{'en': 'Zero Pronoun Resolution with Attention-based Neural Network', 'ar': 'قرار ضمير صفري مع الشبكة العصبية القائمة على الانتباه', 'fr': "Résolution de pronom zéro avec réseau de neurones basé sur l'attention", 'pt': 'Resolução de pronome zero com rede neural baseada em atenção', 'es': 'Resolución de pronombres cero con red neuronal basada en la atención', 'ja': 'アテンションベースのニューラルネットワークによる代名詞ゼロの解像度', 'zh': '盖注意之神经网络零代词分辨率', 'ru': 'Разрешение нулевого местоимения с нейронной сетью, основанной на внимании', 'hi': 'ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ शून्य सर्वनाम संकल्प', 'ga': 'Rún Forainm nialasach le Líonra Néarúil bunaithe ar Aird', 'ka': 'Null Pronoun Resolution with Attention-based Neural Network', 'hu': 'Zéró névmások felbontása figyelem alapú neurális hálózattal', 'el': 'Μηδέν ανάλυση προφορών με νευρωνικό δίκτυο βασισμένο στην προσοχή', 'it': "Risoluzione zero dei pronomi con rete neurale basata sull'attenzione", 'kk': 'Тәртіпке негізделген нейрондық желімен null таңбаша айырмашылығы', 'lt': 'Nulinė nutraukimo nutraukimas su dėmesiu pagrįstu neurologiniu tinklu', 'ms': 'Resolusi Daerah Zero dengan Rangkaian Neural berdasarkan Perhatian', 'mk': 'Резолуција на нула промена со неврална мрежа базирана на внимание', 'ml': 'ശ്രദ്ധ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റുവര്\u200dക്കുമുള്ള പ്രോണോന്\u200d റിസ്റ്റല്\u200d വിശദീകരണം', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд Zero Pronoun Resolution', 'mt': 'Riżoluzzjoni ta’ Pronom żero b’Netwerk Newrali bbażat fuq l-Attenzjoni', 'no': 'Null progrunnløysing med merksomhetsbasert neuralnettverk', 'pl': 'Rozdzielczość zerowych zaimków z siecią neuronową opartą na uwadze', 'ro': 'Rezoluția zero a pronunțelor cu rețeaua neurală bazată pe atenție', 'sr': 'Nula proizvodnja rezolucija sa neuronskom mrežom na osnovu pažnje', 'si': 'සීරෝ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිශීල විශේෂණය සමග අවධානය සඳහා', 'ur': 'ذخیرے-بنیادی نیورال نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ صفر پرون ریزوشن', 'sv': 'Lösning av nollpronomen med uppmärksamhetsbaserat neuralt nätverk', 'ta': 'Comment', 'so': 'Zero Pronoun Resolution with Attention-based Neural Network', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Không tuyên thệ với mạng thần kinh chú ý', 'bg': 'Нулева резолюция на местоименията с невронна мрежа, базирана на вниманието', 'hr': 'Nula proizvodnja rezolucija s neuronskom mrežom na temelju pažnje', 'nl': 'Zero Pronoun Resolutie met aandacht gebaseerd neuraal netwerk', 'id': 'Resolusi Pronoun Zero dengan Jaringan Neural berdasarkan perhatian', 'da': 'Nul pronomen opløsning med opmærksomhedsbaseret neural netværk', 'de': 'Null Pronomen Auflösung mit aufmerksamkeitsbasiertem neuronalem Netzwerk', 'sw': 'Hudumu zisizo na ujasiri na Mtandao wa Neural wenye msimamo mkali', 'ko': '주의에 기초한 신경 네트워크 제로 대명사 해소', 'fa': 'حل\u200cسازی صفر با شبکه عصبی بر پایه توجه', 'tr': 'Attention-daýry Närally Aýry bilen Nusgala Taýýarlama', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Ուշադրության հիմնված նյարդային ցանցով զրո պրոնոուն լուծում', 'af': 'Nuwe Pronoun Resolusie met Aangaande-gebaseerde Neuralnetwerk', 'sq': 'Zgjidhje zero me rrjetin nervor të bazuar në vëmendje', 'az': 'N…ôyral Aƒüƒ± il…ô N…ôyral S…ôviyy…ôsi', 'bn': 'মনোযোগ ভিত্তিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে শূন্য প্রধান রিসেশন', 'ca': "Resolució del Pronom Zero amb Rede Neural basada en l'atenció", 'bs': 'Nula Pronoun Resolution sa neuronskom mrežom na temelju pažnje', 'cs': 'Nulové rozlišení zájmenů s neuronovou sítí založenou na pozornosti', 'et': 'Nullresolutsioon tähelepanupõhise neurovõrguga', 'fi': 'Zero Pronomin Resolution with Attention based Neural Network', 'jv': 'Nulo Pronon Resolution nganggo Atténtion-basa Neral Network', 'sk': 'Ničelna ločljivost zaimka z nevronskim omrežjem, ki temelji na pozornosti', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'פיתרון אפס עם רשת עצבית מבוססת תשומת לב', 'bo': 'རྟོགས་པ་ལྟར་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་དབང་བའི་དྲ་བ་དང་Zero རྩ་མེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག་ཐག་'}
{'en': 'Recent neural network methods for zero pronoun resolution explore multiple models for generating representation vectors for zero pronouns and their candidate antecedents. Typically, contextual information is utilized to encode the zero pronouns since they are simply gaps that contain no actual content. To better utilize contexts of the zero pronouns, we here introduce the self-attention mechanism for encoding zero pronouns. With the help of the multiple hops of attention, our model is able to focus on some informative parts of the associated texts and therefore produces an efficient way of encoding the zero pronouns. In addition, an attention-based recurrent neural network is proposed for encoding candidate antecedents by their contents. Experiment results are encouraging : our proposed attention-based model gains the best performance on the Chinese portion of the OntoNotes corpus, substantially surpasses existing Chinese zero pronoun resolution baseline systems.', 'ar': 'تستكشف طرق الشبكة العصبية الحديثة لتحليل الضمائر الصفرية نماذج متعددة لتوليد نواقل تمثيل للضمائر الصفرية وسوابقهم المرشحة. عادةً ما يتم استخدام المعلومات السياقية لتشفير الضمائر الصفرية لأنها مجرد فجوات لا تحتوي على محتوى فعلي. للاستفادة بشكل أفضل من سياقات الضمائر الصفرية ، نقدم هنا آلية الانتباه الذاتي لتشفير الضمائر الصفرية. بمساعدة قفزات الانتباه المتعددة ، فإن نموذجنا قادر على التركيز على بعض الأجزاء المفيدة من النصوص المرتبطة ، وبالتالي ينتج طريقة فعالة لتشفير الضمائر الصفرية. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، تم اقتراح شبكة عصبية متكررة قائمة على الانتباه لتشفير السوابق المرشحة من خلال محتوياتها. نتائج التجربة مشجعة: يكتسب نموذجنا المقترح المستند إلى الانتباه أفضل أداء على الجزء الصيني من مجموعة OntoNotes ، ويتجاوز بشكل كبير أنظمة خط الأساس الصينية لحل ضمير الصفر.', 'pt': 'Métodos recentes de redes neurais para resolução de pronome zero exploram vários modelos para gerar vetores de representação para pronomes zero e seus antecedentes candidatos. Normalmente, a informação contextual é utilizada para codificar os pronomes zero, uma vez que são simplesmente lacunas que não contêm conteúdo real. Para melhor utilizar os contextos dos pronomes zero, apresentamos aqui o mecanismo de autoatenção para codificar os pronomes zero. Com a ajuda dos múltiplos saltos de atenção, nosso modelo é capaz de se concentrar em algumas partes informativas dos textos associados e, portanto, produz uma maneira eficiente de codificar os pronomes zero. Além disso, uma rede neural recorrente baseada em atenção é proposta para codificar antecedentes candidatos por seus conteúdos. Os resultados do experimento são encorajadores: nosso modelo baseado em atenção proposto obtém o melhor desempenho na porção chinesa do corpus OntoNotes, superando substancialmente os sistemas de linha de base de resolução de pronome zero em chinês existentes.', 'fr': "Les méthodes récentes de réseaux neuronaux pour la résolution zéro des pronoms explorent plusieurs modèles pour générer des vecteurs de représentation pour les pronoms zéro et leurs antécédents candidats. Généralement, les informations contextuelles sont utilisées pour coder les pronoms zéro, car ce sont simplement des espaces qui ne contiennent aucun contenu réel. Pour mieux utiliser les contextes des pronoms zéro, nous introduisons ici le mécanisme d'auto-attention pour coder les pronoms zéro. À l'aide des multiples sauts d'attention, notre modèle est capable de se concentrer sur certaines parties informatives des textes associés et produit ainsi un moyen efficace d'encoder les pronoms zéro. En outre, un réseau neuronal récurrent basé sur l'attention est proposé pour coder des antécédents candidats par leur contenu. Les résultats de l'expérience sont encourageants\xa0: le modèle basé sur l'attention que nous proposons obtient les meilleures performances sur la partie chinoise du corpus OntoNotes, surpasse largement les systèmes de référence chinois existants à résolution zéro pronom.", 'es': 'Los métodos recientes de redes neuronales para la resolución de pronombres cero exploran múltiples modelos para generar vectores de representación para los pronombres cero y sus antecedentes candidatos. Por lo general, la información contextual se utiliza para codificar los pronombres cero, ya que son simplemente espacios que no contienen contenido real. Para utilizar mejor los contextos de los pronombres cero, presentamos el mecanismo de autoatención para codificar los pronombres cero. Con la ayuda de los múltiples saltos de atención, nuestro modelo puede centrarse en algunas partes informativas de los textos asociados y, por lo tanto, produce una forma eficiente de codificar los pronombres cero. Además, se propone una red neuronal recurrente basada en la atención para codificar los antecedentes candidatos por su contenido. Los resultados del experimento son alentadores: nuestro modelo basado en la atención propuesto obtiene el mejor rendimiento en la parte china del corpus de OntoNotes, supera sustancialmente los sistemas chinos de base de resolución de pronombres cero existentes.', 'ja': 'ゼロ代名詞解像度のための最近のニューラルネットワーク法は、ゼロ代名詞の表現ベクトルおよびその候補の前段階を生成するための複数のモデルを探索する。典型的には、文脈情報は、ゼロ代名詞を符号化するために利用される。なぜなら、それらは単に実際のコンテンツを含まないギャップであるからである。ゼロ代名詞の文脈をよりよく活用するために、ここではゼロ代名詞をエンコードするための自己注意メカニズムを紹介します。複数の注目のホップの助けを借りて、私たちのモデルは関連するテキストのいくつかの情報提供部分に焦点を当てることができ、したがって、ゼロ代名詞をエンコードする効率的な方法を生み出すことができます。加えて、注意に基づく再帰的ニューラルネットワークは、候補の前兆をその内容によって符号化するために提案される。実験結果は奨励されています。当社の提案されたアテンションベースのモデルは、OntoNotesコーパスの中国部分で最高のパフォーマンスを獲得し、既存の中国語のゼロ代名詞解決ベースラインシステムを実質的に上回っています。', 'zh': '近以零代词分辨率神经网络求为零代词及选前置词成向量数模。 常上下文信以编码零代词,以其不实之间也。 为用零代词上下文,编码零代词自机制。 凡诸跳跃之助,能专注信息,以生编码零代词之效。 又立一递归神经网络,以选前因编码之。 实验曰:令人鼓舞于OntoNotes语料库之中,得最佳者,过于中文零代词分辨率基线统。', 'ru': 'Недавние методы нейронной сети для разрешения нулевого местоимения исследуют несколько моделей для генерации векторов представления для нулевого местоимения и их возможных предшественников. Как правило, контекстная информация используется для кодирования нулевых местоимений, поскольку они представляют собой просто пробелы, которые не содержат фактического содержания. Чтобы лучше использовать контексты нулевых местоимений, мы вводим механизм самовнимания для кодирования нулевых местоимений. С помощью множественных прыжков внимания наша модель способна сосредоточиться на некоторых информативных частях связанных текстов и, следовательно, производит эффективный способ кодирования нулевых местоимений. Кроме того, предложена основанная на внимании рекуррентная нейронная сеть для кодирования потенциальных предшественников по их содержанию. Результаты эксперимента обнадеживают: наша предлагаемая модель, основанная на внимании, набирает лучшую производительность на китайской части тела OntoNotes, существенно превосходит существующие китайские системы базового разрешения с нулевым местоимением.', 'hi': 'शून्य सर्वनाम संकल्प के लिए हाल के तंत्रिका नेटवर्क तरीके शून्य सर्वनाम और उनके उम्मीदवार पूर्ववर्तियों के लिए प्रतिनिधित्व वैक्टर उत्पन्न करने के लिए कई मॉडल का पता लगाते हैं। आमतौर पर, प्रासंगिक जानकारी का उपयोग शून्य सर्वनामों को एन्कोड करने के लिए किया जाता है क्योंकि वे बस अंतराल हैं जिनमें कोई वास्तविक सामग्री नहीं होती है। शून्य सर्वनाम के संदर्भों का बेहतर उपयोग करने के लिए, हम यहां शून्य सर्वनामों को एन्कोडिंग के लिए आत्म-ध्यान तंत्र पेश करते हैं। ध्यान के कई हॉप्स की मदद से, हमारा मॉडल संबंधित ग्रंथों के कुछ जानकारीपूर्ण भागों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने में सक्षम है और इसलिए शून्य सर्वनामों को एन्कोडिंग करने का एक कुशल तरीका पैदा करता है। इसके अलावा, एक ध्यान-आधारित आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क को उनकी सामग्री द्वारा उम्मीदवार पूर्ववर्तियों को एन्कोडिंग करने के लिए प्रस्तावित किया गया है। प्रयोग के परिणाम उत्साहजनक हैं: हमारा प्रस्तावित ध्यान-आधारित मॉडल OntoNotes कॉर्पस के चीनी हिस्से पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, जो मौजूदा चीनी शून्य सर्वनाम रिज़ॉल्यूशन बेसलाइन सिस्टम को काफी हद तक पार करता है।', 'ga': 'Déan iniúchadh ar mhúnlaí iolracha chun veicteoirí ionadaíochta a ghiniúint d’fhorainmneacha nialais agus a réamhinsint iarrthóra. Go hiondúil, úsáidtear faisnéis chomhthéacsúil chun na forainmneacha nialais a ionchódú toisc nach bhfuil iontu ach bearnaí nach bhfuil aon ábhar iarbhír iontu. Chun úsáid níos fearr a bhaint as comhthéacsanna na bhforainmneacha nialasacha, tugaimid isteach anseo an mheicníocht féinaird chun forainmneacha nialais a ionchódú. Le cabhair ó na leannlusanna iolracha aird, tá ár múnla in ann díriú ar roinnt codanna faisnéiseach de na téacsanna a bhaineann leo agus mar sin táirgeann sé bealach éifeachtach chun na forainmneacha nialais a ionchódú. Ina theannta sin, moltar líonra néarach athfhillteach aird-bhunaithe chun réamhshainithe iarrthóra a ionchódú de réir a n-ábhar. Is ábhar misnigh iad torthaí na dturgnamh: baineann ár múnla aird-bhunaithe atá molta an fheidhmíocht is fearr amach ar an gcuid Síneach de chorpas OntoNotes, sáraíonn sé go suntasach na córais bhonnlíne um réiteach forainmneacha nialais na Síne atá ann cheana féin.', 'hu': 'A legújabb neurális hálózati módszerek nulla névmások felbontására több modellt vizsgálnak a nulla névmásokhoz és azok jelölt előzményeihez való reprezentációs vektorok generálására. Általában a kontextuális információkat használják a nulla névmások kódolására, mivel azok egyszerűen hiányosságok, amelyek nem tartalmaznak tényleges tartalmat. A nulla névmások kontextusainak jobb kihasználása érdekében bemutatjuk a nulla névmások kódolásának önfigyelő mechanizmusát. A többszörös figyelemfelkeltés segítségével modellünk képes a kapcsolódó szövegek néhány információs részére összpontosítani, így hatékony módot teremt a nulla névmások kódolására. Emellett figyelem-alapú visszatérő neurális hálózatot javasolunk a jelöltek előzményeinek tartalma szerinti kódolására. A kísérleti eredmények bátorítóak: a javasolt figyelem-alapú modellünk az OntoNotes korpusz kínai részén a legjobb teljesítményt nyeri, lényegesen meghaladja a meglévő kínai nulla névmások felbontásának alaprendszereit.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες μέθοδοι νευρωνικών δικτύων για την ανάλυση μηδενικής αντωνυμίας εξερευνούν πολλαπλά μοντέλα για τη δημιουργία διανυσμάτων αναπαράστασης για μηδενικές αντωνυμίες και υποψήφιες προγενέστερές τους. Συνήθως, οι πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος χρησιμοποιούνται για να κωδικοποιήσουν τις αντωνυμίες μηδενικού δεδομένου ότι είναι απλά κενά που δεν περιέχουν πραγματικό περιεχόμενο. Για να αξιοποιήσουμε καλύτερα τα πλαίσια των μηδενικών αντωνυμίων, εδώ εισάγουμε τον μηχανισμό αυτοπροσοχής για την κωδικοποίηση μηδενικών αντωνυμίων. Με τη βοήθεια των πολλαπλών ορμήσεων προσοχής, το μοντέλο μας είναι σε θέση να επικεντρωθεί σε κάποια ενημερωτικά μέρη των σχετικών κειμένων και επομένως παράγει έναν αποτελεσματικό τρόπο κωδικοποίησης των αντωνυμίων μηδέν. Επιπλέον, προτείνεται ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο βασισμένο στην προσοχή για την κωδικοποίηση υποψηφίων προγενέστερων στοιχείων από το περιεχόμενό τους. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων είναι ενθαρρυντικά: το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο που βασίζεται στην προσοχή κερδίζει την καλύτερη απόδοση στο κινεζικό τμήμα του σώματος ξεπερνά σημαντικά τα υπάρχοντα κινεζικά συστήματα ανάλυσης μηδενικής αντωνυμίας.', 'ka': 'ახლა ნეიროლური ქსელის მეტოვები ნულ პრონუუნის რეზიოციაციისთვის მრავალური მოდელეების გამოყენება ნულ პრონუმენტებისთვის და მათი კანდიდენტის ანტერე ტიპულად, კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია გამოიყენება ნულის გამოსახულების კოდირებისთვის, რადგან ისინი მხოლოდ არიან განსხვავებები, რომელიც არ აქვს რეალურ ჩვენ უკეთესი გამოყენებლად ნულ გამოსახულებების კონტექსტის გამოყენება, აქ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენებთ ნულ გამოსახულებების სივ ჩვენი მოდელი შეუძლია აღმოჩენოთ რამდენიმე ინფორმაციური ტექსტის ნაწილი და ამიტომ აღმოჩენოთ ძალიან ეფექტიური ფორმაციის კოდიფიკაციის გარეშე. დამატებით, მისი შემდგომარებით კონდიდენტის ანტეცენტების კონდიდენტის კონდიდენტების კონდიდენტირებისთვის გადაწყვეტილება. გამოცდილებების შედეგი უფრო ძალიან გახდება: ჩვენი წარმოიდგინეთ მოდელის დაახლოებით მოდელის უკეთესი გამოცდილება OntoNotes კოპუსის კოპუსის ჩინეთის ნაწილი ნაწილი, ძალიან უფრო მეტი ჩ', 'kk': 'Жуырдағы невралдық желі әдістері нөл белгілер мен кандидаттарының алдындағы белгілерді құру үшін бірнеше үлгілер іздейді. Жалпы түрде, контексті мәлімет нөл белгілерді кодтау үшін қолданылады, өйткені олар тек шын мазмұны жоқ бос орындар болып тұрады. Нөл белгілерінің контексттерін жақсы қолдану үшін, осы жерде нөл белгілерді кодтамыз үшін өзіміздің өзіміздің өзіміздің қарсы механизмін келтіреміз. Бірнеше қызықтың көмегімен, біздің үлгіміз қатынаған мәтіндердің бірнеше мәлімет бөлшектеріне көмектесе алады, сондықтан нөл сөздердің кодтамасын көмектесе алады. Қосымша, қайталанатын невралды желінің мазмұнымен кодтамасы үшін қолданылады. Тәжірибенің нәтижелері көмектеседі: біздің таңдау үлгіміз OntoNotes корпусының қытайсық бөлігінің ең жақсы ықтималдығын жеткізеді, бар қытайсық нөл мөлшерлеменің айырмашылығының негізгі', 'it': "I recenti metodi di rete neurale per la risoluzione zero dei pronomi esplorano modelli multipli per generare vettori di rappresentazione per i pronomi zero e i loro antecedenti candidati. Tipicamente, le informazioni contestuali vengono utilizzate per codificare i pronomi zero poiché sono semplicemente lacune che non contengono contenuti reali. Per utilizzare meglio i contesti dei pronomi zero, qui introduciamo il meccanismo di auto-attenzione per codificare pronomi zero. Con l'aiuto dei molteplici salti di attenzione, il nostro modello è in grado di concentrarsi su alcune parti informative dei testi associati e quindi produce un modo efficiente di codificare i pronomi zero. Inoltre, una rete neurale ricorrente basata sull'attenzione è proposta per codificare i candidati antecedenti dal loro contenuto. I risultati degli esperimenti sono incoraggianti: il nostro modello basato sull'attenzione proposto ottiene le migliori prestazioni sulla porzione cinese del corpus OntoNotes, supera sostanzialmente i sistemi di base cinesi a risoluzione zero dei pronomi.", 'lt': 'Recent neural network methods for zero pronoun resolution explore multiple models for generating representation vectors for zero pronouns and their candidate antecedents.  Paprastai kontekstinė informacija naudojama nuliniams reiškiniams koduoti, nes tai tik spragos, kuriose faktinio turinio nėra. Siekiant geriau panaudoti nulinių išraiškų kontekstus, mes čia įvedame savarankiško dėmesio mechanizmą nulinių išraiškų kodavimui. Pagal daugelį dėmesio apynių, mūsų model is gali sutelkti dėmesį į tam tikras informacines susijusių tekstų dalis ir todėl sukurti veiksmingą būdą koduoti nulinius išreiškimus. Be to, siūlomas dėmesiu grindžiamas nuolatinis nervų tinklas, koduojantis kandidatų antecedentus pagal jų turinį. Eksperimentų rezultatai yra skatinantys: mūsų pasiūlytas dėmesiu pagrįstas modelis įgyja geriausius Kinijos OntoNotes korpus dalies rezultatus, gerokai viršija esamas Kinijos nulinės aiškios pertvarkymo bazines sistemas.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните методи на нервната мрежа за нула резолуција истражуваат повеќе модели за генерирање на репрезентациски вектори за нула резолуции и нивните кандидатски предходи. Типично, контекстуалните информации се користат за кодирање на нула промени бидејќи тие се едноставно празнини кои не содржат вистинска содржина. За подобро да ги искористиме контекстите на нулските промени, овде го воведуваме механизмот за самовнимание за кодирање на нулските промени. Со помош на многуте скокови на внимание, нашиот модел може да се фокусира на некои информативни делови од поврзаните тексти и со тоа произведува ефикасен начин за кодирање на нула изрази. Покрај тоа, се предложува рецидентна нервна мрежа базирана на внимание за кодирање на кандидатските претходни случаи по нивната содржина. Резултатите од експериментите се охрабрувачки: нашиот предложен модел базиран на внимание ја добива најдобрата резултатност на кинескиот дел од корпусот Онто Нотес, значително ги надминува постоечките кинески системи со нула резолуција.', 'ml': 'പൂജ്യത്തിനുള്ള പ്രോയോണ്\u200d റിസ്റ്റല്\u200d നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d രേഖകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുക പൂജ്യത്തിനും പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിയായ ആന്\u200dറെസെന്\u200dറുകള്\u200dക്ക സാധാരണ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പൂജ്യത്തിന്റെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി എക്കോഡ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d ഇല്ലാത്ത പലത To better utilize contexts of the zero pronouns, we here introduce the self-attention mechanism for encoding zero pronouns.  പല പ്രതീക്ഷകളുടെ സഹായം കൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ചില ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, അതുകൊണ്ട് സംബന്ധിച്ചിടത്തോളം വിവരങ് കൂടാതെ, പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ആന്\u200dറെസെഡന്റുകള്\u200d കോഡിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി ആലോചിക്കുന പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ആശ്വാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നുണ്ട്: ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രോദ്ദേശിച്ച ശ്രദ്ധ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡല്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dടോയോട്ട് കോര്\u200dപ്സിന്റെ ചൈനീസ് ഭാഗം ഏറ്റവും നല', 'ms': 'Kaedah rangkaian saraf baru-baru ini untuk resolusi pronon sifar mengeksplorasi model berbilang untuk menghasilkan vektor perwakilan untuk pronon sifar dan anteceden calon mereka. Biasanya, maklumat kontekstual digunakan untuk mengekod pronun sifar kerana ia hanya kosong yang mengandungi tiada kandungan sebenar. To better utilize contexts of the zero pronouns, we here introduce the self-attention mechanism for encoding zero pronouns.  With the help of the multiple hops of attention, our model is able to focus on some informative parts of the associated texts and therefore produces an efficient way of encoding the zero pronouns.  Selain itu, rangkaian saraf berkurang berdasarkan perhatian diusulkan untuk mengekodkan anteceden calon oleh kandungan mereka. Keputusan eksperimen menggoda: model berdasarkan perhatian yang diusulkan kita mendapatkan prestasi terbaik pada bahagian Cina dari OntoNotes corpus, secara berasaskan melebihi sistem dasar resolusi kosong Cina yang wujud.', 'no': 'Nyleg brukte neuralnettverksmetodar for null-oppløysing utforskar fleire modeller for å laga representasjonsvectorar for null-oppløysing og kandidatanten. Vanlegvis vert kontekstinformasjonen bruka til å koda null- uttrykk sidan dei er enkelt mellomrom som inneheld ingen faktisk innhald. For å bedre bruka kontekstane av nullstrekningane, introduserer vi denne selvmerkingsmekanismekanismenyen for koding av nullstrekningar. Med hjelp av fleire oppmerkshopp er modellen vårt i stand til å fokusera på noen informativ deler av den tilknytte teksten, og derfor produserer ein effektiv måte å koda null-uttrykk. I tillegg foreslår eit oppmerksomhetsbasert rekurserande neuralnettverk for koding av kandidatantenten etter innhaldet. Eksperimentresultatet er stimulering: vår foreslått oppmerksbasert modell får den beste utviklinga på den kinesiske delen av OntoNotes-korpusen, og overgår det eksisterande kinesiske null-oppløysingssystemet.', 'mt': 'Metodi reċenti tan-netwerk newrali għal riżoluzzjoni żero pronoun jesploraw mudelli multipli għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ vetturi ta’ rappreżentanza għal pronouns żero u l-anteċedenti kandidati tagħhom. Typically, contextual information is utilized to encode zero pronouns since they are simply gaps that contain no actual content. Biex nikutilizzaw aħjar il-kuntesti tal-pronouns żero, hawnhekk nintroduċu l-mekkaniżmu ta’ awtonomija għall-kodifikazzjoni tal-pronouns żero. Bl-għajnuna tal-ħops multipli ta’ attenzjoni, il-mudell tagħna huwa kapaċi jiffoka fuq xi partijiet informativi tat-testi assoċjati u għalhekk jipproduċi mod effiċjenti ta’ kodifikazzjoni tal-pronomi żero. Barra minn hekk, huwa propost netwerk newrali rikorrenti bbażat fuq l-attenzjoni għall-kodifikazzjoni tal-anteċedenti kandidati bil-kontenut tagħhom. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti huma inkoraġġanti: il-mudell propost tagħna bbażat fuq l-attenzjoni jikseb l-aħjar prestazzjoni fuq il-porzjon Ċiniż tal-OntoNotes corpus, jaqbeż b’mod sostanzjali s-sistemi ta’ referenza eżistenti Ċiniżi b’riżoluzzjoni żero pronoun.', 'mn': 'Нэг хэлбэрийн шийдвэрлэлийн шийдвэрлэлийн шийдвэрлэлийн сүүлийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний арга нь тэр хэлбэрийн хэлбэрүүдийг боловсруулахын тулд олон загваруудыг судалж байна. Олон тохиолдолд, нөхцөл мэдээлэл нь шууд хэлбэрүүдийг кодлохын тулд хэрэглэгддэг. Яагаад гэвэл тэд зүгээр л бодит бүтээгдэхүүн байхгүй зай юм. Зуун утга хэмжээсүүдийг илүү сайн ашиглахын тулд бид энд 0 утга хэмжээсүүдийг кодлох өөртөө анхаарлын механизмийг танилцуулна. Олон төрлийн анхаарлын тусламжтайгаар бидний загвар нь холбоотой хэсгийг мэдээллийн хэсэг дээр анхаарлаа хандуулж, тэгш утгыг кодлох эерэг арга болгодог. Үүнээс гадна анхаарлын үндсэн дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээ нь тэдний бүтээгдэхүүний хэмжээсүүдийг кодлох боломжтой санал болно. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн анхаарлын загвар OntoNotes корпусын хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг олж авдаг. Хятад 0-н шалгалтын шалгалтын суурь системээс илүү өндөр байна.', 'ro': 'Metodele recente de rețea neurală pentru rezoluția pronumelor zero explorează mai multe modele pentru generarea vectorilor de reprezentare pentru pronumele zero și antecedentele lor candidate. De obicei, informațiile contextuale sunt utilizate pentru a codifica pronumele zero, deoarece acestea sunt pur și simplu goluri care nu conțin conținut real. Pentru a utiliza mai bine contextele pronumelor zero, introducem aici mecanismul de auto-atenție pentru codificarea pronumelor zero. Cu ajutorul multiplelor salturi de atenție, modelul nostru este capabil să se concentreze asupra unor părți informative ale textelor asociate și, prin urmare, produce o modalitate eficientă de codificare a pronumelor zero. În plus, este propusă o rețea neurală recurentă bazată pe atenție pentru codificarea antecedentelor candidate prin conținutul lor. Rezultatele experimentelor sunt încurajatoare: modelul nostru bazat pe atenție propus obține cea mai bună performanță pe porțiunea chineză a corpului OntoNotes, depășește substanțial sistemele de bază existente cu rezoluție zero de pronume chinezești.', 'pl': 'Najnowsze metody sieci neuronowej dla zerowej rozdzielczości zaimków badają wiele modeli generowania wektorów reprezentacyjnych dla zaimków zerowych i ich kandydatów poprzednich. Zazwyczaj informacje kontekstowe są wykorzystywane do kodowania zaimków zerowych, ponieważ są one po prostu lukami, które nie zawierają rzeczywistej treści. Aby lepiej wykorzystać konteksty zaimków zerowych, wprowadzamy tutaj mechanizm samo-uwagi kodowania zaimków zerowych. Dzięki wielokrotnym skokom uwagi, nasz model jest w stanie skupić się na niektórych informacyjnych częściach powiązanych z nim tekstów, a tym samym tworzy skuteczny sposób kodowania zaimków zerowych. Ponadto proponuje się opartą na uwadze powtarzającą się sieć neuronową do kodowania kandydatów poprzedzających ich treścią. Wyniki eksperymentów są zachęcające: nasz proponowany model oparty na uwadze zyskuje najlepszą wydajność w chińskiej części korpusu OntoNotes, znacznie przewyższa istniejące chińskie systemy bazowe o zerowej rozdzielczości zaimków.', 'sr': 'Nedavne metode neuralne mreže za nulu rezoluciju pronouna istražuju višestruke modele za stvaranje vektora zastupanja za nulu proglašavanja i njihove kandidatske predsednike. Tipično, kontekstualne informacije se koriste za kodiranje nule izraze jer su prosto praznine koje ne sadrže pravog sadržaja. Da bismo bolje iskoristili kontekste nule proglašavanja, ovde predstavljamo mehanizam samopouzdanja za kodiranje nule proglašavanja. Uz pomoć višestrukih nada pažnje, naš model je u stanju da se fokusira na neke informativne dijelove povezanih tekstova i stoga proizvodi efikasan naèin kodiranja nulih izraza. Osim toga, na pažnji se predlaže rekonstruirana neuralna mreža za kodiranje kandidatskih predsednika njihovih sadržaja. Rezultati iskustva su ohrabrujući: naš predloženi model na pažnji dobija najbolji izvod na kineskom dijelu korpusa OntoNotes, značajno prelazi postojećim kineskim sistemima za rezoluciju nule pronoun.', 'so': 'Teqooyinka shabakadda neurada ee xalliga nuurka ah ayaa baari kara tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo loo sameynayo wadooyin la wakiil ah oo lagu sameynayo noocyo nuurad ah iyo dhaqdhaqaaqa kandida ah. Sida caadiga ah macluumaadka joogtada ah waxaa loo isticmaalaa in la koobo nuurka, sababtoo ah waa goobaha aan ku jirin waxyaabaha rasmiga ah. Si aan ugu fiican u isticmaalno xilliyada nuurka, halkan waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa meyminiyada iskuulka ah si aan u qorno nuurka. Sida caawimaadda rajada badan ee la jeedo, modellkayagu wuxuu ku kalsoonaan karaa qeybaha macluumaadka ah ee qoraalka la xidhiidha, sidaas darteed wuxuu sameynayaa qaab faa’iido ah oo ku kooban karta nuurka. Waxaa sidoo kale looga jeedaa shabakadda neurada ee ku soo socda oo lagu soo jeedo inaad qorsheyso alaabta kandida ah oo ku jirta. Imtixaanka waxaa la dhiirrigelinayaa: Tusaale la soo jeeday oo aad looga jeedo, wuxuu ka helaa habka ugu wanaagsan ee ku saabsan qaybta Shiinaha ee OntoNotes, si gaar ah ayaa u kordhiya nidaamka kooxaha ah oo ku qoran Xiino.', 'sv': 'Nya neurala nätverksmetoder för noll pronomen upplösning utforskar flera modeller för att generera representationsvektorer för noll pronomen och deras kandidatföreteelser. Vanligtvis används kontextuell information för att koda nollpronomen eftersom de helt enkelt är luckor som inte innehåller något verkligt innehåll. För att bättre utnyttja kontexter av nollpronomen introducerar vi här självuppmärksamhetsmekanismen för kodning av nollpronomen. Med hjälp av de många hoppen av uppmärksamhet kan vår modell fokusera på några informativa delar av de associerade texterna och därmed producera ett effektivt sätt att koda nollpronomen. Dessutom föreslås ett uppmärksamhetsbaserat återkommande neuralt nätverk för kodning av kandidatföreteelser genom deras innehåll. Experimentsresultaten är uppmuntrande: vår föreslagna uppmärksamhetsbaserade modell får bästa prestanda på den kinesiska delen av OntoNotes korpus, överträffar avsevärt befintliga kinesiska nollpronomnsupplösning baslinje system.', 'si': 'ශූන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්න විශේෂණය සඳහා අලුත් න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය විධානය සඳහා ශූන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්න වෙක්ටර් වලට ප්\u200dරතිශ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්, සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරකාරයක් සංකේතනය කරන්න භාවිත කරනවා ඒවා ඇත්තටම සාමාන්ය නැති  ශූන්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන හොඳට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න, අපි මෙතන ස්වාම්ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවධානය කරන්න සුන්න අවධානය ගොඩක් බලාපොරොත්තු විශේෂයේ උදව් සමග, අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන්  ඒවගේම, ඔවුන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dයත්වයෙන් සංකේතනය සඳහා අවධානය සඳහා ආපහු ආපහු ප්\u200dරතිකාර න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා: අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ අන්ටෝනො', 'ur': 'نورول نیٹ ورک روشنی کے لئے صفر کی روشنی کے لئے بہت سی موڈل کا اظہار کرتا ہے کہ صفر کے نقطے اور ان کے کنڈیٹ آنٹیسڈینٹ کے لئے نمایش ویکتروں کو ایجاد کریں۔ طبیعی طور پر، کنٹکسٹیل معلومات صفر کی تعریف کے لئے استعمال کی جاتی ہے، کیونکہ وہ صرف فاصلے ہیں جن میں کوئی حقیقی معلومات نہیں ہے. صفر کی کنٹکسٹس کو اچھی طرح استعمال کرنے کے لئے، ہم یہاں صفر کی تعریف کے لئے اپنی ذات توجه کی مکانیزی پیش کریں گے. ہماری مدل مشورت کے چند ہپ کے مطابق ہے، ہماری مدل تعلق کے چند معلومات قسموں پر تمرکز کرسکتا ہے، اور اس لئے صفر کی تعلق کا ایک مفید طریقہ پیدا کرتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، ایک دوبارہ توجه کی بنیادی نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک ان کے منزلوں کے ذریعے کوڈینڈ کیڈیٹ آنٹیسڈینٹ کے لئے پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے. آزمائش نتیجے تحمل کرنے والے ہیں: ہمارے پیشنهاد کی توجه کی موڈل OntoNotes کورپوس کے سب سے بہترین فعالیت حاصل کرتا ہے، بہت زیادہ زیادہ سے زیادہ جاتا ہے جو موجود چین صفر وضعیت ریزیولین سیستموں میں ہے.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் பூஜ்ஜியமான தெளிவுத்திறனுக்கான புதிய பிணைய முறைமைகள் பூஜ்ஜியத்திற்கும் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் புள்ளிகளுக்கும் த பொதுவாக, தற்போதைய தகவல் பூஜ்ஜியத்தை குறியீட்டாக்க பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது ஏனெனில் அவை உண்மையான உள்ளடக்கங்கள் இல்லாத இடைவெள பூஜ்ஜியத்தை பயன்படுத்த முறைமை பல்வேறு உபதேசத்தைக் கொண்டு எங்கள் மாதிரி தொடர்புடைய உரைகளின் சில தகவல் பகுதிகளை கவனம் செலுத்த முடியும் அதனால் பூஜ்ஜியத்தை குறியீட்டும்  மேலும், ஒரு கவனம் அடிப்படையில் இருந்து திரும்ப நெருக்கல் வலைப்பின்னல் திரும்ப பரிந்துரைக்கப்படுகிறது, தங்கள் உள்ளடக முயற்சி முடிவுகள் ஆச்சரியமாக இருக்கிறது: எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட கவனத்தை அடிப்படையில் சீனா பகுதியில் சிறந்த செயல்பாடு பெறுகிறது, பெருக்கியமாக நடப்', 'uz': "Name Oddiy, doim maʼlumot nuqta kodlash uchun ishlatiladi, chunki ular faqat mavjud emas. Biz bu yerda hech narsalarni hech narsa kodlash uchun o'zimni o'zgartiraymiz. Ko'pchilik ravishda, modelmiz bog'liq matnlarning bir haqida ma'lumot qismlariga foydalanadi va shunday qilib bu narsalarni hech narsa kodlash uchun yetarli yordam beradi. Davom etish uchun davom etilgan tarmoq tarkibini ishlatiladi. Name", 'vi': 'Các phương pháp mạng thần kinh gần đây để giải quyết từ không phát đại từ sẽ tìm ra nhiều mẫu để tạo ra các môi trường đại diện bằng không và khả năng trước đó. Thông tin ngữ cảnh thường được dùng để mã hóa các đại từ không vì chúng chỉ là những lỗ hổng không chứa nội dung thực tế. Để sử dụng các mặt từ không tốt hơn, chúng tôi xin giới thiệu cơ chế tự chú ý để tạo ra các từ không. Bằng sự giúp đỡ của nhiều bông hoa chú ý, mẫu của chúng ta có thể tập trung vào một số bộ phận thông tin của các văn bản liên kết và tạo ra một cách hiệu quả để mã hóa các đại từ không. Thêm vào đó, một mạng thần kinh lưu động dựa vào sự chú ý được đề xuất để mã hóa những bước trước của ứng cử viên. Kết quả thí nghiệm rất tích cực: mẫu tập trung của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả tốt nhất trên phần Trung Quốc của Tập thể OntoNotes, vượt qua nhiều hệ thống cơ bản phân giải không đại từ Trung Quốc đã có.', 'bg': 'Последните методи на невронната мрежа за нулева резолюция на местоименията изследват множество модели за генериране на вектори за представяне на нулеви местоимения и техните кандидат-предшественици. Обикновено контекстуалната информация се използва за кодиране на нулевите местоимения, тъй като те са просто пропуски, които не съдържат действително съдържание. За да използваме по-добре контекстите на нулевите местоимения, тук въвеждаме механизма за самовнимание за кодиране на нулеви местоимения. С помощта на многобройните скокове на внимание нашият модел е в състояние да се фокусира върху някои информативни части от свързаните текстове и следователно създава ефективен начин за кодиране на нулевите местоимения. В допълнение, базирана на вниманието рецидивираща невронна мрежа е предложена за кодиране на кандидат-предшественици по тяхното съдържание. Резултатите от експериментите са окуражаващи: нашият предложен модел, базиран на вниманието, печели най-доброто представяне на китайската част от корпуса значително надминава съществуващите китайски базови системи с нулева резолюция на местоименията.', 'da': 'Nylige neurale netværksmetoder til nul pronomen opløsning undersøger flere modeller til at generere repræsentationsvektorer for nul pronomen og deres kandidatforudgående. Typisk bruges kontekstuelle oplysninger til at kode nul pronomen, da de simpelthen er huller, der ikke indeholder noget faktisk indhold. For bedre at udnytte sammenhænge af nul pronomen, introducerer vi her selvopmærksomhedsmekanismen til kodning af nul pronomen. Ved hjælp af de mange humle af opmærksomhed, vores model er i stand til at fokusere på nogle informative dele af de tilhørende tekster og producerer derfor en effektiv måde at kode nul pronomen på. Derudover foreslås et opmærksomhedsbaseret tilbagevendende neuralt netværk til kodning af kandidatforløb efter deres indhold. Eksperimentelle resultater er opmuntrende: vores foreslåede opmærksomhedsbaserede model opnår den bedste præstation på den kinesiske del af OntoNotes korpus, overgår væsentligt eksisterende kinesiske nul pronomen opløsning baseline systemer.', 'nl': 'Recente neurale netwerkmethoden voor nul voornaamwoorden resolutie onderzoeken meerdere modellen voor het genereren van representatievectoren voor nul voornaamwoorden en hun kandidaat antecedenten. Meestal wordt contextuele informatie gebruikt om de nulvoornaamwoorden te coderen, omdat ze gewoon gaten zijn die geen werkelijke inhoud bevatten. Om contexten van de nulvoornaamwoorden beter te benutten, introduceren we hier het zelfaandachtsmechanisme voor het coderen van nulvoornaamwoorden. Met behulp van de vele hops van aandacht, is ons model in staat om zich te concentreren op enkele informatieve delen van de bijbehorende teksten en produceert daardoor een efficiënte manier om de nulvoornaamwoorden te coderen. Daarnaast wordt een attentie-based recidivierend neuraal netwerk voorgesteld voor het coderen van kandidaat antecedenten door hun inhoud. De resultaten van het experiment zijn bemoedigend: ons voorgestelde aandachtsgebaseerde model behaalt de beste prestaties op het Chinese deel van het OntoNotes corpus en overtreft de bestaande Chinese nul voornaamwoorden resolutie baseline systemen aanzienlijk.', 'hr': 'Nedavne metode neuralne mreže za nulu rezoluciju pronouna istražuju višestruke modele za stvaranje vektora zastupanja za nule pronouns i njihove kandidatske predsjednice. Obično, kontekstualne informacije se koriste za kodiranje nule izračuna jer su jednostavno praznine koje ne sadrže pravog sadržaja. Da bi se bolje iskoristili konteksti nule izraze, ovdje predstavljamo mehanizam samopouzdanja za kodiranje nule izraze. Uz pomoć višestrukih nadi pažnje, naš model je u mogućnosti fokusirati se na neke informativne dijelove povezanih teksta i stoga proizvodi učinkovit način kodiranja nulnih izraza. Osim toga, ponavlja se rekonstruirana nervna mreža na pažnji za predsjednice kandidata za kodiranje njihovim sadržajem. Rezultati iskustva ohrabruju: naš predloženi model na temelju pažnje dobiva najbolje učinkovito na kineskom dijelu korpusa OntoNotes, značajno prelazi postojeći kineski sustavi početne rezolucije nule pronoun.', 'id': 'Metode jaringan saraf baru-baru ini untuk resolusi zero pronoun mengeksplorasi banyak model untuk menghasilkan vektor representation untuk zero pronouns dan anteceden kandidat mereka. Typically, contextual information is utilized to encode the zero pronouns since they are simply gaps that contain no actual content.  Untuk menggunakan konteks yang lebih baik dari pronon nol, kita di sini memperkenalkan mekanisme perhatian diri untuk mengkode pronon nol. Dengan bantuan dari beberapa lompatan perhatian, model kita dapat fokus pada beberapa bagian informatif dari teks yang terkait dan oleh itu menghasilkan cara efisien untuk mengekodikan pronon nol. In addition, an attention-based recurrent neural network is proposed for encoding candidate antecedents by their contents.  Hasil eksperimen mendorong: model yang disediakan perhatian kami memperoleh prestasi terbaik pada bagian Cina dari OntoNotes corpus, secara substansial melebihi sistem dasar resolusi kosong Cina yang ada.', 'fa': 'روش شبکه عصبی اخیرا برای حل\u200cسازی صفر مدل\u200cهای متعدد برای تولید ویکتورهای نمایش\u200cسازی برای نمایش\u200cسازی صفر و پیشنهاد کاندیداتشان تحقیق می\u200cکنند. معمولاً اطلاعات موضوع برای رمزگذاری صفر استفاده می\u200cشود، زیرا آنها فقط فاصله\u200cهایی هستند که هیچ محتوای واقعی ندارند. برای بهتر استفاده از شرایط صفر، ما اینجا مکانیسم توجه خود را برای رمزبندی صفر معرفی می کنیم. با کمک از آرزوهای متعدد توجه، مدل ما می تواند روی برخی قسمت اطلاعاتی از متن های مرتبط تمرکز کند و به همین دلیل یک راهی موثرتی برای رمزبندی کردن تعریف صفر تولید می کند. علاوه بر این، یک شبکه عصبی بازگشت بر روی توجه برای پیشنهاد کاندیداتی کودکاندیده توسط محتویات آنها پیشنهاد می\u200cشود. نتایج تجربه\u200cها تشویق می\u200cکنند: مدل پیشنهاد ما بر روی توجه بهترین عملکرد در بخش چینی از شرکت\u200cهای OntoNotes، زیادی از سیستم\u200cهای پایین\u200cشناسی صفر چینی موجود می\u200cگذرد.', 'ko': '최근 0대명사 해석에 사용되는 신경 네트워크 방법은 0대명사와 그 후보 선행어를 벡터를 나타내는 여러 모델을 탐색했다.일반적으로 컨텍스트 정보는 실제 컨텐트의 간격만 포함하지 않으므로 대명사 0을 인코딩하는 데 사용됩니다.0대사의 상하문을 더욱 잘 이용하기 위해 우리는 여기서 0대사를 인코딩하는 자기주의 메커니즘을 소개했다.주의를 많이 기울이는 도움 아래 우리 모델은 관련 텍스트의 일부 정보 부분에 집중할 수 있기 때문에 효과적인 제로 대명사 인코딩 방법이 생겼다.또한 주의를 바탕으로 하는 귀속신경 네트워크를 제시하여 후보 선행어의 내용에 따라 후보 선행어를 인코딩하는 데 사용한다.실험 결과는 고무적이다. 우리가 제시한 주의를 바탕으로 한 모델은 본체 주석 어료 라이브러리의 중국어 부분에서 가장 좋은 성능을 얻었고 기존의 중국어 0대어 분별 기선 시스템을 크게 능가했다.', 'de': 'Neuere neuronale Netzwerkmethoden zur Auflösung von Nullpronomen untersuchen mehrere Modelle zur Generierung von Repräsentationsvektoren für Nullpronomen und deren Kandidatenvorzedenten. Normalerweise werden Kontextinformationen verwendet, um die Nullpronomen zu kodieren, da sie einfach Lücken sind, die keinen tatsächlichen Inhalt enthalten. Um Kontexte der Nullpronomen besser zu nutzen, stellen wir hier den Selbstaufmerksamkeitsmechanismus zur Kodierung von Nullpronomen vor. Mit Hilfe des mehrfachen Aufmerksamkeitsspiels ist unser Modell in der Lage, sich auf einige informative Teile der zugehörigen Texte zu konzentrieren und so eine effiziente Methode zur Kodierung der Nullpronomen zu entwickeln. Darüber hinaus wird ein aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes rezidivierendes neuronales Netzwerk vorgeschlagen, um Kandidatenvortecedenten anhand ihres Inhalts zu kodieren. Die Ergebnisse der Experimente sind ermutigend: Unser vorgeschlagenes aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes Modell erzielt die beste Leistung auf dem chinesischen Teil des OntoNotes-Korpus und übertrifft die bestehenden chinesischen Nullpronomen-Auflösungssysteme erheblich.', 'sw': 'Njia za mtandao wa neura za hivi karibuni za kutafuta suluhisho lisilo sahihi kwa ajili ya kutengeneza vector za uwakilizaji sifuri na matukio ya wagombea. Kwa kawaida, taarifa za kawaida zinatumiwa kuweka taarifa sifa kwa sababu ni tofauti ambazo hazina maudhui halisi. Ili kutumia mazingira bora ya matangazo yasiyo na sifa, hapa tunaonyesha mfumo wa kujitegemea kwa ajili ya kutangaza watu sifuri. Kwa msaada wa matumaini mengi ya kusikiliza, mifano yetu inaweza kuhusiana na baadhi ya maeneo ya taarifa ya maandishi yanayohusiana na hivyo inatengeneza njia yenye ufanisi ya kuweka kumbukumbu hizo sifa. Zaidi ya hayo, mtandao unaoendelea kwa mtazamo wa neura unapendekezwa kwa ajili ya kuingiza matukio ya wagombea na yaliyomo ndani yao. Matokeo ya majaribio yanasisitiza: Mradi wetu unaopendekezwa unapata ufanisi bora zaidi katika sehemu ya makampuni ya OntoNotes nchini China, unavutiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa na mfumo wa msingi wa suluhisho wa asili wa China.', 'tr': 'Sıfır pronoun çözümlenmesi için son zamanlarda nöral ağ metodları sıfır sözleşme ve kandidat üyelerini oluşturmak için çoklu modelleri keşfet. Adatça, senediň maglumaty 0 ködlemek üçin ullanylýar, çünki olar hakyky mazmunlary ýok boşluklardyr. 0 aýrymynyň durumlaryny gowy ulanmak üçin, bu ýerde 0 aýrymyny kodlemek üçin öz üns mekanizmasyny girdir. Birnäçe umytlaryň kömegi bilen, biziň modelimiz gerekli metinlerin birnäçe informasiýa bölümlerine üns berip biler we şonuň üçin 0 sözlerini kodlemek üçin etkinlik ýola getirir. Munuň ýene-de, üns berilen nädogry aňry görkezilýän adamlary ködlemeler üçin teklip edildi. Testeniň netijeleri nähili geň bolýar: biziň teklip eden üns tabanly nusgamyz Onto Notlar corpusynyň iň gowy täsirini gazanýar, hem bolan Hytaý nully çözümleme sistemalarynyň üstünden geçýär.', 'af': "Onlangse neuralnetwerk metodes vir nul pronoun resolusie ondersoek veelvuldige modele vir genereer voorstelling vektores vir nul pronouns en hul kandidate antecedente. Tipe, contextual inligting word gebruik om die nul uitdrukkings te kodeer omdat hulle eenvoudig spasies is wat geen werklike inhoud bevat nie. Om beter konteks te gebruik van die nul uitsprekkings, introduseer ons hier die selfaandag mekanisme vir kodering nul uitsprekkings. Met die hulp van die veelvuldige hoop van aandag, is ons model in staat om op sommige informatiewe dele van die geassosieerde teks te fokus en daarom produseer 'n effektief manier van kodering van die nul uitdrukkings. In addition, an attention-based recurrent neural network is proposed for encoding candidate antecedents by their contents. Ons voorgestelde aandag-gebaseerde model verkry die beste prestasie op die Sjinese deel van die OntoNotes corpus, wat betekenlik oortrek bestaande Sjinese nul-oplossing-basiselstelsels.", 'az': 'Sıfır pronoun çözünürlüyü üçün son nöral şəbəkə metodları sıfır pronoun və kandidát tərzlərini yaratmaq üçün çoxlu modelləri keşif edir. Tipik olaraq, müxtəlif məlumat sıfır sözləri kodlamaq üçün istifadə edilir, çünki onlar sadəcə olaraq məlumat içərisində olmayan boşluqlar. Sıfır tərzlərinin müxtəliflərini daha yaxşı istifadə etmək üçün, biz burada sıfır tərzlərini kodlamaq üçün özünü təsirləndiririk. Bircə çoxlu məlumatların köməyi ilə, modellərimiz bağlı məlumatların bəzi informativ parçalarına odaklanabilir və buna görə də sıfır ifadəsi kodlama yolunu yaradır. Üstəlik, dikkat-tabanlı yenidən nöral şəbəkəsi onların içərilərinə görə kodlama qaydaları üçün təklif edilir. Experiment sonuçları təşkil edir: təklif etdiyimiz gözləmə modelimiz OntoNotes korpusunun ən yaxşı performans qəbul edir, həqiqətən də mövcud olan Çin nul pronoun çözünürlük sistemlərindən çox üstün edir.', 'sq': 'Metodat e fundit të rrjetit nervor për zgjidhjen zero-pronoun eksplorojnë modele të shumta për krijimin e vektorëve përfaqësues për zero pronouns dhe antecedentet e tyre kandidate. Tipikisht, informacioni kontekstual përdoret për të koduar pronumet zero pasi ato janë thjesht boshllëk që nuk përmbajnë përmbajtje reale. Për të përdorur më mirë kontekstet e pronumeve zero, ne këtu prezantojmë mekanizmin e vetë-vëmendjes për kodimin e pronumeve zero. Me ndihmën e shumë kërcimeve të vëmendjes, modeli ynë është në gjendje të përqëndrohet në disa pjesë informative të teksteve të lidhura dhe prandaj prodhon një mënyrë të efektshme për kodimin e pronumeve zero. Përveç kësaj, propozohet një rrjet neural i përsëritur i bazuar në vëmendje për kodimin e antecedenteve të kandidatëve nga përmbajtja e tyre. Experiment results are encouraging: our proposed attention-based model gains the best performance on the Chinese portion of the OntoNotes corpus, substantially surpasses existing Chinese zero pronoun resolution baseline systems.', 'am': 'የአሁኑን የኔዌብ መረብ ዘዴዎች በክፍለ ማስታወቂያው የክፍለ ቁጥጥር እና የአካባቢው ነጥቦች በክፍል እና የአካባቢው የክፍለ ምርጫዎችን ለመፍጠር ብዙዎችን ምሳሌዎች ይፈልጋሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የአሁኑን መረጃ የ0 ፕሮጀክቶችን ለማክበር ይጠቅማል፡፡ በክፍለ አካባቢዎችን ለመጠቀም፣ በዚህ የራሳችን ማስታወቂያ አካባቢ ክፍለ አካባቢ ማድረግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ With the help of the multiple hops of attention, our model is able to focus on some informative parts of the associated texts and therefore produces an efficient way of encoding the zero pronouns.  በተጨማሪም፣ የሚቆጠሩ የደዌብ መረብ የሚቆጠሩ የአካባቢው የነጥብ መረብ በመካዳቸው ይዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ያበረታሉ፤ በተዘጋጀው የቻይና ምሳሌ በኦንቶNotes ካርፓስ ላይ የተሻለ የቻይና ክፍል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցի վերջին մեթոդները զրոյի արտահայտության համար ուսումնասիրում են բազմաթիվ մոդելներ, որոնք ստեղծում են զրոյի արտահայտության վեկտորներ և նրանց թեկնածու նախկինում: Սովորաբար, կոնտեքստային ինֆորմացիան օգտագործվում է զրո արտահայտությունների կոդավորման համար, քանի որ դրանք պարզապես բացեր են, որոնք իրական պարունակություն չունեն: Որպեսզի ավելի լավ օգտագործենք զրո արտահայտությունների կոնտեքստները, մենք ներկայացնում ենք ինքնաուշադրության մեխանիզմը զրո արտահայտությունների կոդավորման համար: Ուշադրության բազմաթիվ հույսերի օգնությամբ մեր մոդելը կարողանում է կենտրոնանալ հարաբերված տեքստերի որոշ ինֆորմատիվ մասերի վրա, և դրա համար ստեղծում է զրո արտահայտությունների կոդավորման արդյունավետ միջոց: Ավելին, ուշադրության վրա հիմնված կրկնվող նյարդային ցանց առաջարկում է թեկնածու նախադեպքերը կոդավորելու համար իրենց պարունակության միջոցով: Փորձարկումների արդյունքները խրախուսափելի են. մեր առաջարկած ուշադրության հիմնված մոդելը լավագույն արդյունքն է ստանում Օնտոնոտեսի կորպոսի չինական հատվածի վրա, հիմնականում գերազանցում է գոյություն ունեցող չինական զրոյի բացառ', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক পদ্ধতি শূন্য প্রার্থী এবং প্রার্থীদের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য প্রতিনিধিত্বের ভেক্টর তৈরি করার জন্য সাধারণত, প্রাক্তন তথ্য ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে শুধুমাত্র বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন কোন বিষয়বস্তু নে শূন্য প্রজাতন্ত্রের প্রতিযোগিতা ব্যবহার করার জন্য আমরা এখানে নিজেদের মনোযোগের মাধ্যমে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি শূন্য প্রোজেন্ With the help of the multiple hops of attention, our model is able to focus on some informative parts of the associated texts and therefore produces an efficient way of encoding the zero pronouns.  এছাড়াও প্রার্থীর প্রার্থী অ্যান্টেডেন্ট এনকোড করার প্রস্তাব প্রদান করা হয়েছে পুনরায় মনোযোগের একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়া পরীক্ষার ফলাফল উৎসাহিত হচ্ছে: আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মনোযোগ-ভিত্তিক মডেল অনটনোট কোর্পাসের চীনের ভাগ্যের ভালো প্রভাব অর্জন করেছে, বাস্তবায়িকভাবে বিদ', 'et': 'Hiljutised närvivõrgu meetodid nullpoolse resolutsiooni jaoks uurivad mitmeid mudeleid nullpoolse resolutsiooni ja nende kandidaadi eelkäijate esitusvektorite genereerimiseks. Tüüpiliselt kasutatakse kontekstiteavet nullpronoomide kodeerimiseks, kuna need on lihtsalt lüngad, mis ei sisalda tegelikku sisu. Nullpronoomide kontekstide paremaks kasutamiseks tutvustame siin enesetähelepanu mehhanismi nullpronoomide kodeerimiseks. Mitme tähelepanu hüppe abil on meie mudel võimeline keskenduma mõnele informatiivsele osale seotud tekstidest ja seetõttu loob tõhusa võimaluse kodeerida null-pronomeid. Lisaks pakutakse välja tähelepanupõhine korduv närvivõrk kandidaatide eelnevate kodeerimiseks nende sisu järgi. Eksperimentide tulemused on julgustavad: meie pakutud tähelepanupõhine mudel saavutab parima tulemuse OntoNotes korpuse Hiina osas, ületab oluliselt olemasolevaid Hiina null-pronouni resolutsiooni baassüsteeme.', 'bs': 'Nedavne metode neuralne mreže za nulu rezoluciju pronouna istražuju višestruke modele za stvaranje vektora zastupanja za nule pronouns i njihove kandidatske predsednice. Obično, kontekstualne informacije se koriste za kodiranje nule izraze jer su to prosto praznine koje ne sadrže stvarni sadržaj. Da bismo bolje iskoristili kontekste nule izraze, ovdje predstavljamo mehanizam samopouzdanja za kodiranje nule izraze. Uz pomoć višestrukih nada pažnje, naš model je u stanju fokusirati se na neke informativne dijelove povezanih tekstova i stoga proizvodi efikasan način kodiranja nulnih izraza. Osim toga, na pažnji se predlaže rekonstruirana neuralna mreža za kodiranje kandidatskih predsjednika po njihovom sadržaju. Rezultati iskustva su ohrabrujući: naš predloženi model na pažnji dobiva najbolji učinkovit na kineskom dijelu korpusa OntoNotes, značajno prelazi postojeći kineski sistemi početne rezolucije nule pronoun.', 'cs': 'Nedávné neuronové síťové metody pro nulové rozlišení zájmen zkoumají několik modelů pro generování reprezentačních vektorů pro nulová zájmena a jejich kandidátské předchůdce. Obvykle se kontextové informace používají k kódování nulových zájmen, protože jsou prostě mezery, které neobsahují žádný skutečný obsah. Pro lepší využití kontextů nulových zájmen zde představujeme mechanismus sebe-pozornosti pro kódování nulových zájmen. S pomocí několika zájmů pozornosti se náš model dokáže zaměřit na některé informativní části souvisejících textů a vytvářet tak efektivní způsob kódování nulových zájmen. Navíc je navržena rekurentní neuronová síť založená na pozornosti pro kódování kandidátů předcházejících jejich obsahem. Výsledky experimentů jsou povzbuzující: náš navržený model založený na pozornosti získává nejlepší výkon na čínské části korpusu OntoNotes, podstatně překonává existující systémy čínského nulového rozlišení zájmen.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset neuroverkkomenetelmät nollapronominien resoluutiolle tutkivat useita malleja nollapronominien ja niiden ehdokas-edeltäjien esitysvektorien luomiseksi. Tyypillisesti kontekstitietoa käytetään nollapronominien koodaamiseen, koska ne ovat yksinkertaisesti aukkoja, jotka eivät sisällä todellista sisältöä. Jotta nollapronominien konteksteja voitaisiin hyödyntää paremmin, esittelemme tässä itsepalvelumekanismin nollapronominien koodaamiseen. Monien huomion hyppyjen avulla mallimme pystyy keskittymään joihinkin asiaan liittyvien tekstien informatiivisiin osiin ja tuottaa siten tehokkaan tavan koodata nollapronominit. Lisäksi ehdotetaan huomiota perustuvaa toistuvaa hermoverkkoa, jolla voidaan koodata ehdokkaiden aikaisempia sisältöjä. Kokeiden tulokset ovat rohkaisevia: ehdotettu huomiopohjainen malli saavuttaa parhaan suorituskyvyn OntoNotes-korpusen kiinalaisessa osassa, ylittää huomattavasti olemassa olevat kiinalaiset nollapronominin resoluution perusjärjestelmät.', 'ca': "Recent neural network methods for zero pronoun resolution explore multiple models for generating representation vectors for zero pronouns and their candidate antecedents.  Typically, contextual information is utilized to encode the zero pronouns since they are simply gaps that contain no actual content.  Per utilitzar millor els contextos dels pronons zero, aquí introduim el mecanisme d'auto-atenció per codificar pronons zero. With the help of the multiple hops of attention, our model is able to focus on some informative parts of the associated texts and therefore produces an efficient way of encoding the zero pronouns.  In addition, an attention-based recurrent neural network is proposed for encoding candidate antecedents by their contents.  Experiment results are encouraging: our proposed attention-based model gains the best performance on the Chinese portion of the OntoNotes corpus, substantially surpasses existing Chinese zero pronoun resolution baseline systems.", 'jv': 'System text-tool-action Ora ono nggawe barang gambar aturan tapi nggambar 0 Saiki nglanggar bantuan sampek anyar tentang politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Perintah sing nggawe kno dadi: awak dhéwé wis nggawe modèl sing nyimpen nggawe barang nggawe barang Chinese ning baho kono Onto Notis', 'he': 'שיטות רשת עצבית לאחרונה עבור ריזולוציה אפסית חוקרות דוגמנים רבים לייצור ויקטורים מייצגים עבור אפסי פרסולוציה ולקודמות המועמדים שלהם. בדרך כלל, מידע קונטוקטואלי משתמש כדי לקוד את אפס פרונומים מאחר שהם פשוט פערים שלא מכילים תוכן אמיתי. כדי להשתמש טוב יותר בקשר של אפס פרנומים, אנחנו כאן להציג את מנגנון תשומת לב עצמית לקוד אפס פרנומים. עם עזרת הקפיצות הרבות של תשומת לב, המודל שלנו מסוגל להתמקד בחלקים מידעיים של הטקסטים הקשורים ולכן יוצר דרך יעילה לקוד את אפס פרונומים. בנוסף, מוצעת רשת עצבית חוזרת מבוססת תשומת לב לקוד קודמות מועמדים על ידי התוכן שלהם. תוצאות הניסויים מעודדות: המודל המבוסס על תשומת לב המוצע שלנו משיג את ההופעה הטובה ביותר על החלק הסיני של הקורפוס של אונטו נוטס, מעליף באופן משמעותי מערכות רזולוציה בסיסית סינית אפס קיימות.', 'ha': "Tsarin taruwar neural na yanzu wa buƙata sifuri na buƙata masu buƙata misãlai masu yawa wa mai ƙiƙiro shiryoyi na wakilishi wa masu nuurin propronunan da na kanana. A ɗabi'a, ana yi amfani da amfani da maɓallin takardar da aka kode sifire don su zama kawai gaura da ba ta ƙunsa da maɓallin gaske ba. Kufi amfani da matsayin da za'a nufi ba, za mu nuna kashi na'anar rayukan da za'a kodi nufi. Ga taimakon wasu matumain muhawi masu yawa, misalinmu yana iya iya makini zuwa wani abu na takarda masu husũma na rubutun da aka yi husũma da shi, kuma don haka yana ƙara wani hani mai kamfata ga kodi da sifiri. Da wannan, ana buƙata wata zango mai saukarwa da aka baka zura ido ta fara kwamfyuta don ya kodi surar-tarakin da ke cikin. Ana ƙiyayya matsalar jarrabai: misalinmu wanda aka ƙayyade wa muhalli wa muhimmin fassarar aiki na China na ci mafi kyaun rabon rabon shirin karbon OntoNotes, ana ƙara yana da muhimmi na kasa da tsarin salon na'urar fasalin na KitoNotes.", 'sk': 'Najnovejše metode nevronskega omrežja za ničelno ločljivost zaimkov raziskujejo več modelov za generiranje vektorjev reprezentacije za ničelne zaimke in njihove kandidatne predhodnike. Običajno se kontekstualne informacije uporabljajo za kodiranje ničelnih zaimkov, saj so preprosto vrzeli, ki ne vsebujejo dejanske vsebine. Za boljšo uporabo kontekstov ničelnih zaimkov tukaj uvajamo mehanizem samopozornosti za kodiranje ničelnih zaimkov. S pomočjo večkratnih skokov pozornosti se naš model lahko osredotoči na nekatere informativne dele povezanih besedil in tako ustvari učinkovit način kodiranja ničelnih zaimkov. Poleg tega je predlagana ponavljajoča se živčna mreža, ki temelji na pozornosti, za kodiranje kandidatnih predhodnikov po njihovi vsebini. Rezultati eksperimentov so spodbudni: naš predlagani model, ki temelji na pozornosti, doseže najboljšo učinkovitost kitajskega dela korpusa OntoNotes, bistveno presega obstoječe kitajske osnovne sisteme ničelne ločljivosti zaimkov.', 'bo': '0pronoun་གཞུང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་མཐུད་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་མཐུད་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྟོན་ Typically, contextual information is used to encode the zero pronouns since they are simply gaps that contain no actual content. མིང་ཚིག་ཀླད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདྲ་བེད་སྤྱོད་དགོས་པ་ལས། ང་ཚོས་འདིར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་རང་ཉིད་གནད་སྤེལ་བའི་ཐབས ང་ཚོའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་མཐུན་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཤས་ཤས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས ད་དུང་ཁྱད་པར། གནད་དོན་རྟེན་དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་ངོས་འབྲེལ་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ནང་དོན་ལ་གསལ་བྱེད་པའི་རྣ Experiment results are encouraging: our proposed attention-based model gains the best performance of the OntoNotes corpus, substantially surpasses existing Chinese zero pronoun baseline systems.'}
{'en': 'They Exist ! Introducing Plural Mentions to Coreference Resolution and Entity Linking', 'ar': 'انهم موجودين! تقديم إشارات الجمع لحل المرجع وربط الكيان', 'pt': 'Eles existem! Apresentando Menções Plurais à Resolução de Correferência e Vinculação de Entidades', 'es': '¡Existen! Introducción de las menciones en plural a la resolución de correferencias y a', 'fr': 'Ils existent\xa0! Introduction des mentions plurielles à la résolution de coréférence et à la liaison', 'hi': 'वे मौजूद हैं! Coreference संकल्प और एंटिटी लिंकिंग के लिए बहुवचन उल्लेख पेश करना', 'zh': '其存也! 引入复数提及共推理解析、实体链接', 'ja': 'それらは存在します！コアレファレンスレゾリューションとエンティティリンクに複数のメンションを紹介します', 'ru': 'Они существуют! Введение множественных упоминаний в разрешение ядра и привязку сущностей', 'ga': 'Tá siad ann! Moltaí Iolra a thabhairt isteach maidir le Réiteach Croíthagartha agus Nascadh Aonáin', 'ka': 'თჱოჲლჱგარ! პლუტრალური მენუსების გაჩვენება კონფერენციის რეზიოციონის და ელექტურის შესაბამისათვის', 'hu': 'Léteznek! Többszörös említések bevezetése a Coreferencia Resolution és Entity Linking', 'el': 'Υπάρχουν! Εισαγωγή πολλαπλών αναφορών στην επίλυση της συναλλακτικής διάστασης και τη σύνδεση οντοτήτων', 'kk': 'Олар бар! Бірнеше мәзірлерді қасиеттердің Айырымдылығына және нысандарды сілтемеге ендіру', 'it': 'Esistono! Introduzione di menzioni pluriennali alla risoluzione di Coreference e al collegamento di entità', 'mk': 'Тие постојат! Внесување на повеќе спомени за резолуцијата на кореференцијата и поврзувањето на ентитетите', 'lt': 'They Exist!  Daugelio nuorodų į koreferencinę rezoliuciją ir subjektų susiejimą įtraukimas', 'mn': 'Тэд сууж байна! Дасгалын шийдвэрлэл болон нэгж холбоотой олон санаануудыг', 'ms': 'Mereka wujud! Memperkenalkan Sementara Plural ke Resolusi Kesuaian dan Pautan Entiti', 'ml': 'അവര്\u200d നില്\u200dക്കുന്നു! കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റീഷനും എന്റിറ്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങിങ്ങിലേക്കും പ്ലഗ്ളേല്\u200d മെനുകള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറ', 'mt': 'Huma jeżistu! Introducing Plural Mentions to Coreference Resolution and Entity Linking', 'no': 'Dei finst! Innstilling av fleire menyar til oppløysing og lenking av einhetar', 'pl': 'Oni istnieją! Wprowadzenie wielu wspomnień na temat restrukturyzacji współpracy i powiązania podmiotów', 'ro': 'Există! Introducerea mențiunilor multiple la rezoluția corefențelor și conectarea entităților', 'sr': 'Oni postoje! Uključujući mnogobrojne sjećanja na rezoluciju i povezivanje podataka', 'si': 'ඔවුන් ඉන්නවා! ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ අන්තිත්වය සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණ සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණ මතකය සංවිධානය කරන්න', 'so': 'Waxay jiraan! Horumarinta xujooyinka kala duduwan ee la xiriira xafiiska iyo xiriirka ganacsiga', 'ur': 'وہ موجود ہیں مہربانی مہمانیوں کو اچھی رخصت اور انٹیٹیٹی لینک کے لئے پیش کیا جاتا ہے', 'sv': 'De existerar! Introducera flertalet omnämnanden till Coreference Resolution och Entity Linking', 'ta': 'அவர்கள் இருக்கிறது! திரைத்திறன் மற்றும் முழுமையான இணைப்புக்கு செருகல் பட்டியல்களை குறிப்பிடுகிறது', 'uz': 'Улар мавжуд! Name', 'vi': 'Họ có rồi! Giới thiệu Các Đầu đề với Giải quyết Quốc phòng và Liên kết các đơn vị', 'da': 'De eksisterer! Indførelse af flere omtaler til Coreference Resolution og Entity Linking', 'nl': 'Ze bestaan! Introductie van meervoudige vermeldingen over Coreference Resolutie en Entity Linkering', 'bg': 'Те съществуват! Въвеждане на многобройни споменания за разрешаването на кореференции и свързването на субекти', 'hr': 'Oni postoje! Uključujući višestruke sjećanja na rješenje korisnosti i povezivanje podataka', 'de': 'Sie existieren! Einführung mehrerer Erwähnungen zu Coreferenz Resolution und Entity Linking', 'ko': '그들은 존재한다!공지 소해와 실체 링크에 복수를 도입하다', 'id': 'Mereka ada! Memperkenalkan Penyebutan Plural ke Resolusi Koreference dan Hubungan Entitas', 'fa': 'اونا وجود دارن توسعه یادآوری\u200cهای زیادی به راه حل و ارتباط اجتماعی', 'tr': 'Olar bar! Ýükseler Menüňleri Çözümleme we Entity Baglaýyşyna girdir', 'af': 'Hulle bestaan! Voorwerp van Plurale Kieslysse na Voorkeure Resolusie en Entiteit Linking', 'sw': 'Wapo! Kuingiza Tamko Zaidi kwa Mazingiro na Kuunganisha Umoja', 'sq': 'Ata ekzistojnë! Përfaqja e përmendimeve të shumta në rezolutën e Koreferencës dhe lidhjen e njësisë', 'hy': 'Նրանք գոյություն ունեն: Կորեֆերանսի լուծումների և միավորների կապերի բազմաթիվ նշաններ ներկայացնելը', 'am': 'Exist ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'তারা আছে! প্লাগাল মেনুষকে সংস্কারের রিপলেশন এবং এন্টিটি লিংকে পরিচিত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Oni postoje! Uključujući mnogobrojne sjećanja rezoluciji i povezivanje podataka', 'az': 'Onlar var! Xüsusiyyət Çözünürlüyünü və Entitələri Bağlama', 'et': 'Nad eksisteerivad! Komitee resolutsiooni ja üksuste sidumise mitmekordsete märkuste tutvustamine', 'ca': 'Existen! Introducir Mencions Plurals a la Resolució de Coreferència i enllaç entre Entitats', 'cs': 'Existují! Představení mnohostranných zmínek o řešení společnosti a propojení subjektů', 'fi': 'He ovat olemassa! Monimuotoisten mainintojen käyttöönotto Coreference-ratkaisuun ja yksiköiden yhdistämiseen', 'jv': 'Dheweke durung ! Multiple', 'ha': 'Suna fita! @ action', 'he': 'הם קיימים! הצגת הזכרונות רבות לפתרון קומפרנס וקשר יחסי יחידות', 'sk': 'Obstajajo! Uvedba večkratnih omemb k reševanju Coreference in povezovanju subjektov', 'bo': 'ཁོང་ཚོ་ཡོད། མཐུན་རྩིས་ཐོག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་གདམ་ཁ་ཚོགས་ལ་སྒྲིག་མཐུད་ནི་དང་ཐུག་སྒྲིག་མཐུད་ལམ་ལ་སྟོན་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper analyzes arguably the most challenging yet under-explored aspect of resolution tasks such as coreference resolution and entity linking, that is the resolution of plural mentions. Unlike singular mentions each of which represents one entity, plural mentions stand for multiple entities. To tackle this aspect, we take the character identification corpus from the SemEval 2018 shared task that consists of entity annotation for singular mentions, and expand it by adding annotation for plural mentions. We then introduce a novel coreference resolution algorithm that selectively creates clusters to handle both singular and plural mentions, and also a deep learning-based entity linking model that jointly handles both types of mentions through multi-task learning. Adjusted evaluation metrics are proposed for these tasks as well to handle the uniqueness of plural mentions. Our experiments show that the new coreference resolution and entity linking models significantly outperform traditional models designed only for singular mentions. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first time that plural mentions are thoroughly analyzed for these two resolution tasks.', 'ar': 'يمكن القول إن هذه الورقة تحلل الجانب الأكثر تحديًا والذي لم يتم استكشافه جيدًا لمهام الحل مثل حل المرجع وربط الكيان ، وهو حل إشارات الجمع. على عكس الإشارات المفردة التي يمثل كل منها كيانًا واحدًا ، فإن إشارات الجمع تعني كيانات متعددة. لمعالجة هذا الجانب ، نأخذ مجموعة تعريف الأحرف من مهمة SemEval 2018 المشتركة التي تتكون من تعليق توضيحي للكيان للإشارات المفردة ، ونوسعها بإضافة تعليق توضيحي للإشارات الجمع. نقدم بعد ذلك خوارزمية دقة مرجعية جديدة تنشئ بشكل انتقائي مجموعات للتعامل مع كل من الإشارات الفردية والجمع ، وأيضًا نموذج ربط كيان قائم على التعلم العميق يتعامل بشكل مشترك مع كلا النوعين من الإشارات من خلال التعلم متعدد المهام. تم اقتراح مقاييس التقييم المعدلة لهذه المهام أيضًا للتعامل مع تفرد إشارات الجمع. تُظهر تجاربنا أن دقة المرجع المرجعي الجديد ونماذج ربط الكيانات تتفوق بشكل كبير على النماذج التقليدية المصممة للإشارات الفردية فقط. على حد علمنا ، هذه هي المرة الأولى التي يتم فيها تحليل إشارات الجمع بدقة لمهمتي الحل هاتين.', 'pt': 'Este artigo analisa indiscutivelmente o aspecto mais desafiador, porém pouco explorado, das tarefas de resolução, como resolução de correferência e vinculação de entidades, que é a resolução de menções plurais. Ao contrário das menções singulares, cada uma representando uma entidade, as menções plurais representam várias entidades. Para lidar com esse aspecto, tomamos o corpus de identificação de caracteres da tarefa compartilhada SemEval 2018 que consiste em anotação de entidade para menções singulares e o expandimos adicionando anotação para menções plurais. Em seguida, apresentamos um novo algoritmo de resolução de correferência que cria seletivamente clusters para lidar com menções singulares e plurais, e também um modelo de vinculação de entidade baseado em aprendizado profundo que lida conjuntamente com os dois tipos de menções por meio de aprendizado multitarefa. Métricas de avaliação ajustadas são propostas para essas tarefas, bem como para lidar com a singularidade das menções plurais. Nossos experimentos mostram que os novos modelos de resolução de correferência e vinculação de entidades superam significativamente os modelos tradicionais projetados apenas para menções singulares. Até onde sabemos, esta é a primeira vez que as menções plurais são minuciosamente analisadas para essas duas tarefas de resolução.', 'fr': "Cet article analyse sans doute l'aspect le plus difficile mais sous-exploré des tâches de résolution telles que la résolution de coréférence et la liaison d'entités, à savoir la résolution de mentions plurielles. Contrairement aux mentions au singulier qui représentent chacune une entité, les mentions au pluriel représentent plusieurs entités. Pour aborder cet aspect, nous prenons le corpus d'identification des caractères de la tâche partagée SemEval 2018 qui consiste à annoter des entités pour les mentions singulières, et nous le développons en ajoutant des annotations pour les mentions au pluriel. Nous introduisons ensuite un nouvel algorithme de résolution de coréférence qui crée sélectivement des clusters pour gérer à la fois les mentions au singulier et au pluriel, ainsi qu'un modèle de liaison d'entités basé sur le deep learning qui gère conjointement les deux types de mentions par le biais d'un apprentissage multitâche. Des mesures d'évaluation ajustées sont également proposées pour ces tâches afin de gérer le caractère unique des mentions au pluriel. Nos expériences montrent que les nouveaux modèles de résolution de coréférence et de liaison d'entités surpassent de manière significative les modèles traditionnels conçus uniquement pour les mentions singulières. À notre connaissance, c'est la première fois que des mentions au pluriel sont analysées en profondeur pour ces deux tâches de résolution.", 'es': 'Este artículo analiza posiblemente el aspecto más desafiante pero poco explorado de las tareas de resolución, como la resolución de correferencias y la vinculación de entidades, es decir, la resolución de menciones en plural. A diferencia de las menciones singulares, cada una de las cuales representa una entidad, las menciones plurales representan entidades Para abordar este aspecto, tomamos el corpus de identificación de personajes de la tarea compartida de SemEval 2018 que consiste en anotaciones de entidades para menciones singulares, y lo ampliamos agregando anotaciones para menciones en plural. A continuación, introducimos un novedoso algoritmo de resolución de correferencias que crea grupos de forma selectiva para manejar menciones en singular y plural, y también un modelo de vinculación de entidades basado en el aprendizaje profundo que maneja conjuntamente ambos tipos de menciones a través del aprendizaje multitarea. También se proponen métricas de evaluación ajustadas para estas tareas para manejar la singularidad de las menciones en plural. Nuestros experimentos muestran que la nueva resolución de correferencia y los modelos de enlace de entidades superan significativamente a los modelos tradicionales diseñados solo para menciones singulares. Hasta donde sabemos, esta es la primera vez que se analizan minuciosamente las menciones en plural para estas dos tareas de resolución.', 'ja': '本論文では、コアリファレンス解決やエンティティリンクといった解決タスクの最も困難でありながら、まだ探求されていない側面、すなわち複数の言及の解決について分析する。 それぞれが1つのエンティティを表す単数形のメンションとは異なり、複数形のメンションは複数のエンティティを表します。 この点に取り組むために、単数メンションのエンティティアノテーションで構成されるSemEval 2018共有タスクから文字識別コーパスを取得し、複数メンションのアノテーションを追加して拡張します。 次に、単数形と複数形の両方の言及を扱うためのクラスタを選択的に作成する新規のコアリファレンス解決アルゴリズムと、マルチタスク学習を通じて両方のタイプの言及を共同で扱う深層学習ベースのエンティティリンクモデルを導入する。 これらのタスクでは、複数のメンションの一意性を処理するために、調整された評価指標が提案されています。 私たちの実験では、新しいコアリファレンス解像度とエンティティリンクモデルは、単一言及のみのために設計された従来のモデルを大幅に上回っていることが示されています。 私たちの知る限りでは、この2つの解決タスクのために複数の言及が徹底的に分析されるのは初めてです。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर यकीनन संकल्प कार्यों के सबसे चुनौतीपूर्ण अभी तक कम-खोजे गए पहलू का विश्लेषण करता है जैसे कि कोरफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन और एंटिटी लिंकिंग, जो कि बहुवचन उल्लेखों का संकल्प है। एकवचन उल्लेख के विपरीत, जिनमें से प्रत्येक एक इकाई का प्रतिनिधित्व करता है, बहुवचन उल्लेख कई संस्थाओं के लिए खड़े हैं। इस पहलू से निपटने के लिए, हम SemEval 2018 साझा कार्य से चरित्र पहचान कॉर्पस लेते हैं जिसमें एकवचन उल्लेखों के लिए इकाई एनोटेशन होता है, और बहुवचन उल्लेखों के लिए एनोटेशन जोड़कर इसका विस्तार किया जाता है। फिर हम एक उपन्यास कोरेफेरेंस रिज़ॉल्यूशन एल्गोरिथ्म पेश करते हैं जो चुनिंदा रूप से एकवचन और बहुवचन दोनों उल्लेखों को संभालने के लिए क्लस्टर बनाता है, और एक गहरी सीखने-आधारित इकाई लिंकिंग मॉडल भी है जो संयुक्त रूप से बहु-कार्य सीखने के माध्यम से दोनों प्रकार के उल्लेखों को संभालता है। समायोजित मूल्यांकन मैट्रिक्स इन कार्यों के लिए प्रस्तावित हैं और साथ ही बहुवचन उल्लेख की विशिष्टता को संभालने के लिए। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि नए coreference संकल्प और इकाई जोड़ने मॉडल काफी पारंपरिक मॉडल केवल एकवचन उल्लेख के लिए डिजाइन outperform. हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, यह पहली बार है कि बहुवचन उल्लेख इन दो संकल्प कार्यों के लिए पूरी तरह से विश्लेषण कर रहे हैं।', 'zh': '本文析其务最具挑战性而未尽索者,如共指寻分辨率与实体链接,即复数提及分辨率也。 与单数提及不同,每提及代一实体,复数提及代数实体。 取字符于SemEval 2018,取字符以识语料库,单数提及实体注释之,因复数提及添注以广之。 凡引解析算法,选择性创聚类以处单复数提及,及深学之实体链接模形,因多任务学而共处之。 又为立评指标,以处复数之唯一性。 臣等实验明,新共指合分辨率实体链接明优于单数。 以吾所知,此一决之复数也。', 'ru': 'В этой статье анализируется, пожалуй, наиболее сложный, но недостаточно изученный аспект задач разрешения, таких как разрешение базовой линии и связывание сущностей, то есть разрешение множественного числа упоминаний. В отличие от единственного числа, каждое из которых представляет одну сущность, множественное число означает несколько сущностей. Чтобы решить этот аспект, мы берём корпус идентификации символов из совместной задачи SemEval 2018, которая состоит из аннотации сущности для единственного упоминания, и расширяем его, добавляя аннотацию для множественного упоминания. Затем мы вводим новый алгоритм разрешения ядра, который выборочно создает кластеры для обработки как единственного, так и множественного упоминания, а также модель связывания сущностей на основе глубокого обучения, которая совместно обрабатывает оба типа упоминаний посредством многозадачного обучения. Для этих задач также предлагаются скорректированные оценочные показатели для учета уникальности множественного числа упоминаний. Наши эксперименты показывают, что новые модели разрешения ядра и связывания сущностей значительно превосходят традиционные модели, предназначенные только для отдельных упоминаний. Насколько нам известно, это первый раз, когда множественное число упоминаний тщательно анализируется для этих двух задач разрешения.', 'ga': 'D’fhéadfaí a áitiú go ndéantar anailís sa pháipéar seo ar an ngné is dúshlánaí fós de thascanna réitigh ar nós réiteach croí-chomhdhála agus nascadh eintiteas, is é sin réiteach na n-luaite iolracha. Murab ionann agus lua uatha arb ionann gach ceann díobh agus aonán amháin, seasann tagairtí iolra d’eintitis iolracha. Chun dul i ngleic leis an ngné seo, glacaimid an corpas aitheantais carachtar ó thasc roinnte SemEval 2018 arb é atá ann nóta aonáin le haghaidh lua uatha, agus déanaimid é a leathnú trí nóta a chur leis le haghaidh tagairtí iolra. Ansin tugaimid isteach algartam réitigh croíchomhdhála úrnua a chruthaíonn go roghnach braislí chun tagairtí uatha agus iolra araon a láimhseáil, agus freisin samhail nasctha aonáin atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim dhomhain a láimhseálann an dá chineál tagairtí i gcomhpháirt trí fhoghlaim ilthasc. Moltar méadracht mheastóireachta choigeartaithe le haghaidh na dtascanna seo chomh maith chun uathúlacht na tagairtí iolra a láimhseáil. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go sáraíonn na samhlacha nua réitigh croíchomhdhála agus naisc aonáin i bhfad níos fearr na samhlacha traidisiúnta atá deartha le haghaidh lua uatha amháin. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, is é seo an chéad uair a dhéantar mionanailís ar na tagairtí iolra don dá thasc réitigh seo.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία αναλύει αναμφισβήτητα την πιο προκλητική αλλά υποδιερευνημένη πτυχή των καθηκόντων εξυγίανσης, όπως η επίλυση της αλληλοδιαφοράς και η σύνδεση οντοτήτων, δηλαδή την επίλυση των πληθυντικών αναφορών. Σε αντίθεση με τις μεμονωμένες αναφορές καθεμία από τις οποίες αντιπροσωπεύει μια οντότητα, οι πληθυντικές αναφορές αντιπροσωπεύουν πολλαπλές οντότητες. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτή η πτυχή, παίρνουμε το σώμα αναγνώρισης χαρακτήρων από την κοινή εργασία που αποτελείται από σχολιασμό οντότητας για μεμονωμένες αναφορές, και το επεκτείνουμε προσθέτοντας σχολιασμό για πληθυντικές αναφορές. Στη συνέχεια, εισάγουμε έναν νέο αλγόριθμο επίλυσης συγχορήγησης που δημιουργεί επιλεκτικά συστάδες για να χειριστεί τόσο τις μεμονωμένες όσο και τις πληθυντικές αναφορές, καθώς και ένα μοντέλο σύνδεσης οντότητας βασισμένο στη βαθιά μάθηση που διαχειρίζεται από κοινού και τους δύο τύπους αναφορών μέσω της εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών. Για αυτές τις εργασίες προτείνονται προσαρμοσμένες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης, καθώς και για να αντιμετωπιστεί η μοναδικότητα των πληθυντικών αναφορών. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι η νέα ανάλυση της συνάφειας και τα μοντέλα σύνδεσης οντότητας ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τα παραδοσιακά μοντέλα σχεδιασμένα μόνο για μεμονωμένες αναφορές. Από όσο γνωρίζουμε, αυτή είναι η πρώτη φορά που αναλύονται λεπτομερώς οι πληθυντικές αναφορές για αυτά τα δύο καθήκοντα επίλυσης.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány vitathatóan elemzi a szanálási feladatok legkihívást jelentő, mégis alul feltárt aspektusát, mint például a coreferencia-szanálás és entitás-összekapcsolás, azaz a többszörös említések megoldása. Ellentétben az egyes említésekkel, amelyek mindegyike egy entitást jelent, a többszörös említések több entitást jelentenek. Ennek a szempontnak a megoldásához a SemEval 2018 megosztott feladat karakterazonosító corpusát vesszük, amely egyedi említésekhez tartozó entitásjegyzetekből áll, és többszámú említésekhez tartozó jegyzetek hozzáadásával bővítjük. Ezután bemutatunk egy új coreferencia felbontási algoritmust, amely szelektív módon hoz létre klasztereket az egyes és többes említések kezelésére, valamint egy mélytanuláson alapuló entitás-összekapcsoló modellt, amely közösen kezeli mindkét típusú említést többfeladatos tanulással. Ezekhez a feladatokhoz igazított értékelési mutatókat javasolunk a többszörös említések egyediségének kezelésére. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy az új coreferencia felbontás és entitáskötő modellek jelentősen felülmúlják a hagyományos modelleket, amelyeket csak egyedi említésekre terveztek. Legjobb tudásunk szerint ez az első alkalom, hogy a többszörös említéseket alaposan elemezzük e két felbontási feladat tekintetében.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი ანალიზაცია, რომ უფრო შესაძლებელია, მაგრამ უფრო შესაძლებელია განსხვავებული მოქმედების აპექტი, როგორც წარმოადგენების განსხვავება და ინტერტიკის გადაკავშირება, ეს არის მ ერთადერთი განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც ერთადერთი ინტერტის განსაზღვრებულია, მრავალური განსაზღვრებულია მრავალური ინტერტიების განსაზღვრებულია. ამოცანტის გარეშე, ჩვენ მივიღეთ კოპუფიკაციის ინდენტიფიკაციის კოპუტი SemEval 2018-ის გარეშე საქმე, რომელიც ერთადერთი ამოცანებისთვის ინტერტიკური ანოტაციის შეფარდება და გაფართვა, რომელიც პულ შემდეგ ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით პრომენტის კონფიგურაციის განსაზღვრება ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც არჩეულად შექმნა კლასტრები, რომელიც ერთადერთად განსაზღვრებას ერთადერთი და მრავალური განსაზღვრების შესახებ, და ასევე ძალიან სწავ ახალგაზრულებული განსაზღვრება მეტრიკები იყენება ამ დავალებისთვის და მრავალური განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრებას. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ახალი წინაწერება და ინტერტიკა, რომლებიც მოდელების შეერთება მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო გავაკეთება ტრადიციონალური მოდელები,  ნაი-ეჲბპვრჲ ჲრ ნაქთრვ ჱნანთწ, რჲგა ვ ოყპგთწრ ოყრ, კჲირჲ ოყპგთ ოყრ ოჲმთჟლწრ ოყლუარვლნთ ჟოჲმვნთ ჟვ ოჲრყპჟნჲ ანალთჱთპარ ჱა რვჱთ ეგა', 'it': "Questo articolo analizza probabilmente l'aspetto più impegnativo ma poco esplorato dei compiti di risoluzione come la risoluzione di coreferenze e il collegamento di entità, cioè la risoluzione di citazioni plurale. A differenza delle menzioni singole ognuna delle quali rappresenta un'entità, le menzioni plurale rappresentano più entità. Per affrontare questo aspetto, prendiamo il corpus di identificazione dei caratteri dal compito condiviso SemEval 2018 che consiste nell'annotazione di entità per menzioni singolari, e lo espandiamo aggiungendo annotazione per menzioni plurale. Introducemo quindi un nuovo algoritmo di risoluzione della coreferenza che crea selettivamente cluster per gestire sia le menzioni singole che plurale, e anche un modello di collegamento basato sull'apprendimento profondo di entità che gestisce congiuntamente entrambi i tipi di menzioni attraverso l'apprendimento multi-task. Vengono proposte metriche di valutazione adeguate anche per queste attività per gestire l'unicità delle menzioni plurale. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che i nuovi modelli di risoluzione di coreferenza e collegamento di entità superano significativamente i modelli tradizionali progettati solo per citazioni singolari. Per quanto ne sappiamo, questa è la prima volta che le menzioni plurale vengono analizzate accuratamente per questi due compiti di risoluzione.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз шешу және бірнеше айырмашылық тапсырмалардың шешу және бірліктерді байланыстыру үшін, бұл көптеген айырмашылығының шешуі. Бір жалғыз нәрсе бір нәрсені көрсетеді, бірнеше нәрсені бірнеше нәрсені көрсетеді. Бұл аспектті шешу үшін біз 2018 жылдың semiEval-ның бөлек тапсырмасынан таңбаларды идентификациялау корпусын алып, бірнеше жазбалар үшін бірнеше жазбалардың жазбаларын қосу арқылы бөлек тапсырмасынан Содан кейін біз жалғыз және көпшілікті сөйлесу үшін, жалғыз және көпшілікті сөйлесу үшін, жалғыз оқу бағдарламасының түрлерін біріктіру үлгісін таңдап алгоритмін таңдаймыз. Бұл тапсырмаларды баптау метрикалары және бірнеше мәліметтердің бір-біріншілігін басқару үшін қолданылады. Біздің тәжірибеміздің жаңа тәжірибесінің айырмашылығы мен үлгілерді сілтіру үлгілері тек жалғыз айырмашылық үлгілеріне жасалған әдімгі үлгілерді көп Біздің біліміміздің ең жақсы түсініктерімізге, бұл бірінші рет бұл екі айырмашылық тапсырмалар үшін толық анализ етіледі.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menganalisis kemungkinan aspek yang paling mencabar tetapi dibawah-mengeksplorasi tugas resolusi seperti resolusi koreferensi dan sambungan entiti, iaitu resolusi sebutan berbilang. Tidak seperti sebutan tunggal yang mana masing-masing mewakili satu entiti, sebutan berbilang berdiri untuk entiti berbilang. Untuk menangani aspek ini, kita mengambil korpus pengenalan aksara dari tugas berkongsi SemEval 2018 yang terdiri dari anotasi entiti untuk sebutan tunggal, dan mengembangkannya dengan menambahkan anotasi untuk sebutan berbilang. Kemudian kita memperkenalkan algoritma resolusi koreferensi yang secara selektif mencipta kumpulan untuk mengendalikan sebutan tunggal dan berbilang, dan juga entiti berdasarkan belajar yang mendalam yang menghubungkan model yang bersama-sama mengendalikan kedua-dua jenis sebutan melalui belajar berbilang-tugas. Metrik penilaian disesuaikan dicadangkan untuk tugas ini juga untuk mengendalikan unik sebutan berbilang. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa resolusi koreferensi baru dan entiti yang menghubungkan model secara signifikan melebihi model tradisional yang direka hanya untuk sebutan tunggal. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ini adalah pertama kalinya bahawa banyak sebutan telah dianalisis secara teliti untuk dua tugas resolusi ini.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente tikriausiai analizuojamas sunkiausias, tačiau nepakankamai išnagrinėtas pertvarkymo užduočių aspektas, pvz., koreferencinė pertvarkymas ir subjektų susiejimas, t. y. daugelio minčių pertvarkymas. Priešingai nei atskiri nurodymai, kurių kiekvienas atstovauja vienam subjektui, daugelis nurodymų reiškia kelis subjektus. Siekdami išspręsti šį aspektą, mes imame simbolių identifikavimo korpusą iš 2018 m. SemEval bendros užduoties, kurią sudaro subjekto anotacija atskiroms mintims, ir išplėsime jį papildant daugelio minčių anotaciją. Tuomet įvedame naują koreferencijos rezoliucijos algoritmą, kuris atrankiniu būdu sukuria grupes, skirtas išskirtiniams ir daugiamečiams paminėjimams tvarkyti, taip pat giliai mokymosi pagrindu grindžiamą subjektą, susiejantį model į, kuris bendrai tvarko abiejų rūšių paminėjimus daugiafunkciniu mokymusi. Siūlomi patikslinti vertinimo rodikliai šioms užduotims atlikti, taip pat siekiant išskirti kelių paminėjimų išskirtinumą. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad naujoji koreferencijos rezoliucija ir subjektas, jungiantis modelius, gerokai viršija tradicinius modelius, sukurtus tik vienkartiniams paminėjimams. Mūsų žiniomis, tai pirmas kartas, kai išsamiai analizuojami daugelis minėtų klausimų, susijusių su šiomis dviem pertvarkymo užduotimis.', 'mk': 'Овој документ најверојатно го анализира најпредизвикувачкиот сé уште помалку истражен аспект на задачите за резолуција како што се резолуцијата на современоста и поврзувањето на ентитетите, тоа е резолуцијата на мнозинските спомени. За разлика од единствените спомени кои секој од нив претставува еден ентитет, многуте спомени се за многуте ентитети. За да го решиме овој аспект, го земаме корпусот за идентификација на карактеристичките карактери од заедничката задача SemEval 2018 која се состои од анотација на ентитетот за единствени спомени, и го прошируваме со додавање на анотација за повеќето спомени. Потоа воведуваме нов алгоритм за резолуција на кореференција кој селективно создава групи за справување со единствените и мнозинските спомени, како и длабоко учење-базиран ентитет кој поврзува модел кој заедно се справува со двата вида спомени преку мултизадачно учење. За овие задачи се предложени прилагодени метрики на евалуација, како и за справување со единственоста на мнозинските спомени. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека новата резолуција на современост и ентитетот кој ги поврзува моделите значително надминуваат традиционалните модели дизајнирани само за единствени спомени. Според нашето знаење, ова е прв пат мнозинските спомени да бидат темелно анализирани за овие две задачи за резолуција.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь хамгийн хэцүү, одоогоор олон хэлэлцээний шийдвэрлэл гэх мэт шийдвэрлэлтийн даалгаврын хамгийн хэцүү асуудлыг шинжилдэг. Ерөнхий хэлбэрээр нэг бүтээгдэхүүнийг илэрхийлдэг эсвэл олон хэлбэрээр олон бүтээгдэхүүнийг илэрхийлдэг. Энэ талаар бодохын тулд бид 2018 оны SemEval-ын загварын тодорхойлолтын корпус ашиглаж, нэг хэлэлцээний загварын тулд нэгдсэн загварын тодорхойлолт байдаг, олон хэлэлцээний загварыг нэмэхэд нэмэгдүүлнэ. Дараа нь бид шийдвэрлэлийн алгоритм шийдвэрлэх шийдвэрлэлийг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь сонголтой нэг, олон хэлбэрийн хэлэлцээг зохицуулахын тулд бүлэг бий болгодог. Төрсөн дүгнэлтийн метрик нь эдгээр ажлын тулд мөн олон хэмжээсүүдийн нэг хэмжээсүүдийг зохицуулахын тулд санал өгдөг. Бидний туршилтууд шинэ удирдлага шийдвэрлэл болон загварыг холбох загвар нь зөвхөн ганц хэлэлцээнд зориулагдсан уламжлалт загваруудыг илүү их ашигладаг. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь, энэ нь олон хэмжээсүүдийг эдгээр хоёр шийдвэрлэлтийн даалгаварын тулд анхны удаа шинжилгээ хийгддэг.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വിലാസകരമായി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നുണ്ട് എന്നിട്ടും പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ടിട്ടില്ലാത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ കീഴില്\u200d ഏറ്റവ ഒരു വസ്തുവിനെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നത് ഒറ്റപ്പെട്ട പ്രഖ്യാപങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച ഈ വിഭാഗത്തെ എതിര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d, സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2018-ല്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എടുത്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു പ പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത് ഒരു ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. ഏകാധികാരികള ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുവേണ്ടി നിര്\u200dണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. പ്രധാനപ്പെട് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് പുതിയ കോര്\u200dഫര്\u200dനെന്\u200dസ് റിസ്റ്റേഷനും സാധാരണ മോഡലുകളും പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200d നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ചത്തില്\u200d ഇതാണ് ആദ്യത്തെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഈ രണ്ട് തീരുമാനിക്കുന്ന ജോലി', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł analizuje prawdopodobnie najbardziej wymagający jeszcze niezbadany aspekt zadań restrukturyzacji i uporządkowanej likwidacji, takich jak restrukturyzacja współreferencyjna i łączenie jednostek, czyli rozwiązywanie wzmianek mnogich. W przeciwieństwie do wymienień pojedynczych, z których każda reprezentuje jedną jednostkę, wzmianki liczbowe oznaczają wiele jednostek. Aby rozwiązać ten aspekt, bierzemy korpus identyfikacji znaków ze wspólnego zadania SemEval 2018, które składa się z adnotacji jednostek dla wzmianek pojedynczych, i rozszerzamy go poprzez dodanie adnotacji dla wzmianek mnogich. Następnie wprowadzamy nowy algorytm rozdzielczości koreferencji, który selektywnie tworzy klastry do obsługi zarówno wzmianek pojedynczych, jak i mnogich, a także model łączący jednostki oparty na głębokim uczeniu, który wspólnie obsługuje oba rodzaje wzmianek poprzez wielozadaniowe uczenie się. Proponuje się skorygowane wskaźniki oceny dla tych zadań, aby poradzić sobie z unikalnością wzmianek liczbowych. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że nowa rozdzielczość koreferencji i modele łączące jednostki znacznie przewyższają tradycyjne modele zaprojektowane tylko dla pojedynczych wzmianek. Według naszej najlepszej wiedzy jest to pierwszy raz, gdy wzmianki liczbowe są dokładnie analizowane dla tych dwóch zadań rozwiązywania.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare analizează, probabil, cel mai provocator, dar subexplorat aspect al sarcinilor de rezoluție, cum ar fi rezoluția corefenței și legătura entităților, și anume rezoluția mențiunilor plurale. Spre deosebire de mențiunile singulare, fiecare dintre ele reprezintă o entitate, mențiunile plurale reprezintă mai multe entități. Pentru a aborda acest aspect, luăm corpul de identificare a caracterului din sarcina partajată SemEval 2018, care constă în adnotarea entității pentru mențiuni singulare și îl extindem prin adnotarea pentru mențiuni plurale. Apoi introducem un algoritm nou de rezoluție a corefenței care creează selectiv clustere pentru a gestiona atât mențiunile singulare, cât și plurale, precum și un model de legătură bazat pe învățare profundă care gestionează împreună ambele tipuri de mențiuni prin învățare multi-task. Sunt propuse măsurători de evaluare ajustate pentru aceste sarcini, precum și pentru a gestiona unicitatea mențiunilor plurale. Experimentele noastre arată că noile modele de rezoluție a corefenței și legătura entităților depășesc semnificativ modelele tradiționale concepute doar pentru mențiuni singulare. Din câte ştim, aceasta este prima dată când menţiunile plurale sunt analizate amănunţit pentru aceste două sarcini de rezoluţie.', 'no': 'Denne papiret analyserer argumentert den mest vanskelegste enno underutforska aspekten av oppløysingar som er koreferanse oppløysing og eininga som lenkjer, som er oppløysinga av fleire oppløysing. I motsetjing til singular gjev kvar av dei som representerer eitt entitet, er fleire gjev for fleire entiteter. For å løse denne aspekten, tar vi karakteridentifiseringskorpusen frå semiEval 2018 delt oppgåve som inneheld av entitetsannotasjon for enkelte oppgåver, og utvida det ved å leggja til notasjon for fleire oppgåver. Vi introduserer så eit nytt algoritme for oppløysing av koreferanse som utvald lager grupper for å handtera både enkelære og fleire opplæringar, og også ein dyp læringsbasert entitet som koplar sammen begge typar opplæringar gjennom fleire oppgåver. Tilpassa evalueringsmetrikar vert foreslått for desse oppgåva og for å handtera ulikheten av fleire oppgåver. Eksperimentane våre viser at den nye oppløysinga av koreferansen og eininga som lenkjer modeller er betydelig utfører tradisjonelle modeller som berre laga for enkelte oppløysingar. Dette er det første gongen fleire opplysningar er nøyaktig analysert for desse to opplysningar.', 'so': "Qoraalkan wuxuu si qallafsan u analyeeyaa waxyaabaha ugu adag ee aan weli la baadhay shaqaalaha kala duduwan sida xafiiska xuquuqda iyo xiriirka jidhka, taasina waa go'aanka qeybaha kala duduwan. Macluumaad kala duwan oo kaliya, mid kastaaba wuxuu ka mid yahay hal jidh, macluumaad kala duduwan waxay u taagan yihiin qeybo kala duduwan. Si aan u tacliino dhinacan, waxaynu ka qaadanaa qofka aqoonsiga ee SemEval 2018 shaqo la qaybsan, kaas oo ka mid ah macluumaad ku saabsan hadalka kaliga ah, waxaana ku sii kordhinaynaa ogeysiiska hadalka kala duduwan. Markaas waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qoraal qaybsiga saxda ah oo si gaar ah u dhaqdhaqaaqda kooxo si ay u xambaaraan barashada kaliga ah iyo waxyaabaha kala duduwan, iyo sidoo kale qaab cilmiga hoose ee waxbarashada ku xiran, kaas oo wada xambaaraya hal noocyo ah oo lagu barto waxbarasho kala duduwan. Adjusted evaluation metrics are proposed for these tasks as well to handle the uniqueness of plural mentions.  Imtixaankayada ayaa muuqanaya in qaynuunka cusub iyo qaababka isku xiran ay si weyn u sameeyaan qaababka caadooyinka ee la qoray oo kaliya. Tani waa marka ugu horraysa in afka kala duduwan si aad looga baahan yahay labadan xafiiska ah.", 'sr': 'Ovaj papir analizira argumentno najizazovniji, ali pod istraživanjem aspekta rezolucije zadataka kao što su rješenje pristojnosti i povezanje entiteta, to je rezolucija pluralnih spomena. Za razliku od jedinstvenog spomena, svaka od kojih predstavlja jednu entitetu, pluralna spomena stoji za višestruke entitate. Da bismo se riješili ovog aspekta, uzeli smo korpus identifikacije karaktera iz zajedničkog zadatka semiEvala 2018, koji sastoji od annotacije entiteta za jednostavne spomena, i proširili ga dodajući annotaciju pluralnih spomena. Onda predstavljamo nov algoritam rezolucije dobrote koji selektivno stvara skupove kako bi se nosila i jednostavna i pluralna spomena, kao i duboko učenje-bazirana entiteta koja povezuje model koji zajedno vodi obje vrste spomena kroz učenje multizadataka. Prilagođene mjere procjene su predložene za te zadatke, kao i za rješavanje jedinstvenosti pluralnih spomena. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da nova rezolucija i entitet koji povezuju modele značajno iznosi tradicionalne modele dizajnirane samo za jednostavne spominje. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prvi put da se mnogih spomena temeljno analiziraju za ove dve rezolucione zadatke.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තු විශ්ලේෂණය විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා විශ්ලේෂණය විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ විශ්ලේෂණයක් අඩුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන් විශේෂයෙන් කියන්නේ නැත්තම් හැම දෙයක්ම එක අයිතියක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා, විශේෂයෙන් කියන්නේ විශ අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, සෙම්වේල් 2018 වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරුණු කරුණාකරණය කරනවා, සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ අපි ඊට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරධාන කෝරෙෆරෙන්ස් රිසෝල්යුෂෝන් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් ප්\u200dරධාන කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරධාන ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වගේම සංවිධානය සහ වගේම ගොඩක් අධ සැකසුම් විශේෂණ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් මෙම වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අළුත් කෝරෙෆෙර්ෆෙන්ස් රිසෝල්යුස් සහ අන්තිත්වය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරමා අපේ දැනගන්න හොඳම දේවල්, මේක තමයි පළමුවෙනි වතාවක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මේ විශ්ලේෂණය දෙකට.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats analyserar utan tvekan den mest utmanande men underutforskade aspekten av resolutionsuppgifter såsom coreference resolution och entity linking, det vill säga lösningen av pluralomnämnanden. Till skillnad från enstaka omnämnanden som var och en representerar en enhet, står pluralomnämnanden för flera enheter. För att ta itu med denna aspekt tar vi teckenidentifikationskorpusen från SemEval 2018 delade uppgift som består av entitetsanteckningar för enstaka omnämnanden, och utökar den genom att lägga till anteckningar för flertalet omnämnanden. Vi introducerar sedan en ny algoritm för coreferencelopplösning som selektivt skapar kluster för att hantera både singular och plural omnämnanden, och även en djupinlärningsbaserad entitetslänkningsmodell som gemensamt hanterar båda typerna av omnämnanden genom multi-task learning. Justerade utvärderingsmetoder föreslås även för dessa uppgifter för att hantera det unika i flertalet omnämnanden. Våra experiment visar att de nya modellerna för coreferencelopplösning och entitetslänkning avsevärt överträffar traditionella modeller som endast utformats för enstaka omnämnanden. Så vitt vi vet är detta första gången som pluralomnämnanden analyseras grundligt för dessa två upplösningsuppgifter.', 'mt': 'This paper analyzes arguably the most challenging yet under-explored aspect of resolution tasks such as coreference resolution and entity linking, that is the resolution of plural mentions.  Għall-kuntrarju tas-sejħiet singulari li kull waħda minnhom tirrappreżenta entità waħda, is-sejħiet plurali jirrappreżentaw diversi entitajiet. Biex nindirizzaw dan l-aspett, aħna nieħdu l-korpus tal-identifikazzjoni tal-karattru mis-SemEval 2018 kompitu kondiviż li jikkonsisti f’annotazzjoni tal-entità għal semmijiet singulari, u nespanduha billi nżidu l-annotazzjoni għal semmijiet plurali. We then introduce a novel coreference resolution algorithm that selectively creates clusters to handle both singular and plural mentions, and also a deep learning-based entity linking model that jointly handles both types of mentions through multi-task learning.  Huma proposti metriċi aġġustati ta’ evalwazzjoni għal dawn il-kompiti kif ukoll biex tiġi ttrattata l-unikità ta’ msemmija plurali. Our experiments show that the new coreference resolution and entity linking models significantly outperform traditional models designed only for singular mentions.  Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, din hija l-ewwel darba li ssemmijiet plurali jiġu analizzati bir-reqqa għal dawn iż-żewġ kompiti ta’ riżoluzzjoni.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் தெளிவான தெளிவுத்திறன் செயல்கள் போன்ற குறிப்பு தெளிவுத்திறன் மற்றும் பொருள் இணைப்பு போன்ற பெரும்பாலான சவாலிகளை ஆர ஒற்றைப்படையான குறிப்புகள் ஒவ்வொரு பொருளுக்கும் ஒரு பொருளை குறிக்கும், பல பொருள் இந்த விளைவை எதிர்பார்க்க, நாம் எழுத்து அடையாளம் குறியீட்டை எடுத்து செம்Eval 2018 பகிர்ந்த பணியில் இருந்து பொருள் தனிப்பட்ட குறிப்புகளுக்கு அறிவி பின்னர் நாம் ஒரு புதிய குறிப்பு தீர்வு முறைமையை குறிப்பிட வேண்டும். அது தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட சுட்டிகளை உருவாக்குகிறது தனியாக மற்றும் பல செயல் கற்றல் மூலம் கைய நிறுவப்பட்ட மதிப்பீடு முறைமைகள் இந்த பணிகளுக்கும் மற்றும் பல குறிப்புகளின் தனிப்பட்டதை கையாள முறையில் பரிந் Our experiments show that the new coreference resolution and entity linking models significantly outperform traditional models designed only for singular mentions.  எங்கள் அறிவின் மிக முதல் முறை, இந்த இரண்டு தெளிவுத்திறன் செயல்களை முழுமையாக ஆராய்ந்து கொள்ள முடியும்.', 'ur': 'This paper analyzes the most challenging yet under explored aspect of resolution tasks such as coreference resolution and entity linking, that is the resolution of plural mentions. ان میں سے ہر ایک ایک ایک چیز کی مختلف ذکر کرتی ہے، بہت سے ذکر کئی چیزوں کے لئے ہے. اس طرح کے مطابق ہم اس شخص کی شناسایی کورپوس کو SemEval 2018 سے شریک کام لیتے ہیں جو ایک ذکر کے لئے ایک ٹیٹ کی علامت میں ہے اور اسے بہت سے ذکر کے مطابق اضافہ کر رہے ہیں۔ اس کے بعد ہم نے ایک نئی مہربانی رضامندی الگوریتم کو معلوم کرلیا ہے جسے انتخاب کرتا ہے کہ ایک اور بہت سے مہربانی کے ذریعے ایک کلسٹر بناتے ہیں اور ایک عمیق سیکھنے کی بنیاد دار متحد موڈل ہے جو ایک جوڑے سے دو قسموں مہربانی کی تعلیم کے ذریعے مہربانی کرتا ہے ان کاموں کے لئے سمجھا ہوا ارزش میٹریک بھی پیشنهاد کیا جاتا ہے اور بہت سی ذکر کے غیر تعریف کرنے کے لئے بھی۔ ہماری آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ نئی مہربانی رضامندی اور انٹیٹی جو مدلز کو متصل کرتی ہے صرف ایک ذکر کے لئے طراحی کی ترتیب سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتی ہے. ہمارے بہترین علم کے لئے یہ پہلی بار ہے کہ بہترین ذکر ان دو حل کے کاموں کے لئے مکمل تحلیل کی جاتی ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz qiyin qilingan hamma narsalarning o'zgarishlari uchun eng qanday qiziqaruvchini aniqlaydi. Bu ko'plab narsalarning o'zgartirish imkoniyatini tushunadi. Bir xil taʼminlovchi so'zlar bir narsa bir tizimga ega bo'ladi, bir necha bogʻ'lamalar bir necha tizimga ega bo'ladi. Bu aspektni boshqarish uchun biz SemEval 2018 bilan birlashtirilgan vazifaning qismlarini qabul qilamiz va bir necha ma'lumotlar uchun ma'lumot taʼminlovchi bo'lgan vazifani qabul qilamiz va ularni ko'paytirish uchun taʼminot qoʻshish mumkin. Keyin biz bir novel qo'shimcha rejalashtirish algorithini anglatamiz. Bu bir necha vazifa o'rganish orqali bir necha xil o'rganish orqali bir necha xil o'rganish orqali bir xil o'rganish orqali boshqarish uchun qo'llanmalar yaratadi. @ info: whatsthis Bizning tajribalarimizni ko'rsatishimiz, yangi kompyuterning oʻlchami va bog'liq modellari bilan bog'liq modellarini faqat singalik taqdimot uchun yaratilgan oddiy modellarni bajaradi. To the best of our knowledge, this is the first time that plural mentions are thoroughly analyzed for these two resolution tasks.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này phân tích rõ ràng là khía cạnh thách thức nhất nhưng chưa được khám phá kỹ nhất của các nhiệm vụ giải quyết như là có khả năng phá và kết nối thực thể, đó là cách giải quyết số nhiều đề cập. Không giống như một số nhắc đến mỗi thứ đại diện cho một thực thể, số lớn lên đại diện cho nhiều thực thể. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi lấy tập đoàn nhận dạng nhân vật ra từ nhiệm vụ chia sẻ của SemEvol vượt qua thực thể với những chỉ thị dị thường, và mở rộng nó bằng cách thêm ghi chú cho các đề cập số nhiều. Sau đó chúng ta sẽ tạo ra một thuật to án giải quyết khả năng cao mới, chuyên tạo các cụm số để xử lý những tên gọi khác thường và nhiều tên, và cũng là một thực thể dựa vào học sâu, kết hợp với cả hai loại đề cập qua việc học nhiều nhiệm vụ. Điều chỉnh âm lượng đánh giá được đề xuất cho những nhiệm vụ này cũng để xử lý sự đặc biệt của số nhiều. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy có một giải pháp hạn chế mới và một thực thể liên kết các mô- đun còn chưa hoàn thành các mô hình truyền thống. Theo hiểu biết của chúng ta, đây là lần đầu tiên các số nhiều đề cập được phân tích kỹ lưỡng cho hai nhiệm vụ giải quyết này.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir se navodno analizira najizazovniji, a to je rezolucija mnogih spominjanja. Za razliku od jedinstvenog spominjanja svakog od kojih predstavlja jednu entitetu, mnogih spominjanja predstavljaju višestruke entitate. Za rješavanje ovog aspekta, uzimamo korpus identifikacije karaktera iz zajedničkog zadatka semiEval 2018, koji sastoji od annotacije entiteta za jednostavne spominje, i proširimo ga dodajući annotaciju za mnogih spominjanja. Onda predstavljamo nov algoritam rezolucije dobrote koji selektivno stvara skupine kako bi se nosila i pojedinačna i pluralna spomena, kao i duboko učenje-bazirana entiteta koja povezuje model koji zajedno vodi obje vrste spomena kroz učenje multizadataka. Prilagođene mjere procjene predlažu se za te zadatke kao i za rješavanje jedinstvenosti pluralnih spomena. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da se nova rezolucija liječnosti i entitet koji povezuje modele značajno iznosi tradicionalne modele dizajnirane samo za jednostavne spominje. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prvi put da se mnogih spomena temeljno analiziraju za te dvije rezolucije zadatke.', 'nl': 'Deze paper analyseert misschien wel het meest uitdagende maar onderonderzochte aspect van afwikkelingstaken zoals coreferentieresolutie en entiteitskoppeling, dat is de oplossing van meervoudige vermeldingen. In tegenstelling tot enkelvoud vermeldingen die elk één entiteit vertegenwoordigen, staan meervoud vermeldingen voor meerdere entiteiten. Om dit aspect aan te pakken, nemen we het karakteridentificatiecorpus uit de gedeelde taak SemEval 2018 die bestaat uit entiteitsannotatie voor enkelvoudige vermeldingen, en breiden we het uit door annotatie toe te voegen voor meervoudige vermeldingen. Vervolgens introduceren we een nieuw algoritme voor coreferentie resolutie dat selectief clusters creëert om zowel enkelvoud als meervoud vermeldingen te verwerken, en ook een op deep learning gebaseerd entiteitskoppelingsmodel dat beide soorten vermeldingen gezamenlijk verwerkt door middel van multi-task leren. Ook voor deze taken worden aangepaste evaluatiestatistieken voorgesteld om de uniciteit van meervoud vermeldingen aan te pakken. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat de nieuwe coreference resolutie en entity linking modellen aanzienlijk beter presteren dan traditionele modellen die alleen voor enkelvoudige vermeldingen zijn ontworpen. Voor zover wij weten, is dit de eerste keer dat meervoud vermeldingen grondig worden geanalyseerd voor deze twee oplossingstaken.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия се анализира спорно най-предизвикателният, но недостатъчно проучен аспект на задачите за преструктуриране като решаване на съвместни референции и свързване на обекти, т.е. решаването на множествени споменания. За разлика от единичните споменания, всяко от които представлява едно цяло, множествено споменаване означава множество единици. За да се справим с този аспект, вземаме корпуса за идентификация на знаците от споделената задача която се състои от анотация на единични единици и го разширяваме чрез добавяне на анотация за множествени споменания. След това въвеждаме нов алгоритъм за разделяне на ядрени референции, който селективно създава клъстери, за да се справят както с единични, така и с множествени споменания, както и модел за свързване на обекти, базиран на дълбоко обучение, който съвместно обработва и двата вида споменавания чрез многозадачи обучение. За тези задачи се предлагат коригирани показатели за оценка, както и за справяне с уникалността на множествените споменания. Нашите експерименти показват, че новите модели за разделителна способност и свързване на обекти значително превъзхождат традиционните модели, проектирани само за отделни споменания. Доколкото знаем, това е първият път, когато множествените споменания се анализират задълбочено за тези две задачи за решаване.', 'da': 'Denne artikel analyserer nok det mest udfordrende, men underudforskede aspekt af afviklingsopgaver som coreferenceopløsning og entity linking, dvs. løsningen af flertalsomtaler. I modsætning til singular omtaler, som hver repræsenterer én enhed, står flertalsomtaler for flere enheder. For at tackle dette aspekt tager vi tegngidentifikationskorpusset fra SemEval 2018 delte opgave, der består af enhedsannotation til singular omtaler, og udvider det ved at tilføje annotation til flertalsomtaler. Vi introducerer derefter en ny algoritme til coreferenceopløsning, der selektivt opretter klynger til at håndtere både singular og plural omtaler, og også en deep learning-baseret entity linking model, der i fællesskab håndterer begge typer omtaler gennem multi-opgave læring. Der foreslås justerede evalueringsmålinger for disse opgaver samt for at håndtere det unikke ved flertalsomtaler. Vores eksperimenter viser, at den nye coreferenceopløsning og entity linking modeller betydeligt overgår traditionelle modeller designet kun til enkelte omtaler. Så vidt vi ved, er dette første gang, at flertalsomtaler analyseres grundigt for disse to opløsningsopgaver.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wird der wohl anspruchsvollste, aber wenig erforschte Aspekt von Abwicklungsaufgaben wie Coreferenz Resolution und Entity Linking analysiert, d.h. die Auflösung pluraler Erwähnungen. Im Gegensatz zu Singular-Erwähnungen, von denen jede eine Entität repräsentiert, stehen Plural-Erwähnungen für mehrere Entitäten. Um diesen Aspekt anzugehen, nehmen wir den Zeichenidentifikationskorpus aus der gemeinsamen Aufgabe SemEval 2018, die aus Entitätenannotation für singuläre Erwähnungen besteht, und erweitern ihn, indem wir Anmerkungen für plurale Erwähnungen hinzufügen. Anschließend stellen wir einen neuartigen Algorithmus zur Coreferenzauflösung vor, der selektiv Cluster erstellt, um sowohl Singular- als auch Plural-Erwähnungen zu verarbeiten, sowie ein Deep Learning-basiertes Entity-Verknüpfungsmodell, das beide Arten von Erwähnungen gemeinsam durch Multi-Task-Lernen behandelt. Für diese Aufgaben werden angepasste Auswertungsmetriken vorgeschlagen, um die Eindeutigkeit pluraler Erwähnungen zu handhaben. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass die neue Coreferenz-Auflösung und Entity-Linking-Modelle herkömmliche Modelle, die nur für singuläre Erwähnungen entwickelt wurden, deutlich übertreffen. Nach bestem Wissen werden hier zum ersten Mal plurale Erwähnungen für diese beiden Auflösungsaufgaben gründlich analysiert.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ به طور قابل تحلیل می\u200cکند که بیشتر مشکل\u200cترین هنوز زیر تحقیق شده\u200cای از کار\u200cهای حل\u200cشناسی مثل حل\u200cشناسی و ارتباط ارتباط، که حل\u200cشناسی اشاره\u200cهای زیادی است. برخلاف یک تنظیم هر یک از آن را معرفی می\u200cکند که یک تنظیم است، چندین تنظیم برای چندین تنظیم است. برای حل کردن این منظور، ما شرکت شناسایی شخصیت را از وظیفه\u200cای که در سال ۲۰۱۸ شرکت کرده\u200cایم، با اضافه کردن اضافه\u200cای برای یادآوری\u200cهای متعدد، می\u200cگیریم. سپس ما الگوریتم جدایی که از طریق یادآوری\u200cهای متعدد و متعدد و متعدد، یک الگوریتم جدایی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم که به طور انتخابی گروه\u200cهایی را می\u200cسازد که از طریق یادآوری\u200cهای متعدد و متعدد و متعدد و متعدد، و همچنین یک گروه عمیق یادآوری متصل می\u200cشود متریک ارزیابی تنظیم شده برای این وظیفه\u200cها پیشنهاد می\u200cشود، همچنین برای کنترل یک تنظیم یادآوری بسیاری. آزمایش های ما نشان می دهند که حل جدیدی و ارتباطی که مدلها را متصل می کنند، فقط برای یادآوری های واحدی طراحی می کنند بیشتر از مدلهای سنتی است. برای بهترین دانش ما، این اولین باری است که یادآوری بسیاری برای این دو کار حل کاملا تحلیل می\u200cشود.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menganalisis mungkin aspek yang paling menantang namun tidak dieksplorasi dalam tugas resolusi seperti resolusi koreferensi dan hubungan entitas, itulah resolusi dari banyak sebutan. Tidak seperti sebutan tunggal masing-masing yang mewakili satu entitas, sebutan plural berdiri untuk banyak entitas. Untuk mengatasi aspek ini, kita mengambil tubuh identifikasi karakter dari SemEval 2018 tugas berbagi yang terdiri dari anotasi entitas untuk sebutan tunggal, dan memperluasnya dengan menambahkan anotasi untuk sebutan plural. We then introduce a novel coreference resolution algorithm that selectively creates clusters to handle both singular and plural mentions, and also a deep learning-based entity linking model that jointly handles both types of mentions through multi-task learning.  Metrik evaluasi yang disesuaikan diusulkan untuk tugas-tugas ini juga untuk menangani unik sebutan plural. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa resolusi koreferensi baru dan entitas yang menghubungkan model secara signifikan melebihi model tradisional yang direncanakan hanya untuk sebutan tunggal. Menurut yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, ini adalah pertama kalinya yang banyak sebutan dianalisis dengan teliti untuk dua tugas resolusi ini.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz çözümleme we çözümleme zadynyň iň kynçylygyny analyzýar, ýaly nusga çözümleme we guramlaryň çözümlemesi, bu plural çözümleriň çözümlemesidir. Birliki bir zat diýip ýazylan ýaly, plural bir zat diýip ýazylýar. Bu aspekti çözmek üçin, 2018-nji SemEval tarapyndan karakter identifikaçy korpusyny alıp, bir üns diňlemek üçin bir zat duýdurmasyndan olup, we muny plural sözlerine duýdurmak üçin bir duýdurma ekläp genişleýäris. Soňra bir täze kardeşlikli çözümleme algoritmi saýlaýarlar we ýekelikli we plural agzalaryň derejesini çykarmak üçin bir taýdan gowy öwrenmeli bir taýdan bir nusga daşarylýar we ol ikisini bir ýagdaýda multi-täze öwrenmeden çykarmak üçin bir nusga çykýar. Bu zadalar üçin geliştirilen çykyş metrikleri plural çykyşlaryň ýekeňlikligini we çykmak üçin teklip edildi. Biziň deneylerimiz täze taýýarlyk çözümlerini we nusgalaryny baglaýan nusgalaryň diňe bir ýagdaý çykarmak üçin düzenlenen däpli nusgalarymyz ýok. Bilgimiziň iň gowy bolsa, bu plural agzalarynyň ilkinji gezek bu iki çözüm uzmanlary üçin doly çözümlenmesi üçin çözüldir.', 'ko': '본고는 공통적으로 소해와 실체 연결 등 소해 임무 중 가장 도전적이지만 아직 충분히 탐색되지 않은 측면, 즉 복수에서 언급한 소해를 분석했다.단수 언급과 달리 단수 언급은 하나의 실체를 대표하고 복수 언급은 여러 개의 실체를 대표한다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 SemEval 2018 공유 작업에서 문자인식 자료 라이브러리를 추출했습니다. 이 작업은 단수에 언급된 실체 주석을 포함하고 복수에 언급된 주석을 추가하여 확장합니다.그 다음에 우리는 새로운 공지소해 알고리즘을 소개했다. 이 알고리즘은 집단을 선택적으로 만들어 단수와 복수 언급을 처리하고 깊이 있는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 실체 링크 모델을 소개했다. 이 모델은 다중 임무 학습을 통해 이 두 가지 언급을 연합 처리한다.이러한 임무에 대해 복수 언급의 유일성을 처리하기 위해 조정된 평가 지표를 제시했다.우리의 실험에 의하면 새로운 공지 해소와 실체 링크 모델은 단지 단수로만 디자인을 언급한 전통 모델보다 현저히 낫다.우리가 알기로는 이 두 가지 해결 임무의 복수 형식에 대해 철저한 분석을 한 것은 이번이 처음이다.', 'sw': 'Kanisa hili linachambua changamoto kubwa zaidi na bado linaloendelea katika upande wa kazi za suluhisho kama vile suluhisho la msingi na vifaa vinavyounganisha, hilo ni suluhisho la maneno mengi. Unlike singular mentions each of which represents one entity, plural mentions stand for multiple entities.  Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, tunachukua viungo vya utambulisho wa tabia kutoka kwenye kazi ya SemEval 2018 ambazo ni pamoja na matangazo ya entity kwa ajili ya taja za pekee, na kuinua kwa kuongeza taarifa kwa maneno mengi. Kisha tunaonyesha utaratibu wa suluhisho la riwaya ambalo kwa uchaguzi unatengeneza viungo ili kukabiliana na maneno ya pekee na mengi, na pia kifaa cha kujifunza kinachohusiana na modeli inayohusiana pamoja na kutangaza aina zote za tajwa kwa njia ya kujifunza kazi nyingi. Utawala wa tathmini unapendekezwa kwa kazi hizi pamoja na kukabiliana na upekee wa maneno mengi. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kwamba suluhisho mpya ya mafanikio na vyombo vinavyounganisha kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya mifano ya kitamaduni iliyoandaliwa kwa ajili ya kutambua pekee. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, hii ni mara ya kwanza ambapo majina mengi yanachambuwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwa kazi hizi mbili za suluhisho.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument analizon ndoshta aspektin më të sfidueshëm ende të nëneksploruar të detyrave të zgjidhjes, të tilla si zgjidhja e korreferencës dhe lidhja e njësisë, kjo është zgjidhja e përmendimeve shumëfishte. Ndryshe nga përmendimet e veçanta secila prej të cilave përfaqëson një njësi, përmendimet shumëfishtare janë për njësi të shumëfishta. Për të trajtuar këtë aspekt, ne marrim trupin e identifikimit të karakterit nga detyra e përbashkët SemEval 2018 që përbëhet nga anotacioni i njësisë për përmendime të veçanta, dhe e zgjerojmë duke shtuar anotacion për përmendime të shumta. Pastaj prezantojmë një algoritëm të ri të rezolutës së korreferencës që krijon në mënyrë selektive grupe për të trajtuar si përmendimet e veçanta, ashtu edhe një njësi të thellë bazuar në mësim që lidh modelin që trajton së bashku të dy llojet e përmendimeve nëpërmjet mësimit me shumë detyra. Metrikat e rregulluara të vlerësimit propozohen për këto detyra si dhe për të trajtuar unikitetin e përmendimeve shumëfishe. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se rezoluta e re e korreferencës dhe njësia që lidh modelet në mënyrë të konsiderueshme tejkalojnë modelet tradicionale të dizajnuara vetëm për përmendime të veçanta. Për më të mirën e njohurive tona, kjo është hera e parë që përmendimet shumëfishore analizohen plotësisht për këto dy detyra rezolute.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին վերլուծում է, հավանաբար, լուծումների առաջադրանքների ամենադժվար, բայց թերբացահայտված ասպեկտը, ինչպիսիք են կորֆերենսի լուծումները և միավորների կապը, այսինքն՝ բազմաթիվ հիշողությունների լուծումները: Ի տարբերություն առանձնահատուկ նշումներին, որոնցից յուրաքանչյուրը ներկայացնում է մեկ միավոր, բազմաթիվ նշումները ներկայացնում են բազմաթիվ միավորներ: Այս ասպեկտը լուծելու համար մենք վերցնում ենք բնավորության հայտնաբերման կորպոսը 2018 թվականի "ՍեմԷվալ" համագործակցած խնդիրից, որը կազմված է առանձին հիշողությունների մասին կազմակերպության նոտացիայից, և ընդլայնում այն ավելացնելով բազմաթիվ Այնուհետև մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր կորեֆերանսի լուծումների ալգորիթմ, որը ընտրականորեն ստեղծում է խմբեր, որպեսզի վերահսկեն առանձին և բազմաթիվ հիշողությունները, ինչպես նաև խորը ուսումնասիրության հիմնված էության, որը կապում է մոդելը, որը միասին վերահսկում է երկու տեսակի Այս խնդիրների համար առաջարկում են հարմարեցված գնահատման չափսեր, ինչպես նաև բազմաթիվ հիշողությունների միանգամից վարվելու համար: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ նոր կորֆերենսի լուծումն ու մոդելներ կապող էությունը շատ ավելի շատ են արտադրում ավանդական մոդելները, որոնք նախագծված են միայն առանձին հիշողությունների համար: Մեր գիտելիքներից լավագույն ասած, սա առաջին անգամ է, երբ բազմաթիվ հիշողությունները հիմնականում վերլուծում են այս երկու լուծման խնդիրների համար:', 'af': "Hierdie papier analyseer argumenteel die mees opgelykende nog onder-ondersoekte aspek van oplossing opdragte soos koreferensie oplossing en einditeit wat verbind is, dit is die oplossing van plurale opmerking. Ongelik soos eenvoudige mense verteenwoordig elkeen van wat een entiteit verteenwoordig, plurale mense staan vir veelvuldige entiteite. Om hierdie aspekt te probeer, neem ons die karakter-identifikasie korpus van die semiEval 2018 gedeelde taak wat bestaan van entiteitannotasie vir eenvoudige menging en dit uitbrei deur annotasie vir plurale menging te voeg. Ons introduseer dan 'n nuwe koreferensie-oplossing algoritme wat selektief skep klasters om beide enkelêre en plurale menging te hanteer, en ook 'n diep onderwerp-gebaseerde entiteite te koppel model wat saamstig beide tipes van menging deur multi-taak leer hanteer. Verstelde evalueringsmetries word voorgestel vir hierdie taak asook om die unikeiteit van plurale mentionasies te hanteer. Ons eksperimente wys dat die nuwe koreferensieresolusie en entiteit wat modele verbind is, betekenlik uitvoer tradisionele modele wat slegs vir eenvoudige mentione ontwerp is. Op die beste van ons kennis is dit die eerste keer dat plurale bepaalde bepaalde is deursigtig analyseer vir hierdie twee oplossing taak.", 'az': 'Bu kağıt çətinliklərin ən çətinlikli, hətta aşağı keşfedilmiş çətinliklərin hissəsini analiz edir. Bu, çoxlu çətinliklərin çətinlikləridir. Hər birinin bir hissəsini təsdiqlədiyi kimi, çoxlu hissələr çoxlu hissələr üçün istifadə edir. Bu aspekti çəkmək üçün, 2018-ci SemEval paylaşdığı şəkil təsdiqləmə korpusu alırıq ki, bircə-bircə yada salmaq üçün entity annotation içərisində olub, çoxlu yada salmaq üçün nəsihətdən artırırıq. Sonra yeni bir mərhəmətli çözünürlük algoritmi təşkil edirik ki, hər ikisini və çoxlu sözləri təşkil etmək üçün gruplar yaradır, həmçinin çoxlu işin öyrənməsi ilə birlikdə hər ikisini təşkil edir. Həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin həmçinin çoxlu yaddaşların təkrarlığını idarə etmək üçün təklif edilmişdir. Bizim təcrübələrimiz yeni mərhəmətli çözünürlük və modelləri birləşdirən mərhəmətli modelləri sadəcə yalnız təkcə yada salmaq üçün müəyyən edilmiş modellərdən çox üstün olduğunu göstərir. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşısına gəldikdə, bu ilk dəfə çoxlu yaddaşların bu iki çözünürlü işlər üçün tamamilə analiz edilməsi idi.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা যুক্তিভাবে বিশ্লেষণ করে যুক্তি যুক্তিভাবে বিশ্লেষণ করে সিদ্ধান্ত কাজের অধীনে তদন্তের সবচেয়ে বেশী চ্যালেঞ্জের বিশ্ একাত্মক উল্লেখের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রত্যেকেই একটি বস্তুর প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে, ব এই দিকের মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা সেমইভাল ২০১৮ সাল থেকে চিহ্নিত চিহ্নিত কর্পুস নিয়ে যাচ্ছি যেখানে প্রতিষ্ঠানের জন্য একান্তভাবে উল্লেখ করা হয়েছে  তারপর আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের কোরেফেন্সের সিদ্ধান্ত আলোরিদম পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই যা নির্বাচিত ক্লাস্টার সৃষ্টি করেছে একত্র এবং বহুবারের মানুষের মাধ্যমে এবং একই সাথে গভীর শি এই কাজের জন্য বৈধ মূল্যবোধের প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে এবং পার্থক্যের মানুষের বৈশিষ্ট্য নিয়ে যাওয়ার জন্য। আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে নতুন কোরেফারেন্স সিদ্ধান্ত এবং প্রতিষ্ঠানের সংযোগ মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাবে প্রকা আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোভাবে এটাই প্রথমবার যে এই দুই সিদ্ধান্ত কাজের জন্য বিশ্লেষণ করা হয়।', 'am': 'ይህም ሕገጽ፣ የቁጥጥር ማስታወቂያ እና አካባቢ ግንኙነት፣ እንደተጨማሪው መልዕክት፣ ይህ የብዛት ጉዳይ ማስታወቂያ ነው፡፡ በአንድ አካባቢ እና እያንዳንዳቸው አንድ አካባቢ እንዲያሳየው በተለየ ብሔራዊ ማስታወቂያዎች ለብዙዎች አካባቢዎች ይቆማሉ፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀናቀል፣ ከSemEval 2018 የሥርዓት ግንኙነት አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ማስታወቂያውን ለመቀበል እናስፋፋታለን፡፡ በኋላም የዘላለም የኮርፌንሽን መልስ አሌጎርቲምን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የዚህ ስራ ማሰናከል ማተሚያዎች እና የአንባቢው ብልሃት መቆጣጠር ለመፈለግ ይጠቅማል፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን አዲስ የኮርፌንስ ማስታወቂያ እና አካባቢ አካሄድ ማተሚያዎች ለብቻው ማሳየት ብቻ የተዘጋጁ የባሕላዊ ዓይነቶች የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ በተሻለ እውቀታችን፣ ይህ የመጀመሪያ ጊዜ ነው፤ ለዚህ ለሁለቱ መለያየት ስራ በትክክል ይታያል፡፡', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir analizira argumentno najizazovniji, a to je rezolucija pluralnih spominjanja, aspekta rezolucija zadataka poput rezolucije pristojnosti i povezanja entiteta. Za razliku od jedinstvenog spominjanja svakog od kojih predstavlja jednu entitetu, pluralna spominjanja predstavlja višestruke entitate. Da bismo se riješili ovog aspekta, uzeli smo korpus identifikacije karaktera iz zajedničkog zadatka semiEvala 2018, koji sastoji od annotacije entiteta za jednostavne spominje, i proširili ga dodajući annotaciju za pluralne spominje. Onda predstavljamo novi algoritam rezolucije liječnosti koji selektivno stvara skupine kako bi se nosila i jednostavna i pluralna spomena, kao i duboko učenje-bazirana entiteta koja povezuje model koji zajedno vodi obje vrste spomena kroz učenje multizadataka. Prilagođene mjere procjene predlažu se za te zadatke, kao i za rješavanje jedinstvenosti pluralnih spomena. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da nova rezolucija i entitet koji povezuju modele značajno iznosi tradicionalne modele dizajnirane samo za jednostavne spominje. Za najbolje od našeg znanja, ovo je prvi put da se mnogih spomena temeljno analiziraju za ove dvije rezolucije zadatke.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis analüüsitakse vaieldamatult kõige keerulisemat, kuid alauuritud aspekti kriisilahendusega seotud ülesannetes, nagu näiteks kaasviide lahendamine ja üksuste sidumine, st mitmusmärkide lahendamine. Erinevalt ainulaadsetest mainimistest, millest igaüks esindab ühte olemit, tähistavad mitmused mitut olemit. Selle aspekti lahendamiseks võtame SemEval 2018 jagatud ülesande iseloomu identifitseerimise korpuse, mis koosneb olemi annoteerimisest ainulaadsete märkide jaoks, ja laiendame seda, lisades annoteerimise mitmusmärkide jaoks. Seejärel tutvustame uudset kortereferentsi resolutsiooni algoritmi, mis loob valikuliselt klastrid, et käsitleda nii ainus- kui mitmusmärkusi, ning samuti sügavõppepõhist olemi linkimismudelit, mis käsitleb ühiselt mõlemat tüüpi märkusi mitme ülesandega õppe kaudu. Nende ülesannete jaoks pakutakse välja kohandatud hindamismõõdikud, et käsitleda mitmusmärkide ainulaadsust. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et uued kortereferentsi eraldusvõime ja olemi sidumise mudelid ületavad oluliselt traditsioonilisi mudeleid, mis on mõeldud ainult üksikute märkuste jaoks. Meie parimate teadmiste kohaselt analüüsitakse nende kahe resolutsiooniülesande puhul põhjalikult mitmekordseid nimetusi.', 'cs': 'Tento článek analyzuje pravděpodobně nejnáročnější dosud nedostatečně prozkoumaný aspekt úloh řešení, jako je řešení koreference a propojení entit, tj. řešení množných zmínek. Na rozdíl od jednotlivých zmínek, z nichž každá představuje jednu entitu, množné zmínky znamenají více entit. Pro řešení tohoto aspektu vezmeme korpus identifikace znaků ze sdíleného úkolu SemEval 2018, který se skládá z anotace entity pro jednotlivé zmínky, a rozšiřujeme ho o přidání anotace pro množné zmínky. Poté představujeme nový algoritmus rozlišení koreferencí, který selektivně vytváří clustery pro zpracování jednotných i množných zmínek, a také model propojení entit založený na hlubokém učení, který společně zpracovává oba typy zmínek prostřednictvím víceúkolového učení. Pro tyto úkoly jsou navrženy upravené hodnotící metriky pro zvládnutí jedinečnosti množných zmínek. Naše experimenty ukazují, že nové rozlišení koreference a modely propojení entit výrazně překonávají tradiční modely určené pouze pro jednotlivé zmínky. Podle našeho nejlepšího vědomí je to poprvé, kdy jsou množné zmínky důkladně analyzovány pro tyto dva úkoly řešení.', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa analysoidaan kiistatta haastavimpaa mutta vﾃ､hﾃ､n tutkittua kriisinratkaisutehtﾃ､vien nﾃ､kﾃｶkulmaa, kuten yhteispﾃ､ﾃ､tﾃｶsratkaisua ja entiteettilinkitystﾃ､, eli monikonmainintojen ratkaisemista. Toisin kuin yksittﾃ､iset maininnat, joista jokainen edustaa yhtﾃ､ entiteettiﾃ､, monikko maininnat tarkoittavat useita entiteettejﾃ､. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n nﾃ､kﾃｶkulman kﾃ､sittelemiseksi otamme SemEval 2018:n jaetusta tehtﾃ､vﾃ､stﾃ､ hahmotunnistuskorpuksen, joka koostuu yksikkﾃｶmainintojen entiteettiannotoinnista, ja laajennamme sitﾃ､ lisﾃ､ﾃ､mﾃ､llﾃ､ annotointia monikkoon mainintoihin. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n jﾃ､lkeen esittelemme uuden koreferenssiresoluution algoritmin, joka valikoivasti luo klustereita kﾃ､sittelemﾃ､ﾃ､n sekﾃ､ yksittﾃ､is- ettﾃ､ monikonmainintoja, sekﾃ､ syvﾃ､oppimiseen perustuvan entiteettilinkitysmallin, joka kﾃ､sittelee molempia mainintoja yhdessﾃ､ monitehtﾃ､vﾃ､oppimisen avulla. Nﾃ､ihin tehtﾃ､viin ehdotetaan mukautettuja arviointimittareita monikonmainintojen yksilﾃｶllisyyden kﾃ､sittelemiseksi. Kokeemme osoittavat, ettﾃ､ uudet koreferenssiresoluutio- ja entiteettilinkitysmallit ylittﾃ､vﾃ､t merkittﾃ､vﾃ､sti perinteisiﾃ､ malleja, jotka on suunniteltu vain yksittﾃ､isiin mainintoihin. Tietojemme mukaan tﾃ､mﾃ､ on ensimmﾃ､inen kerta, kun moniarvoisia mainintoja analysoidaan perusteellisesti nﾃ､iden kahden kriisinratkaisutehtﾃ､vﾃ､n osalta.', 'ca': "Aquest paper analitza probablement l'aspecte més desafiant i subexplorat de les tasques de resolució com la resolució de coreferència i l'enllaç entre entitats, és a dir, la resolució de mencions plurals. A diferència de les mencions singulars que cadascuna representa una entitat, les mencions plurals representan múltiples. Per abordar aquest aspecte, agafem el cos d'identificació de caràcters de la tasca compartida SemEval 2018 que consisteix en anotació d'entitats per mencions singulars, i l'ampliem afegint anotació per mencions plurals. Llavors introduïm un nou algoritme de resolució de coreferència que crea de manera selectiva agrupaments per gestionar mentions singulars i plurals, i també una entitat profunda basada en l'aprenentatge que enllaça un model que gestiona conjuntament ambdós tipus de mentions mitjançant aprenentatge multitascat. Adjusted evaluation metrics are proposed for these tasks as well to handle the uniqueness of plural mentions.  Els nostres experiments demostren que la nova resolució de coreferència i l'entitat que enllaça models superen significativament els models tradicionals dissenyats només per mencions singulars. Per millor que sabem, aquesta és la primera vegada que les mencions plurals s'analitzen completament per aquestes dues tasques de resolució.", 'jv': 'Meksikowe kargonalan kelambak jejaring, nggawe barang nggawe gerangkat luwih karo Resolusi Daftar karo Resolusi layar Singular Nambah nambah iki, kita nggawe cara-nambah perusahaan denganpilihan karo semi-inval 2013 sing dikarolan nggawe barang nggawe ngubah apakno We unye nyenggawe un barêng ngêlêrung Resolusi Algorithm sing diunting ngêlêngêmên kuwi ngêlêngêmên ngerwih sistem sing beraksi lan plural menyang, lan tambah sak ngêlêngêmên basa khitas ngêlêngêmên model sing jointêmên handle éwé types of menyang dilêngêmên dilêngê name Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan anyar tentang karo nggawe geranggap karo model sing apik tur angel Panjenengan langkung apik dhéwé ngerti, iki tualke iki dadi kanggo ngerasakno plural karo hal-hal kanggo ngerasakno iki dadi Resolusi iki.', 'ha': "Wannan takarda yana anaƙayyade masu ƙaranci da kuma mafi ƙaranci a baka-wajen rabo masu aikin rabo kamar yin rabon sarrafi na damaci da maɓalli, wannan ne rabon misalin abun tarayya. Tsarin da aka ambaci sunan ɗai da kõwa daga cikinsu yana wakinsa da kima guda, sunayen abuni masu ƙaranci na tsaye wa abun masu yawa. Yana samun wannan aspecti, za mu karɓi nau'in rubutu daga aikin Simeval 2018 mai rabo da shi wanda yana ƙunsa da zane-zane wa abun da aka ambaci sunan-sunana masu kaɗan, kuma mu faɗa shi da za'a ƙara zane-zane wa masu ƙarai. Sa'an nan kuma Muke introduce wani algoriti na kure-sararin nohanna, wanda ke iya shagala, yana ƙarfafa matsayi don su yi amfani da su masu shiryuwa da takarda masu tsakiya da masu tsakiya, kuma da misali mai ɗauki da shaidar a saman da aka sani masu haɗi da su duk nau'i biyu masu ambato a tsakanin aiki masu ƙaranci. Ana buƙata metrici da aka jurna wa wannan aikin da za'a yi amfani da tunkuɗe wa masu shiryuwa na zaɓani. Kayan jarrabõyinmu na nuna cewa masu buƙata masu jiɓinci da masu tsari da sami-sami masu yin amfani da muhimmi, suna samar da misãlai na'urar da aka designe shi kawai dõmin misalin-taki guda. Ga mafi kyaun saninmu, wannan ne mara na farkon da ake analyza misalin mutane na biyu.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je verjetno analiziran najbolj zahteven, vendar premalo raziskan vidik nalog reševanja, kot sta reševanje sooference in povezovanje entitet, to je reševanje množinskih omemb. Za razliko od omemb enote, od katerih vsaka predstavlja eno entiteto, množinske omembe pomenijo več entitet. Za reševanje tega vidika vzamemo korpus identifikacije znakov iz skupne naloge SemEval 2018, ki je sestavljen iz opombe entitete za enotne omembe, in ga razširimo z dodajanjem opombe za množinske omembe. Nato predstavimo nov algoritem ločljivosti jedrske reference, ki selektivno ustvarja grozde za obravnavanje enotnih in množinskih omemb, ter tudi model povezovanja entitet, ki temelji na globokem učenju, ki skupaj obravnava obe vrsti omemb skozi večopravilno učenje. Za te naloge so predlagane prilagojene meritve ocenjevanja, da bi obravnavali edinstvenost množinskih omemb. Naši poskusi kažejo, da so novi modeli ločljivosti jedrske reference in povezovanja entitet bistveno boljši od tradicionalnih modelov, zasnovanih samo za posamezne omembe. Kolikor vemo, je to prvič, da se množinske omembe temeljito analizirajo pri teh dveh nalogah reševanja.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מנתח בטח את האפקט האתגר ביותר, אך לא חוקר מתחת למשימות פיתרון, כמו פיתרון קווירנס וקשר יחידות, זאת הפתרון של הזכרונות רבים. בניגוד לזכרונות מיוחדים שכל אחד מהם מייצג יחידה אחת, הזכרונות רבות עומדות על יחידות רבות. כדי להתמודד עם האינטרנט הזה, אנו לוקחים את גופוס זיהוי הדמות מ SemEval 2018 משימה משותפת שמתכתבת בציון ישות לזכרונות בודדים, ולהרחיב אותו על ידי להוסיף ציון לזכרונות רבות. ואז אנחנו מציגים אלגוריתם חדש לפתרון התאמה שמייצר באופן בוחר קבוצות כדי לטפל בזכרונות בודדים וגם בהרבים, וגם יחידה עמוקה מבוססת ללמוד שמקשרת מודל שמטפל ביחד בשני סוגי הזכרונות דרך לימוד רב משימות. מטריות הערכה מוצפות מוצעות גם למשימות אלה כדי להתמודד עם היחידות של הזכרונות רבים. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהפתרון החדש והיחידה החדשה שמקשרת דוגמנים יוצאת משמעות יותר ממודלים מסורתיים שנועדו רק לזכרונות בודדים. לפי הידע הטוב ביותר שלנו, זו הפעם הראשונה שזכרונות רבים מנתחים באופן יסודי לשני משימות הפתרון האלה.', 'bo': 'This paper analyzes arguably the most challenging yet under-explored aspect of resolution tasks such as coreference resolution and entity linking, that is the resolution of plural mentions. སྒེར་གྱི་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་སོ་སོ་སོའི་ནང་དུ་དབྱིབས་གཅིག་དང་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་གྲངས་ཀ་སྐོར་ལབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདི་ལྟར་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལ། ང་ཚོར་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དབུས་ཁང་གཙོ་ངོས་ཁང་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་SemEval 2018་ཡི་ནང་གི་ལས་འགན་སྡུད་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་རྣམས་ནང་ཡོད་པའི་ཨ་ར We then introduce a novel coreference resolution algorithm that selectively creates clusters to handle both singular and plural mentions, and also a deep learning-based entity linking model that jointly handles both types of mentions through multi-task learning. Adjusted evaluation metrics are proposed for these tasks as well to handle the uniqueness of plural mentions. Our experiments show that the new coreference resolution and entity linking models significantly outperform traditional models designed only for singular mentions. ང་ཚོའི་ཤེས་ཚད་དགའ་པོ་དེ་ལ། འདི་ནི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཐེངས་དང་པོ་ནས་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་མིག་སྒྲིལ་གྱི་བྱ་བ་གཉིས་ཆ་སྒྲི'}
{'en': 'Challenges of language technologies for the indigenous languages of the Americas', 'ar': 'تحديات تقنيات اللغة للغات السكان الأصليين للأمريكتين', 'pt': 'Desafios das tecnologias linguísticas para as línguas indígenas das Américas', 'fr': 'Les défis des technologies langagières pour les langues autochtones des Amériques', 'es': 'Desafíos de las tecnologías lingüísticas para las lenguas indígenas de las Américas', 'ja': '南北アメリカ先住民言語の言語技術の課題', 'hi': 'अमेरिका की स्वदेशी भाषाओं के लिए भाषा प्रौद्योगिकियों की चुनौतियां', 'zh': '美洲土语术', 'ru': 'Проблемы языковых технологий для языков коренных народов Северной и Южной Америки', 'ga': 'Dúshláin na dteicneolaíochtaí teanga do theangacha dúchasacha Mheiriceá', 'el': 'Προκλήσεις γλωσσικών τεχνολογιών για τις αυτόχθονες γλώσσες της Αμερικής', 'hu': 'A nyelvtechnológiák kihívásai az amerikai őshonos nyelvek számára', 'it': 'Sfide delle tecnologie linguistiche per le lingue indigene delle Americhe', 'ka': 'ენის ტექნოლოგიების შეცდომა ამერიკის კოდენო ენებისთვის', 'lt': 'Amerikos vietinių kalbų kalbų kalbų technologijų uždaviniai', 'mk': 'Challenges of language technologies for the indigenous languages of the Americas', 'kk': 'Американың бағытты тілдер үшін тіл технологияларының өзгерістері', 'ml': 'അമേരിക്കക്കാരുടെ പാര്\u200dവ്വ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഭാഷ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളുടെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Tandakan teknologi bahasa untuk bahasa asli Amerika', 'mn': 'Америкийн төрөлхтний хэлний технологи', 'mt': 'Sfidi tat-teknoloġiji lingwistiċi għall-lingwi indiġeni tal-Amerika', 'no': 'Utfordringar av språk-teknologi for dei indrumspråka i Amerika', 'pl': 'Wyzwania technologii językowych dla języków rdzennych Ameryk', 'ro': 'Provocările tehnologiilor lingvistice pentru limbile indigene din America', 'sr': 'Izazovi jezičkih tehnologija za Indijanske jezike Amerike', 'si': 'ඇමරිකාවේ භාෂා තාක්ෂණාත්මක භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'so': 'Challenges of Teknolojiyada luuqadaha afka Finnishka ee Mareykanka', 'sv': 'Utmaningar med språkteknik för de inhemska språken i Amerika', 'ta': 'அமெரிக்காவின் உள்ளூர் மொழிகளுக்கான மொழி தொழில்நுட்பம்', 'ur': 'امریکا کی اصلی زبانوں کے لئے زبان تکنولوژی کے اختیار', 'uz': 'Amerika uchun oddiy tillar uchun tillar teknologiya tajribalari', 'vi': 'Thách thức của kỹ thuật ngôn ngữ cho ngôn ngữ bản xứ của Châu Mỹ', 'bg': 'Предизвикателства на езиковите технологии за местните езици в Америка', 'da': 'Sprogteknologiens udfordringer for de indfødte sprog i Amerika', 'hr': 'Izazovi jezičkih tehnologija za Indijanske jezike Amerike', 'de': 'Herausforderungen der Sprachtechnologien für die indigenen Sprachen Amerikas', 'nl': 'Uitdagingen van taaltechnologieën voor de inheemse talen van Amerika', 'id': 'tantangan teknologi bahasa untuk bahasa asli Amerika', 'ko': '언어 기술이 아메리카 원주민 언어에 대한 도전', 'fa': 'چالش تکنولوژی زبانی برای زبانهای اصلی آمریکا', 'tr': 'Amerika indiki diller üçin dil teknolojileriniň çözgütleri', 'af': 'Opdragte van taal teknologies vir die indienstale van die Amerika', 'sw': 'Changamoto la teknolojia ya lugha kwa lugha za wenyeji wa Marekani', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ቴክኖጂ የየአሜሪካ ቋንቋዎች ግንኙነት', 'bn': 'আমেরিকার আদিবাসী ভাষার জন্য ভাষার প্রযুক্তির চ্যালেঞ্জ', 'sq': 'Sfidat e teknologjisë gjuhësore për gjuhët vendase të Amerikës', 'hy': 'Լեզվային տեխնոլոգիաների մարտահրավերները Ամերիկայի բնական լեզուների համար', 'ca': 'Els reptes de les tecnologies lingüístices per a les llengües indígenes dels Estats Units', 'az': 'Amerika tayfalar캼 칲칞칲n dil teknolojil톛rinin 칞톛tinlikl톛ri', 'cs': 'Výzvy jazykových technologií pro domorodé jazyky Ameriky', 'bs': 'Izazovi jezičkih tehnologija za Indijanske jezike Amerike', 'et': 'Ameerika põliskeelte keeltehnoloogia väljakutsed', 'fi': 'Kieliteknologian haasteet Amerikan alkuperäiskielille', 'jv': 'Gambar aturan teknêlogi kanggo langgar alêh-alêran wong.', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase', 'sk': 'Izzivi jezikovnih tehnologij za avtohtone jezike Amerike', 'he': 'אתגרים של טכנולוגיות שפה לשפות המקומיות של אמריקה', 'bo': 'ཨ་རིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་འཕེལ་རིག་གི་དཀའ་བརྡན།'}
{'en': 'Indigenous languages of the American continent are highly diverse. However, they have received little attention from the technological perspective. In this paper, we review the research, the digital resources and the available NLP systems that focus on these languages. We present the main challenges and research questions that arise when distant languages and low-resource scenarios are faced. We would like to encourage NLP research in linguistically rich and diverse areas like the Americas.', 'ar': 'لغات السكان الأصليين في القارة الأمريكية متنوعة للغاية. ومع ذلك ، فقد تلقوا القليل من الاهتمام من المنظور التكنولوجي. في هذه الورقة ، نراجع البحث والموارد الرقمية وأنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية المتاحة التي تركز على هذه اللغات. نقدم التحديات الرئيسية وأسئلة البحث التي تنشأ عند مواجهة اللغات البعيدة والسيناريوهات منخفضة الموارد. نود أن نشجع أبحاث البرمجة اللغوية العصبية في مناطق متنوعة وغنية لغويًا مثل الأمريكتين.', 'es': 'Las lenguas indígenas del continente americano son muy diversas. Sin embargo, han recibido poca atención desde el punto de vista tecnológico. En este artículo, revisamos la investigación, los recursos digitales y los sistemas de PNL disponibles que se centran en estos idiomas. Presentamos los principales desafíos y preguntas de investigación que surgen cuando se enfrentan idiomas distantes y escenarios de bajos recursos. Nos gustaría fomentar la investigación sobre PNL en áreas diversas y con gran riqueza lingüística, como las Américas.', 'pt': 'As línguas indígenas do continente americano são altamente diversificadas. No entanto, eles têm recebido pouca atenção do ponto de vista tecnológico. Neste artigo, revisamos a pesquisa, os recursos digitais e os sistemas de PNL disponíveis com foco nessas linguagens. Apresentamos os principais desafios e questões de pesquisa que surgem quando são enfrentados idiomas distantes e cenários de poucos recursos. Gostaríamos de incentivar a pesquisa em PNL em áreas linguísticamente ricas e diversas, como as Américas.', 'fr': "Les langues autochtones du continent américain sont très diverses. Cependant, ils n'ont reçu que peu d'attention du point de vue technologique. Dans cet article, nous passons en revue les recherches, les ressources numériques et les systèmes de PNL disponibles qui se concentrent sur ces langues. Nous présentons les principaux défis et questions de recherche qui se posent lorsque des langues lointaines et des scénarios de ressources faibles sont confrontés. Nous aimerions encourager la recherche sur la PNL dans des régions riches et diversifiées sur le plan linguistique, comme les Amériques.", 'ja': 'アメリカ大陸の先住民の言語は非常に多様である。しかし、それらは技術的な観点からはほとんど注目されていない。この論文では、これらの言語に焦点を当てた研究、デジタルリソース、利用可能なNLPシステムをレビューします。私たちは、遠隔言語と低資源シナリオが直面したときに生じる主な課題と研究の質問を提示します。私たちは、アメリカ大陸のような言語的に豊かで多様な地域でのNLP研究を奨励したいと考えています。', 'hi': 'अमेरिकी महाद्वीप की स्वदेशी भाषाएं अत्यधिक विविध हैं। हालांकि, उन्हें तकनीकी परिप्रेक्ष्य से बहुत कम ध्यान दिया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम अनुसंधान, डिजिटल संसाधनों और उपलब्ध एनएलपी प्रणालियों की समीक्षा करते हैं जो इन भाषाओं पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हम मुख्य चुनौतियों और शोध प्रश्नों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो तब उत्पन्न होते हैं जब दूर की भाषाओं और कम संसाधन परिदृश्यों का सामना करना पड़ता है। हम अमेरिका जैसे भाषाई रूप से समृद्ध और विविध क्षेत्रों में एनएलपी अनुसंधान को प्रोत्साहित करना चाहते हैं।', 'zh': '美洲大陆土著语高多样化。 然以术观之,殆无所关。 于本文中,顾而究之,数资注言者,可以NLP统。 发于远言低资源场之要。 愿劝言富地(如美洲)NLP研究。', 'ru': 'Языки коренных народов американского континента весьма разнообразны. Однако с технологической точки зрения им уделяется мало внимания. В этой статье мы рассмотрим исследования, цифровые ресурсы и доступные системы NLP, которые фокусируются на этих языках. Мы представляем основные вызовы и исследовательские вопросы, возникающие при столкновении с отдаленными языками и малоресурсными сценариями. Мы хотели бы поощрять исследования NLP в лингвистически богатых и разнообразных областях, таких как Америка.', 'ga': 'Tá teangacha dúchasacha na mór-roinne Mheiriceá an-ilghnéitheach. Mar sin féin, is beag aird a fuair siad ó thaobh na teicneolaíochta de. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid athbhreithniú ar an taighde, ar na hacmhainní digiteacha agus ar na córais NLP atá ar fáil a dhíríonn ar na teangacha seo. Cuirimid i láthair na príomhdhúshláin agus na ceisteanna taighde a thagann chun cinn nuair a thugtar aghaidh ar theangacha i bhfad i gcéin agus ar chásanna lagacmhainne. Ba mhaith linn taighde NLP a spreagadh i réimsí saibhir agus éagsúla ó thaobh na teanga de mar Mheiriceá.', 'ka': 'ამერიკანეთის კონტენტინტის ინდეგენური ენები ძალიან განსხვავებულია. მაგრამ ისინი ტექნოლოგიური პერსპექტიკოდან ცოტა აღმოჩენა. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ შევხედავთ განსხვავებას, დიზიტალური რესურსები და ხელსახური NLP სისტემები, რომლებიც ამ ენაზე ფორკურებულია. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილებები და სწავლობის კითხვები, რომლებიც იქნება, როდესაც განსხვავებულია ენები და ცოტა რესურსის სენარიოები. ჩვენ მინდა დავიწყვიოთ NLP სწავლობა ენგლიგისტიკურად ბედნიერი და განსხვავებული ადგილებში, როგორც ამერიკაში.', 'hu': 'Az amerikai kontinens őslakos nyelvei nagyon változatosak. Mindazonáltal technológiai szempontból kevés figyelmet kaptak rájuk. Ebben a tanulmányban áttekintjük a kutatásokat, a digitális erőforrásokat és a rendelkezésre álló NLP rendszereket, amelyek ezekre a nyelvekre összpontosítanak. Bemutatjuk azokat a főbb kihívásokat és kutatási kérdéseket, amelyek akkor merülnek fel, amikor távoli nyelvek és alacsony erőforrásokkal rendelkező forgatókönyvek szembesülnek. Szeretnénk ösztönözni az NLP kutatását nyelvileg gazdag és sokszínű területeken, mint például Amerikában.', 'lt': 'Amerikos žemyno vietinės kalbos labai įvairios. Tačiau technologiniu požiūriu jiems buvo skiriamas mažas dėmesys. Šiame dokumente mes peržiūrime mokslinius tyrimus, skaitmeninius išteklius ir turimas NLP sistemas, kuriomis daugiausia dėmesio skiriama šioms kalboms. Mes pristatome pagrindinius uždavinius ir mokslinių tyrimų klausimus, kylančius susidūrus su tolimomis kalbomis ir mažai išteklių turinčiais scenarijais. Norėtume skatinti NLP mokslinius tyrimus kalbomis turtingose ir įvairiose srityse, pvz., Amerikoje.', 'el': 'Οι αυτόχθονες γλώσσες της αμερικανικής ηπείρου είναι ιδιαίτερα διαφορετικές. Ωστόσο, έχουν λάβει ελάχιστη προσοχή από τεχνολογική άποψη. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εξετάζουμε την έρευνα, τους ψηφιακούς πόρους και τα διαθέσιμα συστήματα που εστιάζουν σε αυτές τις γλώσσες. Παρουσιάζουμε τις κύριες προκλήσεις και ερευνητικά ερωτήματα που προκύπτουν όταν αντιμετωπίζονται μακρινές γλώσσες και σενάρια χαμηλού δυναμικού. Θα θέλαμε να ενθαρρύνουμε την έρευνα σε γλωσσικά πλούσιες και ποικίλες περιοχές όπως η Αμερική.', 'it': 'Le lingue indigene del continente americano sono molto diverse. Tuttavia, hanno ricevuto poca attenzione dal punto di vista tecnologico. In questo articolo, esaminiamo la ricerca, le risorse digitali e i sistemi PNL disponibili che si concentrano su questi linguaggi. Presentiamo le principali sfide e le domande di ricerca che sorgono quando si affrontano linguaggi lontani e scenari a basso contenuto di risorse. Vorremmo incoraggiare la ricerca sul PNL in aree linguisticamente ricche e diversificate come le Americhe.', 'mk': 'Индигените јазици на американскиот континент се многу различни. Сепак, тие добија малку внимание од технолошка перспектива. Во овој документ, ги прегледуваме истражувањата, дигиталните ресурси и достапните НЛП системи кои се фокусираат на овие јазици. Ги претставуваме главните предизвици и истражувачките прашања кои се појавуваат кога се соочуваат со далечните јазици и сценарија со ниски ресурси. Би сакале да го охрабриме истражувањето на НЛП во јазички богати и различни области како Америка.', 'ms': 'Indigenous languages of the American continent are highly diverse.  Namun, mereka telah menerima sedikit perhatian dari perspektif teknologi. Dalam kertas ini, kami meninjau kajian, sumber digital dan sistem NLP yang tersedia yang fokus pada bahasa-bahasa ini. Kami memperkenalkan cabaran utama dan soalan kajian yang muncul apabila bahasa jauh dan skenario sumber rendah dihadapi. Kami ingin mendorong penelitian NLP di kawasan berbagai bahasa yang kaya dan berbagai-bagai seperti Amerika.', 'kk': 'Американың тілдері өте түрлі. Бірақ олар технологиялық перспективадан кішкентай болды. Бұл қағазда, біз зерттеу, цифрлық ресурстарды және қол жеткізетін NLP жүйелерін бұл тілдерге назар аударып көреміз. Қашықтағы тілдер мен төмен ресурс сценарияларына қарағанда негізгі мәселелерді және зерттеу сұрақтарын таңдаймыз. Біз Америка секілді тілдік баяны және әртүрлі аумақтарда NLP зерттеулерін түсінеміз келеді.', 'ml': 'അമേരിക്കക്കൂട്ടത്തിലെ നാട്ടിലെ ഭാഷകള്\u200d വളരെ വ്യത്യസ്തമാണ്. എങ്കിലും സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ കാഴ്ചയില്\u200d നിന്ന് അവര്\u200dക്ക് കുറച്ച് ശ്രദ്ധ കിട്ടിയിട്ടുണ്ട്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന പരിശോധന, ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങളും ലഭ്യമായ NLP സിസ്റ്റമുണ്ട്. ദൂരെയുള്ള ഭാഷകളെയും കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളെയും നേരിടുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിലാസങ്ങളെയും പഠിപ്പിക അമേരിക്കക്കാരെപ്പോലെ സമ്പന്നരും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d നമുക്ക് NLP ഗവേഷണം ആശ്വാസപ്പെടുത്തണം.', 'pl': 'Języki rdzenne kontynentu amerykańskiego są bardzo zróżnicowane. Jednakże z perspektywy technologicznej poświęcono im niewiele uwagi. W niniejszym artykule przeglądamy badania, zasoby cyfrowe i dostępne systemy NLP koncentrujące się na tych językach. Przedstawiamy główne wyzwania i pytania badawcze, które pojawiają się w obliczu odległych języków i scenariuszy niskich zasobów. Chcielibyśmy zachęcić do badań NLP w obszarach bogatych językowo i zróżnicowanych, takich jak Ameryka.', 'mn': 'Америкийн тив нутагтай хэл маш олон төрлийн. Гэхдээ тэд технологийн харагдаас бага анхаарал авсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид судалгаа, дижитал нөөц болон эдгээр хэл дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг NLP системүүдийг судалж байна. Бид хол хэл болон бага нөөцийн хувилбарууд нүүрсэн үед гарч ирэх гол сорилтууд болон судалгааны асуултуудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид НЛП-ын судалгааг Америк шиг хэлний баян, олон төрлийн хэсэгт дэмжихийг хүсч байна.', 'ro': 'Limbile indigene de pe continentul american sunt foarte diverse. Cu toate acestea, acestea au primit puțină atenție din perspectiva tehnologică. În această lucrare, analizăm cercetarea, resursele digitale și sistemele PNL disponibile care se concentrează pe aceste limbi. Prezentăm principalele provocări și întrebări de cercetare care apar atunci când se confruntă limbi îndepărtate și scenarii cu resurse reduse. Am dori să încurajăm cercetarea PNL în domenii bogate din punct de vedere lingvistic și diverse, cum ar fi Americile.', 'mt': 'Il-lingwi indiġeni tal-kontinent Amerikan huma differenti ħafna. Madankollu, dawn irċevew ftit attenzjoni mill-perspettiva teknoloġika. F’dan id-dokument, irrivedu r-riċerka, ir-riżorsi diġitali u s-sistemi NLP disponibbli li jiffukaw fuq dawn il-lingwi. Aħna nippreżentaw l-isfidi ewlenin u l-mistoqsijiet tar-riċerka li joħorġu meta jiġu ffaċċjati lingwi distanti u xenarji b’riżorsi baxxi. Nixtiequ nħeġġu r-riċerka tal-NLP f’żoni lingwistikament rikki u diversifikati bħall-Amerika.', 'no': 'Indigenous språk i Amerikanske kontinentet er svært forskjellige. Dei har imidlertid fått liten oppmerksomhet frå teknologiske perspektiv. I denne papiret gjennomgår vi forskninga, digitale ressursane og tilgjengelege NLP-systemet som fokuserer på desse språka. Vi presenterer hovudutfordringane og forskningsspørsmålene som oppstår når langt språk og låg ressursscenario er ståande. Vi vil oppfordre NLP-forskning i språk rike og ulike område som Amerika.', 'sr': 'Indijanski jezici američkog kontinenta su vrlo različiti. Međutim, oni su dobili malo pažnje iz tehnološke perspektive. U ovom papiru pregledamo istraživanje, digitalne resurse i dostupne NLP sisteme koje se fokusiraju na ovim jezicima. Predstavljamo glavne izazove i istraživanja koje se pojavljuju kada se suočavaju sa dalekim jezicima i scenarijama niskih resursa. Hteli bismo da potaknemo istraživanje NLP u jezički bogatim i različitim područjima poput Amerike.', 'ta': 'அமெரிக்க கண்டத்தின் உள்ளூர் மொழிகள் மிகவும் வித்தியாசமாக இருக்கின்றன. எனினும், அவர்கள் தொழில்நுட்ப பார்வையிலிருந்து சிறிது கவனத்தை பெற்றுள்ளார்கள். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த மொழிகளை கவனம் செலுத்தும் ஆராய்ச்சி, இலக்கங்கள் மற்றும் கிடைக்கும் NLP அமைப்புகளை  தூரத்தில் மொழிகள் மற்றும் குறைந்த மூலத்திற்கு எதிர்பார்க்கும் போது நாம் முக்கிய சவால்கள் மற்றும் ஆரா அமெரிக்காவைப் போன்ற மொழியில் பணக்கார மற்றும் பல்வேறு பகுதிகளில் NLP ஆராய்ச்சியை ஆராய்ப்பிக்க வி', 'si': 'ඇමරිකානු ජාතියේ ඉන්ධාරික භාෂාවල් ගොඩක් වෙනස් වෙනවා. නමුත්, ඔවුන් ටෙක්නොකෝලික් ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන් අවධානය ලැබුනා. මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය, ඩිජිටල් පද්ධතිය සහ පුළුවන් NLP පද්ධතිය, මේ භාෂාවට අවධානය කරනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වනවා දුරස්ථාන භාෂාවය සහ අඩුම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස අපි කැමතියි NLP පරීක්ෂණයට භාෂාවික විශ්වාසයෙන් සහ විවිධ ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන් ඇමරිකාවන් වගේ.', 'so': 'Luqadaha asalka ah barada Amerika waa kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, waxay ka heleen aragtida teknolojiga. Warqaddan waxaynu ka fiirinaynaa baaritaanka, rasuullada digitalinta iyo nidaamka ALP ee aad ugu fiirsan karto luqadahan. We present the main challenges and research questions that arise when distant languages and low-resource scenarios are faced.  Waxaynu rabnaa in aan NLP wax ku barano afka ku qoran taajir iyo meelo kala duduwan sida Mareykanka.', 'ur': 'امریکا قائم کی زبانیں بہت مختلف ہیں۔ لیکن ان کو تکنولوجی کی نظر سے تھوڑی توجه ملی ہے ہم اس کاغذ میں تحقیقات، دیجیٹل رسورسوں اور موجود NLP سیستموں کو دیکھتے ہیں جو ان زبانوں پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں۔ ہم اصلی چالوں اور تحقیق سوالات کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو دور کی زبانیں اور کم منبع سناریوں کے سامنے آتے ہیں۔ ہم چاہتے ہیں کہ NLP تحقیقات کو زبان کی طرح امریکا کی طرح پوری اور مختلف منطقه میں تشویق دے۔', 'sv': 'Ursprungliga språk på den amerikanska kontinenten är mycket olika. De har dock fått liten uppmärksamhet ur ett tekniskt perspektiv. I denna uppsats går vi igenom forskningen, de digitala resurserna och de tillgängliga NLP-systemen som fokuserar på dessa språk. Vi presenterar de viktigaste utmaningarna och forskningsfrågorna som uppstår när avlägsna språk och lågresursscenarier ställs inför. Vi vill uppmuntra NLP-forskning inom språkligt rika och mångsidiga områden som Amerika.', 'uz': "Amerikaning tili juda ko'p turli tillar. Lekin ular texnologiyaning fikrlaridan bir qisqa murakkab qoldi. Bu qogʻozda, biz bu tillarni foydalanish, raqamli rasmlar va mavjud NLP tizimlarini ko'rib chiqimiz. Биз узоқ тиллар ва камбағал манзиллар аниқламаларига қараб чиққанда, асосий қизиқлик ва тадқирлаш саволларни кўрсатамиз. Biz AQSH kabi har xil sohalarda NLP ta'qishni o'rganishni xohlaymiz.", 'vi': 'Ngôn ngữ bản xứ của lục địa Mỹ rất đa dạng. Tuy nhiên, họ nhận được ít sự chú ý từ quan điểm công nghệ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xem xét các nghiên cứu, nguồn lực kỹ thuật số và các hệ thống Njala có mặt đang tập trung vào những ngôn ngữ này. Chúng tôi đưa ra các thử thách chính và các câu hỏi nghiên cứu nảy sinh khi đối mặt với các ngôn ngữ xa xôi và các viễn cảnh ít tài nguyên. Chúng tôi muốn khuyến khích nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ học giàu có và đa dạng vùng như Châu Mỹ.', 'bg': 'Местните езици на американския континент са много разнообразни. Те обаче са получили малко внимание от технологична гледна точка. В настоящата статия разглеждаме изследванията, цифровите ресурси и наличните системи за НЛП, които се фокусират върху тези езици. Представяме основните предизвикателства и изследователски въпроси, които възникват, когато са изправени пред отдалечени езици и сценарии с нисък ресурс. Бихме искали да насърчим изследванията на НЛП в лингвистично богати и разнообразни области като Америка.', 'nl': "De inheemse talen van het Amerikaanse continent zijn zeer divers. Ze hebben echter weinig aandacht gekregen vanuit technologisch perspectief. In dit artikel bespreken we het onderzoek, de digitale bronnen en de beschikbare NLP-systemen die zich op deze talen richten. We presenteren de belangrijkste uitdagingen en onderzoeksvragen die zich voordoen wanneer verre talen en scenario's met weinig middelen worden geconfronteerd. We willen NLP-onderzoek stimuleren in taalkundig rijke en diverse gebieden zoals Amerika.", 'da': 'Oprindelige sprog på det amerikanske kontinent er meget forskelligartede. De har imidlertid fået lidt opmærksomhed set ud fra et teknologisk perspektiv. I denne artikel gennemgår vi forskningen, de digitale ressourcer og de tilgængelige NLP-systemer, der fokuserer på disse sprog. Vi præsenterer de vigtigste udfordringer og forskningsspørgsmål, der opstår, når fjerne sprog og lav ressource scenarier står over for. Vi vil gerne fremme forskning i NLP inden for sprogligt rige og forskelligartede områder som Amerika.', 'hr': 'Indijinski jezici američkog kontinenta su vrlo različiti. Međutim, oni su dobili malo pažnje iz tehnološke perspektive. U ovom papiru pregledamo istraživanje, digitalne resurse i dostupne NLP sustave koje se fokusiraju na te jezike. Predstavljamo glavne izazove i pitanja istraživanja koje se pojavljuju kada se suočavaju s dalekim jezicima i scenarijama niskih resursa. Htjeli bismo poticati istraživanje NLP-a u jezički bogatim i različitim područjima poput Amerike.', 'id': 'Bahasa asli benua Amerika sangat berbeda. Namun, mereka telah menerima sedikit perhatian dari perspektif teknologi. Dalam kertas ini, kami meninjau penelitian, sumber daya digital dan sistem NLP yang tersedia yang fokus pada bahasa-bahasa ini. Kami mempersembahkan tantangan utama dan pertanyaan penelitian yang muncul ketika bahasa jauh dan skenario sumber daya rendah dihadapi. Kami ingin mendorong penelitian NLP di daerah berbagai bahasa yang kaya dan berbagai macam Amerika.', 'de': 'Die indigenen Sprachen des amerikanischen Kontinents sind sehr vielfältig. Aus technologischer Sicht haben sie jedoch wenig Aufmerksamkeit erhalten. In diesem Beitrag beleuchten wir die Forschung, die digitalen Ressourcen und die verfügbaren NLP-Systeme, die sich auf diese Sprachen konzentrieren. Wir stellen die wichtigsten Herausforderungen und Forschungsfragen vor, die sich ergeben, wenn entfernte Sprachen und ressourcenarme Szenarien gegenüberstehen. Wir möchten NLP-Forschung in sprachlich reichen und vielfältigen Gebieten wie Amerika fördern.', 'fa': 'زبان Indigenous of the American continent are highly diverse. ولی آنها توجه کمی از دیدگاه تکنولوژی گرفته اند. در این کاغذ، ما تحقیقات، منابع دیجیتال و سیستم\u200cهای NLP موجود را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم که روی این زبانها تمرکز می\u200cکنند. ما چالش\u200cهای اصلی و سوال تحقیقات را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که وقتی زبان\u200cهای دور و سیناریو\u200cهای کم منابع روبرو می\u200cشوند. ما می خواهیم تحقیقات NLP را در منطقه های پولدار و مختلف مثل آمریکا تشویق کنیم.', 'ko': '아메리카 대륙의 원주민 언어는 매우 다양하다.그러나 기술적으로는 주목을 받지 못한다.본고에서 우리는 이러한 언어의 연구, 디지털 자원과 사용 가능한 NLP 시스템을 되돌아봤다.우리는 아득히 먼 언어와 자원이 부족한 상황에 직면할 때 직면하는 주요 도전과 연구 문제를 제기했다.우리는 NLP가 아메리카 등 언어가 풍부하고 다양한 분야에서 연구를 진행하도록 격려하기를 바란다.', 'sw': 'Lugha za wenyeji wa bara la Marekani ni tofauti sana. Hata hivyo, wamepewa makini kidogo kutokana na mtazamo wa teknolojia. Katika karatasi hii, tunapitia utafiti, rasilimali za kidijitali na mfumo wa NLP ambao unalenga kwenye lugha hizi. Tunawasilisha changamoto kubwa na maswali ya utafiti yanayotokea pale lugha mbali na matukio ya rasilimali duni yanapokabiliwa. We would like to encourage NLP research in linguistically rich and diverse areas like the Americas.', 'sq': 'Gjuhat vendase të kontinentit amerikan janë shumë të ndryshme. Megjithatë, ata kanë marrë pak vëmendje nga perspektiva teknologjike. Në këtë letër, ne shqyrtojmë kërkimet, burimet dixhitale dhe sistemet e disponueshme të NLP që përqëndrohen në këto gjuhë. Ne paraqesim sfidat kryesore dhe pyetjet e kërkimit që ngrihen kur ndeshen gjuhët e largëta dhe skenarët me burime të ulëta. Ne dëshirojmë të inkurajojmë kërkimin e NLP në fusha gjuhësore të pasura dhe të ndryshme si Amerika.', 'tr': 'Amerikan kontinentiniň ýerli dilleri örän üýtgeşik. Ýöne olar tehnologiýaly perspektivden az üns aldylar. Bu kagyzda, araştyrmalary, digital çeşmeleri we bar NLP sistemalary bu dillere üns berýärler. Biz esasy kynçylyklary we araşdyrma soraglary çykýarys we uzak diller we iň-çeşme senaryýalary görünýän wagtlary çykýarys. NLP araştyrmalaryny Amerika ýaly dil baý we çeşitli bölgelerde töwekgelmek isleýäris.', 'am': 'የአሜሪካ አሜሪካ ቋንቋዎች እጅግ ልዩ ልዩ ናቸው፡፡ ነገር ግን ከትክክለኛው የቴክሎጂ ምሳሌ ጥቂት ጥያቄ ተቀብለዋል፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ መርምር፣ የዲጂታል ሀብት እና እነዚህን ቋንቋዎች ላይ የሚጠጉትን የNLP ስርዓቶች እናየዋለን፡፡ የሩቅ ቋንቋዎች እና የዝቅተኛ resource እየተቃወሙ የዋና ጥያቄዎችን እናቀርባለን፡፡ እንደአሜሪካውያን ባለ ጠጎች እና ልዩ ልዩ ክፍሎች የNLP ምርመራ ማጽናናት እንፈልጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Indigenoese tale van die Amerikaanse kontinent is baie verskillende. Maar hulle het 'n bietjie aandag van die teknologiese perspektief ontvang. In hierdie papier, ons hersien die ondersoek, die digitale hulpbronne en die beskikbare NLP stelsels wat op hierdie taal fokus. Ons stel die hoofde uitdagings en ondersoek vrae wat opstaan wanneer afstande tale en lae hulpbron scenarios aangesig word. Ons wil graag NLP-ondersoek in lingwisies ryk en verskeie gebiede, soos die Amerika, bevestig.", 'az': 'Amerikan qarşısının indijin dilləri çox müxtəlif idilər. Lakin onlar teknolojik perspektivindən az dikkat aldılar. Bu kağızda, araştırmaları, dijital kaynaklarını və bu dillərə odaklanan NLP sistemlərini incidirik. Biz uzaq dillər və düşük ressurs scenariyalarının qarşısında gələn ən ən böyük çətinlikləri və araştırma suallarını göstəririk. Biz NLP araştırmalarını dilində zengin və müxtəlif bölgelerde təşkil etmək istəyirik.', 'hy': 'Ամերիկյան մայրցամաքի բնիկ լեզուները շատ տարբեր են: Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք քիչ ուշադրություն են ստացել տեխնոլոգիական տեսանկյունից: In this paper, we review the research, the digital resources and the available NLP systems that focus on these languages.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք հիմնական մարտահրավերները և հետազոտության հարցերը, որոնք առաջանում են հեռավոր լեզուների և ցածր ռեսուրսների սցենարների առջև: Մենք ցանկանում ենք խրախուսել ՆԼՊ-ի ուսումնասիրությունները լեզվաբանական հարուստ և բազմազան տարածքներում, ինչպիսիք են Ամերիկան:', 'bs': 'Indijanski jezici američkog kontinenta su vrlo različiti. Međutim, oni su dobili malo pažnje iz tehnološke perspektive. U ovom papiru pregledamo istraživanje, digitalne resurse i dostupne NLP sustave koje se fokusiraju na ovim jezicima. Predstavljamo glavne izazove i pitanja istraživanja koje se pojavljuju kada se suočavaju sa dalekim jezicima i scenarijama niskih resursa. Hteli bismo poticati istraživanje NLP-a u jezički bogatim i raznim područjima poput Amerike.', 'ca': "Indigenous languages of the American continent are highly diverse.  No obstant això, han rebut poca atenció de la perspectiva tecnològica. En aquest paper, revisem la recerca, els recursos digitals i els sistemes NLP disponibles que es centren en aquestes llengües. Presentam els principals reptes i preguntes de recerca que surten quan s'enfronten llengües remotes i escenaris de baix recursos. Ens agradaria animar a la recerca del NLP en àrees lingüísticament rics i diverses com les Amèricas.", 'cs': 'Domorodé jazyky amerického kontinentu jsou velmi rozmanité. Z technologického hlediska se jim však nevěnovala pozornost. V tomto článku přezkoumáme výzkum, digitální zdroje a dostupné NLP systémy, které se zaměřují na tyto jazyky. Představujeme hlavní výzvy a výzkumné otázky, které vznikají, když jsou čelit vzdáleným jazykům a scénářům s nízkými zdroji. Rádi bychom podpořili výzkum NLP v jazykově bohatých a různorodých oblastech, jako je Amerika.', 'bn': 'আমেরিকান মহাদেশের আদিবাসী ভাষা অনেক বিভিন্ন ভাষা। তবে তারা প্রযুক্তিগত দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে কিছুটা মনোযোগ পেয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা গবেষণা, ডিজিটাল সম্পদ এবং বিদ্যমান এনএলপি সিস্টেমের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি। আমরা প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ এবং গবেষণার প্রশ্ন উপস্থাপন করছি যা দূরবর্তী ভাষা এবং কম সম্পদের দৃশ্যের মুখোমুখি হয়। আমরা ভাষাভাষায় সমৃদ্ধ এবং বিভিন্ন এলাকায় এনএলপি গবেষণা উৎসাহিত করতে চাই।', 'et': 'Ameerika mandri põliskeeled on väga erinevad. Siiski on nad saanud tehnoloogilisest vaatenurgast vähe tähelepanu. Käesolevas dokumendis vaadatakse üle uuringud, digitaalsed ressursid ja olemasolevad uue õppekava süsteemid, mis keskenduvad neile keeltele. Esitleme peamised väljakutsed ja uurimisküsimused, mis tekivad kaugete keelte ja vähese ressursiga stsenaariumide ees. Soovime julgustada uue õppeprogrammi uuringuid keeleliselt rikkates ja mitmekesistes valdkondades, nagu Ameerika.', 'fi': 'Amerikan mantereen alkuperäiskielet ovat hyvin erilaisia. Ne ovat kuitenkin saaneet vain vähän huomiota teknologisesta näkökulmasta. Tässä artikkelissa tarkastellaan tutkimusta, digitaalisia resursseja ja käytettävissä olevia NLP-järjestelmiä, jotka keskittyvät näihin kieliin. Esittelemme tärkeimmät haasteet ja tutkimuskysymykset, joita syntyy, kun kohtaamme kaukaisia kieliä ja vähävaraisia skenaarioita. Haluamme kannustaa NLP:n tutkimusta kielellisesti rikkailla ja monipuolisilla alueilla, kuten Amerikassa.', 'jv': 'Kapan pangan wong kanggo kontribusi Batanjuré iki sakjane sami. Nanging, dhewe durung butine atens mengko nang perspekpektur teknêlogi. Nang pepul iki, kita menehi perusahaan, gambar digit lan sistem NLP sing bisa nguasai Language iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan langkung karo perusahaan sak banjuré surang sing bisa nguasai kapan langkung karo akeh pakan-pakan. Awak dhéwé kepengin nggawe resmi NLP ning alih luwih-luwih lan angkang dipun-pernik nik kabèh lan padha layang-arah sing koyo Awak dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Avtohtoni jeziki ameriške celine so zelo raznoliki. Vendar pa so s tehnološkega vidika prejeli malo pozornosti. V prispevku pregledujemo raziskave, digitalne vire in razpoložljive sisteme NLP, ki se osredotočajo na te jezike. Predstavljamo glavne izzive in raziskovalna vprašanja, ki se pojavljajo ob soočanju z oddaljenimi jeziki in scenariji z nizkimi viri. Spodbujamo raziskave NLP na jezikovno bogatih in raznolikih področjih, kot so Amerike.', 'ha': "Harsunan da ke cikin baran Marekani masu yawa ne. A lokacin da ba su karɓi muhimmanci ba daga gannain technical. Ga wannan takardan, Munã karatun fitina, manyan itãcen digitali da na'urar NLP da ke da muhimmanci ga waɗannan harshen. Munã halatar da masu muhimmi da masu tambayar research da za'a samu idan harsunan da masu kashewa da fassarar-resource masu basĩra. Tuna son mu ƙara wa NLP-research a cikin linguin matajiri da cirar dabam-dabam kamar amerikan.", 'he': 'שפות מקומיות של היבשה האמריקאית מאוד מגוונות. עם זאת, הם קיבלו מעט תשומת לב מהמבט הטכנולוגי. בעיתון הזה, אנו מבקרים את המחקר, את המשאבים הדיגיטליים והמערכות הנוכחיות של NLP שמתמקדות על השפות האלה. אנחנו מציגים את האתגרים העיקריים ושאלות מחקר שמגיעות כאשר שפות רחוקות ותסריטי משאבים נמוכים מתמודדים. אנחנו רוצים לעודד מחקר NLP באזורים עשירים בשפה ומגווונים כמו אמריקה.', 'bo': 'ཨ་རིའི་གླིང་རྟེན་ཁྱབ་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་སྐད་ཆ་ནི་འདྲ་བའི་རྐྱེན་དང་མི་འདྲ་བར་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ལ་ལག་རིག་གི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཆུང་ཉུང་བ་ཡོད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་དག་ལ་མཐོང་ནུས་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དང་། གྲངས་སྒྲིག་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་མ་རྐྱེན ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ནུས་པ་དབྱེ་བ་དང་འདྲ་བ་དག་གི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དག་བརྩོན་གཏོང་།'}
{'en': 'Neural Transition-based String Transduction for Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology', 'es': 'Transducción de cuerdas basada en transición neuronal para entornos de recursos limitados en morfología', 'ar': 'نقل السلاسل العصبية القائم على التحول لإعداد الموارد المحدودة في علم التشكل', 'fr': 'Transduction de chaîne basée sur la transition neuronale pour un réglage de ressources limitées en morphologie', 'pt': 'Transdução de string baseada em transição neural para configuração de recursos limitados em morfologia', 'ja': '形態学における限られたリソース設定のための神経遷移ベースの文字列変換', 'zh': '盖神经渡之弦转导在形态学中资源有限之用', 'hi': 'आकृति विज्ञान में सीमित-संसाधन सेटिंग के लिए तंत्रिका संक्रमण-आधारित स्ट्रिंग ट्रांसडक्शन', 'ru': 'Нейронная трансдукция строк на основе перехода для настройки ограниченных ресурсов в морфологии', 'ga': 'Aistriú Teaghrán Trasdultach Néar-bhunaithe do Shocrú Acmhainní Teoranta i moirfeolaíocht', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neurális átmenet alapú karakterlánc transzducció korlátozott erőforrású beállításokhoz a morfológiában', 'el': 'Μεταμόσχευση συμβολοσειρών με βάση τη νευρωνική μετάβαση για ρύθμιση περιορισμένων πόρων στη μορφολογία', 'it': 'Trasduzione di stringhe basata sulla transizione neurale per impostazione a risorse limitate in morfologia', 'kk': 'Марфологиялық Limited- ресурс баптауларының нейрондық аудару негіздеген жол аударуы', 'lt': 'Neuralinis pereinamasis laidų perdavimas ribotų išteklių nustatymui morfologijoje', 'mk': 'Превод на низи за поставување на ограничени ресурси во морфологија, базиран на неурална транзиција', 'mt': 'Neural Transition-based String Transduction for Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology', 'ms': 'Transduction String-Based Transition Neural for Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology', 'ml': 'മോര്\u200dഫോളോഗിയില്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Марфологид хязгаарлагдсан-нөөц тогтоохын тулд мэдрэлийн шилжүүлэлт суурилсан String Transduction for Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology', 'no': 'Neural Transition-based String Transduction for Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology', 'pl': 'Transdukcja ciągów oparta na przejściu neuronowym dla ustawienia ograniczonych zasobów w morfologii', 'ro': 'Transducerea corzilor bazată pe tranziție neurală pentru setarea resurselor limitate în morfologie', 'sr': 'Neuralno prebacivanje linije na transiciji za postavljanje ograničenih resursa u morfologiji', 'so': 'Transfer String-Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Neural Transition-baserad strängtransduktion för begränsad resursinställning i morfologi', 'ur': 'مرفولوژی میں لیمیٹ-رسسور سیٹینگ کے لئے نیورال ترنسیشن-بنیادی استرینگ ترنسڈوکیشن', 'ta': 'வரம்பு மூலத்தை அமைப்புக்கான நெயுரல் மாற்றம் அடிப்படையிலான சரத்தை மாற்றுதல்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cắt truyền dây thần kinh xuyên qua dây thần kinh cho việc đặt cố lượng tài nguyên trong Morphology', 'bg': 'Трансдукция на струни, базирана на неврален преход, за настройка с ограничен ресурс в морфологията', 'da': 'Neural Transition-baseret strengtransduktion til begrænset ressourceindstilling i morfologi', 'hr': 'Neuralna prijenosa linije na osnovu transicije za postavljanje ograničenih resursa u morfologiji', 'nl': 'String Transductie op basis van neurale overgang voor Beperkte Resource Setting in Morfologie', 'de': 'Neuronale Übergangsbasierte String Transduktion zur Einstellung begrenzter Ressourcen in der Morphologie', 'ko': '형태학에서 유한한 자원 설정에서 신경 변환에 기반한 문자열 변환', 'id': 'Transduksi Garis Berdasarkan Transisi Neural untuk Pengaturan Sumber Terbatas dalam Morfologi', 'fa': 'Transduction of String based on Transition Neural for Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology', 'sq': 'Transiçoni i rrjeteve për vendosjen e burimeve të kufizuara në morfologji', 'sw': 'Uhamiaji wa Vuguvugu lililoko kwa msingi wa Transition kwa ajili ya Mpango wa rasilimali Bora katika Kimorphology', 'tr': 'Morphology', 'af': 'Neural Oordrag- gebaseerde String Oordrag vir Limited- Resource Setting in Morphology', 'am': 'undo-type', 'bn': 'মরোফোলজিতে সীমিত-সম্পদের জন্য নিউরেল পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক স্ট্রিং পরিবর্তন', 'hy': 'Neural Transition-based String Transduction for Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology', 'az': 'Morphologiyada Limited-Resource Setting üçün Nöral Transition-based String Transduction', 'cs': 'Transdukce řetězců založená na neuronovém přechodu pro nastavení omezených zdrojů v morfologii', 'et': 'Neuraalne üleminekupõhine stringitransduktsioon piiratud ressursside seadistamiseks morfoloogias', 'ca': 'Neural Transition-based String Transduction for Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology', 'bs': 'Neuralno prebacivanje stresa na osnovu transicije za postavljanje ograničenih resursa u morfologiji', 'fi': 'Neuraalisen siirtymän pohjainen merkkijono rajoitetun resurssin asettamista varten morfologiassa', 'jv': 'Munculine', 'sk': 'Transdukcija nizov na osnovi živčnega prehoda za nastavitev omejenih virov v morfologiji', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs מצוות', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Neural Transition-based String Transduction for Limited-Resource Setting in Morphology'}
{'en': 'We present a neural transition-based model that uses a simple set of edit actions (copy, delete, insert) for morphological transduction tasks such as inflection generation, lemmatization, and reinflection. In a large-scale evaluation on four datasets and dozens of languages, our approach consistently outperforms state-of-the-art systems on low and medium training-set sizes and is competitive in the high-resource setting. Learning to apply a generic copy action enables our approach to generalize quickly from a few data points. We successfully leverage minimum risk training to compensate for the weaknesses of MLE parameter learning and neutralize the negative effects of training a pipeline with a separate character aligner.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un modèle basé sur la transition neuronale qui utilise un ensemble simple d'actions d'édition (copier, supprimer, insérer) pour des tâches de transduction morphologique telles que la génération d'inflexion, la lemmatisation et la réinflexion. Dans le cadre d'une évaluation à grande échelle portant sur quatre ensembles de données et des dizaines de langues, notre approche surpasse constamment les systèmes de pointe sur les ensembles de formation de petite et moyenne taille et est compétitive dans le contexte de ressources élevées. Apprendre à appliquer une action de copie générique permet à notre approche de généraliser rapidement à partir de quelques points de données. Nous avons réussi à tirer parti de l'entraînement à risque minimal pour compenser les faiblesses de l'apprentissage des paramètres MLE et neutraliser les effets négatifs de l'entraînement d'un pipeline avec un aligneur de caractères distinct.", 'ar': 'نقدم نموذجًا قائمًا على التحول العصبي يستخدم مجموعة بسيطة من إجراءات التحرير (نسخ ، حذف ، إدراج) لمهام التحويل الصرفي مثل توليد الانعكاس ، والليمون ، وإعادة الانعكاس. في تقييم واسع النطاق لأربع مجموعات بيانات وعشرات اللغات ، يتفوق نهجنا باستمرار على أحدث الأنظمة في أحجام مجموعات التدريب المنخفضة والمتوسطة الحجم ، كما أنه قادر على المنافسة في بيئة الموارد العالية. إن تعلم تطبيق إجراء نسخ عام يمكّن نهجنا من التعميم بسرعة من نقاط بيانات قليلة. نجحنا في الاستفادة من التدريب على الحد الأدنى من المخاطر للتعويض عن نقاط الضعف في تعلم معلمات MLE وتحييد الآثار السلبية لتدريب خط أنابيب باستخدام محاذاة شخصية منفصلة.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um modelo baseado em transição neural que usa um conjunto simples de ações de edição (copiar, excluir, inserir) para tarefas de transdução morfológica, como geração de inflexão, lematização e reinflexão. Em uma avaliação em larga escala em quatro conjuntos de dados e dezenas de idiomas, nossa abordagem supera consistentemente os sistemas de última geração em tamanhos de conjuntos de treinamento baixos e médios e é competitivo no cenário de alto recurso. Aprender a aplicar uma ação de cópia genérica permite que nossa abordagem generalize rapidamente a partir de alguns pontos de dados. Aproveitamos com sucesso o treinamento de risco mínimo para compensar as fraquezas do aprendizado de parâmetros MLE e neutralizar os efeitos negativos do treinamento de um pipeline com um alinhador de caracteres separado.', 'es': 'Presentamos un modelo basado en la transición neuronal que utiliza un conjunto simple de acciones de edición (copiar, eliminar, insertar) para tareas de transducción morfológica como la generación de inflexión, la lematización y la reinflexión. En una evaluación a gran escala en cuatro conjuntos de datos y docenas de idiomas, nuestro enfoque supera sistemáticamente a los sistemas de última generación en tamaños de conjuntos de capacitación bajos y medianos y es competitivo en el entorno de recursos altos. Aprender a aplicar una acción de copia genérica permite que nuestro enfoque generalice rápidamente desde unos pocos puntos de datos. Aprovechamos con éxito el entrenamiento de riesgo mínimo para compensar las debilidades del aprendizaje de parámetros de MLE y neutralizar los efectos negativos de entrenar una canalización con un alineador de caracteres independiente.', 'ja': '我々は、変形生成、レマティゼーション、再考などの形態学的形質導入タスクのために、編集アクション（コピー、削除、挿入）の単純なセットを使用するニューラル・トランジションベースのモデルを提示する。4つのデータセットと数十の言語に関する大規模な評価では、当社のアプローチは、低および中規模のトレーニングセットサイズで最先端のシステムを一貫して上回り、高リソース環境で競争力があります。一般的なコピーアクションを適用することを学ぶことで、いくつかのデータポイントからアプローチを迅速に一般化することができます。最小限のリスクトレーニングをうまく活用して、MLEパラメータ学習の弱点を補い、個別のキャラクタアライナでパイプラインをトレーニングすることによる悪影響を軽減します。', 'hi': 'हम एक तंत्रिका संक्रमण-आधारित मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो रूपात्मक ट्रांसडक्शन कार्यों जैसे कि प्रतिबिंब पीढ़ी, लेमेटाइजेशन और पुनर्परिवर्तन के लिए संपादन क्रियाओं (कॉपी, डिलीट, सम्मिलित) के एक सरल सेट का उपयोग करता है। चार डेटासेट और दर्जनों भाषाओं पर बड़े पैमाने पर मूल्यांकन में, हमारा दृष्टिकोण लगातार कम और मध्यम प्रशिक्षण-सेट आकारों पर अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों को मात देता है और उच्च-संसाधन सेटिंग में प्रतिस्पर्धी है। एक सामान्य प्रतिलिपि कार्रवाई को लागू करने के लिए सीखना कुछ डेटा बिंदुओं से जल्दी से सामान्यीकरण करने के लिए हमारे दृष्टिकोण को सक्षम बनाता है। हम MLE पैरामीटर सीखने की कमजोरियों की भरपाई करने के लिए न्यूनतम जोखिम प्रशिक्षण का सफलतापूर्वक लाभ उठाते हैं और एक अलग चरित्र संरेखक के साथ पाइपलाइन को प्रशिक्षित करने के नकारात्मक प्रभावों को बेअसर करते हैं।', 'zh': '立神经渡,编次操(复制,删入)形态学转导务,如词形变成,词形还复偏转。 凡四集和数十种语言之大较,吾法于中小型训集规模,始终优于先进之统,而有竞争力于高资。 学宜通用复制操作使吾法得从数数速泛化。 成功以小风险补MLE参数学之弱,而消独字之负面影响于齐器。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем модель на основе нейронного перехода, которая использует простой набор действий по редактированию (копирование, удаление, вставка) для морфологических задач трансдукции, таких как генерация перегибов, лемматизация и рефлексия. В крупномасштабной оценке по четырем наборам данных и десяткам языков наш подход последовательно превосходит современные системы на низких и средних размерах обучающего набора и является конкурентоспособным в условиях высоких ресурсов. Обучение применению общего действия копирования позволяет нашему подходу быстро обобщать с нескольких точек данных. Мы успешно используем обучение минимальному риску, чтобы компенсировать недостатки обучения параметрам MLE и нейтрализовать негативные последствия обучения трубопровода с отдельным выравнивателем символов.', 'ga': "Cuirimid múnla néar-bhunaithe trasdula i láthair a úsáideann sraith shimplí de ghníomhartha eagarthóireachta (cóipeáil, scrios, cuir isteach) le haghaidh tascanna trasduchtúcháin moirfeolaíocha ar nós giniúint infhillte, liomatúchán agus athmhachnamh. I measúnú mórscála ar cheithre thacar sonraí agus dosaenacha teangacha, tá ár gcur chuige i gcónaí níos fearr ná na córais úrscothacha ar mhéideanna tacair oiliúna ísle agus meánmhéide agus tá sé iomaíoch sa suíomh ard-acmhainne. Trí ghníomh cineálach cóipe a chur i bhfeidhm is féidir lenár gcur chuige ginearálú tapa a dhéanamh ó roinnt pointí sonraí. D'éirigh linn oiliúint riosca íosta a ghiaráil chun laigí na foghlama paraiméadar MLE a chúiteamh agus chun na héifeachtaí diúltacha a bhaineann le píblíne a oiliúint le hailíniú carachtar ar leith a neodrú.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ მივიღებთ ნეიროლური გადაწყვეტილების მოდელი, რომელიც გამოყენებს მარტივი რედაქტირების მოქმედებების (კოპორიცია, წაშლა, დაყენება) მოპროლოგიური გადაწყვეტილების მოქმედებისთვის, როგორ ჩვენი პროგრამა უფრო დიდი განსაზღვრებაში 4 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენი პროგრამა მუშაობელია სისტემის განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრებულებაში და უფრო მედი განსაზღვრებულებაში კონფიგურაცი სწავლება საერთო კოპლიო მოქმედების გამოყენება ჩვენი წარმოდგენებას უფრო ძალიან დაწყენება რამდენიმე მონაცემების წარმოდგენებიდან. ჩვენ წარმატებით მინიმალური რისკის განსწავლებას გამოვიყენებთ, რომ MLE პარამეტრის სწავლების სინამდვილეობების შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ და ნეტრალიზებთ მინიმალური ეფექ', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο με βάση τη νευρική μετάβαση που χρησιμοποιεί ένα απλό σύνολο ενεργειών επεξεργασίας (αντιγραφή, διαγραφή, εισαγωγή) για εργασίες μορφολογικής μετάφρασης όπως η δημιουργία καμπής, η λεμματοποίηση και η επανεμφάνιση. Σε μια αξιολόγηση μεγάλης κλίμακας σε τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων και δεκάδες γλώσσες, η προσέγγισή μας ξεπερνά σταθερά τα σύγχρονα συστήματα σε χαμηλά και μεσαία μεγέθη εκπαιδευτικών συνόλων και είναι ανταγωνιστική στο περιβάλλον υψηλών πόρων. Η εκμάθηση της εφαρμογής μιας γενικής ενέργειας αντιγραφής επιτρέπει την προσέγγισή μας να γενικεύσουμε γρήγορα από μερικά σημεία δεδομένων. Χρησιμοποιούμε επιτυχώς την εκπαίδευση ελάχιστου κινδύνου για να αντισταθμίσουμε τις αδυναμίες της εκμάθησης παραμέτρων και να εξουδετερώσουμε τις αρνητικές επιπτώσεις της εκπαίδευσης ενός αγωγού με ξεχωριστό ευθυγράμμιση χαρακτήρων.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy neurális átmenet alapú modellt, amely egyszerű szerkesztési műveleteket (másolás, törlés, beszúrás) használ morfológiai átalakítási feladatokhoz, mint például az inflexió generálása, lemmatizáció és újraflekció. Négy adatkészleten és több tucat nyelven végzett nagyszabású értékelés során a megközelítésünk következetesen felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb rendszereket alacsony és közepes képzési készletek méretén, és versenyképes a nagy erőforrásokkal rendelkező környezetben. Az általános másolási művelet alkalmazásának tanulása lehetővé teszi, hogy megközelítésünk gyorsan általánosítsuk néhány adatpontból. Sikeresen kihasználjuk a minimális kockázatú képzést, hogy kompenzáljuk az MLE paraméterek tanulásának gyengeségeit, és semlegesítsük a különálló karakterhez igazítóval történő képzés negatív hatásait.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome neurologinį pereinamojo laikotarpio model į, kuris naudoja paprastą redakcijos veiksmų rinkinį (kopijuoti, ištrinti, įterpti) morfologiniams transduccijos uždaviniams, pavyzdžiui, inflekcijos sukūrimui, limmatizacijai ir reinflekcijai. Atliekant didelį keturių duomenų rinkinių ir dešimčių kalbų vertinimą, mūsų požiūris nuosekliai viršija pažangiausias sistemas mažo ir vidutinio dydžio mokymo rinkiniuose ir yra konkurencingas didelių išteklių rinkiniuose. Mokymasis taikyti bendruosius kopijų veiksmus leidžia mūsų požiūrį greitai generalizuoti iš kelių duomenų taškų. Sėkmingai panaudojame minimalaus rizikos mokymą, kad kompensuotume MLE parametrų mokymosi trūkumus ir neutralizuotume neigiamą mokymo su atskiru charakteristikų derintuvu poveikį.', 'it': "Presentiamo un modello basato sulla transizione neurale che utilizza un semplice insieme di azioni di modifica (copia, cancellazione, inserimento) per attività di trasduzione morfologica come generazione di flessioni, lemmatizzazione e reinflezione. In una valutazione su larga scala su quattro set di dati e decine di lingue, il nostro approccio supera costantemente i sistemi all'avanguardia su set di formazione di dimensioni basse e medie ed è competitivo nel contesto delle risorse elevate. Imparare ad applicare un'azione generica di copia permette al nostro approccio di generalizzare rapidamente da alcuni punti di dati. Facciamo leva con successo sulla formazione a rischio minimo per compensare le debolezze dell'apprendimento dei parametri MLE e neutralizzare gli effetti negativi dell'addestramento di una pipeline con un allineatore di caratteri separato.", 'kk': 'Біз морфологиялық аудару тапсырмалары үшін кәдімгі өңдеу әрекеттерді (көшірмелеу, өшіру, ендіру) үшін негізгі аудару үлгісін таңдаймыз. Мысалы инфлекциялық құрылуы, лемматизаци Төрт деректер қорларының және ондық тілдерінің үлкен масштабын оқу үшін, біздің тәсіліміміз өте жақсы және орташа оқу жиілігін төмендету жүйелердің күйін жасайды, және ресурстар жоғары баптауында ә Жалпы көшірме әрекетін қолдануға үйрену бірнеше деректер нүктелерінен тез түрде жасауға мүмкіндік береді. Біз MLE параметрлерінің оқыту үшін төменгі тәуелдік оқыту үшін төменгі тәуелдік оқыту үшін сәтті жеткіземіз және бөлек таңбаларды бағыттаушымен қарсы тәуелдік эффект', 'mk': 'Презентираме нервен модел базиран на транзиција кој користи едноставен сет на уредувачки дејства (копирање, избришување, внесување) за морфолошки трансдукциони задачи како што се генерација на инфекција, лематизација и реинфлекција. Во голема оценка на четири податоци и десетици јазици, нашиот пристап постојано ги надминува најсовремените системи на ниски и средни големини на набор обуки и е конкурентно во поставувањето на високи ресурси. Научите да аплицирате генерална копија акција овозможува нашиот пристап да се генерализира брзо од неколку податочни точки. Успешно го искористуваме минималниот ризик обуката за да ги компензираме слабостите на учењето на параметрите на МЛЕ и да ги неутрализираме негативните ефекти од обуката на гасоводот со одделен појачувач на карактерите.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan model berasaskan transisi saraf yang menggunakan set sederhana tindakan sunting (salin, padam, masukkan) untuk tugas transduksi morfologik seperti generasi pengangkutan, lemmatisasi, dan refleksi. Dalam penilaian skala besar pada empat set data dan puluhan bahasa, pendekatan kita secara konsisten melampaui sistem-state-of-the-art pada saiz-set latihan rendah dan tengah dan adalah kompetitif dalam tetapan sumber-tinggi. Belajar untuk melaksanakan tindakan salinan generik membolehkan pendekatan kita untuk menyebarkan dengan cepat dari beberapa titik data. Kami berjaya menggunakan latihan risiko minimum untuk mengembalikan kelemahan pembelajaran parameter MLE dan neutralkan kesan negatif latihan saluran paip dengan penyesuaian aksara terpisah.', 'ml': 'We present a neural transition-based model that uses a simple set of edit actions (copy, delete, insert) for morphological transduction tasks such as inflection generation, lemmatization, and reinflection.  നാല് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെയും ആയിരക്കണക്കിന് ഭാഷകളുടെയും വിലാസങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദം കുറഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥിതികളുടെയും മദ്ധ്യ പരിശീലന വ്യവസ്ഥകളുട ഒരു സാധാരണ പകര്\u200dത്തുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം പ്രയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയെ കുറച്ചു ഡേറ്റാ പോയിന്\u200dറുകള എംഎല്\u200d പരാമീറ്റര്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ദുര്\u200dബലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാനും പൈപ്പെലൈന്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ നെഗെറ്റി', 'mn': 'Бид мэдрэлийн шилжилт суурилсан загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь морфологийн шилжилтийн үйл ажиллагааг ашигладаг энгийн загвар юм. Дөрвөн өгөгдлийн сан болон олон хэл дээрх том хэмжээний үнэлгээнд бидний арга зам нь бага болон дундаж сургалтын хэмжээнд урлагийн тогтолцоог үргэлжлүүлдэг бөгөөд өрсөлдөөн өндөр боловсруулагч байдаг. Нийт хуулийн үйл ажиллагааг хэрэглэх суралцах нь хэд хэдэн өгөгдлийн цэгээс хурдан хурдан нийтлэх боломжтой. Бид MLE параметр суралцах сургамжлалтын багахан эрсдэлийн сургамжлалтыг амжилттай ашиглаж, хоолойн шугамны сөрөг нөлөөлөлийг өөр өөр дүрсийн тэгшитгэгч болгон сургамжлах боломжтой.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw mudell ibbażat fuq tranżizzjoni newrali li juża sett sempliċi ta’ azzjonijiet ta’ editjar (kopja, tħassar, daħħal) għal kompiti ta’ trasduzzjoni morfoloġika bħall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ inflezzjoni, limmatizzazzjoni, u riflessjoni. F’evalwazzjoni fuq skala kbira dwar erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta u għexieren ta’ lingwi, l-approċċ tagħna b’mod konsistenti jaqbeż is-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati fuq daqsijiet baxxi u medji ta’ settijiet ta’ taħriġ u huwa kompetittiv fl-ambjent ta’ riżorsi għoljin. It-tagħlim li tapplika azzjoni ġenerika ta’ kopja jippermetti li l-approċċ tagħna jiġġeneralizza malajr minn ftit punti ta’ dejta. Aħna nieħdu vantaġġ b'suċċess mit-taħriġ tar-riskju minimu biex nikkumpensaw għad-dgħufijiet tat-tagħlim tal-parametri MLE u ninnewtralizzaw l-effetti negattivi tat-taħriġ ta' pipeline b'allinjatur tal-karattru separat.", 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy model oparty na przejściu neuronowym, który wykorzystuje prosty zestaw akcji edycyjnych (kopiowanie, usuwanie, wstawianie) do zadań transdukcji morfologicznej, takich jak generowanie przekształcenia, lemmatyzacja i reinflekcja. W ramach szerokiej oceny czterech zbiorów danych i kilkudziesięciu języków nasze podejście konsekwentnie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze systemy przy niskich i średnich rozmiarach zestawów szkoleniowych i jest konkurencyjne w warunkach wysokiego zasobu. Nauka stosowania ogólnej akcji kopiowania umożliwia nam szybkie uogólnienie z kilku punktów danych. Z powodzeniem wykorzystujemy szkolenia minimalnego ryzyka, aby zrekompensować słabości uczenia się parametrów MLE i neutralizować negatywne skutki szkolenia rurociągu z osobnym alignerem znaków.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit neiralovergangsbasert modell som brukar ein enkel sett av redigeringshandlingar (kopi, slett, sett inn) for morfologiske transduksjonsoppgåver som infleksjonsgenerasjon, lemmatisering og reinfleksjon. I eit stor skalevaluering på fire datasett og tusen språk er tilnærminga vårt konsekvent utfører kunstsystemet på låg og medium opplæringsstorleik og er konkurentivt i høg-ressursinnstillinga. Læring for å bruka ein generiske kopihandling kan tilnærminga vårt generellisere raskt frå noen få datapunkt. Vi har vellukka å levera minimale risikotrening for å kompensera tyrkene på læring av MLE-parametrar og neutralisera negativne effektane for å lære ei røyrlinje med ei eigne teikn.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo model na osnovu neuralnog prelaza koji koristi jednostavan set redaktnih akcija (kopija, izbrisa, uključuje) za morfološke prevodne zadatke kao što su generacija inflekcije, limmatizacija i reinflekcija. U velikoj procjeni na četiri set a podataka i desetine jezika, naš pristup stalno iznosi državni umjetni sistem na niskim i srednjim veličinama obuke i konkurentno je u postavljanju visokih resursa. Naučenje primjene općeg kopiranog akcije omogućava naš pristup generalizaciji brzo iz nekoliko podataka. Uspjelo smo uticati na minimalnu obuku rizika da bi kompenzirali slabosti učenja parametara MLE i neutralizirali negativne učinke obuke cijevi sa odvojenim likovima.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm un model bazat pe tranziție neurală care utilizează un set simplu de acțiuni de editare (copiere, ștergere, inserare) pentru sarcini de transducție morfologică, cum ar fi generarea inflexiunii, lemmatizarea și reinflecția. Într-o evaluare la scară largă pe patru seturi de date și zeci de limbi, abordarea noastră depășește în mod constant sistemele de ultimă oră la dimensiuni mici și medii de formare și este competitivă în cadrul setului de resurse ridicate. Învățarea de a aplica o acțiune generică de copiere permite abordarea noastră de a generaliza rapid din câteva puncte de date. Folosim cu succes instruirea cu risc minim pentru a compensa slăbiciunile învățării parametrilor MLE și pentru a neutraliza efectele negative ale instruirii unei conducte cu un alinier de caractere separat.', 'si': 'අපි පෙන්වන්නේ න්\u200dයූරාලික වෙනස් අධාරිත මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය සම්පූර්ණ ක්\u200dරියාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න (පිටපන,  දත්ත සැටි හතර සහ භාෂාවන්ගේ ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙන්නේ, අපේ ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය අඩු සහ මධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරමාණය සැටීම් පද්ධතියක් අඩු සහ මධ්\u200dයම ප සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතික ක්\u200dරියාවක් භාවිත කරන්න ඉගෙන ගන්න අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප අපි සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන් අඩුම අවධානයක් ස්ථානය කරනවා MLE පැරැමිටර් ඉගෙනීමේ අවධානයක් සඳහා පැයිප්ලින් එක්ක පෙනෙක් අ', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa model ku saleysan daboolka neurada ah oo isticmaalaya hababka hagitaanka sahlan (copy, delete, insert) oo u isticmaalaya shuqullada dib u wareegashada, tusaale ahaan dhaqdhaqaaq, kalluumeysid iyo dib u celin. Qiimeynta qiyaastii aad u weyn oo ku qoran afar macluumaad iyo kumanyaal luuqadood, qaababkayagu wuxuu si siman u sameynayaa nidaamka farshaxanta ee hoos iyo mid-dhexe ku qoran tirada waxbarashada, wuxuuna ku adag yahay habka sare. Waxbarashada codsashada koopiga geneeral wuxuu awoodaa in aad dhaqso uga sameyso goobaha macluumaadka. Waxbarashada parameter MLE ayaannu ku liibaanaynaa waxbarashada ugu yaraan khatar, si aan u koobanno tababarka cilmiga diidmada ah ee ku tababarida pipeline oo ay leedahay mid gaar ah.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாற்றம் அடிப்படையிலான மாதிரி வழங்குகிறது, அது ஒரு எளிய தொகுப்பு செயல்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது (நகல், நீக்கு, நுழைத்து, செருகுகிறது) பாதிப்ப நான்கு தரவுத்தளங்கள் மற்றும் பல மொழிகள் மீது பெரிய அளவிற்கு மதிப்பில், எங்கள் வழிமுறையாக குறைந்த மற்றும் நடுநிலை பயிற்சி அமைப்பு அளவுகளில் செயல்படுத்து பொது நகல் செயல்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்த கற்றுக் கொண்டு சில தகவல் புள்ளிகளிலிருந்து வேகமாக உருவாக்குவதற்கு எங்கள் வழிம நாம் வெற்றிகரமாக குறைந்தபட்ச ஆபத்திற்கு பயிற்சியை வெற்றிகரமாக உபயோகிப்போம் MLE அளபுருவை கற்றுக்கொள்ள பலஹீனமாக மற்றும் பைப்லை', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en neural övergångsbaserad modell som använder en enkel uppsättning redigeringsåtgärder (kopiera, ta bort, infoga) för morfologiska transduktionsuppgifter som böjningsgenerering, lemmatisering och reinflektion. I en storskalig utvärdering av fyra datauppsättningar och dussintals språk överträffar vårt tillvägagångssätt konsekvent toppmoderna system på låga och medelstora utbildningsuppsättningar och är konkurrenskraftigt i hög resursmiljö. Att lära sig att tillämpa en generisk kopieringsåtgärd gör det möjligt för vårt tillvägagångssätt att generalisera snabbt från några datapunkter. Vi utnyttjar framgångsrikt minimiriskträning för att kompensera för svagheterna i MLE-parameterinlärning och neutralisera de negativa effekterna av att träna en pipeline med en separat karaktärsjustering.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک نئورل تغییر کی بنیادی موڈل کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو ایک ساده سٹ تغییر کے اقدامات (کپی، ٹیٹ، ٹیٹ، ٹیٹ) کا استعمال کرتا ہے جیسے تغییر کی نسل، لیمیٹ، اور دوبارہ تغییر کے لئے۔ چار ڈاٹ سٹ اور دوسروں زبانوں پر ایک بڑی مقدار کی ارزش میں، ہماری طریقہ ہمیشہ کم اور متوسط ترینس سٹ کی اندازوں پر کم کرتا ہے اور بالا رسورس سٹم میں مسابقه کرتا ہے. ایک عمومی کپی کے اقدام کے لئے استعمال کرنے کی سیکھنا ہماری تقریب کو کم ڈیٹ پوینٹوں سے سریع ترکیب کرنے کے لئے امکان دیتا ہے. ہم کامیابی سے کم خطر تطابیر کرنے کے لئے MLE پارامیٹر کی کمزوری کی کمزوری کے لئے کمزوری کریں اور ایک پائپ لین کی منفی تطابیر کے منفی اثرات کو مختلف شخص الیزار کے ساتھ ناکام کریں۔', 'uz': "We present a neural transition-based model that uses a simple set of edit actions (copy, delete, insert) for morphological transduction tasks such as inflection generation, lemmatization, and reinflection.  4 maʼlumotlar va ko'plab tillarda ko'plab qiymatda, bizning qiymatimiz bir qanday qanday qanday narsalar tizimini kamaytirish va o'rtacha taʼminlovchi oʻlchamini bajaradi va yuqori resource moslamalarida rivojlanadi. Umumiy nusxa amalni qoʻllashni o'rganish muvaffaqiyatsiz bir nechta maʼlumot pointdan tez yaratishga ruxsat beradi. Biz muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish uchun MLE parametrlarini o'rganish uchun juda minimal xavfsiz taʼminlovchimiz va bir xil taʼminlovchi bo'lgan pipelining negativ effektlarini taʼminlashtirish", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình chuyển đổi thần kinh hệ thần kinh dùng một bộ đơn giản các hành động sửa đổi (sao chép, xoá, chèn) cho các công việc chuyển sản sinh cấu hình, bắt ép, và tái tạo. Trong một đánh giá quy mô lớn trên bốn bộ dữ liệu và hàng chục ngôn ngữ, cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi hoàn toàn vượt trội về các hệ thống hiện đại ở các kích cỡ thấp và trung bình huấn luyện và cạnh tranh trong môi trường cao tài nguyên. Học cách áp dụng một hành động chép chung cho phép cách tiếp cận của chúng ta nhanh chóng lan rộng từ một số điểm dữ liệu. Chúng tôi đã tận dụng khóa huấn luyện ít rủi ro tối thiểu để bù đắp các yếu điểm của việc học các tham số MLE và trung hòa các tác động tiêu cực của việc đào tạo một đường ống bằng cách phối hợp đặc biệt.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en neural overgangsbaseret model, der bruger et simpelt sæt redigeringsaktioner (kopier, slet, indsæt) til morfologiske transduktionsopgaver som fleksionsgenerering, lemmatisering og reinflektion. I en omfattende evaluering af fire datasæt og snesevis af sprog overgår vores tilgang konsekvent state-of-the-art systemer på lave og mellemstore uddannelsessæt størrelser og er konkurrencedygtig i miljøet med høj ressource. At lære at anvende en generisk kopihandling gør det muligt for vores tilgang til hurtigt at generalisere fra et par datapunkter. Vi udnytter med succes minimumsrisikostræning for at kompensere for svaghederne ved MLE parameterlæring og neutralisere de negative virkninger af træning af en pipeline med en separat karakterlinjer.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een op neurale overgangen gebaseerd model dat een eenvoudige set bewerkingsacties (kopiëren, verwijderen, invoegen) gebruikt voor morfologische transductie taken zoals inflectie genereren, lemmatiseren en herflectie. In een grootschalige evaluatie op vier datasets en tientallen talen presteert onze aanpak consequent beter dan state-of-the-art systemen op lage en middelgrote trainingssets en is concurrerend in de high-resource setting. Leren om een generieke copy actie toe te passen stelt onze aanpak in staat om snel te generaliseren vanuit een paar datapunten. We maken succesvol gebruik van minimale risicotraining om de zwakke punten van MLE-parameterleren te compenseren en de negatieve effecten van het trainen van een pijplijn met een aparte karakteraligner te neutraliseren.', 'bg': 'Представяме модел, базиран на невронен преход, който използва прост набор от действия за редактиране (копиране, изтриване, вмъкване) за морфологични трансдукционни задачи като генериране на флексия, лематизация и рефлекция. При мащабна оценка на четири набора от данни и десетки езика нашият подход последователно надминава най-съвременните системи при ниски и средни размери на набора от обучения и е конкурентен в условията на високи ресурси. Да се научим да прилагаме общо действие за копиране позволява нашият подход да се обобщава бързо от няколко точки от данни. Успешно използваме обучението за минимален риск, за да компенсираме слабостите на изучаването на параметри и неутрализираме отрицателните ефекти от обучението на тръбопровод с отделен хоризонт на знаците.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo model na osnovu neuralnog prelaza koji koristi jednostavan set redaktnih akcija (kopija, izbrisa, uključuje) za morfološke prevodne zadatke poput generacije inflekcije, limmatizacije i reinflekcije. U velikoj procjeni na četiri podatke i desetine jezika, naš pristup stalno iznosi državne umjetničke sustave na niskim i srednjim veličinama obuke i konkurentno je u postavljanju visokih resursa. Naučenje primjene općeg kopiranog akcije omogućava naš pristup generalizaciji brzo iz nekoliko podataka. Uspjelo smo primjenjivati minimalnu obuku rizika kako bi kompenzirali slabosti učenja parametara MLE-a i neutralizirali negativne učinke obuke cijevi sa odvojenim poravnačem karaktera.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan model berasaskan transisi saraf yang menggunakan set sederhana tindakan edit (salin, hapus, masukkan) untuk tugas transduksi morfologis seperti generasi infleksi, lemmatisasi, dan reinfleksi. Dalam evaluasi skala besar pada empat set data dan lusinan bahasa, pendekatan kita secara konsisten melebihi sistem state-of-the-art pada ukuran pelatihan-set rendah dan tengah dan kompetitif dalam setting sumber daya tinggi. Belajar untuk menerapkan tindakan salinan generik memungkinkan pendekatan kita untuk menyegeralkan dengan cepat dari beberapa titik data. Kami berhasil menggunakan pelatihan risiko minimal untuk membalas kelemahan dari pelatihan parameter MLE dan menetralisasi efek negatif dari pelatihan pipa saluran dengan penyesuaian karakter terpisah.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein neuronales Übergangsmodell, das eine einfache Reihe von Bearbeitungsaktionen (Kopieren, Löschen, Einfügen) für morphologische Transduktionsaufgaben wie Flexionsgenerierung, Lemmatisierung und Reinflektion verwendet. In einer groß angelegten Auswertung auf vier Datensätzen und Dutzenden von Sprachen übertrifft unser Ansatz konsequent modernste Systeme bei geringen und mittleren Schulungsgrößen und ist im ressourcenintensiven Umfeld wettbewerbsfähig. Das Erlernen einer generischen Kopieraktion ermöglicht es unserem Ansatz, schnell von einigen Datenpunkten aus zu verallgemeinern. Wir nutzen erfolgreich Minimal Risk Training, um die Schwächen des MLE Parameterlernens auszugleichen und die negativen Auswirkungen des Trainings einer Pipeline mit einem separaten Character Aligner zu neutralisieren.', 'ko': '우리는 간단한 편집 동작(복제, 삭제, 삽입)을 사용하여 형태 전환 임무를 완성하는 신경 전환 모델을 제시했다. 예를 들어 굴절 생성, 레몬화와 재굴절 등이다.네 개의 데이터 집합과 몇 십 개의 언어에 대한 대규모 평가에서 우리의 방법은 중저훈련집합의 규모에서 가장 선진적인 시스템보다 우수하고 높은 자원 환경에서 경쟁력을 가진다.일반적인 복제 조작을 배우는 것은 우리의 방법을 몇 가지 데이터 지점에서 신속하게 개괄할 수 있다.우리는 최소한의 위험 훈련을 이용하여 MLE 매개 변수 학습의 부족함을 보완하고 단독 캐릭터를 사용하여 맞춤형 훈련 파이프라인에 미치는 부정적인 영향을 제거했다.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza muundo wa mpito wa kidini unaotumia mfululizo rahisi wa matendo ya kuhariri (nakala, kufuta, kuondoa, kuingiza) kwa ajili ya kazi za usambazaji wa kimaadilojia kama vile kizazi cha ushawishi, kutengeneza viumbe na kutafakari. Katika uchunguzi mkubwa wa taarifa nne na maelfu ya lugha zetu, mbinu zetu zinafanya kazi kwa ujumla katika mfumo wa sanaa wa kiwango cha mafunzo ya chini na wa kati na inashinikiza katika mazingira ya rasilimali ya juu. Kujifunza kutumia hatua ya nakala ya msingi inawezesha kutengeneza hatua yetu haraka kutoka kwenye pointi chache za takwimu. Tumefanikiwa kutumia mafunzo ya hatari ya chini kwa ajili ya kupunguza udhaifu wa mafunzo ya parameter ya MLE na kuinua madhara hasi ya mafunzo ya pipeline yenye mwangalizi wa tabia tofauti.', 'tr': 'Biz näyral geçişim tabanly bir nuyral modi modül üçin morfolojik terjime etmek, limmatizaçy we ýene-fleksiyonyň basit bir takmyny ulanýar. 4 datajyk we düzinen diller barada Ullakan çykyş çykyşynda, biziň ýaryşymyz düşük we orta düşük okuwçylyk sistemalarynda döwürleýär we ýokary resurslar düzümlerinde döwürleýär. Umumy nusgala etmäge öwrenmek üçin biziň golamyzy birnäçe data noktalaryndan çalt döredir. Biz MLE Parametriýasynyň öwrenmesiniň zayıflatlygyny täzeden almak üçin iň az riskli okuwçylygy bejerdik we paýlaş karakter çyzygçysy bilen pipeline öwrenmesiniň negatif täsirlerini neutralize etdik.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n neurale oorgang-gebaseerde model wat gebruik 'n eenvoudige stel van redigeer aksies (kopie, uitvee, voeg by) vir morfologiese oorgang-taak soos infleksie generasie, lemmatisasie en reinfleksie. In 'n groot skaal evaluering op vier datastelle en duisende tale, ons toegang bestaan konsistentlik uit staat-van-die-kunstenstelsels op lae en middelste onderwerp-stel grootte en is kompetief in die hoë-hulpbron-instelling. Leer om 'n algemene kopie aksie te toewend, laat ons toegang tot vinnig te genereer van 'n paar data punte. Ons het suksesvol die minimale risiko onderwerp gemaak om te kompenseer vir die swakhede van MLE parameter leer en die negatiewe effekte van onderwerp van 'n pipelyn met 'n aparte karakter aligner.", 'fa': 'ما یک مدل بر اساس تغییرات عصبی را نشان می دهیم که از یک مجموعه ساده عمل تغییر (کپی، حذف، ورود) برای کارهای تغییرات مورفولوژیکی مثل نسل تغییر، لیماتیزی و تغییر استفاده می کند. در یک ارزیابی مقیاس بزرگ روی چهار مجموعه داده\u200cها و دوازدها زبان، دسترسی ما به طور کامل سیستم\u200cهای هنری در اندازه\u200cهای آموزش\u200cهای پایین و متوسط انجام می\u200cدهد و در تنظیم منابع بالا رقابت می\u200cکند. یاد گرفتن برای کاربرد یک کپی عمومی اجازه می دهد دسترسی ما را به سرعت از چند نقطه داده\u200cها به جامعه\u200cسازی اجازه دهد. ما با موفقیت آموزش کمینه ریسک را برای کمک کردن ضعیفیت یادگیری پارامتر MLE تحت تأثیر قرار می دهیم و تاثیرات منفی از آموزش یک لوله با یک تنظیم شخصیت جدا تأثیر می دهیم.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një model të bazuar në tranzicion nervor që përdor një set të thjeshtë veprimesh editimi (kopje, fshirje, shtypje) për detyrat e transdukimit morfologjik të tilla si gjenerata e infleksionit, limmatizimi dhe reflektimi. Në një vlerësim në shkallë të madhe mbi katër grupe të dhënash dhe dhjetra gjuhësh, qasja jonë vazhdimisht mbizotëron sistemet më të larta në masat e ulëta dhe të mesme të grupit të trajnimit dhe është konkurruese në bazën e burimeve të larta. Mësimi për të aplikuar një veprim kopje gjeneral mundëson qasjen tonë për të gjeneralizuar shpejt nga disa pika të dhënash. Ne me sukses nxjerrim trajnimin minimal të rrezikut për të kompensuar dobësitë e mësimit të parametrave MLE dhe neutralizojmë efektet negative të trajnimit të një tubacioni me një rregullues të veçantë karakteri.', 'am': 'የናውሮው ተሳታፊ ምሳሌ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በአራቱ ዳታተሮች እና ብዙ ደረጃዎች ቋንቋዎች ላይ በተለየ ትልቅ ማስታወቂያው፣ ልግስናችን በዋናና በመካከለኛ የትምህርት ትምህርት ምርጫዎች ላይ የየልዩ ልዩን ሥርዓት እና ከፍተኛ የክፍለ ዕድሜ መጠን ይቻላል፡፡ የgeneric ቅጂ ክፈት ለመጠቀም ማስተማር የሥርዓታችንን ቅድሚያ ከጥቂት ዳታ ቦታዎች ፈጥኖ እንዲያስቀምጥ ይችላል፡፡ የMLE parameter ትምህርት ማድረግ እና የፖሊንቲንን በተለየ የፊደል አካባቢ የሚያስተምር የጎዳና ውጤት ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային հաղորդակցման հիմնված մոդել, որը օգտագործում է մի պարզ շարք խմբագրման գործողություններ (վերարտադրում, ջնջվում, ներդրում) մորֆոլոգիական հաղորդակցման գործողությունների համար, ինչպիսիք են ներխուժման սերունդը, լեմմատիզացիան և Չորս տվյալների համակարգերի և տասնյակ լեզուների մեծ գնահատման արդյունքում մեր մոտեցումը մշտապես գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր համակարգերը ցածր և միջին ուսուցման համակարգերի չափերում և համընկնում է բարձր ռեսուրսների համակարգերում: Սովորել կիրառել ընդհանուր կոպիայի գործողություն հնարավորություն է տալիս մեր մոտեցումը արագ ընդհանրացնել որոշ տվյալների կետերից: Մենք հաջողությամբ օգտագործում ենք նվազագույն ռիսկի ուսումնասիրությունը, որպեսզի հատուցենք MLE պարամետրերի ուսումնասիրության թույլականությունները և չեզոյացնում ենք խողովակաշարի ուսումնասիրության բացասական ազդեցությունները առանձին', 'az': 'Biz nöral keçmə tabanlı modeli göstəririk ki, infleksyon nəsili, limmatizasyonu və reinfleksiyonu kimi morfolojik keçmə işləri üçün basit bir düzenleme eylemlərini istifadə edər. Dörd veri qurğuları və düzine dillər haqqında böyük ölçüdə, bizim tərzimiz düşük və orta təhsil qurğuları təhsil etdiyi və yüksək ressurs qurğularında mübahisə edir. Əlavə etmək öyrənmək bizim yaxınlığımızı bir neçə məlumat nöqtələrindən tez olaraq generalizə edər. Biz MLE parametrlərin öyrənməsinin zəifliklərini kompensə etmək üçün minimal risk təhsil təhsil edilməsini müvəffəqiyyətə müvəffəqiyyətə gətiririk və təhsil təhsil təhsil etməsinin negatif təsirlərini ayrı karakter təhsil edəni təhsil edirik.', 'bn': 'আমরা একটি নিউরেল পরিবর্তনের ভিত্তিক মডেল উপস্থাপন করেছি যা একটি সাধারণ সম্পাদনার কাজ ব্যবহার করে (কপি, মুছে ফেলে, মুছে ফেলে), যেমন প্রভাব প্রজন্ম, লেম্যামেশন এবং প চার ডাটাসেট এবং ডজন ভাষায় বিশাল পরিমাণ মূল্যের মাধ্যমে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা নিম্ন এবং মধ্যস্থানীয় প্রশিক্ষণের আকারের উপর প্রতিযোগিতা করা হয়েছে। একটি সাধারণ কপি কার্যকলাপ প্রয়োগ করতে শিখতে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ সক্রিয় করে কয়েকটি ডাটা বিন্দুর মধ্য থেকে দ্রুত সৃষ্টি  আমরা সফলভাবে মিলি প্যারামার্টার শিক্ষা ও নেতিবাচক প্রভাব প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য ন্যুনতম ঝুঁকি প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করতে সফলভাবে সফলভাবে লিভার করি', 'ca': "Presentam un model basat en transició neural que utilitza un conjunt simple d'accions d'edició (còpia, eliminació, inserció) per a tasques de transducció morfològica com generació d'inflexió, lemmatització i reinflexió. En una evaluació a gran escala de quatre conjunts de dades i dotzenes de llengües, el nostre enfocament és consistentment més avançat que els sistemes d'última generació en petites i mitjanes dimensions d'ensenyament i és competitiu en un entorn d'alta capacitat. Aprendre a aplicar una acció genèrica de còpia permet que el nostre enfocament s'generalitze ràpidament des d'alguns punts de dades. We successfully leverage minimum risk training to compensate for the weaknesses of MLE parameter learning and neutralize the negative effects of training a pipeline with a separate character aligner.", 'cs': 'Představujeme model založený na neuronovém přechodu, který využívá jednoduchou sadu editačních akcí (kopírovat, odstranit, vložit) pro morfologické transdukční úlohy, jako je generování flexe, lemmatizace a reinflekce. V rozsáhlém hodnocení na čtyřech datových sadách a desítkách jazyků náš přístup důsledně překonává nejmodernější systémy na nízkých a středních velikostech školení a je konkurenceschopný v prostředí s vysokými zdroji. Naučení se aplikovat obecnou kopírovací akci umožňuje našemu přístupu rychle zobecnit z několika datových bodů. Úspěšně využíváme trénink s minimálním rizikem k kompenzaci slabých stránek učení parametrů MLE a neutralizaci negativních účinků tréninku potrubí se samostatným zarovnávačem znaků.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo model na osnovu neuralne transicije koji koristi jednostavan set redaktnih akcija (kopija, izbrisa, uključuje) za morfološke transakcije poput generacije inflekcije, limmatizacije i reinflekcije. U velikoj procjeni na četiri dataseta i desetine jezika, naš pristup stalno iznosi državne umjetničke sustave na niskim i srednjim veličinama obuke i konkurentno je u postavljanju visokih resursa. Naučenje primjene općeg kopiranog akcije omogućava naš pristup generalizaciji brzo iz nekoliko podataka. Uspjelo smo uticati na minimalnu obuku rizika da bi kompenzirali slabosti učenja parametara MLE-a i neutralizirali negativne učinke obuke cijevi sa odvojenim poravnačem karaktera.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme neurosiirtymäpohjaisen mallin, joka käyttää yksinkertaisia muokkaustoimintoja (kopioi, poista, lisää) morfologisiin transduktiotehtäviin, kuten taivutuksen tuottamiseen, lemmatisaatioon ja uudelleenflektioon. Neljän tietoaineiston ja kymmenien kielten laajamittaisessa arvioinnissa lähestymistapamme on johdonmukaisesti tehokkaampi kuin uusimmat järjestelmät pienissä ja keskisuurissa koulutuskokonaisuuksissa ja kilpailukykyinen suurissa resursseissa. Yleisen kopiointitoiminnon soveltaminen mahdollistaa lähestymistapamme yleistymisen nopeasti muutamasta datapisteestä. Hyödynnämme menestyksekkäästi minimiriskin koulutusta kompensoimaan MLE-parametrioppimisen heikkouksia ja neutraloimaan erillisellä merkkilinjaajalla varustetun putken koulutuksen kielteiset vaikutukset.', 'et': 'Esitleme närviüleminekul põhinevat mudelit, mis kasutab lihtsaid redigeerimistoiminguid (kopeerimine, kustutamine, sisestamine) morfoloogiliste transduktsiooniülesannete jaoks, nagu painde genereerimine, lemmatiseerimine ja reinflektsioon. Nelja andmekogumi ja kümnete keelte laiaulatusliku hindamise käigus on meie lähenemisviis järjepidevalt ületanud kaasaegseid süsteeme väikese ja keskmise suurusega koolituste puhul ning on konkurentsivõimeline suurte ressursside puhul. Üldise koopiategevuse rakendamise õppimine võimaldab meie lähenemisviisi kiiresti üldistada mõnest andmepunktist. Me kasutame edukalt minimaalse riski koolitust, et kompenseerida MLE parameetrite õppimise nõrkusi ja neutraliseerida eraldi märgijoonlaatoriga torujuhtme koolitamise negatiivsed mõjud.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing nyerung-basa ning model sing bisa nyerung batir aksi (kopi, delete, insert) kanggo modèl Nanging ketemungan langkung akeh sistem dadi sing nganggo perusahaan dengan upat dataset lan didasahan kanggo langkung, dadi kanggo ngerasah sistem sing ditambah-perusahaan langkung banjur sistem sing na-perusahaan lagi nggawe sistem sing paling-perusahaan lan tambah piyambak banjur kuwi nggawe barang langkung banjur. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngerti nggawe aturan piliné kanggo nyeasai nggawe gerakan kanggo mbalke kanggo ngerasai winih sing dotakan MLE Parameter lan nêtrabah dhéwé nêtas efek nggawe lanjut tuanjakan kanggo ngelarang cara sing seperah.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מודל מבוסס על מעבר עצבי שמשתמש בסט פשוט של פעולות עורכת (עותק, מחק, להכניס) למשימות העברה מורפולוגיות כמו דור השפעה, למטיזציה, ושפעה מחדש. בערכה גדולה על ארבעה קבוצות נתונים ועשרות שפות, הגישה שלנו מתאימה באופן קבוע מערכות חדשות במידה נמוכה וממוצעת ללמוד להפעיל פעולה עותקת גנרלית מאפשרת הגישה שלנו לגנרליזציה מהר מכמה נקודות נתונים. אנו מצליחים להשתמש באימוני סיכון מינימלי כדי לפצות לחלשות של הלימודים של פרמטרים MLE ולניטרל את השפעות השליליות של האימונים צינור עם מארגן אופי נפרד.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo model, ki temelji na živčnem prehodu, ki uporablja preprost nabor urejevalnih dejanj (kopiranje, brisanje, vstavljanje) za morfološke transdukcijske naloge, kot so generiranje inflekcije, lemmatizacija in reinflekcija. Pri obsežnem ocenjevanju štirih naborov podatkov in na desetine jezikov naš pristop dosledno presega najsodobnejše sisteme pri nizkih in srednjih velikostih naborov usposabljanja in je konkurenčen pri visokih virih. Učenje uporabe splošnega kopiranja omogoča naš pristop hitro posploševanje iz nekaj podatkovnih točk. Uspešno izkoristimo usposabljanje za minimalno tveganje, da nadomestimo slabosti učenja parametrov MLE in nevtraliziramo negativne učinke usposabljanja cevovoda z ločenim poravnalnikom znakov.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da wani misali na shige neural wanda ke amfani da shiryoyin aiki mai sauƙi na taƙaita (kofi, tafiyar da, kuma za'a shigar) wa aikin mutafalologi kamar zayen mutilation, mai shawara, da kuma na canza. Daga ƙidãya mai girma a kan tsarin bayani huɗu da dubu'in harshen, hanyoyinmu yana tafiyar da halin-sanarni a kan haske da kuma yana yin gaugawa a cikin tsarin sarki-resource. Ana iya ƙara wa yin amfani da aikin kodi na dama, yana amfani da aikin mu don ya sassautar da haraka daga point kaɗan. Tuna saka mafiya amfani da shi a minimum risiko dõmin mu kafara wa rauni na mazaɓan parameter MLE da kuma ke nadurar da negative Effects of the Trainin a pibleine da wani taki mai ƙayyade.", 'bo': 'We present a neural transition-based model that uses a simple set of edit actions (copy, delete, insert) for morphological transduction tasks such as inflection generation, lemmatization, and reinflection. སྐད་ཡིག སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་འདྲ་བཤུ་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་སྤྱད་ནས་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་ཆ་ཤས་ནས་མཚམས་རྟགས་བཀལ་ཆེ་བ། We successfully leverage minimum risk training to compensate for the weaknesses of MLE parameter learning and neutralize the negative effects of training a pipeline with a separate character aligner.'}
{'en': 'Distance-Free Modeling of Multi-Predicate Interactions in End-to-End Japanese Predicate-Argument Structure Analysis', 'ar': 'نمذجة خالية من المسافات للتفاعلات متعددة المسند في تحليل هيكل الحجة اليابانية الشاملة', 'fr': "Modélisation sans distance d'interactions multi-prédicats dans l'analyse de structure de prédicat-argument japonais de bout en bout", 'pt': 'Modelagem livre de distância de interações multipredicado na análise de estrutura de argumento de predicado japonês de ponta a ponta', 'es': 'Modelado sin distancia de interacciones de predicados múltiples en el análisis de estructura de predicados y argumentos japoneses de extremo a extremo', 'ja': 'エンドツーエンドの日本語述語論証構造解析における多述語相互作用の距離フリーモデリング', 'hi': 'एंड-टू-एंड जापानी विधेय-तर्क संरचना विश्लेषण में मल्टी-विधेय इंटरैक्शन की दूरी-मुक्त मॉडलिंग', 'zh': '端到端日语谓词-参数构析中多谓词交互作用无距建模', 'ru': 'Дистанционное моделирование взаимодействия нескольких предикатов в сквозном японском анализе структуры предикатов и аргументов', 'ga': 'Samhaltú Cian-Idirghníomhartha Ilthuartha in Anailís ar Struchtúr Réamh-Argóint na Seapáine ó cheann go ceann', 'ka': 'Multi-Predice Interactions in End-to-End Japanese Predice-Argument Structure Analysis', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση πολυ-προκαθορισμένων αλληλεπιδράσεων χωρίς απόσταση στην ανάλυση δομών προκαθορισμένων επιχειρημάτων', 'hu': 'Többszörös kölcsönhatások távolságmentes modellezése a japán predikált-argumentum struktúra elemzésben', 'mk': 'Моделирање без дистанца на мултипредикатни интеракции во анализа на структурата на јапонскиот предикат- аргумент од крај до крај', 'it': "Modellazione senza distanza delle interazioni multi-Predicate nell'analisi end-to-end giapponese della struttura Predicate-Argument", 'lt': 'Daugelių prognozių sąveikų modeliavimas be atstumo atliekant Japonijos prognozių argumentų struktūros analizę', 'kk': 'Жапонияның аяқтау- аяқтау аргументтер структурасын талдау үшін көптеген қашықтық қашықтық үлгілеу', 'ms': 'Modeling Bebas Jarak Interaksi Berlipat-Predikat dalam Analisi Struktur Predikat-Argumen Japang Akhir-Akhir', 'ml': 'ജാപ്പാനീസ് പ്രിഡിക്റ്റ്- ആർഗമെന്റ് സ്ട്രെക്റ്റ് ക്രമീകരണത്തിന്റെ അസാധ്യതസ്ഥാനം', 'mt': 'Immudellar mingħajr Distanza ta’ Interazzjonijiet Multi-Predikati fl-Analiżi tal-Istruttura tal-Argument Predikat Ġappuniż minn tmiem sa tmiem', 'no': 'Avstand-fri modellering av fleire-foredikte interaksjonar i ein ekstern-til-slutt japansk predikt-argumentstruktureanalyse', 'pl': 'Modelowanie bez odległości interakcji wielu predykatów w kompleksowej analizie struktur predykatów japońskich', 'ro': 'Modelarea fără distanță a interacțiunilor multi-predicate în analiza structurii predicate-argumente japoneze end-to-end', 'sr': 'Modeliranje multi-predikatskih interakcija u analizi japanske predikatske strukture', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරිඩිකේට් සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණයේ අවසානයෙන් ජාපානිය ප්\u200dරිඩිකේට් ප්\u200dරිඩිකේට් ස්ථාපනය විශාල', 'so': 'Distance-Free Modeling of Multi-Predicate Interactions in End-to-End Japanese Predicate-Argument structure Analysis', 'sv': 'Distansfri modellering av flerpredikata interaktioner i japansk analys av predikatargument', 'ta': 'Distance-Free Modeling of Multi-Predicate Interactions in End-to-End Japanese Predicate-Argument Structure Analysis', 'ur': 'جاپانی پرڈیٹ-آرڈیٹ-آرڈیٹ ساخترٹ تحلیل میں بہت سی-پرڈیٹ ایٹرفکس کی فاصلہ-فائدہ موڈیٹنگ', 'mn': 'Японы төгсгөл-төгсгөл аргумент структурын шинжилгээнд олон-төгсгөл харилцааны зай-үнэгүй зай загвар загвар', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ chia cách miễn phí của tương tác đa chuẩn trong phân tích cấu trúc Heo- tới-đích của Nhật Bản', 'bg': 'Моделиране без дистанция на взаимодействия с множество предшественици в японски анализ на структурата от край до край', 'da': 'Afstandsfri modellering af multiforudsigelige interaktioner i japansk end-to-end-analyse af forudsigelige argumenter', 'nl': 'Afstand-vrije modellering van multi-predicate interacties in end-to-end Japanse predicate-argument structuuranalyse', 'hr': 'Modeliranje multipredikatnih interakcija bez daljine u analizi japanske strukture predikata-argumenta', 'de': 'Distanzfreie Modellierung von Multi-Predicate Interaktionen in der End-to-End japanischen Predicate-Argument Strukturanalyse', 'id': 'Modeling Bebas Jarak dari Interaksi Multi-Predikat dalam Analisi Struktur Predikat-Argumen Japang Akhir-Akhir', 'ko': '단말기부터 단말기까지 일본어 술어 논원 구조 분석에서 다술어 상호작용의 무거리 모델링', 'fa': 'Modeling distance-free of Multi-Predicate Interactions in End-to-End Japanese Predicate-Argument Structure Structure Analysis', 'sw': 'Udhibiti wa Uhuru wa Matukio ya Mikutano ya Kizaidi katika Uchambuzi wa Mfumo wa Uamuzi wa Kijapani', 'tr': 'Ýaponiýanyň soňunda-soňra öňe-öňe-öňe-öňe-aýratyn Etkileşimleriniň azalmagy', 'af': 'Afstand-Vry Modelering van Multi-Predikteer Interaksies in Einde-na-Einde Japaanse Predikteer-Argument Struktuur Analisie', 'sq': 'Distance-Free Modeling of Multi-Predicate Interactions in End-to-End Japanese Predicate-Argument Structure Analysis', 'am': 'Distance-Free Modeling of Multi-Predicate Interaction in End-to-End Japanese Predicate-Argument Structure Analysis', 'hy': 'Բազմականխատես ինտերակցիաների առանց հեռավորության մոդելավորումը', 'az': "Yaponca Predicate-Argument Structure Analizində çoxlu-Predicate Interactions'in Uzaqlıq-Özgür Modeling", 'bn': 'জাপানের শেষ-থেকে শেষ পর্যন্ত প্রিডিকেট-আর্গামেন্ট কাঠামোক্তি বিশ্লেষণের দূরত্ব-মুক্ত মডেল', 'ca': "Modell lliure de distància d'interaccions multipredicates en l'anàlisi de l'estructura del predicat-argument japonès", 'cs': 'Bezvzdálenostní modelování multipredikátních interakcí v koncové japonské analýze predikátních argumentů', 'bs': 'Modeliranje multipredikatnih interakcija bez distanca u analizi japanske strukture predikata do kraja', 'et': 'Mitme eelkäija interaktsioonide kaugusvaba modelleerimine Jaapani eelkäija-argumendi struktuuri analüüsis', 'fi': 'Etätön monen esineen vuorovaikutusten mallinnus japanilaisessa kokonaismallinnuksessa', 'jv': 'Distance-Free model of Multi-predice interections in End-to-End japanese predice-argument structural Test', 'sk': 'Modeliranje interakcij z več predniki brez razdalje v japonski analizi strukture med predniki in argumenti', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מודל ללא מרחק של יחסים מרובים-קודמים באנליזה מבנה של קודם-קודם יפני', 'bo': 'Distance-Free Modeling of Multi-Predicate Interactions in End-to-End Japanese Predicate-Argument Structure Analysis'}
{'en': 'Capturing interactions among multiple predicate-argument structures (PASs) is a crucial issue in the task of analyzing PAS in Japanese. In this paper, we propose new Japanese PAS analysis models that integrate the label prediction information of arguments in multiple PASs by extending the input and last layers of a standard deep bidirectional recurrent neural network (bi-RNN) model. In these models, using the mechanisms of pooling and attention, we aim to directly capture the potential interactions among multiple PASs, without being disturbed by the word order and distance. Our experiments show that the proposed models improve the prediction accuracy specifically for cases where the predicate and argument are in an indirect dependency relation and achieve a new state of the art in the overall F_1 on a standard benchmark corpus.F_1 on a standard benchmark corpus.', 'ar': 'يعد التقاط التفاعلات بين هياكل الحجج الأصلية المتعددة (PASs) قضية حاسمة في مهمة تحليل PAS باللغة اليابانية. في هذا البحث ، نقترح نماذج تحليل يابانية جديدة PAS تدمج معلومات تنبؤ التسمية للحجج في عدة PASs من خلال توسيع المدخلات والطبقات الأخيرة لنموذج الشبكة العصبية المتكررة ثنائية الاتجاه العميقة (bi-RNN). في هذه النماذج ، باستخدام آليات التجميع والانتباه ، نهدف إلى التقاط التفاعلات المحتملة بين العديد من PASs ، دون الانزعاج من ترتيب الكلمات والمسافة. تُظهر تجاربنا أن النماذج المقترحة تعمل على تحسين دقة التنبؤ على وجه التحديد للحالات التي يكون فيها المسند والحجة في علاقة تبعية غير مباشرة وتحقق حالة جديدة من الفن في إجمالي F_1 على مجموعة معيارية قياسية.', 'fr': "La capture des interactions entre plusieurs structures prédicat-argument (PASS) est une question cruciale dans la tâche d'analyse des PAS en japonais. Dans cet article, nous proposons de nouveaux modèles d'analyse PAS japonais qui intègrent les informations de prédiction d'étiquette des arguments dans plusieurs PASs en étendant les couches d'entrée et de fin d'un modèle de réseau neuronal récurrent bidirectionnel profond (Bi-RNN) standard. Dans ces modèles, en utilisant les mécanismes de mise en commun et d'attention, nous visons à capturer directement les interactions potentielles entre plusieurs PASs, sans être dérangés par l'ordre des mots et la distance. Nos expériences montrent que les modèles proposés améliorent la précision de la prédiction spécifiquement dans les cas où le prédicat et l'argument sont dans une relation de dépendance indirecte et atteignent un nouvel état de l'art dans le F_1 global sur un corpus de référence standard.", 'es': 'Capturar interacciones entre múltiples estructuras de predicado-argumento (PASs) es una cuestión crucial en la tarea de analizar las PAS en japonés. En este artículo, proponemos nuevos modelos de análisis PAS japoneses que integran la información de predicción de etiquetas de argumentos en múltiples PAs ampliando la entrada y la última capa de un modelo estándar de red neuronal recurrente bidireccional profunda (bi-RNN). En estos modelos, utilizando los mecanismos de agrupación y atención, nuestro objetivo es capturar directamente las interacciones potenciales entre múltiples PA, sin que el orden de las palabras y la distancia nos perturben. Nuestros experimentos muestran que los modelos propuestos mejoran la precisión de la predicción específicamente para los casos en que el predicado y el argumento están en una relación de dependencia indirecta y alcanzan un nuevo estado de la técnica en la F_1 general en un corpus de referencia estándar.', 'pt': 'Capturar interações entre múltiplas estruturas predicado-argumento (PASs) é uma questão crucial na tarefa de analisar PAS em japonês. Neste artigo, propomos novos modelos de análise de PAS japoneses que integram as informações de previsão de rótulos de argumentos em vários PASs, estendendo a entrada e as últimas camadas de um modelo padrão de rede neural recorrente bidirecional profunda (bi-RNN). Nesses modelos, usando os mecanismos de agrupamento e atenção, buscamos capturar diretamente as interações potenciais entre múltiplas PASs, sem sermos perturbados pela ordem das palavras e distância. Nossos experimentos mostram que os modelos propostos melhoram a precisão da previsão especificamente para casos em que o predicado e o argumento estão em uma relação de dependência indireta e alcançam um novo estado da arte no F_1 geral em um corpus de benchmark padrão.', 'ja': '複数の述語論証構造（ PAS ）間の相互作用をキャプチャすることは、日本語でPASを分析する作業における重要な課題である。本稿では，標準的な深層双方向再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ bi - RNN ）モデルの入力層と最後の層を拡張することにより，複数のPASにおける引数のラベル予測情報を統合する新しい日本のPAS解析モデルを提案する．これらのモデルでは、プールと注意のメカニズムを使用して、単語の順序と距離に支障を受けることなく、複数のPAS間の潜在的な相互作用を直接捉えることを目指しています。我々の実験は、提唱されたモデルが、述語と引数が間接的な依存関係にある場合に特異的に予測精度を向上させ、標準的なベンチマークコーパス上の全体的なF_1における最新の状態を達成することを示している。', 'zh': '获多谓词论(PAS)之相用,析日语PAS之关键问题也。 本文建新日本PAS分析模型,宜广准深双向递归神经网络(bi-RNN)其输层最后,整合数PAS中参数标测信息。 凡此诸形,用集意之机,径获PAS间潜相为用,而不为词序离所干。 臣等实验明, 形增测度, 特谓词与参数处间接恃, 并准语料库总体F_1成新技术水平。', 'hi': 'कई विधेय-तर्क संरचनाओं (पीएएस) के बीच इंटरैक्शन कैप्चर करना जापानी में पीएएस का विश्लेषण करने के कार्य में एक महत्वपूर्ण मुद्दा है। इस पेपर में, हम नए जापानी पीएएस विश्लेषण मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो एक मानक गहरे द्विदिश आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (द्वि-आरएनएन) मॉडल के इनपुट और अंतिम परतों का विस्तार करके कई पीएएस में तर्कों की लेबल भविष्यवाणी जानकारी को एकीकृत करते हैं। इन मॉडलों में, पूलिंग और ध्यान के तंत्र का उपयोग करके, हम शब्द आदेश और दूरी से परेशान किए बिना, कई पीएएस के बीच संभावित बातचीत को सीधे कैप्चर करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल विशेष रूप से उन मामलों के लिए भविष्यवाणी सटीकता में सुधार करते हैं जहां विधेय और तर्क एक अप्रत्यक्ष निर्भरता संबंध में हैं और एक मानक बेंचमार्क कॉर्पस पर समग्र F_1 में कला की एक नई स्थिति प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Улавливание взаимодействий между несколькими структурами предикат-аргумент (PAS) является ключевым вопросом в задаче анализа PAS на японском языке. В этой статье мы предлагаем новые японские модели анализа PAS, которые интегрируют информацию предсказания меток аргументов в нескольких PAS путем расширения входного и последнего слоев стандартной модели глубокой двунаправленной рекуррентной нейронной сети (bi-RNN). В этих моделях, используя механизмы объединения и внимания, мы стремимся напрямую охватить потенциальные взаимодействия между несколькими PAS, не нарушая порядок слов и расстояние. Наши эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемые модели улучшают точность прогнозирования именно для случаев, когда предикат и аргумент находятся в косвенной зависимости и достигают нового уровня техники в общем F_1 на стандартном эталонном корпусе.', 'ga': 'Is saincheist ríthábhachtach é idirghníomhaíochtaí a ghabháil i measc struchtúir iolracha réamh-argóinte (PASanna) le linn anailís a dhéanamh ar PAS sa tSeapáinis. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid samhlacha anailíse PAS Seapánacha nua a chomhtháthaíonn faisnéis tuar lipéad na n-argóintí in ilPASanna trí shíneadh a dhéanamh ar ionchur agus ar na sraitheanna deiridh de shamhail chaighdeánach líonra néarach athfhillteach déthreo (bi-RNN). Sna samhlacha seo, agus na meicníochtaí comhthiomsaithe agus aird á n-úsáid againn, tá sé mar aidhm againn na hidirghníomhaíochtaí féideartha i measc ilPASanna a ghabháil go díreach, gan a bheith ag cur isteach ar ord na bhfocal agus an t-achar. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go bhfeabhsaíonn na samhlacha atá beartaithe cruinneas an tuar go sonrach do chásanna ina bhfuil an tuar agus an argóint i ndáil le spleáchas indíreach agus go mbaineann siad úrscothacht amach san iomlán F_1 ar chorpas tagarmharcála caighdeánach.', 'ka': 'მრავალ პრედიკატიკური არგუმენტის სტრუქტურების (PAS) კონტაციაცია იგივე მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა იაპონული PAS-ს ანალიზაციაში. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ ახალი იაპონური PAS ანალიზის მოდელები, რომლებიც რამდენიმე PAS-ში არგუმენტების ინტერგურაციას ინტერგურაციაში ახალგაზრულების ინფორმაციას, რომლებიც სტანდარტული დიდირექციური მეორე ამ მოდელში, შესაძლებელია სიტყვების და განმავლობის მექანემისთვის გამოყენება, ჩვენ მინდომარებულია განმავლობა პოტენტაქტიური ინტერფექციების შესახებ მრავალ PAS-ს შორის, რომე ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ მოდელები განსაზღვრებულებაში განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებულება, განსაზღვრებულია, სადაც პრედიკატიკური და არგუმენტი არგუმენტის განსაზღვრებულებაში და დავასრულებთ ახალი ს', 'hu': 'A több predikát-argumentum struktúra (PAS) közötti interakciók rögzítése kulcsfontosságú kérdés a PAS japán nyelvű elemzésében. Ebben a tanulmányban új japán PAS elemzési modelleket javasolunk, amelyek integrálják az argumentumok címke előrejelzési információit több PAS-ben egy standard mély kétirányú visszatérő neurális hálózat (bi-RNN) bemeneti és utolsó rétegének kiterjesztésével. Ezekben a modellekben az összevonás és a figyelem mechanizmusait használva arra törekszünk, hogy közvetlenül rögzítsük a több PAS közötti potenciális kölcsönhatásokat, anélkül, hogy zavarná a szósorrend és a távolság. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modellek javítják az előrejelzési pontosságot kifejezetten azokban az esetekben, amikor a predikátum és az érv indirekt függőségi viszonyban van, és új technikai állapotot érnek el a teljes F_1-ben egy standard referencia korpuszon alapján.', 'el': 'Η καταγραφή αλληλεπιδράσεων μεταξύ δομών πολλαπλών υπαρκτών-ορίων (ΠΑS) είναι ένα κρίσιμο ζήτημα στο έργο της ανάλυσης ΠΑS στα ιαπωνικά. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε νέα ιαπωνικά μοντέλα ανάλυσης που ενσωματώνουν τις πληροφορίες πρόβλεψης ετικετών των ορίων σε πολλαπλά ΠΑΣ επεκτείνοντας την είσοδο και το τελευταίο στρώμα ενός τυποποιημένου μοντέλου βαθιάς αμφίδρομης επαναλαμβανόμενης νευρωνικής δικτύωσης (bi-RNN). Σε αυτά τα μοντέλα, χρησιμοποιώντας τους μηχανισμούς συγκέντρωσης και προσοχής, στοχεύουμε να συλλάβουμε άμεσα τις πιθανές αλληλεπιδράσεις μεταξύ των πολλαπλών ΠΑΣ, χωρίς να μας ενοχλεί η σειρά των λέξεων και η απόσταση. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι τα προτεινόμενα μοντέλα βελτιώνουν την ακρίβεια πρόβλεψης ειδικά σε περιπτώσεις όπου το προδιάγραφο και το επιχείρημα βρίσκονται σε έμμεση σχέση εξάρτησης και επιτυγχάνουν μια νέα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στο συνολικό F_1 σε ένα τυποποιημένο σώμα αναφοράς.', 'mk': 'Зафатувањето на интеракциите помеѓу повеќето структури на предикати-аргументи (PAS) е клучно прашање во задачата на анализирање на PAS на јапонски. Во овој весник, предложуваме нови јапонски модели на анализа на PAS кои ги интегрираат информациите за предвидување на етикетата на аргументите во повеќе PAS со проширување на внесувањето и последните слоеви на стандардниот директионален модел на рецидентна нервна мрежа (bi-RNN). Во овие модели, користејќи ги механизмите на спојување и внимание, ние имаме за цел директно да ги фатиме потенцијалните интеракции меѓу повеќе ПАС, без да бидат вознемирени од редот на зборовите и далечината. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека предложените модели ја подобруваат претпоставувачката точност специфично за случаите во кои предикатите и аргументите се во индиректна зависност однос и постигнуваат нова техничка состојба во целокупниот F_1 на стандарден референциски корпус.', 'it': "Catturare le interazioni tra più strutture di argomenti predicati (PAS) è un problema cruciale nel compito di analizzare PAS in giapponese. In questo articolo, proponiamo nuovi modelli di analisi PAS giapponesi che integrano le informazioni di previsione delle etichette degli argomenti in PAS multipli estendendo l'input e gli ultimi livelli di un modello standard di rete neurale ricorrente bidirezionale (bi-RNN). In questi modelli, utilizzando i meccanismi del pooling e dell'attenzione, miriamo a catturare direttamente le potenziali interazioni tra più PASS, senza essere disturbati dall'ordine e dalla distanza delle parole. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che i modelli proposti migliorano l'accuratezza della previsione specificamente per i casi in cui il predicato e l'argomento sono in una relazione di dipendenza indiretta e raggiungono un nuovo stato dell'arte nel F_1 complessivo su un corpus standard di benchmark.", 'lt': 'Pagrindinis uždavinys analizuoti PAS japonų kalba – užfiksuoti sąveiką tarp įvairių argument ų struktūrų. Šiame dokumente siūlome naujus Japonijos PAS analizės modelius, kurie integruoja argumentų etiketės prognozavimo informaciją į kelis PAS, išplečiant standartinio gilaus dvikryptinio pasikartojančio nervinio tinklo (dvikryptinio RNN) modelio įvedimą ir paskutinius sluoksnius. Šiuose modeliuose, naudojant sutelkimo ir dėmesio mechanizmus, siekiame tiesiogiai surinkti galimą įvairių PAS sąveiką, nesutrikdami žodžio tvarkos ir atstumo. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomi modeliai pagerina prognozės tikslumą konkrečiai tais atvejais, kai predikacija ir argumentai yra netiesioginio priklausomybės santykio ir pasiekia naują pažangą bendrame F_1 standartiniu lyginamuoju korpusu.', 'kk': 'Бірнеше предикциялық аргумент құрылымының (PAS) арасындағы әрқашамдылығын түсіру - жапондық PAS талдау тапсырмасында маңызды мәселе. Бұл қағазда жаңа жапон PAS анализ үлгілерін ұсынып, бірнеше PAS параметрлеріне аргументтердің алдын- алатын мәліметін бірнеше параметрлерге енгізу мен соңғы қабаттарды стандартты қайталанатын қайталанатын невралдық желінің (биRN Бұл үлгілерде, бірнеше PAS арасындағы мүмкіндік қатынастарды, сөздердің реті мен қашықтығынан өзгертілмейтін механизмтерді қолдану керек. Біздің тәжірибеміздің ұсынылған үлгілердің таңдау дұрыстығын өзгерту керектігін көрсетеді. Біздің тәжірибеміздің алдындағы және аргументі дұрыс тәуелдік қатынасында тәуелдік қатынасында және стандартты банкмарк кор', 'ms': 'Menangkap interaksi antara struktur argumen-predikat berbilang (PAS) adalah isu penting dalam tugas menganalisis PAS dalam bahasa Jepun. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model analisis PAS Jepun baru yang mengintegrasikan maklumat ramalan label argumen dalam beberapa PAS dengan memperluas input dan lapisan terakhir bagi model rangkaian saraf berkurang berdarah dalam piawai (bi-RNN). In these models, using the mechanisms of pooling and attention, we aim to directly capture the potential interactions among multiple PASs, without being disturbed by the word order and distance.  Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa model yang diusulkan meningkatkan ketepatan ramalan secara khusus untuk kes-kes dimana predikat dan argumen berada dalam hubungan dependensi tidak langsung dan mencapai kemajuan baru dalam F_1 keseluruhan pada korpus benchmark piawai.', 'mt': 'Il-qbid ta’ interazzjonijiet fost strutturi multipli ta’ predikat-argument (PAS) huwa kwistjoni kruċjali fil-kompitu tal-analiżi tal-PAS fil-Ġappuniż. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudelli ġodda ta’ analiżi tal-PAS Ġappuniżi li jintegraw l-informazzjoni tat-tbassir tat-tikketta tal-argumenti f’diversi PAS billi jestendu l-input u l-a ħħar saffi ta’ mudell standard tan-netwerk newrali rikorrenti bidirezzjonali fond (bi-RNN). F’dawn il-mudelli, bl-użu tal-mekkaniżmi ta’ ġbir flimkien u attenzjoni, għandna l-għan li nqabdu direttament l-interazzjonijiet potenzjali fost diversi PASs, mingħajr ma ninsabu mħassba mill-ordni u d-distanza tal-kelma. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-mudelli proposti jtejbu l-preċiżjoni tat-tbassir speċifikament għall-każijiet fejn il-predikat u l-argument huma f’relazzjoni ta’ dipendenza indiretta u jiksbu avvanz ġdid fl-F_1 globali fuq korpus standard ta’ referenza.', 'ml': 'പല പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാദ്യാഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള ഇടപാടുകള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നത് ജപ്പാനീസില്\u200d പശ്ചാത്തപിക്കുന്നതിന ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ജാപ്പനീസ് പാസ്സ് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അത് പല പാസ്സിലുള്ള പ്രവചനങ്ങളുടെ ലേബ്റ്റ് പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചു ഈ മാതൃകങ്ങളില്\u200d, പൂളിങ്ങും ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന മെക്കിനസികങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d നേരെയായി പിടികൂടാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു പല പാസ്സിന്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് പ്രത്യേകിച്ചറിയുന്ന ക', 'pl': 'Uchwytywanie interakcji między strukturami wielu predykatów-argumentów (PAS) jest kluczowym zagadnieniem w zadaniu analizy PAS w języku japońskim. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowe japońskie modele analizy PAS, które integrują informacje przewidywania etykiet argumentów w wielu PAS poprzez rozszerzenie wejściowej i ostatniej warstwy standardowego dwukierunkowego modelu recurrent neuron (bi-RNN). W tych modelach, wykorzystując mechanizmy łączenia i uwagi, dążymy do bezpośredniego uchwycenia potencjalnych interakcji między wieloma PAS, bez zakłócania porządku słów i odległości. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowane modele poprawiają dokładność przewidywania specjalnie w przypadkach, gdy predykat i argument są w pośredniej relacji zależności i osiągają nowy stan techniki w ogólnym F_1 na standardowym korpusie referencyjnym.', 'no': 'Dette er eit viktig problem i oppgåva til å analysera PAS i japansk. I denne papiret foreslår vi nye japanske PAS-analyseringsmodeller som integrerer merkelappføringsinformasjonen om argument i fleire PAS ved å utvida inndata og siste lag i eit standard dyp bidireksjonal rekursjonal neuralnettverk (bi-RNN). I desse modelane må vi direkte henta potensielle interaksjonar mellom fleire PAS, utan å bli trudd av ordrekkefølgja og avstanden. Eksperimentane våre viser at foreslått modeller forbedrar forhåndsvisningsakkuratet spesielt for tilfelle der predikaten og argument er i eit indirekte avhengighetsrelasjon og oppnår eit ny tilstand til kunsten i den generelle F_1 på ein standardmarkkorpus.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх аргументын бүтэц (PAS) хоорондын харилцаа холбоотой нь Япон улсын PAS-г шинжилгээнд хамгийн чухал асуудал юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Японы PAS шинэ шинжилгээний загваруудыг санал болгож, олон PAS-д аргументын талаарх тодорхойлолтын мэдээллийг бий болгож, стандарт гүн гүнзгий давхар сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний (bi-RNN) загварын орлуулалт болон сүүлийн дав Эдгээр загваруудын хувьд, анхаарлыг цуглуулах, анхаарлын механизмуудыг ашиглаж, бид олон ПАС-ын хоорондох боломжтой харилцаа шууд барьж, үг дарааллаар, зайдаар сэтгэл хөдлөхгүй. Бидний туршилтууд санал өгсөн загварын тодорхой тодорхой тодорхойлолтыг сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Яг тодорхой тодорхой тодорхойлолтой, аргумент нь буруу хамааралтай холбоотой болон стандарт банкмарк корпус дээрх урлагийн шинэ байдал гаргаж байна.', 'ro': 'Capturarea interacțiunilor dintre structuri multiple de argumente predicate (PAS) este o problemă crucială în sarcina analizării PAS în japoneză. În această lucrare, propunem noi modele japoneze de analiză PAS care integrează informațiile de predicție a etichetelor argumentelor în mai multe PAS prin extinderea intrării și ultimelor straturi ale unui model standard de rețea neurală recurentă bidirecțională (bi-RNN). În aceste modele, folosind mecanismele de punere în comun și atenție, ne propunem să captăm direct potențialele interacțiuni dintre mai multe PAS, fără a fi deranjate de ordinea cuvântului și distanța. Experimentele noastre arată că modelele propuse îmbunătățesc precizia predicției în special pentru cazurile în care predicatul și argumentul se află într-o relație indirectă de dependență și ating o nouă stare de tehnologie în ansamblul F_1 pe un corpus standard de referință.', 'sr': 'Uhvatanje interakcija među višestrukim predikatnim argumentskim strukturama (PAS) je ključno pitanje za analizu PAS na japanskom jeziku. U ovom papiru predlažemo nove japanske analize PAS-a koji integriraju informacije o predviđanju etiketa o argumentima u višem PAS-u proširenjem ulaznog i poslednjih slojeva standardnih dubokih dvodirektivnih recirenih neuralnih mreža (bi-RNN). U ovim modelima, koristeći mehanizme okupljanja i pažnje, ciljamo direktno uhvatiti potencijalne interakcije među višestrukim PAS-ima, a da se ne uznemiravamo riječima naređenjem i udaljenjem. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su predloženi modeli poboljšali preciznost predviđanja posebno za slučajeve u kojima su predikat i argument u indirektnom odnosu na zavisnost i ostvarili novo stanje umjetnosti u ukupnom F_1 na standardnom korpusu.', 'si': 'ජාපානියේ PAS විශ්ලේෂණය කරන වැඩේ විශ්ලේෂණයේ විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් ජාපාන් PAS විශ්ලේෂණ මොඩේල්ස් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒකෙන් ලෙබෙල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ අන්තිම ස්ථානයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජන මේ මෝඩේල් වලින්, ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ අවධානයක් භාවිත කරන්න, අපි ඉලක්ක කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය PAS වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ අඩුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂය කරනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ', 'so': 'Ku qabsashada xiriiro ka mid ah dhismaha kala duduwan oo ku saabsan jaamacadaha (PASs) waa arin muhiim ah oo ku saabsan baaritaanka PAS ee japaniya. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa modelalka cusub ee jaabiyada PAS oo Japanese ah, kaas oo ku qoraya macluumaadka sii-sheegidda wadajirka ee labka ah ee PASs kala duduwan, si loo sii fidiyo sawirada gudaha iyo ugu dambeeya sawirada shabakadda neurada ee caadiga ah (bi-RNN). Tusaaladan, sida aan isticmaalno meymisyada baabuurta iyo daryeelka, waxaynu ku talo galaynaa si toos ah u qabsashada iskala xiriirta suurtagalka ah oo kala duduwan PAS-ka dhexdooda, iyadoon la dhibaateyn nidaamka iyo meel ka fog. Imtixaanadayada waxay muuqataa in qaababka la soo jeeday ay ay kordhisaan qaababka la soo sheegay si gaar ah xaaladaha ay ku jiraan xiriirka ku xiriira si toos ah oo ay u gaadhaan xaalad cusub oo farshaxanka ku yaala dhamaanka F_1, kaas oo ku qoran kooxda bannaanka.', 'sv': 'Att fånga interaktioner mellan flera predikat-argumentstrukturer (PASS) är en avgörande fråga i uppgiften att analysera PAS på japanska. I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi nya japanska PAS-analysmodeller som integrerar etikettprediktionsinformation för argument i flera PAS genom att utöka ingången och de sista lagren av en standard djup tvåriktad återkommande neuralt nätverk (bi-RNN) modell. I dessa modeller, med hjälp av mekanismerna för pooling och uppmärksamhet, strävar vi efter att direkt fånga potentiella interaktioner mellan flera PASS, utan att störas av ordordning och avstånd. Våra experiment visar att de föreslagna modellerna förbättrar förutsägelsens noggrannhet specifikt för fall där predikatet och argumentet befinner sig i ett indirekt beroendeförhållande och uppnår ett nytt state of the art i den övergripande F_1 på en standardreferenskorpus.', 'ta': 'பலவிதமான முன்னிருப்பு வார்ப்பு அமைப்புகளுக்கிடையே உள்ள இடைவெளிப்பாடுகளை பிடிப்பது ஜப்பானியில் PAS ஆய்வு செய்யும இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் புதிய ஜப்பானிய PAS ஆய்வு மாதிரிகளை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பல பாஸ்களில் உள்ளீட்டை மற்றும் கடைசி அடுக்கை நிலையான ஆழமான திரும்ப நிலையா In these models, using the mechanisms of pooling and attention, we aim to directly capture the potential interactions among multiple PASs, without being disturbed by the word order and distance.  எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகள் முன்னோக்கத்தை சரியாக மேம்படுத்துகிறது குறிப்பாக குறிப்பிட்ட காலத்தில் குறிப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனை மற்றும் வாதம் ஒரு சார', 'ur': 'پاسس کے مطابق بہت سی پیشڈیکٹ آرژیم ساختاروں کے درمیان تعاملات کی تعاملات کاپیٹ کرنا جاپانی میں پاسس کا تحلیل کرنے کا ایک ضروری مسئلہ ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نئی جاپانی پاس تحلیل موڈل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو بہت سی پاس میں لابل پیشنهاد کی معلومات کو جمع کرتا ہے، ایک استاندارڈ عمیق دوئرٹ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک (دو-RNN) موڈل کے اگلے اور آخری لائز کو پھیلاتے ہیں۔ یہ موڈل میں، پولینگ اور توجه کے مکانیزوں کے استعمال سے، ہم مستقیماً مطالبہ پیس کے درمیان پکارنے کا ارادہ رکھتے ہیں، کلمات کے دستور اور فاصلہ سے بغیر اڑانے کے. ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی مدلکوں نے پیشنهاد کی دقیقیت کو اچھی طرح دکھاتی ہے، جہاں پیشنهاد اور ارادہ ایک غیر مستقل اعتبار میں ہیں اور ایک ایسی نئی حالت پہنچ سکتی ہے جو ایک استاندارڈ بنچم مارک کورپوس میں ہے.', 'uz': "Japoniya tilidagi PAS analyzeri vazifasida bir nechta qoʻshimcha argumentlar (PAS) tarkibini olish muhim muammolari. Bu hujjatda, biz yangi japoncha PAS analyzeri modellarini bir nechta PASdagi narsalar haqida birlashtirish mumkin. Andoza qanday davom etilgan neyron tarmoqda (bi-RNN) modelini oshirish va keyingi qanday qatlamni ajratish mumkin. Bu modelларда, suhbat va taqdimlik mechanislarini ishlatish uchun biz bir necha PASlar orasidagi muhit interfeyslarni aniqlashga harakat qilamiz. Bizning imtiyozlarimizni ko'rsatadi, taqdimot modellari taqdimotini aniqlash mumkin, xususiyatli cheksiz ishlatuvchi va argumentlar direktoriy ishlatadigan holatda va butun F_1'ning umumiy kompyuterda yangi holatni amalga oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Bắt giữ tương tác giữa nhiều cơ cấu tranh luận tình cảm khó khăn (PAS) là một vấn đề quan trọng trong việc phân tích PA bằng tiếng Nhật. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất các mô hình phân tích IP mới của PAS, giúp thông tin dự đoán của nhãn hiệu về các đối số trong nhiều quá trình chuyền thí nghiệm. bằng cách mở rộng các lớp nhập và cuối của một mô hình mạng thần kinh chạy bộ hai-RNN tiêu chuẩn. Trong những mô hình này, sử dụng các cơ chế của việc tập hợp và chú ý, chúng tôi hướng tới việc nắm bắt trực tiếp các tương tác tiềm năng trong nhiều phòng tránh thai nghén, mà không bị xáo trộn bởi từ thứ tự và khoảng cách. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy các mẫu đề xuất nâng cao độ chính xác dự đoán, đặc biệt cho những trường hợp tình trạng khó khăn và tranh luận nằm trong mối quan hệ phụ thuộc trực tiếp và đạt được một trạng thái mới trong dạng F 1 trên tập đoàn tiêu chuẩn.', 'bg': 'Заснемането на взаимодействията между множество предикатно-аргументни структури (ПСС) е решаващ въпрос в задачата за анализ на ПСС на японски език. В настоящата статия предлагаме нови японски модели за анализ на ПАС, които интегрират информацията за прогнозиране на етикети на аргументи в множество ПАС чрез разширяване на входните и последните слоеве на стандартен модел на дълбока двупосочна рецидивираща невронна мрежа (би-RNN). В тези модели, използвайки механизмите на обединяване и внимание, ние се стремим директно да уловим потенциалните взаимодействия между множество ПСС, без да бъдем смущавани от реда на думите и разстоянието. Нашите експерименти показват, че предложените модели подобряват точността на прогнозирането специално за случаите, когато предикатът и аргументът са в непряка зависимост връзка и постигат ново състояние на изкуството в общия стандартен референтен корпус.', 'hr': 'Uhvaćanje interakcija među višestrukim predikatnim strukturama argument a (PAS) je ključno pitanje za analiziranje PAS na japanskom jeziku. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi japanski modeli analize PAS-a koji integriraju informacije o predviđanju etikete o argumentima u višestrukim PAS-ima proširenjem ulaznog i posljednjih slojeva standardnih dubokih dvoričnih recirenih neuralnih mreža (bi-RNN). U ovim modelima, koristeći mehanizam okupljanja i pažnje, ciljamo direktno uhvatiti potencijalne interakcije među višestrukim PAS-ima, a da se ne ometaju riječima naređenjem i udaljenjem. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi modeli poboljšavaju preciznost predviđanja posebno za slučajeve u kojima su predikat i argument u indirektnom odnosu na zavisnost i postignu novo stanje umjetnosti u ukupnom F_1 na standardnom korpusu.', 'nl': "Het vastleggen van interacties tussen meerdere predicaat-argument structuren (PAS) is een cruciaal probleem bij het analyseren van PAS in het Japans. In dit artikel stellen we nieuwe Japanse PAS-analysemodellen voor die de labelvoorspellingsinformatie van argumenten integreren in meerdere PAS's door de invoer en laatste lagen van een standaard diep bidirectioneel recidivierend neuraal netwerk (bi-RNN) model uit te breiden. In deze modellen, met behulp van de mechanismen van pooling en aandacht, streven we ernaar om de potentiële interacties tussen meerdere PAS's direct vast te leggen, zonder gestoord te worden door de woordvolgorde en afstand. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde modellen de voorspellingsnauwkeurigheid verbeteren specifiek voor gevallen waarin het predicaat en argument in een indirecte afhankelijkheidsrelatie zitten en een nieuwe stand van de techniek bereiken in het algehele F_1 op een standaard benchmark corpus.", 'da': 'Indfangelse af interaktioner mellem flere prædikat-argumentstrukturer (PASS) er et afgørende problem i opgaven med at analysere PAS på japansk. I denne artikel foreslår vi nye japanske PAS analysemodeller, der integrerer etikette forudsigelsesinformation af argumenter i flere PAS ved at udvide input og sidste lag af en standard dyb bidirectional recurent neural netværk (bi-RNN) model. I disse modeller, ved hjælp af mekanismerne til pooling og opmærksomhed, tilstræber vi direkte at fange de potentielle interaktioner mellem flere PASS, uden at blive forstyrret af ordrækkefølge og afstand. Vores eksperimenter viser, at de foreslåede modeller forbedrer forudsigelsesnøjagtigheden specifikt for tilfælde, hvor prædikatet og argumentet er i en indirekte afhængighedsrelation og opnår en ny state of te art i den samlede F_1 på en standard benchmark corpus.', 'de': 'Die Erfassung von Interaktionen zwischen multiplen Prädikat-Argument-Strukturen (PAS) ist ein entscheidendes Thema bei der Analyse von PAS auf Japanisch. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir neue japanische PAS-Analysemodelle vor, die die Etikettenprädiktionsinformationen von Argumenten in mehrere PAS integrieren, indem sie die Eingangs- und letzten Schichten eines Standard-Deep Bidirektional Recidiviering Neuronal Network (bi-RNN)-Modells erweitern. In diesen Modellen versuchen wir, mithilfe der Mechanismen des Poolings und der Aufmerksamkeit die potenziellen Interaktionen zwischen mehreren PAS direkt zu erfassen, ohne durch die Wortfolge und Distanz gestört zu werden. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagenen Modelle die Vorhersagegenauigkeit speziell für Fälle verbessern, in denen Prädikat und Argument in einer indirekten Abhängigkeitsbeziehung stehen und einen neuen Stand der Technik im gesamten F_1 auf einem Standard-Benchmark-Korpus erreichen.', 'fa': 'تعاملات تعاملات بین ساختارهای مختلف حکومت (PAS) یک مسئله مهم در کار تحلیل PAS در ژاپنی است. در این کاغذ، ما مدل تحلیل PAS جدید ژاپنی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که اطلاعات پیش\u200cبینی برچسب\u200cهای ارتباطات در PAS چندین را با افزایش ورودی و آخرین لایه\u200cها از یک شبکه عصبی عمیق دوباره\u200cای (دو RNN) استاندارد می\u200cکند. در این مدل، با استفاده از مکانیسم جمع کردن و توجه، ما هدف داریم مستقیماً ارتباط پتانسیل را در بین PAS های متعدد بگیریم، بدون توسط سفارش و فاصله کلمات اذیت شود. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که مدلهای پیشنهاد دقیق پیش بینی را به طور خاص برای موارد که پیش بینی و ارتباط مخصوص در ارتباط بستگی ناپذیر هستند و به یک وضعیت جدید هنر در کل F_1 در یک کورپوس استاندارد رسید.', 'id': 'Menangkap interaksi antara struktur berbagai predikat-argumen (PAS) adalah masalah penting dalam tugas analisis PAS dalam bahasa Jepang. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model analisis PAS Jepang baru yang mengintegrasikan informasi prediksi label dari argumen dalam banyak PAS dengan memperluas input dan lapisan terakhir dari model jaringan saraf rekuren bidireksi dalam standar (bi-RNN). Dalam model ini, menggunakan mekanisme pengumpulan dan perhatian, kami bertujuan untuk secara langsung menangkap interaksi potensial antara banyak PAS, tanpa diganggu oleh perintah kata dan jarak. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan meningkatkan akurasi predikasi secara spesifik untuk kasus dimana predikat dan argumen berada dalam hubungan ketergantungan indirekt dan mencapai state of the art baru dalam F_1 secara umum pada corpus benchmark standar.', 'ko': '다술어 논원구조(PASs) 간의 상호작용을 포착하는 것은 일본어에서 PAS를 분석하는 관건적인 문제이다.마지막으로 본고는 귀속신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 새로운 다차원 입력 매개 변수 예측 모델을 제시했다.이러한 모델에서 집중과 주의 메커니즘을 이용하여 우리의 목표는 다중 채널 간의 잠재적인 상호작용을 직접 포획하고 어순과 거리의 방해를 받지 않는 것이다.우리의 실험에 의하면 제시된 모델은 특히 술어와 파라미터가 간접 의존 관계에 있는 상황에서 예측 정밀도를 높였고 표준 기준 어료 라이브러리에서 전체 F 1의 새로운 수준을 실현하였다.', 'sw': 'Kuchukua mahusiano kati ya miundombinu mbalimbali ya hoja (PAS) ni jambo muhimu katika kazi ya uchambuzi wa PAS nchini Japani. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mifano mpya ya uchambuzi wa PAS ya Japan ambayo inajumuisha taarifa za utabiri wa mazungumzo mengi ya PAS kwa kuongeza vipande vya mwisho vya mtandao wa neura unaoendelea kwa kiwango cha kawaida (bi-RNN). Katika mifano hii, kwa kutumia mfumo wa kutangaza na kusikiliza, tunakusudia kuingilia moja kwa moja mahusiano ya uwezekano kati ya PAS kadhaa, bila kujaribu kuchanganyikiwa na amri na umbali. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mifano ya mapendekezo yanaboresha ukweli wa utabiri hasa kwa kesi ambapo utabiri na hoja hizo zimo katika uhusiano wa moja kwa moja na kutegemea hali mpya ya sanaa katika jumla ya F_1 kwenye makampuni ya msingi wa bendera.', 'tr': "Ýaponiýada PAS analyzasynda bir näçe öň-öňki arüm strukturlarynyň arasynda etkileşimleri taýýarlamak üçin bir mesele däldir. Bu kagyzda, biz japonça PAS analyzasy nusgalaryny teklip edip etiketleriň önlemek maglumatyny birnäçe PAS'a girdi we soňky gatlaklary standart derin döwürekli terjime etmek üçin nusgala nusgasyny (bi-RNN) nusgasyna üýtgedýäris Bu nusgalarda, birleşme we üns almak mekanizmalaryny ulanýarys, birnäçe PAS aralygynda potensial etkileşimleri ýüz tutmak niýetide söz düzümleri we uzaklaşdyrmak üçin. Biziň deneylerimiz teklip eden nusgalaryň öngörüm dogrylygyny has bellenen ýagdaýlaryň, nusgalaryň düzgün bir baglanylykda bolan we standart benchmark korpusynyň Täze bir durumyny ýetip biljekdigini görkez.", 'af': "Opneem interaksies tussen veelvuldige predikaat-argument strukture (PAS) is 'n cruciaal probleem in die taak van analyseer PAS in Japanse. In hierdie papier, ons voorstel nuwe japanse PAS analisie modele wat die etiket voorskou inligting van argumente in veelvuldige PAS integreer deur die invoer en laaste lagte van 'n standaard diep bidireksjonale rekursiewende neuralnetwerk (bi- RNN) model te uitbrei. In hierdie modele, gebruik ons die mekanisme van pooling en aandag, doen ons direk die potensiele interaksies onder veelvuldige PAS te vang, sonder om deur die woord volgorde en afstand te ontstel. Ons eksperimente wys dat die voorgestelde modele die voorskou presies spesifieke verbeter vir gevalle waar die predikaat en argument in 'n indirekte afhanklikheid verhouding is en 'n nuwe staat van die kuns in die algemene F_1 op 'n standaard benchmark corpus bereik word.", 'am': 'በጃፓንኛ ውስጥ PAS በማስተዋል ስርዓት ላይ የተጠቃሚ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም አዲስ የጃፓን PAS analyzer ሞዴላዎችን እና በብዙ PASs የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም እና የጥልቅ ጥልቅ ጥልቅ ጥልቅ የቆዳ መረብ (bi-RNN) ሞዴል በመጠቀም እና የመጨረሻውን ደረጃዎች በመጠቀም እና አዲስ የጃፓን አካባቢ ምሳሌዎችን እናሳስባታለን፡፡ በእነዚህ ምሳሌዎች፣ በመጠቀም እና ማስታወቂያውን በመጠቀም፣ በንግግር ትርጓሜ እና ሩቅ ሳይሆን በብዙ PAS መካከል የቻለኝነት ግንኙነቶችን ለመያዝ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የተዘጋጁ ሞዴላዎች የውይይት ውይይት እንዲያበጃሉ፣ በተለየ ግንኙነት እና ክርክር በተቃውሞ ታዋቂ ግንኙነት እና በሙሉ F_1 ላይ አዲስ የዐርድ ግንኙነት እንዲያገኙ ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Kapja e ndërveprimeve midis strukturave të shumta predikat-argument (PAS) është një çështje vendimtare në detyrën e analizimit të PAS në japonez. Në këtë letër, propozojmë modele të reja japoneze të analizës PAS që integrojnë informacionin e parashikimit të etiketave të argumenteve në shumë PAS duke zgjeruar hyrjen dhe shtresat e fundit të një modeli standard të rrjetit nervor të thellë dy-drejtues (bi-RNN). In these models, using the mechanisms of pooling and attention, we aim to directly capture the potential interactions among multiple PASs, without being disturbed by the word order and distance.  Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se modelet e propozuara përmirësojnë saktësinë e parashikimit veçan ërisht për rastet ku predikata dhe argumenti janë në një lidhje të pavarur varësie dhe arrijnë një gjendje të re të teknologjisë në F_1 të përgjithshme në një korpus standart.', 'hy': "Պատկերացնելը բազմաթիվ նախապայման-բանավեճի կառուցվածքների միջև փոխազդեցություններ (ՊԱՍ) կարևոր խնդիր է ճապոներեն լեզվով պԱՍ վերլուծության խնդրում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր ճապոնական ՀԱՍ վերլուծության մոդելներ, որոնք ինտեգրում են բազմաթիվ ՀԱՍ-ներում արգելքների նախատեսման տեղեկատվությունը' ընդլայնելով ստանդարտ երկու ուղղությամբ կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի (երկու-ՌՆ) մոդելի ներմուծ In these models, using the mechanisms of pooling and attention, we aim to directly capture the potential interactions among multiple PASs, without being disturbed by the word order and distance.  Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած մոդելները բարելավում են կանխատեսման ճշգրիտությունը, հատկապես այն դեպքերում, երբ կանխատեսումը և բանավեճը անուղղակի կախվածության հարաբերության մեջ են և հասնում են նոր տեխնոլոգիայի վերաբերյալ F_1-ի ընդհանուր", 'bn': 'জাপানীয় প্যাস বিশ্লেষণের কাজে বেশ কয়েকটি প্রাকৃতিক যুক্তিক কাঠামোর মধ্যে কার্যক্রম গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিষয়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নতুন জাপানী প্যাপেস বিশ্লেষণ মডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা বিভিন্ন প্যাসের মাধ্যমে বিভিন্ন প্যাসের মধ্যে লেবেলের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী তথ্য সম্পূর্ণ করে যুক্ত এই মডেলগুলোতে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি প্যাসের মধ্যে সম্ভাব্য প্রতিক্রিয়ার মাধ্যমে সরাসরি গ্রেফতার করি, শব্দ এবং দূরত্ব দ্বারা বিভ্রান্ত হয়নি। আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেলগুলো ভবিষ্যতের সঠিকভাবে উন্নতি প্রদান করে বিশেষ করে যেখানে প্রাপ্ত নির্ভরশীল এবং যুক্তি নির্ভর করা ক্ষেত্র', 'ca': "Captar interaccions entre múltiples estructures predicates-argument (PAS) és un tema crucial en la tasca d'analitzar PAS en japonès. En aquest paper, proposem nous models d'anàlisi japonès PAS que integren la informació de predicció d'etiquetes d'arguments en múltiples PAS ampliant l'entrada i les últimes capes d'un model normal de xarxa neural recurrent bidireccional (bi-RNN). En aquests models, utilitzant els mecanismes de agrupament i atenció, busquem capturar directament les interaccions potencials entre múltiples PAS, sense ser alterats per l'ordre i la distància de la paraula. Our experiments show that the proposed models improve the prediction accuracy specifically for cases where the predicate and argument are in an indirect dependency relation and achieve a new state of the art in the overall F_1 on a standard benchmark corpus.", 'az': 'Yaponlarda PAS analizi etmək məqsədilə çoxlu predikat arqümat qurularının (PAS) arasında müxtəlif bir məsələdir. Bu kağızda, yeni Japon PAS analizi modellərini təklif edirik ki, çoxlu PAS-lərdə argumentlərin etiketli tədbir məlumatlarını çoxlu tədbir məlumatlarının girdi və son səviyyələrini standart diqqətli nürol a ğının (bi-RNN) modelini genişləyir. Bu modellərdə, birləşdirmək və məlumatların mehanizmilərini istifadə etmək istəyirik ki, çoxlu PAS arasındakı potensial müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif Bizim təcrübələrimiz göstərir ki, təcrübə etdiyimiz modellərin təcrübə edilməsini özlərinə müəyyən etdiyimiz təcrübələrin və argumentlərin indirect bağımlılıq əlaqəsində olduğu və standart benchmark korpusu üstündə yeni bir şəkildə F_1 sanatının yeni durumunu başa düşürür.', 'cs': 'Zachycení interakcí mezi více predikátovými argumenty strukturami (PAS) je klíčovou otázkou při analýze PAS v japonštině. V tomto článku navrhujeme nové japonské PAS analýzy modelů, které integrují informace o predikci štítků argumentů v několika PAS rozšířením vstupní a poslední vrstvy standardního modelu hluboké obousměrné rekurentní neuronové sítě (bi-RNN). V těchto modelech s využitím mechanismů sdružování a pozornosti se snažíme přímo zachytit potenciální interakce mezi více PAS, aniž bychom byli narušeni slovním řádem a vzdáleností. Naše experimenty ukazují, že navržené modely zlepšují přesnost predikce speciálně pro případy, kdy predikát a argument jsou v nepřímé závislosti vztahu a dosahují nového stavu techniky v celkovém F_1 na standardním benchmarkovém korpusu.', 'et': 'Mitme predikaadi-argumendi struktuuri (PAS) vaheliste interaktsioonide jäädvustamine on jaapani keeles PAS analüüsimise ülesandeks otsustava tähtsusega küsimus. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uued Jaapani PAS analüüsi mudelid, mis integreerivad argumentide sildi ennustamise informatsiooni mitmes PASs-is, laiendades standardse sügava kahesuunalise korduva närvivõrgu (bi-RNN) mudeli sisend- ja viimaseid kihte. Nendes mudelites, kasutades ühendamise ja tähelepanu mehhanisme, püüame otseselt jäädvustada võimalikke interaktsioone mitme PASi vahel, häirimata sõnade järjekorda ja kaugust. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et kavandatud mudelid parandavad prognoosi täpsust spetsiaalselt juhtudel, kus predikaat ja argument on kaudses sõltuvussuhtees ning saavutavad uue tehnika taseme üldises F_1 standardkorpuses.', 'fi': 'Monien predikaatti-argumenttirakenteiden (PAS) vuorovaikutusten kuvaaminen on ratkaiseva asia japanin kielen PAS:n analysoinnissa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uusia japanilaisia PAS-analyysimalleja, jotka integroivat argumenttien etiketin ennustustiedot useissa PAS-järjestelmissä laajentamalla standardin syvän kaksisuuntaisen toistuvan hermoverkon (bi-RNN) tulo- ja viimeistä kerrosta. Näissä malleissa pyrimme yhdistämään ja kiinnittämään huomion mekanismeja hyödyntäen suoraan kuvaamaan potentiaalisia vuorovaikutuksia useiden PAS:ien välillä ilman, että sanajärjestys ja etäisyys häiritsevät meitä. Kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotetut mallit parantavat ennustetarkkuutta erityisesti niissä tapauksissa, joissa predikaatti ja argumentti ovat epäsuorassa riippuvuussuhteessa, ja saavuttavat uuden tekniikan tason kokonaisluvussa F_1 vakiovertailukorpusella.', 'bs': 'Uhvatanje interakcija među višestrukim predikatnim strukturama argument a (PAS) je ključno pitanje za analiziranje PAS na japanskom jeziku. U ovom papiru predlažemo nove japanske analize PAS-a koji integriraju informacije o predviđanju etikete o argumentima u višestrukim PAS-ima proširenjem ulaznog i posljednjih slojeva standardnog dubokog dvodirektivnog recirenog neuralne mreže (bi-RNN). U ovim modelima, koristeći mehanizme okupljanja i pažnje, ciljamo direktno uhvatiti potencijalne interakcije među višestrukim PAS-ima, a da se ne ometaju riječima naređenjem i udaljenjem. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su predloženi modeli poboljšali preciznost predviđanja posebno za slučajeve u kojima su predikat i argument u indirektnom odnosu na zavisnost i ostvarili novo stanje umjetnosti u ukupnom F_1 na standardnom korpusu.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pewiir iki, kita mulungi model pada PAS antali japong sing dibutuhke Nang model iki, nggunakake mekanistik kanggo nggunakake lan nggunakake Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntukno akeh model sing beraksi ngono nggawe kesempatan kanggo awak dhéwé Where the', 'ha': "Ina kãma interaction among multi-birnin rubutu-argument (PASs) shi ne da muhimu a cikin aikin analyza PAS cikin japane. Daga wannan takardar, Munã buɗe misãlai na buƙata na PAS, wanda ke haɗa ma'abũcin Annabi na label cikin multi-PASs da za'a ƙunsa da kuma ƙarshen zane cikin wata motsi na ƙarƙashin da aka daidaita na tsarin da aka dace (bi-RNN). Yana cikin waɗannan misãlai, da amfani da masu motsi na samura da aikin aiki, za'a yi niyyar mu kãma masu yiwuwa a tsakãnin mutane mãsu yawa na PASki, kuma bã zã a yi tsuru da kalma ba da tsakanin faɗi da nĩsa. Kayan jarrabõyinmu na nũna cewa misãlai da aka goyya suna improve gaurawa na bashirin da ke ƙayyade haske da haske a cikin mazaɓan da muhimmada mai inganci da kuma ya sami wani halin sanar a jumla na F_1 a kan makarantin bangon bangon gaskiyar.", 'sk': 'Zajemanje interakcij med več strukturami predikatov-argumentov (PAS) je ključno vprašanje pri analizi PAS v japonščini. V prispevku predlagamo nove japonske modele analize PAS, ki združujejo informacije o napovedovanju oznak argumentov v več PAS z razširitvijo vhodnih in zadnjih plasti standardnega modela globokega dvosmernega ponovnega živčnega omrežja (bi-RNN). Pri teh modelih z uporabo mehanizmov združevanja in pozornosti želimo neposredno zajeti potencialne interakcije med več PAS, ne da bi nas motila vrstni red besed in razdalja. Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da predlagani modeli izboljšujejo natančnost napovedi posebej za primere, ko sta predikat in argument v posredni odvisnosti in dosegajo novo stanje tehnike v celotnem F_1 na standardnem referenčnem korpusu.', 'he': 'תפיסת אינטראקציות בין מבנים מרובים של טיעונים-טיעונים (PAS) היא בעיה קריטית במשימה של ניתוח PAS ביפנית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודלים ניתוח PAS יפנים חדשים שמשלפים את מידע צפוי התווים של ויכוחים במספר PAS על ידי הרחיבה של הכניסה והשכבות האחרונות של דוגמא רשת עצבית עמוקה, שתיים כיוונים, מתחזרת (bi-RNN). בדוגמנים אלה, בשימוש במנגנונים של בריכת תשומת לב, אנחנו מכוונים לתפוס ישירות את האינטראקציות הפוטנציאליות בין מספר PAS, מבלי להפריע על ידי סדר המילים ומרחק. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהדוגמנים המוצעים משתפרים את מדויקת התחזויות במיוחד למקרים שבו הקדיקוט והטיעון נמצאים בקשר תלויות אינדריות ולהשיג מצב חדש של האמנות ב-F_1 כללי על קורפוס רנטרטי סטנדרטי.', 'bo': 'Capturing interactions among multiple predicate-argument structures (PASs) is a crucial issue in the task of analyzing PAS in Japanese. In this paper, we propose new Japanese PAS analysis models that integrate the label prediction information of arguments in multiple PASs by extending the input and last layers of a standard deep bidirectional recurrent neural network (bi-RNN) model. In these models, using the mechanisms of pooling and attention, we aim to directly capture the potential interactions among multiple PASs, without being disturbed by the word order and distance. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Sprucing up the trees   Error detection in treebanks', 'ar': 'تجميل الأشجار - اكتشاف خطأ في ضفاف الأشجار', 'fr': "Épinage des arbres — Détection d'erreurs dans les berges", 'es': 'Arreglar los árboles — Detección de errores en los bancos de árboles', 'pt': 'Enfeitando as árvores – Detecção de erros em bancos de árvores', 'ja': 'ツリーの枝張り–ツリーバンクでのエラー検出', 'zh': '剪木 – 树库中误检', 'hi': 'पेड़ ऊपर sprucing - treebanks में त्रुटि का पता लगाने', 'ru': 'Sprucing up the trees – Обнаружение ошибок в берегах деревьев', 'ga': 'Na crainn a fháscadh - Brath earráidí i gcrainn crann', 'el': 'Σπρέξιμο επάνω στα δέντρα για ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων στις όχθες δέντρων', 'hu': 'A fák felcserélése - Hibaészlelés a fákban', 'ka': 'ხელების გარეშე - შეცდომა განახლება', 'it': 'Sprucing up the trees - Rilevazione di errori in treebanks', 'kk': 'Ағаштарды тарату - Ағаш жолағында қате табылды', 'lt': 'Medžių išplitimas – klaidų nustatymas medžių dėžutėse', 'mk': 'Раширење на дрвјата - Детектирање грешки во дрвјата', 'ms': 'Menyebarkan pokok - Pengesanan ralat dalam peti pokok', 'ml': 'മരങ്ങള്\u200d പൊട്ടിപ്പിടിക്കുന്നു- ട്രീബാങ്കുകളില്\u200d പിശക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത്', 'mt': 'It-tifrix tas-siġar - Sejbien ta’ żbalji fil-banek tas-siġar', 'no': 'Sprøyser opp tråda – Feil oppdaging i trelinjer', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie błędów w brzegach drzew', 'sr': 'Raspršivanje drveæa - otkrivanje greška u treebancima', 'ro': 'Creșterea copacilor - Detectarea erorilor în brațe', 'so': 'Goodbax dhirta - caddeynta cadaawayaasha treebanka', 'mn': 'Моднуудыг тараах - Адлаан дээр алдаа олох', 'sv': 'Sprucera upp träden - Feldetektering i trädbackar', 'ur': 'درختوں کو پھیلاتے ہیں - ٹریب بانک میں خطا پیدا کرنا', 'si': 'ගස් විස්තර කරන්න - ට්\u200dරීබැන්ක් වල දෝෂාව හොයාගන්න', 'ta': 'மரங்களை வெடிக்கும் போது பிழை கண்டுபிடிப்பது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện lỗi trên cây trong ba cân', 'bg': 'Разпръскване на дърветата - Откриване на грешки в дървесни ленти', 'hr': 'Raspršivanje drveća - otkrivanje greške u krevetima', 'da': 'Sprucing op i træerne - Fejlregistrering i træbanker', 'nl': 'Sproeien van de bomen op Foutdetectie in boombanken', 'ko': '미화수목 - 나무 창고에서의 오류 검출', 'id': 'Menyebarkan pohon - Deteksi kesalahan dalam peti pohon', 'de': 'Sprucing up the trees of Error detection in treebanks', 'sw': 'Kupasua miti - Kugundua makosa katika viwanja vya miti', 'tr': 'Agaçlary açylýa', 'fa': 'گسترش درختان - شناسایی خطای در چوبهای درخت', 'af': 'Versprei die bome - Fout beskrywing in trebalke', 'sq': 'Shpërthimi i pemëve - Gjetja e gabimeve në vendet e pemës', 'az': 'Ağacları yayılır - Arxa çubuqlarında xəta tapılır', 'am': "ፋይል '%s'ን ለማንበብ ስህተት አለ፦ %s", 'bn': 'গাছগুলো ছড়িয়ে পড়ছে - ত্রিব্যাংকের মধ্যে ত্রুটি সনাক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Փայրերի փչացումը. սխալների հայտնաբերումը ծառերի տախտակներում', 'ca': "Explosió dels arbres - Detecció d'errors a les barres d'arbres", 'cs': 'Sprucing up the stromes of Detekce chyb v stromech', 'et': 'Puude pihustamine - vigade tuvastamine puukottides', 'fi': 'Puiden sprucing up the treebanks - Virheiden havaitseminen puupenkeissä', 'bs': 'Proširenje drveća - otkrivanje greška u treebancima', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'he': 'פיצוץ את העצים - גילוי שגיאות בבנקי עצים', 'sk': 'Škropljenje dreves - Zaznavanje napak v drevesnih ploščah', 'ha': 'QNetworkAccessFileBackend', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་ཡར་བསྐྱེད་བཞིན་པ་་་ འཇུག་རིས་ནང་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་རྙེད་སྐབས་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བ'}
{'en': 'We present a method for detecting annotation errors in manually and automatically annotated dependency parse trees, based on ensemble parsing in combination with Bayesian inference, guided by active learning. We evaluate our method in different scenarios : (i) for error detection in dependency treebanks and (ii) for improving parsing accuracy on in- and out-of-domain data.', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة لاكتشاف أخطاء التعليقات التوضيحية في أشجار تحليل التبعية المشروحة يدويًا وتلقائيًا ، بناءً على تحليل المجموعات بالاقتران مع الاستدلال البايزي ، مسترشدًا بالتعلم النشط. نقوم بتقييم طريقتنا في سيناريوهات مختلفة: (1) لاكتشاف الأخطاء في بنوك التبعية و (2) لتحسين دقة التحليل على البيانات داخل وخارج المجال.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une méthode de détection des erreurs d'annotation dans des arbres d'analyse de dépendance annotés manuellement et automatiquement, basée sur l'analyse d'ensemble en combinaison avec l'inférence bayésienne, guidée par un apprentissage actif. Nous évaluons notre méthode dans différents scénarios\xa0: (i) pour la détection d'erreurs dans les banques d'arbres de dépendance et (ii) pour améliorer la précision de l'analyse des données dans et hors domaine.", 'es': 'Presentamos un método para detectar errores de anotación en árboles de análisis de dependencias anotados manual y automáticamente, basado en el análisis de conjuntos en combinación con la inferencia bayesiana, guiado por el aprendizaje activo. Evaluamos nuestro método en diferentes escenarios: (i) para la detección de errores en bancos de árboles de dependencias y (ii) para mejorar la precisión del análisis de datos dentro y fuera del dominio.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um método para detectar erros de anotação em árvores de análise de dependência anotadas manualmente e automaticamente, baseado em análise de conjunto em combinação com inferência Bayesiana, guiada por aprendizado ativo. Avaliamos nosso método em diferentes cenários: (i) para detecção de erros em treebanks de dependência e (ii) para melhorar a precisão da análise de dados dentro e fora do domínio.', 'ja': '我々は、アクティブラーニングによって導かれるベイズ推論と組み合わせたアンサンブル構文解析に基づいて、手動および自動でアノテーションされた依存関係解析ツリーのアノテーションエラーを検出するための方法を提示する。私たちは、(i)依存性ツリーバンクのエラー検出、および(ii)ドメイン内およびドメイン外データの解析精度の向上という異なるシナリオで方法を評価します。', 'zh': '发一于学,基于融合解析与贝叶斯推理相合者手动与自注赖解析树中注谬检之法。 (i)以倚树库之谬检,及(ii)以崇域外之解析准确性。', 'hi': 'हम मैन्युअल रूप से और स्वचालित रूप से एनोटेट निर्भरता पार्स पेड़ों में एनोटेशन त्रुटियों का पता लगाने के लिए एक विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो बायेसियन अनुमान के साथ संयोजन में पहनावा पार्सिंग पर आधारित है, जो सक्रिय सीखने द्वारा निर्देशित है। हम विभिन्न परिदृश्यों में हमारी विधि का मूल्यांकन करते हैं: (i) निर्भरता ट्रीबैंक में त्रुटि का पता लगाने के लिए और (ii) इन- और आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन डेटा पर पार्सिंग सटीकता में सुधार के लिए।', 'ru': 'Предложен метод обнаружения ошибок аннотаций в вручную и автоматически аннотированных деревьях синтаксического анализа зависимостей, основанный на ансамблевом синтаксическом анализе в сочетании с байесовским выводом, управляемым активным обучением. Мы оцениваем наш метод в различных сценариях: (i) для обнаружения ошибок в древовидных банках зависимостей и (ii) для повышения точности синтаксического анализа внутридоменных и внедоменных данных.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid modh i láthair chun earráidí anótála a bhrath i gcrainn pharsála spleáchais a bhfuil anót orthu de láimh agus go huathoibríoch, bunaithe ar pharsáil ensemble i gcomhar le tátal Bayesian, arna threorú ag foghlaim ghníomhach. Déanaimid ár modh a mheas i gcásanna éagsúla: (i) chun earráidí a bhrath i gcrainn chrainn spleáchais agus (ii) chun cruinneas parsála ar shonraí laistigh agus lasmuigh den fhearann a fheabhsú.', 'hu': 'Bemutatunk egy módszert a jegyzetelési hibák felismerésére manuálisan és automatikusan megjegyzett függőség elemzési fákban, amelyek együttes elemzésen alapulnak Bayezian következtetéssel kombinálva, aktív tanulással vezérelve. Módszerünket különböző forgatókönyvekben értékeljük: (i) a függőségi fázisok hibaészlelésére és (ii) a domain belüli és kívüli adatok elemzési pontosságának javítására.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο για την ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων σχολιασμού σε χειροκίνητα και αυτόματα σχολιασμένα δέντρα ανάλυσης εξάρτησης, με βάση την ανάλυση συνόλων σε συνδυασμό με την Bayesian συμπέρασμα, καθοδηγούμενη από ενεργή μάθηση. Αξιολογούμε τη μέθοδο μας σε διαφορετικά σενάρια: (i) για την ανίχνευση σφαλμάτων σε βάσεις δέντρων εξάρτησης και (ii) για τη βελτίωση της ακρίβειας ανάλυσης δεδομένων εντός και εκτός τομέα.', 'lt': 'Mes pateikiame metodą anotacijos klaidų nustatymui rankiniuose ir automatiškai anotuotuose priklausomybės analizavimo medžiuose, pagrįstą ensemble analizavimu kartu su Bayesian išvada, vadovaujantis aktyviu mokymusi. Mūsų metodą vertiname įvairiais scenarijais: i) nustatant klaidas priklausomybės medži ų pagrinduose ir ii) gerinant duomenų, susijusių su vidaus ir ne srities duomenimis, tikslumą.', 'it': "Presentiamo un metodo per rilevare errori di annotazione negli alberi di analisi delle dipendenze annotati manualmente e automaticamente, basato sull'analisi di insieme in combinazione con inferenza bayesiana, guidato dall'apprendimento attivo. Valutiamo il nostro metodo in diversi scenari: (i) per il rilevamento degli errori nei treebank di dipendenza e (ii) per migliorare l'accuratezza dell'analisi sui dati interni e fuori dominio.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ მივიღეთ მონიტაციის შეცდომების განახსნა ხელსახულად და ავტომატურად მონიტაციული დასახსოვრებულობის პარასის ხელებში, რომელიც აკრთვის სწავლების გამოყენებული ბეიზიანური ინფრენციის ჩვენ განსხვავებული სინარიოში ჩვენი მეთოდის განსაზღვრება: i) შეცდომის განსაზღვრებისთვის განსაზღვრებისთვის და ii) განსაზღვრებისთვის მონაცემების განსაზღვრებისთვის.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan kaedah untuk mengesan ralat anotasi dalam pepohon hurai dependensi yang dicatat secara manual dan secara automatik, berdasarkan hurai ensemble dalam kombinasi dengan kesimpulan Bayesian, dipandu oleh pembelajaran aktif. Kami menilai kaedah kami dalam skenario yang berbeza: (i) untuk pengesan ralat di pangkalan pepohonan dependensi dan (ii) untuk meningkatkan persamaan penghuraian pada data masuk dan keluar-dari-domain.', 'ml': 'കൈയ്യില്\u200d തെറ്റുകള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനും സ്വയം ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസ് വൃക്ഷങ്ങളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നത്. ബെയിസ്യന വ്യത്യസ്ത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയെ വിലയിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു: (i) ത്രീബാങ്കുകളില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പിശക് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിന', 'mk': 'Презентираме метод за детектирање на грешки во анотација во рачно и автоматски анотирани дрвја за анализирање на зависноста, базирани на анализирање на ансембли во комбинација со бајезиска инференција, водена од активно учење. Го проценуваме нашиот метод во различни сценарија: (i) за детекција на грешки во дрвјата на зависноста и (ii) за подобрување на прецизноста на анализирањето на податоците во и надвор од доменот.', 'kk': 'Біз қолмен мен автоматты түрде жазбалардың қатесін анықтау әдісін таңдаймыз. Бейезия инференциясының талдауына негізделген, белсенді оқыту арқылы бағытталған тәуелдік талдау ағаштарының талдауына негіз Біз өзіміздің әдімімізді түрлі сценарияларда оқу үшін: i) тәуелдік үшін қателерді анықтау үшін және ii) доменге шығыс деректерді талдау үшін дұрыстығын жақсарту үшін.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw metodu biex jinstabu żbalji ta’ annotazzjoni f’siġar tal-analiżi tad-dipendenza annotati manwalment u awtomatikament, ibbażat fuq l-analiżi tal-ensemble flimkien mal-inferenza Bayesian a, iggwidat minn tagħlim attiv. Aħna jevalwaw il-metodu tagħna f'xenarji different i: (i) għall-identifikazzjoni ta' żbalji fil-banek tas-siġar tad-dipendenza u (ii) għat-titjib tal-eżattezza tal-analiżi tad-dejta ġewwa u barra d-dominju.", 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy metodę wykrywania błędów adnotacyjnych w ręcznie i automatycznie adnotacyjnych drzewach parsowania zależności, opartą na parsowaniu zespołów w połączeniu z wnioskiem Bayesowskim, kierowanym aktywnym uczeniem się. Oceniamy naszą metodę w różnych scenariuszach: (i) do wykrywania błędów w zależnościach drzew oraz (ii) do poprawy dokładności parsowania danych wewnątrz i poza domeną.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o metodă de detectare a erorilor de adnotare în arborii de analizare a dependenței adnotați manual și automat, bazată pe analizarea ansamblului în combinație cu inferența bayesiană, ghidată de învățare activă. Evaluăm metoda noastră în diferite scenarii: (i) pentru detectarea erorilor în treebanks dependență și (ii) pentru îmbunătățirea preciziei analizării datelor din interiorul și din afara domeniului.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ඇත්තටම සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, බේසියාන් පරීක්ෂණය සමග පරීක්ෂණ අපි වෙනස් සීනාරියෝ වලට අපේ විධානය අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා: (i) විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන විශේෂතාව හොයාගන්න සහ (i) විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන්න සඳහා', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab ay ku ogaato qalabka dhibaatada lagu cadaynayo oo ay si rasmi ah u dhibaataysan tahay geedaha baarlamaanka ku xiran, taas oo ku saleysan jardiinada firaaqada ah oo la xiriira baaritaanka Bayesian, oo lagu hago waxbarashada waxqabadka ah. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa qaababkayaga oo ku qoran aragtida kala duduwan: (i) in qaladka lagu ogaado dareenka ku xiran iyo (ii) in lagu koriyo saxda baaritaanka oo ku saabsan macluumaadka gudaha iyo kuwa aan degaanka ahayn.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en metod för att upptäcka anteckningsfel i manuellt och automatiskt kommenterade beroendetolkningsträd, baserat på ensembletolkning i kombination med bayesiansk inferens, styrd av aktivt lärande. Vi utvärderar vår metod i olika scenarier: (i) för feldetektering i beroendeträdbanker och (ii) för att förbättra analysnoggrannheten på data inom och utanför domänen.', 'ta': 'நாம் கைமுறையாக கைமுறையில் பிழைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க ஒரு முறையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் மற்றும் தானாகவே சார்ந்த சார்ந்த பார்ச் மரங்களில், முன்னிர We evaluate our method in different scenarios: (i) for error detection in dependency treebanks and (ii) for improving parsing accuracy on in- and out-of-domain data.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ مضبوطی خطاؤں کو اپنا ہاتھ سے پہچان سکتے ہیں اور اپنا اپنا اپنا اعتمادی پارس درختوں کے ذریعہ آزمائش کریں، بویسی ایفارنس کے ساتھ مضبوطی پارس کریں، جو فعال سیکھنے کے ذریعہ سی ہم مختلف سناریوں میں اپنے طریقے کا ارزش کررہے ہیں: i) اعتمادی تریب بانک میں گمراہی کا اظہار کرنے کے لئے اور ii) دقیقیقیت کا پارس کرنے کے لئے دامنی اور خارج دامنی کے بارے میں بہترین کررہے ہیں.', 'mn': 'Бид холбоотой, автоматаар анзаарсан хамааралтай модын хуваалцааны арга олж мэдэх арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Байзийн халдвартай холбоотой бөгөөд актив суралцааныг удирдаж байдаг. Бид өөр төрлийн хувилбарт өөрсдийн аргыг: i) хамааралтай зам дээр алдаа олохын тулд, ii) тодорхойлолтын тодорхойлолтыг сайжруулахын тулд.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein metode for oppdaging av oppmerkingsfeilar i manuelt og automatisk oppmerkingsfeil av tolkingar av avhengighet, basert på ensemble tolking i kombinasjon med Bayesian-infeksjon, gjennomført av aktivt læring. Vi evaluerer metoden vårt i ulike scenarioar: i) for feiloppdaging i avhengighetstreibane og ii) for å forbetra tolkinga av nøyaktighet på data i- og ut- domenet.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo metodu za otkrivanje grešaka annotacije u ruènim i automatskim annotacijskim drveæama za analizu zavisnosti, na osnovu analize ensembla u kombinaciji sa infekcijom Bejzija, vodećim aktivnim učenjem. Procjenjujemo našu metodu u različitim scenarijama: i) za otkrivanje grešaka u podacima zavisnosti i ii) za poboljšanje preciznosti analize podataka o unutrašnjim i izvan domena.', 'uz': "Biz qo'lbola qo'lbola va avtomatik qo'lbola'llangan parcha daraxtlarini aniqlash usulini topishga qarash usulni hozir qilamiz, va Bayesian infernatsiya bilan birlashtirish mumkin, va aktiv o'rganish orqali yordam beradi. Biz turli holatdagi usulni qiymatmiz: (i) treebanglarda ishlatadigan xatolik aniqlash uchun va (ii) domen maʼlumotlarini bajarishga tayyorlash uchun.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp để phát hiện lỗi ghi chú trong các cây phân tích phụ thuộc được ghi chú tự động và tự động, dựa trên kết quả phân tích kết hợp với luận ở Bayezian, nhờ học hành. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp trong các viễn cảnh khác nhau: i) phát hiện lỗi trong các chế độ phụ thuộc ba cân bằng và,', 'bg': 'Представяме метод за откриване на анотационни грешки в ръчно и автоматично анотирани дървета за анализ на зависимостта, базиран на ансамбълно анализиране в комбинация с байезианско заключение, ръководено от активно учене. Ние оценяваме метода си в различни сценарии: (i) за откриване на грешки в зависими дървесни ленти и (ii) за подобряване на точността на анализиране на вътре и извън домейна данни.', 'nl': "We presenteren een methode voor het detecteren van annotatiefouten in handmatig en automatisch geannoteerde afhankelijkheidsparsen, gebaseerd op ensembleparsen in combinatie met Bayesiaanse inferentie, geleid door actief leren. We evalueren onze methode in verschillende scenario's: (i) voor foutdetectie in afhankelijkheidsboombanken en (ii) voor het verbeteren van parsing nauwkeurigheid op in- en out-of-domain data.", 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine Methode zur Erkennung von Annotationsfehlern in manuell und automatisch annotierten Dependency Parse Bäumen, basierend auf Ensemble Parsing in Kombination mit Bayes Inferenz, geleitet durch aktives Lernen. Wir evaluieren unsere Methode in verschiedenen Szenarien: (i) zur Fehlererkennung in Abhängigkeitsbanken und (ii) zur Verbesserung der Parsing-Genauigkeit von In- und Out-of-Domain-Daten.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan metode untuk mendeteksi kesalahan anotasi di pohon analisis dependensi secara manual dan secara otomatis anotasi, berdasarkan analisis ensemble dalam kombinasi dengan inferensi Bayesia, dipandu oleh belajar aktif. Kami mengevaluasi metode kami dalam skenario yang berbeda: (i) untuk deteksi kesalahan di batang pohon tergantung dan (ii) untuk memperbaiki penghuraian akurasi pada data masuk dan keluar dari domain.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo metodu za otkrivanje grešaka annotacije u ručnim i automatskim annotiranim drvećima za analizu zavisnosti, temeljenu na analizu ensembla u kombinaciji s infekcijom Bayesian, vodećim aktivnim učenjem. Procjenjujemo našu metodu u različitim scenarijama: i) za otkrivanje greška u zabrinutosti i ii) za poboljšanje preciznosti parsiranja podataka o podacima u- i izvan domena.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en metode til at detektere annoteringsfejl i manuelt og automatisk annoterede afhængighedsparsetræer, baseret på ensemble parsing i kombination med Bayesian inference, styret af aktiv læring. Vi evaluerer vores metode i forskellige scenarier: (i) til fejldetektion i afhængighedstræbanker og (ii) til forbedring af fortolkningsnøjagtigheden på data inden for og uden for domænet.', 'fa': 'ما روش شناسایی خطاهای آگاهی را در درخت\u200cهای بستگی\u200cهای خود و به طور خودکار آگاهی داده\u200cایم، بر اساس آزمایش آزمایش در ترکیب با آلودگی\u200cهای بایزی، که توسط یادگیری فعال هدایت می\u200cشود. ما روش خود را در سناریو مختلف ارزیابی می کنیم: i) برای شناسایی خطا در تخته\u200cهای درخت بستگی و ii) برای improving parsing accuracy on in- and out- domain data.', 'tr': 'Biz janlaşma hatalaryny ellendir we otomatik boýunça baglaryny tanyşdyrmak üçin bir yöntem görkeýäris, beýeziýan hasaplanja bilen birleşmege dayanan, aktiw öwrenme üçin guruldyrylýan. Biz farklı senaryolarda yönümüzi değerlendiriyoruz: (i) bağlılık çubuklarında hata tanımlamak i çin ve (ii) içinde ve dış domuz verilerinde doğruluğu geliştirmek için.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n metode om annotasie foute in manuele en automaties aanmerkte afhanklikheid verwerking bome te ontdek, gebaseer op ensemble verwerking in kombinasie met Bayesian inferensie, wat deur aktiewe leer gedruk word. Ons evalueer ons metode in verskillende scenarios: i) vir foutperking in afhanklikheidsbanke en ii) vir verbetering van verwerking van presisiteit op in- en uit- domein data.", 'am': 'በተመሳሳይ እና በተማሪዎች ትምህርት በተመሳሳይ የባይስያ አካባቢ የፓርስ ዛፎች በተመሳሳይ እና በተመሳሳይ እና በተመሳሳይ የፓርስ ዛፎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ሁኔታ በተለየ ሁኔታ ላይ ስሕተታችንን እናስተውላለን:(i) የስህተት ግንኙነት እና (ii) የዶሜን ዳታዎችን ለማሻሻል ስህተት እና ውጪ ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka mbinu ya kutambua makosa ya uchunguzi katika miti ya bunge yenye kutegemea mikononi na kutegemea kutegemea kwa manufaa, kwa kutumia mabunge ya bunge kwa pamoja na maambukizi ya Bayesia, yanaongozwa na kujifunza kwa haraka. Tunatathmini mbinu yetu katika mitazamo mbalimbali: (i) kwa ajili ya kutambua makosa kwa ajili ya kutegemea mitaani na (ii) kwa kuboresha usahihi wa parge katika taarifa za ndani na nje ya ndani.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նշումների սխալներ հայտնաբերելու մեթոդ ձեռքով և ինքնաբերաբար նշումներ ունեցող կախվածության վերլուծության ծառերում, հիմնված էնսեմբլի վերլուծության վրա, միասին Բեյզիայի հետևանքների հետ, որոնք ուղղություն են ունենում Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մեթոդը տարբեր սցենարներում. i) սխալների հայտնաբերման համար կախվածության ծառերի տախտակներում և i) ճշգրտության վերլուծության բարելավման համար բնագավառի և արտաքին տվյալների համար:', 'ko': '우리는 주동적인 학습의 지도 아래 집적 분석과 베일스 추리를 바탕으로 수동과 자동 주석이 해석 트리에 의존하는 주석 오류를 검출하는 방법을 제시했다.우리는 서로 다른 장면에서 우리의 방법을 평가했다. (i)는 트리 라이브러리에 의존하는 오류 검출에 사용되고, (ii)는 역내와 역외 데이터의 해석 정밀도를 향상시키는 데 사용된다.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një metodë për zbulimin e gabimeve të anotacionit në pemët e analizimit të varësisë të anotuar manualisht dhe automatikisht, bazuar në analizimin e ansamblit në kombinim me inferencën Bayesian, të udhëzuar nga mësimi aktiv. Ne vlerësojmë metodën tonë në skenarë të ndryshme: (i) për zbulimin e gabimeve në bazat e drurit të varësisë dhe (ii) për përmirësimin e analizimit të saktësisë në të dhënat brenda dhe jashtë domenit.', 'az': 'Biz əlində və avtomatik təvəkküllük a ğaclarını təşkil etmək üçün bir yolu göstəririk, Bayesian infeksiyası ilə birləşdirilmiş, fəaliyyət öyrənməsi ilə birləşdirilmiş, təşkil edilmiş bağlılıq analizi ağaclarına dayanılır. Biz metodumuzu müxtəlif senaryolarda değerləşdiririk: i) bağımlılıq çubuqlarında xəta keşfini və ii) daxilində və dış domena verilənlərin dəqiqliyini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün.', 'bn': 'আমরা নিজেদের হাতে বিরক্তিকর ভুল খুঁজে বের করার একটি পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নির্ভরশীল পার্স গাছের উপরে নির্ভর করা হয়েছে, যা বায়েশিয়ার আমরা বিভিন্ন দৃশ্যের মধ্যে আমাদের পদ্ধতিকে মূল্যায়ন করি: (i) ত্রিব্যাংকের উপর নির্ভর করার জন্য ত্রুটি খুঁজে বের করার জন্য এবং (ii) ডোমেইনের তথ্য', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo metodu za otkrivanje grešaka annotacije u ručnim i automatskim annotiranim drvećima za analizu zavisnosti, temeljenu na analizu ensembla u kombinaciji s infekcijom Bayesian, vodeći aktivnim učenjem. Procjenjujemo našu metodu u različitim scenarijama: i) za otkrivanje greška u zabrinutosti i ii) za poboljšanje preciznosti analize podataka o podacima u- i izvan domena.', 'ca': "Presentam un mètode per detectar errors d'anotació en arbres d'analització de dependencies anotats manualment i automàticament, basat en l'analització d'ensembles en combinació amb la inferència bayèsia, guiada per l'aprenentatge actiu. Evaluam el nostre mètode en diferents escenaris: (i) per la detecció d'errors en bancs d'arbres de dependencia i (ii) per millorar la precisió de l'analització de les dades d'entrada i fora de domini.", 'et': 'Esitleme meetodit annotatsioonivigade tuvastamiseks käsitsi ja automaatselt annoteeritud sõltuvuse parsimise puudes, mis põhineb ansambli parsimisel kombinatsioonis bayesia järeldusega, juhindudes aktiivsest õppimisest. Hindame oma meetodit erinevates stsenaariumides: (i) vigade tuvastamiseks sõltuvuspunktides ja (ii) domeenisiseste ja väliste andmete parsimise täpsuse parandamiseks.', 'fi': 'Esitämme menetelmän, jolla voidaan havaita huomautusvirheet manuaalisesti ja automaattisesti annotoiduissa riippuvuuden jäsennyspuissa, joka perustuu ensemblen jäsentämiseen yhdessä bayesilaisen päättelyn kanssa aktiivisen oppimisen ohjaamana. Arvioimme menetelmäämme eri skenaarioissa: (i) virheiden havaitsemiseksi riippuvuuspunkeissa ja (ii) jäsentämisen tarkkuuden parantamiseksi toimialueen sisäisissä ja ulkopuolisissa tiedoissa.', 'cs': 'Představujeme metodu detekce anotačních chyb v ručně a automaticky anotovaných závislostních parsovacích stromech založenou na souborovém parsování v kombinaci s Bayesovou inferencí, řízené aktivním učením. Naši metodu hodnotíme v různých scénářích: (i) pro detekci chyb v závislostních stromových bázích a (ii) pro zlepšení přesnosti analýzy dat v doméně i mimo doménu.', 'jv': 'We present a method for detecting anntations error in Manual and automatically anntating diphendno trese-caret, supported on ensembedle PASSing in combining with bayesi an information, guided by active Learning. We assess the method in Variable scenarias: i) for error detection in packages and (i i) for refining charging exact on in- and out-of-domain data.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo metodo za odkrivanje napak pri označevanju ročno in samodejno označenih dreves razčlenjevanja odvisnosti, ki temelji na ensemblenem razčlenjevanju v kombinaciji z bayesijskim sklepanjem, ki ga vodi aktivno učenje. Našo metodo ocenjujemo v različnih scenarijih: (i) za odkrivanje napak v odvisnih drevesnih zbirkah in (ii) za izboljšanje natančnosti razčlenitve podatkov znotraj in zunaj domene.', 'ha': 'Mu ƙayyade wani hanyoyi wa ka gane ɓata masu cũtarwa da hannayen da ke cũtar da itãcen parse, a kan karatun fanemble da bayesian kafaffiyar, an shiryar da shi na karatun karatun. Tuna ƙaddara hanyoyinmu cikin filayen dabam-daban:(i) kan gano ɓata a cikin bayani na mita da (ii) ga gyara tsarin parse cikin- da kuma don-sauran data.', 'he': 'אנו מציגים שיטה לגלות שגיאות הערות בעצי מעבדת תלויות מועטפות באופן ידני ואוטומטי, מבוססת על מעבדת אנסמבל בשילוב למסקנה בייזית, מונחת על ידי לימוד פעיל. אנו מעריכים את השיטה שלנו בתרחישים שונים: (i) לזהות שגיאות בבנקי עץ תלויות ו (ii) לשפר את בדיקת בדיקת הנתונים בתוך והמחוץ לתחום.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ལག་བཟོས་ལ་སྙན་སྣོད་འཛིན་བྱུང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་ཡོད་པ ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདྲ་མིན་པར་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་བགོ་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Two Local Models for Neural Constituent Parsing', 'ar': 'نموذجان محليان لتحليل المكونات العصبية', 'es': 'Dos modelos locales para el análisis de componentes neuronales', 'pt': 'Dois modelos locais para análise de constituintes neurais', 'fr': "Deux modèles locaux pour l'analyse des constituants neuronaux", 'ja': 'ニューラルコンポーネント構文解析のための2つのローカルモデル', 'zh': '用神经成分解析二局', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका घटक पार्सिंग के लिए दो स्थानीय मॉडल', 'ru': 'Две локальные модели для нейронного компонентного анализа', 'ga': 'Dhá Shamhail Áitiúil le haghaidh Parsáil Comhpháirteanna Néaracha', 'hu': 'Két helyi modell a neurális alkotóelemek értelmezésére', 'el': 'Δύο τοπικά μοντέλα ανάλυσης νευρωνικών συστατικών', 'ka': 'ორი ლოკალური მოდელი ნეიროლური კონსტისტენტისტენტის გადაწერისთვის', 'it': "Due modelli locali per l'analisi dei costituenti neurali", 'mk': 'Два локални модели за анализирање на неурални конститунти', 'lt': 'Du vietiniai modeliai neurologiniam komponentų analizavimui', 'kk': 'Невралдық конституттарды талдау үшін екі жергілікті үлгілер', 'mt': 'Żewġ Mudelli Lokali għall-Analiżi tal-Kostitwenti Newrali', 'ms': 'Dua Model setempat untuk Menghurai Konstitusi Neural', 'ml': 'Two Local Models for Neural Constituent Parsing', 'pl': 'Dwa lokalne modele analizy składników nerwowych', 'mn': 'Хоёр нутгийн загвар', 'si': 'ස්ථානික මොඩේල් දෙකක් නිර්මාණය ස්ථානික ස්ථානය විස්තර කරන්න', 'no': 'To lokale modeller for neuralkonstituent tolking', 'ro': 'Două modele locale pentru analizarea componentelor neurale', 'sr': 'Dva lokalna modela za neuralne konstitucije', 'so': 'Laba Model oo deegaanka ah ee jardiinada guud', 'sv': 'Två lokala modeller för neural konstituerande tolkning', 'ta': 'புதிய மாதிரி பாசிங்குக்கான இரண்டு உள்ளார்ந்த மாதிரிகள்', 'ur': 'نئورل قائم پارچینگ کے لئے دو محلی موڈل', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hai mẫu cục bộ cho cấu trúc thần kinh', 'bg': 'Два локални модела за анализ на невралните съставни елементи', 'hr': 'Dva lokalna modela za pročitanje neuroloških konstitucija', 'da': 'To lokale modeller for neural konstituent parsing', 'de': 'Zwei lokale Modelle zur Analyse neuronaler Konstituenten', 'fa': 'دو مدل محلی برای پدید کردن معادل عصبی', 'id': 'Dua Model Lokal untuk Analisasi Konstitusi Neural', 'nl': 'Twee lokale modellen voor het analyseren van neurale componenten', 'tr': 'Neural konstituent Taýýarlama üçin iki ýer modi', 'sw': 'Modeli mbili za wenyeji kwa ajili ya Mbunge wa Karibu', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'sq': 'Dy modele lokale për analizimin e përbërësve neuronale', 'hy': 'Նյարդային կառուցվածքի վերլուծության երկու տեղական մոդել', 'ko': '신경 성분 분석의 두 가지 국부 모델', 'bn': 'নিউরাল কন্টিভেন্ট পার্সিং এর জন্য দুই স্থানীয় মডেল', 'az': 'Nöral Constituent Parsing üçün iki Yerli Model', 'bs': 'Dva lokalna modela za pročitanje neuroloških konstitucija', 'ca': "Dos models locals d'analització neuronal", 'et': 'Kaks kohalikku mudelit neurokomponentide parsimiseks', 'cs': 'Dva lokální modely pro analýzu neuronových složek', 'fi': 'Kaksi paikallista mallia hermokomponenttien analysointiin', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Dva lokalna modela za razčlenitev živčnih sestavnih delov', 'he': 'שני דוגמנים מקומיים עבור בדיקת חומרים עצביים', 'bo': 'Neural Constituent Parsing ཡི་སྤྱོད་པའི་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཉིས་པ'}
{'en': 'Non-local features have been exploited by syntactic parsers for capturing dependencies between sub output structures. Such features have been a key to the success of state-of-the-art statistical parsers. With the rise of deep learning, however, it has been shown that local output decisions can give highly competitive accuracies, thanks to the power of dense neural input representations that embody global syntactic information. We investigate two conceptually simple local neural models for constituent parsing, which make local decisions to constituent spans and CFG rules, respectively. Consistent with previous findings along the line, our best model gives highly competitive results, achieving the labeled bracketing F1 scores of 92.4 % on PTB and 87.3 % on CTB 5.1.', 'ar': 'تم استغلال الميزات غير المحلية من قبل المحللين النحويين لالتقاط التبعيات بين هياكل المخرجات الفرعية. كانت هذه الميزات مفتاحًا لنجاح أجهزة التحليل الإحصائي الحديثة. ومع ظهور التعلم العميق ، فقد ثبت أن قرارات المخرجات المحلية يمكن أن تعطي دقة تنافسية عالية ، وذلك بفضل قوة تمثيلات المدخلات العصبية الكثيفة التي تجسد المعلومات النحوية العالمية. نحن نحقق في نموذجين عصبيين محليين بسيطين من الناحية المفاهيمية لتحليل المكونات ، والتي تتخذ قرارات محلية بشأن الامتدادات التأسيسية وقواعد CFG ، على التوالي. تمشيا مع النتائج السابقة على طول الخط ، يعطي أفضل نموذج لدينا نتائج تنافسية للغاية ، وتحقيق درجات F1 الموصوفة من 92.4٪ في PTB و 87.3٪ في CTB 5.1.', 'pt': 'Recursos não locais foram explorados por analisadores sintáticos para capturar dependências entre estruturas de sub-saída. Tais recursos têm sido a chave para o sucesso dos analisadores estatísticos de última geração. Com a ascensão do aprendizado profundo, no entanto, foi demonstrado que as decisões de saída local podem fornecer precisões altamente competitivas, graças ao poder das representações de entrada neural densas que incorporam informações sintáticas globais. Investigamos dois modelos neurais locais conceitualmente simples para análise de constituintes, que tomam decisões locais para intervalos constituintes e regras CFG, respectivamente. Consistente com as descobertas anteriores ao longo da linha, nosso melhor modelo oferece resultados altamente competitivos, alcançando as pontuações F1 rotuladas de bracketing de 92,4% no PTB e 87,3% no CTB 5.1.', 'fr': "Les caractéristiques non locales ont été exploitées par des analyseurs syntaxiques pour capturer les dépendances entre les sous-structures de sortie. Ces fonctionnalités ont joué un rôle clé dans le succès des analyseurs statistiques de pointe. Cependant, avec l'essor du deep learning, il a été démontré que les décisions de sortie locales peuvent donner des précisions très compétitives, grâce à la puissance des représentations d'entrée neuronales denses qui incarnent des informations syntaxiques globales. Nous étudions deux modèles neuronaux locaux conceptuellement simples pour l'analyse des constituants, qui prennent des décisions locales en fonction des portées de constituants et des règles CFG, respectivement. Conformément aux résultats précédents, notre meilleur modèle donne des résultats très compétitifs, atteignant les scores F1 entre parenthèses étiquetés de 92,4\xa0% sur PTB et de 87,3\xa0% sur CTB 5.1.", 'es': 'Los analizadores sintácticos han aprovechado las características no locales para capturar dependencias entre estructuras de subsalida. Estas características han sido clave para el éxito de los analizadores estadísticos de última generación. Sin embargo, con el auge del aprendizaje profundo, se ha demostrado que las decisiones de producción local pueden ofrecer precisiones altamente competitivas, gracias al poder de las densas representaciones de entradas neuronales que incorporan información sintáctica global. Investigamos dos modelos neuronales locales conceptualmente simples para el análisis de componentes, que toman decisiones locales sobre los intervalos de los constituyentes y las reglas de CFG, respectivamente. De acuerdo con los hallazgos anteriores a lo largo de la línea, nuestro mejor modelo ofrece resultados altamente competitivos, logrando los puntajes de F1 etiquetados de 92,4% en PTB y 87,3% en CTB 5.1.', 'ja': '非局所的特徴は、サブ出力構造間の依存関係を取り込むための構文解析器によって利用されている。このような機能は、最先端の統計解析器の成功の鍵となりました。しかし、ディープラーニングの台頭に伴い、ローカル出力の決定は、グローバルな構文情報を具現化する濃密なニューラル入力表現の力のおかげで、非常に競争力のある精度を与えることができることが示されている。構成的解析のための2つの概念的に単純な局所ニューラルモデルを調査し、それらはそれぞれ構成的スパンとCFGルールに対して局所的な決定を下します。従来の調査結果と一致して、当社のベストモデルは競争力の高い結果を提供し、PTBで92.4%、CTB 5.1で87.3%のラベル付きブラケットF 1スコアを達成しました。', 'ru': 'Нелокальные особенности были использованы синтаксическими парсерами для захвата зависимостей между суб-выходными структурами. Такие характеристики являются ключом к успеху современных статистических синтаксических анализаторов. Однако с ростом глубокого обучения было показано, что местные решения о выходе могут давать высококонкурентную точность благодаря силе плотных нейронных представлений, которые воплощают глобальную синтаксическую информацию. Мы исследуем две концептуально простые локальные нейронные модели для составляющего синтаксического анализа, которые принимают локальные решения в отношении составляющих пролетов и правил CFG, соответственно. В соответствии с предыдущими выводами, наша лучшая модель дает высококонкурентные результаты, достигая отмеченных брекетинговых баллов F1 92,4% на PTB и 87,3% на CTB 5.1.', 'hi': 'गैर-स्थानीय विशेषताओं को उप-आउटपुट संरचनाओं के बीच निर्भरताओं को कैप्चर करने के लिए वाक्यात्मक पार्सर द्वारा शोषण किया गया है। इस तरह की विशेषताएं अत्याधुनिक सांख्यिकीय पार्सर की सफलता की कुंजी रही हैं। गहरी शिक्षा के उदय के साथ, हालांकि, यह दिखाया गया है कि स्थानीय आउटपुट निर्णय अत्यधिक प्रतिस्पर्धी सटीकता दे सकते हैं, घने तंत्रिका इनपुट अभ्यावेदन की शक्ति के लिए धन्यवाद जो वैश्विक वाक्यात्मक जानकारी को मूर्त रूप देते हैं। हम घटक पार्सिंग के लिए दो वैचारिक रूप से सरल स्थानीय तंत्रिका मॉडल की जांच करते हैं, जो क्रमशः घटक स्पैन और सीएफजी नियमों के लिए स्थानीय निर्णय लेते हैं। लाइन के साथ पिछले निष्कर्षों के अनुरूप, हमारा सबसे अच्छा मॉडल अत्यधिक प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम देता है, पीटीबी पर 92.4% और सीटीबी 5.1 पर 87.3% के लेबल ब्रैकेटिंग एफ 1 स्कोर को प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '语法解析器已用非本地功能以获子输结构之赖。 此功者,先进之计解析器成功之要也。 然随深学之兴,已证局输决策可以供高竞之准确性,此归功于全局句法信息之密神经输示之力也。 论二者神经形,以成解析,以分跨度CFG则。 与前调查结果同,最为极具竞争力,成92.4%于PTB,CTB 5.1至于87.3%。', 'ga': 'Bhain parsálaithe comhréire leas as gnéithe neamh-áitiúla chun spleáchais idir struchtúir fo-aschuir a ghabháil. Bhí gnéithe den sórt sin ríthábhachtach do rath na parsálaithe staidrimh úrscothacha. Le méadú na foghlama domhain, áfach, tá sé léirithe gur féidir le cinntí aschuir áitiúil beachtas an-iomaíoch a thabhairt, a bhuí le cumhacht na n-ionadaíochtaí dlúth-ionchuir néaracha a chuimsíonn faisnéis chomhréire dhomhanda. Déanaimid imscrúdú ar dhá shamhail néaracha áitiúla shimplí do pharsáil na gcomhábhar, a dhéanann cinntí áitiúla de réir raonta comhábhar agus rialacha CFG, faoi seach. Ag teacht le torthaí roimhe seo feadh na líne, tugann ár múnla is fearr torthaí an-iomaíoch, ag baint amach na scóir F1 lúibíní lipéadaithe de 92.4% ar PTB agus 87.3% ar CTB 5.1.', 'el': 'Μη τοπικά χαρακτηριστικά έχουν αξιοποιηθεί από συντακτικούς αναλυτές για την καταγραφή εξαρτήσεων μεταξύ των δομών δευτερεύουσας εξόδου. Τέτοια χαρακτηριστικά έχουν αποτελέσει κλειδί για την επιτυχία των σύγχρονων στατιστικών αναλύσεων. Με την άνοδο της βαθιάς μάθησης, ωστόσο, έχει αποδειχθεί ότι οι τοπικές αποφάσεις παραγωγής μπορούν να δώσουν ιδιαίτερα ανταγωνιστικές ακρίβειες, χάρη στη δύναμη των πυκνών αναπαραστάσεων νευρικών εισόδων που ενσωματώνουν παγκόσμια συντακτική πληροφορία. Ερευνούμε δύο εννοιολογικά απλά τοπικά νευρωνικά μοντέλα για την ανάλυση των συστατικών, τα οποία λαμβάνουν τοπικές αποφάσεις για τις συστατικές περιοχές και τους κανόνες αντίστοιχα. Σύμφωνα με τα προηγούμενα ευρήματα κατά μήκος της γραμμής, το καλύτερο μοντέλο μας δίνει εξαιρετικά ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα, πετυχαίνοντας τις βαθμολογίες με ετικέτα 92.4% στον PTB και 87.3% στη CTB 5.1.', 'hu': 'A nem helyi funkciókat a szintaktikus elemzők használták ki a kimeneti struktúrák közötti függőségek rögzítésére. Az ilyen jellemzők kulcsfontosságúak voltak a korszerű statisztikai elemzők sikerének. A mélytanulás növekedésével azonban bebizonyították, hogy a helyi kimeneti döntések rendkívül versenyképes pontosságot adhatnak, köszönhetően a globális szintaktikus információt testesítő sűrű neurális bemeneti reprezentációk erejének. Két koncepcionálisan egyszerű helyi neurális modellt vizsgálunk az alkotóelemek elemzéséhez, amelyek helyi döntéseket hoznak az alkotóelemek tartományairól, illetve CFG szabályairól. A korábbi eredményekkel összhangban a legjobb modellünk rendkívül versenyképes eredményeket nyújt, elérve a címkézett F1 pontszámot 92,4%-kal PTB esetén, 87,3%-kal CTB 5.1 esetén.', 'it': "Le funzionalità non locali sono state sfruttate dai parser sintattici per catturare dipendenze tra strutture di output secondari. Tali caratteristiche sono state una chiave per il successo dei parser statistici all'avanguardia. Con l'ascesa del deep learning, tuttavia, è stato dimostrato che le decisioni di output locali possono dare precisione altamente competitive, grazie alla potenza di rappresentazioni dense di input neurali che incarnano informazioni sintattiche globali. Investighiamo due modelli neurali locali concettualmente semplici per il parsing costituente, che prendono decisioni locali rispettivamente per gli span costituenti e le regole CFG. Coerentemente con i risultati precedenti, il nostro modello migliore offre risultati altamente competitivi, raggiungendo i punteggi F1 etichettati del 92,4% su PTB e dell'87,3% su CTB 5.1.", 'ka': 'არა ლოკალური ფუნქციები სინტაქტიკური პარასერების გამოყენება საკუთარი გამოყენება სტრუქტურაციის განმავლობაში. ასეთი განსაზღვრებები იყო სტატისტიკალური პანსერების წარმატების კი. მაგრამ ძალიან სწავლების გაზრდა, რომ ლოკალური გამოყენება შესაძლებელია კონსპექტიური კონპექტიური კონპექტიურება, ძალიან ძალიან ნეიროლური გამოყენება, რომელიც გლობალური სინტ ჩვენ შევხედავთ ორი კონცექტურად უკეთესი ლოკალური ნეიროლური მოდელები, რომელიც კონსტუტენტების პანსტირებისთვის, რომელიც მხოლოდ მსოფლიო გადაწყვეტი ჩვენი ყველაზე საკუთარი მოდელის შესახებ უფრო კონექციური შედეგების შესახებ, რომლებიც ჩვენი მოდელის შესახებ უფრო კონექციური შედეგების შესახებ, რომლებიც ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებლობა დაიწ', 'mk': 'Нелокалните карактеристики се искористени од синтактичките анализатори за заземање зависности помеѓу структурите на подизлез. Таквите карактеристики беа клуч за успехот на најновите статистички анализатори. Сепак, со зголемувањето на длабокото учење, се покажа дека одлуките за локалното производство можат да дадат високо конкурентна точност, благодарение на моќта на густите нервни внесувања кои вклучуваат глобални синтактички информации. Ние истражуваме два концептуално едноставни локални нервни модели за анализирање на конститутите, кои донесуваат локални одлуки за конститутивните промени и CFG правила, односно. Во согласност со претходните откритија на линијата, нашиот најдобар модел дава високо конкурентни резултати, постигнувајќи ги оценките на обележаните поддршки F1 од 92,4 отсто на ПТБ и 87,3 отсто на ПТБ 5,1.', 'ml': 'സ്ഥാനമില്ലാത്ത വിശേഷതകള്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ടിക്ക് പാര്\u200dസറുകളാല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഇതുപോലുള്ള വിശേഷതകള്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പാര്\u200dസറുകളുടെ വിജയത്തിന്റെ താക്കോലായിരുന്നു. ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഉയര്\u200dന്നുപോകുമ്പോള്\u200d ലോക്കല്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന തീരുമാനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഏറ്റവും മത്സരത്തിലുള്ള വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകാ സംസാരിക്കാനുള്ള പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനുള്ള രണ്ട് പ്രാദേശിക നെയൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രാദേശികമായി സ്പേന വരിയില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള കണ്ടുപിടിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി നമ്മുടെ മികച്ച മോഡല്\u200d വളരെ മത്സരിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു. പിടിബിയില്\u200d 92. 4% ബിയില്\u200d നിന്നും 87', 'kk': 'Жергілікті емес қасиеттер ішкі шығыс құрылғылар арасындағы тәуелдіктерді алу үшін синтактикалық талдаушылар қолданылды. Бұл мүмкіндіктер статистикалық талдаушыларының күйіне жеткізу үшін кілті болды. Бірақ, жергілікті шығыс шешімдерінің көпшілігін өзгерту үшін, жүйелік синтактикалық мәліметті ендіру үшін жарықтық невралдық ендіру құқықтарының көмегімен, жергілікті шығыс шеші Біз қарапайым жергілікті түрлендіру үшін екі қарапайым жергілікті нейрондық моделдерді зерттеп, олар жергілікті түрлендірушілерді және CFG ережелеріне шешімдерді жасайды. Жолдың алдыңғы тапсырмаларына сәйкес келеді, біздің ең жақсы моделіміз көп жарықтық нәтижелерін береді. Бұл PTB 5.1 және CTB 5.1 және 87.3% және F1 нәтижелерін жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Ne vietos savybės buvo panaudotos sintetiniais analizatoriais, kad būtų galima nustatyti priklausomybę tarp subišėjimo struktūrų. Such features have been a key to the success of state-of-the-art statistical parsers.  Vis dėlto didėjant giliam mokymuisi buvo įrodyta, kad vietos gamybos sprendimai gali suteikti labai konkurencingą tikslumą dėl tankių neurologinių įvedimų, kurie apima pasaulinę sintaktinę informaciją, galios. Mes tiriame du konceptualiai paprastus vietinius nervų modelius sudedamųjų dalių analizei, kurie priima vietinius sprendimus dėl sudedamųjų dalių apimties ir atitinkamai CFG taisyklių. Atsižvelgiant į ankstesnius rezultatus, mūsų geriausias modelis duoda labai konkurencingų rezultatų, pasiekdamas pažymėtą klasifikavimo F1 tašką 92,4 % PTB ir 87,3 % CTB 5,1.', 'mt': 'Il-karatteristiċi mhux lokali ġew sfruttati minn analizzaturi sintetiċi biex jinqabdu d-dipendenzi bejn l-istrutturi ta’ sottoproduzzjoni. Dawn il-karatteristiċi kienu kruċjali għas-suċċess tal-analizzaturi tal-istatistika l-aktar avvanzati. Madankollu, biż-żieda fit-tagħlim profond, intwera li d-deċiżjonijiet lokali dwar il-produzzjoni jistgħu jagħtu preċiżjonijiet kompetittivi ħafna, bis-saħħa ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet densi ta’ input newrali li jinkorporaw informazzjoni sintattika globali. Aħna ninvestigaw żewġ mudelli newrali lokali kunċettwalment sempliċi għall-analiżi kostitwenti, li jieħdu deċiżjonijiet lokali għall-firxa kostitwenti u r-regoli tas-CFG, rispettivament. B’konsistenza mas-sejbiet preċedenti skont il-linja, l-aħjar mudell tagħna jagħti riżultati kompetittivi ħafna, billi jinkisbu l-punteġġi F1 bit-tikketta ta’ 92.4% fuq PTB u 87.3% fuq CTB 5.1.', 'ms': 'Ciri-ciri bukan setempat telah dieksploitasi oleh penghurai sintaktik untuk menangkap dependensi antara struktur sub output. Ciri-ciri tersebut telah menjadi kunci untuk kejayaan penghurai statistik state-of-the-art. Dengan meningkat pembelajaran dalam, bagaimanapun, ia telah menunjukkan bahawa keputusan output setempat boleh memberikan ketepatan kompetitif tinggi, berkat kuasa perwakilan input saraf yang padat yang mengandungi maklumat sintaktik global. We investigate two conceptually simple local neural models for constituent parsing, which make local decisions to constituent spans and CFG rules, respectively.  Berdasarkan dengan penemuan sebelumnya sepanjang garis, model terbaik kami memberikan keputusan kompetitif yang tinggi, mencapai skor bracketing F1 bernilai 92.4% pada PTB dan 87.3% pada CTB 5.1.', 'no': 'Ikkje lokale funksjonar er eksplodert av syntaktiske tolkar for å henta avhengighet mellom underutgangsstrukturar. Desse funksjonane har vært ein nøkkel til suksessen av statistiske tolkarar i kunsten. Med høgden av dypt læring er det likevel vist at lokale utdata-avgjøringar kan gi svært konkurrentiv akkurat, takk på kraft av tette neuralinndata-representasjonar som innebyr globale syntaktiske informasjon. Vi undersøker to konseptelt enkle lokale neuralmodeller for konstituent tolking, som gjer lokale avgjøringar til konstituent avstandar og CFG-reglar. I tillegg til førre oppdagingar langs linja gir vår beste modell svært konkurrentivt resultat, og fører til merkelige F1- poeng med 92,4% på PTB og 87,3% på CTB 5,1.', 'mn': 'Орон нутгийн газрын тодорхойлолтууд нь суб гаргалтын бүтээгдэхүүний хамааралтай байдлыг барьж буй синтактик ажиллагчид ашиглаж байна. Ийм чухал нь урлагийн статистикийн хуваалцагчийн амжилтын түлхүүр юм. Гэхдээ гүн гүнзгий сургалтын өсгөлд орон нутгийн үр дүн шийдвэр нь дэлхийн синтактик мэдээллийг солилцоогоор өрсөлдөг байдлын тохиромжтой тохиромжтой болгож чадна гэдгийг харуулсан. Бид хоёр ойлголттой энгийн газрын мэдрэлийн загварыг судалж байна. Энэ нь газрын загварын загвар болон CFG дүрэм дээр орон нутгийн шийдвэр гаргадаг. Өмнөх ололтуудыг шугам дээр харьцуулахад бидний хамгийн шилдэг загвар нь маш өрсөлдөөнтэй үр дүнг өгдөг. Энэ нь PTB дээр 92.4%, CTB 5.1 дээр 87.3%.', 'pl': 'Funkcje nielokalne zostały wykorzystane przez parsery składni do przechwytywania zależności między podstrukturami wyjściowymi. Takie cechy były kluczem do sukcesu najnowocześniejszych parserów statystycznych. Wraz ze wzrostem głębokiego uczenia się okazało się jednak, że decyzje lokalne mogą dać wysoce konkurencyjne dokładności, dzięki mocy gęstych reprezentacji wejściowych neuronowych, które ucieleśniają globalną informację składnię. Badamy dwa koncepcyjnie proste lokalne modele neuronowe do parsowania składników, które podejmują lokalne decyzje dotyczące rozpięć składników i reguł CFG. Zgodnie z wcześniejszymi ustaleniami, nasz najlepszy model daje wysoce konkurencyjne wyniki, osiągając oznaczone wyniki F1 w nawiasie 92,4% w PTB i 87,3% w CTB 5.1.', 'ro': 'Caracteristicile non-locale au fost exploatate de parserele sintactice pentru captarea dependențelor dintre structurile de ieșire sub. Astfel de caracteristici au fost cheia succesului analizelor statistice de ultimă generație. Cu toate acestea, odată cu creșterea învățării profunde, s-a demonstrat că deciziile locale de ieșire pot oferi precizii extrem de competitive, datorită puterii reprezentărilor dense de intrare neurală care întruchipează informația sintactică globală. Investigăm două modele neuronale locale conceptual simple pentru analizarea constitutivă, care iau decizii locale privind intervalele constitutive și respectiv regulile CFG. În concordanță cu constatările anterioare de-a lungul liniei, cel mai bun model al nostru oferă rezultate extrem de competitive, obținând scoruri F1 marcate de 92,4% pe PTB și 87,3% pe CTB 5.1.', 'si': 'ස්ථානික විශේෂතාවක් නෙවෙයි ස්ථානික විශේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සබ් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සං ඒ වගේ අවස්ථාවක් තමයි ස්ථානයේ සාර්ථක පරීක්ෂකයන්ගේ සාර්ථක විශ්වාස කරනවා. හැබැයි ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ ස්ථානික ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක තීරණය ලොකු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන් අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය ස්ථානික න්\u200dයූරල් මොඩේල් දෙකක් සිද්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ස්ථානික තීරණය සඳහා ස්ථානික අපේ හොඳම මෝඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙනවා, PTB වල 92.4% සහ CTB 5.1 වල ලේබල් කරපු F1 ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක', 'sr': 'Nelokalne karakteristike su iskoristile sintaktični parseri zbog uhvaćenja zavisnosti između podizanih struktura. Takve karakteristike su bili ključ uspeha statističkih parsera. Međutim, uz povećanje dubokog učenja, pokazalo je da lokalne odluke o izlazu mogu dati veoma konkurentne tačnosti zahvaljujući moći gustih neuronskih predstavljanja koji uključuju globalne sintaktične informacije. Istražujemo dve konceptualno jednostavne lokalne neuralne modele za razmatranje sastavnika, koje donose lokalne odluke o sastavnim prostorijama i pravilima CFG. U skladu sa prethodnim nalazima duž linije, naš najbolji model daje vrlo konkurentne rezultate, ostvarivši označene rezultate narukvice F1 od 92,4% na PTB i 87,3% na CTB 5,1.', 'so': "Waxyaabaha aan degmada aheyn waxaa loo isticmaalay jardiinada syntactic si ay u qabsato xiriir ku xiran dhismaha hoose-soo baxa. Xirfadahaas caynkaas ah waxay ahaayeen furaha guulaysta baarlamaha farshaxanka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa la muujiyey in go’aanka soo baxa uu bixi karo saxda aad u adag, waxaana mahad ku leh xoogga daryeelka guud ee diiran oo ku jira macluumaad la xiriira caalamiga ah. Waxaynu baaraynaa laba tusaale oo fudud qoraalka neurada ee deegaanka ah ee baarlamaanka qofka sameeya go'aanno ku gaara jardiinada guud iyo qaynuunnada CFG. Sida uu ku sameynayo dhamaadkii hore ee sameynta, qaababkayaga ugu wanaagsan wuxuu bixiyaa matooyin aad u adag, wuxuuna gaadhaa kooxda labka ah ee F1 score 92.4% PTB iyo 87.3% CTB 5.1.", 'sv': 'Icke-lokala funktioner har utnyttjats av syntaktiska tolkare för att fånga beroenden mellan underutmatningsstrukturer. Sådana funktioner har varit en nyckel till framgång för state-of-the-art statistiska tolkare. Med ökningen av djupinlärning har det dock visat sig att lokala utgångsbeslut kan ge hög konkurrenskraft, tack vare kraften i täta neurala ingångsrepresentationer som förkroppsligar global syntaktisk information. Vi undersöker två konceptuellt enkla lokala neurala modeller för komponenttolkning, som fattar lokala beslut om komponentspann respektive CFG regler. I överensstämmelse med tidigare resultat ger vår bästa modell mycket konkurrenskraftiga resultat och uppnår de märkta F1-poängen på 92,4% på PTB och 87,3% på CTB 5.1.', 'ta': 'உள்ளமைப்பில்லாத குணங்கள் துணை வெளியீட்டு அமைப்புகளுக்கிடையில் சார்புகளை பெறுவதற்காக ஒத்திசைக்கான பார்சர இத்தகைய குணங்கள் மாநிலை - கலை புள்ளிவிவரங்கள் வெற்றிக்கு ஒரு விசையாக இருந்தது. ஆழமான கற்றத்தின் உயர்ந்த போது, உள்ளூர் வெளியீட்டு முடிவுகள் மிகவும் போராட்டியான சரித்திரத்தை கொடுக்க முடியும் என்பது தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டது,  நாங்கள் பாடலுக்கு இரண்டு சுலபமான உள்ளூர புதிய மாதிரிகளை தேடுகிறோம், அது பொறுப்பாளருக்கு உள்ளூர் தீர்வுகள் மற்றும் சிஎஃப்ஜ கோட்டில் முந்தைய கண்டுபிடிப்புகளுடன், எங்கள் சிறந்த மாதிரி மிகவும் தோல்வியான முடிவுகளை கொடுக்கிறது, அடையாளம் குறிக்கப்பட்ட F1 புள்ளிகள் 92. 4% PTB', 'ur': 'غیر محلی ویٹیوں نے سوب آئٹ پیٹ ساختاروں کے درمیان اعتباری کو پکڑنے کے لئے سینٹکتیک پارسر کے ذریعے استعمال کیا گیا ہے. اس طرح کی خصوصیات ایک کلید تھی کہ ایٹیٹ کی آمار سٹیٹسٹی پارس کے کامیابی کے لئے۔ لیکن عمیق تعلیم کے ساتھ، اس کو دکھایا گیا ہے کہ محلی اجلام کے فیصلے بہت سی مساوی دقیق دیتے ہیں، گہرے نئورل اجلام کی طاقت کے شکریہ، جو گلوبی سینٹکتیک معلومات کو پیدا کرتی ہے. ہم دو منظم سے سادھے محلی نئورل نمڈلوں کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، جو محلی تصمیم کرتی ہیں کہ محلی جگہ اور CFG قانون کے لئے۔ ہمارے بہترین موڈل بہت سی مسابقه نتیجے دیتے ہیں، جو PTB پر 92.4% اور CTB 5.1 پر 87.3% کے لیبل کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ کٹ', 'uz': "Name Such features have been a key to the success of state-of-the-art statistical parsers.  Hozir o'rganishni o'rganishda, lokal tuzuvning xususiyatlarini juda qiziqarli tashkilotga ega bo'lishi mumkin, chunki dunyo yo yo'nalishi haqida qo'shimcha neyural input qoidalarini qo'shish uchun. Биз маҳаллий депутатлар парламент учун ўзгартиш қонун усулларини кўриб турамиз, у маҳаллий ҳукумат ва CFG қоидаларини ўзгартириб, қонун қоидаларга ажратиш мумкин. Koʻrib chiziqni olib tashlash bilan eng yuqori modelmiz juda qiziqarli natijalarni beradi, PTB bilan 92.4% va CTB 5.1 dan 87.3% yordamida qo'yilgan F1 scorini bajaradi.", 'vi': "Các tính năng không cục bộ đã được khai thác bởi các phân tích cú pháp để nắm giữ quan hệ phụ thuộc giữa các cấu trúc ngầm. Những tính năng như vậy là chìa khóa cho sự thành công của các phân tích thống kê. Tuy nhiên, với sự phát triển của việc học sâu, nó đã được chứng minh rằng các quyết định xuất bản địa phương có thể mang lại các nguyên trạng cạnh tranh cao, nhờ vào sức mạnh của các biểu tượng kết cấu thần kinh dày đặc mà hiện diện thông tin cú pháp to àn cầu. Chúng tôi điều tra hai mô hình thần kinh cục bộ đơn giản để phân tích nội bộ, đưa ra quyết định địa phương về các chi nhánh và quy tắc CFO. Tương ứng với những phát hiện trước trên đường, mô hình tốt nhất của chúng ta cho kết quả cạnh tranh cao, đạt được điểm khẩu F1 trong ghi rõ giá 92.4='trên CTX 5.1.", 'nl': 'Niet-lokale kenmerken zijn gebruikt door syntactische parsers voor het vastleggen van afhankelijkheden tussen sub-uitvoerstructuren. Dergelijke functies zijn een sleutel geweest tot het succes van state-of-the-art statistische parsers. Met de opkomst van deep learning is echter aangetoond dat lokale outputbeslissingen zeer concurrerende nauwkeurigheid kunnen geven, dankzij de kracht van dichte neurale input representaties die mondiale syntactische informatie belichamen. We onderzoeken twee conceptueel eenvoudige lokale neurale modellen voor constitution parsing, die lokale beslissingen nemen over respectievelijk constitution spans en CFG regels. In overeenstemming met eerdere bevindingen langs de lijn, geeft ons beste model zeer concurrerende resultaten, met het behalen van de gelabelde F1 scores van 92,4% op PTB en 87,3% op CTB 5.1.', 'hr': 'Nelokalne karakteristike iskoristili su sintaktički parseri zbog uhvaćenja ovisnosti između podizvedenih struktura. Takve karakteristike su ključ uspjeha statističkih analitičara. Međutim, s povećanjem dubokog učenja pokazalo je da lokalne odluke o izlazu mogu dati veoma konkurentne preciznosti zahvaljujući moći gustih predstavljanja neuronskih ulaza koji uključuju globalne sintaktičke informacije. Istražujemo dvije konceptualno jednostavne lokalne neuralne modele za razmatranje sastavnih članova, koje donose lokalne odluke o sastavnim prostorijama i pravilima CFG-a. U skladu s prethodnim nalazima duž linije, naš najbolji model daje vrlo konkurentne rezultate, ostvarivši označene rezultate narukvice F1 od 92,4% na PTB i 87,3% na CTB 5,1.', 'id': 'Karakteristik bukan-lokal telah dieksploitasi oleh pemeriksa sintaks untuk menangkap dependensi antara struktur sub output. Karakteristik seperti ini telah menjadi kunci untuk sukses pemeriksa statistik state-of-the-art. Dengan meningkat belajar dalam, bagaimanapun, telah menunjukkan bahwa keputusan output lokal dapat memberikan akurasi kompetitif tinggi, berkat kekuatan dari representation input neural yang padat yang mengandung informasi sintaksi global. Kami menyelidiki dua model saraf lokal konseptual sederhana untuk penghuraian konstitusi, yang membuat keputusan lokal untuk jangkauan konstitusi dan aturan CFG, secara respektif. Berdasarkan penemuan sebelumnya, model terbaik kami memberikan hasil yang sangat kompetitif, mencapai nilai F1 yang ditabel 92,4% pada PTB dan 87,3% pada CTB 5,1.', 'bg': 'Нелокалните функции са експлоатирани от синтактични анализатори за улавяне на зависимости между подизходните структури. Такива характеристики са ключови за успеха на най-съвременните статистически анализатори. С възхода на дълбокото учене обаче е показано, че местните изходни решения могат да дадат висока конкурентна точност, благодарение на силата на плътните невронни входни представяния, които въплъщават глобалната синтактична информация. Проучваме два концептуално прости локални невронни модела за анализ на съставните елементи, които взимат локални решения съответно за съставните интервали и правилата на CFG. В съответствие с предишните констатации, нашият най-добър модел дава силно конкурентни резултати, постигайки маркирани скоби от 92,4% при ПТБ и 87,3% при ПТБ 5,1.', 'da': 'Ikke-lokale funktioner er blevet udnyttet af syntaktiske fortolkere til at fange afhængigheder mellem suboutput strukturer. Sådanne funktioner har været en nøgle til succes for state-of-the-art statistiske fortolkere. Med stigningen i deep learning er det imidlertid blevet vist, at lokale output beslutninger kan give meget konkurrencedygtige nøjagtigheder takket være styrken af tætte neurale input repræsentationer, der legemliggør global syntaktisk information. Vi undersøger to konceptuelt enkle lokale neurale modeller til bestanddeleparsing, som træffer lokale beslutninger om bestanddele spænder og CFG regler, henholdsvis. I overensstemmelse med tidligere resultater, giver vores bedste model yderst konkurrencedygtige resultater og opnår de mærkede F1 scores på 92,4% på PTB og 87,3% på CTB 5.1.', 'ko': '문법 분석기는 비국부적 특징을 이용하여 서브 출력 구조 간의 의존 관계를 포획한다.이러한 특성들은 줄곧 가장 선진적인 통계 해석기의 성공의 관건이었다.그러나 깊이 있는 학습이 일어나면서 연구에 의하면 전체 문법 정보의 밀집 신경 입력 표시 능력을 나타내기 때문에 국부 수출 결정은 고도의 경쟁적인 정확도를 제공할 수 있다.우리는 성분 분석에 사용되는 두 가지 개념의 간단한 국부 신경 모델을 연구했는데 이들은 각각 성분 경계와 CFG 규칙에 대해 국부 결정을 한다.이전 연구 결과와 일치하여 우리의 최적 모델은 PTB와 CTB 5.1에서 각각 92.4%와 87.3%의 괄호 F1 점수를 얻은 경쟁력 있는 결과를 제공했다.', 'fa': 'ویژگی\u200cهای غیر محلی توسط بررسی\u200cکنندگان سنتاکتیک برای گرفتن بستگی بین ساختارهای زیر خروج استفاده شده\u200cاند. این ویژگی\u200cها کلید موفقیت بازرسان آمار هنری بودند. با توجه به یادگیری عمیق، به هر حال نشان داده شده که تصمیم های خروجی محلی می توانند دقیقات مسابقه بسیار مسابقه را بدهند، به سزای قدرت نمایش های ورودی عصبی عمیق که اطلاعات سنتاکتیک جهانی را تشکیل می دهند. ما دو مدل عصبی محلی را در نظر گرفته\u200cایم که برای تجزیه کردن محلی ساده است تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، که تصمیم\u200cهای محلی برای حوزه\u200cهای محلی و قانون CFG را به نظر می\u200cگیرند. با پیدا کردن پیشینیان در طول خط، بهترین مدل ما نتایج مسابقه\u200cای بسیار مسابقه می\u200cدهد، به رسیدن نقطه\u200cهای برچسب F1 از 92.4% در PTB و 87.3% در CTB 5.1 برچسب می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri zisizo na maeneo mengine imetumiwa na wabunge wa ushirikiano kwa kuchukua tegemea kati ya miundombinu ya chini ya mazao. Tamko kama hizi zimekuwa ufunguo wa mafanikio ya mabunge ya takwimu ya serikali. Kutokana na kuongezeka kwa kujifunza kwa kina, hata hivyo, imeonyesha kuwa uamuzi wa matokeo ya eneo hilo unaweza kutoa ukweli wa ushindani mkubwa, shukrani kwa nguvu ya uwakilishi wa taratibu za ubongo ambao unahusisha taarifa za usangazaji wa kimataifa. Tunachunguza mifano miwili rahisi ya ubongo wa ndani kwa ajili ya parge ya wabunge, ambazo hufanya maamuzi ya ndani kwa ajili ya ubunge na sheria za CFG. Pamoja na matokeo yaliyopita kwenye mstari huo, mifano yetu bora inatoa matokeo yenye ushindani mkubwa, na kufikia vipindi vya F1 vilivyoonyesha viwango 92.4 kwenye PTB na asilimia 87.3 kwenye CTB 5.1.', 'tr': 'Sahypa çykyş düzümleri gollanmak üçin syntaktik tansçylar tarapyndan ullanýar Böyle özellikler Durum statistik parsleriň üstesinden çykmak üçin bir a çyk boldy. Ýöne derin öwrenmeniň yükselişinde, ýerleri çykyş kararlaryň dünýä sintaktik maglumaty etmäge mejbur edip biljekdigini görkezildi. Biz konstituent ayırmak üçin iki düşünjüme basit nural modellerini inceleýäris. Bu şekilde yerel kararlar constituent spans we CFG kurallara geçirir. Öňki tapylyklaryň ýagdaýynda, iň gowy nusgamyz ýokary konkursiýa netijesi berer, PTB we CTB 5.1-de etiket edilen F1 noktalaryna 92.4% we 87.3% derejesi berir.', 'sq': 'Karakteristikat jo-lokale janë shfrytëzuar nga analizuesit sintaktikë për kapjen e varësive midis strukturave të daljes së nëntë. Karakteristikat e tilla kanë qenë një çelës për suksesin e analizuesve të statistikës më të lartë. Me rritjen e mësimit të thellë, megjithatë, është treguar se vendimet e prodhimit lokal mund të japin saktësi shumë konkurruese, falë fuqisë së përfaqësimeve të dendura të hyrjes nervore që përfaqësojnë informacionin sintaktik global. Ne hetojmë dy modele konceptualisht të thjeshta lokale neuronale për analizimin e përbërësve, të cilat marrin vendime lokale respektivisht për fushat përbërëse dhe rregullat CFG. Në përputhje me gjetjet e mëparshme përgjatë vijës, modeli ynë më i mirë jep rezultate konkurruese të larta, duke arritur rezultatet e etiketuara të klasifikuara F1 prej 92.4% në PTB dhe 87.3% në CTB 5.1.', 'de': 'Nicht-lokale Features wurden von syntaktischen Parsern ausgenutzt, um Abhängigkeiten zwischen Unterausgabestrukturen zu erfassen. Solche Funktionen waren ein Schlüssel zum Erfolg moderner statistischer Parser. Mit dem Aufkommen von Deep Learning wurde jedoch gezeigt, dass lokale Output-Entscheidungen aufgrund der Macht dichter neuronaler Input-Repräsentationen, die globale syntaktische Informationen verkörpern, sehr wettbewerbsfähige Genauigkeiten liefern können. Wir untersuchen zwei konzeptionell einfache lokale neuronale Modelle für die Constitutive Parsing, die lokale Entscheidungen zu konstituierenden Spannen bzw. CFG-Regeln treffen. In Übereinstimmung mit früheren Erkenntnissen entlang der Linie liefert unser bestes Modell sehr wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse und erzielt die markierten F1-Werte von 92,4% in der PTB und 87,3% in der CTB 5.1.', 'af': "Nie- plaaslike funksies is uitgebruik deur sintaktieke verwerkers vir opneem afhanklikhede tussen sub uitset strukture. Soos eienskappe is 'n sleutel vir die sukses van staat van die kunste statistiese verwerkers. Met die opstanding van diep leer, is dit alleen vertoon dat plaaslike uitvoer besluite baie kompetitive akkurasies kan gee, dankie van die krag van dense neurale inligting verteenwoordighede wat globale sintaktiese inligting inprop. Ons ondersoek twee konseptieële eenvoudige plaaslike neurale modele vir konstituent ondersoek, wat plaaslike besluite maak aan konstituent spans en CFG reëls respektieëf. Ons beste model gee baie gemeenskaplike resultate met vorige gevindings langs die lyn, tot die gemerkte kruipende F1 telling van 92.4% op PTB en 87.3% op CTB 5.1.", 'am': 'ቦታ የሌለው ምርጫዎች በSyntactic Parsers በጥቅል ውጤት አካባቢዎች መካከል ተደጋፊዎችን ለመያዝ ተጠቃቀሙ፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ ምርጫዎች የሀገር-አርስቲካዊ ፓርላር ስኬት ሆነዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን ከጥልቅ ትምህርት መነሳት ጋር፣ የቅርብ ውጤት ፍጥረቶችን እጅግ ተቃዋሚዎችን እንዲሰጥ ይችላል፡፡ በአካባቢው ሁለትን የአገር የሆኑትን የነጥብ ባሕላዊ አካባቢዎች እና የCFG ሕግ ሥርዓቶችን ለመፈለግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው የመረጃ ፍጥረት በተጨማሪም፣ መልካሙን ምሳሌ ትክክለኛ ፍጥረቶችን ይሰጣል፣ የጽሑፉ የF1 score 92.4 በመቶ PTB እና 87.3 በመቶ CTB 5.1 በመደረስ ይደረጋል፡፡', 'bn': 'সাব আউটপুট কাঠামোর মধ্যে নির্ভর করার জন্য স্থানীয় বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। এই ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্য হচ্ছে রাষ্ট্রের পরিসংখ্যান পরিসংখ্যান পার্সারের সফলতার জন্য। কিন্তু গভীর শিক্ষা বাড়তে থাকার পরে এটি দেখা যাচ্ছে যে স্থানীয় আউটপুটের সিদ্ধান্ত অত্যন্ত প্রতিযোগিতা সঠিকভাবে প্রদান করতে পারে, যা বিশ্ব আমরা স্থানীয় স্থানীয় নিউরেল মডেল অনুসন্ধান করি প্রতিনিধিদের পার্সিং এর জন্য, যা স্থানীয় সিদ্ধান্ত এবং সিএফজি নিয়মের জন্য স পিটিবি এবং সিটিবি ৫. ১ তে ৮৭.', 'az': 'Yerli olmayan xüsusiyyətlər altı çıxış quruları arasındakı bağlılıqları almaq üçün sintaktik ayırıcılar istifadə edilmişdir. Bütün bu xüsusiyyətlər art ıq statistik ayırıcıların başarısızlığının anahtarı idi. Yerli çıxış kararlarının böyüklüyü ilə, küresel sintaktik məlumatlarını təsdiqləyən yoxlu nöral giriş təsdiqlərinin gücünün sayəsində çox müqayisəçi təsdiqlənməsini göstərilmişdir. Biz müəyyən edilən ayırmaq üçün iki nəticə olaraq sadə yerli nöral modellərini inceleyirik. Bu, yerli hökmlər müəyyən edilən spanslar və CFG kuralları ilə müəyyən edir. Ən yaxşı modellərimiz, PTB 5.1 üstündə 92.4% və CTB 5.1 üstündə 87.3% etiketli F1 nöqtələrini başa çatdırır.', 'bs': 'Nelokalne karakteristike su iskoristile sintaktični parseri zbog uhvaćenja ovisnosti između podizanih struktura izlaza. Takve karakteristike su ključ uspjeha statističkih analitičara. Međutim, s povećanjem dubokog učenja pokazalo je da lokalne odluke o izlazu mogu dati veoma konkurentne preciznosti zahvaljujući moći gustih predstavljanja neuronskih ulaza koji uključuju globalne sintaktične informacije. Istražujemo dvije konceptualno jednostavne lokalne neuralne modele za razmatranje sastavnika, koje donose lokalne odluke o sastavnim prostorijama i pravilima CFG. U skladu sa prethodnim nalazima duž linije, naš najbolji model daje vrlo konkurentne rezultate, ostvarivši označene rezultate narukvice F1 od 92,4% na PTB i 87,3% na CTB 5,1.', 'cs': 'Nelokální funkce byly využity syntaktickými parsery pro zachycení závislostí mezi dílčími výstupními strukturami. Tyto funkce byly klíčem k úspěchu nejmodernějších statistických parserů. S nárůstem hlubokého učení se však ukázalo, že lokální výstupní rozhodnutí mohou poskytnout vysoce konkurenční přesnost díky síle hustých neuronových vstupních reprezentací, které ztělesňují globální syntaktické informace. Zkoumáme dva konceptuálně jednoduché lokální neuronové modely pro součástí parsování, které dělají lokální rozhodnutí o konstitučních rozpětích a CFG pravidlech. V souladu s předchozími zjištěními, náš nejlepší model poskytuje vysoce konkurenční výsledky, dosahuje označených F1 skóre 92,4% na PTB a 87,3% na CTB 5.1.', 'ca': "Les característiques no locals han estat explotades per analitzadors sinàtics per capturar les dependencies entre les estructures de sub-producció. Aquestes característiques han estat una clau per l'èxit dels analitzadors estadístics més avançats. Amb l'augment de l'aprenentatge profund, no obstant això, s'ha demostrat que les decisions de producció local poden donar precisions altament competitives, gràcies al poder de denses representacions d'entrada neuronal que incorporen informació sinàctica global. Investiguem dos models neurals locals conceptualment senzills per l'analització de constituents, que prenen decisions locals sobre l'amplitud constituent i les regles de la CFG, respectivament. Consistent amb descobriments anteriors al llarg de la línia, el nostre millor model dóna resultats altament competitius, aconseguint les puntuacions etiquetades F1 de 92,4% en PTB i 87,3% en CTB 5,1.", 'et': 'Süntaktilised parserid on kasutanud mittekohalisi funktsioone allväljundstruktuuride sõltuvuste jäädvustamiseks. Sellised omadused on olnud kaasaegsete statistiliste parserite edu võti. Sügavõppe tõusuga on siiski tõestatud, et kohalikud väljundväljundi otsused võivad anda väga konkurentsivõimelisi täpsusi tänu tihedatele närvisisendite esitustele, mis sisaldavad globaalset süntaktilist teavet. Uurime kahte kontseptuaalselt lihtsat kohalikku närvimudelit koostisosade parsimiseks, mis teevad kohalikke otsuseid vastavalt koostisosade ulatuste ja CFG reeglite kohta. Kooskõlas varasemate uuringutega annab meie parim mudel väga konkurentsivõimelised tulemused, saavutades märgistatud F1 skoorid 92,4% PTB ja 87,3% CTB 5,1.', 'fi': 'Syntaktiset parserit ovat hyödyntäneet ei-paikallisia ominaisuuksia alituotosrakenteiden välisten riippuvuuksien tallentamiseen. Tällaiset ominaisuudet ovat olleet avain viimeisimpien tilastollisten jäsennysten menestykseen. Syväoppimisen nousun myötä on kuitenkin osoitettu, että paikalliset tuotospäätökset voivat antaa erittäin kilpailukykyisiä tarkkuuksia, kiitos tiheiden neurosyöttöesitysten voiman, jotka ilmentävät maailmanlaajuista syntaktista tietoa. Tutkimme kahta käsitteellisesti yksinkertaista paikallista neuromallia komponenttien jäsentämiseen, jotka tekevät paikalliset päätökset komponenttien haaroista ja CFG-säännöistä. Aiempien havaintojen mukaisesti paras mallimme antaa erittäin kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia saavuttaen luokituksen F1 pisteet 92,4% PTB:ssä ja 87,3% CTB:ssä 5,1:ssä.', 'hy': 'Սինտակտիկ վերամշակողները օգտագործել են ոչ տեղական հատկություններ, որպեսզի կախվածություններ բռնեն ենթաարտադրման կառուցվածքների միջև: Such features have been a key to the success of state-of-the-art statistical parsers.  Այնուամենայնիվ, խորը ուսումնասիրության աճի դեպքում ցույց է տվել, որ տեղական արտադրման որոշումները կարող են տալ բարձր մրցակցության ճշգրտություն, շնորհիվ խիստ նյարդային ներդրման ներդրումների ուժի, որը ներառում է գլոբալ սինտակտիկ տեղ Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկու հասարակ տեղական նյարդային մոդել ընդհանուր մասնիկների վերլուծության համար, որոնք տեղական որոշումներ են կայացնում ընդհանուր մասնիկների և ընդհանուր մասնիկների օրենքների համար: Համեմատ նախորդ հայտնաբերությունների հետ, մեր լավագույն մոդելը տալիս է բարձր մրցակցության արդյունքներ, հասնելով բջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջջ', 'sk': 'Sintaktični razčlenjevalniki izkoriščajo nelokalne funkcije za zajemanje odvisnosti med podizhodnimi strukturami. Takšne značilnosti so bile ključnega pomena za uspeh najsodobnejših statističnih razčlenjevalnikov. Z vzponom globokega učenja pa je bilo dokazano, da lahko lokalne odločitve o izhodu dajejo visoko konkurenčno natančnost, zahvaljujoč moči gostih nevronskih vhodnih reprezentacij, ki utelešajo globalne sintaktične informacije. Raziskovali smo dva konceptualno preprosta lokalna nevronska modela za razčlenitev sestavnih delov, ki sprejemata lokalne odločitve glede sestavnih razponov oziroma CFG pravil. V skladu s prejšnjimi ugotovitvami v zvezi s tem naš najboljši model daje zelo konkurenčne rezultate, saj doseže označene rezultate F1 92,4% pri PTB in 87,3% pri CTB 5,1.', 'he': 'ניצלו תכונות לא מקומיות על ידי מחקרי סינטקטיקה כדי לתפוס תלויות בין מבנים תוצאה מתחת. אופיינים כאלה היו מפתח להצלחה של מחקרי סטטיסטיקה חדשים. With the rise of deep learning, however, it has been shown that local output decisions can give highly competitive accuracies, thanks to the power of dense neural input representations that embody global syntactic information.  אנחנו חוקרים שני דוגמנים עצביים מקומיים פשוטים מבחינה מושפטית עבור בדיקת המרכיבים, אשר מקבלים החלטות מקומיות למרחב המרכיבים וחוקי CFG, בהתאם. בהתאם למציאות קודמות לאורך הקו, המודל הטוב ביותר שלנו נותן תוצאות תחרותיות גבוהות, להשיג את ציוני הצמיד המתווים F1 של 92.4% על PTB ו-87.3% על CTB 5.1.', 'ha': "An yi amfani da buƙata masu lokaci na-lokaci wa parser na syntactic dõmin ka kãma masu inganci tsakanin bincike-mazaɓan. Waɗancan feature sun kasance key to the cin nasara of-the-art parser. Haƙĩƙa, an nuna cewa, zaɓallin fitarwa na lokal, za'a iya bãyar da hakki mai girma, masu gõdiya ga ƙarfin inputi na ƙaranci neural da ke cikin shirin information na duniya. Tuna ƙidãya misãlai biyu masu sauƙi na littafin neural na lokal wa parse, wanda ke kamfata mataimaki ga masu baka spani da Rubuwa na CFG. Ga inganci da fassaran zaman a samun line, misalinmu na bãyar da matsalar mai gauraya mai gauraya, da gaskata matsalar na rubutun F1 score 92.4% na PTB da 87.3% kan ATB 5.1.", 'jv': 'Layout structural navigation Saiki ono nggambar luwih dumaten Awak dhéwé cah nyongsa sistem iki sampeyan anyar sampeyan anyar Tulung segala ngono sampeyan sing luwih nêmên, model sing ngenanye sampeyan sing paling nggawe dolanan sing paling maneh, nanguwi kanggo nambah sing beraksi ambelan kanggo kelas terakhir F1 sing bisa dipoleh terakhir, sing wis dipoleh terakhir F1 sing bisa dipoleh terakhir, lan ujaran asai', 'bo': 'Non-local features have been exploited by syntactic parsers for capturing dependencies between sub output structures. དབྱངས་ཆ་འདི་དག་ནི་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་འབྲེལ་བ་ཁག་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་རེད། With the rise of deep learning, however, it has been shown that local output decisions can give highly competitive accuracies, thanks to the power of dense neural input representations that embody global syntactic information. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ཚབ་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ལས་ལྟ་སྟངས་འཛིན་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། Consistent with previous findings along the line, our best model gives highly competitive results, achieving the labeled bracketing F1 scores of 92.4% on PTB and 87.3% on CTB 5.1.'}
{'en': 'RNN Simulations of Grammaticality Judgments on Long-distance Dependencies', 'ar': 'محاكاة RNN للأحكام النحوية على التبعيات بعيدة المدى', 'es': 'Simulaciones RNN de juicios de gramaticalidad en dependencias de larga distancia', 'fr': 'Simulations RNN des jugements de grammaticalité sur les dépendances à distance', 'pt': 'Simulações RNN de julgamentos de gramaticalidade em dependências de longa distância', 'ja': '遠距離依存性に関する文法判断のRNNシミュレーション', 'zh': 'RNN 长距离依赖性断 RNN 拟', 'hi': 'लंबी दूरी की निर्भरताओं पर व्याकरणिकता निर्णय के RNN सिमुलेशन', 'ru': 'RNN Моделирование грамматических суждений о зависимостях на расстоянии', 'ga': 'Insamhaltaí RNN ar Bhreithiúnais Gramadaí ar Spleáchais Fadraoin', 'ka': 'RNN სიმულაცია გრამატიკალური გადაწყვეტილებების განმავლობაზე', 'el': 'Προσομοιώσεις γραμματικών κρίσεων σε μακρινές εξαρτήσεις', 'kk': 'RNN ұзындық қашықтық тәуелдіктерінің граматикалық тәжірибесінің симуляциялары', 'hu': 'RNN Nyelvtani ítéletek szimulációja a távolsági függőségeken', 'it': 'Simulazioni RNN di giudizi grammaticali sulle dipendenze a lunga distanza', 'ms': 'Simulasi RNN Penghakiman Grammatik pada Dependensi Jarak Jauh', 'ml': 'Name', 'lt': 'RNN Gramatiškumo sprendimų dėl ilgalaikių priklausomybių simuliacijos', 'mn': 'RNN Хурт зай хамааралтай байдлын грамматикийн шийдвэр', 'mk': 'РНН симулации на пресудите за граматичност за долги зависности', 'mt': 'RNN Simulazzjonijiet ta’ Sentenzi Grammatiċi dwar Dipendenzi fuq Distanza Twila', 'ro': 'RNN Simularea judecăților gramaticale asupra dependențelor la distanță lungă', 'no': 'RNN Simulasjonar av gramatiske avhengighet på langavstanden', 'sr': 'RNN Simulacije Gramatičnih sudova o dalekoj zavisnosti', 'si': 'RNN සිම්යුලේෂන් ග්\u200dරාම්ටිකාලිකතාවක් නිර්මාණය ලොකු දුරක් විශේෂතාවක් ගැන', 'pl': 'RNN Symulacje osądów gramatyczności na długodystansowych zależnościach', 'sv': 'RNN Simuleringar av grammatiska bedömningar på långdistansberoende', 'so': 'RNN Simulations of Grammaticality Judges on Long-distance Dependences', 'ur': 'RNN سیمولوٹیسی ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹنسیٹ کے بارے میں Grammaticality Judgments of RNN', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'RNN Mô phỏng phán quyết êm ái giải quyết độ sâu', 'bg': 'Симулации на граматическите решения по зависимости от разстояние', 'nl': 'RNN Simulaties van Grammaticaliteitsoordelen op lange afstand afhankelijkheden', 'da': 'RNN Simuleringer af grammatiske domme på langdistance afhængigheder', 'hr': 'RNN Simulacije Gramatičnih sudjenja o dalekoj zavisnosti', 'id': 'RNN Simulasi Keputusan Grammatik pada Dependensi Jarak Jauh', 'de': 'RNN Simulationen von GrammatizitĂ¤tsurteilen auf LangstreckenabhĂ¤ngigkeiten', 'fa': 'Simulations of Grammaticality Judgments on Long distance Dependencies RNN', 'ko': '문법적 판단에 따른 장거리 RNN 시뮬레이션', 'tr': 'Ullanyş Dependensiýasy barada Grammatikalyk Jekmanlaryň Simülasy', 'af': 'RNN Simulasies van Gramatitiese oordelings op Lang afstand Afhanklikhede', 'sw': 'Simulations of Grammarity Judges on Long-distance dependencies', 'sq': 'RNN Simulations of Grammaticality Judgments on Long-distance Dependencies', 'am': 'RNN simulations of Grammaticality Judges on Long-distance Dependencies', 'hy': 'Երկար հեռավորության կախվածությունների գրամմատիկական դատողությունների ՌՆՆ-ի սիմուլյացիան', 'az': 'Uzun uzaq bağlılıqları barəsində Gramatik hökmlərinin RNN Simulasyonları', 'bn': 'দীর্ঘ দূরত্বের নির্ভরে গ্রামাটিকিলিটি বিচারের সিমুলেশন', 'bs': 'RNN Simulacije Gramatičnih osuđenja o dalekoj zavisnosti', 'ca': 'RNN Simulations of Grammaticality Judgments on Long-Distance Dependencies', 'et': 'RNN Grammatilisuse kohtuotsuste simulatsioonid kaugsõltuvuse kohta', 'cs': 'RNN Simulace gramatických rozsudků na dálkových závislostech', 'fi': 'RNN:n kielioppisuuden simuloinnit kaukoriippuvuuksista', 'jv': 'Ngucap Simulasi Gram-Gram', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'RNN Simulacije slovničnih sodb o odvisnostih na dolge razdalje', 'he': 'סימוליציה RNN של שפטי גרמטיקות על תלויות במרחק ארוך', 'bo': 'RNN Grammaticality Judgments on Long-distance Dependencies'}
{'en': 'The paper explores the ability of LSTM networks trained on a language modeling task to detect linguistic structures which are ungrammatical due to extraction violations (extra arguments and subject-relative clause island violations), and considers its implications for the debate on language innatism. The results show that the current RNN model can correctly classify (un)grammatical sentences, in certain conditions, but it is sensitive to linguistic processing factors and probably ultimately unable to induce a more abstract notion of grammaticality, at least in the domain we tested.', 'ar': 'تستكشف الورقة قدرة شبكات LSTM المدربة على مهمة نمذجة اللغة لاكتشاف الهياكل اللغوية غير النحوية بسبب انتهاكات الاستخراج (الحجج الإضافية وانتهاكات جزيرة البند ذات الصلة بالموضوع) ، وتأخذ في الاعتبار آثارها على النقاش حول فطرية اللغة. تُظهر النتائج أن نموذج RNN الحالي يمكنه تصنيف الجمل النحوية (غير) بشكل صحيح ، في ظروف معينة ، لكنه حساس لعوامل المعالجة اللغوية وربما في النهاية غير قادر على إحداث فكرة أكثر تجريدية عن القواعد ، على الأقل في المجال الذي اختبرناه.', 'es': 'El documento explora la capacidad de las redes LSTM capacitadas en una tarea de modelado del lenguaje para detectar estructuras lingüísticas que no son gramaticales debido a violaciones de la extracción (argumentos adicionales y violaciones de la isla de cláusulas relativas al sujeto), y considera sus implicaciones para el debate sobre el innatismo del lenguaje. Los resultados muestran que el modelo RNN actual puede clasificar correctamente oraciones (des) gramaticales, en ciertas condiciones, pero es sensible a los factores de procesamiento lingüístico y probablemente en última instancia incapaz de inducir una noción más abstracta de gramaticalidad, al menos en el dominio que probamos.', 'pt': 'O artigo explora a capacidade de redes LSTM treinadas em uma tarefa de modelagem de linguagem para detectar estruturas linguísticas que não são gramaticais devido a violações de extração (argumentos extras e violações de ilha de cláusula relativa ao sujeito) e considera suas implicações para o debate sobre o inatismo da linguagem. Os resultados mostram que o atual modelo RNN pode classificar corretamente sentenças (não) gramaticais, em certas condições, mas é sensível a fatores de processamento linguístico e provavelmente incapaz de induzir uma noção mais abstrata de gramaticalidade, pelo menos no domínio que testamos.', 'fr': "L'article explore la capacité des réseaux LSTM formés à une tâche de modélisation linguistique à détecter les structures linguistiques qui ne sont pas grammaticales en raison de violations d'extraction (arguments supplémentaires et violations d'îlots de clauses relatives au sujet), et examine ses implications pour le débat sur l'innatisme linguistique. Les résultats montrent que le modèle RNN actuel permet de classer correctement les phrases (non) grammaticales, dans certaines conditions, mais qu'il est sensible aux facteurs de traitement linguistique et qu'il est probablement incapable d'induire une notion plus abstraite de grammaticalité, du moins dans le domaine que nous avons testé.", 'ja': 'この論文は、抽出違反（余分な引数と主題相対節の島嶼違反）に起因する非文法的な言語構造を検出する言語モデリングタスクで訓練されたLSTMネットワークの能力を探求し、言語本能主義の議論への影響を考察する。結果は、現在のRNNモデルが、特定の条件下で文法的な文を正しく分類することができることを示しているが、それは言語処理要因に敏感であり、少なくとも私たちがテストした領域では、文法性のより抽象的な概念を最終的に誘発することはできないだろう。', 'zh': '本文讨论语言建模务LSTM网络检取违规(额外参数与题对句岛违规)而不合语法语之能,而思其辩先天性。 结果表明今之RNN,可以正类(非)语法句也,其于言语也敏,而终不可诱语法名,少在吾域。', 'hi': 'पेपर भाषाई संरचनाओं का पता लगाने के लिए एक भाषा मॉडलिंग कार्य पर प्रशिक्षित एलएसटीएम नेटवर्क की क्षमता की पड़ताल करता है जो निष्कर्षण उल्लंघन (अतिरिक्त तर्क और विषय-सापेक्ष खंड द्वीप उल्लंघन) के कारण अव्याकरणिक हैं, और भाषा innatism पर बहस के लिए इसके निहितार्थ पर विचार करता है। परिणामों से पता चलता है कि वर्तमान आरएनएन मॉडल कुछ शर्तों में सही ढंग से (संयुक्त राष्ट्र) व्याकरणिक वाक्यों को वर्गीकृत कर सकता है, लेकिन यह भाषाई प्रसंस्करण कारकों के प्रति संवेदनशील है और संभवतः अंततः व्याकरण की अधिक अमूर्त धारणा को प्रेरित करने में असमर्थ है, कम से कम उस डोमेन में जिसका हमने परीक्षण किया था।', 'ru': 'В работе исследуется способность сетей LSTM, обученных задаче языкового моделирования, обнаруживать лингвистические структуры, которые являются неграмматичными из-за нарушений экстракции (дополнительные аргументы и нарушения субъектно-ориентированных клаузул), и рассматриваются ее последствия для дебатов о языковом иннатизме. Результаты показывают, что текущая модель RNN может правильно классифицировать (un)грамматические предложения, в определенных условиях, но она чувствительна к лингвистическим факторам обработки и, вероятно, в конечном итоге не может вызвать более абстрактное понятие грамматичности, по крайней мере, в области, которую мы тестировали.', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíonn an páipéar cumas líonraí LSTM atá oilte ar thasc samhaltú teanga chun struchtúir theangeolaíocha atá neamhghramadach de bharr sáruithe astarraingthe (argóintí breise agus sáruithe oileáin clásail a bhaineann le hábhar) a bhrath, agus déanann sé breithniú ar a impleachtaí don díospóireacht ar an neamhchiontacht teanga. Léiríonn na torthaí gur féidir leis an tsamhail RNN reatha abairtí gramadaí (un)a rangú i gceart, i gcoinníollacha áirithe, ach go bhfuil sé íogair d’fhachtóirí próiseála teanga agus is dócha nach féidir leis nóisean níos teibí den ghramadach a chothú, ar a laghad san fhearann a ndearnamar a thástáil.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის შესაძლებლობა LSTM ქსელების შესაძლებლობა, რომლებიც სიტყვების მოდელინციის რაოდენობაში განაკეთებული ენგრამისტიკური სტრუქტურების განაკეთება, რომლებიც არგრამიკურია ექსტრაქციის შეცდომად (ექსტრამი არ მიმდინარე RNN მოდელის შესაძლებელია მარტივი კლასიფიკაცია (un)grammatical phrases, განსაკუთრებული შესახებ, მაგრამ ეს სიგრძნობელია ენგურისტიკური პროცესის ფაქტორებისთვის და შესაძლებელია შეუძლებელია უფრო აბსტრაქტური გრამიკა', 'hu': 'A tanulmány a nyelvmodellezési feladatra kiképzett LSTM hálózatok azon képességét vizsgálja fel, amelyek az extrakciós megsértések miatt nem ismert nyelvi struktúrák (extra érvek és tárgyi relatív záradékszigetek megsértése) felismerésére irányulnak, és figyelembe veszi annak következményeit a nyelvi innatizmusról szóló vitára. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a jelenlegi RNN modell bizonyos körülmények között helyesen tudja osztályozni (nem)nyelvtani mondatokat, de érzékeny a nyelvi feldolgozási tényezőkre, és valószínűleg végső soron nem képes elvont nyelvtani fogalmat előidézni, legalábbis az általunk tesztelt területen.', 'el': 'Η εργασία διερευνά την ικανότητα των δικτύων που έχουν εκπαιδευτεί σε μια εργασία γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης να ανιχνεύουν γλωσσικές δομές που είναι μη γραμματικές λόγω παραβιάσεων εξαγωγής (επιπλέον επιχειρήματα και παραβιάσεις σχετικής ρήτρας νησιών), και εξετάζει τις επιπτώσεις της στη συζήτηση για τον γλωσσικό ενδοιασμό. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το σημερινό μοντέλο μπορεί να ταξινομήσει σωστά (μη)γραμματικές προτάσεις, σε ορισμένες συνθήκες, αλλά είναι ευαίσθητο σε γλωσσικούς παράγοντες επεξεργασίας και πιθανόν τελικά ανίκανο να προκαλέσει μια πιο αφηρημένη έννοια γραμματικότητας, τουλάχιστον στον τομέα που εξετάσαμε.', 'it': "L'articolo esplora la capacità delle reti LSTM formate su un compito di modellazione linguistica di rilevare strutture linguistiche che non sono grammaticali a causa di violazioni di estrazione (argomenti extra e violazioni delle clausole insulari relative al soggetto), e considera le sue implicazioni per il dibattito sull'innatismo linguistico. I risultati mostrano che l'attuale modello RNN può classificare correttamente frasi (non)grammaticali, in determinate condizioni, ma è sensibile ai fattori di elaborazione linguistica e probabilmente in ultima analisi incapace di indurre una nozione più astratta di grammaticalità, almeno nel dominio che abbiamo testato.", 'kk': 'Қағаздың LSTM желілерін зерттеу мүмкіндігін тілді модельген тапсырмасына түсіндіру үшін лингвистикалық құрылымдарды табу мүмкіндігін (қосымша аргументтер және тақырыпты тақырыптар аралының қарсылығын шешу) анықтайды және тілдердің Нәтижелер назардағы RNN үлгісі кейбір шарттарда (un) грамматикалық сөздерді дұрыс түрлене алады, бірақ ол лингвистикалық процессорлық факторларға сәтсіз және соңында грамматикалық түрлендірілігін көмектесе алмайды, кемінде біз тексерген', 'lt': 'Dokumente nagrinėjamas LSTM tinklų, apmokytų kalbų modeliavimo užduotimi atlikti, gebėjimas nustatyti kalbines struktūras, kurios nėra gramatinės dėl gavybos pažeidimų (papildomi argumentai ir su objektu susiję salų pažeidimai), ir nagrinėjamas jo poveikis diskusijoms dėl kalbų natizmo. The results show that the current RNN model can correctly classify (un)grammatical sentences, in certain conditions, but it is sensitive to linguistic processing factors and probably ultimately unable to induce a more abstract notion of grammaticality, at least in the domain we tested.', 'mk': 'Документот ја истражува способноста на мрежите на ЛСТМ обучени за задача за моделирање на јазиците да ги откријат јазичките структури кои се неграматични поради прекршувањата на екстракцијата (екстра аргументи и субјект-релативни клаузули за прекршувања на островот), и ги разгледува нејзините импл Резултатите покажуваат дека сегашниот РНН модел може правилно да ги класификува (не)граматичките реченици, во одредени услови, но е чувствителен на лингвистичките фактори за процес и најверојатно на крајот не може да индукцира поапстрактна идеја за граматичност, барем во доменот што го тестиравме.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi kemampuan rangkaian LSTM dilatih dalam tugas pemodelan bahasa untuk mengesan struktur bahasa yang tidak ramatik disebabkan pelanggaran ekstraksi (argumen tambahan dan pelanggaran kelas subjek-relatif pulau), dan mempertimbangkan implikasinya untuk debat tentang innatism bahasa. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa model RNN semasa boleh mengklasifikasikan kalimat (un)grammatik dengan betul, dalam keadaan tertentu, tetapi ia sensitif kepada faktor pemprosesan bahasa dan mungkin akhirnya tidak dapat mengakibatkan idea yang lebih abstrak grammatik, sekurang-kurangnya dalam domain yang kami uji.', 'mt': 'Id-dokument jesplora l-kapaċità tan-netwerks tal-LSTM imħarrġa fuq kompitu ta’ mudellar tal-lingwi li jidentifikaw strutturi lingwistiċi li mhumiex grammatiċi minħabba ksur tal-estrazzjoni (argumenti addizzjonali u ksur ta’ klawżola relattiva għas-suġġett tal-gżejjer), u jikkunsidra l-implikazzjonijiet tiegħu għad-dibattitu dwar l-innatiżmu lingwistiku. Ir-riżultati juru li l-mudell attwali ta’ RNN jista’ jikklassifika b’mod korrett sentenzi (mhux)grammatiċi, f’ċerti kundizzjonijiet, iżda huwa sensittiv għal fatturi ta’ pproċessar lingwistiku u probabbilment fl-a ħħar mill-aħħar ma jkunx jista’ jinduċi kunċett aktar astratt ta’ grammatika, tal-anqas fid-dominju li ttestjajna.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь хэлний загварын загварын талаар сургалтын LSTM сүлжээний чадварыг судалдаг. Энэ нь хэлний загварын зөрчилдөөний шалтгаан бус хэлний бүтэц байгууллагуудыг олж мэдэх боломжтой. Үүний үр дүнд орчин үеийн РНХ загвар зарим нөхцөлд зөв хэлбэрээр дүрслэж чадна. Гэхдээ энэ нь хэлний үйлдвэрлэлийн хүчин зүйлсийг мэдэрч чадна. Эцэст нь бидний шалгалтын дотор хамгийн бага зөвхөн грамматикийн тухай илүү abstract ойлголт гаргаж ча', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ലെസ്റ്റിം നെറ്റുകള്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ മോഡലിങ്ങ് ജോലിയില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ കഴിവ് പരിശീലനം കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. പുറത്തുകടക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഭാഷ ഘടനകള്\u200d കണ് നിലവിലുള്ള RNN മോഡല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് ശരിയായി വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു (un) ഗ്രാമാമ്രാമിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. പക്', 'ro': 'Lucrarea explorează capacitatea rețelelor LSTM instruite pe o sarcină de modelare lingvistică de a detecta structurile lingvistice care sunt ungrammaticale din cauza încălcărilor extracției (argumente suplimentare și încălcări ale insulelor de clauze relative subiectului) și ia în considerare implicațiile acesteia asupra dezbaterii privind înnăscutul limbajului. Rezultatele arată că modelul RNN actual poate clasifica corect propozițiile (ne)gramaticale, în anumite condiții, dar este sensibil la factorii de procesare lingvistică și probabil în cele din urmă incapabil să inducă o noțiune mai abstractă de gramaticalitate, cel puțin în domeniul pe care l-am testat.', 'no': 'Papiret utforskar kapasiteten for LSTM-nettverk som treng på eit språk-modelleringsoppgåve for å finna språk-strukturer som er ungrammatiske på grunn av ekstraksjonsviolasjonar (ekstra argumenter og oppgåver med temarelativ klausøyøyviolasjonar), og ser på implikasjonane for debatten om språk innatisme. Resultatet viser at den gjeldande RNN-modellen kan rett klassifisera (un)grammatiske setningar, i enkelte vilkår, men det er følgjande til språkstiske prosesseringsfaktorar og kanskje til slutt ikkje kunne indusera ein meir abstrakt noe om grammatikk, minst i domenet vi testa.', 'pl': 'W artykule zbadano zdolność sieci LSTM przeszkolonych w zadaniu modelowania językowego do wykrywania struktur językowych nieramatycznych z powodu naruszeń ekstrakcji (dodatkowe argumenty i naruszenia klauzul względnych) oraz rozważono jego implikacje dla debaty na temat innatyzmu językowego. Wyniki pokazują, że obecny model RNN potrafi prawidłowo klasyfikować zdania (un)gramatyczne, w pewnych warunkach, ale jest wrażliwy na czynniki przetwarzania językowego i prawdopodobnie ostatecznie nie jest w stanie wywołać bardziej abstrakcyjnego pojęcia gramatyczności, przynajmniej w badanej dziedzinie.', 'sr': 'U novinama istražuje sposobnost mreža LSTM obučenih na jezičkom modeliranju zadatka za otkrivanje jezičkih struktura koje su neprammatične zbog kršenja ekstrakcije (dodatnih argumenata i kršenja ostrva klauzula u odnosu na temu) i smatra njegovim implikacijama za raspravu o jezičkom innatizmu. Rezultati pokazuju da trenutni model RNN može ispravno klasifikirati (ne)gramatične rečenice, u određenim uvjetima, ali je osjetljiv na faktore obrade jezika i vjerojatno na kraju ne može izazvati apstraktniju ideju gramatike, barem u domenu koju smo testirali.', 'si': 'The papers Explore the Capbility of LSTM network Trained on a language Modeling job to Detect Linguaistic Strukts that are unrammatical for extraction brews (extra argmentation and Subject-family clause Island brews), and Considers its Imperials for the debut on language Innatisms. The scores show that the ongoing RNN Model can correctly classifie (un)Gramatical Sentences, in Certe Conditions, but it is sensive to language processing Factors and may at the end of the end of the day be inadequate to initiate a more extract node of gram maticity, at the minimal in the domain we tested.', 'so': 'Warqaddu wuxuu baaraandegayaa awoodda shabakada LSTM oo lagu baray shaqo tusaale ahaan luuqadda si uu u ogaado dhismaha luuqada oo ay u baahan yihiin kharribka dibadda (xadgudubyada wadajirka ah iyo jasiidka guud ee ku saabsan, wuxuuna ka fikiraa saamaynta debaanka ku saabsan injiilka luuqada. The results show that the current RNN model can correctly classify (un)grammatical sentences, in certain conditions, but it is sensitive to linguistic processing factors and probably ultimately unable to induce a more abstract notion of grammaticality, at least in the domain we tested.', 'sv': 'Uppsatsen undersöker förmågan hos LSTM-nätverk utbildade på en språkmodelleringsuppgift att upptäcka språkliga strukturer som inte är rammatiska på grund av extraktionsbrott (extra argument och ämnesrelaterade klausulsööverträdelser), och beaktar dess konsekvenser för debatten om språkinnebörd. Resultaten visar att den nuvarande RNN-modellen på ett korrekt sätt kan klassificera (o)grammatiska meningar, under vissa förhållanden, men den är känslig för språkliga processfaktorer och troligen inte i slutändan kan framkalla en mer abstrakt föreställning om grammatik, åtminstone inom den domän vi testade.', 'ur': 'The paper explores the ability of LSTM networks trained on a language modeling task to detect linguistic structures that are ungrammatical due to extraction violations (extra arguments and subject-relative clause islause violations), and considers its implications for the debate on language innatism. نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ موجود RNN موڈل (غیر) گراماتیکی جماعتیں (غیر) سیدھی طور پر کلاس کر سکتی ہیں، مگر یہ زبان پرسس فکتوروں کے ساتھ حساس ہے اور شاید بالآخر ہم آزمائش کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ غیر غیر غیر غیر معلوم ہو سکتے ہیں۔', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் LSTM வலைப்பின்னல்களின் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரியும் பணியில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளதை தெரியும் மொழி அமைப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும். வெளியேற்றங்களினால முடிவு', 'uz': "Qogʻoz tillar modelini aniqlash uchun LSTM tarmoqlarini o'rganish imkoniyatini o'rganadi. Bu tilni o'zgartirish muvaffaqiyatlarini aniqlash uchun o'zgarishni anglatadi. Natijalarni koʻrsatish mumkin, joriy RNN modeli haqida grammatikal maxsus soʻzlarni to ʻgʻri darajalashtirish mumkin, ammo bu lingvistik boshqaruv faktoriga juda foydalanuvchi bo'lgan va oxirida, biz tizimga kiritgan domen davomida ko'proq grammatika fikrlarini yaratib boʻlmadi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy tìm hiểu khả năng của các mạng LSD được đào tạo trong một nhiệm vụ tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ để phát hiện các cấu trúc ngôn ngữ không phức tạp do các vi phạm các quy tắc khai thác (lý luận thừa và các quy tắc về các vấn đề về các hòn đảo) và xem xét tác động của nó lên cuộc tranh luận về sinh ngữ. Kết quả cho thấy mẫu RNN hiện nay có thể phân loại chính xác (không) các câu từ ngữ, trong một số điều kiện, nhưng nó nhạy cảm với các yếu tố xử lý ngôn ngữ và có lẽ cuối cùng không thể tạo ra một khái niệm về ngôn ngữ văn học hơn, ít nhất là trong lĩnh vực chúng tôi thử nghiệm.', 'bg': 'Статията изследва способността на мрежите, обучени по задача за езиково моделиране, да откриват езикови структури, които са неграматични поради нарушения на екстракцията (допълнителни аргументи и нарушения на темата-относителната клауза на острова), и разглежда последиците от тях за дебата за езиковия инатизъм. Резултатите показват, че сегашният модел може правилно да класифицира (не)граматическите изречения при определени условия, но е чувствителен към факторите на лингвистичната обработка и вероятно в крайна сметка не може да предизвика по-абстрактно понятие за граматичност, поне в областта, която тествахме.', 'hr': 'U dokumentu istražuje sposobnost mreža LSTM obučenih na jezičkom modeliranju zadatka za otkrivanje jezičkih struktura koje su neprammatične zbog kršenja ekstrakcije (dodatnih argumenata i kršenja ostrva s temom relacionih klauzula) i smatra njegove implikacije za raspravu o jezičkom innatizmu. Rezultati pokazuju da trenutni model RNN može ispravno klasifikirati (ne)gramatične rečenice, u određenim uvjetima, ali osjetljiv je na činjenice obrade jezika i vjerojatno na kraju ne može izazvati više apstraktne pojme gramatičnosti, barem u domenu koju smo testirali.', 'nl': 'De paper onderzoekt het vermogen van LSTM netwerken getraind op een taalmodelleringstaak om taalstructuren te detecteren die niet-grammaticaal zijn als gevolg van extractie schendingen (extra argumenten en subject-relatieve clausule island schendingen), en overweegt de implicaties ervan voor het debat over taalinnatisme. De resultaten tonen aan dat het huidige RNN-model (on)grammaticale zinnen correct kan classificeren, onder bepaalde omstandigheden, maar gevoelig is voor linguïstische verwerkingsfactoren en waarschijnlijk uiteindelijk niet in staat is om een meer abstracte notie van grammaticaliteit op te wekken, althans in het domein dat we hebben getest.', 'da': 'Artiklen undersøger LSTM-netværks evne til at opdage sproglige strukturer, der er uvrammatiske på grund af ekstraktionskrænkelser (ekstra argumenter og emnerelative klausulsøkrænkelser), og undersøger dens konsekvenser for debatten om sproglig medvirken. Resultaterne viser, at den nuværende RNN-model korrekt kan klassificere (un)grammatiske sætninger, under visse betingelser, men den er følsom over for sproglige behandlingsfaktorer og sandsynligvis i sidste ende ikke kan fremkalde en mere abstrakt begreb om grammatik, i hvert fald inden for det område, vi testede.', 'ko': '본고는 언어 모델링 임무에서 훈련된 LSTM 네트워크 검측이 추출 충돌(추가 파라미터와 주어 관계가 구도에서 충돌함)으로 인해 문법에 부합되지 않는 언어 구조의 능력을 탐구하고 언어 본질론 변론에 미친 영향을 고려했다.그 결과 현재의 RNN 모델은 일정한 조건하에서 (비)문법 문장을 정확하게 분류할 수 있으나 언어 처리 요소에 민감하여 최종적으로 더욱 추상적인 문법적 개념을 귀납하지 못할 수도 있다. 적어도 우리가 테스트한 분야에서는 그렇다.', 'de': 'Der Beitrag untersucht die Fähigkeit von LSTM-Netzwerken, die auf einer Sprachmodellierungsaufgabe trainiert wurden, linguistische Strukturen zu erkennen, die aufgrund von Extraktionsverletzungen ungrammatisch sind (zusätzliche Argumente und subjektrelative Klauseln-Inselverletzungen), und untersucht deren Implikationen für die Debatte um Sprachinnatismus. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das gegenwärtige RNN-Modell (un)grammatische Sätze unter bestimmten Bedingungen korrekt klassifizieren kann, aber sensibel auf linguistische Verarbeitungsfaktoren ist und wahrscheinlich nicht in der Lage ist, zumindest in der von uns getesteten Domäne eine abstraktere Vorstellung von Grammatizität zu induzieren.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi kemampuan jaringan LSTM dilatih dalam tugas model bahasa untuk mendeteksi struktur bahasa yang tidak ramatis karena pelanggaran ekstraksi (argumen ekstra dan pelanggaran dari kelas subjek-relatif pulau), dan mempertimbangkan implikasinya untuk debat tentang innatisme bahasa. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa model RNN saat ini dapat mengklassifikasi kalimat (non)gramatika dengan benar, dalam kondisi tertentu, tetapi itu sensitif kepada faktor proyeksi bahasa dan mungkin akhirnya tidak dapat mengakibatkan ide yang lebih abstrak tentang gramatika, setidaknya dalam domain yang kami uji.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ توانایی شبکه\u200cهای LSTM را تحقیق می\u200cکند که بر روی یک کار مدل کردن زبان آموزش داده شده است تا ساختارهای زبان\u200cشناسی را شناسایی کند که به دلیل توطئه\u200cهای خلاف استخراج (توطئه\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای و توطئه\u200cهای جزیره\u200cهای نسبت به موضوع نسبت به موضوع) ناشناس نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل RNN فعلی می\u200cتواند به طور درست جمله\u200cهای گراماتیک (un) را در شرایط خاصی تغییر دهد، ولی این نسبت به faktori\u200cهای پردازش زبانی حساس است و احتمالاً در نهایت نمی\u200cتواند یک نظر مطلق\u200cتری از گراماتیک را تحریک کند، حداقل در دامنی که ما آزما', 'sw': 'Gazeti hilo linagundua uwezo wa mitandao ya LSTM inayofundishwa katika kazi ya mipango ya lugha ya kutambua miundombinu ya lugha ambazo ni muhimu kutokana na uvunjifu wa utoaji wa lugha (hoja za ziada na uvunjaji wa kisiwa kinachohusiana na maudhui), na inafikiri madhara yake kwa mjadala wa kuingilia lugha. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wa sasa wa RNN unaweza kutangaza viungo sahihi (usio)grammatika, katika hali fulani, lakini ni vizuri sana kwa sababu za uchunguzi wa lugha na labda hatimaye haiwezi kuanzisha dhana ya ukaribu zaidi, angalau katika eneo tulilojaribu.', 'sq': 'Gazeta shqyrton aftësinë e rrjeteve LSTM të trajnuar në një detyrë modelimi gjuhësor për të zbuluar struktura gjuhësore që janë jo-grammatike për shkak të shkeljeve të nxjerrjes (argumente shtesë dhe shkelje të klauzulës relative subjektore ishullore) dhe konsideron pasojat e saj për debatin mbi innatizmin gjuhësor. Rezultatet tregojnë se modeli aktual RNN mund të klasifikojë saktësisht frazat (jo)gramatike, në disa kushte, por është i ndjeshëm ndaj faktorëve të procesimit gjuhësor dhe ndoshta në fund të fundit nuk mund të induktojë një koncept më abstrakt të gramaticitetit, të paktën në domenin që testuam.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz dili modelleýän çözümleri çykarmak üçin bilim sistemalarynda bilim sistemalarynda bilim sistemasy çykyp bilmeýän (ekstra argümatlar we temalaryň adalaryň döwürmeleri) we bu taryşmalaryň netijesini çykarýar. Netijenler häzirki RNN modeliniň (un)gramatik sözleri belli şertlerde dogry bir şekilde klasifik edip biler diýip görkezilýär, ýöne bu sözleri lingwistiki işleýän faktörlere hasaplanyr we iň azyndan testindeki sahypalarda bir takyk abstrakt düşünmesine mümkin edip biler.', 'am': 'ፕሬዝዳንቱ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ ማድረጊያውን ለማግኘት የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ሥርዓቶችን ለማግኘት የሚቻለውን የLSTM መረብ ማድረጊያውን ይፈልጋል፡፡ ውጤቶቹ አሁን RNN model (un)grammatical sentences በመክፈት ይችላል (un)grammatical sentences በመክፈት ግን ለቋንቋዊ ፕሮጀክት ክፍተቶችን ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'af': "Die papier ondersoek die moontlikheid van LSTM-netwerke wat op 'n taal modellering taak opgelei is om lingwisiese strukture te ondersoek wat is onrammatiese vanweë uitpakkings gevolg (ekstra argumente en onderwerp-relatiewe klause-eilande oortredings), en ondersoek sy implikasies vir die debatting oor taal innatisme. Die resultate wys dat die huidige RNN-model kan korrek klassifiseer (un)grammatiese setings, in sekere voorwaardes, maar dit is sensitief na lingwisiese verwerkingsfaktors en waarskynlik waarskynlik nie moontlik om 'n meer abstrakte noesie van grammatiese, ten minste in die domein wat ons probeer het nie.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է ԼՍԹՄ ցանցերի հնարավորությունը, որոնք ուսումնասիրում են լեզվի մոդելավորման խնդրի վրա, բացահայտելու լեզվական կառուցվածքները, որոնք անգլամատիկ են արտահանման խախտումների պատճառով (ավելին բանավեճեր և թեմայի հարաբերական պայմաններ կղզի խա Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ ներկայիս ՌՆԹ-ի մոդելը կարող է ճիշտ դասակարգել (ոչ)գրամատիկ նախադասությունները որոշ պայմաններում, բայց այն զգայուն է լեզվական գործոնների նկատմամբ և հավանաբար ի վերջո անկարող է առաջացնել գրամատիկականության ավելի վերացական գաղափար, առնվազն այն ոլորտում', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি ভাষার মডেলিং কাঠামোর উপর প্রশিক্ষিত এলস্টিএম নেটওয়ার্কের ক্ষমতা খুঁজে বের করেছে যেগুলো নির্বাচনের কারণে ভাষাগত কাঠামো সনাক্ত করা যায় (বাড়িয়ে যুক্তি এবং বিষয় ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে বর্তমান RNN মডেল সঠিকভাবে বিশেষ পরিস্থিতিতে গ্রামাটিক্যাল বাক্য সংক্রান্ত করতে পারে, কিন্তু ভাষাগত প্রক্রিয়ার ক্ষেত্রে এটি সুবিধাজনক এবং সম্ভবত অবশেষে আমর', 'ca': "El paper explora l'habilitat de les xarxes LSTM entrenades en una tasca de modelació de llengües per detectar estructures lingüístices que no són gramàtiques a causa de violacions d'extracció (arguments adicionals i violacions de clàusula relativa al tema), i considera les seves implicacions per al debat sobre l'innatisme lingüístic. Els resultats demostren que el model actual de RNN pot classificar correctament frases (no)gramàtiques, en certes condicions, però és sensible a factores de processament lingüístic i probablement incapaç d'induir una noció més abstracta de gramàtica, almenys en el domini que vam provar.", 'cs': 'Článek zkoumá schopnost LSTM sítí vycvičených na jazykovém modelování detekovat jazykové struktury, které jsou v důsledku porušení extrakce (extra argumenty a porušení subjektu-relativních věcí ostrovních porušení), a zvažuje jejich důsledky pro debatu o jazykovém innatismu. Výsledky ukazují, že současný RNN model dokáže za určitých podmínek správně klasifikovat (un)gramatické věty, ale je citlivý na jazykové faktory zpracování a pravděpodobně nedokáže nakonec vyvolat abstraktnější pojem gramaticity, alespoň v oblasti, kterou jsme testovali.', 'et': 'Artiklis uuritakse keele modelleerimise ülesandeks koolitatud LSTM võrgustike suutlikkust tuvastada keelelisi struktuure, mis on ebaprrammatilised ekstraheerimisrikkumiste (lisaargumendid ja teemasuhtelise klausli saarte rikkumised) tõttu, ning kaalutakse selle mõju keele inatismi arutelule. Tulemused näitavad, et praegune RNN mudel suudab õigesti klassifitseerida (mitte)grammatilisi lauseid teatud tingimustel, kuid see on tundlik keelelise töötlemise faktoritele ja tõenäoliselt ei suuda lõpuks indutseerida abstraktsemat grammatilisuse mõistet vähemalt testitud valdkonnas.', 'fi': 'Artikkeli tutkii kielimallinnustehtävään koulutettujen LSTM-verkostojen kykyä havaita kielellisiä rakenteita, jotka ovat epägrammatisia ekstra-argumenttien ja subjekti-relatiivinen lauseke-saaririkkomusten vuoksi, ja tarkastelee sen vaikutuksia kielen synnillisyydestä käytävään keskusteluun. Tulokset osoittavat, että nykyinen RNN-malli pystyy luokittelemaan (ei)kieliopilliset lauseet oikein tietyissä olosuhteissa, mutta se on herkkä kielellisen prosessoinnin tekijöille eikä todennäköisesti lopulta kykene indusoimaan abstraktimpaa kieliopillisuuden käsitettä ainakaan testatulla alalla.', 'bs': 'U novinama istražuje sposobnost mreža LSTM obučenih na jezičkom modeliranju zadatka za otkrivanje jezičkih struktura koje su neprammatične zbog kršenja ekstrakcije (dodatnih argumenata i kršenja ostrva klauzula u odnosu na temu) i smatra svojim implikacijama za raspravu o jezičkom innatizmu. Rezultati pokazuju da trenutni model RNN može ispravno klasifikirati (ne)gramatične rečenice, u određenim uvjetima, ali je osjetljiv na faktore obrade jezika i vjerojatno na kraju ne može izazvati apstraktniju pojmu gramatičnosti, barem u domenu koju smo testirali.', 'az': 'Kağıt çətinliklərə görə təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri üzərində təhsil edilmiş LSTM a ğlarının yetkinliğini keşfetir və dil içərisində mübahisələri barəsində müzakirə etmək üçün təhsil edilmiş dil modelləri üzərində təhsil edilmiş dil quruluşlarını keşfetir. Sonuçlar göstərir ki, a ğımdaki RNN model in in (un)gramatik cümlələri, bəzi şartlarda doğru-düzgün dəyişdirə bilər, amma bu dil işləmə faktörlərinə hassaslıdır və ən azından imtahana çəkdiyimiz domain içində daha abstraktik bir fikir yaratmaz.', 'ha': "Gagon takarda na gane the abincin marubũta na LTRM wanda aka yi wa tunkuɗe a kan wani aikin misalin harshen zuwa a gane wa tsarin linguistic, wanda za'a gane su da muhimmada wanda za'a zartar da su (na zartar da wasu argument da abun jahawar da masu danganta), kuma yana ƙaddara mataimakonsa ga jayaya a cikin muhimmada na cikin harshe. Faramarra na nuna cewa misãlan RNN yanzu zai iya rarraba cewa (un)grammatisk cire, cikin wasu sharĩ'a, kuma amma yana mai sauri zuwa masu aikin linguistic ko kuma yana kasa ƙara ƙara zafi ga kalma na grammati, ko da kuma a lokacin da muka jarraba.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh kapan kanggo mbelaké olwih lan wiir-wiir tentang kanggo nyebokake ing nggawe sapa tindang nggunaken sistem sing wis ungrammatik dhéwé, seneng nggawe pancening dhéwé (tarjamahan liyané karo perusahaan langgar-wong), lan padha bener nggawe gerakan kanggo nyebokake nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nganggep ingkang urip. Rejalekan iku kelompok badhh (un)', 'sk': 'V prispevku raziskujemo sposobnost mrež LSTM, usposobljenih za nalogo jezikovnega modeliranja, da odkrijejo jezikovne strukture, ki so negrammatične zaradi kršitev ekstrakcije (dodatni argumenti in kršitve otoških določb o subjektivni relativni klavzuli), in obravnavamo njene posledice za razpravo o jezikovnem inatizmu. Rezultati kažejo, da lahko sedanji RNN model v določenih pogojih pravilno razvrsti (ne)slovnične stavke, vendar je občutljiv na jezikovne procesne dejavnike in verjetno na koncu ne more sprožiti bolj abstraktnega pojma slovničnosti, vsaj v domeni, ki smo jo testirali.', 'he': 'העיתון חוקר את היכולת של רשתות LSTM מאומנות על משימה דוגמנית שפות לגלות מבנים שפותיים שאינם רמאטיים בגלל הפרות החילוץ (ויכוחים נוספים והפסק יחסי הנושא על הפרות האי), ושקול את השלכות שלה לדיון על השפה אינטליזם. התוצאות מראות שהדוגמאל הנוכחי של RNN יכול לקlassify נכון משפטים (לא) גרמטיים, בתנאים מסויימים, אבל הוא רגיש לגורמים עיבוד שפתיים וכנראה בסופו של דבר לא מסוגל לגרום רעיון יותר אוסטרקטי של גרמטיקות, לפחות בתחום שבדיקנו.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་། The results show that the current RNN model can correctly classify (un)grammatical sentences, in certain conditions, but it is sensitive to linguistic processing factors and probably ultimately unable to induce a more abstract notion of grammaticality, at least in the domain we tested.'}
{'en': 'How Predictable is Your State? Leveraging Lexical and Contextual Information for Predicting Legislative Floor Action at the State Level', 'pt': 'Quão previsível é o seu estado? Aproveitando as informações lexicais e contextuais para prever a ação legislativa no nível estadual', 'ar': 'كيف يمكن التنبؤ هي دولتك؟ الاستفادة من المعلومات المعجمية والسياقية للتنبؤ بالإجراء التشريعي على مستوى الولاية', 'es': '¿Qué tan previsible es su estado? Aprovechamiento de la información léxica y contextual para predecir la acción legislativa a nivel estatal', 'fr': "Dans quelle mesure votre État est-il prévisible\xa0? Tirer parti des informations lexicales et contextuelles pour prédire l'action du plancher législatif au niveau de l'État", 'zh': '君形有多可测? 因词汇与上下文信息以占州立法底线动', 'ja': 'あなたの州はどの程度予測可能ですか？州レベルでの立法フロアアクションを予測するための語彙的および文脈的情報の活用', 'hi': 'आपका राज्य कितना अनुमानित है? राज्य स्तर पर विधायी मंजिल कार्रवाई की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए लेक्सिकल और प्रासंगिक जानकारी का लाभ उठाना', 'ru': 'Насколько предсказуемо ваше государство? Использование лексической и контекстуальной информации для прогнозирования законодательных мер на уровне штатов', 'ga': 'Cé chomh Intuartha atá do Stát? Eolas Foclaíochta agus Comhthéacsúil a Ghiaráil chun Gníomh Urlár Reachtaíochta a Thuar ag Leibhéal an Stáit', 'el': 'Πόσο προβλέψιμη είναι η κατάστασή σας; Αξιοποίηση Λεξικών και Περιεχομένων Πληροφοριών για την πρόβλεψη νομοθετικής δράσης σε επίπεδο κράτους', 'it': "Quanto è prevedibile il tuo stato? Sfruttare le informazioni lessicali e contestuali per prevedere l'azione legislativa a livello statale", 'hu': 'Mennyire előre látható az állapota? Lexikai és kontextuális információk kihasználása az állami szintű jogalkotási intézkedések előrejelzéséhez', 'ka': 'კჲლკჲ ვ ოპვეგთევრვლნჲ რგჲვრჲ ჟრაგჲ? Lexical and Contextual Information for Predicting Legislative Floor Action at the State Level', 'mk': 'Колку е предвидлива вашата состојба? Разголемување на лексикалната и контекстната информација за предвидување на легислативната акција на подот на државно ниво', 'kk': 'Сіздің күйіңіз қанша таңдауға болады? Күй деңгейіндегі законодатылық жағдай әрекетінің лексикалық және контекстік мәліметтері', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങളുടെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് എങ്ങനെയുണ്ട്? സ്റ്റേറ്റ് നിലപാടിലെ നിയമമായ നിലയിലെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളും വിവരങ്ങളും ലെവെര്\u200dവര', 'lt': 'Kaip numatoma Jūsų būklė? Leksinės ir kontekstinės informacijos, skirtos teisėkūros grindų veiksmų planavimui valstybės lygmeniu, sklaida', 'ms': 'Bagaimana boleh dijangka keadaan anda? Menegang Maklumat Lexik dan Konteksual untuk mencegah Tindakan Lantai Legislatif pada Aras Negeri', 'pl': 'Jak bardzo przewidywalny jest twój stan? Wykorzystanie informacji leksykalnych i kontekstowych do przewidywania działań legislacyjnych na szczeblu państwowym', 'mt': 'Kif jista’ jiġi mbassar l-Istat tiegħek? It-tisħiħ tal-Informazzjoni Lessika u Kuntest għat-Tbassir tal-Azzjoni Leġiżlattiva fuq l-Art fil-Livell tal-Istat', 'mn': 'Таны улс орнууд яаж таамаглах вэ? Улс төвшин дээрх хуулийн хөрсөн үйл ажиллагааг дэвшүүлэхэд', 'ro': 'Cât de previzibil este starea ta? Utilizarea informațiilor lexicale și contextuale pentru prevenirea acțiunilor legislative la nivel de stat', 'sr': 'Koliko je predvidljiva Vaša država? Uzimanje leksičkih i kontekstualnih informacija za predviđanje zakonodavnih akcija poda na državnom nivou', 'si': 'ඔයාගේ රජය කොච්චර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ද? ලෙක්සිකිසිකල් සහ සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විද', 'no': 'Kor foregåande er tilstanden din? Leverer leksisk og kontekst- informasjon for forventing av legislativ flønn på tilstandnivået', 'so': 'Sidee awood u leh dowladdaada? Wixii macluumaad ku saabsan qoraalka shaqada sharciga', 'sv': 'Hur förutsägbar är ditt tillstånd? Utnyttjande av Lexisk och sammanhangsinformation för att förutse lagstiftningsåtgärder på statlig nivå', 'ur': 'تمہاری وضعیت کس طرح پیش بینی ہے؟ سٹیٹ سٹیٹ سٹیٹ پر قانونی فلوری اقدام کی پیش بینی کے لئے لکسکسکسیل اور کنٹکسیٹ معلومات', 'ta': 'உங்கள் நாடு எவ்வாறு சுத்தமுடியும்? நாட்டு நிலையில் செயல்பாட்டின் முன்னேற்றப்படும் சட்டத்தில் உள்ளடக்கமான தகவல்', 'uz': '@ info Name', 'vi': 'Tình hình có hạn thế nào? Cung cấp thông tin ngôn ngữ và liên quan đến dự đoán hành động động động lập pháp ở cấp quốc gia', 'bg': 'Колко предвидимо е състоянието ви? Използване на лексикална и контекстуална информация за предвиждане на законодателни действия на държавно ниво', 'da': 'Hvor forudsigelig er din tilstand? Udnyttelse af Lexical and Contextual Information til at forudsige lovgivningsmæssige foranstaltninger på statsplan', 'nl': 'Hoe voorspelbaar is uw toestand? Lexicale en contextuele informatie gebruiken voor het voorspellen van wetgevingsmaatregelen op staatsniveau', 'hr': 'Koliko je predvidljiva Vaša država? Uticavanje leksičkih i kontekstalnih informacija za predviđanje zakonodavnih akcija poda na državnoj razini', 'de': 'Wie vorhersehbar ist Ihr Zustand? Nutzung von Lexika- und Kontextinformationen zur Vorhersage von Maßnahmen auf staatlicher Ebene', 'ko': '너의 상태는 얼마나 예측할 수 있니?어휘와 상하문 정보를 이용하여 주 1급 입법회 행동을 예측하다', 'id': 'Bagaimana bisa diharapkan keadaan Anda? Meningkatkan Informasi Lexik dan Konteksual untuk memprediksi tindakan lantai leġiżlatif di tingkat negara', 'fa': 'وضعيت شما چقدر پيش بيني ميکنه؟ تحت تأثیر اطلاعات سکسیکالی و متوسط برای پیش\u200cبینی اقدام طبقه قانونی در سطح ایالت', 'sw': 'Nchi yako inawezekana vipi? Taarifa za Kilexico na Maudhui kwa ajili ya Kujiandaa Tayari ya Sheria katika daraja la Serikali', 'af': 'Hoe voorskoubaar is u staat? Voorskou Leksiese en Konteksual Informasie vir voorskou Wegsaaklike Vloer Aksie by die Staat Vlak', 'sq': 'Sa e parashikueshme është shteti juaj? Leveraging Lexical and Contextual Information for Predicting Legislative Floor Action at the State Level', 'tr': 'Siziň Durumyňyz nähili Prezentebilir? Legislative Floor Action Durum Derjesinde Bejermek üçin Leksik we Kontekstal Maglumaty Jawanlaşdyrylýar', 'am': 'የአገር አገር እንዴት ይቻላል? Lexical and Contextual Information for Predicting Legislative Floor Action at the State Level', 'hy': 'Ինչքա՞ն է ձեր վիճակը կանխատեսելի: Լեքսիկական և կոնտեքստային տեղեկատվությունը նախատեսելու համար պետական մակարդակում', 'az': 'Sizin eyaletiniz nec톛 t톛dbir edir? Eyalet s톛viyy톛sind톛 Legislative Floor Action for Predicting Lexical and Contextual Information at the State Level', 'bn': 'তোমার রাষ্ট্র কতটা স্বীকার? Leveraging Lexical and Contextual Information for Predicting Legislative Floor Action at the State Level', 'bs': 'Koliko je predvidljiva Vaša država? Uticavanje leksičkih i kontekstualnih informacija za predviđanje zakonodavnih akcija poda na državnom nivou', 'ca': 'Com de predictible és el teu estat? Ampliar la informació lèxica i contextual per predir acció legislativa al nivell estatal', 'cs': 'Jak předvídatelný je váš stav? Využití Lexických a kontextových informací pro předvídání legislativních opatření na státní úrovni', 'et': 'Kui prognoositav on teie olukord? Lexikaalse ja kontekstiteabe kasutamine seadusandlike põrandategevuste prognoosimiseks riigi tasandil', 'fi': 'Kuinka ennakoitavissa tilasi on? Lexikaalisen ja kontekstuaalisen tiedon hyödyntäminen lainsäädäntötoimien ennakoimiseksi valtion tasolla', 'sk': 'Kako predvidljivo je tvoje stanje? Izkoriščanje leksičnih in kontekstualnih informacij za predvidevanje zakonodajnih ukrepov na državni ravni', 'ha': 'Yãya Taƙaitacce ne Halarinka? KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Piye durung kelas nang Statmu ? Ngawe Delokan Informasi Leksial lan Kontextual kanggo Aksi layang lejih dumadhi ning Daftar Stat', 'bo': 'ཁྱོད་ཀྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཅི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་ནུས་མེད་པ་ཡིན་ནམ། སྔོན་འཆར་བའི་ཤུལ་བ་དང་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྐོར་བྱེད་པ་དེ་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་རིམ་', 'he': 'כמה צפוי המדינה שלך? מעלה מידע לקסי וקונקסטוני על מנת לחזות פעולה רמה משפטית ברמה המדינה'}
{'en': 'Modeling U.S. Congressional legislation and roll-call votes has received significant attention in previous literature, and while legislators across 50 state governments and D.C. propose over 100,000 bills each year, enacting over 30 % of them on average, state level analysis has received relatively less attention due in part to the difficulty in obtaining the necessary data. Since each state legislature is guided by their own procedures, politics and issues, however, it is difficult to qualitatively asses the factors that affect the likelihood of a legislative initiative succeeding. We present several methods for modeling the likelihood of a bill receiving floor action across all 50 states and D.C. We utilize the lexical content of over 1 million bills, along with contextual legislature and legislator derived features to build our predictive models, allowing a comparison of what factors are important to the lawmaking process. Furthermore, we show that these signals hold complementary predictive power, together achieving an average improvement in accuracy of 18 % over state specific baselines.', 'ar': 'حظيت صياغة تشريعات الكونجرس الأمريكي وتصويت نداء الأسماء باهتمام كبير في الأدبيات السابقة ، وبينما يقترح المشرعون عبر 50 حكومة ولاية والعاصمة أكثر من 100000 مشروع قانون كل عام ، وسن أكثر من 30 ٪ منهم في المتوسط ، فقد حظي التحليل على مستوى الولاية باهتمام أقل نسبيًا يعود ذلك جزئياً إلى صعوبة الحصول على البيانات اللازمة. وبما أن الهيئة التشريعية في كل ولاية تسترشد بإجراءاتها وسياساتها وقضاياها الخاصة ، فمن الصعب إجراء تقييم نوعي للعوامل التي تؤثر على احتمالية نجاح مبادرة تشريعية. نقدم عدة طرق لنمذجة احتمالية تلقي مشروع قانون لإجراء أرضية عبر جميع الولايات الخمسين والعاصمة ، ونحن نستخدم المحتوى المعجمي لأكثر من مليون فاتورة ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع ميزات التشريع السياقي والمشرع لبناء نماذجنا التنبؤية ، مما يسمح بمقارنة ما العوامل مهمة لعملية سن القانون. علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أن هذه الإشارات تحمل قوة تنبؤية تكميلية ، وتحقق معًا متوسط تحسين في الدقة بنسبة 18٪ على خطوط الأساس الخاصة بالولاية.', 'pt': 'A modelagem da legislação do Congresso dos EUA e das votações nominais recebeu atenção significativa na literatura anterior e, embora os legisladores de 50 governos estaduais e DC proponham mais de 100.000 projetos de lei a cada ano, promulgando mais de 30% deles em média, a análise em nível estadual recebeu relativamente menos atenção devido em parte à dificuldade em obter os dados necessários. Uma vez que cada legislatura estadual é guiada por seus próprios procedimentos, políticas e questões, no entanto, é difícil avaliar qualitativamente os fatores que afetam a probabilidade de sucesso de uma iniciativa legislativa. Apresentamos vários métodos para modelar a probabilidade de um projeto de lei receber ação de plenário em todos os 50 estados e D.C. Utilizamos o conteúdo lexical de mais de 1 milhão de projetos de lei, juntamente com legislatura contextual e recursos derivados do legislador para construir nossos modelos preditivos, permitindo uma comparação do que fatores são importantes para o processo legislativo. Além disso, mostramos que esses sinais possuem poder preditivo complementar, alcançando uma melhoria média na precisão de 18% em relação às linhas de base específicas do estado.', 'fr': "La modélisation de la législation du Congrès américain et des votes par appel nominal a fait l'objet d'une attention particulière dans la littérature précédente, et alors que les législateurs de 50 gouvernements d'États et de D.C. proposent plus de 100 000 projets de loi chaque année, promulguant plus de 30\xa0% d'entre eux en moyenne, l'analyse au niveau des États a reçu relativement moins d'attention en partie en raison de la difficulté d'obtenir les données nécessaires. Étant donné que chaque législature de chaque État est guidée par ses propres procédures, politiques et questions, il est toutefois difficile d'évaluer qualitativement les facteurs qui influent sur la probabilité de succès d'une initiative législative. Nous présentons plusieurs méthodes pour modéliser la probabilité qu'un projet de loi reçoive une action plancher dans les 50 États et D.C. Nous utilisons le contenu lexical de plus d'un million de projets de loi, ainsi que des caractéristiques contextuelles dérivées de la législature et du législateur pour construire nos modèles prédictifs, permettant une comparaison des facteurs importants pour le processus législatif. En outre, nous montrons que ces signaux ont une puissance prédictive complémentaire, ce qui permet d'obtenir ensemble une amélioration moyenne de la précision de 18\xa0% par rapport aux niveaux de référence spécifiques à l'État.", 'es': 'El modelado de la legislación del Congreso de los Estados Unidos y las votaciones nominales ha recibido una atención significativa en la literatura anterior, y aunque los legisladores de 50 gobiernos estatales y D.C. proponen más de 100,000 proyectos de ley cada año, promulgando más del 30% de ellos en promedio, el análisis a nivel estatal ha recibido relativamente menos atención debido en parte a la dificultad de obtener los datos necesarios. Sin embargo, dado que cada legislatura estatal se guía por sus propios procedimientos, políticas y asuntos, es difícil evaluar cualitativamente los factores que afectan la probabilidad de que una iniciativa legislativa tenga éxito. Presentamos varios métodos para modelar la probabilidad de que un proyecto de ley reciba una acción de piso en los 50 estados y D.C. Utilizamos el contenido léxico de más de 1 millón de proyectos de ley, junto con características contextuales derivadas de la legislatura y el legislador para construir nuestros modelos predictivos, lo que permite una comparación de los factores importante para el proceso legislativo. Además, demostramos que estas señales tienen un poder predictivo complementario, logrando en conjunto una mejora promedio en la precisión del 18% con respecto a las líneas de base específicas del estado.', 'zh': '拟美国国会立法及唱名投票于前文献极为关注,虽50一州政府D.C立法者岁言过100,000项法案,均颁过30%,但州一级之析受相少,盖难得之数也。 然每州立法机构以序政为先,故难以质论立法之成也。 臣等条上数法,以拟法案于一切50个州D.C得底线讼之可能。 吾以过100万项法案之词汇,及上下文立法机构立法者衍生之征,以立吾占,可以较哪些因素立法之要。 此外,表明有互补之占,比于州特定基线,均致18%准确性。', 'ja': '米国議会の立法と点呼投票のモデル化は以前の文献で大きな注目を集めており、50の州政府とワシントンD.C.の立法者は毎年10万を超える法案を提案し、平均してその30 ％以上を制定しているが、州レベルの分析は、必要なデータを入手することが困難であるため、比較的注目を集めていない。 しかしながら、各州の立法府は独自の手続き、政治、問題によって指導されているため、立法のイニシアチブが成功する可能性に影響を与える要因を定性的に評価することは困難である。 私たちは、すべての50州とワシントンD.C.で法案がフロアアクションを受ける可能性をモデル化するためのいくつかの方法を提示しています。私たちは、100万を超える法案の語彙的な内容と、文脈的な立法府および立法者由来の機能を利用して、私たちの予測モデルを構築し、立法プロセスに重要な要素の比較を可能にします。 さらに、これらの信号は相補的な予測力を有し、共に州特有のベースラインよりも18%の精度の平均的な改善を達成することを示しています。', 'hi': 'अमेरिकी कांग्रेस के कानून और रोल-कॉल वोटों को मॉडलिंग ने पिछले साहित्य में महत्वपूर्ण ध्यान दिया है, और जबकि 50 राज्य सरकारों और डी.C के विधायकों ने हर साल 100,000 से अधिक बिलों का प्रस्ताव दिया है, औसतन उनमें से 30% से अधिक को लागू करते हुए, राज्य स्तर के विश्लेषण को आवश्यक डेटा प्राप्त करने में कठिनाई के कारण अपेक्षाकृत कम ध्यान दिया गया है। चूंकि प्रत्येक राज्य विधायिका अपनी प्रक्रियाओं, राजनीति और मुद्दों द्वारा निर्देशित होती है, हालांकि, उन कारकों को गुणात्मक रूप से गधे करना मुश्किल है जो विधायी पहल के सफल होने की संभावना को प्रभावित करते हैं। हम सभी 50 राज्यों और डी.C में फर्श कार्रवाई प्राप्त करने वाले बिल की संभावना को मॉडलिंग के लिए कई तरीके प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम अपने पूर्वानुमानित मॉडल बनाने के लिए प्रासंगिक विधायिका और विधायक व्युत्पन्न सुविधाओं के साथ-साथ 1 मिलियन से अधिक बिलों की लेक्सिकल सामग्री का उपयोग करते हैं, जिससे कानून बनाने की प्रक्रिया के लिए कौन से कारक महत्वपूर्ण हैं, इसकी तुलना की जा सकती है। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि ये संकेत पूरक भविष्यवाणी शक्ति रखते हैं, साथ ही साथ राज्य विशिष्ट आधार रेखाओं पर 18% की सटीकता में औसत सुधार प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Моделированию законодательства Конгресса США и поименному голосованию было уделено значительное внимание в предыдущей литературе, и в то время как законодатели в 50 правительствах штатов и округе Колумбия предлагают более 100 000 законопроектов каждый год, приняв более 30% из них в среднем, анализ на уровне штатов получил относительно меньшее внимание из-за трудностей с получением необходимых данных. Поскольку законодательный орган каждого штата руководствуется своими собственными процедурами, политикой и вопросами, однако трудно качественно оценить факторы, влияющие на вероятность успешного осуществления законодательной инициативы. Мы предлагаем несколько методов моделирования вероятности принятия законопроекта к рассмотрению во всех 50 штатах и округе Колумбия. Мы используем лексическое содержание более 1 миллиона законопроектов, наряду с контекстуальными законодательными и законодательными функциями для построения наших прогностических моделей, позволяющих сравнивать, какие факторы важны для законотворческого процесса. Кроме того, мы показываем, что эти сигналы обладают комплементарной прогностической мощностью, вместе обеспечивая среднее улучшение точности на 18% по сравнению с базовыми линиями, зависящими от состояния.', 'ga': 'Tá aird shuntasach tugtha sa litríocht roimhe seo ar shamhaltú reachtaíochta Comhdhála na SA agus vótaí rolla-ghlao, agus cé go molann reachtóirí thar 50 rialtas stáit agus DC níos mó ná 100,000 bille gach bliain, ag achtú níos mó ná 30% díobh ar an meán, is lú an aird a tugadh ar anailís ar leibhéal an stáit. go páirteach mar gheall ar an deacracht a bhaineann leis na sonraí riachtanacha a fháil. Ós rud é go bhfuil gach reachtas stáit á threorú ag a nósanna imeachta, a bpolaitíocht agus a saincheisteanna féin, áfach, tá sé deacair measúnú cáilíochtúil a dhéanamh ar na fachtóirí a théann i bhfeidhm ar an dóchúlacht go n-éireoidh le tionscnamh reachtach. Cuirimid i láthair roinnt modhanna chun samhaltú a dhéanamh ar an dóchúlacht go bhfaighidh bille gníomh urláir ar fud na 50 stát go léir agus DC. Bainimid úsáid as ábhar foclóireachta os cionn 1 milliún billí, mar aon le gnéithe reachtacha comhthéacsúla agus reachtóirí chun ár samhlacha réamh-mheastacháin a thógáil, rud a ligeann do chomparáid a dhéanamh ar cad tá fachtóirí tábhachtacha don phróiseas reachtóireachta. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go bhfuil cumhacht chomhlántach réamhaithriseach ag na comharthaí seo, le chéile ag baint amach meánfheabhsú 18% ar chruinneas thar bhunlínte a bhaineann go sonrach leis an stát.', 'el': 'Η μοντελοποίηση της νομοθεσίας του Κογκρέσου των ΗΠΑ και των ονομαστικών ψήφων έχει λάβει σημαντική προσοχή στην προηγούμενη βιβλιογραφία, και ενώ οι νομοθέτες των 50-πολιτειακών κυβερνήσεων και της Ουάσινγκτον προτείνουν πάνω από 100.000 νομοσχέδια κάθε χρόνο, θεσπίζοντας πάνω από 30% από αυτά κατά μέσο όρο, η ανάλυση σε κρατικό επίπεδο έχει λάβει σχετικά λιγότερη προσοχή λόγω εν μέρει της δυσκολίας απόκτησης των απαραίτητων δεδομένων. Δεδομένου όμως ότι κάθε νομοθετικό σώμα του κράτους καθοδηγείται από τις δικές του διαδικασίες, πολιτικές και ζητήματα, είναι δύσκολο να αξιολογηθεί ποιοτικά οι παράγοντες που επηρεάζουν την πιθανότητα επιτυχίας μιας νομοθετικής πρωτοβουλίας. Παρουσιάζουμε διάφορες μεθόδους για τη μοντελοποίηση της πιθανότητας λήψης δράσης σε ένα νομοσχέδιο σε όλες τις 50-πολιτείες και την Ουάσινγκτον. Χρησιμοποιούμε το λεξικό περιεχόμενο πάνω από ένα εκατομμύριο νομοσχέδια, μαζί με χαρακτηριστικά που προέρχονται από το νομοθετικό σώμα και το νομοθέτη για να χτίσουμε τα προγνωστικά μοντέλα μας, επιτρέποντας τη σύγκριση των παραγόντων που είναι σημαντικοί για τη νομοθετική διαδικασία. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι αυτά τα σήματα κατέχουν συμπληρωματική προγνωστική ισχύ, επιτυγχάνοντας από κοινού μια μέση βελτίωση στην ακρίβεια 18% σε σχέση με τις συγκεκριμένες γραμμές βάσης.', 'hu': 'Az amerikai kongresszusi jogszabályok modellezése és név szerinti szavazások jelentős figyelmet kaptak a korábbi irodalomban, és míg 50 állami kormány és D.C. törvényhozói évente több mint 100 000 törvényjavaslatot tesznek javaslatba, amelyek átlagosan több mint 30%-át fogadják el, az állami szintű elemzés viszonylag kevesebb figyelmet kapott, részben a szükséges adatok megszerzésének nehézsége miatt. Mivel azonban minden állami jogalkotó saját eljárásai, politikái és kérdései irányítják, nehéz minőségi szempontból felmérni azokat a tényezőket, amelyek befolyásolják a jogalkotási kezdeményezés sikerének valószínűségét. Számos módszert mutatunk be annak valószínűségének modellezésére, hogy egy törvényjavaslat mind az 50 államban, mind D.C.-ben kerüljön sor. Több mint 1 millió törvényjavaslat lexikai tartalmát, valamint kontextuális törvényhozási és törvényhozói származtatott funkciókat használjuk fel prediktív modelleink kialakításához, lehetővé téve a törvényhozási folyamat szempontjából fontos tényezők összehasonlítását. Ezenkívül megmutatjuk, hogy ezek a jelek kiegészítő prediktív teljesítménnyel rendelkeznek, és együttesen átlagosan 18%-os pontossági javulást érnek el az államspecifikus alapvető értékekhez képest.', 'ka': 'ამერიკის კონგრესიის წესების მოდელმაცია და კონგრესიის მიღება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი მიღება წინ ლიტერიტურაში, და 50 ღირეულ წესების და D.C. წესში უფრო მეტი 100 000 წესების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც მათგანგან მეტი 30% დამატებით, განსაზღვრებით სახელსაწ რადგან ყოველ ქვეყნების legislature იქნება თავის პროცესტებით, პოლიტიკური და პრობლემებით, მაგრამ კვალიტატიურად შეუძლებელია, რომ კვალიტატიურად აღმოჩენოთ ფაქტორები, რომლებიც შეი ჩვენ გამოყენებთ რამდენიმე მეტი, რომელიც აღმოჩენებულია წინაწერის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ყველა 50 ქვეყნებით და D.C. შორის წინაწერებით. ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ლექსიკალური ინტერნექტის 1 მილიონის წინაწერების შესაძლებლობა, და კონტექსტური legi დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს სიგნალები კომპლენტერიური წარმოდგენებელი ძალიან, ერთად ერთადერთად სხვადასხვა წარმოდგენება 18%-ის წარმოდგენებაში სხვადასხვა', 'it': "Modellare la legislazione del Congresso degli Stati Uniti e i voti per appello nominale ha ricevuto un'attenzione significativa nella letteratura precedente, e mentre i legislatori di 50 governi statali e DC propongono oltre 100.000 progetti di legge ogni anno, emanando oltre il 30% di essi in media, l'analisi a livello statale ha ricevuto relativamente meno attenzione a causa in parte della difficoltà nell'ottenere i dati necessari. Poiché ogni legislatore statale è guidato dalle proprie procedure, politiche e questioni, tuttavia, è difficile valutare qualitativamente i fattori che influenzano la probabilità di successo di un'iniziativa legislativa. Presentiamo diversi metodi per modellare la probabilità che un disegno di legge riceva un'azione di base in tutti i 50 stati e Washington. Utilizziamo il contenuto lessicale di oltre 1 milione di leggi, insieme a caratteristiche contestuali legislative e legislative derivate per costruire i nostri modelli predittivi, consentendo un confronto di quali fattori sono importanti per il processo legislativo. Inoltre, mostriamo che questi segnali possiedono una potenza predittiva complementare, ottenendo insieme un miglioramento medio della precisione del 18% rispetto alle linee di base specifiche dello stato.", 'lt': 'Ankstesnėje literatūroje daug dėmesio buvo skiriama JAV kongreso teisės aktų modeliavimui ir vardiniams balsams, o 50 valstybių vyriausybių ir D.C. įstatymų leidėjai kasmet siūlo daugiau kaip 100 000 projektų projektų projektų projektus, kurių vidutiniškai sudaro daugiau kaip 30 proc., o valstybės lygmens analizė iš dalies buvo skiriama palyginti mažiau dėmesio dėl sunkumų gauti reikalingus duomenis. Kadangi kiekvienas valstybės teisės aktų leidėjas vadovaujasi savo pačių procedūromis, politika ir klausimais, sunku kokybiškai įvertinti veiksnius, darančius įtaką teisėkūros iniciatyvos sėkmės tikimybei. Mes pristatome keletą metodų, kaip modeliuoti galimybę, kad projekto projektas gautų viršutinius veiksmus visose 50 valstybių ir D.C. Mes naudojame daugiau kaip 1 mln. projekto projekto projektų tekstinį turinį kartu su kontekstiniais teisės aktų leidėjais ir teisės aktų leidėjais parengtomis savybėmis, kad sukurtume prognozuojamus modelius, leidžiančius palyginti, kokie veiksniai yra svarbūs teisėkūros procesui. Furthermore, we show that these signals hold complementary predictive power, together achieving an average improvement in accuracy of 18% over state specific baselines.', 'kk': 'АҚШ-ның конгрессиялық законодатылығын түрлендіру және түрлендіру сайлаулары алдыңғы литературада маңызды түсіндірілген, және 50 штаттық үкіметтер мен ДК-ның ережелері ең жылда 100 000 жылдан артық сайлауды ұсынып, олардың орташа 30% деңгейінде орташа шектеп, күй Әрбір күй-жайы законодаторы өзінің процедурлері, саясаты және мәселелері бойынша бағытталған, бірақ саясаттары және бағытталған заң шығару инициативының мүмкіндігіне әсер ететін факторларды көбірек Біз бірнеше әдістерді бағдарламалардың 50 штаттар мен ДК-ның әрекеттерінің модельдігін модельдіру үшін бірнеше әдістерді таңдаймыз. Біз 1 миллион көлемінің лексикалық мазмұнын қолданып, бағдарламалық модельдерімізді құру үшін бағдарламалық модельдерді Сонымен қатар, бұл сигналдар күй- жай негізгі жолдарда орташа 18% деңгейіндегі жақсарту үшін қосымша бағдарламалық қуатты ұстайды.', 'ms': 'Memodelkan undang-undang Kongres Amerika Syarikat dan suara panggilan-nama telah menerima perhatian yang signifikan dalam literatur terdahulu, dan sementara para undang-undang di seluruh 50 kerajaan negara dan D.C. melamar lebih 100,000 bil setiap tahun, membolehkan lebih 30% daripada mereka secara rata-rata, analisis aras negara telah menerima perhatian relatif kurang sebab sebahagian daripada kesulitan dalam mendapatkan data yang diperlukan. Oleh kerana setiap undang-undang negara dipandu oleh prosedur, politik dan isu mereka sendiri, bagaimanapun, ia sukar untuk menilai kualitatif faktor yang mempengaruhi kemungkinan inisiatif undang-undang berjaya. Kami memperkenalkan beberapa kaedah untuk memmodelkan kemungkinan bagi bil menerima tindakan lantai di seluruh 50 negara dan D.C. Kami menggunakan kandungan leksik lebih dari 1 juta bil, bersama-sama dengan legislatur kontekstual dan ciri-ciri dibuat oleh legislator untuk membina model ramalan kami, membolehkan perbandingan faktor apa yang penting untuk proses pembuat undang-undang. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahawa isyarat ini mempunyai kuasa ramalan tambahan, bersama-sama mencapai peningkatan rata-rata dalam ketepatan 18% atas garis dasar khusus negara.', 'mk': 'Моделирањето на легислативата на американскиот конгрес и гласовите по името доби значително внимание во претходната литература, и додека легислативите од 50 државни влади и Вашингтон предлагаат преку 100.000 закони годишно, овозможувајќи во просек над 30 отсто од нив, анализата на државно ниво доби релативно помалку внимание, делумно поради Сепак, со оглед на тоа што секој државен законодавец е воден од своите процедури, политика и прашања, тешко е квалитетно да се проценат факторите кои влијаат на веројатноста на успех на законодавната иницијатива. Презентираме неколку методи за моделирање на веројатноста дека нацрт-законот ќе добие акција на подот низ сите 50 држави и Вашингтон. Ја користиме лексикалната содржина од повеќе од 1 милион нацрт-закони, заедно со контекстуалните законодавствени и законодавните карактеристики за изградба на нашите предвидливи модели, овозможувајќи Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека овие сигнали имаат комплементарна предвидлива моќ, заедно постигнувајќи просечно подобрување на точноста од 18 отсто во однос на државните специфични бази.', 'mt': 'L-immudellar tal-leġiżlazzjoni kongressiva tal-Istati Uniti u l-voti b’sejħa nominali rċevew attenzjoni sinifikanti fil-letteratura preċedenti, u filwaqt li l-leġiżlaturi minn 50 gvern tal-Istat u d-D.C. jipproponu aktar minn 100,000 abbozz ta’ liġi kull sena, li jippermettu aktar minn 30 % minnhom bħala medja, analiżi fil-livell tal-Istat irċeviet relattivament inqas attenzjoni minħabba parzjalment id-diffikultà biex tinkiseb id-dejta meħtieġa. Minħabba li kull leġiżlatura tal-Istat hija ggwidata mill-proċeduri, il-politika u l-kwistjonijiet tagħhom stess, madankollu, huwa diffiċli li jiġu evalwati b’mod kwalitattiv il-fatturi li jaffettwaw il-probabbiltà ta’ suċċess ta’ inizjattiva leġiżlattiva. Aħna nippreżentaw diversi metodi għall-immudellar tal-probabbiltà li abbozz ta’ liġi jirċievi azzjoni fuq l-art madwar il-50 Stat u d-D.C. Aħna nużaw il-kontenut lexiku ta’ aktar minn miljun abbozz ta’ liġi, flimkien mal-karatteristiċi tal-leġiżlatura kuntestwali u dawk derivati mil-leġiżlatur biex nibnu l-mudelli ta’ tbassir tagħna, li jippermettu paragun ta’ liema fatturi huma importanti għall-proċess tat Barra minn hekk, nuru li dawn is-sinjali għandhom saħħa kumplimentari ta’ tbassir, flimkien li jiksbu titjib medju fil-preċiżjoni ta’ 18 % fuq linji bażi speċifiċi għall-istat.', 'ml': 'മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന അമേരിക്കന്\u200d നിയമങ്ങളും റോള്\u200d ഫോള്\u200d വോട്ടുകളും മുമ്പുള്ള സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d ഗുരുതരമായ ശ്രദ്ധ കിട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വര്\u200dഷത്തില്\u200d 50 രാജ്യത്തിലെ ഗവണ്മെന്റുകള്\u200dക്കും ഡി.സി നിയമങ്ങള്\u200d എല്ലാ രാജ്യത്തെ നിയമങ്ങളും സ്വന്തം പ്രക്രിയകളും രാഷ്ട്രീയത്തിലും പ്രശ്നങ്ങളും കൊണ്ട് നേര്\u200dവഴിയിലാക്കുന്നതിനാലും, നിയമപ്രക്രിയയുടെ സാധ്യതക 50 രാജ്യങ്ങളിലും ഡിസിയിലും മുഴുവന്\u200d നില പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ബില്ലിന്റെ സാധ്യതകള്\u200d മാതൃകയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പല രീതികളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. നിയമത്തിലെ നിയമങ്ങളും നിയമപ്രകൃതികളും ഉണ്ടാക് അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു ഈ സിഗ്നലുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന ശക്തിയുണ്ട്, സ്റ്റേറ്റേറ്റ് പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ബെസ്റ്', 'mn': 'АНУ-ын конгрессийн хуулийн загвар, уран зохиолын сонголтыг загварчлах нь өмнөх уран зохиолд маш их анхаарал авсан. 50 улсын засгийн газрын засгийн газрын болон ДХ-ын засгийн газрын засгийн газрын шийдвэрлэгчид жил бүр 100 мянган хууль төрөгчийн хууль төрөгчийн дундаж 30 хувийг ашиглаж байдаг Улс төрийн хуулийн захирамж бүр өөрсдийн хуулийн, улс төрийн, асуудлуудыг удирдаж байгаа учраас хуулийн инициативын амжилтын магадлалыг нөлөөлдөг хүчин зүйлсийг батлах нь хэцүү. Бид 50 улс болон ДОК дахь зөвлөгөө авах хуулийн магадлалыг загварчлахын тулд олон арга загвар тайлбарлаж байна. Бид 1 сая гаруй хуулийн загварын хэмжээг ашиглаж, орчин үеийн хуулийн загвар болон хуулийн загварчид бидний таамаглалтын загварыг бүтээх боломжтой болгон хуулийн загварын Үүнээс гадна бид эдгээр сигналууд улс төрөлхтний суурь шугам шугам дээр дундаж 18%-ын тодорхойлолтой байдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'Modelowanie prawodawstwa Kongresu USA i głosów imiennych cieszyło się znaczną uwagą w poprzedniej literaturze, a podczas gdy ustawodawcy w rządach pięćdziesięciu stanów i stolicy proponują ponad 100.000 ustaw każdego roku, wprowadzając w życie ponad 30% z nich średnio, analiza na poziomie stanu pośrednio zwróciła uwagę ze względu na trudności w uzyskaniu niezbędnych danych. Ponieważ jednak każdy ustawodawca państwowy kieruje się własnymi procedurami, polityką i kwestiami, trudno jest ocenić jakościowo czynniki wpływające na prawdopodobieństwo sukcesu inicjatywy legislacyjnej. Przedstawiamy kilka metod modelowania prawdopodobieństwa otrzymania przez ustawę skargi na pięćdziesiąt stanów i stolicy. Wykorzystujemy zawartość leksykalną ponad miliona ustaw, wraz z kontekstowymi funkcjami ustawodawcy do budowy naszych modeli predykcyjnych, umożliwiającymi porównanie czynników ważnych dla procesu ustawodawstwa. Ponadto pokazujemy, że sygnały te posiadają uzupełniającą siłę predykcyjną, wspólnie osiągając średnią poprawę dokładności 18% w stosunku do linii bazowych dla danego stanu.', 'ro': 'Modelarea legislației Congresului SUA și a voturilor prin apel nominal a primit o atenție semnificativă în literatura anterioară, și în timp ce legiuitorii din 50 de guverne de stat și D.C. propun peste 100.000 de proiecte de lege în fiecare an, adoptând peste 30% dintre ele în medie, analiza la nivel de stat a primit relativ mai puțină atenție datorită în parte dificultății în obținerea datelor necesare. Deoarece fiecare legiuitor de stat este ghidat de propriile proceduri, politici și probleme, este dificil să se evalueze calitativ factorii care afectează probabilitatea succesului unei inițiative legislative. Prezentăm mai multe metode pentru modelarea probabilității ca o lege să primească acțiune la sol în toate cele 50 de state și D.C. Utilizăm conținutul lexical al peste 1 milion de proiecte de lege, împreună cu caracteristicile contextuale ale legislativului și ale legiuitorului pentru a construi modelele noastre predictive, permițând o comparație a factorilor importanți pentru procesul legislativ. Mai mult decât atât, arătăm că aceste semnale dețin o putere predictivă complementară, obținând împreună o îmbunătățire medie a preciziei de 18% față de liniile de bază specifice statului.', 'no': 'Modellering av amerikanske kongresiske lovgivnader og roll-samtaler har fått signifikante oppmerksomhet i tidlegare literatur, og mens lovgivnader over 50 ståndregjeringar og D.C. foreslår over 100.000 regjeringar kvar år, som gjennomsnittlig brukar over 30 % av dei, har tilstandssanalysen mottatt relativt mindre oppmerksomhet på grunn av vanskeligheten for å få dei nødvendige data. Siden kvar tilstandsslovgivning er retninga av sine egne prosedyrar, politikk og problemar, er det likevel vanskeleg å kvalitativt vurdere faktorene som påvirkar sannsynligheten for ein legislativ initiativ. Vi presenterer fleire metoder for å modellere sannsynligheten for ein lovbill som mottar gulhandlingar over alle 50 tilstandar og D.C. Vi bruker leksisk innhaldet over 1 millioner billar, saman med kontekstlege lovgivnader og lovgivnader avhengige funksjonar for å bygge våre foregåve modeller, slik at vi kan sammenligne kva faktorer er viktig for lovgivnaden. I tillegg viser vi at desse signalene inneheld komplementær forebyggingskraft, samtidig som gjennomsnittlig forbedring i nøyaktighet av 18 % over tilstandsspesifikke baselinjer.', 'si': 'Modeling U.S. Kongressal legislary and rol-call Votes have got great heed in the preceding Litterary, and whilst legislators over 50 state regimes and D.C. advise over 100,000 billion per annum, Enecting over 30% of them on mean, state level investigation has got fairly less heed Due in part to the diffdiffighty in Getting the needed data. හැම රාජ්\u200dය නීතිපත්තියක්ම ඔවුන්ගේ විධානය, රාජ්\u200dයාත්මක සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිසා, ඒත් ඒක අමාරුයි, නීතිපත්තියක් සැලසුම් වෙන්න ප අපි බිල්ල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා සියළු ජාතිය 50 සහ D.C. මිලියන 1 මිලියන් වඩා ලෙක්සිකල් සාමාණය භාවිතා කරනවා. තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ සංඥාවල් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, එකට සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් 18% විශේෂ ව', 'sr': 'Modeliranje američkog zakonodavstva i glasova o prijevoznoj pozivi dobilo je značajnu pažnju u prethodnoj literaturi, a zakonodavci iz 50 državnih vlada i D.C. svake godine predlažu preko 100.000 računa, uključujući preko 30% njih u prosjeku, analiza državnog nivoa dobila je relativno manju pažnju zbog teškoće dobiti potrebne podatke. Pošto se svaka državna zakonodavstva vodi svojim postupcima, politikom i pitanjima, međutim, teško je kvalitativno proceniti faktore koji utiču na vjerojatnost uspeha zakonodavne inicijative. Predstavljamo nekoliko metoda za modeliranje mogućnosti računa koji prima akciju poda u svih 50 država i D.C. Koristimo leksički sadržaj preko 1 miliona računa, zajedno sa kontekstualnim zakonodavcima i zakonodavcima izvedenim karakteristikama da izgradimo naše predvidne modele, omogućavajući usporedbu onih faktora koji su važni za proces pravljenja zakona. Osim toga, pokazujemo da ove signale imaju komplementnu predviđavajuću moć, zajedno postižeći prosječan poboljšanje tačnosti od 18% preko državnih specifičnih osnovnih linija.', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga sharciga Congress iyo codooyinka baaritaanka ee U.S. waxaa la soo jeeday warqaddii hore oo aad u weyn, oo sharciyayaasha ka badan ee dowladda dowladda iyo D.C. waxay u soo jeedeen wax ka badan 100,000 billyar sanadkii sanadkii, oo qiimeynta ugu badnaan 30% ka mid ah ayaa qiimeeyay heerka dowladu si qiimo yar ugu yar tahay sababtoo ah dhibaatada helidda macluumaadka u baahan. Sida darteed sharciga dowlad kastaaba wuxuu hogaamiyaa baaritaankooda, siyaasadeeda iyo arrimaha, laakiin waa adag in la qiimeeyo arrimaha ay saameyn ku yeelan karto suurtagalka arrimaha sharciga. We present several methods for modeling the likelihood of a bill receiving floor action across all 50 states and D.C. We utilize the lexical content of over 1 million bills, along with contextual legislature and legislator derived features to build our predictive models, allowing a comparison of what factors are important to the lawmaking process.  Furthermore, waxaynu tusnaynaa in calaamadaas ay haystaan xoog wax la sii sheego oo la mid ah, oo dhammaantood waxay gaadhaan kordhisid si rasmi ah oo 18% ka kordhay qoraal gaar ah oo dowladu ku qoran yahay.', 'sv': 'Modellering av den amerikanska kongressens lagstiftning och namnupprop har fått betydande uppmärksamhet i tidigare litteratur, och medan lagstiftare i 50 statliga regeringar och D.C. föreslår över 100 000 lagförslag varje år, antar över 30% av dem i genomsnitt, har statlig analys fått relativt mindre uppmärksamhet på grund av svårigheten att få fram nödvändiga data. Eftersom varje statlig lagstiftare styrs av sina egna förfaranden, politik och frågor är det dock svårt att kvalitativt bedöma de faktorer som påverkar sannolikheten för att ett lagstiftningsinitiativ ska lyckas. Vi presenterar flera metoder för att modellera sannolikheten för att ett lagförslag får golvåtgärder i alla 50 stater och D.C. Vi använder lexikalt innehåll i över 1 miljon lagförslag, tillsammans med kontextuella lagstiftare och lagstiftare härledda funktioner för att bygga våra prediktiva modeller, vilket möjliggör en jämförelse av vilka faktorer som är viktiga för lagstiftningsprocessen. Dessutom visar vi att dessa signaler har kompletterande prediktiv effekt och tillsammans uppnår en genomsnittlig förbättring av noggrannheten på 18% jämfört med delspecifika baslinjer.', 'ta': 'முந்தைய வாக்கிதத்தில் மாதிரி அமெரிக்க நிரல் மற்றும் சுழற்சி வாக்குதல் வாக்கியங்கள் முன்பு எழுத்தில் முக்கியமான கவனத்தை பெற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ளது, மற்றும் 50 நாட்டு அரசாங்கத்திற்கும் மேலும ஒவ்வொரு நாட்டின் நிறுவனமும் தங்கள் சொந்த செயல்கள், அரசியல் மற்றும் பிரச்சனைகளால் நேர்வழி காட்டப்படுகிறது, எனினும், நிரல் திட்டத்தின் வெற்றி 50 நாடுகள் மற்றும் டிசி முழுவதும் 50 மில்லியன் பில்லியன் உள்ளடக்கத்தை நாம் மாதிரியும் ஒரு பில்லிக் செயல்பாட்டின் வித்தியாசமான முறைகளை மாற்றுவதற்கு பல முறைகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம். நாம் விதி மேலும், நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இந்த குறிப்புகள் சிக்கல்களை சிக்கல் முன்வாக்கி அடிக்குறிப்பிட்ட அடிக்குறிப்பிட்ட கோடு', 'ur': 'امریکا کنگرسی قوانین اور رول-کال وٹوں کی مدل کی وجہ سے پہلے ادبیات میں بہت اچھی توجه حاصل کی گئی ہے اور حالانکہ 50 دولت حکومت اور دی.سی. کے کنگرسی قوانین میں ہر سال سے زیادہ 100,000 بیل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ان میں سے 30% سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے، دولت سطح تحلیل کو اضافہ کرتا ہے کہ ضروری دکھانے کے لئے بہت کم اس وجہ سے کہ ہر دولت کی قوانین کی روش، سیاسی اور مسائل کے ذریعہ ہدایت کی جاتی ہے، لیکن یہ بہت مشکل ہے کہ ایک قانون کی قوانین کی موفقیت پر اثر دیتی ہے. ہم نے بہت سی طریقے پیش کیے ہیں کہ ہر پنجاس ملک اور دی.سی کے درمیان فلوری کے اقدام کے مطابق ایک صحیح طریقے کے مطابق موجود کریں. ہم ایک میلیون بیل سے زیادہ مطابق لکیسی موجود کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، اور متوسط قانون اور قانون کے معاملہ کے ساتھ ہمارے پیش بینی موڈل بنانے کے لئے موجود ہوئے ہیں، اور ہم نے قانو اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ سیگنالیں اضافہ کی پیش بینی طاقت رکھتے ہیں، ایک دوسرے سے ایک متوسط سیگنالہ کی دقیقیت پر 18% سیگنالوں کی سیگنالوں کی سفارش پہنچا رہی ہیں۔', 'uz': "AQSHName Chunki har bir davlat legislature o'z vazifalar, politik va muammolar bilan boshqarishni boshlaydi, ammo, bunday qoidalar muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli ishga tushirish juda qiyin. Biz 50 davlat va D.C. davlatda qattiq amalni olib tashlash imkoniyatini ko'pchilik usullarini hozir qilamiz. Biz 1 million dan ortiq kishil tarkibini foydalanamiz va hozir qoidagi qoidalar va qo'llanmalarni oldingan modellarimizni yaratish mumkin, balki qo'llanmalarning qanday muhim vazifalarini o'rganish mumkin. Ko'rsatganda, bu signallar murakkablik predictiv kuchi qabul qiladi, va bir necha davlat hodisa asosiy asosida 18% darajada o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Chế độ luật pháp Quốc hội mẫu của Mỹ và phiếu bầu biểu tình đã nhận được sự chú ý đáng kể trong văn học trước đó, và trong khi các nhà làm luật liên bang 50 và D.C. mỗi năm đề nghị hơn 100,000 hóa đơn, ban hành trên trung bình, phân tích cấp độ nhà nước đã nhận được một số lượng nhỏ hơn vì một phần sự khó khăn trong việc lấy được dữ liệu cần thiết. Tuy nhiên, vì mỗi cơ quan lập pháp được hướng dẫn bởi chính trị và các vấn đề riêng, về mặt chất lượng thì rất khó khăn để đánh giá những yếu tố ảnh hưởng đến khả năng có một dự luật thành công. Chúng tôi đưa ra nhiều phương pháp mô tả khả năng dự luật nhận được hành động trên khắp liên 50-bang và D.C. Chúng tôi sử dụng nội dung từ viết bằng hơn một triệu tờ tiền hóa đơn, cùng với các cơ quan lập pháp ngữ cảnh và các cơ quan lập pháp khác tạo ra các mô hình dự đoán của chúng tôi, cho phép so sánh các yếu tố quan trọng trong quá trình làm luật. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy những tín hiệu này có năng lượng dự đoán bổ sung, cùng nhau đạt được một cải thiện trung bình độ chính xác cao 1871 trên các nền tảng cụ thể.', 'bg': 'Моделирането на законодателството на Конгреса на САЩ и поименните гласове е получило значително внимание в предишната литература и докато законодателите в 50 държавни правителства и Вашингтон предлагат над 100 000 законопроекта всяка година, като приемат средно над 30% от тях, анализа на щатско ниво е получил относително по-малко внимание, дължащо се отчасти на трудността при получаването на необходимите данни. Тъй като всеки държавен законодател се ръководи от собствените си процедури, политика и въпроси, обаче е трудно качествено да се оценят факторите, които влияят върху вероятността от успех на законодателната инициатива. Представяме няколко метода за моделиране на вероятността законопроект да получи подадено действие във всички 50 щата и Вашингтон. Използваме лексикалното съдържание на над 1 милион законопроекта, заедно с контекстуалните функции на законодателя и законодателя, за да изградим нашите предсказуеми модели, позволяващи сравнение на факторите, които са важни за процеса на правене на закони. Освен това, ние показваме, че тези сигнали притежават допълнителна предсказуема мощност, като заедно постигат средно подобрение на точността от 18% спрямо щатските базови линии.', 'nl': 'Het modelleren van de wetgeving van het Amerikaanse Congres en hoofdelijke stemmen heeft aanzienlijke aandacht gekregen in eerdere literatuur, en terwijl wetgevers in 50-staten en DC elk jaar meer dan 100.000 wetsvoorstellen, waarbij gemiddeld meer dan 30% van hen wordt aangenomen, heeft de analyse op staatsniveau relatief minder aandacht gekregen vanwege de moeilijkheid om de nodige gegevens te verkrijgen. Aangezien elke wetgever zich echter laat leiden door hun eigen procedures, politiek en vraagstukken, is het moeilijk om kwalitatief te beoordelen welke factoren van invloed zijn op de kans dat een wetgevingsinitiatief slaagt. We presenteren verschillende methoden voor het modelleren van de waarschijnlijkheid dat een wetsvoorstel vloeractie ontvangt in alle 50-staten en D.C. We gebruiken de lexicale inhoud van meer dan een miljoen wetsvoorstellen, samen met contextuele wetgever en wetgever afgeleide functies om onze voorspellende modellen te bouwen, waardoor een vergelijking mogelijk is van welke factoren belangrijk zijn voor het wetgevingsproces. Verder tonen we aan dat deze signalen complementair voorspellend vermogen bezitten, samen bereiken ze een gemiddelde verbetering in nauwkeurigheid van 18% ten opzichte van state specifieke baselines.', 'da': 'Modellering af den amerikanske kongres lovgivning og afstemninger ved navneopråb har fået betydelig opmærksomhed i tidligere litteratur, og mens lovgivere på tværs af 50 statsregeringer og D.C. foreslår over 100.000 lovforslag hvert år, der vedtager over 30% af dem i gennemsnit, har analyse på statsniveau fået relativt mindre opmærksomhed på grund af til dels vanskelighederne med at få de nødvendige data. Da hver statslovgiver styres af deres egne procedurer, politik og spørgsmål, er det imidlertid vanskeligt kvalitativt at vurdere de faktorer, der påvirker sandsynligheden for, at et lovgivningsinitiativ lykkes. Vi præsenterer flere metoder til modellering af sandsynligheden for, at et lovforslag modtager etageadgang på tværs af alle 50 stater og D.C. Vi bruger det leksikologiske indhold i over 1 million lovforslag sammen med kontekstuelle lovgiver og lovgiver afledte funktioner til at opbygge vores forudsigende modeller, der muliggør en sammenligning af, hvilke faktorer der er vigtige for lovgivningsprocessen. Desuden viser vi, at disse signaler har supplerende forudsigelseskraft, hvilket tilsammen opnår en gennemsnitlig forbedring af nøjagtigheden på 18% i forhold til statsspecifikke basislinjer.', 'hr': 'Modeliranje američkog zakonodavstva i glasova o prijevoznoj pozivi dobilo je značajnu pažnju u prethodnoj literaturi, a zakonodavci iz 50 državnih vlada i D.C. prijedloguju preko 100.000 računa svake godine, omogućavajući preko 30% njih u prosjeku, analiza državne razine dobila je relativno manju pažnju zbog teškoće dobiti potrebne podatke. Budući da se svaka državna zakonodavstva vodi svojim postupcima, politikom i pitanjima, međutim, teško je kvalitativno procijeniti činjenice koje utječu na vjerojatnost uspjeha zakonodavne inicijative. Predstavljamo nekoliko metoda za modeliranje vjerojatnosti računa koji prima akciju poda u svih 50 država i D.C. Koristimo leksički sadržaj preko 1 milijuna računa, zajedno s kontekstualnim zakonodavstvima i zakonodavstvima izvedenim karakteristikama kako bi izgradili naše predvidne modele, omogućavajući usporedbu čiji su faktori važni za proces zakonodavstva. Osim toga, pokazujemo da te signale drže komplementarnu predviđavajuću moć, zajedno postizajući prosječan poboljšanje preciznosti od 18% nad državnim specifičnim osnovnim linijama.', 'de': 'Die Modellierung der Gesetzgebung des US-Kongresses und namentlicher Abstimmungen hat in der bisherigen Literatur erhebliche Aufmerksamkeit erhalten, und während Gesetzgeber in 50-Staaten-Regierungen und D.C. jedes Jahr über 100.000-Gesetzesvorlagen vorschlagen, die durchschnittlich über 30% davon erlassen, hat die Analyse auf staatlicher Ebene relativ weniger Aufmerksamkeit erhalten, zum Teil aufgrund der Schwierigkeiten, die erforderlichen Daten zu erhalten. Da sich jeder Landesgesetzgeber jedoch von seinen eigenen Verfahren, Politik und Themen leiten lässt, ist es schwierig, die Faktoren, die die Erfolgswahrscheinlichkeit einer Gesetzgebungsinitiative beeinflussen, qualitativ einzuschätzen. Wir präsentieren verschiedene Methoden zur Modellierung der Wahrscheinlichkeit, dass eine Gesetzesvorlage eine Bodenaktion erhält, in allen 50-Staaten und D.C. Wir verwenden den lexikalischen Inhalt von über einer Million Gesetzesvorlagen zusammen mit kontextbezogenen Gesetzgebern und Gesetzgebern abgeleiteten Funktionen, um unsere Vorhersagemodelle zu erstellen, die einen Vergleich der Faktoren ermöglichen, die für den Gesetzgebungsprozess wichtig sind. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass diese Signale komplementäre Vorhersagekraft besitzen und zusammen eine durchschnittliche Verbesserung der Genauigkeit von 18% gegenüber zustandsspezifischen Baselines erreichen.', 'id': 'Modeling undang-undang Kongres AS dan pemilihan panggilan nama telah menerima perhatian yang signifikan dalam literatur sebelumnya, dan sementara para pemilik hukum di seluruh 50 pemerintah negara dan D.C. mengusulkan lebih dari 100.000 tagihan setiap tahun, memungkinkan lebih dari 30% dari mereka secara rata-rata, analisis tingkat negara telah menerima perhatian relatif sedikit karena sebagian dari kesulitan dalam mendapatkan data yang diperlukan. Since each state legislature is guided by their own procedures, politics and issues, however, it is difficult to qualitatively asses the factors that affect the likelihood of a legislative initiative succeeding.  Kami mempersembahkan beberapa metode untuk memmodelir kemungkinan sebuah tagihan menerima tindakan lantai di seluruh 50 negara dan D.C. Kami menggunakan konten lexik dari lebih dari 1 juta tagihan, bersama dengan legislatur kontekstual dan karakteristik dari legislator untuk membangun model prediksif kami, memungkinkan perbandingan faktor apa yang penting untuk proses pembuat hukum. Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa sinyal-sinyal ini memiliki kekuatan prediksi komplementari, bersama-sama mencapai peningkatan rata-rata pada akurezi 18% atas garis dasar spesifik negara.', 'fa': 'مدل قانون کنگرسی و رأی\u200cهای رأی کنگرسی ایالات متحده توجه بزرگی در ادبیات قبلی گرفته است، و در حالی که قانون\u200cدهندگان در پنجاه دولت دولت و دی\u200cسی هر سال بیش از ۱۰۰ هزار billه پیشنهاد می\u200cکنند، که بیش از ۳۰ درصد از آنها در میانگین فعال می\u200cکنند، تحلیل سطح دولت به نسبتا کمتر توجه به دل با وجود اینکه هر قانون قوانین دولتی با روش\u200cهای خودشان، سیاست و مسائل خود هدایت می\u200cشود، ولی این موضوع به عنوان قانونی باعث تأثیر احتمال یک شرکت قوانین موفقیت است، سخت است. ما چند روش برای مدل کردن احتمال یک قانون که در تمام ۵۰ ایالت و دی.سی اقدام طبقه می\u200cگیرد را نشان می\u200cدهیم. ما محتوای زبانی بیش از ۱ میلیون حقوق را استفاده می\u200cکنیم، همراه با ویژه\u200cهای قانون و قانون\u200cکننده\u200cی مدل پیش\u200cبینی\u200cمان را برای ساختن مدل\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی\u200cمان، اجازه می\u200cدهیم که مقایس علاوه بر این، نشان می دهیم که این سیگنالها قدرت پیش بینی اضافه\u200cای دارند، با همدیگر با رسیدن به بهترین متوسط در دقیق ۱۸ درصد بر اساس اصلی خاص دولت.', 'ko': '이전 문헌에서는 미국 의회를 모의한 입법과 가명 표결이 큰 관심을 받았는데, 50개 주 정부와 워싱턴DC 입법자들이 매년 10만건이 넘는 법안을 제출해 그 중 평균 30% 이상을 통과시켰지만, 주 1급 분석은 상대적으로 덜 주목받았고, 일부 이유는 필요한 데이터를 얻기 어려웠기 때문이다.그러나 각 주의 입법 기구는 자신의 절차, 정치, 문제에 의해 지도되기 때문에 입법 조치의 성공 가능성에 영향을 미치는 요소를 정성적으로 평가하기 어렵다.우리는 법안이 모든 50개 주와 워싱턴 특구에서 발언권을 받을 가능성을 모의하는 몇 가지 방법을 제시했다. 우리는 100만 개의 법안의 어휘 내용과 상하문 입법 기구와 입법자의 파생적 특징을 이용하여 우리의 예측 모델을 구축하고 대립법 과정에서 중요한 요소를 비교하도록 허용했다.또한 이러한 신호는 상호 보완적인 예측 능력을 가지고 있으며 주에 특정한 기선에 비해 정확도가 평균 18% 높아졌다고 밝혔다.', 'tr': 'ABŞ-nyň kongresiýasynyň döwletlerini we bellenen sesleri öňki edebiýatynda wajyp üns berilýär, we 50 döwlet hökümetleriniň we D.C. arasyndaky legislaryň her ýylda 100,000 sany uly töwletlerini maslahat berýär, olaryň ortalamasynda 30%-den gowurak dowam edýän, durum derejesi analiziýasynda gerekli maglumatlary alan kynçylyklaryň Her döwlet kanunlady öz prosedürleri, syýasaty we meseleleri tarapyndan guruldygyndan soňra, meňzeýe-de kanunladyň başarylygynyň mümkinçiligine täsirleýän faktorlaryny bejermek kyn. Biz 50 döwletlerde we D.C. we 1 milliýden ýokary taýýarlanan laýyklaryň mümkinçiligini modelletmek üçin birnäçe döwletleri belleýäris. Şu meýdança kanunlar we legislandyrymyz öngörümli modellerimizi inşa etmek üçin elimizde gelen ýagdaýlaryň çykyşyny ulanýarys. Munuň üstüne, bu signalleriň complementer öngörümli gücüne sahip bolandygyny görkezýäris. Döwlet diňe esasy üssüňlerde 18%-iň dogrylygyny aşdyryp bilen üýtgetmek üçin bir karara ulaştyrylýar.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa sheria ya bunge la Marekani na kura za kupiga kura za kura za kura za mabunge zimepokea hisia kubwa katika fasihi iliyopita, na wakati wabunge zaidi ya serikali 50 na D.C. wanapendekeza zaidi ya bili 100,000 kila mwaka, kwa wastani wa wastani wa asilimia 30, uchambuzi wa ngazi ya serikali umepata kiasi kidogo sana kutokana na changamoto ya kupata takwimu zinazohitajika. Kwa kuwa bunge la serikali linaongozwa na utaratibu wao wenyewe, siasa na masuala, hata hivyo, ni vigumu kutathmini ukweli unaoathiri uwezekano wa mradi wa kisheria uliofanika. Tunaweza kuweka mbinu kadhaa za kutengeneza uwezekano wa muswada unaopita hatua ya sakafu katika majimbo yote 50 na D.C. Tunatumia maudhui ya kisaikolojia ya zaidi ya mabilioni milioni 1, pamoja na bunge na sheria za sasa zilipata vifaa vya kutengeneza mifano yetu ya kutabiri, na kuruhusu kulinganisha ukweli gani ni muhimu kwa mchakato wa kutengeneza sheria. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kuwa ishara hizi zinashikilia nguvu ya utabiri, pamoja na kupata maendeleo ya wastani kwa kiwango cha asilimia 18 zaidi ya misingi maalum ya serikali.', 'sq': 'Modelimi i legjislacionit kongresor të SHBA-së dhe votat me emër të thirrjes ka marrë vëmendje të rëndësishme në letraturën e mëparshme dhe ndërsa legjislaturët në 50 qeveritë shtetërore dhe D.C. propozojnë mbi 100,000 projekt-ligj çdo vit, duke miratuar mbi 30% të tyre mesatarisht, analiza e nivelit shtetëror ka marrë relativisht më pak vëmendje për shkak të vështirësisë në marrjen e të dhënave Meqë çdo legjislaturë shtetërore udhëheq nga procedurat, politikat dhe çështjet e tyre, megjithatë, është e vështirë të vlerësohet kualitativisht faktorët që ndikojnë në mundësinë e një nisme legjislatuese të suksesshme. Ne paraqesim disa metoda për modelimin e mundësisë që një projekt-ligj të marrë veprim në katin anembanë të 50 shteteve dhe D.C. Ne përdorim përmbajtjen lexike të mbi 1 milion projekt-ligjeve, së bashku me legjislaturën kontekstuale dhe karakteristikat e nxjerra nga legjislatura për të ndërtuar modelet tona parashikuese, duke lejuar një krahasim të faktorëve që janë të rëndësishëm për procesin e Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se këto sinjale mbajnë fuqi parashikuese komplementare, së bashku duke arritur një përmirësim mesatar në saktësi prej 18% mbi linjat bazë specifike të shtetit.', 'af': "Die modeling van U.S. Kongresiewetting en rol-roep stemme het betekende aandag ontvang in vorige literateer, en terwyl regslateurs oor 50 staatsregerings en D.C. elke jaar oor 100,000 rekeninge voorstel, wat meer 30% van hulle op gemiddelde aanwend is, het staatsvlak analiseer relativief minder aandag ontvang gevolg in deel van die moeilikheid om die nodige data te kry. Omdat elke staatswetsverking deur hul eie prosedure, politiek en probleem bevestig word, is dit tog moeilik om die faktore wat die waarskynlik van 'n wetsverktive iniciatief suksesvol invloek het, te asseer. Ons stel verskeie metodes om die waarskynlik van 'n wet wat vloer aksie ontvang oor alle 50 staatste en D.C. te modelleer. Ons gebruik die leksielle inhoud van meer 1 miljoen bills, saam met contextual wetsverkteer en wetsverkteerder afgeleide funksies om ons voorskynlike modele te bou, toelaat ons 'n vergelyking van wat faktore belangrik is vir die wetsverkproses. Ons wys ook dat hierdie signale komplementeer voorskoulike krag hou, saam met 'n gemiddelde verbetering in die presisie van 18% oor staat spesifieke basisline.", 'hy': 'ԱՄՆ-ի կոնգրեսիոնային օրենսդրության և անվանումների քվեների մոդելավորումը նշանակալի ուշադրություն է ստացել նախորդ գրականության մեջ, և մինչդեռ 50 պետական կառավարությունների օրենսդրողները և D.C. ամեն տարի առաջարկում են ավելի քան 100,000 դոլար, որոնց միջինում 30 տոկոսը ներկայացնում է, պետական մակարդակի վերլուծությունը համեմա Քանի որ յուրաքանչյուր պետական օրենսդրություն առաջնորդում է իրենց սեփական գործընթացների, քաղաքականության և խնդիրների միջոցով, այնուամենայնիվ, դժվար է որակավոր կերպով գնահատել գործոնները, որոնք ազդում են օրենսդրական նախաձեռնության հաջողության հավ Մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազմաթիվ մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտագործում են նախագծի հավանականության մոդելավորման համար բոլոր 50 նահանգներում և D.C. Մենք օգտագործում ենք ավելի քան 1 միլիոն նախագծի լեքսիկական պարունակությունը, միասին կոնտեքստալ օրենսդրություն և օրենսդրություն ստեղծող հատկությունները մեր կանխատեսողական մոդելների կառուցե Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս ազդանշանները ունեն համալրացող կանխատեսողական ուժ, միասին հասնելով պետության կոնկրետ հիմքերի ընդհանուր 18 տոկոսի ճշգրտության բարելավման:', 'az': 'U.S. Kongresi hökmünün modellərini və roll-call səslərini əvvəlki qismətdə möhkəm dikkati alır. 50 Eyalet hökmünün və D.C. arasındakıları hər il 100.000 faturadan artıq təklif edirlər, onların ortalaması ilə 30%-dən artıq istifadə edirlər, eyalet səviyyəsinin analizi lazım verilər almaq çətinliklərinə görə çox az dikkati alır. Hər eyalet qanunu öz prosedürləri, siyasi və məsələləri ilə doğru yola yönəltdiyindən sonra, həqiqətən də, qanuniyyətli tədbirlərin mümkünlüyünü təsirləyən faktörləri qəbul etmək çətindir. Biz bütün 50 eyalet və D.C. arasındakı qayda işləməsini modelləşdirmək üçün bir neçə metodlar təyin edirik. Biz, müxtəlif qayda-qanunu və qayda-qanunu təyin edən modellərimizi inşa etmək üçün, qayda-qanunu təyin etmək üçün nə faktörlərin mühüm olduğunu göstərmək üçün bir neçə metodlar istifadə edirik. Daha sonra, bu sinyallərin çox tədbir gücü ilə birlikdə, eyalet müəyyən səhifələrindən 18%-in doğruluğunda ortalama təmizlənməsini göstəririk.', 'am': 'የአሜሪካ ፓርላማዊ ሕግ እና የጥያቄ ድምፅ በመቀድሞው ሐሳብ ውስጥ ብዙ ትኩረት አቀረበ፡፡ እና በመንግሥት መንግሥታት እና ዲ.C. ሕግ አዛዦች በየዓመቱ በ100 ሺህ ቢልቶች የሚጨምሩ ሲዘጋጁ፣ በመካከለኛው 30 በመቶ ያነሳሉ፣ የሀገር ደረጃዎች አስተያየት በሚያስፈልገው ዳራዎችን ለማግኘት ችግር ምክንያት በጣም ታናሽ ትኩረት ተቀብለዋል። ከሁሉም የአገረ ገዥ ሕግ ሥርዓት በገዛ ሥርዓታቸው፣ ፖለቲካ እና ጉዳዮች በመራመሩ ምክንያት፣ የሕግ ጥያቄ በተቀናኘው ስህተት በሚያስጨንቋቸው ውጤቶች በመጠንቀቅ አስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ 50 ሀገራት እና ዲ.C. በሙሉ መብት የሚቀበልን የሕግ ጥያቄን ለመምረጥ ብዙ ሥርዓቶችን እና የአሁኑን ሕግ እና ሕግ አካባቢዎችን ለመሥራት የሚችሉትን ጥያቄዎች እና የመፍጠር ዓይነታችንን ለመሠረት እና ከሕግ ጉዳይ ጋር ለሕግ መሠረት የሚችሉትን ጥያቄዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ Furthermore, we show that these signals hold complementary predictive power, together achieving an average improvement in accuracy of 18% over state specific baselines.', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী সাহিত্যে আমেরিকার কংগ্রেসের আইন এবং রোল কল ভোট মডেল করার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মনোযোগ পেয়েছে এবং এদিকে প্রতি বছর ৫০ রাষ্ট্র সরকার এবং ডিসির বিল প্রস্তাব প্রদান করেছে, যারা গড়ে ৩০ শতাংশের বেশী প যেহেতু প্রত্যেক রাষ্ট্রের সংসদ নিজেদের নিজেদের প্রক্রিয়া, রাজনীতি এবং বিষয়ের দ্বারা নির্দেশ প্রদান করা হয়েছে, তবে সংস্থা সফল হওয়ার সম্ভাবনার উপর আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি যে ৫০ টি রাষ্ট্র এবং ডিসির সারা বিলের মেঝে ফেলা কার্যকলাপের সম্ভাবনা নির্ধারণ করতে পারে। আমরা ১ মিলিয়নের বেশী লেক্সিকাল বিষয়বস্তু ব্যবহার করি, যার সাথে সাথে বিদ্ তাছাড়াও, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই সিগন্যালগুলো জটিল ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী ক্ষমতায় রাখে, একসাথে রাষ্ট্রীয় নির্দিষ্ট বেসেলাইনের বেশির', 'ca': "Modelar la legislació del Congrés dels EUA i els vots nominals han rebut una atenció significativa en la literatura anterior, i mentre que els legisladors de 50 governs estatals i D.C. proponen més de 100.000 projectes de lletra cada any, habilitant més del 30% d'ells en mitjana, l'anàlisi a nivell estatal ha rebut relativament menys atenció degut en part a la dificultat d'obtenir les dades necessàries. Com que cada legislador estatal està guiat pels seus pròpies procediments, política i qüestions, no obstant això, és difícil analitzar qualitativament els factors que afecten la probabilitat de que una iniciativa legislativa tingui èxit. Presentam diversos mètodes per modelar la probabilitat d'un projecte de llei rebre acció a terra en tots els 50 estats i D.C. Utilitzem el contingut lèxic de més d'un milió de lleis, juntament amb característiques legislatives contextuals i derivades del legislador per construir els nostres models preditius, permetent una comparació de quins factors són importants per al procés legislatiu. A més, demostram que aquests senyals tenen poder preditiu complementar, aconseguint una millora mitjana de la precisió del 18% sobre les línies de base específices de l'estat.", 'cs': 'Modelování právních předpisů amerického kongresu a jmenného hlasování získalo významnou pozornost v předchozí literatuře a zatímco zákonodárci napříč padesáti státními vládami a D.C. navrhují každý rok více než 100,000 zákonů, které z nich přijímají v průměru více než 30% , analýza státní úrovně získala relativně menší pozornost z důvodu obtížnosti při získávání potřebných dat. Vzhledem k tomu, že se každý státní zákonodárce řídí vlastními postupy, politikou a otázkami, je však obtížné kvalitativně posoudit faktory, které ovlivňují pravděpodobnost úspěchu legislativní iniciativy. Představujeme několik metod pro modelování pravděpodobnosti, že zákon obdrží podlahu ve všech padesátých státech a D.C. Používáme lexikální obsah více než milionů zákonů, spolu s kontextovými zákonodárci a zákonodárci odvozenými funkcemi k sestavení našich prediktivních modelů, což umožňuje srovnání faktorů, které jsou důležité pro proces tvorby právních předpisů. Dále ukazujeme, že tyto signály mají komplementární prediktivní sílu, společně dosahující průměrného zlepšení přesnosti 18% oproti stavově specifickým základním liniím.', 'et': 'Ameerika Ühendriikide Kongressi õigusaktide ja nimeliste hääletuste modelleerimine on saanud varasemas kirjanduses märkimisväärset tähelepanu ning kuigi 50 osariigi valitsuse ja Washingtoni seadusandjad esitavad igal aastal üle 100 000 seaduseelnõu, millest keskmiselt kehtestatakse üle 30%, on osariigi tasandi analüüs saanud suhteliselt vähem tähelepanu osaliselt raskuste tõttu vajalike andmete saamisel. Kuna iga riigi seadusandja juhindub oma menetlustest, poliitikast ja küsimustest, on aga raske kvalitatiivselt hinnata tegureid, mis mõjutavad seadusandliku algatuse edukuse tõenäosust. Esitleme mitmeid meetodeid eelnõu vastuvõtmise tõenäosuse modelleerimiseks kõigis 50 osariigis ja Washingtonis. Me kasutame enam kui 1 miljoni eelnõu leksikaalset sisu koos konteksti seadusandja ja seadusandja tuletatud funktsioonidega, et ehitada oma ennustusmudelid, võimaldades võrrelda, millised tegurid on olulised seadusandmise protsessi jaoks. Lisaks näitame, et need signaalid omavad täiendavat prognoosivõimsust, saavutades keskmise täpsuse 18% võrra võrreldes riigispetsiifiliste lähtejoontega.', 'bs': 'Modeliranje američkog zakonodavstva i glasova o prijevoznoj pozivi dobilo je značajnu pažnju u prethodnoj literaturi, a zakonodavci iz 50 državnih vlada i D.C. svake godine predlažu preko 100.000 računa, omogućavajući preko 30% njih u prosjeku, analiza državne razine dobila je relativno manju pažnju zbog teškoće dobiti potrebne podatke. Pošto se svaka državna zakonodavstva vodi svojim postupcima, politikom i pitanjima, međutim, teško je kvalitativno procijeniti faktore koji utiču na vjerojatnost uspjeha legislativne inicijative. Predstavljamo nekoliko metoda za modeliranje vjerojatnosti zakona koji prima akciju poda u svih 50 država i D.C. Koristimo leksički sadržaj preko 1 miliona računa, zajedno sa kontekstualnim zakonodavstvima i zakonodavstvima izvedenim karakteristikama kako bi izgradili naše predvidne modele, omogućavajući usporedbu onih faktora koje su važne za proces pravljenja zakona. Osim toga, pokazujemo da ove signale imaju komplementarnu predviđavajuću moć, zajedno postizajući prosječan poboljšanje tačnosti od 18% preko državnih specifičnih osnovnih linija.', 'fi': 'Yhdysvaltain kongressilainsäädännön ja nimenhuutoäänestysten mallintaminen on saanut merkittävää huomiota aikaisemmassa kirjallisuudessa, ja vaikka lainsäätäjät yli 50 osavaltion hallituksessa ja Washingtonissa ehdottavat vuosittain yli 100 000 lakiehdotusta, jotka säätävät keskimäärin yli 30 prosenttia niistä, osavaltiotason analyysiin on kiinnitetty suhteellisen vähemmän huomiota osittain tarvittavien tietojen saamisen vaikeuden vuoksi. Koska kukin valtion lainsäätäjä ohjaa omia menettelytapoja, politiikkaa ja kysymyksiä, on kuitenkin vaikea arvioida laadullisesti tekijöitä, jotka vaikuttavat lainsäädäntöaloitteen onnistumisen todennäköisyyteen. Esittelemme useita menetelmiä lakiesityksen vastaanottamisen todennäköisyyden mallintamiseen kaikissa 50 osavaltiossa ja Washingtonissa. Hyödynnämme yli miljoonan lakiesityksen sanastosisältöä sekä kontekstuaalisia lainsäätäjien ja lainsäätäjien johdettuja ominaisuuksia ennakoivien mallien rakentamisessa, mikä mahdollistaa vertailun siitä, mitkä tekijät ovat tärkeitä lainsäädäntöprosessissa. Lisäksi osoitamme, että näillä signaaleilla on täydentävä ennakoiva voima, jolloin saavutetaan keskimäärin 18% parempi tarkkuus kuin osavaltiokohtaiset lähtöarvot.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sampeyan kabèh hal-hukum hukum sing dipoleh ning perusahaan dhéwé, politik lan kesalahan, mengko, kuwi susah-susah kanggo kelas kuwi alih sing gak dhéwé, gak dhéwé kuwi nggawe tchek dhéwé sing apik perusahaan ning alih sing gak bener hukum sing beraksi. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing berartil kanggo model mrogram kuwi nggawe sistem sing gak bener aksi nggawe barang dumadhi kuwi padha peduh lan D.C. Label', 'ha': "Yin motsi na sharĩ'a na zaman littãfin na zaman rubutu da kura na rubutu na amerikansa, kuma a lokacin da marubucin ma'abũta mulki 50 da D.C. na bubuɗa over 100,000 bills a shekara, ana ƙara over 30% daga gare su a ƙidãya, analyn daraja na state ya motsa gwargwadon muhimmanci, kuma ya yi amfani da ma'abũcin muhimmin haɗi da data wanda ake bukatawa. A lokacin da aka shiryar da kõwa na'ura na rubutu da takardan aiki, siyasa da masu zartar da su, kuma amma, yã yi ƙunci a kan hakarin matsayin da za'a shagala kara da wata rayoyi na'urar sharciyar ta ci nasara. Tuna halatar da wasu hanyõyi dõmin ka sami kwamfyutan a karɓi aikin jukwar-sakan a duk mataifa 50 da D.C. Tuna yi amfani da muhimmin littafan lokalori kowanta milliardan, da kuma a sami da sharci na sharciyar, za'a sami misalin misãlai masu basĩri, kuma yana yarda a sami da misãlai masu muhimu ga matsayin sharĩ. Furan haka, Munã nũna cewa waɗannan alama suna da wani ƙarfi mai ƙaranci, kuma duk munã sami gyara mai sauri a tsakanin taƙaitacce da 18% a kan rubutun.", 'sk': 'Modeliranje ameriške kongresne zakonodaje in poimenskih glasovanj je v prejšnji literaturi dobilo veliko pozornosti in medtem ko zakonodajalci v 50 državnih vladah in Washingtonu vsako leto predlagajo več kot 100.000 zakonov, ki jih sprejmejo v povprečju več kot 30%, je analiza na državni ravni deležna relativno manj pozornosti, delno zaradi težav pri pridobivanju potrebnih podatkov. Ker pa vsak državni zakonodajalec vodi lastni postopki, politika in vprašanja, je težko kvalitativno oceniti dejavnike, ki vplivajo na verjetnost uspeha zakonodajne pobude. Predstavljamo več metod za modeliranje verjetnosti, da bo zakon prejel tožbo v vseh 50 državah in D.C. Za gradnjo naših napovednih modelov uporabljamo leksikalno vsebino več kot milijonov zakonov ter kontekstualne funkcije zakonodajalca in zakonodajalca, kar omogoča primerjavo dejavnikov, ki so pomembni za proces priprave zakonodaje. Poleg tega pokažemo, da imajo ti signali komplementarno napovedno moč, skupaj pa dosežemo povprečno izboljšanje natančnosti za 18% v primerjavi z izhodiščnimi vrsticami za stanje specifično.', 'he': 'דוגמנית חוק הקונגרסי של ארה"ב וקולות שיחות קבלה תשומת לב משמעותית בספרות קודמות, ובזמן שהחוקאים ברחבי 50 ממשלות מדינות ודושינגטון מציעים מעל 100,000 חוקים בכל שנה, מאפשרים מעל 30% מהם בממוצע, ניתוח רמה מדינית קיבל תשומת לב יחסית פחות בגלל הקשה להשיג את הנתונים הכרחיים. מכיוון שכל חוק המדינה מונח על ידי הנהלים, הפוליטיקה והנושאים שלהם, בכל זאת, קשה להעריך באופן איכותי את הגורמים שמשפיעים על סבירות ליזמה חוקית הצליחה. אנחנו מציגים כמה שיטות לדוגמא סבירות של חשבון מקבל פעולה על הרצפה בכל 50 מדינות ודי.סי. אנו משתמשים בתוכן הלקסי של מעל מיליון חשבונים, יחד עם חוק קונטקטואלי והתכונות הנוצאות מהחוק כדי לבנות את הדוגמאות הנחשבות שלנו, מאפשרים להשוואה של מה גורמים חשובים לתהליך החוק. חוץ מזה, אנו מראים שהאותים האלה מחזיקים כוח צפוי נוסף, יחד להשיג שיפור ממוצע בדיוק של 18% מעל קווי הבסיס ספציפיים של מדינה.', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་ཨ་རིའི་སྡོམ་གཞུང་དང་ཐོག་ལས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྔོན་གྱི་literature་ཐོག་ཏུ་གཏོང་བཅུག་པ་ཡིན། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་སྲིད་བཟོ་བཀོད་པ་སོ་སོང་མས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་ལས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་། ཆབ་སྲིད་དང་དཀའ་ངལ་དགོས་པ་ལས། ཡིན་ནའང་མི་སྲིད། དེ་ལྟར་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་ ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་ལ་བཟོ་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདྲ་ཞིག་མིན་འདུག འོན་ཀྱང་། མིག'}
{'en': 'Incorporating Image Matching Into Knowledge Acquisition for Event-Oriented Relation Recognition', 'ar': 'دمج مطابقة الصور في اكتساب المعرفة من أجل التعرف على العلاقة الموجهة نحو الحدث', 'es': 'Incorporación de la correspondencia de imágenes en la adquisición de conocimientos para el reconocimiento de relaciones orientado', 'pt': 'Incorporando a correspondência de imagens na aquisição de conhecimento para reconhecimento de relações orientadas a eventos', 'fr': "Intégration de la correspondance d'images dans l'acquisition de connaissances pour la reconnaissance de relations orientée événement", 'ja': 'イベント指向の関係認識のための知識習得に画像マッチングを組み込む', 'zh': '将图像匹配融入知识,成向事的关系', 'hi': 'घटना उन्मुख संबंध मान्यता के लिए ज्ञान अधिग्रहण में छवि मिलान को शामिल करना', 'ru': 'Включение сопоставления изображений в процесс получения знаний для распознавания отношений, ориентированных на события', 'ga': "Ag Ionchorprú Meaitseáil Íomhá I bhFáil Eolais d'Aitheantas Caidrimh atá Dírithe ar Imeachtaí", 'ka': 'სურათის შესაბამისათვის შესაბამისათვის შესაბამისათვის შესაბამისათვის შესაბამისათვის შესაბამისათვის', 'hu': 'Képösszehangolás beépítése a tudásszerzésbe az eseményorientált kapcsolatfelismerés érdekében', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση της αντιστοίχισης εικόνας στην απόκτηση γνώσης για αναγνώριση σχέσεων προσανατολισμένων σε γεγονότα', 'it': "Incorporare la corrispondenza delle immagini nell'acquisizione di conoscenze per il riconoscimento delle relazioni orientate agli eventi", 'mk': 'Вклучување на слика која се совпаѓа со набавката на знаење за препознавање на врските ориентирани на настаните', 'kk': 'Оқиға- бағытты қатынау үшін білімдерге сәйкес кескінді құру', 'lt': 'Įtraukti nuotrauką, atitinkančią žinių įgijimą, siekiant pripažinti su įvykiais susijusius ryšius', 'ms': 'Memasukkan Imej Berpadan Ke Pendapatan Kenalan untuk Pengenalan Hubungan Berorientasi Kejadian', 'ml': 'അന്ത്യ- മൂല്യം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള വിജ്ഞാനത്തിലേക്ക് പൊരുതുന്ന ചിത്രം കൂട്ടുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tal-Qbil tal-Immaġni fl-Akkwist tal-Għarfien għar-Rikonoxximent tar-Relazzjoni Orientata lejn l-Avvenimenti', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн холбоотой холбоотой мэдлэгтэй холбоотой холбоотой хүлээн зөвшөөрөх зураг', 'no': 'Inkorporering av bilete som passar inn i kjenningsakseptering for hendingar-orientert relasjon', 'pl': 'Włączenie dopasowania obrazów do nabywania wiedzy w celu rozpoznawania relacji zorientowanych na zdarzenia', 'ro': 'Incorporarea potrivirii imaginilor în achiziția de cunoștințe pentru recunoașterea relațiilor orientate spre evenimente', 'sr': 'Uključujući sliku koja se odgovara na prihvatanje znanja za prepoznavanje odnosa sa događajima orijentiranih događaja', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Inhorumarinta sawirka ee la xiriira aqoonta', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வு- தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்புகளுக்கு பொருந்தும் பிம்பத்தை ஒப்பிடுகிறது', 'sv': 'Att införliva bildmatchning i kunskapsförvärv för händelseorienterad relationsegenkänning', 'ur': 'تصویر کی پیدا کرتی ہے جو علم کے ساتھ ملتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cấu hình ảnh khớp với nhận dạng về sự kiện có liên quan', 'bg': 'Включване на съвпадение на изображенията в придобиването на знания за разпознаване на отношенията, ориентирани към събития', 'da': 'Inddragelse af billedmatchning i viden erhvervelse til begivenhedsorienteret relationsgenkendelse', 'nl': 'Beeldmatching opnemen in kennisverwerving voor gebeurtenisgerichte relatiebekendheid', 'hr': 'Uključujući sliku odgovarajuću prihvatanju znanja za prepoznavanje odnosa s događajima orijentiranih događaja', 'id': 'Menginkorporasi Gambar yang cocok ke Pencapaian Pengetahuan Hubungan Berorientasi Kejadian', 'de': 'Einbindung von Image Matching in Wissenserwerb zur ereignisorientierten Beziehungserkennung', 'sw': 'Picha zinazoingiza inayohusiana na kupata ufahamu kwa ajili ya kutambua Kuhusiana na Tukio', 'ko': '이미지가 일치하는 이벤트 관계 식별 지식을 바탕으로 획득', 'tr': 'Resim Gaýd Edilmek üçin Bilgi Girişinde Eşleýän Resim', 'sq': 'Duke përfshirë imazhin që përputhet me fitimin e njohurive për njohjen e marrëdhënieve të orientuara në ngjarje', 'af': 'Inkorporeer Beeld Ooreenstemmende in kennis aanvang vir Event- Orienteerde Relasie Herkenning', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'az': 'Görüntü Öyrəndiyi İlişkisi Tanıdırmaq üçün Bilməyə uyğunlaşdırılır', 'hy': 'Պատկերը համապատասխանում է իրադարձությունների վրա հիմնված հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերման գիտելիքի մեջ', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن تصویر هماهنگ به دریافت دانش برای شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای پیدا کردن رویداد', 'bn': 'ইভেন্ট- উল্লেখিত সম্পর্ক স্বীকারের জন্য প্রাপ্ত জ্ঞানের সাথে মিলিত ছবি অন্তর্ভুক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Uključujući sliku koja odgovara prihvatanju znanja za prepoznavanje odnosa iz događaja', 'ca': "Incorporar imatges que s'ajusten a l'adquisició del coneixement per a reconèixer les relacions orientades a eventos", 'et': 'Pildi sobitamine teadmiste omandamisse sündmustele orienteeritud suhete tuvastamiseks', 'cs': 'Začlenění shody obrazů do akvizice znalostí pro rozpoznávání vztahů orientovaných na události', 'fi': 'Kuvan yhdistäminen tiedon hankintaan tapahtumalähtöistä suhdetta varten', 'jv': 'Kemerdekaan Gambar Sampeyan Perangkat Kemerdekaan Bilih kanggo Kemerdekaan Eremu-Oriented Relative', 'he': 'מכיל תמונה מתאימה לזכות ידע לזהות מערכת יחסים מסורת לאירועים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Vključevanje ujemanja slik v pridobivanje znanja za prepoznavanje dogodkovno usmerjenih odnosov', 'bo': 'ནང་དུ་བྱ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་པའི་བརྙན་རིས་མཐུན་པ'}
{'en': 'Event relation recognition is a challenging language processing task. It is required to determine the relation class of a pair of query events, such as causality, under the condition that there is n’t any reliable clue for use. We follow the traditional statistical approach in this paper, speculating the relation class of the target events based on the relation-class distributions on the similar events. There is minimal supervision used during the speculation process. In particular, we incorporate image processing into the acquisition of similar event instances, including the utilization of images for visually representing event scenes, and the use of the neural network based image matching for approximate calculation between events. We test our method on the ACE-R2 corpus and compared our model with the fully-supervised neural network models. Experimental results show that we achieve a comparable performance to CNN while slightly better than LSTM.', 'ar': 'يعد التعرف على علاقة الحدث مهمة معالجة لغوية صعبة. مطلوب تحديد فئة العلاقة لزوج من أحداث الاستعلام ، مثل السببية ، بشرط عدم وجود أي دليل موثوق للاستخدام. نتبع النهج الإحصائي التقليدي في هذه الورقة ، متكهنًا بفئة العلاقة للأحداث المستهدفة بناءً على توزيعات فئة العلاقة على الأحداث المماثلة. هناك حد أدنى من الإشراف المستخدم أثناء عملية المضاربة. على وجه الخصوص ، نقوم بدمج معالجة الصور في الحصول على أمثلة أحداث مماثلة ، بما في ذلك استخدام الصور للتمثيل المرئي لمشاهد الأحداث ، واستخدام مطابقة الصور القائمة على الشبكة العصبية للحساب التقريبي بين الأحداث. اختبرنا طريقتنا على مجموعة ACE-R2 وقارننا نموذجنا بنماذج الشبكة العصبية الخاضعة للإشراف الكامل. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أننا نحقق أداءً مشابهًا لأداء CNN بينما أفضل قليلاً من LSTM.', 'pt': 'O reconhecimento da relação de eventos é uma tarefa desafiadora de processamento de linguagem. É necessário determinar a classe de relação de um par de eventos de consulta, como causalidade, sob a condição de que não haja nenhuma pista confiável para uso. Seguimos a abordagem estatística tradicional neste artigo, especulando a classe de relação dos eventos alvo com base nas distribuições de classe de relação nos eventos semelhantes. Há supervisão mínima usada durante o processo de especulação. Em particular, incorporamos o processamento de imagens na aquisição de instâncias de eventos semelhantes, incluindo a utilização de imagens para representar visualmente cenas de eventos e o uso da correspondência de imagens baseada em rede neural para cálculo aproximado entre eventos. Testamos nosso método no corpus ACE-R2 e comparamos nosso modelo com os modelos de rede neural totalmente supervisionados. Os resultados experimentais mostram que alcançamos um desempenho comparável ao da CNN, embora um pouco melhor do que o LSTM.', 'es': 'El reconocimiento de la relación de eventos es una tarea difícil de procesar el lenguaje Es necesario determinar la clase de relación de un par de eventos de consulta, como la causalidad, con la condición de que no haya ninguna pista confiable para su uso. Seguimos el enfoque estadístico tradicional en este artículo, especulando sobre la clase de relación de los eventos objetivo en función de las distribuciones de clase de relación de los eventos similares. Se utiliza una supervisión mínima durante el proceso de especulación. En particular, incorporamos el procesamiento de imágenes en la adquisición de instancias de eventos similares, incluida la utilización de imágenes para representar visualmente escenas de eventos y el uso de la coincidencia de imágenes basada en redes neuronales para el cálculo aproximado entre eventos. Probamos nuestro método en el corpus ACE-R2 y comparamos nuestro modelo con los modelos de redes neuronales totalmente supervisados. Los resultados experimentales muestran que logramos un rendimiento comparable al de la CNN, aunque ligeramente mejor que el LSTM.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance de la relation d'événement est une tâche de traitement linguistique complexe. Il est nécessaire de déterminer la classe de relation d'une paire d'événements de requête, tels que la causalité, à condition qu'il n'existe aucun indice fiable à utiliser. Nous suivons l'approche statistique traditionnelle dans cet article, en spéculant sur la classe de relations des événements cibles en fonction des distributions de classes de relations sur les événements similaires. La supervision utilisée pendant le processus de spéculation est minimale. En particulier, nous intégrons le traitement d'images dans l'acquisition d'instances d'événements similaires, y compris l'utilisation d'images pour représenter visuellement des scènes d'événements, et l'utilisation de la correspondance d'images basée sur le réseau neuronal pour le calcul approximatif entre les événements. Nous testons notre méthode sur le corpus ACE-R2 et avons comparé notre modèle avec les modèles de réseaux neuronaux entièrement supervisés. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que nous obtenons des performances comparables à celles de CNN tout en étant légèrement supérieures à celles de LSTM.", 'ja': 'イベント関係認識は、困難な言語処理タスクです。使用するための信頼できる手がかりがないという条件下で、因果関係などの一対のクエリイベントの関係クラスを決定する必要があります。本稿では従来の統計学的アプローチに従い、同様の事象に関する関係クラス分布に基づいて対象事象の関係クラスを推測する。投機プロセス中に使用される監督は最小限です。特に、イベントシーンを視覚的に表現するための画像の利用、およびイベント間の近似計算のためのニューラルネットワークベースの画像マッチングの使用を含む、同様のイベントインスタンスの取得に画像処理を組み込む。ACE - R 2コーパスでメソッドをテストし、完全に監視されたニューラルネットワークモデルとモデルを比較しました。実験結果は、LSTMよりわずかに優れているが、CNNに匹敵する性能を達成していることを示している。', 'hi': 'घटना संबंध पहचान एक चुनौतीपूर्ण भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्य है। क्वेरी घटनाओं की एक जोड़ी के संबंध वर्ग को निर्धारित करना आवश्यक है, जैसे कि कार्यकारणता, इस शर्त के तहत कि उपयोग के लिए कोई विश्वसनीय सुराग नहीं है। हम इस पेपर में पारंपरिक सांख्यिकीय दृष्टिकोण का पालन करते हैं, इसी तरह की घटनाओं पर संबंध-वर्ग वितरण के आधार पर लक्ष्य घटनाओं के संबंध वर्ग का अनुमान लगाते हैं। अटकलों की प्रक्रिया के दौरान कम से कम पर्यवेक्षण का उपयोग किया जाता है। विशेष रूप से, हम इसी तरह के घटना उदाहरणों के अधिग्रहण में छवि प्रसंस्करण को शामिल करते हैं, जिसमें घटना दृश्यों का नेत्रहीन प्रतिनिधित्व करने के लिए छवियों का उपयोग और घटनाओं के बीच अनुमानित गणना के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आधारित छवि मिलान का उपयोग शामिल है। हम एसीई-आर 2 कॉर्पस पर अपनी विधि का परीक्षण करते हैं और पूरी तरह से पर्यवेक्षित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल के साथ हमारे मॉडल की तुलना करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हम सीएनएन के लिए एक तुलनीय प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं जबकि एलएसटीएम की तुलना में थोड़ा बेहतर है।', 'zh': '事有挑战性言。 无一线之用,须定双询事类,如因果关系。 本文用旧法,盖相似之类,推事之类也。 其监督最少。 特以图像处理入类事例采中,包用图像以直观其事,及用神经网络之象匹类之近计也。 试我 ACE-R2 语料库上,比我神经网络。 实验结果表明,吾得CNN相当,兼优于LSTM。', 'ru': 'Распознавание отношений событий - сложная задача обработки языка. Необходимо определить класс отношения пары событий запроса, таких как причинно-следственная связь, при условии, что нет надежной подсказки для использования. Мы следуем традиционному статистическому подходу в этой работе, спекулируя классом отношений целевых событий на основе распределений классов отношений на аналогичных событиях. В процессе спекуляции используется минимальный контроль. В частности, мы включаем обработку изображений в получение схожих экземпляров событий, включая использование изображений для визуального представления сцен событий и использование сопоставления изображений на основе нейронной сети для приблизительного расчета между событиями. Мы протестировали наш метод на корпусе Ace-R2 и сравнили нашу модель с полностью контролируемыми моделями нейронной сети. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что мы достигаем сопоставимой производительности с CNN, в то время как немного лучше, чем LSTM.', 'ga': 'Is tasc próiseála teanga dúshlánach é aithint caidreamh imeachtaí. Ceanglaítear aicme choibhneasta péire imeachtaí fiosrúcháin a chinneadh, amhail cúisíocht, ar an gcoinníoll nach bhfuil aon leid iontaofa maidir le húsáid. Leanaimid an cur chuige staitistiúil traidisiúnta sa pháipéar seo, ag tuairimíocht ar aicme choibhneasta na sprioc-imeachtaí bunaithe ar na dáiltí gaol-aicme ar na himeachtaí comhchosúla. Is beag maoirseacht a úsáidtear le linn an phróisis tuairimíochta. Go háirithe, déanaimid próiseáil íomhá a ionchorprú in éadáil cásanna comhchosúla, lena n-áirítear úsáid a bhaint as íomhánna chun radhairc ócáide a léiriú, agus úsáid an mheaitseála íomhánna bunaithe ar líonra néaraigh chun neas-ríomh a dhéanamh idir imeachtaí. Déanaimid tástáil ar ár modh ar an gcorpas ACE-R2 agus chuireamar ár samhail i gcomparáid leis na samhlacha néarlíonra atá faoi mhaoirseacht iomlán. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go mbainimid amach feidhmíocht inchomparáide le CNN agus é beagán níos fearr ná LSTM.', 'hu': 'Az eseménykapcsolatok felismerése egy kihívást jelentő nyelvi feldolgozási feladat. Meg kell határozni egy lekérdezési eseménypár kapcsolatosztályát, például az okozati összefüggést, azzal a feltétellel, hogy nincs megbízható nyom a használatra. Jelen tanulmányban a hagyományos statisztikai megközelítést követjük, spekulálva a célesemények relatív osztályát a hasonló események relatív osztályának eloszlása alapján. A spekulációs folyamat során minimális felügyeletet alkalmaznak. Különösen a hasonló eseménypéldányok megszerzésébe építjük be a képfeldolgozást, beleértve a képek vizuális eseményjelenetek megjelenítésére történő felhasználását, valamint az események közötti hozzávetőleges kiszámításhoz a neurális hálózat alapú képfeldolgozás használatát. A módszerünket ACE-R2 korpuszon teszteltük és összehasonlítottuk modellünket a teljes mértékben felügyelt neurális hálózati modellekkel. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy összehasonlítható teljesítményt érünk el a CNN-hez, miközben valamivel jobb, mint az LSTM.', 'ka': 'მოვლენების შესახებ განაცნობა არის შესაძლებელი ენის პროცესი დავალება. საჭიროა კითხვა მოვლენების კლასის დაკავშირების კლასის განსაზღვრება, როგორც წარმოადგენება, როგორც წარმოადგენება, რომ გამოყენებაში არსებობს დარწმუნებელი კლასი. ჩვენ ამ დომენტის ტრადიციონალური სტატისტიკური პროგრამის შესახებ, სპეკულაციას მინიშვნელოვანი მოვლენების კლასის შესახებ, რომელიც განსხვავებული მოვლენების შესახე სპეკულაციის პროცესში გამოყენებულია მინიმალური ნახვა. განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ გამოსახულების პროცესის შეიძლებაში დავყენებთ განსხვავებული მოვლენების ინსტაციების გამოსახულება, რომელიც გამოსახულების გამოსახულება მოვლენების სენების გამოსახულება და ნეიროლური ქსელ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ჩვენი მეთოდი ACE-R2 კორპუსზე და ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარება ყველაფერად დანახვა ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელთან. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენ მივიღეთ სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა CNN-ზე', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση σχέσης συμβάντος είναι μια δύσκολη εργασία επεξεργασίας γλώσσας. Απαιτείται ο προσδιορισμός της κλάσης σχέσης ενός ζευγαριού συμβάντων ερωτήματος, όπως αιτιώδης συνάφεια, υπό την προϋπόθεση ότι δεν υπάρχει κανένα αξιόπιστο στοιχείο για χρήση. Ακολουθούμε την παραδοσιακή στατιστική προσέγγιση στην παρούσα εργασία, υποθέτοντας την κατηγορία σχέσης των γεγονότων στόχων με βάση τις διανομές σχέσης-τάξης στα παρόμοια γεγονότα. Υπάρχει ελάχιστη εποπτεία που χρησιμοποιείται κατά τη διάρκεια της διαδικασίας κερδοσκοπίας. Ειδικότερα, ενσωματώνουμε την επεξεργασία εικόνας στην απόκτηση παρόμοιων περιπτώσεων συμβάντος, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της χρήσης εικόνων για την οπτική απεικόνιση σκηνών συμβάντος, και της χρήσης της αντιστοίχισης εικόνας βασισμένης στο νευρωνικό δίκτυο για τον κατά προσέγγιση υπολογισμό μεταξύ συμβάντων. Δοκιμάζουμε τη μέθοδο μας στο σώμα και συγκρίνουμε το μοντέλο μας με τα πλήρως εποπτευόμενα μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι επιτυγχάνουμε μια συγκρίσιμη απόδοση με το CNN ενώ ελαφρώς καλύτερη από την LSTM.', 'mk': 'Признавањето на врските со настаните е предизвикувачка задача за обработување јазик. Потребно е да се одреди класата на односи на пар прашања, како што е причината, под услов дека нема доверлива идеја за употреба. We follow the traditional statistical approach in this paper, speculating the relation class of the target events based on the relation-class distributions on the similar events.  Постои минимален надзор кој се користи за време на процесот на шпекулации. Особено, ние вклучуваме обработување на слики во купувањето на слични случаи, вклучувајќи ја и употребата на слики за визуелно претставување на сцени на настаните, и употребата на слика базирана на нервната мрежа за приближна пресметка помеѓу настаните. We test our method on the ACE-R2 corpus and compared our model with the fully-supervised neural network models.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека постигнуваме споредлива перформанса со СНН, а малку подобра од ЛСТМ.', 'lt': 'Įvykių ryšių pripažinimas yra sudėtinga kalbų apdorojimo užduotis. Būtina nustatyti poros klausimų, pvz., priežastinio ryšio, santykių klasę su sąlyga, kad nėra jokių patikimų naudojimo požymių. We follow the traditional statistical approach in this paper, speculating the relation class of the target events based on the relation-class distributions on the similar events.  Spekuliacijos metu atliekama minimali priežiūra. Visų pirma įtraukiame vaizdo apdorojimą į panašių įvykių atvejų įsigijimą, įskaitant vaizdų naudojimą vaizdo vaizdo atvaizdams vaizdo atvaizdams vaizdo atvaizdams vaizdo atvaizdams vaizdo atvaizdams vaizdo atvaizdams vaizdo atvaizdams apytiksliai apskaičiuoti tarp įvykių. Bandome ACE-R2 korpuso metodą ir palyginame savo model į su visapusiškai prižiūrimais nervų tinklo modeliais. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mes pasiekiame panašių rezultatų kaip CNN, o šiek tiek geresnių rezultatų nei LSTM.', 'it': "Il riconoscimento delle relazioni con eventi è un compito di elaborazione linguistica impegnativo. È necessario determinare la classe di relazione di una coppia di eventi di query, come la causalità, a condizione che non ci sia alcun indizio affidabile da utilizzare. Seguiamo l'approccio statistico tradizionale in questo articolo, speculando la classe di relazione degli eventi target sulla base delle distribuzioni di relazione-classe sugli eventi simili. C'è una supervisione minima utilizzata durante il processo di speculazione. In particolare, incorporamo l'elaborazione delle immagini nell'acquisizione di istanze di eventi simili, incluso l'utilizzo di immagini per rappresentare visivamente scene di eventi, e l'uso della corrispondenza delle immagini basata sulla rete neurale per il calcolo approssimativo tra eventi. Abbiamo testato il nostro metodo sul corpo ACE-R2 e confrontato il nostro modello con i modelli di rete neurale completamente supervisionati. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che otteniamo prestazioni paragonabili a CNN mentre leggermente migliori di LSTM.", 'kk': 'Оқиға қатынасын анықтау - тілді өңдеу тапсырмасы. Сұраныс оқиғаларының екі қатынасын анықтау керек, мысалы, себебі, пайдалану үшін сенімді таңбалар жоқ. Біз осы қағаздың традиционалдық статистикалық тәсілдерін қалаймыз, ұқсас оқиғалардың қатынастарына негізделген мақсатты оқиғалардың қатынастарының класын анықтаймыз. Спекуляциялау процесінде қолданылатын төменгі бақылау бар. Оқиғалар арасындағы есептеу үшін кескіндердің өзгерістерін алу үшін кескіндердің өзгерістерін қолдануға және невралдық желінің негіздеген кескінін қолдануға болады. Біз ACE-R2 корпус тәсілімізді тексеріп, моделімізді толық бақылайтын невралды желі моделдерімен салыстырып көрдік. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біз CNN-мен салыстыратын әрекеттерді LSTM-ден артық жақсы көрсетеді.', 'ml': 'അവസാന ബന്ധം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയാണ്. ഒരു ജോലിയുടെ സംഭവങ്ങളുടെ ബന്ധം ക്ലാസ് നിര്\u200dണയിക്കേണ്ടതാണ് ആവശ്യമുള്ളത്, കാരണം, ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d വിശ്വസ്തമായ ഒരു കാര്യം ഇല്ല എന് ഈ പത്രത്തിലെ പാര്\u200dട്ടിക്കാരുടെ പാര്\u200dട്ടികമായ പരിസ്ഥിതികസ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പിന്തുടരുന്നു. ഇതുപോലെയുള്ള സംഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d  കണക്കാക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും ചെറുതായ നിരീക്ഷണം ഉണ്ട്. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഇമേജ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഇങ്ങനെ സംഭവിക്കുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നതിലേക്ക് നമ്മള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു. ഇങ്ങനെ സംഭവിക്കുന്നതി We test our method on the ACE-R2 corpus and compared our model with the fully-supervised neural network models.  പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d സിഎന്\u200dഎനിലേക്ക് തുല്യമായ ഒരു പ്രദര്\u200dശനം നേടുന്നത് എന്ന്', 'mn': 'Эцэст нь хүлээн зөвшөөрөл нь хэл үйлдвэрлэх үйл ажиллагаа хэцүү. Хэрэв шалтгаан үйл явдлын хоорондын хоорондын харилцааны хичээл тогтоох хэрэгтэй, хэрэглэх боломжгүй нөхцөлд ямар ч итгэлтэй тоо байхгүй байх шаардлагатай. Бид энэ цаасан дээрх уламжлалт статистикийн арга замыг дагаж, төстэй үйл явдлын харилцааны хичээлийг тодорхойлж байна. Тодорхойлолтын үйл ажиллагаанд бага зэрэгцээ хэрэглэгддэг. Ялангуяа бид төстэй үйл явдлын үйл явдлын хувьд зураг боловсруулах үйл явдлын хувьд төстэй үйл явдлын хувьд зураг хэрэглэх болон мэдрэлийн сүлжээний суурь зураг хэрэглэх боломжтой үйл явдлын хоорондын ойролцоогоор Бид ACE-R2 корпус дээр аргыг шалгаж, моделийг бүрэн удирдлагатай мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвартай харьцуулсан. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бид СНБ-тэй бага зэрэг илүү харьцуулагдаж байгааг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Hendingsrovsningar er ein vanskeleg språkshandteringsoppgåve. Det er nødvendig å bestemme relasjonsklassen til ei par spørjingsbehandlingar, slik som grunnlag, under vilkåret a t det ikkje finst nokon tiltrudd for bruk. Vi følgjer den tradisjonelle statistiske tilnærminga i denne papira, spesifiserer relasjonsklassen på målene basert på relasjonsklassedistribusjonane på dei liknande hendingane. Det er minste oversikt brukt under spekulasjonsprosessen. I særskilt inkluderer vi biletprosessering i henting av liknande hendingskonstillingar, inkluderer bruken av bilete for å visa hendingskonstillingar, og bruken av det neuralnettverket-baserte biletet som passar med omtrent utrekning mellom hendingar. Vi tester metoden vårt på ACE-R2-korpusen og sammenligna modellen vårt med de fullstendige neuralnettverksmodelane. Eksperimentale resultat viser at vi oppnår ei sammenlignbare utvikling med CNN mens litt bedre enn LSTM.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie relacji zdarzeń jest trudnym zadaniem przetwarzania języka. Wymagane jest określenie klasy relacji pary zdarzeń zapytania, takich jak związek przyczynowy, pod warunkiem, że nie ma żadnej wiarygodnej wskazówki do użycia. Stosujemy tradycyjne podejście statystyczne w niniejszym artykule, spekulując klasę relacji zdarzeń docelowych w oparciu o rozkłady relacji-klas na podobnych zdarzeniach. Podczas procesu spekulacji stosowany jest minimalny nadzór. W szczególności uwzględniamy przetwarzanie obrazu w pozyskiwaniu podobnych instancji zdarzeń, w tym wykorzystanie obrazów do wizualnego reprezentowania scen zdarzeń oraz wykorzystanie dopasowywania obrazów opartych na sieci neuronowej do przybliżonych obliczeń między zdarzeniami. Testowaliśmy naszą metodę na korpusie ACE-R2 i porównaliśmy nasz model z modelami sieci neuronowych w pełni nadzorowanymi. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że osiągamy porównywalną wydajność do CNN, a jednocześnie nieco lepszą niż LSTM.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea relațiilor de evenimente este o sarcină dificilă de procesare a limbajului. Este necesar să se determine clasa de relație a unei perechi de evenimente de interogare, cum ar fi cauzalitatea, cu condiția ca nu există nici un indiciu fiabil pentru utilizare. Urmărim abordarea statistică tradițională din această lucrare, speculând clasa de relație a evenimentelor țintă pe baza distribuțiilor de relație-clasă pe evenimente similare. Există o supraveghere minimă utilizată în timpul procesului de speculație. În special, încorporăm procesarea imaginii în achiziționarea de instanțe similare de evenimente, inclusiv utilizarea imaginilor pentru reprezentarea vizuală a scenelor de evenimente și utilizarea potrivirii imaginilor bazate pe rețeaua neurală pentru calculul aproximativ între evenimente. Testăm metoda pe corpul ACE-R2 și am comparat modelul cu modelele de rețea neurală complet supravegheate. Rezultatele experimentale arată că obținem o performanță comparabilă cu CNN, dar ușor mai bună decât LSTM.', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje događaja je izazovni zadatak obrade jezika. Potrebno je odrediti klasu odnosa par događaja ispitivanja, kao što je uzrok, pod uvjetom da nema pouzdanog traga za upotrebu. Pratimo tradicionalni statistički pristup u ovom papiru, spekulirajući odnos klase ciljnih događaja na temelju distribucije klase odnosa o sličnim događajima. Postoji minimalni nadzor koji se koristi tokom procesa spekulacije. Posebno, uključujemo obradu slika u prikupljanje sličnih slučajeva događaja, uključujući korištenje slika za vizualno predstavljanje scena događaja, i korištenje slika na osnovu neuralne mreže koja odgovara približnom računanju između događaja. Testiramo našu metodu na korpusu ACE-R2 i uspoređujemo naš model sa potpuno nadziranim modelima neuromreže. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da postignemo usporedbenu izvedbu sa CNN dok je malo bolje od LSTM-a.', 'si': 'අවස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ පරීක්ෂණය තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්න භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය වැඩක්. ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධතාවක් වගේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැති වි අපි මේ පත්තියේ සාමාන්\u200dය සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරවේශනය පස්සේ පස්සෙන් පස්සෙන් පස්සෙන් ඉලක්ෂ අවස්ථාවයේ සම්බන්ධතාව සැකසුම් පරීක්ෂණය වෙලාවට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙනවා. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පින්තූර පරීක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පින්තූර සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පින්තූර සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පින්තූර සම් අපි ACE-R2 කෝර්පුස් එක්ක අපේ විධානය පරීක්ෂා කරලා අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපිට LSTM වඩා ටිකක් හොඳ වෙලා තියෙන්න පුළුවන් CNN', 'ms': 'Pengenalan hubungan peristiwa adalah tugas pemprosesan bahasa yang mencabar. Ia diperlukan untuk menentukan kelas hubungan pasangan peristiwa pertanyaan, seperti penyebab, dalam syarat bahawa tidak ada petunjuk yang boleh dipercayai untuk digunakan. Kami mengikut pendekatan statistik tradisional dalam kertas ini, mengira kelas hubungan peristiwa sasaran berdasarkan distribusi kelas hubungan pada peristiwa yang sama. Terdapat pengawasan minimal digunakan semasa proses spekulasi. Secara khususnya, kami memasukkan pemprosesan imej ke dalam pembelian kes peristiwa yang sama, termasuk penggunaan imej untuk mewakili secara visual adegan peristiwa, dan penggunaan imej berdasarkan rangkaian saraf yang sepadan untuk pengiraan kira-kira antara peristiwa. We test our method on the ACE-R2 corpus and compared our model with the fully-supervised neural network models.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kita mencapai prestasi yang sama dengan CNN sementara sedikit lebih baik daripada LSTM.', 'mt': 'Ir-rikonoxximent tar-relazzjoni tal-avvenimenti huwa kompitu ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi ta’ sfida. Huwa meħtieġ li tiġi ddeterminata l-klassi t a’ relazzjoni ta’ par ta’ avvenimenti ta’ mistoqsija, bħall-kawżalità, bil-kundizzjoni li ma jkun hemm l-ebda indikazzjoni affidabbli għall-użu. We follow the traditional statistical approach in this paper, speculating the relation class of the target events based on the relation-class distributions on the similar events.  There is minimal supervision used during the speculation process.  B’mod partikolari, inkorporajna l-ipproċessar tal-immaġni fl-akkwist ta’ każijiet simili ta’ avvenimenti, inkluż l-użu ta’ immaġni għal xeni ta’ avvenimenti li jirrappreżentaw viżwalment, u l-użu ta’ tqabbil tal-immaġni bbażat fuq in-netwerk newrali għal kalkolu approssimattiv bejn avvenimenti. Aħna ntestjaw il-metodu tagħna fuq l-ACE-R2 corpus u qabblu l-mudell tagħna mal-mudelli tan-netwerk newrali ssorveljati bis-sħiħ. Experimental results show that we achieve a comparable performance to CNN while slightly better than LSTM.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada xiriirka dhacdu waa shaqada baaraandegista luuqada oo adag. Waxaa loo baahan yahay in la caddeeyo fasalka xiriirka laba nooc oo dhacdooyinka la xiriira, tusaale ahaan sababta, haddii aan jirin cilmi la aamin karo isticmaalka. Qoraalkan ayaannu raacnaa habka takhasuska ah, waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa fasalka dhacdooyinka arrimaha la xiriira oo ku saleysan qaybsashada fasalka isku mid ah. Waxaa laga helaa ilaalinta ugu yaraan ee lagu isticmaalayo marka lagu sameeyo xisaabta. Si gaar ah, waxaynu u koobnaynaa sawirka baaraandegista dhacdooyinka oo la mid ah, kuwaas oo ku jira isticmaalka sawirada si ay u muuqato dhacdooyinka, iyo isticmaalka shabakadda neurada ee u eg sawir xafiiska dhacdooyinka dhexdooda ah. Waxaynu tijaabinaynaa qaababka ku saabsan korpuska ACE-R2, waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qaababka shabakadda neurada oo dhan la ilaaliyey. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in aynu sameyno tababar u eg CNN, iyadoo ay ka wanaagsan tahay LSTM.', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வு தொடர்பு அறிவிப்பு ஒரு சவாலிக்க மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் செயல். ஒரு ஜோடி கேள்வி நிகழ்வுகளின் தொடர்பு வகுப்பை தீர்மானிக்க வேண்டும், காரணம், பயன்படுத்த எந்த நம்பிக்கையான குறிப்பு இல்லை என்ற நாம் இந்த காகிதத்தில் பாரம்பரிய புள்ளிவிவரம் செயல்பாடு குறைந்தபட்ச கண்காணிப்பு செயல்பாட்டில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது. குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் பிம்பத்தை செயல்படுத்தும் போன்ற நிகழ்வு நிகழ்வுகளை பெறுவதற்குள் சேர்த்து, நிகழ்வு நிகழ்வுகளை பார்வையாக க காட்டும் பிம்பங்களை பயன் ACE-R2 கோர்ப்ஸ் மீது எங்கள் முறையை சோதிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் மாதிரியை முழுமையாக கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட புதிய வலைப்ப முயற்சி முடிவுகள் LSTM விட சிறிது சிஎன்என்னுக்கு ஒப்பீட்டு செயல்பாட்டை பெறுகிறது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது.', 'sv': 'Identifiering av händelserelationer är en utmanande språkbehandlingsuppgift. Det krävs att bestämma relationsklassen för ett par frågehändelser, till exempel orsakssamband, under förutsättning att det inte finns någon tillförlitlig ledtråd för användning. Vi följer det traditionella statistiska tillvägagångssättet i denna uppsats och spekulerar relationsklassen för målhändelserna baserat på relationsklassfördelningarna på liknande händelser. Under spekulationsprocessen används minimal övervakning. I synnerhet införlivar vi bildbehandling i förvärv av liknande händelseinstanser, inklusive användning av bilder för visuellt representation av händelsescener, och användning av neurala nätverksbaserade bildmatchning för ungefärlig beräkning mellan händelser. Vi testar vår metod på ACE-R2 corpus och jämförde vår modell med fullt övervakade neurala nätverksmodeller. Experimentella resultat visar att vi uppnår en jämförbar prestanda med CNN samtidigt som vi är något bättre än LSTM.', 'ur': 'حادثہ رابطہ شناسایی ایک مشکل زبان پردازی کا کام ہے. اس کی ضرورت ہے کہ ایک جوڑے سؤال حادثوں کی نسبت کا کلاس مقرر کرے، جیسے دلیل حادثہ، اس حالت میں کہ استعمال کے لئے کوئی قابل اعتماد کا نقطہ نہیں ہے. ہم اس کاغذ میں سنتی آمار طریقے کے پیچھے چلتے ہیں، جس طرح طریقے کے مطابق رابطہ-کلاس تقسیم کے متعلق موجود ہونے کے متعلق موجود ہونے کے متعلق موجود ہو رہے ہیں. اسپگلوٹ پرسس کے بارے میں کم نظارت استعمال کی جاتی ہے. مخصوصا، ہم نے تصویر پرسسور کے ذریعہ مشابہ ایڈینٹ ایڈینٹ ایڈینس کو حاصل کرنے میں شامل کیا ہے، یہاں تک کہ ایڈینٹ سینیوں کی تصویر کا استعمال کرنا، اور نیورل نیٹ ورک کی بنیادی تصویر کا استعمال کرنا، جو حادثوں کے درمیان تقریبا ہم نے ACE-R2 کورپوس کے ذریعے اپنے طریقے کی آزمائش کی اور ہمارے مدل کو پورے نظارت والی نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل سے مقایسہ کیا۔ آزمائش کے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہم سی ان کے ساتھ ایک مقایسہ کرسکتے ہیں حالانکہ LSTM سے تھوڑا بہتر ہے.', 'uz': "Hodisa taʼminlovchisi tilni boshqarish vazifa. Name Biz bu qogʻozdagi taʼminlovchi statistik usulida qo'shishimiz, huddi huddi hodisalar bilan bog'liq boshqaruvchilar darajasini ko'rsatuvchimiz. Name @ info: whatsthis Biz ACE-R2 korpusning usulini sinash va modelimizni butunlay qo'llangan tarmoq modellari bilan kamaytamiz. Experimental results show that we achieve a comparable performance to CNN while slightly better than LSTM.", 'vi': 'Việc nhận dạng sự kiện là một nhiệm vụ xử lý ngôn ngữ khó khăn. Nó cần thiết để xác định phân loại t ương quan của một cặp các sự kiện truy vấn, như nhân quả, dưới điều kiện là không có đầu mối đáng tin cậy để sử dụng. Chúng ta theo phương pháp thống truyền thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống thống kê trong bài báo này, suy đoán về tỷ lệ liên quan của các sự kiện mục tiêu dựa trên các phân phát phân loại tương tự. Trong quá trình suy đoán có ít sự giám sát. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi nhập phần xử lý hình ảnh vào việc nhận dạng các trường hợp tương tự, bao gồm sử dụng ảnh để đại diện trực tiếp các hiện trường các sự kiện, và sử dụng ảnh dựa vào mạng thần kinh để tính toán xấp xỉ giữa các sự kiện. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm phương pháp này trên tập hợp ACE-R2 và so sánh mô hình của chúng tôi với các mô hình mạng thần kinh giám sát đầy đủ. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy chúng ta đạt được hiệu suất tương đương với CNN nhưng có phần tốt hơn LSD.', 'nl': 'Het herkennen van gebeurtenisrelaties is een uitdagende taak voor taalverwerking. Het is vereist om de relatieklasse van een paar query-gebeurtenissen te bepalen, zoals causaliteit, op voorwaarde dat er geen betrouwbare aanwijzing voor gebruik is. We volgen de traditionele statistische benadering in dit artikel, waarbij we speculeren over de relatieklasse van de doelgebeurtenissen op basis van de relatieklassenverdeling op de vergelijkbare gebeurtenissen. Er wordt minimaal toezicht gebruikt tijdens het speculatieproces. In het bijzonder integreren we beeldverwerking in de verwerving van soortgelijke gebeurtenisinstanties, inclusief het gebruik van beelden voor het visueel weergeven van gebeurtenisscènes, en het gebruik van het op neuraal netwerk gebaseerde beeldmatching voor benaderende berekeningen tussen gebeurtenissen. We testen onze methode op het ACE-R2 corpus en vergeleken ons model met de volledig begeleide neurale netwerkmodellen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat we een vergelijkbare prestatie behalen als CNN terwijl we iets beter presteren dan LSTM.', 'da': 'Genkendelse af hændelsesrelationer er en udfordrende sprogbehandlingsopgave. Det er nødvendigt at bestemme relationsklassen for et par forespørgselshændelser, såsom årsagssammenhæng, under forudsætning af at der ikke er nogen pålidelig spor til brug. Vi følger den traditionelle statistiske tilgang i denne artikel, idet vi spekulerer relationsklassen af målbegivenhederne baseret på relationsklassefordelingen på lignende begivenheder. Der anvendes minimalt tilsyn under spekulationsprocessen. Især indarbejder vi billedbehandling i erhvervelsen af lignende begivenhedsforekomster, herunder brug af billeder til visuelt repræsentation af begivenhedsscener, og brug af det neurale netværk baserede billedmatchning til omtrentlig beregning mellem begivenheder. Vi tester vores metode på ACE-R2 corpus og sammenlignede vores model med de fuldt overvågede neurale netværksmodeller. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vi opnår en sammenlignelig ydeevne med CNN, mens vi er lidt bedre end LSTM.', 'bg': 'Разпознаването на връзката със събития е предизвикателна задача за обработка на езика. Необходимо е да се определи класът на връзката на двойка събития от заявка, като причинно-следствена връзка, при условие че няма надеждна улика за използване. Следваме традиционния статистически подход в тази статия, спекулирайки относителния клас на целевите събития въз основа на относителните класове разпределения на подобни събития. По време на процеса на спекулация се използва минимален надзор. По-специално, ние включваме обработка на изображения в придобиването на подобни случаи на събития, включително използването на изображения за визуално представяне на сцени на събития и използването на съвпадение на изображения въз основа на невронна мрежа за приблизително изчисление между събитията. Тестваме метода си върху корпуса и сравняваме модела си с напълно наблюдаваните модели на невронна мрежа. Експерименталните резултати показват, че постигаме сравнима производителност с CNN, докато малко по-добра от LSTM.', 'hr': 'Priznavanje odnosa na događaje je izazovni zadatak obrade jezika. Potrebno je odrediti klasu odnosa par događaja ispitivanja, poput uzrokovanja, pod uvjetom da nema pouzdanog traga za upotrebu. Pratimo tradicionalni statistički pristup u ovom papiru, spekulirajući odnos klase ciljnih događaja na temelju distribucije klase odnosa o sličnim događajima. Postoji minimalni nadzor koji se koristi tijekom procesa spekulacije. Posebno, uključujemo obradu slika u prikupljanje sličnih slučajeva događaja, uključujući korištenje slika za vizualno predstavljanje scena događaja, i korištenje slika na osnovu neuralne mreže koja odgovara približnom računanju između događaja. Testiramo našu metodu na korpusu ACE-R2 i uspoređujemo naš model sa potpuno nadziranim modelima neuromreže. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da postignemo usporedbenu izvedbu sa CNN-om dok je malo bolje od LSTM-a.', 'id': 'Pengenalan hubungan peristiwa adalah tugas memproses bahasa yang menantang. Diperlukan untuk menentukan kelas hubungan dari sepasang peristiwa pertanyaan, seperti penyebab, dalam kondisi bahwa tidak ada petunjuk yang dapat dipercaya untuk digunakan. Kami mengikuti pendekatan statistik tradisional di kertas ini, spekulasi kelas hubungan peristiwa sasaran berdasarkan distribusi kelas hubungan peristiwa yang sama. Ada pengawasan minimal yang digunakan selama proses spekulasi. Terutama, kami memasukkan proses gambar ke dalam akuisisi kejadian yang sama, termasuk penggunaan gambar untuk mewakili secara visual adegan kejadian, dan penggunaan gambar berdasarkan jaringan saraf yang cocok untuk perhitungan sekitar antara kejadian. Kami menguji metode kami pada corpus ACE-R2 dan membandingkan model kami dengan model jaringan saraf yang diawasi sepenuhnya. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa kita mencapai prestasi yang sama dengan CNN sementara sedikit lebih baik dari LSTM.', 'de': 'Die Erkennung von Ereignisbeziehungen ist eine herausfordernde Sprachverarbeitungsaufgabe. Es ist erforderlich, die Relationsklasse eines Paares von Abfrageereignissen zu bestimmen, z. B. Kausalität, unter der Bedingung, dass es keinen zuverlässigen Anhaltspunkt für die Verwendung gibt. Wir folgen dem traditionellen statistischen Ansatz in diesem Beitrag, indem wir die Relationsklasse der Zielereignisse basierend auf den Relationsklassen Verteilungen auf den ähnlichen Ereignissen spekulieren. Während des Spekulationsprozesses wird nur minimal überwacht. Insbesondere beziehen wir Bildverarbeitung in die Erfassung ähnlicher Ereignisinstanzen ein, einschließlich der Verwendung von Bildern zur visuellen Darstellung von Ereignisszenen, und die Verwendung des neuronalen Netzwerkbasierten Bildabgleichs zur ungefähren Berechnung zwischen Ereignissen. Wir testen unsere Methode am ACE-R2 Korpus und verglichen unser Modell mit den vollständig überwachten neuronalen Netzwerkmodellen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass wir eine vergleichbare Leistung mit CNN erzielen, während wir etwas besser als LSTM sind.', 'fa': 'تعریف رابطه رویداد یک کار پرداخت زبان مشکل است. لازم است که کلاس ارتباطی یک جفت از اتفاقات سوال را تعیین کند، مانند دلایل، در حالی که هیچ نشانه قابل استفاده برای استفاده وجود ندارد. ما روش آمار سنتی را در این کاغذ دنبال می\u200cکنیم، با تخمین ارتباط کلاس رویدادهای هدف بر اساس توزیع کلاس ارتباط بر روی رویدادهای شبیه. نیروی کمینه در طول فرایند تخمین استفاده می\u200cشود. مخصوصا، ما پردازش تصویر را در دریافت حادثه\u200cهای مشابه، شامل استفاده از تصویر برای نمایش صحنه\u200cهای رویداد تصویر، و استفاده از تصویر بنیاد شبکه عصبی برای محاسبه\u200cای بین حادثه\u200cها شامل می\u200cشویم. ما روش خودمان را روی کورپوس ACE-R2 آزمایش می کنیم و مدل ما را با مدل شبکه عصبی کامل تحت نظر قرار دادیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که ما یک نمایش قابل مقایسه با سین\u200cان می\u200cرسیم در حالی که کمی بهتر از LSTM است.', 'tr': 'Vaqialar bilen tanamak çykyş dil işleýän işidir. Kullanmak üçin hiç hili ynamly bir pikir däldir. Biz bu kagyzdaki däpli statistik ýalaýyşyny yzarlýarys, şol ýaly bolup geçýän hadysalaryň golaý paýlaşmalaryna daýanýar. Açmak üçin azajyk nadirim bar. Özellikle de resim işlemlerini benzer olar örneklerin alınmasına dahil etkinler sahnelerine görsel ifade etmek için resim işlemlerini ve neural ağ tabanlı resim kullanımına eşit etmiş olar arasynda yaklaşık hesaplamak için kullanılıyoruz. ACE-R2 korpusu üzerinde yönümizi test edip, modelimizi tamamlanmış nöral ağ modelleriyle karşılaştırıyoruz. Experimental netijeleri CNN bilen biraz gowy bir şekilde çykyp biljekdigimizi görkezýär.', 'ko': '이벤트 관계 식별은 도전적인 언어 처리 임무이다.사용할 수 있는 믿을 만한 단서가 없는 상황에서 검색 사건의 관계 종류, 예를 들어 인과 관계를 확인해야 한다.본고는 전통적인 통계 방법에 따라 비슷한 사건의 관계류 분포에 따라 목표 사건의 관계류를 추측한다.투기 과정에서 사용하는 감독은 매우 적다.특히 우리는 이미지 처리를 비슷한 이벤트 실례의 획득에 융합시켰다. 이는 이미지를 사용하여 이벤트 장면을 직관적으로 표시하고 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 이미지 매칭을 사용하여 이벤트 간의 근사 계산을 하는 것을 포함한다.우리는 ACE-R2 자료 라이브러리에서 우리의 방법을 테스트하고 우리의 모델을 완전히 감독하는 신경 네트워크 모델과 비교했다.실험 결과 우리는 CNN과 비슷한 성능을 실현했지만 LSTM보다 약간 우수하다는 것이 밝혀졌다.', 'sw': 'Kutambua uhusiano wa tukio ni kazi yenye changamoto ya upasuaji wa lugha. Inahitajika kuamua darasa la mahusiano ya matukio mawili ya utafiti, kama vile sababu, chini ya hali kwamba hakuna ushahidi wa matumizi. Tunafuatilia mbinu za takwimu za kitamaduni katika karatasi hii, tunakadiria darasa la kuhusiana na matukio ya malengo yanayotokana na usambazaji wa darasa hilo kwa matukio yanayofanana na hayo. Kuna ufuatiliaji wa chini uliotumika wakati wa mchakato wa dhana. Kwa hakika, tunajumuisha picha katika upatikanaji wa matukio yanayofanana na matukio hayo, ikiwa ni pamoja na matumizi ya picha kwa ajili ya kuonyesha matukio ya tukio, na matumizi ya mtandao wa neurali inayofanana na hisabati ya karibu kati ya matukio. Tunajaribu njia yetu kwenye mashindano ya ACE-R2 na kulinganisha mtindo wetu na mifano ya mitandao ya neura yenye utangalizi. Experimental results show that we achieve a comparable performance to CNN while slightly better than LSTM.', 'sq': 'Event relation recognition is a challenging language processing task.  Është e kërkuar t ë përcaktohet klasa e lidhjes me një çift ngjarjesh pyetjeje, të tilla si shkakuese, në kusht se nuk ka asnjë gjurmë të besueshme për përdorim. Ne ndjekim qasjen tradicionale statistike në këtë letër, duke spekulluar klasën e marrëdhënieve të ngjarjeve objektive bazuar në shpërndarjet e klasës së marrëdhënieve në ngjarjet e ngjashme. Ka mbikqyrje minimale të përdorur gjatë procesit të spekullimit. Në veçanti, ne përfshijmë procesimin e imazhit në blerjen e rasteve të ngjarjeve të ngjashme, duke përfshirë përdorimin e imazheve për përfaqësimin vizual të skenave të ngjarjeve dhe përdorimin e imazhit të bazuar në rrjetin nervor për llogaritje të afërt midis ngjarjeve. Ne testojmë metodën tonë në trupin ACE-R2 dhe krahasojmë modelin tonë me modelet e rrjetit nervor të mbikqyrur plotësisht. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se ne arrijmë një performancë të krahasueshme me CNN ndërsa pak më mirë se LSTM.', 'am': 'የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ማረጋገጫ የቋንቋ ማቀናጃ ሥራ ነው፡፡ የግንኙነት ክፍል፣ እንደሁኔታ፣ የጥያቄ ጉዳይ፣ ለመጠቀም የሚታመን ጉዳይ የለበትም፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የባሕላዊውን ተሳታፊ ሥርዓት እንከተላለን፣ በተለያዩ ሁኔታዎች ላይ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት በተያያየው የግንኙነት ክፍሎች እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በአሳባቢው ፕሮጀክት ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ መጠበቅ አለ። በተለይም፣ የምስል ማቀናቀል በተለያዩ ሁኔታ ላይ እና የምስልቶችን ማቀናቀል እና በሁኔታ መካከል ለመቆጣጠር የሚታየው የናውሬል መረብ ምስል እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የACE-R2 ኮርፓስ ስሕተታችንን እንሞክራለን እና ሞዴላችንን በሙሉ ተጠባባቂው የናውሬል መርበብ እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ከLSTM ትንሽ ይሻላል፡፡', 'hy': "Պատահական հարաբերությունների ճանաչելը բարդ լեզվի վերամշակման խնդիր է: It is required to determine the relation class of a pair of query events, such as causality, under the condition that there isn't any reliable clue for use.  Մենք հետևում ենք այս թղթի ավանդական վիճակագրական մոտեցումներին, հաշվարկում ենք նպատակային իրադարձությունների հարաբերությունների դասը, հիմնված նման իրադարձությունների հարաբերությունների դասի տարածումների վրա: Գոյություն ունի մինիմալ վերահսկողություն, որը օգտագործվում է համոզմունքների ընթացքում: Մենք հատկապես ներառում ենք պատկերների վերլուծումը նման իրադարձությունների հավաքածուի մեջ, ներառյալ պատկերների օգտագործումը իրադարձությունների տեսողական ներկայացման համար և նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված պատկերների օգտագործումը իրադարձությունների միջև մոտավորական հաշվարկում: Մենք փորձում ենք մեր մեթոդը ACE-R2 մարմնի վրա և համեմատում ենք մեր մոդելը լիովին վերահսկված նեյրոնային ցանցի մոդելների հետ: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մենք հասնում ենք CNN-ի հետ համեմատական արդյունքներ, մինչդեռ մի քիչ ավելի լավ, քան LSMT-ը:", 'bs': 'Priznavanje veza događaja je izazovni zadatak obrade jezika. Potrebno je odrediti klasu odnosa par događaja ispitivanja, kao što je uzrok, pod uvjetom da nema pouzdanog traga za upotrebu. Pratimo tradicionalni statistički pristup u ovom papiru, spekulirajući odnos klase ciljnih događaja na temelju distribucije klase odnosa o sličnim događajima. Postoji minimalni nadzor koji se koristi tokom procesa spekulacije. Posebno, uključujemo obradu slika u prikupljanje sličnih slučajeva događaja, uključujući korištenje slika za vizualno predstavljanje scena događaja, i korištenje slika na osnovu neuralne mreže koja odgovara približnom računanju između događaja. Testiramo našu metodu na korpusu ACE-R2 i uspoređujemo naš model sa potpuno nadziranim modelima neuromreže. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da postignemo usporedbenu izvedbu sa CNN dok je malo bolje od LSTM-a.', 'az': "Vaqiyat əlaqəsi tanıması çətin dil işləməsi işidir. İkisində istifadə etmək üçün güvenilir nöqtəsi yoxdur. Biz bu kağızdaki ehtiyatlı statistik tərzinə uyuruq, bənzər olaraq əlaqə-sınıf dağıtımlarına dayanan hedef olaraqların əlaqəsi sınıfını müəyyən edirik. Spekulasyon sürətində istifadə edilən minimal gözətçilik var. Özellikle, biz görüntü işləməsini bənzər olaraq məsələlərin alınmasına daxil edirik, görüntü sahələrini görüntülə göstərmək üçün görüntülərin istifadəsini və bənzər olaraq məsələlərin arasındakı hesablaması üçün nöral ağ tabanlı görüntülərin istifadəsini daxil edirik. Biz metodumuzu ACE-R2 korpusu ilə imtahana çəkirik və modelimizi tamamilə gözləyir nöral ağ modelləri ilə qarşılaşdırırıq. Experimental sonuçları, LSTM'dən az daha yaxşı olaraq CNN ilə qarşılaşdırılabilir bir performansı başa çatdığımızı göstərir.", 'bn': 'ইভেন্ট সম্পর্কের স্বীকৃতি হচ্ছে চ্যালেঞ্জের ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজ। অনুসন্ধানের ক্লাসের সম্পর্ক সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণ করা দরকার, যেমন কারণ, যে অবস্থায় ব্যবহারের কোন বিশ্বস্ত ধারণা নেই। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা ঐতিহ্যবাহী পরিসংখ্যানের পদক্ষেপ অনুসরণ করি, একই ধরনের ঘটনায় সম্পর্ক-শ্রেণীর বিতরণের উপর ভিত্তি করে লক্ষ্যবস্তুর সম্ ধারণা প্রক্রিয়ায় ব্যবহৃত সর্বনিম্ন পর্যবেক্ষণ রয়েছে। বিশেষ করে, আমরা একই ধরনের অনুষ্ঠান প্রক্রিয়ায় ছবি প্রক্রিয়া যুক্ত করি, যার মধ্যে অনুষ্ঠানের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার জন্য ছবিগুলো ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে, এবং ঘটনার মধ্ আমরা ACE-R2 কর্পুসের উপর আমাদের পদ্ধতি পরীক্ষা করি এবং আমাদের মডেলের তুলনা করে নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেলের সাথে সম্পূর্ণ পরিচালনা  পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমরা সিএনএন এর সাথে তুলনামূলক প্রদর্শন করেছি এবং এলএসএমএর চেয়ে সামান্য ভালো কাজ করেছি।', 'ca': "El reconeixement de les relacions d'events és una tasca de processament lingüístic difícil. S'ha de determinar la classe de relació d'un parell d'esdeveniments de consulta, com la causalitat, sota la condició que no hi ha cap pista fiable d'ús. Seguim l'enfocament estadística tradicional d'aquest paper, especulant la classe de relació dels esdeveniments alvo basat en les distribucions de classe de relació sobre esdeveniments similars. Hi ha una supervisió mínima utilitzada durant el procés d'especulació. En particular, incorporam el processament d'imatge en l'adquisició de casos similars, incloent l'ús d'imatges per representar visualment escenes d'esdeveniments, i l'ús de la comparació d'imatges basada en la xarxa neural per calcular aproximadament entre esdeveniments. Testem el nostre mètode en el cos ACE-R2 i comparem el nostre model amb els models de xarxa neural plenament supervisats. Els resultats experimentals mostren que aconsegueixem un rendiment comparable a CNN mentre que és una mica millor que LSTM.", 'af': "@ info Dit is benodig om die verwanting klas van 'n paar navraag gebeurtenis te bepaal, soos veroorsaaklikheid, onder die voorwaarde dat daar geen betroubare kleur vir gebruik is nie. Ons volg die tradisionele statistiese toegang in hierdie papier, spekuleer die verwanting klas van die doel gebeurtenis gebaseer op die verwanting-klas verspreidings op die gelyke gebeurtenis. Daar is minimale supervisie gebruik tydens die spekulasie proses. Spesifieke, ons inkorporeer beeldverwerking in die aanvang van vergelykende gebeurtenis, insluitend die gebruik van beelde vir visuele voorskyning van gebeurtenis scene, en die gebruik van die neuralnetwerk gebaseerde beeld ooreenstemmende vir omtrent berekening tussen gebeurtenis. Ons probeer ons metode op die ACE-R2 korpus en vergelyk ons model met die volledige neuralnetwerk modele. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons 'n vergelykbare prestasie tot CNN bereik terwyl 'n bietjie beter as LSTM.", 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání vztahů událostí je náročný úkol zpracování jazyka. Je nutné určit třídu vztahů dvojice událostí dotazu, jako je kauzalita, za podmínky, že neexistuje žádná spolehlivá stopa pro použití. V tomto článku sledujeme tradiční statistický přístup, spekulujeme třídu vztahů cílových událostí na základě rozdělení relace-třídy na podobné události. Během spekulačního procesu je používán minimální dohled. Zpracování obrazu zahrnujeme zejména do získávání podobných událostních instancí, včetně využití obrazů pro vizuální reprezentaci scén událostí a využití srovnávání obrazů založeného na neuronové síti pro přibližný výpočet mezi událostmi. Naši metodu testujeme na korpusu ACE-R2 a porovnáváme model s modely plně dohledovaných neuronových sítí. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že dosahujeme srovnatelného výkonu s CNN, zatímco o něco lepšího než LSTM.', 'et': 'Sündmuste suhte tuvastamine on keeletöötluse ülesanne. Päringusündmuste paari seosklassi (nt põhjuslikkuse seos) määramine on vajalik tingimusel, et kasutamiseks ei ole usaldusväärseid vihjeid. Me järgime traditsioonilist statistilist lähenemisviisi käesolevas dokumendis, spekuleerides seosklassi sihtsündmuste põhinedes seosklassi jaotustel sarnastel sündmustel. Spekulatsiooniprotsessi ajal kasutatakse minimaalset järelevalvet. Eelkõige lisame pilditöötluse sarnaste sündmuste omandamisse, sealhulgas piltide kasutamise sündmuste stseenide visuaalseks esitamiseks ja närvivõrgupõhise piltide sobitamise kasutamise sündmuste vaheliseks ligikaudseks arvutamiseks. Testime oma meetodit ACE-R2 korpusel ja võrdlesime oma mudelit täielikult järelevalvega neurovõrgu mudelitega. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et saavutame CNNiga võrreldava jõudluse, samas kui LSTM on veidi parem.', 'fi': 'Tapahtumasuhteiden tunnistaminen on haastava kielen käsittelytehtävä. Kyselytapahtumien, kuten syy-yhteyden, suhdeluokka on määritettävä sillä ehdolla, että luotettavaa johtolankaa ei ole. Seuraamme tässä artikkelissa perinteistä tilastollista lähestymistapaa spekuloimalla kohdetapahtumien suhdeluokkaa samankaltaisten tapahtumien suhteen-luokan jakaumien perusteella. Spekulaatioprosessissa käytetään vain vähän valvontaa. Erityisesti yhdistämme kuvankäsittelyn samankaltaisten tapahtumaesiintymien hankkimiseen, mukaan lukien kuvien hyödyntäminen tapahtumakohtausten visuaaliseen esittämiseen ja neuroverkkopohjaisen kuvan vastaavuuden käyttö tapahtumien likimääräiseen laskentaan. Testasimme menetelmäämme ACE-R2-korpusella ja vertasimme malliamme täysin valvottuihin neuroverkkomalleihin. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että saavutamme CNN:ään verrattavan suorituskyvyn, mutta hieman paremman kuin LSTM.', 'ha': "Suna ganin da mazaɓa na cikin zuwa-hãli yana da wani aikin mai zartar da harshe. Tilas ne ana buƙa t a dangantar nau'i biyu masu tambayi, kamar misali, a bayan halin da ba za'a da wani alama na amfani ba. Munã biyar fasarin statistical cikin wannan takarda, ana ƙaddara fassarar al'amarin da aka kiyaye wa masu jihãdi a kan raba-daraja da ke samu'i. An sami tsarin ƙarami da aka yi amfani da shi a lokacin da ake ƙayyade. Kayyadiya, za'a haɗa surar da zanen cikin samun shiryoyin ayuka masu kama, da amfani da zane wa zane wa masu nuna kwanan kwanan da ke nuna, da amfani da zanen bakin tarayyan neura wanda ke daidaita zuwa ƙidãyar hisãbi tsakanin tukio. Tuna jarraba hanyoyinmu kan makampyutan AK-R2 kuma muna sammenfane misalinmu da misãlai masu cikakken tsarin neural. Matarin jarrabo na nuna cewa za mu sami wani aikin daidai zuwa CNN alhãli kuwa yana da abu kaɗan mafi alhẽri daga LSM.", 'he': 'זיהוי יחסי אירועים הוא משימה עיבוד שפה מאתגרת. זה דורש לקבוע את שיעור היחסים של זוג אירועי חקירה, כמו סיבות, תחת המצב שאין שום רמז אמין להשתמש. אנחנו עוקבים אחרי הגישה הסטטיסטית המסורתית בעיתון הזה, משערים את שיעור היחסים של אירועי המטרה מבוססים על פיצוי שיעור היחסים על אירועים דומים. יש פיקוח מינימלי משתמש בתהליך השערות. במיוחד, אנחנו מכילים עיבוד תמונות לתוך הרכישה של מקרים אירועים דומים, כולל השימוש של תמונות למייצג חזותי סצנות אירועים, ושימוש של התמונה המבוססת ברשת העצבית מתאימה לחישוב מקביל בין אירועים. אנחנו בודקים את השיטה שלנו על הקורפוס של ACE-R2 ושווה את הדוגמא שלנו עם הדוגמאות של רשת העצבים המפוקחת לחלוטין. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שאנחנו משיגים ביצוע שווה לסי.אן.אן. בעוד קצת יותר טוב מ-LSTM.', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje odnosov med dogodki je zahtevna naloga obdelave jezika. Določiti je treba relacijski razred par dogodkov poizvedbe, kot je vzročna zveza, pod pogojem, da ni nobenega zanesljivega namiga za uporabo. Sledimo tradicionalnemu statističnemu pristopu v tem prispevku in špekuliramo razred relacij ciljnih dogodkov na podlagi distribucij relacijskih razredov na podobne dogodke. Med postopkom špekulacij se uporablja minimalen nadzor. Zlasti vključujemo obdelavo slik v pridobivanje podobnih primerov dogodkov, vključno z uporabo slik za vizualno predstavitev prizorov dogodkov in uporabo ujemanja slik na podlagi živčnega omrežja za približni izračun med dogodki. Našo metodo smo testirali na korpusu ACE-R2 in primerjali model s popolnoma nadzorovanimi modeli nevronskega omrežja. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da dosegamo primerljivo zmogljivost CNN, medtem ko nekoliko boljšo od LSTM.', 'jv': 'tab #a11y <joanie> hello!<joanie> hello! Awak dhéwé ngerti perusahaan istatistik kanggo nggambar iki, nggawe gerapakan kelas karo perusahaan kanggo kowé nggawe Kasama nggawe Laptop" and "Desktop Genjer-Genjer Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem sing ditambah karo akeh-R2 karo model sing nambah karo model sing ditambah sampek dadi Manual Perintah sing paling apik bukane kita sampeyan nggawe akeh nesaturan nggawe mau karo MTR, sampeyan sithik luwih apik sing luwih apik kanggo LTT.', 'bo': 'བྱུང་ལས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་ཤེས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ནི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་ཞིག་རེད དབུས་འཚོལ་བྱ་ཚུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ནི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་དགོས་པ་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་སྔོན་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་མཐུན་ཡོད། གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་ཆུང་བའི་མཐོང་སྣང་བ་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་གཟུགས་རིས་ལས་རིམ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པའི་བྱ་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་སྟོན་པའི་བརྙན་རིས་བྱུང་སྟངས་ལ་རྟོགས་བཞག ང་ཚོས་ACE-R2 མཐུད་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་དང་མིག་ཆས་འདྲ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད། Experimental results show that we achieve a comparable performance with CNN while LSTM is slightly better than it.'}
{'en': 'Neural Math Word Problem Solver with Reinforcement Learning', 'pt': 'Solucionador de Problemas Neural de Matemática com Aprendizado por Reforço', 'fr': 'Solveur de problèmes de mots mathématiques neuronales avec apprentissage par renforcement', 'ar': 'الرياضيات العصبية حل مشكلة الكلمات مع التعلم المعزز', 'es': 'Solucionador de problemas de matemáticas neuronales con aprendizaje por refuerzo', 'hi': 'सुदृढीकरण सीखने के साथ तंत्रिका गणित शब्द समस्या सॉल्वर', 'ja': '強化学習を伴うニューラル数学の単語問題解決', 'zh': '有化学者神经数学单词问决程序', 'ru': 'Решитель задач нейронной математики с обучением подкреплению', 'ga': 'Réiteach Fadhbanna Focal Neural Math le Foghlaim Neartú', 'el': 'Νευρικός Λύτης Προβλήματος Μαθηματικών Λέξεων με Μάθηση Ενίσχυσης', 'hu': 'Neural Math Word problémamegoldó a megerősítési tanulással', 'it': 'Neural Math Word Problem Solver con Reinforcement Learning', 'lt': 'Neuralinių matematikos žodžių problemų sprendimas stiprinant mokymąsi', 'kk': 'Невралдық математикалық сөздердің мәселесін шешуші', 'mk': 'Раширувач на неврални математички зборови со научување за зајакнување', 'ms': 'Neural Math Word Problem Solver with Reinforcement Learning', 'ka': 'ნეირალური მათემატიკური სიტყვების პრობლემების გარეშე სწავლებით', 'mt': 'Solvent tal-Problemi tal-Klawżoli Matematiċi Newrali bit-Tagħlim ta’ Rinfurzar', 'ml': 'പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനൊപ്പം പ്രശ്നം പരിഹരിക്കുക', 'mn': 'Цөмийн математикийн үг асуудал шийдвэрлэгч', 'pl': 'Neural Math Word Problem Solver z uczeniem się wzmocnienia', 'no': 'Neuralt matematisk ordproblem- løysar med forstørringar', 'sr': 'Neuralna matematička reč Problem rješavanja sa učenjem pojačanja', 'ro': 'Rezolvător de probleme cu cuvinte matematice neurale cu învățarea de întărire', 'so': 'Neural Math Word Problem Solver with Reinforcement Learning', 'sv': 'Neural Math Word problemlösning med förstärkning lärande', 'ta': 'நெருக்கமான கணிதம் வார்த்தை பிரச்சனை தீர்வு அறிவிப்பு', 'ur': 'نیورال ریاضی ورڈ مشکل حل کرنے والا', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන්', 'vi': 'Giải đố về thần kinh toán học Với việc học tiếp', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'Neural Math Word problemløser med forstærkning læring', 'hr': 'Neuralna matematička riječ problem rješavač s učenjem pojačanja', 'nl': 'Neural Math Word Probleemoplosser met Versterking Leren', 'id': 'Neural Math Word Problem Solver with Reinforcement Learning', 'de': 'Neuronale Mathe Wort Problem Solver mit Verstärkung Lernen', 'bg': 'Решаване на проблеми с невронни математически думи с обучение за подсилване', 'ko': '학습을 강화하는 신경 수학 단어 해산기', 'sw': 'Tatizo la Matokeo ya Kihisabu', 'sq': 'Neural Math Word Problem Solver with Reinforcement Learning', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մաթեմատիկական բառերի խնդիրների լուծման միջոցով', 'af': 'Neurale Wiskundige Woord Problem Oplosser met Versterking Leer', 'tr': 'Nagt öwrenmek bilen näyral Matematik Sözi Mesele çözgüçi', 'az': 'NĂ¶ral Matematik SĂ¶zlÉ™ri Problemi Ă‡Ă¶zĂ¼r', 'bn': 'শিক্ষা পুনরায় শিক্ষা দিয়ে নিউরেল গণিত শব্দের সমস্যার সমাধান', 'ca': 'Neural Math Word Problem Solver with Reinforcement Learning', 'cs': 'Neurální matematický slovní řešitel problémů s výztužným učením', 'bs': 'Neuralna matematička riječ problem rješavač s učenjem pojačanja', 'et': 'Neuraalse matemaatika sõna probleemide lahendaja tugevdamise õppega', 'fi': 'Neural Math Word ongelmanratkaisu vahvistuksen oppimisella', 'fa': 'حل مشکل ریاضی عصبی با یادگیری استوار', 'jv': 'Mungkin Ngubah Mungkin Rimpen', 'sk': 'Reševalnik težav z nevronskimi matematičnimi besedami z učenjem okrepitve', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'פתרון בעיות מילים מתמטיקות עצביות עם לימוד גיבוי', 'bo': 'Neural Math Word Problem Solver with Reinforcement Learning'}
{'en': 'Sequence-to-sequence model has been applied to solve math word problems. The model takes math problem descriptions as input and generates equations as output. The advantage of sequence-to-sequence model requires no feature engineering and can generate equations that do not exist in training data. However, our experimental analysis reveals that this model suffers from two shortcomings : (1) generate spurious numbers ; (2) generate numbers at wrong positions. In this paper, we propose incorporating copy and alignment mechanism to the sequence-to-sequence model (namely CASS) to address these shortcomings. To train our model, we apply reinforcement learning to directly optimize the solution accuracy. It overcomes the train-test discrepancy issue of maximum likelihood estimation, which uses the surrogate objective of maximizing equation likelihood during training while the evaluation metric is solution accuracy (non-differentiable) at test time. Furthermore, to explore the effectiveness of our neural model, we use our model output as a feature and incorporate it into the feature-based model. Experimental results show that (1) The copy and alignment mechanism is effective to address the two issues ; (2) Reinforcement learning leads to better performance than maximum likelihood on this task ; (3) Our neural model is complementary to the feature-based model and their combination significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art results.', 'ar': 'تم تطبيق نموذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل لحل مسائل الكلمات الرياضية. يأخذ النموذج أوصاف مشكلة الرياضيات كمدخلات ويولد المعادلات كمخرجات. لا تتطلب ميزة نموذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل هندسة ميزات ويمكنه إنشاء معادلات غير موجودة في بيانات التدريب. ومع ذلك ، يكشف تحليلنا التجريبي أن هذا النموذج يعاني من عيبين: (1) توليد أرقام زائفة. (2) توليد أرقام في مواقع خاطئة. في هذا البحث ، نقترح دمج آلية النسخ والمحاذاة مع نموذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل (أي CASS) لمعالجة أوجه القصور هذه. لتدريب نموذجنا ، نطبق التعلم المعزز لتحسين دقة الحل بشكل مباشر. إنه يتغلب على مسألة "تباين اختبار التدريب" لتقدير الاحتمالية القصوى ، والتي تستخدم الهدف البديل لتعظيم احتمالية المعادلة أثناء التدريب بينما يكون مقياس التقييم هو دقة الحل (غير قابلة للتفاضل) في وقت الاختبار. علاوة على ذلك ، لاستكشاف فعالية نموذجنا العصبي ، نستخدم مخرجات نموذجنا كميزة ودمجها في النموذج القائم على الميزة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن (1) آلية النسخ والمحاذاة فعالة لمعالجة المسألتين ؛ (2) التعلم المعزز يؤدي إلى أداء أفضل من أقصى احتمال في هذه المهمة ؛ (3) يعد نموذجنا العصبي مكملاً للنموذج القائم على الميزة ويتفوق الجمع بينهما بشكل كبير على أحدث النتائج.', 'pt': 'O modelo de sequência a sequência foi aplicado para resolver problemas de palavras matemáticas. O modelo recebe descrições de problemas matemáticos como entrada e gera equações como saída. A vantagem do modelo de sequência a sequência não requer engenharia de recursos e pode gerar equações que não existem nos dados de treinamento. No entanto, nossa análise experimental revela que esse modelo sofre de duas deficiências: (1) gerar números espúrios; (2) gerar números em posições erradas. Neste artigo, propomos incorporar o mecanismo de cópia e alinhamento ao modelo sequência-a-sequência (nomeadamente CASS) para resolver essas deficiências. Para treinar nosso modelo, aplicamos aprendizado por reforço para otimizar diretamente a precisão da solução. Ele supera o problema de “discrepância de teste de trem” da estimativa de máxima verossimilhança, que usa o objetivo substituto de maximizar a verossimilhança da equação durante o treinamento enquanto a métrica de avaliação é a precisão da solução (não diferenciável) no momento do teste. Além disso, para explorar a eficácia do nosso modelo neural, usamos a saída do nosso modelo como um recurso e o incorporamos ao modelo baseado em recursos. Os resultados experimentais mostram que (1) O mecanismo de cópia e alinhamento é eficaz para resolver os dois problemas; (2) A aprendizagem por reforço leva a um desempenho melhor do que a probabilidade máxima nesta tarefa; (3) Nosso modelo neural é complementar ao modelo baseado em recursos e sua combinação supera significativamente os resultados de última geração.', 'fr': "Le modèle séquence-séquence a été appliqué pour résoudre des problèmes de mots mathématiques. Le modèle prend les descriptions de problèmes mathématiques en entrée et génère des équations en sortie. L'avantage du modèle séquence-séquence ne nécessite aucune ingénierie de caractéristiques et peut générer des équations qui n'existent pas dans les données d'apprentissage. Cependant, notre analyse expérimentale révèle que ce modèle présente deux inconvénients\xa0: (1) générer des nombres faux\xa0; (2) générer des nombres aux mauvaises positions. Dans cet article, nous proposons d'intégrer le mécanisme de copie et d'alignement au modèle séquence-séquence (à savoir CASS) pour remédier à ces lacunes. Pour entraîner notre modèle, nous appliquons l'apprentissage par renforcement afin d'optimiser directement la précision de la solution. Il permet de résoudre le problème de «\xa0l'écart train-test\xa0» de l'estimation du maximum de vraisemblance, qui utilise l'objectif de substitution consistant à maximiser la probabilité de l'équation pendant la formation alors que la métrique d'évaluation est la précision de la solution (non différentiable) au moment du test. De plus, pour explorer l'efficacité de notre modèle neuronal, nous utilisons la sortie de notre modèle en tant que fonction et l'incorporons dans le modèle basé sur les caractéristiques. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que (1) le mécanisme de copie et d'alignement est efficace pour résoudre les deux problèmes\xa0; (2) L'apprentissage par renforcement conduit à de meilleures performances que la probabilité maximale pour cette tâche\xa0; (3) Notre modèle neuronal est complémentaire au modèle basé sur les caractéristiques et leur combinaison surpasse considérablement des résultats de pointe.", 'es': 'Se ha aplicado el modelo de secuencia a secuencia para resolver problemas matemáticos. El modelo toma las descripciones de los problemas matemáticos como entrada y genera ecuaciones como salida. La ventaja del modelo secuencia a secuencia no requiere ingeniería de características y puede generar ecuaciones que no existen en los datos de entrenamiento. Sin embargo, nuestro análisis experimental revela que este modelo tiene dos deficiencias: (1) generar números falsos; (2) generar números en posiciones incorrectas. En este artículo, proponemos incorporar el mecanismo de copia y alineación al modelo de secuencia a secuencia (es decir, CASS) para abordar estas deficiencias. Para entrenar nuestro modelo, aplicamos el aprendizaje de refuerzo para optimizar directamente la precisión de la solución. Supera el problema de la «discrepancia entre el tren y la prueba» de la estimación de máxima verosimilitud, que utiliza el objetivo sustituto de maximizar la probabilidad de la ecuación durante el entrenamiento, mientras que la métrica de evaluación es la precisión de la solución (no diferenciable) en el momento del examen. Además, para explorar la eficacia de nuestro modelo neuronal, utilizamos la salida de nuestro modelo como una característica y la incorporamos al modelo basado en características. Los resultados experimentales muestran que (1) el mecanismo de copia y alineación es eficaz para abordar los dos problemas; (2) el aprendizaje por refuerzo conduce a un mejor rendimiento que la máxima verosimilitud en esta tarea; (3) nuestro modelo neuronal es complementario al modelo basado en características y su combinación supera significativamente los resultados de última generación.', 'zh': '至于序列模形,已应用于数学单词。 述数学以为输,而生方程以为输。 至于序形之势不须特征,而可以成练数之方程。 然吾实验分析表明,当模形有二短:(1)生虚数;吾等,当模形有二短:生虚数;我等,当模形有二短:生伪数。 (2)于非位生数。 于本文,请将复制比机制整合序于序(即CASS)中,以决其弊。 为吾模样,当以强学直优化求解之准确性。 其胜大似然度"练-试差",宜用于练最大化方程似然之代,而估指标为试时解准确性(不可微分)。 求神经之有效性,输之以为征,并之于象。 实验结果表明曰:(1)复制有效于齐; (2)化学之所致,孰愈于能性; (3)吾神经者,所以补于特征,明优于先进也。', 'ja': 'シーケンスツーシーケンスモデルは、数学の単語問題を解くために適用されています。 モデルは数学の問題記述を入力とし、方程式を出力として生成する。 シーケンスツーシーケンスモデルの利点は、特徴工学を必要とせず、訓練データに存在しない方程式を生成することができる。 しかし、我々の実験的分析は、このモデルが2つの欠点に悩まされていることを明らかにしている。（ 1 ）偽の数字を生成する。（ 2 ）間違った位置で数字を生成する。 本稿では、これらの欠点に対処するために、シーケンスツーシーケンスモデル（すなわち、CASS ）にコピーとアラインメントのメカニズムを組み込むことを提案する。 モデルをトレーニングするために、強化学習を適用して、ソリューションの精度を直接最適化します。 最大尤度推定の「列車試験の不一致」問題を克服し、評価指標が試験時間における解精度（非微分可能）である間、訓練中に方程式の尤度を最大化する代用目標を使用する。 さらに、私たちのニューラルモデルの有効性を探るために、私たちは私たちのモデル出力を特徴として使用し、それを特徴ベースのモデルに組み込んでいます。 実験結果は、(1)コピーとアライメントのメカニズムは、2つの問題に対処するのに効果的であることを示している。(2)強化学習は、このタスクの最大可能性よりも優れたパフォーマンスにつながる。(3)私たちのニューラルモデルは、特徴ベースのモデルに補完的であり、それらの組み合わせは、最先端の結果を大幅に上回る。', 'hi': 'गणित शब्द समस्याओं को हल करने के लिए अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल लागू किया गया है। मॉडल इनपुट के रूप में गणित की समस्या विवरण लेता है और आउटपुट के रूप में समीकरण उत्पन्न करता है। अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल के लाभ के लिए किसी सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है और वे समीकरण उत्पन्न कर सकते हैं जो प्रशिक्षण डेटा में मौजूद नहीं हैं। हालांकि, हमारे प्रयोगात्मक विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि यह मॉडल दो कमियों से ग्रस्त है: (1) नकली संख्या उत्पन्न करता है; (2) गलत पदों पर संख्या उत्पन्न करना। इस पेपर में, हम इन कमियों को दूर करने के लिए अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल (अर्थात् CASS) में कॉपी और संरेखण तंत्र को शामिल करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए, हम समाधान सटीकता को सीधे अनुकूलित करने के लिए सुदृढीकरण सीखने को लागू करते हैं। यह अधिकतम संभावना अनुमान के "ट्रेन-परीक्षण विसंगति" मुद्दे को दूर करता है, जो प्रशिक्षण के दौरान समीकरण संभावना को अधिकतम करने के सरोगेट उद्देश्य का उपयोग करता है जबकि मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक परीक्षण के समय समाधान सटीकता (गैर-विभेदनीय) है। इसके अलावा, हमारे तंत्रिका मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता का पता लगाने के लिए, हम अपने मॉडल आउटपुट को एक सुविधा के रूप में उपयोग करते हैं और इसे फीचर-आधारित मॉडल में शामिल करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि (1) कॉपी और संरेखण तंत्र दो मुद्दों को संबोधित करने के लिए प्रभावी है; (2) सुदृढीकरण सीखने से इस कार्य पर अधिकतम संभावना की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन होता है; (3) हमारा तंत्रिका मॉडल सुविधा-आधारित मॉडल के पूरक है और उनका संयोजन अत्याधुनिक परिणामों को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ru': 'Для решения задач математических слов была применена модель последовательности-последовательности. Модель принимает описания математических задач в качестве входных данных и генерирует уравнения в качестве выходных данных. Преимущество модели последовательность-последовательность не требует проектирования признаков и может генерировать уравнения, которые не существуют в обучающих данных. Однако наш экспериментальный анализ показывает, что эта модель страдает двумя недостатками: (1) генерирует ложные числа; (2) генерирует числа в неправильных положениях. В этой статье мы предлагаем включить механизм копирования и выравнивания в модель последовательности (а именно CASS) для устранения этих недостатков. Чтобы обучить нашу модель, мы применяем обучение подкреплению, чтобы напрямую оптимизировать точность решения. Он преодолевает проблему «расхождения между тестами на поездах», связанную с оценкой максимальной вероятности, которая использует суррогатную цель максимизации вероятности уравнения во время обучения, в то время как оценочная метрика является точностью решения (недифференцируемой) во время тестирования. Кроме того, чтобы исследовать эффективность нашей нейронной модели, мы используем выходные данные нашей модели в качестве признака и включаем их в модель на основе признаков. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что (1) механизм копирования и выравнивания эффективен для решения двух проблем; (2) обучение подкреплению приводит к лучшей производительности, чем максимальная вероятность выполнения этой задачи; (3) наша нейронная модель дополняет функциональную модель, и их комбинация значительно превосходит современные результаты.', 'ga': 'Cuireadh samhail seicheamh-go-seicheamh i bhfeidhm chun fadhbanna focal matamaitice a réiteach. Glacann an tsamhail cur síos ar fhadhb na matamaitice mar ionchur agus gineann sé cothromóidí mar aschur. Ní éilíonn an buntáiste a bhaineann le samhail seicheamh-go-seicheamh aon innealtóireacht gné agus féadann sé cothromóidí a ghiniúint nach bhfuil i sonraí oiliúna. Mar sin féin, léiríonn ár n-anailís thurgnamhach go bhfuil dhá easnamh ag baint leis an tsamhail seo: (1) giniúint uimhreacha spíonta; (2) uimhreacha a ghiniúint ag poist mícheart. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé beartaithe againn meicníocht chóipeála agus ailínithe a ionchorprú sa mhúnla seicheamh go seicheamh (eadhon CASS) chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na heasnaimh seo. Chun ár múnla a oiliúint, cuirimid foghlaim athneartaithe i bhfeidhm chun cruinneas an réitigh a bharrfheabhsú go díreach. Sáraíonn sé an tsaincheist “neamhréireacht tástála traenach” maidir le meastachán dóchúlachta uasta, a bhaineann úsáid as an gcuspóir ionadach chun cosúlacht chothromóid a uasmhéadú le linn na hoiliúna agus is é an mhéadracht mheastóireachta cruinneas réitigh (neamh-dhifriúla) ag am tástála. Ina theannta sin, chun éifeachtacht ár múnla néarúil a iniúchadh, úsáidimid ár n-aschur múnla mar ghné agus ionchorpraímid é sa mhúnla gné-bhunaithe. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha (1) Tá an mheicníocht chóipeála agus ailínithe éifeachtach chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an dá shaincheist; (2) Bíonn feidhmíocht níos fearr ná an dóchúlacht uasta maidir leis an tasc seo mar thoradh ar fhoghlaim treisithe; (3) Tá ár múnla néaraíoch comhlántach leis an múnla gné-bhunaithe agus sáraíonn a gcomhcheangal go suntasach na torthaí úrscothacha.', 'el': 'Το μοντέλο ακολουθίας-προς-ακολουθίας έχει εφαρμοστεί για την επίλυση προβλημάτων μαθηματικών λέξεων. Το μοντέλο λαμβάνει περιγραφές μαθηματικών προβλημάτων ως εισαγωγή και παράγει εξισώσεις ως έξοδο. Το πλεονέκτημα του μοντέλου αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχία δεν απαιτεί μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών και μπορεί να δημιουργήσει εξισώσεις που δεν υπάρχουν στα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης. Ωστόσο, η πειραματική μας ανάλυση αποκαλύπτει ότι το μοντέλο αυτό πάσχει από δύο ελλείψεις: (1) παράγει ψεύτικους αριθμούς. (2) να παράγει αριθμούς σε λάθος θέσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε την ενσωμάτωση μηχανισμού αντιγραφής και ευθυγράμμισης στο μοντέλο ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας (δηλαδή CASS) για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των ελλείψεων. Για να εκπαιδεύσουμε το μοντέλο μας, εφαρμόζουμε τη μάθηση ενίσχυσης για να βελτιστοποιήσουμε άμεσα την ακρίβεια της λύσης. Υπερνικά το ζήτημα της εκτίμησης μέγιστης πιθανότητας μεταξύ αμαξοστοιχίας και δοκιμής, το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί τον υποκατάστατο στόχο της μεγιστοποίησης της πιθανότητας εξίσωσης κατά τη διάρκεια της εκπαίδευσης, ενώ η μετρική αξιολόγηση είναι η ακρίβεια λύσης (μη διαφοροποιημένη) κατά τη διάρκεια της δοκιμής. Επιπλέον, για να διερευνήσουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του νευρωνικού μοντέλου μας, χρησιμοποιούμε το μοντέλο μας ως χαρακτηριστικό και το ενσωματώνουμε στο μοντέλο που βασίζεται σε χαρακτηριστικά. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι (1) Ο μηχανισμός αντιγραφής και ευθυγράμμισης είναι αποτελεσματικός για την αντιμετώπιση των δύο ζητημάτων. (2) Η ενίσχυση της μάθησης οδηγεί σε καλύτερες επιδόσεις από ό,τι η μέγιστη πιθανότητα για το έργο αυτό· (3) Το νευρικό μας μοντέλο είναι συμπληρωματικό με το μοντέλο που βασίζεται σε χαρακτηριστικά και ο συνδυασμός τους ξεπερνά σημαντικά τα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'Szekvencia-szekvencia modellt alkalmaztunk matematikai szóproblémák megoldására. A modell a matematikai probléma leírását veszi bemenetként, és egyenleteket generál kimenetként. A szekvencia-szekvencia modell előnye nem igényel funkciótervezést, és képes olyan egyenleteket generálni, amelyek nem léteznek a képzési adatokban. Kísérleti elemzésünk azonban azt mutatja, hogy ez a modell két hiányosságban szenved: (1) hamis számokat generál; (2) rossz pozícióban kell számokat generálni. Ebben a tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy a másolási és igazítási mechanizmust integráljuk a szekvencia-szekvencia modellhez (nevezetesen CASS) a hiányosságok orvoslása érdekében. Modellünk képzéséhez erősítési tanulást alkalmazunk a megoldás pontosságának közvetlen optimalizálása érdekében. Megoldja a legnagyobb valószínűségi becslés "vonat-teszt eltérések" kérdését, amely a képzés során az egyenlet valószínűségének maximalizálására irányuló helyettesítő célkitűzést használja, míg az értékelési metrika a vizsgálat időpontjában a megoldás pontossága (nem megkülönböztethető). Továbbá, hogy feltárjuk neurális modellünk hatékonyságát, a modell kimenetét használjuk funkcióként, és beépítjük azt a funkcióalapú modellbe. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy (1) a másolási és igazítási mechanizmus hatékony a két kérdés kezelésére; (2) A megerősített tanulás jobb teljesítményt eredményez, mint a legnagyobb valószínűség ebben a feladatban; (3) Neurális modellünk kiegészíti a funkcióalapú modellt és kombinációjuk jelentősen felülmúlja a korszerű eredményeket.', 'it': 'Il modello Sequence-to-Sequence è stato applicato per risolvere problemi di parole matematiche. Il modello prende le descrizioni dei problemi matematici come input e genera equazioni come output. Il vantaggio del modello sequenza-sequenza non richiede alcuna funzionalità ingegneristica e può generare equazioni che non esistono nei dati di formazione. Tuttavia, la nostra analisi sperimentale rivela che questo modello soffre di due carenze: (1) generare numeri falsi; (2) generare numeri in posizioni sbagliate. In questo articolo, proponiamo di incorporare il meccanismo di copia e allineamento al modello sequenza-sequenza (vale a dire CASS) per affrontare queste carenze. Per addestrare il nostro modello, applichiamo l\'apprendimento di rinforzo per ottimizzare direttamente la precisione della soluzione. Supera il problema della "discrepanza treno-test" della stima della massima probabilità, che utilizza l\'obiettivo surrogato di massimizzare la probabilità dell\'equazione durante l\'allenamento, mentre la metrica di valutazione è l\'accuratezza della soluzione (non differenziabile) al momento della prova. Inoltre, per esplorare l\'efficacia del nostro modello neurale, usiamo il nostro modello di output come caratteristica e lo incorporamo nel modello basato su funzionalità. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che (1) il meccanismo di copia e allineamento è efficace per affrontare le due questioni; (2) Il rafforzamento dell\'apprendimento porta a risultati migliori rispetto alla massima probabilità in questo compito; (3) Il nostro modello neurale è complementare al modello basato sulle funzionalità e la loro combinazione supera significativamente i risultati all\'avanguardia.', 'lt': 'Siekiant išspręsti matematinių žodžių problemas, taikomas sekos į seką modelis. Modelis naudoja matematikos problem ų aprašymus kaip įvestį ir sukuria lygtis kaip išvestį. The advantage of sequence-to-sequence model requires no feature engineering and can generate equations that do not exist in training data.  Tačiau mūsų eksperimentinė analizė rodo, kad šis modelis turi dviejų trūkumų: 1) sukuria nepalankius skaičius; (2) generate numbers at wrong positions.  Šiame dokumente siūlome įtraukti kopijų ir suderinimo mechanizmą į eilės model į (būtent CASS), kad būtų pašalinti šie trūkumai. To train our model, we apply reinforcement learning to directly optimize the solution accuracy.  Ji įveikia didžiausios tikimybės įvertinimo "traukinio bandymų neatitikimo" klausimą, kuriame naudojamas pakaitinis tikslas didinti lygybės tikimybę mokymo metu, o vertinimo metrinis dydis yra tirpalo tikslumas (nediferencijuojamas) bandymo metu. Furthermore, to explore the effectiveness of our neural model, we use our model output as a feature and incorporate it into the feature-based model.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad (1) Kopijos ir suderinimo mechanizmas yra veiksmingas dviem klausimams spręsti; (2) Reinforcement learning leads to better performance than maximum likelihood on this task;  (3) Our neural model is complementary to the feature-based model and their combination significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art results.', 'kk': "Математикалық сөздердің мәселелерін шешу үшін реттеу үлгісі қолданылды. Бұл үлгі математикалық мәселелерді келтіру ретінде түрлендіру және шығыс ретінде түрлендіру. Келесіден кейін кейін кейін кейін кейін кейбір инженерлік үлгісінің артықшылығы жоқ және оқыту деректерінде жоқ тегжейлерді құруға болады. Бірақ біздің тәжірибелікті анализ бұл үлгі екі қауіпсіздіктерден тәжірибелі болады: (2) нөмірлерді қате орындарда құру. Бұл қағазда, бұл жеткіліктерді шешу үшін көшірмелеу және түрлендіру механизмін реттеу үлгісіне (мысалы CASS) ендіру керек. Өзіміздің моделімізді оқыту үшін, шешіміздің дұрыстығын өзгерту үшін қолданымыз. Бұл 'train-test discrepancy' маңызды маңызды ықтималдық оқиғасының маңызды мәселесін көтереді. Бұл саррогат мақсатын тексеру кезінде теңдеу кезінде теңдеу кезінде теңдеу мүмкіндігін көтеру кезінде қолданады. Қосымша, невралдық моделіміздің эффективнігін зерттеу үшін, өзіміздің үлгі шығысын мүмкіндігі ретінде қолданып, оны мүмкіндіктердің негіздеген моделіне енгізіп,  Эксперименталдық нәтижелер (1) көшірмелеу мен түзету механизмі екі мәселелерді шешу үшін эффективні болады. (2) Бұл тапсырманың максималдық мүмкіндігінен жақсы жұмыс істеуге болады. (3) Невралдық моделіміз мүмкіндіктерді негіздеген моделіне қосымша болады. Олардың жинақтауы суреттердің нәтижесінің күйіне жоқ болады.", 'ka': "მათემატიკური სიტყვების პრობლემების გარეშე მოდელის გამოყენება. მოდელი მათემატიკური პრობლემების აღწერების გამოყენება და განტოლებების შექმნა როგორც გამოყენება. sequence-to-sequence მოდელის გამოსახულება არ იჭირდება ფუნქციების ინზინეცია და შეიძლება შექმნა განტოლებები, რომლებიც არ არსებობს განტოლებების მონაცემებში. მაგრამ, ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური ანალიზი აღმოჩნდება, რომ ეს მოდელ ექსპერიმენტის შესაძლებლობებისგან იქნება: (2) შეცდომა პოზიციაში რიცხვების შექმნა. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომენეთ კოპიცია და დაწყება მექანემის შეწყვეტის მოდელზე (ანუ CASS) ამ შეწყვეტილებების შესახებ. ჩვენი მოდელის გასწავლობისთვის, ჩვენ დავიყენებთ სწავლობა სწავლობა, რომელიც განსაკუთრებისთვის აპტიმიზება. მაქსიმალური შესაძლებლობის განსაზღვრების 'train-test discrepancy' პრობლემას გადავიწყება, რომელიც გამოყენებს სეროგრატის მიზეზი განსაზღვრების მაქსიმალურად განსაზღვრების შესაძლებლობის მაქსიმალურად განსაზღვრების შემდეგ განსა დამატებით, ჩვენი ნეიროლური მოდელის ეფექტიურობის გამოყენება, ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის გამოყენება როგორც ფუნქცია და დავყენებთ მას ფუნქციების მოდელში. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი ჩვენებს, რომ (1) ექსპერიმენტი და დაწყვეტილების მექანსი ეფექტიურია ორი პრობლემების განსახულებისთვის; (2) სწავლობა უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად გამოყენება, ვიდრე მაქსიმალური შესაძლებლობა ამ რაოდენობაში; (3) ჩვენი ნეიროლური მოდელი კომპლენტერია ფუნქციების მოდელზე და ისინი კომბიზაცია მნიშვნელოვანია შემდეგ წარმოდგენებას.", 'mk': "Моделот од секвенца до секвенца е применет за решавање на проблемите со математичките зборови. The model takes math problem descriptions as input and generates equations as output.  The advantage of sequence-to-sequence model requires no feature engineering and can generate equations that do not exist in training data.  Сепак, нашата експериментална анализа открива дека овој модел страда од две недостатоци: (1) генерира незгодни броеви; (2) генерира броеви на погрешни позиции. Во овој документ, предложуваме вклучување на механизмот за копирање и пристапување во моделот секвенца до секвенца (имено КАС) за решавање на овие недостатоци. To train our model, we apply reinforcement learning to directly optimize the solution accuracy.  It overcomes the 'train-test discrepancy' issue of maximum likelihood estimation, which uses the surrogate objective of maximizing equation likelihood during training while the evaluation metric is solution accuracy (non-differentiable) at test time.  Покрај тоа, за да ја истражуваме ефективноста на нашиот нервен модел, го користиме нашиот модел излез како карактеристика и го вклучуваме во моделот базиран на карактеристики. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека (1) Механизмот на копија и израмнување е ефикасен за решавање на двете прашања; (2) Reinforcement learning leads to better performance than maximum likelihood on this task;  (3) Нашиот нервен модел е комплиментарен на моделот базиран на карактеристики и нивната комбинација значително ги надминува најновите резултати.", 'ms': "Model urutan-ke-urutan telah dilaksanakan untuk menyelesaikan masalah perkataan matematik. Model mengambil deskripsi masalah matematik sebagai input dan menghasilkan persamaan sebagai output. Keuntungan dari model urutan-ke-urutan memerlukan tiada teknik ciri dan boleh menghasilkan persamaan yang tidak wujud dalam data latihan. Namun, analisis percubaan kami mengungkapkan bahawa model ini menderita dari dua kekurangan: (1) menghasilkan nombor yang menggerunkan; (2) menghasilkan nombor pada kedudukan yang salah. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan memasukkan mekanisme salinan dan penyesuaian ke model urutan ke urutan (iaitu CASS) untuk mengatasi kekurangan ini. Untuk melatih model kita, kita melaksanakan pembelajaran kuasa untuk secara langsung optimizasi ketepatan penyelesaian. Ia mengatasi isu 'ketidaksamaan ujian-kereta' penilaian kemungkinan maksimum, yang menggunakan objektif ganti untuk maksimumkan kemungkinan persamaan semasa latihan sementara metrik penilaian adalah ketepatan penyelesaian (tidak boleh berbeza) pada masa ujian. Selain itu, untuk mengeksplorasi keefektivitas model saraf kita, kita menggunakan output model kita sebagai ciri-ciri dan memasukkannya ke dalam model berdasarkan ciri-ciri. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa (1) Mekanisme salinan dan penyesuaian adalah berkesan untuk menangani kedua-dua isu; (2) Pembelajaran kuat-kuat membawa kepada prestasi yang lebih baik daripada kemungkinan maksimum dalam tugas ini; (3) Model saraf kami adalah kumplimentar kepada model berdasarkan ciri-ciri dan kombinasi mereka jauh melebihi keputusan state-of-the-art.", 'ml': "ഗണിത വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കുന്നതിനായി സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- ട്രോംഗ് മോഡല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരിക്ക The model takes math problem descriptions as input and generates equations as output.  സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- ടോ- സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രത്യേക എഞ്ചിനീയറിങ്ങ് ആവശ്യമില്ല. പരിശീലനത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലില്ലാ എന്നാലും, നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണവിശേഷതകള്\u200d വെളിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു ഈ മോഡല്\u200d രണ്ടു ചെറുതുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും കഷ്ടപ്പെടുന്നു: ( (2) generate numbers at wrong positions.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പകര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നതും സജ്ജീകരിക്കുന്ന മെയിനിസ്റ്റമിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതും ഈ ചുരുക്കുകള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d പ് നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു, പരിഹാരത്തെ നേരിട്ട് കൃത്യമാക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക് ട്രെയിന്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള വ്യവസ്ഥയുടെ 'ട്രെയിന്\u200d-പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസം' പ്രശ്നം അതിജയിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷ സമയ അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മുടെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രാകൃതിയെ പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പുറത്ത് മാതൃകയായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതി പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു (1) രണ്ടു പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പകര്\u200dപ്പും സജ്ജീകരിക്കുന്ന മെ (2) ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധ്യതയില്ലാത്തതിനേക്കാള്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വിവരണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ (3) നമ്മുടെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d വിശിഷ്ടമായ മോഡലിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തിലാണ്. അവയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ അവസ്ഥ വി", 'mt': 'Il-mudell minn sekwenza għal sekwenza ġie applikat biex jissolvew il-problemi tal-kliem matematiku. The model takes math problem descriptions as input and generates equations as output.  Il-vantaġġ tal-mudell minn sekwenza għal sekwenza ma jeħtieġ l-ebda in ġinerija b’karatteristiċi u jista’ jiġġenera ekwazzjonijiet li ma jeżistux fid-dejta tat-taħriġ. Madankollu, l-analiżi sperimentali tagħna turi li dan il-mudell ibati minn żewġ nuqqasijiet: (1) jiġġeneraw numri spurjużi; (2) jiġġeneraw numri f’pożizzjonijiet żbaljati. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu li jiġi inkorporat mekkaniżmu ta’ kopja u allinjament mal-mudell sekwenzjali (jiġifieri CASS) biex jiġu indirizzati dawn in-nuqqasijiet. Biex inħarrġu l-mudell tagħna, nagħmlu tagħlim ta’ rinfurzar biex noptimizzaw direttament il-preċiżjoni tas-soluzzjoni. Huwa jegħleb il-kwistjoni tad-“diskrepanza tat-test tal-ferrovija” tal-istima tal-probabbiltà massima, li tuża l-għan sostitut li timmassimizza l-probabbiltà tal-ekwazzjoni matul it-taħriġ filwaqt li l-metrika tal-evalwazzjoni hija l-preċiżjoni tas-soluzzjoni (mhux differenzjabbli) fil-ħin tat-test. Barra minn hekk, biex tiġi esplorata l-effettività tal-mudell newrali tagħna, a ħna nużaw il-produzzjoni tal-mudell tagħna bħala karatteristika u ninkorporawha fil-mudell ibbażat fuq il-karatteristiċi. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li (1) Il-mekkaniżmu ta’ kopja u allinjament huwa effettiv biex jindirizza ż-żewġ kwistjonijiet; (2) It-tagħlim rinfurzat iwassal għal prestazzjoni aħjar minn probabbiltà massima fuq dan il-kompitu; (3) Our neural model is complementary to the feature-based model and their combination significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art results.', 'pl': 'Model sekwencji do sekwencji został zastosowany do rozwiązywania problemów słów matematycznych. Model przyjmuje opisy problemów matematycznych jako wejście i generuje równania jako wyjście. Zaletą modelu sekwencji do sekwencji jest brak inżynierii funkcji i może generować równania, które nie istnieją w danych treningowych. Nasza analiza eksperymentalna pokazuje jednak, że model ten cierpi na dwie niedociągnięcia: (1) generowanie fałszywych liczb; (2) generować liczby na niewłaściwych pozycjach. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy włączenie mechanizmu kopiowania i dostosowania do modelu sekwencji-sekwencji (tj. CASS), aby rozwiązać te niedociągnięcia. Aby szkolić nasz model, stosujemy uczenie się wzmocnienia w celu bezpośredniej optymalizacji dokładności rozwiązania. Przezwycięża kwestię "rozbieżności pociągu-testów" oszacowania maksymalnego prawdopodobieństwa, która wykorzystuje zastępczy cel maksymalizacji prawdopodobieństwa równania podczas treningu, podczas gdy wskaźnikiem oceny jest dokładność rozwiązania (niemożliwa do zróżnicowania) w czasie testu. Ponadto, aby zbadać skuteczność naszego modelu neuronowego, wykorzystujemy nasz model wyjściowy jako cechę i włączamy go do modelu opartego na funkcjach. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że (1) Mechanizm kopiowania i wyrównania jest skuteczny w rozwiązaniu dwóch kwestii; (2) Wzmocnienie uczenia się prowadzi do lepszych wyników niż maksymalne prawdopodobieństwo realizacji tego zadania; (3) Nasz model neuronowy uzupełnia model oparty na funkcjach, a ich połączenie znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze wyniki.', 'ro': 'Modelul secvență-la-secvență a fost aplicat pentru a rezolva problemele cuvintelor matematice. Modelul ia descrierile problemelor matematice ca intrare și generează ecuații ca ieșire. Avantajul modelului secvență-la-secvență nu necesită inginerie de caracteristici și poate genera ecuații care nu există în datele de formare. Cu toate acestea, analiza noastră experimentală arată că acest model suferă de două deficiențe: (1) generează numere false; (2) generează numere în poziții greșite. În această lucrare, propunem încorporarea mecanismului de copiere și aliniere la modelul secvență-la-secvență (și anume CASS) pentru a remedia aceste deficiențe. Pentru a instrui modelul nostru, aplicăm învățarea de armare pentru a optimiza direct precizia soluției. Aceasta depășește problema "discrepanței tren-test" a estimării probabilității maxime, care utilizează obiectivul surogat de maximizare a probabilității ecuațiilor în timpul antrenamentului, în timp ce metrica de evaluare este precizia soluției (neddiferențiabilă) la momentul încercării. Mai mult decât atât, pentru a explora eficiența modelului nostru neural, folosim ieșirea modelului nostru ca caracteristică și îl încorporăm în modelul bazat pe caracteristici. Rezultatele experimentale arată că (1) Mecanismul de copiere și aliniere este eficient pentru a aborda cele două probleme; (2) Învățarea consolidată conduce la o performanță mai bună decât probabilitatea maximă în această sarcină; (3) Modelul nostru neural este complementar modelului bazat pe caracteristici și combinația lor depășește semnificativ rezultatele de ultimă oră.', 'mn': 'Дараагийн дарааллын загвар математикийн үгийн асуудлыг шийдэхэд хэрэглэгдсэн. Загвар нь математикийн асуудлын тодорхойлолтыг орлуулах болон тэгшитгэл гаргах боломжтой болгодог. sequence-to-sequence загварын давуу тал нь ямар нэг төрлийн инженерчлэл хэрэггүй бөгөөд суралцах өгөгдлийн талаар байхгүй тэгшитгэл гаргаж чадна. Гэвч бидний туршилтын шинжилгээнд энэ загвар нь хоёр алдагдлын тулд зовлон байдаг: (2) буруу байрлалд тоо бий болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид дараагийн дараагийн загварыг (яг CASS) дарааллын дарааллын дарааллын дарааллын дарааллын хувилбарын механизмийг бүрдүүлэх боломжтой. Бид загварыг суралцахын тулд шийдвэрийн зөв тодорхойлолтыг шууд сайжруулахын тулд нэмэгдүүлэх сургалтыг ашигладаг. Төвөрмөц-тест ялгаатай асуудлыг шалгах цаг хугацаанд шийдвэрлэх (ялгаагүй) шийдвэрлэх (ялгаагүй) боломжтой байдлыг ашигладаг. Мөн бидний мэдрэлийн загварын үр дүнг судлах үед бид загварын үр дүнг өөрчлөлт гэж ашиглаж, үүнийг өөрчлөлтийн загвар руу нэгтгэх болно. Эмчилгээний үр дүн нь (1) Хоёр асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд хууль болон тохиромжтой механизм үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг. (2) Дасгал суралцах үйл ажиллагаас илүү сайн үйл ажиллагаа үүсгэдэг. (3) Бидний мэдрэлийн загвар нь шинж тэмдэглэгдсэн загварыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Тэдний нийлүүлэлт нь урлагийн төвшин үр дүнд маш чухал байдаг.', 'no': 'Sekvens- til- sekvensmodell er brukt for å løysa matematiske ordproblemer. Modellen tar matematiske problem- skildringar som inndata og lagar likningar som utdata. Fordel av sequence-to-sequence-modellen krev ingen funksjonsengineering og kan laga likningar som ikkje finst i øvingsdata. Dette eksperimentelle analysen viser imidlertid at denne modellen køyrer frå to feil: (1) lager spurre tal. (2) lagar tal på feil plassering. I denne papiret foreslår vi inkorprering av kopi- og justeringsmekanismen til sekvensmodellen (t.d. CASS) for å handtera desse kortingane. For å trene modellen vårt, bruker vi reinforcementlæring for å optimalisera nøyaktighet for løysinga. Det overfører problemet «train-test-discrepancy» for maksimal sannsynlighetssestisering, som brukar surrogatet-målet for maksimalisering av likensynligheten ved opplæring mens evalueringsmetrikken er løysningsnøyaktighet (ikkje-forskjellig) ved testtid. For å utforske effektiviteten av vår neuralmodell, bruker vi modellen vårt som funksjon og inkluderer det i den funksjonsbaserte modellen. Eksperimentale resultat viser at (1) kopi- og justeringsmekanismen er effektiv for å handtera dei to problema. (2) Størrelseslæring fører til bedre utvikling enn maksimal sannsynlighet på denne oppgåva; (3) Nøyralmodellen vårt er komplementært til den funksjonsbaserte modellen, og kombinasjonen sine utfører betydelig resultatet av kunsten.', 'sr': 'Model sekvence do sekvence primjenjen je za rešenje problema sa matematičkim riječima. Model uzima opis matematičkih problema kao ulaz i stvara jednačine kao izlaz. Prednost modela sekvence do sekvence ne zahteva nikakve in ženjeringa i može stvoriti jednačine koje ne postoje u podacima obuke. Međutim, naša eksperimentalna analiza pokazuje da ovaj model pati od dve nedostatke: (1) stvara potpune brojeve; (2) stvaraju brojeve na pogrešnim položajima. U ovom papiru predlažemo uključivanje mehanizma kopije i usklađivanja modelu sekvence do sekvence (a to je CASS) da se reši ovim nedostatkima. Za trening našeg modela, primjenjujemo učenje pojačanja da bi direktno optimizirali tačnost rešenja. Prelazi na pitanje "diskrecija testiranja vlaka" maksimalne procjene verovatnosti, koja koristi cilj nadrogate za maksimaliziranje verovatnosti jednačine tijekom treninga, dok je procjena metrika tačnost rešenja (ne diferencijalna) u vrijeme testa. Osim toga, da bismo istražili učinkovitost našeg neuralnog model a, koristili bismo naš model output kao karakteristiku i uključili ga u model na osnovu funkcija. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je mehanizam kopije i prilagodbe efikasan za rješavanje dva pitanja; (2) Pojačanje učenja vodi do boljih izvođenja nego maksimalne verovatnosti ovog zadatka; (3) Naš neuronski model je komplementar modelu baziranom na funkcijama i njihova kombinacija značajno iznosi rezultate stanja umjetnosti.', 'si': "ගණිත වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න විසිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් විසිද්ධ විසිද්ධ විසිද්ධ විසිද්ධ මොඩේල් ගණිත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇතුළත් විස්තර විස්තර කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. sequence-to-sequence මොඩේලයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් අවශ්\u200dයය නැහැ විශේෂ ඉංජිනේරියාවක් නැහැ ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය දත් නමුත්, අපේ පරීක්ෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා මේ මොඩල් දෙකක් අඩුවෙන් අඩුවෙන් ඉන්න පුළුවන් කියලා: ( (2) වැරදි ස්ථානයේ අංක නිර්මාණය කරන්න. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා මේ අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප අපේ මෝඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් උපදේශනය කරන්න. It overheads the 'train-testing discrepncy' challenge of the maximal chances of Estension, that use the surrogate object of maximising the Equation chances at Training whilst the evalution metric is resolution correction (non-Diffiable) at testing time. තවත්, අපේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් මෝඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අපි අපේ මෝඩල් ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් විදිහට භාවිත කරන්න, ඒක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ (1) ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සහ සැකසුම් පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ද (2) මේ වැඩේ වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි ප්\u200dරමාණයකට වඩා හොඳ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. (3) අපේ න්\u200dයූරාල් මෝඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙන්නේ පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් ආධාරිත මෝඩේල් එක්ක, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ගේ", 'so': 'Tusaale-soo-socodka waxaa lagu codsaday in lagu xalliyo dhibaatooyin ku saabsan hadalka xisaabta. Tusaale wuxuu qaadaa qoraalka dhibaatooyinka xisaabta sida input oo kale, wuxuuna sameynayaa mid lamid ah sida soo baxa. Qiimaha muusikada isbedelka xilliga looma baahna injiilka tayada ah iyo wuxuu sameyn karaa siman oo aan jirin macluumaadka waxbarashada. Laakin baaritaankeenu wuxuu muujiyaa in tusaalkanu uu ka xanuunsado labo gaaban: (1) wuxuu dhalaa lambaro badan; (2) inuu sameeyo lambaro meelo khalad ah. In this paper, we propose incorporating copy and alignment mechanism to the sequence-to-sequence model (namely CASS) to address these shortcomings.  Si aan u tababarinno modellka, waxaynu u codsanaynaa horumarinta waxbarashada si toos u hagaajinta saxda xafiiska. Waxay ka adkaysaa dhibaatada qiimeynta ugu badnaanta qiimeynta jireenka, kaas oo isticmaalaya tijaabada sinnaanta marka waxbarashada lagu jiro, marka lagu tijaabiyo qiimeynta metricigu waa saxda xafiiska (aan kala duwanayn). Sidoo kale, si aan u baarayno effektada modellka neurada, waxaynu u isticmaalnaa soo bixinta modellkayaga sida gaar ah oo aan u soo bandhijinno tilmaanka gaarka ah. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa (1) meymiska koopiga iyo isbedelka waxey faa’iido u leedahay in ay labada su’aalood kala sheekeystaan; (2) Waxbarashada magdhaw wuxuu ka keenaa wax ka wanaagsan shaqeynta shaqada ugu badnaan suurtagalka; Tusaalkayaga neurada ah waa mid ku adag tilmaamaha rasmiga ah, isku xiriirkooduna wuxuu si weyn u muujiyaa arimaha farshaxanka.', 'sv': 'Sekvens-till-sekvens modell har tillämpats för att lösa matematiska ordproblem. Modellen tar matematiska problembeskrivningar som inmatning och genererar ekvationer som utmatning. Fördelen med sekvens-till-sekvensmodell kräver ingen funktionsteknik och kan generera ekvationer som inte finns i utbildningsdata. Vår experimentella analys visar dock att denna modell lider av två brister: (1) generera falska siffror; (2) generera siffror på fel positioner. I denna uppsats föreslår vi att man införlivar kopierings- och justeringsmekanism till sekvensmodellen (nämligen CASS) för att åtgärda dessa brister. För att träna vår modell använder vi armeringsinlärning för att direkt optimera lösningens noggrannhet. Den löser problemet med "tågtest-avvikelse" med uppskattning av högsta sannolikhet, som använder surrogatmålet att maximera ekvationssannolikheten under träning medan utvärderingsmåttet är lösningsnoggrannhet (icke-differentierbar) vid testtillfället. Dessutom, för att utforska effektiviteten av vår neurala modell, använder vi vår modell output som en funktion och införlivar den i den funktionsbaserade modellen. Experimentella resultat visar att (1) Kopierings- och justeringsmekanismen är effektiv för att hantera de två frågorna. (2) Förstärkt lärande leder till bättre resultat än maximal sannolikhet för denna uppgift. (3) Vår neurala modell kompletterar den funktionsbaserade modellen och deras kombination överträffar avsevärt de senaste resultaten.', 'ta': "வரிசையில் இருந்து தொடர் மாதிரி கணித சொல்லு பிரச்சனைகளை தீர்வு செய்ய பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. The model takes math problem description as input and generates equals as output. தொடர்ந்து வரும் மாதிரியின் பயன்பாடு குணங்கள் பொறியியல் தேவையில்லை மற்றும் பயிற்சி தரவில் இல்லாத சமன்பாடுகளை உருவாக் ஆனால், எங்கள் சோதனையின் ஆய்வு விளக்கம் இந்த மாதிரி இரண்டு சுருக்கங்களில் இருந்து பாதிக்கும் என்பது தெரிவிக்கி (2) தவறான நிலைகளில் எண்களை உருவாக்கு In this paper, we propose incorporating copy and alignment mechanism to the sequence-to-sequence model (namely CASS) to address these shortcomings.  எங்கள் மாதிரியை பயிற்சி செய்வதற்கு, நாம் தீர்வு சரியை நேரடியாக முறைப்படுத்த கற்றுக்கொள்ள கற்றலை பயன்படுத் அது அதிகபட்ச சாத்தியமான மதிப்பீட்டின் 'train-test discrimination' பிரச்சனையை வெற்றி பெறுகிறது, இது பயிற்சியில் மதிப்பு மெட்ரிக்கு சரியான தீர்வு சரியானது (வேறுபாடு இல்லாமல்)  அதற்கும், எங்கள் புதிய மாதிரியின் விளைவை கண்டறிவதற்கு, நாம் எங்கள் மாதிரி வெளியீட்டை ஒரு குணங்களாக பயன்படுத்தி அதை குணங்களில் சேர முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது (1) நகல் மற்றும் ஒழுங்குபடுத்தல் முறைமை இரு பிரச்சினைகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க இயல (2) கல்வியை திருப்புதல் இந்த செயல்பாட்டின் அதிகபட்ச வாய்ப்புகளை விட சிறந்த செயல்படுத்துகிறது; (3) நம்முடைய புதிய மாதிரி குணங்களுக்கு சிக்கலான மாதிரி மற்றும் அவற்றின் இணைப்பு முக்கியமான கலைகளின் முடிவுகளை வெளியேற்ற", 'ur': "ریاضی کلمات مسئلہ حل کرنے کے لئے سکوئنس-تا-سکوئنس موڈل لازم کیا گیا ہے. موڈل ریاضی مسئلہ کی توصیف کے طور پر استعمال کرتا ہے اور برابری اپوٹ کے طور پر پیدا کرتا ہے. sequence-to-sequence model کے فائدہ کے لئے کوئی فائدہ انجینژی کی ضرورت نہیں ہے اور وہ ایسے معادلات پیدا کرسکتے ہیں جو ٹرینگ ڈیٹ میں موجود نہیں ہیں۔ لیکن ہماری آزمائش تحلیل ظاہر کرتا ہے کہ یہ مدل دو ناکاموں سے مصیبت ہوتی ہے: (1) مضبوط شمارے پیدا کرتا ہے۔ (2) غلط موقعیت پر شمارے پیدا کرتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے کپی اور آرام کرنے کے مکانیسم کے ساتھ کپی اور آرام کرنے کے مکانیسم (یعنی CASS) کو پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ ان ناکاموں کے بارے میں دریافت کریں۔ ہمارے مدل کی تعلیم کے لئے، ہم مستقیماً حل کی دقیقیت کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ اس کے مطابق سب سے زیادہ احتمالات کا مطابق 'ٹرین-ٹیس-ٹیس-ٹیس-ٹیس-ٹیس-ٹیس-ٹیس' مسئلہ پر غالب ہوتا ہے، جو تطابق کے موقع میں برابری کا مطابق زیادہ بڑھنے کا موقع استعمال کرتا ہے، حالانکہ مطابق متریک آزمائش کے مو اور اس کے علاوہ، ہمارے نئورل موڈل کے اثبات کا تحقیق کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے اپنے موڈل اپوٹ پیٹ پیٹ کے طور پر استعمال کیا اور اسے فرصت بنیادی موڈل میں شامل کر دیا۔ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ (1) کاپی اور متصل مکانیسم دو مسائل کو حل کرنے کے لئے مفید ہے۔ (2) مضبوط تعلیم کو اس کام کے مطابق زیادہ شانسی سے زیادہ اچھی فعالیت کی طرف لے جاتا ہے۔ (3) ہماری نئورل موڈل شخصیت پر بنیاد رکھی ہوئی موڈل سے اضافہ کرتی ہے اور ان کی ترکیب اضافہ کرتی ہے", 'vi': 'Mô hình dãy-tới-dãy đã được áp dụng để giải quyết các vấn đề từ to án. Mẫu này lấy các mô tả vấn đề toán làm nhập và tạo các phương trình như xuất. Lợi thế của mô hình lặp lại không cần cấu trúc chức năng và có thể tạo ra các phương trình không tồn tại trong dữ liệu huấn luyện. Tuy nhiên, phân tích thử nghiệm của chúng ta cho thấy mô hình này có hai thiếu sót: (2) tạo số ở các vị trí sai. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị áp dụng cơ chế sao chép và chỉnh lại theo mô hình lặp lại (tức là ASS) để giải quyết những thiếu sót này. Để huấn luyện mô hình của chúng tôi, chúng tôi áp dụng việc học củng cố để tối ưu tiên độ chính xác. Vượt qua vấn đề mâu thuẫn về độ lệch xe lửa về khả năng cao nhất, nó dùng mục tiêu người máy để tăng khả năng cân bằng tối đa trong thời gian huấn luyện, trong khi đo lường đo lường là độ chính xác giải (không phân biệt) vào thời điểm thử nghiệm. Hơn nữa, để khám phá hiệu quả của mô hình thần kinh chúng tôi, chúng tôi sử dụng kết xuất mẫu như một tính năng và kết hợp nó vào mô hình dựa vào tính năng. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy (1) Bộ phận sao chép và chỉnh sửa có hiệu quả để giải quyết hai vấn đề; (2) Việc học tập cải tiến dẫn đến hiệu quả tốt hơn khả năng tối đa với nhiệm vụ này. (3) Mô hình thần kinh của chúng ta bổ sung cho mô hình có tính năng và sự kết hợp của chúng khả năng cao vượt trội.', 'uz': 'Name Name Ketma- ketlik modelining foydalanishi kerak boʻlmaydi va taʼminlovchi maʼlumotda mavjud emas. Lekin bizning tajriba analytikimizni anglatadi, bu model ikkita kichkina sonlarni o\'zgartiradi:(1) katta raqamlarni yaratish mumkin; (2) Xato joylarda raqamlarni yaratish. Bu qogʻozda, biz bu qisqartmalarni boshqarish uchun nusxa va tarqatish mekanikani birlashtirishni talab qilamiz. Modelni o\'rganish uchun, biz o\'rganishni to ʻgʻri tizimga tayyorlash uchun qo\'llamiz. Bu maksimal qiymatni qiymatga "tog-sinov sinovligi" muammolarini ushlab chiqaradi. Bu o\'qiymati vaqtda o\'qiymati metrik toʻgʻrilayotganda qiymatni aniqlash imkoniyatini oshirish mumkin. Ko\'rib, neyron modelimizning effektligini aniqlash uchun modelning natijasini moslama sifatida foydalanamiz va uning moslama asosiy modeliga qo\'yishingiz mumkin. Taʼlim natijalari (1) nusxa va tarkiblash mekani ikkita muammolarni murojaat qilish ishga tayyorlaydi; (2) Tashqi o\'rganish muvaffaqiyatsiz bu vazifaning eng eng eng muhimligiga bajarishiga ega bo\'ladi; (3) Bizning neyrolik modelimiz feature asosida murakkablik va uning birlashtirish shaxsiyatlarning holatini bajaradi.', 'bg': 'Модел последователност към последователност е приложен за решаване на задачи с математически думи. Моделът взема описания на математически задачи като вход и генерира уравнения като изход. Предимството на модела последователност към последователност не изисква инженеринг на характеристиките и може да генерира уравнения, които не съществуват в данните за обучение. Нашият експериментален анализ обаче показва, че този модел страда от два недостатъка: (1) генерира фалшиви числа; (2) генериране на числа в грешни позиции. В настоящата статия предлагаме включване на механизъм за копиране и подравняване към модела последователност към последователност (а именно CASS) за преодоляване на тези недостатъци. За да тренираме нашия модел, ние прилагаме обучение за подсилване, за да оптимизираме директно точността на решението. Тя преодолява проблема с "несъответствието между влака" при оценката на максималната вероятност, при който се използва заместващата цел за увеличаване на вероятността от уравнение по време на обучение, докато измервателният показател е точността на решението (неразличима) по време на изпитването. Освен това, за да изследваме ефективността на нашия невронен модел, ние използваме нашия модел като функция и го включваме в модела, базиран на функции. Експерименталните резултати показват, че (1) Механизмът за копиране и подравняване е ефективен за решаване на двата въпроса; (2) Укрепването на обучението води до по-добри резултати от максималната вероятност по тази задача; (3) Нашият невронен модел допълва модела, базиран на характеристиките, и комбинацията им значително превъзхожда най-съвременните резултати.', 'hr': 'Model sekvence do sekvence primjenjen je za rješavanje problema s riječima matematike. Model uzima opis matematičkih problema kao ulaz i stvara jednačine kao izlaz. Prednost modela sekvence do sekvence ne zahtijeva nikakve in ženjeringa i može stvoriti jednačine koje ne postoje u podacima obuke. Međutim, naša eksperimentalna analiza pokazuje da ovaj model pati od dva nedostatka: (1) proizvodi potpune brojeve; (2) proizvodi brojeve na pogrešnim mjestima. U ovom papiru predlažemo uključiti mehanizam kopije i usklađivanja modelu sekvence do sekvence (a to je CASS) kako bi se riješili ovim nedostatkima. Za obuku našeg modela, primjenjujemo učenje pojačanja kako bi direktno optimizirali to čnost rješenja. Prelazi na pitanje "nedostatka testiranja vlaka" maksimalne procjene vjerojatnosti, koja koristi cilj nadrogate za maksimaliziranje vjerojatnosti jednačine tijekom treninga dok je procjena metrika tačnost rješenja (ne diferencijalna) u vrijeme testa. Osim toga, da bi istražili učinkovitost našeg neuronskog model a, koristimo naš model izlaz kao karakteristiku i uključili ga u model na osnovu funkcija. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je mehanizam kopije i prilagodbe učinkovit za rješavanje dva pitanja; (2) Pojačavanje učenja vodi do boljih učinka nego maksimalne vjerojatnosti ovog zadatka; (3) Naš neuronski model je dodatak modelu na osnovu funkcija i njihova kombinacija značajno iznosi rezultate stanja umjetnosti.', 'de': 'Sequenz-to-Sequenz-Modell wurde angewendet, um mathematische Wortprobleme zu lösen. Das Modell nimmt mathematische Problembeschreibungen als Eingabe und generiert Gleichungen als Ausgabe. Der Vorteil von Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modellen erfordert kein Feature Engineering und kann Gleichungen generieren, die in Trainingsdaten nicht existieren. Unsere experimentelle Analyse zeigt jedoch, dass dieses Modell zwei Mängel aufweist: (1) falsche Zahlen generieren; (2) Zahlen an falschen Positionen generieren. In diesem Papier schlagen wir vor, Kopier- und Alignment-Mechanismen in das Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modell (nämlich CASS) einzubeziehen, um diese Mängel zu beheben. Um unser Modell zu trainieren, wenden wir Verstärkungslernen an, um die Lösungsgenauigkeit direkt zu optimieren. Es überwindet die "Zug-Test-Diskrepanz"-Frage der maximalen Wahrscheinlichkeitsschätzung, bei der das Ersatzziel der Maximierung der Gleichungswahrscheinlichkeit während des Trainings verwendet wird, während die Auswertungsmetrik die Lösungsgenauigkeit (nicht differenzierbar) zur Testzeit ist. Um die Effektivität unseres neuronalen Modells zu untersuchen, verwenden wir unsere Modellausgabe als Feature und integrieren sie in das funktionsbasierte Modell. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass (1) der Kopier- und Ausrichtungsmechanismus effektiv ist, um die beiden Probleme anzugehen; (2) Verstärktes Lernen führt zu einer besseren Leistung als höchstwahrscheinlich bei dieser Aufgabe; (3) Unser neuronales Modell ist komplementär zum funktionsbasierten Modell und ihre Kombination übertrifft deutlich die aktuellen Ergebnisse.', 'nl': "Sequence-to-sequence model is toegepast om wiskundige woordproblemen op te lossen. Het model neemt wiskundige probleembeschrijvingen als input en genereert vergelijkingen als output. Het voordeel van sequence-to-sequence model vereist geen feature engineering en kan vergelijkingen genereren die niet bestaan in trainingsgegevens. Uit onze experimentele analyse blijkt echter dat dit model lijdt aan twee tekortkomingen: (1) valse aantallen genereren; (2) getallen genereren op verkeerde posities. In dit document stellen we voor om kopieer- en uitlijningsmechanisme op te nemen in het sequence-to-sequence model (namelijk CASS) om deze tekortkomingen aan te pakken. Om ons model te trainen, passen we versterking learning toe om de nauwkeurigheid van de oplossing direct te optimaliseren. Het overwint het probleem van de 'trein-test discrepantie' van de maximale waarschijnlijkheidsschatting, waarbij gebruik wordt gemaakt van het surrogaatdoel van het maximaliseren van de vergelijkingswaarschijnlijkheid tijdens de training terwijl de evaluatiemetriek oplossingsnauwkeurigheid (niet-differentieerbaar) is op het testmoment. Om de effectiviteit van ons neurale model te onderzoeken, gebruiken we onze model output als functie en integreren we deze in het feature-based model. Uit experimentele resultaten blijkt dat (1) het kopieer- en uitlijningsmechanisme effectief is om de twee kwesties aan te pakken; (2) Versterking van leren leidt tot betere prestaties dan maximale waarschijnlijkheid voor deze taak; (3) Ons neurale model is complementair aan het feature-based model en hun combinatie presteert aanzienlijk beter dan de state-of-the-art resultaten.", 'da': 'Sekvens-til-sekvens model er blevet anvendt til at løse matematiske ordproblemer. Modellen tager matematiske problembeskrivelser som input og genererer ligninger som output. Fordelen ved sekvens-til-sekvensmodel kræver ingen egenskabsteknik og kan generere ligninger, der ikke findes i træningsdata. Vores eksperimentelle analyse viser imidlertid, at denne model lider af to mangler: (1) generere falske tal; (2) generere tal på forkerte positioner. I denne artikel foreslår vi, at der indarbejdes kopierings- og justeringsmekanisme til sekvensmodellen (nemlig CASS) for at afhjælpe disse mangler. For at træne vores model anvender vi forstærkningslæring for direkte at optimere løsningens nøjagtighed. Den løser problemet med"togtest-uoverensstemmelse"om estimering af maksimal sandsynlighed, som anvender surrogatmålet om at maksimere ligningssandsynligheden under træning, mens evalueringsmetrikken er opløsningens nøjagtighed (ikke-differentierelig) på testtidspunktet. Desuden, for at undersøge effektiviteten af vores neurale model, bruger vi vores model output som en funktion og indarbejder det i den funktionsbaserede model. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at (1) Kopierings- og justeringsmekanismen er effektiv til at løse de to spørgsmål; (2) Forstærket læring fører til bedre resultater end maksimal sandsynlighed for denne opgave (3) Vores neurale model er komplementær til den funktionsbaserede model, og deres kombination overgår markant de state-of-the-art resultater.', 'ko': "서열 대 서열 모델은 수학 단어 문제를 해결하는 데 이미 응용되었다.이 모델은 수학 문제 설명을 입력으로 하고 방정식을 출력으로 생성한다.서열부터 서열 모델까지의 장점은 특징 공정이 필요 없고 훈련 데이터에 존재하지 않는 방정식을 생성할 수 있다는 것이다.그러나 우리의 실험 분석에 의하면 이 모델은 두 가지 단점이 존재한다. (1) 허위 숫자가 발생한다.(2) 잘못된 위치에서 숫자를 생성합니다.본고에서 우리는 이러한 단점을 해결하기 위해 복제와 정렬 메커니즘을 시퀀스 모델(즉 CASS)에 통합하는 것을 권장한다.우리의 모델을 훈련시키기 위해 우리는 강화 학습을 응용하여 해의 정밀도를 직접적으로 최적화시킨다.이는 가장 유사하게 추정되는'훈련 테스트 차이'문제를 극복했다. 이 문제는 훈련 기간에 방정식 유사성을 최대화하는 대체 목표를 사용하고 평가 지표는 테스트할 때의 해정밀도(미세할 수 없음)이다.또한 우리의 신경모델의 유효성을 탐색하기 위해 우리는 우리의 모델 출력을 특징으로 하고 이를 특징을 바탕으로 하는 모델에 포함시킨다.실험 결과에 의하면 (1) 복제와 정렬 메커니즘은 이 두 문제를 효과적으로 해결할 수 있다.(2) 학습을 강화하는 것이 이 임무에서 최대 가능성보다 낫다.(3) 우리의 신경모델은 특징을 바탕으로 하는 모델에 대한 보충으로 그들의 조합은 가장 선진적인 결과보다 현저히 우수하다.", 'sw': "Mfano wa mfululizo wa mfululizo umetumika kutatua matatizo ya neno la hisabati. Mfano unachukua maelezo ya matatizo ya hisabati kama input na kutengeneza vifano kama matokeo. Utengenezaji wa mifano ya mfululizo kwa mfululizo hauna haja ya uhandisi na unaweza kutengeneza mifano ambayo haina katika taarifa za mafunzo. Hata hivyo, uchambuzi wetu wa majaribio unaonyesha kuwa mtindo huu unaathiri kutokana na upungufu wa viwili: (1) unatengeneza idadi kubwa; (2) kutengeneza namba katika nafasi zisizo sahihi. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kuunganisha nakala na mfumo wa upatikanaji kwa muundo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo (yaani CASS) kuhusiana na upungufu huu. Ili kufundisha mifano yetu, tunatumia kujifunza kuimarisha moja kwa moja uhakika wa ufumbuzi. Inashinda suala la 'utofauti wa uchunguzi wa treni' la kadiri ya uwezekano wa uwezekano wa kiwango kikubwa, ambalo linatumia lengo la upasuaji la kuongeza uwezekano wa usawa wakati wa mafunzo wakati utafiti huo utatuzi ni ukweli wa ufumbuzi (bila tofauti) wakati wa jaribio. Zaidi ya hayo, ili kutambua ufanisi wa muundo wetu wa neura, tunatumia matokeo yetu ya modeli kama utambulisho na kuingiza katika mifano yenye msingi. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa (1) mfumo wa nakala na upatikanaji ni wa ufanisi wa kuzungumzia masuala haya mawili; (2) Kufundisha ufundi unapelekea utendaji bora kuliko uwezekano mkubwa wa kazi hii; (3) Mradi wetu wa neura ni mchanganyiko wa mifano yenye msingi na muungano wao unaonyesha matokeo ya sanaa.", 'id': "Sequence-to-sequence model has been applied to solve math word problems.  The model takes math problem descriptions as input and generates equations as output.  Keuntungan dari model urutan-ke-urutan tidak memerlukan teknik fitur dan dapat menghasilkan persamaan yang tidak ada dalam data latihan. Namun, analisis percobaan kami mengungkapkan bahwa model ini menderita dari dua kekurangan: (1) menghasilkan angka yang mengganggu; (2) menghasilkan angka di posisi yang salah. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan memasukkan mekanisme salinan dan penyesuaian ke model urutan ke urutan (yaitu CASS) untuk mengatasi kekurangan-kekurangan ini. To train our model, we apply reinforcement learning to directly optimize the solution accuracy.  Ini mengatasi isu 'ketidakcocokan tes kereta' dari penilaian kemungkinan maksimum, yang menggunakan objek ganti untuk maksimalkan kemungkinan persamaan selama latihan sementara metrik evaluasi adalah akurasi solusi (tidak berbeda) pada waktu tes. Selain itu, untuk mengeksplorasi efektivitas model saraf kita, kita menggunakan output model kita sebagai fitur dan memasukkannya ke dalam model berbasis fitur. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa (1) Mekanisme salinan dan penyesuaian adalah efektif untuk menangani kedua masalah; (2) Pembelajaran kuat menyebabkan prestasi yang lebih baik dari kemungkinan maksimum dalam tugas ini; (3) Our neural model is complementary to the feature-based model and their combination significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art results.", 'fa': 'مدل جدول به رده برای حل مشکلات کلمه ریاضی کاربرد شده است. مدل توضیح مشکل ریاضی را به عنوان ورودی می\u200cگیرد و معادلات را به عنوان نتیجه تولید می\u200cکند. مزاحمت مدل ردیابی به ردیابی نیاز به مهندسی ویژه نیست و می تواند معادلات را تولید کند که در داده های آموزش وجود ندارند. با این حال، تحلیل آزمایشی ما نشان می دهد که این مدل از دو ناتوانی رنج می دهد: (۱) شماره\u200cهای ناتوانی را تولید می\u200cکند. (۲) شماره را در موقعیت اشتباهی تولید می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که مکانیسم کپی و تنظیم به مدل\u200cهای تنظیم (به عنوان CASS) برای حل این ناکام\u200cها کند. برای آموزش مدل ما، یادگیری افزایش را برای مستقیماً دقیق حل را بهترین کنیم. این مسئله "اختلاف آزمایش قطار" از ارزیابی بالاترین احتمال است که از هدف استفاده می\u200cکند که هدف استفاده می\u200cکند احتمال بزرگترین تفاوت تفاوت در زمان آزمایش باشد، در حالی که ارزیابی متریک دقیق حل (غیر متفاوت) در زمان آزمایش است. علاوه بر این، برای تحقیق فعالیت مدل عصبی ما، از نتیجه مدل ما به عنوان ویژه استفاده می کنیم و آن را در مدل اصلی به ویژه جمع می کنیم. نتایج تجربه نشان می دهد که (۱) مکانیسم کپی و تنظیم برای حل دو مسائل موثر است. (2) یادگیری افزایش به فعالیت بهتر از احتمال بیشتری در این کار می\u200cرسد. (۳) مدل عصبی ما به مدل متعلق به ویژه\u200cها تعداد می\u200cکند و ترکیب آنها به طور معنی نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری را از بین می\u200cبرد.', 'tr': 'Matematikanyň söz meselelerini çözmek üçin sıralama nusgasy uygulandy. Model matematik sorunu girdi ve denklemleri çizgi olarak oluşturur. sequence-to-sequence modellerin avantajı hiçbir özellik injiniyeri gerekmez ve eğitim verisinde olmayan denklemler oluşturabilir. Ama deneysel analizimiz, bu modelinin iki ucuz tarafından çekilmesini gösterir: (1) zor sayılar oluşturur; (2) yanlış pozisyonda sayılar oluşturur. Bu kagyzda, bu ýigrimizi çykmak üçin nusgala we çykarma mehanizminy tertibleyiriz Modelimizi öwretmek üçin, çözüm dogrylygyny düzeden optimizasy üçin reinleme öwrenmegi uygulaýarys. "tren-test discrepancisi" mümkün mümkün değerlendirmeniň maksimal mümkinçilik hasaplamasına üstün edýär. Bu sistemden çözüm dogrudygyny test wagtynda denklem mümkinçiligini azaltmak üçin surogat hedefini ulanýar. Munuň üçin näyral nusganymyzyň etkinliýetini gözlemek üçin, nusganymyzy çykyş şeklinde üýtgedip özelliklere tabanly nusgasyna girdirip bileris. (1) Nusgala we çykma mehanizminiň iki meseleni çözmek üçin täsirli bolandygyny görkezýär; (2) Köçülemek öwrenmesi bu zadyň maksimal mümkinçiliginden has gowurak etmäge mejbur edýär; (3) Biziň neural nusgamyz özelliklere tabanly nusgamyz we olaryň birleşigimiz möhüm bolan ýagtylygynyň durumyny üstüne getirilýär.', 'sq': "Sequence-to-sequence model has been applied to solve math word problems.  Modeli merr përshkrimin e problemeve matematike si input dhe gjeneron ekuacione si output. Përfitimi i modelit sekuencë-në-sekuencë nuk kërkon inxhinieri me funksione dhe mund të gjenerojë ekuacione që nuk ekzistojnë në të dhënat e trajnimit. Megjithatë, analiza jonë eksperimentale zbulon se ky model vuan nga dy mungesa: (1) gjeneron numra të përçara; (2) gjenerojnë numra në pozicione të gabuara. In this paper, we propose incorporating copy and alignment mechanism to the sequence-to-sequence model (namely CASS) to address these shortcomings.  Për të trajnuar modelin tonë, ne aplikojmë mësimin e forcimit për të optimizuar drejtpërdrejt saktësinë e zgjidhjes. Ajo kapërcen çështjen e 'mospërputhjes së testit të trenit' të vlerësimit maksimal të mundësisë, i cili përdor objektivin e zëvendësuar të maksimumit të mundësisë së ekuacionit gjatë trajnimit ndërsa metrika e vlerësimit është saktësia e zgjidhjes (jo-diferenciale) në kohën e testit. Përveç kësaj, për të eksploruar efektshmërinë e model it tonë nervor, ne përdorim rezultatin tonë të modelit si një karakteristikë dhe e përfshijmë në modelin bazuar në karakteristika. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se (1) Mekanizmi i kopjes dhe përshtatjes është i efektshëm për të trajtuar të dy çështjet; (2) Mbështetja e mësimit shpie në performancë më të mirë se sa gjasa maksimale për këtë detyrë; (3) Modeli ynë neural është komplementar me modelin bazuar në karakteristika dhe kombinimi i tyre ekziston në mënyrë të konsiderueshme mbi rezultatet më të larta.", 'af': "Sequence- to- sequence model is aangepas om wiskundige woord probleme te los. Die model neem matematiese probleem beskrywings as invoer en genereer vergelykings as uitset. Die voordeel van sequence-to-sequence-model benodig geen funksie in ženiering en kan genereer vergelykings wat nie bestaan in onderwerp data nie. Ons eksperimentale analisie verduidelik tog dat hierdie model lyf van twee kortpad: (1) genereer sterk getalle; (2) genereer nommers na verkeerde posisies. In hierdie papier stel ons voorstel om kopie en alignment mekanisme te inkorporeer na die sekwensie-na-sekwensie model (naamlik CASS) om hierdie kortpaaklikhede te adres. Om ons model te oefen, kan ons versterking leer toewend om die oplossing presies direk te optimaliseer. Dit oorweeg die 'trein-toets ontwikkeligheid' probleem van maksimum waarskynlikheid estimeering, wat gebruik die oorweeg objek van maksimalisering van vergelyking waarskynlikheid tydens opvoering terwyl die evaluering metriek oplossing waarskynlikheid is (nie-diferensiebaar) by toets tyd. Ons gebruik ons model uitvoer as 'n funksie en inkorporeer dit in die funksie-gebaseerde model. Eksperimentale resultate vertoon dat (1) Die kopie en alignment-mekanisme effektief is om die twee probleme te adres; (2) Versterking leer lei na beter prestasie as maksimum waarskynlik op hierdie taak; en (3) Ons neurale model is komplementaar tot die funksie-gebaseerde model en hulle kombinasie betekenlik uitvoer die staat-van-kuns-resultate.", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች ሞዴል የmathematical ችግር ጽሑፎችን እንደ መግባት ይወስዳል እና አስተያየትን እንደ ውጤት ያደርጋል። የsequence-to-sequence model ጥቅም የፊደል ኢንጂንጂርን አያስፈልግም እና ማስተካከል ዳታ ውስጥ የሌለውን ምሳሌዎችን ማፍጠር ይችላል። ነገር ግን ፈተናችንን ማረፊያ ይህ ምሳሌ ከሁለት አነስተኛ ጉዳይ እንዲቀበል ይገልጣል:(1) የጥልቅ ቁጥር ፍጥረዋል፤ (2) ቁጥርን በመስህተት ቦታ ያስጀምር በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ቁልፍ እና ክፍተት ማሰናከል ማሰናከል እና ማሰናከል እና ክፍተቶችን ለመጠቀም እናስባለን፡፡ ሞዴልናችንን ለማስተማር፣ መፍትሄዱን በቅንነት ማሻለል እናበረታታለን፡፡ የቴርኔን-ፈተና ግንኙነት በሞከሩ ጊዜ ማስታወቂያው ማስተካከል (ለልዩነት ሳይለይ) በተለየ ጊዜ የኦሮጊት አካባቢ አካሄዱን በትክክል ማድረግ ይደረጋል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የናቡር ዓይነታችንን ውጤት ለመመርመር የሞዴል ውጤታችንን እንደ ፊደል እና ወደ ፊደል ሞዴል እናገባዋለን፡፡ ከፈተና ውጤቶች (1) የቅጂ እና የኩልኩል ሥልጣን ሁለቱን ጉዳዮች ለመቀላቀል ጥሩ ነው፡ (2) መግለጫ ትምህርት በዚህ ስራ ከታናሽ ምናልባት የበለጠ ስርዓት ይሻላል፤ (3) የናቡር ዓይነታችን አካባቢ የፊደል ሞዴል እና ጉዳዩ የ-የ-art ውጤቶች በትክክል ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': "গণনাত্রিক শব্দের সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য সেকেন্ড-থেকে সেকেন্স-সেকেন্স মডেল প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে। মডেলটি ইনপুট হিসেবে গণিত সমস্যার বর্ণনা গ্রহণ করে আউটপুট হিসেবে সমতুল্য তৈরি করে। প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যে কোন সমান তৈরি করতে পারে না। তবে আমাদের পরীক্ষার বিশ্লেষণ প্রকাশ করেছে যে এই মডেল দুই সংখ্যা থেকে কষ্ট পাচ্ছে: (১) বিদ্রোহী সংখ্যা তৈরি কর (2) ভুল অবস্থানে সংখ্যা তৈরি করুন। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা কপি এবং একত্রিত করার প্রস্তাব দিচ্ছি সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স মোডেল (যার নাম ক্যাসেস) এই কম্পিউটিকে ঠিক করার জন্য। আমাদের মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য, আমরা সরাসরি সমাধানের সঠিকভাবে সুন্দর করার জন্য শিক্ষা বাড়িয়ে দেই। এটি সর্বোচ্চ সম্ভাব্য হিসেবে ট্রেন-পরীক্ষা বৈষম্যের বিষয়টিকে 'ট্রেন-পরীক্ষা' বিষয়টি জয়ী করে, যা প্রশিক্ষণের সময় সমতুল্যের সমান বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য সার্রোগেটের উদ্ এছাড়াও, আমাদের নিউরেল মডেলের কার্যকলাপ খুঁজে বের করার জন্য, আমরা আমাদের মডেল আউটপুট ব্যবহার করি একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে এবং এটি বৈশি পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে (১) কপি এবং সংযুক্ত করার মাধ্যমে এই দুটি বিষয়গুলোকে মোকাবেলা করার কার্যকর। (2) Reinforcement learning leads to better performance than maximum likelihood on this task;  (৩) আমাদের নিউরেল মডেল বৈশিষ্ট্য ভিত্তিক মডেলের প্রতি সহায়তা এবং তাদের সংযোগ গ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ করে শিল্পের পরিস্থিতির ফলা", 'hy': "Սկզբում հաջորդականության մոդելը կիրառվել է մաթեմատիկական բառերի խնդիրների լուծման համար: The model takes math problem descriptions as input and generates equations as output.  Հաջորդականության և հաջորդականության մոդելի առավելությունը չի պահանջում որևէ հատկանիշներ ճարտարագիտության և կարող է ստեղծել հավասարումներ, որոնք չգոյություն ունեն ուսուցման տվյալների մեջ: Այնուամենայնիվ, մեր փորձարկման վերլուծությունը բացահայտում է, որ այս մոդելը տառապում է երկու թերություններից: (1) ստեղծում է խիստ թվեր, (2) ստեղծել թվեր սխալ դիրքերում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ներառել կոպիայի և հարմարեցման մեխանիզմը հաջորդականության մոդելի (մասնավորապես ՔԱՍ) հետ, որպեսզի լուծենք այս թերությունները: To train our model, we apply reinforcement learning to directly optimize the solution accuracy.  It overcomes the 'train-test discrepancy' issue of maximum likelihood estimation, which uses the surrogate objective of maximizing equation likelihood during training while the evaluation metric is solution accuracy (non-differentiable) at test time.  Ավելին, մեր նյարդային մոդելի արդյունավետության ուսումնասիրելու համար մենք օգտագործում ենք մեր մոդելի արտադրությունը որպես առանձնահատկություն և ներառում այն առանձնահատկություններով հիմնված մոդելի մեջ: Տարբերական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ (1) Կոպիայի և հարմարեցման մեխանիզմը արդյունավետ է երկու խնդիրների լուծման համար: (2) Գործողական ուսումնասիրությունը հանգեցնում է ավելի լավ արդյունք, քան այս խնդրի մեծագույն հավանականությունը: (3) Մեր նյարդային մոդելը համալրացնում է առանձնահատկություններով հիմնված մոդելը, և նրանց համակցությունը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ամենակարևոր արդյունքները:", 'ca': 'S\'ha aplicat un model de seqüència a seqüència per resoldre problemes de paraules matemàtiques. El model agafa les descripcions del problema matemàtic com a entrada i genera equacions com a sortida. The advantage of sequence-to-sequence model requires no feature engineering and can generate equations that do not exist in training data.  No obstant això, la nostra anàlisi experimental revela que aquest model pateix dues deficiències: (1) genera números spuriosos; (2) generar números en posicions equivocades. En aquest paper, proposem incorporar un mecanisme de còpia i alliniament al model de seqüència a seqüència (és a dir, CASS) per abordar aquestes deficiències. Per formar el nostre model, aplicam aprenentatge de reforç per optimitzar directament la precisió de la solució. Supera la qüestió de la "discrepancia entre els proves de tren" de l\'estimació de la màxima probabilitat, que utilitza l\'objectiu substitut de maximitzar la probabilitat d\'equació durant l\'entrenament mentre la métrica d\'evaluació és la precisió de la solució (no diferenciable) en el moment de la prova. A més, per explorar l\'eficacia del nostre model neuronal, utilitzem el nostre model de producció com a característica i l\'incorporam al model basat en característices. Els resultats experimentals mostren que (1) El mecanisme de còpia i alliniament és eficaç per abordar les dues qüestions; (2) L\'aprenentatge de reforç porta a millors resultats que la màxima probabilitat d\'aquesta tasca; (3) El nostre model neuronal és complementar al model basat en característiques i la seva combinació supera significativament els resultats més avançats.', 'et': 'Matemaatika sõna probleemide lahendamiseks on rakendatud jada-jada mudelit. Mudel võtab sisendina matemaatiliste probleemide kirjeldused ja genereerib väljundina võrrandid. Järjest järjestusse mudeli eelis ei nõua funktsioonide projekteerimist ja võib luua võrrandeid, mida koolitusandmetes ei eksisteeri. Meie eksperimentaalne analüüs näitab siiski, et sellel mudelil on kaks puudust: (1) tekitada võltsitud arvu; (2) luua numbrid valedes kohtades. Käesolevas dokumendis teeme ettepaneku lisada kopeerimis- ja vastavusmehhanism järjestusest järjestusse mudelile (nimelt CASS), et kõrvaldada need puudused. Oma mudeli treenimiseks rakendame tugevdusõpet, et otseselt optimeerida lahenduse täpsust. See lahendab maksimaalse tõenäosuse hindamise "rongikatse erinevuse" küsimuse, milles kasutatakse asenduseesmärki maksimeerida võrrandi tõenäosust koolituse ajal, samas kui hindamismeetodiks on lahenduse täpsus (mittediferentseeritav) katse ajal. Lisaks sellele, et uurida oma närvimudeli efektiivsust, kasutame oma mudeli väljundit funktsioonina ja lisame selle funktsioonipõhisesse mudelisse. Katsetulemused näitavad, et (1) kopeerimis- ja vastavusmehhanism on tõhus kahe probleemi lahendamiseks; (2) Tugevdatud õppe tulemused on selle ülesande täitmisel maksimaalsest tõenäosusest paremad; (3) Meie närvimudel täiendab funktsioonipõhist mudelit ja nende kombinatsioon ületab oluliselt kaasaegseid tulemusi.', 'cs': 'Model sekvence-to-sekvence byl použit k řešení matematických slovních problémů. Model bere popisy matematických problémů jako vstup a generuje rovnice jako výstup. Výhoda modelu sekvence na sekvenci nevyžaduje žádné funkční inženýrství a může generovat rovnice, které neexistují v tréninkových datech. Naše experimentální analýza však ukazuje, že tento model trpí dvěma nedostatky: (1) generovat falešná čísla; (2) generovat čísla na špatných pozicích. V tomto článku navrhujeme začlenění kopírovacího a zarovnávacího mechanismu do sekvenčního modelu (konkrétně CASS) k řešení těchto nedostatků. Pro trénink našeho modelu používáme výztužné učení k přímé optimalizaci přesnosti řešení. Překonává problém odhadu maximální pravděpodobnosti mezi vlakem a zkouškami, který využívá náhradního cíle maximalizace pravděpodobnosti rovnic během tréninku, zatímco hodnotící metrika je přesnost řešení (nelišitelná) v době zkoušky. Kromě toho, abychom zkoumali efektivitu našeho neuronového modelu, používáme náš modelový výstup jako vlastnost a začleníme ho do modelu založeného na funkcích. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že (1) Mechanismus kopírování a zarovnání je účinný pro řešení obou problémů; (2) Posílení učení vede k lepšímu výkonu než maximální pravděpodobnosti při plnění tohoto úkolu; (3) Náš neuronový model je doplňkový k modelu založenému na funkcích a jejich kombinace výrazně předčí nejmodernější výsledky.', 'fi': 'Sekvenssi-to-sekvenssimallia on sovellettu matemaattisten sanaongelmien ratkaisemiseen. Malli ottaa matemaattiset ongelmakuvaukset syötteenä ja tuottaa yhtälöt tuotoksena. Sekvenssi-sekvenssimallin etu ei vaadi ominaisuuksien suunnittelua ja voi tuottaa yhtälöitä, joita ei ole olemassa harjoitusdatassa. Kokeellisesta analyysistämme käy kuitenkin ilmi, että tässä mallissa on kaksi puutetta: (1) tuottaa vääriä lukuja; (2) tuottaa numeroita väärissä paikoissa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kopiointi- ja yhdenmukaistamismekanismin sisällyttämistä sekvenssi-to-sekvenssimalliin (CASS) näiden puutteiden korjaamiseksi. Mallimme kouluttamiseen sovellamme vahvistusoppia ratkaisun tarkkuuden optimoimiseksi suoraan. Se ratkaisee suurimman todennäköisyyden estimoinnin "junatestipoikkeaman", jossa käytetään korvaavaa tavoitetta maksimoida yhtälön todennäköisyys harjoittelun aikana, kun taas arviointimetrinä on ratkaisun tarkkuus (ei eroteltavissa) testiaikana. Lisäksi neuromallimme tehokkuuden tutkimiseksi käytämme mallituotosta ominaisuutena ja sisällytämme sen ominaisuuspohjaiseen malliin. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että (1) Kopiointi- ja tasausmekanismi on tehokas näiden kahden ongelman ratkaisemisessa. (2) Vahvistettu oppiminen johtaa parempaan suorituskykyyn kuin suurin todennäköisyys tässä tehtävässä; (3) Neuromallimme täydentää ominaisuuspohjaista mallia ja niiden yhdistelmä ylittää merkittävästi uusimmat tulokset.', 'az': "Matematik söz problemlərini çəkmək üçün sıralama-sıralama modeli uygulandı. Model matematik problemlərini daxil olaraq yazılır və tənlikləri çıxış olaraq yaradır. sequence-to-sequence model in in mənfəəti heç bir özellik in ženjeri ehtiyacı yoxdur və təhsil məlumatlarında olmayan tənlikləri yarada bilər. Ancaq eksperimental analizimiz bu modelin iki zəiflikdən üz verəcəyini göstərir: (2) yanlış məqamlarda nömrələri yarat. Bu kağızda, bu xətaları çəkmək üçün, sequence-to-sequence modeli (CASS) ilə birləşdirmək və düzəltmə mehanizmini təklif edirik. Modelimizi təhsil etmək üçün, çətin doğruluğunu doğrudan optimizləmək üçün yenilənmək öyrənməsini istifadə edirik. Bu, müəyyən vaxtda müəyyən edilmə mümkün olaraq müəyyən edilmə mümkün olan 'tren-test-discrepanci' məsələsini üstün edir. Bu, müəyyən vaxtda müəyyən edilmə mümkün olaraq müəyyən edilmə müəyyən edilmə müəyyən edilmə müəyyən edilmə müddətini istifadə edir. Daha sonra, nöral modelimizin etkinliğini keşfetmek üçün modellərimizi özellik olaraq istifadə edir və onu özelliklərə dayanan modellərə qovuşdururuq. İki məsələləri çəkmək üçün təcrübə və düzəltmə mehanizmisi təşkil edir. (2) Bu işin ən yaxşı mümkün olmasından daha yaxşı performans olar. (3) Bizim nöral modelimiz fərqli modellə tamamlayır və onların kombinatsiyası mövcuddur.", 'bs': 'Model sekvence do sekvence primjenjen je za rješavanje problema s riječima matematike. Model uzima opis matematičkih problema kao ulaz i stvara jednačine kao izlaz. Prednost modela sekvence do sekvence ne zahtijeva nikakve in ženjeringa i može stvoriti jednačine koje ne postoje u podacima obuke. Međutim, naša eksperimentalna analiza pokazuje da ovaj model pati od dva nedostatka: (1) proizvodi potpune brojeve; (2) proizvodi brojeve na pogrešnim pozicijama. U ovom papiru predlažemo uključiti mehanizam kopije i usklađenja modelu sekvence do sekvence (a to je CASS) kako bi se riješili ovih nedostataka. Za trening našeg modela, primjenjujemo učenje pojačanja da bismo direktno optimizirali to čnost rješenja. Prelazi na pitanje "diskrecija testiranja vlaka" maksimalne procjene vjerojatnosti, koja koristi cilj nadrogate za maksimaliziranje vjerojatnosti jednačine tijekom treninga dok je procjena metrika tačnost rješenja (ne diferencijalna) u vrijeme testa. Osim toga, da bismo istražili učinkovitost našeg neuronskog model a, koristili bismo naš model output kao karakteristiku i uključili ga u model na osnovu funkcija. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je (1) mehanizam kopije i usklađenja efikasan za rješavanje dva pitanja; (2) Pojačavanje učenja vodi do boljih učinka nego maksimalne vjerojatnosti ovog zadatka; (3) Naš neuronski model je komplementar modelu baziranom na funkcijama i njihova kombinacija značajno iznosi rezultate stanja umjetnosti.', 'ha': "An amfani da motsi na sakan-zuwa-sequence dõmin ya solar wa masu matsayin matsayi. @ info: tooltip Amfanin misalin-zuwa-sequence ba ya buƙata wani muhalli na muhalli kuma yana iya ƙiƙira misalin da ba ta da shi ba. Amma, anarrayenmu na jarrabi ya bayyana cewa wannan misalin ya cũtar daga ƙarami biyu: (1) mai ƙidida nambara masu ƙaranci; (2) Mai ƙiƙira lambu a cikin wurãren kwanan makosa. Ga wannan takardan, Munã goyyade za'a haɗa kodi da matsayin juyi zuwa misalin-sequence (misali CASS) dõmin su yi amfani da wannan shortcutan. To train our model, we apply reinforcement learning to directly optimize the solution accuracy.  Yana rinjãya wa'urar-jarrabi na-tunni, da yana amfani da shaidar surgeota don ya faɗaɗa masu yiwuwa wa daidaita a a lokacin da za'a yi amfani da shi a lokacin jarraba idan an yi amfani da shi, idan an yi amfani da tunakin metric ya zama tabbatacce (ba-rarrabe) a lokacin jarraba. Furan haka, dõmin mu nẽmi aikin misalin neurali, za mu yi amfani da matsalatan misalinmu kamar wata sifati kuma mu shigar da shi a cikin misali wanda aka ƙayyade. Cire masu jarraba ya nuna (1) Shirin kodi da juyi yana da amfani da yin magana ga masu biyu; (2) Lõkacin da aka ƙara lãdar, zai fi zama mafiya alhẽri ga aiki a kan wannan aikin; @ action: button", 'he': 'מודל רצף לרצף הופעל לפתור בעיות מילים מתמטיקות. המודל לוקח תיאור בעיות מתמטיקה כתוצאה ויוצר משוואות כתוצאה. יתרון של מודל רצף לרצף לא דורש הנדסה של תכונות ויכול ליצור משוואות שלא קיימות בנתונים האימונים. עם זאת, הניתוח הניסיוני שלנו מראה שהדוגמאל הזה סובל משני חסרויות: (1) לייצר מספרים מעוררים; (2) ליצור מספרים במקומות הלא נכונים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים להכניס את מנגנון העתק וההתאמה למודל הרצף לרצף (כלומר CASS) כדי להתמודד עם החסרונות האלה. כדי לאמן את המודל שלנו, אנו משתמשים ללמוד תגבורה כדי לאופטיזם את מדויקת הפתרון באופן ישיר. It overcomes the “train-test discrepancy” issue of maximum likelihood estimation, which uses the surrogate objective of maximizing equation likelihood during training while the evaluation metric is solution accuracy (non-differentiable) at test time.  Furthermore, to explore the effectiveness of our neural model, we use our model output as a feature and incorporate it into the feature-based model.  תוצאות ניסיוניות מראות כי (1) מכונות העתק והשיגור הוא יעיל כדי להתמודד עם שני הנושאים; (2) לימוד חיבור מוביל לביצוע טוב יותר מהסבירות המקסימלית במשימה הזאת; (3) הדוגמא העצבית שלנו תוספת לדוגמא המבוססת על תכונות והשילוב שלהם יוצא משמעות יותר מהתוצאות המאודמות.', 'sk': 'Za reševanje težav z matematičnimi besedami je bil uporabljen model zaporedja v zaporedje. Model vzame opise matematičnih problemov kot vhod in ustvari enačbe kot izhod. Prednost modela od zaporedja do zaporedja ne zahteva nobenega inženiringa funkcij in lahko ustvari enačbe, ki ne obstajajo v podatkih o usposabljanju. Vendar pa naša eksperimentalna analiza pokaže, da ima ta model dve pomanjkljivosti: (1) ustvarja lažno število; (2) ustvariti številke na napačnih položajih. V prispevku predlagamo vključitev mehanizma kopiranja in usklajevanja v model zaporedja v zaporedje (in sicer CASS) za odpravo teh pomanjkljivosti. Za usposabljanje modela uporabljamo učenje ojačitve za neposredno optimizacijo natančnosti rešitve. Odpravlja vprašanje "razlike med vlakom in preskusom" ocene največje verjetnosti, ki uporablja nadomestni cilj povečanja verjetnosti enačb med usposabljanjem, medtem ko je meritev ocenjevanja natančnost rešitve (nediferencirana) v času preskusa. Poleg tega, da bi raziskali učinkovitost našega nevronskega modela, uporabljamo naš izhod modela kot funkcijo in ga vključimo v model, ki temelji na funkcijah. Rezultati poskusov kažejo, da je (1) mehanizem kopiranja in poravnave učinkovit za obravnavanje obeh vprašanj; (2) Okrepitev učenja vodi k boljši uspešnosti te naloge, kot je največja verjetnost; (3) Naš nevronski model dopolnjuje model, ki temelji na funkcijah, njihova kombinacija pa bistveno presega najsodobnejše rezultate.', 'jv': 'Subtraction Laptop" and "Desktop Range politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness (2) Ngawe Perintah kang didasar Nang pember iki, kita enyester biasane nggawe kotak lan nggawe meh dadi sekondirno-to-sekondirno (nambah CKASS) nganggep nggawe barang iki banget. Genjer-genjer model sing paling awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe lan pakak dhéwé iso nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe gerakan dhéwé. Awak dhéwé sing beraksi perbudhakan "njeneng-ujak" nggawe kesempalahan gak bener, sing uwis ngono cah-ujak gak dhéwé iso nggawe gerarané perbudhakan maneh sing uwis nggawe sapa kut ujak-ujak Laptop" and "Desktop Menu item to Open \'Search for Open Files\' dialog (2) Ngubah Jejaring (3) Njarian model sing dibenalke kelompungan karo model sing dibenalke kelompungan karo iso diangkamu nggawe barang nggawe state-of-the-arts dadi.', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གྲངས་རིག་གི་ཆ་ཤས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོགས་ལ་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ཡོད། The model takes math problem descriptions as input and generates equations as output. The advantage of sequence-to-sequence model requires no feature engineering and can generate equations that do not exist in training data. However, our experimental analysis reveals that this model suffers from two shortcomings: (1) generate spurious numbers; and (2) ནུས་མེད་པའི་གནས་ཡུལ་ལ་ཨང་གྲངས་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད། In this paper, we propose incorporating copy and alignment mechanism to the sequence-to-sequence model (namely CASS) to address these shortcomings. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས It overcomes the "train-test discrepancy" issue of maximum likelihood estimation, which uses the surrogate objective of maximizing equation likelihood during training while the evaluation metric is solution accuracy (non-differentiable) at test time. Furthermore, to explore the effectiveness of our neural model, we use our model output as a feature and incorporate it into the feature-based model. ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བྱ་ཚིག་དག (1)འདྲ་བཤུ་དང་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག (2) ཡར་རྒྱས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཤེས་ཚད་ནི་བྱ་འགུལ་འདིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད། (3) Our neural model is complementary to the feature-based model and their combination significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art results.'}
{'en': 'Lexi : A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'ar': 'Lexi: أداة لتبسيط النص المخصص والمتكيف', 'es': 'Lexi: una herramienta para la simplificación adaptativa y personalizada del texto', 'fr': 'Lexi\xa0: un outil de simplification de texte adaptative et personnalisée', 'pt': 'Lexi: Uma ferramenta para simplificação de texto adaptável e personalizada', 'ja': 'Lexi ：適応的でパーソナライズされたテキストを簡素化するためのツール', 'zh': 'Lexi曰:应个性化简化之具也', 'hi': 'Lexi: अनुकूली, व्यक्तिगत पाठ सरलीकरण के लिए एक उपकरण', 'ru': 'Lexi: инструмент для адаптивного, персонализированного упрощения текста', 'ga': 'Lexi: Uirlis chun téacs oiriúnaitheach, pearsantaithe a shimpliú', 'ka': 'A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'hu': 'Lexi: Egy eszköz az adaptív, személyre szabott szövegek egyszerűsítéséhez', 'el': 'Ένα εργαλείο για προσαρμοστική, εξατομικευμένη απλοποίηση κειμένου', 'it': 'Lexi: Uno strumento per la semplificazione adattiva e personalizzata del testo', 'kk': 'Лекси: A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'lt': 'Lexi: pritaikymo ir asmeninio teksto supaprastinimo priemonė', 'ml': 'ലെക്സി', 'ms': 'Lexi: Alat untuk pemudahan teks sesuai dan sesuai', 'mt': 'Lexi: Għodda għas-simplifikazzjoni adattiva u personalizzata tat-test', 'mk': 'Лекси: Инструмент за адаптивно, персонализирано поедноставување на текстот', 'mn': 'Лекси: Хэрэглэгч, хувийн текст хялбарчлалын хэрэгсэл', 'no': 'Lexi: A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'pl': 'Lexi: Narzędzie do adaptacyjnego, spersonalizowanego uproszczenia tekstu', 'ro': 'Lexi: Un instrument pentru simplificarea adaptivă și personalizată a textului', 'si': 'ලක්සි: A toolbox for Adjust, personalised text', 'sr': 'Lexi: alat za adaptivno, osobno pojednostavljanje teksta', 'so': 'Lexi: qalabka la habboon karo, fududeynta text ee gaarka loo leeyahay', 'sv': 'Lexi: Ett verktyg för anpassningsbar, personlig textförenkling', 'ur': 'لکسی: A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'ta': 'லெக்ஸி: ஒப்பீட்டு, தனிப்பட்ட உரை எளிதாக்கத்திற்கான கருவி', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Lexi: Một công cụ để dễ ứng biến, mô phỏng văn bản', 'bg': 'Лекси: Инструмент за адаптивно и персонализирано опростяване на текста', 'hr': 'Lexi: alat za adaptivno, osobno pojednostavljanje teksta', 'da': 'Lexi: Et værktøj til fleksibel, personlig tekstforenkling', 'nl': 'Lexi: Een hulpmiddel voor adaptieve, gepersonaliseerde tekstvereenvoudiging', 'ko': 'Lexi: 맞춤형 텍스트 간소화 도구', 'de': 'Lexi: Ein Werkzeug zur adaptiven, personalisierten Textvereinfachung', 'id': 'Lexi: Alat untuk penyimplifikasi teks pribadi dan adaptif', 'fa': 'لکسی: A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'af': 'Lexi: A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'tr': 'A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'sw': 'Lexi: Kifaa cha upatikanaji wa ujumbe binafsi', 'sq': 'Lexi: Një mjet për thjeshtësimin e tekstit të përshtatshëm dhe personalizuar', 'az': 'Lexi: A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'hy': 'Լեքսի՝ Ադապտատիվ, անձնական տեքստի պարզաբանման գործիք', 'am': 'Lexi: A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'bn': 'লেক্সি: প্রাপ্ত, ব্যক্তিগত টেক্সট সহজেকশনের জন্য একটি টুল', 'cs': 'Lexi: Nástroj pro adaptivní a personalizované zjednodušení textu', 'ca': 'Lexi: A tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification', 'fi': 'Lexi: Työkalu mukautuvaan ja yksilölliseen tekstin yksinkertaistamiseen', 'et': 'Lexi: tööriist kohandatava ja isikupärastatud teksti lihtsustamiseks', 'bs': 'Lexi: alat za adaptivno, osobno pojednostavljanje teksta', 'jv': 'A tool for Adjustable, Personalizated text Simplification', 'he': 'כלי להפשטת טקסט אישית ומתאימת', 'sk': 'Lexi: Orodje za prilagodljivo in prilagojeno poenostavitev besedila', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Lexi:བཟོ་བཅོས་དང་སྒེར་གྱི་ཡི་གེ་ཆུང་སྤྲོད་དགོས་ལག་ཆ།'}
{'en': 'Most previous research in text simplification has aimed to develop generic solutions, assuming very homogeneous target audiences with consistent intra-group simplification needs. We argue that this assumption does not hold, and that instead we need to develop simplification systems that adapt to the individual needs of specific users. As a first step towards personalized simplification, we propose a framework for adaptive lexical simplification and introduce Lexi, a free open-source and easily extensible tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification. Lexi is easily installed as a browser extension, enabling easy access to the service for its users.', 'es': 'La mayoría de las investigaciones anteriores sobre simplificación de textos han tenido como objetivo desarrollar soluciones genéricas, asumiendo audiencias objetivo muy homogéneas con necesidades de simplificación intragrupo consistentes Sostenemos que esta suposición no es válida y que, en cambio, necesitamos desarrollar sistemas de simplificación que se adapten a las necesidades individuales de los usuarios específicos. Como primer paso hacia la simplificación personalizada, proponemos un marco para la simplificación léxica adaptativa e introducimos Lexi, una herramienta gratuita de código abierto y fácilmente extensible para la simplificación adaptativa y personalizada del texto. Lexi se instala fácilmente como una extensión del navegador, lo que permite a sus usuarios acceder fácilmente al servicio.', 'ar': 'تهدف معظم الأبحاث السابقة في تبسيط النص إلى تطوير حلول عامة ، بافتراض وجود جماهير مستهدفة متجانسة للغاية مع احتياجات تبسيط متسقة داخل المجموعة. نحن نجادل بأن هذا الافتراض غير صحيح ، وبدلاً من ذلك نحتاج إلى تطوير أنظمة تبسيط تتكيف مع الاحتياجات الفردية لمستخدمين محددين. كخطوة أولى نحو التبسيط المخصص ، نقترح إطارًا للتبسيط المعجمي التكيفي ونقدم Lexi ، وهو أداة مجانية مفتوحة المصدر وقابلة للتوسيع بسهولة لتبسيط النص المخصص والمخصص. يتم تثبيت Lexi بسهولة كملحق للمتصفح ، مما يتيح سهولة الوصول إلى الخدمة لمستخدميها.', 'fr': "La plupart des recherches précédentes sur la simplification de texte visaient à développer des solutions génériques, en supposant des publics cibles très homogènes ayant des besoins de simplification intra-groupe cohérents. Nous soutenons que cette hypothèse n'est pas valable et que nous devons plutôt développer des systèmes de simplification qui s'adaptent aux besoins individuels des utilisateurs spécifiques. Comme première étape vers une simplification personnalisée, nous proposons un cadre de simplification lexicale adaptative et introduisons Lexi, un outil open source gratuit et facilement extensible pour la simplification de texte adaptative et personnalisée. Lexi s'installe facilement en tant qu'extension de navigateur, ce qui permet à ses utilisateurs d'accéder facilement au service.", 'pt': 'A maioria das pesquisas anteriores em simplificação de texto visava desenvolver soluções genéricas, assumindo públicos-alvo muito homogêneos com necessidades consistentes de simplificação intragrupo. Argumentamos que essa suposição não se sustenta e que, em vez disso, precisamos desenvolver sistemas de simplificação que se adaptem às necessidades individuais de usuários específicos. Como primeiro passo para a simplificação personalizada, propomos uma estrutura para simplificação lexical adaptativa e apresentamos Lexi, uma ferramenta gratuita de código aberto e facilmente extensível para simplificação de texto adaptável e personalizada. Lexi é facilmente instalado como uma extensão do navegador, permitindo fácil acesso ao serviço para seus usuários.', 'ja': 'テキストの簡略化に関する以前の研究のほとんどは、グループ内の一貫した簡素化ニーズを持つ非常に均質なターゲットオーディエンスを想定して、一般的な解決策を開発することを目的としています。私たちは、この仮定は成立せず、代わりに特定のユーザーの個々のニーズに適応した簡素化システムを開発する必要があると主張しています。パーソナライズされた単純化への最初のステップとして、アダプティブ辞書的単純化のためのフレームワークを提案し、アダプティブでパーソナライズされたテキスト単純化のための無料のオープンソースで簡単に拡張可能なツールであるLexiを導入します。Lexiはブラウザ拡張機能として簡単にインストールされ、ユーザーが簡単にサービスにアクセスできます。', 'hi': 'पाठ सरलीकरण में अधिकांश पिछले शोध का उद्देश्य जेनेरिक समाधान विकसित करना है, जो लगातार इंट्रा-ग्रुप सरलीकरण आवश्यकताओं के साथ बहुत सजातीय लक्ष्य दर्शकों को मानते हैं। हम तर्क देते हैं कि यह धारणा नहीं रखती है, और इसके बजाय हमें सरलीकरण प्रणालियों को विकसित करने की आवश्यकता है जो विशिष्ट उपयोगकर्ताओं की व्यक्तिगत जरूरतों के अनुकूल हैं। व्यक्तिगत सरलीकरण की दिशा में पहले कदम के रूप में, हम अनुकूली लेक्सिकल सरलीकरण के लिए एक रूपरेखा का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और लेक्सी, एक मुफ्त ओपन-सोर्स और अनुकूली, व्यक्तिगत पाठ सरलीकरण के लिए आसानी से एक्सटेंसिबल टूल पेश करते हैं। लेक्सी को आसानी से ब्राउज़र एक्सटेंशन के रूप में स्थापित किया जाता है, जिससे इसके उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए सेवा तक आसान पहुंच सक्षम होती है।', 'zh': '前文本简化者多讲求通用解决方案,假设受众甚同质,而有一组内简化之求。 吾谓此设不立,反是,须开适特定用户所求简化系统。 迈向个性化简之首,建一词汇之框架,引入Lexi,此免费之开源而易广之具,施于自适,个性化之文简也。 Lexi可轻为浏览器,使用户可轻访。', 'ru': 'Большинство предыдущих исследований по упрощению текста были направлены на разработку общих решений, предполагая очень однородную целевую аудиторию с постоянными потребностями в упрощении внутри группы. Мы утверждаем, что это предположение не соответствует действительности и что вместо этого нам необходимо разработать системы упрощения, которые адаптируются к индивидуальным потребностям конкретных пользователей. В качестве первого шага на пути к персонализированному упрощению мы предлагаем структуру адаптивного лексического упрощения и представляем Lexi, бесплатный открытый и легко расширяемый инструмент для адаптивного, персонализированного упрощения текста. Lexi легко устанавливается в качестве расширения браузера, обеспечивая легкий доступ к сервису для его пользователей.', 'ga': 'Bhí an chuid is mó den taighde a rinneadh roimhe seo ar shimpliú téacs dírithe ar réitigh chineálacha a fhorbairt, ag glacadh leis go mbeidh spriocghrúpaí an-aonchineálacha ag a bhfuil riachtanais simpliúcháin chomhsheasmhacha inghrúpa. Áitímid nach bhfuil an toimhde seo i gceist, agus ina ionad sin go gcaithfimid córais simplithe a fhorbairt a oiriúnú do riachtanais aonair úsáideoirí sonracha. Mar chéad chéim i dtreo simplithe pearsantaithe, molaimid creat le haghaidh simpliú foclóireachta oiriúnaitheach agus tugtar isteach Lexi, uirlis saor in aisce foinse oscailte atá in-sínte le haghaidh simpliú téacs oiriúnaitheach, pearsantaithe. Tá Lexi suiteáilte go héasca mar shíneadh brabhsálaí, rud a ligeann rochtain éasca ar an tseirbhís dá úsáideoirí.', 'ka': 'უფრო მეტი წინა ტექსტის განხორციელებაში შესაძლებელია განვითარება გენერიკური გარეშე, რომელიც ძალიან ჰომოგენენური მისაღების აუდიტორიები, რომელიც კონსტენტური გენერ ჩვენ ამბობით, რომ ეს წარმოდგენა არ შეიძლება, და რომ უნდა გავაკეთოთ განსხვავებული სისტემი, რომელიც განსხვავებული მომხმარების ინდივეტური საჭიროებებისთვის აეპორტი როგორც პირველი ნაწილი პორციალურად განვითარებაზე, ჩვენ აეპტიგურად ლექსიკალურად განვითარება და Lexi-ს გაჩვენოთ, თავისუფალურად განვითარება და ადაპტიგურად განვითარება ტექსტის განვითარება. Name', 'el': 'Οι περισσότερες προηγούμενες έρευνες σχετικά με την απλοποίηση των κειμένων έχουν ως στόχο την ανάπτυξη γενικών λύσεων, υποθέτοντας πολύ ομοιογενή ακροατήρια-στόχους με συνεπείς ανάγκες απλοποίησης εντός ομάδας. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι αυτή η υπόθεση δεν ισχύει και ότι αντίθετα πρέπει να αναπτύξουμε συστήματα απλοποίησης που προσαρμόζονται στις ατομικές ανάγκες συγκεκριμένων χρηστών. Ως πρώτο βήμα προς την εξατομικευμένη απλοποίηση, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο για την προσαρμοστική λεξική απλοποίηση και εισάγουμε ένα δωρεάν εργαλείο ανοιχτού κώδικα και εύκολα επεκτάσιμο για την προσαρμοστική, εξατομικευμένη απλοποίηση κειμένου. Το εγκαθίσταται εύκολα ως επέκταση προγράμματος περιήγησης, επιτρέποντας εύκολη πρόσβαση στην υπηρεσία για τους χρήστες του.', 'hu': 'A szövegek egyszerűsítésével kapcsolatos korábbi kutatások többsége általános megoldások kidolgozására irányult, nagyon homogén célközönséget feltételezve, amelyek következetes csoporton belüli egyszerűsítési igényekkel rendelkeznek. Azzal érvelünk, hogy ez a feltételezés nem áll fenn, és ehelyett olyan egyszerűsítő rendszereket kell kidolgoznunk, amelyek alkalmazkodnak az egyes felhasználók egyéni igényeihez. A személyre szabott egyszerűsítés felé vezető első lépésként javasoljuk az adaptív lexikai egyszerűsítés keretét, és bemutatjuk a Lexit, egy ingyenes, nyílt forráskódú és könnyen bővíthető eszközt az adaptív, személyre szabott szöveg egyszerűsítéséhez. A Lexi egyszerűen telepíthető böngészőbővítményként, így a felhasználók könnyen hozzáférhetnek a szolgáltatáshoz.', 'it': 'La maggior parte delle ricerche precedenti in materia di semplificazione dei testi ha mirato a sviluppare soluzioni generiche, assumendo destinatari molto omogenei con esigenze coerenti di semplificazione intragruppo. Sosteniamo che questa ipotesi non è valida e che invece dobbiamo sviluppare sistemi di semplificazione che si adattino alle esigenze individuali di utenti specifici. Come primo passo verso una semplificazione personalizzata, proponiamo un framework per la semplificazione lessicale adattiva e presentiamo Lexi, uno strumento gratuito open source e facilmente estensibile per la semplificazione del testo adattivo e personalizzato. Lexi è facilmente installato come estensione del browser, consentendo un facile accesso al servizio per i suoi utenti.', 'kk': 'Мәтін қарапайымдастыру үшін алдыңғы зерттеулердің көпшілігі жалпы шешімдерді жасау үшін, қарапайым топтың ішкі қарапайымдастыру қажеттілігі бар деп ойлайды. Біз бұл тапсырма жоқ деп айтып тұрамыз, және оның орнына біз өзгертілген пайдаланушылардың қажеттігіне адаптайтын қарапайым жүйелерді жасау керек. Бірінші қадам өзгертілген қарапайым ретінде, адаптиялық лексикалық қарапайымдастыру және Lexi- ті, адаптиялық, жеке мәтінді қарапайымдастыру үшін ашық көзі және оңай кеңейтілген құралын келтіріп,  Lexi браузердің кеңейтуі ретінде оңай орнатылады, пайдаланушыларына оңай қатынауға мүмкіндік береді.', 'mk': 'Повеќето претходни истражувања во врска со поедноставувањето на текстот имаат за цел развој на генерални решенија, претпоставувајќи многу хомогени целни публики со константни потреби за поедноставување во групата. Ние тврдиме дека оваа претпоставка не се одржува и дека наместо тоа треба да развиеме системи за едноставување кои се адаптираат на индивидуалните потреби на специфичните корисници. Како прв чекор кон персонализираното поедноставување, предложуваме рамка за адаптивно лексикално поедноставување и воведуваме Лекси, слободна алатка на отворен код и лесно проширена алатка за адаптивно, персонализирано текстово поедноставување. Лесно е инсталиран Lexi како проширување на прелистувачот, овозможувајќи лесен пристап до сервисот за неговите корисници.', 'ms': 'Kebanyakan penelitian terdahulu dalam pemudahan teks telah bertujuan untuk mengembangkan penyelesaian generik, menganggap penonton sasaran yang sangat homogen dengan keperluan pemudahan dalam kumpulan konsisten. Kami membantah bahawa asumsi ini tidak memegang, dan bahawa selain itu kita perlu mengembangkan sistem pemudahan yang menyesuaikan kepada keperluan individu pengguna tertentu. Sebagai langkah pertama ke arah pemadaman pribadi, kami melaporkan kerangka untuk pemadaman leksik sesuai dan memperkenalkan Lexi, alat buka bebas dan mudah dilangkap untuk pemadaman teks sesuai dan sesuai. Lexi mudah dipasang sebagai sambungan pelayar, membolehkan akses mudah ke perkhidmatan untuk penggunanya.', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്റ്റ് എളുപ്പമാക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള പരിശോധനങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ പരിഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിനാല ഈ ഊഹം പിടിച്ചിട്ടില്ലെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നു. അതിനു പകരം നമുക്ക് പ്രത്യേക ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ആവശ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സമര്\u200dപ്പി സ്വകാര്യത്തിലേക്ക് വ്യക്തിപരമാക്കുവാനുള്ള ആദ്യ പടിയായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെയിക്ക് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ലെക്സിയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന് ലെക്സി ബ്രൌസര്\u200d എക്സ്റ്റെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d ആയി ഇന്\u200dസ്റ്റോള്\u200d ചെയ്യപ്പെടുന്നു. അതിന്റെ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സേവനം ലള', 'mt': "Il-biċċa l-kbira tar-riċerka preċedenti dwar is-simplifikazzjoni tat-test immirat lejn l-iżvilupp ta’ soluzzjonijiet ġeneriċi, filwaqt li jassumi udjenzi fil-mira omoġenji ħafna bi ħtiġijiet konsistenti ta’ simplifikazzjoni fi ħdan il-grupp. Aħna jargumentaw li din is-suppożizzjoni ma tinżammx, u minflok jeħtieġ li niżviluppaw sistemi ta' simplifikazzjoni li jadattaw għall-ħtiġijiet individwali ta' utenti speċifiċi. Bħala l-ewwel pass lejn is-simplifikazzjoni personalizzata, qed nipproponu qafas għas-simplifikazzjoni lexika adattiva u nintroduċu Lexi, għodda mingħajr ħlas ta’ sors miftuħ u faċilment estensibbli għas-simplifikazzjoni adattiva u personalizzata tat-test. Lexi huwa faċilment installat bħala estensjoni tal-brawżer, li tippermetti a ċċess faċli għas-servizz għall-utenti tiegħu.", 'no': 'Dei fleste førre forskningar i tekstforenklinga har målet å utvikla generelle løysing, ved å anta svært homogeneske målpublikum med konsistent nødvendighet for forenklingar i gruppa. Vi argumenterer at denne assumpsjonen ikkje inneheld, og at i staden må vi utvikle enkeltingssystemet som tilpassar individuelle behov for spesifikke brukarar. Som første steg mot personaliserte forenklingar, foreslår vi eit rammeverktøy for tilpassande leksikolsk forenkling og introduserer Lexi, eit fri opna kilde og lett utvidbare verktøy for tilpassande, personaliserte tekstforenkling. Lexi er lett installert som ei nettlesar- utviding, og kan bruka enkelt tilgang til tenesta for brukarane.', 'mn': 'Өмнөх текст хялбарчлалын судалгааны ихэнх нь ерөнхий шийдэлүүдийг хөгжүүлэх зорилготой, бүлэг дотор хялбарчлалын хэрэгцээтэй тэнцүү зорилготой хүмүүсийг тодорхойлох зорилготой. Бид энэ тодорхойлолт байхгүй гэдгийг хэлж байна. Үүний оронд бид тодорхой хэрэглэгчийн хэрэгцээтэй адилтгаж буй энгийн системүүд хөгжүүлэх хэрэгтэй. Хэрэглэгчийн хялбарчлал руу анхны алхам болгон, бид өөрсдийгөө зохицуулах лексикийн хялбарчлал болон үнэгүй нээлттэй эх үүсвэр болон хувийн текст хялбарчлалын тусламжтайгаар хөгжүүлэх хэрэгсэл болгон Лексийг тайлбарлаж байна Лекси нь броузер нэмэгдүүлэгч гэж амархан суулгагдсан, хэрэглэгчдийн тусламжтайгаа амархан хүрэх боломжтой.', 'pl': 'Większość wcześniejszych badań dotyczących uproszczenia tekstu miała na celu opracowanie rozwiązań ogólnych, zakładając bardzo jednorodną grupę odbiorców docelowych i konsekwentne potrzeby uproszczenia wewnątrz grupy. Twierdzimy, że takie założenie nie ma zastosowania, a zamiast tego musimy opracować systemy uproszczenia, które dostosowują się do indywidualnych potrzeb konkretnych użytkowników. Jako pierwszy krok w kierunku spersonalizowanego uproszczenia proponujemy ramy adaptacyjnego uproszczenia leksykalicznego i wprowadzamy Lexi, darmowe open source i łatwo rozszerzalne narzędzie do adaptacyjnego, spersonalizowanego uproszczenia tekstu. Lexi można łatwo zainstalować jako rozszerzenie przeglądarki, umożliwiając użytkownikom łatwy dostęp do usługi.', 'ro': 'Cele mai multe cercetări anterioare în domeniul simplificării textelor au vizat dezvoltarea de soluții generice, presupunând publice țintă foarte omogene, cu nevoi coerente de simplificare intragrup. Susținem că această ipoteză nu este valabilă și că, în schimb, trebuie să dezvoltăm sisteme de simplificare care să se adapteze nevoilor individuale ale anumitor utilizatori. Ca prim pas spre simplificarea personalizată, propunem un cadru pentru simplificarea lexicală adaptivă și introducem Lexi, un instrument gratuit open source și ușor extensibil pentru simplificarea adaptivă, personalizată a textului. Lexi este ușor de instalat ca extensie de browser, permițând accesul ușor la serviciu pentru utilizatorii săi.', 'lt': 'Most previous research in text simplification has aimed to develop generic solutions, assuming very homogeneous target audiences with consistent intra-group simplification needs.  Mes teigiame, kad ši prielaida nėra tinkama ir kad vietoj to turime sukurti supaprastinimo sistemas, kurios prisitaikytų prie konkrečių vartotojų individualių poreikių. Pirmuoju žingsniu siekiant individualaus supaprastinimo siūlome pritaikymo teksto supaprastinimo sistemą ir įdiegime Lexi, nemokamą atvirojo kodo ir lengvai išplėstinę pritaikymo teksto supaprastinimo priemonę. Lexi lengvai įrengiama kaip naršyklės išplėtimas, leidžiantis lengvai naudotis paslauga.', 'so': 'Inta badan baaritaanka hore ee fududaanka qoraalka waxaa loogu talagalay in uu horumariyo xalal caadiga ah, sida ay u malaynayaan dhaqaalayaasha kaalmo-jimicsiga ah oo ay u baahan yihiin fududaada kooxda. Waxaynu ka fekernaa in malaha aan haysan, taas darteed waxaan u baahan nahay inaan horumarino nidaam fudud oo u adag u baahan isticmaalayaasha gaarka ah. Sida tallaabo ugu horeysa ee loo soo bandhigayo fududaanka, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa firaaqad loo fududeeyo fududaanka leksikada, waxaana soo bandhigaynaa Lexi, taas oo ah qalabka furan oo si fudud u ah oo loo fududeeyo qalabka isbedelka, saxda saxda. Lexi waxaa si fudud loogu sahliyaa sida booska browser oo kale, kaas oo si fudud u heli kara adeegga isticmaalayaasha.', 'sv': 'De flesta tidigare forskningen inom textförenkling har syftat till att utveckla generiska lösningar, med antagande av mycket homogena målgrupper med konsekventa behov av förenkling inom gruppen. Vi hävdar att detta antagande inte håller, och att vi i stället behöver utveckla förenklingssystem som anpassar sig till specifika användares individuella behov. Som ett första steg mot personlig förenkling föreslår vi ett ramverk för anpassningsbar lexikal förenkling och introducerar Lexi, ett kostnadsfritt verktyg med öppen källkod och lättutbyggbart verktyg för anpassningsbar, personlig textförenkling. Lexi installeras enkelt som ett webbläsartillägg, vilket möjliggör enkel åtkomst till tjänsten för sina användare.', 'ta': 'உரை எளிதாக்கத்தில் முந்தைய ஆராய்ச்சி பொதுவான தீர்வுகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்டது, மிகவும் ஒத்திசைந்த இலக்கு காட் நாங்கள் இந்த கருத்து பிடிக்கவில்லை என்று தர்க்கம் செய்கிறோம், அதற்கு பதிலாக நாம் சுலபமான முறைமைகளை உருவாக்க வேண்டும், அது  தனிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட எளிதாக்கத்திற்கு முதல் படி என்றால், நாம் ஒரு சட்டத்தை ஏற்றுக்கொள்ள முடியும் லெக்ஸிக்சி, ஒரு இலவச திறந்த மூலம் மற்றும் எளிதாக ஒதுக உலாவி விரிவாக்கத்தால் லெக்ஸி எளிதாக நிறுவப்பட்டுள்ளது, அதன் பயனர்களுக்கு சுலபமான அணுகலை செயல்படுத்தும்.', 'sr': 'Većina prethodnih istraživanja u pojednostavljivanju teksta je ciljana da razviju generične rješenja, s obzirom na veoma homogenetne ciljne publike sa konsekventnim potrebama pojednostavljanja unutar grupe. Tvrdimo da ova pretpostavka ne drži i da umesto toga moramo razviti sisteme pojednostavljanja koji se prilagođavaju individualnim potrebama specifičnih korisnika. Kao prvi korak prema personalizovanoj pojednostavljivosti, predlažemo okvir za adaptivnu leksičku pojednostavljivanju i predstavljamo Lexi, slobodan otvoreni izvor i lako prošireni alat za adaptivno, osobno pojednostavljanje teksta. Lexi je lako instaliran kao proširenje pretraživača, omogućavajući lako pristup usluzi svojim korisnicima.', 'ur': 'اکثر پہلے کی تحقیقات متن ساده کرنا کا مطابق ہے کہ جسمانی حل کا تخلیق کرنا ہے، بہت سی موجود موجود لوگوں کی تصدیق کرنا ہے جو ایک گروپ میں ساده کرنا کی ضرورت رکھتے ہیں. ہم argue that this assumption does not hold, and that instead we need to develop simplification systems that adapt to individual needs of specific users. ہم شخصی سادگی کے لئے پہلی قدم کے طور پر ایک فرمود کریں گے اور لکسی کو معلوم کریں گے، ایک منفی اوپن سورس اور آسانی طرح پھیلانے والی، شخصی پیغام سادگی کے لئے ایک فرمود کریں گے۔ لکسی آسان طریقے سے برائوٹر اکسٹنسیٹ کے طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، اس کے کارساز کے لئے آسان دسترسی قابل کرتا ہے.', 'si': 'පාළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයේ පිළිබඳ පරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න අරමුණ තියෙනවා, ගොඩක් සමාන්\u200dය ලක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරක අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ විශ්වාස නොහැකි කියලා, ඒ වගේම අපිට විශේෂ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ගේ අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂ පද්ධතිය ස පෞද්ගලික සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට පළමු පැත්තක් විදිහට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලෙක්සියල් සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ ලෙක්සි සැලසුම් විස්තරයක් විදියට ලේසියෙන් ස්ථාපනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, එයාගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් සේව', 'uz': "Matn oddiylikdagi ko'pchilik o'rganishni o'rganish uchun umumiy usullarni o'rganishga ega bo'ladi. Bu juda homogen maqsadlar bilan bir guruhga oddiylik kerak bo'lgan. Biz murakkab qilamiz, bu g'oyalar hech qanday yo'q, va biz uning uchun foydalanuvchilar kerak bo'lgan oddiy tizimni yaratishimiz kerak. Shaxsiy oddiylikga birinchi qadam deb so'rayapmiz, biz Lexini o'zgartirish uchun yetarli chegara so'rayapmiz va o'zgartirish, shaxsiy matn soddalashlik uchun foydalanuvchi vosita bilan foydalanamiz. Name", 'vi': 'Phần lớn nghiên cứu về sự đơn giản văn bản trước đây nhằm phát triển các giải pháp chung, nhằm vào khán giả đích rất đồng tính với nhu cầu mô phỏng nội bộ. Chúng tôi cho rằng giả định này không đúng, và thay vào đó, chúng ta cần phát triển một hệ thống đơn giản thích nghi với nhu cầu cá nhân của người dùng cụ thể. Một bước đầu tiên tiến tới một sự đơn giản cá nhân, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở để dễ dàng mô phỏng ngôn ngữ văn bản thích ứng và đưa ra Lexi, một công cụ tự do mở và dễ mở rộng để dễ dàng mô phỏng văn bản. Lexi được cài đặt dễ như một phần mở rộng trình duyệt, giúp người dùng dễ dàng truy cập dịch vụ.', 'da': 'De fleste tidligere undersøgelser inden for tekstforenkling har til formål at udvikle generiske løsninger, idet man antager meget homogene målgrupper med konsekvente behov for forenkling inden for gruppen. Vi hævder, at denne antagelse ikke gælder, og at vi i stedet skal udvikle forenklingssystemer, der tilpasser sig specifikke brugeres individuelle behov. Som et første skridt mod personlig forenkling foreslår vi en ramme for adaptiv leksikal forenkling og introducerer Lexi, et gratis open source og let udvideligt værktøj til adaptiv, personlig tekstforenkling. Lexi er nemt installeret som en browserudvidelse, der giver nem adgang til tjenesten for sine brugere.', 'bg': 'Повечето предишни изследвания в областта на опростяването на текста са имали за цел разработването на общи решения, като се предполагат много хомогенни целеви аудитории с последователни нужди от опростяване в рамките на групата. Ние твърдим, че това предположение не важи и че вместо това трябва да разработим системи за опростяване, които да се адаптират към индивидуалните нужди на конкретните потребители. Като първа стъпка към персонализирано опростяване предлагаме рамка за адаптивно лексикално опростяване и въвеждаме безплатен отворен код и лесно разширим инструмент за адаптивно, персонализирано опростяване на текста. Лекси лесно се инсталира като разширение на браузъра, което позволява лесен достъп до услугата за нейните потребители.', 'nl': 'Het meeste eerdere onderzoek naar tekstvereenvoudiging heeft tot doel generieke oplossingen te ontwikkelen, waarbij wordt uitgegaan van een zeer homogene doelgroep met consistente behoefte aan vereenvoudiging binnen de groep. Wij stellen dat deze veronderstelling niet klopt, maar dat we in plaats daarvan vereenvoudigingssystemen moeten ontwikkelen die zich aanpassen aan de individuele behoeften van specifieke gebruikers. Als eerste stap in de richting van gepersonaliseerde vereenvoudiging stellen we een raamwerk voor adaptieve lexicale vereenvoudiging voor en introduceren we Lexi, een gratis open-source en gemakkelijk uitbreidbare tool voor adaptieve, gepersonaliseerde vereenvoudiging van tekst. Lexi is eenvoudig te installeren als een browserextensie, waardoor gebruikers gemakkelijk toegang hebben tot de service.', 'de': 'Die meisten vorangegangenen Forschungen zur Vereinfachung von Texten zielten darauf ab, generische Lösungen zu entwickeln, wobei sehr homogene Zielgruppen mit konsistenten innergruppeninternen Vereinfachungsbedürfnissen vorausgesetzt werden. Wir argumentieren, dass diese Annahme nicht zutrifft, sondern dass wir stattdessen Vereinfachungssysteme entwickeln müssen, die sich an die individuellen Bedürfnisse bestimmter Nutzer anpassen. Als ersten Schritt in Richtung personalisierter Vereinfachung schlagen wir ein Framework für adaptive lexikalische Vereinfachung vor und stellen Lexi vor, ein kostenloses Open-Source und leicht erweiterbares Werkzeug für adaptive, personalisierte Textvereinfachung. Lexi lässt sich einfach als Browser-Erweiterung installieren und ermöglicht den Benutzern einen einfachen Zugriff auf den Dienst.', 'id': 'Sebagian besar penelitian sebelumnya dalam penyimplifikasi teks telah bertujuan untuk mengembangkan solusi generik, mengasumsikan target penonton yang sangat homogen dengan kebutuhan penyimplifikasi intrakelompok konsisten. Kami argumentasi bahwa asumsi ini tidak memegang, dan bahwa sebaliknya kita perlu mengembangkan sistem penyimplifikasi yang beradaptasi dengan kebutuhan individu pengguna spesifik. Sebagai langkah pertama menuju penyimplifikasi pribadi, kami mengusulkan rangkaian untuk penyimplifikasi lexik adaptif dan memperkenalkan Lexi, alat open-source gratis dan mudah diperluaskan untuk penyimplifikasi teks adaptif, pribadi. Lexi mudah dipasang sebagai ekstensi pelayar, memungkinkan akses mudah ke layanan bagi penggunanya.', 'fa': 'بیشتر تحقیقات قبلی در ساده\u200cسازی متن هدف به توسعه راه حل\u200cهای ژنرالی است، با فرض کردن تماشاگران هدف بسیار همجنس با نیازهای ساده\u200cسازی داخل گروه است. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که این فرضیه نگه نمی\u200cدارد، و به جای آن باید سیستم\u200cهای ساده\u200cسازی را توسعه کنیم که به نیازهای شخصی از کاربران خاص adapt می\u200cکنند. به عنوان اولین قدم به سمت ساده\u200cسازی شخصی، ما یک چهارچوب برای ساده\u200cسازی زبان\u200cشناسی adaptive و Lexi را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک ابزار منبع باز و آسان گسترده برای ساده\u200cسازی متن\u200cشناسی و شخصی. لکسی به ساده\u200cای به عنوان استفاده\u200cهای بررسی نصب شده است، که به وسیله\u200cی دسترسی آسان به خدمات برای کاربرانش تواناست.', 'sw': 'Utafiti mkubwa uliopita katika urahisi wa maneno umelenga kuendeleza suluhisho la msingi, kwa kudhani hadhira ya ushoga yenye mahitaji ya urahisi wa kundi la pamoja. Tunahoji kuwa dhana hii haijaishi, na badala yake tunahitaji kuendeleza mfumo wa urahisi unaohusika na mahitaji binafsi ya watumiaji maalumu. Kama hatua ya kwanza kwa ajili ya urahisi binafsi, tunapendekeza mfumo wa urahisi wa lexico na kutambulisha Lexi, zana huru na nyenzo kwa urahisi wa simu za viganjani binafsi. Lexi imewekwa kirahisi kama ukurasa wa browser, na inawezesha upatikanaji rahisi wa huduma kwa watumiaji wake.', 'hr': 'Većina prethodnih istraživanja u pojednostavljivanju teksta ciljala je razviti generične rješenja, s obzirom na veoma homogenetne ciljne publike s konsekvencijom potreba pojednostavljanja unutar grupe. Tvrdimo da ova pretpostavka ne drži i da umjesto toga moramo razviti sustave pojednostavljanja koji se prilagođavaju pojedinim potrebama određenih korisnika. Kao prvi korak prema personaliziranoj pojednostavljivosti, predlažemo okvir prilagođavanja leksičkog pojednostavljanja i predstavljamo Lexi, slobodan otvoreni izvor i lako prošireni alat za adaptivno, osobno pojednostavljanje teksta. Lexi je lako instaliran kao proširenje pretraživača, omogućavajući lako pristup službi svojim korisnicima.', 'sq': 'Shumica e kërkimeve të mëparshme në thjeshtësimin e tekstit ka synuar të zhvillojë zgjidhje gjenerike, duke supozuar audiencë shumë homogjene objektive me nevoja konsistente të thjeshtësimit brenda grupit. Ne argumentojmë se kjo supozim nuk mban dhe se në vend të kësaj ne duhet të zhvillojmë sisteme thjeshtësimi që përshtaten ndaj nevojave individuale të përdoruesve të posaçëm. Si një hap i parë drejt thjeshtimit të personalizuar, ne propozojmë një kuadër për thjeshtimin e përshtatshëm lexik dhe futim Lexi, një mjet falas burimi i hapur dhe lehtë të zgjerueshëm për thjeshtimin e përshtatshëm, të personalizuar të tekstit. Lexi është instaluar lehtë si një shtesë shfletuese, duke lejuar akses të lehtë në shërbim për përdoruesit e tij.', 'af': "Die meeste vorige ondersoek in teks vereenvoudiging het bedoel om generieke oplossing te ontwikkel, met die aangeneem van baie homogeen doel publieke met konsistente intra-groep vereenvoudiging benodig. Ons argumenteer dat hierdie aanvaar nie hou nie, en dat ons in plaas moet eenvoudiging stelsels ontwikkel wat aan die individuele behoefte van spesifieke gebruikers aanpas. As 'n eerste stap teen persoonlike eenvoudiging, voorstel ons 'n raamwerk vir aanpasbare leksiese eenvoudiging en introduseer Lexi, 'n vry open-bron en maklik uitbreidige gereedskap vir aanpasbare, persoonlike teks eenvoudiging. Lexi is maklik geïnstalleer as 'n blaaier uitbreiding, wat maklik toegang tot die diens vir sy gebruikers aktiveer word.", 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ቀላልነት ብዙዎቹ የባሕላዊ መፍትሄቶችን ለማድረግ አግኝቷል፡፡ ይህ ስህተት እንዳይኖር እንከራከራለን፣ በተለያዩ ተጠቃሚዎች የሚያስፈልገውን የፍላጎት ስርዓት ማድረግ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ As a first step towards personalized simplification, we propose a framework for adaptive lexical simplification and introduce Lexi, a free open-source and easily extensible tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification.  ቦታ', 'ko': '대부분의 이전 텍스트 간소화 연구는 일반적인 해결 방안을 개발하는 데 목적을 두고 목표 시청자가 매우 동질적이고 그룹 내 간소화 수요가 일치한다고 가정한다.우리는 이 가설이 성립되지 않는다고 생각한다. 반대로 우리는 특정 사용자의 개인적인 수요에 적응하는 간소화 시스템을 개발해야 한다.개성화된 간소화의 첫걸음으로 우리는 스스로 적응하는 어휘 간소화 구조를 제시했고 Lexi를 소개했다. 무료 소스와 확장이 쉬운 개성화된 텍스트 간소화 도구인 Lexi를 소개했다.Lexi는 브라우저 확장으로 설치하기 쉬우며 사용자가 이 서비스에 쉽게 접근할 수 있다.', 'hy': 'Most previous research in text simplification has aimed to develop generic solutions, assuming very homogeneous target audiences with consistent intra-group simplification needs.  Մենք պնդում ենք, որ այս ենթադրությունը չկա, և փոխարենը մենք պետք է զարգացնենք պարզ համակարգեր, որոնք հարմարվում են կոնկրետ օգտագործողների անհատական կարիքներին: As a first step towards personalized simplification, we propose a framework for adaptive lexical simplification and introduce Lexi, a free open-source and easily extensible tool for adaptive, personalized text simplification.  Լեքսին հեշտությամբ տեղադրվում է որպես բրաուզերային ընդլայնումը, որը թույլ է տալիս օգտագործողների համար հեշտ հասանելիություն ծառայությանը:', 'az': "Mətn basitlaşdırmasının əvvəlki araştırmalarının çoxu generiki çətinlikləri təşkil etmək niyyətində idi, çox homogenik məqsəd auditoriyalarını tamamilə qrup içində basitlaşdırma ihtiyaçlarıyla təşkil edir. Biz bu zənnə sahib olmadığını iddia edirik, və bunun əvəzində müəyyən istifadəçilərin tərzlərinə uyğun tərzlərinə uyğun tərzlərinin basitləşdirmək sistemlərini düzəltmək lazımdır. Şahsiyyətli təmizlənməyə ilk adım olaraq, biz adaptiv leksik təmizlənməsi üçün bir çerçive təklif edirik və Lexi'yi, özgür a çıq kaynağı və adaptiv, kişisel metin təmizlənməsi üçün asanlıqla genişlənmiş vasitəsi təklif edirik. Lexi səhifələrinə asanlıqla faydalandırılır.", 'tr': "Metin esaslaşdyrylygynyň köp öňki barlamasynyň uly çözümlerini bejermek üçin amasyna geldi. Gruplaryň içine ähli ýeňil işlemegi üçin örän eşit maksady publikalary diýip kabul etmek üçin. Biz bu pikir ýok diýip pikir edýäris we onuň ýerine ýeterlik sistemalary beýleki ulanylaryň gerekliklerine uýgunlaýan ýerleşmelidirs. Şahsy bejerilmiş basitleşmelere tarapyndan ilkinji adım bolsa, biz özümizi adaptiv leksiýaly ýeňlemek üçin bir çerçeve teks edip, Lexi'i boş a ç-kaynakly we adaptiv, şahsy metin bejerilmesi üçin aňsatlyk äpişgelendirmek üçin üýtgedik. Leksi ahtarçy ýagdaýy hökmünde ýeňil gurulýar, ullançylaryň häsiýetini ýeňil ýerine ýetirsin.", 'bn': 'টেক্সট সহজেকশনের বেশীরভাগ গবেষণার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে সাধারণ সমাধান উন্নয়নের জন্য, অনুমান করা হচ্ছে যেখানে অন্তর্ভুক্ত ইন্টা- গ্রুপের সহজেক আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে এই ধারণাটি কোন ধরনের নেই, আর এর পরিবর্তে আমাদের সাধারণ সিস্টেম উন্নয়ন করতে হবে যা বিশেষ ব্যবহারকারীদের প্রয়োজনে ব্যক্তিগত সুবিধানের প্রতি প্রথম পদক্ষেপ হিসেবে আমরা লেক্সিক্যাল স্বাধীনতার জন্য একটি ফ্রেম প্রস্তাব করি এবং লেক্সিকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, একটি মুক্ত উন্মুক্ ব্রাউজার এক্সটেনশন হিসেবে লেক্সি সহজে ইনস্টল করা হয়েছে, যার ফলে ব্যবহারকারীদের জন্য সার্ভিসের প্রবেশ সহজে প্রবে', 'bs': 'Većina prethodnih istraživanja u pojednostavljivanju teksta je ciljana razviti generične rješenja, s obzirom na veoma homogenetne ciljne publike sa konsekvencijom potreba pojednostavljanja unutar grupe. Tvrdimo da ova pretpostavka ne drži i da umjesto toga moramo razviti sisteme pojednostavljanja koji se prilagođavaju individualnim potrebama specifičnih korisnika. Kao prvi korak prema personalizovanoj pojednostavljivosti, predlažemo okvir za adaptivnu leksičku pojednostavljivanju i predstavljamo Lexi, slobodan otvoreni izvor i lako prošireni alat za adaptivnu, personalizovanu pojednostavljivanju teksta. Lexi je lako instaliran kao proširenje pretraživača, omogućavajući lako pristup usluzi svojim korisnicima.', 'et': 'Enamik varasemaid teksti lihtsustamise uuringuid on püüdnud välja töötada üldised lahendused, eeldades väga homogeenseid sihtrühmasid, millel on järjepidevad rühmasisesed lihtsustamisvajadused. Väidame, et see eeldus ei kehti ja et selle asemel peame töötama välja lihtsustamissüsteemid, mis kohandavad konkreetsete kasutajate individuaalsete vajadustega. Esimese sammuna isikupärastatud lihtsustamise suunas pakume välja raamistiku adaptiivseks leksikaalseks lihtsustamiseks ja tutvustame Lexit, tasuta avatud lähtekoodiga ja kergesti laiendatavat vahendit kohandatava ja isikupärastatud teksti lihtsustamiseks. Lexi on kergesti paigaldatud brauseri laiendina, mis võimaldab kasutajatel lihtsalt teenusele juurdepääsu.', 'cs': 'Většina předchozích výzkumů v oblasti zjednodušování textů se zaměřila na vývoj obecných řešení za předpokladu velmi homogenního cílového publika s konzistentními potřebami zjednodušení uvnitř skupiny. Argumentujeme, že tento předpoklad neplatí a že místo toho musíme vyvinout zjednodušovací systémy, které se přizpůsobují individuálním potřebám konkrétních uživatelů. Jako první krok k personalizovanému zjednodušení navrhujeme rámec pro adaptivní lexikální zjednodušení a představujeme Lexi, bezplatný open source a snadno rozšiřitelný nástroj pro adaptivní, personalizované zjednodušení textu. Lexi lze snadno nainstalovat jako rozšíření prohlížeče, což umožňuje jeho uživatelům snadný přístup ke službě.', 'ca': "La majoria de recerca anterior en simplificació de textos ha mirat a desenvolupar solucions genèriques, suposant públics objectius molt homogènes amb necessitats consistents de simplificació intragrup. Argumentem que aquesta suposició no hi ha, i que en canvi hem de desenvolupar sistemes de simplificació que s'adapten a les necessitats individuals d'usuaris específics. Com a primer pas cap a la simplificació personalitzada, proposem un marc per a la simplificació lèxica adaptativa i introduim Lexi, una eina lliure de codi obert i fàcilment extensible per a la simplificació adaptativa i personalitzada del text. Lexi es instal·la fàcilment com una extensió del navegador, permetent un accés fàcil al servei per als seus usuaris.", 'fi': 'Useimmissa aikaisemmissa tekstien yksinkertaistamista koskevissa tutkimuksissa on pyritty kehittämään yleisluonteisia ratkaisuja olettaen, että kohderyhmät ovat hyvin homogeenisia ja että ne ovat johdonmukaisia ryhmän sisäisten yksinkertaistamistarpeiden kanssa. Väitämme, että tämä oletus ei pidä paikkaansa, vaan meidän on sen sijaan kehitettävä yksinkertaistamisjärjestelmiä, jotka mukautuvat yksittäisten käyttäjien yksilöllisiin tarpeisiin. Ensimmäisenä askeleena kohti yksilöllistä yksinkertaistamista ehdotamme kehystä mukautuvan sanaston yksinkertaistamiseen ja esittelemme Lexin, ilmaisen avoimen lähdekoodin ja helposti laajennettavan työkalun mukautuvan ja yksilöllisen tekstin yksinkertaistamiseen. Lexi on helposti asennettu selaimen laajennukseksi, mikä mahdollistaa helpon pääsyn palveluun sen käyttäjille.', 'jv': 'Awak dhﺃﺏwﺃﺏ ﺃﺏntuk akeh sing luwih akeh sampeyan teks Awak dhﺃﺏwﺃﺏ ngerasah karo hal-hal iki ora bisa ngono, lan dadi awak dhﺃﺏwﺃﺏ kudu nggawe sistem sing perusahaan seneng nggawe kudu nggawe kudu nggawe barang pengguna sing kudu nggawe Along sampeyan siji garep diolah sampeyan, kita supoyo sistem kanggo ngetalokan leksi sampeyan gak nggawe Lex, akeh open-source gak bebas lan susahe gambar kanggo sampeyan sampeyan kanggo Ketok sampeyan. Lex sampeyan ngesun diolah karo pengguna web, iso dianggawe akses gampang kanggo yen nggunakake', 'sk': 'Večina prejšnjih raziskav na področju poenostavitve besedila je bila namenjena razvoju splošnih rešitev, pri čemer je bila predpostavljena zelo homogena ciljna skupina z doslednimi potrebami po poenostavitvi znotraj skupine. Trdimo, da ta predpostavka ne velja in da moramo namesto tega razviti sisteme za poenostavitev, ki se prilagajajo individualnim potrebam posameznih uporabnikov. Kot prvi korak k osebni poenostavitvi predlagamo okvir za prilagodljivo leksikalno poenostavitev in predstavljamo Lexi, brezplačno odprtokodno in enostavno razširljivo orodje za prilagodljivo in personalizirano poenostavitev besedila. Lexi je enostavno nameščen kot razširitev brskalnika, ki omogoča enostaven dostop do storitve za svoje uporabnike.', 'he': 'רוב המחקרים הקודמים בהפשטה טקסטית התכוונו לפתח פתרונות גנרליים, בהנחה קהל מטרה מאד הומוגני עם צורכים של פשטה תוך קבוצה. אנחנו טוענים שההנחה הזאת לא מחזיקה, ושבמקום זאת אנחנו צריכים לפתח מערכות פשטות שמתאימות לצרכים האישיים של משתמשים מסוימים. כצעד ראשון לכיוון ההפשטה האישית, אנו מציעים מסגרת להפשטה הלקסית המתאימת והציגנו לקסי, כלי פתוח חינם ומרחב בקלות להפשטה טקסטית האישית ומתאימת. לקסי מותקן בקלות בתור מחדשת דופקת, מאפשרת גישה קלה לשירות עבור המשתמשים שלה.', 'ha': "Babu mafi yawan fitina da aka riga a cikin rubutun na rubutu na aimar ya buɗa masu shirya masu kima, idan an yi zato saurãre da saurãre masu saurãre da amfani da mai daidaita na-jama'a. Munã jãyayya cẽwa wannan zato bai tsare shi ba, kuma musamman mu buƙata masu daidaita na'ura da masu amfani da waɗancan da aka ƙayyade. Kama ta zama na farko zuwa sauri na faransa, za mu goyya wata firam wa masu adadi ga sauri na leksi kuma Mu ƙara Lex, wata shirin salo na buɗa ɗɗe-source da sauƙi wa kafin adapti, na canza saurin rubutun na ɗabi'a. An daidaita Leksi da sauƙi kamar wata faɗa ɗar biraws, yana iya amfani da sauƙi zuwa abincin da ke amfani da shi.", 'bo': 'ཡི་གེ་སྔོན་མའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དུ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདོད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྟོགས་པ་འདི་ལ་འཆར་ཡོད་མ་ཚད་དང་། ཚབ་ལུ་ང་ཚོས་སྒེར་གྱི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་བྱེད་དགོ རང་བཟོས་སྒེར་གྱི་simplification་ལ་ཐོག་གི་ཤོག་ལ་དང་པོ་ཞིག Lexi་ནི་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ཆས་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་བཞིན་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་མི་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Identifying Emergent Research Trends by Key Authors and Phrases', 'ar': 'تحديد اتجاهات البحث الناشئة من قبل المؤلفين والعبارات الرئيسية', 'es': 'Identificación de tendencias de investigación emergentes por autores y frases clave', 'fr': 'Identifier les tendances émergentes en matière de recherche par les principaux auteurs et expressions', 'pt': 'Identificando tendências de pesquisa emergentes por autores-chave e frases', 'ja': '主な著者とフレーズによる新たな研究の傾向の特定', 'zh': '主短语识新兴', 'ru': 'Выявление новых тенденций исследований по ключевым авторам и фразам', 'hi': 'प्रमुख लेखकों और वाक्यांशों द्वारा आकस्मिक अनुसंधान रुझानों की पहचान करना', 'ga': 'Treochtaí Taighde Éigeandála a Aithint ag Údair agus Príomhfhrásaí', 'ka': 'კლავის ავტორების და ფრაზების განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Εντοπισμός αναδυόμενων ερευνητικών τάσεων από βασικούς συγγραφείς και φράσεις', 'hu': 'Az új kutatási trendek azonosítása kulcsfontosságú szerzők és kifejezések szerint', 'lt': 'Naujų mokslinių tyrimų tendencijų nustatymas pagrindiniams autoriams ir frazėms', 'mk': 'Identifying Emergent Research Trends by Key Authors and Phrases', 'it': 'Identificare le tendenze emergenti della ricerca per autori e frasi chiave', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tax-xejriet emerġenti tar-riċerka skont l-awturi u l-frażijiet ewlenin', 'kk': 'Кілті авторлар мен фразтар арқылы жерден зерттеу тенденцияларын анықтау', 'mn': 'Олон зохиолчид болон утаснуудын гайхалтай судалгааны тенденс', 'ml': 'കീ രചയിതാക്കനും വാക്കുകളുമായി എക്സെന്\u200dറ് റിസ്ക്രച്ച് ട്രീഡുകള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja nowych trendów badawczych przez kluczowych autorów i fraz', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti Kebenaran Penelitian Kecemasan Oleh Penulis dan Frasa Kunci', 'si': 'මුළු ලේඛකයෝ සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෝ වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'no': 'Identifikasjon av utviklare forskningstendenser av nøkkelforfattar og frøk', 'sv': 'Identifiera akuta forskningstrender genom nyckelförfattare och fraser', 'ro': 'Identificarea tendinţelor emergente de cercetare de către autorii şi frazele cheie', 'sr': 'Identifikacija trendova hitnih istraživanja od strane ključnih autora i fraza', 'ta': 'விசை ஆசிரியர்கள் மற்றும் சொற்றொடர்களால் பொதுவான ஆராய்ச்சி மரங்களை அடையாளம்', 'so': 'Identification Trends of Heeganka', 'ur': 'Key Authors and Phrases', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát hiện hào quang nghiên cứu mới của các tác giả và triết học', 'nl': 'Identificeren van opkomende onderzoekstrends door belangrijke auteurs en zinnen', 'bg': 'Идентифициране на нововъзникващи тенденции в научните изследвания от ключови автори и фрази', 'da': 'Identificering af nye forskningstendenser ved hjælp af nøgleforfattere og sætninger', 'hr': 'Identifikacija trendova hitnih istraživanja ključnih autora i izraza', 'ko': '관건적인 저자와 단어를 통해 긴급 연구 추세를 식별하다', 'id': 'Identifikasi Trends Emergent Research oleh Penulis dan Frasa Kunci', 'de': 'Identifizierung von Emergent Research Trends durch Schlüsselautoren und Phrasen', 'fa': 'شناسایی تدریج تحقیقات فوری توسط نویسندگان کلید و عبارت', 'af': 'Identifikasie van Emergent Research Trends deur Sleutel Outeurs en Frase', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i tendencave të kërkimit të nxehtë nga autorët dhe frazat kyçe', 'sw': 'Kutambua Mtuo wa Utafiti wa Dharura na Waandishi na Lugha', 'tr': 'Anahtar awtory we frazleri tarapyndan janlaşdyrma täzeliklerini tanyşdyrylýar', 'hy': 'Հիմնական հեղինակների և արտահայտությունների կողմից հայտնաբերելը', 'am': 'የአስቸኳይ ምርመራ Trends by Key Authors and Phrases', 'az': 'Anahtar yazńĪcńĪlar v…ô Frazlar tarafńĪndan acil araŇütńĪrma t…ôrzl…ôrini t…ôsdiql…ôyici', 'bn': 'কী লেখক এবং ফ্রেস', 'bs': 'Identificiranje trendova hitnih istraživanja ključnih autora i fraza', 'ca': 'Identificar tendències emergents de recerca per autors i frases clau', 'fi': 'Uusien tutkimussuuntausten tunnistaminen avaintekijöiden ja lauseiden mukaan', 'cs': 'Identifikace vznikajících trendů výzkumu podle klíčových autorů a frází', 'et': 'Tekkivate teadussuundumuste kindlakstegemine peamiste autorite ja väljendite järgi', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'ha': 'Ana gane Trenukan Research na Nazarta', 'sk': 'Opredelitev nastajajočih raziskovalnih trendov po ključnih avtorjih in frazah', 'bo': 'ངོ་བོའི་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་དང་བརྗོད་མིའི་ནང་དུ་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་འདུག', 'he': 'מזהה טנדרציות מחקר חירום על ידי סופרים ופרזים מפתחים'}
{'en': 'Identifying emergent research trends is a key issue for both primary researchers as well as secondary research managers. Such processes can uncover the historical development of an area, and yield insight on developing topics. We propose an embedded trend detection framework for this task which incorporates our bijunctive hypothesis that important phrases are written by important authors within a field and vice versa. By ranking both author and phrase information in a multigraph, our method jointly determines key phrases and authoritative authors. We represent this intermediate output as phrasal embeddings, and feed this to a recurrent neural network (RNN) to compute trend scores that identify research trends. Over two large datasets of scientific articles, we demonstrate that our approach successfully detects past trends from the field, outperforming baselines based solely on text centrality or citation.', 'ar': 'تحديد اتجاهات البحث الناشئة هو قضية رئيسية لكل من الباحثين الأساسيين وكذلك مديري البحوث الثانوية. يمكن لمثل هذه العمليات الكشف عن التطور التاريخي لمنطقة ما ، وتقديم نظرة ثاقبة حول تطوير الموضوعات. نقترح إطارًا مضمنًا لاكتشاف الاتجاه لهذه المهمة والذي يتضمن فرضيتنا الثنائية القائلة بأن جمل مهمة كتبها مؤلفون مهمون في مجال ما والعكس صحيح. من خلال ترتيب معلومات المؤلف والعبارة في مخطط متعدد ، تحدد طريقتنا بشكل مشترك العبارات الرئيسية والمؤلفين الموثوقين. نحن نمثل هذا الناتج الوسيط كزفافات شبه حقيقية ، ونقوم بتغذية هذا إلى شبكة عصبية متكررة (RNN) لحساب درجات الاتجاه التي تحدد اتجاهات البحث. أكثر من مجموعتي بيانات كبيرتين من المقالات العلمية ، نوضح أن نهجنا يكتشف بنجاح الاتجاهات السابقة من المجال ، ويتفوق في الأداء على خطوط الأساس التي تعتمد فقط على مركزية النص أو الاقتباس.', 'es': 'La identificación de las tendencias de investigación emergentes es una cuestión clave tanto para los investigadores primarios como para los directores de investigación secundarios. Dichos procesos pueden descubrir el desarrollo histórico de un área y proporcionar información sobre los temas en desarrollo. Proponemos un marco de detección de tendencias integrado para esta tarea que incorpora nuestra hipótesis bijuntiva de que las frases importantes son escritas por autores importantes dentro de un campo y viceversa. Al clasificar la información de autor y frase en un multigrafo, nuestro método determina conjuntamente las frases clave y los autores autorizados. Representamos este resultado intermedio como incrustaciones de frases y lo alimentamos a una red neuronal recurrente (RNN) para calcular las puntuaciones de tendencias que identifican las tendencias de la investigación. A través de dos grandes conjuntos de datos de artículos científicos, demostramos que nuestro enfoque detecta con éxito tendencias pasadas en el campo, superando las líneas de base basadas únicamente en la centralidad del texto o la cita.', 'pt': 'Identificar tendências de pesquisa emergentes é uma questão fundamental tanto para pesquisadores primários quanto para gerentes de pesquisa secundários. Esses processos podem revelar o desenvolvimento histórico de uma área e fornecer insights sobre tópicos em desenvolvimento. Propomos uma estrutura de detecção de tendências incorporada para esta tarefa que incorpora nossa hipótese bijuntiva de que frases importantes são escritas por autores importantes dentro de um campo e vice-versa. Ao classificar as informações do autor e da frase em um multigrafo, nosso método determina em conjunto as frases-chave e os autores autorizados. Representamos essa saída intermediária como embeddings frasais e alimentamos isso para uma rede neural recorrente (RNN) para calcular pontuações de tendências que identificam tendências de pesquisa. Em dois grandes conjuntos de dados de artigos científicos, demonstramos que nossa abordagem detecta com sucesso tendências passadas do campo, superando as linhas de base baseadas apenas na centralidade do texto ou na citação.', 'fr': "L'identification des tendances émergentes en matière de recherche est une question clé tant pour les chercheurs principaux que pour les directeurs de recherche secondaires. De tels processus peuvent révéler le développement historique d'une région et fournir des informations sur des sujets en développement. Nous proposons un cadre intégré de détection des tendances pour cette tâche qui intègre notre hypothèse bijonctive selon laquelle les phrases importantes sont écrites par des auteurs importants dans un domaine et vice versa. En classant les informations sur l'auteur et la phrase dans un multigraphe, notre méthode détermine conjointement les phrases clés et les auteurs faisant autorité. Nous représentons cette sortie intermédiaire sous forme d'intégrations phrasales, et nous l'envoyons à un réseau de neurones récurrents (RNN) pour calculer les scores de tendance qui identifient les tendances de recherche. À travers deux grands ensembles de données d'articles scientifiques, nous démontrons que notre approche détecte avec succès les tendances passées sur le terrain, surpassant les niveaux de référence basés uniquement sur la centralité du texte ou la citation.", 'ja': '新たな研究の傾向を特定することは、一次研究者と二次研究マネージャーの両方にとって重要な問題です。このようなプロセスは、領域の歴史的発展を明らかにし、発展するトピックに関する洞察を得ることができます。私たちは、重要なフレーズはフィールド内の重要な著者によって書かれ、その逆もまた同様であるという私たちの二項仮説を組み込んだ、このタスクの埋め込まれた傾向検出フレームワークを提案します。著者情報とフレーズ情報の両方をマルチグラフでランク付けすることで、主要なフレーズと権威ある著者を共同で決定します。私たちは、この中間出力をフレーズ埋め込みとして表し、これを再発ニューラルネットワーク（ RNN ）にフィードして、研究の傾向を特定するトレンドスコアを計算します。科学記事の2つの大きなデータセットを通じて、私たちのアプローチは、テキストの中心性または引用のみに基づいてベースラインを上回る、現場からの過去の傾向をうまく検出することを実証しています。', 'zh': '知新兴者,治人之关键问题也。 可以发明一域之史,而见于大端。 臣等为此举一嵌入式以检框架,当框架合双连命设,即短语由一域之重作者,反之亦然也。 列名重图,短语信息定机短语。 出其中以为短语嵌,而给递归神经网络(RNN)以计别趋势之数。 于两大科学文章数集,证吾法成功从该领检到旧势,只基于文本中心性或引用性就优于基线。', 'hi': 'आकस्मिक अनुसंधान प्रवृत्तियों की पहचान करना प्राथमिक शोधकर्ताओं के साथ-साथ माध्यमिक अनुसंधान प्रबंधकों दोनों के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण मुद्दा है। इस तरह की प्रक्रियाएं किसी क्षेत्र के ऐतिहासिक विकास को उजागर कर सकती हैं, और विकासशील विषयों पर अंतर्दृष्टि उत्पन्न कर सकती हैं। हम इस कार्य के लिए एक एम्बेडेड ट्रेंड डिटेक्शन फ्रेमवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसमें हमारी द्विसंकल्पना परिकल्पना शामिल है कि महत्वपूर्ण वाक्यांश एक क्षेत्र के भीतर महत्वपूर्ण लेखकों द्वारा लिखे गए हैं और इसके विपरीत। एक मल्टीग्राफ में लेखक और वाक्यांश जानकारी दोनों को रैंकिंग करके, हमारी विधि संयुक्त रूप से प्रमुख वाक्यांशों और आधिकारिक लेखकों को निर्धारित करती है। हम इस मध्यवर्ती आउटपुट को phrasal embeddings के रूप में प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं, और इसे एक आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (RNN) को खिलाते हैं ताकि अनुसंधान प्रवृत्तियों की पहचान करने वाले रुझान स्कोर की गणना की जा सके। वैज्ञानिक लेखों के दो बड़े डेटासेट पर, हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण सफलतापूर्वक क्षेत्र से पिछले रुझानों का पता लगाता है, पूरी तरह से पाठ केंद्रीयता या उद्धरण के आधार पर बेसलाइन को पछाड़ता है।', 'ru': 'Выявление новых тенденций исследований является ключевым вопросом как для первичных исследователей, так и для руководителей вторичных исследований. Такие процессы могут выявить историческое развитие района и дать представление о развитии тем. Мы предлагаем встроенную структуру обнаружения тенденций для этой задачи, которая включает в себя нашу гипотезу о том, что важные фразы пишутся важными авторами в пределах поля и наоборот. Ранжируя информацию об авторе и фразе в мультиграфе, наш метод совместно определяет ключевые фразы и авторитетных авторов. Мы представляем этот промежуточный результат в виде фразовых вложений и подаем его в рекуррентную нейронную сеть (RNN) для вычисления баллов тренда, которые идентифицируют исследовательские тенденции. В двух больших наборах научных статей мы демонстрируем, что наш подход успешно обнаруживает прошлые тенденции на местах, превосходя базовые линии, основанные исключительно на центральной роли текста или цитировании.', 'ga': 'Príomhcheist do phríomhthaighdeoirí chomh maith le bainisteoirí taighde tánaisteacha is ea treochtaí taighde atá ag teacht chun cinn a aithint. Is féidir le próisis dá leithéid forbairt stairiúil ceantair a nochtadh, agus léargas a thabhairt ar thopaicí atá ag forbairt. Molaimid creat braite treochtaí leabaithe don tasc seo a ionchorpraíonn ár hipitéis dhéthaobhach go scríobhann údair tábhachtacha frásaí tábhachtacha laistigh de réimse agus vice versa. Trí fhaisnéis údair agus frása araon a rangú in ilghraf, comhchinntíonn ár modh frásaí tábhachtacha agus údair údarásacha. Léirímid an t-aschur idirmheánach seo mar leabú frásaí, agus cuirimid é seo le líonra néarach athfhillteach (RNN) chun scóir treochtaí a ríomh a shainaithníonn treochtaí taighde. Thar dhá thacar sonraí mór d’ailt eolaíocha, léirímid go n-aimsíonn ár gcur chuige treochtaí ón am atá thart ón am a chuaigh thart, ag déanamh níos fearr ná na bunlínte atá bunaithe ar lárnacht an téacs amháin nó ar lua.', 'hu': 'A felmerülő kutatási trendek azonosítása kulcsfontosságú kérdés mind az elsődleges kutatók, mind a másodlagos kutatásvezetők számára. Az ilyen folyamatok feltárhatják egy terület történelmi fejlődését, és betekintést nyerhetnek a fejlődő témákba. Ehhez a feladathoz egy beágyazott trendfelismerési keretrendszert javasolunk, amely magában foglalja a kéjunktív hipotézisünket, miszerint fontos mondatokat írnak fontos szerzők egy adott területen belül, és fordítva. A szerzői és kifejezési információk multigráfusban történő rangsorolásával módszerünk közösen határozza meg a kulcsfontosságú kifejezéseket és a hiteles szerzőket. Ezt a közbenső kimenetet frázis beágyazásként reprezentáljuk, és ezt egy visszatérő neurális hálózatba (RNN) juttatjuk, hogy kiszámítsuk a kutatási trendeket azonosító trendpontszámokat. Két nagyméretű tudományos cikkből álló adatkészleten keresztül bizonyítjuk, hogy megközelítésünk sikeresen felismeri a múltbeli trendeket a területről, felülmúlva a kizárólag a szövegközpontosság vagy az idézés alapján.', 'ka': 'განსაზღვრება შესაძლებელი სწავლობა ტენდენციები არის მნიშვნელოვანი პირიმენტური სწავლობისთვის და მეორე სწავლობა მენეჯერისთვის. ასეთი პროცესები შეუძლიათ აღმოჩენოთ არსებობის ისტორიური განვითარება და გავიღებთ თემების განვითარებაზე. ჩვენ გვეძლევა, რომ ამ დავალებისთვის ჩვენი ბიუნქტიური ჰიპოტეზის კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც ჩვენი ბიუნქტიური ჰიპოტეზაცია, რომ მნიშვნელოვანი ფრაზები მნიშვნელოვანი ავ მულტიგრაფიკაში ავტორის და ფრაზის ინფორმაციის რენექტირებით ჩვენი მეტი ერთადერთად განსაზღვრებს კლავის ფრაზები და ავტორიტიური ავტორიები. ჩვენ ეს საშუალო გამოყენებას როგორც ფრაზალური გამოყენება, და ამას რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელში (RNN) გადაწყენებთ ტენდენური მონაცემების გამოყენება, რომელიც განსაზღვრ მეცნიერო ანტიკულების ორი დიდი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაზე, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ ჩვენი პროგორმაცია წარმატებით განაკვირდება პირველ ტენდენციების გარეშე, გარეშე მხოლო', 'el': 'Ο εντοπισμός αναδυόμενων ερευνητικών τάσεων αποτελεί βασικό ζήτημα τόσο για τους πρωτοπόρους ερευνητές όσο και για τους διευθυντές δευτεροβάθμιας έρευνας. Τέτοιες διαδικασίες μπορούν να αποκαλύψουν την ιστορική ανάπτυξη μιας περιοχής και να δώσουν πληροφορίες για θέματα που αναπτύσσονται. Προτείνουμε ένα ενσωματωμένο πλαίσιο ανίχνευσης τάσεων για αυτό το έργο, το οποίο ενσωματώνει τη διjunctive υπόθεσή μας ότι σημαντικές φράσεις γράφονται από σημαντικούς συγγραφείς σε ένα πεδίο και αντίστροφα. Με την κατάταξη τόσο των πληροφοριών του συγγραφέα όσο και των φράσεων σε ένα πολύγραφο, η μέθοδος μας καθορίζει από κοινού τις βασικές φράσεις και τους έγκυρους συγγραφείς. Αντιπροσωπεύουμε αυτό το ενδιάμεσο αποτέλεσμα ως φράσεις ενσωμάτωσης, και το τροφοδοτούμε σε ένα επαναλαμβανόμενο νευρωνικό δίκτυο (RNN) για να υπολογίσουμε τις βαθμολογίες τάσης που προσδιορίζουν τις ερευνητικές τάσεις. Μέσα από δύο μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων επιστημονικών άρθρων, καταδεικνύουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας ανιχνεύει επιτυχώς τις τάσεις του παρελθόντος, ξεπερνώντας τις γραμμές βάσης που βασίζονται αποκλειστικά σε κεντρικό κείμενο ή παραπομπή.', 'it': "Identificare le tendenze emergenti della ricerca è una questione chiave sia per i ricercatori primari che per i responsabili della ricerca secondaria. Tali processi possono scoprire lo sviluppo storico di un'area e fornire informazioni sugli argomenti in via di sviluppo. Proponiamo un framework integrato di rilevamento delle tendenze per questo compito che incorpora la nostra ipotesi Bijunctive secondo cui frasi importanti sono scritte da autori importanti all'interno di un campo e viceversa. Classificando le informazioni sull'autore e sulle frasi in un multigrafo, il nostro metodo determina congiuntamente le frasi chiave e gli autori autorevoli. Rappresentiamo questo output intermedio come embedding frasali, e lo portiamo a una rete neurale ricorrente (RNN) per calcolare i punteggi di tendenza che identificano le tendenze della ricerca. Oltre due grandi set di dati di articoli scientifici, dimostriamo che il nostro approccio rileva con successo le tendenze passate dal campo, superando le linee di base basate esclusivamente sulla centralità del testo o sulla citazione.", 'kk': 'Көрінетін зерттеулер тенденцияларын анықтау - негізгі зерттеулердің және екінші зерттеулер менеджерінің негізгі мәселесі. Бұл процестер тарихый аумақтың жасауын түсіндіре алады және тақырыптарды жасау үшін түсіндіре алады. Біз бұл тапсырманың ендірілген тенденциялық анықтау бағдарламасын ұсынамыз. Бұл тапсырманың белсенді гипотезасын қосып, маңызды мәліметті авторлар өрісте жазылады. Көпграфикада автор мен сөздер мәліметін реттеу арқылы, біздің әдіміз кілттерді сөздер мен авторитивті авторларды біріктіреді. Біз бұл орташа шығысын фразалар ендіру ретінде көрсетеді, және бұны зерттеу тенденцияларын анықтайтын тенденцияларды есептеу үшін қайталанатын невралдық желіне (RNN) бередік. Екі үлкен деректер мақалаларының арқылы біз өткен тенденцияларды сәтті таңдап, тек мәтін орталығына немесе цитикалығына негізделген негізгі жолдарды таңдап көрдік.', 'lt': 'Pagrindinis pagrindinių mokslininkų ir antrinių mokslinių tyrimų vadovų klausimas – nustatyti naujas mokslinių tyrimų tendencijas. Tokie procesai gali atskleisti istorinę teritorijos plėtrą ir suteikti supratimą apie vystomąsias temas. Siūlome integruotą šios užduoties tendencijų nustatymo sistemą, kurioje įtraukiama mūsų dvifunkcinė hipotezė, kad svarbias frazes rašo svarbūs autoriai lauke ir atvirkščiai. Klasifikuodami tiek autorių, tiek frazės informaciją daugiografijoje, mūsų metodas kartu nustato pagrindines frazes ir autorius. Mes atstovaujame šiai tarpinei produkcijai kaip frazės įdėjimams ir perduodame ją pasikartojančiam nervų tinklui (RNN), kad apskaičiuotume tendencijų rezultatus, kurie nustato mokslinių tyrimų tendencijas. Daugiau nei du dideli mokslinių straipsnių duomenų rinkiniai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris sėkmingai atskleidžia praeities tendencijas iš šios srities, viršijančias bazines linijas, pagrįstas tik teksto centrumu ar citacija.', 'mk': 'Identifying emergent research trends is a key issue for both primary researchers as well as secondary research managers.  Таквите процеси можат да го откријат историскиот развој на една област и да дадат сфаќање за развојот на теми. Предложуваме вклучена рамка за детекција на трендови за оваа задача која ја вклучува нашата бионктивна хипотеза дека важните фрази се напишани од важни автори во полето и обратно. Со рангирање на информациите за авторот и фразата во мултиграф, нашиот метод заедно ги одредува клучните фрази и авторитативните автори. Ние го претставуваме овој меѓувремен излез како фразални вложувања, и го даваме ова на рецидентна нервна мрежа (РНН) за да ги пресметаме резултатите на трендот кои ги идентификуваат тенденциите на истражувањето. Повеќе од две големи податоци на научни статии, ние демонстрираме дека нашиот пристап успешно ги детектира минатите трендови од полето, надминувајќи ги базите врз основа основани само на текст централитет или цитата.', 'mt': 'L-identifikazzjoni tax-xejriet emerġenti tar-riċerka hija kwistjoni ewlenija kemm għar-riċerkaturi primarji kif ukoll għall-maniġers tar-riċerka sekondarja. Such processes can uncover the historical development of an area, and yield insight on developing topics.  Aħna nipproponu qafas inkorporat għall-identifikazzjoni tax-xejriet għal dan il-kompitu li jinkorpora l-ipoteżi bijunkttiva tagħna li frażijiet importanti huma miktuba minn awturi importanti f’qasam u viċi versa. Billi nikklassifikaw kemm l-awtur kif ukoll l-informazzjoni tal-frażi f’multigrafika, il-metodu tagħna jiddetermina b’mod konġunt il-frażijiet ewlenin u l-awturi awtoritattivi. Aħna nirrappreżentaw din il-produzzjoni intermedja bħala inkorporazzjonijiet frażili, u nagħtu dan lil netwerk newrali rikorrenti (RNN) biex nikkalkulaw il-punteġġi tax-xejriet li jidentifikaw ix-xejriet tar-riċerka. Aktar minn żewġ settijiet kbar ta’ dejta ta’ artikoli xjentifiċi, aħna nuru li l-approċċ tagħna jidentifika b’suċċess ix-xejriet tal-passat mill-qasam, li jaqbżu l-linji bażi bbażati biss fuq iċ-ċentralità tat-test jew iċ-ċitazzjoni.', 'ms': 'Mengenalpasti trends penelitian yang muncul adalah isu utama bagi peneliti utama dan pengurus penelitian sekunder. Proses seperti ini boleh mengungkap pembangunan sejarah kawasan, dan memberikan pandangan mengenai pembangunan topik. Kami mengusulkan kerangka pengesan trends terbenam untuk tugas ini yang menggabungkan hipotesis bijunctif kita bahawa frasa penting ditulis oleh penulis penting dalam medan dan sebaliknya. Dengan menandakan kedua-dua maklumat penulis dan frasa dalam multigraf, kaedah kami secara bersama menentukan frasa kunci dan penulis yang berkuasa. We represent this intermediate output as phrasal embeddings, and feed this to a recurrent neural network (RNN) to compute trend scores that identify research trends.  Lebih dari dua set data besar artikel saintifik, kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kami berjaya mengesan trends masa lalu dari medan, melampaui garis dasar berdasarkan hanya pusat teks atau citasi.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള പരിശോധന നടപടികളെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്കും സെക്കന്ററില്\u200d പഠിക് ഇത്തരം പ്രക്രിയകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു പ്രദേശത്തിന്\u200dറെ ചരിത്രത്തിലെ വികസിപ്പിനെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയും, വിവരങ്ങളുടെ  We propose an embedded trend detection framework for this task which incorporates our bijunctive hypothesis that important phrases are written by important authors within a field and vice versa.  ഒരു അധികാരത്തിലുള്ള രചയിതാവും വാക്കിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങളും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ രീതി നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ഇടയിലുള്ള വെളിപ്പാട്ടിനെ വാക്കില്\u200d അകത്തേക്ക് പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ വീണ്ടും വരുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ രണ്ടു വലിയ ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞാനത്തിലെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമീതെ നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d വിജയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, ഭൂമിയില്\u200d നിന്ന', 'no': 'Dette er eit nøkkelproblem for både primærforskningar og sekundære forskningshandsamarar. Desse prosessane kan opna historisk utvikling av eit område, og gje innsikt på utvikling av tema. Vi foreslår eit innebygd trendsoppdagingsrammeverk for denne oppgåva som inkluderer våre både aktive hipotese at viktige frasar er skriven av viktige utviklarar i eit felt og motsatt. Ved å rankera både utviklarinformasjon og frasar i eit multigraf, måten vårt kopla bestemmer nøkkelfrasar og autoritativ utviklare. Vi representerer denne mellombels utdata som frasalinnbygging, og fører dette til eit rekurserande neuralnettverk (RNN) for å rekna ut trendspoeng som identifiserer forskningstrender. Over to store datasett av vitenskapelige artiklar viser vi at tilnærminga vårt er fullført oppdaga siste trender frå feltet, og utfører baselinjer basert berre på tekstsentralitet eller siteringa.', 'ro': 'Identificarea tendințelor emergente de cercetare este o problemă esențială atât pentru cercetătorii primari, cât și pentru managerii de cercetare secundară. Astfel de procese pot descoperi dezvoltarea istorică a unei zone și pot oferi o perspectivă asupra subiectelor de dezvoltare. Propunem un cadru integrat de detectare a tendințelor pentru această sarcină care încorporează ipoteza noastră bijunctivă conform căreia frazele importante sunt scrise de autori importanți într-un domeniu și invers. Prin clasificarea atât a informațiilor despre autor cât și expresie într-un multigraf, metoda noastră determină împreună frazele cheie și autorii autoritari. Reprezentăm această ieșire intermediară ca încorporări frazale și alimentăm acest lucru unei rețele neurale recurente (RNN) pentru a calcula scorurile de tendințe care identifică tendințele de cercetare. Peste două seturi mari de date de articole științifice, demonstrăm că abordarea noastră detectează cu succes tendințele trecute din domeniu, depășind liniile de bază bazate exclusiv pe centralitatea textului sau citarea.', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja pojawiających się trendów badawczych jest kluczową kwestią zarówno dla naukowców pierwotnych, jak i kierowników badań wtórnych. Takie procesy mogą odkryć historyczny rozwój obszaru i dać wgląd na rozwijające się tematy. Proponujemy wbudowane ramy detekcji trendów dla tego zadania, które uwzględniają naszą hipotezę dwujunktywną, że ważne zwroty są pisane przez ważnych autorów w danej dziedzinie i odwrotnie. Poprzez ranking zarówno informacji o autorze, jak i frazach w multigrafie, nasza metoda wspólnie określa kluczowe frazy i autorytatywnych autorów. Przedstawiamy to wyjście pośrednie jako osadzenia frazałowe i przekazujemy je do powtarzającej się sieci neuronowej (RNN) w celu obliczenia wyników trendów identyfikujących trendy badawcze. Na podstawie dwóch dużych zbiorów danych artykułów naukowych pokazujemy, że nasze podejście z powodzeniem wykrywa przeszłe trendy z dziedziny, przewyższając linie bazowe oparte wyłącznie na centralności tekstu lub cytowaniu.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණ කරුණාකරුවන්ගේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ව ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවට පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් ඉතිහාසික විකාශය හොයාගන්න, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරදේශ විකාශය අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා මේ වැඩේ සඳහා සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාවක් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා අපේ බියාන්ක්\u200dරිය හොයාගන්න ප ලේඛකය සහ ප්\u200dරකාශ තොරතුරු ගොඩක් ග්\u200dරාෆික්ෂාවක් ඇතුලත් පරීක්ෂණයෙන්, අපේ විධානය සම්බන්ධ වාක්ෂ අපි මේක ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් විදියට, ඒ වගේම මේක ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් නිර විද්\u200dයාඥික ප්\u200dරතිකාරයේ ලොකු දත්ත සටහන් දෙකක් වඩා අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සමහරවිට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් අ', 'mn': 'Шинэ шинэ судалгааны тенденцийг тодорхойлох нь анхны судлаачид болон хоёр дахь судалгааны удирдагчийн чухал асуудал юм. Ийм үйл явц нь түүхийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийг нээж, хөгжлийн сэдвүүдийг ойлгох боломжтой. Бид энэ үйл ажилд хамгийн чухал өгүүлбэрүүдийг тодорхой зохиолчдын бичиж буй зүйлсийг нэгтгэх боломжтой тенденцийг олж мэдэх хэлбэрийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Бидний арга нь олон график дээр зохиолч болон өгүүлбэрийн мэдээлэл хоёуланг нь хамтдаа түлхүүр өгүүлбэрийг, зөвлөх зохиолчдыг тодорхойлдог. Бид энэ дундаж бүтээгдэхүүнийг фразал хэмжээнд үзүүлж, судалгааны тенденцийг тодорхойлж буй тенденцийг тооцоолох гэсэн сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээнд холбоотой. Шинжлэх ухааны өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээс хоёр том өгөгдлийн баримтуудын хувьд бидний арга баримтууд салбарын өмнөх тенденцийг амжилттай олж, текст төв эсвэл тайлбар дээр үндсэн суурь шулуунуудыг илүү олох', 'sv': 'Att identifiera framväxande forskningstrender är en nyckelfråga för både primärforskare och sekundärforskare. Sådana processer kan avslöja den historiska utvecklingen av ett område och ge insikt i utvecklingsämnen. Vi föreslår ett inbäddat trenddetekteringsramverk för denna uppgift som innefattar vår tvåjunktiva hypotes att viktiga fraser skrivs av viktiga författare inom ett fält och vice versa. Genom att rangordna både författar- och frasinformation i en multigraf bestämmer vår metod gemensamt nyckelfraser och auktoritativa författare. Vi representerar detta mellanliggande resultat som frasinbäddningar, och matar detta till ett återkommande neuralt nätverk (RNN) för att beräkna trendpoäng som identifierar forskningstrender. Över två stora datauppsättningar vetenskapliga artiklar visar vi att vårt tillvägagångssätt framgångsrikt upptäcker tidigare trender från fältet och överträffar baselines enbart baserat på textcentralitet eller citering.', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga qalabka baaritaanka degdega ah waa arrin muhiim ah ee labada baaritaanka aasaasiga ah iyo maamulaha waxbarashada dugsiga ah. Such processes can uncover the historical development of an area, and yield insight on developing topics.  Waxaannu horumarinaynaa shuqulkaas oo ku qoran fikradeena a an la dooranayn, in erayada muhiimka ah ay qoraan qoraal muhiim ah oo ku jirta duurka iyo wax ka soo jeeda. Macluumaad ku saabsan qoraal iyo af ku qoran oo aad u baahan tahay, qaabkeenu wuxuu si wadajir ah u go’aaminayaa erayo furan iyo qoraal saraakiisha ah. Waxaynu u muujinaynaa midowga dhexe sida xaraf baabuur ah, waxaynu u daajinaynaa shabakadda neurada ee soo socda (RNN) si aan u xisaabinno kooxaha kooxaha baaritaanka oo aqoonsan waddooyinka baaritaanka. In ka badan laba qoraal oo waaweyn oo sayniska ah, waxaynu muujinnaa in dhaqdhaqaaqyadeenu ay liibaani tahay in uu soo ogaado waddooyinka hore ee duurka, oo aan soo bandhigayno saldhigyada aasaasiga ah oo kaliya ku saleysan xarunta qoraalka.', 'ur': 'پیدا ہونے والی تحقیقات ترینڈز کی شناسایی دونوں اولین تحقیقات کرنے والوں کے لئے اور دوسری تحقیقات مدیرانوں کے لئے ایک کلی مسئلہ ہے. اس طرح کی پروسس ایک منطقه کی تاریخی توسعہ کو اچانک سکتی ہے اور توسعہ کے متعلق بصیرت کو اچانک سکتی ہے۔ ہم اس کام کے لئے ایک پیدا کئے ہوئے ٹرنڈ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ فورمک کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ہماری غیرفعالی فرضی میں شامل کرتا ہے کہ ایک کھیتی میں اہم لکھنے والے لکھنے والے لکھے جاتے ہیں۔ ہمارا طریقہ ملتی گراف میں لکھنے والے اور فریز معلومات کو رانڈ کرنا کے ذریعہ، ہماری طریقہ ایک ساتھ کلید فریز اور اجازت لینے والے لکھنے والے مقرر کرتا ہے. ہم اسے فریزال ایمبڈینگ کے طور پر نمایش دیتے ہیں اور اسے ایک دوبارہ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک (RNN) پر کھلاتے ہیں تارینڈ اسکور کا شمار کرنا جو تحقیق ترینڈ کو پہچانتے ہیں۔ دو بڑے ڈاٹ سٹ کے سائنس لکھوں کے ذریعہ، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہماری طریقہ مصنوعی سے پہلے ترینڈوں کو پہچان رہی ہے، بنسٹ لینوں کو صرف متن مرکز یا سیٹی پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں.', 'sr': 'Identifikacija trendova istraživanja je ključni problem za oba primarnog istraživača, kao i sekundarnog menadžera istraživanja. Takvi procesi mogu otkriti istorijski razvoj područja i pružiti uvid o razvoju tema. Predlažemo ugrađeni okvir otkrivanja trendova za ovaj zadatak koji uključuje našu biaktivnu hipotezu da su važne rečenice napisane važnim autorima unutar polja i suprotno. Određivanjem autora i fraze informacija u multigrafu, naša metoda zajedno određuje ključne rečenice i autoritetne autore. Predstavljamo ovaj prosječni izlaz kao ugrađenje frazala, i hranimo ovo rekonstruiranoj neuralnoj mreži (RNN) kako bi računali rezultate trendova koji identifikuju trende istraživanja. Preko dva velika seta podataka naučnih članaka, pokazujemo da naš pristup uspešno otkriva prošle trende iz polja, izvršavajući osnovne linije zasnovane samo na tekstskoj centralnosti ili citaciji.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய ஆராய்ச்சி செயல்களை அடையாளம் முதல் ஆராய்ச்சி மேலாளர்களுக்கும் முக்கியமான பிரச்சனையாகும். இந்த செயல்பாடுகள் ஒரு புலத்தின் வரலாற்று உருவாக்கத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும், மற்றும் உருவாக்கும் தலைப்ப நாங்கள் இந்த பணிக்கான ஒரு சுருக்கப்பட்ட பாதையின் கண்டுபிடிப்பு சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது எங்கள் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட hypothesis என்ற By ranking both author and phrase information in a multigraph, our method jointly determines key phrases and authoritative authors.  நாம் இந்த நடுநிலை வெளியீட்டை சொற்றொடர் உள்ளடக்கங்களாக குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், மற்றும் நிகழ்ந்த புதிய பிணையத்திற்கு (RNN) இதை கணக்கிடுவதற்க இரண்டு பெரிய அறிவியல் கட்டுரைகளுக்கு மேல் இரண்டு பெரிய தகவல் அமைப்புகள், எங்கள் நெருக்கம் வெற்றிகரமாக புலத்திலிருந்து கடந்த செயல்களை கண்டறி', 'uz': "Taʼminlovchi tarjima holatini aniqlash bir asosiy taqiminlovchilar va ikkinchi taklif qilish boshqaruvchisi uchun muhim muammolar. Bu amallar maydonning tarixi taʼminotni ko'rsatish mumkin, va mavzularni taqdim qilish uchun ko'rinishi mumkin. Biz shu vazifa uchun eng chegara aniqlash freymini taqdimiz qilamiz. Bizning tanlangan hypotheyasizni bir muhim so'zlarning muhim soʻzlari maydondagi muhim mualliflar va vice versa yozishadi. Muallif va lugʻatni bir nechta tezlik bilan birga birlashtirish mumkin so'zlarni va tashqi mualliflarni birlashtirish mumkin. Biz bu intermediate natijasini birlashtirishni tasavvur qilamiz va bu narsalarni davomida tarmoqga (RNN) qidirish qoidalarini aniqlash uchun tarmoqni hisoblash uchun tarmoqchimiz. Over two large datasets of scientific articles, we demonstrate that our approach successfully detects past trends from the field, outperforming baselines based solely on text centrality or citation.", 'vi': 'Việc xác định xu hướng nghiên cứu hiện đại là một vấn đề quan trọng cho cả những nhà nghiên cứu chính và những người quản lý nghiên cứu thứ hai. Những tiến trình đó có thể khám phá sự phát triển lịch sử của khu vực, và cung cấp thông tin về các chủ đề phát triển. Chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở phát hiện xu hướng dẫn nhúng tay cho nhiệm vụ này, nó thu thập giả thuyết đồng suy của chúng tôi rằng những cụm từ quan trọng được viết bởi những tác giả quan trọng trong một lĩnh vực và ngược lại. Xếp ngang các tác giả và các cụm từ trong đa đồ, các phương pháp của chúng tôi quyết định các cụm từ chủ chốt và các tác giả có thẩm quyền. Chúng tôi đại diện kết xuất trung cấp này như sự nhúng thành ngữ, và chuyển nó cho mạng thần kinh liên tục (RNN) để tính to án các điểm xu hướng xác định xu hướng nghiên cứu. Hơn hai tập đoàn dữ liệu lớn của các nghiên cứu khoa học, chúng tôi chứng minh cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi đã tìm ra được các xu hướng trước trong lĩnh vực, hoàn thiện các nền tảng chỉ dựa trên văn bản trung tâm hay ghi chú.', 'nl': 'Het identificeren van opkomende onderzoekstrends is een cruciale kwestie voor zowel primaire onderzoekers als secundaire onderzoeksmanagers. Dergelijke processen kunnen de historische ontwikkeling van een gebied blootleggen en inzicht geven in ontwikkelende onderwerpen. We stellen een ingebed trenddetectie framework voor deze taak voor, dat onze bijunctieve hypothese omvat dat belangrijke zinnen worden geschreven door belangrijke auteurs binnen een veld en vice versa. Door zowel auteur- als zinneninformatie in een multigraph te rangschikken, bepaalt onze methode gezamenlijk sleutelzinnen en gezaghebbende auteurs. We vertegenwoordigen deze intermediaire output als frasale embeddings, en voeren deze naar een terugkerend neuraal netwerk (RNN) om trendscores te berekenen die onderzoekstrends identificeren. Aan de hand van twee grote datasets van wetenschappelijke artikelen laten we zien dat onze aanpak met succes trends uit het verleden detecteert en baselines overtreft die uitsluitend gebaseerd zijn op tekstcentraliteit of citatie.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje nove trendova istraživanja ključno je pitanje za oba primjernog istraživača, kao i sekundarne upravitelje istraživanja. Takvi procesi mogu otkriti istorijski razvoj područja i pružiti uvid o razvoju tema. Predlažemo ugrađeni okvir otkrivanja trendova za ovaj zadatak koji uključuje našu biaktivnu hipotezu da su važne rečenice napisane važnim autorima unutar polja i suprotno. Pomjenjujući informacije autora i fraze u multigrafu, naša metoda zajedno određuje ključne rečenice i autoritetske autore. Predstavljamo ovaj prosječni izlaz kao frazalne integracije, i hranimo to rekonstruiranoj neuralnoj mreži (RNN) kako bi računali trendske rezultate koji identificiraju trendove istraživanja. Preko dvije velike podatke znanstvenih članaka, pokazujemo da naš pristup uspješno otkriva prošle trende iz polja, izvršavajući početne linije temeljno na tekstskoj centralnosti ili citaciji.', 'de': 'Die Identifizierung von aufkommenden Forschungstrends ist sowohl für Primärforscher als auch für Sekundärforscher ein zentrales Thema. Solche Prozesse können die historische Entwicklung eines Gebiets aufdecken und Einblicke in sich entwickelnde Themen liefern. Wir schlagen ein eingebettetes Trenderkennungsrahmen für diese Aufgabe vor, das unsere bijunktive Hypothese beinhaltet, dass wichtige Phrasen von wichtigen Autoren innerhalb eines Feldes geschrieben werden und umgekehrt. Durch das Ranking von Autoren- und Phraseninformationen in einem Multigraph ermittelt unsere Methode gemeinsam Schlüsselphrasen und maßgebliche Autoren. Wir stellen diese Zwischenausgabe als phrasale Einbettungen dar und leiten sie an ein wiederkehrendes neuronales Netzwerk (RNN) weiter, um Trendscores zu berechnen, die Forschungstrends identifizieren. Anhand von zwei großen Datensätzen wissenschaftlicher Artikel zeigen wir, dass unser Ansatz erfolgreich vergangene Trends aus dem Feld erkennt und Baselines übertrifft, die ausschließlich auf Textzentralität oder Zitation basieren.', 'id': 'Identifikasi trende penelitian muncul adalah isu kunci bagi peneliti utama dan manajer penelitian sekunder. Proses seperti ini dapat menemukan perkembangan sejarah daerah, dan memberikan pengetahuan tentang topik berkembang. Kami mengusulkan cadangan deteksi trends yang terkandung untuk tugas ini yang mengandung hipotesis bijunctif kita bahwa frasa penting ditulis oleh penulis penting dalam bidang dan sebaliknya. Dengan memperhitungkan informasi penulis dan frasa dalam multigrafi, metode kita bersama menentukan frasa kunci dan penulis otoritas. Kami mewakili keluaran intermedi ini sebagai penerbangan frasa, dan memberi makan ini ke jaringan saraf yang berkurang (RNN) untuk menghitung skor trends yang mengidentifikasi trends penelitian. Lebih dari dua set data besar dari artikel ilmiah, kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kami berhasil mendeteksi trends masa lalu dari lapangan, melebihi garis dasar berdasarkan hanya pada sentral teks atau citasi.', 'da': 'At identificere nye forskningstendenser er et centralt spørgsmål for både primære forskere og sekundære forskningsledere. Sådanne processer kan afdække den historiske udvikling af et område og give indsigt i udviklingsemner. Vi foreslår en integreret trend detection ramme for denne opgave, som indarbejder vores tojunktive hypotese om, at vigtige sætninger er skrevet af vigtige forfattere inden for et felt og omvendt. Ved at placere både forfatter- og sætningsoplysninger i en multigraf bestemmer vores metode i fællesskab nøglesætninger og autoritære forfattere. Vi repræsenterer dette mellemliggende output som phrasal embeddings, og fodrer dette til et tilbagevendende neuralt netværk (RNN) for at beregne trendscores, der identificerer forskningstendenser. Over to store datasæt af videnskabelige artikler demonstrerer vi, at vores tilgang med succes detekterer tidligere tendenser fra feltet og overgår baselines udelukkende baseret på tekst centralisering eller citation.', 'bg': 'Идентифицирането на възникващите тенденции в научните изследвания е ключов въпрос както за първичните изследователи, така и за ръководителите на вторичните изследователски изследвания. Такива процеси могат да разкрият историческото развитие на дадена област и да дадат представа за развиващите се теми. Предлагаме вградена рамка за откриване на тенденции за тази задача, която включва нашата двуюнктивна хипотеза, че важни фрази са написани от важни автори в дадена област и обратно. Чрез класиране на информацията за автора и фразата в мултиграф, методът ни съвместно определя ключовите фрази и авторитетните автори. Представяме този междинен изход като фразови вграждания и го подаваме към повтаряща се невронна мрежа (RNN), за да изчислим тенденциите, които идентифицират научните тенденции. Над два големи набора от данни от научни статии демонстрираме, че нашият подход успешно открива минали тенденции от областта, надминавайки базовите линии, базирани единствено на централност на текста или цитиране.', 'ko': '초급 연구원과 2급 연구 관리자에게 새로운 연구 추세를 식별하는 것은 모두 관건적인 문제이다.이런 과정은 한 지역의 역사 발전을 밝히고 발전 주제에 대한 견해를 형성할 수 있다.우리는 이 임무를 위해 삽입식 트렌드 탐지 프레임워크를 제시했다. 이 프레임워크는 우리의 이중 연결 가설을 결합시켰다. 즉, 중요한 단어는 영역 내의 중요한 작가가 작성하고 반대로도 마찬가지다.다중도에서 작가와 단어 정보를 정렬함으로써 우리의 방법은 관건적인 단어와 권위 있는 작가를 공동으로 확정한다.우리는 이 중간 출력을 짧은 말로 표시하여 삽입하고 이를 귀속신경망(RNN)에 피드백하여 연구 추세를 식별하는 추세 점수를 계산한다.두 개의 대형 과학 논문 데이터 집합에서 우리는 우리의 방법이 이 분야에서 과거의 추세를 성공적으로 검출했고 텍스트의 중심성이나 인용의 기선만 바탕으로 하는 것보다 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Kutambua hatua za utafiti zinazotokea ni jambo muhimu kwa watafiti wa msingi pamoja na watawala wa tafiti za sekondari. Mradi huu unaweza kugundua maendeleo ya kihistoria ya eneo hilo, na kutoa uelewa wa mada zinazoendelea. Tunazipendekeza mfumo wa uchunguzi wa mwenendo uliokuwa umepangwa kwa juhudi hili ambalo linajumuisha dhana yetu ya uchaguzi kwamba maneno muhimu yanaandikwa na waandishi muhimu ndani ya uwanja na makamu tofauti. Kwa kutangaza taarifa za mwandishi na msemo katika ubakaji wa mbalimbali, njia yetu kwa pamoja inaamua maneno muhimu na waandishi wa mamlaka. Tunawakilisha matokeo haya ya kati kama mabadiliko ya maneno, na tunatoa hili kwenye mtandao wa neura unaoendelea (RNN) kuhesabu vipimo vya treni ambavyo vinaonyesha mwenendo wa utafiti. Zaidi ya seti mbili kubwa za makala za kisayansi, tunaonyesha kwamba hatua yetu inafanikiwa kutambua maendeleo yaliyopita kutoka kwenye uwanja huo, kutengeneza misingi ya msingi pekee ya kituo cha maandishi au maelezo.', 'fa': 'شناسایی ترند تحقیقات آشکار برای هر دو تحقیقات اصلی و مدیران تحقیقات دوم یک مسئله کلیدی است. این روش\u200cها می\u200cتوانند توسعه تاریخی یک منطقه را آشکار کنند و در مورد توسعه موضوع مشاهده کنند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها با رشته\u200cبندی هر نویسنده\u200cای و اطلاعات عبارت در یک چند گراف، روش ما با همدیگر عبارت کلید و نویسندگان توانایی را تعیین می\u200cکند. ما این نتیجه بین\u200cالمللی را به عنوان انجمن\u200cهای فرزال نمایش می\u200cدهیم، و این را به شبکه عصبی (RNN) تکرار می\u200cدهیم تا نتیجه\u200cهای ترند را محاسبه کنیم که ترند\u200cهای تحقیق را شناسایی می\u200cکنند. بیش از دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای بزرگ از مقاله\u200cهای علمی، نشان می\u200cدهیم که دستور ما موفق به طور موفق ترند گذشته\u200cهای منطقه\u200cای را شناسایی می\u200cکند، زیادی از خط\u200cهای پایه\u200cای که تنها بر مرکز متن یا ثبت\u200cکننده\u200c', 'tr': 'Ýükselen araştyrma täzeliklerini tanyşdyrmak hem ilkinji araştyrçylar hem ikinji araştyrma müdiri üçin a çyk meseledir. Böyle proseller taryhy bir bölegiň gelişmesini açyp biler we önümlerini ösüýşip biler. Biz bu zadyň içinde daşarylan trend deteksiyonyň çerçevesini teklip edip, biziň bijunktiw hypotezimizi hem möhüm sözlerimiz bir ýerde möhüm awtarlaryň tarapyndan ýazylýandygyny hem tersine çykarýar. Bir multigrafda awtor we fraz maglumatyny sahyplaşdyrarak, biziň metodamyz a ç sözleri we awtomatik awtomatik awtomatik awtomatik sözleri bilen birleşikde karar berýär. Biz bu orta çıkışı frasal içerimleri olarak temsil ediyoruz ve bunu tekrarlanan bir nöral a ğ (RNN) ile araştırma trenleri tanımlayan trend noktalarını hesaplamak için besleyiriyoruz. Iki uly sany makala üstünde, biz öz ýaryşymyzyň ýerinden geçen çykyşlaryny tanap edip, diňe tekst merkezligine ýa-da başga çykyşlaryny görkeýäris.', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i prirjeve të kërkimit të shfaqura është një çështje kyçe si për kërkuesit kryesorë, ashtu edhe për menaxherët e kërkimit të dytë. Proceset e tilla mund të zbulojnë zhvillimin historik të një zone dhe të japin kuptim mbi temat e zhvillimit. Ne propozojmë një kuadër të zbulimit të prirjes për këtë detyrë që përfshin hipotezën tonë dyfunktive se frazat e rëndësishme janë shkruar nga autorë të rëndësishëm brenda një fushe dhe përkundrazi. Duke renditur si autorin ashtu edhe informacionin e frazës në një multigrafi, metoda jonë përcakton së bashku frazat kyçe dhe autorët autoritativ. Ne përfaqësojmë këtë dalje të ndërmjetësuar si përfshirje frazë, dhe e ushqejmë këtë në një rrjet neural të përsëritur (RNN) për të llogaritur rezultatet e prirjes që identifikojnë prirjet e kërkimit. Mbi dy grupe të dhënash të mëdha të artikujve shkencore, ne demonstrojmë se qasja jonë zbulon me sukses prirjet e kaluara nga fusha, duke kaluar linjat bazë të bazuara bazuar vetëm në qendërinë e tekstit apo përmendimin.', 'hy': 'Առաջին հետազոտողների, ինչպես նաև երկրորդ հետազոտողների մենեջերների համար կարևոր խնդիր է հայտնաբերել: Այսպիսի գործընթացները կարող են բացահայտել մի տարածքի պատմական զարգացումը և հասկանալ զարգացող թեմաների մասին: Մենք առաջարկում ենք ներդրված տենդենդիայի հայտնաբերման շրջանակ այս խնդրի համար, որը ներառում է մեր երկուսանկտիվ հիպոթեզը, որ կարևոր արտահայտությունները գրված են կարևոր հեղինակների կողմից դաշտում և հակառակը: Մեր մեթոդը միասին որոշում է հիմնական արտահայտությունները և հեղինակային հեղինակները: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այս միջին արտադրությունը որպես արտահայտություններ, և կերակրում ենք այն կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի (ՌՆԹ) համար, որպեսզի հաշվարկենք տենդենդիայի գնահատականները, որոնք որոշում են հետազոտության տենդենդիաները: Գիտական հոդվածների երկու մեծ տվյալների ընթացքում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը հաջողությամբ հայտնաբերում է անցյալ տենդերանսի միտումները, որոնք գերազանցում են հիմնական գծերը, հիմնված միայն տեքստի կենտրոնալիության', 'am': 'የአስቸኳይ ምርመራ ግንኙነቶችን ለማግኘት የፊደል ጥናት አስተማሪዎች እና የሁለተኛ ትምህርት አስተማሪ መቆጣጠሪያ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ ፕሮጀክቶች የአገሩ ታሪካዊ ግንኙነት ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ለዚህ ስራ የተለየ የጥምቀት መግለጫ ፍሬዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የጸሐፊ እና የንግግር መረጃዎችን በብዙ ድጋፍ በማስቀመጥ እና የሥልጣን ደራፊዎች እና ባለሥልጣናት ተሟጋቾችን በተጠቃሚ ማረጋገጥ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ ይህንን የመካከለኛ ውጤት የፊደል አካባቢ ሆኖ እናቆጣታለን፣ ይህንንም ለመቀጠል የደዌብ መረብ (RNN) ለመቆጣጠር የሚችሉትን የድምፅ ውጤቶች እናቆጥራለን፡፡ በሁለት ትልቅ የሳይንቀሳዊ ጽሑፎች የዳታ ጽሑፎችን ማዕከላዊ ጉዳይ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Die identifiseer van uitkomstige ondersoek trende is 'n sleutel probleem vir beide primêre ondersoekers en sekundêre ondersoek bestuurders. sodanige prosesse kan die historiese ontwikkeling van 'n area ontdek en onderwerp oor ontwikkeling van onderwerpe. Ons voorstel 'n inbêde trend-beskrywing raamwerk vir hierdie taak wat ons onaktiewe hipotees inkorpreer dat belangrike frase deur belangrike outeurs binne 'n veld en teenoor. Deur te rankeer beide outeur en frase inligting in 'n multigraaf, ons metode saamstig bepaal sleutel frase en autoritatiewe outeurs. Ons verteenwoordig hierdie middelste uitvoer as frasaal inbêding, en voer hierdie na 'n herhaalde neuralnetwerk (RNN) om trend telling te bereken wat ondersoek trende identifiseer. Oor twee groot datastelle van wetenskaplike artikels, wys ons dat ons toegang suksesvol verlede trende van die veld, uitvoer basisline gebaseer sole op teks sentraliteit of sitasie.", 'az': 'İki ilk araştırmacılar və ikinci araştırma müdürləri üçün ilk məsələdir. Bütün proseslər bir məmləkətin tarixi gelişməsini açar və məsələlərin gelişməsi haqqında nəzər verər. Biz bu işin içində möhkəm ifadələr yazılmış möhkəm yazıcılar tarafından yazılmış olaraq imkansız bir trend keşif framework ü təklif edirik. Müxtəlif grafikdə yazıcı və fraz məlumatlarını səf edərək, bizim metodumuz anahtar sözləri və authoritatlı yazıcıları birlikdə belirləşdirir. Biz bu orta çıxışı frazal inşalları olaraq göstəririk və bunu araştırma trendlərini təsdiqləyən trend nöyrənməsi üçün yenidən nöyrə a ğına təsdiqləyirik. İki böyük verilən məlumatların üstündə, biz tərzimizin sahadan keçmiş trendləri başarılı olaraq tanıdığını göstərdik, təkcə mətn mərkəblərinə və tərzlərinə dayanan tərzlərin üstünlüyünü aşağı çıxardıq.', 'ca': "Identificar tendències emergents de la recerca és un tema clau tant per als investigadors primàries com per als gerents de recerca secundaria. Aquests processos poden descobrir el desenvolupament històric d'una àrea i donar una visió sobre els temes de desenvolupament. Proposem un marc integrat de detecció de tendències per aquesta tasca que incorpora la nostra hipòtesi bijonctiva de que frases importants estan escrites per autors importants en un camp i vice versa. By ranking both author and phrase information in a multigraph, our method jointly determines key phrases and authoritative authors.  Representem aquesta producció intermediària com a incorporacions de frases, i alimentam això a una xarxa neural recurrent (RNN) per calcular puntuacions de tendència que identifiquen tendències de recerca. Durant dos grans conjunts de dades d'articles científics, demostram que el nostre enfocament detecta amb èxit les tendències passades del camp, superant les línies de base basades només en la centralitat de text o la citació.", 'bs': 'Identifikacija trendova istraživanja je ključni problem za oba primarnog istraživača, kao i sekundarnog menadžera istraživanja. Takvi procesi mogu otkriti istorijski razvoj područja i pružiti uvid o razvoju tema. Predlažemo ugrađeni okvir otkrivanja trendova za ovaj zadatak koji uključuje našu biaktivnu hipotezu da su važne rečenice napisane od važnih autora unutar polja i unaprijed. Određivanjem autora i fraze informacija u multigrafu, naša metoda zajedno određuje ključne rečenice i autoritativne autore. Predstavljamo ovaj prosječni izlaz kao ugrađenje frazala, i hranimo ovo rekonstruiranoj neuralnoj mreži (RNN) kako bi računali rezultate trendova koji identificiraju trendove istraživanja. Preko dvije velike baze podataka naučnih članaka, pokazujemo da naš pristup uspješno otkriva prošle trende iz polja, izvršavajući osnovne linije zasnovane samo na tekstskoj centralnosti ili citaciji.', 'bn': 'প্রাথমিক গবেষক এবং দ্বিতীয় গবেষণা ব্যবস্থাপকের জন্য জরুরী গবেষণার ধারাবাহিক চিহ্নিত করা হচ্ছে। এই প্রক্রিয়া একটি এলাকার ঐতিহাসিক উন্নয়ন আবিষ্কার করতে পারে এবং উন্নয়নের বিষয়ে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি তৈরি করতে পারে। আমরা এই কাজের জন্য একটি বিভিন্ন ধারাবাহিক অভিজ্ঞতার কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করি যা আমাদের বিছেনাকৃত হিসেবে যুক্ত করে যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বাক্য লেখক এবং বাক্যের তথ্য অনুযায়ী, আমাদের পদ্ধতি একত্রে কী বাক্য এবং কর্তৃপক্ষ লেখকদের নির্ধারণ করে। We represent this intermediate output as phrasal embeddings, and feed this to a recurrent neural network (RNN) to compute trend scores that identify research trends.  দুই বিজ্ঞানিক প্রবন্ধের বেশী তথ্য সেট, আমরা প্রমাণ করছি যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া সফলভাবে ক্ষেত্র থেকে অতীতের ধারাবাহিক সম্পর্কে খুঁজে ব', 'cs': 'Identifikace vznikajících trendů výzkumu je klíčovou otázkou jak pro primární výzkumné pracovníky, tak pro vedoucí sekundárního výzkumu. Takové procesy mohou odhalit historický vývoj oblasti a poskytnout pohled na rozvíjející se témata. Pro tento úkol navrhujeme integrovaný rámec detekce trendů, který zahrnuje naši bijunktivní hypotézu, že důležité fráze jsou psány důležitými autory v rámci oboru a naopak. Naše metoda společně určuje klíčové fráze a autorské autory. Tento intermediální výstup reprezentujeme jako frazální vložení a předáváme ho do recidivující neuronové sítě (RNN), abychom vypočítali skóre trendů, které identifikují trendy výzkumu. Ve dvou velkých datových sadách vědeckých článků ukazujeme, že náš přístup úspěšně detekuje minulé trendy z oboru a překonává základní linie založené výhradně na centralitě textu nebo citaci.', 'et': 'Tekkivate teadussuundumuste kindlakstegemine on nii esmaste kui ka teiseste teadusuuringute juhtide jaoks võtmeküsimus. Sellised protsessid võivad avastada piirkonna ajaloolise arengu ja anda ülevaate arenevatest teemadest. Pakume selle ülesande jaoks välja integreeritud suundumuste tuvastamise raamistiku, mis sisaldab meie bijunktiivset hüpoteesi, et olulised fraasid kirjutavad olulised autorid valdkonnas ja vastupidi. Nii autori- kui ka fraasiteabe järjestamisega multigraafikusse määrab meie meetod ühiselt kindlaks võtmesõnad ja autoriteetsed autorid. Me esitame seda vaheväljundit fraaside manustamisena ja edastame selle korduvale närvivõrgule (RNN), et arvutada trendide skoorid, mis tuvastavad uurimissuundumusi. Kahe suure teadusartikli andmekogumi kaudu näitame, et meie lähenemisviis tuvastab edukalt valdkonna varasemaid suundumusi, ületades lähtejooni, mis põhinevad ainult teksti tsentraalsusel või tsiteerimisel.', 'fi': 'Uusien tutkimustrendien tunnistaminen on avainkysymys sekä alkututkijoille että toissijaisille tutkimusjohtajille. Tällaiset prosessit voivat paljastaa alueen historiallisen kehityksen ja tuottaa tietoa kehittyvistä aiheista. Ehdotamme tähän tehtävään sulautettua trendintunnistuskehystä, joka sisältää bijunktiivisen hypoteesimme, että tärkeät lauseet kirjoittavat tärkeät tekijät tietyllä alalla ja päinvastoin. Sijoittamalla sekä tekijä- että lausetiedot monikaavioon menetelmämme määrittää yhdessä avainlauseet ja arvovaltaiset kirjoittajat. Esitämme tämän välituotoksen fraasiupotuksina ja syötämme sen toistuvaan hermoverkkoon (RNN), jotta voidaan laskea trendipisteet, jotka tunnistavat tutkimustrendejä. Kahden suuren tieteellisen artikkeliaineiston avulla osoitamme, että lähestymistapamme tunnistaa menestyksekkäästi alan aiemmat trendit ja ylittää lähtöviivat pelkästään tekstin keskittämiseen tai viittauksiin perustuen.', 'sk': 'Ugotavljanje nastajajočih raziskovalnih trendov je ključno vprašanje za primarne raziskovalce in sekundarne raziskovalne vodje. Takšni procesi lahko odkrijejo zgodovinski razvoj območja in prinesejo vpogled v razvojne teme. Za to nalogo predlagamo vgrajen okvir za zaznavanje trendov, ki vključuje našo bijunktivno hipotezo, da pomembne fraze napišejo pomembni avtorji znotraj področja in obratno. Z razvrščanjem informacij o avtorjih in frazah v večgrafu naša metoda skupaj določa ključne fraze in avtoritativne avtorje. Ta vmesni izhod predstavljamo kot frazalne vdelave in ga posredujemo ponavljajočemu se nevronskemu omrežju (RNN) za izračun trendov, ki prepoznavajo raziskovalne trende. Preko dveh velikih podatkovnih naborov znanstvenih člankov dokazujemo, da naš pristop uspešno zaznava pretekle trende s področja, kar presega osnovne vrstice, ki temeljijo izključno na besedilni centralnosti ali citiranju.', 'he': 'Identifying emergent research trends is a key issue for both primary researchers as well as secondary research managers.  תהליכים כאלה יכולים לחשוף את התפתחות היסטורית של אזור, ולהביא תובנות על נושאים מתפתחים. אנו מציעים מסגרת גילוי נטייה מוכנה למשימה הזו שמכילה היפותזיה בינוקטיבית שלנו כי ביטויים חשובים נכתבים על ידי סופרים חשובים בתוך שדה והפך. על ידי הדרגה של המידע על הסופר והביטוי במילוגרף, השיטה שלנו קובעת יחד ביטויים מפתחים וסופרים אוטוריטטיביים. אנו מייצגים את ההוצאה הביניית הזאת כתוכניות ביטויים, ומאכילים את זה לרשת עצבית חוזרת (RNN) כדי לחשב נקודות טנדרציות שמזהות טנדרציות מחקר. מעל שתי קבוצות מידע גדולות של מאמרים מדעיים, אנו מראים שהגישה שלנו מגלה בהצלחה טנדרציות עברות מהשדה, מעליות קווי בסיס מבוססים רק על מרכז טקסט או ציטוט.', 'ha': "Ina iya gane kowanta ta da za'a ƙayyade fassara, yana da matsayin watafiti masu ƙarami da manajan labarai. Wannan jarayon aiki na iya nuna mafarin historical na cire wani wuri, kuma yana iya ƙara gane wa masu buɗewa. Tuna goyya da wani firam wanda ya samu a cikin hanyarwa wa wannan aikin da ke ƙunsa da hanyoyinmu masu bijirewa da musamman da mutane muhimu za'a rubũta shi a cikin birnin da ke sami versa. Ina ranar da maɓallin rubutu da maɓallin magana a cikin wata multiraph, metoden mu na ƙayyade maɓallin maganar da ma'abũcin mamlaka. Munã wakin wannan matsayin tsakanin da ke cikin littattafai, kuma Munã ciyar da shi zuwa wani shirin neural wanda ya daɗi (RNN) dõmin a lissafa score na shida wanda ke gane kodi. Ko duk biyu masu ƙari na takardar da masu sayanin da aka sani, tuna nuna cewa hanyoyinmu na ci mafiya babban rabo ta zaman daga field, kuma ke sami salon da ke kan matsayin tsakiya ko kuma ma'anar maganar.", 'jv': 'IID Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo nggawe nggunakake iki dadi bijunactive suputes sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé basa sing dikarepaké basa sing dikarepaké ning acara sak lan mulai. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awakdhéwé menehi nglanggar wigatining kanggo Kemerdekaan kapan Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing sampeyan sing luwih dumateng artiklé Sayensi, kéné bisa ngomongke awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngubah dhéwé', 'bo': 'མཐོང་ཚུགས་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་གསར་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་རྩོལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་ཆོག་ཡིན་པ་དང་secondary research managers་ཆ འོན་ཀྱང་། ལས་སྦྱོར་འདི་དག་གི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་འཕེལ་རིམ་གནས་སྟངས་ཤིག་དང་། ཡང་ན་ཁོང་གི་དོན་དག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏ ང་ཚོས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་འདིའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་འཕེལ་རིམ་གནས་སྟངས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་། མ་ཤེས་པའི་ཚིག་རྩ་ག དབྱེ་རིག་འདིའི་ནང་གི་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་དང་ཐ་སྙད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དག་གི་ནང་གི་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་གྱིས་མཐུན་གྱི་གཙོ་ཚིག་དང་དབྱིབས་ We represent this intermediate output as phrasal embeddings, and feed this to a recurrent neural network (RNN) to compute trend scores that identify research trends. Over two large datasets of scientific articles, we demonstrate that our approach successfully detects past trends from the field, outperforming baselines based solely on text centrality or citation (help).'}
{'en': 'Embedding WordNet Knowledge for Textual Entailment', 'fr': "Intégrer les connaissances de WordNet pour l'implication textuelle", 'ar': 'تضمين المعرفة WordNet من أجل النص', 'pt': 'Incorporando conhecimento do WordNet para envolvimento textual', 'es': 'Incorporación del conocimiento de WordNet para la implicación textual', 'zh': '嵌 WordNet 以成文本蕴涵', 'ja': 'テキストエンターテイメント用のWordNetナレッジの埋め込み', 'hi': 'पाठ्य अनिवार्यता के लिए WordNet ज्ञान एम्बेड करना', 'ru': 'Встраивание знаний WordNet для текстового вложения', 'ga': 'Eolas WordNet a Leabú le haghaidh Siamsaíocht Téacsúil', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση γνώσεων WordNet για την επεξεργασία κειμένων', 'hu': 'WordNet tudás beágyazása a szövegbővítéshez', 'kk': 'WordNet мәтіннің білімін ендіру', 'it': "Incorporare conoscenze WordNet per l'integrazione testuale", 'lt': 'Name', 'ms': 'Membenarkan Pengetahuan WordNet untuk Kesakitan Teks', 'ml': 'എക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റല്\u200d എന്റെല്\u200dമെന്\u200dറിനുള്ള വാര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റ് അറിവു്', 'mk': 'Вклучување на WordNet знаење за текстуални проблеми', 'pl': 'Wbudowanie wiedzy WordNet dla poprawy tekstowej', 'mn': 'WordNet мэдлэг нь текст бүтээгдэхүүн', 'ro': 'Încorporarea cunoștințelor WordNet pentru extinderea textuală', 'sr': 'Ukljuèujuæi znanje WordNet za tekstualnu kompletu', 'no': 'Name', 'so': 'Embedding WordNet Knowledge for Textual Entailment', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Inbädda WordNet-kunskap för textmässig integration', 'ur': 'Name', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni ta’ l-Għarfien WordNet għall-Problemi Tekstiċi', 'ta': 'உரை முகவரிக்கான வார்த்தையின் அறிவிப்பு உட்பொதிந்துள்ளது', 'vi': 'Ý thức WordNet cho Thông tin nhắn', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Вградване на WordNet знания за текстово оформяне', 'nl': 'WordNet-kennis insluiten voor tekstuele bewerking', 'de': 'Einbetten von WordNet-Wissen für die Textverarbeitung', 'da': 'Indlejring af WordNet-viden til tekstuel indlejring', 'id': 'Membentuk pengetahuan WordNet untuk penyakit Teks', 'hr': 'Uključujući znanje WordNet za tekstualnu kompletu', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Ujuzi wa WordNet kwa Ujumbe wa Kiteknolojia', 'af': 'Name', 'ko': 'WordNet 지식 포함 텍스트 포함', 'tr': 'Metin Dolamak üçin WordNet Bilim girişi', 'sq': 'Embedding WordNet Knowledge for Textual Entailment', 'am': 'Net እውቀት', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Textual Entailment Ă¼Ă§Ă¼n WordNet BilmÉ™si', 'bs': 'Uključujući znanje WordNet za tekstualnu kompletu', 'cs': 'Vložení znalostí WordNet pro textové vylepšení', 'bn': 'টেক্সটুয়াল এন্টেমেন্টের জন্য ইম্পেডিং শব্দের নেটওয়ার্ড জ্ঞান', 'ca': 'Embedding WordNet Knowledge for Textual Entailment', 'fi': 'WordNet-tiedon upottaminen tekstimuotoista tekstiä varten', 'et': 'WordNeti teadmiste põimimine tekstilise täienduse jaoks', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'he': 'Comment', 'sk': 'Vgradnja znanja WordNet za besedilno razširjanje', 'jv': 'Tatanan kelas Word net kanggo entelke textual', 'bo': '嘟∴讲嗉嬥絺嘟亨綘嘟侧紜嘟︵緬嗑侧讲嘟傕紜嘟嗋紜嘟氞綋嗉嬥剑嗉嬥健嘟侧紜嘟傕胶嗉嬥健嘟侧絺嗉嬥絾嗉嬥饯嘟亨溅嗉嬥絸嗑编讲嗉嬥綋嘟勦紜嘟戉酱嗉嬥綎嘟︵尽嘟脆溅嗉嬥綌'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we study how we can improve a deep learning approach to textual entailment by incorporating lexical entailment relations from WordNet. Our idea is to embed the lexical entailment knowledge contained in WordNet in specially-learned word vectors, which we call entailment vectors. We present a standard neural network model and a novel set-theoretic model to learn these entailment vectors from word pairs with known lexical entailment relations derived from WordNet. We further incorporate these entailment vectors into a decomposable attention model for textual entailment and evaluate the model on the SICK and the SNLI dataset. We find that using these special entailment word vectors, we can significantly improve the performance of textual entailment compared with a baseline that uses only standard word2vec vectors. The final performance of our model is close to or above the state of the art, but our method does not rely on any manually-crafted rules or extensive syntactic features.', 'es': 'En este artículo, estudiamos cómo podemos mejorar un enfoque de aprendizaje profundo para la implicación textual mediante la incorporación de relaciones de implicación léxica de WordNet. Nuestra idea es integrar el conocimiento de implicación léxica contenido en WordNet en vectores de palabras especialmente aprendidos, que llamamos «vectores de implicación». Presentamos un modelo de red neuronal estándar y un modelo novedoso de teoría de conjuntos para aprender estos vectores de implicación a partir de pares de palabras con relaciones de implicación léxicas conocidas derivadas de WordNet. Además, incorporamos estos vectores de implicación en un modelo de atención descomponible para la implicación textual y evaluamos el modelo en el conjunto de datos SICK y SNLI. Encontramos que al usar estos vectores de palabras de implicación especiales, podemos mejorar significativamente el rendimiento de la implicación textual en comparación con una línea de base que usa solo vectores word2vec estándar. El rendimiento final de nuestro modelo está cerca o por encima del estado de la técnica, pero nuestro método no se basa en reglas elaboradas manualmente ni en funciones sintácticas extensas.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, estudamos como podemos melhorar uma abordagem de aprendizado profundo para vinculação textual, incorporando relações de vinculação lexical do WordNet. Nossa ideia é incorporar o conhecimento de vinculação lexical contido no WordNet em vetores de palavras especialmente aprendidos, que chamamos de “vetores de vinculação”. Apresentamos um modelo de rede neural padrão e um novo modelo teórico de conjuntos para aprender esses vetores de vinculação de pares de palavras com relações de vinculação lexicais conhecidas derivadas do WordNet. Além disso, incorporamos esses vetores de vinculação em um modelo de atenção decomponível para vinculação textual e avaliamos o modelo no conjunto de dados SICK e SNLI. Descobrimos que, usando esses vetores de palavras de vinculação especiais, podemos melhorar significativamente o desempenho da vinculação textual em comparação com uma linha de base que usa apenas vetores word2vec padrão. O desempenho final do nosso modelo está próximo ou acima do estado da arte, mas nosso método não depende de nenhuma regra criada manualmente ou recursos sintáticos extensos.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، ندرس كيف يمكننا تحسين نهج التعلم العميق للاستدلال النصي من خلال دمج علاقات الاستدلال المعجمية من WordNet. تتمثل فكرتنا في تضمين المعرفة المعجمية المتضمنة في WordNet في ناقلات الكلمات التي تم تعلمها بشكل خاص ، والتي نسميها "متجهات الاستلزام". نقدم نموذجًا قياسيًا للشبكة العصبية ونموذجًا نظريًا جديدًا لتعلم هذه النواقل الضمنية من أزواج الكلمات ذات العلاقات المعجمية المعروفة المشتقة من WordNet. نقوم أيضًا بدمج هذه النواقل المتضمنة في نموذج انتباه قابل للتحلل للاستدلال النصي وتقييم النموذج على مجموعة بيانات SICK و SNLI. وجدنا أنه باستخدام متجهات الكلمات الخاصة هذه ، يمكننا تحسين أداء الاستنتاج النصي بشكل ملحوظ مقارنة بخط الأساس الذي يستخدم متجهات word2vec القياسية فقط. يقترب الأداء النهائي لنموذجنا من أحدث التقنيات أو أعلى منها ، لكن طريقتنا لا تعتمد على أي قواعد مصنوعة يدويًا أو ميزات نحوية شاملة.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions comment améliorer une approche d'apprentissage profond de l'implication textuelle en incorporant des relations lexicales issues de WordNet. Notre idée est d'intégrer les connaissances d'implication lexicale contenues dans WordNet dans des vecteurs de mots spécialement appris, que nous appelons «\xa0vecteurs d'implication\xa0». Nous présentons un modèle de réseau neuronal standard et un nouveau modèle de théorie des ensembles pour apprendre ces vecteurs d'implication à partir de paires de mots avec des relations lexicales connues dérivées de WordNet. Nous incorporons ensuite ces vecteurs d'implication dans un modèle d'attention décomposable pour l'implication textuelle et évaluons le modèle sur l'ensemble de données SICK et SNLI. Nous trouvons qu'en utilisant ces vecteurs de mots d'implication spéciaux, nous pouvons améliorer considérablement les performances de l'implication textuelle par rapport à une base qui utilise uniquement des vecteurs word2vec standard. Les performances finales de notre modèle sont proches ou supérieures à l'état de la technique, mais notre méthode ne repose sur aucune règle élaborée manuellement ni sur des caractéristiques syntaxiques étendues.", 'ja': 'この論文では、WordNetからの語彙的帰結関係を取り入れることで、テキスト帰結に対する深層学習アプローチを改善する方法を研究している。 私たちのアイデアは、WordNetに含まれる語彙知識を特別に学習された単語ベクトルに埋め込むことであり、これを「語彙知識ベクトル」と呼びます。「私たちは、WordNetから派生した既知の語彙的エンテイメント関係を持つ単語ペアからこれらのエンテイメントベクターを学習するための標準的なニューラルネットワークモデルと新規のセット理論モデルを提示します。 さらに、これらの巻き込まれベクターをテキスト巻き込まれるための分解可能な注意モデルに組み込み、病気およびSNLIデータセット上のモデルを評価する。 これらの特殊な随伴ワードベクトルを使用すると、標準ワード2 vecベクトルのみを使用するベースラインと比較して、テキスト随伴のパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させることができます。 私たちのモデルの最終的なパフォーマンスは最先端に近いかそれ以上ですが、私たちの方法は手作業で作成されたルールや幅広い構文機能に依存していません。', 'zh': '于本文之中,究WordNet之词汇蕴涵关系,以进蕴涵之深。 吾意WordNet中含词汇蕴涵识嵌专学之词向量,谓之"蕴涵向量"。 立一准者神经网络与一新集合论,从WordNet知词汇蕴涵之词对学此蕴涵向量。 更以蕴涵向量整合解意模中,施于文本蕴涵, SICK SNLI 数集上评之。 臣观用此殊蕴涵词向量,比于word2vec向量之基线,可以显文蕴涵之性。 吾道近而水平,吾道不恃手动而博语法。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम अध्ययन करते हैं कि हम वर्डनेट से लेक्सिकल अनिवार्यता संबंधों को शामिल करके पाठ्य अनिवार्यता के लिए एक गहरी सीखने के दृष्टिकोण में सुधार कैसे कर सकते हैं। हमारा विचार वर्डनेट में निहित लेक्सिकल अनिवार्यता ज्ञान को विशेष रूप से सीखे गए शब्द वैक्टर में एम्बेड करना है, जिसे हम "अनिवार्य वैक्टर" कहते हैं। हम WordNet से व्युत्पन्न ज्ञात लेक्सिकल संबंधों के साथ शब्द जोड़े से इन अनिवार्य वैक्टरों को सीखने के लिए एक मानक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल और एक उपन्यास सेट-सैद्धांतिक मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। हम आगे इन अनिवार्य वैक्टरों को पाठ्य तात्पर्य के लिए एक विघटित ध्यान मॉडल में शामिल करते हैं और बीमार और एसएनएलआई डेटासेट पर मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि इन विशेष अनिवार्य शब्द वैक्टर का उपयोग करके, हम एक बेसलाइन की तुलना में पाठ्य अनिवार्यता के प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार कर सकते हैं जो केवल मानक वर्ड 2 वें सी वैक्टर का उपयोग करता है। हमारे मॉडल का अंतिम प्रदर्शन कला की स्थिति के करीब या उससे ऊपर है, लेकिन हमारी विधि किसी भी मैन्युअल रूप से तैयार किए गए नियमों या व्यापक वाक्यात्मक सुविधाओं पर भरोसा नहीं करती है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы изучаем, как мы можем улучшить подход глубокого обучения к текстовому влечению, включив лексические отношения влечения из WordNet. Наша идея заключается в том, чтобы внедрить знания о лексическом влечении, содержащиеся в WordNet, в специально выученные векторы слов, которые мы называем «векторами влечения».« Мы представляем стандартную модель нейронной сети и новую теоретическую модель, чтобы выучить эти векторы влечения из пар слов с известными лексическими отношениями влечения, полученными из WordNet. Мы далее включаем эти векторы тяги в разлагаемую модель внимания для текстового тяготения и оцениваем модель для БОЛЬНЫХ и набор данных SNLI. Мы обнаружили, что с помощью этих специальных векторов слов влечения мы можем значительно улучшить производительность текстового влечения по сравнению с базовой линией, которая использует только стандартные векторы word2vec. Окончательная производительность нашей модели близка к уровню техники или превышает его, но наш метод не опирается на какие-либо правила, разработанные вручную, или обширные синтаксические особенности.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar conas is féidir linn cur chuige domhainfhoghlama a fheabhsú maidir le gabháil théacsúil trí chaidreamh foclóra ó WordNet a ionchorprú. Is é an smaoineamh atá againn ná an t-eolas foclóra atá in WordNet a leabú i veicteoirí focal atá foghlamtha go speisialta, ar a dtugaimid “veicteora earcaíochta”. Cuirimid i láthair samhail líonra néar caighdeánach agus samhail tacair-teoiric nua a fhoghlaim na veicteoirí eiseamláireach ó péirí focal a bhfuil caidreamh fhoclóra aitheanta a dhíorthaítear ó WordNet. Ionchorpróimid na veicteoirí seo a leanas isteach i múnla aird indiúscartha le haghaidh gabháil théacsúil agus déanaimid measúnú ar an tsamhail ar thacar sonraí SICK agus SNLI. Faighimid amach gur féidir linn feabhas suntasach a chur ar fheidhmíocht an tsaineolais théacsúil trí leas a bhaint as na veicteoirí focal eitice speisialta seo i gcomparáid le bunlíne nach n-úsáideann ach veicteoirí caighdeánacha word2vec. Tá feidhmíocht deiridh ár múnla gar do nó os a chionn ar an úrscothacht, ach níl ár modh ag brath ar aon rialacha lámhdhéanta nó gnéithe comhréire fairsinge.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban azt tanulmányozzuk, hogyan javíthatjuk a mélytanulási megközelítést a WordNet lexikai vonatkozási kapcsolatainak beépítésével. Az elképzelésünk, hogy a WordNet lexikai vonatkozási ismereteit speciálisan tanult szóvektorokba építsük be, amelyeket "vonatkozási vektoroknak" nevezünk. Bemutatunk egy szabványos neurális hálózati modellt és egy új halmazelméleti modellt, amelynek segítségével ezeket a vonatkozási vektorokat a WordNet-ből származó ismert lexikális vonatkozási kapcsolatokkal rendelkező szópárokból tanulhatjuk meg. Ezeket az implicációs vektorokat továbbá egy bontható figyelemmodellbe építjük be a szöveges implicációhoz, és értékeljük a modellt a SICK és az SNLI adatkészleten. Úgy találjuk, hogy ezeknek a speciális vonási szóvektoroknak a használatával jelentősen javíthatjuk a szöveges vonások teljesítményét egy olyan alapvonalhoz képest, amely csak standard word2vec vektorokat használ. Modellünk végső teljesítménye közel vagy felett áll a technika állapotához, de módszerünk nem támaszkodik kézzel kidolgozott szabályokra vagy kiterjedt szintaktikai funkciókra.', 'it': 'In questo articolo, studiamo come possiamo migliorare un approccio di deep learning al coinvolgimento testuale incorporando relazioni lessicali di coinvolgimento da WordNet. La nostra idea è quella di incorporare le conoscenze lessicali contenute in WordNet in vettori di parole appositamente appresi, che chiamiamo "vettori di implicazione". Presentiamo un modello standard di rete neurale e un nuovo modello set-teoretico per imparare questi vettori di implicazione da coppie di parole con relazioni di implicazione lessicali conosciute derivate da WordNet. Incorporamo inoltre questi vettori di implicazione in un modello di attenzione scomposibile per implicazione testuale e valutiamo il modello sul dataset SICK e SNLI. Troviamo che utilizzando questi vettori di parole con implicazione speciale, possiamo migliorare significativamente le prestazioni di implicazione testuale rispetto a una linea di base che utilizza solo vettori word2vec standard. Le prestazioni finali del nostro modello sono vicine o superiori allo stato dell\'arte, ma il nostro metodo non si basa su regole manuali o ampie funzionalità sintattiche.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετάμε πώς μπορούμε να βελτιώσουμε μια προσέγγιση βαθιάς μάθησης στην κειμενική ενσωμάτωση ενσωματώνοντας λεξικές σχέσεις εμπλοκής από το WordNet. Η ιδέα μας είναι να ενσωματώσουμε τη λεξική γνώση που περιέχεται στο WordNet σε ειδικά εκπαιδευμένα διανύσματα λέξεων, τα οποία ονομάζουμε "διανύσματα συνεπειών". Παρουσιάζουμε ένα πρότυπο μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου και ένα νέο σύνολο-θεωρητικό μοντέλο για την εκμάθηση αυτών των διανυσμάτων συνεπειών από ζεύγη λέξεων με γνωστές λεξικές σχέσεις συνεπειών που προέρχονται από το WordNet. Περαιτέρω ενσωματώνουμε αυτά τα διανύσματα εμπλοκής σε ένα αποσυντίθετο μοντέλο προσοχής για κειμενική εμπλοκή και αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο στο σύνολο δεδομένων SICK και SNLI. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι χρησιμοποιώντας αυτά τα ειδικά διανύσματα λέξεων συνεπειών, μπορούμε να βελτιώσουμε σημαντικά την απόδοση του κειμένου σε σύγκριση με μια γραμμή βάσης που χρησιμοποιεί μόνο τυποποιημένα διανύσματα. Η τελική απόδοση του μοντέλου μας είναι κοντά ή πάνω από την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας, αλλά η μέθοδος μας δεν βασίζεται σε χειροκίνητους κανόνες ή εκτεταμένα συντακτικά χαρακτηριστικά.', 'ka': 'ამ წიგნაში, ჩვენ ვისწავლით, როგორ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ ტექსტულური შესწავლების მიზეზი, როგორ შეგვიძლია WordNet-ის ლექსიკალური შესწავლის შესახებ. ჩვენი იდეა არის WordNet-ში მხოლოდ სტაციალურად სწავლილი სიტყვების გვექტორებით, რომელიც ჩვენ ვუხედავთ "საკუთარი გვექტორებით". ჩვენ სტანდარტური ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელს და პრომენტიკი ტეორეტიკური მოდელს გავისწავლოთ ამ საკუთარი გვექტორები სიტყვების ზოგიდან, რომელიც WordNet-დან გამოიყენებული ელე ჩვენ შემდეგ ამ მოწყობილობის გვექტორებს ტექსტულ დაყენების მოდელში დავყენებთ და SICK და SNLI მონაცემების მოდელში მოდულის მოდულის შესახებ. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ამ სპეციალური სამყარო სიტყვების გამოყენება გვაქვს, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია მნიშვნელოვანელოვანი ტექსტულ სამყაროს გამოყენება, რომელიც მხოლოდ სტ ჩვენი მოდელის ბოლო გამოსახულება ხელოვნების სტატის სტატისზე და უფრო მეტი, მაგრამ ჩვენი მეტი არ დაახლოდება პირადი შექმნილი წესები ან უფრო დიდი სინტაქტიული ფუნ', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, WordNet-ден лексикалық қатынастарды қосу арқылы, мәтіндік құрылғысын қалай жақсы оқытуға мүмкіндік бере аламыз. Біздің идеямыз WordNet дегенде болатын лексикалық құрамының білімін өзгеше оқылған сөздер векторына ендіру, бұл сөздерді "көмек векторлар" деп аталамыз. Біз стандартты неврал желінің моделін және WordNet- ден келесі лексикалық қатынастарын үйрену үшін романдық теоретикалық моделін таңдаймыз. Біз осы векторларды текстік тізбектеу үшін бөліп, SICK және SNLI деректер жиынының үлгісін бағалау үлгісіне ендіреміз. Біз осы арнаулы сөздердің векторларын қолдану үшін текстік сөздердің және негізгі сөздердің текстік сөздердің векторларын қолданатын негізгі жолымен салыстыра аламыз. Біздің моделіміздің соңғы әрекетіміз суреттің күйіне жақын немесе үстінен жақын, бірақ әдіміз қолмен құрылған ережелеріне не кеңейтілген синтактикалық мүмкіндіктеріне сенбейді.', 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kita mempelajari bagaimana kita boleh meningkatkan pendekatan pembelajaran mendalam kepada penyelesaian teks dengan memasukkan hubungan penyelesaian leksikal dari WordNet. Our idea is to embed the lexical entailment knowledge contained in WordNet in specially-learned word vectors, which we call 'entailment vectors.'  Kami memperkenalkan model rangkaian saraf piawai dan model set-teoretik baru untuk belajar vektor penyelesaian ini dari pasangan perkataan dengan hubungan penyelesaian leksikal yang diketahui berasal dari WordNet. Kami lebih lanjut memasukkan vektor penyelesaian ini ke dalam model perhatian yang boleh dihapus untuk penyelesaian teks dan menilai model pada set data SICK dan SNLI. Kita jumpa bahawa menggunakan vektor perkataan yang istimewa ini, kita boleh meningkatkan prestasi penggunaan teks secara signifikan dibandingkan dengan dasar yang menggunakan hanya vektor perkataan piawai 2vec. Performasi akhir model kita hampir atau di atas keadaan seni, tetapi kaedah kita tidak bergantung pada mana-mana peraturan yang dibuat secara manual atau ciri-ciri sintaktik luas.", 'mk': 'In this paper, we study how we can improve a deep learning approach to textual entailment by incorporating lexical entailment relations from WordNet.  Нашата идеја е да го вклопиме лексикалното знаење во WordNet во специјално научени вектори на зборови, кои ние ги нарекуваме "вектори на вклопување". Презентираме стандарден модел на нервната мрежа и нов сет-теоретички модел за да ги научиме овие вектори за вмешање од зборови парови со познати лексикални односи за вмешање изведени од WordNet. Понатаму ги интегрираме овие вектори за вмешање во декомпозабилен модел на внимание за текстуално вмешање и го проценуваме моделот на SICK и SNLI датотеката. We find that using these special entailment word vectors, we can significantly improve the performance of textual entailment compared with a baseline that uses only standard word2vec vectors.  Конечната изведба на нашиот модел е блиску или над најсовремената, но нашиот метод не се потпира на никакви рачно изработени правила или екстремни синтактички карактеристики.', 'lt': 'In this paper, we study how we can improve a deep learning approach to textual entailment by incorporating lexical entailment relations from WordNet.  Mūsų idėja yra įdiegti WordNete esančias leksikalines įtraukimo žinias į specialiai išmoktus žodžių vektorius, kuriuos vadiname "įtraukimo vektoriais". We present a standard neural network model and a novel set-theoretic model to learn these entailment vectors from word pairs with known lexical entailment relations derived from WordNet.  We further incorporate these entailment vectors into a decomposable attention model for textual entailment and evaluate the model on the SICK and the SNLI dataset.  Nustatome, kad naudojant šiuos specialius įtraukimo žodžių vektorius, galime gerokai pagerinti tekstinio įtraukimo veiksmingumą, palyginti su pradiniu, kuris naudoja tik standartinius žodžių vektorius 2vec. Galutinis mūsų modelio rezultatas yra artimas arba aukštesnis už pažangiausią, bet mūsų metodas nesiremia jokiomis rankiniu būdu sukurtomis taisyklėmis ar ekstensyviomis sintaksinėmis savybėmis.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид WordNet-ээс сэтгэл хөдлөлийн харилцааны тусламжтайгаар хэрхэн гүн гүнзгий суралцах аргыг хэрхэн сайжруулж болох талаар судалж байна. Бидний санаа бол WordNet-д агуулагдсан лексикийн төвлөрүүлэлтийн мэдлэгийг ялангуяа сурсан үгний векторууд рүү оруулах юм. Бид стандарт мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар болон WordNet-ээс гарсан нээлттэй холбоотой этгэлийн векторуудыг сурахын тулд шинэ шинэ теоретик загвар өгсөн. Бид эдгээр загварын векторуудыг текстурын төвлөрүүлэлт болон SICK болон SNLI өгөгдлийн сан дээрх загварыг үнэлэх боломжтой анхаарал загвар руу оруулдаг. Бид эдгээр онцгой хүсэлтэй үг векторуудыг ашиглаж, текстур хүсэлтэй үйл ажиллагааг зөвхөн стандарт үг 2 векторуудыг ашигладаг суурь шугамнаас харьцуулж чадна. Бидний загварын төгсгөл үйл ажиллагаа урлагийн төвшинд хамгийн ойр эсвэл дээр байдаг. Гэхдээ бидний арга нь гар бүтээгдэхүүний хууль эсвэл өргөн шинжлэх ухааны төвшинд хамаагүй.', 'no': 'I denne papiret studerer vi korleis vi kan forbetra ein dyp læringstilnærming til tekstinnstillingar ved å inkludere leksiske innstillingar frå WordNet. Ideen vårt er å innebygge kjennomheten som inneheld i WordNet i spesielt lærte ordvektorar, som vi kallar « entailvektorar ». Vi presenterer eit standard neuralnettverksmodell og eit roman set- teoretisk modell for å lære disse innhaldsvektorane frå ord- par med kjende leksiske innhaldsrelasjonar frå WordNet. Vi inkluderer desse innhaldsvektorane i ein dekomponerbar oppmerksmodell for tekstinnhalding og evaluerer modellen på SICK og SNLI-datasettet. Vi finn at med disse spesielle innstillingsvectorane, kan vi forbetra utviklinga av tekstinnstillingane i sammenligning med ein grunnlinje som berre brukar standardvektorer. Den siste utviklinga av modellen vårt er nær eller over kunsttilstanden, men metoden vårt er ikkje på nokon manuelt oppretta reglar eller utvida syntaktiske funksjonar.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് വാര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും ലെക്സിക്കാലിക്കല്\u200d അറിവുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല വാര്\u200dഡ്നെറ്റിലെ ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d പരിജ്ഞാനമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യേക വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റരില്\u200d ഉള്ളതാണ് നമ്മുടെ ആശയം, അതിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിവേ വാര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d അറിവില്ലാത്ത ബന്ധങ്ങളുള്ള വാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വെക്റ്റര്\u200d ജോട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക് നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ അറിവില്ലാത്ത വെക്റ്റര്\u200dമാരെ ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d എന്റ്യൂള്\u200d അറിവില്ലാത്ത മോഡലിലേക്ക് ചേര്\u200dക്കുകയും SICK-ലെയും SNLI ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ We find that using these special entailment word vectors, we can significantly improve the performance of textual entailment compared with a baseline that uses only standard word2vec vectors.  നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ അവസാന പ്രകടനം കലാകാരത്തിന്റെ അവസ്ഥ അടുത്തോ അല്ലെങ്കിലും മുകളിലോ ആണ്, പക്ഷെ നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്ത നി', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule badamy, w jaki sposób możemy ulepszyć podejście głębokiego uczenia się do zaangażowania tekstowego poprzez włączenie relacji leksykalnych zaangażowania z WordNet. Naszym pomysłem jest osadzenie wiedzy o implikacji leksykalnej zawartej w WordNet w specjalnie nauczonych wektorach słowa, które nazywamy "wektorami implikacji". Przedstawiamy standardowy model sieci neuronowej oraz nowy model teoretyczny zbioru, aby nauczyć się tych wektorów implikacji z par słów o znanych relacjach leksykalnych pochodzących z WordNet. Ponadto włączamy te wektory implikacji do rozkładalnego modelu uwagi dla implikacji tekstowej i oceniamy model na zbiorze danych SICK i SNLI. Stwierdzimy, że używając tych specjalnych wektorów słów implikacyjnych, możemy znacznie poprawić wydajność implikacji tekstowej w porównaniu z bazą wykorzystującą tylko standardowe wektory Word2vec. Ostateczna wydajność naszego modelu jest bliska lub powyżej stanu techniki, ale nasza metoda nie opiera się na żadnych ręcznie wykonanych regułach ani rozbudowanych funkcjach składni.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru, proučavamo kako možemo poboljšati duboki pristup učenju tekstualnom uključivanju leksičkih odnosa sa WordNet a. Naša ideja je da uključimo leksičko znanje o zadovoljstvu u WordNet-u posebno naučenim vektorima riječi, koje zovemo "vektori za zadovoljstvo". Predstavljamo standardni model neuralne mreže i romanski set-teoretički model da naučimo te vektore iz parova riječi sa poznatim leksičkim odnosima iz WordNet a. Dalje uključujemo ove vektore za uključivanje u raspoređeni model pažnje za tekstualno uključivanje i procjenjujemo model na SICK i SNLI datasetu. Nalazimo da koristeći ove posebne željne reči vektore, možemo značajno poboljšati funkciju tekstualne želje u usporedbi sa početnom linijom koja koristi samo standardne rečenice 2 veka. Posljednja izvršnost našeg modela je blizu ili iznad stanja umjetnosti, ali naša metoda se ne oslanja na bilo koje pravila koje su ručno napravljene ili široke sintaktičke karakteristike.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කොහොමද අපිට WordNet වලින් ලෙක්සිකල් සංවේදනය සම්බන්ධයක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන් ගොඩ අපේ අදහසය තමයි WordNet වල තියෙන ලෙක්සිකල් ඉන්තිල්මන් දන්නවය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, විශේෂයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්ත වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් වල අපි ප්\u200dරමාණය න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයේ මොඩල් එකක් පෙන්වන්නේ සහ නිර්මාණය සෙට් සිද්ධික මොඩල් එකක් WordNet වලින් දන්න පුළුවන් ලෙක්සි අපි තවමත් මේ ඇන්තිල්ම් වෙක්ටර්ස් එක්කරනවා පාළුවන් අවධානයක් සඳහා පාළුවන් අවධානයක් සඳහා SICK සහ SNLI දත්ත සූදානය අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් මේ විශේෂ ශේෂ වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් වලින් භාවිත කරන්න, අපිට පුළුවන් විශේෂ වචන වෙක්ටර්ස් වලින අපේ මෝඩල් එකේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරමාණය යුතුයි කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා කියලා, ඒත් අපේ විධානය මුළු විදිහට හොයාගන්නේ නීති න', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, studiem modul în care putem îmbunătăți o abordare de învățare profundă a implicării textuale prin încorporarea relațiilor de implicări lexicale din WordNet. Ideea noastră este de a încorpora cunoștințele de implicare lexicală conținute în WordNet în vectori de cuvinte special învățați, pe care noi îi numim "vectori de implicare". Prezentăm un model standard de rețea neurală și un nou model teoretic set pentru a învăța acești vectori de implicare din perechile de cuvinte cu relații de implicare lexicale cunoscute derivate din WordNet. Încorporăm în continuare acești vectori de implicare într-un model de atenție decompozabil pentru implicarea textuală și evaluăm modelul pe setul de date SICK și SNLI. Considerăm că folosind acești vectori de cuvinte cu implicație specială, putem îmbunătăți semnificativ performanța implicației textuale comparativ cu o bază de referință care utilizează doar vectori standard word2vec. Performanța finală a modelului nostru este aproape sau deasupra stadiului de tehnologie, dar metoda noastră nu se bazează pe reguli realizate manual sau caracteristici sintactice extinse.', 'mt': "In this paper, we study how we can improve a deep learning approach to textual entailment by incorporating lexical entailment relations from WordNet.  L-idea tagħna hija li ninkorporaw l-għarfien dwar l-involviment lexikali li jinsab f'WordNet f'vetturi tal-kliem imgħallma b'mod speċjali, li jissejħu 'vetturi tal-involviment'. We present a standard neural network model and a novel set-theoretic model to learn these entailment vectors from word pairs with known lexical entailment relations derived from WordNet.  Aħna inkorporaw ukoll dawn il-vetturi ta’ involviment f’mudell ta’ attenzjoni dekompożibbli għall-involviment testwali u jivvalutaw il-mudell fuq is-sett tad-dejta SICK u SNLI. Aħna nsibu li bl-użu ta’ dawn il-vetturi speċjali tal-kliem ta’ involviment, nistgħu ntejbu b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni tal-involviment testwali meta mqabbel ma’ linja bażi li tuża biss vetturi standard tal-kliem 2vec. Il-prestazzjoni finali tal-mudell tagħna hija qrib jew ogħla mill-aħħar, iżda l-metodu tagħna ma jiddependix fuq l-ebda regoli maħduma manwalment jew karatteristiċi sintetiċi estensivi.", 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen studerar vi hur vi kan förbättra ett djuplärande förhållningssätt till textinvolvering genom att införliva lexikala involveringsrelationer från WordNet. Vår idé är att bädda in den lexikala involveringskunskap som finns i WordNet i speciellt lärda ordvektorer, som vi kallar "involveringsvektorer". Vi presenterar en standardmodell för neurala nätverk och en ny uppsättning-teoretisk modell för att lära sig dessa involveringsvektorer från ordpar med kända lexikala involveringsrelationer härledda från WordNet. Vidare införlivar vi dessa involveringsvektorer i en nedbrytbar uppmärksamhetsmodell för textinvolvering och utvärderar modellen på SICK och SNLI datauppsättningen. Vi finner att med hjälp av dessa speciella involveringsordvektorer kan vi avsevärt förbättra prestandan för textinvolvering jämfört med en baslinje som endast använder standard word2vec vektorer. Den slutliga prestandan av vår modell är nära eller över den senaste tekniken, men vår metod bygger inte på några manuellt utformade regler eller omfattande syntaktiska funktioner.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வார்ட்நெட்டில் இருந்து லெக்சிக்சியல் அறிவில்லாத த தொடர்புகளை சேர்த்து எவ்வாறு நாம் ஆழமான கற்றல் ம எங்கள் கருத்து வார்ட்நெட்டில் உள்ள மெக்சிகிச்சியல் அறிவில்லாத அறிவு குறிப்பிட்ட வார்த்தை வெக்டார்களில் உள்ளது, அதை நாம்  நாம் ஒரு நிலையான புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரி மற்றும் வார்ட்நெட்டிலிருந்து வந்துள்ள இந்த அறிவில்லாத வெக்டார்களிலிருந்து கற்றுக்கொ நாம் மேலும் இந்த அறியாத நெறிகளை ஒரு குறைவான கவனத்தின் மாதிரியாக சேர்த்து SICK மற்றும் SNLI தகவல் அமைப்பில் மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடு. இந்த சிறப்பு அறிவில்லாத வார்த்தை நெறிகளை பயன்படுத்தி நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம், நிரல் அறிவிப்பவரின் செயல்பாட்டை மெருக்க முடியும், அடிப் எங்கள் மாதிரியின் இறுதி செயல்பாடு கலைகளின் நிலையில் அருகிலோ அல்லது மேலோ உள்ளது, ஆனால் எங்கள் முறைமை கைமுறையாக்கப்பட்ட விதிகள் அல்லது வ', 'so': "Warqadan waxaynu ku baranaynaa sida aan u kordhin karno qaab aad u dheer waxbarasho oo aan u kordhin karno qofka aan qoraalka aqoonsan, si aan uga soo wadano xiriirka aqoonta lexicka ee WordNet. Fikiradayada waa inaan soo galno aqoonta aqoonta la'aanta ah ee WordNet ku jirta oo ku qoran wado macluumaad gaar ah oo lagu baray, kaas oo aynu u leenahay `vector aan aqoon lahayn’. Tusaale ahaan shabakadda neurada ee caadiga ah iyo qaab saxda cilmiga ah si aan uga barno wadooyinka aan aqoonin, kuwaas oo ay u leeyihiin noocyo labo ah oo la yaqaan xiriir cilmi la'aan oo ka soo baxay WordNet. Sidoo kale wadooyinka aan aqoonta lahayn waxaynu u qoraynaa tusaale adag oo aan caqli karin qoraalka, waxaana qiimeynaynaa modelka SICK iyo sawirada SNLI. Waxaynu helnaa in lagu isticmaalo wadooyinka hadalka gaarka ah oo aan aqoon lahayn, si aad ah ayaannu u beddeli karnaa tababarka qofka aqoonta dhaqanka ee qoraalka, taas oo la barbarto qoraalka hoose oo kaliya isticmaalaya vector caadiga ah 2vex oo kaliya. Sameynta ugu dambaysa ee modellkayagu waa u dhow ama ka sarreeya xaalada farshaxanka, laakiin qaababkayagu iskama saaro sharciyada ay gacanta ku shaqeeyaan ama tayooyin ballaadhan oo farsamada ah.", 'ur': "ہم اس کاغذ میں پڑھتے ہیں کہ ہم کس طرح ایک عمیق سیکھنے کا طریقہ تدریج کرسکتے ہیں جو WordNet سے لکھنے والی رابطہ شامل کرتی ہے۔ ہماری نظر یہ ہے کہ WordNet میں لکھی ہوئی زبان ویکتوروں میں لکھی ہوئی تحقیق علم میں داخل کریں، جسے ہم نے 'تحقیق ویکتوروں' بنایا ہے. ہم نے ایک استاندارڈ نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کو پیش کیا ہے اور ایک نوم سٹ تئوریٹ موڈل کو WordNet سے معلوم ہونے والی لکسیکل نیٹ رابطہ کے ساتھ سیکھنے کے لئے یہ انتظام ویکتروں کو سیکھنے کے لئے۔ ہم نے اس کے ساتھ یہ اندازہ ویکتروں کو ایک ٹیکسٹل ڈیٹسٹ کے لئے متصل ہونے کے قابل توجه کی مدل میں شامل کیا ہے اور SICK اور SNLI ڈیٹسٹ کے مدل کا ارزش کرتا ہے. ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ یہ ویکتوروں کی استعمال کرتی ہے جو ان ویکتوروں سے استعمال کرتی ہیں، ہم ایک بنسس لین کے مقابلہ میں استعمال کرتی ہیں جو صرف استاندارڈ ویکتوروں کو استعمال کرتی ہے۔ ہمارے مدل کی آخری فعالیت هنر کی حالت کے قریب یا اوپر ہے، لیکن ہمارا طریقہ کسی طریقے سے بنایا ہوا قانون یا پھیلا سینٹاکیٹیک فعالیت پر اعتماد نہیں کرتا.", 'vi': "Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu làm thế nào để cải thiện cách học hỏi sâu sắc về kết cấu bằng cách nhập vào các mối quan hệ ngôn ngữ từ WordNet. Ý tưởng của chúng ta là tác động hoá từ ngữ trong WordNet ở những từ trường trung học đặc biệt, nơi mà chúng ta gọi là'ẩm ướt'. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mạng thần kinh tiêu chuẩn và một mô hình mới định lí thiết lập để học những sinh vật có tính khí này từ cặp từ ngữ với các quan hệ nộp tiếp xúc ngôn ngữ được biết đến từ WordNet. Chúng tôi thêm những phương tiện này vào một mô hình chú ý bị phân hủy về kết cấu và đánh giá mô hình về SICK và bộ dữ liệu SNCC. Chúng tôi tìm thấy rằng sử dụng những môi trường có tính khí đặc biệt này, chúng tôi có thể tăng hiệu quả của tỷ lệ kết cấu với một đường cơ bản chỉ sử dụng các véc- tơ tiêu chuẩn. Tác phẩm cuối cùng của mô-đun này gần hay cao hơn trạng thái nghệ thuật, nhưng phương pháp này không dựa vào các quy tắc tự làm hay các tính năng cú pháp rộng rãi.", 'uz': 'Bu qogʻozda, biz WordNetdan qanday o\'rganish muvaffaqiyatli texnologiyaning o\'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarini o\'rganish mumkin deb o\'rganamiz. Bizning fikrimiz, WordNetda o\'rganilgan o\'rganilgan so\'zlar vektorlariga o\'rganish uchun o\'ylab keladi, bu "ilmiy vektorlar" deb ataymiz. Biz Andoza neyrol tarmoq modeli va novel teoretik modelini o\'rganamiz va bu ilmiy vektori so\'zlardan o\'rganish uchun o\'z so\'zlaridan o\'rganamiz. Name Biz bu ilmiy vektorlarni matn ilmiy tizim modeliga qo\'yish va SICK va SNLI maʼlumotlar tizimini qiymatmiz. Biz shu maxsus ilmiy so\'zlar vektoridan foydalanishimiz mumkin, biz faqat andoza soʻzlarni ishlatish mumkin. Modemizning oxirgi bajarishi sanat holatida yoki eng yuqori, lekin bizning usuli qoʻlbola qoʻllanmagan qoidalar yoki kengaytirilgan sintaktik xususiyatlariga ishlatmaydi.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия изследваме как можем да подобрим подхода за дълбоко учене към текстовото обвързване чрез включване на лексикални обвързващи връзки от WordNet. Нашата идея е да вградим лексикалното знание за обвързване, съдържащо се в специално научени словесни вектори, които наричаме "вектори на обвързване". Представяме стандартен модел на невронна мрежа и нов набор-теоретичен модел за изучаване на тези вектори на обвързване от думични двойки с известни лексикални обвързвания, получени от WordNet. Освен това включваме тези вектори на обвързване в разглобяем модел на внимание за текстово обвързване и оценяваме модела на набора от данни. Установяваме, че използвайки тези специални вектори на думата за обвързване, можем значително да подобрим ефективността на текстовото обвързване в сравнение с базова линия, която използва само стандартни вектори. Крайното представяне на нашия модел е близо до или над най-съвременните технологии, но методът ни не разчита на ръчно изработени правила или обширни синтактични функции.', 'da': "I denne artikel undersøger vi, hvordan vi kan forbedre en deep learning tilgang til tekstinvolvering ved at indarbejde leksikalske involveringsrelationer fra WordNet. Vores idé er at integrere den leksikske involveringsviden indeholdt i WordNet i specielt lærte ordvektorer, som vi kalder 'involveringsvektorer'. Vi præsenterer en standard neural netværksmodel og en ny sætteteoretisk model for at lære disse involveringsvektorer fra ordpar med kendte leksikale involveringsrelationer afledt af WordNet. Vi indarbejder yderligere disse involveringsvektorer i en nedbrydelig opmærksomhedsmodel for tekstinvolvering og evaluerer modellen på SICK og SNLI datasættet. Vi finder ud af, at ved hjælp af disse særlige involveringsordvektorer, kan vi betydeligt forbedre ydeevnen af tekst involvering sammenlignet med en baseline, der kun bruger standard word2vec vektorer. Den endelige ydeevne af vores model er tæt på eller over den nyeste teknologi, men vores metode er ikke afhængig af nogen manuelt fremstillede regler eller omfattende syntaktiske funktioner.", 'nl': "In dit artikel bestuderen we hoe we een deep learning benadering van tekstuele implicatie kunnen verbeteren door lexicale implicatierelaties uit WordNet op te nemen. Ons idee is om de lexicale inhoudskennis in WordNet te integreren in speciaal aangeleerde woordvectoren, die we 'implicatievectoren' noemen. We presenteren een standaard neuraal netwerkmodel en een nieuw set-theoretisch model om deze implicatievectoren te leren van woordparen met bekende lexicale implicatierelaties afgeleid van WordNet. We verwerken deze implicatievectoren verder in een decomposeerbaar attentiemodel voor tekstuele implicatie en evalueren het model op de SICK en de SNLI dataset. We vinden dat we met behulp van deze speciale implication woordvectoren de prestaties van tekstuele implication aanzienlijk kunnen verbeteren in vergelijking met een baseline die alleen standaard word2vec vectoren gebruikt. De uiteindelijke prestaties van ons model liggen dicht bij of boven de stand van de techniek, maar onze methode is niet afhankelijk van handmatig vervaardigde regels of uitgebreide syntactische functies.", 'id': "In this paper, we study how we can improve a deep learning approach to textual entailment by incorporating lexical entailment relations from WordNet.  Our idea is to embed the lexical entailment knowledge contained in WordNet in specially-learned word vectors, which we call 'entailment vectors.'  Kami mempersembahkan model jaringan saraf standar dan model set-teoretis novel untuk belajar vektor entailment ini dari pasangan kata dengan hubungan entailment lexik dikenal yang berasal dari WordNet. Kami lebih lanjut memasukkan vektor-vektor ini ke dalam model perhatian yang dekomposibel untuk penyelesaian teks dan mengevaluasi model di SICK dan dataset SNLI. We find that using these special entailment word vectors, we can significantly improve the performance of textual entailment compared with a baseline that uses only standard word2vec vectors.  The final performance of our model is close to or above the state of the art, but our method does not rely on any manually-crafted rules or extensive syntactic features.", 'hr': 'U ovom papiru, proučavamo kako možemo poboljšati duboki pristup učenju tekstualnoj uključivanju leksičkih odnosa sa WordNet a. Naša ideja je da uključimo leksičke znanje o zadovoljstvu sadržane u WordNetu u posebno naučenim vektorima riječi, koje zovemo "vektori za zadovoljstvo". Predstavljamo standardni model neuralne mreže i nov set-teorijski model kako bi naučili te vektore za zadovoljstvo iz parova riječi s poznatim leksičkim odnosima iz WordNet a. Dodatno uključujemo te vektore uključujući u raspoređeni model pažnje za tekstualno uključenje i procjenjujemo model na SICK i SNLI datasetu. Nalazimo da koristeći ove posebne željne riječi vektore, možemo značajno poboljšati učinkovitost tekstualne želje u usporedbi s početnom linijom koja koristi samo standardne vektore rečenice 2vec. Posljednja učinka našeg modela je blizu ili iznad stanja umjetnosti, ali naša metoda se ne oslanja na bilo koje pravila koje su ručno napravljene ili široke sintaktičke funkcije.', 'ko': "본고에서 우리는WordNet의 어휘 함축 관계를 통합함으로써 텍스트 함축의 심도 있는 학습 방법을 개선하는 방법을 연구했다.WordNet에 포함된 어휘 함축 지식을 전문적으로 학습하는 어휘 벡터에 삽입하는 것이 우리의 생각이다. 이를 '함축 벡터' 라고 부른다우리는 표준적인 신경 네트워크 모델과 새로운 집합론 모델을 제시하여 단어 쌍에서 이러한 함축 벡터를 배웠다. 이 단어들은 워드넷에서 온 이미 알고 있는 어휘 함축 관계를 가지고 있다.우리는 이러한 내포된 벡터를 텍스트에 내포된 분해 가능한 주의 모델에 통합시키고 SICK와 SNLI 데이터 집합에서 이 모델을 평가한다.우리는 표준word2vec 벡터만 사용하는 기선에 비해 이런 특수한 함축어 벡터를 사용하면 텍스트 함축의 성능을 현저히 높일 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.우리 모델의 최종 성능은 가장 선진적인 수준에 가깝거나 높지만, 우리의 방법은 수동으로 작성된 규칙이나 광범위한 문법 특징에 의존하지 않는다.", 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir, wie wir einen Deep-Learning-Ansatz für textuelle Einbeziehung verbessern können, indem wir lexikalische Einbeziehungsbeziehungen aus WordNet integrieren. Unsere Idee ist es, das in WordNet enthaltene lexikalische Implementierungswissen in speziell erlernte Wortvektoren einzubetten, die wir "Implementierungsvektoren" nennen. Wir präsentieren ein Standard-neuronales Netzwerkmodell und ein neuartiges Set-Theoretisches Modell, um diese Implementierungsvektoren aus Wortpaaren mit bekannten lexikalischen Implementierungsbeziehungen zu lernen, die aus WordNet abgeleitet sind. Wir integrieren diese Implementierungsvektoren weiter in ein zerlegbares Aufmerksamkeitsmodell für textuelle Implementierungen und evaluieren das Modell auf dem SICK- und SNLI-Datensatz. Wir stellen fest, dass wir mit diesen speziellen Implementierungs-Wortvektoren die Leistung von textuellen Implementierungen im Vergleich zu einer Baseline, die nur Standard-Word2vec-Vektoren verwendet, signifikant verbessern können. Die endgültige Leistung unseres Modells liegt nahe oder über dem Stand der Technik, aber unsere Methode beruht nicht auf manuell erstellten Regeln oder umfangreichen syntaktischen Funktionen.', 'sw': "In this paper, we study how we can improve a deep learning approach to textual entailment by incorporating lexical entailment relations from WordNet.  Wazo letu ni kuingiza maarifa ya maarifa ya kisaikolojia yaliyopo kwenye WordNet katika vectors za maneno yanayojifunza maalum, ambazo tunaita 'vectors wasiofahamu'. Tunaweza kutengeneza muundo wa mtandao wa kawaida wa neurali na modeli yenye seti ya kitamaduni ili kujifunza vectors hawa wasiofahamu kutoka kwa maneno yanayojulikana na mahusiano yanayotokana na WordNet. Tunaweza kuunganisha vector hizi zisizoeleweka katika mtindo wa kutojali kwa ajili ya watu wasiofahamika na kutathmini mtindo wa SICK na seti ya taarifa za SNLI. Tunapata kwamba kwa kutumia vectori hizi za neno maalum zisizoeleweka, tunaweza kuboresha ufanisi wa maarufu wa msingi ukilinganishwa na mstari wa msingi unaotumia vectori za dunia 2 tu za kawaida. Utendaji wa mwisho wa mifano yetu unakaribia au zaidi ya hali ya sanaa, lakini mbinu yetu haitegemea sheria zote zinazotumiwa mikononi au vipengele vya viungo vya usawa.", 'af': 'In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons hoe ons \'n diep leer toegang kan verbeter tot tekstuele aanhouding deur die inkorporeer van leksiese aanhouding van WordNet. Ons idee is om die leksiese inhaling kennis in WordNet in spesiaal leer woord vektore te inbêer, wat ons noem "inhaling vektore". Ons stel \'n standaard neuralnetwerk model en \'n roman set- theoretic model om hierdie betaling vektore te leer van woorde paar met bekende leksiese verhouding van WordNet afgeleide. Ons inkorporeer hierdie inkorporeerde vektore in \'n afgekomporeerde aandag model vir tekstuele aanhouding en evalueer die model op die SICK en die SNLI datastel. Ons vind dat gebruik hierdie spesiale betaling woord vektores, kan ons betekenlik die prestasie van tekstuele betaling vergelyk met \'n basislien wat slegs standaard woorde 2vektore gebruik. Die eindelike effektuur van ons model is naby of bo die staat van die kuns, maar ons metode vertrou nie op enige manueel gebreekte reëls of uitbreidige sintaktiske funksies nie.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, WordNet-iň leksiýa düşen baglaşyklaryny we çykyş öwrenmegi nähili gowurap biljegimizi öwrenýärdik. Bizim fikrimiz WordNet'de özellikle öğrenmiş kelime vektörlerine sahip olan leksik ölçü bilgilerini integrlemektir. - Biz bu çözüm vektörleri WordNet'den gelen bilimli leksik içmeleri bilen kelimelerden öğrenmek için standart bir nöral a ğ modelini ve roman taýýarlanmış teoretik modelini sunuyoruz. Biz bu dahil vektörleri tekst çözümlenmesi için paylaşılabilir bir uzmanlık modelini SICK ve SNLI veri setinde değerlendiriyoruz. Bu özel kelime vektörleri kullanarak, sadece standart kelime vektörleri ile karşılaştırıp, tekst ölçülerinin eserini geliştirebiliriz. - Biziň nusgamyzyň iň soňky ukyplarymyz sungatyň durumyna ýakyn ýa-da üstünde, ýöne biziň metodamyz hiç hili el döredilmiş kurallara ýa-da bütin syntaktik möhümlere ynanmaýar.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مطالعه می\u200cکنیم که چگونه می\u200cتوانیم روش یادگیری عمیق را به ارتباط متن تحصیل کنیم با توجه به ارتباط\u200cهای ارتباط زبانی از WordNet. ایده\u200cی ما این است که دانش\u200cهایی که در WordNet دارند در ویکتور\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای ویکتور\u200cهای ویکتور\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای آموزش می\u200cکنند، که ما به آن می\u200cگوییم «ویکتور\u200cهای تحمل». ما یک مدل شبکه عصبی استاندارد را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و یک مدل اصلی نظریه را برای یاد گرفتن این ویکتورها از جفت\u200cهای کلمه با ارتباط\u200cهای زبان شناخته شده از WordNet. ما این ویکتورها را در یک مدل توجه قابل تغییر قابل تغییر قابل توجه برای تغییر متن و مدل را در سیCK و مجموعه داده SNLI ارزیابی می کنیم. ما با استفاده از این ویکتورهای کلمه ویژه\u200cای استفاده می\u200cکنیم، می\u200cتوانیم عملکرد متن را در مقایسه با خط بنیادی که تنها ویکتورهای استاندارد ۲vek استفاده می\u200cکند بهتر کنیم. آخرین عملکرد مدل ما به وضعیت هنر نزدیک یا بالاتر است، ولی روش ما بر هیچ قوانینی که به دست ساخته شده یا ویژه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک بسیار زیادی اعتماد ندارد.', 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት፣ ከWordNet የሌክሲካዊ የውይይት ግንኙነት ለመቀናቀል እንዴት ጥልቅ ትምህርት ማድረግ እናስተምራለን፡፡ አሳባታችን በWordNet ውስጥ ባለው የስህተት ማወቂያ እውቀት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የአሁኑን የናውሬል መረብ ሞዴል እና የዘላለም የtheoretic a ሞዴል እና ከWordNet የተወለደውን የሌክሲካዊ የውይይት ግንኙነት የሚታወቁ የቃላት ነጥቦች እናስተማራለን፡፡ እነዚህን የማታውቁ vectors ለጽሑፍ ማወቅ እና በSICK እና SNLI ዳታ ማተሚያ ሞዴል እናስተካክላለን፡፡ እነዚህን የተለየ የቃላት መቃኛ vectors በመጠቀም እናገኘዋለን፣ የጽሑፍ ማውቀትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሞዴል ፍጻሜ የዐርድ ግንኙነት ቅርብ ወይም በላይ ነው፤ ግን ዘዴያችን በእጃቸው በተደረገው ሕግ ወይም በተሰፋው ስልጣኖች ላይ አይደገፍም።', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne studiojmë se si mund të përmirësojmë një qasje mësimi të thellë për përfshirjen tekstuale duke përfshirë marrëdhëniet lexike të përfshirjes nga WordNet. Ideja jonë është të përfshijmë njohurinë lexike të përfshirë në WordNet në vektorët e fjalëve të mësuar veçanërisht, të cilët ne e quajmë "vektorët e përfshirjes." Ne prezantojmë një model standard rrjeti nervor dhe një model të ri set-teoretik për të mësuar këto vektorë përfshirje nga pallat e fjalëve me marrëdhënie të njohura lexike përfshirje të nxjerrë nga WordNet. Ne përfshijmë më tej këto vektorë të përfshirjes në një model vëmendjeje të dekompozueshme për përfshirje tekstuale dhe vlerësojmë modelin në SICK dhe të dhënat SNLI. Ne zbulojmë se duke përdorur këto vektorë të veçantë fjalësh të përfshirjes, ne mund të përmirësojmë ndjeshëm performancën e përfshirjes tekstuale krahasuar me një bazë që përdor vetëm vektorë standard word2vec. Performanca përfundimtare e modelit tonë është afër apo mbi gjendjen e artit, por metoda jonë nuk mbështetet në asnjë rregull të ndërtuar manualisht apo karakteristika të gjerë sintaktike.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru, proučavamo kako možemo poboljšati duboki pristup učenju tekstualnom uključivanju leksičkih odnosa sa WordNet a. Naša ideja je da uključimo znanje o leksičkoj integraciji sadržane u WordNet-u posebno naučenim vektorima riječi, koje zovemo "vektori za uključenje". Predstavljamo standardni model neuralne mreže i romanski set-teoretički model kako bi naučili te vektore iz parova riječi sa poznatim leksičkim odnosima iz WordNet a. Dodatno uključujemo ove vektore uključivanja u model razmjenjivanja pažnje za tekstualno uključenje i procjenjujemo model na SICK i SNLI datasetu. Nalazimo da koristeći ove posebne željne riječi vektore, možemo značajno poboljšati učinkovitost tekstualne želje u usporedbi sa početnom linijom koja koristi samo standardne rečenice 2veka. Posljednja učinka našeg modela je blizu ili iznad stanja umjetnosti, ali naša metoda se ne oslanja na bilo koje pravila koje su ručno napravljene ili široke sintaktičke funkcije.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե ինչպես կարող ենք բարելավել խորը ուսումնասիրության մոտեցումը տեքստալ ներգրավման հետ WordNet-ից ներառելով լեքսիկական ներգրավման հարաբերությունները: Մեր գաղափարն այն է, որ WordNet-ում գտնվող լեքսիկական ներգրավման գիտելիքները ներգրավվեն հատուկ սովորված բառերի վեկտորների մեջ, որոնց մենք անվանում ենք "ներգրավման վեկտորներ": We present a standard neural network model and a novel set-theoretic model to learn these entailment vectors from word pairs with known lexical entailment relations derived from WordNet.  We further incorporate these entailment vectors into a decomposable attention model for textual entailment and evaluate the model on the SICK and the SNLI dataset.  Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ օգտագործելով այս հատուկ ներգրավման բառերի վեկտորները, մենք կարող ենք նշանակալի բարելավել տեքստային ներգրավման արդյունքը համեմատած հիմքի հետ, որը օգտագործում է միայն ստանդարտ բառերի 2վեկտորներ: The final performance of our model is close to or above the state of the art, but our method does not rely on any manually-crafted rules or extensive syntactic features.', 'az': "Bu kağızda, WordNet-dən leksik məclislərini birləşdirərək, çətin öyrənmə metodlarını necə yaxşılaşdıra bilərik. Bizim fikrimiz WordNet içində olanı özlərinə öyrənmiş kelimelər vektörlərinə yerləşdirməkdir. Bu da 'çətin vektörləri' deyir. Biz standart nöral a ğ modelini və WordNet tərəfindən əlaqələri olan söz çiftlərindən öyrənmək üçün yeni set-theoretic modelini göstəririk. Biz bu məlumat vektörlərini textual entallation modeli ilə daxil edirik və SICK və SNLI veri quruluğunun modelini değerləşdiririk. Biz bu xüsusi söz vektörlərini istifadə edirik ki, textual entallığın performansını ancaq standart sözləri 2vec vektörlərini istifadə edir. Bizim modelimizin son performansı sanatın durumu yaxındır və ya üstündür, amma bizim metodumuz heç bir əlində yaratdığı kurallara və geniş sintaktik fərqlərə təvəkkül etmir.", 'ca': "En aquest paper estudiem com podem millorar un enfocament d'aprenentatge profund a l'involucració textual incorporant relacions d'involucració lexical de WordNet. Our idea is to embed the lexical entailment knowledge contained in WordNet in specially-learned word vectors, which we call 'entailment vectors.'  Presentam un model de xarxa neural estàndard i un nou model teòric per aprendre aquests vectors d'involucració a partir de parelles de paraules amb relacions conegudes d'involucració lexical derivades de WordNet. We further incorporate these entailment vectors into a decomposable attention model for textual entailment and evaluate the model on the SICK and the SNLI dataset.  Trobem que utilitzant aquests vectors especials de paraules d'involucració, podem millorar significativament el rendiment de l'involucració textual en comparació amb una base basal que només utilitza vectors standard de paraules 2vec. L'actuació final del nostre model està prop o més enllà de l'estat de l'art, però el nostre mètode no es basa en normes artificials manualment ni en característiques sinàctiques extenses.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime, kuidas me saame parandada sügavõppe lähenemisviisi tekstilisele kaasamisele, kaasates WordNeti leksikaalsed kaasamissuhted. Meie idee on integreerida WordNetis sisalduvad leksikaalsed kaasamisteadmised spetsiaalselt õppitud sõnavaktoritesse, mida me nimetame kaasamisvektoriteks. Tutvustame standardset närvivõrgu mudelit ja uudset hulgateoreetilist mudelit, et õppida neid seotusvektoreid WordNetist tuletatud teadaolevate leksikaalsete seotussuhetega sõnapaaridest. Lisaks lisame need kaasamisvektorid tekstilise kaasamise dekomponeeritavasse tähelepanu mudelisse ning hindame mudelit SICK ja SNLI andmekogumil. Leiame, et kasutades neid spetsiaalseid kaasamissõna vektoreid, saame märkimisväärselt parandada tekstilise kaasamise jõudlust võrreldes lähtetasemega, mis kasutab ainult standardseid Word2vec vektoreid. Meie mudeli lõplik jõudlus on tehnika tasemele lähedal või kõrgemal tasemel, kuid meie meetod ei tugine käsitsi valmistatud reeglitele ega ulatuslikele süntaktilistele funktsioonidele.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku studujeme, jak můžeme zlepšit hluboké učení přístup k textové implikaci začleněním lexikálních implikačních relací z WordNet. Naší myšlenkou je vložit lexikální znalosti obsažené ve WordNet do speciálně učených slovních vektorů, které nazýváme "implikční vektory". Představujeme standardní model neuronové sítě a nový model množinové teorie pro naučení těchto implikčních vektorů ze slovních párů se známými lexikálními implikčními vztahy odvozenými z WordNet. Tyto implikční vektory dále začleníme do dekompozičního modelu pozornosti pro textovou implikaci a vyhodnocujeme model na SICK a SNLI datové sadě. Zjišťujeme, že pomocí těchto speciálních implikačních slovních vektorů můžeme výrazně zlepšit výkon textového implikace ve srovnání se základní linií, která používá pouze standardní Word2vec vektory. Konečný výkon našeho modelu je blízký nebo nad nejmodernějším stavem techniky, ale naše metoda nespoléhá na ručně vytvořená pravidla nebo rozsáhlé syntaktické vlastnosti.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme, miten voimme parantaa syvällistä oppimista tekstien osallistamiseen sisällyttämällä WordNetin sanastollisia osallisuussuhteita. Ajatuksemme on upottaa WordNetin sisältämä sanastollinen sidonnaisuustieto erityisesti opittuihin sanavektoreihin, joita kutsumme sidonnaisuusvektoreiksi. Esittelemme standardineuroverkkomallin ja uudenlaisen joukkoteoreettisen mallin, jonka avulla voimme oppia näitä implikaatiovektoreita WordNetistä johdetuista sanapareista. Lisäksi yhdistämme nämä inklosaatiovektorit tekstuaalisen inklosaation huomiomalliin ja arvioimme mallin SICK- ja SNLI-aineistosta. Havaitsemme, että käyttämällä näitä erityisiä implement-sanavektoreita voimme merkittävästi parantaa tekstuaalisen implementin suorituskykyä verrattuna perusaikatauluun, jossa käytetään vain tavallisia word2vec-vektoreita. Mallimme lopullinen suorituskyky on lähellä tai yläpuolella tekniikan tasoa, mutta menetelmämme ei perustu käsin tehtyihin sääntöihin tai laajoihin syntaktisiin ominaisuuksiin.', 'bn': "এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শিক্ষা করছি কিভাবে আমরা কিভাবে ভালো শিক্ষার পদক্ষেপ উন্নত করতে পারি যা ওয়ার্ডনেট থেকে লেক্সিক্সিকাল বিজ্ঞানী আমাদের চিন্তা হচ্ছে ওয়ার্ডনেটে লেক্সিক্সিয়াল বিজ্ঞানের জ্ঞান বিশেষ শিক্ষিত শব্দ ভেক্টরের মধ্যে রয়েছে, যাকে আমরা ডাকি 'জ আমরা একটি স্ট্যান্ডার্ড নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল উপস্থাপন করি এবং একটি উপন্যাস সেট-থিওরিটিক মডেল দেখাচ্ছি শব্দের জোড়া থেকে এগুলো শিখতে যারা ওয়ার We further incorporate these entailment vectors into a decomposable attention model for textual entailment and evaluate the model on the SICK and the SNLI dataset.  আমরা খুঁজে পেয়েছি যে এই বিশেষ বিশেষ বিজ্ঞানী শব্দ ভেক্টর ব্যবহার করে আমরা টেক্সচুয়াল বিজ্ঞানের প্রদর্শনের তুলনায় গুরুত্বপূর্ণ করে দিতে পা আমাদের মডেলের শেষ প্রভাব শিল্পের পরিস্থিতির কাছাকাছি অথবা তার চেয়ে বেশী, কিন্তু আমাদের পদ্ধতি নিয়ে নির্ভর করে না কোন নিয়ম বা বি", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו לומדים איך אנחנו יכולים לשפר גישה למידה עמוקה למערכת טקסטולית על ידי שילום יחסים למערכת טקסטולוגיה מוורדנט. הרעיון שלנו הוא להכניס את הידע הלקסי של התעסקות שנמצא בוורדנט בוקטורים מילים ללמודים במיוחד, שאנחנו קוראים לו "ווקטורים של התעסקות". אנחנו מציגים מודל רשת עצבית סטנדרטית ומודל סט-תיאורטי חדש ללמוד את הוקטורים הקשורים האלה מזוגות מילים אנו מכילים עוד את הוקטורים הקשורים האלה למודל תשומת לב מקוmposable עבור הקשור טקסטלי ולעריך את המודל על SICK וסט הנתונים SNLI. אנו מוצאים שבשימוש בוקטורי מילים מיוחדים אלה, אנו יכולים לשפר באופן משמעותי את ביצועי הקשור בהשוואה לבסיס אשר משתמש רק בוקטורי מילים סטנדרטיים 2vec. ההופעה הסופית של המודל שלנו קרובה או מעל מצב האומנות, אך השיטה שלנו לא תלוי בכלל על חוקים מיוצרים ידנית או תכונות סינטקטיים רחבות.', 'ha': 'Daga wannan takardan, Munã karanta yadda za mu ƙara wani matsayi mai ƙaranci zuwa ma\'abũcin littãfi da za\'a haɗa danganiyar da aka sani na littãfi daga wordNet. Kayinmu na shiga ilmin da ba\'a sani ba a cikin wordNet na cikin masu da aka sanar masu hushi da masu jama\'a masu jama\'a, da sune "masu shiryuwa da ba\'a sani ba." Tuna gabatar da wani misali na\'urar neural da wani misali mai daidaita matsayi da aka sanar da waɗannan shiryori masu sani daga maganar sau biyu da aka sani cewa masu danganta na fassarar mutane na kasa daga wordNet. Za iya ƙara, za\'a haɗi waɗannan masu sakan da ba\'a sani ba zuwa wani motel mai kwamfyuta wa masu sani na rubutu kuma Mu ƙaddara motel kan shirin SCK da tsarin SNLI. Tuna gane cewa, da za mu yi amfani da waɗannan masu sakan maganar masu sani ba, za\'a iya kyautata aikin wanda aka sani na matsayi kuma a sami da wani layin da ke amfani da shiryoyi na tsayi kawai. Ganin kammala shawarar misalinmu yana kusa ko kuma yana bisa halin sanar, kuma hanyonmu ba ta dõgara ga kowane kanuni da hannayenmu ko wasu tsarin sigarin da ke faɗi.', 'sk': 'V prispevku preučujemo, kako lahko izboljšamo pristop globokega učenja k besedilni vključenosti z vključevanjem leksikalnih vključenosti iz WordNeta. Naša ideja je vključiti leksikalno znanje o implikaciji, ki ga vsebuje WordNet, v posebej učene besedne vektorje, ki jih imenujemo"vektorji implikacije". Predstavljamo standardni model nevronskega omrežja in nov množično teoretični model za učenje teh vektorjev implikacije iz besednih parov z znanimi leksikalnimi relacijami implikacije, ki izhajajo iz WordNeta. Te vektorje vključujemo v razgradljiv model pozornosti besedilnega vključevanja in ocenimo model na naboru podatkov SICK in SNLI. Ugotavljamo, da lahko s pomočjo teh posebnih vektorjev besedne implemente bistveno izboljšamo učinkovitost besedilne implemente v primerjavi z osnovno osnovo, ki uporablja samo standardne vektorje word2vec. Končna zmogljivost našega modela je blizu ali nad najsodobnejšim, vendar naša metoda ne temelji na ročno izdelanih pravilih ali obsežnih sintaktičnih funkcijah.', 'jv': 'Nang paper iki, kita isih saben piye basa awak dhéwé iso nglanggar tarjamah dumbu kanggo nggawe gerakan seneng nggawe gerakan luwih saben nggawe gerakan luwih basa luwih apik lan word net. Awakdhéwé punika ingkang dipun ajeng langgambar luwih saben nggambar kelas nang Word net nang vector-awak dhéwé, sing nyimpen "entailment vectors". We present a Standard Neral network model and a new set-theoretical model to Learn this entailment vectors from word parts with the known lectucal entailment ratio from words net. text-tool-action bookmark Laptop" and "Desktop', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གི་སློབ་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཇི་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་ཤིག་ཡོད། Our idea is to embed the lexical entailment knowledge contained in WordNet in specially-learned word vectors, which we call "entailment vectors". We present a standard neural network model and a novel set-theoretic model to learn these entailment vectors from word pairs with known lexical entailment relations derived from WordNet. ང་ཚོས་ཕར་ཆེན་རྐྱེན་འདི་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེའི་ཡིག་ཚན་བཙུགས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་ SICK དང་ SNLI སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲི ང་ཚོས་འདི་དག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་བཤད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་སྤྱོད་པའི་ནང་འཁོད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྒྱུན་གྱི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་འདི་ཚོ་ཡང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་བཏུབ་པས། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབུགས་ཀྱི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ནི་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐོ་བོ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Joint Learning from Labeled and Unlabeled Data for Information Retrieval', 'ar': 'التعلم المشترك من البيانات المصنفة وغير المصنفة لاسترجاع المعلومات', 'fr': "Apprentissage conjoint des données étiquetées et non étiquetées pour la récupération d'informations", 'es': 'Aprendizaje conjunto de datos etiquetados y no etiquetados para la recuperación de información', 'pt': 'Aprendizado conjunto de dados rotulados e não rotulados para recuperação de informações', 'ja': '情報検索のためのラベル付きデータとラベルなしデータからの共同学習', 'zh': '从标记及未标数合学以信息检索之', 'hi': 'सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति के लिए लेबल और अनलेबल डेटा से संयुक्त सीखना', 'ru': 'Совместное обучение на основе маркированных и немаркированных данных для извлечения информации', 'ga': 'Comhfhoghlaim ó Shonraí Lipéadaithe agus Neamhlipéadaithe le haghaidh Aisghabhála Faisnéise', 'ka': 'ინფორმაციის მიღებისთვის დამატებული მასწავლება', 'el': 'Κοινή μάθηση από δεδομένα με ετικέτα και χωρίς σήμανση για την ανάκτηση πληροφοριών', 'hu': 'Közös tanulás a címkézett és címke nélküli adatokból az információ lekéréséhez', 'it': 'Apprendimento congiunto da dati etichettati e non etichettati per il recupero delle informazioni', 'kk': 'Мәліметті алу үшін белгіленген және жазылмаған деректерден біріктіру', 'mk': 'Заедничко учење од означени и неозначени податоци за добивање информации', 'lt': 'Bendras mokymasis iš pažymėtų ir nesupažymėtų informacijos gavimo duomenų', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Bersama-sama Dari Data DiLabel dan Tidak DiLabel untuk Penerimaan Maklumat', 'mn': 'Joint Learning from Labeled and Unlabeled Data for Information Retrieval', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Konġunt minn Dejta Tikkettata u Mhux Tikkettata biex tinkiseb l-Informazzjoni', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ലേബെല്\u200dഡില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂട്ടുക', 'no': 'Kopla til læring frå merkelappe og ubeabelte data for informasjonshenting', 'ro': 'Învățare comună din date etichetate și fără etichete pentru recuperarea informațiilor', 'pl': 'Wspólne uczenie się z danych oznakowanych i nieoznakowanych w celu uzyskania informacji', 'sr': 'Zajedničko učenje iz označenih i neoznačenih podataka za prikupljanje informacija', 'so': 'Waxbarashada wadajirka ah ee Labeled and Unlabeled Data for Information Retrieval', 'sv': 'Gemensamt lärande från märkta och obemärkta data för informationshämtning', 'ta': 'விளக்கச்சீட்டிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொண்டுள்ள தகவல்', 'si': 'තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා ලේබල් කරලා නැති තොරතුරු ඉගෙනගන්න', 'ur': 'معلومات حاصل کرنے کے لئے لابلی اور بغیرقابل معلومات', 'uz': '@ info', 'vi': 'Phát hành chung từ dữ liệu đã dán nhãn và chưa được dán', 'bg': 'Съвместно обучение от етикетирани и неетикетирани данни за извличане на информация', 'nl': 'Gezamenlijk leren van geëtiketteerde en niet-geëtiketteerde gegevens voor het ophalen van informatie', 'hr': 'Zajedničko učenje iz označenih i neoznačenih podataka za prikupljanje informacija', 'da': 'Fælles læring fra mærkede og uheldige data til informationsindsamling', 'de': 'Gemeinsames Lernen aus gekennzeichneten und nicht gekennzeichneten Daten zur Informationsbeschaffung', 'id': 'Pempelajaran Bersama-sama Dari Data DiLabel dan Tidak DiLabel untuk Penerimaan Informasi', 'ko': '정보 검색에서 표기된 데이터와 표기되지 않은 데이터의 연합 학습', 'fa': 'همراه یادگیری از داده\u200cهای برگزیده و نامزده\u200cای برای بازیابی اطلاعات', 'sw': 'Kujifunza pamoja kutoka Labeled and Unlabeled Data for Retrieving Information', 'tr': 'Maglumaty gaýd etmek üçin etilen we ýazylmakdan öwrenmek üçin Goşul', 'sq': 'Mësim i përbashkët nga të dhënat e etiketuara dhe të paetiketuara për marrjen e informacionit', 'am': 'Labeled and Unlabeled Data for Information Retrieval', 'bn': 'তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধারের জন্য লেবেল এবং অসম্ভব তথ্য থেকে শিক্ষা যুক্ত করুন', 'az': 'Malümatı almaq üçün etiketli və əlavə edilməmiş məlumatdan öyrənmək', 'ca': 'Aprendiment conjunt de dades etiquetades i no etiquetades per obtenir informació', 'cs': 'Společné učení z označených a neoznačených dat pro získávání informací', 'hy': 'Տեղեկություն ստանալու համար նշուշված և աննշուշված տվյալներից միասին սովորելը', 'af': 'Aangesluit Leer van Beteker en Onabelde Data vir Informasie Ontvange', 'et': 'Ühine õppimine märgistatud ja märgistamata andmetest teabe hankimiseks', 'fi': 'Yhteinen oppiminen merkityistä ja merkitsemättömistä tiedoista tiedonkeruuta varten', 'bs': 'Zajedničko učenje iz označenih i neoznačenih podataka za prikupljanje informacija', 'jv': 'Join', 'sk': 'Skupno učenje iz označenih in neoznačenih podatkov za pridobivanje informacij', 'he': 'Joint Learning from Labeled and Unlabeled Data for Information Retrieval', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་བྱས་ཟིན་པའི་དང་ཁ་བྱང་མེད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལེན་པར་སྐྱོད་བྱེད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུད་པ'}
{'en': 'Recently, a significant number of studies have focused on neural information retrieval (IR) models. One category of works use unlabeled data to train general word embeddings based on term proximity, which can be integrated into traditional IR models. The other category employs labeled data (e.g. click-through data) to train end-to-end neural IR models consisting of layers for target-specific representation learning. The latter idea accounts better for the IR task and is favored by recent research works, which is the one we will follow in this paper. We hypothesize that general semantics learned from unlabeled data can complement task-specific representation learned from labeled data of limited quality, and that a combination of the two is favorable. To this end, we propose a learning framework which can benefit from both labeled and more abundant unlabeled data for representation learning in the context of IR. Through a joint learning fashion in a single neural framework, the learned representation is optimized to minimize both the supervised loss on query-document matching and the unsupervised loss on text reconstruction. Standard retrieval experiments on TREC collections indicate that the joint learning methodology leads to significant better performance of retrieval over several strong baselines for IR.', 'ar': 'في الآونة الأخيرة ، ركز عدد كبير من الدراسات على نماذج استرجاع المعلومات العصبية (IR). تستخدم فئة واحدة من الأعمال البيانات غير المسماة لتدريب الزخارف العامة للكلمات بناءً على القرب من المصطلح ، والذي يمكن دمجه في نماذج الأشعة تحت الحمراء التقليدية. تستخدم الفئة الأخرى البيانات المصنفة (مثل بيانات النقر) لتدريب نماذج الأشعة تحت الحمراء العصبية الشاملة التي تتكون من طبقات لتعلم التمثيل المحدد الهدف. تعتبر الفكرة الأخيرة أفضل بالنسبة لمهمة IR وهي مفضلة من خلال الأعمال البحثية الحديثة ، وهي الفكرة التي سنتبعها في هذه الورقة. نحن نفترض أن الدلالات العامة المستفادة من البيانات غير المسماة يمكن أن تكمل التمثيل الخاص بالمهمة المستفادة من البيانات المصنفة ذات الجودة المحدودة ، وأن مزيجًا من الاثنين مناسب. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نقترح إطار عمل تعليمي يمكن أن يستفيد من كل من البيانات المصنفة وغير المسماة الأكثر وفرة للتعلم التمثيلي في سياق IR. من خلال أسلوب التعلم المشترك في إطار عمل عصبي واحد ، يتم تحسين التمثيل المكتسب لتقليل كل من الخسارة الخاضعة للإشراف في مطابقة مستندات الاستعلام والخسارة غير الخاضعة للإشراف في إعادة بناء النص. تشير تجارب الاسترجاع المعيارية على مجموعات TREC إلى أن منهجية التعلم المشترك تؤدي إلى أداء أفضل بشكل ملحوظ للاسترجاع عبر عدة خطوط أساسية قوية لـ IR.', 'fr': "Récemment, un nombre important d'études se sont concentrées sur les modèles de récupération d'informations neuronales (IR). Une catégorie d'œuvres utilise des données non étiquetées pour former des intégrations de mots générales basées sur la proximité des termes, qui peuvent être intégrées dans des modèles IR traditionnels. L'autre catégorie utilise des données étiquetées (par exemple des données de clic) pour entraîner des modèles IR neuronaux de bout en bout constitués de couches pour l'apprentissage de représentations spécifiques à la cible. Cette dernière idée tient mieux compte de la tâche de RI et est favorisée par de récents travaux de recherche, qui est celui que nous suivrons dans cet article. Nous émettons l'hypothèse que la sémantique générale apprise à partir de données non étiquetées peut compléter la représentation spécifique à une tâche apprise à partir de données étiquetées de qualité limitée, et qu'une combinaison des deux est favorable. À cette fin, nous proposons un cadre d'apprentissage qui peut bénéficier à la fois de données étiquetées et de données non étiquetées plus abondantes pour l'apprentissage des représentations dans le contexte de l'IR. Grâce à un mode d'apprentissage conjoint dans un cadre neuronal unique, la représentation apprise est optimisée pour minimiser à la fois la perte supervisée lors de la mise en correspondance du document de requête et la perte non supervisée lors de la reconstruction de texte. Les expériences de récupération standard sur les collections TREC indiquent que la méthodologie d'apprentissage conjoint conduit à une amélioration significative des performances de récupération sur plusieurs bases solides pour l'IR.", 'pt': 'Recentemente, um número significativo de estudos se concentrou em modelos de recuperação de informações neurais (IR). Uma categoria de trabalhos usa dados não rotulados para treinar incorporações de palavras gerais com base na proximidade de termos, que podem ser integradas em modelos tradicionais de RI. A outra categoria emprega dados rotulados (por exemplo, dados de clique) para treinar modelos IR neurais de ponta a ponta que consistem em camadas para aprendizagem de representação específica de destino. Esta última ideia responde melhor à tarefa de RI e é favorecida por trabalhos de pesquisa recentes, que é o que seguiremos neste artigo. Nossa hipótese é que a semântica geral aprendida com dados não rotulados pode complementar a representação específica da tarefa aprendida com dados rotulados de qualidade limitada e que uma combinação dos dois é favorável. Para este fim, propomos um framework de aprendizagem que pode se beneficiar tanto de dados rotulados quanto de dados não rotulados mais abundantes para aprendizagem de representação no contexto de RI. Por meio de uma forma de aprendizado conjunto em uma única estrutura neural, a representação aprendida é otimizada para minimizar tanto a perda supervisionada na correspondência de consulta-documento quanto a perda não supervisionada na reconstrução de texto. Experimentos de recuperação padrão em coleções de TREC indicam que a metodologia de aprendizado conjunto leva a um desempenho significativamente melhor de recuperação em várias linhas de base fortes para IR.', 'es': 'Recientemente, un número significativo de estudios se ha centrado en modelos de recuperación de información neuronal (IR). Una categoría de obras utiliza datos sin etiqueta para entrenar la incrustación de palabras generales en función de la proximidad de los términos, que se pueden integrar en los modelos IR tradicionales. La otra categoría emplea datos etiquetados (por ejemplo, datos click-through) para entrenar modelos IR neuronales de extremo a extremo que consisten en capas para el aprendizaje de la representación específica del objetivo. Esta última idea explica mejor la tarea de IR y se ve favorecida por los trabajos de investigación recientes, que es el que seguiremos en este artículo. Planteamos la hipótesis de que la semántica general aprendida de los datos no etiquetados puede complementar la representación específica de la tarea aprendida de los datos etiquetados de calidad limitada, y que una combinación de ambos es favorable. Con este fin, proponemos un marco de aprendizaje que puede beneficiarse de datos etiquetados y no etiquetados más abundantes para el aprendizaje de representación en el contexto de IR. A través de una forma de aprendizaje conjunto en un solo marco neuronal, la representación aprendida se optimiza para minimizar tanto la pérdida supervisada en la coincidencia de documentos de consulta como la pérdida no supervisada en la reconstrucción de texto. Los experimentos de recuperación estándar en las colecciones de TREC indican que la metodología de aprendizaje conjunto conduce a un rendimiento significativamente mejor de la recuperación en comparación con varias líneas de base sólidas para IR.', 'zh': '近者,大集神经信息检索(IR)模。 一类用未标之数以练术语近之词嵌,可以集旧IR。 另一类用表数(如点击数)以教端到端神经IR,所以为学特定也。 后意益解IR务,并受近事青目,此吾文之将由也。 吾设也,未尝标数而学也语义可以补有限之务特定示,而二者之利也。 故立学框架,框架益于数,以学于IR上下文。 合学于神经框架,优化之于学,以省问文档匹者监失,与文本重建者无监失。 合TREC检实验,合学于强IR基线可以显能。', 'hi': 'हाल ही में, अध्ययनों की एक महत्वपूर्ण संख्या ने तंत्रिका सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति (आईआर) मॉडल पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है। कार्यों की एक श्रेणी शब्द निकटता के आधार पर सामान्य शब्द एम्बेडिंग को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए बिना लेबल वाले डेटा का उपयोग करती है, जिसे पारंपरिक आईआर मॉडल में एकीकृत किया जा सकता है। अन्य श्रेणी लेबल किए गए डेटा (जैसे क्लिक-थ्रू डेटा) को लक्षित-विशिष्ट प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए परतों से मिलकर एंड-टू-एंड तंत्रिका आईआर मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए नियोजित करती है। उत्तरार्द्ध विचार आईआर कार्य के लिए बेहतर खाता है और हाल के शोध कार्यों द्वारा इष्ट है, जो कि हम इस पेपर में पालन करेंगे। हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि अनलेबल किए गए डेटा से सीखे गए सामान्य शब्दार्थ सीमित गुणवत्ता के लेबल किए गए डेटा से सीखे गए कार्य-विशिष्ट प्रतिनिधित्व के पूरक हो सकते हैं, और दोनों का संयोजन अनुकूल है। इस अंत के लिए, हम एक सीखने के ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो आईआर के संदर्भ में प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए लेबल किए गए और अधिक प्रचुर मात्रा में अनलेबल डेटा दोनों से लाभ उठा सकता है। एक एकल तंत्रिका ढांचे में एक संयुक्त सीखने के फैशन के माध्यम से, सीखा प्रतिनिधित्व क्वेरी-दस्तावेज़ मिलान पर पर्यवेक्षित हानि और पाठ पुनर्निर्माण पर असुरक्षित नुकसान दोनों को कम करने के लिए अनुकूलित किया जाता है। TREC संग्रह पर मानक पुनर्प्राप्ति प्रयोगों से संकेत मिलता है कि संयुक्त सीखने की पद्धति IR के लिए कई मजबूत बेसलाइन पर पुनर्प्राप्ति के महत्वपूर्ण बेहतर प्रदर्शन की ओर ले जाती है।', 'ja': '最近、かなりの数の研究が神経情報検索（ IR ）モデルに焦点を当てています。 作品の1つのカテゴリは、ラベル付けされていないデータを使用して、従来のIRモデルに統合できる用語の近接性に基づいて一般的な単語埋め込みをトレーニングします。 他のカテゴリは、標的固有の表現学習のための層からなるエンドツーエンドのニューラルIRモデルを訓練するために、ラベル付けされたデータ（例えば、クリックスルーデータ）を使用する。 後者のアイデアは、IRタスクをより良く説明しており、本稿で踏襲する最近の研究成果によって好まれている。 ラベル付けされていないデータから学習された一般的な意味論は、限られた品質のラベル付けされたデータから学習されたタスク固有の表現を補完することができ、両者の組み合わせは有利であると仮定する。 この目的のために、IRの文脈での表現学習のために、ラベル付けされたデータとより豊富なラベル付けされていないデータの両方から恩恵を受けることができる学習フレームワークを提案する。 単一のニューラルフレームワークにおける共同学習様式を通じて、学習された表現は、クエリ文書マッチングの監視された損失とテキスト再構築の監視されていない損失の両方を最小限に抑えるように最適化される。 TRECコレクションの標準的な検索実験は、共同学習方法論がIRのいくつかの強力なベースラインにわたって検索の有意な改善のパフォーマンスにつながることを示しています。', 'ru': 'В последнее время значительное число исследований было сосредоточено на моделях поиска нейронной информации (IR). Одна категория работ использует немаркированные данные для обучения общих вложений слов на основе терминологической близости, которые могут быть интегрированы в традиционные ИК-модели. Другая категория использует помеченные данные (например, данные по кликам) для обучения сквозным нейронным ИК-моделям, состоящим из слоев для обучения целевому представлению. Последняя идея в большей степени учитывает задачу ИК и пользуется поддержкой недавних исследовательских работ, которым мы будем следовать в этой работе. Мы предполагаем, что общая семантика, изученная на основе немаркированных данных, может дополнять представление конкретной задачи, изученное на основе маркированных данных ограниченного качества, и что комбинация этих двух факторов является благоприятной. С этой целью мы предлагаем систему обучения, которая может выиграть как от меченых, так и от более обильных немаркированных данных для репрезентативного обучения в контексте IR. Благодаря совместному обучению в едином нейронном каркасе, полученное представление оптимизируется, чтобы свести к минимуму как контролируемую потерю при сопоставлении запроса и документа, так и неконтролируемую потерю при реконструкции текста. Стандартные эксперименты по извлечению на коллекциях TREC показывают, что методология совместного обучения приводит к значительно лучшей производительности извлечения по нескольким сильным базовым линиям для ИК.', 'ga': 'Le déanaí, dhírigh líon suntasach staidéar ar mhúnlaí néar-aisghabhála faisnéise (IR). Úsáideann catagóir amháin saothair sonraí neamhlipéadaithe chun leabú ginearálta focal a oiliúint bunaithe ar ghaireacht téarma, ar féidir iad a chomhtháthú le samhlacha IR traidisiúnta. Úsáideann an chatagóir eile sonraí lipéadaithe (m.sh. sonraí cliceáil tríd) chun samhlacha néaracha IR ceann go ceann a oiliúint ina bhfuil sraitheanna d’fhoghlaim ionadaíochta a bhaineann go sonrach le sprioc. Is fearr an smaoineamh deiridh don tasc IR agus is fearr leis na hoibreacha taighde a rinneadh le déanaí, an ceann a leanfaimid sa pháipéar seo. Tugaimid hipitéis gur féidir leis an tséimeantaic ghinearálta a fhoghlaimítear ó shonraí neamhlipéadaithe léiriú tasc-shonrach a foghlaimíodh ó shonraí lipéadaithe de cháilíocht theoranta a chomhlánú, agus go bhfuil meascán den dá rud fabhrach. Chuige sin, molaimid creat foghlama a fhéadfaidh leas a bhaint as sonraí lipéadaithe agus sonraí neamhlipéadaithe níos flúirseach le haghaidh foghlama ionadaíochta i gcomhthéacs IR. Trí mhodh comhfhoghlama i gcreat néarúil amháin, déantar an léiriú foghlamtha a bharrfheabhsú chun an caillteanas maoirsithe ar mheaitseáil doiciméad-ceisteanna agus an caillteanas gan mhaoirseacht ar atógáil téacs a íoslaghdú. Léiríonn turgnaimh chaighdeánacha aisghabhála ar bhailiúcháin TREC go bhfuil feidhmíocht aisghabhála níos fearr i bhfad níos fearr mar thoradh ar mhodheolaíocht na comhfhoghlama thar roinnt bonnlínte láidre don IR.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე, მნიშვნელოვანი რაოდენობა კვლევები ნეიროლური ინფორმაციის მიღება (IR) მოდელზე დაყენებულია. ერთი სამუშაო კატეგორია სამუშაო მონაცემების გამოყენება საერთო სიტყვების შესაბამისათვის, რომელიც შეიძლება შეიძლება ინტერპაციული IR მოდელში ინტერპაციურად სხვა კატეგორია მომხმარებულია მონაცემები (მაგალითად, გადაწკაპეთ მონაცემები) დასწავლად ნეიროლური IR მოდელების შეფარდება, რომლებიც მონაცემების განსაკუთრებულია განსა ბოლო იდეა IR დავალებისთვის უკეთესია და უკეთესი პასუხისთვის უკეთესია, რომელიც ჩვენ ამ დომენტის შემდეგ გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენ ჰიპოტესტიზებთ, რომ საერთო სემონტიკი, რომელიც გავისწავლია არაწერილი მონაცემებისგან, შეუძლიათ დავაკეთოთ რაოდენობის კონფიგურაციას, რომელიც მონაცემულია და ეს მიზეზით, ჩვენ მინდომა სწავლების ფრამეტრი, რომელიც შეუძლია გავიყენოთ, რომელიც უფრო უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი და უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემები IR-ის ერთი ნეიროლური ფრამეტში ერთადერთი სწავლის ფორმაციის გამოყენებით, სწავლილი გამოყენება აპტიმიზებულია, რომ გამოყენებული გამოყენება კითხვის დოკუმენტის მიმართებაზე და ტექსტის რესტრუქციაში არ Standard retrieval eksperiments on TREC collections indicate that the joint learning methodology leads to significant better performance of retrieval over several strong baselines for IR.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα, ένας σημαντικός αριθμός μελετών επικεντρώθηκε σε μοντέλα ανάκτησης νευρωνικών πληροφοριών (IR). Μια κατηγορία έργων χρησιμοποιεί δεδομένα χωρίς σήμανση για την εκπαίδευση γενικών ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων με βάση τον όρο εγγύτητα, τα οποία μπορούν να ενσωματωθούν σε παραδοσιακά μοντέλα υπερύθρων. Η άλλη κατηγορία χρησιμοποιεί δεδομένα με ετικέτα (π.χ. δεδομένα με κλικ) για να εκπαιδεύσει ολοκληρωμένα νευρωνικά μοντέλα υπέρυθρης ακτινοβολίας που αποτελούνται από στρώματα για εκμάθηση αναπαράστασης συγκεκριμένων στόχων. Η τελευταία ιδέα ανταποκρίνεται καλύτερα στο έργο και ευνοείται από πρόσφατες ερευνητικές εργασίες, τις οποίες θα ακολουθήσουμε στην παρούσα εργασία. Υποθέτουμε ότι η γενική σημασιολογία που μαθαίνεται από δεδομένα χωρίς σήμανση μπορεί να συμπληρώσει την ειδική αναπαράσταση εργασίας που μαθαίνεται από δεδομένα περιορισμένης ποιότητας και ότι ένας συνδυασμός των δύο είναι ευνοϊκός. Για το σκοπό αυτό, προτείνουμε ένα μαθησιακό πλαίσιο το οποίο μπορεί να επωφεληθεί τόσο από επισήμαντα όσο και από πιο άφθονα μη επισήμαντα δεδομένα για τη μάθηση αναπαράστασης στο πλαίσιο της IR. Μέσω ενός κοινού μαθησιακού τρόπου σε ένα μόνο νευρωνικό πλαίσιο, η μαθησιακή αναπαράσταση βελτιστοποιείται ώστε να ελαχιστοποιεί τόσο την εποπτευόμενη απώλεια στην αντιστοίχιση ερωτήματος-εγγράφου όσο και την απώλεια χωρίς επίβλεψη στην ανασυγκρότηση κειμένου. Τυπικά πειράματα ανάκτησης σε συλλογές δείχνουν ότι η κοινή μεθοδολογία μάθησης οδηγεί σε σημαντική καλύτερη απόδοση ανάκτησης σε αρκετές ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης για IR.', 'hu': 'A k철zelm첬ltban jelent흷s sz찼m첬 tanulm찼ny 철sszpontos챠tott a neur찼lis inform찼ci처visszakeres챕si (IR) modellekre. A m킥vek egyik kateg처ri찼ja c챠mke n챕lk체li adatokat haszn찼l a k철zels챕g kifejez챕sen alapul처 찼ltal찼nos sz처be찼gyaz찼sok k챕pz챕s챕re, amelyek a hagyom찼nyos IR modellekbe integr찼lhat처k. A m찼sik kateg처ria c챠mk챕zett adatokat (p챕ld찼ul kattint찼si adatokat) alkalmaz a c챕lspecifikus reprezent찼ci처s tanul찼shoz sz체ks챕ges r챕tegekb흷l 찼ll처, v챕gpontos neur찼lis IR modellek k챕pz챕s챕re. Ez ut처bbi 철tlet jobban megfelel az IR feladatnak, 챕s a k철zelm첬ltbeli kutat찼sok kedveznek, amelyeket ebben a tanulm찼nyban k철vetni fogunk. Felt챕telezz체k, hogy a c챠mke n챕lk체li adatokb처l tanult 찼ltal찼nos szemantika kieg챕sz챠theti a korl찼tozott min흷s챕g킥 c챠mk챕zett adatokb처l tanult feladatspecifikus reprezent찼ci처t, 챕s hogy a kett흷 kombin찼ci처ja kedvez흷. Ennek 챕rdek챕ben olyan tanul찼si keretrendszert javasolunk, amely mind a c챠mk챕zett, mind a b흷s챕gesebb, c챠mke n챕lk체li adatokat haszn찼lhatja az IR keret챕ben t철rt챕n흷 reprezent찼ci처s tanul찼shoz. Az egyetlen neur찼lis keretrendszer k철z철s tanul찼si m처dj찼n kereszt체l a tanult reprezent찼ci처 optimaliz찼l찼sra ker체l, hogy minimaliz찼lja mind a lek챕rdez챕s-dokumentum egyeztet챕s fel체gyelet n챕lk체li vesztes챕g챕t, mind a sz철vegrekonstrukci처 fel체gyelet n챕lk체li vesztes챕g챕t. A TREC gy킥jtem챕nyeken v챕gzett standard visszakeres챕si k챠s챕rletek azt mutatj찼k, hogy a k철z철s tanul찼si m처dszertan jelent흷sen jobb teljes챠tm챕nyt eredm챕nyez a visszakeres챕s sz찼mos er흷s alapvet흷 IR-vonalon.', 'it': "Recentemente, un numero significativo di studi si è concentrato sui modelli di recupero delle informazioni neurali (IR). Una categoria di opere utilizza dati non etichettati per formare incorporazioni generiche di parole basate sulla prossimità dei termini, che possono essere integrate nei modelli IR tradizionali. L'altra categoria utilizza dati etichettati (ad esempio dati click-through) per formare modelli IR neurali end-to-end costituiti da livelli per l'apprendimento della rappresentazione specifica del target. Quest'ultima idea rappresenta meglio il compito IR ed è favorita da recenti lavori di ricerca, che è quella che seguiremo in questo articolo. Ipotizziamo che la semantica generale appresa da dati non etichettati possa integrare la rappresentazione specifica del compito appresa da dati etichettati di qualità limitata, e che una combinazione dei due è favorevole. A tal fine, proponiamo un framework di apprendimento che può beneficiare di dati etichettati e non etichettati più abbondanti per l'apprendimento della rappresentazione nel contesto di IR. Attraverso una modalità di apprendimento comune in un unico framework neurale, la rappresentazione appresa è ottimizzata per ridurre al minimo sia la perdita supervisionata sulla corrispondenza query-documento che la perdita non supervisionata sulla ricostruzione del testo. Esperimenti standard di recupero su collezioni TREC indicano che la metodologia di apprendimento congiunto porta a prestazioni significativamente migliori di recupero su diverse linee di base forti per IR.", 'lt': 'Neseniai daug tyrimų daugiausia dėmesio skyrė neurologinės informacijos gavimo (IR) modeliams. Viena darbų kategorija naudoja pažymėtus duomenis bendrajam žodžių įterpimui mokymui, grindžiamam termino artimumu, kuris gali būti integruotas į tradicinius IR modelius. Kita kategorija naudoja pažymėtus duomenis (pvz., klijuojamuosius duomenis), kad būtų mokomi nuo vieno iki kito neuraliniai IR modeliai, sudaryti iš tikslui specifinio reprezentacinio mokymosi sluoksnių. Pastaroji idėja geriau atitinka IR užduotį ir yra palanki neseniai atliktiems moksliniams tyrimams, kurie bus tęsiami šiame dokumente. Mes darome prielaidą, kad bendra semantika, išmokta iš nepažymėtų duomenų, gali papildyti užduočių specifinį atstovavimą, išmoktą iš pažymėtų ribotos kokybės duomenų, ir kad abiejų duomenų derinys yra palankus. Šiuo tikslu siūlome mokymosi sistemą, kuri galėtų būti naudinga tiek pažymėtais, tiek gausiau nepažymėtais duomenimis atstovavimo mokymuisi IR kontekste. Įgyvendinant bendrą mokymosi būdą vienoje nervinėje sistemoje, įgytas atstovavimas optimizuojamas siekiant kuo labiau sumažinti kontroliuojamą klausimo dokumentų atitikties praradimą ir nepastebimą teksto atkūrimo praradimą. Standartiniai TREC kolekcijų paieškos eksperimentai rodo, kad bendra mokymosi metodika lemia gerokai geresnius paieškos rezultatus keliose tvirtose IR bazėse.', 'mk': 'Неодамна, значителен број студии се фокусираа на моделите за извлекување на нервни информации (ИР). Една категорија на дела користи необележани податоци за обука на генерални зборови засновани на терминската близина, која може да се интегрира во традиционалните IR модели. Другата категорија употребува означени податоци (np. преку клик податоци) за обука на неурални IR модели од крај до крај кои се состојат од слоеви за учење на специфична репрезентација на целта. Последната идеја е подобра за задачата на ИР и е поддржана од неодамнешните истражувачки дела, која ќе ја следиме во овој весник. Ние хипотезираме дека генералната семантика научена од неозначени податоци може да ја комплиментира задачната специфична претстава научена од означени податоци со ограничен квалитет, и дека комбинацијата од двете е поволна. За оваа цел, предложуваме рамка за учење која може да има корист од обележани и повеќе необележани податоци за претставување на учењето во контекст на ИР. Со заеднички начин на учење во една нервна рамка, наученото претставување е оптимизирано за да се минимизира и надгледуваната загуба на споредувањето на документите за прашање и ненадгледуваната загуба на реструкцијата на текстот. Стандардните експерименти за преземање на колекциите на ТРЕК укажуваат на тоа дека заедничката методологија на учење води до значително подобра резултат на преземањето на неколку силни бази за ИР.', 'kk': 'Жуырда, невралдық мәліметті алу (IR) үлгілеріне көп зерттеулер көмектеседі. Бір жұмыс санаты үлгілмеген деректерді қолдану үшін жалпы сөздерді ендіру үшін терминдің жақындағы тегістеріне негізделген, ол әдімгі IR үлгілеріне ендіре алады. Басқа санаттың жарлық деректерін (мысалы, мәліметтерді түртіп, мәліметтерді түртіп) аяқтау үшін невралдық IR үлгілерін көрсету үшін мәліметтер үшін қабаттардан құрылады. Соңғы идея IR тапсырмасы үшін жақсы тіркелген жұмыс істейді. Соңғы зерттеу жұмыс істейді. Бұл - біз осы қағазға келеді. Біз таңдалмаған деректерден үйренген жалпы семантикалық тапсырмаларды шектелген сапатты мәліметтерден үйренген тапсырмаларды қолдануға мүмкіндік береді, және екеуінің біріктіру жақсы. Бұл үшін біз ИР контекстінде көрсету үшін мәліметтерді оқыту үшін жарлықталмаған және көп жарлықталмаған мәліметтерден аша алатын оқыту бағдарламасын ұсынамыз. Бір невралдық фреймінде біріктірілген оқыту модулі арқылы, оқылған мәтін қайта құрылғанда сұраныс құжатты сәйкес келетін жұмысын қайта құру үшін қайта бақылау үшін біріктірілген жоғалу оптими TREC жинақтарындағы стандартты алу тәжірибелері біріктіру методологиясы IR үшін бірнеше күшті негізгі жолдардан арналған жұмыс істеу арқылы болады.', 'ms': 'Baru-baru ini, sejumlah kajian yang signifikan telah fokus pada model pemulihan maklumat saraf (IR). Satu kategori kerja menggunakan data tidak berlebihan untuk melatih penyambungan perkataan umum berdasarkan kedekatan terma, yang boleh disertai ke dalam model IR tradisional. Kategori lain menggunakan data labeled (cth. klik-melalui data) untuk melatih model IR saraf akhir-akhir yang terdiri dari lapisan untuk pembelajaran perwakilan khusus sasaran. The latter idea accounts better for the IR task and is favored by recent research works, which is the one we will follow in this paper.  We hypothesize that general semantics learned from unlabeled data can complement task-specific representation learned from labeled data of limited quality, and that a combination of the two is favorable.  Untuk tujuan ini, kami melamar kerangka pembelajaran yang boleh berguna dari kedua-dua data yang ditabel dan lebih banyak data yang tidak ditabel untuk pembelajaran mewakili dalam konteks IR. Melalui cara pembelajaran kongsi dalam kerangka saraf tunggal, perwakilan yang belajar ditentukan untuk mengurangkan kedua-dua kerugian yang diawasi pada persamaan dokumen-pertanyaan dan kerugian yang tidak diawasi pada pembangunan semula teks. Eksperimen pemulihan piawai pada koleksi TREC menunjukkan bahawa metodologi pembelajaran kongsi mengarah kepada prestasi pemulihan yang lebih baik pada beberapa garis dasar yang kuat untuk IR.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിട്ടെതിരിക്കുന്നതിനെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുകയാണ്. ഒരു വിഭാഗത്തില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് പൊതുവായ വാക്കിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പ്രോക്സിമിറ്റിയില മറ്റുള്ള വിഭാഗത്തില്\u200d ചിട്ടപ്പെട്ട ഡേറ്റാ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു അവസാനത്തെ ഐആര്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d നല്ലത് കണക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അവസാനത്തെ പരിശോധന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഇഷ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത സെമാന്\u200dറിക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് പഠിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കാ ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് ലേബിള്\u200dഡില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d അ ഒരു നെയൂറല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമ്പില്\u200d ഒരു യൂട്ട് പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫാര്\u200dഡിലൂടെ പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d വെച്ച് ചോദ്യ-രേ TREC കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഡാര്\u200dഡ് റിവേവല്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед маш олон судалгаанууд мэдрэлийн мэдээллийг авах (IR) загварууд дээр төвлөрсөн. Нэг хэлбэрийн ажиллах нь уламжлалт IR загвар руу нэгтгэгдэж болох ерөнхий хэлбэрүүдийг ойролцоогоор дасгал өгөгдлийг ашигладаг. Өөр хэлбэрүүд нь тэмдэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийг ашигладаг (жишээ нь, дарааллаар дарааллаар дарааллаар) төгсгөл-төгсгөл мэдрэлийн IR загваруудын загварууд нь загварын тодорхойлолтын суралцах заг Хамгийн сүүлийн санаа нь IR-ийн ажил дээр илүү сайхан ажилладаг. Саяхан судалгааны ажиллагаанд нөлөөлдөг. Энэ бол бидний энэ цаасан дээр дагах болно. Бид хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн мэдээллээс сурсан ерөнхий семантик нь ажлын тодорхойлолтой үзүүлэлтийг хязгаарлагдсан хэмжээсүүдийн мэдээллээс нэмэгдүүлж болох боломжтой гэж бодож байна. Иймээс бид ИР-ийн тухай суралцах боломжгүй мэдээллээс илүү олон ашигтай суралцах системийг санал болгож байна. Нэг мэдрэлийн хэмжээнд нийлбэр суралцах загвараар суралцаж суралцах загвар нь суралцагдсан загвар нь хувьсалын баримтын хоёуланг багасгах, мөн текст дахин сэргээх боломжгүй алдагдлыг багасгах боломжтой. ТРЕК цуглуулалтын стандарт хамтын туршилтууд нь хамтдаа суралцах методологийг олон хүчтэй суурь шугам шугам дээр авах илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Dan l-a ħħar, għadd sinifikanti ta’ studji ffukaw fuq mudelli ta’ ġbir ta’ informazzjoni newrali (IR). Kategorija waħda tax-xogħlijiet tuża dejta mingħajr tikketta biex tħarreġ l-inkorporazzjonijiet ġenerali tal-kliem ibbażati fuq il-prossimità tat-terminu, li tista’ tiġi integrata fil-mudelli tradizzjonali tal-IR. Il-kategorija l-oħra tuża dejta ttikkettata (e ż. dejta b’click-through) biex tħarreġ mudelli IR newrali minn tarf sa tarf li jikkonsistu f’saffi g ħat-tagħlim ta’ rappreżentanza speċifika għall-mira. L-idea tal-aħħar tirrappreżenta aħjar il-kompitu tar-RI u hija ffavorita minn xogħlijiet riċenti ta’ riċerka, li hija dik li se ssegwi f’dan id-dokument. Aħna niipotesizzaw li s-semantika ġenerali li titgħallem minn dejta mhux ittikkettata tista’ tikkumplimenta r-rappreżentanza speċifika għall-kompiti li titgħallem minn dejta ttikkettata ta’ kwalità limitata, u li kombinazzjoni tat-tnejn hija favorevoli. Għal dan il-għan, nipproponu qafas ta’ tagħlim li jista’ jibbenefika kemm minn dejta ttikkettata kif ukoll minn dejta mhux ittikkettata aktar abbundanti għat-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza fil-kuntest tar-RI. Through a joint learning fashion in a single neural framework, the learned representation is optimized to minimize both the supervised loss on query-document matching and the unsupervised loss on text reconstruction.  Esperimenti standard ta’ rkupru fuq kollezzjonijiet TREC jindikaw li l-metodoloġija konġunta ta’ tagħlim twassal għal prestazzjoni sinifikanti aħjar ta’ rkupru fuq diversi linji bażi b’saħħithom għall-IR.', 'pl': 'Ostatnio znaczna liczba badań skupiła się na modelach odzyskiwania informacji neuronowych (IR). Jedna z kategorii prac wykorzystuje dane nieoznakowane do szkolenia ogólnych osadzeń słów opartych na terminie bliskości, które można zintegrować z tradycyjnymi modelami IR. Druga kategoria wykorzystuje etykietowane dane (np. dane kliknięcia) do treningu kompleksowych neuronowych modeli IR składających się z warstw do uczenia się reprezentacji specyficznej dla celu. Ten ostatni pomysł lepiej odpowiada zadaniu IR i jest faworyzowany przez ostatnie prace badawcze, które będziemy śledzić w niniejszym artykule. Zakładamy hipotezę, że ogólna semantyka wyciągnięta z danych nieoznakowanych może uzupełnić reprezentację specyficzną dla zadania wyciągniętą z danych etykietowanych o ograniczonej jakości i że połączenie tych dwóch jest korzystne. W tym celu proponujemy ramy uczenia się, które mogą korzystać zarówno z etykietowanych, jak i bardziej obfitych danych nieoznakowanych do nauki reprezentacyjnej w kontekście IR. Poprzez wspólny sposób uczenia się w jednym ramie neuronowym, nauczona reprezentacja jest zoptymalizowana, aby zminimalizować zarówno nadzorowaną stratę przy dopasowywaniu zapytań do dokumentów, jak i stratę bez nadzoru przy rekonstrukcji tekstu. Standardowe eksperymenty odzyskiwania zbiorów TREC wskazują, że wspólna metodologia uczenia się prowadzi do znacznie lepszej wydajności odzyskiwania na kilku silnych liniach bazowych dla IR.', 'no': 'Nyleg har ein betydelig tal studier fokusert på neuralinformasjonshenting (IR) modeller. Eit kategori arbeidar brukar ugyldig data for å trenja generelle ordinnbygging basert på uttrykk nærmeste, som kan integrerast i tradisjonelle IR-modeller. Den andre kategorien brukar merkelige data (f.eks. klikk gjennom data) for å trena ein neural e IR-modell som inneheld lag for å læra målspesifisert representasjon. Den siste ideen er bedre for IR-oppgåva og er favorittert av nyleg forskningsarbeid, som er den vi vil følgja i denne papira. Vi hypotiserer at generelle semantikk lært frå ubeabelte data kan leggja til oppgåvelege representasjon lært frå merkelige data med begrenset kvalitet, og at ein kombinasjon av dei to er favoritt. I denne slutten foreslår vi eit læringsrammeverk som kan nytte frå både merkelige og fleire ulærte data for å lære representasjonar i konteksten IR. Gjennom ein kopla læringsmodus i eit enkelt neural rammeverk blir det lærte representasjonen optimalisert for å minimera både sletten av sletten på spørjingsdokumentet som passar med og tap som ikkje er oppretta på tekstrekonstruksjonen. Standard retrieval-eksperimenter på TREC-samlingar tyder på at den samanlige læringsmetodika fører til signifikante bedre utvikling av henting over fleire sterke baselinjer for IR.', 'sr': 'Nedavno, značajan broj ispitivanja se fokusirao na modele prikupljanja nervnih informacija (IR). Jedna kategorija radova koristi nepobeležene podatke za obuku općeg ugrađenja reči na temelju pojma bliskosti, koja se može integrirati u tradicionalne IR modele. Druga kategorija koristi označene podatke (npr. klik-kroz podatke) kako bi obučili neuralne IR modele na kraju do kraja koji se sastoje od slojeva za učenje određenog predstavljanja cilja. Posljednja ideja računa bolje za IR zadatak i predlaže se nedavnim istraživanjima, a to je ona koju ćemo pratiti u ovom papiru. Pretpostavljamo da opće semantike koje su naučile od neopisivanih podataka mogu dodati specifičnu predstavu zadataka naučenu od označenih podataka ograničene kvalitete i da je kombinacija od njih dvojica dobra. Za taj cilj predlažemo sistem učenja koji može profitirati od etiketiranih i mnogih neizbiljnih podataka za učenje predstavljanja u kontekstu IR-a. Kroz zajednički naučni način u jednom neuralnom okviru, naučena predstavljanja se optimizuje kako bi se minimizirala obezbeđeni gubitak na odgovaranju pitanja dokumenta i neodređeni gubitak na rekonstrukciji teksta. Standardni prikupljački eksperimenti o kolekcijama TREC ukazuju na to da zajednička metodika učenja vodi do značajne boljih učinka prikupljanja preko nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija za IR.', 'ro': 'Recent, un număr semnificativ de studii s-au concentrat pe modele de recuperare a informațiilor neurale (IR). O categorie de lucrări utilizează date fără etichete pentru a instrui încorporări generale de cuvinte bazate pe proximitatea termenului, care pot fi integrate în modelele IR tradiționale. Cealaltă categorie utilizează date etichetate (de exemplu, date click-through) pentru a instrui modele IR neurale end-to-end formate din straturi pentru învățarea reprezentării specifice țintei. Această din urmă idee se referă mai bine la sarcina IR și este favorizată de lucrările recente de cercetare, care este cea pe care o vom urma în această lucrare. Ipotezăm că semantica generală învățată din datele neetichetate poate completa reprezentarea specifică sarcinii învățate din datele etichetate de calitate limitată și că o combinație a celor două este favorabilă. În acest scop, propunem un cadru de învățare care poate beneficia atât de date etichetate, cât și mai abundente neetichetate pentru învățarea reprezentării în contextul IR. Printr-o modalitate comună de învățare într-un singur cadru neural, reprezentarea învățată este optimizată pentru a minimiza atât pierderea supravegheată la potrivirea interogării-documentelor, cât și pierderea nesupravegheată la reconstrucția textului. Experimentele standard de recuperare pe colecțiile TREC indică faptul că metodologia de învățare comună duce la performanțe semnificativ mai bune de recuperare pe mai multe linii de bază puternice pentru IR.', 'si': 'අලුත් වෙලාවට, විශේෂ අධ්\u200dයානය ගොඩක් අංකයක් න්\u200dයූරල් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශනය (IR) නිර්මාණයේ අධ වැඩේ එක වර්ගයක් පාවිච්චි නැති දත්ත භාවිතා කරන්න සාමාන්\u200dය වර්ගය සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරිස්සම්බන්ධ විදියට පද අනිත් වර්ගයෙන් ලේබල් තොරතුරු භාවිතා කරනවා (උදාහරණයෙන් ක්ලික් කරන්න තොරතුරු) ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉවරයෙන් ඉන්න අන්තිම අදහසක් IR වැඩ සඳහා හොඳයි කියලා, අන්තිම පරීක්ෂණ වැඩ සඳහා කැමතියි, ඒක තමයි අපි මේ පත්තරේ පස්සෙන්  අපි හිතන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය සෙමාන්ටික්ස් ඉගෙන ගත්තා නැති දත්තෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාව සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙන්නේ IR සම්බන්ධයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින්, ඉගෙන ගත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරමාණික ආරක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙනවා තියෙනවා කියලා සම්බන්ධ ඉගෙන ගන්න විද්\u200dයාව විද්\u200dයාවය IR වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ වට', 'so': 'Dhab ahaantii, waxbarasho badan ayaa waxay focus ugu yeesheen qaabab u soo qaadashada macluumaadka neurada (IR). Mid nooc oo shaqaalaha ah ayaa isticmaalaya macluumaad aan la aqoonsan in lagu barto hadal guud oo ku saleysan xiliga xiliga, kaas oo lagu wada qabsan karo samooyinka caadiga ah IR. Qaybta kale wuxuu u shaqeeyaa macluumaad sawir ah (tusaale ahaan click-through data) si uu u tababaro tusmooyinka IR e e ugu dambeeya dhammaadka neurada ah oo ka mid ah qasnadaha waxbarashada gaarka ah. Fikirada ugu dambeeya ayaa ka wanaagsan shaqada IR, waxaana la jecel yahay shaqada baaritaanka ee ugu dambeeyay, kaas oo ah kaan warqaddan ku soo raacaynaa. We hypothesize that general semantics learned from unlabeled data can complement task-specific representation learned from labeled data of limited quality, and that a combination of the two is favorable.  Taas darteed waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qorshaha waxbarashada, kaas oo faa’iido ka heli kara labada labo leh iyo macluumaad aad u badan oo aan la aqoon karin in lagu barto barashada IR gudaheeda. Foomka iskuulka wadajirka ah oo ku qoran qashinka neurada oo keliya ayaa waxaa loo baran karaa in lagu soo daabaco qofka la ilaaliyey oo la xiriira qoraalka la xiriira iyo khasaarada aan la ilaalinayn dhisidda text. Imtixaanka dib u soo qaadashada ee shaqaalaha TREC waxay ka muuqataa in qaababka iskuulka wadajirka ah uu ka baaraandegayo si aad u fiican oo ka sii fiican sameynta koritaanka IR.', 'sv': 'Nyligen har ett betydande antal studier fokuserat p책 neurala informationsh채mtningsmodeller (IR). En kategori av verk anv채nder os채krade data f철r att utbilda allm채nna ordinb채ddningar baserade p책 termen n채rhet, som kan integreras i traditionella IR-modeller. Den andra kategorin anv채nder m채rkta data (t.ex. klickdata) f철r att utbilda end-to-end neurala IR-modeller best책ende av lager f철r m책lspecifik representationsinl채rning. Den senare id챕n st책r b채ttre f철r IR-uppgiften och gynnas av senaste forskningsarbeten, vilket 채r den vi kommer att f철lja i denna uppsats. Vi hypoteser att generell semantik som l채rts fr책n om채rkta data kan komplettera uppgiftsspecifik representation som l채rts fr책n m채rkta data av begr채nsad kvalitet, och att en kombination av de tv책 채r gynnsam. F철r detta 채ndam책l f철resl책r vi ett l채rramverk som kan dra nytta av b책de m채rkta och mer rikliga om채rkta data f철r representationsl채rande i samband med IR. Genom ett gemensamt l채rande mode i ett enda neuralt ramverk optimeras den l채rda representationen f철r att minimera b책de den 철vervakade f철rlusten vid fr책ge-dokument matchning och den o철vervakade f철rlusten vid textrekonstruktion. Standardf철rs철k p책 TREC-samlingar tyder p책 att den gemensamma inl채rningsmetoden leder till signifikant b채ttre prestanda f철r h채mtning 철ver flera starka baslinjer f철r IR.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில், பல ஆய்வுகள் புதிய தகவல் மீட்டெடுப்பு (IR) மாதிரிகளை கவனம் செலுத்தி வைத்திருக்கின்றன. ஒரு வகை வேலைகள் குறிப்பிடாத தகவலை பயன்படுத்தி வார்த்தை நெருக்கம் அடிப்படையில் பொதுவான வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்களை பயிற்சிக்க பயன்படு மற்ற வகையில் குறிப்பிட்ட தகவல்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது (உ. ம். குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பிரதிப்பிட் கடைசி யோசனை IR பணிக்கு நன்றாக கணக்கிடுகிறது மற்றும் சமீபத்தில் ஆராய்ச்சி வேலைகளால் பிடிக்கப்படுகிறது, இந்த காகிதத குறிப்பிடாத தரவிலிருந்து கற்றப்பட்ட பொது அரைப்புருவிகளை நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட தரவிலிருந்து கற்று இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் ஒரு கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது குறிப்பிட்ட மற்றும் அதிகமாக குறிக்கப்படாத தகவல Through a joint learning fashion in a single neural framework, the learned representation is optimized to minimize both the supervised loss on query-document matching and the unsupervised loss on text reconstruction.  TREC தொகுப்புக்களில் நிலையான மீட்டெடுக்கப்பட்ட சோதனைகள் குறிப்பிடுகிறது இணைய கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறைமையாகும் ஐஆருக்கு பல வலிமை அட', 'ur': 'اچھا، بہت اہم تعداد کی تعداد نیورال معلومات پھیرنے (IR) موڈل پر تمرکز کی گئی ہے. ایک قسمت کاروں کے ایک کاروبار کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ کلمات قریبی پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، جو غیر قابل ذکر دیے جاتے ہیں، اس کے لئے عمومی کلمات ایمڈینگ کی ترین کریں، جو سنتی IR موڈل میں متصل کئے جاتے ہیں. اور دوسری کاٹیور نے لابلیٹ ڈیٹا (جیسے ڈیٹا کے ذریعہ کلک کرکے) استعمال کرتا ہے کہ آخر سے انتہائی انتہائی نیورال ایر موڈل کو ٹرین کرے جو موجود مقررہ نشانی کی تعلیم کے لئے لہروں سے موجود ہیں. آخرین خیال IR کے لئے بہتر ہے اور اچھی تحقیقات کے کاموں کے ذریعہ مہربانی ہے، جو ہم اس کاغذ میں اتباع کریں گے۔ ہم سمجھتے ہیں کہ غیر قابل تعلیم دیٹے سے سکھائے ہوئے عمومی سیمانٹیکوں کی تعلیم بندی کیفیت کے ذریعہ سے سکھائی جاتی ہے اور یہ کہ ان دونوں کی تعلیم مہربانی ہے۔ اس کے لئے ہم ایک سیکھنے کا فرم پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو IR کے بارے میں نمایش کی تعلیم کے لئے لیبل اور بہت زیادہ غیرقابل دکھانے کے لئے فائدہ پہنچا سکتا ہے۔ ایک نئورل فرم میں ایک جوڑی سیکھنے کے ذریعہ سے، سیکھا ہوا نمایش اچھی کر دی جاتی ہے کہ سوال دکھانے کے مطابق دوسری نظارت کی خسارہ کم کرے اور متن دوبارہ ساخت کرنے کے لئے ناپاک ہوا خسارہ ہے. TREC جماعتیوں پر استاندارڈ پھیرنے کی آزمائش نشان دیتی ہے کہ joint learning methodology کو IR کے لئے بہت طاقتور بنسس لینوں پر پھیرنے کی بہت اچھی فعالیت پہنچاتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Gần đây, một số nghiên cứu quan trọng đã tập trung vào các mô hình quét thông tin thần kinh (IR). Một loại công trình dùng dữ liệu chưa đóng băng để đào tạo sự nhúng từ chung dựa trên khoảng cách tạm thời, mà có thể được hoà nhập vào mẫu IR truyền thống. Các loại khác sử dụng các dữ liệu dán nhãn (v.d. thông qua các dữ liệu) để huấn luyện các mô hình thần kinh IR từ xa đến cuối, g ồm các lớp để học phân tích đặc điểm đích. Những ý tưởng sau này tốt hơn cho nhiệm vụ hồng ngoại và được ủng hộ bởi các công trình nghiên cứu gần đây, mà là cái chúng ta sẽ theo sau trong tờ giấy này. Chúng tôi cho rằng một điều tượng chung được biết từ dữ liệu phi vựa kết luận có thể hoạt động lại một bộ phần đặt nhiệm được biết được lật từ những dữ liệu đó tối Để đạt được mục đích, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở học có thể hưởng lợi từ cả những dữ liệu chưa được dán nhãn và nhiều dữ liệu không tải hơn cho việc học đại diện trong hồng ngoại. Nhờ một hệ thống học kết hợp trong một bộ phận thần kinh duy nhất, các đại diện học sẽ được tối đa để giảm thiểu sự mất mát giám sát trong việc khớp tài liệu các yêu cầu và sự mất mát không giám sát trong việc tái tạo văn bản. Các thí nghiệm tìm kiếm thông thường trên các bộ sưu tập TREC cho thấy rằng phương pháp học chung đem lại hiệu quả thu hồi tốt hơn nhiều nền tảng vững chắc cho IR.', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik o'qituvchilar neyron maʼlumot olish modellariga foydalanadi. Bir bir tur ishlarda hech qanday maʼlumotni ishlatish mumkin. Bu bir xil IR modellariga birlashtirish mumkin. Boshqa tur Keyingi fikr IR vazifasini yaxshi hisoblanadi va yaqinda taʼminlovchi ishlarni ishlaydi. Bu qogʻozdagi biz o'zimiz qogʻozga qo'yishingiz mumkin. Biz o'ylab boʻlmagan maʼlumotdan o'rganilgan umumiy semantika tashkilotni qo'shish mumkin, cheksiz maʼlumotdan o'rganilgan vazifaning xususiyatlarini qo'shish mumkin, va bu ikkalarning bir birlashtirish yaxshi. Shunday qilib, biz IR muhimda o'rganishni tashqi qilish uchun yordam beradigan o'rganish freymini talab qilamiz. Name @ info", 'bg': 'Напоследък значителен брой изследвания са фокусирани върху модели за извличане на невронна информация (ИР). Една категория произведения използва незабелязани данни за обучение на общи вграждания на думи въз основа на термина близост, които могат да бъдат интегрирани в традиционните инфрачервени модели. Другата категория използва етикетирани данни (напр. данни за кликване), за да се обучават от край до край невронни инфрачервени модели, състоящи се от слоеве за обучение на специфично за целта представяне. Последната идея отразява по-добре задачата на ИР и е предпочитана от последните изследвания, които ще следваме в настоящата статия. Хипотезираме, че общата семантика, научена от неетикетирани данни, може да допълва специфичното представяне на задачата, научено от етикетирани данни с ограничено качество, и че комбинацията от двете е благоприятна. За тази цел предлагаме учебна рамка, която може да се възползва както от етикетирани, така и от по-изобилни неетикетирани данни за представяне на обучението в контекста на ИР. Чрез съвместен начин на учене в една невронна рамка наученото представяне е оптимизирано, за да се сведе до минимум както наблюдаваната загуба при съвпадение на заявка-документ, така и неконтролираната загуба при реконструкция на текст. Стандартните експерименти за извличане на колекции показват, че съвместната методология на учене води до значително по-добри резултати при извличане на данни върху няколко силни базови линии за инфраструктура.', 'nl': 'Recent is een aanzienlijk aantal studies gericht op neurale informatie retrieval (IR) modellen. Een categorie werken gebruikt gegevens zonder label om algemene woordinbeddingen te trainen op basis van termnabijheid, die kunnen worden geïntegreerd in traditionele IR-modellen. De andere categorie maakt gebruik van gelabelde data (bijvoorbeeld click-through data) om end-to-end neurale IR modellen te trainen die bestaan uit lagen voor doelgericht representatie leren. Dit laatste idee past beter bij de IR-taak en wordt begunstigd door recente onderzoekswerken, die we in dit artikel zullen volgen. We veronderstellen dat algemene semantiek geleerd van niet-gelabelde gegevens een aanvulling kan vormen op taakspecifieke representatie die geleerd is van gelabelde gegevens van beperkte kwaliteit, en dat een combinatie van deze twee gunstig is. Daartoe stellen we een leerkader voor dat kan profiteren van zowel gelabelde als meer overvloedige ongelabelde gegevens voor representatielernen in de context van IR. Door middel van een gezamenlijke leerwijze in één neuraal raamwerk, wordt de geleerde representatie geoptimaliseerd om zowel het supervised verlies op query-document matching als het onbeheerde verlies op tekstreconstructie te minimaliseren. Standaard retrieval experimenten op TREC collecties geven aan dat de gezamenlijke leermethodologie leidt tot significant betere prestaties van retrieval over verschillende sterke baselines voor IR.', 'hr': 'Nedavno je značajan broj ispitivanja usredotočen na modele prikupljanja nervnih informacija (IR). Jedna kategorija radova koristi neopisivane podatke za obuku općeg ugrađenja riječi na temelju pojma bliskosti, koje se mogu integrirati u tradicionalne IR modele. Druga kategorija koristi označene podatke (npr. klik kroz podatke) kako bi obučili neuralne IR modele koji se sastoje od slojeva za učenje određenog predstavljanja cilja do kraja. Posljednja ideja računa bolje za IR zadatak i predlaže se nedavnim istraživačkim radovima, što ćemo slijediti u ovom papiru. Pretpostavljamo da opće semantike koje su naučile od neoznačenih podataka mogu dodati specifičnu predstavu zadataka naučenu od označenih podataka ograničene kvalitete i da je kombinacija od njih dvojica dobra. Za taj cilj predlažemo okvir učenja koji može koristiti od obilježenih i mnogih neizbiljnih podataka za učenje predstavljanja u kontekstu IR-a. Kroz zajednički način učenja u jednom neuralnom okviru, naučena predstavljanja je optimizirana kako bi se minimizirala i nadzirana gubitak na odgovarajućem ispitivanju dokumenta i neodređeni gubitak na rekonstrukciji teksta. Standardni eksperimenti povlačenja pri kolekcijama TREC ukazuju na to da zajednička metodika učenja dovede do značajne boljih učinka povlačenja nad nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija za IR.', 'da': 'For nylig har et betydeligt antal undersøgelser fokuseret på neurale informationshentningsmodeller (IR). En kategori af værker bruger ikke-mærkede data til at træne generelle ordindlejringer baseret på begrebet nærhed, som kan integreres i traditionelle IR-modeller. Den anden kategori anvender mærkede data (f.eks. klikdata) til at træne end-to-end neurale IR-modeller bestående af lag til målspecifik repræsentationslæring. Sidstnævnte idé passer bedre til IR-opgaven og er begunstiget af nylige forskningsarbejder, som er den, vi vil følge i denne artikel. Vi antager, at generel semantik lært fra ikke-mærkede data kan supplere opgavespecifikke repræsentationer lært fra mærkede data af begrænset kvalitet, og at en kombination af de to er gunstig. Med henblik herpå foreslår vi en læringsramme, der kan drage fordel af både mærkede og mere rigelige ikke-mærkede data til repræsentationslæring i forbindelse med IR. Gennem en fælles læringsmåde i en enkelt neural ramme, er den lærte repræsentation optimeret til at minimere både det overvågede tab på forespørgsel-dokument matching og det ubevågede tab på tekst rekonstruktion. Standard retrieval eksperimenter på TREC samlinger indikerer, at den fælles læringsmetode fører til signifikant bedre præstation af retriev over flere stærke baselines for IR.', 'de': 'In letzter Zeit haben sich zahlreiche Studien auf neuronale Informationsgewinnungsmodelle (IR) konzentriert. Eine Kategorie von Werken verwendet unbekennzeichnete Daten, um allgemeine Worteinbettungen basierend auf Termproximity zu trainieren, die in traditionelle IR-Modelle integriert werden können. Die andere Kategorie nutzt beschriftete Daten (z.B. Click-Through-Daten), um End-to-End neuronale IR-Modelle zu trainieren, die aus Schichten für zielspezifisches Darstellungslernen bestehen. Letzteres entspricht besser der IR-Aufgabe und wird von aktuellen Forschungsarbeiten begünstigt, denen wir in diesem Beitrag folgen werden. Wir gehen davon aus, dass allgemeine Semantik, die aus nicht beschrifteten Daten gelernt wird, die aufgabenspezifische Repräsentation ergänzen kann, die aus markierten Daten von begrenzter Qualität gelernt wurde, und dass eine Kombination der beiden vorteilhaft ist. Zu diesem Zweck schlagen wir ein Lernframework vor, das sowohl von markierten als auch von zahlreicheren ungekennzeichneten Daten für Repräsentationslernen im Kontext von IR profitieren kann. Durch eine gemeinsame Lernweise in einem einzigen neuronalen Framework wird die gelernte Darstellung optimiert, um sowohl den überwachten Verlust beim Abfrage-Dokument-Matching als auch den unbeaufsichtigten Verlust bei der Textrekonstruktion zu minimieren. Standard-Retrieval-Experimente an TREC-Sammlungen zeigen, dass die gemeinsame Lernmethode zu signifikant besseren Retrieval-Leistungen über mehrere starke Baselines für IR führt.', 'id': 'Baru-baru ini, sejumlah penelitian yang signifikan telah fokus pada model penghasilan informasi saraf (IR). Salah satu kategori pekerjaan menggunakan data tidak berlebihan untuk melatih pembangunan kata umum berdasarkan pendekatan istilah, yang dapat diintegrasikan ke model IR tradisional. Kategori lain menggunakan data yang ditabel (misalnya klik-melalui data) untuk melatih model IR saraf akhir-akhir yang terdiri dari lapisan untuk pelajaran representation spesifik target. Ide terakhir lebih baik untuk tugas IR dan diberi keuntungan oleh pekerjaan penelitian baru-baru ini, yang mana yang akan kita ikuti dalam kertas ini. Kami hipotesis bahwa semantik umum yang dipelajari dari data tidak berlebihan dapat mengimplementasikan representation spesifik tugas yang dipelajari dari data berlebihan kualitas, dan bahwa kombinasi dari keduanya adalah favorit. Untuk tujuan ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan belajar yang dapat berguna dari data yang ditandai dan tidak ditandai yang lebih banyak untuk penemuan belajar dalam konteks IR. Melalui cara belajar kongsi dalam rangka saraf tunggal, representation belajar optimisasi untuk mengurangi kedua kerugian yang diawasi pada persamaan dokumen pertanyaan dan kerugian yang tidak diawasi pada rekonstruksi teks. Standard retrieval experiments on TREC collections indicate that the joint learning methodology leads to significant better performance of retrieval over several strong baselines for IR.', 'sw': 'Hivi karibuni, idadi kubwa ya utafiti imejikita kwenye mifano ya kupata taarifa za ubongo (IR). Kikundi kimoja cha kazi hutumia taarifa zisizo na alama ya kufundisha ujumla wa maneno yanayoingia kwa msingi wa ukomo wa muhula, ambacho kinaweza kuunganishwa na mifano ya kitamaduni ya IR. Kikundi kingine kinatumia taarifa zinazoonyesha (kwa mfano, click-through data) ili kufundisha mifano ya IR ya mwisho na mwishoni yanajumuisha vipande vya juu kwa ajili ya kujifunza kwa uwakilishi maalum. The latter idea accounts better for the IR task and is favored by recent research works, which is the one we will follow in this paper.  Tunapata imani kwamba mifano ya jumla iliyojifunza kutokana na takwimu zisizoeleweka inaweza kuunganisha uwakilishi wa kazi maalum uliojifunza kutokana na taarifa za ubora wa kiwango kikubwa, na kwamba muunganiko wa hizo mbili ni bora. Kwa mwisho huu, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kujifunza ambao unaweza kufaidika na taarifa zisizoeleweka na zaidi zisizoeleweka kwa ajili ya uwakilishi kujifunza katika muktadha wa IR. Kwa njia ya mfumo wa pamoja wa kujifunza katika mfumo mmoja wa neurali, uwakilishi wa kujifunza umewezesha kupunguza hasara ya kudhibitiwa kwenye nyaraka za utafiti na hasara zisizo sahihi kwenye ujenzi wa maandishi. Majaribio ya upatikanaji wa kawaida kwenye mikusanyiko ya TREC yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu za kujifunza pamoja zinapelekea ufanisi bora wa kurejea zaidi ya misingi kadhaa yenye nguvu kwa ajili ya IR.', 'fa': 'اخیراً تعداد زیادی از مطالعه\u200cها روی مدل\u200cهای بازیابی اطلاعات عصبی (IR) تمرکز کرده\u200cاند. یک گروه کارها از داده های غیرقابل استفاده می\u200cکنند تا آموزش ابزار کلمات عمومی را بر اساس نزدیکترین ترم آموزش دهند، که می\u200cتواند به مدل های IR سنتی متصل شود. برخی از مجموعه\u200cهای دیگر از داده\u200cهای برچسب استفاده می\u200cکند (مثلاً از طریق داده\u200cهای برچسب) تا مدل\u200cهای عصبی IR پایان به پایان آموزش دهد که از لایه\u200cها برای یادگیری نمایش\u200cکننده\u200cهای مشخص هدف است. آخرین ایده برای کار IR بهتر حساب می\u200cکند و توسط کارهای تحقیقات اخیر مورد علاقه قرار می\u200cگیرد، که همان کسی است که ما در این کاغذ دنبال می\u200cکنیم. ما فرض می\u200cکنیم که سیمانتیک ژنرال از داده\u200cهای غیرقابل تعلیم یاد گرفته\u200cاند، می\u200cتوانند از داده\u200cهای محدودیت یاد گرفته\u200cاند، و ترکیب از آن دو مورد علاقه\u200cای باشد. برای این قسمت، ما یک چهارچوب یادگیری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند از اطلاعات مورد علامت و نوشته\u200cای بیشتری برای یادگیری نمایش\u200cدهندگان در محیط IR سود دهد. از طریق یک مدل یادگیری همگانی در یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها آزمایشات استاندارد بازیابی در مجموعه\u200cهای TREC نشان می\u200cدهد که روش یادگیری مشترک باعث می\u200cشود که عملکرد بهتر از بازیابی در چند خط بنیادی قوی برای IR باشد.', 'ko': '최근에는 신경 정보 검색(IR) 모델에 많은 연구가 집중됐다.그 중 하나는 표기되지 않은 데이터를 사용하여 용어의 인접성을 바탕으로 하는 통용 단어의 삽입을 훈련하는데 이것은 전통적인 IR모델에 집적할 수 있다.또 다른 유형은 표기 데이터(예를 들어 클릭 데이터)를 사용하여 끝에서 끝까지의 신경 적외선 모델을 훈련하는데 이 모델은 특정한 목표 표징 학습에 사용되는 층으로 구성된다.다음 관점은 IR의 임무를 더욱 잘 설명하고 최근 연구 작업의 주목을 받았다. 이것은 우리가 본고에서 따를 관점이다.우리는 표기 데이터에서 배운 일반적인 의미가 유한한 품질의 표기 데이터에서 배운 임무의 특정한 표징을 보충할 수 있고 이들의 결합이 유리하다고 가정한다.이를 위해 우리는 IR 환경에서의 표징 학습에 사용할 수 있는 표기 데이터와 더욱 풍부한 표기되지 않은 데이터에서 이득을 볼 수 있는 학습 프레임워크를 제시했다.단일 신경 구조에서의 연합 학습 방식을 통해 학습 표시를 최적화하고 조회 문서가 일치하는 감독 손실과 텍스트 재건의 무감독 손실을 최소화한다.TREC 컬렉션에서의 표준 검색 실험에 따르면 공동 학습 방법은 몇몇 강력한 베이스라인의 IR 검색 성능보다 현저히 향상된 것으로 나타났다.', 'tr': "Soňky wagtlar, näyral maglumat almak (IR) nusgalaryna gollanýar. Birnäçe işlerniň sany ýakyn golaýlygyna daýanýan söz integrasyny terjime etmek üçin ýazylmadyklary maglumatlary ulanýar. Bu dünýäpli IR nusgalaryna daýanlanabilir. Başga kategoriýa etitlenýän maglumatlary (meselâ, hatlary g örä süýtgetmek üçin) iň soňra-soňra nuýral IR nuýatlaryny hedef spesifik öwrenmek üçin gatylar we ýerleşýän düzümleri ulanýar. Soňky ideýa IR zady üçin has gowy esap edýär we soňky araştyrma işlerinden has gowy görýär. Bu biziň şu kagyzyň yzyna gelenimiz. Biz tahmin ediyoruz ki, bilinmeyen verilerden öğrenmiş umumiy semantikler etiketlenen sınırlı kaliteden öğrenmiş verilerden gelen görevi özellikle ifade edebilir ve ikisinin kombinasyonu favoridir. Bu yüzden, IR'nin kontekstinde öğrenmek için etiketli ve daha fazla yazılmadığı verilerden fayda verebilecek öğrenme çerçevesini teklif ediyoruz. Birleşik öwrenmek modi bilen, öwrenmeli reprezentasiýa hem gözetlenýän ýitirmekleri we metin ýene-täzelikde gözleýän ýitirmekleri azaltmak üçin optimize edildi. TREC ýygnaklarynda standart almak deneyleri birleşik öwrenmek methodologiýasynyň IR üçin birnäçe güýçli tagamlaryň üstünde has gowy taýýarlanmagyna sebep edýär.", 'sq': 'Kohët e fundit, një numër i rëndësishëm studimesh janë përqëndruar në modelet e marrjes së informacionit nervor (IR). One category of works use unlabeled data to train general word embeddings based on term proximity, which can be integrated into traditional IR models.  Kategoria tjetër përdorë të dhëna të etiketuara (për shembull, të dhëna klik-through) për të trajnuar modele IR nervore nga fundi në fund që përbëhen nga shtresa për mësimin e përfaqësimit specifik objektiv. Ideja e fundit llogaritet më mirë për detyrën e IR dhe është e favorizuar nga punët e fundit të kërkimit, e cila është ajo që do të ndjekim në këtë letër. Ne hipotezim se semantika e përgjithshme e mësuar nga të dhënat pa etiketë mund të komplementojë përfaqësimin specifik të detyrave të mësuar nga të dhënat e etiketuara me cilësi të kufizuar, dhe se një kombinim i të dyve është i favorshëm. Për këtë qëllim, ne propozojmë një kuadër mësimi që mund të përfitojë si nga të dhënat e etiketuara, ashtu edhe nga të dhënat më të shumta pa etiketë për përfaqësimin e mësimit në kontekstin e IR. Nëpërmjet një mënyre të përbashkët mësimi në një kuadër të vetëm nervor, përfaqësimi i mësuar optimizohet për të minimizuar si humbjen e mbikqyrur në përputhjen e pyetjeve-dokumenteve dhe humbjen e pa mbikqyrur në rindërtimin e tekstit. Eksperimentet standarde të marrjes në koleksionet TREC tregojnë se metodologjia e përbashkët e mësimit çon në performancë më të mirë të marrjes mbi disa linja bazë të forta për IR.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս շատ ուսումնասիրություններ կենտրոնացել են նյարդային ինֆորմացիայի վերադարձման մոդելների վրա: Արքերի մի կատեգորիա օգտագործում է աննշանակված տվյալներ, որպեսզի սովորեցնի ընդհանուր բառերի ներգրավումներ, հիմնված տերմինի մոտիկության վրա, որոնք կարող են ինտեգրվել ավանդական ԻՌ մոդելների մեջ Մյուս կատեգորիան օգտագործում է պիտակուցված տվյալներ (օրինակ, հաղորդակցված տվյալներ) վերջ-վերջ նյարդային Ռ մոդելների ուսումնասիրելու համար, որոնք կազմված են նպատակի կոնկրետ ներկայացման շերտերից: Վերջին գաղափարը ավելի լավ հաշվի է առնում ինֆորմացիոն տեխնոլոգիայի խնդիրների համար, և այն հիմնված է վերջին ուսումնասիրության աշխատանքներով, որոնք մենք կհետևենք այս թղթի մեջ: Մենք ենթադրում ենք, որ ընդհանուր սեմանտիկայը, որը սովորվում է անվավեր տվյալներից, կարող է համալրացնել խնդիրների մասնավոր ներկայացումը, որը սովորվում է սահմանափակ որակի տվյալներից, և որ երկուսի համադրությունը օգտակար է: Այսպիսով, մենք առաջարկում ենք ուսուցման շրջանակ, որը կարող է շահույթ ունենալ և պիտակուցված, և ավելի բազմաթիվ անպիտակուցված տվյալներից, որպեսզի կարողանանք ներկայացնել ուսուցման ընթացքում ԻՌ-ի կոնտեք Միայն նյարդային կառուցվածքի միջոցով սովորված ներկայացուցիչը օպտիմացվում է, որպեսզի նվազեցնի վերահսկվող կորստը հարցերի-փաստաթղթերի համապատասխանման և ոչ վերահսկվող կորստը տեքստի վերականգնման ժամանակ: ՏՌԵԿ հավաքածուների ստանդարտ վերականգնման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ ընդհանուր ուսուցման մեթոդոլոգիան հանգեցնում է կարևոր ավելի լավ վերականգնման արդյունքներին IT-ի համար որոշ ուժեղ հիմքերում:', 'am': 'በቅርቢቱ ዘመን ብዙ ምርጫዎች የውጤት መረጃ ማድረግ (IR) ሞዴላዎች ላይ ተማርተዋል፡፡ አንድ የሥራ ክፍል በሥርዓት IR ዓይነቶች ውስጥ ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን የጠቅላላ ቃላትን አቀማመጥ ለማስተማር ያልተፈቀደውን ዳታ ይጠይቃሉ፡፡ ሌሎቹ ክፍሎች የጽሑፍ ዳታ (ለምሳሌ click-through data) ለመtrain የዳርመ-to-end የneural IR models that consist of layers for target-specific representation learning. የመጨረሻይቱ አሳብ ለIR ስራ የተሻለ ነው፡፡ ባይታወቁ ዳታ የተማሩትን አቀማመጥ እናስባለን፤ በጽሑፍ ዳታ የተማረውን የስራ-ፍጥረት ማድረግ እና የሁለቱን ማቀናቀል የተሻለ ነው፡፡ ለዚህ መጨረሻ፣ የIR ውጤት ለመማር የሚጠቅመውን እና በጽሑፍ እና በብዛት ያልተማረ ዳታዎችን ለመጠቀም የሚችል ትምህርት ፍሬማር እናሳስባለን፡፡ በአንድ በኩል ትምህርት ፍሬም ውስጥ በተማረ ጥያቄ፣ የተማረ መልዕክት በጥያቄ-ሰነዱን በተቃራኒ እና በጽሑፍ ማስታወስ ላይ የተጠበቀውን ጉዳይ እና የማይጠበቀውን ጉዳይ በመጠቀም ላይ ማስታወቂያውን ለማጎድል ይሻላል፡፡ በTREC ሰብስብ ላይ የነበረውን የድጋፍ ተሳታፊዎች የሚያስታውቀው ተማሪ ማድረግ ማድረግ ለIR በብዙ ኃይለኛ መሠረት ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'af': "Onlangs het 'n betekende aantal studie gefokus op neurale inligting ontvang (IR) modele. Een kategorie werke gebruik ongeabelde data om algemene woord inbettings te trein wat op term proximity gebaseer word, wat kan integreer word in tradisionele IR modele. Name Die laaste idee reken beter vir die IR-opdrag en is genade deur onlangse ondersoek werke, wat is die een wat ons sal volg in hierdie papier. Ons hipotesis dat algemene semantieke geleer van ongeabelde data kan komplement opdragspesifieke voorstelling wat geleer word van gemerkte data van beperkte kwaliteit, en dat 'n kombinasie van die twee is gunsbaar. Op hierdie einde voorstel ons 'n leer raamwerk wat kan voordeel van beide etiketeerde en meer oorvloedige ongeabelde data vir voorstelling leer in die konteks van IR. Deur 'n joint leer modus in 'n enkele neurale raamwerk is die geleerde voorstelling optimaliseer om beide die verlies wat ondersoek is op navraag- dokument ooreenstelling en die onondersteunde verlies op teks herkonstruksie te minimiseer. Standaard ontvang eksperimente op TREC-versamelinge aandui dat die gemeenskaplike onderringsmetodologie lei na beter beter prestasie van ontvang oor verskeie sterke basisline vir IR.", 'az': 'Son zamanlarda, nöral məlumat alması (IR) modellərinə çox möhkəm təhsil edildi. İşlərin bir kategoriyası, ehtimal IR modellerinə integral edilə biləcəyi termin yaxınlığına dayanan genel söz inbinglərini təhsil etmək üçün yazılmadığı məlumatları istifadə etmək üçün istifadə edir. Digər kategoriya etiketli məlumatları istifadə edir (məsələn, məlumatları dəyişdirmək üçün sona-sona g ələn nöral IR modellərini təhsil etmək üçün məlumatları təhsil edir). Əvvəlki fikir IR işi üçün daha yaxşı hesab edir və son araştırma işləri tələb edir. Bu bizim bu kağızda takip edəcəyimiz kişi. Biz ehtimal edirik ki, aləmsiz məlumatlardan öyrəndiyi genel semantik məlumatların müəyyən edilmiş məlumatların etiketli məlumatlarından öyrəndiyini və bu ikisinin birləşdirilməsi faydalı olar. Bütün bunlara görə, IR kontekstündə öyrənmək üçün etiketsiz və daha çox müəyyən edilməmiş məlumatlardan fayda verə bilən öyrənmə çerçivi təklif edirik. Yalnız bir nöral frameworkdə birləşdirilmiş öyrənmə modası ilə, öyrənmiş tərzim hər ikisini query-document ilə uyğunlaşdırmaq və məktub yenidən in şallaşdırmaq üçün gözləyirlən kaybını azaltmaq üçün optimizlənir. TREC koleksiyonlarında standart alma təcrübələrinin birlikdə öyrənmə metodologiyasının IR üçün çoxlu qüvvətli sətirlərin üstündə çoxlu daha yaxşı təcrübəsini göstərir.', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি নিউরেল তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার (আইআর) মডেলের উপর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সংখ্যা গবেষণা করেছে। একটি ধরনের কাজ ব্যবহার করা অল্প লেবেলেড ডাটা ব্যবহার করে মেয়াদের ক্ষেত্রের ভিত্তিক ক্ষেত্রে সাধারণ শব্দের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করার জন অন্যান্য বিভাগের টার্গেট- নির্দিষ্ট প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য নিউরেল আইআর মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য লেবেলের ডাটা (উদাহরণ ক্লিক- এর মাধ্যমে তথ্য) চ পরবর্তী চিন্তা আইআর কাজের জন্য ভালো হিসেবে হিসেবে বিবেচনা করে এবং সাম্প্রতিক গবেষণা কাজের দ্বারা তাকে পছন্দ করে, যা আমর আমরা মিথ্যাবাদী যে সাধারণ সেমেন্টিক্স অলীকৃত তথ্য থেকে শিক্ষা প্রদান করেছে তার কাজ-নির্দিষ্ট প্রতিনিধিত্ব সম্পূর্ণ করতে পারে সী এই পর্যন্ত আমরা একটি শিক্ষা ফ্রেমের প্রস্তাব করছি যা আইআরের প্রেক্ষাপটে প্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ষেত্রে প্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ষেত্রে শি এক নিউরেল ফ্রেমের একটি যৌথ শিক্ষা ফ্যাশনের মাধ্যমে শিক্ষিত প্রতিনিধিত্বের সম্ভাবনা করা হয়েছে যাতে প্রশ্ন- নথিপত্রের মিলিয়ে দেওয়া হয়েছে এবং টেক্সট পু TREC সংগ্রহের মাধ্যমে স্থান্যান্ডার্ড পুনরুদ্ধারের পরীক্ষা নির্দেশ করছে যে যৌথ শিক্ষা পদ্ধতিতে আইআরের বেশ কয়েকটি শক্তিশালী বেসা', 'bs': 'Nedavno, značajan broj ispitivanja se fokusirao na modele prikupljanja neuralnih informacija (IR). Jedna kategorija radova koristi neopisivane podatke za obuku općeg ugrađenja riječi na temelju pojma bliskosti, koja se može integrirati u tradicionalne IR modele. Druga kategorija koristi označene podatke (npr. klik-kroz podatke) kako bi obučili neuralne IR modele na kraju do kraja koji se sastoje od slojeva za učenje određenog predstavljanja cilja. Posljednja ideja računa bolje za IR zadatak i predlaže se nedavnim istraživačkim radovima, a to je ta koju ćemo pratiti u ovom papiru. Pretpostavljamo da je opće semantike naučene iz nezabeliranih podataka mogle dodati specifičnu predstavu zadataka naučenu od označenih podataka ograničene kvalitete i da je kombinacija od njih dvoje favorilna. Za taj cilj predlažemo okvir učenja koji može profitirati od etiketiranih i mnogih neizbiljnih podataka za učenje predstavljanja u kontekstu IR-a. Kroz zajednički način učenja u jednom neuralnom okviru, naučena predstavljanja je optimizirana kako bi se minimizirala i nadzorni gubitak na odgovaranju pitanja dokumenta i neodređeni gubitak na rekonstrukciji teksta. Standardni eksperimenti povlačenja pri kolekcijama TREC ukazuju na to da zajednička metodika učenja vodi do značajne boljih učinka povlačenja nad nekoliko jakih osnovnih linija za IR.', 'cs': 'V poslední době se významné množství studií zaměřilo na modely neuronového vyhledávání informací (IR). Jedna kategorie děl využívá neznačkovaná data k tréninku obecných vložení slov založených na termínu blízkosti, které lze integrovat do tradičních IR modelů. Druhá kategorie využívá označená data (např. data kliknutí) k trénování komplexních neuronových IR modelů sestávajících z vrstev pro učení reprezentace specifického cíle. Druhá myšlenka lépe vyhovuje úkolu IR a je upřednostňována nedávnými výzkumnými pracemi, které budeme sledovat v tomto článku. Předpokládáme hypotézu, že obecná sémantika poučená z neoznačených dat může doplnit úlohově specifickou reprezentaci získanou z označených dat omezené kvality, a že kombinace těchto dat je příznivá. Za tímto účelem navrhujeme výukový rámec, který může využít jak označených, tak bohatších neznačených dat pro reprezentační učení v kontextu IR. Prostřednictvím společného učení v jednom neuronovém rámci je učená reprezentace optimalizována tak, aby minimalizovala jak dohledovanou ztrátu při porovnávání dotazů a dokumentů, tak ztrátu bez dozoru při rekonstrukci textu. Standardní retrieval experimenty na kolekcích TREC ukazují, že metodika společného učení vede k výrazně lepšímu výkonu retrieval na několika silných základních liniích pro IR.', 'ca': "Recentment, un nombre significatiu d'estudis s'han centrat en models de recuperació d'informació neuronal. Una categoria de treballs utilitza dades sense etiqueta per formar integracions generals de paraules basades en la proximitat del terme, que poden integrar-se en models IR tradicionals. L'altra categoria utilitza dades etiquetades (com, per exemple, les dades clicades per a través) per formar models IR neuronals de punta a punta que consisteixen en capes d'aprenentatge de representació específica. Aquesta última idea representa millor la tasca IR i està favorita per recents treballs de recerca, que és la que seguirem en aquest paper. Suposem que la semàntica general aprenida a partir de dades no etiquetades pot complementar la representació específica de les tasques aprenida a partir de dades etiquetades de qualitat limitada, i que una combinació de les dues és favorable. Per això, proposem un marc d'aprenentatge que pot beneficiar tant de dades etiquetades com de dades no etiquetades més abundants per a l'aprenentatge de representació en el context de la IR. A través d'una manera d'aprenentatge conjunta en un únic marc neural, la representació aprendida es optimitza per minimitzar tant la pèrdua supervisada en el coincidència entre el document de consulta com la pèrdua no supervisada en la reconstrucció de text. Els experiments normalitzats de recuperació en col·leccions TREC indican que la metodologia d'aprenentatge conjunt porta a un rendiment significatiu millor de recuperació a través de diverses línies de base fortes per a IR.", 'et': 'Hiljuti on märkimisväärne hulk uuringuid keskendunud neuroinformatsiooni taastamise mudelitele. Ühes tööde kategoorias kasutatakse märgistamata andmeid, et koolitada üldiseid sõnade manustamist, mis põhinevad terminil lähedus, mida saab integreerida traditsioonilistesse infrastruktuurimudelitesse. Teises kategoorias kasutatakse märgistatud andmeid (nt klõpsatavad andmed), et koolitada otsast otsa-otsa neuraalseid IR-mudeleid, mis koosnevad sihtmärgipõhise esitusõppe kihtidest. Viimane idee annab paremini arvesse IR ülesannet ja seda soosivad hiljutised uurimistööd, mida me käesolevas töös järgime. Hüpoteesime, et märgistamata andmetest õppitud üldine semantika võib täiendada piiratud kvaliteediga märgistatud andmetest õppitud ülesandespetsiifilist esitust ning et nende kahe kombinatsioon on soodne. Selleks pakume välja õpperaamistiku, mis võib kasu saada nii märgistatud kui ka rohkem märgistamata andmetest representatsiooniõppeks IR kontekstis. Ühise õppeviisi kaudu ühes närviraamistikus optimeeritakse õppitud esindus, et minimeerida nii päringu-dokumendi sobitamise järelevalvet kui ka teksti rekonstrueerimise järelevalveta kadu. Standardsed TREC kollektsioonide tagasivõtmise eksperimendid näitavad, et ühine õppemetoodika toob kaasa märkimisväärse parema tulemuse tagasivõtmisele mitmete tugevate IR aluste alusel.', 'fi': 'Viime aikoina merkittävä määrä tutkimuksia on keskittynyt neuroinformation retriever (IR) -malleihin. Yhdessä teosluokassa käytetään merkitsemätöntä dataa termien läheisyyteen perustuvien yleisten sanaupotusten kouluttamiseen, jotka voidaan integroida perinteisiin infrapunamalleihin. Toisessa luokassa käytetään merkittyä dataa (esim. click-through data) kouluttaakseen päästä päähän -neuroinfrapunamalleja, jotka koostuvat tasoista kohdekohtaiseen representaatiooppimiseen. Jälkimmäinen idea vastaa paremmin IR-tehtävää ja sitä suosivat viimeaikaiset tutkimustyöt, joita seuraamme tässä artikkelissa. Oletamme, että merkitsemättömästä datasta opittu yleinen semantiikka voi täydentää tehtäväkohtaista esitystä, joka on opittu merkitsemättömästä datasta, ja että näiden kahden yhdistelmä on suotuisa. Tätä varten ehdotamme oppimiskehystä, joka voi hyödyntää sekä merkittyä että runsaampaa merkitsemätöntä dataa representaatiooppimiseen infrapunaopetuksen yhteydessä. Yhteisellä oppimistavalla yhdessä neurokehyksessä opittu esitys optimoidaan minimoimaan sekä valvottu menetys kysely-dokumenttien täsmäyksessä että valvomaton menetys tekstin rekonstruktiossa. TREC-kokoelmien vakiohaun kokeet osoittavat, että yhteinen oppimismenetelmä johtaa merkittävästi parempaan haun suorituskykyyn useilla vahvoilla IR-lähtölinjoilla.', 'ha': "A yanzu, wasu na'ura na ƙidãya na tafiti sun fokus a kan motsar masu tsari na yanzu (IR). Wata nau'i na aikin aiki na yi amfani da data wanda ba'a yi ba da amfani da shi ba dõmin ya sanar da ɗabi'a maganar embeddinga a kan muhalli, wanda za'a haɗa shi cikin misãlai na IR. Wata katori na daban ya yi aiki da data wanda aka rubũta (misali, click-through data) dõmin ya sanar da motsalan IR na ƙari-zuwa-ƙari, wanda ke haɗi zane wa zane wa lõkaci na ƙayyade-ƙayyade. Fikirin ta ƙarshe yana da mafi alhẽri ga aikin IR kuma yana yarda da aikin research na ƙarshe, wannan ne da za mu bi cikin wannan takardan. Tuna gaskata cẽwa jumla na semantiki wanda aka sanar daga data ba da lissafa, za ya cika wani mai aikin da aka sanar daga data na da aka rubũta tsarin da ba'a ƙayyade ba, kuma in koma da waɗannan biyu ya fi kyauta. Ga wannan, Munã buɗa wani firam da za'a iya amfani da shi daga kowace da ba'a rubũta shi ba, kuma da yawa ba'a yi amfani ba ga danne da aka sanar da shi a cikin muhimmin IR. Ina son shirin motsi da aka sani kodi cikin firam guda, ana son mai amfani da a motsi ya zama mafi ƙaranci ga hasara wanda aka tsare both a kan takardar-takardar tambayar da ke daidaita da kuma hasara wanda ba'a tsare shi ba kan rekodin matsayin. Tajararin da za'a iya amfani da shi na TREC ke nuna cewa metoden da za'a ƙara wa shirin learning na haɗi ta ƙara wa musamman da musamman na ƙari a bakin wasu basasa masu ƙarfi wa IR.", 'jv': 'Kowe kudu, akeh akeh akeh kudu sampeyan kang dipoleh nang model sing nggawe informasi Neral (IR). category category Panjenengan langkung rawut luwih dumadhi kanggo nggawe IR lan luwih dumadhi karo istrawih sing gak adhil, iki sing bakal sedhaya iki ning acara iki. Awakdhéwé éntukno ngerti semanti kuwi nggambar data Gak dhéwé iso nggambar cara-cara nggawe barang nggambar kuwi tindatan kejahatan data limitatif Saiki iki, kita supoya sistem kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan luwih apik lan gambarang langgar data sing gak bukane nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar aturan IR Ngawe ngubah sistem sing paling kelas nêr Standard Ndelengkat Pangan Pangan', 'sk': 'V zadnjem času se je veliko študij osredotočilo na modele za pridobivanje nevronskih informacij (IR). Ena kategorija del uporablja neoznačene podatke za usposabljanje splošnih vgradnj besed na podlagi izraza bližina, ki jih je mogoče integrirati v tradicionalne modele IR. Druga kategorija uporablja označene podatke (npr. podatke s klikom) za usposabljanje celovitih nevronskih IR modelov, sestavljenih iz plasti za učenje predstavitve, specifično za cilj. Slednja ideja bolje upošteva nalogo IR in jo podpirajo nedavna raziskovalna dela, ki jim bomo sledili v tem prispevku. Predpostavljamo hipotezo, da lahko splošna semantika, ki se je naučila iz neoznačenih podatkov, dopolnjuje specifično predstavitev nalog, ki se je naučila iz označenih podatkov omejene kakovosti, in da je kombinacija obeh podatkov ugodna. V ta namen predlagamo učni okvir, ki lahko koristi tako označenih kot obilnejših neoznačenih podatkov za reprezentativno učenje v kontekstu IR. S skupnim učnim načinom v enem nevronskem okviru je učena reprezentacija optimizirana tako, da se zmanjša nadzorovana izguba pri ujemanju poizvedbe-dokumentov in nenadzorovana izguba pri rekonstrukciji besedila. Standardni poskusi pridobivanja na zbirkah TREC kažejo, da skupna metodologija učenja vodi k znatno boljši uspešnosti pridobivanja na več močnih osnovnih linijah za IR.', 'he': 'לאחרונה, מספר משמעותי של מחקרים התמקדו בדוגמנים של השיג מידע עצבי (IR). קטגוריה אחת של עבודות משתמשת במידע ללא סימנים לאימון מילים כלליות שמבוססת על קרובות מונח, אשר יכול להישאר במודלים IR מסורתיים. הקטגוריה השנייה משתמשת במידע מסוים (למשל נתונים קליקים דרך) כדי לאמן דוגמנים IR עצביים מסוף-לסוף שמכילים בשכבות ללימוד מייצג מסוים למטרה. הרעיון האחרון מחשב טוב יותר למשימה של IR והוא מועדף על ידי עבודות מחקר לאחרונה, אשר הוא אחד שאנחנו נעקוב אחריו בעיתון הזה. אנו מניחים שסמנטיקה כללית שלמדה ממידע ללא סימנים יכולה להוסיף מייצג מסוים למשימה שלמדה ממידע מסוים של איכות מוגבלת, וששילוב של שניהם הוא חיובי. למטרה זו, אנו מציעים מסגרת לימוד שיכולה להרוויח גם מהנתונים המתוויפים וגם מהנתונים הלא-מוויפים ביותר ללמוד מייצג בתוך הקשר של IR. באמצעות אופנה למידה משותפת במסגרת עצבית אחת, היציגה המלמדת אופטימליזמה כדי להפחית את האובדן המבוטח על התאמת מסמכי השאלות והאובדן הלא ממבוטח על בניית טקסט מחדש. ניסויים סטנדרטיים של השחזור על אוסף TREC מצביעים על כך שמתוכנית הלימוד המשותפת מובילה להופעה טובה יותר משמעותית של השחזור על כמה קווי בסיס חזקים עבור IR.', 'bo': 'ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་ཀྱིས། མཐུད་རིམ་གནས་ཚུལ་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བློ་གཏོང་བ་ཡིན། One category of works use unlabeled data to train general word embeddings based on term proximity, which can be integrated into traditional IR models. The other category employs labeled data (e.g. click-through data) to train end-to-end neural IR models consisting of layers for target-specific representation learning. The other category employs labeled data (e.g. click-through data) to train end-to-end neural IR models consisting of layers for target-specific representation learning. འདས་བའི་བསམ་ཚུལ་དེ་IR ལས་ཀ་ལ་སྐྱོན་རྗེས་སུ་ཡོད་ཚད་གསར་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་གསར་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We hypothesize that general semantics learned from unlabeled data can complement task-specific representation learned from labeled data of limited quality, and that a combination of the two is favorable. To this end, we propose a learning framework which can benefit from both labeled and more abundant unlabeled data for representation learning in the context of IR. Through a joint learning mode in a single neural framework, the learned representation is optimized to minimize both the supervised loss on query-document matching and the unsupervised loss on text reconstruction. Standard retrieval experiments on TREC collections indicate that the joint learning methodology leads to significant better performance of retrieval over several strong baselines for IR.'}
{'en': 'Enriching Word Embeddings with Domain Knowledge for Readability Assessment', 'fr': "Enrichir les intégrations de mots avec des connaissances du domaine pour l'évaluation de la lisibilité", 'ar': 'إثراء Word Embeddings بمعرفة المجال لتقييم قابلية القراءة', 'pt': 'Enriquecendo Word Embeddings com conhecimento de domínio para avaliação de legibilidade', 'es': 'Enriquecimiento de incrustaciones de palabras con conocimiento de dominio para la evaluación de legibilidad', 'ja': '読みやすさ評価のためのドメイン知識を活用したWord埋め込みの充実', 'zh': '因领地知识丰富词嵌以可读性评估', 'hi': 'पठनीयता मूल्यांकन के लिए डोमेन ज्ञान के साथ Word एम्बेडिंग को समृद्ध करना', 'ru': 'Обогащение вложений слов знанием домена для оценки читаемости', 'ga': 'Leabú Focal a Shaibhriú le hEolas Fearainn le haghaidh Measúnú Inléiteachta', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შებეჭდვა კითხვა შესაძლებლობის განსაზღვრებისთვის დომენის მეცნიერებით', 'el': 'Εμπλουτισμός των ενσωματώσεων λέξεων με γνώσεις τομέα για αξιολόγηση αναγνωσιμότητας', 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazások bővítése tartományi ismeretekkel az olvashatóság értékeléséhez', 'it': 'Arricchire le incorporazioni di parole con la conoscenza del dominio per la valutazione della leggibilità', 'mk': 'Богатство на вградувања на зборови со знаење на домен за проценка на читливоста', 'kk': 'Оқу мүмкіндігін оқу үшін домен білімімен сөздерді ендіру', 'lt': 'Įterpiamų žodžių turtinimas su skaitomumo vertinimo žiniomis apie domeną', 'ms': 'Menkaya Penjelmaan Kata dengan Pengetahuan Domain untuk Pengesanan Kemudahan Baca', 'ml': 'Enriching Word Embeddings with Domain Knowledge for Readability Assessment', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem rikka bl-Għarfien Domeniku għall-Valutazzjoni tal-Readability', 'no': 'Forstørrar ordinnbygging med domenekjenning for lesabilitet', 'mn': 'Устгах боломжтой оюутнуудын Домен мэдлэгийг нэмэгдүүлэх нь', 'pl': 'Wzbogacanie osadzeń słowa wiedzą o domenę dla oceny czytelności', 'ro': 'Îmbogățirea încorporărilor Word cu cunoștințe de domeniu pentru evaluarea lizibilității', 'sr': 'Побогаћавање објађања речи са знањем домена за оценање прочитања', 'si': 'කියවන්න පුළුවන් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ඩොමේන් දන්නවත් වචන සම්බන්ධ කරනවා', 'so': 'Heshiiska kaartaynta karinka', 'sv': 'Förbättra Word Embeddings med domänkunskap för läsbarhetsbedömning', 'ta': 'சாத்தியமைப்பதற்கு டொமைன் அறிவிப்புடன் வார்த்தை பெறுகிறது', 'ur': 'Readability Assessment کے لئے دامین علم کے ساتھ Word Embeddings بڑھا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Làm giàu môi trường từ với nền Kiến thức miền để đánh giá mức độ', 'bg': 'Обогатяване на вгражданията на думи с познания за домейн за оценка на четливостта', 'nl': 'Word embeddings verrijken met domeinkennis voor leesbaarheidsbeoordeling', 'hr': 'Objačavanje uključenja riječi sa znanjem domena za procjenu čitljivosti', 'da': 'Forbedring af Word Embeddings med domæneviden til vurdering af læsbarhed', 'de': 'Bereicherung von Word-Einbettungen mit Domänenwissen für die Bewertung der Lesbarkeit', 'id': 'Menikah Penciptaan Kata dengan Pengetahuan Domain untuk Pengenalan Kemudahan Baca', 'ko': '분야 지식이 풍부한 단어를 삽입하여 가독성 평가를 진행하다', 'fa': 'افزایش ابزار کلمات با دانش دامین برای تحلیل قابلیت خواندن', 'sw': 'Matokeo yanayoendelea na ufahamu wa Domain kwa ajili ya Tathmini ya Uwezekanaji', 'tr': 'Okuwçylyk Taýýarlamasy üçin Domain Bilgi bilen Keçimler', 'af': 'Vergroot Woord Inbetering met Domein kennis vir Leesbaardige Assensie', 'sq': 'Përmbajtja e pasurisë së fjalëve me njohuri të domenit për vlerësimin e lexueshmërisë', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Խոսքերի ներգրավման հարուստությունը ընթերցողության գնահատման ոլորտում', 'az': 'Oqulabilir Assessm톛si 칲칞칲n Domena Bili il톛 Kelimi 캻fad톛l톛rini art캼rmaq', 'bn': 'ডোমেনের জ্ঞানের সাথে উৎকৃষ্ট শব্দের বিভিন্ন অবস্থান', 'bs': 'Objačavanje uključenja riječi sa znanjem domena za procjenu čitljivosti', 'ca': "Enriquejant l'incorporació de paraules amb coneixements de domini per a l'evaluació de llegibilitat", 'cs': 'Obohacení vložení slov o znalosti domény pro posouzení čitelnosti', 'et': 'Sõna manustamise rikastamine domeeniteadmistega loetavuse hindamiseks', 'fi': 'Sanaupotusten rikastaminen verkkotunnuksen tiedolla luettavuuden arviointia varten', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Obogatenje besednih vdelav z domenskim znanjem za oceno berljivosti', 'he': 'מעשיר קידום מילים עם מידע דומין עבור הערכת היכולת לקרוא', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཀློག་འཇུག་རུང་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ལ་ཆ་ཁོང་ལ་མཚོན་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་མཚོན་རྟགས་སྦྱར་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a method which learns the word embedding for readability assessment. For the existing word embedding models, they typically focus on the syntactic or semantic relations of words, while ignoring the reading difficulty, thus they may not be suitable for readability assessment. Hence, we provide the knowledge-enriched word embedding (KEWE), which encodes the knowledge on reading difficulty into the representation of words. Specifically, we extract the knowledge on word-level difficulty from three perspectives to construct a knowledge graph, and develop two word embedding models to incorporate the difficulty context derived from the knowledge graph to define the loss functions. Experiments are designed to apply KEWE for readability assessment on both English and Chinese datasets, and the results demonstrate both effectiveness and potential of KEWE.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم طريقة تتعلم كلمة تضمين لتقييم قابلية القراءة. بالنسبة لنماذج تضمين الكلمات الحالية ، فإنها تركز عادةً على العلاقات النحوية أو الدلالية للكلمات ، بينما تتجاهل صعوبة القراءة ، وبالتالي قد لا تكون مناسبة لتقييم قابلية القراءة. ومن ثم ، فإننا نقدم كلمة تضمين غنية بالمعرفة (KEWE) ، والتي تشفر المعرفة الخاصة بصعوبة القراءة في تمثيل الكلمات. على وجه التحديد ، نقوم باستخراج المعرفة حول صعوبة مستوى الكلمات من ثلاث وجهات نظر لبناء رسم بياني معرفي ، وتطوير نماذج تضمين من كلمتين لدمج سياق الصعوبة المستمد من الرسم البياني المعرفي لتحديد وظائف الخسارة. تم تصميم التجارب لتطبيق KEWE لتقييم قابلية القراءة على كل من مجموعات البيانات الإنجليزية والصينية ، وتوضح النتائج كلاً من فعالية وإمكانات KEWE.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons une méthode qui apprend le mot intégration pour évaluer la lisibilité. Pour les modèles d'intégration de mots existants, ils se concentrent généralement sur les relations syntaxiques ou sémantiques des mots, tout en ignorant la difficulté de lecture, ils peuvent donc ne pas être adaptés à l'évaluation de la lisibilité. Par conséquent, nous fournissons l'incorporation de mots enrichie en connaissances (KEWE), qui encode les connaissances sur la difficulté de lecture dans la représentation des mots. Plus précisément, nous extrayons les connaissances sur la difficulté au niveau des mots à partir de trois perspectives pour construire un graphe de connaissances, et développons deux modèles d'intégration de mots pour intégrer le contexte de difficulté dérivé du graphe de connaissances afin de définir les fonctions de perte. Les expériences sont conçues pour appliquer KEWE à l'évaluation de la lisibilité sur des ensembles de données anglais et chinois, et les résultats démontrent à la fois l'efficacité et le potentiel de KEWE.", 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un método que aprende la palabra incrustación para la evaluación de la legibilidad. Para los modelos de incrustación de palabras existentes, normalmente se centran en las relaciones sintácticas o semánticas de las palabras, ignorando la dificultad de lectura, por lo que pueden no ser adecuados para la evaluación de la legibilidad. Por lo tanto, proporcionamos la incrustación de palabras enriquecida en conocimiento (KEWE), que codifica el conocimiento sobre la dificultad de lectura en la representación de las palabras. Específicamente, extraemos el conocimiento sobre la dificultad a nivel de palabras desde tres perspectivas para construir un gráfico de conocimiento y desarrollamos dos modelos de incrustación de palabras para incorporar el contexto de dificultad derivado del gráfico de conocimiento para definir las funciones de pérdida. Los experimentos están diseñados para aplicar KEWE para la evaluación de la legibilidad en conjuntos de datos en inglés y chino, y los resultados demuestran tanto la eficacia como el potencial de KEWE.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um método que aprende a palavra embedding para avaliação da legibilidade. Para os modelos de incorporação de palavras existentes, eles normalmente se concentram nas relações sintáticas ou semânticas das palavras, ignorando a dificuldade de leitura, portanto, podem não ser adequados para a avaliação da legibilidade. Assim, fornecemos a incorporação de palavras enriquecidas pelo conhecimento (KEWE), que codifica o conhecimento sobre a dificuldade de leitura na representação das palavras. Especificamente, extraímos o conhecimento sobre a dificuldade em nível de palavra de três perspectivas para construir um gráfico de conhecimento e desenvolvemos dois modelos de incorporação de palavras para incorporar o contexto de dificuldade derivado do gráfico de conhecimento para definir as funções de perda. Os experimentos são projetados para aplicar o KEWE para avaliação de legibilidade em conjuntos de dados em inglês e chinês, e os resultados demonstram a eficácia e o potencial do KEWE.', 'ja': '本稿では、可読性評価のための埋め込みという言葉を学ぶ方法を紹介する。既存の単語埋め込みモデルでは、読み取りの難しさを無視しながら、通常、単語の構文的または意味的関係に焦点を当てているため、可読性評価には適していない場合がある。したがって、読みにくさに関する知識を単語の表現に符号化する知識豊富な単語埋め込み（ KEWE ）を提供します。具体的には、3つの観点から単語レベルの難易度に関する知識を抽出して知識グラフを構築し、知識グラフから導き出される難易度コンテキストを組み込んで損失関数を定義する2つの単語埋め込みモデルを開発する。実験は、KEWEを英語と中国語の両方のデータセットに可読性評価に適用するように設計されており、その結果はKEWEの有効性と可能性の両方を示しています。', 'zh': '本文中,立一学嵌一词以可读性评法。 于今之词嵌于模形,其常侧重于单词句法语义,忽于读难度,故或不宜可读性评。 是以赡辞嵌(KEWE),将读难编码为单词。 以三角取单词之难图谱,发两词以合图谱之难上下文以定义损函数。 实验旨在应用KEWE中英文数据集可读性评估,以验KEWE之有效性力。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем метод, который изучает встраивание слова для оценки читабельности. Для существующих моделей встраивания слов они обычно фокусируются на синтаксических или семантических связях слов, игнорируя при этом сложность чтения, поэтому они могут не подходить для оценки читаемости. Следовательно, мы предоставляем обогащенное знаниями вложение слов (KEWE), которое кодирует знания о сложности чтения в представление слов. В частности, мы извлекаем знания о сложности уровня слова с трех точек зрения для построения графа знаний и разрабатываем две модели встраивания слов, чтобы включить контекст сложности, полученный из графа знаний, для определения функций потерь. Эксперименты предназначены для применения KEWE для оценки читаемости как на английском, так и на китайском наборах данных, и результаты демонстрируют как эффективность, так и потенциал KEWE.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो पठनीयता मूल्यांकन के लिए एम्बेडिंग शब्द सीखता है। मौजूदा शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल के लिए, वे आमतौर पर पढ़ने की कठिनाई को अनदेखा करते हुए शब्दों के वाक्यात्मक या शब्दार्थ संबंधों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, इस प्रकार वे पठनीयता मूल्यांकन के लिए उपयुक्त नहीं हो सकते हैं। इसलिए, हम ज्ञान-समृद्ध शब्द एम्बेडिंग (केईडब्ल्यूई) प्रदान करते हैं, जो शब्दों के प्रतिनिधित्व में पढ़ने की कठिनाई पर ज्ञान को एन्कोड करता है। विशेष रूप से, हम एक ज्ञान ग्राफ का निर्माण करने के लिए तीन दृष्टिकोणों से शब्द-स्तर की कठिनाई पर ज्ञान निकालते हैं, और नुकसान कार्यों को परिभाषित करने के लिए ज्ञान ग्राफ से व्युत्पन्न कठिनाई संदर्भ को शामिल करने के लिए दो शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल विकसित करते हैं। प्रयोगों को अंग्रेजी और चीनी डेटासेट दोनों पर पठनीयता मूल्यांकन के लिए KEWE को लागू करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है, और परिणाम KEWE की प्रभावशीलता और क्षमता दोनों को प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair modh a fhoghlaimíonn an focal leabú do mheasúnú inléiteacht. Maidir leis na múnlaí leabú focal atá ann cheana féin, díríonn siad go hiondúil ar ghaolmhaireacht chomhréire nó shéimeantach na bhfocal, agus neamhaird á déanamh acu ar an deacracht léitheoireachta, mar sin seans nach mbeidh siad oiriúnach do mheasúnú inléiteacht. Mar sin, soláthraímid an leabú focal a shaibhrítear le heolas (KEWE), a ionchódaíonn an t-eolas ar dheacracht léitheoireachta isteach i léiriú na bhfocal. Go sonrach, bainimid an t-eolas ar deacracht ag leibhéal na bhfocal ó thrí pheirspictíocht chun graf eolais a thógáil, agus forbraimid dhá mhúnla leabú focal chun an comhthéacs deacrachta a dhíorthaítear ón ngraf eolais a ionchorprú chun na feidhmeanna caillteanais a shainiú. Tá na turgnaimh deartha chun KEWE a chur i bhfeidhm ar mheasúnú inléiteachta ar thacair shonraí Bhéarla agus Shíneacha, agus léiríonn na torthaí éifeachtacht agus acmhainn KEWE araon.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy olyan módszert, amely megtanulja az olvashatóság értékeléséhez szükséges beágyazás szót. A meglévő szóbeágyazási modellek esetében általában a szavak szintaktikai vagy szemantikai kapcsolataira összpontosítanak, miközben figyelmen kívül hagyják az olvasási nehézséget, így lehet, hogy nem alkalmasak olvashatósági értékelésre. Ezért biztosítjuk a tudással gazdagított szóbeágyazást (KEWE), amely az olvasási nehézségekkel kapcsolatos tudást a szavak ábrázolásába kódolja. Konkrétan három perspektívából kivonjuk a szó-szintű nehézségi ismereteket egy tudásgráf létrehozására, és két szó beágyazási modellt dolgozunk ki a tudásgráf nehézségi kontextusának beépítésére a veszteségfüggvények meghatározására. A kísérleteket arra tervezték, hogy a KEWE angol és kínai adatkészletek olvashatóságának értékelésére alkalmazzák, és az eredmények bizonyítják a KEWE hatékonyságát és potenciálját.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο που μαθαίνει τη λέξη ενσωμάτωση για την αξιολόγηση της αναγνωσιμότητας. Για τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων, συνήθως εστιάζουν στις συντακτικές ή σημασιολογικές σχέσεις λέξεων, ενώ αγνοούν τη δυσκολία ανάγνωσης, επομένως μπορεί να μην είναι κατάλληλα για αξιολόγηση αναγνωσιμότητας. Ως εκ τούτου, παρέχουμε την εμπλουτισμένη με τη γνώση λέξη ενσωμάτωση (KEWE), η οποία κωδικοποιεί τη γνώση σχετικά με τη δυσκολία ανάγνωσης στην αναπαράσταση των λέξεων. Συγκεκριμένα, εξάγουμε τη γνώση σχετικά με τη δυσκολία σε επίπεδο λέξης από τρεις προοπτικές για να κατασκευάσουμε ένα γράφημα γνώσης, και αναπτύσσουμε δύο μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων για να ενσωματώσουμε το πλαίσιο δυσκολίας που προέρχεται από το γράφημα γνώσης για να ορίσουμε τις λειτουργίες απώλειας. Τα πειράματα έχουν σχεδιαστεί για να εφαρμόσουν το KEWE για την αξιολόγηση της αναγνωσιμότητας τόσο στα αγγλικά όσο και στα κινεζικά σύνολα δεδομένων και τα αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν τόσο την αποτελεσματικότητα όσο και τις δυνατότητες του KEWE.', 'ka': 'ამ წიგნიში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ მეტი, რომელიც აღწავლის სიტყვას, რომელიც კითხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვად არსებობს სიტყვების სიტყვებისთვის, რომელიც სიტყვების სინტაქტიკური ან სმენტიკური შესახებ, რომელიც წაკითხვის რთულია უნდა იცნოდოთ, ამიტომ ისინი შეიძლება არ იყოს საჭირო ამიტომ, ჩვენ მივიღეთ ცნობიერებული სიტყვები, რომელიც კოდირებს ცნობიერებს სიტყვების გამოსახულებას. განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სიტყვების სიტყვების განმავლობაზე სამი განსაკუთრებისგან ცნობიერების გრაფიკის შექმნა და გავაკეთებთ ორი სიტყვების შექმნა მოდელები, რომელიც შექმნა ცნობიერების გრაფიკის ექსპერიმენტები დააყენებული KEWE-ს კონფიგურაციის შესახებ ინგლისური და ჩინეთის მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის შესახებ, და შესახებ ექსპერიმენტის და პონტი', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo un metodo che impara la parola embedding per la valutazione della leggibilità. Per i modelli esistenti di incorporazione di parole, tipicamente si concentrano sulle relazioni sintattiche o semantiche delle parole, ignorando la difficoltà di lettura, quindi potrebbero non essere adatti per la valutazione della leggibilità. Pertanto, forniamo il knowledge-rich word embedding (KEWE), che codifica la conoscenza sulla difficoltà di lettura nella rappresentazione delle parole. Nello specifico, estraiamo la conoscenza sulla difficoltà a livello di parola da tre prospettive per costruire un grafico della conoscenza, e sviluppiamo due modelli di incorporazione di parole per incorporare il contesto di difficoltà derivato dal grafico della conoscenza per definire le funzioni di perdita. Gli esperimenti sono progettati per applicare KEWE per la valutazione della leggibilità sia su set di dati inglesi che cinesi, e i risultati dimostrano sia l'efficacia che il potenziale di KEWE.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда оқу мүмкіндігін оқу үшін ендіру үшін сөзді оқу әдісін үйренеді. Бар сөздерді ендіру үлгілері үшін олар әдетте сөздердің синтактикалық немесе семантикалық қатынасына көңіл береді, оқу қиындығын елемейді, сондықтан олар оқу мүмкін емес болуы мүмкін. Сондықтан білім бағатты сөздерді (KEWE) ендіру үшін мәселеді оқу қиындығына кодтамыз. Ескерту үшін білім графикасын құру үшін сөз деңгейіндегі мәселелерді білеміз, білім графикасын құру үшін, білім графикадан шығарылған мәселелерді құру үшін екі сөзді ендіру үлгілерін құрып,  KEWE оқу мүмкіндіктерін ағылшын және қытайша деректер қорларында оқу мүмкіндіктерін оқу үшін қолдану үшін тәжірибелері құрылды, және нәтижелері KEWE-ның е', 'lt': 'In this paper, we present a method which learns the word embedding for readability assessment.  Esamų žodžių įterpimo modelių atveju jie paprastai daugiausia dėmesio skiria žodžių sintaktiniams arba semantiniams santykiams, ignoruojant skaitymo sunkumus, todėl jie gali būti netinkami skaitomumui įvertinti. Todėl mes teikiame žiniomis praturtintą žodžio įtraukimą (KEWE), kuris koduoja žinias apie skaitymo sunkumus į žodžių pateikimą. Konkrečiai mes iš trijų perspektyvų išgauname žinias apie žodžių lygio sunkumus, kad sukurtume žinių grafiką, ir sukurtume du žodžių įterpimo modelius, kad būtų įtrauktas iš žinių grafikos gautas sunkumas apibrėžti nuostolių funkcijas. Eksperimentai skirti taikyti KEWE skaitomumo vertinimui anglų ir Kinijos duomenų rinkiniuose, o rezultatai rodo KEWE veiksmingumą ir potencialą.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме метод кој го научи зборот вграден за проценка на читливоста. За постојните модели на вградување на зборови, тие обично се фокусираат на синтактичките или семантичните односи на зборовите, иако ги игнорираат тешкотиите во читањето, па можеби тие не се соодветни за проценка на читливоста. Затоа, го обезбедуваме зборот збогатен со знаење (КЕВЕ), кој го кодира знаењето за тешкотиите во читањето во претставувањето на зборовите. Специфично, го извлекуваме знаењето за тешкотиите на зборовите од три перспективи за конструкција на график на знаење, и развиваме две зборови модели за вградување на модели за вклучување на контекст на тешкотиите извлечен од графикот на знаење за дефинирање на функциите на заг Експериментите се дизајнирани за да се примени КЕВЕ за проценка на читливоста на англиските и кинеските податоци, а резултатите покажуваат ефикасност и потенцијал на КЕВЕ.', 'ms': 'In this paper, we present a method which learns the word embedding for readability assessment.  Untuk model penyembedding perkataan yang ada, mereka biasanya fokus pada hubungan sintaktik atau semantik perkataan, sementara mengabaikan kesulitan pembacaan, jadi ia mungkin tidak sesuai untuk penilaian pembacaan. Oleh itu, kami menyediakan perkataan yang kaya dengan pengetahuan (KEWE), yang mengekodkan pengetahuan tentang kesulitan membaca ke dalam perwakilan perkataan. Secara khusus, kita mengekstrak pengetahuan mengenai kesulitan tahap perkataan dari tiga perspektif untuk membina graf pengetahuan, dan mengembangkan dua model penyembedding perkataan untuk memasukkan konteks kesulitan yang didapati dari graf pengetahuan untuk menentukan fungsi kehilangan. Eksperimen dirancang untuk melaksanakan KEWE untuk penilaian pembacaan pada set data Bahasa Inggeris dan Cina, dan keputusan menunjukkan kedua-dua efektivitas dan potensi KEWE.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വായിക്കാനുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നാം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. നിലവിലുള്ള വാക്ക് ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക്, വാക്കുകളുടെ സാധാരണ വാക്കുകളുടെ സിനിട്ടാക്കിക്കോ സെമാന്റിക്കോ ബന്ധങ്ങളില്\u200d അവര്\u200d  അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d വിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള വാക്ക് കൊടുക്കുന്നു. അത് വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നത പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d വാക്ക്-നില പ്രയാസത്തിന്റെ അറിവ് മൂന്നു ദൃഷ്ടികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നു. പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ ഗ്രാഫ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d വേര ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ചൈനീസും ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും വായിക്കാവുന്നതിനായി കെയുവെയിനെ പ്രയോഗിക്കാനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്', 'mt': 'In this paper, we present a method which learns the word embedding for readability assessment.  Għall-mudelli eżistenti ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem, dawn tipikament jiffokaw fuq ir-relazzjonijiet sintattiċi jew semantiċi tal-kliem, filwaqt li jinjoraw id-diffikultà tal-qari, għalhekk jistgħu ma jkunux adattati għall-valutazzjoni tal-leġibbiltà. Għalhekk, nipprovdu l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kelma arrikkita bl-għarfien (KEWE), li tikkodifika l-għarfien dwar id-diffikultà tal-qari fir-rappreżentazzjoni tal-kelmiet. B’mod speċifiku, a ħna nieħdu l-għarfien dwar id-diffikultà fil-livell tal-kliem minn tliet perspettivi biex nibnu graff tal-għarfien, u niżviluppaw żewġ mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem biex ninkorporaw il-kuntest tad-diffikultà derivat mill-graff tal-għarfien biex niddefinixxu l-funzjonijiet tat-telf. L-esperimenti huma mfassla biex japplikaw il-KEWE għall-valutazzjoni tal-leġibbiltà kemm fuq settijiet tad-dejta Ingliż kif ukoll Ċiniż, u r-riżultati juru kemm l-effettività kif ukoll il-potenzjal tal-KEWE.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид унших чадварын үнэлэх үгийг сурдаг аргыг тайлбарлаж байна. Унших хэцүү байдлын загварын тулд тэд ихэвчлэн үгийн синтактик эсвэл semantic харилцаа дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулж, унших хэцүү байдлыг нь тодорхойлж чадахгүй байж магадгүй. Иймээс бид мэдлэг баялагдсан үг (KEWE) гэдэг нь хэцүү зүйлсийг унших хэцүү зүйлсийг үг илэрхийлэх хэцүү байдлын тухай мэдлэг зохион байгуулдаг. Ялангуяа бид мэдлэг график бүтээх үеийн хэцүү байдлын талаар мэдлэг авч, мэдлэг графикаас гарсан хэцүү байдлыг нэгтгэхэд хоёр үеийн загварыг бүтээх болно. Үүний үр дүнд нь KEWE-ын үр дүнтэй болон боломжтой байдлыг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret viser vi ein metode som lærer ordet innebygd for lesabilitetsvurdering. For det eksisterande ordinnbyggingsmodellen fokuserer dei vanlegvis på syntaktiske eller semantiske forhold til ord, mens dei ignorerer lesingvanskelsa, slik at dei kanskje ikkje vera passande for lesingsvurdering. Det er derfor vi tilbyr kunnskapet-røyd ord innebygging (KEWE), som koderer kunnskapen om å lesa vanskeligheten i ordrepresentasjonen. Spesielt utpakkar vi kunnskapen om vanskeligheten på ordnivå frå tre perspektiv for å konstruere eit kunnskapegraf, og utvikla to ord innebæringsmodeller for å inkludere vanskelighetskonteksten utgått frå kunnskapegrafen for å definera tapfunksjonane. Eksperimentane er utforma for å bruka KEWE for å vurdere lesabilitet på både engelsk og kinesiske datasett, og resultatene viser både effektiviteten og potensialen av KEWE.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy metodę, która uczy się słowa osadzenie do oceny czytelności. W przypadku istniejących modeli osadzania słów, zazwyczaj koncentrują się one na składniowych lub semantycznych relacjach słów, ignorując trudności czytania, dlatego mogą nie być odpowiednie do oceny czytelności. W związku z tym dostarczamy wzbogaconą wiedzą słowo embedding (KEWE), które koduje wiedzę o trudnościach czytania do reprezentacji słów. W szczególności, ekstraktujemy wiedzę na temat trudności na poziomie słowa z trzech perspektyw, aby skonstruować wykres wiedzy i opracowujemy dwa modele osadzania słów, aby uwzględnić kontekst trudności pochodzący z wykresu wiedzy w celu zdefiniowania funkcji strat. Eksperymenty mają na celu zastosowanie KEWE do oceny czytelności zarówno na angielskich, jak i chińskich zbiorach danych, a wyniki pokazują zarówno skuteczność, jak i potencjał KEWE.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm o metodă care învață cuvântul încorporare pentru evaluarea lizibilității. Pentru modelele existente de încorporare a cuvintelor, acestea se concentrează de obicei pe relațiile sintactice sau semantice ale cuvintelor, ignorând în același timp dificultatea de citire, astfel încât acestea nu pot fi potrivite pentru evaluarea lizibilității. Prin urmare, oferim încorporarea cuvintelor îmbogățite cu cunoaștere (KEWE), care codifică cunoștințele despre dificultatea de citire în reprezentarea cuvintelor. Mai exact, extragem cunoștințele privind dificultatea la nivel de cuvinte din trei perspective pentru a construi un grafic de cunoaștere și dezvoltăm două modele de încorporare a cuvintelor pentru a include contextul de dificultate derivat din graficul de cunoaștere pentru a defini funcțiile de pierdere. Experimentele sunt concepute pentru a aplica KEWE pentru evaluarea lizibilității atât pe seturile de date engleze cât și chineze, iar rezultatele demonstrează atât eficacitatea, cât și potențialul KEWE.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ කියලා කියවන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න වචනය. වචන සම්බන්ධ විදියට, ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට වචන සම්බන්ධ විදියට අවධානය කරනවා වචන සම්බන්ධ විදියට, කියවන්න අමාරුයි, ඉතින ඉතින්, අපි දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා වචනය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා කියලා දන්නවට අමාරුවක් කියලා වචනය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි දන්නවන්නේ වචන-ලේවල් අමාරුවක් වලින් තුන් ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන් දන්නවන්න, දන්නවන් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, වචන අමාරුවක් ද ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ චීනි දත්ත සේට් වල ඉන්ග්\u200dරීසි සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය සැකස', 'so': 'Warqadan waxan ku qornaa qaab ay barato hadalka ku qoran qiimeynta akhriska. Sida caadiga ah waxay ku kalsoonaan karaan xiriirka hadalka oo isku xiran ama isku mid ah, marka ay ka halmaameen dhibaatada akhriska, sidaas darteed uma habboon inay ku habboon qiimeynta akhriska. Sidaas daraaddeed waxaynu bixinnaa hadalka aqoonta hodantinimada ah oo ku qoran aqoonta ku saabsan akhrinta dhibaatada hadalka la dhigo. Si gaar ah, waxaynu saddex dhinac uga soo bixinaa aqoonta dhibaatada hadalka si aan u dhisno sawir aqoonta, waxaana horumarinaynaa laba hadal oo ku qoran tusaalo qalabka dhibaatada ee ka soo baxay xarunta aqoonta si aan u caddeyno waxyaabaha khasaara ah. Imtixaanka waxaa loo qoray in KEWE lagu codsado qiimeynta aqriska ee qoraalka luuqada Ingiriiska iyo Shiino, waxayna ka muujiyaan waxyaabaha iyo suurtagalka KEWE.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi en metod som lär sig ordet inbäddning för läsbarhetsbedömning. För de befintliga ordinbäddningsmodellerna fokuserar de vanligtvis på de syntaktiska eller semantiska relationerna mellan ord, samtidigt som de ignorerar lässvårigheten, därför kanske de inte är lämpliga för läsbarhetsbedömning. Därför tillhandahåller vi kunskapsberikad ordbäddning (KEWE), som kodar kunskapen om lässvårigheter i representationen av ord. Specifikt extraherar vi kunskapen om svårighetsgrad på ordnivå från tre perspektiv för att konstruera en kunskapsgraf, och utvecklar två ordinbäddningsmodeller för att införliva svårighetsgraden härledd från kunskapsgrafen för att definiera förlustfunktioner. Experimenten är utformade för att tillämpa KEWE för läsbarhetsbedömning på både engelska och kinesiska datauppsättningar, och resultaten visar både effektivitet och potential hos KEWE.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu koja nauči reč uključujući za procjenu čitljivosti. Za postojeće modele uključujuće reči, oni se obično fokusiraju na sintaktičke ili semantičke odnose riječi, dok ignoriraju teškoće čitanja, tako da oni možda nisu odgovarajući za procjenu čitljivosti. Stoga, obezbeđujemo bogatstvo znanja obezbeđujuće reči (KEWE), koja kodira znanje o čitanju teškoća u predstavljanje reči. Posebno, izvlačimo znanje o teškoći na nivou riječi iz tri perspektive da izgradimo grafik znanja i razvijemo dva modela uključivanja problema iz grafika znanja kako bi definisali funkcije gubitka. Eksperimenti su dizajnirani da primjenjuju KEWE za procjenu readability na engleskim i kineskim podacima, te rezultati pokazuju kako učinkovitost i potencijal KEWE-a.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو پڑھنے کے لئے پڑھنے والی ارزیابی کا کلام سکھاتا ہے۔ موجود لفظ کے مطابق مڈیلڈ میں لفظ کے مطابق یہ لفظوں کی سینٹکتیک یا سیمنٹیکی رابطہ پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں، پڑھنے کی مشکل کو نادانی کرتے ہیں، اس طرح وہ پڑھنے کی قدر کے لئے مناسب نہیں ہو سکتے۔ اسی طرح ہم نے علم و ثروت والی کلمات (KEWE) کو جمع کردیا ہے جو علم کو سخت پڑھنے کے بارے میں تدبیر دیتا ہے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم کلمات-سطح کی مشکل کے بارے میں علم کو تین نظریں سے نکالتے ہیں کہ ایک علم گراف بنائیں، اور دو کلمات میں داخل ہونے والی مدل کو تخلیق کریں کہ علم گراف سے کمزوری کا موقعیت جمع کریں کہ خسارہ کے کام کا تعریف کریں۔ انگلیسی اور چینی ڈاٹ سٹ کے ذریعے KEWE کو پڑھنے کی قدر کے لئے طراحی کی گئی ہے اور نتیجے KEWE کے فائدہ اور امکانات کو دکھاتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முறையைக் கொண்டு வருகிறோம், அது படிக்க முடியும் மதிப்பில் உள்ள சொல்லை கற்று தற்போதைய வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் மாதிரிக்கும் போது, அவர்கள் வழக்கமாக வார்த்தைகளின் ஒத்திசைவு அல்லது அரைப்புறை தொடர்புகளை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறார ஆகையால், நாம் அறிவு செலுத்தப்பட்ட வார்த்தையை உள்ளடக்கியுள்ளோம் (KEWE), அது வார்த்தைகளின் குறிப்பிட்ட சிக்கலை படிப் குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் வார்த்தை நிலையில் சிக்கல் கடினம் மூன்று பார்வைகளிலிருந்து வெளியேற்றி அறிவு வரைபடம் உருவாக்க, மற்றும் இழப்பு செயல்பாடுகளை வரையறுக் Name', 'vi': "Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp học từ'Sự nhúng tay'để đánh giá sự dễ đọc. Đối với các mô hình ghép từ đã có, chúng thường tập trung vào các mối quan hệ cấu tạo hay ngữ pháp của từ, mặc dù lờ đi khó đọc, vì vậy chúng có thể không thích hợp để đánh giá sự dễ đọc. Chúng tôi cung cấp những từ ngữ đầy kiến thức (KHÔNG), nó mã hóa kiến thức về việc đọc khó khăn vào sự đại diện của các từ. Cụ thể, chúng ta trích ra kiến thức về những khó khăn ở mức chữ từ ba triển vọng để xây dựng một đồ thị kiến thức, và phát triển hai mô hình ghép từ để nhập vào bối cảnh khó khăn từ biểu đồ tri thức để xác định các chức năng mất mát. Các thử nghiệm được thiết kế để áp dụng pháp y để đánh giá khả năng đọc của cả hệ thống dữ liệu Anh và Trung Quốc, và kết quả cho thấy cả hiệu quả và tiềm năng của KHÔNG.", 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz o'qishni o'rganish uchun so'zni o'rganadi. For the existing word embedding models, they typically focus on the syntactic or semantic relations of words, while ignoring the reading difficulty, thus they may not be suitable for readability assessment.  Shunday qilib, biz o'z so'zlarni tashkilotga o'qish qiyin qo'yish mumkin. Ko'rsatilgan, biz ilmiy grafikni yaratish uchun so'zning darajadagi qismini uchta qo'shish darajadagi ta'limni chiqaramiz va qo'llaniladigan funksiyalarni aniqlash uchun ikkita so'zning ichki qiyin modellarini yaratish mumkin. Name", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме метод, който научава думата вграждане за оценка на четливостта. За съществуващите модели за вграждане на думи, те обикновено се фокусират върху синтактичните или семантичните отношения на думите, като същевременно игнорират трудността при четене, поради което те може да не са подходящи за оценка на четливостта. Следователно, ние предоставяме обогатено със знанието влагане на думи (КЕВЕ), което кодира знанията за трудността на четенето в представянето на думите. По-конкретно, извличаме знанията за трудността на ниво дума от три гледни точки, за да изградим графика на знанието и разработваме два модела за вграждане на думи, за да включим контекста на трудността, получен от графиката на знанието, за да дефинираме функциите на загуба. Експериментите са предназначени да прилагат КЕВЕ за оценка на четливостта както на английски, така и на китайски масиви от данни, а резултатите показват както ефективността, така и потенциала на КЕВЕ.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi en metode, der lærer ordet embedding til læsbarhedsvurdering. For de eksisterende ordindlejringsmodeller fokuserer de typisk på de syntaktiske eller semantiske relationer af ord, mens de ignorerer læsesvanskelighederne, hvorfor de måske ikke er egnede til læsbarhedsvurdering. Derfor tilbyder vi den vidensberigede ord embedding (KEWE), som koder viden om læsesvanskeligheder i repræsentationen af ord. Specielt udtrækker vi viden om ordniveau sværhedsgrad fra tre perspektiver for at konstruere en vidensgraf, og udvikler to ord integrering modeller til at indarbejde sværhedskontekst afledt af vidensgrafen for at definere tabsfunktionerne. Eksperimenter er designet til at anvende KEWE til læsbarhedsvurdering på både engelske og kinesiske datasæt, og resultaterne viser både effektivitet og potentiale i KEWE.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een methode die het woord embedding leert voor leesbaarheidsbeoordeling. Voor de bestaande woordinbeddingsmodellen richten ze zich meestal op de syntactische of semantische relaties van woorden, terwijl ze de leesmoeilijkheid negeren, zodat ze mogelijk niet geschikt zijn voor leesbaarheidsbeoordeling. Daarom bieden we de kennisverrijkte woord embedding (KEWE), die de kennis over leesmoeilijkheden codeert in de weergave van woorden. Specifiek extraheren we de kennis over de moeilijkheidsgraad op woordniveau uit drie perspectieven om een kennisgrafiek te maken, en ontwikkelen we twee woordinbeddingsmodellen om de moeilijkheidscontext van de kennisgrafiek te integreren om de verliesfuncties te definiëren. Experimenten zijn ontworpen om KEWE toe te passen voor leesbaarheidsbeoordeling op zowel Engelse als Chinese datasets, en de resultaten tonen zowel de effectiviteit als het potentieel van KEWE aan.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu koja nauči riječ uključujući za procjenu čitljivosti. Za postojeće modele uključujuće riječi, oni se obično fokusiraju na sintaktičke ili semantičke odnose riječi, dok ignoriraju teškoće čitanja, tako oni možda ne mogu biti odgovarajući za procjenu čitljivosti. Stoga, obezbjeđujemo znanje bogatih riječi uključujući (KEWE), koja kodira znanje o čitanju teškoća u predstavljanje riječi. Posebno, izvlačimo znanje o teškoći na razini riječi iz tri perspektive da izgradimo grafik znanja i razvijemo dva modela uključivanja problema iz grafika znanja kako bi definisali funkcije gubitka. Eksperimenti su dizajnirani za primjenu KEWE za procjenu čitljivosti na engleskim i kineskim podacima, te rezultati pokazuju kako učinkovitost i potencijal KEWE-a.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir eine Methode vor, die das Wort Einbettung zur Lesbarkeitsbewertung lernt. Für die bestehenden Worteinbettungsmodelle konzentrieren sie sich typischerweise auf die syntaktischen oder semantischen Beziehungen von Wörtern, während die Leseschwierigkeiten ignoriert werden, so dass sie möglicherweise nicht für die Bewertung der Lesbarkeit geeignet sind. Daher stellen wir die wissensbereicherte Worteinbettung (KEWE) zur Verfügung, die das Wissen über Leseschwierigkeiten in die Darstellung von Wörtern codiert. Konkret extrahieren wir das Wissen über die Schwierigkeit auf Wortebene aus drei Perspektiven, um einen Wissensgraphen zu konstruieren, und entwickeln zwei Worteinbettungsmodelle, um den Schwierigkeitskontext aus dem Wissensgraphen zu integrieren, um die Verlustfunktionen zu definieren. Die Experimente sollen KEWE für die Lesbarkeitsbewertung sowohl auf englische als auch auf chinesische Datensätze anwenden, und die Ergebnisse zeigen sowohl Wirksamkeit als auch Potenzial von KEWE.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 단어가 삽입된 가독성 평가 방법을 배웠다.기존의 단어 삽입 모델에 대해 그들은 일반적으로 단어의 문법이나 의미 관계에만 주목하고 읽기 난이도를 소홀히 하기 때문에 가독성 평가에 적합하지 않을 수 있다.따라서 우리는 어려운 지식을 단어의 표시에 인코딩하는 지식이 풍부한 단어 삽입(KEWE)을 제공한다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 세 가지 측면에서 단어급 난이도의 지식을 추출하여 지식도를 구축하고 두 단어의 삽입 모델을 개발하여 지식도에서 도출된 난이도 상하문을 결합시켜 손실 함수를 정의했다.실험은 KEWE를 중국어와 영문 데이터 집합의 가독성 평가에 응용하기 위한 것으로 그 결과 KEWE의 유효성과 잠재력을 증명했다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan metode yang mempelajari kata embedding untuk penilaian pembacaan. Untuk model embedding kata yang ada, mereka biasanya fokus pada hubungan sintaktik atau semantis kata, sementara mengabaikan kesulitan membaca, sehingga mereka mungkin tidak cocok untuk penilaian pembacaan. Oleh karena itu, kami menyediakan pengetahuan-kaya kata embedding (KEWE), yang mengekodkan pengetahuan tentang kesulitan membaca ke dalam perwakilan kata-kata. Secara spesifik, kita mengekstrak pengetahuan tentang kesulitan tingkat kata dari tiga perspektif untuk membangun grafik pengetahuan, dan mengembangkan dua kata embedding model untuk mengikorporasi konteks kesulitan yang berasal dari grafik pengetahuan untuk mendefinisikan fungsi kehilangan. Eksperimen dirancang untuk menerapkan KEWE untuk penilaian pembacaan pada set data Inggris dan Cina, dan hasilnya menunjukkan efektivitas dan potensi KEWE.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک روش را نشان می دهیم که کلمه را برای ارزیابی قابلیت خواندن یاد می گیرد. برای مدل\u200cهای استفاده کردن کلمه موجود، معمولاً روی رابطه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک یا سیمانتیک کلمه تمرکز می\u200cکنند، در حالی که مشکلات خواندن را نادیده می\u200cگیرند، بنابراین ممکن است برای ارزیابی قابلیت خواندن مناسب نباشند. بنابراین ما کلمه\u200cای که دارای علم و ثروت دارد (KEWE) را می\u200cدهیم، که علم را بر خواندن سختی به نمایش کلمات می\u200cبندد. به طور خاص، ما دانش را در مورد مشکلات سطح کلمات از سه نقطه برای ساختن یک گراف دانش خارج می کنیم، و دو مدل کلمات داخل شده را توسعه می کنیم تا محیط مشکلات را از گراف دانش به عنوان تعریف funkcionهای زیادی تعریف کند. تجربه\u200cها طراحی شده\u200cاند تا KEWE را برای ارزیابی قابلیت خواندن بر مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای انگلیسی و چینی استفاده کند، و نتیجه\u200cها هم فعالیت و پتانسیل KEWE را نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mbinu ambayo inajifunza neno linaloingia kwa ajili ya kutathmini uwezo wa kusoma. Kwa maneno yaliyopo kwenye mifano, mara nyingi hujikita kwenye mahusiano ya ushirikiano au sekunde ya maneno, wakati wakisahau matatizo ya kusoma, kwa hiyo huenda hawawezi kuwa sahihi kwa tafiti ya kusoma. Kwa hiyo, tunatoa neno linalotajiri maarifa (KEWE), ambalo linajumuisha maarifa kuhusu kusoma ngumu katika uwakilishi wa maneno. Specifically, we extract the knowledge on word-level difficulty from three perspectives to construct a knowledge graph, and develop two word embedding models to incorporate the difficulty context derived from the knowledge graph to define the loss functions.  Majaribio yanalengwa kutumia KEWE kwa ajili ya kutathmini uwezo wa kusoma kwenye seti za data za Kiingereza na China, na matokeo yanaonyesha ufanisi na uwezekano wa KEWE.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një metodë që mëson fjalën përfshirje për vlerësimin e lexueshmërisë. Për modelet ekzistuese të përfshirjes së fjalëve, ato zakonisht përqëndrohen në marrëdhëniet sintaktike apo semantike të fjalëve, duke injoruar vështirësinë e leximit, kështu që ato mund të mos jenë të përshtatshme për vlerësimin e lexueshmërisë. Kështu, ne japim fjalën e pasur me dijeni (KEWE), e cila kodon njohurinë mbi vështirësinë e leximit në përfaqësimin e fjalëve. Veçanërisht, ne nxjerrim njohurinë mbi vështirësinë e nivelit të fjalëve nga tre perspektiva për të ndërtuar një grafik njohurie, dhe zhvillojmë dy modele të përfshirjes së fjalëve për të përfshirë kontekstin e vështirësisë të nxjerrë nga grafiku i njohurisë për të përcaktuar funksionet e humbjes. Eksperimentet janë projektuar për të aplikuar KEWE për vlerësimin e lexueshmërisë në të dhënat angleze dhe kineze dhe rezultatet demonstrojnë si efektshmërinë ashtu edhe potencialin e KEWE.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n metode wat leer die woord ingesluit vir leesbaardige evaluering. Vir die bestaande woord ingesluit modele, is hulle tipies fokus op die sintaktike of semantiese verhouding van woorde, terwyl hulle die lees moeilikheid ignoreer, sodat hulle dalk mag nie geskik wees vir leesbaardige evaluering. Daarom, ons verskaf die kennis-ryk woord wat ingesluit word (KEWE), wat die kennis enkodeer op die lees van moeilikheid in die voorstelling van woorde. Spesifieke, ons uitpak die kennis op woord-vlak moeilikheid van drie perspeksies om 'n kennisgraf te konstrukteer en twee woord inbêerde modele te ontwikkel om die moeilikheid konteks te inkorpreer wat van die kennisgraf afgeleide is om die verlies funksies te definieer. Eksperimente is ontwerp om KEWE te toewend vir leesbaardige evaluering op Engels en Sjinese datastelle, en die resultate bevestig beide effektiviteit en potensieal van KEWE.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda okuwuklylyk çykyşlygyny öwrendirmek üçin ýene bir täze täbliýäris. Öň bar sözler içine daşary nusgalar üçin olar adatça sintaktik ýa-da semantik sözlerin baglaşyklaryna üns berýärler, okamak kynçylygyny ýok edip otyrylyp barýarlar, şonuň üçin okamak mümkin däldir. Şol sebäpli biz bilim baýlygyndaky sözleri (KEWE) içine golaýlaşýarys. Bu sözlerin ýerleşmegi üçin kynlaşyk okamakda bilimi ködleýär. Adatça, biz bilim grafisini guramak üçin söz derejesinden kynçylyk bileni çykaryp, we çykyş fonksiyonlary bejermek üçin bilim grafisinden kynçylyk düzümlenmesi üçin iki söz daşartyp çykarýarys. KEWE we Iňlisçe we Çinçe veri setirlerinde okaýan ýagdaýy barlamak üçin synanyşdyrylýar we netijeleri KEWE'ň etkinlik we potensialyny görkezýär.", 'am': 'በዚህ ጋዜጠኛ ቃላት የቃላትን መፍጠር ለማስተማር የሚችል ሥርዓት እናቀርባለን፡፡ የአሁኑ ቃላት በኩል የሚያስገባ ሞዴላዎች፣ በተጨማሪው የቃላትን የሲንቲካዊ ወይም የsemantic ግንኙነት ላይ ያማክራሉ፡፡ ስለዚህም የባለ ጠጎች ቃል እውቀትን እናስባለን፤ ይህም ንግግርን ለማንበብ ጭንቀት በሚያሳየው እውቀት በሚያሳየው ድካም ነው። በተለይም፣ የቃላት-ደረጃ ችግር ላይ ከሦስት እውቀትን ለማስተካከል እናሳውቃለን፤ የተሳሳቱትንም ሥርዓት ለመግለጥ እና ሁለት ቃላትን የሚያሳስብ ምሳሌዎች እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች በንግግሊዝና በቻይና ዳታተሮች ላይ ለማንበብ እና ለማንበብ እና በቻይና ላይ ለመጠቀም የሚችሉትን KEWE እና ፍላጎቱን የሚያሳዩ ናቸው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեթոդ, որը սովորում է ընթերցողականության գնահատման բառը: Գոյություն ունի բառերի ներառման մոդելներ, որոնք սովորաբար կենտրոնանում են բառերի սինտակտիկ կամ սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների վրա, չնայած ընթերցման դժվարություններին, այնպես որ դրանք հնարավոր է, որ չեն համապատասխանում ընթերցողության գն Այդ իսկ պատճառով մենք տրամադրում ենք գիտելիքով հարստացված բառը (KeyWE), որը կոդավորում է գիտելիքը կարդալու դժվարությունների մասին բառերի ներկայացման մեջ: Հատկապես, մենք հանում ենք գիտելիքները բառի մակարդակի դժվարության մասին երեք տեսանկյունից գիտելիքի գրաֆիկի կառուցման համար և զարգանում ենք երկու բառ ներառող մոդելներ, որպեսզի ներառենք գիտելիքի գրաֆիկից ստացված դժվար կոնտեքստը կորստի ֆ Փորձերը նախագծված են, որպեսզի օգտագործեն ՔԵՎ-ը անգլերենի և չինական տվյալների համակարգերի կարդալիության գնահատման համար, և արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս ՔԵՎ-ի արդյունավետությունը և պոտենցիալը:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটা পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি যা পাঠকের মূল্যের জন্য শব্দটি শিখতে পারে। বিদ্যমান শব্দ বিভিন্ন মডেলের জন্য, তারা সাধারণত শব্দের সাথে সিন্ট্যাক্টিক বা সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্কের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়ে মনোযোগ দিয়ে থাকে, যখন প তাই, আমরা জ্ঞান-সমৃদ্ধ শব্দ প্রদান করি (কেইউই), যা শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বে পাঠানোর ব্যাপারে কঠিন জ্ঞান লিখেছে। বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি জ্ঞান গ্রাফ তৈরি করার জন্য শব্দ-স্তরের কঠিন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে তিন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি সম্পর্কে জ্ঞান নির্মাণ করি এবং ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত ফাংশন নির্ধারণের ইংরেজি এবং চীনা ডাটাসেটে পাঠযোগ্য মূল্যের জন্য কে- ইউই-এর পরীক্ষার জন্য পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে এবং ফলাফল কে- ইউই-এর কার্যকর এবং সম্ভাবনা উভয় প', 'ca': "En aquest paper, presentem un mètode que aprenen la paraula incorporada per a la valoració de la llegibilitat. Per als models d'incorporació de paraules existents, normalment es centren en les relacions sinàctiques o semàntiques de paraules, ignorant la dificultat de llegir, així que potser no són adequades per a l'evaluació de la llegibilitat. Per tant, proporcionem l'incorporació de paraules enriquecidas amb el coneixement (KEWE), que codifica el coneixement sobre la dificultat de llegir en la representació de paraules. Concretament, extreuem el coneixement sobre la dificultat de nivell de paraules de tres perspectives per construir un gràfic de coneixement, i desenvolupem dos models d'incorporació de paraules per incorporar el context de dificultat derivat del gràfic de coneixement per definir les funcions de pèrdua. Els experiments estan dissenyats per aplicar KEWE per a la valoració de la llegibilitat en conjunts de dades anglès i xinès, i els resultats demostren tant l'eficacia com el potencial de KEWE.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme metodu, která se učí slovo embedding pro hodnocení čitelnosti. U stávajících modelů vkládání slov se obvykle zaměřují na syntaktické nebo sémantické vztahy slov, přičemž ignorují obtížnosti čtení, proto nemusí být vhodné pro hodnocení čitelnosti. Proto poskytujeme znalostně obohacené vložení slov (KEWE), které kóduje znalosti o obtížnosti čtení do reprezentace slov. Konkrétně extrahujeme znalosti o obtížnosti na úrovni slova ze tří perspektiv, abychom sestavili znalostní graf a vytvořili dva modely vložení slov, které zahrnují kontext obtížnosti odvozený ze znalostního grafu pro definování ztrátových funkcí. Experimenty jsou navrženy tak, aby aplikovaly KEWE pro hodnocení čitelnosti na anglických i čínských datových sadách a výsledky ukazují jak efektivitu, tak potenciál KEWE.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame meetodit, mis õpib sõna manustamine loetavuse hindamiseks. Olemasolevate sõnade manustamise mudelite puhul keskenduvad nad tavaliselt sõnade süntaktilistele või semantilistele suhetele, ignoreerides samas lugemisprobleeme, mistõttu need ei pruugi olla loetavuse hindamiseks sobivad. Seega pakume teadmisi rikastatud sõna manustamist (KEWE), mis kodeerib lugemisprobleemide teadmised sõnade esitamiseks. Täpsemalt ekstraheerime teadmised sõnatasemel raskuse kohta kolmest vaatenurgast, et ehitada teadmistegraafik, ja töötame välja kaks sõna põimimise mudelit, et kaasata teadmiste graafikust tuletatud raskuskontekst, et määratleda kaotusfunktsioonid. Eksperimentide eesmärk on rakendada KEWE loetavuse hindamiseks nii inglise kui ka hiina andmekogumites ning tulemused näitavad KEWE efektiivsust ja potentsiaali.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään menetelmä, joka oppii sanan upotus luettavuuden arviointia varten. Olemassa olevissa sanaupotusmalleissa ne keskittyvät yleensä sanojen syntaktisiin tai semanttisiin suhteisiin unohtamatta lukuvaikeutta, joten ne eivät välttämättä sovellu luettavuuden arviointiin. Siksi tarjoamme tietorikastettua sanaupotusta (KEWE), joka koodaa lukuvaikeustiedon sanojen esittämiseen. Tarkemmin sanottuna poimimme tiedon sanatason vaikeudesta kolmesta näkökulmasta tietokaavion rakentamiseksi ja kehitämme kaksi sanaa upottamalla tietokaaviosta johdetun vaikeusasteen kontekstin häviöfunktioiden määrittelemiseksi. Kokeet on suunniteltu soveltamaan KEWE:tä luettavuuden arviointiin sekä englanniksi että kiinaksi, ja tulokset osoittavat KEWE:n tehokkuuden että potentiaalin.', 'az': "Bu kağızda oxuyabiləcək qiyməti üçün yazılan sözü öyrənən bir metod göstəririk. Mevcud sözlər içərisində modellər üçün, onlar genellikle sözlərin sintaktik və semantik əlaqələrinə odaqlanırlar, oxumaq çətinliklərini görməyə çalışırlar, beləliklə oxuya biləcək mümkün deyillər. Beləliklə, biz elm-dövlətli sözü (KEWE) təyin edirik ki, elm oxumaq çətinliklərini sözlərin göstərilməsinə dəyişdirir. Biz elm grafını inşa etmək üçün söz-seviyyəti çətinliklərini üç perspektivdən çıxarırıq, həmçinin elm grafından çıxarılan çətinliklərin məlumatlarını təyin etmək üçün iki söz inşa edən modelləri inşa edirik. KEWE oxuyabiləcəyi təcrübələr İngilizce və Çin veri qurularında oxuyabiləcəyi təcrübələr üçün təşkil edilmişdir. Sonuçlar da KEWE'nin təcrübəsini və potensialını göstərir.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo metodu koja nauči riječ uključujući za procjenu čitljivosti. Za postojeće modele uključujuće riječi, oni se obično fokusiraju na sintaktičke ili semantičke odnose riječi, dok ignoriraju teškoće čitanja, tako oni možda ne mogu biti odgovarajući za procjenu čitljivosti. Stoga, obećavamo bogatstvenu riječ o znanju, koja širi znanje o teškosti čitanja u predstavljanje riječi. Posebno, izvlačimo znanje o teškoći na nivou riječi iz tri perspektive da izgradimo grafik znanja i razvijemo dva modela uključujući kontekst problema iz grafika znanja kako bi definisali funkcije gubitka. Eksperimenti su dizajnirani za primjenu KEWE za procjenu readability na engleskim i kineskim podacima, te rezultati pokazuju kako učinkovitost i potencijal KEWE-a.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo metodo, ki se uči besede vdelava za oceno berljivosti. Pri obstoječih modelih vključevanja besed se običajno osredotočajo na sintaktične ali semantične odnose besed, hkrati pa ignorirajo težave branja, zato morda niso primerne za oceno berljivosti. Zato zagotavljamo znanje obogateno besedno vključevanje (KEWE), ki znanje o težavah branja kodira v reprezentacijo besed. Natančneje, znanje o težavnosti na ravni besed izvlečemo iz treh perspektiv za izdelavo grafa znanja in razvijamo modele vključevanja dveh besed, ki vključujejo kontekst težavnosti iz grafa znanja za opredelitev funkcij izgube. Eksperimenti so namenjeni uporabi KEWE za oceno berljivosti na angleških in kitajskih naborih podatkov, rezultati pa kažejo tako učinkovitost kot potencial KEWE.', 'jv': 'Nyong ngolesi iki, awak dhéwé ngerti tindang nggawe layang seneng pisan banget nggawe Tulung gambar sistem sing isih perbudhakan winih Kaya, awak dhéwé beraksi punika ingkang alam-alam kuwi nggawe gerakan kelas (KEKEWA), olèhku nggawe kesempatan kanggo nguasai gambar dhéwé. Alpha Gebudhakan langkung dibejuhan kanggo nggawe KEWA kanggo assembosi kapan kanggo dataset Inggris lan cetane, lan gambaran sing bisa éwangi nggambar efek karo potansi KEWA.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים שיטה שלמדה את המילה הקריאה לערכת היכולת לקרוא. לדוגמאות המילים הקיומות, הן מתמקדות בדרך כלל במערכת היחסים הסינטקטית או סמנטית של מילים, בזמן שהתעלמו מהקשות הקריאה, כך שאולי הן לא מתאימות לערכת היכולת לקרוא. לכן, אנחנו מספקים את המילה העשירה במידע (KEWE), שמקודמת את הידע על קשות קריאה לתוך מייצג המילים. במיוחד, אנו מוציאים את הידע על קשות רמה מילים משלושה מבטים לבנות גרף הידע, ולפיתח שתי מילים מודלים להכניס את הקשר הקשה שנוצר מהגרף הידע כדי להגדיר את הפונקציות האבודה. ניסויים מעוצבים כדי להפעיל את KEWE לערכת היכולת לקרוא גם על קבוצות נתונים אנגליות וגם סיניות, והתוצאות מראות גם יעילות וגם פוטנציאל של KEWE.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã zo da wani metode wanda za'a sanar da magana wanda ke ƙunsa da karatun karatun. Don misãlai da ke ƙunsa da maganar da ke ƙunsa, ana ɗabi'a, su yi makõmi a kan haɗiya ko kuma ma'anar magana, kuma idan sun manta da ƙunci na karanta, don haka, ba za su iya daidai wa kimada ta karanta ba. Kuma Munã bã shi magana mai girma ga ilmi, tanã tãshi da ilmi game da karatun nauyi zuwa ga fassarar magana. Specifically, we extract the knowledge on word-level difficulty from three perspectives to construct a knowledge graph, and develop two word embedding models to incorporate the difficulty context derived from the knowledge graph to define the loss functions.  Ana ƙayyade jarrabo dõmin a amfani da KEWU ga karatun karatun masu karatun ta kan ƙananan Ingiriya da kina, kuma matsalan na nuna masu amfani da tsakanin KEWU.", 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཀློག་ཆོས་ལྟར་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་མིག དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཚད་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་པའི་གྲངས་རིགས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་གི་ཡོད། Specifically, we extract the knowledge on word-level difficulty from three perspectives to construct a knowledge graph, and develop two word embedding models to incorporate the difficulty context derived from the knowledge graph to define the loss functions. Experiments are designed to apply KEWE for readability assessment on English and Chinese datasets and the results demonstrate both effectiveness and potential of KEWE.'}
{'en': 'WikiRef : Wikilinks as a route to recommending appropriate references for scientific Wikipedia pages', 'ar': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks كطريق للتوصية بالمراجع المناسبة لصفحات ويكيبيديا العلمية', 'es': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks como una vía para recomendar referencias apropiadas para páginas científicas de Wikipedia', 'pt': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks como um caminho para recomendar referências apropriadas para páginas científicas da Wikipédia', 'fr': 'WikiRef\xa0: Wikilinks comme moyen de recommander des références appropriées pour les pages scientifiques de Wikipédia', 'ja': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks as a route to Recommending appropriate reference for scientific Wikipedia pages', 'hi': 'WikiRef: वैज्ञानिक विकिपीडिया पृष्ठों के लिए उपयुक्त संदर्भों की सिफारिश करने के लिए एक मार्ग के रूप में Wikilinks', 'zh': 'WikiRef曰:维基链接为科学维基百科页面荐当参考文献之道', 'ru': 'WikiRef: Викиссылки как путь к рекомендации соответствующих ссылок для научных страниц Википедии', 'ga': 'WikiRef: Vicipéid mar bhealach chun tagairtí oiriúnacha a mholadh do leathanaigh Vicipéide eolaíocha', 'ka': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks as a route to recommend appropriate references for scientific Wikipedia pages', 'el': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks ως μια διαδρομή για την σύσταση κατάλληλων αναφορών για επιστημονικές σελίδες της Βικιπαίδειας', 'hu': 'WikiRef: Wikihivatkozások, mint útvonal a tudományos Wikipédia oldalak megfelelő hivatkozásainak javaslatára', 'it': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks come percorso per raccomandare riferimenti appropriati alle pagine scientifiche di Wikipedia', 'mk': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks како пат за препорака на соодветни референции за научните страници на Wikipedia', 'lt': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks kaip būdas rekomenduoti atitinkamas nuorodas moksliniams Wikipedia puslapiams', 'kk': 'Name', 'mt': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks bħala rotta għar-rakkomandazzjoni ta’ referenzi xierqa għall-paġni xjentifiċi tal-Wikipedia', 'ms': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks sebagai laluan untuk mencadangkan rujukan sesuai untuk halaman Wikipedia saintifik', 'ml': 'വികിറെഫ്: ശാസ്ത്ര വിക്കിപിഡിയയുടെ താളുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിക്കിപ്പീഡിയ പാതകങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി സജ്ജീവമായ', 'mn': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks as a route to recommend appropriate references for scientific Wikipedia pages', 'no': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks som ein rute som anbefales tilpassande referanser for vitenskapelige Wikipedia-sider', 'pl': 'WikiRef: Wikilinki jako droga do rekomendowania odpowiednich referencji do naukowych stron Wikipedii', 'ro': 'WikiRef: Wikilink-uri ca cale de recomandare a referințelor adecvate pentru paginile științifice Wikipedia', 'sr': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks kao put da preporučuje odgovarajuće preporuke za naučne Wikipedia stranice', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks as a wado in lagu soo jeedo warqado ku habboon bogga sayniska Wikipedia', 'sv': 'WikiRef: Wikilänkar som en väg att rekommendera lämpliga referenser för vetenskapliga Wikipedia sidor', 'ta': 'WikiRef: அறிவியல் விக்கிபிடியா பக்கங்களுக்கு பொருத்தமான குறிப்புகளை பரிந்துரைக்கும் வழி', 'ur': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks as a route to recommend appropriate references for scientific Wikipedia pages', 'uz': 'WikiRef: Name', 'vi': 'WikiLRef: WikiLlink như một đường tới thư giới thiệu sách của Wikipedia.', 'bg': 'Уикипрепратки като път към препоръчване на подходящи препратки за научни страници в Уикипедия', 'hr': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks kao put preporučuje odgovarajuće preporuke za znanstvene Wikipedia stranice', 'da': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks som en vej til at anbefale passende referencer til videnskabelige Wikipedia-sider', 'nl': "WikiRef: Wikilinks als een route naar het aanbevelen van geschikte referenties voor wetenschappelijke Wikipedia pagina's", 'de': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks als Weg zur Empfehlung geeigneter Referenzen für wissenschaftliche Wikipedia-Seiten', 'id': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks sebagai rute untuk merekomendasikan referensi yang sesuai untuk halaman Wikipedia ilmiah', 'fa': 'WikiRef: ویکیلینک\u200cها به عنوان یک مسیر برای پیشنهاد ارتباطات مناسب برای صفحه\u200cهای ویکیپدیا علمی', 'ko': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks는 과학 위키백과 페이지에 적당한 참고 문헌을 추천하는 경로이다', 'sw': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks as a route to recommending appropriate references for scientific Wikipedia pages', 'af': "WikiRef: Wikilinks as 'n raad om geskikte verwysing vir wetenskaplike Wikipedia bladsye te aanbeveel", 'tr': 'WikiRef: Bilim Wikipediýa sahypalary üçin uygun referans maslahat etmek üçin wiki baglaýyşlar bir ýol hökmünde', 'sq': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks si një rrugë për të rekomanduar referenca të përshtatshme për faqet shkencore të Wikipedias', 'az': 'WikiRef: Bilim Wikipedia s…ôhif…ôl…ôrin…ô uyΡüun referans tΟΕvsiy…ô etm…ôk ΟΦΟßΟΦn Wikilinks yolu olaraq', 'am': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks as a route for scientific Wikipedia pages', 'bn': 'উইকিরেফ: বৈজ্ঞানিক উইকিপিডিয়া পাতার জন্য যুক্ত পরামর্শ প্রদান করার জন্য উইকিলিঙ্ক হিসেবে একটি রাস্তা', 'hy': 'WiKiRef: Wikilinks-ը որպես ճանապարհ գիտական Wikipedia էջերի հարմար հղումների խորհուրդ տալու համար', 'bs': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks kao put da preporučuje odgovarajuće preporuke za naučne Wikipedia stranice', 'cs': 'WikiRef: Wikiodkazy jako cesta k doporučení vhodných odkazů na vědecké stránky Wikipedie', 'ca': 'WikiRef: Wikilinks és una ruta per recomanar referències adequades a pàgines científices de Wikipedia', 'et': 'Wikiviide: Wikilingid kui viis soovitada sobivaid viiteid teaduslikele Wikipedia lehekülgedele', 'fi': 'WikiRef: Wikilinkit reittinä suositella sopivia viittauksia tieteellisille Wikipedian sivuille', 'jv': 'query-sort', 'sk': 'Wikipovezave kot pot k priporočanju ustreznih referenc za znanstvene Wikipedije strani', 'ha': 'WikiRef Wilinks', 'bo': 'Title WikiRef Wikilinks as a route to recommend appropriate references for scientific Wikipedia pages', 'he': 'תואר WikiRef Wikilinks כדרך להמליץ התייחסות מתאימות לדפי ויקיפדיה מדעיים'}
{'en': 'The exponential increase in the usage of Wikipedia as a key source of scientific knowledge among the researchers is making it absolutely necessary to metamorphose this knowledge repository into an integral and self-contained source of information for direct utilization. Unfortunately, the references which support the content of each Wikipedia entity page, are far from complete. Why are the reference section ill-formed for most Wikipedia pages? Is this section edited as frequently as the other sections of a page? Can there be appropriate surrogates that can automatically enhance the reference section? In this paper, we propose a novel two step approach   WikiRef   that (i) leverages the wikilinks present in a scientific Wikipedia target page and, thereby, (ii) recommends highly relevant references to be included in that target page appropriately and automatically borrowed from the reference section of the wikilinks. In the first step, we build a classifier to ascertain whether a wikilink is a potential source of reference or not. In the following step, we recommend references to the target page from the reference section of the wikilinks that are classified as potential sources of references in the first step. We perform an extensive evaluation of our approach on datasets from two different domains   Computer Science and Physics. For Computer Science we achieve a notably good performance with a precision@1 of 0.44 for reference recommendation as opposed to 0.38 obtained from the most competitive baseline. For the Physics dataset, we obtain a similar performance boost of 10 % with respect to the most competitive baseline.', 'ar': 'الزيادة الهائلة في استخدام ويكيبيديا كمصدر رئيسي للمعرفة العلمية بين الباحثين تجعل من الضروري للغاية تحويل مستودع المعرفة هذا إلى مصدر معلومات متكامل ومكتفي للاستخدام المباشر. لسوء الحظ ، فإن المراجع التي تدعم محتوى كل صفحة كيان Wikipedia بعيدة عن الاكتمال. لماذا قسم المراجع غير صحيح لمعظم صفحات ويكيبيديا؟ هل يتم تحرير هذا القسم بشكل متكرر مثل الأقسام الأخرى من الصفحة؟ هل يمكن أن يكون هناك بدائل مناسبة يمكنها تحسين القسم المرجعي تلقائيًا؟ في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا جديدًا من خطوتين - WikiRef - والذي (1) يستفيد من روابط wikilink الموجودة في صفحة هدف ويكيبيديا العلمية ، وبالتالي (2) توصي بإدراج مراجع وثيقة الصلة في تلك الصفحة المستهدفة بشكل مناسب واستعار تلقائيًا من قسم المراجع في روابط ويكي. في الخطوة الأولى ، نقوم ببناء مصنف للتأكد مما إذا كان رابط wikilink هو مصدر مرجعي محتمل أم لا. في الخطوة التالية ، نوصي بإشارات إلى الصفحة الهدف من قسم المراجع في روابط wikilinks المصنفة كمصادر محتملة للمراجع في الخطوة الأولى. نقوم بإجراء تقييم شامل لنهجنا الخاص بمجموعات البيانات من مجالين مختلفين - علوم الكمبيوتر والفيزياء. بالنسبة لعلوم الكمبيوتر ، نحقق أداءً جيدًا بشكل ملحوظ بدقة @ 1 من 0.44 للتوصية المرجعية بدلاً من 0.38 التي تم الحصول عليها من\nالأكثر تنافسية. بالنسبة لمجموعة بيانات الفيزياء ، نحصل على تعزيز أداء مماثل بنسبة 10٪ فيما يتعلق بخط الأساس الأكثر تنافسية.', 'fr': "L'augmentation exponentielle de l'utilisation de Wikipédia en tant que source clé de connaissances scientifiques parmi les chercheurs rend absolument nécessaire de métamorphoser ce référentiel de connaissances en une source d'information intégrale et autonome pour une utilisation directe. Malheureusement, les références qui soutiennent le contenu de chaque page d'entité Wikipédia sont loin d'être complètes. Pourquoi la section de référence est-elle mal formée pour la plupart des pages Wikipédia\xa0? Cette section est-elle modifiée aussi fréquemment que les autres sections d'une page\xa0? Existe-t-il des substituts appropriés qui peuvent automatiquement améliorer la section de référence\xa0? Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle approche en deux étapes - WikiRef - qui (i) tire parti des liens wiki présents dans une page cible scientifique de Wikipédia et, par conséquent, (ii) recommande des références hautement pertinentes à inclure dans cette page cible de manière appropriée et automatiquement empruntée à la section de référence du liens wiki. Dans un premier temps, nous créons un classificateur pour déterminer si un lien wiki est une source potentielle de référence ou non. Dans l'étape suivante, nous recommandons des références à la page cible dans la section de référence des liens wiki qui sont classées comme sources potentielles de références dans la première étape. Nous effectuons une évaluation approfondie de notre approche sur des ensembles de données provenant de deux domaines différents\xa0: l'informatique et la physique. Pour l'informatique, nous obtenons une performance particulièrement bonne avec une précision @1 de 0,44 pour la recommandation de référence, contre 0,38 obtenu avec\nle niveau de référence le plus compétitif. Pour le jeu de données de physique, nous obtenons un gain de performance similaire de 10\xa0% par rapport à la base de référence la plus compétitive.", 'pt': 'O aumento exponencial no uso da Wikipédia como fonte chave de conhecimento científico entre os pesquisadores está tornando absolutamente necessário metamorfosear este repositório de conhecimento em uma fonte de informação integral e autocontida para utilização direta. Infelizmente, as referências que suportam o conteúdo de cada página de entidade da Wikipédia estão longe de serem completas. Por que a seção de referência está mal formada para a maioria das páginas da Wikipedia? Esta seção é editada com a mesma frequência que as outras seções de uma página? Pode haver substitutos apropriados que possam aprimorar automaticamente a seção de referência? Neste artigo, propomos uma nova abordagem em duas etapas – WikiRef – que (i) aproveita os wikilinks presentes em uma página de destino da Wikipedia científica e, assim, (ii) recomenda que referências altamente relevantes sejam incluídas nessa página de destino de forma adequada e automaticamente emprestadas da seção de referência dos wikilinks. Na primeira etapa, construímos um classificador para verificar se um wikilink é uma fonte potencial de referência ou não. Na etapa seguinte, recomendamos referências à página de destino da seção de referência dos wikilinks que são classificados como fontes potenciais de referências na primeira etapa. Realizamos uma extensa avaliação de nossa abordagem em conjuntos de dados de dois domínios diferentes – Ciência da Computação e Física. Para Ciência da Computação, alcançamos um desempenho notavelmente bom com uma precisão@1 de 0,44 para recomendação de referência, em oposição a 0,38 obtida de\na base mais competitiva. Para o conjunto de dados de Física, obtemos um aumento de desempenho semelhante de 10% em relação à linha de base mais competitiva.', 'ja': '研究者の間で科学的知識の主要なソースとしてのウィキペディアの使用が指数関数的に増加しているため、この知識リポジトリを直接利用するための統合された自己完結型の情報源に変えることが絶対に必要になっています。 残念ながら、各Wikipediaエンティティページのコンテンツをサポートする参照は完全ではありません。 ほとんどのウィキペディアページの参照セクションが不正な理由は何ですか？ このセクションは、ページの他のセクションと同じくらいの頻度で編集されていますか？ リファレンスセクションを自動的に強化できる適切なサロゲートはありますか？ 本稿では、(i)科学的なウィキペディアのターゲットページに存在するウィキリンクを活用し、(ii)そのターゲットページに適切かつ自動的にウィキリンクのリファレンスセクションから借用することを推奨する、新規の2段階アプローチ（ WikiRef ）を提案する。 最初のステップでは、ウィキリンクが潜在的な参照元であるかどうかを確認するための分類子を構築します。 次のステップでは、最初のステップで参照元候補として分類されているウィキリンクの参照セクションからターゲットページへの参照をお勧めします。 私たちは、コンピュータサイエンスと物理学という2つの異なる領域からのデータセットに対する私たちのアプローチの広範な評価を行います。 コンピュータサイエンスでは、0.38から得られたのとは対照的に、参照推奨の精度@ 1は0.44で、特に優れたパフォーマンスを達成しています\n最も競争力のあるベースラインです。Physicsデータセットの場合、最も競争力のあるベースラインに対して10%の同様のパフォーマンス向上を得ます。', 'es': 'El aumento exponencial del uso de Wikipedia como fuente clave de conocimiento científico entre los investigadores está haciendo absolutamente necesario transformar este depósito de conocimiento en una fuente de información integral e independiente para su uso directo. Desafortunadamente, las referencias que respaldan el contenido de cada página de la entidad de Wikipedia están lejos de ser completas. ¿Por qué la sección de referencia está mal formada para la mayoría de páginas de Wikipedia? ¿Se edita esta sección con la misma frecuencia que las demás secciones de una página? ¿Puede haber sustitutos apropiados que puedan mejorar automáticamente la sección de referencia? En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque novedoso de dos pasos, WikiRef, que (i) aprovecha los wikilinks presentes en una página de destino de Wikipedia científica y, por lo tanto, (ii) recomienda incluir referencias altamente relevantes en esa página de destino de manera adecuada y automática tomadas prestadas de la sección de referencias de la wikilinks. En el primer paso, creamos un clasificador para determinar si un wikilink es una posible fuente de referencia o no. En el siguiente paso, recomendamos referencias a la página de destino de la sección de referencias de los wikilinks que se clasifican como posibles fuentes de referencias en el primer paso. Llevamos a cabo una evaluación exhaustiva de nuestro enfoque en conjuntos de datos de dos dominios diferentes: Ciencias de la Computación y Física. Para Ciencias de la Computación, logramos un rendimiento notablemente bueno con una precisión @1 de 0.44 para la recomendación de referencia, frente a 0.38 obtenida de\nla base de referencia más competitiva. Para el conjunto de datos de Física, obtenemos un aumento de rendimiento similar del 10% con respecto a la línea de base más competitiva.', 'zh': '维基百科为治人科学知识要用数长,此使转此知识库为一全,独立之息,以供直用。 不幸者,所以维基百科体页面参考文献远未成也。 何多维基百科页面参格非是? 此编辑频率与页面同否? 岂有当代者,可以自强参。 于本文中,新颖二步法 - WikiRef - (i)因科学维基百科页面之维基链接,以(ii)高参考文献适意页面中,自借于维基链接。 第一步之中,构一类器以定之维基链接否则潜参之也。 下一步,请从维基链接参引页面,此链接第一步中归类为潜在者参之。 二异域之数(计算机科学与物理)之法博矣。 其于计算机科学也,吾得其善,precision@1为0.44,以参举之,非得0.38也\n最具竞争力之基线。 物理数据集,相对最具竞争力基线,得类10%升。', 'ga': "Mar gheall ar an méadú easpónantúil ar úsáid Vicipéid mar phríomhfhoinse eolais eolaíoch i measc na dtaighdeoirí, tá sé fíor-riachtanach an stór eolais seo a mheiteamorfaiú ina fhoinse dhílis agus fhéinchuimsitheach faisnéise le húsáid dhíreach. Ar an drochuair, tá na tagairtí a thacaíonn le hábhar gach leathanaigh aonáin Vicipéid, i bhfad ó bheith iomlán. Cén fáth nach bhfuil an chuid tagartha d'fhormhór na leathanach Vicipéide? An gcuirtear an chuid seo in eagar chomh minic leis na codanna eile de leathanach? An féidir ionaid oiriúnacha a bheith ann ar féidir leo an chuid tagartha a fheabhsú go huathoibríoch? Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige dhá chéim nua – WikiRef – a (i) a ghiaráil na wikilinks atá i láthair ar leathanach sprice eolaíoch Vicipéid agus, mar sin, (ii) a mholann tagairtí thar a bheith ábhartha a chur san áireamh ar an leathanach sprice sin go cuí agus a fháil ar iasacht go huathoibríoch. ón rannán tagartha de na vicí. Sa chéad chéim, tógaimid aicmitheoir chun a fháil amach an bhfuil wikilink ina fhoinse tagartha féideartha nó nach bhfuil. Sa chéim seo a leanas, molaimid tagairtí don leathanach sprice ón rannán tagartha de na wikilinks a aicmítear mar fhoinsí tagartha féideartha sa chéad chéim. Déanaimid meastóireacht fhairsing ar ár gcur chuige maidir le tacair shonraí ó dhá réimse éagsúla – Eolaíocht Ríomhaireachta agus Fisic. Maidir le Ríomheolaíocht bainimid amach feidhmíocht thar a bheith maith le cruinneas@1 de 0.44 le haghaidh moladh tagartha i gcomparáid le 0.38 a fuarthas ó\nan bonnlíne is iomaíche. Maidir le tacar sonraí na Fisice, faightear borradh feidhmíochta comhchosúil de 10% maidir leis an mbunlíne is iomaíche.", 'hi': 'शोधकर्ताओं के बीच वैज्ञानिक ज्ञान के एक प्रमुख स्रोत के रूप में विकिपीडिया के उपयोग में घातीय वृद्धि इस ज्ञान भंडार को प्रत्यक्ष उपयोग के लिए जानकारी के एक अभिन्न और आत्म-निहित स्रोत में रूपांतरित करने के लिए बिल्कुल आवश्यक बना रही है। दुर्भाग्य से, संदर्भ जो प्रत्येक विकिपीडिया इकाई पृष्ठ की सामग्री का समर्थन करते हैं, वे पूर्ण से बहुत दूर हैं। अधिकांश विकिपीडिया पृष्ठों के लिए संदर्भ अनुभाग का गठन क्यों किया गया है? क्या यह अनुभाग किसी पृष्ठ के अन्य अनुभागों के रूप में अक्सर संपादित किया जाता है? क्या उचित सरोगेट हो सकते हैं जो स्वचालित रूप से संदर्भ अनुभाग को बढ़ा सकते हैं? इस पत्र में, हम एक उपन्यास दो कदम दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं - WikiRef - कि (i) एक वैज्ञानिक विकिपीडिया लक्ष्य पृष्ठ में मौजूद wikilinks का लाभ उठाता है और इस प्रकार, (ii) अत्यधिक प्रासंगिक संदर्भों को उस लक्ष्य पृष्ठ में उचित रूप से शामिल करने की सिफारिश करता है और स्वचालित रूप से विकिलिंक्स के संदर्भ अनुभाग से उधार लिया जाता है। पहले चरण में, हम यह पता लगाने के लिए एक क्लासिफायर का निर्माण करते हैं कि विकिलिंक संदर्भ का संभावित स्रोत है या नहीं। निम्नलिखित चरण में, हम पहले चरण में संदर्भों के संभावित स्रोतों के रूप में वर्गीकृत विकिलिंक्स के संदर्भ अनुभाग से लक्ष्य पृष्ठ के संदर्भों की अनुशंसा करते हैं। हम दो अलग-अलग डोमेन - कंप्यूटर विज्ञान और भौतिकी से डेटासेट पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का व्यापक मूल्यांकन करते हैं। कंप्यूटर विज्ञान के लिए हम संदर्भ सिफारिश के लिए 0.44 के precision@1 के साथ एक विशेष रूप से अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं, जैसा कि 0.38 से प्राप्त करने के विपरीत है\nसबसे अधिक प्रतिस्पर्धी आधार रेखा। भौतिकी डेटासेट के लिए, हम सबसे अधिक प्रतिस्पर्धी आधार रेखा के संबंध में 10% का एक समान प्रदर्शन बढ़ावा प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Экспоненциальный рост использования Википедии в качестве ключевого источника научных знаний среди исследователей делает абсолютно необходимым превращение этого хранилища знаний в единый и автономный источник информации для непосредственного использования. К сожалению, ссылки, которые поддерживают содержание каждой страницы сущности Википедии, далеко не полны. Почему эталонная секция плохо сформирована для большинства страниц Википедии? Редактируется ли этот раздел так же часто, как и другие разделы страницы? Могут ли быть подходящие суррогаты, которые могут автоматически улучшить референтный раздел? В этой статье мы предлагаем новый двухэтапный подход – WikiRef – который (i) использует вики-ссылки, присутствующие на целевой странице научной Википедии, и, таким образом, (ii) рекомендует высокоактуальные ссылки, которые должны быть включены в эту целевую страницу надлежащим образом и автоматически заимствованы из справочного раздела вики-ссылок. На первом этапе мы создаем классификатор, чтобы определить, является ли вики-ссылка потенциальным источником ссылки или нет. На следующем шаге мы рекомендуем ссылки на целевую страницу из справочного раздела вики-ссылок, которые классифицируются как потенциальные источники ссылок на первом шаге. Мы проводим обширную оценку нашего подхода к наборам данных из двух разных областей – компьютерных наук и физики. Для компьютерных наук мы достигаем заметно хорошей производительности с точностью@1 0,44 для справочной рекомендации в отличие от 0,38, полученного из\nнаиболее конкурентоспособная базовая линия. Для набора данных Physics мы получаем аналогичный прирост производительности на 10% по отношению к самой конкурентоспособной базовой линии.', 'hu': 'a legversenyképesebb kiindulópont. A fizikai adatkészlet esetében hasonló, 10%-os teljesítménynövekedést érünk el a legversenyképesebb alapkészlethez képest.', 'el': 'η πιο ανταγωνιστική βάση. Για το σύνολο δεδομένων Φυσικής, λαμβάνουμε παρόμοια αύξηση απόδοσης 10% σε σχέση με την πιο ανταγωνιστική βάση.', 'it': 'la base di riferimento più competitiva. Per il dataset di Fisica, otteniamo un incremento delle prestazioni simile del 10% rispetto al baseline più competitivo.', 'ka': 'ყველაზე კონპექტიური მხარეს. ფიზიკის მონაცემებისთვის, ჩვენ მივიღეთ იგივე გავაკეთება 10%-ის განმავლობაზე, რომელიც უფრო კონკურექტიური ბაზილის განმავლობაში.', 'mk': 'најконкурентната основа. За наборот на податоци за физика, добиваме слично зголемување на резултатите од 10 отсто во однос на најконкурентната основа.', 'kk': 'ең жарықтық негізгі сызық. Физика деректер қорларына сәйкес 10% деген жағдайды өзгертеміз.', 'ms': 'dasar yang paling kompetitif. Untuk set data Fizik, kita mendapat peningkatan prestasi yang sama 10% dengan dasar yang paling kompetitif.', 'lt': 'labiausiai konkurencinga bazė. Fizikos duomenų rinkinio rezultatai panašiai padidinami 10 proc., palyginti su konkurencingiausiu baziniu rodikliu.', 'ml': 'ഏറ്റവും മത്സരിക്കുന്ന ബേസ്ലൈനില്\u200d. ഫിസിക്സ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന് വേണ്ടി നമുക്ക് ഒരു പോലുള്ള പ്രകടന ബൂസ്റ്റ് കിട്ടുന്നു. ഏറ്റവും മത്സരമുള്ള ബെസ്ല', 'mt': 'the most competitive baseline.  Għas-sett tad-dejta dwar il-Fiżika, inkisbu spinta simili tal-prestazzjoni ta’ 10% fir-rigward tal-linja bażi l-aktar kompetittiva.', 'no': 'den mest konkurentære baseline. For fysiske datasettet får vi ein liknande utviklingstyrke på 10% med respekt til den mest konkurentære baseline.', 'mn': 'хамгийн өрсөлдөг суурь шугам. Физикийн өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд бид хамгийн өрсөлдөг суурь шугамын тухай ижил үйл ажиллагааг 10% нэмэгдүүлнэ.', 'pl': 'najbardziej konkurencyjny punkt odniesienia. W przypadku zbioru danych fizyki uzyskujemy podobny wzrost wydajności 10% w stosunku do najbardziej konkurencyjnej bazy danych.', 'ro': 'cea mai competitivă bază. Pentru setul de date Fizică, obținem o creștere similară a performanței de 10% față de cea mai competitivă bază.', 'sr': 'najkonkurentnija osnovna linija. Za fizičku setu podataka, dobijamo slični povećanje učinka od 10% u odnosu na najkonkurentniju osnovnu liniju.', 'si': 'හොඳම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. භෞතික දත්ත සැට්ටුවෙන්, අපිට වගේ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් 10% විශාල විශාලයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': 'tan ugu adag Taariikhda fizikada, waxaynu helaynaa boost u eg 10% oo ku saabsan heerka ugu adag.', 'sv': 'den mest konkurrenskraftiga baslinjen. För datauppsättningen Fysik får vi en liknande prestandaförbättring på 10% jämfört med den mest konkurrenskraftiga baslinjen.', 'ta': 'மிகவும் போராட்டியான அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது. For the Physics dataset, we obtain a similar performance boost of 10% with respect to the most competitive baseline.', 'ur': 'سب سے زیادہ مسابقات بیس لین۔ فیزیک ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے ہم 10% کے برابر عملکرد میں زیادہ اضافہ حاصل کرتے ہیں۔', 'vi': 'là cơ sở hoàn hảo nhất. Với tập tin về vật lí, chúng tôi đạt được một nâng cao chức năng tương tự của 10. so với cơ sở cơ bản cạnh tranh nhất.', 'uz': 'eng rivojlanuvchi asboblar. Fizik маълумотлари таркибида, biz bir xil amalning 10% darajada ishlatish imkoniyatini bajaramiz.', 'nl': 'de meest concurrerende basislijn. Voor de Physics dataset krijgen we een vergelijkbare prestatieboost van 10% ten opzichte van de meest concurrerende baseline.', 'bg': 'най-конкурентната база. За набора от данни от Физика получаваме подобен увеличение на производителността от 10% по отношение на най-конкурентната база.', 'hr': 'najkonkurentniji početak. Za kompletu fizičkih podataka dobijamo sličan povećanje učinka od 10% u odnosu na najkonkurentniju početnu liniju.', 'de': 'die wettbewerbsfähigste Ausgangsbasis. Für den Physics-Datensatz erhalten wir einen ähnlichen Leistungsschub von 10% im Vergleich zur wettbewerbsfähigsten Baseline.', 'da': 'den mest konkurrencedygtige basislinje. For Fysik datasættet opnår vi en lignende performance boost på 10% i forhold til den mest konkurrencedygtige baseline.', 'ko': '가장 경쟁력 있는 기선.물리적 데이터 집합에 대해 가장 경쟁력 있는 기선에 비해 우리는 10%의 유사한 성능을 향상시켰다.', 'fa': 'پایین ترین مسابقه. برای مجموعه داده\u200cهای فیزیک، ما یک افزایش عملکرد شبیه ۱۰ درصد را درباره\u200cی پایگاه\u200cهای مسابقه\u200cترین رقابت می\u200cگیریم.', 'sw': 'mitandao ya ushindani zaidi. Kwa taarifa za fizikia, tunapata ongezeko linalofanana na utendaji wa asilimia 10 kwa kuheshimu msingi wa mashindano.', 'tr': 'iň ýaryşykly baseline. Fizika maglumatlary üçin, iň ýakyn çykyşlyk baseliniň üstünde 10%-niň üstüne meňzeşlik ukyplygy bar.', 'id': 'dasar yang paling kompetitif. Untuk set data fisika, kita mendapatkan peningkatan prestasi yang sama 10% dengan dasar yang paling kompetitif.', 'sq': 'baza më konkurruese. Për grupin e të dhënave fizike, ne marrim një rritje të ngjashme performance prej 10% lidhur me bazën më konkurruese.', 'af': "die mees gemeenskap basislien. Vir die Fisikaanse datastel, kry ons 'n gelyke prestasie booster van 10% met respek na die mees gemeenskap basisline.", 'am': 'በጣም ተቃዋሚ መቀመጫ ነው:: ለፊስክስ ዳታ ማዕከላዊ መደገፊያ አካባቢ አሥር በመቶ አካባቢ እናገኛለን፡፡', 'az': '톛n m칲톛llif s톛tir. Fizik veril톛nl톛ri 칲칞칲n, 톛n m칲qayis톛d톛 s톛hif톛l톛ri haqq캼nda 10%-d톛n b톛nz톛r bir performans art캼r캼r캼q.', 'ca': 'la base més competitiva. Per al conjunt de dades de Física, obtenim un augment de rendiment similar del 10% en relació amb la base més competitiva.', 'hy': 'ամենամրցակցության հիմքում: For the Physics dataset, we obtain a similar performance boost of 10% with respect to the most competitive baseline.', 'bn': 'সবচেয়ে প্রতিযোগিতার বেসেলাইন। ফিজিক্স ডাটাসেটের জন্য, আমরা প্রতিযোগিতার সবচেয়ে প্রতিযোগিতার বেসাইনের সম্মানে ১০ শতাংশের মতো প্রদর্শনী বৃদ্ধ', 'bs': 'najkonkurentnija osnovna linija. Za fizički set podataka, dobijemo slični povećanje učinka od 10% u odnosu na najkonkurentniju osnovnu liniju.', 'fi': 'kilpailukykyisin lähtötilanne. Fysiikan aineistossa saadaan samanlainen 10%:n suorituskyvyn nousu kilpailukykyisimmästä lähtötilanteesta.', 'cs': 'nejkonkurenceschopnější základní hodnotu. U datového souboru Fyzika získáváme podobné zvýšení výkonu o 10% s ohledem na nejkonkurenčnější základní hodnotu.', 'et': 'kõige konkurentsivõimelisem lähtealus. Füüsika andmekogumi puhul saavutame sarnase tulemuslikkuse tõusu 10% võrreldes kõige konkurentsivõimelisema lähtetasemega.', 'jv': 'Sayensi Laih Laopo sing paling ngregani diputasane ora bisa nggawe pagjine Wipedipedya diputasane ? section politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk ng챕w챕 챕ntuk 챕ntuk 챕ntuk duruh basa sing nyebut챕 - WiikiRef - nyebut챕 i) ng챕w챕 챕ntuk 챕ntuk kelompok ng챕w챕 챕ntuk dh챕w챕 ana ing sakjane Wiikipedia sing dadi ng챗ftar luwih tambah, lan tambah (i i) nyebutak챕 supoyata sak benharus tambah ng챕w챕, lan automatik dh챕w챕 ng챗ftar section nd챗ftar. Anyone section Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk sistem sing nyelarakno kanggo diangkat dh챕w챕 ning dataset iki ulih dolanan sing sampek - Sayensi Kompjuter lan Bisik. Pira Sayensi komputer, awak dh챕w챕 ngerasah barang apik dh챕w챕 ngerasah bar챗ng precision@1 Display routing\nSapa sing perusahaan sing paling dhuwur Genjer data yang dipunangke, awake awake dh챕w챕 luhur it챕pakan ning 10% sing ngomong nik kab챔h basa sing paling apik dh챕w챕.', 'he': 'הגידול האקספונציאלי בשימוש בוויקיפדיה כמקור מפתח של ידע מדעי בין החוקרים הופך את זה לחלוטין הכרחי למטאמורפוס מחסן הידע הזה למקור אינטגרלי ומושל עצמי של מידע לשימוש ישיר. למרבה הצער, התייחסות שמתמכות בתוכן של כל עמוד היחידות ויקיפדיה, רחוקות מלאה. למה חלק התייחסות לא נוצר טוב לרוב עמודי ויקיפדיה? האם החלק הזה עורך לעתים קרובות כמו החלקים האחרים של עמוד? האם יכולים להיות חלקים מתאימים שיכולים לשפר באופן אוטומטי את חלק התייחסות? בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה חדשה של שני צעדים - WikiRef - אשר (i) משתמש בקשר wikilinks הנוכחים בעמוד המטרה מדעי ויקיפדיה, ולכן, (ii) ממליץ התייחסות רלוונטיות ביותר להיות כולל בעמוד המטרה ההוא באופן הולם ואוטומטי משואל מהחלק התייחסות של wikilinks. In the first step, we build a classifier to ascertain whether a wikilink is a potential source of reference or not.  בשלב הבא, אנו ממליצים התייחסות לעמוד המטרה מהחלק התייחסות של חיתולים המסוווגים כמקורות פוטנציאליים של התייחסות בשלב הראשון. אנחנו מבצעים עריכה רחבה של הגישה שלנו על קבוצות נתונים משני תחומות שונים - מדע מחשבים ופיזיקה. למדע מחשב אנחנו משיגים ביצוע טוב במיוחד עם precision@1 0.44 למלצת התייחסות בניגוד ל\nבסיס התחרות ביותר. עבור קבוצת נתונים פיזיקה, אנחנו מקבלים דחף ביצועים דומה של 10% בנוגע לבסיס התחרות ביותר.', 'sk': 'Zaradi eksponentnega povečanja uporabe Wikipedije kot ključnega vira znanstvenega znanja med raziskovalci je nujno, da se ta repozitorij znanja pretvori v celovit in samostojen vir informacij za neposredno uporabo. Na žalost sklici, ki podpirajo vsebino vsake Wikipedijske entitete strani, še zdaleč niso popolni. Zakaj je referenčni odsek slabo oblikovan za večino Wikipedijskih strani? Ali je ta razdelek urejen tako pogosto kot drugi deli strani? Ali obstajajo ustrezni nadomestki, ki lahko samodejno izboljšajo referenčni oddelek? V tem prispevku predlagamo nov pristop v dveh korakih – WikiRef – ki (i) uporablja wikipovezave, prisotne na znanstveni ciljni strani Wikipedije, in s tem, (ii) priporoča, da se zelo relevantne reference vključijo na to ciljno stran ustrezno in samodejno izposodijo iz referenčnega dela wikipovezav. V prvem koraku zgradimo klasifikator, da ugotovimo, ali je wikipovezava potencialni vir referenc ali ne. V naslednjem koraku priporočamo sklicevanje na ciljno stran iz referenčnega razdelka wikipovezav, ki so v prvem koraku razvrščeni kot potencialni viri referenc. Izvajamo obsežno oceno našega pristopa na nabore podatkov iz dveh različnih področij - računalništvo in fizika. Za računalništvo dosegamo izjemno dobro delovanje z precision@1 0,44 za referenčno priporočilo v nasprotju z 0,38, pridobljeno iz\nnajbolj konkurenčno osnovo. Za fizični nabor podatkov dobimo podobno povečanje zmogljivosti za 10% glede na najbolj konkurenčno osnovo.', 'bo': 'ཝིག་པི་ཌི་ཡི་སྤྱོད་པར་གལ་ཆེན་གྱི་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་གཙོ་བ་དེ་རྟོགས་མཁན་དབྱེ་རིག ཡིན་ནའང་། Wikipedia་དབུགས་ཤོག་བྱང་རེ་རེར་སོ་སོའི་ནང་དོན་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་པའི་refers. ཅིའི་ཕྱིར་Wikipedia་ཡིག་ཆ་ཕལ་ཆེ་ཤོག་ལ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་དབུགས་ཆ་རྣམས་མེད་པ་ཡིན་ནམ། དབྱེ་རིགས་འདི་ནི་ཤོག་བྱང་གི་ཆ་ཤས་གཞན་དང་ལྟ་སྟངས་ཡིན་ནམ། རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཁུངས་གཏོང་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིན་མིན་ནམ ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོས་བརྗོད་ཐོག་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། ང་ཚོས་ཐོག་མའི་གྲལ་ཐེངས་དང་པོ་ནས་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོག་གི་གྲལ་མ་དེ་ལ། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཡུལ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཤོག་བྱང་ཐོག་མའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་དང་པོ་ལ་འགོད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་ལས་མིན་འདུག ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཚན་རིག་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱ་འགུལ་ལྡན་དང་། precision@1 0.44 ཡི་གྲངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཉེན་ཁ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་དམིགས་གཏན་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།\nསྤྱིར་བཏང་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད། དངོས་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟར་ན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྤྱིར་བཏོན་པའི་མཐར་འཁྲིལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་གཅིག་ཀྱང་མཐོང', 'ha': "Kibone na ƙãra amfani da Wikimedia kamar maɓalli wa sanin na ilmi a tsakanin watafiti, yana yarda da shi ya zama muhimu a metamorfi wannan bakarãrar ilmi zuwa wani source na guda da yake cikin shirin bayani. Babu'am, misãlai da ke ƙarfafa wanda ke cikin duk takardan Wikimedia, ba za'a cika ba. Don me ake zartar da rabon Reference wa mafiya yawa ɗin Wikimedia? Shin, an edit wannan rabon da aka mara fara kamar ƙungiyõyi na guda na saura? Shin, za'a iya sami surgeo masu daidaita da za'a ƙara sigar misalin farat ɗaya? Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata matsayi biyu ta tsaya - WikiRef - da (ni) ke samar da wikilin wanda ke cikin wani karatun na Sayani WikiKiedia na gabatar da shi kuma, da haka, (i i) yana shawarar da muhimmi masu muhimmada da za'a shigar da shi a cikin wannan page na goani, yana da hakki da kuma ana yi amfani da farat ɗaya daga section na maganar wikilinks. Daga ƙẽtare ta farko, za mu gina wani mai fassara dõmin ka sani idan wani wikilink yana da wani sanyi wa fassara ko kuma ba. Daga ƙõfõfin da ke biyar, Munã shawarar da misalin sunan alama daga rabon maganar wikilinks da aka ƙayyade su kamar sourcen muhimu wa Reference cikin kwanza. Tuna tafiyar ƙidãya ga hanyarmu a kan danne-tsari biyu daban-dabam- Sayan Aiki da Fiziki. Ki Zani na Compyuta precision@1 0,44 wa shawarar fassarar da aka motsa 0,38 daga\nda mafi fassara a wajen aiki. For the Physics dataset, we obtain a similar performance boost of 10% with respect to the most competitive baseline."}
{'en': 'Authorship Identification for Literary Book Recommendations', 'ar': 'تحديد التأليف لتوصيات الكتاب الأدبي', 'fr': "Identification de l'auteur pour les recommandations de livres littéraires", 'pt': 'Identificação de autoria para recomendações de livros literários', 'es': 'Identificación de autoría para recomendaciones de libros literarios', 'ja': '文献推奨書の著作者識別', 'zh': '文学书荐者识之', 'hi': 'साहित्यिक पुस्तक सिफारिशों के लिए लेखकत्व पहचान', 'ru': 'Идентификация авторства для рекомендаций по литературным книгам', 'ga': 'Aitheantas Údaraíochta do Mholtaí Leabhar Liteartha', 'hu': 'Szerzői azonosító az irodalmi könyvek ajánlásaihoz', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση συγγραφέα για συστάσεις λογοτεχνικού βιβλίου', 'ka': 'საკუთარი წიგნის მოწყობინებების ავტორისტიფიკაცია', 'lt': 'Raštų knygos rekomendacijų autorių tapatybės nustatymas', 'it': "Identificazione dell'autore per le raccomandazioni di libri letterari", 'kk': 'Авториялық кітапшалардың идентификациясы', 'mk': 'Идентификација на авторот за препораки од литературната книга', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Penulis untuk Rakmandasi Buku Literari', 'mt': 'Identifikazzjoni tal-Awtorità għar-Rakkomandazzjonijiet tal-Ktieb Litterarju', 'ml': 'ലൈറ്ററി പുസ്തകത്തിന്റെ ശുദ്ധീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അധികാരം തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mn': 'Бүх номын шинжлэх ухааны шинжлэх ухаан', 'ro': 'Identificarea autorității pentru recomandările cărților literare', 'no': 'Identifikasjon av autorisasjon for tilrådd for bokbok', 'pl': 'Identyfikacja autorstwa dla rekomendacji książek literackich', 'sr': 'Identifikacija autoriteta za preporuke knjige knjige', 'si': 'ලියිටර් පොත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ලැකියුම් පරීක්ෂණය', 'sv': 'Identifiering av författarskap för rekommendationer om litterära böcker', 'so': 'Aqoonsiga rasmiga ee warqadda', 'ta': 'உரிமை புத்தகத்தின் பரிந்துரைகளுக்கு உரிமையாளர் அடையாளம்', 'ur': 'لیٹری کتاب کی سفارش کے لئے اجازت شناسایی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhận diện thư từ sách Văn học', 'da': 'Identifikation af forfatterskab for anbefalinger af litterære boger', 'hr': 'Identifikacija autoriteta za preporuke knjige knjige', 'nl': 'Identificatie van auteurschap voor aanbevelingen voor literaire boeken', 'bg': 'Идентификация на авторството за препоръки за литературни книги', 'de': 'Identifizierung der Autoren für Empfehlungen zu literarischen Büchern', 'id': 'Identifikasi Penulis untuk Rekomendasi Buku Literari', 'ko': '문학 서적 추천의 저자 신분 식별', 'fa': 'شناسایی اجرای کتاب کتاب نوشته', 'sw': 'Tambulisho la mamlaka kwa Mapendekezo ya Kitabu cha Fasihi', 'tr': 'Literary Kitap Maslahatlary üçin Otomatik Girişi', 'af': 'Oorskrywing Identifikasie vir Literary Book Recommendations', 'sq': 'Identifikimi i Autorisë për rekomandimet e Librit Literar', 'am': 'የሥልጣን መግለጫ', 'az': 'Yazı Kitabın Tövratları', 'hy': 'Գրքի խորհուրդների հեղինակային ինքնությունը', 'bs': 'Identifikacija autoriteta za preporuke knjige knjige', 'ca': "Identificació de l'autor per a les recomanacions del llibre literari", 'et': 'Kirjandusraamatute soovituste autori identifitseerimine', 'bn': 'সাহিত্য বই পরামর্শের জন্য অনুমোদন পরিচয়', 'cs': 'Identifikace autorství pro doporučení literární knihy', 'fi': 'Kirjallisten kirjojen suositusten tekijäntunnistus', 'jv': 'Mix Radio', 'ha': 'Banner page', 'sk': 'Identifikacija avtorstva za književna priporočila', 'he': 'זיהוי אוטוריה למלצות ספרים ספריים', 'bo': 'དབང་རྩིས་བྲིས་དེབ་ཅིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Book recommender systems can help promote the practice of reading for pleasure, which has been declining in recent years. One factor that influences reading preferences is writing style. We propose a system that recommends books after learning their authors’ style. To our knowledge, this is the first work that applies the information learned by an author-identification model to book recommendations. We evaluated the system according to a top-k recommendation scenario. Our system gives better accuracy when compared with many state-of-the-art methods. We also conducted a qualitative analysis by checking if similar books / authors were annotated similarly by experts.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de recomendação de livros podem ajudar a promover a prática da leitura por prazer, que vem diminuindo nos últimos anos. Um fator que influencia as preferências de leitura é o estilo de escrita. Propomos um sistema que recomenda livros após aprender o estilo de seus autores. Até onde sabemos, este é o primeiro trabalho que aplica as informações aprendidas por um modelo de identificação de autor para recomendações de livros. Avaliamos o sistema de acordo com um cenário de recomendação top-k. Nosso sistema oferece melhor precisão quando comparado com muitos métodos de última geração. Também realizamos uma análise qualitativa verificando se livros/autores semelhantes foram anotados de forma semelhante por especialistas.', 'ar': 'يمكن أن تساعد أنظمة اقتراح الكتب في تعزيز ممارسة القراءة من أجل المتعة ، والتي انخفضت في السنوات الأخيرة. أحد العوامل التي تؤثر على تفضيلات القراءة هو أسلوب الكتابة. نقترح نظامًا يوصي بالكتب بعد تعلم أسلوب مؤلفيها. على حد علمنا ، هذا هو العمل الأول الذي يطبق المعلومات التي تم تعلمها من خلال نموذج تحديد هوية المؤلف على توصيات الكتاب. قمنا بتقييم النظام وفقًا لسيناريو توصية من الدرجة الأولى. يوفر نظامنا دقة أفضل عند مقارنته بالعديد من الأساليب الحديثة. لقد أجرينا أيضًا تحليلًا نوعيًا عن طريق التحقق مما إذا كانت الكتب / المؤلفين المتشابهين قد تم شرحهم بالمثل من قبل الخبراء.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de recommandation de livres peuvent aider à promouvoir la pratique de la lecture pour le plaisir, qui a diminué ces dernières années. Le style d'écriture est un facteur qui influence les préférences de lecture. Nous proposons un système qui recommande des livres après avoir appris le style de leurs auteurs. À notre connaissance, il s'agit du premier travail qui applique les informations apprises par un modèle d'identification d'auteur aux recommandations de livres. Nous avons évalué le système selon un scénario de recommandation top-k. Notre système offre une meilleure précision par rapport à de nombreuses méthodes de pointe. Nous avons également effectué une analyse qualitative en vérifiant si des livres/auteurs similaires avaient été annotés de la même manière par des experts.", 'es': 'Los sistemas de recomendación de libros pueden ayudar a promover la práctica de la lectura por placer, que ha ido disminuyendo en los últimos años. Un factor que influye en las preferencias de lectura es el estilo de escritura Proponemos un sistema que recomienda libros después de aprender el estilo de sus autores. Hasta donde sabemos, este es el primer trabajo que aplica la información aprendida por un modelo de identificación de autor a las recomendaciones de libros. Evaluamos el sistema de acuerdo con un escenario de recomendación de los mejores k. Nuestro sistema ofrece una mayor precisión en comparación con muchos métodos de última generación. También realizamos un análisis cualitativo comprobando si los expertos comentaban de manera similar libros o autores similares.', 'ja': '近年減少傾向にある読書を楽しむための習慣を促進するのに役立つブックレコメンダシステム。読書の好みに影響を与える要因の1つは、書き方です。著者のスタイルを学んだ上で本をお勧めするシステムを提案します。私たちの知る限りでは、これは著者識別モデルによって学んだ情報をおすすめの書籍に適用した最初の作品です。トップkの推奨シナリオに従ってシステムを評価しました。当社のシステムは、多くの最先端の方法と比較して、より良い精度を提供します。また、同様の書籍/著者が専門家によって同様に注釈されているかどうかをチェックすることにより、定性的な分析を行った。', 'hi': 'पुस्तक सिफारिशकर्ता सिस्टम खुशी के लिए पढ़ने के अभ्यास को बढ़ावा देने में मदद कर सकते हैं, जो हाल के वर्षों में गिरावट आई है। एक कारक जो पढ़ने की प्राथमिकताओं को प्रभावित करता है वह लेखन शैली है। हम एक ऐसी प्रणाली का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो अपने लेखकों की शैली सीखने के बाद पुस्तकों की सिफारिश करती है। हमारे ज्ञान के लिए, यह पहला काम है जो लेखक-पहचान मॉडल द्वारा सीखी गई जानकारी को पुस्तक सिफारिशों पर लागू करता है। हमने एक टॉप-के सिफारिश परिदृश्य के अनुसार सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन किया। हमारी प्रणाली कई अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में बेहतर सटीकता देती है। हमने यह जांचकर एक गुणात्मक विश्लेषण भी किया कि क्या समान पुस्तकों / लेखकों को विशेषज्ञों द्वारा समान रूप से एनोटेट किया गया था।', 'zh': '图书荐统可以助近年读乐之道。 偏好一因素是风格。 吾侪发一统,学后荐书册。 以吾所知,此第一将识模范所学之信宜于书也。 臣等据 top-k 荐举方案评估了系统。 比之先进,统有善准确性。 又检家书/作者注定性分析。', 'ru': 'Системы книгорекомендателей могут помочь продвигать практику чтения для удовольствия, которая в последние годы сокращается. Одним из факторов, влияющих на читательские предпочтения, является стиль письма. Мы предлагаем систему, которая рекомендует книги после изучения стиля их авторов. Насколько нам известно, это первая работа, в которой информация, полученная с помощью модели идентификации автора, применяется к рекомендациям книги. Мы оценили систему в соответствии с лучшим сценарием рекомендаций. Наша система дает лучшую точность по сравнению со многими современными методами. Мы также провели качественный анализ, проверив, были ли аналогичные книги/авторы аналогичным образом аннотированы экспертами.', 'ga': "Is féidir le córais mholtóirí leabhar cuidiú le cleachtas na léitheoireachta chun pléisiúir a chur chun cinn, rud atá ag dul i laghad le blianta beaga anuas. Fachtóir amháin a mbíonn tionchar aige ar roghanna léitheoireachta is ea an stíl scríbhneoireachta. Molaimid córas a mholann leabhair tar éis dóibh stíl a n-údar a fhoghlaim. Go bhfios dúinn, is é seo an chéad saothar a chuireann an t-eolas a d'fhoghlaim múnla aitheantais údair i bhfeidhm ar mholtaí a chur in áirithe. Rinneamar measúnú ar an gcóras de réir chás molta barr-k. Tugann ár gcóras cruinneas níos fearr i gcomparáid le go leor modhanna úrscothach. Rinneamar anailís cháilíochtúil freisin trína sheiceáil an ndearna saineolaithe nótaí cosúla ar leabhair/údair chosúla.", 'hu': 'A könyvkajánló rendszerek segíthetnek előmozdítani az olvasás gyakorlatát, amely az elmúlt években csökkent. Az olvasási preferenciákat befolyásoló egyik tényező az írási stílus. Olyan rendszert javasolunk, amely a szerzők stílusának megismerése után ajánlja a könyveket. Tudomásunk szerint ez az első olyan munka, amely a szerző-azonosító modell által tanult információkat alkalmazza a könyv ajánlásaira. A rendszert egy top-k ajánlási forgatókönyv alapján értékeltük. Rendszerünk nagyobb pontosságot biztosít számos korszerű módszerrel összehasonlítva. Minőségi elemzést is végeztünk azzal, hogy ellenőriztük, hogy hasonló könyveket/szerzőket szakértők hasonlóan jegyzeteltek-e fel.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα σύστασης βιβλίων μπορούν να βοηθήσουν στην προώθηση της πρακτικής ανάγνωσης για ευχαρίστηση, η οποία έχει μειωθεί τα τελευταία χρόνια. Ένας παράγοντας που επηρεάζει τις προτιμήσεις ανάγνωσης είναι το στυλ γραφής. Προτείνουμε ένα σύστημα που προτείνει βιβλία αφού μάθει το στυλ των συγγραφέων τους. Από όσο γνωρίζουμε, αυτό είναι το πρώτο έργο που εφαρμόζει τις πληροφορίες που αποκτήθηκαν από ένα μοντέλο ταυτοποίησης συγγραφέα σε συστάσεις βιβλίων. Αξιολογήσαμε το σύστημα σύμφωνα με ένα σενάριο συστάσεων κορυφής-k. Το σύστημά μας δίνει καλύτερη ακρίβεια σε σύγκριση με πολλές μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Επίσης, πραγματοποιήσαμε ποιοτική ανάλυση ελέγχοντας αν παρόμοια βιβλία/συγγραφείς σχολιάστηκαν με παρόμοιο τρόπο από ειδικούς.', 'ka': 'წიგნის შემწყვებელი სისტემები შეუძლია დახმარება საკითხვის პრაქტიკის გამოყენებას, რომელიც ბოლო წლის განმავლობაში დახმარება. ერთი ფაქტორი, რომელიც წაკითხვის პარამეტრების შესახებ იქნება წაკითხვის სტილი. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ სისტემა, რომელიც საკუთარი წიგნის სტილის შემდეგ წიგნის შესახებ. ჩვენი ცნობიერებისთვის, ეს არის პირველი სამუშაო, რომელიც ავტორისგან იდენტიფიკაციის მოდელეში მოგეყენებული ინფორმაციის გამოყენება. ჩვენ სისტემის შესახებ უფრო მარტივი რეკუმენტის სენარიოს გავამუშავეთ. ჩვენი სისტემა უფრო მსგავსი წარმოდგენება, როდესაც მრავალი სურათების მეტისთვის შედგენება. ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთეთ კვალიტატიგური ანალიზი, რომელიც დავარწმუნეთ თუ ასეთი წიგნი/ავტორები იგივე განსხვავებულია ექსპერტები.', 'kk': 'Кітаптарды талап ететін жүйелер соңғы жылдар бойы оқу тәртібін көмектесе алады. Бір фактор оқу параметрлерін оқу үшін әсер етеді - жазу стилі. Біз авторларының стилін үйренгеннен кейін кітаптарды талап ететін жүйе ұсынамыз. Біздің білімімізге, бұл автор идентификациясы үлгісінің оқылған мәліметті кітапшасына қолданатын бірінші жұмыс. Жүйені жоғары рекомендациялау сценариясына сәйкес бағаладық. Біздің жүйеміз көпшілік әдістерімен салыстырғанда жақсы дұрыс береді. Біз сондай-ақ ұқсас кітаптар/авторлар эксперттердің ұқсас белгілерін тексеріп квалификациялық анализ істедік.', 'it': "I sistemi di raccomandazione dei libri possono aiutare a promuovere la pratica della lettura per piacere, che è in declino negli ultimi anni. Un fattore che influenza le preferenze di lettura è lo stile di scrittura. Proponiamo un sistema che consiglia i libri dopo aver imparato lo stile dei loro autori. Per quanto ne sappiamo, questo è il primo lavoro che applica le informazioni apprese da un modello di identificazione dell'autore alle raccomandazioni dei libri. Abbiamo valutato il sistema secondo uno scenario di raccomandazione top k. Il nostro sistema offre una maggiore precisione rispetto a molti metodi all'avanguardia. Abbiamo anche condotto un'analisi qualitativa verificando se libri/autori simili sono stati annotati in modo simile da esperti.", 'lt': 'Knygų rekomendavimo sistemos gali padėti skatinti pramogų skaitymo praktiką, kuri pastaraisiais metais mažėjo. Vienas iš veiksnių, turinčių įtakos skaitymo pasirinkimams, yra rašymo stilius. Siūlome sistemą, kuria rekomenduojame knygas pasimokius jų autorių stiliui. Mūsų žiniomis tai yra pirmasis darbas, kuriuo autorių identifikavimo modelio įgyta informacija taikoma rekomendacijoms. Sistemą įvertinome pagal aukščiausio k rekomendacijos scenarijų. Mūsų sistema suteikia geresnį tikslumą, palyginti su daugeliu pažangiausių metodų. Taip pat atlikome kokybinę analizę patikrindami, ar ekspertai panašiai pažymėjo panašias knygas ir (arba) autorius.', 'mk': 'Book recommender systems can help promote the practice of reading for pleasure, which has been declining in recent years.  Еден фактор кој влијае на преференциите за читање е стилот на пишување. Предложуваме систем кој препорачува книги откако ќе го научиме стилот на нивните автори. Според нашето знаење, ова е првата работа која ги применува информациите што ги научи моделот за идентификација на авторот на препораките. Го проценивме системот според сценариото за препорака на врвот К. Нашиот систем дава подобра прецизност во споредба со многу најдобри методи. Исто така, спроведовме квалитетна анализа проверувајќи дали сличните книги/автори беа анализирани слично од експертите.', 'mt': "Is-sistemi ta’ rakkomandazzjoni tal-kotba jistgħu jgħinu fil-promozzjoni tal-prattika tal-qari għall-pjaċir, li kienet qed tonqos f’dawn l-aħħar snin. Fattur wieħed li jinfluwenza l-preferenzi tal-qari huwa l-istil tal-kitba. We propose a system that recommends books after learning their authors' style.  Għall-għarfien tagħna, din hija l-ewwel ħidma li tapplika l-informazzjoni miksuba minn mudell ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-awtur biex jiġu rreġistrati r-rakkomandazzjonijiet. Aħna evalwajna s-sistema skont xenarju ta’ rakkomandazzjoni top-k. Is-sistema tagħna tagħti preċiżjoni aħjar meta mqabbla ma’ ħafna metodi avvanzati. Sarna wkoll analiżi kwalitattiva billi vverifikajna jekk kotba/awturi simili kinux annotati b’mod simili mill-esperti.", 'ml': 'പുസ്തകത്തിന്റെ ശുപാര്\u200dശിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം സന്തോഷത്തിനായി വായിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തികമായി പ് വായിക്കുന്ന മുന്\u200dഗണങ്ങള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന് പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്ന ഒരു കാരണമാണ് എഴുതുന്നത്  പുസ്തകങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം പുസ്തകങ്ങള്\u200d പരാമര്\u200dശിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായ നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന് ഇതാണ് ആദ്യത്തെ ജോലി പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നത്, ഒരു രചയിതാവിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള മോഡലിന് പഠിച ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ശുപാര്\u200dശ സിനേഷന്\u200d അനുസരിച്ച് വിലയിച്ചു. നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൃത്യമായ വ്യക്തിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് രീതി ഇതുപോലുള്ള പുസ്തകങ്ങള്\u200d/രചയിതാക്കള്\u200d ഇതുപോലെ വിശദീകരിക്കപ്പെടുന്നുണ്ടോ എന്ന് പരിശോധിച്ചു കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ക', 'ms': 'Sistem cadangan buku boleh membantu mempromosikan praktek membaca untuk keseronokan, yang telah menurun dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Satu faktor yang mempengaruhi keutamaan pembacaan adalah gaya menulis. Kami cadangkan sistem yang mencadangkan buku selepas belajar gaya penulis mereka. Menurut pengetahuan kita, ini adalah kerja pertama yang melaksanakan maklumat yang dipelajari oleh model pengenalan-penulis untuk cadangan buku. Kami menilai sistem menurut skenario rekomendasi top-k. Sistem kita memberikan ketepatan yang lebih baik bila dibandingkan dengan banyak kaedah-kaedah terbaik. Kami juga melakukan analisis kualitatif dengan memeriksa sama ada buku-buku/penulis yang serupa ditulis dengan cara yang sama oleh pakar.', 'mn': 'Ном зөвлөгч системүүд сүүлийн жилүүдэд багасгаж буй унших дасгалыг дэмжиж чадна. Нэг хүчин зүйл унших сонголтуудыг нөлөөлдөг нь бичих хэлбэр юм. Бид зохиолчдын хэлбэрийг сурсан дараа номуудыг зөвлөх системийг санал болгож байна. Бидний мэдлэгтэй хувьд энэ нь номын зөвлөгөөнд авьяасан загварын мэдээллийг ашиглах анхны ажил юм. Бид системийг хамгийн өндөр зөвлөгөөний хувилбараар дүгнэсэн. Бидний систем олон улсын урлагийн аргыг харьцуулахад илүү нарийн байдал өгдөг. Бид мөн адилхан ном/зохиолчид мэргэжилтнүүд адилхан анзаарсан эсэхийг шалгаж чадвартай шинжилгээ хийсэн.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de recomandare a cărților pot contribui la promovarea practicii lecturii pentru plăcere, care a fost în scădere în ultimii ani. Un factor care influențează preferințele de citire este stilul de scriere. Propunem un sistem care recomandă cărți după învățarea stilului autorilor lor. Din câte știm, aceasta este prima lucrare care aplică informațiile învățate de un model de identificare a autorului la recomandările cărților. Am evaluat sistemul conform unui scenariu de recomandare top-k. Sistemul nostru oferă o precizie mai bună în comparație cu multe metode de ultimă generație. De asemenea, am efectuat o analiză calitativă prin verificarea dacă cărți/autori similare au fost adnotate similar de către experți.', 'no': 'Bokkanbefalingssystemet kan hjelpa til å oppretta praksisen for lesing for glede, som har gått ned i siste år. Eit faktor som påvirkar lesing av innstillingar er skrivingsstil. Vi foreslår eit system som anbefaler bøkar etter å læra utviklaren sine stil. Dette er det første arbeidet som brukar informasjonen lært av ein autoidentifikasjonsmodul til bokanbefalingar. Vi evaluerte systemet etter ein rekomendasjonsfenario. Systemet vårt gjev betre nøyaktighet når sammenlignet med mange metodar for kunsten. Vi gjelda også ein kvalitativ analyse ved å kontrollere om liknande bøker/utviklarar er markert på same måte av ekspertar.', 'pl': 'Systemy rekomendacji książek mogą pomóc promować praktykę czytania dla przyjemności, która w ostatnich latach spada. Jednym z czynników wpływających na preferencje czytania jest styl pisania. Proponujemy system polecający książki po poznaniu stylu ich autorów. Z naszej wiedzy jest to pierwsza praca, która stosuje informacje uzyskane przez model identyfikacji autora do rekomendacji książek. Oceniliśmy system według scenariusza rekomendacji top-k. Nasz system zapewnia lepszą dokładność w porównaniu z wieloma najnowocześniejszymi metodami. Przeprowadziliśmy również analizę jakościową sprawdzając, czy podobne książki/autorzy zostały podobnie opisane przez ekspertów.', 'sr': 'Sistemi preporuèujuæi knjige mogu pomoæi da promoviraju praksu èitanja za zadovoljstvo, koja se smanjuje u poslednjih godina. Jedan faktor koji utiče na čitanje preferencija je stil pisanja. Predlažemo sistem koji preporučuje knjige nakon učenja stila autora. Za naše znanje, ovo je prvi rad koji primjenjuje informacije koje je naučio model identifikacije autora za preporuke knjige. Procjenjivali smo sistem prema scenariju najboljih preporuka. Naš sistem daje bolju tačnost u usporedbi sa mnogim metodama umjetnosti. Takođe smo proveli kvalitativnu analizu provjeravajući da li su slične knjige/autori isto navodili stručnjaci.', 'so': 'Isticmaalka talo-bixiyaha kitaabka ayaa caawinaya in uu horumariyo tababarka akhrinta farxadda, taas oo yaraanay sanadkii ugu dambeeyey. Mid sabab ah oo saameyn ku yeelan karta daryeelka akhriska waa qoraalka. Waxaan soo jeedaynaa nidaam ku taliya buugaagta ka dib barashada qaabka qoraalkooda. Aqoonsheenna, taasi waa shuqulkii ugu horeeyay ee uu macluumaadka lagu baray tusaale ahaan aqoonsiga qoraalka u qoray si uu u sameeyo talooyin buugaag. nidaamka waxaan ku qiimeynay si waafaqsan muuqashada arimaha sare. nidaamkayagu wuxuu bixiyaa saxda ka fiican marka la barbardhigo hablada farshaxanka badan. Waxaannu sameynnay baaritaan aqoon ah, waxaana baaritay in buugaagta/qoraalka la mid ah loo dhibo khabiiriyiinta.', 'si': 'පොත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පද්ධතියට පුළුවන් විදිහට පුළුවන් විදිහට පුළුවන් විදිහට කියවන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජන කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ විශේෂය ලියන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ ලේඛකයේ විදියට පස්සේ පොත් ඉගෙන ගන්න පස්සේ. අපේ දන්නවට, මේක පුළුවන් වැඩක් තමයි ලේඛකයෙන් පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණයක් ලැබුනේ තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ අපි පද්ධතියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ උපස්ථ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ. අපේ පද්ධතිය හොඳයි හරියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට වැඩිය හොඳයි. අපි වගේම විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණයක් කළා වගේම වගේම පොත/ලේඛකයෝ වගේම විශේෂකයෝ විශ්ලේෂකයෝ වගේම ප්\u200dර', 'sv': 'Bokrekommendationssystem kan bidra till att främja praxis att läsa för nöje, som har minskat under de senaste åren. En faktor som påverkar läspreferenser är skrivstil. Vi föreslår ett system som rekommenderar böcker efter att ha lärt sig författarnas stil. Såvitt vi vet är detta det första arbetet som tillämpar den information som lärts av en författaridentifieringsmodell på bokrekommendationer. Vi utvärderade systemet enligt ett rekommenderat top k-scenario. Vårt system ger bättre noggrannhet jämfört med många toppmoderna metoder. Vi genomförde också en kvalitativ analys genom att kontrollera om liknande böcker/författare kommenterades på samma sätt av experter.', 'ta': 'புத்தகத்தின் பரிந்துரைப்பாளர் அமைப்புகள் மகிழ்ச்சிக்கு வாசிப்பதின் செயல்பாட்டை உயர்த்த முடியும், அத வாசிப்பது முன்னுரிமைகளை படிப்பது எழுதும் பாணியை பாதிக்கும் ஒரு காரணி. ஆசிரியர்களின் பாணியை கற்றுக் கொண்ட பிறகு புத்தகங்களை பரிந்துரைக்கும் ஒரு அமைப்பு நாம் பரிந் எங்கள் அறிவிற்கு, இது தான் முதல் வேலை இது ஒரு எழுத்தாளர் அடையாளம் மாதிரியால் கற்ற தகவலை புத்தகத்தின் பரிந்துரைகளை பயன மேல்-k பரிந்துரைக்கும் பொருட்டு நாம் கணினியை மதிப்பிட்டோம். நம்முடைய அமைப்பு பல நிலையில் கலை முறைமைகளுடன் ஒப்பிடும்போது நல்ல சரிபார்வையை கொடுக்கிறது. போன்ற புத்தகங்கள்/எழுத்தாளர்கள் அதே போன்ற தெரியுமா என்று சரிபார்த்துக் கொண்டு நாம் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட ஆராய்', 'ur': 'کتاب کی توصیفہ دینے والے سیستموں کو خوشنودی کے لئے پڑھنے کی تلاش کی تدبیر کی مدد کر سکتے ہیں جو اگلے سالوں میں کمی ہوئی ہے۔ ایک فکتور جو پڑھنے کی ترجیح پر اثر دیتا ہے اسے لکھنے کی طرح ہے۔ ہم ایک سیسٹم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو کتابوں کو ان کے لکھنے والوں کی طرح سکھائے کے بعد سفارش دیتا ہے۔ ہمارے علم کے لئے یہ سب سے پہلے کام ہے جو ایک لکھنے والی معلومات کے ذریعہ سے پڑھی جاتی ہے کتاب کی تعلیمات کے لئے۔ ہم نے سیسٹم کو ایک ٹوپ ک کی سفارش سناریو کے مطابق ارزش کیا۔ ہمارا سیستم بہتر دقیق دیتا ہے جب بہت سی موقعیت کے مطابق ہے ہم نے بھی ایک قابل تحقیقات کی تحقیقات کی جگہ چک کر کیا کہ جیسے کتاب/لکھانے والے اس طرح تحقیقات کرنے والے ہیں.', 'uz': "Китоб таклифлари системаси хурсанд ёзиш учун бажаришга ёрдам беради, у охирги йилларда камайтирилган. @ info Biz mualliflarning uslubini o'rganishdan keyin kitoblarni talab qiladi. Bizning ilmahimizga, bu birinchi ishki, muallif identification modeli uchun maʼlumotni kitob soʻzlariga qoʻllash. Biz tizimni yuqori taʼminlovchi soʻzda qiymatimiz. Bizning tizimimiz ko'pchilik holatning ko'pchilik usullarini o'rganishda yaxshi aniqlaniladi. Biz o'xshash kitoblar/mualliflar shunday taʼminlovchi mualliflarni tekshirib ko'rib chiqqamiz.", 'vi': 'Hệ thống dán nhãn có thể giúp thúc đẩy việc đọc sách để vui vẻ, mà đã giảm dần trong những năm gần đây. Một yếu tố ảnh hưởng đến khả năng đọc quan điểm là kiểu viết. Chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống khuyến cáo sách sau khi học được phong cách tác giả. Theo chúng tôi biết, đây là tác phẩm đầu tiên áp dụng thông tin học được từ một mô hình nhận diện tác giả để đặt lời khuyên. Chúng tôi đánh giá hệ thống theo một k ịch bản đề nghị hàng đầu. Hệ thống của chúng tôi cung cấp độ chính xác hơn so với nhiều phương pháp hiện đại. Chúng tôi cũng tiến hành phân tích về tính chất bằng cách kiểm tra xem liệu sách hay tác giả tương tự được các chuyên gia ghi chú.', 'bg': 'Системите за препоръки на книги могат да спомогнат за популяризирането на практиката на четене за удоволствие, която намалява през последните години. Един фактор, който влияе на предпочитанията за четене, е стилът на писане. Предлагаме система, която препоръчва книги след изучаване на стила на авторите им. Доколкото знаем, това е първата работа, която прилага информацията, получена от модела за идентификация на автора, към препоръките за книги. Оценихме системата според сценарий с топ-к препоръки. Нашата система дава по-добра точност в сравнение с много съвременни методи. Направихме и качествен анализ, като проверихме дали подобни книги/автори са анотирани по подобен начин от експерти.', 'hr': 'Sustavi preporučujući knjige mogu pomoći promovirati praksi čitanja za zadovoljstvo, što se u posljednjih godina smanjuje. Jedan faktor koji utječe na čitanje preferencija je stil pisanja. Predlažemo sistem koji preporučuje knjige nakon učenja stila autora. Za naše znanje, ovo je prvi rad koji primjenjuje informacije koje je naučio model identifikacije autora za preporuke knjige. Procjenjivali smo sistem prema scenariju vrhunskog preporuke. Naš sustav daje bolju preciznost u usporedbi s mnogim metodama umjetnosti. Također smo proveli kvalitativnu analizu provjeravajući da li su slične knjige/autori isto navodili stručnjaci.', 'da': 'Boganbefalingssystemer kan bidrage til at fremme praksis med at læse for fornøjelse, som er faldet i de seneste år. En faktor, der påvirker læsepræferencer, er skrivestil. Vi foreslår et system, der anbefaler bøger efter at have lært deres forfatters stil. Så vidt vi ved, er dette det første værk, der anvender de oplysninger, der læres af en forfatter-identifikationsmodel til boghanbefalinger. Vi evaluerede systemet ud fra et top k anbefalingsscenarie. Vores system giver bedre nøjagtighed sammenlignet med mange state-of-the-art metoder. Vi gennemførte også en kvalitativ analyse ved at kontrollere, om lignende bøger/forfattere blev kommenteret på samme måde af eksperter.', 'nl': 'Boeken aanbevelingssystemen kunnen helpen de praktijk van lezen voor plezier te bevorderen, die de laatste jaren is afgenomen. Een factor die van invloed is op leesvoorkeuren is de schrijfstijl. We stellen een systeem voor dat boeken aanbeveelt na het leren van de stijl van hun auteurs. Voor zover wij weten, is dit het eerste werk dat de informatie die door een auteur-identificatiemodel is geleerd toepast op boekaanbevelingen. We hebben het systeem geëvalueerd volgens een top-k aanbevelingsscenario. Ons systeem geeft betere nauwkeurigheid in vergelijking met vele state-of-the-art methoden. We hebben ook een kwalitatieve analyse uitgevoerd door na te gaan of soortgelijke boeken/auteurs door experts op dezelfde manier geannoteerd zijn.', 'ko': '도서 추천 시스템은 즐거움을 목적으로 하는 독서를 촉진하는데 도움이 되는데 최근 몇 년 동안 이런 독서 방식은 줄곧 떨어지고 있다.읽기 선호에 영향을 주는 요소 중 하나는 쓰기 스타일이다.우리는 작가의 풍격을 배운 후에 책을 추천하는 시스템을 제시했다.저자 식별 모델에서 얻은 정보를 책 추천에 활용한 것은 이번이 처음인 것으로 알려졌다.우리는 top-k 추천 방안에 따라 시스템을 평가했다.많은 가장 선진적인 방법과 비교하면 우리 시스템은 더욱 좋은 정확성을 가지고 있다.우리는 또 유사한 서적/저자가 전문가가 유사한 주석을 했는지 정성 분석을 진행했다.', 'id': 'Sistem rekomendasi buku dapat membantu mempromosikan praktek membaca untuk kesenangan, yang telah menurun dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Satu faktor yang mempengaruhi keutamaan membaca adalah gaya menulis. Kami mengusulkan sistem yang merekomendasikan buku setelah belajar gaya penulis mereka. Menurut pengetahuan kita, ini adalah pekerjaan pertama yang menerapkan informasi yang dipelajari oleh model identifikasi penulis untuk rekomendasi buku. Kami mengevaluasi sistem menurut skenario rekomendasi top-k. Sistem kita memberikan akurasi yang lebih baik dibandingkan dengan banyak metode terbaik. Kami juga melakukan analisis kualitatif dengan memeriksa apakah buku/penulis yang serupa ditulis sama oleh ahli.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای پیشنهاد کتاب می\u200cتوانند تمرین خواندن برای لذت\u200cبخشی که در سالهای اخیر کاهش می\u200cشود کمک کند. یک فاکتور که بر خواندن ترجیح\u200cها تاثیر می\u200cدهد سبک نوشتن است. ما یک سیستم پیشنهاد می کنیم که بعد از یاد گرفتن سبک نویسندگان کتاب ها را پیشنهاد می دهد. برای دانش ما، این اولین کار است که اطلاعات را که توسط یک مدل شناسایی نویسنده برای پیشنهاد کتاب آموخته می شود. ما سیستم را بر اساس یک سناریو پیشنهاد بالا ارزیابی کردیم. سیستم ما دقیقات بهتر را در مقایسه با روش های زیادی هنر می دهد. ما همچنین با بررسی کردن آیا کتاب/نویسنده\u200cهای مشابه\u200cای توسط متخصص مشابه شده\u200cاند، یک تحلیل کیفیت انجام دادیم.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa kupendekeza vitabu unaweza kusaidia kukuza utaratibu wa kusoma kwa furaha, ambao umekuwa ukipungua katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. Sababu moja inayoathiri kusoma vipendeleo ni kuandika mtindo. Tunazipendekeza mfumo unaoonyesha vitabu baada ya kujifunza mtindo wa waandishi wao. To our knowledge, this is the first work that applies the information learned by an author-identification model to book recommendations.  Tuliangalia mfumo kwa mujibu wa tukio la mapendekezo ya juu. Mfumo wetu unatoa uhakika zaidi ukilinganishwa na njia nyingi za sanaa. Pia tulifanya uchambuzi wa sifa kwa kuangalia kama vitabu vinavyofanana na waandishi wa kitabu na vibaya vivyo hivyo.', 'af': "Boodskap aanbeveelderstelsels kan help om die praksie van lees vir plesies te promoteer, wat in onlangse jaar afval het. Een faktor wat die lees voorkeure influens is skryfstyl. Ons beveel 'n stelsel wat beveel boeke na die leer van hul outeurstyl. Op ons kennis, dit is die eerste werk wat die inligting wat deur 'n outeur-identifikasie model geleer word, toewend aan die boekrekening. Ons evalueer die stelsel volgens 'n top-k aanbeveling scenario. Ons stelsel gee beter presisie wanneer vergelyk word met baie state-of-the-art metodes. Ons het ook 'n kvalitatiewe analisie gedoen deur te kontroleer of soortgelyke boeke/outeure gelyk deur eksperte aangetel is.", 'tr': 'Kitap töwekiliçi sistemalary soňky ýyllarda azalan okuw praktikany töwekilip biler. Okuw seçenekleri ýazma biçiminden täsirleýän bir faktor. Biz kitaplary awtorlaryň stilini öwrenenden soňra maslahat beren sistemasyny teklip edýäris. Bilenimiz üçin bu ilkinji işi awtoryň kimligi nusgalaryna görä öwrenen maglumatlary ullanýar. Biz sistemi üst-de teklip senaryýana görä deňledik. Biziň sistemamyz birnäçe sanat yöntemleri bilen görä has gowy dogrylyklygy berýär. Biz hem meňzeş kitaplar/awtorlaryň uzmanlary tarapyndan munuň ýaly duýdurdugyny barlap kvalitatiw analýusiny etdik.', 'de': 'Buchempfehlungssysteme können dazu beitragen, die Praxis des Lesens zum Vergnügen zu fördern, die in den letzten Jahren zurückgegangen ist. Ein Faktor, der die Lesepräferenzen beeinflusst, ist der Schreibstil. Wir schlagen ein System vor, das Bücher empfiehlt, nachdem sie den Stil ihrer Autoren gelernt haben. Nach unserem Wissen ist dies die erste Arbeit, die die durch ein Autoren-Identifikationsmodell gewonnenen Informationen auf Buchempfehlungen anwendet. Wir haben das System nach einem Top-k Empfehlungsszenario evaluiert. Unser System bietet eine bessere Genauigkeit im Vergleich zu vielen modernen Methoden. Wir haben auch eine qualitative Analyse durchgeführt, indem wir überprüft haben, ob ähnliche Bücher/Autoren von Experten ähnlich kommentiert wurden.', 'am': 'የመጽሐፉ ጉዳይ ስርዓቶች በኋለኛው ዓመታት ላይ የሚጎድለውን የደስታዊ ለመቃወም ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ የፊደል ምርጫዎች ማነብ የሚጠይቅ አንድ ውጤት የጽሑፍ ዓይነት ነው፡፡ የጸሐፊዎቹን ዘይት ከመማር በኋላ መጻሕፍትን የሚያስተባብል ሲስተካከል እናሳስባታለን፡፡ እውቀታችን ይህ የመጀመሪያው ሥራ ነው፤ በጸሐፊ-identification ሞዴል የተማረ መረጃዎችን በመጽሐፍ ምክንያቶች ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡ ስብስቡን በላይ-k ምክንያት አስተያየን፡፡ ብዙዎች የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት በተደረገ ጊዜ ስርዓታችን የተሻለ እርግጠኛ ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ መጻሕፍት/ጸሐፊዎች በሙሉ አዋቂዎች እንዲደሰቁባቸው እንደሆነ እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Sistemi preporučujući knjige mogu pomoći promovirati praksi čitanja za zadovoljstvo, što se u posljednjih godina smanjuje. Jedan faktor koji utiče na čitanje preferencija je stil pisanja. Predlažemo sistem koji preporučuje knjige nakon učenja stila autora. Za naše znanje, ovo je prvi rad koji primjenjuje informacije koje je naučio model identifikacije autora za preporuke knjige. Procjenjivali smo sistem prema scenariju najvišeg preporuke. Naš sistem daje bolju preciznost u usporedbi sa mnogim metodama umjetnosti. Također smo proveli kvalitativnu analizu provjeravajući da li su slične knjige/autori isto navodili stručnjaci.', 'bn': 'বই সুপারিশ ব্যবস্থা আনন্দের জন্য পড়তে সাহায্য করতে পারে, যা সাম্প্রতিক বছরে কমে গেছে। পড়তে প্রভাবিত একটি কারণ হচ্ছে লেখার স্টাইল। আমরা একটি সিস্টেম প্রস্তাব করি যা তাদের লেখকদের শিক্ষা শেখার পর বই পরামর্শ দেয়। আমাদের জ্ঞানের জন্য, এটাই প্রথম কাজ যা লেখক-পরিচিতির মডেলের তথ্য প্রয়োগ করে বই পরামর্শ দেয়। সুপারিশের পরামর্শ অনুসারে আমরা সিস্টেমটিকে মূল্যায়ন করেছি। আমাদের সিস্টেম অনেক রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধতির সাথে তুলনা করার পরিমাণ সঠিকভাবে দেয়। আমরা একই সাথে বিশেষজ্ঞদের দ্বারা একই রকম বই/লেখকদের বিরক্তিকর বিশ্লেষণের মাধ্যমে পরীক্ষা করেছি।', 'hy': "Գրքի խորհրդատվող համակարգերը կարող են օգնել առաջ քաղել հաճույքի համար կարդալու գործընթացը, որը վերջին տարիների ընթացքում նվազում է: Առաջին գործոնը, որը ազդում է կարդալու նախընտրություններին, գրելու ոճն է: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի համակարգ, որը խորհուրդ է տալիս գրքերին հեղինակների ոճի սովորելուց հետո: Ինչպես գիտենք, սա առաջին աշխատանքն է, որը կիրառում է հեղինակի ինքնության մոդելի կողմից սովորված ինֆորմացիան գրելու խորհուրդների համար: Մենք գնահատեցինք համակարգը ըստ գլխավոր k-ի խորհուրդ սցենարի: Our system gives better accuracy when compared with many state-of-the-art methods.  Մենք նաև կատարեցինք որակային վերլուծություն' ստուգելով, թե արդյոք նման գրքեր և հեղինակներ նույնպես գրված են մասնագետների կողմից:", 'az': 'Kitab tövsiyə edən sistemləri son illərdə azaldığı oxumaq praksisini artırmağa kömək edə bilər. Okuma seçimlərini təsirləndirən bir faktor yazmaq stilidir. Biz kitablarını yazıcıların stilini öyrəndikdən sonra öyrənən bir sistemi təbliğ edirik. Bizim elmimizə bu, kitab təsirlərinə öyrəndiyi yazıcı-kimlik modeli ilə öyrəndiyi ilk işdir. Biz sistemi ən yüksək təsirlərin scenariyasına görə değerləşdirdik. Sistemimiz bir çox mövcud metodları ilə qarşılaşdığında daha doğruluq verir. Biz də bənzər kitablar/yazarlar da eyni kimi təhsil edildiyini təsdiqləyib təhsil etdik.', 'sq': 'Sistemet e rekomandimeve të librave mund të ndihmojnë në nxitjen e praktikës së leximit për kënaqësi, e cila ka rënë në vitet e fundit. Një faktor që ndikon në preferimet e leximit është stili i shkrimit. Ne propozojmë një sistem që rekomandon libra pas mësimit të stilit të autorëve të tyre. Për njohurinë tonë, kjo është puna e parë që aplikon informacionin e mësuar nga një model identifikimi i autorëve për të libruar rekomandime. Kemi vlerësuar sistemin sipas një skenari rekomandimi top-k. Sistemi ynë jep saktësi më të mirë kur krahasohet me shumë metoda më të larta. Ne kryem gjithashtu një analizë cilësore duke kontrolluar nëse libra/autorët e ngjashëm u shënuan në mënyrë të ngjashme nga ekspertët.', 'ca': "Els sistemes de recomanadors de llibres poden ajudar a promoure la pràctica de llegir per plaer, que ha estat disminuint en els últims anys. Un factor que influeix en les preferències de lectura és l'estil d'escriptura. Proposem un sistema que recomenda llibres després d'aprendre l'estil dels seus autors. Segons el nostre coneixement, aquesta és la primera feina que aplica la informació aprenida per un model d'identificació d'autor a la prensa de recomanacions. Vam evaluar el sistema d'acord amb un escenari de recomanació de top k. El nostre sistema dóna una millor precisiócomparada amb molts mètodes més avançats. També vam fer una anàlisi qualitativa comprobant si els experts van anotar llibres/autors similars de manera similar.", 'cs': 'Systémy doporučování knih mohou pomoci podpořit praxi čtení pro potěšení, která v posledních letech klesá. Jedním z faktorů, který ovlivňuje preference čtení, je styl psaní. Navrhujeme systém, který doporučuje knihy po naučení se stylu jejich autorů. Podle našeho vědomí je to první práce, která aplikuje informace získané autorsko-identifikačním modelem na knižní doporučení. Systém jsme vyhodnotili podle scénáře top-k doporučení. Náš systém poskytuje lepší přesnost ve srovnání s mnoha nejmodernějšími metodami. Dále jsme provedli kvalitativní analýzu tím, že jsme zkontrolovali, zda podobné knihy/autory byly podobně anotovány odborníky.', 'et': 'Raamatupidamissüsteemid võivad aidata edendada naudingulise lugemise praktikat, mis on viimastel aastatel vähenenud. Üks lugemise eelistusi mõjutav tegur on kirjutamisstiil. Pakume välja süsteemi, mis soovitab raamatuid pärast autorite stiili õppimist. Meie teada on see esimene töö, mis rakendab autori identifitseerimise mudeli abil saadud teavet raamatusoovitustele. Me hindasime süsteemi vastavalt top-k soovitusstsenaariumile. Meie süsteem annab parema täpsuse võrreldes paljude kaasaegsete meetoditega. Samuti viisime läbi kvalitatiivse analüüsi, kontrollides, kas sarnased raamatud/autorid on ekspertide poolt sarnaselt märgitud.', 'fi': 'Kirjasuositusjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､t voivat auttaa edistﾃ､mﾃ､ﾃ､n huvilukua, joka on viime vuosina vﾃ､hentynyt. Yksi lukumieltymyksiin vaikuttava tekijﾃ､ on kirjoitustyyli. Ehdotamme jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､, joka suosittelee kirjoja oppiessaan kirjoittajien tyylin. Tietojemme mukaan tﾃ､mﾃ､ on ensimmﾃ､inen teos, joka soveltaa kirjailijatunnistusmallin oppimaa tietoa kirjasuosituksiin. Arvioimme jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､ huippuluokan suositusskenaarion mukaisesti. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme antaa paremman tarkkuuden verrattuna moniin viimeisimpiin menetelmiin. Toteutimme myﾃｶs laadullisen analyysin tarkistamalla, onko samankaltaisia kirjoja/kirjailijoita kommentoitu vastaavalla tavalla asiantuntijoiden toimesta.', 'he': 'מערכות ממליצות ספרים יכולות לעזור לקדם את המאמן של קריאה בשביל העונג, אשר נפל בשנים האחרונות. גורם אחד שמשפיע על עדיפות קריאה הוא סגנון כתיבה. אנחנו מציעים מערכת שממלצה ספרים אחרי ללמוד את הסגנון של הסופרים שלהם. לדעתנו, זו העבודה הראשונה שמאפשרת את המידע שנלמד על ידי דוגמא זיהוי סופר להמלצות ספרים. הערכנו את המערכת לפי תרחיש המלצה העליון. Our system gives better accuracy when compared with many state-of-the-art methods.  ביצענו גם ניתוח איכותי על ידי לבדוק אם ספרים/סופרים דומים נכתבו באופן דומה על ידי מומחים.', 'ha': "Systems na shawarar littafi na iya ƙara umarin karatun wa'urar da aka yi farin ciki, wanda aka ƙara cikin shekara na farko. Babu wani fakta wanda yake yin amfani da zaɓen karantawa yana rubũtar salon. Tuna buɗa'ar wata na'ura da za'a shawarar da littattafai a bãyan an sanar da salon marubũta. Ga saninmu, wannan ne aikin na farkon da ke amfani da information wanda an sanar da shi daga misalin shaidar mai rubũtãwa zuwa masu shawarar littafin. Mun ƙaddara system da a k a ƙaddara wani anini na'urar-k da aka buɗa. Siyarmu na gaskata mafiya tsari idan an sammenliki da shiryoyin-masu-sanawa. Haƙĩƙa, Mun sami wani littãfi mai ƙayyade ko kuma ma'abũta kwamfyutan su zartar da kwamfyutan.", 'sk': 'Sistemi priporočevalcev knjig lahko pomagajo spodbujati prakso branja za užitek, ki se v zadnjih letih zmanjšuje. Eden od dejavnikov, ki vpliva na bralne preference, je slog pisanja. Predlagamo sistem, ki priporoča knjige po učenju sloga avtorjev. Kolikor vemo, je to prvo delo, ki uporablja informacije, pridobljene z avtorsko identifikacijskim modelom, za priporočila knjig. Sistem smo ocenili po scenariju vrhunskih priporočil. Naš sistem zagotavlja boljšo natančnost v primerjavi s številnimi najsodobnejšimi metodami. Izvedli smo tudi kvalitativno analizo s preverjanjem, ali so podobne knjige/avtorji podobno opisali strokovnjaki.', 'jv': 'Suggestir hukum sistem sing paling nggawe maneh perbudhakan pratik nggawe layang kanggo ngilanggar, sing isih ngulinakake tau sing dumadhi. structural navigation Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sing tukang basa luwih tukang jeneng pisan autor. Awakdhéwé, iki kuwi sing perusahaan nggawe informasi sing liurip ning model autor-id kanggo tukang mrogram. Awak dhéwé ngejaraké sistem sing sabanjuré mréneng nggawe top-k. Sistem awak dhéwé kuwi nggalakno sing luwih apik dadi, ngono teka-teka-teka-karcis sing luwih apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntukno cara-cara sing wis dipunangé karo ngono nggawe barang bok/penyutan sing koyok barang maneh karo ngono sak layang-layang.', 'bo': 'ཟིན་བྲིས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་གི་དོ་དམ་གསེས་ཀྱི་སྤྲོ་སྣང་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ཡར་རྒྱས་སྐྱོར་འགྲོ་བ་དང་། ཡིག་འབྲི་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀློག་འཇུག་པར་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གཅིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་དབྱིབས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དེབ་དག་གི་ཤུལ་ལས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་སྤྲོད་དགོས་མིན ང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ། འདི་ནི་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་འཛུགས་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་ལས་འག ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་དཔེ་ལྟར་ལྟར་བཀོད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་པོ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བདེ་ལེན་བདེ་སྦྱོར་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་འདེབས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དེབ་དང་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ཚོས་འདྲ་བའི་དཔེ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ལས་'}
{'en': 'A Nontrivial Sentence Corpus for the Task of Sentence Readability Assessment in Portuguese', 'ar': 'مجموعة الجمل غير البديهية لمهمة تقييم قابلية قراءة الجملة باللغة البرتغالية', 'pt': 'Um corpus de sentenças não trivial para a tarefa de avaliação da legibilidade de sentenças em português', 'fr': "Un corpus de phrases non trivial pour la tâche d'évaluation de la lisibilité des phrases en portugais", 'es': 'Un corpus de oraciones no trivial para la tarea de evaluación de la legibilidad de las oraciones en portugués', 'ja': 'ポルトガル語の文章可読性評価のタスクのための非可読文章コーパス', 'zh': '用葡萄牙语句可读性评事者非凡句语料库', 'ru': 'Корпус нетривиального предложения для задачи оценки читабельности предложения на португальском языке', 'hi': 'पुर्तगाली में वाक्य पठनीयता मूल्यांकन के कार्य के लिए एक nontrivial वाक्य कॉर्पस', 'ga': 'Corpas Pianbhreithe Neamhfhánach don Tasc Measúnaithe Inléiteachta Pianbhreithe sa Phortaingéilis', 'hu': 'Nem triviális ítéletkorpus az ítélet olvashatóságának értékelésére portugál nyelven', 'el': 'Ένα μη τετριμμένο σώμα ποινών για το έργο της αξιολόγησης αναγνωσιμότητας ποινών στα πορτογαλικά', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Португалиялық сөз оқу мүмкіндіктерінің тапсырмасының нетривиал сөз корпус', 'it': 'Un corpo non banale per la valutazione della leggibilità delle frasi in portoghese', 'ms': 'A Nontrivial Sentence Corpus for the Task of Sentence Readability Assessment in Portuguese', 'mk': 'Нетривијален судски корпус за проценка на читателноста на судските реченици на португалски', 'lt': 'Netrivial Sentence Corpus for the Task of Sentence Readability Assessment in Portuguese', 'ml': 'പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീഷിലെ വിധിയുടെ ജോലിക്കുള്ള വിധി കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന് ഒരു നിര്\u200dബന്ധിതമായ ശിക്ഷ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ്', 'mt': 'Korp ta’ Sentenza Mhux Trivjali għall-Valutazzjoni tal-Readabilità tas-Sentenza fil-Portugiż', 'mn': 'Португалийн өгүүлбэр унших чадварын оюун шалгалтын ажил дээр хэзээ ч биш', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Nietrywialny korpus zdań do zadania oceny czytelności zdań w języku portugalskim', 'ro': 'Un corp de sentințe nontrivial pentru evaluarea lizibilității sentințelor în portugheză', 'sr': 'Netrivijalni korpus kazne za ocjenu preglednosti kazne na portugalskom jeziku', 'so': 'Xarunta daryeelka shaqada ee kaartaynta xasaradda ee Burtuqiis', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En icke trivial meningskorpus för uppgiften att bedöma meningarnas läsbarhet på portugisiska', 'ta': 'போர்த்துகீசிஷில் வாக்குறுப்பு சாத்தியமுள்ள வாக்குறுப்பு கார்புச் செயல்', 'ur': 'پورٹوگل میں سنت پڑھنے کی آزمائش کے لئے ایک ناتربیل سنت کورپوس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một tập đoàn chưa được công bố để làm nhiệm vụ đánh giá mức án ở Bồ Đào Nha.', 'da': 'Et ikke-trivielt sætningskorpus til opgaven med vurdering af dommens læsbarhed på portugisisk', 'bg': 'Нетривиален корпус за оценка на четливостта на присъдите на португалски език', 'hr': 'Netrivialni kazneni korpus za procjenu čitljivosti kazne na portugalskom jeziku', 'nl': 'Een niettriviaal zinnencorpus voor de taak van zinnenlesbaarheidsbeoordeling in het Portugees', 'de': 'Ein nichttriviales Satzkorpus für die Aufgabe der Satzlesbarkeitsbewertung auf Portugiesisch', 'id': 'A Nontrivial Sentence Corpus for the Task of Sentence Readability Assessment in Portuguese', 'ko': '포르투갈어 문장의 가독성 평가에 사용되는 비평범한 문장 자료 라이브러리', 'sw': 'Shirika la Hukumu la Udhibiti la Kazi ya Kupitia Hukumu kwa Kireno', 'sq': 'Një korpus gjykimi jo trivial për detyrën e vlerësimit të lexueshmërisë së gjykimeve në portugalisht', 'am': 'በፖርቱጋልኛ የስርዓት መቀናቀል ማሰቃየት የሚችል የፍርድ ኮርፓስ', 'hy': 'Պորտուգալիացի լեզվով դատաստանի կարդալիության խնդրի ոչ տրիվիալ դատաստանի կորպուսը', 'tr': 'Portugalça', 'fa': 'یک کلمه\u200cی مجازات غیر ترویبی برای ارزیابی قابلیت خواندن کلمه در پورتوژیک', 'az': 'Portugalca S칬z칲 oxuyabil톛c톛yi Assess톛nin G칬z톛li 칲칞칲n 칐yr톛nm톛li S칬z칲 Corpus', 'bn': 'পোর্টুগীজের শাস্তি প্রতিযোগিতার কাজের জন্য একটি ক্ষমতাসীন শাস্তি কর্পুস', 'bs': 'Netrivialni kazneni korpus za ocjenu čitljivosti kazne na portugalskom jeziku', 'af': 'Name', 'cs': 'Netriviální větový korpus pro úkol posouzení čitelnosti věty v portugalštině', 'ca': "Un Corpus de Sentences No Trivial per l'Evaluació de la Llegibilitat de Sentences en portuguès", 'et': 'Mittetriviaalne karistuskorpus kohtuotsuse loetavuse hindamise ülesandeks portugali keeles', 'fi': 'A Nontrivial Sentence Corpus for the Task of Sentence Readability Assessment in portugali', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'קורפוס גזר לא טריוויאלי עבור הערכת היכולת לקרוא גזרים בפורטוגזית', 'sk': 'Netrivialni korpus kazni za nalogo ocenjevanja berljivosti kazni v portugalščini', 'bo': 'སྒྲ་ཚིགས་ཀྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་ལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཚོར་མཁན་ཅིག'}
{'en': 'Effective textual communication depends on readers being proficient enough to comprehend texts, and texts being clear enough to be understood by the intended audience, in a reading task. When the meaning of textual information and instructions is not well conveyed, many losses and damages may occur. Among the solutions to alleviate this problem is the automatic evaluation of sentence readability, task which has been receiving a lot of attention due to its large applicability. However, a shortage of resources, such as corpora for training and evaluation, hinders the full development of this task. In this paper, we generate a nontrivial sentence corpus in Portuguese. We evaluate three scenarios for building it, taking advantage of a parallel corpus of simplification, in which each sentence triplet is aligned and has simplification operations annotated, being ideal for justifying possible mistakes of future methods. The best scenario of our corpus PorSimplesSent is composed of 4,888 pairs, which is bigger than a similar corpus for English ; all the three versions of it are publicly available. We created four baselines for PorSimplesSent and made available a pairwise ranking method, using 17 linguistic and psycholinguistic features, which correctly identifies the ranking of sentence pairs with an accuracy of 74.2 %.', 'ar': 'يعتمد الاتصال النصي الفعال على أن يكون القراء ماهرين بما يكفي لفهم النصوص ، وأن تكون النصوص واضحة بما يكفي لفهمها من قبل الجمهور المستهدف ، في مهمة القراءة. عندما لا يتم نقل معنى المعلومات والتعليمات النصية بشكل جيد ، فقد تحدث العديد من الخسائر والأضرار. من بين الحلول للتخفيف من هذه المشكلة التقييم التلقائي لسهولة قراءة الجملة ، وهي مهمة حظيت باهتمام كبير بسبب قابليتها للتطبيق الكبير. ومع ذلك ، فإن النقص في الموارد ، مثل المؤسسات الخاصة بالتدريب والتقييم ، يعيق التطوير الكامل لهذه المهمة. في هذه الورقة ، ننتج مجموعة جملة غير بديهية باللغة البرتغالية. نقوم بتقييم ثلاثة سيناريوهات لبنائها ، والاستفادة من مجموعة التبسيط المتوازية ، حيث يتم محاذاة كل جملة ثلاثية مع شرح عمليات تبسيط ، مما يجعلها مثالية لتبرير الأخطاء المحتملة للطرق المستقبلية. يتكون أفضل سيناريو لمجموعة PorSimplesSent من 4888 زوجًا ، وهو أكبر من مجموعة مماثلة للغة الإنجليزية ؛ جميع الإصدارات الثلاثة منه متاحة للجمهور. أنشأنا أربعة خطوط أساسية لـ PorSimplesSent وأتاحنا طريقة الترتيب الزوجي ، باستخدام 17 سمة لغوية ونفسية لغوية ، والتي تحدد بشكل صحيح ترتيب أزواج الجمل بدقة 74.2٪.', 'es': 'La comunicación textual eficaz depende de que los lectores sean lo suficientemente competentes para comprender los textos y de que los textos sean lo suficientemente claros como para ser entendidos por el público objetivo en una tarea de lectura. Cuando el significado de la información textual y las instrucciones no se transmite bien, pueden producirse muchas pérdidas y daños. Entre las soluciones para paliar este problema está la evaluación automática de la legibilidad de las oraciones, tarea que ha recibido mucha atención debido a su gran aplicabilidad. Sin embargo, la escasez de recursos, como los corpus para la capacitación y la evaluación, dificulta el pleno desarrollo de esta tarea. En este artículo, generamos un corpus de sentencias no triviales en portugués. Evaluamos tres escenarios para construirlo, aprovechando un corpus paralelo de simplificación, en el que cada triplete de oración está alineado y tiene anotadas operaciones de simplificación, siendo ideal para justificar posibles errores de métodos futuros. El mejor escenario de nuestro corpus PorSimpleSent está compuesto por 4.888 pares, que es más grande que un corpus similar para el inglés; las tres versiones del mismo están disponibles públicamente. Creamos cuatro líneas de base para PorSimpleSent y pusimos a disposición un método de clasificación por parejas, utilizando 17 características lingüísticas y psicolingüísticas, que identifican correctamente la clasificación de los pares de oraciones con una precisión del 74,2%.', 'pt': 'A comunicação textual eficaz depende de os leitores serem proficientes o suficiente para compreender os textos e os textos serem claros o suficiente para serem compreendidos pelo público-alvo, em uma tarefa de leitura. Quando o significado das informações textuais e instruções não é bem transmitido, muitas perdas e danos podem ocorrer. Entre as soluções para amenizar esse problema está a avaliação automática da legibilidade das frases, tarefa que vem recebendo bastante atenção devido à sua grande aplicabilidade. No entanto, a escassez de recursos, como corpora para treinamento e avaliação, dificulta o pleno desenvolvimento dessa tarefa. Neste artigo, geramos um corpus de frases não trivial em português. Avaliamos três cenários para construí-la, aproveitando um corpus paralelo de simplificação, em que cada trinca de sentença é alinhada e tem operações de simplificação anotadas, sendo ideal para justificar possíveis erros de métodos futuros. O melhor cenário do nosso corpus PorSimplesSent é composto por 4.888 pares, que é maior que um corpus similar para inglês; todas as três versões dele estão disponíveis publicamente. Criamos quatro linhas de base para o PorSimplesSent e disponibilizamos um método de classificação por pares, usando 17 recursos linguísticos e psicolinguísticos, que identifica corretamente a classificação dos pares de frases com uma precisão de 74,2%.', 'fr': "Une communication textuelle efficace dépend du fait que les lecteurs sont suffisamment compétents pour comprendre les textes et que les textes sont suffisamment clairs pour être compris par le public visé, lors d'une tâche de lecture. Lorsque la signification des informations textuelles et des instructions n'est pas bien communiquée, de nombreuses pertes et dommages peuvent survenir. L'évaluation automatique de la lisibilité des phrases fait partie des solutions permettant de pallier ce problème, une tâche qui a fait l'objet d'une grande attention en raison de sa grande applicabilité. Cependant, le manque de ressources, telles que des corpus pour la formation et l'évaluation, entrave le plein développement de cette tâche. Dans cet article, nous générons un corpus de phrases non trivial en portugais. Nous évaluons trois scénarios pour le construire, en tirant parti d'un corpus parallèle de simplification, dans lequel chaque triplet de phrase est aligné et comporte des opérations de simplification annotées, ce qui est idéal pour justifier d'éventuelles erreurs des méthodes futures. Le meilleur scénario de notre corpus PorSimpleSent est composé de 4 888 paires, ce qui est plus grand qu'un corpus similaire pour l'anglais\xa0; les trois versions de celui-ci sont accessibles au public. Nous avons créé quatre lignes de base pour PorSimpleSent et mis à disposition une méthode de classement par paires, utilisant 17 caractéristiques linguistiques et psycholinguistiques, qui identifie correctement le classement des paires de phrases avec une précision de 74,2\xa0%.", 'ja': '効果的なテキストコミュニケーションは、読者がテキストを理解するのに十分な習熟度があり、読書タスクで意図された読者が理解するのに十分に明確であることに依存する。 テキスト情報や指示の意味がよく伝わらない場合、多くの損失や損害が発生する可能性があります。 この問題を緩和するための解決策の一つに、文章の読みやすさを自動的に評価することがあり、その応用性の高さから多くの注目を集めています。 しかし、トレーニングや評価のためのコーパなどのリソースの不足は、このタスクの完全な開発を妨げます。 本稿では、ポルトガル語で無節句コーパスを生成する。 私たちは、各文のトリプレットが整列され、単純化操作が注釈されている並行した単純化のコーパスを利用して、それを構築するための3つのシナリオを評価し、将来の方法の可能性のある間違いを正当化するのに理想的です。 私たちのコーパスPorSimplesSentの最良のシナリオは4,888ペアで構成されています。これは英語の同様のコーパスよりも大きいです。3つのバージョンすべてが公開されています。 PorSimplesSentのために4つのベースラインを作成し、17の言語学的および心理言語学的特徴を使用してペアワイズランキング法を提供しました。これは、文のペアのランキングを74.2 ％の精度で正しく識別します。', 'zh': '文本交流,在读者足以练之,而文本足以清,以受众读之。 当文本信息,义不能传,或有损益。 解此解决方案一句可读性自评,以其大适用性,多所关注。 然资源之短,如培训评之语料库,阻其全务。 本文以葡萄牙语生非凡句语料库。 估其三景,并行简语料库,其句三元组都齐,并有注释,非常适合证来法之误。 臣等语料库PorSimplesSent最佳者由4,888对成之,大于英语类语料库。 其三本皆明矣。 为PorSimplesSent创四基线,以17种言心语言学特为名法,正句对,准确率为74.2%。', 'ru': 'Эффективное текстовое общение зависит от того, достаточно ли хорошо читатели разбираются в текстах, и достаточно ли они ясны для понимания целевой аудиторией в задаче чтения. Когда смысл текстовой информации и инструкций не передается должным образом, могут возникнуть многочисленные убытки и ущерб. Одним из решений для решения этой проблемы является автоматическая оценка читаемости предложений, задача, которой уделяется много внимания из-за ее большой применимости. Однако полному выполнению этой задачи препятствует нехватка ресурсов, таких, как средства для профессиональной подготовки и оценки. В этой статье мы генерируем нетривиальный корпус предложений на португальском языке. Мы оцениваем три сценария его построения, используя параллельный корпус упрощения, в котором каждый триплет предложения выровнен и имеет аннотированные операции упрощения, будучи идеальным для обоснования возможных ошибок будущих методов. Лучший сценарий нашего корпуса PorSimplesSent состоит из 4888 пар, что больше, чем аналогичный корпус для английского языка; все три его версии общедоступны. Мы создали четыре базовые линии для PorSimplesSent и сделали доступным метод попарного ранжирования, используя 17 лингвистических и психолингвистических особенностей, которые правильно идентифицируют ранжирование пар предложений с точностью 74,2%.', 'hi': 'प्रभावी पाठ्य संचार पाठकों पर निर्भर करता है कि वे ग्रंथों को समझने के लिए पर्याप्त कुशल हैं, और ग्रंथों को पढ़ने के कार्य में इच्छित दर्शकों द्वारा समझने के लिए पर्याप्त स्पष्ट किया जा रहा है। जब पाठ्य जानकारी और निर्देशों का अर्थ अच्छी तरह से व्यक्त नहीं किया जाता है, तो कई नुकसान और नुकसान हो सकते हैं। इस समस्या को कम करने के लिए समाधानों में से वाक्य पठनीयता का स्वचालित मूल्यांकन है, कार्य जो अपनी बड़ी प्रयोज्यता के कारण बहुत अधिक ध्यान प्राप्त कर रहा है। हालांकि, संसाधनों की कमी, जैसे प्रशिक्षण और मूल्यांकन के लिए निगम, इस कार्य के पूर्ण विकास में बाधा डालता है। इस पेपर में, हम पुर्तगाली में एक nontrivial वाक्य कॉर्पस उत्पन्न करते हैं। हम इसे बनाने के लिए तीन परिदृश्यों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, सरलीकरण के समानांतर कॉर्पस का लाभ उठाते हुए, जिसमें प्रत्येक वाक्य ट्रिपल को संरेखित किया जाता है और इसमें सरलीकरण संचालन एनोटेट किया जाता है, जो भविष्य के तरीकों की संभावित गलतियों को सही ठहराने के लिए आदर्श है। हमारे कॉर्पस PorSimplesSent का सबसे अच्छा परिदृश्य 4,888 जोड़े से बना है, जो अंग्रेजी के लिए एक समान कॉर्पस से बड़ा है; इसके सभी तीन संस्करण सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध हैं। हमने PorSimplesSent के लिए चार बेसलाइन बनाए और 17 भाषाई और मनोवैज्ञानिक विशेषताओं का उपयोग करके एक जोड़ीवार रैंकिंग विधि उपलब्ध कराई, जो 74.2% की सटीकता के साथ वाक्य जोड़े की रैंकिंग को सही ढंग से पहचानती है।', 'ga': 'Braitheann cumarsáid éifeachtach téacs ar léitheoirí a bheith inniúil go leor chun téacsanna a thuiscint, agus téacsanna a bheith soiléir go leor le go dtuigfidh an lucht éisteachta atá beartaithe, i dtasc léitheoireachta. Nuair nach gcuirtear in iúl go maith brí na faisnéise agus na dtreoracha téacsacha, is féidir go leor caillteanais agus damáiste a tharlú. I measc na réitigh chun an fhadhb seo a mhaolú tá an mheastóireacht uathoibríoch ar inléiteacht na n-abairtí, tasc a bhfuil go leor aird á tabhairt air mar gheall ar a infheidhmeacht mhór. Mar sin féin, cuireann easpa acmhainní, cosúil le corpora oiliúna agus meastóireachta, bac ar fhorbairt iomlán an taisc seo. Sa pháipéar seo, gineann muid corpas abairtí neamhtriallach sa Phortaingéilis. Déanaimid measúnú ar thrí chás chun é a thógáil, agus leas á bhaint as corpas comhthreomhar simplithe, ina bhfuil gach abairt trí-trí chéile ailínithe agus ina bhfuil oibríochtaí simpliúcháin anótáilte, atá oiriúnach chun botúin a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ann maidir le modhanna amach anseo a chosaint. Tá an scéal is fearr dár gcorpas PorSimplesSent comhdhéanta de 4,888 péire, atá níos mó ná corpas comhchosúil don Bhéarla; tá na trí leagan ar fad ar fáil go poiblí. Chruthaíomar ceithre bhonnlíne do PorSimplesSent agus chuireamar modh rangú péirewise ar fáil, ag baint úsáide as 17 gné teangeolaíochta agus síctheangeolaíochta, a shainaithníonn rangú na bpéirí abairtí i gceart le cruinneas 74.2%.', 'el': 'Η αποτελεσματική γραπτή επικοινωνία εξαρτάται από το γεγονός ότι οι αναγνώστες είναι αρκετά ικανοί να κατανοήσουν τα κείμενα, και τα κείμενα είναι αρκετά σαφή ώστε να τα κατανοήσουν από το κοινό που προορίζεται, σε μια εργασία ανάγνωσης. Όταν η έννοια των κειμένων πληροφοριών και των οδηγιών δεν μεταφέρεται καλά, μπορεί να προκύψουν πολλές απώλειες και ζημίες. Μεταξύ των λύσεων για την ανακούφιση αυτού του προβλήματος είναι η αυτόματη αξιολόγηση της αναγνωσιμότητας των προτάσεων, έργο το οποίο έχει λάβει μεγάλη προσοχή λόγω της μεγάλης εφαρμογής του. Ωστόσο, η έλλειψη πόρων, όπως τα σώματα κατάρτισης και αξιολόγησης, εμποδίζει την πλήρη ανάπτυξη αυτού του έργου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, δημιουργούμε ένα μη τετριμμένο σώμα προτάσεων στα πορτογαλικά. Αξιολογούμε τρία σενάρια για την οικοδόμηση του, αξιοποιώντας ένα παράλληλο σώμα απλοποίησης, στο οποίο κάθε τρίπτυχο της πρότασης ευθυγραμμίζεται και έχει σχολιάσει διαδικασίες απλοποίησης, που είναι ιδανικό για να δικαιολογήσουν πιθανά λάθη μελλοντικών μεθόδων. Το καλύτερο σενάριο του σώματος μας αποτελείται από ζεύγη 4,888, τα οποία είναι μεγαλύτερα από ένα παρόμοιο σώμα για τα Αγγλικά. και οι τρεις εκδόσεις του είναι διαθέσιμες στο κοινό. Δημιουργήσαμε τέσσερις γραμμές βάσης για το και διαθέσαμε μια μέθοδο ταξινόμησης ζευγαριών, χρησιμοποιώντας 17γλωσσικά και ψυχογλωσσικά χαρακτηριστικά, η οποία προσδιορίζει σωστά την κατάταξη των ζευγαριών προτάσεων με ακρίβεια 74.2%.', 'hu': 'A hatékony szöveges kommunikáció attól függ, hogy az olvasók elég jól tudják megérteni a szövegeket, a szövegek pedig elég világosak ahhoz, hogy a tervezett közönség megértse az olvasási feladatot. Ha a szöveges információk és utasítások jelentését nem jól közvetítik, sok veszteség és kár fordulhat elő. A probléma enyhítésére szolgáló megoldások között szerepel a mondatok olvashatóságának automatikus értékelése, amely nagy figyelmet kapott a nagy alkalmazhatósága miatt. Azonban az erőforrások hiánya, mint például a képzéshez és az értékeléshez szükséges corporák, akadályozza ennek a feladatnak a teljes kifejlesztését. Ebben a tanulmányban egy nem triviális mondatkorpust generálunk portugálul. Az építéshez három forgatókönyvet értékelünk, kihasználva egy párhuzamos egyszerűsítési korpuszt, amelyben minden mondat hármas összehangolt és egyszerűsítési műveletet jegyzett meg, ideális a jövőbeli módszerek esetleges hibáinak igazolására. A PorSimplesSent korpusz legjobb forgatókönyve 4 888 párból áll, ami nagyobb, mint egy hasonló korpusz angol; mindhárom változata nyilvánosan hozzáférhető. Négy alapvető vonalat hoztunk létre a PorSimplesSent számára, és egy páros rangsorolási módszert tettünk elérhetővé 17 nyelvi és pszicholingvistikai tulajdonsággal, amely helyesen azonosítja a mondatpárok rangsorolását 74,2%-os pontossággal.', 'ka': 'ეფექტიური ტექსტულური კომუნიკაციის შესახებ საკითხველების პროფიციენტის შესახებ, რომ ტექსტის შესახებ, და ტექსტის შესახებ ძალიან წესია, რომელიც მინდომის აუდიტორიების როცა ტექსტუალური ინფორმაცია და ინსტუქციების ნიშნავს არ უფრო მსგავსია, შეიძლება მოხდენოთ მრავალი დაკარულები და დაკარულები. ამ პრობლემას გახსნა სხვადასხვა პრობლემის განმავლობაში არის სიტყვების კითხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა, რომელიც მაგრამ, რესურსების ცოტა, როგორც კოპორა განსწავლებისთვის და განსაზღვრებისთვის, შეუძლებელია ამ დავალების ყველა განვითარებას. ამ დოგუნში ჩვენ შევქმნით ნოტრივიალური კოპორტუზულში. ჩვენ სამი სინარიოს გავამუშავებთ, რომელიც ყოველ სამყარო სინარიოს გავამუშავებთ, რომელიც ყოველ სამყარო სინარიოს გავამუშავება და უფრო გავამუშავება პერაციები, იდეალური იყოს შესაძლებელი შეც ჩვენი კორპუსის ყველაზე საუკეთესო სინარიო "PorSimplesSent" იქნება 4 888 ზოგიდან, რომელიც უფრო დიდება ანგლისური კორპუსდან. ყველა სამი ვერსია ადამიანის შესაძლებელია. ჩვენ შევქმნით ოთხი ფესური ხაზები PorSimplesSent-ისთვის და გამოიყენებული პრონეტის პრონეტის პრონეტი, რომელიც გამოყენებული 17 ლენგური და ფსიკოლენგური ფესური ფესური ფესურები, რომელიც მართ', 'kk': 'Эффективті мәтіндік байланыс оқушылары мәтінді түсінуге жеткілікті профиль болып тұрады, мәтінді оқу тапсырмасында түсінікті болып табылған аудиторлар түсініп тұрады. Мәтіндік мәліметтер мен мәліметтердің мағынасы жақсы жіберілмегенде, көп жоғалтылық және қиындық болуы мүмкін. Бұл мәселеді көшірмелеу үшін шешімдерді автоматты түрде оқу мүмкіндігін бағалау, бұл тапсырма үлкен қолдану үшін көп назарды қалады. Бірақ бұл тапсырманың толық құрылымын бұғаттайды. Бұл қағазда, біз португалшы тіліндегі нетривиалды сұрақ корпус құрамыз. Біз оны құру үшін үш сценарий бағалаймыз, параллелі қарапайым корпус пайдаланып, әрбір сөздердің үшіншілігін түзету және қарапайым әрекеттері жазылады, болашақ әдістердің қателерін түзету үшін идеалдық. Корпус PorSimplesSent- тың ең жақсы сценариясы 4 888 екі болып тұр. Бұл ағылшын тілінде ұқсас корпуста ұқсас болады. олардың барлық үш нұсқалары жалпы болады. Біз PorSimplesSent үшін төрт негізгі сызықтарды құрып, 17 лингвистикалық және психолингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерді қолдану әдісін қолдандық. Бұл сөздердің жиілігін дұрыс 74,2% деген дұрыс анықтайды.', 'it': "Una comunicazione testuale efficace dipende dalla capacità dei lettori di comprendere i testi, e dai testi sufficientemente chiari da essere compresi dal pubblico previsto, in un compito di lettura. Quando il significato delle informazioni testuali e delle istruzioni non è ben trasmesso, possono verificarsi molte perdite e danni. Tra le soluzioni per alleviare questo problema c'è la valutazione automatica della leggibilità delle frasi, compito che ha ricevuto molta attenzione a causa della sua ampia applicabilità. Tuttavia, una carenza di risorse, come i corpora per la formazione e la valutazione, ostacola il pieno sviluppo di questo compito. In questo articolo, generiamo un corpus di frasi non banale in portoghese. Valutiamo tre scenari per costruirlo, sfruttando un corpus parallelo di semplificazione, in cui ogni frase tripla è allineata e ha operazioni di semplificazione annotate, essendo ideali per giustificare eventuali errori di metodi futuri. Lo scenario migliore del nostro corpus PorSimplesSent è composto da 4.888 coppie, che è più grande di un corpus simile per l'inglese; tutte e tre le versioni sono disponibili al pubblico. Abbiamo creato quattro linee di base per PorSimplesSent e reso disponibile un metodo di classificazione a coppie, utilizzando 17 caratteristiche linguistiche e psicolinguistiche, che identifica correttamente la classifica delle coppie di frasi con una precisione del 74,2%.", 'ml': 'പാഠങ്ങള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി വായിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രായോജ്യമുള്ള ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d വായിക്കേണ്ടതിനെ ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു.  ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും ഉപദേശങ്ങളുടെയും അര്\u200dത്ഥം നന്നായി സംസാരിക്കാതിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പലതും നഷ്ടപ്പെട് ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ ലളിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള പരിഹാരങ്ങളില്\u200d തന്നെയാണ് വായിക്കാനുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ വായിക്കാവുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ സ്വയമായ വി എന്നാലും, പരിശീലനത്തിനും വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഒരു വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ കുറവും, ഈ ജോലിയുടെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരിശീലനത്തിനും പോലെ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പോര്\u200dട്ടൂഗീഷില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d അത് പണിയുന്നതിന് മൂന്നു സാധാരണകളെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ഒരു സാധാരണ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ ഉപയോഗം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഓരോ വാക്കിനും മൂന്നില്\u200d ഒരുമിച് ഞങ്ങളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് പോര്\u200dസിമ്പെല്\u200dസ് സെന്\u200dറിന്\u200dറെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സിനേഷന്\u200d 4,888 ജോട്ടില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഇംഗ് അതിലെ മൂന്നു പതിപ്പുകളൊക്കെ പ്രസിദ്ധമാണ്. പോര്\u200dസിമ്പെല്\u200dസ് സെന്\u200dറിന് നാല് ബേസ്റ്റ് ലൈന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിച്ചു ഒരു ജോട്ട് ജോലിയുള്ള റാങ്കിങ്ങ് രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചു. 17 ഭാഷകങ്ങളും മൈക്കോലിനിസ്റ്റ', 'ms': 'Komunikasi teks yang berkesan bergantung pada pembaca yang cukup ahli untuk memahami teks, dan teks yang cukup jelas untuk dipahami oleh penonton yang bertujuan, dalam tugas pembacaan. Apabila makna maklumat teks dan arahan tidak diberitahu dengan baik, banyak kerugian dan kerosakan boleh berlaku. diantara penyelesaian untuk mengurangi masalah ini ialah penilaian automatik pembacaan kalimat, tugas yang telah menerima banyak perhatian disebabkan kemampuan yang besar. Namun, kekurangan sumber, seperti corpora untuk latihan dan penilaian, menghalangi pembangunan penuh tugas ini. In this paper, we generate a nontrivial sentence corpus in Portuguese.  We evaluate three scenarios for building it, taking advantage of a parallel corpus of simplification, in which each sentence triplet is aligned and has simplification operations annotated, being ideal for justifying possible mistakes of future methods.  Skenario terbaik dari Corpus PorSimplesSent kami terdiri dari 4,888 pasangan, yang lebih besar daripada corpus yang sama untuk bahasa Inggeris; semua tiga versinya tersedia secara awam. Kami mencipta empat garis dasar untuk PorSimplesSent dan membuat tersedia kaedah peringkat pasangan, menggunakan 17 ciri-ciri bahasa dan psikologis, yang betul mengenalpasti peringkat pasangan kalimat dengan ketepatan 74.2%.', 'mt': "Komunikazzjoni testwali effettiva tiddependi fuq li l-qarrejja jkunu biżżejjed profiċjenti biex jifhmu t-testi, u t-testi jkunu biżżejjed ċari biex jinftiehmu mill-udjenza maħsuba, f’kompitu ta’ qari. Meta t-tifsira ta’ informazzjoni u struzzjonijiet testwali ma tiġix mgħoddija tajjeb, jistgħu jseħħu ħafna telf u danni. Fost is-soluzzjonijiet biex tittaffa din il-problem a hemm l-evalwazzjoni awtomatika tal-leġibbiltà tas-sentenzi, kompitu li kien qed jirċievi ħafna attenzjoni minħabba l-applikabbiltà kbira tiegħu. However, a shortage of resources, such as corpora for training and evaluation, hinders the full development of this task.  F’dan id-dokument, niġġeneraw korpus ta’ sentenza mhux trivjali bil-Portugiż. Aħna jevalwaw tliet xenarji għall-bini tiegħu, billi napprofezzaw korpus parallel ta' simplifikazzjoni, li fih kull sentenza triplet hija allinjata u b'operazzjonijiet ta' simplifikazzjoni annotati, li huma ideali biex jiġġustifikaw żbalji possibbli ta' metodi futuri. L-a ħjar xenarju tal-korpus PorSimplesSent tagħna huwa magħmul minn 4,888 par, li huwa akbar minn korpus simili għall-Ingliż; it-tliet verżjonijiet kollha tagħha huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku. Ħoljna erba’ linji bażi għal PorSimplesSent u għamilna disponibbli metodu ta’ klassifikazzjoni par-wise, bl-użu ta’ 17-il karatteristika lingwistika u psikoloġika, li jidentifika korrettament il-klassifikazzjoni ta’ pari ta’ sentenza b’preċiżjoni ta’ 74.2%.", 'mn': 'Эффектив текст харилцаа уншигчид текст ойлгохын тулд хангалттай мэргэжлийн харилцааны хамааралтай байдаг. Зарим сонсогчид унших ажил дээр өгүүлсэн текст ойлгохын тулд хангалттай тодорхой байдаг. Шинэ мэдээлэл болон заавал нь сайн мэдээлэл өгөхгүй байх үед олон алдаа болон хохирол явж болно. Энэ асуудлыг багасгах шийдэл нь өгүүлбэр унших чадварын автоматик үнэлгээ, маш их анхаарлыг хүлээж авсан ажил юм. Гэхдээ баялаг баялаг, жишээ нь Корпора суралцах, үнэлгээ хийх мэт, үүнийг бүрэн хөгжүүлэхийг зориулдаг. Энэ цаасанд бид португаль хэлэлцээгүй үг корпус бий болгож байна. Бид үүнийг бүтээхэд гурван хувилбарыг шалгаж, энгийн параллел корпус ашиглаж, хэлбэрийн гурван удаа бүр хэмжээнд нэгтгэгдэж, хялбарчлалын үйл ажиллагааг тайлбарлаж, ирээдүйн арга замын алдааны тухай шударга байдлаар илүү ойлг Бидний корпус ПорSimplesSent-ын хамгийн сайн хувилбар нь англи хэлний төстэй корпус 4,888 холбоос бүрдсэн байна. бүх гурван хувилбарууд нийтэд ашиглагддаг. Бид PorSimplesSent-ийн 4 суурь шугам бий болгож, 17 хэлний, психолингийн хувилбаруудыг ашиглан хоёр шугам шугам хэлбэрийн хоёрыг 74.2% тодорхойлдог.', 'no': 'Effektiv tekstkommunikasjon avhengig av lesarar som er profilere nok for å forstå tekstar, og tekstar som er klar nok for å forstå av den gjeldande publikum i ei lesingsoppgåve. Når tekstinformasjon og instruksjonar ikkje er godt konvertert, kan det henda mange tapar og skader. Mellom løysingane for å alleviare dette problemet er den automatiske evalueringa av setningslinjer, oppgåva som har motteken mye oppmerksomhet på grunn av det store tilgjengeligheten. Men ein kort mange ressursar, som korpora for opplæring og evaluering, hindrar fullstendig utvikling av denne oppgåva. I denne papiret lager vi eit ikkje-trivial setningskorpus i portugisisk. Vi evaluerer tre scenarior for å bygge det, og bruker fordel av ein parallell korpus av forenklingar, der kvar setnings treflet er justert og har forenklingsprogrammet merkt, som er ideal for å justisera moglege feil i framtidige metoder. Den beste scenarioen av vår korpus PorSimplesSent er lagt av 4 888 par, som er større enn ein liknande korpus for engelsk. alle tre versjonane av det er tilgjengelege offentlig. Vi oppretta fire baselinjer for PorSimplesSent og gjorde tilgjengeleg ein pare rankingsmetode med 17 lingviske og psykologske funksjonar, som rett identifiserer rekkefølgjande setningspar med ein nøyaktig 74,2%.', 'pl': 'Skuteczna komunikacja tekstowa zależy od tego, że czytelnik jest wystarczająco biegły do zrozumienia tekstów, a teksty są wystarczająco jasne, aby były zrozumiane przez zamierzoną publiczność w zadaniu czytania. Gdy znaczenie informacji tekstowych i instrukcji nie jest dobrze przekazane, może wystąpić wiele strat i szkód. Wśród rozwiązań służących złagodzeniu tego problemu jest automatyczna ocena czytelności zdań, zadanie, które cieszy się dużą uwagą ze względu na swoje duże zastosowanie. Niedobór zasobów, takich jak korpory do szkoleń i oceny, utrudnia jednak pełny rozwój tego zadania. W niniejszym artykule generujemy nietrywialny korpus zdań w języku portugalskim. Oceniamy trzy scenariusze jego budowy, korzystając z równoległego korpusu uproszczenia, w którym każda trójka zdań jest wyrównana i ma adnotację operacji uproszczenia, co jest idealne do uzasadnienia ewentualnych błędów przyszłych metod. Najlepszy scenariusz naszego korpusu PorSimplesSent składa się z par 4,888, które są większe niż podobny korpus dla angielskiego; wszystkie trzy wersje są publicznie dostępne. Stworzyliśmy cztery linie bazowe dla PorSimplesSent i udostępniliśmy metodę rankingu parowego, wykorzystującą 17-językowe i psycholingwistyczne cechy, która poprawnie identyfikuje ranking par zdań z dokładnością 74,2%.', 'ro': 'Comunicarea textuală eficientă depinde de faptul că cititorii sunt suficient de competenți pentru a înțelege textele, iar textele sunt suficient de clare pentru a fi înțelese de publicul vizat, într-o sarcină de lectură. Atunci când semnificația informațiilor și instrucțiunilor textuale nu este bine transmisă, pot apărea multe pierderi și daune. Printre soluțiile pentru atenuarea acestei probleme se numără evaluarea automată a lizibilității propozițiilor, sarcină care a primit o mulțime de atenție datorită aplicabilității sale mari. Cu toate acestea, lipsa de resurse, cum ar fi corporele pentru formare și evaluare, împiedică dezvoltarea deplină a acestei sarcini. În această lucrare, generăm un corpus de propoziții non trivial în portugheză. Evaluăm trei scenarii de construire a acesteia, profitând de un corpus paralel de simplificare, în care fiecare triplet de propoziții este aliniat și are operațiuni de simplificare adnotate, fiind ideale pentru justificarea posibilelor greșeli ale metodelor viitoare. Cel mai bun scenariu al corpului nostru PorSimplesSent este compus din 4.888 perechi, care este mai mare decât un corpus similar pentru limba engleză; toate cele trei versiuni ale acestuia sunt disponibile publicului. Am creat patru linii de bază pentru PorSimplesSent și am pus la dispoziție o metodă de clasificare pereche, utilizând 17 caracteristici lingvistice și psihologice, care identifică corect clasamentul perechilor de propoziții cu o precizie de 74,2%.', 'lt': 'Veiksmingas tekstinis ryšys priklauso nuo to, ar skaitytojai yra pakankamai kvalifikuoti tekstams suprasti, o tekstai yra pakankamai aiški, kad numatoma auditorija juos suprastų skaitydama užduotį. Kai tekstinės informacijos ir instrukcijų reikšmė nėra tinkamai perduodama, gali atsirasti daug nuostolių ir žalos. Vienas iš sprendimų šiai problemai spręsti yra automatinis bausmės skaitomumo vertinimas, užduotis, kuri dėl didelės taikymo buvo daug dėmesio skiriama. Tačiau trūkumas išteklių, pvz., mokymo ir vertinimo korporacijos, trukdo visapusiškai plėtoti šią užduotį. Šiame dokumente sukuriame ne trivialų sakinių korpusą portugalų kalba. We evaluate three scenarios for building it, taking advantage of a parallel corpus of simplification, in which each sentence triplet is aligned and has simplification operations annotated, being ideal for justifying possible mistakes of future methods.  Geriausias mūsų corpus PorSimplesSent scenarijus sudarytas iš 4 888 poros, kurios yra didesnės už panašų corpus anglų kalba; all the three versions of it are publicly available.  We created four baselines for PorSimplesSent and made available a pairwise ranking method, using 17 linguistic and psycholinguistic features, which correctly identifies the ranking of sentence pairs with an accuracy of 74.2%.', 'sr': 'Efektivna tekstualna komunikacija zavisi od čitača koji su dovoljno inteligentni da bi razumeli tekste, a teksti su dovoljno jasni da bi se smislili publika, u zadatku za čitanje. Kada se smisao tekstualnih informacija i instrukcija ne predaje dobro, mogu se pojaviti mnogi gubitak i oštećenja. Među rešenjima za ublažavanje ovog problem a je automatska procjena čitljivosti rečenica, zadatak koji je primao mnogo pažnje zbog njegove velike primjene. Međutim, nedostatak resursa, kao što je korpora za obuku i procjenu, sprječava potpuni razvoj ovog zadatka. U ovom papiru, stvorili smo neverovatan korpus kazne na portugalskom jeziku. Procjenjujemo tri scenarija za izgradnju njega, koristeći paralelni korpus jednostavnosti, u kojem je svaka trostruka rečenica usklađena i označena operacija za jednostavljanje, koja je idealna za opravdavanje mogućih grešaka budućih metoda. Najbolji scenario našeg korpusa PorSimplesSent je sastavljen od 4.888 par, koji je veći od sličnog korpusa za engleski jezik; sve tri verzije su javno dostupne. Stvorili smo četiri osnovne linije za PorSimplesSent i raspoložili su parenu metodu, koristeći 17 lingvističkih i psihologističkih karakteristika, koja upravo identifikuje ranking par rečenica sa tačnošću od 74,2%.', 'mk': 'Effective textual communication depends on readers being proficient enough to comprehend texts, and texts being clear enough to be understood by the intended audience, in a reading task.  Кога значењето на текстуалната информација и инструкциите не е добро пренесено, може да се случат многу загуби и штети. Меѓу решенијата за олеснување на овој проблем е автоматската проценка на читливоста на речениците, задача која добива многу внимание поради големата апликабилност на речениците. Сепак, недостатокот на ресурси, како што е корпората за обука и евалуација, го попречува целосниот развој на оваа задача. Во овој весник генерираме непривијален судски корпус на португалски. Ние ги проценуваме трите сценарија за изградбата на истиот, искористувајќи го паралелниот корпус на едноставување, во кој секоја реченица три реченици е alined и има операции за едноставување анотирани, бидејќи се идеални за оправдување на можните грешки на идните методи. Најдобриот сценарио на нашиот корпус PorSimplesSent е составен од 4.888 парови, што е поголем од сличен корпус за англиски; сите три верзии се јавно достапни. Создадовме четири основни линии за PorSimplesSent и ставивме на располагање метод за двојно рангирање, користејќи 17 јазички и психолингвистички карактеристики, кои точно го идентификуваат рангирањето на парови на реченици со точност од 74,2 отсто.', 'so': 'Wargelinta dhaqanka waxqabad ah waxay ku xiran tahay kuwa akhriyada ku filan in ay ku fahanto qoraalka, iyo qoraalaha ay u caddaan yihiin in lagu garto dhegayaasha la talo galay, shaqada akhriska. Marka macluumaadka qoraalka ah iyo hagitaanka aan si wanaagsan loo sheegin micneheeda, waxaa dhici kara khasaaro badan iyo waxyeello badan. Xaaladaha looga fududeeyo dhibaatadan waxaa ka mid ah qiimeynta automatic ah ee awoodda akhriska xaaladda, shaqada oo aad u dhegaysatay daryeelkooda waaweyn dartiis. Si kastaba ha ahaatee gaaban maalgelinta, tusaale ahaan shirkadaha waxbarashada iyo qiimeynta ayaa ka hor jeediya horumarinta shaqada oo dhan. Kanu warqaddan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa qoraal aan la mid ahayn oo ku qoran Burtuqiis. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa saddex aragtidood oo dhisidda, si aan u isticmaalno qalabka fudud, kaas oo uu ku qorayo marxalad walba oo saddex jeer ah, oo uu ku dhibaataysaa hawlo fudud, isagoo fikrad u ah in uu xaq u dhigo qalabka mustaqbalka ah. The best scenario of our corpus PorSimplesSent is composed of 4,888 pairs, which is bigger than a similar corpus for English;  sadexda versiyadooda oo dhan waxay ku jiraan bayaan. Waxaannu u abuurnay afar saldhig ee PorSimplesSent, waxaana sameynay noocyo labaad oo caqli leh, oo isticmaalaya 17 luuqad iyo cilmi-luuqadeed, taasoo si saxda ah u caddeeya heerka labada lamb oo qiyaas ah 74.2 boqolkiiba.', 'sv': 'Effektiv textkommunikation förutsätter att läsarna är tillräckligt skickliga för att förstå texter, och att texter är tillräckligt tydliga för att kunna förstås av den avsedda publiken, i en läsuppgift. När betydelsen av textinformation och instruktioner inte förmedlas väl kan många förluster och skador uppstå. Bland lösningarna för att lindra detta problem är den automatiska utvärderingen av meningarnas läsbarhet, uppgift som har fått mycket uppmärksamhet på grund av dess stora tillämplighet. Brist på resurser, t.ex. corpora för utbildning och utvärdering, hindrar dock en fullständig utveckling av denna uppgift. I denna uppsats genererar vi en icke trivial meningskorpus på portugisiska. Vi utvärderar tre scenarier för att bygga den, med hjälp av en parallell förenklingskorp, där varje meningstrimpel är justerad och har förenklingsåtgärder kommenterade, vilket är idealiskt för att motivera eventuella misstag i framtida metoder. Det bästa scenariot för vår korpus PorSimplesSent består av 4 888 par, vilket är större än en liknande korpus för engelska; alla tre versionerna av det är offentligt tillgängliga. Vi skapade fyra baslinjer för PorSimplesSent och gjorde en parvis rankningsmetod tillgänglig, med 17 språkliga och psykolingvistiska egenskaper, som korrekt identifierar rankningen av meningspar med en noggrannhet på 74,2%.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරභාවිත පාළුම සම්බන්ධයක් පාළුවන්ට පාළුවන්ට ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදියට අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා පාළුවන්ට ප්\u200dරභාවිත විදියට, පාළ පාළ තොරතුරු සහ උපදේශයේ අදහසක් හොඳින් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ නැති වෙලාවට, ගොඩක් නැතිවෙලාවක් සහ අපහස මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතර තමයි වාක්ය කියවන්න පුළුවන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක නමුත්, සම්බන්ධතාවක් අඩුවක්, හරියට ප්\u200dරධානය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා කොර්පෝරා වලින්, මේ වැඩේ සියලු මේ පත්තරේ අපි පොර්තුගුලිස් වලින් නොට්\u200dරිවියාලි වචනයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. අපි ඒක නිර්මාණය කරන්න සිනාරියෝ තුනක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, සමාන්\u200dය කොර්පස් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම හැම වාක්ය ත්\u200dරිප්ලේට් එක්ක සමාන්\u200dය වැඩක්  අපේ කොර්පුස් පොර්ස්පල්ස් සෙන්ට් එකේ හොඳම සිනරියෝ 4,888 දෙකක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒක ඉංග්\u200dරීසියට වඩා වඩා ලොකු කොර්පු ඒකේ සියලුම තුනක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ වෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපි පොර්ස්පල්ස් සෙන්ට් වෙනුවෙන් මූල්\u200dයාන්ති හතරක් හතරක් සිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක සහ මනුස්සික භාෂාවික අවශ', 'ta': 'விளைவான நிரல் தொடர்பு படிப்பவர்கள் உரைகளை புரிந்து கொள்வதற்கு போதுமான தேவையான தொடர்பு இருக்கும் என்பதை பொருத்துகிறது, மற்றும் உர நிரல் தகவல் மற்றும் கட்டளைகளின் அர்த்தம் நன்றாக செய்யப்படவில்லையென்றால், பல இழப்புகள் மற்றும் தாங்கள் ஏற்படும். இந்த பிரச்சனையை நீக்க தீர்வுகளில் உள்ள தானாகவே வாக்கு படிக்க இயலும் மதிப்பினை மதிப்பிடுகிறது, இது பெரிய பயன்பாடுகளினால் ந ஆயினும், பயிற்சி மற்றும் மதிப்பினை போன்ற வளங்களின் குறைவு, இந்த பணியின் முழு உருவாக்கத்தை தடுக்கிறது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் போர்த்துகீசியில் ஒரு வாக்கியத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம். நாம் அதை உருவாக்க மூன்று காட்சிகளை மதிப்பீடு செய்கிறோம், எளிதாக்கத்தை பயன்படுத்தி, ஒவ்வொரு வாக்கிலும் மூன்று முறை சேர்க்கப்பட்டு எளிதாக்கும் செயல் எங்கள் கார்பாஸ் போர்சிம்பெல்ஸ் Sent சிறந்த தோற்றம் 4,888 ஜோடி சேர்க்கப்பட்டது, அது ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு போன்ற கார்புஸ் விட பெர அனைத்து மூன்று பதிப்புகளும் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும். நாம் PorSimplesSent க்கான நான்கு அடிப்படை கோடுகளை உருவாக்கி ஒரு ஜோடி புள்ளிவான வண்ணங்கள் முறைமையை உருவாக்கினோம், 17 மொழி மற்றும் மொழிமாற்றி குணங்களை பயன்படுத்த', 'ur': 'پڑھنے والوں پر اثر دینے والی متن کی تعلیم ہے کہ متن کو سمجھنے کے لئے کافی اثر دینے والی ہیں اور متن کو کافی واضح ہوتے ہیں کہ یہ سمجھ لینے والی بصیرت کے ذریعے سمجھ سکیں۔ جب textual information and instructions کی تعبیر اچھی طرح نہیں پہنچائی جاتی تو بہت سی خسارہ اور نقصان اٹھائے جاتے ہیں اس مسئلہ کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے حل کے درمیان یہ ہے کہ کلام پڑھنے کے قابل قدرت کی آٹوٹی ارزیابی ہے، جو اس کی بڑی کاربردی کے سبب بہت سی توجه حاصل کر رہی ہے. However, a shortage of resources, such as corpora for training and evaluation, hinders the full development of this task. اس کاغذ میں ہم پورٹوگل میں ایک غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر ہم نے اسے بنانے کے لئے تین سناریوں کا ارزش کیا ہے، ایک سادگی کے سادگی کے قالب کے مطابق فائدہ اٹھائے جاتے ہیں، جہاں ہر کلام تین سی سی سی ٹیٹ برابر ہے اور سادگی عملیات کا ارزش کیا جاتا ہے، اس کے مطابق مستقبل طریقوں کی خطاؤں کی اصلاح کرنے کے ہمارے کورپوس پورس سنٹ کی بہترین سیناریو 4,888 جوڑوں سے پیدا ہوا ہے، جو انگلیسی کے لئے ایک جیسی کورپوس سے بڑا ہے۔ اس کے تین نسخے ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں۔ ہم نے PorSimplesSent کے لئے چار بنسس لینٹ بنائے اور ایک جوڑی رنگ طریقہ موجود کردیا ہے، 17 زبان شناسی اور روانی زبان شناسی فرصت کے مطابق، جسے 74.2% کی دقیق طریقہ سے جمع جوڑوں کا رنگ درست پہچان رہا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Thông tin kết cấu có hiệu quả phụ thuộc vào khả năng hiểu được các văn bản, và các văn bản đủ rõ ràng để được hiểu bởi khán giả, trong một nhiệm vụ đọc. Khi ý nghĩa của thông tin và hướng dẫn cấu trúc không được tiết lộ rõ, có thể có nhiều tổn thất và thiệt hại xảy ra. Một trong những giải pháp để giải quyết vấn đề này là việc đánh giá tự động khả năng đọc bản án, nhiệm vụ mà đã được chú ý rất nhiều vì nó có ích rộng lớn. Tuy nhiên, sự thiếu hụt nguồn lực, như "Cơ thể giáo dục và đánh giá", cản trở việc hoàn toàn phát triển nhiệm vụ này. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tạo ra một bản án không nhỏ bằng tiếng Bồ Đào Nha. Chúng tôi đánh giá ba viễn cảnh để xây dựng nó, lợi dụng một hệ thống đơn giản song, trong đó mỗi bản máy được sắp xếp ngang và có các hoạt động đơn giản được ghi chú, lý tưởng để bào chữa những sai lầm về phương pháp tương lai. Trường hợp tốt nhất của Hạ sĩ Porsimplex Send is composed of 4,888 pairs, which is larger than an similar Corpus for English; tất cả ba phiên bản của nó đều công khai. Chúng tôi tạo ra bốn bản nền cho PorSimpesSent và rao bán một phương pháp xếp thứ hai, dựa trên ngôn ngữ và tinh thần học 17, mà chính xác xác xác xác xác xác xác xác xác cách xếp bản án với độ chính xác 74.2 Name', 'uz': "Name @ info Bu muammolarni kamaytirish uchun qoʻllanmalarning soʻzni oʻqish uchun avtomatik qiymati, bu juda katta qoʻllanmagan vazifani ko'p paydo qiladi. Lekin, bu vazifani butunlay tuzishga harakat qiladi. Bu qogʻozda, biz Portugalchada hech qanday so'zning korpusi yaramiz. Biz ularni yaratish uchun uchta scenarini qiymatmiz, cheksizlikning parametrlik korpusdan foydalanish mumkin, har bir so'z bir ikki marta qo'yilgan va oddiylik amallar yordam beradi, biz kelajakdagi xatolarni yordam qilish uchun fikrlik qilamiz. Korpus PorSimplesSent eng eng yaxshi ko'rinishimiz 4,888 parchadan yaratiladi, bu ingliz tilidagi bir xil kopusdan katta. ularning uchta versiyasi jamoat mavjud. We created four baselines for PorSimplesSent and made available a pairwise ranking method, using 17 linguistic and psycholinguistic features, which correctly identifies the ranking of sentence pairs with an accuracy of 74.2%.", 'bg': 'Ефективната текстова комуникация зависи от това читателите да са достатъчно компетентни да разбират текстовете, а текстовете да са достатъчно ясни, за да бъдат разбрани от целевата аудитория, в задачата за четене. Когато значението на текстовата информация и инструкции не е добре предадено, могат да възникнат много загуби и щети. Сред решенията за облекчаване на този проблем е автоматичната оценка на четливостта на изреченията, задача, която получава голямо внимание поради голямата си приложимост. Недостигът на ресурси обаче, като корпуси за обучение и оценка, възпрепятства пълното развитие на тази задача. В тази статия генерираме нетривиален корпус от изречения на португалски език. Оценяваме три сценария за изграждането му, като се възползваме от паралелен корпус от опростяване, в който всяко изречение е подравнено и има анотирани операции по опростяване, което е идеално за обосновка на възможни грешки на бъдещи методи. Най-добрият сценарий на нашия корпус е съставен от 4888 двойки, което е по-голямо от подобен корпус за английски език; всичките три версии на него са публично достъпни. Създадохме четири базови линии за ПорSimplesSent и предоставихме метод за класиране по двойки, използващ 17 езикови и психолингвистични характеристики, който правилно идентифицира класирането на двойките изречения с точност 74.2%.', 'nl': "Effectieve tekstcommunicatie hangt af van het feit dat lezers bekwaam genoeg zijn om teksten te begrijpen en teksten duidelijk genoeg zijn om door het beoogde publiek te worden begrepen tijdens een leestaak. Wanneer de betekenis van tekstuele informatie en instructies niet goed wordt overgebracht, kunnen veel verliezen en schade ontstaan. Een van de oplossingen om dit probleem te verlichten is de automatische evaluatie van de leesbaarheid van zinnen, taak die veel aandacht heeft gekregen vanwege de grote toepasbaarheid. Een tekort aan middelen, zoals corpora's voor opleiding en evaluatie, belemmert echter de volledige ontwikkeling van deze taak. In dit artikel genereren we een niet-triviaal zinnencorpus in het Portugees. We evalueren drie scenario's voor het bouwen ervan, waarbij we gebruik maken van een parallel corpus van vereenvoudiging, waarin elk zinnentrijl is uitgelijnd en vereenvoudigingsoperaties zijn geannoteerd, ideaal om mogelijke fouten van toekomstige methoden te rechtvaardigen. Het beste scenario van ons corpus PorSimplesSent bestaat uit 4.888 paren, wat groter is dan een vergelijkbaar corpus voor Engels; alle drie de versies ervan zijn openbaar beschikbaar. We creëerden vier basislijnen voor PorSimplesSent en maakten een pairwise ranking methode beschikbaar, gebruikmakend van 17 linguïstische en psycholinguïstische kenmerken, die de rangschikking van zinsparen correct identificeert met een nauwkeurigheid van 74.2%.", 'da': 'Effektiv tekstkommunikation afhænger af, at læserne er dygtige nok til at forstå tekster, og at tekster er klare nok til at blive forstået af det tilsigtede publikum i en læseopgave. Når betydningen af tekstoplysninger og instruktioner ikke er godt formidlet, kan der opstå mange tab og skader. Blandt løsningerne til at afhjælpe dette problem er den automatiske evaluering af sætningernes læsbarhed, opgave, der har fået stor opmærksomhed på grund af dens store anvendelighed. Men mangel på ressourcer, såsom corpora til uddannelse og evaluering, hindrer den fulde udvikling af denne opgave. I denne artikel genererer vi et ikke-trivielt sætningskorpus på portugisisk. Vi evaluerer tre scenarier for opbygningen af den, idet vi drager fordel af et parallelt korpus af forenkling, hvor hver sætning triplet er justeret og har forenklingsoperationer noteret, ideelt til at begrunde eventuelle fejl i fremtidige metoder. Det bedste scenarie af vores korpus PorSimplesSent består af 4.888 par, som er større end et lignende korpus for engelsk; alle de tre versioner er offentligt tilgængelige. Vi oprettede fire basislinjer for PorSimplesSent og stillede en parvis rangeringsmetode til rådighed, der bruger 17 sproglige og psykolingvistiske træk, der korrekt identificerer rangeringen af sætningspar med en nøjagtighed på 74,2%.', 'de': 'Effektive Textkommunikation hängt davon ab, dass Leser kompetent genug sind, Texte zu verstehen, und Texte klar genug sind, um vom beabsichtigten Publikum in einer Leseaufgabe verstanden zu werden. Wenn die Bedeutung von Textinformationen und Anweisungen nicht gut vermittelt wird, können viele Verluste und Schäden auftreten. Zu den Lösungen, um dieses Problem zu lindern, gehört die automatische Bewertung der Satzlesbarkeit, Aufgabe, die aufgrund ihrer großen Anwendbarkeit viel Aufmerksamkeit erhalten hat. Ein Mangel an Ressourcen, wie Korpora für Ausbildung und Evaluation, behindert jedoch die volle Entfaltung dieser Aufgabe. In dieser Arbeit generieren wir einen nichttrivialen Satzkorpus auf Portugiesisch. Wir evaluieren drei Szenarien für den Aufbau, wobei wir einen parallelen Korpus der Vereinfachung nutzen, in dem jedes Satztriplett ausgerichtet ist und Vereinfachungsoperationen annotiert sind, um mögliche Fehler zukünftiger Methoden zu rechtfertigen. Das beste Szenario unseres Korpus PorSimplesSent besteht aus 4.888 Paaren, die größer sind als ein ähnlicher Korpus für Englisch; alle drei Versionen davon sind öffentlich zugänglich. Wir erstellten vier Baselines für PorSimplesSent und stellten eine paarweise Rankingmethode zur Verfügung, die 17 linguistische und psycholinguistische Merkmale verwendet, die das Ranking von Satzpaaren mit einer Genauigkeit von 74.2% korrekt identifiziert.', 'hr': 'Efektivna tekstualna komunikacija ovisi o čitačima koji su dovoljno profilni da bi razumijeli tekste, a teksti su dovoljno jasni da bi se namjeravala razumijeti publika, u zadatku čitanja. Kada se smisao tekstualnih informacija i uputstva ne predstavlja dobro, mogu se pojaviti mnogi gubitak i oštećenja. Među rješenjima za ublažavanje ovog problem a je automatska procjena čitljivosti kazne, zadatak koji je primao mnogo pažnje zbog njegove velike primjene. Međutim, nedostatak resursa, poput korporacije za obuku i procjenu, sprječava potpuni razvoj ovog zadatka. U ovom papiru, stvoriti smo nevjerojatni korpus kazne na portugalskom jeziku. Procjenjujemo tri scenarija za izgradnju njega, koristeći paralelni korpus pojednostavljanja, u kojem se svaka trostruka rečenica usklađuje i komentira operacije pojednostavljanja, idealne za opravdavanje mogućih grešaka budućih metoda. Najbolji scenario našeg korpusa PorSimplesSent sastavljen je od 4.888 par, koji je veći od sličnog korpusa za engleski jezik; sve tri verzije njegove su javno dostupne. Stvorili smo četiri osnovne linije za PorSimplesSent i učinili dostupnu metodu postavljanja pare, koristeći 17 lingvističkih i psihologističkih karakteristika, koja upravo identificira ranking par rečenica sa preciznošću 74,2%.', 'ko': '읽기 임무에서 효과적인 텍스트 교류는 독자가 텍스트를 충분히 숙련되게 이해할 수 있는지, 그리고 텍스트가 충분히 명확한지, 목표 독자에게 이해될 수 있는지에 달려 있다.텍스트 정보와 설명의 의미가 잘 전달되지 않을 때 많은 손실과 손해가 발생할 수 있다.이 문제를 완화하는 해결 방안 중 하나는 문장의 가독성을 자동으로 평가하는 것이다. 이 임무는 광범위한 적용성으로 주목받고 있다.그러나 교육과 평가 자원의 부족은 이 임무의 전면적인 전개를 방해한다.본고에서 우리는 포르투갈어로 평범하지 않은 문장 자료 라이브러리를 만들었다.우리는 이를 구축하는 세 가지 장면을 평가하고 평행의 간소화 어료 라이브러리를 이용했다. 그 중에서 각 문장의 삼원조를 맞추고 간소화 조작을 주석했다. 이것은 미래 방법이 틀릴 수 있음을 증명하는 이상적인 방법이다.우리의 자료 라이브러리인 Porsimplesset의 가장 좋은 장면은 4888쌍으로 구성되어 유사한 영어 자료 라이브러리보다 크다.이 세 판본은 모두 공개된 것이다.우리는 Porsimplesset을 위해 네 가지 기선을 만들었고 두 가지 정렬 방법을 제공했다. 17가지 언어와 심리언어학적 특징을 사용하여 문장의 옳은 정렬을 정확하게 식별했고 정확도는 74.2%였다.', 'fa': 'ارتباط متن تاثیر بستگی به خوانندگان بستگی دارد که به اندازه کافی دانشمند برای درک متن\u200cها و متن\u200cها به اندازه کافی واضح هستند تا توسط تماشاگران هدف درک کنند، در یک کار خواندن. هنگامی که معنی اطلاعات و دستورات متن به خوبی رسیده نمی شود، ممکن است بسیاری از خسارها و آسیبی اتفاق بیفتد. بین راه\u200cحل\u200cها برای آسان کردن این مشکل، ارزیابی خودکار قابلیت خواندن جمله است، که به دلیل کاربردی بزرگش توجه زیادی را دریافت کرده است. ولی کمی از منابع، مانند شرکت برای آموزش و ارزیابی، از توسعه کامل این کار باز می\u200cدارد. در این کاغذ، ما یک مجوز غیرقابل تولید می کنیم در پرتغالی. ما سه سناریو برای ساختن آن را ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، با استفاده از یک جسد متفاوتی از ساده\u200cسازی، در آن هر سه جمله\u200cی جمله متصل می\u200cشود و عملیات ساده\u200cسازی مشخص می\u200cشود، ایده\u200cای برای تعیین کردن اشتباهی ممکن از روش\u200cهای آینده است. بهترین سناریو کورپوس پورس سنت از ۴.888 جفت ساخته شده است که از یک کورپوس مشابه برای انگلیسی بزرگتر است. تمام سه نسخه\u200cهای آن را به طور عمومی در دسترس دارند. ما چهار خط بنیادی برای PorSimplesSent ایجاد کردیم و یک روش صفحه جفت با استفاده از ۱۷ ویژگی زبان و روانی زبان\u200cشناسی را در دسترس دادیم که به طور درست صفحه جفت\u200cهای جمله را با دقیق 74.2 درصد شناسایی می\u200cکند.', 'id': 'Komunikasi teks yang efektif tergantung pada pembaca yang cukup ahli untuk memahami teks, dan teks yang cukup jelas untuk dipahami oleh penonton yang berniat, dalam tugas pembacaan. Ketika arti informasi teks dan instruksi tidak diterima dengan baik, banyak kerugian dan kerusakan mungkin terjadi. Di antara solusi untuk mengurangi masalah ini adalah evaluasi otomatis pembacaan kalimat, tugas yang telah menerima banyak perhatian karena aplikabilitas besar. However, a shortage of resources, such as corpora for training and evaluation, hinders the full development of this task.  Dalam kertas ini, kami menghasilkan hukuman tidak trivial corpus dalam bahasa Portugis. Kami mengevaluasi tiga skenario untuk membangunnya, mengambil keuntungan dari sebuah korpus paralel penyimplifikasi, di mana setiap kalimat tiga kalimat disesuaikan dan memiliki operasi penyimplifikasi annotasi, menjadi ideal untuk membenarkan kesalahan mungkin dari metode masa depan. Skenario terbaik dari corpus PorSimplesSent kami terdiri dari 4.888 pasangan, yang lebih besar dari corpus yang sama untuk bahasa Inggris; semua tiga versinya tersedia publik. Kami menciptakan empat garis dasar untuk PorSimplesSent dan membuat tersedia metode peringkat sepasang, menggunakan 17 fitur bahasa dan psikologis, yang benar mengidentifikasi peringkat pasangan kalimat dengan akurasi 74,2%.', 'sw': 'Mawasiliano mazingira yenye ufanisi yanategemea wasomaji kuwa na ufanisi wa kutosha kuelewa maandishi, na maandishi yanakuwa wazi ya kutosha kuelewa na hadhira wenye lengo la kusoma, katika kazi ya kusoma. Wakati maana ya taarifa na maelekezo ya maandishi hayajatumiwa vizuri, hasara nyingi na madhara yanaweza kutokea. Miongoni mwa suluhisho la kupunguza tatizo hili ni tathmini za kujitegemea kwa uwezo wa kusoma hukumu, kazi ambayo imekuwa ikipokea hisia nyingi kutokana na matumizi makubwa. However, a shortage of resources, such as corpora for training and evaluation, hinders the full development of this task.  Katika karatasi hii, tunatengeneza viungo vya hukumu isiyo na maana kwa lugha ya Kireno. Tunatathmini matukio matatu ya kujenga, kwa kutumia vifaa vinavyofanana na urahisi, ambapo kila hukumu inaunganishwa mara tatu na inastahili shughuli za urahisi, kwa kuwa wazo la kuhalalisha makosa yanayoweza kwa njia za baadaye. Mtazamo bora zaidi wa makampuni yetu PorSimplesSent umetengenezwa na jozi 4,888, ambalo ni kubwa zaidi ya makampuni yanayofanana kwa Kiingereza; matoleo yote matatu yanapatikana hadharani. Tumetengeneza mistari nne kwa ajili ya PorSimplesSent na tukapatia mbinu za rangi mbili yenye akili, kwa kutumia utambulisho wa lugha 17 na kisaikolojia, ambao unaonyesha viwango vya wanandoa wa hukumu yenye uhakika wa asilimia 74.2.', 'af': "Effektiewe tekstuele kommunikasie afhang van lesers wat profiseente genoeg is om teks te verstaan, en teks wat duidelik genoeg is om te verstaan deur die bedoelde publiek in 'n lees taak te verstaan. Wanneer die betekening van tekstuurlike inligting en instruksies nie goed uitgevoer is nie, kan baie verlore en skade voorkom. onder die oplossings om hierdie probleem te alleviaat is die outomatiese evaluering van sin leesbaard, die taak wat baie aandag ontvang het vanweë sy groot toepassing. Maar 'n kortpad van hulpbronne, soos korpora vir onderwerp en evaluering, hinders die volle ontwikkeling van hierdie taak. In hierdie papier genereer ons 'n non-trivial seting corpus in Portugees. Ons evalueer drie scenarios om dit te bou, te neem voordeel van 'n parallele korpus van eenvoudiging, waarin elke seting triplet gelyk is en het eenvoudiging operasies aangeteken, ideaal vir die geregting van moontlike foute van toekomstige metodes. Die beste scenario van ons korpus PorSimplesSent is gemaak van 4,888 paar, wat groter as 'n gelyke korpus vir Engels is; al die drie weergawe daarvan is openlik beskikbaar. Ons het vier basisline vir PorSimplesSent geskep en beskikbaar gemaak 'n paar wyse rankingsmetode, met gebruik van 17 lingwisiese en psihologiese funksies, wat reg die ranking van sin paar met 'n presies van 74.2%.", 'sq': 'Komunikimi efektiv tekstual varet nga lexuesit të jenë mjaft të aftë për të kuptuar tekstet dhe tekstet të jenë mjaft të qarta për të kuptuar nga publiku i synuar, në një detyrë leximi. Kur kuptimi i informacionit tekstual dhe instruksioneve nuk është i transmetuar mirë, mund të ndodhin shumë humbje dhe dëme. Midis zgjidhjeve për të lehtësuar këtë problem është vlerësimi automatik i lexueshmërisë së dënimeve, detyrë që ka marrë shumë vëmendje për shkak të aplikabilitetit të saj të madh. Megjithatë, mungesa e burimeve, të tilla si korpra për trajnimin dhe vlerësimin, pengon zhvillimin e plotë të kësaj detyre. Në këtë letër, ne gjenerojmë një korpus jo-trivial dënimi në portugalisht. Ne vlerësojmë tre skenarë për ndërtimin e saj, duke përfituar nga një korpus paralel e thjeshtimit, në të cilin çdo fjalim i trefishtë është i renditur dhe ka anotuar operacionet e thjeshtimit, duke qenë ideale për justifikimin e gabimeve të mundshme të metodave të ardhshme. Skenari më i mirë i korpusit tonë PorSimplesSent përbëhet nga 4,888 palë, që është më i madh se një korpus i ngjashëm për anglishtin; të gjitha tre versionet e saj janë në dispozicion publik. We created four baselines for PorSimplesSent and made available a pairwise ranking method, using 17 linguistic and psycholinguistic features, which correctly identifies the ranking of sentence pairs with an accuracy of 74.2%.', 'tr': 'Efektiv metin habarla힊y힊y okuw챌ylara metin d체힊체nmek 체챌in 첵eterlik ukypdyr we metinleri d체힊체nmek 체챌in 첵eterlik ukypdyr. Metin maglumaty흫 we mugallymlary흫 ahyry gowy g철nderilmediginde k철p zehirlenmek we hasarlary흫 bolup biler. Bu meseleni azaltmak 체챌in 챌철zg체tler arasynda s철zleri흫 oka첵anlygyny흫 awtomatik de흫lenmesi, uly i힊le첵i힊i seb채bi k철p 체ns alan zady. 횦철ne, 챌e힊meleri흫 az bolmagy 첵aly korpora okuw we de흫lemek 체챌in, bu zady흫 dolysyny 철s체mligini engelle첵채r. Bu kagyzda, Portugal챌a hasaplamak k철p체si d철redik. Biz muny in 힊a etmek 체챌in senaryony 챌ykar첵arys, be첵leki 챌yky힊lygy흫 parallel korpusyny ulanyp, bu 첵erde her s철zlem 체챌in bir gezek 챌ykyl첵ar we gelejekde 첵al흫y힊lygyny bejermek 체챌in ideal bolar. PorSimplesSent bizi흫 korpusy흫 i흫 gowy senaryony 4,888 챌ift di첵ilip 첵azyl첵ar, i흫lis챌e 첵aly korpusdan uly; 채hli 체챌 wersi첵asy publika챌a mejbur. Biz PorSimplesSent 체챌in d철rt esasy hatlary bejerdik we 첵ene bir 챌ift derejesi bar we 17 lingwistiki we psihologistik 철zellikleri ulandyk, bu s철zlerin 챌ift derejesini 74.2% derejesi bilen dogry tany힊dyr첵ar.', 'hy': 'Արդյունավետ տեքստային հաղորդակցվածությունը կախված է նրանից, որ կարդացողները բավականաչափ համոզված են տեքստների հասկանալու համար, իսկ հաղորդակցվածքները բավականաչափ պարզ են, որպեսզի հասկանան նախատեսված հանդիսատեսը Երբ տեքստային ինֆորմացիայի և հրահանգների իմաստը լավ չի փոխանցվում, շատ կորստներ և վնասվածքներ կարող են տեղի ունենալ: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու լուծումների միջոցով նախադասությունների կարդալիության ավտոմատիկ գնահատումն է, որը շատ ուշադրություն է ստանում դրա մեծ կիրառելիության պատճառով: Այնուամենայնիվ, ռեսուրսների բացակայությունը, ինչպիսիք են կրթության և գնահատման կապորան, խոչընդոտում է այս խնդրի ամբողջ զարգացումը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ստեղծում ենք ոչ փոքրիկ նախադասությունների մարմին պորտուգալերենում: Մենք գնահատում ենք այն կառուցվածքի երեք սցենարներ, օգտագործելով պարզաբանության զուգահեռ կորպոսը, որտեղ յուրաքանչյուր նախադասություն երեք անգամ հավասար է և գրված է պարզաբանության գործողությունները, որոնք իդեալական են ապագա մեթոդների հնարավոր սխալների արդ The best scenario of our corpus PorSimplesSent is composed of 4,888 pairs, which is bigger than a similar corpus for English;  բոլոր երեք տարբերակները հասանելի են: We created four baselines for PorSimplesSent and made available a pairwise ranking method, using 17 linguistic and psycholinguistic features, which correctly identifies the ranking of sentence pairs with an accuracy of 74.2%.', 'am': 'ጥያቄ የጽሑፍ ግንኙነት በማስተዋል በሚበቃ አንባቢዎች ጽሑፎችን ለማስተዋል እና ጽሑፎች በተሰበሰቡ አድራጊዎች ለማስተዋል የሚበቃቸውን ጽሑፎች በሚታሰቡ ነው፡፡ የጽሑፍ መረጃ እና ትምህርት ማግኘት መልካም ባይደረግ ጊዜ ብዙዎች ጥፋቶች እና ክስሎች ሊደርሱ ይችላል፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማቅረብ መፍትሄቶችን በመቀላቀል ውስጥ የፍርድ መቃውሚያ በራስነት ማረጋገጫ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የሀብት ጉዳይ፣ እንደ ኮርፖርት ለማስተማርና ለማስተዋል፣ የዚህን ስራ ሙሉ ፍላጎቱን የሚከለክል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የፖርቱጋልኛ የፍርድ ክፍል አፈጣጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ We evaluate three scenarios for building it, taking advantage of a parallel corpus of simplification, in which each sentence triplet is aligned and has simplification operations annotated, being ideal for justifying possible mistakes of future methods.  የኮርፓስ PorSimplesSent የተሻለ የኮርፓስ ክፍተት 4,888 ዓይነቶች ተለብጦአል፤ ይህም እንግሊዝኛ በተመሰለ የኮርፕስ ትልቅ ነው። የሦስቱ ዝርዝሮች ሁሉ ግልፅ ነው:: Sent ለPorSimplesSent አራት መሠረቶች ፈጠርነው እና በ17 ቋንቋዊ እና psycholinguistic ጥያቄዎችን በመጠቀም አግኝተናል፡፡', 'az': 'Efektiv tekst iletişimi oxuyanların məktubları anlamaq üçün yeterli profil olmasına bağlı və məktubları oxumaq işində anlayacaq qədər a çıq deyildir. Mətn məlumatının və öyrənmələrinin anlamı yaxşı təbliğ edilmədiyi zaman çox ziyana və zərər olar. Bu problemi yüngülləşdirmək üçün çətinliklərin arasında, cümlələr oxuyabiləcəyi təqdirdə, böyük uyğunluğu üzündən çox dikkati alınan işdir. Ancaq bu işin tamamlanmasını engelleyir. Bu kağızda, portugalca çox kiçik bir cümləlik korpusu yaradırıq. Biz onu in şa etmək üçün üç scenario değerləşdiririk, paralel bir basitləşdirmək korpusu istifadə edərik, hər cümlənin üç cümləsi tərəfləndirilir və olaraq gələcək metodların hatalarını təsdiqləmək üçün ideal olar. Bizim korpusumuzdan PorSimplesSent ən yaxşı scenario 4.888 çift yaradılmışdır. Bu İngilizce üçün bənzər korpusdan daha böyükdür. bütün üç versiyonları açıq-aşkar mövcuddur. Biz PorSimplesSent üçün dörd sətir yaratdıq və 17 dil və psikolojik xüsusiyyətləri istifadə etdik ki, bu cümlələrin səviyyəsini 74.2% ədalətlə tanıyır.', 'bs': 'Efektivna tekstualna komunikacija zavisi od čitača koji su dovoljno profilni da bi shvatili tekste, a teksti su dovoljno jasni da bi se smislila publika, u zadatku čitanja. Kada se smisao tekstualne informacije i upute ne predaje dobro, može se pojaviti mnogi gubitak i štete. Među rješenjima za ublažavanje ovog problem a je automatska procjena čitljivosti kazne, zadatak koji je primao mnogo pažnje zbog njegove velike primjene. Međutim, nedostatak resursa, poput korporacije za obuku i procjenu, sprječava potpuni razvoj ovog zadatka. U ovom papiru, stvorimo nevjerojatni korpus kazne na portugalskom jeziku. Procjenjujemo tri scenarija za izgradnju nje, koristeći paralelni korpus jednostavnosti, u kojem je svaka trostruka rečenica usklađena i označena operacija za jednostavljanje, idealna za opravdavanje mogućih grešaka budućih metoda. Najbolji scenario našeg korpusa PorSimplesSent je sastavljen od 4.888 par, koji je veći od sličnog korpusa za engleski jezik; sve tri verzije njegove su javno dostupne. Stvorili smo četiri osnovne linije za PorSimplesSent i raspoložili smo parovnu metodu rangiranja, koristeći 17 lingvističkih i psihologističkih karakteristika, koja ispravno identificira ranking par rečenica sa preciznošću 74,2%.', 'bn': 'কার্যকর টেক্সচুয়াল যোগাযোগ পাঠকদের প্রতি নির্ভর করে যে লেখাগুলো বোঝার জন্য যথেষ্ট দক্ষতা রয়েছে এবং লেখাগুলো পরিষ্কার করে পাঠ যখন টেক্চুয়াল তথ্য এবং নির্দেশাবলীর মানে ভালোভাবে প্রকাশ করা হয়নি, তখন অনেক ক্ষতি এবং ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত হতে পারে। Among the solutions to alleviate this problem is the automatic evaluation of sentence readability, task which has been receiving a lot of attention due to its large applicability.  তবে কোর্পোরা প্রশিক্ষণ এবং মূল্যের জন্য সম্পদের সংক্রান্ত অভাব এই কাজের সম্পূর্ণ উন্নয়ন বাধা দেয়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পোর্টুগীজের একটি অট্রিভিয়াল কোর্পাস তৈরি করি। আমরা এটি বানানোর জন্য তিনটি পরিস্থিতির মূল্য মূল্য দিচ্ছি, একটি সাধারণ কোর্পাসের সুবিধা নিয়ে যাচ্ছি, যেখানে প্রত্যেক বাক্যের ত্রিবার একত্রিত হয়ে যায় এবং সা আমাদের কোর্পাস পোর্সিম্পলেসেন্টের সবচেয়ে ভালো দৃশ্য তৈরি হয়েছে ৪,৮৮৮ জোড়া, যা ইংরেজীতে একই রকম কোর্পাসের চেয়ে বড়; তিনটি সংস্করণ প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যায়। আমরা পরসিমপ্লেসসেন্টের জন্য চার বেসেলাইন সৃষ্টি করেছি এবং একটি জোড়া বিজ্ঞানী র\u200d্যাঙ্কিং পদ্ধতি প্রদান করেছি, যা ১৭ ভাষার ভাষা এবং মানসিক ভাষার বৈশিষ্ট্য ব', 'et': "Tõhus tekstikommunikatsioon sõltub sellest, kas lugejad on piisavalt osavad teksti mõistmiseks ja tekstid on piisavalt selged, et neid saaks kavandatud publikule mõista, lugemisülesandes. Kui tekstiinfo ja juhiste tähendust ei edastata hästi, võib tekkida palju kahju ja kahju. Selle probleemi leevendamise lahenduste hulgas on lause loetavuse automaatne hindamine, mis on saanud suure rakendatavuse tõttu palju tähelepanu. Sellegipoolest takistab selle ülesande täielikku arengut ressursside, näiteks koolituse ja hindamise korpuste puudus. Käesolevas artiklis loome portugalikeelse mittetiviaalse lausekorpuse. Hindame kolme stsenaariumi selle ehitamiseks, kasutades ära paralleelset lihtsustamiskorpust, kus iga lause kolmik on joondatud ja on lihtsustamistoimingud märgitud, mis on ideaalne tulevaste meetodite võimalike vigade õigustamiseks. Parim stsenaarium meie korpusest PorSimplesSent koosneb 4888 paarist, mis on suurem kui sarnane korpus inglise keeles; kõik selle kolm versiooni on avalikult kättesaadavad. Lõime PorSimplesSent'i jaoks neli alusjoont ning tegime kättesaadavaks paarijärjekorra meetodi, milles kasutati 17 keelelist ja psühholingvistilist omadust, mis tuvastab lausepaaride järjestuse täpsusega 74,2%.", 'ca': "La comunicació textual efectiva depèn de que els lectors siguin suficientment competents per entendre els textos, i que els textos siguin suficientment clars per entendre'ls per l'audiència prevista, en una tasca de lectura. Quan el significat de la informació i les instruccions textuals no es transmet bé, es poden produir moltes pèrdues i danys. Entre les solucions per aliviar aquest problem a hi ha l'evaluació automàtica de la llegibilitat de frases, tasca que ha estat rebint molta atenció degut a la seva gran aplicabilitat. Tanmateix, la falta de recursos, com la corpora de formació i evaluació, dificulta el desenvolupament complet d'aquesta tasca. In this paper, we generate a nontrivial sentence corpus in Portuguese.  Evaluam tres escenaris per construir-lo, aprofitant un cos paral·lel de simplificació, en el qual cada frase triplet està alinejada i té operacions de simplificació anotats, sendo ideal per justificar possible errors de mètodes futurs. The best scenario of our corpus PorSimplesSent is composed of 4,888 pairs, which is bigger than a similar corpus for English;  totes les tres versions estan disponibles al públic. Vam crear quatre línies de base per PorSimplesSent i vam fer disponible un mètode de classement per parell, utilitzant 17 característiques lingüístices i psicologices, que identifica correctament la classement de parells de frases amb una precisió del 74,2%.", 'cs': 'Efektivní textová komunikace závisí na tom, že čtenáři jsou dostatečně schopni porozumět textům a texty jsou dostatečně jasné, aby byly pochopeny určeným publikem při čtenářském úkolu. Pokud není význam textových informací a instrukcí dobře předán, může dojít k mnoha ztrátám a škodám. Mezi řešení pro zmírnění tohoto problému patří automatické vyhodnocování čitelnosti vět, úkol, který se díky své velké aplikaci věnoval velké pozornosti. Nedostatek zdrojů, jako jsou korpusy pro školení a hodnocení, však brání plnému rozvoji tohoto úkolu. V tomto článku generujeme netriviální větový korpus v portugalštině. Vyhodnocujeme tři scénáře jejího budování s využitím paralelního korpusu zjednodušení, v němž je každá trojčata sladěna a má anotovány zjednodušovací operace, což je ideální pro odůvodnění možných chyb budoucích metod. Nejlepší scénář našeho korpusu PorSimplesSent se skládá z 4,888 párů, které jsou větší než podobný korpus pro angličtinu; všechny tři verze jsou veřejně dostupné. Vytvořili jsme čtyři základní linie pro PorSimplesSent a zpřístupnili jsme metodu párového hodnocení, využívající 17 lingvistických a psycholingvistických rysů, která správně identifikuje hodnocení větových párů s přesností 74,2%.', 'fi': 'Tehokas tekstiviestintä riippuu siitä, että lukijat ovat riittävän taitavia ymmärtämään tekstejä ja että tekstit ovat riittävän selkeitä luettavaksi tarkoitetulle yleisölle. Kun tekstitietojen ja ohjeiden merkitys ei ole hyvin välitetty, voi tapahtua monia menetyksiä ja vahinkoja. Ratkaisuja ongelman lievittämiseen on lauseiden luettavuuden automaattinen arviointi, joka on saanut paljon huomiota suuren sovellettavuutensa vuoksi. Resurssien, kuten koulutuksen ja arvioinnin, puute vaikeuttaa kuitenkin tehtävän täysimääräistä kehittämistä. Tässä artikkelissa luomme ei-triviaalisen lausekorpusen portugaliksi. Arvioimme kolmea skenaariota sen rakentamiseksi hyödyntäen rinnakkaista yksinkertaistamiskorpusta, jossa jokainen lausekolmikko on linjattu ja jossa yksinkertaistustoiminnot on merkitty, mikä on ihanteellinen perustelemaan mahdollisia virheitä tulevissa menetelmissä. Paras skenaario korpusestamme PorSimplesSent koostuu 4 888 parista, mikä on suurempi kuin vastaava korpus englanniksi; kaikki sen kolme versiota ovat julkisesti saatavilla. Luomme PorSimplesSentille neljä perusviivaa ja annoimme saataville 17 kielellistä ja psykolingvististä ominaisuutta hyödyntävän parikohtaisen ranking-menetelmän, joka tunnistaa lauseparien järjestyksen oikein 74,2%:n tarkkuudella.', 'jv': 'Coverage Attribute Genjer-tool Nanging, mbok saiki ono wektu nggawe paling-apakno, koyo ngono ora nggawe tresno lan ijol-ijolan, kuwi mau, nggawe ngupakan kanggo ngilangno nggawe lan saiki iki. Nangi pepuluh iki, awake dhéwé ngerewake tresno ana ora tribonan ning portugis. Awak dhéwé éntukno telu sanalé kanggo nggawe iki, nggawe perusahaan kelas karo perusahaan sampeyan, lan kabèh sedhaya-sedhaya kuwi tindakan kotak nggawe gerakan lan operasi layar seneng bakal terus tambah apik, lan akeh alah dhéwé nggawe barang langgar-sistem sing bisa dianggawe barang. Ndheke perusahaan sing dibutuhke bodho PuSimplesSent iki sak tanggal 4,8 pating, iki dadi luwih apik kanggo tinggal Inggris; wong kuwi telu versi ora didasai publika. Awak dhéwé nggawe kat entekake nggo Port SimplesSent lan nganggo kuwi padha karang kelas, gambar aturan sampeyan karo perusahaan kelangan kelangan karo perusahaan kelangan karo perusahaan kelangan sampeyan karo perusahaan seneng nggawe barang kelangan karo perusahaan 75.2%.', 'sk': 'Učinkovita besedilna komunikacija je odvisna od tega, da so bralci dovolj sposobni razumeti besedila, besedila pa dovolj jasna, da jih bo razumela nameravana občinstva pri branju. Kadar pomen besedilnih informacij in navodil ni dobro prenesen, lahko pride do številnih izgub in škode. Med rešitvami za lajšanje tega problema je avtomatsko ocenjevanje berljivosti stavka, naloga, ki je zaradi velike uporabnosti dobila veliko pozornosti. Vendar pa pomanjkanje virov, kot so korpusi za usposabljanje in vrednotenje, ovira celoten razvoj te naloge. V tem prispevku ustvarimo netrivialen korpus stavkov v portugalščini. Ocenjujemo tri scenarije za njeno gradnjo, pri čemer izkoristimo vzporedni korpus poenostavitve, v katerem je vsak stavek trojček poravnan in ima operacije poenostavitve označene, kar je idealno za utemeljitev morebitnih napak prihodnjih metod. Najboljši scenarij našega korpusa PorSimplesSent je sestavljen iz 4.888 parov, kar je večje od podobnega korpusa za angleščino; vse tri različice so javno dostopne. Za PorSimplesSent smo ustvarili štiri osnovne linije in dali na voljo metodo pare razvrščanja s 17 jezikovnimi in psiholingvističnimi značilnostmi, ki pravilno identificira razvrščanje parov stavkov z natančnostjo 74,2%.', 'ha': "Mawasiyyar littãfin da Effective yana dõgara ga ma'abũcin karãtun mafiya amfani da shi dõmin su iya fahimta littattafai, da kuma mistakardu sun kasance mai bayyana shi ga an fahimta da saurãre da aka yi amfani da shi, cikin wani aikin karantawa. Idan ba za'a sami fassarar lãbãrin rubutu da shiryarwa ba, za'a sami hasãra da hasãra masu yawa. Babu daga suluyinin da za'a sauƙa ƙara wannan muammãni, yana ƙayyade yana farat ɗaya ga karatun abincin sigar, wanda aka motsa aikin aiki mai yawa saboda shirin ayukansa mai girma. A lokacin da yake ƙaranci daga manyan dũkiyõyi, kamar makampuni na wa yin wa'anar da wa'anar ta, yana hani da mafarin wannan aikin. In this paper, we generate a nontrivial sentence corpus in Portuguese.  Ana ƙaddara sau-sau uku wa kuɓutar da shi, kuma tuna amfani da kowace kafin mai daidaita, a cikinsa, ko kuma a haɗa duk cewa sau-uku kuma yana da alama masu saukarwa, kuma yana da fikanci ga justify masu iya yiwuwa na hanyor bayani. Tsarin kowace PorSimflesSet na haɗi daga 4,888, wanda ke ƙaranci ko kuma kamarsa na Ingiriya; duk misalin uku na da bayyane. Mun halitta huɗu bango wa PorSimlescen kuma Muka sami hanyoyi guda biyu, ko kuma Muka yi amfani da wasu fassara masu fassara 17 cikin linguistic da linguistic aikin, wanda ke gane mai daidaita matsayin sauran da tsari na 74.2%.", 'he': 'תקשורת הודעה יעילה תלויה בקוראים מספיק מומחים כדי להבין טקסטים, והטקסטים מספיק ברורים כדי להבין על ידי הקהל המתכוון, במשימת קריאה. כאשר המשמעות של מידע הודעה וההוראות אינה מועברת היטב, אפשר לקרות אבדות רבות ונזקים. בין הפתרונות כדי להקל על הבעיה הזאת היא הערכה אוטומטית של אפשרות לקרוא משפטים, משימה שקיבלה הרבה תשומת לב בגלל אפשרותה הגדולה. עם זאת, חסר משאבים, כמו גופרה לאימון והערכה, מפריע לפיתוח מלא של המשימה הזאת. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו יוצרים גופוס משפט לא טריוויאלי בפורטוגזית. אנו מעריכים שלושה תרחישים לבניין אותו, ניצלנו קורפוס מקביל של הפשטות, שבה כל משפט שלישי מתאים ויש פעילות הפשטות מוצבעות, להיות אידיאלית להצדיק טעויות אפשריות של שיטות עתידיות. התרחיש הטוב ביותר של הקורפוס שלנו PorSimplesSent הוא מורכב מ-4,888 זוגות, שהוא גדול יותר מקורפוס דומה לאנגלית; כל שלושת הגרסאות שלה זמינות לציבור. יצרנו ארבעה קווים בסיסיים עבור PorSimplesSent והפכנו פנויים שיטת דירה זוגות, בשימוש 17 תכונות שפתיים ופסיכולוגיות, אשר מזהה נכון את הדרגה של זוגות משפטים עם מדויקה של 74.2%.', 'bo': 'ནུས་པ་ཡིག་གེ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ནི་ཀློག་འཇུག་པ་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡོངས་རྟོགས་ཅན་ཡོད་པ ཡི་གེའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་བཤད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་སྐྱོན་མེད་དུས་སྐབས་སུ། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལེན་པར་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནུས་མེད་པར་བསམ་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡོད་པའི་དཔྱད་འགན་ལ། ཡིན་ནའང་། རྒྱུ་ཆས་ཀྱི་ཆུང་དག་འབྱུང་མེད། དཔེར་ན། གློག་འཕྲིན་དང་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ་ཉུང་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་རྩིས་པོ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་དེ། ང་ཚོས་དེ་བཟོ་བར་བྱས་པར་མཁན་གསུམ་གྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་མདུན་མེད་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་ PorSimplesSent ཞབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་མདུན་མེད་དེ་ ༤,888ཆུང་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་དང་། འདི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ལས་རྩ་ དེའི་ཐོན་རིམ་གསུམ་ཡོད་མེད་པར་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་PorSimplesSent ཡི་བརྗོད་ཐོའི་གཞི་རྟེན་འདི་༤།སྐད་རིགས་དང་ཕྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་གཟུགས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱས་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Adopting the Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets with Individual Comparison for Natural Language Inference', 'fr': "Adoption des triplets de dépendance par paire de mots avec comparaison individuelle pour l'inférence en langage naturel", 'pt': 'Adotando os trigêmeos de dependência de pares de palavras com comparação individual para inferência de linguagem natural', 'es': 'Adopción de los tríos de dependencia de pares de palabras con comparación individual para la inferencia del lenguaje natural', 'ar': 'اعتماد تبعية الكلمات وثلاثة توائم مع المقارنة الفردية للاستدلال اللغوي الطبيعي', 'ja': '自然言語推論のための個々の比較を持つ単語ペア依存性トリプレットの採用', 'zh': '用词对依三元组个体较自然语言推理', 'ru': 'Внедрение тройки «слово - пара - зависимость» с индивидуальным сравнением для вывода на естественный язык', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान के लिए व्यक्तिगत तुलना के साथ Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets को अपनाना', 'ga': 'Glacadh leis na Focal-Péire-Cleithiúlacht-Triplets le Comparáid Aonair le Tátail Teanga Nádúrtha', 'el': 'Υιοθέτηση της λέξης-ζευγαριού-εξάρτησης-τρίδυμων με ατομική σύγκριση για συμπέρασμα φυσικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'A szópár-függőség-hármasok elfogadása egyéni összehasonlítással a természetes nyelvi fertőzésekhez', 'ka': 'სიტყვების დასამხოლობა-სამხოლობა-სამხოლობა, რომელიც individual Comparison for Natural Language Inference', 'it': "Adottare la coppia di parole-dipendenza-triplette con confronto individuale per l'inferenza del linguaggio naturale", 'kk': 'Тәуелдік тіл қасиеттерінің бір-бір салыстыру үшін сөз- екі тәуелдік- үш қасиеттерді қабылдау', 'lt': 'Priimti žodžių, poros, priklausomybės nuo trijų grupių ir atskirai palyginti natūralių kalbų nenurodymą', 'mk': 'Прифаќање на трипати на зависност од зборови со индивидуално споредување за природна инференција на јазик', 'ms': 'Mengadopsi Perkataan-Pasangan-Tergantung-Triplet dengan Perbandingan Individual untuk Bahasa Alami', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള പ്രാധാന്യം', 'mt': 'L-adozzjoni tat-Tripletti ta’ Dipendenza fuq il-Kliem-Pajjiż bi Tqabbil Individwali għall-Inferenza tal-Lingwa Naturali', 'pl': 'Przyjęcie trójkątów zależności słowa-pary z indywidualnym porównaniem dla wniosku języka naturalnego', 'ro': 'Adoptarea tripletelor de cuvinte-pereche-dependență-cuvânt cu comparație individuală pentru inferența limbajului natural', 'no': 'Adopter ord-par-avhengighet-tripletene med individuell sammenlikning for naturspråk', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл хамаарлын харьцуулалтыг хүлээн зөвшөөрөх нь', 'sr': 'Prihvaćanje riječi-par-zavisnosti-tripleta sa individualnom usporedbom prirodnog jezika', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත භාෂාව අතිරීක්ෂණය සමග වචනය-සම්බන්ධතාවය', 'sv': 'Antagande av ordpar-beroende-tripletter med individuell jämförelse för naturlig språkinferens', 'so': 'Barbaarinta hadalka-Pair-ku xiran-Triplets with u dhigista iskutaarinta afka asalka ah', 'ur': 'اس بات کی قبول کرتی ہے کہ ایک شخص کی نسبت طبیعی زبان کی نسبت', 'ta': 'சாதாரண மொழி புகுத்துதலுக்கான சார்ந்த- பேர்- சார்ந்த- சார்ந்த- சார்ந்த மூன்று ஒப்பிடுதலுடன் மாற்றுதல்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhận nuôi Từ-đôi-độ-phụ thuộc-ba với sự khác biệt cá nhân liên hệ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'hr': 'Prihvaćanje riječi o ovisnosti o trostrucima s individualnom usporedbom prirodnog jezika', 'bg': 'Приемане на думата-двойка-зависимост-тризнаци с индивидуално сравнение за естествено езиково заключение', 'da': 'Vedtagelse af ordpar-afhængighed-tripletter med individuel sammenligning for naturlige sprog inference', 'nl': 'Adoptie van de woord-paar-afhankelijkheid-drieling met individuele vergelijking voor natuurlijke taal Inference', 'de': 'Adoption der Wort-Paar-Abhängigkeits-Triplets mit individuellem Vergleich zur natürlichen Sprachfolge', 'ko': '개체 비교를 가진 단어를 채택하여 삼원조에 의존하여 자연 언어 추리를 진행하다', 'id': 'Adopting Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets with Individual Comparison for Natural Language Inference', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Neno-Utegemea-Tatizo na Kulinganisha kwa Kiasili ya Lugha ya asili', 'sq': 'miratimi i trefisheve të varësisë së fjalës-çiftit me krahasim individual për inferencën natyrore të gjuhës', 'fa': 'قبول کردن کلمه-دو-اعتماد-Triplets با مقایسه شخصی برای تفاوت زبان طبیعی', 'am': 'የቃላት-Pair-Dependency-Triplets with Individual Comparities for Natural language Inference', 'hy': 'Բառերի-զույգերի-կախվածության-եռանկյունների ընդունելը բնական լեզվի ինֆերանսի անհատական համեմատությամբ', 'tr': 'Adopting the Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets with Individual Comparison for Natural Language Inferences', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রতিরোধের সাথে শব্দ- পেয়ার-নির্ভর- ত্রিপলেট পরিবর্তন করা হচ্ছে', 'af': 'Aanvaar die Woord-Pair-Afhanklikheid-Triplets met Individuele Vergelyking vir Natuurlike Taal Inferensie', 'bs': 'Prihvaćanje riječi-par-zavisnosti-tripleta sa individualnom usporedbom prirodnog jezika', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil müqabiliyyətinin müqabiliyyəti ilə birləşdirmək üçün', 'et': 'Sõna-paar-sõltuvus-kolmikute vastuvõtmine individuaalse võrdlusega loodusliku keele järelduste jaoks', 'fi': 'Sanapari-riippuvuus-kolmikkojen hyväksyminen yksilöllisellä vertailulla luonnollisen kielen inferenssille', 'ca': 'Adoptar els triplets de "Word-Pair-Dependence-Triplets" amb Comparació Individual per a la Inferència de Llingua Natural', 'cs': 'Přijetí slovo-dvojice-závislost-trojice s individuálním porovnáním pro inferenci přirozeného jazyka', 'jv': 'adopting the Word-PAR', 'he': 'לאמץ את משולשים תלויות מילים-זוג עם שיוואי אישי עבור שפת טבעית', 'sk': 'Sprejetje trojčkov odvisnosti od besed s individualno primerjavo za sklepanje naravnega jezika', 'bo': 'Adopting the Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets with Individual Comparison for Natural Language Inference', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes to perform natural language inference with Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. Most previous DNN-based approaches either ignore syntactic dependency among words, or directly use tree-LSTM to generate sentence representation with irrelevant information. To overcome the problems mentioned above, we adopt Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets to improve alignment and inference judgment. To be specific, instead of comparing each triplet from one passage with the merged information of another passage, we first propose to perform comparison directly between the triplets of the given passage-pair to make the judgement more interpretable. Experimental results show that the performance of our approach is better than most of the approaches that use tree structures, and is comparable to other state-of-the-art approaches.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة إجراء الاستدلال اللغوي الطبيعي باستخدام Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. معظم الأساليب السابقة القائمة على DNN إما تتجاهل التبعية النحوية بين الكلمات ، أو تستخدم بشكل مباشر الشجرة LSTM لإنشاء تمثيل الجملة بمعلومات غير ذات صلة. للتغلب على المشكلات المذكورة أعلاه ، نعتمد على Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets لتحسين المحاذاة والاستدلال على الحكم. لكي نكون محددين ، بدلاً من مقارنة كل ثلاثي من مقطع واحد بالمعلومات المدمجة لمقطع آخر ، نقترح أولاً إجراء مقارنة مباشرة بين التوائم الثلاثة من زوج الممر المحدد لجعل الحكم أكثر قابلية للتفسير. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن أداء نهجنا أفضل من معظم الأساليب التي تستخدم الهياكل الشجرية ، ويمكن مقارنتها بأحدث الأساليب الأخرى.', 'fr': "Cet article propose d'effectuer une inférence en langage naturel avec des triplets de dépendance de mot-paire-dépendants. La plupart des approches précédentes basées sur le DNN ignorent la dépendance syntaxique entre les mots ou utilisent directement Tree-LSTM pour générer une représentation de phrase avec des informations non pertinentes. Pour surmonter les problèmes mentionnés ci-dessus, nous adoptons Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets pour améliorer l'alignement et le jugement d'inférence. Pour être précis, au lieu de comparer chaque triplet d'un passage avec les informations fusionnées d'un autre passage, nous proposons d'abord d'effectuer une comparaison directe entre les triplets de la paire de passages donnée afin de rendre le jugement plus interprétable. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que les performances de notre approche sont meilleures que celles de la plupart des approches utilisant des structures arborescentes et sont comparables à d'autres approches de pointe.", 'es': 'Este artículo propone realizar inferencias de lenguaje natural con tresillos de dependencia de pares de palabras. La mayoría de los enfoques basados en DNN anteriores ignoran la dependencia sintáctica entre las palabras o utilizan directamente Tree-LSTM para generar una representación de oraciones con información irrelevante. Para superar los problemas mencionados anteriormente, adoptamos Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets para mejorar la alineación y el juicio de inferencia. Para ser específicos, en lugar de comparar cada tresillo de un pasaje con la información combinada de otro pasaje, primero proponemos realizar una comparación directamente entre los trillizos del par de pasajes dado para que el juicio sea más interpretable. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el rendimiento de nuestro enfoque es mejor que el de la mayoría de los enfoques que utilizan estructuras arbóreas, y es comparable a otros enfoques de vanguardia.', 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe realizar inferência de linguagem natural com Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. A maioria das abordagens anteriores baseadas em DNN ignoram a dependência sintática entre as palavras ou usam diretamente o tree-LSTM para gerar representação de sentença com informações irrelevantes. Para superar os problemas mencionados acima, adotamos Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets para melhorar o alinhamento e o julgamento de inferência. Para ser específico, em vez de comparar cada trio de uma passagem com as informações mescladas de outra passagem, propomos primeiro realizar a comparação diretamente entre os trigêmeos de um determinado par de passagens para tornar o julgamento mais interpretável. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o desempenho da nossa abordagem é melhor do que a maioria das abordagens que usam estruturas em árvore e é comparável a outras abordagens do estado da arte.', 'ja': 'この論文では、自然言語の推論をWord - Pair - Dependency - Tripletsで行うことを提案している。ほとんどの以前のDNNベースのアプローチは、単語間の構文依存性を無視するか、ツリー- LSTMを直接使用して、無関係な情報を含む文章表現を生成するかのいずれかである。上記の問題を克服するために、アライメントと推論の判断を改善するために、Word - Pair - dependency - Tripletを採用しています。具体的には、ある経路からの各トリプレットを別の経路の結合情報と比較するのではなく、まず、判断をより解釈可能にするために、所与の経路ペアのトリプレット間で直接比較を行うことを提案する。実験結果は、私たちのアプローチのパフォーマンスが、木構造を使用するほとんどのアプローチよりも優れており、他の最先端のアプローチと同等であることを示しています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर वर्ड-पेयर-निर्भरता-ट्रिपल्स के साथ प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान करने का प्रस्ताव करता है। अधिकांश पिछले डीएनएन-आधारित दृष्टिकोण या तो शब्दों के बीच वाक्यात्मक निर्भरता को अनदेखा करते हैं, या अप्रासंगिक जानकारी के साथ वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व उत्पन्न करने के लिए सीधे ट्री-एलएसटीएम का उपयोग करते हैं। ऊपर उल्लिखित समस्याओं को दूर करने के लिए, हम संरेखण और अनुमान निर्णय में सुधार करने के लिए Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets को अपनाते हैं। विशिष्ट होने के लिए, एक मार्ग से प्रत्येक त्रिक की तुलना दूसरे मार्ग की मर्ज की गई जानकारी के साथ करने के बजाय, हम पहले निर्णय को और अधिक व्याख्यायोग्य बनाने के लिए दिए गए मार्ग-जोड़ी के त्रिक के बीच सीधे तुलना करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारे दृष्टिकोण का प्रदर्शन पेड़ संरचनाओं का उपयोग करने वाले अधिकांश दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना में बेहतर है, और अन्य अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों के लिए तुलनीय है।', 'zh': '本文议用Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets行自然语言推理。 大抵 DNN 之道,或忽单词之句法恃,或径用 tree-LSTM ,或有不相关信息之句。 克此者,Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets以善齐理也。 具体来说,臣等首议直比给定段落三元组之间,非以一段落之中组与一段落并息,以决更具可解释性也。 实验结果表明,吾道之性优于多用树结构之法,而与他最先进之法相当。', 'ru': 'В данной работе предлагается выполнить вывод на естественном языке с помощью тройки зависимостей Word-Pair. Большинство предыдущих подходов, основанных на DNN, либо игнорируют синтаксическую зависимость между словами, либо напрямую используют дерево-LSTM для создания представления предложения с нерелевантной информацией. Чтобы преодолеть проблемы, упомянутые выше, мы принимаем Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets для улучшения выравнивания и вывода суждений. Чтобы быть точным, вместо сравнения каждой триплеты из одного отрывка с объединенной информацией другого отрывка, мы сначала предлагаем провести сравнение непосредственно между триплетами данной пары отрывков, чтобы сделать суждение более интерпретируемым. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что эффективность нашего подхода лучше, чем большинство подходов, которые используют структуры деревьев, и сопоставима с другими современными подходами.', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo tátal teanga nádúrtha a dhéanamh le Word-Pair-Cleithiúnacht-Triplets. Déanann an chuid is mó de chur chuige DNN-bhunaithe roimhe seo neamhaird ar spleáchas comhréire i measc na bhfocal, nó úsáideann siad crann-LSTM go díreach chun léiriú abairtí a ghiniúint le faisnéis nach mbaineann le hábhar. Chun na fadhbanna thuasluaite a shárú, glacaimid Word-Pair-Cleithiúnacht-Triplets chun ailíniú agus breithiúnas tátal a fheabhsú. Chun a bheith sainiúil, in ionad gach triplet as sliocht amháin a chur i gcomparáid le faisnéis chumaisc sliocht eile, molaimid ar dtús comparáid a dhéanamh go díreach idir triplets an phasáiste a tugadh chun an breithiúnas a dhéanamh níos inmhínithe. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil feidhmíocht ár gcur chuige níos fearr ná an chuid is mó de na cineálacha cur chuige a úsáideann struchtúir crann, agus go bhfuil sé inchomparáide le cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha eile.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει την εκτέλεση συμπερασμάτων φυσικής γλώσσας με τρίδυμα εξάρτησης λέξεων-ζευγαριών. Οι περισσότερες προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις που βασίζονται είτε αγνοούν τη συντακτική εξάρτηση μεταξύ λέξεων, είτε χρησιμοποιούν απευθείας το δέντρο για να δημιουργήσουν αναπαράσταση προτάσεων με άσχετες πληροφορίες. Για να ξεπεράσουμε τα προβλήματα που αναφέρθηκαν παραπάνω, υιοθετούμε τρίδυμα εξάρτησης λέξεων-ζευγαριών για να βελτιώσουμε την ευθυγράμμιση και την κρίση συμπερασμάτων. Για να είμαστε συγκεκριμένοι, αντί να συγκρίνουμε κάθε τρίδυμο από το ένα απόσπασμα με τις συγχωνευμένες πληροφορίες από το άλλο απόσπασμα, προτείνουμε πρώτα να κάνουμε σύγκριση απευθείας μεταξύ των τρίδυμων του συγκεκριμένου ζεύγους περάσεων για να γίνει η κρίση πιο ερμηνευτική. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η απόδοση της προσέγγισής μας είναι καλύτερη από τις περισσότερες προσεγγίσεις που χρησιμοποιούν δομές δέντρων, και είναι συγκρίσιμη με άλλες προσεγγίσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a természetes nyelvi következtetést javasolja a Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets segítségével. A legtöbb korábbi DNN-alapú megközelítés vagy figyelmen kívül hagyja a szavak közötti szintaktikus függőséget, vagy közvetlenül a tree-LSTM segítségével létrehozza a mondatok ábrázolását irreleváns információkkal. A fent említett problémák leküzdése érdekében Word-Pair-Dependency-Tripleteket alkalmazunk, hogy javítsuk az igazítást és a következtetéseket. Pontosabban, ahelyett, hogy összehasonlítanánk az egyik szakaszból származó hármasokat egy másik szakasz egyesített információival, először azt javasoljuk, hogy közvetlenül összehasonlítsuk az adott szakasz hármasait, hogy értelmezhetőbbé tegyük az ítéletet. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk teljesítménye jobb, mint a legtöbb fastruktúrát alkalmazó megközelítés, és összehasonlítható más korszerű megközelítésekkel.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნტის შესაძლებელია, რომ სიტყვების შესახებ სამყარო სამყარო სიტყვების ინფრენციას გავაკეთოთ. ბევრი წინა DNN- დაბათებული მოხმარება ან სინტაქტიული დასახმარება სიტყვების შორის ინგორიცია, ან პირადი გამოყენება tree- LSTM სიტყვების გამოყენება, რომელიც წარმოადგენა ჩვენ ამოხსენებული პრობლემების გადავიწყებთ, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სიტყვების დამართლებელობა-სამყარო სამყარო, რომელიც უფრო უფრო უფრო დამართვა და და განსაკუთრებული იყოს, ყველა სამჯერო გადასწორება ერთი გადასწორებული ინფორმაციის ერთადერთი გადასწორებული გადასწორება, ჩვენ პირველად გვეძებნა გადასწორება სამჯერო გადასწორებული გადასწორებული გადასწორებ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენი წარმოდგენისა უკეთესი, ვიდრე უფრო მეტი წარმოდგენები, რომლებიც ხელის სტრუქტურაციას გამოყენებს, და სხვა წარმოდგენ', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз Word- Pair- Dependency- Triplets- мен табиғи тілдерді өзгертуге ұсынады. Алдыңғы DNN- негіздеген арқылы синтактикалық тәуелдігін сөздер арасында елемейді, немесе бұтақ- LSTM дегенді тікелей қолдану үшін сөздерді келтіру үшін мәліметтерді құру үшін. Жоғардағы мәселелерді өзгерту үшін біз Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets дегенді жақсарту және бақылау үшін қолданамыз. Арнаулы болу үшін, бір жүгірткіден басқа жүгірткінің біріктірілген мәліметтерімен салыстыру орнына, біріншіден келтірілген жүгірткінің үш жолдарының арасындағы салыстыру үшін мәліметті толықтыруға Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің тәртіпіміздің көпшілігіміз ағаш құрылғыларының көпшілігінен жақсы болып, басқа жағдайдың күйіне салыстырылып тұрады.', 'it': "Questo articolo propone di eseguire inferenza del linguaggio naturale con Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. La maggior parte dei precedenti approcci basati su DNN ignora la dipendenza sintattica tra le parole, oppure usa direttamente tree-LSTM per generare la rappresentazione delle frasi con informazioni irrilevanti. Per superare i problemi sopra menzionati, adottiamo Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets per migliorare l'allineamento e il giudizio di inferenza. Per essere precisi, invece di confrontare ogni tripletta di un passaggio con le informazioni fuse di un altro passaggio, proponiamo innanzitutto di effettuare un confronto diretto tra le triplette della coppia di passaggio data per rendere il giudizio più interpretabile. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che le prestazioni del nostro approccio sono migliori della maggior parte degli approcci che utilizzano strutture ad albero, ed è paragonabile ad altri approcci all'avanguardia.", 'mk': 'Овој документ предлага да се изврши природна инференција на јазик со зборови-парови-зависност-триплини. Повеќето претходни пристапи базирани на DNN или игнорираат синтактичка зависност меѓу зборовите, или директно користат дрво- LSTM за генерирање претставување на речениците со нерелевантни информации. За да ги надминеме проблемите споменети горе, усвојуваме зборови-парови-зависност-триплини за подобрување на пристапувањето и судењето на конференцијата. За да бидеме специфични, наместо да ги споредиме секој триплет од еден премин со заедничките информации од друг премин, прво предлагаме да се спроведе споредба директно помеѓу триплетите од дадениот пар премин за да се направи пресудата поинтерпретабилна. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека резултатите на нашиот пристап се подобри од повеќето пристапи кои користат дрвени структури и се споредливи со другите најсовремени пристапи.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mencadangkan untuk melakukan kesimpulan bahasa semulajadi dengan Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. Kebanyakan pendekatan berdasarkan DNN terdahulu sama ada mengabaikan dependensi sintaktik diantara perkataan, atau menggunakan secara langsung tree-LSTM untuk menghasilkan perwakilan kalimat dengan maklumat tidak relevan. Untuk mengatasi masalah yang disebut di atas, kami mengadopsi Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets untuk meningkatkan penyesuaian dan penghakiman kesimpulan. Untuk menjadi spesifik, selain daripada membandingkan setiap tiga dari satu laluan dengan maklumat gabungan dari laluan lain, kita pertama-tama melamar untuk melakukan perbandingan langsung antara tiga pasangan yang diberikan untuk membuat penilaian lebih boleh diterangkan. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa prestasi pendekatan kita lebih baik daripada kebanyakan pendekatan yang menggunakan struktur pokok, dan adalah bandingan dengan pendekatan yang lain-state-of-the-art.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūloma daryti natūralią kalbos išvadą žodžių-poros-priklausomybės-trikampiais. Dauguma ankstesnių DNN pagrįstų metodų arba ignoruoja sintaktinę priklausomybę nuo žodžių, arba tiesiogiai naudoja medžio LSTM, kad būtų galima generuoti sakinius su nereikšminga informacija. Siekdami įveikti pirmiau minėtas problemas, priimame žodžių-poros-priklausomybės-trikampius siekiant pagerinti suderinimą ir išvadų sprendimą. Kalbant konkrečiai, užuot palyginę kiekvieną trejetą iš vienos dalies su sujungta informacija iš kitos dalies, pirmiausia siūlome tiesiogiai palyginti trejetus iš atitinkamos kelio poros, kad sprendimas būtų aiškinamas. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodo veiksmingumas yra geresnis nei dauguma metodų, kuriuose naudojamos medžių struktūros, ir yra panašus į kitus moderniausius metodus.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ അപരിഹാരം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പുള്ള DNN-അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ഏറ്റവും മിക്കവാറുകള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d സിന്\u200dടാക്ടിക്ക് ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ന മുകളില്\u200d പറയുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെ പരിജയിക്കാന്\u200d വാക്ക്-പീര്\u200d-ഡിപ്പെന്റി-ട്രിപ്ലെറ്റുകള്\u200d പ്രാപ്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നതിന് പകരം ഒരു പാസ്സില്\u200d നിന്നും ഓരോ മൂന്നില്\u200d നിന്നും വേറൊരുമിച്ച വിവരങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന് പകരം നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം പാ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തേക്കുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം മരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഏറ്റവും', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jipproponi li ssir inferenza lingwistika naturali b’Word-Pair-Dependence-Triplets. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi preċedenti bbażati fuq DNN jew jinjoraw id-dipendenza sintattika fost il-kliem, jew jużaw direttament tree-LSTM biex jiġġeneraw rappreżentazzjoni tas-sentenza b’informazzjoni irrelevanti. Biex jingħelbu l-problemi msemmija hawn fuq, aħna niddottaw Word-Pair-Dependence-Triplets biex itejbu l-allinjament u l-inferenza ġudizzjarja. Biex ikun speċifiku, minflok tqabbel kull triplet minn passaġġ wieħed mal-informazzjoni fuża ta’ passaġġ ieħor, l-ewwel nipproponu li jsir tqabbil dirett bejn it-triplets tal-par tal-passaġġ partikolari biex il-ġudizzju jsir aktar interpretabbli. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-prestazzjoni tal-approċċ tagħna hija aħjar mill-biċċa l-kbira tal-approċċi li jużaw strutturi tas-siġar, u hija komparabbli ma’ approċċi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår å utføra naturspråk-infeksjon med Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. Dei fleste førre tilnærmingane som er basert på DNN er anten ignorert syntaksiske avhengighet mellom ord, eller bruk tre-LSTM direkte for å laga setningar med ulike informasjon. For å overvåka problema som er oppgitt over, kan vi bruke ord-par-avhengighetstriplet for å forbetra justeringa og inferens. For å vera spesifikke, i staden for å sammenligne kvar treflett frå ein passasjon med fletta informasjon om ein annan passasjon, første fører vi å utføra sammenligninga direkte mellom trefletta av den gjevne passasjonspara for å gjera det mest tolkbare. Eksperimentale resultat viser at utviklinga av tilnærminga vårt er bedre enn dei fleste tilnærmingane som brukar trestrukturer, og er sammenlignbar med andre tilnærmingar av kunsten.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets-тэй байгалийн хэл халдвар хийх боломжтой. Ихэнх өмнөх DNN-д суурилсан арга баримтууд нь сөрөг дээр синтактикийн хамааралтай байдлыг эсвэл шууд ашиглах боломжтой мэдээллээр өгүүлбэрийг бий болгох боломжтой. Үүний дээр хэлсэн асуудлуудыг давхарлахын тулд бид Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets-ийг зөвшөөрүүлэх, халдварын шүүмжлэг дээр ашигладаг. Тодорхой байхын оронд, нэг дагуулаас нэг дагуулаас нэг дагуулаас нэг дагуулаас харьцуулахын оронд, бид анхны дагуулын дагуулаас хоорондоо шууд харьцуулахыг хүсэж байна. Шийтгэл илүү ойлгомжтой болгох. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний арга хэмжээний үйл ажиллагаа модны бүтээгдэхүүний ихэнх арга хэмжээнээс илүү сайн байдаг ба бусад урлагийн арга хэмжээнээс харьцуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł proponuje przeprowadzenie wniosków języka naturalnego za pomocą trójkątów zależności od par słów. Większość poprzednich podejść opartych na DNN albo ignoruje zależność składni między słowami, albo bezpośrednio używa drzewa-LSTM do generowania reprezentacji zdań z nieistotnymi informacjami. Aby przezwyciężyć problemy wspomniane powyżej, przyjmujemy trójki zależności słowa-pary-zależności, aby poprawić wyrównanie i ocenę wniosków. Szczegółowo mówiąc, zamiast porównywać każdą trójkę z jednego fragmentu z połączoną informacją z innego fragmentu, proponujemy najpierw dokonać porównania bezpośredniego pomiędzy trójkątkami danej pary pasażowej, aby uczynić osąd bardziej interpretowalny. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że efektywność naszego podejścia jest lepsza niż większość podejść wykorzystujących struktury drzew i jest porównywalna z innymi najnowocześniejszymi podejściami.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune efectuarea inferenței limbajului natural cu Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. Majoritatea abordărilor anterioare bazate pe DNN fie ignoră dependența sintactică dintre cuvinte, fie folosesc direct tree-LSTM pentru a genera reprezentarea frazelor cu informații irelevante. Pentru a depăși problemele menționate mai sus, adoptăm Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets pentru a îmbunătăți alinierea și judecata inferenței. Pentru a fi specific, în loc să comparăm fiecare triplet dintr-un pasaj cu informațiile fuzionate dintr-un alt pasaj, propunem mai întâi să facem comparația directă între tripleții perechii de pasaje date pentru a face judecata mai interpretabilă. Rezultatele experimentale arată că performanța abordării noastre este mai bună decât majoritatea abordărilor care utilizează structuri copace și este comparabilă cu alte abordări de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže da izvrši prirodnu jezičku infekciju sa Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. Većina prethodnih pristupa na DNN-u ili ignoriše sintaktičnu zavisnost među riječima, ili direktno koristi drvo-LSTM kako bi stvorila predstavu rečenica sa neovisnim informacijama. Da bi preuzeli probleme koje su spomenule iznad toga, usvojili smo riječi-par-ovisnosti-triplete kako bi poboljšali sud o usklađenju i infekciji. Da bismo bili specifični, umjesto usporedbe svakog trostrukog putovanja iz jednog prolaza sa zajedničkim informacijama o drugom prolazu, prvo predlažemo da izvedemo usporedbu direktno između trostruka određenog putovanja parova kako bi sudjenje učinilo većom interpretacijom. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je učinkovito našeg pristupa bolji od većine pristupa koje koriste strukture drveta i usporedno sa drugim pristupima umjetnosti.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets එක්ක. බොහෝ මුලින් DNN- අධාරිත ප්\u200dරවේශයක් වචනයේ සංකේතික විශ්වාසය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න, නැත්තම් වර්ගය- LSTM විශ්වාසය සඳහා  උඩ තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ කරන්න, අපි Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා, සම්පූර්ණත්වය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වැඩ විශේෂ විදිහට වෙන්න, හැම ත්\u200dරිප්ලෙට් එක පාසයෙන් එක්කෙනෙක් පාසයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න තොරතුරු සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, අපි පළමු ප්\u200dරතිච පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වඩා හොඳයි ගස් සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වගේ', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår att utföra naturlig språkinferens med Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. De flesta tidigare DNN-baserade tillvägagångssätt ignorerar antingen syntaktiskt beroende mellan ord, eller använder direkt tree-LSTM för att generera meningsrepresentation med irrelevant information. För att lösa de problem som nämns ovan använder vi Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets för att förbättra anpassningen och slutsatsbedömningen. För att vara specifik, i stället för att jämföra varje trippel från en passage med den sammanslagna informationen i en annan passage, föreslår vi först att utföra jämförelse direkt mellan trippelerna i det givna passage-paret för att göra bedömningen mer tolkningsbar. Experimentella resultat visar att prestandan i vårt tillvägagångssätt är bättre än de flesta av de tillvägagångssätt som använder trädstrukturer, och är jämförbar med andra state-of-the-art tillvägagångssätt.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் இயல்பான மொழியின் பிரச்சனையை வார்த்தை - பேர்- சார்ந்த- சார்ந்த- மூன்று முறைகள் உடன் செயல முந்தைய DNN-அடிப்படையில் பெரும்பாலான முன்னோடுதல்கள் சொற்களுக்கிடையே ஒத்திசைப்படை சார்பை புறக்கணிக்கவும் அல்லது வார்த மேலே குறிப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனைகளை வெற்றுவதற்கு, நாம் வார்த்தை - பேர்- சார்ந்த- சார்ந்த மூன்று முறைகளை எடுத்து ஒழ குறிப்பிட்ட ஒவ்வொரு முறை கடவுச்சொல்லில் இருந்து ஒப்பிடுவதற்கு பதிலாக மற்றொரு கடவுச்செல்லும் ஒன்றாக ஒப்பிடுவதற்கு, நாம் முதலில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட முயற்சி முடிவுகள் எங்கள் அணுகும் செயல்பாடு மரத்தின் அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தும் பெரும்பாலான வழிகளை விட சிறந்தது என்பதை காட்டுகிறது, மற', 'so': 'Kanu wuxuu soo jeedaa in luqada asalka ah lagu sameeyo qoraal-Pair-Dependence-Triplets. Inta badan oo ku qoran DNN-ka horeysay waxay u jeedaan in ay isku xiran tahay hadallada, ama si toos ah u isticmaalaan geed-LSTM si uu ugu soo diro xukunka looga soo jeedo macluumaad aan hagaagsanayn. Si aan uga adkaado dhibaatooyinka kor lagu soo sheegay, waxaynu soo qaadanaa hadal-Pair-ku-xiran si aan u kordhinno xukunka isbedelinta iyo iney u baahnaan. Si gaar ah ayaynu ugu talo galno in ay isku barbarto saddex nooc kasta oo ka mid ah baasaboor kale, marka ugu horeysa waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan si toos u sameyno isbarbardhiga saddexda labadooda ee baasaboor la siiyey si aan go’aanka ugu fasiri karno. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in dhaqdhaqaalahayaga ay ka wanaagsan yihiin hababka badan ee isticmaalaya dhismaha geedka, waxayna u eg tahay qaababka farshaxanta kale.', 'ur': 'This paper proposes to perform natural language inference with Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. بہت سے پہلے DNN-based approaches either ignore syntactic dependency among words, or directly use tree-LSTM to generate sentence representation with irrelevant information. اوپر کی مشکلات پر غالب ہونے کے لئے ہم کلمہ دو اعتمادی تیپلٹ کو قبول کرتے ہیں کہ انصاف اور کمزوری کا فیصلہ بہتر کریں۔ اور اس لئے کہ ہر تین چوڑی سے ایک دوسرے چوڑی کے مطابق ایک دوسرے چوڑی کے مطابق مقایسہ کرنے کے بدلے، ہم پہلی بار اس بات کو پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک دوسرے چوڑے کے تین چوڑے کے درمیان مستقیم مقایسہ کریں کہ فیصلہ کو زیادہ تفسیر دیں۔ Experimental results show that the performance of our approach is better than most approaches that use tree structures, and is comparable to other state-of-art approaches.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz asosiy tilni so'z-Pair-Dependency-Triplets bilan ishlab chiqarishni anglatadi. Oldingi DNN asosida ko'pchilik tugmalar birikmasiga eʼtibor berilmasin yoki gapiruvchi maʼlumot bilan gapirishni to ʻgʻri boʻlmaydi. Yuqori muammolarni almashtirish uchun biz so'z-Pair-Dependency-Triplet so'zlarini birlashtirish va taqdimlikni o'zgartirish uchun qoʻllanmiz. Koʻrsatiladigan, har bir necha maxfiy soʻzdan bir marta bir marta bir marta bir maxfiy soʻz bilan birlashtirish uchun biz birinchi maxfiy soʻzni birinchi marta o'xshash bo'lishni talab qilamiz. Tajriba natijalari shunday ko'rsatadi, bizning tuyg'urishimiz jarayonlarimizning ko'pchiligi daraxt struktlaridan foydalanadigan narsalardan yaxshi ko'proq, va bu boshqa holatning sohasi usullarida o'xshash.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề nghị thực hiện ngụ ý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên với Từ-đôi-độ phụ thuộc-ba. Hầu hết các phương pháp dựa trên DNS trước hoặc bỏ qua sự phụ thuộc cú pháp giữa các từ, hoặc trực tiếp sử dụng cây-LSD để tạo đại diện án bằng thông tin không liên quan. Để giải quyết xong các vấn đề trên, chúng tôi chấp nhận Từ-đôi-độ phụ thuộc-ba người để cải thiện sự thẳng đứng và phán quyết Để cụ thể hơn, thay vì so sánh mỗi tế bào từ một đoạn với thông tin đã ghép với nhau của một đoạn khác, chúng tôi đề nghị đầu tiên thực hiện sự so sánh trực tiếp giữa các tế bào của một đôi đi qua để làm cho quyết định dễ hiểu hơn. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy hiệu quả của phương pháp này tốt hơn hầu hết các phương pháp sử dụng cấu trúc cây, và cũng tương đương với các phương pháp hiện đại.', 'nl': 'Deze paper stelt voor om natuurlijke taal inferentie uit te voeren met Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. De meeste eerdere DNN-gebaseerde benaderingen negeren syntactische afhankelijkheid tussen woorden, of gebruiken direct tree-LSTM om zinsrepresentatie met irrelevante informatie te genereren. Om bovengenoemde problemen te overwinnen, gebruiken we Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets om uitlijning en inferentieoordeel te verbeteren. Om specifiek te zijn, in plaats van elke drieling van de ene passage te vergelijken met de samengevoegde informatie van een andere passage, stellen we voor om eerst een directe vergelijking uit te voeren tussen de drieling van het gegeven passagepaar om het oordeel duidelijker te maken. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak beter presteert dan de meeste benaderingen die boomstructuren gebruiken, en vergelijkbaar is met andere state-of-the-art benaderingen.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår at udføre naturlig sprogkonklusion med Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. De fleste tidligere DNN-baserede tilgange ignorerer enten syntaktisk afhængighed mellem ord, eller bruger direkte tree-LSTM til at generere sætningsrepræsentation med irrelevante oplysninger. For at overvinde ovennævnte problemer vedtager vi Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets for at forbedre justering og inference bedømmelse. For at være specifik, i stedet for at sammenligne hver trekant fra en passage med de sammenflettede oplysninger fra en anden passage, foreslår vi først at foretage en sammenligning direkte mellem trekanterne af den givne passage-par for at gøre dommen mere fortolkelig. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang er bedre end de fleste af de tilgange, der bruger træstrukturer, og er sammenlignelig med andre state-of-the-art tilgange.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže izvršiti prirodnu jezičku infekciju s Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. Većina prethodnih pristupa na DNN-u ili ignoriraju sintaktičku zavisnost među riječima ili direktno koriste drvo-LSTM kako bi stvorila predstavu rečenica s neovisnim informacijama. Za prevladanje problema spomenutih iznad, usvojimo riječi o ovisnosti-trojke kako bi poboljšali sud o usklađivanju i infekciji. Da bismo bili specifični, umjesto uspoređivanja svakog trostrukog putovanja iz jednog prolaza s ujedinjenim informacijama o drugom prolazu, prvo predlažemo da izvedemo usporedbu direktno između trostruka određenog prolaznog parova kako bi sudjenje učinilo više interpretacijom. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je učinkovito našeg pristupa bolji od većine pristupa koje koriste strukture drveta i usporedno s drugim pristupima umjetnosti.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия предлага извършване на естествени езикови изводи с думи-двойки-зависимост-тризнаци. Повечето предишни подходи, базирани на DNN, или игнорират синтактичната зависимост между думите, или директно използват дърво-LSTM, за да генерират представяне на изречения с неподходяща информация. За да преодолеем проблемите, споменати по-горе, ние приемаме думи-двойки-зависимост-тризнаци, за да подобрим съгласуването и заключителната преценка. За да бъдем по-конкретни, вместо да сравняваме всяка тройка от един пасаж със обединената информация от друг пасаж, първо предлагаме да извършим директно сравнение между тризнаците на дадената двойка пасажи, за да направим преценката по-разбираема. Експерименталните резултати показват, че ефективността на нашия подход е по-добра от повечето подходи, които използват дървесни структури, и е сравнима с други съвременни подходи.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit schlägt vor, natürliche Sprachinferenzen mit Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets durchzuführen. Die meisten bisherigen DNN-basierten Ansätze ignorieren entweder syntaktische Abhängigkeiten zwischen Wörtern oder verwenden direkt tree-LSTM, um Satzdarstellungen mit irrelevanten Informationen zu generieren. Um die oben genannten Probleme zu überwinden, setzen wir Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets ein, um die Ausrichtung und die Schlussfolgerung zu verbessern. Um genau zu sein, anstatt jedes Triplett aus einer Passage mit den zusammengeführten Informationen einer anderen Passage zu vergleichen, schlagen wir vor, zuerst einen direkten Vergleich zwischen den Tripletten des gegebenen Passagenpaares durchzuführen, um das Urteil besser interpretierbar zu machen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die Leistung unseres Ansatzes besser ist als die meisten Ansätze, die Baumstrukturen verwenden, und mit anderen State-of-the-Art-Ansätzen vergleichbar ist.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan untuk melakukan kesimpulan bahasa alam dengan Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. Most previous DNN-based approaches either ignore syntactic dependency among words, or directly use tree-LSTM to generate sentence representation with irrelevant information.  Untuk mengatasi masalah yang disebutkan di atas, kami mengadopsi Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets untuk meningkatkan penyesuaian dan penghakiman kesimpulan. Untuk menjadi spesifik, bukannya membandingkan setiap tiga dari satu bagian dengan informasi gabungan dari bagian lain, kami pertama-tama mengusulkan untuk melakukan perbandingan langsung antara tiga bagian dari pasar-pasar yang diberikan untuk membuat penilaian lebih dapat diterjemahkan. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa prestasi pendekatan kita lebih baik dari kebanyakan pendekatan yang menggunakan struktur pohon, dan dapat dibandingkan dengan pendekatan terbaik lainnya.', 'ko': '본고는 삼원조에 의존하여 자연 언어 추리를 하는 단어를 제시한다.이전에 대부분의 DNN 기반 방법은 단어 간의 문법적 의존을 무시하거나 트리 LSTM을 사용하여 무관한 정보를 포함하는 문장 표현을 직접 생성했다.상술한 문제를 극복하기 위해 우리는 단어 대 의존 삼원조를 이용하여 정렬과 추리 판단을 개선한다.구체적으로 말하면 우리는 한 문장의 각 삼원조와 다른 문장의 합병 정보를 비교할 필요가 없다. 우선 문장에 대한 삼원조를 직접 비교하여 판단을 더욱 해석적으로 하는 것을 권장한다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법의 성능은 대부분의 나무 구조를 사용하는 방법보다 우수하고 다른 가장 선진적인 방법과 비슷하다.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inapendekeza kufanya maambukizi ya lugha ya asili kwa neno-Pair-Trustee-Triplets. Matokeo mengi yaliyotokea nchini DNN yanayotokea ama hupuuza kutegemea uungwaji wa kiteknolojia miongoni mwa maneno, au kutumia moja kwa moja kutumia mti-LSTM kutengeneza uwakilishi wa hukumu kwa taarifa zisizo sahihi. Kushinda matatizo yanayotajwa hapo juu, tunachukua matatizo yanayotegemea neno-Pair-Trustee-Triplets to improve unyanyasaji na uamuzi wa kutokuwepo kwa usawa. To be specific, instead of comparing each triplet from one passage with the merged information of another passage, we first propose to perform comparison directly between the triplets of the given passage-pair to make the judgement more interpretable.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba utendaji wa hatua yetu ni bora kuliko mbinu nyingi zinazotumia miundombinu ya mti, na ni sawa na mbinu nyingine za hali ya sanaa.', 'af': "Hierdie papier voorstel om natuurlike taal inferensie met Woord-Pair-Afhanklikheid-Triplets te uitvoer. Die meeste vorige DNN-gebaseerde toegang of ignoreer sintaktieke afhanklikheid tussen woorde, of direk gebruik boom-LSTM om sentence voorstelling te genereer met onrelevante inligting. Om die probleme bo te oorwinning, aanneem ons woord-paar-afhanklikheid-Triplets om die reg van alignering en inferensie te verbeter. Om spesifieke te wees, in plaas van vergelyking van elke driefletjie van een pasmaak met die saamgekoppelde inligting van 'n ander pasmaak, ons voorstel eerste om vergelyking direk te doen tussen die driefletjies van die gegewe pasmaak-paar om die oordeel meer te interpreteer. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat die prestasie van ons toegang is beter as die meeste van die toegang wat boom strukture gebruik, en is vergelykbaar met ander toestand van die kunstenaar toegang.", 'fa': 'این کاغذ پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که آلودگی زبان طبیعی با Word-pair-Dependency-Triplets انجام دهد. بیشترین روش\u200cهایی که بر اساس DNN سابق شده\u200cاند یا بستگی سنتاکتی بین کلمات را نادیده بگیرند، یا مستقیما از درخت-LSTM استفاده کنید تا تولید کردن جمله\u200cها با اطلاعات بی\u200cاثر. برای تغییر دادن مشکلات از بالا، ما برای تغییر دادن قضاوت و تغییر تغییر دادن کلمه-دو-بستگی-Triplets را قبول می کنیم. برای مشخص بودن، به جای مقایسه کردن هر سه راه از یک مسیر با اطلاعات جمع شده از یک مسیر دیگر، اول پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که مستقیماً در میان سه تا مسیر مسیر دو مسیر داده شده مقایسه کنیم تا قضاوت را بیشتر تفسیر دهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهند که عملکرد دستور ما بهتر از بیشترین دستور\u200cهایی است که از ساختارهای درخت استفاده می\u200cکنند و در مقایسه با دیگر دستور\u200cهای موجود هنر است.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz tebigat dilini söz-Paýlaşyk-Üýtgedikleri bilen çykarmagy teklip edýär. DNN-iň köp görnüşi ýagdaýynda syntaktik baglançylygy sözler arasynda görmezden, ýada agaç-LSTM sözleri baglanmaýan maglumaty bilen döretmek üçin ullanyň. Üstünde bahsetilgen sorunları üstlenmek için, Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets'i düzeltmek ve aşağılık hükümetini geliştirmek için kabul ediyoruz. Aýratyn bolmak üçin, her üç gezek bir geçiginden bir gezek bilen bir gezek bilen bir gezek bilen karşılaştyrmak yerine, biz ilkinji gezek üç gezek üç gezek arasynda çykyş etmegi üçin çykyşymy has ýagdaýlaşdyrmak üçin gurlapdyk. Durmanyň netijeleri ýagdaýymyzyň tanyşymyzyň agaç guramlarynyň köpüsi ýagdaýyndan has gowydygyny görkezýär we bu ýagdaýyň başga ýagdaýynyň ýagdaýynda ýakynlaşýar.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ግጭት በቃላት-Pair-Dependency-Triplets ለመፈጸም ይገልጻል፡፡ የቀድሞው DNN-based አብዛኛዎቹ የድምፅ አካባቢዎች በንግግር መካከል ሲንታካዊ መታሰቢያ እንዲያሳዩ ወይም በዛፍ-LSTM በመቀናቀል የተጠቃሚ መረጃ እንዲያስተካክሉ ተጠቀም፡፡ በላይ የተናገረውን ችግር ለማሸንፍ ቃላት-ፓር-የግል-ተሟጋቾችን እና የፍርድን ማሻሻል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተለየ ሁኔታ፣ አንድ መንገድ ከሌላው መግቢያ ጋር በተለየ መረጃዎችን ከመተያየት ፋንታ ፋንታ፣ መጀመሪያ በተሰጠው መግቢያ ሁለት ሁለት መካከል ቀጥተኛ ለመተካከል ማስታወቂያውን ለመተረጉም እናስመክራለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎች የዛፍ ሥርዓት ከሚጠቀምበት ከአብዛኞቹ ሥርዓቶች ይልቅ የተሻለ ነው፣ እናም ለሌሎቹ የዓላማ ሥርዓት ይተካከላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը առաջարկում է կատարել բնական լեզվի եզրակացությունը բառերի-զույգերի-կախվածության-եզրակացությունների հետ: Անցյալ ԴՆԹ-ով հիմնված մոտեցումների մեծ մասը կամ անտեսում է բառերի սինտակտիկ կախվածությունը, կամ անմիջապես օգտագործում է ծառի LSMT-ը նախադասությունների ներկայացման ստեղծման համար անկարևոր տեղեկատվությամբ: Առաջին նշված խնդիրներին հաղթահարելու համար մենք ընդունում ենք բառերի-զույգերի-կախվածության-եռանկյուններ, որպեսզի բարելավենք համապատասխանությունը և հետևանքները: Իրականում, համեմատելու փոխարեն մեկ հատվածից յուրաքանչյուր երեք անգամ մյուս հատվածի համակցված տեղեկատվության հետ, մենք առաջին անգամ առաջարկում ենք կատարել համեմատություն անմիջապես տվյալ հատվածի երկու անգամ, որպեսզի դատողությունը ավելի հասկանալի դարձնի: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումների արդյունքը ավելի լավ է, քան ծառերի կառուցվածքների մեծ մասը, և համեմատություն ունի այլ բարձրագույն մոտեցումների հետ:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets ilə təbiətli dil xəstəliyini təyin edir. Əvvəlki DNN-tərəfində olanların çoxu sintaktik bağlılığı sözlərin arasında yada ağac-LSTM istifadə etmək üçün cümlələr tərəfindən möhtac məlumatları yaratmaq üçün istifadə edir. Yuxarıda deyilən problemlərin üstünə gəlməsi üçündür, biz hərəkət və düzəltmə hökmünü düzəltmək üçün Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets qəbul edirik. Əslində, hər üçlüyü bir keçmişdən başqa keçmişin birləşdirilmiş məlumatları ilə qarşılaşdırmaq yerinə, ilk dəfə verdiyimiz üçlüyün arasında qarşılaşdırmağı təklif edirik ki, hökmü daha çox yorumlaşdırmaq üçün. Müxtəlif sonuçlarımız ağac yapılarından istifadə edən yaxınlıqların çoxundan daha yaxşıdır və digər mövcuddur yaxınlıqlarına bənzəyir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার আক্রান্তির প্রস্তাব প্রদান করেছে শব্দ-পায়ের-নির্ভরিত-ত্রিপলেট। বেশীর ভিত্তিক ডিএনএন-ভিত্তিক উপেক্ষা করে অথবা শব্দের মধ্যে সিন্ট্যাকটিক নির্ভর করা অথবা সরাসরি ব্যবহার করে বাক্যের প্রতিনিধিত্বে উপরে উল্লেখিত সমস্যাগুলোকে জয়ী করার জন্য আমরা শব্দ-পায়ের-নির্ভর-ত্রিপলেট নিয়ে যাচ্ছি যাতে প্রতিযোগিতা এবং নির্য নির্দিষ্ট প্রত্যেকটি ত্রিবারের পরিবর্তে অন্য প্যাসেজের একত্রিত তথ্যের সাথে তুলনা করার পরিবর্তে আমরা প্রথমে প্রস্তাব করি প্রদান করা পাসপেজ জ জোড়ার মধ্য পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার প্রদর্শনীর প্রভাব বেশীরভাগ উপায়ের চেয়ে ভাল, যা গাছের কাঠামো ব্যবহার করে এবং অন্যান', 'sq': 'This paper proposes to perform natural language inference with Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets.  Shumica e qasjeve të mëparshme të bazuara në DNN ose injorojnë varësinë sintaktike midis fjalëve, ose përdorin drejtpërdrejt drurin-LSTM për të gjeneruar përfaqësimin e fjalëve me informacion të panjohur. Për të kapërcyer problemet e përmendura më lart, ne miratojmë Word-Pair-Dependence-Triplets për të përmirësuar rregullimin dhe gjykimin e inferencës. Për të qenë specifik, në vend që të krahasojmë çdo trefisht nga një pasazh me informacionin e përbashkët të një pasazhi tjetër, ne së pari propozojmë të bëjmë krahasim drejtpërdrejt midis trefishtave të pasazhit të dhënë-çiftit për të bërë gjykimin më të interpretueshëm. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se performanca e qasjes sonë është më e mirë se shumica e qasjeve që përdorin strukturat e pemëve dhe është e krahasueshme me qasjet e tjera më të larta.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže da izvrši prirodnu jezičku infekciju sa Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets. Većina prethodnih pristupa na DNN-u ili ignorira sintaktičku zavisnost među riječima, ili direktno koristi drvo-LSTM kako bi stvorila predstavu rečenica sa neovisnim informacijama. Da bi se poboljšali problemi spomenuti iznad toga, usvojili smo riječi-par-ovisnosti-tripleti kako bi poboljšali sud o usklađivanju i infekciji. Da bismo bili specifični, umjesto uspoređivanja svakog trostrukog putovanja iz jednog prolaza sa ujedinjenim informacijama o drugom prolazu, prvo predlažemo da izvedemo usporedbu direktno između trostruka određenog putovanja parova kako bi sudjenje učinilo većom interpretacijom. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je učinkovito našeg pristupa bolje od većine pristupa koje koriste strukture drveta i usporedno sa drugim pristupima umjetnosti.', 'ca': 'Aquest paper propon fer una inferència natural de llenguatgeamb Word-Pair-Dependence-Triplets. La majoria dels enfocaments basats en DNN anteriors o ignoren la dependència sinàctica entre paraules, o utilitzen directament l\'arbre-LSTM per generar representació de frases amb informació irrelevant. Per superar els problemes mencionats més endavant, adoptem "Word-Pair-Dependence-Triplets" per millorar l\'allinjament i el judici de inferència. Per ser específic, en lloc de comparar cada triplet d\'un passatge amb la informació fusionada d\'un altre passatge, primer proposem fer comparació directa entre els triplets del parell de passatge dada per fer el judici més interpretable. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el rendiment del nostre enfocament és millor que la majoria dels enfocaments que utilitzen estructures d\'arbres, i és comparable a altres enfocaments d\'última edat.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis tehakse ettepanek teha looduskeele järeldusi sõna-paar-sõltuvus-kolmikutega. Enamik varasemaid DNN-põhiseid lähenemisviise kas ignoreerivad sõnade süntaktilist sõltuvust või kasutavad otse puu-LSTM-i lauseesituse genereerimiseks ebaolulise teabega. Eespool nimetatud probleemide lahendamiseks võtame kasutusele sõna-paar-sõltuvus-kolmikud, et parandada vastavust ja järeldusotsuseid. Täpsemalt, selle asemel, et võrrelda iga kolmikut ühest lõigust ühendatud teabega teisest lõigust, teeme esmalt ettepaneku teha võrdlus otse kolmekesi antud läbipääs-paar, et muuta otsus tõlgendatavamaks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis on parem kui enamik puustruktuure kasutavatest lähenemisviisidest ning on võrreldav teiste kaasaegsete lähenemisviisidega.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan luonnollisen kielen päättelyä Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplets -kolmikkosilla. Useimmat aiemmat DNN-pohjaiset lähestymistavat joko sivuuttavat sanojen syntaktisen riippuvuuden tai käyttävät puun LSTM-menetelmää lauseiden esittämiseen epäolennaisilla tiedoilla. Edellä mainittujen ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi otamme käyttöön Word-Pair-Dependency-Tripletit, joilla parannetaan yhdenmukaisuutta ja päättelyä. Tarkemmin sanottuna sen sijaan, että vertailtaisiin jokaista kolmikkoa yhdestä kohdasta toiseen yhdistettyyn informaatioon, ehdotamme ensin, että suoritetaan vertailu suoraan tietyn kulkuparin kolmikkojen välillä, jotta tuomio olisi helpompi tulkita. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että toimintamme suorituskyky on parempi kuin useimmat puurakenteita käyttävät toimintamallit, ja se on verrattavissa muihin viimeisimpiin lähestymistapoihin.', 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje provést inferenci přirozeného jazyka pomocí Word-Pair-Dependency-Tripletů. Většina předchozích přístupů založených na DNN buď ignoruje syntaktickou závislost mezi slovy, nebo přímo používá strom-LSTM k generování reprezentace věty s irelevantními informacemi. Pro překonání výše zmíněných problémů přijímáme Word-Pair-Dependency-Triplety, abychom zlepšili zarovnání a odhadování. Abychom byli konkrétnější, místo porovnání každého trojčata z jedné pasáže se sloučenými informacemi z jiné pasáže, nejprve navrhujeme provést srovnání přímo mezi trojčaty daného pasážového páru, aby byl úsudek interpretovatelnější. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že výkonnost našeho přístupu je lepší než většina přístupů využívajících stromové struktury a je srovnatelná s ostatními moderními přístupy.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun yana bukãtar da yin tafiyar da harshen asiyya da word-Pair-DeDeputy-Treffs. Babu mafi yawan hanyor DNN da aka riga, ko kuma ka ƙẽtare tsarin syntactic a tsakanin magana, ko ka yi amfani da duran-LSM don ya sami tsarin maganar da kuma ma'abũcin gaske. To domin ta rinjãye masu fitina da aka faɗa a kan kowanka, sai mu zãɓi maganar-Pair-Deputanci-Summari dõmin ya kyautata hukuncin sigarin da kuma hani. To, wa'ana da ƙayyade, musamman kõwane nau'i daga wata hanya da shirin haɗiya information na wani tafarki, za'a buƙata farkon da za'a sami daidai a tsakanin nau'in da aka bai wa tafarki don ya fi fassara. Matarin jarrabai na nũna cewa aikin hanyarmu ne mafiya alhẽri daga mafiya yawan hanyõyi wanda ke amfani da matsayin itãce, kuma yana kamfata da misãlai na musamman.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predlaga izvedbo sklepanja naravnega jezika z besedno-par-odvisnostjo-trojčki. Večina prejšnjih pristopov, ki temeljijo na DNN, bodisi ignorira sintaktično odvisnost med besedami ali neposredno uporablja drevesno LSTM za ustvarjanje stavkov z nepomembnimi informacijami. Da bi premagali zgoraj omenjene težave, sprejmemo besedno-par-odvisnost-trojčke za izboljšanje usklajenosti in sklepne presoje. Če smo natančni, namesto da primerjamo vsak trojček iz enega odlomka z združenimi informacijami drugega odlomka, najprej predlagamo izvedbo primerjave neposredno med trojčki danega par prehodov, da bi bila presoja bolj razložljiva. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je uspešnost našega pristopa boljša od večine pristopov, ki uporabljajo drevesne strukture, in je primerljiva z drugimi najsodobnejšimi pristopi.', 'jv': 'Gambar iki supoya nggawe luwih dumadhi kanggo kelas nggawe Word-Pair-Dehensik-Triplits. User text-tool-action Bilih perusahaan, sane nambah tanggal saben pasar iki dadi pasar iki bakal kelas informasi sing beraksi perusahaan, awak dhéwé suwek nggawe ngubah dilakon karo perusahaan langkung sampek karo aturan pasar iki dadi bisa pasar iki dadi bisa ngubah perusahaan langkung sampek. Refangisi sing paling nggambar kuwi nggawe akeh adhek luwih apik sing luwih apik kanggo nganggo sampeyan iki dadi iki, lan sumelang karo perusahaan sugih sing sumelang kanggo kalah-perusahaan langkung sampeyan.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་དེ་ལ་རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བྱེད་ནུས་ཡོད། སྔོན་གྱི་DNN་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་ཕན་ཚུལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡིན་ནའང་མིན་འདུག འོག་གི་ལག་ལས་སྐོར་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོར་དུ་བཏོན་གཏོང་ན། ང་ཚོས་གསལ་པ་-Pair-Dependency དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པར་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་གཡུལ་སྐོར་ལས་རེ་བ་གཅིག་གི་བརྒྱུད་སྐོར་བྱེད་མི་འདུག Experimental Results show that the performance of our approach is better than the approaches of tree structures that use the most of them. It is comparable to other state-of-the-art approaches.', 'he': 'העיתון הזה מציע לבצע הוצאה שפה טבעית עם מילים-זוג-תלויות-משולשים. רוב הגישויים הקודמים מבוססים על DNN או להתעלם מהתלויה סינטקטית בין מילים, או להשתמש ישירות בעץ-LSTM כדי ליצור מייצג משפטים עם מידע לא רלוונטי. כדי להתגבר על הבעיות שזכירו למעלה, אנו מאמצים מילים-זוג-תלויות-משולשים כדי לשפר את התאמה ושיפוט המסקנה. כדי להיות ספציפיים, במקום להשוות כל שלישית ממעבר אחד עם המידע המזויף של מעבר אחר, אנו קודם מציעים לבצע השוואה ישירות בין שלישיות של זוג המעבר הנתון כדי להפוך את השיפוט יותר ניתן לפרש. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהביצועים של הגישה שלנו טובים יותר מרוב הגישות שמשתמשות במבנות עצים, והם שווים לגישות חדשות אחרות.'}
{'en': 'Adversarial Feature Adaptation for Cross-lingual Relation Classification', 'ar': 'تكيف ميزة الخصومة لتصنيف العلاقات عبر اللغات', 'fr': 'Adaptation des caractéristiques contradictoires pour la classification des relations interlinguistiques', 'es': 'Adaptación de características contradictorias para la clasificación de relaciones multilingües', 'pt': 'Adaptação de Recurso Adversarial para Classificação de Relação Cruzada', 'ja': 'クロスリンガルリレーションシップ分類のための対立的特徴の適応', 'zh': '语言分类者对抗性特徵自适', 'ru': 'Адаптация особенностей соперника для классификации межъязыковых отношений', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए प्रतिकूल सुविधा अनुकूलन', 'ga': "Oiriúnú Gné Sárósta d'Aicmiú Caidrimh Thrastheangach", 'ka': 'კონსპერსალური შესახებ კლასიფიკაციის კონსპერსალური შესახებ', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή αντιγλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών για την ταξινόμηση των διασταυρούμενων σχέσεων', 'it': 'Adattamento della caratteristica avversaria per la classificazione delle relazioni interlinguistiche', 'kk': 'Тілді қатынастар классификациясының конверсариялық қасиеттер адаптациясы', 'lt': 'Prieštaringo pobūdžio pritaikymas tarpkalbinių santykių klasifikacijai', 'hu': 'Ellenszármazási jellemzők adaptációja a többnyelvű kapcsolatok osztályozásához', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷ വിലാസത്തിനുള്ള വിശേഷത്തിനുള്ള മുന്നറിയിപ്പുള്ള വിശേഷതകള്\u200d', 'mk': 'Адаптација на непријатната карактеристика за класификација на меѓујазичните односи', 'mn': 'Дөрвөн хэл харилцааны классификацийн тусламжлалт боломжтой адаптация', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Feature Berlawan untuk Klasifikasi Hubungan Salib-Bahasa', 'mt': 'Adversarial Feature Adaptation for Cross-lingual Relation Classification', 'no': 'Adversarial Feature Adaptation for Cross-language Relation Classification', 'si': 'Name', 'pl': 'Adaptacja cech przeciwnych dla klasyfikacji relacji między językami', 'ro': 'Adaptarea caracteristicilor adverse pentru clasificarea relațiilor interlingve', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha iskuulka luuqadaha iskuulka', 'sr': 'Adversarial Feature Adaptation for Cross-lingual Relation Classification', 'ta': 'க்ராஸ்- மொழி தொடர்பு வகைப்புக்கான முன்னேற்பட்ட பண்புகள் Adaptation', 'ur': 'Cross-lingual Relations Classification کے لئے مخالف فرصت اڈپٹیٹ', 'sv': 'Anpassning av negativa egenskaper för klassificering av korspråkiga relationer', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cách định hướng vật lý lạ đối với phân biệt ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Адаптация на нежеланата характеристика за класификация на междуезичната връзка', 'hr': 'Adaptacija oporučnih funkcija za klasifikaciju međujezičkih odnosa', 'nl': 'Aanpassing van nadelige kenmerken voor de classificatie van cross-lingual relaties', 'da': 'Tilpasning af advarselstræk til klassificering af tværsprogede relationer', 'id': 'Adversarial Feature Adaptation for Cross-lingual Relation Classification', 'de': 'Anpassung von Adversarialen Merkmalen für die Klassifizierung von Cross-Lingual Relations', 'ko': '다중 언어 관계 분류 중의 대항적 특징 적응', 'fa': 'Adaptation of Adversarial Feature for Cross-lingual Relations Classification', 'tr': 'Duruz Diller Nişanlary Sözleşirmek üçin Nusgala Etkinlik Görniş Opşenleri', 'sw': 'Tamko za Tamko za Zaidi kwa Kuhusiana na lugha', 'sq': 'Përpërshtatje kundërshtare për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve ndërgjuhësore', 'af': 'Adversariale Feature Adaptation for Cross-language Relations Classification', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Ã‡oxlu Dil Ä°liÅŸkilÉ™ri KlasifikasiyasÄ±', 'hy': 'Խոսքերի միջլեզվային հարաբերությունների դասակարգման հակառակ հատկությունը', 'bs': 'Adversarial Feature Adaptation for Cross-lingual Relation Classification', 'bn': 'ক্রস- ভাষাভাষী সম্পর্কের জন্য পূর্ববর্তী বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'cs': 'Adaptace nepříznivých vlastností pro klasifikaci vztahů mezi jazyky', 'et': 'Kõrvaltoimete kohandamine keeleüleste suhete klassifikatsiooni jaoks', 'ca': 'Adaptació adversaria de la característica per la classificació de relacions translingües', 'fi': 'Haittavaikutuksen sopeutuminen kielirajat ylittävään suhteeseen', 'jv': 'Adverrial Attribution Adjustment for', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Prilagoditev neželenih značilnosti za razvrstitev medjezikovnih odnosov', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་བསྡུས་ཅན་གྱི་ཁྲོད་ཆེན་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བཅོས།', 'he': 'שינוי אופייני נגד שינוי יחסים בין שפות'}
{'en': 'Relation Classification aims to classify the semantic relationship between two marked entities in a given sentence. It plays a vital role in a variety of natural language processing applications. Most existing methods focus on exploiting mono-lingual data, e.g., in English, due to the lack of annotated data in other languages. In this paper, we come up with a feature adaptation approach for cross-lingual relation classification, which employs a generative adversarial network (GAN) to transfer feature representations from one language with rich annotated data to another language with scarce annotated data. Such a feature adaptation approach enables feature imitation via the competition between a relation classification network and a rival discriminator. Experimental results on the ACE 2005 multilingual training corpus, treating English as the source language and Chinese the target, demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach, yielding an improvement of 5.7 % over the state-of-the-art.', 'ar': 'يهدف تصنيف العلاقة إلى تصنيف العلاقة الدلالية بين كيانين مميزين في جملة معينة. إنها تلعب دورًا حيويًا في مجموعة متنوعة من تطبيقات معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. تركز معظم الأساليب الحالية على استغلال البيانات أحادية اللغة ، على سبيل المثال ، باللغة الإنجليزية ، بسبب نقص البيانات المشروحة بلغات أخرى. في هذه الورقة ، توصلنا إلى نهج تكيف الميزة لتصنيف العلاقات عبر اللغات ، والذي يستخدم شبكة خصومة توليدية (GAN) لنقل تمثيلات الميزات من لغة واحدة ببيانات مشروحة غنية إلى لغة أخرى ذات بيانات مشروحة نادرة. يتيح نهج تكييف الميزة هذا تقليد الميزة عبر المنافسة بين شبكة تصنيف العلاقة ومميز منافس. النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة ACE 2005 التدريبية متعددة اللغات ، والتي تعامل اللغة الإنجليزية كلغة المصدر والصينية هي الهدف ، تثبت فعالية نهجنا المقترح ، مما أدى إلى تحسن بنسبة 5.7٪ عن أحدث التقنيات.', 'es': 'La clasificación de relaciones tiene como objetivo clasificar la relación semántica entre dos entidades marcadas en una oración dada. Desempeña un papel vital en una variedad de aplicaciones de procesamiento de lenguaje natural. La mayoría de los métodos existentes se centran en aprovechar los datos monolingües, por ejemplo, en inglés, debido a la falta de datos anotados en otros idiomas. En este artículo, presentamos un enfoque de adaptación de características para la clasificación de relaciones multilingües, que emplea una red generativa de adversarios (GAN) para transferir representaciones de entidades de un idioma con datos anotados enriquecidos a otro idioma con escasos datos anotados. Este enfoque de adaptación de características permite la imitación de características a través de la competencia entre una red de clasificación de relaciones y un discriminador rival. Los resultados experimentales del corpus de capacitación multilingüe de ACE 2005, que tratan el inglés como idioma de origen y el chino como el objetivo, demuestran la eficacia de nuestro enfoque propuesto, con una mejora del 5,7% con respecto al estado de la técnica.', 'fr': "La classification des relations vise à classer la relation sémantique entre deux entités marquées dans une phrase donnée. Il joue un rôle essentiel dans diverses applications de traitement du langage naturel. La plupart des méthodes existantes se concentrent sur l'exploitation de données unilingues, par exemple en anglais, en raison du manque de données annotées dans d'autres langues. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche d'adaptation de caractéristiques pour la classification des relations interlinguales, qui utilise un réseau antagoniste génératif (GAN) pour transférer des représentations de caractéristiques d'un langage avec des données annotées riches vers un autre langage avec des données annotées rares. Une telle approche d'adaptation de caractéristiques permet d'imiter des caractéristiques via la concurrence entre un réseau de classification de relations et un discriminateur rival. Les résultats expérimentaux du corpus de formation multilingue ACE 2005, traitant l'anglais comme langue source et le chinois comme cible, démontrent l'efficacité de notre approche proposée, avec une amélioration de 5,7\xa0% par rapport à la technologie de pointe.", 'pt': 'A Classificação de Relação tem como objetivo classificar a relação semântica entre duas entidades marcadas em uma determinada sentença. Ele desempenha um papel vital em uma variedade de aplicativos de processamento de linguagem natural. A maioria dos métodos existentes se concentra na exploração de dados monolíngues, por exemplo, em inglês, devido à falta de dados anotados em outros idiomas. Neste artigo, apresentamos uma abordagem de adaptação de recursos para classificação de relações entre idiomas, que emprega uma rede adversarial generativa (GAN) para transferir representações de recursos de um idioma com dados anotados ricos para outro idioma com dados anotados escassos. Tal abordagem de adaptação de características permite a imitação de características através da competição entre uma rede de classificação de relações e um discriminador rival. Resultados experimentais no corpus de treinamento multilíngue do ACE 2005, tratando o inglês como idioma de origem e o chinês como destino, demonstram a eficácia da abordagem proposta, gerando uma melhoria de 5,7% em relação ao estado da arte.', 'ja': '関係分類は、与えられた文の2つのマークされたエンティティ間の意味関係を分類することを目的としています。 様々な自然言語処理アプリケーションで重要な役割を果たしています。 ほとんどの既存の方法は、他の言語での注釈付きデータの欠如のために、例えば英語での単一言語データの利用に焦点を当てている。 本稿では，豊富な注釈付きデータを持つ一つの言語から乏しい注釈付きデータを持つ別の言語へ特徴表現を転送するために生成対抗ネットワーク（ GAN ）を用いる，クロスリンガル関係分類の特徴適応アプローチを考案した． このような特徴適応アプローチは、関係分類ネットワークとライバル識別子との間の競合を介して特徴模倣を可能にする。 ACE 2005多言語トレーニングコーパスの実験結果は、英語をソース言語、中国語をターゲットとして扱い、提案されたアプローチの有効性を示しており、最先端のアプローチよりも5.7 ％改善しています。', 'zh': '类指给定句中两标实体语义类也。 在诸自然语言应用程序中起至重之用也。 多见法侧重于用单语数,如英语,以无他语注数也。 本文,我们发出一种跨言语分类的特征自适方法,该法用生成抗抗网络(GAN)将特征表示从有丰厚注数的言语传输到有稀缺注数的另一种语言。 应法以类网络与竞争对手鉴别器争效。 ACE 2005多言培训语料库之实验结果表明,以英语为源言,以中文为的,吾道之有效性,贤于今5.7%矣。', 'hi': 'संबंध वर्गीकरण का उद्देश्य किसी दिए गए वाक्य में दो चिह्नित संस्थाओं के बीच शब्दार्थ संबंध को वर्गीकृत करना है। यह प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण अनुप्रयोगों की एक किस्म में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। अधिकांश मौजूदा तरीके अन्य भाषाओं में एनोटेट डेटा की कमी के कारण, अंग्रेजी में मोनो-भाषी डेटा का शोषण करने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, उदाहरण के लिए, अंग्रेजी में। इस पेपर में, हम क्रॉस-लिंगुअल रिलेशन क्लासिफिकेशन के लिए एक फीचर अनुकूलन दृष्टिकोण के साथ आते हैं, जो दुर्लभ एनोटेट डेटा के साथ दूसरी भाषा में समृद्ध एनोटेटेड डेटा के साथ एक भाषा से फीचर प्रतिनिधित्व को स्थानांतरित करने के लिए एक उत्पादक प्रतिकूल नेटवर्क (जीएएन) को नियोजित करता है। इस तरह की एक सुविधा अनुकूलन दृष्टिकोण एक संबंध वर्गीकरण नेटवर्क और एक प्रतिद्वंद्वी भेदभावकर्ता के बीच प्रतियोगिता के माध्यम से सुविधा नकल को सक्षम बनाता है। एसीई 2005 बहुभाषी प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पस पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम, अंग्रेजी को स्रोत भाषा और चीनी लक्ष्य के रूप में मानते हुए, हमारे प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, जिससे अत्याधुनिक पर 5.7% का सुधार होता है।', 'ru': 'Классификация отношений направлена на классификацию семантических отношений между двумя помеченными сущностями в данном предложении. Он играет жизненно важную роль в различных приложениях для обработки естественного языка. Большинство существующих методов ориентированы на использование одноязычных данных, например на английском языке, из-за отсутствия аннотированных данных на других языках. В этой статье мы придумали подход к адаптации признаков для классификации межъязыковых отношений, который использует генеративную состязательную сеть (GAN) для переноса представлений признаков с одного языка с богатыми аннотированными данными на другой язык с скудными аннотированными данными. Такой подход к адаптации признаков позволяет имитировать признаки посредством конкуренции между сетью классификации отношений и соперничающим дискриминатором. Экспериментальные результаты по многоязычному учебному корпусу Ace 2005, рассматривающему английский язык в качестве исходного языка и китайский в качестве целевого, демонстрируют эффективность нашего предлагаемого подхода, что дает улучшение на 5,7% по сравнению с современным уровнем.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag Aicmiú Caidrimh an gaol shéimeantach idir dhá aonán mharcáilte in abairt ar leith a rangú. Tá ról ríthábhachtach aige in éagsúlacht feidhmeanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha. Díríonn an chuid is mó de na modhanna atá ann faoi láthair ar shaothrú sonraí aonteangacha, m.sh., i mBéarla, mar gheall ar easpa sonraí anótáilte i dteangacha eile. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid suas cur chuige um oiriúnú gné maidir le haicmiú caidrimh tras-teangacha, a úsáideann líonra sáraíochta ginideach (GAN) chun léiriúcháin gné a aistriú ó theanga amháin le sonraí saibhre anótáilte go teanga eile le sonraí anótáilte gann. Cumasaíonn cur chuige oiriúnaithe gnéithe dá leithéid bréige gné tríd an iomaíocht idir líonra aicmithe caidrimh agus idirdhealaitheoir iomaíoch. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar chorpas oiliúna ilteangach ACE 2005, a phléann leis an mBéarla mar an teanga fhoinseach agus an tSínis mar an sprioc, éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige molta, rud a thugann feabhas de 5.7% ar an stát is nua-aimseartha.', 'ka': 'Relative Classification aims to classify the semantic relationship between two marked entities in a given sentence. ის თავისუფალური პროლის განსხვავებულ სახლის პროცესის პროცესი. მნიშვნელოვანი მეთოდიები მონო-ენგური მონაცემების გამოყენებაზე, მაგალითად ანგლისურად, სხვა ენგურაში მონაცემები არსებობის გამოყენება. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია კლასიფიკაციის კონფიკაციისთვის ფუნქციური ადაპტიკაციის მიღება, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრებული ქსელი (GAN) გამოყენებს განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციები ერთი ენაზე განსაზღვრებული ანოტი ასეთი განსაზღვრებული აეპტიფიკაციის შესაძლებელია, რომელიც კონკრესიფიკაციის ქსელექტიკაციის შორის და კონკრესიმენტის დისკრესიმინატორის გამოყენება. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ACE 2005-ის მულტილენგური განსწავლების კორპუსზე, ანგლისური ენათი და ჩინეთის მიზეზი იყოს, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენული პროგენტის ეფექტიურობა, რომელიც 5,7% უფრო მეტი წარ', 'el': 'Η ταξινόμηση σχέσεων αποσκοπεί στην ταξινόμηση της σημασιολογικής σχέσης μεταξύ δύο σημαδεμένων οντοτήτων σε μια δεδομένη πρόταση. Παίζει ζωτικό ρόλο σε μια ποικιλία εφαρμογών επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Οι περισσότερες υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι επικεντρώνονται στην εκμετάλλευση μονογλωσσικών δεδομένων, π.χ. στα αγγλικά, λόγω της έλλειψης σχολιασμένων δεδομένων σε άλλες γλώσσες. Σε αυτή την εργασία, καταλήγουμε σε μια προσέγγιση προσαρμογής χαρακτηριστικών για την ταξινόμηση των γλωσσικών σχέσεων, η οποία χρησιμοποιεί ένα παραγωγικό αντίπαλο δίκτυο (GAN) για τη μεταφορά αναπαραστάσεων χαρακτηριστικών από μια γλώσσα με πλούσια σχολιασμένα δεδομένα σε μια άλλη γλώσσα με σπάνια σχολιασμένα δεδομένα. Μια τέτοια προσέγγιση προσαρμογής χαρακτηριστικών επιτρέπει την απομίμηση χαρακτηριστικών μέσω του ανταγωνισμού μεταξύ ενός δικτύου ταξινόμησης σχέσεων και ενός ανταγωνιστικού διακριτικού φορέα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στο πολύγλωσσο εκπαιδευτικό σώμα του ΑΚΕ 2005, που αντιμετωπίζει την αγγλική ως μητρική γλώσσα και τα κινέζικα ως στόχο, καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισής μας, επιτυγχάνοντας βελτίωση 5,7% σε σχέση με την σύγχρονη τεχνολογία.', 'lt': 'Santykių klasifikavimo tikslas – atskirame sakinyje klasifikuoti semantinius dviejų žymėtų subjektų santykius. It plays a vital role in a variety of natural language processing applications.  Most existing methods focus on exploiting mono-lingual data, e.g., in English, due to the lack of annotated data in other languages.  Šiame dokumente parengiame įvairiakalbių santykių klasifikavimo būdą pritaikyti savybes, pagal kurį naudojamas kartotinis prieštaringas tinklas (GAN), siekiant perduoti savybių atstovavimus iš vienos kalbos su turtingais anotuotais duomenimis į kitą kalbą su retais anotuotais duomenimis. Toks pritaikymo prie savybių metodas leidžia imituoti savybes konkurencija tarp santykių klasifikavimo tinklo ir konkuruojančio diskriminatoriaus. Eksperimentiniai ACE 2005 daugiakalbio mokymo korpuso rezultatai, kuriuose anglų kalba laikoma pradine kalba, o kinų kalba – tikslas, rodo mūsų siūlomo požiūrio veiksmingumą ir 5,7 proc. pagerėjo, palyginti su naujausia.', 'hu': 'A Relation Classification célja a két megjelölt entitás közötti szemantikai kapcsolat osztályozása egy adott mondatban. Alapvető szerepet játszik számos természetes nyelvfeldolgozó alkalmazásban. A legtöbb meglévő módszer az egynyelvű adatok kihasználására összpontosít, például angolul, mivel más nyelveken nincsenek jegyzetelt adatok. Ebben a tanulmányban előállítunk egy funkcióadaptációs megközelítést a többnyelvű kapcsolatok osztályozásához, amely egy generációs ellenfél hálózatot (GAN) alkalmaz a funkcióreprezentációk átvitelére egy nyelvről gazdag jegyzetelt adatokkal egy másik nyelvre, kevés jegyzetelt adatokkal. Az ilyen jellemzői adaptációs megközelítés lehetővé teszi a jellemzők utánzását a kapcsolatosztályozási hálózat és a rivális diszkriminatív verseny révén. Az ACE 2005 többnyelvű képzési korpusz kísérleti eredményei, amelyek az angol nyelvet és a kínai nyelvet kezelik, igazolják javasolt megközelítésünk hatékonyságát, és 5,7%-os javulást eredményeznek a korszerűséghez képest.', 'it': "Relation Classification mira a classificare la relazione semantica tra due entità marcate in una data frase. Svolge un ruolo fondamentale in una varietà di applicazioni di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. La maggior parte dei metodi esistenti si concentra sullo sfruttamento di dati monolingue, ad esempio in inglese, a causa della mancanza di dati annotati in altre lingue. In questo articolo, elaboriamo un approccio di adattamento delle caratteristiche per la classificazione delle relazioni cross-lingual, che utilizza una rete avversaria generativa (GAN) per trasferire rappresentazioni di funzionalità da una lingua con ricchi dati annotati ad un'altra lingua con scarsi dati annotati. Tale approccio di adattamento delle caratteristiche consente l'imitazione delle caratteristiche attraverso la concorrenza tra una rete di classificazione delle relazioni e un discriminatore rivale. I risultati sperimentali sul corpus di formazione multilingue ACE 2005, trattando l'inglese come lingua di partenza e il cinese come obiettivo, dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro approccio proposto, ottenendo un miglioramento del 5,7% rispetto allo stato dell'arte.", 'kk': 'Қатыс классификациясы келтірілген сөйлемеде екі белгіленген нысандар арасындағы семантикалық қатынасын классификациялау мақсаты. Бұл табиғи тілдерді өңдеу қолданбаларында маңызды роль орындайды. Бұл әдістердің көпшілігі монотілік деректерді, мысалы, ағылшын тілінде, басқа тілдерде белгіленген деректер жоқ себебімен қолданылады. Бұл қағазда біз тілдерді бірнеше тілдерге қатынау сәйкестігінің өзгерту тәсілігін таптық. Бұл қағаздың құрамындағы қатынау желі (GAN) құрамындағы қатынау тәсілігін бір тілден бірнеше тілден жаңалық мә Бұл мүмкіндік адаптациялау тәртібі сәйкестік желі мен қарсы дискриминатор арасындағы конкурс арқылы мүмкіндіктерді көтеруге мүмкіндік береді. ACE 2005 жылы көптілік оқыту корпусының эксперименталдық нәтижелері, ағылшын тілі және қытайлық тілі мақсатты болып қалады. Біздің ұсынылған тәсіліміздің ең әсер етілігін көрсетеді. Біздің оқыту к', 'mk': 'Класификацијата на односите има за цел класификација на семантичниот однос помеѓу двата означени ентитети во одредена реченица. Игра важна улога во различни природни апликации за обработување јазици. Повеќето постоечки методи се фокусираат на искористувањето на монојазични податоци, на пример на англиски, поради недостатокот на анотирани податоци на други јазици. In this paper, we come up with a feature adaptation approach for cross-lingual relation classification, which employs a generative adversarial network (GAN) to transfer feature representations from one language with rich annotated data to another language with scarce annotated data.  Таков пристап за адаптација на карактеристиките овозможува имитација на карактеристиките преку натпреварот помеѓу мрежата за класификација на односите и ривалниот дискриминатор. Експерименталните резултати на Мултијазичниот обукен корпус АЦЕ 2005, кој го третира англискиот како изворен јазик и кинескиот јазик како цел, ја демонстрираат ефикасноста на нашиот предложен пристап, предизвикувајќи подобрување од 5,7 отсто во однос на најсовремената', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Hubungan bermaksud untuk klasifikasikan hubungan semantik antara dua entiti ditandai dalam kalimat tertentu. Ia bermain peran penting dalam pelbagai aplikasi pemprosesan bahasa alam. Kebanyakan kaedah yang ada fokus pada mengeksploitasi data monobahasa, cth. dalam bahasa Inggeris, kerana kekurangan data yang dicatat dalam bahasa lain. Dalam kertas ini, kami datang dengan pendekatan penyesuaian fitur untuk klasifikasi hubungan saling bahasa, yang menggunakan rangkaian musuh generatif (GAN) untuk memindahkan perwakilan fitur dari satu bahasa dengan data annotasi kaya ke bahasa lain dengan data annotasi jarang. Pencapaian penyesuaian ciri seperti ini membolehkan imitasi ciri melalui persaingan antara rangkaian klasifikasi hubungan dan diskriminator lawan. Hasil percubaan pada korpus latihan berbilang bahasa ACE 2005, memperlakukan bahasa Inggeris sebagai bahasa sumber dan bahasa Cina sasaran, menunjukkan keefektivitas pendekatan kami yang direncanakan, memberikan peningkatan 5.7% daripada keadaan terbaik.', 'no': 'Relasjonsklassifikasjonen må klassifisera semantiske forhold mellom to markerte einingar i eit gitt setning. Det spelar ein viktig rolle i fleire naturspråkprogrammer. Dei fleste eksisterande metodane fokuserer på å bruka monospråk-data, f.eks. på engelsk, på grunn av manglende data i andre språk. I denne papiret kom vi opp med ein tilpassingstilnærming for krysspråksrelasjonsklassifikasjon, som brukar ein generert adversarial nettverk (GAN) for å overføra funksjonsrepresentasjonar frå ein språk med rike annoterarte data til ein annan språk med kraftig annoterarte data. Desse funksjonstilnærminga gjer funksjonsimitasjon gjennom konkurransen mellom eit relasjonsklassifikasjon- nettverk og eit rivalsk diskriminator. Eksperimentale resultat på ACE 2005 er fleirspråksøvingskorpus, som behandler engelsk som kjeldespråk og kinesisk målet, som viser effektiviteten av vår foreslått tilnærming, og gjer at det er forbedra 5,7 % over kunsttilstanden.', 'mt': 'Il-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet għandha l-għan li tikklassifika r-relazzjoni semantika bejn żewġ entitajiet immarkati f’sentenza partikolari. Għandha rwol vitali f’varjetà ta’ applikazzjonijiet għall-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi e żistenti jiffukaw fuq l-isfruttar tad-dejta monolingwistika, pereżempju bl-Ingliż, minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ dejta annotata f’lingwi oħra. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nħolqu approċċ ta’ adattament tal-karatteristiċi għall-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet translingwi, li jimpjega netwerk avversarju ġenerattiv (GAN) biex jittrasferixxi rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-karatteristiċi minn lingwa waħda b’dejta annotata rikka għal lingwa oħra b’dejta annotata skarsa. Approċċ ta’ adattament ta’ karatteristiċi bħal dan jippermetti imitazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi permezz tal-kompetizzjoni bejn netwerk ta’ klassifikazzjoni ta’ relazzjoni u diskriminatur rivali. Riżultati esperimentali dwar il-korpus ta’ taħriġ multilingwi ACE 2005, li jittratta l-Ingliż bħala l-lingwa tas-sors u ċ-Ċiniż bħala l-mira, juru l-effettività tal-approċċ propost tagħna, u dan iwassal għal titjib ta’ 5.7% fuq l-aktar avvanzat.', 'ml': 'കൊടുത്ത വാക്കില്\u200d രണ്ടു അടയാളപ്പെട്ട വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കുവാന്\u200d വേണ സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d അത് ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പങ്കാളിയാണ്. Most existing methods focus on exploiting mono-lingual data, e.g., in English, due to the lack of annotated data in other languages.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ക്രില്\u200dലിങ്കല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പ്രത്യേക വിശിഷ്ടമായ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് വന്നിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു ജനററിവ് എതിരാളിയുള്ള നെറ്റ ഇതുപോലുള്ള ഒരു വിശേഷപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നത് ഒരു ബന്ധപ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കും ഒരു എത എസിഇ 2005 മുള്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d, ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷ, ചൈനീസിനെയും പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സാധ്', 'mn': 'Хариултын классификацийн зорилго нь өгөгдсөн өгүүлбэрт хоёр загварын хоорондын семантик харилцааныг ангилах зорилго юм. Энэ нь олон байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэх хэрэгсэлд чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Ихэнх сургалтын арга нь моно хэл өгөгдлийг ашиглах, жишээ нь Англи хэл, бусад хэлбэрүүдийн мэдээлэл байхгүй учраас анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний харилцааны олон хэлний харилцааны хуваалцааны тусламжтай адилтгалын арга зам гаргаж ирсэн. Энэ нь маш баян мэдээлэл өгөгдлийг нэг хэлээс өөр хэл руу шилжүүлэх боломжтой эсрэг сүлжээ (GAN) ашигладаг. Ийм шинжлэх ухааны арга барилга нь харилцааны хуваалцааны сүлжээ болон эсрэг бусдын ялгаагчийн хоорондын өрсөлдөөнийг ашиглах боломжтой болгодог. 2005 оны ACE-ын олон хэлний сургалтын корпус болон Англи хэл болон Хятад хэлний зорилго гэдэг туршилтын үр дүнд бидний санал өгсөн арга замын үр дүнг харуулж, урлагийн хувьд 5.7% сайжруулж байна.', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja relacji ma na celu klasyfikację relacji semantycznej między dwoma oznaczonymi jednostkami w danym zdaniu. Odgrywa kluczową rolę w różnych aplikacjach przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Większość istniejących metod skupia się na wykorzystaniu danych jednojęzycznych, np. w języku angielskim, ze względu na brak adnotacji danych w innych językach. W niniejszym artykule opracowano podejście adaptacji cech do klasyfikacji relacji między językami, które wykorzystuje generatywną sieć przeciwniczą (GAN) do przenoszenia reprezentacji cech z jednego języka z bogatymi danymi adnotacyjnymi do innego języka z rzadkimi adnotacjami danych. Takie podejście do adaptacji cech umożliwia imitację cech poprzez konkurencję między siecią klasyfikacji relacji a konkurencyjnym dyskryminującym. Wyniki eksperymentalne dotyczące wielojęzycznego korpusu szkoleniowego ACE 2005, traktującego język językowy angielski jako język źródłowy i chiński jako cel, pokazują skuteczność proponowanego podejścia, przynoszącego poprawę 5,7% w stosunku do najnowocześniejszych technologii.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea relațiilor își propune să clasifice relația semantică dintre două entități marcate într-o anumită propoziție. Acesta joacă un rol vital într-o varietate de aplicații de procesare a limbajului natural. Cele mai multe metode existente se concentrează pe exploatarea datelor monolingve, de exemplu, în limba engleză, din cauza lipsei de date adnotate în alte limbi. În această lucrare, venim cu o abordare de adaptare a caracteristicilor pentru clasificarea relațiilor interlingve, care utilizează o rețea adversară generativă (GAN) pentru a transfera reprezentări caracteristici dintr-o limbă cu date adnotate bogate în altă limbă cu date adnotate rare. O astfel de abordare de adaptare a caracteristicilor permite imitarea caracteristicilor prin concurența dintre o rețea de clasificare a relațiilor și un discriminator rival. Rezultatele experimentale ale corpului de instruire multilingvă ACE 2005, tratând limba engleză ca limbă sursă și chineza ca țintă, demonstrează eficacitatea abordării propuse, obținând o îmbunătățire de 5,7% față de cea mai modernă tehnologie.', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija odnosa je cilj da klasifikuje semantičku vezu između dva označena entiteta u određenoj rečenici. To igra vitalnu ulogu u raznim prirodnim aplikacijama obrade jezika. Većina postojećih metoda se fokusira na korištenje monojezičkih podataka, na primjer na engleskom, zbog nedostatka annotiranih podataka na drugim jezicima. U ovom papiru smo smislili posebni pristup adaptacije za klasifikaciju međujezičkih odnosa, koji koristi generativnu neprijateljsku mrežu (GAN) da prenese predstave karakteristika iz jednog jezika sa bogatim annotiranim podacima na drugi jezik sa manjim annotiranim podacima. Takav pristup prilagodbi omogućava imitaciju karakteristika putem konkurencije između povezane klasifikacije mreže i rivalnog diskriminacija. Eksperimentalni rezultati multijezičkog treninga korpusa ACE 2005-a, tretirajući engleski kao izvorni jezik i kineski cilj, pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa, pružajući poboljšanje od 5,7% iznad države umjetnosti.', 'so': 'Xiriirka xiriirka waxaa loola jeedaa in uu ku qeybeeyo xiriirka lammaaniga ee u dhexeeya labo xafiisyo oo lagu qoray. Waxay leedahay qayb muhiim ah oo ku saabsan codsiyada baaraandegista luqada dabiicadda ah. Inta badan qaababka ay jiraan waxay ku kalsoonaadaan isticmaalka macluumaadka afka noocyada ah, tusaale ahaan ingiriisiga, sababtoo ah baahida macluumaadka qalabka kale e e la isticmaalay. Kanu warqaddan, waxaynu u imaanaynaa qaabab u bedelmaya fasalka xiriirka luuqadaha kala duduwan, kaasoo u shaqeeya shabakad generative cadaawayaal ah (GAN) si aan uga wareejinno noocyo-tirada ah luuqad hal luuqad ka soo wareejiyo taajir oo taajir ah oo loogu soo bandhigayo luuqad kale oo aad u baahan tahay macluumaad dhibaataysan. Dhaqdhaqaaqa u beddelashada waxyaabahaas waxay ku takoori karaan tartanka u dhexeeya shabakadda fasaxda iyo takoorida takoorida. Imtixaanka ku saabsan ACE 2005 koobashada waxbarashada luuqadaha kala duduwan, isticmaalka Ingiriiska sida afka asalka ah iyo Shiinaha, waxay muujiyaan effektada qaababka la soo jeeday, waxayna kordhisay boqolkiiba dowladda farshaxanka.', 'sv': 'Relationsklassificering syftar till att klassificera det semantiska förhållandet mellan två markerade entiteter i en given mening. Det spelar en viktig roll i en mängd olika naturliga språkbehandlingsapplikationer. De flesta befintliga metoder fokuserar på att utnyttja enspråkiga data, t.ex. på engelska, på grund av bristen på kommenterade data på andra språk. I denna uppsats kommer vi fram till en funktionsanpassning för korspråkig relationsklassificering, som använder ett generativt adversarial network (GAN) för att överföra funktionsrepresentationer från ett språk med rika kommenterade data till ett annat språk med knappa kommenterade data. Ett sådant tillvägagångssätt för funktionsanpassning möjliggör funktionsimitation genom konkurrensen mellan ett nätverk för relationsklassificering och en konkurrerande diskriminerare. Experimentella resultat på ACE 2005 flerspråkig utbildningscorpus, där engelska behandlas som källspråk och kinesiska som mål, visar på effektiviteten i vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt, vilket ger en förbättring på 5,7% jämfört med den senaste tekniken.', 'ta': 'கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியத்தில் இரண்டு குறிப்பிட்ட பொருட்களுக்கிடையில் இருந்து அரைப்புரிமையான இணைப்பை வக இது இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் பயன்பாடுகளில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங்கை விளையாடுகிறது. பெரும்பாலும் இருக்கும் முறைகளில் மோனோ- மொழி தரவை பயன்படுத்துவதை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது, உ. ம். ஆங்கிலத்தில், மற்ற மொழிகளில் க இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாங்கள் பல மொழி தொடர்பு வகைப்புக்கு ஒரு குணங்கள் ஒதுங்குப்பொருள் முறைமையாக வருகிறது, அது ஒரு பொதுவான எதிரிய பிரிவு வலைப்பின்னல் (GAN) பயன்படுத்து இது போன்ற ஒரு குணங்கள் ஒதுங்குப்பொருள் செயல்படுத்தும் தொடர்பு வகுப்பு பிணையத்திற்கும் பிணையத்திற்கும் இடையே போ ACE 2005 பல மொழி பயிற்சி குறியீட்டின் முடிவுகள், மூல மொழி மற்றும் சீனா என்று ஆங்கிலத்தை சிகிச்சை செய்யும், நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை கா', 'si': 'Name ඒක ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනයක් වගේ විවිධ භාවිතාවක් සැලසුම් කරනවා. ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ මොනෝ භාෂාවික දත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින්, අනිත් භාෂාවික වලින මේ පැත්තේ, අපි විශේෂ භාෂාත්මක සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සැකසුම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ඇත මෙහෙම විශේෂතාවක් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් සමග සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ ජාලය සහ සම්බන්ධ විශේෂකයෙන් සමග ACE 2005 ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කොර්පුස් වලට පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට, ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය භාෂා වලින් චීනි භාෂා වලින් ඉලක්ෂාව ව', 'ur': 'ارتباط کلاسیفٹ کا ارتباط ہے کہ دو مشرکین متحدوں کے درمیان ایک مجلس میں سیمنٹی رابطہ کا کلاسیفٹ کرے. یہ ایک مختلف طبیعی زبان پردازی کے अनुप्रयोग میں اہم رغم لگا رہا ہے۔ اکثر موجود طریقے موجود ہیں، مونو زبان کے ڈاکٹوں کو استعمال کرنے پر، مثال انگلیسی میں، دوسری زبانوں میں اظہار کئے ہوئے ڈاکٹوں کی ناکامی کے سبب۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک فرصت کے مطابق مختلف زبان کے ارتباط کلاسیفون کے لئے اضافہ طریقے کے ساتھ آئے ہیں، جو ایک زبان سے ایک فرصت کے مطابق مطابق کرتا ہے کہ ایک زبان سے ایک دوسری زبان میں کم دکھائی ہوئی ڈیٹا کے ساتھ ایک دوسری زبان میں مطابق مختلف اس طرح ایک اضافہ تقویم کی تقویم کے ذریعہ ایک رابطہ کلاسیکٹ نیٹ ورک اور ایک مقابلہ جدائی کرنے والے کے درمیان مسابلہ کے ذریعہ مشکلات کی تصویر کرتا ہے. ACE 2005 کے بہت سی زبان کی ترکینس کورپوس پر آزمائش کا نتیجہ، انگلیسی کو سراسر زبان اور چینی کا موقع بنا رہا ہے، ہماری پیشنهاد کی تقریبا کی تابعداری دکھاتا ہے، جو آهنگ کی حالت پر 5.7% کی سوداگری کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Sertifikat tafsilotlari Bu tabiiy tilni boshqarish dasturlarida juda muhim roli o'ylayapti. Most existing methods focus on exploiting mono-lingual data, e.g., in English, due to the lack of annotated data in other languages.  Bu qogʻozda biz bir tillar bilan bog'liq darajasini o'zgartirish imkoniyatini boshqa tillarda o'zgartirish imkoniyatini boshqa tillarda o'zgartirish mumkin. Bu bir tillardan yetarli raqamli tarmoq (GAN) qo'llab beradi. Bu bir tildan taʼminlov qiladigan ma'lumotlarni taʼminlovchi maʼlumotga Bu moslama tahrirlash usulini boshqarish tarmoqning tarmoq va rivojlanuvchi taʼminlovchisi orqali murojaat qiladi. ACE 2005 uchun ko'plab tillar o'rganish qo'shilgan natijalari, ingliz tili va Xitoycha kabi o'rganish natijalarini ko'rsatadi, yaxshi ko'paytuvchimizning chegarasining effektini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Thuyết tương ứng nhằm phân loại mối quan hệ ngữ pháp giữa hai thực thể được đánh dấu trong một câu. Nó đóng vai trò quan trọng trong nhiều ứng dụng xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Hầu hết các phương pháp có liên quan đến việc khai thác dữ liệu ngôn ngữ, ví dụ, bằng tiếng Anh, vì thiếu dữ liệu ghi chú ở các ngôn ngữ khác. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có một phương pháp chỉnh sửa đặc trưng cho phân loại liên quan ngôn ngữ khác nhau, nhờ đó có một mạng lưới phản nghịch tạo ra (GAN) để chuyển các diễn xuất từ một ngôn ngữ có đầy đủ dữ liệu được ghi chú sang một ngôn ngữ khác với số dữ liệu chưa ghi chú. Một phương pháp chỉnh sửa đặc trưng như vậy cho phép mô phỏng các diễn viên qua cuộc cạnh tranh giữa một hệ thống phân hạng mối quan hệ và một kẻ phân biệt cạnh tranh. Kết quả thử nghiệm về tập thể huấn huấn huấn huấn cao đẳng đẳng tập thể dục ngôn ngữ dược bố và Trung Quốc, cho thấy hiệu quả của phương pháp chúng ta đã đề nghị, đạt mức độ nâng cao 5.7.', 'bg': 'Отношение Класификация има за цел да класифицира семантичната връзка между две маркирани същности в дадено изречение. Той играе жизненоважна роля в различни приложения за обработка на естествен език. Повечето съществуващи методи се фокусират върху използването на едноезични данни, например на английски, поради липсата на анотирани данни на други езици. В тази статия ние разработваме подход за адаптиране на характеристиките за класификация на междуезични взаимоотношения, който използва генеративна контразартна мрежа (ГАН) за прехвърляне на характеристиките от един език с богати анотирани данни на друг език с оскъдни анотирани данни. Подобен подход за адаптиране на характеристиките позволява имитацията на характеристиките чрез конкуренцията между мрежа за класификация на отношенията и конкурентен дискриминатор. Експерименталните резултати на многоезичния тренировъчен корпус на АСЕ 2005, третиращ английския като изходен език и китайския като цел, демонстрират ефективността на предлагания от нас подход, което води до подобрение с 5,7% в сравнение със съвременните технологии.', 'nl': 'Relatie Classificatie heeft als doel de semantische relatie tussen twee gemarkeerde entiteiten in een bepaalde zin te classificeren. Het speelt een vitale rol in een verscheidenheid van natuurlijke taalverwerkingstoepassingen. De meeste bestaande methoden richten zich op het gebruik van mono-lingual data, bijvoorbeeld in het Engels, vanwege het ontbreken van geannoteerde gegevens in andere talen. In dit artikel komen we met een feature adaptation benadering voor cross-lingual relation classificatie, waarbij gebruik wordt gemaakt van een generative adversarian network (GAN) om feature representaties van de ene taal met rijke geanotateerde gegevens over te dragen naar een andere taal met schaarse geanotateerde gegevens. Een dergelijke benadering van de aanpassing van kenmerken maakt het mogelijk om kenmerken te imiteren via de concurrentie tussen een relatieklassingsnetwerk en een rivaliserende discriminator. Experimentele resultaten op het meertalige trainingscorpus ACE 2005, waarbij Engels als brontaal wordt behandeld en Chinees als doelwit, tonen de effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde aanpak aan, die resulteert in een verbetering van 5,7% ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art.', 'da': 'Relation Classification har til formål at klassificere det semantiske forhold mellem to markerede enheder i en given sætning. Det spiller en afgørende rolle i en række naturlige sprogbehandlingsapplikationer. De fleste eksisterende metoder fokuserer på at udnytte ensprogede data, f.eks. på engelsk, på grund af manglen på annoterede data på andre sprog. I denne artikel finder vi frem til en funktionstilpasning til klassifikation af tværsprogede relationer, som anvender et generativt adversarial netværk (GAN) til at overføre funktionsrepræsentationer fra et sprog med rige kommenterede data til et andet sprog med knappe kommenterede data. En sådan tilpasning af egenskaber muliggør efterligning af egenskaber gennem konkurrencen mellem et forholdsklassificeringsnet og en konkurrerende diskriminerende virksomhed. Eksperimentelle resultater på ACE 2005 flersprogede træningskorpus, der behandler engelsk som kildesprog og kinesisk som mål, viser effektiviteten af vores foreslåede tilgang, hvilket giver en forbedring på 5,7% i forhold til den nyeste teknologi.', 'de': 'Relation Classification zielt darauf ab, die semantische Beziehung zwischen zwei markierten Entitäten in einem bestimmten Satz zu klassifizieren. Es spielt eine wichtige Rolle in einer Vielzahl von natürlichen Sprachverarbeitungsanwendungen. Die meisten existierenden Methoden konzentrieren sich auf die Nutzung monolingualer Daten, z.B. auf Englisch, da in anderen Sprachen keine annotierten Daten vorhanden sind. In diesem Beitrag entwickeln wir einen Ansatz zur Anpassung von Merkmalen für die sprachübergreifende Beziehungsklassifikation, bei dem ein generatives adversariales Netzwerk (GAN) verwendet wird, um Feature-Repräsentationen von einer Sprache mit reichhaltigen annotierten Daten in eine andere Sprache mit knappen annotierten Daten zu übertragen. Ein solcher Ansatz zur Anpassung von Merkmalen ermöglicht die Nachahmung von Merkmalen über den Wettbewerb zwischen einem Beziehungsklassifizierungsnetzwerk und einem konkurrierenden Diskriminierer. Experimentelle Ergebnisse des mehrsprachigen ACE 2005 Trainingskorpus, bei dem Englisch als Ausgangssprache und Chinesisch als Zielsprache behandelt wird, belegen die Wirksamkeit unseres vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes und liefern eine Verbesserung von 5,7% gegenüber dem Stand der Technik.', 'hr': 'Klasificija odnosa cilja je klasifikirati semantičku vezu između dva označena entiteta u određenoj rečenici. Ima vitalnu ulogu u raznim prirodnim prijavama obrade jezika. Većina postojećih metoda se fokusira na iskorištavanje monojezičkih podataka, na primjer na engleskom, zbog nedostatka annotiranih podataka na drugim jezicima. U ovom papiru, smislili smo prilagodbni pristup klasifikaciji međujezičkih odnosa, koji koristi generičnu neprijateljsku mrežu (GAN) prema prenošenju predstavljanja karakteristika iz jednog jezika sa bogatim annotiranim podacima na drugi jezik s manjim annotiranim podacima. Takav pristup prilagodbi omogućava imitaciju karakteristika putem natjecanja između povezane klasifikacijske mreže i rivalnog diskriminacije. Eksperimentalni rezultati multijezičkog treninga korpusa ACE 2005-a, koji se prema engleskom jeziku smatra izvornim jezikom i kineskim ciljem, pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa, koji pruža poboljšanje od 5,7% iznad države umjetnosti.', 'id': 'Relation Classification aims to classify the semantic relationship between two marked entities in a given sentence.  Ini bermain peran penting dalam berbagai aplikasi proses bahasa alam. Kebanyakan metode yang ada fokus pada mengeksploitasi data monobahasa, misalnya dalam bahasa Inggris, karena kekurangan data yang dicatat dalam bahasa lain. Dalam kertas ini, kami menemukan pendekatan adaptasi fitur untuk klasifikasi hubungan saling bahasa, yang menggunakan jaringan musuh generasi (GAN) untuk memindahkan represensi fitur dari satu bahasa dengan data annotasi kaya ke bahasa lain dengan data annotasi jarang. Pendekatan adaptasi karakteristik seperti ini memungkinkan imitasi karakteristik melalui kompetisi antara jaringan klasifikasi hubungan dan diskriminator rival. Hasil percobaan pada korpus pelatihan berbagai bahasa ACE 2005, memperlakukan bahasa Inggris sebagai bahasa sumber dan bahasa Cina sasaran, menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kami yang diusulkan, memberikan peningkatan 5,7% lebih dari yang terbaik.', 'sw': 'Kuhusiana na uhusiano unakusudia kutangaza uhusiano wa kimapenzi kati ya vitu viwili viwili vilivyowekwa katika hukumu fulani. Inacheza nafasi muhimu katika matumizi mbalimbali ya utaratibu wa lugha asilia. Njia nyingi zilizopo zinalenga kutumia taarifa za lugha za kimapenzi, kwa mfano, kwa Kiingereza, kutokana na ukosefu wa taarifa zilizotajwa kwa lugha nyingine. In this paper, we come up with a feature adaptation approach for cross-lingual relation classification, which employs a generative adversarial network (GAN) to transfer feature representations from one language with rich annotated data to another language with scarce annotated data.  Harakati hii ya kubadilishana inawezesha kutanganisha kwa kupitia ushindani kati ya mitandao ya usambazaji na ubaguzi wa upinzani. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyotokana na makampuni ya mafunzo ya lugha mbalimbali ya ACE 2005, yanatumia Kiingereza kama lugha ya asili na Kichina kwa lengo hilo, yanaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu inayopendekezwa, na kusababisha maboresho ya asilimia 5.7 juu ya hali ya sanaa.', 'fa': 'کلاس ارتباط هدف دارد که ارتباط semantic بین دو تنظیم مشخص شده در یک جمله مشخص شود. این نقش حیاتی در کاربردهای پردازش زبان طبیعی است. بیشتر روش\u200cهای موجود روی استفاده از داده\u200cهای mono-lingual، مثال به انگلیسی، به دلیل lack of annotated data in other languages تمرکز می\u200cکند. در این کاغذ، ما با یک روش تغییرات ویژه برای گروهی رابطه\u200cهای متوسط زبان آماده می\u200cکنیم، که شبکه مخالف (GAN) را استفاده می\u200cکند تا نشانه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از یک زبان با داده\u200cهای ثروتمندی به زبان دیگر با داده\u200cهای کم مشخص\u200cشده استفاده این دستور تغییر تغییر ویژه\u200cای از طریق رقابت بین شبکه\u200cهای تغییر رابطه و یک جدایی رقابت را اجازه می\u200cدهد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی کورپوس تعلیم زیادی زبان\u200cهای ACE ۲۰۰۵، انگلیسی را به عنوان زبان منبع و چینی هدف می\u200cبرند، نشان می\u200cدهند که موثیت دستور پیشنهاد ما موثرت است، که در حالی که در حالی هنر 5.7 درصد بهبود می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '관계 분류는 주어진 문장에 표시된 두 실체 간의 의미 관계를 분류하는 데 목적을 둔다.그것은 각종 자연 언어 처리 응용에서 매우 중요한 역할을 한다.다른 언어의 주석 데이터가 부족하기 때문에 대부분의 기존 방법은 단어 데이터, 예를 들어 영어의 데이터를 이용하는 데 중심을 두었다.본고에서 우리는 다중 언어 관계 분류의 특징 자체 적응 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 생성적 대항 네트워크(GAN)를 이용하여 특징을 풍부한 주석 데이터를 가진 언어에서 희소한 주석 데이터를 가진 언어로 옮긴다.이런 특징 자체 적응 방법은 관계 분류 네트워크와 경쟁 감별기 간의 경쟁을 통해 특징 모방을 실현한다.ACE 2005 다국어 훈련 어료고에서 영어를 원어로 하고 중국어를 목표 언어로 한 실험 결과는 우리가 제시한 방법의 유효성을 증명해 기존 방법보다 5.7% 높아졌다.', 'tr': 'Stencils Bu tebigy diller işleýän programlerde örän wajyp bar. Iň köp bar döwletler mono-dil maglumatlaryny ulanmakda umyt berýär, ýöne iňlisçe, başga dillerde terjime edilen maglumatlaryň ýok bolmasyna sebäbi. Bu kagyzda, biz dillerden baý ýazylan maglumatlar bilen beýleki dillerde terjime etmek üçin bir adaptasyon metody tapdyk. Bärde bir täsirli adaptasyon ýaly çykyşyk bilen düşmeli diskriminator aralygynda ýaryşyk taýýarlamagy mümkin edýär. ACE 2005-nji ýylyň köp dilli eğitim korpusynyň bardygyny örän netijesi, iňlisçe çeşme dili we hyt dilini meýilleşdirýän maksadyň täsirini görkez, gurultaýyň durumynda 5.7%-den gowurak gazanýar.', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i marrëdhënieve synon të klasifikojë marrëdhëniet semantike midis dy njësive të shënuara në një fjalim të caktuar. It plays a vital role in a variety of natural language processing applications.  Shumica e metodave ekzistuese përqëndrohen në shfrytëzimin e të dhënave monogjuhësore, për shembull në anglisht, për shkak të mungesës së të dhënave të anotuara në gjuhë të tjera. Në këtë letër, ne arrijmë me një metodë përshtatjeje të funksioneve për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve ndërgjuhësore, e cila përdor një rrjet gjenerativ kundërshtar (GAN) për të transferuar përfaqësimet e funksioneve nga një gjuhë me të dhëna të pasura të anotuara në një gjuhë tjetër me të dhëna të pakta të anotuara. Such a feature adaptation approach enables feature imitation via the competition between a relation classification network and a rival discriminator.  Rezultatet eksperimentale në korpusin e trajnimit shumëgjuhës ACE 2005, duke trajtuar anglishtin si gjuhën burimore dhe kinezën si objektiv, demonstrojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë të propozuar, duke dhënë një përmirësim prej 5.7% mbi gjendjen e teknologjisë.', 'af': "Verhouding Klassifikasie doel om die semantiese verhouding tussen twee merkte entiteite in 'n gegewe seting te klassifiseer. Dit speel 'n belangrike rol in 'n verskillende natuurlike taal verwerking toepassings. Die mees bestaande metodes fokus op die gebruik van mono-tale data, bv. in Engels, vanweë die mislukking van aanmerkte data in ander tale. In hierdie papier het ons opgekom met 'n funksie aanpassing toegang vir kruistale verhouding klasifikasie, wat gebruik 'n genereer teëstandige netwerk (GAN) na oordra funksie voorstellings van een taal met ryk annoteerde data na 'n ander taal met skaars annoteerde data. Soos 'n funksie aanpassing toegang kan funksie imiteer deur die kompetisie tussen 'n verbinding klassifikasienetwerk en 'n rivale diskrimineerder toestel. Eksperimentale resultate op die ACE 2005 multilingual oefening korpus, wat Engels as die bron taal en die Sjinees die doel behandel, wys die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde toegang, wat 'n verbetering van 5.7% oor die staat van die kuns verkondig het.", 'am': 'ሁኔታ በአካባቢ ቋንቋ ፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ የሚያስፈልገውን አዋቂነት ይጫወታል፡፡ በብዙ ሥርዓት የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም ላይ ማጠቃቀሚያ ነው፤ ምሳሌ በአንደኛ ቋንቋዎች ላይ የተቃወመ መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የቋንቋ ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ማቀናቀል የተለየ የአፍሪካዊ መረብ (GAN) እናደርጋለን፡፡ እንደዚህ የፊደል አካባቢ አካባቢ ግንኙነት በተቃራኒ መረብ እና በተቃዋሚ አዋቂዎች መካከል በተቃራኒ ግንኙነት ይችላል፡፡ የACE 2005 ብዙዎችን የቋንቋ ትምህርት ካርፓስ፣ የኢንግሊዝኛ ቋንቋ እና የቻይና ጉዳይ ሆኗል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հաբերությունների դասակարգման նպատակն է դասակարգել սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունները երկու նշանակված կազմակերպությունների միջև տվյալ նախադասության մեջ: Այն կարևոր դեր է խաղում տարբեր բնական լեզվի վերամշակման ծրագրերում: Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդների մեծ մասը կենտրոնանում է միալեզու տվյալների օգտագործման վրա, օրինակ անգլերենում, այլ լեզուներում գրված տվյալների բացակայության պատճառով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ստեղծում ենք հատկանիշների ադապտացիոն մոտեցում միջլեզվային հարաբերությունների դասակարգման համար, որը օգտագործում է սերունդ հակառակ ցանց (ԳԱՆ) հատկանիշների ներկայացումների փոխանցման մեկ լեզվից հարուստ annoted տվյալներով մեկ այլ լեզվի, որտեղ հազվադեպ Այսպիսի հատկանիշների ադապտացիոն մոտեցումը հնարավորություն է տալիս հատկանիշների կրկնօրինակումը հարաբերությունների դասակարգման ցանցի և մրցակցության խտրականության միջև: 2005 թվականի ACE-ի բազլեզու ուսումնասիրության կորպոսի փորձարկման արդյունքները, անգլերենը վերաբերելով որպես աղբյուր լեզու և չինական նպատակը, ցույց են տալիս մեր առաջարկած մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը, ինչը 5.7 տոկոսի բարելավում է տեխնոլոգիայի դե', 'bn': 'যোগাযোগ বিভাগের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে দুটি চিহ্নিত বস্তুর মধ্যে সেম্যান্টিক সম্পর্ক বিশেষ করার জন্য। এটি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করে। বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি অন্যান্য ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষার তথ্য ব্যবহারের কারণে মনোযোগ প্রদান করে, যেমন ইংরেজী ভাষায়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর প্রতিনিধিত্ব নিয়ে এসেছি যেখানে একটি জেনারেটিভ বিরোধী নেটওয়ার্ক (GAN) প্রতিনিধিত্ব করেছে একটি ভাষা থেকে সমৃদ্ধ তথ্য প্রতিনি এই ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর প্রতিযোগিতার মাধ্যমে বৈশিষ্ট্য বৈষম্য এবং বৈষম্যের মধ্যে প্রতিযোগিতার মাধ্যমে বৈশিষ্ট্যে Experimental results on the ACE 2005 multilingual training corpus, treating English as the source language and Chinese the target, demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach, yielding an improvement of 5.7% over the state-of-the-art.', 'bs': 'Klasificija odnosa cilja je da klasifikuje semantičku vezu između dva označena entiteta u određenoj rečenici. To igra vitalnu ulogu u raznim prirodnim aplikacijama obrade jezika. Većina postojećih metoda se fokusira na korištenje monojezičkih podataka, na primjer na engleskom, zbog nedostatka annotiranih podataka na drugim jezicima. U ovom papiru smo smislili posebni pristup adaptacije za klasifikaciju međujezičkih odnosa, koji koristi generičnu neprijateljsku mrežu (GAN) da prebacimo predstave karakteristika iz jednog jezika sa bogatim annotiranim podacima na drugi jezik sa manjim annotiranim podacima. Takav pristup prilagodbi omogućava imitaciju karakteristika putem konkurencije između povezane klasifikacije mreže i rivalnog diskriminacija. Eksperimentalni rezultati multijezičkog treninga korpusa ACE 2005, prema kojem se Engleski smatra izvornim jezikom i kineskim ciljem, pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa, pružajući poboljšanje od 5,7% iznad države umjetnosti.', 'ca': "La Classificació de Relacions mira a classificar la relació semàntica entre dues entitats marcades en una frase dada. Té un paper vital en una varietat d'aplicacions naturals de processament de llenguatges. La majoria dels mètodes existents es centren en l'explotació de dades monolingües, per exemple en anglès, a causa de la falta de dades anotates en altres llengües. En aquest article, vam crear un enfocament d'adaptació de característiques per a la classificació de relacions translingües, que utilitza una xarxa adversaria generativa (GAN) per transferir representacions de característiques d'un llenguatge amb moltes dades anotates a un altre llenguatge amb escases dades anotates. Aquest enfocament d'adaptació de característiques permet imitar característiques a través de la competició entre una xarxa de classificació de relacions i un discriminator rival. Experimental results on the ACE 2005 multilingual training corpus, treating English as the source language and Chinese the target, demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach, yielding an improvement of 5.7% over the state-of-the-art.", 'az': 'İlişkil Klasifikası, belə bir cümlədə iki işarə edilmiş məlumatın arasındakı semantik ilişkisini dəyişdirmək məqsədilədir. Bu, təbiətli dil işləmə proqramlarında çox mövcuddur. Ən çox mövcuddur metodlar mono dil verilənlərini istifadə etməyə, məsələn İngilizce dilində, başqa dillərdə məlumatlar yoxdur. Bu kağızda, çox dilli ilişkilər klasifikasyonu üçün müxtəlif uyğunlaşdırma metodlarını təşkil edirik. Bu, çox az məlumat verilmiş məlumatları olan bir dildən müxtəlif məlumatları təşkil etmək üçün generikli düşmənçi şəbəkə (GAN) istifadə edir. Bütün bu xüsusiyyətlər uyğunlaşdırma metodları müəllif şəbəkə və müəllif diskriminat arasındakı müqayisədə müqayisədə müqayisədə mövcuddur. ACE 2005 ilə çoxlu dil təhsil korpusu təhsil edir, İngilizce dilini mənbə dili və Çin dilini təhsil edir, bizim təhsil etdiyimiz təhsil təhsil təhsil etkinliğini göstərir, sanat vəziyyətində 5,7%-dən daha yaxşılaşdırır.', 'cs': 'Klasifikace vztahů si klade za cíl klasifikovat sémantický vztah mezi dvěma označenými entitami v dané větě. Hraje důležitou roli v různých aplikacích zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Většina stávajících metod se zaměřuje na využití monojazyčných dat, např. v angličtině, kvůli nedostatku anotovaných dat v jiných jazycích. V tomto článku navrhujeme adaptační přístup pro klasifikaci vztahů mezi jazyky, který využívá generativní adversariální síť (GAN) k přenosu reprezentací prvků z jednoho jazyka s bohatými anotovanými daty do jiného jazyka s vzácnými anotovanými daty. Takový přístup k adaptaci vlastností umožňuje imitaci vlastností prostřednictvím konkurence mezi klasifikační sítí vztahů a konkurenčním diskriminačním subjektem. Experimentální výsledky na vícejazyčném tréninkovém korpusu ACE 2005, který zachází s angličtinou jako zdrojovým jazykem a s čínštinou jako cílem, ukazují efektivitu našeho navrhovaného přístupu, přinášejícího zlepšení o 5,7% oproti nejmodernějšímu stavu techniky.', 'et': 'Seose klassifitseerimise eesmärk on klassifitseerida semantiline seos kahe märgitud olemi vahel antud lauses. See mängib olulist rolli mitmesugustes looduslike keelte töötlemise rakendustes. Enamik olemasolevaid meetodeid keskendub ühekeelsete andmete (nt inglise keeles) kasutamisele, kuna teistes keeltes puuduvad märgitud andmed. Käesolevas töös töötame välja funktsioonide kohandamise lähenemisviisi keeleüleste suhete klassifitseerimiseks, mis kasutab generatiivset vastastikust võrgustikku (GAN), et edastada funktsioonide esitusi ühest keelest rikkalike annoteeritud andmetega teise keelde, kus on vähe annoteeritud andmeid. Selline omaduste kohandamise lähenemisviis võimaldab omaduste imiteerimist seoste klassifitseerimise võrgustiku ja konkureeriva diskrimineerija vahelise konkurentsi kaudu. Katsetulemused ACE 2005 mitmekeelse koolituse korpuse kohta, milles käsitletakse inglise keelt lähtekeelena ja hiina keelt eesmärgina, näitavad meie kavandatud lähenemisviisi tõhusust, saavutades 5,7% võrra parema tasemega võrreldes.', 'fi': 'Suhteelluokituksen tarkoituksena on luokitella kahden merkityn kokonaisuuden semanttinen suhde tietyssä lauseessa. Sillä on tärkeä rooli erilaisissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelysovelluksissa. Useimmat olemassa olevat menetelmät keskittyvät hyödyntämään monikielistä dataa esimerkiksi englanniksi, koska muilla kielillä ei ole merkintöjä. Tässä artikkelissa kehitämme monikielisten suhteiden luokitteluun ominaisuuden sopeutumista koskevan lähestymistavan, jossa käytetään generatiivista vastakkainasetteluverkostoa (GAN), jolla voidaan siirtää ominaisuusesityksiä yhdestä kielestä, jossa on runsaasti annotoituja tietoja, toiselle kielelle, jossa on niukasti annotoituja tietoja. Tällainen ominaisuuksien mukauttaminen mahdollistaa ominaisuuksien jäljittelyn suhdeluokitusverkoston ja kilpailevan syrjijän välisen kilpailun kautta. Kokeelliset tulokset ACE 2005 -monikielisestä koulutuskokonaisuudesta, jossa kohdellaan englantia lähtökielenä ja kiinaa kohdekielenä, osoittavat ehdotetun lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden, mikä on tuottanut 5,7 prosentin parannuksen nykytekniikkaan verrattuna.', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Ora penting nggawe barang akeh pisan ning akeh akeh sistem dadi. Rasané sing isih-ingkang dipungot ngomong nik nggawe data Mono-ingkang, bisa ngomong Inggris, dadi ora ono data sing isiné diunganggo tindan liyane wis ana. In this paper, we are up with a option Adjustment method for interlanguage Relative CLASS, that runs a Generative Counter network (GN) to transfer character representations from one language with weakened data to an additional language with sharp anntatid data. This a character modification method enables character imitation by the Competition with a Relative CLASS network and a contrast disc. Rejalaké sing paling nggambar aturan sing paling nggawe luwih(ingles), nglanggar ingles nganggep ingles saiki perbudhakan lan ijol-ijolan ingles, iso nggambar efek kanggo ngerasakno dhéwé, iso nglanggar njaluké awak dhéwé, nambah sing luwih apik 5.7% kebutuhan langkung sampeyan ingles.', 'ha': "Banner page Ina nuna wani roli mai muhimu a cikin wasu shiryoyin ayuka masu shiryarwa na harshe na asili. Babu yawa na shiryoyin ayuka da ke da ana fokus a kan yin amfani da data na lugha-linguin-mono, misali, cikin Ingiriya, sabo da ƙaranci da data da aka sanar da shi cikin wasu harshe. Daga wannan takardan, munã sãmu da wata hanyor adaptation wa fassarar-danganci na fassarar-linguin, wanda ke yi amfani da wata shirin mai shagala (GAN) dõmin mu motsar masu tsari daga harshen guda da data mai taƙaita zuwa wani harshe da bã da zargi na haske da data. Wannan shirin adaptation na ɗabi'a, yana iya amfani da yin taƙaita ta tsakanin shirin mai haɗuwa da shirin rabo da mai tsakanin rabo. Tajararin matsala ne a kan ACE 2005, ta yi amfani da Ingiriya kamar harshen kwanza da shirin China, ya nuna aikin hanyarmu wanda aka yi niyyar da shi, yana ƙara ƙari da asilimi 5.7 a kan halin-sanar.", 'sk': 'Razvrstitev razmerja je namenjena razvrstitvi semantičnega razmerja med dvema označenima entitetama v danem stavku. Ima ključno vlogo v različnih aplikacijah za obdelavo naravnega jezika. Večina obstoječih metod se osredotoča na izkoriščanje enojezičnih podatkov, npr. v angleščini, zaradi pomanjkanja označenih podatkov v drugih jezikih. V tem prispevku smo pripravili pristop prilagajanja funkcij za klasifikacijo medjezičnih relacij, ki uporablja generativno kontradiralno mrežo (GAN) za prenos funkcijskih predstavitev iz enega jezika z bogatimi podatki z oznakami v drug jezik z omejenimi podatki. Takšen pristop prilagajanja značilnosti omogoča imitacijo značilnosti prek konkurence med mrežo razmerja za klasifikacijo in konkurenčnim diskriminatorjem. Eksperimentalni rezultati večjezičnega korpusa usposabljanja ACE 2005, ki obravnava angleščino kot izvorni jezik in kitajščino kot cilj, kažejo učinkovitost našega predlaganega pristopa, kar je prineslo 5,7-odstotno izboljšanje v primerjavi z najsodobnejšim.', 'bo': 'འབྲེལ་བ་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚིག་རྟགས་བཀོད་པའི་དབྱིབས་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་སྐྱེས་འབྲེལ་འདི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཡོད། དེ་ལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་སྤྱོད་མི་འདྲ་བའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ངོ་བོ་བཏང་བ་རེད། སྐད་ཡིག་ཅིག་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་མང་ཆེ་བའི་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་ཚུལ་གཅིག་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ In this paper, we come up with a feature adaptation approach for cross-lingual relation classification, which employs a generative adversarial network (GAN) to transfer feature representations from one language with rich annotated data to another language with scarce annotated data. Such a feature adaptation approach enables feature imitation via the competition between a relation classification network and a rival discriminator. ACE 2005 multilingual training corpus་གྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད། དབྱིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་སྐད་དང་རྒྱ་ནག་ལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་བཞིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'מסווג מערכות יחסים מתכוון להסביר את מערכת היחסים הסמנטית בין שני יחידות מסומנות במשפט מסוים. It plays a vital role in a variety of natural language processing applications.  Most existing methods focus on exploiting mono-lingual data, e.g., in English, due to the lack of annotated data in other languages.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מגיעים עם גישה שימושית תכונות לסיווג יחסים בין שפות, שמעסקת רשת יריבית דורית (GAN) כדי להעביר מייצגים תכונות משפה אחת עם נתונים עשירים מועטפים לשפה אחרת עם נתונים מועטפים נדירים. גישת התאמה כזו מאפשרת חיקוי תכונות באמצעות התחרות בין רשת מסווג יחסים לבין מיוחד. Experimental results on the ACE 2005 multilingual training corpus, treating English as the source language and Chinese the target, demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach, yielding an improvement of 5.7% over the state-of-the-art.'}
{'en': 'One-shot Learning for Question-Answering in Gaokao History Challenge', 'ar': 'تعلم طلقة واحدة للإجابة على الأسئلة في تحدي تاريخ Gaokao', 'es': 'Aprendizaje único para responder preguntas en el desafío de la historia de Gaokao', 'pt': 'Aprendizado único para responder a perguntas no desafio de história de Gaokao', 'fr': "Apprentissage unique pour répondre aux questions dans le défi de l'histoire de Gaokao", 'ja': 'ガオカオの歴史チャレンジで答えを出すための一発学習', 'zh': '高考史挑战赛中一次性问答学', 'hi': 'गाओकाओ इतिहास चैलेंज में प्रश्न-उत्तर के लिए एक शॉट सीखना', 'ru': 'Одноразовое обучение для ответа на вопросы по истории Гаокао', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Aonghusa le haghaidh Freagra Ceisteanna i nDúshlán Staire Gaokao', 'ka': 'ერთი სტრიქონის სწავლება საკითხვა-პასუხისთვის დაოკაო ისტორიის გარეშე', 'el': 'Μάθηση με μία ευκαιρία για απαντήσεις σε ερωτήσεις στην πρόκληση ιστορίας του Γκαοκάο', 'hu': 'Egyszeres tanulás a kérdések megválaszolásához a Gaokao History Challenge-ben', 'lt': 'One-shot Learning for Question-Answering in Gaokao History Challenge', 'it': 'Imparare un colpo per rispondere alle domande in Gaokao History Challenge', 'kk': 'Gaokao журналында сұрақ-жауап беру үшін бір түрлі оқыту', 'mk': 'Единствено учење за одговори на прашања во историскиот предизвик на Гаокао', 'ms': 'One-shot Learning for Question-Answering in Gaokao History Challenge', 'ml': 'ഗാവോയുടെ ചരിത്രത്തിലെ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു ഷോട്ട് പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Гаокао түүхийн шалгалтын нэг удаа асуулт-хариултыг сурах', 'mt': 'Tagħlim ta’ darba għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet fl-Isfida tal-Istorja ta’ Gaokao', 'no': 'Ein opplæring for spørsmål- svar i Gaokao History Challenge', 'pl': 'Jednorazowe uczenie się do odpowiedzi na pytania w Gaokao History Challenge', 'ro': 'Învățare unică pentru răspunsul la întrebări în proba de istorie Gaokao', 'sr': 'Jedan pogodak učenje za odgovor na pitanje u izazovu povijesti Gaokao', 'si': 'Gaocao ඉතිහාසයේ ප්\u200dරශ්න-ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'One shot Learning for Question-answering in Gaokao History Challenge', 'sv': 'One-shot lärande för att besvara frågor i Gaokao History Challenge', 'ta': 'காயோகோ வரலாற்று சவாலானத்தில் கேள்வி பதில் கற்றுக்கொள்ள ஒரு படம்', 'ur': 'Gaokao History Challenge میں سوال-جواب کے لئے ایک شٹ سکونت', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một phát để học câu hỏi ở Gaokao History Challeng.', 'bg': 'Еднократно обучение за отговор на въпроси в историческото предизвикателство Гаокао', 'nl': 'One-shot leren voor het beantwoorden van vragen in Gaokao History Challenge', 'hr': 'Jednostavno učenje za odgovor na pitanje u izazovu povijesti Gaokao', 'da': 'One-shot læring til spørgsmål-besvarelse i Gaokao History Challenge', 'id': 'One-shot Learning for Question-Answering in Gaokao History Challenge', 'ko': '대입 시험 역사 도전 중의 문답식 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری برای جواب سوال و سوال در چالج تاریخ گاوکائو', 'de': 'One-shot Lernen für die Beantwortung von Fragen in der Gaokao History Challenge', 'af': 'Een-skoot leer vir vraag-antwoord in Gaokao Geskiedenis', 'tr': 'Gaokao Taryhdan sorag-jogabat üçin ýekeje sany öwrenmek', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa picha moja kwa ajili ya kujibu maswali katika Challenge la Historia ya Gaokao', 'sq': 'Mësimi me një mundësi për përgjigjen e pyetjeve në sfidën historike të Gaokaos', 'am': 'በጋኦኮ ታሪክ Challenge', 'hy': 'Գաոկայի պատմության մարտահրավերում հարցերի պատասխանելու մեկ անգամ սովորելը', 'az': 'Gaokao Tarixi √áalńĪŇümasńĪnda sual-cavab √∂yr…ônm…ôk', 'bn': 'গাওকো ইতিহাসের ইতিহাস চ্যালেঞ্জে প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য একটি শিক্ষা শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Jednostavno učenje za odgovor na pitanje u izazovu povijesti Gaokao', 'et': 'Ühekordne õppimine küsimustele vastamiseks Gaokao ajaloo väljakutse', 'ca': "Una oportunitat d'aprendre per respondre a preguntes en el repte històric de Gaokao", 'cs': 'Jednorázové učení pro zodpovězení otázek v Gaokao History Challenge', 'fi': 'Yhden laukauksen oppimista kysymyksiin vastaamiseen Gaokaon historiahaasteessa', 'jv': 'Ngucap Jejaring', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'he': 'לימוד אחד לענות על שאלות באתגר ההיסטוריה של גאוקו', 'sk': 'Enotno učenje za odgovarjanje na vprašanja v zgodovinskem izzivu Gaokao', 'bo': 'Gaokao ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་གདོང་ལེན་ནང་དུ་འདྲི་བ་དང་ལན་སྐོར་གྱི་གནད་དོན་གཅིག་གནོང་བསླབ་པ།'}
{'en': 'Answering questions from university admission exams (Gaokao in Chinese) is a challenging AI task since it requires effective representation to capture complicated semantic relations between questions and answers. In this work, we propose a hybrid neural model for deep question-answering task from history examinations. Our model employs a cooperative gated neural network to retrieve answers with the assistance of extra labels given by a neural turing machine labeler. Empirical study shows that the labeler works well with only a small training dataset and the gated mechanism is good at fetching the semantic representation of lengthy answers. Experiments on question answering demonstrate the proposed model obtains substantial performance gains over various neural model baselines in terms of multiple evaluation metrics.', 'ar': 'تعد الإجابة على الأسئلة من امتحانات القبول بالجامعة (Gaokao باللغة الصينية) مهمة ذكاء اصطناعي صعبة لأنها تتطلب تمثيلاً فعالاً لالتقاط العلاقات الدلالية المعقدة بين الأسئلة والأجوبة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نموذجًا عصبيًا هجينًا لمهمة الإجابة على الأسئلة العميقة من اختبارات التاريخ. يستخدم نموذجنا شبكة عصبية تعاونية مسوّرة لاسترداد الإجابات بمساعدة تسميات إضافية مُعطاة بواسطة مُصنِّف آلة تورينج العصبية. تظهر الدراسة التجريبية أن أداة التسمية تعمل بشكل جيد مع مجموعة بيانات تدريب صغيرة فقط وأن الآلية المسورة جيدة في جلب التمثيل الدلالي للإجابات المطولة. توضح التجارب التي أجريت على الإجابة على الأسئلة أن النموذج المقترح يحصل على مكاسب كبيرة في الأداء عبر مختلف خطوط الأساس للنموذج العصبي من حيث مقاييس التقييم المتعددة.', 'pt': 'Responder a perguntas dos exames de admissão da universidade (Gaokao em chinês) é uma tarefa desafiadora de IA, pois requer uma representação eficaz para capturar relações semânticas complicadas entre perguntas e respostas. Neste trabalho, propomos um modelo neural híbrido para tarefa de resposta a perguntas profundas a partir de exames de história. Nosso modelo emprega uma rede neural fechada cooperativa para recuperar respostas com a ajuda de rótulos extras fornecidos por um rotulador de máquina de turing neural. O estudo empírico mostra que o rotulador funciona bem com apenas um pequeno conjunto de dados de treinamento e o mecanismo fechado é bom para buscar a representação semântica de respostas longas. Experimentos em resposta a perguntas demonstram que o modelo proposto obtém ganhos substanciais de desempenho sobre várias linhas de base do modelo neural em termos de métricas de avaliação múltipla.', 'fr': "Répondre aux questions des examens d'admission à l'université (Gaokao en chinois) est une tâche d'IA difficile car elle nécessite une représentation efficace pour saisir les relations sémantiques complexes entre les questions et les réponses. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un modèle neuronal hybride pour répondre à des questions approfondies à partir d'examens d'histoire. Notre modèle utilise un réseau neuronal fermé coopératif pour récupérer les réponses à l'aide d'étiquettes supplémentaires fournies par une étiqueteuse de machine de turage neuronal. Une étude empirique montre que l'étiqueteuse ne fonctionne bien qu'avec un petit ensemble de données d'apprentissage et que le mécanisme de déclenchement est efficace pour récupérer la représentation sémantique de longues réponses. Les expériences sur la réponse aux questions démontrent que le modèle proposé obtient des gains de performance substantiels par rapport aux différentes lignes de base du modèle neuronal en termes de multiples mesures d'évaluation.", 'es': 'Responder a las preguntas de los exámenes de admisión a la universidad (Gaokao en chino) es una tarea desafiante de IA, ya que requiere una representación eficaz para captar las complicadas relaciones semánticas entre las preguntas y las respuestas. En este trabajo, proponemos un modelo neuronal híbrido para tareas profundas de preguntas y respuestas a partir de exámenes de historia. Nuestro modelo emplea una red neuronal cerrada cooperativa para recuperar respuestas con la ayuda de etiquetas adicionales proporcionadas por una etiquetadora de máquina de turing neuronal. Un estudio empírico muestra que el etiquetador funciona bien con solo un pequeño conjunto de datos de entrenamiento y que el mecanismo cerrado es bueno para obtener la representación semántica de respuestas largas. Los experimentos de respuesta a preguntas demuestran que el modelo propuesto obtiene ganancias de rendimiento sustanciales sobre varias líneas de base del modelo neuronal en términos de múltiples métricas de evaluación.', 'zh': '曰大学入学考试(中文为高考)者,挑战性之人工智能务也,所以效而获杂语义也。 于是混神经模样,以问答事。 用协门控神经网络,于神经图灵机标器额外标签者助检答案。 实证研明,标记器仅用小练数集可也,且门控机善取冗长对案之语义。 问答实验明,所出模形,于诸神经基线得实质性性升擢。', 'hi': 'विश्वविद्यालय प्रवेश परीक्षाओं (चीनी में गाओकाओ) से सवालों के जवाब देना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण एआई कार्य है क्योंकि इसे प्रश्नों और उत्तरों के बीच जटिल शब्दार्थ संबंधों को पकड़ने के लिए प्रभावी प्रतिनिधित्व की आवश्यकता होती है। इस काम में, हम इतिहास परीक्षाओं से गहरे प्रश्न-उत्तर देने वाले कार्य के लिए एक हाइब्रिड तंत्रिका मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल एक तंत्रिका ट्यूरिंग मशीन लेबलर द्वारा दिए गए अतिरिक्त लेबल की सहायता से उत्तरों को पुनः प्राप्त करने के लिए एक सहकारी गेटेड तंत्रिका नेटवर्क को नियोजित करता है। अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन से पता चलता है कि लेबलर केवल एक छोटे से प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट के साथ अच्छी तरह से काम करता है और गेटेड तंत्र लंबे उत्तरों के शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व को प्राप्त करने में अच्छा है। प्रश्न उत्तर देने पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल कई मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक के संदर्भ में विभिन्न तंत्रिका मॉडल बेसलाइन पर पर्याप्त प्रदर्शन लाभ प्राप्त करता है।', 'ja': '大学入試の質問に答えること（中国語ではガオカオ）は、質問と回答の複雑な意味関係を把握するために効果的な表現を必要とするため、AIの課題である。本研究では，歴史検討からの深層解答課題のためのハイブリッドニューラルモデルを提案する．当社のモデルは、ニューラルチューリングマシンラベラーによって与えられた追加のラベルの支援を受けて、回答を取得するために協力的なゲート付きニューラルネットワークを採用しています。実証研究では、ラベラーは小さなトレーニングデータセットのみでうまく機能し、ゲート化されたメカニズムは長い回答のセマンティック表現を取得するのに優れていることが示されています。質問応答の実験は、提案されたモデルが、複数の評価指標の観点から、様々なニューラルモデルのベースラインに対して実質的なパフォーマンスの向上を得ることを示している。', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы из вступительных экзаменов в университеты (Gaokao на китайском языке) являются сложной задачей ИИ, поскольку она требует эффективного представления, чтобы охватить сложные семантические отношения между вопросами и ответами. В этой работе мы предлагаем гибридную нейронную модель для задачи глубокого ответа на вопросы из истории. В нашей модели используется совместная стробированная нейронная сеть для получения ответов с помощью дополнительных меток, выдаваемых меткой нейронной машины Тьюринга. Эмпирическое исследование показывает, что маркер хорошо работает только с небольшим набором обучающих данных, а механизм стробирования хорошо подходит для получения семантического представления длинных ответов. Эксперименты с ответами на вопросы демонстрируют, что предлагаемая модель получает существенный прирост производительности по сравнению с различными базовыми линиями нейронной модели с точки зрения множественных оценочных метрик.', 'ga': 'Is tasc dúshlánach AI é ceisteanna a fhreagairt ó scrúduithe iontrála ollscoile (Gaokao i Sínis) ós rud é go dteastaíonn ionadaíocht éifeachtach chun caidreamh shéimeantach casta a ghabháil idir ceisteanna agus freagraí. San obair seo, molaimid samhail néar hibrideach do thasc dhomhainfhreagartha ó scrúduithe staire. Fostaíonn ár múnla líonra néarach comhoibritheach le geata chun freagraí a fháil le cabhair ó lipéid bhreise a thugann lipéadóir meaisín turing néaraigh. Léiríonn staidéar eimpíreach go n-oibríonn an lipéadóir go maith gan ach tacar sonraí oiliúna beag agus go bhfuil an mheicníocht gated go maith chun léiriú shéimeantach na bhfreagraí fada a fháil. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar fhreagairt ceisteanna go bhfaigheann an tsamhail mholta gnóthachain feidhmíochta suntasacha thar bhonnlínte samhlacha néarúla éagsúla i dtéarmaí méadrachta meastóireachta iolracha.', 'ka': 'უნივერსიტეტების მიღება გამოყენების გამოსახულება (ჩინეთში დაოკაო) არის შესაძლებელი AI დავალება, რადგან ის ჭირდება ეფექტიური გამოსახულება, რომ კომპლექტიური სიმენტიკური შესახებ კითხვ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდა ჰიბრიდის ნეიროლური მოდელის ძალიან კითხვების გარეშე სამუშაოდ ისტორიის განსხვავებებიდან დავიწყებთ. ჩვენი მოდელი კომპერაციური ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება, რომელიც განსხვავებების დახმარებით ნეიროლური რულინური მანქანის ლაბლიერით დაახმარებათ. იმპერიკალური სწავლა ჩვენებს, რომ ლაბელიერი მხოლოდ პატარა განაკეთებული მონაცემების შესახებ და შესაძლებელი მექანიზმის შესაძლებელია სიმენტიკური გამოსახულება. ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც კითხვის შესაძლებლობად დაეწყვება, დემონსტრაცის მოდელეტის შესაძლებელი მონაცემები მიიღება განსხვავებული ნეიროლური მოდელური ბაზის', 'el': 'Η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις από τις εξετάσεις εισαγωγής πανεπιστημίων (στα κινέζικα) είναι μια πρόκληση καθόσον απαιτεί αποτελεσματική αναπαράσταση για να συλλάβει περίπλοκες σημασιολογικές σχέσεις μεταξύ ερωτήσεων και απαντήσεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα υβριδικό νευρωνικό μοντέλο για βαθύ έργο απάντησης ερωτήσεων από εξετάσεις ιστορικού. Το μοντέλο μας χρησιμοποιεί ένα συνεταιριστικό κλειστό νευρωνικό δίκτυο για να ανακτήσει απαντήσεις με τη βοήθεια επιπλέον ετικετών που δίνονται από ένα νευρωνικό μηχάνημα μαρκαρίσματος. Εμπειριακή μελέτη δείχνει ότι ο μαρκαριστής λειτουργεί καλά μόνο με ένα μικρό εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο δεδομένων και ο μηχανισμός είναι καλός στην ανάκτηση της σημασιολογικής αναπαράστασης μακροχρόνιων απαντήσεων. Τα πειράματα που απαντούν σε ερωτήσεις δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει σημαντικά κέρδη απόδοσης σε διάφορες γραμμές βάσης νευρωνικών μοντέλων από την άποψη των μετρήσεων πολλαπλής αξιολόγησης.', 'hu': 'Az egyetemi felvételi vizsgák kérdéseinek megválaszolása (Gaokao kínaiul) kihívást jelentő AI feladat, mivel hatékony reprezentációt igényel a kérdések és válaszok közötti bonyolult szemantikai kapcsolatok rögzítéséhez. Ebben a munkában egy hibrid neurális modellt javasolunk a történelmi vizsgálatok mélyreható kérdésekre. Modellünk egy kooperatív, zárt neurális hálózatot alkalmaz a válaszok lekérésére egy neurális turing gép címkéző segítségével. Empirikus tanulmányok azt mutatják, hogy a címkéző csak egy kis képzési adatkészlettel működik jól, és a gated mechanizmus jó a hosszú válaszok szemantikai ábrázolásában. A kérdések megválaszolására irányuló kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell jelentős teljesítménynövekedést ér el a különböző neurális modell alapvető értékelési mutatói szempontjából.', 'it': "Rispondere alle domande degli esami di ammissione universitari (Gaokao in cinese) è un compito di intelligenza artificiale impegnativo poiché richiede una rappresentazione efficace per catturare complicate relazioni semantiche tra domande e risposte. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un modello neurale ibrido per compiti profondi di risposta alle domande da esami storici. Il nostro modello utilizza una rete neurale gated cooperativa per recuperare le risposte con l'aiuto di etichette extra fornite da un etichettatore neurale turing machine. Uno studio empirico mostra che l'etichettatore funziona bene solo con un piccolo set di dati di formazione e il meccanismo gated è bravo a recuperare la rappresentazione semantica di risposte lunghe. Esperimenti sulla risposta alle domande dimostrano che il modello proposto ottiene notevoli guadagni di performance rispetto ai vari modelli neurali di base in termini di metriche di valutazione multiple.", 'lt': 'Atsakymas į universitetų priėmimo egzaminų klausimus (Gaokao kinų kalba) yra sudėtinga AI užduotis, nes reikalingas veiksmingas atstovavimas, kad būtų užfiksuoti sudėtingi semantiniai klausimų ir atsakymų santykiai. Šiame darbe siūlome hibridinį neurologinį model į, skirtą giliai atsakyti į klausimus iš istorijos egzaminų. Mūsų modelis naudoja kooperatyvų vartų nervų tinklą, kad gautų atsakymus naudodamas papildomas etiketes, kurias suteikia nervų smegenų mašinos etiketė. Empirinis tyrimas rodo, kad etiketė gerai veikia tik su nedideliu mokymo duomenų rinkiniu, o vartų mechanizmas gerai padeda gauti semantinį ilgų atsakymų pateikimą. Atsakymų į klausimus eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomas modelis gauna didelį rezultatų pagerėjimą, palyginti su įvairiomis nervinių modelių bazinėmis linijomis, vertinant įvairius vertinimo rodiklius.', 'kk': 'Университеттік кіріс сынақтарындағы сұрақтардың жауап беру (Қытайда Гаокао) деген жауап беру - көпшілікті AI тапсырмасы, себебі оның сұрақтар мен жауаптар арасындағы көпшілікті семантикалы Бұл жұмыс ішінде, тарихтың тексеруден түсінікті сұрақ жауап беретін тапсырманың гибридті невралдық моделін ұсынамыз. Біздің үлгіміз невралдық туринг машинаның жарлығына келтірілген қосымша жарлықтар көмегімен жауаптарды алу үшін көмектесетін невралдық желімізді қолданады. Империялық зерттеулері тек кішкентай оқыту деректер қорымен жақсы жұмыс істейді, және біріктірілген механизм ұзындық жауаптардың semantiкалық түрін алу үшін жақсы жұмыс істейді. Сұрақ жауап беру туралы тәжірибелері ұсынылған моделінің бірнеше оқу метрикалық түрлі невралдық моделінің негізгі жолдарына көп жауап береді.', 'mk': 'Одговорот на прашањата од универзитетските испитувања за прием (Гаокао на кинески) е предизвикувачка задача на ИИ, бидејќи бара ефикасна претстава за зафатување на комплицираните семантични односи помеѓу прашањата и одговорите. Во оваа работа, предложуваме хибриден нервен модел за длабоко одговорување на прашања од историските испитувања. Нашиот модел употребува соработка на портата на нервната мрежа за да добие одговори со помош на дополнителни етикети дадени од нервната машина за туринг. Империската студија покажува дека означувачот функционира добро со само мал набор на податоци за обука и механизмот на вратата е добар во добивањето семантична претстава на долги одговори. Experiments on question answering demonstrate the proposed model obtains substantial performance gains over various neural model baselines in terms of multiple evaluation metrics.', 'ms': 'Jawaban soalan dari ujian penerimaan universiti (Gaokao dalam bahasa Cina) adalah tugas AI yang mencabar kerana ia memerlukan perwakilan yang efektif untuk menangkap hubungan semantik yang rumit antara soalan dan jawapan. Dalam kerja ini, kami melamar model saraf hibrid untuk tugas jawapan soalan dalam dari pemeriksaan sejarah. Model kami menggunakan rangkaian saraf gerbang kerjasama untuk mendapatkan jawapan dengan bantuan label tambahan yang diberikan oleh label mesin turing saraf. kajian empirik menunjukkan bahawa label berfungsi dengan baik dengan hanya set data latihan kecil dan mekanisme gerbang adalah baik untuk mendapatkan perwakilan semantik jawapan panjang. Eksperimen dalam menjawab soalan menunjukkan model yang direncanakan mendapatkan keuntungan prestasi yang besar atas garis dasar model saraf berbilang dalam terma metrik penilaian berbilang.', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet mill-eżamijiet ta’ ammissjoni universitarja (Gaokao biċ-Ċiniż) hija kompitu ta’ AI ta’ sfida peress li jeħtieġ rappreżentanza effettiva biex jinqabdu relazzjonijiet semantiċi kumplikati bejn mistoqsijiet u tweġibiet. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu mudell newrali ibridu għal kompitu ta’ tweġiba profonda għall-mistoqsijiet mill-eżamijiet tal-istorja. Il-mudell tagħna juża netwerk newrali bil-gated kooperattiv biex jikseb tweġibiet bl-għajnuna ta’ tikketti addizzjonali mogħtija minn tikkettatur tal-magna tat-turing newrali. Studju empiriku juri li t-tikkettatur jaħdem tajjeb biss b’sett żgħir ta’ dejta dwar it-taħriġ u l-mekkaniżmu miftuħ huwa tajjeb biex jikseb ir-rappreżentazzjoni semantika ta’ tweġibiet twal. L-esperimenti dwar it-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet juru li l-mudell propost jikseb kisbiet sostanzjali fil-prestazzjoni fuq diversi linji bażi tal-mudell newrali f’termini ta’ metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni multipla.', 'no': 'Svar spørsmål frå universitetsadmissisjonseksamen (Gaokao i kinesisk) er eit vanskeleg AI-oppgåve sidan det krev effektivt representasjon for å ta inn kompliserte semantiske forhold mellom spørsmål og svar. I dette arbeidet foreslår vi ein hybrid neuralmodell for dyp spørsmål-svarande oppgåve frå historiske eksaminasjonar. Modellen vårt brukar eit samarbeidsflate neuralnettverk for å henta svar med hjelp av ekstra merkelappar gjeve av ein neuralnettverk. Empirical study viser at merkelappen fungerer bra med berre ein liten opplæringsdataset, og den gated mekanismen er bra å henta semantisk representasjon av lengde svar. Eksperiment om spørsmålssvar viser at den foreslåde modellen får stor utvikling over ulike neuralmodellebaselinjer i form av fleire evalueringsmetrikar.', 'mn': 'Их сургуулийн хүлээн авах шалгалтын асуултуудын хариулт (Хятадын Гаокао) бол маш хэцүү AI-ын ажил, учир нь асуултууд болон хариултын хоорондын төвөгтэй semantic харилцааны тусламжтай харилцаа гаргах хэрэгтэй байдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид түүхийн шалгалтын гүн гүнзгий асуулт асуух үйл явцын гибрид сэтгэл зүйн загварыг санал болгож байна. Бидний загвар нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн машины лаблерээр өгөгдсөн нэмэлт лаблерүүдийн хариултыг авахын тулд хамтран ажилладаг мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашигладаг. Эзэвсгийн судалгаагаар Лейблер нь зөвхөн жижиг сургалтын өгөгдлийн сантай сайн ажилладаг ба хамтын механизм нь урт хариултын semantic илэрхийлэл авах нь сайн юм. Хариултын хариултын туршилтууд санал өгсөн загвар нь олон тооцоололтын метрикийн хувьд олон мэдрэлийн загварын суурь шугам дээр үндсэн үйл ажиллагааг ашигладаг.', 'ml': 'യൂണിവേഴ്സിറ്റിയില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ചരിത്ര പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ആഴത്തിലെ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല ഞങ്ങളുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു സഹകരിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d ലേബറിന്\u200dറെ സഹായം കൊണ്ട് ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കാന്\u200d വേണ എമിരിക്കല്\u200d പഠനം കാണിക്കുന്നത് ലേബിലര്\u200d ഒരു ചെറിയ ട്രെയിനിങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് മാത്രമേ നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നുള്ളൂ എന്ന ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്റെ സാധാരണ പ്രകടനത്തിന് കിട്ടുന്നതാണ് വ്യത്യസ്', 'pl': 'Odpowiedź na pytania z egzaminów przyjęciowych uniwersyteckich (Gaokao w języku chińskim) jest trudnym zadaniem AI, ponieważ wymaga skutecznej reprezentacji w celu uchwycenia skomplikowanych relacji semantycznych między pytaniami a odpowiedziami. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy hybrydowy model neuronowy do głębokiego odpowiadania na pytania z badań historii. Nasz model wykorzystuje współpracującą sieć neuronową, aby pobierać odpowiedzi za pomocą dodatkowych etykiet nadanych przez maszynę do etykietowania neuronalną. Badania empiryczne pokazują, że etykieta dobrze działa tylko z małym zbiorem danych treningowych, a mechanizm gated jest dobry w pobieraniu semantycznej reprezentacji długich odpowiedzi. Eksperymenty dotyczące odpowiedzi na pytania wykazują, że proponowany model uzyskuje znaczący wzrost wydajności w stosunku do różnych linii bazowych modeli neuronowych pod względem wielu wskaźników oceny.', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări de la examenele de admitere universitară (Gaokao în chineză) este o sarcină provocatoare AI, deoarece necesită o reprezentare eficientă pentru a capta relațiile semantice complicate dintre întrebări și răspunsuri. În această lucrare, propunem un model neural hibrid pentru sarcini profunde de răspuns la întrebări din examinările istorice. Modelul nostru utilizează o rețea neurală cooperativă gated pentru a obține răspunsuri cu ajutorul etichetelor suplimentare oferite de o mașină de etichetare neurală turing. Studiul empiric arată că etichetatorul funcționează bine doar cu un set de date de formare mic, iar mecanismul gated este bun la obținerea reprezentării semantice a răspunsurilor lungi. Experimentele privind răspunsul la întrebări demonstrează că modelul propus obține câștiguri substanțiale de performanță față de diferite modele de bază neurale în termeni de valori multiple de evaluare.', 'sr': 'Odgovor na pitanja iz ispita prijema univerziteta (Gaokao na kineskom jeziku) je izazovni zadatak AI-a jer zahteva učinkovito predstavljanje da uhvati komplikovane semantičke odnose između pitanja i odgovora. U ovom poslu predlažemo hibridni neuralni model za duboko odgovorno pitanje iz istorijskih ispitivanja. Naš model zapošljava kooperativnu neuralnu mrežu da bi dobio odgovore uz pomoć dodatnih etiketa koje je dao etiketa neuralnog turiranja. Empirička studija pokazuje da etiketa dobro funkcioniše samo sa malim podacima obuke, a prikupljeni mehanizam je dobar u donošenju semantičkog predstavljanja dužih odgovora. Eksperimenti na odgovoru na pitanje pokazuju da predloženi model dobija značajne dobitke učinkovitosti nad različitim osnovnim linijama neuralnog modela u smislu višestruke procjene metrike.', 'si': 'විශ්වාස්ත්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (චීනි වල Gaocao) නිසා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරතිච්නයක මේ වැඩේ අපි ඉතිහාස පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් වෙනුවෙන් හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් න්\u200dයුර අපේ මෝඩල් එක්ක සහයෝගයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල් ටුරින් මැෂින් ලේබලර් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලබාගන්න ප්\u200dරතිච ඉම්පිරිකාලික අධ්\u200dයානය පෙන්වන්නේ ලේබලර් හොඳට වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ පොඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalaha laga jawaabo imtixaanka aqbalka jaamacadda (Gaokao oo ku qoran Shiino) waa shaqo dhibaato leh, sababtoo ah waxay u baahan tahay wakiil faa’iido ah si ay u qabsato xiriirka adag ee su'aalaha iyo jawaabaha. Markaas waxan waxaynu sameynaynaa model naxaas ah oo ku saabsan su'aalo aad u weyn baaritaanka taariikhda. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu shaqaynayaa shabakad wadajir ah oo kooxa ah si uu jawaabo ugu hesho kaalmada alaabta dheeraad ee lagu siiyo alaabta qalabka cayilnaanta ah. Waxbarashada jimicsiga ah wuxuu muujiyaa in calaamaddu uu si wanaagsan u shaqeeyo oo kaliya macluumaad yar oo waxbarasho ah iyo mekaniisada lagu hagayo uu sameynayo jawaabaha dhererka ah. Imtixaanka ku saabsan jawaabta su'aalaha waxay muuqataa modelka la soo jeeday inuu helo bandhig aad u weyn oo ka kordha saldhigyada muusikada neurada oo kala duduwan sida qaab kala duduwan oo kale.", 'sv': 'Att svara på frågor från antagningsprov vid universitet (Gaokao på kinesiska) är en utmanande AI-uppgift eftersom det kräver effektiv representation för att fånga komplicerade semantiska relationer mellan frågor och svar. I detta arbete föreslår vi en hybrid neural modell för djupgående frågesvarsuppgifter från historieundersökningar. Vår modell använder ett kooperativt gated neuralt nätverk för att hämta svar med hjälp av extra etiketter som ges av en neural turing maskin märkning. Empirisk studie visar att etiketten fungerar bra med endast ett litet träningsdataset och gated mekanismen är bra på att hämta den semantiska representationen av långa svar. Experiment på frågesvar visar att den föreslagna modellen uppnår betydande prestandaförbättringar jämfört med olika neurala modellbaselines i termer av flera utvärderingsmetoder.', 'ta': 'பல்கலைவியல் ஒப்புக்கொள்ளும் சோதனைகளில் இருந்து கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் (சீனாவில் காயோகே) ஒரு சவாலிக்கும் AI செயலாகும் ஏனெனில் அது கேள்வி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் வரலாற்று பரிசோதனைகளில் இருந்து ஆழமான கேள்வி பதில் செய்யும் பணிக்கு ஒரு ஹைப்ரி புதிய ப எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒரு துணை திருப்பும் இயந்திரம் குறியீட்டின் உதவி கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ள கூடுதல் சிட்டிகள் மூலம் விடைகளை பெற வேண்டும். சிறிய பயிற்சியின் தகவல் அமைப்புடன் மட்டும் நன்றாக செயல்படுகிறது மற்றும் குறிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையை நீண்ட விடைகளின் குறிப்பிட்ட கேள்விக்கு பதில் கொடுக்கப்படும் சோதனைகள் தெரிவிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி பெரிய செயல்பாடு பெறுகிறது பல மதிப்பிடும் மெட்ரிக்காக பல முறைகள', 'ur': 'یونیورسیٹ کے اعتراف امتحان کے سوال جواب دینے کا ایک مشکل AI کا کام ہے کیونکہ اس کے لئے سؤال اور جواب کے درمیان پیچیدہ سیمانٹی رابطہ حاصل کرنے کی ضرورت ہے۔ اس کام میں ہم نے تاریخ امتحان سے ایک ہیبراڈ نیورل موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے۔ ہماری مدل ایک نیورل ترینگ ماشین لیبلر کے ذریعے اضافہ لابلوں کی مدد کے ساتھ جواب حاصل کرنے کے لئے ایک مشارکت گیٹ نیورل نیٹ ورک کا استعمال کرتا ہے. امپراتیکی تحقیق دکھاتا ہے کہ لابلر صرف ایک چھوٹی ترینس ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ بہتر کام کرتا ہے اور گٹ ڈیٹ مکانیسم بہتر ہے کہ طویل جواب کے سیمنٹی تصویر حاصل کرنے کے لئے۔ سؤال کے جواب کے بارے میں تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی موڈل بہت سی ارزش متریک کے مطابق مختلف نئورل موڈل بنسل لینوں پر بہت زیادہ فعالیت حاصل کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Javob berish university admission exams (Xitoycha Gaokao) javob beradi, chunki u savollar va javoblar orasidagi murakkab semantik aloqalarni qabul qilish kerak. Bu ishda, biz tarixi tahrircharidan juda qiyin javob beruvchi vazifani hisoblash uchun hybrid neyrolik modelini davom etishimiz. Bizning modelimiz bir qo'shilgan neyrolik tarmoqni ishlatadi, bir necha tarmoq yordamida qo'shimcha lab yordam yordam bilan javob olish uchun. Empirik taʼminlovchisi esa, tugmalar faqat kichkina taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar tarkibi bilan yaxshi ishlayapti va qisqa javoblarni ajratishga juda yaxshi. Name", 'vi': 'Trả lời các câu hỏi từ các bài kiểm tra nhập học đại học (Gaokao in Trung Quốc) là nhiệm vụ khó khăn vì cần có sự đại diện hiệu quả để nắm bắt quan hệ theo ngữ nghĩa phức tạp giữa câu hỏi và câu trả lời. Trong công trình này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình thần kinh nhân tạo để trả lời câu hỏi sâu từ các kiểm tra lịch sử. Mô hình của chúng tôi sử dụng một mạng lưới thần kinh lập phương để lấy câu trả lời bằng sự hỗ trợ của các nhãn khác được trao bởi một máy móc tạo hoá thần kinh. Các nghiên cứu quét bụi cho thấy rằng "thợ làm việc rất tốt" chỉ với một bộ dữ liệu huấn luyện nhỏ và cơ chế chui rất tốt để tìm ra các câu trả lời dài theo ngữ pháp. Những thử nghiệm trả lời câu hỏi cho thấy mô hình đã đề nghị đạt được hiệu suất tăng lớn trên các thiết bị dựa trên các mô hình thần kinh khác nhau theo dạng đo đa lượng đánh giá.', 'bg': 'Отговарянето на въпроси от университетски приемни изпити (Гаокао на китайски) е предизвикателна задача по изкуствен интелект, тъй като изисква ефективно представяне, за да улови сложни семантични отношения между въпроси и отговори. В тази работа предлагаме хибриден невронен модел за задълбочено задаване на въпроси от изследвания по история. Нашият модел използва кооперативна затворена невронна мрежа за извличане на отговори с помощта на допълнителни етикети, дадени от етикетираща машина за невронно туризиране. Емпирично изследване показва, че етикетерът работи добре само с малък набор от данни за обучение и затвореният механизъм е добър в извличането на семантичното представяне на дълги отговори. Експериментите с отговор на въпроси показват, че предложеният модел постига значителни подобрения на производителността в сравнение с различни базови линии на невронния модел по отношение на множество показатели за оценка.', 'hr': 'Odgovor na pitanja iz ispitivanja prijema univerziteta (Gaokao na kineskom jeziku) je izazovni zadatak AI-a jer zahtijeva učinkovito predstavljanje da uhvati komplikovane semantičke odnose između pitanja i odgovora. U ovom poslu predlažemo hibridni neuralni model za duboko odgovarajući odgovor na pitanje iz istorijskih ispitivanja. Naš model upotrebljava saradnju prikupljenu neuralnu mrežu kako bi dobila odgovore uz pomoć dodatnih etiketa koje je dao etiketa neuralnog turiranja. Empiričko ispitivanje pokazuje da etiketa dobro funkcionira samo sa malim podacima obuke, a prikupljeni mehanizam je dobar u donošenju semantičkog predstavljanja dužih odgovora. Iskusi na odgovoru na pitanje pokazuju da je predloženi model dobio značajne dobitke učinkovitosti nad različitim osnovnim linijama neuronskog modela u smislu višestruke procjene metrike.', 'da': 'Besvarelse af spørgsmål fra universitetsoptagelseseksamener (Gaokao på kinesisk) er en udfordrende AI-opgave, da det kræver effektiv repræsentation for at fange komplicerede semantiske relationer mellem spørgsmål og svar. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en hybrid neural model til dyb spørgsmål-besvarelse opgave fra historieundersøgelser. Vores model anvender et kooperativt gated neural netværk til at hente svar ved hjælp af ekstra etiketter givet af en neural turing maskine label. Empirisk undersøgelse viser, at mærkeren fungerer godt med kun et lille træningsdatasæt, og gated mekanismen er god til at hente den semantiske repræsentation af langvarige svar. Eksperimenter med spørgsmål besvarelse viser, at den foreslåede model opnår betydelige præstationsgevinster i forhold til forskellige neurale model baselines i form af flere evalueringsmetrics.', 'nl': 'Het beantwoorden van vragen van universitaire toelatingsexamens (Gaokao in het Chinees) is een uitdagende AI-taak omdat het effectieve representatie vereist om ingewikkelde semantische relaties tussen vragen en antwoorden vast te leggen. In dit werk stellen we een hybride neuraal model voor voor diepe vragen beantwoordende taken uit geschiedenisonderzoek. Ons model maakt gebruik van een coöperatief gated neural network om antwoorden op te vragen met behulp van extra labels gegeven door een neural turing machine labeler. Empirisch onderzoek toont aan dat de labeler goed werkt met slechts een kleine trainingsdataset en het gated mechanisme goed is in het ophalen van de semantische representatie van lange antwoorden. Experimenten op het beantwoorden van vragen tonen aan dat het voorgestelde model aanzienlijke prestatiewinsten behaalt over verschillende neurale model baselines in termen van meerdere evaluatie metrics.', 'de': 'Die Beantwortung von Fragen aus Hochschulzulassungspr羹fungen (Gaokao auf Chinesisch) ist eine herausfordernde KI-Aufgabe, da sie eine effektive Repr瓣sentation erfordert, um komplizierte semantische Beziehungen zwischen Fragen und Antworten zu erfassen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein hybrides neuronales Modell f羹r tiefe Fragestellungen aus historischen Untersuchungen vor. Unser Modell verwendet ein kooperatives gated neuronales Netzwerk, um Antworten mit Hilfe von zus瓣tzlichen Labels abzurufen, die von einem neuronalen Turing-Maschinenetikettierer gegeben werden. Empirische Studien zeigen, dass der Labeler mit nur einem kleinen Trainingsdatensatz gut funktioniert und der Gated Mechanismus gut darin ist, die semantische Repr瓣sentation von langen Antworten abzurufen. Experimente zur Beantwortung von Fragen zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell erhebliche Leistungszuw瓣chse 羹ber verschiedene neuronale Modellbaselines in Bezug auf multiple Evaluationsmetriken erzielt.', 'id': 'Jawab pertanyaan dari ujian penerimaan universitas (Gaokao dalam bahasa Cina) adalah tugas AI yang menantang karena memerlukan representation efektif untuk menangkap hubungan semantis rumit antara pertanyaan dan jawaban. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan model saraf hibrid untuk tugas menjawab pertanyaan dalam dari pemeriksaan sejarah. Model kami menggunakan jaringan saraf gerbang kooperatif untuk mendapatkan jawaban dengan bantuan dari label ekstra yang diberikan oleh mesin pengiriman saraf label. Studi kerajaan menunjukkan bahwa label bekerja dengan baik dengan hanya sebuah set data pelatihan kecil dan mekanisme gerbang baik untuk mendapatkan perwakilan semantis jawaban panjang. Eksperimen dalam menjawab pertanyaan menunjukkan model yang diusulkan mendapatkan keuntungan penting atas berbagai garis dasar model saraf dalam terma metrik evaluasi berbilang.', 'ko': '대학 입시(중국어 수능)에 대한 질문에 대답하는 것은 도전적인 인공지능 임무이다. 왜냐하면 문제와 답안 사이의 복잡한 의미 관계를 포착하기 위해 효과적인 표시가 필요하기 때문이다.이 작업에서 우리는 역사 시험의 심도 있는 문답 임무에 사용되는 혼합신경 모델을 제시했다.우리의 모형은 합작된 문 제어 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 신경 그래픽 탭이 제공하는 추가 탭을 통해 답을 검색한다.실증 연구에 의하면 라벨기는 비교적 작은 훈련 데이터 집합에서만 잘 작동하고 선택 메커니즘은 지루한 답안의 의미 표시를 잘 얻을 수 있다.퀴즈 실험에 따르면 각종 신경모델 기선에 비해 이 모델은 여러 평가 지표 방면에서 현저한 성능 향상을 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Jibu maswali kutoka kwenye majaribio ya kujiunga na chuo kikuu (Gaokao nchini China) ni kazi ya changamoto ya AI kwa sababu inahitaji kuwakilisha ufanisi wa kushika mahusiano magumu kati ya maswali na majibu. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza muundo wa ubongo wa mahindi kwa ajili ya kazi ya kujibu maswali ya kina kutoka kwenye uchunguzi wa historia. Mfano wetu unatumia mtandao wa ushirikiano ulioenezwa na neura ili kupata majibu kwa msaada wa mabango ya ziada iliyotolewa na maabara ya vifaa vya kiuchumi. Utafiti wa kipekee unaonyesha kuwa mabango yanafanya kazi vizuri na seti ndogo tu ya mafunzo na mfumo uliotumiwa ni vizuri katika kupata uwakilishi wa sekunde wa majibu ya muda mrefu. Majaribio kuhusu majibu ya maswali yanaonyesha muundo unaopendekezwa unapata ufanisi mkubwa unaopata zaidi ya mistari mbalimbali ya mifumo ya neura kwa namna ya mbinu mbalimbali za uchunguzi.', 'fa': 'پاسخ دادن سوالات از آزمایش اعتراف دانشگاه (Gaokao in Chinese) یک کار AI سخت است، زیرا نیاز به نمایش موثری برای گرفتن رابطه\u200cهای طبیعی پیچیده بین سوالات و جواب است. در این کار، ما یک مدل عصبی hybrid برای پاسخ\u200cجواب عمیق از امتحان تاریخ پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. مدل ما یک شبکه عصبی همکاری را استفاده می\u200cکند تا با کمک برچسب اضافه\u200cای که توسط یک برچسب ماشین تورینگ عصبی داده می\u200cشود جواب\u200cها را برگیرد. مطالعه امپراتیک نشان می دهد که برچسب فقط با یک مجموعه اطلاعات آموزش کوچک کار می کند و مکانیسم جمع شدن به رسیدن نمایش semantic از پاسخهای طولانی خوب است. تجربه\u200cهای پاسخ سوال نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد به عنوان متریک\u200cهای متعدد ارزیابی به عنوان پایه\u200cهای متعدد مدل عصبی بیشتری پیدا می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Uniwersitet administraciýasyndan soraglary jogap bermek (Çin çe Gaokao) hem kynçylyk AI işidir, sebäbi soraglaryň we jogaplaryň arasyndaky semantik baglaşyklaryny almak üçin täsirli bir temel gerek. Bu işde, geçmişiň synaglaryndan çykan soraglary jogaplary üçin hybrid näral nusgasyny teklip edip bilýäris. Biziň modelimiz neural törenme maşynynyň etiketlerinden berilen ekstra etiketleriň jogaplaryny almak üçin birleşmäge gatnaýan netral şebekesini işleýär. Imetrik öwrenmek şol etiketleriň diňe kiçi okuw sanatynda gowy işleýändigini görkezýär we gatlanmış mehanizmiň semantik jogabalaryň uly täsirini almakda gowy. Soragyň jogap bermegi ukyp eden örän nusgalar teklip eden nusgalaryň birnäçe deňleme metriklerine görä örän täsirli ukyplary gazanýar.', 'am': 'የዩንቨርስቲ አቀማመጥ ፈተና መልስ (በቻይናዊ ጋኦኮ) የሚደረገው የኢ.আই ስራ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ ታሪክ ፈተና የጥልቅ ጥያቄ መልስ አድራጊ የኬብሪድ የናቡር ሞዴል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን በጨማሪ መሣሪያው የሳንሱር መሳሪያ ምልክት ማግኘት የጠቅላዊ የናውሬል መረብ ይሠራል፡፡ የኢሜሪካዊ ትምህርት ብሔራዊው የደረጃ ማህበረሰብ ጥቂት ትምህርት ማድረግ ብቻ ሲሠራ የሚያሳየው እና የግል ሙዚቃ የረጅም መልስ መልስ ማግኘት መልካም ነው፡፡ የጥያቄ መልስ ላይ ፈተናዎች በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በብዙ አስተያየት ማተሚያዎች ላይ የናውሬል ሞዴል መደብ መደገፊያዎችን እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Antwoord vrae van universiteit-admissie-eksamens (Gaokao in Sjinese) is 'n pragtige AI-taak omdat dit effektief voorstelling nodig om kompliseerde semantiese verwantings tussen vrae en antwoorde te vang. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n hibride neurale model vir diep vraag-antwoord taak van geskiedenis eksaminasies. Ons model gebruik 'n cooperative gated neuralnetwerk om antwoorde te kry met die hulp van ekstra etikette gegee deur 'n neurale touring masjien etiketeerder. Enigeriese studie wys dat die etiket goed werk met slegs 'n klein onderwerp datastel en die gated mekanisme is goed om die semantiese voorstelling van lengte antwoorde te haal. Eksperimente op vraag antwoord bevestig dat die voorgestelde model beteken betekende prestasie verkry oor verskeie neurale model basisline in terms of multiple evaluation metrics.", 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve nga provimet e pranimit të universitetit (Gaokao në kinez) është një detyrë sfiduese e AI pasi kërkon përfaqësim efektiv për të kapur marrëdhënie të ndërlikuara semantike midis pyetjeve dhe përgjigjeve. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një model nervor hibridë për detyrën e thellë që përgjigjet pyetjeve nga ekzaminat e historisë. Modeli ynë përdorë një rrjet nervor të bashkëpunuar për të marrë përgjigje me ndihmën e etiketave shtesë të dhëna nga një etiketës i makinave nervore. Studimi perandor tregon se etiketori punon mirë me vetëm një set të vogël të dhënash treinimi dhe mekanizmi i derës është i mirë në marrjen e përfaqësimit semantik të përgjigjeve të gjata. Eksperimentet mbi përgjigjen e pyetjeve demonstrojnë se modeli i propozuar merr fitime thelbësore të performancës mbi linjat bazë të ndryshme të modelit nervor lidhur me metrikat e vlerësimit të shumëfishtë.', 'bn': 'বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের প্রবেশ পরীক্ষা থেকে প্রশ্নের উত্তর হচ্ছে (চীনের গাওকো) একটি চ্যালেঞ্জালাঞ্জিত কাজ, কারণ প্রশ্ন ও উত্তরের মধ্যে জটিল সেমা এই কাজে আমরা ইতিহাস পরীক্ষা থেকে গভীর প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য একটি হাইব্রিদ নিউরেল মডেল প্রস্তাব করি। আমাদের মডেল একটি সহযোগিতা নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক চালাচ্ছে যাতে একটি নিউরুল টার্নিং মেশিন ল্যাবেলার দ্বারা প্রদান করা এক বাড়ির লেবেলের সামাজিক গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছে যে লেবেলার শুধুমাত্র একটি ছোট ট্রেনিং ডাটাসেটের সাথে ভাল কাজ করে এবং গেট করা মেক্সিমেনিস দীর্ঘ উত্তর প্রশ্নের উত্তরে প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের বিভিন্ন নিউরেল মডেলের বেসারে প্রাপ্ত পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন মোডেলের বেসাইনের মাধ', 'hy': 'Համալսարանի ընդունման քննությունների հարցերին պատասխանելը (Չինաստանում Գաոկա) դժվար է ԱԲ-ի առաջադրանքը, քանի որ այն պահանջում է արդյունավետ ներկայացում, որպեսզի ընդունենք բարդ սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունները հարցերի և պատասխանների միջև Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք հիբրիդ նյարդային մոդել պատմության ուսումնասիրություններից խորը հարցերին պատասխանող խնդիրների համար: Մեր մոդելը օգտագործում է համագործակցական նյարդային ցանց, որպեսզի ստանանք պատասխաններ, օգտագործելով ավելին պիտակներ, որոնք տրվում են նյարդային արտադրող մեքենայի պիտակների կողմից: Իմպրիկական ուսումնասիրությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ պիտակները լավ են աշխատում միայն փոքր ուսումնասիրության տվյալների համակարգի հետ, իսկ պլատային մեխանիզմը լավ է երկար պատասխանների սեմանտիկ ներկայացումը ստանալու համար: Experiments on question answering demonstrate the proposed model obtains substantial performance gains over various neural model baselines in terms of multiple evaluation metrics.', 'az': 'Universitetə giriş sınaqlarından soruşmaq (Çincə Gaokao) mükəmməl bir AI işidir, çünki soruları və cavabları arasındakı karmaşık semantik əlaqələri tutmaq üçün faydalı göstəriş lazımdır. Bu işdə, tarihi sınaqlarından çəkilən çətin sual cavab verən iş üçün hibrid nöral modeli təklif edirik. Bizim modellərimiz neural turing makinesi etiketindən verilən ekstra etiketlərin cavablarını almaq üçün birləşdirilmiş bir nöral şəbəkəsini istifadə edir. Empirical study shows that the labeler works only with a small training data set and the gated mechanism is good at getting the semantic representation of the long answers. Suğul cavabı təcrübəsi model in in çoxlu değerlendirmə metriklərinin müqabilində müxtəlif nöral modellərin səhifələrində çoxlu təcrübə qazandığını göstərir.', 'bs': 'Odgovor na pitanja iz ispita prijema univerziteta (Gaokao na kineskom jeziku) je izazovni zadatak AI-a jer zahtijeva učinkovito predstavljanje da uhvati komplikovane semantičke odnose između pitanja i odgovora. U ovom poslu predlažemo hibridni neuralni model za duboko odgovarajući zadatak iz istorijskih ispitivanja. Naš model zapošljava kooperativnu neuralnu mrežu kako bi dobili odgovore uz pomoć dodatnih etiketa koje je dao etiketa neuralnog turiranja. Empirička studija pokazuje da je etiketa dobro radila samo sa malim podacima obuke, a prikupljeni mehanizam je dobar u donošenju semantičkog predstavljanja dužih odgovora. Eksperimenti na odgovoru na pitanje pokazuju da predloženi model dobija značajne dobitke učinkovitosti nad različitim osnovnim linijama neuralnog modela u smislu višestruke procjene metrike.', 'ca': "Respondre a preguntes dels exàmens d'admissió universitària (Gaokao en xinès) és una tasca d'AI difícil perquè requereix una representació efectiva per capturar relacions semàntiques complicades entre preguntes i respostes. En aquesta feina, proposem un model neural híbrid per respondre profundament a preguntes a partir d'exàmens històrics. El nostre model utilitza una xarxa neural portada cooperativa per a obtenir respostes amb l'ajuda d'etiquetes adicionals proporcionades per un etiquetador de màquines neurals. L'estudi empíric mostra que l'etiquetador funciona bé amb només un petit conjunt de dades d'entrenament i el mecanisme portat és bon en obtenir la representació semàntica de les llargues respostes. Experiments on question answering demonstrate the proposed model obtains substantial performance gains over various neural model baselines in terms of multiple evaluation metrics.", 'fi': 'Yliopiston valintakokeiden kysymyksiin vastaaminen (Gaokao kiinaksi) on haastava tekoälytehtävä, koska se vaatii tehokasta edustusta monimutkaisten semanttisten suhteiden tallentamiseksi kysymysten ja vastausten välillä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme hybridi-neuromallia syvään kysymyksiin vastaamiseen historiantutkimuksista. Mallimme käyttää yhteistoiminnallista suljettua neuroverkkoa vastausten hakemiseen neuroturing-koneen etiketin antamien ylimääräisten etikettien avulla. Empiirinen tutkimus osoittaa, että etiketti toimii hyvin vain pienen koulutusaineiston kanssa ja gated-mekanismi on hyvä noutamaan pitkien vastausten semanttista esitystä. Kysymyksiin vastaamiseen liittyvät kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli saavuttaa merkittäviä suorituskykyetuja erilaisten neuromallien peruslinjojen suhteen useiden arviointimetriikoiden osalta.', 'cs': 'Odpovědi na otázky z univerzitních přijímacích zkoušek (Gaokao v čínštině) je náročný úkol AI, protože vyžaduje efektivní reprezentaci pro zachycení složitých sémantických vztahů mezi otázkami a odpověďmi. V této práci navrhujeme hybridní neuronový model pro hluboké odpovědi na otázky z historických zkoušek. Náš model využívá kooperativní uzavřenou neuronovou síť k získání odpovědí za pomoci dalších štítků poskytnutých neuronovým turingovým strojem. Empirická studie ukazuje, že značkovač funguje dobře pouze s malou tréninkovou sadou dat a gated mechanismus je dobrý při získávání sémantické reprezentace dlouhých odpovědí. Experimenty na odpovědi na otázky ukazují, že navrhovaný model dosahuje významných výkonnostních zisků nad různými základními liniemi neuronových modelů z hlediska mnohočetných hodnotících metrik.', 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamine ülikooli vastuvõtueksamitelt (hiina keeles Gaokao) on keeruline AI ülesanne, kuna see nõuab tõhusat esindamist, et jäädvustada keerulised semantilised suhted küsimuste ja vastuste vahel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja hübriidneuromudeli sügava küsimustele vastamise ülesandeks ajaloouuringutest. Meie mudel kasutab koostöös suletud närvivõrku, et leida vastuseid lisamärgistuste abil, mida annab neuroturing masina märgistaja. Empiiriline uuring näitab, et märgistaja töötab hästi ainult väikese koolitusandmekogumiga ja suletud mehhanism on hea pikaajaliste vastuste semantilise esituse leidmisel. Küsimustele vastamise eksperimendid näitavad, et kavandatud mudel saavutab mitme hindamismeetodika osas märkimisväärset tulemuslikkust erinevate närvimudeli lähtejoonte võrreldes.', 'he': 'לענות על שאלות מבחני הכניסה לאוניברסיטה (Gaokao בסינית) היא משימה מאתגרת AI מאחר שהיא דורשת מייצג יעיל כדי לתפוס יחסים סמנטיים מסובכים בין שאלות ותשובות. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים מודל עצבי היברידי למשימה עמוקה לענות על שאלות מבחינות ההיסטוריה. המודל שלנו משתמש ברשת עצבית שיתוף פעולה כדי להשיג תשובות עם עזרה של תוויות נוספות שנתנו על ידי תווית מכונת מעצב עצבי. מחקר אימפריקלי מראה שהתווית עובדת היטב רק עם קבוצת מידע אימונים קטנה והמנגנון השער הוא טוב בלהשיג את מייצג הסמנטי של תשובות ארוכות. ניסויים על עניין לשאלות מראים שהמודל המוצע מקבל תרוויות ביצועים משמעותיות מעל שונים בסיסים של מודל עצבי בנוגע למטריות הערכה רבות.', 'jv': 'Wahpur-suaraning ing kang dipunanggunian Universite (Gaokao ning Cinan) kuwi mungkin karo nggunakake AI kuwi nggawe ngubah dhéwé kuwi mesthi apik dhéwé, mengko iso nggawe alam-alam sing apik karo akeh sematik dhéwé uga cara-alam lan gambarang. Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné supoyo urip-urip nêbral nggawe barang langgar-urip kuwi nggawe barang urip. model sing Workspace Getama karo kesjang respon maneh dumalaw kuwi model sing supoyo nggawe akeh bantuan nggawe barang nggawe modèl Nyural sing sampek maning, kaya ngono akeh cara-teka sing nyimpen maning.', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja z univerzitetnih sprejemnih izpitov (Gaokao v kitajščini) je zahtevna naloga umetne inteligence, saj zahteva učinkovito reprezentacijo za zajem zapletenih semantičnih odnosov med vprašanji in odgovori. V tem delu predlagamo hibridni nevronski model za nalogo globokega odgovarjanja na vprašanja iz pregledov zgodovine. Naš model uporablja sodelovalno zaprto nevronsko omrežje za pridobivanje odgovorov s pomočjo dodatnih oznak, ki jih daje označevalnik nevronskega turiranja stroja. Empirična študija kaže, da označevalec dobro deluje le z majhnim naborom podatkov o usposabljanju, zaprti mehanizem pa je dober pri iskanju semantične predstavitve dolgih odgovorov. Eksperimenti na področju odgovarjanja na vprašanja kažejo, da predlagani model doseže znatno povečanje učinkovitosti v primerjavi z različnimi osnovnimi vrsticami nevronskih modelov v smislu več meritev vrednotenja.', 'ha': 'Ina karɓa wa tambayi daga jarrabi masu shigar a university na shigar da shi (Gaokao cikin China) yana mai walau da aikin AI, kwani yana nufin ya riƙi muhimmada mai inganci dõmin ya kãma danganta masu husũma masu adadi a tsakanin tambayar da jibar. In this work, we propose a hybrid neural model for deep question-answering task from history examinations.  MisalinMu yana amfani da wani zanen samaki mai haɗa neural dõmin ya sami majibu da taimakon alama ƙaranci wanda aka bai wa na zane mai kwamfyuta. Empirical research na nũna cewa label yana aiki mai kyau tãre da danna mai ƙaranci kawai kuma na gyara da ake haɗa matsayin da ya sami mutane da jibar tsawo. Tajararin da ke karɓa wa tambaya na nuna misalin wanda aka bukatar da shi yana da babban rabo a kan salon misalin misalin neural cikin misalin misãlai masu yawa.', 'bo': 'university admission exams(Gaokao)ལས་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་དོན་ལ་ལན་གསལ་བའི་ཆེད་དུ་ཅིག་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ནང་གི་དཔེ་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་སྐྱེས་པའི་མཐུན་རིམ་དཔེ་གཏོང་བྱས་པ་ཞིག་ལ། Our model employs a cooperative gated neural network to retrieve answers with the assistance of extra labels given by a neural turing machine labeler. Empirical study shows that the labels work well with only a small training dataset and the gated mechanism is good at fetching the semantic representation of lengthy answers. Experiments on question answering demonstrate the proposed model obtains substantial performance gains over various neural model baselines in terms of multiple evaluation metrics.'}
{'en': 'Few-Shot Charge Prediction with Discriminative Legal Attributes', 'ar': 'توقع رسوم رمزية بسمات قانونية تمييزية', 'es': 'Predicción de cargos de pocos disparos con atributos legales discriminativos', 'fr': "Prédiction d'accusation à faible dose avec attributs juridiques discriminants", 'pt': 'Previsão de cobrança de poucos tiros com atributos legais discriminativos', 'hi': 'भेदभावपूर्ण कानूनी विशेषताओं के साथ कुछ-शॉट चार्ज भविष्यवाणी', 'zh': '有判性法性少发电荷占', 'ja': '差別的な法的属性を持つ数少ない告発予測', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование с помощью нескольких выстрелов с дискриминирующими правовыми признаками', 'ga': 'Réamhthuar Cúraim Mhion-urchar le Tréithe Dlíthiúla Idirdhealaitheacha', 'el': 'Προβλεπόμενη κατηγορία με διακριτικά νομικά χαρακτηριστικά', 'ka': 'პატარა პატარა გადატარება დისკრიმინაციური წესტიური ატრიბუტებით', 'hu': 'Kevés lövéses töltés-előrejelzés diszkriminatív jogi attribútumokkal', 'it': 'Previsione della carica di pochi colpi con attributi legali discriminatori', 'lt': 'Mažai apkaltinimų su diskriminaciniais teisiniais požymiais prognozė', 'kk': 'Дискриминациялық юридикалық аттрибуттарымен бірнеше жүктеу бағдарламасы', 'mk': 'Предвидување на обвинение со неколку стрелања со дискриминативни правни атрибути', 'ms': 'Prediksi Akaun Beberapa Tembakan dengan Atribut Hukum Diskriminatif', 'ml': 'നിയമങ്ങളുടെ കൂടെ ചെറുതായി ഷോട്ട് ചേര്\u200dജ് മുന്\u200dഗണനം', 'mt': 'Tbassir ta’ Akkwist Ftit b’Attributi Legali Diskriminattivi', 'mn': 'Шүүмжлэх хууль шаардлагатай бага шаардлагатай төлөвлөгөө', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie niewielkiej liczby oskarżeń z dyskryminacyjnymi atrybutami prawnymi', 'ro': 'Predicția taxei cu puține lovituri cu atribute juridice discriminatorii', 'no': 'Få-skytte ladingsforhåndsvising med diskriminerte rettleg attributt', 'sr': 'Malo optužbe sa diskriminacijskim pravnim atributima', 'si': 'විශේෂ නීතිය සුදුසුම් සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'so': 'Heymiska sharciga', 'sv': 'Förutsägelse av några skott med diskriminerande juridiska attribut', 'ta': 'வித்தியாசமான சட்டு குணங்களுடன் சிறிய எழுத்து முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'تھوڑا شلیک چارج پیش بینی جنسی قانونی اثرات کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Izoh moslamalari', 'vi': 'Đặt giá trị ít người có đáng khinh', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на няколко изстрела за зареждане с дискриминационни правни атрибути', 'nl': 'Voorspelling van weinig schoten met discriminerende juridische kenmerken', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af few-Shot Charge med diskriminerende juridiske attributter', 'hr': 'Predpoklada za malo optužbe s diskriminacijskim pravnim atributima', 'de': 'Weniger-Schuss-Ladungsvorhersage mit diskriminierenden rechtlichen Attributen', 'ko': '차별적 법적 속성을 지닌 소발탄 고발 예측', 'fa': 'پیشنهاد بارگیری کمی با ویژه\u200cهای قانونی جدایی', 'id': 'Prediksi Pendakwaan Beberapa Tembakan Dengan Atribut Legal Diskriminatif', 'sw': 'Udhibiti wachache wa mashtaka na vipengele vya sheria', 'tr': 'Açmak üçin az Taýram Wagtlaýyn', 'af': 'Fet- Shot Charge Prediksie met diskriminasiewe wetlike eienskappe', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i akuzave me atribute ligjore diskriminuese', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Մի քանի բեռնման կանխատեսումը դիսկրիմատիվ իրավական առանձնահատկություններով', 'az': 'Qısqa-vuruş Tərcləyici Yaxşı Özümləri ilə Tərcləyici Tərcləyici Tərcləyici', 'bn': 'বৈষম্যিক আইনের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর সাথে কয়েকটি শোট চার্জের পছন্দ', 'bs': 'Malo optužbe sa diskriminacijskim pravnim atributima', 'cs': 'Předpověď obvinění s diskriminačními právními atributy', 'ca': 'Predicció de càrregues amb atributs legals discriminatoris', 'et': 'Mõne lasuga laengu prognoos diskrimineerivate juriidiliste atribuutidega', 'fi': 'Muutaman laukauksen latausennuste, jossa on syrjiviä oikeudellisia attribuutteja', 'jv': 'Few-shot Metrol Sagal Punctuation Punctuation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Napoved naboja z nekaj posnetki z diskriminativnimi pravnimi atributi', 'bo': 'འོད་སྲིད་བྱས་བའི་ཆོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ལྡན་མངོན་པ་ཞིག་གི་སྔོན་བསམ་བྱེད་པ', 'he': 'צפוי אשם קטן עם תווים משפטיים דיסקרמינציוניים'}
{'en': 'Automatic charge prediction aims to predict the final charges according to the fact descriptions in criminal cases and plays a crucial role in legal assistant systems. Existing works on charge prediction perform adequately on those high-frequency charges but are not yet capable of predicting few-shot charges with limited cases. Moreover, these exist many confusing charge pairs, whose fact descriptions are fairly similar to each other. To address these issues, we introduce several discriminative attributes of charges as the internal mapping between fact descriptions and charges. These attributes provide additional information for few-shot charges, as well as effective signals for distinguishing confusing charges. More specifically, we propose an attribute-attentive charge prediction model to infer the attributes and charges simultaneously. Experimental results on real-work datasets demonstrate that our proposed model achieves significant and consistent improvements than other state-of-the-art baselines. Specifically, our model outperforms other baselines by more than 50 % in the few-shot scenario. Our codes and datasets can be obtained from https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ar': 'يهدف التنبؤ التلقائي بالتهمة إلى توقع التهم النهائية وفقًا لأوصاف الحقائق في القضايا الجنائية ويلعب دورًا حاسمًا في أنظمة المساعدة القانونية. تعمل الأعمال الحالية المتعلقة بالتنبؤ بالشحنة بشكل كافٍ على تلك الشحنات عالية التردد ولكنها ليست قادرة بعد على التنبؤ بشحنات قليلة في حالات محدودة. علاوة على ذلك ، توجد العديد من أزواج الشحن المربكة ، والتي تتشابه أوصافها الحقيقية مع بعضها البعض. لمعالجة هذه المشكلات ، نقدم العديد من السمات التمييزية للرسوم مثل التعيين الداخلي بين وصف الحقائق والرسوم. توفر هذه السمات معلومات إضافية لرسوم قليلة اللقطات ، بالإضافة إلى إشارات فعالة للتمييز بين الرسوم المربكة. وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا ، نقترح نموذجًا للتنبؤ بالسمات والاهتمام بالشحنة لاستنتاج السمات والرسوم في وقت واحد. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعات بيانات العمل الحقيقي أن نموذجنا المقترح يحقق تحسينات كبيرة ومتسقة من خطوط الأساس الأخرى الحديثة. على وجه التحديد ، يتفوق نموذجنا في الأداء على خطوط الأساس الأخرى بأكثر من 50٪ في سيناريو اللقطة القليلة. يمكن الحصول على أكوادنا ومجموعات البيانات الخاصة بنا من https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'es': 'La predicción automática de cargos tiene como objetivo predecir los cargos finales de acuerdo con las descripciones de los hechos en casos penales y desempeña un papel crucial en los sistemas de asistencia legal. Los trabajos existentes sobre predicción de carga funcionan adecuadamente en esas cargas de alta frecuencia, pero aún no son capaces de predecir cargas de pocos disparos con casos limitados. Además, existen muchos pares de cargas confusos, cuyas descripciones de hechos son bastante similares entre sí. Para abordar estos problemas, introducimos varios atributos discriminatorios de los cargos como el mapeo interno entre las descripciones de los hechos y los cargos. Estos atributos proporcionan información adicional para las cargas de pocos disparos, así como señales eficaces para distinguir las cargas confusas. Más específicamente, proponemos un modelo de predicción de cargos atentos a los atributos para inferir los atributos y los cargos simultáneamente. Los resultados experimentales en conjuntos de datos de trabajo real demuestran que nuestro modelo propuesto logra mejoras significativas y consistentes en comparación con otras líneas de base de última generación. Específicamente, nuestro modelo supera a otras líneas de base en más de un 50% en el escenario de pocos disparos. Nuestros códigos y conjuntos de datos se pueden obtener en https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'fr': "La prédiction automatique des charges vise à prédire les accusations finales en fonction des descriptions de faits dans les affaires pénales et joue un rôle crucial dans les systèmes d'assistants juridiques. Les travaux existants sur la prédiction de charge donnent de bons résultats sur ces charges haute fréquence, mais ne sont pas encore capables de prédire des charges peu nombreuses dans des cas limités. De plus, il existe de nombreuses paires d'accusations déroutantes, dont les descriptions de faits sont assez similaires les unes aux autres. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous introduisons plusieurs attributs discriminants des accusations comme le mappage interne entre les descriptions de faits et les accusations. Ces attributs fournissent des informations supplémentaires pour les charges peu nombreuses, ainsi que des signaux efficaces pour distinguer les charges prêtant à confusion. Plus précisément, nous proposons un modèle de prédiction de charge attentif aux attributs pour déduire simultanément les attributs et les charges. Les résultats expérimentaux sur des ensembles de données réels démontrent que le modèle proposé apporte des améliorations significatives et cohérentes par rapport aux autres bases de référence de pointe. Plus précisément, notre modèle surpasse les autres niveaux de référence de plus de 50\xa0% dans le scénario de quelques plans. Nos codes et ensembles de données peuvent être obtenus sur https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.", 'pt': 'A previsão automática de acusações visa prever as acusações finais de acordo com as descrições dos fatos em processos criminais e desempenha um papel crucial nos sistemas de assistência jurídica. Os trabalhos existentes sobre previsão de carga funcionam adequadamente nessas cargas de alta frequência, mas ainda não são capazes de prever cargas de poucos disparos com casos limitados. Além disso, existem muitos pares de cargas confusos, cujas descrições de fatos são bastante semelhantes entre si. Para abordar essas questões, apresentamos vários atributos discriminativos de cobranças como o mapeamento interno entre descrições de fatos e cobranças. Esses atributos fornecem informações adicionais para cobranças de poucos disparos, bem como sinais eficazes para distinguir cobranças confusas. Mais especificamente, propomos um modelo de previsão de carga atento aos atributos para inferir os atributos e as cargas simultaneamente. Resultados experimentais em conjuntos de dados de trabalho real demonstram que nosso modelo proposto alcança melhorias significativas e consistentes do que outras linhas de base de última geração. Especificamente, nosso modelo supera outras linhas de base em mais de 50% no cenário de poucos tiros. Nossos códigos e conjuntos de dados podem ser obtidos em https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ja': '自動告発予測は、刑事事件における事実の説明に従って最終告発を予測することを目的としており、法務アシスタントシステムにおいて重要な役割を果たしています。 電荷予測に関する既存の作業は、それらの高周波電荷に対して十分な性能を発揮するが、限られたケースではまだ少数の電荷を予測することはできない。 さらに、これらは多くの紛らわしい電荷対として存在し、その事実の記述は互いにかなり類似している。 これらの問題に対処するために、事実の説明と請求の間の内部マッピングとして、請求のいくつかの識別的な属性を導入します。 これらの属性は、ほとんどのショットチャージの追加情報と、混乱したチャージを区別するための効果的な信号を提供します。 より具体的には、属性と電荷を同時に推論するための属性特性電荷予測モデルを提案する。 実際の作業データセットの実験結果は、提案されたモデルが他の最先端のベースラインよりも大幅かつ一貫した改善を達成していることを示しています。 具体的には、当社のモデルは、ほとんどのシナリオで他のベースラインを50%以上上回っています。 当社のコードとデータセットは、https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_chargeから入手できます。', 'zh': '自指占旨据刑狱之事以占终,于法理系统中得其要用。 今电荷占事尽于此高频电荷,而尚不能尽于有限者电荷。 此外多令人困惑电荷对,其事相似。 我们引入了费用的几个判别属性,作为事实描述和费用之间的内映。 性少电荷给额外信息,及区别混淆电荷者有效。 更具体地说,我们发出一种属性关注电荷测量模样,以同时推断属性和电荷。 实数集上实验结果表明,先进之基线一也。 具体来说者,吾形于少数镜头场中比他基线高50%以上。 吾代码数集,可得于 https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge 。', 'ru': 'Автоматическое прогнозирование обвинений направлено на прогнозирование окончательных обвинений в соответствии с описанием фактов по уголовным делам и играет решающую роль в системах помощников юристов. Существующие работы по прогнозированию заряда адекватно работают на этих высокочастотных зарядах, но еще не способны предсказать несколько зарядов с ограниченными случаями. Кроме того, существует много запутанных пар зарядов, описания фактов которых довольно похожи друг на друга. Чтобы решить эти проблемы, мы вводим несколько дискриминационных атрибутов зарядов в качестве внутреннего отображения между описанием фактов и зарядами. Эти атрибуты предоставляют дополнительную информацию для малозарядных зарядов, а также эффективные сигналы для различения зарядов, вводящих в заблуждение. Более конкретно, мы предлагаем модель предсказания заряда, учитывающую атрибуты, чтобы вывести атрибуты и заряды одновременно. Экспериментальные результаты по реальным наборам данных показывают, что наша предлагаемая модель достигает значительных и последовательных улучшений по сравнению с другими современными базовыми линиями. В частности, наша модель превосходит другие базовые линии более чем на 50% в сценарии с несколькими выстрелами. Наши коды и наборы данных можно получить по адресу https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'hi': 'स्वचालित चार्ज भविष्यवाणी का उद्देश्य आपराधिक मामलों में तथ्य विवरण के अनुसार अंतिम आरोपों की भविष्यवाणी करना है और कानूनी सहायक प्रणालियों में महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। चार्ज भविष्यवाणी पर मौजूदा काम उन उच्च आवृत्ति वाले आरोपों पर पर्याप्त रूप से प्रदर्शन करते हैं लेकिन अभी तक सीमित मामलों के साथ कुछ-शॉट शुल्कों की भविष्यवाणी करने में सक्षम नहीं हैं। इसके अलावा, ये कई भ्रमित चार्ज जोड़े मौजूद हैं, जिनके तथ्य विवरण एक दूसरे के समान हैं। इन मुद्दों को हल करने के लिए, हम तथ्य विवरण और शुल्क के बीच आंतरिक मानचित्रण के रूप में आरोपों की कई भेदभावपूर्ण विशेषताओं को पेश करते हैं। ये विशेषताएं कुछ-शॉट शुल्कों के लिए अतिरिक्त जानकारी प्रदान करती हैं, साथ ही साथ भ्रामक शुल्कों को अलग करने के लिए प्रभावी संकेत भी प्रदान करती हैं। अधिक विशेष रूप से, हम एक साथ विशेषताओं और शुल्कों का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक विशेषता-चौकस चार्ज भविष्यवाणी मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। वास्तविक कार्य डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल अन्य अत्याधुनिक आधार रेखाओं की तुलना में महत्वपूर्ण और सुसंगत सुधार प्राप्त करता है। विशेष रूप से, हमारा मॉडल कुछ-शॉट परिदृश्य में 50% से अधिक अन्य बेसलाइन को मात देता है। हमारे कोड और डेटासेट https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge से प्राप्त किए जा सकते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag tuar muirear uathoibríoch na cúisimh deiridh a thuar de réir na tuairiscí fíricí i gcásanna coiriúla agus tá ról ríthábhachtach aige i gcórais cúntóirí dlí. Feidhmíonn oibreacha atá ann faoi láthair ar thuar muirear go leor ar na táillí ard-minicíochta sin ach níl siad fós in ann muirir ar bheagán lámhaigh a thuar le cásanna teoranta. Ina theannta sin, tá go leor péirí muirear mearbhaill ann, a bhfuil a gcur síos ar na fíricí cosúil go leor lena chéile. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na saincheisteanna seo, tugaimid isteach roinnt tréithe idirdhealaitheacha muirear mar an léarscáiliú inmheánach idir tuairiscí fíricí agus muirir. Soláthraíonn na tréithe seo faisnéis bhreise maidir le táillí cúpla lámhaigh, chomh maith le comharthaí éifeachtacha chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh ar tháillí mearbhallacha. Go sonrach, molaimid múnla réamh-mheasta muirear tréithe-aireach chun na tréithe agus na muirir a bhaint amach ag an am céanna. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacair sonraí fíor-oibre go mbaineann ár múnla molta feabhsuithe suntasacha agus comhsheasmhacha amach ná bonnlínte úrscothacha eile. Go sonrach, sáraíonn ár múnla bonnlínte eile níos mó ná 50% sa chás cúpla lámhaigh. Is féidir ár gcóid agus tacair shonraí a fháil ó https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'hu': 'Az automatikus vádak előrejelzése célja, hogy a büntetőügyek tényleírásainak megfelelően megjósolja a végső vádakat, és döntő szerepet játszik a jogi asszisztens rendszerekben. A töltések előrejelzésével kapcsolatos már meglévő munkák megfelelően teljesítenek ezeken a nagyfrekvenciájú töltéseken, de korlátozott esetekben még nem képesek néhány lövés előrejelzésére. Továbbá ezek számos zavaros töltéspár létezik, amelyek tényleírásai meglehetősen hasonlóak egymáshoz. E kérdések kezelése érdekében a díjak több diszkriminatív tulajdonságát vezetjük be, mint a tényleírások és díjak belső feltérképezése. Ezek az attribútumok további információkat nyújtanak a kevés lövéses töltésekhez, valamint hatékony jelzéseket a zavaros töltések megkülönböztetésére. Pontosabban egy attribútumfigyelemre méltó töltéselőrejelzési modellt javasolunk, amely egyidejűleg következteti az attribútumokat és a töltéseket. A valós munkahelyi adatkészletekkel kapcsolatos kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk jelentős és következetes javulást ér el, mint más korszerű alapkészletek. Pontosabban, a modellünk több mint 50%-kal felülmúlja a többi alapvető vonalat a kevés lövéses forgatókönyvben. Kódjaink és adatkészleteink a következő webhelyen érhetők el: https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ka': 'ავტომატიკური გადაწყვეტილების მიზეზია, რომ დასაწყვეტის გადაწყვეტილება, რომლებიც ფაქტის გამოსაწყვეტილება კრიმინალური შემთხვევაში და იყოს ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია არსებობს სამუშაო წარმოდგენისათვის, მაგრამ არ შეუძლებელია წარმოდგენისათვის პარამეტრების გადაწყვეტილება, რომლებიც უფრო უფრო მარტივი ფაილებით. დამატებით, ეს აქვს ბევრი შეცდომარებული ჩატვირთვა, რომლებიც ფაქტის გამოსახულები ერთმანეთისთვის მსგავსი. ამ პრობლემების შესახებ, ჩვენ განვითავსებთ რამდენიმე დისკრიმინატიური ატრიბუტები, როგორც ინტერული კაპრაფიკაცია ფაქტის გამოსახულების და გადატანების შორ ეს ატრიბუტები დამატებული ინფორმაცია მარტივი სტრიქტურებისთვის, და ეფექტიური სიგნალების განსხვავებაში შეცდომარებული ჩატვირთვის. უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ატრიბუტები-ატრუტებური მოდულების მოდელს, რომ ატრიბუტები და ატრიბუტები ერთადერთად გადატანა. ექსპერიმენტიური მონაცემები რეალური სამუშაო მონაცემების შესახებ გამოწვება, რომ ჩვენი მონაცემები მოდელის შესაძლებელია მნიშვნელოვანი და მუშაობელი შესა განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო მეტი ფესტური ხაზებით 50% დამატებს. ჩვენი კოდეები და მონაცემების კოდეები შეიძლება https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη πρόβλεψη χρεών αποσκοπεί στην πρόβλεψη των τελικών κατηγοριών σύμφωνα με τις περιγραφές των γεγονότων σε ποινικές υποθέσεις και διαδραματίζει καθοριστικό ρόλο στα συστήματα νομικών βοηθών. Οι υπάρχουσες εργασίες πρόβλεψης φορτίων αποδίδουν επαρκώς σε αυτά τα φορτία υψηλής συχνότητας, αλλά δεν είναι ακόμη σε θέση να προβλέψουν φορτία ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών σε περιορισμένες περιπτώσεις. Επιπλέον, αυτά υπάρχουν πολλά συγχέοντα ζεύγη φορτίων, των οποίων οι περιγραφές γεγονότων είναι αρκετά παρόμοιες μεταξύ τους. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτά τα ζητήματα, εισάγουμε διάφορα διακριτικά χαρακτηριστικά των τελών ως εσωτερική αντιστοίχιση μεταξύ περιγραφών γεγονότων και τελών. Αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά παρέχουν πρόσθετες πληροφορίες για φορτία ελάχιστων πυροβολισμών, καθώς και αποτελεσματικά σήματα για τη διάκριση των μπερδεμένων φορτίων. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο πρόβλεψης φόρτισης με προσοχή στα χαρακτηριστικά για να συναγάγουμε ταυτόχρονα τα χαρακτηριστικά και τα φορτία. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων πραγματικής εργασίας δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει σημαντικές και συνεπείς βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με άλλες γραμμές βάσης τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Συγκεκριμένα, το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά τις άλλες γραμμές βάσης κατά περισσότερο από 50% στο σενάριο λίγων πυροβολισμών. Οι κωδικοί και τα σύνολα δεδομένων μας μπορούν να ληφθούν από https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'lt': 'Automatinės kaltinimo prognozės tikslas – numatyti galutinius kaltinimus pagal faktų aprašymus baudžiamosiose bylose ir atlikti svarbų vaidmenį teisinės pagalbos sistemose. Esami apmokestinimo prognozavimo darbai deramai atlieka tuos didelio dažnio apmokestinimus, tačiau nėra pajėgūs prognozuoti mažai apmokestinamų apmokestinimų ribotais atvejais. Be to, yra daug painių apmokestinimo porų, kurių faktiniai aprašymai gana panašūs vienas kitam. Siekiant išspręsti šiuos klausimus, įvedame kelis diskriminacinius mokesčių požymius kaip faktų aprašymų ir mokesčių vidaus žemėlapių nustatymą. Šie požymiai suteikia papildomos informacijos apie keletą įkrovų, taip pat veiksmingų signalų, skirtų supainiojantiems įkrovams atskirti. Konkrečiau, mes siūlome atributų atidžiaus apmokestinimo prognozavimo model į, kad atributai ir apmokestinimai būtų daromi vienu metu. Eksperimentiniai realaus darbo duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas modelis pasiekia reikšmingų ir nuoseklių patobulinimų, palyginti su kitomis naujausiomis bazinėmis linijomis. Konkrečiai, mūsų modelis kelių nuotraukų scenarijuje viršija kitas bazines linijas daugiau kaip 50 %. Mūsų kodus ir duomenų rinkinius galima gauti iš https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'it': "La previsione automatica delle cariche mira a prevedere le accuse finali in base alle descrizioni dei fatti nei casi penali e svolge un ruolo cruciale nei sistemi di assistenza legale. I lavori esistenti sulla previsione della carica funzionano adeguatamente su quelle cariche ad alta frequenza, ma non sono ancora in grado di prevedere cariche a pochi colpi con casi limitati. Inoltre, esistono molte coppie di cariche confuse, le cui descrizioni dei fatti sono abbastanza simili l'una all'altra. Per affrontare questi problemi, introduciamo diversi attributi discriminatori delle tariffe come la mappatura interna tra descrizioni dei fatti e tariffe. Questi attributi forniscono informazioni aggiuntive per le cariche a pochi colpi, così come segnali efficaci per distinguere le cariche confuse. Più specificamente, proponiamo un modello di previsione della carica attento agli attributi per dedurre gli attributi e le cariche contemporaneamente. I risultati sperimentali su set di dati reali dimostrano che il nostro modello proposto raggiunge miglioramenti significativi e coerenti rispetto ad altre linee di base all'avanguardia. Nello specifico, il nostro modello supera le altre linee di base di oltre il 50% nello scenario a pochi colpi. I nostri codici e set di dati possono essere ottenuti da https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.", 'kk': 'Автоматты жүктеу үшін аяқталған жүктеулерді қалай жұмыс істейтін және жаңа көмекші жүйелерде маңызды роль орындалады. Бар жүктелген жұмыс бағалау үшін бұл жылдамдығы жоғары жүктелген жұмыс жұмыс істейді, бірақ әлі шектелген жағдайда бірнеше жүктелген жүктеліктерді бағалауға бол Қосымша, бұлар бір-біріне ұқсас болып жатқан көптеген жүктелген екі бар, олардың түсініктері бір-біріне ұқсас. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін бірнеше дискриминациялық атрибуттарды факты түсініктемелер мен жүктеулердің арасындағы ішкі картасы ретінде таңдаймыз. Бұл атрибуттар бірнеше жүктеу үшін қосымша мәлімет береді, жүктеу жүктеулерді таңдау үшін әсер ететін сигналдар да. Атрибуттарды жүктеу үлгісін бір-біріне қарай атрибуттарды жүктеу үлгісін таңдаймыз. Шынымен жұмыс деректер жиындарының тәжірибесінің нәтижелері біздің келтірілген моделіміздің басқа суреттердің негізгі жолдарынан маңызды және тәуелсіздік жақсартуларын Ескерілі, біздің үлгіміз басқа негізгі сызықтарды кейбір сценарияда 50% дегеннен артық істейді. Біздің кодтарымыз мен деректер жиындарымыз https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'mk': 'Автоматското предвидување на обвиненијата има за цел предвидување на конечните обвиненија според описите на фактите во криминалните случаи и игра клучна улога во системите на правни помошници. Постојаните дела за предвидување на наплата одговараат на овие високофреквентни наплати, но сé уште не се способни да предвидат неколку наплати со ограничени случаи. Покрај тоа, овие постојат многу збунети парови на наплата, чии факти описи се прилично слични меѓусебно. За да ги решиме овие прашања, воведуваме неколку дискриминативни атрибути на обвиненијата како внатрешно мапирање помеѓу фактовите описи и обвиненија. Овие атрибути обезбедуваат дополнителни информации за неколку напади, како и ефикасни сигнали за разлика на збунувачки напади. Поконкретно, предлагаме модел за предвидување на наполнување кој е внимателен на атрибутите за истовремено да ги заклучи атрибутите и наполнувањата. Experimental results on real-work datasets demonstrate that our proposed model achieves significant and consistent improvements than other state-of-the-art baselines.  Specifically, our model outperforms other baselines by more than 50% in the few-shot scenario.  Нашите кодови и податоци може да се добијат од https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ms': 'Ramalan tuduhan automatik bermaksud meramalkan tuduhan akhir mengikut deskripsi fakta dalam kes jenayah dan bermain peran penting dalam sistem pembantu undang-undang. Kerja yang wujud dalam ramalan muatan dilakukan dengan cukup pada muatan frekuensi tinggi tetapi belum mampu meramalkan muatan tembakan sedikit dengan kes yang terbatas. Selain itu, ada banyak pasangan yang mengelirukan, yang gambaran fakta mereka agak serupa satu sama lain. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami memperkenalkan beberapa atribut diskriminatif biaya sebagai peta dalaman antara deskripsi fakta dan biaya. Atribut ini menyediakan maklumat tambahan untuk muatan beberapa tembakan, serta isyarat efektif untuk membezakan muatan yang mengelirukan. Lebih khusus, kami melamar model ramalan muatan atribut-perhatian untuk menyimpulkan atribut dan muatan secara bersamaan. Keputusan percubaan pada set data kerja-sebenar menunjukkan bahawa model kami diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dan konsisten daripada garis dasar yang lain-state-of-the-art. Secara khusus, model kita melampaui garis dasar lain dengan lebih dari 50% dalam skenario beberapa tembakan. Our codes and datasets can be obtained from  https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'mt': 'Automatic charge prediction aims to predict the final charges according to the fact descriptions in criminal cases and plays a crucial role in legal assistant systems.  Ix-xogħlijiet eżistenti dwar it-tbassir tal-imposti jwettqu b’mod adegwat fuq dawk l-imposti ta’ frekwenza għolja iżda għadhom mhumiex kapaċi jipprevedu imposti b’ftit skossi b’każijiet limitati. Barra minn hekk, dawn jeżistu ħafna par ta’ imposti konfużivi, li d-deskrizzjonijiet tal-fatti tagħhom huma pjuttost simili għal xulxin. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet, nintroduċu diversi attributi diskriminatorji tal-imposti bħala l-immappjar intern bejn id-deskrizzjonijiet tal-fatti u l-imposti. Dawn l-attributi jipprovdu informazzjoni addizzjonali għal tariffi bi ftit skossi, kif ukoll sinjali effettivi għad-distinzjoni ta’ tariffi konfużivi. B’mod aktar speċifiku, qed nipproponu mudell ta’ tbassir tal-imposti attent għall-attributi biex jiġu inferiti l-attributi u l-imposti fl-istess ħin. Riżultati esperimentali fuq settijiet ta’ dejta dwar ix-xogħol reali juru li l-mudell propost tagħna jikseb titjib sinifikanti u konsistenti minn linji bażi l-aktar avvanzati. B’mod speċifiku, il-mudell tagħna jaqbeż linji bażi oħra b’aktar minn 50% fix-xenarju bi ftit fotografiji. Il-kodiċijiet u s-settijiet tad-dejta tagħna jistgħu jinkisbu minn https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ml': 'ക്രിമിനല്\u200d കേസുകളുടെ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d അനുസരിച്ച് അവസാന കുറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കാനും നിയമപരമായ സഹായികളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ് നിലവിലുള്ള ചാര്\u200dജ് പ്രവചനങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ഹൈഫ്രെയിന്റി ചാര്\u200dജ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിന് മതിയായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്ത അതുകൊണ്ടും, ഇതില്\u200d പലരും വിചിത്രമായ ചാര്\u200dജ് ജോടികളുണ്ട്, അവരുടെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d പരസ്പരം പോലെയാണ്. ഈ കാര്യങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് വിഭിന്നതയുള്ള കുറ്റങ്ങളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സത്യത്തിന കുറച്ചു ഷോട്ട് ചാര്\u200dജുകള്\u200dക്കും കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുന്നു, കുഴപ്പമുള്ള ചാര്\u200dജുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യാസിക്കുന്നതിനും പ്ര കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ചാര്\u200dജ് പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വേറൊരു ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. കുറച്ച് വെടിയുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന സ Our codes and datasets can be obtained from  https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'mn': 'Амьтны хэрэгцээний тодорхойлолтоор эцсийн хэрэгцээг тодорхойлох, хуулийн тусламжтай системд чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Шүүмжлэх таамаглалт дээр байгаа ажиллагаа нь эдгээр өндөр давтамжлалт дээр адилхан хийдэг. Гэхдээ хязгаарлагдсан тохиолдолд хэдэн шалтгааныг таамаглаж чадахгүй. Мөн эдгээр нь олон төвөгтэй цэнэгийн хоёр байдаг. Үнэндээ тодорхойлолтууд нь нэг нэгэнтэй адилхан байдаг. Эдгээр асуудлыг олохын тулд бид үнэндээ тодорхойлолт болон шаардлагатай хоорондын дотоод газрын зураг болох олон ялгаатай харьцуулагддаг. Эдгээр харилцаа нь хэд хэдэн шалгалтын зардалд нэмэлт мэдээллийг өгдөг, мөн алдагдах зардалыг ялгах үр дүнтэй сигналууд өгдөг. Илүү тодорхой нь, бид атрибут-анхаарлын шаардлагатай таамаглалтын загварын загварыг нэг удаа харьцуулахын тулд санал өгдөг. Үнэндээ ажлын өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загвар бусад урлагийн суурь шугам шугамдаас илүү чухал болон үр дүнтэй сайжруулагддаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Ялангуяа бидний загвар зарим суурь шулуунуудыг хэдэн зурагт 50%-аас илүү хийдэг. Бидний код, өгөгдлийн сангууд https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ro': 'Prevederea automată a acuzațiilor are ca scop prezicerea acuzațiilor finale în funcție de descrierile faptelor în cazurile penale și joacă un rol crucial în sistemele de asistență juridică. Lucrările existente privind predicția sarcinilor funcționează în mod adecvat pe aceste sarcini de înaltă frecvență, dar nu sunt încă capabile să predică sarcini cu puține lovituri cu cazuri limitate. Mai mult decât atât, acestea există multe perechi de sarcini confuze, ale căror descrieri de fapt sunt destul de similare unul cu celălalt. Pentru a aborda aceste probleme, introducem mai multe atribute discriminatorii ale taxelor ca cartografiere internă între descrierile faptelor și taxele. Aceste atribute oferă informații suplimentare pentru încărcăturile cu puțină lovitură, precum și semnale eficiente pentru distingerea încărcărilor confuze. Mai exact, propunem un model de predicție a sarcinii atent la atribute pentru a deduce atributele și sarcinile simultan. Rezultatele experimentale pe seturi de date reale demonstrează că modelul nostru propus obține îmbunătățiri semnificative și consecvente față de alte linii de bază de ultimă generație. Mai exact, modelul nostru depășește alte linii de bază cu mai mult de 50% în scenariul puține lovituri. Codurile și seturile noastre de date pot fi obținute de la https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'no': 'Forhåndsvising av automatisk ladning måtar å forhåndsvisa dei siste ladningane etter faktiske skildringar i kriminalnader og spelar ein viktig rolle i juridiske assistentsystemer. Det eksisterande arbeider på forhåndsvising av lastinga gjer tilstrekkelig på desse høg frekvenschargene, men er enno ikkje i stand til å forhåndsvisa få opplastingar med begrenset tilfeller. Desse finst også mange forvirrende lastingspar, der faktiske skildringar er ganske liknande kvarandre. For å handtera desse problemene, introduserer vi fleire diskriminasjonale attributtar for ladningar som den interne kartlegginga mellom faktiske skildringar og ladningar. Desse attributtane gjev tilleggsinformasjon for få bilete, og effektive signaler for å distisera forvirrende lastingar. Dette er meir spesifikt at vi foreslår eit modell for å foreslå attributt-attentiv ladning for å gjere attributtane og ladningane samtidig. Eksperimentale resultat på verkeleg arbeidsområde viser at vår foreslått modell gjer signifikante og konsistent forbedringar enn andre kunstbaselinjer. Det er spesielt at modellen vårt utfører andre baselinjer med meir enn 50% i det få bilete scenarioen. Kodar og datasett våre kan henta frå https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'pl': 'Automatyczna predykcja oskarżeń ma na celu przewidywanie ostatecznych oskarżeń zgodnie z opisem faktów w sprawach karnych i odgrywa kluczową rolę w systemach asystentów prawnych. Istniejące prace dotyczące przewidywania ładunku wykonują się odpowiednio na tych ładunkach wysokiej częstotliwości, ale nie są jeszcze w stanie przewidzieć ładunków kilku strzałów w ograniczonych przypadkach. Ponadto istnieje wiele mylących par ładunków, których opisy faktów są do siebie dość podobne. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, wprowadzamy kilka dyskryminacyjnych atrybutów opłat jako wewnętrzne odwzorowanie opisów faktów i opłat. Atrybuty te dostarczają dodatkowych informacji dotyczących ładunków kilku strzałów, a także efektywnych sygnałów służących rozróżnieniu ładunków mylących. W szczególności proponujemy model przewidywania ładunku uważnego na atrybuty, aby wywnioskować atrybuty i ładunki jednocześnie. Wyniki eksperymentalne na rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazują, że proponowany model osiąga znaczące i spójne ulepszenia niż inne najnowocześniejsze linie bazowe. W szczególności nasz model przewyższa inne linie bazowe o ponad 50% w scenariuszu kilku ujęć. Nasze kody i zbiory danych można uzyskać z https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'sr': 'Predviđanje automatske optužbe je cilj predvidjeti konačne optužbe prema opisu činjenice u kriminalnim slučajevima i igra ključnu ulogu u pravnim asistentnim sistemima. Postoje radovi na predviđanju optužbe obavljaju odgovarajuće optužbe za visoke frekvencije, ali još nisu sposobni predviđati optužbe za nekoliko pucnjava sa ograničenim slučajevima. Osim toga, postoje mnogo zbunjenih par optužbi, čiji su opisi činjenice prilično slični jedno drugom. Da bi se riješili ovih pitanja, predstavljamo nekoliko diskriminacijskih atributa optužbe kao unutrašnja mapa između opisa činjenica i optužbi. Ovi atributi pružaju dodatne informacije za optužbe za nekoliko pucnjava, kao i efikasne signale za razliku zbunjenih optužbi. Posebnije, predlažemo model predviđanja optužbe za atribute i optužbe istovremeno. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setima podataka o stvarnom radu pokazuju da naš predloženi model postiže značajne i konsekventne poboljšanje od drugih podataka umjetnosti. Posebno, naš model iznosi druge osnovne linije više od 50% u scenariju nekoliko snimaka. Naši kodovi i seti podataka mogu dobiti od https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'sv': 'Automatisk laddningsförutsägelse syftar till att förutsäga de slutliga anklagelserna enligt faktabeskrivningarna i brottmål och spelar en avgörande roll i rättshjälpssystemen. Befintliga arbeten med laddningsprognoser presterar tillräckligt på dessa högfrekventa laddningar men kan ännu inte förutsäga laddningar med få skott i begränsade fall. Dessutom finns dessa många förvirrande laddningspar, vars faktabaeskrivningar är ganska lika varandra. För att ta itu med dessa frågor introducerar vi flera diskriminerande egenskaper hos avgifter som intern kartläggning mellan faktableskrivningar och avgifter. Dessa attribut ger ytterligare information för laddningar med få skott samt effektiva signaler för att skilja förvirrande laddningar. Mer specifikt föreslår vi en attributuppmärksam laddningsprognosmodell för att härleda attribut och avgifter samtidigt. Experimentella resultat på reala datauppsättningar visar att vår föreslagna modell uppnår betydande och konsekventa förbättringar än andra toppmoderna baslinjer. Specifikt överträffar vår modell andra baslinjer med mer än 50% i ett fåtalsscenario. Våra koder och dataset kan erhållas från https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක චාර්ජ් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අන්තිම චාර්ජ් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරික්ෂා කරන්න සඳහා අවසාන ප්\u200dරශ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාන වැඩ කරන්නේ චාර්ජ් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන් ඒ ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් වැඩ කරන්න, ඒත් තවමත් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයෙන්  ඒ වගේම, මේවා ගොඩක් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් තියෙනවා, ඒවාගේ ඇත්ත විස්තර විස්තර දේවල් එක්කෙනෙක මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වලින් ඇතුළු සංකේෂණය සහ ව මේ විශේෂතාවන්ට විශේෂ තොරතුරු කිහිපයක් වෙනුවෙන් අඩු තොරතුරු දෙන්න, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ සංඥාවන් විශ වඩා විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ගොඩක් අවශ්\u200dය-අවධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා විශේෂතාවන් සහ චාර්ජ් එකම ඇත්ත වැඩේ තොරතුරු සටහන්ගේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේ විශේෂයෙන්, අපේ මොඩල් අනිත් මූලිකය 50% වඩා වැඩි විදියට වැඩි වෙනවා. අපේ කෝඩ් සහ දත්ත සේට් එකෙන් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන් https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada iskuulka ah waxaa loola jeedaa in uu soo hor dhigo kharashka ugu dambeeya si uu u qoro warqada xaqiiqada xaalada dembiga islamarkaasna uu qayb muhiim ah ugu ciyaariyo nidaamka caawiyaha sharciga ah. Shuqullada joogtada ah oo ku saabsan baaritaanka lacagta ah waxay si ku filan u sameeyaan kharashka sare, laakiin weli ma awoodi kartid inay wax ku soo hor jeedaan lacag yar oo lagu dhuftay oo ay xaaladaha xadgudbay. Weliba waxaa jira laba laba oo lacag ah oo kala qasnaan, oo ay warqadoodu si qumman u yihiin. Si aan looga maamulo arimahan, waxaan u soo bandhignaa takoorid badan oo lambaro ah sida sawirka gudaha ee warqada xaqiiqada ah iyo lacagta. Waxyaabahaas waxay leeyihiin macluumaad dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan kharashka yar iyo sidoo kale calaamado faa’iido leh oo ku kala beddelaya lacagta qalloocan. Si gaar ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa tusaale baaritaanka laguu sii sheegayo si ay u dhibaateeyo qalabka iyo lacagta islamarkaasba. Imtixaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka shaqada ee runta ah waxay muujiyaan in modelkeeni la soo jeeday uu helo hagaajinta aad u weyn oo ku sii socota si ka duwan qorshaha farshaxanka. Si gaar ah, qaababkayagu wuxuu ka muujiyaa saldhigyo kale oo ka badan 50 boqolkiiba marka ay wax yar yihiin. Aqooyinkayada iyo macluumaadyadayada waxaa laga heli karaa https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ta': 'குற்றவாளிகளின் விவரங்களை பொறுத்து கடைசி சுற்றங்களை முன்னோக்குகிறது என்று தானாகவே சுமத்து முற்படுத்தல் எதிர்பார்க்கும் மற் Existing works on charge prediction perform adequately on those high-frequency charges but are not yet capable of predicting few-shot charges with limited cases.  மேலும், இதில் பல குழப்பமான சுழற்சி ஜோடிகள் இருக்கின்றன, அவற்றின் விளக்கம் ஒருவருக்கு சரியாக உள்ளது. இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் சுற்றங்களின் பல வித்தியாசமான குணங்களை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் உண்மையின் வரைபடம் மற் இந்த குணங்கள் சில சுற்றங்களுக்கு கூடுதல் தகவல் வழங்குகிறது, மற்றும் குழப்பமான சுற்றங்களை பிரித்து வெளிப்படுத குறிப்பிட்ட குணங்கள் மற்றும் சுற்றங்களை ஒரு குணங்கள் பார்க்க முடியும் மாதிரி நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். உண்மையான பணி தரவுத்தளங்களின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி முக்கியமானது மற்ற மாதிரியான மே குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் மாதிரி வேறு அடிப்படைகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது சில ஷாட் காட்சியில் 50% க்கு மேற்பட்டது. எங்கள் குறியீடுகள் மற்றும் தரவுத்தளங்கள் இருந்து பெற முடியும் https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ur': 'آٹوٹی چار کی پیش بینی کا ارادہ ہے کہ آخری چاروں کی پیش بینی کریں جنایت کے مطابق اور قانون مددگار سیستموں میں ایک اہم رغم لگا رہے ہیں. جو چارڈ کی پیش بینی پر موجود ہیں ان پر اچھی فرکانسی چارڈ پر اچھی طرح عمل کرتے ہیں لیکن اب تک کم شاٹ چارڈ کی پیش بینی کرنے کے قابل نہیں ہیں۔ اور یہ بہت سی مخلوقات کے جوڑے ہیں جن کی حقیقت کی تعریف ایک دوسرے کے برابر ہے ہم ان مسائلوں کے بارے میں مشکل کرنے کے لئے چاروں کے چند مختلف اختلافات کو معرفی کرتے ہیں کہ حقیقت کی تعریف اور چاروں کے درمیان داخلی نقشه بنانے کے لئے۔ These attributes provide additional information for few-shot charges, as well as effective signals for distinguishing confusing charges. اور زیادہ مشخص ہے، ہم ایک آبریٹ منتظر چارج کی پیش بینی موڈل کی پیش بینی کریں کہ ایک دفعہ آبریٹوں اور چارجوں کو دفع کریں۔ حقیقی کاریاں ڈاٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدل ایک دوسری حالت کی بنسٹلین سے بڑھ کر اثبات اور ثابت ترقی حاصل کرتی ہے۔ خاص طور پر، ہمارا موڈل کم شٹ سناریو میں 50% سے زیادہ دوسری بنسس لینڈوں سے نکلتا ہے۔ ہمارے کڈ اور ڈیٹ سٹ سے مل سکتے ہیں https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'uz': "Avtomatik ravishda avtomatik taqdim qilish qoidalar haqiqiqiy taʼriflari davomida oxirgi davomida o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi va sharciga yordam tizimida muhim roli oʻynaladi. Koʻrib chiqish uchun mavjud vazifalar bu yuqori freym davomida yetarli ishlayapti lekin cheksiz davomida qo'llanmagan bir necha suhbat davomida koʻrsatib boʻlmaydi. Ko'pchilik esa bu ko'pchilik harakat ko'plab qo'llari mavjud, ularning ma'lumotlari bir-бирларига juda qiymati. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun biz bir necha ta'minlovchi shaxsiyatlarni ko'rsatumiz, bu haqiqida taʼrif va davom etish orasidagi ichki narsalar. Ushbu attributlar bir necha marta mashina uchun qoʻshimcha maʼlumot, va minglab qoʻllanmalarni ajratish uchun qoʻshimcha signallar. Ko'pchilik, biz hozirgi tasavvur qilish modelini hozir qilamiz, hozir va davomida bir paytda qo'shishni o'zgartirish mumkin. Mavjud ish tarkibi maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi taʼminot natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin. Bunday qilingan modelimiz boshqa holatning asosiy asosiy asosida muhim va davom etishga ega bo'ladi. Ko'pchilik, bizning modelimiz boshqa asboblar bilan 50% dan ortiq ishlayapti. Kodlash va maʼlumotlar tarkibini olib tashlash mumkin https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.", 'vi': 'Dự đoán phí tự động nhằm dự đoán mức án cuối cùng dựa trên miêu tả sự thật trong các vụ án hình sự và đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong hệ pháp lý trợ lý. Những công trình dự đoán thuế tồn tại cung cấp đầy đủ các giá trị tần suất cao nhưng vẫn chưa có khả năng dự đoán các giá trị nhỏ với các trường hợp hạn chế. Hơn nữa, chúng có rất nhiều cặp nạp khó hiểu, những mô tả thực tế khá giống nhau. Để giải quyết những vấn đề này, chúng tôi đưa ra vài khả năng phân biệt của các hóa đơn như bản vẽ nội bộ giữa miêu tả thực tế và phí. Những thuộc tính này cung cấp thêm thông tin về các mũi thuốc nhỏ, cũng như tín hiệu hiệu hiệu hiệu hiệu hiệu hiệu hiệu dùng để phân biệt tội gây rối. Cụ thể hơn, chúng tôi đề nghị một kiểu dự đoán mức phụ thuộc có chú ý để đồng thời suy ra các thuộc tính và giá cả. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên các bộ dữ liệu thực sự cho thấy mẫu thử của chúng ta đạt được những cải tiến quan trọng và ổn định hơn nhiều nền tảng hiện đại. Cụ thể hơn, mô hình của chúng ta vượt trội hơn 500kg trong kịch bản. Mật mã và các tập tin có thể lấy từ https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното прогнозиране на обвиненията има за цел да прогнозира окончателните обвинения според описанието на фактите в наказателните дела и играе решаваща роля в системите за съдействие. Съществуващите работи за прогнозиране на зарядите работят адекватно при тези високочестотни заряди, но все още не са в състояние да предвидят заряди с няколко изстрела при ограничени случаи. Освен това, те съществуват много объркващи двойки заряди, чиито описания на фактите са доста сходни помежду си. За да се справим с тези въпроси, въвеждаме няколко дискриминационни атрибута на таксите като вътрешно картографиране между описанията на фактите и таксите. Тези атрибути предоставят допълнителна информация за заряди с няколко изстрела, както и ефективни сигнали за разграничаване на объркващи заряди. По-конкретно, предлагаме модел за прогнозиране на зарядите, който да извежда едновременно атрибутите и зарядите. Експерименталните резултати от реални работни набори от данни показват, че предложеният модел постига значителни и последователни подобрения в сравнение с други най-съвременни базови линии. По-конкретно, нашият модел надминава другите базови линии с повече от 50% в сценария с няколко изстрела. Нашите кодове и набори от данни могат да бъдат получени от https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'hr': 'Predviđanje automatske optužbe cilja je predvidjeti konačne optužbe prema opisu činjenica u kriminalnim slučajevima i igrati ključnu ulogu u sustavima pravnih pomoćnika. Postoje radovi na predviđanju optužbe obavljaju odgovarajuće na te optužbe visoke frekvencije, ali još nisu sposobni predvidjeti optužbe za nekoliko pucnjava s ograničenim slučajevima. Osim toga, postoje mnogi zbunjujući par optužbe, čiji su opisi činjenice prilično slični jedni drugima. Za rješavanje tih pitanja, predstavljamo nekoliko diskriminacijskih atributa optužbe kao unutrašnju mapu između opisa činjenica i optužbi. Ovi atributi pružaju dodatne informacije za optužbe za nekoliko pucnjava, kao i učinkovite signale za razliku zbunjenih optužbi. Posebnije, predlažemo model predviđanja optužbe za atribute i optužbe istovremeno. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima realnog rada pokazuju da naš predloženi model postigne značajne i konsekventne poboljšanje od drugih podaci umjetnosti. Posebno, naš model iznosi druge osnovne linije više od 50% u scenariju nekoliko snimaka. Naši kodovi i podaci mogu dobiti od https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'da': 'Automatisk anklageforudsigelse har til formål at forudsige de endelige anklager i henhold til de faktiske beskrivelser i straffesager og spiller en afgørende rolle i juridiske assistentsystemer. Eksisterende arbejder med forudsigelse af ladninger fungerer tilstrækkeligt på disse højfrekvensladninger, men er endnu ikke i stand til at forudsige ladninger med få skud med begrænsede tilfælde. Desuden findes disse mange forvirrende ladningspar, hvis faktiske beskrivelser er temmelig ens med hinanden. For at løse disse spørgsmål indfører vi adskillige diskriminerende egenskaber ved afgifter som den interne kortlægning mellem faktableskrivelser og afgifter. Disse attributter giver yderligere oplysninger om ladninger med få skud samt effektive signaler til at skelne mellem forvirrende ladninger. Mere specifikt foreslår vi en attribut-opmærksom ladning forudsigelsesmodel for at udlede attributter og afgifter samtidig. Eksperimentelle resultater på datasæt i virkeligheden viser, at vores foreslåede model opnår betydelige og konsekvente forbedringer end andre state-of-the-art basislinjer. Konkret overgår vores model andre basislinjer med mere end 50% i det få skud scenarie. Vores koder og datasæt kan fås fra https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'nl': 'Automatic charge prediction is gericht op het voorspellen van de definitieve aanklachten volgens de feitenbeschrijvingen in strafzaken en speelt een cruciale rol in rechtsbijstandssystemen. Bestaande werken op het gebied van ladingsvoorspelling presteren adequaat op die hoogfrequente ladingen, maar zijn nog niet in staat om weinige ladingen in beperkte gevallen te voorspellen. Bovendien bestaan deze vele verwarrende ladingspaaren, waarvan de feitenbeschrijvingen vrij op elkaar lijken. Om deze problemen aan te pakken, introduceren we verschillende onderscheidende kenmerken van heffingen als de interne toewijzing tussen feitenbeschrijvingen en heffingen. Deze kenmerken bieden aanvullende informatie voor weinige ladingen, evenals effectieve signalen voor het onderscheiden van verwarrende ladingen. Meer specifiek stellen we een attribuut-attent ladingsprognosemodel voor om de attributen en ladingen tegelijkertijd af te leiden. Experimentele resultaten op real-work datasets tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model aanzienlijke en consistente verbeteringen bereikt dan andere state-of-the-art baselines. Specifiek, ons model overtreft andere baselines met meer dan 50% in het weinige-shot scenario. Onze codes en datasets zijn te verkrijgen bij https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'de': 'Die automatische Chargenprognise zielt darauf ab, die endgültigen Anklagen anhand der Tatsachenbeschreibungen in Strafsachen vorherzusagen und spielt eine entscheidende Rolle in Rechtsassistenzsystemen. Bestehende Arbeiten zur Ladungsprädiktion liefern für diese Hochfrequenzladungen ausreichend Leistung, sind jedoch noch nicht in der Lage, Wenig-Schuss-Ladungen mit begrenzten Fällen vorherzusagen. Darüber hinaus gibt es viele verwirrende Ladungspaare, deren Faktenbeschreibungen ziemlich ähnlich sind. Um diese Probleme anzugehen, führen wir verschiedene diskriminierende Attribute von Gebühren als interne Zuordnung zwischen Faktenbeschreibungen und Gebühren ein. Diese Attribute liefern zusätzliche Informationen für Weniger-Schuss-Ladungen sowie effektive Signale zur Unterscheidung verwirrender Ladungen. Genauer gesagt schlagen wir ein attributaufsichtiges Ladungsvorhersagemodell vor, um die Attribute und Ladungen gleichzeitig abzuleiten. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell signifikante und konsistente Verbesserungen erzielt als andere State-of-the-Art Baselines. Konkret übertrifft unser Modell andere Baselines um mehr als 50% im Few-Shot-Szenario. Unsere Codes und Datensätze erhalten Sie unter https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ko': '자동 죄명 예측의 목적은 형사 사건의 사실 묘사에 근거하여 최종 죄명을 예측하는 것으로 법률 보조 시스템에서 중요한 역할을 한다.기존의 전하 예측 작업은 이런 고주파 전하에 대해 충분한 예측 능력을 가지고 있지만 유한한 상황에서 소수의 폭발 전하를 예측할 수 없다.그 밖에 곤혹스러운 전하가 많이 존재하는데, 그것들의 사실 묘사는 서로 상당히 비슷하다.이런 문제들을 해결하기 위해 우리는 전하의 몇 가지 구별 속성을 도입하여 사실 묘사와 전하 간의 내부 반사로 삼았다.이러한 속성은 소량의 폭발 전하에 추가 정보를 제공하고 혼동 전하를 구분하는 데 효과적인 신호를 제공한다.더욱 구체적으로 말하자면, 우리는 속성을 주목하는 전하 예측 모델을 제시하여 속성과 전하를 동시에 추정한다.실제 작업 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 다른 가장 선진적인 기선에 비해 우리가 제시한 모델은 현저하고 일치된 개선을 얻었다.구체적으로 말하면 우리의 모델은 소렌즈 장면에서의 표현이 다른 기선의 50% 이상보다 우수하다.우리 코드와 데이터 집합은https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'id': 'Prediksi tuduhan otomatis bermaksud untuk memprediksi tuduhan akhir menurut deskripsi fakta dalam kasus kriminal dan bermain peran penting dalam sistem asisten hukum. Pekerjaan yang ada pada prediksi muatan berhasil dengan cukup pada biaya frekuensi tinggi tapi belum mampu memprediksi biaya beberapa tembakan dengan kasus terbatas. Selain itu, ada banyak pasangan biaya yang membingungkan, yang deskripsi fakta cukup mirip satu sama lain. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami memperkenalkan beberapa atribut diskriminatif biaya sebagai peta internal antara deskripsi fakta dan biaya. Atribut-atribut ini menyediakan informasi tambahan untuk beberapa tuntutan tembakan, serta sinyal efektif untuk membedakan tuntutan yang membingungkan. Lebih spesifik, kami mengusulkan model prediksi muatan atribut-perhatian untuk menyimpulkan atribut dan muatan secara bersamaan. Hasil eksperimen pada set data pekerjaan nyata menunjukkan bahwa model kami diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan dan konsisten dari garis dasar state-of-the-art lainnya. Secara spesifik, model kita melebihi garis dasar lain dengan lebih dari 50% dalam skenario beberapa tembakan. Kode dan set data kita dapat diperoleh dari https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی اتوماتیک انتقال انتقال آخرین اتهام را بر اساس توضیح حقیقت در پرونده\u200cهای جنایت پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند و نقش مهمی در سیستم\u200cهای دستیاری قانونی بازی می\u200cکند. کارهای موجود در پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای بار به اندازه\u200cی کافی بر این اتهام\u200cهای فرکانس بالا انجام می\u200cدهند ولی هنوز قادر به پیش\u200cبینی کردن اتهام\u200cهای چند بار با پرونده\u200cهای محدود نیستند. علاوه بر این، اینها جفت\u200cهای پیچیده\u200cکننده\u200cای وجود دارند که توضیح حقیقت آنها به طور کاملا شبیه یکدیگر هستند. برای حل این مسائل، ما چند خصوصیت جدایی از اتهام را به عنوان نقشه داخلی بین توضیح و اتهام حقیقت معرفی می کنیم. این ویژگی\u200cها اطلاعات اضافه\u200cای برای تاخیرهای کمی شلیک می\u200cدهند، همچنین سیگنال\u200cهای تاثیر برای جدایی کردن تاخیرهای پیچیده\u200cکننده\u200cها. دقیقاً ما یک مدل پیش\u200cبینی بار با توجه به ویژه\u200cهای مواظب توجه می\u200cکنیم تا ویژه\u200cها و بارهایی را همزمان تحریک کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای واقعی کار نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد ما بهترین\u200cهای مهم و هماهنگی از دیگر خط\u200cهای پایگاه\u200cهای هنر را می\u200cرساند. مخصوصا، مدل ما با بیشتر از ۵۰ درصد در سناریو چند شلیک بیشتر از خط پایین\u200cهای دیگر انجام می\u200cدهد. کد\u200cها و مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ما می\u200cتوانند از https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'sw': 'Utabiri wa mashitaka ya kujitegemea inakusudia kutabiri mashitaka ya mwisho kwa mujibu wa maelezo ya ukweli katika kesi za makosa ya jinai na inacheza nafasi muhimu katika mfumo wa msaidizi wa sheria. Kazi zinazopo kwenye utabiri wa shughuli zinafanya mashitaka hayo ya kiwango kikubwa lakini bado hawana uwezo wa kutabiri mashitaka machache ya risasi kwa matukio mengi. Zaidi ya hayo, kuna wanaume wengi wenye changamoto, ambao maelezo yao yanafanana sana. Ili kuzungumzia masuala haya, tunaonyesha vipengele kadhaa vya kutoa ubaguzi wa mashitaka kama ramani ya ndani kati ya maelezo ya ukweli na mashitaka. Vifaa hivi vinatoa taarifa zaidi kwa mashitaka machache yanayopigwa risasi, pamoja na ishara za ufanisi za kutofautisha mashitaka yanayochanganya. Zaidi hasa, tunapendekeza muundo wa utabiri wa shughuli zenye ushahidi wa kutia wasiwasi ili kuwabughudia vigezo na mashitaka kwa wakati mmoja. Matokeo ya majaribio kuhusu taarifa za kazi halisi yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu wa pendekezo unafanikiwa mafanikio makubwa na yanayoendelea zaidi ya misingi mengine ya sanaa. Kwa hakika, mifano yetu inaonyesha misingi mengine kwa zaidi ya asilimia 50 katika eneo chache zilizopigwa risasi. Our codes and datasets can be obtained from  https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'tr': 'Otomatik taýýarlama öňündürmegi iň soňky tämeleriň kriminal durumlaryň tassyklamalaryna görä önlemek we hukuk kömekçi sistemalarda örän möhüm tämeleri çalýar. Öň bar zadyň önlemesi üstünde ýokaryk frekanslaryň üstünde ýeterlik etýär ýöne, ýöne häzir kiçi atly cöwüretlerini sınırlı durumlar bilen önlemek mümkin däl. Munuň ýagdaýda birnäçe karmaşgalan karmaşgalan çiftleri bar, olaryň hasaplamalary birbirine meňzeş ýaly. Bu meselelere çözmek üçin, hatlaryň hem günahlaryň arasynda bir näçe diskriminät hasaplaryny daşary edip görkeýäris. Bu atributlar azajyk atly kargadyrlar üçin gowy informasiýa bererler, we çalşyryş kargadyrlary tapawutlamak üçin etkinlik sinyallar bilen bererler. Adatça, biz bir atribut-tanyş to ýun önümlemek nusgasyna häzirki atributleri we täzelikleri bir gezek süsletmek üçin teklip edip otyrys. Gerçek-iş veri setirlerinde örän netijesi biziň teklip eden nusgadymyz beýleki möhüm we daşary düzeltmelerimizi başga durumlardan has gowurak bolýar diýip kanıtlaýar. Adatça, biziň nusgamyz kiçi resim senaryýasynda 50% üstünden başga üýtgeýän hatlary üstün edýär. Biziň ködlerimiz we veri setirlerimiz alınyp biler https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'sq': 'Parashikimi automatik i akuzave synon të parashikojë akuzat përfundimtare sipas përshkrimit të fakteve në rastet kriminale dhe luan një rol vendimtar në sistemet ndihmës ligjore. Punët ekzistuese mbi parashikimin e ngarkesave kryejnë në mënyrë të përshtatshme mbi ato ngarkesa me frekuencë të lartë por nuk janë ende në gjendje të parashikojnë ngarkesa me pak gjuajtje me raste të kufizuara. Përveç kësaj, këto ekzistojnë shumë çifte akuza konfuze, përshkrimet e të cilave janë mjaft të ngjashme me njëri-tjetrin. Për të trajtuar këto çështje, ne futim disa atribute diskriminuese të akuzave si hartimin e brendshëm midis përshkrimit të fakteve dhe akuzave. Këto atribute ofrojnë informacion shtesë për akuza me pak gjuajtje si dhe sinjale efektive për dallimin e akuzave konfuzive. Më specifikisht, ne propozojmë një model parashikimi të ngarkesave të vëmendshme për atributet dhe ngarkesat në të njëjtën kohë. Rezultatet eksperimentale në grupet e të dhënave të punës reale tregojnë se modeli ynë i propozuar arrin përmirësime të rëndësishme dhe konsistente sesa linjat bazë të tjera më të larta. Veçanërisht, modeli ynë kalon linjat e tjera bazë me më shumë se 50% në skenarin e pak-fotografive. Kodet tona dhe të dhënat tona mund të merren nga https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'am': 'የፖስታ ሽርክት የመጨረሻውን ክስ በተደረገው የኃጢአተኛ ጉዳይ መጻሕፍት እና የሕግ ረዳት ሲስተካከል የጠቃሚ ሚዛን ያሳያል፡፡ የአሁኑ ሥራ የቁጥጥር ውይይት በሚያስፈልጋቸው የቁጥጥር ክስ ግን በጥቂት የሳጥን ክስ በተደረገ ጉዳዮች ላይ መፍጠር አይችሉም፡፡ ደግሞም እነዚህ ብዙ እየተለያዩ የሥርዓት ዓይነቶች አሉ፥ የእነርሱም ጽሕፈት እርስ በርሳቸው በሚያሳየፉ ናቸው። እነዚህን ጉዳዮች ለመቀበል፣ የውስይት ጽሑፎች እና ክስ መካከለኛ የውስጥነት ማረፊያ እና የክስ ክስሎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እነዚህም ምርጫዎች ለጥቂት ሳትወረውሩ ክስ፣ እና ለጥላቻ ክስ ለማንቀሳቀስ ጥያቄ የሚያስፈልጉት ማኅተም ይሰጣሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የአፍሪካዊ የሽብር መፍጠር ሞዴል እና የክስሎቶችን እና በመጠቀም እናሳድጋለን፡፡ እውነተኛውን የድራፍ ዳታተሮች ፍሬዎችን የሚያሳየው ሞዴላታችን ከሌሎቹ ሀገር-የart-መደገፊያዎች የበለጠ ትልቅ እና ሁኔታ የሚያደርግ ነው፡፡ በተለይም፣ ሞዴላያችን ሌሎችን መሠረት በመቶ 50 በመቶ ያነሳል፡፡ Our codes and datasets can be obtained from  https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'af': "Outomatiese gelaadsvoorskou doel om die eindelike gelaadsvoorskou te voorskou volgens die feit beskrywings in kriminele gevalle en speel 'n cruciële rol in wetlike assistent stelsels. Bestaande werke op gelaai voorskou doen adequate op daardie hoë-frekwensies gelaai, maar is nog nie in staat om 'n paar-skoot gelaai te voorskou met beperkte gevalle nie. Ook, hierdie bestaan baie verwarrende laai paar, wie se feit beskrywings is heeltemal gelyk aan mekaar. Om hierdie probleme te raak, introduseer ons verskeie diskriminasiewe eienskappe van gelades as die interne kaart tussen fakte beskrywings en gelades. Hierdie eienskappe verskaf addisionele inligting vir paar-skoot gelades, asook effektief seinale vir afdeling van verdwyn gelades. More specifically, we propose an attribute-attentive charge prediction model to infer the attributes and charges simultaneously. Eksperimentale resultate op reël-werk datastelle bevestig dat ons voorgestelde model betaling en konsistente verbeteringe bereik as ander staat-van-kuns-basisline. Spesifieke, ons model uitvoer ander basisline met meer as 50% in die paar skoot scenario. Ons kode en datastelle kan ontvang word van https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.", 'hy': 'Ավտոմատիկ մեղադրության կանխատեսումը նպատակում է կանխատեսել վերջնական մեղադրությունները ըստ հանցագործական դեպքերի փաստերի նկարագրությունների և խաղում է կարևոր դեր իրավաբանական օգնականների համակարգերում: Գոյություն ունի բեռնման կանխատեսման գործեր, որոնք բավարար չափով են կատարում բարձր հաճախականությամբ բեռնման վրա, բայց դեռ չեն կարողանում կանխատեսել սահմանափակ դեպքերով բավարար բեռնման վրա: Ավելին, սրանք գոյություն ունեն բազմաթիվ շփոթեցնող բեռնման զույգեր, որոնց փաստի նկարագրությունները բավականին նման են միմյանց: Այս հարցերին լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք վճարերի բացատրական առանձնահատկություններ, որպես ներքին քարտեզագրություն փաստերի նկարագրությունների և վճարերի միջև: Այս առանձնահատկությունները պարունակում են ավելացյալ տեղեկատվություն մի քանի լուսանկարների համար, ինչպես նաև արդյունավետ ազդանշաններ շփոթեցնող լուսանկարների տարբերակելու համար: Ավելի հատկապես, մենք առաջարկում ենք առանձնահատկություններին ուշադրություն դարձնող բեռնման կանխատեսման մոդել, որպեսզի հատկությունները և բեռնումները միաժամանակ հաշվի առնենք: Իրական աշխատանքի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելը հասնում է նշանակալի և համապատասխանատու բարելավումներին, քան ամենաբարձր հիմքերը: Մասնավորապես, մեր մոդելը գերազանցում է այլ հիմնական գծերը ավելի քան 50 տոկոսով մի քանի նկարների ընթացքում: Մեր կոդները և տվյալների համակարգերը կարող են ստանալ https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় অভিযোগ ভবিষ্যতের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে অপরাধী ক্ষেত্রের বর্ণনা অনুসারে চূড়ান্ত অভিযোগ ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা এবং আইনী সহকারী সিস্ Existing works on charge prediction perform adequately on those high-frequency charges but are not yet capable of predicting few-shot charges with limited cases.  এছাড়াও, এগুলো অনেক বিভ্রান্ত অভিযোগের জোড়া রয়েছে, যাদের বাস্তবতার বর্ণনা একে অপরের মত। এই বিষয়গুলো নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি বৈষম্যের বৈচারিক বৈষম্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বিষ এই বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বিভ্রান্ত অভিযোগ বিভ্রান্ত করার জন্য আরো কার্যকর তথ্য প্রদান করে। আরো বিশেষ করে, আমরা একটি বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী বিশেষ অভিযোগের প্রস্তাব করছি ভবিষ্যৎবাণী মডেল একই সাথে বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং অভিযোগের আক্র প্রস্তাবিত মডেল অন্যান্য রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের বেসাইনের চেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পাওয়া যায়। বিশেষ করে, আমাদের মডেল অন্যান্য বেসেলাইনের মাধ্যমে সংখ্যাগুলোর দৃশ্যে ৫০ শতাংশেরও বেশি। আমাদের কোড এবং ডাটাসেট থেকে পাওয়া যাবে https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'az': 'Avtomatik yük təmin etməsi cəza olaraq son günahlarını təmin etmək və qanuni asistent sistemlərində çox möhkəm rol oynamaq istəyir. Bu yüklük frekans yüklərinin üstündə müəyyən edilən işlər, amma hələ də müəyyən edilmiş vəziyyətlərlə az vuruş yüklərini təmin etməyə qadir deyillər. Bunlar bir çox karıştırıcı karıştırıcı cütlər var, həqiqətən də onların tanımları bir-birinə bənzəyir. Bu məsələləri çəkmək üçün, həqiqət tanımlamaları və günahları arasındakı iç maplama olaraq bir neçə dəyişiklik xüsusiyyətlərini tanıyırıq. Bu xüsusiyyətlər bir neçə fərqli yüklər üçün çox məlumat verirlər, həmçinin karışıqlıq yüklərini ayırmaq üçün etkili sinyallər də istifadə edirlər. Daha müəyyən olaraq, biz bir-birinin atributlərini və yüklərini təsdiqləmək üçün təsdiqləyirik. Gerçek işlər verilən verilən qutuların təcrübə etdiyimiz modellərin başqa möhüm və sürəkli düzəltmələrin başqa şəkildə təcrübə səhifələrindən daha yaxşılaşdığını göstərir. Şübhəsiz ki, modellərimiz bir neçə şəkildə 50%-dən artıq başqa sətirlərdən üstün gəlir. Kodlarımız və veri qurularımız https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'bs': 'Predviđanje automatske optužbe cilja je predvidjeti konačne optužbe prema opisu činjenica u kriminalnim slučajevima i igrati ključnu ulogu u sistemima pravnih asistenta. Postoje radovi na predviđanju optužbe obavljaju odgovarajuće optužbe za visokofrekvenciju, ali još nisu sposobni predvidjeti optužbe za nekoliko pucnjava sa ograničenim slučajevima. Osim toga, postoje mnogo zbunjenih par optužbi, čiji su opisi činjenice prilično slični jedni drugima. Da bi se riješili ovim pitanjima, predstavljamo nekoliko diskriminacijskih atributa optužbe kao unutrašnja mapa između opisa činjenica i optužbi. Ovi atributi pružaju dodatne informacije za optužbe za nekoliko pucnjava, kao i efikasne signale za razliku zbunjenih optužbi. Posebnije, predlažemo model predviđanja optužbe za atribute i optužbe istovremeno. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima realnog rada pokazuju da naš predloženi model postigne značajne i konsekventne poboljšanje od drugih podaci umjetnosti. Posebno, naš model iznosi druge osnovne linije više od 50% u scenariju nekoliko snimaka. Naši kodovi i podaci mogu dobiti od https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ca': "La previsió automàtica de càrregues mira a predir les càrregues finals segons les descripcions de fets en casos penals i juga un paper crucial en els sistemes d'assistents legals. Els treballs existents sobre la predicció de càrrega es produeixen adequadament en aquests càrrecs d'alta freqüència però encara no són capaços de predir càrregues amb pocs tiros amb casos limitats. A més, hi ha moltes parelles de càrregues confuses, les descripcions dels quals són bastant similars. Per abordar aquests problemes, introduim diversos atributs discriminatoris de càrregues com el mapatge intern entre descripcions de fets i càrregues. Aquests atributs proporcionen informació adicional per a càrregues poc disparades, i senyals efectius per distingir càrregues confuses. Més específicament, proposem un model de predicció de càrrega atent als atributs per inferir els atributs i càrregues simultàneament. Els resultats experimentals dels conjunts de dades de treball real demostren que el nostre model proposat aconsegueix millors significatives i consistents que altres línies de base modernes. Concretament, el nostre model supera altres línies de base en més del 50% en l'escenari de poques fotos. Els nostres codis i conjunts de dades es poden obtenir https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.", 'et': 'Automaatne laengute prognoosimine on kriminaalasjade lõplike süüdistuste prognoosimine vastavalt faktilistele kirjeldustele ning mängib õigusabisüsteemides olulist rolli. Olemasolevad laengute prognoosimise tööd toimivad nende kõrgsageduslike laengute puhul piisavalt, kuid ei ole veel võimelised ennustama vähese lasuga laenguid piiratud juhtudel. Veelgi enam, need on olemas palju segadusse ajavaid laengupaare, mille faktide kirjeldused on üsna sarnased üksteisega. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks võtame kasutusele mitmeid tasude diskrimineerivaid atribuute nagu faktiliste kirjelduste ja tasude sisemise kaardistamise. Need atribuudid annavad lisateavet vähese lasuga laengute kohta ning tõhusaid signaale segadust tekitavate laengute eristamiseks. Täpsemalt pakume välja atribuuditähelepaneliku laengu prognoosimise mudeli, et teha samaaegselt järeldusi atribuutide ja laengute kohta. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused reaalsete andmekogumite kohta näitavad, et meie kavandatud mudel saavutab märkimisväärseid ja järjepidevaid parandusi võrreldes teiste kaasaegsete lähtejoontega. Täpsemalt ületab meie mudel muud lähtejooned vähese pildi stsenaariumis rohkem kui 50%. Meie koodid ja andmekogumid on võimalik saada https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'cs': 'Automatická predikce poplatků má za cíl předpovídat konečné obvinění podle popisů skutečností v trestních případech a hraje klíčovou roli v systémech právního asistenta. Stávající práce na predikci náboje fungují na těchto vysokofrekvenčních nábojích adekvátně, ale zatím nejsou schopny předvídat náboje s několika výstřely v omezených případech. Navíc existuje mnoho matoucích nábojových párů, jejichž popisy faktů jsou sobě docela podobné. Pro řešení těchto problémů představujeme několik diskriminačních atributů poplatků jako interní mapování mezi popisy faktů a poplatky. Tyto atributy poskytují další informace o nábojích s několika výstřelem, stejně jako efektivní signály pro rozlišení matoucích nábojů. Konkrétněji navrhujeme model predikce náboje s pozorností atributů pro odvození atributů a nábojů současně. Experimentální výsledky na skutečných datových sadách ukazují, že náš navrhovaný model dosahuje významných a konzistentních zlepšení než ostatní moderní základní linie. Konkrétně náš model překonává ostatní základní linie o více než 50% ve scénáři několika záběrů. Naše kódy a datové sady lze získat z https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'fi': 'Automaattisen syytteenennustuksen tavoitteena on ennustaa lopulliset syytteet rikosasioiden tosiseikan kuvausten mukaisesti ja sillä on ratkaiseva rooli oikeusavustajien järjestelmissä. Olemassa olevat varausten ennustamistyöt toimivat riittävästi näillä suurtaajuuksilla, mutta niillä ei vielä pystytä ennustamaan muutaman laukauksen latauksia rajoitetuissa tapauksissa. Lisäksi nämä ovat olemassa monia hämmentäviä latauspareja, joiden tosiasiakuvaukset ovat melko samanlaisia keskenään. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi otamme käyttöön useita maksujen syrjiviä ominaisuuksia, kuten tosiasiakuvausten ja maksujen sisäistä kartoitusta. Nämä attribuutit tarjoavat lisätietoa muutaman laukauksen latauksista sekä tehokkaita signaaleja hämmentävien latausten erottamiseksi. Tarkemmin sanottuna ehdotamme attribuutteja huomioivaa latausennustemallia, jolla voidaan päätellä attribuutit ja laskut samanaikaisesti. Kokeelliset tulokset todellisista työpaikoista osoittavat, että ehdotetulla mallilla saavutetaan merkittäviä ja johdonmukaisia parannuksia kuin muilla huippuluokan lähtölinjoilla. Mallimme suoriutuu muista perusviivoista yli 50% muutaman kuvan skenaariossa. Koodit ja aineistot löytyvät osoitteesta: https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'ha': "Kayyar ɗabi'a farat-gabanta yana aimar ya yi bayani ga mashtaka ta ƙarami, kamar misãlai na cikin masu husũma na zunubi kuma ya yi aiki na muhimu a cikin tsarin mataimaki na sharĩ'a. Filin aiki da ke gabatar da bayani na gabatar da shi ke cika daidai a kan masharra masu sauri kuma ba su iya iya gabatar da shaidar masu sauran da aka ƙayyade. Wancan ɗinku ne mafi ãdalci a wurin Allah. To, dõmin mu yi tambaya ga masu yiwuwa, za mu ƙãga wasu misãlai masu da inganci kamar kartoni na guda a tsakanin describinta gaskiya da mashtaka. Wannan shiryoyin su bãyar da bayani na ƙaranci ga shaidar masu gabatar da ɗan-shot, da alama mai amfani da wajen rarraba masu cũtarwa. Kayya, za mu buɗa wata misali mai bayani na halin da alama, don ka sami abun halin da alama. Matarin jarrabai a kan tsarin aiki da ke gaskata ya nuna cewa misalinmu da aka buƙata, yana sãmu mai muhimmi da mai daidai koda musamman masu shida ko wanne-state-of-the-art. A ƙayyade, misalinmu yana samar da wasu layuka da ke ƙara 50% cikin wanda aka yi sauna. Ana iya iya samun kodi da danne-danne daga https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.", 'sk': 'Cilj avtomatskega napovedovanja obtožb je napovedati končne obtožbe glede na opis dejstev v kazenskih zadevah in ima ključno vlogo v sistemih pravnih pomočnikov. Obstoječa dela za napovedovanje nabojev ustrezno delujejo pri teh visokofrekvenčnih nabojih, vendar še niso sposobna napovedati nabojev z nekaj naboji v omejenih primerih. Poleg tega obstaja veliko zmedenih parov nabojev, katerih opisi dejstev so precej podobni drug drugemu. Za reševanje teh vprašanj uvajamo več diskriminativnih atributov pristojbin kot notranje kartiranje opisov dejstev in pristojbin. Ti atributi zagotavljajo dodatne informacije za naboje z nekaj streli, kot tudi učinkovite signale za razlikovanje zmedenih nabojev. Natančneje, predlagamo model napovedovanja nabojev, ki je pozoren na atribute, za hkratno sklepanje atributov in nabojev. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podatkovnih nizih dejanskega dela kažejo, da naš predlagani model dosega znatne in dosledne izboljšave kot druge najsodobnejše osnovne linije. Natančneje, naš model presega druge osnovne linije za več kot 50% v scenariju nekaj posnetkov. Naše kode in nabore podatkov je mogoče pridobiti na https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'he': 'Automatic charge prediction aims to predict the final charges according to the fact descriptions in criminal cases and plays a crucial role in legal assistant systems.  עבודות קיימות על חיזוי חיבוק מבצעים בהתאם על חיבוקים בתדר גבוה אלה, אבל עדיין לא מסוגלות לחזות חיבוקים קטנים עם מקרים מוגבלים. חוץ מזה, אלה קיימים הרבה זוגות טענות מבלבלות, שתיאוריהם בעובדות די דומים אחד לשני. To address these issues, we introduce several discriminative attributes of charges as the internal mapping between fact descriptions and charges.  האישורים האלה מספקים מידע נוסף לאישומים עם כמה יריות, כמו גם אותים יעילים להבחין באישומים מבלבלים. במיוחד יותר, אנו מציעים מודל חיזוי חיפוש שמשמע על תכונות כדי להוציא את הכוננות והחיפושים באותו הזמן. תוצאות ניסיוניות על קבוצות נתונים של עבודה אמיתית מראות שהמודל המוצע שלנו משיג שיפורים משמעותיים ותקבלים מאשר שורות בסיס חדשות אחרות. במיוחד, הדוגמא שלנו עולה על קווי הבסיס אחרים בעוד יותר מ-50% בתרחיש המעט צילומים. הקודים והמסמכים שלנו יכולים להשיג https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'jv': 'Layout Saying Lakok, padha akeh operasi waé karo nganggo akeh operasi layang, sampek kapan kelangan karo nganggo sampek durung. Nyong ngomong alam iki, kita nambah tanggal karribusi layang sampeyan karo iso nggawe cara-cara sing ngenggo karo akeh nambah layang lan kelangan cara Attribute iki nyimpen informasi tambah kanggo nggawe punika operasi dadi, dadi ngono singular efek kanggo nggawe tarjamahan sing dibutuhke string" in "context_BAR_stringLink R Laptop" and "Desktop Iso kode lan dataset iki dibutuhke https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.', 'bo': 'རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་འཇུག་སྡུད་རྟོགས་པར་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ནི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་འཇུག་རྗེས་སྔོན་སྟོན་འདོད་པ་དང་གསར་གཏོད་གནས་ཚུལ་ནང་དུ་ གནས་ཚུལ་རྗེས་མཁན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ལས་དེ་ཚོ་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་ཡིན། འོན་ཀྱང་དུས་ཚོད་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་རྐྱེན་རྗེས་ཉ འོན་ཀྱང་། འདི་དག་རྐྱེན་དུས་འདི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་མང་པོ་ཡིན། དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་དག་ལ་བཤད་དགོས་ན། ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ནང་འཁོད་རྣམས་ལས་སྦྱར་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་སྟོན་གྱི་ཡོད། ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་དག་གི་བརྗོད་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་བཀག་སྡུད་ཀྱི་གསལ་བཤད་སྐོར ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཞིག་ལ་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དང་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཅིག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དཔེ་རིགས་གཅིག་གམ། ངའི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབུགས་གནད་སྡུད་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ལས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་གཞན་དང་མཐུན་ར ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་རིས་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཚད་གཞི་རྟེན་གཞན་ཞིག་ལས་མཐུན་འགྲོ་བ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་སྒྲིག་ཨང་དང་གནད་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/thunlp/attribute_charge.'}
{'en': 'Can Taxonomy Help? Improving Semantic Question Matching using Question Taxonomy', 'ar': 'هل يمكن أن يساعد التصنيف؟ تحسين مطابقة الأسئلة الدلالية باستخدام تصنيف الأسئلة', 'pt': 'A taxonomia pode ajudar? Melhorar a correspondência semântica de perguntas usando a taxonomia de perguntas', 'es': '¿Puede ayudar la taxonomía? Mejorar la correspondencia semántica de preguntas mediante la taxonomía de preguntas', 'fr': 'La taxonomie peut-elle vous aider\xa0? Améliorer la correspondance sémantique des questions grâce à la taxonomie des', 'ja': 'タクソノミーは役に立ちますか？質問タクソノミーを使用したセマンティック質問のマッチングの改善', 'zh': '分类法可以助乎? 用类改语义匹配', 'ru': 'Может ли таксономия помочь? Улучшение семантического сопоставления вопросов с помощью таксономии вопросов', 'hi': 'वर्गीकरण मदद कर सकते हैं? प्रश्न वर्गीकरण का उपयोग कर शब्दार्थ प्रश्न मिलान में सुधार', 'ga': 'An féidir le Tacsanomaíocht Cabhrú? Meaitseáil Séimeantach Ceisteanna a Fheabhsú ag úsáid Tacsanomaíocht na gCeisteanna', 'ka': 'მჲზვ ლთ რაკჟჲნთ ეა ოჲმჲდნვ? Name', 'el': 'Μπορεί η Ταξινομία να βοηθήσει; Βελτίωση της αντιστοίχισης σημασιολογικών ερωτήσεων με τη χρήση της ονοματολογίας ερωτήσεων', 'hu': 'Segíthet a taxonómia? A szemantikus kérdések egyeztetésének javítása a kérdések taxonómiájával', 'kk': 'Таксония көмегі бола ма? Сұрақ таксономиясын қолдану үшін семантикалық сұрақтар сәйкестігін жақсарту', 'lt': 'Ar taksonomija gali padėti? Semantinių klausimų derinimo gerinimas naudojant klausimų taksonomiją', 'mk': 'Може ли таксономијата да помогне? Подобрување на семантичното одговарање на прашањата со користење на таксономија на прашањата', 'it': 'La tassonomia può aiutare? Migliorare la corrispondenza semantica delle domande utilizzando la tassonomia delle domande', 'ms': 'Boleh tolong Taxonomy? Improving Semantic Question Matching using Question Taxonomy', 'ml': 'ടാക്സോനോമി സഹായിക്കാമോ? ചോദ്യം ടാക്സോനോമി ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സെമാന്റിക് ചോദ്യം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു', 'mn': 'Таксономийн тусламж болох уу? Сүүлийн Таксономийг ашиглан семантик асуулт хоорондоо хоорондоо', 'no': 'Kan taksonomhjelp? Forbetra semantisk spørsmål med spørsmålstaksonemi', 'mt': 'It-Tassonomija tista’ tgħin? Titjib fit-Taxxonomija tal-Mistoqsijiet Semantiċi', 'pl': 'Czy taksonomia może pomóc? Poprawa dopasowywania pytań semantycznych za pomocą taksonomii pytań', 'ro': 'Poate taxonomia ajuta? Îmbunătățirea potrivirii semantice a întrebărilor utilizând taxonomia întrebărilor', 'sr': 'Može li taksonomija pomoći? Poboljšanje semantičkog odgovaranja pitanja koristeći taksonomiju pitanja', 'si': 'ටැක්සොනෝමි උදව් කරන්න පුළුවන්ද? Name', 'so': "Ma cawinaad kartaa canshuuraha? Horumarinta su'aalaha Semantic, Matxaftiisa isticmaalka su'aalaha Taxonomy", 'sv': 'Kan taxonomi hjälpa? Förbättra semantisk frågematchning med hjälp av frågetaxonomi', 'ta': 'Taxonomy உதவ முடியுமா? கேள்வி Taxonomy பயன்படுத்தி செமான்டிக் கேள்வி பொருத்தம் முன்னேற்றப்படுகிறது', 'ur': 'ٹاکسونی مدد کر سکتا ہے؟ سؤال ٹاکسونیی کے مطابق سفارشی سفارش مطابق', 'uz': 'Taxonoma yordam bera olami? Name', 'vi': 'Taxonomy có thể giúp không? Thay đổi tỷ lệ đặt câu hỏi bằng cách đặt câu hỏi.', 'bg': 'Може ли таксономията да помогне? Подобряване на семантичното съвпадение на въпросите с помощта на таксономията на въпросите', 'nl': 'Kan taxonomie helpen? Het verbeteren van semantische vragenmatching met behulp van vragentaxonomie', 'da': 'Kan taxonomi hjælpe? Forbedring af semantisk spørgsmålsmatchning ved hjælp af spørgsmålstaxonomi', 'id': 'Bisakah Taxonomy membantu? Improving Semantic Question Matching using Question Taxonomy', 'hr': 'Može li taksonomija pomoći? Poboljšanje semantičkog odgovarajućeg pitanja koristeći taksonomiju pitanja', 'de': 'Kann Taxonomie helfen? Verbesserung des semantischen Frageabgleichs mithilfe der Fragetaxonomie', 'ko': '분류학이 도움이 될까요?문제 분류법을 사용하여 의미 문제의 일치성을 개선하다', 'fa': 'ميتونه کمک تاکسوني کنه؟ بهتر از استفاده از تاکسون سوال سؤال سیمانتیک', 'sw': 'Je, Taxonomy anaweza kusaidia? Kuboresha swali la kimapenzi linalojiunganisha kwa kutumia swali la Taxonomy', 'tr': 'Taksonomiýa kömek edip bilermi? Semantik soragy soraglary sorag taksonomiýany ulanylar', 'af': 'Kan Taxonomy Hulp? Verbeter Semantiese vraag ooreenstemmende met vraag Taxonomy', 'hy': 'Կարո՞ղ է Տաքսոնամիան օգնել: Սեմանտիկ հարցերի համապատասխանման բարելավումը հարցերի տաքսոնամիայի օգտագործման միջոցով', 'az': 'Taksonomiya Yardımı? Semantik sual eşitməsini sual taxonomiya vasitəsilə yaxşılaşdırma', 'sq': 'Can Taxonomy Help?  Përmirësimi i përshtatjes së pyetjeve Semantike me përdorimin e taksonomisë së pyetjeve', 'bn': 'ট্যাক্সোনোমি কি সাহায্য করতে পারে? প্রশ্ন ট্যাক্সোনোমি ব্যবহার করে সেম্যান্টিক প্রশ্নের মাধ্যমে সংশোধন করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Može li taksonomija pomoći? Poboljšanje semantičkog odgovaranja pitanja koristeći taksonomiju pitanja', 'ca': "La taxonomia pot ajudar? millorar l'ajustament de preguntes Semàtiques fent servir la taxonomia de preguntes", 'am': 'ምርጫዎች ጥያቄ ትክሲኖሚን በተጠቃሚ የስሜናዊ ጥያቄ አቀማመጥ', 'cs': 'Může taxonomie pomoci? Zlepšení sémantického porovnávání otázek pomocí taxonomie otázek', 'et': 'Kas taksonoomia saab aidata? Semantilise küsimuste sobitamise parandamine küsimuste taksonoomia abil', 'fi': 'Voiko taksonomia auttaa? Semanttisen kysymysten vastaavuuden parantaminen kysymysteksonomian avulla', 'jv': 'Tulung Tulungan Taksi ? politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'he': 'טקסונומיה יכולה לעזור? שיפור התאמת שאלות סמנטיות באמצעות טקסונומיה לשאלות', 'sk': 'Lahko taksonomija pomaga? Izboljšanje semantičnega ujemanja vprašanj z uporabo taksonomije vprašanj', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ཊ་ཀོ་སིན་རོགས་རམ་བྱེད་ཆོག་གམ། རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དྲི་ཚིག་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་ཆེད་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་གནས་ཚུལ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a hybrid technique for semantic question matching. It uses a proposed two-layered taxonomy for English questions by augmenting state-of-the-art deep learning models with question classes obtained from a deep learning based question classifier. Experiments performed on three open-domain datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of our proposed approach. We achieve state-of-the-art results on partial ordering question ranking (POQR) benchmark dataset. Our empirical analysis shows that coupling standard distributional features (provided by the question encoder) with knowledge from taxonomy is more effective than either deep learning or taxonomy-based knowledge alone.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث نقترح تقنية هجينة لمطابقة الأسئلة الدلالية. يستخدم تصنيفًا مقترحًا من طبقتين لأسئلة اللغة الإنجليزية عن طريق زيادة نماذج التعلم العميق الحديثة مع فئات الأسئلة التي تم الحصول عليها من مصنف أسئلة قائم على التعلم العميق. التجارب التي أجريت على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات مفتوحة تظهر فعالية نهجنا المقترح. نحقق أحدث النتائج في مجموعة البيانات المعيارية للترتيب الجزئي للأسئلة (POQR). يُظهر تحليلنا التجريبي أن اقتران ميزات التوزيع القياسية (التي يوفرها مشفر السؤال) بالمعرفة المستمدة من التصنيف يكون أكثر فاعلية من التعلم العميق أو المعرفة القائمة على التصنيف وحدها.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons une technique hybride pour l'appariement sémantique des questions. Il utilise une taxonomie à deux niveaux proposée pour les questions en anglais en complétant les modèles de deep learning de pointe avec des classes de questions obtenues à partir d'un classificateur de questions basé sur le deep learning. Les expériences réalisées sur trois ensembles de données de domaine ouvert démontrent l'efficacité de l'approche que nous proposons. Nous obtenons des résultats de pointe sur l'ensemble de données de référence POQR (partial ordering question ranking). Notre analyse empirique montre que le couplage des caractéristiques distributionnelles standard (fournies par l'encodeur de questions) avec les connaissances issues de la taxonomie est plus efficace que le deep learning ou les connaissances basées uniquement sur la taxonomie.", 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos una técnica híbrida para la comparación semántica de preguntas. Utiliza una taxonomía propuesta de dos niveles para las preguntas en inglés al aumentar los modelos de aprendizaje profundo de última generación con clases de preguntas obtenidas de un clasificador de preguntas basado en el aprendizaje profundo. Los experimentos realizados en tres conjuntos de datos de dominio abierto demuestran la eficacia de nuestro enfoque propuesto. Logramos resultados de vanguardia en el conjunto de datos de referencia de clasificación de preguntas de pedido parcial (POQR). Nuestro análisis empírico muestra que combinar las características distribucionales estándar (proporcionadas por el codificador de preguntas) con el conocimiento de la taxonomía es más eficaz que el aprendizaje profundo o el conocimiento basado en taxonomía por sí solos.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos uma técnica híbrida para correspondência semântica de perguntas. Ele usa uma taxonomia de duas camadas proposta para perguntas em inglês, aumentando modelos de aprendizado profundo de última geração com classes de perguntas obtidas de um classificador de perguntas baseado em aprendizado profundo. Experimentos realizados em três conjuntos de dados de domínio aberto demonstram a eficácia de nossa abordagem proposta. Alcançamos resultados de última geração no conjunto de dados de referência de classificação de perguntas de ordenação parcial (POQR). Nossa análise empírica mostra que o acoplamento de recursos de distribuição padrão (fornecidos pelo codificador de perguntas) com conhecimento de taxonomia é mais eficaz do que aprendizado profundo ou conhecimento baseado em taxonomia sozinho.', 'ja': '本稿では、意味論的質問マッチングのためのハイブリッド手法を提案する。最先端のディープラーニングモデルをディープラーニングベースの質問分類器から得られた質問クラスで拡張することにより、英語の質問に提案された2層の分類法を使用している。3つのオープンドメインデータセットで実施された実験は、提案されたアプローチの有効性を示しています。部分順序問題ランキング（ POQR ）ベンチマークデータセットで最先端の結果を達成します。私たちの経験的分析は、標準的な分布特徴（質問エンコーダによって提供される）と分類学からの知識を結合することは、ディープラーニングまたは分類学ベースの知識のいずれかだけよりも効果的であることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文中,发一语义匹配之术。 其用一议分类法以对英语问,法用深学分类器所得类来增最先进之深学。 3开域数集上实验验吾所以为有效性。 余于部排序排名(POQR)准数集上最先进也。 臣等实分析表明,分布特征(编码器)与分类学合比仅用深学基于分类学。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम शब्दार्थ प्रश्न मिलान के लिए एक हाइब्रिड तकनीक का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। यह एक गहरी शिक्षा आधारित प्रश्न क्लासिफायर से प्राप्त प्रश्न कक्षाओं के साथ अत्याधुनिक गहरे सीखने के मॉडल को बढ़ाकर अंग्रेजी प्रश्नों के लिए एक प्रस्तावित दो-स्तरीय वर्गीकरण का उपयोग करता है। तीन ओपन-डोमेन डेटासेट पर किए गए प्रयोग हमारे प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं। हम आंशिक आदेश प्रश्न रैंकिंग (POQR) बेंचमार्क डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। हमारे अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि वर्गीकरण से ज्ञान के साथ मानक वितरण सुविधाओं (प्रश्न एन्कोडर द्वारा प्रदान की गई) को युग्मन करना अकेले गहरी शिक्षा या वर्गीकरण-आधारित ज्ञान की तुलना में अधिक प्रभावी है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы предлагаем гибридный метод для семантического сопоставления вопросов. Он использует предлагаемую двухслойную таксономию для английских вопросов, дополняя современные модели глубокого обучения классами вопросов, полученными из классификатора вопросов на основе глубокого обучения. Эксперименты, проведенные с тремя наборами данных открытого домена, демонстрируют эффективность предлагаемого нами подхода. Мы достигаем самых современных результатов по набору контрольных данных для ранжирования вопросов с частичным упорядочением (POQR). Наш эмпирический анализ показывает, что сочетание стандартных распределительных признаков (предоставляемых кодировщиком вопросов) со знаниями из таксономии является более эффективным, чем только глубокое обучение или знания, основанные на таксономии.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid teicníc hibrideach le haghaidh meaitseáil shéimeantach ceisteanna. Úsáideann sé tacsanomaíocht dhá shraith molta do cheisteanna Béarla trí mhúnlaí domhainfhoghlama úrscothacha a mhéadú le ranganna ceisteanna a fhaightear ó aicmitheoir ceisteanna atá bunaithe ar dhomhainfhoghlaim. Léiríonn turgnaimh a dhéantar ar thrí thacar sonraí fearainn oscailte éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige molta. Bainimid torthaí úrscothacha ar thacar sonraí tagarmharcála um rangú ceisteanna páirt-ordaithe (POQR). Léiríonn ár n-anailís eimpíreach go bhfuil sé níos éifeachtaí gnéithe caighdeánacha dáileacháin (arna chur ar fáil ag an ionchódóir ceisteanna) le heolas ó thacsanomaíocht ná foghlaim dhomhain nó eolas atá bunaithe ar thacsanomaíocht amháin.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ წარმოდგინეთ ჰიბრიტური ტექნექცია სემონტიკური კითხვების შესაბამისათვის. ის გამოყენება ანგლისური კითხვებისთვის ორ-layered რაქტონომია, რომლებიც კითხვების კლასებისთვის მიღებული კითხვების კლასიფიკაციის კითხვებისთვის განმავლობაში, ანგლისური კითხვებისთვის გამოცდილება სამი დიომენის გახსნილი მონაცემებით გამოყენებული მონაცემების ეფექტიურობას ჩვენი წარმოადგენა. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენებით. ჩვენი ემპერიკალური ანალიზი გამოჩვენება, რომ სტანდარტური განყოფილებული ფუნქციები (კითხვის კოდერების გამოყენებული) რაქტონომიის მეცნიერებით უფრო ეფექტიურია, ვიდრე ემპერი', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια υβριδική τεχνική για τη σημασιολογική αντιστοίχιση ερωτήσεων. Χρησιμοποιεί μια προτεινόμενη ταξινόμηση δύο επιπέδων για αγγλικές ερωτήσεις, εμπλουτίζοντας σύγχρονα μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης με κατηγορίες ερωτήσεων που λαμβάνονται από έναν ταξινομητή ερωτήσεων βασισμένο στη βαθιά μάθηση. Τα πειράματα που πραγματοποιήθηκαν σε τρία σύνολα δεδομένων ανοικτού τομέα αποδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισής μας. Επιτυγχάνουμε αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς μερικής ταξινόμησης ερωτήσεων (POQR). Η εμπειρική μας ανάλυση δείχνει ότι η σύζευξη των τυπικών χαρακτηριστικών κατανομής (που παρέχονται από τον κωδικοποιητή ερωτήσεων) με τη γνώση από την ταξινομία είναι πιο αποτελεσματική από τη βαθιά μάθηση ή τη γνώση που βασίζεται μόνο στην ταξινομία.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban hibrid technikát javasolunk a szemantikai kérdések egyeztetésére. Egy javasolt kétrétegű taxonómiát használ az angol kérdésekhez a legkorszerűbb mélytanulási modellek kiegészítésével egy mélytanulási alapú kérdéscsoportosítótól kapott kérdéskörökkel. Három nyílt domain adatkészleten végzett kísérletek bizonyítják a javasolt megközelítés hatékonyságát. A részleges megrendelési kérdések rangsorolásával (POQR) kapcsolatos referenciaadatok korszerű eredményeket érünk el. empirikus elemzésünk azt mutatja, hogy a kérdéskódoló által biztosított standard disztribúciós jellemzők és a taxonómiai ismeretek összekapcsolása hatékonyabb, mint a mélytanulás vagy a taxonómiai alapú ismeretek.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo una tecnica ibrida per il matching semantico delle domande. Utilizza una tassonomia a due livelli proposta per le domande inglesi aumentando modelli di deep learning all'avanguardia con classi di domande ottenute da un classificatore di domande basato su deep learning. Esperimenti effettuati su tre set di dati open-domain dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro approccio proposto. Otteniamo risultati all'avanguardia sul set di dati di benchmark POQR (Partial Order Question Ranking). La nostra analisi empirica mostra che l'accoppiamento delle caratteristiche distributive standard (fornite dal question encoder) con le conoscenze provenienti dalla tassonomia è più efficace del deep learning o della conoscenza basata sulla tassonomia.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз симантикалық сұрақтар сәйкестігінің гибрид техникасын ұсынамыз. Бұл ағылшынша сұрақтар үшін екі қабатты таксономия қолданылады. Сұрақтар күйінің қалыпты оқыту классификациясынан алған сұрақтар классификациясы арқылы сұрақтар үлгісін көтеру үшін Үш ашылған домен деректер қорларында жасалған тәжірибелер қолданылған тәжірибеміздің эффективнігін көрсетеді. Біз бөлшекті сұрақтарды реттеу (POQR) деңгейіндегі суреттің нәтижелерін жеткіземіз. Эмпирикалық анализ таксономиядан білім берген стандартты дистрибуттық мүмкіндіктерді (сұрақ кодері бойынша) біріктіру - толық оқытуға не таксономиядан негізделген білімдерден ең эффективні.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome hibridinį semantinio klausimų derinimo metodą. Jame siūloma dviejų sluoksnių taksonomija anglų kalbos klausimams, papildant naujausius giliavandenio mokymosi modelius su klausimų klasifikavimo klasėmis, gautomis iš giliavandenio mokymosi klausimų klasifikatoriaus. Trys atviros srities duomenų rinkiniai parodė mūsų siūlomo metodo veiksmingumą. Mes pasiekiame naujausius rezultatus dėl dalinio tvarkymo klausimų lyginamojo duomenų rinkinio (POQR). Mūsų empirinė analizė rodo, kad standartinių paskirstymo charakteristikų (pateiktų klausimų koduotojo) sujungimas su mokomosiomis žiniomis iš taksonomijos yra veiksmingesnis nei tik gilus mokymasis arba mokomosios mokomosios žinios.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഹൈബ്രിഡ് ടെക്കിക്ക് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു സെമാന്റിക് ചോദ്യം ച ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി രണ്ട് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി പഠിക്കുന്ന രാജ്യത്തിലെ ആഴത്തിലെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട്  മൂന്നു തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ച പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പ നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഗമായ ഉത്തരവാദിത്വത്തിന്റെ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ (പോക്യൂര്\u200d) ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ സ്റ നമ്മുടെ ശാസ്ത്ര വിശ്വാസം കാണിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d സാധാരണ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ (ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ കോഡിറ്റര്\u200d കൊണ്ട് തരിപ്പിക്കുന്ന) ജ്ഞാനം ക', 'mk': 'Во овој весник предложуваме хибридна техника за семантично одговарање на прашања. Истиот користи предложена двосторна таксономија за англиски прашања со зголемување на најсовремените модели на длабоко учење со класи на прашања добиени од класификатор на прашања базиран на длабоко учење. Експериментите спроведени на три податоци на отворен домен ја покажуваат ефикасноста на нашиот предложен пристап. Ние постигнуваме најсовремени резултати за резултатите на резултатот на рејтингот на парцијално нарачување на прашањата (POQR). Нашата емпирична анализа покажува дека поврзувањето на стандардните дистрибуционални карактеристики (обезбедени од кодерот на прашањата) со знаењето од таксономијата е поефикасно отколку само длабоко учење или знаење базирано на таксономијата.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэхүү асуулт хоорондоо холбогдох гибрид техник санал болгож байна. Энэ нь англи хэлний асуултуудын тулд хоёр давхар татекономикийг ашиглаж, суралцах сургалтын үндсэн асуулт хуваалцагчдаас авсан асуулт суралцах загваруудыг нэмэгдүүлж байна. Гурван нээлттэй өгөгдлийн сан дээр хийсэн туршилтууд бидний санал өгсөн аргын үр дүнг харуулдаг. Бид нэг хэсэг асуултын дарааллаар (POQR) хэмжээний дарааллаар урлагийн үр дүн гаргадаг. Манай эмперикийн шинжилгээ нь татвар ономикийн мэдлэгийг зөвхөн гүнзгий суралцах эсвэл татвар ономикийн үндсэн мэдлэгиэс илүү үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu teknika ibrida għat-tqabbil tal-mistoqsijiet semantiċi. Hija tuża tassonomija proposta b’żewġ saffi għall-mistoqsijiet Ingliżi billi żżid mudelli ta’ tagħlim profond bl-aktar mudelli avvanzati b’klassijiet ta’ mistoqsijiet miksuba minn klassifikatur ta’ mistoqsijiet ibbażat fuq tagħlim profond. L-esperimenti mwettqa fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta open-domain juru l-effettività tal-approċċ propost tagħna. Aħna nilħqu riżultati l-aktar avvanzati dwar sett ta’ dejta ta’ referenza dwar l-ordnar parzjali tal-mistoqsijiet (POQR). L-analiżi empirika tagħna turi li l-akkoppjar tal-karatteristiċi tad-distribuzzjoni standard (ipprovduti mill-kodifikatur tal-mistoqsijiet) mal-għarfien mit-tassonomija huwa aktar effettiv minn tagħlim profond jew għarfien ibbażat fuq it-tassonomija waħdu.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan teknik hibrid untuk persamaan soalan semantik. Ia menggunakan taksonomi dua lapisan yang diusulkan untuk soalan Bahasa Inggeris dengan menambah model pembelajaran mendalam dengan kelas soalan yang diperoleh dari klasifikasi soalan berdasarkan pembelajaran mendalam. Eksperimen yang dilakukan pada tiga set data domain terbuka menunjukkan kegunaan pendekatan yang kami cadangkan. Kami mencapai keputusan-state-of-the-art pada set data benchmark rangkaian pertanyaan perintah sebahagian (POQR). Analisis empirik kami menunjukkan bahawa sambungan ciri-ciri distribusi piawai (disediakan oleh pengekod soalan) dengan pengetahuan dari taksonomi lebih efektif daripada belajar dalam atau pengetahuan berdasarkan taksonomi sahaja.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy hybrydową technikę semantycznego dopasowywania pytań. Wykorzystuje proponowaną dwuwarstwową taksonomię dla pytań angielskich poprzez rozszerzenie najnowocześniejszych modeli głębokiego uczenia o klasy pytań uzyskane z klasyfikatora pytań opartego na głębokim uczeniu. Eksperymenty przeprowadzone na trzech zbiorach danych otwartej domeny pokazują skuteczność proponowanego podejścia. Osiągamy najnowocześniejsze wyniki dotyczące rankingu pytań częściowych (POQR) danych referencyjnych. Nasza empiryczna analiza pokazuje, że połączenie standardowych cech dystrybucyjnych (dostarczanych przez koder pytań) z wiedzą z taksonomii jest skuteczniejsze niż głębokie uczenie się lub wiedza oparta na taksonomii.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi ein hybridteknikk for semantisk spørsmål. Det bruker ein foreslått to-lagt taksonomie for engelsk spørsmål ved å auka dype læringsmodeller med spørsmålklassar som får frå ein dyp læringsbasert spørsmålklassering. Eksperiment utført på tre datasett for opna domenet viser effektiviteten av vår foreslått tilnærming. Vi oppnår tilstanden av kunsten på delvis rekkjefølgjande spørsmålsranking (POQR) benchmarkdatasett. Vår empirisk analyse viser at tilkopling av standard distribusjonsfunksjonar (oppgjeven av spørsmålskoderen) med kunnskap frå taksonomien er meir effektivt enn anten dyp læring eller bare taksonomisk kunnskap.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o tehnică hibridă pentru potrivirea semantică a întrebărilor. Acesta utilizează o taxonomie propusă pe două straturi pentru întrebările engleze prin extinderea modelelor de învățare profundă de ultimă generație cu clase de întrebări obținute de la un clasificator de întrebări bazat pe învățare profundă. Experimentele efectuate pe trei seturi de date cu domeniu deschis demonstrează eficacitatea abordării propuse. Obținem rezultate de ultimă generație privind setul de date de referință POQR (Parțial Order Question Ranking). Analiza noastră empirică arată că cuplarea caracteristicilor distribuționale standard (furnizate de codificatorul de întrebări) cu cunoștințele din taxonomie este mai eficientă decât învățarea profundă sau cunoștințele bazate doar pe taxonomie.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo hibridnu tehniku za semantičko odgovaranje pitanja. Koristi predloženu dvoslojnu taksonomiju za engleska pitanja povećavajući modele dubokog učenja države umjetnosti sa časovima pitanja koji su dobili od klasifikatora dubokog učenja temeljenog na pitanju. Eksperimenti provedeni na tri seta podataka otvorenog domena pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa. Postignemo rezultate stanja umjetnosti na delovičnom raspoređivanju pitanja (POQR) standardnom setu podataka. Naša empirička analiza pokazuje da povezanje standardnih distribucijskih karakteristika (obezbeđenih koderom pitanja) sa znanjem iz taksonomije je efikasnije nego samo duboko učenje ili znanje na taksonomiji.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa teknikada hybrid si ay u eg tahay su'aalaha semantiga. Waxay u isticmaaltaa su'aalaha ingiriisiga ee la soo jeeday laba qof oo lagu talo galay si ay u kordhiso tusaalaha waxbarashada deegaanka ee dowladda farshaxanka ah, taas oo fasalka su'aalaha laga helay fasalka su'aalaha aasaasiga ah. Imtixaanka lagu sameeyay saddexda macluumaad ee furan ee domain waxay muujiyaan shaqaalaha qaababka la soo jeeday. Waxaynu dhamaynaa arimaha farshaxanka ee ku saabsan qeyb ka mid ah su'aalaha lagu hagayo (POQR). Our empirical analysis shows that coupling standard distributional features (provided by the question encoder) with knowledge from taxonomy is more effective than either deep learning or taxonomy-based knowledge alone.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi en hybridteknik för semantisk frågematchning. Den använder en föreslagen tvålagers taxonomi för engelska frågor genom att utöka state-of-the-art djupinlärningsmodeller med frågeklasser erhållna från en djupinlärningsbaserad frågeklassificerare. Experiment utförda på tre datauppsättningar med öppen domän visar hur effektivt vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt är. Vi uppnår toppmoderna resultat på jämförelsedataset med partial order question ranking (POQR). Vår empiriska analys visar att det är effektivare att koppla ihop standarddistributionsfunktioner (som tillhandahålls av frågekodaren) med kunskap från taxonomi än enbart djupinlärning eller taxonomi baserad kunskap.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් තාක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. ඒක භාවිතා කරනවා ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් අධික ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධික ඉගෙන ගන් අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුනක් විතරයි. අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (POQR) බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් දත්ත සෙට් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ් අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ස්ථානික විශ්ලේෂණ අවශ්\u200dයය (ප්\u200dරශ්න සංකේතකයෙන් පෙන්වන්න) පරීක්ෂණයෙන් දන්නවත්', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு ஹைப்ரிட் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை பொருத்துவதற்காக பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இது ஆங்கிலம் கேள்வி வகுப்பாளரிடமிருந்து கேள்வி வகுப்பிலிருந்து கிடைக்கப்பட்டுள்ள இரண்டு அடுக்கு நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை அதிகரி மூன்று திறந்த டொமைன் தரவுத்தளங்களில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட முன்னோட்டம் எங்கள் திருப்பப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்ட நாங்கள் பகுதி கட்டளைப்படுத்தும் கேள்வி வரிசையில் நிலையின் முடிவுகளை பெறுகிறோம். எங்கள் முக்கியமான ஆராய்ச்சி தெரியும் நிலையான பங்கீட்டு குணங்கள் (கேள்வி குறியீட்டு வழங்கப்பட்டது)', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک ہیبراڈ ٹیکنیک کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں سیمنٹی سؤال کے مطابق۔ یہ انگلیسی سوالوں کے لئے ایک پیشنهاد دو لائر ٹکسنومیٹ کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ اسے سؤال کلاس کے ساتھ سوال کی سیکھنے والی سوال کلاسیر سے اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ تین اوپن ڈومین ڈیٹ سٹ پر عمل کی آزمائش ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کے مثبت کو دکھاتی ہے. ہم حصہ سفارشی سفارش رینگ (POQR) بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر قائم رہے ہیں. ہماری امپراتیکی تحقیقات دکھاتی ہے کہ ٹاکنسومی سے علم کے ساتھ استاندارڈ ڈیٹ بیٹ ڈیٹ بیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda biz semantik savol bilan mos keladigan hybrid teknikotini talab qilamiz. Bu ingliz savollariga ikkita qo'llangan taxonomni o'rganish holatini o'rganish holatida o'rganish modellarini qo'shish mumkin, muammo'rganish muammolari darajadagi murakkab o'rganish darajalaridan foydalanadi. Uchta ochiq domen maʼlumotlar tarkibida bajarilgan imtiyozlar taʼminlov qilingan usulning effektligini ko'rsatadi. Biz qiymati tarqatish soʻrovi (POQR) benchmark maʼlumoti tartibi haqida saqlash natijalarini bajaramiz. Bizning muvaffaqiyatli analytikimizni ko'rsatadi, taxonomdagi илм bilan o'rganish amalning taxonom asosida faqat o'rganishdan foydalanish (savol kodlash qoidasi) darajadagi tarqatish xususiyatlarini birlashtirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một kỹ thuật lai ngữ nghĩa. Nó sử dụng một loại thuế hai lớp đề xuất cho các câu hỏi tiếng Anh bằng cách tăng cường các mô hình học sâu nhất nghệ thuật với các lớp câu hỏi lấy từ một chuyên gia phân tích câu hỏi sâu học. Những thử nghiệm trên ba bộ dữ liệu mở miền cho thấy hiệu quả của phương pháp chúng ta đề nghị. Chúng tôi đạt được kết quả tối tân khi đặt câu hỏi kiểu cách (POQR) theo tập tin chuẩn. Phân tích theo kinh nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy các tính năng phân phối tiêu chuẩn (được cung cấp bởi bộ mã câu hỏi) với kiến thức từ taxonomy là hiệu quả hơn cả việc học sâu hay chỉ dựa vào taxonomy.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we een hybride techniek voor semantische vragenmatching voor. Het gebruikt een voorgestelde tweelaagse taxonomie voor Engelse vragen door state-of-the-art deep learning modellen uit te breiden met vraagklassen verkregen uit een op deep learning gebaseerde vraagclassificator. Experimenten uitgevoerd op drie open-domein datasets tonen de effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde aanpak aan. We bereiken state-of-the-art resultaten op basis van POQR-benchmarkgegevens (Partial Order Question Ranking). Onze empirische analyse toont aan dat het koppelen van standaard distributionele kenmerken (geleverd door de vragencoder) met kennis uit taxonomie effectiever is dan deep learning of op taxonomie gebaseerde kennis alleen.', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi en hybrid teknik til semantisk spørgsmålstilling. Det bruger en foreslået to-lags taksonomi for engelske spørgsmål ved at øge state-of-the-art dyb læring modeller med spørgsmål klasser opnået fra en dyb læring baseret spørgsmålsklassifikation. Eksperimenter udført på tre open-domain datasæt viser effektiviteten af vores foreslåede tilgang. Vi opnår state-of-the-art resultater på partial order spørgsmål ranking (POQR) benchmark datasæt. Vores empiriske analyse viser, at kobling af standardfordelingsegenskaber (leveret af spørgsmålskoderen) med viden fra taksonomi er mere effektiv end enten dyb læring eller taksonomi baseret viden alene.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме хибридна техника за семантично съвпадение на въпроси. Той използва предложена двупластова таксономия за английски въпроси чрез увеличаване на най-съвременните модели за дълбоко учене с въпросителни класове, получени от базиран на дълбоко учене въпросителен класификатор. Експериментите, извършени върху три открити набора от данни, демонстрират ефективността на предлагания от нас подход. Ние постигаме най-съвременни резултати при сравнителния набор от данни с частично подреждане на въпросите (ПОКР). Нашият емпиричен анализ показва, че свързването на стандартните дистрибуционни характеристики (предоставени от въпросния кодер) със знанията от таксономията е по-ефективно от дълбокото учене или от таксономично базираните знания.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo hibridnu tehniku za semantičko odgovaranje pitanja. On koristi predloženu dvoslojnu taksonomiju za engleska pitanja povećavajući modele dubokog učenja države umjetnosti s časovima pitanja koje su dobile iz klasifikatora dubokog učenja temeljenog na pitanju. Eksperimenti provedeni na tri podataka otvorenog domena pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa. Postignemo rezultate stanja umjetnosti na sastavu podataka o određenim redovima pitanja (POQR). Naša empirička analiza pokazuje da je povezanje standardnih distribucijskih karakteristika (predviđenih koderom pitanja) s znanjem iz taksonomije učinkovitije nego samo duboko učenje ili taksonomičko znanje.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine hybride Technik für semantisches Frageabgleichen vor. Es verwendet eine vorgeschlagene zweischichtige Taxonomie für englische Fragen, indem modernste Deep Learning Modelle mit Fragenklassen erweitert werden, die von einem Deep Learning basierten Fragenklassifikator erhalten wurden. Experimente an drei Open-Domain-Datensätzen belegen die Wirksamkeit unseres vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes. Wir erzielen State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse auf Basis von POQR-Benchmark-Datensätzen (Partial Order Question Ranking). Unsere empirische Analyse zeigt, dass die Kopplung von Standardverteilungsmerkmalen (bereitgestellt durch den Fragenkodierer) mit Wissen aus der Taxonomie effektiver ist als Deep Learning oder taxonomie-basiertes Wissen allein.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan teknik hibrid untuk persamaan pertanyaan semantis. Ia menggunakan taksonomi dua lapisan yang diusulkan untuk pertanyaan Bahasa Inggris dengan meningkatkan model belajar dalam-dalam state-of-the-art dengan kelas pertanyaan yang diperoleh dari klasifikasi pertanyaan berdasarkan belajar dalam-dalam. Eksperimen yang dilakukan pada tiga set data domain terbuka menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kami yang diusulkan. Kami mencapai hasil terbaik dalam rangkaian pertanyaan perintah parsial (POQR) dataset benchmark. Analisi empirik kami menunjukkan bahwa menyambung karakteristik distribusi standar (yang disediakan oleh pengekode pertanyaan) dengan pengetahuan dari taksonomi lebih efektif daripada belajar dalam atau pengetahuan berdasarkan taksonomi sendirian.', 'ko': '본고는 혼합된 의미 문제의 일치 기술을 제시했다.이것은 제안된 영어 문제 2층 분류법을 사용하여 깊이 있는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 문제 분류기에서 얻은 문제 유형을 사용하여 가장 선진적인 깊이 있는 학습 모델을 강화한다.세 개의 개방역 데이터 집합에서 진행된 실험은 우리가 제시한 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.우리는 편차 문제 순위(POQR) 기준 데이터 세트에서 최신 결과를 얻었다.우리의 실증 분석에 의하면 표준 분포 특징(문제 인코더가 제공)과 분류학 지식을 결합시키는 것이 단독으로 깊이 있게 학습하거나 분류학을 바탕으로 하는 지식보다 효과적이다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک تکنیک hybrid برای مسابقه سوال\u200cهای semantic پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. با افزایش مدل\u200cهای یادگیری عمیق در حالی که کلاس\u200cهای سوال از یک کلاس\u200cشناسی عمیق درس یادگیری از یک کلاس\u200cشناسی\u200cکننده\u200cی سوال\u200cهای عمیق، از یک تاکسونوم دو طبقه\u200cای برای سوال\u200cهای انگلیسی استفاده می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cهایی که در سه مجموعه داده\u200cهای دومین باز انجام شده نشان می\u200cدهند فعالیت روش پیشنهاد ما. ما نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنری را در سفارش سفارش قسمتی (POQR) بررسی می\u200cکنیم. تحلیل امپراطوری ما نشان می دهد که تعداد ویژه های استاندارد تقسیم (که توسط کودتر سوال داده شده) با دانش از تاکسونوم بیشتر از دانش عمیق یا تاکسونوم تنها موثر است.', 'af': "In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n hybridteknike vir semantiese vraag ooreenstemmende. Dit gebruik 'n voorgestelde twee laagte taksonomie vir Engels vrae deur die vergroot state-of-the-art diep leer modele met vraagklasse wat van 'n diep leer gebaseerde vraag klassifiseerder ontvang word. Eksperimente wat op drie oop-domein-datastelle uitgevoer het, vertoon die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde toegang. Ons bereik status-of-the-art resultate op gedeeltelike sortering vraag rangering (POQR) benchmark datastel. Ons empiriese analisie wys dat die koppeling van standaard verspreidingsfunksies (verskaf deur die vraagkoder) met kennis van taksonomie meer effektief is as of diep leer of taxonomies-gebaseerde kennis alleen.", 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza teknolojia ya hybrid kwa ajili ya swali la sekunde linalolinganisha. Inatumia utawala wa vipindi viwili vinavyopendekezwa kwa maswali ya Kiingereza kwa kuongeza mifano ya elimu ya sanaa yenye darasa la maswali iliyopewa kutoka kwa mwandishi wa maswali yenye msingi wa maswali. Majaribio yaliyofanyika kwenye taarifa tatu za wazi za ndani zinaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu ya pendekezo. Tunaweza kupata matokeo ya hali ya sanaa juu ya maswali ya sehemu ya kuagiza ujumbe wa taarifa za bendera ya POQR. Uchambuzi wetu wa msisitizo unaonyesha kuwa kuunganisha vipengele vya usambazaji vya kawaida (vinavyotolewa na kodi la swali) kwa ujuzi kutoka utawala ni ufanisi zaidi ya kujifunza ndani au maarifa yenye msingi wa koxonoma pekee.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የኬብሪክ የስሜኒካ ጥያቄን ለመተካከል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ከጥልቅ ትምህርት በተመሳሳይ ትምህርት መተማር ጥልቅ ትምህርት ዓይነቶችን በመጨመር የንግግሊዘኛ ጠያፍ ጥልቅ ትምህርት ማቀናቀል የተዘጋጀ ሁለት ደረጃዎች የጥልቅ ጥብቅ ጥያቄ ጥያቄን ይጠቅማል፡፡ በሦስት ክፍት ዶሜን ዳታተሮች ላይ የተፈጸመ ፈተናዎች የሞክራችንን ሥርዓት የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ የ-የ-የ-አርእስት ውጤቶችን በአካላዊ ጥያቄ (POQR) የbenchmark dataset ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የድምፅ ምርጫችን የጥልቅ ትምህርት ወይም የጥልቅ እውቀት ብቻውን ከማግኘት ይልቅ የተሻለ ነው፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda semantik soraglar üçin hybrid teknikini teklip edip bilýäris. Iňlisçe soraglary üçin ýigrenli iki gatlak taksady ulanýar. Üç açyk-domenyň veri setirlerinde etkinleşen deneyler teklip eden metodamyzyň etkinleşigini görkezýär. Biz sanat netijesini parça düzenlemek soragy derejesinde (POQR) benchmark veri setirine ýetip bileris. Biziň empirik analyzamyz taksadyň bilimi bilen standart daýlamak özelliklerini ýakyn ýöne derin öwrenmek ýa-da taksadyň bir bilimi bilen daýlamak täsirlidir.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, propozojmë një teknikë hibride për përshtatjen e pyetjeve semantike. Ajo përdor një taksonomie të propozuar me dy nivele për pyetjet angleze duke shtuar modelet e mësimit të thellë më të lartë me klasifikuesit e pyetjeve të përfshira nga një klasifikues pyetjesh të thella bazuar në mësim të thellë. Eksperimentet e kryera në tre grupe të dhënash me domini të hapur tregojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë të propozuar. Ne arrijmë rezultate më të mëdha në renditjen e pyetjeve të renditura të pjesshme (POQR) të bazës së të dhënave. Analiza jonë empirike tregon se lidhja e karakteristikave standard shpërndarëse (të ofruara nga koduesi i pyetjeve) me njohuritë nga taksonomia është më e efektshme se vetëm mësimi i thellë apo njohuria bazuar në taksonomia.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সেম্পেন্টিক প্রশ্নের মিলিয়ে একটি হাইব্রিড প্রযুক্তি প্রস্তাব করি। এটি ইংরেজী প্রশ্নের জন্য প্রস্তাবিত দুই পর্যায়ের ক্ষেত্র ব্যবহার করে গভীর শিক্ষা শিক্ষার মডেল বৃদ্ধি করে গভীর শিক্ষার ভিত্তিক প্রশ্ তিনটি উন্মুক্ত ডোমেইন ডাটাসেটে প্রকাশিত পরীক্ষাগুলো আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে। আমরা অংশিক নির্দেশাবলী প্রশ্নের (পোকিউআর) বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেটের ব্যাঙ্কেম্যার্কেটের ব্যান্কমার্কেটে  আমাদের সম্মানিত বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে ক্ষেত্রের জ্ঞানের মাধ্যমে স্থানীয় বিতরণের বৈশিষ্ট্য (প্রশ্নের কোডার দ্বারা) যুক্ত করা হয়েছে ত', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo hibridnu tehniku za semantičko odgovaranje pitanja. On koristi predloženu dvoslojnu taksonomiju za engleska pitanja povećavajući modele dubokog učenja države umjetnosti sa časovima pitanja koje su dobile iz klasifikatora dubokog učenja temeljenog na pitanju. Eksperimenti provedeni na tri podataka otvorenog domena pokazuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa. Postignemo rezultate stanja umjetnosti na sastavu podataka o određenom redovanju pitanja (POQR). Naša empirička analiza pokazuje da povezanje standardnih distribucijskih karakteristika (predviđenih koderom pitanja) sa znanjem iz taksonomije je učinkovitije nego samo duboko učenje ili znanje na taksonomiji.', 'ca': "En aquest article proposem una tècnica híbrida per a ajustar preguntes semàntiques. It uses a proposed two-layered taxonomy for English questions by augmenting state-of-the-art deep learning models with question classes obtained from a deep learning based question classifier.  Els experiments fets en tres conjunts de dades de domini obert demostren l'eficacia del nostre enfocament proposat. Obtenim resultats més avançats en el conjunt de dades de referència de la classificació de preguntes en ordenació parcial (POQR). La nostra anàlisi empírica mostra que acoplar les característiques de distribució estándar (proporcionades pel codificador de preguntes) amb el coneixement de la taxonomia és més efectiu que només l'aprenentatge profund o el coneixement basat en la taxonomia.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme hybridní techniku pro odpovídání sémantických otázek. Používá navrženou dvouvrstvou taxonomii pro anglické otázky rozšířením nejmodernějších modelů hlubokého učení o třídy otázek získané z klasifikátoru otázek založeného na hlubokém učení. Experimenty provedené na třech open-domain datových sadách demonstrují efektivitu našeho navrhovaného přístupu. Dosahujeme nejmodernějších výsledků na benchmarkovém datovém souboru pořadí otázek (POQR). Naše empirická analýza ukazuje, že propojení standardních distribučních rysů (poskytovaných kodérem otázek) se znalostmi z taxonomie je efektivnější než hluboké učení nebo znalosti založené na taxonomii samotné.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հիբրիդ տեխնիկան սեմանտիկ հարցերի համապատասխանելու համար: Այն օգտագործում է անգլերեն հարցերի համար առաջարկված երկու շերտերի դասակարգ՝ բարելավելով ամենաբարձր խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդելները հարցերի դասերով, որոնք ստացվում են խորը ուսումնասիրության հիմնված հարցերի դասակարգչից: Երեք բաց տիեզերքի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա կատարված փորձերը ցույց են տալիս մեր առաջարկված մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը: Մենք հասնում ենք ամենակարևոր արդյունքներ մասամբ դասավորելու հարցերի (POQR) համեմատական տվյալների համակարգում: Մեր էմպրիկական վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ ստանդարտ բաշխման հատկությունները (որոնք տրամադրվում են հարցի կոդավորի կոդավորի միջոցով) դասակարգչագիտության գիտելիքների հետ միավորումը ավելի արդյունավետ է, քան կամ խորը սովորելը, կամ միայն դասակար', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, semantik sual eşitməsi üçün hibrid tekniki təklif edirik. Bu, İngilizə sualları üçün iki katlı taxonomiya təklif edir. İngilizə təklif etdiyimiz məsələlərin dərin öyrənməsi modellərini yüksəltmək üçün sual dəstələrindən alınmış. Üç açıq domena veri qurularında işlədilən sınaqlar bizim təklif etdiyimiz yaxınlıqların etkinliğini göstərir. Biz qismi sıralama sual səviyyəsi (POQR) benchmark veri qutusunda sanat sonuçlarına nail edirik. Bizim empirik analizimiz göstərir ki, taxonomiyadan bilgi ilə standart dağıtım fəaliyyətlərini birləşdirmək, ya derin öyrənmək, ya da taxonomiyadan təkcə bilikdən daha etkilidir.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume välja hübriidtehnika semantiliste küsimuste sobitamiseks. See kasutab inglise keele küsimuste jaoks kavandatud kahekihilist taksonoomiat, täiendades kaasaegseid sügavõppe mudeleid küsimusklassidega, mis on saadud sügavõppel põhinevast küsimusklassist. Kolme avatud andmekogumiga tehtud katsed näitavad meie kavandatud lähenemisviisi tõhusust. Saadame kaasaegseid tulemusi osalise tellimise küsimuste järjestuse (POQR) võrdlusandmete kogumil. Meie empiiriline analüüs näitab, et standardsete jaotusfunktsioonide (mida pakub küsimuskodeerija) ühendamine taksonoomiaalaste teadmistega on efektiivsem kui kas sügavõpe või taksonoomial põhinevad teadmised üksi.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme hybriditekniikkaa semanttisten kysymysten vastaamiseen. Se käyttää englanninkielisiin kysymyksiin ehdotettua kaksikerroksista taksonomiaa lisäämällä viimeisimpiä syväoppimismalleja kysymysluokilla, jotka on saatu syväoppimiseen perustuvasta kysymysluokittajasta. Kolmella avoimella aineistolla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat ehdotetun lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden. Saavutamme viimeisintä tekniikkaa edustavat tulokset osittaisten tilauskysymysten (POQR) vertailuaineistosta. Empiirinen analyysimme osoittaa, että standardijakauman ominaisuuksien yhdistäminen taksonomian tietoon on tehokkaampaa kuin syväoppiminen tai taksonomiaan perustuva tieto yksinään.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé, ning basa iki, kita tukang tékno kanggo kelas sematik perusahaan. Yukono nggambar sistem sistem sing dibutuhke Layer 2-Layer Taclone kanggo Kemerdekaan Inggris The first argument is "open-domain dataset". bench Awakdhéwé éntuk empire sing ngomong nik nggawe kesempaké awak dhéwé éntukno karo koder kuwi kesempaké awak dhéwé éntukno karo aplik-aké awak dhéwé uga sing luwih apik karo akeh lanjut dhéwé karo beka-aké awak dhéwé.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo hibridno tehniko za semantično ujemanje vprašanj. Uporablja predlagano dvoslojno taksonomijo za angleška vprašanja z dopolnitvijo najsodobnejših modelov globokega učenja z vprašanji, pridobljenimi iz klasifikatorja vprašanj, ki temelji na globokem učenju. Eksperimenti, izvedeni na treh naborih odprtih podatkov, kažejo učinkovitost našega predlaganega pristopa. Dosežemo najsodobnejše rezultate na podlagi referenčnega nabora podatkov o delnem naročanju vprašanj (POQR). Naša empirična analiza kaže, da je povezovanje standardnih distribucijskih značilnosti (ki jih zagotavlja kodirnik vprašanj) z znanjem iz taksonomije učinkovitejše od globokega učenja ali samo znanja, ki temelji na taksonomiji.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã buƙata wani tamko na Hybri wa tambayar sakaci mai daidai. Yana amfani da taxenomin da aka buɗa wa masu tambayar Ingiriya biyu-daraja, kuma yana ƙarfafa misãlai na-sanar-da-matsala masu tambayar da aka sami karatun daga mai fassarar tambayar mai ƙaranci. Fijaroyi da aka samar a kan data masu bayani uku Mu sami fassarar-state-of-art on rabo umuruin tambayar ranning data bangment. Ana aikininmu na nũna cẽwa, adadi na gauraya masu fassarar tarayya (da aka ba da kodi na tambayar) da ilmi daga taxenomy, yana da mafiya amfani ko ko kuma ma'abũcin abin da yake a kan taxnomi kawai.", 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད། It uses a proposed two-layered taxonomy for English questions by augmenting state-of-the-art deep learning models with question classes obtained from a deep learning based question classifier. ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་domain་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གསུམ་ཀྱིས་ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ག We achieve state-of-the-art results on partial ordering question ranking (POQR) benchmark dataset Our empirical analysis shows that coupling standard distributional features (provided by the question encoder) with knowledge from taxonomy is more effective than either deep learning or taxonomy-based knowledge alone.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציעים טכניקה היברידית לתאמת שאלות סמנטיות. הוא משתמש במקסינומיה מציעה בשני שכבות לשאלות אנגליות על ידי הגדילה של מודלים למידה עמוקה מצוינים עם שיעורי שאלות שנקבלו מקליסן שאלות עמוקה מבוסס למידה עמוקה. ניסויים שעשויים על שלושה קבוצות נתונים בתחום פתוח מראים את היעילות של הגישה המוצעת שלנו. אנחנו משיגים תוצאות מוקדמות על קבוצת נתונים מסורת שאלות חלקית (POQR). Our empirical analysis shows that coupling standard distributional features (provided by the question encoder) with knowledge from taxonomy is more effective than either deep learning or taxonomy-based knowledge alone.'}
{'en': 'Natural Language Interface for Databases Using a Dual-Encoder Model', 'es': 'Interfaz de lenguaje natural para bases de datos que utilizan un modelo de doble codificador', 'ar': 'واجهة اللغة الطبيعية لقواعد البيانات باستخدام نموذج التشفير المزدوج', 'fr': 'Interface en langage naturel pour les bases de données utilisant un modèle à double encodeur', 'pt': 'Interface de linguagem natural para bancos de dados usando um modelo de codificador duplo', 'ja': 'デュアルエンコーダモデルを使用したデータベース用の自然言語インターフェース', 'zh': '用双编码器数据库自然语言接口', 'hi': 'एक दोहरी एन्कोडर मॉडल का उपयोग कर डेटाबेस के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा इंटरफ़ेस', 'ru': 'Интерфейс на естественном языке для баз данных с использованием модели двойного энкодера', 'ga': 'Comhéadan Teanga Nádúrtha do Bhunachair Shonraí ag Úsáid Múnla Dé-Ionchódóra', 'ka': 'მონაცემების ინტერფექტი დაბაზებისთვის ეუკოდერის მოდელის გამოყენება', 'el': 'Διασύνδεση φυσικής γλώσσας για βάσεις δεδομένων χρησιμοποιώντας ένα μοντέλο διπλού κωδικοποιητή', 'it': 'Interfaccia di linguaggio naturale per i database utilizzando un modello dual-encoder', 'kk': 'Деректер қорлары үшін негізгі тіл интерфейсі Екі кодтау үлгісін қолданады', 'lt': 'Duomenų bazių, kuriose naudojamas dvigubo kodavimo modelis, gamtinė kalbų sąsaja', 'mk': 'Природен јазички интерфејс за бази на податоци со користење на модел со двојен кодер', 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാബേസ്സിനുള്ള സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ ഇന്റര്\u200dഫെസ്സ്', 'hu': 'Természetes nyelvi interfész adatbázisokhoz kettős kódolós modell használatával', 'mt': 'Interfaċċja Lingwa Naturali għal Bażijiet ta’ Dejta bl-Użu ta’ Mudell ta’ Kodifikatur Doppju', 'pl': 'Interfejs języka naturalnego dla baz danych za pomocą modelu podwójnego kodera', 'ms': 'Antaramuka Bahasa Biasa untuk Pangkalan Data Mengguna Model Pengekod Dua', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл интерфейс', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Prirodni jezički interfejs za baze podataka koristeći model dubokog kodera', 'ro': 'Interfață de limbaj natural pentru bazele de date care utilizează un model dual-encoder', 'so': 'Interfeyska luqada asalka ah ee macluumaadka aasaasiga ah', 'sv': 'Gränssnitt för naturligt språk för databaser med hjälp av en dubbelkodningsmodell', 'si': 'ඩාටාබේස් සඳහා ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව සම්බන්ධය', 'ur': 'ڈیٹابیز کے لئے طبیعی زبان انٹرنفس دوئل-اکوڈر موڈل استعمال کرتا ہے', 'ta': 'Natural Language Interface for Databases Using a Dual-Encoder Model', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giao diện ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cho cơ sở dữ liệu Dùng mô hình con mã kép', 'da': 'Naturligt sprog grænseflade til databaser ved hjælp af en dual-encoder model', 'nl': 'Natuurlijke taal interface voor databases met behulp van een Dual-Encoder model', 'bg': 'Естествен езиков интерфейс за бази данни, използващи модел с двоен кодер', 'hr': 'Prirodni jezički interfejs za baze podataka koristeći model dvostruko kodiranja', 'de': 'Natural Language Interface für Datenbanken unter Verwendung eines Dual-Encoder-Modells', 'ko': '더블 인코더 모형을 사용하는 데이터베이스 자연 언어 인터페이스', 'id': 'Interface Bahasa Alami untuk Pangkalan Data Menggunakan Model Pengenkodar Dua', 'fa': 'Interface زبان طبیعی برای داده\u200cهای داده\u200cها با استفاده از مدل دوئولی رمدۀ دوئولی', 'tr': 'Databases üçin Natal Dil Arayüzi Dual Ködleme Mody ullan', 'sw': 'Anwani ya lugha ya asili kwa ajili ya Databases kwa kutumia Modeli ya Kufungua', 'sq': 'Interfaqe e gjuhës natyrore për bazat e të dhënave duke përdorur një model me dy kodues', 'af': "Natuurlike taal koppelvlak vir databasis gebruik 'n Dual- enkoder Model", 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Բնական լեզվի ինտերֆեյսը տվյալների բազաների համար՝ օգտագործելով երկու կոդավորման մոդել', 'bn': 'ডাটাবেসের জন্য স্বাভাবিক ভাষার ইন্টারফেস ডাবল- এনকোডার মডেল ব্যবহার করে', 'az': 'D칲t칲c칲 Kodlay캼c캼 Mod칲l칲n칲 istifad톛 ed톛n veri tabanlar캼 칲칞칲n t톛bi톛tli Dil Aray칲z칲', 'bs': 'Prirodni jezički interfejs za baze podataka koristeći model dubokog kodera', 'ca': 'Natural Language Interface for Databases Using a Dual-Encoder Model', 'et': 'Loomulik keeleliides andmebaaside jaoks, mis kasutavad kahekodeerijat mudelit', 'cs': 'Rozhraní přirozeného jazyka pro databáze s využitím dvoukódovacího modelu', 'fi': 'Luonnollinen kielirajapinta tietokannoille, jotka käyttävät kaksoiskooderimallia', 'jv': 'Normal Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'אינטרנט שפה טבעי לבסיסי נתונים בשימוש מודל קודד כפול', 'sk': 'Naravni jezikovni vmesnik za zbirke podatkov z uporabo modela z dvojnim kodiranjem', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གདོང་མཐའ་བརྙན་རིས་བེད་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་Dual-Encoder Model'}
{'en': 'We propose a sketch-based two-step neural model for generating structured queries (SQL) based on a user’s request in natural language. The sketch is obtained by using placeholders for specific entities in the SQL query, such as column names, table names, aliases and variables, in a process similar to semantic parsing. The first step is to apply a sequence-to-sequence (SEQ2SEQ) model to determine the most probable SQL sketch based on the request in natural language. Then, a second network designed as a dual-encoder SEQ2SEQ model using both the text query and the previously obtained sketch is employed to generate the final SQL query. Our approach shows improvements over previous approaches on two recent large datasets (WikiSQL and SENLIDB) suitable for data-driven solutions for natural language interfaces for databases.', 'ar': 'نقترح نموذجًا عصبيًا من خطوتين قائم على الرسم التخطيطي لإنشاء استعلامات منظمة (SQL) بناءً على طلب المستخدم باللغة الطبيعية. يتم الحصول على الرسم التخطيطي باستخدام عناصر نائبة لكيانات محددة في استعلام SQL ، مثل أسماء الأعمدة وأسماء الجداول والأسماء المستعارة والمتغيرات ، في عملية مشابهة للتحليل الدلالي. تتمثل الخطوة الأولى في تطبيق نموذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل (SEQ2SEQ) لتحديد مخطط SQL الأكثر احتمالية بناءً على الطلب باللغة الطبيعية. بعد ذلك ، يتم استخدام شبكة ثانية مصممة كنموذج SEQ2SEQ مزدوج التشفير باستخدام كل من الاستعلام النصي والرسم الذي تم الحصول عليه مسبقًا لإنشاء استعلام SQL النهائي. يُظهر نهجنا تحسينات على الأساليب السابقة في مجموعتي بيانات كبيرتين حديثتين (WikiSQL و SENLIDB) مناسبين للحلول القائمة على البيانات لواجهات اللغة الطبيعية لقواعد البيانات.', 'fr': "Nous proposons un modèle neuronal en deux étapes basé sur des croquis pour générer des requêtes structurées (SQL) en fonction de la requête d'un utilisateur en langage naturel. L'esquisse est obtenue en utilisant des espaces réservés pour des entités spécifiques dans la requête SQL, telles que les noms de colonne, les noms de table, les alias et les variables, dans un processus similaire à l'analyse sémantique. La première étape consiste à appliquer un modèle séquence-séquence (SEQ2SEQ) pour déterminer l'esquisse SQL la plus probable en fonction de la requête en langage naturel. Ensuite, un second réseau conçu comme un modèle SEQ2SEQ à double encodeur utilisant à la fois la requête de texte et le croquis précédemment obtenu est utilisé pour générer la requête SQL finale. Notre approche montre des améliorations par rapport aux approches précédentes sur deux grands ensembles de données récents (WikiSQL et SENLIDB) adaptés aux solutions pilotées par les données pour les interfaces en langage naturel pour les bases de données.", 'pt': 'Propomos um modelo neural de duas etapas baseado em sketch para gerar consultas estruturadas (SQL) com base na solicitação de um usuário em linguagem natural. O esboço é obtido usando espaços reservados para entidades específicas na consulta SQL, como nomes de colunas, nomes de tabelas, aliases e variáveis, em um processo semelhante à análise semântica. A primeira etapa é aplicar um modelo sequência a sequência (SEQ2SEQ) para determinar o esboço SQL mais provável com base na solicitação em linguagem natural. Em seguida, uma segunda rede projetada como um modelo SEQ2SEQ de codificador duplo usando a consulta de texto e o esboço obtido anteriormente é empregada para gerar a consulta SQL final. Nossa abordagem mostra melhorias em relação às abordagens anteriores em dois grandes conjuntos de dados recentes (WikiSQL e SENLIDB) adequados para soluções orientadas a dados para interfaces de linguagem natural para bancos de dados.', 'es': 'Proponemos un modelo neuronal de dos pasos basado en bocetos para generar consultas estructuradas (SQL) basadas en la solicitud de un usuario en lenguaje natural. El boceto se obtiene mediante el uso de marcadores de posición para entidades específicas en la consulta SQL, como nombres de columnas, nombres de tablas, alias y variables, en un proceso similar al análisis semántico. El primer paso es aplicar un modelo de secuencia a secuencia (SEQ2SEQ) para determinar el boceto SQL más probable en función de la solicitud en lenguaje natural. A continuación, se emplea una segunda red diseñada como un modelo SEQ2SEQ de doble codificador que utiliza tanto la consulta de texto como el boceto obtenido previamente para generar la consulta SQL final. Nuestro enfoque muestra mejoras con respecto a los enfoques anteriores en dos grandes conjuntos de datos recientes (WikiSQL y SENLIDB) adecuados para soluciones basadas en datos para interfaces de lenguaje natural para bases de datos.', 'ja': '自然言語でのユーザーの要求に基づいて構造化クエリ（ SQL ）を生成するためのスケッチベースの2段階ニューラルモデルを提案します。スケッチは、セマンティック解析と同様のプロセスで、列名、テーブル名、エイリアス、変数などのSQLクエリの特定のエンティティのプレースホルダを使用して取得されます。最初のステップは、自然言語での要求に基づいて最も可能性の高いSQLスケッチを決定するために、シーケンスツーシーケンス（ SEQ 2 SEQ ）モデルを適用することである。次いで、テキストクエリ及び以前に取得されたスケッチの両方を使用してデュアルエンコーダＱＵＳ ２ ＳＥＱモデルとして設計された第２のネットワークを用いて、最終的なＳＱＬクエリを生成する。私たちのアプローチは、データベースの自然言語インターフェースのためのデータ駆動型ソリューションに適した、最近の2つの大規模データセット（ WikiSQLとSENLIDB ）に対する以前のアプローチよりも改善されたことを示しています。', 'zh': '立草图二步神经形,以用户自然语言求成结构化询(SQL)。 若语义析之际,以 SQL 询特定体(列名、表名、别名、变量)之占位符以取草图。 一曰序(SEQ2SEQ),以自然语言请定SQL草图。 然后以文本询及前所得草图为双编码器SEQ2SEQ二网络以成终SQL。 吾法于二最新之大集(WikiSQL与SENLIDB)见前法之改进,此数集于数据库自然语言接口之数驱解决方案。', 'ru': 'Предложена эскизная двухэтапная нейронная модель формирования структурированных запросов (SQL) на основе запроса пользователя на естественном языке. Эскиз получается с помощью заполнителей для определенных сущностей в SQL-запросе, таких как имена столбцов, имена таблиц, псевдонимы и переменные, в процессе, аналогичном семантическому синтаксическому анализу. Первым шагом является применение модели последовательности к последовательности (SEQ2SEQ) для определения наиболее вероятного эскиза SQL на основе запроса на естественном языке. Затем для генерации окончательного SQL-запроса используют вторую сеть, выполненную в виде модели SEQ2SEQ с двойным кодированием, используя как текстовый запрос, так и ранее полученный эскиз. Наш подход показывает улучшения по сравнению с предыдущими подходами на двух недавних больших наборах данных (WikiSQL и SENLIDB), подходящих для основанных на данных решений для интерфейсов естественного языка для баз данных.', 'hi': 'हम प्राकृतिक भाषा में उपयोगकर्ता के अनुरोध के आधार पर संरचित क्वेरी (एसक्यूएल) उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक स्केच-आधारित दो-चरणीय तंत्रिका मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। स्केच SQL क्वेरी में विशिष्ट निकायों के लिए प्लेसहोल्डर्स का उपयोग करके प्राप्त किया जाता है, जैसे कि स्तंभ नाम, तालिका नाम, उपनाम और चर, शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग के समान प्रक्रिया में। पहला कदम प्राकृतिक भाषा में अनुरोध के आधार पर सबसे संभावित एसक्यूएल स्केच निर्धारित करने के लिए एक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम (SEQ2SEQ) मॉडल लागू करना है। उसके बाद, पाठ क्वेरी और पहले से प्राप्त स्केच दोनों का उपयोग करके दोहरे-एन्कोडर SEQ2SEQ मॉडल के रूप में डिज़ाइन किया गया एक दूसरा नेटवर्क अंतिम SQL क्वेरी उत्पन्न करने के लिए नियोजित है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण डेटाबेस के लिए प्राकृतिक भाषा इंटरफेस के लिए डेटा-संचालित समाधानों के लिए उपयुक्त दो हालिया बड़े डेटासेट (WikiSQL और SENLIDB) पर पिछले दृष्टिकोणों पर सुधार दिखाता है।', 'ga': 'Molaimid samhail néarach dhá chéim atá bunaithe ar sceitse chun fiosrúcháin struchtúrtha a ghiniúint (SQL) bunaithe ar iarratas úsáideora i dteanga nádúrtha. Faightear an sceitse trí áitshealbhóirí a úsáid le haghaidh aonáin ar leith sa cheist SQL, mar ainmneacha colún, ainmneacha táblaí, ailiasanna agus athróga, i bpróiseas cosúil le parsáil shéimeantach. Is é an chéad chéim ná samhail seicheamh-go-seicheamh (SEQ2SEQ) a chur i bhfeidhm chun an sceitse SQL is dóichí a chinneadh bunaithe ar an iarratas i dteanga nádúrtha. Ansin, úsáidtear an dara líonra atá deartha mar mhúnla dé-ionchódóra SEQ2SEQ a úsáideann an cheist téacs agus an sceitse a fuarthas roimhe seo chun an cheist SQL deiridh a ghiniúint. Léiríonn ár gcur chuige feabhsuithe ar chuir chuige roimhe seo ar dhá thacar sonraí móra le déanaí (WikiSQL agus SENLIDB) atá oiriúnach do réitigh sonraí-tiomáinte do chomhéadain teanga nádúrtha le haghaidh bunachair shonraí.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ სკექტიკური კითხვების (SQL) წარმოიქმება, რომელიც მომხმარებლის მოთხოვნის ნაირადი ენაში დაახლოებით. სკექტის მიღება SQL კითხვაში სპექტიკური ინტერტიებისთვის პლასექონტების გამოყენებით, როგორც სკექტიკური სახელები, ცხრილის სახელები, ალიზები და ცვლილებები, პროცესიში, რო პირველი ნაგულისხმები არის დაყენება მოდელს, რომელიც უფრო შესაძლებელია SQL სკექტის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ნაგულისხმების წინაწერისთვის განსაზღვრება. შემდეგ, მეორე ქსელი, როგორც ორივე კოდირებული SEQ2SEQ მოდელის გამოყენება ტექსტის კითხვა და მხოლოდ მიღებული სკექტის გამოყენება საკუთარი SQL კითხვა. ჩვენი პროგორმაცია ჩვენი წინასწარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობა ორი უფრო დიდი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში (WikiSQL და SENLIDB) მოსაძლებელია მონაცემების გარეშემოწყობისთ', 'el': 'Προτείνουμε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο δύο βημάτων βασισμένο στο σκίτσο για τη δημιουργία δομημένων ερωτημάτων (βασισμένο στο αίτημα ενός χρήστη σε φυσική γλώσσα. Το σκίτσο λαμβάνεται χρησιμοποιώντας σύμβολα κράτησης θέσης για συγκεκριμένες οντότητες στο ερώτημα όπως ονόματα στηλών, ονόματα πινάκων, ψευδώνυμα και μεταβλητές, σε μια διαδικασία παρόμοια με τη σημασιολογική ανάλυση. Το πρώτο βήμα είναι να εφαρμοστεί ένα μοντέλο ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία (SEQ2SEQ) για να καθοριστεί το πιο πιθανό σκίτσο βασισμένο στο αίτημα σε φυσική γλώσσα. Στη συνέχεια, ένα δεύτερο δίκτυο σχεδιασμένο ως μοντέλο διπλού κωδικοποιητή χρησιμοποιώντας τόσο το ερώτημα κειμένου όσο και το προηγουμένως αποκτηθέν σκίτσο χρησιμοποιείται για τη δημιουργία του τελικού ερωτήματος SQL. Η προσέγγισή μας δείχνει βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις σε δύο πρόσφατα μεγάλα σύνολα δεδομένων (WikiSQL και SENLIDB) κατάλληλα για λύσεις βασισμένες σε δεδομένα για διεπαφές φυσικής γλώσσας για βάσεις δεδομένων.', 'kk': 'Құрастырылған сұраныстарды (SQL) құру үшін sketch- негіздеген екі қадам негіздеген неврал үлгісін таңдаймыз. Сұранысты SQL сұраныстағы ерекше нысандар үшін, мәтін атаулары, кестенің атаулары, атаулары мен айнымалылары секілді, өзгерістер мен өзгерістерді қолдану үшін сұранысты алады. Бірінші қадам - табиғи тілдегі сұраныстың негізінде ең маңызды SQL sketch үлгісін анықтау үшін sequence- to- sequence (SEQ2SEQ) үлгісін қолдану. Содан кейін, екінші желі SEQ2SEQ моделі ретінде құрылған, мәтін сұранысын қолданып, алдыңғы алған сұранысты сұранысты соңғы SQL сұранысты құру үшін қолданылады. Біздің қасиетіміз деректер қорларының табиғи тіл интерфейстерінің деректер қорларына қолданылатын деректер қорларының екі жаңа үлкен деректер қорларының (WikiSQL және SENLIDB) алдыңғы қасиеттерінің жа', 'lt': 'Siūlome sukurti dviejų etapų struktūrizuotų klausimų (SQL) model į, pagrįstą skeisu, remiantis naudotojo prašymu natūralia kalba. Skėrimas gaunamas naudojant SQL paklausos konkrečių subjektų, pavyzdžiui, stulpelių pavadinimų, lentelių pavadinimų, vardų pavadinimų ir kintamųjų, vietų turėtojus semantiniame analizavime. Pirmasis žingsnis – taikyti sekos po sekos (SEQ2SEQ) model į, kad būtų galima nustatyti labiausiai tikėtiną SQL skešą, pagrįstą prašymu natūralia kalba. Tada naudojamas antrasis tinklas, sukurtas kaip dvigubo kodavimo SEQ2SEQ model is, naudojantis tiek teksto paklausą, tiek anksčiau gautą skešą, siekiant sukurti galutinį SQL paklausą. Mūsų požiūris rodo, kad dviejų pastarųjų didelių duomenų rinkinių (WikiSQL ir SENLIDB), tinkamų duomenų pagrindu pagrįstiems sprendimams natūralioms kalbinėms sąsajoms duomenų bazėse, metodai buvo patobulinti.', 'hu': 'Egy vázlat alapú, kétlépcsős neurális modellt javasolunk a felhasználó kérése alapján, természetes nyelven történő strukturált lekérdezések (SQL) generálására. A vázlat az SQL lekérdezésben szereplő egyes entitások helyőrzőinek használatával történik, például oszlopnevek, táblázatnevek, aliasok és változók használatával, a szemantikai elemzéshez hasonló folyamatban. Az első lépés egy szekvencia-szekvencia (SEQ2SEQ) modell alkalmazása a legvalószínűbb SQL vázlat meghatározására természetes nyelven. Ezután egy második, kettős kódoló SEQ2SEQ modellként kialakított hálózatot alkalmaznak a szöveges lekérdezés és a korábban kapott vázlat segítségével a végső SQL lekérdezés létrehozásához. Megközelítésünk a korábbi megközelítésekhez képest javulást mutat két legutóbbi nagyméretű adatkészleten (WikiSQL és SENLIDB), amelyek az adatbázisok természetes nyelvi interfészeihez használható adatvezérelt megoldásokra alkalmasak.', 'ms': 'Kami cadangkan model saraf berdasarkan sketsa dua langkah untuk menghasilkan pertanyaan struktur (SQL) berdasarkan permintaan pengguna dalam bahasa semulajadi. Lukisan diterima dengan menggunakan pemegang tempat untuk entiti tertentu dalam pertanyaan SQL, seperti nama lajur, nama jadual, alias dan pembolehubah, dalam proses yang sama dengan penghuraian semantik. Langkah pertama adalah untuk melaksanakan model urutan-ke-urutan (SEQ2SEQ) untuk menentukan sketsa SQL yang paling mungkin berdasarkan permintaan dalam bahasa semulajadi. Kemudian, rangkaian kedua dirancang sebagai model dual-pengekod SEQ2SEQ menggunakan kedua-dua pertanyaan teks dan sketsa yang terdapat sebelumnya digunakan untuk menghasilkan pertanyaan SQL akhir. pendekatan kami menunjukkan peningkatan atas pendekatan terdahulu pada dua set data besar (WikiSQL dan SENLIDB) yang sesuai untuk penyelesaian pemacu data untuk antaramuka bahasa semulajadi untuk pangkalan data.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയിലുള്ള ഒരു ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ആവശ്യം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നതിനായി സ്കേച്ച് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി രണ്ട് പടി നെയുറല്\u200d മോഡ Name The first step is to apply a sequence-to-sequence (SEQ2SEQ) model to determine the most probable SQL sketch based on the request in natural language.  പിന്നെ ഒരു രണ്ടാമത്തെ നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് സെക്ക്വി2SEQ മോഡലായി ഡിസൈനര്\u200d ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ടെക്സ്ക്വെയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചും മുമ നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം മുമ്പുള്ള രണ്ടു വലിയ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും മുന്\u200dഗണന മുന്\u200dഗണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. വികിസ്കിഎസ്ക്യൂഎലും സെന്\u200dലിഡിബ', 'it': "Proponiamo un modello neurale in due fasi basato su sketch per generare query strutturate (SQL) basate sulla richiesta di un utente in linguaggio naturale. Lo schizzo è ottenuto utilizzando segnaposto per entità specifiche nella query SQL, come nomi di colonne, nomi di tabelle, alias e variabili, in un processo simile all'analisi semantica. Il primo passo è quello di applicare un modello sequenza-sequenza (SEQ2SEQ) per determinare lo sketch SQL più probabile basato sulla richiesta in linguaggio naturale. Quindi, una seconda rete progettata come modello SEQ2SEQ dual-encoder utilizzando sia la query di testo che lo schizzo precedentemente ottenuto viene utilizzata per generare la query SQL finale. Il nostro approccio mostra miglioramenti rispetto agli approcci precedenti su due recenti set di dati di grandi dimensioni (WikiSQL e SENLIDB) adatti a soluzioni data-driven per interfacce di linguaggio naturale per database.", 'no': 'Vi foreslår eit sketsbasert to steg neuralmodell for å laga strukturerte spørjingar (SQL) basert på brukaren førespurnad på naturspråk. Skjermen vert henta ved å bruka plassholdarar for spesifikke entitat i SQL- spørjinga, som kolonnenamn, tabellnamn, aliasar og variabler, i ein prosess liknande som semantisk tolking. Den første stegen er å bruka ein sekvens- til- sekvens- modell (SEQ2SEQ) for å bestemme den mest sannsynlege SQL- sketch basert på førespurnaden i naturspråk. Den andre nettverket som er laga som ein dubbelkoder SEQ2SEQ-modell ved å bruka både tekstspørjinga og den førre fått sketch er arbeida for å laga den siste SQL-spørjinga. Tilnærminga vårt viser forbedringar over tidlegare tilnærmingar på to nyere store datasett (WikiSQL og SENLIDB) som er passande for databaseløysing for naturspråkegrensesnitt.', 'mk': "We propose a sketch-based two-step neural model for generating structured queries (SQL) based on a user's request in natural language.  Скишот се наоѓа со користење на имениците на местата за специфични ентитети во SQL- прашањето, како што се имињата на колоните, имињата на табелата, алијазите и променливите, во процес сличен на семантичното анализирање. Првиот чекор е да се примени модел од секвенца до секвенца (SEQ2SEQ) за да се одреди најверојатниот скејс на SQL базиран на барањето на природен јазик. Потоа, се користи втора мрежа дизајнирана како модел со двојен кодер SEQ2SEQ користејќи го и текстовото прашање, како и претходно добиениот скејт за генерирање на последното SQL прашање. Нашиот пристап покажува подобрувања во однос на претходните пристапи на двата неодамнешни големи податоци (WikiSQL и SENLIDB) соодветни за решенија на податоци за природните јазички интерфејси за податочните бази.", 'mt': "Aħna nipproponu mudell newrali b'żewġ stadji bbażat fuq skessi għall-ġenerazzjoni ta' mistoqsijiet strutturati (SQL) ibbażat fuq talba ta' utent f'lingwa naturali. L-iskessjoni tinkiseb bl-użu ta’ detenturi ta’ post għal entitajiet speċifiċi fil-mistoqsija SQL, bħall-ismijiet tal-kolonni, ismijiet tat-tabella, psewdonimi u varjabbli, fi proċess simili għall-analiżi semantika. L-ewwel pass huwa li jiġi applikat mudell minn sekwenza għal sekwenza (SEQ2SEQ) biex jiġi ddeterminat l-aktar sketch probabbli ta’ SQL ibbażat fuq it-talba fil-lingwa naturali. Imbagħad, jintuża t-tieni netwerk iddisinjat bħala mudell SEQ2SEQ b’kodifikatur doppju bl-użu kemm tal-mistoqsija tat-test kif ukoll tal-iskedju miksub qabel biex tiġi ġġenerata l-mistoqsija SQL finali. L-approċċ tagħna juri titjib fuq approċċi preċedenti fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta kbar riċenti (WikiSQL u SENLIDB) adattati għal soluzzjonijiet immexxija mid-dejta għal interfaces lingwistiċi naturali għal bażijiet ta’ dejta.", 'mn': 'Бид хүмүүсийн байгалийн хэл дээр хэрэглэгчдийн хүсэл дээр бүтэц квери (SQL) боловсруулахын тулд хоёр алхмаар суурь загварын загварыг санал болгоно. SQL кверсийн тодорхой нэгжүүдийн оролцогчдыг ашиглаж, жишээ нь баганы нэр, хүснэгт нэр, алиас болон хувьсагчдыг ашиглаж авдаг. Эхний алхам бол байгалийн хэл дээр шаардлагатай хамгийн магадлалтай SQL sketch ийг тодорхойлдох дарааллаар дарааллаар (SEQ2SEQ) загварыг ашиглах юм. Дараа нь, хоёр дахь сүлжээн SEQ2SEQ загвар болгон текст квери болон өмнө нь авсан сүлжээний сүүлийн SQL квери үүсгэхэд ажилладаг. Бидний арга зам нь өгөгдлийн сангийн байгалийн хэл интерфейсийн шийдлийн тулд өгөгдлийн сангийн хоёр саяхан том өгөгдлийн сангийн (WikiSQL болон SENLIDB) хоёр саяхан шийдвэрлэлүүд дээр сайжруулж байна.', 'pl': 'Proponujemy szkicowy dwustopniowy model neuronowy do generowania zapytań strukturalnych (SQL) w oparciu o żądanie użytkownika w języku naturalnym. Szkic uzyskuje się za pomocą symboli zastępczych dla określonych podmiotów w zapytaniu SQL, takich jak nazwy kolumn, nazwy tabel, aliasy i zmienne, w procesie podobnym do parsowania semantycznego. Pierwszym krokiem jest zastosowanie modelu sekwencji-sekwencji (SEQ2SEQ) w celu określenia najbardziej prawdopodobnego szkicu SQL na podstawie żądania w języku naturalnym. Następnie do generowania ostatecznego zapytania SQL wykorzystuje się drugą sieć zaprojektowaną jako model dwukodera SEQ2SEQ z wykorzystaniem zarówno zapytania tekstowego, jak i uzyskanego wcześniej szkicu. Nasze podejście pokazuje ulepszenia w porównaniu z poprzednimi podejściami w odniesieniu do dwóch ostatnich dużych zbiorów danych (WikiSQL i SENLIDB), odpowiednich do rozwiązań opartych na danych dla interfejsów języka naturalnego dla baz danych.', 'ro': 'Propunem un model neural bazat pe schițe în doi pași pentru generarea interogărilor structurate (SQL) bazate pe solicitarea unui utilizator în limbaj natural. Schița se obține prin utilizarea substituenților pentru anumite entități din interogarea SQL, cum ar fi numele coloanelor, numele tabelului, aliasurile și variabilele, într-un proces similar analizării semantice. Primul pas este de a aplica un model secvență-la-secvență (SEQ2SEQ) pentru a determina schița SQL cea mai probabilă bazată pe cerere în limbaj natural. Apoi, o a doua rețea proiectată ca model SEQ2SEQ dual-encoder utilizând atât interogarea text, cât și schița obținută anterior este utilizată pentru a genera interogarea SQL finală. Abordarea noastră arată îmbunătățiri față de abordările anterioare pe două seturi de date mari recente (WikiSQL și SENLIDB) potrivite pentru soluții bazate pe date pentru interfețele lingvistice naturale pentru baze de date.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model neural ah oo ku saleysan karo qoraalo la qoray (SQL) oo ku saleysan codsiga isticmaalaha afka dabiicadda ah. Xiriirka SQL waxaa lagu soo bandhigi karaa jardiinada meelaha gaarka ah, sida magacyada iskuulka, magacyada miiska, magacyada sawirka iyo beddelaadka oo u eg baaritaanka semantika. Qoraalka ugu horeeya waa in lagu codsado qaababka aad u suurtowdo SQL oo ku saleysan codsiga afka dabiicadda ah (SEQ2SEQ). Markaas waxaa loo isticmaalaa shabakad labaad oo loo qoray qoraalka qoraalka ee SEQ2SEQ oo la isticmaalayo qoraalka iyo qoraalka hore oo la helay sketch si uu u sameeyo qoraalka ugu dambeeya SQL. Dhaqdhaheenna waxaa ka muuqata horumarinta horumarinta horumarinta ah ee ugu dambeysay labada kooban ee macluumaad waaweyn (WikiSQL iyo SENLIDB) oo u eg macluumaadyada la soconayo ee Interfacyada afka dabiiciga ah ee databaseyada.', 'sr': 'Predlažemo na skeci dva koraka neuronski model za stvaranje strukturiranih ispitivanja (SQL) na temelju zahteva korisnika na prirodnom jeziku. Sketu dobija koristeći placeholdere za određene entitate u SQL ispitivanju, kao što su imena kolona, imena stola, aliase i varijante, u procesu sličnom semantičkom analizu. Prvi korak je primjenjivanje model a sekvence do sekvence (SEQ2SEQ) kako bi utvrdilo najverovatniji skeč SQL na temelju zahteva na prirodnom jeziku. Onda je druga mreža dizajnirana kao dvostruki koder SEQ2SEQ model koristeći i tekst zahtev, i prethodno dobijenu skeč zaposlena kako bi stvorila konačni SQL zahtev. Naš pristup pokazuje poboljšanje u prethodnim pristupima na dva nedavna velika dataseta (WikiSQL i SENLIDB) odgovarajuća za rešenja podataka za prirodne jezičke interfejse za baze podataka.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு வரைவு அடிப்படையில் இரு படி புதிய மாதிரியை உருவாக்குவதற்கான உருவாக்கப்பட்ட கேள்விகள் (SQL) சார்ந்த பயனரின் கோரிக்க Name @ info பின்னர், இரண்டாவது வலைப்பின்னல் SEQ2SEQ மாதிரி வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டது, உரை கேள்வியையும் பயன்படுத்தி மற்றும் முன்னோடு பெற்ற வருடும் முடிவு SQL எங்கள் செயல்பாடு முந்தைய முன்னேற்றங்களில் முன்னேற்றத்தை காண்பிக்கிறது அண்மையில் உள்ள இரண்டு பெரிய தகவல் அமைப்புகள் (விகிஸ்கியூ', 'sv': 'Vi föreslår en skissbaserad tvåstegs neural modell för att generera strukturerade frågor (SQL) baserat på användarens begäran i naturligt språk. Skissen erhålls genom att använda platshållare för specifika entiteter i SQL-frågan, till exempel kolumnnamn, tabellnamn, alias och variabler, i en process som liknar semantisk tolkning. Det första steget är att tillämpa en sekvens-till-sekvens (SEQ2SEQ) modell för att bestämma den mest sannolika SQL skissen baserat på begäran i naturligt språk. Sedan används ett andra nätverk som utformats som en SEQ2SEQ-modell med dubbla kodare med både textfrågan och den tidigare erhållna skissen för att generera den slutliga SQL-frågan. Vårt tillvägagångssätt visar förbättringar jämfört med tidigare tillvägagångssätt på två nya stora datauppsättningar (WikiSQL och SENLIDB) lämpliga för datadrivna lösningar för naturliga språkgränssnitt för databaser.', 'si': 'අපි ස්කෙච් අධාරිත දෙකක් පැත්තේ න්\u200dයූරාල් මොඩේලයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය භාෂාවයේ භාවිතාවයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා සංස්ක Name පළමු පැත්තය තමයි ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාවයේ අනුරෝධ විධාන SQL ස්කෙච් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන් ඊට පස්සේ, දෙවෙනි ජාලයෙක් සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ ලකුණු ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ පස්සේ ගත්ත ස්කේච් එක අන්තිම SQL ප්\u200dරශ්නය නිර්මාණය අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය පෙන්වන්නේ අලුත් විශාල දත්ත සෙට් දෙකට (WikiSQL සහ SENLIDB) ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව සඳහා දත්', 'ur': 'ہم ایک اسکیچ بنیادی دو سٹے نیورل موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ایک کارساز کی خواہش طبیعی زبان میں بنیاد رکھے۔ اسکیچ کو SQL کیوری میں مخصوص ایٹیوں کے لئے پلیس هولڈر کے استعمال سے حاصل کیا جاتا ہے، جیسے کلام نام، ٹیبل نام، الیاس اور متغیرات، سیمنٹی پارسینگ کے مطابق ایک پروسس میں۔ اولین قدم یہ ہے کہ سطحی زبان کی خواہش پر بنیاد سطحی SQL اسکیچ کا مقرر کرنے کے لئے سطحی-to-sequence (SEQ2SEQ) موڈل لازم کرنا ہے. پھر ایک دوسری نیٹ ورک کو دوئل-انکوڈر SEQ2SEQ موڈل کے طور پر طراحی کیا گیا ہے تاکسٹ کوریٹ اور پہلے حاصل کئے ہوئے اسکیچ کو آخری SQL کوریٹ جوڑنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. ہمارا طریقہ دو اگلے بڑے ڈیٹ سٹ (WikiSQL اور SENLIDB) کے لئے پہلے طریقے کے مطابق اچھے طریقے پر بہترین توسعہ دکھاتے ہیں جو ڈیٹ بیس کے لئے مناسب ہیں، ڈیٹ بیس کے لئے ڈیٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ بیس کے لئے مناسب', 'uz': "Biz foydalanuvchining soʻrovi asosiy tilda yaratilgan soʻrovlar yaratish uchun sketch asosida ikki qadam neyrol modeli rivojlanamiz. Name Ikkinchi darajasi asl tilda soʻrov boʻlgan soʻrov soʻzni aniqlash uchun sequence- to- sequence (SEQ2SEQ) modelini qoʻllash mumkin. Name Maʼlumotlar bazasi uchun asl tili interfeyslari uchun juda muhim boʻlgan ikkita katta maʼlumotlar tarkibida (WikiSQL va SENLIDB) ta'minlovchi soʻzlarimizni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đề xuất mô hình thần kinh hai bước phác thảo để tạo ra các câu hỏi cấu trúc (SQL) dựa trên yêu cầu của người dùng trong ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. The phác thảo được lấy bằng cách dùng bộ giữ chỗ cho các thực thể cụ thể trong câu hỏi SQL, như các cột, tên cái bảng, bí danh và các biến số, trong một tiến trình tương tự với phân tích theo ngữ pháp. Bước đầu tiên là áp dụng một mô hình lặp lại (SEQ2SEQ) để xác định phác họa SQL dễ dàng nhất dựa trên yêu cầu ở ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Sau đó, một mạng thứ hai được thiết kế như một mô hình mã hóa kép SQ2SEQ dùng cả hai các yêu cầu văn bản và bản phác thảo được tạo ra để tạo ra yêu cầu SQL cuối cùng. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi cho thấy sự cải tiến trên các phương pháp trước đây trên hai tập tin lớn gần đây (WikiLSQL và SenLID) thích hợp cho các giải pháp dựa trên dữ liệu về giao diện ngôn ngữ tự nhiên cho cơ sở dữ liệu.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме скеч-базиран двустъпен невронен модел за генериране на структурирани заявки (базиран на заявка на потребителя на естествен език. Скицата се получава чрез използване на контейнери за конкретни обекти в заявката като имена на колони, имена на таблици, псевдоними и променливи, в процес, подобен на семантичното анализиране. Първата стъпка е да се приложи модел последователност към последователност (SEQSEQ), за да се определи най-вероятната скица въз основа на заявката на естествен език. След това се използва втора мрежа, проектирана като модел с двоен кодер използващ текстовата заявка и предварително получената скица, за да се генерира окончателната заявка. Нашият подход показва подобрения спрямо предишните подходи на два скорошни големи набора от данни (подходящи за базирани от данни решения за интерфейси на естествен език за бази данни.', 'da': 'Vi foreslår en skitsebaseret totrins neural model til generering af strukturerede forespørgsler (SQL) baseret på en brugers anmodning i naturligt sprog. Skitsen opnås ved at bruge pladsholdere til bestemte enheder i SQL-forespørgslen, f.eks. kolonnenavne, tabelnavne, aliasser og variabler, i en proces svarende til semantisk fortolkning. Det første skridt er at anvende en sekvens-til-sekvens (SEQ2SEQ) model til at bestemme den mest sandsynlige SQL skitse baseret på anmodningen i naturligt sprog. Derefter anvendes et andet netværk designet som en dual-encoder SEQ2SEQ model ved hjælp af både tekstforespørgslen og den tidligere opnåede skitse til at generere den endelige SQL-forespørgsel. Vores tilgang viser forbedringer i forhold til tidligere tilgange på to nylige store datasæt (WikiSQL og SENLIDB), der er egnet til datadrevne løsninger til naturlige sproggrænseflader til databaser.', 'hr': 'Predlažemo na skeču dva koraka neuronski model za stvaranje strukturiranih ispitivanja (SQL) na temelju zahtjeva korisnika na prirodnom jeziku. Sketu dobija koristeći placeholdere za određene entitate u ispitivanju SQL-a, kao što su imena kolona, imena table, aliase i promjene, u procesu sličnom semantičkom razmatranju. Prvi korak je primjenjivati model sekvencije do sekvence (SEQ2SEQ) kako bi utvrdio najvjerojatniji skeč SQL-a na temelju zahtjeva na prirodnom jeziku. Onda je druga mreža dizajnirana kao dvostruki koder SEQ2SEQ model koristeći i pitanje teksta i prethodno dobijenu skeču zaposlena kako bi stvorila konačnu SQL zahtjev. Naš pristup pokazuje poboljšanje u prethodnim pristupima na dvije nedavne velike baze podataka (WikiSQL i SENLIDB) odgovarajuće za rješenja podataka za prirodne jezičke interfejse za baze podataka.', 'nl': "We stellen een schets-gebaseerd tweestaps neuraal model voor het genereren van gestructureerde query's (SQL) op basis van een verzoek van een gebruiker in natuurlijke taal voor. De schets wordt verkregen door plaatsaanduidingen te gebruiken voor specifieke entiteiten in de SQL-query, zoals kolomnamen, tabelnamen, aliassen en variabelen, in een proces vergelijkbaar met semantische parsing. De eerste stap is om een sequence-to-sequence (SEQ2SEQ) model toe te passen om de meest waarschijnlijke SQL schets te bepalen op basis van het verzoek in natuurlijke taal. Vervolgens wordt een tweede netwerk ontworpen als een dual-encoder SEQ2SEQ model dat zowel de tekstquery als de eerder verkregen schets gebruikt om de definitieve SQL query te genereren. Onze aanpak toont verbeteringen ten opzichte van eerdere benaderingen op twee recente grote datasets (WikiSQL en SENLIDB) geschikt voor datagedreven oplossingen voor natuurlijke taalinterfaces voor databases.", 'de': 'Wir schlagen ein skizzenbasiertes zweistufiges neuronales Modell zur Generierung strukturierter Abfragen (SQL) vor, basierend auf der Anfrage eines Benutzers in natürlicher Sprache. Die Skizze wird durch Verwendung von Platzhaltern für bestimmte Entitäten in der SQL-Abfrage wie Spaltennamen, Tabellennamen, Aliase und Variablen in einem Prozess ähnlich dem semantischen Parsing erhalten. Der erste Schritt besteht darin, ein Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modell (SEQ2SEQ) anzuwenden, um die wahrscheinlichste SQL-Skizze basierend auf der Anforderung in natürlicher Sprache zu bestimmen. Anschließend wird ein zweites Netzwerk, das als Dual-Encoder-SEQ2SEQ-Modell konzipiert ist, verwendet, um die endgültige SQL-Abfrage zu generieren. Unser Ansatz zeigt Verbesserungen gegenüber früheren Ansätzen an zwei großen Datensätzen (WikiSQL und SENLIDB), die sich für datengetriebene Lösungen für natürliche Sprachschnittstellen für Datenbanken eignen.', 'id': "We propose a sketch-based two-step neural model for generating structured queries (SQL) based on a user's request in natural language.  Sket ini diperoleh dengan menggunakan pemegang tempat untuk entitas spesifik dalam pertanyaan SQL, seperti nama kolom, nama tabel, alias dan variabel, dalam proses yang mirip dengan penghuraian semantis. Langkah pertama adalah untuk menerapkan model urutan-ke-urutan (SEQ2SEQ) untuk menentukan sketsa SQL yang paling mungkin berdasarkan permintaan dalam bahasa alami. Kemudian, jaringan kedua dirancang sebagai model SEQ2SEQ dual-encoder menggunakan kedua pertanyaan teks dan sketsa yang terdapat sebelumnya digunakan untuk menghasilkan pertanyaan SQL akhir. pendekatan kami menunjukkan peningkatan dari pendekatan sebelumnya pada dua set data besar (WikiSQL dan SENLIDB) yang sesuai untuk solusi yang didorong data untuk antarmuka bahasa alam untuk pangkalan data.", 'fa': 'ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل عصبی دو قدم بر اساس sketch برای تولید سوالات ساخته شده (SQL) بر اساس درخواست کاربر در زبان طبیعی. طراحی با استفاده از طریق استفاده از طراحی جایگزینیان برای واحدهای خاص در سوال SQL، مانند نام ستون، نام میز، نام\u200cنویس و متغیریان، در یک فرایند شبیه به بازرسی semantic می\u200cشود. اولین مرحله این است که یک مدل به مرحله (SEQ2SEQ) را برای تعیین کردن شکل شاید ترین شکل SQL بر اساس درخواست در زبان طبیعی استفاده کنیم. سپس، یک شبکه دوم به عنوان یک مدل SEQ2SEQ دوگانه رمزگذاری طراحی شده با استفاده از سوال متن و sketch قبلاً استفاده شده برای تولید پایان سوال SQL استفاده می\u200cشود. دستور ما بر روی دستورات قبلی در دو مجموعه داده های بزرگ اخیر (WikiSQL و SENLIDB) مناسب برای راه حل\u200cهای راهنمایی به داده\u200cها برای interfaces زبان طبیعی برای baze\u200cهای داده\u200cها، بهتر شدن را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': "We propose a sketch-based two-step neural model for generating structured queries (SQL) based on a user's request in natural language.  Tovuti hilo linapatikana kwa kutumia vifaa vya vituo maalum katika utafiti wa SQL, kama vile majina ya safu, majina ya table, majina mabadiliko na mabadiliko, katika mchakato unaofanana na mabadiliko ya kimapenzi. Hatua ya kwanza ni kutumia muundo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo (SEQ2SEQ) ili kuamua sketch inayowezekana zaidi ya SQL kwa kutumia maombi ya lugha ya asili. Kisha, mtandao wa pili uliobuniwa kama mfumo wa kodi mbili wa SEQ2SEQ kwa kutumia utafiti wa maandishi na utafiti uliopita unatumiwa kutengeneza swali la mwisho la SQL. Hatua yetu inaonyesha maendeleo zaidi ya hatua zilizopita katika seti mbili za takwimu za hivi karibuni (WikiSQL na SENLIDB) zinazohitajika kwa ufumbuzi wa taarifa zinazoendeshwa kwa lugha za asili kwa ajili ya databases.", 'ko': '우리는 사용자가 자연 언어에서의 요청에 따라 구조화된 조회(SQL)를 생성하는 데 사용되는 스케치 기반의 2단계 신경 모델을 제시했다.SQL 질의에서 특정 엔티티의 자리 표시자(예: 열 이름, 테이블 이름, 앨리어스 및 변수)를 사용하여 의미 해석과 유사한 프로세스를 제공합니다.첫 번째 단계는 서열을 서열(SEQ2SEQ) 모델에 적용하고 자연 언어의 요청에 따라 가장 가능한 SQL 초도를 정하는 것이다.그리고 두 번째 네트워크를 더블 인코더 SEQ2SEQ 모델로 사용하고 텍스트 조회와 이전에 얻은 초도를 사용하여 최종 SQL 조회를 생성합니다.우리의 방법은 최근의 두 개의 대형 데이터 집합(WikiSQL과 SENLIDB)에 이전 방법보다 개선된 것을 보여 주었다. 이 두 데이터 집합은 데이터베이스 자연 언어 인터페이스의 데이터 구동 솔루션에 적용된다.', 'tr': 'Ullançylaryň taryhy dilinde daşary edilen strukturlyk soraglary (SQL) döretmek üçin sketch tabanly iki adım neural modelini teklip edip görýäris. SQL soragynda takyk gabdalyklar üçin ýerleşdirilýar, mesele adlary, täblisaň adlary, aliaslar we üýtgeşmeleri bilen, semantik analýşinde ýaly bir proses üçin ýerleşdirilýar. Ilkinji adım, tebigy dilde iň mümkin SQL skeçsini bejermek üçin bir sıralama (SEQ2SEQ) nusgasyna uygulamak. Sonra, ikinji a ň SEQ2SEQ nusgasyny hem metin soragy ullanýan we öňki alan sketchi iň soňky SQL soragy bejermek üçin ullanýar. Biziň ýaryşymyz (WikiSQL we SENLIDB) tebigy dil interfejleri üçin gowy çözmeler üçin öňki goly golaýlaryň üstünde gelişmeleri görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Ne propozojmë një model nervor dy hapash të bazuar në sketch për krijimin e pyetjeve të strukturuara (SQL) bazuar në kërkesën e një përdoruesi në gjuhën natyrore. Skrizi merret duke përdorur mbajtësit e vendeve për njësitë specifike në pyetjen SQL, të tilla si emrat e kolonave, emrat e tabelës, pseudonimet dhe ndryshuesit, në një proces të ngjashëm me analizimin semantik. Hapi i parë është të aplikohet një model sekuencë-në-sekuencë (SEQ2SEQ) për të përcaktuar skezhin më të mundshëm SQL bazuar në kërkesën në gjuhën natyrore. Pastaj, një rrjet i dytë i dizajnuar si një model me dy kodues SEQ2SEQ duke përdorur si pyetjen e tekstit dhe sketsat e fituar më parë përdoret për të gjeneruar pyetjen finale SQL. Përqasja jonë tregon përmirësime lidhur me qasjet e mëparshme në dy grupe të dhënash të mëdha të fundit (WikiSQL dhe SENLIDB) të përshtatshme për zgjidhje të drejtuara nga të dhënat për interfaqet natyrore të gjuhës për bazat e të dhënave.', 'af': "Ons voorstel 'n sketch- gebaseerde twee- stap neural model vir genereer struktureerde vraagte (SQL) gebaseer op' n gebruiker se versoek in natuurlike taal. Die sketch is verkry deur gebruik van plekhouers vir spesifieke entiteite in die SQL navraag, soos kolom name, tabel name, aliases en veranderlikes, in' n proses gelyk aan semantiese verwerking. Die eerste stap is na toewend 'n volgorde- na- volgorde (SEQ2SEQ) model na bepaal die mees waarskynlik SQL sketch gebaseer op die versoek in natuurlik taal. Dan, 'n tweede netwerk ontwerp as 'n tweede- enkoder SEQ2SEQ model gebruik beide die teks navraag en die voorheen ontvangde sketch is gebruik om die eindelike SQL navraag te genereer. Ons toegang vertoon verbeteringe oor vorige toegang op twee onlangse groot datastelle (WikiSQL en SENLIDB) wat geskik is vir data- draai oplossing vir natuurlike taal koppelinge vir databasis.", 'am': 'በጥያዊ ቋንቋ የተጠቃሚ ፈቃድ ለመፍጠር (SQL) የተመሳሳይ የሁለት ደረጃዎች የኒጀርነት ሞዴል እናስጀጋለን፡፡ Name የመጀመሪያው ደረጃዎች በጥቅረት ቋንቋ ውስጥ ለመፈለግ የሚቻለውን SQL sketch ለማረጋገጥ (SEQ2SEQ) ሞዴል ነው፡፡ በኋላም የሁለተኛው መረብ የፊደል SQ2SEQ ሞዴል በጽሑፍ ጠይቅ እና ቀድሞው የተገኘው ስኮክ መጨረሻውን SQL ጠይቅ ለመፍጠር ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ አካሄዳችን የቀድሞው የዳታ ቋንቋ አካባቢዎች ለዳታ መቃናዎች የሚጠቅሙትን ሁለት ትልቁ ዳታዎችን (WikiSQL እና SENLIDB) የሚጠቅሙትን ትክክል ማድረግ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու քայլի նյարդային մոդել կառուցվածքային հարցերի (SQL) ստեղծման համար, որը հիմնված է օգտագործողի պահանջի վրա բնական լեզվով: Այս նկարը ստացվում է SQL հարցում գտնվող որոշակի անհատականությունների դիրքերի օգտագործման միջոցով, ինչպիսիք են սյունների անունները, աղյուսակի անունները, անունները և փոփոխականները, սեմանտիկ վերլուծության նման գործընթացում: Առաջին քայլը հաջորդականություն հաջորդականության (SEQ2SEQ) մոդելի կիրառելն է, որպեսզի սահմանվի ամենահավանական SQL sketch ը, հիմնված բնական լեզվի խնդրի վրա: Հետո, երկրորդ ցանց, որը նախագծված է որպես երկու կոդեր SEQ2SEQ մոդել, օգտագործելով տեքստի հարցը և նախկինում ստացված sketch ը, օգտագործվում է SQL վերջնական հարցը ստեղծելու համար: Մեր մոտեցումը ցույց է տալիս վերջին երկու մեծ տվյալների (WiKiSQL և SENSIDB) վերաբերյալ բարելավումներ, որոնք համապատասխանում են տվյալների հիմնված լուծումների համար տվյալների բազաների բնական լեզվային ինտերֆեյսերի համար:', 'bn': 'আমরা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় ব্যবহারকারীর অনুরোধ নির্মাণ করার জন্য একটি স্কেচ ভিত্তিক দুই ধাপ নিউরেল মডেল প্রস্তাব করি। SQL অনুসন্ধানে নির্দিষ্ট বস্তুর জন্য প্লেসেহেডার ব্যবহার করে স্ক্যাচ পাওয়া যায়, যেমন কলামের নাম, টেবিলের নাম, অ্যালিজ এবং ভেরিয়াল, যেমন প্রথম পদক্ষেপ হচ্ছে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার অনুরোধের ভিত্তিতে সবচেয়ে বেশী সম্ভাব্য SQL স্কেচ নির্ধারণ করার জন্য একটি সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন তারপর, একটি দ্বিতীয় নেটওয়ার্ক ডিজাইন করা হয়েছে দুই কোডার সেকিউ২SEQ মডেল হিসেবে, টেক্সট কোরিয়ার ব্যবহার করে এবং পূর্ববর্তী পেয়েছে স্কেচ চ চ সাম্প্রতিক দুই বড় ডাটাসেট (উইকিএসকিউএল এবং সেন্লিডিবি) সমাধানের জন্য প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ইন্টারফেসের জন্য তথ্য চালিয়ে যাওয়া সমাধা', 'az': 'Biz təbiətli dildə istifadəçin in istəyinə dayanan strukturlu soruşmalar (SQL) yaratmaq üçün skeç-tabanlı iki adım nöral modeli təklif edirik. Sütunlar, sütun adları, table adları, aliases və dəyişiklikləri kimi, Sütunlar üçün xüsusi məlumatlar üçün placeholders istifadə edir. İlk adım, təbiətli dildə olan ən mümkün olaraq SQL sketchini təyin etmək üçün sequence-to-sequence (SEQ2SEQ) modelini uygulamaqdır. Sonra, ikinci a ğ iki kodlayıcı SEQ2SEQ modeli ilə mətn soruşmasını və əvvəlcə alınan sketchi son SQL soruşmasını yaratmaq üçün istifadə edilir. Yaxınlığımız təbiətli dil interfejləri üçün təbiətli dil interfejləri üçün verilən çətinliklərə uyğun iki yeni böyük veri qurğuları (WikiSQL və SENLIDB).', 'cs': 'Navrhujeme skicový dvoustupňový neuronový model pro generování strukturovaných dotazů (SQL) na základě požadavku uživatele v přirozeném jazyce. Náčrt je získán pomocí zástupných symbolů pro konkrétní entity v SQL dotazu, jako jsou názvy sloupců, názvy tabulek, aliasy a proměnné, v procesu podobném sémantickému parsování. Prvním krokem je aplikace modelu sekvence-to-sekvence (SEQ2SEQ) pro určení nejpravděpodobnějšího SQL náčrtu na základě požadavku v přirozeném jazyce. Následně je k generování konečného SQL dotazu použita druhá síť navržená jako duální síť SEQ2SEQ model využívající jak textový dotaz, tak dříve získaný náčrt. Náš přístup ukazuje zlepšení oproti předchozím přístupům na dvou nedávných velkých datových sadách (WikiSQL a SENLIDB) vhodných pro datově řízená řešení pro rozhraní přirozeného jazyka databází.', 'bs': 'Predlažemo na skeču dva koraka neuronski model za stvaranje strukturiranih ispitivanja (SQL) na temelju zahtjeva korisnika na prirodnom jeziku. Sketu dobija koristeći placeholdere za određene entitate u SQL ispitivanju, kao što su imena kolona, imena stolice, aliase i varijante, u procesu sličnom semantičkom analizu. Prvi korak je primjenjivanje model a sekvence do sekvence (SEQ2SEQ) kako bi utvrdilo najvjerojatniji skeč SQL na temelju zahtjeva na prirodnom jeziku. Onda je druga mreža dizajnirana kao dvostruki koder SEQ2SEQ model koristeći i tekst zahtev, i prethodno dobijenu skeč zaposlena kako bi stvorila konačnu SQL zahtev. Naš pristup pokazuje poboljšanje pri prethodnim pristupima na dvije nedavne velike baze podataka (WikiSQL i SENLIDB) odgovarajuće za rješenja podataka za prirodne jezičke interfejse za baze podataka.', 'ca': "Proposem un model neural de dos passos basat en esboços per generar preguntes estructurats (SQL) basats en la petició d'un usuari en llenguatge natural. L'esboç es obté utilitzant tenedors de lloc per a entitats específices de la consulta SQL, com els noms de columnes, els noms de taula, els aliases i les variables, en un procés similar a l'analització semàntica. El primer pas és aplicar un model de seqüència a seqüència (SEQ2SEQ) per determinar l'esboç SQL més probable basat en la petición en llenguatge natural. Llavors, es utilitza una segona xarxa dissenyada com un model de doble codificador SEQ2SEQ utilitzant tant la pregunta de text com l'esboç obtingut abans per generar la pregunta final SQL. El nostre enfocament mostra millors en comparació amb enfocaments anteriors en dos grans conjunts de dades recents (WikiSQL i SENLIDB) adequats per solucions basades en dades per interfaces de llenguatge natural per a bases de dades.", 'et': 'Pakume välja visandipõhise kaheastmelise neuromudeli struktureeritud päringute (SQL) genereerimiseks, mis põhineb kasutaja soovil looduskeeles. Skeemi saamiseks kasutatakse SQL-päringu konkreetsete olemite kohatäiteid (nt veerunimed, tabelinimed, varjunimed ja muutujad) semantilise parsimisega sarnases protsessis. Esimene samm on rakendada jadast järjestusse (SEQ2SEQ) mudelit, et määrata kõige tõenäolisem SQL sketch päringu põhjal looduskeeles. Seejärel kasutatakse lõpliku SQL-päringu genereerimiseks teist võrku, mis on kujundatud kahekodeerijana SEQ2SEQ mudelina, kasutades nii tekstipäringut kui ka eelnevalt saadud visandit. Meie lähenemisviis näitab paranemist võrreldes varasemate lähenemisviisidega kahe hiljutise suure andmekogumi (WikiSQL ja SENLIDB) puhul, mis sobivad andmebaaside looduskeeleliste liidesete andmebaaside andmepõhiste lahenduste jaoks.', 'fi': 'Ehdotamme luonnokseen perustuvaa kaksivaiheista neuromallia strukturoitujen kyselyjen (SQL) tuottamiseen käyttäjän luonnollisen kielen pyyntöön perustuen. Luonnos saadaan käyttämällä paikkamerkkejä SQL-kyselyn tietyille entiteeteille, kuten sarakkeiden nimille, taulukon nimille, aliaksille ja muuttujille semanttisen jäsentämisen kaltaisessa prosessissa. Ensimmäinen vaihe on soveltaa sekvenssi-to-sekvenssimallia (SEQ2SEQ), jotta voidaan määrittää todennäköisin SQL-luonnos pyynnön perusteella luonnollisella kielellä. Tämän jälkeen käytetään toista verkkoa, joka on suunniteltu kaksoiskoodaajaksi SEQ2SEQ-malliksi käyttäen sekä tekstikyselyä että aiemmin saatua luonnosta, lopullisen SQL-kyselyn luomiseen. Lähestymistapamme osoittaa parannuksia aiempiin lähestymistapoihin verrattuna kahteen viimeaikaiseen suureen tietoaineistoon (WikiSQL ja SENLIDB), jotka soveltuvat tietopohjaisiin ratkaisuihin tietokantojen luonnollisen kielen rajapintoihin.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem 2langgar sampek nêrung kuwi nggawe Tiftar nggawe Rusak nggawe string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Awak dhéwé sing perusahaan iku aplikasi model sing sekondir-to-sekondir (SEq2SEq) kanggo ngerasakno diangkat dhéwé iso diangkat dhéwé rangkeng dhéwé, sing basa sabên banget dadi. Sampeyan, netwis wis digawe nganggo sistem duwel-koder SEq2SEq nambah gambar kelas teks query dan akeh stiftar nggawe scek padha dipolet kanggo ngerewake sêftar sêftar biasane Awakdhéwé éntuk akeh perusahaan kanggo dianggap sing luwih dumadhi sak data sing dibutuhke sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo dianggap sampeyan kanggo databasa.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציעים מודל עצבי שתי שלבים מבוסס על סקיצים לייצור שאלות מבוססות (SQL) מבוססת על בקשה של משתמש בשפה טבעית. הסקיץ מקבל על ידי השימוש בעלי מחליפים לאישויות ספציפיות בשאלה SQL, כמו שמות עמודים, שמות שולחנות, שמות השינויים ושתנים, בתהליך דומה לאבחן סמנטי. השלב הראשון הוא להפעיל דוגמא רצף לרצף (SEQ2SEQ) כדי לקבוע את הסקיץ SQL הכי סביר בהתבסס על הבקשה בשפה טבעית. ואז, רשת שנייה שתוכננה כדוגמא SEQ2SEQ עם קודם כפול בשימוש גם בקשת הטקסט וגם סקיצ שנקבל קודם משתמש כדי ליצור את בקשת SQL האחרונה. הגישה שלנו מראה שיפורים מעל גישות קודמות על שתי קבוצות נתונים גדולות (WikiSQL ו SENLIDB) אחרונות מתאימות לפתרונות הנועדות על נתונים למפני שפה טבעית לבסיסי נתונים.', 'ha': "Tuna goyyar da wata motel ɗin neural wanda aka samar da wanda aka saka (SQL) a kan salon da aka tambayi wani mai amfani da shi cikin harshen asimi. Ana motsa ɗin akwatin bayani da za'a yi amfani da kayan daidaita wa abun masu ƙayyade cikin tambayar SQL, kamar sunayen layin, sunayen layin, alƙalum da variables, cikin wani aikin da ke daidai da parse na semantic. Gagon farko na amfani da wata motsi mai sauri-zuwa-sequence (SQ2SeQ) dõmin ya ƙayyade sauti mafi yiwuwa a ƙayyade SQL kan canza da aka so cikin harshen asimi. Sa'an nan, ana yi amfani da wata wagon na biyu wanda aka designe kamar wata motsi na tsohon-dual-kode-SQ2SeQ, ana yi amfani da duk tambayin matsayin da ke samu'in da ya samu ya samu-sami don ya ƙiƙiro tambayin SQL na ƙarshen. Tsarakanmu na nuna mafiya kyau kan hanyõyin da aka riga ta zaman a kan tsari biyu masu girma (WikiSQL da SNLIDB) wanda ke daidai wa masu motsi da za'a yi fasahawa wa fassarar harshe na farko wa database.", 'sk': 'Predlagamo skični dvostopenjski nevronski model za generiranje strukturiranih poizvedb (SQL), ki temelji na zahtevi uporabnika v naravnem jeziku. Skica je pridobljena z uporabo označb mest za določene entitete v poizvedbi SQL, kot so imena stolpcev, imena tabel, vzdevki in spremenljivke, v procesu, podobnem semantičnemu razčlenjanju. Prvi korak je uporaba modela SEQ2SEQ za določitev najverjetnejše skice SQL na podlagi zahteve v naravnem jeziku. Nato se za ustvarjanje končne poizvedbe SQL uporabi drugo omrežje, oblikovano kot model SEQ2SEQ z dvojnim kodirjem, ki uporablja besedilno poizvedbo in prej pridobljeno skico. Naš pristop kaže izboljšave v primerjavi s prejšnjimi pristopi na dveh nedavnih velikih naborih podatkov (WikiSQL in SENLIDB), primernih za podatkovno usmerjene rešitve za vmesnike naravnega jezika za baze podatkov.', 'bo': "We propose a sketch-based two-step neural model for generating structured queries (SQL) based on a user's request in natural language. The sketch is obtained by using placeholders for specific entities in the SQL query, such as column names, table names, aliases and variables, in a process similar to semantic parsing. The first step is to apply a sequence-to-sequence (SEQ2SEQ) model to determine the most probable SQL sketch based on the request in natural language. Then, a second network designed as a dual-encoder SEQ2SEQ model using both the text query and the previously obtained sketch is employed to generate the final SQL query. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱིས་དུས་རམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་མིའི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང"}
{'en': 'Joint Modeling of Structure Identification and Nuclearity Recognition in Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank', 'ar': 'النمذجة المشتركة لتحديد الهياكل والاعتراف بالنووية في الخطاب الصيني الكلي Treebank', 'pt': 'Modelagem Conjunta de Identificação de Estruturas e Reconhecimento de Nuclearidade no Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank', 'es': 'Modelado conjunto de identificación de estructuras y reconocimiento de nuclearidad en el banco de árboles del discurso macrochino', 'fr': "Modélisation conjointe de l'identification des structures et de la reconnaissance de la nucléarité dans le discours macro-chinois", 'ja': '中国マクロ言論ツリーバンクにおける構造識別と核性認識の共同モデリング', 'ru': 'Совместное моделирование идентификации структуры и распознавания ядерной активности в макро-китайском дискурсе Treebank', 'zh': '宏观中国语树库结构与核性合建模', 'hi': 'मैक्रो चीनी प्रवचन Treebank में संरचना पहचान और परमाणुता मान्यता के संयुक्त मॉडलिंग', 'ga': 'Samhaltú Comhpháirteach ar Shainaithint Struchtúr agus Aitheantas Núicléachta i gCrannchur na gCrann Dioscúrsa Macra-Síneach', 'hu': 'Struktúraazonosítás és nuklearitás felismerés közös modellezése a makro kínai diskurzus fákban', 'ka': 'სტრუქტურის იდენტიფიკაციის და Nuclearity Recognition in Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank', 'el': 'Κοινή μοντελοποίηση της Αναγνώρισης Δομών και της Αναγνώρισης της Πυρηνικότητας στη Μακροκινή Δέντρο Συζήτηση', 'it': "Modellazione congiunta dell'identificazione della struttura e del riconoscimento della nuclearità nel Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank", 'kk': 'Құрылғы идентификациясын және Nuclearity анықтау үлгісін макро китайсық дискурстар Бұтабағының біріктіру', 'lt': 'Bendras struktūros identifikavimo ir branduolinio ryšio pripažinimo makro Kinijos diskurso medienose modeliavimas', 'mk': 'Заедничко моделирање на идентификацијата на структурата и признавањето на нуклеарноста во макрокинската дискурсна банка', 'ms': 'Joint Modeling of Structure Identification and Nuclearity Recognition in Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudellar Konġunt tal-Identifikazzjoni tal-Istruttura u r-Rikonoxximent tan-Nuklearità fil-Pank ta’ Diskors MakroĊiniż', 'mn': 'Макро Хятадын ярианы Treebank-д Structure Identification and Nuclearity Recognition Modeling', 'no': 'Joint Modeling of Structure Identification and Nuclearity Recognition in Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank', 'pl': 'Wspólne modelowanie identyfikacji struktury i rozpoznawania nuclearity w makro chińskim drzewie dyskursowym', 'ro': 'Modelarea comună a identificării structurii și recunoașterii nuclearității în baza discursului macro chinezesc', 'sr': 'Zajednička modela identifikacije strukture i priznanja nuklearnosti u Makro Kineskom diskursu Treebank', 'si': 'මැක්\u200dරෝ චීනි විශ්වාස ක්\u200dරීබැන්ක්', 'so': 'Joint Modeling of Structure Identification and Nuclearity in Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank', 'sv': 'Gemensam modellering av strukturidentifiering och nuklaritetsigenkänning i makrokinesisk diskurs trädbank', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'مکرو چینی ڈیکسور تری بانک میں ساختار شناسایی اور نوکلیریٹ شناسایی کی موڈلینگ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ cấu trúc khớp và nhận diện sơ bộ cấu trúc tại Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank', 'hr': 'Zajednička modela identifikacije strukture i priznanja nuklearnosti u Makro Kineskoj Treebank-u', 'bg': 'Съвместно моделиране на идентификацията на структурата и разпознаването на ядреността в макрокитайската дискурсна дървесна банка', 'nl': 'Gezamenlijke modellering van structurele identificatie en nucleariteitsherkenning in macro Chinese discoursboombank', 'da': 'Fælles modellering af strukturidentifikation og nuklearitetsanerkendelse i makrokinesisk diskurs træbank', 'de': 'Gemeinsame Modellierung von Strukturidentifikation und Nuclearitätserkennung in makro-chinesischen Diskurs-Baumbänken', 'id': 'Modeling Konġunt Identifikasi Struktur dan Pengenalan Nuklearitas di Macro China Discourse Treebank', 'fa': 'مشترک مدل شناسایی ساختار و شناسایی نوکری در درخت درخت صحبت چینی مکرو', 'sw': 'Msimamo wa pamoja wa Utambulisho na Utafiti wa Miundomo katika Treebank ya Utafiti wa Kichina Macro', 'sq': 'Modelimi i përbashkët i identifikimit të strukturës dhe njohjes së bërthamës në bazën e diskutimit maqedonas kinez', 'ko': '거시적 중국어 언어 라이브러리 중 구조 식별과 핵 식별의 결합 모델', 'tr': 'Makro Çin çe Gezgi Başlygynyň Structure Identification we Nusgaliýet Tanymasynyň Goşum', 'hy': 'Մաքրոչինական խոսակցության ծառի մեջ կառուցվածքի հայտնաբերման և միջուկային ճանաչության միասին մոդելավորումը', 'af': 'Joint Modeling of Structure Identification and Nuclearity Recognition in Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank', 'bn': 'ম্যাক্রো চীনা ডিসার্স ট্রিব্যাংকের কাঠামোর পরিচয় এবং পরিষ্কার স্বীকারের মোডেলিং', 'am': 'ማክሮቻይና የቻይና ምርጫዎች Treebank', 'bs': 'Zajednička modela identifikacije strukture i priznanja nuklearnosti u Makro Kineskom diskursu Treebank', 'ca': "Modell conjunt d'identificació de l'estructura i reconeixement de la nuclearitat a la banca de discurs macroxinesa", 'cs': 'Společné modelování identifikace struktury a rozpoznávání nuclearity v makro čínském diskurzním stromu', 'az': "Makro Çincə Discourse Treebank'da Structure Identification and Nuclearity Recognition Modeling in Joint Modeling of Structure Identification and Nuclearity Recognition", 'et': 'Struktuuri identifitseerimise ja tuumapuuduse tuvastamise ühine modelleerimine makrohiina diskursipangas', 'fi': 'Rakenteiden tunnistamisen ja ydinvoiman tunnistamisen yhteinen mallinnus makrokiinalaisessa diskurssipankissa', 'jv': 'Joint model of structural ID and NuClearity', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Skupno modeliranje identifikacije strukture in prepoznavanja nuklearnosti v makrokitajski diskurzni banki', 'he': 'דוגמנית משותפת לזהות מבנה והזיהוי הגרעינית בבנק העץ המקרו סיני', 'bo': 'Joint Modeling of Structure Identification and Nuclearity Recognition in Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank'}
{'en': 'Discourse parsing is a challenging task and plays a critical role in discourse analysis. This paper focus on the macro level discourse structure analysis, which has been less studied in the previous researches. We explore a macro discourse structure presentation schema to present the macro level discourse structure, and propose a corresponding corpus, named Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. On these bases, we concentrate on two tasks of macro discourse structure analysis, including structure identification and nuclearity recognition. In order to reduce the error transmission between the associated tasks, we adopt a joint model of the two tasks, and an Integer Linear Programming approach is proposed to achieve global optimization with various kinds of constraints.', 'ar': 'يعد تحليل الخطاب مهمة صعبة ويلعب دورًا حاسمًا في تحليل الخطاب. تركز هذه الورقة على تحليل هيكل الخطاب على المستوى الكلي ، والذي لم يتم دراسته بشكل أقل في الأبحاث السابقة. نستكشف مخطط عرض هيكل الخطاب الكلي لتقديم هيكل الخطاب على مستوى الماكرو ، ونقترح مجموعة مقابلة ، تسمى بنك الخطاب الصيني الكلي. على هذه القواعد ، نركز على مهمتين لتحليل هيكل الخطاب الكلي ، بما في ذلك تحديد الهيكل والاعتراف بالنووية. من أجل تقليل انتقال الخطأ بين المهام المرتبطة ، نعتمد نموذجًا مشتركًا للمهمتين ، ويقترح نهج البرمجة الخطية الصحيحة لتحقيق التحسين العالمي مع أنواع مختلفة من القيود.', 'es': 'El análisis del discurso es una tarea desafiante y desempeña un papel fundamental en el análisis del discurso. Este artículo se centra en el análisis de la estructura del discurso a nivel macro, que ha sido menos estudiado en investigaciones anteriores. Exploramos un esquema de presentación de la estructura del discurso macro para presentar la estructura del discurso a nivel macro, y proponemos un corpus correspondiente, llamado Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Sobre estas bases, nos concentramos en dos tareas de análisis de la estructura del macrodiscurso, que incluyen la identificación de la estructura y el reconocimiento de la nuclearidad. Para reducir la transmisión de errores entre las tareas asociadas, adoptamos un modelo conjunto de las dos tareas, y se propone un enfoque de programación lineal entera para lograr la optimización global con varios tipos de restricciones.', 'fr': "L'analyse du discours est une tâche difficile qui joue un rôle essentiel dans l'analyse du discours. Cet article se concentre sur l'analyse macroéconomique de la structure du discours, qui a été moins étudiée dans les recherches précédentes. Nous explorons un schéma de présentation de structure de discours macro pour présenter la structure du discours au niveau macro et proposons un corpus correspondant, appelé Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Sur ces bases, nous nous concentrons sur deux tâches d'analyse macro-structurale du discours, y compris l'identification de la structure et la reconnaissance du caractère nucléaire. Afin de réduire la transmission d'erreurs entre les tâches associées, nous adoptons un modèle conjoint des deux tâches, et une approche de programmation linéaire entière est proposée pour obtenir une optimisation globale avec différents types de contraintes.", 'pt': 'A análise do discurso é uma tarefa desafiadora e desempenha um papel crítico na análise do discurso. Este artigo tem como foco a análise da estrutura do discurso em nível macro, que tem sido menos estudada nas pesquisas anteriores. Exploramos um esquema de apresentação da estrutura do discurso macro para apresentar a estrutura do discurso em nível macro e propomos um corpus correspondente, denominado Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Nestas bases, concentramo-nos em duas tarefas de análise macroestrutural do discurso, incluindo a identificação da estrutura e o reconhecimento da nuclearidade. A fim de reduzir a transmissão de erros entre as tarefas associadas, adotamos um modelo conjunto das duas tarefas, e uma abordagem de Programação Linear Inteira é proposta para alcançar a otimização global com vários tipos de restrições.', 'ja': 'ディスコーズ解析は困難な課題であり、ディスコーズ分析において重要な役割を果たします。本稿では、これまでの研究であまり研究されてこなかったマクロレベルの論考構造分析に焦点を当てる。マクロレベルの論証構造を提示するためのマクロ論証構造プレゼンテーションスキーマを探求し、対応するコーパス、マクロ中国論証ツリーバンクを提案します。これらを踏まえ、構造識別と核性認識を含むマクロ言説構造分析の2つの課題に集中している。関連するタスク間の誤差伝達を低減するために、2つのタスクの共同モデルを採用し、様々な制約を伴うグローバル最適化を実現するための整数リニアプログラミングアプローチが提案されています。', 'zh': '语者解析挑战性之任也,论中起至重之用也。 本文重点宏观层面语结构,于往者较少。 探一种宏观语结模样以呈宏观层语结构,并发相应语料库,名曰宏观中国语树库。 凡此二者,宏观别核性也。 为减相关之差,用两务之合模形,并立一线性规画之法,以成约束之优化。', 'hi': 'प्रवचन पार्सिंग एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है और प्रवचन विश्लेषण में एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाता है। यह पेपर मैक्रो स्तर के प्रवचन संरचना विश्लेषण पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है, जिसका पिछले शोधों में कम अध्ययन किया गया है। हम मैक्रो स्तर प्रवचन संरचना को प्रस्तुत करने के लिए एक मैक्रो प्रवचन संरचना प्रस्तुति स्कीमा का पता लगाते हैं, और मैक्रो चीनी प्रवचन ट्रीबैंक नामक एक संबंधित कॉर्पस का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इन आधारों पर, हम मैक्रो प्रवचन संरचना विश्लेषण के दो कार्यों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, जिसमें संरचना की पहचान और परमाणु मान्यता शामिल है। संबंधित कार्यों के बीच त्रुटि संचरण को कम करने के लिए, हम दो कार्यों के एक संयुक्त मॉडल को अपनाते हैं, और विभिन्न प्रकार की बाधाओं के साथ वैश्विक अनुकूलन प्राप्त करने के लिए एक पूर्णांक रैखिक प्रोग्रामिंग दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित है।', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ дискурса является сложной задачей и играет решающую роль в анализе дискурса. В данной работе основное внимание уделяется анализу структуры дискурса на макроуровне, который в меньшей степени изучался в предыдущих исследованиях. Мы исследуем схему презентации структуры макродискурса, чтобы представить структуру дискурса макроуровня, и предлагаем соответствующий корпус, названный Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Исходя из этого, мы концентрируемся на двух задачах макродискурсионного анализа структуры, включая идентификацию структуры и распознавание ядерной активности. Для уменьшения передачи ошибок между связанными задачами мы принимаем совместную модель двух задач, и предлагается подход целочисленного линейного программирования для достижения глобальной оптимизации с различными видами ограничений.', 'ga': "Is tasc dúshlánach é parsáil dioscúrsa agus tá ról ríthábhachtach aige in anailís dioscúrsa. Díríonn an páipéar seo ar an anailís ar struchtúr dioscúrsa macra-leibhéil, ar lú an staidéar a rinneadh air sna taighde roimhe seo. Déanaimid iniúchadh ar scéimre cur i láthair ar struchtúr dioscúrsa macra chun an struchtúr dioscúrsa macra-leibhéil a chur i láthair, agus molaimid corpas comhfhreagrach, darb ainm Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Ar na boinn sin, dírímid ar dhá thasc a bhaineann le hanailís ar struchtúr macra dioscúrsa, lena n-áirítear sainaithint struchtúir agus aithint núicléach. D'fhonn an tarchur earráide idir na tascanna gaolmhara a laghdú, glacaimid múnla comhpháirteach den dá thasc, agus moltar cur chuige Clár Líneach Slánuimhir chun barrfheabhsú domhanda a bhaint amach le cineálacha éagsúla srianta.", 'el': 'Η ανάλυση λόγου είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο και παίζει κρίσιμο ρόλο στην ανάλυση λόγου. Η παρούσα εργασία επικεντρώνεται στην ανάλυση της δομής του λόγου σε μακροεπίπεδο, η οποία έχει μελετηθεί λιγότερο στις προηγούμενες έρευνες. Εξετάζουμε ένα σχήμα παρουσίασης δομής μακρολόγου για να παρουσιάσουμε τη δομή του μακρολόγου σε μακροεπίπεδο, και προτείνουμε ένα αντίστοιχο σώμα, που ονομάζεται Δέντρο Μακροκινής Συζήτηση. Σε αυτές τις βάσεις, επικεντρωνόμαστε σε δύο καθήκοντα ανάλυσης δομών μακρολόγου, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της αναγνώρισης δομών και της αναγνώρισης πυρηνικότητας. Προκειμένου να μειωθεί η μετάδοση σφαλμάτων μεταξύ των σχετικών εργασιών, υιοθετούμε ένα κοινό μοντέλο των δύο εργασιών και προτείνεται μια προσέγγιση Ακέραιου Γραμμικού Προγραμματισμού για την επίτευξη παγκόσμιας βελτιστοποίησης με διάφορα είδη περιορισμών.', 'hu': 'A diskurzuselemzés kihívást jelentő feladat, és kritikus szerepet játszik a diskurzuselemzésben. A tanulmány a korábbi kutatásokban kevésbé tanulmányozott makroszintű diskurzus struktúra elemzésére összpontosít. A makroszintű diskurzus struktúra bemutatási sémáját vizsgáljuk fel a makroszintű diskurzus struktúrájának bemutatására, és javasoljuk a megfelelő korpuszt, a Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank néven. Ezek alapján a makro diskurzus struktúra elemzésének két feladatára összpontosítunk, beleértve a struktúra azonosítását és a nukleáris felismerést. A kapcsolódó feladatok közötti hibaátvitel csökkentése érdekében a két feladat közös modelljét alkalmazzuk, és egy egész lineáris programozási megközelítést javasolunk a globális optimalizálás különböző korlátozásokkal történő elérésére.', 'ka': 'დისკურსების პარალიზაცია არის შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა და კრიტიკური პროლია დისკურსების ანალიზაციაში. მაკრო დონეზე სტუკური სტრუქტურის ანალიზაციისთვის, რომელიც უფრო მეტად უკეთესია წინა სწავლა. ჩვენ მაკრო დისკურსის სტრუქტურის პრეზენტირება სქემის გამოყენება მაკრო დონეზე დისკურსის სტრუქტურაციას და შევძლოთ კომპორცირებული კორპუსს, სახელი მაკრო კინინ ამ ბაზეში, ჩვენ კონტენსტრეტირებით მაკრო დისკურსის სტრუქტურის ანალიზაციის ორი დავალებისთვის, როგორც სტრუქტურის ინდიდინტიფიკაცია და ნუკურილი რომ შეცდომის გადატანაციას შეცდომის გადატანაციას, ჩვენ ორი დავალების ერთადერთი მოდელს მივიღებთ, და უფრო მცირე ლინიერი პროგრამის გადატანაციას მინდა გლობალური ოპტიმიზაციას განსხვავებული განსხვ', 'it': "L'analisi del discorso è un compito impegnativo e svolge un ruolo critico nell'analisi del discorso. Questo articolo si concentra sull'analisi della struttura del discorso a macro livello, che è stata meno studiata nelle ricerche precedenti. Esploriamo uno schema di presentazione della struttura del discorso macro per presentare la struttura del discorso a livello macro, e proponiamo un corpus corrispondente, chiamato Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Su queste basi, ci concentriamo su due compiti di analisi della struttura del macro discorso, tra cui l'identificazione della struttura e il riconoscimento della nuclearità. Al fine di ridurre la trasmissione degli errori tra i compiti associati, adottiamo un modello comune dei due compiti e viene proposto un approccio Interger Linear Programming per ottenere l'ottimizzazione globale con vari tipi di vincoli.", 'mk': 'Анализирањето на дискурсот е предизвикувачка задача и игра критична улога во анализата на дискурсот. Овој документ се фокусира на анализата на дискурсната структура на макро ниво, која е помалку проучена во претходните истражувања. Истражуваме шема на презентација на структурата на макро дискурс за да ја претставиме структурата на макро ниво дискурс, и да предложиме соодветен корпус, наречен Макро Кинеска дискурс банка. On these bases, we concentrate on two tasks of macro discourse structure analysis, including structure identification and nuclearity recognition.  Со цел да го намалиме пренесувањето на грешки помеѓу поврзаните задачи, усвоивме заеднички модел на двете задачи, и се предложува пристап на целосно линијарно програмирање за постигнување на глобална оптимизација со различни видови ограничувања.', 'kk': 'Дискурстарды талдау - мәселе тапсырма және дискурстарды талдау үшін маңызды роль ойнатады. Бұл қағаз макро деңгейіндегі дискурс құрылғысының анализиясына назар ауыстырылады, бұл қағаз алдыңғы зерттеулерде оқылмаған. Макро деңгейіндегі дискурстар құрылғысының сұлбасын зерттеп, макро деңгейіндегі дискурстар құрылғысын көрсету үшін макро дискурстар құрылғысын зерттеп, макро қытайша дискурстар Бұ Бұл негізінде, біз макро дискурстардың құрылғысының анализиясының екі тапсырмасына тәртіпті, құрылғының идентификациясын және ядролықты анықтау үшін. Қате тапсырмалардың арасындағы тапсырмаларды көшірмелеу үшін, екі тапсырмалардың біріктірілген үлгісін қолданамыз, және бірнеше түрлі шектеулермен жүйелік оптимизациялау үшін бүтін линиялық бағдарламалы', 'lt': 'Diskurso analizė yra sudėtinga užduotis ir atlieka svarbų vaidmenį diskurso analizėje. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriama makroekonominio lygio diskurso struktūros analizei, kuri buvo mažiau ištirta ankstesniuose moksliniuose tyrimuose. Mes tiriame makroekonominio diskurso struktūros pristatymo schemą, kad pristatytume makroekonominio lygio diskurso struktūrą, ir siūlome atitinkamą korpusą, pavadintą makroekonominiu Kinijos diskurso medžiu. Šiuo pagrindu daugiausia dėmesio skiriame dviem makroekonominės diskurso struktūros analizės užduotims, įskaitant struktūros nustatymą ir branduolinio poveikio pripažinimą. Siekiant sumažinti klaidų perdavimą tarp susijusių užduočių, mes priimame bendrą dviejų užduočių model į ir siūlomas visapusiško linijinio programavimo metodas siekiant pasaulinio optimizavimo su įvairiais apribojimais.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийг хуваалцах нь хэцүү ажил ба ярианы шинжилгээнд чухал үүрэг тоглодог. Энэ цаас өмнөх судалгаанаас бага судалсан макро хэмжээний ярианы бүтэц шинжилгээнд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бид макро түвшинд ярианы бүтэц бүтэц схемийг судалж, Макро түвшинд ярианы бүтэц үзүүлэх, Макро Хятадын ярианы Treebank гэдэг холбоотой корпус санал болгож байна. Эдгээр суурь дээр бид макро ярианы бүтэц шинжилгээний хоёр даалгавар дээр анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг. Энэ хоёр даалгаварын хоорондын алдаа алдаа дамжуулалтыг багасгахын тулд бид хоёр даалгаварын нийлбэр загварыг ашиглаж байна. Мөн олон төрлийн хязгаарлалтыг дэлхийн сайжруулах арга загвар гаргаж байна.', 'ml': 'ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് പാര്\u200dസിംഗ് വിലാസകരമായ ഒരു ജോലിയാണ്. സംസാരം അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. മാക്രോ നില സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ ഘടനയുടെ അന്വേഷണത്തിന്റെ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക, മുമ്പുള്ള മാക്രോ നില സംസാര സംസാരിക്കാനുള്ള സ്കീമാ നാം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, മാക്രോ ചൈനീസ് ഡിസ്കോര്\u200dസ് ട്രീബാങ്ക് എന്ന പേരുള്ള ഒരു കോര്\u200dപ്പ ഈ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് നമ്മള്\u200d മാക്രോ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ രണ്ട് ജോലികളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. സ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ജോലികള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള പിശക് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കുറയ്ക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് ജോലികളുടെ ഒരു യൂട്ട് മാതൃകയെ പ്രോഗ്രാമിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. വ്യത്യ', 'ms': 'Menghurai hubungan adalah tugas yang mencabar dan bermain peran kritik dalam analisis hubungan. Kertas ini fokus pada analisis struktur diskors aras makro, yang telah kurang dipelajari dalam kajian sebelumnya. Kami mengeksplorasi skema persembahan struktur diskursus makro untuk memperkenalkan struktur diskursus aras makro, dan melamar mayat yang sepadan, bernama Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. On these bases, we concentrate on two tasks of macro discourse structure analysis, including structure identification and nuclearity recognition.  Untuk mengurangi penghantaran ralat diantara tugas berkaitan, kami mengadopsi model kongsi kedua-dua tugas, dan pendekatan Perprogram Linar Integer diusulkan untuk mencapai optimasi global dengan berbagai jenis kekangan.', 'mt': "L-analiżi tad-diskors hija kompitu ta’ sfida u għandha rwol kritiku fl-analiżi tad-diskors. Dan id-dokument jiffoka fuq l-analiżi tal-istruttura ta’ diskors fil-livell makro, li kienet inqas studjata fir-riċerki preċedenti. Aħna nesploraw skema ta' preżentazzjoni ta' struttura ta' diskors makro biex nippreżentaw l-istruttura ta' diskors makro-livell, u nipproponu korpus korrispondenti, imsejjaħ il-Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Fuq dawn il-bażijiet, qed nikkonċentraw fuq żewġ kompiti ta’ analiżi tal-istruttura ta’ diskors makro, inkluż l-identifikazzjoni tal-istruttura u r-rikonoxximent tan-nuklearità. Sabiex titnaqqas it-trażmissjoni ta’ żbalji bejn il-kompiti assoċjati, a ħna niddottaw mudell konġunt taż-żewġ kompiti, u huwa propost approċċ ta’ Programmazzjoni Linjari Integri biex tinkiseb ottimizzazzjoni globali b’diversi tipi ta’ restrizzjonijiet.", 'pl': 'Analiza dyskursu jest wyzwaniem i odgrywa kluczową rolę w analizie dyskursu. Niniejszy artykuł skupia się na analizie struktury dyskursu na poziomie makroekonomicznym, która została mniej zbadana w poprzednich badaniach. Badamy schemat prezentacji struktury dyskursu makro, aby przedstawić strukturę dyskursu makro poziomu, i proponujemy odpowiedni korpus o nazwie Makro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Na tych podstawach koncentrujemy się na dwóch zadaniach analizy struktury makro dyskursu, w tym identyfikacji struktury i rozpoznawaniu nuklearności. Aby zmniejszyć transmisję błędów między powiązanymi zadaniami, przyjmujemy wspólny model dwóch zadań, a proponowane jest podejście do programowania liniowego całkowitego w celu osiągnięcia globalnej optymalizacji z różnego rodzaju ograniczeniami.', 'no': 'Tillesing av diskursar er ein vanskeleg oppgåve og spelar ein kritisk rolle i diskursanalysen. Denne papiret fokuserer på diskurs- struktureanalisen i makroanivå, som er mindre studiert i dei førre forskningane. Vi undersøker eit makro diskurs- strukturpresentasjonsskjema for å visa diskurs- strukturen i makro- nivå, og foreslår eit tilsvarande korpus, kalla namnet Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. På desse basene konsentrerer vi på to oppgåver av makro diskurse-strukturanalyse, inkludert strukturidentifikasjon og kjenningskjenning. For å redusera feiloverføringa mellom de tilknytte oppgåva, kan vi adoptera eit samsvart modell av dei to oppgåva, og ei heiltal linjerprogram-tilnærming er foreslått for å oppnå globale optimalisering med ulike typar avgrensingar.', 'ro': 'Analiza discursului este o sarcină provocatoare și joacă un rol critic în analiza discursului. Lucrarea se concentrează pe analiza structurii discursului la nivel macro, care a fost mai puțin studiată în cercetările anterioare. Explorăm o schemă de prezentare a structurii discursului macro pentru a prezenta structura discursului la nivel macro și propunem un corpus corespunzător, denumit Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Pe aceste baze, ne concentrăm pe două sarcini ale analizei structurii macrodiscursului, inclusiv identificarea structurii și recunoașterea nuclearității. Pentru a reduce transmiterea erorilor între sarcinile asociate, adoptăm un model comun al celor două sarcini, iar abordarea Programării Lineare Integer este propusă pentru a realiza optimizarea globală cu diferite tipuri de constrângeri.', 'sr': 'Analiza diskusija je izazovni zadatak i igra kritičnu ulogu u analizi diskusija. Ovaj papir se fokusira na analizu strukture diskursa na nivou makro, koja je manje proučena u prethodnim istraživanjima. Istražujemo schemu prezentacije makro diskursa u strukturi kako bi predstavili strukturu diskursa na makro nivou i predložili odgovarajući korpus po imenu Makro Kineske diskurse Treebank. Na ovim bazama, koncentrišemo se na dva zadatka analize strukture makroegovora, uključujući identifikaciju strukture i priznanje nuklearnosti. Da bismo smanjili prijenos grešaka između povezanih zadataka, usvojili smo zajednički model dva zadataka, i predložen je pristup integer Linear Programming da postigne globalnu optimizaciju sa različitim vrstama ograničenja.', 'so': 'Baaritaanka baaritaanku waa shaqada dhibaatada leh, wuxuuna ku ciyaaraa qayb muhiim ah baaritaanka hadalka. Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu ku kalsoonaadaa baaritaanka dhismaha hadalka ee macro, kaas oo aan wax ka yar looga baran baaritaankii hore. Waxaynu baaraynaa qorshaha muuqashada macro-ka-hadalka, si aan u soo dirno dhismaha macro-heerka hadalka, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa korpus ku haboon magaca Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Baararkaas waxaa ku qoran labada shaqo oo ku saabsan baaritaanka hadalka macro, kuwaas oo ah aqoonsiga dhismaha iyo aqoonsiga nuurka. Si a an u hoosayso wareejinta khaladda ee shaqaalaha la xidhiidha ah, waxaynu sameynaa noocyo wadajir ah oo labada shaqadooda, waxaana la soo jeedinayaa qalabka laguugu sameynayo qorsheynta caalamiga ah si uu u dhamaado qaabab cayiman oo kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Diskurstolkning är en utmanande uppgift och spelar en avgörande roll i diskursanalys. Denna uppsats fokuserar på diskursstrukturen på makronivå, som har studerats mindre i tidigare studier. Vi undersöker ett presentationsschema för makro diskursstruktur för att presentera diskursstrukturen på makro nivå, och föreslår en motsvarande korpus, kallad Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. På dessa grunder koncentrerar vi oss på två uppgifter för makrodeurstrukturanalys, inklusive strukturidentifiering och nuklearitetsigenkänning. För att minska felöverföringen mellan de associerade uppgifterna antar vi en gemensam modell av de två uppgifterna, och en heltäckande linjär programmering föreslås för att uppnå global optimering med olika typer av begränsningar.', 'si': 'විශ්වාස විශ්ලේෂණය තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වැඩක් සහ කතාව විශ්ලේෂණයේ විශ්ලේෂණය මේ පැත්තේ මැක්රෝ ස්ථානයේ කතා කරපු සංවිධානය විශ්ලේෂණයේ අවධානය කරනවා, මේ පැත්තේ පසුගිය පරී අපි මැක්රෝ කතා කරණාකරණ ස්ථානයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මැක්රෝ ස්ථානයේ කතා කරණාකරණ ස්ථානයක්, සම්බන්ධ කොර්පස් කිර මේ අධාරණයේ අපි මැක්රෝ කතා කරපු විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයේ වැඩක් දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, සංවිධාරණය පරීක සම්බන්ධ වැඩක් අතර වැරැද්ධ වැරැද්ධ වැරැද්ධ වාර්ථාවක් අතරින් අතරින්න, අපි වැරැද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ වැරැද්ධ වැරැද්ධ ව', 'ta': 'விஷயம் பாடல் ஒரு சவாலிக்கும் பணி மற்றும் பேச்சு ஆராய்ச்சியில் ஒரு முக்கியமான பங்கை விளையாடுகிறது. இந்த தாள் மேக்ரோ மட்டத்தில் பேச்சு உரையாடல் அமைப்பு ஆய்வு, முந்தைய ஆய்வுகளில் குறைவாக படிப்பிடப்பட்டது. நாம் மேக்ரோ பேச்சு உரையாடல் அமைப்பு முன்வைப்பு முறைமையை தேடுகிறோம் மேக்ரோ மட்ட பேச்சு உரையாடல் அமைப்பை கொண்டுவருவதற்கு, மாக்ரோ ச இந்த அடிப்படைகளில், நாம் மாக்ரோ பேச்சு உரையாடல் அமைப்பு ஆராய்ச்சியின் இரண்டு பணிகளை கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம், அமைப்பு அடைய தொடர்புடைய பணிகளுக்கிடையில் பிழை அனுப்புதலை குறைக்க, நாம் இவ்விரண்டு பணிகளின் இணைய மாதிரி எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறோம், மேலும் ஒரு முழு கோடு நிரல் நி', 'ur': 'بحث پارسینگ ایک مشکل کام ہے اور بحث تحلیل میں ایک ضروری رول لگا رہا ہے. This paper focuses on the macro level discourse structure analysis, which is less studied in the previous research. ہم ایک مکرو صحبت کی ساختار نمایش اسکیم کو اچھی طرح دیکھتے ہیں کہ مکرو سطح صحبت کی ساختار کرے اور ایک متفاوت کرپوس کی پیشنهاد کریں جس کا نام مکرو چینی ڈسکورس تری بانک ہے. ان بنیادیوں پر ہم مکرو گفتگو کی ساختہ تحلیل کے دو کاموں پر متمرکز ہوتے ہیں، ساختہ شناسایی اور نوکلیریت شناسایی کے شامل ہوتے ہیں. اس لئے کہ مشترک کاموں کے درمیان خطا کا انتقال کم کر دیں، ہم دونوں کاموں کے ایک مشترک موڈل قبول کرتے ہیں، اور ایک عملہ لینار پروگرامینگ طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے کہ مختلف طریقوں کے مطابق global optimization کو پہنچ سکیں.', 'uz': "Name This paper focus on the macro level discourse structure analysis, which has been less studied in the previous researches.  Biz macro xizmatning taqdimotini taqdimot qilamiz, makro darajada talab qilish tuzuvchisini taqdim qilamiz, va Macro Xitoycha Discourse Treebank nomli qisqarli kompyuterni tahlil qilamiz. Bu asosida, biz makro talab qilish tuzuvlarining ikkita vazifalarini o'zgartiraymiz, murakkablik identification va nuqta aniqlash imkoniyatini bajaramiz. Ulangan vazifalar orasidan xato tarkibini kamaytirish uchun biz ikkita vazifalar bilan birlashtirish modelini ishlatamiz va bir nechta qanday qanday qanday kerakli bo'lgan shaxsiy chiziqni qoʻllash talab qilinadi.", 'vi': 'Khám phá là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn và đóng một vai trò quan trọng trong phân tích thuyết trình. Tờ giấy này tập trung vào phân tích cấu trúc ngôn ngữ đa dạng vĩ đại, đã ít được nghiên cứu trong các nghiên cứu trước đây. Chúng tôi khám phá một âm mưu trình bày cấu trúc cấu trúc vĩ đại để trình bày cấu trúc ngôn ngữ vĩ đại, và đề xuất một tập thể tương ứng, tên là Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Dựa trên cơ sở này, chúng tôi tập trung vào hai nhiệm vụ phân tích cấu trúc vĩ đại, bao gồm nhận dạng cấu trúc và nhận dạng nhân quả. Để giảm khả năng truyền lỗi giữa các nhiệm vụ liên quan, chúng tôi chọn một mô hình chung của hai nhiệm vụ, và một phương pháp cài đặt chương trình dây khắp nơi nhằm đạt được hiệu quả tối đa với các loại giới hạn khác nhau.', 'da': 'Diskursanalyse er en udfordrende opgave og spiller en kritisk rolle i diskursanalyse. Denne artikel fokuserer på analyse af diskursstrukturen på makroniveau, som er blevet mindre undersøgt i de tidligere undersøgelser. Vi undersøger et makro diskursstruktur præsentationsskema for at præsentere diskursstrukturen på makro niveau, og foreslår et tilsvarende korpus, kaldet Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. På disse grundlag koncentrerer vi os om to opgaver med makro diskursstruktur analyse, herunder strukturidentifikation og nuklearitetsanerkendelse. For at reducere fejloverførslen mellem de tilknyttede opgaver anvender vi en fælles model af de to opgaver, og en heltalslineær programmeringsmetode foreslås for at opnå global optimering med forskellige former for begrænsninger.', 'nl': 'Discurse parsing is een uitdagende taak en speelt een cruciale rol in discoursanalyse. Dit artikel richt zich op de macro-niveau discoursstructuuranalyse, die in eerdere onderzoeken minder is bestudeerd. We onderzoeken een macro discoursstructuur presentatieschema om de macro discoursstructuur te presenteren, en stellen een corresponderend corpus voor, genaamd Macro Chinese discourse Treebank. Op basis hiervan concentreren we ons op twee taken van macro discoursstructuuranalyse, waaronder structuuridentificatie en nucleariteitsherkenning. Om de foutoverdracht tussen de bijbehorende taken te verminderen, hanteren we een gezamenlijk model van de twee taken, en een Integer Linear Programming aanpak wordt voorgesteld om wereldwijde optimalisatie met verschillende soorten beperkingen te bereiken.', 'hr': 'Analiza diskusija je izazovni zadatak i igra kritičnu ulogu u analizi diskusija. Ovaj papir se fokusira na analizu strukture diskursa na nivou makro, koja je manje proučena u prethodnim istraživanjima. Istražujemo schemu prezentacije strukture diskursa makro kako bi predstavili strukturu diskursa na nivou makro i predložili odgovarajući korpus po imenu Makro Kineske diskurse Treebank. Na ovim bazama, koncentriramo se na dva zadatka analize strukture makroegovora, uključujući identifikaciju strukture i priznanje nuklearnosti. Da bismo smanjili prijenos grešaka između povezanih zadataka, usvojili smo zajednički model dva zadataka, i predlaže se cijeli pristup linijskog programiranja postići globalnu optimizaciju s različitim vrstama ograničenja.', 'id': 'Analisasi diskursus adalah tugas yang menantang dan bermain peran kritis dalam analisis diskursus. Kertas ini fokus pada analisis struktur diskors tingkat makro, yang telah kurang dipelajari dalam penelitian sebelumnya. Kami mengeksplorasi skema presentasi struktur diskors makro untuk memperlihatkan struktur diskors makro tingkat, dan mengusulkan mayat yang cocok, bernama Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Pada dasar ini, kita berkonsentrasi pada dua tugas dari analisis struktur diskors makro, termasuk identifikasi struktur dan pengenalan nuklir. Untuk mengurangi transmisi kesalahan antara tugas terkait, kami mengadopsi model bersama dari dua tugas, dan pendekatan Programmasi Linar Integer diusulkan untuk mencapai optimisasi global dengan berbagai jenis batas.', 'bg': 'Разглеждането на дискурсите е предизвикателна задача и играе критична роля в дискурсния анализ. Настоящата статия се фокусира върху анализ на структурата на дискурса на макро ниво, който е по-малко проучен в предишните изследвания. Изследваме схема за представяне на структурата на дискурса на макро ниво, за да представим структурата на дискурса на макро ниво, и предлагаме съответстващ корпус, наречен Макро китайски дискурс. На тези основания се концентрираме върху две задачи за анализ на структурата на макродискурса, включително идентификация на структурата и разпознаване на ядреността. За да се намали предаването на грешки между свързаните задачи, ние възприемаме съвместен модел на двете задачи, като се предлага подход за цялостно линейно програмиране с цел постигане на глобална оптимизация с различни видове ограничения.', 'de': 'Diskursparsing ist eine herausfordernde Aufgabe und spielt eine entscheidende Rolle in der Diskursanalyse. Dieser Beitrag konzentriert sich auf die makroebene Diskursstrukturanalyse, die in den bisherigen Untersuchungen weniger untersucht wurde. Wir untersuchen ein Makro-Diskursstrukturpräsentationsschema, um die Diskursstruktur auf Makroebene darzustellen, und schlagen ein entsprechendes Korpus vor, genannt Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Auf diesen Grundlagen konzentrieren wir uns auf zwei Aufgaben der Makro-Diskursstrukturanalyse, einschließlich Strukturidentifikation und Nuklearitätserkennung. Um die Fehlerübertragung zwischen den zugehörigen Aufgaben zu reduzieren, verwenden wir ein gemeinsames Modell der beiden Aufgaben, und ein Integer Linear Programming Ansatz wird vorgeschlagen, um globale Optimierung mit verschiedenen Arten von Einschränkungen zu erreichen.', 'fa': 'بررسی صحبت یک کار سخت\u200cکننده است و نقشه\u200cای مهمی در تحلیل صحبت می\u200cکند. این کاغذ روی تحلیل ساختار صحبت صحبت مکرو تمرکز شده است که کمتر در تحقیقات قبلی تحقیق شده است. ما طرح نمایش نمایش ساختار مکرو صحبت را تحقیق می کنیم تا ساختار صحبت مکرو را پیشنهاد کنیم و یک شرکت متعلق به نام مکرو چینی صحبت درخت بانک را پیشنهاد می کنیم. روی این پایگاه، ما روی دو وظیفه از تحلیل ساختار صحبت ماکرو تمرکز می کنیم، شامل شناسایی ساختار و شناسایی نوکری. برای کاهش انتقال خطایی بین وظیفه های ارتباط، ما یک مدل مشترک از دو وظیفه را قبول می کنیم، و یک طریق برنامه ریزی کلی برای رسیدن به optimization global ی با نوع محدودیت مختلف پیشنهاد می شود.', 'sw': 'Uchaguzi wa mazungumzo ni kazi ya changamoto na inacheza nafasi muhimu katika uchambuzi wa mazungumzo. Kanisa hili linalenga kwenye uchambuzi wa muundo wa mazungumzo ya kiwango cha ngazi, ambao haujasomwa kidogo katika utafiti uliopita. Tunapunguza mpango wa muundo wa mazungumzo makubwa wa mazungumzo ili kuweka muundo wa mazungumzo ya kiwango cha juu, na kupendekeza makampuni yanayofanana na jina la Macro China Discourse Treebank. Kwenye msingi huu, tunajikita kwenye kazi mbili za uchambuzi wa miundombinu ya mazungumzo makubwa, ikiwa ni pamoja na utambulisho wa muundo na kutambua usafi wa nuru. Ili kupunguza usafirishaji wa makosa kati ya kazi hizo zinazohusiana, tunachukua muundo wa pamoja wa kazi hizo mbili, na mbinu za programu ya Ujumbe wa Mipango ya Uingereza unapendekezwa kupata matumaini ya kidunia kwa aina mbalimbali za vikwazo.', 'tr': 'Gezginler aylamak kynçylykly zadyr we diskusiýa analyzasynda wajyp roli oýnaýar. Bu kagyz makro derejesinde gürrüň çykyş strukturynyň analyzasyna fokus edýär. Bu ýagdaý öňki araştyrmalarda az öwrenmeli. Biz makro diskurs strukturasyny makro derejesi diskurs bagyny çykarmak üçin bir makro diskurs strukturasyny keşif edip, we Makro Çinçe Diskurse Treebank adynda täsirleýäris Bu tabanlarda, makro diskusiýa yapısı çözümlerinin iki görevi ünsüne dikişiriz, struktur kimligi ve nuklearitet tanımlaması dahil. Aslyk görenler arasyndaky hata göçürmegini azaltmak üçin, ikinji zadyň bir nusgasyny kabul etmek üçin, we bir Gaty Hat Programlama golaýy dürli görnüşdüren çäreler çykarmak üçin dünýä optimizasyny ýetirmek üçin teklip edildi.', 'sq': 'Analizimi i diskursit është një detyrë sfiduese dhe luan një rol kritik në analizën e diskursit. This paper focus on the macro level discourse structure analysis, which has been less studied in the previous researches.  Ne eksplorojmë një skemë prezantimi të strukturës së diskursit makro për të paraqitur strukturën e diskursit të nivelit makro, dhe propozojmë një trup korrispondues, të quajtur Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Në këto baza, ne përqëndrohemi në dy detyra të analizës së strukturës së diskursit makro, duke përfshirë identifikimin e strukturës dhe njohjen e nuklearitetit. In order to reduce the error transmission between the associated tasks, we adopt a joint model of the two tasks, and an Integer Linear Programming approach is proposed to achieve global optimization with various kinds of constraints.', 'am': 'የውይይት ማኅበረሰብ አቃላፊ ስራ ነው፡፡ ይህ የሕትመት ገጽ የቀድሞው ምርጫዎች ውስጥ ትንሽ ያልተማረከ ማካሮ ደረጃዎች የንግግር ሥርዓት አካባቢ አካባቢ ነው፡፡ We explore a macro discourse structure presentation schema to present the macro level discourse structure, and propose a corresponding corpus, named Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank.  በእነዚህ መቀመጫዎች ላይ፣ የመካሪ ንግግር አካባቢ እና የመሠረተ አካውንት እና ነፃነት ማውቀትን እናስማራለን፡፡ በተገኘው ስራዎች መካከል የስህተት ትልቅን ለማጎድል፣ የሁለቱን ስራዎች የተጠቃሚ ሞዴል እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Ondersoek verwerking is 'n pragtige taak en speel 'n kritiese rol in diskursanalisie. Hierdie papier fokus op die makro vlak diskurse struktuur analisie, wat minder in die vorige resekinge gestudier is. Ons ondersoek 'n makro diskurse struktuur voorsiening skema om die makro vlak diskurse struktuur te voorsien en voorstel 'n ooreenstemmende korpus, genaamd Makro Sjinese diskurse Boom bank. Op hierdie basise, ons konsentreer op twee taak van makro diskurse struktureanalisie, insluitend struktureidentifikasie en nukleuriteit herken. In order to reduce the error transmission between the associated tasks, we adopt a joint model of the two tasks, and an Integer Linear Programming approach is proposed to achieve global optimization with various kinds of constraints.", 'hy': 'Խոսքի վերլուծությունը դժվար խնդիր է և կարևոր դեր է խաղում խոսքի վերլուծության մեջ: Այս թղթին կենտրոնանում է մակրո մակարո մակարդակի խոսակցության կառուցվածքի վերլուծության վրա, որը ավելի քիչ ուսումնասիրել է նախորդ հետազոտություններում: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մակրոխոսական կառուցվածքի ներկայացման սխեմա, որպեսզի ներկայացնենք մակրոմային մակարդակի խոսական կառուցվածքը, և առաջարկում ենք համապատասխան մարմին, որը կոչվում է Մաքրոչինական խոսական Այս հիմքերի վրա մենք կենտրոնացնում ենք երկու խնդիրների վրա, որոնք կառուցվածքային խոսակցության կառուցվածքի վերլուծում են, ներառյալ կառուցվածքի հայտնաբերումը և միջուկային ճանաչում In order to reduce the error transmission between the associated tasks, we adopt a joint model of the two tasks, and an Integer Linear Programming approach is proposed to achieve global optimization with various kinds of constraints.', 'ko': '문장 분석은 도전적인 임무로 문장 분석에서 매우 중요한 역할을 한다.본고는 거시적인 차원의 문장 구조 분석에 중심을 두었지만 이전의 연구는 비교적 적었다.우리는 거시적 언어 구조의 표현 모델을 탐색하여 거시적 차원의 언어 구조를 나타내고 해당하는 어료 라이브러리, 즉 거시적 중국어 언어 트리 라이브러리를 제시했다.이를 바탕으로 우리는 거시적 문장 구조 분석의 두 가지 임무를 중점적으로 연구했는데 구조 식별과 핵 식별을 포함한다.관련 임무 간의 오차 전달을 줄이기 위해 우리는 두 임무의 연합 모델을 채택하고 일종의 정수선형 기획 방법을 제시하여 각종 구속 조건에서의 전체적인 최적화를 실현했다.', 'az': 'Diskusiya ayńĪrńĪlmasńĪ √ß…ôtin bir iŇü v…ô diskusiya analizind…ô kritik bir rol oynayńĪr. Bu kańüńĪt, …ôvv…ôlki araŇütńĪrmalarda daha az oxunduńüu makro seviyy…ôtind…ô s√∂hb…ôt quruluŇüu analizi √ľz…ôrind…ô odaqlanńĪr. Makro seviyy…ôti diskursu quruluŇüunu g√∂st…ôrm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn makro diskursu quruluŇüu keŇüif edirik v…ô Macro √áinli Discourse Treebank adlńĪ bir korpusu t…ôklif edirik. Bu √ľss…ôl…ôrd…ô, makro diskursu quruluŇüu analizi il…ô birlikd…ô, struktur kimlińüini v…ô nukleriti tanńĪmasńĪnńĪ dahil olmaqla, iki iŇü…ô m…ôxsus edirik. ńįŇüdirilmiŇü iŇül…ôrin arasńĪnda x…ôta transmisiyasńĪnńĪ azaltmaq √ľ√ß√ľn, iki iŇül…ôrin birlikd…ô modeli q…ôbul edirik, v…ô m√ľxt…ôlif c√ľr m√ľdd…ôtl…ôrl…ô k√ľresel optimizasiya yetirm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn bir Integer Linear Programming approach t…ôklif edildi.', 'bs': 'Analiza diskusija je izazovni zadatak i igra kritičnu ulogu u analizi diskusija. Ovaj papir se fokusira na analizu strukture diskursa na nivou makro, koja je manje proučena u prethodnim istraživanjima. Istražujemo schemu prezentacije strukture diskursa makro kako bi predstavili strukturu diskursa na nivou makro i predložili odgovarajući korpus po imenu Makro Kineske diskurse Treebank. Na ovim bazama, koncentrišemo se na dva zadatka analize strukture makroegovora, uključujući identifikaciju strukture i priznanje nuklearnosti. Da bismo smanjili prijenos grešaka između povezanih zadataka, usvojili smo zajednički model dva zadataka, i predložen je pristup integer Linear Programming da postigne globalnu optimizaciju sa različitim vrstama ograničenja.', 'ca': "L'analització del discurs és una tasca difícil i té un paper crític en l'anàlisi del discurs. Aquest paper es centra en l'anàlisi de l'estructura de discurs a macronivell, que s'ha estudiat menys en les recerca anteriors. Explorem un esquema de presentació de l'estructura de macrodiscurs per presentar l'estructura de discurs de macronivell i proposem un cos correspondent, anomenat Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. En aquestes bases, ens concentrem en dues tasques de l'anàlisi de l'estructura del macrodiscurs, incloent l'identificació de l'estructura i el reconeixement de la nuclearitat. In order to reduce the error transmission between the associated tasks, we adopt a joint model of the two tasks, and an Integer Linear Programming approach is proposed to achieve global optimization with various kinds of constraints.", 'bn': 'ডিসোর্স পার্সিং একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ কাজ এবং কথোপকথন বিশ্লেষণে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা পালন করে। এই কাগজটি পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণায় ম্যাক্রো স্তরের কথোপকথন কাঠামো বিশ্লেষণের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। আমরা ম্যাক্রো স্তরের কথোপকথন কাঠামো স্কীমা খুঁজে বের করি ম্যাক্রো স্তরের কথোপকথন কাঠামো উপস্থাপন করার জন্য এবং ম্যাক্রো চীনা ডিসোর্স ট এই ভিত্তিতে আমরা ম্যাক্রো কথোপকথন কাঠামো বিশ্লেষণের দুটি কাজের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি, যার মধ্যে কাঠামো পরিচয় এবং পারমাণবিক স সম্পর্কিত কাজের মধ্যে যে সমস্যা প্রাপ্তি কমিয়ে দেয়ার জন্য আমরা এই দুটি কাজের একটি যৌথ মডেল গ্রহণ করি, এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের নিয়মের সাথে বিশ্বব্যাপী ক্ষেত্রে ব', 'cs': 'Diskursní analýza je náročný úkol a hraje klíčovou roli v diskurzní analýze. Tento článek se zaměřuje na analýzu struktury diskurzu na makroerové úrovni, která byla v předchozích výzkumech méně studována. Prozkoumáme schéma prezentace struktury makro diskursu pro prezentaci struktury diskursu na makro úrovni a navrhujeme odpovídající korpus s názvem Makro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Na těchto základech se zaměřujeme na dva úkoly analýzy struktury makro diskursu, včetně identifikace struktury a rozpoznávání nuklearity. Abychom snížili přenos chyb mezi přidruženými úkoly, přijali jsme společný model obou úkolů a navrhli jsme přístup celého lineárního programování pro dosažení globální optimalizace s různými druhy omezení.', 'et': 'Diskursuse parsimine on keeruline ülesanne ja mängib diskursuse analüüsis kriitilist rolli. Käesolev töö keskendub makrotasandi diskursuse struktuuri analüüsile, mida on varasemates uuringutes vähem uuritud. Uurime makrodiskursuse struktuuri esitlusskeemi makrotasandi diskursuse struktuuri esitamiseks ja pakume välja vastava korpuse nimega Macro Chinese Diskurse Treebank. Nendel alustel keskendume makrodiskursuse struktuuri analüüsi kahele ülesandele, sealhulgas struktuuri tuvastamisele ja tuumaarsuse tuvastamisele. Selleks et vähendada veaülekannet seotud ülesannete vahel, võtame kasutusele kahe ülesande ühise mudeli ning pakume välja tervikliku lineaarse programmeerimise lähenemisviisi, et saavutada globaalne optimeerimine erinevate piirangutega.', 'fi': 'Diskurssin jäsentäminen on haastava tehtävä ja sillä on keskeinen rooli diskurssianalyysissä. Tässä työssä keskitytään makrotason diskurssirakenteen analyysiin, jota on tutkittu vähemmän aikaisemmissa tutkimuksissa. Tutkimme makrodiskurssirakenteen esitysmallia makrotason diskurssirakenteen esittämiseksi ja ehdotamme vastaavaa korpusta nimeltä Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank. Näistä lähtökohdista keskitymme kahteen makrodiskurssirakenteen analyysin tehtävään, mukaan lukien rakenteen tunnistaminen ja ytimekkyyden tunnistaminen. Tehtävien välisen virhesiirron vähentämiseksi otamme käyttöön yhteisen mallin kahdesta tehtävästä ja ehdotetaan kokonaislineaarisen ohjelmoinnin lähestymistapaa globaalin optimoinnin saavuttamiseksi erilaisilla rajoituksilla.', 'ha': "Salon sharuɗe ta zama wani aikin mai tsõratar da kuma yana play wani roli mai muhimu a cikin Analyza. Wannan takardar da ke fokus a kan Analytan mazaɓa na mazro-daraja, wanda ba a ƙara karanta shi ba a farkon fitina. Tuna karatun wata macro-mazaɓa na mazaɓa wa muhalli zuwa a halatar da ma'abũcin mazaɓa daraja, kuma tuna buƙata wata makampuni mai daidai da sunan Macro China Discourse Treebank. On these bases, we concentrate on two tasks of macro discourse structure analysis, including structure identification and nuclearity recognition.  To, dõmin ya ƙara aikin ɓata tsakanin aikin da aka yi haɗa, za mu ɗauki wata misãlai na haɗi wa aikin biyu, kuma ana buƙata wata shirin Shirin Programme na Inter Linje dõmin ya isa mafiya tsari ga duniya da wasu nau'i-nau'i.", 'he': 'בדיקת דיסקורס היא משימה מאתגרת ומשחקת תפקיד קריטי בניתוח דיסקורס. העבודה הזו מתמקדת בניתוח המבנה של דיבורים ברמה מקרו, שנלמד פחות במחקרים הקודמים. We explore a macro discourse structure presentation schema to present the macro level discourse structure, and propose a corresponding corpus, named Macro Chinese Discourse Treebank.  על הבסיסים האלה, אנחנו מתרכזים בשני משימות של ניתוח מבנה מקרו-דיסקרס, כולל זיהוי מבנה וזהוי גרעיני. כדי להפחית את שידור השגיאות בין המשימות הקשורות, אנו מאמצים מודל משותף של שתי המשימות, והגישה לתכנית לינרית שלמה מוצעת כדי להשיג אופטימיזציה גלובלית עם סוגים שונים של מחסומים.', 'jv': 'Lakok nggawe tarjamahan punika nggawe buat kan karo kelas barang nggawe Pesene iki dipontrol banjur ing dadi macro kuwi banjur-banjuré, sing wis nambah piye cara-lanjuré nang mulasakno sing sabanjuré. Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem macro pakan kanggo nggawe sistem dadi macro kebebasan nambah, lan jewise nggawe barang dumadhakan cara-cara sing nganggo nêmên, ndhek sembarang macro Chinese Diskuris Nang basa iki, kita kang dipun nggambar obah-obahan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan macro bukalakno Warsa bisa ngucap kanggo ngerasakno nunggo kesempakan gar nggawe operasi sing dibutuhke', 'sk': 'Razčlenitev diskurza je zahtevna naloga in ima ključno vlogo pri analizi diskurza. Prispevek se osredotoča na analizo strukture diskurza na makro ravni, ki je bila manj raziskana v prejšnjih raziskavah. Raziščemo shemo predstavitve makro diskurzne strukture za predstavitev makro ravni diskurzne strukture in predlagamo ustrezen korpus z imenom Macro kitajska diskurzna Treebanka. Na teh osnovah se osredotočamo na dve nalogi analize strukture makrodiskurza, vključno z identifikacijo strukture in prepoznavanjem nuklearnosti. Da bi zmanjšali prenos napak med povezanimi nalogami, sprejmemo skupni model obeh nalog in predlagamo pristop celotnega linearnega programiranja za doseganje globalne optimizacije z različnimi vrstami omejitev.', 'bo': 'Discourse parsing is a challenging task and plays a critical role in discourse analysis. This paper focuses on the macro level discourse structure analysis, which has been less studied in the previous research. ང་ཚོས་རྩ་བརྗོད་གཞི་གསལ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཆར་བཤེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྔོན་འཚོལ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན On these bases, we concentrate on two tasks of macro discourse structure analysis, including structure identification and nuclearity recognition. འུ་ཅག་གིས་འབྲེལ་བའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དམའ་རུ་གཏོང་དགོས་པ་ལས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཆ་མཐུན་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition using Neural Tensor Network with Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning', 'ar': 'التعرف على العلاقة الضمنية للخطاب باستخدام شبكة الموتر العصبي مع الانتباه التفاعلي والتعلم المتفرق', 'es': 'Reconocimiento implícito de relaciones discursivas mediante la red de tensores neuronales con atención interactiva y aprendizaje disperso', 'pt': 'Reconhecimento de Relação Discurso Implícita usando Rede Tensor Neural com Atenção Interativa e Aprendizagem Esparsa', 'fr': "Reconnaissance implicite des relations de discours à l'aide d'un réseau de tenseurs neuronaux avec attention interactive et apprentissage clairsemé", 'ja': 'インタラクティブな注意とまばらな学習を伴うニューラルテンソルネットワークを使用した暗黙の話題関係認識', 'zh': '盖交互式意疏学之神经张量网络隐式语也', 'ru': 'Неявное распознавание отношения к дискурсу с использованием нейронной тензорной сети с интерактивным вниманием и разрозненным обучением', 'hi': 'अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध पहचान इंटरैक्टिव ध्यान और विरल सीखने के साथ तंत्रिका टेंसर नेटवर्क का उपयोग कर', 'ga': 'Aitheantas um Chaidreamh Intuigthe le Dioscúrsa ag baint úsáide as Líonra Néar-Cheannasóra le Aird Idirghníomhach agus Gannfhoghlaim', 'ka': 'ინტერქექტიური დაახლოებით და გასწავლების გამოყენებით ინტერქექტიური ტენსორის ქსელი', 'el': 'Εννοούμενη αναγνώριση σχέσης συζήτησης χρησιμοποιώντας το Νευρικό Δίκτυο Τενσορών με Διαδραστική Προσοχή και Σπάνια Μάθηση', 'lt': 'Netiesioginis santykių diskurso pripažinimas naudojant nervinių įtaisų tinklą su interaktyviu dėmesiu ir nedideliu mokymusi', 'kk': 'Нейрондық тенсор желісін интерактивті қатынау және бос оқыту арқылы белгілер қатынасын анықтау', 'hu': 'Implicit Discourse Relation Felismerés Neural Tensor Network segítségével interaktív figyelemmel és ritka tanulással', 'mk': 'Имплицитно препознавање на односите со дискурсот користејќи неврална тензорска мрежа со интерактивно внимание и мало учење', 'it': 'Riconoscimento implicito della relazione di discorso utilizzando la rete del tensore neurale con attenzione interattiva e apprendimento sparso', 'ms': 'Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition using Neural Tensor Network with Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning', 'mn': 'Неврал тенсор сүлжээ болон Interactive Attention, Sparse Learning ашиглан эффективный ярианы харилцааны танилцлага', 'no': 'Implicit diskursrelasjonsgjenkjenning ved bruk av nøyraltensor- nettverk med interaktiv merking og læring', 'ml': 'Name', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie relacji dyskursowych przy użyciu sieci napięcia nerwowego z interaktywną uwagą i rzadkim uczeniem się', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea implicită a relațiilor de discurs folosind Rețeaua Tensor Neural cu atenție interactivă și învățare rară', 'mt': 'Ir-Rikonoxximent Impliċitu tar-Relazzjoni tad-Diskors bl-użu tan-Netwerk tat-Tensor Newrali b’Attenzjoni Interattiva u Tagħlim Mhux Attiv', 'sr': 'Implicitno prepoznavanje veza sa diskusijama koristeći neuronsku tenzorsku mrežu sa interaktivnom pažnjom i učenjem prostora', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ අවධානය සහ ස්පාර්ස් ඉගැනීම් සඳහා න්\u200dයූරල් ටෙන්සර් ජාලය භාවිත කරනවා සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ', 'so': 'Implicit Discourse Relations Recognition using Neural Tensor Network with Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning', 'sv': 'Implicit diskursrelations igenkänning med neural tensor nätverk med interaktiv uppmärksamhet och sparsamt lärande', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'نیورال ٹنسور نیٹورک کے مطابق مشکلات رابطہ معلوم کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thừa nhận liên quan đến giai đoạn ngầm sử dụng mạng khí cầu thần kinh cùng sự chú ý và giáo dục ngắn', 'bg': 'Признаване на имплицитна дискурсна връзка с използване на неврална тензорна мрежа с интерактивно внимание и оскъдно учене', 'nl': 'Implicite Discurse Relatie Erkenning met behulp van Neural Tensor Netwerk met Interactieve Aandacht en Sparse Leren', 'hr': 'Implicitno prepoznavanje odnosa s primjenom neuronske tenzorske mreže s interaktivnom pažnjom i učenjem prostora', 'da': 'Implicit diskursrelationsgenkendelse ved hjælp af neural tensor netværk med interaktiv opmærksomhed og sparsom læring', 'de': 'Implizite Diskursbeziehungserkennung mit neuronalem Tensor-Netzwerk mit interaktiver Aufmerksamkeit und sparsamem Lernen', 'id': 'Pengenalan hubungan Discourse Implicit menggunakan Jaringan Tensor Neural dengan Perhatian Interaktif dan Belajar Sedikit', 'ko': '상호작용 주의와 희소 학습을 바탕으로 하는 신경 장량 네트워크 내 은어편 관계 식별', 'sw': 'Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition using Neural Tensor Network with Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning', 'fa': 'با استفاده از شبکه تنسور عصبی با توجه Interactive و یادگیری جستجو\u200c', 'tr': 'Neural Tensor Network bilen Interaktiv Attention we Gaýd Etmek Öwrenmek bilen Implicit Gezgi Derjesi tanyş', 'af': 'Implicite diskursie relasie herkenning gebruik Neurale Tensor Netwerk met Interaktiewe Aangaande en Sparse Leer', 'sq': 'Njohja e lidhjes me diskutimin implicit duke përdorur rrjetin nervor me vëmendje interaktive dhe mësim të shpejtë', 'am': 'Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning', 'hy': 'Նյարդային տենսորային ցանց օգտագործելով ինտերակտիվ ուշադրություն և փոքր սովորում', 'az': 'Nöral Tensor Ağı ilə Interaktiv Attention və Sparse Learning istifadə edir', 'bn': 'নিউরাল টেনসার নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে বিচারের সংশ্লিষ্ট স্বীকৃতি স্বীকার করুন', 'bs': 'Implicitno prepoznavanje odnosa s primjenom neuronske tenzorske mreže s interaktivnom pažnjom i učenjem prostora', 'ca': 'Recognició implícita de la relació de discurs utilitzant la xarxa de tensors neuronals amb atenció interactiva i aprenentatge ràpid', 'cs': 'Implicitní rozpoznávání diskurzních vztahů pomocí neuronové tenzorové sítě s interaktivní pozorností a řídkým učením', 'et': 'Kaudne diskursussuhte äratundmine neurotensorvõrgu abil interaktiivse tähelepanu ja vähese õppega', 'fi': 'Implisiittinen diskurssisuhteen tunnistaminen hermojänniteverkoston avulla interaktiivisella huomiolla ja niukalla oppimisella', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'זיהוי מערכת יחסים משמעותית באמצעות רשת טנסורים נוירוניים עם תשומת לב אינטראקטיבית וללמוד נמוך', 'sk': 'Implicitno prepoznavanje diskurznih odnosov z uporabo mreže živčnih napetosti z interaktivno pozornostjo in redkim učenjem', 'jv': 'Sumangga Diskuturan Rasane Rusahan', 'bo': 'Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition using Neural Tensor Network with Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning'}
{'en': 'Implicit discourse relation recognition aims to understand and annotate the latent relations between two discourse arguments, such as temporal, comparison, etc. Most previous methods encode two discourse arguments separately, the ones considering pair specific clues ignore the bidirectional interactions between two arguments and the sparsity of pair patterns. In this paper, we propose a novel neural Tensor network framework with Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) for implicit discourse relation recognition. (1) We mine the most correlated word pairs from two discourse arguments to model pair specific clues, and integrate them as interactive attention into argument representations produced by the bidirectional long short-term memory network. Meanwhile, (2) the neural tensor network with sparse constraint is proposed to explore the deeper and the more important pair patterns so as to fully recognize discourse relations. The experimental results on PDTB show that our proposed TIASL framework is effective.', 'ar': 'يهدف التعرف على علاقة الخطاب الضمني إلى فهم العلاقات الكامنة بين حجتين في الخطاب والتعليق عليها ، مثل الحجج الزمنية والمقارنة وما إلى ذلك. تشفر معظم الأساليب السابقة حجتين للخطاب بشكل منفصل ، وتتجاهل تلك التي تفكر في أدلة زوجية محددة التفاعلات ثنائية الاتجاه بين حجتين والتشتت. من أنماط الزوج. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إطارًا جديدًا لشبكة Tensor العصبية مع الاهتمام التفاعلي والتعلم المتقطع (TIASL) للتعرف الضمني على علاقة الخطاب. (1) نقوم باستخراج أزواج الكلمات الأكثر ارتباطًا من حجتين للخطاب لنمذجة أدلة محددة للأزواج ، ودمجها كاهتمام تفاعلي في تمثيلات الحجة التي تنتجها شبكة الذاكرة قصيرة المدى ثنائية الاتجاه. وفي الوقت نفسه ، (2) يُقترح شبكة الموتر العصبي ذات القيود المتفرقة لاستكشاف أنماط الزوج الأعمق والأكثر أهمية من أجل التعرف بشكل كامل على علاقات الخطاب. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على PDTB أن إطار عمل TIASL المقترح لدينا فعال.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance implicite des relations de discours vise à comprendre et à annoter les relations latentes entre deux arguments de discours, tels que le temps, la comparaison, etc. La plupart des méthodes précédentes codent deux arguments de discours séparément, celles qui prennent en compte les indices spécifiques à une paire ignorent les interactions bidirectionnelles entre deux arguments et la rareté des modèles de paires. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau cadre de réseau de tenseurs neuronaux avec Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) pour la reconnaissance implicite des relations de discours. (1) Nous explorons les paires de mots les plus corrélées à partir de deux arguments de discours pour modéliser des indices spécifiques à des paires, et les intégrons en tant qu'attention interactive en représentations d'arguments produites par le réseau bidirectionnel de mémoire à court terme longue durée. Pendant ce temps, (2) le réseau de tenseurs neuronaux à faible contrainte est proposé pour explorer les modèles de paires les plus profonds et les plus importants afin de reconnaître pleinement les relations de discours. Les résultats expérimentaux sur le PDTB montrent que notre cadre TIASL proposé est efficace.", 'es': 'El reconocimiento implícito de la relación discursiva tiene como objetivo comprender y anotar las relaciones latentes entre dos argumentos discursivos, como temporal, comparativo, etc. La mayoría de los métodos anteriores codifican dos argumentos del discurso por separado, los que consideran las pistas específicas de la pareja ignoran las interacciones bidireccionales entre dos argumentos y la escasez de patrones de pareja. En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo marco de red de tensores neuronales con atención interactiva y aprendizaje disperso (TIASL) para el reconocimiento implícito de la relación discursiva. (1) Extraemos los pares de palabras más correlacionados de dos argumentos del discurso para modelar pistas específicas de pares, y los integramos como atención interactiva en representaciones argumentativas producidas por la red de memoria bidireccional a corto plazo. Mientras tanto, (2) se propone la red de tensores neuronales con escasa restricción para explorar los patrones de pares más profundos e importantes para reconocer plenamente las relaciones discursivas. Los resultados experimentales sobre la PDTB muestran que nuestro marco TIASL propuesto es efectivo.', 'pt': 'O reconhecimento de relações discursivas implícitas visa entender e anotar as relações latentes entre dois argumentos discursivos, como temporal, comparação, etc. A maioria dos métodos anteriores codifica dois argumentos discursivos separadamente, os que consideram pistas específicas de pares ignoram as interações bidirecionais entre dois argumentos e a esparsidade de padrões de pares. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova estrutura de rede Tensor neural com Atenção Interativa e Aprendizagem Esparsa (TIASL) para reconhecimento de relações discursivas implícitas. (1) Extraímos os pares de palavras mais correlacionados de dois argumentos de discurso para modelar pistas específicas de pares e os integramos como atenção interativa em representações de argumentos produzidas pela rede bidirecional de memória de longo prazo. Enquanto isso, (2) a rede tensorial neural com restrição esparsa é proposta para explorar os padrões de pares mais profundos e mais importantes para reconhecer completamente as relações de discurso. Os resultados experimentais em PDTB mostram que nossa estrutura TIASL proposta é eficaz.', 'ja': '暗黙の論証関係認識は、時間的、比較などの2つの論証の間の潜在的な関係を理解し、注釈することを目的としている。 ほとんどの以前の方法は、2つの議論の引数を別々に符号化し、ペア固有の手がかりを考慮する方法は、2つの引数間の双方向の相互作用とペアパターンの希薄さを無視する。 本稿では，暗黙の対話関係認識のための対話的注意とスパースラーニング（ TIASL ）を備えた新規のニューラルテンソルネットワークフレームワークを提案する． （ 1 ） 2つの対話引数から最も相関のある単語ペアをマイニングして特定の手がかりをモデル化し，双方向の長い短期記憶ネットワークによって生成される引数表現に対話的注意として統合する． 一方、(2)疎な制約を持つニューラルテンソルネットワークは、言説の関係を完全に認識するために、より深く、より重要なペアパターンを探索するために提案されている。 PDTBの実験結果は、提案されたTIASLフレームワークが効果的であることを示しています。', 'zh': '隐式语相知,注两语论证之间,如时日相等。 前多分别两语参数编码,思特定线忽两参数之间双向相用配对式之疏。 本文有交互式,疏学(TIASL)神经张量网络框架,以隐式言语相别。 (1)从两语论证挖掘出最相关词对,建模于特定线,以为交意整合至双向长短期记网络所生证表征中。 又(2)有疏神经张量网络,以探深层次重,以尽言语。 PDTB之实验结果表明,所陈TIASL框架有效。', 'hi': 'अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध मान्यता का उद्देश्य दो प्रवचन तर्कों के बीच अव्यक्त संबंधों को समझना और एनोटेट करना है, जैसे कि अस्थायी, तुलना, आदि। अधिकांश पिछले तरीके दो प्रवचन तर्कों को अलग-अलग एन्कोड करते हैं, जो जोड़ी विशिष्ट सुरागों पर विचार करते हैं, वे दो तर्कों और जोड़ी पैटर्न की स्पर्सिटी के बीच द्विदिश इंटरैक्शन को अनदेखा करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध मान्यता के लिए इंटरैक्टिव अटेंशन एंड स्पार्स लर्निंग (TIASL) के साथ एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका टेंसर नेटवर्क फ्रेमवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। (1) हम दो प्रवचन तर्कों से मॉडल जोड़ी विशिष्ट सुराग के लिए सबसे अधिक सहसंबद्ध शब्द जोड़े का खनन करते हैं, और उन्हें द्विदिश दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक स्मृति नेटवर्क द्वारा उत्पादित तर्क प्रतिनिधित्व में इंटरैक्टिव ध्यान के रूप में एकीकृत करते हैं। इस बीच, (2) विरल बाधा के साथ तंत्रिका टेंसर नेटवर्क को गहरी और अधिक महत्वपूर्ण जोड़ी पैटर्न का पता लगाने के लिए प्रस्तावित किया गया है ताकि प्रवचन संबंधों को पूरी तरह से पहचाना जा सके। पीडीटीबी पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा प्रस्तावित टीआईएएसएल ढांचा प्रभावी है।', 'ru': 'Неявное распознавание отношений дискурса направлено на понимание и аннотирование скрытых отношений между двумя аргументами дискурса, такими как временные, сравнительные и т. д. Большинство предыдущих методов кодируют два аргумента дискурса отдельно, те, которые рассматривают специфические для пары подсказки, игнорируют двунаправленные взаимодействия между двумя аргументами и редкость пары паттернов. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую структуру нейронной тензорной сети с интерактивным вниманием и разрозненным обучением (TIASL) для неявного распознавания отношений дискурса. (1) Мы добываем наиболее коррелирующие пары слов из двух аргументов дискурса для моделирования специфических подсказок пар и интегрируем их как интерактивное внимание в представления аргументов, создаваемые двунаправленной сетью кратковременной памяти. Между тем, (2) нейронная тензорная сеть с редким ограничением предлагается исследовать более глубокие и более важные пары паттернов, чтобы полностью распознать отношения дискурса. Экспериментальные результаты по PDTB показывают, что предлагаемая нами структура ТИАСЛ эффективна.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag aithint caidrimh dioscúrsa intuigthe an caidreamh folaigh idir dhá argóint dioscúrsa a thuiscint agus a anótáil, mar shampla ama, comparáide, etc. Ionchódaíonn an chuid is mó de na modhanna roimhe seo dhá argóint dioscúrsa ar leithligh, déanann na cinn atá ag smaoineamh ar leideanna sonracha péire neamhaird a dhéanamh ar na hidirghníomhaíochtaí déthreocha idir dhá argóint agus an ghanntanas. de phatrúin péire. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid creat líonra nua néaránach Tensor le Aird Idirghníomhach agus Foghlaim Theanga (TIASL) le haghaidh aitheantais intuigthe caidreamh dioscúrsa. (1) Déanaimid na péirí focal is comhghaolmhara a bhaint as dhá argóint dioscúrsa go leideanna sonracha péire eiseamláireach, agus déanaimid iad a chomhtháthú mar aird idirghníomhach i léiriúcháin argóinte a tháirgeann an líonra cuimhne gearrthéarmach déthreorach fadtéarmach. Idir an dá linn, (2) tá sé beartaithe an líonra néarach tensor le srian tanaí chun iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar na patrúin péire níos doimhne agus níos tábhachtaí chun caidreamh dioscúrsa a aithint go hiomlán. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha ar PDTB go bhfuil an creat TIASL atá beartaithe againn éifeachtach.', 'el': 'Η σιωπηρή αναγνώριση σχέσεων λόγου στοχεύει στην κατανόηση και σχολιασμό των λανθάνοντων σχέσεων μεταξύ δύο επιχειρημάτων λόγου, όπως χρονικά, σύγκριση κλπ. Οι περισσότερες προηγούμενες μέθοδοι κωδικοποιούν δύο επιχειρήματα συζήτησης χωριστά, ενώ αυτές που εξετάζουν συγκεκριμένα στοιχεία ζεύγους αγνοούν τις αμφίδρομες αλληλεπιδράσεις μεταξύ δύο επιχειρημάτων και την έλλειψη προτύπων ζεύγους. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο νευρωνικού δικτύου Tensor με διαδραστική προσοχή και αραιή μάθηση (TIASL) για την έμμεση αναγνώριση σχέσεων λόγου. (1) Εκμεταλλεύουμε τα πιο συσχετιζόμενα ζεύγη λέξεων από δύο επιχειρήματα λόγου για να μοντελοποιήσουμε συγκεκριμένα στοιχεία ζεύγους, και τα ενσωματώνουμε ως διαδραστική προσοχή σε αναπαραστάσεις επιχειρημάτων που παράγονται από το αμφίδρομο δίκτυο μακροχρόνιας βραχυπρόθεσμης μνήμης. Εν τω μεταξύ, (2) το νευρικό δίκτυο τενσορών με αραιό περιορισμό προτείνεται να διερευνήσει τα βαθύτερα και πιο σημαντικά μοτίβα ζευγαριών ώστε να αναγνωριστούν πλήρως οι σχέσεις συζήτησης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα της PDTB δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο TIASL είναι αποτελεσματικό.', 'it': 'Il riconoscimento implicito delle relazioni di discorso mira a comprendere e annotare le relazioni latenti tra due argomenti di discorso, come temporale, confronto, ecc. La maggior parte dei metodi precedenti codifica due argomenti di discorso separatamente, quelli che considerano indizi specifici di coppia ignorano le interazioni bidirezionali tra due argomenti e la scarsità dei modelli di coppia. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo framework di rete neurale Tensor con Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) per il riconoscimento implicito delle relazioni di discorso. (1) Estraiamo le coppie di parole più correlate da due argomenti di discorso per modellare coppie di indizi specifici, e li integriamo come attenzione interattiva nelle rappresentazioni di argomenti prodotte dalla rete bidirezionale di memoria a breve termine. Nel frattempo, (2) la rete di tensori neurali con scarso vincolo è proposta per esplorare i modelli di coppia più profondi e più importanti in modo da riconoscere pienamente le relazioni di discorso. I risultati sperimentali su PDTB mostrano che il framework TIASL proposto è efficace.', 'lt': 'implicitu diskurso santykių pripažinimu siekiama suprasti ir anotuoti latenčius santykius tarp dviejų diskurso argumentų, pvz., laiko, palyginimo ir t. t. Dauguma ankstesnių metodų koduoja du diskurso argumentus atskirai, tie, kurie svarsto konkrečias poras įrodymus, ignoruoja dvikryptinę dvikryptinę sąveiką tarp dviejų argumentų ir poros modelių nedažnumą. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują nervinių tensorių tinklo sistemą su interaktyviu dėmesiu ir sparčiu mokymusi (TIASL) netiesioginiam diskursinių santykių pripažinimui. (1) Mes išgauname labiausiai koreliuojamas žodžių poras iš dviejų diskursų argument ų į konkrečias poras pavyzdys ir integruojame jas kaip interaktyvų dėmesį į dvikrypčių ilgalaikio atminties tinklo pateiktus argumentus. Tuo tarpu (2) siūloma, kad nervinių tempiklių tinklas su nedideliais apribojimais ištirtų gilesnius ir svarbiausius poros modelius, kad būtų visiškai pripažinti diskursiniai santykiai. Eksperimentiniai PDTB rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūloma TIASL sistema yra veiksminga.', 'ka': 'იმპლექტიური დისკურსების შესახებ განაცნობის მიზეზია, რომ ორი დისკურსების არგუმენტების შესახებ, როგორც ცოტა, შესახებ, ანუ. უმრავლესი მეცემენტები ორი დისკურსების არგუმენტების განსაკუთრებულად კოდირებული არგუმენტები, რომლებიც ორი ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ ახალი ნეიროლური ტენსორის ქსელის ფრამეტრი ინტერქექტური ატრუქცია და განსწავლება (TIASL) ინტერქექტური განსწავლების შესახებ. (1) ჩვენ ჩვენ შევწყებთ ყველაზე კორელექტური სიტყვის კოსპექტური არგუმენტებისგან ორი დისკორექტური არგუმენტებისგან კოსპექტური კოსპექტური კოსპექტური კოსპექტურ Meanwhile, (2) the neural tensor network with sparse constraints is proposed to explore the deeper and the more important pair patterns so that to fully recognize discourse relations. PDTB-ის ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები აჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი თვისებული TIASL ფრამეტრი ეფექტიურია.', 'hu': 'Az implicit diskurzus kapcsolatfelismerés célja, hogy megértse és jegyzetelje a két diskurzus argumentum látens kapcsolatát, mint például időbeli, összehasonlítás stb. A legtöbb korábbi módszer külön kódol két diskurzus argumentumot, a párspecifikus nyomokat figyelembe véve figyelmen kívül hagyja a két argumentum közötti kétirányú kölcsönhatást és a párminták ritkaságát. Jelen tanulmányban egy új neurális Tenzor hálózati keretrendszert javasolunk interaktív figyelem és ritka tanulás (TIASL) az implicit diskurzus kapcsolat felismerésére. (1) A legkorreláltabb szópárokat két diskurzus argumentumból bányászjuk modellpáros specifikus nyomokra, és interaktív figyelemként integráljuk a kétirányú hosszú rövid távú memória hálózat által készített argumentumreprezentációkba. Eközben, (2) a ritka korlátozással rendelkező neurális tenszor hálózatot javasoljuk a mélyebb és fontosabb páros minták feltárására, hogy teljes mértékben felismerjük a diskurzus kapcsolatokat. A PDTB kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy javasolt TIASL keretrendszerünk hatékony.', 'kk': 'Кейбір дискурстың қатынасын анықтау мақсатты екі дискурстың аргументтері арасындағы соңғы қатынасын түсіну және белгілеу үшін, мысалы, уақытша, салыстыру және т. б. алдыңғы әдістер екі дискурстың аргументін бөлек кодтамасыз, екі аргумент мен екі үлгілер арасындағы екі ди Бұл қағазда, біз жаңа невралдық тенсор желісін интерактивті қатынау және меңзелік оқыту (TIASL) деңгейлерді белгілеу үшін жаңа невралдық тенсор желісін қолданамыз. (1) Біз екі дискурс аргументінен ең көмектесілген сөздерді екі аргументінен екі нақты таңбаларды үлгілеу үшін құрамыз және оларды екі қысқа уақыт жады желінің аргументтеріне интерактивті түсіндіру үшін енгізуім Осы уақытта, (2) дискурстар қатынасын толық анықтау үшін түсінікті және маңызды екі үлгілерді зерттеу үшін невралдық тензерсор желінің желіне ұсынылады. PDTB эксперименттік нәтижелері TIASL қоршауымыздың эффективті көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Имплицитното признавање на дискурсните односи има за цел да ги разбере и анотира лантните односи помеѓу двата дискурсни аргументи, како што се временски, споредувачки итн. Повеќето претходни методи кодираат два дискурсни аргументи одделно, оние кои ги разгледуваат специфичните траги ги игнорираат двогордните интеракции поме Во овој весник, предложуваме нова мрежна рамка за нервни тензори со интерактивно внимание и мало учење (TIASL) за имплицитно препознавање на дискурсните односи. (1) Ги искористуваме најкорелираните зборови парови од два дискурсни аргументи до модели на специфични парови траги, и ги интегрираме како интерактивно внимание во претставувања на аргументи произведени од дводрекционалната долгорочна мемориска мрежа. Во меѓувреме, (2) мрежата на нервни тензори со мали ограничувања се предложува да ги истражува подлабоките и најважните парови шеми за целосно да ги препознае дискурсните односи. Експерименталните резултати на ПДТБ покажуваат дека нашата предложена ТИАСЛ рамка е ефикасна.', 'ml': 'രണ്ടു സംസാര വാക്കുകളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള അവസാനത്തെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുകയും പ്രശ്നമാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുവാനുള്ള ശ്രമിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉദ്ദേശം മുമ്പുള്ള രീതികളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും പ്രത്യേക വാക്കുകള്\u200d വ്യത് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ന്യൂറല്\u200d ടെന്\u200dസോര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d ശെരുവിന്\u200dറെ ഫ്രെയിക്കേറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഇന്റര്\u200dവെക്റ്റീവ് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നതും സ (1) രണ്ടു സംസാര വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d ജോട്ടുകള്\u200d എന്നാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എന്\u200dറെ കൈയ്യിലാക്കുന്നത്. രണ്ട് പ്രത്യേക ക കൂ അതിനിടയില്\u200d, (2) സ്പാന്\u200dസ് നിര്\u200dബന്ധമുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d ടെന്\u200dസോര്\u200d ശേഖരം ആഴത്തിലും ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോടി രീതികളും പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d പ്ര പിഡിടിബിയിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച ടിയാസില്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് പ്രാ', 'ms': 'Implicit discourse relation recognition aims to understand and annotate the latent relations between two discourse arguments, such as temporal, comparison, etc. Most previous methods encode two discourse arguments separately, the ones considering pair specific clues ignore the bidirectional interactions between two arguments and the sparsity of pair patterns.  Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar kerangka rangkaian Tensor saraf yang baru dengan Perhatian Interaktif dan Belajar Tergesa-gesa (TIASL) untuk pengenalan hubungan diskors secara implicit. (1) Kami lompat pasangan perkataan yang paling berkorrelasi dari dua argumen percakapan ke petunjuk spesifik pasangan model, dan mengintegrasikan mereka sebagai perhatian interaktif ke dalam perwakilan argumen yang dihasilkan oleh rangkaian ingatan jangka pendek bidireksi. Sementara itu, (2) rangkaian tensor saraf dengan keterangan jarang diusulkan untuk mengeksplorasi corak pasangan yang lebih dalam dan lebih penting supaya mengenali hubungan diskors sepenuhnya. Keputusan percubaan pada PDTB menunjukkan bahawa kerangka TIASL yang kami cadangkan adalah berkesan.', 'mn': 'Хоёр ярианы аргументын хоорондын сүүлийн харилцааны харилцааны харилцааны тухай ойлгох, тэмдэглэх зорилго нь хугацааны, харьцуулах, т.д. гэх мэт. Өмнөх аргументын ихэнх нь хоёр ярианы аргументыг тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус тус ту Энэ цаасан дээр бид интерактив анхаарал болон Спарс суралцах (TIASL) холбоотой шинэ мэдрэлийн тенсор сүлжээний хөтөлбөрийг санал болгож байна. (1) Бид хоёр ярианы аргументаас хамгийн холбоотой үг хоёр аргументаас хоёр тодорхой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой ү Тэр үед, (2) хэмжээний хязгаарлагдмал мэдрэлийн tensor сүлжээ илүү гүнзгий, хамгийн чухал хоёр загваруудыг судлах гэж санал болно. PDTB-ын туршилтын үр дүнд бидний TIASL-ын санал дэвшүүлсэн хэмжээсүүд үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea implicită a relațiilor discursului își propune să înțeleagă și să adnoteze relațiile latente dintre două argumente de discurs, cum ar fi temporal, comparație etc. Cele mai multe metode anterioare codifică separat două argumente de discurs, cele care iau în considerare indicii specifice perechilor ignoră interacțiunile bidirecționale dintre două argumente și lipsitatea modelelor de pereche. În această lucrare, propunem un nou cadru de rețea neurală Tensor cu atenție interactivă și învățare spartă (TIASL) pentru recunoașterea implicită a relațiilor de discurs. (1) Extragem cele mai corelate perechi de cuvinte din două argumente de discurs pentru a modela perechi de indicii specifice și le integrăm ca atenție interactivă în reprezentările argumentelor produse de rețeaua bidirecțională de memorie pe termen scurt. Între timp, (2) rețeaua tensorilor neurali cu constrângere rară este propusă pentru a explora modelele de perechi mai profunde și mai importante, astfel încât să recunoască pe deplin relațiile discursului. Rezultatele experimentale pe PDTB arată că cadrul TIASL propus este eficient.', 'mt': 'Ir-rikonoxximent impliċitu tar-relazzjoni ta’ diskors għandu l-għan li jifhem u jinnota r-relazzjonijiet latenti bejn żewġ argumenti ta’ diskors, bħal temporali, paragun, eċċ. Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-metodi preċedenti jikkodifikaw żewġ argumenti ta’ diskors separatament, dawk li jikkunsidraw indikazzjonijiet speċifiċi ta’ par jinjoraw l-interazzjonijiet bidirezzjonali bejn żewġ argumenti u l-iskarsezza ta’ mudelli ta’ par. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu qafas ġdid tan-netwerk tat-tensuri newrali b’Attenzjoni Interattiva u Tagħlim Mhux Attiv (TIASL) għar-rikonoxximent impliċitu tar-relazzjoni diskors. (1) We mine the most correlated word pairs from two discourse arguments to model pair specific clues, and integrate them as interactive attention into argument representations produced by the bidirectional long short-term memory network.  Sadanittant, (2) in-netwerk tat-tensuri newrali b’restrizzjoni żgħira huwa propost biex jesplora l-mudelli aktar profondi u l-aktar importanti ta’ par sabiex jiġu rikonoxxuti bis-sħiħ ir-relazzjonijiet ta’ diskors. Ir-riżultati sperimentali dwar PDTB juru li l-qafas TIASL propost tagħna huwa effettiv.', 'no': 'Implicit diskursrelasjon-gjenkjenning er mål å forstå og annotere dei latere relasjonane mellom to diskursargumenter, slik som temporale, sammenligning osv. Dei fleste førre metodane koder to diskursargumenter separat, dei som ser på par spesifikke kluser ignorerer bidireksjonale interaksjonane mellom to argumenter og sparsiteten av par mønsterer. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt nettverkstrammeverk med Interaktiv Attention og Sparse Learning (TIASL) for implisitt diskursrelasjon om gjenkjenning. (1) Vi mine dei mest korrelaterte ordpar frå to diskursargumenter til modeller par spesifikke klusar, og integrerer dei som interaktive oppmerksomhet til argument-representasjonar produsert av den langsiktige minnettverka for kortmann. Med mellomtida, 2) den neuraltensoren- nettverket med spar begrensning er foreslått å utforske dei dypere og dei viktigere par mønsterene slik at du kan fullstendig gjenkjenne diskursrelasjonane. Eksperimentale resultatene på PDTB viser at vår foreslått TIASL-rammeverket er effektivt.', 'sr': 'Implicitno prepoznavanje veza veza je cilj razumevanja i annotacije poslednjih odnosa između dva argumenta diskursa, kao temporalne, usporedbe, itd. Većina prethodnih metoda kodira dve argumentacije diskursa odvojeno, oni koji razmatraju par specifičnih tragova ignoriraju bidirektivne interakcije između dva argumenta i rezervnosti par obrazaca. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi okvir mreže neuralnog tenzora sa interaktivnom pažnjom i učenjem Sparse (TIASL) za prepoznavanje veze s implicitnim diskusijama. (1) Najkoreliranijim parovima riječi iz dva argumenta o diskursu do modela specifičnih tragova i integriramo ih kao interaktivnu pažnju u predstave argumenta proizvođene od strane dvostrane dugoročne mreže pamćenja. U međuvremenu, (2) je predložena mreža neuronskog tenzora sa rezervnim ograničenjem da istraži dublje i važnije obrasce par, kako bi potpuno prepoznala odnose o diskursima. Eksperimentalni rezultati PDTB pokazuju da je naš predloženi TIASL okvir efikasan.', 'pl': 'Implicite rozpoznawanie relacji dyskursu ma na celu zrozumienie i adnotację utajonych relacji między dwoma argumentami dyskursu, takimi jak czasowe, porównanie itp. Większość poprzednich metod koduje dwa argumenty dyskursu oddzielnie, te uwzględniające konkretne wskazówki pary ignorują dwukierunkowe interakcje między dwoma argumentami i słabość wzorców par. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową strukturę sieci neuronowej Tensorów z Interactive Attention i Sparse Learning (TIASL) do domyślnego rozpoznawania relacji dyskursu. (1) Wydobywamy najbardziej skorelowane pary słów z dwóch argumentów dyskursu do modelowania konkretnych wskazówek pary i integrujemy je jako interaktywną uwagę do reprezentacji argumentów produkowanych przez dwukierunkową sieć pamięci krótkoterminowej. Tymczasem, (2) zaproponowana jest sieć tensorowa neuronowa o rzadkim ograniczeniu, aby zbadać głębsze i ważniejsze wzorce pary, tak aby w pełni rozpoznać relacje dyskursowe. Wyniki eksperymentalne na PDTB pokazują, że proponowane przez nas ramy TIASL są skuteczne.', 'si': 'IMLICT DISCORSE සම්බන්ධතාවක් අඳුරගන්න හා අනතුරගන්න ලෙටින් සම්බන්ධතාවක් අතර දෙන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් අතර, වගේම Tempral, comparison, etc. Most of the preceding ways ncoding both discurre argment Separtely, the one Considering Pai espezie clues neglect the Biirection inter-ction of මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරනවා, සම්බන්ධ අවධානය සහ ස්පාර්ස් ඉගෙනගන්න (TIASL) සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාර කතාව සම් (1) අපි මගේ විශේෂ වචන සම්බන්ධ වචන සම්බන්ධ වචන සම්බන්ධ වචන සම්බන්ධ වචන සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ සම්බන්ධ වලින් ප්\u200d අනුවෙන් වෙලාවෙන්, (2) ප්\u200dරතිශීල සීමාව සමග න්\u200dයූරල් ටෙන්සර් ජාලය ප්\u200dරතිශ්නය කරනවා ගොඩක් ගොඩක් හා වැදගත් ප්\u200dරතිශීල PDTB ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ TIASL ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada xiriirka adag waxaa loola jeedaa in uu fahamo oo uu caddeeyo xiriirka ugu dambeeya labada dood ee hadal, tusaale ahaan waqti, is-dhig, etc. Inta badan qaababka hore waxay ku qoran yihiin laba dood oo hadal si gaar ah, kuwaas oo ka fiirsanaya laba koob oo gaar ah ayaa ka jeeda iskaashatada labada dood dhexdooda iyo dhaqdhaqaaq labo noocyo ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qoraal xeeral neural Tensor framework with Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) for implicit recognition of xiriirka. (1) Waxaan ka dhignaa noocyada ugu wada xidhan hadalka labada dood oo hadal ah si aan u sameyno labada noocyo oo gaar ah, waxaana u kala soojinaynaa si aad u faa’iido badan u leedahay noocyada xaajooyinka oo soo saaray shabakadda xusuusta waqtiga dheer oo gaaban. Inta waqtigaas, (2) shabakadda cudurka ee neurada ah oo qasabka yar leh waxaa lagu talo galay inuu baaraandego labada noocyo oo ugu muhiimsan, si uu u wada aqoonsado xiriirka hadalka. Midhaha jirrabka ee PDTB ku saabsan waxay muujiyaan in laynoogu soo jeeday TIASL ay tayo u tahay.', 'sv': 'Implicit diskursrelationsgenerering syftar till att förstå och kommentera de latenta relationerna mellan två diskursargument, såsom temporal, jämförelse, etc. De flesta tidigare metoderna kodar två diskursargument separat, de som överväger parspecifika ledtrådar ignorerar dubbelriktade interaktioner mellan två argument och sparheten hos parmönster. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt neuralt Tensor nätverksramverk med Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) för implicit diskursrelationsgenerering. (1) Vi utvinner de mest korrelerade ordparen från två diskursargument till modellpar specifika ledtrådar, och integrerar dem som interaktiv uppmärksamhet i argumentrepresentationer som produceras av dubbelriktade korttidsminnen. Samtidigt, (2) det neurala tensornätverket med gles begränsning föreslås att utforska de djupare och viktigare parmönstren för att fullt känna igen diskursrelationer. Experimentresultaten på PDTB visar att vårt föreslagna TIASL-ramverk är effektivt.', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட பேச்சு தொடர்பு குறிப்பிடுதல் இரண்டு பேச்சு வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இடையே சமீபத்தின் தொடர்பை புரிந்து புரிந்து குறிக்கும் மற்றும் அறிவிக்க வேண்டும். முந்தைய முறைமைகளில் இரண இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய புதிய புதிய சென்சார் வலைப்பின்னல் சட்டத்தை முன்நிரூபிக்கிறோம் செயல்பாடு கவனம் மற்றும் ஸ்பார்ஸ (1) நாம் இரண்டு குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்டுகளை மாதிரியும் மிகவும் இண அதிக நேரத்தில், புதிய புதிய பதின்சுறுப்பு வலைப்பின்னல் சுற்றி கட்டுப்பாடுகள் உள்ளது ஆழமாக மற்றும் மிக முக்கியமான ஜோடி முறைகளை தே பிடிடிபி மீது சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட ட டியாஸ்எல் சட்டத்தில் வெளிப்படுத்தும', 'ur': 'مطلق گفتگو کے ارتباط معلوم کرنے کا ارتباط یہ ہے کہ دو گفتگو کے ارتباط کے درمیان پچھلی رابطہ سمجھ سکیں اور اظہار کریں، جیسے temporal, comparison، etc. بہت سے پہلے طریقے دو گفتگو ارتباط مختلف کے ساتھ encode کریں، جن کو دو مخصوص نشانیوں کے بارے میں نظر رکھتے ہیں دو ارتباط کے درمیان دو ارتباط اور دو نمونوں کی کمی کے درمیان دو اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نور نائرل ٹنسور نیٹورک ڈرامٹ ڈرامٹ ڈرامٹ ڈرامٹ کریں گے جو اپنا انتظار اور اسپارس سیکھنے (TIASL) کے ساتھ مختلف صحبت کے ارتباط معلوم کرنے کے لئے۔ (1) ہم نے دو صحبت کے اردوментوں سے سب سے زیادہ تعلق والی کلمات جوڑوں کو جوڑوں کے ذریعہ مدل کر رکھا ہے اور ان کو دوسری مدت کے ذریعہ مطلق نیٹ ورک کے ذریعہ سے مختلف سمجھنے کے لئے مختلف توجه کے طور پر جمع کردیا ہے۔ Meanwhile, (2) the neural tensor network with sparse constraint is proposed to explore the deeper and more important pair patterns so that the discourse relations are fully recognized. PDTB کے آزمائش نتیجے نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد TIASL فرم اثبات ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz Interactive Attention va Spanish Orollari (TIASL) bilan bog'liqni aniqlash uchun novel neyrol tensor tarmoqni tahrirlash imkoniyatlarini tahrirlash. (1) We mine the most correlated word pairs from two discourse arguments to model pair specific clues, and integrate them as interactive attention into argument representations produced by the bidirectional long short-term memory network.  Hozirda, (2) kichkina cheksiz tarmoq bo'lgan neural tensor tarmoqni o'rganish va eng muhim ikki narsalarni o'rganish uchun suhbat munosabatlarni to ʻliq aniqlash uchun talab qilinadi. PDTB haqida tajriba natijalari koʻrsatiladi bizning pendilgan TIASL freymlarimiz effektiv.", 'vi': 'Công việc nhận dạng mối quan hệ ngôn ngữ ngầm nhằm tìm hiểu và ghi chú các quan hệ tiềm ẩn giữa hai đối số, như thời gian, so sánh, v. v. Phần lớn các phương pháp trước thường mã hóa hai đối số riêng, những cái xem xét các manh mối cặp bỏ qua sự tương tác sinh lý giữa hai đối số và sự phân tán của các mẫu đôi. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống dây thần kinh mới với sự chú ý và giáo dục vũ trụ (TIASL) cho việc nhận dạng liên quan ngôn ngữ ngữ ngầm. (1) Chúng tôi phân tích các cặp từ ngữ phù hợp nhất từ hai đối số thuyết trình đến các khớp dẫn cấu trúc của các đầu mối cụ thể, và kết hợp chúng như sự chú ý hấp dẫn vào các biểu hiện tranh luận được sản xuất bởi mạng bộ nhớ tạm thời dài dài. Trong khi đó, 2) Hệ thống dây tín hiệu thần kinh với giới hạn thoáng đãng được đề xuất để khám phá các mô hình cặp sâu hơn và quan trọng hơn để nhận diện hoàn to àn các mối quan hệ đối thoại. Các kết quả thử nghiệm về PDA cho thấy chúng ta có hiệu quả.', 'bg': 'Признаването на имплицитните дискурсни отношения цели да разбере и анотира латентните отношения между два дискурсни аргумента, като например времеви, сравнени и др. Повечето предишни методи кодират два дискурсни аргумента поотделно, като тези, които разглеждат специфични улики за двойката, игнорират двупосочните взаимодействия между два аргумента и рядкостта на двойките модели. В настоящата статия ние предлагаме нова рамка за невронна тензорна мрежа с интерактивно внимание и рядко учене (ТИАСЛ) за имплицитно разпознаване на дискурсните взаимоотношения. (1) Извличаме най-корелационните думични двойки от два дискурсни аргумента, за да моделираме специфични улики за двойки и ги интегрираме като интерактивно внимание в аргументите, произведени от двупосочната мрежа за краткосрочна памет. Междувременно, (2) невронната тензорна мрежа с рядко ограничение се предлага да изследва по-дълбоките и по-важните модели на двойката, така че напълно да разпознае дискурсните отношения. Експерименталните резултати на ПДТБ показват, че предложената ни рамка е ефективна.', 'da': 'Implicit diskursrelationsgenkendelse har til formål at forstå og kommentere de latente relationer mellem to diskursargumenter, såsom tidsmæssig, sammenligning osv. De fleste tidligere metoder koder to diskursargumenter separat, dem, der betragter parspecifikke spor, ignorerer de bidirektionelle interaktioner mellem to argumenter og sparsommeligheden af parmønstre. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny neural Tensor netværksramme med Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) til implicit diskursrelationsgenkendelse. (1) Vi udvinder de mest korrelerede ordpar fra to diskursargumenter til model par specifikke spor, og integrerer dem som interaktiv opmærksomhed i argumentrepræsentationer produceret af det bidirektionelle langtidshukommelsesnetværk. I mellemtiden, (2) det neurale tensor netværk med sparsom begrænsning foreslås at udforske de dybere og de vigtigste par mønstre for fuldt ud at genkende diskursrelationer. De eksperimentelle resultater på PDTB viser, at vores foreslåede TIASL framework er effektiv.', 'nl': 'Implicite discoursrelatierekening is bedoeld om de latente relaties tussen twee discoursargumenten te begrijpen en te annoteren, zoals temporeel, vergelijkend, enz. De meeste eerdere methoden coderen twee discoursargumenten afzonderlijk, degenen die parenspecifieke aanwijzingen overwegen negeren de bidirectionele interacties tussen twee argumenten en de schaarse parenpatronen. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw neuraal Tensor netwerk framework voor met Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) voor impliciete discoursverhoudingsherkenning. (1) We mineren de meest gecorreleerde woordparen uit twee discoursargumenten om pair specifieke aanwijzingen te modelleren, en integreren ze als interactieve aandacht in argumentrepresentaties geproduceerd door het bidirectionele lange kortetermijngeheugen netwerk. Ondertussen, (2) wordt voorgesteld om de diepere en belangrijkere paarpatronen te onderzoeken om discoursrelaties volledig te herkennen. De experimentele resultaten op PDTB tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde TIASL framework effectief is.', 'hr': 'Priznavanje neprimjerenih diskurskih odnosa je cilj razumijeti i annotirati posljednje odnose između dva argumenta o diskursu, poput privremenih, usporedbe itd. Većina prethodnih metoda uključuje dvije argumentacije o diskursu odvojeno, one koje smatraju specifičnim tragovima par ignoriraju bidirektivne interakcije između dva argumenta i rezerviteta par obrazaca. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi okvir mreže neuralnog tenzora s interaktivnom pozornošću i učenjem spasa (TIASL) za prepoznavanje veze s implicitnim diskusijama. (1) Mi čuvamo najkoreliranijih parova riječi iz dva argumenta o diskusiji do modela određenih tragova par i integriramo ih kao interaktivnu pažnju u predstavljanja argumenta proizvođene od strane bidirektivne dugoročne mreže pamćenja. U međuvremenu, (2) je predložena mreža neuralnog tenzera sa rezervnim ograničenjem da istraži dublje i važnije obrasce par kako bi se potpuno prepoznala odnosi o diskusijama. Eksperimentalni rezultati PDTB pokazuju da je naš predloženi TIASL okvir učinkovit.', 'de': 'Die implizite Erkennung von Diskursbeziehungen zielt darauf ab, die latenten Beziehungen zwischen zwei Diskursargumenten zu verstehen und zu kommentieren, wie temporal, vergleichend usw. Die meisten bisherigen Methoden kodieren zwei Diskursargumente getrennt, diejenigen, die paarspezifische Hinweise berücksichtigen, ignorieren die bidirektionalen Interaktionen zwischen zwei Argumenten und die geringe Anzahl von Paarmustern. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neuartiges neuronales Tensor-Netzwerk-Framework mit Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) für die implizite Erkennung von Diskursbeziehungen vor. (1) Wir analysieren die am meisten korrelierten Wortpaare aus zwei Diskursargumenten, um paarspezifische Hinweise zu modellieren und integrieren sie als interaktive Aufmerksamkeit in Argumentrepräsentationen des bidirektionalen Langzeitgedächtnisnetzwerks. In der Zwischenzeit wird, (2) das neuronale Tensornetzwerk mit spärlicher Einschränkung vorgeschlagen, die tieferen und wichtigeren Paarmuster zu erforschen, um Diskursbeziehungen vollständig zu erkennen. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse an PDTB zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes TIASL-Framework effektiv ist.', 'ko': '내은 문장 관계 식별의 목적은 두 문장 파라미터 간의 잠재적인 관계, 예를 들어 시제, 비교 등을 이해하고 주석하는 것이다. 이전의 방법은 대부분 두 문장 파라미터를 각각 인코딩하였으나, 특정한 옳은 단서를 고려하는 방법은 두 파라미터 간의 양방향 상호작용과 모델에 대한 희소성을 소홀히 하였다.본고에서 우리는 내은어편 관계 식별에 사용되는 새로운 상호작용식 주의와 희소 학습 신경장량 네트워크 구조(TIASL)를 제시했다.(1) 우리는 두 개의 언어 논원에서 가장 관련된 단어 쌍을 발굴하여 특정한 단어 쌍에 대한 단서 모델을 구축하고 이를 상호작용 주의로 쌍방향 장-단기 기억 네트워크에서 발생하는 논원 표징에 통합시킨다.또한 (2) 희소한 제약을 가진 신경장량 네트워크를 제시하여 더욱 심층적이고 중요한 배합 모델을 탐색하여 문장 관계를 충분히 식별한다.PDTB에서의 실험 결과는 우리가 제시한 TIASL 프레임워크가 유효하다는 것을 보여준다.', 'id': 'Pengenalan hubungan diskors implicit bermaksud untuk memahami dan anotasi hubungan yang tersembunyi antara dua argumen diskors, seperti waktu, perbandingan, dll. kebanyakan metode sebelumnya mengekodikan dua argumen diskors secara terpisah, yang mempertimbangkan petunjuk spesifik pasangan mengabaikan interaksi bidireksi antara dua argumen dan kecepatan pola pasangan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan rangkaian jaringan Tensor saraf yang baru dengan Perhatian Interaktif dan Pelajaran Tersingkat (TIASL) untuk pengakuan implicit hubungan diskors. (1) Kami menambah pasangan kata yang paling berkorelasi dari dua argumen diskors ke petunjuk spesifik pasangan model, dan mengintegrasikan mereka sebagai perhatian interaktif ke represisi argumen yang diproduksi oleh jaringan memori bidireksi jangka pendek. Sementara itu, (2) jaringan tensor saraf dengan keterangan sedikit diusulkan untuk mengeksplorasi pola pasangan yang lebih dalam dan lebih penting sehingga sepenuhnya mengenali hubungan diskors. Hasil percobaan pada PDTB menunjukkan bahwa cadangan TIASL yang kami sarankan adalah efektif.', 'sw': 'Kutambua mazungumzo magumu ni lengo la kuelewa na kutangaza uhusiano wa hivi karibuni kati ya mijadala miwili ya mazungumzo, kama vile muda wa muda, uliofanana na mbinu zilizopita zinajumuisha mjadala wa mazungumzo mawili tofauti, ambazo zinafikiri vipindi viwili maalum vinapopuuza mazungumzo ya kushoto kati ya mijadala miwili na kuongezeka kwa namna mbili. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa mtandao wa kituo cha neurali wa Tensor wenye uangalizi na Ufunzi wa Kihispania (TIASL) kwa kutambua mahusiano ya mazungumzo. (1) Tunawafanya ndoa za maneno yanayohusiana zaidi kutoka mijadala miwili ya mazungumzo ili kutengeneza vipindi viwili maalum, na kuwaunganisha kama maoni yanayohusiana na hoja zilizotengenezwa na mtandao wa kumbukumbu ya muda mfupi. Wakati huo huo, (2) Mtandao wa viungo vya neura wenye vikwazo vya kidogo unapendekezwa kuchunguza zaidi na mifano muhimu zaidi ili kutambua mahusiano ya mazungumzo. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye PDTB yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu wa pendekezo la TIASL una ufanisi.', 'tr': "Geçen sözleşişi tanamak amaçlary iki gürrüň argümatynyň arasyndaky soňky baglaýyşyny düşünmek we täsir etmek üçin amaçlary. Öňki döwletler iki gürrüň argümatyny aýratynda ködleýär, we olar iki argümat we iki nusga arasyndaky çykyş baglaýyşyny görmeýärler. Bu kagyzda, biz esasy gürrüň tanyş üçin täze bir nuýral Tensor şebekesi bilen Interaktiv Attention we Sparse Learning (TIASL) täze bir nuýral Tensor şebekesini teklip edýäris. (1) Biz iki gürrüň argüminden iň kop kellämizi belli iplerden çift sany nusga çykarýarys we olary ikinji gezek kiçi bolan ýagtylyk aňla üretilen argumlar ýaly ünsümi görkez. Bu arada, (2) diskurs baglaýyşyny tamamlamak üçin näyral tensüzçilik şebekesine golaý we wajyp nusgasyny gözlemek üçin teklip edildi. PDTB'deki experimental netijeleri biziň teklip eden TIASL çarpaklarymyzyň täsirli bolandygyny görkezýär.", 'fa': 'تعریف رابطه\u200cهای مشخص، هدف است که رابطه\u200cهای اخیر بین دو ارتباط گفتگو، مثل موقتی، مقایسه، و غیر از این، درک کنند و تعریف کنند. بیشتر روش\u200cهای قبلی دو ارتباط گفتگو جداً رمز می\u200cکنند، کسانی که در نظر گرفتن نوع\u200cهای مخصوص دو ارتباط مشخص بین دو ارتباط دو ارتباط و کمال الگو دو را نادیده می\u200c در این کاغذ، ما یک چهارچوب شبکه عصبی با توجه و یادگیری بیماری (TIASL) برای شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای صحبت معمولی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. (1) ما ترین جفت کلمات را از دو دلیل صحبت به نقطه\u200cهای مخصوص مدل می\u200cدهیم و آنها را به عنوان توجه interactive به نمایش\u200cهای ارائه\u200cای که توسط شبکه حافظه\u200cی کوتاه\u200cی طولانی تولید می\u200cکند، به عنوان توجه\u200cای که توسط ارائه\u200cهای مد در ضمن، شبکه عصبی با محدودیت کمی پیشنهاد می\u200cشود که الگوهای عمیق\u200cتر و مهمترین برای شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای صحبت کامل باشد. نتایج آزمایشی در PDTB نشان می دهد که چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارمون TIASL موثر است.', 'sq': 'Njohja implicitete e lidhjes me diskursin synon të kuptojë dhe të anotojë marrëdhëniet e fshehta midis dy argumenteve të diskursit, të tilla si tempulli, krahasimi, etj. Shumica e metodave të mëparshme kodojnë dy argumente diskursi veçanërisht, ato që konsiderojnë tregime të posaçme çifte injorojnë ndërveprimet dy-drejtuese midis dy argumenteve dhe pakësisë së modeleve të çifteve. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një kuadër të ri rrjeti nervor Tensor me vëmendje interaktive dhe mësim të shpejtë (TIASL) për njohjen implicite të lidhjes diskursore. (1) Ne i gërmojmë çiftet e fjalëve më të lidhura nga dy argumente diskurse në shenja specifike të çifteve dhe i integrojmë ato si vëmendje interaktive në përfaqësimet e argumenteve të prodhuara nga rrjeti dy-drejtor i kujtesës afat-shkurtër. Ndërkohë, (2) rrjeti nervor tensor me kufizime të pakta propozohet për të eksploruar modelet më të thella dhe më të rëndësishme të çifteve në mënyrë që të njohin plotësisht marrëdhëniet diskursore. Rezultatet eksperimentale në PDTB tregojnë se kuadri ynë i propozuar TIASL është efektiv.', 'am': 'የውይይት ግንኙነት አካባቢ ግንኙነት ማወቅ እና የአሁኑን ግንኙነት እንዲያስተውሉ እና ማሰቃየት ይችላል። የቀድሞው የንግግር ግንኙነት በተለየ ሁለት ይነጋገራሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የአጠቃሚ ስህተት እና የስፓርስ ትምህርት (TIASL) የጠቅላላላ የኔትራዊ ቴንስር መረብ ፍሬማር ለመግለጥ እና ለመግለጥ የንግግር ግንኙነት ማወቅ እና ለመጠየቅ እናደርጋለን፡፡ (1) ከሁለቱ ንግግር አካባቢዎች የተለየውን የቃላት ሁለቶችን እናደርጋለን፣ እናም በጥያቄ የረጅም ቆራጭ የቆራጭ ማስታወሻ መረብ የተደረገውን እናስማራቸዋለን፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም፣ (2) የነዌብ አካባቢ ግንኙነትን በጭንቅ ጥልቅ እና የበለጠ ጥንታዊ ሁለት ዓይነቶች ለመፍጠር ይዘጋጃል፡፡ በPDTB ላይ የሞከር ውጤቶች የተዘጋጀን የTIASL ፍሬም ፍሬማችንን ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Implisite diskursie verwanting van herkening is doel om die latente verwantings tussen twee diskursie argumente te verstaan en annoteer, soos tydelike, vergelyking, ensfh. Die meeste vorige metodes kodeer twee diskursie argumente skiedenis, die wat die paar spesifieke kloue aanneem, ignoreer die bidireksie interaksie tussen twee argumente en die sparsiteit van paar patrone. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe neurale Tensor netwerk raamwerk met Interaktiewe Aangaande en Sparse Leer (TIASL) vir inplisite diskursie verwanting van herken. (1) Ons myn die mees korrelasieerde woord paar van twee diskurse argumente na model paar spesifieke kloue en integreer hulle as interaktiewe aandag in argumente voorstellings wat deur die bidireksjonale lang-term geheunetwerk produseer word. Tussen tyd, (2) die neurale tensor netwerk met sparse begrens word voorgestel om die diepter en die meer belangrike paar patrone te uitsoek sodat dit volledig herken te kenne van diskursie relasies. Die eksperimentale resultate op PDTB vertoon dat ons voorgestelde TIASL raamwerk effektief is.", 'hy': 'Միմաստ խոսահարաբերությունների ճանաչելը նպատակն է հասկանալ և նշում խոսահարաբերությունների երկու բանավեճերի միջև թաքնված հարաբերությունները, ինչպիսիք են ժամանակական, համեմատությունը, և այլն. նախորդ մեթոդների մեծամասնությունը կոդավորում է երկու խոսահարաբերությունները առանձին, որոնք հաշվի առնելով զույգ հատուկ նշաններ, անտեսում Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր նյարդային տենսորի ցանցի շրջանակ ինտերակտիվ ուշադրության և արագ սովորելու (TIASL) միջոցառությամբ խոսակցական հարաբերությունների ճանաչելու համար: (1) Մենք հանում ենք ամենակապված բառերի զույգերը երկու խոսաբանական բանավեճից մի զույգ հատուկ հնարավորությունների և ինտեգրում ենք դրանք որպես ինտերակտիվ ուշադրություն բանավեճի ներկայացումների մեջ, որոնք արտադրվում են երկու ուղղությամբ երկարաժամկետ հիշողության ցան Միևնույն ժամանակ, (2) արագ սահմանափակումներով նեյրոնական տենսորի ցանցը առաջարկում է ավելի խորը և կարևոր զույգերի կաղապարները ուսումնասիրել, որպեսզի լիովին ճանաչենք խոսակցական հարաբերությունները: PDTB-ի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված TIASL-ի շրջանակը արդյունավետ է:', 'az': "Əvvəlki sözlər müəyyən edilən ilişkilərin tanımasını anlamaq və bildirmək məqsədilə iki sözlər arasındakı sonrakı ilişkiləri, müddətli, salışdırma və ya da məşğul etmək istəyir. Əvvəlki metodların çoxu iki sözlər müəyyən edilən argumenti, iki argumentin və çift modellərin az bir hissəsi arasındakı müəyyən edilməsini görmək istəyir. Bu kağızda, müəyyən bir söhbət əlaqəsi tanıtmaq üçün yeni nöral Tensor a ğ framework ü təklif edirik. (1) Biz iki müzakirə argumentindən iki cüt nöqtəsi nöqtəsinə, iki nöqtəsi nöqtəsi nöqtəsi nöqtəsinə götürdük və onları iki nöqtəsi nöqtəsi nöqtəsi ilə müəyyən edilən argumentin tərzlərinə birləşdiririk. Bu arada, küçük müddətli nöral tensor ağı daha derin və daha önemli cüt modelləri keşfetmək üçün müəyyən edilir. PDTB'nin eksperimental sonuçları bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz TIASL qurğumuz etkilidir.", 'bs': 'Implicitno priznanje veze s vezama je cilj razumjeti i annotirati poslednje odnose između dva argumenta diskursa, poput temporalne, usporedbe, itd. Većina prethodnih metoda kodira dva argumenta diskursa odvojeno, oni koji razmatraju par specifičnih tragova ignoriraju bidirektivne interakcije između dva argumenta i rezervnosti par obrazaca. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi okvir mreže nervnog tenzora sa interaktivnom pažnjom i učenjem prostora (TIASL) za prepoznavanje implicitnih veza s diskusijama. (1) Mi čuvamo najpovezanije parove riječi iz dva argumenta o diskusiji do modela određenih tragova par i integriramo ih kao interaktivnu pažnju u predstave argumenta proizvođene od strane dvodirektivne dugoročne mreže pamćenja. U međuvremenu, (2) je predložena mreža neuronskog tenzora sa rezervnim ograničenjem da istraži dublje i važnije obrasce par, kako bi se potpuno prepoznala odnosi o diskursima. Eksperimentalni rezultati PDTB pokazuju da je naš predloženi TIASL okvir efikasan.', 'ca': "El reconeixement implícit de la relació de discurs té l'objectiu d'entendre i anotar les relacions latents entre dos arguments de discurs, com ara temporal, comparació, etc. La majoria dels mètodes anteriors codifiquen dos arguments de discurs per separat, els que consideran indicis específics de parell ignoren les interaccions bidireccionals entre dos arguments i la escassetat de patrons de parell. En aquest article, proposem un nou marc de xarxa de tensors neurals amb Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) per al reconeixement implícit de les relacions de discurs. (1) Extraem els parells de paraules més correlats de dos arguments de discurs a indicis específics de parell, i les integrem com atenció interactiva en representacions d'arguments produïdes per la xarxa de memòria bidireccional a curt termini. Mentrestant, (2) es propone que la xarxa de tensors neurals amb restriccions escases exploren patrons de parell més profunds i més importants per reconèixer plenament les relacions de discurs. Els resultats experimentals de la BPDT mostren que el nostre marc TIASL proposat és efectiu.", 'cs': 'Implicitní rozpoznávání diskurzních vztahů má za cíl porozumět a anotovat latentní vztahy mezi dvěma diskurzními argumenty, jako je časové, srovnání atd. Většina předchozích metod kóduje dva diskurzní argumenty odděleně, ty, které uvažují o specifických vodítkách, ignorují obousměrné interakce mezi dvěma argumenty a řídkost dvojicích vzorců. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový rámec neuronové Tenzorové sítě s interaktivní pozorností a řídkým učením (TIASL) pro implicitní rozpoznávání diskurzních vztahů. (1) Nejkorelovanější slovní páry vytěžujeme ze dvou diskurzních argumentů k modelování specifických vodítek páru a integrujeme je jako interaktivní pozornost do reprezentací argumentů produkovaných obousměrnou sítí krátkodobé paměti. Mezitím, (2) neuronová tenzorová síť s řídkým omezením je navržena k prozkoumání hlubších a důležitějších vzorců páru, aby bylo možné plně rozpoznat diskurzní vztahy. Experimentální výsledky na PDTB ukazují, že náš navrhovaný TIASL framework je efektivní.', 'bn': 'পূর্ববর্তী যোগাযোগ স্বীকৃতির উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে দুটি কথোপকথন যুক্তির মধ্যে সাম্প্রতিক সম্পর্ক বুঝতে এবং বিরক্তির উদ্দেশ্য, যেমন সময়, তুলনা ইত্যাদি। বেশীর ভাগ বিভিন্ন ভাবে দুটি আলোচনা যুক্তি  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নভেল টেনসারের নেটওয়ার্ক কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করছি যার মধ্যে ইন্টারেক্টিভ মনোযোগ এবং স্পের্স শিক্ষা (টিয়াস এল) যারা কথোপ (১) আমরা দুটি কথোপকথন যুক্তি থেকে সবচেয়ে সংশ্লিষ্ট শব্দের জোড়া আমাদের মানিয়ে দিয়েছি দুটি নির্দিষ্ট কিন্তু মডেল করার জন্য, আর তাদের মধ্যে এক এদিকে (২) স্মান্য সীমাবদ্ধ নেটওয়ার্কের নিউরুল টেনসার নেটওয়ার্কের প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে গভীরভাবে আরো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ জোড়া প্যাটার পিডিটিবিতে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত টিএসএল ফ্রেম কার্যক্রম কার্যকর।', 'et': 'Kaudse diskursussuhte tuvastamise eesmärk on mõista ja anoteerida kahe diskursuseargumendi (nt ajalise, võrdluse jne) varjatud suhteid. Enamik varasemaid meetodeid kodeerib kaks diskursuseargumenti eraldi, need, mis käsitlevad paari spetsiifilisi vihjeid, ignoreerivad kahe argumendi kahesuunalist vastastikust koostoimet ja paari mustrite vähesust. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse neurotensorvõrgu raamistiku interaktiivse tähelepanu ja vaese õppega (TIASL) kaudseks diskursussuhete tuvastamiseks. (1) Me kaevandame kõige korrelatsioonilisemad sõnapaarid kahest diskursuse argumendist, et modelleerida paari spetsiifilisi vihjeid ja integreerida need interaktiivse tähelepanuna kahesuunalise pikaajalise mäluvõrgu loodud argumentide esitustesse. Samal ajal (2) tehakse ettepanek hõreda piiranguga neurotensorvõrgu uurida sügavamaid ja olulisemaid paari mustreid, et täielikult ära tunda diskursussuhteid. PDTB eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie pakutud TIASL raamistik on tõhus.', 'fi': 'Implisiittinen diskurssisuhteiden tunnistus pyrkii ymmärtämään ja merkitsemään kahden diskurssiargumentin, kuten ajallisen, vertailun jne. piileviä suhteita. Useimmat aikaisemmat menetelmät koodaavat kaksi diskurssiargumenttia erikseen, ja parikohtaisia vihjeitä käsittelevät menetelmät sivuuttavat kahden argumentin kaksisuuntaiset vuorovaikutukset ja parimallien niukkuuden. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme uutta neurojänniteverkkokehystä interaktiivisella huomiolla ja harvalla oppimisella (TIASL) implisiittiseen diskurssisuhteiden tunnistamiseen. (1) Kaivamme eniten korreloituneita sanapareja kahdesta diskurssiargumentista mallintaaksemme parikohtaisia vihjeitä ja integroimme ne interaktiivisena huomiona kaksisuuntaisen pitkän aikavälin muistiverkon tuottamiin argumenttien esityksiin. Samaan aikaan (2) neurotensoriverkostoa, jossa on harvoja rajoituksia, ehdotetaan tutkimaan syvempiä ja tärkeämpiä parimalleja diskurssisuhteiden tunnistamiseksi. PDTB:n kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu TIASL-viitekehys on tehokas.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggunakake perusahaan nggunakake iki dadi bisa digambut karo perusahaan langgar sampek duruh Nang pemilih iki, kita supoyo nganggo dolanan liyane Neral Tenor tambah nggambar interactive Attention lan Sparso Learning (TIASL) kanggo masalah kejahatan langgambar aturan tambah. (1) Awak dhéwé butine perusahaan kelangan kelangan langgar sampeyan winih Taning Laptop" and "Desktop', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje implicitnih diskurznih relacij je namenjeno razumevanju in označevanju latentnih relacij med dvema diskurznima argumentoma, kot so časovni, primerjalni itd. Večina prejšnjih metod ločeno kodira dva diskurzna argumenta, tiste, ki upoštevajo par specifične namige, ignorirajo dvosmerne interakcije med dvema argumentoma in redkost vzorcev parov. V prispevku predlagamo nov okvir nevronskega Tensorskega omrežja z interaktivno pozornostjo in redkim učenjem (TIASL) za implicitno prepoznavanje diskurznih relacij. (1) Izkopavamo najbolj korelacirane pare besed iz dveh diskurznih argumentov, da modeliramo specifične namige za par in jih integriramo kot interaktivno pozornost v argumentne reprezentacije, ki jih proizvaja dvosmerna dolgoročna kratkoročna spominska mreža. Medtem (2) je predlagano, da bi nevronsko tensorsko mrežo z redkimi omejitvami raziskali globlje in pomembnejše vzorce parov, da bi v celoti prepoznali diskurzne odnose. Poskusni rezultati PDTB kažejo, da je naš predlagani okvir TIASL učinkovit.', 'ha': "Suna ganin mazaɓa masu husũma masu nau'i ne dõmin ya fahimta kuma ya zartar da mazaunin masu ƙaranci a tsakanin mazaɓa biyu, kamar misali, da kuma misali. Babu shiryoyin da suka gaba sun kodi bakin mazaɓa biyu da bakwai-faɗi, da bayani, masu yin tunãni da nau'i biyu masu ƙayyade, sai su ƙẽtare interaction ɗin sau biyu tsakanin argument biyu da sau biyu. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani bango na jerin na'urar na Neural na Tasor da shirin interactive Attemption and Space Learnin (TIANL) wa tabbatar da mazaɓa na haɗi. @ info A lokacin da (2) ana ƙayyade waton jerin neural wanda ke da ƙunci mai ƙaranci, to, ana buɗa masu ƙari da masu muhimmi biyu, dõmin a iya fahimta mazaɓa. Matarin jarrabai a kan PDTB na nuna cewa firam da ake buƙata da mu ke da amfani.", 'he': 'זיהוי יחסי דיבור משמעותי מכוון להבין ולהצביע את יחסים הסתיימים בין שני טיעונים דיבורים, כמו זמניים, שיוואי, וכו. רוב השיטות הקודמות קודמות את שני טיעונים דיבורים בנפרד, אלה ששוקלים רמזים ספציפיים זוג מתעלמים מהאינטראקציות בין שני טיעונים והנדירות של דפוסי זוג. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מסגרת רשת טנסורים עצביים חדשה עם תשומת לב אינטראקטיבית וללמוד נמוך (TIASL) לזהות יחסי דיבור מילוי. (1) אנו מוכרים את זוגות המילים הקשורות ביותר משני טיעונים דיבורים למודל זוגות רמזים ספציפיים, ולהשתלב אותם כתשומת לב אינטראקטיבית לתוך מייצגים טיעונים שנוצרו על ידי רשת הזיכרון הארוך של שני כיוונים. בינתיים, (2) רשת הטנסורים העצביים עם מחסומים נדירים מוצעת לחקור את הדפוסים העמוקים והחשובים יותר של זוגות כדי להכיר לחלוטין יחסי דיבור. התוצאות הניסיוניות על PDTB מראות כי המסגרת הטאיאסל הציעה שלנו היא יעילה.', 'bo': 'Implicit discourse relation recognition aims to understand and annotate the latent relations between two discourse arguments, such as temporal, comparison, etc. Most previous methods encode two discourse arguments separately, the ones considering pair specific clues ignore the bidirectional interactions between two arguments and the sparsity of pair patterns. In this paper, we propose a novel neural Tensor network framework with Interactive Attention and Sparse Learning (TIASL) for implicit discourse relation recognition. (1) We mine the most correlated word pairs from two discourse arguments to model pair specific clues, and integrate them as interactive attention into argument representations produced by the bidirectional long-term memory network. དེར་བརྟེན། ནུས་བྱུང་མཁན་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལ་དམ་ཟབ་པ་དང་གལ་ཅན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདྲ་བ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། PDTB ཐོག་གི་བརྟག་འགོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་དག་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་TIASL གཞི་ཁུང་གི་ལག་སྟར་བྱེ'}
{'en': 'Deep Enhanced Representation for Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition', 'ar': 'التمثيل العميق المحسن للاعتراف بعلاقة الخطاب الضمني', 'fr': 'Représentation améliorée en profondeur pour la reconnaissance implicite des relations de discours', 'pt': 'Representação Aprimorada Profunda para Reconhecimento de Relação de Discurso Implícito', 'es': 'Representación profundamente mejorada para el reconocimiento implícito de relaciones discursales', 'ja': '暗黙の話題関係認識のための深い強化された表現', 'hi': 'अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध मान्यता के लिए गहरा बढ़ाया प्रतिनिधित्व', 'zh': '内隐语深增表', 'ru': 'Глубокое расширенное представление для неявного распознавания отношения к дискурсу', 'ga': 'Léiriú Feabhsaithe Dhomhain le haghaidh Aitheantas an Chaidrimh Impleachta Dioscúrsa', 'ka': 'ძალიან უფრო მეტირებული რესპენტიაცია იმპლიტიკური დისკურსების მიღება', 'el': 'Βαθιά ενισχυμένη εκπροσώπηση για την έμμεση αναγνώριση σχέσεων συζήτησης', 'hu': 'Mélyrehatott reprezentáció az implicit beszédkapcsolat felismeréséhez', 'it': 'Rappresentazione avanzata profonda per il riconoscimento implicito della relazione discorsiva', 'kk': 'Имплективті дискурстардың қатынасын анықтау үшін түсінікті жетілдірілген', 'lt': 'Deep Enhanced Representation for Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition', 'mk': 'Длабоко засилена претстава за имплицитно признавање на односите со дискурсот', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Tingkat Dalam untuk Pengenalan Hubungan Perhubungan Bertindakan Jelas', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Deep Enhanced Representation for Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition', 'no': 'Deep forbetra representasjon for gjenkjenning av implisitt diskursrelasjon', 'mn': 'Импликийн ярианы харилцааны танихын тулд гүнзгий нэмэгдсэн төлөөлөл', 'pl': 'Głęboko ulepszona reprezentacja dla dorozumianego rozpoznawania relacji dyskursowych', 'sr': 'Duboko poboljšano predstavljanje za prepoznavanje veza s implicitnim diskusijama', 'ro': 'Reprezentare profundă îmbunătățită pentru recunoașterea relațiilor implicite de discurs', 'sv': 'Djupt förbättrad representation för implicit diskursrelation igenkänning', 'si': 'ගොඩක් විශාල ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සම්බන්ධතාවක් පිළිගන්න', 'so': 'Aqoonshaha la xiriirka lamaanaha ee mool horumarinta ah', 'ta': 'ஆழம் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட பிரதிநிகழ்வு தொடர்பு அறிதலுக்கான ஆழமாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது', 'ur': 'عملکت دیسکورس رابطہ شناخت کے لئے عمیق زیادہ اضافہ کی نمایش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Diễn xuất phát triển sâu cho hệ thống giảm yêu cầu', 'hr': 'Duboko poboljšano predstavljanje za prepoznavanje odnosa s Implicitnim diskusijama', 'da': 'Dybt forbedret repræsentation for implicit diskursrelation anerkendelse', 'nl': 'Diep Verbeterde Representatie voor Implicite Discourse Relatie Recognition', 'bg': 'Дълбоко подобрено представителство за разпознаване на имплицитна дискурсна връзка', 'ko': '내은어편 관계 식별의 깊이 강화 표징', 'id': 'Deep Enhanced Representation for Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition', 'de': 'Deep Enhanced Representation für die implizite Erkennung von Diskursbeziehungen', 'fa': 'نمایش عمیق بیشتر برای شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای سخنرانی عملی', 'sw': 'Nakili ya kina inayoongezeka kwa Kutambua Kuhusiana na Utamaduni', 'af': 'Deep Verbeter Voorstelling vir Implicite Diskursie Relasie Herkenning', 'tr': 'Implicit Gezgi Görnüş Derjesi Taýýarlama Derjesi', 'sq': 'Përfaqësimi i thellë i përmirësuar për njohjen e marrëdhënieve implicitete të diskutimit', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Խաղաղ զարգացած ներկայացումը աննշանակալի քննարկության հարաբերությունների ճանաչման համար', 'az': 'İpliktik diskusiya ilişki tanıması üçün derin Əlavə Etmiş Təşkil', 'ca': 'Representació profundament millorada per a reconèixer les relacions de discurs implícits', 'cs': 'Hluboká vylepšená reprezentace pro implicitní rozpoznávání diskursních vztahů', 'bn': 'গভীর উন্নত প্রতিনিধি', 'bs': 'Duboko poboljšano predstavljanje za prepoznavanje veza s Implicitnim diskusijama', 'et': 'Sügav tõhustatud esindus kaudse diskursussuhte tunnustamiseks', 'fi': 'Syvällä tehostetulla edustuksella implisiittisen diskurssisuhteen tunnustamista varten', 'jv': 'deep', 'sk': 'Globoko izboljšana reprezentacija za implicitno prepoznavanje diskurznih odnosov', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Deep Enhanced Representation for Implicit Discourse Relation Recognition', 'he': 'מייצגת משותפת עמוקה לזהות מערכת יחסים משמעותית'}
{'en': 'Implicit discourse relation recognition is a challenging task as the relation prediction without explicit connectives in discourse parsing needs understanding of text spans and can not be easily derived from surface features from the input sentence pairs. Thus, properly representing the text is very crucial to this task. In this paper, we propose a model augmented with different grained text representations, including character, subword, word, sentence, and sentence pair levels. The proposed deeper model is evaluated on the benchmark treebank and achieves state-of-the-art accuracy with greater than 48 % in 11-way and F1 score greater than 50 % in 4-way classifications for the first time according to our best knowledge.', 'ar': 'يعتبر التعرف على علاقة الخطاب الضمني مهمة صعبة حيث أن التنبؤ بالعلاقة بدون روابط صريحة في تحليل الخطاب يحتاج إلى فهم امتدادات النص ولا يمكن اشتقاقه بسهولة من السمات السطحية من أزواج جملة الإدخال. وبالتالي ، فإن تمثيل النص بشكل صحيح أمر بالغ الأهمية لهذه المهمة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذجًا معززًا بتمثيلات نصية مختلفة ، بما في ذلك مستويات أزواج الأحرف والكلمات الفرعية والكلمات والجمل والجمل. يتم تقييم النموذج الأعمق المقترح على بنك الشجرة المعياري ويحقق دقة متطورة بأكثر من 48٪ في 11 طريقة ودرجة F1 أكبر من 50٪ في التصنيفات الرباعية لأول مرة وفقًا لأفضل معلوماتنا .', 'pt': 'O reconhecimento implícito da relação do discurso é uma tarefa desafiadora, pois a predição da relação sem conectivos explícitos na análise do discurso precisa de compreensão de extensões de texto e não pode ser facilmente derivada de recursos de superfície dos pares de frases de entrada. Assim, representar adequadamente o texto é muito crucial para esta tarefa. Neste artigo, propomos um modelo aumentado com diferentes representações granulares de texto, incluindo níveis de caracteres, subpalavras, palavras, frases e pares de frases. O modelo mais profundo proposto é avaliado no banco de árvores de referência e alcança precisão de última geração com mais de 48% em 11 vias e pontuação F1 maior que 50% em classificações de 4 vias pela primeira vez de acordo com nosso melhor conhecimento .', 'es': 'El reconocimiento implícito de la relación discursiva es una tarea desafiante, ya que la predicción de la relación sin conectivos explícitos en el análisis del discurso necesita comprender la extensión del texto y no puede derivarse fácilmente de las características superficiales de los pares de oraciones de entrada. Por lo tanto, representar correctamente el texto es crucial para esta tarea. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo ampliado con diferentes representaciones de texto granulado, incluidos los niveles de caracteres, subpalabras, palabras, oraciones y pares de oraciones. El modelo más profundo propuesto se evalúa en el banco de árboles de referencia y logra una precisión de vanguardia con más del 48% en 11 vías y una puntuación de F1 superior al 50% en clasificaciones de 4 vías por primera vez según nuestro mejor conocimiento.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance implicite des relations de discours est une tâche difficile car la prédiction de relation sans connecteurs explicites dans l'analyse du discours nécessite une compréhension des étendues de texte et ne peut pas être facilement dérivée des caractéristiques de surface des paires de phrases en entrée. Il est donc essentiel de bien représenter le texte pour accomplir cette tâche. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle augmenté avec différentes représentations textuelles granulaires, y compris des niveaux de caractères, de sous-mots, de mots, de phrases et de paires de phrases. Le modèle plus profond proposé est évalué sur la banque d'arbres de référence et atteint pour la première fois une précision de pointe avec plus de 48\xa0% en 11 points et un score F1 supérieur à 50\xa0% dans les classifications à 4 facteurs pour la première fois selon nos meilleures connaissances.", 'zh': '隐式语识一挑战性,以语解析无显式连接词知文本跨度,且不可轻从句中推导出也。 是以正文本于事为重。 于本文中,增粒度异体,字符子词,单词句对级。 据我最佳知识,于基准树库上估了所出更深层次的模样,并成了最先进的精度,在11路中超过48%,F1得分首次在4路分类中大于50%。', 'ja': '暗黙の談話関係認識は、談話構文解析における明示的な接続なしの関係予測がテキストスパンの理解を必要とし、入力文のペアから表面的な特徴から容易に導き出すことができないため、困難な課題である。したがって、テキストを適切に表現することは、このタスクにとって非常に重要です。この論文では、文字、サブワード、単語、文、および文のペアレベルを含む異なる粒状のテキスト表現で拡張されたモデルを提案します。提案されたより深いモデルは、ベンチマークツリーバンクで評価され、私たちの最良の知識によれば、11ウェイで48 ％を超える最先端の精度を達成し、4ウェイ分類で50 ％を超えるF 1スコアを初めて達成します。', 'ru': 'Неявное распознавание отношений дискурса является сложной задачей, поскольку предсказание отношений без явных соединений в разборе дискурса требует понимания текстовых диапазонов и не может быть легко выведено из поверхностных признаков из пар входных предложений. Таким образом, надлежащее представление текста имеет решающее значение для выполнения этой задачи. В этой статье мы предлагаем модель, дополненную различными зернистыми текстовыми представлениями, включая уровни пар символов, подфраз, слов, предложений и предложений. Предлагаемая более глубокая модель оценивается на эталонном древостоя и достигает самой современной точности с более чем 48% в 11-полосной и F1 баллов более чем 50% в 4-полосной классификации в первый раз, согласно нашим лучшим знаниям.', 'hi': 'अंतर्निहित प्रवचन संबंध मान्यता एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है क्योंकि प्रवचन पार्सिंग में स्पष्ट संयोजी के बिना संबंध भविष्यवाणी को पाठ स्पैन की समझ की आवश्यकता होती है और इनपुट वाक्य जोड़े से सतह की विशेषताओं से आसानी से प्राप्त नहीं किया जा सकता है। इस प्रकार, पाठ का ठीक से प्रतिनिधित्व करना इस कार्य के लिए बहुत महत्वपूर्ण है। इस पेपर में, हम चरित्र, उपशब्द, शब्द, वाक्य और वाक्य जोड़ी के स्तर सहित विभिन्न ग्रेन किए गए पाठ अभ्यावेदन के साथ संवर्धित एक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रस्तावित गहरे मॉडल का मूल्यांकन बेंचमार्क ट्रीबैंक पर किया जाता है और हमारे सर्वोत्तम ज्ञान के अनुसार पहली बार 4-तरफ़ा वर्गीकरण में 48% से अधिक के साथ अत्याधुनिक सटीकता प्राप्त करता है और F1 स्कोर 4-वे वर्गीकरण में 50% से अधिक है।', 'ga': 'Is tasc dúshlánach é an caidreamh dioscúrsa intuigthe a aithint mar ní mór tuiscint a fháil ar réisí an téacs chun an gaol a thuar gan naisc fhollasacha sa pharsáil dioscúrsa agus ní féidir é a dhíorthú go héasca ó ghnéithe dromchla ó na péirí abairtí ionchuir. Mar sin, tá sé ríthábhachtach don tasc seo an téacs a léiriú i gceart. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid múnla méadaithe le huiríll téacsanna graenacha éagsúla, lena n-áirítear carachtar, fofhocal, focal, abairt, agus leibhéil péire abairtí. Déantar an tsamhail níos doimhne atá beartaithe a mheas ar an gcrann tagarmharcála agus baintear amach cruinneas den scoth le níos mó ná 48% in 11-bhealach agus scór F1 níos mó ná 50% in aicmí 4-bhealach den chéad uair de réir ár n-eolas is fearr. .', 'el': 'Η σιωπηρή αναγνώριση σχέσεων λόγου είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο καθώς η πρόβλεψη σχέσεων χωρίς ρητές συνδέσεις στην ανάλυση λόγου χρειάζεται κατανόηση των περιόδων κειμένου και δεν μπορεί εύκολα να αντληθεί από επιφανειακά χαρακτηριστικά από τα ζεύγη προτάσεων εισαγωγής. Συνεπώς, η ορθή εκπροσώπηση του κειμένου είναι πολύ σημαντική για το έργο αυτό. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο εμπλουτισμένο με διαφορετικές αναπαραστάσεις κειμένου, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των επιπέδων χαρακτήρων, υπολέξεων, λέξεων, προτάσεων και ζευγαριού προτάσεων. Το προτεινόμενο βαθύτερο μοντέλο αξιολογείται στη βάση αναφοράς δέντρων και επιτυγχάνει ακρίβεια τελευταίας τεχνολογίας με μεγαλύτερη από 48% σε 11-τροχιά και βαθμολογία μεγαλύτερη από 50% σε 4-τροχές ταξινομήσεις για πρώτη φορά σύμφωνα με τις καλύτερες γνώσεις μας.', 'hu': 'Az implicit diskurzus kapcsolat felismerése kihívást jelent, mivel a diskurzus elemzésében az explicit kapcsolatok nélküli kapcsolat-előrejelzés szükségessé teszi a szövegtartományok megértését, és nem lehet könnyen levonni a bemeneti mondatpárok felületi jellemzőiből. Ezért a szöveg megfelelő megjelenítése nagyon fontos ehhez a feladathoz. Ebben a tanulmányban egy különböző szemcsés szövegábrázolásokkal kiegészített modellt javasolunk, beleértve a karakter, alsó, szó, mondat és mondatpár szinteket. A javasolt mélyebb modell értékelése a benchmark fapadon történik, és legjobb tudásunk szerint először 48%-nál nagyobb pontosságot ér el a legkorszerűbb pontossággal 11 irányban, az F1 pontszám pedig 50%-nál nagyobb 4 irányban osztályozva.', 'it': "Il riconoscimento implicito delle relazioni di discorso è un compito impegnativo in quanto la previsione delle relazioni senza connessioni esplicite nell'analisi del discorso richiede la comprensione degli intervalli di testo e non può essere facilmente derivata dalle caratteristiche superficiali dalle coppie di frasi di input. Pertanto, rappresentare correttamente il testo è molto cruciale per questo compito. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello arricchito con diverse rappresentazioni di testo granulato, inclusi i livelli di carattere, sottoparola, parola, frase e coppia di frasi. Il modello più profondo proposto viene valutato sul banco degli alberi di riferimento e raggiunge per la prima volta una precisione all'avanguardia con oltre il 48% in 11 vie e un punteggio F1 superiore al 50% in 4 vie secondo le nostre migliori conoscenze.", 'ka': 'იმპლექტიური დისკურსების შესახებ განაცნობა არის შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა, როგორც შესახებ განაცნობა განაცნობით განაცნობით დისკურსების განაცნობაში უნდა ტექსტის განაცნობის შესახებ და შესაძლებელია ამიტომ, ტექსტის მნიშვნელოვანობა ამ დავალებისთვის ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანია. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მოვეხსენებთ მოდელს, რომელიც განსხვავებული ტექსტის გამოსახულებებით, რომელიც სიტყვა, სიტყვა, სიტყვა და წესების ორი დონე. პირველად ჩვენი უკეთესი ცნობიერებისთვის უფრო დიდი მოდელეში გაუმუშავება ბენქმარკის საბოლოში და გავაკეთება 48% უფრო დიდ და F1 წერტილი უფრო მეტია 50% უფრო მეტია 4 გზით კლასიფიკაციაში.', 'kk': 'Дискурстарды талдау үшін мәтін аралықтарын түсіну керек, және келтірілген сөздердің қасиеттерінен оңай түсініп алмайды. Бұл тапсырма үшін мәтінді дұрыс көрсету өте маңызды. Бұл қағазда біз түрлі мәтін түрінде көтерілген үлгілерді ұсынамыз, таңбалар, субсөз, сөз, сөз және сөздің екі деңгейі қоса. Келтірілген артық үлгі деңгейіндегі бағытты бағыттау үшін оқиға беріледі. Біздің ең жақсы білімізге сәйкестіктеріміздің алғашқы ретінде 48% дегеннен артық және F1 деңгейінде 50% дегеннен артық болады.', 'lt': 'Netiesioginis diskursinių santykių pripažinimas yra sudėtinga užduotis, nes santykių prognozė be aiškių jungčių diskursinio analizavimo srityje reikalauja suprasti teksto intervalus ir negali būti lengvai gauta iš paviršiaus požymių iš įvadinių sakinių poros. Todėl tinkamas teksto atstovavimas yra labai svarbus šiam uždaviniui. Šiame dokumente siūlome model į, papildytą įvairiais grūdiniais teksto paveikslais, įskaitant simbolius, paražodžius, žodžius, sakinius ir sakinių poros lygius. Siūlomas gilesnis model is vertinamas pagal standartinę medienos bazę ir pirmą kartą, remiantis mūsų geriausiomis žiniomis, pasiekiamas naujausias tikslumas, kurio 11 kryptimis yra daugiau kaip 48 proc., o F1 balas – daugiau kaip 50 proc. 4 kryptimis.', 'ms': 'Implicit discourse relation recognition is a challenging task as the relation prediction without explicit connectives in discourse parsing needs understanding of text spans and cannot be easily derived from surface features from the input sentence pairs.  Thus, properly representing the text is very crucial to this task.  Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan model ditambah dengan perwakilan teks berbeza, termasuk aksara, subkata, perkataan, kalimat, dan tahap pasangan kalimat. Model yang diusulkan lebih dalam diteliti pada batang pepohonan benchmark dan mencapai ketepatan state-of-the-art dengan lebih dari 48% dalam 11-way dan skor F1 lebih dari 50% dalam 4-way klasifikasi untuk pertama kalinya menurut pengetahuan terbaik kami.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാതെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന പ്രവചനത്തില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണ്. വാക്കുകളില്\u200d  അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഈ ജോലിക്ക് വേണ്ടി പദാവലിയെ ശരിയായി പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത പദാവലിയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുമായി കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അക്ഷര നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d വിലയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല അറിവുള്ള ആദ്യത്തേതിന്\u200dറെ ആദ്യത്തെ അറിവിന്\u200dറെ പ്രകാരം 48', 'mk': 'Имплицитното признавање на дискурсните односи е предизвикувачка задача, бидејќи предвидувањето на односите без експлицитни поврзувања во дискурсниот анализирање бара разбирање на текстовите растојанија и не може лесно да се извлече од површината на паровите на вводните Затоа, соодветното претставување на текстот е многу клучно за оваа задача. Во овој документ, предложуваме модел зголемен со различни презентации на зерен текст, вклучувајќи го и карактерот, подзборот, зборот, реченицата и нивоа на пар реченици. Предложениот подлабок модел е проценет на базата на дрвјата на споредба и постигнува најсовремена точност со поголема од 48 отсто на 11 насоки и оценка Ф1 поголема од 50 отсто на 4 насоки за првпат според нашето најдобро знаење.', 'mt': 'Ir-rikonoxximent impliċitu tar-relazzjoni ta’ diskors huwa kompitu ta’ sfida peress li t-tbassir tar-relazzjoni mingħajr konnettivi espliċiti fl-analiżi ta’ diskors jeħtieġ fehim tal-firxiet tat-test u ma jistax jiġi faċilment derivat mill-karatteristiċi tal-wiċċ mill-pari tas-sentenza input. Għalhekk, ir-rappreżentazzjoni xierqa tat-test hija kruċjali ħafna għal dan il-kompitu. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mudell miżjud b’rappreżentazzjonijiet differenti tat-test magħqud, inklużi livelli ta’ karattru, subkelma, kelma, sentenza, u pari ta’ sentenzi. Il-mudell aktar profond propost huwa evalwat fuq il-bażi tas-siġar ta’ referenza u jikseb l-aktar preċiżjoni avvanzata b’aktar minn 48% fil-punteġġ ta’ 11-il direzzjoni u F1 akbar minn 50% fil-klassifikazzjonijiet ta’ 4 direzzjonijiet għall-ewwel darba skont l-aħjar għarfien tagħna.', 'no': 'Implicit diskursrelasjon-gjenkjenning er eit vanskeleg oppgåve som forhåndsvising av forhåndsvising utan eksplisitt tilkopling i diskursar treng forståking av tekstmellomrom og kan ikkje enkelt hentast frå overflata-funksjonar frå innsetjingspara. Dette er derfor veldig viktig å representera teksten for denne oppgåva. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit modell som er auka med forskjellige tekstrepresentasjonar, inkludert teikn, underord, ord, setning og setningslivå. Den foreslåde dypere modellen er evaluert på baneknappen og når det er større enn 48 % på 11 måte, og F1- punktet er større enn 50 % i 4-måte klassifikasjonar for første gang etter vår beste kunnskap.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea implicită a relațiilor de discurs este o sarcină provocatoare, deoarece predicția relației fără conectivi explicite în analizarea discursului necesită înțelegerea intervalelor de text și nu poate fi ușor derivată din caracteristicile suprafeței din perechile de propoziții de intrare. Astfel, reprezentarea corespunzătoare a textului este foarte crucială pentru această sarcină. În această lucrare, propunem un model amplificat cu diferite reprezentări de text granulat, inclusiv caractere, subcuvânt, cuvânt, propoziție și perechi de propoziții. Modelul profund propus este evaluat pe baza benchmark treebank și atinge o precizie de ultimă oră cu mai mult de 48% în 11 căi și un scor F1 mai mare de 50% în clasificările 4 căi pentru prima dată, conform celor mai bune cunoștințe ale noastre.', 'pl': 'Dorozumiane rozpoznawanie relacji dyskursowych jest trudnym zadaniem, ponieważ przewidywanie relacji bez wyraźnych łączników w parsowaniu dyskursu wymaga zrozumienia przedziałów tekstowych i nie może być łatwo wyodrębnione z cech powierzchniowych z par zdań wejściowych. Dlatego właściwe przedstawienie tekstu jest bardzo istotne dla tego zadania. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy model rozszerzony o różne ziarniste reprezentacje tekstowe, w tym poziomy znaków, podsłów, słów, zdań i par zdań. Proponowany głębszy model jest oceniany na benchmarkowym brzegu drzewa i osiąga najnowocześniejszą dokładność z większą niż 48% w 11-kierunkowej oraz wynik F1 większy niż 50% w 4-kierunkowych klasyfikacjach po raz pierwszy według naszej najlepszej wiedzy.', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ харилцааны харилцааны харилцаа танихын тулд хэцүү зүйл бол ярианы хуваалцааны тухай тодорхой холбоотой холбоотой байдлаар ярианы хуваалцааны харилцааны тухай хэцүү зүйл юм. Тэгээд хэвлэлийн холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой байд Тиймээс, текстийг зөв илэрхийлэх нь энэ үйл ажилд маш чухал. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөр өөр тарианы хэлбэрээр нэмэгдсэн загварыг санал болгож байна. Харин тэмдэгт, суб үг, үг, өгүүлбэр, өгүүлбэр хоёр хэмжээтэй. Илүү гүн гүнзгий загварын загвар нь хэмжээний загвар дээр дүгнэж, бидний хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй анхны удаа 48%-аас илүү тохиромжтой, F1-аас 50%-аас илүү тохиромжтой байдаг.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada xiriirka hadalka adag waa shaqo dhibaato ah, sababtoo ah wax la sii sheegayo xiriirka, iyadoon la xiriir cad oo lagu hadlin waxay u baahan tahay wax garashada qoraalka ah, islamarkaasna si fudud looma soo saari karo qeybaha dhulka laga soo saaray labada xafiiska lagu qoro. Sidaas darteed si hagaagsan u dhigista qoraalka waa muhiim u ah shaqadan. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model lagu kordhiyey oo ay leeyihiin noocyo kala duduwan oo qoraal ah, tusaale ahaan xaraf, hadal, hadal, sentence iyo labada heer. Tusaale hoos loo soo jeeday waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa taariikhda farshaxanka, wuxuuna gaadhaa saxda xaaladda farshaxanka oo ka weyn 48% jidka 11- iyo F1 koox ka badan 50% oo ku qoran fasaxyada 4-qaabka ugu horeysa sida aqoontayada ugu fiican.', 'sv': 'Implicit diskursrelationsgenomenk채nning 채r en utmanande uppgift eftersom relationsprognosen utan explicita kopplingar i diskurstolkning beh철ver f철rst책else av textspann och inte l채tt kan h채rledas fr책n ytfunktioner fr책n inmatningspararen. D채rf철r 채r det mycket viktigt att korrekt representera texten f철r denna uppgift. I denna uppsats f철resl책r vi en modell f철rst채rkt med olika korniga textrepresentationer, inklusive tecken, underord, ord, mening och meningspar niv책er. Den f철reslagna djupare modellen utv채rderas p책 benchmark treebank och uppn책r toppmodern noggrannhet med mer 채n 48% i 11-v채gs och F1 po채ng st철rre 채n 50% i 4-v채gs klassificeringar f철r f철rsta g책ngen enligt v책r b채sta kunskap.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නය කතාවක් සම්බන්ධය අඳුරණය තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ සම්බන්ධය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධය නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200d ඉතින්, පාළුව හරියටම ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්නේ මේ වැඩේ ගොඩක් වැදගත්තා. මේ පත්තරයේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා වෙනස් පැත්තක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්, අක්ෂර, සබ්වර්ඩ, වචන, වාක්ය, වචන ස සැලසුම් වෙනුවෙන් වඩා ගොඩක් මොඩේල් එක්ක බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් ට්\u200dරෙබැන්ක් එක්ක විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම අපේ හොඳම දන්නවට අනුවෙන් ස්ථානයක් 48% වඩා වැඩි ව', 'sr': 'Implicitno prepoznavanje veza sa diskusijama je izazovan zadatak kao predviđanje veze bez objašnjih veza u analiziranju diskusija potrebno je razumevanje tekstskih prostora i ne može se lako izvući iz površinskih karakteristika iz parova rečenice za ulazak. Dakle, pravilno predstavljanje teksta je vrlo važno za ovaj zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo model povećan sa različitim predstavljanjem teksta, uključujući karakter, podreč, reč, rečenicu i razinu rečenica. Predloženi dublji model se procjenjuje na benchmarku i postiže tačnost države umjetnosti sa većim od 48% na 11-putu i rezultat F1 veći od 50% na 4-putnom klasifikaciji po prvi put prema našim najboljim znanjima.', 'ta': 'பேச்சு பாடலில் வெளிப்படையான இணைப்புகள் இல்லாமல் தொடர்பு பேச்சு புரிந்து கொள்ளும் பேச்சு தொடர்பு குறிப்பிடுதல் ஒரு சவாலிக்கும் பணியாகும் என்பதா எனவே, உரையை சரியாக குறிப்பிடுவது இந்த பணிக்கு மிகவும் முக்கியமானது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வேறு கிடைக்கப்பட்ட உரை குறிப்பிட்ட மாதிரியை மேம்படுத்துகிறோம், எழுத்து, துணை சொல், வாக்கு, மற்றும்  இந்த பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட ஆழமான மாதிரி பெங்க்காங் மீது மதிப்பெடுக்கப்படுகிறது மற்றும் சிறந்த அறிவு போன்ற முதல் முறையில் 48% அதிகமாக நிலையை பெறுகிறது மற்றும் F', 'ur': 'مشخص گفتگو رابطہ معلوم کرنے کا ایک مشکل کام ہے جیسے رابطہ پیش بینی کے بغیر صریح اتصال کرنے کی ضرورت ہے کہ متن فضا کا سمجھ سکے اور سطح فرصت سے آسانی طرح اتصال نہیں سکے اس طرح، اس متن کو اچھی طرح دکھا دینا اس کام کے لئے بہت اہم ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک موڈل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو مختلف دانے کے متن کی نمونات کے ساتھ اضافہ کی گئی ہے، شامل کرتور، سوبرویڈ، کلم، کلم، اور جماعت دو سطح کے ساتھ۔ پیشنهاد سے زیادہ عمیق موڈل بنچم مارک تری بنک پر ارزش کیا گیا ہے اور ہمارے بہترین علم کے مطابق 48% سے زیادہ ہے اور F1 اسکور سے 50% سے زیادہ ہے چوتھی طریق کلاسیفوں میں پہلی بار پہنچا جاتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Shunday qilib, bu vazifa juda muhim. Bu hujjatda, biz boshqa grafik matn representlari bilan qo'shilgan modelni boshqa shakllar bilan qo'llanmalamiz. Hujjatning, tub soʻz, so'z, so'zlar, va gapiring ikki darajasi. Koʻrib chiqish modeli benchmark treebbank'da qiymat qiladi va eng yaxshi ma'lumot bilan 48% dan ko'proq bo'ladi, va F1'ning birinchi darajadagi birinchi darajadagi birinchi darajadagi 50% dan ortiq birinchi darajaga ega bo'ladi.", 'vi': "Nhận dạng quan hệ ngôn ngữ ngầm là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn như dự đoán mối quan hệ mà không có kết nối trực tiếp trong cuộc thảo luận phân tích nhu cầu hiểu biết của văn bản bao trùm và không thể dễ dàng bắt nguồn từ các tính năng bề mặt từ cặp câu nhập. Vì vậy, một người thực sự một người rất quan trọng trong nhiệm vụ này. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình được tăng thêm với các biểu tượng văn bản đã được xây dựng khác nhau, gồm chữ ký, chữ, từ, câu, và mức độ cặp câu. The proposed deeper model được đánh giá trên the referend treeback và quả là quả chính xác cao hơn 48=* in 11-way và F1 score more than 50='in 4-way classifications for the first time under our best knowledge.", 'bg': 'Признаването на имплицитната дискурсна връзка е предизвикателна задача, тъй като предсказването на връзката без изрични съединения в дискурсния анализ изисква разбиране на текстовите интервали и не може лесно да бъде извлечено от повърхностните характеристики на входните двойки изречения. По този начин правилното представяне на текста е от решаващо значение за тази задача. В тази статия предлагаме модел, допълнен с различни текстови изображения, включително символи, поддума, дума, изречение и двойка изречения. Предложеният по-задълбочен модел се оценява на референтната дървесна лента и постига най-съвременна точност с по-голяма от 48% при 11-степенни класификации и по-голяма от 50% при 4-степенни класификации за първи път според най-добрите ни познания.', 'nl': 'Implicite discoursrelatierekening herkenning is een uitdagende taak, aangezien de relatieprognitie zonder expliciete connectieven in discoursparsing begrip nodig heeft van tekstoverspanningen en niet gemakkelijk kan worden afgeleid van oppervlaktekenmerken van de invoerzinsparen. Daarom is een goede weergave van de tekst van cruciaal belang voor deze taak. In dit artikel stellen we een model voor dat is uitgebreid met verschillende korrelige tekstrepresentaties, inclusief teken-, subwoord-, woord-, zin- en zinsparenniveaus. Het voorgestelde diepere model wordt geëvalueerd op de benchmark boombank en bereikt state-of-the-art nauwkeurigheid met meer dan 48% in 11-weg en F1 score groter dan 50% in 4-weg classificaties voor het eerst volgens onze beste kennis.', 'da': 'Implicit diskursrelationsgenkendelse er en udfordrende opgave, da relationsforudsigelsen uden eksplicitte forbindelser i diskursanalyse kræver forståelse af tekstspænder og ikke let kan udledes af overfladefunktioner fra input sætningsparene. En korrekt repræsentation af teksten er derfor meget afgørende for denne opgave. I denne artikel foreslår vi en model forstærket med forskellige kornede tekstrepræsentationer, herunder tegn-, underord-, ord-, sætning- og sætningsparniveauer. Den foreslåede dybere model er evalueret på benchmark træbanen og opnår state-of-the-art nøjagtighed med mere end 48% i 11-vejs og F1 score større end 50% i 4-vejs klassifikationer for første gang ifølge vores bedste viden.', 'de': 'Die implizite Erkennung von Diskursbeziehungen ist eine herausfordernde Aufgabe, da die Beziehungsvorhersage ohne explizite Konnektive im Diskursparsing Verständnis von Textspannen erfordert und nicht einfach aus Oberflächenmerkmalen der Eingabesatzpaare abgeleitet werden kann. Daher ist die korrekte Darstellung des Textes für diese Aufgabe von entscheidender Bedeutung. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein Modell vor, das um verschiedene körnige Textdarstellungen erweitert wird, einschließlich Zeichen-, Unterwort-, Wort-, Satz- und Satzpaarenebenen. Das vorgeschlagene tiefere Modell wird an der Benchmark-Baumbank evaluiert und erzielt erstmals in 4-Wege-Klassifikationen mehr als 48% Genauigkeit bei 11-Wege und F1-Score über 50% in 4-Wege-Klassifikationen nach bestem Wissen.', 'id': 'Pengenalan hubungan diskors implicit adalah tugas yang menantang sebagai prediksi hubungan tanpa konektif eksplicit dalam penghuraian diskors membutuhkan pemahaman jangkauan teks dan tidak dapat mudah diproduksi dari fitur permukaan dari pasangan kalimat masukan. Jadi, mewakili teks dengan benar sangat penting untuk tugas ini. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan model yang ditambah dengan representation teks yang berbeda, termasuk karakter, subkata, kata, kalimat, dan tingkat pasangan kalimat. The proposed deeper model is evaluated on the benchmark treebank and achieves state-of-the-art accuracy with greater than 48% in 11-way and F1 score greater than 50% in 4-way classifications for the first time according to our best knowledge.', 'fa': 'تعریف ارتباط مشخص یک کار سخت\u200cکننده است به عنوان پیش\u200cبینی ارتباط بدون ارتباط\u200cهای مشخص در بررسی سخنرانی نیاز به فهمیدن فضای متن است و نمی\u200cتواند آسان از ویژه\u200cهای سطح از جفت جمله وارد شود. بنابراین، دقیقاً نمایش متن برای این کار بسیار مهم است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با نمایش\u200cهای متن متفاوت متفاوت، شامل شخصیت، زیر کلمه، کلمه، جمله و سطح جفت جمله\u200cها بیشتر شده است. این مدل عمیق ترین پیشنهاد بر روی تخت\u200cبندی\u200cها ارزیابی می\u200cشود و دقیقات موقعیت هنر با بیشتر از 48 درصد در ۱۱ راه و نمره\u200cبندی F1 بیشتر از 50 درصد در ۴ راه برای اولین بار بر اساس بهترین دانش ما می\u200cرسد.', 'ko': '내은어편 관계 식별은 도전적인 임무이다. 어편 분석에서 외현 연결어의 관계 예측이 없으면 어편의 넓이를 이해해야 하고 입력 문장이 맞는 표면적 특징에서 얻기 어렵다.따라서 텍스트를 정확하게 표현하는 것이 이 임무에 매우 중요하다.본고에서 우리는 서로 다른 입도 텍스트 표시를 확장하는 모델을 제시했는데 문자, 하위 단어, 단어, 문장과 문장 대조 단계를 포함한다.우리의 최상의 지식에 따라 건의한 더욱 깊은 차원 모델은 기준 트리 라이브러리에서 평가를 실시하여 가장 선진적인 정밀도에 도달했다. 11방향 분류의 정확도는 48%를 넘었고 4방향 분류의 F1은 처음으로 50%를 넘었다.', 'tr': 'Gezgi gabdalyk tanamak üçin çykyş täze bir täblikdir. Diskusiýa içinde explicit baglaýyşlar bolmadyk üçin metin gabdalyklaryň düşünmesi gerek we girdi sözlemden ýeňe çykyp bilmez. Bu şekilde metin doğrudan temsil etmesi bu göreve çok önemli. Bu kagyzda farklı türden metin temsilleri bilen genişleşen bir modeli teklif edip görýäris. Karakter, alt söz, sözlem we sözlem çift derejesi dahil. Görkezilen çukur nusgasynda çukur çukur çukurunda deňlenýär we biziň iň gowy bilgimize görä 48% ýoluň derejesini 11 ýoluň we F1 sanatynda 50% ýoluň derejesini 4 ýoluň derejesinde birinji gezek tapylýar.', 'sw': 'Implicit discourse relation recognition is a challenging task as the relation prediction without explicit connectives in discourse parsing needs understanding of text spans and cannot be easily derived from surface features from the input sentence pairs.  Kwa hiyo, kuwakilisha maandishi ni muhimu sana kwa kazi hii. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza muundo ulioongezwa na uwakilishi tofauti wa maandishi, ikiwa ni pamoja na mhusika, maneno, hukumu, na kuhukumiwa viwango viwili. Mradi wa kina unapendekezwa unavutiwa kwenye mitandao ya bendera na kupata ukweli wa hali ya sanaa kwa zaidi ya asilimia 48 kwa njia 11 na F1 score zaidi ya asilimia 50 kwa njia 4 kwa mara ya kwanza kwa mujibu wa maarifa yetu bora.', 'sq': 'Njohja implicitete e lidhjes diskursore është një detyrë sfiduese pasi parashikimi i lidhjeve pa lidhje eksplicite në analizimin e diskursave ka nevojë për kuptim të zgjatjeve të tekstit dhe nuk mund të nxirret lehtë nga karakteristikat e sipërfaqes nga çiftet e fjalëve të hyrjes. Kështu, përfaqësimi i duhur i tekstit është shumë vendimtar për këtë detyrë. In this paper, we propose a model augmented with different grained text representations, including character, subword, word, sentence, and sentence pair levels.  Modeli më i thellë i propozuar vlerësohet në bazën e pemëve të referimit dhe arrin saktësinë më të lartë me më shumë se 48% në 11-anë dhe rezultatet F1 më të lartë se 50% në klasifikimet 4-anë për herë të parë sipas njohurive tona më të mira.', 'am': 'የንግግር ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ግንኙነት አቀማመጥ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህ ጽሑፉን በመጠቀም ለዚህ ስራ በጣም አስቸጋሪ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተለየ የጽሑፍ መልዕክቶች፣ አካላት፣ ደብዳቤ፣ ቃል፣ ቃል፣ ፍርድ እና የፍርድ ሁለት ደረጃዎች ያሉትን እናስባለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ጥልቅ ሞዴል በአውቀታችን በመጀመሪያው እውቀት የተመሳሳይ እውቀት ላይ ከ48% የበለጠ የዓለማት ትክክል ሀብት እንዲያገኝ ነው፡፡', 'hr': 'Implicitno prepoznavanje veze s pričom o diskusiji je izazovan zadatak kao predviđanje veze bez objašnjih veza u analiziranju diskusija potrebno je razumijevanje tekstskih prostora i ne može se lako izvući iz površinskih karakteristika iz parova ulazne rečenice. Stoga je pravilno predstavljanje teksta vrlo važno za ovaj zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo model povećan sa različitim predstavljanjem teksta zrnca, uključujući karakter, podriječ, riječ, rečenicu i razinu par rečenica. Predloženi dublji model procjenjuje se na stambenoj bazi i postiže tačnost stanja umjetnosti s većim od 48% na 11 načina i rezultat F1 veći od 50% u klasifikaciji 4 puta po prvi put prema našim najboljim znanjima.', 'af': "Implisite diskursie verwanting van herkening is 'n pragtige taak as die verwanting voorskou sonder eksplisiese koppelinge in diskursie verwerking benodig verstanding van teks spans en kan nie maklik afgelei word van die oorspronklike funksies van die invoer sin paar. So, regverdig verteenwoording van die teks is baie belangrik vir hierdie taak. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n model wat vergroot is met verskillende kornerde teks voorstellings, insluitend karakter, subwoord, woord, seting en sin paar vlakke. Die voorgestelde dieper model is evalueer op die benchmark-treebank en bereik staat-van-kuns-presies met groter as 48% in 11 maniere en F1-telling groter as 50% in 4-maniere klasifikasies vir die eerste keer volgens ons beste kennis.", 'az': 'Sözümlü söhbət əlaqəsi tanımlaması çətin bir işdir. Sözümlü söhbətlərdə a çıq bağlantılar olmadan mətn uzaqlarını anlamaq lazımdır və giriş sözlərinin çiftlərindən asanlıqla üzərində fərqli xüsusiyyətlərdən alınmaz. Beləliklə, məktubun düzgün göstəricisi bu işin üçün çox vacibdir. Bu kağızda, müxtəlif dənli mətn göstəriciləri ilə artırılmış modeli təklif edirik, karakter, alt söz, sözlər, cümlələr və cümlələr çift səviyyələri də dahil olacaq. Ən yaxşı biliyimizə görə təklif edilən ən ən derin model benchmark çubuğunda değerlənir və 11 dəfə 48%-dən daha yüksək və F1 dəfə 4 dəfə klasifikasiyada 50%-dən daha yüksək dəfə ilk dəfə müəyyən edilir.', 'hy': 'Խոսքի հարաբերությունների աննշանակալի ճանաչելը դժվար խնդիր է, քանի որ հարաբերությունների կանխատեսումը առանց բացատրական կապերի խոսքի վերլուծում կարիք ունի տեքստի տարածությունների հասկանալու և դրանք հեշտությամբ Այսպիսով, տեքստի ճիշտ ներկայացումը շատ կարևոր է այս խնդրի համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մոդել, որը աճեցված է տարբեր հատիկ տեքստի ներկայացումներով, ներառյալ բնույթը, ենթաբառը, բառը, նախադասությունը և նախադասությունների զույգ մակարդակները: Առաջին անգամ մեր լավագույն գիտելիքների համաձայն, առաջարկած ավելի խորը մոդելը գնահատվում է հարաբերականների ծառի հիմքում և հասնում է լավագույն ճշգրտության 48 տոկոսից ավելին, իսկ F1-ը 50 տոկոսից ավելին:', 'ca': "El reconeixement implícit de la relació discursiva és una tasca desafiadora, com la predicció de la relació sense connexions explícites en l'analització discursiva necessita entendre l'espai de text i no es pot derivar fàcilment de característiques superficials dels parells de frases d'entrada. Així que representar el text adequadament és molt crucial per a aquesta tasca. En aquest paper, proposem un model augmentat amb diferents representacions de text granulat, incloent caràcter, subparaula, paraula, frase i nivells de parell de frases. El model més profund proposat es valora a la base d'arbres de referència i aconsegueix una precisió més avançada amb més del 48% en 11 direccions i una puntuació F1 més del 50% en 4 direccions per primera vegada segons el nostre millor coneixement.", 'bn': 'কথোপকথনের স্বীকৃতি হচ্ছে একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ কাজ, যেহেতু কথোপকথনে পার্সিং পার্সিং এর স্পষ্ট সংযোগ ছাড়া সম্পর্কের ভবিষ্যৎবাণী ছাড়া প্রয়োজনীয় সংযোগ লা তাই এই কাজের জন্য লেখাটিকে সঠিকভাবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা খুবই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। In this paper, we propose a model augmented with different grained text representations, including character, subword, word, sentence, and sentence pair levels.  প্রস্তাবিত গভীর মডেল বেনম্যার্ক ট্রেবাঙ্কে মূল্য করা হয় এবং আমাদের সেরা জ্ঞান অনুসারে প্রথমবারে ৪০% বেশী ৪০% এবং এফ১ স্কোরে ৫০% বেশী বিভাগের জন্যে প্রথমবা', 'bs': 'Implicitno prepoznavanje veze s vezama je izazovan zadatak kao predviđanje veze bez objašnjih veza u analiziranju diskusija potrebno je razumijevanje tekstskih prostora i ne može se lako izvući iz površinskih karakteristika iz parova ulazne rečenice. Dakle, propisno predstavljanje teksta je vrlo važno za ovaj zadatak. U ovom papiru predlažemo model povećan sa različitim predstavljanjem teksta, uključujući karakter, podriječ, reč, rečenicu i razinu par rečenica. Predloženi dublji model se procjenjuje na stambenoj bazi i postiže tačnost stanja umjetnosti sa većim od 48% na 11 načina i rezultat F1 veći od 50% u klasifikaciji 4 puta po prvi put prema našim najboljim znanjima.', 'cs': 'Implicitní rozpoznávání diskurzních vztahů je náročným úkolem, protože predikce vztahů bez explicitních konektivů při analýze diskurzu vyžaduje porozumění textovým rozpětím a nelze snadno odvodit z povrchových rysů ze vstupních vět. Správné zastoupení textu je proto pro tento úkol velmi důležité. V tomto článku navrhujeme model rozšířený o různé zrnité textové reprezentace, včetně úrovní znaků, podslov, slova, věty a větových dvojic. Navržený hlubší model je hodnocen na benchmarkovém stromovém břehu a dosahuje nejmodernější přesnosti s větší než 48% v 11-cestném a F1 skóre větší než 50% ve čtyřcestných klasifikacích poprvé podle našich nejlepších znalostí.', 'fi': 'Diskurssisuhteen implisiittinen tunnistaminen on haastava tehtävä, sillä suhdeennuste ilman eksplisiittisiä yhteyksiä diskurssin jäsentämisessä edellyttää tekstin laajuuden ymmärtämistä eikä sitä voi helposti johtaa syötetyn lauseparin pintaominaisuuksista. Näin ollen tekstin asianmukainen esittäminen on erittäin tärkeää tämän tehtävän kannalta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme mallia, jota täydennetään erilaisilla rakeisilla tekstiesityksillä, kuten merkki-, alasana-, sana-, lause- ja lauseparitasoilla. Ehdotettu syvempi malli arvioidaan vertailupuupenkillä ja saavuttaa huipputason tarkkuudella yli 48% 11-suuntaisissa ja F1-pisteet yli 50% 4-suuntaisissa luokituksissa ensimmäistä kertaa parhaan tietomme mukaan.', 'et': 'Diskursussuhete kaudne äratundmine on keeruline ülesanne, sest suhete ennustamine ilma selgete seosteta diskursuse parsimisel vajab arusaamist tekstiulatustest ja seda ei saa lihtsalt tuletada sisendlausepaaride pinnalistest omadustest. Seega on teksti nõuetekohane esitamine selle ülesande jaoks väga oluline. Käesolevas töös pakume välja mudeli, mis on täiendatud erinevate teraliste tekstikujutistega, sealhulgas märgi-, alamsõna-, sõna-, lause- ja lausepaari tasemetega. Kavandatud sügavamat mudelit hinnatakse võrdlusalusel ja see saavutab kaasaegse täpsusega 11-suunalises klassifikatsioonis üle 48% ja F1 skoori üle 50% 4-suunalises klassifikatsioonis vastavalt meie parimatele teadmistele.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepulan iki, kita supoyo model sing nyusane nggawe gambar teka nambah, nambah cara, gambar, kelas, sandi lan kelas telas. Global', 'ha': "Sunana da mazaɓa na mazaɓa mai ƙunci shi ne mai zartar da aikin muhimmin da ba'a da shiryoyi masu bayyani ba a cikin mazaɓa na magana, yana da amfani da fahimtar fassaran matsayi kuma bã za a iya iya amfani da sauƙi daga fassarar bayani daga mazaɓan cikin mazaɓa. Saboda haka, a halartar littãfi na da muhimu zuwa wannan aikin. Ga wannan takardan, Munã goyyade wata motel wanda aka ƙara shi da wasu shiryoyin matsayin dabam-dabam, kamar karatar, bincike, kalma, maganar, da maganar, da cewa guda biyu. Ana ƙaddara shirin da aka faɗa mafi ƙaranci a kan bangon-bangon na kuma yana sãmu halin-halin-sanar da mafi girma daga 48% cikin hanyar 11 kuma F1 score mafi ƙaranci daga 50% cikin fassarar 4 na farkon da aka sani.", 'he': 'זיהוי יחסי דיבור משמעותי הוא משימה מאתגרת כחיזוי היחסים ללא קשרים ברורים בבדיקת דיבורים זקוקים להבנה של רחבות טקסט ולא ניתן להוציא בקלות מאפיקסי פני משפט הכניסה. Thus, properly representing the text is very crucial to this task.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל שמוסיף ביציגות טקסט שונות, כולל אופי, מילה, משפט ורמות זוג משפטים. המודל העמוק ביותר המוצע מוערך על בנק עץ המרמז ומשיג מדויקת מוקדמת עם יותר מ-48% ב-11 כיוונים ו-F1 נקודות גדולות מ-50% ב-4 כיוונים בפעם הראשונה לפי הידע הטוב ביותר שלנו.', 'sk': 'Implicitno prepoznavanje diskurznih relacij je zahtevna naloga, saj napovedovanje relacij brez eksplicitnih povezav pri razčlenitvi diskurza potrebuje razumevanje razponov besedila in ga ni mogoče zlahka izpeljati iz površinskih značilnosti vhodnih stavkov. Zato je pravilna predstavitev besedila zelo pomembna za to nalogo. V prispevku predlagamo model, dopolnjen z različnimi zrnatimi besedilnimi predstavitvami, vključno z ravnmi znakov, podbesed, besed, stavkov in stavkovnih parov. Predlagani globlji model je ocenjen na referenčni plošči dreves in doseže najsodobnejšo natančnost z več kot 48% pri 11-smernih in rezultati F1 več kot 50% pri 4-smernih klasifikacijah po našem najboljšem znanju.', 'bo': 'Implicit discourse relation recognition is a challenging task as the relation prediction without explicit connectives in discourse parsing needs understanding of text spans and cannot be easily derived from surface features from the input sentence pairs. དེར་བརྟེན། ཡི་གེའི་རིགས་ལ་སྟབས་བདེ་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ནི་བྱ་བ་འདི་ལ་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡིན། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་མ་འདྲ་བ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་འདྲ་བའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Modeling Coherence for Neural Machine Translation with Dynamic and Topic Caches', 'ar': 'نمذجة التماسك للترجمة الآلية العصبية باستخدام ذاكرة التخزين المؤقت الديناميكية والموضوعية', 'es': 'Modelado de coherencia para la traducción automática neuronal con cachés de temas y dinámicos', 'fr': 'Modélisation de la cohérence pour la traduction automatique neuronale avec des caches dynamiques et thématiques', 'pt': 'Coerência de modelagem para tradução automática neural com caches dinâmicos e de tópicos', 'ja': 'ダイナミックキャッシュとトピックキャッシュを使用したニューラルマシン翻訳のためのモデリングコヒーレンス', 'zh': '用动与题缓存神经机器翻译之一致性建模', 'hi': 'गतिशील और विषय कैश के साथ तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए मॉडलिंग सुसंगतता', 'ru': 'Моделирование когерентности для нейронного машинного перевода с динамическими и тематическими кэшами', 'ga': 'Comhleanúnachas a Shamhaltú le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach le Taiscí Dinimiciúla agus Ábhair', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση Συνοχής για Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση με δυναμικές και θεματικές Αποθήκες', 'hu': 'Koherencia modellezése a neurális gépi fordításhoz dinamikus és téma gyorsítótárakkal', 'it': 'Coerenza di modellazione per la traduzione automatica neurale con cache dinamiche e argomenti', 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašinų vertimo dinaminiais ir teminiais lašais suderinamumo modeliavimas', 'mk': 'Моделирање на Коеренцијата за превод на неврални машини со динамични и темски кеши', 'kk': 'Динамикалық және нақыштар кэшілерімен нейрондық машинаның аудармасының координациясын үлгілеу', 'mt': 'Mudellar ta’ Koerenza għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Magni Newrali b’Caches Dinamiċi u Topiċi', 'mn': 'Динамик болон сэдэв хаягтай мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн соёлын загвар', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'no': 'Modellering av koherens for neuromaskinsomsetjing med dynamiske og temamellomlager', 'pl': 'Spójność modelowania dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego za pomocą pamięci podręcznej dynamicznej i tematycznej', 'sr': 'Modeliranje koherencije za prevod neuroloških mašina sa dinamičnim i temskim kavetom', 'so': 'Modeling Coherence for Neural machine Translation with Dynamic and Topic Caches', 'ro': 'Modelarea coerenței pentru traducerea automată neurală cu cache-uri dinamice și subiecte', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාව සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න කැච්ස් එක්ක න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය සඳහා මෝඩේල් එක්ක සංවේද', 'sv': 'Modellering av samstämmighet för neural maskinöversättning med dynamiska cacher och ämnescacher', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ڈینامیک اور ٹوپیک کیچ کے ساتھ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے موڈلینگ', 'uz': 'Modeling Coherence for Neural Machine Translation with Dynamic and Topic Caches', 'vi': 'Sự hợp tác giữa các máy thần kinh Dịch với các Xương rồng động và chủ', 'bg': 'Моделиране на съгласуваност за неврален машинен превод с динамични и тематични кешове', 'nl': 'Coherentie modelleren voor neuronale machinevertaling met dynamische en thematische caches', 'hr': 'Modeliranje pristojnosti neurološkog prevoda strojeva sa dinamičnim i temskim kavetom', 'da': 'Modellering af sammenhæng til neural maskinoversættelse med dynamiske og emne caches', 'id': 'Modeling Coherence for Neural Machine Translation with Dynamic and Topic Caches', 'de': 'Modellierung von Kohärenz für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit dynamischen und thematischen Caches', 'ko': '동적 및 테마 캐시 기반 신경기계 번역 일치성 모델링', 'tr': 'Nural Maşynyň terjimesini dinamik we tema ködlemeleri bilen örän nusgasy', 'sw': 'Utafsiri wa Mashine ya Njerumani kwa Utafiti wa Kidynami na Mipango ya Maudhui', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cسازی هماهنگی برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی با محل\u200cهای دینامیک و موضوع', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Modelimi i Koerencës për Translacionin e Makinës Neurale me Caches Dinamike dhe Topike', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելավորում', 'az': 'Dinamik və məsələn Cənnətlərlə nöral mašin tercüməsinə uyğunluğu modelləyir', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Modeliranje koherencije za neuronski prevod strojeva sa dinamičnim i temskim kavetom', 'ca': 'Modelar la coerència per a la traducció de màquines neuronals amb galetes dinàmiques i temàtiques', 'cs': 'Modelování koherence pro neuronový strojový překlad s dynamickými a tématickými cachami', 'et': 'Neuraalse masintõlke sidususe modelleerimine dünaamiliste ja teemavahemäludega', 'fi': 'Neuraalisen konekäännöksen johdonmukaisuuden mallintaminen dynaamisilla ja aihevälimuisteilla', 'jv': 'Ngubah Kemerdekaan kanggo Perintah Jejaral kang Dinaman karo Temik', 'he': 'מודל התקבילות לתרגום מכונות נוירות עם עוגיות דינמיות ונושאיות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Modeliranje skladnosti za nevralno strojno prevajanje z dinamičnimi in tematskimi predpomnilniki', 'bo': 'ནུས་མཐུན་དང་གནད་དོན་མཛོད་ཁང་གི་འགོ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་མཐུན་མཐུན་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Sentences in a well-formed text are connected to each other via various links to form the cohesive structure of the text. Current neural machine translation (NMT) systems translate a text in a conventional sentence-by-sentence fashion, ignoring such cross-sentence links and dependencies. This may lead to generate an incoherent target text for a coherent source text. In order to handle this issue, we propose a cache-based approach to modeling coherence for neural machine translation by capturing contextual information either from recently translated sentences or the entire document. Particularly, we explore two types of caches : a dynamic cache, which stores words from the best translation hypotheses of preceding sentences, and a topic cache, which maintains a set of target-side topical words that are semantically related to the document to be translated. On this basis, we build a new layer to score target words in these two caches with a cache-based neural model. Here the estimated probabilities from the cache-based neural model are combined with NMT probabilities into the final word prediction probabilities via a gating mechanism. Finally, the proposed cache-based neural model is trained jointly with NMT system in an end-to-end manner. Experiments and analysis presented in this paper demonstrate that the proposed cache-based model achieves substantial improvements over several state-of-the-art SMT and NMT baselines.', 'ar': 'ترتبط الجمل في نص جيد التنسيق ببعضها البعض عبر روابط مختلفة لتشكيل بنية متماسكة للنص. تقوم أنظمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية الحالية (NMT) بترجمة النص بطريقة تقليدية جملة بجملة ، متجاهلة روابط الجملة المتقاطعة والتبعيات. قد يؤدي هذا إلى إنشاء نص هدف غير متماسك لنص مصدر متماسك. للتعامل مع هذه المشكلة ، نقترح نهجًا قائمًا على ذاكرة التخزين المؤقت لنمذجة التماسك للترجمة الآلية العصبية من خلال التقاط المعلومات السياقية إما من الجمل المترجمة حديثًا أو المستند بأكمله. على وجه الخصوص ، نستكشف نوعين من ذاكرات التخزين المؤقت: ذاكرة التخزين المؤقت الديناميكية ، والتي تخزن الكلمات من أفضل فرضيات الترجمة للجمل السابقة ، وذاكرة التخزين المؤقت للموضوع ، والتي تحافظ على مجموعة من الكلمات الموضوعية من الجانب المستهدف والتي ترتبط ارتباطًا معنويًا بالمستند المراد ترجمته . على هذا الأساس ، قمنا ببناء طبقة جديدة لتسجيل الكلمات المستهدفة في هاتين المخبأين باستخدام نموذج عصبي قائم على ذاكرة التخزين المؤقت. هنا يتم دمج الاحتمالات المقدرة من النموذج العصبي القائم على ذاكرة التخزين المؤقت مع احتمالات NMT في احتمالات التنبؤ بالكلمة النهائية عبر آلية بوابة. أخيرًا ، يتم تدريب النموذج العصبي المقترح المستند إلى ذاكرة التخزين المؤقت بالاشتراك مع نظام NMT بطريقة شاملة. توضح التجارب والتحليلات المقدمة في هذه الورقة أن النموذج المقترح المستند إلى ذاكرة التخزين المؤقت يحقق تحسينات جوهرية على العديد من خطوط الأساس SMT و NMT الحديثة.', 'fr': "Les phrases d'un texte bien formé sont reliées les unes aux autres par divers liens afin de former la structure cohérente du texte. Les systèmes actuels de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) traduisent un texte de façon conventionnelle phrase par phrase, en ignorant ces liens et dépendances entre phrases. Cela peut entraîner la génération d'un texte cible incohérent pour un texte source cohérent. Afin de résoudre ce problème, nous proposons une approche basée sur le cache pour modéliser la cohérence pour la traduction automatique neuronale en capturant des informations contextuelles provenant de phrases récemment traduites ou de l'ensemble du document. En particulier, nous explorons deux types de caches\xa0: un cache dynamique, qui stocke les mots issus des meilleures hypothèses de traduction des phrases précédentes, et un cache de sujet, qui conserve un ensemble de mots thématiques côté cible qui sont sémantiquement liés au document à traduire. Sur cette base, nous créons une nouvelle couche pour évaluer les mots cibles dans ces deux caches à l'aide d'un modèle neuronal basé sur le cache. Ici, les probabilités estimées à partir du modèle neuronal basé sur le cache sont combinées avec les probabilités NMT dans les probabilités de prédiction de mots finaux via un mécanisme de portillonnage. Enfin, le modèle neuronal basé sur le cache proposé est entraîné conjointement avec le système NMT de bout en bout. Les expériences et les analyses présentées dans cet article démontrent que le modèle basé sur le cache proposé permet d'obtenir des améliorations substantielles par rapport à plusieurs lignes de base SMT et NMT de pointe.", 'pt': 'As frases em um texto bem formado são conectadas umas às outras por meio de vários links para formar a estrutura coesa do texto. Os sistemas atuais de tradução automática neural (NMT) traduzem um texto de uma maneira convencional frase por frase, ignorando esses links e dependências de frase cruzada. Isso pode levar à geração de um texto-alvo incoerente para um texto-fonte coerente. Para lidar com esse problema, propomos uma abordagem baseada em cache para modelar a coerência para tradução automática neural capturando informações contextuais de frases recentemente traduzidas ou de todo o documento. Particularmente, exploramos dois tipos de caches: um cache dinâmico, que armazena palavras das melhores hipóteses de tradução de frases anteriores, e um cache de tópicos, que mantém um conjunto de palavras tópicas do lado-alvo que são semanticamente relacionadas ao documento a ser traduzido . Com base nisso, construímos uma nova camada para pontuar palavras-alvo nesses dois caches com um modelo neural baseado em cache. Aqui, as probabilidades estimadas do modelo neural baseado em cache são combinadas com as probabilidades NMT nas probabilidades de previsão da palavra final por meio de um mecanismo de controle. Por fim, o modelo neural baseado em cache proposto é treinado em conjunto com o sistema NMT de maneira ponta a ponta. Experimentos e análises apresentados neste artigo demonstram que o modelo baseado em cache proposto alcança melhorias substanciais em várias linhas de base SMT e NMT de última geração.', 'es': 'Las oraciones de un texto bien formado se conectan entre sí a través de varios enlaces para formar la estructura cohesiva del texto. Los sistemas actuales de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) traducen un texto de forma convencional frase por frase, ignorando tales vínculos y dependencias entre frases. Esto puede llevar a generar un texto objetivo incoherente para un texto fuente coherente. Para resolver este problema, proponemos un enfoque basado en caché para modelar la coherencia de la traducción automática neuronal mediante la captura de información contextual de frases recientemente traducidas o de todo el documento. En particular, exploramos dos tipos de cachés: un caché dinámico, que almacena palabras de las mejores hipótesis de traducción de las oraciones precedentes, y un caché de temas, que mantiene un conjunto de palabras temáticas del lado del destino que están semánticamente relacionadas con el documento que se va a traducir. Sobre esta base, creamos una nueva capa para puntuar las palabras objetivo en estas dos cachés con un modelo neuronal basado en caché. En este caso, las probabilidades estimadas del modelo neuronal basado en caché se combinan con las probabilidades de NMT en las probabilidades de predicción de palabras finales a través de un mecanismo de activación. Finalmente, el modelo neuronal propuesto basado en caché se entrena conjuntamente con el sistema NMT de manera integral. Los experimentos y análisis presentados en este documento demuestran que el modelo propuesto basado en caché logra mejoras sustanciales con respecto a varias líneas de base SMT y NMT de última generación.', 'ja': '整形されたテキスト内の文章は、様々なリンクを介して互いに接続され、テキストのまとまりのある構造を形成する。 現在のニューラルマシン翻訳（ ＮＭＴ ）システムは、そのようなクロス文章リンク及び依存関係を無視して、従来の文章ごとにテキストを翻訳する。 これは、一貫性のあるソーステキストのために不整合なターゲットテキストを生成することにつながる可能性がある。 この問題に対処するために、私たちは、最近翻訳された文章または文書全体からの文脈情報を取り込むことによって、ニューラル機械翻訳のモデリングコヒーレンスにキャッシュベースのアプローチを提案します。 特に、前文の最適な翻訳仮説からの単語を格納する動的キャッシュと、翻訳されるドキュメントに意味的に関連するターゲット側のトピック単語のセットを維持するトピックキャッシュの2種類のキャッシュを探索します。 これに基づいて、私たちはキャッシュベースのニューラルモデルを使用して、これら2つのキャッシュ内のターゲット単語をスコアリングするための新しいレイヤーを構築します。 ここで、キャッシュベースのニューラルモデルからの推定確率は、ゲーティング機構を介して最終的な単語予測確率にNMT確率と組み合わされる。 最後に、提案されたキャッシュベースのニューラルモデルは、エンドツーエンド方式でNMTシステムと共同でトレーニングされる。 本論文で提示された実験および分析は、提案されたキャッシュベースのモデルが、いくつかの最先端のSMTおよびNMTベースラインにわたって大幅な改善を達成することを実証している。', 'zh': '格式良文本中句,百链接相连,成文本内聚构。 今之神经机器翻译(NMT)统以旧逐句译本,忽乎链接赖。 或致连贯之源文本生不连贯之本。 为此者,立缓存之法,得近译句若全文档上下文信息以拟神经机器翻译一致性。 特探二缓存:动缓存,以存储前数句最佳译假设之单词,及主题缓存,其持一组与译文档语义相关者单词。 于是构一新层,用缓存神经二缓存之单词评分。 于是缓存之神经度概率与NMT概率门控合终单词测概率中。 最后,将所建基于缓存神经模形与NMT系统端到端训练。 本文实验分析表明,基于缓存,先诸SMTNMT基线实质性成。', 'hi': 'एक अच्छी तरह से गठित पाठ में वाक्य पाठ की एकजुट संरचना बनाने के लिए विभिन्न लिंक के माध्यम से एक दूसरे से जुड़े होते हैं। वर्तमान तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) सिस्टम एक पारंपरिक वाक्य-दर-वाक्य फैशन में एक पाठ का अनुवाद करते हैं, इस तरह के क्रॉस-वाक्य लिंक और निर्भरताओं को अनदेखा करते हैं। यह एक सुसंगत स्रोत पाठ के लिए एक असंगत लक्ष्य पाठ उत्पन्न करने के लिए नेतृत्व कर सकते हैं। इस समस्या को संभालने के लिए, हम हाल ही में अनुवादित वाक्यों या पूरे दस्तावेज़ से प्रासंगिक जानकारी पर कब्जा करके तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए मॉडलिंग सुसंगतता के लिए एक कैश-आधारित दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम दो प्रकार के कैश का पता लगाते हैं: एक गतिशील कैश, जो पूर्ववर्ती वाक्यों के सर्वोत्तम अनुवाद परिकल्पनाओं से शब्दों को संग्रहीत करता है, और एक विषय कैश, जो लक्ष्य-साइड सामयिक शब्दों के एक सेट को बनाए रखता है जो अनुवादित होने वाले दस्तावेज़ से शब्दार्थ से संबंधित हैं। इस आधार पर, हम कैश-आधारित तंत्रिका मॉडल के साथ इन दो कैश में लक्ष्य शब्दों को स्कोर करने के लिए एक नई परत का निर्माण करते हैं। यहां कैश-आधारित तंत्रिका मॉडल से अनुमानित संभावनाओं को एनएमटी संभावनाओं के साथ अंतिम शब्द भविष्यवाणी संभावनाओं में एक गेटिंग तंत्र के माध्यम से जोड़ा जाता है। अंत में, प्रस्तावित कैश-आधारित तंत्रिका मॉडल को एनएमटी सिस्टम के साथ संयुक्त रूप से एंड-टू-एंड तरीके से प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। इस पेपर में प्रस्तुत प्रयोगों और विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित कैश-आधारित मॉडल कई अत्याधुनिक एसएमटी और एनएमटी बेसलाइन पर पर्याप्त सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Предложения в хорошо сформированном тексте соединяются друг с другом по различным ссылкам, чтобы сформировать сплоченную структуру текста. Современные системы нейронного машинного перевода (НМП) переводят текст обычным способом по предложениям, игнорируя такие перекрестные связи и зависимости. Это может привести к созданию несогласованного целевого текста для согласованного исходного текста. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем кэшированный подход к моделированию когерентности для нейронного машинного перевода путем захвата контекстной информации либо из недавно переведенных предложений, либо из всего документа. В частности, мы исследуем два типа кэшей: динамический кэш, в котором хранятся слова из лучших гипотез перевода предыдущих предложений, и тематический кэш, в котором поддерживается набор целевых тематических слов, семантически связанных с переводимым документом. На этой основе мы создаем новый слой для оценки целевых слов в этих двух кэшах с помощью нейронной модели на основе кэша. Здесь оценочные вероятности из нейронной модели на основе кэша объединяются с вероятностями NMT в вероятности предсказания окончательного слова через механизм стробирования. Наконец, предлагаемая нейронная модель на основе кэша обучается совместно с системой NMT сквозным образом. Эксперименты и анализ, представленные в этой статье, показывают, что предлагаемая модель на основе кэша достигает существенных улучшений по сравнению с несколькими современными базовыми линиями SMT и NMT.', 'ga': "Nasctar abairtí i dtéacs dea-chumtha lena chéile trí naisc éagsúla chun struchtúr comhtháite an téacs a fhoirmiú. Aistríonn córais néar-aistriúcháin uathoibríocha (NMT) téacs ar bhealach traidisiúnta abairt-ar-abairt, gan aird a thabhairt ar naisc thras-abairtí agus spleáchais dá leithéid. D’fhéadfadh sé go gcruthófar spriocthéacs neamhchomhleanúnach do bhuntéacs comhleanúnach dá bharr. Chun an tsaincheist seo a láimhseáil, molaimid cur chuige atá bunaithe ar thaisce maidir le comhleanúnachas a shamhaltú d’aistriúchán meaisín néarach trí fhaisnéis chomhthéacsúil a ghabháil ó abairtí a aistríodh le déanaí nó ón doiciméad iomlán. Déanaimid iniúchadh go háirithe ar dhá chineál taisce: taisce dinimiciúil, a stórálann focail ó na hipitéisí aistriúcháin is fearr ar na habairtí roimhe seo, agus taisce topaicí, a chothaíonn sraith d'fhocail thopaicí sprice a bhaineann go semantach leis an doiciméad atá le haistriú. . Ar an mbonn seo, déanaimid ciseal nua a thógáil chun spriocfhocail a scóráil sa dá taisce seo le múnla néaraíoch atá bunaithe ar thaisce. Anseo déantar na dóchúlachtaí measta ón múnla néarúil atá bunaithe ar thaisce a chomhcheangal le dóchúlachtaí NMT isteach sna dóchúlachtaí réamh-mheastacháin focal deiridh trí mheicníocht geata. Ar deireadh, déantar an tsamhail néarúil atá bunaithe ar thaisce atá molta a oiliúint i gcomhpháirt le córas NMT ar bhealach ceann go ceann. Léiríonn turgnaimh agus anailís a chuirtear i láthair sa pháipéar seo go bhfuil feabhsuithe suntasacha bainte amach ag an tsamhail taisce-bhunaithe atá molta thar roinnt bunlínte úrscothacha SMT agus NMT.", 'ka': 'სწორედ ფორმებული ტექსტის სიტყვები ერთმანეთისთვის განსხვავებული კავშირებით დაკავშირებულია ტექსტის კოცესიური სტრუქტურა. მიმდინარე ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) სისტემები ტექსტის გაგრძელება კონგენციოლური სიტყვების ფორმაში, რომელიც ასეთი გაგრძელებული სიტყვების და დასა ეს შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიქმნა სხვადასხვა მისაღების ტექსტის შექმნა. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ მინდომარებით კექის გადაწყვეტილი პრობლემა, რომელიც ნეიროლური მაქინის გადაწყვეტისთვის კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია, ან ახლა გა განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ორი ტიპი კაქები: დინამიკური კაქი, რომელიც წინ შემდეგ სიტყვების საუკეთესო წარმოწმების წარმოწმების ჰიპოტესების სიტყვებით, და ტემიკური კაქი, რომელიც მუშაობს მირწმებული მ ამ ბაზეზე, ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალი წერტილი, რომ ამ ორი კაქში მინიშვნელოვანი სიტყვები წერტილისთვის ჩვენ შევქმნით ნეიროლური მოდელისთვის. აქ შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი NMT შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი საბოლოოდ, საკუთარი შესაძლებელი ნეიროლური მოდელი NMT სისტემის ერთადერთად განსწავლია. გამოცდილებები და ანალიზები, რომლებიც ამ დომენტში გამოჩვენებულია, აჩვენებენ, რომ საზოგადომის მოდელედ, რომლებიც კექის დაბათებული მოდელედ, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია მნიშვნელოვ', 'hu': 'A jól kialakított szövegben lévő mondatok különböző linkeken keresztül kapcsolódnak egymáshoz, hogy kialakítsák a szöveg kohéziós struktúráját. A jelenlegi neurális gépi fordítási rendszerek (NMT) hagyományos mondatról mondatra fordítják le a szöveget, figyelmen kívül hagyva az ilyen keresztmondat-kapcsolatokat és függőségeket. Ez egy koherens forrásszöveg célszövegének létrehozásához vezethet. A probléma kezelése érdekében gyorsítótár alapú megközelítést javasolunk a neurális gépi fordítás koherenciájának modellezéséhez azáltal, hogy kontextuális információkat rögzít a nemrégiben lefordított mondatokból vagy a teljes dokumentumból. Különösen a gyorsítótárak kétféle típusát vizsgáljuk fel: egy dinamikus gyorsítótárat, amely az előző mondatok legjobb fordítási hipotéziseiből származó szavakat tárolja, és egy téma gyorsítótárat, amely a fordítandó dokumentumhoz szemantikusan kapcsolódó céloldali aktuális szavakat tart fenn. Ennek alapján egy új réteget építünk, amely célszavakat pontozhat ebben a két gyorsítótárban egy gyorsítótár-alapú neurális modell segítségével. Itt a gyorsítótár alapú neurális modell becsült valószínűségeit az NMT valószínűségekkel kombináljuk a végső szó előrejelzési valószínűségekbe egy kapu mechanizmus segítségével. Végül, a javasolt cache-alapú neurális modellt az NMT rendszerrel közösen képezik, végpontos módon. A tanulmányban bemutatott kísérletek és elemzések azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt gyorsítótár-alapú modell jelentős javulást ér el számos korszerű SMT és NMT alapvető értékekhez képest.', 'it': "Le frasi in un testo ben formato sono collegate tra loro tramite vari link per formare la struttura coesa del testo. Gli attuali sistemi di traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) traducono un testo in modo convenzionale frase per frase, ignorando tali collegamenti e dipendenze tra frasi incrociate. Ciò può portare a generare un testo di destinazione incoerente per un testo sorgente coerente. Per risolvere questo problema, proponiamo un approccio basato sulla cache alla modellazione della coerenza per la traduzione automatica neurale catturando informazioni contestuali provenienti da frasi tradotte di recente o dall'intero documento. In particolare, esploriamo due tipi di cache: una cache dinamica, che memorizza parole dalle migliori ipotesi di traduzione delle frasi precedenti, e una cache topic, che mantiene un insieme di parole topiche sul lato target che sono semanticamente legate al documento da tradurre. Su questa base, costruiamo un nuovo livello per segnare parole target in queste due cache con un modello neurale basato sulla cache. Qui le probabilità stimate dal modello neurale basato sulla cache sono combinate con probabilità NMT nelle probabilità di previsione finale della parola tramite un meccanismo di gating. Infine, il modello neurale basato sulla cache proposto viene addestrato congiuntamente con il sistema NMT in modo end-to-end. Esperimenti e analisi presentati in questo articolo dimostrano che il modello basato sulla cache proposto raggiunge miglioramenti sostanziali rispetto a diverse linee di base SMT e NMT all'avanguardia.", 'el': 'Οι προτάσεις σε ένα καλοσχηματισμένο κείμενο συνδέονται μεταξύ τους μέσω διαφόρων συνδέσμων για να σχηματίσουν τη συνεκτική δομή του κειμένου. Τα τρέχοντα συστήματα νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT) μεταφράσουν ένα κείμενο με συμβατικό τρόπο πρόταση-προς-πρόταση, αγνοώντας τέτοιους συνδέσμους και εξαρτήσεις μεταξύ των προτάσεων. Αυτό μπορεί να οδηγήσει στη δημιουργία ενός ασυνάρτητου κειμένου στόχου για ένα συνεκτικό κείμενο προέλευσης. Προκειμένου να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση που βασίζεται στη μνήμη της μοντελοποίησης της συνοχής για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση, συλλαμβάνοντας πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος είτε από πρόσφατα μεταφρασμένες προτάσεις είτε από ολόκληρο το έγγραφο. Ειδικότερα, διερευνούμε δύο τύπους κρυψών: μια δυναμική κρυψώνα, η οποία αποθηκεύει λέξεις από τις καλύτερες υποθέσεις μετάφρασης προηγούμενων προτάσεων, και μια θεματική κρυψώνα, η οποία διατηρεί ένα σύνολο τοπικών λέξεων που σχετίζονται σημασιολογικά με το προς μετάφραση έγγραφο. Σε αυτή τη βάση, χτίζουμε ένα νέο στρώμα για να σκοράρουμε λέξεις-στόχους σε αυτές τις δύο κρυψώνες με ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο βασισμένο στην κρυψώνα. Εδώ οι εκτιμώμενες πιθανότητες από το νευρωνικό μοντέλο που βασίζεται στη μνήμη συνδυάζονται με πιθανότητες NMT στις πιθανότητες πρόβλεψης τελικής λέξης μέσω ενός μηχανισμού πύλης. Τέλος, το προτεινόμενο νευρωνικό μοντέλο που βασίζεται στην προσωρινή μνήμη εκπαιδεύεται από κοινού με το σύστημα NMT με έναν ολοκληρωμένο τρόπο. Τα πειράματα και οι αναλύσεις που παρουσιάζονται στην παρούσα εργασία καταδεικνύουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο με βάση την προσωρινή μνήμη επιτυγχάνει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με αρκετές υπερσύγχρονες γραμμές βάσης SMT και NMT.', 'kk': 'Мәтіннің бірдей құрылған мәтіндегі сөздер бір-біріне әртүрлі сілтемелер арқылы байланысты. Назардағы невралдық компьютердің аударуы (NMT) жүйелері кәдімгі мәтінді сөйлемелер мен тәуелдіктерін елемейді. Бұл сәйкесті көзінің мәтініне бірдей мақсатты мәтін құру мүмкін. Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін біз кэш негіздеген тәсілді невралдық компьютерді аудару үшін невралдық компьютерді аудару үшін жаңа аударылған мәліметті не барлық құжаттан алу үшін кэш негіздеген т Мәселен, біз екі түрлі кэш тізімін зерттейміз: динамикалық кэш, бұл сөздерді алдыңғы сөздердің ең жақсы аудармалы гипотезінен сақтайтын, және тақырыптың кэш тізімін сақтайтын, бұл құжаттың семантикалық қатынасы бар мақсатт Бұл негізінде, кэш негіздеген неврал үлгісімен мақсатты сөздерді есептеу үшін жаңа қабатты құрамыз. Мұнда кэш негіздеген невралдық моделінің бағалау мүмкіндіктері NMT мүмкіндіктерімен соңғы сөздің бағалау мүмкіндіктеріне арналған механизм арқылы біріктіріледі. Соңында, кэште негіздеген невралдық модель NMT жүйесіне соңғы ретінде оқылған. Бұл қағазда көрсетілген тәжірибелер мен анализ келтірілген кэш негіздеген үлгі бірнеше SMT және NMT негіздегі күй- жайындағы бірнеше күй- жайындағы SMT және NMT негіздегі жолдарда', 'mk': 'Речениците во добро формиран текст се поврзани меѓусебно преку различни линкови за да се формира согласната структура на текстот. Сегашните системи за нервен машински превод (НМТ) преводат текст на конвенционален начин реченица по реченица, игнорирајќи ги ваквите крсторечени врски и зависности. Ова може да доведе до генерирање на несогледен метен текст за коеорентен извор текст. За да се справи со ова прашање, предлагаме пристап базиран на кеш за моделирање на кохеренцијата за превод на невровните машини со снимање контекстуални информации или од неодамна преведени реченици или од целиот документ. Особено, истражуваме два вида на кеши: динамичен кеш, кој ги чува зборовите од најдобрите преводни хипотези на претходните реченици, и темски кеш, кој одржува набор на точни зборови на страната на целта кои се семантично поврзани со документот кој треба да се преведе. На оваа основа, градиме нов слој за да постигнеме целни зборови во овие две кеши со нервен модел базиран на кеш. Овде проценетите веројатности од нервниот модел базиран на кеш се комбинирани со веројатностите на НМТ во последните веројатности на предвидување на зборот преку механизам за пренесување. Конечно, предложениот нервен модел базиран на кеш е обучен заедно со НМТ системот на крај до крај. Експериментите и анализите претставени во овој документ покажуваат дека предложениот модел базиран на кеш постигнува значителни подобрувања во однос на неколку најсовремени основни линии СМТ и НМТ.', 'lt': 'Gerai suformuoto teksto sakiniai tarpusavyje sujungiami įvairiomis nuorodomis, kad būtų sudaryta nuosekli teksto struktūra. Dabartinės nervinių mašin ų vertimo sistemos (NMT) verta tekstą įprastu sakiniu po sakinio, ignoruodamos tokius tarpsakinius ryšius ir priklausomybę. Tai gali sukelti nesuderinamą tikslinį tekstą nuosekliam šaltinio tekstui. In order to handle this issue, we propose a cache-based approach to modeling coherence for neural machine translation by capturing contextual information either from recently translated sentences or the entire document.  Ypač tiriame dviejų rūšių dėžutes: dinamišką dėžutę, kurioje saugomi žodžiai iš geriausių ankstesnių sakinių vertimo hipotezių, ir teminę dėžutę, kurioje saugomas tikslinės pusės aktualių žodžių rinkinys, semantiškai susijęs su dokumentu, kurį reikia vertti. Tuo remdamiesi sukuriame naują sluoksnį, kad šiuose dviejuose sluoksniuose būtų galima nustatyti tikslinius žodžius naudojant sluoksnį pagrįstą nervinį model į. Čia apskaičiuotos tikimybės, gautos naudojant cache pagrįstą nervinį model į, derinamos su NMT tikimybėmis į galutinį žodžio prognozavimo tikimybę naudojant gatingo mechanizmą. Galiausiai pasiūlytas kompiuteriu pagrįstas neurologinis model is mokomas kartu su NMT sistema visada. Šiame dokumente pateikti eksperimentai ir analizė rodo, kad pasiūlytas modelis, grindžiamas cache, gerokai pagerina keletą naujausių SMT ir NMT bazinių linijų.', 'mt': 'Is-sentenzi f’test iffurmat tajjeb huma konnessi ma’ xulxin permezz ta’ diversi links biex jiffurmaw l-istruttura koeżiva tat-test. Is-sistemi attwali tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) jittraduċu test b’mod konvenzjonali sentenza b’sentenza, filwaqt li jiġu injorati tali rabtiet u dipendenzi bejn sentenzi. Dan jista’ jwassal biex jiġi ġġenerat test fil-mira inkoerenti għal test koerenti tas-sors. Sabiex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, nipproponu approċċ ibbażat fuq il-cache għall-immudellar tal-koerenza għat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali billi nqabdu informazzjoni kuntestwali jew minn sentenzi tradotti reċentement jew mid-dokument kollu. B’mod partikolari, nesploraw żewġ tipi ta’ caches: cache dinamiku, li jaħżen kliem mill-aqwa ipotesi ta’ traduzzjoni tas-sentenzi preċedenti, u cache tematiku, li jżomm sett ta’ kliem tematiku min-naħa tal-mira li huma semantikament relatati mad-dokument li għandu jiġi tradott. On this basis, we build a new layer to score target words in these two caches with a cache-based neural model.  Hawnhekk il-probabbiltajiet stmati mill-mudell newrali bbażat fuq il-cache huma kkombinati mal-probabbiltajiet NMT fil-probabbiltajiet tat-tbassir tal-kliem finali permezz ta’ mekkaniżmu gating. Fl-aħħar nett, il-mudell newrali propost ibbażat fuq il-cache huwa mħarreġ flimkien mas-sistema NMT b’mod minn tarf sa tarf. L-esperimenti u l-analiżi ppreżentati f’dan id-dokument juru li l-mudell propost ibbażat fuq il-cache jikseb titjib sostanzjali fuq diversi linji bażi tal-SMT u l-NMT l-aktar avvanzati.', 'ms': 'Hukuman dalam teks bentuk baik disambung satu sama lain melalui pautan berbeza untuk bentuk struktur sambungan teks. Sistem terjemahan mesin saraf semasa (NMT) terjemahan teks dalam cara kalimat-kalimat konvensional, mengabaikan pautan dan dependensi kalimat-salib tersebut. Ini boleh menyebabkan menghasilkan teks sasaran tidak konsisten untuk teks sumber konsisten. Untuk menangani isu ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan berdasarkan cache untuk memmodelkan kesecoherensi untuk terjemahan mesin saraf dengan menangkap maklumat kontekstual sama ada dari kalimat terjemahan baru-baru ini atau seluruh dokumen. Terutama, kami mengeksplorasi dua jenis cache: cache dinamik, yang menyimpan perkataan dari hipotesis terjemahan terbaik dari kalimat terdahulu, dan cache topik, yang menyimpan set perkataan topik sisi sasaran yang secara semantik berkaitan dengan dokumen yang akan diterjemahkan. Pada dasar ini, kita membina lapisan baru untuk skor kata sasaran dalam dua cache ini dengan model saraf berdasarkan cache. Di sini kemungkinan dijangka dari model saraf berdasarkan cache digabungkan dengan kemungkinan NMT ke dalam kemungkinan ramalan perkataan terakhir melalui mekanisme gating. Akhirnya, model saraf berdasarkan cache direncanakan dilatih bersama dengan sistem NMT dengan cara akhir-akhir. Eksperimen dan analisis yang dihasilkan dalam kertas ini menunjukkan bahawa model berdasarkan cache yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang besar atas beberapa baris dasar SMT dan NMT yang terbaik.', 'ml': 'ടെക്സ്റ്റിന്റെ കോക്സെസ്റ്റിവ് ഘട്ടം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ലിങ്കുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഒരു നല്ല രേഖയിലെ വ നിലവിലുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക്- by- sentence ഫോള്\u200dഡില്\u200d പദാവലിയെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഇതുപോലുള്ള ക്രിസ്ട് ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സ് വാചകത്തിനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d അകത്തുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യ പദാവലി ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി ഇത് കാണി ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു മാതൃകയായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d നാം ഒരു  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു തരം ക്യാച്ചുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു; ഒരു ഡൈനാമിക്ക് ക്യാഷ്, അത് മുമ്പുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല വിഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വ ഈ അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ സ്ഥാനം പണിയുന്നു. ഈ രണ്ട് ക്യാഷില്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി നമ് ഇവിടെ കാഷ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള കണക്കാക്കുന്ന സാധ്യതകള്\u200d NMT-ല്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഗാറ്റിങ് മെക്കയില അവസാനം, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട കാഷ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d NMT സിസ്റ്റത്തോടൊപ്പം പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്ന ഈ പത്രത്തിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളും അന്വേഷണങ്ങളും കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച കാഷ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള മോഡല്\u200d കുറച്ച് സ്ഥാനത്തി', 'pl': 'Zdania w dobrze sformułowanym tekście są ze sobą łączone za pośrednictwem różnych linków tworząc spójną strukturę tekstu. Obecne systemy neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) tłumaczą tekst w konwencjonalny sposób zdania po zdaniu, ignorując takie powiązania i zależności między zdaniami. Może to prowadzić do wygenerowania niespójnego tekstu docelowego dla spójnego tekstu źródłowego. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy podejście oparte na pamięci podręcznej do modelowania spójności dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego poprzez przechwytywanie informacji kontekstowych z ostatnio przetłumaczonych zdań lub całego dokumentu. W szczególności badamy dwa rodzaje buforów: buforów dynamicznych, która przechowuje słowa z najlepszych hipotez tłumaczenia poprzednich zdań, oraz buforów tematycznych, która utrzymuje zestaw słów tematycznych po stronie docelowej, które są semantycznie związane z dokumentem, który ma być przetłumaczony. Na tej podstawie budujemy nową warstwę, aby ocenić słowa docelowe w tych dwóch buforach za pomocą modelu neuronowego opartego na buforach. Tutaj szacowane prawdopodobieństwa z modelu neuronowego opartego na pamięci podręcznej są łączone z prawdopodobieństwami NMT do prawdopodobieństwa przewidywania ostatecznego słowa za pomocą mechanizmu gating. Wreszcie proponowany model neuronowy oparty na pamięci cache jest trenowany wspólnie z systemem NMT w sposób end-to-end. Eksperymenty i analizy przedstawione w niniejszym artykule pokazują, że proponowany model oparty na pamięci podręcznej osiąga znaczące ulepszenia w stosunku do kilku najnowocześniejszych linii bazowych SMT i NMT.', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэлбэртэй текст үг бие биенээ олон холбоотой холбоотой. Одоогийн мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) системүүд энгийн өгүүлбэрээр хэлбэрээр хэлбэрээр текст хөрөнгө оруулдаг. Ийм олон өгүүлбэрээр холбоотой холбоотой, хамааралтай байдлыг Энэ нь холбогдолтой эх үүсвэрийн текстүүдийн тусламжгүй зорилготой текст үүсгэх боломжтой. Энэ асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд бид сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдээллийг саяхан орчуулсан өгүүлбэрээс эсвэл бүх баримт үлгэрүүлсэн мэдээллээс холбогдохын тулд кэш-суурилсан арга замыг санал болгоно. Ялангуяа бид хоёр төрлийн кэшүүдийг судалж байна: хөдөлгөөнтэй кэш, энэ нь өмнөх өгүүлбэрийн хамгийн сайн орчуулсан утгатай үгсийг хадгалдаг, мөн сэдвийн кэшүүдийг хадгалдаг. Энэ үндсэндээ бид зорилготой үгсийг кэш дээр суурилсан мэдрэлийн загвартай тооцохын тулд шинэ давхар бүтээж байна. Энд кэш суурилсан мэдрэлийн загварын тооцоололтой магадлал нь NMT-тэй хамтдаа хамгийн сүүлийн үгний таамаглалтын магадлал боломжтой байдаг. Эцэст нь, санал дэвшүүлсэн кафе-суурилсан мэдрэлийн загвар NMT системтэй хамтдаа төгсгөл хэлбэрээр сургалт авсан. Энэ цаасан дээр тайлбарласан туршилт болон шинжилгээ үзүүлэх нь хэдэн төрлийн SMT болон NMT суурь шугам шугам дээр суурь сайжруулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ro': 'Sentințele dintr-un text bine format sunt conectate unul la altul prin intermediul diferitelor linkuri pentru a forma structura coezivă a textului. Sistemele curente de traducere automată neurală (NMT) traduc un text într-un mod convențional propoziție cu propoziție, ignorând astfel de legături încrucișate și dependențe. Acest lucru poate duce la generarea unui text țintă incoerent pentru un text sursă coerent. Pentru a rezolva această problemă, propunem o abordare bazată pe cache a modelării coerenței pentru traducerea automată neurală prin captarea informațiilor contextuale fie din propoziții traduse recent, fie din întregul document. În special, explorăm două tipuri de cache-uri: un cache dinamic, care stochează cuvinte din cele mai bune ipoteze de traducere ale propozițiilor anterioare, și un cache de subiect, care menține un set de cuvinte topice din partea țintă care sunt legate semantic de documentul care urmează să fie tradus. Pe această bază, construim un nou strat pentru a scora cuvintele țintă în aceste două cache-uri cu un model neural bazat pe cache. Aici probabilitățile estimate din modelul neural bazat pe cache sunt combinate cu probabilitățile NMT în probabilitățile de predicție a cuvântului final prin intermediul unui mecanism de gating. În cele din urmă, modelul neural bazat pe cache propus este instruit împreună cu sistemul NMT într-un mod end-to-end. Experimentele și analizele prezentate în această lucrare demonstrează că modelul bazat pe cache propus obține îmbunătățiri substanțiale față de mai multe linii de bază SMT și NMT de ultimă generație.', 'si': 'වාර්තාවක් හොඳ විදිහට පාළුවක් එක්කෙනෙක් එක්කෙනෙක් එක්කෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා විවිදිහට සම්බන්ධ ව ප්\u200dරස්තූත න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් අවවාදය (NMT) පද්ධතිය පද්ධතියක් පාළුවක් පරිවර්තන කරන්න, සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය ප්\u200dරවේශයක මේක සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරභාව පාළුවක් වෙනුවෙන් නැති ලක්ෂණ පාළුවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන්. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විධානය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සිද්ධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් අ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි කැෂ් වර්ගයක් වර්ගයක් දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා: සාමාන්\u200dය කැෂ්, ඒකෙන් වර්ගයක් තියෙන්නේ පිළිබඳ වර්ගයක් වලින් හොඳම වාර්ථාව අනුවා මේ අධාරණයෙන්, අපි අලුත් ස්ථානයක් හදන්නේ මේ කැෂ් දෙකට ඉලක්කම් වචනයක් ගන්න. මෙතන කැෂ් අධිරූපය න්\u200dයූරාල මොඩල් එක්ක අන්තිම වචනය අන්තිම වචනය අන්තිම වචනය අන්තිම වචනය අන්තිම වචනය අවශ්\u200dය විද අන්තිමේදි, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කැෂ් අධාරිත න්\u200dයූරල් මොඩේල් එක්ක NMT පද්ධතිය සමඟ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අවසානයෙන් ඉ මේ පරීක්ෂණය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ කැෂ් අධ්\u200dයානය විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය සහ NMT අධ්\u200dයානය සඳහා', 'no': 'Uttrykk i eit godt formatert tekst er kopla til kvarandre via ulike lenkjer for å laga den kohesive strukturen av teksten. @ info Dette kan føre til å laga eit ugjennomsiktig måltekst for ein koherent kjeldetekst. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi ein mellomlager-basert tilnærming til å modelera koherens for neuralmaskineomsetjing ved å henta kontekstinformasjon anten frå nyleg omsette setningar eller heile dokumentet. I særskilt utforskar vi to typar mellomlager: ein dynamisk mellomlager, som lagrar ord frå dei beste oversettelshipotesene av førre setningar, og eit mellomlager av emne, som vedlikehald eit sett av målside emne- ord som er semantisk relatert til dokumentet som vert omsett. På denne måten bygger vi eit nytt lag for å scorera målord i desse to mellomlageret med ein neural model basert på mellomlageret. Her er sannsynlege sannsynlighetane frå mellomlagerebasert neuralmodell kombinerte med NMT-sannsynlighetane i den siste sannsynligheten for forhåndsvising av ordet via ein gating mechanism. Etter slutt, den foreslåde mellomlagerebaserte neuralmodellen er trent saman med NMT- systemet på ein sluttmodus. Eksperiment og analyse presenterte i denne papiret viser at den foreslåde mellomlagerebaserte modellen gjer stor forbedringar over fleire mønsteret for SMT og NMT-baselinjer.', 'sv': 'Fraser i en välformad text kopplas samman med varandra via olika länkar för att bilda textens sammanhängande struktur. Nuvarande neurala maskinöversättningssystem (NMT) översätter en text på ett konventionellt mening för mening sätt, ignorerar sådana korsmeningslänkar och beroenden. Detta kan leda till att en inkonsekvent måltext skapas för en sammanhängande källtext. För att hantera detta problem föreslår vi ett cachebaserat tillvägagångssätt för modellering av samstämmighet för neural maskinöversättning genom att fånga kontextuell information antingen från nyligen översatta meningar eller hela dokumentet. I synnerhet utforskar vi två typer av cacher: en dynamisk cache, som lagrar ord från de bästa översättningshypoteserna i föregående meningar, och en ämnescache, som upprätthåller en uppsättning aktuella ord på målsidan som är semantiskt relaterade till dokumentet som ska översättas. På grundval av detta bygger vi ett nytt lager för att poängtera målord i dessa två cacher med en cachebaserad neural modell. Här kombineras de beräknade sannolikheterna från den cachebaserade neurala modellen med NMT sannolikheter till slutordsprognosen sannolikheter via en gating mekanism. Slutligen tränas den föreslagna cachebaserade neurala modellen tillsammans med NMT-systemet på ett end-to-end sätt. Experiment och analyser som presenteras i denna uppsats visar att den föreslagna cachebaserade modellen uppnår betydande förbättringar jämfört med flera state-of-the-art SMT och NMT baselines.', 'sr': 'Izvori u dobro formiranom tekstu povezani su jedno sa drugom putem različitih veza kako bi formirali kohezijsku strukturu teksta. Trenutni sistemi za prevod neuralne mašine (NMT) prevode tekst u konvencionalnom rečenici po rečenici, ignorišući takve veze i zavisnosti prekršene rečenice. To može dovesti do stvaranja neslužnog metnog teksta za sasluženi tekst izvora. Da bismo riješili ovaj problem, predložili smo pristup kojim se temelji na kavezu modelira koherencije za prevod neuralne mašine, hvatanjem kontekstualnih informacija ili iz nedavno prevedenih rečenica ili cijelog dokumenta. Posebno, istražujemo dve vrste cache: dinamični cache, koji čuva riječi iz najboljih prevodnih hipoteza prethodnih rečenica, i temske cache, koji održava setu temskih reči na cilju koja su semantički povezana sa prevodenim dokumentom. Na osnovu ovog, izgradimo novi sloj da rezultišemo ciljne reèi u ovim dva kapetana sa neuralnim modelom na košiji. Ovde su procenile verovatnoće iz neuralnog model a koji se temelji na kafiću kombinovane sa verovatnošću NMT-a u konačnu verovatnošću predviđanja reči putem mehanizma za ulazak. Konačno, predloženi neuralni model na kafiću obučen je zajedno sa NMT sistemom na kraju do kraja. Eksperimenti i analiza predstavljene u ovom papiru pokazuju da predloženi model koji se temelji na cache postiže značajno poboljšanje na nekoliko područja SMT-a i NMT-a.', 'ur': 'ایک اچھی طرح کے متن میں کلمات ایک دوسرے سے مختلف لینکوں کے ذریعے متصل ہوئے ہیں کہ متن کے متصل ساختار بنائیں۔ اوسنی نئورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) سیسٹم ایک معمولی مجلس کے مطابق ایک متن کو ترجمہ کرتا ہے، اس طرح کرس-مجلس لینکوں اور اعتباری کو نادانی کرتا ہے. یہ ممکن ہے کہ ایک مشترک سراسر متن کے لئے ایک مختلف موقع متن پیدا کرے۔ اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے، ہم نے نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے موڈلینگ کے لئے ایک کیش بنیادی طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، یا اچھے ترجمہ جماعتوں سے یا تمام ڈکومئنٹ سے متوجہ ہونے کے ذریعہ. مخصوصاً ہم نے دو قسم کے کچ کا تحقیق کیا ہے: ایک ڈینمانیک کچ، جو پہلے کلمات کے بہترین ترجمہ فرضیوں سے کلمات کو ذخیره کرتا ہے، اور ایک ٹیپ کیچ، جو ایک ٹیپ-سائٹ ٹیپ ٹیپ کلمات کو حفاظت کرتا ہے جو مدفون کے ساتھ مترجم ہونے کے لئے سیماتیک رابطہ ہے. اس کی بنیاد پر ہم ایک نئی لائر بناتے ہیں کہ ان دو کیچوں میں موقع لکھنے کے لئے ان دو کیچوں میں موقع لکھنے لگے۔ یہاں کیش کی بنیادی نیورل موڈل کی تقدیر کی احتمالات NMT کے ساتھ ملی جاتی ہیں آخری کلمات کی پیش بینی احتمالات میں ایک گٹنگ مکانیسم کے ذریعہ۔ آخر میں، پیشنهاد کی کیش بنیاد نیورال موڈل NMT سیسٹم کے ساتھ ایک طریقے سے آموزش کی جاتی ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں پیش آئے ہوئے تجربے اور تحلیل دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیش آئے ہوئے کیش بنیاد موڈل بہت سی ایٹی SMT اور NMT بنیاس لینٹوں پر بہت اچھے سوداگری حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'so': 'Heeganka waxaa isugu xiran xariir kala duduwan si ay u sameeyaan dhismaha saxda. Isticmaalka neural machine translation (NMT) systems translate a text in a conventional sentence-by-sentence, ignoring such cross-sentence links and dependents. Taas waxaa laga yaabaa in ay u sameyn karto qoraal ay ku imaan karto qoraal ay ku imaan karto waxyaabaha la’aanta ah. Si aan u qabsado arimahan, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa qaabab ku saleysan cache-ka si aan u sameynno tarjumaadda maskinada neurada, si aan u qabsashada macluumaadka joogtada ah ugu dhowaad looga turjumay qoraalka ama dukumentiga oo dhan. Si gaar ah, waxaynu baaraynaa laba nooc oo kaleemeyn ah: kalluumey dhaqdhaqaaqi ah, kaas oo ku kaydsan hadal ka mid ah dhanka ugu wanaagsan ee turjumidda hore iyo kaleba kalajarida, kaasoo haysta sawir ka mid ah hadal maamul ah oo ku saabsan qoraalka si loo turjumo. Taas darteed waxaynu dhisaynaa qalab cusub si aan ugu koobanno hadallada waxqabadka labadaas kalluun oo ku qoran tilmaamaha neurada. Halkan waxaa suurtagalka lagu qiimeeyaa sameynta neurada ee cache-ku saleysan waxaa lagu soo ururiyaa suurtagalka NMT ee ugu dambeeya hadalka sii sheegidda ee suurtagalka ah mekaniisa gatashada. Finally, the proposed cache-based neural model is trained jointly with NMT system in an end-to-end manner.  Imtixaanka iyo baaritaanka warqaddan waxaa laga muujiyaa in modelka la soo jeeday ee ku saleysan cache-ka uu ka kordhiyo marxalad badan oo ku qoran qoraalka SMT iyo NMT.', 'ta': 'உரையின் கூட்டிணைப்பு உரையை உருவாக்க வேண்டிய பல இணைப்புகளால் ஒருவருடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. தற்போதைய புதிய கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) அமைப்புகள் ஒரு வழக்கமான வாக்கு- by- வாக்கு வகையில் உரையை மொழிபெயர்க்குகிறது, இது கிறிச்சொல்  இது ஒரு கூட்டிணைப்பு மூல உரைக்கு ஒரு உள்ளடக்கமான இலக்கு உரையை உருவாக்கும். இந்த விஷயத்தை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் தற்போது மொழிபெயர்ப்பிடப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து அல்லது முழு ஆவணத்திலிருந்து மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் இருந குறிப்பாக, நாம் இரண்டு வகையான கேக்களை தேடுகிறோம்: ஒரு இயங்கும் இடைமாற்றம், அது முந்தைய வாக்கியங்களின் சிறந்த மொழிபெயர்ப்பு குறிப்புகளிலிருந்து சேமிக்கும் சொற்கள இந்த அடிப்படையில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய அடுக்கை உருவாக்கி இலக்கு வார்த்தைகளை இந்த இரண்டு கேச்களில் மதிப்பெடுக்க ஒரு தற்கால தற்காலிக சார்ந்த புதிய மாதிரியிலிருந்து கணக்கிடப்பட்ட சாத்தியங்கள் இங்கே NMT சாத்தியங்களுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது கடைசி வார்த்தை முன் இறுதியாக, முன்னிருப்பிய தற்காலிக முறைமை மாதிரி NMT அமைப்புடன் ஒன்றாக பயிற்சி செய்யப்படுகிறது. இந்த காகிதத்தில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சோதனைகள் மற்றும் ஆராய்ச்சி முறைமையை காட்டுகிறது முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட இடைமாதிரி மாதிரி பல நிலையில', 'uz': "Name Name @ info: whatsthis Bu muammani boshqarish uchun, biz yangi tarjima qilingan soʻzlardan yoki butun hujjatni olib tashlash orqali neyron maskin tarjima qilish uchun foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchi usulni tahlil qilamiz. Ko'pchilik, biz ikki turli foydalanuvchi soʻzni qidirimiz: bu soʻzni oldingi so'zlarning eng yaxshi tarjima munosabalaridan saqlanadi, va mavzu keshini saqlaydi. Bu hujjatning tarjima qilish uchun juda qiymatik bogʻ'liq soʻzlarni saqlaydi. Bu asosida, biz bu ikkita kesh asosida ma'lumot modeli bilan qanday so'zlarni qidirish uchun yangi qatlam yaramiz. Bu yerda qiymatlashtirilgan kerakli neyrolik modelidagi imkoniyatlarni birlashtirish imkoniyatlarida NMT'ning oxirgi so'zni taqdimot mekanik orqali o'zgartirish imkoniyatlariga qo'yish mumkin. Oxiri, talab qilingan kesh asosida neyrol modeli NMT tizimi bilan birlashtirilgan ishlayapti. Ushbu qogʻozdagi imtiyozlar va taʼminlovlar taʼminotni koʻrsatish mumkin, talab qilingan kesh asosida modeli bir necha holat SMT va NMT asosiy satrlarida muhim yaxshi o'zgarishni bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Những câu nói trong một văn bản được hình thành được kết nối với nhau qua các liên kết khác nhau để tạo nên một cấu trúc đông đúc của văn bản. Hệ thống dịch biến máy thần kinh hiện thời dịch (NMB) dịch một văn bản theo một cách thông thường từng câu một, phớt lờ các liên kết chữ thập này và quan hệ phụ thuộc. Việc này có thể dẫn đến việc tạo ra một mục tiêu chưa xác định cho một nguồn văn bản. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp dựa trên bộ nhớ tạm để thiết lập sự phù hợp cho dịch chuyển máy thần kinh bằng cách chụp các thông tin ngữ bằng cách bắt giữ hoặc từ các câu đã dịch gần đây hoặc to àn bộ tài liệu. Đặc biệt, chúng ta khám phá hai loại xương rồng: một bộ nhớ tạm động, để lưu lời từ các giả thuyết dịch tốt nhất của các câu trước, và một bộ nhớ tạm chủ đề, để duy trì một bộ từ hiện thời có liên quan đến văn bản cần dịch. Dựa trên cơ sở này, chúng ta xây một lớp mới để ghi điểm chữ vào hai cái hộp chứa này với một mô hình thần kinh dự trữ. Ở đây khả năng dự đoán được từ mô hình thần kinh cục bộ nhớ tạm được kết hợp với khả năng dự đoán của NMT vào cơ sở dự đoán từ cuối cùng qua cơ chế chọn lọc. Cuối cùng, hệ thần kinh dự kiến của bộ nhớ tạm được huấn luyện cùng với hệ thống NMT theo một cách tận cùng. Những thử nghiệm và phân tích được đưa ra trong tờ giấy này chứng minh rằng mô hình dự án dựa trên bộ nhớ tạm đã đạt đến những cải tiến lớn hơn nhiều nền SMB và NMT hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Изреченията в добре оформен текст са свързани помежду си чрез различни връзки, за да формират сплотената структура на текста. Текущите системи за невронен машинен превод (НМТ) превеждат текст по конвенционален начин изречение по изречение, игнорирайки такива кръстосани връзки и зависимости. Това може да доведе до генериране на несвързан целеви текст за съгласуван изходен текст. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме базиран на кеш подход за моделиране на съгласуваност за неврален машинен превод чрез улавяне на контекстуална информация или от наскоро преведени изречения, или от целия документ. По-специално, изследваме два вида кеш-ове: динамичен кеш, който съхранява думи от най-добрите хипотези за превод на предходни изречения, и тематичен кеш, който поддържа набор от целеви тематични думи, които са семантично свързани с документа, който ще бъде преведен. На тази основа изграждаме нов слой, за да отбележим целевите думи в тези две кеширания с невронен модел, базиран на кеш. Тук очакваните вероятности от кеш-базирания неврален модел се комбинират с вероятностите от NMT в вероятностите за прогнозиране на последната дума чрез гейтинг механизъм. И накрая, предложеният кеш-базиран невронен модел се обучава съвместно със системата от край до край. Експериментите и анализите, представени в тази статия, показват, че предложеният модел базиран на кеш, постига значителни подобрения в няколко най-съвременни базови линии на SMT и NMT.', 'nl': 'Zinnen in een goed gevormde tekst worden via verschillende links met elkaar verbonden om de samenhangende structuur van de tekst te vormen. Huidige neurale machine translation (NMT) systemen vertalen een tekst op een conventionele zin-voor-zin manier, waarbij dergelijke kruiszinnige koppelingen en afhankelijkheden worden genegeerd. Dit kan leiden tot het genereren van een incoherente doeltekst voor een coherente brontekst. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een cache-gebaseerde benadering voor voor het modelleren van coherentie voor neurale machinevertaling door contextuele informatie vast te leggen uit recent vertaalde zinnen of het hele document. In het bijzonder onderzoeken we twee soorten caches: een dynamische cache, die woorden van de beste vertaalhypothesen van voorgaande zinnen opslaat, en een topic cache, die een set van target-side actuele woorden bijhoudt die semantisch gerelateerd zijn aan het te vertalen document. Op basis hiervan bouwen we een nieuwe laag om doelwoorden in deze twee caches te scoren met een cache-gebaseerd neuraal model. Hier worden de geschatte waarschijnlijkheden uit het cache-gebaseerde neurale model gecombineerd met NMT waarschijnlijkheden in de uiteindelijke woordvoorspelling waarschijnlijkheid via een gating mechanisme. Tot slot wordt het voorgestelde cache-gebaseerde neurale model samen met NMT systeem op een end-to-end manier getraind. Experimenten en analyses gepresenteerd in dit document tonen aan dat het voorgestelde cache-gebaseerde model aanzienlijke verbeteringen bereikt ten opzichte van verschillende state-of-the-art SMT en NMT baselines.', 'da': 'Sætninger i en velformet tekst er forbundet med hinanden via forskellige links for at danne tekstens sammenhængende struktur. Nuværende neurale maskinoversættelsessystemer (NMT) oversætter en tekst på en konventionel sætning for sætning måde, og ignorerer sådanne krydssætningsforbindelser og afhængigheder. Dette kan føre til at generere en inkonsekvent måltekst for en sammenhængende kildetekst. For at håndtere dette problem foreslår vi en cache-baseret tilgang til modellering af kohærens for neural maskinoversættelse ved at indfange kontekstuel information enten fra nyligt oversatte sætninger eller hele dokumentet. Især undersøger vi to typer caches: en dynamisk cache, som gemmer ord fra de bedste oversættelsesopfattelser fra tidligere sætninger, og en emne cache, som fastholder et sæt aktuelle ord på målsiden, der er semantisk relateret til det dokument, der skal oversættes. På dette grundlag bygger vi et nyt lag til at score målord i disse to caches med en cache-baseret neural model. Her er de estimerede sandsynligheder fra den cache-baserede neurale model kombineret med NMT sandsynligheder i det endelige ord forudsigelse sandsynligheder via en gating mekanisme. Endelig trænes den foreslåede cache-baserede neurale model sammen med NMT-systemet på en end-to-end måde. Eksperimenter og analyser præsenteret i denne artikel viser, at den foreslåede cache-baserede model opnår betydelige forbedringer i forhold til flere state-of-the-art SMT og NMT baselines.', 'hr': 'Odgovori u dobro formiranom tekstu povezani su jedni s drugima putem različitih veza kako bi stvorili kohezijsku strukturu teksta. Trenutni sustavi prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) prevode tekst na konvencionalni način rečenice po rečenici, ignorirajući takve veze i zavisnosti prekrasne rečenice. To može dovesti do stvaranja neslužnog metnog teksta za sasluženi tekst izvora. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predlažemo pristup kojim se temelji na cache nalazi u modeliranju koherencije za prevod neuroloških strojeva uključujući kontekstne informacije ili iz nedavno prevedenih rečenica ili cijelog dokumenta. Posebno, istražujemo dvije vrste cache: dinamični cache, koji čuva riječi iz najboljih prevodnih hipoteza prethodnih rečenica, i temske cache, koji održava skup temalnih riječi na cilju koja se semantički odnose na prevodeni dokument. Na osnovu ovoga, izgradimo novi sloj kako bi rezultirali ciljne riječi u ovim dvije cache sa neuronskim modelom baziranim na cache. Ovdje su procijenjene vjerojatnosti neuronskog model a bazirane na cache kombinirane s verovatnošću NMT-a u konačne vjerojatnosti predviđanja riječi putem mehanizma prijevoza. Konačno, predloženi neuralni model na kojem se nalazi kovčeg, obučen je zajedno s NMT sustavom na kraju do kraja. Iskusi i analiza predstavljene u ovom papiru pokazuju da je predloženi model koji se temelji na cache postigao značajno poboljšanje na nekoliko početnih linija stanja umjetnosti SMT-a i NMT-a.', 'de': 'Sätze in einem gut geformten Text werden über verschiedene Links miteinander verbunden, um die zusammenhängende Struktur des Textes zu bilden. Aktuelle neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungssysteme (NMT) übersetzen einen Text auf eine konventionelle Art und Weise Satz für Satz und ignorieren solche satzübergreifenden Verknüpfungen und Abhängigkeiten. Dies kann dazu führen, dass ein inkohärenter Zieltext für einen kohärenten Quelltext generiert wird. Um dieses Problem zu lösen, schlagen wir einen Cache-basierten Ansatz zur Modellierung der Kohärenz für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung vor, indem kontextbezogene Informationen entweder aus kürzlich übersetzten Sätzen oder dem gesamten Dokument erfasst werden. Insbesondere untersuchen wir zwei Arten von Caches: einen dynamischen Cache, der Wörter aus den besten Übersetzungshypothesen vorheriger Sätze speichert, und einen Themencache, der eine Reihe von zielseitigen topischen Wörtern verwaltet, die semantisch mit dem zu übersetzenden Dokument zusammenhängen. Auf dieser Basis bauen wir eine neue Ebene, um Zielwörter in diesen beiden Caches mit einem Cache-basierten neuronalen Modell zu bewerten. Hier werden die geschätzten Wahrscheinlichkeiten aus dem Cache-basierten neuronalen Modell mit NMT Wahrscheinlichkeiten über einen Gating Mechanismus in die endgültige Wortvorhersage Wahrscheinlichkeiten kombiniert. Schließlich wird das vorgeschlagene Cache-basierte neuronale Modell gemeinsam mit NMT-System in einer End-to-End-Weise trainiert. Experimente und Analysen, die in dieser Arbeit vorgestellt werden, zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Cache-basierte Modell erhebliche Verbesserungen gegenüber mehreren hochmodernen SMT- und NMT-Baselines erzielt.', 'fa': 'جمله\u200cها در یک متن بسیار قابل توجه به یکدیگر از طریق ارتباطات مختلف برای ساختن ساختار هماهنگی متن متصل می\u200cشوند. سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی (NMT) فعلی یک متن را در یک صورت مجموعه\u200cی معمولی ترجمه می\u200cکند، با نادیده از این ارتباطات و بستگی\u200cهای مختلف جمله\u200cای. این ممکن است باعث ایجاد یک متن هدف غیر مشترک برای متن منبع مشترک باشد. برای حل این مسئله، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش بر اساس کاش برای نمودن هماهنگی برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی با گرفتن اطلاعات موضوع یا از جمله\u200cهای تازگی ترجمه شده یا کل سند. مخصوصا، ما دو نوع کیش را تحقیق می کنیم: یک کیش دینامیک، که کلمات را از بهترین فرضیه\u200cهای ترجمه پیش از جمله\u200cهای پیشینیان، و یک کیش موضوع را ذخیره می\u200cکند، که مجموعه کلمات موضوعی از طرف هدف\u200cها را نگه می\u200cدارد که در طول semantic رابطه به سند ترجمه می\u200cشود. بر اساس این، ما یک طبقه جدید ساختیم تا کلمات هدف را در این دو کیف با یک مدل عصبی بر اساس کیف ثبت کنیم. در اینجا احتمالات تقریباً از مدل عصبی بر اساس کاش با احتمالات NMT به احتمالات پیش\u200cبینی آخرین کلمه از طریق یک مکانیزم درگیری ترکیب می\u200cشوند. بالاخره، مدل عصبی بر اساس کاش پیشنهاد با سیستم NMT به طریق پایان و پایان آموزش می\u200cشود. تجربه و تحلیل که در این کاغذ پیشنهاد داده شده نشان می دهد که مدل پیشنهاد بر اساس کاغذ بر اساس چند خطوط بنیادی SMT و NMT بهترین زیادی می رسد.', 'id': 'Hukuman dalam teks bentuk baik terhubung satu sama lain melalui berbagai hubungan untuk membentuk struktur kohesi teks. Sistem terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) saat ini terjemahan teks dalam kalimat-kalimat konvensional, mengabaikan hubungan dan dependensi kalimat-salib tersebut. Ini mungkin menyebabkan menghasilkan teks sasaran yang tidak konsisten untuk teks sumber yang konsisten. Untuk menangani masalah ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan berdasarkan cache untuk memmodelir koerensi untuk terjemahan mesin saraf dengan menangkap informasi kontekstual baik dari kalimat terjemahan baru-baru ini atau seluruh dokumen. Terutama, kita mengeksplorasi dua jenis cache: cache dinamik, yang menyimpan kata-kata dari hipotesis terjemahan terbaik dari kalimat sebelumnya, dan cache topik, yang menyimpan set kata topik sisi target yang secara semantis berhubungan dengan dokumen yang akan diterjemahkan. Pada dasar ini, kami membangun lapisan baru untuk mencetak kata-kata sasaran dalam dua cache ini dengan model saraf berdasarkan cache. Here the estimated probabilities from the cache-based neural model are combined with NMT probabilities into the final word prediction probabilities via a gating mechanism.  Akhirnya, model saraf berdasarkan cache yang diusulkan dilatih bersama dengan sistem NMT dengan cara akhir-akhir. Eksperimen dan analisis yang dihasilkan di kertas ini menunjukkan bahwa model berdasarkan cache yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang besar atas beberapa baris dasar SMT dan NMT yang terbaik.', 'ko': '양식이 좋은 텍스트 중의 문장은 각종 링크를 통해 서로 연결되어 텍스트의 연결 구조를 형성한다.현재의 신경기계번역(NMT) 시스템은 전통적인 한 문장씩 텍스트를 번역하는데 이런 크로스 링크와 의존 관계를 소홀히 한다.이것은 연결된 원본 텍스트에 연결되지 않은 목표 텍스트를 생성할 수 있습니다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 캐시 기반의 신경기계 번역 일관성 모델링 방법을 제시하여 최근에 번역된 문장이나 전체 문서를 통해 상하문 정보를 얻었다.특히 우리는 두 가지 유형의 캐시를 탐색했다. 하나는 동적 캐시로 앞의 문장에서 나온 가장 좋은 번역 가설의 단어를 저장하고, 다른 하나는 테마 캐시로 번역할 문서의 의미와 관련된 목표단 테마 단어를 유지한다.이를 바탕으로 우리는 새로운 층을 구축하여 캐시를 바탕으로 하는 신경모델을 이용하여 이 두 캐시 중의 목표어를 평가한다.여기서 캐시를 기반으로 한 신경모델의 추정 확률과 NMT 확률은 선택 메커니즘을 통해 최종 단어 예측 확률로 조합된다.마지막으로 제시된 캐시 기반의 신경 네트워크 모델과 NMT 시스템이 끝에서 끝까지 연합하여 훈련한다.본고에서 제시한 실험과 분석에 의하면 제시된 캐시 기반 모델은 몇 가지 가장 선진적인 SMT와 NMT 기선에서 실질적인 개선을 얻었다.', 'sw': 'Sentences in a well-formed text are connected to each other via various links to form the cohesive structure of the text.  Mifumo ya utafsiri wa mashine ya kiserikali (NMT) yanatafsiri maandishi katika mtindo wa kawaida wa sentenca-kwa-sentenca, ukiacha viungo hivyo vya kupitia hukumu na kutegemea. Hii inaweza kusababisha kutengeneza ujumbe wa malengo kwa ujumbe wa vyanzo vya pamoja. Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, tunapendekeza mbinu za kutengeneza ushirikiano kwa ajili ya kutafsiri mashine ya kisasa kwa kuchukua taarifa za kisasa ikiwa ni kutoka kwa sentensi zilizotafsiriwa hivi karibuni au nyaraka yote. hasa, tunachunguza aina mbili za mikahawa: kifaa kinachohusiana na maneno bora ya tafsiri ya hukumu zilizopita, na kifaa cha mada, ambacho kinabeba seti ya maneno ya muhimu yanayohusiana na nyaraka ya kutafsiri. Kwa msingi huu, tunajenga ngazi mpya ili kuweka ujumbe wa maneno yanayolenga katika vipande hivi viwili vikiwa na modeli ya neura yenye makazi. Hapa kuna uwezekano wa uwezekano wa mifano ya neura inayotumiwa na NMT wanaunganishwa na uwezekano wa kutabiri neno la mwisho kupitia mfumo wa kuchapisha. Mwisho, muundo wa neura unaopendekezwa umefundishwa pamoja na mfumo wa NMT kwa njia ya mwisho. Tatibu na uchambuzi uliotolewa katika karatasi hii inaonyesha kuwa modeli iliyopendekewa kwa kutumia mikahawa ya kigache inafanikiwa maboresho makubwa zaidi ya mistari kadhaa ya SMT na NMT.', 'tr': 'Iň gowy görkezilen metin sözleri metin üçin bir-birine görnüşli baglaýyşlar bilen bir-birine bağlanýar. Häzirki näyral maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) sistemleri düzgün sözle-täze modinde bir metin terjime edip, şol çarpaz sözle baglaýyşlary we baglanyşlaryny ýok edip bilmeýär. Bu mümkin çeşme metini saýlamak maksady metini bejersin. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, oňki terjime edilen sözleriň ýa-da tüm senediň näurul maşynyň terjime edilişligi üçin göz önüne görkezilýän taýýarlanmagy teklip edýäris. Munuň üçin biz iki hilli keşip gözleýäris: bir keşip, ol sözleriň iň gowy terjime hypotesisinden soňra sözleri we bellenen meýdança sözleriň kopuny tutýar. Bu sistemde, bu iki cache içinde maksady sözlerini cache tabanly näyral modeli bilen ثابت etmek üçin täze bir katyr in şa ediyoruz. Bu ýerde, käse tabanlı näral modelden tapylanan mümkinçilikler NMT sanlyklary bilen iň soňky söz öňlemesi mümkinçilikleri bilen gata meýdançasyndan birleştirildir. Soňunda, taýýarlanan nusgala nusgala NMT sistemi bilen iň soňra bir şekilde eğitilýär. Bu kagyzda görkezilýän deneyler we analýusiler görkezilýän käse taýýarlanan nusgadyň birnäçe sanat SMT we NMT esaslarnyň üstünde örän gowuraklary çykarýar.', 'af': "Stensils in 'n goed formeerde teks word verbind met mekaar deur verskeie skakels om die koesiewe struktuur van die teks te vorm. Huidige neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) stelsels vertaling 'n teks in 'n konvensionele sentence- by- sentence fashion, wat sodanige kruisseting skakels en afhanklikhede ignoreer. Hierdie dalk mag lei na genereer 'n ongesamende doel teks vir' n koerende bron teks. In order to handle this issue, we propose a cache-based approach to modeling coherence for neural machine translation by capturing contextual information either from recently translated sentences or the entire document. Eienskappe, ons ondersoek twee tipe kase:  'n dinamiese kase, wat stoor woorde van die beste vertaling hipotees van voorheede setinge en 'n onderwerp kase, wat onderhou 'n stel van doel-kant onderwerp woorde wat semantiese verwante word met die dokument om te vertaal. Op hierdie basis, bou ons 'n nuwe laag om doel woorde in hierdie twee kasete te tel met 'n kase-gebaseerde neural model. Hier is die gespesifiseerde waarskynlikheite van die kase-gebaseerde neural model gekombineer met NMT waarskynlikheite in die eindelike woord voorskou waarskynlikheite deur 'n gating mekanisme. Eindelik is die voorgestelde kase-gebaseerde neural model gelyk saam met NMT-stelsel in 'n einde-na-einde manier. Eksperimente en analisie wat in hierdie papier voorgeskryf is, vertoon dat die voorgestelde kase-gebaseerde model beter betalings oor verskeie staat-van-kuns-SMT en NMT-basisline.", 'sq': 'Dënimet në një tekst të formuar mirë janë të lidhura me njëri-tjetrin nëpërmjet lidhjeve të ndryshme për të formuar strukturën kohezive të tekstit. Sistemet aktuale të përkthimit të makinave nervore (NMT) përkthyen një tekst në një mënyrë konvencionale fjalë me fjalë, duke injoruar lidhje të tilla ndër-fjalë dhe varësi. Kjo mund të shpjerë në gjenerimin e një teksti objektiv të pakoheshëm për një tekst burimi koherent. Me qëllim që të trajtojmë këtë çështje, ne propozojmë një qasje bazuar në cache për modelimin e konsistencës për përkthimin e makinave nervore duke kapur informacion kontekstual ose nga fjalët e përkthyera kohët e fundit ose nga i gjithë dokumenti. Veçanërisht, ne eksplorojmë dy lloje cache: një cache dinamike, e cila ruan fjalët nga hipotezat më të mira të përkthimit të fjalëve të mëparshme, dhe një cache temike, e cila mban një sërë fjalësh aktuale nga ana objektive që janë semantikisht të lidhura me dokumentin që duhet përkthyer. Në këtë bazë, ne ndërtojmë një shtresë të re për të shënuar fjalët objektive në këto dy cache me një model nervor bazuar në cache. Këtu probabilitetet e vlerësuara nga modeli nervor bazuar në cache kombinohen me probabilitetet NMT në probabilitetet përfundimtare të parashikimit të fjalës nëpërmjet një mekanizmi gating. Më në fund, modeli nervor i propozuar bazuar në cache është trajnuar së bashku me sistemin NMT në një mënyrë nga fundi në fund. Eksperimentet dhe analizat e paraqitura në këtë letër demonstrojnë se modeli i propozuar bazuar në cache arrin përmirësime thelbësore mbi disa linja bazë SMT dhe NMT më të larta.', 'am': 'Sentences in a well-formed text are connected to each other via various links to form the cohesive structure of the text.  የአሁኑ የነጥብ መሻሻን ትርጉም (NMT) systems translate a text in a conventional sentence-by-sentence mode, ignoring such cross-sentence links and dependencies. ይሄንን ለማስቀመጥ የቦታ ጽሑፍ ለመፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመከላከል፣ የአሁኑ መረጃዎች ወይም ከቅርብ የተረጉሙትን ንግግር ወይም ሙሉ ሰነድ ማተርጓሜን ለመምረጥ የካክስ መሠረት መግለጫ እናስባለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ ሁለት ዓይነት ካክስ እናፈልጋለን፡፡ በአዲስ ደረጃ ላይ በሁለቱ ክፍሎች ውስጥ የኩነቶች ነጥብ model ለመቆጣጠር አዲስ ደረጃ እንሠራለን፡፡ በዚህ ካክስ-ተመሳሳይ የኔሩኤል ሞዴል ከNMT የመጨረሻው ቃላት የግንኙነት አካላት በመግኘት እቅረት የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በመጨረሻም፣ በተፈቀደው የካክስ-መሠረት የኒጀር ሞዴል ከNMT ስርዓት ጋር በመጨረሻ ለፍጻሜ ተማሪ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ የተፈተና ሞከር እና analysis የተፈጸመ የካክስ-ተመሳሳይ ሞዴል በክፍለ አካባቢው የSMT እና የNMT መደገፊያ ደረጃዎች ላይ የበለጠ ጥናት እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': "Լավ ձևավորված տեքստի արտահայտությունները կապված են միմյանց հետ տարբեր հղումների միջոցով, որպեսզի ձևավորեն տեքստի միասնական կառուցվածքը: Նյութական նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) համակարգերը թարգմանում են տեքստը ավանդական նախադասություն առ նախադասություն, անտեսելով նման խաչը նախադասությունների կապեր և կախվածություններ: Սա կարող է հանգեցնել անհամապատասխան նպատակային տեքստ համապատասխան աղբյուրի տեքստի համար: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք կեղևի հիմնված մոտեցում նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելավորման համար՝ վերցնելով կոնտեքստային տեղեկատվություն կամ վերջերս թարգմանված նախադասություններից, կամ ամբողջ փաստաթղթից: Հատկապես, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկու տեսակի կեղևերը' դինամիկ կեղևը, որը պահպանում է բառերը նախորդ նախադասությունների լավագույն թարգմանման հիպոթեզներից, և թեմային կեղևը, որը պահպանում է նպատակային կողմի թեմատիկ բառերի մի շարք, որոնք սեմանտիկ կապված են թարգմանելու փաստաթ Այս հիմնադրության վրա մենք ստեղծում ենք նոր շերտ, որպեսզի նպատակային բառերը գնահատենք այս երկու կեղմերում կեղմերում հիմնված նյարդային մոդելի օգնությամբ: Here the estimated probabilities from the cache-based neural model are combined with NMT probabilities into the final word prediction probabilities via a gating mechanism.  Finally, the proposed cache-based neural model is trained jointly with NMT system in an end-to-end manner.  Այս թղթի մեջ ներկայացված փորձարկումները և վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած կեղևի հիմնված մոդելը հասնում է նշանակալի բարելավումներին SMT-ի և NMT-ի տարբեր հիմքերում:", 'az': 'Yaxşı metin içində sözlər mətnin birləşdirilməsi üçün müxtəlif bağlar vasitəsilə bir-birinə bağlanılır. Şimdiki nöral maşın çevirimi (NMT) sistemləri, bu cümlələrdən və bağlılıqlarından məlumatları ignorləndirir. Bu müəyyən mənbə mətnlərinin müəyyən edilməsi üçün müəyyən bir mətn yaratmağa yol göstərə bilər. Bu məsələni çəkmək üçün, çox yaxın çevirilmiş cümlələrdən ya da bütün dökümdən müxtəlif məlumatları almaq üçün nöral maşına çevirilənlərin coherencisini modellemək üçün cache-based approach təklif edirik. Özellikle, biz iki cür cache keşif edirik: əvvəlki cümlələrin ən yaxşı tercümə hipotesindən sözləri və məlumatların çəkilməsi ilə semantik olaraq əlaqəli olan məlumatların məlumatlarını qoruyub saxlayan dinamik cache. Buna görə də, bu iki çöplərdə məqsəd sözlərini çəkmək üçün yeni bir düzüm in şa edirik ki, çöpə tabanlı nöral modeli ilə. Burada cache-tabanlı nöral modelindən müəyyən edilmiş mümkünlüklər NMT mümkünlükləri son sözlərin tədbir mümkünlüyü ilə birləşdirilmişdir. Sonunda, təklif edilən cache-based nöral modeli NMT sistemi sona-sona yolla birlikdə təhsil edilir. Bu kağıtda göstərilən təcrübələr və analizi göstərilir ki, təklif edilmiş cache-based modellərin bir neçə mövcud SMT və NMT-nin əsas səhifələrində çox yaxşılıqlarını başa düşər.', 'cs': 'Věty v dobře tvarovaném textu jsou navzájem propojeny různými odkazy a tvoří soudržnou strukturu textu. Současné systémy neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) překládají text konvenčním způsobem věty po větě a ignorují takové spojení a závislosti mezi větami. To může vést k vytvoření nekonzistentního cílového textu pro koherentní zdrojový text. Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme přístup založený na cache modelování koherence pro neuronový strojový překlad zachycením kontextových informací buď z nedávno přeložených vět, nebo z celého dokumentu. Zvláště zkoumáme dva typy cache: dynamickou cache, která ukládá slova z nejlepších překladových hypotéz předchozích vět, a tématickou cache, která udržuje sadu cílových aktuálních slov, která jsou sémanticky související s dokumentem, který má být přeložen. Na tomto základě vytvoříme novou vrstvu pro skórování cílových slov v těchto dvou caches s neuronovým modelem založeným na cache. Zde jsou odhadované pravděpodobnosti z neuronového modelu založeného na cache kombinovány s pravděpodobnostmi NMT do pravděpodobností predikce konečného slova pomocí gatingového mechanismu. V závěru je navržený neuronový model založený na cache trénován společně s NMT systémem end-to-end způsobem. Experimenty a analýzy prezentované v tomto článku ukazují, že navržený model založený na cache dosahuje podstatných zlepšení oproti několika moderním SMT a NMT základním liniím.', 'bn': 'টেক্সটের কসেসিভ কাঠামো তৈরি করার জন্য বিভিন্ন লিঙ্কের মাধ্যমে একে অপরের সাথে সংযুক্ত। বর্তমান নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) সিস্টেম কনশনিয়াল বাক্য- ব্যবহার করে একটি টেক্সট অনুবাদ করে, যা এই ধরনের ক্রিস্টেশনের লিঙ্ক এবং নির্ভর এটি একটি সোর্সের টেক্সটের জন্য অভ্যন্তরীণ লক্ষ্য টেক্সট তৈরি করতে পারে। এই বিষয়টি মুক্ত করার জন্য আমরা একটি ক্যাশ-ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য উপস্থাপনের জন্য, সম্প্রতি অনুবাদ করা বা পুরো নথ বিশেষ করে, আমরা দুটি ধরনের ক্যাশ খুঁজে বের করি: একটি ডাইনামিক ক্যাশ, যা পূর্ববর্তী বাক্যের সেরা অনুবাদের ভাষায় কথা সংরক্ষণ করে, আর একটি বিষয় ক্যাশ, যা টার্গেট-পার্শ্বের বিষয়বস্ On this basis, we build a new layer to score target words in these two caches with a cache-based neural model.  এখানে ক্যাশ ভিত্তিক নিউরেল মডেল থেকে হিসেবে সম্ভবত এনএমটির সম্ভাবনা শেষ শব্দের ভবিষ্যতের মাধ্যমে একটি গেটিং মেক্সিমেন্টের মাধ্যমে। অবশেষে, প্রস্তাবিত ক্যাশ ভিত্তিক নিউরেল মডেল এনএমটি সিস্টেমের সাথে একত্রে প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে শেষ পর্যন্ত। এই পত্রিকায় প্রস্তাবিত ক্যাশ ভিত্তিক মডেলের পরীক্ষা এবং বিশ্লেষণ প্রদর্শন করে যে বেশ কয়েকটি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পী এসএমটি এবং এনএমটি বেসাইনের উপর', 'bs': 'Izvori u dobro formiranom tekstu povezani su jedno sa drugom putem različitih veza kako bi formirali kohezivnu strukturu teksta. Trenutni sistemi prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) prevode tekst na konvencionalni način rečenice po rečenici, ignorirajući takve veze i zavisnosti krstorečenja. To može dovesti do stvaranja neslužnog metnog teksta za sasluženi tekst izvora. Da bismo riješili ovaj problem, predložili smo pristup kojim se temelji na kavezu modelira koherencije za prevod neuralnih strojeva hvatanjem kontekstnih informacija ili iz nedavno prevedenih rečenica ili cijelog dokumenta. Posebno, istražujemo dvije vrste cache: dinamični cache, koji čuva riječi iz najboljih prevodnih hipoteza prethodnih rečenica, i temske cache, koji održava setu temskih riječi na ciljnoj strani koja su semantički povezana sa prevodenim dokumentom. Na osnovu ovog, izgradili smo novi sloj kako bi rezultirali ciljne riječi u ovim dvije cache sa neuronskim modelom baziranim na cache. Ovdje su procjenjene verovatnoće iz neuralnog model a baziranog na kafiću kombinovane sa verovatnošću NMT-a u konačnu verovatnošću predviđanja riječi putem mehanizma ulaska. Konačno, predloženi neuralni model na cache obučen je zajedno s NMT sistemom na kraju do kraja. Eksperimenti i analiza predstavljene u ovom papiru pokazuju da je predloženi model koji se temelji na cache postigao značajno poboljšanje na nekoliko područja SMT-a i NMT-a.', 'ca': "Les frases d'un text ben format es connecten entre elles a través de diversos enllaços per formar l'estructura coesa del text. Els sistemes actuals de traducció neural de màquines (NMT) tradueixen un text de manera convencional frase per frase, ignorant aquests enllaços i dependencies cruzades. Això pot generar un text d'objectiu incoherent per a un text de font coherent. Per tractar aquesta qüestió, proposem un enfocament basat en cache per modelar la coherencia de la traducció de màquines neurals capturant informació contextual de frases traduïdes recentment o tot el document. En particular, explorem dos tipus de cachés: una caché dinàmica, que emmagatzema paraules de les millors hipòtesis de traducció de les frases anteriors, i una caché de temes, que manté un conjunt de paraules tòpices al costat de l'objectiu que estan semànticament relacionades amb el document a traduir. En aquesta base, construïm una nova capa per puntuar les paraules alvo en aquestes dues caches amb un model neuronal basat en cache. Aquí les probabilitats estimades del model neuronal basat en cache es combinan amb probabilitats de NMT en les probabilitats de predicció de paraules finals mitjançant un mecanisme de gating. Finalment, el model neural proposat basat en cache s'entrena conjuntament amb el sistema NMT d'una manera final a final. Els experiments i l'anàlisi presentats en aquest paper demostren que el model proposat basat en la caché aconsegueix millores substancials sobre diverses línies de base de SMT i NMT d'última generació.", 'fi': 'Hyvin muotoillun tekstin lauseet yhdistetﾃ､ﾃ､n toisiinsa eri linkkien kautta muodostaen tekstin yhtenﾃ､isen rakenteen. Nykyiset neurokonekﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶsjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､t (NMT) kﾃ､ﾃ､ntﾃ､vﾃ､t tekstin perinteisesti lause kerrallaan jﾃ､ttﾃ､en huomiotta tﾃ､llaiset lauseiden vﾃ､liset linkit ja riippuvuudet. Tﾃ､mﾃ､ voi johtaa epﾃ､johdonmukaisen kohdetekstin luomiseen johdonmukaiselle lﾃ､hdetekstille. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme vﾃ､limuistiin perustuvaa lﾃ､hestymistapaa neurokonekﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶksen koherenssin mallintamiseen tallentamalla kontekstitietoa joko ﾃ､skettﾃ､in kﾃ､ﾃ､nnetyistﾃ､ lauseista tai koko dokumentista. Tutkimme erityisesti kahdentyyppisiﾃ､ vﾃ､limuisteja: dynaamista vﾃ､limuistia, joka tallentaa sanat edellisten lauseiden parhaista kﾃ､ﾃ､nnﾃｶstekniikoista, ja aihevﾃ､limuistia, joka yllﾃ､pitﾃ､ﾃ､ kohdepuolen ajankohtaisia sanoja, jotka liittyvﾃ､t semanttisesti kﾃ､ﾃ､nnettﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n asiakirjaan. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n pohjalta rakennamme uuden kerroksen kohdesanojen pisteyttﾃ､miseksi nﾃ､ihin kahteen vﾃ､limuistiin vﾃ､limuistiin perustuvalla neuromallilla. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ vﾃ､limuistipohjaisen neuromallin arvioidut todennﾃ､kﾃｶisyydet yhdistetﾃ､ﾃ､n NMT-todennﾃ､kﾃｶisyyksiin viimeisen sanan ennustetodennﾃ､kﾃｶisyyksiin gating-mekanismin avulla. Lopuksi ehdotettu vﾃ､limuistiin perustuva neuromalli koulutetaan yhdessﾃ､ NMT-jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､n kanssa pﾃ､ﾃ､stﾃ､ pﾃ､ﾃ､hﾃ､n -tavalla. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa esitetyt kokeet ja analyysit osoittavat, ettﾃ､ ehdotettu vﾃ､limuistiin perustuva malli saavuttaa merkittﾃ､viﾃ､ parannuksia useisiin viimeisimpiin SMT- ja NMT-lﾃ､htﾃｶlinjoihin verrattuna.', 'et': 'Hästi vormistatud teksti laused on omavahel ühendatud erinevate linkide kaudu, et moodustada teksti sidus struktuur. Praegused neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) süsteemid tõlgivad teksti tavapäraselt lause-lauselt, ignoreerides selliseid lausevahelisi linke ja sõltuvusi. See võib viia sidusa lähteteksti jaoks ebaühtlase sihtteksti loomiseni. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja vahemälupõhise lähenemisviisi neuromasintõlke sidususe modelleerimiseks, kogudes kontekstiteavet kas hiljuti tõlgitud lausetest või kogu dokumendist. Eelkõige uurime kahte tüüpi vahemälu: dünaamiline vahemälu, mis salvestab sõnu eelmiste lausete parimatest tõlkehüpoteesidest, ja teemavahemälu, mis säilitab sihtküljel paikseid sõnu, mis on semantiliselt seotud tõlkitava dokumendiga. Selle põhjal ehitame uue kihi, et skoorida sihtsõnu nendes kahes vahemällus, kasutades vahemälu-põhist närvimudelit. Siin kombineeritakse vahemälu-põhise närvimudeli hinnangulised tõenäosused NMT tõenäosustega lõppsõna prognoosimise tõenäosusteks värvimismehhanismi kaudu. Lõpuks koolitatakse väljapakutud vahemälu-põhist neuromudelit koos NMT süsteemiga otsast otsani. Käesolevas dokumendis esitatud eksperimendid ja analüüsid näitavad, et kavandatud vahemälu-põhine mudel saavutab märkimisväärseid parandusi mitme kaasaegse SMT ja NMT lähtejoone võrreldes.', 'sk': 'Stavki v dobro oblikovanem besedilu so med seboj povezani prek različnih povezav, da tvorijo kohezivno strukturo besedila. Trenutni sistemi nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) prevajajo besedilo v običajnem stavku za stavkom, pri čemer ne upoštevajo takšnih navzkrižnih povezav in odvisnosti. To lahko povzroči ustvarjanje nepovezanega ciljnega besedila za skladno izvorno besedilo. Za reševanje tega problema predlagamo pristop, ki temelji na predpomnilniku, k modeliranju koherence za nevronsko strojno prevajanje z zajemanjem kontekstualnih informacij iz nedavno prevedenih stavkov ali celotnega dokumenta. Predvsem raziskujemo dve vrsti predpomnilnikov: dinamični predpomnilnik, ki shranjuje besede iz najboljših prevajalskih hipotez prejšnjih stavkov, in predpomnilnik teme, ki ohranja nabor ciljnih tematskih besed, ki so semantično povezane z dokumentom, ki ga je treba prevesti. Na podlagi tega zgradimo novo plast za ocenjevanje ciljnih besed v teh dveh predpomnilnikih z nevronskim modelom, ki temelji na predpomnilniku. Tukaj se ocenjene verjetnosti iz predpomnilniškega nevronskega modela kombinirajo z verjetnostmi NMT v verjetnosti napovedi končne besede prek mehanizma gating. Nazadnje se predlagani nevronski model, ki temelji na predpomnilniku, usposablja skupaj s sistemom NMT na način od konca do konca. Poskusi in analize, predstavljene v tem prispevku, kažejo, da predlagani model, ki temelji na predpomnilniku, doseže znatne izboljšave v več najsodobnejših osnovnih linijah SMT in NMT.', 'ha': "Shawarar da aka daidaita wani matsayi mai kyau, sun yi haɗa da jũna da wasu links don su ƙiƙiri tsarin matsayin. translation Wannan mai yiwuwa yana ƙara wani matsayi na kiyaye wa matsayin na kiyaye ba. Dõmin ya yi amfani da wannan masu husũma, sai mu buƙata wata hanyor bakin cachen zuwa ka motsar kokence wa translation wa mashine neural, ko kuma ka kãma data na takardar da aka fassar a yanzu ko duk takardar. Particularly, we explore two types of caches: a dynamic cache, which stores words from the best translation hypotheses of preceding sentences, and a topic cache, which maintains a set of target-side topical words that are semantically related to the document to be translated.  Daga wannan, muna samar da wani wuri na yanzu don mu yi amfani da maganar amfani cikin wannan baka biyu sunã da wani motel mai baka kaksi. Hali yana da yiwuwa wanda aka ƙaddara daga misalin neural wanda ke asanin cachen an haɗa da masu yiwuwa na NMT zuwa ga saurin na ƙarshen kalma na yi kusa a sami wani mekanin inganci. Haƙĩƙa, an sanar da shirin motel mai asanin cachen na aikin ƙwarai da shirin wata na'ura da NMT cikin shirin-ƙari zuwa-ƙari. Saurin da Ana cikin wannan takarda ya nuna cewa, misãlin wanda aka buƙata a bakin cachen, ya sami amfani da shi mai girma a cikin wasu halin-the-art SMT da NMT.", 'jv': "structural navigation Actual Sampeyan bisa ngubah winih iki dadi, kita supoyo nggawe kelas-nggawe gerakan kelas nang sampeyan ingkang sampeyan kanggo tarjamahan karo perangkat alam wiir dhéwé ngomong: Nang iki basa, kita nggawe Layer Bar kanggo kelompok tarjamahan iki wae Caption Ero, supoyo nambah model sing basa gambar n' e nyerung mudyane sampeyan karo sistem NMT, nganggo sawayaan end-to-end . User", 'he': 'משפטים בטקסט שנוצר היטב מחוברים אחד לשני דרך קשרים שונים כדי ליצור את מבנה התקביל של הטקסט. המערכות הנוכחיות של התרגום של מכונות עצביות (NMT) תורגמות טקסט באופן משפטי-משפטי קונבנציונלי זה יכול להוביל לייצר טקסט מטרה לא תואם לטקסט מקור תואם. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים גישה מבוססת על מחסן לדוגמא תואם לתרגום מכונות עצביות על ידי השיגור מידע קונטקסטי או משפטים מתרגמים לאחרונה או כל המסמך. במיוחד, אנחנו חוקרים שני סוגים של מחסנים: מחסן דינמי, שמחסן מילים מההיפותזיות הטובות ביותר של משפטים קודמים, וחסן נושאי, שמחזיק קבוצה של מילים נושאיות לצד המטרה שקשורות באופן סמנטי למסמך שיתרגום. On this basis, we build a new layer to score target words in these two caches with a cache-based neural model.  כאן הסבירות המערכות מהמודל העצבי המבוסס על המחסן משולבות עם סבירות NMT לסבירות החזוי של המילה האחרונה באמצעות מנגנון גייט. סוף סוף, המודל העצבי המבוסס על המחסן המוצע מאומן יחד עם מערכת NMT בדרך סוף-סוף. Experiments and analysis presented in this paper demonstrate that the proposed cache-based model achieves substantial improvements over several state-of-the-art SMT and NMT baselines.', 'bo': 'ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཚོར་རྣམས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་འདྲ་མི་འདྲ་བའི་དབར་གྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ད་ལྟོའི་མ་ལག་འཁོར་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེ་ཚིག་འདི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཚིག་གི་ཚིག་རྩིས་གཞུང་ལ་གཞུང་བཟོས་ འདིས་མཉམ་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་སྒྲིག་མེད་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཡིག་གེ་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཐུབ་པ In order to handle this issue, we propose a cache-based approach to modeling coherence for neural machine translation by capturing contextual information either from recently translated sentences or the entire document. དམིགས་བསལ་ནི། ང་ཚོའི་རིགས་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདིར་cache་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་སྒུལ་གྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་ནས་ཡོད་པའི་བྱ་ཚུལ་དག་གིས་NMT རྒྱུ་དངོས་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་ཐོག་ལས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག མཐའ་མར་རང་ཆས་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་ཡིག་སྣོད་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མ་དབུགས་ནི་NMT་ཡིས་མཉམ་དུ་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱས་ཡོད། Experiments and analysis presented in this paper demonstrate that the proposed cache-based model achieves substantial improvements over several state-of-the-art SMT and NMT baselines.'}
{'en': 'Fusing Recency into Neural Machine Translation with an Inter-Sentence Gate Model', 'ar': 'دمج الحداثة في ترجمة الآلة العصبية باستخدام نموذج البوابة بين الجمل', 'pt': 'Fusão de recência em tradução automática neural com um modelo de portão entre sentenças', 'es': 'Fusión de lo reciente en la traducción automática neuronal con un modelo de puerta entre frases', 'fr': 'Fusion de la récence dans la traduction automatique neuronale avec un modèle de porte inter-phrases', 'ja': 'センテンス間ゲートモデルを用いたニューラル・マシン・トランスレーションへのRecencyの融合', 'zh': '合新近度于句间门模神经机器翻译中', 'ru': 'Слияние новизны в нейронный машинный перевод с моделью межрегламентных ворот', 'hi': 'एक अंतर वाक्य गेट मॉडल के साथ तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में Recency फ्यूजिंग', 'ga': 'Ag Comhleá Atharthachta san Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach le Múnla Geata Idir-Abairte', 'el': 'Συγχώνευση της ακρίβειας σε νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση με ένα μοντέλο πύλης μεταξύ των προτάσεων', 'hu': 'A k철zelm첬ltb챕li ford챠t찼s idegi g챕pi ford챠t찼sba 철tv철z챕se egy mondatk철zi kapu modellel', 'ka': 'Name', 'lt': 'Naujausios informacijos perdavimas į neurologinės mašinos vertimą tarpsensoriniu vartų modeliu', 'it': 'Fusione della recenza in traduzione automatica neurale con un modello di cancello inter-frase', 'kk': 'Қазіргі сөздер тізімі үлгісімен нейрондық машинаның аудармасына қалдыру', 'mk': 'Name', 'mt': 'Fusing Recent into Neural Machine Translation with an Inter-Sentence Gate Model', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിലേക്കുള്ള പുനരുത്ഥാനത്തിലേക്കുള്ള പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുക', 'ms': 'Name', 'pl': 'Łączenie recencji w neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym z modelem bramy między zdaniami', 'ro': 'Combinarea recenței în traducerea automată neurală cu un model de poartă inter-sentință', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Jebeš Recenciju u Neuralnu mašinu prevod sa modelom Inter-Sentence Gate', 'si': 'අන්තර්ය- වාක්ෂා ගේට් මොඩල් එක්ක නිර්මාණ මැෂින් පරිවර්තනයට අවශ්\u200dය වාර්තාව', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үеийн мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалт нь интерфейс үеийн загвартай', 'so': 'Fusing Recency into Neural machine Translation with an Inter-Sentence Gate Model', 'sv': 'Fusion Recency till Neural Machine Translation med en inter-menings Gate Model', 'ur': 'انٹر سنٹنس گیٹ موڈل کے ساتھ نیورال ماشین ترجمہ میں فسینگ کرنا', 'ta': 'ஒரு இடைவெளி வாயில் மாதிரி மொழிபெயர்ப்புடன் நெய்யூர் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் மறுநிகழ்வை பின்வருகி', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ngưng kết nối lại cấu trúc thần kinh với một kiểu cổng gọi lại.', 'bg': 'Сливане на скорошното в невралния машинен превод с модел на портала между изреченията', 'da': 'Sammensætning af nyhed til neural maskinoversættelse med en mellemsætnings portmodel', 'hr': 'Jebeš nedavnost u neuronski prevod uređaja sa modelom Inter-Sentence Gate', 'nl': 'Samenvoegen van recency in neuronale machinevertaling met een Inter-Sentence Gate Model', 'de': 'Verschmelzung von Rekenzität in neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit einem Satztor-Modell', 'id': 'Fusing Recent into Neural Machine Translation with an Inter-Sentence Gate Model', 'ko': '문간문 모형을 바탕으로 하는 신경기계 번역에서의 근인 융합', 'fa': 'تازگی به ترجمه ماشین عصبی با یک مدل دروازه\u200cی عبارت', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Kufuatia Usafiri wa Matukio katika Mashine ya Njerumani kwa Utafiti wa Mtandao wa Jinai', 'tr': 'Nural Maşynyň terjimesine Jaňky Çykarmak bilen Jaňky Çykarmak Mody', 'sq': 'Fusioni i kohëve të fundit në përkthimin e makinës nervore me një model portë ndërgjykimi', 'az': 'Nəyral maşına çevirilən Tərcümə Qıpı Modeli ilə', 'bn': 'একটি ইন্টার- শেষ গেট মডেল দিয়ে নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদে প্রত্যাবর্তন অনুবাদ পাওয়া যাচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Վերջերս նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման միավորումը միջնազգայական դարպասի մոդելի միջոցով', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'ca': 'fusionar recentment en una traducció de màquines neurones amb un model de porta intersentencial', 'bs': 'Jebeš nedavnost u neurološki prevod sa modelom Inter-Sentence Gate', 'cs': 'Spojení recenze do neuronového strojového překladu s modelem brány mezi větami', 'et': 'Hiljutise ühendamine neuraalse masintõlkega lausedevahelise värava mudeliga', 'fi': 'Äskettäisyyden yhdistäminen neurokonekäännökseen lauseiden välisellä porttimallilla', 'jv': 'undo-type', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Združevanje nedavnosti v nevralni strojni prevod z modelom vrat med stavbami', 'he': 'מיזוג לאחרונה לתרגום מכונת נוירולית עם מודל שער בין גזרים', 'bo': 'Fusing Recency into Neural Machine Translation with an Inter-Sentence Gate Model'}
{'en': 'Neural machine translation (NMT) systems are usually trained on a large amount of bilingual sentence pairs and translate one sentence at a time, ignoring inter-sentence information. This may make the translation of a sentence ambiguous or even inconsistent with the translations of neighboring sentences. In order to handle this issue, we propose an inter-sentence gate model that uses the same encoder to encode two adjacent sentences and controls the amount of information flowing from the preceding sentence to the translation of the current sentence with an inter-sentence gate. In this way, our proposed model can capture the connection between sentences and fuse recency from neighboring sentences into neural machine translation. On several NIST Chinese-English translation tasks, our experiments demonstrate that the proposed inter-sentence gate model achieves substantial improvements over the baseline.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما يتم تدريب أنظمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) على عدد كبير من أزواج الجمل ثنائية اللغة وترجمة جملة واحدة في كل مرة ، مع تجاهل المعلومات بين الجمل. قد يجعل هذا ترجمة الجملة غامضة أو حتى غير متوافقة مع ترجمات الجمل المجاورة. من أجل معالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح نموذج بوابة بين الجمل يستخدم نفس المشفر لتشفير جملتين متجاورتين ويتحكم في كمية المعلومات المتدفقة من الجملة السابقة إلى ترجمة الجملة الحالية باستخدام بوابة بين الجمل. بهذه الطريقة ، يمكن لنموذجنا المقترح التقاط العلاقة بين الجمل ودمج الحداثة من الجمل المجاورة في الترجمة الآلية العصبية. في العديد من مهام الترجمة الصينية-الإنجليزية من NIST ، تُظهر تجاربنا أن نموذج البوابة بين الجمل المقترح يحقق تحسينات كبيرة على خط الأساس.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas de tradução automática neural (NMT) geralmente são treinados em uma grande quantidade de pares de frases bilíngues e traduzem uma frase por vez, ignorando as informações entre as frases. Isso pode tornar a tradução de uma frase ambígua ou mesmo inconsistente com as traduções de frases vizinhas. Para lidar com esse problema, propomos um modelo de porta entre frases que usa o mesmo codificador para codificar duas frases adjacentes e controla a quantidade de informação que flui da frase anterior para a tradução da frase atual com uma porta entre frases. Desta forma, nosso modelo proposto pode capturar a conexão entre sentenças e fundir a recência de sentenças vizinhas em tradução automática neural. Em várias tarefas de tradução chinês-inglês do NIST, nossos experimentos demonstram que o modelo de portão entre frases proposto alcança melhorias substanciais em relação à linha de base.', 'es': 'Los sistemas de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) generalmente se entrenan en una gran cantidad de pares de oraciones bilingües y traducen una oración a la vez, ignorando la información entre frases. Esto puede hacer que la traducción de una oración sea ambigua o incluso inconsistente con las traducciones de oraciones vecinas. Para resolver este problema, proponemos un modelo de puerta entre frases que utiliza el mismo codificador para codificar dos oraciones adyacentes y controla la cantidad de información que fluye desde la oración anterior a la traducción de la oración actual con una puerta entre frases. De esta manera, nuestro modelo propuesto puede capturar la conexión entre oraciones y fusionar lo reciente de las oraciones vecinas en la traducción automática neuronal. En varias tareas de traducción chino-inglés del NIST, nuestros experimentos demuestran que el modelo de puerta entre frases propuesto logra mejoras sustanciales con respecto a la línea de base.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) sont généralement formés sur un grand nombre de paires de phrases bilingues et traduisent une phrase à la fois, en ignorant les informations interphrases. Cela peut rendre la traduction d'une phrase ambiguë ou même incohérente avec les traductions des phrases voisines. Afin de résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un modèle de porte inter-phrases qui utilise le même encodeur pour coder deux phrases adjacentes et contrôle la quantité d'informations circulant de la phrase précédente à la traduction de la phrase actuelle avec une porte inter-phrases. De cette façon, le modèle que nous proposons peut capturer la connexion entre les phrases et fusionner la récence des phrases voisines dans la traduction automatique neuronale. Sur plusieurs tâches de traduction chinois-anglais du NIST, nos expériences démontrent que le modèle de porte inter-phrases proposé apporte des améliorations substantielles par rapport à la base de référence.", 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)系统常于大双语句对上训练,一译一句,忽句间信息。 或使句译含糊不清,至与邻句异。 为此一句间门模,同编码器编码器两邻句,以句间门制前句流信息量。 因此,我们模样可以获句子之间的联络,并将邻句的新近度融合到神经机器翻译中。 NIST数汉英译,吾实验明之,句间门比基线有实质性改进。', 'ja': 'ニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）システムは、通常、大量のバイリンガル文のペアで訓練され、文間情報を無視して一度に1つの文を翻訳します。これにより、文の翻訳が曖昧になる場合もあれば、隣接する文の翻訳と矛盾する場合もある。この問題に対処するために、同じエンコーダを使用して隣接する2つの文を符号化し、前文から現在の文の翻訳に流れる情報量を文間ゲートで制御する文間ゲートモデルを提案する。このようにして、提唱されたモデルは、文の間のつながりを捉え、隣接する文からニューラル機械翻訳に最近のものを融合させることができる。いくつかのNIST中国語-英語翻訳タスクで、私たちの実験は、提案された文章間ゲートモデルがベースラインを大幅に改善することを実証しています。', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) प्रणालियों को आमतौर पर द्विभाषी वाक्य जोड़े की एक बड़ी मात्रा पर प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है और अंतर-वाक्य जानकारी की अनदेखी करते हुए एक समय में एक वाक्य का अनुवाद किया जाता है। यह एक वाक्य के अनुवाद को अस्पष्ट या पड़ोसी वाक्यों के अनुवाद के साथ भी असंगत बना सकता है। इस मुद्दे को संभालने के लिए, हम एक अंतर-वाक्य गेट मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो दो आसन्न वाक्यों को एन्कोड करने के लिए एक ही एन्कोडर का उपयोग करता है और एक अंतर-वाक्य गेट के साथ वर्तमान वाक्य के अनुवाद के लिए पूर्ववर्ती वाक्य से बहने वाली जानकारी की मात्रा को नियंत्रित करता है। इस तरह, हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में पड़ोसी वाक्यों से वाक्यों और फ्यूज पुनरावृत्ति के बीच संबंध पर कब्जा कर सकता है। कई एनआईएसटी चीनी-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद कार्यों पर, हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित अंतर-वाक्य गेट मॉडल बेसलाइन पर पर्याप्त सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Нейронные системы машинного перевода (НМП) обычно обучаются большому количеству двуязычных пар предложений и переводят одно предложение за раз, игнорируя информацию между предложениями. Это может сделать перевод предложения двусмысленным или даже несовместимым с переводами соседних предложений. Чтобы решить эту проблему, мы предлагаем модель межпредложения, которая использует один и тот же кодировщик для кодирования двух смежных предложений и контролирует объем информации, протекающей от предыдущего предложения до перевода текущего предложения с помощью межпредложения. Таким образом, наша предлагаемая модель может зафиксировать связь между предложениями и слиянием остаточности из соседних предложений в нейронный машинный перевод. В нескольких задачах китайско-английского перевода NIST наши эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемая модель межпредложения достигает существенных улучшений по сравнению с базовой линией.', 'ga': 'Go hiondúil cuirtear oiliúint ar chórais néaraistriúcháin meaisín (NMT) ar líon mór péirí abairtí dátheangacha agus aistrítear abairt amháin ag an am, gan aird a thabhairt ar fhaisnéis idir-abairtí. D’fhéadfadh sé go bhfágfadh sé seo aistriúchán ar abairt débhríoch nó fiú ar neamhréir leis na haistriúcháin ar abairtí comharsanacha. Chun an tsaincheist seo a láimhseáil, molaimid múnla geata idir-abairtí a úsáideann an t-ionchódóir céanna chun dhá abairt in aice láimhe a ionchódú agus a rialaíonn an méid faisnéise a shreabhann ón abairt roimhe seo go dtí aistriúchán na habairte reatha le geata idir-abairt. Ar an mbealach seo, is féidir leis an tsamhail atá beartaithe againn an nasc idir abairtí agus ceartacht ó abairtí comharsanacha go haistriúchán meaisíneach a ghabháil. Maidir le roinnt tascanna aistriúcháin Sínis-Béarla de chuid NIST, léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go bhfuil feabhsuithe suntasacha bainte amach ag an tsamhail geata idirbhreithe atá molta thar an mbunlíne.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილება (NMT) სისტემები უბრალოდ დიდი მრავალური წიგნის ზოგი და ერთი წიგნის გადაწყვეტილება, საშუალური წიგნის ინფორმაციას უნდა იგ ეს შეიძლება შეიძლება გადაწყვეტა სიტყვების გადაწყვეტა ან კიდევ შეუძლებელია გადაწყვეტა შემდეგი სიტყვების გადაწყვეტა. ამ პრობლემას გავაკეთებთ, ჩვენ მინდომარებით ერთადერთი სიტყვების მოდელი, რომელიც იგივე კოდირების გამოყენება, რომ ორი მხარეს სიტყვების კოდირება და კონტროლურება ინფორმაციის რაოდენობას, რომელიც წინ სიტყ ასე, ჩვენი მოდელ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ სიტყვების კავშირი და გადასრულებული სიტყვების შესახებ ნეიროლური მანქანის გადასრულებაში. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოყენება, რომ მინდომარებული შინის-ანგლისური მოდელეში ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები მოდელურია, რომ მინდომარებული მოდელი შინის წინაწერის მოდე', 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordító (NMT) rendszereket általában nagy mennyiségű kétnyelvű mondatpárra képezik, és egyszerre egy mondatot fordítanak le, figyelmen kívül hagyva a mondatok közötti információkat. Ez egy mondat fordítását kétértelművé teheti, vagy akár ellentmondhatatlanná teheti a szomszédos mondatok fordításával. A probléma kezelése érdekében egy mondatközi kapu modellt javasolunk, amely ugyanazt a kódolót használja két szomszédos mondat kódolására, és szabályozza az előző mondattól az aktuális mondat fordításáig folyó információk mennyiségét mondatközi kapuval. Ily módon javasolt modellünk megragadhatja a mondatok közötti kapcsolatot, és a szomszédos mondatokból származó újdonságokat egyesítheti neurális gépi fordításba. Számos NIST kínai-angol fordítási feladat esetében kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt mondatközi kapu modell jelentős javulást ér el a kiinduláshoz képest.', 'el': 'Τα συστήματα νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT) εκπαιδεύονται συνήθως σε μεγάλο αριθμό δίγλωσσων ζευγαριών προτάσεων και μεταφράζουν μια πρόταση τη φορά, αγνοώντας τις πληροφορίες μεταξύ προτάσεων. Αυτό μπορεί να κάνει τη μετάφραση μιας πρότασης διφορούμενη ή ακόμη και ασυνεπής με τις μεταφράσεις γειτονικών προτάσεων. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο πύλης μεταξύ προτάσεων που χρησιμοποιεί τον ίδιο κωδικοποιητή για να κωδικοποιήσει δύο γειτονικές προτάσεις και ελέγχει το ποσό των πληροφοριών που ρέουν από την προηγούμενη πρόταση στη μετάφραση της τρέχουσας πρότασης με πύλη μεταξύ προτάσεων. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο μπορεί να συλλάβει τη σύνδεση μεταξύ των προτάσεων και να συγχωνεύσει τις πρόσφατες από γειτονικές προτάσεις σε νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση. Σε αρκετές εργασίες μετάφρασης κινέζικα-αγγλικά, τα πειράματά μας αποδεικνύουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο πύλης μεταξύ των προτάσεων επιτυγχάνει ουσιαστικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με τη βασική γραμμή.', 'it': 'I sistemi di traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) sono solitamente addestrati su una grande quantità di coppie di frasi bilingue e traducono una frase alla volta, ignorando le informazioni tra frasi. Questo può rendere la traduzione di una frase ambigua o addirittura incoerente con le traduzioni di frasi vicine. Per risolvere questo problema, proponiamo un modello di gate inter-frase che utilizza lo stesso encoder per codificare due frasi adiacenti e controlla la quantità di informazioni che fluiscono dalla frase precedente alla traduzione della frase corrente con un gate inter-frase. In questo modo, il nostro modello proposto può catturare la connessione tra le frasi e fondere la recenza dalle frasi vicine in traduzione automatica neurale. Su diversi compiti di traduzione cinese-inglese NIST, i nostri esperimenti dimostrano che il modello di gate tra frasi proposto raggiunge miglioramenti sostanziali rispetto alla base di riferimento.', 'mk': 'Системите за нервен машински превод (НМТ) обично се обучуваат за голема количина двојјазични парови реченици и преведуваат една реченица по една, игнорирајќи информации меѓу речениците. Ова може да го направи преводот на реченица нејасен или дури и несогласен со преводот на соседните реченици. За да се справи со ова прашање, предлагаме модел на меѓуреченица на портата кој го користи истиот кодер за кодирање на две соседни реченици и го контролира количината на информации кои доаѓаат од претходната реченица до преводот на тековната реченица со меѓуреченица портата. На овој начин, нашиот предложен модел може да ја фати поврзаноста помеѓу речениците и врзувањето на речениците од соседните реченици во нервен машински превод. Во врска со неколку НИСТ кинеско-англиски преводни задачи, нашите експерименти покажуваат дека предложениот меѓуречен модел на портата постигнува значителни подобрувања во однос на основата.', 'lt': 'Neuralinės mašinos vertimo (NMT) sistemos paprastai mokomos daug dvikalbių sakinių poros ir vieną sakinį išversti vienu metu, ignoruojant tarpsakinių informaciją. Tai gali padaryti sakinio vertimą dviprasmišku arba net nesuderinamu su kaimyninių sakinių vertimu. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, siūlome tarpsakinių vartų model į, kuris naudoja tą patį koduotoją dviem gretimiems sakiniams koduoti ir kontroliuoja informacijos, gaunamos nuo ankstesnio sakinio iki dabartinio sakinio vertimo tarpsakiniais vartais, kiekį. Tokiu būdu mūsų siūlomas modelis gali užfiksuoti sąsają tarp sakinių ir sujungti neseniai esančius kaimyninius sakinius į nervinį mašinų vertimą. Mūsų eksperimentai parodė, kad pasiūlytas tarpsakinių vartų modelis, atlikdamas keletą Kinijos ir anglų vertimo užduočių, iš esmės pagerina pradinę vertimą.', 'kk': 'Нейрондық компьютердің аударуы (NMT) жүйелері кәдімгі екі тілік сөйлеменің екі жиілігіне аударып, бір сөйлемені бір уақытта аударып, сөйлеменің мәліметін елемейді. Бұл сөйлеменің аудармасын білмейтін немесе соңғы сөйлеменің аудармасына келмейді. Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін біз бір сұлбаның арасындағы сұлбаның қапшығын қолдану үшін бір кодерді қолданатын, екі жағындағы сұлбаны кодтау үшін, алдыңғы сұлбаның аудармасына қараған мәліметтің санын басқару үшін қолд Бұл үлгі үлгілеріміз сөйлемелердің арасындағы байланысын түсіріп, көңіл сөйлемелерден невралдық машинаның аудармасына түсіріп алады. Бірнеше NIST қытайша-ағылшын аудармалардың тапсырмаларында, біз тәжірибелеріміз келтірілген мәліметтің қапшығының негізгі жолында көп жақсарту үшін көрсетіледі.', 'ms': 'Sistem terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) biasanya dilatih pada jumlah besar pasangan kalimat dua bahasa dan terjemahan satu kalimat pada masa, mengabaikan maklumat antara kalimat. Ini boleh membuat terjemahan kalimat ambiguh atau bahkan tidak konsisten dengan terjemahan kalimat jiran. Untuk menangani isu ini, kami cadangkan model gerbang antara kalimat yang menggunakan pengekod yang sama untuk mengekod dua kalimat sebelah dan mengawal jumlah maklumat yang mengalir dari kalimat sebelumnya ke terjemahan kalimat semasa dengan gerbang antara kalimat. Dengan cara ini, model kami yang diusulkan boleh menangkap sambungan antara kalimat dan menghidupkan kebelakangan dari kalimat jiran ke dalam terjemahan mesin saraf. Dalam beberapa tugas terjemahan Cina-Inggeris NIST, eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa model pintu antar-kalimat yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang besar atas dasar asas.', 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) സിസ്റ്റം സാധാരണ രണ രണ്ടു ഭാഷ വാക്കിന്റെ ജോടികളില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്കില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് ഉപ അയല്\u200dക്കാരുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ അനുവാദങ്ങളുമായി വാക്കിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത ഈ വിഷയത്തെ നിയന്ത്രിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഒരേ വാക്കിന്റെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഗേറ്റിന്റെ ഗേറ്റ് മോഡല്\u200d നാം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് രണ്ടു അടുത്ത അങ്ങനെയാണ്, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധം പിടികൂടാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത്, അയല്\u200dവിധ ചൈനീസ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിഭാഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളുടെ ഗേറ', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali (NMT) normalment huma mħarrġa fuq ammont kbir ta’ pari ta’ sentenzi billingwi u jittraduċu sentenza waħda f’daqqa, filwaqt li jinjoraw l-informazzjoni bejn sentenzi. Dan jista’ jagħmel it-traduzzjoni ta’ sentenza ambigwa jew anke inkonsistenti mat-traduzzjonijiet ta’ sentenzi ġirien. Sabiex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, qed nipproponu mudell tal-portal bejn is-sentenzi li juża l-istess kodifikatur biex jikkodifika żewġ sentenzi maġenb xulxin u jikkontrolla l-ammont ta’ informazzjoni li to ħroġ mis-sentenza preċedenti għat-traduzzjoni tas-sentenza attwali b’portal bejn is-sentenzi. B’dan il-mod, il-mudell propost tagħna jista’ jaqbad il-konnessjoni bejn is-sentenzi u l-fużjoni reċenti minn sentenzi ġirien għal traduzzjoni ta’ magni newrali. Dwar diversi kompiti ta’ traduzzjoni Ċiniż-Ingliż NIST, l-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-mudell propost tal-portal intersentenzjali jilħaq titjib sostanzjali fuq il-linja bażi.', 'mn': 'Ихэнхдээ мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) систем нь ихэвчлэн хоёр хэл хэл хоёр хэл дээр суралцаж, нэг өгүүлбэрийг нэг хэлбэрээр орлуулж, хоорондын өгүүлбэрийн мэдээллийг үгүйсгэдэг Энэ үг нь хөршүүн өгүүлбэрүүдийн орчуулалтаас ч тэр үг биш болох юм. Энэ асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид ижил өгүүлбэрийн хаалтын загварыг ашиглаж, хоёр хажууд өгүүлбэрийг кодлоход хоёр хажууд өгүүлбэрээс орчин өгүүлбэрээс орчин өгүүлбэрээс хаалтын хэмжээг удирдаж байна. Иймээс бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загвар нь өгүүлбэр болон хөрш өгүүлбөрөөс мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулах холбоотой холбоотой болно. НИСТ Хятад-Англи хэлний орчуулах үйл ажиллагаанд бидний туршилтууд суурь шугам дээр суурь сайжруулах боломжтой гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'no': '@ info Dette kan gjera omsetjinga av eit setning uavhengig eller til og med omsetjinga av nabo setningar. For å handtere dette problemet, foreslår vi eit mønsterelementet for å bruka samme koder for å koda to tilhøyrande setningar og kontrollere kor mange informasjon som flyttar frå førre setninga til omsetjinga av den gjeldande setninga med eit mellomsetningssgate. På denne måten kan vårt foreslått modell henta tilkoplinga mellom setningar og fysser motsetningar frå nabo setningar til neuralmaskinsomsetjing. På fleire NIST kinesisk-engelsk oversettelsesoppgåver viser eksperimentene våre at den foreslåde intersetningssgate-modellen gjer store forbedringar over grunnlinja.', 'pl': 'Systemy neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) są zwykle trenowane na dużej ilości dwujęzycznych par zdań i tłumaczą jedno zdanie naraz, ignorując informacje między zdaniami. Może to sprawić, że tłumaczenie zdania jest niejednoznaczne lub nawet niezgodne z tłumaczeniami sąsiednich zdań. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy model bramy między zdaniami, który wykorzystuje ten sam koder do kodowania dwóch sąsiadujących zdań i kontroluje ilość informacji przepływających z poprzedniego zdania do tłumaczenia bieżącego zdania bramą między zdaniami. W ten sposób proponowany przez nas model może uchwycić związek między zdaniami i połączyć niedawność z sąsiednich zdań w neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe. W przypadku kilku zadań tłumaczenia chińsko-angielskiego NIST nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowany model bramy między zdaniami osiąga znaczną poprawę w stosunku do podstawowego.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de traducere automată neurală (NMT) sunt de obicei instruite pe o cantitate mare de perechi de propoziții bilingve și traduc o propoziție la un moment dat, ignorând informațiile dintre propoziții. Acest lucru poate face traducerea unei propoziții ambiguă sau chiar inconsistentă cu traducerile propozițiilor vecine. Pentru a rezolva această problemă, propunem un model de poartă inter-frază care utilizează același encoder pentru a codifica două propoziții adiacente și controlează cantitatea de informații care curge de la propoziția precedentă la traducerea propoziției curente cu o poartă inter-frază. În acest fel, modelul nostru propus poate capta conexiunea dintre propoziții și fuziona recența din propozițiile vecine în traducerea automată neurală. În ceea ce privește mai multe sarcini de traducere chineză-engleză NIST, experimentele noastre demonstrează că modelul propus de poartă între fraze obține îmbunătățiri substanțiale față de bază.', 'sr': 'Neuralni sistem prevoda mašine (NMT) obično se obučavaju na velikoj količini dvojezičkih parova rečenica i prevode jednu rečenicu po jednom trenutku, ignorirajući informacije o međurečenicama. To može učiniti prevod rečenice ambiguènom ili čak u skladu sa prevodom susjednih rečenica. Da bismo riješili ovaj problem, predložili smo model kapije međurečenica koji koristi isti koder kako bi kodirali dve pridružene rečenice i kontrolirali količinu informacija koja teke iz prethodne rečenice do prevode trenutne rečenice sa kapijom međurečenice. Na taj naèin, naš predloženi model može da uhvati vezu izmeðu rečenica i pristanak spajanja od susjednih rečenica u prevod neuralne mašine. Na nekoliko zadataka za prevod kineskog i engleskog jezika, naši eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi model kapije međurečenica postigne značajne poboljšanja na početnoj liniji.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් පද්ධතිය (NMT) පද්ධතිය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම දෙවල් භාෂාවක් වර්ගයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා සහ එක වාක්ය මේක පුළුවන් වාක්යයක් අභිවාර්ය කරන්න පුළුවන් නැහැ නැත්නම් සම්බන්ධ වාක්යයේ අභිවාර්ය කරන්න. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්නේ වාක්ය ගේට් මොඩල් එකක් භාවිත කරනවා සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය දෙකක් සංකේත කරන්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක මෙහෙම විදියට, අපේ ප්\u200dරාර්ථාපිත විදිහට පුළුවන් වචන අතර සම්බන්ධයක් අරගෙන ඉන්න සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය වලින් ප NIST චීනි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාව ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වලින්, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා ප', 'so': 'Isticmaalka qoraalka neurada (NMT) waxaa inta badan lagu baraa noocyo badan oo labo luqad ah islamarkaasna lagu turjumaa hal sentence marka, iskaga tago macluumaad Inter-sentence. Turjumaadda waxaa laga yaabaa in turjumaadda looga baahdo ama aan isku mid ahayn turjumaadda deriska. Si aan u qabsado arinkan, waxaan soo jeedaynaa model iridda u dhexeeya oo isku mid ah u isticmaalaya qoraalka u qoran labada dhinac ee u dhow, wuxuuna maamulaa tirada macluumaadka ka soo socda dhamaadka hore ilaa turjumidda halka gebi-gebi. Sidan darteed, Tusaaleheenna la soo jeeday wuxuu qabsan karaa xiriirka u dhexeeya xukunka iyo dib u soo celinta xuquuqda deriska ah oo u bedela turjumaadda maskaxda neurada. Shaqooyinka tarjumaadda ee Shiinaha-Ingiriiska ee NIST waxaa lagu caddeeyaa imtixaanadayada lagu talo galay tusaale ahaan loo soo jeedo iridda Inter-Xerka ah uu ku guulaysto kororooyin aad u weyn.', 'sv': 'Neural machine translation (NMT) system utbildas vanligtvis på en stor mängd tvåspråkiga meningspar och översätter en mening i taget, bortsett från information mellan meningar. Detta kan göra översättningen av en mening tvetydig eller till och med inkonsekvent med översättningarna av närliggande meningar. För att hantera denna fråga föreslår vi en inter-menings gate modell som använder samma kodare för att koda två intilliggande meningar och kontrollerar mängden information som flödar från föregående mening till översättningen av den aktuella meningen med en inter-menings gate. På så sätt kan vår föreslagna modell fånga kopplingen mellan meningar och smälta recency från närliggande meningar till neural maskinöversättning. På flera NIST kinesisk-engelska översättningsuppgifter visar våra experiment att den föreslagna tolkningsmodellen uppnår betydande förbättringar jämfört med baslinjen.', 'ta': 'நெருல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) அமைப்புகள் வழக்கமாக இருமொழி சொல் ஜோடி பயிற்சிக்கப்படுகிறது மற்றும் ஒரு நேரத்தில் ஒரு வாக்கு ம இது அண்டை வாக்கியத்தின் மொழிப்பெயர்ப்பை மொழிபெயர்ப்பாக்கலாம். இந்த விஷயத்தை நிர்வகிக்க, அதே வாக்கியின் இடையே வாயில் மாதிரி முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி இரண்டு அண்மையிலுள்ள வாக்கியங்களை குறியீடு செய்ய மற்றும் முந்தைய வாக இந்த வழியில், எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி வாக்கியங்களுக்கு இடையே இணைப்பை பிடிக்க முடியும் மற்றும் அண்டை வாக்க பல NIST சீன- ஆங்கிலத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பணிகளில், எங்கள் பரிசோதனைகள் தெரிவிக்கிறது என்பது திருப்பப்பட்ட இடைவெளி வாயில் மாதிரி அட', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) سیستموں کو معمولاً دو زبان جوڑوں کے بڑے مقدار پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے اور ایک جماعت کو ایک وقت تک ترجمہ کرتا ہے، ایک جماعت کی اطلاعات نادانی کرتا ہے۔ یہ ایک جماعت کی تعبیر ممکن ہے کہ ایک جماعت کا غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر تعبیر کرے۔ اس مسئلہ کو سمجھنے کے لئے ہم ایک مختلف فیصلہ گیٹ موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو دو مختلف جماعتوں کو کوڈ کرنے کے لئے ایک ہی کوڈر استعمال کرتا ہے اور اس سے پہلے فیصلہ سے پہلے ویدھی ویدھی ویدھی کی ترجمہ کے لئے ایک مختلف فیصلہ کے دروازے سے چلتی ہوئی معلومات کی مقدار کو کن اسی طرح، ہماری پیشنهاد مدل کلمات کے درمیان اتصال کو پکڑ سکتا ہے اور اپنا سامنے کلمات سے نئورل ماشین کی ترجمہ میں اتصال کرسکتا ہے. چند NIST چینی-انگلیسی ترجمہ کے کاموں پر ہماری آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی مختلف فشار کے دروازے کے نمونے بنیاس لین پر بہت اچھی ترجمہ حاصل کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Name Bu muammani boshqarish uchun, biz bir xil orqali bir xiddi kodlash usuli yordamida foydalanuvchi va bir maxfiy soʻzdan oldingi bir sentencedan bir marta tarjima qiladigan maʼlumot soni boshqarish. In this way, our proposed model can capture the connection between sentences and fuse recency from neighboring sentences into neural machine translation.  Bir necha NIST xitoycha- ingliz tili tarjima vazifalarini ko'rsatadi, bizning imtiyozlarimiz bir so'zlar orasidagi portning modeli asosiy tarjimalarida juda muhim yaxshi o'zgarishni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Hệ thống dịch thiết bị thần kinh (NMB) thường được đào tạo trên một lượng lớn các cặp câu hai chữ và phiên dịch một câu một lần, phớt lờ thông tin liên tục. Điều này có thể làm cho phiên dịch của một câu là mơ hồ hoặc thậm chí không có mâu thuẫn với việc dịch các câu lân cận. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một kiểu cổng truyền hình liên kết sử dụng cùng một bộ mã hóa để mã hóa hai câu liền kề và điều khiển lượng thông tin chảy từ câu trước đến đoạn dịch câu hiện thời với cổng liên kết. Bằng cách này, kiểu mẫu đề nghị của chúng ta có thể nắm bắt sự kết nối giữa các câu và gia nhập từ các câu lân cận vào phiên dịch máy thần kinh. Đối với nhiều nhiệm vụ dịch dịch tiếng Trung Quốc Quốc/ Anh của NIST, thí nghiệm của chúng tôi đã chứng minh rằng kiểu cổng lai án đề xuất đạt được cải thiện đáng kể trên cơ sở.', 'nl': 'Neuronale machine translation (NMT) systemen worden meestal getraind op een grote hoeveelheid tweetalige zinnenparen en vertalen één zin tegelijk, waarbij informatie tussen zinnen wordt genegeerd. Dit kan de vertaling van een zin dubbelzinnig of zelfs inconsistent maken met de vertalingen van naburige zinnen. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een gatemodel tussen zinnen voor dat dezelfde encoder gebruikt om twee aangrenzende zinnen te coderen en de hoeveelheid informatie regelt die van de vorige zin naar de vertaling van de huidige zin met een gatemodel tussen zinnen stroomt. Op deze manier kan ons voorgestelde model de verbinding tussen zinnen vastleggen en recentheid van naburige zinnen fuseren in neurale machinevertaling. Op verschillende NIST Chinees-Engels vertaaltaken tonen onze experimenten aan dat het voorgestelde gatemodel tussen zinnen aanzienlijke verbeteringen bereikt ten opzichte van de basislijn.', 'da': 'Neurale maskinoversættelsessystemer (NMT) trænes normalt på en stor mængde tosprogede sætningspar og oversætter en sætning ad gangen, idet oplysningerne mellem sætningerne ignoreres. Dette kan gøre oversættelsen af en sætning tvetydig eller endda inkonsekvent med oversættelserne af tilstødende sætninger. For at håndtere dette problem foreslår vi en mellemsætning gate model, der bruger den samme encoder til at kode to tilstødende sætninger og styrer mængden af information, der strømmer fra den foregående sætning til oversættelsen af den nuværende sætning med en mellemsætning gate. På denne måde kan vores foreslåede model fange forbindelsen mellem sætninger og fusionere nyhed fra nabostatninger til neural maskinoversættelse. På flere NIST kinesisk-engelsk oversættelsesopgaver viser vores eksperimenter, at den foreslåede mellemsætning gate model opnår betydelige forbedringer i forhold til baseline.', 'hr': 'Neuralni sustavi prevoda stroja (NMT) obično se obučavaju na velikoj količini dvojezičkih parova rečenica i prevode jednu rečenicu po jednom vrijeme, ignorirajući informacije o interrečenici. To može učiniti prevod rečenice nesposobnim ili čak u skladu s prevodom susjednih rečenica. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predlažemo model međurečeničkih kapija koji koristi isti koder kako bi kodirali dvije približne rečenice i kontrolirali količinu informacija tekućih od prethodne rečenice do prevode trenutne rečenice sa kapijom međurečenica. Na taj način, naš predloženi model može uhvatiti vezu između rečenica i prijema za spajanje od susjednih rečenica u prevod neuralnih strojeva. Na nekoliko zadataka za prevod kineskog i engleskog NIST-a, naši eksperimenti pokazuju da je predloženi model kapije međurečenica postigao značajno poboljšanje na početnoj liniji.', 'bg': 'Системите за неврален машинен превод (НМТ) обикновено се обучават на голямо количество двуезични двойки изречения и превеждат едно изречение в даден момент, игнорирайки информацията между изреченията. Това може да направи превода на изречение двусмислен или дори несъвместим с преводите на съседни изречения. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме модел на врата между изреченията, който използва един и същ кодер за кодиране на две съседни изречения и контролира количеството информация, протичаща от предходното изречение към превода на текущото изречение с врата между изреченията. По този начин нашият предложен модел може да улови връзката между изреченията и да слее скорошността от съседните изречения в невронен машинен превод. При няколко задачи за превод на китайско-английски нашите експерименти показват, че предложеният модел на портала между изреченията постига значителни подобрения спрямо базовата база.', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) Systeme werden normalerweise auf einer großen Anzahl zweisprachiger Satzpaare trainiert und übersetzen einen Satz nach dem anderen, wobei Zwischensatzinformationen ignoriert werden. Dies kann die Übersetzung eines Satzes mehrdeutig oder sogar inkonsistent mit den Übersetzungen benachbarter Sätze machen. Um dieses Problem zu lösen, schlagen wir ein Inter-Satz-Gate-Modell vor, das denselben Encoder verwendet, um zwei benachbarte Sätze zu codieren und die Menge an Informationen steuert, die vom vorhergehenden Satz zur Übersetzung des aktuellen Satzes mit einem Inter-Satz-Gate fließen. Auf diese Weise kann unser vorgeschlagenes Modell die Verbindung zwischen Sätzen erfassen und die Aktualität von benachbarten Sätzen in neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung fusionieren. An mehreren NIST-Übersetzungsaufgaben zeigen unsere Experimente, dass das vorgeschlagene Inter-Satz-Gate-Modell erhebliche Verbesserungen gegenüber der Baseline erzielt.', 'ko': '신경기계번역(NMT) 시스템은 보통 대량의 이중 언어 문장 쌍을 훈련시켜 한 번에 한 문장만 번역하고 문장 간의 정보를 무시한다.이것은 문장의 번역을 애매모호하게 할 수도 있고, 심지어는 인접한 문장의 번역과 일치하지 않을 수도 있다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 문장 간 관문 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 같은 인코더를 사용하여 두 개의 인접한 문장을 인코딩하고 한 문장 간 관문을 통해 이전 문장에서 현재 문장으로 번역하는 정보량을 제어한다.이런 방식을 통해 우리가 제시한 모델은 문장 간의 관계를 포착하고 인접한 문장의 근의성을 신경기계 번역에 융합시킬 수 있다.NIST의 몇 가지 한영 번역 임무에서 우리의 실험은 제시된 문장 사이의 관문 모델이 기선보다 실질적인 개선이 있음을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) معمولاً روی یک مقدار زیادی از جفت\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای دو زبان آموزش می\u200cشوند و یک جمله را در یک زمان ترجمه می\u200cکنند، و اطلاعات بین\u200cجمله را نادیده می\u200cگیرند. این ممکن است ترجمه\u200cی یک جمله بی\u200cنظیر یا حتی با ترجمه\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای همسایه کنار بیاورد. برای حفظ این مسئله، ما یک مدل دروازه\u200cی عبارت بین\u200cجمله پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از همان رمز\u200cدهنده استفاده می\u200cکند تا دو جمله نزدیک را رمز کند و تعداد اطلاعات را کنترل می\u200cکند که از جمله پیش به ترجمه\u200cی جمله\u200cی جاری با دروازه\u200cی عبارت بین\u200cجمله می\u200cرود. در این صورت، مدل پیشنهاد ما می\u200cتواند ارتباط بین جمله\u200cها و اثراتی از جمله\u200cهای همسایه به ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی را بگیرد. در چندین کار ترجمه\u200cهای چینی و انگلیسی NIST، آزمایشات ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل پیشنهاد دروازه\u200cی جمله\u200cهای بین\u200cجمله به بهترین زیادی روی خط پایین رسیده است.', 'id': 'Sistem terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) biasanya dilatih pada jumlah besar pasangan kalimat dua bahasa dan terjemahan satu kalimat pada waktu, mengabaikan informasi antara kalimat. Ini bisa membuat terjemahan kalimat ambiguh atau bahkan tidak konsisten dengan terjemahan kalimat tetangga. In order to handle this issue, we propose an inter-sentence gate model that uses the same encoder to encode two adjacent sentences and controls the amount of information flowing from the preceding sentence to the translation of the current sentence with an inter-sentence gate.  Dengan cara ini, model kami yang diusulkan dapat menangkap koneksi antara kalimat dan fuse recency dari kalimat tetangga ke terjemahan mesin saraf. Dalam beberapa tugas terjemahan Cina-Inggris NIST, eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa model gerbang interkalimat yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang besar dibanding dasar.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine ya kijinsia (NMT) mara nyingi hufunzwa kwa kiasi kikubwa cha hukumu ya lugha mbili na kutafsiri hukumu moja kwa wakati, ukisahau taarifa za sentenca. Hii inaweza kuwa tafsiri ya hukumu yenye uchochezi au hata usio na maana ya tafsiri ya hukumu za jirani. Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, tunapendekeza modeli ya mlango wa kifungo kinachotumia idadi hiyo hiyo ya kuongeza hukumu mbili za jirani na kudhibiti kiasi cha taarifa kinachopita kutoka hukumu iliyopita mpaka tafsiri ya hukumu ya sasa kwa mlango wa kifungo. Kwa namna hii, muundo wetu wa pendekezo unaweza kukutana na uhusiano kati ya hukumu na upinzani wa upinzani kutoka sentensi za jirani katika tafsiri ya mashine ya kisasa. Katika majukumu kadhaa ya tafsiri ya Kiingereza ya NIST, majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa modeli ya mlango wa kati ya hukumu inapata maboresho makubwa zaidi ya msingi.', 'tr': 'NMT sistemalar adatça iki dilli sözle çiftlerde täze terjime edilýär we bir sözle bir gezek terjime edilýär, sözle arasynda maglumatlary ýok edip bilen terjime edilýär. Bu sözlerin terjimesini ýok ýa-da goňşy sözlerin terjimelerine ýok edip biler. Bu meseleni çözmek üçin, biz esaslaryň gapysyny üçin bir ködleme nusgasyny teklip edip, iki golaý sözläni kodlamak üçin we öňki sözläniň terjime etmegini başarmak üçin bir soragy nusgasyny barlaýarys. Şol şekilde, teklip eden nusgamyz sözleriň arasynda bir baglaýyşy çykaryp biler we goňşularyň sözlerinden neural maşynyň terjime edilmesine çevrilebilir. NIST Çinçe-Iňlisçe terjime eden zadlaryň birnäçe gezek, biziň deneylerimiz esasy çykyşyň nusgasyna üýtgeden çykyşyň üstünde örän gowurak gazandygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) stelsels word gewoonlik op 'n groot hoeveelheid twee tale sin paar onderwerp en een seting vertaling op 'n tyd, en onderwerp inter- sentence inligting. Hierdie dalk mag die vertaling van 'n seting onbepaalde of selfs ongelukkig maak met die vertaling van nabygeste setinge. Om hierdie probleem te hanteer, voorstel ons 'n inter- sentence gate model wat die selfde enkoder gebruik om twee nabytige setnings te kodeer en die hoeveelheid inligting wat vloei van die voorheende seting na die vertaling van die huidige setnings met 'n inter- sentence gate. Op hierdie manier kan ons voorgestelde model die verbinding tussen setnings en afsluiting van nabyge setnings in neurale masjien vertaling opneem. Op verskeie NIST Sjinese-Engels vertaling opdragte, ons eksperimente wys dat die voorgestelde inter-sentence-poort-model betaling oor die basisline bereik word.", 'sq': 'Sistemet e përkthimit nervor të makinave (NMT) zakonisht janë trajnuar në një sasi të madhe çiftesh dy-gjuhësh dhe përkthimin e një fjale në një kohë, duke injoruar informacionin ndër-fjalë. Kjo mund të bëjë përkthimin e një fjale të qartë apo madje të pakënaqur me përkthimet e fjalëve fqinjë. Me qëllim që të trajtojmë këtë çështje, ne propozojmë një model portë ndër-fjalë që përdor të njëjtin kodues për të koduar dy fjalë pranë dhe kontrollon sasinë e informacionit që rrjedh nga fjala e mëparshme në përkthimin e fjalës aktuale me një portë ndër-fjalë. In this way, our proposed model can capture the connection between sentences and fuse recency from neighboring sentences into neural machine translation.  On several NIST Chinese-English translation tasks, our experiments demonstrate that the proposed inter-sentence gate model achieves substantial improvements over the baseline.', 'am': 'የኔural machine translation (NMT) systems are usually trained on a large amount of two language sentences and translate one sentence at a time, ignoring inter-sentence information. ይህም የቃላትን ትርጓሜ በአገር ፍርድ መተርጓሜ የሚያሳልፍ ወይም ደግሞ የማይተካከል ሊሆን ይችላል፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀበል እናስቸጋጅላለን፣ በአንድ የውይይት የፖለቲካ ደጅ ማድረግ የሚጠቅመውን ሁለት የአቅራቢያ ቃላት እንዲቆጠር እና ከቀድሞው ክፍል ጀምሮ እስከ አሁን ደብዳቤ ድረስ በመግለጫ በር የሚዘጋጀውን መረጃ እናስተካክላለን፡፡ እንደዚሁም፣ በተፈቃዱ ሞዴል ከጎረቤ ፍርድ ከፀሐይ መሣሪያው ትርጓሜ ጋር ግንኙነትን እና የውጤት ግንኙነትን ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ በብዙ የቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም ሥራ፣ ፈተናዎቻችን የግንኙነት የደጅ ደጅ ሞዴል በመሠረት ላይ የውጤት ግንኙነት እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) համակարգերը սովորաբար պատրաստվում են երկլեզու նախադասությունների երկու զույգերի վրա և թարգմանում են մեկ նախադասություն առ անտեսելով նախադասությունների միջև տեղեկատվությունը: Սա կարող է հանգամանքների թարգմանությունը երկիմաստ դարձնել, կամ նույնիսկ անհամապատասխանելի հարևան նախադասությունների թարգմանման հետ: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նախադասությունների միջև դարպասի մոդել, որը օգտագործում է նույն կոդավորիչը կոդավորելու երկու հարևան նախադասություններ և վերահսկում է նախորդ նախադասությունից մինչև ներկայիս նախադասությունների թարգմանումը նախադասությունների միջև դարպասի միջ In this way, our proposed model can capture the connection between sentences and fuse recency from neighboring sentences into neural machine translation.  Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ նախագծված նախադասությունների միջև դարպասի մոդելը հասնում է նշանակալի բարելավումներին հիմնական հարաբերության մեջ:', 'az': 'NMT sistemləri genellikle iki dilli cümləlik çiftlərinin böyük miktarında təhsil edilir və bir cümləni hər dəfə tərcümə edir, cümlənin məlumatlarını dərk edir. Bu cümlənin tərcümünü müəyyən və ya hətta qonşu cümlələrin tərcümələrinə uyğunlaşdırması mümkün olar. Bu məsələni çəkmək üçün, biz bir cümlənin qapısı modelini təklif edirik ki, bu cümlədən əvvəlki cümlədən keçən məlumatın dəyişdirilməsini və cümlənin qapısı ilə istifadə edir. Bu şekilde, təklif edilmiş modellərimiz cümlələr arasındakı bağlantıları və qonşu cümlələrdən nöral maşına çevirməyə çevirə bilər. Növbəti NIST Çinli-İngilizce çeviri işlərində, bizim eksperimentlərimiz təbliğ edilmiş cümlələr qapısının modelinin baseline üstündə böyük düzəltmələri başa düşər.', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) সিস্টেম সাধারণত বিশাল দুই ভাষার বাক্যের জোড়ায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয় এবং একবার একটি বাক্য অনুবাদ করা হয়, য এই বিষয়টি প্রতিবেশীর বাক্যের অনুবাদের সাথে অনুবাদ বাধা দিতে পারে। এই বিষয়টি মোকাবেলা করার জন্য আমরা একটি বিভিন্ন গেটের মোডেল প্রস্তাব করি যা একই কোডার ব্যবহার করে দুটি পাশের বাক্য এনকোড করে এবং পূর্বের বাক্য থেকে বর্তমান বাক্যের অনু এভাবে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের মাধ্যমে শাস্তি এবং প্রতিবেশী শাস্তি থেকে নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের মধ্যে যোগাযোগের স বেশ কয়েকটি এনআইএসটি চীন-ইংরেজী অনুবাদ কাজে আমাদের পরীক্ষা প্রমাণিত করেছে যে প্রস্তাবিত গেটের মোডেল বেস্ট লাইনের ব্যাপারে ব', 'ca': "Els sistemes neuromàquines de traducció (NMT) normalment s'entrenen en una gran quantitat de parells de frases bilingües i tradueixen una frase a la vegada, ignorant la informació entre frases. This may make the translation of a sentence ambiguous or even inconsistent with the translations of neighboring sentences.  Per tractar aquesta qüestió, proposem un model de porta entre frases que utilitza el mateix codificador per codificar dues frases adjacents i controlar la quantitat d'informació que surt de la frase anterior a la traducció de la frase actual amb una porta entre frases. In this way, our proposed model can capture the connection between sentences and fuse recency from neighboring sentences into neural machine translation.  En diverses tasques de traducció xinès-anglès del NIST, els nostres experiments demostren que el model proposat de porta entre frases aconsegueix millores substàncielles en comparació amb el basal.", 'et': 'Neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) süsteeme koolitatakse tavaliselt suure hulga kakskeelsete lausepaaride kohta ja tõlgitakse üks lause korraga, ignoreerides lausevahelist teavet. See võib muuta lause tõlkimise ebamääraseks või isegi naaberlausete tõlketega vastuolus olevaks. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja lausedevahelise värava mudeli, mis kasutab sama kodeerijat kahe külgneva lause kodeerimiseks ja kontrollib eelmisest lausest kuni praeguse lause tõlkeni lausedevahelise väravaga. Sel viisil saab meie pakutud mudel jäädvustada lausete vahelise seose ja sulatada naaberlausete hiljutise aja neuromasintõlkeks. Mitmete NIST hiina-inglise tõlketööde puhul näitavad meie eksperimendid, et väljapakutud lausedevaheline väravamudel saavutab olulisi parandusi võrreldes lähtetasemega.', 'cs': 'Systémy neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) jsou obvykle trénovány na velkém množství dvojjazyčných větových párů a překládají jednu větu najednou, přičemž ignorují informace mezi větami. To může způsobit, že překlad věty je nejednoznačný nebo dokonce neslučitelný s překladami sousedních vět. Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme model brány mezi větami, který používá stejný kodér pro kódování dvou sousedních vět a řídí množství informací proudících z předchozí věty do překladu aktuální věty s bránou mezi větami. Náš navržený model tak dokáže zachytit spojení mezi větami a spojit nedávnost ze sousedních vět do neuronového strojového překladu. Na několika NIST čínsko-anglických překladatelských úlohách naše experimenty ukazují, že navržený model brány mezi větami dosahuje výrazných zlepšení oproti základnímu principu.', 'bs': 'Sistemi neurološkog prevoda (NMT) obično se obučavaju na velikoj količini dvojezičkih parova rečenica i prevode jednu rečenicu po jednom trenutku, ignorirajući informacije o međurečenicama. To može učiniti prevod rečenice nesposobnim ili čak u skladu sa prevodom susjednih rečenica. Da bismo riješili ovaj problem, predlažemo model kapije međurečenica koji koristi isti koder kako bi kodirao dvije približne rečenice i kontrolirao količinu informacija koja teke iz prethodne rečenice do prevode trenutne rečenice sa kapijom međurečenice. Na taj način, naš predloženi model može uhvatiti vezu između rečenica i pristanak spajanja od susjednih rečenica u prevod neuralnih strojeva. Na nekoliko zadataka za prevod kineskog i engleskog NIST-a, naši eksperimenti pokazuju da predloženi model kapije međurečenica postigne značajne poboljšanja na početnoj liniji.', 'fi': 'Neuroiden konek채채nn철sj채rjestelmi채 (NMT) koulutetaan yleens채 suurella m채채r채ll채 kaksikielisi채 lausepareja ja k채채nnet채채n yksi lause kerrallaan j채tt채m채ll채 lauseiden v채liset tiedot huomiotta. T채m채 voi tehd채 lauseen k채채nt채misest채 ep채selv채n tai jopa ristiriidassa naapurilauseiden k채채nn철sten kanssa. T채m채n ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme lauseidenv채list채 porttimallia, joka k채ytt채채 samaa koodausta kahden vierekk채isen lauseen koodaamiseen ja ohjaa edellisen lauseen k채채nt채miseen kuluvan tiedon m채채r채채 lauseiden v채lisell채 portilla. T채ll채 tavoin mallimme pystyy kuvaamaan lauseiden v채lisen yhteyden ja yhdist채m채채n l채hilauseiden viimeaikaiset vaikutukset neurokonek채채nn철kseen. Useissa NIST:n kiina-englanti k채채nn철steht채viss채 kokeemme osoittavat, ett채 ehdotettu lauseiden v채linen porttimalli saavuttaa merkitt채vi채 parannuksia l채ht철tasoon verrattuna.', 'sk': 'Sistemi nevralnega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) so običajno usposobljeni za veliko količino dvojezičnih stavkov in prevajajo en stavek naenkrat, pri čemer ne upoštevajo informacij med stavki. To lahko naredi prevod stavka dvoumen ali celo neskladen s prevodi sosednjih stavkov. Za reševanje tega vprašanja predlagamo model vrat med stavki, ki uporablja isti kodirnik za kodiranje dveh sosednjih stavkov in nadzoruje količino informacij, ki tečejo od prejšnjega stavka do prevoda trenutnega stavka z vrati med stavki. Na ta način lahko naš predlagani model zajame povezavo med stavki in združi nedavnost iz sosednjih stavkov v nevronsko strojno prevajanje. Naši eksperimenti pri več prevajalskih nalogah NIST kitajsko-angleščina kažejo, da predlagani model vrat med stavki dosega bistvene izboljšave v primerjavi z osnovno vrednostjo.', 'ha': "translation Wannan mai yiwuwa ne ya sanya fassarar-fassarar da maganar kwamfyuta ko kuma kõ kuwa yana daidai da fassarar da جãban jiran jiran. To, dõmin ya yi amfani da wannan masu zartar da, muna buƙata wani motsi na ƙõfa guda da ke amfani da kodi guda zuwa kode guda biyu masu haɗi, kuma Yana kanana ƙidãyar information wanda ke gudãna daga cewa ta farko zuwa fassarar da ƙõfõfin da ke guda. Kamar wannan ne, misalinmu da aka buƙata yana iya kãma haɗi tsakanin saurãro da sauri daga cire-sauri zuwa fassarar mashine na neural. Daga wasu aikin fassarar-na'urar-Ingiriya na NIS, jarrabanmu sun nuna cewa, misãlin da aka buƙata a danne-ɗabi'a, ya sami mafiya amfani da babban gyarata a bakin basalin.", 'he': 'מערכות התרגום של מכונות נוירוניות (NMT) בדרך כלל מאומנות על כמות גדולה של זוגות משפטים שתיים שפתיים ותרגום משפט אחד בכל פעם, מתעלם מידע בין משפטים. זה עשוי להפוך את התרגום של משפט ספק או אפילו לא מתאים לתרגומות של משפטים שכנים. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים מודל שער בין משפטים שמשתמש באותו קודם כדי לקוד שני משפטים סמוכים ושליטה בכמות המידע שזורם מהמשפט הקודם לתרגום של המשפט הנוכחי עם שער בין המשפטים. בדרך זו, המודל המוצע שלנו יכול לתפוס את הקשר בין משפטים ולהתמזמז מקרוב משפטים שכנים לתרגום מכונות עצביות. על מספר משימות התרגום סיני-אנגלית של NIST, הניסויים שלנו מראים כי מודל השער בין המשפטים המוצע משיג שיפורים משמעותיים מעל הבסיס.', 'jv': 'System Iki iso nggawe tarjamahan kanggo mbaluk sing toljamahan apat, sane mengko iso nggawe tarjamahan kanggo kalah mbuluk. Awak dhéwé nggunakake perusahaan winih iki, kita supoyo model sing dibutuhke kuwi nggawe barang sampek winih dhéwé nggo kode nggo ngerasakno duha dolanan sing dibutuhke lan hukung nambah informasi sing dibutuhke sing dibutuhke tarjamahan kanggo ngerusaha winih-bakal terusaha winih. Nang yo koyo maneh, model sing supoyo iso nggawe nggambar aturan kelas nang watesan karo peranggap karo peranggap kaluwargane kapan Awak dhéwé éntuk NIS-Inggris nggambar tarjamahan kanggo ngerasai, awak dhéwé éntukno éntuk wong modèl kuwi nggawe barang-barang kanggo ngerasai supaya supaya supaya sak nggawe barang.', 'bo': 'Neural machine translation (NMT) systems are usually trained on a large amount of bilingual sentence pairs and translate one sentence at a time, ignoring inter-sentence information. འདིས་ཚིག To handle this issue, we propose an inter-sentence gate model that uses the same encoder to encode two adjacent sentences and controls the amount of information flowing from the preceding sentence to the translation of the current sentence with an inter-sentence gate. In order to handle this issue, we propose an inter-sentence gate. འདི་ལྟར། ང་ཚོའི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབུགས་གྱིས་ཚིག་རྐང་དང་། ཁྱིམ་མཚེས་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་ཚོར་བཞག NIST རྒྱ་ནག'}
{'en': 'Improving Neural Machine Translation by Incorporating Hierarchical Subword Features', 'ar': 'تحسين الترجمة الآلية العصبية من خلال دمج ميزات الكلمات الفرعية الهرمية', 'es': 'Mejorar la traducción automática neuronal mediante la incorporación de funciones jerárquicas de subpalabras', 'fr': 'Améliorer la traduction automatique neuronale en incorporant des fonctionnalités de sous-mots hiérarchiques', 'pt': 'Melhorando a tradução automática neural incorporando recursos de subpalavras hierárquicas', 'ru': 'Улучшение нейронного машинного перевода за счет включения иерархических функций подслова', 'ja': '階層的なサブワード機能を組み込むことによる神経機械翻訳の改善', 'zh': '并子词功以进神经机器翻译', 'hi': 'पदानुक्रमित उपशब्द सुविधाओं को शामिल करके तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद में सुधार', 'ga': 'Aistriú Meaisín Néarthach a Fheabhsú trí Ghnéithe Fofhocal Ordlathacha a Ionchorprú', 'ka': 'უფრო მეტივად ნეიროლური მაქინის გარგუნება იერარიფური სუბსიტურებით', 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordítás javítása hierarchikus alszó funkciók beépítésével', 'el': 'Βελτίωση της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης με την ενσωμάτωση των ιεραρχικών χαρακτηριστικών υπολέξεων', 'it': 'Miglioramento della traduzione automatica neurale incorporando caratteristiche gerarchiche di sottoparola', 'lt': 'Gerinti nervinių mašinų vertimą įtraukiant hierarchinius paražodžius', 'kk': 'Иерархикалық субсөздің қасиеттері арқылы нейрондық машинаның аудармасын жақсарту', 'ms': 'Menyambungkan Terjemahan Mesin Neural dengan Memasukkan Ciri-ciri Subkata Hierarkikal', 'mk': 'Подобрување на преведувањето на невралните машини со вклучување на хиерархички подзборови', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d സബ്\u200cവോര്\u200dഡ് വിശേഷതകള്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതാ', 'mn': 'Цөмийн механикийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн шинжлэх ухаан болон', 'mt': 'Titjib fit-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali bl-Inkorporazzjoni ta’ Karatteristiċi Sottokliem Erarkiċi', 'no': 'Å forbetra omsetjing av neiralmaskinen ved å inkorporare hierarkiske underordfunksjonar', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea traducerii automate neurale prin încorporarea caracteristicilor ierarhice ale subcuvintelor', 'sr': 'Poboljšanje prevoda neuroloških mašina uključujući hijerarške podrečne karakteristike', 'pl': 'Poprawa neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego poprzez włączenie hierarchicznych cech podsłów', 'si': 'හියරාචිකල් සබ්වර්ඩ විශේෂතාවන් සඳහා නිර්මාණ මැෂින් පරිවර්තනය වැඩ කරන්න', 'sv': 'Förbättra neural maskinöversättning genom att införliva hierarkiska underordsfunktioner', 'so': 'Horumarinta tarjumaadda maskinenta Neural by Incorporating Hierarchical Subword Features', 'ur': 'نیورل ماشین کی ترجمہ کو زیادہ اضافہ کرنے کے ذریعہ', 'ta': 'மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப்பை மேம்படுத்துகிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thay đổi máy thần kinh bằng cách lắp đặt các chức năng ngầm', 'bg': 'Подобряване на невралния машинен превод чрез включване на йерархични функции на субдумата', 'nl': 'Het verbeteren van neurale machinevertaling door hiërarchische subwoordfuncties op te nemen', 'hr': 'Poboljšanje prevoda neuroloških strojeva uključujući hijerarške podriječje', 'da': 'Forbedring af neural maskinoversættelse ved at indarbejde hierarkiske underordsfunktioner', 'de': 'Verbesserung der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung durch Einbindung hierarchischer Subwortfunktionen', 'id': 'Menembak Translation Mesin Neural Dengan Memasukkan Karakteristik Subkata Hierarkis', 'ko': '차원 서브단어 특징을 결합하여 신경 기계 번역 개선', 'fa': 'افزایش ترجمه ماشین عصبی توسط ویژه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای طبیعی', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Tafsiri za Mashine ya Kijerumani na Kuboresha Tafsiri za Ujadala', 'sq': 'Duke përmirësuar përkthimin e makinës nervore duke përfshirë funksionet hierarkike të nënfjalëve', 'tr': 'Hierarhiýal Subword özellikleri guralýan näyral maşynyň terjimesini gowylaşdyrmak', 'af': 'Verbeter Neurale Masjien Vertaling deur hierarske Subwoord-eienskappe te inkorporeer', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'bn': 'Hierarchic Subword Features', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման բարելավումը ներառելով գերախիկ ենթաբառերի առանձնահատկություններ', 'az': 'Hiyerarhiqli Səbsöz Featuresi ilə Nöral Makina Tercüməsini İşləndirir', 'bs': 'Poboljšanje prevoda neuroloških strojeva uključujući hijerarške podriječje', 'cs': 'Zlepšení neuronového strojového překladu zahrnutím hierarchických funkcí podslov', 'ca': 'millorar la traducció de màquines neuronals incorporant característiques subparaules hieràrquiques', 'et': 'Neuraalse masintõlke parandamine hierarhiliste alamsõnade funktsioonide lisamisega', 'fi': 'Neuraalisen konekäännöksen parantaminen sisällyttämällä hierarkisia alasanoja ominaisuuksia', 'sk': 'Izboljšanje nevralnega strojnega prevajanja z vključitvijo hierarhičnih podbesed', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'Gujarian Majin Tulisan Neral', 'he': 'שיפור התרגום של מכונת נוירולית על ידי הכילוי תכונות הת-מילים היררכיות', 'bo': 'རྣམ་པ་ཚུལ་ལས་འགུལ་བཙུགས་པའི་སྒྲིག་རིམ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚོགས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་དང་།'}
{'en': 'This paper focuses on subword-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT). We hypothesize that in the NMT model, the appropriate subword units for the following three modules (layers) can differ : (1) the encoder embedding layer, (2) the decoder embedding layer, and (3) the decoder output layer. We find the subword based on Sennrich et al. (2016) has a feature that a large vocabulary is a superset of a small vocabulary and modify the NMT model enables the incorporation of several different subword units in a single embedding layer. We refer these small subword features as hierarchical subword features. To empirically investigate our assumption, we compare the performance of several different subword units and hierarchical subword features for both the encoder and decoder embedding layers. We confirmed that incorporating hierarchical subword features in the encoder consistently improves BLEU scores on the IWSLT evaluation datasets.', 'ar': 'تركز هذه الورقة على الترجمة الآلية العصبية القائمة على الكلمات الفرعية (NMT). نفترض أنه في نموذج NMT ، يمكن أن تختلف وحدات الكلمات الفرعية المناسبة للوحدات النمطية الثلاثة التالية (الطبقات): (1) طبقة تضمين المشفر ، (2) طبقة تضمين وحدة فك التشفير ، و (3) طبقة إخراج وحدة فك التشفير. نجد الكلمة الفرعية بناءً على Sennrich et al. (2016) ميزة مفادها أن المفردات الكبيرة هي مجموعة شاملة من المفردات الصغيرة ويمكن تعديل نموذج NMT من دمج عدة وحدات كلمات فرعية مختلفة في طبقة تضمين واحدة. نشير ميزات الكلمات الفرعية الصغيرة هذه إلى ميزات الكلمات الفرعية الهرمية. للتحقيق في افتراضنا تجريبيًا ، قمنا بمقارنة أداء العديد من وحدات الكلمات الفرعية المختلفة وميزات الكلمات الفرعية الهرمية لكل من طبقات التضمين في وحدة التشفير وفك التشفير. لقد أكدنا أن دمج ميزات الكلمات الفرعية الهرمية في المشفر يؤدي باستمرار إلى تحسين نتائج BLEU في مجموعات بيانات تقييم IWSLT.', 'fr': "Cet article se concentre sur la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) basée sur des sous-mots. Nous supposons que dans le modèle NMT, les unités de sous-mots appropriées pour les trois modules (couches) suivants peuvent différer\xa0: (1) la couche d'intégration du codeur, (2) la couche d'intégration du décodeur et (3) la couche de sortie du décodeur. Nous trouvons que le sous-mot basé sur Sennrich et al. (2016) a la particularité qu'un vocabulaire large est un sur-ensemble d'un petit vocabulaire et que modifier le modèle NMT permet l'incorporation de plusieurs unités de sous-mots différentes dans une seule couche d'intégration. Nous appelons ces petites entités de sous-mots des entités de sous-mots hiérarchiques. Pour étudier notre hypothèse de manière empirique, nous comparons les performances de plusieurs unités de sous-mots et entités de sous-mots hiérarchiques différentes pour les couches d'intégration de l'encodeur et du décodeur. Nous avons confirmé que l'intégration de fonctionnalités de sous-mots hiérarchiques dans l'encodeur améliore constamment les scores BLEU sur les ensembles de données d'évaluation IWSLT.", 'ja': 'この論文では、サブワードベースのニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ NMT ）に焦点を当てている。NMTモデルでは、(1)エンコーダ埋め込み層、(2)デコーダ埋め込み層、(3)デコーダ出力層の3つのモジュール（レイヤー）の適切なサブワード単位が異なる可能性があると仮定する。Sennrich et al .( 2016)に基づくサブワードには、大きな語彙が小さな語彙のスーパーセットであり、NMTモデルを修正することで、単一の埋め込み層にいくつかの異なるサブワード単位を組み込むことができるという特徴がある。これらの小さなサブワード機能を階層型サブワード機能と呼びます。想定を実証的に調べるために、エンコーダとデコーダの埋め込みレイヤーの両方について、いくつかの異なるサブワードユニットと階層的なサブワード機能のパフォーマンスを比較します。エンコーダに階層的なサブワード機能を組み込むことで、IWSLT評価データセットのBLEUスコアが一貫して向上することを確認した。', 'pt': 'Este artigo se concentra na tradução automática neural (NMT) baseada em subpalavras. Nossa hipótese é que no modelo NMT, as unidades de subpalavra apropriadas para os três módulos (camadas) a seguir podem diferir: (1) a camada de incorporação do codificador, (2) a camada de incorporação do decodificador e (3) a camada de saída do decodificador. Encontramos a subpalavra com base em Sennrich et al. (2016) tem como característica que um vocabulário grande é um superconjunto de um vocabulário pequeno e modificar o modelo NMT permite a incorporação de várias unidades de subpalavras diferentes em uma única camada de embedding. Referimo-nos a esses pequenos recursos de subpalavra como recursos de subpalavra hierárquica. Para investigar empiricamente nossa suposição, comparamos o desempenho de várias unidades de subpalavras diferentes e recursos hierárquicos de subpalavras para as camadas de incorporação do codificador e do decodificador. Confirmamos que a incorporação de recursos de subpalavra hierárquica no codificador melhora consistentemente as pontuações BLEU nos conjuntos de dados de avaliação do IWSLT.', 'zh': '本文重点介于子词之神经机器翻译(NMT)。 设于NMT模之中,以下三模块(层)当子词单元可不同:(1)编码器嵌层,(2)解码器嵌层,与(3)解码器输层。 见Sennrich等(2016)子词有一特征,即大词汇量为小词汇之超集,并改NMT模形可于单嵌层中并数子词单元。 吾以此小子词特徵为分层子词特徵。 为经验上研究我们的假设,我们较较了编码器和解码器嵌层的几个不同子词单元和分层子词特征的性能。 我们确认,在编码器中加入分层子词功能可以持续增加 IWSLT 评估数据集的BLEU分数。', 'es': 'Este artículo se centra en la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) basada en subpalabras. Se plantea la hipótesis de que en el modelo NMT, las unidades de subpalabra apropiadas para los siguientes tres módulos (capas) pueden diferir: (1) la capa de incrustación del codificador, (2) la capa de incrustación del decodificador y (3) la capa de salida del decodificador. Encontramos que la subpalabra basada en Sennrich et al. (2016) tiene la característica de que un vocabulario grande es un superconjunto de un vocabulario pequeño y modificar el modelo NMT permite la incorporación de varias unidades de subpalabras diferentes en una sola capa de incrustación. Nos referimos a estas características de subpalabras pequeñas como características de subpalabras jerárquicas. Para investigar empíricamente nuestra suposición, comparamos el rendimiento de varias unidades de subpalabras diferentes y características jerárquicas de subpalabras para las capas de incrustación del codificador y el decodificador. Confirmamos que la incorporación de características jerárquicas de subpalabras en el codificador mejora consistentemente las puntuaciones BLEU en los conjuntos de datos de evaluación de IWSLT.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर सबवर्ड-आधारित न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (एनएमटी) पर केंद्रित है। हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि एनएमटी मॉडल में, निम्नलिखित तीन मॉड्यूल (परतों) के लिए उपयुक्त सबवर्ड इकाइयां अलग-अलग हो सकती हैं: (1) एनकोडर एम्बेडिंग परत, (2) डिकोडर एम्बेडिंग परत, और (3) डिकोडर आउटपुट परत। हम Sennrich et al. (2016) पर आधारित उप-शब्द पाते हैं, जिसमें एक विशेषता है कि एक बड़ी शब्दावली एक छोटी शब्दावली का एक सुपरसेट है और एनएमटी मॉडल को संशोधित करना एक एकल एम्बेडिंग परत में कई अलग-अलग सबवर्ड इकाइयों को शामिल करने में सक्षम बनाता है। हम इन छोटे उपशब्द सुविधाओं को पदानुक्रमित उपशब्द सुविधाओं के रूप में संदर्भित करते हैं। हमारी धारणा की अनुभवजन्य रूप से जांच करने के लिए, हम एनकोडर और डिकोडर एम्बेडिंग परतों दोनों के लिए कई अलग-अलग सबवर्ड इकाइयों और पदानुक्रमित सबवर्ड सुविधाओं के प्रदर्शन की तुलना करते हैं। हमने पुष्टि की है कि एनकोडर में पदानुक्रमित सबवर्ड सुविधाओं को शामिल करने से लगातार IWSLT मूल्यांकन डेटासेट पर BLEU स्कोर में सुधार होता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье основное внимание уделяется нейронному машинному переводу (НМП) на основе подслова. Предположим, что в модели NMT соответствующие подсловы для следующих трех модулей (слоев) могут различаться: (1) слой встраивания кодера, (2) слой встраивания декодера и (3) выходной слой декодера. Мы находим, что подслово, основанное на Sennrich et al. (2016), имеет признак, что большой словарный запас является супернабором небольшой лексики, и модифицируем модель NMT, что позволяет включать несколько различных подслоев в один слой вложения. Мы называем эти небольшие признаки подслова иерархическими признаками подслова. Чтобы эмпирически исследовать наше предположение, мы сравниваем производительность нескольких различных подфраз и иерархических признаков подфраз как для уровней встраивания кодера, так и для слоев встраивания декодера. Мы подтвердили, что включение иерархических признаков подслова в кодировщик последовательно улучшает баллы BLEU в наборах данных оценки IWSLT.', 'ga': 'Díríonn an páipéar seo ar Neural Machine Translation (NMT) bunaithe ar fhofhocail. Tugaimid hipitéis, i múnla NMT, gur féidir na haonaid fofhocail chuí do na trí mhodúl (sraitheanna) seo a leanas a bheith difriúil: (1) ciseal leabú an ionchódóra, (2) ciseal leabú an díchódóra, agus (3) ciseal aschuir an díchódóra. Faighimid an fofhocal atá bunaithe ar Sennrich et al. (2016) gur sárthacar d’fhoclóir beag é stór focal mór agus má mhodhnaítear an tsamhail NMT is féidir roinnt aonad fofhocail éagsúla a ionchorprú i sraith leabú amháin. Déanaimid tagairt do na gnéithe beaga fofhocail seo mar ghnéithe ordlathacha fofhocail. Chun ár mbonn tuisceana a fhiosrú go heimpíreach, déanaimid comparáid idir feidhmíocht roinnt aonad fofhocail éagsúla agus gnéithe ordlathacha fofhocail do na sraitheanna leabú ionchódóra agus díchódóra araon. Dhearbhaíomar go bhfeabhsaítear scóir BLEU ar thacair sonraí meastóireachta IWSLT trí ghnéithe ordlathacha fofhocail a ionchorprú san ionchódóir.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány az alszó alapú Neural Machine Translation (NMT). Feltételezzük, hogy az NMT modellben a következő három modul (réteg) megfelelő alszóegységei eltérhetnek: (1) a kódoló beágyazási réteg, (2) a dekódoló beágyazási réteg, és (3) a dekódoló kimeneti réteg. Úgy találjuk, hogy a Sennrich és mások (2016) alapú alszónak van egy tulajdonsága, hogy a nagy szókincs egy kis szókincs szuperhalmaza, és az NMT modell módosítása lehetővé teszi több különböző alszóegység beépítését egyetlen beágyazó rétegbe. Ezeket a kis alszó funkciókat hierarchikus alszó funkcióknak nevezzük. Feltételezésünk empirikus vizsgálatához több különböző alszóegység és hierarchikus alszó funkció teljesítményét hasonlítjuk össze mind a kódoló, mind a dekódoló beágyazási rétegek esetében. Megerősítettük, hogy a hierarchikus alszó funkciók beépítése a kódolóban következetesen javítja a BLEU pontszámokat az IWSLT értékelési adatkészleteken.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία επικεντρώνεται στην υπολέξη-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT). Υποθέτουμε ότι στο μοντέλο οι κατάλληλες μονάδες υπολέξεων για τις ακόλουθες τρεις ενότητες (στρώματα) μπορούν να διαφέρουν: (1) το στρώμα ενσωμάτωσης κωδικοποιητή, (2) το στρώμα ενσωμάτωσης αποκωδικοποιητή και (3) το στρώμα εξόδου αποκωδικοποιητή. Βρίσκουμε ότι η υπολέξη που βασίζεται στο κ.λ. (2016) έχει ένα χαρακτηριστικό ότι ένα μεγάλο λεξιλόγιο είναι ένα υπερσύνολο ενός μικρού λεξιλογίου και τροποποιεί το μοντέλο επιτρέπει την ενσωμάτωση πολλών διαφορετικών μονάδων υπολέξεων σε ένα ενιαίο στρώμα ενσωμάτωσης. Αναφέρουμε αυτά τα μικρά χαρακτηριστικά υπολέξεων ως ιεραρχικά χαρακτηριστικά υπολέξεων. Για να διερευνήσουμε εμπειρικά την υπόθεση μας, συγκρίνουμε την απόδοση πολλών διαφορετικών μονάδων υπολέξεων και ιεραρχικών χαρακτηριστικών υπολέξεων τόσο για τα στρώματα ενσωμάτωσης κωδικοποιητή όσο και για τον αποκωδικοποιητή. Επιβεβαιώσαμε ότι η ενσωμάτωση ιεραρχικών χαρακτηριστικών υπολέξεων στον κωδικοποιητή βελτιώνει σταθερά τις βαθμολογίες BLEU στα σύνολα δεδομένων αξιολόγησης IWSLT.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი გადაყენებული სამუშაო სიტყვების ნეირალური მაქინის გადატვირთვაზე (NMT) დაყენება. ჩვენ ჰიპოტესურებთ, რომ NMT მოდელში შესაძლებელი სამი მოდულებისთვის შესაძლებელია განსხვავება: (1) კოდირების შესაძლებლობა, (2) დეკოდირების შესაძლებლობა და (3) დეკოდირების შესაძლებლობა. ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ სუბსიტყვა Sennrich et al. (2016) აქვს ფუნქცია, რომ დიდი სიტყვალური სიტყვალური არის პატარა სიტყვალური სიტყვალური სუპერექტი და შეცვლა NMT მოდელური მოდელში განსხვავებული სუბსიტყვალურ ჩვენ ამ პატარა სუბსიტყვის ფუნქციები იერაქტიკური სუბსიტყვის. ჩვენი წარმოდგენისთვის ემპერიკურად შევსწორებთ, ჩვენ განსხვავებული საბეჭდონის ერთეულების და იერაქტიკური საბეჭდონის ფუნქციების გამოყენება, რომელიც კოდერის და რეკ ჩვენ დარწმუნეთ, რომ იერაქტიკური სუბსიტყვების ფუნქციები კოდერში მუშაობა BLEU წერტილებები IWSLT განსაზღვრების მონაცემების შესახებ.', 'it': "Questo articolo si concentra sulla traduzione automatica neurale basata su subparole (NMT). Ipotizziamo che nel modello NMT, le unità sottoparole appropriate per i seguenti tre moduli (layer) possono differire: (1) il livello di incorporazione dell'encoder, (2) il livello di incorporazione del decoder e (3) il livello di uscita del decoder. Troviamo che la sottoparola basata su Sennrich et al. (2016) ha una caratteristica che un ampio vocabolario è un superset di un piccolo vocabolario e modificare il modello NMT consente l'incorporazione di diverse sottoparole diverse in un unico livello di incorporazione. Queste piccole caratteristiche di sottoparola vengono definite come caratteristiche gerarchiche di sottoparola. Per analizzare empiricamente la nostra ipotesi, confrontiamo le prestazioni di diverse unità di sottoparola e le caratteristiche gerarchiche di sottoparola sia per i livelli di incorporazione dell'encoder che del decoder. Abbiamo confermato che incorporando caratteristiche gerarchiche di sottoparola nell'encoder migliora costantemente i punteggi BLEU sui set di dati di valutazione IWSLT.", 'mk': 'Оваа хартија се фокусира на превод на неурална машина (НМТ) базиран на подзборови. We hypothesize that in the NMT model, the appropriate subword units for the following three modules (layers) can differ: (1) the encoder embedding layer, (2) the decoder embedding layer, and (3) the decoder output layer.  Најдовме дека подзборот базиран на Сенрих и други (2016) има карактеристика дека големиот речник е суперсет на мал речник и го модификуваме моделот НМТ овозможува вклучување на неколку различни подзборови во еден слој. Ги нарекуваме овие мали подзборни карактеристики како хиерархични подзборни карактеристики. To empirically investigate our assumption, we compare the performance of several different subword units and hierarchical subword features for both the encoder and decoder embedding layers.  Потврдивме дека вклучувањето на хиерархичните карактеристики на подзборовите во кодерот константно ги подобрува оценките на БЛЕУ на податоците за проценка на IWSLT.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ішкі сөздерді негіздеген нейрондық машинаның аударуына (NMT) назар аударады. Біз NMT үлгісінде келесі үш модульдер (қабаттар) үшін қолданылатын ішкі сөздер бірлігі айырмашылады: (1) кодерді ендіру қабатты, (2) декодерді ендіру қабатты және (3) декодерді ендіру қабатты. Біз Sennrich et al. (2016) негізінде ішкі сөздің үлкен сөздері кішкентай сөздердің суперсеті және NMT үлгісін өзгерту үшін бірнеше әртүрлі ішкі сөздердің бірлігін бір қабатта ендіруге мүмкіндік береді. Біз бұл кішкентай ішкі сөздің қасиеттерін иерархикалық ішкі сөздің қасиеттері ретінде сұраймыз. Емпериялық тапсырмамызды зерттеу үшін бірнеше түрлі ішкі сөздер бірлігін және иерархикалық ішкі сөздерді кодерлеу мен декодерлеу қабаттарының қасиеттерін салыстырамыз. Біз кодерінде иерархикалық субсөздің мүмкіндіктерін ендіру үшін IWSLT бағалау деректер жиындарында BLEU нәтижелерін жақсарту дегенді тексердік.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriama neuroninių mašinų vertimui (NMT), grindžiamam žodžiais. Mes hipotezuojame, kad NMT modelyje gali skirtis atitinkami subžodžių vienetai šiems trims moduliams (sluoksniams): 1) kodavimo įdėjimo sluoksnis, 2) dekoderio įdėjimo sluoksnis ir 3) dekoderio išėjimo sluoksnis. Matome, kad Sennrich et al. (2016) pagrindu pagrįstas subžodis turi savybę, kad didelis žodynas yra mažo žodyno superrinkinys ir pakeisti NMT model į leidžia įdėti kelis skirtingus subžodžių vienetus į vieną įdėjimo sluoksnį. Šie maži požymiai vadinami hierarchiniais požymiais. Norėdami empiriniu būdu ištirti mūsų prielaidą, palyginame kelių skirtingų subžodžių vienetų ir hierarchinių subžodžių savybių rezultatus tiek koduotojo, tiek dekoderio įterpimo sluoksniuose. We confirmed that incorporating hierarchical subword features in the encoder consistently improves BLEU scores on the IWSLT evaluation datasets.', 'ms': 'This paper focuses on subword-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT).  Kami hipotesis bahawa dalam model NMT, unit subkata yang sesuai untuk tiga modul (lapisan) berikut boleh berbeza: (1) lapisan penyembedding pengekod, (2) lapisan penyembedding pengekod, dan (3) lapisan output pengekod. Kami jumpa subkata berdasarkan Sennrich et al. (2016) mempunyai ciri bahawa vokbulari besar adalah superset bagi vokbulari kecil dan mengubahsuai model NMT membolehkan penyambungan beberapa unit subkata yang berbeza dalam lapisan penyambungan tunggal. Kita rujuk ciri-ciri subkata kecil ini sebagai ciri-ciri subkata hierarkis. Untuk menyelidiki asumsi kita secara empirik, kita membandingkan prestasi beberapa unit subkata berbeza dan ciri-ciri subkata hierarkis untuk kedua-dua lapisan penyembedding pengekod dan penyembedding penyembedding. Kami mengesahkan bahawa memasukkan ciri-ciri subkata hierarkis dalam pengekod secara konsisten meningkatkan skor BLEU pada set data penilaian IWSLT.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас суурь үг дээр суурь мэдрэлийн машин хөгжүүлэх (NMT) дээр төвлөрүүлдэг. Бид NMT загвар дээр, дараагийн гурван модуль (давхар) үеийн зөв суб үеийн нэгжүүд өөрчлөгдөж болно: (1) коддогч орлуулах давхар, (2) коддогч орлуулах давхар, мөн (3) коддогч гарах давхар. Бид Sennrich et al-н суурь үгийг олж мэднэ. (2016) том үг нь жижиг үг хэлний супер хэлбэртэй бөгөөд NMT загварын загварыг өөрчлөх боломжтой. Нэг хэлбэрээр хэдэн өөр сувер үг нэгжүүдийг нэг хэлбэрт оруулах боломжтой. Бид эдгээр жижиг суб үгнүүдийг төрөлхтний суб үгнүүд гэж нэрлэдэг. Бид өөр олон үгийн нэгжүүдийг харьцуулахын тулд коддогч болон коддогч оролцох давхаруудыг харьцуулдаг. Бид кодлогчдод дүгнэлтийн дүгнэлт бүрдүүлэх нь IWSLT-ийн дүгнэлт өгөгдлийн санд BLEU оноо сайжруулдаг гэдгийг баталсан.', 'ml': 'This paper focuses on subword-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT).  NMT മോഡലില്\u200d, താഴെയുള്ള മൂന്നു ഘടകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സബ്വോര്\u200dഡ് യൂണിറ്റുകള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കാം: (1) കോഡെര്\u200d എപ്പോഡിങ്ങ് layer, (2) ഡെകോഡെര സെന്\u200dറ്രിക്ക് എറ്റ് അലിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ള സബ്വോര്\u200dഡിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. (2016) ഒരു വലിയ വാക്കുപദാവലി ഒരു ചെറിയ വാക്കോലിഷന്\u200dറെ സൂപ്പര്\u200d ഈ ചെറിയ സബ്\u200cവോര്\u200dഡിന്\u200dറെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഹിയറര്\u200dച്ചിക്കല്\u200d സബ്\u200cവോര്\u200dഡിലെ വിശേഷതകളാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വി നമ്മുടെ ഊഹിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രകടനത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് താരതമ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിന്റെ കോഡോര്\u200dഡര്\u200d  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉറപ്പ് വരുത്തിയിട്ടുണ്ടായിരുന്നു ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d സബ്\u200cവോര്\u200dഡിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d കോഡെരില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് IWSLT വില', 'mt': 'This paper focuses on subword-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT).  Aħna niipotesizzaw li fil-mudell NMT, l-unitajiet tas-subkelma xierqa għat-tliet moduli (saffi) li ġejjin jistgħu jvarjaw: (1) is-saff tal-inkodifikazzjoni tal-kodifikatur, (2) is-saff tal-inkodifikazzjoni tad-dekoder, u (3) is-saff tal-output tad-dekoder. Aħna nsibu s-subkelma bbażata fuq Sennrich et al. (2016) għandha karatteristika li vokabulari kbir huwa supersett ta’ vokabulari żgħir u jimmodifika l-mudell NMT jippermetti l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ diversi unitajiet ta’ subkelma differenti f’saff wieħed ta’ inkorporazzjoni. We refer these small subword features as hierarchical subword features.  Biex ninvestigaw b’mod empiriku s-suppożizzjoni tagħna, aħna nqabblu l-prestazzjoni ta’ diversi unitajiet differenti ta’ sottokliem u karatteristiċi ġerarkiċi ta’ sottokliem kemm għas-saffi ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kodifikatur kif ukoll għad-dekoder. Aħna kkonfermajna li l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi ġerarkiċi ta’ sottokliem fil-kodiċi ttejjeb b’mod konsistenti l-punteġġi BLEU fuq is-settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ evalwazzjoni IWSLT.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł skupia się na podsłowowym neuronowym tłumaczeniu maszynowym (NMT). Zakładamy hipotezę, że w modelu NMT odpowiednie jednostki podsłów dla następujących trzech modułów (warstw) mogą się różnić: (1) warstwa osadzania kodera, (2) warstwa osadzania dekodera i (3) warstwa wyjściowa dekodera. Znajdujemy podsłowo oparte na Sennrich et al. (2016) posiada cechę, że duże słownictwo jest nadzbiorem małego słownictwa i modyfikacja modelu NMT umożliwia włączenie kilku różnych jednostek podsłów w jedną warstwę osadzania. Te małe cechy podsłów określamy jako hierarchiczne cechy podsłów. Aby empirycznie zbadać nasze założenie, porównujemy wydajność kilku różnych jednostek podsłów i hierarchicznych cech podsłów dla warstw osadzania kodera i dekodera. Potwierdziliśmy, że włączenie hierarchicznych funkcji podsłów w koderze konsekwentnie poprawia wyniki BLEU na zbiorach danych oceniających IWSLT.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare se concentrează pe traducerea automată neurală bazată pe subcuvinte (NMT). Ipotezăm că în modelul NMT, unitățile de subcuvânt corespunzătoare pentru următoarele trei module (straturi) pot diferi: (1) stratul de încorporare al encoderului, (2) stratul de încorporare al decodorului și (3) stratul de ieșire al decodorului. Am găsit subcuvântul bazat pe Sennrich et al. (2016) are o caracteristică că un vocabular mare este un superset al unui vocabular mic și modificarea modelului NMT permite încorporarea mai multor unități diferite de subcuvânt într-un singur strat de încorporare. Ne referim la aceste caracteristici mici de subcuvinte ca caracteristici ierarhice de subcuvinte. Pentru a investiga empiric ipoteza noastră, comparăm performanța mai multor unități diferite de subcuvânt și caracteristici ierarhice de subcuvânt atât pentru straturile de încorporare codificator, cât și pentru decodor. Am confirmat că încorporarea caracteristicilor ierarhice ale subcuvântului în encoder îmbunătățește constant scorurile BLEU pe seturile de date de evaluare IWSLT.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir se fokusira na podrečenom Neuralnom prevodu mašine (NMT). Pretpostavljamo da u modelu NMT, odgovarajuće podriječne jedinice za sljedeće tri modula (slojeva) mogu razlikovati: (1) sloj kodera ugrađenog sloja, (2) sloj ugrađenog dekodera i (3) sloj izlaza dekodera. Našli smo podreč na osnovu Sennrich et al. (2016) ima karakteristiku da je veliki rečnik superset malih rečnika i modificira model NMT omogućava uključenje nekoliko različitih podrečnih jedinica u jednom ugrađenom sloju. Smatramo ove male podrijeèi kao hijerarhijske podrijeèi. Da bismo empirički istražili našu pretpostavku, usporedili smo učinkovitost nekoliko različitih podriječnih jedinica i hijerarhičkih podriječnih karakteristika i kodera i dekodera ugrađenih slojeva. Potvrdili smo da uključujući hijerarhijske podrečne karakteristike u koderu stalno poboljšava BLEU rezultate na setima IWSLT procjene podataka.', 'no': 'Denne papiret fokuserer på underordbasert neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT). Vi hypotiserer at i NMT-modellen kan dei passande underordeiningane for dei følgjande tre modulane (lag) forskjeller: (1) innbyggingslaget med koderar, (2) dekoderlaget og (3) dekoderlaget. Vi finn underordet basert på Sennrich et al. (2016) har ein funksjon som ein stor ordliste er eit oversett av ein liten ordliste og endrar NMT-modellen, kan inkludere fleire ulike underordeiningar i eit enkelt innbygging lag. Vi refererer desse små underordfunksjonane som hierarkiske underordfunksjonar. For å undersøkja assumpsjonen vårt, sammenlignar vi effekten av fleire ulike underordeiningar og hierarkiske underordfunksjonar for både kodingar og dekoderingar innebygde lag. Vi stadfestig at inkludering av hierarkiske underordfunksjonar i koderen konsekvent forbetrar BLEU-poeng på IWSLT-evalueringsdatasetta.', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddan wuxuu ku kalsoonaadaa tarjumaadda Neural machine (NMT). Waxaynu ka fekernaa in midowga NMT, qaybaha hoose ee ku habboon ee saddex module (layers) ay kala duwan karaan: (1) darajada kookookooxda kooxeedka, (2) darajada kooxeedka, iyo (3) darajada soo baxa. Hadalka hoose ee Sennrich et al. (2016) waxay leedahay qeyb aad u weyn oo ah hadal aad u yar, waxaana beddelinaynaa muusikada NMT, kaas oo awoodaa in laga soo galo qayb kala duduwan oo qoraal ah. Waxyaabahan hoos-hadalka yar waxaan u sheegaynaa heerarka hoose-word. Si aan u baaritaanno malayaasheena, waxaynu isbarbardhignaa tababarka kala duduwan ee iskuullada hoose-hadalka iyo xarafta hoose-hadalka, taas oo ah kooxerada iyo sawirada. Waxaannu xaqiijinnay in lagu koobi karo hierarchical subword-word oo ku qoran kooxda codsiga si joogto ah uu u beddelo scoraha BLEU ee IWSLT-da qiimeynta.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තුව සබ් වචන අධාරිත න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් භාවිතය (NMT) ගැන බලන්නේ. අපි හිතන්නේ NMT මොඩල් වලින්, පස්සේ මොඩ්යුල් තුනක් වෙනුවෙන් සබ් වචන යුනිකාවට වෙනස් කරන්න පුළුවන්: (1) ඇන්කෝඩර් ඇන්බිම් ලැයුම, (2) ඩිකෝඩ අපි සෙන්රිච් ට් අල් අධාරිත සබ්වර්ඩ හොයාගන්නේ. (2016) ලොකු භාෂාවක් තියෙනවා කියලා පොඩි භාෂාවක් සුපුර්සෙට් සහ NMT මොඩේල් වෙනස් කරනවා වෙනස අපි මේ පුංචි සබ්වර්ඩ වචන අවශ්\u200dය වචන අවශ්\u200dය විදියට කියනවා. අපේ විශ්වාසය පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අපි වෙනස් සබ්වර්ඩ් යුනිකාවන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ අභ්\u200dයාක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය සබ්වර්ඩ් වර්ගය ස අපි සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ අයිරේක්ෂික සබ්වර්ඩ් අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats fokuserar på underordsbaserad Neural Machine Translation (NMT). Vi antar att i NMT-modellen kan lämpliga underordsenheter för följande tre moduler (lager) skilja sig åt: (1) encoder embedding layer, (2) dekoder embedding layer, och (3) dekoder output layer. Vi finner att underordet baserat på Sennrich et al. (2016) har en funktion att ett stort ordförråd är en superset av ett litet ordförråd och modifiera NMT modellen möjliggör införlivande av flera olika underordenheter i ett enda inbäddningslager. Vi hänvisar till dessa små underordsfunktioner som hierarkiska underordsfunktioner. För att empiriskt undersöka vårt antagande jämför vi prestandan hos flera olika underordsenheter och hierarkiska underordsfunktioner för både kodare och dekoder inbäddningslager. Vi bekräftade att införlivandet av hierarkiska underordsfunktioner i kodaren konsekvent förbättrar BLEU-poäng på IWSLT utvärderingsdata.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் துணை வார்த்தையில் அடிப்படையிலான நெயுரல் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறது. NMT மாதிரியில், பின்வரும் மூன்று கூறுகளுக்கு தேவையான துணை அலகுகள் (அடுக்கு) We find the subword based on Sennrich et al. (2016) has a feature that a large vocabulary is a superset of a small vocabulary and modify the NMT model enables the incorporation of several different subword units in a single embedding layer.  நாம் இந்த சிறிய உச்சொல் குணங்களை உயர்ச்சி துணை வார்த்தைகளாக குறிக்கிறோம். எங்கள் யூகங்களை பெரும்பாலாக ஆராய்ச்சி செய்ய, நாம் பல்வேறு வித்திய உச்சொல் அலகுகளின் செயல்பாட்டை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் குறியீ IWSLT மதிப்பிடும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் BLEU மதிப்புகளை மேம்படுத்துகிறது என்பதை நாம் உறுதிப்படுத்தினோம்.', 'ur': 'This paper focuses on subword-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT). ہم فرض کرتے ہیں کہ NMT موڈل میں، نیچے تین موڈلوں (لائئٹ) کے لئے مناسب سوبرویڈ یونیٹ مختلف ہو سکتے ہیں: (1) انڈینگ لائٹ، 2) ڈیکوڈر انڈینگ لائٹ، اور (3) ڈیکوڈر اپوٹ لائٹ۔ ہم نے سنرچی ٹ ال (2016) پر بنیاد رکھا ہے کہ ایک بڑی آواز لکھنے والی ایک چھوٹی آواز لکھنے والی سوپرسٹ ہے اور NMT موڈل کو بدل دیتا ہے کہ چند مختلف سوبرویڈ یونیٹوں کو ایک ڈمبینڈ لائر میں شامل کرتا ہے۔ ہم ان چھوٹے سوبرویڈ کے خصوصے کو ہیراریک سوبرویڈ کے خصوصے بناتے ہیں۔ ہمارے فرض کو مضبوط طور پر تحقیق کرنے کے لئے، ہم مختلف مختلف سوبرویڈ یونیٹوں کے عملکرد اور یورارشیک سوبرویڈ کے فائولوں کے لئے کوڈر اور ڈیکوڈر ڈیکور ڈیکور ڈیکور کریں گے۔ ہم نے مطمئن کر دیا کہ ایوWSLT ارزیابی ڈیٹ سٹوں پر BLEU اسکوروں کو ثابت قدم رکھتا ہے', 'uz': "Name Biz kechilik, NMT modelida, quyidagi uchta modul (qatlamlar) uchun muhim tub soʻzlar birikmasi turli boʻlishi mumkin: (1) Kodlash usuli, (2) kodlash darajasi, kodlash darajasi va (3) kodlash usuli. Sennrich et al. (2016) asosida tub soʻzni topamiz, bir necha vosita bir kichkina vosita bo'ladi va NMT modelini oʻzgartirish imkoniyatini bir necha xil soʻzning bir xil tub soʻzlarni bir qanchalik chegaraga kirishga imkoniyat beradi. Biz bu kichkina tub soʻzning xususiyatlarini hierarchik tub soʻzning xususiyatlari deb ataymiz. Biz tasavvur qilish uchun biz bir necha xil soʻzning bir xil tub soʻzning imkoniyatini va hierarchik tub soʻzning xususiyatlarini birlashtiramiz. Biz kompyuterdagi hierarchik tub soʻzning imkoniyatlarini qoʻshish imkoniyatini IWSLT qiymati maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi BLEU qiymatlarini davom etishga ishonch hosil qildik.", 'vi': 'Tập trung vào dịch về máy thần kinh (NMB) Chúng tôi cho rằng trong mô hình NMB, các đơn vị ký tự thích hợp cho ba mô- đun sau (các lớp) có thể khác nhau: Chúng tôi tìm thấy chữ phụ dựa trên Sennkich et al. (thẩm 6) có một tính năng rằng một từ vựng lớn là một thay thế của một Từ điển nhỏ và sửa đổi mô hình NMT cho phép thêm vài đơn vị chữ phụ khác nhau trong một lớp nhúng đơn. Chúng tôi coi những chi tiết nhỏ này là các tính năng dưới từ cấp. Để nghiên cứu giả thuyết của chúng tôi, chúng tôi so sánh các hiệu quả của nhiều đơn vị dưới từ khác nhau và các tính năng dưới từ cấp cho cả các lớp mã hóa và mã giải. Chúng tôi xác nhận rằng việc áp dụng các chức năng dưới chữ cái thứ cấp trong bộ mã hóa cải thiện liên tục bảng số NIWSLT trên các tập tin đánh giá IWSLT.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel richt zich op subword-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT). We veronderstellen dat in het NMT-model de juiste subwoordeenheden voor de volgende drie modules (lagen) kunnen verschillen: (1) de inbeddingslaag van de encoder, (2) de inbeddingslaag van de decoder en (3) de uitvoerlaag van de decoder. We vinden dat het subwoord gebaseerd op Sennrich et al. (2016) een functie heeft dat een grote woordenschat een superset is van een kleine woordenschat en het aanpassen van het NMT model maakt het mogelijk om verschillende subwoordeenheden in een enkele insluitlaag op te nemen. We verwijzen naar deze kleine subwoordfuncties als hiërarchische subwoordfuncties. Om onze veronderstelling empirisch te onderzoeken, vergelijken we de prestaties van verschillende subwoordeenheden en hiërarchische subwoordfuncties voor zowel de coder- als decoder-insluitingslagen. We bevestigden dat het opnemen van hiërarchische subwoordfuncties in de encoder de BLEU-scores op de IWSLT-evaluatiedatasets consistent verbetert.', 'bg': 'Тази статия се фокусира върху поддума базиран неврален машинен превод (НМТ). Хипотезата е, че в модела подходящите подсловни единици за следните три модула (слоя) могат да се различават: (1) слой за вграждане на кодера, (2) слой за вграждане на декодер и (3) изходния слой на декодера. Намираме, че поддумата, базирана на Сенрих и др. (2016), има характеристика, че големият речник е суперсет от малък речник и модифицирането на модела позволява включването на няколко различни поддумични единици в един вграден слой. Ние наричаме тези малки функции на поддума като йерархични функции на поддума. За да проучим емпирично предположението си, сравняваме ефективността на няколко различни подслови и йерархични функции на подслови както за инкорпориращите слоеве на кодера, така и за декодера. Потвърдихме, че включването на йерархични функции на поддумата в кодера последователно подобрява оценките на наборите от данни за оценка на IWSLT.', 'da': 'Denne artikel fokuserer på underordsbaseret Neural Machine Translation (NMT). Vi antager, at i NMT-modellen kan de relevante underordsenheder for følgende tre moduler (lag) variere: (1) encoder indlejringslag, (2) dekoder indlejringslag og (3) dekoder udgangslag. Vi finder, at underordet baseret på Sennrich et al. (2016) har en funktion, at et stort ordforråd er et supersæt af et lille ordforråd og ændre NMT modellen muliggør indarbejdning af flere forskellige underordsenheder i et enkelt indlejringslag. Vi henviser disse små underordsfunktioner som hierarkiske underordsfunktioner. For empirisk at undersøge vores antagelse sammenligner vi ydeevnen af flere forskellige underordsenheder og hierarkiske underordsfunktioner for både encoder og dekoder indlejringslag. Vi bekræftede, at indarbejdelse af hierarkiske underordsfunktioner i encoderen konsekvent forbedrer BLEU scores på IWSLT evalueringsdatasæt.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag konzentriert sich auf subword-basierte Neural Machine Translation (NMT). Wir gehen davon aus, dass sich im NMT-Modell die entsprechenden Unterworteinheiten für die folgenden drei Module (Layer) unterscheiden können: (1) die Encoder-Einbettungsschicht, (2) die Decoder-Einbettungsschicht und (3) die Decoder-Ausgabeschicht. Wir finden, dass das Unterwort basierend auf Sennrich et al. (2016) eine Eigenschaft hat, dass ein großes Vokabular eine Überlagerung eines kleinen Vokabulars ist und das Modifizieren des NMT-Modells ermöglicht die Integration mehrerer Unterworteinheiten in einer einzigen Einbettungsebene. Wir bezeichnen diese kleinen Unterwortmerkmale als hierarchische Unterwortmerkmale. Um unsere Annahme empirisch zu untersuchen, vergleichen wir die Leistung verschiedener Unterworteinheiten und hierarchischer Unterwortmerkmale sowohl für die Einbettungsebenen für Encoder als auch Decoder. Wir haben bestätigt, dass die Integration hierarchischer Subword-Features im Encoder die BLEU-Scores auf den IWSLT-Auswertungsdatensätzen konsequent verbessert.', 'id': 'Kertas ini fokus pada Translation Neural Machine (NMT) berdasarkan subword. Kami hipotesis bahwa dalam model NMT, unit subkata yang sesuai untuk tiga modul (lapisan) berikutnya dapat berbeda: (1) lapisan penyembedding pengekode, (2) lapisan penyembedding pengekode, dan (3) lapisan keluaran pengekode. Kami menemukan subword berdasarkan Sennrich et al. (2016) memiliki ciri-ciri bahwa sebuah vocabulari besar adalah superset dari sebuah vocabulari kecil dan mengubah model NMT memungkinkan inkorporasi beberapa unit subword berbeda dalam satu lapisan embedding. Kami merujuk ciri-ciri subkata kecil ini sebagai ciri-ciri subkata hierarkis. Untuk menyelidiki asumsi kita secara empiris, kita membandingkan prestasi beberapa unit subword berbeda dan ciri-ciri subword hierarkis untuk kedua lapisan penyembedding pengekode dan dekoder. Kami mengkonfirmasi bahwa memasukkan ciri-ciri subkata hierarkis dalam pengekode secara konsisten meningkatkan skor BLEU pada set data evaluasi IWSLT.', 'sw': 'This paper focuses on subword-based Neural Machine Translation (NMT).  Tunafikiri kuwa katika mtindo wa NMT, vifaa vyenye vizuri vya maneno vinavyohitajika kwa vifaa tatu (vipande) vinaweza tofauti: (1) kiwango cha kodi kinachoingia, (2) kiwango cha kupunguza kodi, na (3) kiwango cha utoaji wa kodi. Tunapata neno la chini linalohusiana na Sennrich et al. (2016) lina hoja kwamba lugha kubwa ni moja ya lugha ndogo ya maneno na kubadilisha mtindo wa NMT unawezesha kuingiza vifaa kadhaa tofauti vya maneno katika ngazi moja. Tunaiita hizi nyeti ndogo za maneno ya chini kama utambulisho wa maneno ya chini. Ili kwa makini kuchunguza dhana yetu, tunalinganisha ufanisi wa vitengo kadhaa tofauti vya viungo vya maneno na vifaa vya upande wa maneno ya chini kwa ajili ya maeneo ya kodi na kupunguza vipande vya habari. Tulithibitisha kuwa kuingiza vipengele vya chini ya neno hilo kwa ujumla huo huboresha score za BLEU kwenye seti za taarifa za uchunguzi wa IWSLT.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ روی ترجمه ماشین عصبی بر اساس زیر کلمه تمرکز می\u200cکند (NMT). ما فرض می\u200cکنیم که در مدل NMT، واحدهای زیر کلمه مناسب برای سه مدول (لایه) زیر بعدی می\u200cتوانند تفاوت کنند: (۱) لایه پیدا کردن کودهر, (۲) لایه پیدا کردن دیکودهر و (۳) لایه خروج دیکودهر. ما پایین کلمه را بر اساس سنرچ و ال پیدا می\u200cکنیم. (۲۰۱۶) ویژه\u200cای دارد که کلمه بزرگ یک مجموعه از کلمه\u200cهای کوچک است و مدل NMT را تغییر می\u200cدهد که چند واحد زیر کلمه\u200cهای متفاوت در یک طبقه\u200cای وارد می\u200cشود. ما این ویژگی\u200cهای زیر کلمه کوچک را به عنوان ویژگی\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه معرفی می\u200cکنیم. برای تحقیق فرضیه\u200cهای ما، عملکرد چندین واحد زیر کلمه متفاوت و ویژه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای متفاوت برای لایه\u200cهای پیوند\u200cبندی\u200cکننده\u200cها و کوډر\u200cکننده\u200cها مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. ما تایید کردیم که شامل ویژه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200cهای زیر کلمه\u200c', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir se fokusira na podriječju neurološki prevod stroja (NMT). Pretpostavljamo da u modelu NMT, odgovarajuće podriječne jedinice za sljedeće tri modula (slojeva) mogu se razlikujeti: (1) sloj ugrađenog kodera, (2) sloj ugrađenog dekodera i (3) sloj izlaza dekodera. Našli smo podriječ temeljenu na Sennrich et al. (2016) ima karakteristiku da je veliki riječnik superset malih riječnika i modificira model NMT omogućava uključenje nekoliko različitih podriječnih jedinica u jednom ugrađenom sloju. Smatramo ove male podriječje kao hijerarhijske podriječje. Da bismo empirički istražili našu pretpostavku, uspoređujemo učinkovitost nekoliko različitih podriječnih jedinica i hijerarhičkih podriječnih karakteristika i kodera i dekodera ugrađenih slojeva. Potvrdili smo da uključujući hijerarhičke podriječje karakteristike u koderu stalno poboljšava BLEU rezultate na IWSLT ocjenama podataka.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz altsözleriň tabanly näral Maşynyň terjimesine (NMT) üns berýär. NMT nusgasynda, aşağıdaki üç modul (katlar) üçin ýeterli subsöz birimleri üýtgebilir. (1) ködleme katlany, (2) ködleme katlany we (3) ködleme katlany üýtgebilir. Sennrich et al'a daýanýan sözleriň uly sözleriň bir süýtgedigini tapdyk we NMT modeliniň birnäçe üýtgedigini ýekeje girişdirip biler. Biz bu kiçijek subject sözleri hiyerarşik subsözler özellikleri diýip kabul edip görýäris. Taýýarlanmamyzy empirik görkezmek üçin, birnäçe farklı sübsöz birimlerini we iýerarhiýa sübsöz özelliklerini hem kodeýan hem dekoderlemek üçin karşılaştyrýarys. Biz iýerarhiýa sübsöz özelliklerini kodlaýandygyny garaşdyrdyk. IWSLT deňlenme hasaplamalarynda BLEU अंश düzümlerini diňe gowydyrýar.", 'af': "Hierdie papier fokus op subwoord- gebaseerde neurale masjien vertaling (NMT). Ons hipotesis dat in die NMT model, die geskikte subwoord eenhede vir die volgende drie modules (lage) kan verskil: (1) die enkoder ingesluit laag, (2) die dekoder ingesluit laag, en (3) die dekoder uitset laag. Ons vind die subwoord gebaseer op Sennrich et al. (2016) het 'n funksie wat 'n groot woordeboek is 'n superstel van' n klein woordeboek en verander die NMT model aktiveer die inkorporering van verskeie verskillende subwoord eenhede in 'n enkele inbêding laag. Ons verwys hierdie klein subwoord funksies as hierarkies subwoord funksies. Om empiriese ondersoek ons aanvaar te vergelyk, vergelyk ons die prestasie van verskillende subwoord eenhede en hierarkies subwoord funksies vir beide die enkoder en dekoder ingesluit lagte. Ons het bevestig dat die inkorporering van hierarkies subwoord funksies in die enkoder konsistentlik BLES-punte op die IWSLT-evalueringsdatastel verbeter.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument përqëndrohet në Translation Neural Machine (NMT) bazuar në nënfjalë. Ne hipotezojmë se në model in NMT, njësitë e përshtatshme të nënfjalëve për tre modulet (shtresa) që vijnë mund të ndryshojnë: (1) shtresa e kodifikuesit të brendshëm, (2) shtresa e kodifikuesit të brendshëm dhe (3) shtresa e daljes së kodifikuesit. Ne e gjejmë nënfjalën bazuar në Sennrich et al. (2016) ka një funksion se një fjalor i madh është një superset i një fjalori të vogël dhe modifiko model in NMT lejon përfshirjen e disa njësive të ndryshme të nënfjalëve në një shtresë të vetme përfshirje. Ne i referojmë këto karakteristika të vogla nënfjalësh si karakteristika hierarkike nënfjalësh. To empirically investigate our assumption, we compare the performance of several different subword units and hierarchical subword features for both the encoder and decoder embedding layers.  We confirmed that incorporating hierarchical subword features in the encoder consistently improves BLEU scores on the IWSLT evaluation datasets.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը կենտրոնանում է ենթաբառերի հիմնված նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման վրա (NMT). We hypothesize that in the NMT model, the appropriate subword units for the following three modules (layers) can differ: (1) the encoder embedding layer, (2) the decoder embedding layer, and (3) the decoder output layer.  Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ Sennych et al. (2016) հիմնված ենթաբառը ունի հատկություն, որ մեծ բառարանը փոքր բառարանի գերսեթ է և փոխում է NMT-ի մոդելը հնարավորություն է տալիս բազմաթիվ տարբեր ենթաբառային միավորների ներառումը մեկ շերտի մեջ: Մենք այս փոքրիկ ենթաբառերի առանձնահատկությունները անվանում ենք հիերարխիկ ենթաբառերի առանձնահատկություններ: Մեր ենթադրության էմպիրիկ ուսումնասիրելու համար մենք համեմատում ենք բազմաթիվ տարբեր ենթաբառերի միավորների և հիերարխիկ ենթաբառերի առանձնահատկությունների արտադրությունը, և կոդերի ներդրման շերտերի համար: Մենք հաստատեցինք, որ հիերարխիկ ենթաբառերի առանձնահատկությունների ներառումը կոդերի մեջ անընդհատ բարելավում է IW-ՍԼT գնահատման տվյալների գնահատման գնահատականները:', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በመስመር ቃላት በኩል ቃላት የኔural machine ትርጓሜ (NMT) ላይ ያስተካክላል፡፡ We hypothesize that in the NMT model, the appropriate subword units for the following three modules (layers) can differ: (1) the encoder embedding layer, (2) the decoder embedding layer, and (3) the decoder output layer.  በSennrich et al (2016) ላይ የተመሳሳይ ጥብቃሩን እናገኛለን፡፡ እነዚህን ትንሽ ደብዳቤ ቃላት አዳራርቻዊ ዝርዝር ቃላትን እናስባለን፡፡ በአሳማሚ ስህተታችንን ለመፍጠር፣ ለሌሎች ልዩ ልዩ ደብዳቤ የክፍለ ቃላት አካባቢ እና ለኮድ እና የክፍለ አካባቢ ደረጃዎችን ለማስተካከል እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ የኤራርስክሪክ ደብዳቤ አዳራሲ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የBLEU scores ሲያሳድግ አረጋገጥን፡፡', 'ko': '본고는 주로 자어를 바탕으로 하는 신경기계번역(NMT)을 연구한다.우리는 NMT 모델에서 다음과 같은 세 개의 모듈(층)의 적당한 하위 단원이 다를 수 있다고 가정한다. (1) 인코더 삽입층, (2) 인코더 삽입층, 그리고 (3) 인코더 출력층.우리는 Sennrich et al.(2016)의 자어를 바탕으로 한 특징이 있는데 그것이 바로 큰 어휘량은 작은 어휘량의 초집합이고 NMT모델을 수정하면 하나의 삽입층에 여러 개의 서로 다른 자어 단원을 포함할 수 있다는 것이다.우리는 이런 작은 자사 특징을 분층자사 특징이라고 부른다.우리의 가설을 실증적으로 연구하기 위해 우리는 인코더와 디코더 삽입층의 몇 가지 서로 다른 서브 단원과 층별 서브 특징의 성능을 비교했다.인코더에 차원화된 자어 특징을 넣으면 IWSLT 평가 데이터 집합의 BLEU 점수를 지속적으로 높일 수 있다는 것을 확인했다.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা সাবওয়ার্ড ভিত্তিক নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (NMT) নিয়ে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। আমরা বিশ্বাস করি যে এনএমটি মডেলে নিম্নলিখিত তিন মোডুল (স্তর) যে সঠিক সাবওয়ার্ড ইউনিট বিভিন্ন হতে পারে: (1) এনকোডার এনকোডিং স্তর, (2) ডিকোডার এমডিং স্তর এব (3) ডি আমরা সেন্ররিকেট এল (২০১৬) ভিত্তিক সাবওয়ার্ডের উপর ভিত্তিক একটি বিশাল বৈশিষ্ট্য আছে যে বিশাল শব্দভাণ্ডার একটি ছোট শব্দভাণ্ডারের সুপারেট এবং এনএমটি মডেল পরিবর্তন আমরা এই ছোট্ট সাবওয়ার্ডের বৈশিষ্ট্য হিয়ারার্কিক সাবওয়ার্ডের বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে উল্লেখ করি। আমাদের ধারণাকে ক্ষমতাভাবে তদন্ত করার জন্য আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি বিভিন্ন সাবওয়ার্ড ইউনিট এবং হিয়েরার্কিয়ার সাবওয়ার্ডের বৈশিষ্ট্যের তুলনা করি এ আমরা নিশ্চিত করেছি যে এনকোডারে হিয়ারার্কিয়ার্কিল সাবওয়ার্ডের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈলিউ স্কোর বাড়িয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে IWSLT মূল্যায়নে', 'ca': "Aquest article es centra en la traducció de màquines neuronals (NMT) basada en subparaules. Suposem que en el model NMT, les unitats subparaules apropiades per als següents tres móduls (capes) poden diferir: (1) la capa d'incorporació del codificador, (2) la capa d'incorporació del codificador, i (3) la capa de sortida del codificador. Trobem que la subparaula basada en Sennrich et al. (2016) té una característica que un gran vocabulari és un superset d'un petit vocabulari i modifica el model NMT permet l'incorporació de diverses unitats de subparaula diferents en una sola capa d'incorporació. We refer these small subword features as hierarchical subword features.  Per investigar empíricament la nostra suposició, comparem el rendiment de diverses unitats de subparaules diferents i característiques jeràrquiques de subparaules tant per a les capes d'incorporació del codificador com del decodificador. Vam confirmar que incorporar característiques jeràrquiques de subparaules al codificador millora constantment les puntuacions BLEU dels conjunts de dades d'evaluació IWSLT.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir se fokusira na podriječju neurološki prevod (NMT). Pretpostavljamo da u modelu NMT, odgovarajuće podriječne jedinice za sljedeće tri modula (slojeva) mogu razlikovati: (1) sloj kodera ugrađenog sloja, (2) sloj ugrađenog dekodera i (3) sloj izlaza dekodera. Nalazimo podriječ na osnovu Sennrich et al. (2016) ima karakteristiku da je veliki rečnik superset malih rečnika i modificira model NMT omogućava uključenje nekoliko različitih podriječnih jedinica u jednom ugrađenom sloju. Smatramo ove male podriječje karakteristike kao hijerarhijske podriječje. Da bismo empirički istražili našu pretpostavku, uspoređujemo učinkovitost nekoliko različitih podriječnih jedinica i hijerarhičkih podriječnih karakteristika i kodera i dekodera ugrađenih slojeva. Potvrdili smo da uključujući hijerarhičke podriječje karakteristike u koderu stalno poboljšava BLEU rezultate na setima IWSLT procjene podataka.', 'cs': 'Tento článek se zaměřuje na podslovní neuronový strojový překlad (NMT). Předpokládáme hypotézu, že v NMT modelu se vhodné jednotky podslov pro následující tři moduly (vrstvy) mohou lišit: (1) vrstva vložení kodéru, (2) vrstva vložení dekodéru a (3) výstupní vrstva dekodéru. Zjišťujeme, že podslovo založené na Sennrichu et al. (2016) má vlastnost, že velká slovní zásoba je nadsadou malé slovní zásoby a modifikace NMT modelu umožňuje začlenění několika různých podslovních jednotek do jedné vložené vrstvy. Tyto malé podslovní vlastnosti označujeme jako hierarchické podslovní vlastnosti. Abychom empiricky zkoumali náš předpoklad, porovnáváme výkon několika různých podslovních jednotek a hierarchických podslovních vlastností pro vložení kodéru i dekodéru. Potvrdili jsme, že začlenění hierarchických funkcí podslov do snímače trvale zlepšuje skóre BLEU na hodnotících sadách IWSLT.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö keskendub alamsõnapõhisele neuromasintõlkele (NMT). Hüpoteesime, et NMT mudelis võivad järgmise kolme mooduli (kihi) jaoks sobivad alamsõnaühikud erineda: (1) kodeerija manustamiskiht, (2) dekoodri manustamiskiht ja (3) dekoodri väljundikiht. Leiame, et Sennrich et al. (2016) alusel põhineval alamsõnal on omadus, et suur sõnavara on väikese sõnavara superkomplekt ja NMT mudeli muutmine võimaldab ühte manustamiskihti lisada mitmeid erinevaid alamsõnaühikuid. Nimetame neid väikeseid alamsõna funktsioone hierarhilisteks alamsõna funktsioonideks. Eelduste empiiriliseks uurimiseks võrdleme erinevate alamsõnaühikute ja hierarhiliste alamsõnafunktsioonide jõudlust nii kodeerija kui ka dekooderi manustamiskihtide puhul. Kinnitasime, et hierarhiliste alamsõna funktsioonide lisamine kodeerijale parandab järjepidevalt BLEU tulemusi IWSLT hindamisandmekogumites.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa keskitytään alasanapohjaiseen neurokonekäännökseen (NMT). Oletamme, että NMT-mallissa asianmukaiset alasanayksiköt seuraaville kolmelle moduulille (kerroksille) voivat poiketa: (1) kooderin upotuskerros, (2) dekooderin upotuskerros ja (3) dekooderin lähtökerros. Sennrich et al. (2016) pohjautuvalla alasanalla on ominaisuus, että suuri sanasto on pienen sanaston superjoukko ja NMT-mallin muokkaaminen mahdollistaa useiden eri alasanayksiköiden yhdistämisen yhteen upotuskerrokseen. Kutsumme näitä pieniä aliavan ominaisuuksia hierarkkisiksi aliavan ominaisuuksiksi. Empiirisesti tutkiaksemme oletustamme vertaamme useiden eri alasanayksiköiden ja hierarkkisten alasanaominaisuuksien suorituskykyä sekä kooderi- että dekooderiupotustasojen osalta. Vahvistimme, että hierarkkisten alasanaominaisuuksien sisällyttäminen kooderiin parantaa jatkuvasti BLEU-pisteitä IWSLT-arviointiaineistoissa.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt altsözlərə dayanan nöral Makina Çeviri (NMT) üzərinə odaqlanır. Biz NMT modelində, aşağıdaki üç modul (layers) üçün uyğun sübsöz birlikləri fərqli olaraq təsdiqləyirik: (1) kodlayıcı sütun, (2) kodlayıcı sütun və (3) dekoder çıxış sütunu. Sennrich et al. (2016-ci ildə) yüksək sözlərin küçük sözlərin süper seti olduğunu və NMT modelini dəyişdirmək üçün bircə müxtəlif süb sözlərin birincisini bir yerdə qatmağa qadirdir. Biz bu kiçik sözlərin özelliklərini hiyerarşik sözlərin özellikləri kimi adlandırırıq. Bizim zənnlərimizi empirik olaraq araşdırmaq üçün, bir neçə fərqli alt-söz ünvanların və hiyerarşik alt-söz özelliklərini də kodlayıcı və kodlayıcı katların performansını salırıq. Biz kodadan hiyerarşik alt sözlərin özelliklərini inkorplanmağını təsdiqlədik ki, IWSLT değerlendirmə verilənlərin qurğularında BLEU nöqtələrini artırar.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek se osredotoča na podbesedni nevralni strojni prevod (NMT). Predpostavljamo hipotezo, da se lahko v modelu NMT ustrezne podbesede za naslednje tri module (plasti) razlikujejo: (1) plast vgradnje kodirja, (2) plast vgradnje dekoderja in (3) izhodna plast dekoderja. Ugotovili smo, da ima podbeseda, ki temelji na Sennrichu et al. (2016), značilnost, da je velik besedišče superniz majhnega besedišča in spreminjanje modela NMT omogoča vključitev več različnih podbesednih enot v eno samo vgradno plast. Te majhne podbesede označujemo kot hierarhične podbesede. Da bi empirično raziskali našo domnevo, primerjamo učinkovitost več različnih podbesednih enot in hierarhičnih funkcij podbesed za plasti vdelave kodirnika in dekodirnika. Potrdili smo, da vključitev hierarhičnih funkcij podbesed v kodirnik dosledno izboljšuje rezultate BLEU v naborih podatkov o vrednotenju IWSLT.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Tuna kai-labari cẽwa, cikin shirin NMT, sune masu daidai wa ƙanshi na cikin modulen turu uku (ƙananan) za'a rarraba: (1) layin kode da ke cikin daraja, (2) layin da aka lokace, da (3) layin duk masu fitarwa. Tuna gane maganar da aka binge shi a kan sunnrich et al. (2016) yana da wani feashi mai girma wa maganar wani abu mai ƙara kuma ya gyara misalin NMT, yana iya amfani da in shigar da wasu sunayen dabam-dabam cikin wani wuri guda. Kana kalmar waɗannan masu ƙarami masu husũma kamar misalin sarki. To, idan an yi ƙidãya na zato, muna samfani game da aikin wasu nau'i-nau'i ko kuma masu buƙata sauri masu cikin zanen kode da za'a daidaita. We confirmed that incorporating hierarchical subword features in the encoder consistently improves BLEU scores on the IWSLT evaluation datasets.", 'jv': 'Perintah iki dipungasun kanggo gambar-gambar Manual Manual Terjamahan (NMT). We theorulate that in the NMT model, the right Subword unit for the next 3 modules (layers) can change (1) the decoder embedding layer,2) the decoder embedding layer, and (3) the decoder output layer. Awak dhéwé ngêngguna kuwi apa-word basa Sennèh et al (2013) lan akeh cara-cara sing dibenakno karo akeh langgar sampek kudu diweh sistem sing gak dhéwé nggawe sistem NMT iso ngubah akeh akeh sekondirno karo aku sing gak dhéwé Monday Jejaring Awak dhéwé wis nggunakake kuwi nggawe akeh pernik-pernik ingkang karo koder sing ditambah basa sing luwih basa sing luwih nggawe gerakan cukup durung, sing uwis nggawe datasing sing nggawe IWSLT', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מתמקדת בתרגום מכונת נוירולית (NMT) מבוססת על מילים. אנו מניחים שבמודל NMT, היחידות הת-מילים המתאימות לשלושת המודולים (שכבות) הבאים יכולות להשתנות: (1) שכבת הקוד, (2) שכבת הקוד של הקוד, ו (3) שכבת ההוצאה של הקוד. אנחנו מוצאים את המילה התחתונה המבוססת על Sennrich et al. (2016) יש תכונה כי מילון גדול הוא סופרסט של מילון קטן ושינוי מודל NMT מאפשר את ההקיעה של כמה יחידות תת מילים שונות בשכבת הוקפה אחת. אנו קוראים לתחומים הקטנים האלה בתור תכונות התחומים היררכיים. כדי לחקור אמפירית את ההנחה שלנו, אנחנו משווה את ההופעה של מספר יחידות תחת מילים שונות ואת תכונות תחת מילים היררכיים לשכבות הקודר וגם לקודר. We confirmed that incorporating hierarchical subword features in the encoder consistently improves BLEU scores on the IWSLT evaluation datasets.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ལག་འཁོར་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་སྒུལ་གྱི་མ་དངུལ་ལག་འཁོར་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྐབས་ལ་བློ་གཏད་འདུག (NMT) We hypothesize that in the NMT model, the appropriate subword units for the following three modules (layers) can differ: (1) the encoder embedding layer, (2) the decoder embedding layer, and (3) the decoder output layer. We find the subword based on Sennrich et al. (2016) has a feature that a large vocabulary is a superset of a small vocabulary and modify the NMT model enables the incorporation of several different subword units in a single embedding layer. ང་ཚོས་དབང་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཆུང་ཆུང་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་དག་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། To empirically investigate our assumption, we compare the performance of several different subword units and hierarchical subword features for both the encoder and decoder embedding layers. We confirmed that incorporating hierarchical subword features in the encoder consistently improves BLEU scores on the IWSLT evaluation datasets.'}
{'en': 'Design Challenges in Named Entity Transliteration', 'ar': 'تحديات التصميم في التحويل الصوتي للكيان المحدد', 'es': 'Desafíos de diseño en la transliteración de entidades', 'fr': "Défis de conception dans la translittération d'entités nommées", 'pt': 'Desafios de design na transliteração de entidade nomeada', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ変換の設計上の課題', 'zh': '命实体音译中计挑战', 'hi': 'नामित एंटिटी लिप्यंतरण में डिज़ाइन चुनौतियां', 'ru': 'Проблемы проектирования при транслитерации именованных сущностей', 'ga': 'Dúshláin Dearaidh i dTraslitriú Aonán Ainmnithe', 'hu': 'Tervezési kihívások a nevezett entitások transztliterációjában', 'el': 'Προκλήσεις σχεδιασμού στη μεταγραφή ονομασμένων οντοτήτων', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Sfide progettuali nella traslitterazione delle entità nominate', 'lt': 'Projekto uždaviniai pavadinimų subjektų transliteracijos srityje', 'kk': 'Аталған нысанның транслитерациясындағы шақыруларды құрастыру', 'mk': 'Предизвики за дизајн во транслитерација на именувани ентитети', 'ms': 'Cipta cabaran dalam Transliterasi Entiti bernama', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Sfidi tad-Disinn fit-Trasliterazzjoni tal-Entità Ismija', 'mn': 'Нэр нэрлэгдсэн Entity Transliteration', 'pl': 'Wyzwania projektowe w transliteracji nazwanych podmiotów', 'no': 'Design Challenges in Named Entity Transliteration', 'ro': 'Provocări de proiectare în transliterarea entităților denumite', 'sr': 'dizajniraj izazove u transliteraciji imenovanog entiteta', 'so': 'Design Challenges in name Entity Translation', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Design Challenges in Named Entity Transliteration', 'sv': 'Utformningsutmaningar vid translitering av namngivna enheter', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trận đấu thiết kế trong Dịch ngữ nghĩa.', 'hr': 'Dizajnirati izazove u preliteraciji imenovanog entiteta', 'nl': 'Ontwerpuitdagingen bij de transliteratie van naamloze entiteiten', 'id': 'Design Challenges in Named Entity Transliteration', 'bg': 'Предизвикателства за проектиране при транслитерацията на названите обекти', 'da': 'Design udfordringer i translitering af navngivne enheder', 'ko': '명명 실체 음역의 디자인 도전', 'de': 'Designherausforderungen bei der Transliteration benannter Entitäten', 'sw': 'Design Changamoto katika Translation of Entity Named Entity', 'fa': 'طراحی چالش\u200cها در تغییر نامیده شده\u200cای', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'af': 'Ontwerp Opdragte in Genaamde Entity Transliteration', 'hy': 'Նախագծելու մարտահրավերներ անունված անհատականության հաղորդակցման մեջ', 'az': 'İsmim Entity Transliteration', 'sq': 'Sfidat e projektimit në Transliteracionin e njësisë së emëruar', 'ca': "El desafiament del disseny en la transliteració d'entitats anomenades", 'bn': 'নামের এন্টিটি ট্রান্সলিটেশনে চ্যালেঞ্জ ডিজাইন করুন', 'cs': 'Návrhové výzvy v transliteraci jmenovaných entit', 'bs': 'dizajniraj izazove u transliteraciji imenovanog entiteta', 'fi': 'Designing Challenges in Named Entity Transliteration', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste transliteratsiooni disainiprobleemid', 'jv': 'name', 'he': 'עיצוב אתגרים בטרנסליטרציה של איכות בשם', 'sk': 'Izzivi oblikovanja pri prevajanju imenovanih subjektov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'མིང་བཏགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཨ་རིའི་གནས་སྡུད་རྗེས་ལ་བཟོ་བ'}
{'en': 'We analyze some of the fundamental design challenges that impact the development of a multilingual state-of-the-art named entity transliteration system, including curating bilingual named entity datasets and evaluation of multiple transliteration methods. We empirically evaluate the transliteration task using the traditional weighted finite state transducer (WFST) approach against two neural approaches : the encoder-decoder recurrent neural network method and the recent, non-sequential Transformer method. In order to improve availability of bilingual named entity transliteration datasets, we release personal name bilingual dictionaries mined from Wikidata for English to Russian, Hebrew, Arabic, and Japanese Katakana. Our code and dictionaries are publicly available.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتحليل بعض تحديات التصميم الأساسية التي تؤثر على تطوير نظام تحويل صوتي للكيان متعدد اللغات حديث ، بما في ذلك تنظيم مجموعات بيانات الكيانات المسماة ثنائية اللغة وتقييم طرق التحويل الصوتي المتعددة. نقوم بتقييم مهمة التحويل الصوتي بشكل تجريبي باستخدام نهج محول الحالة المحدودة الموزون التقليدي (WFST) مقابل نهجين عصبيين: طريقة الشبكة العصبية المتكررة لجهاز التشفير وفك التشفير وطريقة المحول الحديثة غير المتسلسلة. من أجل تحسين توفر مجموعات بيانات التحويل الصوتي للكيانات ثنائية اللغة ، قمنا بإصدار قواميس ثنائية اللغة للأسماء الشخصية مستخرجة من Wikidata للغة الإنجليزية إلى الروسية والعبرية والعربية واليابانية كاتاكانا. الكود والقواميس الخاصة بنا متاحة للجمهور.', 'pt': 'Analisamos alguns dos desafios fundamentais de design que impactam o desenvolvimento de um sistema multilíngue de transliteração de entidades nomeadas de última geração, incluindo a curadoria de conjuntos de dados de entidades nomeadas bilíngues e a avaliação de vários métodos de transliteração. Avaliamos empiricamente a tarefa de transliteração usando a abordagem tradicional de transdutor de estado finito ponderado (WFST) contra duas abordagens neurais: o método de rede neural recorrente do codificador-decodificador e o método recente do transformador não sequencial. Para melhorar a disponibilidade de conjuntos de dados de transliteração de entidades nomeadas bilíngues, lançamos dicionários bilíngues de nomes pessoais extraídos do Wikidata para inglês para russo, hebraico, árabe e japonês Katakana. Nosso código e dicionários estão disponíveis publicamente.', 'fr': "Nous analysons certains des défis de conception fondamentaux qui ont un impact sur le développement d'un système de translittération d'entités nommées multilingue de pointe, y compris la conservation d'ensembles de données d'entités nommées bilingues et l'évaluation de plusieurs méthodes de translittération. Nous évaluons empiriquement la tâche de translittération en utilisant l'approche traditionnelle du transducteur d'état fini pondéré (WFST) par rapport à deux approches neuronales\xa0: la méthode du réseau neuronal récurrent encodeur-décodeur et la méthode récente non séquentielle Transformer. Afin d'améliorer la disponibilité des ensembles de données de translittération d'entités nommées bilingues, nous publions des dictionnaires bilingues de noms personnels extraits de Wikidata pour l'anglais vers le russe, l'hébreu, l'arabe et le katakana japonais. Notre code et nos dictionnaires sont accessibles au public.", 'es': 'Analizamos algunos de los desafíos fundamentales de diseño que afectan el desarrollo de un sistema multilingüe de transliteración de entidades nombradas de última generación, incluida la conservación de conjuntos de datos bilingües de entidades nombradas y la evaluación de múltiples métodos de transliteración. Evaluamos empíricamente la tarea de transliteración utilizando el enfoque tradicional del transductor de estados finitos ponderado (WFST) en comparación con dos enfoques neuronales: el método de red neuronal recurrente codificador-decodificador y el reciente método Transformer no secuencial. Con el fin de mejorar la disponibilidad de conjuntos de datos bilingües de transliteración de entidades nombradas, publicamos diccionarios bilingües de nombres personales extraídos de Wikidata para el katakana del inglés al ruso, hebreo, árabe y japonés. Nuestro código y diccionarios están a disposición del público.', 'ja': '私たちは、バイリンガルの名前付きエンティティデータセットのキュレーションや複数の音声変換方法の評価を含む、最先端のエンティティ名付き多言語変換システムの開発に影響を与えるいくつかの基本的な設計上の課題を分析します。我々は、従来の加重有限状態変換器（ ＷＦＳＴ ）アプローチを使用して、エンコーダ－デコーダ反復ニューラルネットワーク法と最近の非逐次的トランスフォーマー法という２つのニューラルアプローチと比較して、トランスリテレーションタスクを経験的に評価する。バイリンガルエンティティの名前付きトランスリテーションデータセットの可用性を向上させるために、ウィキデータから英語、ロシア語、ヘブライ語、アラビア語、日本語のカタカナにマイニングされた個人名バイリンガル辞書をリリースします。当社のコードと辞書は一般に公開されています。', 'zh': '论其多言、先进之名实体音译系统开发之要,双语名实体数集、评估多种音译法。 旧加权有限换能器(WFST)二神经法音译:编码器 - 解码器递归神经网络近变压器。 为高双语命实体音译数集之可用性,发维基数挖掘出人姓名双语词典,施于英语至俄语,希伯来语,阿拉伯语与日语片假名。 吾代码与词典明矣。', 'hi': 'हम कुछ मौलिक डिजाइन चुनौतियों का विश्लेषण करते हैं जो एक बहुभाषी राज्य-के-कला नामित इकाई लिप्यंतरण प्रणाली के विकास को प्रभावित करते हैं, जिसमें द्विभाषी नामित इकाई डेटासेट और कई लिप्यंतरण विधियों का मूल्यांकन शामिल है। हम दो तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोणों के खिलाफ पारंपरिक भारित परिमित राज्य ट्रांसड्यूसर (WFST) दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके लिप्यंतरण कार्य का अनुभवजन्य रूप से मूल्यांकन करते हैं: एन्कोडर-डिकोडर आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क विधि और हाल ही में, गैर-अनुक्रमिक ट्रांसफॉर्मर विधि। द्विभाषी नामित इकाई लिप्यंतरण डेटासेट की उपलब्धता में सुधार करने के लिए, हम अंग्रेजी के लिए विकिडेटा से रूसी, हिब्रू, अरबी और जापानी कटाकाना में खनन किए गए व्यक्तिगत नाम द्विभाषी शब्दकोशों को जारी करते हैं। हमारे कोड और शब्दकोश सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы анализируем некоторые фундаментальные проблемы проектирования, которые влияют на разработку многоязычной современной системы транслитерации именованных сущностей, включая курирование двуязычных наборов данных именованных сущностей и оценку нескольких методов транслитерации. Мы эмпирически оцениваем задачу транслитерации, используя традиционный взвешенный подход конечного преобразователя (WFST) по двум нейронным подходам: метод рекуррентной нейронной сети кодировщик-декодер и недавний, непоследовательный метод трансформатора. Чтобы улучшить доступность двуязычных наборов данных для транслитерации сущностей, мы выпускаем двуязычные словари личных имен, созданные на основе Викидата для перевода с английского языка на русский, иврит, арабский и японский катаканы. Наш код и словари являются общедоступными.', 'ga': "Déanaimid anailís ar chuid de na dúshláin dearaidh bhunúsacha a mbíonn tionchar acu ar fhorbairt chóras traslitrithe ilteangach úrscothach d’eintiteas ainmnithe, lena n-áirítear tacair shonraí eintiteas ainmnithe dátheangacha a choimeád agus measúnú ar mhodhanna iolracha traslitrithe. Déanaimid measúnú eimpíreach ar an tasc traslitrithe ag baint úsáide as an gcur chuige traidisiúnta um thrasduchtúr stáit chríochnaigh ualaithe (WFST) i gcoinne dhá chur chuige néaracha: an modh líonra néaraigh athfhillteach ionchódóra-díchódóra agus an modh Trasfhoirmeora neamhsheicheamhach le déanaí. D'fhonn feabhas a chur ar infhaighteacht tacar sonraí dátheangacha traslitrithe aonáin ainmnithe, eisímid foclóirí dátheangacha ainmneacha pearsanta a bhaintear as Wikidata don Bhéarla go Rúisis, Eabhrais, Araibis agus Katakana Seapánach. Tá ár gcód agus ár bhfoclóirí ar fáil go poiblí.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვაანალიზებთ ფუნდამენტური დიზინის გამოცდილებები, რომლებიც მრავალენგური განვითარებას განვითარებას, რომლებიც განვითარება ინტერნეტის ტრანსლიტაციის სისტემის განვითარებას, რომლებიც ორიენგური სახე ჩვენ ემპერიკურად ტრანსლიტაციის რაოდენობას გამოყენებთ траდიციონალური განსაზღვრებული სტრანსუქტორის (WFST) პროგრამის გამოყენება ორი ნეიროლური გახსნა: რეკორენტი ნეიროლური ქსელის მეტოდი და ახალი,  ჩვენ ვიკეთეტატიდან ინგლისური, ჰებური, აპაბური და იაპონური კაკაკანადან პირადი სახელის სახელის სახელის გასაღებისთვის შესაძლებელობა. ჩვენი კოდი და სიტყვარები ადგილურად ხელსახულია.', 'el': 'Αναλύουμε μερικές από τις θεμελιώδεις προκλήσεις σχεδιασμού που επηρεάζουν την ανάπτυξη ενός πολυγλωσσικού συστήματος μεταγραφής ονομαστών οντοτήτων, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της επιμέλειας δίγλωσσων συνόλων δεδομένων ονομαστών οντοτήτων και της αξιολόγησης πολλαπλών μεθόδων μεταγραφής. Αξιολογούμε εμπειρικά το έργο μεταγραφής χρησιμοποιώντας την παραδοσιακή προσέγγιση μετατροπέα πεπερασμένης κατάστασης σε σχέση με δύο νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις: την μέθοδο επαναλαμβανόμενου νευρικού δικτύου κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή και την πρόσφατη, μη διαδοχική μέθοδο μετασχηματιστή. Προκειμένου να βελτιωθεί η διαθεσιμότητα των διγλωσσών συνόλων δεδομένων μεταγραφής ονομασμένων οντοτήτων, κυκλοφορούμε προσωπικά δίγλωσσα λεξικά που εξορύσσονται από τα Βικιντεδομένα για τα Αγγλικά στα Ρωσικά, Εβραϊκά, Αραβικά και Ιαπωνικά Κατάκανα. Ο κώδικας και τα λεξικά μας είναι δημόσια διαθέσιμα.', 'hu': 'Elemzünk néhány olyan alapvető tervezési kihívást, amelyek hatással vannak egy többnyelvű, korszerű nevezett entitás transzliterációs rendszer fejlesztésére, beleértve a kétnyelvű nevezett entitás adatkészletek kurátorait és több transzliterációs módszer értékelését. A transzliterációs feladatot empirikusan értékeljük a hagyományos súlyozott véges állapotátalakító (WFST) megközelítéssel két neurális megközelítéssel: az encoder-dekóder visszatérő neurális hálózati módszerrel és a legújabb, nem szekvenciális transzformátor módszerrel. Annak érdekében, hogy javítsuk a kétnyelvű nevezett entitás transzliterációs adatkészletek elérhetőségét, kiadjuk a Wikidata-ból bányászott személyes név kétnyelvű szótárakat angolra, héberre, arabra és japán katakánára. A kódunk és szótáraink nyilvánosan elérhetőek.', 'it': "Analizziamo alcune delle sfide progettuali fondamentali che influenzano lo sviluppo di un sistema multilingue di traslitterazione di entità denominate all'avanguardia, tra cui la cura di set di dati bilingui di entità denominate e la valutazione di più metodi di traslitterazione. Valutiamo empiricamente il compito di traslitterazione utilizzando il tradizionale approccio ponderato a stato finito (WFST) rispetto a due approcci neurali: il metodo di rete neurale ricorrente encoder-decoder e il recente metodo Transformer non sequenziale. Al fine di migliorare la disponibilità di set di dati bilingui sulla traslitterazione di entità denominate, rilasciamo dizionari bilingui di nome personale estratti da Wikidata per l'inglese al russo, ebraico, arabo e giapponese Katakana. Il nostro codice e dizionari sono disponibili pubblicamente.", 'kk': 'Біз көптілік тілдерді аудару жүйесінің көпшілік тілдерді аудару жүйесіне әсер ететін негізгі құрылғыларды анализирамыз, сондай-ақ екі тілдерді аталатын нысандар деректер жиындарын жасау және бірнеше аудару әдістері Біз транслитерациялық тапсырманы кәдімгі шектелген күй аударғышы (WFST) арқылы екі невралдық келесінің қарсы: кодер- декодер қайталанатын невралдық желінің әдісін және соңғы, келесінша түрлендіру әдісін қолд Екі тілінде аталған нысандардың транслитерациялық деректер жиындарын жақсарту үшін, біз әрбір тілінен ағылшын, еврей, араб және япон Katakana үшін Wikidata- дан арнаулы сөздік сөздіктерін шығару үшін. Біздің код мен сөздіктеріміз көпшілікті қол жеткізеді.', 'lt': 'Analizuojame kai kuriuos pagrindinius projektavimo uždavinius, kurie daro poveikį daugiakalbės moderniausios subjektų transliteracijos sistemos kūrimui, įskaitant dvikalbių subjektų duomenų rinkinių kurimą ir daugelio transliteracijos metodų vertinimą. Empiriškai vertiname transliteracijos užduotį taikant tradicinį svertinį galutinės būklės transductorių (WFST) metodą, lyginant su dviem nerviniais metodais: pakartotinio nervinio tinklo kodavimo dekoderio metodu ir naujausiu, ne sekvenciniu transformatorių metodu. Siekiant pagerinti dvikalbių subjektų transliteracijos duomenų rinkinių prieinamumą, mes skelbiame asmeninius pavadinimus dvikalbius žodynus, kasuojamus iš Wikidata anglų kalba rusų, hebrajų, arabų ir japonų katakana. Mūsų kodas ir žodynai yra viešai prieinami.', 'ms': 'Kami menganalisis beberapa cabaran rancangan dasar yang mempengaruhi pembangunan sistem transliterasi entiti bernama banyak bahasa, termasuk merawat set data entiti bernama dua bahasa dan penilaian kaedah transliterasi berbilang. Kami secara empirik menilai tugas transliterasi menggunakan pendekatan transducer keadaan tertentu (WFST) berlebihan tradisional melawan dua pendekatan saraf: kaedah rangkaian saraf yang berulang-ulang pengekod-dekoder dan kaedah Transformer yang baru-baru ini, bukan-urutan. Untuk meningkatkan kesediaan set data transliterasi entiti bernama dua bahasa, kami melepaskan kamus dua bahasa peribadi bernama peribadi yang dibuang dari Wikidata untuk bahasa Inggeris ke Rusia, Hebrew, Arab, dan Katakana Jepun. Kod dan kamus kami tersedia secara umum.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ച് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഡിസൈന്\u200d വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പേരുള്ള ഒരു വസ്തുവിന്റെ ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ലിറ്റരേഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ് We empirically evaluate the transliteration task using the traditional weighted finite state transducer (WFST) approach against two neural approaches: the encoder-decoder recurrent neural network method and the recent, non-sequential Transformer method.  വികിത്താതയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കും ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലേക്കും അറബിയിലേക്കും ജപ്പാനിലേക്കും കാ നമ്മുടെ കോഡും നിഘട്ടങ്ങളും പ്രത്യേകം ലഭ്യമാണ്.', 'mt': 'Aħna tanalizzaw xi wħud mill-isfidi fundamentali tad-disinn li jaffettwaw l-iżvilupp ta’ sistema multilingwi ta’ traslitterazzjoni tal-entità msejħa l-aktar avvanzata, inkluż il-kurazzjoni ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta tal-entità msejħa bilingwi u l-evalwazzjoni ta’ metodi multipli ta’ traslitterazzjoni. Nivvalutaw empirikament il-kompitu tat-traslitterazzjoni bl-użu tal-approċċ tradizzjonali tat-trasdutur tal-istat finit ippeżat (WFST) kontra żewġ approċċi newrali: il-metodu rikorrenti tan-netwerk newrali rikorrenti tal-kodifikatur-dekoder u l-metodu riċenti tat-Trasformer mhux sekwenzjali. Sabiex tittejjeb id-disponibbiltà ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ traslitterazzjoni ta’ entitajiet b’isem bilingwu, nirrilaxxaw dikjararji bilingwi b’isem personali maħruġa minn Wikidata għall-Ingliż għar-Russu, l-Hebrew, l-Għarab u l-Ġappuniż Katakana. Il-kodiċi u d-dikjararji tagħna huma disponibbli għall-pubbliku.', 'mk': 'Ние анализираме некои од фундаменталните предизвици за дизајн кои влијаат на развојот на мултијазичен систем на транслитерација на ентитетите наречен најново име, вклучувајќи го и курирањето на двојјазичните податоци на ентитетите наречени и евалуацијата на многут Емпирички ја проценуваме транслитерацијата користејќи го традиционалниот тежиран крајна состојба трансдукер (WFST) пристап против два нервни пристапи: рецидент метод на нервната мрежа на кодерот-декодерот и неодамнешниот, несеквенцијален метод на трансформирање. Со цел да се подобри достапноста на податоците за транслитерација на двајазични ентитети, ние ги објавуваме личен името двајазични речници минирани од Викидата за англиски на руски, еврејски, арапски и јапонски Катакана. Нашиот код и речниците се јавно достапни.', 'mn': 'Бид олон хэл хэлний урлагийн зохиолын хөгжүүлэх системийн нөлөөлдөг зарим үндсэн дизайн сорилтуудыг шинжилгээ хийдэг. Үүнээс хоёр хэлний нэрлэгдсэн бизнесийн өгөгдлийн сангууд, олон хэлний зохиолын арга замыг шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бид уламжлалтай жингийн төгсгөл орнуудын хөрөнгө оруулагч (WFST) хоёр мэдрэлийн ойлголтын эсрэг шийдвэрлэх үйл ажиллагааг үнэлэх болно: кодчууд-шийдвэрлэх дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний арга болон саяхан, дахин дахин да Хоёр хэлний нэрлэгдсэн бизнесийн эргүүлэлтийн өгөгдлийн санг сайжруулахын тулд бид хувийн нэр хоёр хэлний үгийг Англи, Хибри, Араб, Япон Катаканаас хадгалагдсан Wikidata-ээс гаргасан үгийг эргүүлдэг. Бидний код, үлгэр зохиолууд олон нийтэд хангалттай.', 'pl': 'Analizujemy niektóre z podstawowych wyzwań projektowych, które mają wpływ na rozwój wielojęzycznego, najnowocześniejszego systemu transliteracji nazwanych jednostek, w tym kurację dwujęzycznych zbiorów danych nazwanych jednostek i ocenę wielu metod transliteracji. Oceniamy empirycznie zadanie transliteracyjne przy użyciu tradycyjnego ważonego przetwornika stanu skończonego (WFST) na podstawie dwóch podejść neuronowych: metody recidivującej sieci neuronowej kodera-dekodera oraz najnowszej, niesekwencyjnej metody Transformera. Aby poprawić dostępność dwujęzycznych zestawów danych transliteracji nazwanych jednostek, udostępniamy dwujęzyczne słowniki imion osobistych wydobyte z Wikidanych dla angielskiego na rosyjski, hebrajski, arabski i japoński Katakana. Nasz kod i słowniki są publicznie dostępne.', 'si': 'අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා මූලික විද්\u200dයාපනය අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය වලින් සමහර විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා මුළු භාෂාත්මක ස්ථානයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්න අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසිකයෙන් පාරමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසික විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා පාරමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසිකය (WFST) ප්\u200dරයෝජනය දෙකක් විර දුවන් භාෂාවක් කියලා නම් අයිතිකාරය ගොනුවන් දත්ත සේට් වලට පුළුවන් වෙන්න, අපි පුළුවන් නම දුවන් භාෂාවක් භාෂාවක් වලින්  අපේ කෝඩ් සහ භාකිතාවක් ලොකු සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පිළිගන්න පුළුවන්.', 'ro': 'Analizăm unele dintre provocările fundamentale de proiectare care afectează dezvoltarea unui sistem multilingv de transliterare a entităților denumite, inclusiv curățarea seturilor de date bilingve denumite și evaluarea mai multor metode de transliterare. Evaluăm empiric sarcina de transliterare utilizând abordarea tradițională ponderată a transductorului de stare finită (WFST) în raport cu două abordări neurale: metoda rețelei neurale recurente encoder-decoder și metoda recentă, non-secvențială Transformer. Pentru a îmbunătăți disponibilitatea seturilor de date bilingve privind transliterarea entităților denumite, lansăm dicționare bilingve extrase din Wikidata pentru limba engleză în rusă, ebraică, arabă și japoneză Katakana. Codul și dicționarele noastre sunt disponibile public.', 'no': 'Vi analyserer nokre av dei grunnleggjande utfordringane som påvirkar utviklinga av eit multispråk-tilstand til kunstsystemet med namnet entitetstransliterasjon, inkludert koring av datasett med eit bilinguelt namn på entitet og evaluering av fleire transliterasjonsmetodar. Vi er empirisk evaluering av transliterasjonsoppgåva med den tradisjonelle vekte avslutta tilstand- transduktoren (WFST) mot to neuraltilnærmingar: rekurserande neuralnettverksmetoden for koderingsdekoder- dekoder og den siste, ikkje- sekvensiske transformeringsmetoden. For å forbetra tilgjengeligheten av datasett for gjennomsett av bilinguelt namn på einingar, så slettar vi personleg namn på bilinguelt ordbokstavar minert frå Wikidata for engelsk til russisk, hebresisk, arabisk og japansk Katakana. Koden og ordbokar våre er tilgjengelege offentlig.', 'sr': 'Analiziramo neke od osnovnih dizajnskih izazova koji utiču na razvoj multijezičkog stanja umjetnosti po imenu entitetskog transliteracijskog sistema, uključujući uključujući korištenje bilijezičkih podataka podataka podataka imena entiteta i procjenu višestrukih metoda transliteracije. Mi empirički procjenjujemo transliteracijski zadatak koristeći tradicionalni težinski ograničeni državni prevoditelj (WFST) pristup protiv dva neuralnog pristupa: rekonstruirani metod neuralne mreže kodera-dekodera i nedavni, ne-sekvencijalni metod transformera. Da bismo poboljšali dostupnost dvojezičkih podataka o transliteraciji podataka entiteta, oslobodili smo osobne ime dvojezičke rečnike minerane iz Wikidata za engleski na ruski, hebrejski, arapski i japanski Katakana. Naši kod i rečnici su javno dostupni.', 'so': 'Analyaalnaa qaar ka mid ah dhibaatooyinka asalka ah oo saameyn ku yeelanaya koritaanka xaaladda farshaxanka kala duduwan ee lagu magacaabay macluumaadka iskuulka, kuwaas oo ku qoran sawirida labada luqadood oo magaceeda la yidhaahdo macluumaadka macluumaadka iyo qiimeynta qaabab kala duduwan. Waxaynu si fiican ugu qiimeynaynaa shuqulka turjumista, isticmaalka qaababka caadiga ah oo wadista shilalka (WFST) oo ka gees ah labada qaab neurada ah: koodkoder-decoder oo ku soo socda qaababka neurada iyo qaabkii ugu dambeeyey ee aan soo socon. Si loo hagaajiyo helitaanka labada luuqadood ee lagu magacaabay macluumaadka warqada, waxaynu u dirnaa macluumaadka qofka ah oo laga qoray Wikidata afka Ingiriis-Ruush, Cibraaniya, Carabi iyo Jabanees Katakana. Qoidaheenna iyo luqadahayagu waxay si bayaan ah u helaan.', 'sv': 'Vi analyserar några av de grundläggande designutmaningarna som påverkar utvecklingen av ett flerspråkigt state-of-the-art namngivna entitetstransliterationssystem, inklusive kuratering tvåspråkiga namngivna entitetsdataset och utvärdering av flera transliterationsmetoder. Vi utvärderar empiriskt transliterationsuppgiften med hjälp av den traditionella metoden WFST (viktad finite state transducer) mot två neurala tillvägagångssätt: encoder-dekoder recidiverande neurala nätverksmetoden och den senaste, icke-sekventiella Transformermetoden. För att förbättra tillgängligheten av tvåspråkiga namngivna entitetstransliterationsdatauppsättningar, släpper vi tvåspråkiga ordböcker för personligt namn som utvinns från Wikidata för engelska till ryska, hebreiska, arabiska och japanska katakana. Vår kod och ordböcker är allmänt tillgängliga.', 'ta': 'நாம் முதல் வடிவமைப்பு சவால்பங்களை ஆராய்ந்து கொள்கிறோம். பல மொழி நிலையின் உருவாக்கத்தை பாதிக்கும் பொருள் மாற்று அமைப்பில், பெயரிடப்பட்ட இரு மொழியின்  நாம் பாரம்பிய நிலை மாற்றுநர்களை பயன்படுத்தி மாற்றும் செயலை முறையாக மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் இரண்டு புதிய முறைமையான முறைமைகளை எதிர்பார்க்கும்: குறியீட்டு குறியீட விகிட்டாவிலிருந்து ஆங்கிலத்தில் இரு மொழி பெயர் மாற்றும் தகவல் தளங்களை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு, நாம் தனிப்பட்ட பெயர் இரு மொழி அகராதிகளை விட்டு ஆங் எங்கள் குறியீடு மற்றும் அகராதிகள் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'ہم نے بنیادی طراحی چالوں میں سے بعض کو تحقیق کر لیا ہے جو ایک متعدد زبان کی حالت-of-the-art کی توسعہ پر تأثیر دیتے ہیں جن کے نام میں ایک متعدد زبان کی ٹرانسلیٹ سیستم ہے، اور ایک دوسری زبان کے نام میں entity datasets اور متعدد ٹرانسلیٹ سیٹوں کی ار ہم ترنس لیٹریشن ٹاکس کو ترنس لیٹریشن ٹاکس (WFST) کے مطابق دو نیورال طریقے کے خلاف ترنس لیٹریشن ٹاکس (ترنس لیٹریشن ٹاکس) طریقے کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مقرر کر رہے ہیں: Encoder-decoder recurrent neural network method ہم نے ویکیڈاٹ سے انگلیسی، یہودی, عربی اور جاپانی کاکاٹکانا کے لئے ویکیڈاٹ کے ذریعہ دوبلی زبان کا نام ترنسلیٹ ڈاٹ سٹ کے موجودہ موجودہ ہونے کے لئے۔ ہمارے کڈ اور لکھائی ظاہر طور پر موجود ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz bir necha asosiy dizayning qiymatlarini analyzmaymiz, bu bir necha tildagi shaxsiy narsalarning taʼminotlarini o'zgartirish tizimini o'zgartiradi, va bir necha ta'sirlik usullarni qiymatish mumkin. Biz tarjima qiluvchi vazifani o'qiymatimiz oddiy qiymati bilan bir neyron usullarning (WFST) yordamida qiymatimiz: koddekoder davom etilgan tarmoq metodi va yangi keyingi non-keyingi tarjima usuli. Name Our code and dictionaries are publicly available.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi phân tích một số thử thách thiết kế cơ bản tác động tới việc phát triển một hệ thống chuyển hóa dạng thực thể tên là đa dạng. bao gồm việc phục hồi các bộ dữ liệu hai diện tên thực thể và đánh giá các phương pháp chuyển chữ. Chúng tôi có kinh nghiệm đánh giá các nhiệm vụ chuyển dạng bằng cách sử dụng hệ thống chuyển giới xác minh hàng loạt truyền liên tục dựa trên hai phương pháp thần kinh: phương pháp mã hóa giải mã mạng thần kinh thường xuyên và phương pháp chuyển biến gen gần đây. Để nâng cao khả năng cung cấp dữ liệu chuyển dạng thực thể có tên hai thứ, chúng tôi công bố các từ điển hình, được khai thác từ WikiLdata for English to Russian, Hebrew, Ả Rập, and Japanese Katakana. Mật mã và từ điển của chúng tôi công khai.', 'hr': 'Analiziramo neke od temeljnih dizajnskih izazova koji utječu na razvoj multijezičkog stanja umjetnosti po imenu transliteracijskog sustava entiteta, uključujući uključujući uključivanje dvojezičkih podataka podataka podataka imena entiteta i procjenu višestrukih metoda transliteracije. Mi empirički procjenjujemo transliteracijski zadatak koristeći tradicionalni težinski ograničeni pristup konačnog državnog prevoditelja (WFST) protiv dva neuralnog pristupa: rekonstruirani metod neuralne mreže kodera-dekodera i nedavni, neosekvencijalni metod transformera. Da bismo poboljšali dostupnost dvojezičkih podataka o transliteraciji entiteta, oslobodili bismo osobne ime dvojezičke riječi minerane iz Wikidata za engleski na ruski, hebrejski, arapski i japanski Katakana. Naši kod i riječi su javno dostupni.', 'bg': 'Анализираме някои от фундаменталните дизайнерски предизвикателства, които оказват влияние върху развитието на многоезична система за транслитерация на имена на обекти, включително куриране на двуезични набори от данни за имена на обекти и оценка на множество методи за транслитерация. Емпирично оценяваме задачата за транслитерация, използвайки традиционния подход за претеглено крайно състояние (WFST) срещу два невронни подхода: метода на рецидивиращата невронна мрежа на кодер-декодер и скорошния метод на несеквения трансформатор. За да подобрим наличността на двуезични набори от данни за транслитерация на обекти, ние публикуваме двуезични речници за лични имена, извлечени от Уикиданни за английски на руски, иврит, арабски и японски катакана. Нашият код и речници са публично достъпни.', 'da': 'Vi analyserer nogle af de grundlæggende designudfordringer, der påvirker udviklingen af et flersproget state-of-the-art navngivet entity transliteration system, herunder kuratering tosproget navngivet entity datasæt og evaluering af flere transliterationsmetoder. Vi evaluerer empirisk transliterationsopgaven ved hjælp af den traditionelle vægtede finite state transducer (WFST) tilgang mod to neurale tilgange: encoder-dekoder tilbagevendende neurale netværk metode og den seneste, ikke-sekventielle Transformer metode. For at forbedre tilgængeligheden af tosprogede navngivne enhedstransliterationsdatasæt frigiver vi tosprogede personlige navne tosprogede ordbøger udvundet fra Wikidata til engelsk til russisk, hebraisk, arabisk og japansk katakana. Vores kode og ordbøger er offentligt tilgængelige.', 'nl': 'We analyseren enkele van de fundamentele ontwerpuitdagingen die van invloed zijn op de ontwikkeling van een meertalig state-of-the-art named entity transliteration systeem, inclusief het cureren van tweetalige named entity datasets en het evalueren van meerdere transliteratiemethoden. We evalueren de transliteratietaak empirisch met behulp van de traditionele gewogen finite state transducer (WFST) benadering tegen twee neurale benaderingen: de encoder-decoder recidivierende neurale netwerkmethode en de recente, niet-sequentiële Transformer methode. Om de beschikbaarheid van tweetalige transliteratiedatasets voor naamloze entiteiten te verbeteren, geven we tweetalige woordenboeken van persoonlijke namen uit Wikidata voor Engels naar Russisch, Hebreeuws, Arabisch en Japans Katakana. Onze code en woordenboeken zijn openbaar beschikbaar.', 'ko': '우리는 다중 언어의 가장 선진적인 명명 실체 음역 시스템 개발에 영향을 미치는 몇 가지 기본적인 디자인 도전을 분석했다. 이는 이중 언어 명명 실체 데이터 집합을 관리하고 다양한 음역 방법을 평가하는 것을 포함한다.우리는 전통적인 가중 유한 상태 센서(WFST) 방법과 두 가지 신경 방법을 사용하여 음역 작업에 대해 실증 평가를 실시했다. 인코더-디코더 귀속 신경 네트워크 방법과 최근의 비순서 변환기 방법이다.이중 언어 명명 실체 음역 데이터 집합의 가용성을 높이기 위해 우리는 위키 데이터에서 발굴한 영어, 러시아어, 히브리어, 아랍어와 일본어 영화 가명의 인명 이중 언어 사전을 발표했다.우리의 코드와 사전은 공개된 것이다.', 'de': 'Wir analysieren einige der grundlegenden Design-Herausforderungen, die die Entwicklung eines mehrsprachigen State-of-the-Art Named Entity Transliteration Systems beeinflussen, einschließlich der Kuratierung zweisprachiger Named Entity Datasets und der Bewertung mehrerer Transliterationsmethoden. Wir evaluieren die Transliterationsaufgabe empirisch mit dem traditionellen gewichteten Finite State Transducer (WFST)-Ansatz gegen zwei neuronale Ansätze: die Encoder-Decoder-Recidivierungsmethode und die neuere, nicht-sequenzielle Transformer-Methode. Um die Verfügbarkeit zweisprachiger Transliterationsdatensätze für benannte Entitäten zu verbessern, veröffentlichen wir zweisprachige Wörterbücher für persönliche Namen, die aus Wikidata für Englisch, Hebräisch, Arabisch und Japanisch Katakana gewonnen wurden. Unser Code und unsere Wörterbücher sind öffentlich zugänglich.', 'id': 'Kami menganalisis beberapa tantangan desain dasar yang mempengaruhi perkembangan sistem transliterasi entitas bernama banyak bahasa, termasuk merawat set data entitas bernama dua bahasa dan evaluasi metode transliterasi berbilang. Kami secara empirik mengevaluasi tugas transliterasi menggunakan pendekatan tradisional pemindai keadaan terbatas (WFST) terhadap dua pendekatan saraf: metode jaringan saraf rikorren koder-dekoder dan metode Transformer yang baru-baru ini, bukan sekwensial. In order to improve availability of bilingual named entity transliteration datasets, we release personal name bilingual dictionaries mined from Wikidata for English to Russian, Hebrew, Arabic, and Japanese Katakana.  Kode dan kamus kami tersedia publik.', 'af': "Ons analiseer sommige van die fundamentele ontwerp uitdagings wat die ontwikkeling van 'n multilinglike staat van-die-kunsten genaamde entiteit-transliterasie stelsel invloek, insluitend die kunstening van bilinguele genaamde entiteit-datastelle en evaluering van veelvuldige transliterasie-metodes. Ons evalueer die transliterasie taak met die tradisionele geweegte bepaalde staatsoordruker (WFST) toegang teen twee neuraltoegang: die enkoder- dekoder herhaalde neuralnetwerk metode en die onlangse, non- sequential Transformer metode. Om die beskikbaarheid van twee tale genaamde entiteite-transliterasie-datastel te verbeter, laat ons persoonlike naam twee tale woordeboekvorms uitgelei wat van Wikidata vir Engels tot Russies, Hebreese, Arabiese en Japanse Katakana mineer is. Ons kode en woordeboeke is openlik beskikbaar.", 'sw': 'Tunafahamu baadhi ya changamoto za msingi za ubunifu zinazoathiri maendeleo ya hali ya utafiti wa sanaa ya lugha mbalimbali inayoitwa mfumo wa usambazaji wa vifaa, ikiwa ni pamoja na kufuatilia seti za taarifa za lugha zinazoitwa lugha mbili na kutathmini njia mbalimbali za usambazaji. We empirically evaluate the transliteration task using the traditional weighted finite state transducer (WFST) approach against two neural approaches: the encoder-decoder recurrent neural network method and the recent, non-sequential Transformer method.  Ili kuboresha upatikanaji wa taarifa za utafiti wa lugha mbili zinazoitwa jina la maudhui, tunatoa lugha binafsi zinazotumiwa kutoka Wikidata kwa Kiingereza, KiHebrew, Kiarabu na Kijapani Katakana. Kodi zetu na dictionary zinapatikana hadharani.', 'fa': 'ما برخی از چالش\u200cهای بنیادی طراحی را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم که تأثیر توسعه یک سیستم ترجمه\u200cسازی شرکت\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cهای هنر را تأثیر می\u200cدهند، شامل تأثیر مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای entity\u200cهای دو زبان نامیده شده و ارزیابی از روش\u200c ما با استفاده از دستور ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی وضعیت محدودیت سنتی (WFST) بر خلاف دو دستور عصبی ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم: روش شبکه عصبی تکرار\u200cکننده\u200cی کودکور-دکور\u200cکننده\u200cی شبکه عصبی و روش\u200cهای اخیر، ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی غیرنظیر. برای اینکه دسترسی داده\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cسازی یک entity به عنوان دو زبان، نام شخصی را از ویکیداده\u200cهای معدنی برای انگلیسی به روسی، هیبروی، عربی و ژاپنی کاتاکانا آزاد کنیم. رمز و لغت\u200cنامه\u200cهای ما به طور عمومی در دسترس هستند.', 'tr': 'Biz esasy tasarlama kynçylyklarynyň käbirlerini çözdirip, sanat taýýarlanmasy sistemasyna etjek bir multi dil çözümleme sistemasyny çözdirip, olaryň adynda iki dil barlag düzümlerini çözdirip we çoklu terjime edilme yöntemlerini çözdirip barýarys. Biz däpli çykyş taýýarlama täblisini däpli çykyş şeklinde terjime edilen beýik taýýarlama täblisini (WFST) golaýyndan çykarýarys: iň ködleme-dekoderlemek täblisini we soňky, iň-soňky terjime etmek täblisini ullanýarys. Iňlisçe, iňlisçe, arapça we japonça Katakana üçin iki dil terjime etmek üçin elinden gelenler bar. Biziň ködlerimiz we sözlerimiz publika mejbur.', 'sq': 'Ne analizojmë disa nga sfidat themelore të dizajnit që ndikojnë në zhvillimin e një sistemi të transliteracionit të njësisë me emër shumëgjuhës, duke përfshirë kurimin e grupeve të dhënash të njësisë me emër dy gjuhësh dhe vlerësimin e metodave të shumëgjuhësisë transliteracioni. Ne empirikisht vlerësojmë detyrën e transliteracionit duke përdorur metodën tradicionale të peshuar të transducuesit të shtetit të kufizuar (WFST) kundër dy metodave nervore: metodën e koduesit-dekoderit të rrjetit neural të përsëritur dhe metodën e fundit të Transformuesit jo-sekuencues. Për të përmirësuar disponueshmërinë e të dhënave transliterative të njësisë me emër dy gjuhësh, ne lëshojmë fjalorë dy gjuhësh me emër personal të minave nga Wikidata për anglisht në katakana ruse, hebre, arabe dhe japoneze. Kodi ynë dhe fjalorët tonë janë në dispozicion publik.', 'bn': 'আমরা কিছু মৌলিক ডিজাইন চ্যালেঞ্জ বিশ্লেষণ করি যা একটি বহুভাষী রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের প্রভাব ফেলে দেয়, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে দুই ভাষার নামের বৈশিষ্ট্যের তথ্য সং আমরা ঐতিহ্যবাহী ভারী দেশের ট্রান্সট্রান্সপ্লাইসার ব্যবহার করে ট্রান্সলিটারেশন কাজের ব্যাপারে মূল্যায়ন করি দুটি নিউরেল উপায়ের বিরুদ্ধে: এনকোডার-ডেকোডার পু উইকিদাতা থেকে ইংরেজি থেকে রুশ, হিব্রু, আরবী এবং জাপানী কাতানার জন্য ব্যক্তিগত ভাষার ভাষায় ব্যক্তিগত নাম দুই ভাষার সংবাদপত্র মুক্তি দেয়া আমাদের কোড এবং অভিধান প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'az': 'Biz bir √ßoxlu dil-o-sanatńĪn istifad…ô edilm…ôsini t…ôsir ed…ôn …ôsas dizayn √ß…ôtinlikl…ôrind…ôn b…ôzisini analiz edirik. ńįki n√∂ral t…ôr…ôfl…ôrin…ô qarŇüńĪ t…ôkrarlama iŇül…ôri t…ôkrarlama iŇül…ôri il…ô t…ôkrarlama iŇül…ôrini t…ôkrarlayńĪrńĪq: koder-dekoder tekrarlńĪ n√∂ral ańü metodu v…ô yeni, sonsuz transformer metodu il…ô t…ôkrarlayńĪrńĪq. ńįki dil t…ôkrarlama veril…ônl…ôrin faydalanmasńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn, ńįngilizd…ôn Rus, ńįbrahim, Arap√ßa v…ô Japon Katakana √ľ√ß√ľn Wikidata t…ôkrarlanan iki dil s√∂zl…ôri t…ôkrarlayńĪrńĪq. Kodumuz v…ô s√∂zl…ôrimiz a√ßńĪq-aŇükar m√∂vcuddur.', 'hy': "Մենք վերլուծում ենք որոշ հիմնական դիզայնի մարտահրավերներ, որոնք ազդում են բազմալեզու բարձրագույն էակների փոխգրման համակարգի զարգացման վրա, ներառյալ երկլեզու էակների տվյալների համակարգի վերահսկումը և բազմալեզու փոխգրման մեթոդների գնահատումը: Մենք էմպիրիկ կերպ գնահատում ենք տրանսգրականության առաջադրանքը, օգտագործելով ավանդական կենտրոնացված սահմանափակ վիճակի տրանսֆորմացիոն մոտեցումը' հակառակ երկու նյարդային մոտեցումների' կոդերի-կոդերի կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի մեթոդի և վերջին, ոչ Որպեսզի բարելավենք երկլեզու անհատականության տրանսգրականության տվյալների համակարգերի հասանելիությունը, մենք հրապարակում ենք անհատական անվանումների երկլեզու բառարաններ, որոնք հանվում են Վիքիդատայից անգլերեն, ռուսերեն, եբրայի, արաբերեն և ճապոնական Կատ Մեր կոդը և բառարանները հանրային հասանելի են:", 'am': 'አካባቢ የቋንቋ አካባቢ ዳታዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሁለተኛው የደዌብ ደረጃዎች ላይ የሚቃወሙትን (WFST) የሚቃወሙትን ትርጓሜ በመጠቀም እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ የencoder-decoder የሚቀጥለውን የደዌብ መረብ ዘዴ እና የቀድሞው ያልተቃውሞ ተርሚናል፡፡ በሁለቱ ቋንቋዎች የተባለውን አካባቢነት ትርጉም ማድረግ ለማድረግ፣ ከWikidata ለኢንዝርዝርኛ፣ ዕብራዊ፣ ዐረብኛ እና የጃፓን ቃታና የሁለት ቋንቋዎች የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎችን እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የኮድ እና መዝገበኛ ግልፅ ነው፡፡', 'ca': "We analyze some of the fundamental design challenges that impact the development of a multilingual state-of-the-art named entity transliteration system, including curating bilingual named entity datasets and evaluation of multiple transliteration methods.  Evaluam empíricament la tasca de transliteració utilitzant l'enfocament tradicional de transdutor d'estat finit ponderat (WFST) en comparació amb dos enfocaments neuronals: el mètode recurrent de xarxa neuronal codificador-decodificador i el mètode recent de Transformació no seqüencial. Per millorar la disponibilitat de conjunts de dades de transliteració bilingües, alliberam diccionaris bilingües de nom personal minerats de Wikidata per anglès a russo, hebreu, àrab i japonès Katakana. Our code and dictionaries are publicly available.", 'bs': 'Analiziramo neke od osnovnih dizajnskih izazova koji utiču na razvoj multijezičkog stanja umjetnosti po imenu entitetskog transliteracije, uključujući uključujući korištenje dvojezičkih podataka podataka imena entiteta i procjenu višestrukih metoda transliteracije. Mi empirički procjenjujemo transliteracijski zadatak koristeći tradicionalni težinski ograničeni pristup državnog prevoditelja (WFST) protiv dva neuralnog pristupa: rekonstruirani metod neuralne mreže kodera-dekodera i nedavni, ne-sekvencijalni metod transformera. Da bismo poboljšali dostupnost dvojezičkih podataka o transliteraciji entiteta, oslobodili bismo osobne ime dvojezičke riječi minerane iz Wikidata za engleski na ruski, hebrejski, arapski i japanski Katakana. Naši kod i rečnici su javno dostupni.', 'cs': 'Analyzujeme některé ze základních návrhových výzev, které ovlivňují vývoj vícejazyčného nejmodernějšího transliteračního systému pojmenovaných entit, včetně kurace dvojjazyčných datových sad jmenovaných entit a vyhodnocení více transliteračních metod. Empiricky hodnotíme transliterační úlohu pomocí tradičního přístupu váženého převodníku konečného stavu (WFST) na základě dvou neuronových přístupů: metody recidivní neuronové sítě kodéru-dekodéru a nedávné metody nesekvenčního transformátoru. Za účelem zlepšení dostupnosti dvojjazyčných datových sad transliterace pojmenovaných entit vydáváme dvojjazyčné slovníky osobních jmen vytěžené z Wikidat pro angličtinu do ruštiny, hebrejštiny, arabštiny a japonštiny Katakana. Náš kód a slovníky jsou veřejně dostupné.', 'et': 'Analüüsime mõningaid põhilisi disainiprobleeme, mis mõjutavad mitmekeelse state-of-the-art nimega olemi transliteratsioonisüsteemi arengut, sealhulgas kakskeelsete nimega olemi andmekogumite kureerimist ja mitme transliteratsiooni meetodi hindamist. Me hindame empiiriliselt transliteratsiooni ülesannet, kasutades traditsioonilist kaalutud piiritletud oleku anduri (WFST) lähenemisviisi kahe närvilähenemise vastu: kodeerija-dekooder korduva närvivõrgu meetod ja hiljutine mitteseotud Transformeri meetod. Selleks et parandada kaks keelt nimetatud olemi transliteratsiooni andmekogumite kättesaadavust, avaldame Wikiandmetest kaevandatud isiklike nimede kaks keelt vene, heebrea, araabia ja jaapani katakana jaoks. Meie kood ja sõnastikud on avalikult kättesaadavad.', 'fi': 'Analysoimme joitakin keskeisistä suunnitteluhaasteista, jotka vaikuttavat monikielisen state-of-the-art nimettyjen entiteettien transliterointijärjestelmän kehittämiseen, mukaan lukien kaksikielisten nimettyjen entiteettiaineistojen kuratointi ja useiden transliterointimenetelmien arviointi. Arvioimme empiirisesti transliteraatiotehtävää perinteisellä painotetulla finite state transducer (WFST) -menetelmällä kahta neuromenetelmää vastaan: encoder-decoder recorrente neural network -menetelmää ja tuoretta, ei-sekvenssiaalista Transformer-menetelmää. Parantaaksemme kaksikielisten nimettyjen entiteettitransliteraatiotietoaineistojen saatavuutta julkaisemme Wikidatasta louhittuja kaksikielisiä henkilönimisanakirjoja englanniksi, hepreaksi, arabiaksi ja japaniksi katakanaksi. Koodimme ja sanakirjat ovat julkisesti saatavilla.', 'he': 'אנו מנתחים חלק מאתגרי העיצוב הבסיסיים שמשפיעים על התפתחות של מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מערכת מע אנו מעריכים אמפירית את משימה הטרנסליטרציה באמצעות גישה מסורתית של מעביר המדינה הגבוהה (WFST) נגד שתי גישות עצביות: שיטת רשת עצבית חוזרת של קודד-קודד והשיטה האחרונה, לא רצופית של מעביר. על מנת לשפר את זמינות קבוצת נתונים של ישויות בשם שתיים לשונים, אנחנו משחררים שמילונים שתיים לשונים אישיים מוכרים בוויקידאטה לאנגלית לרוסית, היברית, ערבית וקאטקנה היפנית. הקוד והמילונים שלנו זמינים לציבור.', 'sk': 'Analiziramo nekatere temeljne izzive oblikovanja, ki vplivajo na razvoj večjezičnega najsodobnejšega sistema transliteracije imenovanih entitet, vključno s kuracijo dvojezičnih naborov podatkov imenovanih entitet in vrednotenjem več metod transliteracije. Empirično ocenjujemo nalogo transliteracije z uporabo tradicionalnega pristopa tehtanega končnega stanja pretvornika (WFST) glede na dva nevralna pristopa: metodo enkodirnika-dekodirnika ponovnega živčnega omrežja in metodo nezaporednega transformatorja. Da bi izboljšali razpoložljivost dvojezičnih naborov podatkov o transliteraciji entitet, izdajamo dvojezične slovarje osebnih imen iz Wikipodatkov za angleščino v ruščino, hebrejščino, arabščino in japonsko katakana. Naša koda in slovarji so javno dostopni.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé énalitis pipilihan karo nggawe sistem sing dibenalke basan sing nguasai gambar nggawe sistem multilanggar state-of-the-arts seneng pisan kelangan kelangan dhéwé, gambar dhéwé kuwi nggawe dataset karo akeh nyebuturan sistem sing berarti cara-nyebuturan sing berarti dadi nggawe dataset Awak dhéwé empirhik nggunian caratar nggawe basan seneng pisan caratar caratar nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe gerakan durum soko pawaran Neral: Awak dhéwé ngéwé éntuk kanggo ngerasakno éntuk dhéwé éntuk karo pergambar ingkang sampeyan ingkang Awak dhéwé kode lan diktualisar kang publik gawe', 'ha': "Tuna anarari da wasu na'ura masu bincike da za'a yi amfani da developen halin-mulki-na-na-sanar da aka sanar da abun-abun, kamar an ƙididdige tsarin da aka sune shi na biyu masu basĩri da kuma an ƙaddara hanyoyin misãlai masu yawa. Tuna ƙaddara aikin transliteratori game da the traditional state transmitter (WFstan) hanyoyi a kan hanyõyin biyu na neural: the encoder-coder re-regainin neural and the latest, non-sequencical Transformer way. To, dõmin ya improve tsarin da aka sanar da masu cikin harshen biyu wanda aka suna transliteratori masu nau'i, za'a saka dictionaries masu nau'i biyu masu ƙaranci daga Wikidata zuwa Ingiriya zuwa Ruushi, Yahũdiya, Larabci da kuma Katakana. Ana sami kodi da dictionary.", 'bo': 'We analyze some of the fundamental design challenges that impact the development of a multilingual state-of-the-art named entity transliteration system, including curating bilingual named entity datasets and evaluation of multiple transliteration methods. We empirically evaluate the transliteration task using the traditional weighted finite state transducer (WFST) approach against two neural approaches: the encoder-decoder recurrent neural network method and the recent, non-sequential Transformer method. To improve the availability of bilingual named entity transliteration datasets, we release personal name bilingual dictionaries mined from Wikidata for English to Russian, Hebrew, Arabic and Japanese Katakana. ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་དང་ཐུམ་གྲངས་མང་ཆེ་སྤྱིར་ཐུབ་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Systematic Study of Long Tail Phenomena in Entity Linking', 'ar': 'دراسة منهجية لظواهر الذيل الطويل في ربط الكيانات', 'fr': "Étude systématique des phénomènes de longue traîne dans la liaison d'entités", 'pt': 'Estudo Sistemático de Fenômenos de Cauda Longa em Entity Linking', 'es': 'Estudio sistemático de fenómenos de cola larga en la vinculación de entidades', 'ja': 'エンティティリンクにおけるロングテール現象の体系的研究', 'zh': '实体链接中长尾之统', 'hi': 'एंटिटी लिंकिंग में लंबी पूंछ की घटनाओं का व्यवस्थित अध्ययन', 'ru': 'Систематическое Изучение Явлений Длинного Хвоста в Связывании Сущности', 'ga': 'Staidéar Córasach ar Fhéiniméin Eireaball Fada i Nascáil Aonáin', 'ka': 'სისტემატიური განსხვავება განსხვავებულ ფანომის სისტემატიკური განსხვავება', 'el': 'Συστηματική Μελέτη φαινομένων μακριάς ουράς στη σύνδεση οντοτήτων', 'hu': 'Hosszú farok jelenségeinek szisztematikus vizsgálata az entitások összekapcsolásában', 'it': 'Studio sistematico dei fenomeni di coda lunga nel collegamento di entità', 'kk': 'Орнатылық сілтемелердегі ұзындық тайп феноманың систематикалық зерттеу', 'ms': 'kajian sistemik bagi fenomena akhir panjang dalam Pautan Entiti', 'mk': 'Systematic Study of Long Tail Phenomena in Entity Linking', 'lt': 'Sisteminis ilgojo galo fenomenų, susijusių su subjektais, tyrimas', 'mn': 'Объектын холбогдолтын урт хугацааны феномын систематикийн судалгаа', 'ml': 'എന്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങിങ്ങില്\u200d നീണ്ട ട ടേയില്\u200d ഫീനോമെന്ന സിസ്റ്റീമാറ്റിക് പഠനം', 'mt': 'Studju Sistematiku ta’ Fenomeni ta’ Deni Twil f’Konnessjoni ma’ Entitajiet', 'pl': 'Systematyczne badanie zjawisk długiego ogona w łączeniu podmiotów', 'ro': 'Studiul sistematic al fenomenelor coadă lungă în legătura de entități', 'si': 'පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය ගැන ලොකු ටේල් ෆෙනමෝනා', 'no': 'Sistematisk studie av lang tail-fenomen i lenking av einingar', 'sr': 'Sistemalno istraživanje dugotrajne fenomene u vezi entiteta', 'ur': 'انٹیٹی لینک میں لانگ ٹیل فینومن کی سیستماتیک تحقیق', 'so': 'Systematic Study of Long Tail Phenomena in Entity Linking', 'sv': 'Systematisk studie av långsvansfenomen i entity linking', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு இணைப்பில் நீண்ட ட டேய் பொதியின் முறைமையான ஆய்வு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu hệ thống về Biểu tượng Đuôi Long trong liên minh', 'hr': 'Sistemično ispitivanje dugotrajne fenomene u vezi entiteta', 'bg': 'Систематично изследване на феномените на дългата опашка в свързването на съществата', 'nl': 'Systematische studie van Long Tail fenomenen in Entity Linking', 'da': 'Systematisk undersøgelse af langhalefænomener i entity linking', 'ko': '실체 연결 중의 긴 꼬리 현상에 대한 체계적 연구', 'id': 'Studi Sistematik Fenomena Akhir Panjang dalam Hubungan Entitas', 'de': 'Systematische Untersuchung von Long Tail Phänomenen in Entity Linking', 'fa': 'مطالعه سیستماتیک فیونوم طولانی در ارتباط شرکت', 'tr': 'Ullakan ýerleşdirim fenomenynyň sistemasyzlyk öňünde', 'af': 'Sistematiese studie van Lang Tail Fenomena in Entity Linking', 'sq': 'Studimi sistematik i fenomenave të këmbës së gjatë në lidhjen e njësisë', 'am': 'Systematic Study of Long Tail Phenomena in Entity Linking', 'hy': 'Սիտեմատիկ ուսումնասիրությունը երկար ճակատային ֆենոմենների հետ կապված կազմակերպություններում', 'az': 'Entity Linking', 'bn': 'এন্টিটি লিংকিং-এ লম্বা তাইল ফিনোমেনার সিস্টেমিক গবেষণা', 'ca': 'Estudiament sistemàtic de fenomens de llarga raó en enllaç entre entitats', 'bs': 'Sistemalno istraživanje dugotrajne fenomene u vezi entiteta', 'cs': 'Systematické studium fenoménů s dlouhým ocasem v propojení entit', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa mfumo wa Tail wa Long Tail katika Kuunganisha Ujumbe', 'fi': 'Pitkähäntäilmiöiden systemaattinen tutkimus entiteetin linkittämisessä', 'et': 'Piksasaba nähtuste süstemaatiline uuring üksuste seostamisel', 'jv': "Sistem Iwaksi Trang Tamil 'Fenomena' ning Entit Linking", 'he': 'מחקר מערכתי של פנומנות צדדים ארוכים בקשר יחסים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Sistematična študija pojavov dolgega repa v povezovanju entitet', 'bo': 'City in Entity Linking, United States'}
{'en': 'State-of-the-art entity linkers achieve high accuracy scores with probabilistic methods. However, these scores should be considered in relation to the properties of the datasets they are evaluated on. Until now, there has not been a systematic investigation of the properties of entity linking datasets and their impact on system performance. In this paper we report on a series of hypotheses regarding the long tail phenomena in entity linking datasets, their interaction, and their impact on system performance. Our systematic study of these hypotheses shows that evaluation datasets mainly capture head entities and only incidentally cover data from the tail, thus encouraging systems to overfit to popular / frequent and non-ambiguous cases. We find the most difficult cases of entity linking among the infrequent candidates of ambiguous forms. With our findings, we hope to inspire future designs of both entity linking systems and evaluation datasets. To support this goal, we provide a list of recommended actions for better inclusion of tail cases.', 'ar': 'تحقق روابط الكيانات الحديثة نتائج عالية الدقة باستخدام الطرق الاحتمالية. ومع ذلك ، يجب مراعاة هذه الدرجات فيما يتعلق بخصائص مجموعات البيانات التي يتم تقييمها عليها. حتى الآن ، لم يتم إجراء تحقيق منهجي في خصائص الكيان الذي يربط مجموعات البيانات وتأثيرها على أداء النظام. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بالإبلاغ عن سلسلة من الفرضيات المتعلقة بالظواهر الطويلة في الكيان الذي يربط مجموعات البيانات ، وتفاعلها ، وتأثيرها على أداء النظام. تُظهر دراستنا المنهجية لهذه الفرضيات أن مجموعات بيانات التقييم تلتقط بشكل أساسي الكيانات الرئيسية وتغطي فقط البيانات المصادفة من الذيل ، وبالتالي تشجع الأنظمة على الإفراط في التعامل مع الحالات الشائعة / المتكررة وغير الغامضة. نجد أصعب حالات ربط الكيان بين المرشحين غير المتكررين بأشكال غامضة. من خلال النتائج التي توصلنا إليها ، نأمل أن تكون مصدر إلهام للتصاميم المستقبلية لكل من أنظمة ربط الكيانات ومجموعات بيانات التقييم. لدعم هذا الهدف ، نقدم قائمة بالإجراءات الموصى بها لإدراج حالات الذيل بشكل أفضل.', 'es': 'Los enlazadores de entidades de última generación logran puntuaciones de alta precisión con métodos probabilísticos. Sin embargo, estas puntuaciones deben considerarse en relación con las propiedades de los conjuntos de datos en los que se evalúan. Hasta ahora, no se ha realizado una investigación sistemática de las propiedades de la entidad que vincula los conjuntos de datos y su impacto en el rendimiento del sistema. En este artículo informamos sobre una serie de hipótesis sobre los fenómenos de cola larga en los conjuntos de datos de enlace de entidades, su interacción y su impacto en el rendimiento del sistema. Nuestro estudio sistemático de estas hipótesis muestra que los conjuntos de datos de evaluación capturan principalmente las entidades principales y solo cubren incidentalmente los datos de la cola, lo que alienta a los sistemas a sobreajustarse a casos populares/frecuentes y no ambiguos. Encontramos los casos más difíciles de vinculación de entidades entre los candidatos poco frecuentes de formas ambiguas. Con nuestros hallazgos, esperamos inspirar futuros diseños de sistemas de vinculación de entidades y conjuntos de datos de evaluación. Para apoyar este objetivo, proporcionamos una lista de acciones recomendadas para una mejor inclusión de los casos de cola.', 'fr': "Les linkers d'entités de pointe obtiennent des scores de haute précision grâce à des méthodes probabilistes. Cependant, ces scores doivent être considérés en relation avec les propriétés des ensembles de données sur lesquels ils sont évalués. Jusqu'à présent, il n'y a pas eu d'enquête systématique sur les propriétés des ensembles de données de liaison d'entités et leur impact sur les performances du système. Dans cet article, nous présentons une série d'hypothèses concernant les phénomènes de longue traîne dans les ensembles de données de liaison d'entités, leur interaction et leur impact sur les performances du système. Notre étude systématique de ces hypothèses montre que les ensembles de données d'évaluation capturent principalement les entités de la tête et ne couvrent qu'incidemment les données de la queue, encourageant ainsi les systèmes à s'adapter aux cas populaires/fréquents et non ambigus. Nous trouvons les cas les plus difficiles de liaison d'entités parmi les candidats peu fréquents de formes ambiguës. Grâce à nos conclusions, nous espérons inspirer les futures conceptions de systèmes de liaison d'entités et d'ensembles de données d'évaluation. Pour atteindre cet objectif, nous fournissons une liste d'actions recommandées pour une meilleure inclusion des «\xa0tail cases\xa0».", 'pt': 'Os vinculadores de entidade de última geração alcançam pontuações de alta precisão com métodos probabilísticos. No entanto, essas pontuações devem ser consideradas em relação às propriedades dos conjuntos de dados em que são avaliadas. Até agora, não havia uma investigação sistemática das propriedades dos conjuntos de dados de vinculação de entidades e seu impacto no desempenho do sistema. Neste artigo, relatamos uma série de hipóteses sobre os fenômenos de cauda longa em conjuntos de dados de vinculação de entidades, sua interação e seu impacto no desempenho do sistema. Nosso estudo sistemático dessas hipóteses mostra que os conjuntos de dados de avaliação capturam principalmente entidades principais e apenas incidentalmente cobrem dados da cauda, incentivando os sistemas a se ajustarem a casos populares/frequentes e não ambíguos. Encontramos os casos mais difíceis de vinculação de entidades entre os candidatos infrequentes de formas ambíguas. Com nossas descobertas, esperamos inspirar projetos futuros de sistemas de vinculação de entidades e conjuntos de dados de avaliação. Para apoiar esse objetivo, fornecemos uma lista de ações recomendadas para uma melhor inclusão de casos finais.', 'ja': '最先端のエンティティリンカーは、確率的方法で高精度スコアを達成する。 ただし、これらのスコアは、それらが評価されるデータセットの特性に関連して考慮する必要があります。 これまで、データセットをリンクするエンティティの特性とシステムパフォーマンスへの影響について、体系的な調査は行われていません。 本稿では，データセットを結びつけるエンティティにおけるロングテール現象とその相互作用，システムパフォーマンスへの影響に関する一連の仮説について報告する。 これらの仮説の体系的な研究では、評価データセットは主に頭部エンティティを捕捉し、尾部からのデータのみを偶発的にカバーするため、システムが人気/頻度の高い曖昧でない症例に適合しすぎることを奨励することが示されています。 曖昧な形の稀な候補の中で、エンティティがリンクする最も困難なケースを発見しました。 私たちの調査結果は、エンティティリンクシステムと評価データセットの両方の将来の設計にインスピレーションを与えたいと考えています。 この目標をサポートするために、尾部症例をより適切に含めるための推奨されるアクションのリストを提供します。', 'hi': 'अत्याधुनिक इकाई लिंकर्स संभाव्य तरीकों के साथ उच्च सटीकता स्कोर प्राप्त करते हैं। हालांकि, इन स्कोर को उन डेटासेट के गुणों के संबंध में माना जाना चाहिए जिन पर उनका मूल्यांकन किया जाता है। अब तक, डेटासेट को जोड़ने वाली इकाई के गुणों और सिस्टम प्रदर्शन पर उनके प्रभाव की एक व्यवस्थित जांच नहीं हुई है। इस पेपर में हम डेटासेट को जोड़ने वाली इकाई में लंबी पूंछ की घटनाओं, उनकी बातचीत और सिस्टम प्रदर्शन पर उनके प्रभाव के बारे में परिकल्पनाओं की एक श्रृंखला पर रिपोर्ट करते हैं। इन परिकल्पनाओं के हमारे व्यवस्थित अध्ययन से पता चलता है कि मूल्यांकन डेटासेट मुख्य रूप से प्रमुख संस्थाओं को कैप्चर करते हैं और केवल संयोग से पूंछ से डेटा को कवर करते हैं, इस प्रकार सिस्टम को लोकप्रिय / लगातार और गैर-अस्पष्ट मामलों के लिए ओवरफिट करने के लिए प्रोत्साहित करते हैं। हम अस्पष्ट रूपों के अनियमित उम्मीदवारों के बीच जोड़ने वाली इकाई के सबसे कठिन मामलों को पाते हैं। हमारे निष्कर्षों के साथ, हम सिस्टम और मूल्यांकन डेटासेट को जोड़ने वाली इकाई दोनों के भविष्य के डिजाइनों को प्रेरित करने की उम्मीद करते हैं। इस लक्ष्य का समर्थन करने के लिए, हम पूंछ के मामलों को बेहतर ढंग से शामिल करने के लिए अनुशंसित कार्यों की एक सूची प्रदान करते हैं।', 'zh': '最先进之实体链接器以概率成高精度得分。 然宜量其数而虑之。 至目前为止,未有链接数集之性,及对系统性之系统调查。 本文,列于实体链接数集长尾,其相用对系统性之伪设也。 臣等考之,评数集首,偶覆尾数,以劝拟合流/频非模棱。 臣等见最难之体链接例为模糊之不常见候选者。 以吾所见,愿发实体链接系统评估数据集之来计。 为此一言,以包尾也。', 'ru': 'Современные линкеры сущностей достигают высоких показателей точности вероятностными методами. Тем не менее, эти баллы следует учитывать в отношении свойств наборов данных, на которых они оцениваются. До сих пор не проводилось систематического исследования свойств структур, связывающих наборы данных, и их влияния на производительность системы. В этой статье мы сообщаем о ряде гипотез относительно длинного хвоста явлений в сущности, связывающих наборы данных, их взаимодействия и их влияния на производительность системы. Наше систематическое исследование этих гипотез показывает, что наборы оценочных данных в основном захватывают головные объекты и только случайно охватывают данные из хвоста, тем самым поощряя системы к переосмыслению популярных/частых и нечетких случаев. Мы находим наиболее сложные случаи, когда сущность связывается между редкими кандидатами неоднозначных форм. С помощью наших выводов мы надеемся вдохновить будущие проекты как систем увязки подразделений, так и наборов данных оценки. Чтобы поддержать эту цель, мы предоставляем список рекомендованных действий для лучшего включения кейсов.', 'ga': 'Baineann nascóirí aonáin úrscothacha scóir ardchruinneas amach le modhanna dóchúlachta. Mar sin féin, ba cheart na scóir seo a chur san áireamh maidir le hairíonna na dtacar sonraí a ndéantar meastóireacht orthu. Go dtí seo, ní dhearnadh imscrúdú córasach ar airíonna na dtacar sonraí a nascann eintitis agus a dtionchar ar fheidhmíocht an chórais. Sa pháipéar seo tuairiscímid ar shraith hipitéisí maidir leis na feiniméin eireaball fada i dtacar sonraí a nascann aonáin, a n-idirghníomhaíocht, agus a dtionchar ar fheidhmíocht an chórais. Léiríonn ár staidéar córasach ar na hipitéisí seo go nglacann tacair shonraí meastóireachta príomhaonáin agus nach gclúdaíonn siad ach sonraí ón eireaball go teagmhasach, rud a spreagann córais chun an rófheisteas a dhéanamh ar chásanna coitianta/minic agus neamhdhébhríoch. Faighimid na cásanna is deacra maidir le nascadh eintiteas i measc na n-iarrthóirí neamhrialta foirmeacha débhríoch. Agus ár dtorthaí, tá súil againn dearaí amach anseo de chórais nasctha aonáin agus tacair sonraí meastóireachta a spreagadh. Chun tacú leis an sprioc seo, cuirimid liosta gníomhartha molta ar fáil chun cásanna eireaball a chuimsiú níos fearr.', 'ka': 'სახელსაწყოთა ინტერტიკის კონფიკრები უფრო მარტივი წარმოდგენა შესაბამისი მეტოვებით. მაგრამ, ეს მონაცემები უნდა იყოს მონაცემების შესახებ, რომლებიც მონაცემებული მონაცემების შესახებ. სანამ არ მოხდა სისტემატიური განსხვავება ინტერტიკის განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრება და მათი განსაზღვრება სისტემა მუშაობაზე. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ შეგვიძლია აღწეროთ რამდენიმე ჰიპოტეზების შესახებ სიგრძნელი ფენომენების შესახებ ინტერტიკის დაკავშირებაში, თავის ინტერქექცია და თავის შე ჩვენი სისტემატიკური ჰიპოტესების შესახებ ჩვენი სისტემატიკური შესწავლა, რომ განსაზღვრების მონაცემები უფრო მხოლოდ მივიღებენ თავისწავლის ელექტიტები და მხოლოდ განსაზღვრებული მონაცემები,  ჩვენ ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან რთული შემთხვევაში, რომელსაც უბრალოდ განსხვავებული ფორმების კონდიდენტები შორის ერთად ერთად დაკავშირება. ჩვენი შესაძლებლობით, ჩვენ გვემედით მომავალე განაზღვრების მომავალე განაზღვრების სისტემის და განაზღვრების მონაცემების შესახებ. ჱა ეა ოჲეეყპზთმ რაჱთ უვლ, ღვ ოპველჲზთმ ჟოთჟყკ ჟ ოპვპვკსმვნთ აკუთთ ჱა ოჲ-ეჲბპვ თნკლძჱთპანვ ნა ოყრკთრვ.', 'el': 'Οι υπερσύγχρονοι σύνδεσμοι οντοτήτων επιτυγχάνουν υψηλές βαθμολογίες ακρίβειας με πιθανολογικές μεθόδους. Ωστόσο, οι βαθμολογίες αυτές θα πρέπει να λαμβάνονται υπόψη σε σχέση με τις ιδιότητες των συνόλων δεδομένων στα οποία αξιολογούνται. Μέχρι τώρα, δεν υπήρξε συστηματική έρευνα των ιδιοτήτων της οντότητας που συνδέει σύνολα δεδομένων και των επιπτώσεών τους στην απόδοση του συστήματος. Στην παρούσα εργασία αναφέρουμε μια σειρά υποθέσεων σχετικά με τα φαινόμενα μακράς ουράς στην οντότητα που συνδέουν σύνολα δεδομένων, την αλληλεπίδρασή τους και τον αντίκτυπο τους στην απόδοση του συστήματος. Η συστηματική μελέτη αυτών των υποθέσεων δείχνει ότι τα σύνολα δεδομένων αξιολόγησης καταγράφουν κυρίως τις κεφαλικές οντότητες και καλύπτουν μόνο περιστασιακά δεδομένα από την ουρά, ενθαρρύνοντας έτσι τα συστήματα να υπερβάλλουν σε δημοφιλείς/συχνές και μη διφορούμενες περιπτώσεις. Βρίσκουμε τις πιο δύσκολες περιπτώσεις σύνδεσης οντοτήτων μεταξύ των σπάνιων υποψηφίων αμφιλεγόμενων μορφών. Με τα ευρήματά μας, ελπίζουμε να εμπνεύσουμε μελλοντικά σχέδια τόσο των οντοτήτων που συνδέουν συστήματα όσο και των συνόλων δεδομένων αξιολόγησης. Για να υποστηρίξουμε αυτόν τον στόχο, παρέχουμε έναν κατάλογο προτεινόμενων ενεργειών για καλύτερη συμπερίληψη των περιπτώσεων ουράς.', 'hu': 'A legkorszerűbb entitáskötők valószínűsíthető módszerekkel magas pontossági pontszámokat érnek el. Ezeket a pontszámokat azonban figyelembe kell venni azon adathalmazok tulajdonságaival összefüggésben, amelyeken értékelik őket. Eddig nem vizsgálták szisztematikusan az adatkészleteket összekapcsoló entitás tulajdonságait és azok rendszer teljesítményére gyakorolt hatását. Jelen tanulmányban számos hipotézisről beszámolunk az entitásokat összekapcsoló adatkészletek hosszú farkú jelenségeiről, interakciójukról és a rendszer teljesítményére gyakorolt hatásukról. Ezeknek a hipotéziseknek a szisztematikus tanulmányozása azt mutatja, hogy az értékelési adatok elsősorban a főentitásokat rögzítik, és csak véletlenül fedik le az adatokat a farokból, így arra ösztönözve a rendszereket, hogy túlteljesítsék a népszerű/gyakori és nem kétértelmű esetekre. Az entitás legnehezebb eseteit találjuk a kétértelmű formák ritkán jelöltjei között. Eredményeinkkel reméljük, hogy inspirálni tudjuk a jövőbeli terveket mind az entitások összekapcsoló rendszereinek, mind az értékelési adatkészleteknek. Ennek a célnak a támogatása érdekében összeállítjuk az ajánlott intézkedések listáját a farokesetek jobb bevonására.', 'it': "I linker di entità all'avanguardia ottengono punteggi di alta precisione con metodi probabilistici. Tuttavia, questi punteggi dovrebbero essere considerati in relazione alle proprietà dei set di dati su cui sono valutati. Fino ad ora, non c'è stata un'indagine sistematica delle proprietà delle entità che collegano i set di dati e del loro impatto sulle prestazioni del sistema. In questo articolo riportiamo una serie di ipotesi riguardanti i fenomeni di coda lunga in entità che collegano i dataset, la loro interazione e il loro impatto sulle prestazioni del sistema. Il nostro studio sistematico di queste ipotesi mostra che i set di dati di valutazione catturano principalmente le entità principali e coprono solo incidentalmente i dati dalla coda, incoraggiando così i sistemi a sovraadattarsi a casi popolari/frequenti e non ambigui. Troviamo i casi più difficili di collegamento tra i candidati poco frequenti di forme ambigue. Con i nostri risultati, speriamo di ispirare progetti futuri di sistemi di collegamento tra entità e set di dati di valutazione. Per sostenere questo obiettivo, forniamo un elenco di azioni raccomandate per una migliore inclusione dei casi di coda.", 'mk': 'Најсовремените поврзувачи на ентитетите постигнуваат високи точности со веројатни методи. However, these scores should be considered in relation to the properties of the datasets they are evaluated on.  Досега, не постои систематска истрага за сопственостите на ентитетот кој ги поврзува податоците и нивното влијание на системската функција. Во овој весник известуваме за серија хипотези во врска со феномените на долга опашка во ентитетот кој ги поврзува податоците, нивната интеракција и нивното влијание врз системската функција. Нашата систематска студија на овие хипотези покажува дека податоците за проценка главно ги заземаат главните ентитети и само инцидентно ги покриваат податоците од опашката, со што се охрабруваат системите да се преприлагодат на популарни/чести и несигурни случаи Најтешките случаи на ентитет се поврзуваат меѓу ретките кандидати на двогледни форми. Со нашите откритија, се надеваме дека ќе инспирираме идни дизајни на ентитетите кои ги поврзуваат системите и податоците за евалуација. За да ја поддржиме оваа цел, ние обезбедуваме листа на препорачани акции за подобро вклучување на случаите со опашка.', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റേറ്റ്- ഓഫ്- ആര്\u200dട്ടിയിലെ ലിങ്കെര്\u200dസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് കൂടുതല്\u200d കൃത്യമായ സ്കോര്\u200d  എങ്കിലും അവയുടെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സ്കോര്\u200dസ് വിചാരിക്കണം. ഇതുവരെ സിസ്റ്റമില്ലാത്ത വസ്തുക്കളുടെ സ്വഭാവങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന്റ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടം കണക്കിനെക്കുറിച്ച് റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു, നീണ്ട വാലിനെക്കുറിച്ച്, ഡാറ്റാസറ്റിനെ Our systematic study of these hypotheses shows that evaluation datasets mainly capture head entities and only incidentally cover data from the tail, thus encouraging systems to overfit to popular/frequent and non-ambiguous cases.  സാധാരണ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികളുടെ ഇടയില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും കഠിനമായ കേസുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ കണ്ടുപിടികള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, ഭാവിയുടെ ഡിസൈനിങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റം ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വസ്തുക്കളുടെയും വിവ ഈ ലക്ഷ്യത്തെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ശുപാര്\u200dശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ പട്ടികയില്\u200d നല്ല വാല്\u200d കേസ', 'kk': 'Суреттің күйі сілтемелері ықтималдық әдістерімен жоғары дұрыс нәтижелерін жеткізеді. Бірақ бұл нәтижелер бағалайтын деректер жиындарының қасиеттеріне қатынау керек. Қазірге дейін деректер қорларын қосып, жүйелік істеуіне әсер ететін нысандардың қасиеттерін жүйелік зерттеу жоқ. Бұл қағазда біз деректер жинақтарын сілтіру, үйлесімділіктерін жүйелік істеу үшін ұзындық кейбір гипотезалар туралы хабарлаймыз. Біздің гипотезаларды жүйелік зерттеудіміз бағалау деректер бағдарламаларының негізінде басып тұратынын көрсетеді, сондықтан тек басып тұратын деректерді басып тұрады, сондықтан жүйелерді көпшілікті/көпшілікті Біз кәдімгі кандидаттардың арасындағы көмектесетін жағдайлардың ең қиын жағдайларын көреміз. Біздің табуымыз келесі жағдайды жүйелерді қосып, мәліметті бағалау деректер жиындарының болашағы дизайндарын түсінуге үміттенеміз. Бұл мақсатты қолдау үшін, жұлдық жағдайларды жақсы қосылу үшін қолданатын әрекеттер тізімін таңдаймыз.', 'lt': 'Aukščiausios pažangos subjektų sąsajos užtikrina aukštą tikslumą taikant probabilistinius metodus. Tačiau šie rezultatai turėtų būti svarstomi atsižvelgiant į jų vertinamų duomenų rinkinių savybes. Iki šiol nebuvo atliekamas sistemingas subjektų, jungiančių duomenų rinkinius, savybių ir jų poveikio sistemos veikimui tyrimas. Šiame dokumente pranešame apie daugelį hipotezių, susijusių su ilguoju uodegos reiškiniais subjektuose, jungiančiuose duomenų rinkinius, jų sąveika ir jų poveikis sistemos veikimui. Mūsų sistemingas šių hipotezių tyrimas rodo, kad vertinimo duomenų rinkiniai daugiausia apima pagrindinius subjektus ir tik atsitiktinai apima duomenis iš uodegos, taip skatinant sistemas prisitaikyti prie populiarių (dažnų) ir nedviprasmiškų atvejų. Rasime sunkiausius subjektų atvejus, susijusius tarp nedažnų dviprasmiškų formų kandidatų. With our findings, we hope to inspire future designs of both entity linking systems and evaluation datasets.  Siekdami paremti šį tikslą, pateiksime rekomenduojamų veiksmų, skirtų geriau įtraukti paskutinius atvejus, sąrašą.', 'ms': 'Pengikat entiti-state-of-the-art mencapai skor akurasi tinggi dengan kaedah kemungkinan. Namun, skor ini patut dianggap berkaitan dengan ciri-ciri set data yang mereka nilaikan. Sehingga sekarang, tidak ada penyelidikan sistemik ciri-ciri entiti yang menghubungkan set data dan kesan mereka pada prestasi sistem. In this paper we report on a series of hypotheses regarding the long tail phenomena in entity linking datasets, their interaction, and their impact on system performance.  Penelitian sistemik kita terhadap hipotesis ini menunjukkan bahawa set data penilaian terutamanya menangkap entiti kepala dan hanya secara tidak sengaja menutupi data dari ekor, dengan itu mengangkut sistem untuk melebihi kes populer/sering dan tidak ambiguh. Kami mendapati kes yang paling sukar entiti yang menghubungkan antara calon yang tidak kadang-kadang bentuk ambiguh. Dengan penemuan kami, kami berharap untuk menginspirasi rancangan masa depan kedua-dua entiti yang menghubungkan sistem dan set data penilaian. Untuk menyokong tujuan ini, kami menyediakan senarai tindakan yang direkomendasikan untuk penyelesaian lebih baik kes ekor.', 'mt': 'L-aktar konnessuri moderni tal-entitajiet jiksbu punteġġi ta’ preċiżjoni għoljin b’metodi probabilistiċi. Madankollu, dawn il-punteġġi għandhom jiġu kkunsidrati b’rabta mal-karatteristiċi tas-settijiet tad-dejta li huma evalwati fuqhom. Sa issa, ma kienx hemm investigazzjoni sistematika tal-proprjetajiet tal-entità li torbot settijiet ta’ dejta u l-impatt tagħhom fuq il-prestazzjoni tas-sistema. F’dan id-dokument nirrappurtaw dwar sensiela ta’ ipoteżi rigward il-fenomeni tad-denb twil fl-entità li torbot settijiet ta’ dejta, l-interazzjoni tagħhom, u l-impatt tagħhom fuq il-prestazzjoni tas-sistema. L-istudju sistematiku tagħna ta’ dawn l-ipotesi juri li settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ evalwazzjoni prinċipalment jaqbdu entitajiet prinċipali u jkopru biss b’mod inċidentali dejta mid-denb, u b’hekk jinkoraġġixxu sistemi biex jaqbdu żżejjed għal każijiet popolari/frekwenti u mhux ambigwi. Aħna nsibu l-każijiet l-aktar diffiċli ta’ entità li torbot fost il-kandidati mhux frekwenti ta’ forom ambigwi. Bis-sejbiet tagħna, nittamaw li ninspiraw disinji futuri kemm ta’ entitajiet li jgħaqqdu s-sistemi kif ukoll settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ evalwazzjoni. Biex nappoġġjaw dan l-għan, nipprovdu list a ta’ azzjonijiet rakkomandati għal inklużjoni a ħjar ta’ każijiet ta’ denb.', 'mn': 'Урлагийн байгууллагын холбоотой байгууллагууд магадлалын аргаар өндөр тодорхойлолт гаргадаг. Гэхдээ эдгээр тоонуудыг үнэлэх өгөгдлийн сангийн шинж чанартай холбоотой байх хэрэгтэй. Одоо хүртэл, системийн үйл ажиллагаанд нөлөө үзүүлэх үйл ажиллагааны байгууллагуудын тухай систематикийн судалгаа байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдээллийн сангуудыг холбох, харилцаа, системийн үйл ажиллагаанд нөлөөлөл үзүүлэхэд урт эрхтэн явдал, урт эрхтэн явдалтай тухай олон гипотезийн талаар зарлаж байна. Эдгээр гипотезуудын систематик судалгаа нь үнэлгээний өгөгдлийн сангууд ихэвчлэн толгой бүлгүүдийг барьж, шугамны мэдээллийг нь тойронд нь хадгалах боломжтой болно. Иймээс системүүдийг олон хүн/ихэвчлэн, тусгаарлагдахгүй тохиолдолд Бид бүтээгдэхүүний хамгийн хэцүү тохиолдолуудыг холбоотой байдаг. Бид ирээдүйн загваруудыг холбох систем болон үнэлгээний өгөгдлийн сангуудыг урам зориулах гэж найдаж байна. Энэ зорилгоог дэмжихэд бид шүдний хэрэгсэл дээр нэмэгдүүлэхэд зөвлөсөн үйл ажиллагааны жагсаалт гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Najnowocześniejsze linkery jednostek osiągają wysoką dokładność za pomocą metod probabilistycznych. Wyniki te należy jednak rozważyć w odniesieniu do właściwości zbiorów danych, na których są oceniane. Do tej pory nie prowadzono systematycznego badania właściwości podmiotu łączącego zbiory danych i ich wpływu na wydajność systemu. W artykule przedstawiamy serię hipotez dotyczących zjawisk długiego ogona w jednostkach łączących zbiory danych, ich interakcji oraz ich wpływu na wydajność systemu. Nasze systematyczne badanie tych hipotez pokazuje, że zbiory danych oceniających przede wszystkim pojmują jednostki główne i tylko przypadkowo obejmują dane z ogona, zachęcając tym samym systemy do nadmiernego dopasowywania do popularnych/częstych i niedwuznacznych przypadków. Znajdujemy najtrudniejsze przypadki powiązania podmiotów wśród rzadkich kandydatów o niejednoznacznych formach. Dzięki naszym odkryciom mamy nadzieję inspirować przyszłe projekty zarówno podmiotów łączących systemy, jak i zbiorów danych oceniających. Aby wspierać ten cel, przedstawiamy listę zalecanych działań w celu lepszego włączenia przypadków ogonowych.', 'ro': 'Legatorii de entități de ultimă generație obțin scoruri de precizie ridicate cu metode probabilistice. Cu toate acestea, aceste scoruri ar trebui luate în considerare în raport cu proprietățile seturilor de date pe care sunt evaluate. Până în prezent, nu a existat o investigare sistematică a proprietăților entității care leagă seturile de date și a impactului acestora asupra performanței sistemului. În această lucrare prezentăm o serie de ipoteze privind fenomenele de coadă lungă în entitățile care leagă seturile de date, interacțiunea acestora și impactul lor asupra performanței sistemului. Studiul nostru sistematic al acestor ipoteze arată că seturile de date de evaluare captează în principal entitățile principale și acoperă doar accidental datele din coadă, încurajând astfel sistemele să se adapteze la cazuri populare/frecvente și non-ambigue. Găsim cele mai dificile cazuri de legătură de entitate între candidații rar de forme ambigue. Prin constatările noastre, sperăm să inspirăm proiecte viitoare atât pentru sistemele care leagă entitățile, cât și seturile de date de evaluare. Pentru a susține acest obiectiv, vă oferim o listă de acțiuni recomandate pentru o mai bună includere a cazurilor de coadă.', 'sr': 'Poveznici države umjetnosti postižu visoke tačnosti sa verovatnim metodama. Međutim, ovi rezultati bi trebali razmotriti u vezi sa svojstvima podataka na kojima se procjenjuju. Do sada, nije bilo sistematske istrage o svojstvima entiteta koje povezuju podatke i njihov uticaj na provedbu sistema. U ovom papiru prijavljujemo niz hipoteza u vezi dugih fenomena repa u entitetima povezanim podacima, njihovom interakcijom i njihovom utjecaju na provedbu sistema. Naše sistematsko ispitivanje tih hipoteza pokazuje da podaci za procjenu uglavnom uhvate glavne entitate i samo slučajno pokrivaju podatke sa repa, tako poticajući sisteme da se uklapaju u popularne/česte i neobične slučajeve. Najteži slučajevi entiteta koji se povezuju među neobičnim kandidatima neobičnih oblika. Sa našim nalazima, nadamo se da ćemo inspirirati buduće dizajne obje entitete koje povezuju sisteme i dataset za procjenu. Da bismo podržali ovaj cilj, pružili smo spisak preporučenih akcija za bolju uključenje slučajeva repa.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවය සම්බන්ධකයෙන් සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාවයෙන් සැකසුම් විශ්වාසික විද්\u200dයාවය සමඟ උපසුම්  නමුත්, මේ ප්\u200dරමාණය ඔවුන් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ දත්ත සැට් ගැන සම්බන්ධයෙන් හිතන්න ඕනි. දැන් වෙනකම්, තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධ වැඩසටහන් සහ පද්ධති වැඩසටහන් සම්බන්ධ වැඩසටහන් ගැන පද්ධතිය පරීක් මේ පත්තරේ අපි දත්ත සේට් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ලොකු පුළුවන් ගැන හිතාවක් ගැන වාර්තා කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ මේ විශේෂණ දත්ත සැකසුම් විශේෂයෙන් ඔළුවන් වලින් අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි පරීක්ෂණයෙන්  අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන්ම අමාරුයි වර්ගයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් අපේ හොයාගන්න, අපි බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනවා අනාගතයේ දෙන්නම් පද්ධති සහ දත්ත සැට් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න අනාග මේ අරමුණ සහාය කරන්න, අපි හොඳට පස්සේ සිද්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැයිස්තුවක් දෙන්නේ.', 'no': 'Tilstand til kunstende-lenkjerar oppnår høg nøyaktighetspoeng med sannsynlige metodar. Desse poeng bør imidlertid vurderast i forhold til eigenskapane til datasetta dei skal evaluerast på. Til nå har det ikkje vært eit systematisk undersøking av eigenskapane til einingar som lenkjer datasett og effekten på systemutvikling. I denne papiret rapporterer vi om ei serie hypotesar om den lange halfenomena i eininga som lenkjer datasett, interaksjonen deres og effekten deres på systemutvikling. Vår systematisk studie av desse hypotesane viser at evalueringsdatasett hovudsakelig hentar hovudeiningar og berre omslag data frå haldet, slik at systemet påvirkar å overpassa med populære/ofte og ikkje-ambiguære tilfeller. Vi finn dei vanskelege tilfellene til entitet som ligg saman mellom dei følgjande kandidatane av avgjengelege formar. Med finningane våre håper vi å inspirere framtidige utviklingar av både einingar som koplar systemet og evalueringsdatasett. For å støtta dette målet, oppgjev vi ei liste over tilrådd handlingar for betre inkludering av halvtilfeller.', 'ta': 'சாத்தியமான முறைகளுடன் அதிக சரியான மதிப்பெண்களை பெற முடியும். ஆயினும், இந்த மதிப்பெண்கள் மதிப்பிடப்படும் தரவுத்தளத்தின் பண்புகளைப் பற்றி கருதப்பட வேண்டும். இப்போது, கணினி செயல்பாட்டின் பண்புகளை இணைக்கும் மற்றும் கணினியின் விளைவுகளின் பாதிப்பு எதுவும் இல்லை. இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு தொகுதியில் நீண்ட வால் நடவடிக்கையை பற்றி அறிவிக்கிறோம் உண்மையில் தகவல் அமைப்புகளை இணைக்கும், அவர்களுடை இந்த துப்புணர்வுகளின் முறைமையான ஆராய்ச்சி தகவல் அமைப்புகளை பிடிக்கும் முக்கியமாக தலைப்புகளை பிடிக்கும் மற்றும் வாயிலிருந்து மட்டும் தகவல் மறை நாங்கள் கண்டுபிடிக்க மிகவும் கடினமான பொருள்கள் இணைக்கப்படுகிறது அடிப்படையான தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட முறையா With our findings, we hope to inspire future designs of both entity linking systems and evaluation datasets.  இந்த இலக்கை ஆதரிக்க, நாம் வால் சிறந்த செயல்களை சேர்க்க பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பட்டியலை வழங்குகிறோம்.', 'ur': 'ایٹیٹ ایٹیٹ ایٹیٹی لینکر بالا دقیق اسکور کو احتمال طریقے سے پہنچاتے ہیں. However, these scores should be considered in relation to the properties of the data sets on which they are evaluated. یہاں تک، ایست کی سیستمائی تحقیق نہیں کی گئی ہے جو ڈیٹسٹ کو متصل کرتی ہے اور ان کی سٹم کی عملکرد پر اثر کرتی ہے. ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک سری فرضیات کے بارے میں راپورت کرتے ہیں جن میں ڈیٹسٹ، ان کی تعامل، اور ان کی تاثیر سیسٹم کی پرورش پر ہے۔ ہماری سیستماتیک تحقیقات ان فرضیوں کے بارے میں دکھاتی ہے کہ تحقیقات ڈاٹ سٹے اکثر سر ایٹینٹیوں کو پکڑتے ہیں اور صرف پیٹ سے ڈاٹیوں کو پکڑتے ہیں، اسی طرح سیستمات کو جمعیت/اثر اور غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر ہم نے اکثر مشکل جگہ پایا ہے کہ انٹیٹ کی نسبت غیر مشکل فرموں میں متصل ہوتی ہے. ہمارے معلومات کے ساتھ، ہم امید رکھتے ہیں کہ مستقبل طراحوں کی پیدائش کریں جو سیستموں اور ارزیابی ڈیٹ سٹوں کو متصل کرتی ہیں۔ اس مقصد کی مدد کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک سفارش دینے والی اقدامات کی لکھ دیتے ہیں تائیل کے کیسوں کے بہتر شامل کرنے کے لئے.', 'so': 'Wadamada farshaxanku waxay heli karaan heer aad u sax ah, waxayna ku helaan qaabab suurtagal ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa habboon in lambarkaas looga fikiraa hantida lambarka lagu qiimeeyo. Hada la joogo, ma jirto baaritaanka nidaamka ah ee hantida jidhka ku xiriira kooxda macluumaadka iyo saameyntooda ku saabsan sameynta nidaamka. Warqaddan waxaan wargelinaynaa wax ku saabsan labawejiyo badan oo ku saabsan waxyaabaha dheer oo daba-daba ah ee ku saabsan bogga macluumaadka la xiriira, iskala xiriirkooda iyo saamehooda ku saabsan sameynta nidaamka. Baaritaankeenna nidaamka ah ee munaafiqiintan waxay muuqataa in qiimeynta macluumaadka lagu qabsado sida ugu horeysa waxay qabsadaan maadooyinka madaxa oo keliya oo ay daboolaan macluumaad, sidaa darteed waxay ku dhiirrigeliyaan nidaamka inay u wareegaan xaaladaha dad badan/marar iyo aan caqli lahayn. Waxaynu helaynaa xaaladaha ugu adag ee jacaylka oo ku xiran noocyada caadiga ah. Marka la helo baaritaankeenna, waxaynu rajaynaynaa in aan ku xiiro sawirada mustaqbalka ee dhamaantood ee isbitaalka iyo sawirada qiimeynta. Si aan u taagno goalkan, waxaynu u fidnaynaa liiska falimaha la taliyey oo ka wanaagsan in lagu qoro xaaladaha dabada.', 'sv': 'State-of-the-art entity linkers uppnår höga noggrannhetspoäng med sannolika metoder. Dessa poäng bör dock beaktas i förhållande till egenskaperna hos de dataset de utvärderas på. Hittills har det inte gjorts någon systematisk undersökning av egenskaperna hos enheter som länkar datauppsättningar och deras inverkan på systemets prestanda. I den här uppsatsen redovisar vi en rad hypoteser om långsvansfenomen i entitetslänkande datauppsättningar, deras interaktion och deras inverkan på systemets prestanda. Vår systematiska studie av dessa hypoteser visar att utvärderingsdata huvudsakligen fångar huvudenheter och endast tillfälligtvis täcker data från svansen, vilket uppmuntrar system att överpassa till populära/frekventa och icke-tvetydiga fall. Vi finner de svåraste fallen av entitetskoppling bland de sällan förekommande kandidaterna av tvetydiga former. Med våra resultat hoppas vi kunna inspirera till framtida design av både entitetslänkande system och utvärderingsdata. För att stödja detta mål tillhandahåller vi en lista över rekommenderade åtgärder för bättre inkludering av svansfall.', 'uz': "Sana bogʻlamalari Lekin, bu qiymatdagi maʼlumot bazasining xossalariga qarang. Hozirda, maʼlumot bazasining xossalarini va tizim bajarishga tayyorlanish natijalarini tizim tizim bajarishga tayyorlanib qolmadi. Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha qo'shiq holatlari haqida, maʼlumotlar sahifasini bog'lash, ularning interfeys va tizim amalni bajarishga ishlatish haqida ko'plab yetarli munosabatlar haqida xabar beramiz. Bu munosabatlarning tizimimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, qiymatlar asosiy boshqa obʼektlarni qabul qiladi va faqat hodisa quyidagi taʼlumotni qo'yish mumkin, shunday qilib tizimlarni faqat katta/ko'proq va hech qanday hamma narsalar bilan yuklashga ishlab chiqaradi. Biz eng qiyin narsalarni o'rganamiz va ko'paytirilgan shakllar bilan bog'liq. Biz natijalarimiz bilan kelajakdagi obʼektlar tizimni bogʻ'lash va qiymatlar maʼlumotlar tarkibini ishlab chiqarish kerak. Bu maqsadni qoʻllash uchun, biz qo'yil holatlarini qo'shish uchun talab qilinadigan amallar roʻyxatini koʻrsatimiz.", 'vi': 'Các tổ chức liên kết nghệ thuật đạt điểm chính xác cao bằng các phương pháp chắc chắn. Tuy nhiên, những điểm này nên được cân nhắc dựa trên tính chất của các bộ dữ liệu mà chúng được đánh giá. Cho đến bây giờ, chưa có một cuộc điều tra có hệ thống nào kiểm tra các thuộc tính của thực thể liên kết các bộ dữ liệu và tác động của chúng lên khả năng hệ thống. Trong bài báo này chúng tôi đưa ra một loạt các giả thuyết về các hiện tượng đuôi dài trong thực thể liên kết các tập tin, giao tiếp của chúng và tác động của chúng lên khả năng hệ thống. Những nghiên cứu có hệ thống về các giả thuyết này cho thấy rằng các tập tin đánh giá thường chiếm các cơ sở dữ liệu trên đầu và chỉ thông thường là bao gồm dữ liệu từ phần đuôi, nhờ đó các hệ thống dẫn đến các trường hợp phổ biến, thường xuyên và không mơ hồ. Chúng tôi thấy những trường hợp khó khăn nhất liên kết giữa những ứng cử viên hiếm hoi của dạng mơ hồ. Với những kết quả của chúng tôi, chúng tôi hi vọng có thể tạo ra những thiết kế tương lai của cả hai hệ thống liên kết và bộ dữ liệu đánh giá. Để hỗ trợ mục tiêu này, chúng tôi cung cấp một danh sách các hành động được đề nghị để tốt hơn trong các ca đuôi.', 'bg': 'Съвременните свързващи субекти постигат високи оценки за точност с вероятностни методи. Тези оценки обаче следва да се вземат предвид по отношение на свойствата на наборите от данни, по които се оценяват. Досега не е имало систематично проучване на свойствата на субектите, свързващи набори от данни и тяхното въздействие върху ефективността на системата. В настоящата статия се отчитат редица хипотези относно явленията с дълга опашка в съвкупности от данни, тяхното взаимодействие и тяхното въздействие върху производителността на системата. Нашето систематично проучване на тези хипотези показва, че наборите от данни за оценка обхващат главно главни субекти и само случайно обхващат данни от опашката, като по този начин насърчават системите да се пренасочват към популярни/чести и недвусмислени случаи. Намираме най-трудните случаи на свързване на субекти сред редките кандидати с двусмислени форми. С нашите открития се надяваме да вдъхновим бъдещи проекти както на системи за свързване на обекти, така и на набори от данни за оценка. В подкрепа на тази цел предлагаме списък с препоръчителни действия за по-добро включване на опашките случаи.', 'nl': 'State-of-the-art entity linkers bereiken hoge nauwkeurigheidsscores met probabilistische methoden. Deze scores moeten echter worden bekeken in relatie tot de eigenschappen van de datasets waarop ze worden geëvalueerd. Tot nu toe is er geen systematisch onderzoek gedaan naar de eigenschappen van entiteiten die datasets koppelen en hun impact op systeemprestaties. In dit artikel rapporteren we over een reeks hypothesen over de long tail fenomenen in entiteiten die datasets koppelen, hun interactie en hun impact op systeemprestaties. Onze systematische studie van deze hypothesen toont aan dat evaluatiedatasets hoofdzakelijk hoofdentiteiten bevatten en alleen incidenteel gegevens van de staart dekken, waardoor systemen worden aangemoedigd om te overfitten naar populaire/frequente en niet-dubbelzinnige gevallen. We vinden de moeilijkste gevallen van entiteitskoppeling tussen de zeldzame kandidaten van dubbelzinnige vormen. Met onze bevindingen hopen we toekomstige ontwerpen te inspireren van zowel entiteitskoppelsystemen als evaluatiedatasets. Om dit doel te ondersteunen, bieden we een lijst van aanbevolen acties voor een betere integratie van tail cases.', 'da': 'State-of-the-art enhedslinkere opnår høj nøjagtighed scores med sandsynlighedsmæssige metoder. Disse scorer bør dog tages i betragtning i forhold til egenskaberne af de datasæt, de evalueres på. Indtil nu har der ikke været en systematisk undersøgelse af egenskaberne ved enheder, der forbinder datasæt, og deres indvirkning på systemets ydeevne. I denne artikel rapporterer vi om en række hypoteser vedrørende langhalefænomener i entity linking datasæt, deres interaktion og deres indvirkning på systemets ydeevne. Vores systematiske undersøgelse af disse hypoteser viser, at evalueringsdatasæt hovedsageligt indfanger hovedenheder og kun i tilfælde dækker data fra halen, hvilket tilskynder systemerne til at overpasse til populære/hyppige og ikke-tvetydige tilfælde. Vi finder de vanskeligste tilfælde af enhedsforbindelse blandt de sjældne kandidater af tvetydige former. Med vores resultater håber vi at inspirere fremtidige designs af både entity linking systemer og evalueringsdatasæt. For at understøtte dette mål leverer vi en liste over anbefalede tiltag til bedre inklusion af haletilfælde.', 'hr': 'Poveznici države umjetnosti postignu visoke tačnosti s vjerojatnim metodama. Međutim, te rezultate treba razmotriti u odnosu na vlasništvo podataka na kojima se procjenjuju. Do sada nije bilo sistematske istrage vlasništva podataka koje povezuju podatake i njihov utjecaj na provedbu sustava. U ovom papiru izvještajemo o nizu hipoteze u vezi dugog repa u entitetu povezivanja podataka, njihovog interakcije i njihovog utjecaja na provedbu sustava. Naša sistematska ispitivanja tih hipoteze pokazuje da podaci za procjenu uglavnom uhvate glavne entitate i samo slučajno pokrivaju podatke iz repa, tako poticajući sustave da se uklapaju u popularne/česte i neobične slučajeve. Najteži slučajevi entiteta koji se povezuju među rijetkom kandidatima neobičnih oblika. S našim nalazima, nadamo se da ćemo inspirirati buduće dizajne objekata koji povezuju sustave i datum za procjenu. Da bismo podržali ovaj cilj, pružili smo popis preporučenih akcija za bolju uključenje slučajeva repa.', 'de': 'Modernste Entity Linker erzielen mit probabilistischen Methoden hohe Genauigkeitswerte. Diese Scores sollten jedoch in Bezug auf die Eigenschaften der Datensätze betrachtet werden, auf denen sie ausgewertet werden. Bisher gab es keine systematische Untersuchung der Eigenschaften von Entitäten, die Datensätze verknüpfen und deren Auswirkungen auf die Systemleistung. In diesem Beitrag berichten wir über eine Reihe von Hypothesen über Long Tail Phänomene in Entitätenverknüpfungen von Datensätzen, ihre Interaktion und ihren Einfluss auf die Systemleistung. Unsere systematische Untersuchung dieser Hypothesen zeigt, dass Auswertungsdatensätze hauptsächlich Head Entities erfassen und nur zufällig Daten vom Tail abdecken, wodurch Systeme ermutigt werden, auf beliebte/häufige und nicht mehrdeutige Fälle zu überführen. Wir finden die schwierigsten Fälle von Entitätenverknüpfung unter den seltenen Kandidaten zweideutiger Formen. Mit unseren Erkenntnissen wollen wir zukünftige Entwürfe sowohl von Entitätenverknüpfungssystemen als auch von Auswertungsdatensätzen inspirieren. Um dieses Ziel zu unterstützen, stellen wir eine Liste von empfohlenen Maßnahmen zur besseren Einbeziehung von Tail Cases zur Verfügung.', 'id': 'Penghubung entitas yang terbaik mencapai skor akurasi tinggi dengan metode probabilis. Namun, skor ini harus dianggap berkaitan dengan properti set data yang mereka evaluasi. Sampai sekarang, belum ada penyelidikan sistematis tentang properti entitas yang menghubungkan dataset dan dampak mereka pada prestasi sistem. Dalam kertas ini kami melaporkan tentang serangkaian hipotesis mengenai fenomena ekor panjang dalam entitas yang menghubungkan dataset, interaksi mereka, dan dampak mereka pada prestasi sistem. Our systematic study of these hypotheses shows that evaluation datasets mainly capture head entities and only incidentally cover data from the tail, thus encouraging systems to overfit to popular/frequent and non-ambiguous cases.  Kami menemukan kasus-kasus yang paling sulit dari entitas yang menghubungkan antara kandidat yang tidak sering dari bentuk ambigu. Dengan penemuan kami, kami berharap untuk menginspirasi desain masa depan dari kedua entitas yang menghubungkan sistem dan dataset evaluasi. Untuk mendukung tujuan ini, kami menyediakan daftar tindakan yang direkomendasikan untuk memasukkan kasus ekor yang lebih baik.', 'ko': '가장 선진적인 실체 링크기는 확률 방법을 통해 고정밀 점수를 얻는다.그러나 이 점수는 평가 데이터 집합의 속성과 관련이 있어야 한다.지금까지 실체 링크 데이터 집합의 속성과 시스템 성능에 대한 영향을 체계적으로 연구하지 못했다.본고에서 우리는 실체 링크 데이터가 집중된 긴 꼬리 현상, 그들 간의 상호작용과 시스템 성능에 미친 영향에 대한 일련의 가설을 보고했다.우리가 이러한 가설에 대해 체계적인 연구를 실시한 결과 평가 데이터 집합은 주로 머리 실체를 포착하고 우연히 꼬리 데이터만 덮어쓰기 때문에 시스템이 유행/빈번하고 모호하지 않은 상황에 지나치게 적응하도록 장려한다.우리는 흔히 볼 수 없는 잘못된 형식의 후보자 중에서 실체 링크의 상황이 가장 어렵다는 것을 발견했다.우리의 발견을 통해 우리는 실체 링크 시스템과 평가 데이터 집합의 미래 디자인에 시사점을 주기를 바란다.이 목표를 지지하기 위해서, 우리는 꼬리 환자의 사례를 더욱 잘 포함시키기 위해 일련의 건의 조치를 제공했다.', 'fa': 'ارتباط\u200cهای شرکت\u200cهای هنری با روش\u200cهای احتمالات بالا دقیق می\u200cرسند. با این حال، این امتیاز باید در ارتباط با ویژه\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cای که در آن ارزیابی می\u200cشوند به نظر بگیرند. تا الان، تحقیقات سیستماتی از ویژگی\u200cهای اجزای متصل کردن مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و تاثیر آنها بر عملکرد سیستم وجود نداشته است. در این کاغذ ما در مورد مجموعه فرضیه\u200cهای طولانی در مورد پدیده\u200cهای دنبال درازی در مجموعه\u200cهای متصل داده\u200cها، تعامل\u200cشان، و تاثیر آنها بر عملکرد سیستم گزارش می\u200cکنیم. مطالعه سیستماتیک ما از این فرضیه ها نشان می دهد که مجموعه داده های ارزیابی عمدتاً دارای سر را می گیرند و فقط به طور ناگهانی داده های پشت پشت سر را پوشش می کنند، بنابراین سیستم ها را تشویق می دهند که به پرونده های مشهور/اغلب و غیر مشهور قابل ما پرونده\u200cهای سخت\u200cترین اجتماعی را پیدا می\u200cکنیم که در میان کاندیدات غیر\u200cاثر فرم\u200cهای غیر\u200cاثر متصل می\u200cشوند. با نتیجه\u200cهایمان، امیدواریم طراحی\u200cهای آینده\u200cای از سیستم\u200cهای ارتباط و داده\u200cهای ارتباط را الهام دهیم. برای حمایت این هدف، ما یک لیست از اقدامات پیشنهاد برای شامل بهتر پرونده\u200cهای عقب را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Sanat taýýarlarynyň etraby mümkin döredmeleri bilen ýokary dogrylygyny ýetip bilýär. Ýöne bu sanlary çylýan hasaplanyň häsiýetleri bilen baglanmaly. Şu wagt bolana çenli, sistem edip bilmeýän guramlaryň häsiýetlerini baglaýan we olaryň sistem edip täsirine netijesi ýok. Bu kagyzda biz birnäçe hypotezi barada birnäçe gezek baglaşdyrylyp bilýäris we sistem başaryşlaryna täsirler barada. Biziň sistematik öwrenmegimiz bu hypotezeler barada deňlenme datasynlaryň esasy baş guramlaryny aňlap tutýandygyny görkezýär. Bu ýagdaýda sistemalaryň popüler/sık we ýüregi bolmadyklaryna täsir edýär. Biz esasy wajyp görnüş kanunlaryň arasynda bir zat bilen baglaýan eserleri tapýarys. Taýdyklarymyz bilen gelejekde birnäçe sistemalary bilen baglaşdyrma we deňlenme sistemalarynyň gelejekde işaretlenmegi umyt edýäris. Bu maksady desteklemek üçin, yzynyň döwüregi gowy dahyl etmek üçin maslahat edilen hereket listi saýlaýrys.', 'sw': 'Viunganishi wa hali ya sanaa hufanikiwa vipimo vya sahihi vinavyowezekana. Hata hivyo, score hizi zinapaswa kuchukuliwa kuhusiana na utajiri wa seti za data zinazopitiwa. Mpaka sasa, hakuna uchunguzi wa mfumo wa utafiti wa vifaa vya vyombo vinavyounganisha taarifa na athari zao kwenye utendaji wa mfumo. Katika karatasi hii tunaripoti kuhusu mfululizo wa nadhani kuhusu hali ndefu ya kufuatia kwenye vyombo vya habari vinavyounganisha taarifa, mahusiano yao, na athari zao kuhusu utendaji wa mfumo. Utafiti wetu wa mfumo wa imani hizi unaonyesha kuwa taarifa za uchunguzi wa taarifa zinazichukua vyuo vikuu na kwa matukio pekee hupakia taarifa kutoka kwenye vita, kwa hiyo inahamasisha mifumo ya kuingia kwenye kesi maarufu/mara nyingi na isiyo na matumaini. Tunaona kesi ngumu zaidi za entity zinazounganisha miongoni mwa wagombea wa aina isiyo na matatizo. Kutokana na matokeo yetu, tunatumaini kuhamasisha ubunifu wa mustakabali wa taasisi zote zinazounganisha mifumo na taarifa za uchunguzi. Ili kuunga mkono lengo hili, tunatoa orodha ya hatua zinazopendekezwa ili kuwajumuisha kesi bora za kufuatia.', 'af': "State-of-the-art entities linkers achieve high accuracy scores with probabilistic methods. Maar hierdie telling moet wees aangesien in relatie met die eienskappe van die datastelle waarop hulle evalueer word. Tot nou is daar nie 'n sistematiese ondersoek van die eienskappe van entiteit wat datastelle koppel en hulle invloek op stelsel uitvoerings is nie. In hierdie papier rapporteer ons op 'n reeks van hipotees aangaande die lang stert fenomene in einde wat datastelle verbind, hul interaksie en hul invloek op stelsel uitwerking. Ons sistematiese studie van hierdie hipotees vertoon dat evalueringsdatastelle hoofsaaklik kopentiteite en net inkidensielik omdek data van die stert, sodat stelsels bevestig om te oorvloei na populêre/dikwels en nie-ambigeese gevalle. Ons vind die mees moeilike gevalle van entiteite wat onder die onvolgende kandidate van onbekende vorms verbind. Met ons gevinde hoop ons om toekomstige designe van beide entiteite wat stelsels en evalueringsdatastelle verbind, te inspireer. Om hierdie doel te ondersteun, verskaf ons 'n lys van aanbeveelde aksies vir beter inkluiting van sterk gevalle.", 'am': 'የ-የ-አርእስት አካል ግንኙነቶችን በአስፈላጊ ልግስና ይደረጋሉ፡፡ ምንም እንኳን እነዚህ ነጥቦች ከዳታ ሰርቨሮች ግንኙነት ጋር ይቆጠሩ ዘንድ ይገባቸዋል፡፡ እስከ አሁን ድረስ፣ አካባቢው ዳታተሮችን እና የድምፅ ስርዓት ላይ የሚጠያየቅ ምርመራ ምንም ስርዓት አልነበረም፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ላይ የረጅም የውይይት ግንኙነት፣ ዳታዎችን እና ግንኙነታቸውን እና በሲስተም ስርዓት ላይ የሚጠያየቁትን እናስባለን፡፡ የእነዚህን ንፍቅናዎች የስብሰባዊ ትምህርት ማድረግ የዳታ አካላትን በመጠቀም ራስ አካባቢዎችን እንዲያዝዛ እና ከጅራችን ዳታ ብቻ እንዲሸፍኑ ያሳያል፡፡ አካባቢ ነፃነት በተቃወመ ፍላጎች መካከል የሚጠያየቁ አካባቢ ጉዳዮች እናገኛለን፡፡ ከፍላጎታችን ጋር የመጨረሻው አካባቢ ሥርዓት እና የዳታዎችን ማሳየት እናስፈራራለን፡፡ ይህንን አግዳጅ ለመደጋገም፣ ለመሻለል የሚታሰቡትን ተግባሮች ዝርዝር እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Ndërlidhësit e njësisë së lartë arrijnë rezultate të saktësisë me metoda probabiliste. However, these scores should be considered in relation to the properties of the datasets they are evaluated on.  Deri tani, nuk ka patur një hetim sistematik të pronave të njësisë që lidh të dhënat dhe ndikimin e tyre në performancën e sistemit. Në këtë letër raportojmë mbi një seri hipotezësh lidhur me fenomenet e gjata të bishtit në njësi që lidh të dhënat, ndërveprimin e tyre dhe ndikimin e tyre në performancën e sistemit. Studimi ynë sistematik i këtyre hipotezave tregon se grupet e të dhënave të vlerësimit kapin kryesisht njësitë kryesore dhe mbulojnë vetëm rastësisht të dhënat nga bishti, duke inkurajuar kështu sistemet për të mbipërshtatur në rastet popullore/të shpeshta dhe jo-të qarta. Ne gjejmë rastet më të vështira të njësisë që lidhen mes kandidatëve të pakufaqë të formave të dyshimta. Me gjetjet tona, shpresojmë të frymëzojmë dizajnet e ardhshme të njësisë që lidhin sistemet dhe të dhënat e vlerësimit. Për të mbështetur këtë qëllim, ne ofrojmë një list ë veprimesh të rekomanduara për përfshirjen më të mirë të rasteve të bishtit.', 'hy': 'Ավելի լավագույն էակների կապերը հասնում են բարձր ճշգրտության գնահատականներ հավանական մեթոդներով: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս գնահատականները պետք է հաշվի առնեն նրանց գնահատվող տվյալների հատկությունների հետ: Մինչև հիմա, ոչ մի սիստեմատիկ հետազոտություն չկա տվյալների համակարգերի կապերի առանձնահատկությունների և նրանց ազդեցության վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք զեկուցում ենք մի շարք հիպոթեզների մասին, որոնք վերաբերում են երկար պոչխարի երևույթներին, որոնք կապում են տվյալների համակարգերը, նրանց փոխազդեցությունը և նրանց ազդեցությունը համակարգի արդյունքին: Our systematic study of these hypotheses shows that evaluation datasets mainly capture head entities and only incidentally cover data from the tail, thus encouraging systems to overfit to popular/frequent and non-ambiguous cases.  Մենք գտնում ենք առանձնահատուկ ձևերի անհաճախ թեկնածուների միջև կապված առանձնահատուկ դեպքերը: Մեր հայտնաբերությունների միջոցով մենք հույս ունենք ոգեշնչել համակարգերի և գնահատման տվյալների համակարգերի կապերի ապագա դիզայները: Այս նպատակին աջակցելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք խորհուրդ տալու գործողությունների ցուցակ, որպեսզի ավելի լավ ներառվեն պոչխարի դեպքերը:', 'bs': 'Poveznici države umjetnosti postignu visoke tačnosti s verovatnim metodama. Međutim, ovi rezultati bi trebali razmotriti u odnosu na vlasništvo podataka na kojima se procjenjuju. Do sada, nije bilo sistematske istrage o vlasništvu entiteta povezivanja podataka i njihov utjecaj na provedbu sustava. U ovom papiru izvještajemo o nizu hipoteze u vezi dugih fenomena repa u entitetu povezivanja podataka, njihovog interakcije i njihovog utjecaja na provedbu sustava. Naše sistematsko ispitivanje tih hipoteza pokazuje da podaci za procjenu uglavnom uhvate glavne entitate i samo slučajno pokrivaju podatke iz repa, tako poticajući sisteme da se uklapaju u popularne/česte i neobične slučajeve. Najteži slučajevi entiteta koji se povezuju među neobičnim kandidatima neobičnih oblika. Sa našim nalazima, nadamo se da ćemo inspirirati buduće dizajne obje entiteta koje povezuju sisteme i dataset za procjenu. Da bismo podržali ovaj cilj, pružili smo spisak preporučenih akcija za bolju uključenje slučajeva repa.', 'ca': "Els enllaçadors d'entitats més modernes aconsegueixen puntuacions d'alta precisió amb mètodes probabilistes. No obstant això, aquestes puntuacions haurien de ser considerades en relació amb les propietats dels conjunts de dades en què es valoren. Fins ara no hi ha hagut una investigació sistemàtica de les propietats de l'entitat que vincula conjunts de dades i el seu impacte en el rendiment del sistema. En aquest article informem d'una sèrie d'hipòtesis sobre els fenomens de la llarga cola de l'entitat que enllacen conjunts de dades, la seva interacció i el seu impacte en el rendiment del sistema. El nostre estudi sistemàtic d'aquestes hipòtesis mostra que els conjunts de dades d'evaluació capten principalment entitats principals i només cobreixen incidentalment dades de la cua, alentant els sistemes a adaptar-se a casos populars/freqüents i no ambiguos. Trobem els casos més difícils d'entitat que s'uneixen entre els candidats poc freqüents de formes ambigues. Amb els nostres descobriments, esperem inspirar dissenys futurs de les entitats que enllacen sistemes i conjunts de dades d'evaluació. Per sostenir aquest objectiu, proporcionem una llista d'accions recomanades per a una millor inclusió de casos de cola.", 'bn': 'রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের বস্তুর লিঙ্কাররা সম্ভবত সম্ভাব্য পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে উচ্চ সঠিক স্কোর অর্জন করে। তবে তথ্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে এই স্কোর বিবেচনা করা উচিত। এখন পর্যন্ত বস্তুর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর তদন্ত এবং সিস্টেম প্রদর্শনের উপর তাদের প্রভাব নেই। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিভিন্ন দীর্ঘ ধারণা সম্পর্কে রিপোর্ট করি যে বস্তুর তথ্য সংযোগ, তাদের কার্যক্রম এবং তাদের প্রভাব সিস্টেমের প্রদর্ এই হিসেবে আমাদের সিস্টেমিক গবেষণা দেখাচ্ছে যে মূলধারণ মাধ্যমে মাধ্যমে তথ্য গ্রেফতার করা হয়েছে এবং শুধুমাত্র ঘটনাক্রমে কেবল টেল থেকে তথ্য প্রদান করা হয়েছ আমরা প্রার্থীদের মধ্যে সংযুক্ত বস্তুর সবচেয়ে কঠিন কেস খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যেখানে প্রার্থীদের মধ্যে যুক্ত। আমাদের আবিস্কারের মাধ্যমে আমরা আশা করি ভবিষ্যতের ডিজাইন উভয় বস্তুর সাথে যুক্ত সিস্টেম এবং মূল্যায়নের তথ্যের এই লক্ষ্যটিকে সমর্থন করার জন্য আমরা তালিকায় পরামর্শ প্রদান করি যেখানে তালিকা যোগাযোগ করার জন্য।', 'az': 'Əslində, sanatçıların bağlantıları mümkünlük metodları ilə yüksək doğruluq nöqtələrini tapır. Ancaq bu nöqtələr değerlendirilmiş verilən qurğuların özellikləri ilə haqqında düşünməlidir. Şimdiye qədər, məlumat qurğularını bağlayıb və sistem performans üzərində təsirlərinin sistematik xəbərdarlığı yoxdur. Bu kağızda biz bir sürü hipotez barəsində məlumatlarını bağlayıb, bağlantılarını və sistem performansına təsir edirlər. Bu hipotezlərin sistematik təcrübələrimiz göstərir ki, təcrübə verilən verilən dəyişiklik qurduğu məlumatların başlıqlarını alır və yalnız dəyişiklikdən gizlədirlər, buna görə də sistemlərin popularlı/sıxıntılı və müxtəlif məlumatların üstünə uyğunlanmasını təşkil Bizim ən çətin vəziyyətlərimiz müxtəlif formların arasında birləşdirilməsini görürük. Sonuçlarımız ilə, hər ikisinin sistemləri və değerlendirmə verilənlərin gələcək dizaynlarına ilham vermək istəyirik. Bu məqsədini dəstəkləmək üçün, daha yaxşı kuyruğun məqsədilərinin istifadə edilməsi üçün tövsiyə olunan eylemlərin listesini təmin edirik.', 'et': 'Kaasaegsed üksuste sidurid saavutavad tõenäosuslike meetoditega kõrge täpsuse skoorid. Neid tulemusi tuleks siiski arvesse võtta seoses nende andmekogumite omadustega, mille alusel neid hinnatakse. Seni ei ole andmekogumeid siduvate üksuste omaduste ja nende mõju süsteemi jõudlusele süsteemselt uuritud. Käesolevas töös esitame hulga hüpoteesid, mis puudutavad andmekogumite ühendavate üksuste nähtusi, nende vastastikust mõju ja mõju süsteemi jõudlusele. Meie süstemaatiline uuring nende hüpoteeside kohta näitab, et hindamisandmekogumid hõlmavad peamiselt peamisi üksusi ja hõlmavad ainult juhuslikult saba andmeid, julgustades seega süsteeme ülekoormama populaarsete/sagedaste ja mittemõistetavate juhtumitega. Me leiame kõige raskemaid üksuste sidumise juhtumeid ebaselgete vormide harvaesinevate kandidaatide hulgas. Oma tulemustega loodame inspireerida nii üksuste sidumissüsteemide kui ka hindamisandmekogumite tulevasi projekteerimisi. Selle eesmärgi toetamiseks esitame loetelu soovitatud meetmetest, et paremini kaasata saba juhtumid.', 'cs': 'Nejmodernější entity linkery dosahují vysoké přesnosti skóre pravděpodobnostními metodami. Tyto skóre by však měly být brány v úvahu s vlastnostmi datových souborů, na nichž jsou hodnoceny. Dosud nebylo systematické zkoumání vlastností entity propojujících datové sady a jejich vlivu na výkon systému. V tomto článku popisujeme sérii hypotéz týkajících se fenoménů long tail v entitách propojujících datové sady, jejich interakce a jejich vlivu na výkon systému. Naše systematická studie těchto hypotéz ukazuje, že hodnotící datové sady zachycují hlavní entity a pouze náhodně pokrývají data z ocasu, čímž povzbuzují systémy k přesahování do populárních/častých a nedvojznačných případů. Nejtěžší případy entity propojení najdeme mezi vzácnými kandidáty nejednoznačných forem. S našimi poznatky doufáme, že inspirujeme budoucí návrhy jak entity propojující systémy, tak hodnotící datové sady. Na podporu tohoto cíle poskytujeme seznam doporučených opatření pro lepší začlenění tail casu.', 'fi': 'Nykyaikaiset entiteettilinkittäjät saavuttavat todennäköisillä menetelmillä korkeat tarkkuuspisteet. Nämä pisteet olisi kuitenkin otettava huomioon niiden tietoaineistojen ominaisuuksien suhteen, joilla niitä arvioidaan. Tähän mennessä aineistoja linkittävien kokonaisuuksien ominaisuuksia ja niiden vaikutusta järjestelmän suorituskykyyn ei ole tutkittu systemaattisesti. Tässä artikkelissa selvitämme useita hypoteeseja, jotka koskevat pitkähäntäilmiöitä kokonaisuuksien linkittämisessä, niiden vuorovaikutusta ja niiden vaikutusta järjestelmän suorituskykyyn. Näiden hypoteesien systemaattinen tutkimus osoittaa, että arviointiaineistot keräävät pääosin pääyksiköitä ja kattavat vain satunnaisesti pyrstötietoja, mikä kannustaa järjestelmiä ylikuormittumaan suosituimpiin/usein esiintyviin ja epäselviin tapauksiin. Havaitsemme vaikeimmat tapaukset entiteettisidonnaisuudesta harvoin epäselvissä muodoissa olevien ehdokkaiden keskuudessa. Löydöksillämme toivomme inspiroivamme tulevaisuuden suunnitelmia sekä kokonaisuuksien linkittämisestä että arviointiaineistoista. Tämän tavoitteen tueksi tarjoamme luettelon suositelluista toimista, joilla pyrstötapausten sisällyttämistä voidaan parantaa.', 'jv': 'structural navigation Nanging, Punika sing nyong kudu tanggal dipunangé karo perusahaan dataset sing ditambahak Isih durung-ora ono karo sistem sing perusahaan nyong nggawe perusahaan anyari dadi nggawe dataset karo nggawe barang sistem sing bisa ngono nggawe barang sistem. Nang paper iki, kita balik banjur ilang keseng ipotes barang nggawé kuwi tindakan dataset, interaksi, lan nganggep kuwi nggawe barang sistem. Sistem-sistem arahan sing nggambar barang nggambar akeh hilipun kuwi bisa nguasai dataset kuwi nggawe barang kelas kuwi mau, nganggep kuwi diangkat dhéwé kuwi diangkat sing nyimpen, dadi nambah sistem kuwi nggawe populer/sakjane sak cara-pasar dumadhi. Awak dhéwé luwih akeh dhéwé, nik akeh operasi luwih dumadhi iki, nik akeh iso nguasai winih sing luwih apik dhéwé. Rasané awak dhéwé, dino awak dhéwé éneng pisan-sistem sing beraksi dadi nggawe barang sistem sing beraksi dadi kejahatan Kaya supokot karo bukane iki, awake dhéwé ngewehku operasi nggawe ngubah luwih dumadhi kanggo kebebasan Kase tuan.', 'he': 'State-of-the-art entity linkers achieve high accuracy scores with probabilistic methods.  However, these scores should be considered in relation to the properties of the datasets they are evaluated on.  עד עכשיו, לא הייתה חקירה מערכתית של תכונות היחידה שמקשרות קבוצות נתונים וההשפעה שלהם על ביצועי מערכת. בעיתון הזה אנחנו מדווחים על סדרה של היפותזיות בנוגע לתופעות הזנב הארוכה ביחידות שמקשרות קבוצות נתונים, האינטראקציה שלהם, וההשפעה שלהם על ביצועי מערכת. המחקר המערכת שלנו על ההיפתוזיות האלה מראה כי קבוצת נתונים הערכה בעיקר לכלוא יחידות ראשיות ורק במקרה מכסה נתונים מהזנב אנחנו מוצאים את המקרים הקשים ביותר של יחידה שקשורת בין המועמדים הלא נדירים של צורות סביבות. עם הממצאים שלנו, אנחנו מקווים לעורר השראה לעיצוב עתידי של שני היחידות שקשורות מערכות וקבוצות נתונים הערכה. כדי לתמוך במטרה הזאת, אנחנו מספקים רשימה של פעולות מומלצות לכלול טוב יותר מקרים זנב.', 'ha': "State-of-the-art entity linkers achieve high accuracy scores with probabilistic methods.  Amma, za'a ƙayyade wannan score zuwa ga tsarin da za'a ƙayyade su. Har zuwa yanzu, ba a sami wani jarraba bayani na halin abun da ke haɗa danne-danne da kuma an yi amfani da su kan performance na'ura. Ga wannan takardan, Munã warar da wasu misãlai masu husu ga abu na ƙarƙashin da ke cikin mazaɓa masu tsari da data, da interaction, da kuma matsayinsu a kan manyan aikin system. Ana karatunmu na masu lazima a kan wannan munafukan na nuna cewa, evaluation data ta kãma mainli masu nau'i, kuma kawai ke rufe data daga ƙarƙashin da ke a gaba ɗaya, don haka yana yarda da tsarin su sami zuwa masu jama'a/daidai da kuma bã masu fara-kwamfyuta. Munã sãmu mafi tsananin kashẽwar masu gaskiyar da ke haɗa cikin ma'auni masu baka. Da fassararmu, tuna kwaɗayin mu yi wahayi zuwa idãnun nan gaba ɗaya na masu da tsari da masu haɗi na'ura da masu bincike. Ga mu ƙarfafa wannan goa, za mu ƙayyade wani jerin aikin da aka umurce su da za'a shigar da kayan ƙarfe mafi alhẽri.", 'sk': 'Najsodobnejši povezovalci entitet z verjetnostnimi metodami dosegajo visoke točnosti. Vendar je treba te ocene upoštevati glede na lastnosti naborov podatkov, na katerih se ocenjujejo. Do zdaj ni bilo sistematične preiskave lastnosti subjektov, ki povezujejo nabore podatkov, in njihovega vpliva na delovanje sistema. V prispevku poročamo o vrsti hipotez o pojavu dolgega repa v entitetnih povezovalnih naborih podatkov, njihovi interakciji in njihovem vplivu na delovanje sistema. Naša sistematična študija teh hipotez kaže, da nabori podatkov ocenjevanja v glavnem zajemajo glavne subjekte in samo naključno zajemajo podatke iz repa, s čimer spodbujajo sisteme, da se preveč prilagajajo priljubljenim/pogostim in nedvoumnim primerom. Najtežji primeri entitetnega povezovanja med redkimi kandidati dvoumnih oblik najdemo. Z našimi ugotovitvami upamo, da bomo navdihnili prihodnje oblikovanje sistemov povezovanja entitet in naborov podatkov o vrednotenju. V podporo temu cilju smo pripravili seznam priporočenih ukrepov za boljšo vključitev primerov na repu.', 'bo': 'State-of-the-art entity linkers achieve high accuracy scores with probabilistic methods. ཡིན་ནའང་། རྩིས་འབྲས་འདི་དག་དེ་དག་ཚང་ཚང་གི་ངོ་བོའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་ལ་བསམ་དགོས། དང་གཅིག་གི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་གནས་སྟངས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བྱེད་པའི་དབུལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་དབུགས་རིམ་སྟོན་པའི་ལྟ་ཀློག་བྱ In this paper we report on a series of hypotheses regarding the long tail phenomena in entity linking datasets, their interaction, and their impact on system performance. ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སུ་རིགས་ཚན་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཚིག་གིས་མཐུན་གྱིས་མགོ་ཡི་གྲངས་བསྡུར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྣམ་པ་གནད་དོན་མེད་པའི་དབུགས་རྩའི་ནང་དུ་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཤོས་བ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་རྙེད་ཐུང་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་མ་འོངས་ལ་དབུལ་དང་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་ཆའི་མཐུད་སྣེ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་རིམ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡ དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདིས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་དགོས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐབས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐོ་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Neural Collective Entity Linking', 'ar': 'ربط الكيان الجماعي العصبي', 'es': 'Enlace de entidades colectivas neuronales', 'pt': 'Vinculação de Entidade Coletiva Neural', 'fr': "Lien d'entités collectives neuronales", 'ja': 'ニューラル・コレクティブ・エンティティ・リンク', 'zh': '神经合实体链接', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका सामूहिक एंटिटी लिंकिंग', 'ru': 'Связывание нейронных коллективных сущностей', 'ga': 'Nascáil Aonáin Chomhchoiteann Néaraigh', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neural Collective Entity Linking', 'el': 'Νευρική συλλογική σύνδεση οντοτήτων', 'it': 'Collegamento di entità collettive neurali', 'kk': 'Нейрондық жинақтау нысандарының сілтемесі', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dന്ന എന്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'Ir-rabta mal-Entità Kollettiva Newrali', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл хамтын нэгж холбогдол', 'lt': 'Neuralinio kolektyvinio subjekto ryšys', 'mk': 'Неурална колективна ентитетName', 'no': 'Nøyralt samling av einingar', 'ms': 'Pempautan Entiti Kolektif Neural', 'ro': 'Legătura dintre entitățile colective neurale', 'so': 'La xiriirka shirkadda naafada', 'pl': 'Połączenie podmiotów zbiorowych neuronalnych', 'sr': 'Povezivanje neuroloških kolektivnih jedinica', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් සංවේදන අංකත්වය ලින්ක් කරන්න', 'ur': 'نائورل کلکتیو اینٹیٹی لینک', 'sv': 'Koppling av neurala kollektiva enheter', 'ta': 'புதிய தொகுப்பு உள்ளீடு இணைப்பு', 'uz': 'Umumiy toĘ»plami bogĘ»lamasi', 'vi': 'Cấu hình thần kinh', 'bg': 'Свързване на невронни колективни същества', 'hr': 'Povezivanje neuronskih kolektivnih podataka', 'nl': 'Neurale collectieve entiteitenkoppeling', 'da': 'Neural Collective Entity Linking', 'de': 'Neurale kollektive Entitätenverknüpfung', 'id': 'Linking Entitas Kolektif Neural', 'fa': 'ارتباط واحد جمع عصبی', 'sw': 'Kiungo cha Umoja wa Kirusi', 'ko': '신경 집합 실체 연결', 'tr': 'Stencils', 'af': 'Nural Versameling Entiteit Linking', 'sq': 'Lidhja e njësisë kolektive nervore', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Նյարդային հավաքական անհատականության կապը', 'az': 'Nöral Kolektiv Entity Linking', 'bn': 'নিউরেল সংগ্রহের এন্টিটি লিংকিং', 'bs': 'Povezivanje neuroloških kolektivnih podataka', 'ca': 'enllaç entre entitats col·lectives neurals', 'fi': 'Neuroiden kollektiivisten entiteettien yhdistäminen', 'cs': 'Neurální kolektivní propojení entit', 'et': 'Neuraalse kollektiivse olemi seostamine', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'Link', 'sk': 'Povezovanje živčnih kolektivnih entitet', 'he': 'קישור גוויות קולקטיבית נוירולית', 'bo': 'སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་སྒྲིག་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད'}
{'en': 'Entity Linking aims to link entity mentions in texts to knowledge bases, and neural models have achieved recent success in this task. However, most existing methods rely on local contexts to resolve entities independently, which may usually fail due to the data sparsity of local information. To address this issue, we propose a novel neural model for collective entity linking, named as NCEL. NCEL apply Graph Convolutional Network to integrate both local contextual features and global coherence information for entity linking. To improve the computation efficiency, we approximately perform graph convolution on a subgraph of adjacent entity mentions instead of those in the entire text. We further introduce an attention scheme to improve the robustness of NCEL to data noise and train the model on Wikipedia hyperlinks to avoid overfitting and domain bias. In experiments, we evaluate NCEL on five publicly available datasets to verify the linking performance as well as generalization ability. We also conduct an extensive analysis of time complexity, the impact of key modules, and qualitative results, which demonstrate the effectiveness and efficiency of our proposed method.', 'ar': 'يهدف ربط الكيانات إلى ربط إشارات الكيانات في النصوص بقواعد المعرفة ، وقد حققت النماذج العصبية نجاحًا مؤخرًا في هذه المهمة. ومع ذلك ، تعتمد معظم الأساليب الحالية على السياقات المحلية لحل الكيانات بشكل مستقل ، والتي قد تفشل عادةً بسبب تباين البيانات في المعلومات المحلية. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح نموذجًا عصبيًا جديدًا لربط الكيان الجماعي ، يسمى NCEL. تطبق NCEL شبكة الرسم البياني التلافيفية لدمج كل من السمات السياقية المحلية ومعلومات التماسك العالمي لربط الكيانات. لتحسين كفاءة الحساب ، نقوم تقريبًا بإجراء التفاف للرسم البياني على رسم بياني فرعي لكيانات مجاورة مذكورة بدلاً من تلك الموجودة في النص بأكمله. نقدم أيضًا مخطط اهتمام لتحسين متانة NCEL لضوضاء البيانات وتدريب النموذج على ارتباطات Wikipedia التشعبية لتجنب فرط التخصيص وتحيز المجال. في التجارب ، قمنا بتقييم NCEL على خمس مجموعات بيانات متاحة للجمهور للتحقق من أداء الربط وكذلك القدرة على التعميم. نجري أيضًا تحليلًا شاملاً لتعقيد الوقت ، وتأثير الوحدات الرئيسية ، والنتائج النوعية ، والتي توضح فعالية وكفاءة طريقتنا المقترحة.', 'es': 'Entity Linking tiene como objetivo vincular las menciones de entidades en los textos con las bases de conocimiento, y los modelos neuronales han logrado un éxito reciente en esta Sin embargo, la mayoría de los métodos existentes se basan en contextos locales para resolver entidades de forma independiente, lo que generalmente puede fallar debido a la escasez de datos de la información local. Para abordar este problema, proponemos un modelo neuronal novedoso para la vinculación colectiva de entidades, denominado NCEL. NCEL aplica Graph Convolutional Network para integrar tanto las características contextuales locales como la información de coherencia global para la vinculación de entidades. Para mejorar la eficiencia del cálculo, realizamos aproximadamente una convolución gráfica en un subgráfico de menciones de entidades adyacentes en lugar de en todo el texto. Además, introducimos un esquema de atención para mejorar la solidez de NCEL ante el ruido de los datos y entrenamos el modelo en los hipervínculos de Wikipedia para evitar el sobreajuste y el sesgo de dominio. En experimentos, evaluamos NCEL en cinco conjuntos de datos disponibles públicamente para verificar el rendimiento de la vinculación y la capacidad de generalización. También realizamos un análisis exhaustivo de la complejidad del tiempo, el impacto de los módulos clave y los resultados cualitativos, que demuestran la eficacia y eficiencia de nuestro método propuesto.', 'fr': "Entity Linking vise à relier les mentions d'entités dans les textes aux bases de connaissances, et les modèles neuronaux ont récemment obtenu un succès dans cette tâche. Cependant, la plupart des méthodes existantes s'appuient sur des contextes locaux pour résoudre les entités indépendamment, ce qui peut généralement échouer en raison de la rareté des données locales. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un nouveau modèle neuronal pour la liaison collective d'entités, appelé NCEL. NCEL applique Graph Convolutional Network pour intégrer à la fois des caractéristiques contextuelles locales et des informations de cohérence globale pour la liaison d'entités. Pour améliorer l'efficacité du calcul, nous effectuons approximativement une convolution de graphe sur un sous-graphe de mentions d'entités adjacentes au lieu de celles du texte entier. Nous introduisons également un système d'attention pour améliorer la robustesse du NCEL au bruit des données et entraîner le modèle sur les hyperliens Wikipédia afin d'éviter le surajustement et le biais de domaine. Dans le cadre d'expériences, nous évaluons NCEL sur cinq ensembles de données accessibles au public afin de vérifier les performances de liaison ainsi que la capacité de généralisation. Nous effectuons également une analyse approfondie de la complexité temporelle, de l'impact des modules clés et des résultats qualitatifs, qui démontrent l'efficacité et l'efficience de la méthode que nous proposons.", 'pt': 'Entity Linking visa vincular menções de entidades em textos a bases de conhecimento, e modelos neurais têm alcançado sucesso recente nessa tarefa. No entanto, a maioria dos métodos existentes depende de contextos locais para resolver entidades de forma independente, o que geralmente pode falhar devido à escassez de dados de informações locais. Para resolver esse problema, propomos um novo modelo neural para vinculação de entidades coletivas, denominado NCEL. O NCEL aplica Graph Convolutional Network para integrar recursos contextuais locais e informações de coerência global para vinculação de entidades. Para melhorar a eficiência da computação, realizamos aproximadamente a convolução do gráfico em um subgrafo de menções de entidades adjacentes, em vez daquelas em todo o texto. Introduzimos ainda um esquema de atenção para melhorar a robustez do NCEL ao ruído de dados e treinar o modelo nos hiperlinks da Wikipedia para evitar overfitting e viés de domínio. Em experimentos, avaliamos o NCEL em cinco conjuntos de dados disponíveis publicamente para verificar o desempenho de vinculação, bem como a capacidade de generalização. Também realizamos uma extensa análise da complexidade do tempo, do impacto dos módulos-chave e dos resultados qualitativos, que demonstram a eficácia e eficiência do nosso método proposto.', 'ja': 'エンティティリンクは、テキストでのエンティティの言及をナレッジベースにリンクすることを目的としており、ニューラルモデルはこのタスクで最近成功を収めています。 しかし、ほとんどの既存の方法は、エンティティを独立して解決するためにローカルコンテキストに依存しています。これは、ローカル情報のデータの希少性のために通常失敗する可能性があります。 この問題に対処するために、私たちは、NCELと名付けられた、集合的エンティティリンクのための新規のニューラルモデルを提案します。 NCELは、グラフ畳み込みネットワークを適用して、エンティティリンクのためのローカルコンテキスト機能とグローバルコヒーレンス情報の両方を統合します。 計算効率を向上させるために、全体のテキストではなく、隣接するエンティティのサブグラフでグラフ畳み込みをおおよそ実行します。 さらに、データノイズに対するNCELの堅牢性を向上させ、ウィキペディアのハイパーリンクでモデルをトレーニングして、オーバーフィッティングやドメインバイアスを回避するための注意スキームを導入します。 実験では、我々は５つの公開されているデータセット上のＮＣＥＬを評価し、リンク性能と一般化能力を検証する。 また、提案された方法の有効性と効率性を示す、時間の複雑さ、主要なモジュールの影響、および定性的な結果の広範な分析も行います。', 'zh': '实体链接旨链接文本于知识库,神经模形近成于此。 然多依本上下文以立解析体,盖数疏而败也。 为此一体链接新型神经形,命曰NCEL。 NCEL宜用图形卷积网络以成局上下文特徵全局一致性信息,以成实体链接。 为高计效率,近于邻实提及子图上行图卷积,不在全文中行图卷积。 引入一方,以崇NCEL噪声之鲁棒性,练模形于维基百科超链接之上,以避拟合域之差。 实验之中,五公之数集上评估NCEL,以验链接性及泛化能。 时复杂性要模块,定性而博论,明有效性效率也。', 'hi': 'एंटिटी लिंकिंग का उद्देश्य ग्रंथों में उल्लेखित इकाई को ज्ञान के आधार से जोड़ना है, और तंत्रिका मॉडल ने इस कार्य में हाल ही में सफलता हासिल की है। हालांकि, अधिकांश मौजूदा विधियां स्वतंत्र रूप से संस्थाओं को हल करने के लिए स्थानीय संदर्भों पर निर्भर करती हैं, जो आमतौर पर स्थानीय जानकारी के डेटा स्पार्सिटी के कारण विफल हो सकती हैं। इस मुद्दे को हल करने के लिए, हम सामूहिक इकाई को जोड़ने के लिए एक उपन्यास तंत्रिका मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसे एनसीएल के रूप में नामित किया गया है। NCEL दोनों स्थानीय प्रासंगिक सुविधाओं और इकाई लिंकिंग के लिए वैश्विक सुसंगतता जानकारी को एकीकृत करने के लिए ग्राफ कनवल्शनल नेटवर्क लागू करते हैं। गणना दक्षता में सुधार करने के लिए, हम लगभग पूरे पाठ में उन लोगों के बजाय आसन्न इकाई के एक सबग्राफ पर ग्राफ कनवल्शन करते हैं। हम आगे डेटा शोर के लिए NCEL की मजबूती में सुधार करने के लिए एक ध्यान योजना शुरू करते हैं और ओवरफिटिंग और डोमेन पूर्वाग्रह से बचने के लिए विकिपीडिया हाइपरलिंक पर मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। प्रयोगों में, हम लिंकिंग प्रदर्शन के साथ-साथ सामान्यीकरण क्षमता को सत्यापित करने के लिए पांच सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध डेटासेट पर NCEL का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम समय की जटिलता, प्रमुख मॉड्यूल के प्रभाव और गुणात्मक परिणामों का एक व्यापक विश्लेषण भी करते हैं, जो हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि की प्रभावशीलता और दक्षता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Привязка сущностей направлена на увязку упоминаний сущностей в текстах с базами знаний, и нейронные модели добились в последнее время успеха в этой задаче. Тем не менее, большинство существующих методов полагаются на локальные контексты для самостоятельного разрешения сущностей, что, как правило, может привести к сбою из-за ограниченности данных локальной информации. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем новую нейронную модель для связывания коллективных сущностей, названную NCEL. NCEL применяет Graph Convolutional Network для интеграции как локальных контекстных функций, так и информации о глобальной согласованности для связывания сущностей. Чтобы повысить эффективность вычислений, мы приблизительно выполняем свертку графа на подграфе упоминаний смежных сущностей вместо упоминаний во всем тексте. Мы далее вводим схему внимания для повышения надежности NCEL к шуму данных и обучаем модель по гиперссылкам Википедии, чтобы избежать переобучения и смещения домена. В экспериментах мы оцениваем NCEL на пяти общедоступных наборах данных для проверки эффективности связывания, а также способности к обобщению. Мы также проводим обширный анализ временной сложности, влияния ключевых модулей и качественных результатов, которые демонстрируют эффективность и результативность предложенного нами метода.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag Nascáil Aonáin tagairtí aonáin i dtéacsanna a nascadh le bunachair eolais, agus d’éirigh le samhlacha néaracha sa tasc seo le déanaí. Mar sin féin, braitheann an chuid is mó de na modhanna atá ann cheana féin ar chomhthéacsanna áitiúla chun eintitis a réiteach go neamhspleách, rud a d’fhéadfadh teip a bheith orthu de ghnáth mar gheall ar ghanntanas sonraí na faisnéise áitiúla. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, molaimid samhail néarúil nua le haghaidh nascadh aonán comhchoiteann, ainmnithe mar NCEL. Cuireann NCEL Líonra Comhdhlúite Graf i bhfeidhm chun gnéithe comhthéacsúla áitiúla agus faisnéis chomhleanúnachais dhomhanda a chomhtháthú le haghaidh nascadh aonáin. Chun an éifeachtúlacht ríomha a fheabhsú, déanaimid convolution graif a bheag nó a mhór ar fhoghraf de lua aonáin chóngaracha seachas iad siúd atá sa téacs iomlán. Thugaimid isteach scéim aird freisin chun láidreacht an NCEL maidir le torann sonraí a fheabhsú agus an tsamhail a oiliúint ar hipearnaisc Vicipéid chun rófheisteas agus laofacht fearainn a sheachaint. I dturgnaimh, déanaimid measúnú ar NCEL ar chúig thacar sonraí atá ar fáil go poiblí chun an fheidhmíocht nasctha chomh maith le cumas ginearálaithe a fhíorú. Déanaimid anailís fhairsing freisin ar chastacht ama, ar thionchar na bpríomh-mhodúil, agus ar thorthaí cáilíochtúla, a léiríonn éifeachtacht agus éifeachtúlacht ár modh molta.', 'el': 'Η σύνδεση οντοτήτων έχει ως στόχο να συνδέσει αναφορές οντοτήτων σε κείμενα με βάσεις γνώσης, και τα νευρωνικά μοντέλα έχουν επιτύχει πρόσφατη επιτυχία σε αυτό το έργο. Ωστόσο, οι περισσότερες υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι βασίζονται σε τοπικά πλαίσια για να επιλύσουν οντότητες ανεξάρτητα, κάτι που συνήθως μπορεί να αποτύχει λόγω της έλλειψης δεδομένων των τοπικών πληροφοριών. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε ένα νέο νευρωνικό μοντέλο για τη συλλογική σύνδεση οντοτήτων, που ονομάζεται NCEL. Το NCEL εφαρμόζει το Δίκτυο Σύγκλισης Γραφημάτων για να ενσωματώσει τόσο τοπικά χαρακτηριστικά περιβάλλοντος όσο και πληροφορίες παγκόσμιας συνοχής για τη σύνδεση οντοτήτων. Για να βελτιωθεί η αποδοτικότητα του υπολογισμού, κατά προσέγγιση εκτελούμε σύγχυση γραφήματος σε ένα υπογράφημα των αναφορών παρακείμενων οντοτήτων αντί αυτών σε ολόκληρο το κείμενο. Περαιτέρω εισάγουμε ένα σχέδιο προσοχής για τη βελτίωση της ανθεκτικότητας του στον θόρυβο δεδομένων και εκπαιδεύουμε το μοντέλο σε υπερσυνδέσεις της Βικιπαίδειας για να αποφύγουμε την υπερπροσαρμογή και την προκατάληψη των τομέων. Σε πειράματα αξιολογούμε το NCEL σε πέντε δημόσια διαθέσιμα σύνολα δεδομένων για να επαληθεύσουμε την απόδοση σύνδεσης καθώς και τη δυνατότητα γενικοποίησης. Επίσης, διεξάγουμε εκτενή ανάλυση της πολυπλοκότητας του χρόνου, του αντίκτυπου των βασικών ενοτήτων και ποιοτικών αποτελεσμάτων, τα οποία αποδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα και την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης μεθόδου.', 'hu': 'Az Entity Linking célja, hogy összekapcsolja a szövegekben szereplő entitás említéseket a tudásbázisokhoz, és az idegi modellek a közelmúltban sikereket értek el ebben a feladatban. A legtöbb meglévő módszer azonban helyi kontextusokra támaszkodik az entitások önállóan történő megoldásához, ami általában a helyi információk szűkössége miatt kudarcot vallhat. Ennek a kérdésnek a megoldására egy új neurális modellt javasolunk a kollektív entitások összekapcsolására, NCEL néven. Az NCEL a Graph Convolutional Network alkalmazásával integrálja mind a helyi kontextuális jellemzőket, mind a globális koherencia információkat az entitások összekapcsolásához. A számítási hatékonyság javítása érdekében a teljes szövegben lévő szomszédos entitás említések helyett grafikonkonzoluációt végzünk. Bevezetünk továbbá egy figyelmet arra, hogy javítsuk az NCEL robusztusságát az adatok zajával szemben, és a Wikipédia hiperhivatkozási modelljét képezzük, hogy elkerüljük a túlteljesítést és a domain elfogultságát. Kísérletekben öt nyilvánosan elérhető adatkészleten értékeljük az NCEL-t, hogy ellenőrizzük a kapcsolódási teljesítményt és az általánosítási képességet. Emellett átfogó elemzést végzünk az időbonyolultságról, a kulcsfontosságú modulok hatásáról és a minőségi eredményekről, amelyek bizonyítják javasolt módszerünk hatékonyságát és hatékonyságát.', 'ka': 'Entity Linking მიზეზია, რომ ტექსტის შესახებ ინტერტიკების შესახებ ცნობიერების ბაზების შესახებ, და ნეიროლური მოდელები ამ დავალებში უკვე წარმოდგენა. მაგრამ უფრო მეტი არსებობს პოკტექსტებზე, რომელიც ადგილური ინფორმაციის შესაძლებლობად მონაცემების შესაძლებლობად არსებობს. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით ნეიროლური მოდელის კოლექტური ელექტიკის დაკავშირება, რომელიც NCEL. Comment გამოსახულებელი ეფექტიურობის გასაკეთებლად, ჩვენ დავამუშავებთ გრაფიკური კონგულუციას მინუს ელექტიკის სპეგრაფიკაში, რომელიც ყველა ტექსტში ამბობს. ჩვენ დავიყენებთ მონაცემების სქემი, რომელიც NCEL-ის ძალიან ძალიან გავაკეთებს მონაცემების ბუნში და მოდელს ვიკიპედიაში ჰიპერლინქციების მოწყობინებას, რომ გადარჩენოთ და ექსპერიმენტებში, ჩვენ NCEL-ს ხუთი ადამიანიურად ხელმისაწარმოდგინული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის შესაძლებლობად დავწეროთ კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურ ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ დიდი ანალიზი დროის კომპლექსიტების, კლავიტური მოდულების და კვალიტური შედეგების შედეგების, რომლებიც ჩვენი პროგრამის ეფექტიურობა და ეფექტიურ', 'it': "Entity Linking mira a collegare le menzioni di entità nei testi alle basi di conoscenza, e i modelli neurali hanno raggiunto recentemente successo in questo compito. Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei metodi esistenti si basano su contesti locali per risolvere le entità in modo indipendente, che di solito possono fallire a causa della scarsità di dati delle informazioni locali. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo un nuovo modello neurale per il collegamento di entità collettive, denominato NCEL. NCEL applica Graph Convolutional Network per integrare sia le caratteristiche contestuali locali che le informazioni sulla coerenza globale per il collegamento di entità. Per migliorare l'efficienza di calcolo, eseguiamo approssimativamente la convoluzione del grafico su un sottografico di menzioni di entità adiacenti invece di quelle nell'intero testo. Introduciamo inoltre uno schema di attenzione per migliorare la robustezza del NCEL al rumore dei dati e addestriamo il modello sui collegamenti ipertestuali Wikipedia per evitare sovrafittiziamenti e distorsioni del dominio. In esperimenti, valutiamo NCEL su cinque set di dati pubblicamente disponibili per verificare le prestazioni di collegamento e la capacità di generalizzazione. Conduciamo anche un'analisi approfondita della complessità temporale, dell'impatto dei moduli chiave e dei risultati qualitativi, che dimostrano l'efficacia e l'efficienza del metodo proposto.", 'kk': 'Нөлшектерді сілтемелеу мәтіндерінде мәтіндерді білім негізіне сілтемелеу мақсатты, және невралдық моделдері осы тапсырманың соңғы сәттігіне жеткізді. Бірақ барлық әдістердің көпшілігі жергілікті мәліметтерді жергілікті контексттерге тәуелдіру үшін, олар әдетте жергілікті мәліметтердің бөлімінен қайта Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін, біз NCEL деп аталатын жинақталған нысандар үшін романдық неврал үлгісін ұсынамыз. NCEL жергілікті контексті мүмкіндіктерді және жалпы қатынау мәліметін біріктіру үшін графикалық құрылғы желісін қолдану үшін қолданылады. Есептеу мүмкіндігін жақсарту үшін, біз графикалық көлемін барлық мәтіндегі бөлшектерінің орнына жазылатын нысандардың ішінде орындаймыз. Келесіден біз NCEL деректердің дыбыстығын жақсарту үшін, Wikipedia гиперлинктерінің үлгісін өзгертіп, доменге қарсы болмау үшін түсінікті сұлбаны таңдаймыз. Тәжірибелерде, біз NCEL бес жалпы деректер қорларына қосылу мүмкіндігін және жалпы түрлендіру мүмкіндігін тексеру үшін бағалаймыз. Біз сондай-ақ уақыттың тәжірибесін, басқа модульдердің нәтижесін және квалификациялық нәтижесін тең анализ істейміз. Бұл таңдалған әдіміміздің ефективнігін және', 'mk': 'Entity Linking aims to link entity mentions in texts to knowledge bases, and neural models have achieved recent success in this task.  Сепак, повеќето постоечки методи зависат од локалните контексти за независно решавање на ентитетите, кои обично можат да пропаднат поради малоста на податоци на локалните информации. За да го решиме ова прашање, предложуваме нов нервен модел за колективен ентитет кој се поврзува, наречен NCEL. NCEL аплицира графска конволуционална мрежа за интегрирање на локалните контекстни карактеристики и глобални информации за конеквентност за поврзување на ентитетите. За да ја подобриме компјутерската ефикасност, ние приближно изведуваме графска конволуција на подграфот на соседниот ентитет споменува наместо оние во целиот текст. Понатаму воведуваме схема на внимание за подобрување на силноста на НЦЕЛ кон бучава на податоци и обука на моделот на хиперлинковите на Википедија за да избегнеме прекумерно пристапување и предрасудување на домените. Во експериментите, ние ја проценуваме НЦЕЛ на пет јавно достапни податоци за да ја потврдиме врзувачката перформанса, како и способноста за генерализација. Исто така, спроведуваме широка анализа на временската комплексност, влијанието на клучните модули и квалитетните резултати, кои ја покажуваат ефикасноста и ефикасноста на нашиот предложен метод.', 'ms': 'Pempautan Entiti bertujuan untuk paut sebutan entiti dalam teks kepada asas pengetahuan, dan model saraf telah mencapai kejayaan baru-baru ini dalam tugas ini. Namun, kebanyakan kaedah yang ada bergantung pada konteks setempat untuk menyelesaikan entiti secara independen, yang biasanya gagal kerana kecepatan data maklumat setempat. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami cadangkan model saraf baru untuk menghubungkan entiti kolektif, bernama NCEL. Name Untuk meningkatkan efisiensi pengiraan, kita kira-kira melakukan konvolusi graf pada subgraf entiti bersebelahan menyebut selain daripada yang dalam seluruh teks. We further introduce an attention scheme to improve the robustness of NCEL to data noise and train the model on Wikipedia hyperlinks to avoid overfitting and domain bias.  Dalam eksperimen, kami menilai NCEL pada lima set data yang tersedia secara awam untuk mengesahkan prestasi sambungan serta kemampuan generalisasi. Kami juga melakukan analisis yang luas tentang kompleksiti masa, kesan modul kunci, dan keputusan kualitatif, yang menunjukkan keefektivitas dan efisiensi kaedah yang kami cadangkan.', 'ml': 'എന്റിറ്റിറ്റി ലിങ്ങിങ്ങ് വിവരങ്ങളിലെ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പേരുകള്\u200d അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തേക്ക് ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേ എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള മിക്കവിധ രീതികളില്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യം വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d പരിഹരിക്കാന്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്ന ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, NCEL എന്ന പേരുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നാം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ് സാധാരണ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രാദേശികമായ വിശേഷങ്ങളും ഗ്രാഫ് കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d ശൃംഖലം പ്രയോഗിക്കുക. കണക്കെടുത്തിന്റെ സാധ്യത മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, മുഴുവന്\u200d പദാവലിയിലുള്ള പേരുകള്\u200dക്ക് പകരം അടുത്തുള്ള ഒരു സബ്ഗ്രാഫിലെ ഗ്രാഫ We further introduce an attention scheme to improve the robustness of NCEL to data noise and train the model on Wikipedia hyperlinks to avoid overfitting and domain bias.  പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d അഞ്ച് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വിലയിക്കുന്നു. ലിങ്ങിങ്ങ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളും ജനറലേഷ സമയത്തിന്റെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണത്തിന്റെയും താക്കോലുകളുടെയും പ്രഭാവം, വിവിധ ഫലങ്ങളുടെയും പ്രഭാവം, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതി', 'mt': 'L-Entity Linking għandha l-għan li torbot is-semmiet tal-entità fit-testi mal-bażijiet tal-għarfien, u mudelli newrali kisbu suċċess reċenti f’dan il-kompitu. However, most existing methods rely on local contexts to resolve entities independently, which may usually fail due to the data sparsity of local information.  Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, nipproponu mudell newrali ġdid għal entità kollettiva li torbot, imsejħa NCEL. L-NCEL japplika n-Netwerk ta’ Konvenzjoni tal-Grafiki biex jintegra kemm il-karatteristiċi kuntestwali lokali kif ukoll l-informazzjoni ta’ koerenza globali għall-konnessjoni tal-entitajiet. Biex tittejjeb l-effiċjenza fil-komputazzjoni, a ħna bejn wieħed u ieħor twettaq konvoluzzjoni tal-graff fuq sottografu ta’ entità maġenb isemmi minflok dawk fit-test kollu. Aħna nintroduċu wkoll skema ta’ attenzjoni biex itejbu r-robustezza tal-NCEL għall-istorbju tad-dejta u nħarrġu l-mudell fuq l-hyperlinks tal-Wikipedia biex tiġi evitata t-twaħħil żejjed u l-preġudizzju tad-dominju. Fl-esperimenti, jivvalutaw l-NCEL fuq ħames settijiet ta’ dejta disponibbli għall-pubbliku biex jivverifikaw il-prestazzjoni ta’ rabta kif ukoll il-kapaċità ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni. Għandna nagħmlu wkoll analiżi estensiva tal-kumplessità taż-żmien, l-impatt tal-moduli ewlenin, u r-riżultati kwalitattivi, li juru l-effettività u l-effiċjenza tal-metodu propost tagħna.', 'no': 'Entitetslenking mål å kopla opplysningar i tekst til kunnskapsbaser, og nøyralmodeller har oppnådd nyleg suksess i denne oppgåva. Dei fleste eksisterande metodane er imidlertid på lokale kontekstar for å løysa einingar uavhengig, som vanlegvis kan mislukka på grunn av datasparsiteten av lokale informasjon. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi ein novel neuralmodell for å kopla saman til samlingar, kalla som NCEL. Comment For å forbetra dataeffektiviteten, utfører vi omtrent grafikkkonvolusjon på ein undergraf av tilhøyrande eininga i staden for dei i hele teksten. Vi introduserer meir eit oppmerksområde for å forbetra styrken på NCEL til datastøy og trena modellen på Wikipedia-hyperlinkar for å unngå overpassende og domeneforvirksområde. I eksperimenter evaluerer vi NCEL på fem offentlig tilgjengelege datasett for å stadfesta tilkoplingsfunksjonen og generelliseringsfunksjonen. Vi gjer også eit utvida analyse av tidsplleksitet, effekten av nøkkelmodular og kvalitative resultat, som demonstrerer effektiviteten og effektiviteten av vår foreslått metode.', 'mn': 'Entity Linking-ын зорилго нь нэг зүйлийг мэдлэг суурь дээр хэлж байгааг, мэдлэг суурь дээр холбогдох зорилго, мэдрэлийн загварууд энэ ажил дээр саяхан амжилттай болсон. Гэвч ихэнх суурилсан арга баримтууд орон нутгийн мэдээллийн бөөмбөлөг байдлын тухай бие биетүүдийг ганцаараа шийдвэрлэх зорилготой байдаг. Энэ асуудлыг олохын тулд бид NCEL гэдэг нийгмийн нэгж холбогдох шинэ мэдрэлийн загварыг санал болгоно. NCEL холбоотой байрлал болон ертөнцийн холбоотой холбоотой дэлхийн холбоотой мэдээлэл холбоотой график хөгжлийн сүлжээг ашигладаг. Хэрэв тооцооллын үр дүнг сайжруулахын тулд бид ойролцоогоор ойролцоогоор ойролцоогоор ойролцоогоор тооцооллын нэг хэсэг дээр график холбоотой байдаг. Бид NCEL-ын хүчтэй байдлыг өгөгдлийн чимээг дээр сайжруулахын тулд анхаарлын төлөвлөгөө тайлбарлаж, Wikipedia-ын гиперхолбоотой загварын загварыг суралцах болно. Тууралд бид НЦЕЛ-г олон нийтэд ашиглаж байгаа өгөгдлийн санд холбоотой үйл ажиллагааг, ерөнхийлөгч чадварыг шалгахын тулд үнэлдэг. Мөн бид цаг хугацааны цогц байдлыг, түлхүүр модульын нөлөө, чадвартай үр дүнг олон шинжилгээ хийдэг. Энэ нь бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга замын үр дүнг, үр дүнг үзүүлдэг.', 'pl': 'Entity Linking ma na celu powiązanie wzmianek jednostek w tekstach z bazami wiedzy, a modele neuronowe osiągnęły ostatnio sukces w tym zadaniu. Jednak większość istniejących metod opiera się na lokalnych kontekstach w celu samodzielnego rozwiązywania podmiotów, co zazwyczaj może się nie udać ze względu na ograniczenie danych lokalnych informacji. Aby rozwiązać tę kwestię, proponujemy nowy model neuronowy dla łączenia zbiorowych podmiotów o nazwie NCEL. NCEL stosuje Graph Convolutional Network do integracji zarówno lokalnych funkcji kontekstowych, jak i globalnych informacji o spójności dla łączenia podmiotów. Aby poprawić efektywność obliczeń, w przybliżeniu wykonujemy zwolnienie wykresu na podgrafie sąsiednich wzmianek jednostek zamiast tych w całym tekście. Ponadto wprowadzamy schemat uwagi mający na celu poprawę odporności NCEL na szumy danych i trenujemy model na hiperłączach Wikipedii, aby uniknąć nadmiernego dopasowania i uprzedzeń domeny. W eksperymentach oceniamy NCEL na pięciu publicznie dostępnych zbiorach danych, aby zweryfikować wydajność łączenia i zdolność uogólnienia. Przeprowadzamy również obszerną analizę złożoności czasu, wpływu kluczowych modułów oraz wyników jakościowych, które pokazują skuteczność i skuteczność proponowanej metody.', 'ro': 'Entity Linking își propune să conecteze mențiunile entităților din texte la bazele de cunoștințe, iar modelele neurale au obținut succes recent în această sarcină. Cu toate acestea, majoritatea metodelor existente se bazează pe contextele locale pentru a rezolva entitățile în mod independent, care, de obicei, pot eșua din cauza lipsei de date a informațiilor locale. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem un nou model neural pentru conectarea entităților colective, denumit NCEL. NCEL aplică Graph Convolutional Network pentru a integra atât caracteristici contextuale locale, cât și informații de coerență globală pentru conectarea entităților. Pentru a îmbunătăți eficiența calculului, efectuăm aproximativ convoluția graficului pe un subgraf al mențiunilor entităților adiacente în loc de cele din întregul text. De asemenea, introducem o schemă de atenție pentru a îmbunătăți robustețea NCEL la zgomotul de date și instruim modelul pe hyperlinkurile Wikipedia pentru a evita suprasolicitarea și părtinirea domeniului. În experimente, evaluăm NCEL pe cinci seturi de date disponibile public pentru a verifica performanța de legătură, precum și capacitatea de generalizare. De asemenea, efectuăm o analiză amplă a complexității timpului, a impactului modulelor cheie și a rezultatelor calitative, care demonstrează eficiența și eficiența metodei propuse.', 'lt': 'Subjektų sąsajos tikslas – susieti tekstuose nurodytus subjektus su žinių bazėmis ir neseniai šioje užduotyje sėkmingai pasiekė neurologiniai modeliai. However, most existing methods rely on local contexts to resolve entities independently, which may usually fail due to the data sparsity of local information.  Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, siūlome naują kolektyvinio subjekto, jungiančio ryšį, model į, vadinamą NCEL. NCEL taiko konvoliucinį grafinį tinklą, kad integruotų tiek vietos kontekstines savybes, tiek visuotinę nuoseklumo informaciją susiejantiems subjektams. Siekiant padidinti skaičiavimo efektyvumą, mes apytiksliai atliekame grafikos konvoliuciją gretimo subjekto pografe, užuot paminėję visuose tekstuose. Be to, įvedame dėmesio schemą, kuria siekiama pagerinti NCEL patikimumą duomenų triukšmui ir mokyti Wikipedia hiperlinkių model į, kad būtų išvengta pernelyg didelio įrengimo ir sklandumo dominėse srityse. In experiments, we evaluate NCEL on five publicly available datasets to verify the linking performance as well as generalization ability.  Taip pat atliekame išsamią laiko sudėtingumo, pagrindinių modulių poveikio ir kokybinių rezultatų analizę, kuri parodo mūsų siūlomo metodo veiksmingumą ir veiksmingumą.', 'sr': 'Povezivanje entiteta cilja je povezati spomenute entitete u tekstima sa bazama znanja, a neuralni modeli su postigli nedavni uspeh u ovom zadatku. Međutim, većina postojećih metoda se oslanja na lokalne kontekste za rješavanje entitata nezavisno, koje obično mogu propasti zbog rezerviteta podataka lokalnih informacija. Da bi se riješili ovom pitanju, predlažemo nov neuralni model za kolektivnu vezu, po imenu NCEL. NCEL primjenjuje konvolucionalnu mrežu grafika kako bi integrirala lokalne kontekstske funkcije i globalne informacije o saskaņosti za povezivanje entiteta. Da bismo poboljšali računalnu efikasnost, približno izvršili konvoluciju grafika na podgrafu sljedećih entiteta spominje umjesto onih u celom tekstu. Dalje predstavljamo pažnju šemu za poboljšanje snage NCEL-a na buku podataka i obučavamo model na hiperlinkama Wikipedije kako bi se izbjegao predrasude prekopterećenja i domena. U eksperimentima, procjenjujemo NCEL na pet javno dostupnih podataka kako bi potvrdili povezanje provedbe i sposobnost generalizacije. Takođe vodimo ogromnu analizu složenosti vremena, utjecaja ključnih modula i kvalitativnih rezultata, koji pokazuju učinkovitost i efikasnost našeg predloženog metoda.', 'si': 'අන්තිත්වය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් අදහස් කරනවා අන්තිත්වය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් පාළුවන් සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන් නමුත්, ගොඩක් විදිහට තියෙන විදිහට ස්ථානික සම්බන්ධතාවයේ ස්ථානික සම්බන්ධතාවට අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න, ඒක සාමාන්\u200d මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විධානය කරන්න, අපි සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, NCEL කියලා. NCEL ස්ථානික සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ ජාතික සම්බන්ධතාවක් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් සම්බන්ධ ජා පරිගණනය වැඩ කරන්න, අපි සම්පූර්ණ පාළුවන්ගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ග්\u200dරාෆ් කොන්වෝල්යුස් කරන්න. අපි තවදුරටත් අවධානයක් පරීක්ෂා කරනවා NCEL ගේ ශක්තිමතාවට දත්ත ශබ්දයක් වැඩ කරන්න සහ විකිපිඩියා හායිපර්ලින්ක් වල මොඩේල් එක පරීක්ෂණාවට, අපි NCEL විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ සාමාන්\u200dයය සම්බන්ධතා අපි වෙලාවට විශාල විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරනවා, යතුරු මොඩියෝල් වල ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒක', 'ta': 'Entity Linking aims to link entity mentions in texts to knowledge bases, and neural models have achieved recent success in this task.  However, most of existing methods rely on local contexts to resolve entities independently, which usually failed because of data sparsity of local information. இந்த பிரச்சனையை முகவரிக்க, நாம் NCEL என்று பெயரிடப்பட்ட ஒரு புதிய புதிய பாதுகாரி மாதிரி முறைமையை நிர்ணயி @ info கணிக்கும் செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த, நாம் குறைந்த வரைப்படத்தை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம் சமீபத்திலுள்ள பொருள் குறிப்புகளின் துண நாம் மேலும் ஒரு கவனம் திட்டத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் தகவல் சப்தம் மேம்படுத்த மற்றும் விகிபிடியா மின்னஞ்சல் மாதிரியை பயிற்சி மற்றும் க பரிசோதனைகளில், நாம் ஐந்து பொதுவான கிடைக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் இணைப்பு செயல்பாட்டை மற்றும் பொது நாம் நேரத்தின் சிக்கல், விசை கூறுகளின் விளைவுகள், மற்றும் தகுதியின் விளைவுகளையும் செயல்படுத்துகிறோம். இது நம் பரிந்துரைய முறைமையின', 'ur': 'انٹیٹی لینکنگ کا ارادہ ہے کہ ایک ٹیکسٹ کے ذریعے ایک ٹیکسٹ کے ذریعے علم بنسس کے ساتھ لینک کریں، اور نیورال نمڈل اس کام میں اچھی موفقیت پہنچ چکی ہے۔ However, most existing methods rely on local contexts to resolve entities independently, which may usually fail due to the data sparsity of local information. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم نے ایک نئورل موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہے جو ایک جمع ایٹنی کی نسبت ہے، جس کا نام NCEL ہے. NCEL ایک ٹیٹی لینک کے لئے گراف کنویلوشن نیٹ ورک کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ کمپیوٹر کے مطابق زیادہ کرنا، ہم تقریباً گراف کونولوشن کریں گے اس کے علاوہ جو تمام متن میں لکھی جاتی ہے، ایک قریب دار ایٹنی کے سپگراف میں لکھی جاتی ہے. ہم اس کے بعد NCEL کی مضبوطی کو مزید دکھانے کے لئے ایک توجه کا طریقہ پیش کریں اور ویکیپیڈیا ہیپر لینک کے مدل کو دکھانے کے لئے اوپر فائدہ اٹھانے کے لئے اور ڈومین کی غرض سے بچانے کے لئے تربیت کریں۔ آزمائش میں، ہم نے نچ سیل کو پانچ عمومی دسترسی ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ مطابق کرلیا ہے کہ نقش کرنا اور عمومی کرنا قابلیت کی تصدیق کریں. ہم نے بھی زمانہ پیچیدگی کی بڑی تحلیل کی، کلی موڈولوں کے اثر، اور کیلوٹیٹیوں کے نتائج کی، جو ہمارے پیش کیا ہوا طریقہ کے اثرات اور اثرات کو دکھاتے ہیں.', 'sv': 'Entity Linking syftar till att länka entitetsomnämnanden i texter till kunskapsbaser, och neurala modeller har uppnått framgång på senare tid i denna uppgift. De flesta befintliga metoder förlitar sig dock på lokala sammanhang för att lösa enheter självständigt, vilket vanligtvis kan misslyckas på grund av den begränsade datamängden i lokal information. För att ta itu med denna fråga föreslår vi en ny neural modell för kollektiv entity linking, kallad NCEL. NCEL tillämpar Graph Convolutional Network för att integrera både lokala kontextuella funktioner och global sammanhållningsinformation för entitetslänkning. För att förbättra beräkningseffektiviteten utför vi ungefär grafkonvulution på en undergraf av intilliggande entitetsomnämnanden istället för dem i hela texten. Vi introducerar vidare ett uppmärksamhetsschema för att förbättra NCEL:s robusthet mot databuller och utbilda modellen på Wikipedias hyperlänkar för att undvika överpassning och domänbias. I experiment utvärderar vi NCEL på fem allmänt tillgängliga datauppsättningar för att verifiera länkningsprestanda samt generaliseringsförmåga. Vi genomför också en omfattande analys av tidskomplexitet, påverkan av nyckelmoduler och kvalitativa resultat som visar effektiviteten och effektiviteten i vår föreslagna metod.', 'so': 'Entity Linking aims to link entity mentions in texts to knowledge bases, and neural models have achieved recent success in this task.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee, hababka badan ee joogta waxay ku xiran yihiin in ay macluumaadka degmada ku xalliyaan si xor ah, taas oo sida caadiga ah u baaqan karto sabab u noqota dhamaanka macluumaadka degmada ah. Si aan arrintan ula macaamilo karno, waxaan soo jeedaynaa model neurada ah oo ku xiriira dhaqaalaha shaqada ee la yidhaahdo NCEL. NCEL wuxuu ku dalban karaa shabakadda iskuulka Graph si uu u qabsado labada tababar ee deegaanka iyo macluumaadka wadajirka ah ee caalamiga ah ee xiriirka bogga. Si aan u hagaajino faa’iidada xisaabinta, waxaynu sameynaa sida qiyaastii oo kale sameynaa sameynta sameynta rasmiga, taasoo ayan ka beddelin warqadda oo dhan. Sidoo kale waxaynu u soo bandhignaynaa qorshaha daryeelka si ay u kordhiso khatarka NCEL si aan u tababarino codka danaha iyo tababarida warqadda Wikipedia si aan uga fogaan baaritaanka iyo dabeecada. Imtixaanka waxaa lagu qiimeynayaa shan sawirro oo caadiga ah si aan u xaqiijinno tababarka xiriirka iyo awoodda dhalashada. Sidoo kale waxaynu sameynaa baaritaan dheer oo saameyn ku saabsan wakhtiga, saameyn ku yeelashada qalabka muhiimka ah, iyo resultiyada qiimeeya, taas oo muuqata effektada iyo waxyaabaha qaababka la soo jeeday.', 'uz': "Bu vazifani yangi muvaffaqiyatli amalga oshirishni istaysiz. Lekin, ko'pchilik mavjud usullar lokal taʼminlovchilarga o'xshash narsalarni aniqlash uchun ishlatadi, bu odatda lokal maʼlumotning qisqartmalari sababda muvaffaqiyatsiz tugadi mumkin. Bu muammo bilan murojaat qilish uchun biz NCEL deb nomli collective entity bogʻlanish uchun novel neyrol modelini rivojlanamiz. Name Hisoblash natijasini oshirish uchun, biz butun matnning o'rniga quyidagi narsalarning tubgrafik tashkilotlarini bajaramiz. Biz NCEL haqida maʼlumotlar to ʻplarini o'zgartirish va Wikipedia hyperlinks modelini o'rganamiz va domen tizimlarini saqlashdan foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchi qolipini ko'rsamiz. In experiments, we evaluate NCEL on five publicly available datasets to verify the linking performance as well as generalization ability.  Vaqtning murakkablikligini, key modulining effekti va kvalifik natijalarini bajaramiz. Bu tashkilotlarimizning effektligini va effektligini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Mục đích liên kết các thực thể liên kết những đề cập trong văn bản đến căn cứ kiến thức, và các mô hình thần kinh đã đạt được thành công gần đây trong nhiệm vụ này. Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các phương pháp tồn tại dựa trên các địa phương để giải quyết các thực thể độc lập, mà thường có thể thất bại do độ hẹp thông tin địa phương. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình thần kinh mới cho liên kết tập thể, được gọi là NCel. NCel áp dụng mạng lưới hình ảnh có liên hệ thống kết tâm lý để nhập vào cả các tính năng ngữ cảnh địa phương và thông tin liên minh. Để tăng hiệu quả tính toán, chúng tôi có độ xấp xỉ tiến hành kết cấu đồ thị trong tiểu đồ của một thực thể liền kề đề cập thay vì trong toàn bộ văn bản. Chúng tôi sẽ thêm một kế hoạch chú ý để nâng tầm chịu đựng của NCel lên tiếng ồn dữ liệu và huấn luyện mô hình trên các đường dây siêu tốc Wikipedia để tránh trò chơi quá tải và khuynh hướng miền. Trong các thí nghiệm, chúng tôi đánh giá NCel trên năm bộ dữ liệu công khai để xác định khả năng kết hợp và phát triển tổng hợp. Chúng tôi cũng tiến hành một phân tích đầy đủ về sự phức tạp thời gian, tác động của các mô-đun chủ chốt, và kết quả về tính chất, cho thấy hiệu quả và hiệu quả của phương pháp chúng tôi đề nghị.', 'bg': 'Целта на връзката между съществата е да свърже споменаванията на същества в текстовете с базите от знания, а невронните модели постигат неотдавна успех в тази задача. Въпреки това, повечето съществуващи методи разчитат на локален контекст за самостоятелно решаване на субекти, което обикновено може да се провали поради оскъдността на данните на местната информация. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме нов невронен модел за свързване на колективни единици, наречен NCEL. NCEL прилага Графична конвелуционна мрежа, за да интегрира както локални контекстуални характеристики, така и глобална информация за съгласуваност за свързване на обекти. За да подобрим ефективността на изчисленията, ние приблизително извършваме конволюция на графика върху подграфа на съседните споменания на единици вместо тези в целия текст. Освен това въвеждаме схема за внимание, за да подобрим здравината на NCEL към шума от данни и да обучим модела на хипервръзките на Уикипедия, за да избегнем пренасочването и пристрастяването на домейна. При експерименти ние оценяваме NCEL върху пет публично достъпни набора от данни, за да проверим ефективността на свързването, както и способността за обобщаване. Извършваме и задълбочен анализ на времевата сложност, въздействието на ключовите модули и качествените резултати, които демонстрират ефективността и ефективността на предлагания от нас метод.', 'da': "Entity Linking har til formål at forbinde entitetsnævnelser i tekster til vidensbaser, og neurale modeller har opnået nylig succes i denne opgave. De fleste eksisterende metoder er dog afhængige af lokale sammenhænge til at løse enheder uafhængigt, hvilket normalt kan mislykkes på grund af dataspartheden i lokale oplysninger. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi en ny neural model for kollektiv entity linking, navngivet som NCEL. NCEL anvender Graph Convolutional Network til at integrere både lokale kontekstuelle funktioner og globale sammenhængsoplysninger til enhedslinkning. For at forbedre beregningseffektiviteten udfører vi omtrentligt grafkonvulution på en undergraf af tilstødende entitetsnævnelser i stedet for dem i hele teksten. Vi introducerer endvidere en opmærksomhedsordning for at forbedre NCEL's robusthed over for datastøj og træne modellen på Wikipedia hyperlinks for at undgå overtilpasning og domæne bias. I eksperimenter evaluerer vi NCEL på fem offentligt tilgængelige datasæt for at verificere linkydeevnen såvel som generaliseringsevnen. Vi gennemfører også en omfattende analyse af tidskompleksitet, effekten af centrale moduler og kvalitative resultater, som viser effektiviteten og effektiviteten af vores foreslåede metode.", 'nl': 'Entity Linking heeft tot doel entiteitsvermeldingen in teksten te koppelen aan kennisbases, en neurale modellen hebben recent succes geboekt in deze taak. De meeste bestaande methoden zijn echter afhankelijk van lokale contexten om entiteiten onafhankelijk op te lossen, wat meestal mislukt als gevolg van de schaarse data van lokale informatie. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuw neuraal model voor collectieve entiteitskoppeling voor, genaamd NCEL. NCEL past Graph Convolutional Network toe om zowel lokale contextuele kenmerken als globale coherentie-informatie te integreren voor entiteitskoppeling. Om de berekeningsefficiëntie te verbeteren, voeren we ongeveer grafiekconvolutie uit op een subgraaf van aangrenzende entiteitsvermeldingen in plaats van die in de hele tekst. We introduceren verder een aandachtsschema om de robuustheid van NCEL tegen dataruis te verbeteren en trainen het model op Wikipedia hyperlinks om overfitting en domein bias te voorkomen. In experimenten evalueren we NCEL op vijf publiekelijk beschikbare datasets om de linking performance en generalisatie vermogen te verifiëren. We voeren ook een uitgebreide analyse uit van de tijdscomplexiteit, de impact van belangrijke modules en kwalitatieve resultaten, die de effectiviteit en efficiëntie van onze voorgestelde methode aantonen.', 'hr': 'Povezivanje podataka cilja je povezati spojene subjekte u tekstovima s bazama znanja, a neuromodeli su postigli nedavni uspjeh u ovom zadatku. Međutim, većina postojećih metoda se oslanja na lokalne kontekste za rješavanje subjekta neovisno, koje obično mogu propasti zbog rezerviteta podataka lokalnih informacija. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja, predlažemo nov neuralni model za povezanje kolektivnih entiteta, po imenu NCEL. NCEL primjenjuje konvolucionalnu mrežu grafika kako bi integrirala lokalne kontekstske karakteristike i globalne informacije o saslušnosti za povezanje entitata. Da bismo poboljšali učinkovitost računala, približno izvršili konvoluciju grafika na podgrafu sljedećih subjekta spominje umjesto onih iz cijelog teksta. Dalje predstavljamo pažnju za poboljšanje snage NCEL-a na buku podataka i obučavanje modela na hiperlinkama na Wikipediji kako bi se izbjegao predrasude prekopterećenja i domena. U eksperimentima procjenjujemo NCEL na pet javno dostupnih podataka kako bi potvrdili povezanje učinka i sposobnost generalizacije. Također provodimo široku analizu složenosti vremena, utjecaja ključnih modula i kvalitativnih rezultata, koji pokazuju učinkovitost i učinkovitost našeg predloženog metoda.', 'de': 'Entity Linking zielt darauf ab, Entity Erwähnungen in Texten mit Wissensbasen zu verknüpfen, und neuronale Modelle haben in letzter Zeit Erfolge in dieser Aufgabe erzielt. Die meisten existierenden Methoden beruhen jedoch auf lokalen Kontexten, um Entitäten unabhängig voneinander aufzulösen, was in der Regel aufgrund der Datenmangel lokaler Informationen scheitern kann. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir ein neuartiges neuronales Modell für kollektive Entitätenverknüpfung vor, genannt NCEL. NCEL wendet Graph Convolutional Network an, um sowohl lokale Kontextmerkmale als auch globale Kohärenzinformationen für Entitätenverknüpfungen zu integrieren. Um die Recheneffizienz zu verbessern, führen wir annähernd Graphenfaltung auf einem Subgraph benachbarter Entitätserwähnungen anstelle derjenigen im gesamten Text durch. Wir führen weiter ein Aufmerksamkeitsschema ein, um die Robustheit von NCEL gegenüber Datenrauschen zu verbessern und trainieren das Modell auf Wikipedia-Hyperlinks, um Überfitting und Domain Bias zu vermeiden. In Experimenten evaluieren wir NCEL auf fünf öffentlich zugänglichen Datensätzen, um sowohl die Verknüpfungsleistung als auch die Generalisierungsfähigkeit zu überprüfen. Wir führen auch eine umfassende Analyse der Zeitkomplexität, der Auswirkungen von Schlüsselmodulen und qualitativen Ergebnissen durch, die die Wirksamkeit und Effizienz unserer vorgeschlagenen Methode belegen.', 'id': 'Entity Linking bermaksud untuk menghubungkan entity menyebutkan dalam teks ke dasar pengetahuan, dan model saraf telah mencapai sukses baru-baru ini dalam tugas ini. Namun, kebanyakan metode yang ada bergantung pada konteks lokal untuk menyelesaikan entitas secara independen, yang biasanya gagal karena kecepatan data informasi lokal. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan model saraf baru untuk entitas kolektif yang menghubungkan, bernama NCEL. NCEL menerapkan Graph Convolutional Network untuk mengintegrasikan kedua fitur kontekstual lokal dan informasi koherensi global untuk menghubungkan entitas. Untuk meningkatkan efisiensi komputasi, kita kira-kira melakukan konvolusi grafik pada subgraf entitas bersebelahan menyebutkan bukan dalam seluruh teks. Kami lebih lanjut memperkenalkan skema perhatian untuk meningkatkan kekuatan NCEL pada suara data dan melatih model di hyperlinks Wikipedia untuk menghindari overfitting dan bias domain. In experiments, we evaluate NCEL on five publicly available datasets to verify the linking performance as well as generalization ability.  We also conduct an extensive analysis of time complexity, the impact of key modules, and qualitative results, which demonstrate the effectiveness and efficiency of our proposed method.', 'ko': '실체 링크는 텍스트에서 언급한 실체를 지식 라이브러리에 연결하는 데 목적을 둔다. 신경 모형은 최근 이 임무에서 성공을 거두었다.그러나 대부분의 기존 방법은 국부 상하문에 의존하여 실체를 독립적으로 해석하는데 이것은 국부 정보의 데이터 희소성으로 인해 실패할 수 있다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 집단 실체 링크에 사용되는 새로운 신경 모델인 NCEL을 제시했다.NCEL 응용 그림 볼륨 네트워크는 부분적인 상하문 특징과 전역적인 일치성 정보를 통합하여 실체 링크를 실현한다.계산 효율을 높이기 위해 우리는 인접한 실체가 언급한 하위 그림을 근사하게 도권적하는 것이지 전체 텍스트의 하위 그림을 도권적하는 것이 아니다.우리는 NCEL의 데이터 소음에 대한 노봉성을 높이고 위키백과 하이퍼링크에서 훈련 모델을 도입하여 과도한 의합과 영역 편견을 피했다.실험에서 우리는 다섯 개의 공개된 데이터 집합에서 NCEL을 평가하여 링크 성능과 범위화 능력을 검증했다.우리는 또한 시간 복잡도, 관건 모듈의 영향과 정성 결과를 광범위하게 분석했는데 이것은 우리가 제시한 방법의 유효성과 효율을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa Linking unalenga kuunganisha vifaa katika maandishi kwa misingi ya maarifa, na mifano ya kisasa imefanikiwa hivi karibuni katika kazi hii. Hata hivyo, mbinu nyingi zilizopo zinategemea mikutano ya ndani ya kutatua vifaa huru, ambavyo kwa kawaida huweza kushindwa kutokana na upungufu wa taarifa za maeneo ya ndani. Kupambana na suala hili, tunapendekeza mtindo wa kisasa wa kisasa kwa ajili ya viungo vya pamoja, kinachoitwa NCEL. NCEL inatumia Mtandao wa Kujitoleza Graph ili kuunganisha vipengele vya ndani na taarifa za ushirikiano wa kimataifa kwa ajili ya kuunganisha vifaa. To improve the computation efficiency, we approximately perform graph convolution on a subgraph of adjacent entity mentions instead of those in the entire text.  Tunaweza kuonyesha mpango wa kutangaza ustawi wa NCEL kwa sauti za data na kufundisha modeli kwenye viwanja vya Wikipedia ili kuepuka kuingia na upendeleo wa ndani. Katika majaribio, tunatathmini NCEL kwenye seti tano za taarifa zinazopatikana hadharani ili kuthibitisha ufanisi wa kuunganisha pamoja na uwezo wa kuzalisha. Pia tunafanya uchambuzi wa kina wa utata wa muda, madhara ya module muhimu, na matokeo makubwa, ambayo yanaonyesha ufanisi na ufanisi wa njia yetu ya pendekezo.', 'fa': 'ارتباط ارتباط به ارتباط ارتباط برقرار کردن ارتباط entities mentioned in texts to knowledge bases and neural models have achieved recent success in this task. ولی بیشترین روش\u200cهای موجود به موضوع محلی وابسته می\u200cشوند تا موضوع را به تنهایی حل کنند، که معمولاً ممکن است به خاطر کمال داده\u200cهای اطلاعات محلی شکست بخورد. برای حل این مسئله، ما یک مدل عصبی جدید برای ارتباط ارتباطی مجموعه به نام NCEL پیشنهاد می کنیم. NCEL برای تضمین کردن ویژگی\u200cهای موقعیت محلی و اطلاعات هماهنگی جهانی برای ارتباط ارتباط\u200cهای واحد استفاده می\u200cکند. برای تأثیر فعالیت محاسبات، تقریباً در یک زیر گراف از شرکت نزدیک به جای آن\u200cها که در کل متن می\u200cگویند اجرا می\u200cکنیم. ما برنامه توجه را برای بهبود شدت NCEL به صدای داده ها معرفی می کنیم و مدل روی ارتباط هایپر لینک ویکیپدیا را آموزش می دهیم تا از نقطه\u200cهای زیادی پیوسته و دامنی فرار کند. در آزمایشات، ما NCEL را روی پنج مجموعه داده\u200cهای عمومی برای تأیید اجرای ارتباط و توانایی عمومی ارتباط می\u200cدهیم. ما همچنین یک تحلیل وسیع از پیچیدگی زمان، تاثیر مدول\u200cهای کلید و نتیجه\u200cهای کیفیت را انجام می\u200cدهیم، که نشان می\u200cدهد فعالیت و موثیت روش پیشنهاد ما.', 'af': "Entiteit Linking doel doel om entiteite bepaalde in teks na kennis basis te skakel, en neurale modele het onlangse sukses in hierdie taak bereik. Maar die meeste bestaande metodes vertrou op plaaslike kontekste om entiteite onveilig te los, wat dalk gewoonlik misluk vanweë die data sparsiteit van plaaslike inligting. Om hierdie probleem te adres, voorstel ons 'n nuwe neural model vir kolektiewe entiteite te koppel, genaamd as NCEL. NCEL toewend Grafiese Konvolusionele Netwerk om beide plaaslike kontekslike funksies en globale koherens inligting vir entiteit-koppeling te integreer. Om die rekenaar effektiviteit te verbeter, uitvoer ons omtrent graaf konvolusie op 'n subgraaf van nabytende entiteite in plaas van die wat in die hele teks is. Ons introduseer verder 'n aanmerking skema om die kragtigheid van NCEL te verbeter na data ruis en die model op Wikipedia hiperlinke te tref om oorvloediging en domein bias te verlos. In eksperimente, ons evalueer NCEL op vyf openlik beskikbaar datastelle om die konnekteer prestasie te verifiseer en die generellisering-kapasiteit. Ons doen ook 'n uitbreidige analisie van tydpleksiteit, die effekt van sleutel modules en kwalitiewe resultate wat die effektiviteit en effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde metode vertoon.", 'tr': "Ba힊galar Bagla첵y힊y metinlerde hatlary bilgi tabanlaryna bagla힊dyrmak amalydyr we n채yral nusgalary bu i힊i흫 체st체ne 첵etirdi. 횦agna g철r채 k철p bar 첵agda첵lar 첵erle힊첵채n contextlere 첵erle힊첵채n bir zatlar 챌철zmek 체챌in ynan첵arlar. Bu hat adat챌a 첵erle힊첵채n maglumaty흫 az bolmagy 체챌in bo힊adyl첵ar. Bu meselede 챌철zmek 체챌in, toplam bir zat 체챌in bir nural nusgasyny NCEL di첵ip atlandyr첵an nusgasyny teklip edip g철r첵채ris. At Hesaplama etkinli휓ini geli힊tirmek i챌in, yakla힊캇k bir grafik konvolusyonunu t체m metinlerin yerine 챌철z체r. Daha da NCEL'nin g체챌l체휓체n체 bergi g체r체lt체s체ne geli힊tirmek 체챌in bir 체ns taslamas캇n캇 tan캇t캇yoruz ve bu modeli Wikipedia hiperlinklerine uygun ve domenin bias 캇ndan 챌ykarmak 체챌in e휓itiyoruz. Deneylerde, NCEL'i be힊 sanly mejbur veri setirlerinde 챌ykmak 체챌in janla힊dyrylygy we generalizasyon ukyplaryny barla첵arys. Biz hem wagt karma힊캇klygyny흫, a챌ary modulleri흫 t채sirini we kwalitet netijesini 챌ykar첵arys. Bu bizi흫 teklip eden 첵체regimizi흫 t채sirini we etkinli첵etini g철rkez.", 'sq': 'Entity Linking synon të lidhë përmendimet e njësisë në tekste me bazat e njohurive dhe modelet neuronale kanë arritur sukses të fundit në këtë detyrë. Megjithatë, shumica e metodave ekzistuese mbështeten në kontekstet lokale për të zgjidhur njësitë në mënyrë të pavarur, që zakonisht mund të dështojnë për shkak të pakësisë së të dhënave të informacionit lokal. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne propozojmë një model neural të ri për njësinë kolektive të lidhur, të quajtur NCEL. NCEL aplikon Rrjetin Grafik Konveolutiv për të integruar si karakteristikat kontekstuale lokale dhe informacionin e konsistencës globale për lidhjen e njësisë. Për të përmirësuar efektshmërinë e llogaritjeve, ne përafërsisht kryejmë konvolution grafik në një subgrafi të njësisë së afërt përmend në vend të atyre në të gjithë tekstin. Ne përfaqësojmë më tej një skemë vëmendjeje për të përmirësuar fuqinë e NCEL për zhurmën e të dhënave dhe për të trajnuar modelin në hiperlinket Wikipedia për të shmangur mbipajtimin dhe paragjykimin në domini. Në eksperimente, ne vlerësojmë NCEL në pesë grupe të dhënash publikisht të disponueshme për të verifikuar performancën lidhëse si dhe aftësinë e gjeneralizimit. Ne kryejmë gjithashtu një analizë të gjerë të kompleksitetit të kohës, ndikimit të moduleve kryesorë dhe rezultateve kualitative, që demonstrojnë efektshmërinë dhe efektshmërinë e metodës sonë të propozuar.', 'hy': 'Համակարգ Կապելը նպատակում է կապել տեքստներում նշումները գիտելիքի հիմքերի հետ, և նյարդային մոդելները վերջերս հաջողություն են հասել այս խնդրի մեջ: Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները հիմնված են տեղական կոնտեքստների վրա, որպեսզի անկախ լուծեն միավորները, ինչը սովորաբար կարող է ձախողվել տեղական ինֆորմացիայի հազվադեպության պատճառով: To address this issue, we propose a novel neural model for collective entity linking, named as NCEL.  NCEL ը կիրառում է Գրաֆ հակառակցման ցանց տեղական կոնտեքստալ հատկությունների և գլոբալ կոնտեքստալ ինֆորմացիայի ինֆորմացիայի ինտեգրման համար, որպեսզի միավորները կապված լինեն: Համակարգման արդյունավետության բարելավման համար, մենք մոտավորապես կատարում ենք գծագրային հակադարձում հարևանքային էության ենթագծի վրա, որը նշում է ամբողջ տեքստում գտնվող հակադարձությունների փոխարեն: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք մի ուշադրության սխեմա, որպեսզի բարելավենք NCEL ի ուժեղությունը տվյալների աղմուկի դեպքում և վարժեցնենք Վիքիփեդիայի հիպերկապերի մոդելը, որպեսզի խուսափենք գերահարմարեցման և տիե Փորձերի ընթացքում մենք գնահատում ենք NCEL ը հինգ հանրային հասանելի տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որպեսզի ստուգենք կապերի արդյունքը, ինչպես նաև ընդհանուր ընդունակությունը: Մենք նաև կատարում ենք ժամանակի բարդությունը, կարևոր մոդուլների ազդեցությունը և որակային արդյունքները, որոնք ցույց են տալիս մեր առաջարկված մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը և արդյունավետությունը:', 'am': 'የኢንተርት Linking አካባቢውን በጽሑፎች ውስጥ እውቀት መቀመጫዎችን ለማቀናቀል እና የነዌብ ዓይነቶች በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ አግኝተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ አብዛኞቹ ሥርዓቶች የአካባቢ መረጃዎችን በተለይነት ለመፍታት የሚታመሙ የአካባቢ ሁኔታዎች ይታመናሉ፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀላቀል፣ የኖረብ የውጤት ሞዴል እንደ NCEL የተባለው የኮሌክ አካል ማቀናቀል እናስባለን፡፡ NCEL apply Graph Convolutional Network to integrate both local contextual features and global coherence information for entity linking.  ቁጥጥር ውጤቱን ለማሻል፣ በጽሑፉ ሁሉ ፋንታ በአቅራቢያ አካባቢ ማሳሰብ ላይ የgraph ጉዳዮችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የNCEL የድምፅ ድምፅ ለማሻሻል እና በWikipedia hyperlinks ላይ ሞዴል ለመግለጽ እና የውይይት ውይይት መሳፍን ለማሻሻል እና እናስተማርጋለን፡፡ በተፈተና ውስጥ የNCEL በአምስት ግልፅ የሚኖረውን የዳታ መስመር እና የግንኙነቱን አካባቢ እና አቀማመጥ ስልጣንን እናረጋግጥ ዘንድ ነው፡፡ በጊዜው አካባቢነት፣ የቁልፎች አካባቢ እና ፍሬዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'az': "Entity Linking mətnlərin mətnlərində mətnlərin mətnlərinə elm üssələrinə bağlanmağı niyyət edir, və nöral modellərin bu işdə son başarılarına çatdı. Halbuki, çox mevcut metodlar yerli müxtəlif məlumatları təkrar çəkmək üçün yerli müxtəlif məlumatlara təvəkkül edirlər. Bunlar genellikle yerli məlumatların təkrar olmasına görə başarısız olarlar. Bu məsələni çəkmək üçün, NCEL adlı kolektivni bir məsəl üçün yeni nöral modeli təklif edirik. NCEL hər iki yerli müxtəlif fəaliyyətləri və qlobal birləşmə məlumatlarını birləşdirmək üçün Graph Convolutional Network uygulayır. Hesaplama faydalanılığını daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün, bütün mətndə yazılmış məlumatların yerinə, yaxın məlumatların bir subgrafında graflı konvolusyonu edərik. Biz də NCEL'nin güclüyünü məlumatların səslərinə yaxşılaşdırmaq və Wikipedia hiperlinklərinin modelini təhsil etmək üçün təsirlərini təşkil edirik. Biz təcrübələrdə NCEL'i beş mükəmməl verilən qurduğu təcrübə və generalizasyon qabiliyyətini təsdiqləmək üçün təcrübələrdə təcrübə edirik. Biz də vaxt kompleksitəsinin, anahtar modulların və qiymətli sonuçlarının etkisini göstərən geniş analizi çəkirik.", 'bn': 'এন্টিটি লিঙ্কিং এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে টেক্সটে বস্তুর উল্লেখ করা জ্ঞানের বেসের সাথে লিঙ্ক করা যায়, আর নিউরেল মডেল এই কাজে সম্প তবে বেশীরভাগ বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি স্থানীয় প্রতিযোগিতার উপর নির্ভর করে স্বাধীন বস্তুর সমাধানের জন্য, যা সাধারণত স্থানীয় তথ্ এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি নভেল নিউরেল মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যার নাম NCEL নামে নামে সংযুক্ত বস্তুর লিঙ্ক করা হয় স্থানীয় বৈশ্বিক বৈশ্বিক সংযোগ এবং বৈশ্বিক সম্পর্কের তথ্য যুক্ত করার জন্য NCEL গ্রাফ কনভোলেশন নেটওয়ার্ক প্রয়োগ করে। গণনার ক্ষমতা উন্নত করার জন্য আমরা পুরো টেক্সটের পরিবর্তে প্রতিবেশী বস্তুর উল্লেখের সাবগ্রাফ উল্লেখ করে গ্রাফ ক্লাফ ফুলেশন করি। আমরা এনসিএলের রাস্তা উন্নত করার জন্য আরো একটি মনোযোগ পরিকল্পনা চিহ্নিত করেছি ডাটা আওয়াজ এবং উইকিপিডিয়া হাইপার্লিন্কের মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ করার জন্য। পরীক্ষায় আমরা পাঁচজন প্রকাশ্য বিদ্যমান ডাটাসেটে এনসিএলের মূল্য চালিয়ে দিচ্ছি যে লিঙ্কিং করা প্রদর্শন এবং সাধারণ ক্ষমতা  আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির কার্যকর এবং কার্যকর ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে সময়ের জটিল বিশ্লেষণ, গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মডিউলের প্রভাব এবং পরিমাণ ফলাফল।', 'bs': 'Povezivanje entiteta cilja je povezati spomenute entitete u tekstima sa bazama znanja, a neuronski modeli su postigli nedavni uspjeh u ovom zadatku. Međutim, većina postojećih metoda se oslanja na lokalne kontekste za rješavanje entitata nezavisno, koje obično mogu propasti zbog rezerviteta podataka lokalnih informacija. Da riješimo ovaj problem, predlažemo nov neuralni model za povezanje kolektivnih entiteta, po imenu NCEL. NCEL primjenjuje konvolucionalnu mrežu grafika kako bi integrirala lokalne kontekstske funkcije i globalne informacije o saskaņosti za povezivanje entitata. Da bismo poboljšali učinkovitost računala, približno izvršili konvoluciju grafika na podgrafu sljedećih subjekta spominje umjesto onih iz cijelog teksta. Dalje predstavljamo pažnju za poboljšanje snage NCEL-a na buku podataka i obučavanje modela na hiperlinkama Wikipedije kako bi se izbjegao predrasude prekopterećenja i domena. U eksperimentima, procjenjujemo NCEL na pet javno dostupnih podataka kako bi potvrdili povezanje učinka i sposobnost generalizacije. Također vodimo ogromnu analizu složenosti vremena, utjecaja ključnih modula i kvalitativnih rezultata, koji pokazuju učinkovitost i učinkovitost našeg predloženog metoda.', 'ca': "Entity Linking té l'objectiu d'enllaçar les mentions de les entitats en els textos amb les bases de coneixement, i els models neuronals han aconseguit èxit recent en aquesta tasca. Però la majoria dels mètodes existents depenen dels contextes locals per resoldre les entitats de manera independent, que normalment poden fracassar degut a la escassetat de dades de la informació local. Per abordar aquesta qüestió, proposem un nou model neuronal per a una entitat col·lectiva que vincula, anomenat NCEL. NCEL aplica la Red Graph Convolutional per integrar tant les característiques contextuals locals com la informació global de coherencia per a l'enllaç d'entitats. Per millorar l'eficiència de la computació, aproximadament fem una convolució gràfica en un subgràfic de mentions d'una entitat adjacent en lloc d'aquestes en tot el text. També introduïm un esquema d'atenció per millorar la robustet de la NCEL al soroll de dades i entrenem el model a hiperlinks de Wikipedia per evitar l'excess d'ajustament i el bias de domini. En experiments, evaluem el NCEL en cinc conjunts de dades disponibles per a verificar el rendiment d'enllaç i l'habilitat de generalització. També fem una an àlisi extensa de la complexitat del temps, l'impacte dels móduls clau i els resultats qualitatius, que demostren l'eficiència i l'eficiència del nostre mètode proposat.", 'cs': 'Entity Linking si klade za cíl propojit zmínky entit v textech se znalostními bázemi a neurální modely v tomto úkolu dosáhly nedávného úspěchu. Nicméně, většina stávajících metod spoléhá na lokální kontexty k řešení subjektů nezávisle, což může obvykle selhat kvůli úzkosti dat lokálních informací. Pro řešení této problematiky navrhujeme nový neuronový model pro kolektivní propojení entit, jmenovaný NCEL. NCEL používá Graph Convolutional Network k integraci lokálních kontextových funkcí a globálních informací o soudržnosti pro propojení entit. Pro zlepšení efektivity výpočtu provádíme přibližně grafovou konvoluci na podgrafu sousedních entit zmínek namísto těch v celém textu. Dále představujeme schéma pozornosti ke zlepšení robustnosti NCEL vůči datovému šumu a trénujeme model na hypertextových odkazech Wikipedie, abychom zabránili přehnanému přizpůsobení a doménovému zaujatí. V experimentech hodnotíme NCEL na pěti veřejně dostupných datových sadách, abychom ověřili výkon propojení a zobecnění schopnosti. Dále provádíme rozsáhlou analýzu časové složitosti, vlivu klíčových modulů a kvalitativních výsledků, které dokazují efektivitu a efektivitu naší navrhované metody.', 'fi': 'Entity Linkingin tavoitteena on linkittää tekstissä olevat entiteettimaininnat tietokantoihin, ja neuromallit ovat viime aikoina onnistuneet tässä tehtävässä. Useimmat olemassa olevat menetelmät perustuvat kuitenkin paikallisiin konteksteihin ratkaistakseen kokonaisuuksia itsenäisesti, mikä voi yleensä epäonnistua paikallisen tiedon niukkuuden vuoksi. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta neuromallia kollektiiviselle entiteettilinkitykselle, nimeltään NCEL. NCEL soveltaa Graph Convolutional Network -verkostoa integroidakseen sekä paikalliset kontekstuaaliset ominaisuudet että globaalin johdonmukaisuuden tiedot entiteettilinkitykseen. Laskentatehokkuuden parantamiseksi suoritamme graafikon konvoluution suunnilleen vierekkäisten entiteettimainintojen alikaaviolla koko tekstissä olevien mainintojen sijaan. Lisäksi otamme käyttöön huomiojärjestelmän, jolla parannetaan NCEL:n luotettavuutta datakohinan suhteen ja koulutetaan mallia Wikipedian hyperlinkkien avulla välttääksemme ylikuormituksen ja verkkotunnuksen vääristymisen. Kokeissa arvioimme NCEL:ää viidellä julkisesti saatavilla olevalla aineistolla linkitystehokkuuden ja yleistyskyvyn todentamiseksi. Teemme myös laajan analyysin ajan monimutkaisuudesta, avainmoduulien vaikutuksesta ja laadullisista tuloksista, jotka osoittavat ehdotetun menetelmän tehokkuuden ja tehokkuuden.', 'et': 'Olemuse linkimise eesmärk on siduda tekstides olevaid olemi nimetusi teadmistebaasidega ning neuromudelid on selles ülesandes hiljuti edukalt saavutanud. Enamik olemasolevaid meetodeid tugineb siiski kohalikule kontekstile, et lahendada olemeid iseseisvalt, mis võib tavaliselt ebaõnnestuda kohaliku teabe vähesuse tõttu. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja uudse neuromudeli kollektiivse olemi sidumiseks, nimega NCEL. NCEL rakendab graafilise konvolutsioonivõrgustiku, et integreerida nii kohalikke kontekstilisi funktsioone kui ka globaalset sidusust teavet üksuste linkimiseks. Arvutuste tõhususe parandamiseks sooritame graafikute konvolutsiooni ligikaudu kõrvalseisvate olemite nimetuste alamgraafil, mitte kogu tekstis. Lisaks tutvustame tähelepanu skeemi, et parandada NCEL-i tugevust andmemürale ja treenida mudelit Wikipedia hüperlinkidel, et vältida ülemäärast paigaldamist ja domeeni kallutamist. Katsetes hindame NCEL-i viie avalikult kättesaadava andmekogumi põhjal, et kontrollida linkimisjõudlust ja üldistamisvõimet. Samuti analüüsime ulatuslikult aja keerukust, võtmemoodulite mõju ja kvalitatiivseid tulemusi, mis näitavad meie kavandatud meetodi efektiivsust ja tõhusust.', 'jv': 'Entité Linking saiki nglanggar sampek Entité kanggo Kemerdekaan kapan kelangan anyar tentang kanggo sabên nglarani diangkat sabên, lan model Nyural sing bisa bantuan nggawe barang iki diangkat dhéwé. slot type Nyong ngomong alam iki, kita supoyo model nyerung kuwi nggawe enti kolèhku nggawe, nganggo barang Nél. default:LTR Laptop" and "Desktop We additional insert an information scheme to advance the botus of NSEL to data sound and vlane the model on Wipedia ipertinks to miss unbias and domain bias. Nang pawaran, kita deweke Nél kanggo limo perusahaan dataset sing wis publikan kanggo weruh nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe kesempatan kanggo ngono kapan Generalizasi. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk sistem sing nggawe akeh lansi kanggo ngerasakno sistem sing, dadi nggawe modul sing bakal terus ngono nggawe barang-sistem sing bisa nguasakno pratiké lan yen efetisi kanggo awak dhéwé', 'he': 'Entity Linking aims to link entity mentions in texts to knowledge bases, and neural models have achieved recent success in this task.  However, most existing methods rely on local contexts to resolve entities independently, which may usually fail due to the data sparsity of local information.  כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים מודל עצבי חדש עבור יחידות קולקטיבית שקשורת, בשם NCEL. NCEL להפעיל רשת שינוי גראפ כדי לשתלב גם תכונות קונטוקטואליות מקומיות וגם מידע תואם גלובלי לקשר יחידות. כדי לשפר את יעילות החישוב, אנו בערך מבצעים שינוי גרפים על תת גרפים של ישות סמוכה מזכירים במקום אלה שבטקסט כולו. אנחנו גם מציגים תכנית תשומת לב כדי לשפר את חוזקתו של NCEL לרעש נתונים ולאימון את המודל על ויקיפדיה היפרקינס בניסויים, אנו מעריכים את NCEL על חמישה קבוצות נתונים זמינות לציבור כדי לאמת ביצועי הקשר כמו גם יכולת הגנרליזציה. אנחנו גם מבצעים ניתוח רחב של מורכבות הזמן, השפעה של מודולים מפתחיים, ותוצאות איכותיות, שמוכיחים את היעילות והיעילות של השיטה המוצעת שלנו.', 'ha': "@ action: button A lokacin da, ko mafi yawan metode masu jira, sunã dõgara ga matsayin lokaci dõmin su cire masu da inganci, wanda ko da ɗabi'a, za'a ɓace wa matsayin tsari na data na lokaci. Domin da za'a yi amfani da wannan masu zartar da, sai mu buƙata wani misali na nohanna wa abun da ke haɗi da abun da aka sunan NCEL. @ info: whatsthis To, dõmin ya gyãra fikar lissafi, muna cika kwamfyutan rufaffiyar grafyuta a kan subgrafyutan sunayen abun da ke kusantar da musamman masu cikin matsayin duk. Ko ƙara, Muke ƙara wani aikin muhimmanci wa improve surori na NCEL zuwa sauri na dangani na data kuma mu sanar da misalin kan Wikimedia ya zama don ya iya sami sauri da sauri. Daga jarrabai, Munã ƙaddara NCEL a kan masana da ake iya saman bayani, dõmin Mu gaskata tsarin da ake haɗa da shi da abinci mai sami. Kayya, muna sami ƙidãya masu kamãta ga lokaci, mai amfani da modulin maɓalli da fassarata, wanda ke nuna aikin da kuma fassarar amfani da hanyarmu da ake buƙata.", 'sk': 'Namen povezovanja entitet je povezati omenjanja entitet v besedilih z bazami znanja, nevronski modeli pa so v tej nalogi v zadnjem času dosegli uspeh. Vendar pa se večina obstoječih metod zanaša na lokalne kontekste za neodvisno reševanje entitet, kar lahko običajno ne uspe zaradi redkosti podatkov lokalnih informacij. Za reševanje tega vprašanja predlagamo nov nevronski model za kolektivno povezovanje entitet, imenovan NCEL. NCEL uporablja Graph Convolutional Network za integracijo lokalnih kontekstualnih značilnosti in informacij o globalni koherenci za povezovanje entitet. Da bi izboljšali učinkovitost izračuna, približno izvedemo konvolucijo grafov na podgrafi sosednjih omemb entitet namesto tistih v celotnem besedilu. Nadalje uvajamo shemo pozornosti za izboljšanje robustnosti NCEL na podatkovni hrup in usposabljamo model na Wikipedijinih hiperpovezavah, da bi se izognili prekomernemu prilagajanju in pristranskosti domene. V poskusih ocenjujemo NCEL na petih javno dostopnih naborih podatkov, da preverimo zmogljivost povezovanja in sposobnost generalizacije. Izvajamo tudi obsežno analizo časovne kompleksnosti, vpliva ključnih modulov in kvalitativnih rezultatov, ki dokazujejo učinkovitost in učinkovitost naše predlagane metode.', 'bo': 'Entity Linking aims to link entity mentions in texts to knowledge bases, and neural models have achieved recent success in this task. ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཕལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱིས་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལས་གནས་ཚུལ་མོས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། To address this issue, we propose a novel neural model for collective entity linking, named as NCEL. NCEL apply Graph Convolutional Network to integrate both local contextual features and global coherence information for entity linking. དེ་ལྟ་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྐྱོན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལེགས་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་ན། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག We further introduce an attention scheme to improve the robustness of NCEL to data noise and train the model on Wikipedia hyperlinks to avoid overfitting and domain bias. In experiments, we evaluate NCEL on five publicly available datasets to verify the linking performance as well as generalization ability. ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོད་དཀའ་བ་གླེང་སྣུམ་ཚོད་ཀྱི་གནོད་འཚོ་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Exploiting Structure in Representation of Named Entities using Active Learning', 'ar': 'استغلال البنية في تمثيل الكيانات المحددة باستخدام التعلم النشط', 'es': 'Explotación de la estructura en la representación de entidades nombradas mediante el aprendizaje activo', 'pt': 'Explorando a Estrutura na Representação de Entidades Nomeadas usando Aprendizagem Ativa', 'fr': "Exploiter la structure dans la représentation d'entités nommées à l'aide de l'apprentissage actif", 'ja': 'アクティブラーニングを使用した名前付きエンティティの表現における構造の活用', 'ru': 'Изучение структуры представления именованных сущностей с помощью активного обучения', 'hi': 'सक्रिय अधिगम का उपयोग कर नामित निकायों के प्रतिनिधित्व में संरचना का शोषण', 'zh': '用己学于名实者,用也', 'ga': 'Leas a Bhaint as Struchtúr i Léiriú Aonáin Ainmnithe ag Úsáid Foghlaim Ghníomhach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A megnevezett entitások reprezentációjának struktúrájának kiaknázása aktív tanulás segítségével', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση Δομής στην Αντιπροσωπεία Οντών με Ενεργή Μάθηση', 'it': "Sfruttare la struttura nella rappresentazione delle entità nominate utilizzando l'apprendimento attivo", 'kk': 'Белсенді оқыту арқылы аталған нысандарды таңдау құрылымы', 'lt': 'Pavadintų subjektų, naudojančių aktyvų mokymąsi, atstovavimo struktūros naudojimas', 'mk': 'Извршување на структурата во претставувањето на именуваните ентитети користејќи активно учење', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'L-Isfruttar ta’ Struttura fir-Rappreżentanza ta’ Entitajiet Ismija li jużaw Tagħlim Attiv', 'ml': 'Name', 'mn': 'Актив суралцах ашиглаж нэрлэгдсэн Entities-ын төлөөлөлийн бүтэц', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie struktury w reprezentacji nazwanych podmiotów przy użyciu aktywnego uczenia się', 'ro': 'Exploatarea structurii în reprezentarea entităților numite folosind învățarea activă', 'sr': 'Eksplozirajući strukturu u predstavljanju imenovanih subjekta koristeći aktivno učenje', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Utnyttjande av struktur i representation av namngivna enheter med hjälp av aktivt lärande', 'ta': 'செயல் படிப்பை பயன்படுத்தி பெயரிடப்பட்ட உள்ளீடுகளின் மீது உருவாக்கம் வெளியேறுகிறது', 'so': 'Exploding structure in Representation of Named Entities using Active Learning', 'ur': 'فعال یادہانی کے مطابق نام دار ایٹنیٹیوں کی روشنی میں استعمال کرتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phát triển cấu trúc có tên theo mục đích học hành', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af struktur i repræsentation af navngivne enheder ved hjælp af aktiv læring', 'nl': 'Exploiteren van structuur in vertegenwoordiging van benoemde entiteiten met behulp van actief leren', 'hr': 'Eksplozirajući strukturu u predstavljanju imenovanih subjekta koristeći aktivno učenje', 'bg': 'Използване на структурата при представянето на имена на субекти, използващи активно обучение', 'id': 'Mengeksploitasi Struktur dalam Perwakilan Entitas bernama menggunakan Belajar Aktif', 'ko': '주동적인 학습을 이용하여 명명 실체 표시의 구조를 발굴하다', 'de': 'Nutzung der Struktur in der Repräsentation benannter Entitäten mittels Active Learning', 'sw': 'Miundombinu ya Kutumia Katika Replacement of Named Entries by using Active Learning', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'استفاده از ساختار در نمایش شرکتهای نامیده با استفاده از یادگیری فعال', 'sq': 'Shfrytëzimi i strukturës në përfaqësimin e njësive të emëruara duke përdorur Mësimin Aktiv', 'tr': "%s'i janlaşdyr öwrenmek üçin Adlanylan Baýramlaryň Görkezilişinde Structure Exploiting", 'az': 'Etkinli √∂yr…ônm…ôk vasit…ôsil…ô ńįsiml…ônmiŇü Entit…ôl…ôrin ńįsiml…ônm…ôsi', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով ակտիվ սովորելը', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': "Explotar l'estructura en la representació d'entitats anomenades utilitzant l'aprenentatge activ", 'bs': 'Eksplozirajući strukturu u predstavljanju imenovanih subjekta koristeći aktivno učenje', 'cs': 'Využití struktury v reprezentaci jmenovaných entit pomocí aktivního učení', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste esindamise struktuuri kasutamine aktiivse õppe abil', 'fi': 'Rakenteen hyödyntäminen nimettyjen yhteisöjen edustamisessa aktiivisen oppimisen avulla', 'jv': 'Ngubah Isotoro Stringkap Nang Sampeyan Entire Gawe Jejaring', 'he': 'ניצל מבנה במייצג של יחידות בשמות בשימוש ללימוד פעיל', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje strukture pri zastopanju imenovanih subjektov z aktivnim učenjem', 'bo': 'Exploiting Structure in Representation of Named Entities using Active Learning'}
{'en': 'Fundamental to several knowledge-centric applications is the need to identify named entities from their textual mentions. However, entities lack a unique representation and their mentions can differ greatly. These variations arise in complex ways that can not be captured using textual similarity metrics. However, entities have underlying structures, typically shared by entities of the same entity type, that can help reason over their name variations. Discovering, learning and manipulating these structures typically requires high manual effort in the form of large amounts of labeled training data and handwritten transformation programs. In this work, we propose an active-learning based framework that drastically reduces the labeled data required to learn the structures of entities. We show that programs for mapping entity mentions to their structures can be automatically generated using human-comprehensible labels. Our experiments show that our framework consistently outperforms both handwritten programs and supervised learning models. We also demonstrate the utility of our framework in relation extraction and entity resolution tasks.', 'ar': 'من الأمور الأساسية للعديد من التطبيقات التي تركز على المعرفة الحاجة إلى تحديد الكيانات المسماة من الإشارات النصية. ومع ذلك ، تفتقر الكيانات إلى تمثيل فريد ويمكن أن تختلف إشاراتها بشكل كبير. تنشأ هذه الاختلافات بطرق معقدة لا يمكن التقاطها باستخدام مقاييس التشابه النصية. ومع ذلك ، تحتوي الكيانات على هياكل أساسية ، تتم مشاركتها عادةً بواسطة كيانات من نفس نوع الكيان ، والتي يمكن أن تساعد في تفسير اختلافات الأسماء الخاصة بها. يتطلب اكتشاف هذه الهياكل وتعلمها ومعالجتها عادةً جهدًا يدويًا عاليًا في شكل كميات كبيرة من بيانات التدريب المعنونة وبرامج التحويل المكتوبة بخط اليد. في هذا العمل ، نقترح إطارًا قائمًا على التعلم النشط يقلل بشكل كبير من البيانات المصنفة المطلوبة لتعلم هياكل الكيانات. نظهر أن برامج تعيين إشارات الكيانات إلى هياكلها يمكن إنشاؤها تلقائيًا باستخدام تسميات مفهومة من قبل الإنسان. تُظهر تجاربنا أن إطار عملنا يتفوق باستمرار على كل من البرامج المكتوبة بخط اليد ونماذج التعلم الخاضعة للإشراف. نوضح أيضًا فائدة إطار العمل الخاص بنا في مهام استخراج العلاقة وحل الكيان.', 'pt': 'Fundamental para várias aplicações centradas no conhecimento é a necessidade de identificar entidades nomeadas a partir de suas menções textuais. No entanto, as entidades carecem de uma representação única e suas menções podem diferir muito. Essas variações surgem de maneiras complexas que não podem ser capturadas usando métricas de similaridade textual. No entanto, as entidades têm estruturas subjacentes, normalmente compartilhadas por entidades do mesmo tipo de entidade, que podem ajudar a raciocinar sobre suas variações de nome. Descobrir, aprender e manipular essas estruturas normalmente requer alto esforço manual na forma de grandes quantidades de dados de treinamento rotulados e programas de transformação manuscritos. Neste trabalho, propomos um framework baseado em aprendizado ativo que reduz drasticamente os dados rotulados necessários para aprender as estruturas das entidades. Mostramos que programas para mapear menções de entidades para suas estruturas podem ser gerados automaticamente usando rótulos compreensíveis para humanos. Nossos experimentos mostram que nossa estrutura supera consistentemente os programas manuscritos e os modelos de aprendizado supervisionado. Também demonstramos a utilidade de nossa estrutura em tarefas de extração de relação e resolução de entidade.', 'es': 'Fundamental para varias aplicaciones centradas en el conocimiento es la necesidad de identificar las entidades nombradas a partir de sus menciones textuales. Sin embargo, las entidades carecen de una representación única y sus menciones pueden diferir mucho. Estas variaciones surgen de formas complejas que no se pueden capturar mediante métricas de similitud textual. Sin embargo, las entidades tienen estructuras subyacentes, normalmente compartidas por entidades del mismo tipo de entidad, que pueden ayudar a razonar las variaciones de nombre. Descubrir, aprender y manipular estas estructuras generalmente requiere un gran esfuerzo manual en forma de grandes cantidades de datos de entrenamiento etiquetados y programas de transformación escritos a mano. En este trabajo, proponemos un marco basado en el aprendizaje activo que reduce drásticamente los datos etiquetados necesarios para aprender las estructuras de las entidades. Mostramos que los programas para mapear menciones de entidades a sus estructuras se pueden generar automáticamente utilizando etiquetas comprensibles para el ser humano. Nuestros experimentos muestran que nuestro marco supera sistemáticamente tanto a los programas escritos a mano como a los modelos de aprendizaje supervisado. También demostramos la utilidad de nuestro marco en las tareas de extracción de relaciones y resolución de entidades.', 'ja': 'いくつかの知識中心のアプリケーションの基本は、テキストの言及から名前付きエンティティを識別する必要性です。 しかし、エンティティは独自の表現を欠いており、その言及は大きく異なる場合があります。 これらのバリエーションは、テキスト類似性メトリックを使用してキャプチャすることができない複雑な方法で発生します。 ただし、エンティティには基本的な構造があり、通常は同じエンティティタイプのエンティティによって共有されます。これは、名前のバリエーションに関する推論に役立ちます。 これらの構造を発見し、学習し、操作するには、通常、大量のラベル付けされたトレーニングデータと手書きの変換プログラムという形で、高い手作業の努力が必要である。 この研究では、エンティティの構造を学習するために必要なラベル付けされたデータを大幅に削減するアクティブラーニングベースのフレームワークを提案します。 エンティティのメンションを構造にマッピングするためのプログラムは、人間が理解できるラベルを使用して自動的に生成できることを示しています。 私たちの実験は、私たちのフレームワークが手書きプログラムと監督下の学習モデルの両方を一貫して上回っていることを示しています。 また、関連抽出とエンティティ解決タスクにおけるフレームワークの有用性も示しています。', 'fr': "La nécessité d'identifier les entités nommées à partir de leurs mentions textuelles est fondamentale pour plusieurs applications centrées sur les connaissances. Cependant, les entités n'ont pas de représentation unique et leurs mentions peuvent être très différentes. Ces variations apparaissent de manière complexe qui ne peuvent pas être capturées à l'aide de métriques de similarité textuelle Cependant, les entités ont des structures sous-jacentes, généralement partagées par des entités du même type d'entité, qui peuvent aider à raisonner leurs variations de nom. La découverte, l'apprentissage et la manipulation de ces structures nécessitent généralement un effort manuel important sous la forme de grandes quantités de données d'entraînement étiquetées et de programmes de transformation manuscrits. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un cadre basé sur l'apprentissage actif qui réduit considérablement les données étiquetées nécessaires pour apprendre les structures des entités. Nous montrons que les programmes de mappage des mentions d'entités à leurs structures peuvent être générés automatiquement à l'aide d'étiquettes compréhensibles par l'homme. Nos expériences montrent que notre framework surpasse constamment les programmes écrits à la main et les modèles d'apprentissage supervisés. Nous démontrons également l'utilité de notre framework dans les tâches d'extraction de relations et de résolution d'entités.", 'zh': '凡数以知识为中心之应用程序,大要从文本提及中识名实体。 然实体阙一,而其言或有异也。 变化以杂见,不可用文本相似性指标获。 然有基构(同体共),可以助理其名变体。 见、学、操作,常须大手动工作,多标练数、手书转换程序。 于此言之,则框架大大减少其实矣。 表明,用将实体提及映射到其结构的程序可以用人们可解的标签自生。 吾实验明,吾框架终优于手序及监学模样。 示我以框架,取实解析实用性。', 'hi': 'कई ज्ञान-केंद्रित अनुप्रयोगों के लिए मौलिक उनके पाठ्य उल्लेखों से नामित संस्थाओं की पहचान करने की आवश्यकता है। हालांकि, संस्थाओं में एक अद्वितीय प्रतिनिधित्व की कमी है और उनके उल्लेख बहुत भिन्न हो सकते हैं। ये भिन्नताएं जटिल तरीकों से उत्पन्न होती हैं जिन्हें पाठ्य समानता मीट्रिक का उपयोग करके कैप्चर नहीं किया जा सकता है। हालांकि, निकायों में अंतर्निहित संरचनाएं होती हैं, जो आमतौर पर एक ही एंटिटी प्रकार की संस्थाओं द्वारा साझा की जाती हैं, जो उनके नाम भिन्नताओं पर कारण की मदद कर सकती हैं। इन संरचनाओं की खोज, सीखने और हेरफेर करने के लिए आमतौर पर लेबल किए गए प्रशिक्षण डेटा और हस्तलिखित परिवर्तन कार्यक्रमों की बड़ी मात्रा के रूप में उच्च मैनुअल प्रयास की आवश्यकता होती है। इस काम में, हम एक सक्रिय-सीखने आधारित ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो संस्थाओं की संरचनाओं को सीखने के लिए आवश्यक लेबल किए गए डेटा को काफी कम कर देता है। हम दिखाते हैं कि मैपिंग एंटिटी के लिए प्रोग्राम उनकी संरचनाओं का उल्लेख करते हैं, मानव-समझने योग्य लेबल का उपयोग करके स्वचालित रूप से उत्पन्न किए जा सकते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा ढांचा लगातार हस्तलिखित कार्यक्रमों और पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के मॉडल दोनों को मात देता है। हम संबंध निष्कर्षण और इकाई संकल्प कार्यों में हमारे ढांचे की उपयोगिता को भी प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Основополагающим для нескольких наукоориентированных приложений является необходимость идентификации именованных сущностей из их текстовых упоминаний. Однако организации не имеют уникального представительства, и их упоминания могут сильно различаться. Эти вариации возникают сложными способами, которые не могут быть зафиксированы с помощью текстовых метрик сходства. Тем не менее, сущности имеют базовые структуры, обычно общие для сущностей одного и того же типа сущностей, которые могут помочь рассуждать об их вариациях имен. Обнаружение, изучение и манипулирование этими структурами обычно требует больших ручных усилий в виде больших объемов маркированных обучающих данных и рукописных программ трансформации. В этой работе мы предлагаем основанный на активном обучении фреймворк, который резко сокращает помеченные данные, необходимые для изучения структур сущностей. Показано, что программы для отображения упоминаний сущностей в их структурах могут быть автоматически сгенерированы с помощью понятных человеку меток. Наши эксперименты показывают, что наша структура постоянно превосходит как рукописные программы, так и модели обучения под наблюдением. Мы также демонстрируем полезность нашей структуры в отношении задач извлечения и разрешения сущностей.', 'ga': 'Tá an gá atá le heintitis ainmnithe a aithint óna gcuid téacsanna luaite mar chuid bhunúsach de roinnt feidhmeanna eolas-lárnaithe. Mar sin féin, níl ionadaíocht uathúil ag eintitis agus is féidir go mbeadh difríocht mhór idir a gcuid tagairtí. Tagann na héagsúlachtaí seo chun cinn ar bhealaí casta nach féidir a ghabháil trí úsáid a bhaint as méadracht cosúlachta téacs. Mar sin féin, tá struchtúir bhunúsacha ag eintitis, arna roinnt go hiondúil ag eintitis den chineál céanna aonáin, ar féidir leo cabhrú le réasúnú a dhéanamh ar éagsúlachtaí a n-ainmneacha. Teastaíonn ardiarracht láimhe de ghnáth chun na struchtúir seo a aimsiú, a fhoghlaim agus a ionramháil i bhfoirm méideanna móra sonraí oiliúna lipéadaithe agus cláir lámhscríofa claochlaithe. San obair seo, molaimid creat bunaithe ar fhoghlaim ghníomhach a laghdóidh go mór na sonraí lipéadaithe a theastaíonn chun struchtúir na n-eintiteas a fhoghlaim. Léirímid gur féidir cláir chun aonáin mhapála a luann a struchtúir a ghiniúint go huathoibríoch trí úsáid a bhaint as lipéid shothuigthe daonna. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go sáraíonn ár gcreat go seasta na cláir lámhscríofa agus na samhlacha foghlama maoirsithe araon. Léirímid freisin úsáideacht ár gcreat maidir le tascanna eastósctha agus réitigh eintiteas.', 'ka': 'უფრო მეცნიერების ცნობიერების ცნობიერების სენტრუქტური პროგრამებისთვის უნდა იდენტიფიკარება, რომელიც ტექსტულების შესახებისთვის სახელ მაგრამ, ინტერტიების განსხვავება უნიკალური გამოსახულება და მათი გამოსახულება შეიძლება ძალიან განსხვავება. ეს გარიაციები შეიძლება კომპლექსიური გზებით, რომლებიც ტექსტულური სინამდვილეობის მეტრიკის გამოყენებით არ შეიძლება გადატანა. მაგრამ, ინტერტიები აქვს სტრუქტურები, რომლებიც განსაზღვრებული იგივე ინტერტიკის ტიპის ინტერტიკებით, რომლებიც შეუძლია დახმარება მისი სახელის გარიაციები ეს სტრუქტურების განახლება, მესწავლება და მანიპულაცია, რომელიც ტიპულად უნდა გამოვიყენოთ დიდ მანქანური ძალადობა, რომელიც მანქანილური განახლება მონაცემების და ხელწ ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ აკტივი სწავლის ფრამეტრის გადავიწყებთ, რომელიც დირასტიკურად შემცირებული ინტერტიკების სტრუქტურების შესაბამისათვის მონაცემები და ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ პროგრამები მარტიკაციის ინტერქტუქტურების შესახებ მათი სტრუქტურებისთვის ავტომატურად შეიქმნა ადამიანის შესახებ შესა ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი ფრამეტრი მუშაობელია, რომელიც ხელწერული პროგრამები და სწავლების მოდელების შესახებ. ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ ჩვენი პარამეტრების სუტილიტება ექსტრაქციის და ინტერტიკის გარეშექმნის საქმებში.', 'hu': 'Számos tudásközpontú alkalmazás számára alapvető fontosságú, hogy a nevezett entitásokat azonosítsuk szöveges említéseikből. Azonban az entitások nem rendelkeznek egyedi képviselettel, és említéseik nagymértékben eltérhetnek. Ezek a változások összetett módon jelentkeznek, amelyeket nem lehet szöveges hasonlósági mutatókkal rögzíteni. Az entitások azonban alapul szolgáló struktúrákkal rendelkeznek, amelyeket általában azonos entitástípusú entitások osztanak meg, amelyek segíthetnek a névváltozások felett érvelni. Ezeknek a struktúráknak a felfedezése, tanulása és manipulálása általában nagy mennyiségű kézi erőfeszítést igényel, jellemzően nagy mennyiségű címkézett képzési adat és kézzel írt transzformációs programok formájában. Ebben a munkában egy aktív tanuláson alapuló keretrendszert javasolunk, amely drasztikusan csökkenti az entitások struktúráinak elsajátításához szükséges címkézett adatokat. Megmutatjuk, hogy a struktúrájukhoz tartozó entitások leképezésére szolgáló programok automatikusan létrehozhatók emberi érthető címkék segítségével. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy keretrendszerünk következetesen felülmúlja mind a kézzel írt programokat, mind a felügyelt tanulási modelleket. Bemutatjuk keretrendszerünk hasznosságát a kitermelési és szanálási feladatokban is.', 'el': 'Βασική για πολλές εφαρμογές που επικεντρώνονται στη γνώση είναι η ανάγκη να εντοπιστούν ονομαστικές οντότητες από τις γραπτές αναφορές τους. Ωστόσο, οι οντότητες στερούνται μιας μοναδικής αναπαράστασης και οι αναφορές τους μπορεί να διαφέρουν σημαντικά. Αυτές οι παραλλαγές προκύπτουν με πολύπλοκους τρόπους που δεν μπορούν να συλληφθούν χρησιμοποιώντας μετρήσεις ομοιότητας κειμένου. Ωστόσο, οι οντότητες έχουν υποκείμενες δομές, συνήθως κοινές από οντότητες του ίδιου τύπου οντότητας, οι οποίες μπορούν να βοηθήσουν στη λογική σχετικά με τις παραλλαγές ονομάτων τους. Η ανακάλυψη, η εκμάθηση και ο χειρισμός αυτών των δομών απαιτεί συνήθως υψηλή χειρωνακτική προσπάθεια με τη μορφή μεγάλων ποσοτήτων ετικετών δεδομένων κατάρτισης και χειρόγραφων προγραμμάτων μετασχηματισμού. Στην εργασία αυτή, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο ενεργού μάθησης που μειώνει δραστικά τα επισημασμένα δεδομένα που απαιτούνται για την εκμάθηση των δομών των οντοτήτων. Δείχνουμε ότι προγράμματα χαρτογράφησης αναφορών οντοτήτων στις δομές τους μπορούν να δημιουργηθούν αυτόματα χρησιμοποιώντας κατανοητές από τον άνθρωπο ετικέτες. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι το πλαίσιο μας ξεπερνά σταθερά τόσο τα χειρόγραφα προγράμματα όσο και τα εποπτευμένα μοντέλα μάθησης. Επιδεικνύουμε επίσης τη χρησιμότητα του πλαισίου μας σε σχέση με τα καθήκοντα εξαγωγής και εξυγίανσης οντοτήτων.', 'it': "Fondamentale per diverse applicazioni incentrate sulla conoscenza è la necessità di identificare entità nominate dalle loro menzioni testuali. Tuttavia, le entità mancano di una rappresentazione unica e le loro menzioni possono differire notevolmente. Queste variazioni si presentano in modi complessi che non possono essere catturati utilizzando metriche di somiglianza testuale. Tuttavia, le entità hanno strutture sottostanti, tipicamente condivise da entità dello stesso tipo di entità, che possono aiutare a ragionare sulle loro variazioni di nome. La scoperta, l'apprendimento e la manipolazione di queste strutture richiede tipicamente un elevato sforzo manuale sotto forma di grandi quantità di dati di formazione etichettati e programmi di trasformazione scritti a mano. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un framework basato sull'apprendimento attivo che riduce drasticamente i dati etichettati necessari per imparare le strutture delle entità. Mostriamo che i programmi per la mappatura delle menzioni di entità alle loro strutture possono essere generati automaticamente utilizzando etichette comprensibili dall'uomo. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro framework supera costantemente sia i programmi scritti a mano che i modelli di apprendimento supervisionati. Dimostriamo anche l'utilità del nostro framework nei compiti di estrazione delle relazioni e risoluzione delle entità.", 'lt': 'Pagrindinė kelioms žiniomis orientuotoms programoms yra poreikis iš tekstinių minčių identifikuoti pavadintus subjektus. Tačiau subjektams trūksta unikalio atstovavimo ir jų minėjimai gali labai skirtis. Šie skirtumai atsiranda sudėtingais būdais, kurių negalima surinkti naudojant tekstinio panašumo metrijas. Tačiau ūkio subjektai turi pagrindines struktūras, kurios paprastai pasidalija tos pačios rūšies ūkio subjektais, ir kurios gali padėti pagrįsti jų pavadinimo keitimus. Atradimas, mokymasis ir manipuliavimas šiomis struktūromis paprastai reikalauja didelių rankinių pastangų, pavyzdžiui, didelio kiekio pažymėtų mokymo duomenų ir rankiniu būdu rašomų transformavimo programų forma. Šiame darbe siūlome aktyviu mokymusi grindžiamą sistemą, kuri drastiškai sumažintų ženklintus duomenis, reikalingus subjektų struktūroms išmokti. Mes rodome, kad žemėlapių išdėstymo subjektams skirtos programos, apie kurias kalbama apie jų struktūras, gali būti automatiškai sukurtos naudojant žmonėms suprantamas etiketes. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų sistema nuosekliai viršija tiek rankinius programus, tiek prižiūrimus mokymosi modelius. Taip pat parodome, kad mūsų sistema yra naudinga gavybos ir subjektų pertvarkymo užduočių atžvilgiu.', 'mk': 'Fundamental to several knowledge-centric applications is the need to identify named entities from their textual mentions.  Сепак, ентитетите немаат уникатно претставување и нивните спомени можат многу да се разликуваат. Овие варијации се појавуваат на комплексни начини кои не можат да се фатат со текстуална метрика на сличност. Сепак, ентитетите имаат основни структури, обично споделени од ентитетите од истиот тип на ентитет, кои можат да помогнат во разумот околу нивните варијации на името. Откривањето, учењето и манипулирањето на овие структури обично бара високи рачни напори во форма на големи количини обележани податоци за обука и рачно напишани програми за трансформација. Во оваа работа, предложуваме активно учење базирана рамка која драстично ги намалува означените податоци потребни за учење на структурите на ентитетите. Покажуваме дека програмите за мапирање на ентитетите споменуваат на нивните структури можат автоматски да се генерираат користејќи луѓе-разбирливи етикети. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека нашата рамка постојано ги надминува и рачно напишаните програми и надгледуваните модели на учење. Исто така ја демонстрираме корисноста на нашата рамка во врска со извлекувањето и задачите за решавање на ентитетите.', 'kk': 'Бірнеше білім орталық қолданбаларға негізгі мәтіндіктерінен аталған нысандарды анықтау керек. Бірақ бөліктердің бірнеше таңбашасы жоқ, олардың айырмалары көп айырмалы болады. Бұл вариациялар мәтіндік ұқсас метрикалық көмегімен түсірілмейтін комплекс түрлерде болады. Бірақ нысандардың негізгі құрылымы бар, әдетте бір нысандардың түріне бөлінген нысандар, олар атауларының айырмашылықтарына көмектесе алады. Бұл құрылғыларды анықтау, үйрену және өзгерту әдетте, жарлық оқыту деректері мен қолмен жазылған түрлендіру бағдарламалардың үлкен мөлшерлері ретінде көп қолмен жұмыс істеу керек. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз белсенді оқыту негіздеген қоршауын таңдаймыз. Бұл жарлық құрылымдарды оқыту үшін керек деректерді драстикалық қысқартады. Біз оның құрылғыларының картасының бағдарламалары адамдардың түсінікті жарлықтарымен автоматты түрде құрылады. Біздің тәжірибеміз қолмен жазылған бағдарламаларды және оқыту үлгілерін тексеру үлгілерімізді көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, біз бағдарламаларды тарқату және айырмашылық тапсырмаларымен қатынау үшін қоршауымыздың утилитациясын көрсетедік.', 'ms': 'Asas untuk beberapa aplikasi pusat pengetahuan adalah perlukan untuk mengenalpasti entiti bernama dari sebutan teks mereka. Namun, entiti kekurangan perwakilan unik dan sebutan mereka boleh berbeza sangat. Variasi ini muncul dalam cara kompleks yang tidak dapat ditangkap menggunakan metrik kesamaan teks. Namun, entiti mempunyai struktur dasar, biasanya dikongsi oleh entiti jenis entiti yang sama, yang boleh membantu alasan atas variasi nama mereka. Penemuan, belajar dan manipulasi struktur ini biasanya memerlukan usaha manual yang tinggi dalam bentuk jumlah besar data latihan yang ditabel dan program penukaran tulis tangan. Dalam kerja ini, kami melamar kerangka pembelajaran aktif yang mengurangi secara drastik data yang diperlukan untuk belajar struktur entiti. Kami menunjukkan bahawa program untuk memetakan entiti menyebut kepada struktur mereka boleh secara automatik dijana menggunakan label yang boleh dimengerti manusia. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa kerangka kami secara konsisten melampaui kedua-dua program tulis tangan dan model belajar yang diawasi. We also demonstrate the utility of our framework in relation extraction and entity resolution tasks.', 'mt': 'Fundamentali għal diversi applikazzjonijiet ċentriċi għall-għarfien hija l-ħtieġa li jiġu identifikati entitajiet imsemmija mis-semmiet testwali tagħhom. Madankollu, l-entitajiet ma għandhomx rappreżentanza unika u s-simboli tagħhom jistgħu jvarjaw ħafna. These variations arise in complex ways that cannot be captured using textual similarity metrics.  Madankollu, l-entitajiet għandhom strutturi sottostanti, tipikament kondiviżi minn entitajiet tal-istess tip ta’ entità, li jistgħu jgħinu r-raġuni dwar il-varjazzjonijiet fl-isem tagħhom. L-iskoperta, it-tagħlim u l-manipulazzjoni ta’ dawn l-istrutturi tipikament jeħtieġu sforz manwali għoli fil-forma ta’ ammonti kbar ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ ittikkettata u programmi ta’ trasformazzjoni miktuba bl-idejn. F’dan ix-xogħol, nipproponu qafas ibbażat fuq it-tagħlim attiv li jnaqqas drastikament id-dejta ttikkettata meħtieġa biex jitgħallmu l-istrutturi tal-entitajiet. Aħna nuru li programmi għall-immappjar tal-entità jsemmu l-istrutturi tagħhom jistgħu jiġu ġġenerati awtomatikament bl-użu ta’ tikketti li jinftiehmu mill-bniedem. Our experiments show that our framework consistently outperforms both handwritten programs and supervised learning models.  Aħna nuru wkoll l-utilità tal-qafas tagħna fir-rigward tal-kompiti tal-estrazzjoni u r-riżoluzzjoni tal-entitajiet.', 'mn': 'Хэдэн хэдэн мэдлэг төв хэрэглээний үндсэн хэрэглээ нь тэдний текстүүдийн хэлэлцээсээ нэрлэгдсэн бүтээлүүдийг олж мэдэх хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ бизнесүүд өөр нэг төрлийн үзүүлэлт байхгүй, тэдний хэлэлцээг маш өөрчлөгдөж чадна. Эдгээр өөрчлөлт нь textual similarity метрик ашиглан баригдахгүй комплекс аргаар гарч ирдэг. Гэхдээ бизнесүүд ихэвчлэн ижил бизнесийн төрлийн бизнесүүдийн хуваалцагдаж байдаг. Энэ нь өөрчлөлтийн шалтгааныг тусалж чадна. Эдгээр бүтээлүүдийг олох, сурах болон мандайлах нь ихэвчлэн маш их хэмжээний суралцах өгөгдлийн болон гар бичсэн шилжүүлэх програмын хэлбэрээр өндөр гар хичээл хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажил дээр бид бүтээгдэхүүний бүтээгдэхүүнийг сурахад шаардлагатай тэмдэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийг үнэхээр багасгадаг актив суралцах сургалтын үндсэн хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Бид бүтээгдэхүүний газрын зураг бүтээгдэхүүний бүтээгдэхүүнийг автоматаар бүтээж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний туршилтууд гар бичсэн програм болон суралцах загваруудыг харуулдаг. Бид мөн өөрсдийнхөө хөрөнгө оруулалт, бүтэц шийдвэрлэлтийн даалгавруудын тухай хэрэгцээг харуулдаг.', 'ml': 'Fundamental to several knowledge-centric applications is the need to identify named entities from their textual mentions.  എന്നാലും, ശരീരങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d ഇല്ല, അവരുടെ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ വ്യത്യസ്തമാകും. ടെക്സ്ചുള്\u200d സമമായ മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പിടിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ലാത്ത ഈ വേറിഷനുകള്\u200d സങ്കല്\u200dപ്പിച എങ്കിലും വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d ഈ സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയും പഠിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നത് സാധാരണയായി കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി വലിയ കൈകൊണ്ടുള്ള ശ്രമി ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സജ്ജീവമായ പഠിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെക്ക് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. അത് വസ്തുക്കളുടെ അടിസ് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു അവയുടെ സ്ഥാനങ്ങളിലേക്കുള്ള പ്രോഗ്രാമുകള്\u200d മാപ്പിങ്ങ് വസ്തുക്കളുടെ പ്രോഗ്രാ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമേക്ക് പ്രോഗ്രാമുകളിലും കൈഎഴുതിയ പ്ര നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകളുടെ ഉപയോഗം നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്, പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനും ശരീരത്തിന്റെ വിധ', 'no': 'Grunnleggjande for fleire kunnskapsenterske program er det må identifisera namnet entiteter frå tekstmenningane sine. Entitetene manglar imidlertid ein unikt representasjon, og dei oppgjevnadene kan veldig forskjellige. Desse variasjonane oppstår på komplekse måtar som ikkje kan hentast med tekstuelle similaritetsmetrikar. Entitetene har imidlertid underliggande strukturar, som vanlegvis delt av einingar med same entitetstype, som kan hjelpa grunn over namnvariasjonane sine. Oppdaging, læring og manipulering av desse strukturene krev vanlegvis høg manuelt påverka i forma av store mengdar av merkelige opplæringsdata og handskrivne transformasjonsprogrammer. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit aktiv læringsbasert rammeverk som drastisk reduserer merkelige data nødvendig for å lære strukturen av einingar. Vi viser at programmet for mappingsentitet som mener til strukturene sine kan automatisk lagast med menneskelige etikettar. Eksperimentane våre viser at rammeverket vårt konsistent utfører både handskrivne program og oversikte læringsmodeller. Vi viser også verktøyet for rammeverktøyet vårt i forhold til utpakking og oppløysing av einingar.', 'pl': 'Podstawowym elementem kilku aplikacji zorientowanych na wiedzę jest konieczność identyfikacji nazwanych podmiotów z ich wzmianek tekstowych. Jednak podmiotom brakuje unikalnej reprezentacji, a ich wzmianki mogą się znacznie różnić. Te odmiany powstają w złożony sposób, których nie można uchwycić za pomocą wskaźników podobieństwa tekstowego. Jednak podmioty mają struktury podstawowe, zazwyczaj współdzielone przez podmioty tego samego typu podmiotów, które mogą pomóc rozumować ich zmiany nazw. Odkrywanie, uczenie się i manipulowanie tymi strukturami zazwyczaj wymaga dużego wysiłku manualnego w postaci dużych ilości etykietowanych danych szkoleniowych i ręcznie pisanych programów transformacyjnych. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy ramy oparte na aktywnym uczeniu się, które drastycznie redukują znakowane dane niezbędne do poznania struktur podmiotów. Pokazujemy, że programy do mapowania wzmianek jednostek do ich struktur mogą być generowane automatycznie za pomocą zrozumiałych dla człowieka etykiet. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz framework konsekwentnie przewyższa zarówno ręcznie pisane programy, jak i nadzorowane modele uczenia się. Pokazujemy również przydatność naszego frameworku w zadaniach ekstrakcji relacji i restrukturyzacji podmiotów.', 'ro': 'Fundamentală pentru mai multe aplicații centrate pe cunoaștere este necesitatea de a identifica entitățile numite din mențiunile lor textuale. Cu toate acestea, entitățile nu au o reprezentare unică și mențiunile lor pot diferi foarte mult. Aceste variații apar în moduri complexe care nu pot fi capturate folosind metrici de similitudine textuală. Cu toate acestea, entitățile au structuri subiacente, de obicei partajate de entități de același tip de entitate, care pot ajuta la raționare asupra variațiilor numelui lor. Descoperirea, învățarea și manipularea acestor structuri necesită, de obicei, un efort manual ridicat sub forma unor cantități mari de date de instruire etichetate și programe de transformare scrise manual. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru bazat pe învățare activă care reduce drastic datele etichetate necesare pentru a învăța structurile entităților. Noi arătăm că programele de cartografiere a mențiunilor entităților la structurile lor pot fi generate automat folosind etichete inteligibile de om. Experimentele noastre arată că cadrul nostru depășește constant atât programele scrise de mână, cât și modelele de învățare supravegheate. De asemenea, demonstrăm utilitatea cadrului nostru în activitățile de extragere a relațiilor și de rezoluție a entităților.', 'sr': 'Fundamentalno za nekoliko znanja-centralnih aplikacija je potrebna identifikacija imenih entitata iz njihovih tekstualnih spomena. Međutim, entiteti nedostaju jedinstveno predstavljanje, a njihovi spomena se mogu mnogo razlikovati. Ove varijacije se pojavljuju na kompleksnim načinama koje se ne mogu uhvatiti koristeći tekstualne sličnosti metrike. Međutim, entiteti imaju temeljne strukture, obično podijeljene entitetima istog tipa entiteta, koje mogu pomoći razuma zbog njihovih varijacija imena. Otkrivanje, učenje i manipuliranje tih struktura obično zahteva visoke rukovne napore u obliku velikih količina označenih podataka obuke i programa za transformaciju rukopisa. U ovom poslu predlažemo aktivan okvir na osnovu učenja koji drastično smanjuje označene podatke potrebne za naučenje strukture entiteta. Pokazujemo da programi za mapiranje entiteta spominju njihove strukture mogu biti automatski proizvedeni koristeći ljudske etikete koje mogu razumjeti. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš okvir stalno iznosi i rukopisane programe i nadzorne modele učenja. Takođe pokazujemo korisnost našeg okvira u vezi sa izvlačenjem i rezolucijom subjekta.', 'si': 'මුළු දැනගැනීම-කෙන්ද්\u200dරික විදියට අධාර්\u200dයය තමයි ඔවුන්ගේ පාළුවන් කියලා නම් කියලා තියෙන්න ඕනේ  නමුත්, සංවිධානයට අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. මේ වෙනස් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සංශ්\u200dය විදිහට පත්වෙන්න බැරි විදිහට පත්වෙන්න පුළුවන්. නමුත්, සංවිධාන වර්ගයක් තියෙනවා, සාමාන්\u200dය වර්ගයක් වගේ සංවිධාන වර්ගයක් වලින්, ඒකෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ නම වෙන සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම මේ සංවිධානය හොයාගන්න, ඉගෙන ගන්න හා වැඩ කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ ලේබල් කරපු ප්\u200dරධාන දත්ත හා අත් ලියපු ව මේ වැඩේ අපි සක්\u200dරිය-ඉගෙන ගන්න අධ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ලේබල් කරලා තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dය අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ම අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට අත් ලියපු වැඩසටහන් සහ ඉගෙනීම් මොඩේල් එක්ක න අපි තවමත් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ', 'so': "Sida aasaasiga ah ee codsiga barta aqoonta waxaa loo baahan yahay in laga caddeeyo macluumaadyo la magacaabay macluumaadkooda qoraalka ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee dowladuhu waa u baahan yihiin wakiil gaar ah, waana kala bedelan karaa macluumaadkooda. Isbedelka waxaa ka soo baxa qaabooyin adag oo aan la qabsan karin isticmaalka metrikada qoraalka oo isku mid ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, hay'adaha waxaa ku yaala dhismo hoose ah, sida caadiga ah waxaa lagu qeybiyaa waxyaabo isku mid ah, taas oo sabab ku caawinaya isbedelka magacooda. Sida caadiga ah waxaa loo baahan yahay in aad u hawshoodo dhaqaale, barashada iyo maamulka dhismahan sida badan looga baahan yahay macluumaad waxbarasho oo waaweyn iyo barnaamijyo is-beddelka gacmaha. Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa firaaqad waxbarasho oo ku shaqeeya, taasoo si aad ah u hoosaystira macluumaadka la qoray si ay u barato dhismaha jidhka. Waxan tusnaynaa in barnaamijyo loogu talagalay sawiraadka ay dhismaha ku qoran yihiin ay si automati ah u abuuri karaan isticmaalka calaamadaha aasaasiga ah ee dadka. Imtixaanadayada waxay muuqataa in fircoonkayadu ay dhamaan ka muuqato barnaamijyo qoraal ah iyo qaabab waxbarasho la ilaaliyo. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa isticmaalka dhaqdhaqaalaha iyo hawlaha go’aanka ee shaqada jidhka.", 'sv': 'Grundläggande för flera kunskapscentrerade tillämpningar är behovet av att identifiera namngivna entiteter från deras textomnämnanden. Men entiteter saknar en unik representation och deras omnämnanden kan skilja sig mycket åt. Dessa variationer uppstår på komplexa sätt som inte kan fångas med hjälp av textliknande likhetsmått. Men entiteter har underliggande strukturer, vanligtvis delade av entiteter av samma entitetstyp, som kan hjälpa till att resonera över deras namnvariationer. Att upptäcka, lära sig och manipulera dessa strukturer kräver vanligtvis hög manuell ansträngning i form av stora mängder märkta träningsdata och handskrivna transformationsprogram. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett aktivt lärande baserat ramverk som drastiskt minskar de märkta data som krävs för att lära sig strukturerna i entiteter. Vi visar att program för kartläggning av entitetsomnämnanden till deras strukturer automatiskt kan genereras med hjälp av mänskligt begripliga etiketter. Våra experiment visar att vårt ramverk konsekvent överträffar både handskrivna program och handledda inlärningsmodeller. Vi visar också nyttan av vårt ramverk i relation extraktion och entitetsresolution uppgifter.', 'ta': 'சில அறிவு மையம் பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு அடிப்படையான தேவை ஆனால், உண்மைகளுக்கு ஒரு தனிப்பட்ட பிரதிநிதியில் இல்லை மற்றும் அவர்களுடைய குறிப்புகள் மிக மாறுபடும இந்த மாறுபாடுகள் சிக்கலான வழிகளில் நிரல் ஒத்த மெட்ரிக்களை பயன்படுத்தி பிடிக்க முடியாது. However, entities have underlying structures, typically shared by entities of the same entity type, that can help reason over their name variations. இந்த அமைப்புகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பது, கற்றுக்கொள்வது மற்றும் நிர்வாக்கம் செய்வது பெரிய கையேட்டு முயற்சி செய்து கொண்டிருக்கும் போது  In this work, we propose an active-learning based framework that drastically reduces the labeled data required to learn the structures of entities.  நாம் காட்டுகிறோம் நிரல்கள் வரைப்படத்தின் பொருள் குறிப்புகளை உருவாக்கும் அமைப்புகளில் தானாகவே மனித சூழ்நிலை எங்கள் சோதனைகள் தெரியும் என்றால் எங்கள் சட்டத்தில் முழுமையாக கையில் எழுதப்பட்ட நிரல்களையும் பார்க்கப்பட்டு நாம் தொடர்பு பிரித்து மற்றும் உண்மையான தெளிவுத்திறன் பணிகளில் நம் சட்டத்தின் பயன்பாட்டை காட்டுகிற', 'ur': 'بہت سی علم-مرکز کاربریوں کے لئے بنیادی کی ضرورت ہے کہ ان کی تفصیل یادہانی سے نامہ داروں کو پہچان سکیں. لیکن متحدوں کو ایک واحد کی تعریف نہیں ہے اور ان کی تعریف بہت زیادہ اختلاف کر سکتی ہے۔ یہ تغییرات پیچیدہ طریقے سے پیدا ہوتے ہیں جو ٹیکسٹل کی مثالی متریک کے مطابق پکڑ نہیں سکتے۔ لیکن، ایٹنیٹوں کے پاس بنیادی ساختار ہیں، معمولاً ایک ہی ایٹنیٹ کے ٹائپ کے ذریعہ شریک ہوتے ہیں، جو ان کے نام کے متفاوتوں پر دلیل کی مدد کرسکتے ہیں. یہ ساختاروں کو اچھی طرح کی تلاش کرنا، سیکھنا اور منظورت کرنا ضرورت ہے کہ بہت زیادہ مقدار کی تلاش ڈیٹا اور ہاتھ لکھی تغییر پروگراموں کی شکل میں اچھی لائق کریں۔ اس کام میں ہم ایک فعال سیکھنے کی بنیادی فرموک کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جس کے ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ ذریعہ سے لابلیٹ ڈیٹا کم کر دیتا ہے جو واحدوں کی ساختاری سیکھنے کے لئے لازم ہے. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ان کی ساختاریوں کے ذریعہ مکاپیٹ انٹیٹیوں کے لئے پروگرامے انسان کے سمجھنے والے لیبل کے مطابق خود پیدا کئے جائیں۔ ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے فرم ہمیشہ ہتھیار لکھے ہوئے پروگراموں کو اور سیکھنے کی مدل کو دیکھ رہا ہے۔ ہم نے بھی اپنے فرمود کا فائدہ دکھایا ہے اٹھانے اور انٹیٹیٹی روزی کے کاموں کے معاملہ میں.', 'uz': "Bir necha ilmo markaziy dasturlarning asosiy matn xususiyatlaridan nomli obʼektlarni aniqlash kerak. Lekin, ma'lumotlar uning taqdimoti yo'q va ularning fikrlari juda ajoyib turadi. These variations arise in complex ways that cannot be captured using textual similarity metrics.  Lekin, obʼektlar asosiy structural asosida, odatda bitta obʼekt turi boʻlgan narsalar bilan bir nechta boʻlishi mumkin, bu ularning nomining oʻzgarishlarini yordam beradi. Ushbu tuzuvlarni aniqlash, o'rganish va boshqarish dasturlari oddiy qoʻlbola boshqarish uchun juda katta ta ta'lim maʼlumot va qoʻllanmalar tugmasini ko'paytirish kerak. Bu vazifanda, biz aktiv o'rganish asosiy freymini rivojlanishimiz va obʼektlarning tuzuvlarini o'rganish uchun kerakli maʼlumotlarni o'zgartirib chiqaradi. Biz quyidagi rasmlarning tuzuvlari uchun dasturlarni avtomatik yaratish mumkin. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz, freymiz hamma qo'llangan dasturlarni ko'rsatadi va o'rganish modellarini ko'rsatadi. Biz quyidagi jadvalning foydalanishimizni ko'rsatamiz. Biz quyidagi quyidagi amallar va quyidagi quyidagi vazifalarni ko'rsatamiz.", 'vi': 'Chủ yếu cho nhiều ứng dụng trung tâm kiến thức là cần phải xác định các thực thể tên trong các chỉ thị văn bản. Tuy nhiên, thực thể thiếu một đại diện duy nhất và đề cập của họ có thể khác rất nhiều. Những biến đổi này xuất hiện theo cách phức tạp không thể ghi lại bằng âm tương tự. Tuy nhiên, thực thể có cấu trúc cơ bản, thường được chia sẻ bởi các thực thể cùng kiểu thực thể, có thể giúp lý lẽ về sự biến đổi tên tuổi. Việc khám phá, học và điều khiển các cấu trúc này thường đòi hỏi một công trình thủ công cao dưới dạng một lượng lớn các dữ liệu huấn luyện được dán nhãn và các chương trình chuyển đổi bằng tay. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ quan dựa trên việc học hành có khả năng giảm tối đa các dữ liệu ghi nhãn cần thiết để học các cấu trúc của thực thể. Chúng tôi cho thấy các chương trình vẽ bản đồ đề cập đến các cấu trúc của họ có thể tự động được tạo ra bằng các nhãn con người hiểu được. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy khung hình của chúng tôi hoàn toàn vượt trội cả các chương trình viết tay và các mẫu học được giám sát. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh tiện ích của cơ sở trong các nhiệm vụ giải quyết các thực thể.', 'da': 'Grundlæggende for flere videnscentrerede applikationer er behovet for at identificere navngivne enheder fra deres tekstnævnelser. Men enheder mangler en unik repræsentation, og deres omtaler kan variere meget. Disse variationer opstår på komplekse måder, som ikke kan registreres ved hjælp af tekstligningsmålinger. Enheder har dog underliggende strukturer, som typisk deles af enheder af samme enhedstype, som kan hjælpe med at begrunde deres navnevariationer. At opdage, lære og manipulere disse strukturer kræver typisk høj manuel indsats i form af store mængder mærkede træningsdata og håndskrevne transformationsprogrammer. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en aktiv læringsbaseret ramme, der drastisk reducerer de mærkede data, der kræves for at lære strukturerne i enheder. Vi viser, at programmer til kortlægning af enhedsnævnelser til deres strukturer automatisk kan genereres ved hjælp af menneskelige forståelige etiketter. Vores eksperimenter viser, at vores rammer konsekvent overgår både håndskrevne programmer og overvågede læringsmodeller. Vi demonstrerer også nytten af vores rammer i relation til udvindings- og afviklingsopgaver.', 'hr': 'Osnovno za nekoliko znanja-centričkih primjena je potrebna identifikacija imenovanih subjekta iz njihovih tekstualnih spomena. Međutim, entiteti nedostaju jedinstveno predstavljanje, a njihova spomena se mogu mnogo razlikovati. Ove varijacije se pojavljuju na složenim načinama koje se ne mogu uhvatiti koristeći tekstualne sličnosti metrike. Međutim, subjekti imaju temeljne strukture, obično dijeljene subjektima istog tipa subjekta, koje mogu pomoći razumijevanju zbog njihovih varijacija imena. Otkrivanje, učenje i manipuliranje tih struktura obično zahtijeva visoke rukovne napore u obliku velikih količina označenih podataka o obuci i programa za transformaciju rukopisa. U ovom poslu predlažemo okvir na temelju aktivnog učenja koji drastično smanjuje označene podatke potrebne za učenje strukture entiteta. Pokazujemo da se programi za mapiranje entiteta spominju na njihove strukture mogu automatski proizvesti koristeći ljudski razumljive etikete. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš okvir stalno iznosi i rukopisane programe i nadzorne modele učenja. Također pokazujemo korisnost našeg okvira u odnosu na zadatke za izvlačenje i rješavanje entiteta.', 'bg': 'Фундаментално за няколко приложения, насочени към знанието, е необходимостта от идентифициране на имената от техните текстови споменания. Въпреки това, субектите нямат уникално представителство и техните споменания могат да се различават значително. Тези вариации възникват по сложни начини, които не могат да бъдат уловени с помощта на текстови показатели за сходство. Въпреки това, субектите имат базови структури, обикновено споделени от субекти от един и същ тип субекти, които могат да помогнат за разсъждаването на техните вариации на имената. Откриването, ученето и манипулирането на тези структури обикновено изисква високи ръчни усилия под формата на големи количества етикетирани данни за обучение и ръчно написани програми за трансформация. В тази работа предлагаме рамка, базирана на активно обучение, която драстично намалява етикетираните данни, необходими за изучаване на структурите на субектите. Показваме, че програмите за картографиране на споменаванията на обекти към техните структури могат автоматично да бъдат генерирани с помощта на разбираеми за човека етикети. Нашите експерименти показват, че нашата рамка постоянно надминава както ръчно написаните програми, така и моделите на обучение под надзор. Също така демонстрираме полезността на нашата рамка по отношение на задачите за извличане и разрешаване на субекти.', 'nl': "Fundamenteel voor verschillende kennisgerichte toepassingen is de noodzaak om benoemde entiteiten te identificeren aan de hand van hun tekstuele vermeldingen. Entiteiten missen echter een unieke representatie en hun vermeldingen kunnen sterk verschillen. Deze variaties ontstaan op complexe manieren die niet kunnen worden vastgelegd met behulp van tekstvergelijkingsmetrieken. Entiteiten hebben echter onderliggende structuren, meestal gedeeld door entiteiten van hetzelfde entiteitstype, die kunnen helpen redeneren over hun naamvariaties. Het ontdekken, leren en manipuleren van deze structuren vereist meestal een hoge handmatige inspanning in de vorm van grote hoeveelheden gelabelde trainingsgegevens en handgeschreven transformatieprogramma's. In dit werk stellen we een active-learning gebaseerd framework voor dat de gelabelde gegevens die nodig zijn om de structuren van entiteiten te leren drastisch vermindert. We laten zien dat programma's voor het toewijzen van entiteitsvermeldingen aan hun structuren automatisch gegenereerd kunnen worden met behulp van menselijk begrijpelijke labels. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat ons framework consequent beter presteert dan handgeschreven programma's en begeleide leermodellen. We demonstreren ook het nut van ons raamwerk bij relatieontwikkeling en entiteitsafwikkelingstaken.", 'ko': '일부 지식 중심의 응용 프로그램에서 가장 기본적인 것은 텍스트에서 명명 실체를 식별하는 것이다.그러나 실체는 독특한 표현이 부족하기 때문에 그들의 언급은 큰 차이가 있을 수 있다.이러한 변화는 복잡한 방식으로 나타나기 때문에 텍스트의 유사성 도량을 사용하여 포획할 수 없다.그러나 실체는 밑바닥 구조를 가지고 보통 같은 실체 유형의 실체가 공유하기 때문에 그 명칭 변화를 추리하는 데 도움이 된다.이러한 구조를 발견하고 학습하며 조작하는 데는 일반적으로 대량의 인공 작업이 필요하다. 예를 들어 표시된 훈련 데이터와 손으로 쓴 변환 프로그램 등이다.이 작업에서 우리는 주동적인 학습을 바탕으로 하는 구조를 제시했는데 이 구조는 실체 구조를 배우는 데 필요한 표기 데이터를 크게 감소시켰다.우리는 인간이 이해할 수 있는 라벨을 사용하면 실체 언급을 구조에 비추는 프로그램을 자동으로 생성할 수 있다는 것을 보여준다.우리의 실험은 우리의 구조가 필기 프로그램과 감독 학습 모델보다 시종 우수하다는 것을 보여 주었다.우리는 또한 우리의 구조가 관계 추출과 실체 해석 임무에서의 실용성을 보여 주었다.', 'fa': 'بنیادی برای چندین کاربرد مرکزی علم نیاز است که برنامه\u200cهای نامیده شده را از یادآوری\u200cهای متن\u200cشان شناسایی کند. با این حال، شرکت\u200cها یک نمایش متفاوت لازم دارند و اشاره\u200cهایشان می\u200cتوانند بسیار تفاوت کنند. این تغییرات به طریق پیچیده ای وجود دارند که نمی توانند با استفاده از متریک شباهت textual دستگیر شوند. با این حال، شرکتها ساختارهای پایه دارند که معمولاً توسط شرکتهای یک نوع شرکت دارند، که می توانند به دلیل تغییرات نامشان کمک کنند. کشف، یادگیری و تغییر این ساختارها معمولاً نیاز به تلاش دستی بالا در شکل تعداد زیادی از داده های آموزش یادگیری و برنامه های تغییر دستی است. در این کار، ما یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ ما نشان می دهیم که برنامه\u200cها برای نقشه\u200cسازی شرکت\u200cهایی که به ساختمان\u200cهایشان اشاره می\u200cکنند می\u200cتوانند با استفاده از نقشه\u200cهای قابل بفهم انسان تولید شوند. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که چهارچوب ما همیشه برنامه\u200cهای دستی نوشته شده و مدل یادگیری را تحت نظر می\u200cگیرد. ما همچنین استفاده از چهارچهارچهارمون را در ارتباط به خارج کردن وضعیت حل اجتماعی نشان می دهیم.', 'id': 'Pada dasar beberapa aplikasi sentral pengetahuan adalah kebutuhan untuk mengidentifikasi entitas bernama dari sebutan teks mereka. Namun, entitas kekurangan representation unik dan sebutan mereka dapat berbeda besar. Variasi ini muncul dalam cara kompleks yang tidak dapat ditangkap menggunakan metrik kesamaan tekstual. Namun, entitas memiliki struktur dasar, biasanya dibagi oleh entitas tipe entitas yang sama, yang dapat membantu alasan atas variasi nama mereka. Penemuan, belajar dan memanipulasi struktur-struktur ini biasanya memerlukan usaha manual yang tinggi dalam bentuk jumlah besar data pelatihan yang ditabel dan program transformasi tulis tangan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan rangkaian pembelajaran aktif yang secara drastis mengurangi data yang diperlukan untuk mempelajari struktur entitas. Kami menunjukkan bahwa program untuk memetakan entitas menyebutkan struktur mereka dapat secara otomatis dihasilkan menggunakan label yang dapat dimengerti manusia. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa kerangka kami secara konsisten melebihi kedua program tulis tangan dan model belajar yang diawasi. Kami juga menunjukkan utilitas dari kerangka kami dalam hubungan ekstraksi dan tugas resolusi entitas.', 'de': 'Grundlegend für mehrere wissenszentrierte Anwendungen ist die Notwendigkeit, benannte Entitäten aus ihren textlichen Erwähnungen zu identifizieren. Entitäten fehlt jedoch eine einzigartige Darstellung und ihre Erwähnungen können sehr unterschiedlich sein. Diese Variationen entstehen auf komplexe Weise, die nicht mit Textähnlichkeitsmetriken erfasst werden können. Entitäten haben jedoch zugrunde liegende Strukturen, die typischerweise von Entitäten desselben Entity-Typs geteilt werden, die helfen können, über ihre Namensvariationen nachzudenken. Diese Strukturen zu entdecken, zu erlernen und zu manipulieren erfordert in der Regel einen hohen manuellen Aufwand in Form von großen Mengen beschrifteter Trainingsdaten und handschriftlicher Transformationsprogramme. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein aktives Lern-basiertes Framework vor, das die markierten Daten drastisch reduziert, die zum Erlernen der Strukturen von Entitäten erforderlich sind. Wir zeigen, dass Programme zur Zuordnung von Entity-Erwähnungen zu ihren Strukturen automatisch mit menschenverständlichen Labels generiert werden können. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass unser Framework sowohl handschriftliche Programme als auch überwachte Lernmodelle durchweg übertrifft. Wir demonstrieren auch die Nützlichkeit unseres Frameworks bei der Beziehungsextraktion und Entity Resolution Aufgaben.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe bilim-sentraly uygulamalaryň esasy düýbünden adlanylan guramlaryny tespit etmelidir. Ýöne birnäçe üýtgeşik bir temsil ýok we olaryň sözleriniň kän bir üýtgeşik edip biler. Bu çeşitlikler metin benzeri metrikleri kullanarak yakalanamayan karmaşık yönlerde gelir. Ýöne, işlemler ýerli strukturlary bar, adatça birnäçe hedefiň birnäçe görnüşleri bilen paylaşýarlar. Olar adlarynyň üýtgeşmeleri üçin sebäbi kömek edip biler. Bu structures öwrenmek, öwrenmek we işlemek düzeninde adatça el çarpyşlygyny etilen we el ýazylan terjime programlaryň şeklinde ýokary ullanýar. Bu işde, birnäçe strukturlary öwrenmek üçin gerekli etiketli maglumatlary drastik düşürmek üçin aktiw öwrenmek tabanly bir çerçew teklip edip otyrys. Biz öz strukturlaryna görkezilýän bir taýýarlama programlarynyň adama düşünýän etiketlerden ullanýar. Biziň deneylerimiz çerýämiz el ýazylan programlaryň hem öwrenmek nusgalarynyň üstünde täsir edýändigini görkezýär. Biz hem öz çerýämiziň ýüklemek we çözümleşme zadlarymyza baglanşygymyzy görkez.', 'am': 'በብዙ እውቀት-ማዕከላዊ ፕሮግራሞች ማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ነገር ግን አካባቢዎች የልዩ መልዕክት የጎደለባቸው እና ማስታወሳቸው እጅግ ልዩነት ይችላል፡፡ እነዚህ ለውጦች በጽሑፍ ብጤት ሚትሪኮችን በመጠቀም የማይችሉ በተቃውሞ መንገድ ይቆማሉ። ምንም እንኳን፣ አካባቢዎች የመሠረት ሥርዓቶች ናቸው፣ በተጨማሪም በተለየ አንዱ አካል ዓይነት የተካፈሉ አካባቢዎች፣ የስማቸው መለወጫ ላይ ማስረጃ ይችላል፡፡ Discovering, learning and manipulating these structures typically requires high manual effort in the form of large amounts of labeled training data and handwritten transformation programs.  በዚህ ስራ አካባቢዎችን ለመማር የሚችሉትን የጽሑፎችን ዳታዎች በሙሉ የሚያጎድለውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን ፕሮግራሞች ለአካባቢዎች ማስታወቂያውን ማሳየት የሰው አካባቢ ምልክቶችን በመጠቀም በራስነት እንዲፈጠር ይችላል፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የፍሬማችን ፍሬማችን ሁኔታ እጆችን የተጻፈውን ፕሮግራሞች እና ትምህርት ሞዴላዎችን እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡ በአካባቢው እና አካል ማስታወቂያ ስራዎችን የፍሬማችንን መጠቀሚያ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'sw': 'Fundamental to several knowledge-centric applications is the need to identify named entities from their textual mentions.  Hata hivyo, vyombo vimekosa uwakilishi wa kipekee na tahadhari zao zinaweza kuwa tofauti sana. Mabadiliko haya yanaibuka kwa njia ngumu ambazo haziwezi kukamatwa kwa kutumia mbinu za uhalisia za usawa. Hata hivyo, vyombo vina miundombinu ya msingi, kwa kawaida zinasambazwa na vitu vinavyofanana na aina hiyo, ambavyo vinaweza kusaidia sababu ya mabadiliko ya jina zao. Kugundua, kujifunza na kusimamia miundombinu haya kwa kawaida inahitaji jitihada kubwa za manufaa katika aina kubwa ya taarifa za mafunzo na programu za mabadiliko ya mikononi. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kujifunza kwa haraka ambao unapunguza takwimu zinazohitajika ili kujifunza muundo wa vyombo. Tunaonyesha kwamba programu za ramani zinazotajwa kwa ajili ya miundombinu yao zinaweza kutengenezwa kwa wenyewe kwa kutumia maabara ya binadamu yenye ujumla. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu unaendesha mipango yote ya kuandikwa mikononi na mifano ya kujifunza. Pia tunaonyesha matumizi ya mfumo wetu katika kazi za utekelezaji na suluhisho la uhalisia.', 'sq': 'Fundamental për disa aplikime qendrore në njohuri është nevoja për të identifikuar njësitë e emëruara nga përmendimet e tyre tekstuale. Megjithatë, njësitë mungon një përfaqësim unik dhe përmendimet e tyre mund të ndryshojnë shumë. Këto variacione rriten në mënyra komplekse që nuk mund të kapen duke përdorur metrikat e ngjashmërisë tekstuale. Megjithatë, njësitë kanë struktura themelore, zakonisht të ndara nga njësitë e të njëjtit lloj njësie, që mund të ndihmojnë arsyetimin lidhur me ndryshimet e emrit të tyre. Discovering, learning and manipulating these structures typically requires high manual effort in the form of large amounts of labeled training data and handwritten transformation programs.  Në këtë punë, propozojmë një kuadër të bazuar në mësim aktiv që redukton drastikisht të dhënat e etiketuara të nevojshme për të mësuar strukturat e njësive. Ne tregojmë se programet për hartimin e njësisë përmend strukturat e tyre mund të gjenerohen automatikisht duke përdorur etiketa njerëzore-të kuptueshme. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se kuadri ynë vazhdimisht ekziston si programe të shkruara me dorë dhe modele mësimi të mbikqyrur. Ne gjithashtu demonstrojmë dobinë e kuadrit tonë në lidhje me detyrat e nxjerrjes dhe zgjidhjes së njësisë.', 'hy': 'Հիմնական մի քանի գիտելիքի կենտրոնական ծրագրերի կարիքն է անհրաժեշտությունը բացահայտել անվանված էակներ իրենց տեքստային հիշողություններից: Այնուամենայնիվ, կազմակերպությունները բացակայում են առանձնահատուկ ներկայացում, և նրանց հիշողությունները կարող են շատ տարբերվել: Այս տարբերությունները առաջանում են բարդ ձևերով, որոնք չեն կարող նկարել օգտագործելով տեքստալ նմանության մետրիկներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, կազմակերպությունները ունեն հիմնական կառուցվածքներ, որոնք սովորաբար կիսվում են նույն կազմակերպության կազմակերպությունների կողմից, որոնք կարող են օգնել իրենց անունների տարբերությունների պատճառով: Այս կառուցվածքների բացահայտումը, ուսումնասիրումը և մանիպուլյացիան սովորաբար պահանջում է մեծ ձեռքի ջանքեր՝ մարտահրավերված ուսումնասիրության տվյալների և ձեռքով գրված վերափոխման ծրագրերի տեսքով: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք ակտիվ ուսուցման հիմնված շրջանակ, որը խիստ նվազեցնում է մարմնավորված տվյալները, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են միավորների կառուցվածքների սովորելու համար: We show that programs for mapping entity mentions to their structures can be automatically generated using human-comprehensible labels.  Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր շրջանակը մշտապես գերազանցում է ձեռքով գրված ծրագրերը և վերահսկված ուսուցման մոդելները: We also demonstrate the utility of our framework in relation extraction and entity resolution tasks.', 'af': "Fondaal vir verskeie kennis-sentrale toepassings is die nodig om genaamde entiteite te identifiseer vanaf hulle tekstuele bemenging. Maar entiteite het nog 'n unieke verteenwoordigheid ontbreek en hulle bepaalde kan groot verskil word. Hierdie veranderinge kom in komplekse maniere wat nie deur tekstuurlike gelykenis metriek gevang word nie. Maar entiteite het altyd ondersteunde strukture, tipes gedeel deur entiteite van dieselfde entiteittipe, wat kan help rede oor hulle naam veranderinge. Die ontdekking, leer en manipulering van hierdie strukture het tipies hoë handhandversoek nodig in die vorm van groot hoeveelheid etiketeerde onderwerp data en handskryfde transformasie programme. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n aktiewe-leer gebaseerde raamwerk wat drastieke die merkelige data wat nodig is om die strukture van entiteite te leer. Ons wys dat programma vir kartering entiteite aanwys na hul strukture kan outomaties genereer word deur die gebruik van mens- verstaanbare etikette. Ons eksperimente wys dat ons raamwerk konsistentlik uitvoer beide handskryfe programme en ondersoek leer modele. Ons wys ook die nuttigheid van ons raamwerk in verwanting van uitpakking en entiteitoplossing opdragte.", 'bn': 'বেশ কিছু জ্ঞান-কেন্দ্রীয় অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের মূল্যবান হচ্ছে তাদের টেক্সচুয়াল উল্লেখ থেকে নামের বৈশিষ্ট তবে বিষয়গুলোর কোন অনন্য প্রতিনিধিত্ব নেই এবং তাদের মন্তব্য অনেক বিভক্ত হতে পারে। এই ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভি তবে বস্তুগুলোর নীচের কাঠামো রয়েছে, সাধারণত একই বস্তুর ধরনের বস্তুগুলো শেয়ার করেছে, যা তাদের নামের ভিন্ন ভিন্ন কারণে স এই কাঠামোগুলো আবিষ্কার, শিক্ষা এবং ম্যানিপলেশন করার প্রয়োজন সাধারণত হাতে বিশাল পরিমাণ প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য এবং হাতে লেখা পরিবর্তন করার প্র এই কাজে আমরা একটি সক্রিয় শিক্ষা ভিত্তিক কাঠামো প্রস্তাব করি যা বস্তুর কাঠামো শিখতে প্রয়োজনীয় তথ্য নির্মাণ করা যায়। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে তাদের কাঠামোর উল্লেখের জন্য প্রোগ্রাম স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মানুষ-সম্পূর্ণ লেবেল ব্যবহার করে স্বয় আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ফ্রেম কার্যক্রম হাতে লিখিত প্রোগ্রাম এবং শিক্ষা মডেল পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হয় আমরা আমাদের ফ্রেম কার্যক্রমের ব্যবহার প্রদর্শন করি যে সম্পর্কে বের করে নেওয়া এবং সত্ত্বের সিদ্ধান্ত কাজের কাজে', 'az': '√á√ľnki bilgi-m…ôrk…ôzi uyńüulamalarńĪna …ôslind…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü m…ôkt…ôbl…ôrd…ôn adńĪ √ß…ôkilm…ôk lazńĪmdńĪr. Ancaq m…ôlumatlarńĪn t…ôhsil edilm…ôsi yoxdur v…ô onlarńĪn yada salmalarńĪ √ßox f…ôrqli olar. Bu d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôr textual similarity metrics vasit…ôsil…ô yakalana bilm…ôy…ôn kompleks yollarla g…ôlir. Buna rańümen, entit…ôl…ôrin d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôri √ľz…ôrind…ô d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôri √ľz…ôrind…ô s…ôb…ôb olaraq d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ôrin…ô k√∂m…ôk ed…ô bil…ôr. Bu yapńĪlarńĪ √∂yr…ônm…ôk, √∂yr…ônm…ôk v…ô manipul etm…ôk genellikle y√ľks…ôk …ôlli √ßabalarńĪ etiketli t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn v…ô …ôl yazńĪlmńĪŇü transformasyon proqramlarńĪnńĪn formu kimi lazńĪmdńĪr. Bu iŇüd…ô, biz f…ôaliyy…ôtli √∂yr…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn etiketli m…ôlumatlarńĪ d…ôyiŇüdirir. Biz insanlarńĪn anlaŇüńĪlabilir etiketl…ôri il…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edil…ôn m…ôkt…ôbl…ôr…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edil…ôn m…ôkt…ôbl…ôr…ô g√∂st…ôririk. Bizim t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrimiz sistemimiz el…ô yazńĪlmńĪŇü proqramlarńĪn v…ô √∂yr…ônm…ôk modell…ôrinin √ľst√ľn√ľ s√ľrd√ľr√ľr. Biz d…ô qurńüumuzun istifad…ôsini √ß…ôkm…ô v…ô √ß…ôkm…ô iŇül…ôri haqqńĪnda g√∂st…ôririk.', 'ca': "La necessitat d'identificar entitats anomenades a partir de les seves mencions textuals és fundamental a diverses aplicacions centrades en el coneixement. However, entities lack a unique representation and their mentions can differ greatly.  Aquestes variacions sorgeixen de maneres complexes que no es poden capturar fent servir mètriques de similitud textual. Però les entitats tenen estructures subjacents, normalment compartides per entitats del mateix tipus d'entitat, que poden ajudar a raonar les seves variacions de nom. El descobriment, l'aprenentatge i la manipulació d'aquestes estructures requereixen un gran esforç manual en forma de grans quantitats de dades d'entrenament etiquetades i de programes de transformació escrits a mà. En aquesta feina, proposem un marc basat en l'aprenentatge actiu que redueix drasticament les dades etiquetades requerides per aprendre les estructures de les entitats. Mostrem que els programes de mapejament de les entitats mencionen les seves estructures es poden generar automàticament fent servir etiquetes comprensibles per a l'home. Els nostres experiments demostren que el nostre marc supera consistentment els programes manuscrits i els models d'aprenentatge supervisats. També demostrem la utilitat del nostre marc en relació amb les tasques d'extracció i resolució d'entitats.", 'et': 'Mitmete teadmistekesksete rakenduste puhul on oluline vajadus tuvastada nimetatud üksused nende tekstilistest märkustest. Üksustel puudub siiski ainulaadne esindus ja nende nimetused võivad väga erineda. Need variatsioonid tekivad keerulistel viisidel, mida ei saa teksti sarnasuse mõõdikute abil tabada. Samas on üksustel aluseks olevad struktuurid, mida tavaliselt jagavad sama üksuse tüüpi üksused, mis võivad aidata nende nimevariatsioone arutada. Nende struktuuride avastamine, õppimine ja manipuleerimine nõuab tavaliselt suurt käsitsi jõupingutust märgistatud koolitusandmete ja käsitsi kirjutatud transformatsiooniprogrammide kujul. Selles töös pakume välja aktiivse õppe raamistiku, mis vähendab oluliselt märgistatud andmeid, mis on vajalikud üksuste struktuuride õppimiseks. Näitame, et üksuste märgistuste kaardistamise programme nende struktuuridele saab automaatselt genereerida inimese arusaadavate siltide abil. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et meie raamistik suudab pidevalt üle nii käsitsi kirjutatud programmide kui ka juhendatud õppemudelite. Samuti näitame oma raamistiku kasulikkust seoses kaevandamise ja üksuste lahendamise ülesannetega.', 'cs': 'Základní pro několik znalostně orientovaných aplikací je potřeba identifikovat pojmenované entity z jejich textových zmínek. Nicméně subjekty postrádají jedinečné zastoupení a jejich zmínky se mohou značně lišit. Tyto variace vznikají složitými způsoby, které nelze zachytit pomocí metrik textové podobnosti. Nicméně entity mají základní struktury, obvykle sdílené entitami stejného typu entity, které mohou pomoci uvažovat o jejich variantách názvů. Objevování, učení a manipulace s těmito strukturami obvykle vyžaduje vysoké manuální úsilí ve formě velkého množství označených tréninkových dat a ručně psaných transformačních programů. V této práci navrhujeme rámec založený na aktivním učení, který drasticky snižuje označená data potřebná k učení se struktur entit. Ukazujeme, že programy pro mapování zmínek entit do jejich struktur lze automaticky generovat pomocí lidsky srozumitelných štítků. Naše experimenty ukazují, že náš framework důsledně překonává ručně psané programy i modely dohledu. Také demonstrujeme užitečnost našeho rámce při extrakci vztahů a úkolech řešení entit.', 'fi': 'Useiden osaamiskeskeisten sovellusten keskeinen merkitys on tarve tunnistaa nimetyt entiteetit tekstimaininnoistaan. Yhteisöiltä puuttuu kuitenkin ainutlaatuinen edustus ja niiden maininnat voivat vaihdella suuresti. Nämä vaihtelut syntyvät monimutkaisilla tavoilla, joita ei voida kuvata tekstien samankaltaisuuden mittareilla. Yhteisöillä on kuitenkin taustalla olevia rakenteita, jotka tyypillisesti jakavat saman yhteisötyypin yhteisöt, jotka voivat auttaa järkeistämään niiden nimivariaatioita. Näiden rakenteiden löytäminen, oppiminen ja manipulointi vaatii tyypillisesti suurta manuaalista työtä suurten määrien merkittyjen harjoitustietojen ja käsinkirjoitettujen muutosohjelmien muodossa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme aktiiviseen oppimiseen perustuvaa viitekehystä, joka vähentää merkittävästi merkityn datan määrää, jota tarvitaan entiteettien rakenteiden oppimiseen. Osoitamme, että ohjelmat entiteettimainintojen kartoittamiseen niiden rakenteisiin voidaan luoda automaattisesti ihmisen ymmärrettävillä tunnisteilla. Kokeemme osoittavat, että viitekehyksemme suoriutuu johdonmukaisesti sekä käsinkirjoitettuja ohjelmia että ohjattuja oppimismalleja paremmin. Osoitamme myös kehyksemme hyödyllisyyden louhinta- ja ratkaisutehtävissä.', 'bs': 'Osnovno za nekoliko znanja-centralnih aplikacija je potrebna identifikacija imenih entitata iz njihovih tekstualnih spomena. Međutim, entiteti nedostaju jedinstveno predstavljanje, a njihovi spominji se mogu mnogo razlikovati. Ove varijacije se pojavljuju na kompleksnim načinama koje se ne mogu uhvatiti koristeći tekstualne sličnosti metrike. Međutim, entiteti imaju temeljne strukture, obično podijeljene entitetima iste vrste entiteta, koje mogu pomoći razumijevanju zbog njihovih varijacija imena. Otkrivanje, učenje i manipuliranje tih struktura obično zahtijeva visoke rukovne napore u obliku velikih količina označenih podataka o obuci i programa za transformaciju rukopisa. U ovom poslu predlažemo aktivan okvir na osnovu učenja koji drastično smanjuje označene podatke potrebne za naučenje strukture entiteta. Pokazujemo da se programi za mapiranje entiteta spominju na njihove strukture mogu automatski proizvesti koristeći ljudske etikete koje mogu razumjeti. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da naš okvir stalno iznosi i rukopisane programe i nadzorne modele učenja. Također pokazujemo korisnost našeg okvira u vezi sa izvlačenjem i rezolucijom subjekta.', 'jv': 'Foundation Nanging, akeh-akeh saiki dipunangé awak dhéwé éntukno karo ngono sakjane sampeyan luwih apik. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Nanging Ndongi, ngerti lan ijol-ijolan dianggawe iki dadi mesthine kudu ngejarang manut sing ngengati tur angel karo sistem sing paling nggawe dadi nggawe lan sistem anyar nggawe manut. Nang lan gunggo iki, kita supoyata supoyo sistem sing wis ana aksi kanggo ngerasakno dadi sing nyimpen kanggo ngerasakno sampek Entèji. Display boxes Awak dhéwé éntuk sing ngerasakno nang sampek akeh dumateng manut lan model sing bisa nguasai nggawe barang manut. Awak dhéwé éntuk pisan penggunaké aturan kanggo nggawe barang tanggal nggawe', 'sk': 'Temeljno za več znanje osredotočenih aplikacij je potreba po identifikaciji imenovanih entitet iz njihovih besedilnih omemb. Vendar subjekti nimajo edinstvene zastopanosti in njihove omembe se lahko zelo razlikujejo. Te različice se pojavljajo na kompleksne načine, ki jih ni mogoče zajeti z uporabo meritev besedilne podobnosti. Vendar imajo subjekti osnovne strukture, ki jih običajno delijo subjekti iste vrste subjekta, ki lahko pomagajo razumeti njihove različice imena. Odkrivanje, učenje in manipulacija teh struktur običajno zahteva veliko ročnega napora v obliki velikih količin označenih podatkov o usposabljanju in ročno napisanih programov transformacije. V tem delu predlagamo okvir, ki temelji na aktivnem učenju, ki drastično zmanjšuje označene podatke, potrebne za učenje struktur subjektov. Pokazali smo, da je programe za mapiranje omemb entitet v njihove strukture mogoče samodejno ustvariti z uporabo človeško razumljivih oznak. Naši poskusi kažejo, da naš okvir dosledno presega ročno napisane programe in modele nadzorovanega učenja. Prikazujemo tudi uporabnost našega okvira v zvezi z nalogami pridobivanja in reševanja subjektov.', 'ha': "Tilas ne aka ƙayyade wa wasu shiryoyin ayuka masu sanã-centric, sai ya buƙata a gane wasu abubuwa da aka suna daga misalin ayuka na rubutu. A lokacin da haka, ma'abubuwa bã su da wani mataimaki wanda ba ya so ba, kuma ma'anarsu za su iya sãɓa. Wannan variantun za'a ci cikin hanyõyi masu husũma, wanda ba a iya kãma su ba da metric misãlai na rubutu. A lokacin da, abubuwa sun ƙunsa da tsaro masu ƙaranci, mai amfani da abun masu haɗi da nau'in abun da ke daidaita, za'a iya amfani da saba kan sunayen su. Ana gane, karanta da maniyya wa waɗannan rubutu, ana ƙayyade aikin aiki mai girma cikin tsarin mutane mai girma na tsarin data da aka rubũta shi da shiryoyin shiryoyin da aka rubũta hannuwansu. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani firam wanda za'a yi karatun farat-haiti, mai ƙara data da aka ƙayyade wajen karanta tilasan abun. Munã nũna wa shirin ayuka wa sunayen maɓallin yin ramani da su, za'a iya ƙiƙiro shi farat ɗaya da za'a iya amfani da alama masu bincike wa mutum. Kayan jarrabõyinmu, za'a nũna cewa firam masu iya ƙaranci ko da shiryoyin ayuka da aka tsare misãlai da aka sani. Tuna nuna amfani da aikin firam masu cikin masu sami da masu yin rabo da masu gaskiya.", 'he': 'בסיסי לכמה שימושים מרכזיים לידע הוא הצורך לזהות יחידות בשמות מהזכרונות הטקסטאליים שלהם. עם זאת, ישויות חסרות מייצג ייחודי והזכרונות שלהם יכולים להיות שונים מאוד. השינויים האלה מתגלים בדרכים מורכבות שאי אפשר לתפוס באמצעות מטריות דמיון טקסטאלית. בכל אופן, ליחידות יש מבנים בסיסיים, בדרך כלל משותפים על ידי היחידות באותו סוג של היחידה, שיכולים לעזור להסביר על השינויים שלהם. גילוי, לימוד ומניפולציה במבנים הללו דורשים בדרך כלל מאמץ ידני גבוה בצורה של כמויות גדולות של נתוני אימון מותגנים ותוכניות שינוי כתבי יד. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים מסגרת מבוססת למידה פעילה שמפחית באופן דרסטי את המידע המתוויד הנדרש ללמוד את מבנים של יחידות. אנחנו מראים כי תוכניות למפית ישויות מזכירות למבנים שלהם יכולות ליצור באופן אוטומטי באמצעות תוויות הבנתות אנושיות. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהמסגרת שלנו מתאימה באופן קבוע יותר מתוכניות כתובות יד ומודלים למידה מושלמים. אנחנו גם מראים את היעילות של המסגרת שלנו בנוגע למשימות חיפוש ופתרון היחידות.', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་ཤེས་བྱས་དབུས་གཞུང་ལ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཆས་གཞན་དང་མིང་ཡོད་པའི་གྲངས་ཀ་ཐོག་མཛོད་ཁང་ཅིག་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། དབུགས་ཆ་དག་ལ་ཁོ་ན་མི་གཅིག་གི་རྟོགས་པ་ཞིག་མ་ཐུབ། དེ་དག་གི་སྐོར་གྱི་གཞན་དང་ཁོ་ན་གྱི་ག འདི་དག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཚང་བའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་འགྱུར་བ་འདི་དག་རྙེད་ཐུབ་མེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། entities have underlying structures, typically shared by entities of the same entity type, that can help reason over their name variations. Discovering, learning and manipulating these structures typically requires high manual effort in the form of large amounts of labeled training data and handwritten transformation programs. In this work, we propose an active-learning based framework that drastically reduces the labeled data required to learn the structures of entities. We show that programs for mapping entity mentions to their structures can be automatically generated using human-comprehensible labels. ང་ཚོའི་ལག་འཁྱེར་སྟངས་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་གི་རིམ་པ་དེ་ལས་ལག་བྲིས་པའི་བྱ་རིམ་དང་མི་ལྟ་སྟངས་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་གཞ ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཕྱིར་འདོན་དང་དབུགས་ཆ་སྒྲིག་གི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་དང་མཐུན་བཟོས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་པ་དེ་བཀྲམ་སྟོན་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'An Empirical Study on Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'es': 'Un estudio empírico sobre el reconocimiento detallado de entidades nombradas', 'pt': 'Um Estudo Empírico sobre Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada Refinada', 'ar': 'دراسة تجريبية حول التعرف الدقيق على الكيانات المسماة', 'fr': 'Une étude empirique sur la reconnaissance fine des entités nommées', 'ja': '細かく挽いた名前のエンティティの認識に関する実証的研究', 'zh': '细粒度名实体', 'hi': 'ठीक दानेदार नामित इकाई मान्यता पर एक अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन', 'ru': 'Эмпирическое исследование по распознаванию мелких именованных сущностей', 'ga': 'Staidéar Eimpíreach ar Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe Mínghráinneach', 'ka': 'თმორიკალური სწავლება სახელი სახელი ინტერტის განახლებაზე', 'hu': 'Empirikus tanulmány a finomszemű elnevezett entitások elismeréséről', 'el': 'Μια εμπειρική μελέτη για την αναγνώριση λεπτόκοκκων ονομαστικών οντοτήτων', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды таңдау үшін империялық оқу', 'it': 'Uno studio empirico sul riconoscimento delle entità nominate a grana fine', 'lt': 'Empirijos tyrimas dėl plono grūdo pavadinimo subjekto pripažinimo', 'mk': 'An Empirical Study on Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Studju Impiriku dwar ir-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija b’Ħruġ Fin', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэмжээний нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition-ын эзэн хүчний судалгаа', 'ml': 'നല്ല ഗ്രാന്\u200dഡ് ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്ന പേരുള്ള എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതില്\u200d ഒരു എമിരിക്കല്\u200d ശ്', 'sr': 'Empiričko istraživanje o priznanju dobrog područja imenovanog područja', 'ro': 'Un studiu empiric privind recunoașterea entităților denumite cu granule fine', 'pl': 'Badanie empiryczne dotyczące rozpoznawania drobnoziarnistej nazwy podmiotów', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'An Empirical Study on Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'sv': 'En empirisk studie om erkännande av finkorniga namngivna enheter', 'ta': 'சரியான சிறப்பு பெயர் பெயர் உள்ளீடு அறிமுகம் மீது ஒரு வெற்றிகரமான ஆராய்ச்சி', 'ur': 'اچھی طرح کے ذریعہ ذریعہ انٹیٹی شناخت کے بارے میں ایک عمومی تحقیق', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một nghiên cứu Empirical on fine-Grained Entity recognition', 'nl': 'Een empirische studie naar fijnkorrelige naamsbekendheid', 'hr': 'Empirička ispitivanja o prepoznavanju dobrog područja imenovanog područja', 'bg': 'Емпирично проучване за признаване на фино зърнесто наименувано лице', 'de': 'Eine empirische Studie zur feinkörnigen Namenserkennung', 'da': 'En empirisk undersøgelse af finkornet navngivet enhedsanerkendelse', 'ko': '세립도 명명 실체 식별의 실증 연구', 'sw': 'An Empirical Study on Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'af': "'n Empirical Study on Fine-Grained Entity Recognition", 'sq': 'An Empirical Study on Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'fa': 'یک مطالعه امپراطوری در مورد شناسایی یک entity نامیده شده پاکیزه', 'hy': 'Իմպրիկական ուսումնասիրություն, որը վերաբերում է գեղեցիկ ցորենի անվանումների ճանաչման', 'az': 'Adlı Entity Recognition', 'tr': 'Taýram Edilmiş Bir Taýram Bilişinde Wagtlaýyn', 'bs': 'Empiričko ispitivanje o priznanju dobrog područja imenovanog područja', 'cs': 'Empirická studie o jemnozrnném uznávání jmenovaných entit', 'id': 'Sebuah Studi Kekaisaran mengenai Pengenalan Entitas bernama Grain-Fine', 'fi': 'Empirical Study on Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'An Empirical Study on Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'et': 'Empiiriline Study on Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'jv': 'Workspace', 'sk': 'Empirična študija o prepoznavanju drobnozrnatega imenovanega subjekta', 'ha': 'An Empirical Study on Fine-Grained Named Entity Recognition', 'bo': 'རྩིས་བ་ལྕོགས་རིང་དང་མིང་བཏགས་པའི་ཨ་རིང་དང་སྐོར་གྱི་སློབ་གྲྭས་ཤིག་དང་།', 'he': 'מחקר אימפריקלי על זיהוי איכות בשם צהוב'}
{'en': 'Named entity recognition (NER) has attracted a substantial amount of research. Recently, several neural network-based models have been proposed and achieved high performance. However, there is little research on fine-grained NER (FG-NER), in which hundreds of named entity categories must be recognized, especially for non-English languages. It is still an open question whether there is a model that is robust across various settings or the proper model varies depending on the language, the number of named entity categories, and the size of training datasets. This paper first presents an empirical comparison of FG-NER models for English and Japanese and demonstrates that LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), one of the state-of-the-art methods for English NER, also works well for English FG-NER but does not work well for Japanese, a language that has a large number of character types. To tackle this problem, we propose a method to improve the neural network-based Japanese FG-NER performance by removing the CNN layer and utilizing dictionary and category embeddings. Experiment results show that the proposed method improves Japanese FG-NER F-score from 66.76 % to 75.18 %.', 'ar': 'اجتذب التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) قدرًا كبيرًا من البحث. في الآونة الأخيرة ، تم اقتراح العديد من النماذج القائمة على الشبكة العصبية وحققت أداءً عاليًا. ومع ذلك ، هناك القليل من الأبحاث حول NER الدقيق (FG-NER) ، حيث يجب التعرف على مئات من فئات الكيانات المسماة ، خاصة بالنسبة للغات غير الإنجليزية. لا يزال السؤال مفتوحًا ما إذا كان هناك نموذج قوي عبر إعدادات مختلفة أو يختلف النموذج المناسب اعتمادًا على اللغة وعدد فئات الكيانات المسماة وحجم مجموعات بيانات التدريب. تقدم هذه الورقة أولاً مقارنة تجريبية لنماذج FG-NER للغة الإنجليزية واليابانية وتوضح أن LSTM + CNN + CRF (Ma and Hovy ، 2016) ، إحدى أحدث الأساليب للغة الإنجليزية NER ، تعمل أيضًا بشكل جيد للغة الإنجليزية FG-NER ولكنها لا تعمل بشكل جيد مع اليابانية ، وهي لغة بها عدد كبير من أنواع الأحرف. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح طريقة لتحسين أداء FG-NER الياباني المستند إلى الشبكة العصبية عن طريق إزالة طبقة CNN واستخدام القاموس والدمج في الفئات. تظهر نتائج التجربة أن الطريقة المقترحة تحسن درجة FG-NER اليابانية من 66.76٪ إلى 75.18٪.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) a suscité un nombre important de recherches. Récemment, plusieurs modèles basés sur des réseaux de neurones ont été proposés et ont atteint des performances élevées. Cependant, il existe peu de recherches sur le NER à grain fin (FG-NER), dans lequel des centaines de catégories d'entités nommées doivent être reconnues, en particulier pour les langues autres que l'anglais. La question de savoir s'il existe un modèle robuste pour différents paramètres ou si le modèle approprié varie en fonction de la langue, du nombre de catégories d'entités nommées et de la taille des ensembles de données d'apprentissage reste ouverte. Cet article présente d'abord une comparaison empirique des modèles FG-NER pour l'anglais et le japonais et démontre que LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma et Hovy, 2016), l'une des méthodes de pointe pour le NER anglais, fonctionne également bien pour l'anglais FG-NER mais ne fonctionne pas bien pour le japonais, une langue qui compte un grand nombre de types de caractères. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons une méthode pour améliorer les performances FG-NER japonais basées sur les réseaux neuronaux en supprimant la couche CNN et en utilisant des intégrations de dictionnaires et de catégories. Les résultats de l'expérience montrent que la méthode proposée améliore le score F FG-NER japonais de 66,76\xa0% à 75,18\xa0%.", 'es': 'El reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) ha atraído una cantidad considerable de investigaciones. Recientemente, se han propuesto varios modelos basados en redes neuronales que han logrado un alto rendimiento. Sin embargo, hay poca investigación sobre NER de grano fino (FG-NER), en la que se deben reconocer cientos de categorías de entidades nombradas, especialmente para idiomas que no son ingleses. Todavía está pendiente la pregunta de si hay un modelo que sea sólido en varios entornos o si el modelo adecuado varía según el idioma, el número de categorías de entidades nombradas y el tamaño de los conjuntos de datos de capacitación. Este artículo presenta primero una comparación empírica de los modelos FG-NER para inglés y japonés y demuestra que LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma y Hovy, 2016), uno de los métodos más avanzados para la NER inglesa, también funciona bien para el inglés FG-NER pero no funciona bien para el japonés, un idioma que tiene un gran número de tipos de caracteres. Para abordar este problema, proponemos un método para mejorar el rendimiento del FG-NER japonés basado en redes neuronales mediante la eliminación de la capa CNN y la utilización de incrustaciones de diccionario y categorías. Los resultados del experimento muestran que el método propuesto mejora la puntuación F de FG-NER japonesa del 66,76% al 75,18%.', 'pt': 'O reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) atraiu uma quantidade substancial de pesquisas. Recentemente, vários modelos baseados em redes neurais foram propostos e alcançaram alto desempenho. No entanto, há pouca pesquisa sobre NER de grão fino (FG-NER), em que centenas de categorias de entidades nomeadas devem ser reconhecidas, especialmente para idiomas diferentes do inglês. Ainda é uma questão em aberto se existe um modelo robusto em várias configurações ou se o modelo adequado varia dependendo do idioma, do número de categorias de entidades nomeadas e do tamanho dos conjuntos de dados de treinamento. Este artigo apresenta primeiro uma comparação empírica de modelos FG-NER para inglês e japonês e demonstra que LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma e Hovy, 2016), um dos métodos de última geração para NER inglês, também funciona bem para inglês FG-NER, mas não funciona bem para japonês, um idioma que possui um grande número de tipos de caracteres. Para resolver este problema, propomos um método para melhorar o desempenho do FG-NER japonês baseado em rede neural, removendo a camada CNN e utilizando embeddings de dicionário e categoria. Os resultados do experimento mostram que o método proposto melhora o escore F do FG-NER japonês de 66,76% para 75,18%.', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）は、かなりの量の研究を惹きつけています。 最近では、いくつかのニューラルネットワークベースのモデルが提案され、高性能を達成している。 しかし、特に英語以外の言語では、数百の命名されたエンティティカテゴリが認識されなければならない、細かいNER （ FG - NER ）に関する研究はほとんどない。 言語、名前付きエンティティカテゴリの数、およびトレーニングデータセットのサイズによって、さまざまな設定にわたって堅牢なモデルがあるか、または適切なモデルが異なるかどうかは、未解決の問題です。 本稿では，まず，英語と日本語のFG - NERモデルの実証的比較を紹介し，英語NERの最先端手法の一つであるLSTM + CNN + CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016)が，英語FG - NERにもうまく機能するが，文字型が多い日本語にはうまく機能しないことを示した。 この問題に対処するため、CNN層を取り除き、辞書やカテゴリの埋め込みを活用することで、ニューラルネットワークベースの日本のFG - NERパフォーマンスを向上させる方法を提案します。 実験の結果、提案された方法は、日本のFG - NER Fスコアを66.76%から75.18%に向上させることが示された。', 'zh': '名实体识(NER)多所研究。 近者,已建数神经网络之形,以成其高性能。 然于细粒度 NER (FG-NER) 者甚少,必识数百名实之类,尤于非英语言也。 有一于诸置而皆壮者,若正其言语、名其实数、练数集之大小而异,犹一悬而未决也。 本文首于英语、日语之FG-NER,验LSTM + CNN + CRF(Ma、Hovy,2016)为英语NER最新之一,亦宜于英语FG-NER,而不用于日语,日语大字符之语也。 为此者,举CNN而去之,以字典类销之,以崇神经网络之日语FG-NER性也。 实验结果表明,日本FG-NER F得分自66.76%至75.18%。', 'ru': 'Признание именованных субъектов (NER) привлекло значительное количество исследований. Недавно было предложено несколько нейросетевых моделей, которые достигли высокой производительности. Тем не менее, мало исследований по мелкозернистому NER (FG-NER), в котором должны быть признаны сотни именованных категорий сущностей, особенно для неанглоязычных языков. Остается открытым вопрос о том, существует ли модель, которая является надежной в различных настройках, или правильная модель варьируется в зависимости от языка, количества именованных категорий сущностей и размера обучающих наборов данных. В этой статье сначала представлено эмпирическое сравнение моделей FG-NER для английского и японского языков и показано, что LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), один из самых современных методов для английского NER, также хорошо работает для английского FG-NER, но не хорошо работает для японского языка, который имеет большое количество типов символов. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем метод улучшения производительности FG-NER на основе нейронной сети в Японии путем удаления слоя CNN и использования словарных и категорийных вложений. Результаты эксперимента показывают, что предлагаемый метод улучшает японский FG-NER F-балл с 66,76% до 75,18%.', 'hi': 'नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) ने अनुसंधान की एक बड़ी राशि को आकर्षित किया है। हाल ही में, कई तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित मॉडल प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं और उच्च प्रदर्शन हासिल किए गए हैं। हालांकि, ठीक-ठाक एनईआर (एफजी-एनईआर) पर बहुत कम शोध है, जिसमें सैकड़ों नामित इकाई श्रेणियों को पहचाना जाना चाहिए, खासकर गैर-अंग्रेजी भाषाओं के लिए। यह अभी भी एक खुला सवाल है कि क्या कोई मॉडल है जो विभिन्न सेटिंग्स में मजबूत है या उचित मॉडल भाषा, नामित इकाई श्रेणियों की संख्या और प्रशिक्षण डेटासेट के आकार के आधार पर भिन्न होता है। यह पेपर पहले अंग्रेजी और जापानी के लिए एफजी-एनईआर मॉडल की एक अनुभवजन्य तुलना प्रस्तुत करता है और यह दर्शाता है कि एलएसटीएम + सीएनएन + सीआरएफ (मा और होवी, 2016), अंग्रेजी एनईआर के लिए अत्याधुनिक तरीकों में से एक, अंग्रेजी एफजी-एनईआर के लिए भी अच्छी तरह से काम करता है लेकिन जापानी के लिए अच्छी तरह से काम नहीं करता है, एक ऐसी भाषा जिसमें बड़ी संख्या में चरित्र प्रकार हैं। इस समस्या से निपटने के लिए, हम सीएनएन परत को हटाने और शब्दकोश और श्रेणी एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित जापानी एफजी-एनईआर प्रदर्शन में सुधार करने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोग के परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित विधि जापानी FG-NER F-स्कोर को 66.76% से 75.18% तक बेहतर बनाती है।', 'ga': 'Tá méid suntasach taighde tarraingthe ag aitheantas aonán ainmnithe (NER). Le déanaí, moladh roinnt samhlacha néaracha líonra-bhunaithe agus baineadh amach ardfheidhmíocht. Mar sin féin, is beag taighde atá déanta ar NER mhínghlanta (FG-NER), ina gcaithfear na céadta catagóir eintiteas ainmnithe a aithint, go háirithe i gcás teangacha nach Béarla iad. Is ceist oscailte í fós an bhfuil múnla atá láidir thar shuímh éagsúla nó an bhfuil an tsamhail cheart éagsúil ag brath ar an teanga, líon na gcatagóirí eintiteas ainmnithe, agus méid na dtacar sonraí oiliúna. Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair ar dtús comparáid eimpíreach ar shamhlacha FG-NER don Bhéarla agus don tSeapáinis agus léiríonn sé go n-oibríonn LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma agus Hovy, 2016), ceann de na modhanna úrscothacha le haghaidh Béarla NER, go maith freisin. don Bhéarla FG-NER ach ní oibríonn sé go maith don tSeapáinis, teanga a bhfuil líon mór cineálacha carachtar inti. Chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb seo, molaimid modh chun feidhmíocht néarchóras FG-NER na Seapáine a fheabhsú trí chiseal CNN a bhaint agus úsáid a bhaint as leabú foclóra agus catagóirí. Léiríonn torthaí turgnaimh go bhfeabhsaíonn an modh atá beartaithe Scór-F na Seapáine FG-NER ó 66.76% go 75.18%.', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση ονομαστικής οντότητας (NER) προσέλκυσε σημαντικό ποσό έρευνας. Πρόσφατα, έχουν προταθεί αρκετά μοντέλα με βάση τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα και έχουν επιτευχθεί υψηλές επιδόσεις. Ωστόσο, υπάρχει μικρή έρευνα σχετικά με το λεπτόκοκκο ΝΕR (FG-NER), στην οποία πρέπει να αναγνωριστούν εκατοντάδες ονομαστικές κατηγορίες οντοτήτων, ειδικά για τις μη αγγλικές γλώσσες. Είναι ακόμα ένα ανοικτό ερώτημα αν υπάρχει ένα μοντέλο που είναι ανθεκτικό σε διάφορες ρυθμίσεις ή το σωστό μοντέλο ποικίλλει ανάλογα με τη γλώσσα, τον αριθμό των κατηγοριών οντοτήτων που ονομάζονται και το μέγεθος των συνόλων δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει πρώτα μια εμπειρική σύγκριση των μοντέλων για τα αγγλικά και τα ιαπωνικά και καταδεικνύει ότι μια από τις πιο σύγχρονες μεθόδους για τα αγγλικά λειτουργεί επίσης καλά για τα αγγλικά αλλά δεν λειτουργεί καλά για τα ιαπωνικά, μια γλώσσα που έχει μεγάλο αριθμό τύπων χαρακτήρων. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης των νευρωνικών δικτύων από την Ιαπωνία αφαιρώντας το στρώμα και χρησιμοποιώντας ενσωμάτωση λεξικών και κατηγοριών. Τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος βελτιώνει την ιαπωνική βαθμολογία FG-NER από 66.76% έως 75.18%.', 'hu': 'A megnevezett entitás elismerése (NER) jelentős mennyiségű kutatást vonzott. A közelmúltban számos neurális hálózat alapú modellt javasoltak és nagy teljesítményt értek el. Azonban kevés kutatás van a finomszemű NER (FG-NER), amelyben több száz elnevezett entitáskategóriát kell felismerni, különösen a nem angol nyelvek esetében. Még mindig nyitott kérdés, hogy van-e olyan modell, amely különböző beállítások között robusztus, vagy a megfelelő modell a nyelvtől, a megnevezett entitáskategóriáktól és a képzési adatkészletek méretétől függően változik. Ez a tanulmány először az angol és japán FG-NER modellek empirikus összehasonlítását mutatja be, és bemutatja, hogy az LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), az angol NER egyik legkorszerűbb módszere, szintén jól működik az angol FG-NER, de nem működik jól a japán nyelven, amely sok karaktertípussal rendelkezik. A probléma megoldása érdekében javasoltunk egy módszert a neurális hálózat alapú japán FG-NER teljesítményének javítására a CNN réteg eltávolításával, valamint szótár és kategória beágyazások használatával. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer 66,76%-ról 75,18%-ra javítja a japán FG-NER F pontszámot.', 'ka': 'სახელი ინტერტის განაცნობა (NER) გადატანა მნიშვნელოვანი პასუხი. მიმდინარე, რამდენიმე ნეიროლური ქსელის მუშაობის მოდელები იყო, რომლებიც უფრო დიდი გამოყენება. მაგრამ, არსებობს პატარა პატარა პატარა შესწავლობა NER (FG-NER), რომელიც ასეულები სახელი ინტერტიკო კატეგორია უნდა იყოს, განსაკუთრებით ინგლისური ენათებისთვის. ეს უკვე გახსნა კითხვა თუ არსებობს მოდელი, რომელიც განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული მოდელი ან სწორი მოდელი განსხვავებულია ენაზე, სახელი ინტერტიკო კატეგორიების რაოდენობა და განსწორებული მოდენტი ეს დოკუმენტი პირველად აჩვენებს ინგლისური და იაპონური მოდელების эმპერიკალური შემდგომარება და გამოჩვენებს, რომ LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), ერთი ინგლისური NER-ის განმავლობაში, ანგლისური FG-NER-ის განმავლობაში, მაგრამ არ მუშაობს ჯაონური, რომელი ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ მივიღეთ მეტი, რომელიც ნეიროლური ქსელის დამატებული იაპონური FG-NER პრობლემენტის გასაკეთებლად CNN-ს ჩატვირთვის და სიტყვან ექსპერიმენტის შედეგები აჩვენებენ, რომ პროგრამეტი წაპონული FG-NER F-score 66,76% დან 75,18%.', 'it': "Il riconoscimento di entità nominativa (NER) ha attirato una notevole quantità di ricerca. Recentemente, diversi modelli basati su reti neurali sono stati proposti e hanno raggiunto alte prestazioni. Tuttavia, c'è poca ricerca sul NER a grana fine (FG-NER), in cui centinaia di categorie di entità nominate devono essere riconosciute, soprattutto per le lingue non inglesi. Resta ancora aperta la domanda se esiste un modello robusto in varie impostazioni o se il modello corretto varia a seconda della lingua, del numero di categorie di entità nominate e della dimensione dei set di dati formativi. Questo articolo presenta per prima cosa un confronto empirico dei modelli FG-NER per inglese e giapponese e dimostra che LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), uno dei metodi all'avanguardia per il NER inglese, funziona bene anche per l'inglese FG-NER ma non funziona bene per il giapponese, una lingua che ha un gran numero di tipi di caratteri. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo un metodo per migliorare le prestazioni FG-NER giapponesi basate sulla rete neurale rimuovendo il livello CNN e utilizzando le incorporazioni di dizionario e categoria. I risultati degli esperimenti mostrano che il metodo proposto migliora il punteggio F FG-NER giapponese dal 66,76% al 75,18%.", 'lt': 'Pavadintojo subjekto pripažinimas (NER) pritraukė didelę mokslinių tyrimų dalį. Neseniai buvo pasiūlyti keli nervų tinklu pagrįsti modeliai ir pasiekti aukšti rezultatai. Vis dėlto nedideli moksliniai tyrimai, susiję su smulkių grūdų NER (FG-NER), kuriuose turi būti pripažįstami šimtai nurodytų subjektų kategorijų, ypač anglų kalbomis. Vis dar neišspręstas klausimas, ar egzistuoja įvairiuose nustatymuose patikimas model is, ar tinkamas modelis skiriasi priklausomai nuo kalbos, pavadintų subjektų kategorijų skaičiaus ir mokymo duomenų rinkinių dydžio. Šiame dokumente pirmiausia pateikiamas empirinis anglų ir japonų FG-NER modelių palyginimas ir įrodoma, kad LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), vienas iš pažangiausių anglų NER metodų, taip pat gerai veikia anglų FG-NER, bet ne gerai veikia japonų kalba, kuri turi daug charakterių tipų. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, siūlome metodą, kaip pagerinti nerviniu tinklu pagrįstą Japonijos FG-NER veiksmingumą pašalinant CNN sluoksnį ir naudojant žodyno ir kategorijų įdėjimus. Eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas pagerina Japonijos FG-NER F balas nuo 66,76 % iki 75,18 %.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan entiti bernama (NER) telah menarik jumlah penyelidikan yang besar. Baru-baru ini, beberapa model berasaskan rangkaian saraf telah diusulkan dan mencapai prestasi tinggi. Namun, terdapat sedikit kajian tentang NER (FG-NER) berwarna halus, di mana ratusan kategori entiti bernama mesti dikenali, terutama untuk bahasa bukan bahasa Inggeris. Ia masih soalan terbuka sama ada ada model yang kuat melalui berbagai tetapan atau model yang betul berubah bergantung pada bahasa, bilangan kategori entiti bernama, dan saiz set data latihan. This paper first presents an empirical comparison of FG-NER models for English and Japanese and demonstrates that LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), one of the state-of-the-art methods for English NER, also works well for English FG-NER but does not work well for Japanese, a language that has a large number of character types.  Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami cadangkan kaedah untuk meningkatkan prestasi FG-NER Jepun berasaskan rangkaian saraf dengan membuang lapisan CNN dan menggunakan penyambungan kamus dan kategori. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan meningkatkan skor F-FG-NER Jepun dari 66.76% kepada 75.18%.', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды анықтау (НЕР) көп зерттеулердің саны бар. Жуырда бірнеше неврал желінің негіздеген моделдері ұсынылды және жоғары істеу үшін жеткізілді. Бірақ, NER (FG-NER) жүздеген атаулар санаттарының жүздеген санаттарының санаттары білмеу керек, осымен қатар ағылшын тілдері емес. Бұл әлі бірнеше параметрлерде үлгі немесе дұрыс үлгі тілде, аталған нысандар саны мен оқыту деректер қорларының өлшемінен айырылып тұрады. Бұл қағаз біріншіден ағылшын және жапон үшін FG-NER үлгілерін импирикалық салыстырып, LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), ағылшын NER үшін әртүрлі әдістердің бірі, сонымен қатар ағылшын FG-NER үшін жақсы жұмыс істейді, бірақ жапон үшін жақсы жұмыс істеме Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін, CNN қабатты алып, сөздік мен санаттарды ендіру арқылы невралдық желінде негізделген жапон FG-NER әрекетін жасау әдісін ұсындық. Тәжірибенің нәтижесі жапон FG-NER F-нәтижесін 66,76% ден 75,18% деп жасайтынын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Признавањето на именуваниот ентитет (НЕР) привлече значителна количина истражувања. Неодамна беа предложени и постигнати високи резултати неколку модели на нервната мрежа. However, there is little research on fine-grained NER (FG-NER), in which hundreds of named entity categories must be recognized, especially for non-English languages.  Сеуште е отворено прашање дали постои модел кој е силен во различните поставувања или соодветниот модел се разликува во зависност од јазикот, бројот на категориите на именувани ентитети и големината на наборите на податоци за обука. Овој весник прво претставува емпирична споредба на моделите FG-NER за англиски и јапонски и покажува дека LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), еден од најновите методи за англиски NER, исто така функционира добро за англиски FG-NER, но не функционира добро за јапонски јазик, јазик кој има голем број типови на карактеристики. За решавање на овој проблем, предложуваме метод за подобрување на ефективноста на јапонската ФГ-НЕР базирана на нервната мрежа со отстранување на слојот на СНН и користење на речник и категорија. Резултатите од експериментите покажуваат дека предложениот метод ги подобрува јапонските ФГ-НЕР оценки од 66,76 отсто на 75,18 отсто.', 'ml': 'പേരിട്ട വസ്തുവിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് (NER) ഒരു വലിയൊരു പഠനത്തിന് ആകര്\u200dഷിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. Recently, several neural network-based models have been proposed and achieved high performance.  എന്നാലും, നല്ല കൈക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന NER (FG-NER) നിമിത്തം പഠിക്കാന്\u200d കുറച്ചുമുണ്ട്, അവിടെ നൂറുകണക്കിന് ശാസ്ത്ര വിഭാഗ വ്യത്യസ്ത സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d റോബ് ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ഉണ്ടോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ശരിയായ മോഡല്\u200d ഭാഷ, പേരിട്ട വസ്തുക്കളുടെ എണ്ണം, ട്രെയിനിന്\u200d ഡാറ് ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ജപ്പാനീസുമായ FG-NER മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കും ആദ്യം ഒരു സാമ്രാജ്യത്തോടുള്ള തുല്യമായ തുല്യമാണ് ഈ പേപ്പ് കാണിക്കുന്നത്. എംഎസ്റ്റി+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് നെയറിന്റെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഒരു രീത ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെട്ട ജാപ്പനീസ് എഫ്ജി-നെര്\u200d പ്രകടനം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടാന്\u200d ഒരു  പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച രീതിയില്\u200d ജപ്പാനീസ് എഫ്ജി-നെര്\u200d F-സ്കോര്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പ', 'mn': 'Нэр нэрлэгдсэн entity recognition (NER) нь маш олон судалгааг татсан. Сүүлийн үед хэдэн мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан загварууд санал болгож, өндөр ажиллагааг гаргасан. Гэхдээ сайхан тарианы НЕР (FG-NER) талаар бага судалгаа байдаг. Үүнд хэдэн зуун нэгж нэрлэгдсэн хэсэг нь англи хэл биш байдаг. Энэ нь одоо ч нээлттэй асуулт юм. Холбоотой загвар эсвэл зөв загвар нь хэл, нэрлэгдсэн загвар, сургалтын өгөгдлийн хэмжээний хэмжээг хамаараад өөрчлөгдөх загвар байдаг. Эхлээд энэ цаас Англи болон Японы FG-NER загварын харьцуулалтыг харуулж байна. LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), Англи NER-ын урлагийн нэг арга загварын нэг нь англи FG-NER-д ч сайн ажилладаг. Гэхдээ Японы хувьд маш олон хүн төрлийн хэл ажиллахгүй. Энэ асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан Япон FG-NER үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулах аргыг санал болгоно. CNN давхарыг устгаж, үгүйлтэй, хэлбэрийг ашиглаж байна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнг нь Японы FG-NER F-тоог 66.76% аас 75.18% хүртэл сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'mt': 'Named entity recognition (NER) has attracted a substantial amount of research.  Dan l-aħħar, diversi mudelli bbażati fuq in-netwerk newrali ġew proposti u kisbu prestazzjoni għolja. Madankollu, ftit li xejn hemm riċerka dwar in-NER (FG-NER), fejn iridu jiġu rikonoxxuti mijiet ta’ kategoriji ta’ entitajiet imsemmija, speċjalment għal-lingwi mhux Ingliżi. Għad hemm mistoqsija miftuħa jekk hemmx mudell b’saħħtu f’diversi settijiet jew il-mudell xieraq ivarjax skont il-lingwa, in-numru ta’ kategoriji ta’ entitajiet imsemmija, u d-daqs ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ. Dan id-dokument l-ewwel jippreżenta paragun empiriku ta’ mudelli FG-NER għall-Ingliż u l-Ġappuniż u juri li LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), wieħed mill-metodi l-aktar avvanzati għall-Ingliż NER, jaħdem tajjeb ukoll għall-Ingliż FG-NER iżda ma jaħdimx tajjeb għall-Ġappuniż, lingwa li għandha għadd kbir ta’ tipi ta’ karattri. Biex nindirizzaw din il-problem a, nipproponu metodu għat-titjib tal-prestazzjoni Ġappuniża FG-NER ibbażata fuq in-netwerk newrali billi neħħew is-saff CNN u nużaw l-inkorporazzjonijiet tad-dikjararju u tal-kategorija. Ir-riżultati tal-esperimenti juru li l-metodu propost itejjeb il-punteġġ F Ġappuniż FG-NER minn 66.76% għal 75.18%.', 'no': 'Namnet entitetskjenning (NER) har attrakta eit stor mengde forskning. Nyleg har fleire neuralnettverksbaserte modeller foreslått og oppnådd høg utvikling. Det er imidlertid lite forskning om fin-grained NER (FG-NER), der hundre av namnet entitetskategoriar må gjenkjenrast, spesielt for ikkje-engelske språk. Det er framleis eit opna spørsmål om det finst eit modell som er sterkt over ulike innstillingar eller den rette modellen varierer avhengig av språket, talet på namnet entitetskategoriar og storleiken på opplæringsdatasett. Denne papiret viser først eit empirisk samanlikning av FG-NER-modeller for engelsk og japansk, og viser at LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), ein av kunstmetodane for engelsk NER, fungerer også godt for engelsk FG-NER, men fungerer ikkje godt for japansk, eit språk som har mange teiknstypar. For å løsa dette problemet, foreslår vi ein metode for å forbetra den neirale nettverksbaserte Japanske FG-NER-utviklinga ved å fjerna CNN-laget og bruka ordbok og kategoriinnbygging. Eksperimentresultat viser at den foreslåde metoden forbetrar japanske FG-NER F-poeng frå 66,76 % til 75,18 %.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie nazwy podmiotów (NER) przyciągnęło znaczną ilość badań. Ostatnio zaproponowano kilka modeli opartych na sieciach neuronowych, które osiągnęły wysoką wydajność. Niewiele jest jednak badań nad drobnoziarnistym NER (FG-NER), w których należy rozpoznać setki nazwanych kategorii podmiotów, zwłaszcza dla języków nieangielskich. Wciąż pozostaje otwarte pytanie, czy istnieje model solidny w różnych ustawieniach, czy właściwy model różni się w zależności od języka, liczby nazwanych kategorii podmiotów i wielkości zbiorów danych szkoleniowych. W artykule przedstawiono najpierw empiryczne porównanie modeli FG-NER dla języka angielskiego i japońskiego i pokazuje, że LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma i Hovy, 2016), jedna z najnowocześniejszych metod dla angielskiego NER, działa również dobrze dla angielskiego FG-NER, ale nie działa dobrze dla japońskiego, języka, który ma dużą liczbę typów znaków. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy metodę poprawy wydajności japońskiego FG-NER opartego na sieci neuronowej poprzez usunięcie warstwy CNN oraz wykorzystanie osadzeń słownikowych i kategorii. Wyniki eksperymentu pokazują, że proponowana metoda poprawia japoński wynik FG-NER F od 66,76% do 75,18%.', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) a atras o cantitate substanțială de cercetare. Recent, mai multe modele bazate pe rețele neurale au fost propuse și au obținut performanțe ridicate. Cu toate acestea, există puține cercetări privind NER cu granule fine (FG-NER), în care sute de categorii de entități numite trebuie recunoscute, în special pentru limbile non-engleză. Este încă o întrebare deschisă dacă există un model robust în diferite setări sau modelul corespunzător variază în funcție de limbă, numărul de categorii de entități denumite și dimensiunea seturilor de date de formare. Această lucrare prezintă mai întâi o comparație empirică a modelelor FG-NER pentru engleză și japoneză și demonstrează că LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma și Hovy, 2016), una dintre metodele de ultimă generație pentru engleză NER, funcționează bine și pentru engleză FG-NER, dar nu funcționează bine pentru japoneză, o limbă care are un număr mare de tipuri de caractere. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem o metodă de îmbunătățire a performanței FG-NER japoneze bazate pe rețeaua neurală prin eliminarea stratului CNN și utilizarea încorporărilor dicționare și categorii. Rezultatele experimentelor arată că metoda propusă îmbunătățește scorul F FG-NER japonez de la 66,76% la 75,18%.', 'so': "Named entity recognition (NER) has attracted a substantial amount of research.  Dhab ahaantii waxaa la soo jeeday samooyin badan oo ku saleysan shabakadda neurada ah, waxayna gaadhay sameynta dhaqdhaqaaq dheer. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa jira waxbarasho yar oo ku saabsan NER (FG-NER), kuwaas oo ay boqol boqol oo kooxo la magacaabay in la aqoonsado, khusuusan afka ingiriisiga ah. Waxaa weli jirta su'aal furan in tusaale la soo wareejiyo xarumaha kala duduwan ama tusaale saxda ah ay ku kala duwan yihiin luuqada, tirada lambarka la magacaabay waxyaabaha la xiriira iyo tirada macluumaadka waxbarashada. Qoraalkan marka ugu horeysa ayaa muujin kara tusaalaha FG-NER ee Ingiriis iyo Jabanees, wuxuuna muujiyaa in LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), mid ka mid ah qaababka farshaxanka ee Ingiriis NER, wuxuu sidoo kale si wanaagsan u shaqeeyaa afka Ingiriiska FG-NER, laakiin si wanaagsan uma shaqeeyo Jabanees, af aad u badan oo xaraf ah. Si aan u tacliino dhibaatadan, waxaannu u soo jeedaynaa qaab u bedesha sameynta shabakadda neurada ee Japoniya FG-NER ee ku saleysan iyo dhaqaajinta qarka CNN iyo isticmaalka luqada iyo qeybta. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in qaabkii la soo jeeday uu kordhiyo kooxda FG-NER F-scorta japaniya laga bilaabo 66.76 boqolkiiba iyo 75.18 boqolkiiba.", 'sv': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) har dragit till sig en betydande mängd forskning. Nyligen har flera neurala nätverksbaserade modeller föreslagits och uppnått hög prestanda. Det finns dock lite forskning om finkornig NER (FG-NER), där hundratals namngivna entitetskategorier måste erkännas, särskilt för icke-engelska språk. Det är fortfarande en öppen fråga om det finns en modell som är robust över olika inställningar eller om rätt modell varierar beroende på språk, antal namngivna entitetskategorier och storleken på utbildningsdatauppsättningar. Denna uppsats presenterar först en empirisk jämförelse av FG-NER modeller för engelska och japanska och visar att LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), en av de senaste metoderna för engelska NER, också fungerar bra för engelska FG-NER men inte fungerar bra för japanska, ett språk som har ett stort antal teckentyper. För att ta itu med detta problem föreslår vi en metod för att förbättra den neurala nätverksbaserade japanska FG-NER prestanda genom att ta bort CNN-skiktet och använda ordlista och kategori inbäddningar. Experimentresultat visar att den föreslagna metoden förbättrar japansk FG-NER F-poäng från 66,76% till 75,18%.', 'ta': 'Named entity recognition (NER) has attracted a substantial amount of research.  சமீபத்தில், பல புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையிலான மாதிரிகள் முன்னோக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது அதிக செயல்பாடு  ஆனால், நன்றாக கிடைக்கப்பட்ட NER (FG-NER) மீது சிறிய ஆராய்ச்சி இருக்கிறது, அதில் நூறுகள் பெயர்க்கப்பட்ட சொத்த வகுப்புகளை அறியப்பட வே மொழி, பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் வகுப்புகளின் எண்ணிக்கையையும் பயிற்சி தரவு அமைப்புகளின் அளவு @ info இந்த பிரச்சனையை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் ஒரு முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் சிஎன்னி அடுக்கை நீக்கி மற்றும் அகராதி மற்றும் வகைப்பு உள்ளடக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்தி பா முயற்சி முடிவுகள் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் ஜாப்பானிய FG-NER F- score மேம்படுத்தும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது 66. 76% லிரு', 'si': 'නම් තියෙන අයිතික අඳුරණය (NER) විශාල පරීක්ෂණය ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අල්ලගත්තා. අලුත් වෙලාවට, න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ අධාරිත විද්\u200dයාපයක් සැලසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම උත්සාහ ව නමුත්, ප්\u200dරතිශේෂය NER (FG-NER) ගැන පොඩි පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වලින් නම් අයිතිශේෂ වර්ගයක් සියළුවක් ඉන්ග්\u200dරීසි  ඒක තාමත් විවෘත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා නැත්නම් විවිධ සැකසුම් වලින් නිර්මාණයක් තියෙනවා නැත්නම් නිර්මාණයක් නැත්නම් නිර්මා මේ පත්තර පළවෙනි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජාපානි වලට FG-NER මොඩේල්ස් සඳහා සම්පූර්ණ වෙනුවෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජාපානි වලට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් LSTM+CNN+CRF (ma and Hovy, 2016), ඉංග්\u200dරීස මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හරිගන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සැලසුම් කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල ජාපාන් ජාපාන් FG-NER ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසිද්ධ කරන්න, CNN ලේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ජාපාන් FG-NER F-score 66.76% විතරයි 75.18% විතරයි.', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) privlačilo je značajnu količinu istraživanja. Nedavno je predloženo nekoliko modela na osnovu neuralne mreže i ostvarilo visoke funkcije. Međutim, postoji malo istraživanja o finog zrnca NER (FG-NER), u kojima se moraju prepoznati stotine kategorija imenovanih entiteta, posebno za non-engleski jezik. Još uvek je otvoreno pitanje da li postoji model koji je jak u raznim nastavama ili odgovarajući model razlikuje u ovisnosti o jeziku, broju kategorija imena entiteta i veličini podataka obuke. Ovaj papir prvo predstavlja empiričko usporedbe modela FG-NER za engleski i japanski i pokazuje da LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma i Hovy, 2016), jedna od metoda umjetnosti za engleski NER, takođe dobro radi za engleski FG-NER, ali ne radi dobro za japanski, jezik koji ima veliki broj tipova karaktera. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predlažemo metodu da poboljšamo izvođenje na neuralnoj mreži japanske FG-NER uklanjanjem CNN sloja i korištenjem rečnika i kategorije. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da predložena metoda poboljšava japanski FG-NER F-rezultat od 66,76% do 75,18%.', 'ur': 'نام لیا گیٹی شناسایی (NER) نے بہت زیادہ تحقیق کو اٹھایا ہے۔ اچھا، بہت سی نیورال نیٹ ورک بنیاد کی مدل پیشنهاد کی گئی ہیں اور بہت اچھی پرورش پائی گئی ہیں. However, there is little research on fine grained NER (FG-NER) where hundreds of entity categories must be recognized, especially non-English languages. یہ ابھی ایک کھلی سؤال ہے کہ کیا ایک موڈل ہے جو مختلف تنظیمات میں مضبوط ہے یا مناسب موڈل زبان پر متفاوت ہوتی ہے، انٹیٹ کے نام کے کاٹیوں کی تعداد، اور ترینس ڈیٹ سٹ کی اندازہ. یہ کاغذ پہلے انگلیسی اور جاپانی کے لئے FG-NER موڈل کے مطابق مطابق مقایسہ کرتا ہے اور دکھاتا ہے کہ LSTM+CNN+CRF (ماہ اور هووی، 2016), انگلیسی NER کے لئے ایک ایسی موجود ہے، انگلیسی FG-NER کے لئے بھی بہت اچھا کام کرتا ہے لیکن جاپانی کے لئے بہت اچھا کام نہیں کرتا، ایک زبان جس میں بہت سی تعداد شخصیٹ اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے، ہم ایک طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ نیورال نیٹ ورک پر بنیاد جاپانی FG-NER فعالیت کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے CNN لائر کو ہٹانے کے ذریعہ اور لئوی اور کاٹیوں ایمبڈینگ کا استعمال کریں. تجربہ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ جاپانی FG-NER F-score کو 66.76% سے 75.18% تک بہتر کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Named entity recognition (NER) has attracted a substantial amount of research.  Yaqinda, bir necha neyrol tarmoq asosiy modellari talab qilingan va yuqori ishlash imkoniyatini topdik. Lekin, yaxshi qo'llangan NER (FG-NER) haqida o'rganish bir nechta o'rganish mavjud. Bu yerda yuzlab ma'lumot turlarini aniqlash kerak, hususan ingliz tillar uchun. @ info: whatsthis Birinchi qadam ingliz va Япония uchun FG-NER modellariga o'xshash imkoniyatlarini koʻrsatadi va ingliz NER uchun bir xil usullar (Ma va Hovy 2016), Ingliz tilining sohasi usullarida biri ishlaydi va Ingliz FG-NER uchun yaxshi ishlayapti, lekin Yaponchaga bir necha xil turlari bo'lgan tilni yaxshi ishlayapti. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun, Yaponiya asosiy tarmoqning neyrolik FG-NER bajarishini bajarish usulini tahlil qilamiz, CNN qatlam olib tashlash va lugʻatni va kategori tarmoqlaridan foydalanish uchun. Name", 'vi': 'Nhận dạng tổ chức có tên (NER) đã thu hút rất nhiều nghiên cứu. Gần đây, nhiều mô hình mạng thần kinh đã được đề xuất và đạt hiệu suất cao. Tuy nhiên, có rất ít nghiên cứu về cái máy sẵn sàng (FG-NER), trong đó phải được công nhận hàng trăm hạng người có tên, đặc biệt là ngôn ngữ không tiếng Anh. Vẫn là một câu hỏi cởi mở, liệu có mô hình vững chắc trong các thiết lập khác nhau hay mô hình thích hợp khác nhau tùy theo ngôn ngữ, số lượng các phân loại thực thể tên, và kích thước các bộ dữ liệu tập luyện. Tờ giấy này trước tiên là một bản so sánh bằng thực tế của FG-NER với tiếng Anh và tiếng Nhật và chứng minh rằng LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma và Hoy, 2006), một trong những phương pháp tối tân nhất của người Anh, cũng làm việc tốt cho FG-NER Anh, nhưng không hoạt động tốt cho người Nhật, một ngôn ngữ có nhiều loại đặc trưng. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp cải thiện hiệu ứng con số mạng thần kinh của Nhật FG-NER bằng cách gỡ bỏ lớp CNN và sử dụng từ điển và sự nhúng vào phân loại. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp đã đề nghị cải thiện con số FG-NER của Nhật từ 67', 'bg': 'Признаването на наименованите субекти (NER) привлече значителен брой изследвания. Наскоро бяха предложени няколко модела, базирани на невронна мрежа, които постигнаха висока производителност. Въпреки това, има малко изследвания за фино зърнестото НЕР (FG-NER), в което стотици категории имена трябва да бъдат признати, особено за неанглийски езици. Все още е отворен въпрос дали има модел, който е здрав в различни настройки, или правилният модел варира в зависимост от езика, броя на посочените категории субекти и размера на наборите от данни за обучение. Тази статия първо представя емпирично сравнение на моделите за английски и японски език и демонстрира, че един от най-съвременните методи за английски език работи добре и за английски език, но не работи добре за японски език, който има голям брой типове знаци. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме метод за подобряване на функционирането на японската базирана невронна мрежа чрез премахване на слоя и използване на вграждания речник и категории. Резултатите от експеримента показват, че предложеният метод подобрява японския F-score от 66,76% на 75,18%.', 'da': 'Anerkendelse af navngivne enheder (NER) har tiltrukket en betydelig mængde forskning. For nylig er flere neurale netværksbaserede modeller blevet foreslået og opnået høj ydeevne. Der er imidlertid kun lidt forskning i finkornet NER (FG-NER), hvor hundredvis af navngivne enhedskategorier skal anerkendes, især for ikke-engelske sprog. Det er stadig et åbent spørgsmål, om der er en model, der er robust på tværs af forskellige indstillinger, eller om den rigtige model varierer afhængigt af sproget, antallet af navngivne enhedskategorier og størrelsen af træningsdatasæt. Denne artikel præsenterer først en empirisk sammenligning af FG-NER modeller for engelsk og japansk og viser, at LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma og Hovy, 2016), en af de nyeste metoder for engelsk NER, også fungerer godt for engelsk FG-NER, men ikke fungerer godt for japansk, et sprog, der har et stort antal tegntyper. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi en metode til at forbedre den neurale netværksbaserede japanske FG-NER ydeevne ved at fjerne CNN-laget og bruge ordbog og kategori indlejringer. Forsøgsresultater viser, at den foreslåede metode forbedrer japansk FG-NER F-score fra 66,76% til 75,18%.', 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih subjekta (NER) privuklo je značajnu količinu istraživanja. Nedavno je predloženo nekoliko modela na osnovu neuralne mreže i postiglo visoke funkcije. Međutim, postoji malo istraživanja o fino zrno NER (FG-NER), u kojima se moraju prepoznati stotine kategorija imenovanih entiteta, posebno za jezike koje nisu Engleski. Još uvijek je otvoreno pitanje da li postoji model koji je jak u raznim nastavama ili odgovarajući model razlikuje u ovisnosti o jeziku, broju kategorija imena entitata i veličini podataka obuke. Ovaj papir prvo predstavlja empiričko usporedbe modela FG-NER za engleski i japanski i pokazuje da LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma i Hovy, 2016), jedna od metoda umjetnosti za engleski NER, također dobro radi za engleski FG-NER, ali ne radi dobro za japanski, jezik koji ima veliki broj vrsta karaktera. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predlažemo metodu da poboljšamo učinkovitost japanskog FG-NER-a na neuralnoj mreži uklanjanjem CNN sloja i korištenjem rečnika i kategorije. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da je predložena metoda poboljšala japanski FG-NER F-rezultat od 66,76% do 75,18%.', 'de': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) hat eine beträchtliche Menge an Forschung angezogen. In letzter Zeit wurden mehrere neuronale netzwerkbasierte Modelle vorgeschlagen, die eine hohe Leistung erzielen. Allerdings gibt es wenig Forschung zu feinkörnigem NER (FG-NER), in dem Hunderte von benannten Entitätenkategorien erkannt werden müssen, insbesondere für nicht-englische Sprachen. Es ist immer noch offen, ob es ein Modell gibt, das über verschiedene Einstellungen hinweg robust ist oder ob das richtige Modell abhängig von der Sprache, der Anzahl der benannten Entitätskategorien und der Größe der Trainingsdatensätze variiert. Diese Arbeit stellt zunächst einen empirischen Vergleich von FG-NER Modellen für Englisch und Japanisch vor und zeigt, dass LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), eine der modernsten Methoden für Englisch NER, auch für Englisch FG-NER gut funktioniert, aber nicht gut für Japanisch, eine Sprache mit einer großen Anzahl von Zeichentypen. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir eine Methode vor, um die neuronale Netzwerk-basierte japanische FG-NER Leistung zu verbessern, indem die CNN-Schicht entfernt und Wörterbuch- und Kategorieeinbedlungen verwendet werden. Experimente zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode den japanischen FG-NER F-Score von 66,76% auf 75,18% verbessert.', 'nl': 'Named entity recognition (NER) heeft een aanzienlijke hoeveelheid onderzoek aangetrokken. Onlangs zijn verscheidene neurale netwerkmodellen voorgesteld die hoge prestaties behalen. Er is echter weinig onderzoek naar fine-granined NER (FG-NER), waarin honderden benoemde entiteitencategorieën moeten worden herkend, vooral voor niet-Engelse talen. Het is nog steeds een open vraag of er een model is dat robuust is voor verschillende instellingen of het juiste model varieert afhankelijk van de taal, het aantal benoemde entiteitencategorieën en de grootte van trainingsdatasets. Dit artikel presenteert eerst een empirische vergelijking van FG-NER modellen voor Engels en Japans en toont aan dat LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), een van de state-of-the-art methoden voor Engels NER, ook goed werkt voor Engels FG-NER, maar niet goed werkt voor Japans, een taal die een groot aantal tekentypen heeft. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een methode voor om de op neurale netwerken gebaseerde Japanse FG-NER prestaties te verbeteren door de CNN laag te verwijderen en gebruik te maken van woordenboek- en categoriebedden. Uit experimenten blijkt dat de voorgestelde methode de Japanse FG-NER F-score verbetert van 66,76% tot 75,18%.', 'id': 'Pengenalan entitas bernama (NER) telah menarik jumlah penelitian yang besar. Baru-baru ini, beberapa model jaringan saraf telah diusulkan dan mencapai prestasi tinggi. Namun, ada sedikit penelitian tentang NER (FG-NER), di mana ratusan kategori entitas bernama harus dikenal, terutama untuk bahasa bukan Inggris. Ini masih pertanyaan terbuka apakah ada model yang kuat melalui berbagai pengaturan atau model yang tepat berbeda bergantung pada bahasa, bilangan kategori entitas bernama, dan ukuran set data latihan. Kertas ini pertama-tama menunjukkan perbandingan empirik dari model FG-NER untuk bahasa Inggris dan Jepang dan menunjukkan bahwa LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), salah satu metode terbaik untuk bahasa Inggris NER, juga bekerja dengan baik untuk bahasa Inggris FG-NER tetapi tidak bekerja dengan baik untuk bahasa Jepang, bahasa yang memiliki banyak jenis karakter. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan metode untuk meningkatkan prestasi FG-NER Jepang berbasis jaringan saraf dengan menghapus lapisan CNN dan menggunakan kamus dan kategori embedding. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan meningkatkan skor F FG-NER Jepang dari 66,76% ke 75,18%.', 'sw': 'Named entity recognition (NER) has attracted a substantial amount of research.  Hivi karibuni, mifano kadhaa yenye mtandao wa neurali imependekezwa na kupata ufanisi mkubwa. Hata hivyo, kuna utafiti kidogo kuhusu NER (FG-NER), ambapo mamia ya makundi yaliyoitwa yanapaswa kutambuliwa, hasa kwa lugha isiyo ya Kiingereza. Bado ni swali la wazi kama kuna muundo unaoharibiwa katika maeneo mbalimbali au mtindo sahihi unatofautiana na kutegemea lugha, idadi ya makundi yanayoitwa entity, na ukubwa wa taarifa za mafunzo. Makala hii ya kwanza inaonyesha mfano wa FG-NER kwa ajili ya Kiingereza na Kijapani na inaonyesha kuwa LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma na Hovy, 2016), moja ya njia za sanaa za Kiingereza za za NER, pia inafanya kazi vizuri kwa Kiingereza FG-NER lakini haifanya kazi vizuri kwa Kijapani, lugha yenye aina nyingi za wahusika. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo hili, tunapendekeza njia ya kuboresha utendaji wa mtandao wa neura wa Kijapani wa FG-NER kwa kuondoa daraja la CNN na kutumia makundi ya lugha na makundi. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa inaboresha score za FG-NER za Japani kutoka asilimia 66.76 hadi asilimia 75.18.', 'fa': 'شناسایی واحد نامیده (NER) تعداد زیادی تحقیقات را جذب کرده است. اخیرا، چندین مدل\u200cهای شبکه عصبی پیشنهاد داده شده\u200cاند و به عملکرد بالا رسیده\u200cاند. با این حال، تحقیقات کمی در مورد NER (FG-NER) که در آن صدها از مجموعه\u200cهای نامیده شده باید شناخته شوند، مخصوصا برای زبانهای غیر انگلیسی. این هنوز یک سوال باز است که آیا یک مدل وجود دارد که در تنظیمات مختلف قوی است یا مدل مناسب بر اساس زبان تغییر می\u200cدهد، تعداد مجموعه\u200cهای مجموعه نامیده شده و اندازه مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای آموزش است. این کاغذ اول یک مقایسه امپراتیک از مدلهای FG-NER برای انگلیسی و ژاپنی را نشان می دهد و نشان می دهد که LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), یکی از روش\u200cهای هنری برای انگلیسی NER، همچنین برای انگلیسی FG-NER خوب کار می\u200cکند ولی برای ژاپنی کار نمی\u200cکند، یک زبان که تعداد زیادی از نوع شخصیت دارد. برای حل این مشکل، ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که فعالیت ژاپنی FG-NER بر روی شبکه عصبی با حذف طبقه CNN و استفاده از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cها و قسمتی\u200cها بهتر شود. نتیجه تجربه نشان می دهد که این روش پیشنهاد به جاپانی FG-NER F-score از 66.76% تا 75.18% بهتر می شود.', 'ko': '명명된 실체 식별(NER)은 많은 연구를 끌어들였다.최근 신경 네트워크를 기반으로 한 몇 가지 모델이 제기돼 높은 성능을 얻고 있다.그러나 세립도 실체 클래스 식별(FG-NER)에 대한 연구는 매우 적고 이 분야에서 수백 개의 명명 실체 클래스, 특히 비영어 언어에 대해 식별해야 한다.여러 가지 설정에서 하나의 모델이 건장한지, 아니면 적당한 모델이 언어, 명명 실체 유형의 수량과 훈련 데이터 집합의 크기에 따라 다른지 여부는 여전히 현안으로 남아 있다.본고는 먼저 영어와 일본어의 FG-NER 모델을 실증적으로 비교하고 LSTM+CNN+CRF(Ma와 Hovy, 2016)가 영어 NER의 가장 선진적인 방법 중 하나이며 영어 FG-NER에도 적용되지만 일본어에는 적용되지 않고 일본어에는 대량의 문자 유형이 있음을 증명한다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 CNN층을 제거하고 사전과 카테고리를 이용해 신경 네트워크 기반의 일본어 FG-NER 성능을 향상시키는 방법을 제시했다.실험 결과 이 방법은 일본어 FG-NER F 평점을 66.76%에서 75.18%로 높였다.', 'tr': 'Adlanylan zatlary tanamak (NER) uly bir ara힊tyrma 챌ekdi. So흫ky wagtlar, n채sir 힊ebeke tabanly nusgalar teklip edildi we 첵okary ukyp ba힊armady. 횦철ne, i흫lisi NER (FG-NER) hakynda 첵체zler챌e sany sany toparlar bilen tanalmaly. H채li a 챌yk soragy bar, d체rli d체z체mlerden 첵철ne g체첵챌li bir nusga 첵철ne-de d체rli nusga g철rn체힊i, ady kategori첵alary흫 sany we e휓itim datasyny흫 ululygy g철rn체힊i. Bu kagyz ilkinji gezek FG-NER nusgalaryny흫 i흫lis we japon챌a 체챌in empirik kar힊캇la힊ygyny g철rkez첵채r we LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma we Hovy, 2016), i흫lis NER 체챌in sungat d철wletlerinden birini, I흫lis dili FG-NER 체챌in gowy i힊le첵채r 첵철ne Japon챌a 체챌in gowy i힊le첵채r 첵철ne, bir nusga 체챌in uly bir karakter hili bar. Bu mesel채ni 챌철zmek 체챌in, CNN d체z체mlerini silerek we s철zl체k we kategori첵a i챌erenleri ulanarak n채yral 힊ebeke tabanly japon챌a FG-NER eserini geli힊tirmek 체챌in bir y철ntem teklip edip otyr첵arys. Testler netijesi Japon챌a FG-NER F-scoreny 66,76% we 75,18% tarapyndan gowura첵andygyny g철rkez첵채r.', 'af': "Genaamde entiteiterkenning (NER) het 'n groot hoeveelheid ondersoek aantrek. Onlangs het verskeie neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde modele voorgestel en hoog prestasie bereik. Maar daar is 'n bietjie ondersoek oor fyn-graad NER (FG-NER), waarin honderde van genoemde entiteitkategorie herken moet word, veral vir nie-Engels tale. Dit is nog 'n oop vraag of daar 'n model is sterk oor verskeie instellings of die regte model verander afhanklik van die taal, die nommer van genoem entiteitkategories en die grootte van onderwerking datastelle. Hierdie papier stel eerste 'n empiriese vergelyking van FG-NER modele vir Engels en Japane en wys dat LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), een van die state-of-the-art metodes vir Engels NER, ook goed werk vir Engels FG-NER maar doen nie goed werk vir Japans, 'n taal wat 'n groot aantal karaktertipes het nie. Om hierdie probleem te probeer, voorstel ons 'n metode om die neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde japanese FG-NER-prestasie te verbeter deur die CNN-laag te verwyder en die woordeboek en kategorie inbettings te gebruik. Eksperiment resultate wys dat die voorgestelde metode japanse FG-NER F-score verbeter van 66,76% tot 75,18%.", 'hy': 'Նվանված էության ճանաչելը (ՆԵՌ) շատ հետազոտություններ է գրավել: Վերջերս մի քանի նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված մոդելներ են առաջարկվել և հասել բարձր արդյունքների: Այնուամենայնիվ, շատ քիչ հետազոտություն կա նրբագեղ ՆԵՌ (FG-ՆԵR) մասին, որտեղ հարյուրավոր անվանելի կատեգորիաներ պետք է ճանաչեն, հատկապես ոչ անգլերեն լեզուների համար: It is still an open question whether there is a model that is robust across various settings or the proper model varies depending on the language, the number of named entity categories, and the size of training datasets.  This paper first presents an empirical comparison of FG-NER models for English and Japanese and demonstrates that LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), one of the state-of-the-art methods for English NER, also works well for English FG-NER but does not work well for Japanese, a language that has a large number of character types.  Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նյարդային ցանցով հիմնված ճապոնական FG-Net-ի արտադրողականությունը բարելավելու մեթոդ՝ հեռացնելով CNN շերտը և օգտագործելով բառարանի և կատեգորիայի ներդրումները: Փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկած մեթոդը բարելավում է ճապոնական FG-NetR F-գնահատականը 66.76 տոկոսից 75.18 տոկոսին:', 'az': 'İsimlənmiş entitə tanıması (NER) çox dəyişik təhsil etdi. Son zamanlarda bir neçə nöral ağ tabanlı modellər təbliğ edildi və yüksək performansı başa düşdü. Yüzlərcə ünsiyyət kategoriyaları tanınmalıdır, özellikle İngilizə dili olmayan ünsiyyətlər üçün. Bu hələ də a çıq bir sual idi ki, cürbəcür quruluşlar arasında möhkəm bir model yoxsa düzgün model dilinə, adlı növ kategoriyalarının sayısı və təhsil veri quruluşların böyüklüyü dəyişər. Bu kağıt ilk dəfə İngilizce və Japon üçün FG-NER modellərinin empirik komparaştırmasını göstərir və LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), İngilizce NER üçün sanat metodlarından birini göstərir, İngilizce FG-NER üçün də yaxşı çalışır, lakin Japon üçün yaxşı çalışmır, çox cür karakter türləri olan dili. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, CNN səhifəsini silib sözlük və kategoriya inşallarını istifadə etmək üçün nöral şəbəkə tabanlı Japon FG-NER performansını yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün bir yol təklif edirik. Təcrübə sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş metodların Japon FG-NER F-scorelarını 66,76%-dən 75,18%.', 'bn': 'নামের বস্তুর স্বীকার (NER) বিশেষ পরিমাণ গবেষণার আকর্ষণ করেছে। সম্প্রতি বেশ কয়েকটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক মডেল প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে এবং উচ্চকর্ম অর্জন করা হয়েছে। কিন্তু সুন্দর ভালো গ্রেফতারিত নেয়ার (এফজি-নের) সম্পর্কে কিছু গবেষণা রয়েছে, যেখানে শত শত নামের বস্তুর বিভাগের স্বীকৃতি প্ এটি এখনো একটি উন্মুক্ত প্রশ্ন যে কোন মডেল রয়েছে যা বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যের মাধ্যমে চুরি করা হয় অথবা সঠিক মডেল ভাষার উপর নির্ভর করে, নামের বস্তুর সংখ্যা এব এই পত্রিকাটি প্রথমে ইংরেজি এবং জাপানীদের জন্য এফজি-নেনার মডেলের তুলনায় একটি কার্যকর তুলনা উপস্থাপন করেছে এবং প্রদর্শন করেছে যে এলসিএম+সিএনএন+সিএনএন+সিআরএফ (মা এবং হোভি ২০১৬), ইংরেজি নেটরের একটি রাষ্ট্রী এই সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য আমরা একটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক এফজি-NER প্রদর্শনের মাধ্যমে জাপানী এফজি-নের ভিত্তিক কর্মসূচী উন্নত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি জাপানী এফজি-নের এফ-স্কোরের উন্নতি পায় ৬৬. ৭৬% থেকে ৭৫.', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) privuklo je značajnu količinu istraživanja. Nedavno je predloženo nekoliko modela na osnovu neuralne mreže i ostvarilo visoke funkcije. Međutim, postoji malo istraživanja o fino zrno NER (FG-NER), u kojima se moraju prepoznati stotine kategorija imenovanih entiteta, posebno za non-engleske jezike. Još uvijek je otvoreno pitanje da li postoji model koji je jak u raznim nastavama ili odgovarajući model razlikuje u ovisnosti o jeziku, broju kategorija imena entitata i veličini podataka obuke. Ovaj papir prvo predstavlja empiričko usporedbe modela FG-NER za engleski i japanski i pokazuje da LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma i Hovy, 2016), jedna od metoda umjetnosti za engleski NER, također dobro radi za engleski FG-NER, ali ne radi dobro za japanski, jezik koji ima veliki broj tipova karaktera. Da bi se riješili ovaj problem, predlažemo metodu da poboljšamo učinkovitost japanskog FG-NER na neuralnoj mreži uklanjanjem CNN sloja i korištenjem rečnika i kategorije. Rezultati iskustva pokazuju da je predložena metoda poboljšala japanski FG-NER F-rezultat od 66,76% do 75,18%.', 'am': 'የስሜ አካባቢ ማውቀት (NER) ምርመራ በብዛት አቀላቅሎታል፡፡ በቅርቢቱ ዘመን፣ ብዙ የደዌብ መረብ የተመሠረተች ምሳሌዎች ተዘጋጅተዋል ከፍተኛ የራሳቸውንም አግኝተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን በመቶ የሚቆጠሩ አካባቢ ክፍሎች፣ ይልቁንም ለኢንግሊዝኛ ቋንቋዎች አይደሉም፡፡ በቋንቋ፣ የአካላት ክፍሎች፣ የሥርዓት ቁጥር እና የድምፅ ዳታዎችን መጠን የሚከተል ሞዴል ቢኖር የተከፈተ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም በመጀመሪያ የእንግሊዝኛ እና የጃፓን አካባቢዎች የFG-NER ዓይነቶች እና የኢንጂንግል እና የጃፓንኛ እና LSTM+CNN+CRF (MA እና ሆvy 2016) የኢንግሊዝኛ ነፃነት የልዩ አርእስት ሥርዓት አንዱ፣ እንግሊዝኛ FG-NER ደግሞ መልካም ይሠራል፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመቀናቀል፣ የነዌብ መረብ-based የጃፓን FG-NER አድራጊውን ለማሻል እና የመዝገብ መዝገብ እና የክፍለ ሥርዓት እና የክፍለ አካላትን በመጠቀም እና ለመጠቀም የማንችል ልማድ አቅናለን፡፡ ፈተናው ውጤቶች ከ66.76 በመቶ ጀምሮ እስከ 75.18 በመቶው የጃፓን FG-NER F-score እንዲያሳድግ ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Njohja e emëruar e njësisë (NER) ka tërhequr një sasi thelbësore kërkimi. Kohët e fundit, disa modele me bazë në rrjetin nervor janë propozuar dhe arritur performancë të lartë. Megjithatë, ka pak kërkim mbi NER të hollë (FG-NER), në të cilin duhet të njihen qindra kategori të njësive të emëruara, veçanërisht për gjuhët jo-angleze. Është ende një pyetje e hapur nëse ekziston një model i fortë nëpërmjet rregullimeve të ndryshme apo modeli i duhur ndryshon në varësi të gjuhës, numrit të kategorive të emëruara të njësisë dhe madhësisë së grupeve të dhënash të trajnimit. Ky dokument paraqet së pari një krahasim empirik të modeleve FG-NER për anglisht dhe japonezë dhe demonstron se LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma dhe Hovy, 2016), një nga metodat më të larta për anglishtin NER, punon gjithashtu mirë për anglishtin FG-NER por nuk punon mirë për japonezën, një gjuhë që ka një numër të madh tipesh karakteresh. Për të trajtuar këtë problem, ne propozojmë një metodë për të përmirësuar performancën japoneze FG-NER me bazë në rrjetin nervor duke hequr shtresën CNN dhe duke përdorur përbërjet e fjalorit dhe kategorisë. Rezultatet e eksperimenteve tregojnë se metoda e propozuar përmirëson rezultatin F japonez FG-NER nga 66.76% në 75.18%.', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste tunnustamine (NER) on kaasanud märkimisväärse hulga teadusuuringuid. Hiljuti on välja pakutud mitmeid neurovõrgupõhiseid mudeleid, mis on saavutanud kõrge jõudluse. Siiski on vähe uuringuid peeneteralise NER (FG-NER) kohta, kus tuleb tunnustada sadu nimetatud üksuste kategooriaid, eriti mitte-inglise keelte puhul. On veel lahtiseks küsimuseks, kas on olemas mudel, mis on erinevates seadetes tugev, või õige mudel varieerub sõltuvalt keelest, nimetatud üksuste kategooriate arvust ja koolitusandmekogumite suurusest. Käesolev töö esitab esmalt empiirilise võrdluse FG-NER mudelitest inglise ja jaapani keeles ning näitab, et LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma ja Hovy, 2016), üks kaasaegsemaid inglise NER meetodeid, toimib hästi ka inglise FG-NER puhul, kuid ei toimi hästi jaapani keele puhul, millel on suur hulk märgitüüpe. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja meetodi, mille abil parandada jaapani närvivõrgul põhinevat FG-NER jõudlust CNN kihi eemaldamise ning sõnastiku ja kategooria manustamise abil. Katsetulemused näitavad, et kavandatud meetod parandab Jaapani FG-NER F-skoori 66,76%-lt 75,18%-le.', 'fi': 'Nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnustaminen (NER) on houkutellut huomattavan määrän tutkimusta. Viime aikoina on ehdotettu useita neuroverkkoihin perustuvia malleja, jotka ovat saavuttaneet korkean suorituskyvyn. Hienorakeisesta NER:stä (FG-NER) on kuitenkin vähän tutkimusta, jossa satoja nimettyjä entiteettiluokkia on tunnustettava, erityisesti muille kuin englanninkielisille kielille. Vielä on avoin kysymys, onko olemassa malli, joka on vankka eri asetuksissa vai onko oikea malli erilainen kielen, nimettyjen yhteisöluokkien määrän ja koulutustietojen koon mukaan. Tämä artikkeli esittelee ensin empiirisen vertailun FG-NER-malleista englanniksi ja japaniksi ja osoittaa, että LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma ja Hovy, 2016), yksi englannin NER:n uusimmista menetelmistä, toimii hyvin myös englannin FG-NER:lle, mutta ei hyvin japanille, jolla on suuri määrä merkkityyppejä. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme menetelmää, jolla parannetaan japanilaista FG-NER-suorituskykyä poistamalla CNN-kerros ja hyödyntämällä sanakirja- ja kategoriaupotuksia. Koetulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä parantaa japanilaisen FG-NER F-pisteen 66,76%:sta 75,18%:iin.', 'ca': "Named entity recognition (NER) has attracted a substantial amount of research.  Recentment, s'han proposat i aconseguit molts models basats en xarxa neural. No obstant això, hi ha poca investigació sobre el NER fins grans (FG-NER), en la qual s'han de reconèixer centenars de categories d'entitats anomenades, especialment per a llengües no angleses. Encara hi ha una pregunta oberta si hi ha un model que és robust a través de diverses configuracions o el model adequat varia segons el llenguatge, el nombre de categories d'entitats anomenades i la mida dels conjunts de dades d'entrenament. Aquest article presenta primer una comparació empírica de models FG-NER en anglès i japonès i demostra que LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma i Hovy, 2016), un dels mètodes més avançats en anglès NER, també funciona bé en anglès FG-NER però no funciona bé en japonès, una llengua que té molts tipus de caràcter. To tackle this problem, we propose a method to improve the neural network-based Japanese FG-NER performance by removing the CNN layer and utilizing dictionary and category embeddings.  Els resultats dels experiments mostren que el mètode proposat millora la puntuació F japonesa FG-NER del 66,76% al 75,18%.", 'cs': 'Uznání jmenovaných entit (NER) přilákalo značné množství výzkumu. V poslední době bylo navrženo několik modelů založených na neuronových sítích a dosaženo vysokého výkonu. Nicméně existuje málo výzkumu na jemnozrnné NER (FG-NER), ve kterém je třeba rozpoznat stovky pojmenovaných kategorií entit, zejména pro neanglické jazyky. Je stále otevřená otázka, zda existuje model, který je robustní napříč různými nastaveními, nebo správný model se liší v závislosti na jazyce, počtu pojmenovaných kategorií entit a velikosti tréninkových datových sad. Tento článek nejprve prezentuje empirické srovnání FG-NER modelů pro angličtinu a japonštinu a ukazuje, že LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma a Hovy, 2016), jedna z nejmodernějších metod pro angličtinu NER, funguje také dobře pro angličtinu FG-NER, ale nefunguje dobře pro japonštinu, jazyk, který má velké množství typů znaků. Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme metodu zlepšení výkonu japonského FG-NER založeného na neuronové síti odstraněním CNN vrstvy a využitím slovníků a kategorií vložení. Výsledky experimentů ukazují, že navrhovaná metoda zlepšuje japonský FG-NER F-skóre z 66,76% na 75,18%.', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Saying politenessoffpolite, there is ffpolite"), and there is a change ("assertive Iki sampeyan mbukak perspeking ing ing kana karo model sing gak nggawe sistem sing paling, iso nggawe sistem sing paling nggawe winih, ngono nganggo perusahaan kategori Enti, lan ukuya perusahaan dataset sing apik. Awak iki nambah tanggal nggo ngerasakno karo FG-NeR model kanggo Inggris lan Japoni lan nambah lan ngawe barang nggo oleh-oleh (ma karo Hove, 2011), saben kelas-oleh sistem kanggo ngerasakno Inggris NeR, dadi iso dianggo barang kanggo ngerasakno FG-NeR maca ora trus nggo japoni, banget sing dumadhi akeh akeh operasi kanggo ngerasakno. Ngawe nggawe perbudhakan iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem kanggo bantayan netwisik-sistem sing supoyo barang nggawe barang japangan FG-NeR kang nggawe layang MT lan Ngawe Perintah sing berarti diketeksi lan soko sing diranggo soko malang. Perintah sing paling nggambar kuwi nggawe Perintah sing bisa nggawe Perintah kanggo nyebute FG-NIR F-Puntuan kanggo 6.7% sampek 75.18%.', 'sk': 'Priznanje imenovanih subjektov (NER) je pritegnilo veliko raziskav. V zadnjem času je bilo predlaganih več modelov, ki temeljijo na nevronskih omrežjih in doseženih visoko zmogljivost. Vendar pa je malo raziskav o drobnozrnatih NER (FG-NER), v katerih je treba prepoznati na stotine imenovanih kategorij entitet, zlasti za ne-angleške jezike. Še vedno je odprto vprašanje, ali obstaja model, ki je robusten v različnih nastavitvah, ali se ustrezen model razlikuje glede na jezik, število imenovanih kategorij subjektov in velikost naborov podatkov o usposabljanju. Ta prispevek najprej predstavlja empirično primerjavo modelov FG-NER za angleščino in japonščino in dokazuje, da LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), ena najsodobnejših metod za angleščino NER, dobro deluje tudi za angleščino FG-NER, vendar ne deluje dobro za japonščino, jezik z velikim številom vrst znakov. Za reševanje tega problema predlagamo metodo za izboljšanje učinkovitosti japonskega FG-NER, ki temelji na živčnem omrežju, z odstranitvijo plasti CNN in uporabo vgradnje slovarjev in kategorij. Rezultati eksperimentov kažejo, da predlagana metoda izboljša japonski FG-NER F-score s 66,76% na 75,18%.', 'he': 'זיהוי ישות בשם (NER) נמשך כמות משמעותית של מחקר. לאחרונה, כמה דוגמנים מבוססים ברשת עצבית הציעו והשגו ביצועים גבוהים. עם זאת, יש מעט מחקר על NER (FG-NER), שבה מאות קטגוריות של ישויות בשם חייבים להכיר, במיוחד לשפות לא אנגליות. זו עדיין שאלה פתוחה אם יש דוגמא שהיא חזקה במערכות שונות או שהדוגמא הנכונה שונה בהתאם לשפה, מספר הקטגוריות של ישויות בשם, וגודל של קבוצות נתונים אימונים. העבודה הזו מציגה קודם שיוון אמפירי של דוגמנים FG-NER לאנגלית ויפנית והוכיחה כי LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), אחת מהשיטות המאודמות לאנגלית NER, גם עובדת טוב עבור אנגלית FG-NER אבל לא עובדת טוב עבור יפנית, שפה שיש לה מספר גדול של סוגי אופים. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזאת, אנו מציעים שיטה לשפר את ההופעה היפנית FG-NER שברשת העצבית על ידי להסיר את שכבת CNN ולהשתמש במילון וקטגוריה. תוצאות הניסויים מראות שהשיטה המוצעת משפר את נקודת F-FG-NER היפנית מ-66.76% ל-75.18%.', 'ha': "Sunan sunan shaidar abun (NER) ya zaɓe kima mai girma. Recently, several neural network-based models have been proposed and achieved high performance.  A lokacin da, ana da research kaɗan a kan NER (FG-NER), a cikinsa, za'a gane wasu turbuɗu masu sunan abuni, kuma hususan cikin harshen Ingiriya. Ba ta kasa wani tambayi mai buɗe ko an sami wata motsi da za'a shafe shi a cikin wasu shiryoyin ayuka ko kuma misali mai daidaita, yana daidai a kan harshen, da ƙidãyar nau'in abun da aka suna, da girma tsarin data masu amfani da. Wannan takardar farko na bãyar da wani fanic misalin FG-NER wa Ingiriya da japane kuma yana nuna cewa LstanM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovie, 2016), wani na-state-of-art-metode wa Inglizi NER, yana aiki mai kyau ga Ingirinsa FG-NER kuma bai yi aiki da wani alhẽri ba ga Jabanisi, wata harshe wanda yana da wasu irin wahala mai girma. Yana buɗawa ga masu haɗi da wannan muammãni, ko kuma Muke buƙata wata hanyoyi wa improve aikin FG-NER wanda ke danna na shirin jerin CNN da za'a yi amfani da dictionary da kategori. Matarin jarrabo na nuna cewa, shirin da aka buƙata yana ƙaranci FG-NER F-score na japanen daga 66.76% zuwa 85.18%.", 'bo': 'མིང་ཞུགས་པའི་དབུལ་གྱི་རྟོགས་ཤིག་དང་།NER(NER)ལ་གནས་ཚུལ་འཚོལ་ཁག་ཅིག་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད། ཉེ་ཆར་བར་དུ་ཀླད་མེད་དྲ་བ་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་སྤྲོད་བྱས་ནས་མཐུན་སྣེ་མཐུན་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེལ་ཆེ་བའི་NER (FG-NER)ལ་ལས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ཚོ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྣམས་མིང་དང་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ར It is still a open question whether there is a model that is robust across various settings or the proper model varies depending on the language, the number of named entity categories, and the size of training data sets. It is still a open question whether there is a model that is strong across various settings or the proper model varies depending on the language, the number of names entity categories, and the size of training data sets. This paper first presents an empirical comparison of FG-NER models for English and Japanese and demonstrates that LSTM+CNN+CRF (Ma and Hovy, 2016), one of the state-of-the-art methods for English NER, also works well for English FG-NER but does not work well for Japanese, a language that has a large number of character types. དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་འོང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པས། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་དྲ་བ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ཉེ་པོ་FG-NER་ཡོད་ཚད་འདི་ Experiment results show that the proposed method improves Japanese FG-NER F-score from 66.76% to 75.18%.'}
{'en': 'Ant Colony System for Multi-Document Summarization', 'ar': 'نظام مستعمرة النمل لتلخيص متعدد الوثائق', 'fr': 'Système de colonies de fourmis pour la synthèse de plusieurs documents', 'es': 'Sistema de colonias de hormigas para resumen de varios documentos', 'pt': 'Sistema de colônia de formigas para sumarização de vários documentos', 'ja': 'マルチドキュメントの要約のためのアントコロニーシステム', 'hi': 'बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के लिए चींटी कॉलोनी सिस्टम', 'zh': '以多文档总之蚁群统', 'ru': 'Система Ant Colony для суммирования нескольких документов', 'ga': 'Córas Coilíneachta Seangán le haghaidh Achoimriú Ildhoiciméad', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Hangyakolónia rendszer többdokumentumos összefoglaláshoz', 'el': 'Σύστημα αποικίας μυρμηγκιών για περίληψη πολλαπλών εγγράφων', 'it': 'Sistema di colonia delle formiche per la sintesi di più documenti', 'kk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Ant kolonijos sistema daugiadokumentams apibendrinti', 'ml': 'Multi- രേഖയുടെ ചുരുക്കത്തിനുള്ള ആന്റ് കോണി സിസ്റ്റം', 'ms': 'Sistem Koloni Ant untuk Penapisan Dokumen Berbilang', 'mk': 'Name', 'mn': 'Мөн олон бичгийн нийлүүлэлтийн арван колони систем', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Sistema ta’ Kolonja ta’ Ant għas-Sommarju ta’ Multi-Dokumenti', 'pl': 'System kolonii mrówek do podsumowania wielu dokumentów', 'ro': 'Sistem de colonii furnici pentru rezumarea mai multor documente', 'sr': 'Name', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Isticmaalka midowga', 'sv': 'Myrkolonisystem för sammanfattning av flera dokument', 'ta': 'பல- ஆவணத்தின் சுருக்கம்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Koʻproq hujjat hisoboti uchun rang tizimi', 'vi': 'Hệ thống cấu tạo Kiến cho tổng hợp Tài liệu', 'bg': 'Система за обобщаване на множество документи', 'da': 'Myrekolonisystem til opsummering af flere dokumenter', 'nl': 'Mierenkoloniesysteem voor samenvatting van meerdere documenten', 'hr': 'Name', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Sistem Koloni Ant untuk Penapisan Multi-Dokumen', 'ko': '다중 문서 요약에 사용되는 개미떼 시스템', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa Colony wa Ujumbe wa Dokumentari', 'de': 'Ameisenkolonie System zur Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Ant Colony System for Multi-Document Summarization', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'az': 'Multi-Document Toplaşdırması üçün Ant Colony Sistemi', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'বহু নথি সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের জন্য অ্যান্ট কলোনি সিস্টেম', 'tr': 'Çoklu Sened Toplaýyşy üçin Ant Koloni Sistemi', 'bs': 'Name', 'cs': 'Systém kolonie mravenců pro shrnutí více dokumentů', 'et': 'Sipelgakolooniasüsteem mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtmiseks', 'fi': 'MuurahaiskĂ¤ytĂ¶jĂ¤rjestelmĂ¤ usean asiakirjan yhteenvetoa varten', 'ca': "Sistema de colònia d'formigues per a resumir múltiples documents", 'sk': 'Sistem kolonij mravljev za povzetek več dokumentov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מערכת קולוניה הנמלים לסדרת מסמכים רבים', 'jv': 'Name', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་མང་བོའི་ལུས་མཛོད་རིས་ཀྱི་ཚོང་གྲངས་མ་ལག'}
{'en': 'This paper proposes an extractive multi-document summarization approach based on an ant colony system to optimize the information coverage of summary sentences. The implemented system was evaluated on both English and Arabic versions of the corpus of the Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot by using ROUGE metrics. The evaluation results are promising in comparison to those of the participating systems. Indeed, our system achieved the best scores based on several ROUGE metrics.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الورقة نهج تلخيص استخلاصي متعدد المستندات يعتمد على نظام مستعمرة النمل لتحسين تغطية المعلومات للجمل الموجزة. تم تقييم النظام المنفذ في النسختين الإنجليزية والعربية من مجموعة مواد مؤتمر تحليل النصوص 2011 MultiLing Pilot باستخدام مقاييس ROUGE. نتائج التقييم واعدة مقارنة بنتائج الأنظمة المشاركة. في الواقع ، حقق نظامنا أفضل الدرجات بناءً على العديد من مقاييس ROUGE.', 'fr': "Cet article propose une approche de synthèse extractive de plusieurs documents basée sur un système de colonies de fourmis afin d'optimiser la couverture d'information des phrases sommaires. Le système mis en œuvre a été évalué sur les versions anglaise et arabe du corpus de la Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot à l'aide des métriques ROUGE. Les résultats de l'évaluation sont prometteurs par rapport à ceux des systèmes participants. En effet, notre système a obtenu les meilleurs scores sur la base de plusieurs métriques ROUGE.", 'pt': 'Este artigo propõe uma abordagem extrativa de sumarização multidocumento baseada em um sistema de colônia de formigas para otimizar a cobertura de informações de frases resumidas. O sistema implementado foi avaliado nas versões em inglês e árabe do corpus da Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot usando as métricas ROUGE. Os resultados da avaliação são promissores em comparação com os dos sistemas participantes. De fato, nosso sistema alcançou as melhores pontuações com base em várias métricas do ROUGE.', 'es': 'Este artículo propone un enfoque de resumen extractivo de varios documentos basado en un sistema de colonia de hormigas para optimizar la cobertura de información de las oraciones sumarias. El sistema implementado se evaluó en las versiones en inglés y árabe del corpus del Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot mediante el uso de métricas ROUGE. Los resultados de la evaluación son prometedores en comparación con los de los sistemas participantes. De hecho, nuestro sistema obtuvo las mejores puntuaciones en función de varias métricas de ROUGE.', 'zh': '立一基于蚁群统之提取式多文档汇总之法,以优化摘要句息覆之。 用ROUGE指标,于2011年文本析会议MultiLing Pilot语料库英文及阿拉伯文版本上所行系统为评估。 比之参统,论终有望。 事实,我们的系统据几个ROUGE指标得最佳分数。', 'ja': '本稿では、アリコロニーシステムをベースに、要約文の情報カバレッジを最適化する抽出的マルチドキュメント要約アプローチを提案する。実装されたシステムは、ROUGE指標を使用して、Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilotのコーパスの英語版とアラビア語版の両方で評価されました。評価結果は、参加システムと比較して有望です。確かに、当社のシステムはいくつかのルージュ指標に基づいて最高のスコアを達成しました。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर सारांश वाक्यों की जानकारी कवरेज को अनुकूलित करने के लिए एक चींटी कॉलोनी सिस्टम के आधार पर एक निष्कर्षण बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करता है। कार्यान्वित प्रणाली का मूल्यांकन रूज मैट्रिक्स का उपयोग करके पाठ विश्लेषण सम्मेलन 2011 मल्टीलिंग पायलट के कॉर्पस के अंग्रेजी और अरबी दोनों संस्करणों पर किया गया था। मूल्यांकन परिणाम भाग लेने वाली प्रणालियों की तुलना में आशाजनक हैं। दरअसल, हमारे सिस्टम ने कई रूज मीट्रिक के आधार पर सबसे अच्छा स्कोर हासिल किया।', 'ru': 'В данной работе предлагается подход к подведению итогов по нескольким документам, основанный на системе муравьиных колоний, для оптимизации информационного охвата суммарных предложений. Внедренная система была оценена как на английском, так и на арабском языках в корпусе экспериментального проекта MultiLing 2011 конференции по текстовому анализу с использованием метрик ROUGE. Результаты оценки являются многообещающими по сравнению с результатами, полученными участвующими системами. Действительно, наша система достигла лучших результатов, основанных на нескольких метриках ROUGE.', 'ga': 'Molann an páipéar seo cur chuige achoimrithe ildhoiciméad eastóscach bunaithe ar chóras seanchoilíneachta chun clúdach faisnéise na n-abairtí achoimre a bharrfheabhsú. Rinneadh measúnú ar an gcóras a cuireadh i bhfeidhm ar leaganacha Béarla agus Araibis araon de chorpas Phíolótach MultiLing Chomhdháil Anailíse Téacs 2011 trí úsáid a bhaint as méadracht ROUGE. Tá torthaí na meastóireachta geallta i gcomparáid le torthaí na gcóras rannpháirteach. Go deimhin, bhain ár gcóras na scóir is fearr amach bunaithe ar roinnt méadracht ROUGE.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια εξορυκτική προσέγγιση συνοψίας πολλών εγγράφων βασισμένη σε ένα σύστημα αποικίας μυρμηγκιών για τη βελτιστοποίηση της κάλυψης πληροφοριών των συνοπτικών προτάσεων. Το εφαρμοζόμενο σύστημα αξιολογήθηκε τόσο στην αγγλική όσο και στην αραβική έκδοση του σώματος του Συνεδρίου Ανάλυσης Κειμένου 2011 Pilot χρησιμοποιώντας μετρήσεις ROUGE. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης είναι ελπιδοφόρα σε σύγκριση με εκείνα των συμμετεχόντων συστημάτων. Πράγματι, το σύστημά μας πέτυχε τις καλύτερες βαθμολογίες με βάση αρκετές μετρήσεις.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány hangyakolónia rendszeren alapuló extraktív többdokumentumos összefoglaló megközelítést javasol az összefoglaló mondatok információs lefedettségének optimalizálása érdekében. A megvalósított rendszert ROUGE mutatók segítségével értékeltük a 2011-es Szövegelemző Konferencia korpuszának angol és arab változatán. Az értékelés eredményei ígéretesek a részt vevő rendszerekhez képest. Rendszerünk több ROUGE mutató alapján érte el a legjobb pontszámot.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტის გამოსახულება მრავალე დოკუმენტის გამოსახულება, რომელიც მრავალური კოლონის სისტემის დაბაზეულია ინფორმაციის გამოსახულება. მომუშავებული სისტემის შესაბამისი ტექსტის ანალიზის კონფიგურაციის კორპუსს 2011 MultiLing Pilot-ის მომხმარებით ROUGE მეტრიკის გამოყენებით გაუმუშავებულია. შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი სისტემების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი. ნაქარა ჟთჟრვმა ეჲჟრигნალა ნაი-ეჲბპთრვ ოჲდჲრჲგთ ნა ნწკჲლკჲ ROUGE მვრპთკა.', 'it': 'Questo articolo propone un approccio di sintesi multi-documento estrattivo basato su un sistema di colonie di formiche per ottimizzare la copertura informativa delle frasi di sintesi. Il sistema implementato è stato valutato sia sulla versione inglese che araba del corpus della Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot utilizzando metriche ROUGE. I risultati della valutazione sono promettenti rispetto a quelli dei sistemi partecipanti. Infatti, il nostro sistema ha ottenuto i migliori punteggi sulla base di diverse metriche ROUGE.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз қосымша көп құжаттардың тұжырымдамасының мәліметтерінің тұжырымдамасын оптимизациялау үшін, тұжырымдамасының жүйесіне негізделген көп құжатты т Ескерту жүйесі 2011 жылы Мәтін анализ конференциясының корпусының ағылшын және араб нұсқаларында ROUGE метрикалықтарын қолданатын көпшілік пішімінде бағалады. Бағалау нәтижелері қатысушылардың салыстырылығында болады. Біздің жүйеміз бірнеше ROUGE метрикасына негізделген ең жақсы нәтижелерді жетті.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini mencadangkan pendekatan penghuraian berkumpul-dokumen ekstraktif berdasarkan sistem koloni semut untuk optimumkan penutupan maklumat kalimat ringkasan. The implemented system was evaluated on both English and Arabic versions of the corpus of the Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot by using ROUGE metrics.  The evaluation results are promising in comparison to those of the participating systems.  Sebenarnya, sistem kita mencapai skor terbaik berdasarkan beberapa metrik ROUGE.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ആന്\u200dറ് കോണിയുടെ സിസ്റ്റം അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഒരു അണ്ട് രേഖയുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാന്യമാക്ക പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം റൂജിജ് മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും അറബിയിലും പദാവലിയുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസി പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d പങ്കുചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നവരോട് തുല്യമാക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിലാസഫലങ്ങള്\u200d  ഞങ്ങളുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d കുറച്ച് റൂജ് മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഏറ്റവും നല്ല സ്കോര്\u200d എത്തി.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jipproponi approċċ ta’ sommarju estrattiv b’diversi dokumenti bbażat fuq sistema ta’ kolonji ta’ formoli biex tiġi ottimizzata l-kopertura ta’ informazzjoni tas-sentenzi sommarji. Is-sistema implimentata ġiet evalwata kemm fuq verżjonijiet Ingliżi kif ukoll Għarab tal-korpus tal-Konferenza tal-Analiżi tat-Test 2011 MultiLing Pilot bl-użu tal-metriċi ROUGE. Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni huma promettenti meta mqabbla ma’ dawk tas-sistemi parteċipanti. Tabilħaqq, is-sistema tagħna kisbet l-aħjar punteġġi bbażati fuq diversi metriċi ROUGE.', 'mk': 'Овој документ предложува екстрактивен пристап на мултидокументарна резултатација базиран на систем на колонија на мравки за оптимизација на информациското покривање на речениците. Имплементираниот систем беше проценет на англиските и арапските верзии на корпусот на Конференцијата за текстова анализа 2011 MultiLing Pilot со употреба на метрика ROUGE. Резултатите на проценката ветуваат во споредба со резултатите на учествувачките системи. Нашиот систем ги постигна најдобрите резултати базирани на неколку ROUGE метрики.', 'no': 'Denne papiret foreslår eit ekstraktivt fleire dokumentsammendrag basert på eit kontekstkolonningssystem for å optimalisera informasjonsomslag av samandrag. Den implementerte systemet ble evaluert på både engelsk og arabiske versjonar av korpusen av tekstanalyseringskonferansen 2011 MultiLing Pilot ved å bruka ROUGE-metrikar. Resultatene av evalueringa blir foreslått i sammenligning med dei deltakende systema. Verkeleg har systemet vårt oppnådd dei beste poeng basert på fleire ROUGE-metrikar.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас хэвлэгдэх хэвлэгүүдийн мэдээллийг сайжруулах боломжтой олон баримт хэвлэгдэх арга замыг сануулдаг. Дүрслэгдсэн систем нь ROUGE метрикийг ашиглан Англи болон Араб хэлбэрийн хувилбарууд 2011 оны Текст Шалингийн Конференцийн Корпус дээр дүгнэсэн. Үүний үнэлгээ нь оролцоогоор оролцогчдын системтэй харьцуулахад амлалтай. Үнэндээ бидний систем олон ROUGE метрийн үндсэн хамгийн сайн оноо гаргасан.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlomas ekstraktyvus daugiadokumentas apibendrinantis metodas, grindžiamas formų kolonijų sistema, siekiant optimizuoti santraukų informacijos aprėptį. Įgyvendinta sistema buvo įvertinta pagal 2011 m. daugialypio bandomojo teksto analizės konferencijos korpuso anglų ir arabų versijas naudojant ROUGE metrinius rodiklius. Vertinimo rezultatai yra perspektyvūs palyginti su dalyvaujančių sistemų rezultatais. Indeed, our system achieved the best scores based on several ROUGE metrics.', 'pl': 'W artykule zaproponowano ekstrakcyjne podejście do podsumowania wielu dokumentów oparte na systemie kolonii mrówek w celu optymalizacji zasięgu informacji w zdaniach podsumowujących. Wdrożony system został oceniony zarówno w wersji angielskiej, jak i arabskiej korpusu Konferencji Analizy Tekstu 2011 MultiLing Pilot z wykorzystaniem metryk ROUGE. Wyniki oceny są obiecujące w porównaniu z wynikami uczestniczących systemów. Rzeczywiście nasz system osiągnął najlepsze wyniki w oparciu o kilka wskaźników ROUGE.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže ekstraktivni pristup sažetke multidokumenta na temelju sistema mravih kolonija kako bi optimizirao informacije o sažetnim rečenicama. Implementirani sistem je procenio na engleskim i arapskim verzijama korpusa konferencije za analizu teksta 2011 MultiLing Pilot koristeći ROUGE metrike. Rezultati procjene obećavaju u usporedbi sa onima sudjelujućih sustava. Naš sistem je postigao najbolji rezultat na temelju nekoliko ROUGE metrika.', 'si': 'Name පරීක්ෂණ පද්ධතියේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ අරාබික් වර්ගයක් දෙන්නම් පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය 2011 MultiLing පද්ධතිය ROUGE මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් භ විශ්වාස ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ව ඇත්තටම, අපේ පද්ධතියේ හොඳම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ලැබුණා ROUGE මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වලින් අධාරිත විශේෂයෙන්.', 'so': 'Warqaddaas wuxuu soo jeedaa qalabka soo saarista qoraalka oo kala duduwan oo ku saleysan nidaamka midowga ah si uu ugu beddelo warbixinta macluumaadka ku qoran erayada summerka. Tirada la soo dejiyey waxaa lagu qiimeeyay labada warqadood oo afka Ingiriis iyo Carabi ah oo ku qoran qof ka mid ah shirka Matrix Analysis 2011 ee MultiLing Pilot using ROUGE metrics. Abaalkooda qiimeynta waxaa ballan ku ah in la barbardhigo kuwa ka qayb gala nidaamka. Sida xaqiiqada ah, nidaamkayagu wuxuu gaadhay qiimaha ugu wanaagsan ee lagu saleyn karo wadamo badan oo ROUGE ah.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats föreslår en extraktiv sammanfattning av flera dokument baserad på ett myrkolonisystem för att optimera informationstäckningen av sammanfattande meningar. Det implementerade systemet utvärderades på både engelska och arabiska versioner av korpusen från Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot med hjälp av ROUGE-mätvärden. Utvärderingsresultaten är lovande jämfört med resultaten från de deltagande systemen. Vårt system uppnådde de bästa poängen baserat på flera ROUGE-mått.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் சுருக்கமான வாக்கியங்களின் தகவல் தடைப்பை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு அடிப்படையிலான பல- ஆவணங்கள் சுருக்கும் செயல்பாட்டு ச The implemented system was evaluated on both English and Arabic versions of the text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot by using ROUGE metrics. The evaluation results are promising in comparison to those of the participating systems.  உண்மையில், எங்கள் அமைப்பு சிறந்த மதிப்பெண்கள் அடிப்படையில் செய்தது.', 'ur': 'This paper proposes an extractive multi-document summarization approach based on an ant colony system to optimize the information coverage of summary sentences. رووGE متریک کے استعمال کے ذریعے انگلیسی اور عربی نسخہ کے کارپوس کے مطابق مطابق سیسٹم کا ارزش کیا گیا تھا۔ انصاف کا نتیجہ مشارکت سیستموں کے مقابلہ میں وعدہ دیتا ہے. بیشک ہماری سیستم نے بہترین اسکور کو چند روجی متریک پر بنیاد کیا۔', 'ro': 'Această lucrare propune o abordare extractivă de sinteză multi-document bazată pe un sistem de colonii de furnici pentru a optimiza acoperirea informațională a propozițiilor de sinteză. Sistemul implementat a fost evaluat atât în limba engleză cât și în limba arabă a corpului Conferinței de Analiză Text 2011 MultiLing Pilot prin utilizarea măsurătorilor ROUGE. Rezultatele evaluării sunt promițătoare în comparație cu cele ale sistemelor participante. Într-adevăr, sistemul nostru a obținut cele mai bune scoruri bazate pe mai multe metrici ROUGE.', 'uz': "Name Bitta ishga tushirilgan tizim ROUGE metriklari yordamida ingliz va arab versiyasi 2011 Analysis konferansining koʻplariga ko'paydi. The evaluation results are promising in comparison to those of the participating systems.  Hullas, bizning tizimmiz bir necha ROUGE metriklarga eng yaxshi darajaga erishildi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này đề nghị một phương pháp tổng kết văn bản khai thác các văn bản khai thác khai thác các mẫu dựa trên một hệ thống kiến tạo để tối ưu hóa thông tin về các câu tóm tắt. Hệ thống được áp dụng được đánh giá qua cả phiên bản Anh và A Rập của tập đoàn kết Trình phân tích văn bản cho cuộc hội thảo 2011 MulLing Pilate bằng cách sử dụng âm lượng ROG. Kết quả đánh giá rất có triển vọng so với kết quả của hệ thống tham gia. Thật ra, hệ thống của chúng tôi đạt được điểm tốt nhất dựa trên một số lượng tử ROCE.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия се предлага екстрактивен подход за обобщаване на множество документи, базиран на система от мравки колонии, за да се оптимизира информационното покритие на обобщените изречения. Въведената система беше оценена както на английски, така и на арабски версии на корпуса на Конференцията за Текстов Анализ 2011 чрез използване на показатели. Резултатите от оценката са обещаващи в сравнение с тези на участващите системи. Всъщност нашата система постигна най-добрите резултати въз основа на няколко показатели.', 'nl': 'Deze paper stelt een extractieve multi-document samenvattingsbenadering voor gebaseerd op een mierenkoloniesysteem om de informatiedekking van samenvattingszinnen te optimaliseren. Het geïmplementeerde systeem werd geëvalueerd op zowel Engelse als Arabische versies van het corpus van de Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot met behulp van ROUGE metrics. De evaluatieresultaten zijn veelbelovend in vergelijking met die van de deelnemende systemen. Ons systeem behaalde inderdaad de beste scores op basis van verschillende ROUGE metrics.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predlaže ekstraktivan pristup sažetke multidokumenta na temelju sustava mravih kolonija kako bi optimizirao informacijski pokrivač sažetnih rečenica. Provedeni sustav je procijenjen na engleskim i arapskim verzijama korpusa konferencije za analizu teksta 2011 MultiLing Pilot koristeći ROUGE metrike. Rezultati procjene obećavaju u usporedbi s onima sudjelujućih sustava. Naš sustav je postigao najbolji rezultat na temelju nekoliko ROUGE metrika.', 'da': 'Denne artikel foreslår en ekstraktiv multi-dokument opsummering tilgang baseret på et myrekolonisystem for at optimere informationsdækningen af summariske sætninger. Det implementerede system blev evalueret på både engelske og arabiske versioner af korpuset af tekstanalysekonferencen 2011 MultiLing Pilot ved hjælp af ROUGE metrics. Evalueringsresultaterne er lovende i forhold til de deltagende systemers resultater. Faktisk opnåede vores system de bedste resultater baseret på flere ROUGE metrics.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit schlägt einen extraktiven Mehrdokumentzusammenfassungsansatz vor, der auf einem Ameisenkoloniensystem basiert, um die Informationsabdeckung von zusammenfassenden Sätzen zu optimieren. Das implementierte System wurde sowohl auf englischer als auch auf arabischer Version des Korpuss der Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot mittels ROUGE Metriken evaluiert. Die Evaluationsergebnisse sind vielversprechend im Vergleich zu denen der teilnehmenden Systeme. Tatsächlich erzielte unser System die besten Ergebnisse basierend auf mehreren ROUGE-Metriken.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mengusulkan pendekatan ekstraktif multi-dokumen pengringkasan berdasarkan sistem koloni semut untuk optimisasi penutupan informasi kalimat ringkasan. Sistem implementasi telah diuji pada versi Bahasa Inggris dan Arab dari korpus Konferensi Analisi Teks 2011 MultiLing Pilot dengan menggunakan metrik ROUGE. Hasil evaluasi berjanji dibandingkan dengan hasil sistem yang berpartisipasi. Sebenarnya, sistem kita mencapai skor terbaik berdasarkan beberapa metrik ROUGE.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linapendekeza mbinu za muhtasari wa nyaraka mbalimbali zinazotumiwa na mfumo wa ukoloni wa chumvi ili kuboresha habari za hukumu za muhtasari. Mfumo uliotekelezwa ulitathmini katika toleo la Kiingereza na Kiarabu la kikao cha Mkutano wa Uchambuzi wa Mataifa 2011 kwa kutumia mbinu za ROUGE. Matokeo ya uchunguzi ni kuahidini kulinganisha na wale wa mifumo ya ushiriki. Kwa hakika, mfumo wetu ulipata vipimo vizuri zaidi kwa kutumia mbinu kadhaa za UKIMWI.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که روش جمع کردن سند\u200cهای زیادی استثناء بر اساس سیستم کلونی مورچه\u200cای برای بهترین کردن پوشش اطلاعاتی از جمله\u200cهای جمع باشد. سیستم عملکرد در برنامه\u200cهای انگلیسی و عربی از کنفرانس تحلیل متن ۲۰۱۱ با استفاده از متریک ROUGE ارزیابی شد. نتایج ارزیابی در مقایسه با سیستم\u200cهای مشترک قول می\u200cدهند. در حقیقت، سیستم ما بهترین امتیاز را بر اساس چند متریک ROUGE به دست آورد.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument propozon një qasje të përmbledhjes së shumëdokumenteve ekstraktive bazuar në një sistem koloni mihrash për të optimizuar mbulimin e informacionit të fjalëve të përmbledhur. Sistemi i zbatuar u vlerësua në versionet angleze dhe arabe të korpusit të Konferencës së Analizës Tekste 2011 MultiLing Pilot duke përdorur metrikat ROUGE. The evaluation results are promising in comparison to those of the participating systems.  Në të vërtetë, sistemi ynë arriti rezultatet më të mira bazuar në disa metrika ROUGE.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የአሁኑ ኮኖኒ ስርዓት የኩነቶች መረጃ ክፍተቶችን ለማሻሻል በተደረገ የብዙ የሰነድ አቀማሚ ጉዳይ ያሳያል፡፡ The implemented system was evaluated on both English and Arabic versions of the corpus of the Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot by using ROUGE metrics.  የውጤቱ ውጤቶች ከሲስተም ከሚያጋጁት ጋር ተስፋ ያደርጋል፡፡ በእውነት፣ ስርዓታችን ብዙዎች የሮጂ ሜትሪክ የተመሳሳይ ደረጃዎች አግኝቷል፡፡', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel voorstel 'n ekstraktiewe multi- dokument opsomming toegang gebaseer op 'n ant kolonie stelsel om die inligting omdekking van opsomming setinge te optimaliseer. Die implementeerde stelsel is geevalueer op Engels en Araabse weergawe van die korpus van die Teks Analyse Konferensie 2011 MultiLing Pilot deur ROUGE metries te gebruik. Die evalueringsresultate is belowe in vergelyking met die wat van die deelnadende stelsels is. Waarlik, ons stelsel het die beste telling gebaseer op verskeie ROUGE metries bereik.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz gaty bir kolon sistemasyna daýan ýar bir gaty multi-sened jemgyýetleme approach teklip edýär Ewezam sistemi ROUGE metriklerini ulanarak Iňlisçe we Arapça wersiýasynda çykylýar. Ýalňyşlyk netijeleri iştirakçi sistemalaryň bilen karşılaşykda söz berýärler. Çyndanam sistemamyz birnäçe ROUGE metriklerine daýanýan iň gowy sanlary ýetdi.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթին առաջարկում է բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման մոտեցում, որը հիմնված է մրջյունների գաղութակի համակարգի վրա, որպեսզի օպտիմացվի համառոտագրված նախադասությունների տեղեկատվական ծածկու Հիմնավորված համակարգը գնահատվել է նաև անգլերենի և արաբական տարբերակների վրա 2011 թվականի տեքստի վերլուծության կոնֆերանսի բազմալեզու փորձարկման միջոցով օգտագործելով ROUGe մետրիկները: Ագնահատման արդյունքները խոստանում են, համեմատելով մասնակցող համակարգերի արդյունքները: Իրականում, մեր համակարգը հասավ լավագույն գնահատականներին, հիմնված մի քանի ROUGe մետրերի վրա:', 'ko': '개미떼 시스템을 바탕으로 하는 추출식 다중 문서 요약 방법을 제시하여 요약 문장의 정보 커버율을 최적화시켰다.2011년 텍스트 분석 회의 다국어 시험 자료 라이브러리의 영문과 아랍어 버전에서 ROUGE 도량을 사용하여 실현된 시스템을 평가했다.시스템에 참여한 평가 결과에 비해 평가 결과는 희망적이다.사실 몇 가지 연지 지표를 바탕으로 우리 시스템이 가장 좋은 성적을 거두었다.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি একটি অ্যান্ট কোলোনি সংক্রান্ত ব্যবস্থার ভিত্তিতে বহুল নথি সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের প্রস্তাব করে সংক্ষিপ্ বাস্তবিক সিস্টেম রোউজের মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করে টেক্সট বিশ্লেষণ কনফারেন্স ২০১১ সালের মাল্টিলিঙ্গ পাইলটের কোর্পাসের কোর্পা এই মূল্যের ফলাফল অংশগ্রহণকারীদের তুলনায় প্রতিশ্রুতি দেয়া হচ্ছে। সত্যিই, আমাদের সিস্টেম বেশ কয়েকটি রুজের মেট্রিক ভিত্তিক স্কোর অর্জন করেছে।', 'az': 'Bu kağıt, qeyd sözlərinin məlumatını optimizləmək üçün qarışıq koloni sisteminə dayanan çoxlu dəstə təmizləmə approach təklif edir. İşləndirilmiş sistem ROUGE metriklərini istifadə edərək mətn Analizi Konferencisinin korpusu ilə İngilizce və Arapça versiyonlarında değerlendirildi. Qıymet sonuçları iştirak sistemlərinin qarşısında vəd edir. Əlbəttə, sistemimiz çoxlu ROUGE metriklərinə dayanan ən yaxşı nöqtələri qəbul etdi.', 'ca': "Aquest paper proposa un enfocament extractiu de resum multidocumental basat en un sistema de colònies de formigues per optimitzar la cobertura d'informació de les frases resumes. El sistema implementat va ser avaluat en versions anglesa i àrab del corpus de la Conferència MultiLing Pilot de l'Anàlisi del Texte 2011 utilitzant les mètriques ROUGE. Els resultats de l'evaluació són prometedors en comparació amb els dels sistemes participants. Indeed, our system achieved the best scores based on several ROUGE metrics.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakutakse välja ekstraktiivse mitmekordse kokkuvõtliku lähenemisviisi, mis põhineb sipelgakolooniate süsteemil, et optimeerida kokkuvõtlike lausete infokatvust. Rakendatud süsteemi hinnati nii inglise kui araabia versioonide tekstianalüüsi konverentsi 2011 MultiLing Pilot korpuse ROUGE mõõdikute abil. Hindamistulemused on osalevate süsteemidega võrreldes paljulubavad. Tõepoolest saavutas meie süsteem parimad tulemused mitmete ROUGE mõõdikute põhjal.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predlaže ekstraktivan pristup sažetke multidokumenta na temelju sistema mravih kolonija kako bi optimizirao informacijski pokrivač sažetnih rečenica. Implementirani sistem je procjenjen na engleskim i arapskim verzijama korpusa konferencije za analizu teksta 2011 MultiLing Pilot koristeći ROUGE metrike. Rezultati procjene obećavaju u usporedbi s onima sudjelujućih sustava. Naš sistem je postigao najbolji rezultat na temelju nekoliko ROUGE metrika.', 'cs': 'Tento článek navrhuje extraktivní multidokumentový přístup založený na systému kolonie mravenců pro optimalizaci informačního pokrytí souhrnných vět. Implementovaný systém byl hodnocen na anglické i arabské verzi korpusu konference pro analýzu textů 2011 MultiLing Pilot pomocí metrik ROUGE. Výsledky hodnocení jsou slibné ve srovnání s výsledky zúčastněných systémů. Náš systém skutečně dosáhl nejlepších výsledků na základě několika metrik ROUGE.', 'fi': 'Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ artikkelissa ehdotetaan muurahaisyhdyskuntajﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､n perustuvaa ekstraktivista monidokumenttisia yhteenvetomenetelmiﾃ､ tiivistettyjen lauseiden tietokattavuuden optimoimiseksi. Toteutettua jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､ arvioitiin sekﾃ､ englannin- ettﾃ､ arabiankielisillﾃ､ versioilla Tekstianalyysikonferenssin 2011 MultiLing Pilotin korpusesta ROUGE-mittareilla. Arvioinnin tulokset ovat lupaavia verrattuna osallistuvien jﾃ､rjestelmien tuloksiin. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme saavutti parhaat pisteet useiden ROUGE-mittareiden perusteella.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Sistem sing ngewehke ditambah kanggo bersi Inggris lan arap iki sak bagasar tentang kanggo Ketok Anali Kongres 2011 MultiLing Pilot seng digawe LOUGE Metika. Wujaring Awak dhéwé, sistememuk dhéwé ngerasah sing luwih nêmêr, sing basa babagan nyelaran banget nggawe LOUGE Metric.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predlaga ekstraktivni pristop za povzetek več dokumentov, ki temelji na sistemu mravljavskih kolonij, da bi optimizirali informacijsko pokritost povzetih stavkov. Implementirani sistem je bil ocenjen na angleški in arabski različici korpusa Konference za analizo besedila 2011 MultiLing Pilot z uporabo ROUGE metrike. Rezultati ocenjevanja so obetavni v primerjavi z rezultati sodelujočih sistemov. Naš sistem je dejansko dosegel najboljše rezultate na podlagi več ROUGE meritev.', 'ha': "Wannan takardar da ke buƙata wata hanyor ƙararin multi-document, a kan kwamfyuta da tsarin launi na maɓalli dõmin ya yi amfani da rufaffiyar da takardar ƙarami. An evaluate shirin ayuka da aka aikata shi, a kan duk versiyar na Ingiriya da Larabci na kurs of the Match Analyis Conference 2011 The evaluation results are promising in comparison to those of the participating systems.  Haƙĩƙa, na'asarmu ya sami mafiya kyaun score a kan wasu metrici na RUGE.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציעה גישה מסמכים רבים מייצרת שמבוססת על מערכת מושבת נמלים כדי לאופטימיזם את כיסוי המידע של משפטי סכם. המערכת המופעלת הוערכה על גרסאות אנגלית וגם ערבית של הקורפוס של מסיבת הניתוח הטקסט 2011 MultiLing Pilot על ידי השימוש במטריקות ROUGE. תוצאות הערכה מבטיחות בהשוואה לאלה של המערכות המשתתפות. למעשה, המערכת שלנו השיגה את התוצאות הטובות ביותר בהתבסס על מספר מטריות ROUGE.', 'bo': 'ཤོག The implemented system was evaluated on both English and Arabic versions of the corpus of the Text Analysis Conference 2011 MultiLing Pilot by using ROUGE metrics. རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་འདིའི་གྲངས་འབོར་མ་ལག་ཚོ་དང་མཉམ་སྦྱར་བའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དང་མཐུན་ཁས་ལེན་ཏེ། Indeed, our system achieved the best scores based on several ROUGE metrics.'}
{'en': 'Multi-task dialog act and sentiment recognition on Mastodon', 'ar': 'عمل حوار متعدد المهام والتعرف على المشاعر على Mastodon', 'es': 'Acción de diálogo multitarea y reconocimiento de sentimientos en Mastodon', 'pt': 'Ato de diálogo multitarefa e reconhecimento de sentimento no Mastodon', 'fr': 'Dialogues multitâches et reconnaissance des sentiments sur Mastodon', 'zh': '乳齿象上多任务言行情识', 'ja': 'マストドンに関するマルチタスクダイアログアクトと感情認識', 'hi': 'मल्टी-टास्क संवाद अधिनियम और Mastodon पर भावना मान्यता', 'ru': 'Многозадачный диалоговый акт и распознавание настроений на Mastodon', 'ga': 'Gníomh dialóige ilthasc agus aithint meon ar Mastodon', 'el': 'Ενεργοποίηση διαλόγου πολλαπλών εργασιών και αναγνώριση συναισθημάτων στο Mastodon', 'it': 'Atto di dialogo multi-task e riconoscimento sentiment su Mastodon', 'kk': 'Мастодон арқылы көп тапсырмалар диалогы және сезімдерді анықтау', 'hu': 'Többfeladatos párbeszédablak és érzelmek felismerése a Mastodonon', 'ka': 'მრავალ დავალების დიალოგის აქტი და მასტოდონის სენტიმენტის განაცნობა', 'lt': 'Daugiaužduočių dialogo veiksmas ir jausmų pripažinimas Mastodon', 'mt': 'Att ta’ djalogu multikompiti u rikonoxximent tas-sentimenti dwar Mastodon', 'mn': 'Мастодон дээр олон ажлын диалог үйл ажиллагаа, сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлгох', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'മാസ്ടോണില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ജോലിയുടെ ഡയലോഗ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതും', 'ms': 'Tindakan dialog-tugas berbilang dan pengenalan perasaan pada Mastodon', 'ro': 'Actul de dialog multi-sarcini și recunoașterea sentimentelor pe Mastodon', 'no': 'Dialogvindauget for fleire oppgåver og følelseskjenning på Mastodon', 'sr': 'Višezadatačni dijalog i priznanje sentimenta na Mastodonu', 'si': 'ගොඩක් වැඩක් සංවාදය සහ මස්ටෝඩෝන්ගේ සංවාදය අඳුරන්න', 'pl': 'Wielozadaniowe okno dialogowe i rozpoznawanie sentymentów na Mastodonie', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka diyaarinta shaqada iyo aqoonsiga daryeelka ee Mastodon', 'sv': 'Dialogakt med flera uppgifter och sentimentigenkänning på Mastodon', 'ur': 'مٹوڈون پر بہت سی ٹاکس ڈالیلوگ عمل اور احساس شناخت', 'ta': 'மாஸ்டோனில் பல- பணி உரையாடல் செயல் மற்றும் உணர்வு புரியும்', 'uz': 'Multi-task dialog act and sentiment recognition on Mastodon', 'vi': 'Mã số đa tác vụ và nhận diện cảm xúc về Mastododera', 'da': 'Flere opgaver dialog handling og sentimentgenkendelse på Mastodon', 'bg': 'Многозадачи диалогов акт и разпознаване на чувства на Mastodon', 'hr': 'Višezadatačni dijalog djelovanja i prepoznavanje osjećaja na Mastodonu', 'nl': 'Multi-task dialoog act en sentiment herkenning op Mastodon', 'de': 'Multi-Task Dialog Act und Sentiment Erkennung auf Mastodon', 'id': 'Akt dialog berbilang tugas dan pengakuan perasaan pada Mastodon', 'ko': '유치상 의 다중 임무 대화 행위 와 정서 식별', 'fa': 'فعالیت محاورۀ چندین کار و شناسایی احساسات در ماستودون', 'sw': 'Kitendo cha mazungumzo mengi na kutambua hisia kwenye Mastodon', 'af': 'Multi-task dialog act en sentiment herken op Mastodon', 'tr': "Çoklu-täblik dialogi Mastodon'da duýgular tanaýmasy", 'sq': 'Akt dialog me shumë detyra dhe njohje e ndjenjave në Mastodon', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'hy': 'Multi-task dialog act and sentiment recognition on Mastodon', 'az': 'Mastodon haqqında çoxlu iş dialog ı və duyguları tanıması', 'bn': 'ম্যাস্টডনে বহু কাজের ডায়ালগের কাজ এবং আবেগ স্বীকার', 'bs': 'Višezadatačni dijalog i priznanje osjećaja na Mastodonu', 'ca': 'Acte de diàleg multitasca i reconeixement de sentiments sobre Mastodon', 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání citů a dialogového dialogu pro více úkolů na Mastodonu', 'et': 'Mitme ülesande dialoogi toimingu ja tunnete äratundmine Mastodonis', 'fi': 'Multi-task dialog actin ja tunteentunnistus Mastodon', 'jv': 'Multi-task dialog', 'ha': 'Suna ganin zauren akwatin aiki mai yawa', 'he': 'פעולת דיאלוג במשימות רבות והזיהוי רגשות על מסטודון', 'sk': 'Večopravilno pogovorno dejanje in prepoznavanje čustev na Mastodonu', 'bo': 'Mastodon ཐོག་ཏུ་སྣ་མང་བོར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཌའི་ལོག་བློ་གཏོང་དང་སྟོན་རུང་ངོས་འཛིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Because of license restrictions, it often becomes impossible to strictly reproduce most research results on Twitter data already a few months after the creation of the corpus. This situation worsened gradually as time passes and tweets become inaccessible. This is a critical issue for reproducible and accountable research on social media. We partly solve this challenge by annotating a new Twitter-like corpus from an alternative large social medium with licenses that are compatible with reproducible experiments : Mastodon. We manually annotate both dialogues and sentiments on this corpus, and train a multi-task hierarchical recurrent network on joint sentiment and dialog act recognition. We experimentally demonstrate that transfer learning may be efficiently achieved between both tasks, and further analyze some specific correlations between sentiments and dialogues on social media. Both the annotated corpus and deep network are released with an open-source license.', 'fr': "En raison des restrictions de licence, il devient souvent impossible de reproduire strictement la plupart des résultats de recherche sur les données Twitter quelques mois après la création du corpus. Cette situation s'est progressivement aggravée à mesure que le temps passe et que les tweets deviennent inaccessibles. Il s'agit d'une question cruciale pour la recherche reproductible et responsable sur les réseaux sociaux. Nous résolvons en partie ce défi en annotant un nouveau corpus de type Twitter à partir d'un grand média social alternatif avec des licences compatibles avec des expériences reproductibles\xa0: Mastodon. Nous annotons manuellement les dialogues et les sentiments sur ce corpus, et formons un réseau récurrent hiérarchique multitâche sur la reconnaissance des sentiments communs et des actes de dialogue. Nous démontrons expérimentalement que l'apprentissage par transfert peut être réalisé efficacement entre les deux tâches, et analysons plus en détail certaines corrélations spécifiques entre les sentiments et les dialogues sur les réseaux sociaux. Le corpus annoté et le réseau profond sont publiés avec une licence open source.", 'es': 'Debido a las restricciones de licencia, a menudo se hace imposible reproducir estrictamente la mayoría de los resultados de la investigación en los datos de Twitter ya unos meses después de la creación del corpus. Esta situación empeoró gradualmente con el paso del tiempo y los tuits se volvieron inaccesibles. Este es un tema fundamental para la investigación reproducible y responsable en las redes sociales. Resolvemos parcialmente este desafío anotando un nuevo corpus similar a Twitter de una gran red social alternativa con licencias que son compatibles con experimentos reproducibles: Mastodon. Anotamos manualmente tanto los diálogos como los sentimientos en este corpus, y entrenamos una red jerárquica recurrente multitarea en el reconocimiento conjunto de sentimientos y actos de diálogo. Demostramos experimentalmente que el aprendizaje por transferencia se puede lograr de manera eficiente entre ambas tareas y analizamos con más detalle algunas correlaciones específicas entre los sentimientos y los diálogos en las redes sociales. Tanto el corpus anotado como la red profunda se publican con una licencia de código abierto.', 'ar': 'بسبب قيود الترخيص ، غالبًا ما يصبح من المستحيل إعادة إنتاج معظم نتائج البحث بدقة على بيانات Twitter بالفعل بعد بضعة أشهر من إنشاء المجموعة. ساء هذا الوضع تدريجياً مع مرور الوقت وأصبح الوصول إلى التغريدات غير ممكن. هذه قضية حاسمة للبحث القابل للتكرار والمساءلة على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. نحل هذا التحدي جزئيًا عن طريق إضافة تعليقات توضيحية إلى مجموعة جديدة شبيهة بتويتر من وسيط اجتماعي كبير بديل بتراخيص متوافقة مع التجارب القابلة للتكرار: Mastodon. نقوم يدويًا بتعليق كل من الحوارات والمشاعر في هذه المجموعة ، وندرب شبكة متكررة هرمية متعددة المهام على التعرف على المشاعر المشتركة والتعرف على عمل الحوار. لقد أثبتنا بشكل تجريبي أن التعلم الانتقالي يمكن تحقيقه بكفاءة بين كلتا المهمتين ، ونحلل أيضًا بعض الارتباطات المحددة بين المشاعر والحوارات على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. يتم إصدار كل من المجموعة المشروحة والشبكة العميقة بترخيص مفتوح المصدر.', 'pt': 'Por causa das restrições de licença, muitas vezes torna-se impossível reproduzir estritamente a maioria dos resultados da pesquisa nos dados do Twitter já alguns meses após a criação do corpus. Essa situação piorou gradualmente com o passar do tempo e os tweets se tornaram inacessíveis. Esta é uma questão crítica para a pesquisa reproduzível e responsável nas mídias sociais. Resolvemos parcialmente esse desafio anotando um novo corpus semelhante ao Twitter de um grande meio social alternativo com licenças compatíveis com experimentos reproduzíveis: Mastodon. Anotamos manualmente os diálogos e os sentimentos neste corpus e treinamos uma rede recorrente hierárquica multitarefa no reconhecimento de sentimentos conjuntos e atos de diálogo. Demonstramos experimentalmente que o aprendizado de transferência pode ser alcançado de forma eficiente entre as duas tarefas e analisamos ainda algumas correlações específicas entre sentimentos e diálogos nas mídias sociais. Tanto o corpus anotado quanto a rede profunda são liberados com uma licença de código aberto.', 'zh': '以许可证限,创语料库数月,常不能于Twitter数严复制多所研究。 随时流转,渐恶推文无法访问。 于社交媒体之可复与任者,一关键问题也。 注自大社交媒体类Twitter新语料库来分解之,语料库有重复实验兼容许可证:Mastodon。 吾手动注此语料库上之对情,而练其合情与言行之多任务分层循环网络。 实验以验之,迁学可以两效,而益论社交媒体情对之特定相关性。 带注语料库深度网络皆用开源许可证发也。', 'hi': 'लाइसेंस प्रतिबंधों के कारण, कॉर्पस के निर्माण के कुछ महीनों बाद पहले से ही ट्विटर डेटा पर अधिकांश शोध परिणामों को सख्ती से पुन: पेश करना अक्सर असंभव हो जाता है। यह स्थिति धीरे-धीरे खराब हो गई क्योंकि समय बीतता है और ट्वीट्स दुर्गम हो जाते हैं। यह सोशल मीडिया पर पुनरुत्पादक और जवाबदेह अनुसंधान के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण मुद्दा है। हम आंशिक रूप से लाइसेंस के साथ एक वैकल्पिक बड़े सामाजिक माध्यम से एक नए ट्विटर-जैसे कॉर्पस को एनोटेट करके इस चुनौती को हल करते हैं जो पुनरुत्पादक प्रयोगों के साथ संगत हैं: मास्टोडन। हम मैन्युअल रूप से इस कॉर्पस पर संवादों और भावनाओं दोनों को एनोटेट करते हैं, और संयुक्त भावना और संवाद अधिनियम मान्यता पर एक बहु-कार्य पदानुक्रमित आवर्तक नेटवर्क को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। हम प्रयोगात्मक रूप से प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि स्थानांतरण सीखने को दोनों कार्यों के बीच कुशलतापूर्वक प्राप्त किया जा सकता है, और आगे सोशल मीडिया पर भावनाओं और संवादों के बीच कुछ विशिष्ट सहसंबंधों का विश्लेषण किया जा सकता है। एनोटेट किए गए कॉर्पस और डीप नेटवर्क दोनों को ओपन-सोर्स लाइसेंस के साथ जारी किया जाता है।', 'ja': 'ライセンスの制限のため、コーパスの作成から数ヶ月後にはすでにTwitterのデータでほとんどの研究結果を厳密に再現することができなくなることがよくあります。時間が経過し、ツイートがアクセスできなくなっていく中で、この状況は徐々に悪化していった。これは、ソーシャルメディア上で再現可能で説明責任のある研究にとって重要な問題です。私たちは、再現可能な実験と互換性のあるライセンスを備えた代替の大規模なソーシャルメディアから新しいTwitterのようなコーパスに注釈を付けることによって、この課題を部分的に解決します。このコーパスでは、対話と感情の両方に手動で注釈を付け、共同感情と対話行為認識に関するマルチタスク階層のリカレントネットワークをトレーニングします。両方のタスクの間で効率的に転移学習が達成される可能性があることを実験的に実証し、ソーシャルメディア上の感情と対話の間のいくつかの特定の相関関係をさらに分析します。注釈付きコーパスとDEEPネットワークの両方がオープンソースのライセンスでリリースされます。', 'ru': 'Из-за лицензионных ограничений часто становится невозможным строгое воспроизведение большинства результатов исследований в данных Twitter уже через несколько месяцев после создания корпуса. Эта ситуация постепенно ухудшалась по мере того, как время шло и твиты становились недоступными. Это критически важный вопрос для воспроизводимых и подотчетных исследований в социальных сетях. Мы частично решаем эту проблему, аннотируя новый Twitter-подобный корпус из альтернативного крупного социального носителя с лицензиями, которые совместимы с воспроизводимыми экспериментами: Mastodon. Мы вручную аннотируем диалоги и настроения на этом корпусе и обучаем многозадачную иерархическую рекуррентную сеть распознаванию совместных настроений и диалоговых актов. Мы экспериментально демонстрируем, что трансферное обучение может быть эффективно достигнуто между обеими задачами, и далее анализируем некоторые конкретные корреляции между настроениями и диалогами в социальных сетях. Как аннотированный корпус, так и глубокая сеть выпускаются с лицензией с открытым исходным кодом.', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar shrianta ceadúnais, is minic a éiríonn sé dodhéanta an chuid is mó de thorthaí taighde ar shonraí Twitter a atáirgeadh go docht cúpla mí tar éis cruthú an chorpais cheana féin. Chuaigh an scéal in olcas de réir a chéile de réir mar a chuaigh an t-am thart agus de réir mar a éiríonn tweets dorochtana. Is ceist ríthábhachtach í seo maidir le taighde in-atáirgthe agus cuntasach ar na meáin shóisialta. Réitímid an dúshlán seo i bpáirt trí chorpas nua cosúil le Twitter a anótáil ó mheán sóisialta mór eile le ceadúnais atá comhoiriúnach le turgnaimh in-atáirgthe: Mastodon. Déanaimid anótáil de láimh ar idirphlé agus ar dhearcthaí ar an gcorpas seo, agus cuirimid oiliúint ar líonra athfhillteach ordlathach il-tasc maidir le meon comhpháirteach agus aithint gnímh dialóige. Léirímid go turgnamhach gur féidir foghlaim aistrithe a bhaint amach go héifeachtach idir an dá thasc, agus déanaimid tuilleadh anailíse ar roinnt comhghaolta sonracha idir mothúcháin agus idirphlé ar na meáin shóisialta. Scaoiltear an corpas anótáilte agus an líonra domhain le ceadúnas foinse oscailte.', 'ka': 'ლიცენსის დასაწყვებისთვის, ხშირად შეუძლებელია გავამუშაოთ უფრო მეტი შესწავლობის შედეგი Twitter მონაცემების მონაცემების შემდეგ რამდენიმე თვისგან კოპ ეს სიტუაცია სწრაფად გახდება, როდესაც დრო გადასრულებულია და tweets გახდება შესაძლებელია. ეს კრიტიკური პრობლემენტია საზოგადომი მედიაში გამოყენებელი და დასაწყენებელი პასუხისთვის. ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ ეს გამოცდილებას, რომელიც ახალი Twitter-ის კოპპუსის შესახებ ალტენტრუმენტური დიდი სოციალური მედიდან, რომელიც ლიცენსიები, რომლებიც შემდგომარებული გამოცდილებელი ჩვენ ხელსახურად ამ კორპუსზე დიალოგიები და სენტიმენტები ამბობით და მრავალური საქაღალური რეკურენტური ქსელის გაგრძნობით ერთადერთი სენტიმენტიმენტი და დიალოგის განაცნობაზე ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტიურად გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ტრანსპერიმენტის სწავლება შეიძლება ეფექტიურად იყოს ორივე საქმედების შორის და დამატებით განსაზღვრებული კოლექციები სოცი ეგამარა ანჲრთპანთრვ კჲპოსჟ თ ეყლბჲკთრვ ჟვრკაპთ ჟვ ჲჟრაგწრ ჟ ლთჱვნუთწ ჲრგჲპვნ თჱრჲპ.', 'el': 'Λόγω των περιορισμών της άδειας χρήσης, συχνά καθίσταται αδύνατο να αναπαραχθούν αυστηρά τα περισσότερα αποτελέσματα έρευνας σε δεδομένα ήδη λίγους μήνες μετά τη δημιουργία του σώματος. Η κατάσταση αυτή επιδεινώθηκε σταδιακά καθώς περνάει ο χρόνος και τα tweets γίνονται απρόσιτα. Αυτό είναι ένα κρίσιμο ζήτημα για την αναπαραγωγική και υπεύθυνη έρευνα στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Επιλύουμε εν μέρει αυτή την πρόκληση σχολιάζοντας ένα νέο σώμα που μοιάζει με το Twitter από ένα εναλλακτικό μεγάλο κοινωνικό μέσο με άδειες που είναι συμβατές με αναπαραγώγιμα πειράματα: Mastodon. Σημειώνουμε χειροκίνητα τόσο τους διαλόγους όσο και τα συναισθήματα σε αυτό το σώμα, και εκπαιδεύουμε ένα ιεραρχικό επαναλαμβανόμενο δίκτυο πολλαπλών εργασιών για την αναγνώριση κοινών συναισθημάτων και πράξεων διαλόγου. Επιδεικνύουμε πειραματικά ότι η μάθηση μεταφοράς μπορεί να επιτευχθεί αποτελεσματικά μεταξύ των δύο εργασιών και αναλύουμε περαιτέρω ορισμένες συγκεκριμένες συσχετίσεις μεταξύ συναισθημάτων και διαλόγων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Τόσο το σχολιασμένο σώμα όσο και το βαθύ δίκτυο κυκλοφορούν με άδεια ανοικτού κώδικα.', 'hu': 'A licenc korlátozásai miatt gyakran lehetetlenné válik a legtöbb kutatási eredmény szigorú reprodukálása a Twitter adatokon már néhány hónappal a korpusz létrehozása után. Ez a helyzet fokozatosan romlott, ahogy múlt az idő és a tweetek elérhetetlenné váltak. Ez kritikus kérdés a közösségi média reprodukálható és elszámoltatható kutatásához. Ezt a kihívást részben azzal oldjuk meg, hogy egy új Twitter-szerű korpuszt jegyzetelünk egy alternatív nagy közösségi médiumból, amely kompatibilis a reprodukálható kísérletekkel: Mastodon. Ezen a korpuszon manuálisan jegyzetelünk párbeszédeket és érzelmeket, és egy többfeladatos hierarchikus visszatérő hálózatot képezünk a közös érzelmek és párbeszédaktusok felismerésére. Kísérleti módon bizonyítjuk, hogy a transzfertanulás mindkét feladat között hatékonyan megvalósítható, továbbá elemzünk néhány konkrét összefüggést a közösségi médiában zajló érzelmek és párbeszédek között. Mind a jegyzetelt korpusz, mind a mély hálózat nyílt forráskódú licenccel kerül kiadásra.', 'it': 'A causa delle restrizioni di licenza, spesso diventa impossibile riprodurre rigorosamente la maggior parte dei risultati della ricerca sui dati di Twitter già pochi mesi dopo la creazione del corpus. Questa situazione è peggiorata gradualmente con il passare del tempo e i tweet diventano inaccessibili. Si tratta di una questione critica per la ricerca riproducibile e responsabile sui social media. In parte risolviamo questa sfida annotando un nuovo corpus simile a Twitter da un grande social media alternativo con licenze compatibili con esperimenti riproducibili: Mastodon. Annotamo manualmente sia i dialoghi che i sentimenti su questo corpus e addestriamo una rete ricorrente gerarchica multi-task sul riconoscimento congiunto di sentimenti e atti di dialogo. Dimostriamo sperimentalmente che il transfer learning può essere realizzato in modo efficiente tra entrambi i compiti e analizziamo ulteriormente alcune correlazioni specifiche tra sentimenti e dialoghi sui social media. Sia il corpus annotato che la rete profonda sono rilasciati con una licenza open source.', 'lt': 'Dėl licencijų apribojimų dažnai tampa neįmanoma griežtai atkurti daugumos Twitter duomenų mokslinių tyrimų rezultatų jau kelis mėnesius nuo korpuso sukūrimo. Ši padėtis laipsniškai pablogėjo praeinant laikui ir netinkamai skelbiant tweetus. Tai labai svarbus klausimas, susijęs su reprodukciniais ir atskaitingais socialinių žiniasklaidos moksliniais tyrimais. Iš dalies išspręsime šį iššūkį, užrašydami naują į Twitter panašų korpusą iš alternatyvios didelės socialinės terpės su licencijomis, suderinamomis su reprodukciniais eksperimentais: Mastodon. Mes rankiniu būdu anotuojame dialogus ir jausmus apie šį korpusą ir treniruojame įvairių užduočių hierarchinį nuolatinį tinklą dėl bendro jausmo ir dialogo akto pripažinimo. Eksperimentiškai įrodome, kad abiejų užduočių mokymasis perkeliamas veiksmingai ir toliau analizuojame tam tikras konkrečias sąsajas tarp jausmų ir dialogų socialinėje žiniasklaidoje. Užrašytas korpusas ir gilus tinklas išleidžiami su atviro kodo licencija.', 'kk': 'Лицензиясының шектеулерінің себебі, корпус құрылған бірнеше айдан кейін Twitter деректерінің көпшілігін зерттеу нәтижесін қайталау мүмкін болады. Бұл жағдай уақыт өткен және tweets қатынауға мүмкін емес болып тұрғанда көп жағдайды. Бұл социалдық медиақтардың қайта-қайта және жауап беретін зерттеулерінің маңызды мәселе. Біз бұл мәселеді жаңа Твиттер сияқты корпус жаңа үлкен әлеуметтік медиақтың альтернативті үлкен әлеуметтік медиақтың лицензияларынан қатынау үшін шешіміз: Мастодон. Бұл корпустың диалогтары мен сезімдерін қолмен жазып, бірнеше тапсырманың иерархиялық қайталану желін біріктіру және диалогты анықтау үшін оқыту. Біз тәжірибелерді көмектесу үйреніміз екі тапсырма арасындағы ең әсер ететін және социалдық медиақтардың көмектесу мен диалогтарының арасындағы кейбір нақты қатынастарын анали Ашық көзінің лицензиясы бар корпус және түсіндірілген желі екеуі де ашылған.', 'mk': 'Поради ограничувањата на лиценцата, честопати станува невозможно стриктно да се репродуктираат повеќето истражувачки резултати на Твитер податоци веќе неколку месеци по создавањето на корпусот. Оваа ситуација се влоши постепено додека поминува времето и твитовите стануваат непристапни. Ова е критично прашање за репродуктибилно и одговорно истражување на социјалните медиуми. Делумно го решаваме овој предизвик со анотирање на нов Твитер-сличен корпус од алтернативен голем социјален медиум со лиценци кои се компатибилни со репродуктибилните експерименти: Мастодон. Рачно ги анотираме дијалозите и чувствата на овој корпус, и обучуваме хиерархична мрежа со повеќе задачи на заедничко препознавање на чувствата и дијалозите. Експериментално демонстрираме дека трансферентното учење може да биде ефикасно постигнато помеѓу двете задачи и понатаму анализираме некои специфични корелации помеѓу чувствата и дијалозите на социјалните медиуми. Онотираниот корпус и длабоката мрежа се ослободуваат со дозвола на отворен извор.', 'ms': 'Kerana pengendalian lesen, ia sering menjadi mustahil untuk mengembalikan kebanyakan hasil kajian pada data Twitter sudah beberapa bulan selepas ciptaan korpus. Situasi ini bertambah teruk semasa masa berlalu dan tweet menjadi tidak boleh dicapai. Ini isu penting untuk penelitian yang boleh dikembalikan dan bertanggungjawab tentang media sosial. Kami sebahagian-sebahagian memecahkan cabaran ini dengan menyatakan korpus baru seperti Twitter dari media sosial besar alternatif dengan lesen yang sesuai dengan eksperimen yang boleh dikembalikan: Mastodon. Kami secara manual anotar kedua-dua dialog dan perasaan pada korpus ini, dan melatih rangkaian berulang-tugas hierarkis pada perasaan kongsi dan pengenalan tindakan dialog. Kami secara eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pembelajaran pemindahan mungkin mencapai secara efektif antara kedua-dua tugas, dan menganalisis lebih lanjut beberapa korelasi khusus antara perasaan dan dialog di media sosial. Both the annotated corpus and deep network are released with an open-source license.', 'ml': 'ലൈസന്\u200dസിന്റെ നിയന്ത്രണങ്ങള്\u200d കാരണം, കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് സൃഷ്ടിച്ചതിനു ശേഷം കുറച്ചു മാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പ് ടൂട്ടറിയില്\u200d പലതും പരിശ സമയം കടന്നുപോകുമ്പോള്\u200d ഈ സാഹചര്യം പതുക്കെ കുഴപ്പമുണ്ടായിരുന്നു. ഇത് സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും പുനര്\u200dമ്മിപ്പിക്കാനും ഉത്തരവാദിത്വവുമായ പരിശോധനത്തിനും പ്ര പുതിയ ടൂട്ടറില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പുതിയ സാമൂഹ്യത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുതിയ വ്യാല്\u200dപ്ലാന്\u200dസ് പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളുടെ ലൈസന്\u200dസുമായ ഈ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിലെ സംസാരത്തെയും വികാരങ്ങളെയും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യമായി അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പല ജോലിയുടെ ഹിയെരാര്\u200dക് നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് രണ്ടു ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണ പ്രാപിക്കു കോര്\u200dപ്പസും ആഴമുള്ള ശൃംഖലങ്ങളും രണ്ടുപേരും തുറന്ന സോര്\u200dസ് ലൈസന്\u200dസുമായി വിട്ടുപോകുന്നു.', 'mt': 'Minħabba restrizzjonijiet fuq il-liċenzji, spiss isir impossibbli li l-biċċa l-kbira tar-riżultati tar-riċerka jiġu riprodotti strettament fuq dejta fuq Twitter diġà ftit xhur wara l-ħolqien tal-korpus. Din is-sitwazzjoni marret għall-agħar gradwalment hekk kif jgħaddi ż-żmien u t-tweets isiru inaċċessibbli. Din hija kwistjoni kritika għar-riċerka riproduċibbli u responsabbli dwar il-midja soċjali. Aħna parzjalment issolvew din l-isfida billi nnotaw korpus ġdid simili għal Twitter minn mezz soċjali kbir alternattiv b’liċenzji li huma kompatibbli ma’ esperimenti riproduċibbli: Mastodon. Aħna nnutaw manwalment kemm id-djalogi kif ukoll is-sentimenti dwar dan il-korpus, u nħarrġu netwerk ġerarkiku rikorrenti b’ħafna kompiti dwar ir-rikonoxximent ta’ l-att ta’ sentiment konġunt u djalogu. Jiġu ppruvati b’mod sperimentali li t-tagħlim tat-trasferiment jista’ jinkiseb b’mod effiċjenti bejn iż-żewġ kompiti, u nianalizzaw aktar xi korrelazzjonijiet speċifiċi bejn is-sentimenti u d-djalogi dwar il-midja soċjali. Kemm il-korpus annotat kif ukoll in-netwerk fond jiġu rilaxxati b’liċenzja ta’ sors miftuħ.', 'pl': 'Ze względu na ograniczenia licencyjne często niemożliwe jest ścisłe odtworzenie większości wyników badań na danych Twittera już kilka miesięcy po utworzeniu korpusu. Sytuacja ta pogarszała się stopniowo wraz z upływem czasu, a tweety stają się niedostępne. Jest to kwestia kluczowa dla powtarzalnych i odpowiedzialnych badań w mediach społecznościowych. Częściowo rozwiązujemy to wyzwanie poprzez adnotację nowego korpusu podobnego do Twittera z alternatywnego dużego medium społecznościowego z licencjami kompatybilnymi z powtarzalnymi eksperymentami: Mastodon. Ręcznie anomentujemy zarówno dialogi, jak i sentymenty na tym korpusie i szkolimy wielozadaniową hierarchiczną sieć powtarzającą się w zakresie wspólnego rozpoznawania sentymentów i aktów dialogowych. Eksperymentalnie pokazujemy, że transfer uczenia się może być skutecznie osiągnięty między obydwoma zadaniami, a dalej analizujemy pewne konkretne korelacje między sentymentami a dialogiem w mediach społecznościowych. Zarówno komentowany korpus, jak i głęboka sieć są wydane z licencją open-source.', 'mn': 'Лицензийн хязгаарлалтын тулд Твиттерийн мэдээллийн ихэнх судалгааны үр дүнг корпус үүсгэхээс хэдэн сарын дараа нэмэгдүүлэх боломжгүй болдог. Энэ нөхцөл нь цаг хугацаа өнгөрөхөд, tweets хүрэхгүй болж хурдан муу болсон. Энэ бол нийгмийн мэдээлэл дээр үржих болон хариуцлагатай судалгааны чухал асуудал юм. Бид энэ сорилтыг нэг хэсэгт шинэ Твиттертэй адилхан корпус шинэ нийгмийн дэлгэцээс шинэ боловсруулан шийдвэрлэх боломжтой боломжтой лицензийг үржигдэх туршилттай холбоотой. Бид энэ корпус дээрх диалог болон сэтгэл санаа хоёулаа хоёулаар анзаарч, олон ажил дахин дахин сэтгэл санаа, диалог хүлээн зөвшөөрөх сүлжээг сургадаг. Бид туршилтын үр дүнд шилжүүлэх суралцлага нь ажил хоёулаас ч үр дүнтэй байж болно гэдгийг харуулж, нийгмийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийн сэтгэл хөдлөл болон диалогуудын хоорондын зарим тодорхой харилцааныг Хоёр нь нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн лицензийг ашиглаж байна.', 'no': 'På grunn av lisenseavgrensingar, blir det ofte umulig å redusere dei fleste forskningsresultatene på Twitter-data allereie for nokre månader etter opprettinga av korpusen. Denne situasjonen vart verka gradvis når tidspunktet går og tweeter blir ikkje tilgjengeleg. Dette er ein kritisk problem for reproduktiv og responsabil forskning på sosiale medier. Vi løyser denne utfordringen delvis ved å merke på eit nytt korpus som ligg på Twitter frå ein alternativ stor sosialmedium med lisenser som er kompatibel med reproduktiv eksperimenter: Mastodon. Vi markerer begge dialogar og sentimentar på denne korpusen manuelt, og treng ein fleire oppgåver-hierarkisk gjentakelsesnettverk på kopla sentiment og dialogvindauge. Vi viser eksperimentelt at læring av overføring kan vera effektivt oppnådd mellom både oppgåver, og analyser meir spesifikke korrelasjonar mellom følelser og dialogar på sosiale media. Begge oppmerkte korpus og dyp nettverk vert sletta med ein open-source lisens.', 'ro': 'Din cauza restricțiilor de licență, adesea devine imposibilă reproducerea strictă a majorității rezultatelor cercetărilor pe datele Twitter deja la câteva luni de la crearea corpului. Această situație s-a înrăutățit treptat pe măsură ce timpul trece și tweeturile devin inaccesibile. Aceasta este o problemă critică pentru cercetarea reproductibilă și responsabilă pe rețelele sociale. Rezolvăm parțial această provocare prin adnotarea unui nou corpus asemănător Twitter dintr-un mediu social alternativ mare, cu licențe compatibile cu experimente reproductibile: Mastodon. Adnotăm manual atât dialogurile, cât și sentimentele pe acest corpus și antrenăm o rețea recurentă ierarhică multi-sarcini pe recunoașterea sentimentelor comune și a actelor de dialog. Demonstrăm experimental că transferul de învățare poate fi realizat eficient între ambele sarcini și analizăm în continuare unele corelații specifice între sentimente și dialoguri pe rețelele de socializare. Atât corpul adnotat, cât și rețeaua profundă sunt lansate cu o licență open source.', 'sr': 'Zbog ograničenja dozvole, često je nemoguće da strogo reprodukuje većinu istraživačkih rezultata na podacima Twitter veæ nekoliko mjeseci nakon stvorenja korpusa. Ova situacija se postupno pogoršala dok prolazi vreme i tweets postaju neposlušni. Ovo je kritičan problem za reproduktivno i odgovorno istraživanje socijalnih medija. Mi djelomično rešimo taj izazov annotirajući novi korpus sličan na Twitter iz alternativnog velikog društvenog medija sa licencijama koje su kompatibilne sa reproduktivnim eksperimentima: Mastodon. Ručno annotiramo i dijaloge i osjećaje o ovom korpusu, i obučavamo hijerarhičku povratnu mrežu o zajedničkom sentimentu i razmatranju dijaloga. Eksperimentalno pokazujemo da bi učenje prijenosa moglo biti efikasno postignuto između oba zadatka i dalje analizirati neke specifične korelacije između osjećaja i dijaloga na društvenim medijima. Oboje annotirane korpuse i duboke mreže su puštene sa dozvolom otvorenog izvora.', 'si': 'ලායිසින්ස් සීමාවක් නිසා, බොහොම වෙලාවට ට්විටර් දත්තේ ගොඩක් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරත මේ තත්වය ස්ථානයක් වැඩියෙන් වෙලාවට වෙලාවට වැඩියෙන් වැඩියෙන් වැඩියෙන් වෙලා තියෙන්නේ  මේක සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමත්වයේ ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය සහ හිතුරු පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි මේ අභ්\u200dයානය විස්තර කරන්නේ අළුත් ට්විටර් වගේ කොර්පස් වගේ අලුත් ලොකු සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් විස්තර කරනවා මේ අභ්\u200dයානය ප අපි මේ කොර්පස් ගැන සංවාද සහ හිතුවක් දෙන්නම් අල්ලගන්නවා, සම්බන්ධ සංවාදය සහ සංවාදය සම්බන්ධ විදියට ගොඩක් කාර්යාක අපි පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයේ සංවාදය සහ සංවාදය සමඟ විශේෂ කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරතිකාර කර්පස් සහ ගොඩක් ජාලය ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Sababta sharciga awgeed, marmarka badan ma suurtowdo in si qallafsan looga soo celiyo arimaha waxbarashada ee Twitterka marka la abuuro korpus kadib. Xaaladaas si taxadar ah ayay u dhibaataysnaayeen marka wakhtigu dhaafo iyo tweetka aan suurtagal karin. Tani waa arin muhiim ah oo ku saabsan waxbarashada la soo celin karo iyo mas’uuliyadda ku saabsan shabakada bulshada. Qayb ka mid ah ayaannu qiimeynaynaa dhibaatadan si a an uga caddeyno korpus cusub oo u eg Twitterka, mid ka mid ah dhexdhexdhexaadka bulshada oo kale oo badan, kaas oo ku habboon jirrabaadka la soo celin karo: Mastodon. Waxaynu si rasmi ah ugu tababarinnaa labada dialogeeyadood iyo fikradooda, waxaynu ku tababarinnaa shabakadda dib u soo celinta shaqaalaha badan ee ku saabsan xisaabta wadajirka ah iyo aqoonsashada bulshada. Imtixaanka waxaynu muujinnaa in waxbarashada la wareejiyo uu si fiican u gaadhi karo labada shaqaalaha dhexdooda, sidoo kale baaritaanno xiriir gaar ah oo u dhexeeya fekerka iyo is-xiriirka bulshada. Labada qof oo sharaf leh iyo shabakadda mool dheer waxaa lagu furaa ruqsada furan.', 'ur': 'لیزانس محدودیت کی وجہ سے، بہت سی مہینوں کے بعد توئیٹر ڈیٹے میں بہت سی تحقیق نتائج مکمل کرنا غیر ممکن ہوتا ہے. یہ موقعیت آہستہ سے بدتر ہوتی ہے جب زمانہ گزرتا ہے اور ٹویٹ نہیں ہوتی۔ یہ سوسیل میڈیا کے بارے میں دوبارہ پیدا کرنے والی اور جواب دینے والی تحقیق کے لئے ایک ضروری مسئلہ ہے۔ ہم ایک حصہ سے اس چال کو حل کر رہے ہیں کہ ایک نو ٹویٹر جیسی کورپوس کو ایک الٹی بڑے سوسیال میڈی سے آواز دینے کے ذریعہ لکھ دیتے ہیں جو دوبارہ پیدا کرنے والے آزمائش کے ساتھ مطابق ہیں: ماستودون. ہم نے اس کورپوس کے بارے میں دونوں گفتگو اور احساسات کو اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپن ہم آزمائش کے طور پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ ترنسیس سیکھنے کی تعلیم دو کاموں کے درمیان مفید طور پر پہنچ سکتی ہے اور اس سے زیادہ مخصوص احساسات اور صحبت کے درمیان کچھ مشخص تعلقات کا تحلیل کرتا ہے۔ Both the annotated corpus and deep network are released with an open-source license.', 'sv': 'På grund av licensbegränsningar blir det ofta omöjligt att strikt reproducera de flesta forskningsresultat på Twitter-data redan några månader efter skapandet av korpusen. Denna situation förvärrades gradvis när tiden går och tweets blir otillgängliga. Detta är en kritisk fråga för reproducerbar och ansvarsfull forskning på sociala medier. Vi löser delvis denna utmaning genom att kommentera en ny Twitter-liknande korpus från ett alternativt stort socialt medium med licenser som är kompatibla med reproducerbara experiment: Mastodon. Vi kommenterar både dialoger och känslor manuellt på denna korpus, och tränar ett hierarkiskt återkommande nätverk med flera uppgifter på gemensam sentiment och dialog act recognition. Vi visar experimentellt att transferlärande kan uppnås effektivt mellan båda uppgifterna och analyserar vidare vissa specifika korrelationer mellan känslor och dialoger på sociala medier. Både den kommenterade korpusen och djupnätverket släpps med en öppen källkod licens.', 'ta': 'Because of license restrictions, it often becomes impossible to strictly reproduce most research results on Twitter data already a few months after the creation of the corpus.  நேரம் கடந்து செல்லும் போது இந்த நிலையில் மெதுவாக வருகிறது மற்றும் தொடர்புகள் பொருளாது. இது சமூக ஊடகங்களில் பழிப்பெற்ற மற்றும் பொருத்தமான ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு ஒரு முக்கியமான பிரச்சனை. மாற்று பெரிய சமூக இடைவெளியிலிருந்து ஒரு புதிய தொடர்பு போன்ற ஒரு புதிய குறியீட்டை வெளிப்படுத்தி இந்த சவால் நாம் தீர்வு செய்து க நாம் இந்த குறிப்புகளில் உரையாடல் மற்றும் உணர்வுகளையும் கைமுறையாக குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், மற்றும் பல பணி ஹையரியல் மீண்டும் திரும்ப வலைப்பி நாம் சோதனையில் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால், இரு பணிகளுக்கும் இடையே மாற்றும் கல்வியை மாற்றுதல் வேண்டும் என்பதை குறிப்பிட்டுள்ளது, மற்ற விளக்கப்பட்ட கார்புஸ் மற்றும் ஆழமான வலைப்பின்னல் இருவரும் ஒரு திறந்த மூல உரிமம் கொண்டு வெளியேறுக', 'uz': "Because of license restrictions, it often becomes impossible to strictly reproduce most research results on Twitter data already a few months after the creation of the corpus.  Вақт ўтиб кетганида, бу ҳол тезда кучга тушади ва tweeti қабул қилинмайди. Bu jamiyat media'da qo'llash va taʼminlovchi taʼminot uchun muhim muammolar. Biz bir qismni boshqa Twitter kabi yangi kompyuter bilan boshqa jamiyatlarni taqdim qilish bilan boshqa bir kompyuterga ega bo'lishimiz mumkin: Mastodon. Biz buning muloqat oynalar va hissiyalarni qoʻlbola tahlil qilamiz, va bir qanchalik vazifa hierarchik tarmoqni bir necha hisobot va muloqat hisoboti hisobotini aniqlash uchun muloqat taʼminlovchi tarmoqni o'rganamiz. Biz tajriba o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rganish mumkin, ikkita vazifalar orasida juda foydalanishi mumkin, va hissiyotlar va muloqat muloqat bilan bir necha bog'liqlarni aniqlash mumkin. Aniqlanadigan korpus va boshqa tarmoq bilan ochiq manba litsenziya bilan chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Do bị hạn chế giấy phép, hầu hết kết quả nghiên cứu trên Twitter thường trở nên không thể mô phỏng chặt chẽ hơn được vài tháng sau khi tạo ra tập thể. Tình hình ngày càng xấu đi khi thời gian trôi qua và tweet trở nên khó đọc. Đây là vấn đề then chốt cho việc nghiên cứu có khả năng sinh tồn và chịu trách nhiệm về xã hội. Chúng ta giải quyết phần lớn thử thách này bằng cách ghi chú một tập thể mới giống Twitter từ một phương tiện xã hội lớn khác có giấy phép tương thích với thí nghiệm có thể sinh sản: MasTodd. Chúng ta sẽ ghi chú cả các ca- trình và tình cảm trong tập thể này, và huấn luyện một hệ thống cấp cao lập trình phân cấp đa nhiệm, dựa trên cảm xúc và hộp thoại hợp tác. Chúng tôi thí nghiệm chứng minh rằng việc chuyển học có thể đạt được hiệu quả giữa hai nhiệm vụ, và tiếp tục phân tích các mối liên hệ cụ thể giữa cảm xúc và các cuộc đối thoại trên mạng xã hội. Cả tập thể và mạng sâu được ghi chú đều được sản xuất bằng nguồn mở.', 'bg': 'Поради лицензионните ограничения често става невъзможно стриктно да се възпроизведат повечето резултати от изследванията на данни в Туитър още няколко месеца след създаването на корпуса. Тази ситуация се влошава постепенно с течение на времето и туитовете стават недостъпни. Това е критичен въпрос за възпроизводими и отговорни изследвания в социалните медии. Ние отчасти решаваме това предизвикателство, като анотираме нов корпус, подобен на Туитър, от алтернативна голяма социална среда с лицензи, които са съвместими с възпроизводими експерименти: Мастодон. Ръчно анотираме диалози и сентименти в този корпус и обучаваме многозадача йерархична повтаряща се мрежа за съвместно разпознаване на сентименти и диалогови актове. Експериментално демонстрираме, че трансферното обучение може да бъде ефективно постигнато между двете задачи и допълнително анализираме някои специфични корелации между чувствата и диалозите в социалните медии. Както анотираният корпус, така и дълбоката мрежа се издават с лиценз с отворен код.', 'da': 'På grund af licensbegrænsninger bliver det ofte umuligt at gengive de fleste forskningsresultater strengt på Twitter-data allerede et par måneder efter oprettelsen af korpuset. Denne situation forværredes gradvist, efterhånden som tiden går, og tweets bliver utilgængelige. Dette er et kritisk spørgsmål for reproducerbar og ansvarlig forskning på sociale medier. Vi løser delvis denne udfordring ved at kommentere et nyt Twitter-lignende korpus fra et alternativt stort socialt medie med licenser, der er kompatible med reproducerbare eksperimenter: Mastodon. Vi annoterer manuelt både dialoger og følelser på dette korpus, og træner et hierarkisk gentagne opgaver-netværk om fælles følelser og dialoghandlingsgenkendelse. Vi demonstrerer eksperimentelt, at transferlæring kan opnås effektivt mellem begge opgaver, og yderligere analyserer vi nogle specifikke sammenhænge mellem følelser og dialoger på sociale medier. Både den kommenterede korpus og dybe netværk frigives med en open source-licens.', 'nl': 'Door licentiebeperkingen wordt het vaak onmogelijk om de meeste onderzoeksresultaten al enkele maanden na de oprichting van het corpus strikt te reproduceren op Twitter data. Deze situatie verslechterde geleidelijk naarmate de tijd verstrijkt en tweets ontoegankelijk werden. Dit is een cruciale kwestie voor reproduceerbaar en verantwoord onderzoek op sociale media. We lossen deze uitdaging gedeeltelijk op door een nieuw Twitter-achtig corpus te annoteren vanuit een alternatief groot sociaal medium met licenties die compatibel zijn met reproduceerbare experimenten: Mastodon. We maken handmatig aantekeningen op zowel dialogen als sentiments op dit corpus, en trainen een multi-task hiërarchisch terugkerend netwerk op gezamenlijke sentiment- en dialogactherkenning. We tonen experimenteel aan dat transfer learning efficiënt kan worden bereikt tussen beide taken, en analyseren verder enkele specifieke correlaties tussen sentiments en dialogen op sociale media. Zowel het geannoteerde corpus als het deep network worden uitgebracht met een open-source licentie.', 'hr': 'Zbog ograničenja dozvole, često je nemoguće pojačati većinu rezultata istraživanja na Twitter podacima već nekoliko mjeseci nakon stvorenja korpusa. Ova situacija se postupno pogoršala dok prolazi vrijeme i tweets postaju neposlušni. Ovo je kritično pitanje za reproduktivno i odgovorno istraživanje socijalnih medija. Mi djelomično riješimo taj izazov annotirajući novi korpus sličan na Twitter iz alternativnog velikog društvenog medija sa licencijama koje su kompatibilne s reproduktivnim eksperimentima: Mastodon. Ručno annotiramo i dijaloge i osjećaje o ovom korpusu, i obučavamo hijerarhičku povratnu mrežu multizadataka o priznanju zajedničkog osjećaja i dijaloga. Eksperimentalno pokazujemo da se učenje prijenosa može učinkovito postići između oba zadatka i dalje analizirati neke specifične korelacije između osjećaja i dijaloga na društvenim medijima. Oba annotirana korpusa i duboka mreža su oslobođena s dozvolom otvorenog izvora.', 'de': 'Aufgrund von Lizenzbeschränkungen wird es oft unmöglich, die meisten Forschungsergebnisse bereits wenige Monate nach Erstellung des Korpuss streng auf Twitter-Daten zu reproduzieren. Diese Situation verschlechterte sich allmählich mit der Zeit und Tweets wurden unzugänglich. Dies ist ein kritisches Thema für reproduzierbare und verantwortliche Recherchen in sozialen Medien. Wir lösen diese Herausforderung teilweise, indem wir einen neuen Twitter-ähnlichen Korpus aus einem alternativen großen sozialen Medium mit Lizenzen annotieren, die mit reproduzierbaren Experimenten kompatibel sind: Mastodon. Wir kommentieren sowohl Dialoge als auch Sentiments manuell auf diesem Korpus und trainieren ein hierarchisch wiederkehrendes Multi-Task-Netzwerk zur gemeinsamen Sentiment- und Dialogakterkennung. Wir zeigen experimentell, dass Transferlernen effizient zwischen beiden Aufgaben erreicht werden kann, und analysieren einige spezifische Korrelationen zwischen Gefühlen und Dialogen in sozialen Medien. Sowohl der annotierte Korpus als auch das Deep Network werden mit einer Open-Source-Lizenz veröffentlicht.', 'ko': '허가증 제한 때문에 어료 라이브러리를 몇 달 동안 만든 후에는 트위터 데이터에서 대부분의 연구 결과를 엄격하게 복제할 수 없다.시간이 지날수록 트윗을 접근할 수 없게 되면서 이런 상황은 점점 악화했다.이것은 소셜 미디어의 복제 가능성과 책임 있는 연구에 있어 관건적인 문제이다.우리는 또 다른 대형 소셜 미디어에서 트위터와 유사한 새로운 언어 자료 라이브러리를 주석함으로써 이 도전을 부분적으로 해결했다. 이 매체는 복제 실험과 호환되는 허가증: 유치상을 가지고 있다.우리는 이 자료 라이브러리에 수동으로 대화와 감정을 표시하고 다중 임무 차원의 결합 감정과 대화 행위 식별 귀속 네트워크를 훈련한다.우리는 실험을 통해 이동 학습이 두 임무 사이에서 효과적으로 실현될 수 있음을 증명하고 정서와 소셜 미디어 대화 간의 특정한 관련성을 더욱 분석했다.주석이 있는 자료 라이브러리와 deep 네트워크는 모두 소스 오픈 허가증을 통해 발표된다.', 'id': 'Karena batasan lisensi, sering menjadi mustahil untuk mereproduksi kebanyakan hasil penelitian di Twitter data sudah beberapa bulan setelah menciptakan korpus. This situation worsened gradually as time passes and tweets become inaccessible.  Ini adalah masalah kritis untuk penelitian yang dapat diproduksi dan bertanggung jawab pada media sosial. Kami sebagian memecahkan tantangan ini dengan menganoterasi sebuah korpus baru seperti Twitter dari sebuah media sosial besar alternatif dengan lisensi yang kompatibel dengan eksperimen yang dapat diproduksi: Mastodon. Kami secara manual anotasi kedua dialog dan perasaan pada korpus ini, dan melatih jaringan berkurang hierarkis multi-tugas pada perasaan kongsi dan pengakuan tindakan dialog. Kami secara eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pembelajaran transfer mungkin secara efisien mencapai antara kedua tugas, dan lebih lanjut menganalisis beberapa korelasi spesifik antara perasaan dan dialog di media sosial. Kedua corpus yang dicatat dan jaringan dalam dibebaskan dengan lisensi sumber terbuka.', 'sw': 'Kwa sababu ya vizuizi vya leseni, mara nyingi haiwezekani kurudisha matokeo mengi ya utafiti kwenye takwimu za Twita tayari ni miezi michache baada ya kuanzishwa kwa mashindano hayo. Hali hii ilibadilika taratibu pale muda unapopita na twiti zisizoeleweka. Hili ni suala muhimu kwa utafiti unaowezekana na uwajibikaji kwenye mitandao ya kijamii. Tunafanya changamoto hili kwa kutangaza makampuni mpya kama Twita kutoka kwenye mitandao mbadala ya kijamii yenye leseni inayolinganishwa na majaribio yanayoweza kuzalisha: Mastodon. We manually annotate both dialogues and sentiments on this corpus, and train a multi-task hierarchical recurrent network on joint sentiment and dialog act recognition.  Tunaonyesha kwa mtihani kwamba uhamishaji wa elimu unaweza kuwa na ufanisi kati ya kazi zote hizo, na pia kuchambua mahusiano maalum kati ya hisia na mazungumzo kwenye mitandao ya kijamii. Wote viwili vikosi vinavyotajwa na mitandao ya ndani huachiwa huru kwa leseni iliyo wazi.', 'tr': 'Lisans çykyşlarynyň sebäbi köplenç Twitter maglumatynyň beýleki a ýdan soň köp barlag netijelerini taýýarlamak mümkin däldir. Bu ýagdaý wagt geçirýän ýaly ýuwaş boldy we tweets hem bolup bilenokdyr. Bu sosyal medýdançalaryň täzeden edibiljek we jogapkärli barlamasynyň döwüregi. Biz bu kynçylygy täze Twitter ýaly korpusy täze bir nusgadan çözerek, täze täze sosialy ortamdan, lezzetler bilen täzeden gelenler bilen täzeden çözeriz: Mastodon. Biz bu korpusda hem dialoglary hem duýgularyny elimizden duýdurýarys we birnäçe-täbli bir ýerarşik şebekesini bilelikde duýgular we dijalog tanyş bilen okaýarys. Biz experimental şekilde öwrenmegi hem zadyň arasynda täsirli bolup biler diýip görkezip bilýäris we sosyal medýýatlar arasynda duýgular we dialoglaryň arasynda käbir nähili meselelerini çözümleşdirip biler. Notasyzlyk korpus we derin şebek ikisi açyk çeşme lisansy bilen çykylýar', 'af': "Omdat lisensie beperking is, word dit dikwels onmoontlik om die meeste resensie resultate op Twitter te herhaal reeds 'n paar maande na die skepping van die korpus. Hierdie situasie het gradief verder as tyd verbygaan en tweets ontoegang kan word. Hierdie is 'n kritiese probleem vir reproduseerbare en verantwoordelike ondersoek op sosiale media. Ons het gedeeltelik hierdie uitdrukking opgelos deur 'n nuwe Twitter-like korpus te kennis van 'n alternatiewe groot sosiale medium met lisensies wat versoenbaar is met reproduktiveerbare eksperimente: Mastodon. Ons moet selfs die dialoog en sentimente op hierdie korpus annoteer en 'n multi-taak hierarkiese herhaalde netwerk trein op joint sentiment en dialoog werk herken. Ons eksperimenteel wys dat oordrag leer effektief tussen beide opdragte bereik kan word en 'n paar spesifieke korrelasies tussen sentimente en dialoog op sosiale media verder analyseer. Beide die opgemaakte corpus en diep netwerk word met 'n oop-bron lisensie verlos.", 'sq': 'Për shkak të kufizimeve të liçensës, shpesh bëhet e pamundur të riprodhohet rreptësisht shumica e rezultateve të kërkimeve në të dhënat e Twitter tashmë disa muaj pas krijimit të korpusit. Kjo situatë u përkeqësua gradualisht pasi kalon koha dhe tweetet bëhen të pamundur. Ky është një çështje kritike për kërkimin e riprodhueshëm dhe përgjegjës në mediat sociale. Ne pjesërisht zgjidhim këtë sfidë duke shënuar një korpus të ri si Twitter nga një mjet social alternativ i madh me licensa që janë kompatibile me eksperimentet e riprodhueshme: Mastodon. We manually annotate both dialogues and sentiments on this corpus, and train a multi-task hierarchical recurrent network on joint sentiment and dialog act recognition.  Ne eksperimentalisht demonstrojmë se mësimi i transferimit mund të arrihet në mënyrë të efektshme midis të dy detyrave dhe analizojmë më tej disa korrelacione specifike midis ndjenjave dhe dialogeve në mediat sociale. Si korpusi i anotuar dhe rrjeti i thellë janë lëshuar me një licensë burimi të hapur.', 'am': 'የፍቃድ ግንኙነት ምክንያት፣ ብዙ ጊዜም የፌስቡክ አካባቢ ከተፈጠረ በኋላ ብዙ ምርመራ ፍሬዎችን በትዊተር ዳራዎች በጥቂት ወር ላይ በመመለስ አይቻልም፡፡ ሰዓት ሲያልፍ ትዊተሮችም የማይገባ ሲሆኑ ይህ ጉዳይ ቀላል ይጨነቃል፡፡ ይህ በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የሚቃወም እና የተገኘ ምርመራ የሚያስፈልግ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ አዲስ ትዊተር-ምሳሌ ካርፓስ በተለየ ትልቁ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ በመቀላቀል እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ማስዶዶን፡፡ በዚህ ኮርፕስ ላይ የሚቆጠሩን dialogs እና እውቀቶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተፈተና እናሳየዋለን ትምህርት በሁለቱ ስራዎች መካከል በጥቅም እንዲደርስ እና በማኅበራዊ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያዎች መካከል የተለያዩ ግንኙነት እና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያዎች መካከል የሚኖረውን ግንኙነት እንዲያስተምር ይችላል፡፡ ሁለቱም ተቃውሞ የቆርፓስ እና ጥልቅ መረብ በተከፈተ ምንጭ ፈቃድ ይፈታሉ።', 'az': 'Lizens müəyyənləşdirmələri üzündən, Twitter məlumatlarının çoxunu körpüsünün yaratdığı bir neçə ay sonra çox araştırma sonuçlarını təkrar təkrar etmək imkansız olur. Bu durum zaman geçdiyi zaman və twetlər istifadə edilməz olaraq yavaş dəyişər. Bu sosyal mediyalarda yenidən ürəkləndirilən və müəyyən edilən araştırmalar üçün kritik bir məsəl. Biz bu çətinliyi bir-birimizə çəkirik, yeni Twitter kimi korpusu yeni bir çox böyük sosyal ortamdan, yeniləndirilən təcrübələr ilə uyğunlaşan lisanslar ilə müəyyən edirik: Mastodon. Biz bu korpus barəsindəki dialogları və duyguları özümüzə məlumatlandırırıq, birlikdə duyguları və diyalə tanınması barəsində çoxlu iş hiyerarşik yenidən fəaliyyət a ğlarını təhsil edirik. Biz təcrübə edirik ki, transfer öyrənməsinin hər iki işin arasında faydalı olaraq başarılı ola bilər və sosyal medialarda hisslər və dialoglar arasındakı bəzi xüsusi bağlantıları daha da analiz edirik. İkisi də açıq-kaynak lisansı ilə açılır.', 'hy': "Լիցենսի սահմանափակումների պատճառով հաճախ անհնար է կրկնօրինակել Թվիթերի տվյալների հետազոտությունների մեծ մասը մի քանի ամիս մարմնի ստեղծման հետո: Այս իրավիճակը դանդաղ վատթարանում է, երբ ժամանակը անցնում է և թվիթերը դառնում են անհասանելի: Սա սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների վերարտադրողական և պատասխանատու հետազոտության կարևոր խնդիր է: Մենք մասամբ լուծում ենք այս մարտահրավերը, գրելով Թվիթերի նման նոր կորպուս այլընտրանքային մեծ սոցիալական մեդիայից, որն ունի լիցեններ, որոնք համատեղելի են վերարտադրելի փորձարկումների հետ՝ Մասթոդոն: Մենք ձեռքով նշում ենք այս մարմնի վերաբերյալ երկու պատմություններ և զգացմունքներ, և վարժեցնում ենք բազմախնդիրների հիերարխիկ հաճախ կրկնվող ցանց' միասին զգացմունքների և երկու պատմությունների ճանաչելու համար: Մենք փորձարկումներով ցույց ենք տալիս, որ փոխանցման ուսումնասիրությունը կարող է արդյունավետ հասնել երկու խնդիրների միջև և ապագայում վերլուծել որոշ հատուկ կապ հասարակական լրատվամիջոցների զգացմունքների և քննարկումների միջև Նոտորացված կորպուսը և խորը ցանցը արտադրվում են բաց աղբյուրի արտոնագիր:", 'bn': 'লাইসেন্স নিষেধাজ্ঞার কারণে প্রায়শই টুইটারের তথ্যে বেশীরভাগ গবেষণার ফলাফল পুনরুদ্ধার করা অসম্ভব হয় না কোর্পাস তৈরি করার ক এই পরিস্থিতি ধীরে ধীরে বেড়ে যায় যখন সময় অতিক্রম করে এবং টুইট ব্যবস্থা করা যায়। This is a critical issue for reproducible and accountable research on social media.  আমরা এই চ্যালেঞ্জের সমাধান করি একটি বিকল্প সামাজিক মাধ্যম থেকে একটি নতুন টুইটারের মতো কোর্পাসের বিষয়টি ব্যাখ্যা করে যারা প্রবণযোগ্য পরীক্ষ আমরা এই কোর্পাসের ব্যাপারে কথোপকথন এবং অনুভূতিকে নিজেদের হাতে প্রশিক্ষণ করি এবং যৌথ অনুভূতি এবং ডায়ালগের স্বীকৃতি নেওয়ার্কে পুনরাবৃত্তি কর আমরা পরীক্ষায় দেখাচ্ছি যে শিক্ষা বিনিময়ে কাজের মধ্যে কার্যকর অর্জন হতে পারে এবং সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় অনুভূতি এবং আলোচনার মধ্যে কিছু বিশেষ সম্পর বিরক্তিকর কোর্পাস এবং গভীর নেটওয়ার্ক উভয়ই একটি উন্মুক্ত সোর্স লাইসেন্স দ্বারা মুক্তি প্রদান করা হয়।', 'fa': 'بخاطر محدودیت مجوز، اغلب غیرممکن است بیشتر نتیجه تحقیقات در داده های توئیتر چند ماه بعد از ایجاد شرکت کورپوس را به شدت تبدیل کند. این وضعیت به تدریج بدتر شد وقتی زمان می گذرد و توئیت غیرقابل دسترسی می شود. این یک مسئله مهمی برای تحقیقات بازآفریننده و مسئول حساب در رسانه های اجتماعی است. ما بخشی از این چالش را حل می\u200cکنیم با نویسند یک کورپوس جدید مانند توئیتر از یک رسانه اجتماعی بزرگ با گواهینامه\u200cهایی که با آزمایش\u200cهای تولید می\u200cکنند: ماستودون. ما به دستی هر دو گفتگو و احساسات روی این کورپوس را نشان می دهیم، و یک شبکه مجدد تکرار تکرار چندین کاری را در مورد احساسات و تعریف اعمال محاسبات مشترک آموزش می دهیم. ما به طور آزمایشی نشان می دهیم که یادگیری انتقال ممکن است به طور موثر بین هر دو وظیفه رسیده شود و بعضی رابطه\u200cهای خاص بین احساسات و گفتگوها در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی تحلیل کنیم. هر دو کورپوس و شبکه عميق با يه گواهينامه منبع باز آزاد ميشن', 'bs': 'Zbog ograničenja dozvole, često postaje nemoguće strogo reprodukirati većinu rezultata istraživanja na podacima Twitter već nekoliko mjeseci nakon stvorenja korpusa. Ova situacija se postupno pogoršala dok prolazi vrijeme i tweets postaju neposlušni. Ovo je kritičan problem za reproduktivno i odgovorno istraživanje socijalnih medija. Mi djelomično riješimo ovaj izazov annotirajući novi korpus sličan na Twitter iz alternativnog velikog društvenog medija sa licencijama koje su kompatibilne sa reproduktivnim eksperimentima: Mastodon. Ručno annotiramo i dijaloge i osjećaje o ovom korpusu, i treniramo hijerarhičku povratnu mrežu multizadataka o priznanju zajedničkog osjećaja i dijaloga. Eksperimentalno pokazujemo da će učenje prijenosa biti učinkovito postići između oba zadatka i dalje analizirati neke specifične korelacije između osjećaja i dijaloga na društvenim medijima. Obojica annotirana korpusa i duboka mreža su oslobođena sa dozvolom otvorenog izvora.', 'ca': "Gràcies a restriccions de llicències, sovint es torna impossible reproducir estrictament la majoria dels resultats de la recerca a Twitter ja uns mesos després de la creació del corpus. Aquesta situació s'agrava gradualment mentre passa el temps i els tweets es tornen inaccessibles. És un tema crític per a la recerca reproducible i responsable sobre els mitjans socials. We partly solve this challenge by annotating a new Twitter-like corpus from an alternative large social medium with licenses that are compatible with reproducible experiments: Mastodon.  Anotem manualment els diàlegs i els sentiments d'aquest corpus, i entrenem una xarxa jeràrquica recurrent de múltiples tasques en el reconeixement de sentiments conjunts i actes de diàleg. Demonstrem experimentalment que l'aprenentatge de transfer ència pot ser aconseguit eficientment entre les dues tasques, i analitzem més endavant algunes correlacions específices entre sentiments i diàlegs en els mitjans socials. Tant el corpus anotat com la xarxa profundasón alliberats amb una llicència de codi obert.", 'et': 'Litsentsipiirangute tõttu muutub sageli võimatuks enamiku uurimistulemuste rangelt reprodutseerimine Twitteri andmetes juba paar kuud pärast korpuse loomist. See olukord halvenes järk-järgult, kui aeg möödub ja säutsud muutuvad kättesaamatuks. See on sotsiaalmeedia reprodutseeritavate ja vastutustundlike uuringute jaoks kriitiline küsimus. Osaliselt lahendame selle väljakutse, märkides uue Twitteri-sarnase korpuse alternatiivselt suurelt sotsiaalmeedialt litsentsidega, mis sobivad reprodutseeritavate eksperimentidega: Mastodon. Me märgistame käsitsi nii dialoogid kui ka tunded selles korpuses ning koolitame mitme ülesandega hierarhilise korduva võrgustiku ühise tunde- ja dialoogiaktide tuvastamiseks. Eksperimentaalselt näitame, et siirdeõpet võib efektiivselt saavutada mõlema ülesande vahel, ning analüüsime edaspidi mõningaid konkreetseid seoseid tunnetuste ja dialoogide vahel sotsiaalmeedias. Nii märgitud korpus kui ka sügavvõrk on vabastatud avatud lähtekoodiga litsentsiga.', 'fi': 'Lisenssirajoitusten vuoksi useimpien tutkimustulosten tarkka toistaminen Twitterissä on usein mahdotonta jo muutaman kuukauden kuluttua korpusen luomisesta. Tilanne paheni vähitellen ajan kuluessa ja tweetit ovat vaikeapääsyisiä. Tämä on kriittinen kysymys toistettavan ja vastuullisen sosiaalisen median tutkimuksen kannalta. Ratkaisemme tämän haasteen osittain kirjoittamalla uuden Twitterin kaltaisen korpusen vaihtoehtoisesta suuresta sosiaalisesta mediasta, jossa on lisenssejä, jotka ovat yhteensopivia toistettavien kokeilujen kanssa: Mastodon. Merkitsemme sekä dialogit että tunteet manuaalisesti tähän korpuseen ja koulutamme monitehtävän hierarkkisen toistuvan verkoston yhteiseen tunteen ja dialogin tekojen tunnistamiseen. Kokeellisesti osoitamme, että siirtooppiminen voidaan saavuttaa tehokkaasti molempien tehtävien välillä, ja analysoimme edelleen joitakin erityisiä korrelaatioita tunteiden ja dialogien välillä sosiaalisessa mediassa. Sekä kommentoitu korpus että deep network julkaistaan avoimen lähdekoodin lisenssillä.', 'cs': 'Vzhledem k licenčním omezením se často stává nemožné striktně reprodukovat většinu výsledků výzkumu na Twitteru již několik měsíců po vytvoření korpusu. Tato situace se postupně zhoršovala, jak plyne čas a tweety se stávají nepřístupnými. To je klíčová otázka pro reprodukovatelný a zodpovědný výzkum na sociálních médiích. Tuto výzvu částečně řešíme anotováním nového korpusu podobného Twitteru z alternativního velkého sociálního média s licencemi kompatibilními s reprodukovatelnými experimenty: Mastodon. Ručně anotujeme dialogy i sentimenty na tomto korpusu a trénujeme hierarchickou recidivující se síť na společné rozpoznávání sentimentů a dialogových aktů. Experimentálně demonstrujeme, že transferové učení lze efektivně dosáhnout mezi oběma úkoly a dále analyzujeme některé specifické korelace mezi sentimenty a dialogy na sociálních médiích. Jak anotovaný korpus, tak hluboká síť jsou vydány s open-source licencí.', 'he': 'בגלל ההגבלות ברשיונות, לעתים קרובות זה הופך בלתי אפשרי לשחזר לחלוטין את רוב תוצאות המחקר על נתוני טוויטר כבר כמה חודשים לאחר יצירת הקורפוס. המצב הזה התחמר באופן שלילי כשהזמן עובר וטוויטרים נעשים בלתי אפשריים. זה נושא קריטי למחקר אפשרי לשחזור וחשבוני על תקשורת חברתית. אנו לפתור חלקית את האתגר הזה על ידי הערות על קורפוס חדש דומה לטוויטר ממדיו חברתי גדול אלטרנטיבי עם רישיונות שיתאימים לניסויים אפשריים לשחזור: מאסטודון. אנו מציינים באופן ידני גם דיאלוגים וגם רגשות על הקורפוס הזה, ולאימון רשת היררכית ממשימה רבה חוזרת על זיהוי רגשות משותפים ודיולוגים פעולה. אנו מבחינה ניסיונית מראים כי ההעברה הלימודים עשויה להשיג באופן יעיל בין שני המשימות, ולמשיך לנתח כמה קשרים ספציפיים בין רגשות ודיולוגים על התקשורת החברתית. גם הקורפוס המכתב וגם הרשת העמוקה משוחררים עם רשיון מקור פתוח.', 'ha': "Dukan kandinan lissafar, ko da yawa bã za ta iya mayar matsala masu yawa a kan data na Twitter yanzu, watanni kaɗan daban da aka halitta Corbus. This situation worsened gradually as time passes and tweets become inaccessible.  Wannan abu ne mai muhimu wa research na fara da lissãfi a kan mitandain jamii. Tuna rabo wannan tsohon da za mu sanar wani makampi mai kama da Twitter daga wani mataimaki mai girma da lissãfi wanda ke kamfata da jarraboyin ayuka: Masdoon. Tuna sanar da zauren zauren akwatin bayani da ke kanana kan wannan nau'in, kuma muna tafiyar da wani jerin da aka sake aikin aiki masu yawa a kan hisani da kuma zauren akwatin bayani na haɗi. Tuna nuna cewa, za'a iya kai mafiya amfani a tsakanin aikin da za'a iya transfer education, kuma Mu sami wani abu na ƙayyade tsakanin hisia da zajeyen ayuka a kan mita jamii. Dukkansu da aka sanar da naus'in da kuma shirin ciki guda za'a sakar da wata lissãfi mai buɗewa.", 'sk': 'Zaradi licenčnih omejitev pogosto postane nemogoče strogo reproducirati večino rezultatov raziskav na podatkih Twitterja že nekaj mesecev po ustvarjanju korpusa. Ta situacija se je postopoma poslabšala, saj čas mineva in tviti postajajo nedostopni. To je ključno vprašanje za ponovljive in odgovorne raziskave na družbenih omrežjih. Ta izziv delno rešujemo z označevanjem novega Twitterju podobnega korpusa iz alternativnega velikega družbenega medija z licencami, ki so združljive s ponovljivimi eksperimenti: Mastodon. Na tem korpusu ročno označujemo dialoge in občutke ter usposabljamo večopravilno hierarhično ponavljajočo se mrežo o skupnem prepoznavanju občutkov in dialognih dejanj. Eksperimentalno dokazujemo, da je transferno učenje mogoče učinkovito doseči med obema nalogama, in nadalje analiziramo nekatere specifične korelacije med čustvi in dialogi na družbenih omrežjih. Tako korpus z oznakami kot globoko omrežje sta izdana z odprtokodno licenco.', 'jv': 'Soalé perusahaan kanggo mbanjurasi dipunangé, akeh iso dianggap kanggo rerampungan dadi nyong kanggo awak dhéwé éntuk kelangan wong liyane sak sabanjuré perusahaan karo hal sampek. Kemerdekaan iki lak saalah sedhaya lan tuwit kuwi ora bisa gabus gak. Iki iku sak mungkar nggo resmi dadi rawuh akeh lan gampang sak mungkar media sotiki. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan iki luwih nggawe nguasakno karo perusahaan anyar tentang karo petani sing dibutuhke tarjamahan karo perusahaan sing nyeasakno karo perusahaan sing kompatib karo perusahaan rebuk: MasTodon. Awake dhéwé manut lan tambah dialog lan ngawasipun oleh dumadhi iki, lan nganggeke tresno karo akeh multi-task Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk tindang nggawe dolanan ingkang dipunangé nggawe layang-layang lan nganggep nggawe layang kelas kuwi nggawe Perintah sing beraksi karo hal-alamat sing beraksi karo dialog kanggo ingkang media sotiane Ombudhakan banget kotak tambah lan tambah sing dibujak nguasai perusahaan bukir', 'bo': 'ཆོག་ཐང་ལག་འཆར་བཤེར་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཁང་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ལས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཌིས་ཌིར་དང་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྐྱེ དུས་ཚོད་བརྒྱུད་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་དུས་ཚོད་ལ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་འགྱུར་བར་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་འཕྱུར་བར་ནམ་མེད། འདི་ནི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ ང་ཚོས་གྲངས་འབོར་གྱི་གདོང་ལེན་བྱ་བ་འདི་ལ་བཟུམ་མཁན་གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག We manually annotate both dialogues and sentiments on this corpus, and train a multi-task hierarchical recurrent network on joint sentiment and dialog act recognition. ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གིས་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་གྱིས་བྱ་རིམ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གཉིས་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐོར་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ ས annotated corpus་དང་deep networks་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཁུངས་ཐོག་མའི་མངོན་འཆར་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ།'}
{'en': 'Self-Normalization Properties of Language Modeling', 'ar': 'خصائص التطبيع الذاتي لنمذجة اللغة', 'fr': "Propriétés d'auto-normalisation de la modélisation du langage", 'zh': '言语建模者规范化性也', 'ja': '言語モデリングの自己正規化プロパティ', 'pt': 'Propriedades de Auto-Normalização da Modelagem de Linguagem', 'es': 'Propiedades de autornormalización del modelado del lenguaje', 'hi': 'भाषा मॉडलिंग के स्व-सामान्यीकरण गुण', 'ga': 'Féin-normalú Airíonna na Samhaltú Teanga', 'ru': 'Свойства самонормализации языкового моделирования', 'ka': 'ენის მოდელირების თავისუფალი ნორმალიზაცია', 'it': 'Proprietà di auto-normalizzazione della modellazione linguistica', 'kk': 'Тіл үлгісінің өзінің нормализациялау қасиеттері', 'hu': 'A nyelvmodellezés önnormalizációs tulajdonságai', 'el': 'Ιδιότητες αυτοκανονικοποίησης της μοντελοποίησης γλωσσών', 'ms': 'Ciri-ciri Normalisasi Sendiri Modeling Bahasa', 'lt': 'Self-Normalization Properties of Language Modeling', 'ml': 'Language Modeling Properties', 'mk': 'Сопствености на самонормализација на моделирање јазик', 'mn': 'Өөрийгөө нормализах хэл загварчлалын шинж чанар', 'no': 'Eigenskapar for sjølvnormalisering av språk- modellering', 'pl': 'Właściwości autonormalizacji modelowania języka', 'mt': 'Proprjetajiet ta’ Awtonormalizzazzjoni tal-Mudellar tal-Lingwi', 'sr': 'Самонормализиране собствености модела језика', 'si': 'භාෂා මෝඩිලයේ ස්වාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවය', 'so': 'Iskuul-Normalization Properties of Modeling Language', 'ta': 'மொழி மாதிரியின் தன்னியக்கமாக சீராக்குதல் பண்புகள்', 'ur': 'زبان موڈلینگ کی خودسازی ویژگی', 'ro': 'Proprietăți de auto-normalizare ale modelării limbajului', 'sv': 'Egenskaper för självnormalisering av språkmodellering', 'vi': 'Tự chỉnh hóa tính năng của chế tạo ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Tilning modulini oĘ»zgartirish xossalari', 'nl': 'Eigenschappen voor zelfnormalisatie van taalmodellering', 'da': 'Egenskaber for selvstormalisering af sprogmodellering', 'bg': 'Свойства за самонормализиране на езиковото моделиране', 'hr': 'Samoonormalizacija vlasništva modela jezika', 'de': 'Selbstnormalisierungseigenschaften der Sprachmodellierung', 'ko': '언어 모델링의 자체 규범화 성질', 'id': 'Properti Normalisasi Sendiri Modeling Bahasa', 'sw': 'Taybeti za Uhuru wa Utawala wa Lugha', 'fa': 'ویژگی\u200cهای خودسازی نمودار زبان', 'tr': 'Dil nusgasynyň özüni bellenenlendirmek Häsiýetleri', 'af': 'Selfnormalisering Eienskappe van Taal Modelering', 'sq': 'Pronësitë e vetë-normalizimit të modelimit të gjuhës', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Լեզու մոդելավորման ինքնանորմալիզացիայի հատկությունները', 'az': 'Dil modell톛rinin 칐z Normalizasyonu', 'bn': 'ভাষা মডেলিং এর স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বাক্ষরিকভাবে বৈশিষ্ট্য', 'ca': "Propiedats d'auto-normalització de la modelació del llenguatge", 'bs': 'SamoNormalizacija vlasništva modela jezika', 'cs': 'Vlastnosti autonormalizace jazykového modelování', 'et': 'Keele modelleerimise isenormaliseerimise omadused', 'fi': 'Kielimallinnan itsenormalisointiominaisuudet', 'jv': 'layers-action', 'he': 'תכונות נורמליזציה עצמית של מודל שפה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Lastnosti samonormalizacije jezikovnega modeliranja', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ངོ་བོ'}
{'en': 'Self-normalizing discriminative models approximate the normalized probability of a class without having to compute the partition function. In the context of language modeling, this property is particularly appealing as it may significantly reduce run-times due to large word vocabularies. In this study, we provide a comprehensive investigation of language modeling self-normalization. First, we theoretically analyze the inherent self-normalization properties of Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) language models. Then, we compare them empirically to softmax-based approaches, which are self-normalized using explicit regularization, and suggest a hybrid model with compelling properties. Finally, we uncover a surprising negative correlation between self-normalization and perplexity across the board, as well as some regularity in the observed errors, which may potentially be used for improving self-normalization algorithms in the future.', 'fr': "Les modèles discriminants auto-normalisés se rapprochent de la probabilité normalisée d'une classe sans avoir à calculer la fonction de partition. Dans le contexte de la modélisation du langage, cette propriété est particulièrement intéressante car elle peut réduire considérablement les temps d'exécution en raison de la grande taille des vocabulaires de mots. Dans cette étude, nous proposons une étude complète de l'auto-normalisation de la modélisation du langage. Tout d'abord, nous analysons théoriquement les propriétés d'auto-normalisation inhérentes aux modèles de langage NCE (Noise Contrastive Estimation). Ensuite, nous les comparons empiriquement à des approches basées sur Softmax, qui sont auto-normalisées à l'aide d'une régularisation explicite, et nous suggérons un modèle hybride aux propriétés convaincantes. Enfin, nous découvrons une corrélation négative surprenante entre l'auto-normalisation et la perplexité générale, ainsi qu'une certaine régularité dans les erreurs observées, qui pourraient être utilisées pour améliorer les algorithmes d'auto-normalisation à l'avenir.", 'es': 'Los modelos discriminativos autornormalizantes se aproximan a la probabilidad normalizada de una clase sin tener que calcular la función de partición. En el contexto del modelado del lenguaje, esta propiedad es particularmente atractiva, ya que puede reducir significativamente los tiempos de ejecución debido a los vocabularios de palabras extensas. En este estudio, ofrecemos una investigación exhaustiva de la autornormalización del modelado del lenguaje. Primero, analizamos teóricamente las propiedades inherentes de autornormalización de los modelos de lenguaje de estimación contrastiva de ruido (NCE). Luego, los comparamos empíricamente con los enfoques basados en softmax, que se normalizan automáticamente mediante la regularización explícita, y sugerimos un modelo híbrido con propiedades convincentes. Finalmente, descubrimos una sorprendente correlación negativa entre la autornormalización y la perplejidad en general, así como cierta regularidad en los errores observados, que podrían utilizarse para mejorar los algoritmos de autornormalización en el futuro.', 'ar': 'تقترب النماذج التمييزية للتطبيع الذاتي من الاحتمال الطبيعي للفئة دون الحاجة إلى حساب وظيفة القسم. في سياق نمذجة اللغة ، هذه الخاصية جذابة بشكل خاص لأنها قد تقلل بشكل كبير من أوقات التشغيل بسبب مفردات الكلمات الكبيرة. في هذه الدراسة ، نقدم تحقيقًا شاملاً لنمذجة اللغة التطبيع الذاتي. أولاً ، نقوم من الناحية النظرية بتحليل خصائص التطبيع الذاتي المتأصلة في نماذج لغة تقدير التباين الضجيج (NCE). بعد ذلك ، قارناها تجريبيًا بالنهج المستندة إلى softmax ، والتي يتم تطبيعها ذاتيًا باستخدام تنظيم صريح ، ونقترح نموذجًا هجينًا بخصائص مقنعة. أخيرًا ، اكتشفنا ارتباطًا سلبيًا مفاجئًا بين التطبيع الذاتي والحيرة في جميع المجالات ، بالإضافة إلى بعض الانتظام في الأخطاء المرصودة ، والتي يمكن استخدامها لتحسين خوارزميات التطبيع الذاتي في المستقبل.', 'pt': 'Modelos discriminativos auto-normalizantes aproximam a probabilidade normalizada de uma classe sem ter que calcular a função de partição. No contexto da modelagem de linguagem, essa propriedade é particularmente atraente, pois pode reduzir significativamente os tempos de execução devido a grandes vocabulários de palavras. Neste estudo, fornecemos uma investigação abrangente da auto-normalização da modelagem de linguagem. Primeiro, analisamos teoricamente as propriedades inerentes de auto-normalização dos modelos de linguagem Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE). Em seguida, nós os comparamos empiricamente com abordagens baseadas em softmax, que são auto-normalizadas usando regularização explícita, e sugerimos um modelo híbrido com propriedades atraentes. Finalmente, descobrimos uma surpreendente correlação negativa entre auto-normalização e perplexidade em geral, bem como alguma regularidade nos erros observados, que podem ser usados para melhorar os algoritmos de auto-normalização no futuro.', 'hi': 'स्व-सामान्यीकरण भेदभावपूर्ण मॉडल विभाजन फ़ंक्शन की गणना किए बिना एक वर्ग की सामान्यीकृत संभावना का अनुमान लगाते हैं। भाषा मॉडलिंग के संदर्भ में, यह संपत्ति विशेष रूप से आकर्षक है क्योंकि यह बड़े शब्द शब्दावली के कारण रन-टाइम को काफी कम कर सकती है। इस अध्ययन में, हम भाषा मॉडलिंग आत्म-सामान्यीकरण की एक व्यापक जांच प्रदान करते हैं। सबसे पहले, हम सैद्धांतिक रूप से शोर Contrastive अनुमान (NCE) भाषा मॉडल के अंतर्निहित आत्म-सामान्यीकरण गुणों का विश्लेषण करते हैं। फिर, हम उन्हें सॉफ्टमैक्स-आधारित दृष्टिकोणों से अनुभवजन्य रूप से तुलना करते हैं, जो स्पष्ट नियमितीकरण का उपयोग करके आत्म-सामान्यीकृत होते हैं, और सम्मोहक गुणों के साथ एक हाइब्रिड मॉडल का सुझाव देते हैं। अंत में, हम बोर्ड भर में आत्म-सामान्यीकरण और उलझन के बीच एक आश्चर्यजनक नकारात्मक सहसंबंध को उजागर करते हैं, साथ ही साथ मनाया त्रुटियों में कुछ नियमितता, जिसका उपयोग संभावित रूप से भविष्य में आत्म-सामान्यीकरण एल्गोरिदम में सुधार के लिए किया जा सकता है।', 'ja': '自己正規化された判別モデルは、分割関数を計算する必要なく、クラスの正規化された確率を近似する。言語モデリングの文脈では、この特性は特に魅力的であり、大規模な単語語彙のために実行時間を大幅に短縮する可能性がある。この研究では、言語モデリングの自己正規化の包括的な調査を提供します。まず、ノイズコントラスト推定（ NCE ）言語モデルの固有の自己正規化特性を理論的に分析する。次に、明示的な正規化を使用して自己正規化されるソフトマックスベースのアプローチと経験的に比較し、説得力のある性質を持つハイブリッドモデルを提案します。最後に、全般的な自己正規化と困惑の間の驚くべき負の相関関係と、観察された誤差の規則性を発見します。これは、将来的に自己正規化アルゴリズムを改善するために使用される可能性があります。', 'zh': '自规范化判近类之归一化概率,而无算分区函数。 言语建模上下文,性尤引人,盖单词词汇量大著减行时也。 于此论之,建模自言规范化自尽也。 先论之噪声比(NCE)言语自规范化。 然后校之于softmax,显式正则化自归一化,合之于服。 最后,自归一化与全惑相惊负相关,及观过规律性,盖未来所以改进自归一化算法也。', 'ru': 'Самонормализующиеся дискриминационные модели аппроксимируют нормализованную вероятность класса без необходимости вычисления функции раздела. В контексте языкового моделирования это свойство особенно привлекательно, поскольку оно может значительно сократить время выполнения из-за больших словарей. В этом исследовании мы предоставляем всестороннее исследование самонормализации языкового моделирования. Во-первых, мы теоретически анализируем присущие свойства самонормализации языковых моделей оценки контрастности шума (NCE). Затем мы сравниваем их эмпирически с подходами на основе softmax, которые самонормализуются с использованием явной регуляризации, и предлагаем гибридную модель с убедительными свойствами. Наконец, мы обнаруживаем удивительную отрицательную корреляцию между самонормализацией и недоумением во всем мире, а также некоторую регулярность наблюдаемых ошибок, которые потенциально могут быть использованы для улучшения алгоритмов самонормализации в будущем.', 'ga': "Is ionann samhlacha idirdhealaitheacha féin-normalaithe agus an dóchúlacht normalaithe d’aicme gan an fheidhm dheighilte a ríomh. I gcomhthéacs na samhaltú teanga, tá an airí seo thar a bheith tarraingteach mar go bhféadfadh sé amanna reatha a laghdú go suntasach mar gheall ar stór focal mór. Sa staidéar seo, cuirimid imscrúdú cuimsitheach ar fáil ar fhéin-normalú samhaltaithe teanga. Ar an gcéad dul síos, déanaimid anailís teoiriciúil ar airíonna féin-normalaithe dúchasach samhlacha teanga Meastachán Codarsnachta Torainn (NCE). Ansin, déanaimid comparáid eimpíreach le cineálacha cur chuige atá bunaithe ar softmax, atá féin-normalaithe ag baint úsáide as rialtacht fhollasach, agus molaimid samhail hibrideach a bhfuil airíonna láidre aige. Mar fhocal scoir, aimsímid comhghaol diúltach iontasach idir féin-normalú agus perplexity ar fud an bord, chomh maith le roinnt rialtacht sna hearráidí a breathnaíodh, a d'fhéadfadh a bheith in úsáid chun feabhas a chur ar halgartaim féin-normalú sa todhchaí.", 'el': 'Τα αυτοομαλοποιημένα διακριτικά μοντέλα προσεγγίζουν την κανονικοποιημένη πιθανότητα μιας τάξης χωρίς να χρειάζεται να υπολογίσει τη συνάρτηση χωρισμού. Στο πλαίσιο της γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης, αυτή η ιδιότητα είναι ιδιαίτερα ελκυστική καθώς μπορεί να μειώσει σημαντικά τους χρόνους εκτέλεσης λόγω μεγάλων λεξιλογίων λέξεων. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, παρέχουμε μια ολοκληρωμένη έρευνα για την αυτοεξομάλυνση της γλωσσικής μοντελοποίησης. Πρώτον, αναλύουμε θεωρητικά τις εγγενείς ιδιότητες αυτοομαλοποίησης των γλωσσικών μοντέλων εκτίμησης θορύβου (NCE). Στη συνέχεια, τις συγκρίνουμε εμπειρικά με προσεγγίσεις βασισμένες σε Softmax, οι οποίες αυτοομαλοποιούνται χρησιμοποιώντας ρητή ρύθμιση, και προτείνουμε ένα υβριδικό μοντέλο με συναρπαστικές ιδιότητες. Τέλος, ανακαλύπτουμε μια εκπληκτική αρνητική συσχέτιση μεταξύ αυτο-ομαλοποίησης και σύγχυσης σε όλη την επιφάνεια, καθώς και κάποια κανονικότητα στα παρατηρούμενα σφάλματα, τα οποία ενδέχεται ενδεχομένως να χρησιμοποιηθούν για τη βελτίωση των αλγόριθμων αυτο-ομαλοποίησης στο μέλλον.', 'hu': 'Az önnormalizáló diszkriminatív modellek megközelítik egy osztály normalizált valószínűségét anélkül, hogy a partíciófüggvényt kiszámítanánk. A nyelvi modellezés összefüggésében ez a tulajdonság különösen vonzó, mivel jelentősen csökkentheti a futási időt a nagy szószótárak miatt. Ebben a tanulmányban átfogó vizsgálatot nyújtunk a nyelvmodellezés önnormalizációjáról. Először elméletileg elemezzük a Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) nyelvmodellek eredendő önnormalizációs tulajdonságait. Ezután empirikusan összehasonlítjuk őket a softmax alapú megközelítésekkel, amelyek explicit regularizációval önnormalizálódnak, és egy hibrid modellt javasolunk meggyőző tulajdonságokkal. Végezetül meglepően negatív korrelációt fedezünk fel az önnormalizáció és a zavarosság között, valamint a megfigyelt hibák bizonyos rendszerességét, amelyek potenciálisan az önnormalizációs algoritmusok javítására használhatók a jövőben.', 'it': "I modelli discriminatori auto-normalizzanti approssimano la probabilità normalizzata di una classe senza dover calcolare la funzione di partizione. Nel contesto della modellazione linguistica, questa proprietà è particolarmente attraente in quanto può ridurre significativamente i tempi di esecuzione a causa di vocaboli di grandi dimensioni. In questo studio, forniamo un'indagine completa sull'auto-normalizzazione della modellazione linguistica. In primo luogo, analizziamo teoricamente le proprietà intrinseche di auto-normalizzazione dei modelli di linguaggio Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE). Poi, li confrontiamo empiricamente con approcci basati su softmax, che sono auto-normalizzati utilizzando regolarizzazione esplicita, e suggeriamo un modello ibrido con proprietà convincenti. Infine, scopriamo una sorprendente correlazione negativa tra auto-normalizzazione e perplessità su tutta la linea, così come una certa regolarità negli errori osservati, che potrebbero potenzialmente essere utilizzati per migliorare gli algoritmi di auto-normalizzazione in futuro.", 'ka': 'თავიდან ნორმალურიზებული დისკრიმინატიური მოდელები კლასის ნორმალურიზებული შესაძლებლობას გადაწყებენ, რომელიც არ უნდა გადაწყება პერტიციის ფუნქცია. ენის მოდელირების კონტექსტში, ეს მნიშვნელობა განსაკუთრებულია, რადგან ეს შეიძლება მნიშვნელოვანად გადასრულებული სიტყვებულების გამოსახულება. ამ კვლევაში, ჩვენ განვითარებთ ყველაფერი სიტყვების მოდელიზაციას. პირველად, ჩვენ ტეორეტიკურად ანალიზაცით ჩვენ კონტრესტიგური განსაზღვრება (NCE) ენის მოდელების შესახებ თავიდან ნორმალიზაცია. შემდეგ, ჩვენ ისინი ემპერიკურად მაქსიკურად დავიწყებთ, რომლებიც თავიდან ნორმალურებულია, გამოყენებული განსხვავებული რეგილარიზაციის გამოყენებით, და დავიწყებთ ჰიბრიდის მოდელს,  საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ საინტერესო ნორმალიზაცია და კომპლექტია შორის განსხვავებული განსხვავებული შეცდომაში, რომელიც შეიძლება გამოიყენება თავიდან ნორმალიზაციის ალგორიტემის გაუფლებისთვის.', 'mk': 'Самонормализирање на дискриминативните модели ја приближува нормализираната веројатност на класа без да мора да ја пресмета функцијата на поделба. Во контекст на моделирањето на јазиците, оваа сопственост е особено привлечна бидејќи може значително да ги намали времињата за трчање поради големите зборови. Во оваа студија, обезбедуваме комплетна истрага за самонормализација на моделот на јазикот. Прво, теоретски ги анализираме природните сопствености на самонормализацијата на јазичните модели за контрастивна проценка на шумата. Потоа, ги споредуваме емпирички со пристапите базирани на софтмакс, кои се самонормализирани користејќи експлицитна регуларизација, и предлагаме хибриден модел со убедливи сопствености. Конечно, откриваме изненадувачка негативна корелација помеѓу самонормализацијата и збунетоста низ целото, како и некоја регуларност во набљудуваните грешки, која може потенцијално да се користи за подобрување на алгоритмите за самонормализација во иднина.', 'kk': 'Бөлім функциясын есептеу үшін классының кәдімгі мүмкіндігін өзінің дискриминациялық үлгілерін өзінің нормализациялауы керек. Тілдерді моделдеу контексті, бұл қасиеті өзгеше жазылады, себебі ол үлкен сөздер сөздерінің үлкен уақыттарын азайту мүмкін. Бұл зерттеулерде тілдерді өз нормализациялау үшін толық зерттеулерді береміз. Біріншіден, теориялық түрде, дыбыс контрастық оқиға (NCE) тіл үлгілерінің негізгі өзінің нормализациялау қасиеттерін анализирақ. Содан кейін, біз оларды империялық максимум негіздеген жағдайлармен салыстырып, бұл өзімізді түсінікті түсініктермен қалыптастырып, гибрид үлгісін күшті қасиеттермен салыстырады. Соңында, өзімізді нормализациялау мен қорқыныштылық арасындағы кейбір қателердің қайшылығын түсіндіреміз. Бұл болашақта өзімізді нормализациялау алгоритмдерді жақсарту үшін қолданылатын кейбір қателердің қайшылығын түсі', 'ms': 'Model diskriminatif auto-normalisasi mengharapkan kemungkinan normalisasi kelas tanpa perlu menghitung fungsi sekatan. Dalam konteks pemodelan bahasa, ciri-ciri ini terutama menarik kerana ia boleh mengurangi masa berjalan secara signifikan disebabkan vocabulari perkataan besar. Dalam kajian ini, kami menyediakan penyelidikan yang meliputi tentang pemodelan bahasa sendiri-normalisasi. Pertama, secara teori, kita menganalisis ciri-ciri normalisasi diri yang ada dalam model bahasa Perkiraan Kontrastif Suara (NCE). Kemudian, kita membandingkannya secara empirik dengan pendekatan berdasarkan softmax, yang disesuaikan dengan menggunakan pengaturan secara eksplicit, dan menyarankan model hibrid dengan ciri-ciri yang meyakinkan. Finally, we uncover a surprising negative correlation between self-normalization and perplexity across the board, as well as some regularity in the observed errors, which may potentially be used for improving self-normalization algorithms in the future.', 'mn': 'Өөрийгөө хуваалцах загвар нь хуваалцах функцийг тооцоогүй хичээлийн энгийн магадлал ойролцоогоор байдаг. Холын үлгэр загварын тухайд энэ газрын шинж чанар ихэвчлэн сэтгэл хөдлөх болно. Яагаад гэвэл энэ нь том үг үлгээний шалтгааныг маш их багасгаж болох юм. Энэ судалгаанд бид хэл загварчлалын өөрсдийгөө нормализах тухай бүрэн судалгаа өгдөг. Эхлээд, бид теоретик хэлний хэл загваруудын өөрсдийгөө нормализацийн өөрсдийгөө шинжилгээ хийдэг. Дараа нь бид тэднийг эзэмшигтэй максимум суурилсан арга барилгуудтай харьцуулдаг. Энэ нь өөрсдийгөө тодорхой дүрслэлтэй хэрэглэдэг. Мөн гибрид загварыг гайхалтай чадвартай илэрхийлдэг. Эцэст нь бид өөрсдийгөө нормализах болон хувьсгалын хоорондоо гайхалтай сөрөг харилцааны холбоотой байдлыг олж мэднэ. Мөн харагдаж байгаа алгоритмын зарим шударга байдлыг олж мэднэ.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli diskriminattivi li jinnormalizzaw lilhom infushom approssimaw il-probabbiltà normalizzata ta’ klassi mingħajr ma jkollhom jikkalkulaw il-funzjoni tal-partizzjoni. Fil-kuntest tal-mudell tal-lingwi, din il-proprjetà hija partikolarment attraenti peress li tista’ tnaqqas b’mod sinifikanti l-ħinijiet ta’ tħaddim minħabba vokabulariji kbar tal-kliem. F’dan l-istudju, nagħtu investigazzjoni komprensiva dwar l-awtonormalizzazzjoni tal-mudell tal-lingwi. L-ewwel nett, teoretikament nagħmlu analiżi tal-proprjetajiet inerenti ta’ awtonormalizzazzjoni tal-mudelli lingwistiċi ta’ Stima Kontrastiva tal-Istorbju (NCE). Imbagħad, a ħna nqabbluhom empirikament ma’ approċċi bbażati fuq softmax, li huma awtonormalizzati bl-użu ta’ regolarizzazzjoni espliċita, u ssuġġerixxu mudell ibridu bi proprjetajiet konvinċenti. Fl-a ħħar nett, niskopru korrelazzjoni negattiva sorprendenti bejn l-awtonormalizzazzjoni u l-perplessità madwar id-dinja, kif ukoll xi regolarità fl-iżbalji osservati, li jistgħu potenzjalment jintużaw għat-titjib tal-algoritmi tal-awtonormalizzazzjoni fil-futur.', 'lt': 'Savanormalizuojantys diskriminaciniai modeliai apytikriai įvertina normalizuotą klasės tikimybę, nereikalaujant skaičiavimo funkcijos. Kalbos modeliavimo kontekste ši savybė ypač patraukli, nes dėl didelių žodžių žodynų gali gerokai sumažėti eksploatavimo laikas. Šiame tyrime atliekame išsamų kalbų modeliavimo savarankiškumo tyrimą. First, we theoretically analyze the inherent self-normalization properties of Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) language models.  Tada mes juos empiriškai palyginame su softmax grindžiamais metodais, kurie savanoriškai normalizuojami naudojant aiškią reguliarizaciją, ir siūlome hibridinį model į su įtikinamomis savybėmis. Galiausiai atskleidžiame nuostabią neigiamą savanormalizacijos ir apskrito perplexumo koreliaciją, taip pat tam tikrą pastebėtų klaidų reguliarumą, kuris ateityje gali būti naudojamas savanormalizacijos algoritmams gerinti.', 'pl': 'Samonormalizujące się modele dyskryminacyjne przybliżają znormalizowane prawdopodobieństwo klasy bez konieczności obliczania funkcji partycji. W kontekście modelowania językowego właściwość ta jest szczególnie atrakcyjna, ponieważ może znacznie skrócić czas pracy ze względu na duże słowniki słownicze. W niniejszym opracowaniu przeprowadzamy kompleksowe badanie autonormalizacji modelowania języka. Po pierwsze, teoretycznie analizujemy właściwości autonormalizacji modeli językowych Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE). Następnie porównujemy je empirycznie z podejściami opartymi na softmaksie, które są samonormalizowane za pomocą wyraźnej regularyzacji i sugerujemy model hybrydowy o przekonujących właściwościach. Wreszcie odkrywamy zaskakującą negatywną korelację pomiędzy samonormalizacją a zdezorientowaniem na całym szczeblu, a także pewną regularność obserwowanych błędów, które mogą być potencjalnie wykorzystane do poprawy algorytmów samonormalizacji w przyszłości.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യാസമുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാസിന്റെ സാധാരണ സാധ്യതയുള്ള സാധ്യതയുള്ള സാധ്യതയുള്ള സാ ഭാഷ മോഡലോഡിങ്ങിന്റെ പ്രകൃതി ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ സ്വയം സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കുന്നതിനെ പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം, നോയിസ് കോണ്ട്രാസ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d എസ്റ്റിമേഷന്\u200d (NCE) ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ ഉള്\u200dപ്പെട്ട സ്വാഭാവികമായ സ്വാഭാവിതവിശേഷതക പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d അവയെ സ്വാഭാവികമായി സമര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നത് മെക്സ്റ്റാക്സ് അടിസ്ഥാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വഴികളോടാണ്. അത് സ്വയം സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കുന അവസാനം, ബോര്\u200dഡില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d സ്വയം സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കുന്നതും പരിഭ്രമത്തിനും തമ്മിലുള്ള ഒരു അത്ഭുതപ്പെട്ട നെഗറിവ് ബന്ധവും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു, പിന്നീട് സ്വയം സ്വ', 'si': 'ස්වාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වෙනුව භාෂාව මොඩිලින්ගේ සම්බන්ධයෙන්, මේ විශේෂතාව විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධවෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් වැඩ වචන මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අපි භාෂාව ස්වාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණය ගැන සම්පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණයක් දෙන්නේ. මුලින්ම, අපි සාධාර්ථික විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා ස්වාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ කරනවා ස්වාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ කරනවා ස්වාමාන්\u200dය විශ ඊට පස්සේ, අපි ඔවුන්ව සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය විදියට සමාන්\u200dය විදි අන්තිමට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගත්තා ස්වාමාන්\u200dය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධතාවක් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හොයාගත්තා, සහ සාමාන්\u200dය සම්බන්ධතාවක්', 'no': 'Sjølvnormaliserer diskriminasjonsmodular omtrent den normaliserte sannsynligheten til ein klasse utan å rekna ut partisjonsfunksjonen. I konteksten av språk- modellering er denne eigenskapen spesielt tilleggleg, sidan han kan redusere køyringsdata på grunn av store ordordordordordlister. I denne studien gir vi ein komplett undersøking av språk som modeller selv-normalisering. Først analyserer vi teoretisk dei innhaldne selvnormaliseringseigenskapane for støykontrastivske estimaer (NCE). Så sammenlignar vi dei empirisk med måkkmaks-baserte tilnærmingar, som er sjølvnormalisert med eksplisitt regularisering, og foreslår ein hybridmodell med kompliserte eigenskapar. I slutt oppdager vi eit overraskende negativt korrelasjon mellom selvnormalisering og kompleksjon over brettet, og ein del regulært i de observerte feilene, som kan potensielt brukast for å forbedra algoritme for selvnormalisering i framtida.', 'ro': 'Modelele discriminatorii auto-normalizante aproximează probabilitatea normalizată a unei clase fără a fi nevoie să calculeze funcția de partiție. În contextul modelării limbajului, această proprietate este deosebit de atrăgătoare, deoarece poate reduce semnificativ timpii de rulare datorită vocabularelor mari de cuvinte. În acest studiu, oferim o investigație cuprinzătoare a auto-normalizării modelării limbajului. În primul rând, analizăm teoretic proprietățile inerente de auto-normalizare ale modelelor lingvistice de estimare contrastivă a zgomotului (NCE). Apoi, le comparăm empiric cu abordările bazate pe softmax, care sunt auto-normalizate folosind regularizarea explicită, și sugerăm un model hibrid cu proprietăți convingătoare. În cele din urmă, descoperim o corelație negativă surprinzătoare între auto-normalizare și perplexitate peste tot, precum și o anumită regularitate în erorile observate, care pot fi utilizate pentru îmbunătățirea algoritmilor de auto-normalizare în viitor.', 'sr': 'Samounormalizirajući diskriminacijski modeli približavaju normaliziranu verovatnoću klase, a ne moraju računati funkciju particije. U kontekstu modeliranja jezika, ova imovina je posebno privlačna jer može značajno smanjiti trčanje vremena zbog velikih rečnih rečnika. U ovoj studiji pružamo kompletnu istragu o samounormalizaciji jezika. Prvo, teoretički analiziramo inherentne vlasništvo samounormalizacije jezičkih modela kontrastivne procjene glasa (NCE). Onda ih uspoređujemo empirički sa softmax-baziranim pristupima, koji su sami normalizirani korištenjem ekskluzivne regularizacije, i predlažemo hibridni model sa prisiljnim vlasništvom. Na kraju, otkrili smo iznenađujuću negativnu korelaciju između samounormalizacije i perpleksije širom odbora, kao i određene redovitosti u promatranim grešakama, koja se možda koristi za poboljšanje algoritma samounormalizacije u budućnosti.', 'so': 'Tusaaladaha takoorida ee iskaa caadi ahaanshaha u dhiganaya sida caadiga ah ee fasalka aan loo xisaabin hawlaha qeybinta. Tusaale ahaan luuqada waxaa si gaar ah loo codsadaa hantidan, sababtoo ah waxay si weyn ugu yaraan kartaa booska lagu soconayo hadalka waaweyn dartiis. Waxbarashadan waxaynu sameynaa baaritaanka aasaasiga ah oo ku sameynaya tusaale ahaan iscaadi ah ee luqada. First, we theoretically analyze the inherent self-normalization properties of Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) language models.  Markaas waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qaababka hoose ee dhaqdhaqaaqa ah, kuwaas oo si gaar ah loo isticmaalayo qaab xuquuqda si cad ah, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa model hybrid oo ay leeyihiin hantida qasabka ah. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu muujinnaa xiriir naxaas ah oo u dhexeeya iskumarin-dhigista iyo shakhsiyaha, sidoo kale qaar ka mid ah qaladyada la arkay, taas oo suurtowda loo isticmaali karo si loo hagaajiyo kalgorgoriyaha nafta caadiga ah mustaqbalka.', 'sv': 'Självnormaliserande diskriminerande modeller approximerar den normaliserade sannolikheten för en klass utan att behöva beräkna partitionsfunktionen. I samband med språkmodellering är denna egenskap särskilt tilltalande eftersom den avsevärt kan minska körtiderna på grund av stora ordvokabulär. I denna studie ger vi en omfattande undersökning av språkmodellering självnormalisering. Först analyserar vi teoretiskt de inneboende självnormaliseringsegenskaperna hos Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) språkmodeller. Sedan jämför vi dem empiriskt med softmax-baserade metoder, som är självnormaliserade med explicit regularisering, och föreslår en hybridmodell med övertygande egenskaper. Slutligen avslöjar vi en överraskande negativ korrelation mellan självnormalisering och förvirring över hela linjen, liksom viss regelbundenhet i de observerade felen, som potentiellt kan användas för att förbättra självnormaliseringsalgoritmer i framtiden.', 'ta': 'பிரிப்பு செயல்பாட்டை கணக்கிடாமல் தன்னியக்க இயல்பாக்கும் வகுப்பின் இயல்பான சாத்தியமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. மொழி மாதிரி உருவாக்கத்தின் மூலம், இந்த பண்பு குறிப்பாக அழைக்கப்படுகிறது, ஏனெனில் அது பெரிய சொல்லாக்க சொல்லக்கூறுகள்  இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் மொழியின் மாதிரி தன்னை இயல்பாக்கத்தை மாதிரியும் ஒரு முழுமையான ஆய்வு  முதலில், நாம் மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரிகளின் உள்ளடக்கமான சாதாரண செயல்களை ஆராய்வோம். மென்னெழுத்து அடிப்படையான முறைமையை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். இறுதியில், நாம் போர்டில் உள்ள தன்னாட்சியமைப்பு மற்றும் பிரச்சனையின் இடையே ஒரு ஆச்சரியமான எதிர்மறை இணைப்பை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும், மற்றும் காண்பிக்கப்பட்', 'ur': 'پارتیشن فنس کا شمار بغیر کسی کلاس کے معمولی احتمال کے مطابق اپنے آپ کو بغیر عامل کرتا ہے۔ زبان موڈلینگ کے متعلق، یہ اموال مخصوص زیادہ اضافہ کر رہا ہے، کیونکہ یہ بڑے کلمات لکھنے کے باعث بڑی سخت آواز کی وجہ سے چلنے کی ضرورت سے کم کر سکتا ہے. اس مطالعہ میں، ہم زبان کی نمونیلیز کی تحقیق کریں گے۔ پہلے، ہم نظریہ طور پر صوت کنٹرسٹیف ارزیابی (NCE) زبان نمڈلوں کے صاحب خود-عامل کرنے کے خصوصے کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں. پھر ہم ان کو مضبوط طریقے سے مضبوط مضبوط طریقے کے مطابق مضبوط طریقے کے مطابق مقایسہ کرتے ہیں، جو صریح قانون کے مطابق اپنے آپ کو عامل کر رہے ہیں، اور مضبوط طریقے کے مطابق ایک ہیبریڈ موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں. بالآخر، ہم نے ایک عجیب منفی تعلق بورد کے درمیان اپنے اوپر نارمولیزی اور غلطی کے درمیان کھول دیا ہے، اور دیکھے ہوئے غلطیوں میں بعض معمولی تعلق، جو امید ہے کہ آیندہ میں اپنے اوپر نارمولیزی الگوریتم کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا جائے۔', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Tilning modeli muhitida, bu hususiyat maxsus soʻzlar soʻzlarning katta soʻzlar sababini ishga tushirish imkoniyatini kamaytirish mumkin. Bu o'rganida, biz o'zining o'zimni o'zimni o'zgartirish modelini o'rganamiz. Birinchi so'zda, biz Noise Contrastiv Estimatsiya (NCE) tili modellarining tarkibi o'zgarishning xossalarini aniqlamiz. Keyin biz ularni maksimal asosida o'xshash ko'rib turamiz, bu o'z o'zimni tahrirlash uchun o'zimni o'zimiz qo'llaniladi, va bir qanchalik qo'llanmalar bilan bir xil modelni tasavvur qilamiz. Endi, biz quyidagi o'zimga o'zimni o'zgartirish va murakkablik va ko'paytirilgan xatolarning bir necha oddiy bog'liqni ko'rsamiz, bu kelajakda o'zimni o'zgartirishga foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tự định dạng phân biệt ước lượng xác suất bình thường của một lớp mà không cần tính to án phân tách. Trong trường hợp tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ, tài sản này đặc biệt hấp dẫn vì nó có thể giảm đáng kể thời gian chạy vì từ lớn. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi cung cấp một cuộc điều tra đầy đủ về khả năng sinh học. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi phân tích về mặt lý thuyết các tính chất tự nhiên của mô hình ngôn ngữ khuếch đại nhiễu. Sau đó, chúng tôi so sánh bằng kinh nghiệm với các phương pháp dựa trên đa dạng mềm, mà tự bình thường bằng cách xác định rõ ràng, và gợi ý một mô hình lai có tính chất hấp dẫn. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi phát hiện ra mối tương quan âm bất ngờ giữa tự bình thường và phức tạp trên toàn cầu, cũng như có một số quy tắc trong các lỗi được ghi nhận, mà có thể được dùng để cải tiến các thuật toán tự bình thường trong tương lai.', 'da': 'Selvrealiserende diskriminerende modeller omtaler den normaliserede sandsynlighed for en klasse uden at skulle beregne partitionsfunktionen. I forbindelse med sprogmodellering er denne egenskab særligt attraktiv, da den kan reducere køretiden betydeligt på grund af store ordforråd. I dette studie giver vi en omfattende undersøgelse af sprogmodellering selv-normalisering. For det første analyserer vi teoretisk de iboende selv-normaliseringsegenskaber af støj kontrastive estimation (NCE) sprogmodeller. Derefter sammenligner vi dem empirisk med softmax-baserede tilgange, som er selv-normaliseret ved hjælp af eksplicit regulering, og foreslår en hybrid model med overbevisende egenskaber. Endelig afdækker vi en overraskende negativ korrelation mellem selvregulering og forvirring på tværs af linjen, samt en vis regelmæssighed i de observerede fejl, som potentielt kan bruges til at forbedre selvregulering algoritmer i fremtiden.', 'hr': 'Samounormalizirajući diskriminirajući modeli približavaju normaliziranu vjerojatnost klase, a ne moraju računati funkciju particije. U kontekstu modeliranja jezika, ova imovina je posebno privlačna jer može značajno smanjiti trčanje vrijeme zbog velikih riječi riječi. U ovom ispitivanju pružamo sveobuhvatnu istragu o samounormalizaciji jezika. Prvo, teoretički analiziramo sadržajne vlasništvo samounormalizacije jezičkih modela kontrastivnih procjena glasa (NCE). Onda ih uspoređujemo empirički sa softmax-baziranim pristupima, koji su sami normalizirani koristeći izravnu regularizaciju, i predlažemo hibridni model s prisiljnim vlasništvom. Na kraju, otkrili smo iznenađujuću negativnu korelaciju između samounormalizacije i perpleksije širom odbora, kao i određene redovitosti u promatranim greškama, koja se može potencijalno koristiti za poboljšanje algoritma samounormalizacije u budućnosti.', 'nl': 'Zelfnormaliserende discriminatieve modellen benaderen de genormaliseerde waarschijnlijkheid van een klasse zonder de partitiefunctie te hoeven berekenen. In de context van taalmodellering is deze eigenschap bijzonder aantrekkelijk omdat het de looptijden aanzienlijk kan verminderen als gevolg van grote woordwoordenschaten. In deze studie bieden we een uitgebreid onderzoek naar zelfnormalisatie van taalmodellering. Eerst analyseren we theoretisch de inherente zelfnormalisatie eigenschappen van Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) taalmodellen. Vervolgens vergelijken we ze empirisch met softmax-gebaseerde benaderingen, die zelfgenormaliseerd worden door expliciete regularisatie, en suggereren we een hybride model met overtuigende eigenschappen. Tot slot ontdekken we een verrassende negatieve correlatie tussen zelfnormalisatie en verwarring over de hele linie, evenals enige regelmaat in de waargenomen fouten, die potentieel kunnen worden gebruikt voor het verbeteren van zelfnormalisatie algoritmen in de toekomst.', 'bg': 'Саморазвиващите се дискриминационни модели приближават нормализираната вероятност на клас, без да се налага да се изчислява функцията за дял. В контекста на езиковото моделиране, това свойство е особено привлекателно, тъй като може значително да намали времето за изпълнение поради големите речници на думи. В това проучване предлагаме цялостно изследване на езиковото моделиране на самонормализацията. Първо, теоретично анализираме присъщите свойства на самонормализиране на езиковите модели за шумова контрастивна оценка (ННК). След това ги сравняваме емпирично с базирани на софтмакс подходи, които се самонормализират с помощта на изрична регулировка, и предлагаме хибриден модел със завладяващи свойства. И накрая, откриваме изненадваща негативна корелация между самонормализацията и объркването, както и известна редовност в наблюдаваните грешки, които потенциално могат да бъдат използвани за подобряване на алгоритмите за самонормализиране в бъдеще.', 'de': 'Selbstnormalisierende diskriminierende Modelle nähern sich der normalisierten Wahrscheinlichkeit einer Klasse an, ohne die Partitionsfunktion berechnen zu müssen. Im Kontext der Sprachmodellierung ist diese Eigenschaft besonders attraktiv, da sie aufgrund großer Wortvokabulare Laufzeiten signifikant reduzieren kann. In dieser Studie liefern wir eine umfassende Untersuchung der Selbstnormalisierung der Sprachmodellierung. Zunächst analysieren wir theoretisch die inhärenten Selbstnormalisierungseigenschaften von Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE)-Sprachmodellen. Anschließend vergleichen wir sie empirisch mit softmax-basierten Ansätzen, die mittels expliziter Regularisierung selbstnormalisiert werden, und schlagen ein hybrides Modell mit überzeugenden Eigenschaften vor. Schließlich decken wir eine überraschend negative Korrelation zwischen Selbstnormalisierung und Verwirrung auf, sowie einige Regelmäßigkeiten in den beobachteten Fehlern, die möglicherweise für die Verbesserung von Selbstnormalisierungsalgorithmen in der Zukunft verwendet werden könnten.', 'id': 'Model diskriminatif auto-normalisasi mendekati kemungkinan normalisasi kelas tanpa harus menghitung fungsi partisi. Dalam konteks model bahasa, properti ini sangat menarik karena dapat mengurangi waktu berjalan dengan signifikan karena kata-kata besar. Dalam penelitian ini, kami menyediakan penyelidikan komprensif tentang model bahasa sendiri-normalisasi. Pertama, secara teori kami menganalisis properti normalisasi diri inherent dari model bahasa Perkiraan Kontrastif Suara (NCE). Kemudian, kita membandingkan mereka secara empiris dengan pendekatan berdasarkan softmax, yang sendiri-normalisasi menggunakan regularisasi eksplicit, dan menyarankan model hibrid dengan properti yang meyakinkan. Finally, we uncover a surprising negative correlation between self-normalization and perplexity across the board, as well as some regularity in the observed errors, which may potentially be used for improving self-normalization algorithms in the future.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای جدایی خود را به خودش عادت می\u200cکند که احتمال عادت یک کلاس را بدون مجبور به محاسبه تابع جدایی محاسبه می\u200cکند. در محیط مدل زبانی، این ویژگی به خصوص آزاد کننده است، زیرا ممکن است زمان اجرا را به دلیل کلمات بزرگ کاهش دهد. در این مطالعه، ما یک تحقیقات کامل در مورد نمونه\u200cسازی زبان خود را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. اول، ما به نظر تئوری ویژگی\u200cهای خودسازی از مدل\u200cهای زبان (NCE) تخمین کنترل صدا را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. سپس، ما آنها را به طور مغربی با روش\u200cهای نرم\u200cماکس بنیاد مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، که از استفاده از روش\u200cسازی\u200cهای معمولی خودشان عادی می\u200cشوند، و یک مدل هیبرید با ویژگی\u200cهای مجبور می\u200cکنند. بالاخره، ما یک ارتباط متعجب منفی بین نورمنیزی خودش و پیچیدگی در کنار کشور کشف کردیم، و بعضی از معمولی در اشتباه های مشاهده شده، که ممکن است برای بهترین الگوریتم\u200cهای خودنورمنیزی در آینده استفاده شود.', 'ko': '자체 규범화 판별 모델은 배분 함수를 계산하지 않는 상황에서 같은 규범화 확률과 비슷하다.언어 모델링의 상하문에서 이 속성은 특히 매력적이다. 왜냐하면 어휘량이 많기 때문에 운행 시간을 현저하게 줄일 수 있기 때문이다.본 연구에서 우리는 언어 모델링의 자체 규범화에 대해 전면적인 연구를 진행했다.우선, 우리는 이론적으로 소음 대비 추정(NCE) 언어 모델의 고유한 자체 규범화 특성을 분석했다.그 다음에 우리는 이것들을softmax를 바탕으로 하는 방법과 경험을 비교했고 후자는 현식 정규화를 사용하여 자체 규범화를 했고 믿을 만한 특성을 가진 혼합 모델을 제시했다.마지막으로 우리는 자규범화와 곤혹 사이의 놀라운 마이너스 관계, 그리고 관찰된 오류 중의 일부 규칙성을 제시했다. 이것은 미래의 자규범화 알고리즘을 개선하는 데 사용될 것이다.', 'sw': 'Ujenzi wa kujikawaida wa mifano ya ubaguzi unakaribia uwezekano wa kawaida wa darasa bila bila kushindwa kuhesabu shughuli za kushirikiana. Katika mukhtadha wa mifano ya lugha, mali hii inaitikia hasa kwa sababu inaweza kupunguza mara nyingi kwa sababu ya maneno makubwa. Katika utafiti huu, tunatoa uchunguzi wa kina wa mifano ya lugha ya kujitegemea. Kwanza, tunachambua kwa nadharia utafiti wa kujikawaida wa mifano ya lugha ya asili ya Ujadala (NCE). Kisha, tunafananisha kwa makini na mbinu za msingi, ambazo zinajilazimisha wenyewe kwa kutumia utaratibu wa wazi, na tunapendekeza modeli ya hybrid yenye utajiri wa kulazimisha. Finally, we uncover a surprising negative correlation between self-normalization and perplexity across the board, as well as some regularity in the observed errors, which may potentially be used for improving self-normalization algorithms in the future.', 'tr': 'Öz normaliziýan diskriminçylyk nusgalary bir klasyň normaliziýan mümkinçiligini takyklaýar. Diller modelleýän sahypalarda, bu häsiýeti uly sözler üçin eserden wagtyny azaltyp biler. Bu araşdyrymda dil modelleýän özüni daşary bir soragy berýäris. Ilkinji gezek, biz teoriýaly çykyş güýçli çykyş dili nusgalarynyň içine özüni normalizasyon hasaplanýarys Soňra biz olary empirik bilen ýuwaşlyk tabanly ýakynlaşdyrylýarys. Bu öz-özüne düzgün düzgün ýakynlaşdyrylýar we hybrid modelini nähili häsiýetlere gollaşdyrylýar. Soňunda, biz öz-normaliziýanyň we çykyşlygyň arasynda gaty ýaramaýan täsir bir whakarlaýyşyny a çdyk, we gözlenen hatalaryň käbir düzgünliklerini açdyk. Bu gelejekde özüni normaliziýan algoritmalaryny gelişmek üçin ullanýar.', 'af': "Selfnormaliseerde diskriminasiewe modele omtrent die normaliseerde waarskynlik van 'n klas sonder om die partisie funksie te bereken. In die konteks van taal modellering, is hierdie eienskap spesifieke aangeroep omdat dit kan betekeurig verduur hardlooptyd vanweë groot woord woordewoordeboeke. In hierdie studie, verskaf ons 'n komplettende ondersoek van taal modeling self-normalisering. Eerste, ons teorieese analiseer die inherende self-normalisering eienskappe van ruis kontrastiewe estimatie (NCE) taal modele. Dan vergelyk ons hulle empiriese met sagte maks-gebaseerde toegang, wat self-normaliseer word deur eksplisiese regularisasie te gebruik en voorstel 'n hibride model met kompliseerde eienskappe. Eindelik ontdek ons 'n verwonderende negatiewe korrelasie tussen self-normalisering en perpleksie oor die bord, en ook sommige geregtigheid in die aansigte foute, wat dalk potensieel gebruik word vir die verbetering van self-normalisering algoritme in die toekoms.", 'sq': 'Vet-normalizimi i modeleve diskriminuese përafërson probabilitetin e normalizuar të një klase pa pasur nevojë për të llogaritur funksionin e ndarjes. Në kontekstin e modelimit gjuhësor, kjo pronë është veçanërisht tërheqëse pasi ajo mund të reduktojë ndjeshëm kohët e zbatimit për shkak të fjalëkalimeve të mëdha. Në këtë studim, ne ofrojmë një hetim të përgjithshëm të modelimit të gjuhës vetë-normalizim. Së pari, ne teorikisht analizojmë pronësitë e vetë-normalizimit të natyrshme të modeleve gjuhërore të Shkatësimit Kontrastiv të Zhurmës (NCE). Pastaj, ne i krahasojmë a to empirikisht me metodat e softmax-it, të cilat janë të normalizuara vetë duke përdorur rregullimin eksplicit, dhe sugjerojmë një model hibridik me prona të bindshme. Më në fund, zbulojmë një korrelacion negativ surprizues midis vetë-normalizimit dhe perplexitetit anembanë bordit, si dhe disa rregullësi në gabimet e vëzhguara, të cilat mund të përdoren potencialisht për përmirësimin e algoritmeve të vetë-normalizimit në të ardhmen.', 'am': 'የክፍል функсия ሳይቆጠር የክፍለ ጥያቄ የክፍል ምናልባት የክፍለ ክፍል በተለየ ራሳቸው የተለየ እና የተለያየ ሞዴላዎችን በማስተካከል ነው፡፡ የቋንቋ ምሳሌ በመግለጫ፣ ይህ property በተለየ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ In this study, we provide a comprehensive investigation of language modeling self-normalization.  በመጀመሪያው፣ የኖይስ Contrastive Estimation (NCE) ቋንቋዎች ምሳሌዎች የሚኖረውን የራሳዊውን ምርጫዎች አስተያይተናል፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ እናሳስፋቸዋለን፡፡ በመጨረሻው፣ በሳንዳው ሁሉ መካከል ራሳዊነቱን እና በጭንቀት እና በተመለከተው ስሕተት መካከል የሚያስደነግጥ የnegative ግንኙነት እና በተመለከተው ስሕተት እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Ինքնանորմալ խտրականության մոդելները մոտավորում են դասարանի նորմալ հավանականությունը առանց հարկավոր հաշվարկել բաժանման ֆունկցիան: Լեզու մոդելավորման կոնտեքստում այս հատկությունը հատկապես գրավիչ է, քանի որ այն կարող է նշանակալի նվազեցնել աշխատանքի ժամանակը բառերի մեծ բառերի պատճառով: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք լեզվի մոդելավորման ինքնանորմալ ուսումնասիրություն: First, we theoretically analyze the inherent self-normalization properties of Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) language models.  Հետո, մենք համեմատում ենք դրանք էմպիրիկ կերպով փափութմաքսի հիմնված մոտեցումների հետ, որոնք ինքնանորմալ են օգտագործելով բացահայտ ռեգորիզացիա, և առաջարկում են հիբրիդ մոդել, որը համոզիչ հատկություններ ունի: Վերջապես, մենք բացահայտում ենք զարմանալի բացասական հաղորդակցվածություն ինքնանորմալիզացիայի և ամբողջ խառնաշփոթի միջև, ինչպես նաև տեսված սխալների որոշ կանոնավոր լինելու համար, որը կարող է պոտենցիալ օգտագործվել ինքնանորմալիզացիայի ալգորիթմների զարգացման', 'az': 'Öz-normalizəyən diskriminat modelləri, partisiya funksiyasını hesablamadan, dəstənin normalizə mümkünlüyünü yaxınlaşdırır. Dil modellərinin məlumatında, bu xüsusiyyət böyük sözlər sözlərinə görə çalışma zamanı çox azaltır. Bu təhsil içində, dil modellərinin özünü normalizasyon barəsində büsbütün təhsil veririk. İlk dəfə, biz teoriki olaraq səs kontrastif hesablama (NCE) dil modellerinin özünün normalizasyonu özlərini analiz edirik. Sonra, biz onları empirik olaraq yumuşaqlıq tabanlı tərzlərinə qarşılaşdırırıq. Bu, a çıq-aydın düzgünlük vasitəsilə özünü normalizləndirir və bir hibrid modelini zorla təsirləndirir. Sonunda, özünün normalizasyonu və karşılıqlığı arasında təəccüblü negatif bir bağlantısı və gözlənmiş hataların bəzi düzgünlüyü a çıq-aşkar görürük. Bu, belə olaraq gələcəkdə özünün normalizasyonu algoritmini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün istifadə edilə bilər.', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিকভাবে বৈষম্যের মডেল স্বাভাবিকভাবে স্বাভাবিকভাবে বিভক্ত করা হচ্ছে একটি ক্লাসের স্বাভাবিক সম্ভাবনার সম ভাষার মডেলিং এর প্রেক্ষাপটে, এই সম্পত্তি বিশেষ করে আপীলিকার কারণ এটি বিশাল শব্দভাণ্ডারের কারণে চালানো বার কমে যাবে। এই গবেষণায় আমরা ভাষার স্বাভাবিক স্বাভাবিকভাবে স্বাভাবিকভাবে গণনা করার একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তদন্ত দ প্রথমত, আমরা স্বাভাবিকভাবে ভাষার মডেল বিশ্লেষণ করি নোইস কন্ট্রেসিটিভ অ্যাস্টিমেশন (এনসিআই)। তারপর আমরা তাদের সফটম্যাক্স ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতির সাথে তুলনা করি, যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নিয়মিত নিয়মিত ব্যবহার করে স্বাভাবিকভাবে স্বাভাবিক করে এবং  অবশেষে, আমরা বোর্ডের স্বাভাবিক স্বাভাবিক এবং বিভ্রান্তির মধ্যে একটি বিস্ময়কর নেতিবাচক সম্পর্ক আবিষ্কার করি, আর দেখা যাচ্ছে ভুলের কিছু নিয়মিত, যা ভবিষ্যতে আত্', 'ca': "Models discriminatius auto-normalitzants aproximan la probabilitat normalitzada d'una classe sense haver de calcular la funció de partició. In the context of language modeling, this property is particularly appealing as it may significantly reduce run-times due to large word vocabularies.  En aquest estudi, proporcionem una investigació completa sobre l'autonormalització del modelat de llenguatges. En primer lloc, teòricament analitzem les propietats inherents de l'autonormalització dels models de llenguatge de l'Estima Contrastiva del Soroll. Llavors els comparam empíricament amb els enfocaments basats en tmax, que s'auto-normalitzen fent servir una regularització explícita, i suggerem un model híbrid amb propietats convincents. Finalment, descobrim una sorprenent correlació negativa entre l'auto-normalització i la perplexitat a tot arreu, i alguna regularitat en els errors observats, que poden ser utilitzats potencialment per millorar els algoritmes d'auto-normalització en el futur.", 'et': 'Enesenormaliseerivad diskrimineerivad mudelid lähendavad klassi normaliseeritud tõenäosust ilma partitsioonifunktsiooni arvutamata. Keele modelleerimise kontekstis on see omadus eriti atraktiivne, kuna see võib märkimisväärselt vähendada töötamisaegu suurte sõnavara tõttu. Käesolevas uuringus pakume põhjalikku uuringut keele modelleerimise isenormaliseerimise kohta. Esiteks analüüsime teoreetiliselt müra kontrastiivse hindamise (NCE) keelemudelite iseloomulikke isenormaliseerimisomadusi. Seejärel võrdleme neid empiiriliselt softmax-il põhinevate lähenemisviisidega, mis on isenormaliseeritud selgesõnalise regulariseerimise abil, ning pakume välja hübriidmudeli, millel on veenvad omadused. Lõpuks avastame üllatava negatiivse korrelatsiooni enesenormiseerumise ja segaduse vahel üldiselt, samuti täheldatud vigade korrapärasuse, mida võib tulevikus kasutada enesenormiseerimise algoritmide parandamiseks.', 'bs': 'Samounormalizirajući diskriminirajući modeli približavaju normaliziranu verovatnoću klase, a ne moraju računati funkciju particije. U kontekstu modeliranja jezika, ova imovina je posebno privlačna jer može značajno smanjiti trčanje vremena zbog velikih rečenica. U ovoj studiji pružamo kompletnu istragu o samounormalizaciji jezika. Prvo, teoretički analiziramo sadržajne vlasništvo samounormalizacije jezičkih modela kontrastivne procjene glasa (NCE). Onda ih uspoređujemo empirički sa softmax-baziranim pristupima, koji su sami normalizirani koristeći eksplicitnu regularizaciju, i predlažemo hibridni model sa prisiljnim vlasništvom. Na kraju, otkrili smo iznenađujuću negativnu korelaciju između samounormalizacije i perpleksije širom odbora, kao i određene redovitosti u promatranim grešakama, koja se možda koristi za poboljšanje algoritma samounormalizacije u budućnosti.', 'fi': 'Itsenormalisoituvat diskriminatiiviset mallit lähentävät luokan normalisoitua todennäköisyyttä ilman osiofunktiota. Kielimallinnan yhteydessä tämä ominaisuus on erityisen houkutteleva, koska se voi merkittävästi lyhentää käyttöaikoja suurten sanasanastojen vuoksi. Tässä tutkimuksessa tarjoamme kattavan tutkimuksen kielen mallinnuksen itsenormalisoinnista. Ensin analysoimme teoreettisesti Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE) -kielimallien luontaisia itsenormalisoitumisominaisuuksia. Tämän jälkeen vertaamme niitä empiirisesti softmax-pohjaisiin lähestymistapoihin, jotka normalisoidaan eksplisiittisellä säännöstelyllä, ja ehdotamme hybridimallia, jolla on pakottavia ominaisuuksia. Lopuksi löydämme yllättävän negatiivisen korrelaation itsensä normalisoinnin ja hämmennyksen välillä sekä jonkin verran säännöllisyyttä havaituissa virheissä, joita voidaan mahdollisesti käyttää itsenormalisoinnin algoritmien parantamiseen tulevaisuudessa.', 'cs': 'Samonormalizující diskriminační modely přibližují normalizovanou pravděpodobnost třídy bez nutnosti vypočítat funkci oddílu. V kontextu jazykového modelování je tato vlastnost obzvláště atraktivní, neboť může výrazně zkrátit běžné doby kvůli velkým slovním slovníkům. V této studii poskytujeme komplexní výzkum autonormalizace jazykového modelování. Nejprve teoreticky analyzujeme vlastnosti autonormalizace modelů šumu Contrastive Estimation (NCE). Následně je empiricky porovnáme s přístupy založenými na softmaxu, které jsou samononormalizovány pomocí explicitní regularizace, a navrhneme hybridní model s přesvědčivými vlastnostmi. Nakonec odhalujeme překvapivou negativní korelaci mezi sebeonormalizací a zmateností v celé řadě, stejně jako určitou pravidelnost pozorovaných chyb, které mohou být potenciálně využity pro zlepšení algoritmů autonormalizace v budoucnu.', 'sk': 'Samonormalizirajoči diskriminativni modeli približujejo normalizirano verjetnost razreda, ne da bi bilo treba izračunati funkcijo particije. V kontekstu jezikovnega modeliranja je ta lastnost še posebej privlačna, saj lahko bistveno skrajša čas izvajanja zaradi velikih besednih besednih besedil. V tej študiji predstavljamo celovito raziskavo samonormalizacije jezikovnega modeliranja. Najprej teoretično analiziramo neločljive lastnosti samonormalizacije jezikovnih modelov Noise Contrastive Estimation (NCE). Nato jih empirično primerjamo s pristopi, ki temeljijo na softmax-u, ki se samonormalizirajo z eksplicitno ureditvijo, in predlagamo hibridni model s prepričljivimi lastnostmi. Nazadnje odkrivamo presenetljivo negativno korelacijo med samonormalizacijo in zmedenostjo po vsej plošči ter nekaj pravilnosti opaženih napak, ki se lahko potencialno uporabljajo za izboljšanje samonormalizacijskih algoritmov v prihodnosti.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis A cikin wannan lõkaci, Munã samar da wani abu na kamfata da misalin harshe masu motsi da faransa. Kayyan da, za mu yi anayyar cikin takardar da ke cikin tsari na masu tsari da ke cikin salon na'urar-raye na Nose Contrastive estimation (NCE). Sa'an nan kuma, Munã samfane su zuwa ga hanyoyin mafĩfi, masu kamfani da su ne mafiya so, waɗand a ke faransa da yin amfani da Rudinci mai bayyane, kuma Munã shawarar da misalin ya ya yi kybri da dũkiyõyi da za'a lazimta. Haƙĩƙa, za mu gane wata danganiya mai ban sha'awa a tsakanin kangara da mai shakka a kowace mulkin, da kuma da wasu ruɓanci a cikin karkaci da aka gane, abin da ke iya yiwuwa za'a yi amfani da wajen kyautata algoritori masu normal a gaba ga.", 'he': 'דוגמנים דיסקרטיביים נורמלים עצמיים מתקרבים לסבירות נורמלית של כיתה מבלי לחשב את הפונקציה של המחלקה. In the context of language modeling, this property is particularly appealing as it may significantly reduce run-times due to large word vocabularies.  במחקר הזה, אנו מספקים חקירה מורכבת של דוגמניות שפה נורמליזציה עצמית. ראשית, אנו ניתוח תיאורטית את תכונות הנורמליזציה עצמית הנכונות של דוגמני שפת ההערכה נגד רעש (NCE). ואז, אנחנו משוותים אותם באמפריה לגישויים מבוססים על softmax, שהם נורמלים בעצמם באמצעות קבועה ברורה, ומצייעים מודל היברידי עם תכונות משכנעים. סוף סוף, אנו מגלים קשר שלילי מפתיע בין נורמליזציה עצמית לבלבלות ברחבי העולם, כמו גם קבועות מסויימת בטעויות המבוחנות, שאולי אפשרי להשתמש בשיפור אלגוריתם נורמליזציה עצמית בעתיד.', 'jv': 'Self-Normal Attribute Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné ngerewake perusahaan akeh kapan-perusahaan anyar denggal sêmên. Awak dhéwé, kéné theoretik yang dipertulisi uwong kelangan priwatisakno ning kelangan kelangan nggawe Noire contraststive (NKE). politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Lha wih-wih, awak dhéwé ngerasai perusahaan langgar sampeyan nêmên karo perusahaan karo perusahaan kuwi nggawe gedhéwé, lan tambah apik perusahaan kanggo ngerasai perusahaan langgar sampeyan. Soalé, iso nguasai perusahaan langgar sampeyan kanggo ngerasai perusahaan sugirra awak dhéwé.', 'bo': 'རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་discriminationམིག སྐད་ཡིག་རྣམ་པ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་སྐབས་ཡིག་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུ་དངོས་འདི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆོས ལྟ་བ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་མིན་བཟོ་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྡན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དང་པོ་ལྟར། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རང་ཉིད་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དེ་དག་ནི་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དང་མཉེན་ཡུལ་བའི་གནད་དོན་དང་རང་ཉིད་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་བྱེད་སྤྱད་ནས་ཆོས མཐའ་མར་མ་དེ། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དང་བློ་གཏོང་ཁང་གི་བར་ཁྱད་པར་མེད་པའི་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་འབྲེལ་ཞིག་གི་ནང་དུ་བྱུང་ཡོད་པའི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ལ་ཞིག་དཔྱད་ཡོད'}
{'en': 'Dynamic Feature Selection with Attention in Incremental Parsing', 'ar': 'تحديد الميزة الديناميكي مع الانتباه في التحليل التزايدي', 'es': 'Selección dinámica de funciones con atención en el análisis incremental', 'pt': 'Seleção de recursos dinâmicos com atenção na análise incremental', 'fr': "Sélection dynamique de fonctions avec attention lors de l'analyse incrémentielle", 'zh': '在增量解析中,留意特征', 'ja': 'インクリメンタル解析で注意を払った動的な機能選択', 'ru': 'Динамический выбор функций с учетом инкрементного анализа', 'hi': 'वृद्धिशील पार्सिंग में ध्यान के साथ डायनेमिक सुविधा चयन', 'ga': 'Roghnú Gné Dinimiciúla le Aird sa Pharsáil Incriminteach', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Dinamikus funkciókiválasztás növekvő értelmezésben figyelemmel', 'el': 'Δυναμική επιλογή χαρακτηριστικών με προσοχή στην αυξανόμενη ανάλυση', 'it': "Selezione dinamica delle caratteristiche con attenzione nell'analisi incrementale", 'lt': 'Dinaminės savybės pasirinkimas, atkreipiant dėmesį į didėjantį analizavimą', 'mk': 'Динамички избор на фигурности со внимание во зголеменото анализирање', 'kk': 'Динамикалық қасиеттерді таңдау үлкен талдау үшін', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നതിനോടൊപ്പം ഡൈനാമിക് വിശേഷത ത തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുക', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн шинжлэх ухааны сонголт', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Dynamiczny wybór funkcji z uwagą w parowaniu przyrostowym', 'ro': 'Selectarea dinamică a caracteristicilor cu atenție în analizarea incrementală', 'sr': 'Избор динамичних функција с внимањем у увеличеним разгледањем', 'si': 'විශාල විශාලනයේ අවධානය සඳහා විශේෂතාව තෝරාගන්න', 'so': 'Doorashada xuquuqda dynamics with Attention in Incremental Parsing', 'ms': 'Pemilihan Feature Dinamik dengan Perhatian dalam Penghuraian Incremental', 'mt': 'Għażla Dinamika tal-Karatteristiċi b’Attenzjoni fl-Analiżi Akkumentali', 'sv': 'Dynamisk funktionsval med uppmärksamhet vid inkrementell tolkning', 'ta': 'அதிகபட்ச பாடலில் கவனத்துடன் தேர்வு', 'ur': 'بڑھائی پارسینگ میں غور سے ڈینامیک فوکتر انتخاب', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chọn động cơ động động động động năng có chú ý phân tích.', 'nl': 'Dynamische selectie van functies met aandacht bij incrementele parsing', 'bg': 'Динамичен избор на функции с внимание при нарастващо анализиране', 'hr': 'Izabranje dinamičke funkcije s pažnjom u povećanom razmatranju', 'da': 'Dynamisk funktionsvalg med opmærksomhed ved inkrementel fortolkning', 'fa': 'انتخاب خصوصیت دینامیک با توجه در تحلیل افزایش', 'ko': '증량 문법 분석에서 주의할 만한 동적 특징 선택', 'de': 'Dynamische Feature-Auswahl mit Aufmerksamkeit beim inkrementellen Parsing', 'id': 'Pemilihan Feature Dinamik Dengan Perhatian dalam Penganalisan Incremental', 'tr': 'Ullanyş Taýýarlama bilen dinamik Mazmunlar Saýlaw', 'af': 'Dinamiese Funksie Keuse met Aangaande in Inkremental Toesteling', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja dinamike e funksionit me vëmendje në analizimin rritës', 'sw': 'Uchaguzi wa Taifa za Kidynamic with Attention in Increme Parsing', 'am': 'dynamics-action', 'az': 'Dinamik Özellik Seçimi', 'bn': 'বৃদ্ধিমান পার্সিং এর সাথে মনোযোগ দিয়ে ডাইনামিক বৈশিষ্ট্য নির্বাচন', 'hy': 'Comment', 'et': 'Dünaamiline funktsioonide valik koos tähelepanuga järkjärgulisel parsimisel', 'bs': 'Izabranje dinamičkih funkcija sa pažnjom u povećanom razmatranju', 'ca': "Selecció dinàmica de característiques amb atenció en l'analització incremental", 'cs': 'Dynamický výběr funkcí s pozorností při inkrementálním analýzování', 'fi': 'Dynamic Feature Selection with Attention in Incremental Parsing', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'sk': 'Dinamična izbira funkcij s pozornostjo pri postopnem razčlenjanju', 'ha': 'Dynamic Feature Selection with Attention in Incremental Parsing', 'he': 'בחרת תכונות דינמיות עם תשומת לב בפרסיקות מגדלות', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ་བཤད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གདམ་པ'}
{'en': 'One main challenge for incremental transition-based parsers, when future inputs are invisible, is to extract good features from a limited local context. In this work, we present a simple technique to maximally utilize the local features with an attention mechanism, which works as context- dependent dynamic feature selection. Our model learns, for example, which tokens should a parser focus on, to decide the next action. Our multilingual experiment shows its effectiveness across many languages. We also present an experiment with augmented test dataset and demon- strate it helps to understand the model’s behavior on locally ambiguous points.', 'ar': 'يتمثل أحد التحديات الرئيسية للمحللين التزايديين المعتمدين على الانتقال ، عندما تكون المدخلات المستقبلية غير مرئية ، في استخراج ميزات جيدة من سياق محلي محدود. في هذا العمل ، نقدم تقنية بسيطة للاستفادة القصوى من الميزات المحلية مع آلية الانتباه ، والتي تعمل كاختيار ميزة ديناميكية تعتمد على السياق. يتعلم نموذجنا ، على سبيل المثال ، الرموز المميزة التي يجب أن يركز عليها المحلل اللغوي ، لتحديد الإجراء التالي. تُظهر تجربتنا متعددة اللغات فعاليتها عبر العديد من اللغات. نقدم أيضًا تجربة باستخدام مجموعة بيانات اختبار معزز ونوضح أنها تساعد على فهم سلوك النموذج في النقاط الغامضة محليًا.', 'fr': "L'un des principaux défis des analyseurs basés sur la transition incrémentielle, lorsque les entrées futures sont invisibles, est d'extraire les bonnes fonctionnalités d'un contexte local limité. Dans ce travail, nous présentons une technique simple pour utiliser au maximum les caractéristiques locales avec un mécanisme d'attention, qui fonctionne comme une sélection dynamique de caractéristiques dépendante du contexte. Notre modèle apprend, par exemple, sur quels jetons un analyseur doit se concentrer pour décider de l'action suivante. Notre expérience multilingue montre son efficacité dans de nombreuses langues. Nous présentons également une expérience avec un jeu de données de test augmenté et démontrons qu'elle aide à comprendre le comportement du modèle sur des points localement ambigus.", 'es': 'Un desafío principal para los analizadores incrementales basados en transiciones, cuando las entradas futuras son invisibles, es extraer buenas características de un contexto local limitado. En este trabajo, presentamos una técnica simple para utilizar al máximo las características locales con un mecanismo de atención, que funciona como una selección dinámica de características dependiente del contexto. Nuestro modelo aprende, por ejemplo, en qué tokens debe centrarse un analizador para decidir la siguiente acción. Nuestro experimento multilingüe demuestra su eficacia en muchos idiomas. También presentamos un experimento con un conjunto de datos de pruebas aumentadas y demostramos que ayuda a comprender el comportamiento del modelo en puntos localmente ambiguos.', 'pt': 'Um desafio principal para analisadores baseados em transição incremental, quando entradas futuras são invisíveis, é extrair bons recursos de um contexto local limitado. Neste trabalho, apresentamos uma técnica simples para utilizar ao máximo as características locais com um mecanismo de atenção, que funciona como uma seleção dinâmica de características dependente do contexto. Nosso modelo aprende, por exemplo, em quais tokens um analisador deve se concentrar para decidir a próxima ação. Nosso experimento multilíngue mostra sua eficácia em muitos idiomas. Também apresentamos um experimento com conjunto de dados de teste aumentado e demonstramos que ele ajuda a entender o comportamento do modelo em pontos localmente ambíguos.', 'ja': '将来の入力が見えない場合の、インクリメンタル遷移ベースの構文解析器の主な課題の1つは、限られたローカルコンテキストから優れた機能を抽出することです。この研究では、文脈依存の動的特徴選択として機能する注意メカニズムを備えたローカル特徴を最大限に活用するための単純な手法を提示する。たとえば、次のアクションを決定するために、構文解析器がフォーカスするべきトークンを学習します。当社の多言語実験は、多くの言語でその有効性を示しています。また、拡張テストデータセットの実験を提示します。これは、局所的に曖昧な点でのモデルの挙動を理解するのに役立ちます。', 'zh': '方来之输不可见,盖增量之解析器临一主于有限之上下文也。 凡此诸术,以大度乘局,以上下文相关。 如吾模样解析器何所关令牌,以定操作。 多言实验见多种语言中有效性。 又立一用增测试数据集 demon-strate 之实验,助解模形于局糊点之行。', 'hi': 'वृद्धिशील संक्रमण-आधारित पार्सर के लिए एक मुख्य चुनौती, जब भविष्य के इनपुट अदृश्य होते हैं, तो सीमित स्थानीय संदर्भ से अच्छी सुविधाओं को निकालना है। इस काम में, हम एक ध्यान तंत्र के साथ स्थानीय सुविधाओं का अधिकतम उपयोग करने के लिए एक सरल तकनीक प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो संदर्भ-निर्भर गतिशील सुविधा चयन के रूप में काम करता है। हमारा मॉडल सीखता है, उदाहरण के लिए, अगली कार्रवाई तय करने के लिए कौन से टोकन पर पार्सर पर ध्यान केंद्रित करना चाहिए। हमारा बहुभाषी प्रयोग कई भाषाओं में इसकी प्रभावशीलता को दर्शाता है। हम संवर्धित परीक्षण डेटासेट के साथ एक प्रयोग भी प्रस्तुत करते हैं और दानव-स्ट्रैट यह स्थानीय रूप से अस्पष्ट बिंदुओं पर मॉडल के व्यवहार को समझने में मदद करता है।', 'ru': 'Одна из основных проблем, с которыми сталкиваются синтаксические анализаторы, основанные на постепенном переходе, в тех случаях, когда будущие вводимые ресурсы не видны, заключается в извлечении положительных характеристик из ограниченного местного контекста. В этой работе мы представляем простой метод максимального использования локальных признаков с механизмом внимания, который работает как контекстно-зависимый динамический выбор признаков. Наша модель учится, например, на каких токенах должен сосредоточиться синтаксический анализатор, чтобы решить следующее действие. Наш многоязычный эксперимент показывает свою эффективность на многих языках. Мы также представляем эксперимент с дополненным набором тестовых данных и демоном - это помогает понять поведение модели в локально неоднозначных точках.', 'ga': 'Príomhdhúshlán amháin do pharsálaithe incriminteacha atá bunaithe ar an trasdul, nuair a bhíonn ionchuir dofheicthe sa todhchaí, ná tréithe maithe a bhaint as comhthéacs áitiúil teoranta. Sa saothar seo, cuirimid i láthair teicníocht shimplí chun an úsáid is fearr is féidir a bhaint as na gnéithe áitiúla le meicníocht aird, a oibríonn mar roghnú gnéithe dinimiciúil a bhraitheann ar an gcomhthéacs. Foghlaimíonn ár múnla, mar shampla, cé na comharthaí ar chóir don pharsálaí díriú orthu, chun an chéad ghníomh eile a chinneadh. Léiríonn ár dturgnamh ilteangach a éifeachtacht thar go leor teangacha. Cuirimid i láthair freisin turgnamh le tacar sonraí tástála méadaithe agus léirímid go gcabhraíonn sé le tuiscint a fháil ar iompar an mhúnla ar phointí débhríoch áitiúla.', 'ka': 'ერთი მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილება, როდესაც მომავალე მონაცემები არაჩვენებელია, არის გამოყენება კარგი ფუნქციები მხოლოდ კონტექსტიდან. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მაქსიმალურად გამოყენებთ ლოკალური ფუნქციების მაქსიმალურად გამოყენებას, რომელიც სამუშაოდ კონტექსტური დინამიკური ფუნქციების მონიშ ჩვენი მოდელის მაგალითად ვისწავლის, რომელიც მონიშნულები უნდა გააკეთოთ, რომ შემდეგი მოქმედების გადაწყვება. ჩვენი მრავალენგური ექსპერიმენტი ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტის ექსპერიმენტი მრავალში. ჩვენ ასევე ექსპერიმენტიური ტესტის მონაცემები და დემონის სტრატის გამოყენება, რომელიც მოდილის მოქმედების მოცემები ლოკალურად არსებულ წერტილებზე გავიგოთ.', 'hu': 'Az inkrementális átmeneti alapú elemzők egyik fő kihívása, amikor a jövőbeli bemenetek láthatatlanok, a jó funkciók kivonása egy korlátozott helyi kontextusból. Ebben a munkában egy egyszerű technikát mutatunk be a helyi jellemzők maximális kihasználására egy figyelemmechanizmussal, amely kontextusfüggő dinamikus jellemzőválasztásként működik. Modellünk megtanulja például, hogy mely tokenekre kell összpontosítania egy elemzőnek, hogy eldöntse a következő műveletet. Többnyelvű kísérletünk számos nyelven mutatja hatékonyságát. Emellett bemutatunk egy kiterjesztett tesztadatkészlettel és demonstráljuk, hogy segít megérteni a modell viselkedését lokálisan kétértelmű pontokon.', 'el': 'Μια κύρια πρόκληση για τους προσαυξημένους αναλυτές μετάβασης, όταν οι μελλοντικές εισόδοι είναι αόρατες, είναι να εξάγουν καλά χαρακτηριστικά από ένα περιορισμένο τοπικό πλαίσιο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια απλή τεχνική για τη μέγιστη αξιοποίηση των τοπικών χαρακτηριστικών με έναν μηχανισμό προσοχής, ο οποίος λειτουργεί ως δυναμική επιλογή χαρακτηριστικών εξαρτώμενης από το περιβάλλον. Το μοντέλο μας μαθαίνει, για παράδειγμα, σε ποια μάρκες πρέπει να επικεντρωθεί ένας αναλυτής, για να αποφασίσει την επόμενη ενέργεια. Το πολύγλωσσο πείραμα μας δείχνει την αποτελεσματικότητά του σε πολλές γλώσσες. Παρουσιάζουμε επίσης ένα πείραμα με εμπλουτισμένο σύνολο δεδομένων δοκιμών και καταδεικνύουμε ότι βοηθά στην κατανόηση της συμπεριφοράς του μοντέλου σε τοπικά διφορούμενα σημεία.', 'it': "Una sfida principale per i parser basati sulla transizione incrementale, quando gli input futuri sono invisibili, è estrarre buone funzionalità da un contesto locale limitato. In questo lavoro, presentiamo una tecnica semplice per utilizzare al massimo le caratteristiche locali con un meccanismo di attenzione, che funziona come selezione dinamica delle caratteristiche dipendente dal contesto. Il nostro modello impara, ad esempio, su quali token dovrebbe concentrarsi un parser, per decidere l'azione successiva. Il nostro esperimento multilingue dimostra la sua efficacia in molte lingue. Presentiamo anche un esperimento con set di dati di test aumentati e dimostriamo che aiuta a capire il comportamento del modello su punti localmente ambigui.", 'lt': 'Vienas iš pagrindinių iššūkių, kylančių palaipsniui pereinamuoju laikotarpiu grindžiamiems analizatoriams, kai būsimi duomenys yra nematomi, yra ištraukti gerus požymius iš ribotų vietinių aplinkybių. Šiame darbe pristatome paprastą metodą, kaip kuo geriau panaudoti vietos savybes su dėmesio mechanizmu, kuris veikia kaip konteksto priklausomos dinaminės savybės atranka. Our model learns, for example, which tokens should a parser focus on, to decide the next action.  Mūsų daugiakalbis eksperimentas rodo jo veiksmingumą daugelyje kalbų. Mes taip pat pristatome eksperimentą su padidintu bandymų duomenų rinkiniu ir demonstruojame, kad jis padeda suprasti modelio elgesį vietoje dviprasmiškuose taškuose.', 'kk': 'Кеңейтілген ауыстыру негізгі талдаушылар үшін, келесі енгізулер көрінбейтінде, шектелген жергілікті контекстің жақсы мүмкіндіктерін шығару. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, жергілікті мүмкіндіктерді максималды қолдану үшін қарапайым техниканы таңдаймыз. Бұл контексті тәуелді динамикалық мүмкіндіктерді таңдау үшін қолд Өзіміздің үлгіміз, мысалы, келесі әрекетті шешу үшін, талдаушы қай белгілерді көрсетеді. Біздің көптілік тәжірибеміз көпшілікті тілдерде көрсетеді. Мұндай-ақ біз өзгертілген сынақ деректер жиыны және демонстратты тәжірибелерді көрсетуге көмектеседік. Бұл үлгісін жергілікті жергілікті мәселелердің қасиетін', 'mk': 'Еден главен предизвик за екстременталните анализатори базирани на транзиција, кога идните внесувања се невидливи, е да се извадат добри карактеристики од ограничен локален контекст. Во оваа работа, претставуваме едноставна техника за максимално искористување на локалните карактеристики со механизам на внимание, кој функционира како контекст-зависен динамичен избор на карактеристики. Нашиот модел научи, на пример, на кои знаци треба да се фокусира анализаторот, за да одлучи за следната акција. Нашиот мултијазичен експеримент ја покажува ефективноста на многу јазици. Исто така, претставуваме експеримент со зголемени тестови податоци и демонстрација што помага да се разбере однесувањето на моделот на локално двогумни точки.', 'mt': 'Sfida ewlenija għall-analizzaturi inkrementali bbażati fuq it-tranżizzjoni, meta l-inputs futuri jkunu inviżibbli, hija li jiġu estratti karatteristiċi tajbin minn kuntest lokali limitat. F’din il-ħidma, qed nippreżentaw teknika sempliċi biex niksbu l-a ħjar użu mill-karatteristiċi lokali b’mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni, li jaħdem bħala għażla ta’ karatteristiċi dinamiċi dipendenti fuq il-kuntest. Il-mudell tagħna jitgħallem, pereżempju, fuq liema tokens għandu jiffoka parser, biex jiddeċiedi l-azzjoni li jmiss. L-esperiment multilingwi tagħna juri l-effettività tiegħu f’ħafna lingwi. Aħna nippreżentaw ukoll esperiment b’sett ta’ dejta miżjud tat-testijiet u nippruvaw li jgħin biex nifhmu l-imġiba tal-mudell fuq punti ambigwi lokalment.', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വ്യാല്\u200dക്കാലം, ഭാവിയുടെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടുകള്\u200d കാണാത ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സ്ഥാനത്തിലെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് ക ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു, അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഏത് അടയാളം അടയാ നമ്മുടെ പല ഭാഷ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം പല ഭാഷകളിലും കാണിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ പരീക്ഷണം കൊണ്ട് വരുന്നു. പിന്നെ പിശാചിന്\u200dറെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന് അത് പ്രാദേശിക്കുന', 'mn': 'Ирээдүй оруулалт харагдахгүй байх үед нэмэлт шилжилт суурилсан судлаачидын нэг гол сорилт нь хязгаарлагдсан орчин нутгийн байдлаас сайн чадварыг гаргах юм. Энэ ажлын тулд бид орон нутгийн чадварыг анхаарлын механизм ашиглах хялбар техник бий болгодог. Энэ нь контекст-хамааралтай динамик чадваруудын сонголт гэж ажилладаг. Бидний загвар, жишээлбэл, дараагийн үйл ажиллагааг шийдэхэд шийдвэрлэх ямар тэмдэгт анхаарлаа хандуулах ёстой вэ? Бидний олон хэл туршилт олон хэл дээр үр дүнг харуулдаг. Бид мөн нэмэгдсэн тест өгөгдлийн суурь болон эмэгтэй судалгааны туршилтыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь загварын загварын үйл ажиллагааг ойлгохад тусалдаг.', 'no': 'Eit hovudutfordring for inkremental overgangsbaserte tolkar, når framtidige inndata er ukjende, er å pakka ut gode funksjonar frå ein begrenset lokal kontekst. I dette arbeidet viser vi ein enkel teknikk for å maksimalisere bruk dei lokale funksjonane med ein oppmerksmekanisme, som fungerer som utval av dynamiske funksjonar som kontekstavhengig. Modellen vårt lærer, for eksempel, kva teikn skal fokusera på, for å bestemma neste handlinga. Vår multispråk eksperiment viser effektiviteten på mange språk. Vi presenterer også ein eksperiment med augmentert test dataset og demonstrasjon. Det hjelper å forstå oppførselen til modellen på lokalt avgjengelege punkt.', 'pl': 'Jednym z głównych wyzwań dla przyrostowych parserów opartych na przejściach, gdy przyszłe wejścia są niewidoczne, jest wydobycie dobrych funkcji z ograniczonego kontekstu lokalnego. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy prostą technikę maksymalnego wykorzystania lokalnych cech z mechanizmem uwagi, który działa jako dynamiczny wybór cech zależnych od kontekstu. Nasz model uczy się na przykład, na których tokenach powinien skupić się parser, aby zdecydować o kolejnym działaniu. Nasz wielojęzyczny eksperyment pokazuje jego skuteczność w wielu językach. Przedstawiamy również eksperyment z rozszerzonym zbiorem danych testowych i demonstrujemy, że pomaga zrozumieć zachowanie modelu w lokalnie niejednoznacznych punktach.', 'ro': 'O provocare principală pentru parserele bazate pe tranziție incrementală, atunci când intrările viitoare sunt invizibile, este de a extrage caracteristici bune dintr-un context local limitat. În această lucrare, prezentăm o tehnică simplă de utilizare maximă a caracteristicilor locale cu un mecanism de atenție, care funcționează ca selecție dinamică a caracteristicilor dependentă de context. Modelul nostru învață, de exemplu, pe ce jetoane ar trebui să se concentreze un parser, pentru a decide următoarea acțiune. Experimentul nostru multilingv demonstrează eficacitatea sa în mai multe limbi. De asemenea, prezentăm un experiment cu set de date de testare augmentat și demonstrăm că ajută la înțelegerea comportamentului modelului pe puncte locale ambigue.', 'sr': 'Jedan od glavnih izazova za razmatrače na temelju incrementalne tranzicije, kada buduće ulaganje su nevidljive, je izvući dobre karakteristike iz ograničenog lokalnog konteksta. U ovom poslu predstavljamo jednostavnu tehniku da maksimalno iskoristi lokalne funkcije sa pažnjom mehanizam, koji funkcioniše kao selekcija dinamičnih funkcija ovisnosti o kontekstu. Naš model nauči, na primer, na koje znakove bi trebalo da se fokusira analizator, da odluči sljedeću akciju. Naš multijezički eksperiment pokazuje svoju efikasnost na mnogim jezicima. Takoðe predstavljamo eksperiment sa povećanom testnom setom podataka i demonom-stratom pomaže da razumemo ponašanje modela na lokalnim dvosmislenim taèkama.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධාන අවශ්\u200dයයෙක් විශාලනය සඳහා විශාලනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරධාන අවශ්\u200dයයෙක්, අනාගතය ඇතුළු අදහස් වෙලාවට, සීමාත්\u200d මේ වැඩේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් පෙන්වන්නේ ස්ථානික විශේෂතාවක් අවශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපනය සඳහා ස්ථානික විශේෂතාවක අපේ මොඩල් ඉගෙන ගන්නවා, උදාහරණයෙන්, මොන තොක්කේන්සුවක්ද පරීක්ෂකයෙක්ට ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න ඕනේ, ඊළඟ ක්\u200d අපේ ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ඒක ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් විතරයි. අපි පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ.', 'so': 'Hal dhibaato muhiim ah ee baarlamaanka ku saleysan koritaanka, marka laga soo galo wax aan muuqanayn, waa in laga soo saaraa kharasho wanaagsan oo ka mid ah xaalada degmada. Shaqadan waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaabab fudud oo si ugu fudud ugu isticmaalno xortii deegaanka, taas oo u shaqeeya doorasho dabiicadeed oo ku xiran. Tusaale ahaan wuxuu baranayaa tusaale ahaan calaamado ay leedahay in lambarku uu ku kalsoonaado, in uu go’aano falimaha soo socda. Imtixaanka luuqadaha kala duduwan wuxuu muujiyaa saameyntiisa luuqado badan oo dhan. Imtixaanka waxaa sidoo kale ku soo bandhignaa kooxda tijaabada oo lagu daray iyo Ibliis- waxay caawinaysaa in lagu fahamo dabeecada dabeecada goobaha degmada ah.', 'ms': 'One main challenge for incremental transition-based parsers, when future inputs are invisible, is to extract good features from a limited local context.  Dalam kerja ini, kami mempersembahkan teknik sederhana untuk memanfaatkan maksimum ciri-ciri setempat dengan mekanisme perhatian, yang berfungsi sebagai pemilihan ciri dinamik tergantung konteks. Model kita belajar, contohnya, tanda mana yang patut fokus penghurai, untuk memutuskan tindakan berikutnya. Eksperimen berbilang bahasa kami menunjukkan efektivitasnya melalui banyak bahasa. Kami juga memperkenalkan eksperimen dengan set data ujian bertambah dan demonstrasi ia membantu untuk memahami perilaku model pada titik yang ambiguh tempatan.', 'sv': 'En stor utmaning för inkrementella övergångsbaserade tolkare, när framtida indata är osynliga, är att extrahera bra funktioner från en begränsad lokal kontext. I detta arbete presenterar vi en enkel teknik för att maximalt utnyttja de lokala funktionerna med en uppmärksamhetsmekanism, som fungerar som kontextberoende dynamiskt funktionsval. Vår modell lär sig till exempel vilka tokens en parser ska fokusera på för att bestämma nästa åtgärd. Vårt flerspråkiga experiment visar dess effektivitet på många språk. Vi presenterar också ett experiment med förstärkt testdataset och demonstrerar att det hjälper till att förstå modellens beteende på lokalt tvetydiga punkter.', 'ta': 'அதிகரிக்கப்பட்ட சார்ந்த பார்சர்களுக்கான ஒரு முக்கிய சவால் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு சுலபமான தொழில்நுட்பம் கொடுக்கிறோம் அதிகப்படையாக உள்ளூர் குணங்களை உபயோகிக்க ஒரு கவனத்தின் முறைமையை பயன்பட உதாரணத்திற்காக எங்கள் மாதிரி எந்த குறியீடுகளை ஒரு பிரிப்பாளர் கவனம் செலுத்த வேண்டும், அடுத்த செயலை தீர எங்கள் பல மொழிகளின் சோதனையை பல மொழிகளுக்கும் அதன் விளைவை காட்டுகிறது. நாம் கூட்டப்பட்ட சோதனை தரவுத்தளத்துடன் ஒரு சோதனையை கொண்டுவருகிறோம் மற்றும் பிள்ளையாக - அது மாதிரியின் நடத்தையை உள்ளூர் பு', 'ur': 'اضافہ تغییر پر بنیادی پارس کے لئے ایک اصلی چال ہے، جب آینده اینپوٹ نامرئم ہیں، ایک محدودیت محدودیت سے اچھی فائدے اٹھانے کی ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک ساده ٹیکنیک پیش کرتے ہیں کہ محلی فوکیلوں کو اپنا توجه مکانیزمن کے ساتھ استعمال کریں، جو کنٹنسیٹ-dependent ڈیکنیوی فوکیلوں کا انتخاب کرے۔ ہمارا مدل، مثال، کس ٹوکین پر پارٹر کا منتخب کرنا چاہتا ہے، آگے کے کام کا فیصلہ کرنا چاہتا ہے. ہماری بہت سی زبان کی آزمائش بہت سی زبانوں میں اس کی فعالیت دکھاتی ہے۔ ہم نے بھی ایک آزمائش پیش کیا ہے جو بڑھی ہوئی آزمائش ڈیٹ سٹ اور شیطان کے ساتھ ہے، اس کا استراٹ ہے کہ موڈل کے رفتار کو محلی مغلوب پوینٹوں پر سمجھنے کی مدد کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Keyingi narsalar ko'rinishi mumkin bo'lganda, cheksiz lokal xizmatdan yaxshi xususiyatlarni olib tashlash mumkin. Bu ishda biz lokal xususiyatlarni maksimal foydalanish uchun oddiy texnologiyani hozir qilamiz. Bu muammolar - muhit va dynamik xususiyatlarini tanlash deb ishlayapti. Our model learns, for example, which tokens should a parser focus on, to decide the next action.  Bizning ko'pchilik tizimimizning ko'pchilik tillarda effektligini ko'rsatadi. Biz qo'shilgan sinov maʼlumotlar tarkibi va demon bilan bir eksperiment hozir qilamiz - bu modelning xususiyatlarini lokal g'oyalar davomida tushunishga yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Một thách thức chính cho các phân tích tăng dần xuyên qua, khi các nội dung tương lai không thấy được, là rút ra các yếu tố tốt từ một trường hợp địa phương hạn chế. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi có một kỹ thuật đơn giản dùng tối đa các tính năng địa phương với một cơ chế để chú ý, nó hoạt động như sự chọn đặc trưng phụ thuộc hoàn cảnh. Ví dụ, kiểu mẫu của chúng ta sẽ học được một bài học để quyết định hành động tiếp theo. Thí nghiệm đa dạng của chúng tôi cho thấy hiệu quả của nó. Chúng tôi cũng trình bày một thí nghiệm với các tập tin thử nghiệm gia tăng và chiến lược quỷ nó giúp hiểu được hành vi của mô hình ở các điểm mơ hồ địa phương.', 'bg': 'Едно от основните предизвикателства за програмните анализатори, базирани на преход, когато бъдещите входове са невидими, е извличането на добри характеристики от ограничен местен контекст. В тази работа представяме проста техника за максимално използване на локалните характеристики с механизъм на внимание, който работи като контекст-зависим динамичен избор на характеристика. Нашият модел научава например върху кои символи трябва да се фокусира анализаторът, за да реши следващото действие. Нашият многоезичен експеримент показва неговата ефективност на много езици. Представяме и експеримент с разширени тестови данни и демонстрираме, че той помага да се разбере поведението на модела върху локално неясни точки.', 'nl': 'Een belangrijke uitdaging voor incrementele transitie-gebaseerde parsers, wanneer toekomstige inputs onzichtbaar zijn, is het extraheren van goede functies uit een beperkte lokale context. In dit werk presenteren we een eenvoudige techniek om de lokale kenmerken maximaal te benutten met een aandachtsmechanisme, dat werkt als context-afhankelijke dynamische kenmerkselectie. Ons model leert bijvoorbeeld op welke tokens een parser zich moet richten om de volgende actie te bepalen. Ons meertalige experiment toont zijn effectiviteit in vele talen. We presenteren ook een experiment met augmented test dataset en demonstreren dat het helpt om het gedrag van het model op lokaal dubbelzinnige punten te begrijpen.', 'da': 'En største udfordring for trinvise overgangsbaserede fortolkere, når fremtidige input er usynlige, er at udtrække gode funktioner fra en begrænset lokal kontekst. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi en enkel teknik til maksimalt at udnytte de lokale funktioner med en opmærksomhedsmekanisme, der fungerer som kontekstafhængig dynamisk funktionsvalg. Vores model lærer for eksempel, hvilke tokens en fortolker skal fokusere på, for at beslutte den næste handling. Vores flersprogede eksperiment viser dens effektivitet på tværs af mange sprog. Vi præsenterer også et eksperiment med forstærket testdatasæt og demonstrerer, at det hjælper med at forstå modellens adfærd på lokalt tvetydige punkter.', 'hr': 'Jedan glavni izazov za razmatrače na temelju incrementalnog prijelaza, kad budući ulazi nevidljivi, je izvući dobre karakteristike iz ograničenog lokalnog konteksta. U ovom poslu predstavljamo jednostavnu tehniku da maksimalno iskoristi lokalne funkcije sa mehanizam pažnje, koji djeluje kao selekcija dinamičnih funkcija ovisnosti o kontekstu. Naš model nauči, na primjer, na kojim znakovima bi se trebao fokusirati analizator, da odluči sljedeću akciju. Naš multijezički eksperiment pokazuje svoju učinkovitost na mnogim jezicima. Također predstavljamo eksperiment s povećanom testnom setom podataka i demonom-stratom koji pomaže razumjeti ponašanje modela na lokalnim dvosmislenim to čkama.', 'de': 'Eine große Herausforderung für inkrementelle Übergangs-basierte Parser, wenn zukünftige Eingaben unsichtbar sind, besteht darin, gute Features aus einem begrenzten lokalen Kontext zu extrahieren. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir eine einfache Technik vor, um die lokalen Merkmale mit einem Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus maximal zu nutzen, der als kontextabhängige dynamische Merkmalsauswahl funktioniert. Unser Modell lernt zum Beispiel, auf welche Token sich ein Parser konzentrieren sollte, um die nächste Aktion zu entscheiden. Unser mehrsprachiges Experiment zeigt seine Wirksamkeit in vielen Sprachen. Außerdem stellen wir ein Experiment mit erweiterten Testdatensätzen vor und demonstrieren, dass es hilft, das Verhalten des Modells an lokal ambiguösen Punkten zu verstehen.', 'id': 'Satu tantangan utama untuk pemeriksa secara incremental berdasarkan transisi, ketika masukan masa depan tidak terlihat, adalah untuk mengekstrak fitur yang baik dari konteks lokal terbatas. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mempersembahkan teknik sederhana untuk memanfaatkan maksimal fitur lokal dengan mekanisme perhatian, yang bekerja sebagai seleksi fitur dinamik tergantung konteks. Model kita belajar, contohnya, token mana yang harus fokus parser, untuk memutuskan tindakan berikutnya. Eksperimen berbilang bahasa kami menunjukkan efektivitasnya di berbagai bahasa. Kami juga mempersembahkan eksperimen dengan set data ujian yang meningkat dan demonstrasi itu membantu untuk memahami perilaku model pada titik yang ambigu lokal.', 'fa': 'یک چالش اصلی برای پردازگاران بر اساس تغییر بیشتر، وقتی واردات آینده نابینا هستند، این است که ویژگی های خوب را از یک محدودیت محدودیت خارج کنیم. در این کار، ما یک تکنیک ساده را برای استفاده از ویژه های محلی با یک مکانیسم توجه نشان می دهیم که به عنوان انتخاب ویژه های دینامیک بستگی به محیط کار می کند. برای مثال، مدل ما یاد می\u200cگیرد که کدام نشانه\u200cها باید یک بازیگر روی آن تمرکز کند تا عمل بعدی را تصمیم بگیرد. آزمایش های زیادی زبان ما موثیت آن را در بسیاری از زبانها نشان می دهد. ما همچنین یک آزمایش را با مجموعه داده های آزمایش افزایش و شیطان نشان می دهیم. آن به درک رفتار مدل در نقطه های ناپذیر محلی کمک می کند.', 'sw': 'Changamoto moja kubwa kwa mabunge wenye asili ya mabadiliko, pale matokeo ya baadae yanapoonekana, ni kutengeneza vipengele vizuri kutoka katika mazingira yenye mipaka. In this work, we present a simple technique to maximally utilize the local features with an attention mechanism, which works as context- dependent dynamic feature selection.  Mfano wetu unajifunza, kwa mfano, ishara zipi zinapaswa kuchukua makini, kuamua hatua inayofuata. Mjaribu wetu wa lugha mbalimbali unaonyesha ufanisi wake katika lugha nyingi. Tunajaribu pia jaribio la taarifa za majaribio zilizoongezeka na maandamano- inasaidia kuelewa tabia za mifano katika pointi isiyo na mashaka.', 'tr': 'A첵ratyn g철챌체rmek 체챌in esasy kyn챌ylyklar 체챌in bir kyn챌ylyk, ha챌anda gelejek giri힊i g철r체nmez bolsa, gowy m철h체matlary 챌ykarmakd캇r. Bu i힊de, 첵erlik karakterleri 체ns me첵dan챌asynda janla힊mak 체챌in basit bir tekniki g철rkezil첵채ris. Bu sisteme ba휓l캇 dynamik se챌gisi 첵aly i힊le첵채r. Mesela, bizi흫 nusgamyz 철wren첵채r, n채hili i힊aret챌ilik 체챌in fokus etmelidigini, indiki emeli kararyny 챌철zmek 체챌in. Bizi흫 k철p dillerimiz barlag 철z t채sirini k철p dillerde g철rkez첵채r. Biz hem geli힊mi힊 ber체vler seti we 힊채hne bilen bir deney 챌ykarypdyk. Bu nusgany흫 첵erli m철h체m noktalarda n채hili ta첵첵arlanmagyna k철mek edip otyr첵ar.', 'af': "Een hoofstandige uitdrukking vir inkremensiele oordragsbaseerde verwerkers, wanneer toekomstige inputs onsigbaar is, is om goeie funksies uit 'n beperkte plaaslike konteks te uittrek. In hierdie werk stel ons 'n eenvoudige teknik voor om die plaaslike funksies met 'n aandag mekanisme te gebruik, wat werk as konteks- afhanklik dinamiese funksiekeuse. Ons model leer byvoorbeeld wat tekens moet 'n tolker fokus op, om die volgende aksie te besluit. Ons multitaalse eksperiment vertoon sy effektiviteit oor baie tale. Ons het ook 'n eksperiment voorgestel met vergroot toets datastel en demon- dit help om die model se gedrag te verstaan op plaaslike onbediende punte.", 'sq': 'One main challenge for incremental transition-based parsers, when future inputs are invisible, is to extract good features from a limited local context.  Në këtë punë, ne paraqesim një teknikë të thjeshtë për të përdorur maksimalisht karakteristikat lokale me një mekanizëm vëmendjeje, i cili funksionon si zgjedhje e karakteristikave dinamike të varura nga konteksti. Modeli ynë mëson, për shembull, në cilat shenja duhet të përqëndrohet një analizues, për të vendosur veprimin tjetër. Eksperimenti ynë shumëgjuhës tregon efektshmërinë e tij në shumë gjuhë. Ne gjithashtu paraqesim një eksperiment me të dhënat e shtuara të test it dhe demon- strate ajo ndihmon për të kuptuar sjelljen e modelit në pika lokale të ambiguara.', 'hy': 'Գլխավոր մարտահրավերն է, որպեսզի ավելացված վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ, երբ ապագայի ներմուծները անտեսանելի են, լավ հատկանիշներ վեր Այս աշխատանքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի պարզ մեթոդ, որպեսզի առավելագույնս օգտագործենք տեղական հատկանիշները ուշադրության մեխանիզմի միջոցով, որը աշխատում է որպես կոնտեքստի կախված դինամիկ հատկանիշների ընտրություն: Մեր մոդելը, օրինակ, սովորում է, թե որոնց վրա պետք է կենտրոնանա վերլուծողը, հաջորդ գործողությունը որոշելու համար: Մեր բազլեզու փորձը ցույց է տալիս դրա արդյունավետությունը բազմաթիվ լեզուներում: Մենք նաև մի փորձ ենք ներկայացնում աճված թեստերի տվյալների համակարգի և դեմոնների միջոցով, որը օգնում է հասկանալ մոդելի վարքագիծը տեղական երկիմաստ կետերում:', 'az': 'Əksinə giriş görünməz olduğu zaman, çoxlu dəyişiklik-dəyişikliklər üçün ən böyük döyüşdür, müəyyən edilən yerli məlumatdan yaxşı özellikləri çıxartmaq. Bu işdə, yerli xüsusiyyətləri gözləmə mehanizmi ilə ən çox istifadə etmək üçün basit bir tekniki göstəririk. Bu, kontekst-bağlı dinamik xüsusiyyətlərin seçimi kimi çalışır. Modelimiz, məsələn, hansı möcüzələrin bir parçacılıq üzərində odaklanmasını öyrənir, sonraki eylemi qərar vermək üçün. Bizim çoxlu dil eksperimentimiz çoxlu dillərdə etkinlik göstərir. Biz həmçinin artırılmış s ınama verilənləri və şeytanları ilə təcrübə edirik. Bu, modelinin davranışlarını yerli məlumatlarda anlamağa kömək edir.', 'ko': '미래의 입력이 보이지 않을 때 증량 전환을 바탕으로 하는 해석기가 직면하는 주요한 도전은 유한한 국부 상하문에서 좋은 특징을 추출하는 것이다.이 업무에서 우리는 간단한 기술을 제기하여 국부적 특징과 주의 메커니즘을 최대한 이용했다. 이것은 상하문에 의존하는 동태적 특징 선택이다.예를 들어 우리 모델 학습 해석기는 다음 조작을 결정하기 위해 어떤 표시를 주목해야 하는가를 주목해야 한다.우리의 다언어 실험은 그것이 여러 언어에서의 유효성을 보여 주었다.우리는 또한 확장 테스트 데이터 집합을 사용하는 실험을 제공했고 모델이 국부 모호점에서의 행위를 이해하는 데 도움이 된다는 것을 증명했다.', 'bn': 'অগ্রগতির ভিত্তিক পার্সারের জন্য একটি প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জ, যখন ভবিষ্যৎ ইনপুট অদৃশ্য হয়, তখন সীমিত স্থানীয় প্রেক্ষাপট থেকে ভ এই কাজে আমরা একটি সাধারণ প্রযুক্তি উপস্থাপন করি স্থানীয় বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহারের জন্য স্থানীয় বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করার জন্য, যা এক্সটেক্স- নি আমাদের মডেল, উদাহরণস্বরূপ, কোন চিহ্নের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি পরবর্তী কাজের সিদ্ধান্ত নেয়ার জন্য একটি প্যারেজ আমাদের বহুভাষার পরীক্ষা অনেক ভাষায় তার কার্যক্রম দেখাচ্ছে। আমরা একটি পরীক্ষা উপস্থাপন করি যার ফলে বাড়ানো পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে ডেটাসেট এবং প্রতিক্রিয়া- এটি স্থানীয় বিষয়গুলোতে মডেলের আচরণ বুঝতে', 'bs': 'Jedan glavni izazov za razmatrače na temelju incrementalnog prijenosa, kada budući ulazi nevidljivi, je izvući dobre karakteristike iz ograničenog lokalnog konteksta. U ovom poslu predstavljamo jednostavnu tehniku da maksimalno iskoristi lokalne funkcije sa mehanizam pažnje, koji funkcioniše kao selekcija dinamičnih funkcija ovisnosti o kontekstu. Naš model nauči, na primjer, na kojim znakovima bi se trebao fokusirati analizator, da odluči sljedeću akciju. Naš multijezički eksperiment pokazuje svoju efikasnost na mnogim jezicima. Također predstavljamo eksperiment sa povećanom testnom setom podataka i demonom- strat pomaže razumjeti ponašanje modela na lokalnim dvosmislenim to čkama.', 'cs': 'Jednou z hlavních výzev pro inkrementální parsery založené na přechodu, kdy budoucí vstupy jsou neviditelné, je extrahovat dobré funkce z omezeného lokálního kontextu. V této práci představujeme jednoduchou techniku maximálního využití lokálních rysů s mechanismem pozornosti, který funguje jako kontextově závislý dynamický výběr rysů. Náš model se například dozví, na které tokeny by se parser měl zaměřit, aby se rozhodl o další akci. Náš vícejazyčný experiment ukazuje jeho účinnost napříč mnoha jazyky. Dále představujeme experiment s rozšířenými testovacími daty a demonstrujeme, že pomáhá porozumět chování modelu na lokálně nejednoznačných bodech.', 'et': 'Üks peamine üleminekupõhiste parserite väljakutse, kui tulevased sisendid on nähtamatud, on eraldada häid omadusi piiratud kohalikust kontekstist. Käesolevas töös tutvustame lihtsat tehnikat kohalike funktsioonide maksimaalseks kasutamiseks tähelepanumehhanismiga, mis toimib kontekstist sõltuva dünaamilise funktsioonivalikuna. Meie mudel õpib näiteks, millistele märkidele peaks parser keskenduma, et otsustada järgmine toiming. Meie mitmekeelne eksperiment näitab selle tõhusust paljudes keeltes. Samuti tutvustame eksperimenti täiendatud testide andmekogumiga ja demonstreerime, et see aitab mõista mudeli käitumist lokaalselt ebamõistetavates punktides.', 'ca': "Un repte principal per als analitzadors de transició incremental, quan les entrades futures són invisibles, és extrair bones característiques d'un contexte local limitat. En aquesta feina, presentem una tècnica senzilla per utilitzar al màxim les característiques locals amb un mecanisme d'atenció, que funciona com a selecció dinàmica de característiques dependients del context. Our model learns, for example, which tokens should a parser focus on, to decide the next action.  El nostre experiment multilingüe mostra la seva eficacia en moltes llengües. També presentem un experiment amb un conjunt de dades de prova augmentat i demostració que ajuda a entendre el comportament del model en punts ambiguosos localment.", 'fi': 'Yksi tärkeimmistä haasteista siirtymäpohjaisille jäsentäjille, kun tulevat syötteet ovat näkymättömiä, on saada hyviä ominaisuuksia rajallisesta paikallisesta kontekstista. Tässä työssä esitellään yksinkertainen tekniikka paikallisten ominaisuuksien maksimaaliseen hyödyntämiseen huomiomekanismilla, joka toimii kontekstista riippuvana dynaamisena ominaisuuden valintana. Mallimme oppii esimerkiksi, mihin poletteihin jäsentäjän tulisi keskittyä päättääkseen seuraavan toiminnon. Monikielinen kokeilumme osoittaa sen tehokkuuden monilla kielillä. Esittelemme myös kokeilun lisätyllä testiaineistolla ja demonstroimme sen auttavan ymmärtämään mallin käyttäytymistä paikallisesti epäselvissä kohdissa.', 'am': "ለመጠቀም በተጨማሪው የፓርላማዎች ማሰናከል አንዲት ዋጋ ግንኙነት፣ የቀድሞው ውጤቶች አይታዩም፡፡ In this work, we present a simple technique to maximally utilize the local features with an attention mechanism, which works as context- dependent dynamic feature selection.  ምሳሌያችን ምሳሌ ምሳሌ፣ በምን ምልክቶች ማሳየት የሚያስፈልጉት፣ የመጨረሻውን ሥራ ለመፍጠር ነው፡፡ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ፈተናችንን በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ጥቅም ያሳየዋል፡፡ We also present an experiment with augmented test dataset and demon- strate it helps to understand the model's behavior on locally ambiguous points.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé sing beraksi kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo Ketokan Nang iki trabah, kita muddiwang sampeyan sistem kanggo nggawe sistem lokal sing digunakno karo paketenipun kanggo ngawe jinahan, sing gagal barang kontext-diputaaken caraturan Dinamanan. modellu anyar tentang, sampek, sampek token kudu pentir nggawe, nggawe aksi juter Awakdhéwé éntukno akeh langgar sampeyan neng akeh pengguna nggawe barang langgar. Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk éntuk sing gak perusahaan karo dadi nggunaké ate ujian lan daemony- nggabung ngéwangi maning nggawe barang model nang titimbang kelangan iki.', 'ha': "Babu kima mai ƙudura wa parser-parkeri da aka samar da shi, idan an gane masu ƙara da za'a gani, shine ya fita masu kyauta mai kyau daga wata mazaɓa mai ƙayyade lokaci. Daga wannan aikin, Munã ƙayyade wani takwai mai sauƙi dõmin mu yi amfani da mafiya amfani da furofati masu lokal da wani alama na aikin muhimmanci, wanda ke aiki kamar zaɓen haske- da ke dõgara ga masu hushi. Misali ya sanar, misali, wanne alama za'a yi amfani da shi ga parse, dõmin ya hukunta aikin na ƙarshe. jarrabadenmu masu mulki na'ura ke nuna fasarinta a cikin harshe mãsu yawa. Yana samun jarrabo da aka sami tsarin jarrabo da aka samu-ya yi amfani da ya fahimta aikin misalin ayuka kan pointi masu buƙata a lokacin.", 'he': 'אתגר ראשי אחד עבור מחקרים מבוססים במעבר מיוחד, כאשר הכניסות העתידיות בלתי נראות, הוא להוציא תכונות טובות ממקשר מקומי מוגבל. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מציגים טכניקה פשוטה כדי להשתמש באופן מקסימלי במיוחד במאפיינים המקומיים עם מנגנון תשומת לב, אשר עובד כמבחרת תכונות דינמיות תלויות בקשר. המודל שלנו לומד, לדוגמה, על אילו סימנים צריך להתמקד מעבד, כדי להחליט על הפעולה הבאה. הניסוי הרב-שפתי שלנו מראה את היעילות שלו בכל שפות רבות. אנחנו גם מציגים ניסוי עם קבוצת מידע מבחן מוגבלת ומגבלת שדים... זה עוזר להבין את ההתנהגות של המודל על נקודות סביבות מקומיות.', 'sk': 'Eden glavnih izzivov za razčlenjevalnike, ki temeljijo na postopnem prehodu, ko so prihodnji vnosi nevidni, je izvleči dobre lastnosti iz omejenega lokalnega konteksta. V tem delu predstavljamo preprosto tehniko za maksimalno uporabo lokalnih značilnosti z mehanizmom pozornosti, ki deluje kot kontekstno odvisno dinamično izbiro značilnosti. Naš model se na primer nauči, na katere žetone se mora osredotočiti razčlenjevalec, da se odloči o naslednjem dejanju. Naš večjezični eksperiment kaže njegovo učinkovitost v številnih jezikih. Predstavljamo tudi eksperiment z razširjenim testnim naborom podatkov in dokazujemo, da pomaga razumeti vedenje modela na lokalno dvoumnih točkah.', 'bo': 'ཡར་འཕེལ་འགྲུལ་སྐྱོད་དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་མིག In this work, we present a simple technique to maximally utilize the local features with an attention mechanism, which works as context-dependent dynamic feature selection. དཔེར་ན། ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་དཔེར་ན། དཔེར་ན། མིང་རྟགས་ཅི་ནི་དབྱེ་བ་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་རིགས་སྣ་མང་ཙམ་གྱི་བརྟག་ཞིག་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤིག་ཏུ་གྲུབ་ཤིང་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཀྱི་བརྟག་ཞིག་བྱས་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་ཆོག་ཉིད་ཡིན་པས།'}
{'en': 'Reading Comprehension with Graph-based Temporal-Casual Reasoning', 'ar': 'الفهم القرائي مع المنطق الزمني العرضي القائم على الرسم البياني', 'es': 'Comprensión lectora con razonamiento temporal-casual basado en gráficos', 'fr': 'Compréhension de lecture avec raisonnement temporel occasionnel basé sur des graphiques', 'pt': 'Compreensão de Leitura com Raciocínio Temporal-Casual Baseado em Gráficos', 'ja': 'グラフベースの時間的-カジュアル推論で理解を読み取る', 'zh': '读解图形 - 休闲推理', 'hi': 'ग्राफ-आधारित टेम्पोरल-कैजुअल रीजनिंग के साथ रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन', 'ru': 'Понимание прочитанного на основе графиков, временнó-случайное мышление', 'ga': 'Léamhthuiscint le Réasúnaíocht Ócáideach Bunaithe ar Ghraf', 'el': 'Κατανόηση ανάγνωσης με χρονολογικό λόγο βασισμένο σε γραφήματα', 'hu': 'Olvasási áttekintés grafikon alapú időszakos-alkalmi érveléssel', 'ka': 'ფაილის კომპრენციაცია გრაფიკური ტემპორალური- კასუალური მიზეზებით', 'it': 'Comprensione della lettura con ragionamento temporale-casuale basato su grafico', 'kk': 'Графика негіздеген Температуралық- Кәдімгі себептерді оқу', 'lt': 'Skaitymo suvokimas su grafiku pagrįstu laikinu ir atsitiktiniu pagrįstumu', 'mk': 'Reading Comprehension with Graph-based Temporal-Casual Reasoning', 'ms': 'Membaca Pemahaman dengan Pengesanan Temporal-Kasual Berasas Graf', 'mt': 'Qari Komprensjoni b’Raġunar Temporali-Każwali bbażat fuq il-Grafika', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി വായിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'График суурилсан Температур-Үндэсний шалтгааныг унших', 'no': 'Les komprehension med grafikkbasert mellombels- kasual grunn', 'pl': 'Czytanie zrozumienia za pomocą graficznego uzasadniania czasowo-przypadkowego', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea lecturii cu raționare temporală-ocazională bazată pe grafic', 'sr': 'Èitanje kompresije sa vremenskim-sluèajnim razlogom na grafiku', 'si': 'Graph- based Temporal- Casal Reasoning සඳහා සංවේදනය කියනවා', 'sv': 'Läsförståelse med grafbaserad tidsmässig och tillfällig resonemang', 'so': 'Waxbarashada kaalmada ee ku saleysan Graph', 'ta': 'சார்ந்த வரைபடத்தில் சார்ந்த தற்காலிக வாசிப்புடன் படிப்பது முடிவு', 'ur': 'Graph-based Temporal-Casual Reasoning', 'vi': 'Xem toàn bộ bằng giải thích múi giờ', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Разбиране на четенето с графично базирано времево-случайно разсъждаване', 'nl': 'Begrijpen lezen met grafiekgebaseerde tijdelijke en casual redenering', 'da': 'Læseforståelse med grafbaseret tidsmæssig-afslappet begrundelse', 'ko': '그림에 기초한 시제 인과 추리 읽기 이해', 'hr': 'Čitanje komprehenzije s vremenskim-slučajnim razlogom na grafiku', 'de': 'Lesen des Verständnisses mit grafenbasiertem Temporal-Casual Reasoning', 'id': 'Membaca Kompresi dengan Alasan Temporal-Kasual Berdasarkan Graf', 'sw': 'Kusoma Ufanuzi kwa Msomaji wa Muda wa Matokeo', 'tr': 'Graph tabanly Wagtlaýyn-Casual Reasoning bilen Derjesi okamak', 'fa': 'خواندن تأثیرات با دلایل معمولی و معمولی بر اساس گراف', 'sq': 'Leximi i përfshirjes me arsyetimin përkohor-rastësor bazuar në grafik', 'af': 'Lees komprehensie met Grafiegebaseerde Temporal- Casual Reasoning', 'bn': 'গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক ট্যাম্পুরাল- ক্যাসুয়াল পাঠকরণের সাথে সম্পূর্ণ পাঠ করা হচ্ছে', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Գրաֆի վրա հիմնված ընկալումն ընթերցնում է ժամանակական-պատահական պատճառը', 'az': 'Grafik-tabanlı Temporal-Casual Reasoning', 'cs': 'Porozumění čtení s grafovým časovým a neformálním odůvodněním', 'bs': 'Čitanje komprehenzije sa vremenskim-slučajnim razlogom na grafiku', 'ca': 'Llegir la comprensió amb una raonació temporal-casual basada en gràfics', 'fi': 'Lukemisen ymmärtäminen graafisella ajallisella ja rennolla järkeilyllä', 'et': 'Lugemine arusaam graafikapõhise ajalise-juhusliku mõistmisega', 'jv': 'Language', 'sk': 'Razumevanje branja z grafičnim časovnim in priložnostnim razlogom', 'he': 'קריאת הבנה עם הגיון זמני-מקרי מבוסס על גרף', 'ha': 'QXml', 'bo': 'Graph-based Temporal-Casual Reasoning सह་བསྟར་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་ཀློག་འཇུག་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Complex questions in reading comprehension tasks require integrating information from multiple sentences. In this work, to answer such questions involving temporal and causal relations, we generate event graphs from text based on dependencies, and rank answers by aligning event graphs. In particular, the alignments are constrained by graph-based reasoning to ensure temporal and causal agreement. Our focused approach self-adaptively complements existing solutions ; it is automatically triggered only when applicable. Experiments on RACE and MCTest show that state-of-the-art methods are notably improved by using our approach as an add-on.', 'ar': 'تتطلب الأسئلة المعقدة في مهام فهم القراءة تكامل المعلومات من جمل متعددة. في هذا العمل ، للإجابة على مثل هذه الأسئلة التي تتضمن العلاقات الزمنية والسببية ، نقوم بإنشاء رسوم بيانية للأحداث من نص بناءً على التبعيات ، ونصنف الإجابات عن طريق محاذاة الرسوم البيانية للأحداث. على وجه الخصوص ، يتم تقييد المحاذاة عن طريق التفكير القائم على الرسم البياني لضمان الاتفاق الزمني والسببي. نهجنا المركّز يكمل الحلول الحالية بشكل تكيفي ذاتي ؛ يتم تشغيله تلقائيًا فقط عند الاقتضاء. تُظهر التجارب على RACE و MCTest أنه تم تحسين الأساليب الحديثة بشكل ملحوظ باستخدام نهجنا كإضافة.', 'fr': "Les questions complexes dans les tâches de compréhension de lecture nécessitent l'intégration d'informations provenant de plusieurs phrases. Dans ce travail, pour répondre à de telles questions impliquant des relations temporelles et causales, nous générons des graphes d'événements à partir de texte basé sur des dépendances, et classons les réponses en alignant les graphes d'événements. En particulier, les alignements sont limités par un raisonnement basé sur des graphiques afin d'assurer une concordance temporelle et causale. Notre approche ciblée complète de manière auto-adaptative les solutions existantes\xa0; elle n'est déclenchée automatiquement que lorsqu'elle est applicable. Les expériences sur RACE et MCTEST montrent que les méthodes de pointe sont considérablement améliorées en utilisant notre approche en tant que complément.", 'es': 'Las preguntas complejas en las tareas de comprensión lectora requieren la integración de la información de varias oraciones. En este trabajo, para responder a estas preguntas que involucran relaciones temporales y causales, generamos gráficos de eventos a partir del texto basados en dependencias y clasificamos las respuestas alineando los gráficos de eventos. En particular, las alineaciones están limitadas por un razonamiento basado en gráficos para garantizar un acuerdo temporal y causal. Nuestro enfoque centrado se complementa de forma autoadaptativa con las soluciones existentes; solo se activa automáticamente cuando corresponde. Los experimentos en RACE y McTest muestran que los métodos más avanzados mejoran notablemente al utilizar nuestro enfoque como complemento.', 'pt': 'Questões complexas em tarefas de compreensão de leitura exigem a integração de informações de várias frases. Neste trabalho, para responder a essas questões envolvendo relações temporais e causais, geramos grafos de eventos a partir de texto com base em dependências e classificamos as respostas alinhando grafos de eventos. Em particular, os alinhamentos são limitados por raciocínio baseado em grafos para garantir concordância temporal e causal. Nossa abordagem focada complementa de forma auto-adaptativa as soluções existentes; ele é acionado automaticamente somente quando aplicável. Experimentos em RACE e MCTest mostram que métodos de última geração são notavelmente aprimorados usando nossa abordagem como um complemento.', 'ja': '理解タスクを読む際の複雑な質問では、複数の文章からの情報を統合する必要があります。この研究では、時間的および因果関係に関わるこのような質問に答えるために、依存関係に基づいてテキストからイベントグラフを生成し、イベントグラフを整列させて回答をランク付けします。特に、アライメントは、時間的および因果的合意を確実にするために、グラフベースの推論によって制約される。当社の焦点を当てたアプローチは、既存のソリューションを自己適応的に補完し、該当する場合にのみ自動的にトリガーされます。RACEとMCTestの実験では、当社のアプローチをアドオンとして使用することで、最先端の方法が顕著に改善されることが示されています。', 'zh': '读解务须整合数语。 对及时因果关系,因事图对名。 特为齐所推束,以保时一致性。 注法自应补见解决方案。 它仅宜自发。 RACE、MCTest之实验,以吾道为附组件,先进之道显进。', 'hi': 'समझने के कार्यों को पढ़ने में जटिल प्रश्नों को कई वाक्यों से जानकारी को एकीकृत करने की आवश्यकता होती है। इस काम में, अस्थायी और कारण संबंधों को शामिल करने वाले ऐसे सवालों के जवाब देने के लिए, हम निर्भरताओं के आधार पर पाठ से ईवेंट ग्राफ़ उत्पन्न करते हैं, और ईवेंट ग्राफ़ को संरेखित करके उत्तरों को रैंक करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, संरेखण को अस्थायी और कारण समझौते को सुनिश्चित करने के लिए ग्राफ-आधारित तर्क द्वारा विवश किया जाता है। हमारा केंद्रित दृष्टिकोण आत्म-अनुकूली रूप से मौजूदा समाधानों को पूरक करता है; यह स्वचालित रूप से केवल तभी ट्रिगर होता है जब लागू होता है। RACE और MCTest पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि एक ऐड-ऑन के रूप में हमारे दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके अत्याधुनिक तरीकों को विशेष रूप से बेहतर बनाया गया है।', 'ru': 'Сложные вопросы в задачах понимания чтения требуют интеграции информации из нескольких предложений. В этой работе для ответа на такие вопросы, как временные и причинно-следственные связи, мы формируем графики событий из текста на основе зависимостей и ранжируем ответы, выравнивая графики событий. В частности, выравнивание ограничивается рассуждениями на основе графов для обеспечения временного и причинного согласия. Наш целенаправленный подход самоадаптивно дополняет существующие решения; он автоматически срабатывает только тогда, когда это применимо. Эксперименты на РАСЕ и MCTest показывают, что современные методы заметно улучшаются, используя наш подход в качестве дополнения.', 'ga': 'Éilíonn ceisteanna casta i dtascanna léamhthuisceana faisnéis ó abairtí iolracha a chomhtháthú. Sa saothar seo, chun ceisteanna dá leithéid a fhreagairt a bhaineann le caidreamh ama agus cúiseach, ginimid graif imeachtaí ó théacs bunaithe ar spleáchais, agus rangaimid freagraí trí ghraif imeachtaí a ailíniú. Go háirithe, tá srian ar na hailínithe ag réasúnaíocht ghraf-bhunaithe chun comhaontú ama agus cúisíoch a áirithiú. Comhlánaíonn ár gcur chuige dírithe na réitigh atá ann cheana féin go féinoiriúnaithe; ní spreagtar go huathoibríoch é ach amháin nuair is infheidhme. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar RACE agus MCTest go bhfuil feabhas suntasach tagtha ar na modhanna úrscothacha trínár gcur chuige a úsáid mar bhreiseán.', 'el': 'Οι σύνθετες ερωτήσεις στις εργασίες κατανόησης ανάγνωσης απαιτούν την ενσωμάτωση πληροφοριών από πολλαπλές προτάσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία, για να απαντήσουμε σε τέτοιες ερωτήσεις που αφορούν χρονικές και αιτιώδεις σχέσεις, δημιουργούμε γραφήματα συμβάντων από κείμενο βασισμένα σε εξαρτήσεις και ταξινομούμε απαντήσεις ευθυγραμμίζοντας γραφήματα συμβάντων. Ειδικότερα, οι ευθυγραμμίσεις περιορίζονται από αιτιολογία βασισμένη σε γραφήματα για να εξασφαλιστεί χρονική και αιτιώδης συμφωνία. Η εστιασμένη προσέγγισή μας συμπληρώνει αυτόματα τις υπάρχουσες λύσεις. ενεργοποιείται αυτόματα μόνο όταν ισχύει. Τα πειράματα σε RACE και MCTest δείχνουν ότι οι σύγχρονες μέθοδοι βελτιώνονται σημαντικά χρησιμοποιώντας την προσέγγισή μας ως πρόσθετο.', 'hu': 'Az olvasásértési feladatok komplex kérdései több mondatból származó információk integrálását igénylik. Ebben a munkában az időbeli és okozati összefüggéseket érintő kérdések megválaszolására eseménygrafikonokat generálunk szövegből függőségek alapján, és eseménygrafikonok igazításával rangsoroljuk a válaszokat. Az összehangolásokat különösen grafikonon alapuló érvelés korlátozza az időbeli és okozati összefüggések biztosítása érdekében. Célzott megközelítésünk önalkalmazkodó módon kiegészíti a meglévő megoldásokat; automatikusan csak akkor aktiválódik, ha alkalmazható. A RACE és MCTest kísérletei azt mutatják, hogy a legkorszerűbb módszereket kiegészítőként használjuk a megközelítésünket.', 'ka': 'კომპლექტური კითხვები, რომლებიც კითხვა შესახებ დავალებების შესახებ, უნდა ინტერგურაციის ინტერგურაცია რამდენიმე სიტყვების შე ამ სამუშაოში, ამ სამუშაოში, ამ კითხვების შესახებ, რომლებიც სამუშაო და წარმოდგენების შესახებ, ჩვენ ტექსტიდან მოვლენების გრაფიკები დავიწყებთ, რომლებიც დასახებ დასახე განსაკუთრებულია, განსაკუთრებულებები განსაკუთრებულია გრაფიკური განსაკუთრებულია, რომ დარწმუნოთ გერმალური და მიზეზიდან მიზეზიდან. ჩვენი ფონსკური პროგორმაცია თავიდან აეპტიფიურად კომპლემენტირებს მსგავსი პროგორმაციები; ეს ავტომატურად მოწყენება მხოლოდ როდესაც მოდის. RACE და MCTest ექსპერიმენტების გამოცდილებები გამოიყენება, რომ ხელსაწყოთა მენტები განსაკუთრებულად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მე', 'it': "Domande complesse nei compiti di comprensione della lettura richiedono l'integrazione di informazioni da più frasi. In questo lavoro, per rispondere a tali domande che coinvolgono relazioni temporali e causali, generiamo grafici di eventi dal testo in base alle dipendenze, e classifichiamo le risposte allineando grafici di eventi. In particolare, gli allineamenti sono vincolati da ragionamenti basati su grafici per garantire un accordo temporale e causale. Il nostro approccio mirato integra automaticamente le soluzioni esistenti; si attiva automaticamente solo se applicabile. Gli esperimenti su RACE e MCTest dimostrano che i metodi all'avanguardia sono notevolmente migliorati utilizzando il nostro approccio come componente aggiuntivo.", 'lt': 'Sudėtingi klausimai skaitant supratimo užduotis reikalauja integruoti informaciją iš kelių sakinių. Šiame darbe, atsakydami į tokius klausimus, susijusius su laikinais ir priežastiniais santykiais, mes sukuriame renginių grafikus iš teksto, pagrįsto priklausomybėmis, ir klasifikuojame atsakymus derindami renginių grafikus. Visų pirma suderinimai yra apriboti grafiniu pagrindu pagrįstais argumentais, kad būtų užtikrintas laikinas ir priežastinis susitarimas. Mūsų tikslinis požiūris savarankiškai papildo esamus sprendimus; jis automatiškai įjungiamas tik tada, kai taikoma. Experiments on RACE and MCTest show that state-of-the-art methods are notably improved by using our approach as an add-on.', 'kk': 'Бірнеше сөздерден мәліметті біріктіру керек. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, уақытша және себепті қатынастар туралы сұрақтарды жауап беру үшін оқиға графиктерін мәтіннен негізделген, оқиға графиктерін баптау арқылы жауаптарды жоғарлатып жа Әрине, графикалық негіздеген тәртібі уақытша және себептік келім беру үшін графикалық тәртібін шектеп тұрады. Біздің көздеген тәртібіміздің өзіміздің адаптеріміз бар шешімдерді қосып шығады. ол тек қолданғанда автоматты түрде басталады. RACE және MCTest туралы тәжірибелері өзіміздің күй- жай әдістерін қосымша ретінде қосымша қолдану арқылы өзгертілген.', 'mk': 'Комплексните прашања во читањето на задачите за разбирање бараат интеграција на информациите од повеќе реченици. Во оваа работа, за да одговориме на вакви прашања кои вклучуваат привремени и причинни односи, генерираме графики на настани од текст базиран на зависности, и рангираме одговори со alining на настани графики. Особено, прилагодувањата се ограничени од размислувањата на графот за да се осигури временски и причински договор. Нашиот фокусиран пристап самоадаптивно ги комплиментира постојните решенија; автоматски се активира само кога е важно. Експериментите на RACE и MCTest покажуваат дека најновите методи се особено подобрени со користењето на нашиот пристап како додаток.', 'mt': 'Mistoqsijiet kumplessi fil-qari ta’ kompiti ta’ komprensjoni jeħtieġu l-integrazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni minn sentenzi multipli. F’dan ix-xogħol, biex twieġeb mistoqsijiet bħal dawn li jinvolvu relazzjonijiet temporali u kawżali, niġġeneraw graffi tal-avvenimenti mit-test ibbażat fuq id-dipendenzi, u nirraggregaw it-tweġibiet billi nallinjaw graffi tal-avvenimenti. B’mod partikolari, l-allinjamenti huma ristretti minn raġunament ibbażat fuq il-grafika biex jiġi żgurat ftehim temporali u kawżali. L-approċċ iffukat tagħna jikkomplementa b’mod awtoadaptattiv is-soluzzjonijiet eżistenti; jiġi attivat awtomatikament biss meta applikabbli. L-esperimenti fuq ir-RACE u l-MCTest juru li l-metodi l-aktar avvanzati huma notevolment imtejba bl-użu tal-approċċ tagħna bħala żieda.', 'ms': 'Soalan kompleks dalam membaca tugas pemahaman memerlukan penyelesaian maklumat dari kalimat berbilang. Dalam kerja ini, untuk menjawab soalan seperti yang melibatkan hubungan sementara dan penyebab, kita menghasilkan graf peristiwa dari teks berdasarkan dependensi, dan jajar jawapan dengan menyesuaikan graf peristiwa. Secara khususnya, penyesuaian diharamkan oleh alasan berdasarkan graf untuk memastikan perjanjian sementara dan penyebab. pendekatan fokus kita secara sesuai menyempurnakan penyelesaian yang wujud; ia secara automatik dipicu hanya bila berlaku. Eksperimen pada RACE dan MCTest menunjukkan bahawa kaedah state-of-the-art terutama diperbaiki dengan menggunakan pendekatan kami sebagai tambahan.', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d പല വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, സമയത്തിലും കാരണ ബന്ധങ്ങളിലും ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ഈ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d, ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും വ In particular, the alignments are constrained by graph-based reasoning to ensure temporal and causal agreement.  നമ്മുടെ ശ്രദ്ധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന നമ്മുടെ സ്വയം ആത്മാര്\u200dത്ഥമായ പരിഹാരങ്ങള്\u200d നിലവിലുള പ്രയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d മാത്രമേ അത് സ്വയമായി ത്രിഗ്രാജ് ചെയ്യുന്നുള്ളൂ. റേസിയെയും എംസിറ്റെസ്റ്റിനെയും പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നടപടികള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത് കൂടുതല്\u200d മ', 'no': 'Komplekt spørsmål i lesing av forståkingsprogrammer krev integrering av informasjon frå fleire setningar. I denne arbeida, for å svara på slike spørsmåla som involverer temporale og grunnleggjande forhold, genererer vi hendingsgrafar frå tekst basert på avhengighet og ranker svarar ved å justera hendingsgrafar. I særskilt er innrettingane begrenset av grafikkbasert grunnlag for å sikra tidlegare og grunnleggjande samtale. Det fokuserte tilnærminga vår selv tilpassar eksisterande løysingar. den vert berre utløyst automatisk når det er tilgjengeleg. Eksperimentar på RACE og MCTest viser at kunstmetodane er spesielt forbetra ved å bruka tilnærminga vårt som tillegg.', 'pl': 'Złożone pytania w zadaniach rozumienia czytania wymagają integracji informacji z wielu zdań. W niniejszej pracy, aby odpowiedzieć na takie pytania związane z relacjami czasowymi i przyczynowymi, generujemy wykresy zdarzeń z tekstu oparte na zależnościach, a odpowiedzi rankingujemy poprzez wyrównanie wykresów zdarzeń. W szczególności dostosowania są ograniczone rozumowaniem opartym na wykresie w celu zapewnienia zgodności czasowej i przyczynowej. Nasze ukierunkowane podejście samodzielnie uzupełnia istniejące rozwiązania; jest automatycznie uruchamiany tylko wtedy, gdy ma to zastosowanie. Eksperymenty na RACE i MCTest pokazują, że najnowocześniejsze metody zostały znacznie ulepszone dzięki zastosowaniu naszego podejścia jako dodatku.', 'mn': 'Уншихын тулд олон өгүүлбэрээс мэдээллийг нэгтгэх хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажил дээр, цаг хугацааны болон шалтгаан холбоотой асуултуудын хариултын тулд бид хамааралтай байдлын үндсэн текстээс үйл явдлын график бий болгодог. Ялангуяа, график суурилсан шалтгааныг цаг хугацааны болон шалтгааны зөвшөөрөл байлгахын тулд тэгшитгэл нь хязгаарлагддаг. Бидний төвлөрсөн арга зам өөрсдийгөө адилхан зохицуулж байгаа шийдвэрийг нэмэгдүүлдэг. зөвхөн хэрэглэх үед автоматаар үүсгэдэг. RACE болон MCTest-ийн туршилтын туршилтууд бидний арга замыг нэмэлт хэлбэрээр нэмэлт болгон нэмэгдүүлж байгааг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Întrebările complexe în sarcinile de înțelegere a citirii necesită integrarea informațiilor din mai multe propoziții. În această lucrare, pentru a răspunde la astfel de întrebări care implică relații temporale și cauzale, generăm grafice de evenimente din text bazate pe dependențe și clasificăm răspunsurile prin alinierea graficelor de evenimente. În special, alinierile sunt constrânse de raționamentul bazat pe grafice pentru a asigura acordul temporal și cauzal. Abordarea noastră concentrată completează automat soluțiile existente; este declanșat automat numai atunci când este cazul. Experimentele efectuate pe RACE și MCTest arată că metodele de ultimă generație sunt îmbunătățite în mod semnificativ prin utilizarea abordării noastre ca supliment.', 'sr': 'Kompleksna pitanja u čitanju zadataka o razumijevanju zahtevaju integraciju informacija iz višestrukih rečenica. U ovom poslu, da bi odgovorili na takve pitanja uključujući temporalne i uzročne odnose, stvorili smo grafike događaja iz teksta bazirane na ovisnosti i reagirali odgovore prilagođenjem grafika događaja. Posebno, prilagodbe ograničavaju razlogom na grafiku kako bi se osigurala privremeni i uzročni sporazum. Naš fokusirani pristup sami adaptivno dodaje postojeće rješenja; automatski se aktivira samo kada se primjenjuje. Eksperimenti o RACE i MCTest pokazuju da su metode umetnosti posebno poboljšane koristeći naš pristup kao dodatak.', 'so': "Shaqooyinka aasaasiga ah lagu akhriyo waxay u baahan yihiin macluumaad la qabsashada luuqado badan. Shaqadan, si aan ugu jawaabno su'aalaha ku saabsan waqtiga ah iyo xiriirka sababta ah, waxaynu ka soo bandhignaa sawirka dhacdooyinka, taasoo ku saleysan ku xiran, waxaana ka soo jawaabaynaa sarraynta sawirada dhacdooyinka. Si gaar ah marka loo soo bandhigi karo waxaa lagu diidi karaa sabab ku saleysan fasaxa si uu u xaqiijiyo heshiiska waqtiga ah iyo sababta sababta ah. Xaaladahayaga ku kalsoonaanta ee isbedelka ah waxaa lagu dhaqdhaqaaqaaqayaa marka lagu habboon karo oo kaliya. Imtixaanka RACE iyo MCTest waxay muujiyaan in xaalada farshaxanka ah si gaar ah loo hagaajiyo isticmaalka qaababkayaga lagu daro.", 'si': 'කියවන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්පූර්ණ වැඩක් වලින් තො මේ වැඩේදී, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න වගේ උත්තර දෙන්න, අවස්ථාව සහ කාරණාත්මක සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි පාළුවන් විසින්  විශේෂයෙන්, ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් සැකසුම් සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ කාලය සහ කාරණාත්මක සම්බන් අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන විදිහට ස්වයංගයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ විසින් විසින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්; ඒක ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විතරයි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි. RACE සහ MCT පරීක්ෂණයේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්පූර්ණ විදිහට වැඩ කරනවා කියලා.', 'sv': 'Komplexa frågor i läsförståelse kräver integrering av information från flera meningar. För att besvara sådana frågor som involverar tidsmässiga och kausala relationer genererar vi händelsegrafer från text baserat på beroenden, och rangordnar svar genom att justera händelsegrafer. Framför allt begränsas anpassningarna av grafbaserade resonemang för att säkerställa tidsmässig och orsakssamband. Vårt fokuserade tillvägagångssätt anpassar sig själv till befintliga lösningar. Den utlöses automatiskt endast när det är tillämpligt. Experiment på RACE och MCTest visar att toppmoderna metoder förbättras avsevärt genom att använda vårt tillvägagångssätt som tillägg.', 'ta': 'தொகுதி பணிகளை படிக்கும் போது சிக்கல் கேள்விகள் பல வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து ஒன்றிணைக்க வேண்டும். இந்த வேலையில், தற்காலிக மற்றும் காரணத்தால் தொடர்புகளுடன் உள்ள இந்த கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்க, உரையிலிருந்து நிகழ்வு வரைபடங்களை உருவா குறிப்பிட்டு, ஒதுங்குபடுத்தல் வரைப்படத்தில் காரணத்தால் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது தற்காலிக மற்றும் காரணத நம்முடைய கவனம் செலுத்தப்பட்ட தீர்வுகள் உள்ளது பயன்படுத்தப்படும் போது மட்டும் தானாகவே துவக்கப்படுகிறது. RACE மற்றும் MCTest முயற்சிகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது நிலை - கலை முறைமைகள் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை கூட்டுதலாக முன்னேற்றுகிறது.', 'ur': 'تعلیم کے کاموں کی پڑھنے میں مکمل سوال کی ضرورت ہے کہ بہت سی جماعتوں سے معلومات کا تفریق کریں اس کام میں، ایسے سوال کی جواب دینے کے لئے temporal and causal relationships میں شامل ہونے کے لئے، ہم اپنا اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل اہل ا مخصوصاً گراف کی بنیادی دلیل کے ذریعہ سے تعمیر کی محدودیت کی جاتی ہے تاکہ موقت اور دلیل توافق کو ثابت قدم رکھے۔ ہمارے متمرکز طریقے سے اپنے آپ کو اچھی طریقے کے ساتھ موجود حل کا اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ یہ صرف موجود ہونے کے موقع پر اتنا ہی پھیرا جاتا ہے۔ RACE اور MCTest کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ اضافہ کے طور پر ہمارے طریقے کے ذریعہ اضافہ کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Complex questions in reading comprehension tasks require integrating information from multiple sentences.  Ushbu vazifani vaqt va sababchi aloqalar bilan javob berish uchun, biz tashkilotlarni matn asosida ishlatadigan holat grafiklarini yaratimiz va hodisa grafiklarini birlashtirish orqali darajaga javob beramiz. @ info Bizning eng fokusiz o'zimizga o'xshash murakkablarimizga o'xshaydi. @ info RACE va MCTest'ning imtiyozlari qoʻshish usuli sifatida holatning holati usulini qoʻshish usuli sifatida bajariladi.", 'vi': 'Vấn đề phức tạp trong việc đọc các công việc thấu hiểu yêu cầu ghép thông tin từ nhiều câu. Trong việc này, để trả lời những câu hỏi liên quan đến thời gian và hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ hệ, chúng tôi tạo ra các biểu đồ Sự hợp nhất bị hạn chế bởi việc lập trình đồ thị để đảm bảo sự hợp đồng thời gian và nguyên nhân. Cách tiếp cận tập trung của chúng ta thích hợp hơn nó chỉ được kích hoạt tự động khi thích hợp. Các thí nghiệm trên đua ngựa và MCTest cho thấy các phương pháp hiện đại được cải thiện đáng kể bằng cách dùng phương pháp bổ sung như chúng ta.', 'nl': 'Complexe vragen bij leesbegripstaken vereisen het integreren van informatie uit meerdere zinnen. In dit werk genereren we gebeurtenisgrafieken op basis van tekst op basis van afhankelijkheden en rangschikken antwoorden door gebeurtenisgrafieken uit te lijnen. In het bijzonder worden de uitlijningen beperkt door op grafieken gebaseerde redenering om tijdige en causale overeenstemming te garanderen. Onze gerichte aanpak vult op zelfadaptieve wijze bestaande oplossingen aan; het wordt alleen automatisch geactiveerd indien van toepassing. Experimenten op RACE en MCTest tonen aan dat state-of-the-art methoden aanzienlijk verbeterd worden door onze aanpak als add-on te gebruiken.', 'bg': 'Сложните въпроси в задачите за разбиране на четенето изискват интегриране на информация от множество изречения. В тази работа, за да отговорим на такива въпроси, включващи времеви и причинно-следствени отношения, генерираме графики на събития от текст въз основа на зависимости и подреждаме отговорите чрез подравняване на графики на събития. По-специално подравняванията са ограничени от графично основани разсъждения, за да се гарантира времево и причинно-следствено съгласие. Нашият фокусиран подход, самоадаптиращ се, допълва съществуващите решения; автоматично се задейства само когато е приложимо. Експериментите на RACE и MCTest показват, че най-съвременните методи са значително подобрени чрез използването на нашия подход като добавка.', 'da': 'Komplekse spørgsmål i læseforståelsesopgaver kræver integrering af oplysninger fra flere sætninger. For at besvare sådanne spørgsmål, der involverer tidsmæssige og årsagsrelaterede relationer, genererer vi hændelsesgrafer ud fra tekst baseret på afhængigheder, og rangerer svar ved at justere hændelsesgrafer. Navnlig er justeringerne begrænset af grafbaseret ræsonnement for at sikre tidsmæssig og årsagssammenhæng. Vores fokuserede tilgang supplerer selv eksisterende løsninger. den udløses kun automatisk, når det er relevant. Eksperimenter med RACE og MCTest viser, at state-of-the-art metoder forbedres markant ved at bruge vores tilgang som en add-on.', 'hr': 'Kompletna pitanja u čitanju zadataka razumijevanja zahtijevaju integraciju informacija iz višestrukih rečenica. U ovom poslu, kako bi odgovorili na takve pitanja uključujući privremene i uzročne odnose, stvorili smo grafike događaja iz teksta bazirane na ovisnosti i odgovore na rank prilagođenjem grafika događaja. Posebno, prilagodbe ograničavaju razlogom na grafiku kako bi se osigurala privremeni i uzročni sporazum. Naš fokusirani pristup samoporavno dopunjava postojeće rješenja; automatski se pokreće samo kad se primjenjuje. Iskusi na RACE i MCTest pokazuju da su metode umjetnosti posebno poboljšane koristeći naš pristup kao dodatak.', 'ko': '읽기 이해 임무 중의 복잡한 문제는 여러 문장의 정보를 통합시켜야 한다.이 작업에서 시간과 인과관계에 관한 질문에 대답하기 위해 우리는 의존관계에 따라 텍스트에서 이벤트맵을 생성하고 이벤트맵을 정렬하여 답안을 정렬한다.특히 정렬은 도형에 기초한 추리의 제약을 받아 시간과 인과가 일치하도록 한다.우리가 집중한 방법은 기존의 해결 방안을 적응적으로 보충했다.적용 시에만 자동으로 터치됩니다.RACE와 MCTest에서의 실험은 우리의 방법을 부가 부품으로 사용하면 가장 선진적인 방법을 현저하게 개선할 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Maswali ya kompyuta katika kusoma kazi za msingi yanahitaji kuunganisha taarifa kutoka kwenye sentensi mbalimbali. Katika kazi hii, kujibu maswali kama hayo yanayohusiana na mahusiano ya muda na maana, tunatengeneza picha za matukio kutoka kwenye maandishi yanayotegemea, na majibu ya vyeo kwa kutumia picha za tukio. Kwa hakika, upinzani huo umezuiwa na sababu inayotumika na picha ili kuhakikisha makubaliano ya muda na sababu. Our focused approach self-adaptively complements existing solutions;  inajitokeza kwa manufaa tu pale inavyopatikana. Majaribio yanayohusu RACE na MCTest yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu za aina ya sanaa zinazozidi kuboreshwa kwa kutumia mbinu yetu kama kuongezea.', 'de': 'Komplexe Fragen in Leseverständnisaufgaben erfordern die Integration von Informationen aus mehreren Sätzen. Um solche Fragen mit zeitlichen und kausalen Beziehungen zu beantworten, generieren wir in dieser Arbeit Ereignisgraphen aus Text basierend auf Abhängigkeiten und ordnen Antworten durch Ausrichtung von Ereignisgraphen ein. Insbesondere werden die Ausrichtungen durch graphenbasierte Argumentation eingeschränkt, um zeitliche und kausale Übereinstimmung zu gewährleisten. Unser fokussierter Ansatz ergänzt bestehende Lösungen selbstadaptiv; es wird nur dann automatisch ausgelöst, wenn es zutrifft. Experimente an RACE und MCTest zeigen, dass modernste Methoden durch den Einsatz unseres Ansatzes als Add-on deutlich verbessert werden.', 'id': 'Pertanyaan kompleks dalam membaca tugas pemahaman membutuhkan integrasi informasi dari beberapa kalimat. Dalam pekerjaan ini, untuk menjawab pertanyaan seperti ini yang melibatkan hubungan temporal dan penyebab, kami menghasilkan grafik peristiwa dari teks berdasarkan dependensi, dan rangka jawaban dengan menyesuaikan grafik peristiwa. Terutama, penyesuaian dikuasai oleh alasan berdasarkan grafik untuk memastikan kesepakatan temporal dan penyebab. pendekatan fokus kita secara otomatif menambah solusi yang ada; itu secara otomatis dipicu hanya ketika berlaku. Eksperimen pada RACE dan MCTest menunjukkan bahwa metode terbaik terutama diperbaiki dengan menggunakan pendekatan kita sebagai tambahan.', 'tr': 'Açmak üçin soraglary çykarmak üçin bir näçe sözlerden maglumat integrasyna gerek. Bu işde, wagt we sebäpli baglaýyşlar arasynda ýaly soraglary jogap bermek üçin, olaryň grafiklerine daşary baglançlyga daýanýan tekstden çykyş grafikleri döredip, we olaryň grafiklerini çykaryp derejesini çykaryp barýarys. Hassa bolsa, çizgiler grafik tabanly sebäpli wagtyň we netijeli ylalaşygyny garaşamak üçin mümkin edýärler. Biziň ünsümiz öz-özümizden üýtgeşik ýagdaýymyz bar çözümlerini doldurýar; ol diňe işlenýän zaman otomatik bilen başlatılýar. "RACE" we "MCTest" deneyleri gurnalan ýagdaýymyzy ekleýän ýagdaýymyzy üýtgedeniňde has gowydygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Kompleksie vrae in die lees van verstandige taak benodig integrasie inligting van veelvuldige teikene. In hierdie werk, om sodanige vrae te antwoord met tydelike en oorsaaklike verwantings, genereer ons gebeurtenis grafieke van teks gebaseer op afhanklikhede en rank antwoordes deur gebeurtenis grafieke te aligneer. In besonderhede word die aanpassings gebrek deur graafgebaseerde redening om tydelike en oorsaaklike ooreenkoms te verseker. Ons fokuseerde toegang self-adaptief complementeer bestaande oplossing; dit is automaties uitgestrek slegs wanneer toepassing is. Eksperimente op RACE en MCTest vertoon dat state-of-the-art metodes is notaal verbeter deur ons toegang as 'n byvoeg te gebruik.", 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s በዚህ ሥራ፣ ሰዓት እና አካባቢ ግንኙነት ጋር ያሉትን ጥያቄዎች ለመመልስ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተለየ ጊዜ እና የውይይት ግንኙነት እንዲያረጋግጥ በgraph-based ምክንያት ግንኙነቶችን አግኝቷል፡፡ ተማምኖን የራሳችንን አስተያየት ለመቀበል የሚችሉትን መፍትሄ አግኝቷል:: በተጠቃሚ ጊዜ ብቻ ይታያል የRACE እና MCTest ፈተናዎች የዓላማ ሥርዓት ሥርዓት በመጠቀም ጥያቄን በመጨመር ይሻላል፡፡", 'fa': 'سوال\u200cهای پیچیده در خواندن وظیفه\u200cهای درک نیاز دارد اطلاعات را از جمله\u200cهای چندین جمله جمع کند. در این کار، برای پاسخ دادن به چنین سوالاتی که شامل رابطه\u200cهای موقتی و علت\u200cآوری هستند، ما گرافیک\u200cهای اتفاق را از متن بر اساس بستگی\u200cها تولید می\u200cکنیم، و پاسخ\u200cها را از طریق تنظیم گرافیک\u200cهای اتفاق می\u200cکنیم. مخصوصاً تعیین\u200cها توسط دلیل\u200cهای بنیاد گراف محدودیت می\u200cشوند تا موافقت موقتی و باعث دلایل ثابت شوند. روش تمرکز ما به طور خودساز راه حل\u200cهای موجود را اضافه می\u200cکند. تنها زمانی که موجود می\u200cشود به طور خودکار فعال می\u200cشود. تجربه\u200cهای RACE و MCTest نشان می\u200cدهند که روش\u200cهای ایالت هنری با استفاده از روش\u200cهای ما به عنوان اضافه\u200cای بهتر می\u200cشوند.', 'sq': "Pyetje komplekse në leximin e detyrave të kuptimit kërkojnë integrimin e informacionit nga fjalët e shumta. Në këtë punë, për t'u përgjigjur pyetjeve të tilla që përfshijnë marrëdhënie të përkohshme dhe shkaktuese, ne krijojmë grafikë ngjarjesh nga teksti bazuar në varësitë dhe renditet përgjigjet duke renditur grafikë ngjarjesh. Veçanërisht, rregullimet janë të kufizuara nga arsyetimi bazuar në grafik për të siguruar marrëveshje të përkohshme dhe shkakuese. Përqasja jonë e përqëndruar plotëson në mënyrë të vetëpërshtatshme zgjidhjet ekzistuese; është aktivizuar automatikisht vetëm kur aplikohet. Eksperimentet në RACE dhe MCTest tregojnë se metodat më të larta janë përmirësuar veçan ërisht duke përdorur qasjen tonë si shtesë.", 'hy': 'Բազմաթիվ նախադասություններից տեղեկատվությունը անհրաժեշտ է բազմաթիվ նախադասություններից ինտեգրելով: In this work, to answer such questions involving temporal and causal relations, we generate event graphs from text based on dependencies, and rank answers by aligning event graphs.  Մասնավորապես, հարմարեցումները սահմանափակվում են գծագրային հիմնված մտածողության միջոցով, որպեսզի ապահովեն ժամանակական և պատճառային համաձայնություն: Our focused approach self-adaptively complements existing solutions;  այն ինքնաբերաբար ակտիվանում է միայն այն դեպքում, երբ հարմար է: RACE ի և MCT-ի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ ամենաբարձր մեթոդները հատկապես բարելավվում են օգտագործելով մեր մոտեցումը որպես ավելցում:', 'az': 'Əvvəlki sözlərdən məlumatları oxumaq üçün kompleks suallar lazımdır. Bu işdə, temporal və causal ilişkiler barəsindəki bu suallara cavab vermək üçün, bağımlılıqlara dayanan mətn grafiklərindən və olaraq grafikləri düzəltmək üçün dərəcələrə cavab verərik. Özellikle, müəyyən edilmələri grafik tabanlı dəyişikliklər üçün müddətli və nedeniyyət anlaşmasını təsdiqləmək üçün müəyyən edilir. Bizim mövcud tərzimiz öz-özünə uyğunlaşdırılmış çətinliklərimizi tamamlayır. yalnız mümkün olduğu vaxt avtomatik olaraq başlatılır. RACE və MCTest təcrübələrinin təcrübələrinin əlavə etdiyi təcrübələrə görə bizim təcrübəmizi əlavə etdiyimiz kimi daha yaxşılaşdırılır.', 'bs': 'Kompleksna pitanja u čitanju zadataka razumijevanja zahtijevaju integraciju informacija iz višestrukih rečenica. U ovom poslu, kako bi odgovorili na takve pitanja uključujući privremene i uzročne odnose, stvaramo grafike događaja iz teksta bazirane na ovisnosti i odgovore na rank usklađivanjem grafika događaja. Posebno, usporedbe ograničavaju razlogom na grafiku kako bi se osigurala privremeni i uzročni sporazum. Naš fokusirani pristup sami prilagođuje postojeće rješenja; automatski se pokreće samo kada se primjenjuje. Eksperimenti o RACE i MCTest pokazuju da su metode umjetnosti posebno poboljšane koristeći naš pristup kao dodatak.', 'ca': "Preguntes complexes en llegir tasques de comprensió requereixen integrar informació de múltiples frases. En aquesta feina, per respondre a aquestes preguntes que impliquen relacions temporals i causals, generam gràfics d'esdeveniments a partir del text basat en dependencies, i classifiquem les respostes alliniant els gràfics d'esdeveniments. In particular, the alignments are constrained by graph-based reasoning to ensure temporal and causal agreement.  El nostre enfocament centrat complementa de manera autoadaptada les solucions existents; només es desencadena automàticament quan és aplicable. Els experiments en RACE i MCTest mostren que els mètodes més avançats s'han millorat sobretot utilitzant el nostre enfocament com a complement.", 'bn': 'কনফ্রেন্সশন কাজ পড়ার সময় কমপ্লেক্স প্রশ্নের প্রয়োজন বেশ কয়েকটি বাক্য থেকে তথ্য যুক্ত করার প্রয়োজন। এই কাজে এই ধরনের প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেওয়ার জন্য আমরা অনুষ্ঠানের ভিত্তিতে অনুষ্ঠানের গ্রাফ তৈরি করি এবং অনুষ্ঠানের গ্রাফ তৈরি করি। বিশেষ করে, গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক কারণে সাময়িক এবং কারণ চুক্তি নিশ্চিত করার জন্য এই প্রতিযোগিতা নিষিদ্ধ করা হয়েছে। আমাদের মনোযোগ আত্মসমর্থনের প্রতিক্রিয়া বিদ্যমান সমাধানের ব্যাপারে; এটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রয়োজনীয় সময়ে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ট্রাইগার করা হয়। রেসি এবং এমসিটিস্টের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধতি আমাদের যোগাযোগ হিসেবে ব্যবহার করে আমাদের পদক্ষে', 'et': 'Keerulised küsimused lugemise mõistmise ülesannetes nõuavad teabe integreerimist mitmest lausest. Selles töös, et vastata ajalisi ja põhjuslikke seoseid puudutavatele küsimustele, genereerime sõltuvustel põhinevast tekstist sündmuste graafikud ja järjestame vastused sündmuste graafikute joondamise abil. Ajalise ja põhjusliku kokkuleppe tagamiseks piirab joondusi eelkõige graafik-põhine arutlus. Meie keskendunud lähenemisviis täiendab iseenesest olemasolevaid lahendusi; see käivitub automaatselt ainult vajaduse korral. RACE ja MCTest katsed näitavad, et tipptasemel meetodeid on märkimisväärselt parandatud, kasutades meie lähenemisviisi lisana.', 'fi': 'Monimutkaiset kysymykset lukemisen ymmärtämistä koskevissa tehtävissä edellyttävät tiedon integroimista useista lauseista. Tässä työssä, vastataksemme tällaisiin ajallisiin ja kausaalisiin suhteisiin liittyviin kysymyksiin, luomme tekstistä tapahtumakaavioita riippuvuuksien perusteella ja asetamme vastaukset rivittämällä tapahtumakaavioita. Erityisesti graafiseen päättelyyn perustuvia linjauksia rajoittaa ajallinen ja syy-yhteys. Keskitetty lähestymistapamme täydentää itse olemassa olevia ratkaisuja. se käynnistyy automaattisesti vain tarvittaessa. RACE- ja MCTest-kokeilut osoittavat, että viimeisimpiä menetelmiä parannetaan huomattavasti käyttämällä lähestymistapaamme lisäosana.', 'cs': 'Komplexní otázky v úkolech porozumění čtení vyžadují integraci informací z více vět. V této práci, abychom odpověděli na otázky týkající se časových a kauzálních vztahů, generujeme událostní grafy z textu na základě závislostí a řadíme odpovědi srovnáním událostních grafů. Zejména zarovnání je omezeno grafovým uvažováním, aby byla zajištěna časová a příčinná shoda. Náš zaměřený přístup samostatně doplňuje stávající řešení; automaticky se spustí pouze v případě potřeby. Experimenty na RACE a MCTest ukazují, že nejmodernější metody jsou výrazně zlepšeny pomocí našeho přístupu jako doplněk.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang gawar iki, nggambar aturan suaraning sampeyan gambar nggawe tarjamahan karo perusahaan anyar perusahaan winih windows-action Awakdhéwé kabèh tanggal dipoleksi kanggo nambah akeh politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Perintah Panjenengan langkung raé karo XMP nggambar kuwi meta-karo seni nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nambah nambah.', 'ha': "QXml Daga wannan aikin, za mu iya karɓa wa masu tambayar su masu haɗi da kuma masu shawara, za'a ƙiƙira graphogi na shiryoyin ayuka daga matsayin, a kan da inganci, kuma Mu sami majiɓinta daraja da za'a yi fassara. A cikin ƙayyade, an riƙe jujjuyawar da aka ƙayyade fassarar dõmin ya tabbatar karɓen iyarwa da sabo. Zuwa ta zura a cikin matabbata masu adadi da kangara; @ action: button Kayan jarrabõ na RaCE da MATest sun nuna cewa an kyautata metoden-sanar-halin don a yi amfani da hanyarmu kamar wata ƙara.", 'he': 'שאלות מורכבות בקריאה משימות הבנה דורשות שיתוף מידע ממשפטים רבים. בעבודה הזו, כדי לענות על שאלות כאלה שמעורבות יחסים זמניים וגורניים, אנחנו יוצרים גרפים של אירועים מהטקסט מבוסס על תלויות, ומדרגות תשובות על ידי התאמה גרפים של אירועים. In particular, the alignments are constrained by graph-based reasoning to ensure temporal and causal agreement.  הגישה המתמקדת שלנו תוספת פתרונות קיימות באופן עצמי, הוא מופעל באופן אוטומטי רק כשמתאים. ניסויים על RACE ו MCTest מראים ששיטות מצוינות משתפרות במיוחד על ידי השימוש הגישה שלנו כתוספת.', 'sk': 'Zapletena vprašanja pri razumevanju branja zahtevajo integracijo informacij iz več stavkov. V tem delu za odgovore na takšna vprašanja, ki vključujejo časovne in vzročne odnose, ustvarimo dogodkovne grafe iz besedila, ki temeljijo na odvisnostih, in razvrstimo odgovore z usklajevanjem dogodkovnih grafov. Zlasti so uskladitve omejene z grafično utemeljitvijo, da se zagotovi časovno in vzročno soglasje. Naš osredotočen pristop samoprilagodljivo dopolnjuje obstoječe rešitve; samodejno se sproži le, kadar je to primerno. Poskusi na RACE in MCTest kažejo, da se najsodobnejše metode bistveno izboljšajo z uporabo našega pristopa kot dodatka.', 'bo': 'ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡོད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་ཀློག་འཇུག་གི་ནང་དུ་འདྲི་ཚིག་དག་ཆ་སྐྱེས་ལས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་བཙུགས་དགོས་པ ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དུས་ཚོད་དང་རྒྱུ་མཚན་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཡིག དམིགས་བསལ་ན། སྒྲིག་འཇུག ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་བྱས་པའི་ཐབས་ཤེས་དེ་རང་ཉིད་བཟོས་པ་ཡིན་པ་མིན་འདུག ཉེར་སྤྱོད་རུང་བའི་སྐབས་ཁོ་ན་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་འགོ་འཛུགས་པ RACE དང་MCTest ལ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ནི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་སྟངས་པར་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས'}
{'en': 'Projecting Embeddings for Domain Adaption : Joint Modeling of Sentiment Analysis in Diverse Domains', 'ar': 'إسقاط التضمينات لتكييف المجال: النمذجة المشتركة لتحليل المشاعر في مجالات متنوعة', 'pt': 'Projetando Embeddings para Adaptação de Domínio: Modelagem Conjunta de Análise de Sentimentos em Diversos Domínios', 'fr': "Projection d'intégrations pour l'adaptation de domaines\xa0: modélisation conjointe de l'analyse des sentiments dans divers domaines", 'es': 'Proyección de incrustaciones para la adaptación de dominios: modelado conjunto del análisis de sentimientos en diversos dominios', 'zh': '投影嵌以应域,异域情析之合建模', 'ja': 'ドメイン適応のための埋め込みの投影：多様なドメインにおけるセンチメント分析の共同モデリング', 'hi': 'डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए एम्बेडिंग प्रोजेक्टिंग: विविध डोमेन में भावना विश्लेषण के संयुक्त मॉडलिंग', 'ru': 'Проекция вложений для адаптации домена: совместное моделирование анализа настроений в различных доменах', 'ga': 'Leabaithe Teilgean le haghaidh Oiriúnú Fearainn: Samhaltú Comhpháirteach ar Anailís Mothúchán i bhFearainn Éagsúla', 'ka': 'პროექტირება დიომენის ადაპტიფიკაციისთვის დაყენება: სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის ერთადერთი მოდელირება განსხვავებული დიომენში', 'hu': 'Beágyazások kivetítése a domain adaptációhoz: az érzelmek elemzésének közös modellezése különböző tartományokban', 'el': 'Προβολή ενσωμάτωσης για προσαρμογή τομέων: Κοινή μοντελοποίηση ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων σε ποικίλους τομείς', 'mk': 'Проектирање на вградувања за адапција на домен: заедничко моделирање на анализа на чувствата во различни домени', 'kk': 'Доменге адаптациялау үшін жобалау ендірулері: Түрлі домендерде Sentiment анализациялау үлгісін біріктіру', 'it': "Proiezione di incorporazioni per l'adattamento del dominio: modellazione congiunta dell'analisi dei sentimenti in diversi domini", 'lt': 'Domeno pritaikymo įrenginių projektavimas: bendras jautrumo analizės modeliavimas įvairiose srityse', 'ms': 'Projeksi Embeddings untuk Penyesuaian Domain: Modeling Berkongsi Analisis Sentimen dalam Domain Berberbeza', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്ഷന്\u200dറെ പ്രോജക്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്ന എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d: വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡൊമെന്\u200dസിലെ സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് അന്', 'mt': 'Il-Proġettazzjoni tal-Embeddings għall-Adattament għad-Dominju: Mudellar Konġunt tal-Analiżi tas-Sentimenti f’Dominji Diversi', 'mn': 'Домен загварчлалтын төслийн интеграци: Joint Modeling of Sentiment Analysis in Diverse Domains', 'no': 'Innebygging av prosjekt for domenetilpassing: Joint Modeling of Sentiment Analysis in Diverse Domains', 'ro': 'Proiectarea încorporărilor pentru adaptarea domeniilor: Modelarea comună a analizei sentimentelor în diverse domenii', 'pl': 'Projektowanie osadzeń dla adaptacji domen: wspólne modelowanie analizy sentymentów w różnych dziedzinach', 'sr': 'Projektiranje integracija za adaptaciju domena: zajednička modela analize sentimenta u raznim domenama', 'so': 'Subjecting qalabka Adaption Domain: Joint Modeling of Sentiment Analysis in kala duduwan Domain', 'si': 'ඩොමේන් විස්තරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ විස්තරය: සම්බන්ධ විස්තරය සම්බන්ධ විස්තරය සම්බන්ධය', 'sv': 'Projektering av inbäddningar för domänanpassning: Gemensam modellering av känsloanalys i olika domäner', 'ta': 'Domain Adaption பொருள்', 'ur': 'ڈومین اڈپٹیٹ کے لئے پروژیکٹ ایمبڈینگ: مختلف ڈومین میں Sentiment Analysis کے جولنے کی مدل کرنا', 'uz': 'Domen taĘĽminlovchisi uchun manzillar:', 'vi': 'Chế độ đệm định giá cho Thích nghi miền: Cách thức cảm xúc được kết nối trong các câu kiểu Diverse', 'bg': 'Проектиране на вграждания за адаптиране на домейни: Съвместно моделиране на анализ на сентимента в различни домейни', 'hr': 'Projektiranje integracija za prilagodbu domena: zajednička modela analize sentimenta u raznim domenama', 'nl': 'Projecteren van embeddings voor domeinaanpassing: gezamenlijke modellering van sentimentanalyse in diverse domeinen', 'da': 'Projektering af indlejringer til domænetilpasning: Fælles modellering af følelsesanalyse i forskellige domæner', 'de': 'Projektierung von Embeddings für Domain Adaption: Gemeinsame Modellierung von Stimmungsanalysen in verschiedenen Domänen', 'ko': '영역 적응된 투영 삽입: 서로 다른 영역 정서 분석의 결합 모델', 'fa': 'پروژه\u200cبندی\u200cها برای تغییر\u200cسازی دامنه: نمونه\u200cبندی مجموعه\u200cی تحلیل مجموعه در دامنهای مختلف', 'id': 'Projecting Embeddings for Domain Adaption: Joint Modeling of Sentiment Analysis in Diverse Domains', 'sw': 'Mradi wa Mazingiro kwa ajili ya Adapisho ya Domain: Joint Modeling of Sentiment Analysis in Domain tofauti', 'tr': 'Açmak Adynyň Ullanmasy üçin Taýgunlaşýar: Çeşitli Açysalarda Sentiment Analyzasynyň Kop Modeli', 'af': 'Projekteer Inbeeldings vir Domein Aanpassing: Gesluit Modelering van Sentiment Analiseer in Verskeie Domeine', 'sq': 'Projektimi i përfshirjeve për adaptimin e domenit: Modelimi i përbashkët i analizës së ndjenjave në domene të ndryshme', 'az': 'Domain Adfiksiyası üçün İfadə Etilməsi: Çeşitli Domeylərdə Sentiment Analizisinin İfadə Modeli', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Projecting Embeddings for Domain Adaption: Joint Modeling of Sentiment Analysis in Diverse Domains', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন আডেপেশনের জন্য প্রকল্প: বিভিন্ন ডোমেন্টের সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের মোডেলিং যুক্ত করুন', 'bs': 'Projektiranje integracija za adaptaciju domena: zajednička modela analize sentimenta u raznim domenama', 'et': 'Domeeni kohandamise põimimiste projekteerimine: sentimentaalüüsi ühine modelleerimine erinevates valdkondades', 'ca': 'Projecting Embeddings for Domain Adaption: Joint Modeling of Sentiment Analysis in Diverse Domains', 'cs': 'Projektování vložení pro adaptaci domén: společné modelování analýzy sentimentů v různých doménách', 'fi': 'Verkkotunnuksen mukauttamiseen liittyvien sulautusten projektiointi: Tunne-analyysin yhteinen mallinnus eri toimialueilla', 'he': 'פרוייקציה של תוכניות לתאמה למשפחה: דגם משותף של ניתוח רגשות במשפחות שונות', 'jv': 'Projecting embedings for domain Adjustion: Joint model ing of Sentiment Test in Multiple domain ain', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Projekcijska vgradnja za prilagajanje domen: skupno modeliranje analize čustev v različnih domenah', 'bo': 'Domain Adaption for Projecting Embeddings for Domain: Joint Modeling of Sentiment Analysis in Diverse Domains'}
{'en': 'Domain adaptation for sentiment analysis is challenging due to the fact that supervised classifiers are very sensitive to changes in domain. The two most prominent approaches to this problem are structural correspondence learning and autoencoders. However, they either require long training times or suffer greatly on highly divergent domains. Inspired by recent advances in cross-lingual sentiment analysis, we provide a novel perspective and cast the domain adaptation problem as an embedding projection task. Our model takes as input two mono-domain embedding spaces and learns to project them to a bi-domain space, which is jointly optimized to (1) project across domains and to (2) predict sentiment. We perform domain adaptation experiments on 20 source-target domain pairs for sentiment classification and report novel state-of-the-art results on 11 domain pairs, including the Amazon domain adaptation datasets and SemEval 2013 and 2016 datasets. Our analysis shows that our model performs comparably to state-of-the-art approaches on domains that are similar, while performing significantly better on highly divergent domains. Our code is available at https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ar': 'يعد تكييف المجال لتحليل المشاعر أمرًا صعبًا نظرًا لحقيقة أن المصنفات الخاضعة للإشراف حساسة جدًا للتغيرات في المجال. إن أبرز طريقتين لحل هذه المشكلة هما التعلم الهيكلي بالمراسلة والتشفير التلقائي. ومع ذلك ، فهم إما يحتاجون إلى فترات تدريب طويلة أو يعانون بشكل كبير في مجالات شديدة الاختلاف. مستوحاة من التطورات الحديثة في تحليل المشاعر عبر اللغات ، نقدم منظورًا جديدًا ونعتبر مشكلة التكيف مع المجال مهمة إسقاط متضمنة. يأخذ نموذجنا كإدخال اثنين من مساحات التضمين أحادية المجال ويتعلم عرضهما على مساحة ثنائية المجال ، والتي تم تحسينها بشكل مشترك لـ (1) المشروع عبر المجالات و (2) توقع المشاعر. نجري تجارب تكيف المجال على 20 زوجًا من مجالات هدف المصدر لتصنيف المشاعر ونبلغ عن نتائج حديثة على 11 زوجًا من المجالات ، بما في ذلك مجموعات بيانات تكيف مجال Amazon ومجموعات بيانات SemEval 2013 و 2016. يُظهر تحليلنا أن نموذجنا يؤدي أداءً مقارنًا بأحدث الأساليب في المجالات المتشابهة ، بينما يؤدي أداءً أفضل بشكل ملحوظ في المجالات شديدة التباين. الكود الخاص بنا متاح على https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'fr': "L'adaptation du domaine pour l'analyse des sentiments est difficile en raison du fait que les classificateurs supervisés sont très sensibles aux changements de domaine. Les deux approches les plus importantes pour résoudre ce problème sont l'apprentissage par correspondance structurelle et les auto-encodeurs. Cependant, soit ils nécessitent de longues durées de formation, soit ils souffrent beaucoup dans des domaines très divergents. Inspirés par les récents progrès de l'analyse des sentiments multilingues, nous proposons une nouvelle perspective et présentons le problème de l'adaptation de domaine comme une tâche de projection intégrée. Notre modèle prend en entrée deux espaces d'intégration mono-domaine et apprend à les projeter dans un espace bi-domaine, qui est optimisé conjointement pour (1) projeter sur plusieurs domaines et (2) prédire le sentiment. Nous réalisons des expériences d'adaptation de domaines sur 20 paires de domaines source-cible pour la classification des sentiments et publions de nouveaux résultats de pointe sur 11 paires de domaines, y compris les ensembles de données d'adaptation de domaine Amazon et les ensembles de données SemEval 2013 et 2016. Notre analyse montre que notre modèle fonctionne de manière comparable aux approches de pointe sur des domaines similaires, tout en étant nettement plus performant sur des domaines très divergents. Notre code est disponible sur https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse", 'pt': 'A adaptação de domínio para análise de sentimento é desafiadora devido ao fato de que os classificadores supervisionados são muito sensíveis a mudanças no domínio. As duas abordagens mais proeminentes para este problema são o aprendizado de correspondência estrutural e os autoencoders. No entanto, eles exigem longos tempos de treinamento ou sofrem muito em domínios altamente divergentes. Inspirados pelos recentes avanços na análise de sentimentos em vários idiomas, fornecemos uma nova perspectiva e lançamos o problema de adaptação de domínio como uma tarefa de projeção de incorporação. Nosso modelo toma como entrada dois espaços de incorporação de monodomínio e aprende a projetá-los para um espaço de dois domínios, que é otimizado em conjunto para (1) projetar entre domínios e (2) prever sentimentos. Realizamos experimentos de adaptação de domínio em 20 pares de domínio de origem-destino para classificação de sentimentos e relatamos novos resultados de última geração em 11 pares de domínio, incluindo os conjuntos de dados de adaptação de domínio da Amazon e conjuntos de dados SemEval 2013 e 2016. Nossa análise mostra que nosso modelo tem desempenho comparável às abordagens de última geração em domínios semelhantes, enquanto apresenta desempenho significativamente melhor em domínios altamente divergentes. Nosso código está disponível em https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'es': 'La adaptación de dominios para el análisis de sentimientos es un desafío debido al hecho de que los clasificadores supervisados son muy sensibles a los cambios en el dominio. Los dos enfoques más destacados para este problema son el aprendizaje por correspondencia estructural y los autocodificadores. Sin embargo, requieren largos tiempos de entrenamiento o sufren mucho en ámbitos muy divergentes. Inspirados por los avances recientes en el análisis de sentimientos multilingües, ofrecemos una perspectiva novedosa y presentamos el problema de la adaptación de dominios como una tarea de proyección de incrustación. Nuestro modelo toma como entrada dos espacios de incrustación monodominio y aprende a proyectarlos en un espacio bidominio, que se optimiza conjuntamente para (1) proyectar entre dominios y (2) predecir el sentimiento. Realizamos experimentos de adaptación de dominios en 20 pares de dominios de origen y destino para la clasificación de opiniones e informamos de resultados novedosos de última generación en 11 pares de dominios, incluidos los conjuntos de datos de adaptación de dominios de Amazon y los conjuntos de datos SemEval 2013 y 2016. Nuestro análisis muestra que nuestro modelo funciona de manera comparable a los enfoques más avanzados en dominios que son similares, mientras que se desempeña significativamente mejor en dominios altamente divergentes. Nuestro código está disponible en https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'hi': 'भावना विश्लेषण के लिए डोमेन अनुकूलन इस तथ्य के कारण चुनौतीपूर्ण है कि पर्यवेक्षित क्लासिफायर डोमेन में परिवर्तन के लिए बहुत संवेदनशील हैं। इस समस्या के लिए दो सबसे प्रमुख दृष्टिकोण संरचनात्मक पत्राचार सीखने और autoencoders हैं। हालांकि, उन्हें या तो लंबे समय तक प्रशिक्षण समय की आवश्यकता होती है या अत्यधिक अलग-अलग डोमेन पर बहुत पीड़ित होते हैं। क्रॉस-लिंगुअल भावना विश्लेषण में हाल की प्रगति से प्रेरित होकर, हम एक उपन्यास परिप्रेक्ष्य प्रदान करते हैं और डोमेन अनुकूलन समस्या को एक एम्बेडिंग प्रोजेक्शन कार्य के रूप में डालते हैं। हमारा मॉडल इनपुट दो मोनो-डोमेन एम्बेडिंग रिक्त स्थान के रूप में लेता है और उन्हें एक द्वि-डोमेन स्थान पर प्रोजेक्ट करना सीखता है, जिसे संयुक्त रूप से डोमेन में (1) परियोजना के लिए अनुकूलित किया जाता है और (2) भावना की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए। हम भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए 20 स्रोत-लक्ष्य डोमेन जोड़े पर डोमेन अनुकूलन प्रयोग करते हैं और अमेज़ॅन डोमेन अनुकूलन डेटासेट और सेमईवल 2013 और 2016 डेटासेट सहित 11 डोमेन जोड़े पर उपन्यास स्टेट-ऑफ-द-आर्ट परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं। हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल उन डोमेन पर अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों के लिए तुलनात्मक रूप से प्रदर्शन करता है जो समान हैं, जबकि अत्यधिक अलग-अलग डोमेन पर काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हमारा कोड https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse पर उपलब्ध है', 'zh': '情析域适有挑战性,以监分类器敏于领也。 二者,学自编码器也。 然要须久练时,或在高发散领中受大苦。 受跨言情析最新进展,供一新视角,以领域为嵌投影。 二单域嵌空为输,学投双域空合优化,以(1)跨域影(2)测情。 吾于 20 个源-域自适实验以行情类,而 11 个域(Amazon 域自应数集、 SemEval 2013 、 2016 数集)以告最新。 吾之分析表明,形于相似之域,与先进相当,而明于高散之域。 吾代码可 https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ja': 'センチメント分析のためのドメイン適応は、監視された分類子がドメインの変化に非常に敏感であるという事実のために困難である。 この問題に対する2つの最も顕著なアプローチは、構造的対応学習とオートエンコーダーである。 しかし、それらは長いトレーニング時間を必要とするか、非常に多様なドメインで大きな被害を受けます。 最近のクロスリンガル感情分析の進歩に触発されて、私たちは斬新な視点を提供し、埋め込み投影タスクとしてドメイン適応の問題をキャスティングします。 私たちのモデルは、2つのモノドメイン埋め込み空間を入力とし、それらをバイドメイン空間に投影することを学びます。バイドメイン空間は、(1)ドメイン間で投影し、(2)感情を予測するために共同で最適化されています。 私たちは、センチメント分類のための20のソースターゲットドメインペアでドメイン適応実験を行い、Amazonドメイン適応データセット、SemEval 2013および2016データセットを含む11のドメインペアで最新の結果を報告します。 当社の分析によると、当社のモデルは、類似したドメインでの最先端のアプローチと同等のパフォーマンスを発揮する一方で、非常に多様なドメインでのパフォーマンスが著しく向上していることが示されています。 コードはhttps://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blseで入手できます。', 'ru': 'Адаптация домена для анализа настроений является сложной задачей в связи с тем, что контролируемые классификаторы очень чувствительны к изменениям в домене. Двумя наиболее заметными подходами к этой проблеме являются структурное заочное обучение и автокодировщики. Однако они либо требуют длительного времени обучения, либо сильно страдают в весьма различных областях. Вдохновленные недавними достижениями в анализе кросс-лингвистических настроений, мы предоставляем новую перспективу и ставим проблему адаптации домена как задачу проекции встраивания. Наша модель берет в качестве входных данных два однодоменных пространства встраивания и учится проецировать их в двухдоменное пространство, которое совместно оптимизировано для (1) проецирования между доменами и (2) прогнозирования настроений. Мы проводим эксперименты по адаптации домена на 20 парах «источник - целевой домен» для классификации настроений и сообщаем о новых современных результатах на 11 парах доменов, включая наборы данных по адаптации домена Amazon и наборы данных SemEval 2013 и 2016 годов. Наш анализ показывает, что наша модель работает сопоставимо с современными подходами на схожих доменах, в то же время демонстрируя значительно лучшие показатели на сильно расходящихся доменах. Наш код доступен по адресу https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ga': 'Is dúshlánach é oiriúnú fearainn le haghaidh anailíse meon toisc go bhfuil aicmitheoirí faoi mhaoirseacht an-íogair d’athruithe san fhearann. Is iad an dá chur chuige is suntasaí maidir leis an bhfadhb seo ná foghlaim struchtúrach comhfhreagrais agus uath-ionchódóirí. Mar sin féin, teastaíonn amanna fada oiliúna uathu nó bíonn siad ag fulaingt go mór ar réimsí an-éagsúla. Arna spreagadh ag dul chun cinn le déanaí in anailís thrastheangach ar dhearcadh, soláthraímid peirspictíocht úrnua agus réitighimid fadhb oiriúnú an fhearainn mar thasc réamh-mheastacháin leabú. Glacann ár samhail dhá spás leabaithe mona-fhearainn mar ionchur agus foghlaimíonn sé iad a theilgean chuig spás dé-fhearainn, atá optamaithe le chéile chun (1) tionscadal a dhéanamh ar fud na bhfearann agus (2) meon a thuar. Déanaimid turgnaimh oiriúnaithe fearainn ar 20 péirí fearainn foinse-sprioc le haghaidh aicmiú meon agus tuairiscímid torthaí úrscothacha ar 11 phéire fearainn, lena n-áirítear tacair sonraí oiriúnaithe fearainn Amazon agus tacair sonraí SemEval 2013 agus 2016. Léiríonn ár n-anailís go bhfeidhmíonn ár samhail ar bhealach inchomparáide le cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha ar fhearainn atá cosúil le chéile, agus ag an am céanna ag feidhmiú i bhfad níos fearr ar réimsí an-difriúla. Tá ár gcód ar fáil ag https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ka': 'სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის დომინის ადაპტიფიკაცია შესაძლებელია ფაქტის შესახებ, რომ სენტიმენტირებული კლასიფიკაციები დიომინის ცვლილებისთვის ძალიან უფრო ეს პრობლემა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ორი მიღება არის სტრუქტურული კოპორსპენტების სწავლება და ავტოკოდერები. მაგრამ ისინი უნდა ძალიან განსხვავებული დროების განსხვავება, ან ძალიან განსხვავებული დომენში. ჩვენ პროექტიფიკაციის პროექტიკური პროექტიკური პროექტიკური პროექტიკური პრობლემაციის შესაძლებლობით აღმოჩენა, როგორც კონფიგურაციის ანალიზიციაში. ჩვენი მოდელი იყენებს ორი მონო- დომინის შემდეგ სივრცე და ისწავლის ორი- დომინის სივრცე პროექტირებას, რომელიც ერთად პროექტირებულია (1) პროექტის დიომენში და (2) წარმოდგენა სივრცემე ჩვენ დიომინის ადაპტიფიკაციის ექსპერიმენტები 20 მისამართელი დიომინის კლასიფიკაციაში და აღწერეთ პრომენტის შედეგები 11 დიომინის კოსპერიმენტებში, რომლებიც Amazon დიომინის ადაპტიკაციის დიატატიკა ჩვენი ანალიზია, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარებით გავაკეთება კომენტებზე, რომლებიც მსგავსია, რომლებიც ძალიან უკეთესია განსხვავებული დომენტებში. ჩვენი კოდის შესაძლებელია https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'hu': 'Domain adaptáció az érzelmek elemzéséhez kihívást jelent, mivel a felügyelt osztályozók nagyon érzékenyek a domain változásaira. A probléma két legkiemelkedőbb megközelítése a strukturális levelezési tanulás és az autoencoder. Mindazonáltal vagy hosszú képzési időt igényelnek, vagy nagymértékben különböző területeken szenvednek. A többnyelvű érzelmek elemzésének közelmúltbeli előrehaladásaiból inspirálva új perspektívát nyújtunk, és a domain adaptációs problémát beágyazó vetítési feladatnak tekintjük. Modellünk bemenetként két mono-domain beágyazó teret vesz igénybe, és megtanulja kivetíteni őket egy két-domain térbe, amelyet közösen optimalizáltunk (1) a domainek közötti projektre és (2) a sentiment előrejelzésére. Tartomány adaptációs kísérleteket végzünk 20 forrás-cél domain páron a sentiment osztályozás céljából, valamint 11 domain páron, beleértve az Amazon domain adaptációs adatkészleteket és a SemEval 2013 és 2016 adatkészleteket. Elemzésünk azt mutatja, hogy modellünk összehasonlíthatóan teljesít a hasonló területeken alkalmazott korszerű megközelítésekkel, miközben jelentősen jobban teljesít a rendkívül eltérő területeken. A kódunk elérhető a következő címen: https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'el': 'Η προσαρμογή του τομέα για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων αποτελεί πρόκληση λόγω του γεγονότος ότι οι εποπτευόμενοι ταξινομητές είναι πολύ ευαίσθητοι στις αλλαγές στον τομέα. Οι δύο πιο σημαντικές προσεγγίσεις σε αυτό το πρόβλημα είναι η εκμάθηση δομικής αλληλογραφίας και οι αυτόματοι κωδικοποιητές. Ωστόσο, είτε απαιτούν μακρύς χρόνους κατάρτισης είτε υποφέρουν σημαντικά σε εξαιρετικά αποκλίνοντες τομείς. Εμπνευσμένοι από τις πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στην ανάλυση των γλωσσικών συναισθημάτων, παρέχουμε μια νέα προοπτική και θέτουμε το πρόβλημα προσαρμογής του τομέα ως έργο ενσωμάτωσης της προβολής. Το μοντέλο μας λαμβάνει ως εισαγωγή δύο χώρους ενσωμάτωσης μονο-τομέα και μαθαίνει να τους προβάλλει σε ένα χώρο δύο τομέων, ο οποίος από κοινού βελτιστοποιείται για (1) προβολή μεταξύ τομέων και (2) πρόβλεψη συναισθημάτων. Πραγματοποιούμε πειράματα προσαρμογής τομέων σε 20-ζεύγη πηγής-στόχου για ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων και αναφέρουμε νέα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε 11-ζεύγη τομέων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των συνόλων δεδομένων προσαρμογής τομέων του Αμαζονίου και των συνόλων δεδομένων SemEval 2013 και 2016. Η ανάλυσή μας δείχνει ότι το μοντέλο μας αποδίδει συγκριτικά με τις σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις σε τομείς που είναι παρόμοιοι, ενώ αποδίδει σημαντικά καλύτερα σε τομείς υψηλής απόκλισης. Ο κωδικός μας είναι διαθέσιμος στο https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'lt': 'Prisitaikymas prie srities jautrumo analizei yra sudėtingas, nes prižiūrimi klasifikatoriai labai jautrūs srities pokyčiams. Dvi svarbiausi šios problemos sprendimai yra struktūrinis korespondencijos mokymasis ir autokodavimas. However, they either require long training times or suffer greatly on highly divergent domains.  Įkvėpta pastarojo meto pažanga atliekant tarpkalbinę jausmų analizę, mes teikiame naują perspektyvą ir sprendžiame prisitaikymo prie srities problem ą kaip įtraukiamą projektavimo užduotį. Mūsų model is įdeda dvi viendomenines įdėjimo erdves ir išmoko jas projektuoti į dvidomeninę erdvę, kuri kartu optimizuojama (1) projektui įvairiose srityse ir (2) prognozuoti jausmą. Atliekame domeno pritaikymo eksperimentus su 20 šaltinių tikslinių domenų poromis, kad būtų galima klasifikuoti jausmus, ir pranešame apie naujus pažangiausius rezultatus su 11 domenų poromis, įskaitant Amazon domeno pritaikymo duomenų rinkinius ir 2013 ir 2016 m. SemEval duomenų rinkinius. Mūsų analizė rodo, kad mūsų modelis veikia palyginti su naujausiais požiūriais panašiose srityse, o labai skirtingose srityse – gerokai geriau. Mūsų kodas pateikiamas https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'it': "L'adattamento del dominio per l'analisi del sentiment è difficile a causa del fatto che i classificatori supervisionati sono molto sensibili ai cambiamenti nel dominio. I due approcci più importanti a questo problema sono l'apprendimento strutturale della corrispondenza e gli autoencoder. Tuttavia, essi richiedono lunghi tempi di formazione o soffrono molto su settori molto divergenti. Ispirati dai recenti progressi nell'analisi del sentiment multilingue, forniamo una nuova prospettiva e lanciamo il problema dell'adattamento del dominio come un compito di proiezione incorporante. Il nostro modello prende come input due spazi di embedding mono-dominio e impara a proiettarli in uno spazio bi-dominio, che è ottimizzato congiuntamente per (1) progetto tra domini e (2) predire sentiment. Eseguiamo esperimenti di adattamento del dominio su 20 coppie di domini sorgente-target per la classificazione dei sentiment e riportiamo nuovi risultati all'avanguardia su 11 coppie di domini, inclusi i dataset di adattamento del dominio Amazon e SemEval 2013 e 2016. La nostra analisi mostra che il nostro modello funziona in modo comparabile agli approcci all'avanguardia su domini che sono simili, mentre funziona significativamente meglio su domini altamente divergenti. Il nostro codice è disponibile all'indirizzo https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse", 'kk': 'Сезімдік анализ үшін домендің адаптациясы домендің бақылау классификацияларының домендің өзгерістеріне өте тәжірибесі бар. Бұл мәселеге ең маңызды екі жағдай - структуралық сәйкестіктер оқыту мен автокодерлер. Бірақ олар ұзын оқыту уақыттарын талап етеді немесе көп айырмашылық домендерде көп көп көмектеседі. Жаңа тілдерді көптеген сезімдер анализиясындағы жаңа жағдайлардың көпшілігін түсіндіріп, біз романдық перспективті келтіріп, доменнің адаптациялауының мәселесін көрсету Біздің үлгіміз екі монодоменді ендіру бос орын ретінде береді, оларды екі домен бос орынға жобалауға үйренеді, бұл домендер арасында (1) жобаға және (2) сезімін алдын алады. Біз домен адаптациялау тәжірибелерін 20 көз мақсатты домендің екеуі сезімдік классификациялау үшін және 11 домендің екеуінің романдық күйінің нәтижесін есептеп береміз, сондай-ақ Amazon домендің адаптаци Біздің анализиямыз моделіміз ұқсас домендердің күйіне салыстырып жатқан, бірақ өте дивергентті домендерде өте жақсы жұмыс істейді. Біздің кодмыз бар https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'mk': 'Адаптацијата на доменот за анализа на чувствата е тешка поради фактот дека надгледуваните класификатори се многу чувствителни на промените во доменот. Двајцата најистакнати пристапи кон овој проблем се структурното учење на кореспонденција и автокодирање. Сепак, тие или бараат долго време на обука или страдаат многу во многу различни домени. Инспирирани од неодамнешните напредоци во различната анализа на чувствата, ние обезбедуваме нова перспектива и го фрлиме проблемот со адаптација на доменот како вградена проекција задача. Нашиот модел зема како влог два монодомени внатрешни простори и научи да ги проектира во дводомен простор, кој е заеднички оптимизиран за (1) проект низ сите домени и (2) предвидува чувство. Ние спроведуваме експерименти за адаптација на домените на 20 парови од домените извор-мета за класификација на чувствата и известуваме нов најнов резултат на 11 парови од домените, вклучувајќи ги и датотеките за адаптација на домените на Амазон и SemEval 2013 и 2016. Our analysis shows that our model performs comparably to state-of-the-art approaches on domains that are similar, while performing significantly better on highly divergent domains.  Нашиот код е достапен на https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'mt': 'L-adattament tad-dominju għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti huwa sfida minħabba l-fatt li l-klassifikaturi sorveljati huma sensittivi ħafna għal bidliet fid-dominju. Iż-żewġ approċċi l-aktar prominenti għal din il-problema huma t-tagħlim strutturali tal-korrispondenza u l-awtokodifikaturi. Madankollu, jew jeħtieġu ħinijiet twal ta’ taħriġ jew ibatu ħafna f’oqsma diverġenti ħafna. Inspirati minn avvanzi reċenti fl-analiżi tas-sentimenti translingwi, a ħna nipprovdu perspettiva ġdida u nieħdu l-problem a tal-adattament tad-dominju bħala kompitu ta’ projezzjoni inkorporattiva. Il-mudell tagħna jieħu bħala input żewġ spazji ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ monodominju u jitgħallem jipproġettawhom lejn spazju ta’ żewġ dominji, li huwa ottimizzat b’mod konġunt għal (1) proġett madwar id-dominji u għal (2) tbassir tas-sentiment. Aħna nagħmlu esperimenti ta’ adattament tad-dominju fuq 20 par tad-dominju sors-mira għall-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti u nirrappurtaw riżultati ġodda tal-aħħar fuq 11-il par tad-dominju, inklużi settijiet tad-dejta tal-adattament tad-dominju Amazon u settijiet tad-dejta SemEval 2013 u 2016. L-analiżi tagħna turi li l-mudell tagħna jwassal b’mod komparabbli mal-approċċi l-aktar avvanzati f’oqsma simili, filwaqt li jwassal b’mod sinifikanti aħjar f’oqsma diverġenti ħafna. Il-kodiċi tagħna huwa disponibbli fuq https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian domain untuk analisis perasaan adalah mencabar kerana fakta bahawa pengklasifikasi yang diawasi sangat sensitif kepada perubahan domain. Dua pendekatan paling terkenal untuk masalah ini adalah pembelajaran korespondenci struktur dan pengekod sendiri. Bagaimanapun, mereka memerlukan masa latihan yang panjang atau menderita sangat pada domain yang sangat berbeza. Inspired by recent advances in cross-lingual sentiment analysis, we provide a novel perspective and cast the domain adaptation problem as an embedding projection task.  Model kami mengambil sebagai input dua ruang penyembedding mono-domain dan belajar untuk projek mereka ke ruang bi-domain, yang secara bersama-sama optimizasi kepada (1) projek melalui domain dan (2) ramalkan perasaan. Kami melakukan eksperimen penyesuaian domain pada 20 pasangan domain sumber-sasaran untuk klasifikasi sentimen dan laporkan keputusan state-of-the-art novel pada 11 pasangan domain, termasuk set data penyesuaian domain Amazon dan set data SemEval 2013 dan 2016. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa model kami berkembang dengan pendekatan state-of-the-art pada domain yang sama, sementara berkembang lebih baik pada domain yang sangat berbeza. Kod kita tersedia di https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിനിലെ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സൂക്ഷ്മമായി നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ക്ലാസ്പിഫ്ലര്\u200dമാര്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നത ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിലേക്ക് ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട രണ്ടുപേരുള്ള അടുത്തെത്തുന്നത് ക്രമീകരണ വിവരങ്ങളും സ്വയം കോ എന്നാലും, അവര്\u200dക്ക് നീണ്ട ട ട്രെയിനിന്\u200dറെ സമയം ആവശ്യമുണ്ട് അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വളരെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഡൊമീനുകളില്\u200d  ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രേരിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d കാഴ്ചപ്പെടുത്തു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d രണ്ട് മോണോ- ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഇടുന്ന സ്ഥലങ്ങളായി എടുക്കുന്നു. അവയെ ഒരു ബി- ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d സ്പെയിസിലേക്ക് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരുമ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഡൊമെന്\u200d ആഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. വിചാരണക്കുറിച്ച് 20 സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ലക്ഷ്യം ഡൊമെയിനിലെ ജോടികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. 11 ഡൊ നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഇതുപോലെയുള്ള ഡോമീനുകളുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ കോഡ് ലഭ്യമാണ് https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээнд хүрээлэн буй домаар дамжуулагч нь хүрээлэн буй хэлбэрүүдийн өөрчлөлттэй маш чухал болохоор хэцүү. Энэ асуудлын хамгийн чухал хоёр ойлголт бол бүтэц харилцааны суралцах, автокодлогч юм. Гэхдээ тэд урт дасгал хөдөлгөөн цаг хэрэгтэй эсвэл маш олон ялгаатай газарт зовлонг шаарддаг. Өмнөх хэлний сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээнд саяхан хөгжлийн талаар бид шинэ асуудлыг хангаж, хүрээлэн буй адилтгалын асуудлыг төвлөрүүлэх үйл ажиллагаа болгодог. Бидний загвар нь хоёр ганц домены орон зайг оруулж, тэднийг хоёр домены орон зайд төсөөлж суралцдаг. Энэ нь хоорондоо (1) төсөл, хоорондоо (2) мэдрэмжтэй байдаг. Бид холбооны адилтгалын туршилтыг 20 эх үүсвэрийн зорилготой холбооны холбоонууд мэдрэмжтэй хуваалцах болон 11 холбооны холбоонууд дээр шинэ state-of-the-art үр дүнг тайлбарлаж, мөн Amazon домжны адилтгалын өгөгдлийн санг Бидний шинжилгээнд бидний загвар нь төстэй зохиолын ойлголтыг харьцуулж байгааг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ маш олон ялгаатай зохиолууд дээр ажиллаж байгааг харуулж байна. Бидний код нь https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'sr': 'Domena adaptacija za analizu sentimenta je izazovna zbog činjenice da su nadzirani klasifikatori veoma osetljivi na promjene domena. Dva najpoznatija pristupa ovom problemu su strukturno učenje dopisnika i autokoderi. Međutim, oni ili zahtevaju dugo treninga ili mnogo patiju u veoma različitim domenama. Inspirirali smo nedavnim napredama u analizi prejezika sentiment a, pružamo novu perspektivu i bacimo problem adaptacije domena kao zadatak za ugrađenje projekcije. Naš model uzima kao ulaz dva prostora u monodomenu i nauèi da ih projektiraju u dvodomenu prostora, koji je zajedno optimiziran na (1) projekt preko domena i predviðaju osjeæaj. Izvodimo eksperimente za adaptaciju domena na 20 izvorskih domena za klasifikaciju sentimenta i prijavljujemo nove rezultate stanja umjetnosti na 11 domena par, uključujući podatke o adaptaciji domena Amazona i semiEval 2013 i podatke 2016. Naša analiza pokazuje da naš model provodi usporedno sa pristupima države umjetnosti na područjima sličnim, dok izvodi značajno bolje u veoma različitim domenama. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ඩෝමේන් සැකසුම් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙන්නම් විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙන්නම් තමයි ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සංවේදනය සහ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීයාවක්  ඒත් ඔවුන්ට ලොකු කාලයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා නැත්නම් ගොඩක් වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණයෙන් අලුත් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, අපි නියම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නේ සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම් අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක මොනෝ ඩෝමින් එක්ක ඇතුළුම් දෙකක් වෙනුවෙන් ඇතුළු වෙනුවෙන් තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ව බී ඩෝමින් අවස්ථානයකට ප්\u200dරයෝජන අපි පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරභාව 20 ප්\u200dරභාව-ලක්ෂණ ඩෝමින් ජෝමින් සඳහා ප්\u200dරභාවිතය සඳහා ප්\u200dරභාවිත ස්ථිතිය-of-the-art පරීක්ෂණය අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මෝඩේල් එක්ක සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට සමාන්\u200dය අපේ කෝඩ් එක පුළුවන් https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha internetka lagu beddelayo baaritaanka maandooriyaha waxaa la yaabaa in dadka la ilaaliyey fasaladaha ay aad u xiisaysan yihiin beddelka internetka. Labada ugu dhaw ee dhibaatadan waa barashada iskuulka ah iyo codsiga iskuulka ah. However, they either require long training times or suffer greatly on highly divergent domains.  Waxey ku soo dhiibtay horumarinta ugu dambeysa baaritaanka fikrada luuqadaha kala duduwan, waxaynu soo bandhignaa aragtida sawir ah, waxaana lagu tuuraa dhibaatada beddelka domain sida shaqada firaaqada. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu u qaadaa labada meelood oo kaliya, waxaana baranaya in lagu sameeyo goob-domain ah, taasoo si wadajir ah looga wada opti karo (1) projecto gudaha gudaha iyo in (2) la sii sheego fekero. Waxaan sameynaa imtixaanka bedeenka oo ku qoran 20 noocyo oo xafiiska noocyada ah, waxaana wargelinaynaa fasaxa xaaladda farshaxanka oo ku qoran 11 noocyo, kuwaas oo ka mid ah macluumaadka bedelka domain ee Amazon iyo SemEval 2013 iyo 2016. Analyskayagu wuxuu muujiyaa in modellkayagu uu sameeyo si u eg hababka farshaxanka ee ku yaala meelaha la mid ah, isla markaasna aad uga wanaagsan meelaha kala duduwan. Aqoontayada waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'no': 'Domenetilpassing for sentimentanalyser er vanskeleg på grunn av at overvakte klassifikatorar er svært sensitiv til endringar i domenet. Dei to viktigste nærmingane til dette problemet er strukturelle tilsvarande læring og autokodingar. Dei krev anten lange treningstidar, eller kjører mykje på svært forskjellige domene. Inspirert av nyleg avansert i krysspråk sentimentanalisering, gir vi eit nytt perspektiv og kastar domeneadaptasjonsprobleten som eit innebyggende projeksjonsprogram. Modellen vårt tar som inndata to monodomene innebyggende mellomrom og lærer å prosjektera dei til eit biladomeneplass, som blir kopla optimalisert til (1) prosjekt over domene og til (2) forventa sentiment. We perform domain adaptation experiments on 20 source-target domain pairs for sentiment classification and report novel state-of-the-art results on 11 domain pairs, including the Amazon domain adaptation datasets and SemEval 2013 and 2016 datasets. Analysen vårt viser at modellen vårt utfører sammenlignbare med tilstanden av kunsten nærmer på domene som er liknande, mens det utfører betydelig bedre på høyre forskjellige domene. Koden vårt er tilgjengeleg på https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'pl': 'Adaptacja domeny do analizy sentymentów jest wyzwaniem ze względu na fakt, że nadzorowane klasyfikatory są bardzo wrażliwe na zmiany w domenie. Dwa najbardziej znane podejścia do tego problemu to nauka korespondencji strukturalnej i autokodery. Jednak albo wymagają długiego czasu szkolenia, albo cierpią znacznie w wysoce rozbieżnych dziedzinach. Zainspirowani ostatnimi postępami w analizie sentymentów wielojęzycznych, przedstawiamy nową perspektywę i postrzegamy problem adaptacji domeny jako zadanie projekcyjne. Nasz model bierze jako wejście dwie monodomenowe przestrzenie osadzające i uczy się projektować je do przestrzeni dwudomenowej, która jest wspólnie zoptymalizowana do (1) projektowania między domenami i (2) przewidywania sentymentów. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty adaptacyjne na 20-parach domen źródłowo-docelowych w celu klasyfikacji sentymentów oraz raportujemy nowe wyniki na 11-parach domen, w tym zbiorach danych adaptacyjnych Amazon oraz zbiorach danych SemEval 2013 i 2016. Nasza analiza pokazuje, że nasz model działa porównywalnie do najnowocześniejszych podejść w domenach, które są podobne, a jednocześnie wydaje się znacznie lepiej w wysoce rozbieżnych domenach. Nasz kod jest dostępny pod adresem: https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ro': 'Adaptarea domeniului pentru analiza sentimentului este o provocare datorită faptului că clasificatorii supravegheați sunt foarte sensibili la schimbările domeniului. Cele două abordări cele mai proeminente la această problemă sunt învățarea structurală a corespondenței și autoencoderele. Cu toate acestea, acestea fie necesită perioade lungi de formare, fie suferă foarte mult pe domenii foarte divergente. Inspirați de progresele recente în analiza sentimentului translingvistic, oferim o perspectivă nouă și aruncăm problema adaptării domeniului ca o sarcină de proiecție încorporată. Modelul nostru ia ca intrare două spații de încorporare mono-domeniu și învață să le proiecteze într-un spațiu bi-domeniu, care este optimizat împreună pentru (1) proiectarea pe domenii și (2) predicția sentimentului. Efectuăm experimente de adaptare a domeniului pe 20 de perechi de domenii sursă-țintă pentru clasificarea sentimentelor și raportăm rezultate noi de ultimă oră pe 11 perechi de domenii, inclusiv seturi de date de adaptare a domeniului Amazon și seturi de date SemEval 2013 și 2016. Analiza noastră arată că modelul nostru funcționează comparativ cu abordările de ultimă generație pe domenii similare, în timp ce performează semnificativ mai bine pe domenii foarte divergente. Codul nostru este disponibil la https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட வகுப்பாளர்கள் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்று காரணத்தால் உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு டொமைன் ஒதுக்குதல் மிகவ இந்த பிரச்சினைக்கு மிகவும் பெரிய இரண்டு நெருங்குதல் கட்டுப்பாட்டில் சார்ந்த ஒப்புக்கொள்ளும்  ஆனாலும், அவர்கள் நீண்ட பயிற்சி நேரத்தை தேவைப்படுகிறார்கள் அல்லது மிகவும் வித்தியாசமான களங்களில் ப அண்மையில் மொழி உணர்வு ஆராய்ச்சியில் சமீபத்தில் முன்னேற்றம் வழங்கப்பட்டது, நாம் ஒரு புதிய பார்வையை வழங்குகிறோம் மற்றும் களம் ஒ எங்கள் மாதிரி உள்ளீட்டில் உள்ளீட்டில் உள்ளீடு இரண்டு மாதிரி இடைவெளியில் உள்ளீடு எடுக்கிறது மற்றும் அவற்றை ஒரு பி டொமைன் இடைவெளி நாம் உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு 20 மூல- இலக்கு களத்தில் உள்ள டோமைன் ஒதுக்கீட்டு சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் நாம் 11 டோமைன் ஜோடிகளில் புதிய நிலை முடிவுகளை அறி எங்கள் ஆராய்ச்சி காட்டுகிறது என்றால் எங்கள் மாதிரி மாதிரி செயல்படுகிறது அது போன்ற களங்களில் உள்ள நிலையில் உள்ள கலை முறைகளை ஒப்பிடு எங்கள் குறியீடு கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ur': 'احساسات تحلیل کے لئے دامین اضافہ کرنے کا مشکل ہے اس حقیقت کی وجہ سے کہ تحقیق کی کلاسیر ڈمین میں بدلنے کے لئے بہت حساس ہیں. اس مسئلہ کے سب سے زیادہ مشکل کے قریب آتے ہیں ساختاری تعلیم اور اتوکوڈر کی تعلیم. بلکہ یہ لوگ دور کی تعلیم چاہتے ہیں یا بہت مختلف جگہ پر سخت مصیبت پڑتے ہیں ہم ایک نور نظر دیتے ہیں اور ڈومین اپنا اچھا سامان مسئلہ ڈال دیتے ہیں ایک انبوڈینگ پروژیکٹ کا کام۔ ہمارا موڈل دو منو ڈومین کے اندر سوار کرتا ہے اور اسے ایک دوسری ڈومین جگہ پر پروژه کرنا سکھتا ہے جو دومین کے اندر (1) پروژہ تک اچھی ترجیح کی جاتی ہے اور (2) احساس پیش کرتی ہے۔ ہم ڈومین اڈیٹ سٹ ڈومین کے 20 سورس-ٹ ڈومین کے جوڑوں پر آزمائش کریں اور 11 ڈومین جوڑوں پر نومین ایٹ-اوٹ-ایٹ نتیجے راپور کریں، جیسے آمازون ڈومین اڈیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ اور SemEval 2013 اور 2016 ڈیٹ سٹ ہماری تحلیل دکھاتی ہے کہ ہماری مدل مثالی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر ہمارا کوڈ اس میں موجود ہے https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'sv': 'Domänanpassning för sentimentalanalys är utmanande eftersom övervakade klassificerare är mycket känsliga för förändringar i domänen. De två mest framträdande tillvägagångssätten för detta problem är strukturell korrespondensinlärning och autoencoders. Antingen kräver de långa utbildningstider eller lider mycket på mycket olika områden. Inspirerad av de senaste framstegen inom tvärspråklig sentimental analys ger vi ett nytt perspektiv och kastar domänanpassningsproblemet som en inbäddad projektionsuppgift. Vår modell tar som indata två monodomäninbäddningsutrymmen och lär sig att projicera dem till ett tvådomänsutrymme, som är gemensamt optimerat för (1) projekt över domäner och (2) förutsäga sentiment. Vi utför domänanpassningsexperiment på 20 käll-måldomänpar för sentimentklassificering och rapporterar nya toppmoderna resultat på 11 domänpar, inklusive Amazon-domänanpassningsdata och SemEval 2013 och 2016 dataset. Vår analys visar att vår modell presterar jämförbart med state-of-the-art tillvägagångssätt på liknande domäner, samtidigt som den presterar betydligt bättre på mycket olika domäner. Vår kod finns tillgänglig på https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'vi': 'Sửa miền cho phân tích tình cảm là một thử thách bởi vì các phân loại giám sát rất nhạy cảm với những thay đổi trong miền. Hai phương pháp quan trọng nhất đối với vấn đề này là học tập kết cấu hình thư và mã hóa tự động. Tuy nhiên, họ cần thời gian đào tạo dài hoặc bị ảnh hưởng nặng nề về những lĩnh vực khác nhau. Lấy cảm hứng từ những bước tiến gần đây trong phân tích cảm xúc xuyên ngôn ngữ, chúng tôi cung cấp một viễn cảnh mới và đặt vấn đề sửa chữa miền như một nhiệm vụ nhúng trong. Mẫu của chúng tôi là nhập hai khu vực chứa một miền và học được cách vận chuyển chúng vào một không gian hai miền, cùng lúc được tối ưu cho dự đoán dự đoán dự tính của cả hai miền. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm sửa chữa miền nhà hàng 9m các cặp miền đầu để phân loại cảm xúc và báo cáo các kết quả tuyệt vời mới về các cặp dạng dạng miền 11, bao gồm các tập tin gia chỉnh miền Amazon và SemEvl thậm chí 206. Phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy mô hình của chúng tôi tiến triển tương đối với các phương pháp hiện đại trên những miền tương tự, trong khi hoạt động tốt hơn nhiều ở những miền khác nhau. Mật mã của chúng tôi có sẵn ở https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'uz': "Name Bu muammo uchun eng eng katta murakkab murakkab murakkablik tizimi o'rganish va avtomatik kodlash. Lekin, ularning ko'p o'rganish vaqtlari kerak yoki juda ajoyib turgan domeyalarda ko'p harakat qilishi kerak. Yaqinda bir necha tillar hissiyotni aniqlash uchun muvaffaqiyatlarni imzolangan, biz noha ko'rinishimiz va domen adapterining muammosini ajratish vazifasi deb o'ylaymiz. Bizning modelimizning ikkita oʻlchamini kiritish va ularni bir domen boʻsh joy bilan loyihani olishni o'rganadi. Bu foydalanuvchiga (1) loyihasiga birlashtirilgan va (2) foydalanuvchiga tayyorlash imkoniyatini o'rganadi. Biz foydalanuvchining darajalashi uchun 20 manba-target domen sonini tahrirlash imtiyozlarini bajaramiz va 11 domen soni taʼminlovchisi natijasi haqida xabar beramiz. Agar Amazon domen adaptlash maʼlumotlarini saqlash va SemEval 2013 va 2016 maʼlumot tizimlarini saqlash. Analytikizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, modelimizning o'xshash soniyalarning holatiga o'xshash usullarini bajaradi, ammo juda ajoyib ajratilgan domeyalarda juda yaxshi ko'proq bajaradi. Kodlash usuli https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse", 'bg': 'Адаптирането на домейна за анализ на сентимента е предизвикателство поради факта, че контролираните класификатори са много чувствителни към промените в домейна. Двата най-видни подхода към този проблем са структурното кореспондентско обучение и автокодери. Въпреки това, те или изискват дълго време на обучение, или страдат значително в силно различаващи се области. Вдъхновени от последните постижения в междуезичния анализ на сантименталните чувства, ние предоставяме нова перспектива и поставяме проблема с адаптацията на домейна като вграждаща задача за проекция. Нашият модел взема като вход две моно-домейн вграждащи пространства и се научава да ги проектира в двудомейн пространство, което е съвместно оптимизирано за (1) проектиране между домейни и (2) предсказване на сентимента. Извършваме експерименти за адаптация на домейни върху 20 двойки източник-целеви домейни за класификация на сентимента и докладваме нови най-съвременни резултати за 11 двойки домейни, включително набор от данни за адаптация на домейни и набор от данни за 2013 и 2016. Нашият анализ показва, че нашият модел се представя сравнително с най-съвременните подходи за области, които са сходни, като същевременно се представя значително по-добре при силно различаващи се домейни. Нашият код е достъпен на адрес: https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'hr': 'Adjustacija domena za analizu osjećaja je izazovna zbog činjenice da su nadzirani klasifikatori veoma osjetljivi na promjene domena. Dva najpoznatija pristupa ovom problemu su učenje strukturnih dopisnika i autokoderi. Međutim, oni ili zahtijevaju dugo vrijeme obuke ili mnogo pate u visokim različitim domenama. Inspirirani nedavnim napredovima u analizi prejezičkih osjećaja, pružamo novu perspektivu i postavljamo problem adaptacije domena kao zadatak za ugrađenje projekcije. Naš model uzima kao ulaz dva prostora u monodomenu i uči ih projektirati u dvodomenu prostora, koji se zajedno optimizira na (1) projekt preko domena i predviđa osjećaj. Izvodimo eksperimente za adaptaciju domena na 20 broj ciljnih domena za klasifikaciju osjećaja i prijavljujemo nove rezultate stanja umjetnosti na 11 parova domena, uključujući podatke o adaptaciji domena Amazona i semiEval 2013 i podatke 2016. Naša analiza pokazuje da naš model provodi usporedno s pristupima države umjetnosti na područjima sličnim, dok izvodi značajno bolje u visokim različitim područjima. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'nl': 'Domeinaanpassing voor sentimentanalyse is een uitdaging omdat begeleide classificatoren zeer gevoelig zijn voor domeinveranderingen. De twee meest prominente benaderingen van dit probleem zijn structurele correspondentie leren en autoencoders. Ze vereisen echter ofwel lange trainingstijden of lijden sterk onder sterk uiteenlopende domeinen. Geïnspireerd door recente vooruitgang in cross-lingual sentiment analyse, bieden we een nieuw perspectief en beschouwen we het domein adaptatie probleem als een inbedding projectie taak. Ons model gebruikt als input twee mono-domein embedding spaces en leert deze te projecteren naar een bi-domein ruimte, die gezamenlijk geoptimaliseerd is om (1) over domeinen te projecteren en (2) sentiment te voorspellen. We voeren domeinadaptatie experimenten uit op 20-bron-doeldomeinparen voor sentimentclassificatie en rapporteren nieuwe state-of-the-art resultaten op 11-domeinparen, waaronder de Amazon domeinadaptatie datasets en SemEval 2013 en 2016 datasets. Uit onze analyse blijkt dat ons model vergelijkbaar presteert met state-of-the-art benaderingen op domeinen die vergelijkbaar zijn, terwijl het aanzienlijk beter presteert op sterk divergente domeinen. Onze code is beschikbaar op https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'da': 'Domænetilpasning til sentimentalanalyse er udfordrende, fordi overvågede klassificerere er meget følsomme over for ændringer i domænet. De to mest fremtrædende tilgange til dette problem er strukturel korrespondance læring og autoencodere. De kræver dog enten lange træningstider eller lider meget på meget forskellige områder. Inspireret af de seneste fremskridt inden for tværsproget sentimental analyse giver vi et nyt perspektiv og kaster domænetilpasningsproblemet som en integrerende projektionsopgave. Vores model tager som input to mono-domæne indlejringsrum og lærer at projicere dem til et bi-domæne rum, som i fællesskab er optimeret til (1) projekt på tværs af domæner og (2) forudsige sentiment. Vi udfører domænetilpasningseksperimenter på 20 kilde-mål domænepar til sentiment klassificering og rapporterer nye state-of-the-art resultater på 11 domænepar, herunder Amazon domænetilpasningsdatasæt og SemEval 2013 og 2016 datasæt. Vores analyse viser, at vores model fungerer sammenligneligt med state-of-the-art tilgange på domæner, der ligner hinanden, samtidig med at den fungerer betydeligt bedre på meget forskellige domæner. Vores kode er tilgængelig på https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'id': 'Domain adaptation for sentiment analysis is challenging due to the fact that supervised classifiers are very sensitive to changes in domain.  Dua pendekatan paling terkenal untuk masalah ini adalah pelajaran korespondensi struktural dan autokoder. Namun, mereka membutuhkan waktu latihan panjang atau menderita banyak di daerah yang sangat berbeda. Terinspirasi oleh kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam analisis sentimen saling bahasa, kami menyediakan perspektif baru dan melemparkan masalah adaptasi domain sebagai tugas proyeksi. Model kami mengambil sebagai input dua ruang penyembedding mono-domain dan belajar untuk memproyeksikan mereka ke ruang bi-domain, yang secara bersama optimisasi untuk (1) proyek melalui domain dan untuk (2) prediksi sentimen. Kami melakukan eksperimen adaptasi domain pada 20 pasangan domain sumber-target untuk klasifikasi sentimen dan melaporkan hasil baru state-of-the-art pada 11 pasangan domain, termasuk set data adaptasi domain Amazon dan set data SemEval 2013 dan 2016. Analisi kami menunjukkan bahwa model kami berhasil dibandingkan dengan pendekatan state-of-the-art pada domain yang sama, sementara berhasil jauh lebih baik pada domain yang sangat berbeda. Kode kita tersedia di https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'de': 'Domänenanpassung für Sentiment-Analysen ist eine Herausforderung, da überwachte Klassifikatoren sehr empfindlich auf Domänenänderungen reagieren. Die beiden wichtigsten Ansätze für dieses Problem sind strukturelles Korrespondenzlernen und Autoencoder. Sie benötigen jedoch entweder lange Trainingszeiten oder leiden stark unter stark divergierenden Bereichen. Inspiriert von den jüngsten Fortschritten in der crosslingualen Stimmungsanalyse bieten wir eine neue Perspektive und betrachten das Domänenanpassungsproblem als Einbettungsaufgabe. Unser Modell nimmt zwei Einbettungsräume mit Monodomain als Input und lernt, diese in einen Bidomain-Raum zu projizieren, der gemeinsam optimiert ist, um (1) domainübergreifend zu projektieren und (2) Sentiment vorherzusagen. Wir führen Domänenanpassungsexperimente an 20-Quell-Ziel-Domänenpaaren zur Sentiment-Klassifizierung durch und berichten über neue State-of-the-Art-Ergebnisse auf 11-Domänenpaaren, einschließlich der Amazon Domänenanpassungsdatensätze und SemEval 2013 und 2016 Datensätze. Unsere Analyse zeigt, dass unser Modell vergleichbar mit aktuellen Ansätzen auf Domänen funktioniert, die ähnlich sind, während es auf stark divergenten Domänen deutlich besser abschneidet. Unser Code ist verfügbar unter https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ko': '감독을 받는 분류기는 분야의 변화에 민감하기 때문에 감정 분석의 영역 적응은 도전적이다.이 문제를 해결하는 가장 두드러진 두 가지 방법은 구조화 대응 학습과 자동 인코더다.그러나 그들은 훈련 시간이 오래 걸리거나 고도가 다른 분야에서 큰 영향을 받는다.다중 언어 감정 분석의 최신 진전의 계발을 받아 우리는 새로운 시각을 제공했고 분야 적응 문제를 삽입 투영 임무로 전환시켰다.우리의 모델은 두 개의 단역 삽입 공간을 입력으로 삼아 그것들을 한 쌍역 공간에 투영하는 것을 배운다. 이 쌍역 공간은 연합하여 (1) 크로스 투영과 (2) 예측 정서로 최적화된다.우리는 20개의 소스-타겟 도메인 쌍에서 도메인 적응 실험을 실시하여 감정 분류를 실시했고 11개의 도메인 쌍에서 아마존 도메인 적응 데이터 집합과SemEval 2013과 2016 데이터 집합을 포함한 최신 결과를 보고했다.우리의 분석에 의하면 우리의 모델은 비슷한 분야에서 가장 선진적인 방법과 비슷하지만 고도의 다른 분야에서 뚜렷하게 더 잘 나타난다.우리 코드는https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'fa': 'تغییرات دامنی برای تحلیل احساسات به دلیل این حقیقت مشکل است که راهنمایی\u200cهای تحت نظر بسیار حساس به تغییرات دامنی هستند. دو دسترسی بزرگترین برای این مشکل، یادگیری ساختاری و کودردهنده\u200cهای خودکار هستند. ولی آنها یا زمان آموزش طولانی نیاز دارند یا در سرزمینهای بسیار متفاوت رنج می کنند. توسط پیشرفت های اخیر در تحلیل احساسات متفاوت زبان، ما یک دیدگاه تازه را پیشنهاد می کنیم و مشکل اصلاح دامنه را به عنوان یک وظیفه تغییر دادن دامنه قرار می دهیم. مدل ما به عنوان ورودی دو فضای پیدا کردن mono-domain را می\u200cگیرد و یاد می\u200cگیرد که آنها را به فضای دو دومینی پروژه دهند، که با همدیگر به پروژه (1) در طول دامین و (2) احساسات پیش بینی می\u200cکند. ما آزمایش\u200cهای تغییر\u200cسازی دومین در ۲۰ جفت منبع مقصد دومین برای تشکیل احساسات انجام می\u200cدهیم و گزارش دادیم نتیجه\u200cهای تاریخ\u200cسازی دومین ۱۱ دومین، شامل مجموعه\u200cهای تغییر داده\u200cهای دومین آمازون و سیم\u200cاول ۲۰ تحلیل ما نشان می دهد که مدل ما در مقایسه با نزدیک های موجود هنر در دامنه های مشابه انجام می دهد، در حالی که در دامنه های بسیار متفاوت انجام می دهد. کد ما در دسترس است https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'sw': 'Domain adaptation for sentiment analysis is challenging due to the fact that supervised classifiers are very sensitive to changes in domain.  Matokeo mawili makubwa zaidi katika tatizo hili ni mawasiliano ya msingi yanayojifunza na kujifunza. Hata hivyo, au wanahitaji muda mrefu wa mafunzo au wanakabiliwa sana katika maeneo mbalimbali. Kuhamishwa na maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika uchambuzi wa hisia za lugha tofauti, tunatoa mtazamo wa riwaya na tunaweka tatizo la kuboresha ndani kama kazi ya mradi. Mfano wetu unachukua kama input wa ndani ya sehemu mbili za mono na unajifunza kuwapa mradi katika nafasi ya ndani, ambazo kwa pamoja imekuwa na optimizi kwa mradi (1) katika maeneo mbalimbali na kutabiri (2) hisia. Tunafanya majaribio ya mabadiliko ya domain kwa ajili ya kutangazwa kwa wanaume wa ndani 20 kwa ajili ya kutangaza hisia na kuripoti matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwa wanandoa 11 za ndani, ikiwa ni pamoja na seti za taarifa za kompyuta za ndani ya Amazon na SemEval 2013 na 2016. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kwamba mifano yetu inafanya kama inavyofanana na hali ya sanaa kwenye maeneo yanayofanana, wakati wakifanya vizuri zaidi katika maeneo mbalimbali. Utawala wetu unapatikana katika https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'tr': 'Duygusal analizi için sahne adaptasyonu, süslenme klasifikatörlerinin domenindeki değişikliklere örän hassas bir şekilde düşürülmesi zordur. Bu mesele üçin iñ esasy golaýy nusgasy strukturel terjime öwrenmek we awtomatik kodeçlerdir. Ýöne olar ýöne uzak okuw wagtlary gerek ýa-da köp üýtgeşik ýerlerde agyrlaşýarlar. Ýakyndaky duýgular analyzasynda täzeden öňki gelişmeler tarapyndan çykylýar, biz bir täze perspektiv berip domeniň adaptasyýa meselelerini integral bir projeksiýa hökmünde çykarýarys. Bizim modelimiz iki mono-domeny içeri giriş alanı alır ve onları bi-domeny bir alana taslaşmayı öğrenir, bu da domenin arasındaki (1) projesine ve (2) duyguları tahmin edilir. We perform domain adaptation experiments on 20 source-target domain pairs for sentiment classification and report novel state-of-the-art results on 11 domain pairs, including the Amazon domain adaptation datasets and SemEval 2013 and 2016 datasets. Biziň analyzamyz modelimiz üýtgeşik sahypalarda ýakynlaşyk sahypalarda ýakynlaşyk şeklinde çykýar. Bu sahypalarda örän gowy üýtgeşik edip otyrýar. Biziň kodymyz bar https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'am': 'የዶሜን አቀማመጥ ለመስማት አቀማመጥ በተመለከተ ክፍለ ግንኙነት በዶሜን ውስጥ ለውጥ በጣም ማወቅ ነው፡፡ ወደዚህ መከራ የሚደርሱት ሁለቱ ትልቁ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ትምህርት እና የራሳቸው ኮድ ናቸው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የረጅም ዘመን ተማሪ እንዲያስፈልጋቸው ወይም እጅግ በተለያዩ አዳራሾች ላይ መከራ እንዲችሉ ነው፡፡ Inspired by recent advances in cross-lingual sentiment analysis, we provide a novel perspective and cast the domain adaptation problem as an embedding projection task.  ሞዴሌያችን በሁለት ዶሜን ስፍራዎች ውስጥ እንደሚገባ እና ወደ ቢ ዶሜን መፍጠር ይማራል፤ በተጠቃሚ (1) ፕሮጀክት በሀገር ውስጥ እና (2) ስሜት ለመፍጠር ይሻላል፡፡ የአማዞን ዶሜን አዲስ ዳታተር ማድረጊያውን እና የስሜት ግንኙነቱን እና አዲስ ፍሬቶችን 11 ዶሜን ሁለቶች እና ሰምምምEval 2013 እና 2016 ዳታዎችን ማድረግ እናስባለን፡፡ ትምህርታችን ሞዴሌያችን በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች ላይ በሚያሳየው አካባቢ ግንኙነት እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'af': "Domein-aanpassing vir sentimentanalisie is uitgelyk vanweë die feit dat superviseerde klassifiseerders baie sensitief is na veranderinge in domein. Die twee mees belangrikste toegang tot hierdie probleem is strukturele ooreenstemmingsleer en autokoders. Maar hulle moet of lank onderwerp tye nodig of baie lyk op baie verskillende domeine. Ons verskaf 'n nuwe perspektief en gooi die domein aanpassing probleem as 'n inbinneste projeksie taak deur onlangse vorderings in kruistale sentimentanalisie. Ons model neem as invoer twee mono-domein inbetering spasies en leer om hulle te projek na 'n bi-domein spasie, wat is saamstig optimaliseer na (1) projek oor domeine en na (2) voorskou sentiment. Ons uitvoer domein aanpassing eksperimente op 20 bron-doel domein paar vir sentiment klasifikasie en rapporteer novel state-of-the-art resultate op 11 domein paar, insluitend die Amazon domein aanpassing datastelle en SemEval 2013 en 2016 datastelle. Ons analisie wys dat ons model vergelykbaar uitvoer met staat-of-kuns toegang op domeine wat gelykbaar is, terwyl ons betekeurig beter uitvoer op baie verskeie domeine. Ons kode is beskikbaar by https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse", 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների վերլուծության ոլորտի ադապտացիան դժվար է այն պատճառով, որ վերահսկված դասակարգիչները շատ զգայուն են ոլորտի փոփոխություններին: Այս խնդրի երկու ամենակարևոր մոտեցումները կառուցվածքային հաղորդակցման ուսումնասիրությունն ու ավտոկոդները են: Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք կամ երկար ուսուցման ժամանակ են պահանջում, կամ շատ են տառապում շատ տարբեր ոլորտներում: Inspired by recent advances in cross-lingual sentiment analysis, we provide a novel perspective and cast the domain adaptation problem as an embedding projection task.  Մեր մոդելը վերցնում է երկու միա-տիեզերք ներառող տարածքներ և սովորում է նախագծել դրանք երկու տիեզերք, որը միասին օպտիմացված է (1) նախագծի համար տիեզերքներում և (2) կանխատեսելու զգացմունքների համար: Մենք կատարում ենք բնագավառի ադապտացիայի փորձեր 20 աղբյուր-նպատակային բնագավառի զույգերի վրա զգացմունքների դասակարգման համար և զեկուցում ենք 11 բնագավառի նոր վերջնական արդյունքներ, ներառյալ Ամազոնի բնագավառի ադապտացիայի տվյալների համակարգերը Մեր վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կատարվում է համեմատաբար նորագույն մոտեցումների հետ այնպիսի բնագավառներում, որոնք նման են, մինչդեռ կատարվում են շատ ավելի լավ տարբեր բնագավառներում: Մեր կոդը հասանելի է https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'sq': "Domain adaptation for sentiment analysis is challenging due to the fact that supervised classifiers are very sensitive to changes in domain.  Dy qasjet më të shquara për këtë problem janë mësimi i korrespondencës strukturore dhe autokoduesit. Megjithatë, ato ose kërkojnë kohë të gjata trainimi ose vuajnë shumë në fusha shumë të ndryshme. Inspiruar nga përparimet e fundit në analizën e ndjenjave ndërgjuhësore, ne ofrojmë një perspektivë të re dhe hedhim problem in e përshtatjes në domeni si një detyrë projektimi. Modeli ynë merr si hyrje dy hapësira të integrimit mono-domain dhe mëson t'i projektojë a to në një hapësirë bi-domain, e cila është optimizuar së bashku për (1) projektin në të gjithë domainet dhe për (2) parashikimin e ndjenjave. Ne kryejmë eksperimente të përshtatjes së domenisë në 20 çifte burimi-objektiv të domenisë për klasifikimin e ndjenjave dhe raportojmë rezultate të reja të state-of-the-art në 11 çifte domenish, duke përfshirë sërat e të dhënave të përshtatjes së domenisë Amazon dhe sërat e të dhënave SemEval 2013 dhe 2016. Analiza jonë tregon se modeli ynë funksionon krahasueshmërisht me qasjet më të larta në fusha të ngjashme, ndërsa funksionon më mirë në fusha shumë të ndryshme. Kodi ynë është në dispozicion në https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse", 'ca': "L'adaptació al domini per a l'anàlisi del sentiment és difícil degut al fet que els classificadors supervisats són molt sensibles als canvis en domini. Els dos enfocaments més prominents d'aquest problema són l'aprenentatge de corresponència estructural i els autocodificadors. Tot i així, o requereixen llargs temps d'entrenament o pateixen molt en dominis molt divergents. Inspired by recent advances in cross-lingual sentiment analysis, we provide a novel perspective and cast the domain adaptation problem as an embedding projection task.  El nostre model agafa com entrada dos espais d'incorporació monodominical i aprene a projectar-los a un espai bi dominical, que està juntament optimitzat per (1) projecte a través de dominicals i (2) predir el sentiment. Fem experiments d'adaptació de dominis en 20 parells de dominis d'origen-objectiu per a la classificació de sentiments i reportem noves resultats d'última generació en 11 parells de dominis, incloent els conjunts de dades d'adaptació de dominis Amazon i SemEval 2013 i 2016. La nostra anàlisi mostra que el nostre model actua comparablement amb els enfocaments més avançats en dominis similars, mentre actua significativament millor en dominis molt divergents. El nostre codi està disponible en https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse", 'bn': 'বিশ্লেষণের জন্য ডোমেনের অ্যাডাপেটশন ডোমেনের বিশ্লেষণ চ্যালেঞ্জের চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে এই বাস্তবতার কারণে যে ক্লাসেফার এই সমস্যার প্রতি সবচেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ দুটি প্রতিক্রিয়া হচ্ছে কাঠামোর সংবাদ শিক্ষা ও স্বয়ংক্রিয় এনকো তবে তাদের দীর্ঘ সময়ের প্রশিক্ষণ দরকার অথবা অত্যন্ত বিভিন্ন ডোমেইনে অনেক ভুগছে। সাম্প্রতিক ভাষাভাষী অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণে উন্নয়নের প্রতি অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে, আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দিয়েছি এবং ডোমেনের আপেটশন সমস্য আমাদের মডেল দুটি মোনো-ডোমেইন বিভিন্ন জায়গায় আটকে রাখে এবং তাদেরকে একটি বি-ডোমেইন জায়গায় প্রকল্পের শিক্ষা দেয়, যা ডোমেইন জুড়ে প্রকল্পের কাছে সম্ম আমাজোন ডোমেইন ডাটাপেটসেট এবং সেমইভাল ২০১৩ এবং ২০১৬ ডাটাসেটের মধ্যে আমাজোন ডোমেইন ডাটাপেটশন ডেটাসেট এবং সেমইভাল ২০১৩ এবং ২০১৬ সালের ডাটাসেটের মধ্যে ১১ ডোম আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল দেখাচ্ছে যে ডোমেইনের রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের সাথে যুক্ত, যেগুলো একই ধরনের ক্ষেত আমাদের কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'az': 'Duyarlıq analizi üçün domena uyğunlaşdırma dəyişikliklərin domain dəyişikliklərinə çox hassaslı olduğuna görə izah edir. Bu problem ə ən möhtərəm iki yaxınlıq yapışmaq öyrənməsi və autokodlayıcıdır. Lakin onlar ya uzun təhsil vaxtı istəyirlər, ya da çox fərqli bölgeler içində əziyyət çəkirlər. Daha yeni dilli hisslər analizi ilə təşkil edilmişdir, biz yeni bir perspektiv təşkil edir və domain adaptasiyonu problemini inkişaf etdik. Bizim modellərimiz iki mono-domain içərisində daxil olunan yer kimi alır və onları iki-domena alanına təşkil etməyi öyrənir, bu da domena boyunca (1) layihə optimizlənir və (2) hissləri təşkil edir. Biz domenə uyğunlaşdırma sınaqlarını 20 mənbə-məqsəd domenə çift üçün hiss klasifikasyonu və 11 domenə çiftlərinin yeni stat-of-the-art sonuçlarını bildiririk, Amazon domenə uyğunlaşdırma veri qurğuları və SemEval 2013 və 2016 veri qurğuları da dahil edirik. Bizim analizimiz modellərimiz bənzər domenlərdə eyni halda, çox müxtəlif domenlərdə çox daha yaxşı işlər edir. Bizim kodumuz https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'bs': 'Domena adaptacija za analizu osjećanja je izazovna zbog činjenice da su nadzirani klasifikatori veoma osjetljivi na promjene domena. Dva najpoznatija pristupa ovom problemu su učenje strukturnih dopisnika i autokoderi. Međutim, oni ili zahtevaju dugo treniranje ili mnogo pate u visokim različitim domenama. Inspirirani nedavnim napredama u analizi prijevoznih sentiment a, pružamo novu perspektivu i postavljamo problem adaptacije domena kao zadatak za ugrađenje projekcije. Naš model uzima kao ulaz dva prostora u monodomenu i uči ih projektirati u dvodomenu prostor, koji se zajedno optimizira na (1) projekt preko domena i predviđa osjećaj. Izvodimo eksperimente za adaptaciju domena na 20 domena sa ciljem izvora za klasifikaciju osjećaja i izvještavamo nove rezultate stanja umjetnosti na 11 domena par, uključujući podatke adaptacije domena Amazona i semiEval 2013 i podatke 2016. Naša analiza pokazuje da naš model provodi usporedno sa pristupima države umjetnosti na područjima koja su slična, dok izvodi značajno bolje u visokim različitim domenama. Naš kod je dostupan na https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'et': 'Domeeni kohandamine sentimentaalüüsi jaoks on keeruline, kuna järelevalve all olevad klassifitseerijad on domeeni muutuste suhtes väga tundlikud. Kaks kõige silmapaistvamat lähenemisviisi sellele probleemile on struktuuriline kirjavahetusõpe ja autokodeerijad. Siiski nõuavad nad kas pikka koolitusaega või kannatavad väga erinevates valdkondades. Inspireerituna hiljutistest edusammudest keeleülese sentimentaalüüsi vallas, pakume uudset perspektiivi ja paneme domeeni kohandamise probleemi sisseehitava projektsiooni ülesandeks. Meie mudel võtab sisendiks kaks monodomeenilist manustamisruumi ja õpib neid projitseerima kahe domeeni ruumi, mis on ühiselt optimeeritud (1) projektiks üle domeenide ja (2) tunnetuse ennustamiseks. Teeme domeeni kohandamise katseid 20 lähte-sihtdomeenipaariga sentimentaalse klassifitseerimise jaoks ning anname uudseid kaasaegseid tulemusi 11 domeenipaari kohta, sealhulgas Amazoni domeeni kohandamise andmekogumid ning SemEval 2013 ja 2016 andmekogumid. Meie analüüs näitab, et meie mudel toimib võrreldavalt kaasaegsete lähenemisviisidega sarnastes valdkondades, samas kui tulemus on märkimisväärselt parem väga erinevates valdkondades. Meie kood on kättesaadav aadressil https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'cs': 'Adaptace domén pro sentimentovou analýzu je náročná vzhledem k tomu, že dohlížené klasifikátory jsou velmi citlivé na změny v doméně. Dva nejvýznamnější přístupy k tomuto problému jsou strukturální korespondenční učení a autokodéry. Nicméně, buď vyžadují dlouhou dobu tréninku, nebo velmi trpí ve vysoce rozdílných oblastech. Inspirováni nedávnými pokroky v analýze sentimentů mezi jazyky poskytujeme novou perspektivu a považujeme problém adaptace domény za integrovaný úkol projekce. Náš model bere jako vstup dva monodoménové vkládací prostory a učí se je promítat do bi-doménového prostoru, který je společně optimalizován pro (1) projekt napříč doménami a (2) predikci sentimentu. Provádíme experimenty adaptace domén na dvaceti zdrojových a cílových doménových párech pro klasifikaci sentimentů a nahlásíme nové nejmodernější výsledky na 11 doménových párech, včetně datových sad pro adaptaci domén Amazon a datových sad SemEval 2013 a 2016. Naše analýza ukazuje, že náš model funguje srovnatelně s nejmodernějšími přístupy na doménách, které jsou podobné, přičemž výrazně lepší na vysoce divergentních doménách. Náš kód je k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'fi': 'Verkkotunnuksen mukauttaminen tunteiden analysointiin on haastavaa, koska valvotut luokittelijat ovat erittäin herkkiä verkkotunnuksen muutoksille. Kaksi merkittävintä lähestymistapaa tähän ongelmaan ovat rakenteellinen kirjeenvaihto oppiminen ja automaattikooderit. Ne vaativat kuitenkin pitkiä koulutusaikoja tai kärsivät suuresti toisistaan poikkeavilla aloilla. Tuoreimpien monikielisten tunteiden analyysin saavutusten innoittamana tarjoamme uudenlaisen näkökulman ja asetamme verkkotunnuksen sopeutumisongelman integroivaksi projektiotehtäväksi. Mallimme ottaa syötteenä kaksi yksidomeenista upotustilaa ja oppii projisoimaan ne kaksidomeeniseen tilaan, joka on yhdessä optimoitu (1) projektiin toimialueiden välillä ja (2) ennustamaan tunteita. Teemme verkkotunnuksen sopeutumiskokeita 20 lähde-kohdeverkkotunnusparilla tunteiden luokittelua varten ja raportoimme uusimmista tuloksista 11 verkkotunnusparilla, mukaan lukien Amazon-verkkotunnuksen sopeutumiskokeet ja SemEval 2013- ja 2016-aineistot. Analyysimme osoittaa, että mallimme toimii vertailukelpoisesti uusimpien lähestymistapojen kanssa samankaltaisilla toimialoilla, mutta suorituskyky on huomattavasti parempi hyvin erilaisissa toimialoissa. Koodimme on saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'he': 'התאמה למשפחה לניתוח רגשות היא מאתגרת בגלל העובדה שהמסמכים שמבוטחים הם רגישים מאוד לשינויים במשפחה. שני הגישויים הכי ברורים לבעיה הזאת הם לימוד התכתבות מבנה וקודים אוטומטיים. בכל אופן, הם או דורשים זמני אימונים ארוכים או סובלים בצורה רבה בתחומים שונים מאוד. השראה על ידי התקדמות האחרונות בניתוח רגשות בין שפתיים, אנחנו מספקים פרספקטיבה חדשה ומזרקים את בעיית ההתאמה לתחום כמשימה פרוייקציה מעורבת. המודל שלנו לוקח כתוצאה שני מקומות מונו-דומין מכילים ולמד לפרויקט אותם לחלל דומין-דומין, אשר אופטימוליזם ביחד לפרויקט (1) ברחבי דומינים ולצפות רגשות (2). אנו מבצעים ניסויים שימוש בתחום על 20 זוגות בתחום המקור-מטרה להקליזת רגשות ודווחים על תוצאות חדשות של המצב המיוחד ב-11 זוגות בתחום, כולל קבוצות נתונים שימוש בתחום האמזון וסימוול 2013 ו-2016. הניתוח שלנו מראה שהדוגמנית שלנו מתבצעת בהשוואה לגישויים מצויינים על שטחים דומים, בזמן שהופעה טובה יותר באופן משמעותי על שטחים שונים מאוד. הקוד שלנו זמין ב https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'ha': "Shiryarwa na Domen wa Ana Ana Ana Shaki na Fiki, yana tsõratar wa haske da aka tsare fasalarar su ne mai sauri wa canza cikin wuri. Makarin biyu masu girma zuwa wannan matabbata, su ne ma'anar mutane da ake karanta da kodi farat ɗaya. A lokacin da aka so, ko kuma suna da matsayin mutane mai yawa. An Inspire da kewayi masu ƙara cikin Ana yi wa fasalin na ɗabi'ar-linguin, za'a samar da wani wuri na node kuma Mu jẽfa masu shida ɗin ayuka kamar wani aikin firam mai embedded. @ info: whatsthis Kana tafiyar jarrabar adadin Domen da ke samar da nau'i biyu ɗin-sauran da aka yi amfani da shi ga sifori-nau'in-sauri 20, kuma muna sakar da matsalar-halin-sanannin da aka rubũta shi a duk biyu na Domen 11, kamar da aka sami tsarin adaptarin Domen na amazon da SemEal 2013 da 2016. Anayyayinmu na nũna cewa misalinmu yana sami da muhimmada-sanawa masu sami a kan wurãre waɗanda ke daidai, kuma yana yi amfani da abu mai kyau a kan wurãren dabam-dabam. QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse", 'sk': 'Prilagoditev domen za analizo sentimenta je zahtevna zaradi dejstva, da so nadzorovani klasifikatorji zelo občutljivi na spremembe domene. Dva najpomembnejša pristopa k tej težavi sta strukturno korespondenčno učenje in samokodirniki. Vendar pa zahtevajo dolg čas usposabljanja ali pa zelo trpijo na zelo različnih področjih. Z navdihom nad nedavnim napredkom v medjezični analizi sentimentalnih občutkov zagotavljamo novo perspektivo in problem prilagajanja domene obravnavamo kot nalogo vključevanja projekcije. Naš model vzame kot vhod dva enodomenska vdelana prostora in se nauči projicirati v dvdomenski prostor, ki je skupaj optimiziran za (1) projekcijo med domenami in (2) napoved čustva. Izvajamo poskuse prilagajanja domen na 20 parih izvorne-ciljne domene za klasifikacijo sentimenta in poročamo o novih najsodobnejših rezultatih na 11 parih domen, vključno z nabori podatkov prilagajanja domene Amazon ter nabori podatkov SemEval 2013 in 2016. Naša analiza kaže, da je naš model primerljiv z najsodobnejšimi pristopi na podobnih področjih, medtem ko je bistveno boljši na zelo različnih področjih. Naša koda je na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'jv': 'domain Iki sampeyan sing dibutungan langgar sampeyan kanggo kelas iki politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness YOUNHARDER YOUR HARDER CURRENTCURRENT MUSAN HARDER HARDER YOUR PLANSUR We model take as input Two Mon-domain embedding space and Learnrns to design it to a bi-domain space, that is joinly Optimisaed to (1) design against domain and to (2) preview Sensitive. The first argument is "multi-domain" and the second argument is "multi-domain". We do domain modification testis on 8 source-goal domain parts for Senment category and report rom state-of-the-arts output on 11 domain parts, compromising the Boston domain modification dataset and semebal 2013 and 2013 dataset. We do domain modification testing on 8 source-goal domain parts Awaliyané dhéwé éntuk ngono model nambarang nggawe Perintah-perusahaan langgar tarjamah lan sampeyan sing luwih dumadhi, winih dhéwé iso nggawe barang langgar sampeyan gérané. Awake kode sing dibutuhke ing https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse', 'bo': 'Domain adaptation for sentiment analysis is challenging due to the fact that supervised classifiers are very sensitive to changes in domain. དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་ཆེས་ཤུགས་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་ཆ་ནི་བཟོ་ཁོངས་ཀྱི་ཆ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁོང་ཚོས་དུས་འགའ་འགྲོ་སྐབས་རིང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་ཡང་ན། Inspired by recent advances in cross-lingual sentiment analysis, we provide a novel perspective and cast the domain adaptation problem as an embedding projection task. Our model takes as input two mono-domain embedding spaces and learns to project them to a bi-domain space, which is jointly optimized to (1) project across domains and to (2) predict sentiment. We perform domain adaptation experiments on 20 source-target domain pairs for sentiment classification and report novel state-of-the-art results on 11 domain pairs, including the Amazon domain adaptation datasets and SemEval 2013 and 2016 datasets. ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་དང་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་རྟགས་འདི་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/jbarnesspain/domain_blse'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual Argumentation Mining : Machine Translation (and a bit of Projection) is All You Need !', 'ar': 'تعدين الحجج عبر اللغات: الترجمة الآلية (وقليلًا من الإسقاط) هو كل ما تحتاجه!', 'pt': 'Mineração de argumentação multilíngue: tradução automática (e um pouco de projeção) é tudo que você precisa!', 'fr': "Exploration d'argumentation multilingue\xa0: la traduction automatique (et un peu de projection) est tout ce dont vous avez besoin\xa0!", 'es': 'Minería de argumentación multilingüe: ¡la traducción automática (y un poco de proyección) es todo lo que necesita!', 'ja': 'クロスリンガル弁論術マイニング：機械翻訳（と少しの投影）が必要です！', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी तर्क खनन: मशीन अनुवाद (और प्रक्षेपण का एक सा) आप सभी की जरूरत है!', 'ru': 'Межъязычная аргументация Майнинг: машинный перевод (и немного проекции) - это все, что вам нужно!', 'zh': '跨语言论掘:机器翻译(与投影)即君所须也!', 'ga': 'Mianadóireacht Argóint Trasteangacha: Aistriúchán Meaisín (agus beagán Teilgean) is gá duit!', 'ka': 'ძირითადი აპროგუმენტების მიმდინარება: მაქსინური შემდეგ (და ცოტა პროგექტირება) არის ყველაფერი საჭირო!', 'hu': 'Többnyelvű érvelés Bányászat: Gépi fordítás (és egy kis vetítés) minden, amire szükséged van!', 'el': 'Εξόρυξη διαφορικών επιχειρημάτων: Η μηχανική μετάφραση (και λίγη προβολή) είναι το μόνο που χρειάζεστε!', 'lt': 'Kelių kalbų argumentacijos kasyba: mašinų vertimas (ir šiek tiek projektavimo) yra viskas, ko jums reikia!', 'it': "Estrazione di argomenti multilingue: Traduzione automatica (e un po' di proiezione) è tutto ciò che serve!", 'kk': 'Аргументациялық аргументациялық бағалау: Машин аудару (және бірнеше жобалар) керек болып тұрсыз!', 'mk': 'Cross-lingual Argumentation Mining: Machine Translation (and a bit of Projection) is All You Need!', 'ms': 'Cross-lingual Argumentation Mining: Machine Translation (and a bit of Projection) is All You Need!', 'ml': 'ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷ അര്\u200dഗ്ഗമെന്റേഷന്\u200d മിനിംഗ്: മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പ്രോജക്ടേഷനും) നിങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെല്ലാം ആവശ്യമു', 'mt': 'Argumentazzjoni Cross-lingual Mining: It-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni (u ftit ta’ Proġettazzjoni) hija dak kollu li teħtieġ!', 'mn': 'Дөрвөн хэл аргументацийн багасгал: Машин хөрөнгө (мөн бага зэрэг төсөөлөл) бол Танд хэрэгтэй зүйл юм!', 'no': 'Krysspråk argumentasjonsminning: maskinsomsetjing (og litt prosjekt) er alt du treng!', 'pl': 'Eksploacja argumentacji wielojęzycznych: Tłumaczenie maszynowe (i trochę projekcji) to wszystko, czego potrzebujesz!', 'ro': 'Argumentare interlingvă Mining: Traducere automată (și un pic de proiecție) este tot ce ai nevoie!', 'sr': 'Krozjezička argumentacija rudarstva: automatska prevoda (i malo proizvodnje) je sve što ti treba!', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරොස් භාෂාවික වාර්තාව මනින්: මැෂින් වාර්තාව (සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ටිකක්) ඔයාට ඕනි හැම දෙයක්ම!', 'sv': 'Gränsspråkig argumentation Mining: Maskinöversättning (och lite projektion) är allt du behöver!', 'so': 'Waxyaabaha ku saabsan luqada iskutallaabta: Turjumidda mashiinka (iyo wax ka mid ah Projection) waa kaad u baahan tahay dhammaan!', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- மொழி கருத்து குறிப்பு: இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (மற்றும் ஒரு பிட் திட்டத்தை) நீங்கள் அனைத்து தேவை!', 'ur': 'Cross-language Argumentation Mining: Machine Translation (and a bit of Projection) is all you need!', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phân tích chéo ngôn ngữ học: Dịch cỗ máy (và một chút Dự đoán) là tất cả bạn cần!', 'bg': 'Междуезичен аргументационен добив: Машинният превод (и малко проекция) е всичко, от което се нуждаете!', 'da': 'Tværsproget argumentation Mining: Maskinoversættelse (og lidt projektion) er alt hvad du behøver!', 'hr': 'Krozjezično argumentaciono rudarstvo: strojna prevoda (i malo proizvodnje) je sve što ti treba!', 'nl': 'Cross-lingual Argumentation Mining: Machine Translation (en een beetje projectie) is alles wat je nodig hebt!', 'id': 'Argumentasi Berbahasa Bertambang: Translation Mesin (dan sedikit proyeksi) adalah Yang Anda butuhkan!', 'de': 'Mehrsprachiges Argumentation Mining: Maschinelle Übersetzung (und ein bisschen Projektion) ist alles, was Sie brauchen!', 'ko': '크로스 언어 변론 발굴: 기계 번역(과 약간의 투영)이 바로 당신이 필요로 하는 것입니다!', 'sw': 'Uhusiano wa lugha ya Kusini: Tafsiri ya Mashiniki (na kipindi kidogo cha Project) ni unahitaji!', 'af': "Kruistale Argumentasie Mining: Masjien Vertaling (en 'n bietjie van Projeksie) is Alle U nodig!", 'fa': 'آرژومات متوسط زبان: ترجمه ماشین (و اندکی تغییر) تنها چیزی است که نیاز دارید!', 'tr': 'Çot dilli Argumentasyon Küçlemek: Makine terjime (we biraz hili Projüme) Ehlisiňiz gerek!', 'sq': 'Argumentimi ndërgjuhësor Mining: Përkthimi i makinave (dhe pak projektim) është e gjitha që ju duhet!', 'hy': 'Միայն լեզվաբանական բանավեճ հանքահանում. մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (և մի փոքր պրոեկցիա) այն է, ինչ քեզ անհրաժեշտ է:', 'am': 'ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መግለጫ ማቀናጃ: መኪን ትርጉም (እና አንዲት ፕሮጀክት) ሁሉንም ያስፈልጋል!', 'bn': 'ক্রস-ভাষার আর্গুমেন্টেশন মিনিং: মেশিন অনুবাদ (এবং কিছু প্রকল্প) আপনার সবকিছু দরকার!', 'ca': 'Argumentació translingüística Miniera: La traducció màquina (i una mica de projectió) és tot el que necessites!', 'bs': 'Krozjezička argumentacija rudarstva: automatska prevoda (i malo proizvodnje) je sve što ti treba!', 'az': '칂톛rz dilli Argumentasyon Mining: Makinat T톛rc칲m칲 (v톛 Biraz Projection) 캻stediyin T톛kdir!', 'cs': 'Dolování argumentů mezi jazyky: Strojový překlad (a trochu projekce) je vše, co potřebujete!', 'fi': 'Cross-lingual Argumentation Mining: Konekäännös (ja hieman projektiota) on kaikki mitä tarvitset!', 'et': 'Keeleülene argumentide kaevandamine: masintõlge (ja natuke projektsiooni) on kõik, mida vajate!', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'sk': 'Medjezično rudarjenje argumentacij: Strojni prevod (in malo projekcije) je vse, kar potrebujete!', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion', 'he': 'מינוי בין שפות: תרגום מכונות (וקצת פרוייקציה) זה כל מה שאתה צריך!', 'bo': 'Cross-lingual Argumentation Mining: Machine Translation (and a bit of Projection) is All You Need!'}
{'en': 'Argumentation mining (AM) requires the identification of complex discourse structures and has lately been applied with success monolingually. In this work, we show that the existing resources are, however, not adequate for assessing cross-lingual AM, due to their heterogeneity or lack of complexity. We therefore create suitable parallel corpora by (human and machine) translating a popular AM dataset consisting of persuasive student essays into German, French, Spanish, and Chinese. We then compare (i) annotation projection and (ii) bilingual word embeddings based direct transfer strategies for cross-lingual AM, finding that the former performs considerably better and almost eliminates the loss from cross-lingual transfer. Moreover, we find that annotation projection works equally well when using either costly human or cheap machine translations. Our code and data are available at http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ar': 'يتطلب التعدين الجدلي (AM) تحديد هياكل الخطاب المعقدة وقد تم تطبيقه مؤخرًا بنجاح أحادي اللغة. في هذا العمل ، نظهر أن الموارد الحالية ، مع ذلك ، ليست كافية لتقييم AM عبر اللغات ، بسبب عدم تجانسها أو عدم تعقيدها. لذلك نقوم بإنشاء مجموعات موازية مناسبة من خلال ترجمة (الإنسان والآلة) لمجموعة بيانات AM مشهورة تتكون من مقالات طلابية مقنعة إلى الألمانية والفرنسية والإسبانية والصينية. نقوم بعد ذلك بمقارنة (1) الإسقاط التوضيحي و (2) إستراتيجيات النقل المباشر القائمة على تضمين الكلمات ثنائية اللغة لـ AM عبر اللغات ، ووجدنا أن الأول يؤدي بشكل أفضل إلى حد كبير ويكاد يقضي على الخسارة الناتجة عن النقل عبر اللغات. علاوة على ذلك ، وجدنا أن عرض التعليقات التوضيحية يعمل بشكل جيد بنفس القدر عند استخدام الترجمات البشرية المكلفة أو الترجمات الآلية الرخيصة. الكود والبيانات الخاصة بنا متاحة على http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'pt': 'A mineração de argumentação (MA) requer a identificação de estruturas discursivas complexas e ultimamente tem sido aplicada com sucesso monolíngue. Neste trabalho, mostramos que os recursos existentes, no entanto, não são adequados para avaliar MA multilíngue, devido à sua heterogeneidade ou falta de complexidade. Portanto, criamos corpora paralelos adequados traduzindo (humano e máquina) um conjunto de dados AM popular que consiste em ensaios persuasivos de alunos para alemão, francês, espanhol e chinês. Em seguida, comparamos (i) projeção de anotação e (ii) incorporação de palavras bilíngües baseadas em estratégias de transferência direta para AM multilíngue, descobrindo que a primeira tem um desempenho consideravelmente melhor e quase elimina a perda da transferência interlíngue. Além disso, descobrimos que a projeção de anotações funciona igualmente bem ao usar traduções humanas caras ou máquinas baratas. Nosso código e dados estão disponíveis em http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'es': 'La minería de la argumentación (AM) requiere la identificación de estructuras discursivas complejas y últimamente se ha aplicado con éxito monolingüe. En este trabajo, mostramos que los recursos existentes, sin embargo, no son adecuados para evaluar la AM multilingüe, debido a su heterogeneidad o falta de complejidad. Por lo tanto, creamos cuerpos paralelos adecuados mediante la traducción (humana y automática) de un conjunto de datos de AM popular que consiste en ensayos persuasivos de estudiantes al alemán, francés, español y chino. Luego comparamos (i) la proyección de anotaciones y (ii) las estrategias de transferencia directa basadas en incrustaciones de palabras bilingües para la AM interlingüe, encontrando que la primera funciona considerablemente mejor y casi elimina la pérdida de la transferencia multilingüe. Además, descubrimos que la proyección de anotaciones funciona igual de bien cuando se utilizan traducciones humanas costosas o automáticas baratas. Nuestro código y nuestros datos están disponibles en http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'fr': "L'analyse d'argumentation (AM) nécessite l'identification de structures de discours complexes et a récemment été appliquée avec succès de manière monolingue. Dans ce travail, nous montrons que les ressources existantes ne sont cependant pas adéquates pour évaluer la FA multilingue, en raison de leur hétérogénéité ou de leur manque de complexité. Nous créons donc des corpus parallèles appropriés (humains et machines) en traduisant un ensemble de données de FA populaire composé de dissertations d'étudiants convaincants en allemand, français, espagnol et chinois. Nous comparons ensuite (i) la projection d'annotations et (ii) les stratégies de transfert direct basées sur l'intégration de mots bilingues pour la AM interlinguale, constatant que la première fonctionne considérablement mieux et élimine presque la perte due au transfert interlinguistique. De plus, nous constatons que la projection d'annotations fonctionne aussi bien lorsqu'on utilise des traductions humaines coûteuses ou des traductions automatiques bon marché. Notre code et nos données sont disponibles sur http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.", 'ja': '議論マイニング（ AM ）は、複雑な議論構造の特定を必要とし、最近では単一言語での成功に応用されている。しかし、この研究では、既存のリソースが異質性または複雑性の欠如により、クロスリンガルAMを評価するのに適切ではないことを示しています。したがって、私たちは、説得力のある学生エッセイからなる人気のあるAMデータセットをドイツ語、フランス語、スペイン語、中国語に翻訳することによって、適切な平行コーパ（人間と機械）を作成します。次に、(i)アノテーションプロジェクションと(ii)バイリンガルワード埋め込みを比較し、前者がかなり優れたパフォーマンスを発揮し、クロスリンガル転送からの損失をほとんど排除することを発見しました。さらに、アノテーションプロジェクションは、費用のかかる人間翻訳または安価な機械翻訳のいずれかを使用する場合にも同様にうまく機能することがわかります。コードとデータはhttp://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_miningから入手できます。', 'zh': '论掘(AM)须识杂语结构,且近于单语上成功应用。 然吾等明其异质性乏复杂性,今资源不足以质AM。 故因(人机器)以说服力弟子论文之流行AM数集翻译成德语,法语,西班牙语与中文创立其并行语料库。 然后较(i)注投影及(ii)基于跨语AM直移策双语词嵌,见前者善,几消跨语之损。 又注投影于贵工译廉价机器翻译时同效。 吾代码数可 http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining。', 'hi': 'तर्क खनन (एएम) को जटिल प्रवचन संरचनाओं की पहचान की आवश्यकता होती है और हाल ही में मोनोलिंगुअल रूप से सफलता के साथ लागू किया गया है। इस काम में, हम दिखाते हैं कि मौजूदा संसाधन, हालांकि, उनकी विषमता या जटिलता की कमी के कारण क्रॉस-लिंगुअल एएम का आकलन करने के लिए पर्याप्त नहीं हैं। इसलिए हम (मानव और मशीन) द्वारा एक लोकप्रिय एएम डेटासेट का अनुवाद करके उपयुक्त समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट बनाते हैं जिसमें जर्मन, फ्रेंच, स्पेनिश और चीनी में प्रेरक छात्र निबंध शामिल हैं। फिर हम तुलना करते हैं (i) एनोटेशन प्रोजेक्शन और (ii) द्विभाषी शब्द एम्बेडिंग क्रॉस-लिंगुअल एएम के लिए प्रत्यक्ष हस्तांतरण रणनीतियों पर आधारित है, यह पाते हुए कि पूर्व काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है और लगभग क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ट्रांसफर से नुकसान को समाप्त कर देता है। इसके अलावा, हम पाते हैं कि एनोटेशन प्रक्षेपण या तो महंगा मानव या सस्ते मशीन अनुवाद का उपयोग करते समय समान रूप से अच्छी तरह से काम करता है। हमारा कोड और डेटा http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Аргументация майнинга (AM) требует идентификации сложных структур дискурса и в последнее время с успехом применяется монолингвистически. В этой работе мы показываем, что существующие ресурсы, однако, не достаточны для оценки межязыкового аддитивного производства из-за их неоднородности или отсутствия сложности. Поэтому мы создаем подходящие параллельные корпуса путем (человеческого и машинного) перевода популярного набора данных АП, состоящего из убедительных студенческих эссе, на немецкий, французский, испанский и китайский языки. Затем мы сравниваем (i) аннотационную проекцию и (ii) двуязычные вложения слов, основанные на стратегиях прямой передачи для межязычного аддитивного производства, обнаруживая, что первое работает значительно лучше и почти исключает потерю от межязычной передачи. Кроме того, мы обнаружили, что проекция аннотаций работает одинаково хорошо при использовании дорогостоящих человеческих или дешевых машинных переводов. Наш код и данные доступны по адресу http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ga': 'Éilíonn mianadóireacht argóinte (AM) go sainaithnítear struchtúir chasta dioscúrsa agus cuireadh i bhfeidhm go rathúil é go haonteangach le déanaí. San obair seo, léirímid, áfach, nach leor na hacmhainní atá ann faoi láthair chun AM tras-teangach a mheasúnú, mar gheall ar a ilchineálacht nó a n-easpa castachta. Mar sin cruthaímid corpora comhthreomhara oiriúnacha trí (duine agus meaisín) tacar sonraí coitianta AM ina bhfuil aistí áititheacha na mac léinn a aistriú go Gearmáinis, Fraincis, Spáinnis agus Sínis. Déanaimid comparáid ansin (i) teilgean nótaí agus (ii) leabú focal dátheangach bunaithe ar straitéisí aistrithe díreacha don AM tras-teangach, ag fáil amach go bhfeidhmíonn an chéad cheann i bhfad níos fearr agus nach gcuireann sé deireadh leis an gcaillteanas ó aistriú tras-teangach. Ina theannta sin, feicimid go n-oibríonn teilgean anótála chomh maith céanna nuair a bhíonn aistriúcháin chostasacha daonna nó saor ó mheaisín á n-úsáid. Tá ár gcód agus ár sonraí ar fáil ag http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ka': 'არგუმენტების მინიღება (AM) მოჭირდება კომპლექსიკური სტრუქტურების ინდიდინტიფიკაცია და ახლა მონოლენგიურად გამოყენება. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ მსგავსი რესურსები არიან სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მსგავსი მსგავსი განსაზღვრებისთვის, ისინი heterogeneity ან კომპლ ამიტომ ჩვენ შევქმნით საჭირო პარალელი კოპორაცია (ადამიანი და მანქანი) რომელიც პოლიპური AM მონაცემების საქაღალდეს, რომელიც წარმოიდგინული სტუდენტის ესეების გერმა შემდეგ ჩვენ i) ანტორაციის პროექცია და ii) ორიენგური სიტყვების ინტერნექციების განმავლობაში პირადი ტრანსტრიქციის სტრატიგიების შესახებ, რომლებიც ძალიან უკეთესი გავაკეთება და დაბრუნდება კრესი ენ დამატებით, ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, რომ ანოტაციის პროექცია მსგავსია მსგავსია, როდესაც ადამიანის, ან მარტივი მანქანის გადასრულება გამოყენებ ჩვენი კოდი და მონაცემები შესაძლებელია http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'hu': 'Az argumentációs bányászat (AM) komplex diskurzusi struktúrák azonosítását igényli, és az utóbbi időben sikeresen egynyelvűen alkalmazták. Ebben a munkában megmutatjuk, hogy a meglévő források azonban nem elegendőek a nyelvek közötti AM értékeléséhez heterogenitásuk vagy összetettségük hiánya miatt. Ezért megfelelő párhuzamos corporákat hozunk létre (emberi és gépi) azzal, hogy egy népszerű AM adatkészletet fordítunk le, amely meggyőző tanulói esszékből áll németre, franciára, spanyolra és kínára. Ezután összehasonlítjuk (i) a megjegyzések vetítését és (ii) a kétnyelvű szóbeágyazások alapú közvetlen transzfer stratégiáit a többnyelvű AM esetében, megállapítva, hogy az előbbi jelentősen jobban teljesít, és szinte kiküszöböli a többnyelvű transzfer veszteségét. Ezenkívül úgy találjuk, hogy a megjegyzések vetítése ugyanolyan jól működik, ha költséges emberi vagy olcsó gépi fordításokat használunk. Kódunk és adataink az alábbi címen érhetők el: http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'el': 'Η εξόρυξη επιχειρημάτων (ΑΜ) απαιτεί τον προσδιορισμό σύνθετων δομών λόγου και έχει εφαρμοστεί πρόσφατα με επιτυχία μονογλωσσικά. Στην εργασία αυτή, καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι υφιστάμενοι πόροι δεν είναι επαρκείς για την αξιολόγηση της γλωσσικής ΑΜ, λόγω της ετερογένειας τους ή της έλλειψης πολυπλοκότητας τους. Ως εκ τούτου, δημιουργούμε κατάλληλα παράλληλα σώματα μεταφράζοντας ένα δημοφιλές σύνολο δεδομένων που αποτελείται από πειστικά φοιτητικά δοκίμια στα γερμανικά, γαλλικά, ισπανικά και κινέζικα. Στη συνέχεια, συγκρίνουμε (i) την προβολή σχολίων και (ii) τις δίγλωσσες ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων βασισμένες σε στρατηγικές άμεσης μεταφοράς για τη διαγώνια ΑΜ, διαπιστώνοντας ότι η πρώτη αποδίδει σημαντικά καλύτερα και σχεδόν εξαλείφει την απώλεια από τη διαγώνια μεταφορά. Επιπλέον, διαπιστώνουμε ότι η προβολή σχολίων λειτουργεί εξίσου καλά όταν χρησιμοποιείται είτε δαπανηρή ανθρώπινη είτε φτηνή μηχανική μετάφραση. Ο κώδικας και τα δεδομένα μας είναι διαθέσιμα στο http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'it': "Argumentation mining (AM) richiede l'identificazione di strutture di discorso complesse ed è stato recentemente applicato con successo monolingue. In questo lavoro, mostriamo che le risorse esistenti, tuttavia, non sono adeguate per valutare l'AM cross-lingual, a causa della loro eterogeneità o mancanza di complessità. Creiamo quindi corpi paralleli adatti traducendo (umani e macchine) un popolare set di dati AM composto da saggi studenteschi convincenti in tedesco, francese, spagnolo e cinese. Confrontiamo quindi (i) la proiezione di annotazioni e (ii) le strategie di trasferimento diretto basate su embedding di parole bilingue per AM cross-lingual, scoprendo che il primo funziona notevolmente meglio e quasi elimina la perdita dal trasferimento cross-lingual. Inoltre, troviamo che la proiezione delle annotazioni funziona altrettanto bene quando si utilizzano traduzioni automatiche costose o umane. Il nostro codice e i nostri dati sono disponibili all'indirizzo http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.", 'kk': 'Аргументациялық бағыттау (ТМ) комплекс дискурстардың құрылымын анықтау керек және соңғы уақытта монолингілікті сәттілігімен қолданылады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, біз барлық ресурстар, бірақ бірнеше тілдерді бағалау үшін жеткілікті емес деп көрсетедік. Олардың гетерогендиялық немесе тәжірибесі жоқ. Сондықтан біз (адам және машина) мәліметті AM деректер жиынын аударып, неміс, француз, испан және қытайша студенттердің ессейлерінен тұрады. Содан кейін (i) жазбалардың проекциясын және (ii) екі тілік сөздерді ендіру бағдарламасын көптілікті AM- тілікті аудару стратегиясын салыстырып, бұрынғылардың көпшілікті жақсы жұмыс істеу және көпшіл Сонымен қатар, жазбалар проекциясы адамдардың немесе артық компьютердің аудармаларын қолданғанда дұрыс жақсы жұмыс істейді. Код мен деректеріміз бар http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'lt': 'Argumentacinė kasyba (AM) reikalauja nustatyti sudėtingas diskurso struktūras ir pastaruoju metu buvo sėkmingai taikoma vienkalbiškai. In this work, we show that the existing resources are, however, not adequate for assessing cross-lingual AM, due to their heterogeneity or lack of complexity.  Todėl mes sukuriame tinkamą lygiagrečią korporą (žmogiškąjį ir mašininį) vertdami populiarų AM duomenų rinkinį, sudarytą iš įtikinamų student ų esejų į vokiečių, prancūzų, ispanų ir kinų kalbas. Tada palyginame i) anotacijų projekciją ir ii) dvikalbį žodži ų įterpimą grindžiančias tiesioginio perdavimo strategijas, skirtas tarpkalbiniam AM, nustatydami, kad pirmasis yra gerokai geresnis ir beveik pašalina nuostolius dėl tarpkalbinio perdavimo. Be to, matome, kad anotacijos projektavimas taip pat gerai veikia naudojant brangus žmogiškuosius arba pigius vertimus mašinomis. Mūsų kodas ir duomenys pateikiami http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'mk': 'Аргументациското рудање (АМ) бара идентификација на комплексни дискурсни структури и во последно време е примено со успех монојазично. Во оваа работа покажуваме дека постоечките ресурси, сепак, не се соодветни за проценка на меѓујазичниот АМ, поради нивната хетерогеност или недостатокот на комплексност. Затоа создаваме соодветна паралелна корпора преку преведување на популарниот компјутер на податоци на АМ кој се состои од убедливи студентски есеи на германски, француски, шпански и кинески. We then compare (i) annotation projection and (ii) bilingual word embeddings based direct transfer strategies for cross-lingual AM, finding that the former performs considerably better and almost eliminates the loss from cross-lingual transfer.  Покрај тоа, откриваме дека проекцијата на анотација функционира исто добро кога се користи или скапо човечко или евтино машинско преведување. Нашиот код и податоците се достапни на http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ms': 'Perlombongan argumen (AM) memerlukan pengenalan struktur diskors kompleks dan baru-baru ini telah dilaksanakan dengan sukses secara monobahasa. In this work, we show that the existing resources are, however, not adequate for assessing cross-lingual AM, due to their heterogeneity or lack of complexity.  Oleh itu, kami mencipta corpora selari yang sesuai dengan (manusia dan mesin) menerjemahkan set data AM yang terkumpul dari esai murid yang meyakinkan ke Jerman, Perancis, Sepanyol, dan Cina. Kemudian kita membandingkan (i) projeksi anotasi dan (ii) strategi pemindahan langsung berdasarkan perkataan dua bahasa untuk AM saling bahasa, mencari bahawa yang pertama berjalan jauh lebih baik dan hampir menghapuskan kehilangan dari pemindahan saling bahasa. Selain itu, kami dapati projeksi anotasi berfungsi dengan baik bila menggunakan sama ada penerjemah manusia yang mahal atau mesin murah. Kod dan data kita tersedia di http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'mn': 'Аргументацийн хөрөнгө оруулалт (АМ) нь комплекс ярианы бүтцийг тодорхойлох шаардлагатай бөгөөд сүүлийн үед амжилтыг ганц хэлний хэлбэрээр хэрэглэгдсэн. Энэ ажлын тулд бид суурилсан нөөцийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ тэдний төвөгтэй байдал эсвэл төвөгтэй байдал байхын тулд олон хэлний АМ-г үнэлэхэд хангалттай биш. Тиймээс бид алдартай AM өгөгдлийн санг Герман, Француз, Испан, Хятад хэлбэрээр хуваалцах зөвхөн зөвхөн параллел корпора бүтээж байна. Дараа нь бид i) анзаарлын төсөл болон ii) хоёр хэл хэлний дамжуулалтын тусламжтайгаар дамжуулалтын стратегийг харьцуулж байна. Өмнөх нь илүү сайн үйлдвэрлэж, олон хэл дамжуулалтын алдагдлыг бараг устгаж байна. Мөн бид үнэтэй хүн эсвэл хямд машины орчуулалт ашиглах үед илүү сайн ажилладаг гэдгийг мэднэ. Бидний код болон өгөгдлийг http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ml': 'ആര്\u200dഗ്യുമെന്റേഷന്\u200d മൈനിംഗ് (AM) സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. അടുത്തുതന്നെ വിജയം മോണോളില ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് ഭാഷയിലെ എമിനെ പരിഗണിക്കാന്\u200d മതിയാവി അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട AM ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റിനെ പരാതിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d, ഫ്രെഞ്ച്, സ്പാനിഷ്, ചൈനീസിലേക്കും പ്രധാനപ് പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d (I) അഭിപ്രോജക്ട് പ്രോജക്ഷന്\u200d (i i) രണ്ടു ഭാഷ വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള നേരിട്ട് മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള പദ്ധതികള്\u200d താല്\u200dപര്യമാക്കുന് അതുകൊണ്ട് നമുക്ക് തോന്നുന്നത് വിലയേറെ മനുഷ്യനോ വിലയേറ്റ മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷണങ്ങളോ ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രോജക് നമ്മുടെ കോഡും വിവരങ്ങളും ലഭ്യമാണ് http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'mt': 'It-tħaffir fil-minjieri tal-argumentazzjoni (AM) jeħtieġ l-identifikazzjoni ta’ strutturi kumplessi ta’ diskors u dan l-aħħar ġie applikat b’suċċess b’mod monolingwistiku. In this work, we show that the existing resources are, however, not adequate for assessing cross-lingual AM, due to their heterogeneity or lack of complexity.  Għalhekk a ħna nħolqu korpora parallel a adatta billi (umana u magna) jittraduċu sett ta’ dejta popolari tal-AM li jikkonsisti f’essaji persuasivi tal-istudenti fil-Ġermaniż, Franċiż, Spanjol u Ċiniż. Imbagħad inqabblu (i) il-projezzjoni tal-annotazzjoni u (ii) l-istrateġiji ta’ trasferiment dirett ibbażati fuq l-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem b’żewġ lingwi għall-AM translingwi, u nsibu li l-ewwel iwettaq prestazzjoni konsiderevolment aħjar u kważi jelimina t-telf mit-trasferiment translingwi. Barra minn hekk, isibu li l-projezzjoni tal-annotazzjoni taħdem bl-istess mod tajjeb meta tuża traduzzjonijiet tal-magni li jiswew ħafna flus mill-bniedem jew irħas. Il-kodiċi u d-dejta tagħna huma disponibbli fuq http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ro': 'Argumentation mining (AM) necesită identificarea unor structuri complexe de discurs și a fost aplicată în ultima vreme cu succes în mod monolingv. În această lucrare, demonstrăm că resursele existente nu sunt totuși adecvate pentru evaluarea AM translingvistică, din cauza eterogenității sau a lipsei de complexitate a acestora. Prin urmare, creăm corpore paralele potrivite (umane și mașini) traducând un set de date AM popular format din eseuri convingătoare ale studenților în germană, franceză, spaniolă și chineză. Comparăm apoi (i) proiecția adnotării și (ii) strategiile de transfer direct bazate pe încorporarea de cuvinte bilingve pentru AM translingv, constatând că primul performează considerabil mai bine și aproape elimină pierderea din transferul translingv. Mai mult decât atât, considerăm că proiecția adnotării funcționează la fel de bine atunci când se utilizează traduceri umane costisitoare sau mașini ieftine. Codul și datele noastre sunt disponibile la adresa http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'pl': 'Argumentation mining (AM) wymaga identyfikacji złożonych struktur dyskursu i ostatnio jest stosowany z sukcesem jednojęzycznie. W niniejszej pracy pokazujemy, że istniejące zasoby nie są jednak wystarczające do oceny AM między językami ze względu na ich heterogeniczność lub brak złożoności. Dlatego tworzymy odpowiednie korpory równoległe poprzez tłumaczenie popularnego zestawu danych AM składającego się z przekonujących esejów studenckich na język niemiecki, francuski, hiszpański i chiński. Następnie porównujemy (i) projekcję adnotacyjną i (ii) dwujęzyczne osadzenia słów oparte na strategiach bezpośredniego transferu dla AM między językami, stwierdzając, że pierwsza działa znacznie lepiej i prawie eliminuje straty z transferu między językami. Ponadto zauważamy, że projekcja adnotacji działa równie dobrze przy użyciu kosztownych ludzkich lub tanich tłumaczeń maszynowych. Nasz kod i dane są dostępne pod adresem: http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'no': 'Argumenteringsmining (AM) krev identifisering av komplekse diskursstrukturer og har nyleg brukt med suksess monospråk. I dette arbeidet viser vi at dei eksisterande ressursane er imidlertid ikkje adekvate for å vurdere krysspråk AM, på grunn av heterogeneitet eller mangelse av kompleksitet. Vi lagar derfor passende parallelle korpora av (menneske og maskin) som oversetter ein populært AM-dataset som inneheld av persuasive studentessay til tysk, fransk, spansk og kinesisk. Vi sammenliknar så i) notasjonsprojeksjon og ii) bilinguelt ord-innbygging basert direkte overføringsstrategiar for krysspråk AM, og finn at den tidlegare utfører mykje betre og nesten eliminerer tapen frå krysspråk overføring. I tillegg finn vi at notasjonsprojeksjonen fungerer like godt når du brukar anten kost menneske eller billige maskinsomsetjingar. Koden og data våre er tilgjengelege på http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'sr': 'Argumentacija rudarstva (AM) zahteva identifikaciju kompleksnih diskurskih struktura i nedavno je primjenjena uspjehom monojezički. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da postojeći resursi, međutim, nisu odgovarajući za procjenu preko jezika AM, zbog njihove heterogenecije ili nedostatka kompleksnosti. Stoga stvorimo odgovarajuću paralelnu korporu (ljudska i mašina) prevodeći popularnu postavku podataka AM-a koja se sastoji od uvjerljivih studentskih eseja na njemačke, francuske, španjolske i kineske. Onda uspoređujemo i) prognozu annotacije i ii) dvojezičke reči ugrađenje na temelju direktne transferske strategije za preko jezika AM, otkrivajući da je bivši mnogo bolji i skoro eliminiše gubitak od preko jezika transfera. Osim toga, pronađemo da projekcija annotacije funkcioniše jednako dobro kada koristimo skupe ljudske ili jeftine prevode mašine. Naši kod i podaci su dostupni na http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'sv': 'Argumentation mining (AM) kräver identifiering av komplexa diskursstrukturer och har nyligen tillämpats med framgång enspråkigt. I detta arbete visar vi att de befintliga resurserna dock inte är tillräckliga för att bedöma flerspråkig AM på grund av deras heterogenitet eller brist på komplexitet. Vi skapar därför lämpliga parallella corpora genom att översätta ett populärt AM-dataset bestående av övertygande studentuppsatser till tyska, franska, spanska och kinesiska. Vi jämför sedan (i) annoteringsprojektion och (ii) tvåspråkiga ordinbäddningar baserade direktöverföringsstrategier för tvärspråkig AM, konstaterande att den förstnämnda presterar betydligt bättre och nästan eliminerar förlusten från tvärspråkig överföring. Dessutom tycker vi att annoteringsprojektion fungerar lika bra när man använder kostsamma mänskliga eller billiga maskinöversättningar. Vår kod och data finns tillgängliga på http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista heshiiska (AM) waxay u baahan tahay in la aqoonsado dhismaha hadalka adag, ugu dambeyntana waxaa lagu codsaday liibaanshaha luuqada. Shuqulkaas waxan ku muujinnaa in hantida joogta ah ay ku filan yihiin qiimeynta afka kala duwan ee AM, sababtoo ah jinsiyadooda iyo baahida dhibaatada. Sidaa darteed waxaan sameynaa shirkado si haboon u eg oo u turjumaya taariikhda AM oo ah koorasyada ardayda oo ka mid ah Jarmal, Faraansiis, Isbanish iyo Shiino. Markaas waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qorshaha la wareejiyo labada luuqadood oo ku qoran qoraal toos oo si toos ah oo u diraya AM, waxaynu ogaannahay in kuwii hore ay sameeyeen si aad u wanaagsan oo uu u dhowaaday in khasaarada laga saaro wareejinta luuqadaha kala duwan. Sidoo kale waxaynu helnaa in qalabka caafimaadku si siman u shaqeeyo marka lagu isticmaalo turjumaadda kharashka ah ee bini ama machine jaban. Qoidayada iyo macluumaadyadayada waxaa laga helaa http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'si': 'වාර්තාවිකරණය මනුස්සන (AM) අවශ්\u200dයයි සංකෘත කතාවක් සංවිධානයේ පරික්ෂණය සඳහා පරික්ෂණය සමඟ සාමයෙ මේ වැඩේදී, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ වෙන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, විශේෂ භාෂාවක් AM විශ්වාස කරන්න, ඔවුන්ගේ අ ඉතින්, අපි යුක්තිමත් සමාන්\u200dය කොර්පෝරාව (මිනිස හා මැෂින්) නිර්මාණය කරනවා ජර්මාන්, ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස්, ස්පැනිස් හා චීනි ව අපි ඊට පස්සේ (i) කිරීම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ (i) දෙවෙනි භාෂාවක් වචනයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න තවත්, අපි හොයාගන්නවා කියලා කියන්නේ මිනිස්සු හෝ විශේෂ පරිවර්තනය සමහර විශේෂයෙන් වැඩ කරනවා කිය අපේ කෝඩ් සහ දත්ත තියෙනවා http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ta': 'அளபுரு குழப்பம் (AM) சிக்கலான பேச்சு உரையாடல் அமைப்புகளை அடையாளம் தேவை In this work, we show that the existing resources are, however, not adequate for assessing cross-lingual AM, due to their heterogeneity or lack of complexity.  எனவே நாம் ஒரு பிரபலமான AM தரவு அமைப்பை மொழிபெயர்ப்போம் பொருத்தமான ஒழுங்கு நிறுவனத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம். இது ஜெர்மன், பிரெஞ்சு, ஸ்பானிஷ், மற்ற நாம் (நான்) அறிவிப்பு திட்டத்தை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் (i i) இரு மொழியில் இருந்து வார்த்தைகளை சேர்க்கும் நேரடி மாற்றும் திட்டங்களை நாம் ஒப்பிடுக்கிறோம் , ம மேலும், விலையான மனிதன் அல்லது சுலபமான இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தும் பொழுது நாம் அந்த அறிவிப்பு த எங்கள் குறியீடு மற்றும் தகவல் கிடைக்கும் http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ur': 'آرگونیٹ مینینگ (AM) کی پیچیدہ گفتگو ساختاروں کی شناسایی کی ضرورت ہے اور اچھے وقت ایک زبان کے ساتھ موفقیت کے ساتھ لازم کیا گیا ہے۔ ہم اس کام میں دکھاتے ہیں کہ موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود ہیں لیکن ان کے کثیر زبان امی کی آزمائش کے لئے کافی نہیں ہیں، ان کی تعلق یا پیچیدگی کے باعث۔ تو ہم نے (انسان اور ماشین) کے ذریعہ ایک جماعت AM ڈیٹ سٹ کو ترجمہ کیا ہے جو مسلمان، فرانسوی، اسپانیایی اور چینی میں قابل تحصیلات کا سامان ہے۔ پھر ہم نے (i) اظہار کی تدبیر کی اور (ii) دو زبان کی باتوں کی تدبیر کی جگہ کرسی زبان آم کے لئے مستقیم تدبیر استراتژیات کی بنیاد رکھی ہے، اور یہ دیکھ رہے ہیں کہ اگلے لوگ بہتر عمل کرتے ہیں اور قریب تھا کہ کئی زبان کے تدبیر سے خسارہ کو ٹال دی اور ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اچھا کام کرتا ہے جب انسان یا سائل ماشین کی ترجمہ استعمال کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے کڈ اور ڈیٹا موجود ہیں http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'uz': "Argumentation mining (AM) requires the identification of complex discourse structures and has lately been applied with success monolingually.  Bu ishda biz mavjud rasmlarni ko'rsatumiz, ammo, ularning kengaylik yoki murakkablik sababini qo'shimcha tillar AM haqida yetarli emas. Шундай қилиб, биз мувофиқ парламент воситаларини (инсон ва мошини) яратамиз, мувофиқ AM маълумотлари таркиб этилган. Бу маълумот аъзолари Германий, Французс, Испанча ва Xitoycha ичига тааллуқли саволлар ўтказилади. Keyin biz tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz va ikki tillar so'zlarini o'zgartirish imkoniyatlariga ega bo'lgan direkt o'zgartirish strategiyasini ko'rib turamiz, bizning oldingi vazifalarni juda yaxshi ko'proq qiladi va ularning o'zgarishdan foydalanishini olib tashlaydi. Ko'rib, biz o'ylaymiz, taxminan tashqi narsa yoki cheksiz mashinalar tarjimalarini ishlatishda yaxshi ishlaydi. Kodlash va maʼlumot mavjud http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác tranh luận (AM) cần phải xác định các cấu trúc phức tạp trong các cuộc đối thoại và gần đây được áp dụng một cách thành công. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng nguồn tài nguyên hiện tại không đủ để đánh giá kênh AM ngôn ngữ khác nhau do sự khác nhau hay thiếu phức tạp. Chúng tôi tạo ra nhóm thể thao tương thích bằng (con người và máy) dịch một bộ dữ liệu AM phổ biến từ các bài luận thuyết phục của học sinh thành tiếng Đức, Pháp, Tây Ban Nha và Trung Quốc. Sau đó chúng ta so sánh (i) hình phạt ghi chú và (i) sự nhúng vào hai từ dựa trên chiến lược chuyển nhượng trực tiếp cho kênh AM chéo ngôn ngữ, phát hiện rằng cái này đạt được hiệu quả tốt hơn nhiều và gần như loại bỏ mất từ việc chuyển nhượng ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Chúng tôi thấy cũng có tác dụng khi sử dụng dịch thuật tốn kém của người máy hay rẻ tiền. Mật mã và dữ liệu của chúng tôi có ở http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'bg': 'Аргументационното миниране (АМ) изисква идентифициране на сложни дискурсни структури и напоследък се прилага с успех едноезично. В тази работа показваме, че съществуващите ресурси обаче не са достатъчни за оценка на междуезичните УМ поради тяхната хетерогенност или липса на сложност. Ето защо създаваме подходящи паралелни корпуси чрез (човешки и машинни) превод на популярен набор от данни, състоящ се от убедителни студентски есета на немски, френски, испански и китайски. След това сравняваме (i) анотационна проекция и (ii) двуезични словни вграждания въз основа на стратегии за директен трансфер на междуезичен АМ, като установим, че първият се представя значително по-добре и почти елиминира загубата от междуезичен трансфер. Освен това откриваме, че проекцията на анотацията работи еднакво добре, когато се използват скъпи човешки или евтини машинни преводи. Нашият код и данни са достъпни на адрес: http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'nl': "Argumentation mining (AM) vereist het identificeren van complexe discoursstructuren en wordt de laatste tijd met succes monolingual toegepast. In dit werk laten we zien dat de bestaande middelen echter niet toereikend zijn om meertalige AM te beoordelen, vanwege hun heterogeniteit of gebrek aan complexiteit. We creëren daarom geschikte parallelle corpora's door (mens en machine) een populaire AM dataset bestaande uit overtuigende student essays te vertalen naar het Duits, Frans, Spaans en Chinees. Vervolgens vergelijken we (i) annotatieprojectie en (ii) tweetalige woord embeddings gebaseerde directe overdrachtsstrategieën voor cross-lingual AM, waarbij we vaststellen dat de eerstgenoemde aanzienlijk beter presteert en bijna het verlies van cross-lingual transfer elimineert. Bovendien vinden we dat annotatieprojectie even goed werkt bij het gebruik van dure menselijke of goedkope machinevertalingen. Onze code en gegevens zijn beschikbaar op http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.", 'da': 'Argumentation mining (AM) kræver identifikation af komplekse diskursstrukturer og er på det seneste blevet anvendt med succes ensproget. I dette arbejde viser vi, at de eksisterende ressourcer imidlertid ikke er tilstrækkelige til at vurdere tværsproget AM på grund af deres heterogenitet eller manglende kompleksitet. Vi skaber derfor passende parallelle korpora ved at oversætte et populært AM datasæt bestående af overbevisende studerende essays til tysk, fransk, spansk og kinesisk. Vi sammenligner derefter (i) annoteringsprojektion og (ii) tosprogede ordindlejringer baseret på direkte overførselsstrategier for tværsproget AM, og finder ud af, at førstnævnte klarer sig betydeligt bedre og næsten eliminerer tabet fra tværsproget overførsel. Desuden finder vi, at annoteringsprojektion fungerer lige så godt, når du bruger enten dyre menneskelige eller billige maskinoversættelser. Vores kode og data er tilgængelige på http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'hr': 'Argumentacija rudarstva (AM) zahtijeva identifikaciju kompleksnih struktura diskursa i nedavno je primjenjena uspjehom monolingično. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da postojeći resursi, međutim, nisu odgovarajući za procjenu preko jezika AM, zbog njihove heterogenecije ili nedostatka kompleksnosti. Stoga stvaramo odgovarajuću paralelnu korporaciju (ljudska i strojnica) prevodeći popularnu AM dataset koji se sastoji od uvjerljivih studentskih eseja na njemačke, francuske, španjolske i kineske. Onda uspoređujemo i) prognozu annotacije i ii) dvojezičke riječi ugrađene na temelju direktne strategije prijenosa prema međujezičkim AM-ima, otkrivajući da je bivši mnogo bolji i skoro eliminira gubitak preko jezičkih prijenosa. Osim toga, pronalazimo da projekcija annotacije funkcioniše jednako dobro kada koristimo skupe ljudske ili jeftine prevode strojeva. Naši kod i podaci su dostupni na http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'de': 'Argumentation Mining (AM) erfordert die Identifikation komplexer Diskursstrukturen und wird in letzter Zeit erfolgreich monolingual angewendet. In dieser Arbeit zeigen wir, dass die vorhandenen Ressourcen aufgrund ihrer Heterogenität oder mangelnden Komplexität für die Beurteilung von crosslingualer AM jedoch nicht ausreichend sind. Wir erstellen daher geeignete parallele Korpora, indem wir (Mensch und Maschine) einen populären AM-Datensatz aus überzeugenden studentischen Essays ins Deutsche, Französische, Spanische und Chinesische übersetzen. Wir vergleichen dann (i) Annotationsprojektion und (ii) zweisprachige Wort Einbettungsstrategien, die auf direkten Transfer für crosslinguale AM basieren, und stellen fest, dass erstere deutlich besser funktioniert und den Verlust durch crosslinguale Übertragung fast eliminiert. Darüber hinaus finden wir, dass Annotationsprojektion gleichermaßen gut funktioniert, wenn entweder teure menschliche oder billige maschinelle Übersetzungen verwendet werden. Unser Code und unsere Daten sind verfügbar unter http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ko': '논증 발굴(AM)은 복잡한 언어 구조를 식별해야 하기 때문에 최근 단어에서 성공적으로 응용되었다.그러나 이 작업에서 우리는 기존의 자원이 크로스 언어 AM을 평가하기에 부족하다는 것을 발견했다. 왜냐하면 그들의 이질성이나 복잡성이 부족하기 때문이다.따라서 우리는 설득력 있는 학생 논문으로 구성된 유행 AM 데이터 집합을 독일어, 프랑스어, 스페인어, 중국어로 번역하여 적합한 평행 어료 라이브러리를 만들었다.그 다음에 우리는 (i) 주석 투영과 (ii) 이중 언어 단어를 바탕으로 삽입된 크로스 언어 AM 직접 이동 전략을 비교한 결과 전자가 더욱 잘 표현되고 크로스 언어 이동의 손실을 거의 없앴다.그 밖에 주석 투영은 비싼 인공 번역이나 저렴한 기계 번역을 사용할 때도 마찬가지로 효과가 있다는 것을 발견했다.저희 코드와 데이터는http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'fa': 'آرژانس خروجی آرژانس (AM) نیاز به شناسایی ساختارهای صحبت پیچیده است و اخیرا با موفقیت به یک زبان استفاده شده است. در این کار، ما نشان می دهیم که منابع موجود در حال حاضر برای ارزیابی AM متوسط زبان ها، به دلیل عداوت یا کمبود پیچیدگی آنها کافی نیستند. بنابراین ما شرکت پارالی مناسب را با (انسان و ماشین) ترجمه داده\u200cهای محبوب AM ایجاد می\u200cکنیم که از نسخه\u200cهای دانش آموزان متقاعد به آلمان، فرانسوی، اسپانیایی و چینی است. سپس پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای (i) نوشته\u200cها و (ii) استراتژی\u200cهای انتقال مستقیم برای AM متوسط زبان را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، و می\u200cفهمیم که پیشینیان خیلی بهتر انجام می\u200cدهد و تقریباً از دست دادن از انتقال متوسط زبان\u200cها از دست می\u200cدهد. علاوه بر این، ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که پروژه\u200cهای نوشته\u200cها با هم خوب کار می\u200cکند وقتی از ترجمه\u200cهای انسان یا دستگاه ارزونی استفاده می\u200cکند. کد و داده های ما در http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'sw': 'Ukimwengu wa mazungumzo (AM) unahitaji kutambua muundo wa mazungumzo magumu na hivi karibuni umetumiwa na mafanikio kwa lugha moja kwa moja. Katika kazi hii, tunaonyesha kuwa rasilimali zinazopo, hata hivyo, si vya kutosha kwa kutathmini lugha mbalimbali, kutokana na ujasiri wao au ukosefu wa utata. Kwa hiyo tunatengeneza makampuni yanayofanana na (binadamu na mashine) yanayotafsiri seti maarufu ya taarifa za AM ikiwa ni pamoja na masomo ya wanafunzi yenye ushawishi katika lugha ya Kijerumani, Kifaransa, Kihispania na Kichina. Kisha tunalinganisha (mimi) miradi ya kutangaza na (i i) maneno ya lugha mbili yanayohusiana na mikakati ya usafirishaji wa moja kwa moja kwa lugha, tunagundua kuwa hatua za zamani zinafanya vizuri zaidi na inakaribia kuondoa hasara kutoka kwa usafirishaji wa lugha mbalimbali. Zaidi, tunagundua kwamba miradi ya kuchanganyikiwa yanafanya kazi vizuri kwa kutumia tafsiri za binadamu gharama au mashine rahisi. Kodi na takwimu zetu zinapatikana katika http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'id': 'Argumentasi penambangan (AM) membutuhkan identifikasi struktur diskors kompleks dan akhir-akhir ini telah diaplikasikan dengan sukses secara monobahasa. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menunjukkan bahwa sumber daya yang ada, bagaimanapun, tidak cukup untuk menilai AM saling bahasa, karena heterogenitas atau kekurangan kompleksitas mereka. Oleh karena itu kami menciptakan corpora paralel yang cocok dengan (manusia dan mesin) menerjemahkan set data AM populer yang terdiri dari esai murid yang meyakinkan ke Jerman, Perancis, Spanyol, dan Cina. Kemudian kita membandingkan (i) proyeksi anotasi dan (ii) pembangunan kata dua bahasa berdasarkan strategi transfer langsung untuk AM saling bahasa, menemukan bahwa yang pertama berjalan jauh lebih baik dan hampir menghapuskan kehilangan dari transfer saling bahasa. Selain itu, kami menemukan bahwa proyeksi anotasi bekerja sama dengan baik ketika menggunakan baik manusia mahal atau mesin terjemahan murah. Kode dan data kita tersedia di http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'tr': 'Argumentasyň küçümegi (AM) karmaşık diskler strukturlaryny tanamak isleýär we soňky wagtlar monolingual başarylyga bilen uygulandyryldy. Bu işde bolan çeşmeler bolmadyklaryny görkezýäris, ýöne olaryň döwürlenmegi ýa-da çözürlik ýok bolmagy sebäbi çarpaz dillerden aýlamak üçin ýeterli däldir. Şonuň üçin biz (adam we maşynyň) meşhur bir AM veri setirini almak bilen iň ynamly okuwçylar eserlerinden Nemes, Fransizça, Ispanýolça we Çinçe dilinden doly parallel korpora döredik. Sonra (i) duygulama projesini ve (ii) bilimsel söz embederini çarpı dil AM i çin doğru bir aktar stratejilerini karşılaştırıyoruz. Önceki bu şekilde daha iyi yaptığını ve çoklu dil aktarımından kaybı çözmesini neredeyse çeviriyoruz. Munuň üçin, sözleşme projeksiyonyň deňe bir adam ýa-da ucuz maşynyň terjimelerini ulananda işleýändigini görüp otyrys. Biziň kodymyz we maglumatymyz bar http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'af': "Argumentasie mining (AM) benodig die identifikasie van komplekse diskurse strukture en het laaste toepassing gebruik met sukses monolingueel. In hierdie werk wys ons dat die bestaande hulpbronne, egter, nie adequate is om kruistale AM te evalueer nie, vanweë hulle heterogeneet of mislukking van kompleksiteit. Ons skep daarom geskikte parallele korpora deur (menslike en masjien) die vertaling van 'n populêre AM dataset wat bestaan van persuasive studente eseye in Duits, Frans, Spaanse en Sjinees. Ons vergelyk dan (i) annotasie projeksie en (ii) twee tale woord inbettings gebaseerde direkte oordrag strategies vir kruistale AM, en vind dat die vroeër beter uitvoer en amper vernietig die verlies van kruistale oordrag. Maar ons vind dat annotasie projeksie gelyk goed werk wanneer ons of kostelike menslike of skaamte masjien vertalings gebruik word. Ons kode en data is beskikbaar by http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.", 'sq': 'Argumentation mining (AM) kërkon identifikimin e strukturave komplekse të diskursit dhe kohët e fundit është aplikuar me sukses në mënyrë monogjuhësore. Në këtë punë, ne tregojmë se burimet ekzistuese nuk janë megjithatë të përshtatshme për vlerësimin e AM-së ndërgjuhësore, për shkak të heterogenitetit të tyre apo mungesës së kompleksitetit. Prandaj krijojmë një korporë paralele të përshtatshme duke përkthyer një set të dhënash të AM popullorë që përbëhet nga esej bindëse student ësh në gjermanë, francezë, spanjolle dhe kineze. Pastaj krahasojmë (i) projektimin e anotacionit dhe (ii) strategjitë e transferit të drejtpërdrejtë të bazuara në dy fjalë për AM ndërgjuhës, duke gjetur se e para funksionon konsiderueshëm më mirë dhe pothuajse eliminon humbjen nga transferi ndërgjuhës. Përveç kësaj, gjejmë se projektimi i anotacionit funksionon njëlloj mirë kur përdoret përkthimi njerëzor i kushtueshëm apo i lirë i makinave. Our code and data are available at  http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'am': 'የአውላጫው ማዘጋጀት (AM) የተጨማሪው ንግግር ሥርዓት ማረጋገጥ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ፣ የአሁኑን ሀብት፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አሜን በማስተካከል አይበቃም፣ የግንኙነት ወይም ውስጥነት ግንኙነት አይጎድልም፡፡ እንግዲህ በጀርመን፣ ፈረንሳይ፣ ስፓኒሽ እና ቻይንኛ ተማሪዎችን ትምህርት የሆኑት የኤም ዳታተር ጽሑፎችን በመግለጽ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በኋላም (እና) እና (i i) የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ተቃውሞ ለመቀናቀል ጥቅምት ለቀድሞው የአሜሪካዊ ቋንቋ ተቃውሞ እና ከክፍለ ቋንቋ መቀናቀል የተጠቃሚ መሆኑን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የዋጋው የሰው ወይም ቀላል መሣሪያዎች መተርጓሜ በመጠቀም ጊዜ የሚያስቸጋሪው ፕሮጀክት በተደላደል እናገኛለን፡፡ የኮድ እና ዳራዎች http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'bs': 'Argumentacija rudarstva (AM) zahtijeva identifikaciju kompleksnih diskurskih struktura i nedavno je primjenjena uspjehom monolingično. U ovom poslu pokazujemo da postojeći resursi, međutim, nisu odgovarajući za procjenu preko jezika AM, zbog njihove heterogenecije ili nedostatka kompleksnosti. Stoga stvaramo odgovarajuću paralelnu korporaciju (ljudska i mašina) prevodeći popularnu postavu podataka AM-a koja se sastoji od uvjerljivih studentskih eseja na njemačke, francuske, španjolske i kineske. Onda uspoređujemo i) prognozu annotacije i ii) dvojezičke riječi ugrađene na temelju direktne strategije prijenosa prema međujezičkim AM, otkrivajući da je prethodni čini mnogo bolje i skoro eliminiše gubitak preko prejenosa. Osim toga, pronalazimo da projekcija annotacije funkcioniše jednako dobro kada koristimo skupe ljudske ili jeftine prevode mašine. Naši kod i podaci su dostupni na http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'bn': 'আর্গুমেন্টেশন মিনিং (এম) কমপ্লেক্ট কথোপকথন কাঠামোর পরিচয় চিহ্নিত করার প্রয়োজন এবং সম্প্রতি সফলতার সাথে সাফল্য প্রয়োজন। এই কাজে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে বিদ্যমান সম্পদ হচ্ছে ক্রস-ভাষাভাষী এম ম মূল্যের জন্য যথেষ্ট নয়, যারা তাদের নৈতিকতা বা জটিলতার অভাব। তাই আমরা একটি জনপ্রিয় এম ডাটাসেট অনুবাদ করি যা জার্মান, ফ্রেঞ্চ, স্প্যানিশ এবং চীনে অনুসন্ধান করা হয়েছে। তারপর আমরা (আমি) বিজ্ঞাপন প্রকল্পের তুলনা করি (ই) দুই ভাষায় শব্দের বিভিন্ন সরাসরি পরিবর্তনের কৌশলের ভিত্তিক কৌশলগুলোকে তুলনা করি, তারা খুঁজে পেয়েছে যে প্রাক্তন এছাড়াও আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে বিরক্তিকর প্রজেক্ট সমান ভালো কাজ করে যখন মানুষ বা সস্তা মেশিন অনুবাদ ব্যবহার করে। আমাদের কোড এবং তথ্য পাওয়া যাচ্ছে http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'hy': "Արգեմենտացիայի հանքահանումը (ԱՄ) պահանջում է բարդ խոսակցության կառուցվածքների բացահայտումը և վերջերս կիրառվել է հաջողության մենականգծային ձևով: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ գոյություն ունեցող ռեսուրսները, այնուամենայնիվ, բավարար չեն լեզվային ԱՄ-ի գնահատելու համար, քանի որ դրանք տարբեր են կամ բարդություն չունեն: Այդ պատճառով մենք ստեղծում ենք համապատասխան զուգահեռ կառուցվածք' մարդկային և մեքենային միջոցով թարգմանելով հայտնի ԱՄ տվյալների համակարգը, որը կազմված է համոզող ուսանողների էսսերից գերմաներեն, ֆրանսիացի Հետո մենք համեմատում ենք (i) նոտացիայի պրոեկցիան և (II) երկլեզու բառերի ներդրումները հիմնված ուղղակի փոխանցման ստրատեգիաներ երկլեզու ԱՄ-ի համար, բացահայտելով, որ առաջինը շատ ավելի լավ է աշխատում և գրեթե վերացնում է կորստը երկլեզու փոխանցման արդյունքում Ավելին, մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ annoտացիայի պրոեկցիան նույնքան լավ է աշխատում, երբ օգտագործվում է կամ թանկ մարդկային կամ էժան մեքենային թարգմանություններ: Մեր կոդը և տվյալները հասանելի են http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.", 'az': 'Argumentasyon mining (AM) kompleks s√∂hb…ôt qurularńĪnńĪn tanńĪmasńĪnńĪ lazńĪm edir v…ô son zamanlarda monolingual baŇüarńĪlńĪ olaraq istifad…ô edildi. Bu iŇüd…ô, h…ôqiq…ôt…ôn d…ô, mevcut resurslar √ßoxlu dil AM-ni m√ľ…ôyy…ôn etm…ôy…ô uyńüun deyildir, onlarńĪn heterogenelikl…ôri v…ô ya kompleksit…ô yoxdur. Buna g√∂r…ô d…ô insanlar v…ô maŇüńĪnlar m…ôŇühur AM veril…ôn m…ôlumat quruluńüu il…ô m√ľnasib…ôtli paralel korpora yaradńĪrńĪq, Almanca, FransńĪzca, ńįspanyola v…ô √áinc…ô dilind…ô m√∂hk…ôm t…ôl…ôb…ô esel…ôrind…ôn olub. Sonra da i) danńĪŇüma projeksiyonu v…ô ii) iki dil danńĪŇüma stratejil…ôrini qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrńĪrńĪq, …ôvv…ôlkil…ôrin √ßox yaxŇüńĪ …ôm…ôll…ôrini √ß…ôkir v…ô √ßox dil daŇüńĪmaqdan az qala ziyana uńürayar. Daha √ßox, biz…ô bel…ô g√∂r√ľn√ľr ki, annotation projection istifad…ô ed…ôrk…ôn ya mal insan, ya da ucuz maŇüńĪn √ßeviriml…ôrini istifad…ô ed…ôrk…ôn eyni q…ôd…ôr yaxŇüńĪ iŇül…ôyir. Kodumuz v…ô m…ôlumatlarńĪmńĪz http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ca': "L'argomentació minera (AM) requereix la identificació de complexes estructures de discurs i s'ha aplicat últimament amb èxit monolingüísticament. En aquesta feina, demostram que els recursos existents no són adequats per avaluar el AM translingüístic, a causa de la seva heterogeneitat o la falta de complexitat. Així doncs creem una corpora paral·lela adequada traduïnt un conjunt de dades AM populars compost d'essais persuasius d'estudiants a alemanès, francès, espanyol i xinès. Llavors comparem (i) projecció d'anotació i (ii) estratègies de transfer ència directa basades en incorporació de paraules bilingües per AM translingüe, trobant que la primera funciona considerablement millor i quasi elimina la pèrdua de transferència translingüe. A més, trobem que la projecció d'anotació funciona igualment bé quan utilitzem traduccions humanes o barates. El nostre codi i les dades estan disponibles http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.", 'et': 'Argumentatsiooni kaevandamine (AM) nõuab keerukate diskursusstruktuuride tuvastamist ja seda on viimasel ajal edukalt rakendatud ühekeelselt. Selles töös näitame, et olemasolevad ressursid ei ole siiski keeleülese AM hindamiseks piisavad nende heterogeensuse või keerukuse puudumise tõttu. Seetõttu loome sobivaid paralleelseid korpuseid (inim- ja masinakorporeid), tõlkides populaarset AM andmekogumit, mis koosneb veenvatest üliõpilaste esseedest saksa, prantsuse, hispaania ja hiina keelde. Seejärel võrdleme (i) annotatsiooni projektsiooni ja (ii) kakskeelseid sõnade põhinevaid otseseid ülekandestrateegiaid keeleülese AM puhul, leides, et esimene toimib oluliselt paremini ja peaaegu kõrvaldab kaotuse keeleülese ülekande tõttu. Lisaks leiame, et annotatsiooni projektsioon toimib sama hästi, kui kasutatakse kas kulukaid inimlikke või odavaid masintõlkeid. Meie kood ja andmed on kättesaadavad aadressil http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'cs': 'Argumentation mining (AM) vyžaduje identifikaci složitých diskurzních struktur a je v poslední době úspěšně aplikován monojazyčně. V této práci ukazujeme, že stávající zdroje však nejsou dostatečné pro hodnocení mezijazyčné AM kvůli jejich heterogenitě nebo nedostatku složitosti. Proto vytváříme vhodné paralelní korpusy (lidské i strojové) překladem populární AM datové sady sestávající z přesvědčivých studentských esejí do němčiny, francouzštiny, španělštiny a čínštiny. Následně porovnáváme (i) annotační projekci a (ii) dvojjazyčné vkládání slov založené na strategiích přímého přenosu pro vícejazyčné AM, zjišťujeme, že první metoda funguje výrazně lépe a téměř eliminuje ztráty z přenosu mezi jazyky. Navíc zjišťujeme, že anotace projekce funguje stejně dobře při použití nákladných lidských nebo levných strojových překladů. Náš kód a data jsou k dispozici na adrese http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'fi': 'Argumentaatiolouhinta vaatii monimutkaisten diskurssirakenteiden tunnistamista ja sitä on viime aikoina sovellettu menestyksekkäästi yksikielisesti. Tässä työssä osoitetaan, että olemassa olevat resurssit eivät kuitenkaan riitä monikielisen AM:n arviointiin niiden heterogeenisyyden tai monimutkaisuuden vuoksi. Siksi luomme sopivia rinnakkaiskorpusia kääntämällä (ihminen ja kone) suositun AM-aineiston, joka koostuu vakuuttavista opiskelijaesseistä saksaksi, ranskaksi, espanjaksi ja kiinaksi. Tämän jälkeen vertaamme (i) annotointiprojektiota ja (ii) kaksikielisiä sanaupotuksia, jotka perustuvat suoriin siirtostrategioihin monikielisessä AM:ssä, ja huomasimme, että edellinen suoriutuu huomattavasti paremmin ja lähes eliminoi menetyksen monikielisestä siirrosta. Lisäksi huomaamme, että annotointiprojektio toimii yhtä hyvin, kun käytetään joko kalliita ihmis- tai halpoja konekäännöksiä. Koodimme ja tietomme ovat saatavilla osoitteessa http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'sk': 'Argumentacijsko rudarjenje (AM) zahteva identifikacijo kompleksnih diskurznih struktur in se v zadnjem času uspešno uporablja enojezično. V tem delu pa pokažemo, da obstoječi viri zaradi heterogenosti ali pomanjkanja kompleksnosti niso primerni za ocenjevanje medjezične AM. Zato ustvarjamo primerne vzporedne korpuse s prevajanjem (človeškega in strojnega) priljubljenega nabora podatkov AM, sestavljenega iz prepričljivih študentskih esejev v nemščino, francoščino, španščino in kitajščino. Nato primerjamo (i) projekcijo označevanja in (ii) dvojezične besedne vdelave, ki temeljijo na strategijah neposrednega prenosa za medjezično AM, ugotovimo, da prva deluje bistveno bolje in skoraj odpravlja izgubo zaradi medjezičnega prenosa. Poleg tega ugotavljamo, da projekcija označevanja deluje enako dobro pri uporabi dragih človeških ali poceni strojnih prevodov. Naša koda in podatki so na voljo na spletni strani http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'ha': "Juyin Argumentation (AM) yana son gane wa tsarin mazaɓa masu husũma da kuma a haɗa shi a yanzu da babban nasara monoli. Daga wannan aikin, Munã nũna masa cẽwa, ma'anar nan da ke jira ba ta isa ga haƙatan AM-fassarar-harshen, saboda da tausayi ko kuma bã da kami mai kamfatawa. Saboda haka, Munã halitta koropa mai daidai da (mutum da mashine) mai fassara da data na AM mai girma wanda yana da fassarar littafan karatun masu bakwai zuwa jeruman, French, spanish, da China. Sa'an nan kuma muna samfani da kunnufi da (i i) maganar biyu masu saukarwa da ke samu'anar shishi ga masu shiryuwa na dabar-harshen AM, sai ka gane cewa masu amfani da shi ne mafi alhẽri kuma don ya yi kusa ya goge hasara daga transfer-harshen. Za kuma, za mu gane cewa shirin zartar da shi yana aiki daidai idan an yi amfani da fassarar masu nau'i ko kuma ma'abũcin adadin masu sauri. Ana sami kodi da data http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.", 'jv': 'name of the first argument Nang barêng-barêng iki, kéné ngomong nik nggawe kayané rasané sing ana, nguasai, ora adalah kanggo nggawe gerakan kelangan AM karo hal-langgar, ngenaé perusahaan karo hal-langgar sing ora mbok saiki. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan langgar-wong liyane karo (karo uwong karo mulalam) sing dikambutan dataset AM popular sing isiné dadi nggawe gerapakan karo essayu kuwi ampungan ning alam, Perancis, Spanish lan Cino. Awak dhéwé nambah (i) ngerasakno pergunakan lan Nambah, awak dhéwé luwih éntuk akeh operasi luwih apik nek nguasai perusahaan barang sampeyan karo akeh dolanan liyane. Iso kode lan data kang sampeyan http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'he': 'Argumentation mining (AM) requires the identification of complex discourse structures and has lately been applied with success monolingually.  בעבודה הזאת, אנו מראים שהמשאבים הנוכחים אינם מתאימים להערכה אמ.אם. בין שפתיים, בגלל ההטרוגניות שלהם או חוסר מורכבות. לכן אנחנו יוצרים גופרה מקבילה מתאימה על ידי (אנושית ומכונה) תורגם קבוצת מידע AM פופופולרית שמתכתבת במאמרים סטודנטים משכנעים לגרמנים, צרפתיים, ספרדיים וסינים. ואז נשווה (i) פרוייקציה של הערות (annotation projection) ו (ii) תכניות מילים שתיים שפות מבוססת אסטרטגיות העברה ישירה לחצות שפות AM, למצוא שהקודם מבצע הרבה יותר טוב וכמעט מחסל את האובדן מההעברה דרך שפות. בנוסף, אנו מוצאים שפרוייקציה של הערות עובדת באותה מידה כשמשתמשת בתרגומות אנושיות יקרות או זולות. הקוד והנתונים שלנו זמינים ב http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.', 'bo': 'Argumentation mining (AM) requires the identification of complex discourse structures and has lately been applied with success monolingually. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་རྒྱུ་ཆས་དེ་དག་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཅིག་གིས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ན་ལས་ཕལ་མ དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་མི་དང་མི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ན། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་i) annotation projection and (ii) bilingual word embeddings based direct transfer strategies for cross-lingual AM, འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྲངས་སྟོན་རྩིས་མེད་གཉིས་ལས་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན་ན། ང་ཚོའི་ཨང་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དེ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ http://github.com/UKPLab/coling2018-xling_argument_mining.'}
{'en': 'Open-Domain Event Detection using Distant Supervision', 'es': 'Detección de eventos de dominio abierto mediante supervisión a distancia', 'pt': 'Detecção de eventos de domínio aberto usando supervisão à distância', 'ar': 'كشف حدث المجال المفتوح باستخدام الإشراف البعيد', 'fr': "Détection d'événements de domaine ouvert à l'aide de la", 'zh': '以远程监开域事检测', 'ja': '遠隔監視を使用したオープンドメインイベント検出', 'hi': 'दूरस्थ पर्यवेक्षण का उपयोग कर ओपन-डोमेन ईवेंट डिटेक्शन', 'ru': 'Обнаружение событий в открытом домене с помощью удаленного контроля', 'ga': 'Brath Imeachta Fearainn Oscailte ag baint úsáide as Maoirseacht i gCéin', 'lt': 'Atviro domeno įvykių nustatymas naudojant nuotolinę priežiūrą', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση συμβάντων ανοικτού τομέα με χρήση απομακρυσμένης επίβλεψης', 'kk': 'Домен оқиғаларын қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау арқылы анықтау', 'mk': 'Детектирање на настани во отворен домен користејќи далечна надзора', 'it': 'Rilevamento di eventi open-domain con supervisione remota', 'ka': 'დიომენის გახსნა მოვლენების განსახულება', 'hu': 'Nyitott tartomány eseményészlelése távoli felügyelet segítségével', 'ml': 'ഡോമെന്\u200d അവസ്ഥ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Peristiwa Domain Buka menggunakan Supervisi Jauh', 'mn': 'Холбооны найдвар ашиглан Доменын үйл явдал нээх', 'mt': 'Sejbien ta’ Avvenimenti f’Dominju Miftuħ bl-użu ta’ Superviżjoni Distanza', 'no': 'Opna- domenehendingar- oppdaging ved hjelp av ekstern oversikt', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie zdarzeń otwartych w domenie przy użyciu nadzoru na odległość', 'ro': 'Detectarea evenimentelor de domeniu deschis utilizând supravegherea la distanță', 'sr': 'Otvaranje događaja u domenu koristeći daljinski nadzor', 'si': 'දුරස්ථාන බලන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ඩොමේන් අවස්ථාව හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'Xafiiska dhacdooyinka furan ee degmada', 'sv': 'Identifiering av händelser med öppen domän med fjärrövervakning', 'ta': 'தொலைநிலை சேவையகத்தை பயன்படுத்தி திற- Domain நிகழ்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'دور سپرویزین کے مطابق دامین ایڈمنٹ شناسایی', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Phát hiện sự kiện miền rộng', 'bg': 'Откриване на събития с отворен домейн чрез дистанционен надзор', 'hr': 'Otvaranje događaja otvorenog domena koristeći daljinski nadzor', 'da': 'Registrering af åbne domæner ved hjælp af fjerntilsyn', 'nl': 'Open-domein gebeurtenisdetectie met behulp van toezicht op afstand', 'de': 'Open-Domain Ereigniserkennung mit Fernüberwachung', 'id': 'Deteksi Kejadian Domain Buka menggunakan Supervisi Jauh', 'ko': '원격 모니터링 기반의 개방역 이벤트 탐지', 'fa': 'باز کردن اتفاق دامنه با استفاده از نظارت دور', 'tr': '_Wagtlaýyn Görkezilişinden Aç Wagtlaýyn Açmak', 'sw': 'Toleo la Tukio la Open-Domain kwa kutumia Ufuatiliaji wa Masuala', 'af': 'Open- Domein Begeefde Opdekking gebruik afstand Supervisie', 'sq': 'Detektimi i ngjarjeve të dominit të hapur duke përdorur mbikqyrjen e largët', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Բաց բնագավառի իրադարձությունների հայտնաբերումը հեռավոր վերահսկողության միջոցով', 'az': 'Uzaq Supervizyon vasit…ôsil…ô A√ß Domena Vaqialarƒ±', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন ইভেন্ট সনাক্ত করুন', 'bs': 'Otvaranje događaja u domenu koristeći udaljeni nadzor', 'ca': "Detecció d'events en domini obert fent servir supervisió remota", 'cs': 'Detekce událostí v otevřené doméně pomocí vzdáleného dohledu', 'et': 'Avatud domeeni sündmuste tuvastamine kaugjärelevalve abil', 'fi': 'Avoimen verkkotunnuksen tapahtumantunnistus etävalvonnan avulla', 'jv': 'Open-domain events detection with Distant super view', 'he': 'גילוי אירועים בתחום פתוח באמצעות מעקב מרחוק', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje dogodkov v odprti domeni z uporabo daljnega nadzora', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཐག་རིང་མཐོང་སྣང་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་དྲ་ཁོངས་བྱ་འགུལ་རྟོགས་བྱེད་སྐབས་ཁ་ཕྱེ་བ'}
{'en': 'This paper introduces open-domain event detection, a new event detection paradigm to address issues of prior work on restricted domains and event annotation. The goal is to detect all kinds of events regardless of domains. Given the absence of training data, we propose a distant supervision method that is able to generate high-quality training data. Using a manually annotated event corpus as gold standard, our experiments show that despite no direct supervision, the model outperforms supervised models. This result indicates that the distant supervision enables robust event detection in various domains, while obviating the need for human annotation of events.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة اكتشاف حدث المجال المفتوح ، وهو نموذج جديد للكشف عن الأحداث لمعالجة مشكلات العمل السابق في المجالات المقيدة والتعليق التوضيحي للحدث. الهدف هو اكتشاف جميع أنواع الأحداث بغض النظر عن المجالات. نظرًا لغياب بيانات التدريب ، نقترح طريقة إشراف بعيدة قادرة على توليد بيانات تدريب عالية الجودة. باستخدام مجموعة أحداث مشروحة يدويًا كمعيار ذهبي ، تُظهر تجاربنا أنه على الرغم من عدم وجود إشراف مباشر ، فإن النموذج يتفوق على النماذج الخاضعة للإشراف. تشير هذه النتيجة إلى أن الإشراف عن بُعد يتيح اكتشافًا قويًا للأحداث في مجالات مختلفة ، مع تجنب الحاجة إلى التعليقات التوضيحية البشرية للأحداث.', 'fr': "Cet article présente la détection d'événements de domaine ouvert, un nouveau paradigme de détection d'événements pour résoudre les problèmes liés aux travaux antérieurs sur les domaines restreints et l'annotation d'événements. L'objectif est de détecter toutes sortes d'événements, quels que soient les domaines. En l'absence de données d'entraînement, nous proposons une méthode de supervision à distance capable de générer des données d'entraînement de haute qualité. En utilisant un corpus d'événements annoté manuellement comme étalon-or, nos expériences montrent que, malgré l'absence de supervision directe, le modèle surpasse les modèles supervisés. Ce résultat indique que la supervision à distance permet une détection robuste des événements dans divers domaines, tout en évitant la nécessité d'une annotation humaine des événements.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta la detección de eventos de dominio abierto, un nuevo paradigma de detección de eventos para abordar los problemas del trabajo previo en los dominios restringidos y la anotación de eventos. El objetivo es detectar todo tipo de eventos independientemente de los dominios. Dada la ausencia de datos de entrenamiento, proponemos un método de supervisión a distancia que sea capaz de generar datos de entrenamiento de alta calidad. Al utilizar un corpus de eventos anotado manualmente como estándar de oro, nuestros experimentos muestran que, a pesar de no haber supervisión directa, el modelo supera a los modelos supervisados. Este resultado indica que la supervisión a distancia permite la detección robusta de eventos en varios dominios, al tiempo que evita la necesidad de anotación humana de los eventos.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta a detecção de eventos de domínio aberto, um novo paradigma de detecção de eventos para resolver problemas de trabalhos anteriores em domínios restritos e anotação de eventos. O objetivo é detectar todos os tipos de eventos, independentemente dos domínios. Dada a ausência de dados de treinamento, propomos um método de supervisão à distância capaz de gerar dados de treinamento de alta qualidade. Usando um corpus de eventos anotado manualmente como padrão-ouro, nossos experimentos mostram que, apesar de não haver supervisão direta, o modelo supera os modelos supervisionados. Este resultado indica que a supervisão à distância permite detecção robusta de eventos em vários domínios, ao mesmo tempo em que evita a necessidade de anotação humana de eventos.', 'ja': '本稿では、制限されたドメインとイベントアノテーションに関する先行作業の問題に対処するための新しいイベント検出パラダイムであるオープンドメインイベント検出を紹介する。目的は、ドメインに関係なくあらゆる種類のイベントを検出することです。トレーニングデータがないことを考慮し、高品質のトレーニングデータを生成できる遠隔監督方法を提案します。手動でアノテーションされたイベントコーパスをゴールドスタンダードとして使用すると、私たちの実験は、直接的な監督がないにもかかわらず、モデルが監督されたモデルよりも優れていることを示します。この結果は、遠隔監視が様々なドメインでの堅牢なイベント検出を可能にする一方で、イベントのヒューマンアノテーションの必要性を排除することを示す。', 'zh': '本文引开域事检测,此一新事检测,所以决前受限域注事也。 检诸事,不虑域。 鉴于训练之数,建一能成高质量练数之远程。 用手动注事语料库为黄金准,吾实验明之,虽不径监,其性优于监模。 此结果表明,远程监可以检域中,兼免注事之需。', 'ru': 'Эта статья вводит обнаружение событий открытого домена, новую парадигму обнаружения событий для решения вопросов предыдущей работы над ограниченными доменами и аннотацией событий. Целью является обнаружение всех видов событий независимо от доменов. Учитывая отсутствие обучающих данных, мы предлагаем метод дистанционного наблюдения, который способен генерировать высококачественные обучающие данные. Используя вручную аннотированный корпус события в качестве золотого стандарта, наши эксперименты показывают, что, несмотря на отсутствие прямого надзора, модель превосходит модели под наблюдением. Этот результат указывает на то, что удаленное наблюдение позволяет надежно обнаруживать события в различных доменах, при этом устраняя необходимость человеческой аннотации событий.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर ओपन-डोमेन ईवेंट डिटेक्शन, प्रतिबंधित डोमेन और ईवेंट एनोटेशन पर पूर्व कार्य के मुद्दों को संबोधित करने के लिए एक नया ईवेंट डिटेक्शन प्रतिमान पेश करता है। लक्ष्य डोमेन की परवाह किए बिना सभी प्रकार की घटनाओं का पता लगाने के लिए है। प्रशिक्षण डेटा की अनुपस्थिति को देखते हुए, हम एक दूर की पर्यवेक्षण विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले प्रशिक्षण डेटा उत्पन्न करने में सक्षम है। सोने के मानक के रूप में मैन्युअल रूप से एनोटेट किए गए ईवेंट कॉर्पस का उपयोग करते हुए, हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि कोई प्रत्यक्ष पर्यवेक्षण के बावजूद, मॉडल पर्यवेक्षित मॉडल को मात देता है। यह परिणाम इंगित करता है कि दूर का पर्यवेक्षण विभिन्न डोमेन में मजबूत घटना का पता लगाने में सक्षम बनाता है, जबकि घटनाओं के मानव एनोटेशन की आवश्यकता को दूर करता है।', 'ga': 'Tugann an páipéar seo braite teagmhais oscailte isteach, paraidím braite teagmhais nua chun dul i ngleic le saincheisteanna a bhaineann le réamhobair ar fhearann srianta agus nótaí imeachta. Is é an sprioc gach cineál imeachtaí a bhrath beag beann ar na fearainn. Ós rud é nach bhfuil sonraí oiliúna ann, molaimid modh maoirseachta i bhfad i gcéin a bheidh in ann sonraí oiliúna ardchaighdeáin a ghiniúint. Agus corpas imeachtaí anótáilte de láimh á n-úsáid againn mar chaighdeán óir, léiríonn ár dturgnaimh, ainneoin nach bhfuil aon mhaoirseacht dhíreach ann, go n-éiríonn níos fearr leis an tsamhail ná na samhlacha maoirsithe. Léiríonn an toradh seo go gcumasaíonn an mhaoirseacht i bhfad i gcéin braite teagmhais láidir i bhfearainn éagsúla, agus go seachnaítear an gá atá le nótaí daonna ar imeachtaí.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει την ανίχνευση συμβάντων ανοικτού τομέα, ένα νέο παράδειγμα ανίχνευσης συμβάντων για την αντιμετώπιση προβλημάτων προηγούμενης εργασίας σε περιορισμένους τομείς και σχολιασμού συμβάντων. Ο στόχος είναι να ανιχνεύσει όλα τα είδη συμβάντων ανεξάρτητα από τους τομείς. Δεδομένου της απουσίας δεδομένων κατάρτισης, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο απομακρυσμένης επίβλεψης που είναι σε θέση να παράγει δεδομένα κατάρτισης υψηλής ποιότητας. Χρησιμοποιώντας ένα χειροκίνητα σχολιασμένο σώμα γεγονότων ως χρυσό πρότυπο, τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι παρά την έλλειψη άμεσης επίβλεψης, το μοντέλο ξεπερνά τα εποπτευόμενα μοντέλα. Αυτό το αποτέλεσμα δείχνει ότι η μακρινή επιτήρηση επιτρέπει την εύρωστη ανίχνευση συμβάντων σε διάφορους τομείς, ενώ παράλληλα αποτρέπει την ανάγκη για ανθρώπινη σημείωση συμβάντων.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a nyílt domain eseményfelismerést, egy új eseményfelismerési paradigmát, amely a korábbi korlátozott domaineken végzett munkák és eseményjegyzetek kérdéseinek kezelésére szolgál. A cél az, hogy mindenféle eseményt észleljünk, függetlenül a tartományoktól. A képzési adatok hiányában olyan távoli felügyeleti módszert javasolunk, amely képes kiváló minőségű képzési adatokat generálni. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy közvetlen felügyelet nélkül a modell felügyelt modelleket felülmúlja. Ez az eredmény azt mutatja, hogy a távoli felügyelet lehetővé teszi az események robusztus felismerését különböző területeken, miközben elkerüli az események emberi jegyzetelésének szükségességét.', 'ka': 'ეს დომენტი გახსნა მოვლენების განახსნა, ახალი მოვლენების განახსნა პარადიგმა, რომელიც წინასწორედ მუშაობის პრობლემების გადაწყენება დასაწყენებელი დომენების და მოვლ მისამართი არის ყველა სახის განახლება, რომელიც არაფერი მოხდება. მაგალითად განაკეთებული მონაცემების არსებობა, ჩვენ მინდომებით განაკეთებული მონაცემების მეთოდი, რომელიც შეუძლებელია წარმოიქმნა უფრო კარგალიტიური ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოყენება, როგორც წლის სტანდარტატური მოვლენის კორპუსის გამოყენება, რომ პირდაპირი დანარწმუნება არაფერი, მოდელი უფრო ნარწმუნებული მო ეს შედეგი მოჩვენებს, რომ განმავლობაში მონაცემები ძალიან ძალიან მონაცემების განახლება სხვადასხვა დომენში, როცა ადამიანის მონაცემების ნოტაციის განახლება მოხდება.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз ашылған домен оқиғаларды анықтау, жаңа оқиғаларды анықтау парадигмін шектелген домен мен оқиғалардың мәселелерін өзгертуге болады. Мақсат - домендерге қарамастан бүкіл түрлі оқиғаларды анықтау. Оқыту деректері жоқ болмаса, қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау әдісін таңдаймыз. Қолмен белгіленген оқиға корпус алтын стандартты ретінде қолданып, тәжірибелеріміз дәл бақылау үшін, үлгі бақылау үлгілерін жоқ деп көрсетеді. Бұл нәтижесі, қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау оқиғаларды түрлі домендерде анықтау мүмкіндігін мүмкіндік береді.', 'it': "Questo articolo introduce il rilevamento di eventi a dominio aperto, un nuovo paradigma di rilevamento di eventi per affrontare i problemi del lavoro precedente su domini limitati e annotazione di eventi. L'obiettivo è rilevare tutti i tipi di eventi indipendentemente dai domini. Data l'assenza di dati formativi, proponiamo un metodo di supervisione a distanza in grado di generare dati formativi di alta qualità. Utilizzando un corpus di eventi annotato manualmente come gold standard, i nostri esperimenti mostrano che, nonostante nessuna supervisione diretta, il modello supera i modelli supervisionati. Questo risultato indica che la supervisione a distanza consente un rilevamento robusto degli eventi in vari domini, evitando al contempo la necessità di annotazione umana degli eventi.", 'mk': 'Овој весник претставува детекција на настани во отворен домен, нов парадигм за детекција на настани за решавање на прашањата од претходната работа на рестриктирани домени и анотација на настани. Целта е да се детектираат сите видови на настани без оглед на домените. Со оглед на отсуството на податоци за обука, предложуваме далечен метод за надзор кој може да генерира висококвалитетни податоци за обука. Користејќи рачно анотиран настан корпус како златен стандард, нашите експерименти покажуваат дека и покрај тоа што нема директен надзор, моделот надминува надгледувани модели. Овој резултат покажува дека далечниот надзор овозможува силно детекција на настани во различни домени, истовремено избегнувајќи ја потребата за човечка анотација на настаните.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan pengesan peristiwa domain-terbuka, paradigm a pengesan peristiwa baru untuk mengatasi isu kerja sebelumnya pada domain-sempadan dan anotasi peristiwa. Tujuan adalah untuk mengesan semua jenis peristiwa walaupun domain. Given the absence of training data, we propose a distant supervision method that is able to generate high-quality training data.  Menggunakan korpus peristiwa yang dicatat secara manual sebagai piawai emas, eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa walaupun tiada pengawasan langsung, model melampaui model yang diawasi. Hasil ini menunjukkan bahawa pengawasan jauh membolehkan pengesan peristiwa yang kuat dalam pelbagai domain, sementara menghindari keperluan untuk anotasi peristiwa manusia.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d തുറന്ന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d സംഭവം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി പുതിയ സംഭവം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതി എല്ലാ തരത്തിലുള്ള സംഭവങ്ങളും കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യം. പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു ദൂരത്തെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഉയര സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്റ്ററായി കൊണ്ട് ഒരു സംഭവത്തിന്റെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. നേരിട്ട് നിരീക ഇതിന്റെ ഫലം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d ദൂരെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമീനുകളില്\u200d സംഭവിക്കുന്നതിനെ പ', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jintroduċi detezzjoni ta’ avvenimenti f’dominju miftuħ, paradigm a ġdida ta’ detezzjoni ta’ avvenimenti biex jiġu indirizzati kwistjonijiet ta’ xogħol minn qabel fuq dominji ristretti u annotazzjoni ta’ avvenimenti. L-għan huwa li jinstabu kull tip ta’ avveniment irrispettivament mid-dominji. Minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ dejta dwar it-taħriġ, qed nipproponu metodu ta’ superviżjoni distanti li jista’ jiġġenera dejta dwar it-taħriġ ta’ kwalità għolja. Bl-użu ta’ event corpus annotat manwalment bħala standard tad-deheb, l-esperimenti tagħna juru li minkejja l-ebda superviżjoni diretta, il-mudell jaqbeż il-mudelli superviżi. Dan ir-riżultat jindika li s-superviżjoni distanti tippermetti detezzjoni robusta ta’ avvenimenti f’diversi oqsma, filwaqt li tevita l-ħtieġa għal annotazzjoni umana ta’ avvenimenti.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нээлттэй холбоотой үйл явдлыг тайлбарлах, шинэ үйл явдлыг тайлбарлах парадигм гэсэн үг. Цаг нь бүх төрлийн үйл явдлыг зохион байгуулах. Боловсролын өгөгдлийн байхгүй учраас бид өндөр чанартай дасгал өгөгдлийг бүтээж чадах хол дасгал хандлагын аргыг санал болгож байна. Хоосон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн корпус алт стандарт болж ашиглан бидний туршилтууд шууд удирдлагагүй ч, загвар нь удирдлагатай загваруудыг дамжуулдаг. Үүний үр дүнд хол даяарлын харилцаа нь олон хэсэгт хүн төрөлхтний сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шаардлагатай байдлыг олох боломжтой болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'lt': 'This paper introduces open-domain event detection, a new event detection paradigm to address issues of prior work on restricted domains and event annotation.  Tikslas – nustatyti visų rūšių įvykius, nepriklausomai nuo domenų. Atsižvelgdami į mokymo duomenų trūkumą, siūlome nuotolinio priežiūros metodą, kuris galėtų sukurti aukštos kokybės mokymo duomenis. Naudojant rankiniu būdu anotuotą įvykio korpusą kaip aukso standartą, mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad nepaisant tiesioginės priežiūros modelis yra didesnis už prižiūrimus modelius. Šis rezultatas rodo, kad nuotolinė priežiūra leidžia patikimai nustatyti įvykius įvairiose srityse, kartu išvengiant poreikio žmonėms užrašyti įvykius.', 'no': 'Denne papiret introduserer oppdaging av hendingar med open- domain, eit nytt paradigm for oppdaging av hendingar for å adressera problemar med førre arbeid på avgrensa domene og hendingar. Målet er å finna alle typar hendingar uavhengig av domene. Gjennom ingenting av treningsdata, foreslår vi ein ekstern overvåkingsmetode som kan laga høg kvalitetøvingsdata. Bruk ein manuelt merkte hendingskorpus som gull standard, viser eksperimentene våre at selv om ingen direkte oversikt ikkje, utfører modellen over oversikte modeller. Dette resultatet viser at avstanden av oversiktet kan gjere robust hendingar oppdaging i ulike domene, mens det gjer nødvendighet for menneske oppdaging av hendingar.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja otvorenog domena otkrivanja događaja, novu paradigmu otkrivanja događaja za rješavanje pitanja prethodnog rada o ograničenim domenama i annotaciji događaja. Cilj je otkrivanje svih događaja bez obzira na domene. S obzirom na nedostatak podataka o obuci, predlažemo daljinski metod nadzora koji može stvoriti podatke o kvalitetu obuke. Koristeæi ruèno annotirani korpus dogaðaja kao zlatni standard, naši eksperimenti pokazuju da, uprkos direktnom nadzoru, model ne izvršava nadzorne modele. Ovaj rezultat ukazuje na to da udaljeni nadzor omogućava robotu otkrivanje događaja u različitim domenima, dok obnavlja potrebu za ljudskim oznakem događaja.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ විවෘත්ත සැකසුම් හොයාගන්න, අළුත් සැකසුම් හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200d අලක්ෂණය තමයි සියළුම විදිහට සියළුම සිදුවීම් හොයාගන්න. ප්\u200dරශ්නය දත්ත නැති විදිහට, අපි දුරස්ථානය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න. සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විදියට සුන්ධ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ සිද්ධ පරීක්ෂණයක් නැති විදියට,  මේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ දුරස්ථ ප්\u200dරධානය විවිධ ස්ථානයක් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, මිනිස්සු අවස්ථාව', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia wykrywanie zdarzeń w otwartej domenie, nowy paradygmat wykrywania zdarzeń w celu rozwiązania problemów wcześniejszych prac nad ograniczonymi domenami i adnotacją zdarzeń. Celem jest wykrywanie wszelkiego rodzaju zdarzeń niezależnie od domen. Biorąc pod uwagę brak danych szkoleniowych proponujemy metodę nadzoru na odległość, która jest w stanie generować wysokiej jakości dane szkoleniowe. Wykorzystując ręcznie adnotację korpusu zdarzeń jako złoty standard, nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że pomimo braku bezpośredniego nadzoru, model przewyższa nadzorowane modele. Wynik ten wskazuje, że odległy nadzór umożliwia solidne wykrywanie zdarzeń w różnych dziedzinach, przy jednoczesnym uniknięciu potrzeby adnotacji zdarzeń przez człowieka.', 'ta': '@ info The goal is to detect all kinds of events regardless of domains.  பயிற்சி தரவு இல்லையென்றால், நாம் தொலைதூர கண்காணிப்பு முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது உயர்தரமான பயிற்சி தர ஒரு கைமுறையாக குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட நிகழ்வு குறிப்புகளை தங்கநிலைமையாக பயன்படுத்தி, எங்கள் சோதனைகள் தெரியும் நேரடி கண்காணிப்பு இல இந்த முடிவு குறிப்பிடுகிறது தொலைதூர கண்காணிப்பு நிகழ்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பதை செயல்படுத்தும் மற்றொரு களங்களில் உள்ள கண', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă detectarea evenimentelor cu domeniu deschis, o nouă paradigmă de detectare a evenimentelor pentru a aborda problemele de lucru anterior pe domenii restricționate și adnotări de evenimente. Scopul este de a detecta toate tipurile de evenimente indiferent de domenii. Având în vedere absența datelor de formare, propunem o metodă de supraveghere la distanță care să genereze date de formare de înaltă calitate. Folosind un corpus de evenimente adnotat manual ca standard auriu, experimentele noastre arată că, în ciuda lipsei de supraveghere directă, modelul depășește modelele supravegheate. Acest rezultat indică faptul că supravegherea la distanță permite detectarea robustă a evenimentelor în diferite domenii, evitând totodată necesitatea adnotării umane a evenimentelor.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ کھولتا ہے ڈومین ایڈیٹ شناسایی، ایک نئی ایڈیٹ شناسایی پارادیگ، جو پہلے کام کے مسئلہ پر محدودہ ڈومین اور ایڈیٹ انٹیٹ کے بارے میں حل کرنے کے لئے مشکل کرتا ہے. مقصد یہ ہے کہ ہر قسم کی اتفاق ڈمین کے بغیر جانے کی۔ آموزش دادہ کے غیر موجود ہونے کے باعث، ہم ایک دور نظارت طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو بہت سی کیفیت کی آموزش دی جائے گی۔ ہمارے آزمائش نے سونے کی استاندارڈ کے طور پر ایک مضبوط ایڈیونٹ کورپوس کا استعمال کیا ہے کہ کسی مستقیم نظارت کے بغیر، مدل نظارت کی مدلکوں سے زیادہ اضافہ نہیں کرتا۔ یہ نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ دور کی نظر مختلف دامنوں میں مضبوطی حادثہ کا اظہار کرتا ہے، اور انسان کی حادثہ کے اظہار کی ضرورت کو آزاد کرتا ہے.', 'so': 'Warqaddan wuxuu soo bandhigaa baaritaanka dhacdooyinka furan ee gudaha, qayb cusub oo ku saabsan arrimaha shaqada ka horeysa ee la xiriira meelaha la xadgudbay iyo dhibaatada dhacdooyinka. Ujeedadu waa in la ogaado dhacdooyin cayn kasta ah, iyadoo aan ku jirin deegaanka. Given the absence of training data, we propose a distant supervision method that is able to generate high-quality training data.  Isku isticmaalaya qofka dhacda oo si gacan ah loo xumeeyo sida standard dahab ah, imtixaankayada ayaa muujiya in kastoo aan la ilaalin toos, modelkuna wuxuu sameeyaa model ilaaliya. Taas waxaa loola jeedaa in ilaalinta fogu ay dareemeysaa in lagu ogaado dhacdooyinka dhacdooyinka ee gudaha kala duduwan, marka lagu baahdo baahida dhacdooyinka dadka.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats introducerar händelsedetektering med öppen domän, ett nytt paradigm för händelsedetektering för att hantera frågor om tidigare arbete med begränsade domäner och händelseanteckningar. Målet är att upptäcka alla typer av händelser oavsett domäner. Med tanke på avsaknaden av träningsdata föreslår vi en avlägsen handledningsmetod som kan generera högkvalitativa träningsdata. Med hjälp av en manuellt kommenterad händelsekorpus som guldstandard visar våra experiment att modellen trots ingen direkt övervakning överträffar övervakade modeller. Detta resultat indikerar att fjärrövervakningen möjliggör robust händelsedetektering inom olika områden, samtidigt som behovet av mänsklig notering av händelser undviks.', 'uz': "This paper introduces open-domain event detection, a new event detection paradigm to address issues of prior work on restricted domains and event annotation.  @ info: whatsthis Taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar mavjud emas, biz juda uzoq taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni yaratish mumkin. Ushbu hodisa qoʻlbola qoʻlbola qo'lbola qo'lbola ishlatiladi, bizning imtiyozlarimiz direktoriy boshqaruvchi bo'lmasa bo'lsa, model taʼminlovchi modellarni bajaradi. @ info", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này giới thiệu việc phát hiện sự kiện mở miền, một mô hình khám phá sự kiện mới để giải quyết các vấn đề về việc làm trước trên miền cấm và ghi chú sự kiện. Mục tiêu là phát hiện mọi loại sự kiện bất kể miền nào. Do không có dữ liệu về huấn luyện, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp giám sát xa xôi có thể tạo ra dữ liệu đào tạo chất lượng cao. Sử dụng một thực tế được ghi chú bằng tay như hệ thống vàng, thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy mặc dù không có sự giám sát trực tiếp, mẫu hoàn thiện các mô hình giám sát. Kết quả này cho thấy sự giám sát xa xôi giúp khả năng phát hiện sự kiện mạnh mẽ trong nhiều lĩnh vực khác nhau, nhưng cũng ngăn được sự chú ý của con người.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja otkrivanje događaja otvorenog domena, novu paradigmu otkrivanja događaja kako bi se riješio pitanja prethodnog rada o ograničenim domenama i annotaciji događaja. Cilj je otkrivanje svih vrsta događaja bez obzira na domene. S obzirom na nedostatak podataka o obuci, predlažemo daleku metodu nadzora koja može stvoriti podatke o kvalitetu obuke. Koristeći ručno annotirani korpus događaja kao zlatni standard, naši eksperimenti pokazuju da, uprkos direktnom nadzoru, model iznosi nadzorne modele. Ovaj rezultat ukazuje na to da udaljeni nadzor omogućava robotu otkrivanje događaja u različitim domenima, dok obnavlja potrebu za ljudskim oznakem događaja.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel introduceert gebeurtenisdetectie in open domein, een nieuw gebeurtenisdetectie paradigma om problemen aan te pakken van eerder werk aan beperkte domeinen en gebeurtenisannotatie. Het doel is om allerlei gebeurtenissen te detecteren, ongeacht domeinen. Gezien het ontbreken van trainingsgegevens, stellen we een remote supervisie methode voor die in staat is om hoogwaardige trainingsgegevens te genereren. Met behulp van een handmatig geannoteerd event corpus als gouden standaard, tonen onze experimenten aan dat het model ondanks geen directe supervisie beter presteert dan supervisored modellen. Dit resultaat geeft aan dat het toezicht op afstand robuuste gebeurtenisdetectie in verschillende domeinen mogelijk maakt, terwijl menselijke annotatie van gebeurtenissen overbodig is.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя откриване на събития с отворен домейн, нова парадигма за откриване на събития за решаване на проблеми от предишна работа по ограничени домейни и анотация на събития. Целта е да се открият всички видове събития, независимо от домейните. Предвид липсата на данни за обучение предлагаме метод за дистанционно наблюдение, който може да генерира висококачествени данни за обучение. Използвайки ръчно анотиран корпус от събития като златен стандарт, нашите експерименти показват, че въпреки липсата на пряк надзор моделът надминава надзорните модели. Този резултат показва, че дистанционното наблюдение позволява надеждно откриване на събития в различни области, като същевременно премахва необходимостта от човешко анотиране на събитията.', 'da': 'Denne artikel introducerer open-domain event detection, et nyt hændelsesdetekteringsparadigme til at løse problemer med tidligere arbejde på begrænsede domæner og hændelsesannotering. Målet er at registrere alle former for begivenheder uanset domæner. Da der ikke foreligger træningsdata, foreslår vi en fjerntilsynsmetode, der kan generere træningsdata af høj kvalitet. Ved hjælp af en manuelt kommenteret begivenhedskorpus som guldstandard viser vores eksperimenter, at selv om modellen ikke er direkte overvåget, overgår modellen overvågede modeller. Dette resultat indikerer, at fjernovervågningen muliggør robust hændelsesdetektering på forskellige områder, samtidig med at behovet for menneskelig notering af hændelser undgås.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag stellt Open-Domain Event Detection vor, ein neues Event Detection Paradigma, das Probleme früherer Arbeiten an eingeschränkten Domänen und Event Annotation adressiert. Ziel ist es, alle Arten von Ereignissen unabhängig von Domänen zu erkennen. Da Trainingsdaten fehlen, schlagen wir eine Fernüberwachungsmethode vor, die qualitativ hochwertige Trainingsdaten generieren kann. Mit Hilfe eines manuell annotierten Ereigniskorpus als Goldstandard zeigen unsere Experimente, dass das Modell trotz fehlender direkter Überwachung überwachte Modelle übertrifft. Dieses Ergebnis zeigt, dass die Fernüberwachung eine robuste Ereigniserkennung in verschiedenen Domänen ermöglicht und gleichzeitig die Notwendigkeit einer menschlichen Annotation von Ereignissen überflüssig macht.', 'ko': '본고는 개방역 이벤트 검측을 소개했는데 이것은 새로운 이벤트 검측 모델로 이전에 제한역과 이벤트 주석에 대한 업무 문제를 해결하는 데 사용되었다.대상은 도메인에 관계없이 모든 유형의 이벤트를 테스트하는 것입니다.훈련 데이터의 부족을 감안하여 우리는 고품질 훈련 데이터를 생성할 수 있는 원격 모니터링 방법을 제시했다.인공적으로 표시된 사건 자료 라이브러리를 금 기준으로 삼아 우리의 실험은 직접적인 감독이 없지만 이 모델이 감독 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.이 결과 원격 모니터링은 다양한 분야에서 건장한 사건 검측을 실현할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 사건에 대한 인공 주석의 필요도 피할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Kertas ini memperkenalkan deteksi peristiwa domain terbuka, paradigm a deteksi peristiwa baru untuk mengatasi masalah kerja sebelumnya pada domain terbatas dan anotasi peristiwa. The goal is to detect all kinds of events regardless of domains.  Karena tidak ada data pelatihan, kami mengusulkan metode pengawasan jauh yang mampu menghasilkan data pelatihan berkualitas tinggi. Menggunakan mayat peristiwa yang dicatat secara manual sebagai standar emas, eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa meskipun tidak ada pengawasan langsung, model melampaui model yang diawasi. Hasil ini menunjukkan bahwa pengawasan jauh memungkinkan deteksi peristiwa yang kuat di berbagai daerah, sementara menghilangkan kebutuhan untuk anotasi manusia peristiwa.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ کشف رویداد باز دامنی، پارادیگ شناسایی رویداد جدید را برای حل مشکلات پیشینیان کار در دامنهای محدود و اخطار رویداد معرفی می کند. هدف این است که همه نوع اتفاقات را بغیر از دامنه شناسایی کنیم. با وجود اینکه داده های آموزش وجود ندارد، ما یک روش نظارت دور را پیشنهاد می کنیم که می تواند داده های آموزش کیفیت بالا تولید کند. با استفاده از یک کورپوس رویداد با دستی به عنوان استاندارد طلا، آزمایش\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که با وجود هیچ نظارت مستقیم، مدل مدل\u200cهای مدل\u200cهای نظارت را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. این نتیجه نشان می\u200cدهد که بررسی دور به شناسایی حادثه\u200cهای قوی در مختلف منطقه\u200cها اجازه می\u200cدهد، در حالی که نیازی برای اظهار دادن حادثه\u200cهای انسان را آزاد می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz a çyk-domeny öňki işi çykarmak üçin açyk-domeny oýun keşfedilmesini, täze bir faýlyň keşfedilmesini çykar. Maşynyň bolup, alanlaryň gaýsyz bolmadyk ähli sanlary açmak. Maglumatlaryň ýok bolmadyklaryna görä, ýokary kaliteli eğitim maglumatlaryny döredip biljek ýokary uzyn bir supervisiň yöntemini teklip edýäris. El täsirli wajyp korpusyny altyn standart hökmünde ullanýarys, deneylerimiz düzgün nadirim ýok bolsaňyz, nusgasyň gözleýän nusgalary ýok edip bilmeýändigini görkez. Bu netijede, uzak goragynyň dürli ýerlerde ýigrenç hasaplamasyny mümkin edýändigini görkezýär.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha uchunguzi wa matukio ya wazi ya ndani, kitendo kipya cha kutambua matukio ya tukio ili kutatua masuala ya kawaida ya kazini katika maeneo vizuizini na matatizo ya tukio hilo. Lengo ni kutambua matukio yote bila kujali maeneo. Kutokana na kutokuwepo kwa takwimu za mafunzo, tunapendekeza njia ya ufuatiliaji wa mbali ambazo inaweza kutengeneza takwimu za mafunzo ya juu. Kwa kutumia vifaa vya tukio lililotangazwa kwa mikononi kama kiwango cha dhahabu, majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kwamba pamoja na kuwa hakuna ufuatiliaji wa moja kwa moja, mifano inaonyesha mifano inayofuatiliwa. Matokeo haya yanaonyesha kuwa uangalizi wa mbali unawezesha kutambua matukio ya ubaguzi katika maeneo mbalimbali, huku wakivutia haja ya kutangaza matukio ya binadamu.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet zbulimin e ngjarjeve në domeni të hapur, një paradigm ë të re zbulimi i ngjarjeve për të trajtuar çështjet e punës së mëparshme në domeni të kufizuar dhe anotacionin e ngjarjeve. Qëllimi është të zbulojmë të gjitha llojet e ngjarjeve pavarësisht nga domenat. Given the absence of training data, we propose a distant supervision method that is able to generate high-quality training data.  Duke përdorur një korpus ngjarjesh të anotuar manualisht si standard ari, eksperimentet tona tregojnë se pavarësisht nga asnjë mbikqyrje e drejtpërdrejtë, modeli ekziston mbi modelet e mbikqyrura. Ky rezultat tregon se mbikqyrja e largët lejon zbulimin e fortë të ngjarjeve në fusha të ndryshme, duke shmangur nevojën për anotacion njerëzor të ngjarjeve.', 'af': "Hierdie papier introduseer oop- domein gebeurtenis opmekaar, 'n nuwe gebeurtenis opmekaar paradigme na adres probleme van voorheede werk op beperkte domein en gebeurtenis opmerking. Die doel is om alle soorte gebeurtenis te ontdek ongeag van domeine. Giens die absence van onderwerp data, voorstel ons 'n afgeleë onderwerp metode wat in staat kan genereer hoë-kwaliteit onderwerp data. Die gebruik van 'n hand aangetelde gebeurtenis korpus as goud standaard, vertoon ons eksperimente dat, alhoewel geen direkte supervisie nie, die model uitvoer ondersoekte modele. Hierdie resultaat wys dat die afgeleë onderskyning sterkte gebeurtenis opdecking in verskeie domeine, terwyl die behoefte vir menslike annotasie van gebeurtenis obviaat.", 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የተከፈተ ዶሜን ሁኔታ ማግኘት፣ አዲስ ጉዳይ ማግኘት አዲስ ጉዳይ እና የተከለከለ አካባቢ ጉዳዮችን ለመጠቀም የሚችል ነው፡፡ ቦታ ከውይይቶች ቢሆን የዓይነቱ ሁኔታ ማግኘት ነው፡፡ የትምህርት ዳታዎችን ባይጎድል፣ የራቀ የጥሩ ትምህርት ዳታዎችን ለማፍጠር የሚችል የራቀ የጉዳይ መጠበቅ ሥርዓት እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ የግንኙነት ክፍል እንደ ወርቅ ድጋፍ በመጠቀም፣ ፈተናዎቻችን ቀጥተኛ ጉዳይ ምንም እንኳ ባይኖር ምሳሌው በተጠበቀው ሞዴላዎችን እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ ይሄ ፍሬው የሩቅ ጉዳይ የሰው ጉዳይ ማስታወቂያውን በተለየ አካባቢዎች ውስጥ እንዲያሳየው ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է բաց տիեզերքի իրադարձությունների հայտնաբերումը, նոր իրադարձությունների հայտնաբերման պարադիգմ, որպեսզի լուծվի նախկինում սահմանափակ տիեզերքների և իրադարձությունների նոտացիայի հարցերը: Նպատակն այն է, որ բացահայտենք բոլոր տեսակի իրադարձությունները անկախ տիեզերքից: Given the absence of training data, we propose a distant supervision method that is able to generate high-quality training data.  Օգտագործելով ձեռքով նկարագրված իրադարձությունների մարմինը որպես ոսկու ստանդարտ, մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ չնայած անմիջական վերահսկողության, մոդելը գերազանցում է վերահսկված մոդելները: Այս արդյունքը ցույց է տալիս, որ հեռավոր վերահսկողությունը հնարավորություն է տալիս ճշգրիտ իրադարձությունների հայտնաբերման տարբեր ոլորտներում, միաժամանակ խուսափելով իրադարձությունների մարդկային նշումների կարիքը:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt a çıq-domen olaraq keşfetməsini, əvvəlki işin çəkilməsi üçün yeni vaxt keşfetməsi paradigmi təşkil edir. Məqsəd hər cür olaraq domeinlərdən xəbərsiz keçirməkdir. Eğitimlik məlumatlarının yoxduğuna görə, yüksək kaliteli təhsil məlumatlarını ürəkləyə biləcək uzaq bir gözləmə metodu təklif edirik. Əlbəttə, təminatlarımız altın standartları olaraq, əlli təminatı korpusu ilə istifadə edirlər ki, düzgün təminatı olmadığı halda, modellər təminatılı modellərdən üstün deyildir. Bu nəticə göstərir ki, uzaq təhlükəsi müxtəlif sahələrdə möhkəm vaxt keşfini, insanların gələcəkləri təhlükəsizlərin ehtiyacını azaldırmağa imkan verir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা উন্মুক্ত ডোমেইন ইভেন্ট আবিষ্কার, একটি নতুন অনুষ্ঠান আবিষ্কার প্যারাডিম, যা সীমিত ডোমেইন এবং অনুষ্ঠানের বিষয়গু লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে ডোমেইনের ব্যাপারে সকল ধরনের ঘটনা সনাক্ত করা যায়। প্রশিক্ষণের অনুপস্থিতি দিয়ে আমরা দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণের পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করছি যা উচ্চমানের তথ্য তৈরি করতে সক্ষম। আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে সরাসরি পর্যবেক্ষন না হওয়া সত্ত্বেও, মডেলটি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা মডেলের দেখা যাচ্ছে। This result indicates that the distant supervision enables robust event detection in various domains, while obviating the need for human annotation of events.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja otkrivanje događaja otvorenog domena, paradigmu otkrivanja događaja za rješavanje pitanja prethodnog rada o ograničenim domenama i annotaciji događaja. Cilj je otkrivanje svih događaja bez obzira na domene. S obzirom na nedostatak podataka o obuci, predlažemo daleku metodu nadzora koja može stvoriti podatke o kvalitetu obuke. Koristeći ručno annotirani korpus događaja kao zlatni standard, naši eksperimenti pokazuju da, uprkos direktnom nadzoru, model iznosi nadzorne modele. Ovaj rezultat ukazuje na to da udaljeni nadzor omogućava robotu otkrivanje događaja u različitim domenima, dok obnavlja potrebu za ljudskim oznakem događaja.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje detekci událostí otevřené domény, nové paradigma detekce událostí, které řeší problémy předchozí práce na omezených doménách a anotaci událostí. Cílem je detekovat všechny druhy událostí bez ohledu na domény. Vzhledem k absenci tréninkových dat navrhujeme metodu vzdáleného dohledu, která je schopna generovat kvalitní tréninková data. Použitím manuálně anotovaného korpusu událostí jako zlatého standardu naše experimenty ukazují, že i přes žádný přímý dohled model překonává supervizorované modely. Tento výsledek naznačuje, že vzdálený dohled umožňuje robustní detekci událostí v různých doménách a zároveň eliminuje potřebu lidské anotace událostí.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustatakse avatud domeeni sündmuste tuvastamist, uut sündmuste tuvastamise paradigmat, mis käsitleb piiratud domeenide ja sündmuste annoteerimise varasemat tööd. Eesmärk on tuvastada igasuguseid sündmusi, olenemata domeenidest. Koolitusandmete puudumise tõttu pakume välja kaugjärelevalvemeetodi, mis suudab luua kvaliteetseid koolitusandmeid. Kasutades käsitsi annoteeritud sündmuskorpust kuldstandardina, näitavad meie eksperimendid, et vaatamata otsese järelevalve puudumisele on mudel üle kontrollitud mudelite. See tulemus näitab, et kaugjärelevalve võimaldab tugevat sündmuste tuvastamist erinevates valdkondades, vältides samas vajadust inimese sündmuste märgistamise järele.', 'ca': "Aquest article introdueix la detecció d'events en domini obert, un nou paradigm a de detecció d'events per abordar problemes de treball anterior en dominis restringits i anotació d'events. L'objectiu és detectar tot tipus d'esdeveniments independentment dels dominis. Tenint en compte l'absència de dades d'entrenament, proposem un mètode de supervisió remot capaç de generar dades d'entrenament d'alta qualitat. Utilitzant un corpus d'eventos anotats manualment com a estàndard d'or, els nostres experiments mostren que malgrat cap supervisió directa, el model supera els models supervisats. Aquest resultat indica que la supervisió remota permet la detecció robusta d'esdeveniments en diversos dominis, evitant la necessitat d'anotació humana d'esdeveniments.", 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittelee avoimen verkkotunnuksen tapahtumantunnistuksen, uuden tapahtumantunnistuksen paradigman, joka käsittelee aiemmin tehtyjä rajoitettuja verkkotunnuksia ja tapahtumamerkintöjä. Tavoitteena on tunnistaa kaikenlaisia tapahtumia verkkotunnuksista riippumatta. Koska koulutustietoja ei ole, ehdotamme etävalvontamenetelmää, joka pystyy tuottamaan korkealaatuista koulutustietoa. Käyttämällä kultastandardina manuaalisesti annotoitua tapahtumakorpusta kokeemme osoittavat, että suorasta valvonnasta huolimatta malli on tehokkaampi kuin valvotut mallit. Tämä tulos osoittaa, että etävalvonta mahdollistaa vahvan tapahtumantunnistuksen eri osa-alueilla, samalla kun vältetään inhimillisten tapahtumien merkitsemisen tarve.', 'jv': 'This paper Intruses open-domain events detection, a new events detection PATTIGM to Address bugs of previous job on limited domain and events anntations. goal is to detect all types of events Ingat nganggo data alêng Ngawe ngubah manut karo perusahaan dumadhi kaya ngono kuwi dianggawe dolanan ping gol, dadi sing perintah wong liyane kuwi nggawe nguasai perusahaan yèn, model kuwi ora bisa dianggawe model sing bisa nguasai. Pametuné iki diperaksi punika dipunangé awak dhéwé éntuk akeh perbudhakan sing gak nggawe winih, lan uwis seneng nggawe Kelangan Panjenengan langgar-awak dhéwé.', 'ha': "@ info Gani na gane duk nau'in al'amarin ko kuma ba da amfani ba. Gida ba ya kasancẽwa ga data na ƙidãya, sai muna buƙata wata metode mai nĩsa mai iya iya ƙiƙiro data masu tsari da sifati. Yi amfani da wani nau'in tukuka da aka yi zartar da hannuwansa kamar tsohon zĩnãriya, jarrabayarmu za'a nuna cewa, kuma kõ da ba wata tsarin shiryarwa ba, misalin yana samar da misãlai masu tsari. Wannan matsalar ta nuna cewa, suron nan da ke nĩsa yana iya amfani da gane surori masu cikin duk biyu, da kuma ana sami muhimmin zartar da surar mutum.", 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja odprto domeno za zaznavanje dogodkov, novo paradigmo za zaznavanje dogodkov, ki obravnava vprašanja predhodnega dela na omejenih domenah in označevanju dogodkov. Cilj je zaznati vse vrste dogodkov ne glede na domene. Zaradi pomanjkanja podatkov o usposabljanju predlagamo metodo nadzora na daljavo, ki lahko ustvari visokokakovostne podatke o usposabljanju. Z uporabo ročno označenega korpusa dogodkov kot zlatega standarda naši eksperimenti kažejo, da kljub neposrednemu nadzoru model presega nadzorovane modele. Ta rezultat kaže, da daljni nadzor omogoča robustno zaznavanje dogodkov na različnih področjih, hkrati pa preprečuje potrebo po človeškem označevanju dogodkov.', 'he': 'העבודה הזו מציגה זיהוי אירועים בתחום פתוח, פרדיגמה חדשה לזהות אירועים כדי לטפל בנושאים של עבודה קודמת על שטחים מוגבלים והציון אירועים. המטרה היא לגלות כל מיני אירועים ללא קשר לתחומים. Given the absence of training data, we propose a distant supervision method that is able to generate high-quality training data.  בשימוש של קורפוס אירועים שנכתב ידנית כסטנדרט זהב, הניסויים שלנו מראים שלמרות שאין פיקוח ישיר, המודל מפעיל מודלים מבוקשים. התוצאה הזו מצביעה על כך שהפיקוח הרחוק מאפשר לזהות אירועים חזקים בשטחים שונים, בזמן שמונחים את הצורך להציעה אנושית על אירועים.', 'bo': 'ཤོག དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་དྲ་ཁྲོད་མེད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡོངས་རེ་རྟོགས་བཤེར་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཐད་རིང་བའི་གསལ་བཤད་བྱས་པར་བརྗོད་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱིན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཞིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་ཚད་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་ཡོད་པའི་མིང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། བར་ཐག་རིང་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཁྱད་པར་བྱ་འགུལ་རྟོགས་པ་ཡིན་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Semi-Supervised Lexicon Learning for Wide-Coverage Semantic Parsing', 'ar': 'تعلم معجم شبه خاضع للإشراف للتحليل الدلالي واسع التغطية', 'fr': "Apprentissage semi-supervisé du lexique pour l'analyse sémantique à couverture étendue", 'pt': 'Aprendizado de léxico semi-supervisionado para análise semântica de ampla cobertura', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de léxico semisupervisado para un análisis semántico de amplia cobertura', 'zh': '以广覆盖语义解析半监词典学', 'ja': '広範囲セマンティック構文解析のための半監修型辞書学習', 'hi': 'व्यापक कवरेज शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग के लिए अर्ध पर्यवेक्षित शब्दकोश सीखना', 'ru': 'Полуконтролируемое изучение лексики для широкого семантического анализа', 'ga': 'Foclóir Leath-Maoirsithe le haghaidh Parsáil Shéimeantach le Clúdach Leathan', 'ka': 'სამხედვი დანახვა ლექსიკონის სწავლობა სიმპანტიკური განახლებისთვის', 'el': 'Ημι-εποπτευόμενη εκμάθηση λεξικού για τη σηματική ανάλυση ευρείας κάλυψης', 'hu': 'Félig felügyelt Lexikon Tanulás a széles körű szemantikus értelmezéshez', 'it': "Apprendimento lessico semi-supervisionato per un'analisi semantica a ampia copertura", 'kk': 'Жарым- бақылау лексикалық оқыту үшін жарым- бақылау жарым- бақылау', 'mk': 'Научување на полунадгледувани лексикони за семантично анализирање на широко покривање', 'ml': 'Semi-Supervised Lexicon Learning for Wide-Coverage Semantic Parsing', 'mn': 'Дөрвөн хэмжээний хэмжээний суралцах сэтгэл хөдлөл', 'mt': 'Tagħlim tal-Lexicon Semissorveljat għal Analiżi Semantika b’Kopertura wiesgħa', 'no': 'semioversikt leksjonslæring for breiddekkeområde semiantisk tolking', 'pl': 'Nauka leksykonów pół-nadzorowana dla szerokiego zasięgu analizy semantycznej', 'lt': 'Semi-Supervised Lexicon Learning for Wide-Coverage Semantic Parsing', 'ro': 'Învățare Lexicon semi-supravegheată pentru analizarea semantică pe scară largă', 'sr': 'Polovično nadgledano leksičko učenje za semantičko razmatranje širokog okruženja', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Lexikon Semi-Dijaga untuk Menghurai Semantik Penutup Lebar', 'si': 'විශාලය සමාන්තික විශාලනය සඳහා ලෙක්සිකෝන් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'so': 'Semi-Supervised Lexicon Learning for Wide-Coverage Semantic Parsing', 'sv': 'Halvövervakad Lexikoninlärning för semantisk tolkning med bred täckning', 'ta': 'அகலம்- உறைப்புகளுக்கான கற்றுக்கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பெமான்டிக் பாசிங்கு', 'ur': 'وسعت-Coverage Semantic Parsing کے لئے نصف-Supervised Lexicon Learning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kỹ thuật truyền hình trái phép', 'hr': 'Polovično nadgledano učenje leksičkog učenja za semantičko razmatranje širokog okruženja', 'da': 'Semi-supervised Lexicon Learning for bred dækning semantisk tolkning', 'bg': 'Полунадзорно обучение на лексикони за семантично анализиране с широко покритие', 'nl': 'Semi-supervised Lexicon Learning voor Semantische Parsing met brede dekking', 'id': 'Hali-Supervised Lexicon Learning for Wide-Coverage Semantic Parsing', 'de': 'Semi-Supervised Lexicon Learning für Semantisches Parsing mit breiter Abdeckung', 'fa': 'آموزش آموزش سکسیون نیم مراقبت برای بازرسی سطح پوشش گسترده', 'sw': 'Kipindi cha Semi kinachoendeshwa nchini Lexico Kujifunza kwa ajili ya Kuchapisha Ukanda', 'ko': '넓은 범위의 의미 분석을 위한 반감독 어휘 학습', 'sq': 'Gjysmë-mbikqyrur lexikon Mësim për analizimin Semantik të mbulesës së gjerë', 'am': 'ስሜኢ-አቀማመጥ Lexicon Learn for Wide-Coverage Semantic Parsing', 'hy': 'Լեքսիկոնի կես-վերահսկված ուսումնասիրությունը լայն ծածկում գտնվող սեմատիկ վերլուծության համար', 'tr': 'Üýtgedik Kalamlar', 'af': 'Semantiese verwerking', 'bs': 'Polovično nadzirano leksičko učenje za semantičko razmatranje širokog okruženja', 'cs': 'Semi-Supervised Lexikon Learning for Wide-Coverage Sémantic Parsing', 'ca': "Aprendència semisupervisada de Lexicòns per l'analització Semàtica d'Ampliació", 'az': 'Yarı-gözləyirli Lexicon Öyrənməsi geniş-Coverage Semantic Parsing üçün', 'bn': 'সেমি- সুপার্ভিস্ট লেক্সিকোন কাভারেজ সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং এর জন্য শিক্ষা শিক্ষা', 'et': 'Pooljärelevalvega leksikoni õppimine laiapõhjaliseks semantiliseks parsimiseks', 'fi': 'Semi-valvottu Lexicon Learning Laajan kattavuuden Semanttinen Parsing', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'לימוד לקסיקון חצי מושגת עבור בדיקת סמנטית מכסה רחבה', 'sk': 'Polnadzorovano učenje leksikonov za široko pokritost semantičnega razčlenjanja', 'jv': 'Leksion Learning for Wide-Coverage semianti-Parasing', 'bo': 'Semi-Supervised Lexicon Learning for Wide-Coverage Semantic Parsing'}
{'en': 'Semantic parsers critically rely on accurate and high-coverage lexicons. However, traditional semantic parsers usually utilize annotated logical forms to learn the lexicon, which often suffer from the lexicon coverage problem. In this paper, we propose a graph-based semi-supervised learning framework that makes use of large text corpora and lexical resources. This framework first constructs a graph with a phrase similarity model learned by utilizing many text corpora and lexical resources. Next, graph propagation algorithm identifies the label distribution of unlabeled phrases from labeled ones. We evaluate our approach on two benchmarks : Webquestions and Free917. The results show that, in both datasets, our method achieves substantial improvement when comparing to the base system that does not utilize the learned lexicon, and gains competitive results when comparing to state-of-the-art systems.', 'ar': 'تعتمد المحللون اللغويون بشكل حاسم على معاجم دقيقة وذات تغطية عالية. ومع ذلك ، فإن المحللات الدلالية التقليدية تستخدم عادةً الأشكال المنطقية المشروحة لتعلم المعجم ، والذي غالبًا ما يعاني من مشكلة تغطية المعجم. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إطارًا تعليميًا شبه خاضع للإشراف قائم على الرسم البياني يستفيد من نصوص كبيرة وموارد معجمية. يقوم هذا الإطار أولاً ببناء رسم بياني بنموذج تشابه العبارة الذي تم تعلمه من خلال استخدام العديد من المصادر النصية والمعاجمية. بعد ذلك ، تحدد خوارزمية انتشار الرسم البياني توزيع التسمية للعبارات غير المسماة من العبارات المصنفة. نقوم بتقييم نهجنا على أساس معيارين: Webquestions و Free917. تظهر النتائج أن طريقتنا ، في مجموعتي البيانات ، تحقق تحسنًا كبيرًا عند مقارنتها بالنظام الأساسي الذي لا يستخدم المعجم المكتسب ، وتحقق نتائج تنافسية عند مقارنتها بأحدث الأنظمة.', 'fr': "Les analyseurs sémantiques s'appuient de manière critique sur des lexiques précis et à couverture élevée. Cependant, les analyseurs sémantiques traditionnels utilisent généralement des formes logiques annotées pour apprendre le lexique, qui souffrent souvent du problème de couverture du lexique. Dans cet article, nous proposons un cadre d'apprentissage semi-supervisé basé sur des graphiques qui utilise des corpus de texte volumineux et des ressources lexicales. Ce framework construit d'abord un graphique avec un modèle de similarité de phrases appris en utilisant de nombreux corpus textuels et ressources lexicales. Ensuite, l'algorithme de propagation de graphe identifie la distribution des étiquettes des phrases non étiquetées à partir des phrases étiquetées Nous évaluons notre approche en fonction de deux critères\xa0: Webquestions et Free917. Les résultats montrent que, dans les deux ensembles de données, notre méthode obtient des améliorations substantielles par rapport au système de base qui n'utilise pas le lexique appris, et obtient des résultats compétitifs par rapport aux systèmes de pointe.", 'es': 'Los analizadores semánticos se basan de manera crítica en léxicos precisos y de alta cobertura. Sin embargo, los analizadores semánticos tradicionales suelen utilizar formas lógicas anotadas para aprender el léxico, que a menudo sufren el problema de la cobertura del léxico. En este artículo, proponemos un marco de aprendizaje semisupervisado basado en gráficos que utiliza corpus de texto grande y recursos léxicos. Este marco primero construye un gráfico con un modelo de similitud de frases que se aprende utilizando muchos corpus de texto y recursos léxicos. A continuación, el algoritmo de propagación de gráficos identifica la distribución de etiquetas de frases no etiquetadas de las etiquetadas. Evaluamos nuestro enfoque en dos puntos de referencia: Webquestions y Free917. Los resultados muestran que, en ambos conjuntos de datos, nuestro método logra una mejora sustancial en comparación con el sistema base que no utiliza el léxico aprendido, y obtiene resultados competitivos cuando se compara con los sistemas de última generación.', 'pt': 'Os analisadores semânticos dependem criticamente de léxicos precisos e de alta cobertura. No entanto, os analisadores semânticos tradicionais geralmente utilizam formas lógicas anotadas para aprender o léxico, que geralmente sofre com o problema de cobertura do léxico. Neste artigo, propomos um framework de aprendizado semi-supervisionado baseado em grafos que faz uso de grandes corpora de texto e recursos lexicais. Essa estrutura primeiro constrói um gráfico com um modelo de similaridade de frase aprendido utilizando muitos corpora de texto e recursos lexicais. Em seguida, o algoritmo de propagação de grafos identifica a distribuição de rótulos de frases não rotuladas a partir de frases rotuladas. Avaliamos nossa abordagem em dois benchmarks: Webquestions e Free917. Os resultados mostram que, em ambos os conjuntos de dados, nosso método alcança uma melhora substancial quando comparado ao sistema base que não utiliza o léxico aprendido, e ganha resultados competitivos quando comparado a sistemas de última geração.', 'zh': '语义解析器甚赖正覆盖率之词典。 然旧语义解析器常用带注逻辑以学词典,此常困于词典也。 于本文中,图形半监学框架,宜框架用大语料库、词汇资。 其框架首用诸文本语料库与词汇资学者短语相似性为图形。 接下,图形传算法从标记的短语中识识未标记短语的标签分布。 余以两准测之:Webquestions、Free917。 结果表明二数集,比于不用学词典之本统,吾道皆得实质性改,而与先进之统相比,有竞争力之效矣。', 'ja': 'セマンティックパーサーは、正確でカバレッジの高い辞書に批判的に依存しています。しかしながら、従来の意味論的構文解析器は、通常、語彙カバレッジの問題に苦しむことが多い語彙を学習するために注釈付き論理形式を利用する。本稿では，大規模なテキストコーパスと語彙リソースを活用したグラフベースの半監督学習フレームワークを提案する．このフレームワークは、まず、多くのテキストコーパスと語彙リソースを利用して学習されたフレーズ類似性モデルを使用してグラフを構築します。次に、グラフ伝播アルゴリズムは、ラベル付けされたものからラベル付けされていないフレーズのラベル分布を識別する。私たちは、WebquestionsとFree 917という2つのベンチマークでアプローチを評価します。その結果、両方のデータセットにおいて、我々の方法は、学習された語彙を利用しないベースシステムと比較した場合に実質的な改善を達成し、最先端のシステムと比較した場合に競争的な結果を得ることが示された。', 'hi': 'सिमेंटिक पार्सर गंभीर रूप से सटीक और उच्च-कवरेज शब्दकोशों पर भरोसा करते हैं। हालांकि, पारंपरिक शब्दार्थ पार्सर आमतौर पर शब्दकोश सीखने के लिए एनोटेट तार्किक रूपों का उपयोग करते हैं, जो अक्सर शब्दकोश कवरेज समस्या से पीड़ित होते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक ग्राफ-आधारित अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो बड़े पाठ निगम और लेक्सिकल संसाधनों का उपयोग करता है। यह ढांचा पहले एक वाक्यांश समानता मॉडल के साथ एक ग्राफ का निर्माण करता है जो कई पाठ कॉर्पोरेट और लेक्सिकल संसाधनों का उपयोग करके सीखा जाता है। अगला, ग्राफ प्रोपेगेशन एल्गोरिथ्म लेबल वाले लोगों से बिना लेबल वाले वाक्यांशों के लेबल वितरण की पहचान करता है। हम दो बेंचमार्क पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं: Webquestions और Free917। परिणाम बताते हैं कि, दोनों डेटासेट में, हमारी विधि आधार प्रणाली की तुलना करते समय पर्याप्त सुधार प्राप्त करती है जो सीखा शब्दकोश का उपयोग नहीं करती है, और अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों की तुलना करते समय प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त करती है।', 'ru': 'Семантические парсеры критически полагаются на точные и высокопокрытые лексиконы. Тем не менее, традиционные семантические парсеры обычно используют аннотированные логические формы для изучения лексикона, которые часто страдают от проблемы с охватом лексики. В этой статье мы предлагаем основанный на графе полунаблюдаемый обучающий фреймворк, который использует большие текстовые корпуса и лексические ресурсы. Эта структура сначала строит график с моделью сходства фраз, изученной с использованием многих текстовых корпусов и лексических ресурсов. Далее алгоритм распространения графа идентифицирует распределение меток немаркированных фраз от маркированных. Мы оцениваем наш подход по двум критериям: Webquestions и Free917. Результаты показывают, что в обоих наборах данных наш метод достигает существенного улучшения при сравнении с базовой системой, которая не использует изученный лексикон, и получает конкурентные результаты при сравнении с современными системами.', 'ga': 'Braitheann parsálaithe shéimeantacha go criticiúil ar fhoclóirí cruinne agus ardchlúdaigh. Mar sin féin, is gnách go n-úsáideann parsálaithe shéimeantacha traidisiúnta foirmeacha loighciúla anótáilte chun an foclóir a fhoghlaim, a mbíonn fadhb an chlúdaigh fhoclóra ag baint leo go minic. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid creat foghlama leath-mhaoirseachta bunaithe ar ghraif a bhaineann úsáid as acmhainní móra corpra téacs agus foclóireachta. Tógann an creat seo graf ar dtús le múnla cosúlachta frása a foghlaimíodh trí úsáid a bhaint as go leor acmhainní corpora agus foclóireachta téacs. Ansin, sainaithníonn algartam iomadaithe graf dáileadh lipéad frásaí gan lipéad ó na cinn lipéadaithe. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár gcur chuige ar dhá thagarmharc: Webquestions agus Free917. Léiríonn na torthaí go mbaineann ár modh, sa dá thacar sonraí, feabhas suntasach amach nuair a dhéantar comparáid leis an mbunchóras nach n-úsáideann an foclóir foghlamtha, agus go ngnóthaítear torthaí iomaíocha nuair a dhéantar comparáid le córais den scoth.', 'ka': 'Semantic parsers critically rely on accurate and high-coverage lexicons. მაგრამ, ტრადიციონალური სემონტიკური პარასერები უბრალოდ გამოიყენებენ ანოტიკური ლოგიკური ფორმები, რომლებიც ბევრად ლექსიკონის გადაკვირთის პრობლ ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომებით დავუყვებით ნახევარჯერი სწავლების ფრამეტრი, რომელიც დიდი ტექსტის კოპორა და ლექსიკალური რესურსების გამოყენება. ეს ფრამეტრი პირველი შექმნა გრაფიკას, რომელიც ფრამეტს სხვადასხვა მოდელს, რომელიც მოსწავლია, რამდენიმე ტექსტის კოპორა და ლექსიკალური რესურ შემდეგ, გრაფიკის პროპაგიაციის ალგორიტიმი განსაზღვრდება, რომელიც ნიშნავულებიდან არაფერი ფრაზების გაყოფილება. ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგრამის შესახებ ორი ბანქმარკის შესახებ: Webquestions და Free917. წარმოდგენები გამოჩნდა, რომ ორივე მონაცემების კონფიგური წარმოდგენა ჩვენი მეთოდი, როდესაც ბაზის სისტემის შემდგენება, რომელიც არ გამოყენებს მონაცემებული ლექქსიკონის და კონფიგური წარმო', 'it': "I parser semantici si basano criticamente su lessici accurati e ad alta copertura. Tuttavia, i parser semantici tradizionali di solito utilizzano forme logiche annotate per imparare il lessico, che spesso soffrono del problema di copertura del lessico. In questo articolo, proponiamo un framework di apprendimento semi-supervisionato basato su grafici che fa uso di grandi corpora di testo e risorse lessicali. Questo framework per prima cosa costruisce un grafico con un modello di somiglianza delle frasi imparato utilizzando molte corpora di testo e risorse lessicali. Successivamente, l'algoritmo di propagazione del grafico identifica la distribuzione dell'etichetta delle frasi non etichettate da quelle etichettate. Valutiamo il nostro approccio su due parametri di riferimento: Webquestions e Free917. I risultati mostrano che, in entrambi i set di dati, il nostro metodo raggiunge un miglioramento sostanziale rispetto al sistema base che non utilizza il lessico appreso, e ottiene risultati competitivi rispetto a sistemi all'avanguardia.", 'hu': 'A szemantikus elemzők kritikusan támaszkodnak a pontos és nagy lefedettségű lexikonokra. A hagyományos szemantikai elemzők azonban általában jegyzetelt logikai formákat használnak a lexikon tanulására, amelyek gyakran szenvednek a lexikon lefedettségi problémától. Ebben a tanulmányban egy grafikon alapú, félig felügyelt tanulási keretrendszert javasolunk, amely nagy szövegcorporákat és lexikai erőforrásokat használ fel. Ez a keretrendszer először egy grafikont épít fel, amelyet számos szövegkorpus és lexikai erőforrás felhasználásával tanultak meg. Ezután a gráf terjesztési algoritmus azonosítja a címke nélküli kifejezések címkeloszlását a címkézettől. A megközelítésünket két referenciaérték alapján értékeljük: Webquestions és Free917. Az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk mindkét adatkészletben jelentős javulást ér el a tanult lexikont nem használó alaprendszerhez képest, és versenyképes eredményeket ér el a korszerű rendszerekhez képest.', 'el': 'Οι σημειακοί αναλυτές βασίζονται σε ακριβή λεξικά υψηλής κάλυψης. Ωστόσο, οι παραδοσιακοί σημασιολογικοί αναλυτές χρησιμοποιούν συνήθως σχολιασμένες λογικές μορφές για να μάθουν το λεξικό, το οποίο συχνά υποφέρει από το πρόβλημα κάλυψης λεξικού. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο ημι-εποπτευόμενης μάθησης βασισμένο σε γραφήματα που χρησιμοποιεί μεγάλα σώματα κειμένου και λεξικούς πόρους. Αυτό το πλαίσιο κατασκευάζει πρώτα ένα γράφημα με ένα μοντέλο ομοιότητας φράσεων που έμαθε χρησιμοποιώντας πολλά σώματα κειμένου και λεξικούς πόρους. Στη συνέχεια, ο αλγόριθμος διάδοσης γραφήματος προσδιορίζει τη διανομή ετικετών από φράσεις χωρίς ετικέτα. Αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας σε δύο σημεία αναφοράς: και Free917. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι και στα δύο σύνολα δεδομένων η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει ουσιαστική βελτίωση σε σύγκριση με το βασικό σύστημα που δεν χρησιμοποιεί το μαθημένο λεξικό και κερδίζει ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα σε σύγκριση με συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'kk': 'Semantic parsers critically rely on accurate and high coverage lexicons. Бірақ әдеттегі семантикалық талдаушылар әдетте лексиканы оқыту үшін логикалық пішімдерді қолданады. Бұл лексикан мәселесінен көбірек болады. Бұл қағазда, график негіздеген жарты бақылау бағдарламасын қолданатын үлкен мәтін корпора мен лексикалық ресурстарды қолданатын. Бұл фрейм біріншіден бірнеше мәтін корпора мен лексикалық ресурстарды қолдану арқылы оқылған фрейздік ұқсас үлгісімен графикті құрады. Келесі, график пропагациясы алгоритмі жарлық мәтіндердің үлестірімін анықтайды. Біз өзіміздің тәсілімізді екі бағыттау белгілерінде оценивамыз: Веб сұрақтары мен Free917. Нәтижелер екі деректер қорларында біздің әдіміміз үйренілмеген лексикон жүйесіне салыстыратын негізгі жүйесіне көп жақсартылып, әртүрлі жүйелерді салыстырып, әртүрлі нәтижелерді жеткізеді.', 'mk': 'Семантичките анализатори критично се потпираат на точни и високопокриени лексикони. Сепак, традиционалните семантични анализатори обично користат анотирани логични форми за да го научат лексиконот, кој честопати страдаат од проблемот со покривањето на лексиконите. Во овој весник предложуваме графска полунадгледувана рамка за учење која користи големи текстови корпора и лексикални ресурси. Оваа рамка прво конструира граф со модел на сличност на фразите научен со користење на многу текстови корпора и лексикални ресурси. Next, graph propagation algorithm identifies the label distribution of unlabeled phrases from labeled ones.  Го проценуваме нашиот пристап на два референтни значки: веб прашања и Free917. Резултатите покажуваат дека во двата податоци нашиот метод постигнува значително подобрување во споредба со базичкиот систем кој не го користи научениот лексикон и добива конкурентни резултати во споредба со најсовремените системи.', 'ms': 'Semantic parsers critically rely on accurate and high-coverage lexicons.  Namun, penghurai semantik tradisional biasanya menggunakan bentuk logik anotasi untuk belajar leksikon, yang sering menderita masalah penyamaran leksikon. Dalam kertas ini, kami melamar kerangka pembelajaran setengah diawasi berdasarkan graf yang menggunakan korpra teks besar dan sumber leksikal. kerangka ini pertama-tama membina graf dengan model persamaan frasa yang belajar dengan menggunakan banyak korpra teks dan sumber leksikal. Seterusnya, algoritma penjelasan graf mengenalpasti distribusi label frasa yang tidak ditabel dari frasa yang ditabel. Kami menilai pendekatan kita pada dua tanda referensi: soalan web dan Free917. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa, dalam kedua-dua set data, kaedah kita mencapai peningkatan yang besar apabila dibandingkan dengan sistem asas yang tidak menggunakan leksikon belajar, dan mendapat keputusan kompetitif apabila dibandingkan dengan sistem terbaik.', 'lt': 'Semantiniai analizatoriai kritiškai remiasi tiksliais ir aukštos apimties leksikonais. However, traditional semantic parsers usually utilize annotated logical forms to learn the lexicon, which often suffer from the lexicon coverage problem.  Šiame dokumente siūlome grafiniu pagrindu pagrįstą pusiau prižiūrimą mokymosi sistemą, kurioje naudojami dideli tekstiniai korporai ir leksiniai ištekliai. Ši sistema pirmiausia sukuria grafiką su frazės panašumo modeliu, įgytu naudojant daug tekstinių korprų ir leksinių išteklių. Toliau grafiko dauginimo algoritme nurodomas žymėtų frazių etiketės pasiskirstymas. Vertiname savo požiūrį pagal du kriterijus: internetinius klausimus ir Free917. Rezultatai rodo, kad abiejuose duomenų rinkiniuose mūsų metodas gerokai pagerina palyginti su bazine sistema, kuri nenaudoja mokomojo leksikono, ir gauna konkurencinius rezultatus palyginti su naujausiomis sistemomis.', 'mn': 'Semantic parsers critically rely on accurate and high-coverage lexicons. Гэвч уламжлалтай семантик судлаачид лексикон суралцах боломжтой логик хэлбэрийг ашигладаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид график дээр сургалтын хагас дамжуулагдсан сургалтын хөрөнгө оруулж, том текст корпора болон лексик нөөц ашигладаг. Эхлээд энэ хэлбэр нь олон текст корпора болон лексик нөөц ашиглаж сурсан хэлбэртэй адилхан хэлбэртэй график бүтээж байна. Дараагийн график дэвшүүлэлтийн алгоритм нь нэрлэгдсэн үг биш гэсэн үг хуваалцааныг тодорхойлдог. Бид хоёр салбарын аргыг үнэлдэг: Веб асуулт, Free917. Үүний үр дүнд бидний арга нь сурсан лексикон ашиглахгүй суурь системтэй харьцуулахад, урлагийн системтэй харьцуулахад өрсөлдөг үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസര്\u200dമാര്\u200d വിശേഷിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് കൃത്യമായും ഉയരത്തിലുള്ള ലെക്സിക്ക എന്നാലും പാര്\u200dസറുകള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി സാധാരണമായി ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d രൂപങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് പ്രാവശ്യം ല ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നിരീക്ഷിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സെമി-നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട പഠിക ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് ആദ്യം ഒരു വാക്ക് തുല്യമായ മോഡലുമായി ഒരു ഗ്രാഫ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ധാരാളം ടെക്സ്റ്റ് കോര്\u200dപ്പോര അടുത്ത ഗ്രാഫ് പ്രൊപ്പഗ്രാപ്പ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം ലേബിള്\u200d വിതരണം നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു രണ്ടു ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സാധ്യത നമ്മള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു: വെബ്ചില്\u200d ചോദ്യങ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലും, പഠിച്ച ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാത്ത ബേസ് സിസ്റ്റത്തോട് മാറ്റുമ്പോള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d വളരെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്', 'ro': 'Analizoarele semantice se bazează critic pe lexicoane precise și cu acoperire ridicată. Cu toate acestea, parserii semantici tradiționali folosesc de obicei forme logice adnotate pentru a învăța lexiconul, care suferă adesea de problema acoperirii lexiconului. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru de învățare semi-supravegheat bazat pe grafice, care utilizează corpuri mari de text și resurse lexicale. Acest cadru construiește mai întâi un grafic cu un model de similitudine a frazelor învățat prin utilizarea multor corpuri de text și resurse lexicale. Apoi, algoritmul de propagare a graficului identifică distribuția etichetelor frazelor fără etichete de la cele etichetate. Evaluăm abordarea noastră pe două criterii de referință: Webquestions și Free917. Rezultatele arată că, în ambele seturi de date, metoda noastră obține îmbunătățiri substanțiale în comparație cu sistemul de bază care nu utilizează lexiconul învățat și obține rezultate competitive în comparație cu sistemele de ultimă generație.', 'no': 'Semantiske tolkarar brukar kritisk på nøyaktige og høg dekkefølgje. Men tradisjonelle semantiske tolkarne brukar vanlegvis merke logiske skjemar for å lære leksikonet, som ofte kjører frå problemet med dekkeomslag av leksikonet. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit grafikkbasert semioversikt læringsrammeverk som gjer bruk av store tekstkorporar og leksiske ressursar. Dette rammeverket konstruerer først eit graf med eit modell som er lært med å bruka mange tekstkorporar og leksiske ressursar. Neste er grafikkpropagasjonsalgoritmen identifisert merkelappdelinga av ubemerkte frasar frå merkelappene. Vi evaluerer tilnærming vårt på to benchmarker: Webspørsmål og Free917. Resultatet viser at metoden vårt når det sammenlignar med basesystemet som ikkje brukar lærte leksikon, i begge datasett, får konkurrentiv resultat når det sammenlignar med kunstsystemet.', 'sr': 'Semantički parseri se kritično oslanjaju na tačne i visoke leksije. Međutim, tradicionalni semantički parseri obično koriste annotirane logičke forme da nauče leksikon, koji često pati od problema sa prekrivanjem leksikona. U ovom papiru predlažemo polu-nadzorni okvir učenja koji koristi velike tekstske korporacije i leksičke resurse. Ovaj okvir prvo konstruuje grafik sa model sličnosti fraze naučenim korištenjem mnogih tekstskih korporacija i leksičkih resursa. Sledeće, algoritam propagacije grafika identifikuje distribuciju etiketa neoznačenih fraza iz etiketiranih. Procjenjujemo naš pristup na dva kritika: Web pitanja i Free917. Rezultati pokazuju da, u oba seta podataka, naša metoda postiže značajno poboljšanje u usporedbi sa baznom sistemom koji ne koristi naučeni leksikon, i dobija konkurentne rezultate u usporedbi sa državnim umjetničkim sistemima.', 'pl': 'Parsery semantyczne krytycznie opierają się na dokładnych i wysokim zasięgu leksykonach. Jednak tradycyjne parsery semantyczne zwykle używają adnotacji form logicznych do nauki leksykonu, który często cierpi z powodu problemu pokrycia leksykonu. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy pół-nadzorowany system uczenia się oparty na wykresie, który wykorzystuje duże korpusy tekstowe i zasoby leksykalne. Ten framework najpierw konstruuje wykres z modelem podobieństwa fraz nauczonym przez wykorzystanie wielu korpusów tekstowych i zasobów leksykalnych. Następnie algorytm propagacji wykresu identyfikuje rozkład etykiet nieoznakowanych fraz z etykietowanych. Nasze podejście oceniamy na podstawie dwóch punktów odniesienia: Webquestions i Free917. Wyniki pokazują, że w obu zbiorach danych nasza metoda osiąga znaczną poprawę w porównaniu z systemem bazowym, który nie wykorzystuje nauczonego leksykonu, a osiąga konkurencyjne wyniki w porównaniu z najnowocześniejszymi systemami.', 'sv': 'Semantiska tolkare förlitar sig kritiskt på korrekta och heltäckande lexikon. Traditionella semantiska tolkare använder vanligtvis kommenterade logiska former för att lära sig lexikonet, som ofta lider av lexikontäckningsproblemet. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett grafbaserat semi-övervakat lärramverk som utnyttjar stora textkorpor och lexikala resurser. Detta ramverk konstruerar först en graf med en frasliknande modell som lärts genom att använda många textkorpor och lexikala resurser. Därefter identifierar grafförökningsalgoritmen etikettfördelningen av omärkta fraser från märkta fraser. Vi utvärderar vårt tillvägagångssätt utifrån två riktmärken: Webquestions och Free917. Resultaten visar att vår metod, i båda datauppsättningarna, uppnår betydande förbättringar jämfört med det bassystem som inte utnyttjar det lärda lexikonet, och får konkurrenskraftiga resultat vid jämförelse med state-of-the-art system.', 'ta': 'செமான்டிக் பார்சர்கள் சரியான மற்றும் அதிக மறைக்கப்பட்ட லெக்சிக்ஸின் மீது சார்ந்திருக்கிறது. ஆனாலும், மரபார்ந்த அரை பார்ச்சர்கள் வழக்கமாக அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட தொழில்நுட்பமான வடிவங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, லெக்சிக்சன் மறைப்பு பி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வரைப்படத்திலான பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட கற்றுப்பாட்டு சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பெரிய உரை  இந்த சட்டம் முதலில் ஒரு சொற்றொடர் ஒத்த மாதிரியை உருவாக்குகிறது பல உரை நிறுவனம் மற்றும் லெக்சிக்சியல் மூலங்களை பயன்படுத் அடுத்த வரைப்படத்தின் விரிவாக்கத்தின் பட்டியலை குறிப்பிடாத சொற்களில் இருந்து விளக்கச்சீட்டை குறிப்பிடு நாம் இரண்டு பெங்குருக்கள் மீது எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம்: வலை கேள்விகள் மற்றும் Free917 @ info', 'mt': 'Semantic parsers critically rely on accurate and high-coverage lexicons.  However, traditional semantic parsers usually utilize annotated logical forms to learn the lexicon, which often suffer from the lexicon coverage problem.  F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu qafas ta’ tagħlim semisuperviż ibbażat fuq il-grafika li jagħmel użu minn korpora kbira tat-test u riżorsi lexiċi. Dan il-qafas l-ewwel jibni graff b’mudell ta’ similarità ta’ frażi li jitgħallem bl-użu ta’ ħafna korporazzjonijiet tat-test u riżorsi lexiċi. Wara, l-algoritmu ta’ propagazzjoni tal-graff jidentifika d-distribuzzjoni tat-tikketta ta’ frażijiet mhux ittikkettati minn frażijiet ittikkettati. We evaluate our approach on two benchmarks: Webquestions and Free917.  Ir-riżultati juru li, fiż-żewġ settijiet tad-dejta, il-metodu tagħna jikseb titjib sostanzjali meta mqabbel mas-sistema bażi li ma tużax il-lexicon imgħallem, u jikseb riżultati kompetittivi meta mqabbel mas-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්වාසකයෝ විශ්වාසයෙන් සිද්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා හරියට සහ උපරික්ෂාව ප්\u200dරත නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dය සෙමැන්ටික් පරීක්ෂකයෝ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලෙක්සිකෝන් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dර මේ පත්තරේ අපි ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත අධාරිත අධාරිත අධාරිත අධාරිත ප්\u200dරකාරයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් පැත් මේ මුලින්ම ප්\u200dරකාරයක් ප්\u200dරකාරයක් හරියට ප්\u200dරකාරයක් අනුවෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්තා ප්\u200dරකාරයක් සහ ලෙක්සිකාලික ස ඊළඟ, ග්\u200dරාෆ් ප්\u200dරවේශනය ඇල්ගෝරිතම් ලේබල් විතරය ලේබල් විතරය ලේබල් විතරය ලබාගන්නවා. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් වෙනුවෙන් අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්වාස කරනවා: වෙබ් ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ ෆ්\u200dරි917. ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය, දෙන්නම් දත්ත සැට් වලින්, අපේ විධානය සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා ම', 'so': "Baaritaanka sinaantu waxay si muhiim ah ugu xiran yihiin leksisiyada saxda ah iyo kuwa sareeya. Si kastaba ha ahaatee baaritaanka caadiga ah waxay inta badan isticmaalaan noocyada caadiga ah si ay u barto leksikanka, taas oo inta badan dhibaatada daboolka leksikanka ku jirta. Warqaddan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal waxbarasho oo lagu ilaaliyey sawir, kaasoo isticmaalaya shirkado faro badan iyo hanti leksis ah. Shaqooyinkan marka ugu horeysa wuxuu dhisaa maamul la mid ah oo ku qoray tusaale siman oo lagu baray isticmaalka shirkado badan oo qoraal ah iyo suurooyin leksikal ah. Agoritka aqoonsiga ee xarafka waxaa lagu qoray qaybinta labo la'aan oo laga qoray. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa qaabilaadeenna ku qoran labada qoraal: Internetka iyo Free917. The results show that, in both datasets, our method achieves substantial improvement when comparing to the base system that does not utilize the learned lexicon, and gains competitive results when comparing to state-of-the-art systems.", 'ur': 'سیمنٹی پارچر دقیق اور بلند پورچر لکسانوں پر اعتماد کرتے ہیں. اگرچہ، سنتی سیمنٹی پارسر معمولاً لکسیون کو سیکھنے کے لئے منطقی فرموں کا استعمال کرتا ہے، جو اکثر لکسیون کاوٹ مشکل سے رنج لگتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک گراف بنیادی نصف نظارت کی تعلیم فرمیک پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو بڑے ٹیکسٹ کورپورا اور لکسیکل سراسروں سے استعمال کرتا ہے۔ یہ چوکاٹ پہلے ایک گراف بناتا ہے جو ایک فریز مثالی موڈل کے ساتھ سکھایا گیا ہے اور بہت سی ٹیکسٹ کورپورا اور لکسیکل سراسروں کا استعمال کرتا ہے۔ آگے، گراف پراگاشن الگوریٹم لیبل کے بغیرقابل فریزوں کی تقسیم کو پہچان دیتا ہے. ہم دوسرے بنچم مارک پر اپنے طریقے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں: وب سوال اور فری 917۔ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ دونوں ڈاٹ سٹ میں ہمارا طریقہ بہت اچھا سوداگری حاصل کرتا ہے جب بنسٹ سٹم سے مقایسہ کرتا ہے جو علم لیکسون کو استعمال نہیں کرتا اور جب آرت سیستم سے مقایسہ کرتا ہے تو مسابقات نتائج حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Semantik parkerlari muhim toʻgʻri va eng yuqori leksikalarga ishlatadi. However, traditional semantic parsers usually utilize annotated logical forms to learn the lexicon, which often suffer from the lexicon coverage problem.  Bu qogʻozda biz katta matn kompaniya va leksikal rasmlarni ishlatish uchun grafik asosida o'rganilgan semi-o'rganish freymini talab qilamiz. Name Keyingi grafik propaganda algorithi yordamida lab boʻlmagan soʻzlar tarqatishi yorliqni aniqlaydi. Biz ikki sahifa qo'llanmizni qiymatimiz: Web savollari va Free917. Natijalar ikkita maʼlumotlar tarkibida, bizning usuli o'rganilgan leksisini ishlatilmagan asosiy tizimga kamaytirish mumkin va o'rganilgan shaxsiy tizim tizimga murojaat qilayotganda rivojlanish natijalarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Các phân tích trung học dựa hoàn toàn vào ngôn ngữ chính xác. Tuy nhiên, các phân tích mẫu giáo truyền thống thường sử dụng các dạng logic được ghi chú để học ngôn ngữ, mà thường phải chịu đựng vấn đề che đậy từ ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống dạy mẫu theo đồ thị dựa trên đồ thị, sử dụng các nguồn văn bản lớn bằng cơ bản và từ ngữ. Bộ khung này đầu tiên xây dựng một đồ thị có mô hình nét giống cụm từ được học bằng cách sử dụng nhiều văn bản cơ thể và tài nguyên văn bản. Tiếp theo, thuật toán phân tán đồ thị xác định tỷ lệ hiệu suất đoạn văn không được dán trên nhãn. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi dựa trên hai tiêu chuẩn: Kết quả cho thấy, trong cả hai bộ dữ liệu, phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được sự cải thiện đáng kể khi so sánh với hệ thống cơ bản không sử dụng ngôn ngữ học, và đạt được kết quả cạnh tranh khi so sánh với hệ thống hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Семантичните анализатори критично разчитат на точни и с високо покритие лексикони. Въпреки това, традиционните семантични анализатори обикновено използват анотирани логически форми, за да научат лексикона, които често страдат от проблема с лексиконното покритие. В настоящата статия предлагаме графична рамка за полунадзорно обучение, която използва големи текстови корпуси и лексикални ресурси. Тази рамка първо конструира графика с модел на сходство на фразите, научен чрез използване на много текстови корпуси и лексикални ресурси. След това алгоритъмът за разпространение на графики идентифицира разпределението на етикетите на неетикетирани фрази от етикетирани такива. Оценяваме подхода си на две показатели: Уебвъпроси и Фрий917. Резултатите показват, че и в двата набора от данни методът ни постига значително подобрение в сравнение с базовата система, която не използва научения лексикон, и печели конкурентни резултати в сравнение с най-съвременните системи.', 'da': 'Semantiske fortolkere er kritisk afhængige af nøjagtige og højt dækkende leksikoner. Men traditionelle semantiske fortolkere bruger normalt annoterede logiske former til at lære leksikonen, som ofte lider af leksikondækningsproblemet. I denne artikel foreslår vi en grafbaseret semi-overvåget læringsramme, der gør brug af store tekstkorpora og leksikalske ressourcer. Denne ramme konstruerer først en graf med en sætning lighedsmodel lært ved at bruge mange tekstkorpora og leksikalske ressourcer. Dernæst identificerer grafformeringsalgoritmen etiketfordelingen af ikke-mærkede sætninger fra mærkede sætninger. Vi evaluerer vores tilgang ud fra to benchmarks: Webquestions og Free917. Resultaterne viser, at vores metode i begge datasæt opnår betydelige forbedringer i forhold til basissystemet, der ikke udnytter det lærte leksikon, og opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater i forhold til state-of-the-art systemer.', 'nl': 'Semantische parsers vertrouwen kritisch op nauwkeurige lexicons met een hoge dekking. Traditionele semantische parsers gebruiken echter meestal geanotateerde logische vormen om het lexicon te leren, die vaak lijden aan het probleem van de lexicon dekking. In dit artikel stellen we een grafiekgebaseerd semi-supervised leerframework voor dat gebruik maakt van grote tekstcorpora en lexicale bronnen. Dit framework construeert eerst een grafiek met een frase similarity model geleerd door gebruik te maken van veel tekstcorpora en lexicale bronnen. Vervolgens identificeert het algoritme voor grafiekpropagatie de labelverdeling van niet-gelabelde zinnen van gelabelde zinnen. We evalueren onze aanpak op twee benchmarks: Webquestions en Free917. De resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode in beide datasets aanzienlijke verbeteringen bereikt in vergelijking met het basissysteem dat geen gebruik maakt van het geleerde lexicon, en concurrerende resultaten behaalt in vergelijking met state-of-the-art systemen.', 'hr': 'Semantički analitičari kritično se oslanjaju na tačne i visokopokrivene leksije. Međutim, tradicionalni semantički analitičari obično koriste annotirane logičke oblike kako bi naučili leksikon, koji često pati od problema sa prekrivanjem leksikona. U ovom papiru predlažemo polu-nadzorni okvir učenja koji koristi velike tekstske korporacije i leksičke resurse. Ovaj okvir prvo konstruira grafik sa model sličnosti fraze naučenim koristeći mnoge tekstne korporacije i leksičke resurse. Sljedeći, algoritam propagacije grafika identificira distribuciju etikete neoznačenih fraza iz označenih. Procjenjujemo naš pristup na dva mjera: Web pitanja i Free917. Rezultati pokazuju da, u oba seta podataka, naša metoda postiže značajno poboljšanje u usporedbi s baznom sustavom koji ne koristi učeni leksikon, i dobija konkurentne rezultate u usporedbi s državnim umjetničkim sustavom.', 'de': 'Semantische Parser stützen sich kritisch auf genaue Lexikone mit hoher Abdeckung. Traditionelle semantische Parser verwenden jedoch normalerweise annotierte logische Formen, um das Lexikon zu lernen, das häufig unter dem Problem der Lexikonabdeckung leidet. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein graphenbasiertes semi-überwachtes Lernframework vor, das große Textkorpora und lexikalische Ressourcen nutzt. Dieses Framework konstruiert zunächst einen Graphen mit einem Phrasenmodell, das durch die Verwendung vieler Textkorpora und lexikalischer Ressourcen gelernt wurde. Als nächstes identifiziert Graph Propagation Algorithmus die Etikettenverteilung von nicht beschrifteten Phrasen aus beschrifteten Phrasen. Wir bewerten unseren Ansatz anhand von zwei Benchmarks: Webquestions und Free917. Die Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode in beiden Datensätzen im Vergleich zum Basissystem, das das gelernte Lexikon nicht nutzt, erhebliche Verbesserungen erzielt und im Vergleich zu modernen Systemen wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse erzielt.', 'id': 'Pemanalis semantis sangat bergantung pada leksikon yang akurat dan meliputi tinggi. Namun, penganalis semantis tradisional biasanya menggunakan bentuk logis anotasi untuk belajar leksikon, yang sering menderita dari masalah penyamaran leksikon. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan rangkaian belajar semi-mengawasi berdasarkan grafik yang menggunakan teks besar corpora dan sumber daya lexik. Bingkai ini pertama-tama membangun grafik dengan model persamaan frasa yang belajar dengan menggunakan banyak teks corpora dan sumber daya lexik. Selanjutnya, algoritma propagasi grafik mengidentifikasi distribusi label frasa yang tidak ditabel dari frasa yang ditabel. We evaluate our approach on two benchmarks: Webquestions and Free917.  The results show that, in both datasets, our method achieves substantial improvement when comparing to the base system that does not utilize the learned lexicon, and gains competitive results when comparing to state-of-the-art systems.', 'ko': '의미 분석기는 어느 정도 정확하고 높은 범위의 어휘에 의존한다.그러나 전통적인 의미 분석기는 주석이 있는 논리 형식을 이용하여 어휘를 배우는데 이것은 어휘 덮어쓰기 문제에 부딪힐 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 그림을 바탕으로 하는 반감독 학습 구조를 제시했는데 이 구조는 대형 텍스트 자료 라이브러리와 어휘 자원을 이용했다.이 프레임워크는 먼저 대량의 텍스트 자료 라이브러리와 어휘 자원을 이용하여 짧은 말의 유사성을 가진 모델을 가진 그림을 구축한다.다음에 그림 전파 알고리즘은 표시되지 않은 단어와 표시되지 않은 단어의 라벨 분포를 식별한다.우리는 두 가지 기준에서 우리의 방법을 평가한다. 그것이 바로 웹questions와Free917이다.그 결과 이 두 가지 데이터가 집중되면서 우리의 방법은 배운 어휘를 사용하지 않는 기본 시스템에 비해 현저하게 개선되었고 가장 선진적인 시스템에 비해 우리의 방법은 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었다.', 'fa': 'متخصص\u200cکننده\u200cهای سیمانتیک به ریاضی بر زبان\u200cهای دقیق و پوشش بالا اعتماد دارند. با این حال، بازرسان سنتی\u200cها معمولاً فرم\u200cهای منطقی را برای یاد گرفتن زبان\u200cشناسی استفاده می\u200cکنند که اغلب از مشکل پوشش لکسیون رنج می\u200cبرند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم چهارچوب یادگیری نصف نظارت بر اساس گراف که از منابع\u200cهای متن بزرگ و زبان\u200cشناسی استفاده می\u200cکند. این چهارچوب اول یک گراف با یک مدل شبیه عبارت یاد گرفته با استفاده از بسیاری از منابع متن و زبان\u200cشناسی ساخته می\u200cشود. آلگوریتم گسترش گراف توزیع نقاشی از جمله\u200cهای نامه\u200cنوشته از برچسب شناسایی می\u200cکند. ما روش خودمون رو در دو برچسب ارزیابی می کنیم: سوال وب و Free917. نتیجه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که در هر دو مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cها، روش ما در مقایسه با سیستم پایه\u200cای که زبان یاد گرفته را استفاده نمی\u200cکند، بهتر شدن زیادی را می\u200cرساند، و نتیجه\u200cهای رقابتی را در مقایسه با سیستم\u200cهای هنر می\u200cگیرد.', 'tr': 'Semantik tanyşçylar kritiýa çykyş edilen düzgün we ýokary çykyş sözlerine ynanýarlar. Ýöne däpli semantik tansçylary köplenç lezikon öwrenmek üçin tansýan logik biçimlerini ulanýarlar. Köplenç lezikon kapsamynyň problemasyndan çykýarlar. Bu kagyzda grafik tabanly ýarym-gözleýän öwrenmek çerçevesini teklip edip, uly tekst korpora we leksiýaly çerçevesini ulanýar. Ilkinji gezek metin korpora we leksiýal çeşmeleri ulanarak öwrenen bir fraz meňzeşlikli nusga bilen bir grafiki inşa eder. Indiki, grafik üýtgetmek algoritmi etiketsiz sözlerniň daýlamagyny etiket edir. Biz öz yaklaşymyzy iki düýbünden deňleýäris: Websoraglary we Free917. netijeler hem veri setirlerinde biziň metodamyz öwrenmeden leksikony ulanmaýan baz sistemasyna karşılaşykda örän gowurak gazanýar we sungat sistemleri bilen urşanlyk netijeleri gazanýar.', 'sw': 'Wabunge wa kimapenzi wanategemea lexico sahihi na taarifa za juu. Hata hivyo, mabango ya kiutamaduni mara nyingi hutumia aina za kisiasa za kujifunza lexico, ambazo mara nyingi hupata matatizo ya habari za lexico. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kujifunza unaoangaliwa na mfumo wa simu unaotumia makampuni makubwa na rasilimali za kilexico. Mfumo huu wa kwanza unaunda picha yenye msemo wa aina inayofanana na kujifunza kwa kutumia makampuni mengi na rasilimali za kilexico. Baadae, utaratibu wa propaganda wa picha unaonyesha usambazaji wa alama za maneno yasiyotambuliwa kutoka kwenye zile zinazobainishwa. Tutathmini hatua yetu kuhusu bendera mbili: maswali ya mtandao na Free917. Matokeo yanaonyesha kuwa, katika seti zote za data, mbinu zetu hupata maboresho makubwa pale unapolinganisha na mfumo wa msingi ambao hauitumia elimu ya lexico, na hupata matokeo ya ushindani pale unapolinganisha na mifumo ya sanaa.', 'sq': 'Semantic parsers critically rely on accurate and high-coverage lexicons.  Megjithatë, analizuesit tradicionalë semantikë zakonisht përdorin forma logjike të anotuara për të mësuar lexikonin, i cili shpesh vuan nga problemi i mbulimit lexikon. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një kuadër mësimi gjysmë-mbikqyrur me bazë në grafik që bën përdorim të korprave të mëdha teksti dhe burimeve lexike. Ky kuadër ndërton së pari një grafik me një frazë të ngjashme model mësuar duke përdorur shumë korpra teksti dhe burime lexike. Më pas, algoritmi i përhapjes së grafikut identifikon shpërndarjen e etiketës së frazave të pa etiketë nga ato të etiketuara. Ne vlerësojmë qasjen tonë në dy pika: pyetje në internet dhe Free917. Rezultatet tregojnë se, në të dy grupet e të dhënave, metoda jonë arrin përmirësim thelbësor kur krahasohet me sistemin bazë që nuk përdor lexikonin e mësuar dhe fiton rezultate konkurruese kur krahasohet me sistemet më të moderne.', 'am': 'ሰሜንቲካዊ ፓርርቲዎች በአስቸኳይ እና ከፍተኛ ደረጃዎች ሌክሲኮችን ታመካሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን ባሕላዊው የሴሜንቲካ ፓርራር ብዙ ጊዜ ከሌክሲኮን ክፍተት መከራን የሚቀበል ሌክሲኮን ለመማር የሚታወቀውን የሎጂካዊ ፎርማዎች ይጠቅማል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የጽሑፍ ኮርፖርት እና የሊክሲ ሀብትን የሚጠቅመውን የግልጽ ተማሪ ፍሬም እናሳልቃለን፡፡ ይሄ ፍሬም በመጀመሪያ የፊደል ክፍል በተመሳሳይ እና በብዙ የጽሑፍ ኮርፖራ እና የሌክሲካዊ ሀብት በመጠቀም የተማረ የፊደል ክፍል ይሠራል፡፡ የአሁኑን ቀለም የሁለት ደብዳቤዎች ላይ ልናስተምር:: የዌብ ጥያቄዎች እና የፍሪ917. ፍሬዎቹ በሁለቱም ዳታተሮች ውስጥ፣ ከተማሩት ሌክሲኮን ከማይጠቀም መሠረት ካልደረገው መሠረት እና ከሀገር-የart ሲስተያየት በተደረገ ጊዜ የጥላቻ ፍሬዎችን ያገኛል፡፡', 'af': "Semantiese verwerkers kritiese vertrou op presies en hoë- dekking leksies. Alhoewel, tradisionele semantiese verwerkers gebruik gewoonlik notateerde logiese vorms om die lexikon te leer, wat dikwels lyk van die lexikon dekking probleem. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n graafgebaseerde semi-superviseer leer raamwerk wat gebruik maak van groot teks korpora en leksiese hulpbronne. Hierdie raamwerk konstrukteer eerste 'n graf met 'n frase gelykbaarheidmodeel leer deur baie teks korpore en leksiese hulpbronne te gebruik. Volgende, graafpropagasie algoritme identifiseer die etiket verspreiding van ongeabelde frase van gemerkte frase. Ons evalueer ons toegang op twee benchmarke: Webvrae en Free917. Die resultate vertoon dat, in beide datastelle, ons metode beter beter wanneer ons vergelyk word met die basis stelsel wat nie die geleerde leksikon gebruik nie, en kry mededingsresultate wanneer ons vergelyk word met die state-of-the-art stelsels.", 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ վերլուծումները կարևորաբար հիմնված են ճշգրիտ և բարձր ծավալի լեքսիկոնների վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, ավանդական սեմանտիկ վերլուծումները սովորաբար օգտագործում են գրված տրամաբանական ձևեր լեքսիկոնի սովորելու համար, որոնք հաճախ տառապում են լեքսիկոնի ծածկության խնդիրներից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք գծագրի հիմնված կիսավերահսկվող ուսումնական շրջանակ, որը օգտագործում է մեծ տեքստի կորպորա և լեքսիկական ռեսուրսներ: Այս շրջանակը նախ կառուցում է գրաֆիա, որն ունի արտահայտության նմանության մոդել, որը սովորվում է օգտագործելով շատ տեքստի կորպորա և լեքսիկական ռեսուրսներ: Հաջորդ, գծագրի տարածման ալգորիթմը բացահայտում է նշանված արտահայտությունների բաշխման պիտակը: We evaluate our approach on two benchmarks: Webquestions and Free917.  Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ երկու տվյալների համակարգերում մեր մեթոդը նշանակալի բարելավում է համեմատելով հիմնական համակարգը, որը չի օգտագործում սովորված լեքսիկոնը, և ստանում է մրցակցության արդյունքներ՝ համեմատելով ամենաբարձր համակարգերը:', 'az': 'Semantik ayırıcılar dəyişiklik və yüksək örtük leksiklərinə təvəkkül edirlər. Halbuki, əvvəlki semantik analizatçılar genellikle sözləri öyrənmək üçün nöqtəli lojik formaları istifadə edirlər, ki çox çox sıxıntılı leksikon örtükləri problemindən çəkilir. Bu kağızda, grafik-tabanlı yarı-gözləyirli öyrənmə framework ünü təklif edirik ki, böyük mətn korporası və leksik kaynaqlarından istifadə edər. Bu framework ilk dəfə çoxlu mətn korporasını və leksik kaynaqlarını istifadə edərək öyrənən bir fraz similaritə modeli ilə grafı inşa edir. Sonra, grafik propagasyon algoritmi etiketsiz sözlərin etiketsiz dağıtını etiketləndirir. Biz iki benchmarkla yaxınlığımızı değerlendiririk: Websuallar və Free917. Sonuçlar hər iki veri qurularında, öyrənməmiş leksikonu istifadə etməyən baz sistemi ilə qarşılaşdırdığımız və sanat sistemi ilə qarşılaşdırdığımızda müəllif sonuçlarımız gəlir.', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক পার্সারেরা সঠিক এবং উচ্চ কাভারেজ লেক্সিকোর উপর নির্ভর করে। তবে ঐতিহ্যবাহী সেম্পেন্টিক পার্সার সাধারণত লেক্সিকোন কাভারেজের সমস্যা থেকে প্রায়শই লেক্সিকোর কাভারেজ সমস্যার ব্যবহা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক সেমি পর্যবেক্ষিত শিক্ষা কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করি যা বিশাল ল লেখা কোর্পোরা এবং লেক্সিক্ এই ফ্রেমের কাঠামো প্রথমে একটি গ্রাফ তৈরি করেছে যেখানে একটি বাক্যের সমতামূলক মডেল শিখেছে অনেক টেক্সট কর্পোরা এবং লেক্সি পরবর্তীতে, গ্রাফ প্রচারণা অ্যালগরিদম লেবেল বিতরণের লেবেল বিতরণ চিহ্নিত করেছে লেবেল থেকে লেবেল বিতরণ। We evaluate our approach on two benchmarks: Webquestions and Free917.  ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে দুটো ডাটাসেটে আমাদের পদ্ধতি বেশ উন্নতি পেয়ে যায় যখন বেস সিস্টেমের সাথে তুলনা করা হয়, যা শিক্ষিত লেক্সিকোন ব্যবহার করে না এবং প্রতিযোগিতা', 'cs': 'Sémantické parsery kriticky spoléhají na přesné a vysoce pokryté lexikony. Tradiční sémantické parsery však obvykle používají anotované logické formy k učení se lexikon, který často trpí problémem pokrytí lexikonu. V tomto článku navrhujeme grafový semi-supervisovaný učební rámec, který využívá velkých textových korpusů a lexikálních zdrojů. Tento framework nejprve konstruuje graf s modelem podobnosti frází naučeným pomocí mnoha textových korpusů a lexikálních zdrojů. Dále algoritmus šíření grafu identifikuje distribuci štítků neznačených frází z označených frází. Náš přístup hodnotíme na základě dvou měřítek: Webquestions a Free917. Výsledky ukazují, že v obou datových sadách dosahuje naše metoda podstatného zlepšení v porovnání se základním systémem, který nevyužívá naučený lexikon, a získává konkurenční výsledky při porovnání s nejmodernějšími systémy.', 'ca': "Els analitzadors semàtics confien críticament en lèxics precisos i d'alta cobertura. Però els analitzadors semàntics tradicionals normalment utilitzen formes lògiques anotates per aprendre el lèxic, que sovint pateixen el problema de cobertura del lèxic. En aquest paper, proposem un marc d'aprenentatge semisupervisat basat en gràfics que utilitza grans corpores de text i recursos lèxics. Aquest marc comença a construir un gràfic amb un model de similitud de frases aprenent utilitzant molts corpores de text i recursos lèxics. Next, graph propagation algorithm identifies the label distribution of unlabeled phrases from labeled ones.  Evaluam el nostre enfocament en dos punts de referència: preguntes web i Free917. Els resultats demostren que, en ambdós conjunts de dades, el nostre mètode aconsegueix una millora substancial al comparar amb el sistema de base que no utilitza el lexicon aprengut, i guanya resultats competitius al comparar amb els sistemes més moderns.", 'et': 'Semantilised parserid tuginevad kriitiliselt täpsetele ja kõrge katvusega leksikonidele. Traditsioonilised semantilised parserid kasutavad aga tavaliselt anoteeritud loogilisi vorme leksikoni õppimiseks, mis sageli kannatavad leksikoni katvuse probleemi all. Käesolevas töös pakume välja graafikapõhise pooljuhitatud õpperaamistiku, mis kasutab suuri tekstikorpuseid ja leksikaalseid ressursse. See raamistik ehitab esmalt graafiku fraasisarnasuse mudeliga, mis on õppinud kasutades paljusid tekstikorpuseid ja leksikaalseid ressursse. Järgmisena tuvastab graafilise leviku algoritm märgistamata fraaside sildijaotuse märgistatud fraasidest. Hindame oma lähenemisviisi kahe võrdluskriteeriumi alusel: Webquestions ja Free917. Tulemused näitavad, et mõlemas andmekogumis saavutab meie meetod olulise paranemise võrreldes baassüsteemiga, mis ei kasuta õppitud sõnavara, ning saavutab konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi võrreldes kaasaegsete süsteemidega.', 'fi': 'Semanttiset jäsentäjät luottavat kriittisesti tarkkoihin ja kattaviin sanastoihin. Perinteiset semanttiset jäsentäjät käyttävät kuitenkin yleensä selityksillä varustettuja loogisia muotoja oppiakseen sanaston, joka usein kärsii sanaston kattavuusongelmasta. Tässä työssä ehdotamme graafista puoliohjattua oppimiskehystä, jossa hyödynnetään suuria tekstikorpusia ja sanastoresursseja. Tämä viitekehys rakentaa ensin kaavion fraasien samankaltaisuusmallilla, joka on opittu hyödyntämällä useita tekstikorpusia ja sanastoresursseja. Seuraavaksi graafien lisäysalgoritmi tunnistaa merkitsemättömien lauseiden tunnistejakauman merkityistä lauseista. Arvioimme lähestymistapaamme kahdella vertailukohdalla: Webquestions ja Free917. Tulokset osoittavat, että molemmissa aineistoissa menetelmämme saavuttaa huomattavaa parannusta verrattuna perusjärjestelmään, joka ei hyödynnä opittua sanastoa, ja saavuttaa kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia verrattuna uusimpiin järjestelmiin.', 'bs': 'Semantički analitičari se kritično oslanjaju na tačne i visokopokrivene leksije. Međutim, tradicionalni semantički analitičari obično koriste annotirane logičke forme kako bi naučili leksikon, koji često pati od problema sa prekrivanjem leksikona. U ovom papiru predlažemo polu-nadzorni okvir učenja koji koristi velike tekstske korporacije i leksičke resurse. Ovaj okvir prvo konstruuje grafik sa model sličnosti fraze naučenim koristeći mnoge tekstne korporacije i leksičke resurse. Sljedeći, algoritam propagacije grafika identificira distribuciju etikete neoznačenih fraza iz etiketiranih. Procjenjujemo naš pristup na dva kritika: Web pitanja i Free917. Rezultati pokazuju da, u oba seta podataka, naša metoda postiže značajno poboljšanje u usporedbi sa baznom sistemom koji ne koristi naučeni leksikon i dobija konkurentne rezultate u usporedbi sa državnim umjetničkim sistemima.', 'he': 'מעבדות סמנטיות סומכות באופן קריטי על לקסיקונים מדויקים וכיסויים גבוהים. עם זאת, חוקרים סמנטיים מסורתיים בדרך כלל משתמשים בצורות הגיוניות המכתבות כדי ללמוד את הלקסיקון, אשר לעתים קרובות סובלים מבעית כיסוי הלקסיקון. In this paper, we propose a graph-based semi-supervised learning framework that makes use of large text corpora and lexical resources.  המסגרת הזאת קודם בונה גרף עם מודל דומות ביטוי שנלמד באמצעות השימוש של גופרות טקסט רבות ומשאבים לקסיים. לאחר מכן, אלגוריתם פיתוח גרף מזהה את פיתוח התווית של ביטויים ללא סימנים מאותם מסומנים. אנו מעריכים את הגישה שלנו על שני נקודות רמז: שאלות אינטרנט ו-Free917. התוצאות מראות שבשני קבוצות נתונים השיטה שלנו משיגה שיפור משמעותי בהשוואה למערכת הבסיס שלא משתמשת בלקסיקון הלמד, ומקבלת תוצאות תחרותיות בהשוואה למערכות חדשות.', 'ha': "QFontDatabase A lokacin da aka yi amfani da fassarar na semantiki ko daidai, sai su yi amfani da fomat na zartar da aka sanar wa leksikon, wanda ake ƙara matabbatar cewa na leksikon. Ga wannan karatun, Munã buɗa wani firam na karatun a karatun na karatun da aka tsare shi na karatun, wanda ke amfani da matsayin makampuni mai girma da maɓallin leksisi. Wannan firam na farkon ya gina wani grafi da wani misalin na daidaita da aka sanar da shi da ya yi amfani da masu yawa na koropa da maɓallin leksisi. QXml Tuna ƙaddara hanyarmu a kan takardar misalin biyu: Web savai da Free917. Mataimakin za'a nuna cewa, a cikin kowane danne biyu, metoden mu yana sãmun mafiya kyau idan yana sami tsarin na'asar wanda bai yi amfani da shi ba ya sanar leksisin, kuma yana ƙara fassarar ta yi competitive idan yana sammeni da-state-of-the-art.", 'sk': 'Semantni razčlenjevalci se kritično zanašajo na natančne in visokopokrite leksikone. Vendar pa tradicionalni semantični razčlenjevalci običajno uporabljajo označene logične oblike za učenje leksikona, ki pogosto trpijo zaradi težav s pokritostjo leksikona. V prispevku predlagamo polnadzorovan okvir učenja, ki uporablja velike besedilne korpuse in leksikalne vire. Ta okvir najprej gradi graf z modelom podobnosti fraz, ki se je naučil z uporabo številnih besedilnih korpusov in leksikalnih virov. Nato algoritem razmnoževanja grafov identificira porazdelitev oznak neoznačenih stavkov iz označenih stavkov. Naš pristop ocenjujemo na dveh merilih: Webquestions in Free917. Rezultati kažejo, da v obeh naborih podatkov naša metoda doseže bistveno izboljšanje v primerjavi z osnovnim sistemom, ki ne uporablja učenega leksikona, ter konkurenčne rezultate v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi sistemi.', 'jv': 'semanti-PASSARS Jura, semanti dipunangke semanti dipunangke iso nggawe tarjamahan logik nggawe leksiko box sapa-sapa ngono kuwi tindakan pakan seneng pisan seneng pisan banget. Nang pepulan iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem sing sembaran-sistem sing bisa nguasai perusahaan text ora nggawe barang kelas nêmên. Sampeyan iki dadi nggawe graf nganggo sistem sing sampeyan kelas nang sampeyan kelas nang nggawe barang langgar sampeyan teks politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngerasakno dadi iki bangsane: webquestion karo Free Reuniversi nambarang, ditambahak dataset, ditambahak dhéwé nggawe barang kelas supayano karo sistem sing ditambangkampun kuwi tindakan sistem sing ora nggawe leksikondur nggawe, lan akeh njaluk-njaluk sing bisa tekaanyi state-of-the-arts sistem sing berarti.', 'bo': 'ལྟ་བུའི་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོས་དྲན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་སྦྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་སྲོལ་ཆེན་ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྩོམ་པ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གཙོ་ དང་པོའི་གཞུང་ཚབ་འདིས་ཡིག་གི་མཐུན་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཛུབ་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསླབས་པའི་ཚིག Next, graph propagation algorithm identifies the label distribution of unlabeled phrases from labeled ones. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གནད་གཟུགས་རིས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་རིམ་པ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Webquestions and Free917 རིགས། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བྱ་ཚིག་དག་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་ལས་ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིས་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Document-level Multi-aspect Sentiment Classification by Jointly Modeling Users, Aspects, and Overall Ratings', 'es': 'Clasificación de sentimientos multiaspecto a nivel de documento mediante el modelado conjunto de usuarios, aspectos y calificaciones generales', 'ar': 'تصنيف المشاعر متعدد الجوانب على مستوى المستند من خلال النمذجة المشتركة للمستخدمين والجوانب والتصنيفات الإجمالية', 'pt': 'Classificação de sentimento multi-aspecto em nível de documento por usuários de modelagem conjunta, aspectos e classificações gerais', 'fr': 'Classification des sentiments multi-aspects au niveau du document en modélisant conjointement les utilisateurs, les aspects et les évaluations globales', 'ja': 'ユーザー、アスペクト、および総合評価の共同モデリングによる文書レベルのマルチアスペクトセンチメント分類', 'zh': '合建模用户总体评级者文档多情类', 'hi': 'संयुक्त रूप से मॉडलिंग उपयोगकर्ताओं, पहलुओं, और समग्र रेटिंग द्वारा दस्तावेज़-स्तर बहु-पहलू भावना वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'Классификация многоаспектных настроений на уровне документа по совместному моделированию пользователей, аспектов и общих рейтингов', 'ga': 'Aicmiú Méine Ilghnéitheach ar leibhéal an doiciméid trí Úsáideoirí, Gnéithe agus Rátálacha Foriomlána a Shamhaltú i gComhar', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის მრავალ აპექტების მნიშვნელოვანი კლასიფიკაცია მნიშვნელოვანი მომხმარებელი, აპექტები და ყველა რეტიმენტების შესახებ', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων πολλαπλών πτυχών σε επίπεδο εγγράφου από κοινού μοντελοποίηση χρηστών, πτυχών και συνολικών αξιολογήσεων', 'hu': 'Dokumentumszintű többoldalú érzelmi osztályozás a felhasználók, aspektusok és általános értékelések közös modellezése szerint', 'it': 'Classificazione dei sentimenti multiaspetto a livello di documento in base alla modellazione congiunta degli utenti, degli aspetti e delle valutazioni complessive', 'kk': 'Құжат деңгейіндегі көп аспекті және жалпы бағалаулар бойынша үлгілеу', 'mk': 'Мултиаспектна класификација на чувство на ниво на документот според заеднички моделирање на корисниците, аспектите и генералните оценки', 'lt': 'Dokumento lygmens daugiapakopis jutimo klasifikavimas pagal jungtinio modeliavimo naudotojus, aspektus ir bendrą reitingą', 'ml': 'മോഡില്\u200d മോഡിങ് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d, ആസ്പെക്റ്റുകള്\u200d, മൊത്തം റേറ്റിങ്ങുകള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Sentimen Berbagai Aspek Aras Dokumen Oleh Pengguna Model Bergabung, Aspek, dan Nilai Umum', 'mn': 'Документийн түвшинд олон аспектийн мэдрэгчийн классификацийг хамтдаа загварлах хэрэглэгчид, аспектүүд, нийтлэг рейтинг', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni tas-Sentiment f’diversi aspetti fil-livell tad-dokument skont l-Utenti li jimmudellaw b’mod konġunt, l-Aspetti u l-Klassifikazzjonijiet Globali', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja sentymentów wieloaspektowych na poziomie dokumentu poprzez wspólne modelowanie użytkowników, aspektów i ocen ogólnych', 'ro': 'Clasificarea sentimentelor multi-aspect la nivel de document după modelarea comună a utilizatorilor, aspectelor și evaluărilor globale', 'sr': 'Razina dokumenta višeaspekta klasifikacija sentimenta zajedno modelirajućim korisnicima, aspektima i ukupnim ocjenama', 'no': 'Dokumentnivå Multi aspect Sentiment- klassifikasjon av Joint Modeling Users, Aspects, and Overall Ratings', 'si': 'වාර්තාව, සැකසුම, සම්පූර්ණ රේටින්ස් වලින් විශේෂණය සමග විශේෂණය', 'so': 'Isticmaalayaasha Joint Modeling Users, Aspects, and Overall Ratings', 'sv': 'Klassificering av känslor i flera aspekter på dokumentnivå efter gemensam modellering av användare, aspekter och övergripande betyg', 'ta': 'ஆவண- மட்டத்தில் பல- பகுதியிலுள்ள அமர்வு வகைப்படுத்தல் இணைப்பு மாதிரியும் பயனர், காட்சிகள், மற்றும் மொத்த விகிதம்', 'ur': 'Document-level Multi-aspect Sentiment Classification by Joint Modeling Users, Aspects, and Overall Ratings', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Dịch bởi dịch vụ mạngName', 'bg': 'Класификация на многоаспектни сентименти на ниво документ по съвместно моделиране на потребители, аспекти и общи оценки', 'da': 'Klassificering af følelser på flere sider på dokumentniveau efter fælles modellering af brugere, aspekter og samlede vurderinger', 'nl': 'Classificatie van gevoelens op documentniveau door gebruikers, aspecten en algemene beoordelingen gezamenlijk te modelleren', 'de': 'Klassifizierung von mehrseitigen Stimmungen auf Dokumentenebene durch gemeinsame Modellierung von Benutzern, Aspekten und Gesamtbewertungen', 'ko': '모형 사용자, 방면과 전체 평점을 연합하여 문서급의 다방면 정서 분류를 실현하다', 'id': 'Klasifikasi Sentimen Multi-aspek Tingkat Dokumen oleh Pengguna Modeling Bergabung, Aspekt, dan Rating Umum', 'fa': 'سطح سند چندین نقطه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cی مجموعه\u200cی مجموعه توسط مدل\u200cسازی کاربر\u200cها، نقطه\u200cها و ارزش\u200cهای عمومی', 'sw': 'Makosano ya Makala ya dokumentari kwa upande mwingi wa Seneti na watumiaji wa Shirika la Usimamizi, Miazamo na Matukio ya Kijumla', 'hr': 'Razina dokumenta višeaspekta klasifikacija sentimenta zajedno modelirajućim korisnicima, aspektima i ukupnim ocjenama', 'tr': 'Sened Statistikleri Ýagtylamak Senedi', 'am': 'ሰነድ-level', 'hy': 'Comment', 'af': 'Dokumentvlak Veelvuldige aspekte Sentiment Klassifikasie deur Gesameleid Modeleer Gebruikers, Aspekte en Gewone Ratings', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i ndjenjave në nivelin e dokumentit me shumëaspekte nga Modelimi i Bashkuar i Përdoruesve, Aspektet dhe Vlerësimet e Përgjithshme', 'az': 'Dəstə-seviyyəsi Çoxlu-aspekt Sentiment Klasifikası Birleşik Modelləndirilən İstifadəçilər, Aspectlər və Üstünlü Rəstlər', 'bn': 'মোডেলিং ব্যবহারকারী , প্রত্যাখ্যান এবং সার্ভার রেটিং', 'bs': 'Klasifikacija višeaspekta Sentimenta na nivou dokumenta zajedno modeliranim korisnicima, aspektima i ukupnim ocjenama', 'ca': 'Classificació de sentiments multiaspectes a nivell de documentació per Usuaris Modeladors Juntament, Aspectes i Valoracions Globals', 'et': 'Dokumenditasemel mitmeaspektiline sentimentide klassifitseerimine kasutajate, aspektide ja üldiste hinnangute järgi', 'cs': 'Klasifikace víceaspektových sentimentů na úrovni dokumentů společným modelováním uživatelů, aspektů a celkových hodnocení', 'fi': 'Asiakirjatason moniulotteinen tunneluokitus käyttäjien, näkökulmien ja yleisten luokitusten yhteismallinnuksen mukaan', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Razvrščanje več vidikov sentimenta na ravni dokumenta glede na skupno modeliranje uporabnikov, vidikov in splošnih ocen', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་གནས་རིམ་འདུག་མཉམ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་དང་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་བསྡུས་རིམ་པ', 'he': 'רמת המסמכים מסויימת סיווג רגשות מרובים על ידי משתמשים מודלים משותפים, נקודות וכל הערכות'}
{'en': 'Document-level multi-aspect sentiment classification aims to predict user’s sentiment polarities for different aspects of a product in a review. Existing approaches mainly focus on text information. However, the authors (i.e. users) and overall ratings of reviews are ignored, both of which are proved to be significant on interpreting the sentiments of different aspects in this paper. Therefore, we propose a model called Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) to consider user preference and overall ratings jointly. Specifically, HUARN adopts a hierarchical architecture to encode word, sentence, and document level information. Then, user attention and aspect attention are introduced into building sentence and document level representation. The document representation is combined with user and overall rating information to predict aspect ratings of a review. Diverse aspects are treated differently and a multi-task framework is adopted. Empirical results on two real-world datasets show that HUARN achieves state-of-the-art performances.', 'ar': 'يهدف تصنيف المشاعر متعدد الجوانب على مستوى المستند إلى توقع استقطاب مشاعر المستخدم لجوانب مختلفة من المنتج في المراجعة. النهج الحالية تركز بشكل رئيسي على المعلومات النصية. ومع ذلك ، يتم تجاهل المؤلفين (أي المستخدمين) والتقييمات الإجمالية للمراجعات ، وكلاهما ثبت أنه مهم في تفسير مشاعر الجوانب المختلفة في هذه الورقة. لذلك ، نقترح نموذجًا يسمى شبكة تصنيف جانب المستخدم الهرمي (HUARN) للنظر في تفضيل المستخدم والتقييمات الإجمالية بشكل مشترك. على وجه التحديد ، تتبنى HUARN بنية هرمية لتشفير معلومات الكلمات والجمل والمستندات. بعد ذلك ، يتم تقديم انتباه المستخدم واهتمام الجانب في بناء الجملة وتمثيل مستوى المستند. يتم دمج تمثيل المستند مع معلومات المستخدم والتصنيف العام للتنبؤ بتصنيفات جانب المراجعة. يتم التعامل مع الجوانب المتنوعة بشكل مختلف ويتم اعتماد إطار متعدد المهام. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعتي بيانات في العالم الحقيقي أن HUARN تحقق أداءً متطورًا.', 'fr': "La classification des sentiments multi-aspects au niveau du document vise à prédire les polarités de sentiment de l'utilisateur pour différents aspects d'un produit dans un avis. Les approches existantes se concentrent principalement sur les informations textuelles. Cependant, les auteurs (c'est-à-dire les utilisateurs) et les évaluations globales des critiques sont ignorés, deux éléments qui se sont révélés significatifs pour interpréter les sentiments des différents aspects de cet article. Par conséquent, nous proposons un modèle appelé réseau hiérarchique d'évaluation des aspects utilisateur (HUARN) pour prendre en compte conjointement les préférences de l'utilisateur et les évaluations globales. Plus précisément, HUARN adopte une architecture hiérarchique pour coder les informations au niveau des mots, des phrases et des documents. Ensuite, l'attention de l'utilisateur et de l'aspect est introduite dans la représentation au niveau de la phrase de construction et du document La représentation du document est combinée avec les informations d'évaluation globale et de l'utilisateur afin de prédire les évaluations d'aspect d'un avis. Différents aspects sont traités différemment et un cadre multitâche est adopté. Des résultats empiriques sur deux ensembles de données réels montrent que HUARN atteint des performances de pointe.", 'es': 'La clasificación de opiniones multiaspecto a nivel de documento tiene como objetivo predecir las polaridades de opinión de los usuarios para diferentes aspectos de un producto en una revisión. Los enfoques existentes se centran principalmente en la información textual. Sin embargo, se ignoran los autores (es decir, los usuarios) y las calificaciones generales de las reseñas, las cuales han demostrado ser significativas a la hora de interpretar los sentimientos de los diferentes aspectos de este artículo. Por lo tanto, proponemos un modelo llamado Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) para considerar conjuntamente las preferencias de los usuarios y las calificaciones generales. Específicamente, HUARN adopta una arquitectura jerárquica para codificar información a nivel de palabras, oraciones y documentos. Luego, se introduce la atención del usuario y la atención de aspecto en la construcción de la representación a nivel de oración y documento La representación del documento se combina con la información de calificación general y del usuario para predecir las calificaciones de aspecto de una opinión. Los diversos aspectos se tratan de manera diferente y se adopta un marco multitarea. Los resultados empíricos en dos conjuntos de datos del mundo real muestran que HUARN logra un rendimiento de vanguardia.', 'pt': 'A classificação de sentimento multi-aspecto em nível de documento visa prever as polaridades de sentimento do usuário para diferentes aspectos de um produto em uma revisão. As abordagens existentes concentram-se principalmente em informações de texto. No entanto, os autores (ou seja, os usuários) e as classificações gerais das revisões são ignorados, ambos se mostraram significativos na interpretação dos sentimentos de diferentes aspectos neste artigo. Portanto, propomos um modelo chamado Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) para considerar a preferência do usuário e as classificações gerais em conjunto. Especificamente, o HUARN adota uma arquitetura hierárquica para codificar informações em nível de palavra, sentença e documento. Em seguida, a atenção do usuário e a atenção ao aspecto são introduzidas na construção da representação em nível de sentença e documento. A representação do documento é combinada com as informações de classificação geral e do usuário para prever as classificações de aspecto de uma revisão. Diversos aspectos são tratados de forma diferente e uma estrutura multitarefa é adotada. Resultados empíricos em dois conjuntos de dados do mundo real mostram que a HUARN alcança desempenhos de última geração.', 'zh': '文档级多情类用户论产异情极性。 今法主侧重于文本信息。 然(者,用户)论之体评分忽略了,二者皆征其异情之说有大义焉。 故曰分用户评级网络(HUARN),以共虑用户偏好整评级。 事具言之,HUARN用分层架构对单词,句与文档级信息编码之。 然后引用户注意,引入构句及文档级以示中。 文档表文体评级体合信息,以占论评级。 异方而异处,并用多任务框架。 两真实世界数结果表明,HUARN得先进之性。', 'ja': '文書レベルのマルチアスペクト感情分類は、レビューで製品のさまざまな側面に対するユーザーの感情の極性を予測することを目的としています。 既存のアプローチは主にテキスト情報に焦点を当てている。 しかし、レビューの著者（すなわちユーザー）と全体的な評価は無視され、両者は本稿の異なる側面の感情を解釈する上で重要であることが証明されている。 そこで、ユーザーの好みと総合的な評価を一緒に考慮するために、Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network （ HUARN ）というモデルを提案します。 具体的には、HUARNは階層型アーキテクチャを採用し、単語、文章、ドキュメントレベルの情報をエンコードします。 次に、ユーザーの注意とアスペクトの注意が、文章と文書レベルの表現を構築するために導入されます。 文書表現は、レビューのアスペクト評価を予測するために、ユーザーおよび総合評価情報と組み合わされます。 多様な側面が異なる扱いを受け、マルチタスクフレームワークが採用されています。 2つの現実のデータセットの実証結果は、HUARNが最先端のパフォーマンスを達成していることを示しています。', 'hi': 'दस्तावेज़-स्तरीय बहु-पहलू भावना वर्गीकरण का उद्देश्य समीक्षा में किसी उत्पाद के विभिन्न पहलुओं के लिए उपयोगकर्ता की भावना ध्रुवीयता की भविष्यवाणी करना है। मौजूदा दृष्टिकोण मुख्य रूप से पाठ जानकारी पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हालांकि, लेखकों (यानी उपयोगकर्ताओं) और समीक्षाओं की समग्र रेटिंग को अनदेखा कर दिया जाता है, जिनमें से दोनों इस पेपर में विभिन्न पहलुओं की भावनाओं की व्याख्या करने पर महत्वपूर्ण साबित होते हैं। इसलिए, हम संयुक्त रूप से उपयोगकर्ता वरीयता और समग्र रेटिंग पर विचार करने के लिए पदानुक्रमित उपयोगकर्ता पहलू रेटिंग नेटवर्क (HUARN) नामक एक मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, HUARN शब्द, वाक्य और दस्तावेज़ स्तर की जानकारी को एन्कोड करने के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित आर्किटेक्चर को अपनाता है। फिर, उपयोगकर्ता ध्यान और पहलू ध्यान को वाक्य और दस्तावेज़ स्तर के प्रतिनिधित्व के निर्माण में पेश किया जाता है। दस्तावेज़ प्रतिनिधित्व को समीक्षा की पहलू रेटिंग की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए उपयोगकर्ता और समग्र रेटिंग जानकारी के साथ जोड़ा जाता है। विभिन्न पहलुओं को अलग-अलग तरीके से माना जाता है और एक बहु-कार्य ढांचे को अपनाया जाता है। दो वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट पर अनुभवजन्य परिणाम बताते हैं कि HUARN अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Классификация многоаспектных настроений на уровне документов направлена на прогнозирование полярности настроений пользователя для различных аспектов продукта в обзоре. Существующие подходы в основном сосредоточены на текстовой информации. Однако авторы (т.е. пользователи) и общие рейтинги обзоров игнорируются, и оба они, как оказалось, играют важную роль в интерпретации настроений по различным аспектам в настоящем документе. Поэтому мы предлагаем модель под названием Иерархическая сеть оценки пользовательских аспектов (HUARN) для совместного рассмотрения предпочтений пользователей и общих оценок. В частности, HUARN использует иерархическую архитектуру для кодирования информации об уровне слова, предложения и документа. Затем внимание пользователя и внимание аспекта вводятся в построение представления предложения и уровня документа. Представление документа сочетается с информацией о пользователях и общей рейтинговой информацией для прогнозирования рейтингов аспектов обзора. Различные аспекты рассматриваются по-разному, и принимается многозадачная структура. Эмпирические результаты по двум наборам данных реального мира показывают, что HUARN достигает самых современных показателей.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag aicmiú meon ilghnéitheach ar leibhéal doiciméad polaraíochtaí meon an úsáideora a thuar maidir le gnéithe éagsúla de tháirge in athbhreithniú. Díríonn cur chuige reatha go príomha ar fhaisnéis téacs. Mar sin féin, déantar neamhaird ar na húdair (i.e. úsáideoirí) agus ar rátálacha foriomlána na n-athbhreithnithe, agus cruthaítear go bhfuil an dá rud suntasach maidir le léirmhíniú a dhéanamh ar dhearcthaí gnéithe éagsúla sa pháipéar seo. Dá bhrí sin, molaimid múnla ar a dtugtar Líonra Rátála Gnéithe Úsáideora Ordlathach (HUARN) chun rogha úsáideoirí agus rátálacha foriomlána a mheas i gcomhpháirt. Go sonrach, glacann HUARN ailtireacht ordlathach chun faisnéis ar leibhéal focal, abairte agus doiciméad a ionchódú. Ansin, tugtar aird na n-úsáideoirí agus aird na ngnéithe isteach san léiriú ar leibhéal abairtí agus doiciméad a thógáil. Comhcheanglaítear léiriú an doiciméid le faisnéis úsáideora agus rátála foriomlána chun rátálacha gné an athbhreithnithe a thuar. Caitear go héagsúil le gnéithe éagsúla agus glactar le creat ilthascanna. Léiríonn torthaí eimpíreacha ar dhá thacar sonraí ón bhfíorshaol go mbaineann HUARN feidhmíocht den scoth amach.', 'el': 'Η ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων πολλαπλών πτυχών σε επίπεδο εγγράφου έχει ως στόχο να προβλέψει τις πολικότητες συναισθημάτων του χρήστη για διαφορετικές πτυχές ενός προϊόντος σε μια κριτική. Οι υπάρχουσες προσεγγίσεις επικεντρώνονται κυρίως στην πληροφόρηση κειμένου. Ωστόσο, οι συγγραφείς (δηλαδή οι χρήστες) και οι συνολικές αξιολογήσεις των κριτικών αγνοούνται, και οι δύο αποδεικνύονται σημαντικές για την ερμηνεία των συναισθημάτων των διαφόρων πτυχών της παρούσας εργασίας. Ως εκ τούτου, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο που ονομάζεται Ιεραρχικό Δίκτυο Αξιολόγησης Aspect User (για να εξετάσουμε από κοινού τις προτιμήσεις των χρηστών και τις γενικές αξιολογήσεις. Συγκεκριμένα, το υιοθετεί μια ιεραρχική αρχιτεκτονική για να κωδικοποιήσει πληροφορίες σε επίπεδο λέξεων, προτάσεων και εγγράφων. Στη συνέχεια, η προσοχή των χρηστών και η προσοχή των πτυχών εισάγονται στην κατασκευή της πρότασης και της αναπαράστασης σε επίπεδο εγγράφου. Η αναπαράσταση του εγγράφου συνδυάζεται με πληροφορίες για χρήστες και συνολικές αξιολογήσεις για την πρόβλεψη αξιολογήσεων πτυχών μιας αναθεώρησης. Οι ποικίλες πτυχές αντιμετωπίζονται διαφορετικά και υιοθετείται πλαίσιο πολλαπλών εργασιών. Εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων πραγματικού κόσμου δείχνουν ότι η HUARN επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'A dokumentum szintű, több aspektusú érzelmi osztályozás célja, hogy megjósolja a felhasználók érzelmi polaritásait egy termék különböző aspektusaira vonatkozóan egy áttekintés során. A meglévő megközelítések elsősorban a szöveges információkra összpontosítanak. Ugyanakkor a szerzőket (azaz a felhasználókat) és a kritikák általános értékeléseit figyelmen kívül hagyják, amelyek mindkettő jelentősnek bizonyult a dolgozat különböző aspektusainak értelmezésében. Ezért javasoljuk a Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) nevű modellt, hogy közösen figyelembe vegyük a felhasználói preferenciákat és az általános értékeléseket. Konkrétan a HUARN hierarchikus architektúrát alkalmaz a szó-, mondat- és dokumentumszintű információk kódolására. Ezután a felhasználói figyelmet és aspektusfigyelmet bevezetjük a mondat- és dokumentumszintű ábrázolásba. A dokumentum ábrázolása a felhasználói és általános értékelési információkkal kombinálódik, hogy megjósolja az értékelés aspektus minősítését. A különböző szempontokat eltérően kezelik, és többfeladatú keretrendszert fogadnak el. Két valós adathalmaz empirikus eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a HUARN korszerű teljesítményt ér el.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტის მრავალ აპექტიმენტის სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციის მიზეზია გამოყენებელი სენტიმენტის პოლარიტის განსხვავებული პროდუმენტის განსხვავებული აპექტიმენტებ მხოლოდ ტექსტის ინფორმაციაზე კონუქტირება. მაგრამ, ავტორები (იმ. მომხმარები) და ყველაფერი განახლებების რეტენტირები იგნორირებულია, რომლებიც ორივე განახლებულია, რომ განსხვავებული აპექტირების განსხვავებაში იყოს მნიშვნელოვ ამიტომ, ჩვენ მინდომა მოდელს, რომელიც ჰიერარიქული მომხმარებელი ასპექტის რეტენტიგური ქსელი (HUARN) დავფიქროთ მომხმარებელი მონიშნობა და ყველა რეტენტი განსაკუთრებულია, HUARN იქნება იერაქტიკალური აქტიქტიქტურა სიტყვის, სიტყვის და დოკუმენტის სიტყვის ინფორმაციას. შემდეგ მომხმარებელი დააყენება და აპექტიკური დააყენება სიტყვების და დოკუმენტის განსახულებაში. დოკუმენტის გამოყენება მომხმარებელი და ყველა რეთენტირების ინფორმაციის შემდეგ გამოსახულებლად გამოყენება. განსხვავებული არსპექტები განსხვავებულია და მრავალური დავალების ფრამეტრი დაიწყება. ეგამა მსოფლიოს მონაცემების ექსტრების ემპერიკალური შედეგები აჩვენებს, რომ HUARN მონაცემებით მონაცემებით.', 'kk': 'Құжат деңгейіндегі көп аспекті сезімдерді шектеу үшін пайдаланушының сезімдерінің поляриттарын тексеру үшін бірнеше аспекттерінің түрлі бөлшектерін алдын алатын мақсаттары. Мәтін мәліметіне негізінде назар аудару керек. Бірақ авторлар (т. е. пайдаланушылар) және жалпы рейтинг елемейді, екеуі бұл қағаздың түрлі аспекттерінің түсініктерін түсініктіру үшін маңызды болады. Сондықтан, біз иерархикалық пайдаланушының аспекті бағалау желі (HUARN) деп аталатын үлгісін қолданып, пайдаланушының таңдауын және бүкіл оқиғаларды біріктіру үшін ұсынамыз Ескерту үшін HUARN сөз, сөз және құжат деңгейінің мәліметін кодтау үшін иерархиялық архитектурасын қолданады. Содан кейін, пайдаланушылардың назары мен аспекттерді құжаттың деңгейінің құрылымына және құжаттың деңгейінің негізделігіне ендіріледі. Құжатты көрсету пайдаланушылармен және бағалау мәліметімен біріктірілген, қарау бағалауын көрсету үшін. Әртүрлі аспекттер әртүрлі болып, көптеген тапсырмалар қолданылады. Екі шын әлемдегі деректер жиынының империялық нәтижелері HUARN әлемдегі орындауларды жеткізеді.', 'it': "La classificazione del sentiment multi-aspetto a livello di documento mira a prevedere le polarità del sentiment dell'utente per diversi aspetti di un prodotto in una recensione. Gli approcci esistenti si concentrano principalmente sulle informazioni testuali. Tuttavia, gli autori (cioè gli utenti) e le valutazioni complessive delle recensioni sono ignorate, entrambi si sono rivelati significativi nell'interpretare i sentimenti di diversi aspetti in questo articolo. Pertanto, proponiamo un modello chiamato Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) per considerare congiuntamente le preferenze degli utenti e le valutazioni complessive. Nello specifico, HUARN adotta un'architettura gerarchica per codificare parole, frasi e informazioni a livello di documento. Quindi, l'attenzione dell'utente e l'attenzione degli aspetti vengono introdotte nella rappresentazione a livello di frase e documento. La rappresentazione del documento è combinata con informazioni sull'utente e sulla valutazione complessiva per prevedere le valutazioni degli aspetti di una recensione. Diversi aspetti sono trattati in modo diverso e viene adottato un quadro multi-task. I risultati empirici su due set di dati reali mostrano che HUARN raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia.", 'lt': "Document-level multi-aspect sentiment classification aims to predict user's sentiment polarities for different aspects of a product in a review.  Esami metodai daugiausia susiję su teksto informacija. Tačiau autorių (t. y. naudotojų) ir bendrų perži ūrų vertinimų neatsižvelgiama, ir abu ši e vertinimai yra svarbūs aiškinant skirtingų aspektų šiame dokumente. Todėl siūlome model į, vadinamą Hierarchiniu vartotojo aspekto reitingų tinklu (HUARN), kuris kartu apsvarstytų vartotojų pirmenybę ir bendrą reitingą. Konkrečiai, HUARN priima hierarchinę architektūrą koduojant žodžius, sakinius ir dokumentų lygmens informaciją. Tada vartotojų dėmesys ir dėmesys į aspektus įtraukiami į pastato sakinį ir dokumentų lygmens atstovavimą. Dokumento atstovavimas derinamas su naudotoju ir bendra reitingų informacija, kad būtų galima numatyti peržiūros aspektų reitingus. Įvairūs aspektai vertinami skirtingai ir priimama daugiafunkcinė sistema. Dviejų realiojo pasaulio duomenų rinkinių empiriniai rezultatai rodo, kad HUARN pasiekia pažangiausius rezultatus.", 'mk': 'Класификацијата на мултиаспекти на сентименти на ниво на документот има за цел предвидување на поларитетите на сентиментите на корисникот за различни аспекти на производот во преглед. Постојаните пристапи се фокусираат главно на текстовите информации. Сепак, авторите (т.е. корисниците) и целокупните оценки на рецензиите се игнорирани, кои се покажаа дека се значителни во интерпретацијата на чувствата на различни аспекти во овој весник. Затоа, предложуваме модел наречен Хиерархична мрежа за оценка на аспектот на корисникот (HUARN) за разгледување на преференцијата на корисникот и целокупните оценки заедно. Specifically, HUARN adopts a hierarchical architecture to encode word, sentence, and document level information.  Потоа, вниманието на корисникот и аспектното внимание се воведени во изградбата на речениците и претставувањето на нивото на документите. Претставувањето на документот е комбинирано со корисничките и целокупните информации за рејтинг за да се предвидат рејтинзите на аспектот на прегледот. Diverse aspects are treated differently and a multi-task framework is adopted.  Импирските резултати на двата бази на податоци на реалниот свет покажуваат дека ХУАРН постигнува најсовремени изведби.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പ്രതിഫലത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാനുള്ള രേഖ-നില പല ഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ വിവി നിലവിലുള്ള അടുത്തുവരുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ടെക്സ്റ്റ് വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുക. എന്നാലും രചയിതാക്കള്\u200d (ഉദാഹരണമായ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d) പിന്നെ മൊത്തം പരിശോധനങ്ങളും അവഗണിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തിലെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങളെ വ്യക്തമാക്കു അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഹിയെരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവ് ആസ്പെക്ക് റേറ്റ് റേറ്റ് നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് (HUARN) എന്ന ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദാനം  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഹുആര്\u200dന്\u200d വാക്ക്, വാക്ക്, വാക്ക്, രേഖയുടെ നില വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എന്\u200dകോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി ഹിയേരാര്\u200dക്കിക പിന്നീട്, ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്നതും ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്നതും രേഖയുടെ നില പ്രതിനിധിയി രേഖയുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിനോടൊപ്പം കൂട്ടിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗത്തിന്റെ വിഭവ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായി ചികിത്സിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. പല ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200d പ്ര Empirical results on two real-world datasets show that HUARN achieves state-of-the-art performances.', 'mt': 'Il-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti b’diversi aspetti fil-livell tad-dokument għandha l-għan li tipprevedi l-polaritajiet tas-sentimenti tal-utent għal aspetti differenti ta’ prodott f’reviżjoni. L-approċċi eżistenti jiffukaw prinċipalment fuq l-informazzjoni dwar it-test. Madankollu, l-awturi (jiġifieri l-utenti) u l-klassifikazzjonijiet ġenerali tar-reviżjonijiet huma injorati, li t-tnejn li huma ntwerew li huma sinifikanti fl-interpretazzjoni tas-sentimenti ta’ aspetti different i f’dan id-dokument. Għalhekk, qed nipproponu mudell imsejjaħ Netwerk tal-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Aspett tal-Utent Iераrkiku (HUARN) biex jikkunsidra l-preferenza tal-utent u l-klassifikazzjonijiet ġenerali b’mod konġunt. B’mod speċifiku, HUARN jadotta arkitettura ġerarkika biex tikkodifika l-kelma, is-sentenza u l-informazzjoni fil-livell tad-dokument. Imbagħad, l-attenzjoni tal-utent u l-attenzjoni tal-aspett jiġu introdotti fis-sentenza tal-bini u r-rappreżentanza fil-livell tad-dokument. Ir-rappreżentanza tad-dokument hija kkombinata ma’ informazzjoni tal-utent u tal-klassifikazzjoni ġenerali biex jitbassru l-klassifikazzjonijiet tal-aspetti ta’ reviżjoni. Aspetti differenti jiġu ttrattati b’mod differenti u jiġi adottat qafas b’ħafna kompiti. Riżultati empiriċi fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali juru li HUARN jikseb prestazzjonijiet avvanzati.', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi sentimen berbilang-aspek aras dokumen bermaksud meramalkan polariti sentimen pengguna untuk aspek berbeza produk dalam ulasan. pendekatan yang wujud terutama fokus pada maklumat teks. Namun, penulis (iaitu pengguna) dan nilai keseluruhan ulasan diabaikan, kedua-duanya terbukti menjadi signifikan dalam menerangkan perasaan aspek berbeza dalam kertas in i. Therefore, we propose a model called Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) to consider user preference and overall ratings jointly.  Secara khusus, HUARN menerima arkitektur hierarkis untuk mengekod perkataan, kalimat, dan maklumat aras dokumen. Kemudian, perhatian pengguna dan perhatian aspek diperkenalkan dalam bangunan kalimat dan persembahan aras dokumen. Perwakilan dokumen digabungkan dengan maklumat pengguna dan penilaian keseluruhan untuk meramalkan penilaian aspek bagi ulasan. Aspekt berbeza dianggap berbeza dan kerangka-tugas berbilang diterima. Keputusan empirik pada dua set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa HUARN mencapai pertunjukan terbaik.', 'mn': 'Документын түвшинд олон асуудлын мэдрэмжүүдийн хуваалтын зорилго нь хэрэглэгчийн мэдрэмжүүдийн түвшинд өөр хэсгүүдийг шалгаж үзүүлэх зорилго юм. Existing approaches mainly focus on text information. Гэхдээ зохиолчдын (т.е. хэрэглэгчид) болон шинжилгээний нийтлэг дүгнэлт үгүй байдаг. Эдгээр хоёр нь энэ цаасан дээрх өөр асуудлын мэдрэмжүүдийг тодорхойлох нь чухал байдаг. Иймээс бид хэрэглэгчийн сонирхолтой болон нийтлэг үнэ цэнийг хамтдаа ойлгохын тулд Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) гэдэг загварыг санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа, HUARN үг, өгүүлбэр, баримтын түвшинд мэдээллийг кодлохын тулд архитектурыг ашигладаг. Ингээд хэрэглэгчийн анхаарал, асуудлын анхаарлыг өгүүлбэр, баримт түвшинд үзүүлэх болно. Документын үзүүлэлт нь хэрэглэгч болон нийтлэг дүрслэлийн мэдээлэл холбогдсон. Дөрвөн асуудлууд өөр өөр төрлийн эмчилгээ авч, олон даалгаварын хөтөлбөр ашиглана. Хоёр бодит дэлхийн өгөгдлийн сангийн эзэмшигийн үр дүн нь HUARN-ын урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Dokumentnivå multiaspektsentiment- klassifikasjon måtar å foregå sentiment- polaritiet til brukaren for ulike aspektar av eit produkt i ei oversikt. Eksiste tilnærmingar er hovudsakelig fokusert på tekstinformasjon. Men utviklarane (t.d. brukarar) og overalt verdiar av gjennomsikt vert ignorerte, begge av dei vert vist til å vera signifikant for å tolka følelsene til ulike aspektar i denne papira. Det er derfor eit modell kalla hierarkisk brukarspektivretningsverdinettverk (HUARN) for å forstå brukaravhengighet og overalt retningar. HUARN adopterer eit hierarkisk arkitektur for å koda ord, setningar og dokumentnivåinformasjon. Deretter vert brukaroppmerksomheten og aspektoppmerksomheten introdusert i utbygging av setningar og dokumentnivå. Dokumentrepresentasjonen er kombinert med brukar og overalt valueringsinformasjon for å forhåndsvisa aspektverdiar for ei oversikt. Diverse aspektar vert behandla ulike og eit fleire oppgåver-rammeverk vert godtatt. Empirical results on to real-world datasets show that HUARN achieves state-of-the-art performances.', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja sentymentów wieloaspektowych na poziomie dokumentu ma na celu przewidzenie polaryzacji sentymentów użytkownika dla różnych aspektów produktu w recenzji. Istniejące podejścia koncentrują się głównie na informacjach tekstowych. Jednak ignoruje się autorów (tj. użytkowników) i ogólne oceny recenzji, które okazują się istotne dla interpretacji sentymentów różnych aspektów niniejszego artykułu. Dlatego proponujemy model o nazwie Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN), aby wspólnie uwzględnić preferencje użytkowników i ogólne oceny. W szczególności HUARN przyjmuje hierarchiczną architekturę kodowania informacji na poziomie słów, zdań i dokumentów. Następnie uwaga użytkownika i uwaga aspektów są wprowadzane do budowania zdań i reprezentacji na poziomie dokumentu. Reprezentacja dokumentu jest łączona z informacjami o ocenie użytkownika i ogólnej, aby przewidzieć oceny aspektów recenzji. Różne aspekty traktowane są różnie i przyjmuje się ramy wielozadaniowe. Wyniki empiryczne na dwóch rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazują, że HUARN osiąga najnowocześniejsze osiągnięcia.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea sentimentelor multi-aspect la nivel de document vizează prezicerea polarităților sentimentelor utilizatorilor pentru diferite aspecte ale unui produs într-o recenzie. Abordările existente se concentrează în principal pe informațiile text. Cu toate acestea, autorii (adică utilizatorii) și evaluările generale ale recenziilor sunt ignorate, ambele fiind dovedite a fi semnificative în interpretarea sentimentelor diferitelor aspecte din această lucrare. Prin urmare, propunem un model numit Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) pentru a lua în considerare preferințele utilizatorilor și evaluările generale în comun. Mai exact, HUARN adoptă o arhitectură ierarhică pentru codificarea informațiilor la nivel de cuvânt, propoziție și document. Apoi, atenția utilizatorului și atenția aspectelor sunt introduse în construirea frazelor și reprezentarea la nivel de document. Reprezentarea documentului este combinată cu informațiile referitoare la utilizator și la evaluarea generală pentru a prezice evaluările aspectelor unei revizuiri. Diversele aspecte sunt tratate în mod diferit și se adoptă un cadru multifuncțional. Rezultatele empirice pe două seturi de date din lumea reală arată că HUARN obține performanțe de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija sentiment a multiaspekta na nivou dokumenta je cilj predviđati polaritet korisnika sentimenta za različite aspekte proizvoda u pregledu. Postoje pristupi uglavnom fokusiraju se na tekstne informacije. Međutim, autori (tj. korisnici) i općeg ocjena pregleda se ignoriraju, a oba su dokazana da su značajna na interpretaciji osjećaja različitih aspekta u ovom papiru. Stoga predlažemo model pod nazivom Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) da zajedno razmotri preferenciju korisnika i ukupne ocjene. Posebno, HUARN usvoji hijerarhičku arhitekturu da kodira informacije o reči, rečenici i nivou dokumenta. Onda je pozornost korisnika i pažnja aspekta uvedena u izgradnju rečenice i predstavljanje nivoa dokumenta. Predstavljanje dokumenta je kombinovana sa korisnikom i ukupnim informacijama o ocjenama za predviđanje ocjena aspekta preglede. Razni aspekti se tretiraju drugačije i usvojen je višezadatačni okvir. Impirički rezultati na dva seta podataka u stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da HUARN postiže izvedbe stanja umjetnosti.', 'si': 'ලේඛන-ලේවල් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂය අදහස් කරනවා ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය සඳහා ප්\u200dර පාළ තොරතුරු ගැන ප්\u200dරධාන විදිහට තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. නමුත්, ලේඛකයෝ (ඉතින්, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ) සහ සාමාන්\u200dය රේටින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය අවධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ, ඒ දෙන්නම දෙන්නම වෙනස් ප්\u200dර ඉතින්, අපි හියර්චිකල් ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගාරකයාගාරකයාගාරකයාගාරකය සැකසුම් රේටින් ජාලය (HUARN) කියලා ප්\u200dරයෝජකයා විශේෂයෙන්, HUARN වචන, වාක්ය, සහ වාක්ෂාව ස්තූතිය තොරතුරු සඳහා විශේෂ ස්ථාපනයක් ගන්නවා. ඊට පස්සේ, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයා අවධානය සහ අවධානය අවධානය සිද්ධ වාක්ය සහ වාක්ෂාව ස්තූතිය සි ලිපින්ත ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය ප්\u200dරයෝජකය සහ සම්පූර්ණ රේටින් තොරතුරු සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200d විවිධ ප්\u200dරදේශයක් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා වගේම විශේෂ කාර්යාවක් ප්\u200dරත ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සටහන් දෙකක් තියෙන්නේ අධ්\u200dයාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'so': 'Takhasuska farsamada ee dukumentigu wuxuu ku qoran yahay inuu horay u sii sheego xisaabta isticmaalaha, si ay u taqaano arrimaha kala duduwan ee dhaqaalaha. Waxyaabaha uu joogo waxay ugu horeyn ku kalsoonaadaan macluumaadka qoraalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qofka qoraya (tusaale ahaan isticmaalayaasha) iyo bandhigyada baaritaanka oo dhan waa la jeedaa, taas oo labadoodaba waxaa loo caddaynayaa inay muhiim u yihiin turjubaan fikirrada dhinacyada kala duduwan e e warqaddan. Sidaa darteed waxaan soo jeedaynaa tusaale la yidhaahdo Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) si aan u fiirsanno horumarinta isticmaalaha iyo heerarka oo dhan. Si gaar ah, HUARN wuxuu qaataa xarunta hierarchical si uu u qoro hadal, sentence, iyo macluumaad heerka wargeyska. Then, user attention and aspect attention are introduced into building sentence and document level representation.  Muuqashada dukumentigu wuxuu ku xiran yahay isticmaalaha iyo macluumaadka rasmiga ah oo dhan si uu uga hor tago qeybaha ka fiirista. Arrimaha kala duduwan waxaa loo dhaqdhaqaaqaaqaa si kala duwan, waxaana la sameeyaa qashinka shaqada oo kala duduwan. Shaqo la’aanta labada macluumaad ee caalamiga ah waxay muujiyaan in HUARN gaadho xaalad-ka-farshaxanta.', 'sv': 'Dokumentnivå multi-aspect sentiment klassificering syftar till att förutsäga användarnas sentiment polariteter för olika aspekter av en produkt i en recension. Befintliga metoder fokuserar främst på textinformation. Emellertid ignoreras författarna (dvs användare) och de totala omdömena, vilka båda har visat sig vara betydelsefulla för att tolka känslor av olika aspekter i denna uppsats. Därför föreslår vi en modell som kallas Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) för att överväga användarpreferenser och övergripande betyg gemensamt. HUARN antar en hierarkisk arkitektur för att koda ord-, mening- och dokumentnivå information. Sedan introduceras användaruppmärksamhet och aspektuppmärksamhet i att bygga menings- och dokumentnivå representation. Dokumentrepresentationen kombineras med användar- och övergripande betygsinformation för att förutsäga aspektbedömningar av en granskning. Olika aspekter behandlas olika och ett ramverk för flera uppgifter antas. Empiriska resultat från två verkliga datauppsättningar visar att HUARN uppnår toppmoderna prestanda.', 'ta': 'ஆவண- மட்டத்தில் பல- பகுதி உணர்வு வகைப்பாடு பயனரின் உணர்வு தேர்வுகளை முன்விருப்பத்தில் பொருளின் வேறு விளைவுகளுக்கு முன்னோடுகி தற்போதைய நெருங்குதல் முக்கியமாக உரை தகவல் மீது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது. எனினும், எழுத்தாளர்கள் (அதாவது, பயனர்கள்) மற்றும் மொத்த முறையான பார்வைகள் புறக்கணிக்கப்படுகின்றன, இவை இரண்டும் இந்த காகிதத்தில் வேறு விஷயங்களின் உணர ஆகையால், நாங்கள் ஒரு மாதிரி முன்னுரிமையை பயன்படுத்துபவர் விரிவு வலைப்பின்னல் (HUARN) என்று அழைக்கப்படும் பயனர் முன்னுரிமை குறிப்பிட்டு, HUARN குறிப்பிட வார்த்தை, வாக்கு, மற்றும் ஆவண நிலையின் தகவல்களை குறியீட்டுக்கு ஒரு பரப்பு அட்டவணை பின்னர், பயனர் கவனம் மற்றும் பக்கம் கவனம் கட்ட வாக்கியத்தை மற்றும் ஆவண மட்டத்தின் குறிப்பிடப்படும். ஆவணம் குறிப்பிடுதல் பயனருடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் மொத்த விகிதத்தின் விகிதத்தை முன்விகிதத்தை முடிக் பல்வேறு பாகங்கள் வேறு வித்தியாசமாக சிகிச்சைக்கப்படுகின்றன மற்றும் பல பணி சட்டம் பெறுகிறது. Empirical results on two real-world datasets show that HUARN achieves state-of-the-art performances.', 'ur': "دفتر-سطح multi-aspect sentiment classification aims to predict user's sentiment polarities for different aspects of a product in a review. Existing approaches mainly focus on text information. لیکن لکھنے والے (یعنی کارساز) اور تمام ریٹینگ ریٹینگ ان دونوں کو اس کاغذ میں مختلف قسموں کی تعبیر کی تعبیر پر اہم ہے۔ لہٰذا ہم ایک مدل کی پیشنهاد کریں جس کا نام Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) ہے کہ کارساز ترجیح اور عمومی ریٹنگ کو مشترک سمجھیں۔ مخصوص طور پر، HUARN ایک حیراتیکل معماری مطابق لکھنے کے لئے لفظ، جماعت اور سند سطح کی اطلاعات کا کوڈ کرتا ہے. اس کے بعد، کارساز کی توجه اور منظور کی توجه جماعت اور دفتر سطح کی نمایش میں پیش کیے جاتے ہیں. دفتر کی نمایش یوسٹر اور عمومی ریٹینگ معلومات کے ساتھ تفریق کیا جاتا ہے کہ ایک ریٹینگ کی آسپٹ ریٹینگ کی پیش بینی کریں. مختلف اندازے مختلف طریقے سے درگزر کیے جاتے ہیں اور ایک بہت سے کام فرمود قبول کیے جاتے ہیں. دو حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ پر مصریح نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ HUARN نے اپنا وضعیت-آرت نمائش پہنچایا ہے.", 'uz': "Hujjat darajasi bir necha darajadagi hisobot darajasini koʻrsatish uchun foydalanuvchining hissiyotlarini tahrirlash mumkin. Mavjud boʻlgan murakkablar matn maʼlumotiga mos keladi. However, the authors (i.e. users) and overall ratings of reviews are ignored, both of which are proved to be significant on interpreting the sentiments of different aspects in this paper.  Shunday qilib, biz Hierarchik foydalanuvchisi Aspect Rating tarmoq (HUARN) bilan foydalanuvchi parametrlarini birlashtirish va umumiy qismlarni tasavvur qilish mumkin. @ info: status Keyin foydalanuvchi taqdimoti va murakkablar va hujjat darajasini taqdim qilish mumkin. Name Har xil aspektlar boshqa boshqa dastur qilinadi va bir necha vazifa freymi ishlatiladi. Ikki haqiqiqiy dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatish mumkin, HUARN bajarish holatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Phân loại đa thể cảm của người dùng cấp tài liệu nhằm dự đoán các quan điểm của người dùng về các khía cạnh khác nhau của một s ản phẩm. Các phương pháp hiện tại chủ yếu dựa vào thông tin. Tuy nhiên, các tác giả (người dùng) và đánh giá tổng thể các bài bình luận bị bỏ qua, cả hai đều được cho là rất quan trọng trong việc diễn tả các khía cạnh khác nhau trong tờ giấy này. Do đó, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình gọi là Hệ thống phân phối khía cạnh người dùng (HUARN) để cân nhắc ưu tiên người dùng và đánh giá chung. Theo cụ thể, HUARN sử dụng một cấu trúc cấp bậc để mã hóa thông tin về từ, bản án và mức tài liệu. Sau đó, người dùng chú ý và chú ý về khía cạnh xây dựng án và trình diện tài liệu. Tài liệu đại diện được kết hợp với thông tin người dùng và đánh giá tổng thể để dự đoán tỉ lệ hình thể của cuộc kiểm tra. Những khía cạnh khác nhau được đối xử khác nhau và một cơ chế đa nhiệm được chấp nhận. Có kết quả từ hai nhà dữ liệu thế giới thực cho thấy HUARN đạt được trình độ cao nhất.', 'nl': 'De classificatie van multi-aspect sentiment op documentniveau is bedoeld om de sentimentpolariteiten van gebruikers voor verschillende aspecten van een product in een review te voorspellen. De bestaande benaderingen richten zich voornamelijk op tekstinformatie. De auteurs (d.w.z. gebruikers) en de algemene beoordelingen van reviews worden echter genegeerd, die beide significant blijken te zijn bij de interpretatie van de sentiments van verschillende aspecten in dit artikel. Daarom stellen we een model voor genaamd Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) om gebruikersvoorkeuren en algemene beoordelingen gezamenlijk te overwegen. Met name hanteert HUARN een hiërarchische architectuur om informatie op woord-, zin- en documentniveau te coderen. Vervolgens worden gebruikersaandacht en aspect aandacht geïntroduceerd in het bouwen van zin- en documentniveau representatie. De documentweergave wordt gecombineerd met gebruikers- en algemene beoordelingsinformatie om aspect beoordelingen van een beoordeling te voorspellen. Diverse aspecten worden verschillend behandeld en er wordt een multitask kader aangenomen. Empirische resultaten op twee real-world datasets tonen aan dat HUARN state-of-the-art prestaties behaalt.', 'bg': 'Класификацията на сентимента на ниво документ има за цел да прогнозира сентименталните полярности на потребителя за различните аспекти на продукта в преглед. Съществуващите подходи се фокусират главно върху текстовата информация. Въпреки това, авторите (т.е. потребителите) и цялостната оценка на рецензиите са пренебрегнати, като и двете са доказани като значими при тълкуването на чувствата от различни аспекти в тази статия. Ето защо предлагаме модел, наречен Йерархична мрежа за оценка на потребителските аспекти (УАРН), за да се разгледат предпочитанията на потребителите и общите оценки съвместно. По-конкретно, приема йерархична архитектура за кодиране на информация на ниво дума, изречение и документ. След това вниманието на потребителя и вниманието на аспекта се въвеждат в изграждането на изречение и представяне на ниво документ. Представлението на документа се комбинира с потребителска и обща информация за оценка, за да се предвиди оценката на аспектите на преглед. Разнообразните аспекти се третират по различен начин и се приема многофункционална рамка. Емпиричните резултати от два набора от данни от реалния свят показват, че постига най-съвременни изпълнения.', 'id': 'Klasifikasi sentimen multi-aspek tingkat dokumen bertujuan untuk memprediksi polaritas sentimen pengguna untuk aspek berbeda dari produk dalam penelitian. Pendekatan yang ada terutama fokus pada informasi teks. Namun, para penulis (i.e. pengguna) dan nilai umum penelitian diabaikan, yang keduanya terbukti signifikan dalam interpretasi perasaan dari aspek yang berbeda dalam kertas ini. Oleh karena itu, kami mengusulkan model yang disebut Jaringan Penandaan Aspek Pengguna Hierarkis (HUARN) untuk mempertimbangkan keutamaan pengguna dan nilai keseluruhan bersama-sama. Khususnya, HUARN mengadopsi arsitektur hierarkis untuk mengkode kata, kalimat, dan informasi tingkat dokumen. Kemudian, perhatian pengguna dan perhatian aspek diperkenalkan dalam pembangunan kalimat dan representasi tingkat dokumen. Perwakilan dokumen dikombinasikan dengan informasi pengguna dan penilaian umum untuk memprediksi penilaian aspek dari penilaian. Diverse aspects are treated differently and a multi-task framework is adopted.  Hasil kerajaan pada dua set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa HUARN mencapai pertunjukan terbaik.', 'da': 'Klassificering af sentiment på dokumentniveau har til formål at forudsige brugerens sentiment polariteter for forskellige aspekter af et produkt i en anmeldelse. De eksisterende metoder fokuserer primært på tekstinformation. Forfatterne (dvs. brugerne) og de samlede vurderinger af anmeldelser ignoreres imidlertid, hvilket begge har vist sig at være betydningsfulde for fortolkningen af følelserne af forskellige aspekter i denne artikel. Derfor foreslår vi en model kaldet Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) for at overveje brugerpræferencer og samlede ratings i fællesskab. Specielt vedtager HUARN en hierarkisk arkitektur til at kode ord-, sætning- og dokumentniveau information. Derefter introduceres brugerens opmærksomhed og aspektopmærksomhed i opbygningen af sætninger og dokumentniveau repræsentation. Dokumentrepræsentationen kombineres med bruger- og overordnede vurderingsoplysninger for at forudsige aspektvurderinger af en anmeldelse. Forskellige aspekter behandles forskelligt, og der vedtages en ramme med flere opgaver. Empiriske resultater på to virkelige datasæt viser, at HUARN opnår state-of-the-art præstationer.', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija višeaspektskih osjećaja na razini dokumenta cilja je predvidjeti polaritet osjećaja korisnika za različite aspekte proizvoda u pregledu. Postojeći pristupi uglavnom se fokusiraju na tekstne informacije. Međutim, autori (tj. korisnici) i ukupne ocjene pregleda se ignoriraju, a obje od njih se dokazuju da su značajni za tumačenje osjećaja različitih aspekta u ovom papiru. Stoga predlažemo model pod nazivom Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) da zajedno razmotri preferenciju korisnika i ukupne ocjene. Posebno, HUARN usvoji hijerarhičku arhitekturu kako bi kodirao informacije o razini riječi, rečenice i dokumenta. Onda je pozornost korisnika i pozornost aspekta uvedena u zastupanje kazne i razine dokumenta. Predstava dokumenta je kombinirana s korisnikom i ukupnim informacijama o ocjenama za predviđanje ocjena aspekta preglede. Različiti aspekti se tretiraju drugačije i usvojen je višezadatačni okvir. Empirički rezultati na dva podataka o stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da HUARN postigne izvedbe u stanju umjetnosti.', 'de': 'Die mehrseitige Stimmungsklassifizierung auf Dokumentenebene zielt darauf ab, die Stimmungspolaritäten des Benutzers für verschiedene Aspekte eines Produkts in einer Rezension vorherzusagen. Bestehende Ansätze konzentrieren sich hauptsächlich auf Textinformationen. Allerdings werden die Autoren (d.h. Nutzer) und die Gesamtbewertungen von Rezensionen ignoriert, die sich als bedeutsam für die Interpretation der Stimmungen verschiedener Aspekte in diesem Beitrag erwiesen haben. Daher schlagen wir ein Modell namens Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) vor, um Benutzerpräferenzen und Gesamtbewertungen gemeinsam zu berücksichtigen. Insbesondere verwendet HUARN eine hierarchische Architektur, um Informationen auf Wort-, Satz- und Dokumentenebene zu codieren. Anschließend werden Benutzeraufmerksamkeit und Aspektaufmerksamkeit in die Darstellung auf Satz- und Dokumentenebene eingeführt. Die Dokumentdarstellung wird mit Benutzer- und Gesamtbewertungsinformationen kombiniert, um Aspektbewertungen einer Bewertung vorherzusagen. Unterschiedliche Aspekte werden unterschiedlich behandelt und ein Mehraufgabenrahmen verabschiedet. Empirische Ergebnisse an zwei realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass HUARN State-of-the-Art-Leistungen erzielt.', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya kiwango cha dokumentari vingi vina lengo la kutabiri hisia za uchaguzi wa mtumiaji kwa vipengele tofauti vya bidhaa katika tathmini. Maendeleo yanatokea yanajikita zaidi kwenye taarifa za maandishi. Hata hivyo, waandishi (yaani watumiaji) na taratibu zote za utafiti hupuuzwa, ambazo zote hizo zinaonyesha kuwa ni muhimu kuhusu tafsiri ya hisia za mambo tofauti katika karatasi hii. Kwa hiyo, tunapendekeza modeli inayoitwa mtumiaji wa Hierarchical Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) kutafakari upendeleo wa mtumiaji na taratibu za jumla pamoja. Kwa ujumla, HUARN huchukua ujenzi wa kimataifa ili kuweka ujumbe wa maneno, hukumu na taarifa za kiwango cha nyaraka. Then, user attention and aspect attention are introduced into building sentence and document level representation.  Uwakilishaji wa nyaraka umeunganishwa na mtumiaji na taarifa za jumla za kutabiri vipengele vya tafiti. Sehemu mbalimbali zinachukuliwa tofauti na mfumo wa kazi nyingi unachukuliwa. Matokeo ya matumaini kwenye takwimu mbili za dunia halisi yanaonyesha kwamba HUARN hufanikiwa matukio ya sanaa.', 'ko': '문서급 다방면 정서 분류는 사용자가 논평에서 제품에 대한 서로 다른 정서의 극성을 예측하는 데 목적을 둔다.기존의 방법은 주로 텍스트 정보에 주목한다.그러나 작가(즉 사용자)와 평론의 전체적인 평점은 무시되고 이 두 가지 요소는 본고에서 서로 다른 측면의 정서를 해석하는 데 중요한 의미를 가진다는 것을 증명했다.따라서 우리는 사용자 선호도와 전체 평점을 종합적으로 고려하기 위해 층별 사용자 측 평점 네트워크(HUARN)라는 모델을 제시했다.구체적으로 Huarn은 단어, 문장, 문서 수준의 정보를 인코딩하는 차원 구조를 채택했다.그리고 사용자의 주의와 측면의 주의를 문장과 문서급 표시에 도입한다.문서는 사용자와 전체 등급 평가 정보를 결합시켜 평론의 등급을 예측한다는 것을 나타낸다.서로 다른 방면의 처리 방식이 다르기 때문에 다중 임무 구조를 채택하였다.두 개의 실제 데이터 세트에서 실증한 결과 Huarn은 최첨단 성능을 구현했다.', 'fa': 'تنظیم احساسات مختلف مرحله\u200cهای سند را هدف می\u200cدهد که نقطه\u200cای احساسات کاربر را برای نقطه\u200cهای مختلف یک محصول در یک تحقیق پیش بینی کند. نزدیک\u200cهای موجود در اصل روی اطلاعات متن تمرکز کنید. با این حال، نویسندگان (یعنی کاربران) و مقدار عمومی از تحقیقات نادیده می\u200cگیرند، و هر دو از آن بر تفسیر احساسات متفاوت در این کاغذ ثابت شده است. به همین دلیل، ما یک مدل به نام شبکه نسخه\u200cهای نسخه\u200cهای کاربر هیئراریکی (HUARN) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا با هم برگزیدن ترجیح\u200cهای کاربر و ارزش\u200cهای عمومی را در نظر بگیریم. مخصوصاً HUARN یک معماری معماری معماری را برای رمزگذاری کلمه، جمله و اطلاعات سطح سند پذیرفته می\u200cکند. بعدش توجه و توجه منابع کاربر در ساختن جمله و نمایش سطح سند وارد می شوند. نمایش سند با کاربر و اطلاعات ارزش عمومی برای پیش\u200cبینی کردن ارزش\u200cهای نقطه\u200cای از یک بررسی ترکیب می\u200cشود. نقطه\u200cهای مختلف به صورت مختلف درمان می\u200cشوند و یک چهارچوب چندین کاری قبول می\u200cشود. نتایج امپراطوری در دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی نشان می\u200cدهد که HUARN اجرای موقعیت هنر را می\u200cرساند.', 'tr': 'Sened derejesi Çoklu-aspekt duýgularyny çalyşmak üçin ullançylaryň duýgularyny çalyşmak üçin önüme gidirýär. Öň bar ýagdaýlar metin maglumatynda üns berir. Ýöne awtoriler (myseläm ullançylar) we ähli süýtgewleriň ýüzüni seretmeýärler, ikisi hem bu gazetdeki farklı aspektleriň duýgularyny yorumda möhüm bolup görünýär. Şol sebäpli, biz ýerarhiýal Ullançy Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) ullançy tercihleri we ähli derejesini bir arada düşünmek üçin bir nusga teklip edýäris. Adatça, HUARN söz, sözlem we sened derejesi maglumaty kodlemek üçin bir iýerarhiýa arhitekturuny kabul edir. Soňra ulananlaryň ünsi we aspektleriň ünsi çözümler we sened derejesi suratynda guruldylar. Sened Namaýyşçysy Ullançy bilen birleştirilýär we çykyş etmek üçin döredilen mykdarlar bilen birleştirilýär. Çeşitli aspektler başga bir şekilde davranýar we birnäçe-täbli framda kabul edilýär. HUARN sanat eserleriniň durumyny ýetip biljekdigini görkez.', 'af': "Dokumentvlak multiaspekte sentiment klasifikasie doel om die gebruiker se sentimente polarisies te voorskou vir verskillende aspekte van 'n produkt in' n hersiening. Bestaande toegang is hoofsaaklik fokus op teks inligting. Maar die outeurs (i.e. gebruikers) en die hele ooreenstellings van hersienings word geïgnoreer, albei van hulle is bevestig dat dit betekeurig is om die sentimente van verskillende aspekte in hierdie papier te interpreteer. Daarom, ons voorstel 'n model genoem Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) om die gebruiker voorkeure en die hele reetings saam te beskou. Spesifieke, HUARN aanvaar 'n hierarkies arkitektuur om woord, seting en dokumentvlak inligting te kodeer. Dan word gebruiker aandag en aspekte aandag ingevoer in die bou van seting en dokumentvlak voorsiening. Die dokument voorstelling is gekombineer met gebruiker en die hele waarde inligting om aspekte waardes van 'n hersiening te voorskou. Verskeie aspekte word verskillende behandel en 'n multi-taak raamwerk is aangeneem. Enige resultate op twee regte wêreld-datastelle vertoon dat HUARN staat-van-kuns-uitvoerings bereik.", 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i ndjenjave të nivelit të dokumentit me shumë aspekte synon të parashikojë polaritetet e ndjenjave të përdoruesit për aspekte të ndryshme të një produkti në një përmbledhje. Përqafimet ekzistuese përqëndrohen kryesisht në informacionin e tekstit. Megjithatë, autorët (pra përdoruesit) dhe vlerësimet e përgjithshme të shqyrtimeve janë injoruar, të dy të cilat janë vërtetuar të rëndësishme në interpretimin e ndjenjave të aspekteve të ndryshme në këtë letër. Prandaj, ne propozojmë një model të quajtur Rrjeti Hierarkik i Vlerësimit të Aspektit të Përdoruesit (HUARN) për të konsideruar preferimin e përdoruesit dhe vlerësimet e përgjithshme së bashku. Specifikisht, HUARN miraton një arkitekturë hierarkike për të koduar fjalën, fjalën dhe informacionin e nivelit të dokumentit. Pastaj, vëmendja e përdoruesit dhe vëmendja e aspektit futen në ndërtimin e fjalëve dhe përfaqësimit të nivelit të dokumentit. Përfaqësuesi i dokumentit kombinohet me informacionin e përdoruesit dhe të përgjithshëm të vlerësimit për të parashikuar vlerësimet aspektore të një përmbledhjeje. Aspekte të ndryshme trajtohen ndryshe dhe miratohet një kuadër me shumë detyra. Rezultatet imperiale në dy grupe të dhënash të botës reale tregojnë se HUARN arrin shfaqje më të larta.', 'hy': 'Թղթերի մակարդակի բազմաասպեկտների զգացմունքների դասակարգման նպատակն է կանխատեսել օգտագործողի զգացմունքների կողմնականությունը արտադրանքի տարբեր ասպեկտների համար վերլուծության մեջ: Գոյություն ունեցող մոտեցումները հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են տեքստի ինֆորմացիայի վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, հեղինակները (այսինքն՝ օգտագործողները) և վերլուծումների ընդհանուր գնահատականները անտեսվում են, որոնք երկուսն էլ պարզվում են նշանակալի են այս թղթի տարբեր ասպեկտների արտահայտության մեջ: Այսպիսով, մենք առաջարկում ենք մի մոդել, որը կոչվում է Հիերարխիկ օգտագործողի հարաբերությունների ցանց (HUARN), որպեսզի հաշվի առնենք օգտագործողի նախընտրությունները և ընդհանուր գնահատականները միասին: Հատկապես, HUARN-ը ընդունում է հիերարխիկ ճարտարապետություն բառերի, նախադասությունների և փաստաթղթի մակարդակի տեղեկատվության կոդավորման համար: Այնուհետև օգտագործողների ուշադրությունը և ասպեկտները ներկայացվում են նախադասությունների և փաստաթղթերի մակարդակի ներկայացման կառուցվածքում: Փաստողի ներկայացումը համադրվում է օգտագործողի և ընդհանուր գնահատականների ինֆորմացիայի հետ, որպեսզի կանխատեսի վերանայման ասպեկտների գնահատականները: Տարբեր ասպեկտները վերաբերվում են տարբեր կերպ և ընդունվում է բազմախնդիրների շրջանակ: Երկու իրական աշխարհի տվյալների կայսրական արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ HUARN-ը հասնում է ամենաբարձր ներկայացումներին:', 'am': 'ሰነድ-ደረጃ በብዙ እውቀት መግለጫ የተጠቃሚውን ስሜት ምርጫዎች በተለያዩ የፍሬት ጉዳይ ላይ ለመቀበል ይችላል፡፡ የአሁኑ ደረጃዎች የጽሑፍ መረጃ በመጠንቀቅ ይምረጡ። ነገር ግን ጸሐፊዎቹ (ምናልባት ተጠቃሚዎች) እና የሙሉ መልዕክቶች ተሳሳትተዋል፡፡ Therefore, we propose a model called Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) to consider user preference and overall ratings jointly.  በተለየ ጊዜ HUARN ቃላት፣ ፍርድ እና የሰነድ ደረጃ መረጃዎችን ለማቀናጃ የሚወስድ የሀይራርክ መሠረት ይይዛል፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ ተጠቃሚው ትኩረት እና የፊደል ትኩረት ለፍርድ እና የሰነድ ደረጃዎች መልዕክት እንዲገልጽ ነው፡፡ የሰነዱ መልዕክት በተጠቃሚ እና የክፍለ መረጃ ማቀናጃ ለመቀበል የፊደል ክፍል አካላትን ለመጠየቅ ነው፡፡ የተለያዩ ጉዳዮች ልዩ ሆኖ ይቆማሉ፣ የብዙ አድራሻ ፍሬም ይደረጋል፡፡ በሁለቱ እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታዎች ላይ የውጤት ፍሬቶች HUARN የ-አርእስት ግዛት እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Dökümət seviyesi çoxlu-aspekt hissləri klasifikasiyası istifadəçin in hisslərinin polaritisini müxtəlif tərzlərinə baxmaq məqsədilədir. Bütün məlumat məlumatının üstündə məlumatlarına odaqlanır. Lakin, yazıcılar (istifadəçilər) və bütün dəyişikliklər görmədilər, hər ikisi də bu kağızdaki fərqli aspektlərin hisslərinin yorumlandırmasında mövcuddur. Buna görə də istifadəçilərin seçimləri və bütün dəyişiklikləri birlikdə düşünmək üçün Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) adlı modeli təklif edirik. Şübhəsiz ki, HUARN sözləri, sözləri və belə səviyyə məlumatlarını kodlamaq üçün hiyerarşik arhitektura istifadə edir. Sonra istifadəçilərin məlumatı və aspekt məlumatı cümləmə və dökümət seviyyəsi göstəricisinə daxil edilir. Dökümət göstəricisi istifadəçi ilə birləşdirilmiş və dəyişiklik məlumatlarını gözləyir. Müxtəlif aspektlər fərqli tərzdə tətbiq edilir və çoxlu iş framework ü qəbul edilir. İki həqiqət dünya verilənlərin iməlikli sonuçları HUARN sanat performanslarını başa çatdığını göstərir.', 'bn': 'ডকুমেন্ট-স্তরের মাল্টিপেক্টের অনুভূতি বিভিন্ন প্রজেক্টের বিভিন্ন দিকের জন্য ব্যবহারকারীর মনোভাব নির্বাচনের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে। বিদ্যমান টেক্সট তথ্যের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করা হচ্ছে। তবে লেখকদের (যেমন ব্যবহারকারীরা) এবং সাধারণ পর্যবেক্ষণের মানুষগুলো উপেক্ষা করা হয়েছে, এই পত্রিকায় বিভিন্ন দিকের অনুভূতি ব্যাখ্যা করার জন্য উভয়কে  Therefore, we propose a model called Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) to consider user preference and overall ratings jointly.  বিশেষ করে, হুয়ার্ন শব্দ, বাক্য এবং নথি স্তর তথ্য এনকোড করার জন্য একটি হিয়ারেরার্কিয়াল কাঠামো গ্রহণ করে। তারপর ব্যবহারকারীর দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির প্রতিনিধিত্বে মনোযোগ প্রদান করা হয়েছে শাস্তি এবং নথ নথির প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহারকারীর সাথে একত্রিত এবং পুনরাবৃত্তির প্রেক্ষাপটের রেজেন্টের প্রতিনিধির সাথে  বিভিন্ন প্রাক্ষাপগুলো ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাবে চিকিৎসা করা হয় এবং একটি বহুকাজ দুই বাস্তব বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটগুলোতে সম্মানিত ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে হুয়ার্নের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের কাজ অর্জন করে।', 'cs': 'Klasifikace sentimentů na úrovni dokumentu má za cíl předpovídat polarity sentimentů uživatelů pro různé aspekty produktu v recenzi. Stávající přístupy se zaměřují především na textové informace. Nicméně autori (tj. uživatelé) a celkové hodnocení recenzí jsou ignorovány, z nichž se ukázalo, že oba jsou významné pro interpretaci sentimentů různých aspektů v tomto článku. Proto navrhujeme model s názvem Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN), který společně zohlední preference uživatelů a celkové hodnocení. Konkrétně HUARN přijímá hierarchickou architekturu pro kódování informací na úrovni slova, věty a dokumentů. Poté je zavedena pozornost uživatele a pozornost aspektů do reprezentace na úrovni věty a dokumentu. Reprezentace dokumentu je kombinována s informacemi o uživateli a celkovém hodnocení pro předpověď hodnocení aspektů recenze. S různými aspekty se zachází odlišně a je přijat rámec pro více úkolů. Empirické výsledky dvou reálných datových sad ukazují, že HUARN dosahuje nejmodernějších výkonů.', 'ca': "La classificació de sentiment s multiaspectes a nivell documental mira a predir la polaritat del sentiment de l'usuari per diferents aspectes d'un producte en una revisió. Els enfocaments existents es centren principalment en la informació de text. Tot i així, els autors (és a dir, els usuaris) i les valoracions globals de les revisions s'ignoren, les dues que s'ha demostrat ser significatives en interpretar els sentiments de diferents aspectes d'aquest paper. Per tant, proposem un model anomenat Red Hierarquical User Aspect Rating (HUARN) per considerar conjuntament la preferència dels usuaris i les valoracions globals. En concret, HUARN adopta una arquitectura jeràrquica per codificar paraules, frases i informació sobre nivell documental. Then, user attention and aspect attention are introduced into building sentence and document level representation.  La representació del document està combinada amb informació d'usuari i de valoració global per predir les valoracions aspectes d'una revisió. Els diversos aspectes es tracten de manera diferent i s'adopta un marc multitascat. Els resultats empírics de dos conjunts de dades del món real mostren que HUARN aconsegueix actuacions més avançades.", 'et': 'Dokumenditasemel mitmeaspektilise sentimentaalse klassifikatsiooni eesmärk on ennustada kasutaja sentimentaalseid polaarsusi toote erinevate aspektide puhul ülevaates. Olemasolevad lähenemisviisid keskenduvad peamiselt tekstiteabele. Kuid arvustuste autorid (st kasutajad) ja üldised hinnangud ignoreeritakse, mis mõlemad on osutunud oluliseks erinevate aspektide tõlgendamisel käesolevas artiklis. Seetõttu pakume välja mudeli nimega Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN), et kaaluda kasutaja eelistusi ja üldisi hinnanguid ühiselt. Täpsemalt võtab HUARN kasutusele hierarhilise arhitektuuri sõna-, lause- ja dokumenditaseme teabe kodeerimiseks. Seejärel lisatakse kasutaja tähelepanu ja aspekti tähelepanu lause- ja dokumenditaseme esindamisse. Dokumendi esitus kombineeritakse kasutaja- ja üldise hinnanguteabega, et prognoosida ülevaate aspektihinnanguid. Mitmesuguseid aspekte käsitletakse erinevalt ja võetakse vastu mitmeülesandeline raamistik. Kahe reaalmaailma andmekogumi empiirilised tulemused näitavad, et HUARN saavutab tipptasemel esitusi.', 'bs': 'Klasifikacija sentiment a multiaspekta na nivou dokumenta je cilj predvidjeti polaritet osjećaja korisnika za različite aspekte proizvoda u pregledu. Postojeći pristupi uglavnom se fokusiraju na tekstne informacije. Međutim, autori (tj. korisnici) i ukupne ocjene pregleda se ignoriraju, a oba se dokazuju da su značajne za tumačenje osjećaja različitih aspekta u ovom papiru. Stoga predlažemo model pod nazivom Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) da zajedno razmotri preferenciju korisnika i ukupne ocjene. Posebno, HUARN usvoji hijerarhičku arhitekturu kako bi kodirao informacije o razini riječi, rečenice i dokumenta. Onda se pozornost korisnika i pozornost aspekta uvede u izgradnju rečenice i predstavljanje nivoa dokumenta. Predstava dokumenta je kombinovana sa korisnikom i ukupnim informacijama o ocjenama za predviđanje ocjena aspekta preglede. Različiti aspekti se tretiraju drugačije i usvojen je višezadatačni okvir. Empirički rezultati na dvije podatke iz stvarnog svijeta pokazuju da HUARN postigne predstave države umjetnosti.', 'fi': 'Asiakirjatason monitasoisen tunteiden luokittelun tavoitteena on ennustaa käyttäjän tunteiden polariteetteja tuotteen eri osa-alueilla arvostelussa. Nykyisissä lähestymistavoissa keskitytään pääasiassa tekstitietoon. Arvostelujen kirjoittajat (eli käyttäjät) ja kokonaisarviot jätetään kuitenkin huomiotta, jotka molemmat osoittautuvat merkittäviksi tulkittaessa mielipiteitä eri näkökulmista tässä artikkelissa. Siksi ehdotamme Hierarchical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN) -mallia, joka tarkastelee käyttäjien mieltymyksiä ja yleisiä arvioita yhdessä. HUARN käyttää hierarkkista arkkitehtuuria sanan, lauseen ja dokumentin tason tietojen koodaamiseen. Tämän jälkeen käyttäjän huomio ja näkökulman huomio otetaan käyttöön lause- ja asiakirjatason esitysten rakentamisessa. Asiakirjan esitys yhdistetään käyttäjän ja yleisen luokitustiedon kanssa arvostelun aspektiluokituksen ennustamiseksi. Erilaisia näkökohtia käsitellään eri tavoin, ja siinä otetaan käyttöön monitehtävä. Empiiriset tulokset kahdesta reaalimaailman aineistosta osoittavat, että HUARN saavuttaa huipputason performansseja.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Learn Mode politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Kaya, kéné gunakake model sing dikenakno Jeara-Pilihan Utek Aspect rationg Network (HUDN) kanggo ngubah pengaturan karo akeh barang sampeyan. user politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Multi-task Resulita empir sing nganggo dataset sing paling iki dadi iki bakal dumadhi iki bakal sing perusahaan HWAR dumadhi perusahaan-perusahaan-perusahaan', 'ha': "Classify na-daraja na multi-aspecti na takardar-takardar don ya yi amfani da wajen ƙayyade surori masu amfani da matsayin daban-dabam cikin biralisar da ke nuna. @ action: button A lokacin da, za'a ƙyale marubuci (misali masu amfani da mazaɓa) da rabon musamman dukansu, dukansu na jarraba su da muhimu ga fassarar saurãren masu cikin takardan wannan. Saboda haka, Munã goyyar da wani misali wanda ake kiran na Hierrrchical Use Aspect Rat NetworkManager (HURN) dõmin a yi tunãni game da zaɓen amfani da kuma tsakanin sami haɗi. A ƙayyade, HUYAN na zãɓi wani matsayi na taƙaitacce wa kodi maganar, maganar da maɓallin takardar. A sa'an nan, za'a ƙõna wa mai amfani da wato masu ƙaranci zuwa tsarin maganar da mai tsari ga takardar. @ action: button Ana yi amfani da su masu variant kuma an zãɓe wani firam mai yawa. Imirical matsala a kan data-biyu masu gaske na dũniya yana nuna cewa HURN ta sami halin-of-the-art.", 'sk': 'Cilj razvrstitve več vidikov sentimenta na ravni dokumenta je napovedati uporabnikove sentimentalne polarnosti za različne vidike izdelka v pregledu. Obstoječi pristopi se osredotočajo predvsem na besedilne informacije. Vendar pa se avtorji (tj. uporabniki) in splošne ocene recenzij ne upoštevajo, kar se je izkazalo za pomembno pri interpretaciji mnenj različnih vidikov v tem prispevku. Zato predlagamo model Hierarhical User Aspect Rating Network (HUARN), ki skupaj upošteva nastavitve uporabnikov in splošne ocene. Zlasti HUARN sprejme hierarhično arhitekturo za kodiranje informacij na ravni besede, stavka in dokumenta. Nato se pozornost uporabnika in pozornost vidika vnese v gradnjo stavkov in predstavitve na ravni dokumenta. Predstavitev dokumenta je združena z uporabniškimi in splošnimi informacijami ocene za napoved ocene vidikov pregleda. Različni vidiki se obravnavajo različno in sprejema se večnalni okvir. Empirični rezultati dveh resničnih naborov podatkov kažejo, da HUARN dosega najsodobnejše predstave.', 'he': 'מסווג רגשות מרובים ברמה מסמכים מתכוון לחזות את קוטביות הרגשות של המשתמש לנקודות שונים של מוצר בבדיקה. Existing approaches mainly focus on text information.  עם זאת, הסופרים (כלומר משתמשים) והציונים הכלליים של ביקורות מתעלמים, שניהם הוכיחים להיות משמעותיים על פירוש הרגשות של היבטים שונים בעיתון הזה. לכן, אנו מציעים מודל שנקרא רשת מערכת האפקט של המשתמשים הייררכית (HUARN) כדי לשקול את העדיפות של המשתמש ואת הערכות כלליות ביחד. במיוחד, HUARN מאמץ ארכיטקטורה היררכית כדי לקוד מילה, משפט, ומידע רמת המסמכים. ואז, תשומת לב המשתמש והתשומת לב היבט מוצגת לתוך משפט בניין ומייצג רמת המסמכים. The document representation is combined with user and overall rating information to predict aspect ratings of a review.  היבטים שונים מתייחסים בצורה שונה ומסגרת משימות רבות מאומצת. Empirical results on two real-world datasets show that HUARN achieves state-of-the-art performances.', 'bo': 'ཡིག གནས་ཡུལ་ཡོད་པའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་པ ཡིན་ནའང་། རྩོམ་པ་པོ་དག (དཔེར་ན། སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་ཚད་རྐྱེན་ཡོངས་སྣང་མེད་བསྐྱུར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདི་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་ག དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Specifically, HUARN adopts a hierarchical architecture to encode word, sentence, and document level information. དེ་ནས་སྤྱོད་མཁན ཡིག་གེའི་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ནི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་དང་རིམ་པ་བསྡུས་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུས་ཡོད་པ དབྱེ་རིགས་འདྲ་བ་སོ་སོ་སོ་ལ་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་ཆས་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱིན་ཡོད། རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ཚོ་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་HUARN་གིས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་སྒྲ'}
{'en': 'Leveraging Meta-Embeddings for Bilingual Lexicon Extraction from Specialized Comparable Corpora', 'ar': 'الاستفادة من عمليات التضمين الفوقية لاستخراج المعجم ثنائي اللغة من Corpora المتخصصة المقارنة', 'es': 'Aprovechamiento de metaincrustaciones para la extracción bilingüe de léxico de corpus comparables especializados', 'fr': "Exploitation des méta-intégrations pour l'extraction de lexiques bilingues à partir de corpus comparables spécialisés", 'pt': 'Aproveitando Meta-Embeddings para Extração de Léxico Bilíngue de Corpora Comparáveis Especializados', 'ja': 'バイリンガルレキシコン抽出のためのメタ埋め込みの活用', 'zh': '利用元嵌取双语词典于语料库', 'ru': 'Использование мета-вложений для извлечения двуязычного лексикона из специализированных сопоставимых тел', 'hi': 'विशेष तुलनीय निगम से द्विभाषी शब्दकोश निष्कर्षण के लिए मेटा-एम्बेडिंग का लाभ उठाना', 'ga': 'Meitea-Leabaithe a Ghiaráil le haghaidh Eastóscadh Foclóir Dhátheangach ó Chorpóra Inchomparáide Speisialaithe', 'hu': 'Meta-beágyazások hasznosítása a kétnyelvű lexikon kivonáshoz a speciális összehasonlítható Corporából', 'el': 'Αξιοποίηση μετα-ενσωμάτωσης για διγλωσσή εξαγωγή λεξικού από εξειδικευμένο συγκρίσιμο σώμα', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Қосымша лексикан тарқату үшін мета- ендіру үшін Сәйкестік Корпорасынан', 'it': "Sfruttare i Meta-Embedding per l'estrazione bilingue del lessico da corpora comparabile specializzata", 'mk': 'Разголемување на мета- вградувањата за двојно екстракција на лексикони од специјализирана споредлива корпора', 'lt': 'Meta įrangos, skirtos dvikalbiam leksikonui ekstrahuoti iš specializuotos palyginamosios korporos, naudojimas', 'ms': 'Menyerangkan Meta-Embedding untuk Ekstraksi Lexikon Bilingual dari Korpora Dibandingkan Khas', 'ml': 'ബിലിങ്കുള്\u200d ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d എക്സ്ട്രേക്ഷന്\u200d വേണ്ടി മെറ്റ- എമ്പെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന കോര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Leveraging Meta-Embeddings for Bilingual Lexicon Extraction from Specialized Comparable Corpora', 'mn': 'Хоёр дахин хоёр дахин лексикон хайлтын мета-интервенцүүд', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie meta-osadzeń do ekstrakcji dwujęzycznego leksykonu ze specjalistycznego porównywalnego korpusu', 'no': 'Leverer metainnbyggingar for utpakking av bilinguelt leksjon frå spesialiserte kompatibelt korpora', 'ro': 'Utilizarea metaîncorporărilor pentru extragerea bilingvă a lexiconului din corpora comparabilă specializată', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Soo diritaanka Meta-Embedding for Bilingual Lexicon Extraction from Specialized Comparable Corpora', 'sr': 'Uticavajući meta-integraciju za izvlačenje bilingualnih leksijuna iz specijalizovane usporedne korpore', 'sv': 'Utnyttja metainbäddningar för tvåspråkig Lexikonextraktion från specialiserad jämförbar Corpora', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'சிறப்பு ஒப்பீடுபடும் கோர்போராவிலிருந்து பில்லிங்கல் லெக்சிகோன் வெளியேற்றுவதற்கான மெடா- உட்பொதிங்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đáng yêu siêu môi trường cho ngôn ngữ hóa học chiết xuất từ Cơ thể đối tượng đặc biệt', 'bg': 'Използване на мета-вграждания за двуезично извличане на лексикони от специализирани сравними корпуси', 'hr': 'Uzbudljivanje meta-integracije za ekstrakciju bilingualnog leksiona iz specijalizirane usporedne korpore', 'nl': 'Gebruik maken van meta-embeddings voor tweetalige Lexiconextractie uit gespecialiseerde vergelijkbare corpora', 'da': 'Udnyttelse af Meta-Embeddings til tosproget Lexikon udtrækning fra specialiseret sammenlignelig Corpora', 'de': 'Nutzung von Meta-Embeddings für die zweisprachige Lexikon-Extraktion aus spezialisierten vergleichbaren Korpora', 'ko': '원 삽입을 이용하여 전문 비교 자료 라이브러리에서 이중 언어 어휘를 추출하다', 'id': 'Menyerangkan Meta-Embeddings untuk Ekstraksi Lexikon Bilingual dari Korpora Dibandingkan Spesialisasi', 'fa': 'تحت تأثیر استخراج Meta- Embedding for Bilingual Lexicon Extraction from Specialized Comparable Corpora', 'sw': 'Kuandika Ujumbe wa Utoa wa Lexico kwa lugha ya Kiingereza kutoka Korpora inayofanana', 'sq': 'Duke nxjerrë metatë për ekstraksionin e lexikonëve dygjuhës nga korpora e përshkruar e krahasueshme', 'tr': 'Çiri baglanç leksiýan Açmak üçin Meta-Edilmeler Çykarylýar', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ማተሚያ ፕሮግራም', 'bn': 'বিশেষ কর্পোরা থেকে বিলিঙ্গুয়াল লেক্সিকোর এক্সট্র্যাকশনের জন্য লেভারেজিং মেটা-এমবেডিং', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Çiftli Körpür Korporadan İkinci Lexicon Çıqarması üçün Meta-İdxalatları', 'ca': "Extensionar les meta-incorporacions per l'extracció bilingüe de Lexicons de la Corpora Comparable Specialitzada", 'cs': 'Využití meta-vložení pro extrakci dvojjazyčného slovníku ze specializovaného srovnatelného korpusu', 'et': 'Metamanustuste kasutamine kahekeelse leksikoni ekstraheerimiseks spetsialiseeritud võrreldavast korpusest', 'bs': 'Uticavajući meta-integraciju za izvlačenje bilingualnih leksijuna iz specijalizirane usporedne korpore', 'fi': 'Meta-upotusten hyödyntäminen kaksikieliseen Lexicon Extraction Specialized Comparable Corporasta', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Izkoriščanje metavdelav za dvojezično ekstrakcijo leksikona iz specializiranih primerljivih korpusov', 'he': 'Leveraging Meta-Embeddings for Bilingual Lexicon Extraction from Specialized Comparable Corpora', 'bo': 'Leveraging Meta-Embeddings for Bilingual Lexicon Extraction from Specialized Comparable Corpora'}
{'en': 'Recent evaluations on bilingual lexicon extraction from specialized comparable corpora have shown contrasted performance while using word embedding models. This can be partially explained by the lack of large specialized comparable corpora to build efficient representations. Within this context, we try to answer the following questions : First, (i) among the state-of-the-art embedding models, whether trained on specialized corpora or pre-trained on large general data sets, which one is the most appropriate model for bilingual terminology extraction? Second (ii) is it worth it to combine multiple embeddings trained on different data sets? For that purpose, we propose the first systematic evaluation of different word embedding models for bilingual terminology extraction from specialized comparable corpora. We emphasize how the character-based embedding model outperforms other models on the quality of the extracted bilingual lexicons. Further more, we propose a new efficient way to combine different embedding models learned from specialized and general-domain data sets. Our approach leads to higher performance than the best individual embedding model.', 'ar': 'أظهرت التقييمات الحديثة لاستخراج المعجم ثنائي اللغة من مجموعات متخصصة قابلة للمقارنة أداءً متباينًا أثناء استخدام نماذج تضمين الكلمات. يمكن تفسير ذلك جزئيًا من خلال عدم وجود شركات كبيرة متخصصة قابلة للمقارنة لبناء تمثيلات فعالة. في هذا السياق ، نحاول الإجابة على الأسئلة التالية: أولاً ، (1) من بين أحدث نماذج التضمين ، سواء كانت مدربة على مجموعات متخصصة أو مدربة مسبقًا على مجموعات بيانات عامة كبيرة ، أيهما هو الأنسب نموذج لاستخراج المصطلحات ثنائية اللغة؟ ثانيًا (2) هل يستحق الجمع بين عدة حفلات زفاف مدربة على مجموعات بيانات مختلفة؟ لهذا الغرض ، نقترح أول تقييم منهجي لنماذج مختلفة لتضمين الكلمات لاستخراج المصطلحات ثنائية اللغة من مجموعات متخصصة قابلة للمقارنة. نؤكد كيف يتفوق نموذج التضمين المستند إلى الأحرف على النماذج الأخرى في جودة المعاجم ثنائية اللغة المستخرجة. علاوة على ذلك ، نقترح طريقة فعالة جديدة للجمع بين نماذج التضمين المختلفة المستفادة من مجموعات البيانات المتخصصة والعامة. نهجنا يؤدي إلى أداء أعلى من أفضل نموذج تضمين فردي.', 'es': 'Las evaluaciones recientes sobre la extracción bilingüe de léxico de cuerpos comparables especializados han demostrado un rendimiento contrastado al utilizar modelos de incrustación de palabras. Esto puede explicarse en parte por la falta de grandes corpus especializados comparables para construir representaciones eficientes. Dentro de este contexto, tratamos de responder a las siguientes preguntas: Primero, (i) entre los modelos de incrustación de última generación, ya sea capacitados en corpus especializados o previamente entrenados en grandes conjuntos de datos generales, ¿cuál es el modelo más adecuado para la extracción de terminología bilingüe? Segundo (ii) ¿vale la pena combinar múltiples incorporaciones capacitadas en diferentes conjuntos de datos? Para ello, proponemos la primera evaluación sistemática de diferentes modelos de incrustación de palabras para la extracción de terminología bilingüe de cuerpos comparables especializados. Hacemos hincapié en cómo el modelo de incrustación basado en caracteres supera a otros modelos en la calidad de los léxicos bilingües extraídos. Además, proponemos una nueva forma eficiente de combinar diferentes modelos de incrustación aprendidos de conjuntos de datos especializados y de dominio general. Nuestro enfoque conduce a un rendimiento superior al del mejor modelo de incrustación individual.', 'pt': 'Avaliações recentes sobre extração de léxico bilíngue de corpora comparáveis especializados mostraram desempenho contrastante ao usar modelos de incorporação de palavras. Isso pode ser parcialmente explicado pela falta de grandes corpora comparáveis especializados para construir representações eficientes. Dentro desse contexto, tentamos responder as seguintes questões: Primeiro, (i) entre os modelos de incorporação de última geração, sejam treinados em corpora especializados ou pré-treinados em grandes conjuntos de dados gerais, qual é o mais adequado modelo para extração de terminologia bilíngue? Segundo (ii) vale a pena combinar vários embeddings treinados em diferentes conjuntos de dados? Para isso, propomos a primeira avaliação sistemática de diferentes modelos de incorporação de palavras para extração de terminologia bilíngue de corpora comparáveis especializados. Enfatizamos como o modelo de incorporação baseado em caracteres supera outros modelos na qualidade dos léxicos bilíngues extraídos. Além disso, propomos uma nova maneira eficiente de combinar diferentes modelos de incorporação aprendidos de conjuntos de dados especializados e de domínio geral. Nossa abordagem leva a um desempenho mais alto do que o melhor modelo de incorporação individual.', 'fr': "Des évaluations récentes sur l'extraction de lexiques bilingues à partir de corpus spécialisés comparables ont montré des performances contrastées lors de l'utilisation de modèles d'intégration de mots. Cela peut s'expliquer en partie par l'absence de grands corpus comparables spécialisés permettant de construire des représentations efficaces. Dans ce contexte, nous tentons de répondre aux questions suivantes\xa0: Premièrement, (i) parmi les modèles d'intégration de pointe, qu'ils soient formés sur des corpus spécialisés ou préformés sur de grands ensembles de données générales, quel est le modèle le plus approprié pour l'extraction terminologique bilingue\xa0? Deuxièmement (ii) vaut-il la peine de combiner plusieurs intégrations formées sur différents ensembles de données\xa0? À cette fin, nous proposons la première évaluation systématique de différents modèles d'intégration de mots pour l'extraction terminologique bilingue à partir de corpus spécialisés comparables. Nous soulignons comment le modèle d'intégration basé sur les caractères surpasse les autres modèles en termes de qualité des lexiques bilingues extraits. De plus, nous proposons un nouveau moyen efficace de combiner différents modèles d'intégration appris à partir d'ensembles de données spécialisés et du domaine général. Notre approche permet d'obtenir des performances supérieures à celles du meilleur modèle d'intégration individuel.", 'ja': '専門的な同等のコーラからのバイリンガル辞書抽出に関する最近の評価は、単語埋め込みモデルを使用している間に対照的なパフォーマンスを示しています。 これは、効率的な表現を構築するための大規模な専門的な同等の体の欠如によって部分的に説明できる。 この文脈では、次の質問に答えようとしています。まず、(i)専門的な組織で訓練されているか、大規模な一般的なデータセットで事前に訓練されているかにかかわらず、最先端の埋め込みモデルのうち、バイリンガル用語抽出に最も適切なモデルはどれですか？ 2番目の(ii)異なるデータセットでトレーニングされた複数の埋め込みを組み合わせる価値はありますか？ そのために、専門的な同等の組織からのバイリンガル用語抽出のための異なる単語埋め込みモデルの最初の体系的評価を提案します。 抽出されたバイリンガル辞書の品質に関して、文字ベースの埋め込みモデルが他のモデルよりもどのように優れているかを強調します。 さらに、専門的および一般的なドメインデータセットから学んださまざまな埋め込みモデルを組み合わせる新しい効率的な方法を提案します。 当社のアプローチは、最高の個々の埋め込みモデルよりも高いパフォーマンスにつながります。', 'zh': '近取双语词典评于语料库,用词嵌模,双语词典性较明。 此可以说为乏大之业,比语料库以立效者也。 背景此以下:先(i)最先进者嵌之,语料库上练与大通用数据集上预训练之,孰宜双语术语取? 其次(ii)合数集上训练者数嵌之可乎? 为立对不同词嵌模首系统评估,以取双语术语于语料库。 我们强调基于字符的嵌入模形在提取的双语词典质量上如何优于他模样。 又立新效以合专用、通用域数集中学习不同。 我们的方法比最好的单个嵌入模样有更高的性能。', 'hi': 'विशेष तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट से द्विभाषी शब्दकोश निष्कर्षण पर हाल के मूल्यांकन ने शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का उपयोग करते समय विपरीत प्रदर्शन दिखाया है। यह आंशिक रूप से कुशल प्रतिनिधित्व बनाने के लिए बड़े विशेष तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट की कमी से समझाया जा सकता है। इस संदर्भ में, हम निम्नलिखित प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने की कोशिश करते हैं: सबसे पहले, (i) अत्याधुनिक एम्बेडिंग मॉडल के बीच, चाहे विशेष कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रशिक्षित हो या बड़े सामान्य डेटा सेट पर पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित हो, द्विभाषी शब्दावली निष्कर्षण के लिए सबसे उपयुक्त मॉडल कौन सा है? दूसरा (ii) क्या विभिन्न डेटा सेटों पर प्रशिक्षित कई एम्बेडिंग को संयोजित करना इसके लायक है? उस उद्देश्य के लिए, हम विशेष तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट से द्विभाषी शब्दावली निष्कर्षण के लिए विभिन्न शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल के पहले व्यवस्थित मूल्यांकन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम इस बात पर जोर देते हैं कि चरित्र-आधारित एम्बेडिंग मॉडल निकाले गए द्विभाषी शब्दकोशों की गुणवत्ता पर अन्य मॉडलों को कैसे मात देता है। इसके अलावा, हम विशेष और सामान्य डोमेन डेटा सेट से सीखे गए विभिन्न एम्बेडिंग मॉडल को संयोजित करने के लिए एक नया कुशल तरीका प्रस्तावित करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण सबसे अच्छा व्यक्तिगत एम्बेडिंग मॉडल की तुलना में उच्च प्रदर्शन की ओर जाता है।', 'ru': 'Недавние оценки извлечения двуязычного лексикона из специализированных сопоставимых корпусов показали контрастную эффективность при использовании моделей вложения слов. Частично это можно объяснить отсутствием крупных специализированных сопоставимых корпораций для создания эффективных представительств. В этом контексте мы пытаемся ответить на следующие вопросы: во-первых, i) какая из современных моделей встраивания, будь то подготовка на специализированных корпусах или предварительная подготовка на больших общих наборах данных, является наиболее подходящей моделью для извлечения двуязычной терминологии? Во-вторых, ii) стоит ли комбинировать несколько вложений, подготовленных на основе различных наборов данных? С этой целью мы предлагаем первую систематическую оценку различных моделей встраивания слов для извлечения двуязычной терминологии из специализированных сопоставимых корпусов. Мы подчеркиваем, что основанная на символах модель встраивания превосходит другие модели по качеству извлеченных двуязычных лексиконов. Кроме того, мы предлагаем новый эффективный способ комбинирования различных моделей встраивания, извлеченных из специализированных наборов данных и наборов данных в общей области. Наш подход приводит к более высокой производительности, чем лучшая индивидуальная модель встраивания.', 'ga': 'Léirigh meastóireachtaí a rinneadh le déanaí ar eastóscadh foclóir dátheangach ó shainchorpóra inchomparáide feidhmíocht chodarsnachta agus úsáid á baint as samhlacha leabaithe focal. Is féidir é seo a mhíniú i bpáirt ag an easpa sainchorparáide inchomparáide chun léiriúcháin éifeachtacha a chruthú. Laistigh den chomhthéacs seo, déanaimid iarracht na ceisteanna seo a leanas a fhreagairt: Ar an gcéad dul síos, (i) i measc na múnlaí leabú úrscothach, bíodh siad oilte ar shainchorpóra nó réamhoilte ar thacair sonraí ghinearálta mhóra, cé acu ceann is oiriúnaí. múnla le haghaidh eastóscadh téarmaíochta dátheangach? Ar an dara dul síos (ii) ar fiú é il leabú a chur le chéile atá oilte ar thacair sonraí éagsúla? Chun na críche sin, molaimid an chéad mheastóireacht chórasach ar mhúnlaí éagsúla leabú focal le haghaidh eastóscadh téarmaíochta dátheangach as sainchorpóra inchomparáide. Cuirimid béim ar an gcaoi a n-éiríonn níos fearr leis an tsamhail leabú carachtar-bhunaithe ná múnlaí eile maidir le cáilíocht na bhfoclóirí dátheangacha a bhaintear amach. Ina theannta sin, molaimid bealach nua éifeachtach chun samhlacha leabaithe éagsúla a foghlaimíodh ó thacair sonraí speisialaithe agus fearainn ghinearálta a chomhcheangal. Cruthaíonn ár gcur chuige feidhmíocht níos airde ná an tsamhail leabaithe aonair is fearr.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες αξιολογήσεις σχετικά με την εξαγωγή δίγλωσσου λεξικού από εξειδικευμένα συγκρίσιμα σώματα έχουν δείξει αντίθετη απόδοση κατά τη χρήση μοντέλων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Αυτό μπορεί εν μέρει να εξηγηθεί από την έλλειψη μεγάλων εξειδικευμένων συγκρίσιμων σωμάτων για την κατασκευή αποτελεσματικών αναπαραστάσεων. Στο πλαίσιο αυτό, προσπαθούμε να απαντήσουμε στα ακόλουθα ερωτήματα: Πρώτον, (α) ανάμεσα στα σύγχρονα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης, είτε εκπαιδευμένα σε εξειδικευμένα σώματα είτε προ-εκπαιδευμένα σε μεγάλα γενικά σύνολα δεδομένων, ποιο είναι το καταλληλότερο μοντέλο για δίγλωσση εξαγωγή ορολογίας; Δεύτερον (αξίζει να συνδυάσετε πολλαπλές ενσωματώσεις εκπαιδευμένες σε διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων; Για το σκοπό αυτό, προτείνουμε την πρώτη συστηματική αξιολόγηση διαφορετικών μοντέλων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων για δίγλωσση εξαγωγή ορολογίας από εξειδικευμένα συγκρίσιμα σώματα. Τονίζουμε πώς το μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης βάσει χαρακτήρων ξεπερνά τα άλλα μοντέλα όσον αφορά την ποιότητα των εξαγόμενων δίγλωσσων λεξικών. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε έναν νέο αποτελεσματικό τρόπο συνδυασμού διαφορετικών μοντέλων ενσωμάτωσης που μαθαίνονται από εξειδικευμένα και γενικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Η προσέγγισή μας οδηγεί σε υψηλότερη απόδοση από το καλύτερο ατομικό μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης.', 'it': "Recenti valutazioni sull'estrazione bilingue del lessico da corpora comparabile specializzata hanno mostrato prestazioni contrastanti utilizzando modelli di embedding di parole. Questo può essere parzialmente spiegato dalla mancanza di grandi corpora specializzati comparabili per costruire rappresentazioni efficienti. In questo contesto, cerchiamo di rispondere alle seguenti domande: Primo, (i) tra i modelli embedding all'avanguardia, sia formati su corpora specializzata che pre-addestrati su grandi set di dati generali, quale è il modello più appropriato per l'estrazione terminologica bilingue? Secondo (ii) vale la pena combinare più incorporazioni addestrate su diversi set di dati? A tal fine, proponiamo la prima valutazione sistematica di diversi modelli di embedding di parole per l'estrazione terminologica bilingue da corpora comparabile specializzata. Sottolineiamo come il modello di embedding basato sui caratteri superi altri modelli sulla qualità dei lessici bilingui estratti. Inoltre, proponiamo un nuovo modo efficiente per combinare diversi modelli di embedding appresi da set di dati specializzati e di dominio generale. Il nostro approccio porta a prestazioni superiori rispetto al miglior modello di embedding individuale.", 'ka': 'მხოლოდ ექსპეციალური ლექსიკონის ექსპერქციის შესაბამისი კოპეციალური კოპორაციის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი კონტრასტური გამოყენება ეს შეიძლება ნაწილად განახსნა დიდი სპეციალური შემდგომარებული კოპორაზე, რომელიც ეფექტიური გამოსახულებების შექმნა. ამ კონტექსტში, ჩვენ ვცდილობთ გადასწოროთ შემდეგი კითხვების შესახებ: პირველი, i) ხელსაწყოთა მოდელების შორის, თუ პოვციალური კოპორაზე ან პრეტრენული დიდ საერთო მონაცემების შესახებ, რომელიც ერთი არის ყველაზე სწ მეორე ii) უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში მრავალ ინბედინციები გადაყენება? ამ მიზეზისთვის ჩვენ პირველი სისტემატიკური გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული სიტყვების მოდელების პირველი სისტემატიკური გავაკეთება ორიენგური ტერმინოლოგიის ექსპეციაციის ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ, როგორ სიმბოლოების დაბათი მოდელი სხვა მოდელების გავაკეთება ექსტრაქტირებული მელექსიკონის კაalitეზე. უფრო მეტი, ჩვენ ახალი ეფექტიური გზა, რომელიც განსხვავებული სპექციალური და გენერალური დემოინის მონაცემების შემდეგ მოდელების კომბიზება. ჩვენი პროგორმაცია უფრო მეტი გამოყენება, ვიდრე საუკეთესო ინდიველური მოდელეში.', 'hu': 'A speciális, hasonló corporákból származó kétnyelvű lexikon extrakció legutóbbi értékelései kontrasztos teljesítményt mutattak a szóbeágyazási modellek használata során. Ez részben azzal magyarázható, hogy nem rendelkeznek nagy, speciális, összehasonlítható corporák, amelyek hatékony reprezentációkat építenek. Ebben az összefüggésben a következő kérdésekre próbálunk válaszolni: Először is, (i) a legkorszerűbb beágyazási modellek között, legyen szó speciális corporáról vagy nagy általános adatkészletekről, melyik a legmegfelelőbb modell a kétnyelvű terminológia kinyerésére? Másodszor (ii) Érdemes-e több beágyazást kombinálni különböző adatkészletekre? Ennek érdekében javasoljuk a különböző szóbeágyazási modellek első szisztematikus értékelését a kétnyelvű terminológia kitermeléséhez speciális hasonló corporákból. Hangsúlyozzuk, hogy a karakter alapú beágyazási modell a kivont kétnyelvű lexikonok minősége tekintetében hogyan teljesít más modelleket. Továbbá javaslatunk egy új hatékony módszert a speciális és általános tartományú adatkészletekből tanult különböző beágyazási modellek kombinálására. Megközelítésünk magasabb teljesítményt eredményez, mint a legjobb egyéni beágyazási modell.', 'lt': 'Naujausi dvikalbio leksikono ekstrakcijos iš specializuotų panašių korprų vertinimai parodė kontrastinį veiksmingumą naudojant žodžių įterpimo modelius. Tai galima iš dalies paaiškinti dėl to, kad nėra didelių specializuotų panašių korporų veiksmingai atstovauti. Šiomis aplinkybėmis bandome atsakyti į šiuos klausimus: pirma, i) i š moderniausių įterpimo modelių, apmokytų specializuotame korpore arba iš anksto apmokytų dideliuose bendruosiuose duomenų rinkiniuose, kuris yra tinkamiausias dvikalbės terminologijos išgavimo model is? Antra, ii) ar verta derinti kelis įvairiuose duomenų rinkiniuose rengiamus įrašus? Tuo tikslu siūlome pirmąjį sistemingą skirtingų žodžių įterpimo modelių, skirtų dvikalbei terminologijai išgauti iš specializuotų panašių korprų, vertinimą. Mes pabrėžiame, kaip simboliu pagrįstas įterpimo modelis yra didesnis už kitus ekstrahuotų dvikalbių leksikonų kokybės modelius. Be to, siūlome naują veiksmingą būdą derinti įvairius įtraukimo modelius, įgytus iš specializuotų ir bendrųjų sričių duomenų rinkinių. Mūsų požiūris lemia didesnius rezultatus nei geriausias atskiras įtraukimo modelis.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните евалуации за извлекување на двојјазични лексикони од специјализирани споредливи корпора покажаа контрастни резултати додека се користат модели за вградување на зборови. Ова може делумно да се објасни со недостатокот на големи специјализирани споредливи тела за изградба на ефикасни претставувања. Во овој контекст, се обидуваме да одговориме на следните прашања: Прво, и) меѓу најсовремените модели на вградување, дали се обучени на специјализирани корпора или предобучени на големи генерални податоци, кој од нив е најсоодветниот модел за извлекување на двојјазични терминологии? Вториот (ii) вреди ли да се комбинираат повеќе вградувања обучени на различни податоци? За таа цел, предложуваме прва систематска проценка на различни модели за вградување на зборови за двојјазична терминолошка екстракција од специјализирани споредливи корпора. Ние истакнуваме како моделот на вградба базиран на карактери ги надминува другите модели на квалитетот на извадените двојјазични лексикони. Повеќе, предложуваме нов ефикасен начин да се комбинираат различни модели на вградување научени од специјализирани и генерални податоци на домени. Нашиот пристап води до повисока резултатност отколку најдобриот индивидуален модел за вградување.', 'kk': 'Екі тілді лексиканың тарқатуының жуырдағы оқиғалары арнаулы салыстырылатын корпорадан сөздерді ендіру үлгілерін қолдану кезінде контрастырылатын ықтималдығын көрсе Бұл үлкен жұмыс салыстырмалы корпора жоқ деген бөлігін түсініп бере алады. Бұл контекстің ішінде, біз келесі сұрақтарды жауап беруді қалаймыз: Біріншісі, i) жұмыс істеу үлгілері арасында, бұл үлкен жалпы деректер жинақтарында арнаулы корпора немесе бұрын оқылған, екі тілді терминология тарқату үшін е Екінші ii) бірнеше деректер жинақтарында бірнеше ендіруді біріктіру үшін дұрыс ма? Бұл мақсат үшін бірінші жүйелік сәйкестік корпорадан арнаулы терминологиялық тарқату үшін әртүрлі сөздерді ендіру үлгілерінің бірінші жүйелік оқиғаны таң Біз таңбалардың негізінде ендіру үлгісінің қалай басқа үлгілерін тарқатын екі тілді лекциялардың сапасына арналады. Көбірек, біз өзгертілген және жалпы домен деректер жиындарынан үйренген басқа ендіру үлгілерін біріктіру үшін жаңа эффективті жолын ұсынамыз. Біздің тәсіліміміз жақсы индивидуалдық үлгісінен артық істеу үшін болады.', 'ms': 'Recent evaluations on bilingual lexicon extraction from specialized comparable corpora have shown contrasted performance while using word embedding models.  Ini boleh dijelaskan sebahagian oleh kekurangan corpora besar yang boleh dibandingkan khusus untuk membina perwakilan efisien. Dalam konteks ini, kita cuba menjawab soalan berikut: pertama, (i) diantara model penyembedding terbaik, sama ada dilatih pada korpra khusus atau dilatih-dilatih pada set data umum yang besar, mana satu adalah model yang paling sesuai untuk pengekstrakan terminologi bilingual? Kedua (ii) adakah ia bernilai untuk menggabungkan pelbagai penyembedding dilatih pada set data yang berbeza? Untuk tujuan itu, kami cadangkan penilaian sistemik pertama dari model penyembedding perkataan berbeza untuk ekstraksi terminologi bilingual dari korpra yang boleh dibandingkan khusus. Kami menekankan bagaimana model penyembedding berdasarkan aksara melebihi model lain pada kualiti leksikon bilingual yang dikekstrak. Lebih lagi, kami cadangkan cara efisien baru untuk menggabungkan model penyembedding yang berbeza yang belajar dari set data khusus dan domain umum. Pendekatan kita membawa kepada prestasi yang lebih tinggi daripada model penerbangan individu terbaik.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үеийн хоёр хэлний хэлний хэлбэрээс хадгалах талаар мэргэжлийн харьцуулагдмал корпора нь үгийг нэвтрүүлэх үеийн загварыг ашиглан эсрэг үйл ажиллагааг харуулсан. Үүнийг маш их мэргэжлийн харьцуулагдмал корпора байхын тулд нэг хэсэгт тайлбарлаж болно. Энэ нөхцөлд бид дараагийн асуултуудыг хариулах гэж оролдож байна: Эхлээд, i) урлагийн хөгжүүлэх загваруудын хооронд, мэргэжлийн корпора эсвэл том ерөнхий өгөгдлийн сургууль дээр сургалтын тулд сургалтын тулд сургалтын тулд сургалтын тулд, хэ Хоёрдугаар ii) өөр өөр өгөгдлийн санд сургалтын олон тоонуудыг нэгтгэх үнэ цэнэтэй үү? Ийм зорилго дээр бид хоёр хэл терминологийг хуваалцах хэлбэрээс харьцуулагдмал корпора хоёр хэлний хэлбэрээр нэмэгдүүлэх тийм олон үгнүүдийн анхны систематик дүгнэлтийг санал бол Бид харилцааны суурилсан загвар хоёр хэл хэлний хэлний чанарын өөр загваруудыг хэрхэн дамжуулдаг талаар тодорхойлж байна. Дараа нь бид өөр өөр бүрдүүлэх загваруудыг мэргэжлийн, ерөнхий домгийн өгөгдлийн санаас суралцагдсан өөр бүрдүүлэх загваруудыг нэгтгэх шинэ үр дүнтэй арга загвар санал болго Бидний арга хэмжээний үйл ажиллагаа нь хамгийн сайн загвараас илүү өндөр байдаг.', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjonijiet reċenti dwar l-estrazzjoni tal-lexicon bilingwi minn korpra komparabbli speċjalizzata wrew prestazzjoni kuntrastata waqt li użaw mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem. Dan jista’ jiġi spjegat parzjalment min-nuqqas ta’ korpura komparabbli speċjalizzata kbira biex jinbnew rappreżentazzjonijiet effiċjenti. F’dan il-kuntest, nippruvaw inwieġbu l-mistoqsijiet li ġejjin: L-ewwel, (i) fost l-aktar mudelli moderni ta’ inkorporazzjoni, kemm jekk imħarrġa fuq korpora speċjalizzata kif ukoll jekk imħarrġa minn qabel fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ġenerali kbar, liema wieħed huwa l-mudell l-aktar xieraq għall-estrazzjoni tat-terminoloġija bilingwi? It-tieni (ii) huwa ta’ min jikkombina inkorporazzjonijiet multipli mħarrġa fuq settijiet differenti ta’ dejta? Għal dak il-għan, nipproponu l-ewwel evalwazzjoni sistematika ta’ mudelli differenti ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem għall-estrazzjoni tat-terminoloġija bilingwi minn korpra komparabbli speċjalizzata. Aħna tenfasizzaw kif il-mudell ta’ inkorporazzjoni bbażat fuq il-karattri jwassal għal mudelli oħra fuq il-kwalità tal-lexicons billingwi estratti. Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu mod effiċjenti ġdid biex nikkombinaw mudelli differenti ta’ inkorporazzjoni li jitgħallmu minn settijiet ta’ dejta speċjalizzati u ta’ dominju ġenerali. L-approċċ tagħna jwassal għal prestazzjoni ogħla mill-aħjar mudell ta’ inkorporazzjoni individwali.', 'ml': 'പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന കോര്\u200dപ്പോരയില്\u200d നിന്നും രണ്ടു ഭാഷ ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d പുറത്തിറങ്ങുന്നതിന്റെ അടുത്ത വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d വാക ഇത് ഭാഗമായി വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ കാരണമാണ്. ഈ സംഭവത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d താഴെയുള്ള ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു: ആദ്യം, ആദ്യം, ആദ്യത്തെ ആര്\u200dട്ടിയുടെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് എംബിഡിംഗ് മോഡലുകളില്\u200d, പ്രത്യേകിച് രണ്ടാമത്തെ (ii) വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d പല അംഗങ്ങളും കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതാണോ? അതിനുവേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ സിസ്റ്റീമി നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യക്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് രണ്ടു ഭാഷയുടെ ലെക്സിക്സിക്സിന്റെ മാതൃകയില്\u200d മറ്റു മോഡലുകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് ചെയ്യുന് കൂടുതല്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രത്യേകിച്ചും ജനറല്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിച്ച വ്യത്യസ്ത മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൂട Our approach leads to higher performance than the best individual embedding model.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie oceny ekstrakcji dwujęzycznego leksykonu ze specjalistycznych porównywalnych korpusów wykazały kontrastową wydajność podczas stosowania modeli osadzania słów. Można to częściowo wyjaśnić brakiem dużych, wyspecjalizowanych porównywalnych korpusów do budowania efektywnych reprezentacji. W tym kontekście staramy się odpowiedzieć na następujące pytania: Po pierwsze, (i) wśród najnowocześniejszych modeli osadzania, czy to przeszkolonych na specjalistycznych korporach czy wstępnie przeszkolonych na dużych ogólnych zbiorach danych, który z nich jest najbardziej odpowiedni model do ekstrakcji dwujęzycznej terminologii? Po drugie (ii) czy warto łączyć wiele osadzeń przeszkolonych na różnych zbiorach danych? W tym celu proponujemy pierwszą systematyczną ocenę różnych modeli osadzania słów dla ekstrakcji terminologii dwujęzycznej ze specjalistycznych porównywalnych korpusów. Podkreślamy, jak model osadzania oparty na znakach przewyższa inne modele pod względem jakości ekstraktowanych dwujęzycznych leksykonów. Ponadto proponujemy nowy efektywny sposób łączenia różnych modeli osadzania wyciągniętych ze specjalistycznych i ogólnodostępnych zbiorów danych. Nasze podejście prowadzi do wyższej wydajności niż najlepszy indywidualny model osadzania.', 'ro': 'Evaluările recente privind extragerea lexiconului bilingv din corpore comparabile specializate au arătat performanțe contrastante în timpul utilizării modelelor de încorporare a cuvintelor. Acest lucru poate fi explicat parțial prin lipsa corpurilor mari specializate comparabile pentru a construi reprezentări eficiente. În acest context, încercăm să răspundem la următoarele întrebări: În primul rând, (i) printre modelele de încorporare de ultimă generație, fie instruite pe corpore specializate sau pre-instruite pe seturi de date generale mari, care este modelul cel mai potrivit pentru extragerea terminologiei bilingve? În al doilea rând (ii) merită să combini mai multe încorporări instruite pe seturi de date diferite? În acest scop, propunem prima evaluare sistematică a diferitelor modele de încorporare a cuvintelor pentru extragerea terminologiei bilingve din corpore comparabile specializate. Subliniem modul în care modelul de încorporare bazat pe caractere depășește alte modele în ceea ce privește calitatea lexicoanelor bilingve extrase. Mai mult, propunem o nouă modalitate eficientă de a combina diferite modele de încorporare învățate din seturi de date specializate și de domeniu general. Abordarea noastră duce la performanțe mai mari decât cel mai bun model individual de încorporare.', 'no': 'Nyleg evalueringar om utpakking av bilingbokstavar frå spesialiserte sammenlignbare korpora har vist kontrast utvikling medan du brukar ordinnbyggingsmodeller. Dette kan delvis forklares av manglene av store spesialiserte sammenlignbare korporar for å bygge effektive representasjonar. I denne konteksten prøver vi å svara på følgjande spørsmåla: først, i) mellom innbyggingsmodelane for kunsttilstanden, om det er trengd på spesialiserte korpora eller før-trengd på store generelle datasett, kva som er den mest passende modellen for utpakking av bilinguelt terminologikk? Andre ii) er det verdt å kombinere fleire innbyggingar som trengte på ulike datasett? For dette målet fører vi den første systematiske evalueringa av ulike ord innebygde modeller for utpakking av bilinguelt terminologisk frå spesialiserte sammenlignbare korpora. Vi understrekar korleis teiknbaserte innbyggingsmodellen utfører andre modeller på kvaliteten av dei ekstraherte bilinguelleksikane. I meir måte foreslår vi ein ny effektiv måte å kombinere ulike innbyggingsmodeller som lærte frå spesialiserte og generelle domenedatasett. Tilnærminga vårt fører til høgare utvikling enn den beste individuelle innbyggingsmodellen.', 'sr': 'Nedavne procjene o izvlačenju dvojezičkih leksiona iz specijalizovane usporedne korporacije pokazale su kontrastne funkcije dok koriste modele uključene reči. To se može delimično objasniti nedostatkom velikog specijalizovanog usporednog korporacija za izgradnju efikasnih predstavljanja. U ovom kontekstu pokušavamo odgovoriti na sljedeća pitanja: Prvo, i) među modelima integracije stanja umjetnosti, obučenim li na specijalizovanom korporaciji ili predobučenim na velikim općim setima podataka, koji je najprikladniji model za izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije? Drugi ii) je li vredno kombinirati višestruke integracije obučene na različitim setima podataka? Za tu svrhu predlažemo prvu sistematičnu procjenu različitih reči uključujući modele za izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije iz specijalizovanog usporednog korporacije. Podsećamo kako model ugrađenog na karakteru iznosi druge modele na kvalitetu izvlačenih dvojezičkih lekcija. Još više, predlažemo novi efikasni naèin za kombinaciju različitih modela uključenih iz specijalizovanih i općeg domena podataka. Naš pristup vodi do višeg izvođenja nego najbolji individualni model.', 'si': 'විශේෂය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ව මේක පැහැදිලි විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ කොර්පෝරා නැති විදිහට පැහැදිලි කරන්න පුළුවන්. මේ සම්බන්ධයෙන්, අපි පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නේ උත්තර දෙන්න උත්තර කරනවා: මුලින්, (i) ස්ථානයේ සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය සඳහා විශේෂ කරුණු කරුණ දෙවෙනි අංක (i) වෙනස් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන වෙනස් ඇන්බින්ඩින්ග් එකතු කරන්න ඒ ඒ අදහසට, අපි පලවෙනි පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වෙනස් වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා දෙවෙනි භාෂාවික ශ්\u200d අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කොහොමද අක්ෂර පද්ධතිය සංවිධානයේ අනිත් මොඩේල්ස් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්නේ අනිත් මොඩේල්ස් ව තවත් වැඩියි, අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා විශේෂය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය- ඩොමේන් දත්ත සැට් වලින් ඉගෙන ගත අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය තමයි හොඳම ප්\u200dරවේශනයට වඩා විශේෂ ප්\u200dරවේශනය වෙන්නේ.', 'sv': 'Nyligen genomförda utvärderingar av tvåspråkig lexikonextraktion från specialiserade jämförbara corpora har visat kontrasterande prestanda vid användning av ordinbäddningsmodeller. Detta kan delvis förklaras av bristen på stora specialiserade jämförbara korpora för att bygga effektiva representationer. I detta sammanhang försöker vi besvara följande frågor: Först, (i) bland de senaste inbäddningsmodellerna, oavsett om de är utbildade på specialiserade corpora eller pre-utbildade på stora allmänna datauppsättningar, vilken är den lämpligaste modellen för tvåspråkig terminologiutvinning? För det andra (ii) är det värt att kombinera flera inbäddningar utbildade på olika datauppsättningar? För detta ändamål föreslår vi den första systematiska utvärderingen av olika ordinbäddningsmodeller för tvåspråkig terminologiutvinning från specialiserade jämförbara corpora. Vi betonar hur den karaktärsbaserade inbäddningsmodellen överträffar andra modeller på kvaliteten på de extraherade tvåspråkiga lexikonerna. Vidare föreslår vi ett nytt effektivt sätt att kombinera olika inbäddningsmodeller som lärts från specialiserade och allmänna datauppsättningar. Vårt tillvägagångssätt leder till högre prestanda än den bästa individuella inbäddningsmodellen.', 'so': "Qiimeyntii ugu dambeysay soo saaridda leksikarka ee labo luqadood oo gaar ah ee shirkadda kala duduwan waxay muuqatay shaqo ka duwan marka lagu isticmaalayo sameynta midowga hadalka. Taas waxaa qeyb ahaan loo caddayn karaa, waayo, baahida shirkad gaar ah oo u eg inay dhisaan noocyada shaqaalaha. Markaas waxaynu isku daynaa inaannu jawaabno su'aalaha soo socda: marka hore, (i) Mid ka mid ah wadamada farshaxanka, in shirkadda gaarka ah lagu tababariyey ama in horay loo tababariyey qoraalka macluumaadka ee guud ah, oo midkee baa ugu haboon qaababka soo bixinta labada luqadood? Second (ii) is it worth it to combine multiple embeddings trained on different data sets?  Sababtaas darteed, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qiimeynta koowaad ee nidaamka ah ee hadal kala duduwan oo u qoran tusaalooyin kala duduwan oo ka soo bixinta terminology labada luqadood oo gaar ah ee korporada. Waxaynu ku qoraynaa sida muusikada ku saleysan qaababka labo luqad ah uu u soo saaray tusaalo kale oo ku saabsan tusaalaha kale. Further, waxaynu soo jeedinnaa qaab cusub oo faa'iido ah si aan u soo wadano noocyo kala duduwan oo lagu baray koobaha macluumaadka ee gaarka ah iyo guud-domain. Dhaqdhaqaalahayagu waxay leedahay wax ka sareeya sameynta dhaqdhaqaalaha ee ugu wanaagsan qaababka qofka oo dhan.", 'ta': 'வார்த்தை உள்ளீடும் மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தும் போது சமீபத்தில் இரு மொழி லெக்சிசன் பிரிவினையிலிருந்து ஒப்பிடும் கோர்ப This can be partially explained by the lack of large specialized comparable corpora to build efficient representations.  இந்த சூழ்நிலையில், நாம் பின்வரும் கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்க முயற்சி செய்கிறோம்: முதலில், கலை நிலைமையில் உள்ள மாதிரிகளில், சிறப்பு நிறுவனத்தில் பயிற்சி செய்யப் இரண்டாவது (ii) வேறு தரவு அமைப்புகளில் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட பல உள்ளீடுகளை ஒன்றாக்க வேண்டுமா? இந்த காரணத்திற்கு, நாம் முதல் அமைப்பில் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் வேறு வார்த்தைகள் உள்ளடக்க மாதிரிகளின் முறைமையில் இரு மொழி முனைய எழுத்து அடிப்படையான உள்ளீட்டு மாதிரி எப்படி வேறு மாதிரிகளை வெளியேற்றும் இரு மொழி லெக்சிக்ஸின் தரம் மேல் செயல்படு மேலும், சிறப்பு மற்றும் பொது டொமைன் தகவல் அமைப்புகளிலிருந்து கற்றப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்க புதிய தேவையான வழிய எங்கள் செயல்பாடு சிறந்த தனிப்பட்ட மாதிரியை விட அதிக செயல்படுத்தும்.', 'ur': 'ان سے اچھے تحقیقات دو زبان کی لکسیون اٹھانے کے بارے میں مخصوص مقابلہ قابل قابل مقابلہ کے قابل اعمال کو دکھاتے ہیں جب کلمات انڈینگ موڈل استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ یہ ایک حصہ سے واضح کر سکتا ہے کہ بہت بڑی مخصوص مقایسہ قابل شرکت کی کمزوری کے ذریعہ مفید نمونات بنانے کے لئے۔ اس متصلہ میں ہم نیچے سوالوں کی جواب دینے کی کوشش کریں گے: پہلے (i) آرتی انڈینگ موڈل میں، خواہ مخصوص کرپورا یا بڑے عمومی ڈیٹ سٹوں پر پیش آموزش کی جاتی ہے، کون دوزخ کی ترمینلوژی اضافہ کے لئے بہترین موڈل ہے؟ دوسری (ii) کیا یہ اس کا ارزش ہے کہ مختلف ڈیٹ سٹ پر تعلیم کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کی تعلیم چند انڈینگ جمع کرے؟ اس لئے ہم مختلف کلمات کی پہلی سیستماتیک ارزیابی کی پیشنهاد دیتے ہیں کہ دو زبان ٹرمینلوژی اٹھانے کے لئے مختلف کلمات کے مطابق مختلف مطابق قابل قابل تعمیر کی مدل کے لئے۔ ہم تفصیل کرتے ہیں کہ کس طرح علامت بنیادی موڈل اٹھائے گئے دو زبان لکھانوں کی کیفیت پر دوسرے موڈل کو اٹھائے جاتے ہیں۔ اور زیادہ، ہم ایک نئی مفید طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ مختلف ایمبڈینگ موڈل کو مختلف طریقے سے پیدا کریں جو مختلف طریقے سے سکھائے گئے ہیں اور عمومی ڈومین ڈیٹ سٹ سے۔ ہمارا تقریبا بہترین فرد انڈینگ مدل سے زیادہ عملکرد کی طرف چلتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Những đánh giá gần đây về ngôn ngữ văn bản khai thác từ điển điển điển điển điển. xuất hiện khả năng tương đối với nhau, sử dụng các mô hình ghép từ. Điều này có thể được giải thích một phần bởi việc thiếu tập đoàn tỉ mỉ để xây dựng những biểu tượng hiệu quả. Trong trường hợp này, chúng tôi cố gắng trả lời các câu hỏi: Thứ nhất, i) trong giới mẫu tác tác tác nền nghệ thuật hiện đại, chuyên môn về cơ thể chuyên môn hay chuyên nghiệp về các bộ dữ liệu chung, cái nào là mẫu thích hợp nhất cho việc khai thác các thuật ngữ hai chiều? Thứ hai. Có đáng để kết hợp các sự nhúng vào đa dạng được đào tạo trên các bộ dữ liệu khác nhau không? Để đạt được mục đích đó, chúng tôi đề nghị đánh giá hệ thống đầu tiên của các mô hình ghép từ khác nhau cho việc khai thác hai ngôn ngữ từ chuyên môn. Chúng tôi nhấn mạnh cách mô hình ghép dựa vào tính cách vượt trội các mô hình khác về chất lượng từ ngôn ngữ được chiết xuất. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đề nghị một cách hiệu quả mới để kết hợp các mô hình ghép khác nhau được học từ các bộ dữ liệu đặc biệt và phổ biến. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi dẫn đến hiệu suất cao hơn cả mô hình nhân viên tốt nhất.', 'uz': "Yaqinda bir necha leksikan tashqi qiymatlari taʼminlovchi bo'lgan kompaniyadan foydalanishda soʻzni tuzuvchi modellardan foydalanishda bir necha leksikan qiymatlarini ko'rsatadi. Bu bir qismni o'rganish mumkin, juda katta hususiyat bo'lgan kompaniya qobiliyatlarini yaratish uchun. Bu paytda, biz quyidagi savollarni javob berishga harakat qilamiz: Birinchi, (i) shaxsiy soʻzlar davlatdan foydalanish modellaridan foydalanishimiz, shaxsiy kompaniya yoki katta maʼlumot satrlarida o'rganishdan oldin, biri ikkita tillar terminologi chiqarish uchun eng muhim modeli? Ikkinchi (ii) boshqa maʼlumot sahifadagi bir nechta oʻrnatilgan foydalanuvchilarni birlashtirish kerak? Bu sababda, biz boshqa so'zlar ichki birinchi tizim qiymatini tasavvur qilamiz, ikkita tillar terminologni bir xil kompaniyadan o'zgartirish modellarini Biz ko'paytirilgan ikki tillar leksikaning sifatida boshqa modellarni qanday bajaradi. Koʻrsatganda, biz махсус ва умумий маълумотлар манзилларидан ўргатилган ўзаро тўпланиш учун янги етарли усулни тақдим этамиз. Bizning fikrimiz bir odamning eng yaxshi shaklning modeldan ko'proq bajarishga ega bo'ladi.", 'bg': 'Последните оценки на извличането на двуезичен лексикон от специализирани сравними корпуси показват контрастно представяне при използване на модели за вграждане на думи. Това може отчасти да се обясни с липсата на големи специализирани сравними корпуси за изграждане на ефективни представителства. В този контекст се опитваме да отговорим на следните въпроси: Първо, (и) сред най-съвременните модели за вграждане, независимо дали са обучени по специализирани корпуси или предварително обучени по големи общи масиви от данни, кой е най-подходящият модел за извличане на двуезична терминология? Второ (струва ли си да комбинирате множество вграждания, обучени върху различни набори от данни? За тази цел предлагаме първата систематична оценка на различни модели за вграждане на думи за извличане на двуезична терминология от специализирани сравними корпуси. Подчертаваме как моделът на вграждане, базиран на символи, надминава другите модели по отношение на качеството на извлечените двуезични лексикони. Освен това предлагаме нов ефективен начин за комбиниране на различни модели за вграждане, научени от специализирани и общи масиви от данни. Нашият подход води до по-висока производителност от най-добрия индивидуален модел за вграждане.', 'da': 'Nylige evalueringer af tosproget lexikon ekstraktion fra specialiserede sammenlignelige corpora har vist kontrasterende ydeevne ved brug af ordindlejringsmodeller. Dette kan delvis forklares ved manglen på store specialiserede sammenlignelige korpora til at opbygge effektive repræsentationer. Inden for denne sammenhæng forsøger vi at besvare følgende spørgsmål: For det første, (i) blandt de state-of-the-art embedding modeller, uanset om de er uddannet på specialiserede corpora eller præ-uddannet på store generelle datasæt, hvilken model er den mest hensigtsmæssige for tosproget terminologiudvinding? For det andet (ii) er det værd at kombinere flere indlejringer trænet på forskellige datasæt? Til det formål foreslår vi den første systematiske evaluering af forskellige ordindlejringsmodeller til tosproget terminologiudvinding fra specialiserede sammenlignelige corpora. Vi understreger, hvordan den tegnbaserede integreringsmodel overgår andre modeller på kvaliteten af de udvundne tosprogede leksikoner. Yderligere foreslår vi en ny effektiv måde at kombinere forskellige indlejringsmodeller lært fra specialiserede og generelle datasæt. Vores tilgang fører til højere ydeevne end den bedste individuelle integreringsmodel.', 'nl': "Recente evaluaties van tweetalige lexicon extractie uit gespecialiseerde vergelijkbare corpora hebben contrasterende prestaties aangetoond bij het gebruik van woord embedding modellen. Dit kan gedeeltelijk worden verklaard door het ontbreken van grote gespecialiseerde vergelijkbare corpora's om efficiënte representaties te bouwen. In deze context proberen we de volgende vragen te beantwoorden: Ten eerste, (i) onder de state-of-the-art embedding modellen, of getraind op gespecialiseerde corpora's of voorgetraind op grote algemene datasets, welk model is het meest geschikt voor tweetalige terminologie extractie? Ten tweede (ii) is het de moeite waard om meerdere embeddings te combineren die zijn getraind op verschillende datasets? Hiervoor stellen we de eerste systematische evaluatie voor van verschillende woord embedding modellen voor tweetalige terminologie extractie uit gespecialiseerde vergelijkbare corpora's. We benadrukken hoe het karaktergebaseerde inbeddingsmodel andere modellen overtreft op de kwaliteit van de geëxtraheerde tweetalige lexicons. Verder stellen we een nieuwe efficiënte manier voor om verschillende embedding modellen te combineren die zijn geleerd uit gespecialiseerde en algemene domeindatasets. Onze aanpak leidt tot hogere prestaties dan het beste individuele embedding model.", 'de': 'Neuere Auswertungen zur bilingualen Lexikonextraktion aus spezialisierten vergleichbaren Korpora haben eine kontrastierende Leistung bei der Verwendung von Wort-Einbettungsmodellen gezeigt. Dies kann teilweise durch das Fehlen großer spezialisierter vergleichbarer Korpora erklärt werden, um effiziente Repräsentationen zu erstellen. In diesem Zusammenhang versuchen wir, folgende Fragen zu beantworten: Erstens, (i) unter den modernsten Einbettungsmodellen, ob trainiert auf spezialisierten Korpora oder vortrainiert auf großen allgemeinen Datensätzen, welches Modell ist das geeignetste für die bilinguale Terminologieextraktion? Zweitens (ii) lohnt es sich, mehrere Einbettungen zu kombinieren, die auf verschiedenen Datensätzen trainiert wurden? Zu diesem Zweck schlagen wir die erste systematische Evaluation verschiedener Worteinbettungsmodelle für die zweisprachige Terminologieextraktion aus spezialisierten vergleichbaren Korpora vor. Wir betonen, wie das charakterbasierte Einbettungsmodell andere Modelle hinsichtlich der Qualität der extrahierten zweisprachigen Lexika übertrifft. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir eine neue effiziente Möglichkeit vor, verschiedene Einbettungsmodelle zu kombinieren, die aus spezialisierten und allgemeinen Datensätzen gelernt wurden. Unser Ansatz führt zu einer höheren Leistung als das beste individuelle Einbettungsmodell.', 'hr': 'Nedavne procjene o izvlačenju dvojezičkih leksiona iz specijaliziranog usporednog tijela pokazale su kontrastne učinke tijekom primjene modela uključenja riječi. To se može djelomično objasniti nedostatkom velikog specijaliziranog usporednog tijela kako bi izgradila učinkovite predstave. U ovom kontekstu pokušavamo odgovoriti na sljedeća pitanja: Prvo, i) među modelima integracije države umjetnosti, obučenim na specijaliziranom tijelu ili predobučenim na velikim općim setima podataka, koji je najprikladniji model za izvlačenje dvojezične terminologije? Drugi ii) je li vrijedno kombinirati višestruke integracije obučene na različitim setima podataka? Za tu svrhu predlažemo prvu sistematsku procjenu različitih riječi uključujući modele za izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije iz specijaliziranog usporednog tijela. Podrazumijemo kako model ugrađenog na karakteru iznosi druge modele na kvalitetu izvlačenih dvojezičkih lekcija. Još više, predlažemo novi učinkovit način za kombinaciju različitih modela uključenih iz specijalizovanih i općeg domena podataka. Naš pristup vodi do višeg učinka nego najbolji individualni model.', 'id': 'Evaluasi baru-baru ini mengenai ekstraksi lexikon bilingual dari korpra berbanding khusus telah menunjukkan prestasi yang bertentangan saat menggunakan model embedding kata. Hal ini dapat diterangkan secara parsial oleh kekurangan besar spesialisasi corpora yang dapat dibandingkan untuk membangun representation efisien. Dalam konteks ini, kami mencoba menjawab pertanyaan berikut: Pertama, (i) diantara model penerbangan terbaik, apakah dilatih pada korpra khusus atau dilatih pada set data umum besar, yang mana model yang paling cocok untuk ekstraksi terminologi bilingual? Kedua (ii) apakah itu layak untuk menggabungkan beberapa embedding dilatih pada set data yang berbeda? Untuk tujuan itu, kami mengusulkan evaluasi sistematis pertama dari model pembangunan kata yang berbeda untuk ekstraksi terminologi bilingual dari corpora berbanding khusus. Kami menekankan bagaimana model embedding berdasarkan karakter melebihi model lain pada kualitas leksikon bilingual yang dikekstraksi. Lebih lanjut lagi, kami mengusulkan cara efisien baru untuk menggabungkan model embedding yang berbeda belajar dari set data khusus dan domain umum. pendekatan kita mengarah ke prestasi yang lebih tinggi dari model embedding individu terbaik.', 'ko': '최근 전문 비교 자료 라이브러리에서 이중 언어 어휘를 추출한 평가에 따르면 단어를 모델에 삽입할 때 효과가 확연히 다르다.이것은 부분적으로 대형 전문적인 비교 가능한 자료 라이브러리가 부족하여 효율적인 표현을 구축하는 것으로 해석할 수 있다.이런 배경에서 우리는 다음과 같은 질문에 대답하고자 한다. 우선, (i) 가장 선진적인 삽입 모델에서 전문 어료 라이브러리에서 훈련했든 대형 통용 데이터 집합에서 미리 훈련했든 어떤 모델이 이중 언어 용어 추출에 가장 적합합니까?두 번째 (ii) 조합이 서로 다른 데이터 집합에 훈련된 여러 개의 삽입이 가치가 있습니까?이를 위해 우리는 처음으로 전문 비교 가능한 어료 라이브러리에서 이중 언어 용어를 추출한 서로 다른 단어 삽입 모델에 대한 시스템 평가를 제시했다.우리는 문자를 바탕으로 하는 삽입 모델이 이중 언어 어휘를 추출하는 데 있어서 다른 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 강조했다.그 밖에 우리는 전공과 통용 분야의 데이터로부터 집중적으로 학습된 서로 다른 삽입 모델을 조합하는 새로운 효과적인 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법은 가장 좋은 개체 삽입 모델보다 더 높은 성능을 가지고 있다.', 'sw': 'Tathmini za hivi karibuni kuhusu uteuzi wa lexico wa lugha mbili kutoka kwenye kampuni maalumu inayofanana imeonyesha tofauti na utendaji huo wakati wakitumia mifano ya maneno ya kuchapisha. Hii inaweza kufafanuliwa kwa kiasi kikubwa na ukosefu wa makampuni makubwa yanayofanana na kujenga uwakilishi wenye ufanisi. Katika muktadha huu, tunajaribu kujibu maswali yafuatayo: Kwanza, (i) miongoni mwa mitindo ya kazi za sanaa, ikiwa imefunzwa kwenye kampuni maalumu au iliyoendeshwa kabla kwenye seti kubwa ya takwimu za jumla, ni modeli bora zaidi kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa ngono za lugha mbili? Pili (ii) inastahili kuunganisha vifaa vingi vilivyofunzwa katika seti tofauti za data? Kwa lengo hilo, tunapendekeza tathmini ya kwanza ya mfumo wa maneno tofauti ya utoaji wa ngono za lugha mbili kutoka kwa makampuni yanayofanana. Tunaisisitiza jinsi muundo wa kuweka msingi wa tabia unavyoonyesha mifano mingine kuhusu ubora wa lexico zilizotolewa kwa lugha mbili. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza njia mpya yenye ufanisi kuunganisha mifano tofauti ya mabango yaliyofunzwa kutoka kwenye seti za data maalum na jumla za ndani. Mfumo wetu unapelekea ufanisi mkubwa kuliko mifano bora ya mtu aliyeingia.', 'tr': 'Ýakynda iki dilli leksiýan açylmagynyň ahyry görkezilýän korporadan hat laryny ullanýan wagtlar has düzümlendirilýän zady görkezildi. Muny be ýleki hüýtgeşikli korpora etkinlik suratlary gurmak üçin aýratyn düşündirilip biler. Bu kontekstde, biz indiki soraglary jogap berjek bolýarys: ilkinji, (i) sanat-taýýarlama nusgalarynyň arasynda, uzyn korpora ýa-da uly umumy maglumat düzmelerinde öňünde bilim termynologiýasy taýýarlama üçin i ň gowy nusgala? Ikinji (ii) farklı veri setirlerinde eğitilen çoklu integrleri birleştirmek üçin bir değermi? Şol maksada üçin, bilim terminologiýasynyň spesializ karşılaştırılýan korporadan aýrylan düzümlerniň ilkinji sistematik çözümlerni maslahat berýäris. Karakter tabanly nusgasyny çykan iki dil lingüň kalitesinde başga nusgalary nähili üstün edýändigini emplaýarys. Daha fazla, uzmanlık we umumiy domain veri düzenlerinden öwrenmek üçin farklı integral modellerini birleştirmek üçin täze etkinlik bir yola teklif ediyoruz. Biziň ýaryşymyz daşary nusgadan has gowy ukyplarymyza ýokar.', 'af': "Onlangse evaluasies op tweedelingse leksikone uitpakking van spesialiseerde vergelykbare korpora het gewys kontraste prestasie terwyl word ingesluit modele gebruik word. Dit kan gedeeltelik verduidelik word deur die ontbreek van groot spesialiseerde vergelykbare korpora om effektief voorstellings te bou. In hierdie konteks probeer ons na antwoord die volgende vraagte: eerste, (i) onder die staat-van-die-kunste inbêring modele, of onderwerp op spesialiseerde korpora of vooraf-onderwerp op groot algemene data stelle, wat een is die mees geskikte model vir twee tale terminologie uitvoering? Tweede (ii) is dit waarde om veelvuldige inbêdings te kombinerer wat op verskillende data stelle geonderwys is? Vir daardie doel voorstel ons die eerste sistematiese evaluering van verskillende woord inbêerde modele vir twee tale terminologie uittrek van spesialiseerde vergelykbare korpora. Ons bepaal hoe die karaktergebaseerde inbetering model ander modele uitvoer op die kwaliteit van die uitgevoerde bilinguele leksies. Verder meer, ons voorstel 'n nuwe effektief manier om verskillende inbêerde modele te kombinerer van spesialiseerde en algemene-domein data stelle. Ons toegang lei na hoër prestasie as die beste individuele inbetering model.", 'sq': "Recent evaluations on bilingual lexicon extraction from specialized comparable corpora have shown contrasted performance while using word embedding models.  Kjo mund të shpjegohet pjesërisht nga mungesa e një korpore të madhe të përshtatshme të specializuar për të ndërtuar përfaqësime të efektshme. Brenda këtij konteksti, ne përpiqemi t'u përgjigjemi pyetjeve të mëdha: së pari, i) midis modeleve përfshirëse më të moderne, qoftë i stërvitur në korpra të specializuara apo i stërvitur në grupe të mëdha të dhënash të përgjithshme, cila është modeli më i përshtatshëm për nxjerrjen e terminologjisë dygjuhëse? I dyti (ii) a vlen të kombinohen shumë përfshirje të trajnuara në grupe të dhënash të ndryshme? Për këtë qëllim, ne propozojmë vlerësimin e parë sistematik të modeleve të ndryshme të përfshirjes së fjalëve për nxjerrjen e terminologjisë dygjuhëse nga korpra të përshtatshme të specializuara. Ne theksojmë se si modeli i përfshirjes në bazë të karaktereve ekzekuton modele të tjera mbi cilësinë e lexikonëve dygjuhës të nxjerrë. Edhe më tepër, ne propozojmë një mënyrë të re të efektshme për të kombinuar modele të ndryshme të përfshirjes mësuar nga grupet e të dhënave të specializuara dhe të domenit të përgjithshëm. Përqasja jonë shpie në performancë më të lartë se modeli më i mirë i përfshirjes individuale.", 'am': 'በአሁኑ ጊዜ በሁለት ቋንቋ ሊክሲኮን ውጤት በተለየ ኮርፖርት ላይ የተመሳሳይ ውጤቶች ቃላትን በመጠቀም የሚቃወም ምሳሌዎች የሚያሳየው ተቃውሞ ነው፡፡ ይህ በብዙ ባሕላዊ ኮርፖርት ባይጎድለበት ትልቅ መልዕክቶችን ለመሥራት ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ክፍል ውስጥ፣ የሚከተሉትን ጥያቄዎች ለመመልስ እንሞክራለን፤ መጀመሪያ፣ በሀገር-አርእስት አካባቢ ሞዴላዎች መካከል፣ የባሕላዊ ኮርፖርት ወይም ትልቁ የዳታ ማዕከላዊ ጥያቄ ላይ የተማረ መሆኑን፣ ማንኛውም ለሁለት ቋንቋ ተርሚኖጂ ማውጣት በጣም የተሻለ model ነው? ሁለተኛ (ii) በተለየ የዳታ መስመር ላይ የተማረከውን በብዙ አካባቢዎች ማሳሰል ይገባዋል? ለዚህ ምክንያት፣ የሁለት ቋንቋዎች ተርሚኖሎጂ ማውጣት የፊተኛውን የስርዓት ማረጋገጫ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሁለት ቋንቋዎች ሊክሲኮን ጥያቄ ላይ የፊደል አካባቢ ሞዴል እንዴት እንደሚያሳየው እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በተለየ እና የጠቅላላ አዲስ የድምፅ አካባቢ እና የድምፅ ዳታዎችን ለመቀላቀል አዲስ ጥያቄን እናሳስባለን፡፡ አካሄዳችን ከመልካም የሆኑት ምሳሌ ይልቅ ወደ ትልቅ ትርጉም ይሄዳል፡፡', 'hy': 'Երկուլեզու լեքսիկոնի վերջին գնահատումները հատուկ համեմատական մարմնից ցույց են տալիս հակադրական արտադրողականությունը օգտագործելով բառերի ներգրավման մոդելներ: This can be partially explained by the lack of large specialized comparable corpora to build efficient representations.  Within this context, we try to answer the following questions: First, (i) among the state-of-the-art embedding models, whether trained on specialized corpora or pre-trained on large general data sets, which one is the most appropriate model for bilingual terminology extraction?  Երկրորդ․ արդյո՞ք արժե համադրել տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վրա սովորեցված բազմաթիվ ներդրումներ։ Այդ նպատակով, մենք առաջարկում ենք երկլեզու տերմինոլոգիայի վերացման տարբեր բառերի ներառման մոդելների առաջին համակարգչային գնահատականը հատուկ համեմատական մարմնից: Մենք շեշտում ենք, թե ինչպես է բնավորության հիմնված ներգրավման մոդելը արտադրում այլ մոդելներ երկլեզու լեքսիկոնների որակի վրա: Ավելի շատ, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր արդյունավետ միջոց, որպեսզի համադրենք տարբեր ներգրավման մոդելներ, որոնք սովորվել են մասնագիտական և ընդհանուր բնագավառների տվյալների համակարգերից: Մեր մոտեցումը հանգեցնում է ավելի բարձր արդյունք, քան լավագույն անհատական ներգրավման մոդելը:', 'az': 'Xüsusiyyətli komparaşdırılabilir korporadan iki dilli leksikon çıxarılması haqqında son xüsusiyyətlər sözləri içərisində modelləri istifadə edərkən müxtəlif performans göstərdilər. Bu, böyük xüsusiyyətli karşılaşdırılabilir korpora sayəsində müəyyənləşdirilmiş göstəricilər inşa etmək üçün bir qismini açıqlayabilir. Bu məlumat i çində, biz bu sualların cavabını verməyə çalışırıq: ilk, i) sanatın içərisində olan modellərin arasında, özelliklik korpora və ya böyük nümunə məlumat qurularında təhsil edilən böyük məlumat qurularında təhsil edilən, birinin ikili dil terminoloji çıxarması üçün ən uyğun modeli? İkincisi ii) müxtəlif məlumat qurğularında təhsil edilmiş çoxlu inbingləri birləşdirmək üçün layiqdir? Bu məqsədilə, biz müxtəlif korporadan birinci sistematik təcrübə edirik ki, iki dil terminoloji çıxarılması üçün müxtəlif sözlər içərisində olan modellərin ilk sistematik təcrübəsini. Biz karakter-tabanlı birləşdirmək modelinin çıxarılmış ikili dillərin keyfiyyətində başqa modellərdən necə istifadə edir? Daha çox, biz müxtəlif məlumatlardan öyrənmiş və genel domena məlumatlarını birləşdirmək üçün yeni faydalı bir yol təklif edirik. Bizim yaxınlığımız ən yaxşı individual inşa modelindən yüksək performansına yol göstərir.', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি বিশেষ কর্পোরা বিশেষ তুলনায় দুই ভাষার লেক্সিকোর বের করার বিষয়টি প্রদর্শন করেছে শব্দ বিভিন্ন মডেল ব্যবহার করে। কার্যকর প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণের জন্য বিশেষ বিশেষজ্ঞ কর্পোরার অভাব ব্যাখ্যা করা যাবে। এই পরিস্থিতিতে আমরা নিম্নলিখিত প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিতে চেষ্টা করছি: প্রথম, (i) শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের মধ্যে, বিশেষ কর্পোরায় প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে কিনা বিশেষ কর্পোরা বা পূর্ব দ্বিতীয় (২) বিভিন্ন তথ্য সেটে প্রশিক্ষিত বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষিত বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণের ক্ষেত এই উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য আমরা প্রথম বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী টার্মিনোলজি বের করার জন্য বিভিন্ন শব্দের মোডেলের প্রস্তাব প্রস্তাব করি। আমরা জোর দিচ্ছি কিভাবে চরিত্র ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক মডেল বিনিময়ের মানে অন্য মডেল প্রকাশ করে। আরো আমরা নতুন কার্যকর উপায় প্রস্তাব করি বিশেষ বিশেষ এবং সাধারণ ডোমেইন ডাটা সেট থেকে শিক্ষিত ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা ব্যক্তির চেয়ে বেশী প্রদর্শনের কারণে প্রদর্শন করে।', 'fa': 'ارزیابی اخیرا در اخراج زبان دو زبان از شرکت مقایسه\u200cای متخصص در زمان استفاده از مدل\u200cهای استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای استفاده می\u200cکند. این می\u200cتواند بخشی توسط کمبود شرکت متخصص برای ساختن نمایش\u200cهای موثر توضیح داده شود. در این محیط، ما سعی می\u200cکنیم جواب این سوالات را بپرسیم: اول، i) بین مدل\u200cهای شرکت هنری، آیا در شرکت ویژه\u200cهای متخصص یا پیش\u200cآموزش بر مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای عمومی بزرگ آموزش یافته شده، کدام یک مدل مناسب\u200cترین برای استخراج ترمینالوژی دوزبانی است؟ (ii) آیا ارزش آن است که در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متفاوت تعلیم یافته شده\u200cاند؟ برای این هدف، ما اولین ارزیابی سیستماتیک کلمه متفاوتی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که مدل\u200cهای استخراج ترمینالوژی دو زبانی از شرکت متقابل مقایسه است. ما تضمین می\u200cکنیم که چگونه مدل پیوند\u200cسازی\u200cهای شخصیت بر روی کیفیت زبان\u200cهای دوزبانی استخراج می\u200cکند. و بیشتر، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک راه تاثیر تاثیر برای ترکیب مدل\u200cهای متفاوتی که از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای ویژه و دومین\u200cهای عمومی یاد گرفته\u200cاند. دستور ما به اجرای بیشتری از بهترین مدل متصل کردن فردی هدایت می\u200cکند.', 'bs': 'Nedavne procjene o izvlačenju dvojezičkih leksiona iz specijaliziranog usporednog korporacija pokazale su kontrastne učinke u koristi modela uključenih riječi. To se može djelomično objasniti nedostatkom velikog specijalizovanog usporednog korporacija za izgradnju efikasnih predstavljanja. U ovom kontekstu pokušavamo odgovoriti na sljedeća pitanja: Prvo, i) među modelima integracije države umjetnosti, obučenim li na specijalizovanom korporaciji ili predobučenim na velikim općim setima podataka, koji je najprikladniji model za izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije? Drugi ii) je li vrijedno kombinirati višestruke integracije obučene na različitim setima podataka? Za tu svrhu predlažemo prvu sistematsku procjenu različitih reči uključujući modele za izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije iz specijaliziranog usporednog korporacije. Podrazumijemo kako model ugrađenog na karakteru iznosi druge modele na kvalitetu izvlačenih dvojezičkih lekcija. Još više, predlažemo novi efikasni način za kombinaciju različitih modela uključenih iz specijalizovanih i općeg domena podataka. Naš pristup vodi do višeg učinka nego najbolji individualni model.', 'ca': "Evaluacions recents sobre l'extracció bilingüe de lexicòns de corpores especialitzats comparables han mostrat rendiment contrastat mentre utilitzen models d'incorporació de paraules. Això es pot explicar parcialment per la falta de grans corpores comparables especialitzats per construir representacions eficients. En aquest context, intentem respondre a les següents preguntes: primer, i) entre els models d'incorporació més avançats, que siguin entrenats en corpora especialitzada o pré-entrenats en grans conjunts de dades generals, quin és el model més apropiat per l'extracció de terminologia bilingüe? Segon (ii) val la pena combinar múltiples integracions entrenats en diferents conjunts de dades? Per això, proposem la primera evaluació sistemàtica de diferents models d'incorporació de paraules per a l'extracció de terminologia bilingüe de corpores especialitzats comparables. Destacem com el model d'integració basat en caràcters supera altres models sobre la qualitat dels lexicons bilingües extraïts. Més encara, proposem una nova manera eficient de combinar diferents models d'integració aprenguts de conjunts de dades especialitzats i generalitzats. Our approach leads to higher performance than the best individual embedding model.", 'et': 'Hiljutised hinnangud kakskeelse leksikoni ekstraheerimise kohta spetsialiseeritud võrreldavatest korpustest on näidanud kontrastset jõudlust sõna manustamise mudelite kasutamisel. Seda võib osaliselt seletada suurte spetsialiseeritud võrreldavate korporatsioonide puudumisega tõhusate esinduste loomiseks. Selles kontekstis püüame vastata järgmistele küsimustele: Esiteks, (i) tipptasemel manustamismudelite hulgas, olgu need siis koolitatud spetsialiseerunud korpustele või eelnevalt koolitatud suurtele üldistele andmekogumitele, milline on kõige sobivam mudel kakskeelse terminoloogia ekstraheerimiseks? Teiseks (ii) kas on väärt kombineerida mitu erinevate andmekogumitega koolitatud manustamist? Sel eesmärgil pakume välja esimese süstemaatilise hindamise erinevate sõnade põimimise mudelite süsteemne hindamine spetsialiseeritud võrreldavatest korpustest. Rõhutame, kuidas märgipõhine manustamismudel ületab teisi mudeleid ekstraheeritud kakskeelsete leksikonide kvaliteedi osas. Lisaks pakume välja uut tõhusat viisi erinevate põimimismudelite kombineerimiseks, mis on omandatud spetsialiseerunud ja ülddomeenilistest andmekogumitest. Meie lähenemine toob kaasa suurema jõudluse kui parim individuaalne manustamismudel.', 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset arviot kaksikielisestä sanastoekstraktiosta erikoistuneista vastaavista korpusista ovat osoittaneet vastakohtaista suorituskykyä käytettäessä sanaupotusmalleja. Tämä voidaan osittain selittää sillä, ettei suuria erikoistuneita vertailukelpoisia korpusia tehokkaiden edustustojen rakentamiseksi. Tässä yhteydessä pyrimme vastaamaan seuraaviin kysymyksiin: Ensinnäkin, (i) viimeisimpien upotusmallien joukossa, olivatpa ne koulutettuja erikoistuneita korpusia vai esikoulutettuja suuria yleisiä datakokonaisuuksia, mikä on sopivin malli kaksikielisen terminologian poimimiseen? Toiseksi (ii) kannattaako yhdistää useita eri datasarjoihin koulutettuja upotuksia? Tätä varten ehdotamme ensimmäistä systemaattista arviointia eri sanaupotusmalleista kaksikielisen terminologian poimimiseen erikoistuneista vastaavista korpusista. Korostamme, miten hahmopohjainen upotusmalli suoriutuu muista malleista enemmän kuin kaksikielisten sanastojen laadussa. Lisäksi ehdotamme uutta tehokasta tapaa yhdistää erilaisia sulautusmalleja, jotka on opittu erikoistuneista ja yleisistä tietokokonaisuuksista. Lähestymistapamme johtaa parempaan suorituskykyyn kuin paras yksittäinen upotusmalli.', 'cs': 'Nedávná hodnocení extrakce dvojjazyčného lexikonu ze specializovaných srovnatelných korpusů ukázala kontrastní výkon při použití modelů vkládání slov. To lze částečně vysvětlit nedostatkem velkých specializovaných srovnatelných korpusů pro vytváření efektivních reprezentací. V této souvislosti se snažíme odpovědět na následující otázky: Za prvé, (i) mezi nejmodernějšími embeding modely, ať už trénovanými na specializovaných korpusech nebo předškolenými na velkých obecných datových sadách, který z nich je nejvhodnější model pro extrakci dvojjazyčné terminologie? Za druhé (ii) stojí za to kombinovat více vložení trénovaných na různých datových sadách? Za tímto účelem navrhujeme první systematické vyhodnocení různých modelů vkládání slov pro extrakci dvojjazyčné terminologie ze specializovaných srovnatelných korpusů. Zdůrazňujeme, jak model založený na znakách překonává ostatní modely na kvalitě extrahovaných dvojjazyčných lexikonů. Dále navrhujeme nový efektivní způsob kombinování různých modelů vložení získaných ze specializovaných a obecných datových sad. Náš přístup vede k vyššímu výkonu než nejlepší model individuálního vložení.', 'he': 'הערכות האחרונות על החלץ למקסיקון שתיים לשונות מתוך גופורה מומחית שווה הראו ביצועים שווים בזמן השימוש בדוגמנים של קישום מילים. זה יכול להסביר חלקית על ידי חוסר גופורה גדולה ומיוחדת שווה לבנות ייצוגים יעילים. בתוך הקשר הזה, אנו מנסים לענות על השאלות הבאות: ראשית, (i) בין מודלים של קישום מוקדמים, בין אם מאומנים על גופורה מיוחדת או מאומנים מראש על קבוצות מידע כלליות גדולות, איזה מהם המודל המתאים ביותר להוציא טמינולוגיה שתיים לשונות? שנית (ii) האם זה שווה את זה לשלב מספר קישורים מאומנים על קבוצות נתונים שונות? למטרה זו, אנו מציעים את הערכה השיטתית הראשונה של דוגמנים שונים של מילים מעורבות להוציא טרמינולוגיה שתיים-לשונית מ גופורה מומחית שווה. אנו מתייחסים איך מודל ההכניסה המבוסס על אופיים מתגבר על מודלים אחרים על איכות הלקסיקונים השולשים. נוסף מזה, אנו מציעים דרך יעילה חדשה לשלב דוגמנים שונים של שילוב ללמוד מכספי נתונים מיוחדים ומחולקים כלליים. הגישה שלנו מובילה להופעה גבוהה יותר ממודל ההכניסה האישי הטוב ביותר.', 'ha': "Ana ƙaddara na masu zartar da leksikon sau biyu daga shirin komai mai ƙayyade, da suka yi amfani da misãlai masu fitarwa. Ina iya bayyana wannan rabo da bã na da hasara mai girma na daidaita korpo dõmin ya gina masu fassara masu inganci. Daga wannan muhalli, Munã jarraba mu karɓa wa maswalin da ke jẽre: farko, (i) daga mazaɓan-masu cikin-sanar da aka shigar da shi, ko kuma an yi wa shirin a kan firma masu ƙayyade ko kuma tun gaba-wa'ura a kan daidaita matsayin bayani masu girma, da kuma wanne ne mafi daidai wa masu fito ga zartar da bakwai-biyu na'ura? Kiwanne (ii) yana kasa daidai a haɗa kowace embedded masu amfani da aka yi wa kodi masu daidaita danne-daban? Ga wannan, Munã goyyar da farkon muhalli na'ura a cikin matsayin da ke cikin misãlai na daban-dabam wa cire-bakwai ta sauki daga wani abu da ke daidaita. We emphasize how the character-based embedding model outperforms other models on the quality of the extracted bilingual lexicons.  Furan haka, Munã buɗa wata hanci mai fasha zuwa mu haɗa misãlai masu cikin shirin da aka sanar daga daidaita masu da aka ƙayyade da ɗayan-Domen. MataimakinMu na ƙara zuwa ga mafiya performance ko da mafi kyaun misali wanda ke cikin kashi.", 'sk': 'Nedavne ocene dvojezičnega leksikona ekstrakcije iz specializiranih primerljivih korpusov so pokazale kontrastno učinkovitost pri uporabi modelov za vdelavo besed. To je delno mogoče pojasniti s pomanjkanjem velikih specializiranih primerljivih korpusov za gradnjo učinkovitih predstavitev. V tem okviru poskušamo odgovoriti na naslednja vprašanja: Prvič, (i) med najsodobnejšimi modeli vgradnje, bodisi usposobljenimi za specializirane korpuse bodisi predhodno usposobljenimi za velike splošne nabore podatkov, kateri je najprimernejši model za dvojezično ekstrakcijo terminologije? Drugič (ii) ali je vredno združiti več vdelav, usposobljenih za različne nabore podatkov? V ta namen predlagamo prvo sistematično vrednotenje različnih modelov vključevanja besed za dvojezično ekstrakcijo terminologije iz specializiranih primerljivih korpusov. Poudarjamo, kako model vgradnje na podlagi znakov presega druge modele glede kakovosti izvlečenih dvojezičnih leksikonov. Poleg tega predlagamo nov učinkovit način združevanja različnih modelov vdelave, pridobljenih iz specializiranih in splošnih podatkovnih nizov. Naš pristop vodi do večje zmogljivosti kot najboljši individualni model vgradnje.', 'jv': 'text-tool-action Ing iki iso diwedharaké ngerasakno karo akeh luwih dumadhi piye cara-karo nganggep petani sing nyimpen Ayo kontext iki, kita saiki nggambar deweke seneng pisan seneng pisan: First (i) iso mulai model sing ditambah stawat-of-the-arts section Saiki ono, kita supoyo sistem sistem dadi nggawe sistem dadi bisa nguasai model sing dadi bintang kanggo kalem kesempatan karo perusahaan winih Awak dhéwé éngari piye ngerasakno ning model sing bisa akeh basa ning cara-teka ngono model sing wis ana luwih dumadhi tanggal sing apik dhéwé. Additional additional, we proposal a new Effectt method to combine new embedding modes Learned from special and General-domain data set. Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé nggawe sawetara luwih apik dhéwé ning model sing luwih apik.', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཅན་གྱི་སྡུད་མིའི་ནང་དུ་ཉེ་ཆར་བར་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཐོག་ལས་ཕན་ཚུན་འབྲེལ་བ་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྐབས འདི་ནི་དབྱིབས་ཅན་གྱི་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་ཆོས་ཉུང་བ་ཡིན་པའི་སྡུད་ཁང་ཆེ་བ་དེ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཐུབ། འུ་ཚོས་ཡུལ་འདི་ནང་གི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་གཤམ་གྱི་དོན་དག་ལ་ལན་གསལ་འདོད་ནི་ཨ་རབ་དང་། སྔོན་པ་(i) among the state-of-the-art embedding models, whether trained on specialized corpora or pre-trained on large general data sets, which one is the most appropriate model for bilingual terminology extraction? གཉིས་པ་(ii) ཅིག་ནི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་སྟངས་སུ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཀྱི་བསྡུར་དགོས་སམ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདིའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་པོ་སྣང་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ནང་གི་མིང་ཚོགས་དབ ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་གཞི་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གཞན་ཞིག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་དེ་ཇི་ལྟར་ཡར་བསྐྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞན་ Further more, we propose a new efficient way to combine different embedding models learned from specialized and general-domain data sets. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་འདིས་སྐྱེས་ཚད་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གཙོ་བོ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Evaluating the text quality, human likeness and tailoring component of PASS : A Dutch data-to-text system for soccer', 'ar': 'تقييم جودة النص والتشابه البشري ومكوِّن التخصيص في PASS: نظام تحويل البيانات إلى نص هولندي لكرة القدم', 'fr': "Évaluation de la qualité du texte, de la ressemblance humaine et du composant d'adaptation de PASS\xa0: un système néerlandais de données en texte pour le football", 'pt': 'Avaliando a qualidade do texto, semelhança humana e componente de adaptação do PASS: um sistema holandês de dados para texto para futebol', 'es': 'Evaluación de la calidad del texto, la imagen humana y el componente de adaptación de PASS: un sistema holandés de datos a texto para el fútbol', 'ja': 'パスのテキスト品質、人間らしさ、テーラリングの要素を評価する：サッカーのためのオランダのデータツーテキストシステム', 'hi': 'पाठ की गुणवत्ता, मानव समानता और पास के सिलाई घटक का मूल्यांकन: फुटबॉल के लिए एक डच डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट सिस्टम', 'zh': '评估PASS之文质,人类肖像定制组件:施于足球荷兰数据于文本系统', 'ru': 'Оценка качества текста, человеческого сходства и пошива компонента PASS: голландская система передачи данных в текст для футбола', 'ga': 'Cáilíocht an téacs, cosúlacht an duine agus comhpháirt oiriúintithe PASS a mheas: Córas sonraí-go-téacs Ollainnis do sacar', 'hu': 'A PASS szövegminőségének, emberi hasonlóságának és testreszabásának értékelése: Hollandia futballrendszer', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση της ποιότητας κειμένου, της ανθρώπινης ομοιότητας και της προσαρμογής του ΠΑSS: Ένα ολλανδικό σύστημα δεδομένων-κειμένου για το ποδόσφαιρο', 'ka': 'PASS- ის ტექსტის კაalitეტის, ადამიანის სინამდვილეობის და შესაბამის კომპონენტის შესაბამისათვის: ჰოლონდის მონაცემების ტექსტის სისტემი', 'lt': 'PASS teksto kokybės, žmogaus panašumo ir pritaikymo komponento vertinimas: Nyderlandų futbolo duomenų ir teksto sistema', 'it': 'Valutare la qualità del testo, la somiglianza umana e la componente sartoriale di PASS: un sistema dati-testo olandese per il calcio', 'kk': 'PASS- тың мәтін сапасы, адамдардың көрінісін және өзгерту компонентін оқу: футбол үшін Нидерландық деректер мен мәтін жүйесі', 'ms': 'Menghargai kualiti teks, kesamaan manusia dan komponen penyesuaian PASS: Sistem data-ke-teks Belanda untuk bola sepak', 'mt': 'Evaluating the text quality, human likeness and tailoring component of PASS: A Dutch data-to-text system for soccer', 'mk': 'Оценувањето на квалитетот на текстот, човечката слика и компонентот за прилагодување на PASS: Холандски систем за податоци во текст за фудбал', 'ml': 'പസ്സിന്റെ പദാവലിയുടെ ഗുണവും, മനുഷ്യരുടെ രീതിയും തലപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഘടകം', 'no': 'Evaluerer tekstkvaliteten, menneskelig likning og tilpassingskomponenten av PASS: Ein nederlandsk data- til- tekstsystem for fotball', 'mn': 'PASS-ын текст сайн, хүн төрөлхтний харьцаа, өөрчлөлтийг тодорхойлох хэмжээсүүдийг: хөмбөгийн Далландын өгөгдлийн систем', 'ro': 'Evaluarea calității textului, a asemănării umane și a componentei personalizate a PASS: Un sistem de date-text olandez pentru fotbal', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje kvalitete teksta, ljudske sličnosti i komponente prilagođavanja PASS-a: nizozemski sistem podataka na tekst za fudbal', 'si': 'PASS ගේ ලිපින්ත ස්වභාවය, මිනිස්සු වර්ගය සහ සැකසුම් සම්බන්ධයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා: ෆෝට්බෝල්ස් ගැන ඩච', 'pl': 'Ocena jakości tekstu, podobieństwa człowieka i komponentu dopasowania PASS: holenderski system danych-tekstowych dla piłki nożnej', 'ur': 'پاسس کے ٹیکسٹ کیلوٹی، انسان کی نسبت اور ٹیلر رغتوں کا ارزش کرنا: فوتبال کے لئے ڈیٹ ڈیٹ سے ٹیکسٹ سیسٹم', 'so': 'Evaluating the text quality, human likeness and tailoring component of PASS: A Dutch data-to-text system for soccer', 'sv': 'Utvärdering av textkvalitet, mänsklig liknelse och skräddarsydd komponent i PASS: Ett holländskt data-till-text-system för fotboll', 'ta': 'PASS உரையின் தரம், மனித உரையின் வடிவம் மற்றும் வாய்ப்பு பகுதி', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh giá chất lượng văn bản, chân dung con người và thiết kế riêng của qua đường chuyền: hệ thống dữ liệu đối chữ Hà Lan cho bóng đá', 'nl': 'Evaluatie van de tekstkwaliteit, menselijke gelijkenis en maatwerk component van PASS: Een Nederlands data-to-text systeem voor voetbal', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje kvalitete teksta, ljudske sličnosti i komponente prilagođavanja PASS-a: nizozemski sustav podataka na tekst za fudbal', 'da': 'Evaluering af tekstkvalitet, menneskelig lighed og skræddersyet komponent i PASS: Et hollandsk data-til-tekst system til fodbold', 'bg': 'Оценка на качеството на текста, човешката прилика и шивашкия компонент на Холандска система от данни към текст за футбол', 'ko': 'PASS의 텍스트 품질, 인상 및 재단 부분 평가: 네덜란드 축구 데이터부터 텍스트 시스템까지', 'de': 'Bewertung der Textqualität, der menschlichen Ähnlichkeit und der Anpassungskomponente von PASS: Ein niederländisches Daten-zu-Text-System für Fußball', 'id': 'Mengevaluasi kualitas teks, perumpamaan manusia dan komponen tailoring dari PASS: Sistem data-ke-teks Belanda untuk sepak bola', 'fa': 'ارزیابی کیفیت متن، شبیه انسان و رشته\u200cای از PASS: یک سیستم داده\u200cهای هلندی به متن برای فوتبال', 'af': "Geevalueer die teks kwaliteit, menslike lykheid en herstelling komponent van PASS: ' n Dutch data- to- text stelsel vir voetspel", 'sw': 'Kuthibitisha kiwango cha ujumbe wa maandishi, mfano wa binadamu na sehemu ya uchunguzi wa PASS: Mfumo wa data-hadi-ujumbe wa mpira wa miguu', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'ՊԱՍՍ-ի տեքստի որակի, մարդկային նմանության և համապատասխանատվության գնահատումը. ֆուտբոլի հոլանդական տվյալների համակարգ', 'tr': "Metin kalitesini, adamlary흫 g철rn체힊ligini we PASS'y흫 첵erle힊diril첵채n komponenti: futbol 체챌in H철l채nd챌e data-to-text sistemi", 'bn': 'পাএসএসের টেক্সটের মান, মানুষের আকৃতি এবং তালারিং অংশ পরীক্ষা করা হচ্ছে: ফুটবলের জন্য একটি ডাচ্চ ডাটাটেক্স সিস্টেম', 'sq': 'Vlerësimi i cilësisë së tekstit, ngjashmërisë njerëzore dhe përbërjes së komponentit të PASS: Një sistem hollandez të dhënash në tekst për futbollin', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje kvalitete teksta, ljudske sličnosti i komponente prilagođavanja PASS-a: nizozemski sistem podataka na tekst za fudbal', 'ca': 'Evaluar la qualitat del text, la similitud humana i el component de adaptació del PASS: Un sistema holandès de dades a text per al futbol', 'cs': 'Hodnocení kvality textu, lidské podoby a přizpůsobení složky PASS: holandský data-to-text systém pro fotbal', 'fi': 'PASS:n tekstin laadun, inhimillisen samankaltaisuuden ja räätälöinnin arviointi: hollantilainen jalkapallon data-to-text-järjestelmä', 'az': 'Metin keyfiyyətini, insan görünüşlüyü və PASS-nin düzəltmə komponentini değerlendirmək: futbol üçün Hollandi məlumat sistemi', 'et': 'PASS-i teksti kvaliteedi, inimliku sarnasuse ja kohandamise komponendi hindamine: Hollandi jalgpalli andmevahetussüsteem', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah sing kalitas teks, kalitas wong sampeyan karo paken nggawe PASS: Sistem dadi-kanggo-teks Teks Teks kanggo kowe bal', 'he': 'הערכה של איכות הטקסט, הדמות האנושית והרכיב המתאים של PASS: מערכת נתונים הולנדית לטקסט לכדורגל', 'sk': 'Ocena kakovosti besedila, človeške podobe in prilagajanja komponente PASS: nizozemski sistem podatkov v besedilo za nogomet', 'ha': 'Yana inganci tsarin matsayin, tsarin mutane da ƙaranni na PASS: An kasa tsarin data-zuwa-text wa soccer', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དབྱིབས་ཚད་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ། མིའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་དང་ PASS་གི་ཆ་ཤས་ལྡན་བཟོ་བཞིན་ཡིན། ཕྱིར་ཡིག་ཆ'}
{'en': 'We present an evaluation of PASS, a data-to-text system that generates Dutch soccer reports from match statistics which are automatically tailored towards fans of one club or the other. The evaluation in this paper consists of two studies. An intrinsic human-based evaluation of the system’s output is described in the first study. In this study it was found that compared to human-written texts, computer-generated texts were rated slightly lower on style-related text components (fluency and clarity) and slightly higher in terms of the correctness of given information. Furthermore, results from the first study showed that tailoring was accurately recognized in most cases, and that participants struggled with correctly identifying whether a text was written by a human or computer. The second study investigated if tailoring affects perceived text quality, for which no results were garnered. This lack of results might be due to negative preconceptions about computer-generated texts which were found in the first study.', 'ar': 'نقدم تقييمًا لنظام PASS ، وهو نظام لتحويل البيانات إلى نص يقوم بإنشاء تقارير كرة القدم الهولندية من إحصائيات المباريات المصممة تلقائيًا لمشجعي أحد الأندية أو الأخرى. التقييم في هذه الورقة يتكون من دراستين. تم وصف التقييم الجوهري المستند إلى الإنسان لمخرجات النظام في الدراسة الأولى. في هذه الدراسة ، وجد أنه مقارنة بالنصوص المكتوبة بواسطة الإنسان ، تم تصنيف النصوص التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة الكمبيوتر بدرجة أقل قليلاً على مكونات النص ذات الصلة بالنمط (الطلاقة والوضوح) وأعلى قليلاً من حيث صحة المعلومات المعطاة. علاوة على ذلك ، أظهرت نتائج الدراسة الأولى أنه تم التعرف على التكييف بدقة في معظم الحالات ، وأن المشاركين كافحوا في تحديد ما إذا كان النص قد كتبه إنسان أو كمبيوتر. تحققت الدراسة الثانية فيما إذا كان التكييف يؤثر على جودة النص المدركة ، والتي لم يتم الحصول على نتائج لها. قد يكون هذا النقص في النتائج بسبب المفاهيم السلبية حول النصوص التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة الكمبيوتر والتي تم العثور عليها في الدراسة الأولى.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une évaluation de PASS, un système de données en texte qui génère des rapports de football néerlandais à partir de statistiques de matchs qui sont automatiquement adaptées aux fans d'un club ou d'un autre. L'évaluation présentée dans cet article consiste en deux études. Une évaluation humaine intrinsèque de la production du système est décrite dans la première étude. Dans cette étude, il a été constaté que, par rapport aux textes écrits par des humains, les textes générés par ordinateur étaient légèrement moins bien notés en ce qui concerne les éléments de texte liés au style (fluidité et clarté) et légèrement plus élevés en termes d'exactitude des informations données. En outre, les résultats de la première étude ont montré que la personnalisation était reconnue avec précision dans la plupart des cas, et que les participants avaient du mal à identifier correctement si un texte avait été écrit par un humain ou un ordinateur. La deuxième étude a examiné si la personnalisation affectait la qualité perçue du texte, pour laquelle aucun résultat n'a été obtenu. Ce manque de résultats peut être dû à des idées préconçues négatives sur les textes générés par ordinateur qui ont été découvertes dans la première étude.", 'es': 'Presentamos una evaluación de PASS, un sistema de datos a texto que genera informes de fútbol holandeses a partir de estadísticas de partidos que se adaptan automáticamente a los fanáticos de un club u otro. La evaluación de este artículo consta de dos estudios. En el primer estudio se describe una evaluación intrínseca basada en humanos de la producción del sistema. En este estudio se encontró que, en comparación con los textos escritos por humanos, los textos generados por computadora tenían una calificación ligeramente inferior en los componentes del texto relacionados con el estilo (fluidez y claridad) y ligeramente más alta en términos de la exactitud de la información dada. Además, los resultados del primer estudio mostraron que la adaptación se reconocía con precisión en la mayoría de los casos, y que los participantes tenían dificultades para identificar correctamente si un texto había sido escrito por un humano o por una computadora. El segundo estudio investigó si la adaptación afecta la calidad percibida del texto, para lo cual no se obtuvieron resultados. Esta falta de resultados podría deberse a ideas preconcebidas negativas sobre los textos generados por ordenador que se encontraron en el primer estudio.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma avaliação do PASS, um sistema de dados para texto que gera relatórios de futebol holandês a partir de estatísticas de partidas que são automaticamente adaptadas aos torcedores de um clube ou outro. A avaliação neste artigo consiste em dois estudos. Uma avaliação intrínseca baseada em humanos da saída do sistema é descrita no primeiro estudo. Neste estudo, verificou-se que, em comparação com os textos escritos por humanos, os textos gerados por computador foram classificados um pouco mais baixo nos componentes de texto relacionados ao estilo (fluência e clareza) e um pouco mais alto em termos de correção das informações fornecidas. Além disso, os resultados do primeiro estudo mostraram que a alfaiataria foi reconhecida com precisão na maioria dos casos e que os participantes tiveram dificuldade em identificar corretamente se um texto foi escrito por um humano ou por um computador. O segundo estudo investigou se a alfaiataria afeta a qualidade percebida do texto, para o qual nenhum resultado foi obtido. Esta falta de resultados pode ser devido a preconceitos negativos sobre textos gerados por computador que foram encontrados no primeiro estudo.', 'ja': 'PASSの評価をご紹介します。PASSは、あるクラブのファンに合わせて自動的に調整された試合統計からオランダのサッカーレポートを生成するデータツーテキストシステムです。 本論文の評価は2つの研究からなる。 システムの出力の本質的な人間ベースの評価は、最初の研究で説明されています。 この研究では、人間が書いたテキストと比較して、コンピュータで生成されたテキストは、スタイル関連のテキストコンポーネント（流暢さと明瞭さ）でわずかに低く、与えられた情報の正確性でわずかに高い評価を受けていることがわかった。 さらに、最初の研究の結果は、ほとんどの場合、テーラリングが正確に認識され、参加者はテキストが人間によって書かれているかコンピュータによって書かれているかを正しく識別することに苦労していることを示した。 第2の研究では、テーラリングが知覚されたテキスト品質に影響を与えるかどうかを調査したが、その結果は得られなかった。 この結果の欠如は、最初の研究で発見されたコンピュータで生成されたテキストに対する否定的な先入観に起因する可能性がある。', 'zh': '凡PASS之评估,PASS数系统于文本,可于比赛统计数据中生荷兰足球报,此告一家俱乐部另一家俱乐部之球迷自定也。 本文评估二事。 第一项究述对系统输者,在人伦之评。 于此论之,比人文本,计算机生成之本,系式组件(流畅性清晰度)之评分略低,略高给定息之正确性。 又第一项研之的结果表明,大抵剪裁确识,参与者难正文,人计算机所编。 第二项考定文本,无所得。 此其缺也,或生于第一项计算机生之负面先入也。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем оценку PASS, системы передачи данных по тексту, которая генерирует отчеты голландского футбола из статистики матчей, которые автоматически адаптируются к болельщикам того или иного клуба. Оценка, содержащаяся в настоящем документе, состоит из двух исследований. В первом исследовании описывается внутренняя оценка производительности системы, основанная на учете человеческого фактора. В этом исследовании было обнаружено, что по сравнению с написанными человеком текстами, созданные компьютером тексты были оценены немного ниже по компонентам текста, связанным со стилем (беглость и ясность) и немного выше с точки зрения правильности данной информации. Кроме того, результаты первого исследования показали, что в большинстве случаев точное признание получила адаптация и что участники пытались правильно определить, был ли текст написан человеком или компьютером. Второе исследование исследовало, влияет ли адаптация на воспринимаемое качество текста, для которого не было получено никаких результатов. Это отсутствие результатов может быть связано с негативными предрассудками о созданных компьютером текстах, которые были обнаружены в первом исследовании.', 'hi': 'हम पास का मूल्यांकन प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट सिस्टम जो मैच के आंकड़ों से डच फुटबॉल रिपोर्ट उत्पन्न करता है जो स्वचालित रूप से एक क्लब या दूसरे के प्रशंसकों की ओर सिलवाया जाता है। इस पेपर में मूल्यांकन में दो अध्ययन शामिल हैं। सिस्टम के आउटपुट का एक आंतरिक मानव-आधारित मूल्यांकन पहले अध्ययन में वर्णित है। इस अध्ययन में यह पाया गया कि मानव-लिखित ग्रंथों की तुलना में, कंप्यूटर-जनित ग्रंथों को शैली से संबंधित पाठ घटकों (प्रवाह और स्पष्टता) पर थोड़ा कम और दी गई जानकारी की शुद्धता के संदर्भ में थोड़ा अधिक रेट किया गया था। इसके अलावा, पहले अध्ययन के परिणामों से पता चला है कि ज्यादातर मामलों में सिलाई को सटीक रूप से पहचाना गया था, और प्रतिभागियों ने सही ढंग से पहचानने के साथ संघर्ष किया कि क्या कोई पाठ मानव या कंप्यूटर द्वारा लिखा गया था। दूसरे अध्ययन ने जांच की कि क्या टेलरिंग कथित पाठ की गुणवत्ता को प्रभावित करती है, जिसके लिए कोई परिणाम प्राप्त नहीं किया गया था। परिणामों की यह कमी कंप्यूटर-जनित ग्रंथों के बारे में नकारात्मक पूर्वधारणाओं के कारण हो सकती है जो पहले अध्ययन में पाए गए थे।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair meastóireacht ar PASS, córas sonraí-go-téacs a ghineann tuairiscí sacair na hÍsiltíre ó staitisticí cluichí a shaincheaptar go huathoibríoch do lucht leanúna club amháin nó club eile. Tá dhá staidéar sa mheastóireacht sa pháipéar seo. Déantar cur síos sa chéad staidéar ar mheastóireacht intreach duine-bhunaithe ar aschur an chórais. Fuarthas amach sa staidéar seo, i gcomparáid le téacsanna daonna-scríofa, go raibh téacsanna ríomhghinte beagán níos ísle ar chomhpháirteanna téacs a bhain le stíl (líofacht agus soiléireacht) agus beagán níos airde i dtéarmaí cruinneas na faisnéise tugtha. Ina theannta sin, léirigh torthaí ón gcéad staidéar gur aithníodh an oiriúint go cruinn i bhformhór na gcásanna, agus go raibh sé ag streachailt le rannpháirtithe a aithint i gceart cibé acu an raibh an téacs scríofa ag duine nó ag ríomhaire. Scrúdaíodh sa dara staidéar an bhfuil tionchar ag an oiriúint ar cháilíocht an téacs a bhraitear, nach bhfuarthas aon torthaí ina leith. D’fhéadfadh gur réamhthuiscintí diúltacha faoi théacsanna ríomhghinte a fuarthas sa chéad staidéar a tharla an easpa torthaí seo.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a PASS értékelését, egy olyan adat-szöveges rendszer, amely holland labdarúgási jelentéseket készít a mérkőzési statisztikákból, amelyek automatikusan az egyik vagy a másik klub rajongóira szabottak. A tanulmányban szereplő értékelés két tanulmányból áll. Az első tanulmány bemutatja a rendszer teljesítményének belső humán alapú értékelését. Ebben a tanulmányban megállapították, hogy az emberi írású szövegekhez képest a számítógép által generált szövegek stílusösszetevői (folyékonyság és tisztaság) tekintetében kissé alacsonyabbak, illetve az adott információ helyessége tekintetében kissé magasabbak voltak. Továbbá az első tanulmány eredményei azt mutatták, hogy a szabást a legtöbb esetben pontosan felismerték, és hogy a résztvevők küzdöttek azzal, hogy helyesen azonosítsák, hogy egy szöveget ember vagy számítógép írt-e. A második tanulmány azt vizsgálta, hogy a szabás befolyásolja-e az érzékelt szövegminőséget, amelyre nem sikerült eredményt szerezni. Az eredményhiány a számítógép által generált szövegekkel kapcsolatos negatív előítéleteknek köszönhető, amelyeket az első tanulmányban találtunk.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια αξιολόγηση του ΠΑSS, ένα σύστημα δεδομένων-σε-κείμενο που παράγει ολλανδικές αναφορές ποδοσφαίρου από στατιστικά παιχνίδια που προσαρμόζονται αυτόματα στους οπαδούς του ενός ή του άλλου συλλόγου. Η αξιολόγηση στην παρούσα εργασία αποτελείται από δύο μελέτες. Στην πρώτη μελέτη περιγράφεται μια εγγενής ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση της παραγωγής του συστήματος. Στην παρούσα μελέτη διαπιστώθηκε ότι σε σύγκριση με τα κείμενα που δημιουργούνται από τον άνθρωπο, τα κείμενα που παράγονται από τον υπολογιστή αξιολογήθηκαν ελαφρώς χαμηλότερα σε σχέση με τα στοιχεία κειμένου που σχετίζονται με το στυλ (ρευστότητα και σαφήνεια) και ελαφρώς υψηλότερα από την άποψη της ορθότητας των παρεχόμενων πληροφοριών. Επιπλέον, τα αποτελέσματα της πρώτης μελέτης έδειξαν ότι η προσαρμογή αναγνωρίστηκε με ακρίβεια στις περισσότερες περιπτώσεις και ότι οι συμμετέχοντες αγωνίζονταν να εντοπίσουν σωστά αν ένα κείμενο γράφτηκε από άνθρωπο ή υπολογιστή. Η δεύτερη μελέτη διερεύνησε αν η προσαρμογή επηρεάζει την αντιληπτή ποιότητα κειμένου, για την οποία δεν βρέθηκαν αποτελέσματα. Αυτή η έλλειψη αποτελεσμάτων μπορεί να οφείλεται σε αρνητικές προκαταλήψεις σχετικά με κείμενα που δημιουργούνται από υπολογιστή που βρέθηκαν στην πρώτη μελέτη.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ PASS-ის განსაზღვრება, მონაცემების ტექსტისტექსტის სისტემა, რომელიც ჰოლონდიური ფუბოლის შესახებ სტატისტისტიდან შექმნა, რომელიც ავტომატურად ერთი კლუბის ან ამ წიგნის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შეფარდება ორი სწავლებით. სისტემის გამოსახულების ინტერნექტიური ადამიანის განსახულება პირველი კვლევაში აღწერა. ამ სწავლაში მოიძებნა, რომ ადამიანის წერტილი ტექსტის შედგომარება, კომპიუტერის შექმნილი ტექსტის შედგომარებული ტექსტის კომპონენტებზე (სიგრძნობა და სიგრძნობა) ცოტა უფრო მეტია და დამატებით, პირველი სწავლიდან შედეგი გამოიყენება, რომ სწორედ განვიცნობა უფრო მეტი შემთხვევაში და რომ სწორედ განვიცნობით თუ ადამიანის ან კომპიუტერის გამოყენება ტექსტი. მეორე სწავლის შესახებ, თუ შესახებ ტექსტის კაalitეტის შესახებ, რომლის შესახებ არაფერი შესახებ. ეს არსებობა შეიძლება იქნება, რომ კომპიუტერის შექმნილი ტექსტის მიზეზით, რომელიც პირველი სწავლაში მოიძებნა.', 'it': "Presentiamo una valutazione di PASS, un sistema dati-testo che genera report di calcio olandesi a partire dalle statistiche delle partite che vengono automaticamente adattati ai tifosi di una o dell'altra società. La valutazione in questo documento consiste in due studi. Nel primo studio viene descritta una valutazione intrinseca basata sull'uomo dell'output del sistema. In questo studio è stato scoperto che rispetto ai testi scritti dall'uomo, i testi generati dal computer sono stati valutati leggermente più bassi in termini di componenti testuali legati allo stile (fluidità e chiarezza) e leggermente più alti in termini di correttezza delle informazioni fornite. Inoltre, i risultati del primo studio hanno dimostrato che nella maggior parte dei casi la sartoria è stata accuratamente riconosciuta e che i partecipanti hanno faticato a identificare correttamente se un testo è stato scritto da un uomo o da un computer. Il secondo studio ha esaminato se la sartoria influisce sulla qualità del testo percepita, per la quale non sono stati ottenuti risultati. Questa mancanza di risultati potrebbe essere dovuta a preconcetti negativi sui testi generati dal computer trovati nel primo studio.", 'kk': 'Біз PASS - мәтіннің деректер мен мәтіннің бағалауын көрсеткіземіз. Бұл Нидерландық футбол хабарламаларын бір клуб не бір-бірінің бағалаушыларына автоматты түрде өзгертілген статистикадан шығару ж Бұл қағаздың бағалауы екі зерттеулерден тұрады. Бірінші зерттеулерде жүйенің шығысының ішкі адамға негізделген оқиғаны анықтайды. Бұл зерттеулерде адамға жазылған мәтіндерге салыстырылған, компьютер жасалған мәтіндерді стилінен қатынаған мәтін компоненттеріне (жылдамдығы мен түсініктігі) деген мәтіндеріне (жылдамдығы мен түсініктігі Қосымша, бірінші зерттеулердің нәтижелері көпшілігінде дұрыс түсіндірілген және қатысушылар адам немесе компьютер жазылған мәтінді дұрыс анықтауға көмектеседі. Екінші зерттеу мәтін сапасына қарағанда, оның нәтижесін қалпына келтірілмеген болса, зерттеді. Бұл нәтижелерді бірінші зерттеулерде табылған компьютер құрылған мәтіндер туралы негативті алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- алдын- ала қабылдау', 'lt': 'Pateikiame PASS vertinimą, duomenų į tekstą sistemą, kuria iš triukšmo statistikos gaunamos Nyderlandų futbolo ataskaitos, automatiškai pritaikytos vieno ar kito klubo fanams. Šio dokumento vertinimą sudaro du tyrimai. Pirmajame tyrime aprašytas nuoseklus žmogaus pagrįstas sistemos rezultatų vertinimas. Šiame tyrime nustatyta, kad, palyginti su žmogaus rašytiniais tekstais, kompiuteriu sukurti tekstai buvo šiek tiek mažesni su stiliu susijusių teksto komponentų (lankstumas ir aiškumas) ir šiek tiek didesni, atsižvelgiant į pateiktos informacijos teisingumą. Be to, pirmojo tyrimo rezultatai parodė, kad daugeliu atvejų tiksliai pripažįstamas pritaikymas ir kad dalyviai turėjo sunkumų teisingai nustatyti, ar tekstą rašo žmogus ar kompiuteris. Antrajame tyrime buvo tiriama, ar pritaikymas daro įtaką suvokiamai teksto kokybei, dėl kurios nebuvo gauta jokių rezultatų. Šių rezultatų trūkumas gali būti susijęs su neigiamomis prielaidomis apie kompiuteriu sukurtus tekstus, kurios buvo nustatytos pirmajame tyrime.', 'mk': 'Презентираме проценка на ПАСС, систем од податоци до текст кој генерира холандски фудбалски извештаи од статистиката за натпревари кои се автоматски приспособени на обожаватели на еден клуб или друг. Оваа оценка во овој документ се состои од две студии. Во првата студија се опишува внатрешна човечка проценка на излезот на системот. Во оваа студија се откри дека во споредба со текстите напишани од човек, текстите генерирани од компјутерот беа рејтинирани малку пониски на текстовите компоненти поврзани со стилот (течност и јасност) и малку повисоки во поглед на коректноста на дадените информации. Покрај тоа, резултатите од првата студија покажаа дека прилагодувањето е прецизно признаено во повеќето случаи и дека учесниците се бореа со правилно идентификување дали текстот е напишан од човек или компјутер. Втората студија истражуваше дали прилагодувањето влијае на перцепираниот квалитет на текстот, за кој не се добиени резултати. Овој недостаток на резултати можеби е резултат на негативни предконцепции за компјутерските тексти кои беа пронајдени во првата студија.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw evalwazzjoni tal-PASS, sistema ta’ dejta għat-test li tiġġenera rapporti Olandiżi tal-futbol minn statistika tal-logħob li huma awtomatikament imfassla lejn fannijiet ta’ klub wieħed jew l-ieħor. L-evalwazzjoni f’dan id-dokument tikkonsisti f’żewġ studji. Evalwazzjoni intrinsika bbażata fuq il-bniedem tal-output tas-sistema hija deskritta fl-ewwel studju. F’dan l-istudju nstab li meta mqabbel mat-testi miktuba mill-bniedem, it-testi ġġenerati mill-kompjuter kienu kklassifikati kemmxejn aktar baxxi fuq komponenti tat-test relatati mal-istil (fluwenza u ċarezza) u kemmxejn ogħla f’termini tal-korrettezza tal-informazzjoni mogħtija. Barra minn hekk, ir-riżultati mill-ewwel studju wrew li t-tfassil kien rikonoxxut b’mod preċiż fil-biċċa l-kbira tal-każijiet, u li l-parteċipanti kellhom diffikultà biex jidentifikaw b’mod korrett jekk test kienx miktub minn bniedem jew minn kompjuter. It-tieni studju investiga jekk it-tfassil jaffettwax il-kwalità perċepita tat-test, li għalih ma nkisbux riżultati. Dan in-nuqqas ta’ riżultati jista’ jkun minħabba prekonċezzjonijiet negattivi dwar testi ġġenerati mill-kompjuter li nstabu fl-ewwel studju.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan penilaian PASS, sistem data-ke-teks yang menghasilkan laporan bola Belanda dari statistik perlawanan yang secara automatik disesuaikan kepada peminat satu kelab atau yang lain. Evaluasi dalam kertas ini terdiri dari dua kajian. Evaluasi asas manusia intrinsik output sistem diterangkan dalam kajian pertama. Dalam kajian ini ditemukan bahawa dibandingkan dengan teks ditulis oleh manusia, teks yang dijana oleh komputer diangkat sedikit lebih rendah pada komponen teks berkaitan dengan gaya (keseluruhan dan keseluruhan) dan sedikit lebih tinggi dalam terma keperluan maklumat yang diberikan. Selain itu, keputusan dari kajian pertama menunjukkan bahawa penyesuaian telah dikenali dengan tepat dalam kebanyakan kes, dan bahawa peserta berjuang dengan betul mengenali sama ada teks ditulis oleh manusia atau komputer. The second study investigated if tailoring affects perceived text quality, for which no results were garnered.  Kekurangan keputusan ini mungkin disebabkan prasangka negatif mengenai teks yang dijana oleh komputer yang ditemui dalam kajian pertama.', 'mn': 'Бид Нэг клуб эсвэл нөгөө клубын хувьд автоматжуулагдсан хөмбөгийн мэдээллийн системийн PASS-г шалгаж өгдөг. Энэ цаасан дээрх үнэлгээ нь хоёр судалгаа бий. Эхний судалгаанд хүн төрөлхтний үндсэн үнэлгээ нь анхны судалгаанд тайлбарлана. Энэ судалгаанд хүн төрөлхтний бичигдсэн текстэй харьцуулахад компьютер үүсгэсэн текстүүдийн хэлбэртэй бүтээгдэхүүнд бага зэрэг (шингэн, тодорхойлолт) болон өгсөн мэдээллийн зөв байдлын тухай бага зэрэг өндөртэй байдаг. Дараа нь анхны судалгааны үр дүн нь ихэнх тохиолдолд өөрчлөлт нь тодорхой хүлээн зөвхөн танигдсан ба оролцогчдын хүн эсвэл компьютер бичигдсэн эсэхийг зөв тодорхойлдог. Хоёр дахь судалгаанд хэрвээ өөрчлөлт нь харагдаж байгаа бичил чанарыг нөлөөлнө гэдгийг судалсан. Үүнээс ямар ч үр дүнгүй. Эхний судалгаанд олсон компьютер үүсгэсэн текстүүдийн эсрэг анхны тухай үр дүнгүй байж магадгүй.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പാഎസിന്\u200dറെ ഒരു വിലാസവും, ഒരു ഡേറ്റാട്ട-ലേക്ക് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് സിസ്റ്റം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അത് ഡച്ച് ഫുട്ടറില്\u200d നിന്നും സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന ഈ പത്രത്തിലെ വിലാസം രണ്ടു പഠനങ്ങളിലാണ്. സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഫലത്തിന്റെ ആദ്യത്തെ പഠനത്തില്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വിവരിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. In this study it was found that compared to human-written texts, computer-generated texts were rated slightly lower on style-related text components (fluency and clarity) and slightly higher in terms of the correctness of given information.  അതിനുശേഷം, ആദ്യത്തെ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരുന്നു താലകങ്ങള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും ശരിയായി തിരിച്ചറിയപ്പെട്ടിരുന്നു എന്ന്,  രണ്ടാമത്തെ പഠന പരിശോധിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ഗുണമായി ബാധിക്കുന്നു ആദ്യ പഠനത്തില്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തിയ കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d ജനിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളെക്കുറിച്ച് നേരിട്ട മുന്\u200dഗണന മാ', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein evaluering av PASS, eit data- til- tekstsystem som lagar nederlandske fotbalsrapporter frå statistikk som automatisk er tilpassa til fanne av ein klub eller den andre. Evalueringa i denne papiret inneheld av to studier. Ein intrinsisk menneskebasert evaluering av systemutdata er beskriven i den første studien. I denne studien ble det funne at samanlikninga med menneskelig skriven tekstar, datamaskinen genererte tekstar vart ratert litt nedre på stilrelaterte tekstkomponentar (fluktet og klarhet) og litt høgare i forhold til korrektet av oppgjeven informasjon. I tillegg viste det første studiet at tillegget er nøyaktig gjenkjent i dei fleste tilfellene, og at deltakarane kjempe med rett identifisering om ein tekst er skriven av ein menneske eller datamaskin. Den andre studien er undersøkt om tilpassinga påvirkar oppdaga tekstkvalitet, som ingen resultat vart lagt inn. Dette manglar av resultat kan vera grunn av negativ førehandsvising om datamaskinelaga tekstar som vart funne i den første studien.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy ocenę PASS, systemu danych-tekstowego generującego holenderskie raporty piłkarskie ze statystyk meczów, które są automatycznie dostosowywane do kibiców jednego lub drugiego klubu. Ocena w niniejszym artykule składa się z dwóch badań. W pierwszym badaniu opisano wewnętrzną ocenę wyników systemu opartą na człowieku. W niniejszym badaniu stwierdzono, że w porównaniu do tekstów pisanych przez człowieka teksty generowane komputerowo oceniane były nieco niżej pod kątem komponentów tekstowych związanych ze stylem (płynność i klarowność) oraz nieco wyższe pod względem poprawności podanych informacji. Ponadto wyniki pierwszego badania wykazały, że w większości przypadków dokładnie rozpoznawane było dopasowanie krawiec, a uczestnicy mieli problem z prawidłową identyfikacją, czy tekst został napisany przez człowieka czy komputera. Drugie badanie badało, czy dopasowanie wpływa na postrzeganą jakość tekstu, dla którego nie uzyskano żadnych wyników. Ten brak wyników może być spowodowany negatywnymi uprzedzeniami dotyczącymi tekstów generowanych komputerowo, które znaleziono w pierwszym badaniu.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o evaluare a PASS, un sistem de date-text care generează rapoarte de fotbal olandeze din statisticile meciurilor care sunt adaptate automat fanilor unui club sau altuia. Evaluarea din această lucrare constă în două studii. O evaluare intrinsecă bazată pe om a rezultatelor sistemului este descrisă în primul studiu. În acest studiu s-a constatat că, în comparație cu textele scrise de om, textele generate de calculator au fost evaluate ușor mai scăzut în ceea ce privește componentele text legate de stil (fluență și claritate) și ușor mai mari în ceea ce privește corectitudinea informațiilor date. Mai mult decât atât, rezultatele primului studiu au arătat că croitoria a fost recunoscută cu precizie în majoritatea cazurilor și că participanții se luptau să identifice corect dacă un text a fost scris de un om sau de un computer. Al doilea studiu a investigat dacă croitorii afectează calitatea percepută a textului, pentru care nu s-au obținut rezultate. Această lipsă de rezultate s-ar putea datora preconcepțiilor negative despre textele generate de calculator care au fost găsite în primul studiu.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo procjenu PASS-a, sistema podataka na tekst koji stvara holandske izveštaje fudbala iz statistike podudara koji su automatski prilagođeni fanovima jednog kluba ili drugog. Procjena u ovom papiru sastoji se od dva studija. U prvoj studiji se opisuje unutrašnja ljudska procjena rezultata sistema. U ovom ispitivanju je otkriveno da u usporedbi sa ljudskim pisanim tekstima, kompjuterski teksti su bili malo niži na komponentima teksta povezanih sa stilom (tekućina i jasnost) i malo više u smislu ispravnosti određenih informacija. Nadalje, rezultati prvog ispitivanja pokazali su da je prilagodba precizno prepoznata u većini slučajeva, i da su učesnici borili se sa ispravnim identifikacijom da li je tekst napisao ljudski ili kompjuter. Druga ispitivanja je istraživala ako pregled utječe na percepcionu kvalitetu teksta, zbog kojih nisu prikupljeni rezultati. Ovaj nedostatak rezultata bi mogao biti zbog negativnih preduzeća o tekstima iz kompjutera koji su pronađeni u prvoj studiji.', 'si': 'අපි PASS ගැන විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙන්වන්නේ, දත්ත තියෙන්න පාළුවක් පද්ධතියක් තියෙන්නේ ඩොච්ච් ෆෝට්බෝල් වාර්තාව ස්වය මේ පත්තරයේ විශ්ලේෂණය තමයි අධ්\u200dයානය දෙකක් තියෙනවා. පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරමාණයක් පළමු පරීක මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ඒක හොයාගත්තා මිනිස්සු ලියපු පාළුවන් සමග විදිහට, පරීක්ෂණය විදිහට ලියපු පාළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධතා පාළු ඉතින්, පළවෙනි පරීක්ෂණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා, ඒ දෙවෙනි පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය කරලා පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ පාළ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂතාවට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තිය මේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'so': "Waxaannu soo bandhignaa qiimeynta PASS, nidaamka macluumaadka ee wargelinta sokeeye ee Dutch oo ka soo saara statisticada match, kaas oo si automatic ah loo qoray sawirada isku biil ama tan kale. The evaluation in this paper consists of two studies.  Qiimeynta soo bixinta nidaamka ee gudaha ah ee biniaadamka waxaa lagu qoraa waxbarashada hore. Waxbarashadan waxaa laga helay in la barbardhigo qoraalka qoran ee dadka, qoraalka dhashay ee komputerka waxaa lagu qiimeeyey wax yar oo ka hooseeya qeybaha qoraalka qoran ee qoraalka qoran (faa'iidada iyo caddaaladda) iyo wax yar oo ka sarreeya saxda macluumaadka la siiyey. Furthermore, resultiyadii waxbarashada ugu horraysay waxay tuseen in dabaraynta si saxda ah loo aqoonsaday xaaladaha badan, iyo in kuwa wadajirka ah ay la dagaalamayeen si hagaagsan u ogaanayaan in qoraal lagu qoray dad ama kambiyuutaro. Waxbarashada labaad ayaa baarayay in dabaasho uu saameyn ku yeelan karo qiimaha qoraalka ee la gartay, taas oo aan sabab lagu helin. Taas dhamaantooda waxaa laga yaabaa in ay sabab u noqon karaan ka hortagga horumarinta oo ku saabsan qoraal-qoraal la soo abuuray computer, kuwaas oo lagu helay waxbarashada hore.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en utvärdering av PASS, ett data-till-text system som genererar holländska fotbollsrapporter från matchstatistik som automatiskt skräddarsys för fans av en klubb eller den andra. Utvärderingen i denna uppsats består av två studier. En inneboende mänsklig utvärdering av systemets resultat beskrivs i den första studien. I denna studie konstaterades att datorgenererade texter, jämfört med människoskrivna texter, värderades något lägre på stilrelaterade textkomponenter (flyt och klarhet) och något högre vad gäller korrektheten av given information. Vidare visade resultaten från den första studien att skräddarsy var korrekt igenkännt i de flesta fall, och att deltagarna kämpade med att korrekt identifiera om en text skrevs av en människa eller dator. Den andra studien undersökte om skräddarsy påverkar upplevd textkvalitet, för vilken inga resultat erhölls. Denna brist på resultat kan bero på negativa förutfattade uppfattningar om datorgenererade texter som hittades i den första studien.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் PASS-ன் மதிப்பினை கொண்டிருக்கிறோம், ஒரு தரவு முதல் உரை அமைப்பு, இது பொருந்தும் புள்ளிவிவரங்களிலிருந்து டாந்து கால் அடிக்குறிப இந்த காகிதத்தில் மதிப்பு இரண்டு ஆய்வுகள் உள்ளது. கணினியின் வெளியீட்டின் முதல் படிப்பில் ஒரு உள்ளமைப்பு மனித அடிப்படையான மதிப்பினை விவரிக்கப்படுகிறது. இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில் மனித எழுத்தப்பட்ட உரைகளை ஒப்பிட்டு காணப்பட்டது, கணினி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உரைகள் பாணி தொடர்புடைய உரைப் பகுதிகளில் குறைவாக குறைந்து விகிதம மேலும், முதல் ஆய்வு முடிவு இரண்டாவது ஆராய்ச்சி பார்த்தது புரிந்த உரை தரம் பாதிக்குமா என்று ஆராய்ந்தது, அதன் முடிவு எதுவும் அலங்கா முதல் படிப்பில் கணினி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உரைகளை பற்றி எதிர்மறை முன்னுரிமைகள் காரணமாக இந்த விளைவுகளின் குறைவு இல்லை.', 'ur': 'ہم PASS کی ایک ارزیابی پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک ڈیٹ سے ٹیکسٹ سیستم جو ڈچ فوٹ بول راپوروٹ پیدا کرتا ہے، جو ایک کلوب یا دوسرے فریانوں کی طرف اتنا پھیری جاتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں مطالعہ دو مطالعہ سے ہے۔ سیسٹم کے نتیجے کی ایک داخلی انسان کی بنیادی ارزیابی پہلی مطالعہ میں تشریف کی جاتی ہے۔ اس مطالعہ میں یہ معلوم ہوا کہ انسان کے لکھے ہوئے پیغام کے مقابلہ میں کمپیوٹر کی پیغام پیدا کی گئی تھوڑا کم کم کم کم کم کم پائی گئی تھی، اور تھوڑا زیادہ مطالعہ کی سیدھی معلومات کے مقابلہ میں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ پہلی مطالعہ سے نتیجے دکھائے گئے کہ بہت سی موقع میں سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی سیدھی شناخت کی گئی تھی، اور یہ شرکت کرنے والوں نے ٹھیک طور پر مشغول کیا تھا کہ کسی انسان یا کمپیوٹر کے ذریعہ ایک متن لکھا دوسری مطالعہ کی تحقیق کی گئی کہ اگر تغییر دینے کے باعث متخصص کیفیت پر اثر دیتا ہے، جس کے لئے کوئی نتیجہ اثر نہیں کیا جاتا۔ یہ نتائج ناکام ہو سکتا ہے کیونکہ کمپیوٹر کی پیدائش کی پیدائش کے بارے میں منفی پیش آزمائش کی وجہ سے جو پہلی مطالعہ میں پائی گئی تھی۔', 'uz': "Biz PASSning qiymatini hozir qilamiz, bir klab yoki boshqa bir xil fanlariga avtomatik qo'yilgan Dutch soccer haqida yaratish mumkin. Bu qogʻozdagi qiymatni ikkita ta'qituvchi bo'lgan. Tizimning natijasining ichki inson asosida qiymati birinchi o'qituvchida koʻrsatiladi. Bu o'qituvda oddiy matnlarni kamaytirish mumkin, kompyuterning yaratilgan matnlar uslub bilan bog'liq matn komponentlarida qisqacha kamaytirilgan va koʻrsatilgan maʼlumot to ʻgʻri haqida juda kichik yuqori. Ko'rib, birinchi o'qituvchidagi natijalar ko'pchilik holatda yozilishi haqiqida aniqlangan va o'qituvchilar odamning yoki kompyuterning matnni yozib qo'lganligini toʻgʻri aniqlashga harakat qildi. The second study investigated if tailoring affects perceived text quality, for which no results were garnered.  @ info", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một bản đánh giá của PAS, một hệ thống dữ liệu-văn-bản phát ra các báo cáo đá bóng Hà-Lan từ các số kết quả, tự động được phù hợp với người hâm mộ của câu lạc bộ này hay câu lạc bộ khác. Bài đánh giá này gồm hai nghiên cứu. Một bài học cơ bản dựa trên con người về kết quả của hệ thống được mô tả trong nghiên cứu đầu tiên. Trong nghiên cứu này, nó được tìm thấy là so với văn bản được viết bằng người, văn bản máy tính được đánh giá thấp hơn một chút về các thành phần văn bản có liên quan đến phong cách (ngẫu nhiên và trong sáng) và cao hơn một chút về sự chính xác của thông tin. Hơn nữa, kết quả từ nghiên cứu đầu tiên cho thấy rằng thợ sửa được xác nhận chính xác trong hầu hết các trường hợp, và những người tham gia rất khó khăn để xác định chính xác nếu một văn bản được viết bởi người hay máy tính. Vụ nghiên cứu thứ hai có ảnh hưởng đến chất lượng văn bản cảm nhận, mà không có kết quả được thu thập. Sự thiếu kết quả có thể là do các kiến thức tiêu cực về văn bản máy tính được phát hiện trong nghiên cứu đầu tiên.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en evaluering af PASS, et data-til-tekst system, der genererer hollandske fodboldstatistikker, der automatisk skræddersyes til fans af den ene eller den anden klub. Evalueringen i dette dokument består af to undersøgelser. En iboende menneskebaseret evaluering af systemets output er beskrevet i den første undersøgelse. I denne undersøgelse blev det konstateret, at computergenererede tekster sammenlignet med menneskeskrevne tekster blev vurderet lidt lavere på stilrelaterede tekstkomponenter (flydende og klarhed) og lidt højere med hensyn til korrektheden af givne oplysninger. Desuden viste resultaterne fra den første undersøgelse, at skræddersyet i de fleste tilfælde var nøjagtigt anerkendt, og at deltagerne kæmpede med korrekt at identificere, om en tekst var skrevet af et menneske eller en computer. Den anden undersøgelse undersøgte, om skræddersyet påvirker den opfattede tekstkvalitet, hvor der ikke blev opnået resultater. Denne mangel på resultater kan skyldes negative forudsigelser om computergenererede tekster, som blev fundet i den første undersøgelse.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een evaluatie van PASS, een data-to-text systeem dat Nederlandse voetbalrapporten genereert uit wedstrijdstatistieken die automatisch worden afgestemd op fans van de ene of de andere club. De evaluatie in dit artikel bestaat uit twee studies. Een intrinsieke menselijke evaluatie van de output van het systeem wordt beschreven in de eerste studie. In deze studie werd geconstateerd dat computergegenereerde teksten in vergelijking met door mensen geschreven teksten iets lager werden beoordeeld op stijlgerelateerde tekstcomponenten (vloeiendheid en helderheid) en iets hoger in termen van juistheid van gegeven informatie. Bovendien toonden de resultaten van het eerste onderzoek aan dat maatwerk in de meeste gevallen nauwkeurig herkend werd en dat deelnemers worstelden met het correct identificeren of een tekst geschreven was door een mens of computer. In het tweede onderzoek werd onderzocht of maatwerk invloed heeft op de waargenomen tekstkwaliteit, waarvoor geen resultaten werden verkregen. Dit gebrek aan resultaten kan te wijten zijn aan negatieve vooroordelen over computergegenereerde teksten die in het eerste onderzoek werden gevonden.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo procjenu PASS-a, sustava podataka do teksta koji stvara nizozemske izvještaje fudbala iz podudarajućih statistika koje su automatski prilagođene fanovima jednog kluba ili drugog. Procjena u ovom papiru sastoji se od dva ispitivanja. U prvom ispitivanju opisuje unutrašnja ljudska procjena rezultata sustava. U ovom ispitivanju je otkriveno da u usporedbi s ljudskim pisanim tekstima, kompjuterski proizvođeni teksti su malo manji procijenjeni na dijelove teksta povezanih s stilom (tekućina i jasnost) i malo više u smislu ispravnosti podataka. Nadalje, rezultati prvog ispitivanja pokazali su da je prilagodba precizno priznata u većini slučajeva i da su učesnici borili se s ispravnim utvrđivanjem da li je tekst napisao čovjek ili kompjuter. Druga ispitivanja istražila je ako prilagodba utječe na percepcionu kvalitetu teksta, zbog kojih nisu prikupljeni rezultati. Ovaj nedostatak rezultata može biti uzrokovan negativnim preduzetnicima o tekstima iz računala koji su pronađeni u prvom ispitivanju.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan evaluasi PASS, sistem data-ke-teks yang menghasilkan laporan sepak bola Belanda dari statistik pertandingan yang secara otomatis disesuaikan ke penggemar satu klub atau yang lain. The evaluation in this paper consists of two studies.  Evaluasi dasar manusia intrinsik dari hasil sistem diterangkan dalam penelitian pertama. Dalam penelitian ini ditemukan bahwa dibandingkan dengan teks yang ditulis oleh manusia, teks yang dihasilkan oleh komputer ditandai sedikit lebih rendah pada komponen teks berkaitan dengan gaya (keseluruhan dan keseluruhan) dan sedikit lebih tinggi dalam terma persis informasi yang diberikan. Selain itu, hasil dari studi pertama menunjukkan bahwa penyesuaian akurat dikenal dalam kebanyakan kasus, dan bahwa peserta berjuang dengan benar untuk mengidentifikasi apakah teks ditulis oleh manusia atau komputer. Studi kedua menyelidiki apakah penyesuaian mempengaruhi kualitas teks yang diduga, yang tidak dapat hasil. Kekurangan hasil ini mungkin karena preconception negatif tentang teks yang dihasilkan oleh komputer yang ditemukan dalam studi pertama.', 'bg': 'Представяме оценка на система от данни към текст, която генерира холандски футболни отчети от статистиката на мачовете, които автоматично се адаптират към феновете на един или друг клуб. Оценката в настоящата статия се състои от две проучвания. В първото проучване е описана вътрешна човешка оценка на изхода на системата. В това проучване е установено, че в сравнение с човешките текстове, компютърно генерираните текстове са оценени малко по-ниско по отношение на стиловите текстови компоненти (плавност и яснота) и малко по-високо по отношение на коректността на дадената информация. Освен това резултатите от първото проучване показват, че шивашкото майсторство е точно разпознато в повечето случаи и че участниците се борят с правилното идентифициране дали даден текст е написан от човек или компютър. Второто проучване изследва дали шиенето влияе върху възприеманото качество на текста, за което не са получени резултати. Тази липса на резултати може да се дължи на отрицателни предубеждения за компютърно генерирани текстове, които бяха открити в първото проучване.', 'ko': 'PASS 평가를 소개했는데 이것은 데이터를 텍스트로 하는 시스템으로 경기 통계 데이터에 따라 네덜란드 축구 보고서를 작성하는데 이런 데이터는 자동으로 한 클럽이나 다른 클럽의 팬들을 대상으로 맞춤형으로 만들어진다.본고의 평가는 두 가지 연구를 포함한다.첫 번째 연구에서는 시스템 출력의 내재적인 인간에 기초한 평가를 묘사했다.이 연구에서 사람들이 쓴 텍스트에 비해 컴퓨터가 생성한 텍스트는 스타일과 관련된 텍스트 성분(유창도와 선명도)에 대한 평점이 낮고 주어진 정보의 정확성에 대한 평점이 약간 높다는 것을 발견했다.그 밖에 첫 번째 연구 결과에 따르면 대부분의 경우 커팅이 정확하게 식별되고 참여자들은 텍스트가 인간인지 컴퓨터인지 정확하게 식별하기 어렵다고 한다.두 번째 연구는 커팅이 감지된 텍스트의 질에 영향을 미치는지 조사했지만 아무런 결과를 얻지 못했다.이런 결과의 결핍은 첫 번째 연구에서 발견된 컴퓨터 생성 텍스트에 대한 소극적인 선입견 때문일 수 있다.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine Auswertung von PASS, einem Daten-zu-Text-System, das niederländische Fußballberichte aus Spielstatistiken generiert, die automatisch auf Fans des einen oder anderen Clubs zugeschnitten sind. Die Evaluation in dieser Arbeit besteht aus zwei Studien. In der ersten Studie wird eine intrinsische human-basierte Bewertung der Systemleistung beschrieben. In dieser Studie wurde festgestellt, dass computergenerierte Texte im Vergleich zu menschlich geschriebenen Texten hinsichtlich stilbezogener Textkomponenten (Fluenz und Klarheit) etwas niedriger und in Bezug auf die Korrektheit der gegebenen Informationen etwas höher bewertet wurden. Darüber hinaus zeigten die Ergebnisse der ersten Studie, dass Schneiderei in den meisten Fällen genau erkannt wurde und dass die Teilnehmer Schwierigkeiten hatten, richtig zu erkennen, ob ein Text von einem Menschen oder Computer geschrieben wurde. Die zweite Studie untersuchte, ob Tailoring die wahrgenommene Textqualität beeinflusst, für die keine Ergebnisse erzielt wurden. Dieser Mangel an Ergebnissen könnte auf negative Vorurteile über computergenerierte Texte zurückzuführen sein, die in der ersten Studie gefunden wurden.', 'sw': 'Tunatoa tathmini ya PASS, mfumo wa taarifa hadi ujumbe unaotengeneza taarifa za kandanda za Dutch kutoka kwenye takwimu za mpira zinazojitokeza kwa ajili ya mashabiki wa klabu moja au nyingine. Tathmini katika gazeti hili linajumuisha tafiti mbili. Tathmini ya utafiti wa mfumo wa ndani wa binadamu unaelezea katika utafiti wa kwanza. Katika utafiti huu uligunduliwa kuwa ukilinganishwa na maandishi yaliyoandikwa kwa binadamu, maandishi yaliyozaliwa kompyuta yalipungua kidogo kwenye vifaa vya maandishi yanayohusiana na mtindo (ushawishi na uwazi) na kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi kwa sababu ya uhakika wa taarifa zilizotolewa. Zaidi ya hayo, matokeo yaliyotokana na utafiti wa kwanza yalionyesha kuwa uchunguzi ulitambuliwa kwa haki katika kesi nyingi, na kwamba washiriki walipambana na kutambua kama maandishi yaliandikwa na binadamu au kompyuta. Utafiti wa pili ulichunguza kama ufuatiliaji unaathiri ubora wa ujumbe wa maandishi, ambao haujapata matokeo. Ukosefu wa matokeo haya unaweza kutokana na maendeleo hasi kuhusu ujumbe uliotengenezwa kwa kompyuta ambao ulipatikana katika utafiti wa kwanza.', 'fa': 'ما یک ارزیابی PASS را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک سیستم اطلاعات به متن که گزارش فوتبال هلندی را تولید می\u200cکند از آمار مسابقه\u200cای که به طور خودکار به طرفداران یک کلوب یا دیگر تغییر داده می\u200cشوند. ارزیابی در این کاغذ از دو مطالعه است. در اولین مطالعه توضیح داده می\u200cشود که یک ارزیابی از بنیاد انسان بر اساس نتیجه سیستم توصیف می\u200cشود. در این مطالعه پیدا شد که در مقایسه با متن\u200cهای نوشته شده\u200cی انسان، متن\u200cهای تولید شده\u200cی کامپیوتر به کمی پایین\u200cتر از متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن\u200cهای متن ( علاوه بر این، نتیجه\u200cهای اولین مطالعه نشان داد که در بیشتر پرونده\u200cها دقیقاً تغییر\u200cسازی شناخته شده است، و این شرکتگران با دقیقاً مشغول کردند که آیا یک متن توسط یک انسان یا کامپیوتر نوشته شده است. مطالعه دوم تحقیق کرد که آیا تغییر دادن به کیفیت متن مشاهده شده اثر می\u200cدهد، که نتیجه\u200cای به آن نمی\u200cرسید. این کمبود نتایج ممکن است به دلیل پیشگیری منفی در مورد متن های پیدا شده از کامپیوتر که در اولین مطالعه پیدا شده باشند.', 'tr': "Biz PASS'i, bir data-to-text sistemini çykarýarys. Ol Hollandiýanyň futbol raporlaryny oňa bir klub ýa-da başga nusgalaryna awtomatik taýýarlanýar. Bu kagyzdaki çykyş 2 öwrenme bar. Sistemiň netijesi içerisinde daşary adamlaryň çykyşynyň çykyşyny ilkinji studide tassyklanýar. Bu arada adamlaryň ýazylan metinlerine karşılaşykda, kompýuter üretilen metinler biçimlerde (süýtgelik we açıklak) hasaplanýar we berilen maglumatyň dogrylygyna görä biraz ýokary düşürilýär. Munuň üçin ilkinji araşdyrymyň netijesi köp wagtda düzgün şekilde tanaýandygyny görkezildi we iştirakçiler adam ýa-da kompýuter tarapyndan ýazylan metin ýazylýandygyny dogry tanamak bilen mücadele etdiler. Ikinji araşdyrma, eger bejermek metin kalitesine täsirleýän bolsa, onuň üçin hiç hili netijesi getirilmedi. Bu netijeleri ilkinji araştyrmada tapılan kompýuter üretilen metinler hakynda täsirli önünlerden öňünden gelendir.", 'af': "Ons stel 'n evaluering van PASS, 'n data- to- text stelsel wat die Nederlandse fotball raporte genereer van ooreenstemmende statistieke wat outomaties versterk word tot fans van een club of die ander. Die evaluering in hierdie papier bestaan van twee studie. 'n Interinsiese mens-gebaseerde evaluering van die stelsel se uitvoer is beskrywe in die eerste studie. In hierdie studie is dit gevind dat vergelyk met mens geskryfe teks, rekenaar gegenereerde teks is bietjie minder op styl verwante teks komponente (fluwens en klariteit) en bietjie hoër in terms van die regverdigheid van gegewe inligting. Verder het die resultate van die eerste studie vertoon dat die sterking in meeste gevalle geregtig herken was, en dat deelnaders met reg geveg het met die identifiseer of 'n teks deur 'n mens of rekenaar geskryf is. Die tweede studie het ondersoek as die sterking beïnvloor die aangeneem teks-kwaliteit, waarvan geen resultate verkry is nie. Hierdie ontbrekking van resultate mag dalk wees vanweë negatiewe voorsoekte oor rekenaar genereerde teks wat in die eerste studie gevind is.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një vlerësim të PASS, një sistem të dhënash në tekst që gjeneron raporte të futbollit hollandez nga statistikat e ndeshjeve të cilat janë automatikisht të përshtatura ndaj tifozëve të një klubi apo të tjetrit. Vlerësimi në këtë letër përbëhet nga dy studime. Një vlerësim intrinsik me bazë njerëzore i rezultatit të sistemit është përshkruar në studimin e parë. Në këtë studim u zbulua se krahasuar me tekstet e shkruara nga njerëzit, tekstet e gjeneratuar nga kompjuteri u vlerësuan pak më pak në komponentet e tekstit të lidhur me stilin (fluencë dhe qartësi) dhe pak më lart në lidhje me korrektësinë e informacionit të dhënë. Përveç kësaj, rezultatet e studimit të parë treguan se përshtatja ishte e njohur saktësisht në shumicën e rasteve dhe se pjesëmarrësit luftuan për të identifikuar saktësisht nëse një tekst u shkrua nga një njeri apo kompjuter. Studimi i dytë hetoi nëse përshtatja ndikon në cilësinë e perceptuar të tekstit, për të cilën nuk u mblodhën rezultate. This lack of results might be due to negative preconceptions about computer-generated texts which were found in the first study.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՊԱՍՍ-ի, տվյալներ-տեքստի համակարգի գնահատումը, որը ստեղծում է հոլանդական ֆուտբոլային զեկույցներ համապատասխանատվության վիճակագրությունից, որոնք ինքնաբերաբար պատրաստված են մեկ կամ մյուս կլիբի սի Այս թղթի գնահատումը կազմված է երկու ուսումնասիրությունից: Առաջին ուսումնասիրության մեջ նկարագրված է համակարգի արդյունքի ներքին մարդկային հիմնված գնահատումը: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում պարզվեց, որ համեմատելով մարդկային գրված տեքստերի հետ, համակարգչի կողմից ստեղծված տեքստերը մի քիչ ավելի ցածր էին գնահատված ոճով կապված տեքստի բաղադրիչների վրա (ճկունություն և պարզ) և մի քիչ ավելի բարձր տվյալ տեղեկա Ավելին, առաջին ուսումնասիրության արդյունքները ցույց տվեցին, որ հարմարեցման կարևորությունը ճշգրիտ ճանաչում է մեծամասնության դեպքերում, և մասնակիցները պայքարում էին ճշգրիտ պարզելու համար, թե արդյոք տեքստը գրվել է մարդկային կամ համակար Երկրորդ ուսումնասիրությունը ուսումնասիրեց, թե արդյոք պատրաստումը ազդում է ընկած տեքստի որակի վրա, որի համար ոչ մի արդյունք չստացավ: This lack of results might be due to negative preconceptions about computer-generated texts which were found in the first study.', 'am': 'We present an evaluation of PASS, a data-to-text system that generates Dutch soccer reports from match statistics which are automatically tailored towards fans of one club or the other.  በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ ማስታወቂያ ሁለት ትምህርት ነው፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤት በመጀመሪያው ትምህርት ውስጥ የሰው ውጤት መግለጫ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ ከሰው ጽሑፎችን በተካፈሉ፣ ኮምፒውተር የተፈጠሩ ጽሑፎች በሥርዓት የተገኘ ጽሑፎች (ፍጥረት እና ዝርዝርነት) በተለየ የጽሑፍ ጽሑፎች (ፍጥረት እና ዝርዝነት) በተለየ ትንሽ ከፍተኛ ሆኖ ነበር፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የመጀመሪያው ትምህርት ፍጥረቶች በብዙዎቹ ጉዳዮች ላይ መግለጫ እንዲታወቅ እና ተጋሪዎቹ ጽሑፍ በሰው ወይም ኮምፒውተር የተጻፈውን እንደሆነ አስተያየቁ፡፡ ሁለተኛይቱ ትምህርት የጽሑፍ ጥያቄ ጥያቄ እንዲያስጨንቅ ይፈልጋል፡፡ ይህ ውጤት የጎደለው ፍሬዎች በመጀመሪያ ትምህርት ውስጥ የተገኘው የኮምፒውተር ተወው ጽሑፎች የnegative ውጤቶች መሆኑን ይችላል፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা প্যাএসএসের একটি মূল্য উপস্থাপন করছি, একটি ডাটা থেকে টেক্সট সিস্টেম যা ডাচ ফুটবল সংক্রান্ত পরিসংখ্যান থেকে সৃষ্টি করে, যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এক এই পত্রিকার মূল্যের দুই গবেষণায় রয়েছে। প্রথম গবেষণায় সিস্টেমের আউটপুটের বিভিন্ন মানুষের ভিত্তিক মূল্য বর্ণনা করা হয়েছে। এই গবেষণায় পাওয়া গেছে যে মানব লেখা লেখার তুলনায় কম্পিউটার-জেনারেট টেক্সট স্টাইলের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট ট টেক্সপেন্ট সম্পর্ক (ফ্লাইসি এবং পরিস্থিতি) লেখ এছাড়াও প্রথম গবেষণার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে টেলারিং সঠিকভাবে স্বীকৃতি প্রদান করা হয়েছে, এবং অংশগ্রহণকারীরা সঠিকভাবে সংগ্রাম করেছে য দ্বিতীয় গবেষণা অনুসন্ধান করা হয়েছে যে টেইলরিং বুঝতে পারে টেক্সটের মানের উপর প্রভাব ফেলে, যার ফলে কোন ফলাফল স এই ফলাফলের অভাব হতে পারে কম্পিউটার উৎপাদন করা টেক্সট সম্পর্কে নেতিবাচক ধারণার কারণে যা প্রথম গবেষণায় পাওয়া যায়।', 'ca': "Presentam una evaluació del PASS, un sistema de dades a text que genera informes holandeses de futbol a partir d'estadístiques de partida que estan adaptats automàticament a fans d'un club o l'altre. The evaluation in this paper consists of two studies.  En el primer estudi es descriu una evaluació intrínseca basada en l'humà de la producció del sistema. En aquest estudi es va descobrir que en comparació amb els textos escrits per humans, els textos generats per ordinador van ser una mica més baixos en components de text relacionats amb l'estil (fluïtat i claretat) i una mica més alts en termes de correctesa de la informació dada. A més, els resultats del primer estudi van demostrar que en la majoria dels casos la adaptació era reconeguda amb precisió i que els participants van lluitar per identificar correctament si un text era escrit per un humà o per un ordinador. El segon estudi va investigar si la adaptació afecta la qualitat perceptiva del text, per la qual no es van aconseguir resultats. Aquesta falta de resultats pot ser degut a preconceptions negatives sobre els textos generats per ordinador que es van trobar en el primer estudi.", 'cs': 'Představujeme vyhodnocení systému PASS, který generuje holandské fotbalové reporty ze statistik zápasů, které jsou automaticky přizpůsobeny fanouškům jednoho či druhého klubu. Hodnocení v tomto článku se skládá ze dvou studií. V první studii je popsáno vnitřní hodnocení výstupu systému založené na člověku. V této práci bylo zjištěno, že ve srovnání s texty psanými člověkem byly počítačově generované texty hodnoceny mírně nižší na složkách textu souvisejících se stylem (plynulost a srozumitelnost) a mírně vyšší z hlediska správnosti daných informací. Dále výsledky první studie ukázaly, že krejčování bylo ve většině případů přesně rozpoznáno a že účastníci se snažili správně identifikovat, zda text byl napsán člověkem nebo počítačem. Druhá studie zkoumala, zda přizpůsobení na míru ovlivňuje vnímanou kvalitu textu, pro kterou nebyly získány žádné výsledky. Tento nedostatek výsledků může být způsoben negativními předsudky o počítačově generovaných textech, které byly nalezeny v první studii.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo procjenu PASS-a, sustava podataka do teksta koji stvara holandske izvještaje fudbala iz statistike poklapanja koji su automatski prilagođeni fanovima jednog kluba ili drugog. Procjena u ovom papiru sastoji se od dva ispitivanja. U prvom ispitivanju se opisuje unutrašnja ljudska procjena rezultata sustava. U ovom ispitivanju je otkriveno da u usporedbi s ljudskim pisanim tekstima, kompjuterski tekst proizveden je malo niži u odnosu na komponente teksta (tekućina i jasnost) koji su povezani s stilom i malo viši u odnosu na ispravnost određenih informacija. Nadalje, rezultati prvog ispitivanja pokazali su da je prilagodba precizno priznata u većini slučajeva, i da su učesnici borili se sa ispravnim identifikacijom da li je tekst napisao čovjek ili kompjuter. Druga ispitivanja je istraživala ako prilagodba utječe na percepcionu kvalitetu teksta, zbog kojih nisu prikupljeni rezultati. Ovaj nedostatak rezultata bi mogao biti zbog negativnih preduzeća o tekstima iz kompjutera koji su pronađeni u prvom ispitivanju.', 'et': 'Esitame hinnangu PASS-ile, mis on andmevahetussüsteem, mis genereerib Hollandi jalgpalli aruandeid mängude statistikast, mis on automaatselt kohandatud ühe või teise klubi fännidele. Käesolevas dokumendis esitatud hindamine koosneb kahest uuringust. Esimeses uuringus kirjeldatakse süsteemi väljundite olemuslikku inimpõhist hindamist. Käesolevas uuringus leiti, et võrreldes inimkirjutatud tekstidega hinnati arvutipõhiseid tekste stiiliga seotud tekstikomponentide osas veidi madalamalt (sujuvus ja selgus) ning antud informatsiooni õigsuse poolest veidi kõrgemalt. Lisaks näitasid esimese uuringu tulemused, et rätsepteerimist tunti enamikul juhtudel täpselt ära ning et osalejatel oli raskusi õigesti tuvastada, kas tekst on kirjutatud inimese või arvuti poolt. Teises uuringus uuriti, kas kohandamine mõjutab tajutavat teksti kvaliteeti, mille kohta tulemusi ei saadud. Selline tulemuste puudumine võib olla tingitud negatiivsetest eelarvamustest arvutipõhiste tekstide kohta, mis leiti esimeses uuringus.', 'fi': 'Esitämme arvioinnin PASS-järjestelmästä, joka tuottaa hollantilaisia jalkapalloraportteja ottelutilastoista, jotka räätälöidään automaattisesti yhden tai toisen seuran faneille. Arviointi tässä asiakirjassa koostuu kahdesta tutkimuksesta. Ensimmäisessä tutkimuksessa kuvataan ihmisen sisäinen arviointi järjestelmän tuotoksesta. Tutkimuksessa havaittiin, että tietokoneella tuotettuja tekstejä arvioitiin hieman alemmaksi tyyliin liittyvien tekstikomponenttien osalta (sujuvuus ja selkeys) ja hieman korkeammaksi annetun tiedon oikeellisuuden osalta. Lisäksi ensimmäisen tutkimuksen tulokset osoittivat, että räätälöinti tunnistettiin useimmissa tapauksissa tarkasti ja että osallistujilla oli vaikeuksia tunnistaa oikein, onko teksti ihmisen vai tietokoneen kirjoittama. Toisessa tutkimuksessa selvitettiin, vaikuttaako räätälöinti koettuun tekstin laatuun, josta ei saatu tuloksia. Tulosten puute saattaa johtua ensimmäisessä tutkimuksessa havaituista negatiivisista ennakkoluuloista tietokonepohjaisista teksteistä.', 'az': "Biz PASS'i, bir klub və ya digərinin fanlarına tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf tərəf göstəririk. Bu kağızdaki değerlendirmə iki təhsil idi. Sistemin çıxışının içərisində insan tabanlı değerlendirməsi ilk təhsil içində tanımlanır. Bu araşdırma içində insan yazılmış mətnlərlə qarşılaşdığı kimi, bilgisayar yaratdığı mətnlər stil ilə bağlı mətn komponentlərinin (sıxınlıq və açıq-aydınlıq) üzərində biraz daha düşük və verilən məlumatların doğruluğuna görə daha yüksək dərəcələr verildi. Daha sonra, ilk çalışmaların sonuçları çoxluğunda dəyişiklik edilməsi doğru tanındığını göstərdi, və iştirakçıların insan ya da kompjuter tarafından yazıldığını doğru tanıdıqları üçün mübahisə etdilər. İkinci araşdırma təşkil edilmişdir ki, əgər təşkil edilmiş mətn keyfiyyətinə səbəb olursa, buna görə heç bir sonuç verilmədi. Bu sonuçların yoxsulluqları ilk təhsil içində tapılmış kompjuter təşkil edilmiş mətnlər haqqında negatif preconception olaraq olar.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukno perintasi PASS, sistem data-to-text sing ngregani barang batir barang batir barang holes sing dikenakno dadi nggawe dadi, sing automatik dhéwé ngebeki cara-cara sing bakal terus hayo sing paling-cara sing pasang. Validity Wang dhèwèké sing basa gambar uwong ing pancene pancening nggawe sistem sing paling nggawe barang basa sing katêpakan. Nang barêng-barêng iki dipunangé kuwi nggambar kelompok karo texti sing nêmên, sampeyan unêmên seneng pisan ngêmên kuwi kompon sing nêmên (atipêter karo kesempatan) lan akeh langgar sampeyan nêmên kuwi dianggap persilangan Label Genjer-genjer saiki istrasi arah sak kelas kuwi nggawe barang seneng pisan kelas telas, iki dadi ono geulah sekondurahan. Mangkin maneh sing paling maneh kayané perkoro-perkoro sing rak cara-perkoro karo kelas telu, sing dumateng kapan arah sing dumateng nèng arah sing sampeyan tèng sampek.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים עריכה של PASS, מערכת נתונים לטקסט שמוצרת דוחות כדורגל הולנדים מתאימים סטטיסטיקות שמתאימות באופן אוטומטי למעריצים של מועדון אחד או השני. הערכה בעיתון הזה מורכבת משני מחקרים. הערכה פנימית מבוססת על האדם של יציאת המערכת מתארת במחקר הראשון. במחקר הזה נמצא שבהשוואה לטקסטים שנכתבו על ידי אדם, טקסטים שנוצרים על ידי מחשב הוערכו קצת יותר נמוכים על רכיבי טקסט קשורים לסגנון חוץ מזה, התוצאות מהמחקר הראשון הראו כי התאמה הוכרה בדיוק ברוב המקרים, ושהשתתפים נאבקו בזיהוי נכון אם טקסט נכתב על ידי אדם או מחשב. המחקר השני חקר אם הציוד משפיע על איכות טקסט מתחשבת, שאין לו תוצאות. חוסר התוצאות הזה עלול להיות בגלל התחשבות שליליות קודמות על טקסטים שנוצרים מחשב שנמצאו במחקר הראשון.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da ƙaddara na PASS, wata na'urar-zuwa-matsayi da za'a iya ƙiƙiro warar soccer na Dukkan daga statistics da ke daidaita, wanda aka taimaki farat ɗaya zuwa fanfans wa club guda ko na guda. Ana ƙaddara cikin wannan takarda na ƙunsa da karatun biyu. An bayyana wani ƙaddara na cikin mutum a cikin shirin gabanin na'urar na'ura a farkon lõkaci. A cikin wannan littãfin an gane shi, a sami da littãfin rubũtacce ga mutane, aka yi littãfin da kwamfyuta wanda aka ƙididdige littãfin da suka yi sauri da abu kaɗan a kan ƙananan matsayin da aka yi wa masu husũma da rubutu (masu fasahan da bayyani) kuma aka yi da mafi girma a cikin masu ingancin maɓallin da aka ba da shi. Furan haka, matsalar daga littafin farkon ya nuna cewa an gane tailori da hakki a cikin masu yawa, kuma mushirikai sun yi jihãdi game da yin yaƙĩni ko an rubuta wani littãfi na mutum ko kombuyuta. The second study investigated if tailoring affects perceived text quality, for which no results were garnered.  Wannan ƙaranci na matsalar za'a saba da cewa masu motsi na matsayin da aka haife shi na komputi da aka samu a cikin kwanan lõkaci.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo oceno PASS, sistema podatkov v besedilo, ki ustvarja nizozemska nogometna poročila iz statistike tekem, ki so samodejno prilagojena navijačem enega ali drugega kluba. Ocena v tem prispevku je sestavljena iz dveh študij. V prvi študiji je opisana notranja ocena rezultatov sistema na podlagi človeka. V tej študiji smo ugotovili, da so bila računalniško ustvarjena besedila v primerjavi s človeškimi besedili nekoliko nižja glede na slogovne besedilne komponente (tekočost in jasnost) in nekoliko višja glede na pravilnost danih informacij. Poleg tega so rezultati prve študije pokazali, da je bilo prilagajanje v večini primerov natančno prepoznano in da so se udeleženci borili s pravilnim prepoznavanjem, ali je besedilo napisal človek ali računalnik. Druga študija je proučevala, ali prilagajanje vpliva na zaznano kakovost besedila, za katero rezultati niso bili zbrani. To pomanjkanje rezultatov je lahko posledica negativnih predsodkov o računalniško ustvarjenih besedilih, ki so jih našli v prvi študiji.', 'bo': "ང་ཚོར་PASS་ལྟ་བུའི་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གནད་སྡུད་ནས་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་གཏོང་གི་ཡིག་རྩལ་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་འཁོར་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་ཞིབ་གཉིས་ཡོད་པ་རེད། An intrinsic human-based evaluation of the system's output is described in the first study. In this study it was found that compared to human-written texts, computer-generated texts were slightly lower on style-related text components (fluency and clarity)and slightly higher in the terms of the correctness of given information. མ་ཟད། གནད་དོན་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དག་གིས་ཕལ་ཆེན་རྟོགས་བ་ཡིན་ན། ལྟ་བ་གཉིས་པ་དེ་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དཀའ་ངལ་དང་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པ་ཚོར་བརྟན་ཞིབ་བྱས་ན། རྐྱེན་འབྲས་འདི་དག་པས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་རྩོམ་འཁོར་ཐོག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་སྔོན་འགྱུར་བའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་མེད་པས།"}
{'en': 'Answerable or Not : Devising a Dataset for Extending Machine Reading Comprehension', 'ar': 'جواب أم لا: ابتكار مجموعة بيانات لتوسيع نطاق فهم آلة القراءة', 'pt': 'Respondível ou não: conceber um conjunto de dados para estender a compreensão de leitura de máquina', 'fr': 'Answerable or Not\xa0: Concevoir un ensemble de données pour étendre la compréhension de la lecture automatique', 'es': 'Responsable o no: Diseño de un conjunto de datos para ampliar la comprensión de la lectura automática', 'ja': '回答可能かどうか：機械読解理解を拡張するためのデータセットを考案する', 'zh': '对曰:设数集来广机器读解', 'hi': 'उत्तरदायी या नहीं: मशीन रीडिंग कॉम्प्रिहेंशन का विस्तार करने के लिए एक डेटासेट तैयार करना', 'ru': 'Ответить или нет: создание набора данных для расширения понимания машинного чтения', 'ga': 'Freagrach nó Níl: Tacar Sonraí a Chruthú chun Tuiscint Léamh Meaisín a Mhéadú', 'hu': 'Megválaszolható vagy nem: Adatkészlet kidolgozása a gép olvasási értékének kiterjesztéséhez', 'ka': 'პასუხი', 'el': 'Απάντηση ή όχι: Σχεδιάζοντας ένα σύνολο δεδομένων για την επέκταση της κατανόησης ανάγνωσης μηχανών', 'it': 'Risposta o meno: elaborazione di un set di dati per estendere la comprensione della lettura della macchina', 'kk': 'Жауап беретін немесе жоқ: Машин оқу құрылғысының кеңейту деректер қорын құру', 'lt': 'Answerable or Not: Devising a Dataset for Extending Machine Reading Comprehension', 'mk': 'Одговорен или не: Направи датотека за проширување на разбирање за читање на машина', 'ml': 'ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നില്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d: കൂടുതല്\u200d വായിക്കുന്ന യന്ത്രം വായിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡേറ', 'ms': 'Boleh Jawab atau Tidak: Meletakkan Set Data untuk Meluaskan Pemahaman Pembacaan Mesin', 'mt': 'Answerable or Not: Devising a Dataset for Extending Machine Reading Comprehension', 'mn': 'Хариулт өгөх эсвэл үгүй: Машин унших шинжлэх ухааны өгөгдлийн санг төхөөрөх', 'pl': 'Odpowiedź lub nie: Tworzenie zestawu danych do rozszerzenia zrozumienia odczytu maszynowego', 'no': 'Svarbar eller ikkje: Eining av ein databaset for utviding av maskinelesingskomprehension', 'ro': 'Răspuns sau nu: Dezvoltarea unui set de date pentru extinderea înțelegerii citirii mașinilor', 'sr': 'Odgovor ili ne: uređivanje datoteka za proširenje kompresije za čitanje mašine', 'si': 'උත්තර දෙන්න පුළුවන් නැත්නම්: මැෂින් කියවන්න සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණය සඳහා දත්ත සැකසුම්', 'sv': 'Svar eller ej: Utformning av ett dataset för att utöka maskinläsförståelse', 'so': 'Jawaab ama Maya: Developing a Dataset for Extending Mashine Reading Comprehension', 'ta': 'பதிலளிக்கப்படுகிறது அல்லது இல்லை: கூடுதல் இயந்திரத்தை படிக்கும் முடிவுக்கு தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கு', 'ur': 'جواب دینے واﻻ یا نہیں: مشین پڑھنے کی کمپرنسیس کے لئے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ ڈیویس کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Trả lời hay không: Định dạng dữ liệu cho việc mở rộng máy đọc rộng', 'bg': 'Отговорност или не: Създаване на набор от данни за разширяване на разбирането за машинно четене', 'hr': 'Odgovor ili ne: uređivanje datoteka za proširenje kompresije pročitanja strojeva', 'de': 'Antwortfähig oder nicht: Entwicklung eines Datensatzes zur Erweiterung des maschinellen Leseverständnisses', 'nl': 'Beantwoordbaar of niet: Een dataset ontwikkelen voor het uitbreiden van het begrip machinelezen', 'id': 'Jawab atau Tidak: Menyediakan Dataset untuk memperluas Pembacaan Mesin Komprensi', 'da': 'Besvarelig eller ej: Udvikling af et datasæt til udvidelse af maskinlæseforståelse', 'fa': 'پاسخ پاسخ\u200cدهنده یا نه: تغییر داده\u200cای برای افزایش تغییر خواندن ماشین', 'sw': 'Answers or Not: Developing a Dataset for Extreme Mashine Reading Composition', 'tr': 'janlaşdyr ýada ýok: makina okamak üçin bir maglumaty düzenlemek üçin', 'af': "Antwoordebaar of nie: Toestel 'n Dataset vir uitbreiding Masjien Lees Kompresie", 'sq': 'Përgjigjshëm apo jo: Duke pajisur një bazë të dhënash për zgjerimin e kompresionit të leximit të makinës', 'am': 'Answerable or Not: Devising a Dataset for Extending Machine Reading Comprehension', 'hy': 'Պատասխանելի է կամ ոչ: Դադարեցնել մեքենայի ընթերցման ընդլայնման տվյալներ', 'az': 'Cevap verə bilər ya da yoxdur: Makinatı oxumaq üçün çox genişləndirilən verilən quruluş', 'bn': 'Answerable or Not: Devising a Dataset for Extending Machine Reading Comprehension', 'bs': 'Odgovor ili ne: uređivanje datoteka za proširenje kompresije za čitanje mašine', 'ca': 'Responsable o no: Dispositivar un conjunt de dades per ampliar la comprensió de llegir màquines', 'cs': 'Zodpovědné nebo ne: Vývoj datové sady pro rozšíření porozumění strojovému čtení', 'ko': '응답 여부: 디자인 확장 기계 읽기 이해 데이터 집합', 'fi': 'Vastaava tai ei: Tietokannan laatiminen konelukemisen ymmärtämisen laajentamista varten', 'et': 'Vastatav või mitte: andmekogumi väljatöötamine masinlugemise mõistmise laiendamiseks', 'he': 'עניין או לא: מתכנן קבוצת נתונים להרחיב ביטוי קריאת מכונות', 'ha': 'Mai karɓa ko kuma Na: Ka ƙayyade wani tsari na Kyauta', 'sk': 'Odgovorni ali ne: oblikovanje nabora podatkov za razširitev razumevanja strojnega branja', 'jv': '??????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????????', 'bo': 'ལན་གསལ་རུང་མེད་པ། ཆས་གཞུང་ཚབ་ལ་སྒྲིག་ཆས་ཀློག་འཇུག་ཆས་ཀློག་འཇུག་བརྟན་པར་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Machine-reading comprehension (MRC) has recently attracted attention in the fields of natural language processing and machine learning. One of the problematic presumptions with current MRC technologies is that each question is assumed to be answerable by looking at a given text passage. However, to realize human-like language comprehension ability, a machine should also be able to distinguish not-answerable questions (NAQs) from answerable questions. To develop this functionality, a dataset incorporating hard-to-detect NAQs is vital ; however, its manual construction would be expensive. This paper proposes a dataset creation method that alters an existing MRC dataset, the Stanford Question Answering Dataset, and describes the resulting dataset. The value of this dataset is likely to increase if each NAQ in the dataset is properly classified with the difficulty of identifying it as an NAQ. This difficulty level would allow researchers to evaluate a machine’s NAQ detection performance more precisely. Therefore, we propose a method for automatically assigning difficulty level labels, which measures the similarity between a question and the target text passage. Our NAQ detection experiments demonstrate that the resulting dataset, having difficulty level annotations, is valid and potentially useful in the development of advanced MRC models.', 'ar': 'جذب فهم القراءة الآلية (MRC) مؤخرًا الانتباه في مجالات معالجة اللغة الطبيعية والتعلم الآلي. أحد الافتراضات الإشكالية مع تقنيات MRC الحالية هو أنه يُفترض أن كل سؤال يمكن الإجابة عليه من خلال النظر في فقرة نصية معينة. ومع ذلك ، لتحقيق القدرة على فهم اللغة مثل الإنسان ، يجب أن تكون الآلة أيضًا قادرة على التمييز بين الأسئلة غير القابلة للإجابة (NAQs) والأسئلة التي يمكن الإجابة عليها. لتطوير هذه الوظيفة ، تعد مجموعة البيانات التي تتضمن NAQs التي يصعب اكتشافها أمرًا حيويًا ؛ ومع ذلك ، فإن بنائه اليدوي سيكون مكلفًا. تقترح هذه الورقة طريقة إنشاء مجموعة البيانات التي تغير مجموعة بيانات MRC الحالية ، ومجموعة بيانات الإجابة على سؤال ستانفورد ، وتصف مجموعة البيانات الناتجة. من المرجح أن تزداد قيمة مجموعة البيانات هذه إذا تم تصنيف كل NAQ في مجموعة البيانات بشكل صحيح مع صعوبة تحديدها على أنها NAQ. سيسمح مستوى الصعوبة هذا للباحثين بتقييم أداء اكتشاف NAQ للجهاز بشكل أكثر دقة. لذلك ، نقترح طريقة لتعيين تسميات مستوى الصعوبة تلقائيًا ، والتي تقيس التشابه بين السؤال وممر النص الهدف. توضح تجارب اكتشاف NAQ أن مجموعة البيانات الناتجة ، التي تواجه صعوبة في التعليقات التوضيحية على مستوى ، صالحة وربما مفيدة في تطوير نماذج MRC المتقدمة.', 'fr': "La compréhension en lecture automatique (MRC) a récemment attiré l'attention dans les domaines du traitement du langage naturel et de l'apprentissage automatique. L'une des hypothèses problématiques des technologies MRC actuelles est que chaque question est supposée répondre en examinant un passage de texte donné. Cependant, pour acquérir une capacité de compréhension du langage semblable à celle d'un humain, une machine devrait également être capable de distinguer les questions sans réponse (NAQ) des questions auxquelles il est impossible de répondre. Pour développer cette fonctionnalité, un jeu de données intégrant des NAQ difficiles à détecter est essentiel\xa0; cependant, sa construction manuelle serait coûteuse. Cet article propose une méthode de création d'ensemble de données qui modifie un ensemble de données MRC existant, le jeu de données de réponse aux questions de Stanford, et décrit l'ensemble de données résultant. La valeur de cet ensemble de données est susceptible d'augmenter si chaque QN de l'ensemble de données est correctement classé avec la difficulté de l'identifier en tant que QNA. Ce niveau de difficulté permettrait aux chercheurs d'évaluer plus précisément les performances de détection de la NAQ d'une machine. C'est pourquoi nous proposons une méthode pour attribuer automatiquement des étiquettes de niveau de difficulté, qui mesure la similitude entre une question et le passage de texte cible. Nos expériences de détection NAQ démontrent que l'ensemble de données résultant, comportant des annotations de niveau de difficulté, est valide et potentiellement utile dans le développement de modèles MRC avancés.", 'pt': 'A compreensão de leitura de máquina (MRC) atraiu recentemente a atenção nas áreas de processamento de linguagem natural e aprendizado de máquina. Uma das presunções problemáticas com as tecnologias MRC atuais é que cada pergunta é considerada passível de resposta olhando para uma determinada passagem de texto. No entanto, para realizar a capacidade de compreensão de linguagem semelhante à humana, uma máquina também deve ser capaz de distinguir perguntas não respondidas (NAQs) de perguntas respondíveis. Para desenvolver essa funcionalidade, um conjunto de dados que incorpore NAQs difíceis de detectar é vital; no entanto, sua construção manual seria cara. Este artigo propõe um método de criação de conjunto de dados que altera um conjunto de dados MRC existente, o Stanford Question Answering Dataset, e descreve o conjunto de dados resultante. O valor desse conjunto de dados provavelmente aumentará se cada NAQ no conjunto de dados for classificado adequadamente com a dificuldade de identificá-lo como um NAQ. Esse nível de dificuldade permitiria aos pesquisadores avaliar o desempenho de detecção de NAQ de uma máquina com mais precisão. Portanto, propomos um método para atribuição automática de rótulos de nível de dificuldade, que mede a semelhança entre uma pergunta e a passagem do texto alvo. Nossos experimentos de detecção de NAQ demonstram que o conjunto de dados resultante, com anotações de nível de dificuldade, é válido e potencialmente útil no desenvolvimento de modelos MRC avançados.', 'es': 'La comprensión de lectura automática (MRC) ha atraído recientemente la atención en los campos del procesamiento del lenguaje natural y el aprendizaje automático. Una de las presunciones problemáticas con las tecnologías actuales de MRC es que se supone que cada pregunta es respondible mirando un pasaje de texto dado. Sin embargo, para lograr una capacidad de comprensión lingüística similar a la humana, una máquina también debe ser capaz de distinguir las preguntas no respondibles (NAQ) de las preguntas respondibles. Para desarrollar esta funcionalidad, es vital contar con un conjunto de datos que incorpore NAQs difíciles de detectar; sin embargo, su construcción manual sería costosa. Este artículo propone un método de creación de conjunto de datos que altera un conjunto de datos de MRC existente, el conjunto de datos de respuestas a preguntas de Stanford, y describe el conjunto de datos resultante Es probable que el valor de este conjunto de datos aumente si cada NAQ del conjunto de datos se clasifica adecuadamente con la dificultad de identificarlo como un NAQ. Este nivel de dificultad permitiría a los investigadores evaluar el rendimiento de detección de NAQ de una máquina con mayor precisión. Por lo tanto, proponemos un método para asignar automáticamente etiquetas de nivel de dificultad, que mide la similitud entre una pregunta y el pasaje de texto objetivo. Nuestros experimentos de detección de NAQ demuestran que el conjunto de datos resultante, que tiene anotaciones de nivel de dificultad, es válido y potencialmente útil en el desarrollo de modelos de MRC avanzados.', 'ja': '機械読み取り理解（ MRC ）は、自然言語処理と機械学習の分野で最近注目を集めています。 現在のMRCテクノロジーにおける問題のある推測の1つは、各質問は、与えられたテキストの一節を見ることによって回答可能であると仮定することである。 しかし、人間のような言語理解能力を実現するためには、機械は答えられない質問（ NAQ ）と答えられない質問を区別することもできるはずです。 この機能を開発するには、検出しにくいNAQを組み込んだデータセットが不可欠ですが、手動での構築は高価です。 本稿では、既存のMRCデータセットであるStanford Question Answering Datasetを変更し、得られたデータセットを記述するデータセット作成方法を提案する。 このデータセットの値は、データセット内の各NAQがNAQとして識別することが困難な状態で適切に分類されている場合、増加する可能性が高い。 この難易度により、研究者は機械のNAQ検出性能をより正確に評価することができます。 そこで、質問と対象テキストパサージュの類似性を測定する難易度レベルラベルを自動的に割り当てる方法を提案する。 当社のNAQ検出実験は、難易度レベルの注釈を有する得られたデータセットが有効であり、高度なMRCモデルの開発に潜在的に有用であることを実証している。', 'hi': 'मशीन-रीडिंग समझ (एमआरसी) ने हाल ही में प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण और मशीन सीखने के क्षेत्र में ध्यान आकर्षित किया है। वर्तमान एमआरसी प्रौद्योगिकियों के साथ समस्याग्रस्त अनुमानों में से एक यह है कि प्रत्येक प्रश्न को किसी दिए गए पाठ मार्ग को देखकर उत्तरदायी माना जाता है। हालांकि, मानव जैसी भाषा की समझ की क्षमता का एहसास करने के लिए, एक मशीन को उत्तरदायी प्रश्नों से गैर-उत्तरदायी प्रश्नों (NAQs) को अलग करने में भी सक्षम होना चाहिए। इस कार्यक्षमता को विकसित करने के लिए, हार्ड-टू-डिटेक्ट NAQs को शामिल करने वाला डेटासेट महत्वपूर्ण है; हालांकि, इसका मैनुअल निर्माण महंगा होगा। यह पेपर एक डेटासेट निर्माण विधि का प्रस्ताव करता है जो एक मौजूदा एमआरसी डेटासेट, स्टैनफोर्ड प्रश्न उत्तर डेटासेट को बदल देता है, और परिणामी डेटासेट का वर्णन करता है। इस डेटासेट का मूल्य बढ़ने की संभावना है यदि डेटासेट में प्रत्येक NAQ को NAQ के रूप में पहचानने की कठिनाई के साथ ठीक से वर्गीकृत किया जाता है। यह कठिनाई स्तर शोधकर्ताओं को एक मशीन के NAQ का पता लगाने के प्रदर्शन का अधिक सटीक मूल्यांकन करने की अनुमति देगा। इसलिए, हम स्वचालित रूप से कठिनाई स्तर लेबल असाइन करने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो एक प्रश्न और लक्ष्य पाठ मार्ग के बीच समानता को मापता है। हमारे NAQ डिटेक्शन प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि परिणामी डेटासेट, कठिनाई स्तर एनोटेशन होने के कारण, मान्य है और उन्नत एमआरसी मॉडल के विकास में संभावित रूप से उपयोगी है।', 'zh': '机器读解(MRC)近在自然语言处机器学域起人意。 今MRC术者设一问,必验给定文本段落以对。 然而类人之言理解能力,机器犹能分别不能对(NAQ)与可对者也。 开此功能,包藏难测之NAQ数集至要。 然其手动构将甚贵。 本文一变见MRC数据集(斯坦福问答数集)数集创立法,并述所得数集。 若数集之 NAQ ,皆已正分,难以标识为 NAQ,则此数集之直可增也。 此水平将使论人更精机器NAQ检测性能。 是以自分难标之法,以度文段落之相似性。 臣等NAQ检实验,有难注之数集是效,且开高级MRC有潜用之性。', 'ru': 'Понимание машинного чтения (MRC) недавно привлекло внимание в области обработки естественного языка и машинного обучения. Одно из проблемных предположений с современными технологиями MRC заключается в том, что каждый вопрос считается ответственным, если посмотреть на данный отрывок текста. Однако для того, чтобы реализовать способность понимать человеческий язык, машина также должна уметь отличать неответственные вопросы (NAQ) от ответственных вопросов. Для развития этой функциональности жизненно важное значение имеет набор данных, включающий трудно обнаруживаемые NAQ; однако его ручное построение было бы дорогостоящим. В данной статье предлагается метод создания массива данных, который изменяет существующий массив данных MRC, Стэнфордский массив данных для ответа на вопросы, и описывает полученный массив данных. Значение этого набора данных, вероятно, возрастет, если каждый NAQ в наборе данных будет правильно классифицирован с трудностями его идентификации в качестве NAQ. Этот уровень сложности позволил бы исследователям более точно оценить эффективность обнаружения NAQ машины. Поэтому мы предлагаем метод автоматического присвоения меток уровня сложности, который измеряет сходство между вопросом и целевым отрывком текста. Наши эксперименты по обнаружению NAQ демонстрируют, что результирующий набор данных, имеющий аннотации уровня сложности, является действительным и потенциально полезным при разработке передовых моделей MRC.', 'ga': 'Tharraing tuiscint ar mheaisín-léitheoireachta (MRC) aird le déanaí i réimsí na próiseála teanga nádúrtha agus na meaisínfhoghlama. Ceann de na toimhdí fadhbacha le teicneolaíochtaí reatha an MRC ná go nglactar leis go bhfuil gach ceist freagrach trí bhreathnú ar sliocht téacs ar leith. Chun cumas tuisceana teanga atá cosúil leis an duine a bhaint amach, áfach, ba cheart go mbeadh meaisín in ann idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir ceisteanna neamhfhreagracha (CCN) agus ceisteanna atá le freagairt. Chun an fheidhmiúlacht seo a fhorbairt, tá sé ríthábhachtach tacar sonraí a chuimsíonn CCanna ar deacair iad a bhrath; áfach, bheadh a thógáil láimhe costasach. Molann an páipéar seo modh cruthaithe tacar sonraí a athraíonn tacar sonraí MRC atá ann cheana féin, Tacar Sonraí Freagraí Ceist Stanford, agus déanann sé cur síos ar an tacar sonraí a thagann as. Is dócha go dtiocfaidh méadú ar luach an tacair sonraí seo má rangaítear gach CCanna sa tacar sonraí i gceart agus an deacracht é a aithint mar CCÁ. Chuirfeadh an leibhéal deacrachta seo ar chumas taighdeoirí feidhmíocht braite NAQ an mheaisín a mheas ar bhealach níos cruinne. Mar sin, molaimid modh chun lipéid leibhéal deacrachta a shannadh go huathoibríoch, a thomhaiseann an chosúlacht idir ceist agus sliocht an spriocthéacs. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh braite NAQ go bhfuil an tacar sonraí a eascraíonn as, a bhfuil nótaí leibhéil deacrachta aige, bailí agus go bhféadfadh sé a bheith úsáideach maidir le hardsamhlacha MRC a fhorbairt.', 'ka': 'მაქსინური კითხვის შესაძლებლობა (MRC) უკვე აღმოჩენა მონაცემულობა თავისუფალური ენის პროცესი და მაქსინური სწავლების ფორმებში. მიმდინარე MRC ტექნოლოგიების პრობლემატიკური პრობლემატიკური წარმოდგენებიდან ერთი არის, რომ ყოველ კითხვა იყოს წარმოდგენელი ტექსტის გადასვლა. მაგრამ ადამიანის სახელსაწარმოდგენის შესაძლებლობად მაქსინი უნდა შეუძლებელია განსხვავებას, რომელიც არ უკეთესებული კითხვები (NAQs) უკეთესებული კითხვებიდან. ამ ფუნქციალურობის განვითარებისთვის, მონაცემების კონქცია, რომელიც NAQs-ს ძალიან განვითარებელია, მნიშვნელოვანია; მაგრამ მისი ხელსახური შექმნა იქნება ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან. ამ დოკუმენტის შექმნა მონაცემების მეტი, რომელიც მსგავსი MRC მონაცემების სეტის შეცვლა, Stanford კითხვა მონაცემების შესახებ მონაცემების შესახებ და შესახებ მონაცემე ამ მონაცემების მნიშვნელობა შესაძლებელია გაზრდება, თუ ყველა NAQ მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში სწორად კლასიფიგურაცია, როგორც NAQ- ის განსაცემების განსაზღვრების ეს შესაძლებლობელი დონე შეუძლებელია პირდაპირებელი მაქსინის NAQ-ის განაკვირვების გამოყენება უფრო დარწმუნებელია. ამიტომ, ჩვენ აჩვენებთ სხვადასხვა კითხვა და მისაწყისი ტექსტის გადასვლისთვის სხვადასხვა მეტი, რომელიც ავტომატურად განახლებელია განსაზღვრებელი დონეზე. ჩვენი NAQ-ის განახლების ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ შემდეგ მონაცემების კონტაქტი, რომელიც განახლებელია განახლებების დონეზე, ძალიან და პოტენციალურად გამოსაყენებელია', 'el': 'Η κατανόηση της μηχανικής ανάγνωσης (MRC) έχει προσελκύσει πρόσφατα την προσοχή στους τομείς της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας και της μηχανικής μάθησης. Ένα από τα προβληματικά τεκμήρια με τις τρέχουσες τεχνολογίες είναι ότι κάθε ερώτηση θεωρείται ότι μπορεί να απαντηθεί εξετάζοντας ένα συγκεκριμένο κείμενο. Ωστόσο, για να συνειδητοποιήσει την ικανότητα κατανόησης της γλώσσας που μοιάζει με άνθρωπο, μια μηχανή θα πρέπει επίσης να είναι σε θέση να διακρίνει ερωτήσεις που δεν απαντούν από ερωτήσεις που απαντούν. Για την ανάπτυξη αυτής της λειτουργικότητας, είναι ζωτικής σημασίας ένα σύνολο δεδομένων που περιλαμβάνει δύσκολα ανιχνεύσιμα NAQ. Ωστόσο, η χειροκίνητη κατασκευή του θα ήταν δαπανηρή. Η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια μέθοδο δημιουργίας συνόλου δεδομένων που τροποποιεί ένα υπάρχον σύνολο δεδομένων, το σύνολο δεδομένων απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις του Στάνφορντ, και περιγράφει το σύνολο δεδομένων που προκύπτει. Η αξία αυτού του συνόλου δεδομένων είναι πιθανό να αυξηθεί εάν κάθε NAQ στο σύνολο δεδομένων ταξινομηθεί σωστά με δυσκολία να αναγνωριστεί ως NAQ. Αυτό το επίπεδο δυσκολίας θα επέτρεπε στους ερευνητές να αξιολογήσουν με μεγαλύτερη ακρίβεια την απόδοση ανίχνευσης μιας μηχανής. Ως εκ τούτου, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο αυτόματης ανάθεσης ετικετών επιπέδου δυσκολίας, η οποία μετρά την ομοιότητα μεταξύ μιας ερώτησης και του κειμένου προορισμού. Τα πειράματα ανίχνευσης καταδεικνύουν ότι το σύνολο δεδομένων που προκύπτει, έχοντας σημειώσεις επιπέδου δυσκολίας, είναι έγκυρο και δυνητικά χρήσιμο στην ανάπτυξη προηγμένων μοντέλων MRC.', 'hu': 'A gépi olvasási megértés (MRC) a közelmúltban felkeltette a figyelmet a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás és a gépi tanulás területén. Az egyik problémás feltételezés a jelenlegi MRC technológiákkal, hogy minden kérdés egy adott szövegrész megvizsgálásával válaszolható. Azonban az emberi nyelvértési képesség megvalósításához egy gépnek képesnek kell lennie arra is, hogy megkülönböztesse a nem megválaszolható kérdéseket (NAQ-kat) a megválaszolható kérdésektől. E funkció fejlesztéséhez létfontosságú a nehezen észlelhető NAQ-kat tartalmazó adatkészlet; Kézi felépítése azonban drága lenne. Ez a tanulmány egy olyan adatkészlet létrehozási módszert javasol, amely megváltoztatja egy meglévő MRC adatkészletet, a Stanford Question Answering Dataset-et, és leírja az eredményül kapott adatkészletet. Ennek az adatkészletnek az értéke valószínűleg növekedni fog, ha az adatkészletben szereplő egyes NAQ-kat megfelelően osztályozzák, nehézségekkel azonosítani lehet azt NAQ-ként. Ez a nehézségi szint lehetővé tenné a kutatók számára, hogy pontosabban értékeljék a gép NAQ észlelési teljesítményét. Ezért javasoljuk a nehézségi szintű címkék automatikus hozzárendelésére szolgáló módszert, amely méri a kérdés és a célszövegrész hasonlóságát. NAQ detektálási kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy az eredményekből származó, nehézségi szintű megjegyzésekkel rendelkező adatkészlet érvényes és potenciálisan hasznos a fejlett MRC modellek fejlesztésében.', 'kk': 'Машина оқу түсінігі (MRC) жаңа уақытта табиғи тіл процессорын және машинаны оқыту өрістерінде болады. Назардағы MRC технологияларындағы мәселелердің бірі - әрбір сұрақ келтірілген мәтін жолын қарап жауап беру үшін жауап береді. Бірақ адамдар тілінің түсініктерін түсіндіру үшін машина да жауап бермейтін сұрақтарды (NAQs) жауап беруге болады. Бұл функциялықты жасау үшін, NAQs- ті қатты анықтау үшін деректер қорлары үшін маңызды; мәлімет Бірақ оның қолмен құрылымы бағатты болады. Бұл қағаз бар MRC деректер жиынын өзгертетін деректер жиынын құру әдісін, Станфорд сұрақ жауап беретін деректер жиынын таңдап береді. Бұл деректер қорларының мәні, егер деректер қорларындағы әрбір NAQ дегенді NAQ деп анықтау қиындығымен дұрыс түрленген болса, үлкен болады. Бұл қиын деңгейі зерттеушілер машинаның NAQ анықтау әрекетін дұрыс түрде анықтауға мүмкіндік береді. Сондықтан бұл сұрақ мен мақсатты мәтін жолының арасындағы ұқсастығын автоматты түрде таңдау әдісін таңдаймыз. Біздің NAQ анықтау тәжірибелеріміз деректер жинағы, мәселелер деңгейіндегі жазбалар бар дегенді көрсетеді. МRC моделдерін жасау үшін дұрыс және мүмкін пайдалы болады.', 'it': "La comprensione della lettura automatica (MRC) ha recentemente attirato l'attenzione nei campi dell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale e dell'apprendimento automatico. Una delle supposizioni problematiche con le attuali tecnologie MRC è che ogni domanda si presume possa rispondere guardando un dato passaggio di testo. Tuttavia, per realizzare una capacità di comprensione linguistica simile a quella umana, una macchina dovrebbe anche essere in grado di distinguere le domande non risposte (NAQ) dalle domande risposte. Per sviluppare questa funzionalità, un set di dati che incorpora NAQ difficili da rilevare è vitale; Tuttavia, la sua costruzione manuale sarebbe costosa. Questo articolo propone un metodo di creazione di set di dati che altera un set di dati MRC esistente, il set di dati di risposta alle domande di Stanford, e descrive il set di dati risultante. Il valore di questo set di dati aumenterà probabilmente se ogni NAQ del set di dati è classificato correttamente con la difficoltà di identificarlo come NAQ. Questo livello di difficoltà consentirebbe ai ricercatori di valutare le prestazioni di rilevamento NAQ di una macchina in modo più preciso. Pertanto, proponiamo un metodo per assegnare automaticamente etichette di livello di difficoltà, che misura la somiglianza tra una domanda e il passaggio del testo di destinazione. I nostri esperimenti di rilevamento NAQ dimostrano che il set di dati risultante, avendo annotazioni di livello di difficoltà, è valido e potenzialmente utile nello sviluppo di modelli MRC avanzati.", 'ms': 'Pemahaman pembacaan mesin (MRC) baru-baru ini menarik perhatian dalam bidang pemprosesan bahasa alam dan pembelajaran mesin. Salah satu anggapan masalah dengan teknologi MRC semasa adalah bahawa setiap soalan dianggap dapat dijawab dengan melihat laluan teks tertentu. Bagaimanapun, untuk menyadari kemampuan pemahaman bahasa seperti manusia, mesin juga perlu mampu membezakan soalan yang tidak dapat dijawab (NAQ) dari soalan yang dapat dijawab. Untuk mengembangkan fungsi ini, set data yang mengandungi NAQs sukar untuk dikesan adalah penting; bagaimanapun, pembangunan manualnya akan mahal. Kertas ini melaporkan kaedah penciptaan set data yang mengubah set data MRC yang wujud, Set Data Penjawapan soalan Stanford, dan menggambarkan set data yang berasal. Nilai set data ini mungkin akan meningkat jika setiap NAQ dalam set data diklasifikasikan dengan betul dengan kesulitan mengenalpasti sebagai NAQ. Aras kesulitan ini akan membolehkan peneliti untuk menilai prestasi pengesan NAQ mesin dengan lebih tepat. Oleh itu, kami cadangkan kaedah untuk menulis label aras kesulitan secara automatik, yang mengukur persamaan antara soalan dan laluan teks sasaran. Eksperimen pengesan NAQ kami menunjukkan bahawa set data yang menghasilkan, mempunyai anotasi tahap kesulitan, adalah sah dan berpotensi berguna dalam pembangunan model MRC maju.', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d വായിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പരിപാടി (എംആര്\u200dസി) അടുത്തുതന്നെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തിന്റെയും യന്ത് ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ എംആര്\u200dസി സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളുടെ ഒരു പ്രശ്നമുള്ള ഊഹിപ്പുകളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണ് ഓരോ ചോദ്യം നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റ്  എന്നാലും മനുഷ്യരെപ്പോലെയുള്ള ഭാഷ പരിഗണിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു യന്ത്രം ഉത്തരം ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും മറുപടിയില്ലാത്ത ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യ ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വളര്\u200dത്തുവാന്\u200d, നാക്യൂസിനെ കഠിനമായി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സെ എങ്കിലും അതിന്റെ കൈകൊണ്ടുള്ള പണിയെല്ലാം വിലയേറും. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള MRC ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് മാറ്റുന്ന ഒരു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സൃഷ്ടിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതിയാണ് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കു ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിലുള്ള എല്ലാ NAQ വിവരങ്ങളും NAQ എന്ന നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രയാസത്തോടൊപ്പം ശരിക്കും വ്യക്തമാക്കിയാല്\u200d  ഈ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ട നില പരിശീലിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ നാക്കി കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രകടനം കൂടുതല്\u200d വ് Therefore, we propose a method for automatically assigning difficulty level labels, which measures the similarity between a question and the target text passage.  നമ്മുടെ NAQ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, അതിന്റെ ഫലം ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ്, ബുദ്ധിമുട്ട നിലയില്\u200d വികാരം', 'lt': "Mašin ų skaitymo supratimas (MRC) neseniai atkreipė dėmesį į gamtos kalbų apdorojimo ir mašinų mokymosi sritis. One of the problematic presumptions with current MRC technologies is that each question is assumed to be answerable by looking at a given text passage.  However, to realize human-like language comprehension ability, a machine should also be able to distinguish not-answerable questions (NAQs) from answerable questions.  Kad būtų galima plėtoti šį funkciją, labai svarbu sukurti duomenų rinkinį, kuriame būtų sunku nustatyti NAK; vis dėlto jos rankinė konstrukcija būtų brangi. Šiame dokumente siūlomas duomenų rinkinio kūrimo metodas, kuriuo keičiamas esamas MRC duomenų rinkinys, Stanford atsakymų į klausimus duomenų rinkinys, ir aprašomas gautas duomenų rinkinys. Tikėtina, kad šio duomenų rinkinio vertė padidės, jei kiekvienas duomenų rinkinio NAQ yra tinkamai klasifikuojamas ir sunku jį identifikuoti kaip NAQ. This difficulty level would allow researchers to evaluate a machine's NAQ detection performance more precisely.  Todėl siūlome metodą, kuriuo automatiškai priskiriamos sunkumų lygio etiketės, kuria nustatomas klausimo ir tikslinio teksto dalių panašumas. Mūsų NAQ nustatymo eksperimentai rodo, kad gautas duomenų rinkinys, turintis sunkumų lygio anotacijas, yra tinkamas ir potencialiai naudingas kuriant pažangius MRC modelius.", 'mk': "Разбирањето за читање машини (МРЦ) неодамна привлече внимание во областите на природното обработување јазик и машинско учење. Една од проблематичните претпоставувања со сегашните МРЦ технологии е дека секое прашање се претпоставува дека е одговорно со поглед на одреден текст. Сепак, за да се оствари способноста за разбирање на човековите јазици, машината, исто така, треба да може да ги разликува неодговорните прашања (НАК) од одговорните прашања. To develop this functionality, a dataset incorporating hard-to-detect NAQs is vital;  сепак, неговата рачна изградба би била скапа. This paper proposes a dataset creation method that alters an existing MRC dataset, the Stanford Question Answering Dataset, and describes the resulting dataset.  Вредноста на овој набор на податоци најверојатно ќе се зголеми ако секоја НАК во наборот на податоци е соодветно класификувана со тешкотијата да се идентификува како НАК. This difficulty level would allow researchers to evaluate a machine's NAQ detection performance more precisely.  Therefore, we propose a method for automatically assigning difficulty level labels, which measures the similarity between a question and the target text passage.  Нашите експерименти за детекција на НАК покажуваат дека резултатот на сетот на податоци, со анотации на ниво на тешкотии, е валиден и потенцијално корисен во развојот на напредна МРЦ модели.", 'mn': 'Машины унших ойлголт (MRC) саяхан байгалийн хэл болон машин суралцах талаар анхаарлыг татах болсон. Одоогийн MRC технологиудын асуудлын нэг нь асуулт бүр өгөгдсөн текст дагуулыг харахад хариулттай байх гэж боддог. Гэвч хүний хэл шиг хэл ойлгох чадварыг ойлгохын тулд машин хариултгүй асуултуудаас хариултгүй асуултаас ялгаж чадна. Энэ функционалтыг хөгжүүлэхийн тулд НАК-г олох хэцүү өгөгдлийн сан нь чухал. Гэхдээ гарын бүтээл үнэтэй болно. Энэ цаас MRC өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийг өөрчилж байгаа өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийг бүтээх аргыг сануулдаг. Стэнфорд асуулт хариултын өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийг хариулт өгөгдлийн хэлбэрийг харуулдаг. Энэ өгөгдлийн сангийн утга нь NAQ бүр өгөгдлийн сангийн хэмжээнд зөв хэлбэртэй байвал нэмэгдэх боломжтой. Энэ хэцүү хэмжээний түвшинд судлаачид машины NAQ онолын үйл ажиллагааг илүү тодорхойлох боломжтой болгодог. Тиймээс бид хэцүү хэмжээний түвшинд тэмдэглэгдэх арга зааж өгдөг. Энэ нь асуулт болон зорилготой текст хугацааны хоорондын тэнцүү байдлыг хэмжээнэ. Бидний НАК-ын ололтын туршилтууд нөлөөлж буй өгөгдлийн сангууд, хэцүү түвшинд анзаарлаа, хөгжиж буй MRC загварын хөгжлийн тулд үнэ цэнэтэй болон ашигтай гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Il-fehim tal-qari tal-magni (MRC) reċentement ġibed l-attenzjoni fl-oqsma tal-ipproċessar naturali tal-lingwi u t-tagħlim tal-magni. Waħda mill-preżunzjonijiet problematiċi bit-teknoloġiji attwali tal-MRC hija li kull mistoqsija hija preżunta li tista’ tintwieġeb billi wieħed iħares lejn passaġġ tat-test partikolari. Madankollu, biex tinkiseb il-kapaċità ta’ fehim tal-lingwa li tixbaħ lill-bniedem, magna għandha tkun tista’ tiddistingwi wkoll mistoqsijiet li ma jistgħux jitwieġbu (NAQs) minn mistoqsijiet li jistgħu jitwieġbu. Biex tiġi żviluppata din il-funzjonalità, sett ta’ dejta li jinkorpora NAQs diffiċli biex jiġu identifikati huwa vitali; madankollu, il-kostruzzjoni manwali tagħha tkun għalja. Dan id-dokument jipproponi metodu ta’ ħolqien ta’ sett ta’ dejta li jbiddel sett ta’ dejta eżistenti tal-MRC, is-sett ta’ dejta dwar it-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet ta’ Stanford, u jiddeskrivi s-sett ta’ dejta li jirriżulta. Il-valur ta’ dan is-sett ta’ dejta x’aktarx jiżdied jekk kull NAQ fis-sett ta’ dejta jkun ikklassifikat kif suppost bid-diffikultà li jiġi identifikat bħala NAQ. Dan il-livell ta’ diffikultà jippermetti lir-riċerkaturi jevalwaw il-prestazzjoni tal-identifikazzjoni tan-NAQ ta’ magna b’mod aktar preċiż. Għalhekk, qed nipproponu metodu għall-assenjazzjoni awtomatika tat-tikketti tal-livell ta’ diffikultà, li jkejjel is-similarità bejn mistoqsija u l-passaġġ tat-test fil-mira. L-esperimenti tagħna ta’ identifikazzjoni tan-NAQ juru li s-sett tad-dejta li jirriżulta, li għandu annotazzjonijiet fil-livell ta’ diffikultà, huwa validu u potenzjalment utli fl-iżvilupp ta’ mudelli avvanzati tal-MRC.', 'pl': 'Rozumienie czytania maszynowego (MRC) przyciągnęło ostatnio uwagę w dziedzinie przetwarzania języka naturalnego i uczenia się maszynowego. Jednym z problematycznych założeń obecnych technologii MRC jest to, że każde pytanie jest zakładane jako odpowiedzialne poprzez spojrzenie na dany fragment tekstowy. Aby jednak zrealizować zdolność zrozumienia języka podobnego do człowieka, maszyna powinna być również w stanie odróżnić pytania nieodpowiedzialne (NAQ) od pytań odpowiedzialnych. Aby rozwinąć tę funkcjonalność, niezbędny jest zbiór danych zawierający trudne do wykrycia NAQ; jednak jego ręczna konstrukcja byłaby kosztowna. W artykule zaproponowano metodę tworzenia zbiorów danych, która zmienia istniejący zbiór danych MRC, Stanford Question Answering Dataset, i opisuje powstały zbiór danych. Wartość tego zbioru danych prawdopodobnie wzrośnie, jeżeli każdy NAQ w zbiorze danych zostanie odpowiednio sklasyfikowany z trudnością zidentyfikowania go jako NAQ. Ten poziom trudności pozwoliłby naukowcom dokładniej ocenić wydajność wykrywania NAQ maszyny. Dlatego proponujemy metodę automatycznego przypisywania etykiet poziomu trudności, która mierzy podobieństwo między pytaniem a docelowym fragmentem tekstu. Nasze eksperymenty wykrywania NAQ pokazują, że powstały zestaw danych, mający adnotacje na poziomie trudności, jest ważny i potencjalnie przydatny w opracowywaniu zaawansowanych modeli MRC.', 'no': 'Forståking av maskinelesing (MRC) har nyleg attrakta oppmerksomhet i felta for naturspråkshandtering og maskinelæring. Ein av problematiske forstånadane med gjeldande MRC-teknologi er at kvar spørsmål vert ansvart ved å sjå på eit oppgitt tekstpassage. For å forstå språk som menneskelig, bør ein maskin også kunna forstå ikkje svarbare spørsmål (NAQs) frå svarbare spørsmål. For å utvikla denne funksjonaliteten er ein dataset som inkluderer vanskeleg å finna NAQs viktig. handbokstaven vil imidlertid vera dykka. Denne papiret foreslår ein datasettopprettingsmetode som endrar eit eksisterande MRC- datasett, Stanford- spørsmålet svarar på databasen og beskriver resultatet av datasett. Verdien på denne dataset vil sannsynlegvis auka dersom kvar NAQ i dataset er rett klassifisert med vanskeleg å identifisera den som NAQ. Denne vanskelighetsnivået vil tillata forskere å evaluera NAQ- oppdaginga til maskina meir nøyaktig. Derfor fører vi ein metode for automatisk tilordning av vanskeleg nivåetikettar, som målar liknande mellom eit spørsmål og måltekst. Våre NAQ-oppdagingseksperimenter viser at resultatet dataset, med vanskeleg nivånotasjonar, er gyldig og potensielt nyttig i utviklinga av avanserte MRC-modeller.', 'ro': 'Înțelegerea automată a cititului (MRC) a atras recent atenția în domeniul prelucrării limbajului natural și al învățării automate. Una dintre prezumțiile problematice cu tehnologiile actuale MRC este că fiecare întrebare este presupusă a fi răspunzătoare prin examinarea unui anumit pasaj text. Cu toate acestea, pentru a realiza capacitatea umană de înțelegere a limbii, o mașină ar trebui, de asemenea, să fie capabilă să distingă întrebările care nu pot răspunde (NAQ) de întrebările care pot răspunde. Pentru a dezvolta această funcționalitate, un set de date care include NAQ greu de detectat este vital; Cu toate acestea, construcția sa manuală ar fi costisitoare. Această lucrare propune o metodă de creare a seturilor de date care modifică un set de date MRC existent, setul de date de răspuns la întrebări Stanford, și descrie setul de date rezultat. Valoarea acestui set de date va crește probabil dacă fiecare NAQ din setul de date este clasificat corespunzător, cu dificultatea de a-l identifica ca NAQ. Acest nivel de dificultate ar permite cercetătorilor să evalueze performanța de detectare a NAQ a unei mașini mai precis. Prin urmare, propunem o metodă de atribuire automată a etichetelor de nivel de dificultate, care măsoară similitudinea dintre o întrebare și pasajul text țintă. Experimentele noastre de detecție NAQ demonstrează că setul de date rezultat, având adnotări la nivel de dificultate, este valabil și potențial util în dezvoltarea de modele avansate MRC.', 'sr': 'Razumijevanje mašinskih čitanja (MRC) nedavno privlačilo je pažnju na području prirodnog obrazovanja jezika i učenja mašina. Jedna od problematičnih pretpostavki sa trenutnim tehnologijama MRC je da se svako pitanje pretpostavlja odgovornim gledanjem određenog tekstnog prolaza. Međutim, da bi shvatio sposobnost razumevanja jezika kao što je ljudski, mašina bi takođe trebala biti u stanju da razlikuje odgovorne pitanja (NAQs) od odgovornih pitanja. Da bi razvili ovu funkcionalnost, komplet podataka koji uključuje teško otkrivanje NAQs je vitalno; međutim, njegova rukovna građevina bi bila skupa. Ovaj papir predlaže metodu stvaranja podataka koji izmeni postojeću setu podataka MRC-a, Stanford pitanja odgovara na datoteku i opisuje rezultatnu setu podataka. Vrijednost ovog seta podataka će vjerojatno povećati ako je svaka NAQ u setu podataka propisno klasifikovana sa teškošću identifikacije njega kao NAQ. Ova razina teškoća bi omogućila istraživačima da preciznije procjenjuju nastup detektiva mašine NAQ-a. Stoga predlažemo metodu za automatsku dodavanje etiketa nivoa teškoća, koja mjera sličnost između pitanja i ciljnog prolaza teksta. Naši eksperimenti za otkrivanje NAQ-a pokazuju da je rezultatna grupa podataka, koja ima annotacije nivoa teškoća, validna i potencijalno korisna u razvoju naprednih modela MRC-a.', 'si': 'මැෂින් කියවන්න පුළුවන් (MRC) අවස්ථාවයේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ මැෂින් ඉගෙනීමේ ප්\u200dරදේශ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ MRC තාක්ෂණිකාව සමග ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් එක්ක තමයි හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දැක්කා පාසල්  නමුත්, මිනිස්සු වගේ භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා තේරුම් ගන්න, යන්ත්\u200dරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ් මේ වැඩසටහනය විස්තර කරන්න, NAQs විශේෂයෙන් හොයාගන්න දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා; ඒත් එයාගේ මත්තලික නිර්මාණය ගොඩක් වැඩියි. මේ පැත්තේ තියෙන්නේ MRC දත්ත සැට වෙනස් කරපු දත්ත සැටියක්, ස්ටැන්ෆෝර්ඩ් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව දත්ත සැටියක්, සහ මේ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ අගය වැඩි වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා නම් දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ හැම NAQ කියලා ඒක NAQ විදිහට පරීක්ෂා ක මේ අමාරුකාරීය ස්ථානයෙන් පරීක්ෂකයන්ට යන්ත්\u200dරයේ NAQ හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් ව ඉතින්, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ඉලක්කම් පාසයෙන් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාව අපේ NAQ හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පෙන්වන්නයි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ නිසා ප්\u200dරතිචාර දත්ත සැට, අමාරුයි ස්ථානයක් තියෙන්නේ', 'so': "Heshiiska akhriska ee machineenka (MRC) ugu dhowaad ayaa aad u taxadaray daryeelka afka dabiicadda ah iyo barashada machine-ka. Mid ka mid ah fikrada dhibaatada ah oo haysta teknolojiyada MRC waa in su’aal walba la jawaabo marka uu eego baasabka qoraalka la siiyey. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, si aad u ogaato awoodda aasaasiga luqada u eg dadka, mashiintu waa in uu ka kala sooci karo su'aalo aan jawaab ku lahayn (NAQs). Si uu u horumariyo waxqabashadan, waxaa muhiim ah koob macluumaad ah oo ku qoraya NAQs oo aad u adag in la ogaado; Si kastaba ha ahaatee, dhismaha gacmaha ayaa qaali ah. Kanu warqaddan wuxuu soo jeedaa qaab u abuurista macluumaadka oo beddeliya sawirada ku jira MRC, sawirada su'aalaha Stanford, wuxuuna sawirayaa sawirada macluumaadka soo socda. Qiimaha sawiradan waxaa suurtowda in la kordhiyo haddii NAQ kasta oo ku jira databaseta si hagaagsan looga qeybeeyo dhibaatada aqoonsiga sida NAQ. Heerarkan dhibaatadu waxay u oggolaan kartaa baaritaanka baaritaanka NAQ ee mashiinka. Sidaa darteed waxaan horumarinaynaa qaab aan automatic u qaybinno alaabta heerka dhibaatada, kaas oo qiyaasa si siman u dhexeeya su'aal iyo baasabka qoraalka waxqabadka. Our NAQ detection experiments demonstrate that the resulting dataset, having difficulty level annotations, is valid and potentially useful in the development of advanced MRC models.", 'sv': 'Maskinläsförståelse (MRC) har nyligen uppmärksammats inom områdena naturlig språkbearbetning och maskininlärning. En av de problematiska antagandena med dagens MRC-teknik är att varje fråga antas vara besvarad genom att titta på en given textpassage. Men för att inse mänsklig språkförståelse förmåga, bör en maskin också kunna skilja icke-besvarade frågor (NAQs) från besvarade frågor. För att utveckla denna funktionalitet är en datauppsättning som innehåller svårupptäckta nationella Qs avgörande. Den manuella konstruktionen skulle dock bli dyr. Denna uppsats föreslår en metod för skapande av datauppsättningar som ändrar en befintlig MRC-datauppsättning, Stanford Question Answering Dataset, och beskriver den resulterande datauppsättningen. Värdet på denna datamängd kommer sannolikt att öka om varje NAQ i datauppsättningen klassificeras korrekt med svårigheten att identifiera den som en NAQ. Denna svårighetsgrad skulle göra det möjligt för forskare att utvärdera en maskines NAQ detekteringsprestanda mer exakt. Därför föreslår vi en metod för att automatiskt tilldela svårighetsnivåetiketter, som mäter likheten mellan en fråga och måltextpassagen. Våra NAQ-detekteringsexperiment visar att den resulterande datauppsättningen, med anmärkningar på svårighetsnivå, är giltig och potentiellt användbar vid utveckling av avancerade MRC-modeller.', 'ta': 'இயந்திரம்- படிக்கும் தொகுதி( MRC) சமீபத்தில் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் மற்றும் இயந்திரம் கற்றல் புலங்களில் கவனம்  தற்போதைய MRC தொழில்நுட்பத்தில் ஒரு சிக்கலான எண்ணங்கள் என்னவென்றால் ஒவ்வொரு கேள்வியும் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உரை கடவுச்செல்ல ஆனால், மனிதன் போன்ற மொழி சூழ்நிலை தெரிந்து கொள்ளும், ஒரு இயந்திரமும் பதில்லாத கேள்விகளிலிருந்து பிரித்துக் கொள்ள மு இந்த செயல்பாட்டை உருவாக்க, NAQs கடினமாக-கண்டுபிடிக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்பு முக்கியமானது; however, its manual construction would be expensive.  இந்த காகிதத்தில் இருக்கும் MRC தரவுத்தளத்தை மாற்றும் தகவல் அமைப்பு முறைமையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும், ஸ்டான்போர்ட் கேள்வி பதில்  தரவுத்தளத்தில் ஒவ்வொரு NAQ யும் NAQ என்று கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பொருளால் இந்த தரவுத்தளத்தின் மதிப்பு அதிகரிக்கும். இந்த கடினமான நிலையில் ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் ஒரு இயந்திரத்தின் NAQ கண்டுபிடிப்பு செயல்பாட்டை மிகவும் சரியாக மதிப ஆகையால், நாம் தானாகவே கட்டுப்பாட்டு மட்டத்தின் சிட்டைகளை வழங்கும் முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது கேள்வி மற்றும் சேர எங்கள் NAQ கண்டுபிடிப்பு சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறது முடிவு தகவல் அமைப்பு, கடினமான நிலை அறிவிப்புகள் இருக்கிறது, மேம்பட்ட MRC மாதிரிகளை உருவா', 'ur': 'ماشین پڑھنے کی سمجھ (MRC) نے اچھے وقت طبیعی زبان پردازش اور ماشین سکھانے کی کھیتیوں میں اچھی طرح توجه اٹھایا ہے۔ موجود MRC ٹیکنالوجی کے ساتھ مشکلات کی حدس سے ایک ہے کہ ہر سوال کو ایک متن پھیر دیکھنے کے ذریعہ جواب دینے والا سمجھا جاتا ہے. لیکن انسان کی طرح کی زبان کی سمجھ جانے کے لئے ایک ماشین بھی جواب دینے والی سوال سے جواب دینے والی سوال سے اختلاف کرسکتا ہے۔ اس فعالیت کے لئے ایک ڈیٹ سٹ ہے جو NAQs کو اچانک تلاش کرنے کے لئے شامل ہوتا ہے۔ لیکن اس کے مہمانی بنیاد گران ہوگا۔ یہ کاغذ ایک ڈاٹ سٹ پیدا کرنے کا طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو موجود MRC ڈاٹ سٹ کو بدل دیتا ہے، استنفورد سؤال ڈاٹ سٹ کا جواب دیتا ہے اور نتیجہ ڈاٹ سٹ کو دکھاتا ہے. اس ڈاٹ سٹ کا ارزش زیادہ ہو سکتا ہے اگر ڈاٹ سٹ میں ہر NAQ ٹھیک طرح کے ساتھ اس کو NAQ کے طور پر پہچان کرنے کی مشکل کے ساتھ تقسیم کیا جاتا ہے. یہ مشکل سطح جہاد کرنے والوں کو ایک ماشین کے NAQ شناسایے کے عملکرد کا ارزش کرنا اجازت دے گا۔ لہٰذا ہم ایک طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ مشکل سطح لئبل کو اپنا مقرر کریں، جو ایک سوال اور موقع لکھنے کے درمیان برابری کا اندازہ کرتا ہے. ہمارے NAQ ڈیٹسٹ کی آزمائش کی آزمائش دکھاتی ہے کہ نتیجۂ ڈیٹسٹ، مشکل سطح کی آزمائش کے ساتھ، قابل ہے اور امکانات میں فائدہ اٹھانے والی MRC موڈلوں کی پیشرفت میں ہے.', 'uz': "Yaqinda mashina o'qish kompyutini (MRC) asl tilni boshqarish va mashinani o'rganish maydonlarida foydalanadi. Joriy MRC texnologiyaning murakkab fikrlaridan biri, har savol koʻrsatilgan matn maxfiy soʻzni ko'rib turib javob beradi. Lekin, oddiy tilni o'xshash natijaligini aniqlash uchun, mashina javob berilmagan savollarni ajratish kerak. To develop this functionality, a dataset incorporating hard-to-detect NAQs is vital;  Lekin, uning qoʻlbola tuzilishi qiymati bo'ladi. Bu hujjat mavjud maʼlumot maʼlumotlar bazasini oʻzgartirib boʻladi, Stanford soʻrov maʼlumot bazasini oʻzgartiradi va natijada maʼlumot bazasini anglatadi. @ info Bu qiyin darajasi o'qituvchilarni mashinaning NAQ aniqlash bajarishini qidirishga ruxsat beradi. Shunday qilib, biz avtomatik darajadagi qiyin tugmalar baytlarini ajratish usulini talab qilamiz, bu savol va qanday matn maxfiy soʻzlari orasidagi oʻxshasini moslash. NAQ'ning aniqlash imtiyolarimizni ko'rsatadi, natijasida maʼlumotlar tizimi, qiyin darajada taʼminlovchi bo'lganligi mumkin, yaxshi va muhim MRC modellarini taʼminlashga foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc thấu hiểu máy tính (MRX) gần đây thu hút sự chú ý trong lĩnh vực xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và học máy. Một trong những giả thiết khó khăn với công nghệ MRC hiện nay là mỗi câu hỏi được cho là phải trả lời bằng cách nhìn vào một đoạn văn bản cụ thể. Tuy nhiên, để nhận ra khả năng hiểu biết ngôn ngữ giống người, một cỗ máy cũng có thể phân biệt những câu hỏi không đáp ứng (NAQs) với những câu hỏi trả lời. Để phát triển chức năng này, một bộ dữ liệu chứa các Nazca khó phát hiện, Tuy nhiên, công trình bằng tay sẽ rất đắt tiền. Tờ giấy này đề xuất một phương pháp tạo dữ liệu có thể thay đổi một bộ dữ liệu MRC tồn tại, Bộ Dữ liệu Trả lời Hỏi Hỏi của Stanford, và mô tả bộ dữ liệu sau đó. Giá trị của bộ dữ liệu này có thể tăng lên nếu mỗi bộ phận giám định trên dữ liệu được phân loại thích đáng với khó khăn xác định nó là một bộ phận giám sát quốc gia. Mức độ khó khăn này s ẽ cho phép các nhà nghiên cứu đánh giá tỉ lệ phát hiện của máy ở NASQ hơn. Do đó, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp tự động phân bổ các nhãn cấp độ khó khăn, nó đo đạc sự giống nhau giữa câu hỏi và đoạn văn bản đích. Những thí nghiệm phát hiện NASQ của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng tập tin này, có ghi chú cấp độ khó khăn, là hợp lệ và có khả năng hữu dụng trong việc phát triển các mô hình MRC cao.', 'da': "Maskinlæseforståelse (MRC) har for nylig tiltrukket opmærksomhed på områderne naturlig sprogbehandling og maskinlæring. En af de problematiske formodninger med nuværende MRC teknologier er, at hvert spørgsmål antages at være besvaret ved at se på en given tekstpassage. Men for at realisere menneskelig-lignende sprogforståelsesevne, bør en maskine også være i stand til at skelne ikke-besvarelige spørgsmål (NAQs) fra besvarelige spørgsmål. For at udvikle denne funktionalitet er et datasæt, der indeholder svært at detektere NAQ'er, afgørende; Den manuelle konstruktion ville imidlertid være dyr. Denne artikel foreslår en metode til oprettelse af datasæt, der ændrer et eksisterende MRC datasæt, Stanford spørgsmål besvarelse datasæt, og beskriver det resulterende datasæt. Værdien af dette datasæt vil sandsynligvis stige, hvis hver NAQ i datasættet klassificeres korrekt, og det har svært ved at identificere det som en NAQ. Dette vanskelighedsniveau ville gøre det muligt for forskere at evaluere en maskines NAQ detektionsydeevne mere præcist. Derfor foreslår vi en metode til automatisk tildeling af sværhedsniveau etiketter, som måler ligheden mellem et spørgsmål og måltekstpassagen. Vores NAQ detektionseksperimenter viser, at det resulterende datasæt, der har vanskelighedsniveau annotationer, er gyldigt og potentielt nyttigt i udviklingen af avancerede MRC modeller.", 'hr': 'Razumijevanje pročitanja strojeva (MRC) nedavno privlačilo je pažnju na području prirodnog obrazovanja jezika i učenja strojeva. Jedna od problematičnih pretpostavki s trenutnim tehnologijama MRC-a je da se svako pitanje smatra odgovornim gledanjem određenog tekstnog prolaza. Međutim, kako bi shvatio sposobnost razumijevanja jezika sličnog ljudskom jeziku, stroj bi također trebao biti u stanju različiti odgovorne pitanja (NAQs) od odgovornih pitanja. Da bi razvili ovu funkcionalnost, potrebna je kompleta podataka uključujući tvrdo otkrivanje NAQs-a; međutim, njegova rukovna građevina bi bila skupa. Ovaj papir predlaže metodu stvaranja podataka koja izmijeni postojeću setu podataka MRC-a, Stanford pitanja odgovara na datoteku i opisuje rezultatnu setu podataka. Vjerojatno će vrijednost ovog seta podataka povećati ako je svaka NAQ u setu podataka propisno klasifikirana s teškošću identifikacije njega kao NAQ. Ova razina teškoća bi omogućila istraživačima da preciznije procijene učinkovitost otkrivanja mašine NAQ-a. Stoga predlažemo metodu za automatski dodavanje etiketa razine teškoća, koja mjera sličnost između pitanja i ciljnog prolaza teksta. Naši eksperimenti za otkrivanje NAQ-a pokazuju da je rezultatna grupa podataka, koja ima annotacije nivoa teškoća, vrijedna i potencijalno korisna u razvoju naprednih modela MRC-a.', 'bg': 'Разбирането на машинното четене напоследък привлича вниманието в областта на обработката на естествени езици и машинното обучение. Една от проблемните предположения при сегашните технологии на ДПС е, че всеки въпрос се приема за отговорен чрез разглеждане на даден текстов пасаж. Въпреки това, за да осъществи способността за разбиране на езика, подобна на човека, машината трябва също да може да различава въпросите, които не отговарят (НАQ) от въпросите, които отговарят. За да се развие тази функционалност, е жизненоважно да се създаде набор от данни, включващи трудни за откриване НК; Но ръчното му строителство би било скъпо. Настоящата статия предлага метод за създаване на набор от данни, който променя съществуващ набор от данни от МРС, Станфордския набор от данни за отговор на въпроси, и описва получения набор от данни. Стойността на този набор от данни вероятно ще се увеличи, ако всяка NAQ в набора от данни е правилно класифицирана с трудността да бъде идентифицирана като NAQ. Това ниво на трудност би позволило на изследователите да оценят по-точно ефективността на откриване на NAQ на машината. Затова предлагаме метод за автоматично задаване на етикети с нива на трудност, който измерва сходството между въпрос и целевия текст. Нашите експерименти за откриване на NAQ показват, че полученият набор от данни, с анотации с ниво на трудност, е валиден и потенциално полезен при разработването на усъвършенствани модели на MRC.', 'de': 'Das maschinelle Leseverstehen (MRC) hat in jüngster Zeit in den Bereichen der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprachen und des maschinellen Lernens Aufmerksamkeit erregt. Eine der problematischen Annahmen mit aktuellen MRC-Technologien ist, dass jede Frage durch Betrachten einer bestimmten Textpassage als beantwortet angenommen wird. Um jedoch menschenähnliche Sprachverständnisfähigkeiten zu realisieren, sollte eine Maschine auch in der Lage sein, nicht ansprechbare Fragen (NAQs) von beantworbaren Fragen zu unterscheiden. Zur Entwicklung dieser Funktionalität ist ein Datensatz mit schwer zu erkennenden NAQs unerlässlich; Der manuelle Bau wäre jedoch teuer. Dieses Papier schlägt eine Methode zur Datensatzerstellung vor, die einen bestehenden MRC-Datensatz, den Stanford Question Answering Dataset, verändert und den resultierenden Datensatz beschreibt. Der Wert dieses Datensatzes wird wahrscheinlich steigen, wenn jede NAQ im Datensatz ordnungsgemäß klassifiziert wird, wobei es schwierig ist, sie als NAQ zu identifizieren. Dieser Schwierigkeitsgrad würde es Forschern ermöglichen, die NAQ-Erkennungsleistung einer Maschine genauer zu bewerten. Daher schlagen wir eine Methode zur automatischen Zuweisung von Schwierigkeitsstufen vor, die die Ähnlichkeit zwischen einer Frage und der Zieltextpassage misst. Unsere NAQ-Detektionsexperimente zeigen, dass der resultierende Datensatz mit Anmerkungen auf Schwierigkeitsgraden valide und potenziell nützlich für die Entwicklung fortschrittlicher MRC-Modelle ist.', 'nl': "Machine-reading understanding (MRC) heeft onlangs aandacht getrokken op het gebied van natuurlijke taalverwerking en machine learning. Een van de problematische veronderstellingen bij de huidige MRC-technologieën is dat elke vraag beantwoordbaar wordt door naar een bepaalde tekstpassage te kijken. Om echter een menselijk taalbegrip te realiseren, moet een machine ook niet-beantwoordbare vragen (NAQ's) kunnen onderscheiden van antwoordbare vragen. Om deze functionaliteit te ontwikkelen is een dataset met moeilijk te detecteren NAQ's essentieel; De handmatige constructie ervan zou echter duur zijn. Dit document stelt een methode voor om datasets te maken die een bestaande MRC dataset, de Stanford Question Answering Dataset, wijzigt en beschrijft de resulterende dataset. De waarde van deze dataset zal waarschijnlijk toenemen als elke NAQ in de dataset naar behoren is geclassificeerd met de moeilijkheid om het als NAQ te identificeren. Dit moeilijkheidsniveau zou onderzoekers in staat stellen om de NAQ-detectieprestaties van een machine nauwkeuriger te evalueren. Daarom stellen we een methode voor om moeilijkheidsniveaulabels automatisch toe te wijzen, die de gelijkenis meet tussen een vraag en de doeltekst passage. Onze NAQ detectie experimenten tonen aan dat de resulterende dataset, met moeilijkheidsniveau annotaties, geldig en potentieel nuttig is bij de ontwikkeling van geavanceerde MRC modellen.", 'fa': 'مفهوم خواندن ماشین (MRC) اخیرا توجه در زمینه\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی و یادگیری ماشین را جذب کرده است. یکی از پیش\u200cبینی\u200cهای مشکلی با تکنولوژی\u200cهای MRC فعلی این است که هر سوال با نگاه کردن یک مسیر متن به پاسخ داده می\u200cشود. ولی برای فهمیدن توانایی درک کردن زبان مانند انسان، یک ماشین باید توانایی از سوالاتی که پاسخ نمی\u200cدهند (NAQs) از سوالاتی که پاسخ می\u200cدهند جدا کند. برای توسعه این عملکرد، یک مجموعه داده\u200cای که شامل شناسایی NAQs سخت است مهم است. به هر حال ساختن دستگاه آن گرون خواهد بود. این کاغذ روش ساختن مجموعه داده\u200cها را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند که مجموعه داده\u200cهای MRC موجود را تغییر می\u200cدهد، سؤال جواب داده\u200cهای استنفورد و مجموعه داده\u200cهای نتیجه را توصیح می\u200cدهد. ارزش این مجموعه داده\u200cها احتمالاً افزایش می\u200cدهد اگر هر NAQ در مجموعه داده\u200cها به طور درست با مشکل شناسایی آن را به عنوان NAQ تشخیص داده شود. این سطح مشکلی به محققان اجازه می دهد که کاربرد شناسایی NAQ یک دستگاه دقیقاً ارزیابی کنند. بنابراین، ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با خودکار برچسب\u200cهای سطح مشکل را تهیه کنیم، که مشابه بین یک سوال و مسیر متن هدف را اندازه می\u200cدهد. آزمایش\u200cهای شناسایی NAQ ما نشان می\u200cدهند که مجموعه داده\u200cهای نتیجه\u200cای که توضیح سطح مشکلی دارند، در توسعه مدل\u200cهای پیشرفته MRC قابل استفاده است.', 'id': 'Pemahaman pembacaan mesin (MRC) baru-baru ini menarik perhatian dalam bidang proses bahasa alam dan pembelajaran mesin. Salah satu asumsi yang problematik dengan teknologi MRC saat ini adalah bahwa setiap pertanyaan dianggap dapat dijawab dengan melihat kalimat teks tertentu. Namun, untuk menyadari kemampuan pemahaman bahasa seperti manusia, mesin juga harus dapat membedakan pertanyaan yang tidak dapat dijawab dari pertanyaan yang dapat dijawab. Untuk mengembangkan fungsi ini, set data yang mengangkut NAQs yang sulit ditemukan adalah penting; however, its manual construction would be expensive.  Kertas ini mengusulkan metode penciptaan set data yang mengubah set data MRC yang ada, set data menjawab pertanyaan Stanford, dan menggambarkan set data yang berasal. Nilai set data ini mungkin akan meningkat jika setiap NAQ dalam set data diklasifikasi dengan benar dengan kesulitan untuk mengidentifikasinya sebagai NAQ. Tingkat kesulitan ini akan memungkinkan para peneliti untuk mengevaluasi prestasi deteksi NAQ mesin dengan lebih tepat. Oleh karena itu, kami mengusulkan metode untuk otomatis mengatur label tingkat kesulitan, yang mengukur persamaan antara pertanyaan dan bagian teks sasaran. Eksperimen deteksi NAQ kami menunjukkan bahwa set data yang menghasilkan, memiliki anotasi tingkat kesulitan, adalah valid dan potensial berguna dalam pengembangan model MRC maju.', 'ko': '기계독해(MRC)는 최근 몇 년 동안 자연 언어 처리와 기계 학습 분야에서 광범위한 관심을 불러일으켰다.현재 MRC 기술의 문제점 중 하나는 모든 문제가 주어진 텍스트 단락을 보고 대답할 수 있다고 가정하는 것이다.그러나 인간과 유사한 언어 이해 능력을 실현하기 위해서는 기계가 대답할 수 없는 문제(NAQ)와 대답할 수 있는 문제를 구분할 수 있어야 한다.이 기능을 개발하기 위해서는 검출하기 어려운 NAQ를 포함하는 데이터 집합이 중요하다.그러나 인공 건조의 비용은 매우 높을 것이다.본고는 기존의 MRC 데이터 집합인 스탠퍼드 퀴즈 데이터 집합을 바꾸고 생성된 데이터 집합을 묘사하는 데이터 집합 생성 방법을 제시했다.데이터 세트의 각 NAQ가 올바르게 분류되고 NAQ로 인식하기 어려울 경우 데이터 세트의 가치가 증가할 수 있습니다.이 난이도 수준은 연구원들이 기계의 NAQ 검측 성능을 더욱 정확하게 평가할 수 있게 할 것이다.따라서 우리는 난이도 등급 라벨을 자동으로 분배하는 방법을 제시했는데 이 방법은 문제와 목표 텍스트 단락 간의 유사성을 측정한다.우리의 NAQ 검사 실험에 의하면 생성된 데이터 집합은 난이도 수준의 주석을 가지고 있으며 고급 MRC 모델의 개발에서 효과적이고 잠재적으로 유용하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'tr': "Maşynyň okamaky düşünmesi (MRC) täbiýal dil işlemegi we maşynyň öwrenmesi sahypalarda üns çekdi. Häzirki MRC teknolojileri bilen problematik ösümlikleriň biri bolsa, her soragy berilen metin geçigine seredeniň jogap berilip kabul edilýär. Ýöne adam ýaly dilde düşünüp biljek ukyplaryny gözlemek üçin maşynyň jogap bermeýän soraglaryny (NAK'lar) jogap bermeginden tapawup bilmeli. Bu funksiýaty bejermek üçin, NAQlary ahtarmak üçin gaty bir dataýet düzümleri möhüm; onuň elimi gurluşy bagly bolar. Bu kagyz meňzeş MRC veri setini üýtgeden veri setirini saýlaýar we netijäki veri setirini saýlaýar Eger veri setirinde her NAQ dogry ýagdaýda soraglanmaň kynçylyky bilen bejerilip biler. Bu kynçylyk derejesi araştyranlaryň maşynyň NAQ tapylygynyň dykkatly çykmasyna rugsat bermesine mümkin edýär. Şol sebäpli biz kynçylyk derejesi etiketlerini otomatik taýýarlamak üçin bir yöntem teklip edip, soragyň we maksady metin geçişiniň arasynda meňzeşlikini öleýäris. NAQ deteksiýalarymyz netijesi ýagdaýynyň, kynçylyk derejesi ýagdaýynyň, gelişmiş MRC modelleriniň gelişmesinde geçerli we gowy ýüzedir diýip görkezilýän deneylerimiz görkezilýär.", 'sw': 'MRC hivi karibuni imevutiwa hisia katika maeneo ya utaratibu wa lugha asili na kujifunza mashine. Moja ya dhana tatizo yenye teknolojia ya sasa ya MRC ni kwamba kila swali linadhaniwa kujibu kwa kuangalia upatikanaji wa ujumbe wa maandishi. Hata hivyo, kuelewa uwezo wa lugha inayofanana na binadamu, mashine pia inapaswa kuwa na uwezo wa kutofautisha maswali yasiyowajibu (NAQs) kutoka maswali yanayojibu. Kuendeleza kazi hii, seti ya data inayojumuisha vigumu kugundua NAQs ni muhimu; Hata hivyo, ujenzi wake wa mikononi utakuwa ghali. Gazeti hili linapendekeza mbinu ya kutengeneza taarifa inayobadilisha seti ya taarifa za MRC zilizopo, seti ya swali la Stanford, na inaelezea seti ya taarifa za matokeo. Takwimu ya seti hii ya data inawezekana kuongezeka kama kila NAQ katika seti ya taarifa inaweza kutangazwa vizuri na vigumu vya kutambua kama NAQ. Kiwango hiki cha ngumu kitawasaidia watafiti kutathmini utendaji wa mashine ya NAQ kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi. Therefore, we propose a method for automatically assigning difficulty level labels, which measures the similarity between a question and the target text passage.  Majaribio yetu ya uchunguzi wa NAQ yanaonyesha kuwa kituo cha data kinachotokana na kuwa na matatizo ya kiwango kigumu, kina uhakika na kinachofaa katika maendeleo ya modeli za MRC zilizopanda.', 'am': 'መሳሪያን-አንብቡ (MRC) በቅርብ ጊዜ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል እና መሳሪያን ትምህርት ባለበት እርሻ ላይ ትኩረትን አቀረበ፡፡ የአሁኑን MRC ቴክሎጂ ያሉት የጭንቀት ግንኙነት አንዱ ጥያቄ የተሰጠውን የጽሑፍ መግቢያ በመጠበቅ መልስ እንዲመስል ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የሰው ብጤ ቋንቋ መፍጠርን ለማወቅ፣ መሳሪያው ደግሞ መልስ ሳይመልስ ጥያቄዎችን ለመለየት ይችላል፡፡ ይህንን ቦታ ለማድረግ፣ NAQ-ን ለማግኘት አስቸጋሪ ማህበረሰብ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የሀብት ግንኙነት ዋጋ ይሆናል፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም የአሁኑን MRC ዳታዎችን የሚለውጥ የዳታ አዲስ ፍጥረት ሥርዓት፣ የስቴንፎር ጥያቄ የመጠያቂያውን ጥያቄ እና የመጨረሻውን ዳታ ማዘጋጀት ይገልጻል፡፡ የዚህ ዳታ ሰርቨሮች ቁጥር የNAQ በየዳራሲቱ ውስጥ በክፍለ ግንኙነት እንደ NAQ በሚገልጽ ጭንቀት እንደሆነ ይጨመርበታል፡፡ ይህ ጭንቀት ደረጃዎች የመኪና የNAQ ግንኙነትን በሙሉ እንዲያስተካክሉ ይፈልጋል፡፡ ስለዚህ የጭንቀት ደረጃ ምልክቶችን በራስነት ለማሳየት የደረጃ ማሰናከል እና በጥያቄ እና የጽሑፍ መግቢያ መካከል የሚመስል ሥርዓት እናስባለን፡፡ የNAQ ፈተናዎቻችን ምናልባት የሚያሳየው የዳታ ሰርቨሮች፣ የጭንቀት ደረጃዎች ማስታወቂያ ሆኖ የተጠቃሚ እና የተቻለ የMRC ሞዴላዎችን ለመግኘት ነው፡፡', 'sq': 'Përkuptimi i leximit të makinave (MRC) ka tërhequr kohët e fundit vëmendjen në fushat e procesimit natyror të gjuhës dhe mësimit të makinave. Një nga supozimet problematike me teknologjitë aktuale të MRC është se çdo pyetje supozohet të jetë e përgjigjshme duke parë një kalim teksti të caktuar. Megjithatë, për të realizuar aftësinë e kuptimit të gjuhës njerëzore, një makinë duhet të jetë gjithashtu në gjendje të dallojë pyetjet e papërgjigjshme (NAQ) nga pyetjet e përgjigjshme. Për të zhvilluar këtë funksionalitet, një grup të dhënash që përfshin NAQ të vështira për të zbuluar është thelbësor; however, its manual construction would be expensive.  Ky dokument propozon një metodë krijimi të grupit të të dhënave që ndryshon një grup të të dhënave ekzistuese MRC, grupi i të dhënave për përgjigjet e pyetjeve të Stanfordit dhe përshkruan grupin e të dhënave që rezultojnë. Vlera e këtij grupi të dhënash ka gjasa të rritet në qoftë se çdo NAQ në grup të dhënash klasifikohet siç duhet me vështirësinë e identifikimit të saj si një NAQ. Ky nivel vështirësie do të lejojë kërkuesit të vlerësojnë më saktësisht performancën e zbulimit të NAQ-s ë së një makine. Prandaj, ne propozojmë një metodë për të caktuar automatikisht etiketat e nivelit të vështirësisë, që masa ngjashmërinë midis një pyetjeje dhe kalimit të tekstit objektiv. Eksperimentet tona të zbulimit të NAQ demonstrojnë se grupi i të dhënave që rezultojnë, duke pasur anotacione të nivelit të vështirësisë, është i vlefshëm dhe potencialisht i dobishëm në zhvillimin e modeleve të avancuara MRC.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս մեքենաների ընթերցման ընկալումը (ՄՌԿ) ուշադրություն է դարձրել բնական լեզվի վերամշակման և մեքենաների ուսումնասիրության ոլորտներում: Այսօրվա ՄՌԿ տեխնոլոգիաների հետ կապված խնդիրներից մեկն այն է, որ յուրաքանչյուր հարց ենթադրվում է, որ պատասխանելի է տեսնելով տվյալ տեքստի հատվածը: Այնուամենայնիվ, որպեսզի հասկանանք մարդկային նման լեզվի հասկանալու ունակությունը, մեքենան պետք է նաև կարողանա տարբերել անպատասխանատու հարցերը պատասխանատու հարցերից: To develop this functionality, a dataset incorporating hard-to-detect NAQs is vital;  այնուամենայնիվ, ձեռքի կառուցվածքը թանկ կլիներ: Այս աշխատանքը առաջարկում է տվյալների համակարգի ստեղծման մեթոդ, որը փոխում է գոյություն ունեցող ՄՌԿ տվյալների համակարգը, Ստենֆորդ հարցերի պատասխանների համակարգը և նկարագրում է արդյունքում ստացված տվյալների համակարգը: Այս տվյալների համակարգի արժեքը հավանաբար կբարձրանա, եթե տվյալների համակարգի յուրաքանչյուր NAQ-ը ճիշտ դասակարգում է, և այն որպես NAQ-ի բացահայտելու դժվարությամբ: Այս դժվարության մակարդակը թույլ կտար հետազոտողներին ավելի ճշգրիտ գնահատել մի մեքենայի NAQ-ի հայտնաբերման արդյունքը: Therefore, we propose a method for automatically assigning difficulty level labels, which measures the similarity between a question and the target text passage.  Մեր NAQ-ի հայտնաբերման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ արդյունքում ստացված տվյալների համակարգը, որն ունի դժվարությունների մակարդակի նոտացիաներ, ճշմարիտ է և պոտենցիալ օգտակար է զարգացած ՄՌԿ մո', 'af': "Masjien-lees verstaan (MRC) het onlangs aandag in die velde van natuurlike taal verwerking en masjien leer aangevoer. Een van die problematiese voorspoedings met huidige MRC-teknologies is dat elke vraag aangeneem word om te verantwoord deur te kyk na 'n gegewe teks-pad. Maar om menslike taal verstaande moontlikheid te bevestig, moet 'n masjien ook in staat wees om nie-antwoorbare vrae (NAQs) van antwoord vrae te verkies nie. Om hierdie funksionaliteit te ontwikkel, 'n datastel wat hard to- detect NAQs inkorpreer is vitaal; maar sy handbouding sou koste wees. Hierdie papier voorstel 'n datastel skep metode wat verander 'n bestaande MRC datastel, die Stanford Vrag Antwoord Dataset en beskryf die resulteerde datastel. Die waarde van hierdie datastel is waarskynlik na vermeerder as elke NAQ in die datastel regverdig geklassifiseer is met die moeilikheid om dit as 'n NAQ te identifiseer. Hierdie moeilikheid vlak sal toelaat resekers na evalueer 'n masjien se NAQ-deteksie-presies meer. Daarom, ons voorstel 'n metode vir outomatiese toewysing van moeilikheid vlak etikette, wat die gelykheid tussen 'n vraag en die doel teks verbygegang maak. Ons NAQ-opdekking eksperimente bevestig dat die resulteerde datastel, met moeilikheidsvlak notasies, is geldig en potensielle nuttig in die ontwikkeling van gevorderde MRC-modelle.", 'az': 'MaŇüńĪn oxuyan anlama (MRC) t…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ôsi v…ô maŇüńĪn √∂yr…ônm…ôsi sah…ôl…ôrind…ô √ßox yaxńĪnlaŇüdńĪ. HazńĪrkńĪ MRC teknolojil…ôri il…ô olan problematik t…ôsirl…ôrd…ôn biri, h…ôr bir sual veril…ôn m…ôtn ke√ßm…ôsin…ô cavab ver…ôc…ôkdir. Ancaq insan kimi dill…ôrin anlama qabiliyy…ôtini √∂yr…ônm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, bir makin d…ô cavab ver…ô bilm…ôy…ôn suallarńĪ (NAQs) il…ô cavab ver…ô bil…ôr. Bu funksiyalńĪńüńĪ inkiŇüaf etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, NAQs-l…ôri inkiŇüaf etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn m…ôlumat qurńüusu m√∂vcuddur; ∆Źlb…ôtt…ô, onun …ôlli inŇüaatńĪ mal olacaq. Bu kańüńĪt mevcut MRC veri quruluńüunu d…ôyiŇüdir…ôn veri quruluńüunu, Stanford SoruŇüu Cevap Ver…ôn veri quruluńüunu t…ôblińü edir v…ô sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪn veri quruluńüunu t…ôsdiql…ôyir. Bu veril…ôn qurńüunun qiym…ôti, …ôg…ôr veril…ôn qurńüuda h…ôr bir NAQ d√ľzg√ľn bir NAQ kimi tanńĪtmaq √ß…ôtinlikl…ô ayńĪrńĪlńĪrsa, artńĪracaq. Bu √ß…ôtin s …ôviyy…ôsi, araŇütńĪrmacńĪlarńĪn maŇüńĪnńĪn NAQ keŇüfetm…ôsini daha dońürudan deńüerl…ôŇüdirm…ôsin…ô izin verir. Bel…ôlikl…ô, biz s…ôrt seviyy…ôti etiketl…ôrini avtomatik t…ôyin etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn bir metod t…ôklif edirik ki, bir sual v…ô m…ôqs…ôd metin ke√ßm…ôsi arasńĪndakńĪ b…ônz…ôrini √∂l√ß√ľr. NAQ keŇüfetm…ôsi t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrimiz t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrinin sonucu veril…ôn quruluńüu, √ß…ôtin seviyy…ôti t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrinin, m√ľmk√ľn v…ô m√ľv…ôff…ôqiyy…ôtli MRC modell…ôrin geliŇüm…ôsind…ô faydalńĪ olduńüunu g√∂st…ôrir.', 'bs': 'Razumijevanje strojeva čitanja (MRC) nedavno privlačilo je pažnju na području prirodnog obrazovanja jezika i učenja strojeva. Jedna od problematičnih pretpostavki sa trenutnim tehnologijama MRC-a je da se svako pitanje predpostavlja odgovornim gledanjem određenog tekstnog prolaza. Međutim, kako bi shvatio sposobnost razumijevanja jezika sličnog ljudskom jeziku, stroj bi također trebao biti u stanju da razlikuje odgovorne pitanja (NAQs) od odgovornih pitanja. Da bi razvili ovu funkcionalnost, potrebna je kompleta podataka koja uključuje teško otkrivanje NAQs-a; međutim, njegova rukovna građevina bi bila skupa. Ovaj papir predlaže metodu stvaranja podataka koji izmjenja postojeću setu podataka MRC-a, Stanford pitanja odgovara na datoteku i opisuje rezultatnu setu podataka. Vrijednost ovog seta podataka će vjerojatno povećati ako je svaka NAQ u setu podataka propisno klasifikovana sa teškošću identifikacije njega kao NAQ. Ova razina teškoća bi omogućila istraživačima da preciznije procjenjuju učinkovitost otkrivanja mašine NAQ-a. Stoga predlažemo metodu za automatsku dodavanje etiketa nivoa teškoća, koja mjera sličnost između pitanja i ciljnog prolaza teksta. Naši eksperimenti za otkrivanje NAQ-a pokazuju da je rezultatna grupa podataka, koja ima annotacije nivoa teškosti, vrijedna i potencijalno korisna u razvoju naprednih modela MRC-a.', 'ca': "La comprensió de lectura màquina (MRC) ha atraït recentment atenció en els camps del processament natural de llenguatges i l'aprenentatge màquina. Una de les presuncions problemàtiques de les tecnologies actuals de la MRC és que cada pregunta es suposa ser responsable mirant un passage de text. Tanmateix, per tal de concretizar l'habilitat de comprensió del llenguatge humà, una màquina també hauria de ser capaç de distingir preguntes no resposables de preguntes resposables. Per desenvolupar aquesta funcionalitat, un conjunt de dades que incorporen QNAs difícils de detectar és vital; però la seva construcció manualseria cara. Aquest paper propon un mètode de creació de conjunt de dades que altera un conjunt de dades MRC existent, el conjunt de dades de resposta a preguntes de Stanford, i descriu el conjunt de dades resultant. El valor d'aquest conjunt de dades creixerà probablement si cada NAQ del conjunt de dades està classificat adequadament amb la dificultat d'identificar-la com a NAQ. Aquest nivell de dificultat podria permetre als investigadors evaluar més precisament el rendiment de la detecció de la QNAP d'una màquina. Per tant, proposem un mètode per assenyar automàticament etiquetes de nivell de dificultat, que mesuren la similitud entre una pregunta i la passació del text d'objectiu. Els nostres experiments de detecció del NAQ demostren que el conjunt de dades resultant, tenint anotacions de nivell de dificultat, és válid i potencialment útil en el desenvolupament de models avançats de MRC.", 'bn': 'মেশিন-পড়তে পারে সাম্প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া এবং মেশিন শিক্ষার ক্ষেত্রে মনোযোগ আকর্ষণ করেছে। বর্তমান MRC প্রযুক্তির সঙ্গে সমস্যার একটি ধারণা হচ্ছে প্রত্যেক প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেওয়া হবে একটি টেক্সট পাসেজ দেখার মাধ্যমে। তবে মানুষের মতো ভাষার সম্পূর্ণ ক্ষমতা বুঝতে পারে, একটি মেশিনেও উত্তর প্রশ্ন থেকে বিচ্ছিন্ন করতে পারে। এই কার্যকলাপ উন্নয়নের জন্য ন্যাকিউসের মধ্যে কঠিন-থেকে সনাক্ত করার একটি ডাটাসেট গুরুত্বপূর্ণ; তবে তার হাতের নির্মাণ বেশী দাম হবে। এই পত্রিকাটি একটি ডাটাসেট সৃষ্টির পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করেছে যা বিদ্যমান MRC ডাটাসেট, স্ট্যানফোর্ড প্রশ্নের উত্তর তথ্য সেট পরিবর্তন করে  এই ডাটাসেটের মান বৃদ্ধি হবে যদি ডাটাসেটের প্রত্যেকটি NAQ-এ সঠিকভাবে ক্লাসাফ করা হয়, তাহলে এটি NAQ হিসেবে চিহ্নিত করার কঠি এই কঠিন পর্যায়ে গবেষকদের একটি মেশিনের ন্যাকিউ সনাক্তির কার্যক্রমের বিষয়টি বেশি পরিমাণে মূল্যায়ন করতে দেবে। তাই আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কঠিন পর্যায়ের লেবেল বানানোর একটি পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি, যা প্রশ্ন এবং লক্ষ্য লেখা পাসেজের মধ্যে একই ধরন আমাদের ন্যাকিউ আবিষ্কার পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা প্রমাণ করেছে যে এর ফলে ডাটাসেট, যার ফলে কঠিন পর্যায়ে বিবেচনা আছে, তা বৈধ এবং সম্ভবত উন্নত এমআরসি মডেল উন', 'cs': 'Porozumění strojovému čtení (MRC) v poslední době upoutalo pozornost v oblastech zpracování přirozeného jazyka a strojového učení. Jednou z problematických předpokladů současných MRC technologií je, že každá otázka je předpokládána za zodpovědnou pohledem na danou textovou pasáž. Aby však stroj mohl být schopen rozlišovat nezodpovědné otázky (NAQ) od zodpovědných otázek, měl by být také schopen rozlišovat. Pro rozvoj této funkce je nezbytná sada dat obsahující obtížně detekovatelné NAQ; Nicméně jeho ruční konstrukce by byla drahá. Tento článek navrhuje metodu vytváření datových sad, která mění existující MRC datovou sadu, Stanford Question Answering Dataset, a popisuje výslednou sadu dat. Hodnota tohoto datového souboru se pravděpodobně zvýší, pokud bude každý NAQ v datovém souboru řádně klasifikován, s obtížností jej identifikovat jako NAQ. Tato úroveň obtížnosti by výzkumníkům umožnila přesněji vyhodnotit detekční výkon stroje NAQ. Proto navrhujeme metodu automatického přiřazování značek úrovně obtížnosti, která měří podobnost mezi otázkou a cílovou textovou pasáží. Naše detekční experimenty NAQ ukazují, že výsledná sada dat s anotacemi úrovně obtížnosti je platná a potenciálně užitečná při vývoji pokročilých MRC modelů.', 'et': 'Masinlugemise mõistmine (MRC) on hiljuti pälvinud tähelepanu looduskeele töötlemise ja masinõppe valdkonnas. Üks praeguste MRC tehnoloogiate probleemseid eeldusi on, et iga küsimus eeldatakse vastutavaks konkreetse tekstilõigu vaatamisel. Inimliku keele mõistmise võime realiseerimiseks peaks masin suutma eristada ka mittevastavaid küsimusi vastutavatest küsimustest. Selle funktsionaalsuse arendamiseks on oluline andmekogum, mis sisaldab raskesti tuvastatavaid riiklikke kvalifikatsioone; Kuid selle käsitsi ehitamine oleks kallis. Käesolevas artiklis pakutakse välja andmekogumi loomise meetod, mis muudab olemasolevat MRC andmekogumit Stanfordi küsimustele vastamise andmekogumit ja kirjeldab saadud andmekogumit. Kõnealuse andmekogumi väärtus tõenäoliselt suureneb, kui iga andmekogumi NAQ liigitatakse nõuetekohaselt ja seda on raske tuvastada NAQ. See raskusaste võimaldaks teadlastel täpsemalt hinnata masina NAQ tuvastamise jõudlust. Seetõttu pakume välja meetodi raskusastme siltide automaatseks määramiseks, mis mõõdab küsimuse ja sihtteksti vahelist sarnasust. Meie NAQ tuvastamise katsed näitavad, et saadud andmekogum, millel on raskusastme märkused, on kehtiv ja potentsiaalselt kasulik täiustatud MRC mudelite väljatöötamisel.', 'fi': 'Konelukemisen ymmärtäminen (MRC) on viime aikoina herättänyt huomiota luonnollisen kielen käsittelyn ja koneoppimisen aloilla. Yksi nykyisten MRC-teknologioiden ongelmallisista oletuksista on, että jokaiseen kysymykseen oletetaan vastattavan tarkastelemalla tiettyä tekstikohtaa. Ihmisen kaltaisen kielen ymmärtämiskyvyn toteuttamiseksi koneen tulisi myös pystyä erottamaan vastaamattomat kysymykset (NAQ) vastaamattomista kysymyksistä. Tämän toiminnon kehittämiseksi on elintärkeää luoda tietokokonaisuus, jossa on vaikeasti havaittavia kansallisia kysymyksiä. Sen manuaalinen rakentaminen olisi kuitenkin kallista. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotetaan aineiston luontimenetelmää, joka muuttaa olemassa olevaa MRC-aineistoa, Stanford Question Answering Dataset -aineistoa, ja kuvailee tuloksena olevaa aineistoa. Tämän aineiston arvo todennäköisesti kasvaa, jos jokainen aineiston NAQ luokitellaan asianmukaisesti ja sitä on vaikea tunnistaa NAQ:ksi. Tämä vaikeustaso antaisi tutkijoille mahdollisuuden arvioida koneen NAQ-tunnistuksen suorituskykyä tarkemmin. Siksi ehdotamme menetelmää vaikeustason tunnisteiden automaattiseen määrittämiseen, joka mittaa kysymyksen ja kohdetekstikohdan samankaltaisuutta. NAQ-havaintokokeemme osoittavat, että tuloksena oleva aineisto, jolla on vaikeustason merkinnät, on pätevä ja mahdollisesti hyödyllinen kehittyneiden MRC-mallien kehittämisessä.', 'jv': 'Perintah yang dipunanggé gambar (MR) Mungkin kamu kelompok sing beraksi barêng-barêng karo teknêlogi MPN gak iki dadi saben cejane supong supoyo barang seng apik. Nanging, nggunakake tresnane kapanan ingkang sampeyan karo perusahaan, kelangan kuwi mau iso ngubah ujian sing ora iso dianggapon nggo cecaturan (Naqs) sing apik dhéwé. Daftar nggawe funksi iki, sampeyan dataset sing isine kapan-pakan karo ditambah NUqs iku dianggawe lan saiki kenal; Nanging, dadi, ngejaraké manut kuwi karo akeh. Laptop" and "Desktop string" in "context_BAR_stringLink CalImp politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ndheke nambah éntuk éntuk-éntuk sing bisalahan ngono nggawe dataset dadi, iso ngdadi susah-susahe kuwi dianggap, sing luwih apik lan iso nggawe barang nggawe model sing bisa dianggap model MPN.', 'he': 'ההבנה בקריאת מכונות (MRC) נמשכה לאחרונה תשומת לב בשטחים של עיבוד שפה טבעי וללמד מכונות. אחת מההניחויות הבעיתיות עם טכנולוגיות MRC הנוכחיות היא שכל שאלה ניתן לענות על ידי הסתכל על מעבר טקסט מסוים. בכל אופן, כדי להבין יכולת הבנה לשפה דומה לאדם, מכונה גם צריכה להיות מסוגלת להבדיל שאלות לא ענויות (NAQs) משאלות ענויות. כדי לפתח את הפונקציונליות הזו, קבוצת נתונים שמכילה NAQs קשה לגלות הוא חיוני; however, its manual construction would be expensive.  העבודה הזו מציעה שיטת יצירת קבוצת נתונים שינוית קבוצת נתונים של MRC קיימת, קבוצת נתונים של עניין שאלות סטנפורד, ומתארת את קבוצת נתונים הנוצאה. הערך של קבוצת הנתונים הזאת סביר להעלות אם כל NAQ שבקבוצת הנתונים מסווג כראוי עם הקשה לזהות אותה כNAQ. רמת הקשה הזו תאפשר למחקרים להעריך את ביצועי זיהוי NAQ של מכונה יותר מדויק. לכן, אנו מציעים שיטה להסגיר אוטומטית תוויות רמת הקשה, שמדודה את הדומה בין שאלה למעבר הטקסט המטרה. Our NAQ detection experiments demonstrate that the resulting dataset, having difficulty level annotations, is valid and potentially useful in the development of advanced MRC models.', 'sk': 'Strojno branje (MRC) je v zadnjem času pritegnilo pozornost na področju obdelave naravnega jezika in strojnega učenja. Ena od problematičnih domnev pri sedanjih tehnologijah MRC je, da se predpostavlja, da je vsako vprašanje odgovorno z ogledom določenega besedilnega odlomka. Za uresničitev sposobnosti razumevanja jezika, ki je podobna človeku, pa mora biti stroj sposoben razlikovati tudi vprašanja, ki niso odgovorna (NAQ) od vprašanj, ki jih je mogoče odgovoriti. Za razvoj te funkcionalnosti je ključnega pomena nabor podatkov, ki vključuje težko zaznavne NAQ; Vendar bi bila njegova ročna gradnja draga. V prispevku je predlagana metoda ustvarjanja nabora podatkov, ki spreminja obstoječi nabor podatkov MRC, Stanfordov nabor podatkov za odgovore na vprašanja, in opisuje nastali nabor podatkov. Vrednost tega nabora podatkov se bo verjetno povečala, če bo vsak NAQ v naboru podatkov ustrezno razvrščen in ga je težko identificirati kot NAQ. Ta težavnostna stopnja bi raziskovalcem omogočila natančnejšo oceno učinkovitosti zaznavanja NAQ stroja. Zato predlagamo metodo samodejnega dodeljevanja oznak težavnostne stopnje, ki meri podobnost med vprašanjem in ciljnim besedilnim prelomom. Naši poskusi odkrivanja NAQ kažejo, da je nastali nabor podatkov s težavnimi opombami veljaven in potencialno uporaben pri razvoju naprednih modelov MRC.', 'ha': "QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Bayani daga zato masu cikin shakka da technical na MRC yanzu shine an ƙayyade a karɓa kõwane tambayi da aka dũba wani tsarin matsayin. A lokacin da, dõmin ka gane abincin harshen mutum kamar misalin mutum, wani mashine ya kamata ya iya rarraba su tambayar da ba'a karɓa ba (NAQs) daga tambayar za'a karɓa. @ action: button Kayya, kammala kammala zai kasance mafiya kyauta. Wannan takardar da ke buɗe wata metode na samun halitta da ke canza wata tsarin MRC da ke gaba, da shirin Jawabar Jayayar Stanford, kuma yana bayyana tsarin data ta ƙarama. Kima na wannan daidaita database zai iya ƙara idan an ƙayyade kowace NAQ cikin tsarin database da aka ƙayyade shi properly da ƙunci ya gane shi kamar NAQ. Wannan zane na da nau'i zai yarda watan da su evaluate mafarin karatun na NAQ na cikin mashine mafi ƙayyade. Saboda haka, Munã buɗa wata hanyor da za'a raba alama masu nau'i farat ɗaya, da za'a daidaita tsakanin wani tambayi da kuma ma'abũcin matsayin kiyaye. TajararinMu na NAQ za'a nuna cewa tsarin danganta ta, ana da zane-zane-zane-zane, yana da inganci kuma yana da amfani cikin bubuɗen misali na MRC.", 'bo': 'མ་ལག་ལྟ་ཀློག་ནུས་པའི་རྟོགས་ཤིག་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་དང་མ་ལག་གི་སློབ མིག་སྔར་ཡོད་པའི་MRC་ལག་རྩལ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་དཀའ་ངལ་གྱི་འཆར་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་ནི་དྲི་ཚིག ཡིན་ནའང་། མིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ནུས་པ་ལྟ་བུ་རྟོགས་དགོས་པ་ལས། མ་ལག་ཅིག་གིས་གདོང་ལེན་ལབ་མི་ལན་པའི་དྲི་ཚིག ལས་འགན་འགྲུལ་སྐྱོད་འདི་དག་གནང་དགོས་ན་གནད་དོན་རྙེད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཞིག་དག་པས། ཡིན་ནའང་། ལག་བཟོས་གཞི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་དེ་སྡུག་པ་དང་། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གནས་ཚུལ་སྒྲིག གལ་སྲིད་ནང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་ཀྱི་བེ་ལྟར་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའམ། དཀའ་ངལ་གྱི་ཚད་འདི་ལྟ་ཞིབ་པས་རྩོལ་ཞིབ་པ་ཚོས་ལག་གི་རྟོགས་བཤེར་གྱི་སྐྱེས་ཚད་དང་གཅིག་ཡང་མཐོང་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དཀའ་ངལ ང་ཚོའི་NAQ རྟོགས་པའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཤད་ཐབས་མེད།'}
{'en': 'Style Obfuscation by Invariance', 'ar': 'أسلوب التعتيم بالثبات', 'pt': 'Ofuscação de estilo por invariância', 'fr': 'Obfuscation de style par invariance', 'es': 'Ofuscación de estilos por invariancia', 'ja': '不変性によるスタイルの難読化', 'zh': '因不变性模糊', 'hi': 'Invariance द्वारा शैली Obfuscation', 'ru': 'Обфусцирование стиля по инвариантности', 'ga': 'Obfuscation Stíl de réir Athraitheas', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Απόκρυψη ύφους από ασυμβατότητα', 'hu': 'A stílus zavarással történő homályosítása', 'mk': 'Стил', 'kk': 'Comment', 'lt': 'Style Obfuscation by Invariance', 'it': 'Sforzamento dello stile per invarianza', 'ms': 'Gaya Terkekacauan Oleh Kegagalan', 'mt': 'Obfuskazzjoni tal-istil mill-Invarjanza', 'mn': 'Инвариантын төлөвлөгөө', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d അബ്ഫുക്സേഷന്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുക', 'pl': 'Zamaskowanie stylu przez niezmienność', 'ro': 'Obfuscare stil prin invarianță', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'Оффункција стила инваларианса', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaqa', 'sv': 'Stilförvrängning med förvrängning', 'ta': 'பாணி', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Xoá(delete)', 'hr': 'Oplodnja stila Invariance', 'nl': 'Stijlverduistering door onveranderdheid', 'bg': 'Замърсяване на стила чрез инвалидност', 'da': 'Stilforvirring ved Invariance', 'de': 'Stilverschleierung durch Invarianz', 'ko': '불변성을 이용하여 풍격 모호 처리를 하다', 'id': 'Style Obfuscation by Invariance', 'sw': 'Ufutilizaji wa Style na Upinzani', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Անտարբերություն', 'az': '캻stifad톛칞ilik', 'bn': 'স্টাইল অবফুক্সেশন', 'sq': 'Style Obfuscation by Invariance', 'ca': "Obfuscació d'estil per l'Invariance", 'et': 'Stiili hägustamine invariatsiooni järgi', 'bs': 'Opuštanje stila Invariance', 'cs': 'Styl zamaskování nepravidelností', 'fi': 'Tyylin hämärtyminen invarianssin mukaan', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Zameglitev sloga z invariacijo', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'סגנון התעללות על ידי שונה', 'bo': 'བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདེམས་དང་བསྟུན་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ'}
{'en': 'The task of obfuscating writing style using sequence models has previously been investigated under the framework of obfuscation-by-transfer, where the input text is explicitly rewritten in another style. A side effect of this framework are the frequent major alterations to the semantic content of the input. In this work, we propose obfuscation-by-invariance, and investigate to what extent models trained to be explicitly style-invariant preserve semantics. We evaluate our architectures in parallel and non-parallel settings, and compare automatic and human evaluations on the obfuscated sentences. Our experiments show that the performance of a style classifier can be reduced to chance level, while the output is evaluated to be of equal quality to models applying style-transfer. Additionally, human evaluation indicates a trade-off between the level of obfuscation and the observed quality of the output in terms of meaning preservation and grammaticality.', 'ar': 'سبق أن تم التحقيق في مهمة تعتيم أسلوب الكتابة باستخدام نماذج التسلسل في إطار التشويش عن طريق النقل ، حيث تتم إعادة كتابة نص الإدخال بشكل صريح بأسلوب آخر. التأثير الجانبي لهذا الإطار هو التعديلات الرئيسية المتكررة للمحتوى الدلالي للمدخلات. في هذا العمل ، نقترح التشويش على أساس الثبات ، ونبحث إلى أي مدى تم تدريب النماذج على أن تكون ثابتة في الأسلوب تحافظ على الدلالات. نقوم بتقييم هياكلنا في إعدادات متوازية وغير متوازية ، ونقارن التقييمات التلقائية والبشرية على الجمل المبهمة. تُظهر تجاربنا أنه يمكن تقليل أداء مصنف النمط إلى مستوى فرصة ، بينما يتم تقييم الناتج ليكون ذا جودة متساوية للنماذج التي تطبق نقل النمط. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يشير التقييم البشري إلى مفاضلة بين مستوى التشويش والجودة المرصودة للمخرجات من حيث الحفاظ على المعنى والقواعد النحوية.', 'fr': "La tâche d'obscurcir le style d'écriture à l'aide de modèles de séquence a déjà été étudiée dans le cadre de l'obscurcissement par transfert, où le texte d'entrée est explicitement réécrit dans un autre style. Un effet secondaire de ce cadre est la fréquence des modifications majeures du contenu sémantique de l'entrée. Dans ce travail, nous proposons l'obscurcissement par invariance et nous étudions dans quelle mesure les modèles formés pour être explicitement invariants au style préservent la sémantique. Nous évaluons nos architectures dans des configurations parallèles et non parallèles, et comparons des évaluations automatiques et humaines sur les phrases masquées. Nos expériences montrent que les performances d'un classificateur de style peuvent être réduites au hasard, tandis que la sortie est évaluée comme étant de qualité égale à celle des modèles appliquant le transfert de style. De plus, l'évaluation humaine indique un compromis entre le niveau d'obscurcissement et la qualité observée de la sortie en termes de préservation de la signification et de grammaticalité.", 'es': 'La tarea de ofuscar el estilo de escritura mediante modelos de secuencia se ha investigado previamente en el marco de la ofuscación por transferencia, donde el texto de entrada se reescribe explícitamente en otro estilo. Un efecto secundario de este marco son las frecuentes alteraciones importantes en el contenido semántico de la entrada. En este trabajo, proponemos la ofuscación por invariancia e investigamos hasta qué punto los modelos entrenados para ser explícitamente invariantes de estilo preservan la semántica. Evaluamos nuestras arquitecturas en entornos paralelos y no paralelos, y comparamos las evaluaciones automáticas y humanas en las oraciones ofuscadas. Nuestros experimentos muestran que el rendimiento de un clasificador de estilos se puede reducir al nivel de probabilidad, mientras que el resultado se evalúa para ser de la misma calidad que los modelos que aplican la transferencia de estilo. Además, la evaluación humana indica una compensación entre el nivel de ofuscación y la calidad observada del resultado en términos de preservación del significado y gramaticalidad.', 'pt': 'A tarefa de ofuscar o estilo de escrita usando modelos de sequência foi investigada anteriormente sob a estrutura de ofuscação por transferência, onde o texto de entrada é explicitamente reescrito em outro estilo. Um efeito colateral dessa estrutura são as frequentes alterações importantes no conteúdo semântico da entrada. Neste trabalho, propomos ofuscação por invariância e investigamos até que ponto os modelos treinados para serem explicitamente invariantes de estilo preservam a semântica. Avaliamos nossas arquiteturas em configurações paralelas e não paralelas e comparamos avaliações automáticas e humanas nas sentenças ofuscadas. Nossos experimentos mostram que o desempenho de um classificador de estilo pode ser reduzido ao nível do acaso, enquanto a saída é avaliada como de qualidade igual aos modelos que aplicam a transferência de estilo. Além disso, a avaliação humana indica um trade-off entre o nível de ofuscação e a qualidade observada da saída em termos de preservação de significado e gramaticalidade.', 'ja': 'シーケンスモデルを使用して書き込みスタイルを難読化するタスクは、入力テキストが別のスタイルで明示的に書き換えられる難読化-転送の枠組みの下で以前に調査されています。このフレームワークの副作用は、入力のセマンティックコンテンツへの頻繁な大きな変更です。この研究では、不変性による難読化を提案し、スタイル不変性の意味論を明示的に保存するように訓練されたモデルがどの程度保存されているかを調査します。並列および非並列設定でアーキテクチャを評価し、難読化された文章の自動評価と人間評価を比較します。私たちの実験では、スタイルクラスファイアのパフォーマンスをチャンスレベルに低減することができ、出力はスタイル転送を適用するモデルと同等の品質であると評価されます。さらに、人間の評価は、意味の保存と文法性の観察されたアウトプットの質と難読化のレベルとの間のトレードオフを示します。', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम मॉडल का उपयोग करके लेखन शैली को बाधित करने के कार्य की जांच पहले obfuscation-by-transfer के ढांचे के तहत की गई है, जहां इनपुट टेक्स्ट को स्पष्ट रूप से किसी अन्य शैली में फिर से लिखा जाता है। इस ढांचे का एक साइड इफेक्ट इनपुट की शब्दार्थ सामग्री में लगातार प्रमुख परिवर्तन हैं। इस काम में, हम obfuscation-by-invariance का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और जांच करते हैं कि किस हद तक मॉडल को स्पष्ट रूप से शैली-अपरिवर्तनीय होने के लिए प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, शब्दार्थ को संरक्षित करता है। हम समानांतर और गैर-समानांतर सेटिंग्स में अपने आर्किटेक्चर का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और obfuscated वाक्यों पर स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन की तुलना करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि एक शैली क्लासिफायर के प्रदर्शन को मौका स्तर तक कम किया जा सकता है, जबकि आउटपुट का मूल्यांकन शैली-हस्तांतरण को लागू करने वाले मॉडल के समान गुणवत्ता के लिए किया जाता है। इसके अतिरिक्त, मानव मूल्यांकन अर्थ संरक्षण और व्याकरणिकता के संदर्भ में obfuscation के स्तर और आउटपुट की मनाया गुणवत्ता के बीच एक व्यापार बंद इंगित करता है।', 'zh': '以序模糊之任,考之传输框架之下,输文本以别式显式重写。 此框架之副作用,语义数大改也。 于是条逐不变性混淆,讲习为显式不变者,存语义于多大程度。 并行与非并设中评架构,并校混句自与人工评。 臣等实验明,式分器性,可减偶然,同时评估输与应用式移模形有同者。 此外人伦评估,存语法混淆,与观察输质之间有权衡。', 'ru': 'Задача обфускации стиля написания с использованием моделей последовательностей ранее исследовалась в рамках обфускации по переносу, где вводный текст явно переписывается другим стилем. Побочным эффектом этой структуры являются частые крупные изменения семантического содержания входных данных. В этой работе мы предлагаем обфускацию по инвариантности и исследуем, в какой степени модели, обученные быть явно стилеинвариантными, сохраняют семантику. Мы оцениваем наши архитектуры в параллельных и непараллельных настройках и сравниваем автоматические и человеческие оценки по обфусцированным предложениям. Наши эксперименты показывают, что производительность классификатора стилей может быть снижена до случайного уровня, в то время как выход оценивается как равное качество с моделями, применяющими передачу стилей. Кроме того, оценка человека указывает на компромисс между уровнем обфускации и наблюдаемым качеством выходных данных с точки зрения сохранения смысла и грамматичности.', 'ga': 'Táthar tar éis an tasc a bhaineann le stíl scríbhneoireachta a chaolú agus úsáid á baint as seichimh-mhúnlaí a fhiosrú roimhe seo faoin gcreat um obfuscation-by-transfer, áit a ndéantar an téacs ionchuir a athscríobh go follasach i stíl eile. Fo-iarmhairt den chreat seo is ea na mórathruithe a dhéantar go minic ar ábhar séimeantach an ionchuir. San obair seo, molaimid doiléire de réir athraitheas, agus déanaimid imscrúdú ar a mhéid a chuirtear oiliúint ar mhúnlaí chun a bheith sainráite de réir athróg stíle a chaomhnú. Déanaimid ár n-ailtireacht a mheas i suíomhanna comhthreomhara agus neamh-chomhthreomhara, agus déanaimid comparáid idir meastóireachtaí uathoibríocha agus daonna ar na habairtí claonta. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh gur féidir feidhmíocht aicmitheora stíle a laghdú go leibhéal seans, agus meastar go bhfuil an t-aschur ar chomhchaighdeán le samhlacha a chuireann aistriú stíle i bhfeidhm. Ina theannta sin, léiríonn meastóireacht dhaonna comhbhabhtáil idir leibhéal na folaíochta agus cáilíocht bhreathnaithe an aschuir i dtéarmaí caomhnú brí agus gramadaí.', 'ka': 'სკენესური მოდელების გამოყენებით წერილის სტილის გადასრულება სამუშაოდ გადასრულებული სტრანფესტის ფრამეტში, სადაც წერილის ტექსტი სხვა სტილით გადასრულებულია. ამ ფრამეტრის ბედნიერი ეფექტი არის ჩემი სიმენტიკური შეცვლა. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდომებით გადავიწყებთ სტუბუქციას და განსხვავებით რამდენიმე მოდელები, რომლებიც განსწავლებული იყო სტილური ინგარესიანი სემანტიკების შესახებ. ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ჩვენი არქტიქტურების პარალელური და არ პარალელური პარალელური პარალელური პარალელური პარალელში, და ავტომატური და ადამიანის განსაზღვრებების შემდეგ გადადა ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ სტილის კლასიფიკაციის გამოსახულება შეიძლება გააკეთება ქანსის დონეზე, მაგრამ გამოსახულება განსახულებული იყოს სტილის გადატანსტანს დამატებით, ადამიანის განსაზღვრება მონიშნავს, რომ განსაზღვრება და გრამმატიკალურობის განსაზღვრება განსაზღვრებულია.', 'el': 'Το έργο της απόκρυψης του στυλ γραφής χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλα ακολουθίας έχει διερευνηθεί στο παρελθόν στο πλαίσιο της απόκρυψης-με-μεταφορά, όπου το κείμενο εισόδου επαναγράφεται ρητά σε άλλο στυλ. Μια παρενέργεια αυτού του πλαισίου είναι οι συχνές μεγάλες αλλαγές στο σημασιολογικό περιεχόμενο της εισόδου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε συγκάλυψη-από-αμετάβλητη, και διερευνούμε σε ποιο βαθμό μοντέλα εκπαιδευμένα για να είναι ρητά αμετάβλητα στυλ διατηρούν τη σημασιολογία. Αξιολογούμε τις αρχιτεκτονικές μας σε παράλληλες και μη παράλληλες ρυθμίσεις και συγκρίνουμε αυτόματες και ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις στις θολές προτάσεις. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι η απόδοση ενός ταξινομητή στυλ μπορεί να μειωθεί σε τυχαίο επίπεδο, ενώ η παραγωγή αξιολογείται ως ίσης ποιότητας με τα μοντέλα που εφαρμόζουν μεταφορά στυλ. Επιπροσθέτως, η ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση υποδεικνύει ένα συμβιβασμό μεταξύ του επιπέδου θολοποίησης και της παρατηρούμενης ποιότητας της παραγωγής όσον αφορά τη διατήρηση της έννοιας και τη γραμματικότητα.', 'hu': 'Az írási stílus elhomályosításának feladatát sorozatmodellek segítségével korábban a homályosítás-by-transfer keretében vizsgáltuk, ahol a bemeneti szöveget kifejezetten újraírják egy másik stílusban. Ennek a keretrendszernek a mellékhatása az input szemantikai tartalmának gyakori változásai. Ebben a munkában javaslatot teszünk a homályosításról invariánsra, és megvizsgáljuk, hogy a modellek milyen mértékben tartják fenn a szemantikát. Párhuzamos és nem párhuzamos beállításokban értékeljük architektúráinkat, és összehasonlítjuk az automatikus és emberi értékeléseket a homályos mondatokon. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy egy stílusosztályozó teljesítménye véletlenszintre csökkenthető, míg a kimenet a stílustranszfert alkalmazó modellekkel azonos minőségű. Ezenkívül az emberi értékelés a homályosítás szintje és a kimenet megfigyelt minősége közötti kompromisszumot mutat a jelentés megőrzése és nyelvtanitás tekintetében.', 'lt': 'Įrašymo stiliaus obfuskavimo pagal sekos modelius užduotis anksčiau buvo ištirta pagal obfuskavimo pagal perdavimą sistemą, kai įvesties tekstas aiškiai perskaičiuojamas kitais stiliais. Šios sistemos šalutinis poveikis yra dažni esminiai įėjimo semantinio turinio pokyčiai. Šiame darbe siūlome apgaubti kiekvieną invaziją ir ištiriame, kokiu mastu modeliai, parengti aiškiai būdingą invaziją išsaugoti semantiką. Mes vertiname savo architektūras lygiagrečiomis ir ne lygiagrečiomis aplinkybėmis ir lyginame automatinius ir žmogiškuosius vertinimus dėl apgaubtų sakinių. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad stiliaus klasifikatoriaus veiksmingumas gali būti sumažintas iki atsitiktinio lygio, o rezultatas vertinamas kaip lygios kokybės modeliams, taikomiems stiliaus perdavimui. Be to, žmogaus vertinimas rodo, kad apgaulėjimo lygis ir stebėta produkcijos kokybė atitinka reikšmės išsaugojimą ir gramatiškumą.', 'it': "Il compito di offuscare lo stile di scrittura utilizzando modelli di sequenza è stato precedentemente indagato nell'ambito dell'offuscation-by-transfer, dove il testo di input è esplicitamente riscritto in un altro stile. Un effetto collaterale di questo framework sono le frequenti e importanti alterazioni del contenuto semantico dell'input. In questo lavoro, proponiamo offuscamento-per-invarianza, e indaghiamo in che misura i modelli addestrati ad essere esplicitamente style-invariant preservano la semantica. Valutiamo le nostre architetture in impostazioni parallele e non parallele e confrontiamo valutazioni automatiche e umane sulle frasi offuscate. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che le prestazioni di un classificatore di stile possono essere ridotte al livello casuale, mentre l'output è valutato come di qualità uguale ai modelli che applicano il trasferimento di stile. Inoltre, la valutazione umana indica un compromesso tra il livello di offuscamento e la qualità osservata dell'output in termini di conservazione del significato e grammaticalità.", 'ms': 'Tugas untuk menggunakan gaya tulisan menggunakan model urutan telah diselesaikan sebelumnya di bawah kerangka obfuscation-by-transfer, di mana teks input ditulis secara eksplicit dalam gaya lain. Kesan sampingan kerangka ini adalah perubahan utama yang sering bagi kandungan semantik input. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan pencerobohan-demi-pencerobohan, dan menyelidiki seberapa banyak model yang dilatih untuk menjadi secara eksplicit gaya-pencerobohan menyimpan semantik. Kita menilai arkitektur kita dalam tetapan selari dan bukan selari, dan membandingkan penilaian automatik dan manusia pada kalimat yang terganggu. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa prestasi klasifikasi gaya boleh dikurangkan ke aras peluang, sementara output diteliti sebagai kualiti yang sama dengan model yang melaksanakan pemindahan gaya. Lagipun, penilaian manusia menunjukkan perdagangan antara aras obfuskasi dan kualiti yang dilihat output dalam terma penyimpanan makna dan gramatikal.', 'kk': 'Кіріс мәтіні басқа стилінде қайта жазу үлгілерін қолдануға арналған жазу стилінің тапсырмасы алдында бұл жұмыс ішінде сұралған. Бұл қоршаудағы бейбір эффекті - келтірілген семантикалық мазмұның көбірек өзгерістері. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз қанша үлгілерді түсініктіру және қанша үлгілерді түсінікті стилінде сақтау үшін зерттеуді ұсынамыз. Біз архитектурамызды параллель және параллель емес параллель параметрлерде оқу және автоматты және адамдардың оқиғаларын қалай салыстырамыз. Біздің тәжірибеміз стиль классификациясының істеу мүмкіндік деңгейіне азайтын дегенді көрсетеді, бірақ шығыс стиль аудару үлгілеріне тең сапатты деп бағалады. Сонымен қатар, адамның бағалауы қалпындық деңгейінде жұмыс сақтау және грамматикалық сақтау үшін қалпындығын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Задачата за обфускација на стилот на пишување со користење на секвенциски модели претходно беше истражена во рамките на обфускација по трансфер, каде што вводниот текст е експлицитно препишан во друг стил. A side effect of this framework are the frequent major alterations to the semantic content of the input.  Во оваа работа, предложуваме обфускација по инваријација, и истражуваме во каков степен моделите тренирани да бидат експлицитно стил-инваријантни зачувуваат семантика. Ги проценуваме нашите архитектури во паралелни и непаралелни поставувања, и ги споредуваме автоматските и човечките проценки на обвинетите реченици. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека резултатот на класификаторот на стил може да се намали на ниво на случајност, додека резултатот е проценет за да биде еднаков квалитет со моделите кои аплицираат трансфер на стил. Покрај тоа, човечката проценка покажува разлика помеѓу нивото на обфускација и набљудуваниот квалитет на производот во поглед на значењето зачувување и граматикалитетот.', 'mt': 'Il-kompitu tal-obfuskazzjoni tal-istil tal-kitba bl-użu ta’ mudelli ta’ sekwenza kien preċedentement investigat fil-qafas tal-obfuskazzjoni bi trasferiment, fejn it-test tal-input jiġi miktub mill-ġdid b’mod espliċitu fi stil ieħor. Effett sekondarju ta’ dan il-qafas huma l-bidliet maġġuri frekwenti fil-kontenut semantiku tal-input. F’dan ix-xogħol, nipproponu obfuskazzjoni b’invarjanza, u ninvestigaw sa liema punt il-mudelli mħarrġa biex ikunu espliċitament stil-invarjanti jippreservaw is-semantika. We evaluate our architectures in parallel and non-parallel settings, and compare automatic and human evaluations on the obfuscated sentences.  L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-prestazzjoni ta’ klassifikatur tal-istil tista’ titnaqqas għal livell ta’ ċans, filwaqt li l-output jiġi evalwat bħala ta’ kwalità ugwali għall-mudelli li japplikaw trasferiment tal-istil. Barra minn hekk, l-evalwazzjoni tal-bniedem tindika kompromess bejn il-livell ta’ obfuskazzjoni u l-kwalità osservata tal-produzzjoni f’termini ta’ preservazzjoni tat-tifsira u grammatika.', 'ml': 'സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് എഴുതുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d എഴുതുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലി മുമ്പേ അന്വേഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, അവിടെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ടെക് ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്പിന്റെ ഒരു ഭാഗ പ്രഭാവം ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക് ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക് മാറ്റങ ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നത് വ്യക്തമായ ശൈലിയില്\u200d അinvariant semantics സൂക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d എന്ത് പരി നമ്മുടെ ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടകങ്ങള്\u200d പാരാളില്\u200d അല്ലാത്ത സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d വിലയിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കുകളില്\u200d തന്നെയും മനുഷ്യരുടെയും വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയരുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d സാധ്യതലത്തിലേക്ക് കുറവാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു.  കൂടാതെ, മനുഷ്യന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതും ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കേറ്റിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും അര്\u200dത്ഥം സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും വി', 'mn': 'Дараагийн загваруудыг ашиглан бичих хэлбэрийг солилцуулах үйл ажиллагаа нь өмнө нь солилцоогоор шилжүүлэх хэлбэрээр судалж байсан. Харин бичсэн текст өөр хэлбэрээр тодорхой дахин бичигдсэн. Энэ үйл ажиллагааны тал нөлөө нь орлуулалтын семантик бүтээгдэхүүний ихэвчлэн том өөрчлөлт юм. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид хүчирхийллээс халдвар авч, хэр хэмжээнд сургалтын загваруудыг тодорхой хэлбэрээр хүчирхийллээс хадгалдаг вэ гэдгийг судалж байна. Бид барилгуудыг параллел болон параллел биш байдлаар үнэлэх, автоматик болон хүн төрөлхтний дүгнэлттэй харьцуулдаг. Бидний туршилтууд хэлбэрийн классификацийн үйл ажиллагааг боломжийн түвшинд багасгаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Ингэснээр үр дүнг нь хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэлтийн загвартай тэнцүү байдаг. Мөн хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээ нь хамгаалах болон грамматик байдлын тухай үр дүнгийн түвшин хоорондох худалдааныг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Oppgåva til å fjerna skriftstil med sekvensmodeller har tidlegare vert undersøkt under rammeverket for obfuscation-by-transfer, der inndatateksten er eksplisivt omskriven i ein annan stil. Eit sideeffekt av dette rammeverket er dei ofte store endringane i semantiske innhaldet i inndata. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi avfusasjon-etter-invarians, og undersøk kva storleik modeller trengte for å vera eksplisitt stilinvariant å beholde semantikk. Vi evaluerer arkitektura våre i parallelle og ikkje-parallelle innstillingar, og sammenliknar automatiske og menneske evalueringar på utfordrede setningane. Eksperimentane våre viser at utviklinga av ein stilklassifiserer kan reduserast til sjansnivå, mens utdata blir evaluert til å vera lik kvalitet til modeller som brukar stiloverføring. I tillegg viser menneskelige evalueringa eit utvikling mellom nivået av avfusasjon og den observerte kvaliteten av utdata i uttrykket med betydning for konservasjon og grammatikk.', 'pl': 'Zadanie zatłumienia stylu pisania za pomocą modeli sekwencyjnych zostało wcześniej zbadane w ramach zatłumienia przez transfer, gdzie tekst wejściowy jest wyraźnie przepisywany w innym stylu. Efektem ubocznym tego frameworku są częste poważne zmiany w zawartości semantycznej danych wejściowych. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy zamaskowanie przez inwariancję i zbadamy, w jakim stopniu modele przeszkolone do bycia wyraźnie inwariancyjnymi stylu zachowują semantykę. Oceniamy nasze architektury w ustawieniach równoległych i nierównoległych oraz porównujemy automatyczne i ludzkie oceny na zdaniach zatłumionych. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że wydajność klasyfikatora stylu można zredukować do poziomu przypadkowego, podczas gdy wynik jest oceniany jako równa jakość modeli stosujących styl-transfer. Dodatkowo ocena ludzka wskazuje na kompromis pomiędzy poziomem zatłumienia a obserwowaną jakością wydajności pod względem zachowania znaczenia i gramatyczności.', 'ro': 'Sarcina de a obfusca stilul de scriere folosind modele secvențiale a fost investigată anterior în cadrul obfuscation-by-transfer, unde textul de intrare este rescris în mod explicit într-un alt stil. Un efect secundar al acestui cadru sunt modificările majore frecvente ale conținutului semantic al intrării. În această lucrare, propunem obfuscare prin invarianță și investigăm în ce măsură modelele instruite să fie explicit invariante de stil păstrează semantica. Evaluăm arhitecturile noastre în setări paralele și non-paralele și comparăm evaluările automate și umane pe propozițiile obfusate. Experimentele noastre arată că performanța unui clasificator de stil poate fi redusă la nivel de șansă, în timp ce rezultatul este evaluat ca fiind de calitate egală cu modelele care aplică transfer de stil. În plus, evaluarea umană indică un compromis între nivelul de offuscare și calitatea observată a producției în termeni de conservare a semnificației și gramaticalitate.', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණ මොඩේල් භාවිතා ලියණ විදියට විවෘත විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ අබ්ෆුසික් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය මේ ප්\u200dරකාරයේ පැත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ඇතුළුමේ සැමැන්තික සාමාන්තික වෙනස් වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය. මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශ අපි අපේ ස්ථාපනය සමාන්\u200dය සහ සමාන්\u200dය සැකසුම් වලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සහ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය සමාන අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට විදියට විදියට විදියට අවස්ථාවක් ස්ථානයකට පහත් වෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ප්\u200d තවත් මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නයි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සහ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අතර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරති', 'sr': 'Zadatak opuštanja stila pisanja koristeći modele sekvencije ranije je istražen pod okvirom obfusacije po transferu, gde je tekst unosa objašnjavao u drugom stilu. Nuspojava ovog okvira su često velike promjene semantičkog sadržaja ulaska. U ovom poslu predlažemo obfusaciju po invariaciji i istražujemo u kakvoj mjeri modeli obučeni da budu isključivo invariantni da sačuvaju semantiku. Procjenjujemo naše arhitekture u paralelnim i ne-paralelnim postavkama, i uspoređujemo automatske i ljudske procjene o zbunjenim rečenicama. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da funkcija klasifikatora stila može biti smanjena na nivo šanse, dok se procjenjuje izlaz kao jednaka kvaliteta modelima koji primjenjuju prebacivanje stila. Osim toga, ljudska procjena ukazuje na trgovinu između nivoa opfuzije i promatranog kvaliteta proizvoda u smislu očuvanja i gramatičnosti značenja.', 'sv': 'Uppgiften att dölja skrivstil med hjälp av sekvensmodeller har tidigare undersökts inom ramen för obfuscation-by-transfer, där inmatningstexten uttryckligen skrivs om i en annan stil. En bieffekt av detta ramverk är de frekventa stora förändringarna av det semantiska innehållet i indata. I detta arbete föreslår vi obfuscation-by-invariance, och undersöker i vilken utsträckning modeller tränade för att vara explicit stilinvariant bevarar semantik. Vi utvärderar våra arkitekturer i parallella och icke-parallella inställningar, och jämför automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingar på de dolda meningarna. Våra experiment visar att prestandan hos en stilklassificerare kan reduceras till slumpnivå, medan resultatet bedöms vara av samma kvalitet som modeller som tillämpar stilöverföring. Dessutom tyder mänsklig utvärdering på en avvägning mellan graden av fördjupning och den observerade kvaliteten på resultatet när det gäller betydelsebevarande och grammatik.', 'ta': 'வரிசையின் மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி எழுதும் பாணியின் செயல் முன்னால் தேடியிருக்கிறது அடிப்படையில் உள்ளீட்டு உரையை வெளிப்படையாக மற்றொரு பா இந்த சட்டத்தின் பக்கத்தின் விளைவு உள்ளீட்டின் அரைத்தான மாற்றங்கள் ஆகும். இந்த வேலையில், நாம் புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் பொருட்களை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து பாணியில் எத்தனை மாதிரிகள் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது  நாங்கள் இணையாக மற்றும் இணையாத அமைப்புகளில் எங்கள் அடைவுகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், மற்றும் தானாகவே மற்றும் மனித மதிப்பினையும் ஒப்பிட நம்முடைய சோதனை கூடுதலாக, மனித மதிப்பெண்கள் பாதுகாப்பு மற்றும் குறிப்பிடும் பாதுகாப்பு மற்றும் வரைப்படுத்தும் மதிப்பின் மதிப்பை குறிப்', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka qoraalka lagu qorayo qoraalka qaabka lagu isticmaalayo tusaale ahaan waxaa horay lagu baaraandegay hoosta dhaqanka baabuurta-la-wareejinta, meesha lagu qorayo qoraalka hoostooda si cad looga qorayo qaab kale. Effekteed dhinacan waa isbedelka ugu badnaanta marka lagu jiro gudaha hoose. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in lagu baaraandegayo, waxaana baaritaannaa in lagu baro tusaalooyin ay si cad u ahaanayaan dabeecada. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa arkiyadeena si lamid ah oo aan isku mid ahayn, waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qiimeynta bilowga ah iyo qiimeynta biniaadamka ee hadallada aan la fududayn. Imtixaankayada waxaa muuqanaya in tababarida qaababka ah uu hoos u dhigi karo heerka suurtagalka, marka laga qiimeeyo in midowga qaababka lagu beddelo qaababka. Intaas waxaa dheer qiimeynta biniaadamka looga jeedaa xiriirka baahida iyo qiimaha soo bixinta, taas oo lagu jeedo ilaalinta iyo grammanimada.', 'ur': 'لکھنے کے سبب لکھنے کا کام اس طرح کی جگہ پہلے کئی طرح کے نمڈلوں کے مطابق غلط کرنا پڑھا گیا ہے، جہاں اینٹ پیغام ایک دوسرے طرح سے واضح طور پر لکھا جاتا ہے. اس فرمیٹ کے ایک کنارہ اثر انپیٹ کے سیمنٹیک منصوبے کے بہت بڑے بدلنے والے ہیں. اس کام میں ہم نے غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ ہم اپنے معماروں کو مشابل اور غیر مشابل تنظیمات میں ارزش دیتے ہیں، اور اتماتیک اور انسان کی ارزش کے مطابق مشابہ شدہ جماعتوں پر مقایسہ کرتے ہیں. ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک استیل کلیسٹر کی فعالیت شانس سطح تک کم کر دی جاتی ہے، حالانکہ اپوٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ وٹ ورسٹ کے ماڈل کے برابر گوارتفا اور اضافہ، انسان کی ارزیابی کی تعلیم ایک تبلیغ سطح کے درمیان اور اجلام کی نظر رکھی ہوئی کیفیت کی تعریف کے مطابق حفاظت اور گراماتیکی کے مطابق ہے.', 'uz': "Name Ushbu freymning qismlari kiritish tarkibidagi semantik tarkibini ko'p katta oʻzgarishlar. Bu vazifanda, biz ko'paytirishni tasavvur qilamiz, va xususiyatli uslub-invalid semantika saqlash uchun modellar qanday darajaga o'rganadi. Biz maktablarimizni parametrlar va o'xshash moslamalar bilan qiymatimiz, va avtomatik va inson qiymatlarimizni o'xshash keladigan so'zlarda qiymatmiz. Our experiments show that the performance of a style classifier can be reduced to chance level, while the output is evaluated to be of equal quality to models applying style-transfer.  Qo'shimcha, inson qiymatlari haqida muvaffaqiyatli darajasi va natijaning qiymatini saqlash va grammatikatlik imkoniyatini aniqlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc đần độn kiểu viết bằng các mô- trình tự đã từng được điều tra trong phạm vi phân dạng, nơi văn bản nhập được viết lại rõ ràng theo một kiểu khác. Một tác động phụ của bộ khung này là những thay đổi thường xuyên lớn về nội dung theo ngữ nghĩa. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị đần độn-từng-hệ-tính, và tìm hiểu xem các mô hình được đào tạo để không phải sử dụng ngữ pháp. Chúng tôi đánh giá kiến trúc song song song và không song song, và so sánh đánh giá tự động và con người trên câu chú ý. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy hiệu quả của một người phân loại kiểu có thể giảm đến mức ngẫu nhiên, trong khi kết quả được đánh giá bằng chất lượng so với các mẫu áp dụng kiểu chuyển giao. Hơn nữa, đánh giá con người cho thấy có một sự trao đổi giữa mức độ đần độn và mức chất lượng sản xuất được ghi nhận theo dạng bảo tồn và thuật ngữ.', 'da': 'Opgaven med at tilsløre skrivestil ved hjælp af sekvensmodeller er tidligere blevet undersøgt inden for rammerne af tilsløring ved overførsel, hvor indadteksten udtrykkeligt omskrives i en anden stil. En bivirkning af denne ramme er de hyppige store ændringer i input semantiske indhold. I dette arbejde foreslår vi indslæbning ved invarians, og undersøger i hvilket omfang modeller uddannet til at være eksplicit stilinvariant bevarer semantik. Vi evaluerer vores arkitekturer i parallelle og ikke-parallelle indstillinger, og sammenligner automatiske og menneskelige evalueringer af de forvirrede sætninger. Vores eksperimenter viser, at ydeevnen af en stilklassificering kan reduceres til tilfældighedsniveau, mens output vurderes til at være af samme kvalitet som modeller, der anvender stiloverførsel. Desuden indikerer menneskelige evalueringer en afvejning mellem niveauet af tilsløring og den observerede kvalitet af output med hensyn til betydning bevarelse og grammatik.', 'bg': 'Задачата за замъгляване на стила на писане с помощта на последователни модели преди това е изследвана в рамките на замъгляване чрез трансфер, където входният текст изрично се пренаписва в друг стил. Страничен ефект на тази рамка са честите основни промени в семантичното съдържание на входа. В тази работа предлагаме замъгляване по инваrianтност и изследваме до каква степен моделите, обучени да бъдат изрично стилово инваrianтни, запазват семантиката. Ние оценяваме нашите архитектури в паралелни и непаралелни настройки и сравняваме автоматични и човешки оценки на замъглените изречения. Нашите експерименти показват, че производителността на класификатор на стил може да бъде намалена до ниво на случайност, докато изходът се оценява като с еднакво качество на моделите, прилагащи трансфер на стил. Освен това човешката оценка показва компромис между нивото на замъгляване и наблюдаваното качество на продукцията по отношение на запазване на значението и граматичността.', 'nl': 'De taak van het verhullen van schrijfstijl met behulp van sequentiemodellen is eerder onderzocht in het kader van obfuscation-by-transfer, waarbij de invoertekst expliciet in een andere stijl wordt herschreven. Een neveneffect van dit framework zijn de frequente grote veranderingen in de semantische inhoud van de input. In dit werk stellen we verbetering-by-invariance voor en onderzoeken we in hoeverre modellen getraind om expliciet stijlinvariant te zijn semantische conserveren. We evalueren onze architecturen in parallelle en niet-parallelle instellingen, en vergelijken automatische en menselijke evaluaties op de onzichtbare zinnen. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat de prestaties van een stijlclassificator kunnen worden gereduceerd tot kansniveau, terwijl de output wordt geëvalueerd als van gelijke kwaliteit aan modellen die stijl-overdracht toepassen. Bovendien wijst menselijke evaluatie op een compromis tussen het niveau van verduistering en de waargenomen kwaliteit van de output in termen van betekenisbehoud en grammaticaliteit.', 'de': 'Die Aufgabe der Verschleierung des Schreibstils mittels Sequenzmodellen wurde bisher im Rahmen der Verschleierung durch Übertragung untersucht, bei der der eingegebene Text explizit in einem anderen Stil umgeschrieben wird. Ein Nebeneffekt dieses Frameworks sind die häufigen großen Veränderungen des semantischen Inhalts des Inputs. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir Obfuscation-by-Invariance vor und untersuchen, inwieweit Modelle, die explizit stilinvariant trainiert wurden, Semantik bewahren. Wir bewerten unsere Architekturen in parallelen und nicht-parallelen Einstellungen und vergleichen automatische und menschliche Auswertungen der verschleierten Sätze. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass die Leistung eines Stilklassifikators auf Zufallsniveau reduziert werden kann, während der Output von gleicher Qualität bewertet wird wie Modelle mit Stiltransfer. Darüber hinaus deutet die menschliche Bewertung auf einen Kompromiss zwischen dem Grad der Verschleierung und der beobachteten Qualität des Outputs in Bezug auf Bedeutungserhaltung und Grammatizität hin.', 'hr': 'Zapovijed optužbe pisaćeg stila koristeći modele sekvencije ranije je istražen pod okvirom obfusacije po transferu, gdje je tekst ulaznog teksta jasno prepisan u drugom stilu. Nuspojava ovog okvira često su velike promjene semantičkog sadržaja ulaska. U ovom poslu predlažemo obfusaciju po invariaciji i istražujemo u kakvoj mjeri modeli obučeni da budu isključivo invariantni u stilu čuvajući semantike. Procjenjujemo naše arhitekture u paralelnim i ne paralelnim postavkama, i uspoređujemo automatske i ljudske procjene o zbunjenim rečenicama. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da se učinkovitost klasifikatora stila može smanjiti na razinu šanse, dok se procjenjuje izlaz kao jednaka kvaliteta modelima koji primjenjuju prebacivanje stila. Osim toga, ljudska procjena ukazuje na trgovinu između razine opfuzije i promatranog kvaliteta proizvoda u smislu očuvanja i gramatičnosti značenja.', 'id': 'Tugas untuk mengacaukan gaya tulisan menggunakan model urutan sebelumnya telah diselidiki di bawah kerangka obfuscation-by-transfer, di mana teks input secara eksplicit ditulis ulang dalam gaya lain. Efek samping dari rangkaian ini adalah perubahan utama yang sering pada isi semantis input. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami melamar obfuscation-by-invariance, dan menyelidiki seberapa besar model dilatih untuk secara eksplicit gaya-invarian mempertahankan semantik. Kami mengevaluasi arsitektur kita dalam pengaturan paralel dan non-paralel, dan membandingkan evaluasi otomatis dan manusia pada kalimat yang terganggu. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa prestasi dari klasifikasi gaya dapat dikurangkan ke tahap kesempatan, sementara output diaevaluasi untuk kualitas yang sama dengan model yang menerapkan style-transfer. Selain itu, evaluasi manusia menunjukkan perdagangan antara tingkat obfuskasi dan kualitas pengamatan output dalam terma konservasi arti dan gramatikal.', 'ko': '시퀀스 모델을 사용하여 창작 스타일을 모호하게 처리하는 임무를 수행하기 전에 모호 처리 구조를 바꾸는 연구를 진행했는데 그 중에서 입력 텍스트는 다른 스타일로 현저하게 바뀌었다.이 틀의 부작용 중 하나는 입력된 의미 내용에 항상 중대한 변화가 발생하는 것이다.이 작업에서 우리는 불변성을 통해 모호한 처리를 하고 현식 스타일이 변하지 않는 모델로 얼마나 의미를 보존하는지 연구했다.우리는 병행과 비병행 환경에서 우리의 구조를 평가하고 모호한 문장에 대한 자동과 인공적인 평가를 비교한다.우리의 실험에 의하면 스타일 분류기의 성능은 우연한 수준으로 떨어질 수 있고 출력의 질은 응용 스타일 전환 모델과 같다.그 밖에 인류 평가에 의하면 의미 보존과 문법성에 있어 혼동 정도와 관찰된 출력의 질 사이에 균형이 존재한다.', 'sw': 'Kazi ya kukosa mtindo wa kuandika kwa kutumia mifano ya mfululizo tayari imechunguzwa chini ya mfumo wa uharibifu-kwa-uhamishaji, ambapo ujumbe wa kuandika kwa uwazi umeandikwa tena kwa mtindo mwingine. Madhara ya upande wa mfumo huu ni mabadiliko makubwa ya mara kwa mara kwenye maudhui ya sekundi ya input. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza uvunjifu na uvamizi, na kuchunguza kwa kiwango gani mifano ilivyofundishwa kuwa wazi kwa namna ya kuhifadhia mifano. Tunatathmini majengo yetu katika mazingira yanayofanana na yasiyo tofauti, na kulinganisha tathmini za automatic na binadamu kuhusu hukumu hizo zisizoeleweka. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kwamba utendaji wa mtindo unaweza kupunguza hadi kiwango cha nafasi, wakati matokeo yanavutiwa kuwa sawa na mfano wa usafiri wa mtindo. Zaidi ya hayo, uchunguzi wa binadamu unaonyesha utoaji wa biashara kati ya kiwango cha ukosefu wa uvunjifu na kiwango kinachotajwa na matokeo kwa maana ya kuhifadhiwa na ubora.', 'af': "Die taak van afskuif skryfstyl gebruik volgorde modele is voorheen onder die raamwerk van obfuscation-by-transfer, waar die invoer teks is eksplisief herskryf in 'n ander styl. 'n Sideeffek van hierdie raamwerk is die dikwels groot veranderinge tot die semantiese inhoud van die invoer. In hierdie werk is ons voorstel om affusasie-by-invariansie te wees en om te ondersoek na watter uitbreidingsmodele opgelei het om uitduidelik styl-invariant semantieke te bewaar. Ons evalueer ons arkitektuure in parallele en nie-parallele instellings, en vergelyk automatiese en menslike evaluasies op die afgesluitde setinge. Ons eksperimente wys dat die prestasie van 'n styl klassifiseerder kan verminder word na kans vlak, terwyl die uitset is evalueer om gelyk kwaliteit te wees aan model wat styl-oordrag toewend word. In addition, human evaluation indicates a trade-off between the level of obfuscation and the observed quality of the output in terms of meaning preservation and grammaticality.", 'fa': 'وظیفه\u200cای که با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای دستورات نوشتن از طریق دستورات از قبل تحقیق می\u200cشود، در حالی که متن ورودی به صورت دیگر نوشته شده است. اثر جانبی از این چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که به تغییر تغییر تغییر دهیم، و تحقیق کنیم تا چه مدل\u200cهایی آموزش داده شده است که به طریق مشخصاً بی\u200cنیازی\u200cکننده\u200cها محافظت کنند. ما معماری\u200cهایمان را در تنظیمات متفاوتی و غیر متفاوتی ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، و ارزیابی\u200cهای خودکار و انسان را بر جمله\u200cهای متفاوت مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش های ما نشان می دهند که عملکرد یک فرآیندگر سبک می تواند به سطح شانس کاهش داده شود، در حالی که نتیجه ارزش داده می شود که کیفیت برابر با مدل\u200cهای تغییر سبک را تغییر می\u200cدهد. اضافه\u200cای از این، ارزیابی انسان یک تجارت بین سطح آلودگی و کیفیت مشاهده\u200cای از نتیجه به عنوان محافظت و گراماتیک نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Sahypa düzümlerini ulanmak üçin ýazma tarzıny kafatlandyrmak täblisasi, çapda-göçürmek tarzında, giriş metin başga bir tarzda täze ýazylýar. Bu çerýäniň saýlyk eseri, girişiniň semantik maksadynyň iň köp üýtgewleri dir. Bu işde, karmaşıklyga salyp bilmek teklif edip, semantikleri açıklama şeklinde eğitilen örnekler hakkında soruşmalıyız. Biz öz arhitekterimizi parallel we parallel düzümlerde deňlendirip, we öz-özümizi we adamlaryň deňlenmelerini karşılaştyrýarys. Biziň deneylerimiz bir stil klasifikatynyň başarnygyny şansyň derejesine düşürilip biler diýip görkezilýär, çykyş stil göçürmek üçin örneklere eşit kalitede deňleýär. Adamlar deňlemesi hem çykyş derejesi saýlamak we gramatik baglamak diýip görkezilýän çykyş derejesi arasynda düşmegini görkeýär.', 'sq': 'Detyra e obfuskimit të stilit të shkrimit duke përdorur modelet e sekuencës është hetuar më parë nën kuadrin e obfuscation-by-transfer, ku teksti i hyrjes është rishkruar në mënyrë eksplicite në stil tjetër. Një efekt anësor i këtij kuadri janë ndryshimet e shpeshta të mëdha në përmbajtjen semantike të hyrjes. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë përçarje-me-përçarje, dhe hetojmë në çfarë mase modelet e trajnuar për të qenë eksplicitisht stil-invariant ruajnë semantikën. We evaluate our architectures in parallel and non-parallel settings, and compare automatic and human evaluations on the obfuscated sentences.  Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se paraqitja e një klasifikues stili mund të reduktohet në nivelin e rastit, ndërsa paraqitja vlerësohet për të qenë e barabartë me modelet që aplikojnë transferimin stili. Përveç kësaj, vlerësimi njerëzor tregon një kompromis midis nivelit të përçarjes dhe cilësisë së vëzhguar të prodhimit lidhur me ruajtjen e kuptimit dhe grammatikën.', 'am': 'The task of obfuscating writing style using sequence models has previously been investigated under the framework of obfuscation-by-transfer, where the input text is explicitly rewritten in another style.  የዚህ ፍሬም የጥያቄ ጥያቄ የጥያቄ ውይይት የሚቆጠሩ የበለጠ ለውጦች ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ የግልፅ ውጤት ማድረግ እናሳውቃለን፣ እና እንዴት ዓይነት በሥርዓት-የግልፅ የዘላለም ስሜቲካ ለመጠበቅ እንደተማርከናል፡፡ አካውንቶቻችንን በማስተካከል እና በማይተካከል ባይኖሩ አካባቢዎች እናስተዋልናለን፣ በአስማትነታችንና በሰው ውይይት በተመለከተ ፍርድ ላይ እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የዓይነት ክፍለ ሥርዓት ወደ ስልጣኑ ደረጃ መጨመር እንዲችል ያሳያል፡፡ በተጨማሪም የሰው ማስታወቂያ በአካባቢነት እና የውጤቱን ጥሩ በሚያሳየው ማሳየት እና በግራማርቲካዊነት እና በሚያሳየው ግንኙነት የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Գրության ոճի խառնաշփոթման խնդիրը հաջորդականության մոդելների օգնությամբ նախկինում ուսումնասիրել է խառնաշփոթման-հաջորդականության շրջանակում, որտեղ ներմուծի տեքստը բացահայտորեն վերագրվում է մեկ այլ ոճով: Այս շրջանի կողմնակի ազդեցությունը ներմուծի սեմանտիկ պարունակության հաճախ մեծ փոփոխություններն են: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք օբֆուզացիա-առ-ներխուժում և ուսումնասիրում ենք, թե որքան չափով են մոդելները պատրաստված լինել բացահայտորեն ոճի-ներխուժող պահպանել սեմանտիկան: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր ճարտարապետությունները զուգահեռ և ոչ զուգահեռ միջավայրում, և համեմատում ենք ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատումները խառնված նախադասությունների վրա: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ ոճի դասակարգչի արտադրությունը կարող է կրճատվել դեպի պատահական մակարդակ, մինչդեռ արտադրությունը գնահատվում է որպես հավասար որակի մոդելներ, որոնք կիրառում են ոճի-փոխանցումը Additionally, human evaluation indicates a trade-off between the level of obfuscation and the observed quality of the output in terms of meaning preservation and grammaticality.', 'az': 'Qısqa modellərini istifadə edərək yazma stillərinin fəsahlandırması işləri əvvəl fəsahlandırma-by-transfer framework ü altında incidir. Qısqa mətn başqa bir stildə açıq-aydın yazılmışdır. Bu çarşığın tərəfindən bir təsiri içərisinin semantik məlumatının çox böyük dəyişiklikləridir. Bu işdə, həddi-büluğa təklif edirik və nəyə qədər modellər təhsil edilməyə təhsil edilmişdir? Bizim arhitektarlarımızı paralel və paralel olmayan ayarlarda değerləşdiririk, avtomatik və insan değerləşdirirləri fərqli cümlələr barəsində qarşılaşdırırıq. Bizim təcrübələrimiz bir stil klasifikatının performansını şanslıq seviyesinə düşürülebilir, çünki çıxış istifadə edilən modellərə eşit kaliteli olaraq təcrübə edilir. Əvvəlcə, insan değerlendirməsi, sağ-salama və qrammatik məsələsi ilə istifadə edilən səviyyənin arasındakı ticarəti göstərir.', 'bn': 'সেকেন্ড মডেল ব্যবহার করে লেখার স্টাইল ব্যবহার করার কাজ ইতিপূর্বে অনুসন্ধান করা হয়েছে, যেখানে ইনপুট ট টেক্সট অন্য ধরনের ভিত্তিতে পুনরায় লেখা হয়। এই ফ্রেমের একটি পার্শ্বপূর্ণ প্রভাব হচ্ছে ইনপুটের সেম্পেন্টিক বিষয়বস্তুর প্রায়শই প্রধান পরিবর্তন। এই কাজের মধ্যে আমরা প্রস্তাব করি যে কোন ধরনের মডেল পরিস্কার করা হয়েছে সেমেন্টিক সংরক্ষণ করার জন্য। আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং মানুষের মূল্য মূল্যায়ন করি তাদের সাথে তুলনা এবং অসমান বৈশিষ্ট্যের মাধ্যমে এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে মানু আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে একটি স্টাইল বিভাগের প্রভাব সুযোগ স্তরে কমে যাবে, কিন্তু আউটপুটটি স্টাইল পরিবর্তনের মডেলের মান সমতু এছাড়াও মানুষের মূল্যের মানে সংরক্ষণ এবং গ্রামান্তিক সংরক্ষণের মাধ্যমে মানুষের মূল্য ব্যবসায়ীতে বাণিজ্য-আটকে দেখা যায়।', 'bs': 'Zadatak optužbe pisaćeg stila koristeći modele sekvencije prethodno je istražen pod okvirom optužbe po transferu, gdje je tekst ulaza objašnjenje napisan u drugom stilu. Nuspojava ovog okvira su često velike promjene semantičkog sadržaja ulaska. U ovom poslu predlažemo obfusaciju po invariaciji i istražujemo u kakvoj mjeri modeli obučeni da budu isključivo invariantni da sačuvaju semantiku. Procjenjujemo naše arhitekture u paralelnim i ne-paralelnim postavkama, i uspoređujemo automatske i ljudske procjene o zbunjenim rečenicama. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da se učinkovitost klasifikatora stila može smanjiti na nivo šanse, dok se procjenjuje izlaz kao jednaka kvaliteta modelima koji primjenjuju prebacivanje stila. Osim toga, ljudska procjena ukazuje na trgovinu između nivoa opfuzije i promatranog kvaliteta proizvoda u smislu očuvanja i gramatičnosti značenja.', 'cs': 'Úloha zamaskování stylu psaní pomocí sekvenčních modelů byla dříve zkoumána v rámci zamaskování-by-transfer, kde je vstupní text explicitně přepsán do jiného stylu. Vedlejším efektem tohoto rámce jsou časté významné změny sémantického obsahu vstupu. V této práci navrhujeme zamaskování invariancí a zkoumáme, do jaké míry modely trénované tak, aby byly explicitně styloinvariantní, uchovávají sémantiku. Vyhodnocujeme naše architektury v paralelním i nealelním nastavení a porovnáváme automatické a lidské hodnocení na zamlčených větách. Naše experimenty ukazují, že výkonnost klasifikátoru stylu lze snížit na úroveň náhody, zatímco výstup je hodnocen jako stejná kvalita jako modely aplikující styl-transfer. Lidské hodnocení navíc naznačuje kompromis mezi úrovní zamlčení a sledovanou kvalitou výstupu z hlediska zachování významu a gramatiky.', 'et': 'Kirjutamisstiili summutamise ülesannet jadamudelite abil on varem uuritud summutamise-by-transfer raames, kus sisendtekst kirjutatakse selgesõnaliselt teises stiilis. Selle raamistiku kõrvalmõjudeks on sagedased olulised muudatused sisendi semantilises sisus. Käesolevas töös pakume välja varjamine invariantsi abil ja uurime, mil määral mudelid, mis on õpetatud selgesõnaliselt stiiliinvariantseks säilitama semantikat. Hindame oma arhitektuure paralleelsetes ja mitteparalleelsetes seadetes ning võrdleme automaatseid ja inimlikke hinnanguid varjatud lausete kohta. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et stiiliklassifikaatori jõudlust saab vähendada juhusliku tasemeni, samas kui väljundit hinnatakse võrdse kvaliteediga stiiliülekannet rakendavate mudelitega. Lisaks näitab inimhinnang kompromisse hägustumise taseme ja väljundi tähenduse säilitamise ja grammatilisuse seisukohalt täheldatud kvaliteedi vahel.', 'ca': "La tasca d'obfuscar l'estil d'escriptura utilitzant models de seqüència s'ha investigat anteriorment sota el marc d'obfuscació per transfer ència, on el text d'entrada es reescriu explícitament en un altre estil. Un efecte secundari d'aquest marc són les freqüents alteracions importants del contingut semàntic de la entrada. En aquesta feina, proposem obfuscació per invariació, i investigam en quin punt els models entrenats per ser esplicitament estil-invariants conserven la semàntica. Evaluam les nostres arquitectures en ambients paralèls i no paralèls, i comparem les evaluacions automàtiques i humanes en frases obfuscades. Els nostres experiments demostren que el rendiment d'un classificador d'estil pot ser reduït a nivell d'atzar, mentre que la producció és de la mateixa qualitat que els models aplicant transfer ència d'estil. A més, l'evaluació human a indica un compromís entre el nivell d'obfuscació i la qualitat observada de la producció en termes de preservació significativa i gramàtica.", 'fi': 'Kirjoitustyylin hämärtämistä sekvenssimallien avulla on aiemmin tutkittu hämärtymisen avulla, jossa syöteteksti kirjoitetaan nimenomaisesti uudelleen toiseen tyyliin. Tämän viitekehyksen sivuvaikutuksena ovat usein merkittävät muutokset syötteen semanttiseen sisältöön. Tässä työssä ehdotamme hämärtymistä invarianssilla ja selvitämme, missä määrin mallit, jotka on koulutettu nimenomaan tyyliinvarianssiksi, säilyttävät semantiikan. Arvioimme arkkitehtuurejamme rinnakkaisissa ja ei-rinnakkaisissa asetuksissa ja vertaamme automaattisia ja inhimillisiä arvioita hämärtyneistä lauseista. Kokeet osoittavat, että tyyliluokituksen suorituskyky voidaan laskea sattumanvaraiseksi, kun taas tuotoksen arvioidaan olevan yhtä laadukas kuin tyylinsiirtoa soveltavat mallit. Lisäksi ihmisen arviointi osoittaa kompromisseja hämärtymisen tason ja tuotoksen havaitun laadun välillä merkityksen säilyttämisen ja kieliopillisuuden kannalta.', 'jv': 'task of ob-by-transfer effect Nang-uwong lan mungkin gunakake iki, kita supoyo perusahaan-perusahaan karo invariance, lan ujaran kanggo kalaman lagi model sing dituruti nggawe isih perusahaan style-invariant Monday Where Ubah, nggunakake uwong ngerasai perusahaan anyar tentang matang tanggal nggawe gerakan karo kalitas urang kanggo ngilangno sistêm kuwi tindakan kanggo ngerayakno ning ngerayakno ora bisa pasar iki dadi.', 'ha': "Kayan aikin obfuskaskure rubutun mai amfani da misãlai masu saka, an tambaye su a gabãni, a cikin firam na obfuskation-by-transfer, inda aka sake rubũtar matsayin injistan da bayyane cikin wata salon daban. Wata Effekt na wannan firam yana da sauri masu girma zuwa tsarin da aka shigar. Daga wannan aikin, muna buƙata misalin-da-sura, kuma munã karatun zuwa inda misãlai aka sanar da su a cikin zane-salon-inganci mai bayyane. Tuna ƙaddara matsayinmu a sami da masu daidaita da bã-daidaita, kuma muna daidaita qiymati farat ɗaya da mutane a kan maganar da aka faɗa. Kayan jarrabai ke nũna cewa, za'a ƙara aikin wani mai tsari cikin salon zuwa wani daraja ya yi furuci, kuma a ƙidãya matsayin ya zama daidai kamar misali da za'a yi amfani da shishi-transfer. Furan wannan, evaluation ga mutum yana nũna wata fatauci mai tsakanin daraja na obfuskanci da sifar da aka tsare na grammanci.", 'sk': 'Naloga zameglitve sloga pisanja z modeli zaporedja je bila prej raziskana v okviru zameglitve s prenosom, kjer je vhodno besedilo izrecno prepisano v drug slog. Stranski učinek tega okvira so pogoste večje spremembe semantične vsebine vhoda. V tem delu predlagamo zameglitev z invarianco in raziskujemo, v kolikšni meri modeli, usposobljeni za eksplicitno invariantno slogovno ohranjajo semantiko. Naše arhitekture ocenjujemo v vzporednih in neizporednih nastavitvah ter primerjamo avtomatske in človeške ocene o zamegljenih stavkih. Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da je zmogljivost slogovnega klasifikatorja mogoče zmanjšati na raven naključja, medtem ko je rezultat ocenjen enako kakovostni kot modeli, ki uporabljajo slogovni prenos. Poleg tega ocena človeka kaže na kompromis med stopnjo zabrisanosti in opaženo kakovostjo produkta v smislu ohranjanja pomena in slovničnosti.', 'he': 'המשימה של התעסקות בסגנון כתיבה באמצעות דוגמני רצף כבר חקרה קודם תחת המסגרת של התעסקות על ידי העברה, שם טקסט הכניסה מוכתב מחדש באופן ברור בסגנון אחר. תופעה לוואי של המסגרת הזו הם השינויים העיקריים לעתים קרובות לתוכן הסמנטי של הכניסה. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים התעללות על ידי הפלישה, וחקירים עד כמה מודלים מאומנים להיות באופן ברור סגנון-פלילי לשמור סמנטיקה. אנו מעריכים את הארכיטקטורות שלנו במערכות מקבילות ולא מקבילות, ולהשוות הערכות אוטומטיות ואנושיות על המשפטים המבולבלים. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהביצועים של מסגנון מסגנון יכולים להיפחות לרמה סיכוי, בזמן שהתוצאה מוערכת להיות של איכות שווה לדוגמנים שמאפשרים העברת סגנון. בנוסף, הערכה האנושית מצביעה על סחר בין רמת ההתערבות לאיכות המבוחנת של התוצאה במונחים של שמירת משמעות וגרמטיקות.', 'bo': 'འདི་ལྟ་བུ རྩིས་གཞུང་འདིའི་ཟུར་བ་ཅིག་ནི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ཚུལ་ཆེ་བའི་ནང་དོན་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ལས་ཀ་འདི་ལྟར་བཀག་ལྡན་པའི་མིང་དང་། གནད་དོན་དག་ཕྱིར་མཐོང་བའི་དཔེ་གཞི་རྩལ་སྒྲིག་ལ་གསལ་འཕགས་རྣམས་མེད་པའི་སྐྱེས་ཚོགས་ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་བཟོ་བརྩིས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ལས་parallel་མིན་པའི་སྒྲིག Our experiments show that the performance of a style classifier can be reduced to chance level, while the output is evaluated to be of equal quality to models applying style-transfer. ད་དུང་། མི་ཤེས་ཚོར་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་གནད་སྡུད་འདོར་བའི་ཚད་དང་མཐོང་བའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བརྟེན་ནས་གནད་སྡུད་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག'}
{'en': 'Towards a Language for Natural Language Treebank Transductions', 'ar': 'نحو لغة لتحولات تريبانك للغة الطبيعية', 'pt': 'Rumo a uma linguagem para transduções do Treebank em linguagem natural', 'es': 'Hacia un lenguaje para las transducciones de bancos de árboles en lenguaje natural', 'fr': "Vers une langue pour les transductions des banques d'arbres en langage naturel", 'ja': '自然言語ツリーバンクトランスクリプションのための言語に向けて', 'zh': '迈向自然语言树库转导之言', 'hi': 'प्राकृतिक भाषा Treebank Transductions के लिए एक भाषा की ओर', 'ru': 'На пути к языку для трансдукции Treebank на естественном языке', 'ga': 'I dTreo Teanga do Theanga Nádúrtha Aistrithe Bhruach na gCrann', 'ka': 'თავისუფალური ენერგიის ტრანგუქციებისთვის ენერგია', 'el': 'Προς μια γλώσσα για τις αναπαραστάσεις δέντρων φυσικής γλώσσας', 'hu': 'Egy nyelv felé a természetes nyelvű fabank transzdukciókhoz', 'lt': 'Kalbos, skirtos natūralios kalbos medžio banko vertimui, link', 'it': 'Verso un linguaggio per le trasduzioni della banca degli alberi del linguaggio naturale', 'kk': 'Табиғи тіл Treebank аудармаларының тіліне', 'mt': 'Lejn Lingwa għat-Traduzzjonijiet tal-Banek tas-Siġar tal-Lingwa Naturali', 'mk': 'За јазик за транстракции на дрвјата на природниот јазик', 'ms': 'Ke arah bahasa untuk Transduction Natural Language Treebank', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэлний Treebank-ын хөндлөлийн хэл рүү', 'no': 'Gå til eit språk for naturleg språk Treebank- overføringar', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ ട്രീബാങ്കിന്റെ ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ട്രാന്\u200dഡ്യൂഷനുകള്\u200dക്കു് മുകളിലേക്കു്', 'ro': 'Către o limbă pentru transducțiile din brațe naturale', 'so': 'Ganacsiga afka asalka ah ee Treebank', 'pl': 'W kierunku języka dla języka naturalnego', 'sr': 'Prema jeziku prirodnog jezika Treebank-a', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාවක ට්\u200dරීබැන්ක් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සඳහා භාෂාවක් වලට', 'sv': 'Mot ett språk för naturspråk Treebank Transduktions', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி மொழிக்கு மேலே மொழி', 'ur': 'طبیعی زبان تری بینک ٹرانسڈوکیشن کے لئے ایک زبان کی طرف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết ngôn ngữ cho ngôn ngữ Tây Dương', 'bg': 'Към език за естествени езикови трансдукции на дървесни банки', 'hr': 'Prema jeziku prirodnog jezika Treebank-a', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu einer Sprache für natursprachliche Baumbanktransduktionen', 'ko': '자연 언어 트리 라이브러리로 전환하는 언어', 'da': 'På vej mod et sprog for naturligt sprog træbank transduktioner', 'nl': 'Naar een taal voor natuurlijke taal boombanktransducties', 'id': 'Menuju Bahasa untuk Transliasi Bahasa Alami', 'sw': 'Mpaka lugha kwa ajili ya Uhamiaji wa Lugha ya asili', 'fa': 'به سمت زبان برای تغییرات درخت درخت بانک طبیعی', 'tr': 'Tebiýal Dil agaç Bataklary üçin bir dile ýol', 'am': 'Towards a Language for Natural Language Treebank Transductions', 'sq': 'Për një gjuhë për transmetimet e bazës së drurit të gjuhës natyrore', 'hy': 'Գնալով բնական լեզուների ծառի հաղորդակցման լեզուն', 'af': "Na 'n Taal vir Natuurlike Taal Boom Bankoordragte", 'az': 'Təbiətli Dil a ğacı Banku tərcümələrinin dilinə tərəf', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ট্রিবাঙ্ক ট্রান্সট্রান্সডাকশনের জন্য একটি ভাষা উপরে', 'bs': 'Prema jeziku prirodnog jezika Treebank-a', 'cs': 'Směrem k jazyku pro přirozený jazyk stromové transdukce', 'ca': "cap a una llengua per a les traduccions de bancs d'arbres de llenguatges naturals", 'et': 'Loodusliku keele poole puupanga transduktsioonide keele suunas', 'fi': 'Kohti kieltä luonnonkielisille puupankeille', 'jv': 'Tulung langkung kanggo Ketokipun Manual sing Ketokaké', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'לכיוון שפה לתרגשות שפת טבעית', 'sk': 'Na poti k jeziku za naravne jezikovne prenose drevesnih knjig', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཤིག་ཏུ་'}
{'en': 'This paper describes a transduction language suitable for natural language treebank transformations and motivates its application to tasks that have been used and described in the literature. The language, which is the basis for a tree transduction tool allows for clean, precise and concise description of what has been very confusingly, ambiguously, and incompletely textually described in the literature also allowing easy non-hard-coded implementation. We also aim at getting feedback from the NLP community to eventually converge to a de facto standard for such transduction language.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة لغة التحويل المناسبة لتحولات بنك الشجرة الطبيعي للغة وتحفز تطبيقها على المهام التي تم استخدامها ووصفها في الأدبيات. تتيح اللغة ، التي هي أساس أداة تحويل الأشجار ، وصفًا واضحًا ودقيقًا وموجزًا لما تم وصفه بشكل محير للغاية وغامض وغير كامل في الأدبيات ، مما يسمح أيضًا بالتنفيذ السهل غير المشفر. نهدف أيضًا إلى الحصول على تعليقات من مجتمع البرمجة اللغوية العصبية (NLP) حتى نتقارب في النهاية مع معيار واقعي لمثل هذه اللغة التحويلية.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe un lenguaje de transducción adecuado para las transformaciones de bancos de árboles de lenguaje natural y motiva su aplicación a tareas que se han utilizado y descrito en la literatura. El lenguaje, que es la base de una herramienta de transducción de árboles, permite una descripción clara, precisa y concisa de lo que se ha descrito textualmente de manera muy confusa, ambigua e incompleta en la literatura, lo que también permite una implementación fácil y no codificada. También pretendemos obtener comentarios de la comunidad de PNL para eventualmente converger a un estándar de facto para dicho lenguaje de transducción.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit un langage de transduction adapté aux transformations de banques d'arbres en langage naturel et motive son application à des tâches qui ont été utilisées et décrites dans la littérature. Le langage, qui est la base d'un outil de transduction d'arbre, permet une description claire, précise et concise de ce qui a été décrit de manière très confuse, ambiguë et incomplètement textuelle dans la littérature, ce qui permet également une implémentation facile non codée en dur. Nous visons également à obtenir des commentaires de la communauté de la PNL afin de finalement converger vers une norme de facto pour un tel langage de transduction.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve uma linguagem de transdução adequada para transformações de banco de árvores em linguagem natural e motiva sua aplicação a tarefas que têm sido utilizadas e descritas na literatura. A linguagem, que é a base para uma ferramenta de transdução em árvore, permite uma descrição clara, precisa e concisa do que foi descrito textualmente de forma muito confusa, ambígua e incompleta na literatura, permitindo também uma fácil implementação não codificada. Também pretendemos obter feedback da comunidade de PNL para eventualmente convergir para um padrão de fato para tal linguagem de transdução.', 'ja': '本論文では、自然言語ツリーバンク変換に適した形質導入言語を説明し、文献で使用され説明されているタスクへの適用を動機づけている。木変換ツールの基礎となる言語は、文献で非常に紛らわしく、曖昧に、そして不完全にテキストで説明されてきたもののクリーンで、正確で、簡潔な説明を可能にし、簡単に非ハードコード化された実装も可能にする。また、NLPコミュニティからのフィードバックを得て、最終的にそのような形質導入言語のデファクトスタンダードに収束することを目指しています。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर प्राकृतिक भाषा ट्रीबैंक परिवर्तनों के लिए उपयुक्त एक ट्रांसडक्शन भाषा का वर्णन करता है और साहित्य में उपयोग किए गए और वर्णित कार्यों के लिए इसके आवेदन को प्रेरित करता है। भाषा, जो एक ट्री ट्रांसडक्शन टूल के लिए आधार है, साफ, सटीक और संक्षिप्त विवरण के लिए अनुमति देती है जो साहित्य में बहुत भ्रमित, अस्पष्ट रूप से, और अपूर्ण रूप से वर्णित है, जो आसान गैर-हार्ड-कोडित कार्यान्वयन की अनुमति देता है। हम एनएलपी समुदाय से प्रतिक्रिया प्राप्त करने का भी लक्ष्य रखते हैं ताकि अंततः इस तरह की ट्रांसडक्शन भाषा के लिए एक वास्तविक मानक में अभिसरण किया जा सके।', 'zh': '本文述自然语言树库转语,激劝其用于文转导。 其言树转导器之本,许其乱也,模糊不尽之文,精洁之述,亦许简非硬编码。 犹得反馈于NLP社区,以终敛转导言之事实标准。', 'ru': 'В данной работе описывается язык трансдукции, пригодный для трансформации берегов деревьев естественного языка, и мотивируется его применение к задачам, которые были использованы и описаны в литературе. Язык, который является основой для инструмента дерево трансдукции позволяет чистое, точное и краткое описание того, что было очень запутанно, двусмысленно и неполно текстово описано в литературе, также позволяя легко не жестко закодированной реализации. Мы также стремимся получить обратную связь от сообщества NLP, чтобы в конечном итоге сблизиться со стандартом де-факто для такого языка трансдукции.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar theanga aistrithe atá oiriúnach le haghaidh claochluithe nádúrtha bruacha crann teanga agus spreagann sé a cur i bhfeidhm ar thascanna a úsáideadh agus a gcuirtear síos orthu sa litríocht. Ceadaíonn an teanga, atá mar bhunús le huirlis aistrithe crann, cur síos glan, beacht agus beacht ar a bhfuil cur síos déanta go han-mhearbhall, go débhríoch agus go neamhiomlán sa litríocht, rud a cheadaíonn cur i bhfeidhm éasca gan cód crua. Tá sé mar aidhm againn freisin aiseolas a fháil ón bpobal NLP chun teacht le chéile faoi dheireadh go dtí caighdeán de facto don teanga aistrithe sin.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία περιγράφει μια γλώσσα μεταγωγής κατάλληλη για μετασχηματισμούς δέντρων φυσικής γλώσσας και παρακινεί την εφαρμογή της σε εργασίες που έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί και περιγραφεί στη βιβλιογραφία. Η γλώσσα, η οποία αποτελεί τη βάση ενός εργαλείου μεταγωγής δέντρων επιτρέπει την καθαρή, ακριβή και συνοπτική περιγραφή αυτού που έχει περιγραφεί πολύ μπερδεμένα, διφορούμενα και ελλιπώς κειμενικά στη βιβλιογραφία επιτρέποντας επίσης την εύκολη εφαρμογή χωρίς σκληρό κώδικα. Στόχος μας είναι επίσης να πάρουμε ανατροφοδότηση από την κοινότητα ώστε τελικά να συγκλίνουμε σε ένα de facto πρότυπο για μια τέτοια γλώσσα μετάφρασης.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy természetes nyelvű fabank átalakítására alkalmas transzdukciós nyelvet ír le, és motiválja annak alkalmazását a szakirodalomban használt és leírt feladatokra. A faátalakító eszköz alapját képező nyelv tiszta, pontos és tömör leírást tesz lehetővé annak, amit a szakirodalomban nagyon zavarosan, kétértelműen és nem teljesen szövegesen leírtak, lehetővé téve egyszerű, nem kemény kódolású implementációt is. Arra is törekszünk, hogy visszajelzéseket kapjunk az NLP közösségtől, hogy végül konvergáljunk az ilyen fordítási nyelv de facto szabványához.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი აღწერს ტრანსტუქციის ენათი, რომელიც სახური ენათის ტრანსტუქციებისთვის საჭირო და მოტივირდება მისი პროგრამის დაყენებას, რომელიც ლიტებერი ენაა, რომელიც სახელის გადატანაციის საფუძლიერო ხელის გამოსახულებისთვის შესაძლებელია მხოლოდ, განსაკუთრებული და დარწმუნებელია, რაც ძალიან დამბრუნებელია, ამბიზუალურად და დარწმუნებელია ტექსტურ ჩვენ ასევე უნდა მივიღოთ, რომ NLP საზოგადოებოდან გადავიღოთ, რომ საბოლოოდ დეფექტო სტანდარტუქო სტანდარტუქციის ენათისთვის გადავიღოთ.', 'it': 'Questo articolo descrive un linguaggio di trasduzione adatto alle trasformazioni del linguaggio naturale della banca degli alberi e motiva la sua applicazione a compiti che sono stati utilizzati e descritti in letteratura. Il linguaggio, che è alla base di uno strumento di trasduzione ad albero, consente una descrizione pulita, precisa e concisa di ciò che è stato descritto in letteratura in modo molto confuso, ambiguo e incompleto testuale permettendo anche una facile implementazione non hard-coded. Puntiamo anche a ottenere feedback dalla comunità NLP per poi convergere a uno standard de facto per tale linguaggio di trasduzione.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašoma perskaičiavimo kalba, tinkama natūraliam kalbų medžio pagrindo perskaičiavimui ir motyvuojama ją taikyti literatūroje naudojamoms ir aprašytoms užduotims. Kalba, kuri yra medžių perskaičiavimo priemonės pagrindas, leidžia aiškiai, tiksliai ir glaudžiai aprašyti tai, kas buvo labai painiojanti, dviprasmiškai ir nekomplektiškai tekstiškai aprašyta literatūroje, taip pat leidžia lengvai įgyvendinti nekoduotus kodus. Taip pat siekiame gauti NLP bendruomenės pastabas, kad galų gale būtų konvergencija prie de facto standarto tokiai vertimo kalbai.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз табиғи тілінің орналасуы үшін жақсы аудару тілін таңдап, әдебиетте қолданылған және түсінілген тапсырмалар үшін қолданбаны мотиваттайды. Бұл тіл, ағаш аудару құралының негізінде, әріптерде әріптердің көмектесілмеген және қатты кодтамасыз емес істеуіне мүмкіндік береді. Біз сондай-ақ NLP коммуникасынан қайталану үшін де-факто стандартты осы аудару тілінің стандарттарына біріктіру үшін мақсаттамыз.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan bahasa penyerahan yang sesuai untuk perubahan pangkalan pepohonan bahasa semulajadi dan mendorong aplikasinya kepada tugas yang telah digunakan dan diterangkan dalam literatur. Bahasa, yang merupakan asas bagi alat penerbangan pokok membolehkan penerangan bersih, tepat dan singkat apa yang telah sangat keliru, ambiguh, dan tidak lengkap diterangkan secara teks dalam literatur juga membolehkan pelaksanaan mudah bukan-kod keras. Kami juga bertujuan untuk mendapatkan balas balik dari komuniti NLP untuk akhirnya menuju ke piawai de facto untuk bahasa penyerahan seperti itu.', 'mk': 'This paper describes a transduction language suitable for natural language treebank transformations and motivates its application to tasks that have been used and described in the literature.  Јазикот, кој е основа за алатката за трансдукција на дрвјата, овозможува чист, прецизен и кратен опис на она што е многу збунувачки, двогумно и нецелосно текстуално опишано во литературата, исто така овозможува лесно нецврсто кодирано спроведување. Ние, исто така, имаме за цел да добиеме реакција од заедницата на НЛП за конечно да се приближиме до дефактичен стандард за ваков јазик на трансдукција.', 'ml': 'This paper describes a transduction language suitable for natural language treebank transformations and motivates its application to tasks that have been used and described in the literature.  ഒരു വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ ട്രാന്\u200dഡ്രാന്\u200dഡ്യൂക്ഷന്\u200d ഉപകരണത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാണ് ഈ ഭാഷ വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന് ശുദ്ധിയും വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന് നമ്മളും NLP സമൂഹത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഫിബിക്കേക്ക് ലഭിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അവസാനം ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള ട്രാന്\u200dഡ്രാന്\u200dഡോക', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь байгалийн хэл дээрх өөрчлөлт болон уран зохиолд хэрэглэгдсэн, тайлбарласан үйл ажилд хэрэглэгддэг болон зохиолд хэрэглэгддэг үйл ажилд зориулагддаг. Энэ хэл бол модны хувиргалтын үндсэн хэрэгсэл юм. Энэ нь уран зохиолд маш төвөгтэй, тодорхой, тодорхой тодорхойлдог зүйлсийг цэвэр, тодорхойлох боломжтой болгодог. Мөн бид NLP-ын нийгмийн хариулт авах зорилго нь эцэст нь эдгээр орчуулалтын хэл дээр de facto стандарттай холбогдох болно.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi lingwa ta’ trasduzzjoni adatta għat-trasformazzjonijiet tal-banek tas-siġar tal-lingwa naturali u jimmotiva l-applikazzjoni tiegħu għal kompiti li ntużaw u deskritti fil-letteratura. Il-lingwa, li hija l-bażi għal għodda għat-trasduzzjoni tas-siġar tippermetti deskrizzjoni nadifa, preċiża u konċiża ta’ dak li kien konfużiv ħafna, ambigwu, u mhux kompletament deskritt testwalment fil-letteratura li tippermetti wkoll implimentazzjoni faċli mhux ikkodifikata b’kodiċi iebes. Għandna wkoll l-għan li niksbu reazzjonijiet mill-komunità NLP biex eventwalment nikkonverġu għal standard de facto għal tali lingwa ta’ trasduzzjoni.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje język transdukcyjny odpowiedni do transformacji języka naturalnego i motywuje jego zastosowanie do zadań, które zostały wykorzystane i opisane w literaturze. Język, będący podstawą narzędzia transdukcyjnego drzewa, pozwala na czysty, precyzyjny i zwięzły opis tego, co było bardzo myląco, dwuznacznie i niekompletnie tekstowo opisane w literaturze, pozwalając również na łatwą, nietwardą implementację. Dążymy również do uzyskania informacji zwrotnych ze społeczności NLP, aby ostatecznie zbliżyć się do de facto standardu dla takiego języka transdukcyjnego.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare descrie un limbaj de traducere adecvat pentru transformările limbajului natural al băncii copace și motivează aplicarea acestuia la sarcini care au fost folosite și descrise în literatură. Limbajul, care stă la baza unui instrument de traducere arborească, permite o descriere curată, precisă și concisă a ceea ce a fost descris foarte confuz, ambiguu și incomplet textual în literatură, permițând, de asemenea, implementarea ușoară non-hard-coded. De asemenea, ne propunem să obținem feedback din partea comunității PNL pentru a converge în cele din urmă la un standard de facto pentru un astfel de limbaj de traducere.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje prevodni jezik koji odgovara transformacijama prirodnog jezika i motivira njegovu aplikaciju na zadatke koje su korištene i opisane u literaturi. Jezik, koji je osnova alata za prevod drveta omogućava čistom, preciznom i konkretnom opisu onoga što je bilo veoma zbunjeno, ambigudno i nesposobno tekstualno opisano u literaturi takođe omogućava lakom ne-teškom kodiranom provedbom. Također ciljamo dobiti povratku iz zajednice NLP-a da se konačno poveže sa de facto standardom za takav jezik prevode.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver eit omsetjingspråk som passar for naturleg språk- treebank- transformasjonar og motiverer programmet til oppgåver som er brukt og beskriven i literaturen. Språket, som er grunnleggjande for eit tretransduksjonsverktøy, kan bruka ein rein, nøyaktig og konklisert beskrivelse av det som er veldig forvirrende, ambiguelt og ikkje fullstendig tekst beskriven i litteratur, tillat også enkle ikkje-hardkoda implementasjon. Vi måtar også å få tilbakemeldingar frå NLP-fellesskapet til å eventuelt konvertere til ein de facto standard for slik transduksjonsspråk.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාවට ප්\u200dරතිකාර භාෂාවක් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාර භාෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන් සඳහා ප්\u200d මේ භාෂාව, මේ වස්ත්\u200dරයක් වාර්ථාපනයක් වෙනුවෙන් අධාරණය වෙනුවෙන් පුළුවන්, සුදුසුදු සහ සුදුසුදු විස්තරණය සඳහා පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන්  අපි අදහස් කරනවා NLP සමාජිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගන්න අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් අවස්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaa ku qoran luqada wareejinta oo ku haboon isbedelka afka dabiicadda ah oo ku haboon isbedelka treebank iyo wuxuu ku dalbadaa codsigiisa shaqooyinka lagu isticmaalay oo lagu qoray warqada. Luqada, kaas oo ah xarunta geed ka soo wareegista, wuxuu si nadiif ah u heli karaa sawir, si saxda ah iyo si gaar ah u sheegi karaa waxa qoraalka lagu qoray, si qallafsan, si buuxsan, si buuxdana loogu qoray qoraalka, sidoo kale wuxuu sidoo kale u ogolaan karaa in la sameeyo si fudud oo aan codsan. Waxaynu sidoo kale ula jeedinaynaa in dib looga soo celiyo bulshada NLP si aan ugu dambaysta ugu beddelno kaalada farsamada ee luqada ka soo wareejinta.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver ett översättningsspråk som lämpar sig för transformationer av naturspråk och motiverar dess tillämpning på uppgifter som använts och beskrivits i litteraturen. Språket, som ligger till grund för ett trädtransduktionsverktyg, möjliggör en ren, exakt och koncis beskrivning av vad som har beskrivits mycket förvirrande, tvetydigt och ofullständigt i litteraturen, vilket också möjliggör enkel icke-hårdkodad implementering. Vi strävar också efter att få feedback från NLP-gemenskapen för att så småningom konvergera till en de facto standard för sådant översättningsspråk.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் இயல்பான மொழி மொழி மாற்றங்களுக்கு பொருத்தமான மொழியை விவரிக்கும் மற்றும் அதில் பயன்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ள பணிகளு ஒரு மரத்தை மாற்றும் கருவிக்கு அடிப்படையாகும் மொழி, சுத்தமான, சரியான மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட விளக்கம் மிகவும் குழப்பமாக இருந்தது என்பதை விளக்குகிறது மற்றும் மு நாம் NLP சமுதாயத்திலிருந்து பதில் பெறுவதற்கு எதிர்பார்க்கிறோம் முடிவில் இந்த மொழிக்கு ஒரு de facto standard ஆக மாற்றுகிறது.', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک ٹرنڈوٹ کی زبان کی نسبت قابل تغییرات کے لئے مطابق ہے اور اس کا کاروبار ادبیات میں استعمال کیا گیا اور توصیح کیا گیا ہے۔ زبان، جو ایک درخت کی تغییرات ابزار کی بنیاد ہے، اس کی پاکیزگی، دقیق اور دقیق تعریف کے لئے اجازت دیتی ہے جو بہت پیچیدہ، غلط اور غلط طور پر لکھا گیا ہے، اور اس میں آسان غلط کڈ کی عملومات کی اجازت دیتی ہے۔ ہم نے بھی NLP کمونٹی سے فیڈ پک حاصل کرنے کا ارادہ کیا ہے کہ آخر میں ایسی ترجمہ زبان کے لئے de facto استاندارڈ سے ملے۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz tilni tabiiy tilda o'zgarishga mos keladigan tilni tahrirlaydi va ta'limda ishlatilgan vazifalarni ishlatish va taʼminlovchiga ega qiladi. Til, daraxt kodlash vositasi asosida, bu muammolar, juda qanday qanday g'oyalar bo'lgan va o'xshash va o'xshash o'zgarishga ega bo'lgan narsalarning ma'lumotga aytishga ruxsat beradi. Biz NLP jamoasidan xabar olishga qaramaymiz, endi bunday tarjima tillariga o'zgartirish uchun de facto standardini o'zgartirish uchun.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này mô tả một ngôn ngữ chuyển phát thích hợp cho sự biến đổi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trên diện rộng và thúc đẩy việc sử dụng vào các tác phẩm đã được sử dụng và mô tả trong văn học. Ngôn ngữ, nền tảng cho một công cụ chuyển hàng cây cho phép mô tả gọn, chính xác và rõ ràng về những gì đã được mô tả trong văn học, rõ ràng và không rõ ràng, dễ dàng được mã hóa. Mục tiêu của chúng tôi cũng là lấy phản hồi từ cộng đồng Njala để cuối cùng hội tụ với một tiêu chuẩn thực tế cho ngôn ngữ phân phối này.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft een transductietaal geschikt voor natuurtaalboombanktransformaties en motiveert de toepassing ervan op taken die in de literatuur zijn gebruikt en beschreven. De taal, die de basis vormt voor een tree transductie tool, maakt een schone, nauwkeurige en beknopte beschrijving mogelijk van wat zeer verwarrend, dubbelzinnig en onvolledig tekstueel beschreven is in de literatuur, waardoor ook eenvoudige niet-hard-gecodeerde implementatie mogelijk is. We streven ook naar feedback van de NLP gemeenschap om uiteindelijk te convergeren naar een de facto standaard voor dergelijke transductie taal.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje prevodni jezik koji odgovara transformacijama prirodnog jezika i motivira njegovu primjenu na zadatke koje su korištene i opisane u književnosti. Jezik, koji je osnova alata za prevod drveta omogućava čistom, preciznom i konkretnom opisu onoga što je bilo vrlo zbunjeno, dvosmisleno i nepotpuno tekstualno opisano u književnosti također omogućavajući jednostavnu ne-teško kodiranu provedbu. Također ciljamo dobiti odgovor iz zajednice NLP-a da se konačno poveže sa de facto standardom za takav jezik prevode.', 'da': 'Dette arbejde beskriver et transduktionssprog, der er velegnet til transformationer af natursproget træbank, og motiverer dets anvendelse på opgaver, der er blevet anvendt og beskrevet i litteraturen. Sproget, som er grundlaget for et trætransduktionsværktøj, giver mulighed for en ren, præcis og præcis beskrivelse af, hvad der er blevet meget forvirrende, tvetydigt og ufuldstændigt beskrevet i litteraturen, og muliggør også nem ikke-hårdt kodet implementering. Vi har også til formål at få feedback fra NLP-fællesskabet for i sidste ende at konvergere til en de facto standard for et sådant transduktionssprog.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt eine Transduktionssprache, die für natursprachliche Baumbanktransformationen geeignet ist und motiviert deren Anwendung auf Aufgaben, die in der Literatur verwendet und beschrieben wurden. Die Sprache, die die Grundlage für ein Baumtransduktionswerkzeug bildet, ermöglicht eine saubere, präzise und prägnante Beschreibung dessen, was in der Literatur sehr verwirrend, mehrdeutig und unvollständig textlich beschrieben wurde, und ermöglicht eine einfache, nicht-hard-codierte Implementierung. Wir wollen auch Feedback von der NLP-Community erhalten, um schließlich zu einem de facto Standard für eine solche Transduktionssprache konvergieren zu können.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan bahasa transduksi yang cocok untuk transformasi batang pohon bahasa alam dan mendorong aplikasinya untuk tugas yang telah digunakan dan digambarkan dalam literatur. Bahasa, yang merupakan dasar untuk alat transduksi pohon memungkinkan untuk deskripsi bersih, tepat dan singkat apa yang telah sangat membingungkan, ambiguh, dan tidak lengkap secara tekstual yang diterangkan dalam literatur juga memungkinkan implementasi mudah tidak-hard-coded. Kami juga bermaksud mendapatkan feedback dari komunitas NLP untuk akhirnya konvergensi ke standar de facto untuk bahasa transduksi seperti itu.', 'ko': '본고는 자연 언어 트리 라이브러리 전환에 적용되는 전환 언어를 묘사하고 문헌에 응용하고 묘사하는 임무를 격려한다.이 언어는 트리 변환 도구의 기초로 문헌에서 매우 혼란스럽고 모호하며 불완전한 텍스트 묘사를 뚜렷하고 정확하며 간결하게 묘사할 수 있고 가벼운 비하드 코딩을 실현할 수 있다.우리는 또한 NLP 커뮤니티에서 피드백을 받아 최종적으로 이런 언어의 사실 기준에 도달하기를 희망한다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک زبان تغییرات مناسب برای تغییرات تغییرات زبان طبیعی را توصیف می\u200cکند و کاربردش را به وظیفه\u200cهایی که در ادبیات استفاده شده و توصیف شده\u200cاند انگیزه می\u200cکند. زبان، که بنیادی برای ابزار تغییرات درخت است، اجازه می دهد برای توضیح تمیز، دقیق و دقیق چیزی که خیلی پیچیده، غیرقابل و غیرقابل متن توصیف شده در ادبیات همچنین اجازه می دهد که کاربرد ساده غیرقابل کد شده است. ما همچنین هدف می\u200cگیریم که از جامعه NLP بازگشت را بدست بیاوریم تا بالاخره به یک استاندارد de facto برای این زبان تبدیل شود.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaelezea lugha ya mpito inayofaa kwa mabadiliko ya lugha ya asili na yanahamasisha matumizi yake kwa kazi zilizotumiwa na kuelezea katika fasihi. Lugha, ambayo ni msingi wa chombo cha usambazaji wa mti unaruhusu kuelezea usafi, sahihi na sahihi kuhusu kile kilichokuwa kinapotangaza sana, kwa uchochezi, na kinachoelezwa kabisa katika fasihi hiyo pia inaruhusu utekelezaji usio na vigumu. Pia tunakusudia kupata maoni kutoka jumuiya ya NLP ili hatimaye kubadilisha kuwa kiwango cha ukweli cha lugha hii ya upatikanaji.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz tebigy dil baglançylary üçin gowy bir terjime dilini tashylaýar we öz uygulamasyny edebiýatda ulanan we tassyklanan zadlara täsirleýär. Bu dil, agaç terjime etmek üçin esasy, arassa, düz we kelläp kelläp bolan zadyň düşünmesini saýlamak üçin mümkin edýär. Bu dil edebiýatan boşalmakdan a ňsat täze bir implementasiýa mümkin edýär. Biz hem NLP jemgyýetinden yzyna geçirmek üçin aslynda bu şekilde terjime edilen dillere de facto standartlara çeşmek üçin amaçladyk.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия описва трансдукционен език, подходящ за трансформации на естествения език и мотивира прилагането му към задачи, които са използвани и описани в литературата. Езикът, който е в основата на инструмент за трансдукция на дървета, позволява чисто, прецизно и кратко описание на това, което е било много объркващо, двусмислено и непълно текстово описано в литературата, което също така позволява лесно нетвърдо кодирано изпълнение. Ние също така се стремим да получим обратна връзка от общността на НЛП, за да се доближим до фактически стандарт за такъв език за трансдукция.', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskrywe 'n vertalingstaal wat geskik is vir natuurlike taal treebank transformasies en motiveer sy toepassing na opdragte wat gebruik is en beskrywe is in die literaat. Die taal, wat die basis vir 'n boom oordrukking hulpmiddel is, laat toe vir rein, presies en concise beskrywing van wat baie verdwyn, onvolledig en onvolledig in die leeteratur beskrywe is en toelaat maklik nie-harde-kodeerde implementasie. Ons doen ook doel om terugmelding van die NLP gemeenskap te kry om eindelik na 'n de facto standaard te verbind vir sodanige transduksie taal.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër përshkruan një gjuhë transdukimi të përshtatshme për transformimet natyrore të bazës së drurit të gjuhës dhe motivon aplikimin e saj ndaj detyrave që janë përdorur dhe përshkruar në letraturë. Gjuha, e cila është baza për një mjet transdukimi pemësh lejon për përshkrimin e pastër, të saktë dhe të shkurtër të asaj që ka qenë shumë konfuze, në mënyrë të qartë dhe jo plotësisht tekstuale të përshkruar në letërsinë, duke lejuar gjithashtu zbatimin e lehtë jo të koduar të vështirë. Ne synojmë gjithashtu të marrim feedback nga komuniteti NLP për përfundimisht të konvergjojmë në një standard de facto për një gjuhë të tillë transdukimi.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է թարգմանման լեզու, որը համապատասխանում է բնական լեզվի ծառի վերափոխման համար, և դրդում է դրա կիրառումը գրականության մեջ օգտագործված և նկարագրված խնդիրների վրա: Լեզուն, որը ծառի հաղորդակցման գործիքի հիմքն է, հնարավորություն է տալիս մաքուր, ճշգրիտ և ճշգրիտ նկարագրություն այն բանի մասին, ինչը բավականին շփոթեցնող, երկիմաստ և անամբողջովին գրականության մեջ նկարագրված է, ինչպես նաև հնարավորություն է տալիս հեշտ ոչ ծանր Մենք նաև նպատակում ենք ստանալ ՆԼՊ համայնքից արձագանքներ, որպեսզի վերջապես համընկնում ենք դե ֆատո ստանդարտ նման թարգմանման լեզուների համար:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt təbiətli dilin təbiətli dəlillərin dəyişikliklərinə uyğun bir dəyişiklik dilini təsdiqləyir və təbiətdə istifadə edilən və təfsil edilən işlərə uyğun göstərir. Bu dil, a ğac təkrarlama vasitəsi üçün təmiz, düzgün və müfəssəl olaraq səhv, səhv və təkrar təkrar edilən təkrarların təkrarlanmasına imkan verir. Biz də NLP toplumundan geri bildirmək istəyirik ki, nihayət də böyük təkrarlama dillərinin de facto standartlarına çevrilsin.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার পরিবর্তনের জন্য যথেষ্ট ট্রিব্যাংকের জন্য একটি ট্রান্ডক্যান্ডাকশন ভাষা বর্ণনা করে এবং সাহিত্যে ব্যবহ ভাষা, যা একটি গাছের ট্রান্ডক্যান্ড্রান্ডিং টুলের ভিত্তিতে পরিষ্কার, পরিস্কার এবং সুনির্দিষ্ট বিষয়বস্তুর ব্যাখ্যা দেয় যা খুব ব বিভ্রান্ত, বিভ্রান এনএলপি সম্প্রদায়ের কাছ থেকে প্রতিক্রিয়া পাওয়ার উদ্দেশ্যে আমরা এই ধরনের ট্রান্ড্রান্ডাকশন ভাষার জন্য একটি ডি ফাক্তো স্ট', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje prevodni jezik koji odgovara transformacijama prirodnog jezika i motivira njegovu primjenu na zadatke koje su korištene i opisane u književnosti. Jezik, koji je osnova alata za prevod drveta omogućava čistom, preciznom i konkretnom opisu onoga što je bilo vrlo zbunjeno, ambigudno i nepotpuno tekstualno opisano u književnosti, također omogućavajući jednostavnu ne-teško kodiranu provedbu. Također ciljamo dobiti povratku iz zajednice NLP-a da se konačno poveže sa de facto standardom za takav jezik prevode.', 'ca': "This paper describes a transduction language suitable for natural language treebank transformations and motivates its application to tasks that have been used and described in the literature.  La llengua, que és la base d'una eina de transducció d'arbres, permet una descripció clara, precisa i concisa del que ha estat molt confus, ambiguament i incompletament descrit textualment a la literatura, també permet una implementació fàcil sense codificació difícil. També volem obtenir feedback de la comunitat de la NLP per convertir-nos en un estàndard de facto per a aquesta llengua de traducció.", 'et': 'Käesolev töö kirjeldab looduskeele puupanga muundamiseks sobivat transduktsioonikeelt ja motiveerib selle rakendamist ülesannetele, mida on kasutatud ja kirjeldatud kirjanduses. Puutransduktsioonivahendi aluseks olev keel võimaldab selgelt, täpselt ja lühidalt kirjeldada seda, mida kirjanduses on väga segadusttekitavalt, ebamääraselt ja ebatäielikult tekstiliselt kirjeldatud, võimaldades ka lihtsalt mitte-kõvakoodistatud rakendamist. Samuti on meie eesmärk saada tagasisidet uue õppeprogrammi kogukonnalt, et lõpuks läheneda sellise transduktsioonikeele de facto standardile.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ ለፍጥረት ቋንቋ መቀናቀል የሚጠቅመውን ቋንቋ ይናገራል፡፡ ቋንቋው የዛፍ መቀነስ መሠረት፣ የንጹሕ፣ ቁጥር እና የተመሳሳይ፣ በጽሕፈት የተዘረዘ እና በጽሑፍ የተዘረዘ የጽሑፍ መሠረት፣ ለቀላል ያልተጨማሪም መጠቀም እንዲፈቅድ ይችላል፡፡ We also aim at getting feedback from the NLP community to eventually converge to a de facto standard for such transduction language.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje transdukční jazyk vhodný pro transformace stromových břehů přirozeného jazyka a motivuje jeho aplikaci na úkoly, které byly použity a popsány v literatuře. Jazyk, který je základem pro nástroj pro transdukci stromů, umožňuje čistý, přesný a stručný popis toho, co bylo v literatuře velmi matoucí, nejednoznačně a neúplně textově popsáno, umožňuje také snadnou, nekódovanou implementaci. Také se snažíme získat zpětnou vazbu od NLP komunity, abychom se nakonec sbližovali k de facto standardu pro tento transdukční jazyk.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan luontaiseen kielenmuutokseen soveltuvaa transduktiokieltä ja motivoi sen soveltamista kirjallisuudessa käytettyihin ja kuvattuihin tehtäviin. Puutransduktiotyökalun pohjana oleva kieli mahdollistaa puhtaan, tarkan ja ytimekkään kuvauksen kirjallisuudessa hyvin hämmentävästi, epäselvästi ja puutteellisesti kuvailusta tekstistä, mikä mahdollistaa myös helpon ei-kovakoodatun toteutuksen. Tavoitteenamme on myös saada palautetta NLP-yhteisöltä, jotta voimme lopulta lähentyä tällaisen muunnoksen tosiasiallista standardia.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מתאר שפת העברה מתאימה לשפת טבעית שפת עץ שינויים ומניע את היישום שלה למשימות שהשתמשו והתיארו בספרות. השפה, שהיא הבסיס עבור כלי שינוי עץ מאפשר לתיאור נקי, מדויק וקצר של מה שהיה מאוד מבלבל, באופן סביר, ולא מושלם מתואר בספרות We also aim at getting feedback from the NLP community to eventually converge to a de facto standard for such transduction language.', 'ha': "This paper describes a transduction language suitable for natural language treebank transformations and motivates its application to tasks that have been used and described in the literature.  Harshen, wanda ke baka kan zanen shishi na itãce, yana yarda wa tsari, da hakki kuma ya ƙayyade rabon abin da ya kasance mai ƙẽtare da haske, da kuma an cikakken takarda da aka faɗa shi a littafin da kuma yana yarda in zartar da shi mai sauƙi na-kodi. Tuna nufin mu motsa baka daga jami na NLP don mu ƙara koma ta zama taƙaitaccen fakto wa lugha wannan da za'a shige.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je opisan transdukcijski jezik, primeren za transformacije drevesne plošče naravnega jezika in motivira njegovo uporabo pri nalogah, ki so bila uporabljena in opisana v literaturi. Jezik, ki je osnova za drevesno transdukcijsko orodje, omogoča čist, natančen in jedrnat opis tega, kar je bilo v literaturi zelo zmedeno, dvoumno in nepopolno besedilno opisano, prav tako omogoča enostavno neizkodirano implementacijo. Prav tako si želimo pridobiti povratne informacije od skupnosti NLP, da bi se sčasoma približali dejanskemu standardu za takšen transdukcijski jezik.', 'jv': 'Kapan iki dadi mbukakipun luwih apik kanggo kelangan anyar nggawe gerakan kanggo tarjamahan karo nggawe barang, lan mbok aplikasi kanggo nggawe operasi dipunangé awak dhéwé ngerasakno ning basa. Tulung Awakdhéwé mung njaluk kanggo ngilangno komunitas NLP iki dadi iki luwih apik kanggo langgambar barang nggawe barang.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་འགྱུར སྐད་ཡིག་ནི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་ལག ང་ཚོས་NLP ཚོགས་སྡེའི་ལྟ་བུ་དང་མཐའ་ནས་ཕར་རིས་བློ་གཏོང་ཐབས་ཤིག་གི་འགྱུར་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཕར་སྡུད་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་ན།'}
{'en': 'Point Precisely : Towards Ensuring the Precision of Data in Generated Texts Using Delayed Copy Mechanism', 'ar': 'حدد بدقة: نحو ضمان دقة البيانات في النصوص التي تم إنشاؤها باستخدام آلية النسخ المتأخر', 'fr': "Point précis\xa0: vers la garantie de la précision des données dans les textes générés à l'aide du mécanisme de copie différée", 'es': 'Señale con precisión: hacia garantizar la precisión de los datos en los textos generados mediante el mecanismo de copia retrasada', 'pt': 'Apontar com precisão: para garantir a precisão dos dados em textos gerados usando o mecanismo de cópia atrasada', 'ja': 'ポイント正確に：遅延コピー機構を使用して生成されたテキストのデータの正確性を確保するために', 'ru': 'Точно: На пути к обеспечению точности данных в сгенерированных текстах с использованием механизма отложенного копирования', 'zh': '精确点:迟复制机准确性', 'hi': 'बिंदु ठीक: विलंबित प्रतिलिपि तंत्र का उपयोग करके उत्पन्न ग्रंथों में डेटा की परिशुद्धता सुनिश्चित करने की दिशा में', 'ga': 'Pointe Beacht: I dtreo Beachtas Sonraí i dTéacsanna Ginte a Chinntiú agus Úsáid á baint as Meicníocht Cóipeála Moillithe', 'ka': 'წერტილი მარტივია: დასრულებული ტექსტში მონაცემების წერტილების დასრულება', 'el': 'Σημείωμα Ακριβώς: Προς τη διασφάλιση της ακρίβειας των δεδομένων σε δημιουργημένα κείμενα χρησιμοποιώντας τον μηχανισμό καθυστερημένης αντιγραφής', 'hu': 'Pontosan pontosan: A generált szövegek adatainak pontosságának biztosítása felé késleltetett másolási mechanizmus segítségével', 'it': 'Puntare esattamente: verso garantire la precisione dei dati nei testi generati utilizzando il meccanismo di copia ritardata', 'kk': 'Дұрыс: Жалпы мәтіндерде деректердің дұрыстығын қолдану үшін Көшірмелеу механизмін қолдану', 'ms': 'Titik Tepat: Ke arah memastikan ketepatan Data dalam Teks Jana Mengguna Mekanisme Salin Terlambat', 'mk': 'Точно точката: Закон осигурување на точноста на податоците во генерираните тексти со употреба на механизмот за одложување на копирање', 'lt': 'Tiksliai: siekiant užtikrinti duomenų tikslumą generuojamuose tekstuose, naudojant vėlavimo kopijų mechanizmą', 'mt': 'Punt Preċiżament: Lejn l-iżgurar tal-preċiżjoni tad-dejta fit-testi ġġenerati bl-użu ta’ Mekkaniżmu ta’ Kopja Dewmien', 'mn': 'Яг л цэг: Өгөгдлийн тодорхойлолтыг нийтлэгдсэн текст ашиглаж буй мэдээллийн тодорхойлолтыг хамгаалах', 'no': 'Punkt nøyaktig: Gå til å sikra nøyaktighet på data i genererte tekstar ved å bruka forsinkla kopimekanisme', 'ml': 'പോയിന്റ് കൃത്യമായി: വൈകിയ പകര്\u200dപ്പ് മെക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പദാവലികളില്\u200d ഡേറ്റായുള്ള പ്രിസിസിഷന്\u200d മുകളിലേക്ക് മ', 'pl': 'Wskaż dokładnie: W kierunku zapewnienia precyzji danych w wygenerowanych tekstach za pomocą mechanizmu opóźnionego kopiowania', 'ro': 'Punct exact: Către asigurarea preciziei datelor în textele generate utilizând mecanismul de copiere întârziată', 'si': 'පොයින්ට් හරියටම: සැකසුම් පාළුමේ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණත්වය පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්ණත්වය ප්\u200dරය', 'sr': 'Točno tačno: ka osiguranju preciznosti podataka u generalnim tekstima korištenjem odgođenog kopijskog mehanizma', 'ta': 'சரியான புள்ளி', 'ur': 'سیدھی پوینٹ: ڈیٹ کی مکانیسم کے استعمال سے ڈیٹ کی مکانیسم کے مطابق مضبوط کرنا کی طرف', 'so': 'Point Precisely: Towards Ensuring the Precision of Data in Generated Texts using Delayed Copy Mechanism', 'sv': 'Rikta exakt: Mot att säkerställa noggrannheten hos data i genererade texter med hjälp av fördröjd kopieringsmekanism', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Chi tiết chính xác: để đảm bảo độ chính xác của dữ liệu trong các đoạn đã tạo ra bằng cơ chế sao chép trễ', 'hr': 'Točno tačno: prema osiguranju preciznosti podataka u generalnim tekstima korištenjem odgođenog kopijskog mehanizma', 'da': 'Peg præcist: På vej mod at sikre nøjagtigheden af data i genererede tekster ved hjælp af forsinket kopieringsmekanisme', 'nl': 'Precies punt: Naar het waarborgen van de precisie van gegevens in gegenereerde teksten met behulp van vertraagd kopieermechanisme', 'bg': 'Точно така: към гарантиране на точността на данните в генерирани текстове с помощта на механизъм за забавено копиране', 'de': 'Präziser Punkt: Auf dem Weg zur Sicherstellung der Präzision von Daten in generierten Texten mithilfe eines verzögerten Kopiermechanismus', 'id': 'Titik Tepat: Menuju Memastikan Precision Data dalam Teks Yang Digenerasikan Menggunakan Mekanisme Salin Terlambat', 'ko': '중점: 지연 복제 메커니즘을 사용하여 텍스트의 데이터 생성의 정확성을 확보한다.', 'tr': 'Tam olarak: Geçerli Metinler içinde Veri Durumluluğu Güvenlik Metinler için Güvenlik Mehanizmi Kullanmak üzere', 'sw': 'Pongo sahihi: Kuelekea Kuhakikisha Uwekezaji wa Taarifa katika Maandishi ya Kutengenezwa kwa kutumia Mfumo wa Kupima', 'af': 'Punt Presies: Gaan na Versoek die Presisie van Data in Gegenereerde Teks gebruik Verlate Kopie Mekanisme', 'fa': 'نقطه دقیقا: به سوی تضمین دقیق داده در متن\u200cهای تولید استفاده از مکانیسم کپی تأخیر شده', 'am': 'ቦታ፦', 'sq': 'Point Precisely: Towards Ensuring the Precision of Data in Generated Texts Using Delayed Copy Mechanism', 'hy': 'Ճիշտ է. Որպեսզի համոզվի տվյալների ճշգրտությունը ստեղծված տեքստներում՝ օգտագործելով ուշ կոպիայի մեխանիզմ', 'az': 'Dońüru n√∂qt…ô: YaratńĪlmńĪŇü M…ôtnl…ôrd…ô M…ôlumatńĪn precizit…ôsini Q√ľvv…ôtl…ôndirm…ôy…ô t…ôr…ôf', 'bs': 'Točno tačno: prema osiguranju preciznosti podataka u generalnim tekstima korištenjem odgođenog kopijskog mehanizma', 'cs': 'Přesně ukazujte: směrem k zajištění přesnosti dat v generovaných textech pomocí mechanismu opožděného kopírování', 'bn': 'পয়েন্টের সুস্পষ্ট: ডেলিয়ে দেয়া কপি মেক্সিম ব্যবহার করে ডাটা তথ্যের সুসংখ্যা সুরক্ষিত করা হচ্ছে', 'et': 'Punkt täpselt: andmete täpsuse tagamine genereeritud tekstides hilinenud kopeerimismehhanismi abil', 'fi': 'Kohde täsmälleen: Kohti tietojen tarkkuuden varmistamista luotuissa teksteissä viivästyneen kopioinnin mekanismin avulla', 'ca': 'Punt exactament: Per assegurar la precisió de les dades en textos generats utilitzant un mecanisme de copia retardat', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': 'Točno točno: k zagotavljanju natančnosti podatkov v ustvarjenih besedilih z mehanizmom zakasnjenega kopiranja', 'bo': 'Point Precisely: Towards Ensuring the Precision of Data in Generated Texts Using Delayed Copy Mechanism', 'he': 'נקודה בדיוק: לעבור להבטיח את מדויקת המידע בטקסטים המוצרים באמצעות מכונות העתק מאוחר'}
{'en': 'The task of data-to-text generation aims to generate descriptive texts conditioned on a number of database records, and recent neural models have shown significant progress on this task. The attention based encoder-decoder models with copy mechanism have achieved state-of-the-art results on a few data-to-text datasets. However, such models still face the problem of putting incorrect data records in the generated texts, especially on some more challenging datasets like RotoWire. In this paper, we propose a two-stage approach with a delayed copy mechanism to improve the precision of data records in the generated texts. Our approach first adopts an encoder-decoder model to generate a template text with data slots to be filled and then leverages a proposed delayed copy mechanism to fill in the slots with proper data records. Our delayed copy mechanism can take into account all the information of the input data records and the full generated template text by using double attention, position-aware attention and a pairwise ranking loss. The two models in the two stages are trained separately. Evaluation results on the RotoWire dataset verify the efficacy of our proposed approach to generate better templates and copy data records more precisely.', 'ar': 'تهدف مهمة إنشاء البيانات إلى نص إلى إنشاء نصوص وصفية مشروطة بعدد من سجلات قاعدة البيانات ، وقد أظهرت النماذج العصبية الحديثة تقدمًا كبيرًا في هذه المهمة. حققت نماذج وحدة فك التشفير القائمة على الانتباه مع آلية النسخ نتائج متطورة على عدد قليل من مجموعات البيانات من البيانات إلى النص. ومع ذلك ، لا تزال مثل هذه النماذج تواجه مشكلة وضع سجلات بيانات غير صحيحة في النصوص التي تم إنشاؤها ، خاصةً في بعض مجموعات البيانات الأكثر تحديًا مثل RotoWire. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا من مرحلتين بآلية نسخ مؤجلة لتحسين دقة سجلات البيانات في النصوص المُنشأة. يتبنى نهجنا أولاً نموذج وحدة فك التشفير لإنشاء نص نموذج مع فتحات البيانات المراد ملؤها ثم الاستفادة من آلية النسخ المتأخر المقترحة لملء الفتحات بسجلات البيانات المناسبة. يمكن أن تأخذ آلية النسخ المؤجلة لدينا في الاعتبار جميع المعلومات الخاصة بسجلات بيانات الإدخال ونص القالب الكامل الناتج عن طريق استخدام الانتباه المزدوج والاهتمام بالوضع وفقدان الترتيب الزوجي. يتم تدريب النموذجين في المرحلتين بشكل منفصل. تتحقق نتائج التقييم على مجموعة بيانات RotoWire من فعالية نهجنا المقترح لإنشاء قوالب أفضل ونسخ سجلات البيانات بشكل أكثر دقة.', 'pt': 'A tarefa de geração de dados para texto visa gerar textos descritivos condicionados a uma série de registros de banco de dados, e modelos neurais recentes têm mostrado progressos significativos nessa tarefa. Os modelos de codificador-decodificador baseados em atenção com mecanismo de cópia alcançaram resultados de última geração em alguns conjuntos de dados de dados para texto. No entanto, tais modelos ainda enfrentam o problema de colocar registros de dados incorretos nos textos gerados, especialmente em alguns conjuntos de dados mais desafiadores como o RotoWire. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem em duas etapas com um mecanismo de cópia atrasada para melhorar a precisão dos registros de dados nos textos gerados. Nossa abordagem primeiro adota um modelo de codificador-decodificador para gerar um texto de modelo com slots de dados a serem preenchidos e, em seguida, aproveita um mecanismo de cópia atrasada proposto para preencher os slots com registros de dados adequados. Nosso mecanismo de cópia atrasada pode levar em consideração todas as informações dos registros de dados de entrada e todo o texto do modelo gerado usando atenção dupla, atenção com reconhecimento de posição e uma perda de classificação aos pares. Os dois modelos nas duas etapas são treinados separadamente. Os resultados da avaliação no conjunto de dados RotoWire verificam a eficácia de nossa abordagem proposta para gerar modelos melhores e copiar registros de dados com mais precisão.', 'es': 'La tarea de generación de datos a texto tiene como objetivo generar textos descriptivos condicionados a una serie de registros de bases de datos, y los modelos neuronales recientes han mostrado avances significativos en esta tarea. Los modelos de codificador-decodificador basados en la atención con mecanismo de copia han logrado resultados de vanguardia en unos pocos conjuntos de datos de datos a texto. Sin embargo, estos modelos todavía se enfrentan al problema de colocar registros de datos incorrectos en los textos generados, especialmente en algunos conjuntos de datos más desafiantes como RotoWire. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque de dos etapas con un mecanismo de copia diferida para mejorar la precisión de los registros de datos en los textos generados. Nuestro enfoque primero adopta un modelo de codificador-decodificador para generar un texto de plantilla con espacios de datos que deben llenarse y luego aprovecha un mecanismo de copia diferida propuesto para llenar los espacios con los registros de datos adecuados. Nuestro mecanismo de copia diferida puede tener en cuenta toda la información de los registros de datos de entrada y el texto completo de la plantilla generado mediante el uso de doble atención, atención consciente de la posición y una pérdida de clasificación por pares. Los dos modelos de las dos etapas se entrenan por separado. Los resultados de la evaluación del conjunto de datos de RotoWire verifican la eficacia de nuestro enfoque propuesto para generar mejores plantillas y copiar registros de datos con mayor precisión.', 'fr': "La tâche de génération de données en texte vise à générer des textes descriptifs conditionnés par un certain nombre d'enregistrements de base de données, et les modèles neuronaux récents ont montré des progrès significatifs dans cette tâche. Les modèles encodeur-décodeur basés sur l'attention avec mécanisme de copie ont permis d'obtenir des résultats de pointe sur quelques ensembles de données de données en texte. Cependant, ces modèles sont toujours confrontés au problème de placer des enregistrements de données incorrects dans les textes générés, en particulier sur certains ensembles de données plus complexes tels que RotoWire. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche en deux étapes avec un mécanisme de copie différée pour améliorer la précision des enregistrements de données dans les textes générés. Notre approche adopte d'abord un modèle encodeur-décodeur pour générer un texte modèle avec des emplacements de données à remplir, puis exploite un mécanisme de copie retardée proposé pour remplir les cases avec des enregistrements de données appropriés. Notre mécanisme de copie différée peut prendre en compte toutes les informations des enregistrements de données d'entrée et le texte complet du modèle généré en utilisant une double attention, une attention consciente de la position et une perte de classement par paire. Les deux modèles des deux étapes sont entraînés séparément. Les résultats de l'évaluation du jeu de données RotoWire confirment l'efficacité de l'approche que nous proposons pour générer de meilleurs modèles et copier les enregistrements de données de manière plus précise.", 'ja': 'データ対テキスト生成のタスクは、いくつかのデータベースレコードに条件付けられた記述的なテキストを生成することを目的としており、最近のニューラルモデルは、このタスクで有意な進歩を示している。 コピーメカニズムを備えた注目度ベースのエンコーダデコーダモデルは、いくつかのデータからテキストへのデータセットで最先端の結果を達成しています。 しかしながら、このようなモデルは、生成されたテキストに誤ったデータレコードを配置する問題に直面しています。特に、RotoWireのようなより難しいデータセットには問題があります。 本稿では、生成されたテキストのデータ記録の精度を向上させるために、遅延コピー機構を備えた2段階のアプローチを提案する。 当社のアプローチは、まずエンコーダデコーダモデルを採用して、埋めるデータスロットを持つテンプレートテキストを生成し、次に提案された遅延コピーメカニズムを活用して、適切なデータレコードでスロットを埋めます。 当社の遅延コピーメカニズムは、二重注目、位置認識注目、ペアランキング損失を使用することにより、入力データレコードのすべての情報と完全に生成されたテンプレートテキストを考慮することができます。 2段階の2つのモデルは別々にトレーニングされます。 RotoWireデータセットの評価結果は、より良いテンプレートを生成し、データレコードをより正確にコピーするための提案されたアプローチの有効性を検証します。', 'zh': '据文本生成之务,以众数据库记录为描述性,近神经形势已见重大进展于此。 复制机者编码器-解码器数集上先进也。 然犹临文置非数,尤于RotoWire等更具挑战性数集上。 本文有延迟复制机制两端,以崇成文数之精。 吾法先用编码器- 解码器形以成数槽之模板,然后因言之迟复制机以充数记之插槽。 我们的延迟复制机制可以双重关注,位位感知关注和成对排名损失来想输入数据记录和完全生成的模板文本的所有信息。 两段两模独练。 RotoWire数集之评验于成模板与更精复制数录之有效性。', 'hi': 'डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट जनरेशन के कार्य का उद्देश्य कई डेटाबेस रिकॉर्ड पर वातानुकूलित वर्णनात्मक ग्रंथों को उत्पन्न करना है, और हाल के तंत्रिका मॉडल ने इस कार्य पर महत्वपूर्ण प्रगति दिखाई है। कॉपी तंत्र के साथ ध्यान आधारित एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल ने कुछ डेटा-टू-टेक्स्ट डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम प्राप्त किए हैं। हालांकि, ऐसे मॉडल अभी भी उत्पन्न ग्रंथों में गलत डेटा रिकॉर्ड डालने की समस्या का सामना करते हैं, विशेष रूप से रोटोवायर जैसे कुछ और चुनौतीपूर्ण डेटासेट पर। इस पेपर में, हम उत्पन्न ग्रंथों में डेटा रिकॉर्ड की सटीकता में सुधार करने के लिए एक विलंबित प्रतिलिपि तंत्र के साथ दो-चरण दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण पहले एक एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल को अपनाता है ताकि डेटा स्लॉट को भरने के लिए एक टेम्पलेट पाठ उत्पन्न किया जा सके और फिर उचित डेटा रिकॉर्ड के साथ स्लॉट को भरने के लिए एक प्रस्तावित विलंबित प्रतिलिपि तंत्र का लाभ उठाया जा सके। हमारी विलंबित प्रतिलिपि तंत्र दोहरे ध्यान, स्थिति-जागरूक ध्यान और एक जोड़ीवार रैंकिंग हानि का उपयोग करके इनपुट डेटा रिकॉर्ड और पूर्ण उत्पन्न टेम्पलेट पाठ की सभी जानकारी को ध्यान में रख सकता है। दो चरणों में दो मॉडलों को अलग-अलग प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है। RotoWire डेटासेट पर मूल्यांकन परिणाम बेहतर टेम्पलेट्स उत्पन्न करने और डेटा रिकॉर्ड को अधिक सटीक रूप से कॉपी करने के लिए हमारे प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावकारिता को सत्यापित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Задача генерации данных в текст направлена на создание описательных текстов, основанных на ряде записей базы данных, и последние нейронные модели показали значительный прогресс в этой задаче. Основанные на внимании модели кодировщик-декодер с механизмом копирования достигли самых современных результатов на нескольких наборах данных в текст. Однако такие модели все еще сталкиваются с проблемой размещения некорректных записей данных в сгенерированных текстах, особенно на некоторых более сложных наборах данных, таких как RotoWire. В этой статье мы предлагаем двухэтапный подход с механизмом отложенного копирования для повышения точности записей данных в сгенерированных текстах. В нашем подходе сначала используется модель кодировщик-декодер для генерации шаблонного текста со слотами данных, которые должны быть заполнены, а затем используется предлагаемый механизм отложенного копирования для заполнения слотов надлежащими записями данных. Наш механизм отложенного копирования может учитывать всю информацию записей входных данных и полностью сгенерированный текст шаблона, используя двойное внимание, внимание с учетом положения и потерю попарного ранжирования. Две модели на двух этапах обучаются отдельно. Результаты оценки в наборе данных RotoWire подтверждают эффективность нашего предлагаемого подхода для более точного создания лучших шаблонов и копирования записей данных.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag an nginiúint sonraí-go-téacs téacsanna tuairisciúla a ghiniúint atá coinníollaithe ar roinnt taifead bunachar sonraí, agus tá dul chun cinn suntasach léirithe ag samhlacha néarúla le déanaí ar an tasc seo. Tá torthaí úrscothacha bainte amach ag samhlacha aird-bhunaithe ionchódóra-díchódóra le meicníocht chóipeála ar chúpla tacar sonraí sonraí go téacs. Mar sin féin, tá fadhb fós ag samhlacha den sórt sin maidir le taifid sonraí míchearta a chur sna téacsanna ginte, go háirithe ar roinnt tacair sonraí níos dúshlánaí mar RotoWire. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige dhá chéim le meicníocht chóipeála mhoillithe chun beachtas na dtaifead sonraí sna téacsanna ginte a fheabhsú. Glacann ár gcur chuige ar dtús samhail ionchódóra-díchódóra chun téacs teimpléad a ghiniúint le sliotáin sonraí le líonadh agus ansin luamhálann sé meicníocht mholta maidir le cóipeáil mhoillithe chun na sliotáin a líonadh le taifid sonraí chearta. Is féidir lenár meicníocht chóipeála mhoillithe faisnéis uile na dtaifead sonraí ionchuir agus an téacs teimpléid iomlán a ghintear a chur san áireamh trí úsáid a bhaint as aird dhúbailte, aird ar an suíomh agus caillteanas rangú péirewise. Déantar oiliúint ar leithligh ar an dá mhúnla sa dá chéim. Deimhníonn torthaí meastóireachta ar thacar sonraí RotoWire éifeachtúlacht ár gcur chuige molta chun teimpléid níos fearr a ghiniúint agus taifid sonraí a chóipeáil ar bhealach níos cruinne.', 'ka': 'მონაცემების შემდეგ ტექსტის მოქმედება მიზეზიან, რომ მონაცემების რაოდენობით მონაცემების მონაცემების შემდეგ მოქმედება და ახალი ნეიროლური მოდელები ამ მოქმედებაში მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემები კოდირების მოდელი, რომელიც კოდირების მექანიზმისთვის გადატანა მონაცემების შედეგი რამდენიმე მონაცემები ტექსტისთვის. მაგრამ ასეთი მოდელები უკვე მუშაობენ პრობლემას, რომ შექმნა ტექსტში შეცდომა მონაცემების შეცდომა, განსაკუთრებით რამდენიმე უფრო შესაძლებელი მონაცემების შე ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ მუშაობით ორ დონტაციის მოხმარება, რომელსაც დასრულებული კომენტაციის მექსინემი, რომ გაუფლებოთ მონაცემების წესების წესების წე ჩვენი პროგორმა პირველი იყენებს შაბლონის ტექსტის შექმნა, რომელიც მონაცემების მხოლოდ დაყენებული მონაცემების მხოლოდ, და შემდეგ იყენებს მონაცემებული კოდირების მექანსი, რომელიც დაყ ჩვენი დასრულებული კოპირაციის მექანსი შეიძლება ყველა ინფორმაცია ჩემი მონაცემების მონაცემების და ყველა შექმნა შაბლონის ტექსტის გამოყენებით ეუბრალო გონისტური,  ორი მოდელეები ორი ფაეში განსხვავებულია. RotoWire მონაცემების შესახებ მონაცემების შესახებ მოწმების ეფექტიურობას დააწყება, რომ უფრო მეტი შაბლონების შექმნა და დააწყება მონაცემების შესახებ.', 'el': 'Το έργο της δημιουργίας δεδομένων-κειμένου στοχεύει στην παραγωγή περιγραφικών κειμένων που βασίζονται σε μια σειρά εγγραφών βάσης δεδομένων, και πρόσφατα νευρωνικά μοντέλα έχουν δείξει σημαντική πρόοδο σε αυτό το έργο. Τα μοντέλα κωδικοποιητών-αποκωδικοποιητών με μηχανισμό αντιγραφής έχουν επιτύχει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε μερικά σύνολα δεδομένων-σε-κείμενο. Ωστόσο, τέτοια μοντέλα εξακολουθούν να αντιμετωπίζουν το πρόβλημα της τοποθέτησης λανθασμένων εγγραφών δεδομένων στα παραγόμενα κείμενα, ειδικά σε μερικά πιο απαιτητικά σύνολα δεδομένων όπως το RotoWire. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση δύο σταδίων με μηχανισμό καθυστερημένης αντιγραφής για τη βελτίωση της ακρίβειας των εγγραφών δεδομένων στα παραγόμενα κείμενα. Η προσέγγισή μας υιοθετεί πρώτα ένα μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για να δημιουργήσει ένα κείμενο προτύπου με αυλακώσεις δεδομένων που πρέπει να συμπληρωθούν και στη συνέχεια χρησιμοποιεί έναν προτεινόμενο μηχανισμό καθυστερημένης αντιγραφής για να γεμίσει τις αυλακώσεις με κατάλληλα αρχεία δεδομένων. Ο μηχανισμός καθυστερημένης αντιγραφής μας μπορεί να λάβει υπόψη όλες τις πληροφορίες των εγγραφών δεδομένων εισαγωγής και το πλήρες κείμενο προτύπου χρησιμοποιώντας διπλή προσοχή, προσοχή με επίγνωση θέσης και απώλεια ζεύγους. Τα δύο μοντέλα στα δύο στάδια εκπαιδεύονται ξεχωριστά. Τα αποτελέσματα αξιολόγησης του συνόλου δεδομένων επιβεβαιώνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισής μας για την παραγωγή καλύτερων προτύπων και την ακριβέστερη αντιγραφή αρχείων δεδομένων.', 'hu': 'Az adatok-szöveg generálásának feladata számos adatbázis rekordon alapuló leíró szöveg létrehozása, és a legújabb neurális modellek jelentős előrelépést mutattak ebben a feladatban. A figyelem alapú kódoló-dekódoló modellek másolási mechanizmussal rendelkeznek, néhány adat-szöveg adatkészleten a legkorszerűbb eredményeket értek el. Azonban az ilyen modellek még mindig azzal a problémával szembesülnek, hogy helytelen adatrögzítéseket helyeznek el a generált szövegekbe, különösen néhány nagyobb kihívást jelentő adatkészleten, mint például a RotoWire. Ebben a tanulmányban egy kétlépcsős megközelítést javasolunk késleltetett másolási mechanizmussal, amely javítja az adatrögzítések pontosságát a generált szövegekben. A megközelítésünk először egy kódoló-dekódoló modellt alkalmaz, hogy sablonszöveget hozzon létre a kitöltendő adatfolyókkal, majd egy javasolt késleltetett másolási mechanizmust használ a helyek megfelelő adatrögzítésekkel történő kitöltéséhez. Késleltetett másolási mechanizmusunk kettős figyelem, pozíciótudatos figyelem és páros rangsorolási veszteség segítségével figyelembe veszi a bemeneti adatok és a teljes létrehozott sablonszöveg összes információját. A két szakaszban lévő két modellt külön-külön képezik. A RotoWire adatkészleten végzett értékelési eredmények igazolják a javasolt megközelítés hatékonyságát a jobb sablonok létrehozására és az adatrögzítések pontosabb másolására.', 'mk': 'Задачата на генерација на податоци во текст има за цел генерање описни тексти условени на број записи на базата на податоци, а неодамнешните нервни модели покажаа значителен напредок во оваа задача. Моделите на кодер-декодер базирани на вниманието со механизам на копија постигнаа најнови резултати на неколку набори податоци од податоци до текст. Сепак, ваквите модели сé уште се соочуваат со проблемот со ставањето неправилни записи на податоци во генерираните тексти, особено на некои потешки податоци како RotoWire. Во овој документ, предложуваме двофазивен пристап со одложен механизам на копија за подобрување на прецизноста на записите на податоци во генерираните тексти. Нашиот пристап прво усвои модел на кодер-декодер за генерирање на текст на шаблонот со датотеки за пополнување и потоа користи предложен механизам за одложена копија за пополнување на датотеките со соодветни датотеки. Нашиот одложен механизам за копија може да ги земе во предвид сите информации од записите на податоците за внесување и целиот генериран текст на шаблонот со користење на двојно внимание, внимание на позицијата и загуба на рангирање во двојка стран Двајцата модели во двете фази се обучени одделно. Резултатите од евалуацијата на податоците RotoWire ја потврдуваат ефикасноста на нашиот предложен пристап за генерирање подобри шаблони и попрецизно копирање на податочните записи.', 'it': "Il compito della generazione data-to-text mira a generare testi descrittivi condizionati da una serie di record di database, e recenti modelli neurali hanno mostrato progressi significativi in questo compito. I modelli encoder-decoder basati sull'attenzione con meccanismo di copia hanno ottenuto risultati all'avanguardia su alcuni set di dati dati-testo. Tuttavia, tali modelli devono ancora affrontare il problema di inserire record di dati errati nei testi generati, soprattutto su alcuni set di dati più impegnativi come RotoWire. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio in due fasi con un meccanismo di copia ritardata per migliorare la precisione dei record di dati nei testi generati. Il nostro approccio adotta dapprima un modello encoder-decoder per generare un testo modello con slot dati da riempire e poi sfrutta un meccanismo di copia ritardata proposto per riempire gli slot con record di dati adeguati. Il nostro meccanismo di copia ritardata può prendere in considerazione tutte le informazioni dei record di dati di input e il testo completo del modello generato utilizzando doppia attenzione, attenzione consapevole della posizione e una perdita di posizionamento a coppie. I due modelli nelle due fasi sono addestrati separatamente. I risultati della valutazione sul set di dati RotoWire verificano l'efficacia del nostro approccio proposto per generare modelli migliori e copiare i record di dati in modo più preciso.", 'lt': 'Duomenų ir tekstų kūrimo užduotis – sukurti aprašomuosius tekstus, grindžiamus daugeliu duomenų bazės įrašų, o naujausi neurologiniai modeliai parodė didelę pažangą šioje užduotyje. Atsižvelgiant į dėmesio kodavimo kodavimo modelius su kopijų mechanizmu pasiekti naujausi rezultatai keliuose duomenų rinkiniuose. Tačiau tokie modeliai vis dar susiduria su klaidingų duomenų įrašų įtraukimu į sukurtus tekstus problema, ypač kai kuriuose sunkesniuose duomenų rinkiniuose, pvz., RotoWire. Šiame dokumente siūlome dviejų etapų metodą su atidėto kopijų mechanizmu, siekiant pagerinti duomenų įrašų tikslumą sukurtuose tekstuose. Mūsų požiūris pirmiausia taikomas kodavimo kodavimo modelis, kuriame būtų sukurtas šablono tekstas, kuriame būtų užpildyti duomenų laiko tarpsniai, o vėliau naudojamas siūlomas atidėtos kopijos mechanizmas, kuriuo laiko tarpsniai būtų užpildyti tinkamais duomenų įrašais. Mūsų vėluojamas kopijų mechanizmas gali atsižvelgti į visą įvestų duomenų įrašų informaciją ir į visą sukauptą šablono tekstą, naudojant dvigubą dėmesį, dėmesį į padėtį ir parių lygių nuostolius. Abu abiejų etapų modeliai rengiami atskirai. RotoWire duomenų rinkinio vertinimo rezultatai tikrina mūsų siūlomo metodo veiksmingumą, kad būtų sukurti geresni šablonai ir tiksliau kopijuoti duomenų įrašus.', 'kk': 'Деректер мен мәтінді құру тапсырмасы бірнеше деректер қорының жазуында сипаттамалы мәтінді құру мақсаты, жуырдағы невралдық моделдері осы тапсырманың маңызды жағдайын көрсетеді. Көшірмелеу механизмі арқылы кодер- декодер үлгілерін негіздеген бірнеше деректер мен мәтін деректер қорларының күй- жай нәтижесін жеткізді. Бірақ бұл үлгілер жасалған мәтіндерде дұрыс деректер жазуының мәселелеріне сәйкес келеді, осымен қатар RotoWire секілді бірнеше шақыру деректер жиындарында. Бұл қағазда, құрылған мәтіндерде деректер жазуының дұрыстығын жақсарту үшін көшірмелеу механизмі артқа екі этап қатынасын ұсындық. Біздің тәсіліміз біріншіден қолданылатын мәтінді толтыру үшін кодер- декодер үлгісін қолданады. Содан кейін слоттарды дұрыс деректер жазуларымен толтыру үшін қолданылатын көшірмелеу механизмін қолданады Біздің көшірмелеу механизміміз келтірілген деректер жазуының барлық мәліметін және толық құрылған үлгі мәтіні қолдануға болады. Екі қадамдағы екі үлгі бөлек оқылған. RotoWire деректер қорларының оқу нәтижесін тексеру үлгілерін жақсы үлгілерді құру және деректер жазуларын дұрыс көшірмелеу үшін қолданылатын тәжірибесін тексеру.', 'mt': 'Il-kompitu tal-ġenerazzjoni tad-dejta mat-test għandu l-għan li jiġġenera testi deskrittivi kkundizzjonati fuq għadd ta’ reġistri tad-database, u mudelli newrali reċenti wrew progress sinifikanti f’dan il-kompitu. The attention based encoder-decoder models with copy mechanism have achieved state-of-the-art results on a few data-to-text datasets.  Madankollu, mudelli bħal dawn għadhom jiffaċċjaw il-problema li jitpoġġew rekords tad-dejta mhux korretti fit-testi ġġenerati, speċjalment fuq xi settijiet ta’ dejta aktar sfidanti bħal RotoWire. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ f’żewġ stadji b’mekkaniżmu ta’ kopja ttardjat biex tittejjeb il-preċiżjoni tar-rekords tad-dejta fit-testi ġġenerati. Our approach first adopts an encoder-decoder model to generate a template text with data slots to be filled and then leverages a proposed delayed copy mechanism to fill in the slots with proper data records.  Il-mekkaniżmu ta’ kopja ttardjata tagħna jista’ jqis l-informazzjoni kollha tar-rekords tad-dejta tad-dħul u t-test tal-mudell iġġenerat sħiħ billi tuża attenzjoni doppja, attenzjoni konxja tal-pożizzjoni u telf ta’ klassifikazzjoni bejn il-pari. Iż-żewġ mudelli fiż-żewġ stadji huma mħarrġa separatament. Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni fuq is-sett tad-dejta RotoWire jivverifikaw l-effikaċja tal-approċċ propost tagħna biex jiġġeneraw mudelli aħjar u jikkopjaw ir-rekords tad-dejta b’mod aktar preċiż.', 'ms': 'Tugas generasi data-ke-teks bertujuan untuk menghasilkan teks deskriptif berkonditioned pada sejumlah rekod pangkalan data, dan model saraf baru-baru ini telah menunjukkan kemajuan yang signifikan pada tugas ini. Model pengekod-dekoder berdasarkan perhatian dengan mekanisme salinan telah mencapai keputusan state-of-the-art pada beberapa set data-to-text. Namun, model tersebut masih menghadapi masalah meletakkan rekod data yang salah dalam teks yang dijana, terutama pada beberapa set data yang lebih mencabar seperti RotoWire. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan dua tahap dengan mekanisme salinan tertunda untuk meningkatkan ketepatan rekod data dalam teks yang dijana. pendekatan kita pertama-tama menerima model pengekod-dekoder untuk menghasilkan teks templat dengan slot data yang akan diisi dan kemudian menggunakan mekanisme salinan tertunda yang diusulkan untuk mengisi slot dengan rekod data yang betul. Mekanisme salinan tertunda kami boleh mempertimbangkan semua maklumat rekod data input dan teks templat yang dijana penuh dengan menggunakan perhatian ganda, perhatian-sedar kedudukan dan kehilangan rangkaian sepasang. Dua model dalam dua tahap dilatih secara terpisah. Keputusan penilaian pada set data RotoWire mengesahkan kegunaan pendekatan yang kami cadangkan untuk menghasilkan templat yang lebih baik dan salin rekod data dengan lebih tepat.', 'ml': 'ഡേറ്റാബേസ് റെക്കോര്\u200dഡില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിശദീകരണ പദാവലികള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അടുത്ത പുതിയ പുതിയ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഈ ജോ പകര്\u200dത്തുവാനുള്ള മെക്കയിനിമയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d കുറച്ച് ഡാറ്റാക്സില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള എങ്കിലും ഇത്തരം മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവർത്തിക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d തെറ്റായ ഡേറ്റാ റെക്കോര്\u200dഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനെ പ്രശ്നമ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജില്\u200d പ്രോഗ്രാന്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നുണ്ട്. ഒരു വൈകിയ പകര്\u200dപ്പ് മെക്കയുമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഡേറ Our approach first adopts an encoder-decoder model to generate a template text with data slots to be filled and then leverages a proposed delayed copy mechanism to fill in the slots with proper data records.  നമ്മുടെ വൈകിയ പകര്\u200dപ്പ് സാധ്യതയ്ക്ക് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ഡേറ്റ റ റെക്കോര്\u200dഡുകളുടെയും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വാചകങ്ങളുടെയും വിവരങ്ങളും രണ്ട് ശ്രദ്ധ, സ്ഥാന രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേജിലെ രണ്ട് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകം പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. റോട്ടോവൈര്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നിന്നും മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുവാനും ഡേറ്റാ രേഖകള്\u200d പകര്\u200dത്തുക', 'no': 'Oppgåva for data- to- text- generering måtar å laga beskrivelige tekstar som er conditionert på mange databaseoppføringar, og nyleg neuralmodeller har vist betydelig framgang i denne oppgåva. Den oppmerksomhetsbaserte koderingsmodellen med kopimekanismen har oppnådd tilstanden av kunsten på nokre datasett til tekst. Desse modelane har imidlertid framleis problemet med å leggja feil dataopptak i dei genererte tekstane, spesielt på noen meir vanskelege datasett som RotoWire. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein to-stadstilnærming med ein forsinkla kopimekanisme for å forbedra presisjonen av dataopptak i dei genererte tekstane. Tilnærminga vårt først adopterer ein koderingsmodell for å laga ein mal-tekst med dataplassar som skal fyllast, og så leverer ein foreslått delagt kopimekanisme for å fylla inn plassen med rette dataopptak. Vårt forsinkla kopimekanisme kan ta opp alle informasjonen om inndata- oppføringane og den fulle laga malen ved å bruka dobbelt oppmerksomhet, oppmerksomhet på posisjonen og tap på ein par rekningar. Dei to modelane i dei to stadene er trengd separat. Evalueringsresultat på RotoWire-datasettet er sjekka på effekten av vår foreslått tilnærming for å laga betre mal og kopiera dataopptak meir nøyaktig.', 'pl': 'Zadaniem generowania danych do tekstu jest generowanie tekstów opisowych uwarunkowanych szeregiem rekordów bazy danych, a ostatnie modele neuronowe wykazały znaczący postęp w tym zadaniu. Modele koderów-dekoderów oparte na uwadze z mechanizmem kopiowania osiągnęły najnowocześniejsze wyniki na kilku zbiorach danych danych o charakterze tekstowym. Jednak takie modele nadal borykają się z problemem umieszczania nieprawidłowych rekordów danych w generowanych tekstach, zwłaszcza w niektórych bardziej trudnych zbiorach danych, takich jak RotoWire. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy dwuetapowe podejście z mechanizmem opóźnionego kopiowania w celu poprawy precyzji zapisów danych w generowanych tekstach. Nasze podejście najpierw przyjmuje model kodera-dekodera do generowania szablonu tekstu z gniazdami danych, które mają być wypełnione, a następnie wykorzystuje proponowany mechanizm opóźnionego kopiowania, aby wypełnić gniazda odpowiednimi rekordami danych. Nasz mechanizm opóźnionego kopiowania może uwzględnić wszystkie informacje z rekordów danych wejściowych i pełny wygenerowany tekst szablonu, korzystając z podwójnej uwagi, uwagi świadomej pozycji i straty rankingu w parze. Dwa modele w dwóch etapach są trenowane oddzielnie. Wyniki oceny zbioru danych RotoWire potwierdzają skuteczność proponowanego podejścia do generowania lepszych szablonów i precyzyjniejszego kopiowania zapisów danych.', 'mn': 'Data-to-text generation-ийн даалгавар нь өгөгдлийн сангийн зарчим бичил дээр тодорхойлолтой текст бий болгох зорилго юм. Саяхан мэдрэлийн загварууд энэ даалгаварт маш чухал хөгжлийг харуулсан. Кодлогчийн механизмтай анхаарлын үндсэн кодлогчийн загвар нь хэд хэдэн өгөгдлийн болон текст өгөгдлийн хэмжээсүүд дээр гарч ирсэн. Гэвч ийм загварууд үүсгэсэн текстүүдэд буруу өгөгдлийн бичлэг хийх асуудалтай байдаг. Ялангуяа RotoWire шиг хэцүү хэцүү өгөгдлийн санд. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хоёр дахь арга замыг бий болгох өгөгдлийн бичлэгийн тодорхойлолтыг сайжруулахын тулд хоёр дахь дахь хувилбарын механизмтэй санал болгож байна. Эхлээд бидний арга нь коддогч-декодер загварын загварыг дүүргэх өгөгдлийн слотуудыг бүтээх үед шалгалтын текст ашиглаж, дараа нь зөв өгөгдлийн бичлэгээр дүүргэх арга загварын хурдан хураагдах механизмийг аш Бидний хурдан хуулбарлах механизм нь өгөгдлийн өгөгдлийн бичлэгийн бүх мэдээллийг, бүрэн бий болгосон үлгэр бичлэгийг хоёр дахин анхаарал, нөхцөл байдлын анхаарал, хоёр дахин цэглэх алдаа ашигла Хоёр дахь загваруудын хоёр загвар тус тус тус тус тусгаарлагддаг. RotoWire өгөгдлийн сангийн үндсэн үр дүн нь бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга баримтын үр дүнг илүү сайн шагналыг бүтээж, өгөгдлийн бичлэгийг илүү тодорхой хуулбарлах боломжтой.', 'ro': 'Sarcina generării de date-la-text își propune să genereze texte descriptive condiționate de un număr de înregistrări de baze de date, iar modelele neurale recente au arătat progrese semnificative în această sarcină. Modelele encoder-decoder bazate pe atenție cu mecanism de copiere au obținut rezultate de ultimă oră pe câteva seturi de date date date-text. Cu toate acestea, astfel de modele se confruntă încă cu problema de a pune înregistrări incorecte de date în textele generate, în special pe unele seturi de date mai dificile, cum ar fi RotoWire. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare în două etape cu un mecanism de copiere întârziată pentru a îmbunătăți precizia înregistrărilor de date în textele generate. Abordarea noastră adoptă mai întâi un model codificator-decodor pentru a genera un text șablon cu sloturi de date care urmează să fie umplute și apoi utilizează un mecanism propus de copiere întârziată pentru a umple sloturile cu înregistrări de date corespunzătoare. Mecanismul nostru de copiere întârziată poate lua în considerare toate informațiile înregistrărilor de date de intrare și textul complet generat de șablon utilizând dublă atenție, atenție conștientă de poziție și o pierdere de clasament pereche. Cele două modele din cele două etape sunt instruite separat. Rezultatele evaluării setului de date RotoWire verifică eficacitatea abordării propuse de noi pentru generarea de șabloane mai bune și copierea înregistrărilor de date mai precis.', 'si': 'Data- to- text නිර්මාණයේ කාර්ය හදන්නේ විස්තර පාළුවක් සංඛ්\u200dයාවක් තියෙන්න, සහ අලුත් නිර්මාණ ප්\u200dරවෘතියක් මේ වැඩේ විසිද්ධ Name නමුත්, මේ මොඩල් තාමත් අවුලක් තියෙන්නේ නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ අවුලක් තොරතුරු රොටෝවායිර් වගේ විශේෂයෙන් විශ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ පරක්කු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ තොරතුරු වාර්තාවේ ලිපිත අපේ පළමු විදියට සංකේතකය- ඩිකෝඩර් මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා පරිපූර්ණ දත්ත ස්ථානය සඳහා තේරුම් පාළුවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඊට අපේ පරක්කු ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පරික්ෂණය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විසින් ඇතුළත් තොරතුරු සහ සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dර මොඩේල් දෙකක් තියෙන්නේ මොඩේල් දෙකක් වෙනුවෙන් පුහුණුවන්. රෝටෝවායිර් දත්ත සැටේ විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප', 'sv': 'Uppgiften med data-to-text generering syftar till att generera beskrivande texter som är beroende av ett antal databasposter, och de senaste neurala modellerna har visat betydande framsteg på denna uppgift. De uppmärksamhetsbaserade encoder-avkodarmodellerna med kopieringsmekanism har uppnått toppmoderna resultat på ett fåtal data-to-text datauppsättningar. Sådana modeller står dock fortfarande inför problemet med att sätta felaktiga dataposter i de genererade texterna, särskilt på vissa mer utmanande datauppsättningar som RotoWire. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett tvåstegs tillvägagångssätt med en fördröjd kopieringsmekanism för att förbättra precisionen i dataposter i de genererade texterna. Vårt tillvägagångssätt antar först en encoder-avkodarmodell för att generera en malltext med dataplatser som ska fyllas och utnyttjar sedan en föreslagen fördröjd kopieringsmekanism för att fylla i platserna med rätt dataposter. Vår mekanism för fördröjd kopiering kan ta hänsyn till all information i inmatningsdataposterna och den fullständiga genererade malltexten genom att använda dubbel uppmärksamhet, positionsmedveten uppmärksamhet och en parvis rankningsförlust. De två modellerna i de två stegen tränas separat. Utvärderingsresultaten på RotoWire-datauppsättningen bekräftar effektiviteten av vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt för att generera bättre mallar och kopiera dataposter mer exakt.', 'sr': 'Zadatak generacije podataka do teksta je cilj da stvori opisivne tekste pod uslovom broja podataka, a nedavni neuronski modeli pokazuju značajan napredak na ovom zadatku. Pažnja bazirana na modelima kodera-dekodera sa kopijskim mehanizam postigla je rezultate umetnosti na nekoliko podataka na tekst. Međutim, takvi modeli se i dalje suočavaju sa problemom stavljanja nepravednih podataka u proizvedene tekstove, posebno na neke više izazovnih podataka poput RotoWire. U ovom papiru predlažemo dvofazni pristup sa odgođenim mehanizam kopije kako bi poboljšali preciznost podataka u proizvedenim tekstima. Naš pristup je prvi put usvojio model kodera-dekodera kako bi stvorio tekst šablona sa slovima podataka koji će biti napunjen, a zatim se uključuje predloženi mehanizam odgođenog kopiranja da bi napunili slojeve odgovarajućim podacima. Naš odgođeni kopijski mehanizam može uzeti u obzir sve informacije o podacima o ulaznim podacima i potpunom proizvedenom tekstu šablona koristeći dvostruku pažnju, pozornu pažnju na poziciju i gubitku reda na parovima. Dva modela su trenirana odvojeno. Rezultati procjene na setu podataka RotoWire potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa za stvaranje boljih šablona i kopiranje podataka tačnije.', 'so': 'Shaqo ku saabsan qarniga macluumaadka-iyo-saxanka waxaa loola jeedaa inuu sameeyo qoraal-qoraal ah oo lagu sharrajiyey qoraal-qoraal ah oo ku qoran qoraal badan oo diiwaanka ah, waxaana la muujiyey qaababka neurada ee ugu dambeeyey horumar muhiim ah oo ku saabsan shaqadan. Isticmaalka codcodcoder-coder-based mechanisyo copy-mechanism waxay gaadhay xaalad-art resultariyo ku saabsan dhawr data-to-text-sets. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, tusaalooyinkaas ayaa weli dhibaatada la xiriira la dhigo diiwaanka macluumaadka saxda ah oo ku qoran qoraalka la soo dhashay, khusuusan qaar ka mid ah sameynta macluumaadka dhibaatada badan sida RotoWire. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaabab labaad ah oo ay leedahay mekaniisa koopiga dib u dhigista si ay u kordhiso saxda diiwaanka taariikhda ee qoraalka la soo saaray. Dhaqdhaheenna marka ugu horeysa wuxuu qaadaa model codcoder ah in uu sameeyo qoraal macluumaad ay ku buuxsanto laamaha macluumaadka, markaasna uu soo diraa meymisyo qoraal ah oo loo soo jeeday in lagu buuxiyo saxda taariikhda. Maamulkaneeyadayada koopiga dib u dambeeyey waxay qaadan karaan macluumaadka taariikhda laguugu qorayo oo dhan iyo taariikhda dhaqdhaqaaqa ee buuxa, si labanlaab loo eego, boos-digtoonaan iyo khasaaro labaad ah. The two models in the two stages are trained separately.  Qiimeynta dhamaadka ka soo saaran taariikhda RotoWire waxay xaqiijinaysaa saameynta qaababka lagu talo galay inuu sameeyo macluumaad ka wanaagsan iyo koobiyo diiwaanka macluumaadka.', 'ur': "Data-to-text generation's task aims to generate descriptive texts conditioned on a number of database records, and recent neural models have shown significant progress on this task. کاپی مکانیسم کے ساتھ کوڈر ڈیکوڈر ڈیکوڈر مدل کی توجه کے ذریعہ ایک کم ڈیٹ سے ٹیکسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ پر موجود ہے. However, such models still face the problem of putting incorrect data records in the generated texts, especially on some more challenging datasets like RotoWire. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک دومرحلہ طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ایک دیر کی کاپی مکانیزمن کے ساتھ ڈیٹ ریکورڈوں کی دقیق ترجیح کے لئے پیدا کئے جاتے ہیں۔ ہماری تقریبا پہلے ایک کوڈر ڈیکوڈر موڈل کو قبول کرتا ہے تاکہ ایک ٹیپلٹ ٹیپلٹ ٹیپلٹ کے ساتھ بھری ہوئی ڈیٹ اسلوٹوں سے پیدا کرے اور پھر ایک پیشنهاد دیر کپی مکانیزمن کو مطابق ڈیٹ ریکورڈوں سے بھر سکے۔ ہماری دیر کی کاپی مکانیزین تمام اطلاعات کو اپنا ذریعہ لیتا ہے انپیٹ ڈیٹ ریکورڈ اور تمام پیدا کئے ہوئے ٹیپلٹ ٹیکسٹ ٹیکسٹ کے ذریعہ دو دفعہ توجه کے ذریعہ، موقعہ سے خبردار اور ایک جو دو مرحلے میں دو مدل مختلف تعلیم کی جاتی ہیں۔ روٹوویرل ڈیٹ سٹ کے ارزش نتائج کی تصدیق کرتی ہیں کہ ہمارے پیشنهاد کی تقریبا کی عملکرد بہترین ٹیپلٹ پیدا کرے اور ڈیٹ ریکورڈ کو زیادہ دقیق کر سکے۔", 'ta': 'தரவு உரை உருவாக்கத்தின் செயல் பல தரவுத்தளத்தின் பதிவுகளில் நிரந்தரமான உரையை உருவாக்க வேண்டும், மற்றும் சமீபத்திய புதிய மாதிரிகள் இந்த பணியில நகல் முறைமையுடன் அடிப்படையிலான குறியீட்டாளர் மாதிரிகள் சில தரவு- to- text தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் முடிவுகளை பெற்றுவிட்டது. ஆனால், இத்தகைய மாதிரிகள் இன்னும் பிரச்சனையில் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உரைகளில் தவறான தரவு பதிவுகளை வைத்துக் கொள்ளும், குறிப்பாக சி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தாமதமாக்கப்பட்ட உரைகளில் உள்ள தகவல் பதிவுகளின் துல்லியமைப்பை மேம்படுத்த ஒரு இரண்டு நிலையில் முறையை நிற நம் முதலில் ஒரு குறியீட்டாக்கி மாதிரி உரையை உருவாக்குவதற்கு தகவல் செருகுகள் நிரப்பப்பட வேண்டிய உரையை உருவாக்கும் பிறகு தாமதமாக்கப்பட்ட நகல் முற நம்முடைய தாமதமான நகல் முறைமை இரண்டு மாதிரிகள் தனியாக பயிற்சி செய்யப்படுகின்றன. சுழற்சி தகவல் அமைப்பில் சிறந்த வார்ப்புருவை உருவாக்க மற்றும் தரவு பதிவுகளை மேலும் சரிபார்க்கவும்.', 'uz': "Name Name Lekin, bu modellar roʻyxatdan yaratilgan matnlarda notoʻgʻri maʼlumot yozuvlarini qoʻyish muammolasiga ko'rib turadi, hususan RotoWire kabi bir necha qisqarli maʼlumotlar tarkibida. Bu qogʻozda, biz yaratilgan matnlarning ma'lumot yozuvlarini oshirish uchun tezlashtirilgan ikki darajada nusxa mechanismni o'zgartirish imkoniyatlarini bajarishimizni anglatamiz. Bizning birinchi usuli koddekoder modelini ishga tushirish uchun maʼlumot slotlarini to ʻldirish uchun namunani yaratish va keyin ishlatiladigan taʼminlovchi nusxa mechaniyatlarni toʻldirish uchun tezlashtirish. Kechirilgan nusxa mekanizning hamma ma maʼlumotlarni hisoblash mumkin. Ikkita paydo qo'llash, joylashtirish va ikkita chegara qo'shish yoʻqoladi. Ikki darajadagi ikkita modellar alohida o'rganadi. Name", 'vi': 'Nhiệm vụ sản xuất dữ liệu qua văn bản nhằm tạo ra các văn bản mô tả, dựa trên một số dữ liệu, và các mô hình thần kinh gần đây đã cho thấy tiến triển đáng kể trong nhiệm vụ này. Các mô hình mã hóa tập trung dựa trên cơ chế bắt chước đã đạt được kết quả hiện đại trên một số bộ dữ liệu. Tuy nhiên, những mô- đun như vậy vẫn gặp vấn đề khi lưu các dữ liệu sai trong các văn bản đã tạo ra, đặc biệt là những tập tin đầy thử thách như RoteoWire. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp hai giai đoạn với một cơ chế sao chép chậm để cải thiện độ chính xác của các dữ liệu trong các văn bản đã tạo ra. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta trước tiên là một mô hình mã hóa để tạo một văn bản mẫu với các khe số dữ liệu cần điền vào và sau đó dùng một cơ chế bản sao trễ đề xuất để điền vào các khe hở bằng các dữ liệu thích hợp. Sự chậm trễ của chúng ta có thể nắm giữ tất cả thông tin về dữ liệu nhập và văn bản mẫu được tạo ra đầy đủ bằng cách dùng hai sự chú ý, chú ý vị trí và một sự giảm vị trí kép. Hai mẫu trong hai giai đoạn được đào tạo riêng. Kết quả đánh giá trên tập tin RoteoWire chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp yêu cầu để tạo mẫu tốt hơn và ghi chép dữ liệu chi tiết hơn.', 'bg': 'Задачата за генериране на данни към текст има за цел да генерира описателни текстове, обусловени на редица записи от бази данни, а последните невронни модели показват значителен напредък по тази задача. Моделите, базирани на вниманието кодер-декодер с копиращ механизъм, са постигнали най-съвременни резултати върху няколко набора данни от данни към текст. Въпреки това, такива модели все още са изправени пред проблема с поставянето на неправилни записи от данни в генерираните текстове, особено на някои по-предизвикателни набори от данни като РотоУайър. В настоящата статия предлагаме двуетапен подход с механизъм за забавено копиране за подобряване точността на записите на данни в генерираните текстове. Нашият подход първо приема модел на кодер-декодер, за да генерира шаблон текст с слотове за данни, които да бъдат запълнени, а след това използва предложен механизъм за забавено копиране, за да попълни слотовете с подходящи записи за данни. Нашият механизъм за забавено копиране може да вземе предвид цялата информация от записите на входните данни и пълния генериран текст на шаблона, като използва двойно внимание, внимание с отчитане на позицията и загуба на класиране по двойки. Двата модела в двата етапа се обучават отделно. Резултатите от оценката на набора от данни потвърждават ефективността на предлагания от нас подход за генериране на по-добри шаблони и копиране на записи от данни по-точно.', 'da': 'Opgaven med data-til-tekst generering sigter mod at generere beskrivende tekster betinget af en række databaseposter, og nyere neurale modeller har vist betydelige fremskridt med denne opgave. De opmærksomhedsbaserede encoder-dekoder modeller med kopieringsmekanisme har opnået state-of-the-art resultater på nogle få data-to-tekst datasæt. Men sådanne modeller står stadig over for problemet med at sætte forkerte dataposter i de genererede tekster, især på nogle mere udfordrende datasæt som RotoWire. I denne artikel foreslår vi en to-trins tilgang med en forsinket kopieringsmekanisme for at forbedre præcisionen af dataposter i de genererede tekster. Vores tilgang vedtager først en encoder-dekoder model til at generere en skabelon tekst med dataslots, der skal udfyldes og derefter udnytter en foreslået forsinket kopimekanisme til at udfylde slots med korrekte dataposter. Vores forsinkede kopieringsmekanisme kan tage højde for alle oplysninger om input dataposter og den fulde genererede skabelonstekst ved hjælp af dobbelt opmærksomhed, positionsbevidst opmærksomhed og et par placeringstab. De to modeller i de to faser trænes separat. Evalueringsresultaterne på RotoWire datasættet bekræfter effektiviteten af vores foreslåede tilgang til at generere bedre skabeloner og kopiere dataposter mere præcist.', 'nl': 'De taak van data-to-text generatie is om beschrijvende teksten te genereren gebaseerd op een aantal database records, en recente neurale modellen hebben aanzienlijke vooruitgang op deze taak laten zien. De aandachtsgebonden encoder-decoder modellen met kopieermechanisme hebben state-of-the-art resultaten behaald op enkele data-to-text datasets. Dergelijke modellen worden echter nog steeds geconfronteerd met het probleem van het plaatsen van onjuiste gegevensrecords in de gegenereerde teksten, vooral op sommige meer uitdagende datasets zoals RotoWire. In dit artikel stellen we een tweefasige aanpak voor met een vertraagd kopieermechanisme om de nauwkeurigheid van gegevensrecords in de gegenereerde teksten te verbeteren. Onze aanpak hanteert eerst een encoder-decoder model om een sjabloontekst te genereren met te vullen dataslots en maakt vervolgens gebruik van een voorgesteld mechanisme voor vertraagd kopiëren om de slots met de juiste gegevensrecords in te vullen. Ons vertraagde kopieermechanisme kan rekening houden met alle informatie van de invoergegevensrecords en de volledig gegenereerde template tekst door gebruik te maken van dubbele aandacht, positiebewuste aandacht en een pairwise ranking verlies. De twee modellen in de twee fasen worden apart getraind. Evaluatieresultaten op de RotoWire dataset bevestigen de effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde aanpak om betere sjablonen te genereren en datarecords nauwkeuriger te kopiëren.', 'de': 'Die Aufgabe der Daten-zu-Text-Generierung zielt darauf ab, deskriptive Texte zu generieren, die auf einer Reihe von Datenbankdatensätzen basieren, und neuere neuronale Modelle haben bei dieser Aufgabe erhebliche Fortschritte gezeigt. Die aufmerksamkeitsbasierten Encoder-Decoder-Modelle mit Kopiermechanismus haben auf wenigen Daten-zu-Text-Datensätzen modernste Ergebnisse erzielt. Allerdings stehen solche Modelle immer noch vor dem Problem, falsche Datensätze in den generierten Texten zu platzieren, insbesondere auf einigen anspruchsvolleren Datensätzen wie RotoWire. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen zweistufigen Ansatz mit einem verzögerten Kopiermechanismus vor, um die Genauigkeit der Datensätze in den generierten Texten zu verbessern. Unser Ansatz verwendet zunächst ein Encoder-Decoder-Modell, um einen Vorlagentext mit zu füllenden Datensätzen zu generieren, und nutzt dann einen vorgeschlagenen verzögerten Kopiermechanismus, um die Slots mit richtigen Datensätzen zu füllen. Unser verzögerter Kopiermechanismus kann alle Informationen der Eingabedatensätze und den vollständig generierten Vorlagentext berücksichtigen, indem er doppelte Aufmerksamkeit, positionsbewusste Aufmerksamkeit und einen paarweisen Rankingverlust verwendet. Die beiden Modelle in den beiden Stufen werden separat trainiert. Auswertungsergebnisse auf dem RotoWire Datensatz bestätigen die Wirksamkeit unseres vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes, bessere Vorlagen zu generieren und Datensätze genauer zu kopieren.', 'hr': 'Zadatak generacije podataka do teksta cilj je proizvesti opisivne tekste pod uslovom broja podataka podataka, a nedavni neuronski modeli pokazali su značajan napredak na tom zadatku. Pažnja bazirana na modelima kodera-dekodera s kopijskim mehanizam ostvarila je rezultate stanja umjetnosti na nekoliko podataka na tekst. Međutim, takvi modeli se i dalje suočavaju s problemom stavljanja nepravednih podataka u proizvedene tekstove, posebno na neke više izazovnih podataka poput RotoWire. U ovom papiru predlažemo dva stupnja pristup s odgođenim mehanizam kopije kako bi poboljšali preciznost podataka u proizvedenim tekstima. Naš pristup je prvi put usvojio model kodera za dekoder kako bi stvorio tekst šablona punim mjestima podataka i potom iskoristio predloženi mehanizam za odgođene kopije kako bi napunili slojeve odgovarajućim podacima. Naš odgođeni kopijski mehanizam može uzeti u obzir sve informacije o podacima o ulaznim podacima i potpunom proizvedenom tekstu šablona koristeći dvostruku pažnju, pozornu pažnju na poziciju i gubitku reda na parima. Dva modela su trenirana odvojeno. Rezultati procjene na setu podataka RotoWire potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa za stvaranje boljih šablona i kopiranje podataka preciznije.', 'id': 'Tugas dari generasi data-ke-teks bermaksud untuk menghasilkan teks deskriptif tergantung pada sejumlah catatan pangkalan data, dan model saraf baru-baru ini telah menunjukkan kemajuan yang signifikan dalam tugas ini. Model decoder-decoder berdasarkan perhatian dengan mekanisme salinan telah mencapai hasil state-of-the-art pada beberapa set data-to-text. Namun, model tersebut masih menghadapi masalah menempatkan catatan data yang salah dalam teks yang dihasilkan, terutama pada beberapa set data yang lebih menantang seperti RotoWire. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan dua tahap dengan mekanisme salinan tertunda untuk meningkatkan presisi catatan data dalam teks yang dihasilkan. pendekatan kita pertama-tama mengadopsi model pengekoder-dekoder untuk menghasilkan teks templat dengan slot data yang harus dipenuhi dan kemudian menggunakan mekanisme salinan terlambat yang diusulkan untuk mengisi slot dengan catatan data yang tepat. Mekanisme salinan tertunda kita dapat mempertimbangkan semua informasi dari catatan data masukan dan teks templat penuh yang dihasilkan dengan menggunakan perhatian ganda, perhatian posisi-sadar dan kehilangan rangkaian sepasang. Dua model dalam dua tahap dilatih secara terpisah. Hasil evaluasi pada set data RotoWire memverifikasi efektivitas pendekatan kami yang diusulkan untuk menghasilkan templat yang lebih baik dan salin catatan data dengan lebih tepat.', 'ko': '데이터가 텍스트로 생성되는 작업은 대량의 데이터베이스 기록을 조건으로 하는 묘사적인 텍스트를 생성하는 데 목적을 두고 있으며 최근의 신경모델은 이 방면에서 중대한 진전을 거두었다.주의를 바탕으로 하는 디코더 모델은 복제 메커니즘을 채택하여 일부 데이터가 텍스트의 데이터 집합에서 최신 성과를 얻었다.그러나 이런 모델은 생성된 텍스트에 잘못된 데이터 기록을 넣는 문제, 특히 로토와이어 등 더욱 도전적인 데이터 집합에 직면해 있다.본고에서 우리는 지연 복제 메커니즘을 가진 2단계 방법을 제시하여 텍스트에서 데이터 기록을 생성하는 정밀도를 향상시켰다.우리의 방법은 우선 인코더-디코더 모델을 이용하여 채워야 할 데이터 슬롯을 포함하는 템플릿 텍스트를 생성한 다음에 제시된 지연 복제 메커니즘을 이용하여 적당한 데이터 기록을 가진 슬롯을 채워야 한다.우리의 지연 복제 메커니즘은 이중 주의, 위치 감지 주의와 짝짓기 순위 손실을 사용함으로써 데이터 기록과 완전하게 생성된 템플릿 텍스트의 모든 정보를 입력할 수 있다.이 두 단계 중의 두 모델은 각각 훈련을 진행한다.RotoWire 데이터 세트의 평가 결과는 더 나은 템플릿을 생성하고 데이터 로깅을 보다 정확하게 복제하는 방법의 유효성을 검증했습니다.', 'sw': 'The task of data-to-text generation aims to generate descriptive texts conditioned on a number of database records, and recent neural models have shown significant progress on this task.  Mfano wa kodi-decodir wenye mfumo wa nakala umefanikiwa matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwenye seti chache za taarifa za maandishi. Hata hivyo, mifano hiyo bado inakabiliwa na tatizo la kuweka kumbukumbu zisizo sahihi katika maandishi yaliyozaliwa, hususani kwenye seti za taarifa za changamoto kama RotoWire. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya hatua mbili yenye mfumo wa nakala wa muda mrefu wa kuboresha ukweli wa rekodi za taarifa katika ujumbe uliotengenezwa. Mfumo wetu wa kwanza unachukua muundo wa kuweka kodi kwa ajili ya kutengeneza ujumbe wa maandishi yenye viwanja vya taarifa vinavyojazwa na kisha kutumia mfumo unaopendekezwa kuchelewa ili kuzijaza rekodi sahihi za takwimu. Mfumo wetu wa ucheleweshaji wa nakala unaweza kuzingatia taarifa zote za rekodi za taarifa za input na ujumbe kamili wa maandishi ya namba kwa kutumia hisia za mara mbili, uelewa wa nafasi na hasara ya viwili. Mifano miwili katika hatua hizi mbili hufundishwa kwa upande mmoja. Matokeo ya uthibitisho kwenye seti ya taarifa za RotoWire yanathibitisha ufanisi wa hatua yetu ya pendekezo za kutengeneza namba bora na kuandika kumbukumbu za takwimu zaidi kwa sahihi.', 'fa': 'وظیفه نسل داده\u200cها و متن را هدف می\u200cدهد که متن توصیف\u200cکننده را در تعداد ثبت داده\u200cهای داده\u200cهای داده\u200cها تولید کند، و مدل\u200cهای عصبی اخیر پیشرفت بزرگی در این وظیفه را نشان داده\u200cاند. مدل\u200cهای رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزگذاری\u200cکننده\u200cی توجه با مکانیسم کپی به نتیجه\u200cهای حالت هنری روی چند مجموعه داده\u200cهای متن رسیده\u200cاند. ولی این مدلها هنوز با مشکل قرار دادن ثبت داده\u200cهای اشتباهی در متن\u200cهای پیدا شده، مخصوصاً بر برخی از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای سخت\u200cتر مانند RotoWire روبرو می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش دو مرحله پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم با یک مکانیسم کپی دیر شده تا دقیق ثبت داده\u200cها را در متن\u200cهای تولید کنیم. اولین دستور ما یک مدل رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده را برای تولید یک متن رمز را با محل\u200cهای داده\u200cای که پر می\u200cشود پذیرفته می\u200cشود و سپس یک مکانیسم\u200cهای رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cای پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد تا با ثبت داده\u200cهای مناسب پر کنند در محل\u200cها. مکانیسم کپی تاخیر ما می\u200cتواند تمام اطلاعات داده\u200cهای ورودی و متن الگوی کامل تولید شده را با استفاده از توجه دو برابر، توجه به موقعیت و خسارت رشته\u200cهای جفت به حساب بگیرد. دو مدل در دو مرحله جدا آموزش داده می شوند. نتایج ارزیابی روی مجموعه داده های RotoWire موثرت دستور پیشنهاد ما را برای تولید قالبهای بهتر و نسخه ثبت داده\u200cها دقیقاًتر تصدیق می\u200cکند.', 'am': "የዳታ-ወደ-ጽሑፍ ትውልድ ማድረግ የሥርዓት ጽሑፎችን በቁጥር ዳታቤስ ሳጥን ማድረግ ይችላል፤ እናም የቀድሞው የውይይት ዓይነቶች በዚህ ስራ ላይ ትልቅ ግንኙነት ያሳያል፡፡ የድምፅ አካባቢ አካባቢ የሆኑት የድምፅ አካባቢ ዓይነቶች በጥቂት የዳታ-ወደ-ጽሑፍ ዳታተሮች የሥርዓት-art ፍሬዎችን አግኝተዋል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን እንደዚህ ዓይነት ሞዴል ግን በተፈጠሩ ጽሑፎች ውስጥ የተሳሳተ የዳታ ዘርጊዎችን ለማስቀመጥ ጉዳት ነው፤ ይልቁንም እንደሮትWire በሚመስል በብዙ አዋቂዎች ዳታዎችን በመስጠት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተዘገየው ጽሑፎች ውስጥ የዳታ records ማስታወቂያውን ለማሻል የሁለት ደረጃዎች የቆይቷል፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ ምሳሌ መፍጠር የዳታ ደረጃዎችን ለመሙላት መክፈቻን ለመፍጠር ይችላል፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ በተዘገየ ቅጂ አካል ማሰናጃዎችን በመጠቀም በሚያስፈልጉት የዳታ መክፈቻዎችን ለመሙላት ይዘረጋል፡፡ የዘገየ ቅጂ አካሄዳችን የጥያቄ መረጃዎችን ሁሉ እና የፍጹም የአካባቢው ጽሑፍ በሁለት ጥያቄ ተጠቃሚ፣ የስፍራው ማስታወቂያ እና ሁለት እየሆኑ ክፍል ክፍል በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ The two models in the two stages are trained separately.  ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'tr': 'Data-to-text döredilişiniň görevi bu zadyň üstünde näçe databank hatlarynda tassyklanan metinleri döretmek üçin amaçlandy. Name Ýöne bu nusgalar ýene-de ýalňyş maglumaty ýazylýan metinlerde ýazmakda mesele çykýar. Özellikde RotoWire ýaly gaty kynçylykly maglumaty düzenlemekde mesele çykýar Bu kagyzda, üretilen metinlerde data kayıtlaryň dogrylygyny geliştirmek üçin gecikmiş bir kopya mekanizması bilen iki stadij yaklaşmasyny teklif ediyoruz. Biziň ýaryşymyz ilkinji gezek bir ködleme kodçysy modelini doldurmak üçin bir şaablon metini döretýär we soňra ýerlerde dogry maglumat kaydedikleri bilen doldurmak üçin täblisaň geçmäge rugsat meýdançasyny çykar. Biziň geçen nusgasymyz gaýd edilen nusgasyny girdi ýazgaýynyň hemme maglumatyny we doly döredilen täblisaň habarlaryny alap biler. Iki taýýardaki iki nusga ayrı-ayrı eğitilýär. RotoWire veri setiniň çykyşlarynyň netijesi biziň teklip eden çykyşymyzyň has gowy nusgalary döretmek üçin janlaşdyrylşygyny barlaýar we munyň hatlarynyň düzgün derejesini nusgala.', 'af': "Die taak van data- to- text generasie is doel om beskrywende teks te genereer wat op 'n aantal databasis opneem is, en onlangse neurale modele het betekende vordering op hierdie taak vertoon. Name Alhoewel, sodanige modele is nog steeds aangesig met die probleem van die laai van verkeerde data opneem in die genereerde teks, spesiaal op sommige meer opgelykende datastelle soos RotoWire. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n twee-stadige toegang met 'n verwagte kopie mekanisme om die presisie van data opneem in die genereerde teks te verbeter. Ons toegang eerste aanvaar 'n enkoder- dekoder model om 'n sjabloon teks te genereer met data slots na wees gevul en dan leverer 'n voorgestelde verlate kopie mekanisme om in die slots te vul met regte data opneem. Ons verwagte kopie mekanisme kan neem in rekening al die inligting van die invoer data opneem en die volle genereerde sjabloon teks deur dubbel aandag te gebruik, posisie- bewyser aandag en 'n paar wyse ranking verlies. Die twee modele in die twee stadige is onderwerp aparte. Evalueer resultate op die RotoWire datastel bevestig die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde toegang om beter templates te genereer en data opneem te kopieer meer presies.", 'hy': "Տվյալների տեքստի ստեղծման խնդիրը նպատակն է ստեղծել նկարագրական տեքստեր, որոնք կախված են բազմաթիվ տվյալների ձայնագրություններից, և վերջերս նյարդային մոդելները ցույց են տալիս նշանակալի առաջընթաց այս խնդրի վրա: Ուշադրության վրա հիմնված կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելները, որոնք օգտագործում են կոպիայի մեխանիզմ, արդյունքներ են ստացել մի քանի տվյալների տեքստի վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, այսպիսի մոդելները դեռևս հանդիպում են սխալ տվյալների ձայնագրությունների տեղադրման խնդիրը ստեղծված տեքստներում, հատկապես որոշ ավելի դժվար տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, ինչպիսիք են Ռոտովիրեն: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու փուլում գտնվող մոտեցում՝ ուշացած կոպիայի մեխանիզմի օգնությամբ, որպեսզի բարելավենք ստեղծված տեքստերում տեղեկատվական ձայնագրությունների ճշգրտությունը: Մեր մոտեցումը առաջին հերթին ընդունում է կոդեր-կոդեր մոդել, որպեսզի ստեղծենք մոդել տեքստ տվյալների պահերով, որոնք պետք է լրացնեն, և հետո օգտագործում է առաջարկած ուշացած կոպիայի մեխանիզմ, որպեսզի պահերով լրա Մեր ուշացած վերարտադրման մեխանիզմը կարող է հաշվի առնել մուտքագրման տվյալների բոլոր տեղեկատվությունը և ամբողջ ստեղծված մոդելի տեքստը' օգտագործելով երկու ուշադրություն, դիրք գիտակցած ուշադրություն և զույգ դասավորման կորուստ Երկու փուլում երկու մոդելները առանձին են վարժեցվում: Ռոտովիրի տվյալների համակարգի գնահատման արդյունքները ստուգում են մեր առաջարկված մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը ավելի լավ կաղապարներ ստեղծելու և ավելի ճշգրիտ տվյալների ձայնագրման համար:", 'sq': 'Detyra e gjenerimit të të dhënave në tekst synon të gjenerojë tekste përshkrimuese të kushtuar nga një numër të regjistrimeve të bazës së dhënave dhe modelet e fundit nervore kanë treguar përparim të rëndësishëm në këtë detyrë. Modelet e koduesit-dekoderit me mekanizëm kopje të bazuar në vëmendje kanë arritur rezultate moderne në disa grupe të dhënash në tekst. Megjithatë, modele të tilla ende ndeshen me problem in e vendosjes së regjistrimeve të të dhënave të gabuara në tekstet e gjeneruara, veçanërisht në disa grupe të dhënash më sfiduese si RotoWire. In this paper, we propose a two-stage approach with a delayed copy mechanism to improve the precision of data records in the generated texts.  Përqasja jonë miraton së pari një model koduesi-dekoderi për të gjeneruar një tekst modeli me slots të dhënave për të mbushur dhe pastaj nxjerr një mekanizëm të propozuar kopje të vonuar për të mbushur slots me regjistrime të duhura të të dhënave. Mekanizmi ynë i shtyrë i kopjes mund të marrë parasysh të gjitha informacionet e të dhënave të hyrjes dhe tekstin e plotë të gjeneruar të modelit duke përdorur vëmendjen e dyfishtë, vëmendjen e ndërgjegjshme për pozicionin dhe një humbje të renditjes në dy anë. Të dy modelet në të dy fazat janë trajnuar veçanërisht. Rezultatet e vlerësimit në grupin e të dhënave RotoWire verifikojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë të propozuar për të gjeneruar modele më të mira dhe kopjuar më saktësisht regjistrimet e të dhënave.', 'ca': "La tasca de generació de dades a text mira a generar textos descriptius condicionats amb una sèrie de registres de bases de dades, i els models neuronals recents han mostrat progrés significatius en aquesta tasca. Els models de decodificació basats en l'atenció amb mecanisme de còpia han aconseguit resultats més avançats en alguns conjunts de dades entre textos. Tot i així, aquests models encara enfronten el problema de posar registres incorrects de dades als textos generats, especialment en alguns conjunts de dades més desafiants com RotoWire. En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament en dos etapes amb un mecanisme de còpia retardat per millorar la precisió dels registres de dades dels textos generats. El nostre enfocament adopta primer un model de codificador-decoder per generar un text de models amb slots de dades que han de rellenar i després aprofita un mecanisme de còpia retrasada proposat per rellenar els slots amb registres de dades adequats. El nostre mecanisme de còpia retrasada pot tenir en compte tota la informació dels registres de dades d'entrada i el text complet del model generat utilitzant la doble atenció, l'atenció conscient de la posició i una pèrdua de classement en parell. Els dos models de les dues etapes s'entrenen separadament. Els resultats d'evaluació del conjunt de dades RotoWire verificen l'eficacia del nostre enfocament proposat per generar millors models i copiar els registres de dades de manera més precisa.", 'az': 'Data-to-text n…ôz…ôriyy…ôtinin v…ôsiyy…ôti bir ne√ß…ô veri-tabanńĪ kayńĪtlarńĪnda m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilmiŇü t…ôfsirli m…ôtnl…ôri yaratmaq v…ô son n√∂ral modell…ôrin bu iŇüd…ô m√∂hk…ôm ilerlemesini g√∂st…ôrm…ôk ist…ôyir. N√∂vb…ôti kodlayńĪcńĪ modelleri kopyalama mekanizmasńĪ il…ô t…ôsirli bir ne√ß…ô veri-m…ôlumat qurńüularńĪnda m√ľ…ôyy…ôn etdi. Ancaq bu modell…ôr h…ôl…ô d…ô yaratdńĪńüńĪ m…ôtnl…ôr…ô yanlńĪŇü m…ôlumat kayńĪtlarńĪnńĪ yerl…ôŇüdirm…ôk probleml…ôrin…ô qarŇüńĪ √ß…ôkirl…ôr, √∂zl…ôrin…ô d…ô RotoWire kimi daha √ß…ôtin veril…ôn qurbanlara. Bu kańüńĪzda, yaratdńĪńüńĪ m…ôtnl…ôrd…ô veril…ôn m…ôlumatlarńĪn d…ôqiqliyini yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn gecikl…ômiŇü kopiya mekanizmasńĪ il…ô iki f…ôrz t…ôrzini t…ôklif edirik. Bizim t…ôrzimiz ilk d…ôf…ô kodlayńĪcńĪ modelini dolduracaq m…ôlumatlarla √∂rt√ľk m…ôlumatńĪ yaratmaq √ľ√ß√ľn v…ô sonra t…ôklif edil…ôn gecikmiŇü kopiya mehanizmisini d√ľzg√ľn m…ôlumatlarla dolduracaq. Bizim gecikmiŇü kopiya mehanizmimiz giriŇü verilmiŇü m…ôlumatlarńĪn b√ľt√ľn m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ v…ô b√ľt√ľn yaratdńĪńüńĪ Ňüablon m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ iki d…ôf…ô g√∂zl…ôyir, m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ v…ô √ßift d…ôf…ô ziyana uńürayaraq hesab ed…ô bil…ôr. ńįki s…ôf…ôrd…ô iki modeli ayrńĪ-ayrńĪ t…ôhsil edilir. RotoWire veri qutusundakńĪ deńüerlendirm…ô sonu√ßlarńĪ bizim t…ôklif etdiyimiz metodlarńĪn daha yaxŇüńĪ n√ľmun…ôl…ôri yaratmaq v…ô m…ôlumatlarńĪn kayńĪtlarńĪnńĪ daha dońürudan kopiyalamaq √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôsdiql…ônir.', 'et': "Andmete loomise ülesande eesmärk on luua kirjeldavaid tekste, mis on tingitud mitmetest andmebaasi kirjetest ja hiljutised närvimudelid on näidanud selles ülesandes märkimisväärset edu. Tähelepanu põhinevad kopeerimismehhanismiga kodeerija-dekooderi mudelid on saavutanud kaasaegseid tulemusi mõne andmekogumi puhul. Sellised mudelid seisavad siiski silmitsi probleemiga ebaõigete andmekirjete paigutamisega genereeritud tekstidesse, eriti mõnedes keerulisemates andmekogumites, nagu RotoWire. Käesolevas töös pakume välja kaheastmelise lähenemisviisi koos hilinenud kopeerimismehhanismiga, et parandada andmekirjete täpsust genereeritud tekstides. Meie lähenemisviis võtab esmalt kasutusele kodeerija-dekooderi mudeli, et genereerida malli tekst koos täidetavate andmeaegadega ja seejärel kasutab kavandatud hilinenud kopeerimismehhanismi, et täita pesad õigete andmekirjetega. Meie hilinenud kopeerimise mehhanism võib arvesse võtta kogu sisendandmete kirjete teavet ja täielikku loodud malli teksti, kasutades topelttähelepanu, positsiooniteadlikku tähelepanu ja paarijärgulist järjestuse kaotust. Kaks mudelit kahes etapis koolitatakse eraldi. RotoWire'i andmekogumi hindamise tulemused kinnitavad meie kavandatud lähenemisviisi tõhusust paremate mallide loomisel ja andmekirjete täpsemalt kopeerimisel.", 'cs': 'Úkolem generace dat-text je generování popisných textů podmíněných na řadě databázových záznamů a nedávné neuronové modely ukázaly v této oblasti významný pokrok. Modely kodérů a dekodérů založené na pozornosti s kopírovacím mechanismem dosáhly nejmodernějších výsledků na několika datových sadách. Tyto modely však stále čelí problému vložení nesprávných datových záznamů do generovaných textů, zejména na některých náročnějších datových sadách, jako je RotoWire. V tomto článku navrhujeme dvoustupňový přístup s mechanismem opožděného kopírování pro zlepšení přesnosti datových záznamů v generovaných textech. Náš přístup nejprve používá model kodéru-dekodéru k generování šablony textu s datovými sloty, které mají být vyplněny, a pak využívá navržený mechanismus opožděného kopírování k vyplnění slotů správnými datovými záznamy. Náš mechanismus opožděného kopírování může brát v úvahu veškeré informace ze vstupních datových záznamů a celý generovaný text šablony pomocí dvojité pozornosti, pozornosti vědomé pozice a ztráty párového hodnocení. Oba modely ve dvou fázích jsou trénovány samostatně. Výsledky hodnocení datové sady RotoWire ověřují účinnost našeho navrhovaného přístupu k generování lepších šablon a přesnější kopírování datových záznamů.', 'bn': 'The task of data-to-text generation aims to generate descriptive texts conditioned on a number of database records, and recent neural models have shown significant progress on this task.  কপি মেক্সিমেন্টের সাথে ভিত্তিক এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল কপি করা হয়েছে কয়েকটি তথ্য থেকে টেক্সট ডাটাসেটে অবস্থানের শিল্প তবে এরকম মডেল এখনো তৈরি করা টেক্সটে ভুল তথ্য রেকর্ড রেখার সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হয়েছে, বিশেষ করে রোটোউইয়ার মতো কিছু চ্যালেঞ্জাল এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি দুই স্টেডের মাধ্যমে প্রস্তাব করছি যেটি দেরি করা হয়েছে একটি কপি মেকানিস্টেমের সাথে তৈরি করা লেখার ডাটা রেকর্ আমাদের প্রথমে একটি এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল তৈরি করে তথ্য স্লোট পূর্ণ করার জন্য একটি টেম্পেল টেক্সট তৈরি করে এবং তারপর একটি প্রস্তাবিত কপি ব্যবস্থা প্রদা আমাদের দেরি করা কপি ব্যবস্থা ইনপুট ডাটা রেকর্ডের সকল তথ্য এবং পুরো তৈরি করা টেক্সট ব্যবহার করে দ্বিগুণ মনোযোগ, অবস্থানের সতর্ক এবং দুই জাতির দুই স্টেজে এই দুই মডেল আলাদা প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়। রোটোউইয়ার ডাটাসেটে প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপের কার্যক্রম নিশ্চিত করা এবং তথ্যের রেকর্ড আরো সঠিকভাবে অনুলিপি করা যায়।', 'bs': 'Zadnji zadatak generacije podataka do teksta je cilj proizvesti opisivne tekste pod uslovom broja podataka podataka, a nedavni neuronski modeli pokazali su značajan napredak na ovom zadatku. Pažnja bazirana na modelima kodera-dekodera sa kopijskim mehanizam postigla je rezultate umjetnosti na nekoliko podataka na tekst. Međutim, takvi modeli se i dalje suočavaju sa problemom stavljanja nepravednih podataka u proizvedene tekstove, posebno na neke više izazovnih podataka poput RotoWire. U ovom papiru predlažemo dvofazni pristup s odgođenim mehanizam kopije kako bi poboljšali preciznost podataka u proizvedenim tekstima. Naš pristup je prvi put usvojio model kodera-dekodera kako bi stvorio tekst šablona sa slovima podataka koji će biti ispunjeni, a zatim se uključuje predloženi mehanizam odgođenog kopiranja da bi se slovima napunili odgovarajućim podacima. Naš odgođeni kopijski mehanizam može uzeti u obzir sve informacije o podacima o ulaznim podacima i potpunom proizvedenom tekstu šablona koristeći dvostruku pažnju, pozornu pažnju na poziciju i gubitku reda na parovima. Dva modela su trenirana odvojeno. Rezultati procjene na setu podataka RotoWire potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa za stvaranje boljih šablona i kopiranje podataka preciznije.', 'fi': 'Datan tuottamisen tehtävänä on tuottaa kuvailevia tekstejä, jotka perustuvat useisiin tietokantatietueisiin, ja viimeaikaiset neuromallit ovat osoittaneet merkittävää edistystä tässä tehtävässä. Huomioon perustuvat kooderi-dekooderimallit, joissa on kopiointimekanismi, ovat saavuttaneet viimeisimpiä tuloksia muutamassa datasta tekstiin -aineistossa. Tällaisten mallien ongelmana on kuitenkin edelleen virheellisten tietotallenteiden laittaminen luotuihin teksteihin, erityisesti haastavampiin tietokokonaisuuksiin, kuten RotoWireen. Tässä työssä ehdotamme kaksivaiheista lähestymistapaa viivästyneen kopioinnin mekanismilla, jolla parannetaan tuotetuissa teksteissä olevien tietojen tarkkuutta. Lähestymistapamme omaksuu ensin kooderi-dekooderimallin, joka luo mallin tekstin, jossa on täytettävät tietopaikat, ja hyödyntää sitten ehdotettua viivästyskopiomekanismia täyttämään paikat oikeilla tietotiedoilla. Viivästyneen kopioinnin mekanismimme voi ottaa huomioon kaikki syöttötietotietueiden tiedot ja koko luodun mallin tekstin käyttämällä kaksinkertaista huomiota, sijaintitietoista huomiota ja pareittain pisteytystä. Kaksi mallia kahdessa vaiheessa koulutetaan erikseen. RotoWire-aineiston arviointitulokset vahvistavat ehdotetun toimintamallimme tehokkuuden parempien mallien luomisessa ja tietotallenteiden kopioimisessa tarkemmin.', 'ha': "Kijan danna-zuwa-text ɗin na yi amfani da ya ƙiƙira matsayin descriptive wanda aka ƙayyade shi a kan wasu rekodi na database, kuma misãlai na ƙarshen ƙarshen suka nuna mafarin mai girma a kan wannan aikin. @ action: button A lokacin da, misalin wannan yana ƙara musamman a matsayin a cikin matsayin da aka ƙãga, kuma, hususanci, a kan wasu masu sakan da ke ƙaranci danganta kamar RotoWire. Ga wannan takardan, Muke goyyade wata matsayi biyu-daraja da aka jinkirtar na matsayin kodi don ya improve korrekin rubutun data cikin littattafani da aka ƙãga. TsarinMu na farkon ya ɗauki wani misali na kode-koda dõmin ya sami wani matsayi na salon da aka cika filayen data, sa'an nan kuma ya ƙara wata matsayin kodi da aka jinkirtar da shi don ya cika cikin filayen da rekodi masu daidai. @ action: button An sanar da misãlai biyu cikin jujjuya biyu ko da ɗai. Ana gaskata matsalar a kan danne na RotoWire, ka gaskata aikin hanyarmu na buƙatan da aka buƙata wajen ka samu da takardar da za'a iya amfani da shi na taƙaita.", 'sk': 'Naloga generiranja podatkov v besedilo je ustvarjanje opisnih besedil, pogojenih na številnih zapisih baz podatkov, nedavni nevronski modeli pa so pokazali znaten napredek pri tej nalogi. Modeli kodirnikov-dekodirnikov, ki temeljijo na pozornosti, z mehanizmom kopiranja, so dosegli najsodobnejše rezultate na nekaj naborih podatkov iz podatkov v besedilo. Vendar pa se takšni modeli še vedno soočajo s problemom vnosa nepravilnih podatkovnih zapisov v ustvarjena besedila, zlasti na nekaterih bolj zahtevnih naborih podatkov, kot je RotoWire. V prispevku predlagamo dvostopenjski pristop z mehanizmom zakasnjenega kopiranja za izboljšanje natančnosti podatkovnih zapisov v ustvarjenih besedilih. Naš pristop najprej sprejme model kodirnika-dekodirnika za ustvarjanje besedila predloge s podatkovnimi režami, ki jih je treba izpolniti, nato pa izkoristi predlagani mehanizem zakasnjenega kopiranja, da izpolni reže z ustreznimi podatkovnimi zapisi. Naš mehanizem zakasnjenega kopiranja lahko upošteva vse informacije zapisov vhodnih podatkov in celotno ustvarjeno besedilo predloge z uporabo dvojne pozornosti, pozornosti glede na položaj in izgube pare po razvrstitvi. Oba modela v obeh fazah se usposabljata ločeno. Rezultati vrednotenja podatkovnega nabora RotoWire preverjajo učinkovitost našega predlaganega pristopa za ustvarjanje boljših predlog in natančnejše kopiranje podatkovnih zapisov.', 'he': 'The task of data-to-text generation aims to generate descriptive texts conditioned on a number of database records, and recent neural models have shown significant progress on this task.  The attention based encoder-decoder models with copy mechanism have achieved state-of-the-art results on a few data-to-text datasets.  עם זאת, דוגמנים כאלה עדיין מתמודדים עם הבעיה של לשים רישומי נתונים לא נכונים בטקסטים שנוצרים, במיוחד על כמה קבוצות נתונים מאתגרים יותר כמו RotoWire. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה בשתי שלבים עם מנגנון עותק מאוחר כדי לשפר את הדיוק של רשומות נתונים בטקסטים שנוצרים. הגישה שלנו קודם מאמץ דוגמא קודם לקודר-קידור כדי ליצור טקסט דוגמא עם מקומות נתונים למלא ואז משתמש במנגנון עותק מאוחר מוצע כדי למלא את מקומות עם רשומות נתונים מתאימים. מנגנון העתק המועכב שלנו יכול לקחת בחשבון את כל המידע של רשומות הנתונים הנתונים והטקסט המלא של המדגם שנוצר על ידי השימוש בשימוש תשומת לב כפולה, תשומת לב מודעת לעמדה ואבדן מעמד זוג. שני הדוגמנים בשני השלבים מאומנים בנפרד. תוצאות הערכה על קבוצת נתונים RotoWire מאשרות את היעילות של הגישה המוצעת שלנו לייצר דוגמנים טובים יותר ולהעתק רשומות נתונים יותר בדיוק.', 'jv': 'task of data-to-text Generation Attribute Nanging, sampeyan model saiki iso ngrusak perkoro sing dadi sing misil dumateng data sing bisa ngelarane textin, sithik karo perkoro sing memperbudhakan dataset sing koyo roto wire Nang kuwi iki, kita mudhaya ngaweh sistem sing wis rampung durung lan ngawehi sistem sing beraksi dadi sing perusahaan dadi sing dadi nggawe barang seneng pisan iki. Nambah tanggal nggap sambane sistem koder-decoder text-tool-action Laptop" and "Desktop Tarjamahan pipilihan ing dataset roto wire gak bener', 'bo': 'The task of data-to-text generation aims to generate descriptive texts conditioned on a number of database records, and recent neural models have shown significant progress on this task. attention based encoder-decoder models with copy mechanism have achieved state-of-the-art results on a few data-to-text datasets. However, such models still face the problem of putting incorrect data records in the generated texts, especially on some more challenging datasets like RotoWire. འོག ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་དང་པོ་དེ་གསལ་བཀོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་མིང་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གེ་སྟོང་དགོས་པའི་གནས་ས། Our delayed copy mechanism can take into account all the information of the input data records and the full generated template text by using double attention, position-aware attention and a pairwise ranking loss. སྔོན་གྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གཉིས་ནང་གི་མིག་ཆས་གཉིས་དབྱེ་བ་སྦྱར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། RotoWire གནད་སྡུད་ནང་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཚད་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་གྲོས་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་བཟོ་བཅོས་གྱི་efficacy་ཡིན་པ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་བཙལ་'}
{'en': 'Enhanced Aspect Level Sentiment Classification with Auxiliary Memory', 'ar': 'تصنيف المشاعر المحسن على مستوى الجانب مع الذاكرة المساعدة', 'pt': 'Classificação de sentimento de nível de aspecto aprimorada com memória auxiliar', 'fr': "Classification des sentiments au niveau d'aspect améliorée avec mémoire auxiliaire", 'es': 'Clasificación de opinión a nivel de aspecto mejorada con memoria auxiliar', 'zh': '有助记增强的情绪分类', 'ja': '補助メモリを使用したアスペクトレベルのセンチメント分類の強化', 'hi': 'सहायक स्मृति के साथ एन्हांस्ड पहलू स्तर भावना वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'Улучшенная классификация настроений на уровне аспекта со вспомогательной памятью', 'ga': 'Aicmiú Méine Feabhsaithe Leibhéal Gné le Cuimhne Cúnta', 'el': 'Ενισχυμένη ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων επιπέδου πτυχών με βοηθητική μνήμη', 'hu': 'Továbbfejlesztett Aspect Level Sentiment Osztályozás kiegészítő memóriával', 'ka': 'დამატებული მეხსიერება', 'kk': 'Көмекші жады арқылы көмектесу деңгейінде көмектесу', 'mk': 'Поголемена класификација на чувство на ниво на аспект со помошна меморија', 'lt': 'Aukštesnis aspekto jautrumo klasifikavimas su pagalbine atmintine', 'it': 'Classificazione migliorata dei sentimenti di livello di aspetto con memoria ausiliaria', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Sensan Aras Aspek Tertinggi dengan Memori Tambahan', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн аспектийн түвшин сэтгэл санаагаар хуваалцах', 'no': 'Forbetra aspektnivå for sentidsglassifikasjon med hjelpeminne', 'ml': 'കൂട്ടുകാരുടെ മെമ്മറിയോടൊപ്പം കൂടുതല്\u200d ആസ്പെക്ക് നിലനില', 'ro': 'Clasificare îmbunătățită a sentimentelor la nivel de aspect cu memorie auxiliară', 'pl': 'Ulepszona klasyfikacja sentymentów poziomu aspektów z pamięcią pomocniczą', 'si': 'වැඩි ස්පෙක්ට් ලේවල් සංවේදනය ක්\u200dලාසික්ෂණය', 'sr': 'Povećana razina aspekta Sentimentalna klasifikacija sa pomoænom memorijom', 'sv': 'Förbättrad bildnivå Sentiment Klassificering med hjälpminne', 'so': 'Heerka la xiriira xasuusta xuquuqda', 'ta': 'மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட பார்வை நிலை', 'ur': 'مزید آسپٹ لئویل سنٹیمینٹ کلاسیفٹ', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni mtejba tas-Sentiment fil-Livell tal-Aspett b’Memorja Awżiljarja', 'uz': 'Sertifikat xotirasi', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Подобрено ниво на аспект класификация на сентимента с помощна памет', 'nl': 'Verbeterde classificatie van gevoelens op aspect niveau met hulpgeheugen', 'da': 'Forbedret Aspect Level Sentiment Klassificering med hjælpehukommelse', 'ko': '보조 기억의 증강을 가진 방면급 감정 분류', 'de': 'Verbesserte Klassifizierung von Aspect Level Sentiments mit zusätzlichem Speicher', 'hr': 'Povećana razina aspekta Sentimentalna klasifikacija pomoćnog sjećanja', 'fa': 'سطح احساسات سطح بیشتری با حافظه کمک', 'id': 'Klasifikasi Sentimen Tingkat Aspek Tingkat dengan Memori Tambahan', 'af': 'Verbeter Aspek Vlak Sentiment Klassifikasie met hulpgeheue', 'tr': 'Aspect ratio', 'sw': 'Makala ya Siasa ya Kianganyiko na Kumbukumbu', 'hy': 'Օգնական հիշողությամբ բարելավված հարաբերակցության մակարդակը', 'az': 'Yard캼mc캼 Haf캼za il톛 쿮lav톛 S톛viyy톛si', 'bn': 'সংযুক্ত মেমরি সহযোগে উন্নত Aspect Level Sentiment Classication', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i nivelit të ndjeshëm të përmirësuar të nivelit të aspektit me kujtesë ndihmëse', 'bs': 'Povećana razina aspekta Sentimentalna klasifikacija sa pomaganjem', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ', 'ca': 'Classificació millorada del nivell de sentiment amb memòria auxiliar', 'cs': 'Vylepšená klasifikace sentimentů na úrovni aspektů s pomocnou pamětí', 'et': 'Täiustatud aspektitaseme sentimentide klassifitseerimine abimäluga', 'fi': 'Parannettu aspektitason tunneluokitus apumuistilla', 'sk': 'Izboljšana klasifikacija čustev ravni vidika s pomožnim pomnilnikom', 'he': 'Enhanced Aspect Level Sentiment Classification with Auxiliary Memory', 'ha': 'Media controller element', 'jv': 'ProgressBar', 'bo': 'རྒྱས་རྗེས་ཀྱི་དྲན་ཚད་དང་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད་པའི་མཚོན་རྟགས་གནས་ཚད'}
{'en': 'In aspect level sentiment classification, there are two common tasks : to identify the sentiment of an aspect (category) or a term. As specific instances of aspects, terms explicitly occur in sentences. It is beneficial for models to focus on nearby context words. In contrast, as high level semantic concepts of terms, aspects usually have more generalizable representations. However, conventional methods can not utilize the information of aspects and terms at the same time, because few datasets are annotated with both aspects and terms. In this paper, we propose a novel deep memory network with auxiliary memory to address this problem. In our model, a main memory is used to capture the important context words for sentiment classification. In addition, we build an auxiliary memory to implicitly convert aspects and terms to each other, and feed both of them to the main memory. With the interaction between two memories, the features of aspects and terms can be learnt simultaneously. We compare our model with the state-of-the-art methods on four datasets from different domains. The experimental results demonstrate the effectiveness of our model.', 'ar': 'في تصنيف المشاعر على مستوى الجانب ، هناك مهمتان شائعتان: لتحديد المشاعر من جانب (فئة) أو مصطلح. كحالات محددة من الجوانب ، تحدث المصطلحات صراحة في الجمل. من المفيد للنماذج التركيز على كلمات السياق القريبة. في المقابل ، كمفاهيم دلالية عالية المستوى للمصطلحات ، عادة ما يكون للجوانب تمثيلات أكثر قابلية للتعميم. ومع ذلك ، لا يمكن للطرق التقليدية الاستفادة من معلومات الجوانب والمصطلحات في نفس الوقت ، لأن القليل من مجموعات البيانات مشروحة بالجوانب والمصطلحات. في هذا البحث ، نقترح إنشاء شبكة ذاكرة عميقة جديدة بذاكرة مساعدة لمعالجة هذه المشكلة. في نموذجنا ، تُستخدم الذاكرة الرئيسية لالتقاط كلمات السياق المهمة لتصنيف المشاعر. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نبني ذاكرة مساعدة لتحويل الجوانب والمصطلحات ضمنيًا إلى بعضها البعض ، وتغذية كلاهما إلى الذاكرة الرئيسية. من خلال التفاعل بين ذاكرتين ، يمكن تعلم ميزات الجوانب والمصطلحات في وقت واحد. قارنا نموذجنا بأحدث الأساليب في أربع مجموعات بيانات من مجالات مختلفة. النتائج التجريبية تظهر فعالية نموذجنا', 'fr': "Dans la classification des sentiments au niveau de l'aspect, il existe deux tâches courantes\xa0: identifier le sentiment d'un aspect (catégorie) ou d'un terme. En tant que cas spécifiques d'aspects, les termes apparaissent explicitement dans les phrases. Il est avantageux pour les modèles de se concentrer sur les mots contextuels proches. En revanche, en tant que concepts sémantiques de haut niveau des termes, les aspects ont généralement des représentations plus généralisables. Cependant, les méthodes classiques ne peuvent pas utiliser les informations des aspects et des termes en même temps, car peu de jeux de données sont annotés à la fois avec des aspects et des termes. Dans cet article, nous proposons un nouveau réseau de mémoire profonde avec mémoire auxiliaire pour résoudre ce problème. Dans notre modèle, une mémoire principale est utilisée pour capturer les mots contextuels importants pour la classification des sentiments. De plus, nous construisons une mémoire auxiliaire pour convertir implicitement les aspects et les termes entre eux, et les alimentons tous les deux dans la mémoire principale. Grâce à l'interaction entre deux mémoires, les caractéristiques des aspects et des termes peuvent être apprises simultanément. Nous comparons notre modèle avec les méthodes les plus récentes sur quatre ensembles de données provenant de différents domaines. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent l'efficacité de notre modèle.", 'pt': 'Na classificação de sentimento em nível de aspecto, há duas tarefas comuns: identificar o sentimento de um aspecto (categoria) ou de um termo. Como instâncias específicas de aspectos, os termos ocorrem explicitamente nas sentenças. É benéfico que os modelos se concentrem em palavras de contexto próximas. Em contraste, como conceitos semânticos de termos de alto nível, os aspectos geralmente têm representações mais generalizáveis. No entanto, os métodos convencionais não podem utilizar as informações de aspectos e termos ao mesmo tempo, porque poucos conjuntos de dados são anotados com aspectos e termos. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova rede de memória profunda com memória auxiliar para resolver este problema. Em nosso modelo, uma memória principal é usada para capturar as palavras de contexto importantes para a classificação de sentimentos. Além disso, construímos uma memória auxiliar para converter implicitamente aspectos e termos entre si e alimentar ambos na memória principal. Com a interação entre duas memórias, as características de aspectos e termos podem ser aprendidas simultaneamente. Comparamos nosso modelo com os métodos de última geração em quatro conjuntos de dados de diferentes domínios. Os resultados experimentais demonstram a eficácia do nosso modelo.', 'es': 'En la clasificación de sentimientos a nivel de aspecto, hay dos tareas comunes: identificar el sentimiento de un aspecto (categoría) o un término. Como casos específicos de aspectos, los términos aparecen explícitamente en las oraciones. Es beneficioso que los modelos se centren en palabras de contexto cercanas. Por el contrario, como conceptos semánticos de términos de alto nivel, los aspectos suelen tener representaciones más generalizables. Sin embargo, los métodos convencionales no pueden utilizar la información de aspectos y términos al mismo tiempo, porque pocos conjuntos de datos están anotados con aspectos y términos. En este artículo, proponemos una novedosa red de memoria profunda con memoria auxiliar para abordar este problema. En nuestro modelo, se utiliza una memoria principal para capturar las palabras de contexto importantes para la clasificación de los sentimientos. Además, construimos una memoria auxiliar para convertir implícitamente aspectos y términos entre sí, y alimentar ambos a la memoria principal. Con la interacción entre dos memorias, las características de los aspectos y los términos se pueden aprender simultáneamente. Comparamos nuestro modelo con los métodos más avanzados en cuatro conjuntos de datos de diferentes dominios. Los resultados experimentales demuestran la eficacia de nuestro modelo.', 'ja': 'アスペクトレベルのセンチメント分類では、アスペクトレベル（カテゴリ）または用語のセンチメントを識別するという2つの一般的なタスクがあります。 態様の具体的な例として、用語は文において明示的に生じる。 モデルが近くの文脈の単語に焦点を当てることは有益です。 対照的に、用語の高水準の意味概念として、態様は通常、より一般化可能な表現を有する。 しかしながら、従来の方法は、態様及び用語の両方で注釈が付けられているデータセットがほとんどないため、態様及び用語の情報を同時に利用することはできない。 本稿では、この問題に対処するために、補助メモリを備えた新規のディープメモリネットワークを提案する。 私たちのモデルでは、メインメモリを使用して、センチメント分類のための重要な文脈の単語をキャプチャします。 また、アスペクトや用語を暗黙的に互いに変換し、両方をメインメモリに供給する補助メモリを構築しています。 2つの記憶の相互作用により、側面と用語の特徴を同時に学ぶことができる。 私たちは、さまざまなドメインの4つのデータセットの最先端の方法とモデルを比較します。 実験結果は、私たちのモデルの有効性を示しています。', 'zh': '情类之中,有两常事:标识(类)术语之情。 方面之实,术语明见于句中。 置重于近上下文单词有益也。 反此者,术语之高语义名也,常有所广也。 然旧法不可兼用术语息,盖少据集兼用术语注也。 本文有新型助记之深网络以决之。 在我模形,主内存用于情上下文单词。 又构一佐存储器,以隐式转换术语,悉馈于主存储器。 两记相用,可兼学术语也。 以我四集最先进之法较之。 实验验模形之有效性。', 'ru': 'В классификации настроений на уровне аспекта есть две общие задачи: определить настроение аспекта (категории) или термина. В качестве конкретных примеров аспектов термины явно встречаются в предложениях. Для моделей полезно сосредоточиться на близлежащих контекстных словах. Напротив, как высокоуровневые семантические концепции терминов, аспекты обычно имеют более обобщаемые представления. Однако обычные методы не могут использовать информацию об аспектах и терминах одновременно, поскольку лишь немногие наборы данных аннотированы как аспектами, так и терминами. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую сеть глубокой памяти со вспомогательной памятью для решения этой проблемы. В нашей модели основная память используется для захвата важных контекстных слов для классификации настроений. Кроме того, мы строим вспомогательную память, чтобы неявно конвертировать аспекты и термины друг в друга, и подавать их оба в основную память. При взаимодействии между двумя воспоминаниями можно одновременно изучать особенности аспектов и терминов. Мы сравниваем нашу модель с современными методами на четырех датасетах из разных областей. Экспериментальные результаты демонстрируют эффективность нашей модели.', 'hi': 'पहलू स्तर की भावना वर्गीकरण में, दो सामान्य कार्य हैं: एक पहलू (श्रेणी) या एक शब्द की भावना की पहचान करने के लिए। पहलुओं के विशिष्ट उदाहरणों के रूप में, शब्द स्पष्ट रूप से वाक्यों में होते हैं। यह मॉडल के लिए पास के संदर्भ शब्दों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए फायदेमंद है। इसके विपरीत, शब्दों की उच्च स्तरीय शब्दार्थ अवधारणाओं के रूप में, पहलुओं में आमतौर पर अधिक सामान्यीकृत प्रतिनिधित्व होते हैं। हालांकि, पारंपरिक तरीके एक ही समय में पहलुओं और शब्दों की जानकारी का उपयोग नहीं कर सकते हैं, क्योंकि कुछ डेटासेट पहलुओं और शर्तों दोनों के साथ एनोटेट किए जाते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए सहायक स्मृति के साथ एक उपन्यास गहरी स्मृति नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल में, भावना वर्गीकरण के लिए महत्वपूर्ण संदर्भ शब्दों को कैप्चर करने के लिए एक मुख्य स्मृति का उपयोग किया जाता है। इसके अलावा, हम पहलुओं और शर्तों को एक-दूसरे के लिए स्पष्ट रूप से परिवर्तित करने के लिए एक सहायक स्मृति का निर्माण करते हैं, और उन दोनों को मुख्य स्मृति में फ़ीड करते हैं। दो यादों के बीच बातचीत के साथ, पहलुओं और शब्दों की विशेषताओं को एक साथ सीखा जा सकता है। हम विभिन्न डोमेन से चार डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक तरीकों के साथ अपने मॉडल की तुलना करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम हमारे मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá dhá thasc choiteann ag baint le haicmiú sentiment ag leibhéal gné: meon gné (catagóir) nó téarma a aithint. Mar shamplaí sonracha de ghnéithe, tarlaíonn téarmaí go sainráite in abairtí. Tá sé tairbheach do mhúnlaí díriú ar fhocail chomhthéacs in aice láimhe. I gcodarsnacht leis sin, mar choincheapa shéimeantacha ardleibhéil téarmaí, is gnách go mbíonn léirithe níos ginearálaithe ag gnéithe. Mar sin féin, ní féidir le gnáth-mhodhanna úsáid a bhaint as faisnéis gnéithe agus téarmaí ag an am céanna, mar is beag tacar sonraí atá anótáilte le gnéithe agus téarmaí araon. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid líonra cuimhne domhain úrnua le cuimhne cúnta chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an bhfadhb seo. Inár múnla, úsáidtear príomhchuimhne chun na focail chomhthéacs tábhachtacha le haghaidh aicmiú meon a ghabháil. Ina theannta sin, tógann muid cuimhne cúnta chun gnéithe agus téarmaí a thiontú go hintuigthe ar a chéile, agus an bheirt acu a chothú don phríomhchuimhne. Leis an idirghníomhú idir dhá chuimhní cinn, is féidir gnéithe gnéithe agus téarmaí a fhoghlaim go comhuaineach. Déanaimid ár samhail a chur i gcomparáid leis na modhanna úrscothacha ar cheithre thacar sonraí ó réimsí éagsúla. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha éifeachtacht ár múnla.', 'ka': 'აპექტიმენტის დონეზე სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციაში, არსებობს ორი საერთო დავალება: აპექტიმენტის (კატეგორია) ან ტერმინის სენტიმენტის განსაცნობა. როგორც განსაკუთრებული აპექტიკების შემთხვევაში, სიტყვები განსაკუთრებულია. მოდელებისთვის გამოსაყენებელია, რომ კონტექსტური სიტყვებზე დარჩენა. კონტრესტში, როგორც სიმენტიკური კონფექტები, აპექტები უფრო უფრო გენერალურად უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად განახლებელია. მაგრამ, კონტუნციონალური მეტოვები არ შეუძლიათ აპექტირების და სიტყვების ინფორმაციის გამოყენება ერთადერთი დროში, რადგან რამდენიმე მონაცემების კონტაქტი ამ დომენტში ჩვენ პრომენტის შიბოლო მეხსიერების ქსელის დახმარებელი მეხსიერებით, რომელიც ამ პრობლემას გარეშე. ჩვენი მოდელში, მნიშვნელოვანი მეხსიერება გამოყენება სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის მნიშვნელოვანი კონტექსტური სიტყვები. დამატებით, ჩვენ შევქმნით დახმარებელი მეხსიერება, რომელიც იმპლექტიურად აპექტები და სიტყვები ერთმანეთისთვის გადაცვლა, და ჩვენ ორივე მართლად მეხ ორი მეხსიერების განმავლობაში, აპექტების და სიტყვების განმავლობა შეიძლება ერთადერთად ვისწავლოთ. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელს განსხვავებული დომენეებიდან 4 მონაცემების განსხვავებული დომენეებიდან შედგენებთ. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენი მოდელის ეფექტიურობას გამოჩვენებენ.', 'el': 'Στην ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων επιπέδου πτυχής, υπάρχουν δύο κοινές εργασίες: να προσδιορίσετε το συναίσθημα μιας πτυχής (κατηγορίας) ή ενός όρου. Ως συγκεκριμένες περιπτώσεις πτυχών, οι όροι εμφανίζονται ρητά σε προτάσεις. Είναι ευεργετικό για τα μοντέλα να επικεντρωθούν σε κοντινές λέξεις περιβάλλοντος. Αντίθετα, ως σημασιολογικές έννοιες υψηλού επιπέδου των όρων, οι πτυχές συνήθως έχουν πιο γενικευμένες αναπαραστάσεις. Ωστόσο, οι συμβατικές μέθοδοι δεν μπορούν να χρησιμοποιήσουν τις πληροφορίες των πτυχών και των όρων ταυτόχρονα, επειδή λίγα σύνολα δεδομένων είναι σχολιασμένα τόσο με πτυχές όσο και με όρους. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα νέο δίκτυο βαθιάς μνήμης με βοηθητική μνήμη για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του προβλήματος. Στο μοντέλο μας, μια κύρια μνήμη χρησιμοποιείται για να συλλάβει τις σημαντικές λέξεις περιβάλλοντος για την ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων. Επιπλέον, χτίζουμε μια βοηθητική μνήμη για να μετατρέψουμε έμμεσα πτυχές και όρους μεταξύ τους, και να τροφοδοτούμε και τις δύο στην κύρια μνήμη. Με την αλληλεπίδραση μεταξύ δύο αναμνήσεων, τα χαρακτηριστικά των πτυχών και των όρων μπορούν να διδαχθούν ταυτόχρονα. Συγκρίνουμε το μοντέλο μας με τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους σε τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων από διαφορετικούς τομείς. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του μοντέλου μας.', 'hu': 'Az aspektuszintű hangulatosztályozásban két közös feladat létezik: egy aspektus (kategória) vagy egy kifejezés hangulatának azonosítása. A szempontok konkrét példájaként a kifejezések kifejezetten előfordulnak a mondatokban. Előnyös, ha a modellek a közeli kontextus szavakra összpontosítanak. Ezzel szemben, mint magas szintű szemantikai fogalmak, az aspektusok általában általánosíthatóbb reprezentációkkal rendelkeznek. A hagyományos módszerek azonban nem tudják egyszerre felhasználni a szempontok és kifejezések információit, mivel kevés adatkészletet tartalmaznak mind aspektusokkal, mind kifejezésekkel. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új mélymemória hálózatot javasolunk kiegészítő memóriával a probléma kezelésére. Modellünkben egy fő memóriát használunk az érzelmek osztályozásához szükséges fontos kontextusszavak rögzítésére. Ezenkívül egy kiegészítő memóriát építünk, amely implicit módon konvertálja az aspektusokat és kifejezéseket egymásba, és mindkettőt a fő memóriába juttatja. A két emlék közötti interakcióval egyidejűleg megismerhetők a szempontok és a kifejezések jellemzői. Modellünket a legkorszerűbb módszerekkel hasonlítjuk össze négy különböző területről származó adatkészleten. A kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják modellünk hatékonyságát.', 'it': "Nella classificazione del sentiment a livello di aspetto, ci sono due compiti comuni: identificare il sentiment di un aspetto (categoria) o di un termine. Come casi specifici di aspetti, i termini si trovano esplicitamente nelle frasi. È utile per i modelli concentrarsi sulle parole di contesto vicine. Al contrario, come concetti semantici di alto livello di termini, gli aspetti di solito hanno rappresentazioni più generalizzabili. Tuttavia, i metodi convenzionali non possono utilizzare le informazioni di aspetti e termini allo stesso tempo, perché pochi set di dati sono annotati con entrambi gli aspetti e termini. In questo articolo, proponiamo una nuova rete di memoria profonda con memoria ausiliaria per affrontare questo problema. Nel nostro modello, una memoria principale viene utilizzata per catturare le parole di contesto importanti per la classificazione del sentiment. Inoltre, costruiamo una memoria ausiliaria per convertire implicitamente aspetti e termini tra loro, e alimentarli entrambi nella memoria principale. Con l'interazione tra due ricordi, le caratteristiche degli aspetti e dei termini possono essere apprese contemporaneamente. Confrontiamo il nostro modello con i metodi all'avanguardia su quattro set di dati di domini diversi. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano l'efficacia del nostro modello.", 'lt': 'Klasifikuojant jausmą aspekto lygiu, yra dvi bendros užduotys: nustatyti aspekto (kategorijos) ar termino jausmą. Kalbant apie konkrečius aspektus, sakiniuose aiškiai nurodomi terminai. Modelius naudinga sutelkti dėmesį į artimus kontekstinius žodžius. Priešingai, kaip aukšto lygio semantinės sąvokos, aspektai paprastai turi labiau generalizuotą atstovavimą. Tačiau tradiciniai metodai negali tuo pačiu metu naudotis aspektų ir terminų informacija, nes keli duomenų rinkiniai yra užrašyti tiek su aspektais, tiek su terminais. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują gilios atminties tinklą su pagalbine atmintimi spręsti šią problem ą. Mūsų modelyje pagrindinė atmintis naudojama svarbiems kontekstiniams žodžiams, skirtiems sentimentams klasifikuoti. Be to, mes sukuriame pagalbinę atmintį, kad netiesiogiai perskaičiuotume aspektus ir terminus vienas kitam, ir juos abu perduodame pagrindinei atmintinei. Dviejų atmintinių sąveika leidžia vienu metu mokytis aspektų ir terminų savybių. Palyginame savo model į su naujausiais metodais keturiose skirtingų sričių duomenų rinkiniuose. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo mūsų modelio veiksmingumą.', 'kk': 'Арнаптық деңгейінде сезімдерді шектеу үшін екі жалпы тапсырма бар: аспекті (санаты) немесе терминдің сезімдерін анықтау үшін. Бөлшектердің ерекше мәселелері ретінде сөйлемелерде тәуелді болады. Бұл үлгілер жақын контексті сөздерге назар аудару үшін пайдалы. Осылай қатар, терминдердің көп деңгейіндегі семантикалық концепциялары ретінде, аспекттердің кәдімгі жалпы түрінде болады. Бірақ кәдімгі әдістер аспекттер мен шарттар туралы мәліметті бірдей уақытта пайдалануға болмайды, себебі бірнеше деректер жиындары екі аспекттер мен шарттармен байланысты. Бұл қағазда, бұл мәселеге көмектесу үшін романдық жады желіне көмектесетін жады қолданып тастаймыз. Өзіміздің үлгісінде негізгі жады сезімдер үшін маңызды контексті сөздерді алу үшін қолданылады. Қосымша, біз бір-біріне аспекттер мен терминдерді аудару үшін көмектесік жады құрып, екеуін негізгі жадына аударамыз. Екі жады арасындағы әріптердің қасиеттері мен терминдердің қасиеттері бірден үйрене алады. Біз моделімізді түрлі домендерден төрт деректер жинақтарымен салыстырамыз. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер үлгіміздің әсерілігін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Во класификацијата на сентименталното ниво на аспектот, постојат две заеднички задачи: да се идентификува сентиментот на аспект (категорија) или термин. Како специфични примери на аспекти, термините експлицитно се случуваат во речениците. Конефицијално е моделите да се фокусираат на блиските контекстни зборови. За разлика од тоа, како семантични концепти на високо ниво, аспектите обично имаат погенерализирани претставувања. Сепак, конвенционалните методи не можат да ги искористат информациите за аспектите и термините во исто време, бидејќи малку податоци се анотирани со двата аспекти и термини. Во овој весник предложуваме нова мрежа на длабока меморија со помошна меморија за решавање на овој проблем. Во нашиот модел, главната меморија се користи за да ги фати важните контекстни зборови за класификација на чувствата. Покрај тоа, ние градиме помошна меморија за имплицитно да се претвориме аспекти и термини еден на друг, и да ги храниме двајцата во главната меморија. Со интеракцијата помеѓу две спомени, карактеристиките на аспектите и термините може да се научат истовремено. Го споредуваме нашиот модел со најновите методи на четири податоци од различни домени. Експерименталните резултати ја покажуваат ефикасноста на нашиот модел.', 'mt': 'Fil-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti fil-livell tal-aspetti, hemm żewġ kompiti komuni: li jiġi identifikat is-sentiment ta’ aspett (kategorija) jew terminu. Bħala każijiet speċifiċi ta’ aspetti, termini jseħħu espliċitament fis-sentenzi. Huwa ta’ benefiċċju għall-mudelli li jiffokaw fuq kliem ta’ kuntest qrib. In contrast, as high level semantic concepts of terms, aspects usually have more generalizable representations.  Madankollu, il-metodi konvenzjonali ma jistgħux jużaw l-informazzjoni ta’ aspetti u termini fl-istess ħin, minħabba li ftit settijiet ta’ dejta huma annotati kemm b’aspetti kif ukoll b’termini. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu netwerk ġdid ta’ memorja profonda b’memorja awżiljarja biex nindirizzaw din il-problem a. Fil-mudell tagħna, tintuża memorja ewlenija biex jinqabdu l-kliem importanti tal-kuntest għall-klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti. Barra minn hekk, aħna nibnu memorja awżiljarja biex b’mod impliċitu nikkonvertixxu aspetti u termini lil xulxin, u nużaw it-tnejn għall-memorja ewlenija. Bl-interazzjoni bejn żewġ memorji, il-karatteristiċi tal-aspetti u t-termini jistgħu jitgħallmu simultanjament. We compare our model with the state-of-the-art methods on four datasets from different domains.  Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru l-effettività tal-mudell tagħna.', 'ml': 'വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ നിലവിലുള്ള അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d രണ്ടു പൊതുവായ ജോലികള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്: ഒരു വിഭാഗത്തിന്റെ (വിഭാഗവിഭാഗവും വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ പ്രത്യേക സ്ഥിതികളായി വാക്കുകള്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി സംഭവിക്കുന്നു. അടുത്തുള്ള വാക്കുകളില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നത് മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപകാരമാണ്. വിധികളുടെ ഉയരത്തില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ആശയങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെ സാധാരണ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണ പ്രതിനിധികളുണ്ട്. എന്നാലും സാധാരണ രീതികള്\u200d ഒരേ സമയത്ത് വിവരങ്ങളും വിവരങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയില്ല, കാരണം കുറച്ചു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d രണ്ടു ഭാഗങ്ങളും വ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ആഴമുള്ള മെമ്മറിയുടെ നെറ്റ് വര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന നമ്മുടെ മോഡലില്\u200d, ഒരു പ്രധാന മെമ്മറി പിടികൂടുന്നു വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d പരസ്പരം ഭാഗങ്ങളെയും വാക്കുകളെയും മാറ്റുന്നതിനു വേണ്ടി ഒരു കൂട്ടുതല്\u200d ഓര്\u200dമ്മയുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടുപേരെയും  രണ്ടു മെമ്മറുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെയും വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെയും വ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിനെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡൊമെയിനുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നാല് ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും സമമാക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Dalam klasifikasi perasaan aras aspek, terdapat dua tugas umum: untuk mengenalpasti perasaan aspek (kategori) atau istilah. Sebagai contoh spesifik aspek, terma secara eksplicit berlaku dalam kalimat. Ia berguna bagi model untuk fokus pada perkataan konteks dekat. Sebaliknya, sebagai konsep semantik tahap tinggi bagi terma, aspek biasanya mempunyai perwakilan yang lebih umum. Namun, kaedah konvensional tidak dapat menggunakan maklumat aspek dan terma pada masa yang sama, kerana beberapa set data dicatat dengan kedua-dua aspek dan terma. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan rangkaian ingatan dalam yang baru dengan ingatan bantuan untuk mengatasi masalah ini. Dalam model kita, memori utama digunakan untuk menangkap kata konteks penting untuk klasifikasi perasaan. Selain itu, kita membina memori tambahan untuk secara implicit menukar aspek dan terma satu sama lain, dan memberi makan keduanya ke memori utama. Dengan interaksi antara dua ingatan, ciri-ciri aspek dan terma boleh belajar secara bersamaan. Kita membandingkan model kita dengan kaedah terbaik pada empat set data dari domain yang berbeza. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan keefektivitas model kita.', 'ro': 'În clasificarea sentimentului la nivel de aspect, există două sarcini comune: identificarea sentimentului unui aspect (categorie) sau a unui termen. Ca cazuri specifice de aspecte, termenii apar în mod explicit în propoziții. Este benefic ca modelele să se concentreze pe cuvintele contextuale din apropiere. În schimb, ca concepte semantice de termeni de nivel înalt, aspectele au de obicei reprezentări mai generalizabile. Cu toate acestea, metodele convenționale nu pot utiliza informațiile aspectelor și termenilor în același timp, deoarece puține seturi de date sunt adnotate atât cu aspecte, cât și cu termeni. În această lucrare, propunem o rețea nouă de memorie profundă cu memorie auxiliară pentru a aborda această problemă. În modelul nostru, o memorie principală este folosită pentru a surprinde cuvintele contextuale importante pentru clasificarea sentimentelor. În plus, construim o memorie auxiliară pentru a converti implicit aspecte și termeni unul la altul și pentru a le alimenta pe amândoi în memoria principală. Prin interacțiunea dintre două amintiri, caracteristicile aspectelor și termenilor pot fi învățate simultan. Comparăm modelul nostru cu metodele de ultimă generație pe patru seturi de date din domenii diferite. Rezultatele experimentale demonstreaza eficacitatea modelului nostru.', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн түвшинд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваалцаанд хоёр ерөнхий даалгавар байна: нэг хэсэг (категори) эсвэл нэг томъёоны мэдрэмжийг тодорхойлдох. Яг тодорхой асуудлын тодорхой тохиолдолд хэлбэрүүдийн тодорхой тохиолдолд тодорхой байдаг. Загварууд ойролцоогоор орчин үгийг төвлөрүүлэхэд ашигтай. Харамсалтай нь, өндөр төвшин хэмжээний semantic ойлголтын хувьд асуудлууд ихэвчлэн илүү ерөнхийлөгчийн үзүүлэлт байдаг. Гэвч энгийн арга зам нь асуудал болон томъёонуудын мэдээллийг нэг зэрэг хэрэглэж чадахгүй, учир нь хэдэн өгөгдлийн сангууд нь асуудал болон томъёонууд хоёуланг анзаарагддаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ асуудлыг шийдэхэд тусламжтай сэтгэл санах шинэ шинэ санамжийн сүлжээг санаж байна. Бидний загвар дээр гол санамж мэдрэмжтэй хуваалцааны чухал үгийг барьж авдаг. Үүнээс гадна бид тусламжтай ой санамж бий болгож, харьцаа болон томъёо бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие бие биенээ гол санамж болгох болно. Хоёр санамжийн хоорондын харилцаа хоорондын харилцаа нь харилцаа болон хувилбаруудын харилцаа хоорондоо нэг удаа суралцаж болох юм. Бид загварыг өөр хэсэгт 4 өгөгдлийн сангуудтай харьцуулж байна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загварын үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'W klasyfikacji sentymentów na poziomie aspektów istnieją dwa wspólne zadania: identyfikacja sentymentu aspektu (kategorii) lub terminu. Jako konkretne przypadki aspektów terminy wyraźnie występują w zdaniach. Korzystne jest dla modeli skupienie się na pobliskich słowach kontekstowych. Natomiast, jako wysokiego poziomu semantyczne pojęcia terminów, aspekty mają zwykle bardziej uogólnione reprezentacje. Jednak konwencjonalne metody nie mogą jednocześnie wykorzystywać informacji o aspektach i terminach, ponieważ niewiele zbiorów danych jest adnotacjonowanych zarówno aspektami, jak i terminami. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową sieć głębokiej pamięci z pamięcią pomocniczą, aby rozwiązać ten problem. W naszym modelu pamięć główna służy do uchwycenia ważnych słów kontekstowych dla klasyfikacji sentymentów. Dodatkowo budujemy pamięć pomocniczą, aby domyślnie konwertować aspekty i terminy do siebie nawzajem, a obie podawać do pamięci głównej. Dzięki interakcji dwóch wspomnień można nauczyć się cech aspektów i terminów jednocześnie. Porównujemy nasz model z najnowocześniejszymi metodami na czterech zbiorach danych z różnych dziedzin. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują skuteczność naszego modelu.', 'no': 'I aspektnivå er det to vanlege oppgåver: å identifisera sentimenten på eit aspekt (kategori) eller eit uttrykk. Som spesifikke instansar for aspektar, skjer vilkåra eksplisivt i setningar. Det er nyttig for modeller å fokusera på nærare kontekstord. I contrast, as høg nivå semantiske konseptar av vilkåra, har aspektar vanlegvis meir generelt representasjonar. Men konvensjonelle metodar kan ikkje bruka informasjonen om aspektar og vilkår samtidig, fordi få datasett er merka med både aspektar og vilkår. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt dyp minnet nettverk med hjelpeminne for å handsama dette problemet. I modellen vår vert eit hovudminne brukt for å henta dei viktige kontekstord for sentimentklassifikasjon. I tillegg bygger vi ei hjelpeminne for å konvertera aspektar og vilkår til kvarandre, og føre begge dei til hovudminnet. Med interaksjonen mellom to minne kan funksjonane for aspektar og vilkåra lærast samtidig. Vi sammenliknar modellen vårt med kunstmetodane på fire datasett frå ulike domene. Eksperimentale resultatene viser effektiviteten av modellen vår.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය ස්තූතිය සමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණයෙන්, සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩක් දෙකක් තියෙනවා: පැත්ත (විශේෂ) නැත්තම් පරීක්ෂණයෙන විශේෂ සැකසුම් වලින්, වර්තන වර්තන වලින් විශේෂ විදිහට වෙනවා. මොඩල් වලට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයි. විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, උඩ ස්තූතිය සෙමැන්ටික් අදහස් වලින්, සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම තරම් සාමා නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් එකම වෙලාවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සහ වර්ත්\u200dරයේ තොරතුරු පාවිච්චි කරන්න බෑ, මොකද දත්ත සේට් ටි මේ පැත්තට, අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න අධ්\u200dයම මතක ජාලයක් සමග උදව් මතක තියෙනවා. අපේ මදුලියේ ප්\u200dරධාන මතකයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වැදගත් වචන වචන අල්ලගන්න. ඒ වගේම, අපි උදව් මතකයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන මතකයෙන් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් එක්කෙනෙක් වෙනස් කර මතකය දෙකක් අතර සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන්, ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය අතර සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුව අපි අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් වලින් තොරතුරු හතරක් තියෙන්නේ. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නෙ අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා.', 'ta': 'விகிதத்தில் உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தலில் இரண்டு பொதுவான செயல்கள் இருக்கின்றன: ஒரு பக்கத்தின் உணர்வு (வகைப்பு) அல்லது ஒரு காலத்தை காணல விளைவுகளின் குறிப்பிட்ட நிகழ்வுகளாக, வாக்கியங்களில் வெளிப்படையாக நடக்கும். மாதிரிகளுக்கு இது அருகிலுள்ள சூழல் வார்த்தைகளை கவனம் செலுத்துவதற்கு பயனுள்ளது. மாறாக, அதிக மட்டத்தில் அரைப்புருவான கருத்துக்களாக இருக்கும், பாகங்கள் வழக்கமாக அதிக பொதுவான பாதிப்புகள் இரு ஆனால் வழக்கமான முறைமைகள் ஒரே நேரத்தில் பாகங்கள் மற்றும் விளக்கங்கள் தகவலை பயன்படுத்த முடியாது, ஏனெனில் சில தகவல் அமைப்புகள் இரு பக்கங இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனையை முகவரிக்க ஒரு புதிய நினைவகத்தின் ஆழமான நினைவகத்தின் வலைப்பின் எங்கள் மாதிரியில், ஒரு முக்கிய நினைவகம் உணர்வு வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான முக்கியமான சொல்லை பிடிக்க பயன்படுத்தப மேலும், நாம் ஒரு கூட்ட நினைவகத்தை உருவாக்கி ஒருவர் மற்றும் ஒருவருக்கொருவர் பக்கங்களை மற்றும் விருப்பங்களை பொருத்தமாக மாற இரண்டு நினைவகங்களுக்கும் இடையேயுள்ள இடைவெளிப்பாடுகளின் குணங்கள் மற்றும் விளக்கங்களுக்கும் தன்மைகள் அதே ந நாம் நான்கு தரவு அமைப்புகளில் இருந்து நான்கு முறைமையை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் எங்கள் மாதிரியின் விளைவை காண்பிக்கிறது.', 'sv': 'I aspektnivå sentiment klassificering finns det två gemensamma uppgifter: att identifiera sentiment för en aspekt (kategori) eller en term. Som specifika exempel på aspekter förekommer termer uttryckligen i meningar. Det är fördelaktigt för modeller att fokusera på närliggande sammanhangsord. Däremot, som semantiska begrepp på hög nivå av termer, aspekter har vanligtvis mer generaliserbara representationer. Men konventionella metoder kan inte använda information om aspekter och termer samtidigt, eftersom få datauppsättningar är kommenterade med både aspekter och termer. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt djupminnesnätverk med hjälpminne för att lösa detta problem. I vår modell används ett huvudminne för att fånga viktiga kontextord för sentimentklassificering. Dessutom bygger vi ett hjälpminne för att implicit konvertera aspekter och termer till varandra, och matar dem båda till huvudminnet. Genom samspelet mellan två minnen kan aspekter och termer läras samtidigt. Vi jämför vår modell med de senaste metoderna på fyra datauppsättningar från olika domäner. De experimentella resultaten visar hur effektiv vår modell är.', 'sr': 'U klasifikaciji sentiment a na nivou aspekta postoje dva zajednička zadatka: identificiranje osjećaja aspekta (kategorija) ili termina. Kao posebni slučajevi aspekta, uvjeti se pojavljuju u rečenicama. Korisno je da se modeli fokusiraju na približne kontekstske reči. U suprotnom, kao semantički koncepti termina visokog nivoa, aspekti obično imaju više generalizovanih predstavljanja. Međutim, konvencionalne metode ne mogu iskoristiti informacije o aspektima i uslovima u isto vrijeme, jer su nekoliko podataka notatirane i aspektima i uslovima. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu duboku mrežu pamćenja sa pomoænim pamćenjem da riješimo ovaj problem. U našem modelu, glavno pamćenje se koristi da uhvatimo važne kontekstske reči za klasifikaciju sentiment a. Osim toga, izgradili smo pomaganje da se implicitno preobratimo aspekte i uslovi jedno drugom, i hranimo oboje na glavnu sećanje. Sa interakcijom između dva sećanja, karakteristike aspekta i uslova mogu istovremeno naučiti. Uspoređujemo naš model sa metodama umjetnosti na četiri seta podataka iz različitih domena. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju efikasnost našeg modela.', 'ur': 'منظور سطح احساسات کلاسیفوں میں دو مشترک کام ہیں: ایک منظور (کاٹی) یا ایک منظور کی احساسات شناسایی کرنے کے لئے۔ منظور کی مخصوص مثالیں کے طور پر، کلمات صریح طور پر اتر جاتے ہیں. مدلکوں کے لئے فائدہ ہے کہ نزدیک کنٹیکسٹ کلمات پر تمرکز کریں. مقابلہ میں، اچھی سطح کے سیمنٹی نظریں کی طرح، الگوں میں معمولاً زیادہ عمومی نظریں ہیں۔ However, conventional methods cannot use the information of aspects and terms at the same time, because few datasets are annotated both aspects and terms. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے ایک نوم عمیق مہمانی نیٹورک کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے موڈل میں، ایک اصلی یادگاری کا استعمال کیا جاتا ہے کہ احساس کلاسیفوں کے لئے اہم کنٹنسیٹ لغات کو پکڑنے کے لئے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک مددگار یاد بناتے ہیں کہ ایک دوسرے کے سامنے اندازے اور شرمگاہوں کو ایک دوسرے کے سامنے تبدیل کریں اور دونوں کو اصلی یاد میں کھلائیں۔ دو یاد کے درمیان تعامل کے ساتھ، الگوں اور شرمگاہوں کی تعامل ایک ہی طرح سکھائی جاتی ہے۔ ہم اپنے مدل کو مختلف ڈومین سے چار ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ فرق کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش نتیجے ہمارے مدل کی عمدگی دکھاتے ہیں.', 'so': 'Xirfaha heerka iskuulka ah waxaa ku jira laba shaqo oo wada caadi ah: si loo aqoonsado fikradda dhinaca (qeybta) ama waqti. Sida qaablada gaar ah, qeybaha waxaa si cad looga dhaqdhaqaaqayaa. Waxaa faa’iido u ah in sameynta aad ku kalsoonaato hadallada soo dhow. Isku saabsan, sida fikrada heerka sare oo semantika ah waxay inta badan leeyihiin noocyo badan oo la caadi ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qaababka caadiga ah ma isticmaali karo macluumaadka dhinaca iyo sharciga, sababtoo ah kooxo macluumaad ayaa ku dhibaataysa labada dhinac iyo sharaf. Warqaddan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa shabakadda xasuusta ee mool dheer oo xasuus la xiriira si aan u xambaarano dhibaatadan. Tusaale ahaan xusuusta ugu horeeya waxaa loo isticmaalaa in loo qabsado hadalka muhiimka ah oo loo qoro fasaxa xisaabta. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaan dhisnaa xusuus dheeraad ah si aan ugu beddelno dhinacyada iyo xirfadaha midka kale, waxaana u quudinnaa labadooda xusuusta ugu horeeya. Isku xiriirka labada xubnaha waxaa islamarkaasna la baran karaa qeybaha iyo xirfadaha. Tusaale ahaan ayaannu uga dhignaa noocyada xaaladda farshaxanka afarta macluumaadka ee meelaha kala duduwan. arimaha imtixaanka waxay muujiyaan saameynta modellkayaga.', 'vi': 'Về phân loại cảm xúc cấp độ, có hai nhiệm vụ chung là xác định cảm xúc của một khía cạnh (phân loại) hay một thuật ngữ. Như các trường hợp đặc biệt về các khía cạnh, các chữ thường xuất hiện. Nó có lợi cho các mẫu để tập trung vào những từ ngữ ngữ ngữ cảnh gần đó. Tuy nhiên, theo nghĩa ngữ pháp cấp cao, các khía cạnh thường có các biểu tượng tổng quát hơn. Tuy nhiên, các phương pháp thông thường không thể sử dụng thông tin về các khía cạnh và ngữ cùng lúc, vì ít bộ dữ liệu được ghi chú với cả các khía cạnh và các thuật ngữ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mạng bộ nhớ sâu mới với bộ nhớ phụ trợ để giải quyết vấn đề này. Trong mô hình của chúng ta, một bộ nhớ chính được dùng để ghi lại những từ ngữ cảnh quan trọng để phân loại cảm xúc. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi xây dựng một bộ nhớ phụ tùng để ngấm ngầm chuyển các khía cạnh và điều kiện sang nhau, và chuyển cả hai vào bộ nhớ chính. Với giao tiếp giữa hai ký ức, các khía cạnh và điều kiện có thể học cùng lúc. Chúng tôi so sánh mô hình với các phương pháp hiện đại trên bốn bộ dữ liệu từ các miền khác nhau. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy hiệu quả của mẫu này.', 'uz': "Aniqlik darajada hissiyotga ikkita umumiy vazifalar mavjud: hisobni aniqlash (kategori) yoki bir so'zni aniqlash uchun. @ info: whatsthis Name Ikkinchi darajada, eng darajada semantik g'oyalari sifatida, oddiy darajalar qo'shiladi. Lekin umumiy usullar bir vaqtda maʼlumotni foydalanib boʻlmaydi, chunki bir nechta maʼlumotlar soni va soʻzlar bilan murakkablaydi. Bu hujjatda, biz bu muammolani boshqarish uchun qoʻshimcha xotira tarmoqni tahlil qilamiz. Modemizdagi asosiy xotira foydalanuvchi darajadagi muhim soʻzlarni qabul qilish uchun ishlatiladi. Ko'pchilik, biz bir-бирларимизга нисбатан ўзгартириш учун мос xotira yaramiz, икковларининг асосий xotira qo'shishimiz. Ikki xotira orasidagi interfeys bilan boshqa shakllar va tugmalar bir xil bilan o'rganadi. Biz modelimizni boshqa davlatdan to'rtta maʼlumotlar tartibining holatiga kamaytamiz. Sinov natijalari modelmizning effektini ko'rsatadi.", 'da': 'I aspektniveau sentiment klassificering er der to fælles opgaver: at identificere sentiment af et aspekt (kategori) eller et udtryk. Som specifikke tilfælde af aspekter forekommer termer eksplicit i sætninger. Det er gavnligt for modeller at fokusere på nærliggende kontekst ord. Som semantiske begreber på højt niveau har aspekter derimod mere generaliserede repræsentationer. Men konventionelle metoder kan ikke udnytte oplysninger om aspekter og termer på samme tid, fordi få datasæt er noteret med både aspekter og termer. I denne artikel foreslår vi et nyt dybt hukommelsesnetværk med ekstra hukommelse til at løse dette problem. I vores model bruges en hovedhukommelse til at indfange de vigtige kontekst ord for sentiment klassificering. Derudover bygger vi en ekstra hukommelse til implicit at konvertere aspekter og termer til hinanden, og fodre dem begge til hovedhukommelsen. Med samspillet mellem to minder kan aspekter og termer læres samtidig. Vi sammenligner vores model med de nyeste metoder på fire datasæt fra forskellige domæner. De eksperimentelle resultater viser effektiviteten af vores model.', 'nl': 'In aspect level sentiment classificatie zijn er twee gemeenschappelijke taken: het identificeren van het sentiment van een aspect (categorie) of een term. Als specifieke gevallen van aspecten komen termen expliciet voor in zinnen. Het is gunstig voor modellen om zich te concentreren op nabijgelegen contextwoorden. Als semantische begrippen op hoog niveau daarentegen hebben aspecten meestal meer algemene representaties. Echter, conventionele methoden kunnen de informatie van aspecten en termen niet tegelijkertijd gebruiken, omdat weinig datasets zijn geannoteerd met zowel aspecten als termen. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuw diep geheugennetwerk voor met hulpgeheugen om dit probleem aan te pakken. In ons model wordt een hoofdgeheugen gebruikt om de belangrijke contextwoorden voor sentimentclassificatie vast te leggen. Daarnaast bouwen we een hulpgeheugen om impliciet aspecten en termen naar elkaar om te zetten, en ze beide naar het hoofdgeheugen te voeden. Met de interactie tussen twee herinneringen kunnen de kenmerken van aspecten en termen tegelijkertijd worden geleerd. We vergelijken ons model met de state-of-the-art methoden op vier datasets uit verschillende domeinen. De experimentele resultaten tonen de effectiviteit van ons model aan.', 'hr': 'U klasifikaciji osjećaja na razini aspekta postoje dva zajednička zadatka: identificiranje osjećaja aspekta (kategorija) ili termina. Kao specifični slučajevi aspekta, uvjeti se pojavljuju u rečenicama. Korisno je da se modeli fokusiraju na blizu kontekstske riječi. Za suprotno, kao semantički koncepti termina visoke razine, aspekti obično imaju više generaliziranih predstavljanja. Međutim, konvencionalne metode ne mogu iskoristiti informacije o aspektima i uvjetima u isto vrijeme, jer se nekoliko podataka primjećuje i aspektima i uvjetima. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu duboku mrežu sjećanja s pomoćnim sjećanjem da riješimo ovaj problem. U našem modelu, glavna sjećanja se koristi za uhvatiti važne kontekstske riječi za klasifikaciju osjećaja. Osim toga, izgradimo pomoćnu pamćenje da se implicitno preobratimo aspekte i uvjete jedno drugom, i hranimo oboje na glavnu sjećanje. S interakcijom između dvije sjećanja, karakteristike aspekta i termina mogu se istovremeno naučiti. Uspoređujemo naš model sa metodama umjetnosti na četiri podatke iz različitih domena. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju učinkovitost našeg modela.', 'de': 'Bei der Einstufung von Stimmungen auf Seitenebene gibt es zwei gemeinsame Aufgaben: das Erkennen der Stimmungen eines Aspekts (Kategorie) oder eines Begriffs. Als spezifische Instanzen von Aspekten treten Begriffe explizit in Sätzen auf. Es ist vorteilhaft für Modelle, sich auf nahe gelegene Kontextwörter zu konzentrieren. Im Gegensatz dazu haben Aspekte als hochrangige semantische Begriffe meist generalisierbare Repräsentationen. Allerdings können herkömmliche Methoden die Informationen von Aspekten und Begriffen nicht gleichzeitig nutzen, da nur wenige Datensätze sowohl mit Aspekten als auch mit Begriffen annotiert werden. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein neuartiges Deep Memory Netzwerk mit Hilfsspeicher vor, um dieses Problem zu lösen. In unserem Modell wird ein Hauptspeicher verwendet, um die wichtigen Kontextwörter für die Stimmungsklassifizierung zu erfassen. Darüber hinaus bauen wir einen Hilfsspeicher auf, um implizit Aspekte und Begriffe miteinander umzuwandeln und beide dem Hauptspeicher zuzuführen. Durch das Zusammenspiel zweier Erinnerungen können Aspekte und Begriffe gleichzeitig erlernt werden. Wir vergleichen unser Modell mit den modernsten Methoden auf vier Datensätzen aus verschiedenen Domänen. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse belegen die Wirksamkeit unseres Modells.', 'ko': '방면급 정서 분류에는 두 가지 흔히 볼 수 있는 임무가 있는데 그것이 바로 식별방면(종류)이나 용어의 정서이다.방면의 구체적인 실례로서 용어는 문장에 명확하게 나타난다.모형은 부근의 상하문어를 주목하는 것이 유익하다.그에 비해 용어로서의 고급 의미 개념은 일반적으로 더욱 일반화된 표현을 가지고 있다.그러나 전통적인 방법은 방면과 용어의 정보를 동시에 이용할 수 없다. 왜냐하면 데이터 집합이 방면과 용어를 동시에 사용하여 주석을 하는 경우가 매우 드물기 때문이다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 보조 메모리를 가진 깊이 있는 메모리 네트워크를 제시하여 이 문제를 해결했다.우리의 모델에서 메인 메모리는 감정 분류를 하기 위해 중요한 상하문어를 포획하는 데 사용된다.그 밖에 우리는 방면과 용어를 은밀하게 변환하고 그것들을 주 메모리에 제공하는 보조 메모리를 구축했다.두 기억 간의 상호작용을 통해 방면과 용어의 특징을 동시에 학습할 수 있다.우리는 우리의 모델을 서로 다른 분야에서 온 네 개의 데이터 집합의 최신 방법과 비교했다.실험 결과는 이 모델의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'bg': 'В класификацията на сентимента на ниво аспект има две общи задачи: да се идентифицира сентимента на аспект (категория) или термин. Като специфични случаи на аспекти термините изрично се появяват в изреченията. Полезно е моделите да се фокусират върху близките контекстни думи. За разлика от това, като семантични понятия на високо ниво, аспектите обикновено имат по-обобщени представи. Въпреки това, конвенционалните методи не могат да използват информацията за аспекти и термини едновременно, тъй като малко набори от данни са анотирани както с аспекти, така и с термини. В настоящата статия предлагаме нова дълбока памет мрежа с спомагателна памет за решаване на този проблем. В нашия модел основна памет се използва за улавяне на важните контекстни думи за класификация на сантимента. В допълнение, ние изграждаме спомагателна памет, която имплицитно преобразува аспекти и термини един към друг, и подава и двамата към основната памет. С взаимодействието между два спомена характеристиките на аспектите и термините могат да се научат едновременно. Сравняваме нашия модел с най-съвременните методи на четири набора от данни от различни области. Експерименталните резултати показват ефективността на нашия модел.', 'sw': 'Katika kutangazwa kwa kiwango fulani, kuna kazi mbili za kawaida: kutambua hisia za mtazamo (kigezo) au muhula. Kama matukio maalum ya mambo, maneno yanatokea wazi katika hukumu. Ni faida kwa mifano kutangaza maneno yanayokaribia. Tofauti na hilo, kama dhana ya kiwango cha juu ya mifano, mambo mara nyingi huwa na uwakilishi wa kawaida. Hata hivyo, mbinu za kawaida haziwezi kutumia taarifa za vipengele na vipengele kwa wakati huo, kwa sababu seti chache za taarifa zinaudhi kwa upande na vipengele viwili. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mtandao wa riwaya wa kina wa kumbukumbu yenye kumbukumbu za kiunganisha kutangaza tatizo hili. In our model, a main memory is used to capture the important context words for sentiment classification.  Zaidi ya hayo, tunajenga kumbukumbu ya ushirikiano ili kubadilisha vipengele na vipengele vinginevyo, na kuwalisha wote kwenye kumbukumbu kuu. Kuhusu uhusiano kati ya kumbukumbu mbili, tabia za mambo na maneno yanaweza kujifunza kwa wakati mmoja. Tunawalinganisha mifano yetu na hali ya sanaa katika seti nne za data kutoka maeneo tofauti. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha ufanisi wa mifano yetu.', 'af': "In aspektvlak sentiment klasifikasie is daar twee gemeenskare opdragte: om die sentiment van 'n aspek (kategorie) of 'n term te identifiseer. As spesifieke voorbeelde van aspekte, voorwaardes uitsonderlik in setinge voorkom. Dit is nuttig vir modele om te fokus op naby kontekswoorde. In contrast, as hoë vlak semantiese konsepte van terme, het aspekte gewoonlik meer generaliseerbare voorstellings. Maar konvensionele metodes kan nie die inligting van aspekte en terme op dieselfde tyd gebruik nie, omdat sommige datastelle met beide aspekte en terme aangekies word. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n roman diep geheue netwerk met hulpgeheue om hierdie probleem te adres. In ons model word 'n hoofgeheue gebruik om die belangrike kontekswoorde vir sentiment klasifikasie te vang. In addition, we build an auxiliary memory to implicitly convert aspects and terms to each other, and feed both to the main memory. Met die interaksie tussen twee geheue kan die funksies van aspekte en terme eenmaal leer word. Ons vergelyk ons model met die state-of-the-art metodes op vier datastelle van verskillende domeine. Die eksperimentale resultate wys die effektiviteit van ons model.", 'tr': 'Aspect derejesi duyglamasynda, bir aspekt (kategoriýa) ýa bir termynyň duygyny tanımlamak üçin iki işi bar. Şahsy görnüşler ýaly sözleriň aýratynda görünýär. ýakyn kontekst sözlerine üns bermek nusgasyna ýok. Daha tersi, semantik düşünceler şeklinde, aspektler genel şekilde daha düzenli suratlar bar. Emma, adil metodlar aspektler we şartlaryň maglumatyny bir wagtda ulanyp bilmeýär, sebäbi birnäçe sanat setirleri hem aspektler hem şertler bilen duýgunlaşdyrylýar. Bu kagyzda, biz bu meseleyi çözmek üçin romanlaryň derin ýamda a ňry kömekleyici ýada taýýarlamagy teklip edýäris. Biziň nusgymyzda, hasaplanjak üçin wajyp kontekst sözleri duýdurmak üçin ullanýar. Munuň üstünde, aspektleri we şartlary bir-birine üýtgetmek üçin kömekleyici bir ýadym inşa edýäris we ikisiniň ikisiniň de esasy ýadyma üýtgedýäris. Iki ýatlar arasyndaky etkileşim bilen aspektler we şartlaryň özellikleri bir gezek öwrenip biler. Biziň modelimizi farklı nokadan dört sanat setirlerine karşılaştyrýarys. Denetim netijeleri nusgamyzyň täsirini görkezýär.', 'id': 'Dalam klasifikasi sensasi tingkat aspek, ada dua tugas umum: untuk mengidentifikasi sensasi aspek (kategori) atau istilah. Sebagai contoh spesifik aspek, istilah secara eksplicit terjadi dalam kalimat. Ini berguna bagi model untuk fokus pada kata konteks dekat. Sebaliknya, sebagai konsep semantis tingkat tinggi dari istilah, aspek biasanya memiliki representation yang lebih umum. Namun, metode konvensional tidak dapat menggunakan informasi dari aspek dan istilah pada saat yang sama, karena beberapa set data dicatat dengan kedua aspek dan istilah. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan jaringan ingatan dalam yang baru dengan ingatan bantuan untuk mengatasi masalah ini. In our model, a main memory is used to capture the important context words for sentiment classification.  Selain itu, kita membangun memori bantuan untuk secara implicit mengubah aspek dan istilah satu sama lain, dan memberi makan keduanya ke memori utama. Dengan interaksi antara dua kenangan, ciri-ciri aspek dan istilah dapat belajar secara bersamaan. Kita membandingkan model kita dengan metode terbaik pada empat set data dari domain yang berbeda. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan efektivitas model kita.', 'fa': 'در مجموعه مرحله احساسات، دو کار مشترک وجود دارد: برای شناسایی احساسات یک منطقه یا یک term. به عنوان نمونه\u200cهای خاصی از نقطه\u200cها، شرایط مشخصا در جمله\u200cها اتفاق می\u200cافتد. برای مدلها سودمند است که روی کلمات محیط نزدیک تمرکز کنید. در مقابل، به عنوان نظریه\u200cهای semantic طبقه بالا از شرایط، نقطه\u200cها معمولاً نمایش\u200cهای قابل توجهی بیشتری دارند. ولی روش\u200cهای معمولی نمی\u200cتوانند اطلاعات مرحله\u200cها و شرایط را در همان زمان استفاده کنند، زیرا چند تنظیم داده\u200cها با هر دو مرحله و شرایط مشخص می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک شبکه عمیق حافظه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که حافظه کمک برای حل این مشکل کند. در مدل ما، یک حافظه اصلی برای دستگیر کردن کلمات محیط مهم برای مختصات احساسات استفاده می شود. علاوه بر این، ما یک حافظه کمک برای تبدیل کردن نقطه و شرایط به یکدیگر ساختیم، و هر دو را به حافظه اصلی غذا می دهیم. با تعامل بین دو خاطره، ویژه\u200cهای منبع و شرایط می\u200cتوانند همزمان یاد بگیرند. ما مدل خودمان را با روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنر بر چهار مجموعه داده\u200cهای مختلف مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. نتایج آزمایشی موثرت مدل ما را نشان می دهد.', 'am': 'በተለያዩ ደረጃዎች ላይ የስሜት መግለጫ ሁለት የተለየ ስራዎች አሉ፤ የክፍለ ጉዳይ (category) ወይም ቁጥር ማረጋገጥ፡፡ በተለየ ጉዳዮች ምሳሌ፣ ግንኙነቱ በተለየ ፍርድ ውስጥ ነው፡፡ ለምሳሌዎች በአቅራቢያ ቃላት ላይ ማክሰል ይጠቅማል፡፡ በተለይ፣ ከፍተኛ ደረጃው የsemantic አካላት እንደሚመስል፣ በተለይ ጉዳዮች ላይ አብዛኛዎቹ የሚቆጠሩ ናቸው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የሥልጣን ሥርዓቶች የውይይት እና የግንኙነት መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም አይችሉም፣ ምክንያቱም ጥቂቶች የዳታ ሰርቨሮች በሁለቱም ክፍሎች እና ግንኙነቶች ይደሰታሉ፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ የጠለቀ የመስታሰቢያ መረብ ለመጠቀም የዚህን ጉዳይ ለመጠየቅ ጥልቅ ማስታወሻ ማሰሪያ እናሳልጋለን፡፡ በሞዴል፣ መጀመሪያው ማስታወስ ለስሜት መፍጠር የተጠቃሚ ቃላትን ለመያዝ ይጠቀማል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የግንኙነትን እና ግንኙነትን እርስ በርሳቸው ለመለወጥ የሚታሰብ መታሰቢያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በሁለቱ ማስታወሻ መካከል ግንኙነት፣ የፊደሎችን እና ግንኙነቶችን በአንድ ጊዜ ይማራሉ፡፡ ምሳሌያችንን በአራቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ እናሳያታለን፡፡ The experimental results demonstrate the effectiveness of our model.', 'hy': "Ապրեկտիվ մակարդակի զգացմունքների դասակարգում կա երկու ընդհանուր խնդիր' որոշել մի ասպեկտիվ (կատեգորիա) կամ տերմին զգացմունքը: Որպես կոնկրետ ասպեկտների օրինակներ, նախադասություններում բացատրական տերմինները տեղի են ունենում: Մոդելների համար օգտակար է կենտրոնանալ մոտ գտնվող կոնտեքստի բառերի վրա: Ի հակառակ, որպես տերմինների բարձր մակարդակի սեմանտիկ հասկացություններ, ասպեկտները սովորաբար ունեն ավելի ընդհանուր ներկայացումներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, ավանդական մեթոդները չեն կարող միաժամանակ օգտագործել ասպեկտների և տերմինների տեղեկատվությունը, քանի որ մի քանի տվյալների համակարգեր գրված են երկու ասպեկտներով և տերմիներով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր խորը հիշողության ցանց, որը ունի օգնական հիշողություն այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար: Մեր մոդելի մեջ հիմնական հիշողությունը օգտագործվում է զգացմունքների դասակարգման կարևոր կոնտեքստի բառերի նկարահանման համար: Ավելին, մենք կառուցում ենք օգնական հիշողություն, որպեսզի միանգամից փոխակերպենք ասպեկտները և տերմինները, և երկուսն էլ կերակրենք հիմնական հիշողությանը: Երկու հիշողությունների միջև փոխազդեցության միջոցով ասպեկտների և տերմինների առանձնահատկությունները կարող են միաժամանակ սովորվել: Մենք համեմատում ենք մեր մոդելը տարբեր բնագավառների չորս տվյալների համակարգերի հետ: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր մոդելի արդյունավետությունը:", 'az': "Aspect səviyyəsində hisslərin səviyyəsində, bir hisslərin (kategoriya) ya da bir terminin hissini tanımlamaq üçün iki ortaq işdir. Bütün aspektlərin müəyyən məsəlləri kimi, şartlar açıq-aydın cümlələrdə olur. Modellərə yaxın məlumat sözlərinə odaqlanmaq faydası. Əksinə, yüksək seviyyət semantik məsələlər kimi, aspektlər genellikle daha genellik göstəricilər vardır. Lakin, conventional methods can't use the information of aspects and terms at the same time, because few data sets are annotated with both aspects and terms. Bu kağızda, bu problemi çəkmək üçün yeni bir məlumat a ğını təklif edirik. Bizim modelimizdə, hisslər klasifikasyonu üçün möhkəm məlumat sözlərini almaq üçün ana yaddaş istifadə edilir. Əvvəlcə, bir-birimizə aspektləri və şartları dəyişdirmək üçün yardımcı bir yada qurduq və ikisini də ana yada salmaq üçün yeyirik. İki anı arasındakı təşkil ilə, aspektlərin və şartların özellikləri eyni zamanda öyrənə bilər. Bizim modelimizi müxtəlif domenalardan dörd veri qurğuları ilə müəyyən edirik. Müxtəlif sonuçlar modelimizin etkinliğini göstərir.", 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন স্তরের অনুভূতি বিভাগে দুটি সাধারণ কাজ রয়েছে: একটি প্রতিক্রিয়া (বিভাগ) অথবা একটি মেয়েদ চিহ্নিত করার জন্য। বিষয়গুলোর নির্দিষ্ট ঘটনা হিসেবে স্পষ্টভাবে কারাদণ্ডে শব্দগুলো স্পষ্টভাবে ঘটছে। It is beneficial for models to focus on nearby context words.  বিপরীতে, উচ্চপর্যায়ের সেমেন্টিক ধারণা হিসেবে সাধারণত বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধিত্ব রয়েছে। কিন্তু সাধারণ মাধ্যম একই সাথে বিভিন্ন দিক এবং শর্তের তথ্য ব্যবহার করতে পারে না, কারণ সামান্য তথ্যের ব্যাপারে বিরক্তিকর। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি গভীর স্মৃতির নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করছি যার সাথে এই সমস্যার কথা বলা যায়। আমাদের মডেলে একটি প্রধান স্মৃতি ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে অনুভূতিক শ্রেণীকরণের জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কন্টেক্সটেক্ এছাড়াও, আমরা এক স্মৃতি তৈরি করি যাতে একে অপরের সাথে বিভিন্ন দিক এবং শর্ত পরিবর্তন করে এবং উভয়কে প্রধান স্মৃতিতে খাওয়া যায়। দুই স্মৃতির মধ্যে যোগাযোগের মাধ্যমে দুই বিষয় এবং শর্তের বৈশিষ্ট্য একই সাথে শিখতে পারে। আমরা আমাদের মডেলের সাথে বিভিন্ন ডোমেইন থেকে চারটি ডাটাসেটের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প পদ্ধতিতে তুলনা করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল আমাদের মডেলের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে।', 'bs': 'U klasifikaciji osjećanja na nivou aspekta postoje dva zajednička zadatka: identificiranje osjećaja aspekta (kategorija) ili termina. Kao specifični slučajevi aspekta, uvjeti se pojavljuju u rečenicama. Korisno je da se modeli fokusiraju na blizu kontekstske riječi. Za suprotno, kao semantički koncepti termina visoke nivoe, aspekti obično imaju visoke generalizacije predstavljanja. Međutim, konvencionalne metode ne mogu iskoristiti informacije o aspektima i uvjetima u isto vrijeme, jer su nekoliko podataka annotirane i aspektima i uvjetima. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu duboku mrežu sjećanja sa pomoćnim sjećanjem da riješimo ovaj problem. U našem modelu, glavna sjećanja se koristi da uhvatimo važne kontekstske riječi za klasifikaciju osjećaja. Osim toga, izgradimo pomoćnu pamćenje da se implicitno preobratimo aspekte i uvjete jedno drugom, i hranimo oboje na glavnu sjećanje. Sa interakcijom između dva sjećanja, karakteristike aspekta i termina mogu se istovremeno naučiti. Uspoređujemo naš model sa metodama umjetnosti na četiri dataseta iz različitih domena. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju učinkovitost našeg modela.', 'sq': 'Në klasifikimin e nivelit të ndjenjave, ka dy detyra të përbashkëta: për të identifikuar ndjenjat e një aspekti (kategori) ose një term. Si raste specifike të aspekteve, termat ndodhin shprehësisht në fraza. Është e dobishme për modelet të përqëndrohen në fjalët e afërta të kontekstit. Në ndryshim, si koncepte semantike të nivelit të lartë të termave, aspektet zakonisht kanë përfaqësime më të gjeneralizueshme. Megjithatë, metodat konvencionale nuk mund të përdorin informacionin e aspekteve dhe termave në të njëjtën kohë, sepse pak grupe të dhënash janë shënuar me të dy aspektet dhe termat. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një rrjet të ri të kujtesës së thellë me kujtesë ndihmëse për të trajtuar këtë problem. Në modelin tonë, një kujtim kryesor përdoret për të kapur fjalët e rëndësishme të kontekstit për klasifikimin e ndjenjave. Përveç kësaj, ne ndërtojmë një kujtesë ndihmëse për të konvertuar implicitisht aspektet dhe termat në njëri-tjetrin, dhe ushqejmë të dy në kujtesën kryesore. Me ndërveprimin midis dy kujtimeve, karakteristikat e aspekteve dhe termave mund të mësohen njëkohësisht. Ne krahasojmë modelin tonë me metodat më të mëdha në katër grupe të dhënash nga fusha të ndryshme. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë efektshmërinë e modelit tonë.', 'ca': "En la classificació del nivell de sentiment, hi ha dues tasques comunes: identificar el sentiment d'un aspecte (categoria) o d'un terme. Com a exemples específics d'aspectes, els termes ocorren explícitament en frases. It is beneficial for models to focus on nearby context words.  En canvi, com conceptes semàntics de termes d'alt nivell, els aspectes normalment tenen representacions més generalitzables. Però els mètodes convencionals no poden utilitzar la informació dels aspectes i termes al mateix temps, perquè pocs conjunts de dades estan anotats amb ambdós aspectes i termes. En aquest article, proposem una nova xarxa de memòria profunda amb memòria auxiliar per abordar aquest problem a. En el nostre model, es utilitza una memòria principal per capturar les paraules contextuals importants per a la classificació del sentiment. A més, construïm una memòria auxiliar per convertir implícitament aspectes i termes entre ells i alimentar-los a la memòria principal. Amb la interacció entre dos records, les característiques dels aspectes i termes es poden aprendre simultàniament. Comparem el nostre model amb els mètodes més moderns en quatre conjunts de dades de dominis diferents. Els resultats experimentals demostren l'eficacia del nostre model.", 'cs': 'V klasifikaci sentimentů na úrovni stran existují dva běžné úkoly: identifikovat sentiment aspektu (kategorie) nebo termínu. Jako specifické případy aspektů se termíny explicitně vyskytují ve větách. Pro modely je výhodné se zaměřit na blízká kontextová slova. Naproti tomu, jako vysoká úroveň sémantických konceptů termínů, aspekty mají obvykle více zobecňovatelné reprezentace. Konvenční metody však nemohou využít informace o aspektech a termínech současně, protože málo datových sad je anotováno jak aspekty, tak termíny. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou síť hluboké paměti s pomocnou pamětí k řešení tohoto problému. V našem modelu slouží hlavní paměť k zachycení důležitých kontextových slov pro klasifikaci sentimentů. Kromě toho vytvoříme pomocnou paměť, která implicitně převádí aspekty a termíny na sebe navzájem a obě je přivádí do hlavní paměti. Díky interakci mezi dvěma vzpomínkami se lze naučit rysy aspektů a pojmů současně. Porovnáváme náš model s nejmodernějšími metodami na čtyřech datových sadách z různých domén. Experimentální výsledky ukazují efektivitu našeho modelu.', 'et': 'Aspekti tasandi sentimentaalse klassifikatsiooni puhul on kaks ühist ülesannet: määrata kindlaks aspekti (kategooria) või termini tunnetus. Spetsiifiliste aspektide juhtumitena esinevad terminid sõnaselgelt lausetes. Mudelite jaoks on kasulik keskenduda lähedalasuvatele kontekstisõnadele. Seevastu kõrgetasemeliste semantiliste mõistetena on aspektidel tavaliselt rohkem üldistatavaid esitusi. Tavapärased meetodid ei saa aga samaaegselt kasutada aspektide ja terminite teavet, sest vähesed andmekogumid on märgitud nii aspektide kui terminitega. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse süvamälu võrgu abimäluga selle probleemi lahendamiseks. Meie mudelis kasutatakse peamist mälu tundete klassifitseerimiseks oluliste kontekstisõnade jäädvustamiseks. Lisaks ehitame lisamälu, et kaudselt teisendada aspekte ja termineid üksteisele ning toita need mõlemad põhimälusse. Kahe mälu vahelise koostoime abil saab aspektide ja terminite omadusi õppida samaaegselt. Võrdleme oma mudelit nelja eri valdkondade andmekogumi tipptasemel meetoditega. Katsetulemused näitavad meie mudeli efektiivsust.', 'fi': 'Aspektitason tunteiden luokittelussa on kaksi yhteistä tehtävää: tunnistaa aspektin (kategorian) tai termin tunteita. Erityisinä näkökulmien tapauksina termit esiintyvät nimenomaisesti lauseissa. Mallien kannattaa keskittyä läheisiin kontekstisanoihin. Sen sijaan termien korkean tason semanttisina käsitteinä aspekteilla on yleensä yleisempiä esityksiä. Perinteiset menetelmät eivät kuitenkaan pysty hyödyntämään näkökulmien ja termien informaatiota samanaikaisesti, koska harvoissa aineistoissa on sekä näkökulmia että termejä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta syvämuistiverkkoa apumuistilla tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Mallissamme käytetään päämuistia tunteiden luokittelun tärkeiden asiasanojen tallentamiseen. Lisäksi rakennamme apumuistin muuntamaan implisiittisesti aspekteja ja termejä toisiinsa ja syöttämään ne molemmat päämuistiin. Kahden muiston vuorovaikutuksessa näkökulmien ja termien piirteet voidaan oppia samanaikaisesti. Vertaamme malliamme uusimpiin menetelmiin neljässä eri toimialojen aineistossa. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat mallimme tehokkuuden.', 'jv': 'Where am I Taning Punika bener kanggo model kanggo dikondirno ing larang kapan-kapan drawable-action politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pember iki, kita mudhaya mpungan mat mungkar alat kanggo nganggo perusahaan iki. Attribute Nambah, kita nggawe jutahan memperbudhakan kanggo nggawe Aspekt karo ditambah sing berarti, lan nganggo alat iki dadi wis nguasakno Genjer-genjer We Periyandik model nambah karo state-of-the-arts gambar na 4 dataset sing perusahaan Rejalaké sing paling nggambaran anyar tentang ing rak model sing ngendaliké awak dhéwé', 'sk': 'Pri klasifikaciji sentimenta na ravni vidika obstajata dve skupni nalogi: identificirati sentimenta vidika (kategorije) ali izraza. Kot posebni primeri vidikov se izrazi izrecno pojavljajo v stavkih. Za modele je koristno, da se osredotočijo na bližnje kontekstne besede. Nasprotno pa imajo vidiki kot semantični koncepti izrazov na visoki ravni običajno bolj splošne reprezentacije. Vendar pa običajne metode ne morejo hkrati uporabljati informacij o vidikih in izrazih, saj je malo podatkovnih nizov označenih z vidiki in izrazi. V prispevku predlagamo novo globoko pomnilniško omrežje s pomožnim pomnilnikom za reševanje tega problema. V našem modelu se glavni spomin uporablja za zajem pomembnih kontekstnih besed za klasifikacijo sentimenta. Poleg tega gradimo pomožni pomnilnik za implicitno pretvorbo vidikov in izrazov drug v drugega in jih hranimo v glavni pomnilnik. Z interakcijo med dvema spominoma se lahko hkrati naučimo značilnosti vidikov in izrazov. Naš model primerjamo z najsodobnejšimi metodami na štirih naborih podatkov iz različnih področij. Poskusni rezultati kažejo učinkovitost našega modela.', 'ha': "Ga wani daraja na daban, akwai aiki biyu masu jama'a: dõmin a gane ma'anar wani aspecti (category) ko wata kalma. As specific instances of aspects, terms explicitly occur in sentences.  Yana da amfani wa misali da za'a zura zura zura zura kan maganar mazaɓa masu kusantar da shi. In da tsoho, kamar zaɓen kwanan daraja mai tsawo na kalma, masu da matsayi ko da kawaici sune wasu mataimaka masu mayarwa. A lokacin da, hanyoyin ɗabi'a, bã za su yi amfani da information ga masu sakan da ƙayyade sami daidai, kwani kaɗan za'a cũtar da tsarin database game da duk ƙarfe da ƙayyade. Daga wannan takardan, muna buƙata wani jerin memory mai ƙaranci cikin yanzu, da kumbar masu inganci zuwa masu shirya wa wannan mataimaki. Yana amfani da karatun lokaci a cikin shirin ayukanmu, ana yi amfani da in riƙon maganar muhimu wa danne-daraja. Ina ƙaranci, za'a sami karatun lokaci da muhimmanci zuwa ɗayan, kuma Mu ciyar da su dukansu zuwa kumbar muhimmi. Ana iya kula da tsakanin tunãni biyu, za'a iya karanta misãlai masu sakan da ƙayyade sami. Tuna samfani misalinmu da metoden-halin-sanar kan tsari huɗu daga guda daban. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna aikin misalinmu.", 'he': 'בקבוצת רגשות ברמה האפקטורית, ישנן שתי משימות משותפות: לזהות את רגשות האפקטוריה (קטגוריה) או המונח. בתור מקרים מסוימים של היבטים, מונחים מתרחשים באופן ברור במשפטים. זה מועיל לדוגמנים להתמקד במילים הקשר הקרובות. בניגוד לזה, בתור מושג סמנטי רמה גבוהה של מונחים, לפינקטים בדרך כלל יש מייצגים יותר גנרליזבי. However, conventional methods cannot utilize the information of aspects and terms at the same time, because few datasets are annotated with both aspects and terms.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים רשת זיכרון עמוק חדשה עם זיכרון נוסף כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הזאת. במודל שלנו, זיכרון ראשי משתמש בכדי לתפוס את מילים הקשר החשובות לקליסציה של רגשות. בנוסף, אנו בונים זיכרון נוסף כדי להפוך באופן מילוי את היבטים והתנאים אחד לשני, ולאכיל את שניהם לזכרון העיקרי. עם האינטראקציה בין שני זיכרונות, המאפיינים של היבטים והתנאים יכולים ללמוד באותו זמן. We compare our model with the state-of-the-art methods on four datasets from different domains.  התוצאות הניסוייות מראות את היעילות של הדוגמנית שלנו.', 'bo': 'སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་འདིའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་དབྱེ་རིམ་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་པའི་བྱ་རིམ་གཉིས་ཡོད། སྐྱེས་ཆོས་ཀྱི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་དག་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་སྦྱར་ཡོད། དོན་དག་གི་ཁྲོད་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཡི་གེ་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་པའི་མིག་ཆས་ཡོད། གདོང་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལྟར། རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཚོར་བ་མང་པོ་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱིར་བཏང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལ་ཆ་ཤས་དང་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཅིག་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པར་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་མེད་པ་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་གནད་བ Bu kağıt içinde, bu sorunu çözmek için yardımcı bir anım altındaki yeni bir anım a ğını öneriyoruz. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ནང་དུ་རྩ་བའི་དྲན་འཛིན་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཡོད་པའི་ཁོར་ཡུག་གལ་ཆེན་ཡི་གེ In addition, we build an auxiliary memory to implicitly convert aspects and terms to each other, and feed both to the main memory. དྲན་འཛིན་གཉིས་དབར་གྱི་འཚོལ་བ་དང་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མིག་དབྱིབས་སྔར་སྒྲིག་ཆས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་པ་ཡིན། ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་བཟོ་སྣང་བ་མངོན་གསལ་འཆར་བྱེད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Bringing replication and reproduction together with generalisability in NLP : Three reproduction studies for Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis', 'ar': 'إحضار النسخ المتماثل والتكاثر جنبًا إلى جنب مع التعميم في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية: ثلاث دراسات استنساخ لتحليل المشاعر التابعة المستهدفة', 'pt': 'Reunindo replicação e reprodução com generalização em PNL: três estudos de reprodução para análise de sentimento dependente do alvo', 'fr': "Associer la réplication et la reproduction avec la généralisabilité dans la PNL\xa0: trois études de reproduction pour l'analyse du sentiment dépendant de la cible", 'es': 'Unir la replicación y la reproducción con la generalización en la PNL: tres estudios de reproducción para el análisis de sentimiento dependiente del objetivo', 'ja': 'NLPにおける複製と再現性と一般化性を一緒にする：ターゲット依存感情分析のための3つの再現研究', 'zh': '合复制于NLP之泛化性:所以依赖性情析者三也', 'hi': 'एनएलपी में सामान्यता के साथ प्रतिकृति और प्रजनन को एक साथ लाना: लक्ष्य निर्भर भावना विश्लेषण के लिए तीन प्रजनन अध्ययन', 'ru': 'Приведение репликации и воспроизведения вместе с обобщаемостью в NLP: Три исследования воспроизводства для анализа зависимых от цели настроений', 'ga': 'Macasamhlú agus atáirgeadh a thabhairt mar aon leis an nginearáltacht in NLP: Trí staidéar atáirgeadh le haghaidh Anailís ar Dhóchas Sprice', 'ka': 'რეპუპლიკაცია და რეპუპლეცია NLP-ში ჯერნალიზაცია: სამი რეპუპლეციის სწავლება მისამართლური განსაკუთრებული სენტიმანტის ანალიზაციისთვის', 'hu': 'A replikáció és a reprodukció összekapcsolása az NLP általánosíthatóságával: Három reprodukciós vizsgálat a célfüggő érzékelő analízishez', 'el': 'Συνδυάζοντας την αναπαραγωγή και την αναπαραγωγή με τη γενικότητα στο Τρεις μελέτες αναπαραγωγής για την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων εξαρτώμενων από τον στόχο', 'it': "Riunire replicazione e riproduzione insieme alla generalizzabilità nella PNL: tre studi sulla riproduzione per l'analisi dei sentimenti dipendenti da target", 'lt': 'Reprodukcijos ir reprodukcijos derinimas kartu su generalizuotumu NLP: trys reprodukcijos tyrimai, atliekami pagal tikslinę priklausomo jautrumo analizę', 'mk': 'Донесување на репликација и репродукција заедно со генерализација во НЛП: Три репродукциски студии за анализа на сентиментот зависен од метата', 'kk': 'NLP- де репликация және репродукция жалпы мүмкіндігімен бірге: Мақсаттың тәуелді синтиментті анализ үш репродукция зерттеулері', 'ml': 'എംഎല്\u200dപിയിലെ ജനറലിസ്റ്റബിളുമായി പകര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നതും പുതുക്കുന്നതും കൊണ്ടുവന്നു', 'ms': 'Membawa replikasi dan reproduksi bersama dengan kemampuan generalisasi dalam NLP: Tiga kajian reproduksi untuk Analisi Sentimen Tergantung Sasaran', 'mn': 'NLP-д дахин дахин үржүүлэх, үржүүлэх болон ерөнхийлөгч чадвартай нийлүүлэх: Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis-ын 3 дахин үржүүлэх судалгаа', 'mt': 'It-twaqqif tar-replikazzjoni u r-riproduzzjoni flimkien mal-ġeneralizzazzjoni f’NLP: Tliet studji dwar ir-riproduzzjoni għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment Dipendenti fuq il-Mira', 'no': 'Hentar replikasjon og reproduksjon saman med generelliserbarhet i NLP: tre reproduksjonsstudier for målavhengig sentralanalyse', 'ro': 'Aducerea replicării și reproducerii împreună cu generalizarea în PNL: Trei studii de reproducere pentru analiza sentimentelor dependente țintă', 'pl': 'Połączenie replikacji i reprodukcji z uogólnieniem w NLP: Trzy badania reprodukcji dla analizy sentymentów zależnych od celu', 'sr': 'Prikupljanje replikacije i reprodukcije zajedno sa generalizabilnošću u NLP-u: tri ispitivanja reprodukcije za ciljnu nezavisnost Sentimentnu analizu', 'si': 'NLP වලට සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සමඟ ප්\u200dරතිපත්ති සහ ප්\u200dරතිපත්ති සහ ප්\u200dරතිපත්තිය: ලක්ෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ප', 'sv': 'Att sammanföra replikation och reproduktion med generalisering i NLP: Tre reproduktionsstudier för målberoende känselanalys', 'so': 'Horumarinta iyo dib u soo celinta iyo dhaqaalaha la soo saari karo NLP: Saddex waxbarasho ka soo dugsasha baaritaanka la xiriira fasaxa', 'ta': 'NLP-ல் மூன்று முறை மற்றும் புதுப்பித்தல் மற்றும் பொதுவாக்குதலுடன் கொண்டுவருகிறது: சேர்க்கை சார்ந்த முடிவு ஆய', 'ur': 'NLP میں جرائنالیز قابلیت کے ساتھ ملے جاتے ہیں: Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis کے لئے تین بازگشت تحقیقات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết hợp tái tạo và tái tạo cùng với việc phát triển chung ở NLP:', 'nl': 'Replicatie en reproductie samenbrengen met generaliseerbaarheid in NLP: Drie reproductiestudies voor Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis', 'bg': 'Съобщаване на репликацията и репродукцията заедно с генерализацията в НЛП: Три проучвания за репродукция за анализ на целевите зависими чувства', 'de': 'Replikation und Reproduktion mit Verallgemeinerbarkeit in NLP zusammenbringen: Drei Reproduktionsstudien für Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis', 'da': 'At bringe replikation og reproduktion sammen med generalitet i NLP: Tre reproduktionsundersøgelser til målafhængig følelsesanalyse', 'id': 'Membawa replikasi dan reproduksi bersama dengan generalisasi di NLP: Tiga studi reproduksi untuk Analisi Sentiment Dependent Target', 'fa': 'جمع کردن تکنولوژی و تکنولوژی با قابلیت عمومی در NLP: سه مطالعه تکنولوژی برای تحلیل احساسات بستگی به هدف', 'sw': 'Akitoa maombi na uzazi pamoja na uwezekano wa ujumla katika NLP: Utafiti wa uzazi watatu kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa Seneti inayotegemea', 'tr': "NLP'da döwletlerlik we ýerleşik gabdalyklary bilen birleştirilýär: Maksadyň boýunça Sentiýat Analizi üçin üç ýerleşik öwrenmeleri", 'hr': 'Prikupljanje replikacije i reprodukcije zajedno s generalizacijom u NLP-u: tri ispitivanja reprodukcije za ciljnu zavisnu analizu osjetljivosti', 'ko': 'NLP에서의 복제와 복제를 보편성과 결합: 목표 의존 정서 분석에 대한 세 가지 복제 연구', 'am': 'በNLP ውስጥ የፍጥረት ማቀናቀል እና ቅድሚያ በመቀበል አቀማመጥ: የግል ተቃውሞ ሰንተር Analysis', 'sq': 'Duke sjellë replikimin dhe riprodhimin së bashku me gjeneralizueshmërinë në NLP: Tre studime riprodhimi për Analizën e Sentimenteve të Varur nga Objektivi', 'af': 'Bereken replikasie en reproduksie saam met generaliserbaardigheid in NLP: drie reproduksie studie vir Teël afhanklike Sentiment Analisie', 'az': 'NLP-də replikasyon və reproduksyon birlikdə genel qabiliyyətlə birləşdiriləcək: Hedef bağımsız Sentiment Analizi üçün üç reproduksyon öyrənməsi', 'bn': 'এনএলপিতে সাধারণ বিশ্লেষণের সাথে প্রতিক্রিয়া এবং প্রজন্ম নিয়ে যাচ্ছে: টার্গেটের নির্ভর সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণে', 'ca': 'Bringing replication and reproduction together with generalisability in NLP: Three reproduction studies for Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis', 'bs': 'Prikupljanje replikacije i reprodukcije zajedno sa generalizacijom u NLP-u: tri ispitivanja reprodukcije za analizu osjetljivosti cilja', 'cs': 'Spojení replikace a reprodukce s generalizací v NLP: Tři reprodukční studie pro analýzu cílově závislých sentimentů', 'hy': 'ՆԼՊ-ում գոյություն ունեցող վերարտադրողականության և վերարտադրողականության հետ միասին բերելով՝ նպատակի կախված զգացմունքների վերարտադրողականության երեք ուսումնասիրություն', 'et': 'Reproduktsiooni ja reproduktsiooni ühendamine üldistatavusega NLP-s: kolm reproduktsiooniuuringut sihtmärkidest sõltuva tunnete analüüsi jaoks', 'fi': 'Replikoinnin ja lisääntymisen yhdistäminen yleistettävyyteen NLP:ssä: Kolme lisääntymistä koskevaa tutkimusta kohderiippuvaisen tunteen analyysiin', 'jv': 'NLP Jejaring', 'sk': 'Združevanje reprodukcije in reprodukcije skupaj s splošljivostjo v NLP: Tri študije reprodukcije za analizo ciljnih odvisnih čustev', 'ha': "Aka motsa musanyawa da duba da mai jama'a cikin NLP: Analyze na Ana Target da aka Dama Target", 'he': 'להביא שיתופים ותרבות יחד עם הגנרליזציה ב-NLP: שלושה מחקרי שיתופים עבור ניתוח תחושה תלוי במטרה', 'bo': 'NLP ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བསུབ་དང་བསུབ་སྐྱོར་དང་ཆེ་བསུབ་པར་མཉམ་དུ་བཅུག་པ། Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis རྩོལ་ནུས་ལ།'}
{'en': 'Lack of repeatability and generalisability are two significant threats to continuing scientific development in Natural Language Processing. Language models and learning methods are so complex that scientific conference papers no longer contain enough space for the technical depth required for replication or reproduction. Taking Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis as a case study, we show how recent work in the field has not consistently released code, or described settings for learning methods in enough detail, and lacks comparability and generalisability in train, test or validation data. To investigate generalisability and to enable state of the art comparative evaluations, we carry out the first reproduction studies of three groups of complementary methods and perform the first large-scale mass evaluation on six different English datasets. Reflecting on our experiences, we recommend that future replication or reproduction experiments should always consider a variety of datasets alongside documenting and releasing their methods and published code in order to minimise the barriers to both repeatability and generalisability. We have released our code with a model zoo on GitHub with Jupyter Notebooks to aid understanding and full documentation, and we recommend that others do the same with their papers at submission time through an anonymised GitHub account.', 'ar': 'يعد نقص التكرار وقابلية التعميم تهديدين مهمين للتطور العلمي المستمر في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. تعد النماذج اللغوية وطرق التعلم معقدة للغاية لدرجة أن أوراق المؤتمرات العلمية لم تعد تحتوي على مساحة كافية للعمق التقني المطلوب للتكرار أو الاستنساخ. بأخذ تحليل المشاعر المعتمدة على الهدف كدراسة حالة ، نوضح كيف أن العمل الأخير في هذا المجال لم يصدر باستمرار رمزًا ، أو وصف الإعدادات لطرق التعلم بتفاصيل كافية ، ويفتقر إلى القابلية للمقارنة والتعميم في بيانات التدريب أو الاختبار أو التحقق من الصحة. للتحقيق في قابلية التعميم ولتمكين أحدث التقييمات المقارنة ، نجري أول دراسات استنساخ لثلاث مجموعات من الأساليب التكميلية ونجري أول تقييم جماعي واسع النطاق على ست مجموعات بيانات إنجليزية مختلفة. بالنظر إلى تجاربنا ، نوصي بأن تراعي تجارب النسخ أو الاستنساخ المستقبلية دائمًا مجموعة متنوعة من مجموعات البيانات جنبًا إلى جنب مع توثيق وإصدار طرقها والرموز المنشورة من أجل تقليل العوائق التي تحول دون التكرار والتعميم. لقد أصدرنا الكود الخاص بنا مع حديقة حيوانات نموذجية على GitHub مع Jupyter Notebooks للمساعدة في الفهم والتوثيق الكامل ، ونوصي بأن يفعل الآخرون نفس الشيء مع أوراقهم في وقت الإرسال من خلال حساب GitHub مجهول الهوية.', 'fr': "Le manque de répétabilité et de généralisabilité constituent deux menaces importantes pour le développement scientifique continu du traitement du langage naturel. Les modèles linguistiques et les méthodes d'apprentissage sont si complexes que les documents de conférence scientifique ne contiennent plus assez d'espace pour la profondeur technique requise pour la reproduction ou la reproduction. En prenant l'analyse du sentiment dépendant de Target comme une étude de cas, nous montrons comment les travaux récents sur le terrain n'ont pas toujours publié de code ou décrit les paramètres des méthodes d'apprentissage de manière suffisamment détaillée, et manquent de comparabilité et de généralisabilité dans les données de train, de test ou de validation. Pour étudier la généralisabilité et permettre des évaluations comparatives de pointe, nous réalisons les premières études de reproduction de trois groupes de méthodes complémentaires et effectuons la première évaluation de masse à grande échelle sur six ensembles de données anglais différents. Compte tenu de nos expériences, nous recommandons que les futures expériences de réplication ou de reproduction prennent toujours en compte une variété d'ensembles de données en plus de la documentation et de la publication de leurs méthodes et du code publié afin de minimiser les obstacles à la répétabilité et à la généralisabilité. Nous avons publié notre code avec un zoo modèle sur GitHub avec des blocs-notes Jupyter pour faciliter la compréhension et la documentation complète, et nous recommandons aux autres de faire de même avec leurs articles au moment de la soumission via un compte GitHub anonymisé.", 'pt': 'A falta de repetibilidade e generalização são duas ameaças significativas ao desenvolvimento científico contínuo em Processamento de Linguagem Natural. Os modelos de linguagem e os métodos de aprendizagem são tão complexos que os artigos de conferências científicas não contêm mais espaço suficiente para a profundidade técnica necessária para replicação ou reprodução. Tomando a Análise de Sentimento Dependente de Destino como um estudo de caso, mostramos como o trabalho recente no campo não liberou código de forma consistente ou descreveu configurações para métodos de aprendizado com detalhes suficientes e carece de comparabilidade e generalização em dados de treinamento, teste ou validação. Para investigar a generalização e permitir avaliações comparativas de última geração, realizamos os primeiros estudos de reprodução de três grupos de métodos complementares e realizamos a primeira avaliação em massa em grande escala em seis conjuntos de dados ingleses diferentes. Refletindo sobre nossas experiências, recomendamos que futuros experimentos de replicação ou reprodução sempre considerem uma variedade de conjuntos de dados ao lado de documentar e liberar seus métodos e código publicado para minimizar as barreiras à repetibilidade e generalização. Lançamos nosso código com um zoo modelo no GitHub com Jupyter Notebooks para ajudar na compreensão e na documentação completa, e recomendamos que outros façam o mesmo com seus artigos no momento do envio por meio de uma conta anônima do GitHub.', 'es': 'La falta de repetibilidad y generalización son dos amenazas importantes para el desarrollo científico continuo en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Los modelos lingüísticos y los métodos de aprendizaje son tan complejos que los documentos de las conferencias científicas ya no contienen suficiente espacio para la profundidad técnica necesaria para la replicación o reproducción. Tomando Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis como un estudio de caso, mostramos cómo el trabajo reciente en el campo no ha publicado código de manera consistente ni ha descrito la configuración de los métodos de aprendizaje con suficiente detalle, y carece de comparabilidad y generalización en los datos de entrenamiento, prueba o validación. Para investigar la generalización y permitir evaluaciones comparativas de última generación, llevamos a cabo los primeros estudios de reproducción de tres grupos de métodos complementarios y realizamos la primera evaluación masiva a gran escala en seis conjuntos de datos diferentes en inglés. Reflexionando sobre nuestras experiencias, recomendamos que los futuros experimentos de replicación o reproducción siempre consideren una variedad de conjuntos de datos, además de documentar y publicar sus métodos y código publicado, a fin de minimizar las barreras tanto para la repetibilidad como para la generalización. Hemos publicado nuestro código con un zoológico modelo en GitHub con Jupyter Notebooks para facilitar la comprensión y la documentación completa, y recomendamos que otros hagan lo mismo con sus trabajos en el momento de enviarlos a través de una cuenta de GitHub anónima.', 'ja': '繰り返し性と一般性の欠如は、自然言語処理における継続的な科学開発への2つの重大な脅威です。 言語モデルと学習方法は非常に複雑であるため、科学会議の論文には、複製や再現に必要な技術的な深さのための十分なスペースがもはや含まれていません。 Target Dependent Sentiment Analysisをケーススタディとすると、最近の現場での研究が、コードを一貫してリリースしていなかったり、学習方法の設定を十分に詳細に説明しておらず、トレーニング、テスト、検証データの比較性と一般化性に欠けていることが示されます。 一般化性を検討し、最先端の比較評価を可能にするために、３つの補完的な方法群の最初の再現研究を行い、６つの異なる英語データセットに対して最初の大規模な質量評価を行う。 私たちの経験を振り返りながら、将来の複製または複製実験は、再現性と一般性の両方への障壁を最小限に抑えるために、方法と公開されたコードを文書化して公開するとともに、さまざまなデータセットを常に考慮することをお勧めします。 Jupyterノートブックと共にGitHub上のモデル動物園でコードを公開し、理解と完全な文書化を支援しています。匿名化されたGitHubアカウントを通じて、提出時に他のユーザーも同じことを行うことをお勧めします。', 'zh': '无重复性可广性是自然语言科学二大胁也。 言语模形学术如此,至于科学会议论文不复含空复制复制所须深度。 以依赖性情析为例,示域近事,如何无始发代码,或未足以详述学术之设,且训练之,试验数阙可比性可推广性。 为可推广性而先进者较之,三组互补术为首,而六英语之数集矣。 据臣等经验,臣等言未来复制或复见实验在记发之法与已发代码同时,宜终思诸数集,以大限减可重复性、可推广性之障。 吾已发吾代码于GitHub,其包Jupyter Notebooks形动物园,以助解全之文档,吾言其他因匿名之GitHub帐户而同其论。', 'ru': 'Отсутствие повторяемости и обобщаемости являются двумя серьезными угрозами для продолжения научных разработок в области обработки естественного языка. Языковые модели и методы обучения настолько сложны, что научные конференционные документы уже не содержат достаточного пространства для технической глубины, необходимой для тиражирования или воспроизведения. Используя целевой анализ зависимых настроений в качестве тематического исследования, мы показываем, как недавняя работа в этой области не всегда выпускает код или описывает настройки для методов обучения достаточно подробно, а также не хватает сопоставимости и обобщаемости в данных поезда, теста или проверки. Чтобы исследовать обобщаемость и обеспечить возможность сравнительных оценок современного уровня техники, мы проводим первые репродуктивные исследования трех групп комплементарных методов и выполняем первую крупномасштабную массовую оценку на шести различных английских наборах данных. Размышляя о нашем опыте, мы рекомендуем, чтобы будущие эксперименты по тиражированию или воспроизведению всегда рассматривали различные наборы данных наряду с документированием и выпуском их методов и опубликованного кода, чтобы свести к минимуму барьеры как для повторяемости, так и для обобщаемости. Мы выпустили наш код с моделью зоопарка на GitHub с Jupyter Notebooks, чтобы облегчить понимание и полную документацию, и мы рекомендуем другим сделать то же самое со своими документами во время отправки через анонимную учетную запись GitHub.', 'hi': 'पुनरावृत्ति और सामान्यता की कमी प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में वैज्ञानिक विकास को जारी रखने के लिए दो महत्वपूर्ण खतरे हैं। भाषा मॉडल और सीखने के तरीके इतने जटिल हैं कि वैज्ञानिक सम्मेलन पत्रों में अब प्रतिकृति या प्रजनन के लिए आवश्यक तकनीकी गहराई के लिए पर्याप्त स्थान नहीं है। एक मामले के अध्ययन के रूप में लक्ष्य निर्भर भावना विश्लेषण लेते हुए, हम दिखाते हैं कि क्षेत्र में हाल के काम ने लगातार कोड जारी नहीं किया है, या पर्याप्त विस्तार से सीखने के तरीकों के लिए सेटिंग्स का वर्णन नहीं किया है, और ट्रेन, परीक्षण या सत्यापन डेटा में तुलनात्मकता और सामान्यता का अभाव है। सामान्यता की जांच करने और कला तुलनात्मक मूल्यांकन की स्थिति को सक्षम करने के लिए, हम पूरक विधियों के तीन समूहों के पहले प्रजनन अध्ययन करते हैं और छह अलग-अलग अंग्रेजी डेटासेट पर पहले बड़े पैमाने पर बड़े पैमाने पर मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारे अनुभवों पर प्रतिबिंबित करते हुए, हम अनुशंसा करते हैं कि भविष्य की प्रतिकृति या प्रजनन प्रयोगों को हमेशा अपने तरीकों और प्रकाशित कोड के दस्तावेजीकरण और रिलीज के साथ-साथ विभिन्न प्रकार के डेटासेट पर विचार करना चाहिए ताकि पुनरावृत्ति और सामान्यता दोनों के लिए बाधाओं को कम किया जा सके। हमने समझ और पूर्ण प्रलेखन में सहायता करने के लिए जुपीटर नोटबुक के साथ गिटहब पर एक मॉडल चिड़ियाघर के साथ अपना कोड जारी किया है, और हम अनुशंसा करते हैं कि अन्य लोग एक अनाम गिटहब खाते के माध्यम से सबमिशन समय पर अपने कागजात के साथ भी ऐसा ही करें।', 'ga': 'Dhá bhagairt shuntasacha ar fhorbairt leanúnach eolaíoch i bPróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha is ea easpa in-atrialachachta agus ginearálaithe. Tá samhlacha teanga agus modhanna foghlama chomh casta sin nach mbíonn go leor spáis i bpáipéir chomhdhála eolaíochta a thuilleadh don doimhneacht theicniúil a theastaíonn chun macasamhlú nó atáirgeadh. Ag glacadh le hAnailís Dearcaidh Sprice mar chás-staidéar, léirímid nach bhfuil cód eisithe go comhsheasmhach ag obair le déanaí sa réimse, nó nár chuir sé síos go leor sonraí ar shuíomhanna modhanna foghlama, agus nach bhfuil inchomparáideacht agus ginearáltacht i sonraí oiliúna, tástála nó bailíochtaithe. Chun ginearálú a fhiosrú agus chun meastóireachtaí comparáideacha úrscothacha a chumasú, déanaimid na chéad staidéir atáirgeadh ar thrí ghrúpa de mhodhanna comhlántacha agus déanaimid an chéad ollmheasúnú ar sé thacar sonraí Béarla éagsúla. Ag machnamh ar ár n-eispéiris, molaimid gur cheart go mbreathnódh turgnaimh mhacasamhlaithe nó atáirgeadh sa todhchaí ar éagsúlacht tacair sonraí i dteannta a modhanna agus a gcód foilsithe a dhoiciméadú agus a scaoileadh chun na bacainní ar in-atrialltacht agus ginearáltacht araon a íoslaghdú. Táimid tar éis ár gcód a scaoileadh le zú samhail ar GitHub le Jupyter Notebooks chun cabhrú le tuiscint agus doiciméadú iomlán, agus molaimid go ndéanfadh daoine eile an rud céanna lena gcuid páipéir ag am aighneachta trí chuntas GitHub gan ainm.', 'ka': 'არაფერადობა და გენერალური შესაძლებლობა არის ორი მნიშვნელოვანი საზოგადოება, რომ მეცნიერო განვითარება Natural Language Processing-ში. ენების მოდელები და სწავლების მეტოვები ძალიან კომპლექსია, რომ მეცნიერო კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციები მისამართლის განსაკუთრებული სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის გამოყენება როგორც კითხვაში, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, როგორც მხოლოდ სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაო კოდის არ გახსნა, ან განსაკუთრე ჩვენ სამი ჯგუფის კომპლემენტური მეტისების პირველი რეპოვკურაციის სწორედ გავაკეთებთ და გავაკეთებთ პირველი დიდი მასური განსაზღვრება შვიდი განსხვავებული ანგლისური მონაცემების შესახებ ჩვენი გამოცდილებების შესახებ, ჩვენ მუშაობით, რომ მომავალე რეპოვკურაცია ან რეპოვკურაციის ექსპერიმენტები უნდა ყოველთვის დავფიქროთ განსხვავებული მონაცემენტის კონფიგურაცია და განსხვავება მათი მეტივებ ჩვენ ჩვენი კოდის გახსნა, რომელსაც მოდელური ზოო-ზო გადავიტანეთ GitHub-ში, რომელსაც Jupyter Notebooks-ით, რომ დახმარება სწორედ და უკვე დოკუმენტაციას, და ჩვენ შევძლებთ სხვების გავაკეთოთ', 'kk': 'Қайталану және жалпы мүмкіндіктер жоқ - табиғи тіл процессінде ғылыми жасау үшін екі маңызды қиын. Тіл үлгілері мен оқыту әдістері толық комплекс, сондықтан ғылыми конференциялар қағаздарында репликациялау не репродукциялау үшін керек техникалық тереңдігін жеткілікті Мақсаттың тәуелді синтиментті анализ үшін жаңа жұмыс өрісінде қанша жұмыс істемегенін көрсетеді, немесе оқыту әдістерін жеткілікті егжей- тегжейлі түрде таңдау әдістерін көрсетеді, жұмыс, сынақтар не тексеру дерект Жалпы мәліметтерді зерттеу және әртүрлі салыстырмалы мәліметтердің күйін рұқсат ету үшін бірінші жалпы мәліметтердің үш топтарды жасап, алты түрлі ағылшын деректер жиындарында бірінші үлкен Біздің тәжірибемізге қарай қарай, болашақ репликациялау не репликациялау тәжірибелерін құжаттау және әрқашанда әртүрлі деректер жинақтарын жұмыс істеу және басып шығарылған код арқылы, қайталану және жалпы Біз Джупитер нотобуктарымен GitHub үлгісімен кодымызды толық құжаттамасын түсінуге және толық құжаттамасын көмектесу үшін үлгілі зоопарымен шығарып тастадық. Басқаларымыз бірдей жазбаларымызды анонимизияланған Git', 'lt': 'Pakartotinumo ir bendro pobūdžio trūkumas kelia dvi dideles grėsmes tolesniam mokslo vystymuisi gamtos kalbų apdorojimo srityje. Kalbos modeliai ir mokymosi metodai yra tokie sudėtingi, kad mokslinių konferencijų dokumentuose nebėra pakankamai vietos techniniam gilumui, reikalingam dauginimuisi ar reprodukcijai. Atsižvelgdami į tikslinę priklausomo jausmo analizę kaip atvejų tyrimą, mes parodome, kaip naujausias darbas šioje srityje nėra nuosekliai paskelbtas kodas arba pakankamai išsamiai aprašyti mokymosi metodų nustatymai ir trūksta traukinių, bandymų ar patvirtinimo duomenų palyginamumo ir generalizavimo. Siekiant ištirti generalizuotumą ir sudaryti galimybę atlikti naujausius lyginamuosius vertinimus, atliekame pirmuosius trijų papildomų metodų grupių reprodukcijos tyrimus ir atliekame pirmąjį didelio masto masės vertinimą šešiais skirtingais anglų duomenų rinkiniais. Atsižvelgdami į mūsų patirtį, rekomenduojame, kad būsimi kartojimo ar reprodukcijos eksperimentai visada apsvarstytų įvairius duomenų rinkinius kartu su jų metodų ir paskelbtų kodeksų dokumentavimu ir paskelbimu, kad būtų kuo labiau sumažintos kartojimo ir generalizavimo kliūtys. Mes paskelbėme savo kodą su modeliu zoologijos sodu GitHub su Jupyter Notebooks, kad padėtume suprasti ir išsamiai dokumentuoti, ir rekomenduojame, kad kiti darytų tą patį su savo dokumentais pateikimo metu per anonimizuotą GitHub sąskaitą.', 'mk': 'Недостатокот на повторливост и генерализација претставуваат две значителни закани за континуираниот научен развој во процесот на природен јазик. Моделите на јазикот и методите на учење се толку комплексни што научните конференциски документи повеќе не содржат доволно простор за техничката длабочина потребна за репликација или репродукција. Земајќи ја анализата на сентиментот зависен од целта како случајна студија, покажуваме како неодамнешната работа на теренот не постојано објавува код, или опишува поставувања за методите на учење во доволно детали, и недостасува споредливост и генерализација на податоците за воз, тест или валидација. За да ја испитаме генерализацијата и да овозможиме најсовремената споредлива оценка, ги спроведуваме првите студии за репродукција на три групи комплементарни методи и спроведуваме првата голема масовна оценка на шест различни англиски податоци. Reflecting on our experiences, we recommend that future replication or reproduction experiments should always consider a variety of datasets alongside documenting and releasing their methods and published code in order to minimise the barriers to both repeatability and generalisability.  Го ослободивме нашиот код со модел зоолошки градина на Гитхаб со Јупитер Нотебокс за да помогнеме во разбирањето и целосната документација, и препорачуваме другите да го направат истото со своите документи на време на поднесување преку анонимна сметка на Гитхаб.', 'hu': 'Az ismételhetőség és az általánosíthatóság hiánya két jelentős veszélyt jelent a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás folyamatos tudományos fejlődésére. A nyelvi modellek és tanulási módszerek annyira összetettek, hogy a tudományos konferenciaanyagok már nem tartalmaznak elegendő helyet a replikációhoz vagy reprodukcióhoz szükséges technikai mélységhez. A Célfüggő Érzelmi Elemzés esettanulmányként megmutatjuk, hogy a közelmúltban végzett munkák nem adtak ki következetesen kódot, vagy nem írták le a tanulási módszerek beállításait elegendő részletesen, és hiányoznak az összehasonlíthatóság és általánosíthatóság a vonatok, tesztek vagy validálási adatok tekintetében. Az általánosíthatóság vizsgálata és a legkorszerűbb összehasonlító értékelések lehetővé tétele érdekében három egymást kiegészítő módszercsoport első reprodukciós vizsgálatát végzünk, és az első nagyszabású tömegértékelést hat különböző angol adatkészleten végezzük el. Tapasztalataink alapján azt javasoljuk, hogy a jövőbeli replikációs vagy reprodukciós kísérletek mindig vegyék figyelembe a különböző adatkészleteket, módszereik és publikált kódok dokumentálása és kiadása mellett annak érdekében, hogy minimalizálják mind az ismételhetőség, mind az általánosíthatóság akadályait. A GitHub modellállatkertjében kiadtuk a kódunkat Jupyter Notebookokkal, hogy elősegítsük a megértést és a teljes dokumentációt, és azt javasoljuk, hogy mások is tegyék ugyanezt a dokumentációval a benyújtás időpontjában egy anonimizált GitHub fiókon keresztül.', 'el': 'Η έλλειψη επαναληπτικότητας και γενικιμότητας είναι δύο σημαντικές απειλές για τη συνεχή επιστημονική ανάπτυξη στην Επεξεργασία Φυσικής Γλώσσας. Τα γλωσσικά μοντέλα και οι μέθοδοι μάθησης είναι τόσο πολύπλοκα που οι επιστημονικές εργασίες του συνεδρίου δεν περιέχουν πλέον αρκετό χώρο για το τεχνικό βάθος που απαιτείται για την αναπαραγωγή ή αναπαραγωγή. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη την ανάλυση των συναισθημάτων ως μια μελέτη περίπτωσης, δείχνουμε πώς η πρόσφατη εργασία στον τομέα δεν έχει απελευθερώσει με συνέπεια κώδικα, ή περιγράφει ρυθμίσεις για μεθόδους μάθησης με αρκετή λεπτομέρεια, και στερείται συγκρισιμότητας και γενικιμότητας στα δεδομένα τρένου, δοκιμής ή επικύρωσης. Για να διερευνηθεί η γενικότητα και να καταστεί δυνατή η συγκριτική αξιολόγηση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, διεξάγουμε τις πρώτες μελέτες αναπαραγωγής τριών ομάδων συμπληρωματικών μεθόδων και διενεργούμε την πρώτη μαζική αξιολόγηση μεγάλης κλίμακας σε έξι διαφορετικά αγγλικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τις εμπειρίες μας, προτείνουμε τα μελλοντικά πειράματα αναπαραγωγής ή αναπαραγωγής να λαμβάνουν πάντα υπόψη μια ποικιλία συνόλων δεδομένων παράλληλα με την τεκμηρίωση και την απελευθέρωση των μεθόδων τους και του δημοσιευμένου κώδικα, προκειμένου να ελαχιστοποιηθούν τα εμπόδια τόσο στην επαναληπτικότητα όσο και στη γενικότητα. Έχουμε κυκλοφορήσει τον κώδικα μας με ένα μοντέλο ζωολογικού κήπου στο GitHub με σημειωματάρια Jupyter για να βοηθήσουμε στην κατανόηση και την πλήρη τεκμηρίωση, και συνιστούμε σε άλλους να κάνουν το ίδιο με τις εργασίες τους κατά το χρόνο υποβολής μέσω ενός ανώνυμου λογαριασμού GitHub.', 'it': "La mancanza di ripetibilità e generalizzabilità sono due minacce significative al continuo sviluppo scientifico nel Natural Language Processing. I modelli linguistici e i metodi di apprendimento sono così complessi che i documenti scientifici delle conferenze non contengono più abbastanza spazio per la profondità tecnica necessaria per la riproduzione o la riproduzione. Prendendo Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis come caso studio, mostriamo come il recente lavoro sul campo non abbia rilasciato costantemente codice, o descritto le impostazioni per i metodi di apprendimento in modo sufficientemente dettagliato, e manchi di comparabilità e generalità nei dati di treno, test o convalida. Per investigare la generalizzabilità e consentire valutazioni comparative all'avanguardia, eseguiamo i primi studi di riproduzione di tre gruppi di metodi complementari ed eseguiamo la prima valutazione di massa su larga scala su sei diversi set di dati inglesi. Riflettendo sulle nostre esperienze, raccomandiamo che i futuri esperimenti di replica o riproduzione considerino sempre una varietà di set di dati, oltre a documentare e rilasciare i loro metodi e il codice pubblicato, al fine di ridurre al minimo le barriere alla ripetibilità e alla generalizzabilità. Abbiamo rilasciato il nostro codice con uno zoo modello su GitHub con Jupyter Notebooks per facilitare la comprensione e la documentazione completa, e raccomandiamo agli altri di fare lo stesso con i loro documenti al momento dell'invio attraverso un account GitHub anonimo.", 'ms': 'Kekurangan kemampuan ulang dan keseluruhan adalah dua ancaman yang signifikan untuk mengembangkan saintifik terus dalam Proses Bahasa Alami. Model bahasa dan kaedah belajar begitu kompleks sehingga kertas konferensi saintifik tidak lagi mengandungi ruang yang cukup untuk kedalaman teknik yang diperlukan untuk replikasi atau reproduksi. Mengambil Analisi Sentimen Tergantung Sasaran sebagai kajian kes, kami menunjukkan bagaimana kerja baru-baru ini di medan tidak secara konsisten melepaskan kod, atau diterangkan tetapan untuk kaedah belajar dengan rincian yang cukup, dan kekurangan perbandingan dan keseluruhan dalam data kereta api, ujian atau pengesahihan. Untuk menyelidiki keseluruhan dan memungkinkan penilaian perbandingan terbaik, kami melakukan kajian reproduksi pertama dari tiga kumpulan kaedah komplementari dan melakukan penilaian massa skala besar pertama pada enam set data bahasa Inggeris yang berbeza. Mengingat pengalaman kami, kami cadangkan bahawa percubaan replikasi atau reproduksi masa depan sentiasa mempertimbangkan berbagai set data bersama-sama mendokumentasikan dan melepaskan kaedah mereka dan kod yang diterbitkan untuk mengurangkan halangan kepada kemudahan ulang dan keseluruhan. Kami telah melepaskan kod kami dengan model zoo di GitHub dengan Notebooks Jupyter untuk membantu pemahaman dan dokumentasi penuh, dan kami menyarankan bahawa orang lain melakukan hal yang sama dengan kertas mereka pada masa penghantaran melalui akaun GitHub yang tidak dikenali.', 'ml': 'തിരിച്ചടിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും സാധാരണ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രീയ വ്യവസ്ഥ തുടരുന്നതിനുള്ള രണ്ട് പ്രധാനപ് ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളും പഠിക്കുന്ന രീതികളും വളരെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായിരിക്കുന്നു. ശാസ്ത്ര കോണ്\u200dഫറന്\u200dസ് പത്രങ്ങള്\u200d പിന്നീട് പ്രതികരിക്കുവ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന സെന്റിമെന്റ് അന്യായം എടുക്കുന്നത് കേസ് പഠനത്തിന്റെ അടുത്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d വി ജെനറലിയലിസ്റ്ററിവിഷയങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുവാനും കലാകാരത്തിന്റെ നിരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കുവാനും, ആറു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളി നമ്മുടെ അനുഭവങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആലോചിക്കുന്നു, ഭാവിയുടെ പ്രതികരിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ചോ പ്രവർത്തിക്കു ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ജുപ്പൈറ്റര്\u200d നോട്ട്ബുക്കുകളുമായി ഗിറ്റ് ഹുബിലെ മോഡല്\u200d ജിയോബില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മുടെ കോഡ് വിട്ടുകളഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്നു. ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുകളും പൂര്\u200dണ', 'mn': 'Дахин давтах болон ерөнхийлөгч чадварын алдаагүй нь байгалийн хэл процесс дээр шинжлэх ухааны хөгжлийг үргэлжлүүлэх хоёр чухал аюул юм. Холын загвар болон суралцах аргыг маш нарийн төвөгтэй болгож шинжлэх ухааны конференцийн цааснууд дахин дахин дахин боловсруулах боломжтой техникийн гүн гүнзгийг хангалттай зай байхгүй. Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis-г хэрхэн судалгаа болгоход бид саяхан ажилладаг талбайд хэрхэн шинэ ажиллах нь кодыг үргэлж гаргахгүй, эсвэл суралцах аргачлалыг хангалттай нарийвчлан тайлбарлаж чадахгүй бөгөөд төлөвлөгөө, шалгалт эсвэл шийдвэрлэлтийн Олон төрлийн чадварыг судалж, урлагийн харьцуулалтын үнэлгээг боловсруулахын тулд бид анхны үржүүлэлтийн судалгааг 3 бүлэг нэмэгдүүлэх арга замыг хийж, 6 өөр Англи хэлний өгөгдлийн сангийн анхны том хэмжээний үнэлгээг хийдэг. Бид ирээдүйн дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин дахин давтах эсвэл үржүүлэх туршилтууд баримтуудыг баримтуудын хамтдаа өөр олон өгөгдлийн сангуудыг бодох, арга замаар, хэвлэгдсэн кодыг нэмэгдүүлэх, давтах боломжтой байдлыг багасгах Бид Жупитер Нотобуктай GitHub-ын загварын зохион байгууллагын кодыг бүрэн бичил баримт ойлгохын тулд ашиглаж өгсөн. Бид бусад хүмүүсийн бичил баримтуудтай адилхан ажиллахыг зөвлөж байна.', 'pl': 'Brak powtarzalności i ogólności to dwa istotne zagrożenia dla ciągłego rozwoju naukowego w zakresie przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Modele językowe i metody uczenia się są na tyle złożone, że naukowe artykuły konferencyjne nie zawierają już wystarczającej przestrzeni na głębokość techniczną wymaganą do replikacji lub reprodukcji. Biorąc pod uwagę analizę sentymentów celowych jako studium przypadku, pokazujemy, że ostatnie prace w tej dziedzinie nie wydały konsekwentnie kodu lub opisywały ustawienia metod uczenia się wystarczająco szczegółowo, a także brakuje porównywalności i ogólności w danych dotyczących pociągu, testów lub walidacji. Aby zbadać ogólność i umożliwić najnowocześniejszą ocenę porównawczą, przeprowadzamy pierwsze badania reprodukcyjne trzech grup uzupełniających się metod i przeprowadzamy pierwszą wielkoskalową ocenę masową na sześciu różnych zbiorach danych angielskich. Biorąc pod uwagę nasze doświadczenia, zalecamy, aby przyszłe eksperymenty w zakresie replikacji lub reprodukcji zawsze uwzględniały różne zbiory danych wraz z dokumentowaniem i udostępnianiem ich metod i opublikowanego kodu w celu zminimalizowania barier dla powtarzalności i ogólności. Wydaliśmy nasz kod wraz z modelem zoo na GitHub z Jupyter Notebookami, aby ułatwić zrozumienie i pełną dokumentację, i zalecamy, aby inni robili to samo ze swoimi dokumentami w czasie składania za pośrednictwem anonimowego konta GitHub.', 'ro': 'Lipsa repetabilității și generalizabilității reprezintă două amenințări semnificative la adresa dezvoltării științifice continue în procesarea limbajului natural. Modelele lingvistice și metodele de învățare sunt atât de complexe încât lucrările de conferință științifică nu mai conțin suficient spațiu pentru adâncimea tehnică necesară pentru reproducere sau reproducere. Luând analiza sentimentelor dependente de țintă ca studiu de caz, arătăm că munca recentă în domeniu nu a eliberat în mod constant cod, sau a descris setările pentru metodele de învățare suficient de detaliate și lipsește comparabilitatea și generalizarea datelor de tren, testare sau validare. Pentru a investiga generalizarea și pentru a permite evaluări comparative de ultimă generație, efectuăm primele studii de reproducere a trei grupuri de metode complementare și efectuăm prima evaluare masivă la scară largă pe șase seturi de date engleze diferite. Reflectând asupra experiențelor noastre, recomandăm ca viitoarele experimente de replicare sau reproducere să ia în considerare întotdeauna o varietate de seturi de date, alături de documentarea și eliberarea metodelor și a codului publicat, pentru a minimiza barierele atât în calea repetabilității, cât și generalizării. Am lansat codul nostru cu o grădină zoologică model pe GitHub cu notebook-uri Jupyter pentru a ajuta la înțelegerea și documentația completă, și recomandăm ca alții să facă același lucru cu lucrările lor la momentul depunerii printr-un cont GitHub anonim.', 'mt': 'In-nuqqas ta’ ripetibbiltà u ġeneralizzazzjoni huma żewġ theddid sinifikanti għall-iżvilupp xjentifiku kontinwu fl-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali. Il-mudelli lingwistiċi u l-metodi ta’ tagħlim huma tant kumplessi li d-dokumenti ta’ konferenza xjentifika ma għadhomx fihom biżżejjed spazju għall-fond tekniku meħtieġ għar-replikazzjoni jew ir-riproduzzjoni. Meta nqisu l-Analiżi tas-Sentiment Dipendenti fuq il-Mira bħala studju ta’ każ, nagħmlu evidenza ta’ kif ix-xogħol reċenti fil-qasam ma rrilaxxax b’mod konsistenti kodiċi, jew deskritt setturi għal metodi ta’ tagħlim f’dettall biżżejjed, u nieqsa mill-komparabbiltà u l-ġeneralizzazzjoni fid-dejta tal-ferroviji, tat-testijiet jew Biex ninvestigaw il-ġeneralizzazzjoni u biex ninvestigaw l-aktar evalwazzjonijiet komparattivi avvanzati, nagħmlu l-ewwel studji dwar ir-riproduzzjoni ta’ tliet gruppi ta’ metodi kumplimentari u nagħmlu l-ewwel evalwazzjoni tal-massa fuq skala kbira fuq sitt settijiet differenti ta’ dejta Ingliżi. B’riflessjoni fuq l-esperjenzi tagħna, nirrakkomandaw li esperimenti futuri ta’ replikazzjoni jew riproduzzjoni għandhom dejjem jikkunsidraw varjetà ta’ settijiet ta’ dejta flimkien mad-dokumentazzjoni u r-rilaxx tal-metodi u l-kodiċi ppubblikati tagħhom sabiex jimminimizzaw l-ostakli kemm għar-ripetibbiltà kif ukoll għall-ġeneralizzazzjoni. Aħna rrilaxxajna l-kodiċi tagħna b’mudell ta’ zoo fuq GitHub b’Notebooks Jupyter biex jgħinu fil-fehim u d-dokumentazzjoni sħiħa, u nirrakkomandaw li oħrajn jagħmlu l-istess bid-dokumenti tagħhom fil-ħin tas-sottomissjoni permezz ta’ kont anonimu ta’ GitHub.', 'no': 'Manglar på gjentakelighet og generelliserbarhet er to signifikante trusler for å fortsette vitenskapelige utvikling i naturspråkprosessering. Språk- modeller og læringsmetodar er så komplekse at vitenskapelige konferansmetodar ikkje lenger inneheld nok plass for den tekniske dybde som krevst for replikasjon eller reproduksjon. Viser vi korleis nyleg arbeid i feltet ikkje har utgjeven kode, eller beskriven innstillingar for læringsmetodar i nok detalj, og manglar sammenlignbare og generelliserbar i tog, testen eller valideringsdata. For å undersøke generelliserbarhet og for å slå på tilstanden til kunstsammenligningane, gjer vi dei første reproduksjonsstudiane i tre grupper av komplementære metodar og utfører den første store massevalueringa på seks ulike engelske datasett. Dersom vi gjer referanse på opplevelsane våre, anbefaler vi at framtidige kopieringseksperimenter eller reproduksjonseksperimenter skal alltid gjennomgå ei ulike datasett ved siden av dokumentering og utgjeving av metodane og utgjeven koden sine for å minimere barrierene til både gjentakingsbehandlingar og generelliserbar. Vi har løyst koden vårt med eit modell zoo zoo på GitHub med Jupyter-notatboks for å hjelpa forståelse og fullstendig dokumentasjon, og vi anbefaler at andre gjer det same med papiret sine ved å senda inn tid gjennom ein anonymisert GitHub-konto.', 'sr': 'Nedostatak ponavljivosti i generalizacije su dve značajne prijetnje nastavku naučnog razvoja u procesu prirodnog jezika. Jezikovi modeli i metode učenja su tako kompleksni da naučni konferencijski dokumenti više ne sadrže dovoljno prostora za tehničku dubinu potrebnu za replikaciju ili reprodukciju. Uzimajući ciljnu zavisnu analizu osjećajnosti kao studiju slučajeva, pokazujemo kako nedavno rad na terenu nije konsekventno oslobodio kodeks, ili opisujući nastave za metode učenja u dovoljno detalja, i nedostaje usporednost i generalizabilnost podataka vlaka, test a ili validacije. Da bismo istražili generalizabilnost i da bismo omogućili stanje usporedbenih procjena umjetnosti, proveli smo prva ispitivanja reprodukcije tri grupe komplementarnih metoda i izvršili prvu veliku masovnu procjenu na šest različitih engleskih podataka. Preporučujemo da budući eksperimenti za replikaciju ili reprodukciju uvek treba razmotriti različite podatke zajedno sa dokumentiranjem i relevancijom njihovih metoda i objavljivanjem koda kako bi se smanjili barijere na ponavljivost i generalizaciju. Pustili smo naš kod sa modelom zoološkom vrtu na GitHubu sa Jupyter Notebooksima kako bi pomogli razumijevanju i punom dokumentacijom, i preporučujemo da drugi rade isto sa svojim novinama na podnošenju vremena kroz anonimni GitHub račun.', 'sv': 'Brist på repeterbarhet och generaliserbarhet är två betydande hot mot fortsatt vetenskaplig utveckling inom Natural Language Processing. Språkmodeller och inlärningsmetoder är så komplexa att vetenskapliga konferensdokument inte längre innehåller tillräckligt med utrymme för det tekniska djupet som krävs för replikering eller reproduktion. Med Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis som fallstudie visar vi hur det senaste arbetet inom fältet inte konsekvent har släppt kod, eller beskrivit inställningar för inlärningsmetoder tillräckligt detaljerat, och saknar jämförbarhet och generellhet i tåg-, test- eller valideringsdata. För att undersöka generaliseringen och möjliggöra toppmoderna jämförande utvärderingar genomför vi de första reproduktionsstudierna av tre grupper av kompletterande metoder och utför den första storskaliga massutvärderingen på sex olika engelska datauppsättningar. Med tanke på våra erfarenheter rekommenderar vi att framtida replikerings- eller reproduktionsexperiment alltid bör beakta en mängd olika datauppsättningar tillsammans med dokumentering och publicering av deras metoder och publicerade kod för att minimera hindren för både repeterbarhet och generalisering. Vi har släppt vår kod med en modell zoo på GitHub med Jupyter Notebooks för att underlätta förståelsen och fullständig dokumentation, och vi rekommenderar att andra gör detsamma med sina papper vid inlämningstid via ett anonymiserat GitHub-konto.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණයේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක විශ්වාසික විශාල ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවෘ භාෂා මොඩල් සහ ඉගෙන ගන්න විද්\u200dයාපාරය ඉතා සංශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපාරය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරය ස Targe Dependent Sentiment විශ්ලේෂණය විශ්ලේෂණයක් විදිහට පෙන්වන්න, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ක්\u200dෂේත්\u200dරයේ අලුත් වැඩේ කොඩ් නිදහස් කරලා නැති කියලා, නැති විස්තර විස්තර සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න සහ කල්ලාගේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සක්\u200dරීය කරන්න, අපි පළමු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුන් කණ්ඩායම් ව අපේ අවස්ථාවට ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා, අපි ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා අනාගතයේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරනවා වි අපි ජූපිටර් නොට්බොක්ස් එක්ක ජූපිටර් නොට්බොක්ස් එක්ක අපේ කෝඩ් එක පිළිබඳ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, සම්පූර්ණ ලිපිණිපත්තියක් සඳහා අනිත', 'ur': 'دوبارہ تکرار کرنے والی اور عمومی قابلیت کی کمزوری دو اہم تهدید ہیں کہ طبیعی زبان پرسس میں علمی توسعہ ادامه کریں۔ زبان مدلکوں اور سیکھنے کے طریقے بہت پیچیدہ ہیں کہ سائنس کنفرانس کاپورکوں میں کبھی تکنیکی عمیق کے لئے ضرورت کی تکنیکی عمیق کے لئے کافی جگہ نہیں ہے۔ Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis کو ایک کیس مطالعہ کے طور پر لیتے ہیں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ کس طرح اگلے کام فیلڈ میں کوڈ نہیں آزاد کیا گیا ہے، یا کافی جزئیات کے مطالعہ کے لئے سیکھنے کے لئے تنظیمات کا مطالعہ بیان کیا گیا ہے، اور ٹرین، امتحان یا validation ڈیٹوں میں مقایسہ ہم نے تین گروہوں کی پہلی بازگشت کی تحقیقات کی اور سو مختلف انگلیسی ڈاٹ سٹ پر پہلی بڑی مساوی مطالعہ کی۔ ہمارے تجربے کے بارے میں متوجہ ہوتے ہیں، ہم اس کی توصیف کرتے ہیں کہ مستقبل تکرار یا تکرار کی تجربے ہمیشہ دکھانے کے ساتھ اور ان کے طریقوں کو چھوڑ دینے کے ساتھ مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ کی نظر کریں اور ان کے طریقوں کو چھوڑ دیں اور منتشر کیے گئے کڈ کے ذریعہ سے باز ہم نے یوپئیٹر نوٹبوک کے ساتھ GitHub پر ایک موڈل زیور کے ساتھ ہمارا کوڈ آزاد کردیا ہے کہ سمجھ اور پورے دکھانے کی مدد کریں اور ہم نے دوسروں کو ایک نامی GitHub حساب کے ذریعے اپنے کاغذوں کے ساتھ ایسا ہی کرنا نصیحت کریں۔', 'so': 'Lacag la’aanta dib u soo celinta iyo dhalashada waa laba hanjabaad oo muhiim ah in la sii wado horumarinta cilmi-horumarinta oo la soconayo baaritaanka afka asalka ah. Tusaalada luuqada iyo qaababka waxbarashadu waa wax adag in warqadaha cilmiga leh ayan mar dambe ku haysan meel ku filan moolka teknolojiga loo baahan yahay in la soo celiyo ama la soo celiyo. Analyska waqtiga ku saabsan baaxada gaadiga, waxaynu tusnaynaa siduu shaqada ugu dambeeyay duurka ugu sii daayay amaan u qorsheynay qaababka waxbarashada si ku filan, una baahna isku mid ahaanshaha iyo dhaqanka shahaadada, imtixaanka ama xaqiijinta. Si aan u baarito dhalashada iyo si aan u fududeyno qiimeynta barbarashada farshaxanka, waxaynu sameynaa waxbarashada ugu horeeya ee saddex kooxood oo ka mid ah qaababka iskuullada, waxaana sameynaa qiimeynta guud ee ugu horeeya lix kooxood oo luuqad kala duduwan. Ka fiirsashada aragtideena, waxaan ku talinaynaa in qalabka soo celinta ama imtixaanka dib loo soo celin karo ay mar walba ka fikiraan sawirro kala duduwan oo ku qoran macluumaad, taasoo ay ka sii daabacaan qaababtooda iyo codsiga la soo daabacay si ay u minimiso qalabka dib u celinta iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha. Waxaan kaarkayada ku siinnay xoolo noocyo ah oo GitHub ku yaala Jupyter Notebooks, si a an u caawinno waxgarashada iyo dukumentiyada buuxda, waxaana ku talinaynaa in qof kale ay isla mid ku sameeyaan warqadahooda oo waqti loo soo diro akoonka GitHub aan la magacaabin.', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் தொடர்ந்து வரும் அறிவியல் வளர்ச்சியை இரண்டு முக்கியமான அச்சுறுத்தல்கள். மொழி மாதிரி மற்றும் கற்றல் முறைமைகள் மிகவும் சிக்கலாகும் என்றால் அறிவியல் மாதிரிகள் மேலும் பின்னணி அல்லது புதுப்பிக்க தே இலக்கு சார்ந்த சார்ந்த வாய்ப்பு ஆராய்ச்சியாக எடுத்து, நாம் புலத்தில் உள்ள சமீபத்திய வேலை எப்படி வெளியிடப்படாது என்பதை காட்டுகிறோம் அல்லது போதுமான கற்ற முறைகளு பொதுவானத்தையும் தேர்ந்தெடுத்து கலை ஒப்பீட்டு மதிப்புகளையும் செயல்படுத்த, மூன்று குழுவின் முதல் முறையான முறையான முறைகளையும் செயல்படுத்த எங்கள் அனுபவங்களை பார்த்து, எதிர்கால மாற்றுதல் அல்லது புதுப்பித்தல் சோதனைகள் எப்போதும் ஆவணங்களை கூடுதலாக தகவல் அமைப்புகளை பார்க்க பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் மற்றும்  நாங்கள் ஜிப்பைட்டர் குறிப்புகளுடன் ஜிட்ஹுப் மாதிரி புத்தகத்துடன் எங்கள் குறியீட்டை வெளியிட்டுள்ளோம் புரிந்து புரியும் முழு ஆவணங்களும் உதவி, மற', 'uz': "Qaytarish va generalizlik haqida, ilmiy tajribani tabiiy tillar jarayonini davom etishga ikki muhim trusler. Til modellari va o'rganish usullari juda murakkab, ilmiy konferansa qoʻllari bu holatda replica yoki reproduce uchun kerak boʻlgan texnologiya qoʻllanmagan. @ info: whatsthis Birinchi narsalarni o'rganish uchun birinchi narsalarni o'qish uchun, biz uchta guruhga murakkablik usullarning birinchi taklif qilishni bajaramiz va birinchi katta massa qiymatni 6 turli ingliz maʼlumotlar tarkibida bajaramiz. Biz tajribaларимизга назар солиб турибмиз, biz kelajakdagi replica yoki reproduction eksperimentelarini davom etish va qoʻllanmalar bilan bir nechta maʼlumot etishlarini tasavvur qilishimiz va ularning usullarini chiqarishi va qayta qoidalarni qayta ishlab chiqarish uchun buyruqlar va generalisiyatlarni kamaytirish uchun. Biz GitHub modeli zooli bilan Jupyter yozuvlari yordamida qoidamizni chiqardik. Bu dokumentar yordam qilish va butun hujjatni yordam berish uchun boshqa qoʻllanmalarni aniqlangan GitHub hisoboti orqali yordam berish uchun shunday qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Thiếu khả năng lặp lại và phát triển chung là hai mối đe dọa lớn cho việc phát triển khoa học tiếp tục trong Quá trình hóa ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Ngôn ngữ và phương pháp học phức tạp đến nỗi các biên bản hội nghị khoa học không còn chứa đủ chỗ cho độ sâu kỹ thuật cần thiết cho sự tái tạo hay tái tạo. Nhận lấy Phân tích tình cảm phụ thuộc đích làm một nghiên cứu điển hình, chúng tôi cho thấy những tác phẩm mới trong lĩnh vực chưa từng giải mã, hay thiết lập được mô tả về phương pháp học đủ chi tiết, thiếu sự tương đồng và sự lan rộng trong dữ liệu huấn luyện, kiểm tra hay thẩm tra. Để nghiên cứu về khả năng tổng hợp và cho phép tiến hành đánh giá cùng nghệ thuật, chúng tôi thực hiện các nghiên cứu sinh sản đầu tiên của ba nhóm các phương pháp bổ sung, và thực hiện bản đánh giá hàng loạt đầu tiên trên sáu bộ dữ liệu Anh khác nhau. Dựa theo kinh nghiệm của chúng tôi, chúng tôi đề nghị thử nghiệm sao chép hay sinh sản tương lai nên luôn cân nhắc các bộ dữ liệu khác nhau, cùng với việc ghi chép và phát hành phương pháp và mã công bố, để có thể hạn chế luôn luôn ngăn chặn lặp đi lặp lại và phát triển. Chúng tôi đã phát hành mật mã của chúng tôi với một sở thú ở GitHub cùng các cuốn sổ tháng tháng tháng Jupyger để giúp đỡ hiểu biết và tài liệu đầy đủ, và chúng tôi khuyến cáo những người khác làm điều tương tự với các giấy tờ của họ tại thời điểm đăng nhập dữ liệu tại GitHub.', 'da': 'Manglende repeterbarhed og generaliserbarhed er to væsentlige trusler mod den fortsatte videnskabelige udvikling i Natural Language Processing. Sprogmodeller og indlæringsmetoder er så komplekse, at videnskabelige konferencepapirer ikke længere indeholder plads nok til den tekniske dybde, der kræves for reproduktion eller reproduktion. Med Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis som et casestudie viser vi, hvordan det seneste arbejde på området ikke konsekvent har frigivet kode, eller beskrevet indstillinger for læringsmetoder tilstrækkeligt detaljeret, og mangler sammenlignelighed og generalitet i tog-, test- eller valideringsdata. For at undersøge generaliteten og muliggøre state of te art komparative evalueringer gennemfører vi de første reproduktionsundersøgelser af tre grupper af komplementære metoder og udfører den første store masseevaluering på seks forskellige engelske datasæt. I betragtning af vores erfaringer anbefaler vi, at fremtidige replikations- eller reproduktionseksperimenter altid bør overveje en række datasæt sammen med dokumentation og frigivelse af deres metoder og offentliggjort kode for at minimere barriererne for både gentagelighed og generalisering. Vi har frigivet vores kode med en model zoo på GitHub med Jupyter Notebooks for at hjælpe med forståelse og fuld dokumentation, og vi anbefaler, at andre gør det samme med deres papirer på indsendelsestidspunktet via en anonymiseret GitHub konto.', 'bg': 'Липсата на повторяемост и обобщаваемост са две значителни заплахи за продължаващото научно развитие в обработката на естествения език. Езиковите модели и методите за учене са толкова сложни, че научните конферентни доклади вече не съдържат достатъчно място за техническата дълбочина, необходима за репликация или възпроизвеждане. Вземайки като примерно проучване анализа на целевите зависими чувства, ние показваме как скорошната работа в областта не е пускала последователно код или описала настройките за методите на обучение достатъчно подробно и липсва сравнимост и обобщеност в данните за обучение, тест или валидиране. За да се изследва обобщаваемостта и да се даде възможност за най-съвременни сравнителни оценки, ние извършваме първите проучвания за възпроизвеждане на три групи допълващи се методи и първата мащабна масова оценка на шест различни английски масиви. Отразявайки опита си, препоръчваме бъдещите експерименти за репликация или възпроизвеждане винаги да разглеждат различни набори от данни, наред с документирането и публикуването на техните методи и публикувания код, за да се сведат до минимум бариерите пред повторяемостта и обобщаваемостта. Ние пуснахме нашия код с моделен зоопарк в Бележници за подпомагане на разбирането и пълната документация, и препоръчваме на другите да направят същото с документите си по време на подаване чрез анонимизиран акаунт.', 'hr': 'Nedostatak ponovnosti i generalizacije su dvije značajne prijetnje nastavku naučnog razvoja u procesu prirodnog jezika. Jezikovi modeli i metode učenja su tako kompleksni da naučni konferencijski dokumenti više ne sadrže dovoljno prostora za tehničku dubinu potrebnu za replikaciju ili reprodukciju. Uzimajući ciljnu zavisnu analizu osjetljivosti kao studiju slučajeva, pokazujemo kako nedavni rad na terenu nije konsekventno oslobodio kodeks, ili opisujući nastave za metode učenja u dovoljno detalja, a nedostaje usporednost i generalizabilnost podataka vlaka, testa ili validacije. Da bismo istražili generalizabilnost i omogućili stanje usporednih procjena umjetnosti, proveli smo prva ispitivanja reprodukcije tri grupe komplementarnih metoda i proveli prvu veliku masovnu procjenu na šest različitih engleskih podataka. Preporučujemo da budući eksperimenti za replikaciju ili reprodukciju uvijek treba razmotriti razne podatke zajedno s dokumentiranjem i objavljivanjem njihovih metoda i objavljivanjem koda kako bi se smanjili barijere na ponovnost i generalizaciju. Pustili smo naš kod sa modelom zoološkim vrtovima na GitHub sa Jupyter Notebooksima kako bi pomogli razumijevanju i punom dokumentacijom, i preporučujemo drugima da urade isto sa svojim novinama na podnošenje vremena kroz anonimni GitHub račun.', 'id': 'Kekurangan kebolehan ulang dan generalisasi adalah dua ancaman yang signifikan untuk terus berkembang ilmiah dalam Proses Bahasa Alam. Model bahasa dan metode belajar begitu kompleks bahwa kertas konferensi ilmiah tidak lagi memiliki cukup ruang untuk kedalaman teknis yang diperlukan untuk replikasi atau reproduksi. Mengambil Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis sebagai studi kasus, kami menunjukkan bagaimana pekerjaan baru-baru ini di lapangan tidak secara konsisten melepaskan kode, atau menggambarkan pengaturan untuk metode belajar dengan cukup detail, dan kekurangan perbandingan dan generalisasi dalam data kereta, tes atau validasi. Untuk menyelidiki generalisasi dan memungkinkan evaluasi perbandingan terbaik, kami melakukan studi reproduksi pertama dari tiga kelompok metode komplementari dan melakukan evaluasi massa skala besar pertama pada enam set data Inggris yang berbeda. Mengingat pengalaman kita, kita merekomendasikan bahwa percobaan replikasi atau reproduksi masa depan harus selalu mempertimbangkan berbagai set data bersama mendokumentasi dan melepaskan metode mereka dan kode yang diterbitkan untuk mengurangi halangan untuk kedua-dua repeatability dan generalisasi. We have released our code with a model zoo on GitHub with Jupyter Notebooks to aid understanding and full documentation, and we recommend that others do the same with their papers at submission time through an anonymised GitHub account.', 'nl': 'Gebrek aan herhaalbaarheid en generaliseerbaarheid zijn twee belangrijke bedreigingen voor de voortdurende wetenschappelijke ontwikkeling in Natural Language Processing. Taalmodellen en leermethoden zijn zo complex dat wetenschappelijke conferentiestukken niet meer voldoende ruimte bevatten voor de technische diepte die nodig is voor replicatie of reproductie. Aan de hand van Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis als casestudy laten we zien hoe recent werk in het veld niet consequent code heeft vrijgegeven, of instellingen voor leermethoden onvoldoende gedetailleerd heeft beschreven, en dat het gebrek aan vergelijkbaarheid en generaliseerbaarheid in trein-, test- of validatiegegevens ontbreekt. Om de veralgemeendheid te onderzoeken en state-of-the-art vergelijkende evaluaties mogelijk te maken, voeren we de eerste reproductiestudies uit van drie groepen complementaire methoden en voeren we de eerste grootschalige massaevaluatie uit op zes verschillende Engelse datasets. Rekening houdend met onze ervaringen raden we aan dat toekomstige replicatie- of reproductieexperimenten altijd rekening houden met een verscheidenheid aan datasets naast het documenteren en vrijgeven van hun methoden en gepubliceerde code om de barrières voor zowel herhaalbaarheid als generaliseerbaarheid tot een minimum te beperken. We hebben onze code uitgebracht met een model zoo op GitHub met Jupyter Notebooks om het begrip en de volledige documentatie te helpen, en we raden anderen aan hetzelfde te doen met hun documenten op het moment van indiening via een geanonimiseerd GitHub-account.', 'de': 'Mangelnde Wiederholbarkeit und Verallgemeinerbarkeit sind zwei wesentliche Bedrohungen für die weitere wissenschaftliche Entwicklung in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. Sprachmodelle und Lernmethoden sind so komplex, dass wissenschaftliche Konferenzbeiträge nicht mehr genügend Platz für die technische Tiefe für Replikation oder Reproduktion bieten. Anhand von Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis als Fallstudie zeigen wir, dass die jüngsten Arbeiten in diesem Feld nicht konsequent Code veröffentlicht oder Einstellungen für Lernmethoden ausreichend detailliert beschrieben haben und dass es an Vergleichbarkeit und Verallgemeinerbarkeit in Zug-, Test- oder Validierungsdaten mangelt. Um die Verallgemeinerbarkeit zu untersuchen und vergleichende Auswertungen nach dem neuesten Stand der Technik zu ermöglichen, führen wir erste Reproduktionsstudien von drei Gruppen komplementärer Methoden durch und führen die erste großformatige Massenauswertung an sechs verschiedenen englischen Datensätzen durch. In Anbetracht unserer Erfahrungen empfehlen wir, dass zukünftige Replikations- oder Reproduktionsexperimente neben der Dokumentation und Freigabe ihrer Methoden und veröffentlichten Codes immer eine Vielzahl von Datensätzen berücksichtigen sollten, um die Barrieren für Wiederholbarkeit und Verallgemeinerbarkeit zu minimieren. Wir haben unseren Code mit einem Modell-Zoo auf GitHub mit Jupyter Notebooks veröffentlicht, um das Verständnis und die vollständige Dokumentation zu erleichtern, und wir empfehlen anderen, dasselbe mit ihren Beiträgen zum Zeitpunkt der Einreichung über ein anonymisiertes GitHub-Konto zu tun.', 'ko': '중복성과 통용성이 부족한 것은 자연 언어 처리 과학이 지속적으로 발전하는 두 가지 위협이다.언어 모델과 학습 방법이 이렇게 복잡해서 과학회의 논문은 더 이상 충분한 공간을 포함하지 않고 복제나 복제에 필요한 기술적 깊이를 만족시킬 수 없다.목표 관련 정서 분석을 사례 연구로 삼아 우리는 이 분야의 최신 업무가 코드를 지속적으로 발표하지 않거나 학습 방법의 설정을 충분히 상세하게 설명하거나 훈련, 테스트 또는 검증 데이터에서 비교가능성과 통용성이 부족함을 보여 주었다.통용성을 연구하고 가장 선진적인 비교 평가를 실현하기 위해 우리는 세 그룹의 상호 보완 방법에 대해 처음으로 복제 연구를 실시했고 6개의 서로 다른 영어 데이터 집합에 대해 처음으로 대규모 평가를 실시했다.우리의 경험을 돌이켜 보면, 우리는 미래의 복제나 복제 실험은 시종일관 각종 데이터 집합을 고려하고, 그것들의 방법과 이미 발표된 코드를 기록하고 발표함으로써 중복성과 통용성의 장애를 최대한 줄여야 한다고 건의한다.GitHub에 Jupyter 노트가 있는 모델 동물원 코드를 발표하여 이해와 완전한 문서를 돕고 논문을 제출할 때 익명의 GitHub 계정을 통해 같은 조작을 권장합니다.', 'sw': 'Lack of repeatability and generalisability are two significant threats to continuing scientific development in Natural Language Processing.  Mradi wa lugha na mbinu za kujifunza ni vigumu sana kwamba karatasi za kongamano la kisayansi hazina nafasi ya kutosha kwa kina cha teknolojia kinachohitajika kwa ajili ya kujibu au uzalishaji. Kuchukua uchambuzi wa Seneti anayetegemea Target kama utafiti wa kesi, tunaonyesha jinsi kazi ya hivi karibuni katika uwanja haijachiliwa tena na sheria, au kuelezea mazingira ya namna za kujifunza kwa kina, na ukosefu wa usambazaji na ubunifu katika taarifa za uhalisia. Ili kuchunguza uhalisia na kuwezesha hali ya tathmini za sanaa zinazolinganisha, tunafanya tafiti za kwanza za za uzalishaji wa makundi matatu ya mbinu za uungwaji na kutekeleza tatizo la kiasi kikubwa kwenye seti sita tofauti za takwimu za Kiingereza. Akiangalia uzoefu wetu, tunapendekeza kuwa majaribio ya baadaye au majaribio ya uzazi yanapaswa kuangalia zana mbalimbali za taarifa pamoja na kuweka kumbukumbu na kuachia njia zao na kuchapisha sheria ili kupunguza vizuizi vya upatikanaji na uwezekano. Tumetoa sheria zetu kwa ajili ya zoo la mifano kwenye GitHub na Vitabu vya Jupyter ili kusaidia kuelewa na taarifa kamili, na tunapendekeza kuwa wengine wanafanya hivyo na makaratasi yao kwa kutuma muda wa kutoa ujumbe kupitia akaunti ya GitHub isiyojulikana.', 'fa': 'ناتوانی تکراری و قابلیت عمومی دو تهدید مهم برای ادامه توسعه علمی در پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. مدلهای زبان و روش یادگیری خیلی پیچیده است که کاغذهای کنفرانس علمی دیگر فضای کافی برای عمیق تکنیکی که نیاز دارد برای تکنولوژی یا تکنولوژی وجود ندارد. به عنوان یک مطالعه پرونده، ما نشان می دهیم که چگونه کار اخیرا در زمینه کد آزاد نکرده است، یا تنظیمات برای روش یادگیری در جزئیات کافی توصیف نکرده است، و مقایسه و قابلیت عمومی در داده های قطار، آزمایش یا تصدیق کردن کم است. برای تحقیق قابلیت عمومی و فعال کردن وضعیت ارزیابی مقایسه هنری، ما اولین تحقیقات تولید تولید از سه گروه روش\u200cهای تعدادی را انجام می\u200cدهیم و اولین ارزیابی جرم مقایسه بزرگ را در شش مجموعه داده\u200cهای انگلیسی مختلف انجام می\u200cدهیم. با توجه به تجربه\u200cهایمان، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که آزمایشات تکرار یا تولید آینده باید همیشه مختلف مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها را در کنار ثبت کردن و آزاد کردن روش\u200cهای آنها و رمز منتشر شده را به کمترین اندازه\u200cگیری مانع بازگشت و توانایی عمومی در نظر بگیرند. ما کد خود را با یک باغ وحشی مدل در GitHub با نوشته\u200cهای جوپیتر آزاد کردیم تا به درک و مدارک کامل کمک کنیم، و ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که بقیه با روزنامه\u200cهایشان در زمان تحویل از یک حساب نامیده GitHub همین کار را انجام دهند.', 'af': "Ongelukkig van herhaalbaardigheid en generaliserbaardigheid is twee betekende bedrywe om te voortgaan wetenskaplike ontwikkeling in Natuurlike Taal Prosessering. Taalsmodelle en leermeetode is so kompleks dat wetenskaplike konferensiepapiers nie meer genoeg spasie bevat vir die tekniske diepte wat nodig is vir replikasie of reproduksie nie. Ons wys hoe onlangse werk in die veld nie konsistentlik verlig kode het nie, of beskrywe instellings vir leer metodes in genoeg detail, en misluk vergelykbaarheid en generaliserbarheid in trein, toets of geldigheidsdata. Om gewonelikheid te ondersoek en om staat van die kuns vergelykbare evaluasies te aktiveer, moet ons die eerste reproduksie studie van drie groepe komplementare metodes uitvoer en die eerste groot-skaal massevaluasie uitvoer op ses verskillende Engelske datastelle. Ons aanbeveel ons erfarings dat toekomstige replikasie of reproduksie eksperimente altyd 'n verskillende datastelle by die dokumentering en die uitlossing van hul metodes en publikeerde kode moet aangaan om die barriers te minimiseer tot weergawe en genereerbaardigheid. Ons het ons kode met 'n model zoo op GitHub met Jupyter Notebooks verlos om verstanding en volle dokumentasie te help, en ons beveel dat ander dieselfde doen met hul papiers op die onderwerp tyd deur 'n anonymiseerde GitHub rekening.", 'tr': "Täzeliklik we umumy ýeterlik etmek tebigat dilinde ylmy gelişmeleri dowam etmek üçin iki wajyp tehdit edip bilýär. Dil nusgalary we öwrenmek yöntemleri gaty karmaşık bolýar çünki bilim konferanslar kagytlarynda replikat we ýetişdirmek üçin gerek tekniki derinlikleri üçin ýeterlik ýere meýdança ýok. Maksadyň boýunça Sentiýasyny analizi ýaly, biz sahyda ýakyn işiň nähili soňky ködleri çykarmadygyny görkezip ýa-da ýeterlik detaylarda öwrenmek üçin düzümlerni tanyşdyrýarys we trende döredilişik we umumy barlamazlyk ýok. Umumy çykyşlygyny barlamak we sungat salyklaşyk çykyşlygyny mümkin etmek üçin, biz ilkinji çarpyş metodlaryň üç topary üçin ýene-de bir topar çykyşlygyny we ilkinji uly çykyş uly çykyşlygyny 6-nji görä Iňlis maglumaty düzü Tejribelerimizi düşünmekde, gelejekde replikat ýa-da reproducsiýa deneyleriniň hemişe bir topar veri setirlerini dokumentasyň we çykyş metodlaryny çykarmak we publikat ködlerini azaltmak üçin maslahat berýäris. Biz Jupyter Notebooks bilen GitHub'da bir nusga bilen çykardyk we doly dökümentlere kömek etmek üçin kodymyzy çykardyk we başgalarymyz şol ýagdaýlary hem etmegi teklip edip görýäris.", 'am': 'የጥያቄ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል እና የፍጥረተ ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት ውስጥ የሳይንቀሳዊ ግንኙነት ለመቀናቀል ሁለት ታላቅ ዛቻዎች ናቸው፡፡ የቋንቋ ምሳሌዎች እና ማስማር ዘዴዎች የሳይንስ ኮንቨርስቲ ቃላት ዳግመኛ ለጥልቅ ጥልቅ ወይም ለመቀናቀል የሚፈልገውን ቦታ እንደማይበቃል ተጨማሪ ናቸው፡፡ የአሁኑን ደረጃ ማሰናከል በመጠቀም፣ የአሁኑን ቦታ በሜዳ ውስጥ እንዴት ያለ ሥራ በቁጥር ያልተፈቀደ፣ ወይም ለመማር ሥርዓት በጠቅላላ የተጠቃሚ ምርጫዎች እና በtrain፣ ፈተና ወይም የሚያረጋግጥ ዳታ እንዳይጎድል እና አካባቢነት እና የፍላጎት ስህተት አለበት፡፡ የዘረኝነትን ለመመርመር እና የጣቢያውን አስተያየት ለማስቻል፣ የሦስት አካባቢ የሥርዓት አካባቢ ሥርዓት ተማርናት እናደርጋለን፡፡ Reflecting on our experiences, we recommend that future replication or reproduction experiments should always consider a variety of datasets alongside documenting and releasing their methods and published code in order to minimise the barriers to both repeatability and generalisability.  ኮዱን በጊትHub ላይ የዓይነት ኮድማችን ከጃፕyter Notebooks ጋር ማስተዋልን እና ሙሉ ሰነድ ማድረግ አፍረናል፤ ሌሎችም በጋትHub አካባቢ ላይ በተባለው ሰነፎቻቸውን በጊዜው እንዲያሰናክሉ እናመክራለን፡፡', 'az': "Təbiətli Dil İşləməsində bilimsel gelişməyi devam etmək üçün hərəkətsiz və generalizasizlik yoxdur. Dil modelləri və öyrənmə metodları çox kompleks olmuşdur ki, bilimsel konferans kağıtları replikasyon və reproduksyon üçün ehtiyacı olan teknik derinlikləri üçün artıq kifayət yer yoxdur. Məqsəd bağımlı Sentiment Analizi məsələlər təhsil olaraq almaq, sahədə yeni işlər nə qədər sürəkli kodu yayınlamadığını göstəririk, ya da öyrənmək metodlarının təhsil edilməsi kifayət detaylı olaraq təfsil edilməsi və trendə, sınamaq və validaşdırma məlumatlarında qarşılaşılabilir və generalizasizlik yo Üniversal müqabiliyyətini araşdırmaq və sanat müqabiliyyətinin müqabiliyyətini qabilleştirmək üçün, üç tamamlayıcı metodların ilk çoxluğu təhsil etmək və altı müxtəlif İngilizə veri quruluğunda ilk böyük ölçü müqabiliyyətini gerçəkləşdiririk. Bizim təcrübələrimizə baxmayaraq, gələcək replikasyon və reproduktiv eksperimentlərin hər zaman dokumentasyon və metodlarını yayındırmaq və yayınlanan kodu ilə birlikdə müxtəlif bir dəyişiklik verilən təcrübələrini təsdiqləməsini təsdiqləyirik. Bizim kodumuzu Jupyter Notebooksu ilə GitHub'da modeli zooloq bağına yayındırdıq ki, anlaşılmağa və tamamlama dökümətinə kömək edək, və digərləri anonimlənmiş GitHub hesabı ilə belə işləməsinə tavsiye edirik.", 'sq': 'Mungesa e përsëritësisë dhe gjeneralizueshmërisë janë dy kërcënime të rëndësishme për zhvillimin e vazhdueshëm shkencor në procesimin e gjuhës natyrore. Modelet e gjuhës dhe metodat e mësimit janë kaq komplekse që dokumentet e konferencave shkencore nuk përmbajnë më hapësirë të mjaftueshme për thellësinë teknike të kërkuar për riprodhimin apo riprodhimin. Duke marrë Analizën e Sentimenteve të Varur nga Objektivi si një studim rasti, ne tregojmë se si puna e fundit në fushë nuk ka lëshuar në mënyrë të vazhdueshme kodin, apo përshkruan rregullimet për metodat e mësimit në detaj të mjaftueshëm dhe mungon krahasueshmëria dhe gjeneralizueshmëria në të dhënat e trenit, testimit apo validimit. Për të hetuar gjeneralizueshmërinë dhe për të mundësuar vlerësimet krahasuese të state of the art, ne kryejmë studimet e para të riprodhimit të tre grupeve të metodave komplementare dhe kryejmë vlerësimin e parë masiv në shkallë të madhe në gjashtë grupe të dhënash të ndryshme angleze. Duke pasqyruar përvojat tona, ne rekomandojmë që eksperimentet e ardhshme të riprodhimit apo riprodhimit të konsiderojnë gjithmonë një shumëllojshmëri të grupeve të dhënash së bashku me dokumentimin dhe lëshimin e metodave të tyre dhe kodin e botuar me qëllim që të minimizojnë pengesat për riprodhimin dhe gjeneralizimin. Ne kemi lëshuar kodin tonë me një model zoologjik në GitHub me Jupyter Notebooks për të ndihmuar kuptimin dhe dokumentacionin e plotë, dhe ne rekomandojmë që të tjerët të bëjnë të njëjtën gjë me dokumentet e tyre në kohën e paraqitjes nëpërmjet një llogarie të anonimizuar GitHub.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় বৈজ্ঞানিক উন্নয়ন চলতে দুটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ হুমকি। ভাষার মডেল এবং শিক্ষা পদ্ধতি অত্যন্ত জটিল যে বৈজ্ঞানিক কনফারেন্সের কাগজ এখন পর্যাপ্ত জায়গা নেই যে প্রযুক্তিগত গভীরে প্রতি টার্গেটের নির্ভর করা সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণ একটি কেস গবেষণা হিসেবে গ্রহণ করে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি ক্ষেত্রে কি ভাবে সাম্প্রতিক ক কোডের মুক্তি প্রদান করা হয়নি, অথবা যথেষ্ট বিস To investigate generalisability and to enable state of the art comparative evaluations, we carry out the first reproduction studies of three groups of complementary methods and perform the first large-scale mass evaluation on six different English datasets.  আমাদের অভিজ্ঞতার প্রতি প্রতিক্রিয়া বা প্রজন্মের পরীক্ষা নিয়ে আমরা পরামর্শ দিচ্ছি যে ভবিষ্যতের প্রতিক্রিয়া বা পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা সবসময় ডকুমেন্টিং এর সাথে বিভিন আমরা জুপাইটার নোটবুকের সাথে জিটহাবের একটি মডেল চিত্রের চিত্র নিয়ে আমাদের কোড ছেড়ে দিয়েছি যাতে বুঝতে পারে এবং পূর্ণ নথিপত্রের সাহায্য করার জন্য। আর আমর', 'hy': 'Կարճելիության և ընդհանուր տարածելիության բացակայությունը երկու կարևոր վտանգ են բնական լեզվի մշակումների գիտական զարգացման համար: Լեզվային մոդելները և ուսուցման մեթոդները այնքան բարդ են, որ գիտական կոնֆերանսի փաստաթղթերը այլևս բավարար տարածք չունեն վերարտադրելու կամ վերարտադրելու համար պահանջված տեխնիկական խորության համար: Օգտագործելով նպատակի կախված զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը որպես դեպքի ուսումնասիրություն, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես է այս ոլորտում վերջին աշխատանքը համապատասխանաբար չի արտադրել կոդ, կամ բավականին մանրամասն նկարագրել ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներ, և բացակայում է համեմատություն և ըն Որպեսզի ուսումնասիրենք ընդհանրացողականությունը և հնարավորություն դարձնենք ամենաբարձր համեմատական գնահատումները, մենք կատարում ենք երեք խմբի բազմապատկած մեթոդների առաջին վերարտադրման ուսումնասիրությունները և կատարում ենք առաջին մեծ զանգվածային գնահատումը Հետևելով մեր փորձառություններին, մենք խորհուրդ ենք տալիս, որ ապագա կրկնօրինակման կամ կրկնօրինակման փորձարկումները միշտ պետք է հաշվի առնեն տարբեր տվյալների համակարգեր, միասին իրենց մեթոդների և հրատարակված կոդի մասին, որպեսզի նվազեցնեն կրկնօրինակ Մենք հրապարակեցինք մեր կոդը ԳիթՀուբի կենսաբանական մոդելի միջոցով JupHUB-ի հետ, որպեսզի օգնենք հասկանալ և ամբողջական փաստաթղթերը, և մենք խորհուրդ ենք տալիս, որ մյուսները նույնը անեն իրենց փաստաթղթերի հետ ներկայացման ժամանակ անհայտ ԳիթՀուբի հա', 'ca': "La falta de repetibilitat i generalització són dues amenaces significatives al desenvolupament científic continu en el processament de llenguatges naturals. Els models de llenguatge i els mètodes d'aprenentatge són tan complexes que els documents de conferències científices ja no contenen suficient espai per a la profunditat tècnica requerida per a la replicació o la reproducció. Prenant l'anàlisi del sentiment dependent de l'objectiu com a estudi de cas, demostram com la feina recent en el camp no ha publicat codi de manera constant, ni descrit les configuracions dels mètodes d'aprenentatge en suficient detall, i falta comparabilitat i generalització en les dades de tren, prova o validació. Per investigar la generalització i permetre evaluacions comparatives d'última generació, fem els primers estudis de reproducció de tres grups de mètodes complementars i fem la primera evaluació massiva a gran escala en sis conjunts de dades anglesos diferents. Reflexionant en les nostres experiències, recomanem que els futurs experiments de replicació o reproducció sempre consider in una varietat de conjunts de dades alhora de documentar i alliberar els seus mètodes i codi publicat per minimitzar les barreres tant a la repetició com a la generalització. We have released our code with a model zoo on GitHub with Jupyter Notebooks to aid understanding and full documentation, and we recommend that others do the same with their papers at submission time through an anonymised GitHub account.", 'bs': 'Nedostatak ponovnosti i generalizacije su dvije značajne prijetnje nastavku naučnog razvoja u procesu prirodnog jezika. Jezikovi modeli i metode učenja su tako kompleksni da naučni konferencijski dokumenti više ne sadrže dovoljno prostora za tehničku dubinu potrebnu za replikaciju ili reprodukciju. Uzimajući ciljnu zavisnu analizu za slučaj, pokazujemo kako nedavni rad na terenu nije konsekventno oslobodio kodeks, ili opisujući nastave za metode učenja u dovoljno detalja, i nedostaje usporednost i generalizabilnost podataka vlaka, test a ili validacije. Da bismo istražili generalizabilnost i omogućili stanje usporedbenih procjena umjetnosti, proveli smo prva ispitivanja reprodukcije tri grupe komplementarnih metoda i proveli prvu veliku masovnu procjenu na šest različitih engleskih podataka. Predlažeći na naše iskustvo, preporučujemo da budući eksperimenti za replikaciju ili reprodukciju uvijek treba razmotriti različite sete podataka zajedno s dokumentacijom i objavljivanjem njihovih metoda i objavljivanjem koda kako bi se smanjili barijere i ponavljivosti i generalizaciji. Pustili smo naš kod sa modelom zoološkim vrtovima na GitHubu sa Jupyter Notebooksima kako bi pomogli razumijevanju i punom dokumentacijom, i preporučujemo da drugi rade isto sa svojim novinama na podnošenju vremena kroz anonimni GitHub račun.', 'cs': 'Nedostatek opakovatelnosti a obecnosti jsou dvě významné hrozby pro pokračující vědecký vývoj v oblasti zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Jazykové modely a metody učení jsou natolik složité, že vědecké konferenční příspěvky již neobsahují dostatek prostoru pro technickou hloubku potřebnou pro replikaci nebo reprodukci. Na základě analýzy cílových závislých sentimentů jako případové studie ukazujeme, že nedávná práce v oboru neudělala konzistentně kód, nebo popsala nastavení učebních metod dostatečně detailně a postrádá srovnatelnost a obecnost ve vlakových, testových nebo validačních datech. Pro zkoumání obecnosti a umožnění nejmodernějších srovnávacích hodnocení provádíme první reprodukční studie tří skupin doplňkových metod a provádíme první velkoplošné hmotnostní hodnocení na šesti různých anglických datových sadách. S ohledem na naše zkušenosti doporučujeme, aby budoucí replikační nebo reprodukční experimenty vždy zvážily různé datové sady spolu s dokumentováním a uvolněním jejich metod a publikovaného kódu, aby se minimalizovaly bariéry opakovatelnosti i obecné. Vydali jsme náš kód s modelovou zoologickou zahradou na GitHubu s Jupyter Notebooky, abychom usnadnili porozumění a úplnou dokumentaci, a doporučujeme ostatním učinit totéž se svými články v době odeslání prostřednictvím anonymizovaného účtu GitHub.', 'et': 'Korratavuse ja üldistatavuse puudumine on kaks olulist ohtu looduskeele töötlemise jätkuvale teaduslikule arengule. Keelemudelid ja õppemeetodid on nii keerulised, et teaduslikud konverentsidokumendid ei sisalda enam piisavalt ruumi reprodutseerimiseks või reprodutseerimiseks vajaliku tehnilise sügavuse jaoks. Võttes sihtmärkidest sõltuva tunnete analüüsi juhtumiuuringuna, näitame, kuidas hiljutine töö valdkonnas ei ole pidevalt välja andnud koodi või kirjeldanud õppemeetodite seadeid piisavalt üksikasjalikult ning puudub võrreldavus ja üldistatavus rongi-, katse- või valideerimisandmetes. Üldisuse uurimiseks ja kaasaegsete võrdlevate hindamiste võimaldamiseks teostame kolme täiendavate meetodite rühma esimesed reproduktsiooniuuringud ning esimese suuremahulise massihindamise kuuel erineval inglise andmekogumil. Meie kogemusi arvestades soovitame, et tulevased replikatsiooni- või reprodutseerimiskatsed peaksid alati arvestama erinevate andmekogumitega koos nende meetodite ja avaldatud koodide dokumenteerimise ja avaldamise kõrval, et minimeerida nii korratavuse kui ka üldistatavuse takistusi. Oleme avaldanud GitHubis Jupyteri sülearvutitega oma koodi, mis aitab kaasa mõistmisele ja täielikule dokumentatsioonile, ning soovitame, et teised teeksid sama oma dokumentidega esitamise ajal anonüümseks muudetud GitHubi konto kaudu.', 'fi': 'Toistettavuuden ja yleistettävyyden puute ovat kaksi merkittävää uhkaa luonnonkielen käsittelyn jatkuvalle tieteelliselle kehitykselle. Kielimallit ja oppimismenetelmät ovat niin monimutkaisia, että tieteellisissä konferenssijulkaisuissa ei enää ole riittävästi tilaa jäljentämiseen tai jäljentämiseen tarvittavaan tekniseen syvyyteen. Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis -analyysin tapaustutkimuksena osoitamme, että viimeaikainen alan työ ei ole johdonmukaisesti julkaissut koodia tai kuvannut oppimismenetelmien asetuksia riittävän yksityiskohtaisesti, eikä se ole vertailtavissa ja yleistettävissä juna-, testi- tai validointitiedoissa. Yleistettävyyden tutkimiseksi ja uusimpien vertailevien arviointien mahdollistamiseksi teemme ensimmäiset lisääntymistutkimukset kolmesta toisiaan täydentävästä menetelmäryhmästä ja ensimmäisen laajamittaisen massaarvioinnin kuudelle eri englanninkieliselle aineistolle. Kokemuksiamme ajatellen suosittelemme, että tulevissa replikointi- tai lisääntymiskokeissa tulisi aina harkita erilaisia aineistoja niiden menetelmien ja julkaistun koodin dokumentoinnin ja julkaisemisen ohella, jotta vältetään sekä toistettavuuden että yleistettävyyden esteet. Olemme julkaisseet koodimme mallin eläintarhan kanssa GitHubissa Jupyter Notebooksin kanssa auttaaksemme ymmärtämistä ja täydellistä dokumentaatiota, ja suosittelemme, että muut tekevät samoin papereilleen lähettämisen yhteydessä anonymisoidun GitHub-tilin kautta.', 'jv': 'Gak Kenalé kapan-kapan karo pangrungke kabèh dumadhi kapan-kapan kanggo nguasai pengguna Sayensi kanggo ngilangno Sistem Daerah-ingkang Daerah. Laptop" and "Desktop Jejaring Jejaring Ngawe ngubah perintah awak dhéwé, kéné sugolen kanggo ngerasakno perbudhakan winih karo perbudhakan winih dhéwé kuwi tindakan dataset sing gak dhéwé nggambar nggawe sistem sing berarti ngono nggawe sistem sing berarti ngono nggawe barang-sistem sing berarti kanggo nyenggawe barang nggawe gerakan, akeh perbudhaka Awak dhéwé éntuk kode awak dhéwé nganggo sistem zoom model nang Gethub iki ning Jupi notebok kanggo nggawe gerakan sampek lan dokumentasi luwih apik, lan ampuhé awak dhéwé nggawe lan kartulutan surat sing gawe ngubah dhéwé, gawe ngubah dhéwé beraksi lan konto Gethub sing bisa nyebat', 'sk': 'Pomanjkanje ponovljivosti in splošljivosti sta dve pomembni grožnji za nadaljnji znanstveni razvoj v obdelavi naravnega jezika. Jezikovni modeli in metode učenja so tako zapleteni, da znanstveni konferenčni članki ne vsebujejo več dovolj prostora za tehnično globino, potrebno za replikacijo ali reprodukcijo. Če uporabimo analizo ciljnih odvisnih čustev kot študijo primera, pokažemo, kako nedavno delo na terenu ni dosledno objavljalo kode ali opisovalo dovolj podrobno nastavitev učnih metod ter nima primerljivosti in splošljivosti v podatkih o vlaku, testu ali validaciji. Za raziskovanje splošnosti in omogočanje najsodobnejših primerjalnih vrednotenj smo izvedli prve študije reprodukcije treh skupin dopolnilnih metod in prvo obsežno masno vrednotenje na šestih različnih angleških podatkovnih nizih. Ob upoštevanju naših izkušenj priporočamo, da bodo prihodnji poskusi replikacije ali reprodukcije vedno upoštevali različne nabore podatkov poleg dokumentiranja in objave njihovih metod in objavljene kode, da se zmanjšajo ovire za ponovljivost in splošljivost. Našo kodo smo objavili z modelnim živalskim vrtom na GitHub z Jupyter Notebooki, da bi pomagali razumeti in popolno dokumentacijo, in priporočamo, da drugi storijo enako s svojimi prispevki v času oddaje prek anonimiziranega računa GitHub.', 'ha': "Ina rauni da duffai da jama'a biyu masu yi wa'adi ga kuendelea mafaniki na ilmi a Taurar Lugha. Motdalun harshen da shiryoyin ayuka sun zama masu husu da takardar zaman shawara da aka sani ba za'a ƙunsa da fili wa kwanan kunyan technical da aka buƙata wa jiba ko dubuwa. Taking Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis as a case study, we show how recent work in the field has not consistently released code, or described settings for learning methods in enough detail, and lacks comparability and generalisability in train, test or validation data.  To, domin yin jarraba littafin da za'a karatun halin sanar ta sami, za'a yi amfani da farkon karatun na kure na ƙungiyoyi uku na kamfani kuma za'a cika muhimmada na farkon girma a kan sitan danassi na daban Ingiriya. Aka kula ga zaman shawaratinmu, tuna shawarar da za'a buƙata musanyamako ko jarrabi masu motsi a gaba ɗaya, ko kuma, ana buƙata kodi masu haɗi da takardar, da kuma a saka hanyoyinin su da kuma aka nuna kode don a ƙara hanyarsu zuwa ga dubu da mai saukarwa. Mun sakar kodinmu da wata masallãci na GitHub da Jupyter takardun Jupyter don ya taimake fahimci da takardun takardun, kuma Munã shawarar da wasu su aikata kamar da suka aikata da takardun takardun su zuwa wani akan GitHub ba'a sani ba.", 'he': 'חוסר ניתן לחזור ולהגנרליזציה הם שני איומים משמעותיים לפיתוח מדעי ממשיך בתהליך השפה הטבעית. דוגמנים לשפה ושיטות לימוד הן כל כך מורכבות כי מסמכי הישיבות מדעיים כבר לא מכילים מספיק מקום לעומק הטכני הנדרש לשכפול או התרבות. Taking Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis as a case study, we show how recent work in the field has not consistently released code, or described settings for learning methods in enough detail, and lacks comparability and generalisability in train, test or validation data.  To investigate generalisability and to enable state of the art comparative evaluations, we carry out the first reproduction studies of three groups of complementary methods and perform the first large-scale mass evaluation on six different English datasets.  בהתחשב בניסיונותינו, אנו ממליצים שניסויים עתידיים של השכפול או השחזור תמיד צריכים לשקול מגוון של קבוצות נתונים לצד המתיקן ולשחרר את שיטותיהם וקוד פורסם שחררנו את הקוד שלנו עם גן חיות מודל על GitHub עם Jupyter Notebooks כדי לעזור להבין ומסמכים מלאים, ואנחנו ממליצים שאחרים יעשו את אותו הדבר עם הניירים שלהם בזמן ההעברה דרך חשבון GitHub אנונימי.', 'bo': 'རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པར། སྤྱིར་བཏང་ནུས་མེད་པར་ནི་རང་རིག་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་ཚན་རིག་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བར་ག སྐད་ཡིག Taking Target Dependent Sentiment Analysis as a case study, we show how recent work in the field have not consistently released code, or described settings for learning methods in enough detail, and lacks comparability and generalisability in train, test or validation data. ལྟ་བུ་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏུབ་པར་ལྡན་རིམ་པ་དང་ལྟ་བུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལྟ་བུ་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་སྐབས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་འོངས ང་ཚོས་Jupyter Notebooks་དང་། GitHub ཡི་གྲངས་སུ་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་དང་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་ཐོག་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས་བྱེད་པར་ཨིན་རྟགས་བཀལ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Multilevel Heuristics for Rationale-Based Entity Relation Classification in Sentences', 'ar': 'الاستدلال متعدد المستويات لتصنيف علاقة الكيان القائم على المنطق في الجمل', 'pt': 'Heurística Multinível para Classificação de Relação de Entidade Baseada em Racional em Sentenças', 'fr': "Heuristique multiniveau pour la classification des relations d'entités basée sur la rationalité dans les phrases", 'es': 'Heurística multinivel para la clasificación de relaciones de entidades basada en fundamentos racionales en oraciones', 'ja': '文中の理論的根拠に基づくエンティティ関係分類のための多層的ヒューリスティクス', 'zh': '句之基本原理体,类之多启发式', 'hi': 'वाक्यों में तर्क-आधारित इकाई संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए बहुस्तरीय ह्यूरिस्टिक्स', 'ru': 'Многоуровневая эвристика для обоснованной классификации отношений сущностей в предложениях', 'ga': "Heuristics Illeibhéil d'Aicmiú Caidrimh Aonáin Bunaithe ar Réasúnaíocht i bPianbhreitheanna", 'el': 'Πολυεπίπεδες heuristics για την ταξινόμηση σχέσεων οντοτήτων βάσει λογικών κριτηρίων σε φράσεις', 'hu': 'Többszintű heurisztika a mondatok racionális alapú entitási viszonyainak osztályozására', 'ka': 'რაციონალური ინტერტიკური შესახებ კლასიფიკაციაში მრავალური ჰერისტიკა', 'it': 'Euristica multilivello per la classificazione razionale delle relazioni tra entità nelle frasi', 'kk': 'Сөздердің негіздеген нысандар қасиеттерінің көп деңгейі жылдамдық классификациясы', 'lt': 'Daugialygis Heuristika pagrįstam subjekto santykių klasifikavimui nuosprendžiuose', 'mk': 'Многу нивоа хеуристика за класификација на реакционално базирани односи на ентитетите во речениците', 'ms': 'Multilevel Heuristics for Rationale-Based Entity Relation Classification in Sentences', 'ml': 'കാരണം', 'mn': 'Олон түвшинд Арьюстик байгууллага дээр байгууллага байгууллагын харилцааны классификаци', 'mt': 'Heuristiċi Multilivelli għall-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni ta’ Entità Bażata fuq Razzjonalità f’Sentenzi', 'ro': 'Euristică multinivel pentru clasificarea relațiilor de entitate bazate pe rațiune în sentințe', 'pl': 'Wielopoziomowa heurystyka dla klasyfikacji relacji podmiotów opartych na racjonalnych zdaniach', 'no': 'Multinivå Heuristics for rasjonelbasert entitetsrelasjonsklassifisering i teikn', 'si': 'වාර්තාව සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් විශේෂයෙන් වර්තාවක් සඳහා ගොඩක් ලේවල් හෙයුරිස්ටික්', 'so': 'Heuristiyada heerka kala duduwan ee daryeelka deganaanshaha', 'sv': 'Flernivåheuristik för klassificering av rationell enhetsrelation i meningar', 'sr': 'Većina nivoa Heuristika za klasifikaciju odnosa podataka na razumnoj bazi u kaznama', 'ta': 'வாக்குகளில் உள்ள பொருள் தொடர்பு வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு பல நிலை உயரம்', 'ur': 'منظورات میں متعدد سطح حوریسیٹ', 'uz': 'Description', 'vi': 'Nhân loại Chế độ Sinh vật phân động liên hệ phân động', 'da': 'Multilevel Heuristics for Rational Based Entity Relation Classification in Sentences', 'nl': 'Multilevel heuristics voor rationele entiteitsverhoudingen classificatie in zinnen', 'bg': 'Многостепенна евристика за класификация на отношенията на субектите в изречения', 'hr': 'Većina nivoa Heuristika za klasifikaciju odnosa poduzeća na razini u kaznama', 'ko': '추리를 바탕으로 한 문장 실체 관계 분류의 다차원 계발식 알고리즘', 'id': 'Multilevel Heuristics for Rationale-Based Entity Relation Classification in Sentences', 'fa': 'کلاسیک ارتباط ارتباط متعدد سطح زیادی در جمله\u200cها', 'af': 'Stencils', 'sw': 'Takwimu za kiwango kikubwa kwa ajili ya Kuhusiana na Umoja wa Matukio', 'sq': 'Heuristika shumënivele për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve të njësisë me bazë racionale në dënime', 'de': 'Mehrstufige Heuristiken zur rationalen Entity Relation Klassifizierung in Sätzen', 'hy': 'Multilevel Heuristics for Rationale-Based Entity Relation Classification in Sentences', 'tr': 'Durum Zolaky', 'az': 'Sözlərdə çoxlu səviyyə Heuristik İlişkisi', 'am': 'e-Based Entity Relation Classification in Sentences', 'cs': 'Víceúrovňová heuristika pro klasifikaci vztahů entit založené na racionálních větách', 'bs': 'Većina nivoa Heuristika za klasifikaciju odnosa podataka na razini u kaznama', 'bn': 'শাস্তিগুলোতে রেটনাল-ভিত্তিক এন্টিটি সম্পর্কের জন্য বহুস্তরের উরিস্টিক', 'ca': 'Heurística multinivell per a la classificació de relacions entre entitats basades en racions en sentences', 'et': 'Mitmetasandiline heuristika põhjenduspõhise olemi suhte klassifitseerimiseks lausetes', 'fi': 'Monitasoinen heuristiikka rationaalipohjaiselle entiteettisuhteelle lauseissa', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'הוריסטיקה רבה רמות עבור מסווג יחסי יחסים יחסים ביחסים ברציונליים', 'sk': 'Večstopenjska heuristika za razvrstitev razmerja med entitetami v stavkih', 'ha': 'e-Based Entity Relation Classification in Searches', 'bo': 'རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྣ་མཐུད་ཚད་ལྟར་བཅས'}
{'en': 'Rationale-based models provide a unique way to provide justifiable results for relation classification models by identifying rationales (key words and phrases that a person can use to justify the relation in the sentence) during the process. However, existing generative networks used to extract rationales come with a trade-off between extracting diversified rationales and achieving good classification results. In this paper, we propose a multilevel heuristic approach to regulate rationale extraction to avoid extracting monotonous rationales without compromising classification performance. In our model, rationale selection is regularized by a semi-supervised process and features from different levels : word, syntax, sentence, and corpus. We evaluate our approach on the SemEval 2010 dataset that includes 19 relation classes and the quality of extracted rationales with our manually-labeled rationales. Experiments show a significant improvement in classification performance and a 20 % gain in rationale interpretability compared to state-of-the-art approaches.', 'ar': 'توفر النماذج القائمة على المنطق طريقة فريدة لتقديم نتائج مبررة لنماذج تصنيف العلاقة من خلال تحديد الأسباب المنطقية (الكلمات الرئيسية والعبارات التي يمكن للشخص استخدامها لتبرير العلاقة في الجملة) أثناء العملية. ومع ذلك ، فإن الشبكات التوليدية الحالية المستخدمة لاستخراج المبررات تأتي مع مفاضلة بين استخلاص المبررات المتنوعة وتحقيق نتائج تصنيف جيدة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا إرشاديًا متعدد المستويات لتنظيم استخراج الأساس المنطقي لتجنب استخلاص المبررات الرتيبة دون المساس بأداء التصنيف. في نموذجنا ، يتم تنظيم اختيار الأساس المنطقي من خلال عملية شبه خاضعة للإشراف وميزات من مستويات مختلفة: الكلمات ، وبناء الجملة ، والجملة ، والمجموعة. نقوم بتقييم نهجنا في مجموعة بيانات SemEval 2010 التي تتضمن 19 فئة علاقة وجودة المبررات المستخرجة مع مبرراتنا المصنفة يدويًا. تظهر التجارب تحسنًا كبيرًا في أداء التصنيف ومكاسبًا بنسبة 20٪ في تفسير المبررات مقارنةً بأحدث الأساليب.', 'es': 'Los modelos basados en la razón proporcionan una forma única de proporcionar resultados justificables para los modelos de clasificación de relaciones mediante la identificación de fundamentos (palabras y frases clave que una persona puede usar para justificar la relación en la oración) durante el proceso. Sin embargo, las redes generativas existentes que se utilizan para extraer justificaciones vienen con una compensación entre la extracción de justificaciones diversificadas y el logro de buenos resultados de clasificación. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque heurístico multinivel para regular la extracción de fundamentos para evitar la extracción de fundamentos monótonos sin comprometer el rendimiento de la clasificación. En nuestro modelo, la selección de fundamentos está regularizada por un proceso semi-supervisado y características de diferentes niveles: palabra, sintaxis, oración y corpus. Evaluamos nuestro enfoque en el conjunto de datos SemEval 2010 que incluye 19 clases de relación y la calidad de los fundamentos extraídos con nuestros fundamentos etiquetados manualmente. Los experimentos muestran una mejora significativa en el rendimiento de la clasificación y una ganancia del 20% en la interpretabilidad de los fundamentos en comparación con los enfoques más avanzados', 'pt': 'Os modelos baseados em raciocínio fornecem uma maneira única de fornecer resultados justificáveis para modelos de classificação de relações, identificando fundamentos (palavras-chave e frases que uma pessoa pode usar para justificar a relação na frase) durante o processo. No entanto, as redes generativas existentes usadas para extrair lógicas vêm com um trade-off entre extrair lógicas diversificadas e alcançar bons resultados de classificação. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem heurística multinível para regular a extração de raciocínio para evitar extrair raciocínios monótonos sem comprometer o desempenho da classificação. Em nosso modelo, a seleção do raciocínio é regularizada por um processo semi-supervisionado e recursos de diferentes níveis: palavra, sintaxe, sentença e corpus. Avaliamos nossa abordagem no conjunto de dados SemEval 2010 que inclui 19 classes de relações e a qualidade dos raciocínios extraídos com nossos raciocínios rotulados manualmente. Os experimentos mostram uma melhora significativa no desempenho da classificação e um ganho de 20% na interpretabilidade racional em comparação com abordagens de última geração.', 'fr': "Les modèles fondés sur la justification fournissent un moyen unique de fournir des résultats justifiables pour les modèles de classification des relations en identifiant les justifications (mots clés et phrases qu'une personne peut utiliser pour justifier la relation dans la phrase) au cours du processus. Cependant, les réseaux génératifs existants utilisés pour extraire des justifications présentent un compromis entre l'extraction de justifications diversifiées et l'obtention de bons résultats de classification. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche heuristique à plusieurs niveaux pour réguler l'extraction des justifications afin d'éviter d'extraire des justifications monotones sans compromettre les performances de classification. Dans notre modèle, la sélection de la justification est régularisée par un processus semi-supervisé et comporte différents niveaux\xa0: mot, syntaxe, phrase et corpus. Nous évaluons notre approche sur le jeu de données SemEval 2010 qui comprend 19 classes de relations et la qualité des justifications extraites avec nos justifications étiquetées manuellement. Les expériences montrent une amélioration significative des performances de classification et un gain de 20\xa0% de l'interprétabilité des justifications par rapport aux approches de pointe.", 'ja': '根拠に基づくモデルは、プロセス中に根拠（人が文の関係を正当化するために使用できるキーワードとフレーズ）を特定することによって、関係分類モデルに正当な結果を提供する独自の方法を提供する。 しかし、理論的根拠を抽出するために使用される既存の生成ネットワークは、多様な理論的根拠を抽出することと、良好な分類結果を達成することとの間のトレードオフをもたらします。 本稿では，分類性能を損なうことなく単調な根拠を抽出することを避けるために，根拠抽出を規制するための複合的ヒューリスティック手法を提案する． 私たちのモデルでは、理論的選択は、半監督プロセスによって規則化され、単語、構文、文、およびコーパスという異なるレベルからの特徴があります。 私たちは、19の関連クラスと抽出された根拠の品質を含むSemEval 2010データセットのアプローチを、手動でラベル付けされた根拠で評価します。 実験では、最先端のアプローチと比較して、分類パフォーマンスが大幅に向上し、根拠の解釈可能性が20%向上したことが示されています。', 'zh': '基本原理之所以独见者,知基本原理(之所以明关键字短语),以类其理也。 然则取基本原理之成网络取多样化基本原理、成善之类而权之。 于本文中,立一多级启发式以规基本原理取,以避不害分类之基本原理。 于我模形,基本原理择其半监,与正则化:单词,语法,句语料库。 余于SemEval 2010数集上估吾法,当数集19类,及用吾手动标记之理。 实验明先进之法,类性显崇,基本原理可解释性崇20%矣。', 'hi': 'तर्क-आधारित मॉडल प्रक्रिया के दौरान तर्कों (प्रमुख शब्दों और वाक्यांशों जो एक व्यक्ति वाक्य में संबंध को सही ठहराने के लिए उपयोग कर सकते हैं) की पहचान करके संबंध वर्गीकरण मॉडल के लिए उचित परिणाम प्रदान करने का एक अनूठा तरीका प्रदान करते हैं। हालांकि, तर्कों को निकालने के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले मौजूदा उत्पादक नेटवर्क विविध तर्कों को निकालने और अच्छे वर्गीकरण परिणाम प्राप्त करने के बीच एक व्यापार-बंद के साथ आते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन से समझौता किए बिना नीरस तर्कों को निकालने से बचने के लिए तर्क निष्कर्षण को विनियमित करने के लिए एक बहुस्तरीय हेरिस्टिक दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हमारे मॉडल में, तर्क चयन को एक अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित प्रक्रिया और विभिन्न स्तरों से सुविधाओं द्वारा नियमित किया जाता है: शब्द, वाक्यविन्यास, वाक्य, और कॉर्पस। हम SemEval 2010 डेटासेट पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं जिसमें 19 संबंध वर्ग और हमारे मैन्युअल रूप से लेबल किए गए तर्कों के साथ निकाले गए तर्कों की गुणवत्ता शामिल है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन में एक महत्वपूर्ण सुधार और राज्य के अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना में तर्कसंगत व्याख्याक्षमता में 20% लाभ है।', 'ru': 'Обоснованные модели предоставляют уникальный способ получения обоснованных результатов для моделей классификации отношений путем выявления обоснований (ключевых слов и фраз, которые человек может использовать для обоснования отношения в предложении) в ходе процесса. Однако существующие генерирующие сети, используемые для получения обоснований, приводят к компромиссу между получением диверсифицированных обоснований и достижением хороших результатов классификации. В данной работе мы предлагаем многоуровневый эвристический подход к регулированию извлечения обоснования, чтобы избежать извлечения монотонных обоснований без ущерба для эффективности классификации. В нашей модели выбор логического обоснования регламентируется полуконтролируемым процессом и особенностями с разных уровней: слова, синтаксиса, предложения и корпуса. Мы оцениваем наш подход к набору данных SemEval 2010, который включает 19 классов отношений и качество извлеченных обоснований с помощью наших обоснований с ручной маркировкой. Эксперименты свидетельствуют о значительном улучшении характеристик классификации и 20% -ном увеличении обоснованной интерпретируемости по сравнению с современными подходами.', 'ga': 'Soláthraíonn samhlacha bunaithe ar réasúnaíocht bealach uathúil chun torthaí inchosanta a sholáthar do mhúnlaí aicmithe caidrimh trí réasúnaíocht a shainaithint (eochairfhocail agus frásaí a fhéadfaidh duine a úsáid chun an gaol san abairt a chosaint) le linn an phróisis. Mar sin féin, tagann comhbhabhtáil idir líonraí giniúna atá ann cheana a úsáidtear chun réasúnaíocht a bhaint amach idir réasúnaíocht éagsúlaithe a bhaint amach agus torthaí maithe aicmithe a bhaint amach. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige heorastúil illeibhéil chun eastóscadh réasúnaíochta a rialáil chun asbhaint réasúnaíochta aondathúil a sheachaint gan cur isteach ar fheidhmíocht aicmithe. Inár múnla, déantar roghnú réasúnaíochta a rialú trí phróiseas leath-mhaoirseachta agus gnéithe ó leibhéil éagsúla: focal, comhréir, abairt, agus corpas. Déanaimid measúnú ar ár gcur chuige maidir le tacar sonraí SemEval 2010 a chuimsíonn 19 aicme caidrimh agus cáilíocht na réasúnaíochta a bhaintear as lenár réasúnaíocht lipéadaithe de láimh. Léiríonn turgnaimh feabhas suntasach ar fheidhmíocht aicmithe agus gnóthachan 20% in léirmhíniú réasúnaíochta i gcomparáid le cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha.', 'ka': 'პროცესის განსაზღვრებით რეაციონალური მოდელები განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებითი წარმოდგენება კლასიფიკაციის მოდელებისთვის განსაზღვრებით (კლასიფიკაციის სიტყვები და ფრაზები, რომლებიც ადამიანი შეუძლი მაგრამ არსებობს განსხვავებული რაციონალების გამოყენება და კარგი კლასიფიკაციის შედეგების გამოყენება განსხვავებული რაციონალების გამოყენება. ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ მრავალდომის ჰერისტიკური პროგრამის რეგრამინალური ექსპექციის რეგილურაციას გამოწვება მონოტონური რაციონალური გამოწვებას, კომპროგრაციის კ ჩვენი მოდელში პარაციონალური მონიშნულება პროცესი და განსხვავებული დონეებიდან პროცესი, სინტაქსი, სიტყვანი და კოპუსის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ვამუშაობთ ჩვენი პროგრამის შესახებ სამუშაო 2010 მონაცემების სამუშაოდ, რომელიც 19 კლასების შესახებ და გამოყენებული პარაციონალების კაalitეობა ჩვენი ხელსახურად და ექსპერიმენტები კლასიფიკაციის გამოსახულებაში უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია და 20% უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია პარაციონალური განსხვავლებელობაში, როგორც მნიშვნელოვანი წარმო', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα βάσει λογικών παρέχουν έναν μοναδικό τρόπο για την παροχή δικαιολογημένων αποτελεσμάτων για μοντέλα ταξινόμησης σχέσεων προσδιορίζοντας αιτιολογίες (λέξεις-κλειδιά και φράσεις που ένα άτομο μπορεί να χρησιμοποιήσει για να δικαιολογήσει τη σχέση στην πρόταση) κατά τη διάρκεια της διαδικασίας. Ωστόσο, τα υπάρχοντα παραγωγικά δίκτυα που χρησιμοποιούνται για την εξαγωγή αιτιολόγησης έρχονται με ένα συμβιβασμό μεταξύ της εξόρυξης διαφοροποιημένων αιτιολόγησης και της επίτευξης καλών αποτελεσμάτων ταξινόμησης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια πολυεπίπεδη heuristική προσέγγιση για τη ρύθμιση της εξαγωγής λογικών ώστε να αποφεύγεται η εξαγωγή μονότονων αιτιολογιών χωρίς να διακυβεύεται η απόδοση ταξινόμησης. Στο μοντέλο μας, η επιλογή λογικών ρυθμίζεται με μια ημι-εποπτευμένη διαδικασία και διαθέτει χαρακτηριστικά από διαφορετικά επίπεδα: λέξη, σύνταξη, πρόταση και σώμα. Αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας στο σύνολο δεδομένων που περιλαμβάνει 19-τάξεις σχέσεων και την ποιότητα των εξαγόμενων αιτιολογιών με τις χειροκίνητες σημαδεμένες αιτιολογίες μας. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν σημαντική βελτίωση στην απόδοση ταξινόμησης και 20% κέρδος στη λογική ερμηνεία σε σύγκριση με τις σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις.', 'hu': 'Az ésszerű modellek egyedülálló módot biztosítanak a kapcsolatosítási modellek indokolt eredményeinek biztosítására azáltal, hogy a folyamat során azonosítják az indokokat (kulcsszavakat és kifejezéseket, amelyeket egy személy a mondatban lévő kapcsolat igazolására használhat). A meglévő generációs hálózatok azonban, amelyeket az indokok kivonására használnak, kompromisszumot kötnek a diverzifikált indokok kivonása és a jó osztályozási eredmények elérése között. Ebben a tanulmányban egy többszintű heurisztikus megközelítést javasolunk a logikai kivonás szabályozására, hogy elkerüljük a monoton indokok kivonását anélkül, hogy veszélyeztetnénk az osztályozási teljesítményt. Modellünkben a logikai kiválasztást félig felügyelt folyamattal szabályozzuk, és különböző szintű jellemzők: szó, szintaxis, mondat és corpus. Megközelítésünket a SemEval 2010 adatkészleten értékeljük, amely 19 kapcsolatosztályt tartalmaz, valamint a kivont logikák minőségét manuálisan jelölt logikáinkkal. A kísérletek jelentős javulást mutatnak az osztályozási teljesítményben és 20%-os értelmezhetőséget mutatnak a korszerű megközelítésekhez képest.', 'it': "I modelli basati sulla logica forniscono un modo unico per fornire risultati giustificabili per i modelli di classificazione delle relazioni identificando le motivazioni (parole chiave e frasi che una persona può utilizzare per giustificare la relazione nella frase) durante il processo. Tuttavia, le reti generative esistenti utilizzate per estrarre le motivazioni comportano un compromesso tra l'estrazione di logiche diversificate e il raggiungimento di buoni risultati di classificazione. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio euristico multilivello per regolare l'estrazione razionale per evitare di estrarre logiche monotone senza compromettere le prestazioni di classificazione. Nel nostro modello, la selezione razionale è regolarizzata da un processo semi-supervisionato e presenta caratteristiche di diversi livelli: parola, sintassi, frase e corpus. Valutiamo il nostro approccio sul set di dati SemEval 2010 che include 19 classi di relazione e la qualità delle logiche estratte con le nostre logiche etichettate manualmente. Gli esperimenti mostrano un significativo miglioramento delle prestazioni di classificazione e un aumento del 20% nell'interpretabilità razionale rispetto agli approcci all'avanguardia.", 'mk': 'Рационалните модели обезбедуваат уникатен начин да обезбедат оправдани резултати за моделите на класификација на односите со идентификување на рационалите (клучни зборови и фрази кои личноста може да ги користи за оправдување на односот во реченицата) за време на проце However, existing generative networks used to extract rationales come with a trade-off between extracting diversified rationales and achieving good classification results.  Во овој весник, предложуваме мултиниверзитетски пристап за регулирање на рационалната екстракција за да избегнеме екстракција на монотонни рационали без да ја компромитираме класификацијата. Во нашиот модел, рационалната селекција е регулизирана со полунадгледуван процес и карактеристики од различни нивоа: збор, синтакс, реченица и корпус. Ние го проценуваме нашиот пристап на податоците SemEval 2010 кои вклучуваат 19 класи на односи и квалитетот на извадени рационали со нашите рачно означени рационали. Експериментите покажуваат значително подобрување на резултатите на класификацијата и 20 отсто зголемување на рационалната интерпретабилност во споредба со најновите пристапи.', 'ms': 'Model berasaskan rasional menyediakan cara unik untuk menyediakan keputusan yang boleh dibenarkan untuk model klasifikasi hubungan dengan mengidentifikasikan rasional (kata-kata kunci dan frasa yang seseorang boleh guna untuk membenarkan hubungan dalam kalimat) semasa proses. Namun, rangkaian generatif yang wujud digunakan untuk mengekstrak rasional datang dengan perdagangan antara mengekstrak rasional berbeza dan mencapai keputusan klasifikasi yang baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan heuristik berlebihan untuk mengatur ekstraksi rasional untuk menghindari ekstraksi rasional monoton tanpa merusak prestasi klasifikasi. Dalam model kami, pemilihan rasional diukur oleh proses setengah-mengawasi dan ciri-ciri dari aras yang berbeza: perkataan, sintaks, kalimat, dan corpus. Kami menilai pendekatan kita pada set data SemEval 2010 yang termasuk 19 kelas hubungan dan kualiti rasional ekstrak dengan rasional-labeled manual kami. Experiments show a significant improvement in classification performance and a 20% gain in rationale interpretability compared to state-of-the-art approaches.', 'kk': 'Рейтониялық негіздеген үлгілер процестің қатынасын баптау үлгілеріне қатынас үлгілерін баптау үшін бірнеше тәртібін береді (кім сөздер мен сөздерді мәліметтің қатынасын баптау үшін қолданатын кілт сөздер мен сөздерді аны Бірақ, рационалияларды тарқату үшін қолданылатын генеративті желілер әртүрлі рационалияларды тарқату мен жақсы классификациялау нәтижелерін жеткізу арасындағы тәртіпсіздік сә Бұл қағазда біз бірнеше деңгейіндегі геуристикалық тәртібін түзету үшін бірнеше деңгейінде классификациялық жылдамдығын көмектесу үшін бірнеше түрлі рационалиялық түрлерді тарқату Біздің үлгімізде рационалды таңдау жарты бақылау процесі мен түрлі деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктері: сөз, синтаксис, сөз және корпус. Біз 19 қатынастық класс және қолмен белгіленген рационалияларымыздың сапасы бар HalfEval 2010 деректер бағдарламасының қасиетін бағалаймыз. Тәжірибелер классификациялық әдістерінде маңызды жақсартылығын көрсетеді, және 20% рационалдық түсініктердің түсініктеріне салыстырылығын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Motyvais pagrįsti modeliai yra unikalus būdas pateikti pagrįstus santykių klasifikavimo modelių rezultatus nustatant motyvus (pagrindinius žodžius ir frazes, kuriuos asmuo gali naudoti santykiui pagrįsti sakinyje) proceso metu. Vis dėlto esami generaciniai tinklai, naudojami racionalų gavybai, sudaro kompromisą tarp įvairių racionalų gavimo ir gerų klasifikavimo rezultatų. Šiame dokumente siūlome daugiapakopį heuristinį požiūrį, kad būtų reguliuojama racionali gavyba, siekiant išvengti monotoninių priežasčių, nekeliant pavojaus klasifikavimo veiksmingumui. In our model, rationale selection is regularized by a semi-supervised process and features from different levels: word, syntax, sentence, and corpus.  Vertiname savo požiūrį į 2010 m. SemEval duomenų rinkinį, kuriame yra 19 santykių klasių ir išgautų racionalų kokybė su rankiniu ženklu pažymėtais racionalais. Eksperimentai rodo, kad klasifikacijos rezultatai gerokai pagerėjo, o racionalus aiškinimas padidėjo 20 proc., palyginti su naujausiais metodais.', 'mn': 'Шагнал суурилсан загварууд үйл явцын үед хүн хэрэглэж чадах түлхүүр үг, өгүүлбэр харилцааны тухай зөвшөөрөх боломжтой үр дүнг тодорхойлж өгдөг. Гэхдээ суурь үйлдвэрлэлийн сүлжээн ойлголт гаргахад хэрэглэгддэг нь олон төрлийн ойлголт гаргаж, сайн хуваалтын үр дүнг гаргах хоорондох худалдаа гарч ирдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон түвшинд хэвлэлийн үйл ажиллагааг нөлөөлөхгүйгээр ганц түвшингийн шалтгаан гаргахын тулд rational extraction хяналтын тулд олон түвшингийн heuristic арга зам санал өгдөг. Бидний загварын хувьд рационал сонголт нь хагас удирдлагатай үйл явц болон өөр түвшинөөс харьцуулагддаг: үг, синтаксис, өгүүлбэр, корпус. Бид 2010 оны SemEval өгөгдлийн сангийн тухай 19 харилцааны хичээл болон гар аргаар нэмэгдсэн түлхүүрүүдийн талаар ашиглаж байгаа талаар үнэлдэг. Түүх туршилтууд хуваалцах үйл ажиллагаанд маш чухал хөгжлийг харуулж, урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны тухай харьцуулахад 20%-ын ашиг үзүүлдэг.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli bbażati fuq raġunijiet jipprovdu mod uniku biex jiġu pprovduti riżultati ġustifikabbli għall-mudelli ta’ klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet billi jiġu identifikati raġunijiet (kliem u frażijiet ewlenin li persuna tista’ tuża biex tiġġustifika r-relazzjoni fis-sentenza) matul il-proċess. Madankollu, in-netwerks ġenerattivi eżistenti użati għall-estrazzjoni tar-raġunijiet joħolqu kompromess bejn l-estrazzjoni tar-raġunijiet diversifikati u l-kisba ta’ riżultati tajbin ta’ klassifikazzjoni. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ ewristiku f’diversi livelli biex tiġi rregolata l-estrazzjoni razzjonali biex tiġi evitata l-estrazzjoni ta’ raġunijiet monotonużi mingħajr ma tiġi kompromessa l-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni. Fil-mudell tagħna, l-għa żla razzjonali hija rregolarizzata minn proċess semisuperviż u karatteristiċi minn livelli differenti: kelma, sintaks, sentenza, u korpus. Aħna jevalwaw l-approċċ tagħna dwar is-sett tad-dejta SemEval 2010 li jinkludi 19-il klassi ta’ relazzjoni u l-kwalità tar-raġunijiet estratti mar-raġunijiet tagħna ttikkettati manwalment. Experiments show a significant improvement in classification performance and a 20% gain in rationale interpretability compared to state-of-the-art approaches.', 'pl': 'Modele oparte na racjonalnych zapewniają unikalny sposób na uzasadnione wyniki dla modeli klasyfikacji relacji poprzez identyfikację uzasadnień (słów kluczowych i zwrotów, które dana osoba może użyć do uzasadnienia relacji w zdaniu) w trakcie procesu. Jednakże istniejące sieci generacyjne wykorzystywane do wydobycia uzasadnienia wiążą się z kompromisem między wydobyciem zróżnicowanych uzasadnień a osiągnięciem dobrych wyników klasyfikacji. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wielopoziomowe podejście heurystyczne regulujące ekstrakcję racjonalną, aby uniknąć ekstrakcji monotonnych uzasadnień bez naruszania wydajności klasyfikacji. W naszym modelu selekcja uzasadnienia jest regulowana przez pół-nadzorowany proces i cechy z różnych poziomów: słowa, składni, zdania i korpusu. Oceniamy nasze podejście do zbioru danych SemEval 2010 obejmującego 19-klasy relacji oraz jakość wyekstrahowanych uzasadnień z naszymi ręcznie oznaczonymi uzasadnieniami. Eksperymenty wykazują znaczącą poprawę wydajności klasyfikacji oraz 20% wzrost interpretowalności racjonalnej w porównaniu z nowoczesnymi podejściami.', 'no': 'Reasjonalbaserte modeller gjev ein unikt måte å gje rettferdige resultat for relasjonsklassifikasjonsmodular ved å identifisera rasjonar (nøkkelord og frasar som ein person kan bruka for å justisera relasjonen i setninga) i prosessen. Dette er imidlertid det eksisterande genererige nettverk som brukar for å pakka ut rasjonar, med eit uttrykk mellom å pakka ut diversifiserte rasjonar og oppnå gode klassifikasjonsfiltar. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein fleire nivå heuristisk tilnærming for å regne racionale utpakking for å unngå å utpakka monotonske rasjonar utan å kompromisera klassifikasjonsfunksjonen. I modellen vår blir rasjonale utval regulert av ein halvoversikt prosess og funksjonar frå ulike nivå: ord, syntaks, setning og korpus. Vi evaluerer tilnærminga vårt på dataset for semiEval 2010 som inneheld 19 relasjonsklasser og kvaliteten til utpakka rasjonar med våre manuelt merkelige rasjonar. Eksperiment viser ein betydelig forbedring i klassifikasjonen og 20% får forskjellig uttolkingar i sammenligning med tilnærmingar av kunsten.', 'ml': 'പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഒരാള്\u200dക്ക് വാക്കിന്റെ ബന്ധം നീതിപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന വാക്കുകളും വാക്കുകളും നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന ഒരു വ്യക്തിപരമ എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള ജനറലിവ് നെറ്റര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന നിലവിലുള്ള നിലവിലുള്ള ശേഖരം വ്യത്യസ്ത വ In this paper, we propose a multilevel heuristic approach to regulate rationale extraction to avoid extracting monotonous rationales without compromising classification performance.  ഞങ്ങളുടെ മാതൃകയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത നിലകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത നിലകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d നിയന്ത്രണമാക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക്, സി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സെമ്എവാല്\u200d 2010 ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതില്\u200d 19 ബന്ധം ക്ലാസുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നു. കൈയ്യില പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു ഗുരുതരമായ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണ് കാണിക്കുന്നത്. വ്യാഖ്യാനത്തില്\u200d 20', 'si': 'රේසියෝනේල් අධාරිත මොඩල් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් විශේෂයෙන් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ මොඩල් සඳහා සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් දෙන්න පුළුව නමුත්, විවිදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගන්න සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ගන්න සහ හ හොඳ විවිදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ල මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ගොඩක් ලේවල් හෙයුරිස්ටික් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා විශේෂණ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නැති විතරක් න අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක, ප්\u200dරතිකාරය තෝරණය සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ. වෙනස් ස්ථානයක්, වාක්ෂාව, වාක්ෂ අපි සේම්වේල් 2010 දත්ත සේට් එකේ අපේ විදියට අවශ්\u200dයය කරනවා ඒ වගේම සංවිධාන වර්ගයක් 19 සම්බන්ධ වර්ගයක් සහ අපේ අත්තර්ගයෙන පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂණ ප්\u200dරමාණයේ විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් වගේම විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් වගේම සමාන', 'ro': 'Modelele raționale oferă o modalitate unică de a oferi rezultate justificate pentru modelele de clasificare a relațiilor prin identificarea rațiunilor (cuvinte cheie și fraze pe care o persoană le poate folosi pentru a justifica relația din propoziție) în timpul procesului. Cu toate acestea, rețelele generative existente utilizate pentru extragerea rațiunilor vin cu un compromis între extragerea rațiunilor diversificate și obținerea unor rezultate bune de clasificare. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare euristică multinivel pentru reglementarea extracției raționale pentru a evita extragerea rațiunilor monotone fără a compromite performanța clasificării. În modelul nostru, selecția rațională este regularizată printr-un proces semi-supravegheat și caracteristici de la diferite niveluri: cuvânt, sintaxă, propoziție și corpus. Evaluăm abordarea noastră privind setul de date SemEval 2010 care include 19 clase de relație și calitatea rațiunilor extrase cu rațiunile noastre etichetate manual. Experimentele arată o îmbunătățire semnificativă a performanței clasificării și o creștere de 20% a interpretabilității raționale comparativ cu abordările de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Razumni modeli pružaju jedinstven način da pruži opravdane rezultate za modele klasifikacije odnosa identificirajući racionale (ključne reči i rečenice koje osoba može koristiti za opravdanje odnosa u rečenici) tokom procesa. Međutim, postojeće generativne mreže koje su koristile za izvlačenje racionala dolaze sa trgovinom između izvlačenja različitih racionala i ostvarivanja dobrih rezultata klasifikacije. U ovom papiru predlažemo višeniverski heuristički pristup kako bi regulirali racionalnu ekstrakciju kako bi izbjegli izvlačenje monotonnih racionala bez kompromitiranja klasifikacijskih učinka. U našem modelu, racionalni izbor je regulariziran pola nadzornog procesa i karakteristikama iz različitih nivoa: reč, sintaksa, rečenica i korpusa. Procjenjujemo naš pristup setu podataka za semiEval 2010 koji uključuje 19 klasa odnosa i kvalitet izvlačenih racionala sa našim ručno označenim racionalima. Eksperimenti pokazuju značajno poboljšanje klasifikacije i dobijanje od 20% racionalne interpretabilnosti u usporedbi s pristupima države umjetnosti.', 'ta': 'விகிதத்தில் அடிப்படையான மாதிரிகள் செயல்பாட்டில் ஒரு தொடர்பு வகைப்பாட்டு மாதிரிகளுக்கு தகுதியில்லாத முடிவுகளை கொடுக்கும் தனிப்பட்ட வழி தரும். ஆனால், இருக்கும் பொதுவான பிணையங்களை வெளியேற்ற பயன்படுத்தப்படும் வித்தியாசமான விகிதத்தை வெளியேற்றும் மற்றும் நல்ல வகுப்பு ம இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பல்வேறு உயர்ந்த முறையை நிரூபிக்கிறோம் வகுப்பு செயல்பாட்டை குறைப்பிடாமல் வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு வித்த எங்கள் மாதிரியில், வித்தியாசமான தேர்வு ஒரு பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட செயல் மற்றும் வேறு நிலைகளில் இருந்து குணங்கள் கட்டுப்படுத்தப்பட நாம் செம்Eval 2010 தரவுத்தளத்தின் முறையை மதிப்பீடு செய்கிறோம். அது 19 தொடர்பு வகுப்புகள் உள்ளது மற்றும் நம் கைமுறையாக குறிப்பிட்ட வ பரிசோதனைகள் வகைப்படுத்தல் செயல்பாட்டில் முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றத்தை காட்டுகிறது மற்றும் நிலையில் கலை முறைமைகளை ஒப்பிடும', 'so': "Tusaaladaha lagu soo bandhigay ee lagu soo bandhigi karo waxay u fidiyaan qaab gaar ah, si loo xaqiijiyo tusaalaha fasaxa, si loo aqoonsado rasmiga ah (erayada muhiimka ah iyo hadallada, in qof looga isticmaali karo si uu xaq u dhigo xiriirka xukunka). Si kastaba ha ahaatee shabakado dhaqanka ah oo lagu isticmaali karo in la soo saaro waxyaabaha kala duduwan iyo dhamaadka fasaxa wanaagsan. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab aad u kala duduwan in la maamulo soo bixinta rasmiga ah si aan uga soo bixino rasmiga ah oo aan sameyn tababarka fasaxda. Tusaale ahaan doorashada rasmiga ah waxaa la maamulaa baaritaanka halka la ilaaliyo iyo heerarka kala duduwan: hadal, canshuur, sentence iyo qof. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaabilaada ku saabsan danbiyada ee SemEval 2010, kaas oo ku jira 19 fasalka xiriirka iyo qiimaha rasuullada la soo saaray ee la qoray rasmigayada. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda hagaajinta tababarka farsamada oo aad u weyn iyo 20% faa'iido ah turjumaadda si rasmi ah looga barbarto habka farshaxanka.", 'sv': 'Rationella modeller ger ett unikt sätt att ge motiverade resultat för relationsklassificeringsmodeller genom att identifiera rationaler (nyckelord och fraser som en person kan använda för att motivera relationen i meningen) under processen. Befintliga generationsnät som används för att ta fram rationella grunder innebär dock en avvägning mellan att utvinna diversifierade rationella grunder och uppnå goda klassificeringsresultat. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett flernivåheuristiskt tillvägagångssätt för att reglera rationell extraktion för att undvika att utvinna monotona rationaler utan att kompromissa med klassificeringens prestanda. I vår modell regleras rationella val av en halvövervakad process och funktioner från olika nivåer: ord, syntax, mening och corpus. Vi utvärderar vårt tillvägagångssätt på SemEval 2010 dataset som omfattar 19 relationsklasser och kvaliteten på extraherade rationaler med våra manuellt märkta rationaler. Experiment visar en signifikant förbättring av klassificeringsprestanda och en 20% ökning av rationell tolkning jämfört med state-of-the-art metoder.', 'ur': 'رایٹونال بنیادی موڈلز پرسس کے درمیان رابطہ کے متعلق قابل تعریف کے نتیجے پیش کرنے کے لئے ایک واحد طریقہ دیتے ہیں۔ However, existing generative networks used to extract rationales come with a trade-off between extracting various rationales and achieving good classification results. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک multilevel heuristic approach propose to regulate rationale extraction to avoid extracting monotonous rationales without compromising classification performance. ہمارے مدل میں، منطقی انتخاب ایک نصف نظارت والی پروسس کے ذریعے اور مختلف سطح سے ویژہ بنا دیا گیا ہے: لفظ، سینٹکس، جماعت اور کورپوس. ہم نے نصف ایول 2010 ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعے اپنے طریقے کا ارزش کیا ہے جس میں 19 رابطہ کلاس اور ہمارے ہاتھ سے لابل کیا ہوا رابطہ کے ساتھ نکالا گیا ہے۔ تجربے کلاسپیٹ کی عملکرد میں ایک بڑی اضافہ دکھاتے ہیں اور 20% کے مطابق منطقی تفسیر قابلیت کے مطابق قابل تفسیر کے مطابق۔', 'uz': "Name Lekin mavjud generativ tarmoqlarni tashqi qilish uchun ishlatiladigan tarmoqlar turli turli rasmlarni ajratish va yaxshi darajalashtirish natijalarini bajarish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha heuristik usulni boshqarish uchun qo'llanmalarni boshqarish uchun qo'llanmalarni tasavvur qilamiz. Bizning modelimizda, oddiy tanlangan bir necha taʼminlovchi jarayonni boshqa darajadagi xususiyatlarni boshqa darajadagi darajaga qo'yiladi: so'z, syntax, sentence, va corpus. Biz SemEval 2010 maʼlumotlar tarkibini qiymatimiz, 19 murakkab sinflari va qoʻlbola qo'llab qo'llab qo'llangan rationalar bilan chiqarish rationalarimizning sifatida. Name", 'vi': 'Các mô hình lập động cung cấp một cách độc đáo để cung cấp kết quả hợp lý cho các mô hình phân phối phân phối bằng cách xác định lý trí (từ khóa và cụm từ mà một người có thể dùng để biện hộ cho quan hệ trong câu đó) trong quá trình này. Tuy nhiên, các mạng tạo hóa đã được dùng để khai thác lý do có một mối giao dịch giữa khai thác các lý trí đa dạng và đạt được kết quả phân loại tốt. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp bay cao, nhiều tầng để điều chỉnh các biện pháp lý lẽ để tránh khai thác độc chất độc lập mà không ảnh hưởng tới hiệu suất phân hạng. Trong mô hình của chúng tôi, sự lựa chọn theo logic được điều chỉnh bằng một quá trình bán giám sát và tính năng từ các cấp khác nhau: từ, cú pháp, câu và tập thể. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi trên bộ dữ liệu SemEvl 2009 gồm cả lớp liên hệ 19 và chất lượng hóa giải với lý trí được dán bằng tay. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy hiệu quả phân loại tăng đáng kể và một lợi nhuận cao trong tính lý lẽ giải thích so với các phương pháp hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Основаните на съображения модели предоставят уникален начин за предоставяне на обосновани резултати за моделите за класификация на отношенията чрез идентифициране на обосновки (ключови думи и фрази, които човек може да използва, за да обоснове връзката в изречението) по време на процеса. Съществуващите генеративни мрежи, използвани за извличане на обосновки, обаче, имат компромис между извличането на диверсифицирани обосновки и постигането на добри резултати по класификацията. В настоящата статия предлагаме многостепенен евристичен подход за регулиране на извличането на обосновки, за да се избегне извличането на монотонни обосновки, без да се компрометира класификационната ефективност. В нашия модел подборът на обосновките се регламентира чрез полунадзорен процес и характеристики от различни нива: дума, синтаксис, изречение и корпус. Ние оценяваме нашия подход към набора от данни който включва 19 класове взаимоотношения и качеството на извлечените обосновки с ръчно етикетирани обосновки. Експериментите показват значително подобрение на класификационните показатели и 20% увеличение на рационалната интерпретация в сравнение с най-съвременните подходи.', 'nl': 'Rationele-based modellen bieden een unieke manier om gerechtvaardigde resultaten te leveren voor relatiecolassificatiemodellen door tijdens het proces motivaties te identificeren (sleutelwoorden en zinnen die een persoon kan gebruiken om de relatie in de zin te rechtvaardigen). Bestaande generatieve netwerken die worden gebruikt om rationales te extraheren, hebben echter een compromis tussen het extraheren van gediversifieerde rationales en het bereiken van goede classificatieresultaten. In dit artikel stellen we een heuristische aanpak voor op meerdere niveaus om rationale extractie te reguleren om te voorkomen dat monotone rationales worden extraheren zonder afbreuk te doen aan de classificatieprestaties. In ons model wordt rationale selectie geregulariseerd door een semi-begeleid proces en kenmerken van verschillende niveaus: woord, syntaxis, zin en corpus. We evalueren onze aanpak op de SemEval 2010 dataset met 19-relatieklassen en de kwaliteit van geëxtraheerde rationales met onze handmatig gelabelde rationales. Experimenten tonen een significante verbetering in classificatieprestaties en een 20% winst in rationale interpreteerbaarheid in vergelijking met state-of-the-art benaderingen.', 'hr': 'Razumni modeli pružaju jedinstveni način za pružanje opravdanih rezultata za modele klasifikacije odnosa identificirajući racionale (ključne riječi i rečenice koje osoba može koristiti kako bi opravdavala odnos u rečenici) tijekom procesa. Međutim, postojeće generativne mreže koje se koriste za izvlačenje racionala dolaze s trgovinom između izvlačenja različitih racionala i ostvarivanja dobrih rezultata klasifikacije. U ovom papiru predlažemo višestruki heuristički pristup regulatiranju racionalne ekstrakcije kako bi se izbjegao izvlačenje monotonnih racionala bez ugrožavanja učinka klasifikacije. U našem modelu, racionalni izbor je regulariziran pola nadzornog procesa i karakteristikama iz različitih razina: riječ, sintaksa, rečenica i korpusa. Procjenjujemo naš pristup setu podataka za semiEval 2010 koji uključuje 19 klasa odnosa i kvalitetu izvlačenih racionala s našim ručno označenim razlogom. Eksperimenti pokazuju značajno poboljšanje učinka klasifikacije i dobiti 20% u razumnoj interpretabilnosti u usporedbi s pristupima stanja umjetnosti.', 'da': 'Rationalbaserede modeller giver en unik måde at give berettigede resultater for relationsklassificeringsmodeller ved at identificere rationaler (nøgleord og sætninger, som en person kan bruge til at retfærdiggøre relationen i sætningen) under processen. De eksisterende generative netværk, der anvendes til at udvinde rationaler, kommer imidlertid med en afvejning mellem at udvinde diversificerede rationaler og opnå gode klassifikationsresultater. I denne artikel foreslår vi en heuristisk tilgang på flere niveauer til regulering af rationel ekstraktion for at undgå at udtrække monotone rationaler uden at gå på kompromis med klassificeringens ydeevne. I vores model reguleres rationelle valg af en semi-overvåget proces og funktioner fra forskellige niveauer: ord, syntaks, sætning og korpus. Vi evaluerer vores tilgang til SemEval 2010 datasættet, der omfatter 19 relationsklasser og kvaliteten af ekstraherede rationaler med vores manuelt mærkede rationaler. Eksperimenter viser en betydelig forbedring i klassificeringsresultaterne og en stigning på 20% i rationel fortolkning sammenlignet med state-of-the-art metoder.', 'de': 'Rationale-basierte Modelle bieten eine einzigartige Möglichkeit, gerechtfertigte Ergebnisse für Beziehungsklassifikationsmodelle zu liefern, indem sie Begründungen (Schlüsselwörter und Phrasen, die eine Person verwenden kann, um die Beziehung im Satz zu rechtfertigen) während des Prozesses identifizieren. Bestehende generative Netzwerke, die verwendet werden, um Gründe zu extrahieren, gehen jedoch mit einem Kompromiss zwischen der Extraktion diversifizierter Gründe und dem Erzielen guter Klassifizierungsergebnisse einher. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen mehrstufigen heuristischen Ansatz vor, um die Extraktion von rationalen Gründen zu regulieren, um zu vermeiden, monotone Gründe zu extrahieren, ohne die Klassifikationsleistung zu beeinträchtigen. In unserem Modell wird die Rationalauswahl durch einen semi-überwachten Prozess regularisiert und umfasst verschiedene Ebenen: Wort, Syntax, Satz und Korpus. Wir evaluieren unseren Ansatz auf dem SemEval 2010 Datensatz, der 19-Beziehungsklassen und die Qualität extrahierter Rationalen enthält, mit unseren manuell markierten Rationalen. Experimente zeigen eine signifikante Verbesserung der Klassifikationsleistung und einen 20% Anstieg der rationalen Interpretierbarkeit im Vergleich zu modernen Ansätzen.', 'id': 'Model berdasarkan rasional menyediakan cara unik untuk menyediakan hasil yang dapat diduga untuk model klasifikasi hubungan dengan mengidentifikasi rasional (kata-kata kunci dan frasa yang dapat digunakan seseorang untuk membenarkan hubungan dalam kalimat) selama prosesnya. Namun, jaringan generasi yang ada yang digunakan untuk mengekstrak rasional datang dengan perdagangan antara mengekstrak rasional diversifikasi dan mencapai hasil klasifikasi yang baik. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan heuristik multitingkat untuk mengatur ekstraksi rasional untuk menghindari ekstraksi rasional monoton tanpa merusak prestasi klasifikasi. Dalam model kita, seleksi rasional diukur oleh proses semi-mengawasi dan fitur dari tingkat yang berbeda: kata, sintaks, kalimat, dan corpus. Kami mengevaluasi pendekatan kami pada set data SemEval 2010 yang termasuk 19 kelas hubungan dan kualitas rasional ekstraksi dengan rasional kami yang ditabel secara manual. Eksperimen menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan dalam prestasi klasifikasi dan 20% peningkatan dalam interpretasi rasional dibandingkan dengan pendekatan terbaik.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای بنیاد منطقی یک راهی متفاوتی برای تحویل دادن نتایج قابل توافق برای مدل\u200cهای جدید ارتباط با شناسایی منطقی (کلمات کلید و جمله\u200cهای کلید که یک نفر می\u200cتواند برای توافق ارتباط در جمله) در طول فرایند استفاده کند. ولی شبکه\u200cهای ژنترافی موجود برای خروج منطقی استفاده می\u200cشود، با تجارت بین خروج منطقی متفاوت و رسیدن نتایج\u200cهای مختلف\u200cبندی خوب می\u200cباشد. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم یک روش بسیاری از طبقه\u200cهای زیادی برای کنترل استخراج منطقی برای جلوگیری از استخراج منطقی تنها\u200cتون بدون توجه به فعالیت شناسایی. در مدل ما، انتخاب منطقی توسط یک فرایند نیمه مراقبت شده و ویژه\u200cهای مختلف از سطح\u200cهای مختلف، کلمه، سنتاکس، جمله و کورپوس است. ما روش خود را در مجموعه داده\u200cهای نیمه\u200cای ۲۰۰۱ ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم که شامل ۱۹ کلاس ارتباط و کیفیت منطقه\u200cهای خارج شده با منطقه\u200cهای دستی که به دست برگزیده شده\u200cایم. تجربه\u200cها به عنوان توسعه بزرگی توسعه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cبندی و سود 20 درصد توسعه\u200cبندی منطقی در مقایسه با نزدیک\u200cهای دولت هنر نشان می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Mifano ya kibaguzi yanatoa njia ya kipekee ya kutoa matokeo ya haki kwa mifano ya usalama kwa kutambua uhalali (maneno muhimu na maneno ambayo mtu anaweza kutumia kuhalalisha uhusiano katika hukumu) wakati wa mchakato. Hata hivyo, mitandao ya kizalendo iliyotumika kuchukua rasilimali yanakuja na biashara kati ya kutengeneza rasilimali tofauti na kupata matokeo mazuri ya usambazaji. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mbinu za heuristi za kiasi kikubwa kudhibiti uteuzi wa kimaadili ili kuepuka kuondoa rasilimali za kiuchumi bila kuharibu utendaji wa usambazaji. Katika mifano yetu, uchaguzi wa kimaadili unadhibitiwa na mchakato unaoangaliwa na nusu na vipengele vinavyotokana na viwango tofauti: maneno, usambazaji, hukumu, na makampuni. Tutathmini mbinu yetu kuhusu takwimu za SemEval 2010 ambazo zinajumuisha darasa 19 za mahusiano na kiwango cha rasilimali zilizotolewa kwa mikononi. Majaribio yanaonyesha maendeleo makubwa katika utendaji wa idadi hiyo na ongezeko la asilimia 20 kwa tafsiri ya msingi ukilinganishwa na hali ya sanaa.', 'tr': 'Görniş gabdaly nusgalar süreňde klasifikasyon nusgalaryny tanyşdyryp, bir nusga sözleriň baglaýyşyny dograşdyrmak üçin ejazay etmek üçin ejazay bir ýol temin edýär. Ýöne, meýdança döredijili netekler sebäpleri çykarmak üçin ullanýarlar. Döredijili sebäpleri çykarmak we gowy klasifikasyon netijelerini ýetirmek üçin bir türleşme bilen gelir. Bu kagyzda, klasifikasiýany boýunça süýtgetmek üçin multinivel heuristik taýýarlamagy täzelemek üçin bir nusga teklip edýäris. Biziň modelimizde, mantal saýlamak ýarym-gözlemli proses we farklı derejesinden düzenlenýär: söz, syntaks, sözlem we korpus. We evaluate our approach on the SemEval 2010 dataset that includes 19 relation classes and the quality of extracted rationales with our manually-labeled rationales. Denminatlar klasifikasynda möhüm gowurak we düzgün terjime edip biljek ýagdaýynda 20%-ni artyk ýagdaýynda görýär.', 'af': "Rationale-gebaseerde modele verskaf 'n unieke manier om geregtigbare resultate te verskaf vir verwanting klassifikasie modele deur rationales (sleutel woorde en frase wat 'n persoon kan gebruik om die verwanting in die seting te regverdig) in die proses te identifiseer. Maar bestaande genereerende netwerke wat gebruik word om racionale te uitpak, kom met 'n handel-af tussen uitpakking van verskeidende rationale en toegang van goeie klassifikasie resultate. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n multivlak heuristiese toegang om racionale uittrekking te reg om monotonese rationales te uittrek sonder om klasifikasie uittrekking te kompromiseer. In ons model is racionale keuse regulariseer deur 'n semi-superviseer proses en funksies van verskillende vlakke: woord, sintaks, seting en korpus. Ons evalueer ons toegang op die semiEval 2010 datastel wat 19 verwante klasse en die kwaliteit van uitgevoerde rationales met ons hand-etiketeerde rationales insluit. Eksperimente wys 'n betekende verbetering in klasifikasie-prestasie en 'n 20% verskaf in racionale uitleggingskapasiteit vergelyk met staat-van-kuns-toegang.", 'sq': 'Modelet me bazë racionale ofrojnë një mënyrë unike për të dhënë rezultate të justifikuara për modelet e klasifikimit të marrëdhënieve duke identifikuar racionalet (fjalët dhe frazat kyçe që një person mund të përdorë për të justifikuar marrëdhënien në dënim) gjatë procesit. Megjithatë, rrjetet ekzistuese gjenerative të përdorura për të nxjerrë racionet vijnë me një kompromis midis nxjerrjes së racioneve të diversifikuara dhe arritjes së rezultateve të klasifikimit të mirë. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një qasje heuristike shumëniveli për të rregulluar nxjerrjen racionale për të shmangur nxjerrjen e racioneve monotone pa kompromisuar performancën e klasifikimit. Në modelin tonë, zgjedhja racionale rregullohet nga një proces gjysmë-mbikqyrur dhe karakteristika nga nivele të ndryshme: fjalë, sintaks, fjalë dhe korpus. We evaluate our approach on the SemEval 2010 dataset that includes 19 relation classes and the quality of extracted rationales with our manually-labeled rationales.  Eksperimentet tregojnë një përmirësim të rëndësishëm në performancën e klasifikimit dhe një fitim prej 20% në interpretueshmërinë racionale krahasuar me qasjet më të larta.', 'am': 'በክፍለ ዘመን ማንም ሰው ግንኙነትን ለማክበር የሚችል የቁልፍ ቃላት እና ቃላት በሚያስፈልገው የግንኙነት ግንኙነት እንዲያረጋግጥ የግንኙነት ክፍተቶችን ለማግኘት የግንኙነት ፍሬዎችን ለማግኘት የተለየ የልዩ መንገድን ያስተካክላል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የተገኘ የዘረኝነት መረብ ለመውጣት የሚጠቅሙት የልዩ ልዩ እውቀት እና መልካሙን መግለጫ ፍሬዎችን ለማግኘት በመካከለኛው ነጋዴ ይደርሳሉ፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ በክፍለ ግንኙነት ሳንጎድል ክፍተቶችን ለመውጣት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በሞዴል፣ የተግባር ምርጫ በተለዩ ደረጃዎች፣ ቃላት፣ ሲንካር፣ ፍርድ እና ክፍለ ሥርዓት ነው፡፡ የሴmEval 2010 ዳታዊ ሰርቨሮች ላይ ሥርዓታችንን እናስተውላለን፤ 19 የግንኙነት ክፍሎች እና በእጃችን በተለወጠው የውጤት ክፍተቶችን እናውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎች በክፍለ ግንኙነት አካባቢ እና ከሀገር-አርእስት ግንኙነት ጋር የሚተካክሉ 20 በመቶ ትርጉም የሚያሳየው፡፡', 'hy': "Ռացիոնալ հիմնված մոդելները պարունակում են առանձնահատուկ միջոց հարաբերության դասակարգման մոդելների արդարացված արդյունքներ պարունակելու, որոշում են ռացիոնալներ (կարևոր բառեր և արտահայտություններ, որոնք մարդը կարող է օգտագործել նախադասության հարաբերության արդարաց Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող սերունդային ցանցերը, որոնք օգտագործվում են ռացիոնալների վերացման համար, հանում են բազմազան ռացիոնալների վերացման և լավ դասակարգման արդյունքների հասնելու միջև: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմամամամակարդակի հյուրիստիկ մոտեցում ռացիոնալ արտահանումը վերահսկելու համար, որպեսզի խուսափենք մոնոտոն ռացիոնալ արտահանումներից առանց կործանցելու դասակարգման Մեր մոդելի մեջ ռացիոնալ ընտրությունը կառավարվում է կիսակառավարվող գործընթացի միջոցով և տարբեր մակարդակների առանձնահատկություններով' բառերի, սինտաքսի, նախադասությունների և մարմնի միջոցով: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը 2010 թվականի կենտրոնային տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որը ներառում է 19 հարաբերությունների դասեր և ստացված ռացիոնալների որակը ձեռքով նշանակված ռացիոնալների հետ: Փորձերը ցույց են տալիս դասակարգման արդյունքների կարևոր բարելավումը և ռացիոնալ մեկնաբանելիության 20 տոկոսի բարելավումը, համեմատած ամենաբարձր մոտեցումների հետ:", 'ko': '기본 원리를 바탕으로 하는 모델은 독특한 방법을 제공하여 그 과정에서 기본 원리(한 사람이 문장의 관계를 증명할 수 있는 키워드와 단어)를 식별함으로써 관계 분류 모델에 합리적인 결과를 제공한다.그러나 추출 원리에 사용되는 기존 생성 네트워크는 추출 다양화 원리와 양호한 분류 결과 실현 사이에 균형이 존재한다.본고에서 우리는 분류 성능에 영향을 주지 않는 상황에서 단조로운 기본 원리를 추출하지 않도록 다단계 계발식 방법을 제시했다.우리의 모델에서 이론적 기초의 선택은 반감독의 과정과 서로 다른 차원에서 온 특징을 통해 규범화된 단어, 문법, 문장과 어료 라이브러리이다.SemEval 2010 데이터 세트에서는 19개의 관계 클래스와 수동 태그를 사용하는 기본 원리를 사용하여 추출한 기본 원리의 품질을 포함하는 방법을 평가했습니다.실험에 의하면 가장 선진적인 방법에 비해 분류 성능이 현저히 향상되었고 기본 원리 해석 능력이 20% 향상되었다.', 'bs': 'Razumni modeli pružaju jedinstveni način da pruži opravdane rezultate za modele klasifikacije odnosa identificirajući racionale (ključne riječi i rečenice koje osoba može koristiti za opravdanje odnosa u rečenici) tijekom procesa. Međutim, postojeće generativne mreže koje se koriste za izvlačenje racionala dolaze sa trgovinom između izvlačenja različitih racionala i ostvarivanja dobrih rezultata klasifikacije. U ovom papiru predlažemo višeniverski heuristički pristup kako bi regulirali racionalnu ekstrakciju kako bi izbjegli izvlačenje monotonnih racionala bez kompromitiranja učinka klasifikacije. U našem modelu, racionalni izbor je regulariziran pola nadzornog procesa i karakteristikama iz različitih nivoa: riječ, sintaksa, rečenica i korpusa. Procjenjujemo naš pristup setu podataka za semiEval 2010 koji uključuje 19 klasa odnosa i kvalitetu izvlačenih racionala sa našim ručno označenim racionalima. Eksperimenti pokazuju značajno poboljšanje klasifikacije i dobijanje od 20% u razumnoj interpretabilnosti u usporedbi s pristupima države umjetnosti.', 'az': 'Reazional modellər işlətmə müddətində insanın əlaqəsini təsdiqləmək üçün istifadə edə biləcək anahtar sözləri və sözləri təsdiqləmək üçün istifadə edə biləcək müəyyən bir yol verir. Lakin, müxtəlif dəyişiklik nəticələri çıxartmaq və yaxşı klasifikasiya sonuçlarını əldə etmək üçün istifadə edilən genişliyi a ğları müxtəlif dəyişiklik əlaqəsi ilə gəlir. Bu kağızda, çoxlu səviyyədə heuristik bir tərzim təklif edirik ki, razıllıq çıxartmasını müdafiə etmək üçün monotonlu razıllıqları çıxartmaqdan uzaqlaşdırılır. Bizim modelimizdə, racional seçim yarı-gözləyirli proses və müxtəlif səviyyələrdən təhsil edilir: söz, sintaks, cümlələr və korpus. Biz 2010-ci SemEval veri qutusu ilə 19 ilişki sınıflarını və əl etiketli rationallərimizlə çıxarılmış rationallərin kalitetini təmin edirik. Tərəbələr klasifikasyon performansındakı möhkəm bir improvement göstərir və 20% razıllıq təfsil edilməsi ilə müqayisədə sanatın yaxınlıqlarını göstərir.', 'cs': 'Modely založené na racionálních modelech poskytují jedinečný způsob, jak poskytnout odůvodněné výsledky pro klasifikační modely vztahů identifikací odůvodnění (klíčová slova a fráze, které může osoba použít k odůvodnění vztahu ve větě) během procesu. Stávající generační sítě používané k extrakci odůvodnění však přicházejí s kompromisem mezi extrakcí diverzifikovaných odůvodnění a dosažením dobrých výsledků klasifikace. V tomto článku navrhujeme víceúrovňový heuristický přístup k regulaci extrakce racionálních důvodů, abychom zabránili extrakci monotónních důvodů bez ohrožení klasifikační výkonnosti. V našem modelu je výběr odůvodnění regulován polovičně dohlíženým procesem a funkce z různých úrovní: slovo, syntaxe, věta a korpus. Hodnotíme náš přístup na datové sadě SemEval 2010, která zahrnuje 19-třídy vztahů a kvalitu extrahovaných odůvodnění s našimi ručně označenými odůvodněními. Experimenty ukazují významné zlepšení klasifikační výkonnosti a 20% nárůst racionální interpretovatelnosti ve srovnání s moderními přístupy.', 'bn': 'প্রক্রিয়ার সময় কোন ব্যক্তির সম্পর্কের বৈধতা নির্ধারণের মাধ্যমে সম্পর্কের ক্লাস্ফিকেশন মডেলের জন্য একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য উপায় প্রদান করা যায়। তবে বর্তমান জেনারেটিভ নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করা যায় যৌক্তিকতা বের করার জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে তারা বৈচিত্র্যকভাবে বিভিন্ন যৌক্তিকতা  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি মাল্টিলিভেল হারিস্টিক উপায় প্রস্তাব করি যাতে যৌক্তিকতা বের করা নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা যায়, যাতে তারা ক্লাসাফিকেশনের প্রদর্ আমাদের মডেলে যৌক্তিক নির্বাচন নিয়ন্ত্রণ করা হয়েছে একটি প্রক্রিয়ার দ্বারা আর বিভিন্ন স্তর থেকে বৈশিষ্ট্য: শব্দ, সিন্যাক্স, শাস্ আমরা সেমইভাল ২০১০ ডাটাসেটের উপর আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া মূল্যায়ন করি যার মধ্যে ১৯ সম্পর্ক ক্লাস এবং আমাদের হাতে হাতে চিহ্নিত বৈষম্যের মা পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে শ্রেণীর প্রযুক্তির তুলনায় বিশাল উন্নতি এবং রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের পদক্ষেপের তুলনায় ২০ শতাংশের', 'fi': 'Rationaalipohjaiset mallit tarjoavat ainutlaatuisen tavan tuottaa perusteltuja tuloksia suhdeluokittelumalleille tunnistamalla perusteet (avainsanat ja lauseet, joilla henkilö voi perustella suhdetta lauseessa) prosessin aikana. Nykyiset generatiiviset verkot, joita käytetään perustelujen poimimiseen, tuovat kuitenkin kompromisseja hajautettujen perustelujen poimimisen ja hyvien luokitustulosten saavuttamisen välillä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme monitasoista heuristista lähestymistapaa rationaaliuuttojen säätelyyn, jotta vältetään monotonisten rationaalien uuttaminen vaarantamatta luokitusta. Mallissamme perustelujen valintaa regularisoidaan puolivalvotulla prosessilla ja sen ominaisuuksilla eri tasoilta: sana, syntaksi, lause ja korpus. Arvioimme lähestymistapaamme SemEval 2010 -aineistoon, joka sisältää 19 suhdeluokkaa ja uutettujen perustelujen laatua manuaalisesti merkittyjen perustelujemme avulla. Kokeet osoittavat, että luokituksen suorituskyky parani merkittävästi ja perustelujen tulkittavuus parani 20 prosenttia verrattuna uusimpiin lähestymistapoihin.', 'et': 'Põhjenduspõhised mudelid annavad ainulaadse võimaluse anda seoste klassifitseerimise mudelitele põhjendatud tulemusi, määrates protsessi käigus kindlaks põhjendused (võtmesõnad ja laused, mida inimene saab kasutada seose põhjendamiseks lauses). Olemasolevad generatiivsed võrgustikud, mida kasutatakse põhjenduste väljatöötamiseks, toovad siiski kaasa kompromisse mitmekesiste põhjenduste kaevandamise ja heade klassifitseerimistulemuste saavutamise vahel. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja mitmetasandilise heuristilise lähenemisviisi, et reguleerida põhjenduste ekstraheerimist, et vältida monotoonsete põhjenduste ekstraheerimist, kahjustamata klassifikatsiooni tulemuslikkust. Meie mudelis reguleeritakse põhjenduste valikut pooljärelevalvega protsessiga ja erinevatel tasanditel: sõna, süntaks, lause ja korpus. Hindame oma lähenemisviisi SemEval 2010 andmekogumile, mis sisaldab 19 seosklassi ja ekstraheeritud põhjenduste kvaliteeti käsitsi märgistatud põhjendustega. Katsed näitavad klassifitseerimise tulemuslikkuse märkimisväärset paranemist ja 20% suuremat tõlgendatavust võrreldes kaasaegsete lähenemisviisidega.', 'ca': "Els models basats en racions proporcionen una manera única de proporcionar resultats justificats als models de classificació de relacions identificant racions (paraules clau i frases que una person a pot utilitzar per justificar la relació en la frase) durant el procés. Tot i així, les xarxes generatives existents utilitzades per extrair racionals tenen un compromís entre extrair racionals diversificades i aconseguir bons resultats de classificació. En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament heurístic a molts nivells per a regular l'extracció racional per evitar extrair racions monotòniques sense comprometre el rendiment de la classificació. En el nostre model, la selecció racional es regularitza per un procés semisupervisat i característiques de nivells diferents: paraula, sintaxi, frase i corpus. Evaluam el nostre enfocament en el conjunt de dades SemEval 2010 que inclou 19 classes de relació i la qualitat de racions extraites amb les nostres racions etiquetades manualment. Els experiments mostren una millora significativa en el rendiment de la classificació i un guany del 20% en l'interpretabilitat racional comparat amb els enfocaments més avançats.", 'jv': 'Language politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pebukir iki, kita mudhaya akeh bantuan heuristik dadi nggawe rationale extract nggawe bukasai winih dhéwé, perusahaan ono bukasai basa luwih apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé, diuwisan rationale kuwi nggawe diuwisan sampeyan karo perusahaan langgar-sistem sing gawe nguasai winih: kelas, siwek, dadi sakjane lan sakjane sampeyan. Awak dhéwé éntukno dhéwé nggawe gerasané karo dataset semiinval 2011 sing nyebutaké 19 perusahaan karo kalitas itépakan rationales ngéwé manut-tambah rationales User:', 'sk': 'Modeli, ki temeljijo na utemeljitvah, zagotavljajo edinstven način zagotavljanja upravičenih rezultatov za modele razvrstitve relacij z določanjem utemeljitev (ključnih besed in stavkov, ki jih oseba lahko uporabi za utemeljitev razmerja v stavku) med postopkom. Vendar obstoječa generativna omrežja, ki se uporabljajo za pridobivanje utemeljitev, prinašajo kompromis med pridobivanjem raznolikih utemeljitev in doseganjem dobrih rezultatov klasifikacije. V tem prispevku predlagamo večstopenjski heuristični pristop za uravnavanje ekstrakcije racional, da bi se izognili ekstrakciji monotonih racional brez ogrožanja klasifikacijske uspešnosti. V našem modelu je izbira utemeljitev urejena s polnadzorovanim procesom in značilnostmi iz različnih ravni: beseda, sintaksa, stavek in korpus. Naš pristop ocenjujemo na naboru podatkov SemEval 2010, ki vključuje 19 relacijskih razredov in kakovost izvlečenih utemeljitev z našimi ročno označenimi utemeljitvami. Poskusi kažejo znatno izboljšanje uspešnosti klasifikacije in 20-odstotno povečanje racionalne razlage v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi pristopi.', 'ha': "Modalin da aka daidaita masu aikin aiki na ƙayyade, yana bãyar da wata hanya wanda ya ƙayyade matsalar masu inganci wa misãlai masu danganta, a bayan ka gane masu inganci (masu ƙayyade da maganar da mazaɓa wanda wani mutum yana iya amfani da dõmin a justify haɗin da maganar). A lokacin da, zanãgo masu jira da ake amfani da su dõmin su fitar rasori za'a zo da wani fatauci mai bambanci tsakanin ya fita da rabo-baƙa ƙƙe da kuma ta sami fassarar mai kyau. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi mai multi'in heuristic dõmin ya yi adadi ga haramtar masu da inganci dõmin ya kange masu kashewa rasori na monotono ko kuma ba mu sami da fasalin daraja ba. Yana cikin shirin tuyinmu, ana ƙayyade zaɓa ɓen rasa ko kuma yana da tsari daga darajõji daban-dabam: kalma, synkasa, salon, da cire, da nau'in. Tuna ƙaddara hanyarmu a kan data na Semeval 2010 wanda ke ƙunsa da masallaci 19 da sifar da masu kashewa da rabon da hannayenmu. Tajarakin na nuna mafiya girma cikin performance na fasalin daraja kuma yana ƙari 20% cikin fassarar fassarori da inganci da sami'a da fassarar-na-sanar.", 'he': 'דוגמנים מבוססים ברציונליים מספקים דרך ייחודית לספק תוצאות מוצדקות לדוגמנים מסווגים יחסים על ידי זיהוי הגיוניים (מילים מפתחות ומבטים שאדם יכול להשתמש בהצדקה של יחסים במשפט) במהלך התהליך. בכל אופן, רשתות דורות קיימות שהשתמשו כדי לחלץ הגיוניים מגיעות עם הסכם בין לחלץ הגיוניים מסווגים ולהשיג תוצאות מסווגים טובות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה הוריסטית רבה רמות כדי לקבוע חיפוש הגיוני כדי להימנע מחלץ הגיוני מונוטוני בלי להפריע ביצועי מסווג. בדוגמא שלנו, הבחירה הגיונית מוסדרת ע"י תהליך חצי-מפקח והתכונות מרמות שונות: מילה, סינטקס, משפט וקורפוס. We evaluate our approach on the SemEval 2010 dataset that includes 19 relation classes and the quality of extracted rationales with our manually-labeled rationales.  הניסויים מראים שיפור משמעותי ביצועי מסווג ו-20% רווח ביכולת הפרשנות הגיונית בהשוואה לגישויים מצוינים.', 'bo': 'Rationale-based models provide a unique way to provide justifiable results for relation to classification models by identifying rationales (key words and phrases that a person can use to justify the relation in the sentence) during the process. ཡིན་ནའང་། རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཕྱིར་བཤེར་བྱེད་པར་ལག་ལེན་པའི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཚོ་ནི་ཕན་འབྲེལ་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་ཞིག འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྣ་ཚོགས་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ་བཟོ་བཅུག In our model, rationale selection is regularized by a semi-supervised process and features from different levels: word, syntax, sentence, and corpus. We evaluate our approach on the SemEval 2010 dataset that includes 19 relation classes and the quality of extracted rationales with our manually-labeled rationales. Experiments show a significant improvement in classification performance and a 20% gain in rational interpretability compared to state-of-the-art approaches.'}
{'en': 'Adversarial Multi-lingual Neural Relation Extraction', 'es': 'Extracción de relaciones neuronales contradictorias multilingües', 'fr': 'Extraction de relations neuronales multilingues contradictoires', 'ar': 'استخراج العلاقات العصبية متعدد اللغات الخصوم', 'pt': 'Extração de Relação Neural Multilíngue Adversarial', 'ja': '対抗的多言語神経関係抽出', 'zh': '对抗性多语言神经关系', 'hi': 'प्रतिकूल बहुभाषी तंत्रिका संबंध निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Состязательная многоязычная экстракция нейронной связи', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh Gaol Néarach Ilteangach Sáraíochta', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური ნეირალური შესახებ ექსტრაქცია', 'el': 'Αντιθετική πολυγλωσσική εκχύλιση νευρωνικής σχέσης', 'hu': 'Nemkívánatos többnyelvű idegrendszeri kapcsolat extrakció', 'it': 'Estrazione di relazione neurale multilingue avversaria', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujamas daugiakalbis nervinių santykių ekstrakcija', 'kk': 'Конверсариялық көп тілді нейралық қатынас тарқатуы', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Hubungan Neural Berbahasa Berlawan', 'ml': 'അഭിപ്രായത്തിലെ പല- ഭാഷ നെയുറല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തല്\u200d', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni ta’ Relazzjoni Newrali Multilingwi Adversarjali', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн олон хэл мэдрэлийн харилцааны хамаарал', 'no': 'Rekursarialt fleirspråk neuralrelasjonsutpakking', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczna ekstrakcja relacji nerwowych', 'ro': 'Extracţie adversă multilingvă a relaţiei neurale', 'si': 'ව්\u200dයාපාරික විශාල භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණය සම්බන්ධය නික්\u200dරියාව', 'sr': 'Adversarial Multi lingual Neural Relations Extraction', 'so': 'Adversarial Multi-lingual Neural Relation Extraction', 'sv': 'Adversarial flerspråkig neural relationsextraktion', 'ta': 'முன்னேற்றல் பல மொழிகளின் நெருக்கல் தொடர்பு வெளியேறுதல்', 'ur': 'مخصوص متعدد زبان کی نئورل رابطہ اخراج', 'uz': 'Bir nechta tillar bilan aloqani ajratish', 'vi': 'Cấu trúc thần kinh', 'bg': 'Извличане на нежелана многоезична неврална връзка', 'nl': 'Adversaire meertalige neurale relatie extractie', 'hr': 'Adversarial Multi lingual Neural Relations Extraction', 'da': 'Adversarial Multi- lingual Neural Relation Extraction', 'de': 'Adversariale mehrsprachige neuronale Beziehungsextraktion', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Hubungan Neural Multibahasa', 'ko': '대항성 다언어 신경 관계 추출', 'fa': 'اخراج ارتباط عصبی متفاوتی', 'sw': 'Kutengenezwa kwa lugha nyingi za asili', 'tr': 'Nusgala köp-dilli näsaz baglanyşy açmak', 'af': 'Adversariale Multi lingual Neural Relation Extraction', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi kundërshtar i marrëdhënieve neuronale shumëgjuhëse', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'MĂĽÉ™llif Ă§oxlu dil nĂ¶ral Ä°liĹźki Ă‡Ä±qÄ±Ĺź', 'bn': 'প্রাধান্য বহুভাষী নিউরেল সম্পর্ক এক্সট্র্যাকশন', 'bs': 'Adversarial Multi lingual Neural Relations Extraction', 'ca': 'Extracció adversaria de relació neuronal multilingüe', 'cs': 'Nepříznivá extrakce vícejazyčného neuronového vztahu', 'et': 'Kõrvaltoimete mitmekeelse neuraalse seose ekstraheerimine', 'fi': 'Haitallinen monikielinen hermosuhteiden poisto', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Ekstrakcija neželenih večjezičnih nevronskih odnosov', 'jv': 'FindOK', 'he': 'מערכת יחסים נוירואלים רבות שפות', 'bo': 'སྐུལ་གསུམ་ཅན་གྱི་སྣ་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་དབང་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་འདོན'}
{'en': 'Multi-lingual relation extraction aims to find unknown relational facts from text in various languages. Existing models can not well capture the consistency and diversity of relation patterns in different languages. To address these issues, we propose an adversarial multi-lingual neural relation extraction (AMNRE) model, which builds both consistent and individual representations for each sentence to consider the consistency and diversity among languages. Further, we adopt an adversarial training strategy to ensure those consistent sentence representations could effectively extract the language-consistent relation patterns. The experimental results on real-world datasets demonstrate that our AMNRE model significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art models. The source code of this paper can be obtained from https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ar': 'يهدف استخراج العلاقة متعدد اللغات إلى إيجاد حقائق علائقية غير معروفة من نص بلغات مختلفة. لا يمكن للنماذج الحالية التقاط تناسق وتنوع أنماط العلاقات في اللغات المختلفة. لمعالجة هذه المشكلات ، نقترح نموذجًا لاستخراج العلاقة العصبية متعددة اللغات (AMNRE) ، والذي يبني تمثيلات متسقة وفردية لكل جملة للنظر في الاتساق والتنوع بين اللغات. علاوة على ذلك ، نعتمد إستراتيجية تدريب عدائي لضمان أن تمثيلات الجملة المتسقة يمكن أن تستخرج بشكل فعال أنماط العلاقة المتوافقة مع اللغة. توضح النتائج التجريبية على مجموعات البيانات الواقعية أن نموذج AMNRE الخاص بنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث النماذج. يمكن الحصول على الكود المصدري لهذه الورقة من https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'pt': 'A extração de relação multilíngue visa encontrar fatos relacionais desconhecidos de texto em vários idiomas. Os modelos existentes não podem capturar a consistência e a diversidade de padrões de relação em diferentes linguagens. Para resolver esses problemas, propomos um modelo de extração de relação neural multilíngue adversarial (AMNRE), que constrói representações consistentes e individuais para cada sentença para considerar a consistência e a diversidade entre os idiomas. Além disso, adotamos uma estratégia de treinamento contraditório para garantir que essas representações consistentes de sentenças possam efetivamente extrair os padrões de relação consistentes com a linguagem. Os resultados experimentais em conjuntos de dados do mundo real demonstram que nosso modelo AMNRE supera significativamente os modelos de última geração. O código-fonte deste artigo pode ser obtido em https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'fr': "L'extraction de relations multilingues vise à trouver des faits relationnels inconnus à partir de textes dans différentes langues. Les modèles existants ne permettent pas de rendre compte de la cohérence et de la diversité des modèles de relations dans les différentes langues. Pour résoudre ces problèmes, nous proposons un modèle d'extraction de relation neuronale multilingue contradictoire (AMNRE), qui construit des représentations cohérentes et individuelles pour chaque phrase afin de tenir compte de la cohérence et de la diversité entre les langues. De plus, nous adoptons une stratégie de formation contradictoire afin de garantir que ces représentations de phrases cohérentes puissent extraire efficacement les modèles de relation cohérents avec la langue. Les résultats expérimentaux sur des ensembles de données réels démontrent que notre modèle AMNRE surpasse largement les modèles de pointe. Le code source de ce document peut être obtenu à l'adresse https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'es': 'La extracción de relaciones multilingües tiene como objetivo encontrar hechos relacionales desconocidos a partir de textos en varios idiomas. Los modelos existentes no pueden captar bien la consistencia y la diversidad de los patrones de relación en diferentes idiomas. Para abordar estos problemas, proponemos un modelo contradictorio de extracción de relaciones neuronales multilingüe (AMNRE), que construye representaciones consistentes e individuales para cada oración para considerar la coherencia y la diversidad entre los idiomas. Además, adoptamos una estrategia de entrenamiento contradictorio para garantizar que esas representaciones consistentes de oraciones puedan extraer eficazmente los patrones de relación consistentes con el lenguaje. Los resultados experimentales en conjuntos de datos del mundo real demuestran que nuestro modelo AMNRE supera significativamente a los modelos de última generación. El código fuente de este documento se puede obtener en https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ja': '多言語関係抽出は、さまざまな言語のテキストから未知の関係事実を見つけることを目的としている。既存のモデルは、異なる言語における関係パターンの一貫性と多様性をうまく捉えることができない。これらの問題に対処するために、私たちは対立多言語ニューラルリレーションズ抽出（ AMNRE ）モデルを提案します。これは、言語間の一貫性と多様性を考慮するために、各文の一貫性と個々の表現の両方を構築します。さらに、これらの一貫した文章表現が言語一貫性のある関係パターンを効果的に抽出できるようにするために、対抗訓練戦略を採用しています。現実のデータセットの実験結果は、AMNREモデルが最先端のモデルを大幅に上回っていることを示しています。この論文のソースコードは、https://github.com/thunlp/AMNREから入手できます。', 'hi': 'बहुभाषी संबंध निष्कर्षण का उद्देश्य विभिन्न भाषाओं में पाठ से अज्ञात संबंधपरक तथ्यों को ढूंढना है। मौजूदा मॉडल विभिन्न भाषाओं में संबंध पैटर्न की स्थिरता और विविधता को अच्छी तरह से कैप्चर नहीं कर सकते हैं। इन मुद्दों को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एक प्रतिकूल बहुभाषी तंत्रिका संबंध निष्कर्षण (AMNRE) मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो भाषाओं के बीच स्थिरता और विविधता पर विचार करने के लिए प्रत्येक वाक्य के लिए सुसंगत और व्यक्तिगत प्रतिनिधित्व दोनों बनाता है। इसके अलावा, हम यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए एक प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण रणनीति अपनाते हैं कि उन सुसंगत वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व प्रभावी ढंग से भाषा-सुसंगत संबंध पैटर्न को निकाल सकें। वास्तविक दुनिया के डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि हमारा AMNRE मॉडल अत्याधुनिक मॉडल को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है। इस पेपर का स्रोत कोड https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE से प्राप्त किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'Многоязычное извлечение отношений направлено на поиск неизвестных реляционных фактов из текста на различных языках. Существующие модели не могут в полной мере отразить последовательность и разнообразие моделей взаимоотношений на различных языках. Для решения этих вопросов мы предлагаем состязательную многоязычную модель извлечения нейронных отношений (AMNRE), которая строит как последовательные, так и индивидуальные представления для каждого предложения, чтобы учитывать согласованность и разнообразие между языками. Кроме того, мы принимаем состязательную стратегию обучения, чтобы эти последовательные представления предложений могли эффективно извлекать закономерности отношений, согласующихся с языком. Экспериментальные результаты на реальных наборах данных показывают, что наша модель AMNRE значительно превосходит самые современные модели. Исходный код этой статьи можно получить по адресу https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'zh': '多言取旨于诸语言文本中求未知之实。 今模形不得甚佳,言语之一致性多样性。 为此等者,立对抗性多言神经取(AMNRE),各为一句,以虑言语之一致性多样性。 此外用对抗性训练之策,以保一体之句,有效于言语之式。 在真实世界数集上之实验结果表明,吾AMNRE明优于先进。 本文源代码可得于 https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE 。', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag eastóscadh caidrimh ilteangacha fíricí coibhneasta anaithnid a fháil ó théacs i dteangacha éagsúla. Ní féidir le samhlacha atá ann cheana comhsheasmhacht agus éagsúlacht na bpatrún caidrimh i dteangacha éagsúla a léiriú. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar na saincheisteanna seo, molaimid múnla sáraíochta ilteangach um eastóscadh caidreamh néaraigh (AMNRE), a thógann léirithe comhsheasmhacha agus aonair araon do gach abairt chun comhsheasmhacht agus éagsúlacht teangacha a mheas. Ina theannta sin, glacaimid le straitéis oiliúna sáraíochta lena chinntiú go bhféadfadh na huiríll chomhsheasmhacha pianbhreithe sin na patrúin caidrimh teanga-chomhsheasmhacha a bhaint go héifeachtach. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacair shonraí an fhíorsaoil go sáraíonn ár samhail AMNRE go suntasach na samhlacha úrscothacha. Is féidir cód foinse an pháipéir seo a fháil ó https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ka': 'მრავალენგური შესახებ ექსტრაქციის მიზეზი ტექსტიდან უცნობი შესახებ ფაქტები განსხვავებული ენაში. Existing models cannot well capture the consistency and diversity of relations patterns in different languages. ამ პრობლემების შესახებ, ჩვენ მინდომარებთ განსაკუთრებული მრავალური ნეიროლური შესახებ ექსტრაქციის მოდელს, რომელიც ყველა სიტყვებისთვის კონსტენსური და ინდიველური გამოსახულებების შესა დამატებით, ჩვენ განვითარებით განვითარება სტრატიგია, რომელიც დავითარებით ამ კონსტენსტური წესების გამოსახულება შეიძლება ეფექტურად გამოყენოთ ენის კო ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შესახებ გამოწვება, რომ ჩვენი AMNRE მოდელი მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო გავაკეთებს მოდელს. ამ გვერდის მხოლოდ კოდი შეიძლება მიიღოთ https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή πολλαπλών γλωσσών σχέσεων στοχεύει στην εύρεση άγνωστων σχεσιακών γεγονότων από κείμενο σε διάφορες γλώσσες. Τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα δεν μπορούν να αποτυπώσουν καλά τη συνέπεια και την ποικιλομορφία των προτύπων σχέσεων σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες. Για να αντιμετωπιστούν αυτά τα ζητήματα, προτείνουμε ένα αντικρουνικό πολυγλωσσικό μοντέλο εξαγωγής νευρωνικών σχέσεων (AMNRE), το οποίο δημιουργεί τόσο συνεκτικές όσο και μεμονωμένες αναπαραστάσεις για κάθε πρόταση ώστε να ληφθεί υπόψη η συνέπεια και η ποικιλομορφία μεταξύ των γλωσσών. Περαιτέρω, υιοθετούμε μια ανταγωνιστική στρατηγική εκπαίδευσης για να διασφαλίσουμε ότι αυτές οι συνεπείς αναπαραστάσεις των προτάσεων θα μπορούσαν αποτελεσματικά να εξάγουν τα πρότυπα σχέσεων συνεπή στη γλώσσα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε πραγματικά σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά τα μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Ο πηγαίος κώδικας αυτής της εργασίας μπορεί να ληφθεί από https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'hu': 'A többnyelvű kapcsolatkivonás célja, hogy ismeretlen kapcsolati tényeket találjon különböző nyelveken. A meglévő modellek nem tudják jól megragadni a különböző nyelvek kapcsolati mintáinak következetességét és sokszínűségét. Ezeknek a kérdéseknek a megoldására javaslatot teszünk egy ellentmondásos, többnyelvű neurális kapcsolat extrakciós (AMNRE) modellre, amely minden mondat következetes és egyéni reprezentációját építi fel, hogy figyelembe vegye a nyelvek közötti következetességet és sokszínűséget. Továbbá ellenséges képzési stratégiát fogadunk el annak biztosítása érdekében, hogy ezek a következetes mondatábrázolások hatékonyan kivonják a nyelvi következetes kapcsolatmintákat. A valós adatkészletek kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy AMNRE modellünk jelentősen felülmúlja a korszerű modelleket. A tanulmány forráskódja a https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'it': "L'estrazione di relazioni multilingue mira a trovare fatti relazionali sconosciuti dal testo in varie lingue. I modelli esistenti non riescono bene a cogliere la coerenza e la diversità dei modelli di relazione nelle diverse lingue. Per affrontare questi problemi, proponiamo un modello di estrazione delle relazioni neurali multilingue avversarie (AMNRE), che costruisce rappresentazioni coerenti e individuali per ogni frase per considerare la coerenza e la diversità tra le lingue. Inoltre, adottiamo una strategia di formazione avversaria per garantire che quelle rappresentazioni coerenti delle frasi possano efficacemente estrarre i modelli di relazione coerenti con il linguaggio. I risultati sperimentali su set di dati reali dimostrano che il nostro modello AMNRE supera significativamente i modelli all'avanguardia. Il codice sorgente di questo documento può essere ottenuto da https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'lt': 'Daugiakalbių santykių išrašymo tikslas – rasti nežinomus santykinius faktus iš teksto įvairiomis kalbomis. Esami modeliai negali gerai atsižvelgti į santykių modelių nuoseklumą ir įvairovę skirtingomis kalbomis. Siekiant išspręsti šiuos klausimus, siūlome priešingą daugiakalbį nervinių santykių ekstrahavimo (AMNRE) model į, kuriame kiekvieno sakinio nuosekliai ir atskirai pateikiami duomenys, kad būtų atsižvelgta į kalbų nuoseklumą ir įvairovę. Be to, priimame prieštaringo mokymo strategiją, kad užtikrintume, jog šie nuoseklūs sakiniai galėtų veiksmingai išnaudoti kalbos požiūriu nuoseklius santykius. Eksperimentiniai realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkinių rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų AMNRE modelis gerokai viršija naujausius modelius. Šio popieriaus pradinis kodas gali būti gaunamas iš https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'kk': 'Бірнеше тілді қатынасын тарқату мақсатында, әртүрлі тілдерде беймәлім қатынастық факттерді табу үшін. Бар үлгілер әртүрлі тілдерде қатынастық үлгілердің тәуелсіздігін және әртүрлі қатынастық үлгілерін түсіндіре алмайды. Бұл мәселелерді шешу үшін, біз тілдер арасындағы тәуелсіздік және әрбір сөйлеменің тәуелсіздігін қарастыру үшін қарсылық көптілік невраллық қатынасы (AMNRE) үлгісін қолданамыз. Сонымен қатар, бұл тұрақты сөйлемелерді таңдау үшін қарсы оқыту стратегиясын қолданып тұрмыз, тілдердің тұрақты қатынас үлгілерін таңдау үшін. Тынық әлемдегі деректер жиындарының тәжірибелі нәтижелері AMNRE үлгісіміздің орындау үлгілерін өте жақсы көрсетеді. Бұл қағаздың көзі коды https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi hubungan berbilang- bahasa bertujuan untuk mencari fakta hubungan tidak diketahui dari teks dalam berbagai bahasa. Model yang wujud tidak dapat menangkap konsistensi dan pelbagai corak hubungan dalam bahasa yang berbeza. To address these issues, we propose an adversarial multi-lingual neural relation extraction (AMNRE) model, which builds both consistent and individual representations for each sentence to consider the consistency and diversity among languages.  Lagipun, kami menerima strategi latihan lawan untuk memastikan perwakilan kalimat yang konsisten itu dapat mengekstrak corak hubungan konsisten bahasa secara efektif. Keputusan percubaan pada set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa model AMNRE kita jauh melebihi model-model-state-of-the-art. Kod sumber kertas ini boleh dicapai dari https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'mk': 'Мултијазичното извлекување на односи има за цел да најде непознати односни факти од текстот на различни јазици. Existing models cannot well capture the consistency and diversity of relation patterns in different languages.  За да ги решиме овие прашања, предложуваме противнички мултијазичен модел на екстракција на нервните односи (АМНРЕ), кој изградува константни и индивидуални претставувања за секоја реченица за да ја разгледа константноста и различноста меѓу јазиците. Покрај тоа, усвојуваме стратегија за обука на противниците за да се осигури дека овие константни претставувања на речениците би можеле ефикасно да ги извадат јазичките константни шеми на односи. Експерименталните резултати на базите на податоци на реалниот свет покажуваат дека нашиот модел АМНРЕ значително ги надминува најдобрите модели. Изворниот код на оваа хартија може да се добие од https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അപരിചിതമായ ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളിലുള്ള ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ സാധ്യതയും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ രീതികളും പിടിക ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു വിരോധമായ പല ഭാഷകളുടെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഭാഷകളിലെ സഹവും  അതിനുശേഷം, ഈ വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വിരോധമായ പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ട്രെയിക്കേജിറ്റി എടുക്കാന്\u200d പ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ AMNRE മോഡല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട ഈ പത്രത്തിന്റെ ഉറവിട കോഡ് ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'mt': "Multi-lingual relation extraction aims to find unknown relational facts from text in various languages.  Il-mudelli eżistenti ma jistgħux jaqbdu sew il-konsistenza u d-diversità tax-xejriet ta’ relazzjoni f’lingwi differenti. Biex nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet, nipproponu mudell avversarju ta’ estrazzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet newrali multilingwi (AMNRE), li jibni rappreżentazzjonijiet konsistenti kif ukoll individwali għal kull sentenza biex tiġi kkunsidrata l-konsistenza u d-diversità fost il-lingwi. Barra minn hekk, aħna niddottaw strateġija ta' taħriġ avversarju biex niżguraw li dawk ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet konsistenti tas-sentenzi jistgħu effettivament jestraġu xejriet ta' relazzjoni konsistenti mal-lingwa. Ir-riżultati sperimentali fuq settijiet tad-dejta tad-dinja reali juru li l-mudell AMNRE tagħna huwa sinifikattivament ogħla mill-mudelli l-aktar avvanzati. Il-kodiċi tas-sors ta’ din il-karta jista’ jinkiseb minn https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'mn': "Олон хэлний харилцааны хамаарал нь олон хэлний хэл дээр бичигдсэн харилцааны үндсэнийг олох зорилго юм. Existing models can't well capture the consistency and diversity of relations patterns in different languages. Эдгээр асуудлыг олохын тулд бид олон хэл хэлний мэдрэлийн харилцаа (AMNRE) гаргах загварын эсрэг загварын загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь хэлний хоорондын харилцааны байдал болон олон төрлийн төрлийн загварыг бүтээж байдаг. Дараа нь, бид тэр үгийг зөвхөн харилцааны хэлбэртэй холбоотой загварыг эерэг үзүүлэхэд эсрэг дасгал сургалтын стратегийг ашиглаж байна. Дэлхийн бодит өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний AMNRE загвар нь урлагийн төвшин загварыг маш чухал болгож чаддаг. Энэ цаасын эх үүсвэрийн код нь https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'no': 'Fleirspråksrelasjonsekstrahering måtar å finna ukjende relasjonsfaktar frå tekst i ulike språk. Dette eksisterande modeller kan ikkje henta godt konsistens og mangfoldiging av relasjonsmønsteret i ulike språk. For å handtera desse problemene, foreslår vi ein motsetning for kontrarial fleirspråksrelasjon (AMNRE), som bygger både konsistent og individuelle representasjonar for kvar setning for å gjere konsistens og mangfoldighet blant språk. I tillegg kan vi adoptere ein adversarisk treningsstrategi for å sikre at dei konsistente setningane kunne effektivt ekstrahera språk-konsistent relasjonsmønsteret. Den eksperimentelle resultatene på dataset for verkeleg verda viser at vår AMNRE-modell utfører signifikante ut av kunstmodellen. Kjeldekode for denne papiret kan hentast frå https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczna ekstrakcja relacji ma na celu znalezienie nieznanych faktów relacyjnych z tekstu w różnych językach. Istniejące modele nie mogą dobrze uchwycić spójności i różnorodności wzorców relacji w różnych językach. Aby rozwiązać te problemy, proponujemy model wielojęzycznej ekstrakcji relacji neuronowych (AMNRE), który buduje zarówno spójne, jak i indywidualne reprezentacje dla każdego zdania, aby uwzględnić spójność i różnorodność między językami. Ponadto, przyjmujemy strategię szkolenia przeciwnego, aby zapewnić, że spójne reprezentacje zdań mogły skutecznie wyodrębnić wzorce relacji spójnych z językiem. Wyniki eksperymentalne na rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazują, że nasz model AMNRE znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze modele. Kod źródłowy niniejszego artykułu można uzyskać z https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ro': 'Extragerea relațiilor multilingve are ca scop găsirea unor fapte relaționale necunoscute din text în diferite limbi. Modelele existente nu pot surprinde consecvența și diversitatea modelelor de relații în diferite limbi. Pentru a aborda aceste probleme, propunem un model adversar multilingv de extracție a relațiilor neurale (AMNRE), care construiește atât reprezentări coerente, cât și individuale pentru fiecare propoziție pentru a lua în considerare coerența și diversitatea dintre limbi. Mai mult, adoptăm o strategie de formare adversară pentru a ne asigura că aceste reprezentări consecvente ale frazelor ar putea extrage în mod eficient modelele de relație coerente cu limba. Rezultatele experimentale ale seturilor de date din lumea reală demonstrează că modelul nostru AMNRE depășește semnificativ modelele de ultimă generație. Codul sursă al acestei lucrări poate fi obținut de la https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'so': 'Dhaqaalaha xiriirka luuqadaha badan waxaa loola jeedaa in laga helo warqado luuqado kala duduwan. Tusaalada joogtada ah si fiican uma qabsan karo noocyada xiriirka oo kala duduwan luuqado kala duduwan. Si aan u qabsado arimahan, waxaan u soo jeedinnaa qaab ka gees ah soo bixinta xigaanka kala duduwan (AMNRE), kaas oo dhisaya qof kasta oo isku mid ah iyo mid gaar ah si aan ugu fiirsanno isku xirnimo iyo kala duduwan luuqadaha. Sidoo kale waxaynu qaadannaa qoraal waxbarasho ka gees ah si aynu u u xaqiijinno in qofka noocyada la dhigo ay si faa’iido ah uga soo bixi karto qaababka isku xiran ee luqada. arimaha imtixaanka ee danbiyada dunida ee runta ah waxay muujiyaan in qaababkayaga AMNRE si muhiim ah uu u muujiyo qaababka farshaxanka. Kaararka warqaddan waxaa laga heli karaa https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'sv': 'Flerspråkig relation extraktion syftar till att hitta okända relationella fakta från text på olika språk. Befintliga modeller kan inte väl fånga samstämmigheten och mångfalden av relationsmönster på olika språk. För att ta itu med dessa frågor föreslår vi en kontradiktorisk flerspråkig neural relationsextraktion (AMNRE) modell, som bygger både konsekventa och individuella representationer för varje mening för att beakta konsistensen och mångfalden mellan språk. Vidare antar vi en strategi för motpartsträning för att säkerställa att dessa konsekventa meningsrepresentationer effektivt kan extrahera de språkkonsekventa relationsmönstren. Experimentella resultat på verkliga datauppsättningar visar att vår AMNRE-modell avsevärt överträffar de senaste modellerna. Källkoden för detta dokument kan erhållas från https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'sr': 'Mnogo jezičkih odnosa su ciljevi pronaći nepoznate vezne činjenice iz teksta na različitim jezicima. Postojeći modeli ne mogu dobro uhvatiti konsekvenciju i raznolikost obrazaca odnosa na različitim jezicima. Da bi se riješili ovim pitanjima, predlažemo protivni model izvlačenja multijezičkih neuralnih odnosa (AMNRE), koji izgradi i konsekventne i individualne predstave za svaku rečenicu da razmotri konsekvenciju i raznolikost među jezicima. Nadalje, usvojimo strategiju protivnog treninga kako bi se osigurali da bi te konsekventne predstave rečenice mogle efektivno izvući obrazac veze sa jezikom konsekventnom. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima stvarnog sveta pokazuju da naš model AMNRE značajno iznosi modele stanja umjetnosti. Izvorni kod ovog papira se može dobiti od https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් භාෂාත්මක සම්බන්ධතාවක් නිර්මාණය ලක්ෂණය විවිධ භාෂාවක් වලින් අඳුන් සම්බන්ධතාව වෙනස් භාෂාවල් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සහ වෙනස් භාෂාවක් වලින් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් නෑ. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විරෝධ විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ්වාසික විශ තවත්, අපි විරුද්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගන්නවා ඒවා සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට භාෂාව සම්බන් ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ AMNRE මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂ මේ පත්තරේ මූලික කෝඩ් අරගෙන හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ta': 'பல மொழிகளின் தொடர்பு பிரிப்பு தெரியாத தொடர்பு காரணிகளை உரையில் இருந்து கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும். இருக்கும் மாதிரிகள் வேறு மொழிகளில் உள்ள தொடர்பு மாதிரிகளின் மாதிரியையும் பிடிக்க முடியாது. இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் பல மொழிகளின் புதிய உறவு வெளியீடு (AMNRE) மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது மொழிகளில் ஒத்திசையாக மற்றும் தனியார் பி மேலும், நாங்கள் ஒரு எதிர்மறை பயிற்சி துறையை எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறோம் என்று உறுதிப்படுத்தும் வாக்கு பிரதிநிதிகள் மொழியில்  உண்மையில் இருக்கும் உலக தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனையின் முடிவு இந்த காகிதத்தின் மூல குறியீடு இருந்து கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ur': "بہت سی زبان کی نسبت استخراج کا ارادہ ہے کہ متن سے مختلف زبانوں میں ناشناختہ نسبت کی حقیقت تلاش کریں. Existing models can't well capture the consistency and diversity of relation patterns in different languages. ہم ان مسائلوں کے بارے میں ایک مخالف مخالف مخالف زبان کی نسبت کی مخالفت (AMNRE) موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، جو ہر جماعت کے لئے موجود اور مختلف نمونے بناتا ہے تاکہ زبانوں کے درمیان موجودگی اور مختلفیت کی نظر کریں. اور اس کے بعد ہم ایک مخالف تدریس استراتژی کو قبول کرتے ہیں کہ ان مضبوط جماعتوں کو مضبوط طور پر زبان کے ساتھ قابل تعلق الٹراتژی نکالے۔ حقیقی دنیا کے ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارے AMNRE موڈل معلوم ہوتا ہے کہ آرتی موڈل کی حالت سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ کے سراسر کوڈ سے مل سکتا ہے https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác mối quan hệ ngôn ngữ rộng nhằm tìm ra các liên quan chưa rõ bằng văn bản. Các mô hình tồn tại không thể nắm bắt được sự đồng nhất và đa dạng các mô hình liên quan tại các ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Để giải quyết những vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình liên hệ thần kinh đa ngôn ngữ khác nhau (AMROE) tạo ra các biểu hiện liên tục và cá nhân cho mỗi câu để cân nhắc độ đồng nhất và đa dạng ngôn ngữ. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi chọn một chiến lược huấn luyện trái ngược để đảm bảo các mô phỏng tử hình phù hợp có thể thực hiện các mô hình liên hệ ngôn ngữ. Các kết quả thử nghiệm trên các tập tin thực tế cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta vượt trội hơn mẫu thời đại. Mật mã gốc của tờ giấy này có thể lấy từ https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'uz': "Koʻp tillar bogʻlamasini ajratish uchun muloqat tildagi bogʻ'liq faqatlarini boshqa tillardan foydalanish mumkin. Mavjud modellar boshqa tillarda bogʻ'liq tugmalar birikmasini va turli shaklni qabul qilib boʻlmaydi. Bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun biz bir necha tillar neyron aloqalarini ajratish (AMNRE) modelini talab qilamiz. Bu bir so'zni bir xil tildagi bir xil aloqalarni bir xil va har bir xil shaklga representations yaratadi. Ko'rsatganda, biz bu so'zlar davomida ta'lim qoidalarini ishlab chiqarish uchun foydalanish strategiyasini ishlatamiz. Bu so'zlar davomida o'zgarishni tasdiqlash mumkin. Mavjud dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari AMNRE modelimizni juda muhimiy o'zgartiradi. Ushbu qogʻozning manba kodi https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'bg': 'Извличането на многоезични връзки цели да открие неизвестни релационни факти от текста на различни езици. Съществуващите модели не могат да уловят последователността и разнообразието на моделите на взаимоотношения на различните езици. За да се справим с тези въпроси, предлагаме модел на екстракция на многоезична неврална връзка, който изгражда както последователни, така и индивидуални представи за всяко изречение, за да се вземе предвид последователността и разнообразието между езиците. Освен това, ние приемаме стратегия за обучение на конкуренция, за да гарантираме, че тези последователни изображения на изреченията могат ефективно да извлекат моделите на взаимоотношенията, съответстващи на езика. Експерименталните резултати върху набори от данни от реалния свят показват, че нашият модел значително превъзхожда съвременните модели. Изходният код на тази статия може да бъде получен от https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'da': 'Flersproget relation ekstraktion sigter mod at finde ukendte relationelle fakta fra tekst på forskellige sprog. Eksisterende modeller kan ikke godt indfange konsistensen og mangfoldigheden af relationsmønstre på forskellige sprog. For at løse disse problemer foreslår vi en modstandsdygtig flersproget neural relations extraction (AMNRE) model, der bygger både konsekvente og individuelle repræsentationer for hver sætning for at overveje konsistensen og diversiteten mellem sprog. Desuden vedtager vi en modstridende træningsstrategi for at sikre, at disse konsekvente sætningsrepræsentationer effektivt kan udtrække de sprogkonsekvente relationsmønstre. De eksperimentelle resultater på virkelige datasæt viser, at vores AMNRE-model overgår de nyeste modeller betydeligt. Kildekoden til dette papir kan fås fra https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'nl': 'Meertalige relatieontwikkeling heeft tot doel onbekende relationele feiten uit tekst in verschillende talen te vinden. Bestaande modellen kunnen de consistentie en diversiteit van relatiepatronen in verschillende talen niet goed weergeven. Om deze problemen aan te pakken, stellen we een adversarial multilingual neural relation extraction (AMNRE) model voor, dat zowel consistente als individuele representaties voor elke zin bouwt om de consistentie en diversiteit tussen talen te overwegen. Verder hanteren we een tegenstrijdige trainingsstrategie om ervoor te zorgen dat die consistente zinsrepresentaties effectief de taalconsistente relatiepatronen kunnen extraheren. De experimentele resultaten op real-world datasets tonen aan dat ons AMNRE model aanzienlijk beter presteert dan de state-of-the-art modellen. De broncode van dit document is te verkrijgen bij https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'de': 'Mehrsprachige Beziehungsextraktion zielt darauf ab, unbekannte relationale Fakten aus Texten in verschiedenen Sprachen zu finden. Bestehende Modelle können die Konsistenz und Vielfalt von Beziehungsmustern in verschiedenen Sprachen nicht gut erfassen. Um diese Probleme anzugehen, schlagen wir ein adversariales multilingual neural relation extraction (AMNRE) Modell vor, das sowohl konsistente als auch individuelle Repräsentationen für jeden Satz erstellt, um die Konsistenz und Vielfalt der Sprachen zu berücksichtigen. Darüber hinaus verfolgen wir eine kontradische Trainingsstrategie, um sicherzustellen, dass diese konsistenten Satzdarstellungen die sprachkonsistenten Beziehungsmuster effektiv extrahieren können. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse an realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser AMNRE-Modell die aktuellen Modelle deutlich übertrifft. Der Quellcode dieser Arbeit ist abrufbar unter https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ko': '다중 언어 관계 추출은 서로 다른 언어의 텍스트에서 알 수 없는 관계 사실을 발견하는 데 목적을 둔다.기존 모델은 서로 다른 언어에서의 관계 모델의 일치성과 다양성을 잘 포착할 수 없다.이러한 문제점을 해결하기 위해 우리는 언어 간의 일치성과 다양성을 고려하기 위해 문장마다 일치와 단독의 표현을 구축하는 대항적 다언어 신경관계 추출(AMNRE) 모델을 제시했다.그 밖에 우리는 이러한 일치된 문장 표징이 언어 일치성 관계 모델을 효과적으로 추출할 수 있도록 대항적인 훈련 전략을 채택했다.실제 데이터 세트에서의 실험 결과에 따르면 AMNRE 모델은 최첨단 모델보다 훨씬 우수합니다.본문의 원본 코드는https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'fa': 'رابطه\u200cهای زیادی زبان هدف می\u200cگیرد که حقیقت رابطه\u200cای ناشناخته از متن در زبانهای مختلف پیدا کند. مدل\u200cهای موجود نمی\u200cتوانند به خوبی هماهنگی و مختلف الگوهای ارتباطی را در زبانهای مختلف بگیرند. برای حل این مسائل، ما یک مدل مخالف رابطه عصبی چندین زبان (AMNRE) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که هر جمله را نمایش\u200cدهنده\u200cای هماهنگ و شخص ساخته می\u200cکند تا تفاوت و مختلف بین زبان\u200cها را در نظر بگیرد. ما استراتژی آموزش دشمنی را برای مطمئن کردن این نمایش\u200cدهندگان جمله\u200cهای پایدار می\u200cتوانند به طور تاثیر الگوهای ارتباط با زبان\u200cپایدار را خارج کنند. نتایج آزمایشی در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل AMNRE ما مدل\u200cهای هنری را بسیار بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. کد منبع این کاغذ می\u200cتواند از https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'hr': 'Većina jezičkih odnosa se cilja pronaći nepoznate vezne činjenice iz teksta na različitim jezicima. Postojeći modeli ne mogu dobro uhvatiti konsistenciju i raznolikost obrazaca odnosa na različitim jezicima. Za rješavanje tih pitanja predlažemo neprijateljski model izvlačenja multijezičkih neuralnih odnosa (AMNRE), koji izgradi i konsekventne i pojedinačne predstave za svaku rečenicu kako bi razmotrili konsekvenciju i raznolikost među jezicima. Nadalje, usvojimo strategiju protivnog obuke kako bi se osigurali da bi te konsekventne predstave rečenice mogle učinkovito izvući obrazac veze s jezikom konsekventne. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima stvarnog svijeta pokazuju da naš model AMNRE značajno iznosi modele stanja umjetnosti. Izvorni kod ovog papira se može dobiti od https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'sw': 'Utoa wa uhusiano wa lugha nyingi unalenga kutafuta ukweli wa kihusiano kutokea kwa lugha mbalimbali. Mradi wa sasa hauwezi kukubaliana vizuri na utofauti wa mitindo ya mahusiano katika lugha tofauti. Ili kukabiliana na masuala haya, tunapendekeza utoaji wa mahusiano ya lugha mbalimbali (AMNRE), ambayo inajenga wawili na wawakilishi binafsi kwa kila hukumu ili kutafakari umuhimu na utofauti kati ya lugha. Zaidi ya hayo, tunachukua mkakati wa mafunzo ya upinzani ili kuhakikisha wawakilishi hao wa hukumu inayoendelea kunaweza kutengeneza kwa ufanisi mfumo wa mahusiano ya lugha. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye taarifa za dunia halisi yanaonyesha kuwa modeli yetu ya AMNRE inafanya vizuri zaidi ya mifano ya sanaa. Kifungu cha chanzo cha karatasi hiki kinaweza kupatikana kutoka https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe dilli baglaýyşy açmak üçin bilinmedik baglaýyşy faktlary metin dilinden tapmak maksady. Öň bar nusgalar başga dillerde baglaýyş nusgalaryny gowy çekip bilmeýär. Bu meselelerden çözmek üçin, dilleriň arasynda durnuklylyk we näsazlyklaryny düşünmek üçin bir nuwasal çykyş nuwasyny teklip edip bilýäris. Mundan soňra, biz çözümleri diýen sözleri diýen ýagdaýlaryň sözlerini diýen ýagdaýda çykyp biljekdigini garaşmak üçin teňkili eğitim strategiýasyny kabul edýäris. Gerçek dünýäde maglumat düzümlerindeki denetim netijesi AMNRE nusgasymyz möhüm bir şekilde töweregini ýok edip bilýär. Bu kagyzyň çeşme kody alyp biler https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'sq': "Nxitja e marrëdhënieve shumëgjuhësore synon të gjejë fakte të panjohura marrëdhënieve nga teksti në gjuhë të ndryshme. Modelet ekzistuese nuk mund të kapin mirë konsistencën dhe diversitetin e modeleve të marrëdhënieve në gjuhë të ndryshme. Për t'i trajtuar këto çështje, ne propozojmë një model kundërshtar të nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve nervore shumëgjuhësore (AMNRE), i cili ndërton si përfaqësime të konsistenta si dhe individuale për çdo fjalim për të konsideruar konsistencën dhe diversitetin midis gjuhëve. Për më tepër, ne miratojmë një strategji trajnimi kundërshtar për të siguruar që ato përfaqësime të konsistenta të dënimeve mund të nxjerrin efektivisht modelet e marrëdhënieve konsistente me gjuhën. Rezultatet eksperimentale në grupet e të dhënave të botës reale demonstrojnë se modeli ynë AMNRE ekziston në mënyrë të konsiderueshme mbi modelet më të moderne. Kodi burimi i kësaj letre mund të merret nga https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'am': 'የቋንቋ ግንኙነት ግንኙነት የቋንቋ ግንኙነት ማግኘት ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ ሞዴላዎች በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች የግንኙነት ዓይነቶች እና የልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ዓይነቶች በመያዝ አይችሉም። To address these issues, we propose an adversarial multi-lingual neural relation extraction (AMNRE) model, which builds both consistent and individual representations for each sentence to consider the consistency and diversity among languages.  በተጨማሪም፣ እነዚህን የቁጥጥር መልዕክቶች የቋንቋ-ተካታዊ ግንኙነት ሥርዓቶችን እንዲያረጋግጡ በተቃዋሚ ተማሪ strategy እናደርጋለን፡፡ እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታተሮች ላይ የፈተናው ፍሬዎች AMNRE ሞዴል የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት ምሳሌዎችን በሙሉ የሚያሳየው፡፡ የዚህ ገጽ የኩነቶች ጽሑፍ ማግኘት ይችላል https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'hy': 'Բազլեզու հարաբերությունների վերացումը նպատակն է գտնել տարբեր լեզուներում անհայտ հարաբերական փաստեր տեքստից: Գոյություն ունի մոդելներ, որոնք չեն կարող լավ պատկերացնել հարաբերությունների կաղապարների համապատասխանությունը և բազմազանությունը տարբեր լեզուներում: Այս հարցերին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք հակառակ բազլեզու նյարդային հարաբերությունների վերացման (AMNAE) մոդել, որը կառուցում է յուրաքանչյուր նախադասության համար համապատասխան և անհատական ներկայացումներ, որպեսզի հաշվի առնենք լեզուների միջև կատարյալ Ավելին, մենք ընդունում ենք հակառակ ուսուցման ռազմավարություն, որպեսզի ապահովենք, որ այդ համապատասխան նախադասությունների ներկայացումները արդյունավետ կարողանան հանել լեզվի համապատասխան հարաբերությունների կաղապարները: Իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր AMN-ի մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ամենակարևոր մոդելները: Այս թղթի աղբյուր կոդը կարող է ստանալ https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'id': 'Multi-lingual relation extraction aims to find unknown relational facts from text in various languages.  Model yang ada tidak dapat menangkap konsistensi dan diversitas pola hubungan dalam bahasa yang berbeda. Untuk mengatasi isu-isu ini, kami mengusulkan model ekstraksi hubungan saraf multibahasa yang bertentangan (AMNRE), yang membangun representation konsisten dan individu untuk setiap kalimat untuk mempertimbangkan konsistensi dan diversitas di antara bahasa. Selain itu, kami mengadopsi strategi latihan lawan untuk memastikan bahwa represisi kalimat konsisten dapat secara efektif mengekstraksi pola hubungan konsisten bahasa. Hasil percobaan dari dataset dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa model AMNRE kita jauh lebih berharga dari model state-of-the-art. Kode sumber kertas ini dapat diperoleh dari https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'af': "Veelvuldige verwanting uitvoer doel om onbekende verwantende fakte van teks in verskillende tale te vind. Bestaande modelles kan nie goed die konsistensie en diversiteit van verwanting patrone in verskillende tale neem nie. Om hierdie probleme te raak, voorstel ons 'n teenstandaarlike multi-tale neurale verwanting-uittrekking model (AMNRE), wat bybou beide konsistente en individuele voorstellings vir elke seting om die konsistensie en diversiteit onder tale te beskou. Verder, ons aanvaar 'n teëstandige onderwerking strategie om daardie konsistente voorstellings van setigheid te verseker kan effektief die taal-konsistente verhouding patrone uitpak. Die eksperimentale resultate op reël wêreld datastelle vertoon dat ons AMNRE model betekenlik die state-of-the-art model uitvoer. Die bronkode van hierdie papier kan ontvang word van https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'bs': 'Mnogjezički odnos izvlačenje cilja je pronaći nepoznate vezne činjenice iz teksta na različitim jezicima. Postojeći modeli ne mogu dobro uhvatiti konsekvenciju i raznolikost obrazaca odnosa na različitim jezicima. Za rješavanje tih pitanja predlažemo nevjerovatni model izvlačenja multijezičkih neuralnih odnosa (AMNRE), koji izgradi i konsekventne i individualne predstave za svaku rečenicu kako bi razmotrili konsekvenciju i raznolikost među jezicima. Nadalje, usvojimo strategiju protivnog treninga kako bi se osigurali da bi te konsekventne predstave rečenice mogle efektivno izvući obrasce veze sa jezikom u konsekvenciji. Eksperimentalni rezultati na podacima stvarnog svijeta pokazuju da naš model AMNRE značajno iznosi modele stanja umjetnosti. Izvorni kod ovog papira se može dobiti od https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'az': 'Çoxlu dil əlaqəsi çıxarmaq məlumatdan müxtəlif dillərdə bilinməyən əlaqələr tapmaq istəyir. Existing modellər müxtəlif dillərdə ilişkilərin müxtəlifliyini və müxtəlifliyini yaxınlaşdıra bilməz. Bu məsələlərdən çəkinmək üçün, dillərin birləşməsini və çeşitliliğini düşünmək üçün hər cümlənin müəyyən edilməsi və tədriclüyünü təsdiqləməsi üçün müxtəlif çoxlu dilli nöral bağlantı (AMNRE) modeli təklif edirik. Daha sonra, biz müəyyən cümlələrin göstərilmələrinin dili ilə müəyyən bir bağlantı örtüklərini təmin etmək üçün müqayisədə təhsil təhsil stratejisini qəbul edirik. Gerçek dünya verilənlərin təcrübələrinin sonuçları AMNRE modeliyimizin sanat modellərinin vəziyyətini çox yüksək göstərir. Bu kağıdın mənbə kodu alınabilir https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন ভাষায় লেখা থেকে অজানা সম্পর্কের তথ্য খুঁজে বের করার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে। বিদ্যমান মডেল বিভিন্ন ভাষায় সম্পর্কের প্রান্ত ও বৈচিত্র্যের বৈচিত্র্য ধরা যায় না। এই বিষয়গুলোর বিরুদ্ধে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা একটি বিরোধী বহুভাষী নিউরেল সম্পর্ক বের করার প্রস্তাব প্রদান করি, যা ভাষার মধ্যে সংশ্লিষ্ট এবং বৈচিত্র্যময় বিবেচনা করার এছাড়াও, আমরা বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণ কৌশল নিশ্চিত করি যে সমস্ত প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব নিশ্চিত করতে পারি যে ভাষার সাধারণ সম্পর্ বাস্তব বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করে যে আমাদের এমএনআরবি মডেল গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাবে শিল্পের রাষ্ট্রের মডেলে এই কাগজের উৎস কোড থেকে পাওয়া যাবে https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'cs': 'Vícejazyčná extrakce vztahů se zaměřuje na nalezení neznámých relačních faktů z textu v různých jazycích. Stávající modely nemohou dobře zachytit konzistenci a rozmanitost vztahových vzorců v různých jazycích. Pro řešení těchto problémů navrhujeme adversariální vícejazyčný model extrakce neuronových vztahů (AMNRE), který buduje konzistentní i individuální reprezentace pro každou větu, aby zvážil konzistenci a rozmanitost mezi jazyky. Dále přijímáme strategii odborného tréninku, abychom zajistili, že tyto konzistentní reprezentace vět mohou efektivně extrahovat vztahové vzorce konzistentní s jazykem. Experimentální výsledky na reálných datových sadách ukazují, že náš AMNRE model výrazně předčí nejmodernější modely. Zdrojový kód tohoto článku lze získat z https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ca': "Multi-lingual relation extraction aims to find unknown relational facts from text in various languages.  Els models existents no poden capturar bé la consistencia i la diversitat dels patrons de relació en diferents llengües. Per abordar aquests problemes, proposem un model adversari d'extracció de relacions neurals multilingües (AMNRE), que construeix representacions consistents i individuals per cada frase per considerar la consistencia i la diversitat entre les llengües. També adoptem una estratègia d'entrenament adversari per assegurar que aquestes representacions consistents de frases puguin extreure efectivament els patrons de relació compatibles amb el llenguatge. Els resultats experimentals dels conjunts de dades del món real demostren que el nostre model AMNRE supera significativament els models més avançats. El codi fontd'aquest paper es pot obtenir https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'et': 'Mitmekeelse suhete ekstraheerimise eesmärk on leida erinevates keeltes tekstidest tundmatuid suhtelisi fakte. Olemasolevad mudelid ei suuda hästi kajastada erinevates keeltes suhete mustrite järjepidevust ja mitmekesisust. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks pakume välja kontrastaarse mitmekeelse neurosuhte ekstraheerimise mudeli (AMNRE), mis ehitab iga lause jaoks nii järjepidevad kui ka individuaalsed representatsioonid, et arvestada keelte järjepidevust ja mitmekesisust. Lisaks võtame vastu vastastikuse koolituse strateegia, et tagada, et need järjepidevad lausekujutused võiksid tõhusalt välja tõmmata keeleühtsete suhete mustrid. Reaalmaailma andmekogumite eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie AMNRE mudel ületab oluliselt kaasaegseid mudeleid. Käesoleva dokumendi lähtekoodi võib saada aadressilt https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'fi': 'Monikielisen suhdehaudon tavoitteena on löytää tuntemattomia suhdefaktoja tekstistä eri kielillä. Nykyiset mallit eivät voi hyvin kuvata eri kielillä esiintyvien suhdemallien johdonmukaisuutta ja monimuotoisuutta. Näiden kysymysten ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme kontradikaalista monikielistä neurosuhdeekstraktiomallia (AMNRE), joka rakentaa jokaiselle lauseelle sekä johdonmukaisia että yksilöllisiä representaatioita kielten johdonmukaisuuden ja monimuotoisuuden huomioon ottamiseksi. Lisäksi otamme käyttöön kontradiktorisen koulutusstrategian varmistaaksemme, että johdonmukaiset lauseesitykset voisivat tehokkaasti poimia kielen yhdenmukaiset suhdemallit. Kokeelliset tulokset todellisista aineistoista osoittavat, että AMNRE-mallimme suoriutuu merkittävästi huippuluokan malleista. Tämän asiakirjan lähdekoodi on saatavissa osoitteesta: https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Baling Ngawe nggunakake perusahaan iki, kita supoyo akeh modèl multi-languang languang languang tanggal nggawe winih (AM NR), sing nggawe ngubah dhéwé, awak dhéwé nggawe ngupakan sampeyan karo pawaran sing bakal terus nggawe ngupakan languang languang. Lahor, kéné sumungo perbudhakan langgar-sistem sing beraksi kanggo ngerasai winih sing nguasai nggawe sapa-winih sing bisa nguasai nggawe nguasai perusahaan langgar sapa-perusahaan winih. Laptop" and "Desktop Kayin kode nggo mapun punika dipunangé https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'he': 'מחילוץ מערכת יחסים רבות שפות מטרה למצוא עובדות יחסיות לא ידועות מהטקסט בשפות שונות. דוגמנים קיימים לא יכולים לתפוס היטב את התקבלות והמגוון של דפוסי יחסים בשפות שונות. כדי להתמודד עם הנושאים האלה, אנו מציעים מודל ניצול מערכת יחסים עצביים רבות-שפותית (AMNRE), שמבנה גם מייצגים קבועים וגם אישיים לכל משפט כדי לשקול את התקבילות והגיוון בין שפות. חוץ מזה, אנו מאמצים אסטרטגיה אימון יריבי כדי להבטיח שהמייצגים המשפטיים המתואמים האלה יכולים באופן יעיל להוציא את דפוסי היחסים המתואמים לשפה. התוצאות הניסוייות על קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי מראות שמודל AMNRE שלנו יוצא משמעות יותר מהמודלים המיוחדים ביותר. קוד המקור של הנייר הזה ניתן להשיג https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje večjezičnih relacij je namenjeno iskanju neznanih relacijskih dejstev iz besedila v različnih jezikih. Obstoječi modeli ne morejo dobro zajeti doslednosti in raznolikosti vzorcev odnosov v različnih jezikih. Za reševanje teh vprašanj predlagamo kontradicionalni model večjezične nevralne relacije ekstrakcije (AMNRE), ki za vsak stavek gradi konsistentne in individualne reprezentacije, da bi upoštevali doslednost in raznolikost med jeziki. Poleg tega sprejmemo strategijo konkurenčnega usposabljanja, da bi zagotovili, da bi te dosledne predstavitve stavkov učinkovito izvlekle vzorce odnosov, skladne z jezikom. Eksperimentalni rezultati na naborih podatkov v realnem svetu kažejo, da naš model AMNRE bistveno presega najsodobnejše modele. Izvorno kodo tega prispevka je mogoče dobiti na https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.', 'ha': "Extractin haɗi na ɗabi'a cikin harshe na'ura sun yi amfani da in gane gaskiyar da ba'a sani ba daga matsayin cikin wasu harshe. Existing models cannot well capture the consistency and diversity of relation patterns in different languages.  To, dõmin a yi musu magana da waɗannan masu husũma, Munã ƙayyade wata motsi mai ƙiyayya na masu husũma na neural na'urar mulki-lugha (AMNNER), wanda ke samar da su da daidai da kuma maimamori guda dõmin a yi tunãni ga haɗiya da waɗancan cikin lugha. Da haka, muna karɓi wani takwai mai ƙidãya wa'adin aiki da ke tsakanin dõmin mu tabbatar da waɗannan masu wakin maganar da ke daidai su zaɓi tsarin da ke sami cikin harshen. Matarin jarrabai a kan data masu cikin duniya gaske sun nuna cewa misalinmu na AMNNE mai girma yana samar da halin-da-sanar. Kana iya iya sãmun kodi na wannan takardar https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.", 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་འབྲེལ་བའི་འབྲེལ་བ་མང་ཙམ་འབྲེལ་ཀྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་སྣ་ནས་མི་ཤེས་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀ་དངོས་ཡ གནས་ཡོད་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྐད་རིགས་མི་འདྲ་བའི་ཆ་རྣམས་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ་འཛིན་མི་ཐུབ། གནད་དོན་འདི་དག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་དགོས་པ་ནི་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་མཐུན་ནུས་ཀྱི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་རྒྱུ་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཚོར་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་གི་གདོང་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་ལས། སྐད་རིགས་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་འདྲ་བ ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་མང་བའི་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཅིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་AMNRE མ་དབྱིབས་བཀོད་སྟོན་འཆར ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ཐོག་མའི་ཁུངས་ཨང་རྟགས་དེ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ https://github.com/thunlp/AMNRE.'}
{'en': 'Abstract Meaning Representation for Multi-Document Summarization', 'ar': 'تمثيل المعنى المجرد للتلخيص متعدد الوثائق', 'fr': 'Représentation de la signification abstraite pour la synthèse multi-documents', 'pt': 'Representação de significado abstrato para sumarização de vários documentos', 'es': 'Representación del significado abstracto para el resumen de varios documentos', 'hi': 'अमूर्त अर्थ बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के लिए प्रतिनिधित्व', 'ja': 'マルチドキュメント要約の抽象的意味表現', 'zh': '多文档摘要象义', 'ru': 'Абстрактное представление значений для суммирования нескольких документов', 'ga': 'Ionadaíocht Theibí Brí le hAchoimriú Ildhoiciméad', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Περίληψη Σημαίνει Αντιπροσωπεία για Σύνοψη πολλαπλών εγγράφων', 'hu': 'Absztrakt jelentési ábrázolás a többdokumentumos összefoglaláshoz', 'kk': 'Көптеген құжаттар тұжырымдамасының абстракты орташа таңдау', 'lt': 'Abstraktinė reikšmė daugiadokumentavimo santraukoje', 'mk': 'Апстрактна претстава на значење за резентација на мултидокументи', 'it': 'Rappresentazione astratta del significato per la sintesi multi-documento', 'ml': 'അധിക രേഖയുടെ ചുരുക്കത്തിനുള്ള പ്രതിനിധി', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjoni tat-tifsira assoluta għas-Sommarju ta’ Multi-Dokumenti', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Maksud Abstrakt untuk Penapisan Dokumen Berberbilang', 'pl': 'Streszczenie Znaczenie Reprezentacji dla podsumowania wielu dokumentów', 'mn': 'Олон-баримт нийлүүлэлтийн Abstract Meaning Representation', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea abstractă a semnificației pentru rezumarea mai multor documente', 'sr': 'Abstraktna značajna predstava za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta', 'so': 'Kalajarida looga jeedo dhamaystirka dukumentiga badan', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'பல ஆவணத்தின் சுருக்கம்', 'sv': 'Abstrakt betydelserepresentation för sammanfattning av flera dokument', 'ur': 'Multi-Document Summarization کے لئے مطلوب معنی نمایش', 'uz': 'Bir nechta hujjat hisoboti uchun ajratish', 'vi': 'Bộ đại lý tổng hợp kim loại', 'bg': 'Абстрактно представяне на значението за обобщаване на множество документи', 'nl': 'Abstract Betekenis Representatie voor Samenvatting van meerdere documenten', 'da': 'Abstrakt betydning repræsentation for sammenfatning af flere dokumenter', 'hr': 'Abstraktična srednja predstava za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta', 'de': 'Abstract Bedeutungsdarstellung für die Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente', 'id': 'Perwakilan Arti Abstrakt untuk Penapisan Multi-Dokumen', 'ko': '다중 문서 요약의 추상적 의미 표시', 'sw': 'Kuondoa maana ya kuhakikisha kwa ajili ya Ujumuisha wa Sheria nyingi', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Çot-Sened Toplaýyşy üçin Wasp Görkezilişi', 'sq': 'Përfaqësues abstrakt e kuptimit për përmbledhjen e shumë dokumenteve', 'am': 'አዲስ ሰነድ ማጠቃለያ', 'fa': 'Name', 'hy': 'Abstract Meaning Representation for Multi-Document Summarization', 'az': 'Multi-Document Toplaşdırması', 'bn': 'বহু নথি সংক্রান্ত সংক্ষেপের মানে আবশ্যক', 'bs': 'Abstraktična značajna predstava za sažetak višestrukog dokumenta', 'ca': "Representació d'un significat abstract per a una resumensió multidocumental", 'cs': 'Abstrakt Význam reprezentace pro vícedokumentové shrnutí', 'et': 'Mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtte abstraktne tähendus', 'fi': 'Abstrakti merkityksen edustaminen usean asiakirjan yhteenvetoa varten', 'jv': 'Sample rate', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Abstraktna predstavitev pomena za povzetek več dokumentov', 'he': 'מייצג משמעות מוחלטת לסומריזציה של מסמכים רבים', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་མང་བོའི་མཚོན་རྟགས་མཚོན་པ'}
{'en': 'Generating an abstract from a collection of documents is a desirable capability for many real-world applications. However, abstractive approaches to multi-document summarization have not been thoroughly investigated. This paper studies the feasibility of using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), a semantic representation of natural language grounded in linguistic theory, as a form of content representation. Our approach condenses source documents to a set of summary graphs following the AMR formalism. The summary graphs are then transformed to a set of summary sentences in a surface realization step. The framework is fully data-driven and flexible. Each component can be optimized independently using small-scale, in-domain training data. We perform experiments on benchmark summarization datasets and report promising results. We also describe opportunities and challenges for advancing this line of research.', 'es': 'Generar un resumen a partir de una colección de documentos es una capacidad deseable para muchas aplicaciones del mundo real. Sin embargo, los enfoques abstractivos para la sumarización de varios documentos no se han investigado a fondo. Este artículo estudia la viabilidad de utilizar Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), una representación semántica del lenguaje natural basada en la teoría lingüística, como forma de representación de contenido. Nuestro enfoque condensa los documentos fuente en un conjunto de gráficos de resumen siguiendo el formalismo AMR. Los gráficos de resumen se transforman luego en un conjunto de oraciones de resumen en un paso de realización de la superficie. El marco está totalmente basado en datos y es flexible. Cada componente se puede optimizar de forma independiente mediante datos de capacitación en el dominio a pequeña escala. Realizamos experimentos en conjuntos de datos de resumen de referencia e informamos de resultados prometedores. También describimos las oportunidades y los desafíos para avanzar en esta línea de investigación.', 'ar': 'يعد إنشاء ملخص من مجموعة من المستندات قدرة مرغوبة للعديد من تطبيقات العالم الحقيقي. ومع ذلك ، لم يتم التحقيق بدقة في الأساليب التجريدية للتلخيص متعدد الوثائق. تدرس هذه الورقة جدوى استخدام تمثيل المعنى المجرد (AMR) ، وهو تمثيل دلالي للغة الطبيعية يرتكز على النظرية اللغوية ، كشكل من أشكال تمثيل المحتوى. يقوم نهجنا بتكثيف المستندات المصدر إلى مجموعة من الرسوم البيانية الموجزة التي تتبع شكليات مقاومة مضادات الميكروبات. يتم بعد ذلك تحويل الرسوم البيانية الموجزة إلى مجموعة من الجمل الموجزة في خطوة تحقيق السطح. إطار العمل مرن وقائم على البيانات بالكامل. يمكن تحسين كل مكون بشكل مستقل باستخدام بيانات التدريب داخل المجال على نطاق صغير. نجري تجارب على مجموعات بيانات تلخيص معيارية ونبلغ عن نتائج واعدة. وصفنا أيضًا الفرص والتحديات للنهوض بهذا النوع من البحث.', 'fr': "La génération d'un résumé à partir d'une collection de documents est une fonctionnalité souhaitable pour de nombreuses applications du monde réel. Cependant, les approches abstraites de la synthèse multi-documents n'ont pas fait l'objet d'une étude approfondie. Cet article étudie la faisabilité de l'utilisation de la représentation de signification abstraite (AMR), une représentation sémantique du langage naturel fondée sur la théorie linguistique, comme forme de représentation de contenu. Notre approche condense les documents sources en un ensemble de graphiques récapitulatifs suivant le formalisme de la RAM. Les graphiques récapitulatifs sont ensuite transformés en un ensemble de phrases récapitulatives lors d'une étape de réalisation de surface. Le cadre est entièrement piloté par les données et flexible. Chaque composant peut être optimisé indépendamment à l'aide de données de formation internes à petite échelle. Nous réalisons des expériences sur des ensembles de données de synthèse de référence et présentons des résultats prometteurs. Nous décrivons également les opportunités et les défis liés à l'avancement de cette ligne de recherche.", 'pt': 'Gerar um resumo de uma coleção de documentos é um recurso desejável para muitos aplicativos do mundo real. No entanto, abordagens abstratas para sumarização de vários documentos não foram completamente investigadas. Este artigo estuda a viabilidade do uso da Representação Abstrata do Significado (AMR), uma representação semântica da linguagem natural fundamentada na teoria linguística, como forma de representação de conteúdo. Nossa abordagem condensa os documentos de origem em um conjunto de gráficos de resumo seguindo o formalismo AMR. Os gráficos de resumo são então transformados em um conjunto de frases de resumo em uma etapa de realização de superfície. A estrutura é totalmente orientada a dados e flexível. Cada componente pode ser otimizado de forma independente usando dados de treinamento em pequena escala no domínio. Realizamos experimentos em conjuntos de dados de resumo de benchmark e relatamos resultados promissores. Também descrevemos oportunidades e desafios para o avanço dessa linha de pesquisa.', 'ja': 'ドキュメントのコレクションから抽象を生成することは、多くの現実世界のアプリケーションにとって望ましい機能です。しかし、マルチドキュメントの要約に対する抽象的なアプローチは徹底的には調査されていない。本論文では、言語理論に基づく自然言語の意味論的表現である抽象意味表現（ ＡＭＲ ）をコンテンツ表現の一形態として用いることの実現可能性について研究する。私たちのアプローチは、AMR形式主義に従った一連の要約グラフにソースドキュメントを凝縮します。次いで、概要グラフは、表面実現ステップで概要文のセットに変換される。フレームワークは完全にデータ駆動で柔軟です。各コンポーネントは、小規模なドメイン内トレーニングデータを使用して独立して最適化することができます。ベンチマーク要約データセットの実験を行い、有望な結果を報告します。また、この分野の研究を進めるための機会と課題についても説明します。', 'zh': '文档合而成摘要众应用程序之理也。 然多文摘要抽象未得穷勘。 本文研用抽象之义(AMR)以为文可行性,AMR言理之自然语言语义也。 吾法以源文档浓缩为AMR形式主义摘要图。 然后,在外面成步驿中,摘要图将转换为一朋摘要句。 其框架悉以数驱之。 每组件皆可以小域内练数独立优化。 臣等实验基准汇总数据集,并报有期。 我们还述述了这一领机会和挑战。', 'hi': 'दस्तावेजों के संग्रह से एक सार उत्पन्न करना कई वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुप्रयोगों के लिए एक वांछनीय क्षमता है। हालांकि, बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण के लिए अमूर्त दृष्टिकोण की पूरी तरह से जांच नहीं की गई है। यह पेपर अमूर्त अर्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (एएमआर) का उपयोग करने की व्यवहार्यता का अध्ययन करता है, जो भाषाई सिद्धांत में आधारित प्राकृतिक भाषा का एक शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व है, सामग्री प्रतिनिधित्व के एक रूप के रूप में। हमारा दृष्टिकोण एएमआर औपचारिकता के बाद सारांश ग्राफ़ के एक सेट के लिए स्रोत दस्तावेजों को संघनित करता है। सारांश रेखांकन तब एक सतह प्राप्ति चरण में सारांश वाक्यों के एक सेट में परिवर्तित कर रहे हैं। फ्रेमवर्क पूरी तरह से डेटा-संचालित और लचीला है। प्रत्येक घटक को छोटे पैमाने पर, इन-डोमेन प्रशिक्षण डेटा का उपयोग करके स्वतंत्र रूप से अनुकूलित किया जा सकता है। हम बेंचमार्क सारांश डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं और आशाजनक परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं। हम अनुसंधान की इस पंक्ति को आगे बढ़ाने के लिए अवसरों और चुनौतियों का भी वर्णन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Формирование резюме из подборки документов является желательной возможностью для многих реальных приложений. Однако абстрактные подходы к обобщению нескольких документов не были тщательно изучены. В данной работе рассматривается возможность использования абстрактного смыслового представления (АМР), семантического представления естественного языка, основанного на лингвистической теории, в качестве формы представления контента. Наш подход сводит исходные документы к набору сводных графиков в соответствии с формализмом AMR. Затем сводные графики преобразуют в набор сводных предложений на этапе реализации на поверхности. Эта система в полной мере основана на данных и является гибкой. Каждый компонент может быть оптимизирован независимо с использованием небольших, внутридоменных обучающих данных. Мы проводим эксперименты с эталонными суммирующими наборами данных и сообщаем многообещающие результаты. Мы также описываем возможности и проблемы для продвижения этого направления исследований.', 'ga': 'Is acmhainn inmhianaithe é achomaireacht a ghiniúint ó bhailiúchán doiciméad le haghaidh go leor feidhmchlár sa saol fíor. Mar sin féin, ní dhearnadh imscrúdú críochnúil ar chur chuige teibí maidir le hachoimriú ildhoiciméad. Déanann an páipéar seo staidéar ar an bhféidearthacht a bhaineann le Léiriú Brí Teibí (AMR) a úsáid, léiriú shéimeantach ar theanga nádúrtha atá bunaithe ar theoiric teanga, mar chineál ionadaíochta ábhair. Comhdhlúthaíonn ár gcur chuige doiciméid foinse go dtí sraith de ghraif achoimre tar éis foirmiúlacht an AMB. Déantar na graif achoimre ansin a chlaochlú go sraith abairtí achoimre i gcéim réadaithe dromchla. Tá an creat iomlán bunaithe ar shonraí agus solúbtha. Is féidir gach comhpháirt a bharrfheabhsú go neamhspleách ag baint úsáide as sonraí oiliúna ar scála beag san fhearann. Déanaimid turgnaimh ar thacair sonraí achoimrithe tagarmhairc agus tuairiscímid torthaí a bhfuil gealladh fúthu. Déanaimid cur síos freisin ar dheiseanna agus ar dhúshláin chun an líne taighde seo a chur chun cinn.', 'ka': 'დოკუმენტების კოლექციაზე აბსტრაქტის შექმნა უფრო მსოფლიო პროგრამების შესაძლებლობაა. მაგრამ, ბოლოსტრაქტიური პროგრამები მრავალური დოკუმენტის სისუმენტის შესახებ არ იყო სრულად განსხვავებული. ამ დოკუმენტის შესაძლებლობა აბსტრაქტიკური განსაზღვრება (AMR) გამოყენება, სიმენტიკური განსაზღვრება, რომელიც ინდოკუმენტიკური განსაზღვრების ფორმა. ჩვენი პროგორმაცია კონდენსტური დოკუმენტების შესახებ AMR ფორმალიზმის შემდეგ საზოგადომი გრაფიკაში. საზოგადომის გრაფიკები შემდეგ გადატანქრდება საზოგადომის სიმბოლოების ნაწილში. პარამეტრი ყველაფერად მონაცემები და გრძნობელია. ყოველ კომპონენტერი შეიძლება აპტიმიზება განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც პატარა მანქანა, დემომინში განსწავლების მონაცემებით. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ ბენქმარკის კომუზაციაციის მონაცემების შესახებ და გავაკეთებთ გვეუბნებული შესახებ. ჩვენ ასევე აღწერეთ შესაძლებლობები და განსაზღვრებები, რომლებიც ამ შესაძლებლობის წინასწორებაში გავაკეთებთ.', 'hu': 'Számos valós alkalmazás esetében kívánatos lehetőség egy dokumentumgyűjteményből készíteni egy kivonatot. A többdokumentumos összefoglalás absztraktív megközelítéseit azonban nem vizsgálták alaposan. A tanulmány a nyelvelméleti alapokon alapuló természetes nyelv szemantikai reprezentációjának, az Absztrakt Meaning Representation (AMR) használatának megvalósíthatóságát vizsgálja, mint tartalom reprezentációját. Megközelítésünk az AMR formalizmusát követő összefoglaló grafikonokra sűríti a forrásdokumentumokat. Az összefoglaló grafikonokat ezután egy felületi megvalósítási lépésben összefoglaló mondatokká alakítják át. A keretrendszer teljes mértékben adatközpontú és rugalmas. Minden alkatrész önállóan optimalizálható kisméretű, területen belüli képzési adatok segítségével. Kísérleteket végzünk benchmark összefoglaló adatkészletekkel és ígéretes eredményeket jelentünk. Ezen kutatási terület fejlesztésének lehetőségeit és kihívásait is bemutatjuk.', 'lt': 'Dokumentų rinkimo santraukos sukūrimas yra pageidautinas daugelio realaus pasaulio programų gebėjimas. Tačiau abstraktūs daugiadokumentų apibendrinimo metodai nebuvo išsamiai ištirti. Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama galimybė naudoti Abstraktinę reikšmę atstovaujančią (AMR), semantinę gamtos kalbos atstovavimą, pagrįstą kalbos teorija, kaip turinio atstovavimo form ą. Mūsų požiūris sujungia šaltinio dokumentus į suvestinių grafikų rinkinį po AMR formalumo. The summary graphs are then transformed to a set of summary sentences in a surface realization step.  Sistema yra visiškai pagrįsta duomenimis ir lanksti. Kiekvieną komponentą galima optimizuoti nepriklausomai, naudojant mažo masto mokymo srityse duomenis. Eksperimentuojame lyginamųjų santraukų duomenų rinkinius ir pateikiame pažadėtinus rezultatus. Mes taip pat apibūdiname galimybes ir iššūkius tobulinti šią mokslinių tyrimų liniją.', 'mk': 'Generating an abstract from a collection of documents is a desirable capability for many real-world applications.  Сепак, апстрактивните пристапи до мултидокументарната резултатација не се темелно испитани. Овој весник ја проучува физибилитетот на употребата на Апстрактна претстава на значењето (АМР), семантична претстава на природниот јазик основана на јазичната теорија, како форма на претстава на содржината. Нашиот пристап ги кондензира изворните документи во група графики по формализмот на АМР. Графиците се потоа трансформираат во група реченици во чекор на реализација на површината. Рамката е целосно управувана со податоци и флексибилна. Секој компонент може да биде оптимизиран независно користејќи мали податоци за обука во домен. Ние спроведуваме експерименти на сумирање на базите на податоци и известуваме ветувачки резултати. Исто така ги опишуваме можностите и предизвиците за напредок на оваа линија на истражување.', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία μιας περίληψης από μια συλλογή εγγράφων είναι μια επιθυμητή ικανότητα για πολλές εφαρμογές πραγματικού κόσμου. Ωστόσο, οι αφηρημένες προσεγγίσεις για την περίληψη πολλών εγγράφων δεν έχουν διερευνηθεί διεξοδικά. Η παρούσα εργασία μελετά τη σκοπιμότητα της χρήσης της αφηρημένης συμβολικής αναπαράστασης (ΑΜR), μιας σημασιολογικής αναπαράστασης της φυσικής γλώσσας θεμελιωμένης στη γλωσσική θεωρία, ως μορφή αναπαράστασης περιεχομένου. Η προσέγγισή μας συμπυκνώνει τα έγγραφα προέλευσης σε ένα σύνολο συνοπτικών γραφικών που ακολουθούν τον φορμαλισμό της ΑΜR. Τα συνοπτικά γραφήματα στη συνέχεια μετατρέπονται σε ένα σύνολο συνοπτικών προτάσεων σε ένα βήμα υλοποίησης επιφάνειας. Το πλαίσιο βασίζεται πλήρως στα δεδομένα και είναι ευέλικτο. Κάθε συστατικό μπορεί να βελτιστοποιηθεί ανεξάρτητα χρησιμοποιώντας δεδομένα κατάρτισης μικρής κλίμακας. Πραγματοποιούμε πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων σύνοψης αναφοράς και αναφέρουμε πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα. Περιγράφουμε επίσης ευκαιρίες και προκλήσεις για την προώθηση αυτής της γραμμής έρευνας.', 'it': 'Generare un abstract da una raccolta di documenti è una capacità desiderabile per molte applicazioni del mondo reale. Tuttavia, gli approcci astratti alla sintesi multi-documento non sono stati approfonditi. Questo articolo studia la fattibilità di utilizzare Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), una rappresentazione semantica del linguaggio naturale basata sulla teoria linguistica, come forma di rappresentazione dei contenuti. Il nostro approccio condensa i documenti di origine in una serie di grafici riassuntivi seguendo il formalismo AMR. I grafici riassuntivi vengono poi trasformati in un insieme di frasi riassuntive in una fase di realizzazione superficiale. Il quadro è completamente basato sui dati e flessibile. Ogni componente può essere ottimizzato in modo indipendente utilizzando dati di formazione in-domain su piccola scala. Eseguiamo esperimenti su set di dati di sintesi di benchmark e riportiamo risultati promettenti. Descriviamo anche opportunità e sfide per far avanzare questa linea di ricerca.', 'kk': 'Құжаттар жинақтағы абстракты құру - көп әлемді қолданбалар үшін қажетті мүмкіндік. Бірақ, бірнеше құжаттарды жазылуға абстрактивті жағдайлар толық іздеу жоқ. Бұл қағаз Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) қолдану мүмкіндігін зерттейді, лингвистикалық теориясында негізделген табиғи тілдің semantic representation, мазмұның түрі ретінде. Біздің тәсіліміз көзінің құжаттарын AMR формализміне келесі тәсілік графикалық жиынына арналады. Тұжырымдама графиктері, кейін, қараңғы түсініктеме қадамындағы тұжырымдама жиынына аударылады. Бұл бағдарлама толық деректерді басқару және гибкілді. Әрбір компонент кішкентай масштабтағы, доменде оқыту деректерін қолдану арқылы өзгертуге болады. Біз банкмарк тұжырымдастыру деректер жинақтарында тәжірибелерді және мәселелерді туралы хабарлаймыз. Осы зерттеулердің жолын жасау үшін мүмкіндіктерді және мәселелерді таңдап береміз.', 'mt': "Il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ astratt minn ġbir ta’ dokumenti hija kapaċità mixtieqa għal ħafna applikazzjonijiet fid-dinja reali. Madankollu, l-approċċi astratti għas-sommarju ta’ diversi dokumenti ma ġewx investigati bir-reqqa. Dan id-dokument jistudja l-fattibbiltà li tintuża Rappreżentanza tat-Tip Abstrat (AMR), rappreżentanza semantika tal-lingwa naturali bbażata fuq it-teorija lingwistika, bħala forma ta’ rappreżentanza tal-kontenut. L-approċċ tagħna jikkondensa d-dokumenti tas-sors għal sett ta’ grafiċi sommarji wara l-formaliżmu tal-AMR. Il-grafiċi sommarji mbagħad jiġu trasformati f’sett ta’ sentenzi sommarji fi stadju ta’ realizzazzjoni tal-wiċċ. Il-qafas huwa kompletament ibbażat fuq id-dejta u flessibbli. Kull komponent jista’ jiġi ottimizzat indipendentement bl-użu ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ fuq skala żgħira fid-dominju. Għandna nagħmlu esperimenti dwar settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ sommarju ta’ punti ta’ riferiment u nirrappurtaw riżultati promettenti. Aħna niddeskrivu wkoll opportunitajiet u sfidi għall-avvanz ta' din il-linja ta' riċerka.", 'mn': 'Бүтээгдэхүүний цуглуулалтын абстракт үүсгэх нь олон бодит ертөнцийн хэрэглээнд хүсэх чадвар юм. Гэхдээ олон баримт хэвлэхэд abstractive approaches have not been thoroughly investigated. Энэ цаас нь Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), хэлний онол дээр суурилсан байгалийн хэлний semantic representation гэдгийг судладаг. Бидний арга баримт эх үүсвэрийн баримтуудыг АМР-ын официализмын дараа цуглуулсан графиктүүд болгодог. Харин хэмжээний график нь гадаргуу ойлголтын алхам дээр хэмжээний өгүүлбэрүүдийг шилжүүлнэ. Дасгал хөдөлгөөн нь мэдээллийн хөдөлгөөнтэй, урсгал хөдөлгөөнтэй. Бүх компонент нь жижиг хэмжээний сургалтын өгөгдлийг ашиглан хамгийн сайн сайжруулж чадна. Бид банкомарк хэвлэлийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын туршилтыг хийж, амлалтай үр дүнг тайлбарлаж байна. Мөн бид энэ судалгааны хичээлийг хөгжүүлэх боломж болон сорилтуудыг тайлбарладаг.', 'no': 'Oppretting av eit abstrakt frå eit samling av dokument er ein ønsklege kapasitet for mange verdsprogram. Men abstraktive tilnærmingar til samansering av fleire dokument er ikkje undersøkt. Denne papiret studierer feilighet for å bruka abstrakt middelrepresentasjon (AMR), eit semantisk representasjon av naturspråk basert på språk teorien som form av innhaldsrepresentasjon. Tilnærminga vårt condenserer kjeldedokument til eit sett samandragrafikk etter AMR-formalismen. Sammendragrafikkane blir derfor transformerte til eit sett samandrag setningar i eit trekk for overflata. Rammeverket er fullstendig datadrivt og fleksibel. Kvar komponent kan optimaliserast uavhengig med små skala, i domeneopplæringsdata. Vi utfører eksperimenter på sammendragsdata for benchmarken og rapporterer resultatet som foreslår. Vi beskriver også muligheter og utfordringar for å forbedra denne forskningslinja.', 'ml': 'ഒരു രേഖകളുടെ സംഘത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പ്രതിഷ്ഠ സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നത് വളരെ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ആവശ്യമുള്ള എന്നാലും പല രേഖകളുടെ സംഖ്യാനത്തിലേക്ക് ഒഴിഞ്ഞുപോകുന്ന സാഹചര്യങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിച്ചിട്ടില്ല. This paper studies the feasibility of using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), a semantic representation of natural language grounded in linguistic theory, as a form of content representation.  AMR ഫോര്\u200dമിലിസ്റ്റം പിന്നാലെ ഒരു കൂട്ടം ചുരുക്കിയ ഗ്രാഫുകളിലേക്ക് നമ്മുടെ അടുത്തുള്ള കോണ്\u200dഡന്\u200d പിന്നീട് ചുരുക്കം ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകള്\u200d മാറ്റിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഫൈസ്റ്റ് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന ഒരു കൂട്ടം വാക ഫ്രെയിമ്പിന്റെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും ഡേറ്റാ ഓടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഫ്രെയ എല്ലാ ഘടകം സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന് സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയാക നമ്മള്\u200d ബെന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കിന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കിന്\u200dറെ ചുരുക്കം ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പ ഈ പഠനത്തിന്റെ വരിയില്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നതിനുള്ള അവസരങ്ങളും വ്യാലോചനങ്ങളും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന', 'pl': 'Generowanie abstrakcji z kolekcji dokumentów jest pożądaną możliwością dla wielu aplikacji w świecie rzeczywistym. Abstrakcyjne podejście do podsumowania wielu dokumentów nie zostało jednak dokładnie zbadane. W artykule badano możliwość wykorzystania Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), semantycznej reprezentacji języka naturalnego opartej na teorii językowej, jako formy reprezentacji treści. Nasze podejście skupia dokumenty źródłowe do zestawu wykresów podsumowujących zgodnie z formalizmem AMR. Wykresy podsumowujące są następnie przekształcane w zestaw zdań podsumowujących w etapie realizacji powierzchni. Ramy te są w pełni oparte na danych i elastyczne. Każdy komponent może być zoptymalizowany niezależnie przy użyciu małych danych treningowych w domenie. Przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na zbiorach danych podsumowujących benchmarki i raportujemy obiecujące wyniki. Opisujemy również możliwości i wyzwania związane z rozwojem tej linii badań.', 'ro': 'Generarea unui rezumat dintr-o colecție de documente este o capacitate de dorit pentru multe aplicații din lumea reală. Cu toate acestea, abordările abstractive ale rezumatului multi-document nu au fost investigate în detaliu. Lucrarea studiază fezabilitatea utilizării reprezentării semnificației abstracte (AMR), o reprezentare semantică a limbajului natural bazată pe teoria lingvistică, ca formă de reprezentare a conținutului. Abordarea noastră condensatează documentele sursă într-un set de grafice rezumate după formalismul AMR. Graficele de rezumat sunt apoi transformate într-un set de propoziții de rezumat într-un pas de realizare a suprafeței. Cadrul este pe deplin bazat pe date și flexibil. Fiecare componentă poate fi optimizată independent folosind date de instruire la scară mică, în domeniu. Efectuăm experimente pe seturi de date de sinteză de referință și raportăm rezultate promițătoare. De asemenea, descriem oportunitățile și provocările pentru avansarea acestei linii de cercetare.', 'si': 'ලොකුණු සංග්රහනයෙන් නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ඇත්ත ලෝක යුද්ධාවක් වෙනු නමුත්, විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂ වෙනුවෙන් අවස්ථානය කරන්නේ නැහැ. මේ පැත්තේ අභ්\u200dයාස්ත්\u200dරක්ෂිත භාෂාව භාවිතා කරන්න පුළුවන් අභ්\u200dයාස කරනවා, භාෂාවික භාෂාව භාවිතාවේ සැමැන්තික භ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය ඇම්රි සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පස්සේ මුළු ලිපින්තුවක් සම්බන්ධ විදියට පස්සේ. සම්පර්ණ ග්\u200dරාෆික්ස් පස්සේ සුම්පර්ණ වාක්ෂාවක් සම්පර්ණ වාක්ෂාවක් වෙනුවෙන්. ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම දත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න හා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්. හැම අංකයෙක්ම පොඩි ප්\u200dරමාණය, ඩොමේන් ප්\u200dරේෂණය දත්ත භාවිතා විසින් ස්වභාවිත විශේෂ කරන් අපි බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් සාමාර්ක්ෂිත දත්ත සේට් වල පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා සහ පොරොන්දු වාර්තාවීමේ ප්\u200d අපි ඒවගේම අවස්ථාවක් සහ අවස්ථාවක් විස්තර කරනවා මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න.', 'so': 'Ka sameynta qalabka dukumentiyada waa awood aad u baahan tahay codsiyada caalamka badan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa loo baaraandegay qaabilaad diidmo ah oo loo soo qoray warqada warqadaha badan. Qoraalkan ayaa ka baran kara suurtagalka isticmaalka Abstract (AMR), kaas oo ah mid ka mid ah wakiilka afka asalka ah oo lagu dhigay fikrada luuqada, sida foom u eg macluumaadka. Dhaqdhaqaalahayagu waxay soo bandhigtaa dukumentiyada oo lagu qoray sawirada soo dhaw ee AMR-ka soo raaca. Jardiinooyinka dhamaadka waxaa lagu beddeli karaa qeybo dhowr ah oo lagu soo bandhigi karo baaritaanka dhulka. Shaqoyinku waa mid si buuxda ah u isticmaalaya macluumaad iyo fudud. Qayb kasta waxaa si xor ah loola isticmaali karaa macluumaadka waxbarashada gudaha. Waxaannu sameynaa imtixaan ku saabsan taariikhda summarinta ee benchmark, waxaana wargelinaynaa arimaha lagu ballanqaaday. Sidoo kale waxaynu u sheegnaa fursado iyo dhibaatooyin horumarinta wadanka waxbarashada.', 'sr': 'Generacija abstrakta iz kolekcije dokumenta je poželjna sposobnost za mnoge aplikacije stvarnog svijeta. Međutim, apstraktivni pristupi sažetaciji multidokumenta nisu potpuno istraženi. Ovaj papir proučava mogućnost korištenja Abstrakta značajnog predstavljanja (AMR), semantičkog predstavljanja prirodnog jezika temeljenog na jezičkoj teoriji, kao oblik zastupanja sadržaja. Naš pristup kondenzira izvorne dokumente za skup sažetnih grafika nakon AMR formalizma. Sažetke grafike se onda pretvaraju u skup sažetnih rečenica u koraku površine realizacije. Okvir je potpuno podaci vodljen i fleksibilan. Svaki komponent se može optimizirati nezavisno koristeći podatke o obuci u domenu. Izvedemo eksperimente na sažetke podataka i prijavimo obećavajuće rezultate. Takođe opisujemo mogućnosti i izazove za unapređenje ove linije istraživanja.', 'ta': 'ஆவணங்களின் தொகுப்பிலிருந்து வெளியீட்டை உருவாக்குதல் பல உண்மையான- உலக பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு தேவையான ஆற்றல். ஆயினும், பல ஆவணத்தின் சுருக்கத்திற்கு ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட அணுகல்கள் முழுமையாக ஆராய்ச்சிக்கப்படவில்லை. இந்த தாள் மொழி திட்டத்தில் உள்ளடக்கத்தின் வடிவமாக பாதிக்கப்பட்ட இயல்பான மொழி குறிப்பிடப்பட்டுள்ளது, மொழி திட்டத்தில் உள்ளடக்கத்தின் குற AMR வடிவமைப்பை பின்பற்றி ஒரு சுருக்க வரைபடங்களுக்கு எங்கள் அணுகல் மூலம் ஆவணங்களை காண்பிக்கிறது. சுருக்க வரைப்படங்கள் பின்னர் ஒரு சுருக்கமான வாக்கியங்களுக்கு மாற்றப்படும் சட்டத்தின் முழுவதும் தரவு இயக்கி மற்றும் flexible. ஒவ்வொரு பொருளும் சிறிய அளவுக்கு, டொமைன் பயிற்சி தரவை பயன்படுத்தி தனிப்பயனாக மேம்படுத்தலாம். நாங்கள் பெங்க்மார்க் சுருக்கம் தரவுத்தளங்கள் மீது சோதனைகளை செய்து மற்றும் வாக்களிக்கும் முட நாம் இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியின் வரியை மேம்படுத்த வாய்ப்புகளையும் சவால்களையும் விவரிக்கிறோம்.', 'ms': 'Menjana abstrak dari koleksi dokumen adalah kemampuan yang diperlukan untuk banyak aplikasi dunia nyata. However, abstractive approaches to multi-document summarization have not been thoroughly investigated.  Kertas ini mempelajari kemungkinan menggunakan Perwakilan Maksud Abstrakt (AMR), perwakilan semantik bahasa alami berdasarkan teori bahasa, sebagai bentuk perwakilan kandungan. pendekatan kami mengumpulkan dokumen sumber ke set graf ringkasan mengikut formalisme AMR. Graf ringkasan kemudian diubah ke set kalimat ringkasan dalam langkah penyelesaian permukaan. The framework is fully data-driven and flexible.  Setiap komponen boleh optimasi secara bebas menggunakan data latihan dalam domain skala kecil. Kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data penghuraian tanda rujukan dan laporkan hasil yang berjanji. Kami juga menggambarkan peluang dan cabaran untuk melangkah garis penyelidikan ini.', 'ur': 'دفتروں کی مجموعہ سے ایک غلطی پیدا کرنا بہت سی حقیقی دنیا کے کاروباروں کے لئے ضروری کا قابلیت ہے. However, abstractive approaches to multi-document summarization are not thoroughly investigated. This paper studies the feasibility of using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), a semantic representation of natural language based on linguistic theory, as a form of content representation. ہمارا طریقہ AMR فرمولیسم کے پیچھے سراسر دفتروں کو ایک سراسر گراف کے ساتھ کنڈنس کرتا ہے. سطح کی تصدیق کے سطح میں ایک جمع جمع جمع جمع کرنے کے لئے تبدیل کئے جاتے ہیں. چوکاٹ پوری دکھائی ہوئی اور مہربانی ہے۔ ہر قسمت کو چھوٹی اسکیل کے مطابق، ڈومین کی ترکینس ڈیٹ کے مطابق اچھی ترکینس کر سکتا ہے. ہم بنچم مارک ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور وعدہ کے نتائج راپورت کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے اس طرح تحقیقات کی آگے بڑھنے کے لئے فرصت اور چالیں بیان کرتے ہیں.', 'sv': 'Att generera ett abstract från en samling dokument är en önskvärd förmåga för många verkliga applikationer. Abstrakta tillvägagångssätt för sammanfattning av flera dokument har dock inte undersökts grundligt. Denna uppsats studerar genomförbarheten av att använda Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), en semantisk representation av naturligt språk grundad i språkteori, som en form av innehållsrepresentation. Vårt tillvägagångssätt kondenserar källdokument till en uppsättning sammanfattande diagram efter AMR formalism. Sammanfattningsgraferna omvandlas sedan till en uppsättning sammanfattande meningar i ett ytförverkligande steg. Ramverket är fullt datadrivet och flexibelt. Varje komponent kan optimeras självständigt med hjälp av småskaliga träningsdata inom domänen. Vi utför experiment på benchmark summering dataset och rapporterar lovande resultat. Vi beskriver också möjligheter och utmaningar för att driva denna forskningslinje framåt.', 'uz': "@ info However, abstractive approaches to multi-document summarization have not been thoroughly investigated.  Bu qogʻoz & # 160; o'zgarishni AMR (AMR) ishlatish imkoniyatini o'rganish mumkin. Bu qogʻoz tilni tillar teoriga qo'yilgan semantik taʼminlovchisi, maʼlumot tashkilotlari sifatida. Bizning qismimiz AMR formatlaridan keyin kichik grafiklarga bogʻ'liq hujjatlarni yaratadi. Name Freym butun maʼlumot bajarildi va fleksiblik. @ info: whatsthis Biz benchmark tahrirlash maʼlumotlarini bajaramiz va kutilgan natijalarni xabar qilamiz. Biz bu taʼminlovchi tarmoqni tahlil qilish uchun imkoniyatlarni va rivojlanishimiz.", 'vi': 'Tạo ra một trừu tượng từ một bộ sưu tập tài liệu là khả năng đáng mong đợi cho nhiều ứng dụng thế giới thực. Tuy nhiên, thuật to án về tổng hợp tài liệu chưa được nghiên cứu kỹ. Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu khả năng sử dụng "Abstract meaning Representation (AMR), một sự mô tả ngữ pháp của ngôn ngữ tự nhiên dựa trên kiến thức ngôn ngữ, như một hình thức đại diện nội dung. Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi cô tụ tập các tài liệu gốc thành một tập biểu đồ tổng hợp theo chính thức AMR. Các biểu đồ tổng hợp sau đó được biến thành một chuỗi các câu tóm tắt trong một bước phát hiện bề mặt. Khung cảnh này hoàn toàn dựa trên dữ liệu và linh hoạt. Mỗi thành phần có thể được tối ưu độc bằng dữ liệu huấn luyện nội bộ nhỏ. Chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm về các nhà mô phỏng tiêu chuẩn và báo cáo kết quả hứa hẹn. Chúng tôi cũng mô tả cơ hội và thử thách để tiến hành nghiên cứu này.', 'da': 'Generering af et abstrakt fra en samling af dokumenter er en ønskelig evne til mange virkelige applikationer. Abstraktive tilgange til opsummering af flere dokumenter er imidlertid ikke blevet grundigt undersøgt. Denne artikel undersøger muligheden for at bruge Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), en semantisk repræsentation af naturligt sprog baseret på sprogteori, som en form for indholdsrepræsentation. Vores tilgang kondenserer kildedokumenter til et sæt sammenfattende grafer efter AMR formalisme. De sammenfattende grafer omdannes derefter til et sæt sammenfattende sætninger i et overfladebehandlingstrin. Rammerne er fuldt ud datadrevet og fleksibel. Hver komponent kan optimeres uafhængigt af hinanden ved hjælp af små træningsdata. Vi udfører eksperimenter med benchmark resumé datasæt og rapporterer lovende resultater. Vi beskriver også muligheder og udfordringer for at fremme denne forskningslinje.', 'nl': 'Het genereren van een abstract uit een verzameling documenten is een wenselijke mogelijkheid voor veel toepassingen in de praktijk. Abstractieve benaderingen van multi-document samenvatting zijn echter niet grondig onderzocht. Deze paper onderzoekt de haalbaarheid van het gebruik van Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), een semantische representatie van natuurlijke taal gebaseerd op linguïstische theorie, als vorm van inhoudelijke representatie. Onze aanpak comprimeert brondocumenten tot een reeks samenvattingsgrafieken volgens het AMR-formalisme. De samenvattingsgrafieken worden vervolgens getransformeerd in een reeks samenvattingszinnen in een oppervlakterealisatiestap. Het kader is volledig datagedreven en flexibel. Elk onderdeel kan onafhankelijk worden geoptimaliseerd met behulp van kleinschalige, in-domain trainingsgegevens. We voeren experimenten uit op benchmark samenvattingsdatasets en rapporteren veelbelovende resultaten. We beschrijven ook kansen en uitdagingen om deze onderzoekslijn verder te ontwikkelen.', 'bg': 'Генерирането на резюме от колекция от документи е желана възможност за много приложения от реалния свят. Абстрактните подходи за обобщаване на множество документи обаче не са подробно проучени. Настоящата статия изследва възможността за използване на семантично представяне на естествения език, основано на лингвистичната теория, като форма на представяне на съдържанието. Нашият подход обобщава изходните документи в набор от обобщени графики, следвайки формализма на АМР. След това обобщените графики се трансформират в набор от обобщени изречения в стъпка на реализация на повърхността. Рамката е изцяло ориентирана към данните и гъвкава. Всеки компонент може да бъде оптимизиран самостоятелно, като се използват малки данни за обучение в областта. Извършваме експерименти с набори от данни за обобщаване на показатели и докладваме обещаващи резултати. Също така описваме възможностите и предизвикателствата за напредъка на тази линия на изследвания.', 'id': 'Membuat abstrak dari koleksi dokumen adalah kemampuan yang diinginkan untuk banyak aplikasi dunia nyata. Namun, pendekatan abstraktif untuk penglihatan multi-dokumen belum menyelidiki dengan teliti. Kertas ini mempelajari feasibilitas menggunakan Perwakilan Arti Abstrakt (AMR), sebuah perwakilan semantis bahasa alam berdasarkan teori bahasa, sebagai bentuk perwakilan konten. pendekatan kami mengumpulkan dokumen sumber ke set grafik ringkasan mengikuti formalisme AMR. Graf ringkasan kemudian diubah ke set kalimat ringkasan dalam langkah realizasi permukaan. Rambutnya sepenuhnya didorong data dan fleksibel. Each component can be optimized independently using small-scale, in-domain training data.  Kami melakukan eksperimen pada benchmark ringkasan dataset dan melaporkan hasil yang berjanji. We also describe opportunities and challenges for advancing this line of research.', 'hr': 'Generiranje apstrakta iz kolekcije dokumenta je željna sposobnost za mnoge primjene stvarnog svijeta. Međutim, apstraktivni pristupi sažetku višestrukog dokumenta nisu temeljno istraženi. Ovaj papir ispitiva mogućnost upotrebe Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), semantičke predstave prirodnog jezika temeljene na jezičkoj teoriji, kao oblik zastupanja sadržaja. Naš pristup predstavlja izvorne dokumente skupu sažetnih grafika nakon AMR formalizma. Sažetke grafike se onda pretvaraju u skup sažetnih rečenica u koraku površine realizacije. Okvir je potpuno podacima vodljen i fleksibilan. Svaki komponent se može optimizirati neovisno koristeći podatke o obuci u domenu. Izvršimo eksperimente na sažetke podataka o kriteriji i prijavimo obećavajuće rezultate. Također opisujemo mogućnosti i izazove za unapređenje ove linije istraživanja.', 'de': 'Das Generieren eines Abstracts aus einer Sammlung von Dokumenten ist eine wünschenswerte Fähigkeit für viele reale Anwendungen. Abstraktive Ansätze zur Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente wurden jedoch nicht gründlich untersucht. Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), eine semantische Repräsentation natürlicher Sprache, die auf der linguistischen Theorie basiert, als Form der inhaltlichen Repräsentation untersucht werden kann. Unser Ansatz verdichtet Quelldokumente zu einer Reihe von zusammenfassenden Graphen, die dem AMR-Formalismus folgen. Die zusammenfassenden Graphen werden dann in einem Oberflächenrealisierungsschritt in eine Reihe von zusammenfassenden Sätzen umgewandelt. Das Framework ist vollständig datengetrieben und flexibel. Jede Komponente kann unabhängig voneinander mit kleinen In-Domain-Trainingsdaten optimiert werden. Wir führen Experimente an Benchmark-Zusammenfassungsdatensätzen durch und berichten vielversprechende Ergebnisse. Wir beschreiben auch Chancen und Herausforderungen für die Weiterentwicklung dieser Forschungsrichtung.', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza kujitenga kutoka kwenye mkusanyiko wa nyaraka ni uwezo wa kutaka kwa matumizi mengi ya dunia halisi. Hata hivyo, mbinu za kujitenga za muhtasari wa nyaraka mbalimbali hazijafunguzwa vizuri. Makala hii inasoma uwezekano wa kutumia Ubaguzi wa Kumaanisha Representation (AMR), muwakilishaji wa sekunde wa lugha asili ulioanzishwa katika nadharia ya lugha, kama namna ya uwakilishi wa maudhui. Our approach condenses source documents to a set of summary graphs following the AMR formalism.  Takwimu za muhtasari baadae zinabadilishwa na seti ya muhtasari katika hatua ya kuelewa juu. Mfumo huu unaendeshwa na taarifa na yenye ujasiri. Kila kifaa kinaweza kuboreshwa huru kwa kutumia takwimu ndogo, katika mafunzo ya ndani. Tunafanya majaribio kuhusu taarifa za muhtasari za benchmark na kuripoti matokeo yanayoahidi. Pia tunaelezea fursa na changamoto za kukuza mstari huu wa utafiti.', 'ko': '많은 실제 응용 프로그램에 있어 문서 집합에서 요약을 생성하는 것은 이상적인 기능이다.그러나 다중 문서 요약의 추상적인 방법은 아직 철저한 연구를 받지 못했다.본고는 언어학 이론을 바탕으로 하는 자연 언어의 의미 표징인 추상적 의미 표징(AMR)이 내용 표징 형식으로서의 타당성을 연구했다.EMC의 접근 방식은 AMR 형식에 따라 소스 문서를 요약 정보 세트로 압축합니다.그리고 표면 실현 단계에서 요약도를 요약 문장으로 변환한다.이 프레임워크는 완전히 데이터로 구동되고 매우 유연하다.모든 구성 요소는 소규모 역내 훈련 데이터를 사용하여 독립적으로 최적화할 수 있다.우리는 기준 집합 데이터 집합에서 실험을 진행하고 희망적인 결과를 보고했다.우리는 또한 이 연구 분야를 추진하는 기회와 도전을 묘사했다.', 'tr': 'Senedler toplamakdan abstrakt döredilmek birnäçe dünýä uygulamalar üçin isleýän bir ukypdyr. Ýöne, birnäçe sened jemgyýeti üçin abstraktiw golaýlary doly barlanmady. Bu kagyz Abstrakt meýdançasyny (AMR) ulanmak mümkinçiligini öwredýär, tebigat dilinde lingwistiki teoriýada ýerleşýän semantik dillerini meýdançalar hökmünde bellenilýär. Biziň ýaryşymyz AMR formalismine görä çeşme senedi sumy grafiklere süýtgedýär. Sonra nişan grafikler surat çykarma adında hili cümleler üýtgediler. Bu çerçew doly maglumat sürüjili we fleksibildir. Her komponent kiçijek ölçekli, domenyda öwrenme maglumaty ullanyp biler. Biz benchmark hasaplanjak datajylary üzerinde deneyler çykarýarys we söz berýän netijelere bildirip görkez. Biz hem bu ýoly barlamak üçin mümkinçilik we kynçylyklary tassykladyrys.', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i një abstrakti nga një koleksion dokumentesh është një aftësi e dëshirueshme për shumë aplikime të botës reale. Megjithatë, qasjet abstraktive për përmbledhjen e shumë dokumenteve nuk janë hetuar në mënyrë të hollësishme. This paper studies the feasibility of using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), a semantic representation of natural language grounded in linguistic theory, as a form of content representation.  Përqasja jonë kondenzon dokumentet e burimit në një sërë grafikësh të përmbledhur pas formalizmit të AMR. The summary graphs are then transformed to a set of summary sentences in a surface realization step.  Korniza është krejtësisht e drejtuar nga të dhënat dhe fleksibel. Çdo komponent mund të optimizohet në mënyrë të pavarur duke përdorur të dhëna të treinimit në shkallë të vogël në domeni. Ne bëjmë eksperimente në përmbledhjen e të dhënave të përmbledhjes dhe raportojmë rezultate premtuese. Ne përshkruajmë gjithashtu mundësitë dhe sfidat për përparimin e kësaj linje kërkimi.', 'hy': 'Փաստագրերի հավաքածուց վերացական ստեղծելը շատ իրական աշխարհի ծրագրերի համար ցանկալի հնարավորություն է: Այնուամենայնիվ, բազմաթղթերի համառոտագրման վերացրատիվ մոտեցումները հիմնականում չեն ուսումնասիրել: Այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է, թե արդյոք կարելի է օգտագործել Աբստրակտ նշանակության ներկայացումը (AMR), բնական լեզվի սեմանտիկ ներկայացումը, հիմնված լեզվաբանական տեսության վրա, որպես պարունակության ներկայացումը: Մեր մոտեցումը կոնդենսացնում է աղբյուրների փաստաթղթերը ամփոփման գրաֆիկների մի շարք, որոնք հետևում են ԱՄՌ ֆորմալիզմին: The summary graphs are then transformed to a set of summary sentences in a surface realization step.  Համակարգը ամբողջովին հիմնված է տվյալների վրա և ճկուն է: Յուրաքանչյուր բաղադրիչ կարող է օպտիմացվել անկախ օգտագործելով փոքր մակարդակի, բնագավառներում ուսուցման տվյալներ: Մենք կատարում ենք փորձեր համեմատական համառոտագրման տվյալների համակարգերի վրա և հայտարարում ենք խոստացող արդյունքներ: Մենք նաև նկարագրում ենք ուսումնասիրության այս գծի զարգացման հնարավորությունները և մարտահրավերները:', 'am': 'የሰነድ አካባቢዎች ማሰብሰብ ውጤት መፍጠር ለብዙ እውነተኛ ዓለም ፕሮግራሞች የሚችል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የብዙዎች የሰነድ አቅራቢያ ተሟጋቾች በሙሉ አልተመረመርም፡፡ ይህ ሕገጽ የቋንቋዊ ታሪክ ታሪክ፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ አካባቢ አፍሪካዊ አካባቢ (AMR) በመጠቀም የሚችለውን ማሰናከል ያስተምራል፡፡ የአሜሪካ ፎርማሊም ተከትሎ የአሜሪካ ፎርማሌ በተለየ የአጠቃሚ ቀለሞች ሰነድ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ማጠቃለያው ግንኙነት በጥያቄ አቀማሚ ቃላት እንዲለውጥ ነው፡፡ የፍሬም መክፈት ሙሉ ዳታ-የሚነዳ እና ማፍሰስ ነው። ሁሉም ሰንሰነዱ ታናሽ-ስፋን፣ የዶሜን ትምህርት ዳታ በመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ የbenchmark አቀማመጥ ዳታዎችን እናደርጋለን እና የተስፋ ፍሬዎችን እናስታውሳለን፡፡ እንደዚህ የርዕክት ግንኙነት ለመሻለል የሚችሉትን መፍታት እና ድጋፍ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'af': "Name Maar abstraktiewe toegang tot multi-dokument opsomming is nie gedruk ondersoek nie. Hierdie papier studeer die feilikheid van gebruik van Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), â\x80\x99n semantiese voorstelling van natuurlike taal gegrond in lingvisiese teoriee, as â\x80\x99n vorm van inhoud voorstelling. Ons toegang verkondenseer bron dokumente na 'n stel opsomming grafieke volgens die AMR formalisme. Die opsomming grafieke word dan transformeer na 'n stel opsomming setings in' n oorspronklike realisasie stap. Die raamwerk is volledig data-gedryf en fleksibel. Elke komponent kan onveilig optimaliseer word deur die gebruik van klein-skaal, in-domein onderwerking data. Ons uitvoer eksperimente op benchmark opsomming datastelle en rapporteer beloftende resultate. Ons beskrywe ook moontlikhede en uitdagings om hierdie lyn van ondersoek te voorskryf.", 'az': 'Bütün belələr koleksiyonundan abstrakt yaratmaq çoxlu həqiqət dünya proqramları üçün istəyən bir qabiliyyətdir. Ancaq çoxlu belədi təmizlənməyə abstraktiv tərzlərin tamamilə təhsil edilmədi. Bu kağıt Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), dil teoriyasında yerləşdirilmiş doğal dillərin semantik ifadə edilməsini təhsil edir. Bizim yaxınlığımız, AMR formalismindən sonra mənbə dökümətlərini qeyd edir. Qısqa grafikləri bir yerə gəlmə adımı içində toplam cümlələrə dəyişdiriləcəkdir. Çerçive tamamilə verilən və fleksibildir. Hər komponent kiçik ölçüdə, domain təhsil məlumatlarını istifadə edərək optimizlənir. Biz benchmark summarization veri qurularında təcrübələr edirik və vəd verilən sonuçları raport edirik. Biz də bu araştırma səviyyəsini artırmaq üçün fırsatları və çətinlikləri təsbit edirik.', 'fa': 'ایجاد کردن یک مطلق از جمع کردن سند یک توانایی بسیاری از کاربردهای دنیای واقعی است. با این حال، به طور کامل تحقیق نکرده\u200cاند. این کاغذ فعالیت استفاده از معنی Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR) را مطالعه می\u200cکند، یک نمایش semantic از زبان طبیعی که در نظریه زبان\u200cشناسی بنیاد می\u200cشود، به عنوان شکل نمایش محتویات. دستور ما مدارک منبع را به مجموعه\u200cی گرافیک جمع می\u200cکند که بعد از رسمی آمریکا آمریکا است. گرافیک\u200cهای جمعیت بعدش به مجموعه\u200cی جمعیت در یک قدم فهمیدن سطح تبدیل می\u200cشوند. چهارچوب کاملاً با اطلاعات راهنمایی و قابل flexibility است. هر بخش می\u200cتواند با استفاده از مقیاس کوچک، اطلاعات آموزش دامنی به طور مستقل بهترین سازی شود. ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی مجموعه\u200cهای جمع کردن داده\u200cهای صندوق انجام می\u200cدهیم و نتایج قول\u200cدهنده را گزارش می\u200cدهیم. ما همچنین فرصت\u200cها و چالش\u200cها را برای پیشرفت این خط تحقیقات توصیف می\u200cکنیم.', 'bn': 'ডকুমেন্টের সংগ্রহ থেকে একটি অস্বীকৃতি তৈরি করা হচ্ছে অনেক বাস্তবতা পৃথিবীর অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য। তবে অনেক ডকুমেন্টের সারসংক্ষেপের কাছে অস্বীকৃতিক প্রতিক্রিয়ার ক্ষেত্রে তদন্ত করা হয় নি। এই পত্রিকাটি ভাষাগত তত্ত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব হিসেবে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রতিনিধিত্ব ব্যবহারের বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে গবেষণা করছে। আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা কন্ডেন্সের সূত্রের তথ্য এএমআর ফরমালিজমের পরে সামার্ট গ্রাফের কিছু সংক্ষিপ্ত তারপর সার্মিক গ্রাফ বুঝতে পারে একটি সার্মিক শাস্তিতে পরিবর্তন করা হয়। ফ্রেম কাঠ সম্পূর্ণ তথ্য চালানো এবং ফ্ল্যাক্সিবল। প্রত্যেক কম্পোনেন্ট স্বাধীনভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ব্যবহার করা যাবে, ডোমেইন-এর প্রশিক্ষণ তথ্য ব্যবহার করে। আমরা বেনকম্যার্কের সার্মিজেশন ডাটাসেটে পরীক্ষা করি এবং প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল প্রতিবেদন করি। আমরা এই গবেষণার লাইনের উন্নতির জন্য সুযোগ এবং চ্যালেঞ্জ বর্ণনা করি।', 'ca': "Generar un abstracte d'una col·lecció de documents és una capacitat desitjable per a moltes aplicacions del món real. No obstant això, no s'han investigat detalladament els enfocaments abstractius de la resumització multidocumental. This paper studies the feasibility of using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), a semantic representation of natural language grounded in linguistic theory, as a form of content representation.  Our approach condenses source documents to a set of summary graphs following the AMR formalism.  Els gràfics de resum es transformen en un conjunt de frases de resum en un pas de concretització de la superfície. El marc està plenament basat en dades i flexible. Cada component es pot optimitzar independentment fent servir dades d'entrenament a petita escala en domini. Fem experiments en conjunts de dades de comparació de resum i informem de resultats prometedors. També descrivim oportunitats i reptes per avançar aquesta línia de recerca.", 'cs': 'Generování abstraktu ze sbírky dokumentů je žádoucí schopnost pro mnoho reálných aplikací. Abstraktivní přístupy k shrnutí více dokumentů však nebyly důkladně zkoumány. Tento článek zkoumá možnost využití abstraktní reprezentace významu (AMR), sémantické reprezentace přirozeného jazyka založené na lingvistické teorii, jako formy reprezentace obsahu. Náš přístup zkompenzuje zdrojové dokumenty do souboru souhrnných grafů dle AMR formalismu. Souhrnné grafy jsou následně transformovány na sadu souhrnných vět v kroku povrchové realizace. Rámec je plně datově řízený a flexibilní. Každá součást může být optimalizována nezávisle pomocí drobných tréninkových dat v doméně. Provádíme experimenty na srovnávacích datových sadách a vykazujeme slibné výsledky. Popisujeme také příležitosti a výzvy pro rozvoj této oblasti výzkumu.', 'et': 'Abstrakti genereerimine dokumentide kogumist on soovitav võimalus paljude reaalmaailma rakenduste jaoks. Kuid abstraktseid lähenemisviise mitme dokumendi kokkuvõtlikule koostamisele ei ole põhjalikult uuritud. Käesolevas töös uuritakse keelteoorias põhineva looduskeele semantilise representatsiooni (Abstract Meaning Representation, AMR) kasutamise teostatavust sisu representatsiooni vormina. Meie lähenemisviis koondab lähtedokumendid kokkuvõtlikeks graafikuteks vastavalt AMR formalismile. Kokkuvõtlikud graafikud teisendatakse seejärel kokkuvõtlike lausete komplektiks pinna realiseerimise etapis. Raamistik on täielikult andmepõhine ja paindlik. Iga komponenti saab optimeerida iseseisvalt, kasutades väikesemahulisi domeenisiseseid koolitusandmeid. Teostame katseid võrdlusaluse kokkuvõtliku andmekogumiga ja anname aru paljulubavatest tulemustest. Samuti kirjeldame võimalusi ja väljakutseid selle uurimisliini edendamiseks.', 'bs': 'Generacija abstrakta iz kolekcije dokumenta je željna sposobnost za mnoge aplikacije realnog svijeta. Međutim, apstraktivni pristupi sažetku višestrukog dokumenta nisu temeljno istraženi. Ovaj papir proučava mogućnost upotrebe Abstrakta značajnog predstavljanja (AMR), semantičkog predstavljanja prirodnog jezika temeljenog na jezičkoj teoriji, kao oblik zastupanja sadržaja. Naš pristup kondenzira izvorne dokumente za skup sažetnih grafika nakon AMR formalizma. Sažetke grafike se onda pretvaraju u skup sažetnih rečenica u koraku površine realizacije. Okvir je potpuno podaci vodljen i fleksibilan. Svaki komponent se može optimizirati neovisno koristeći podatke o obuci u domenu. Izvodimo eksperimente na sumirajućim podacima o referenciji i prijavimo obećavajuće rezultate. Također opisujemo mogućnosti i izazove za unapređenje ove linije istraživanja.', 'fi': 'Tiivistelmän luominen asiakirjakokoelmasta on toivottava ominaisuus monissa reaalimaailman sovelluksissa. Abstraktiivisia lähestymistapoja monidokumenttien yhteenvetoon ei kuitenkaan ole tutkittu perusteellisesti. Tässä työssä tutkitaan mahdollisuutta käyttää abstraktia merkityksen representaatiota (AMR), joka on kielelliseen teoriaan pohjautuva luonnonkielen semanttinen representaatio sisällönrepresentaation muotona. Lähestymistapamme tiivistää lähdeasiakirjat yhteenvetokaavioihin AMR-formalismin mukaisesti. Yhteenvetokaaviot muunnetaan sitten tiivistelmälauseiksi pinnan toteuttamisvaiheessa. Kehys on täysin datalähtöinen ja joustava. Kukin komponentti voidaan optimoida itsenäisesti käyttämällä pienimuotoista, sisäistä koulutustietoa. Teemme kokeita benchmark-yhteenvetoaineistoista ja raportoimme lupaavia tuloksia. Kuvaamme myös mahdollisuuksia ja haasteita tämän linjan edistämiseen.', 'jv': 'Where am I politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Perintah sing dipunangé kapasitasi ning gambar kelangan podho \'absolute means representation (AM R), gambar semanti representation of a normal language that is underlined in language theory, ingkang dipunangé kapasitasi. Name Cumulate Tibuk-bukane kabèh donêt lan kabèh dumateng. Sapa komputer can be Optimisated separately use small-scale, in-domain Learning data. section Awakdhéwé pisan kanggo ngerasakno kapan lan susahé kanggo ngilanggar nggawe barang iki.', 'ha': "Mai ƙiƙiro wata kanana daga mai haɗa takardar aiki na da kwamfyuta ne mai ƙayyade wa shiryoyin ayuka masu yawa. Hata haka, ba za'a yi ƙidãya wa kurarin takardar multi-dokuman ba da hakki ba. Wannan karatun na karanta abincin ya yi amfani da Reference (AMR), a semantic wakilishi na harshen asimi wanda aka riga a cikin littafin linguistic, kamar wani tsari na tsari. MataimakinMu na samu takardar aiki zuwa kowace grafyutan da aka bi tsarin AMR. Ana juya grafyutan da ke ƙara zuwa wani tsari na ƙara cikin jarraba gane bakin. An cika firam da aka tafiyar da data da mai fleksa. Ana iya amfani da data masu amfani da ƙarami cikin-Domen, kowace compound ɗin da ke amfani da shi kaɗan. Munã jarraba jarrabo kan tsarin tsari na bangbang kuma munã gaya matsalan mai yiwuwa da ake yi musu alkawari. Kayya, Munã bayyana fursa da masu hanyõyin da za'a gabatar da wannan linja na research.", 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje povzetka iz zbirke dokumentov je zaželena zmogljivost za številne aplikacije v realnem svetu. Vendar abstraktivni pristopi k povzetku večdokumentov niso temeljito raziskani. Prispevek proučuje izvedljivost uporabe abstraktne predstavitve pomena (AMR), semantične predstavitve naravnega jezika, temelječe na jezikovni teoriji, kot oblike predstavitve vsebine. Naš pristop združuje izvorne dokumente v niz povzetnih grafov, ki sledijo formalizmu AMR. Povzetni grafi se nato pretvorijo v niz povzetnih stavkov v koraku uresničitve površine. Okvir je v celoti podatkovno usmerjen in prožen. Vsako komponento je mogoče optimizirati neodvisno z uporabo manjših podatkov o usposabljanju. Izvajamo eksperimente na referenčnih naborih podatkov za povzetek in poročamo o obetavnih rezultatih. Opisujemo tudi priložnosti in izzive za napredek te smeri raziskav.', 'he': 'לייצר אסטרקט מאוסף מסמכים הוא יכולת רצויה עבור שימושים רבים בעולם האמיתי. עם זאת, גישות אוסטרקטיביות לסיוריזציה ממספר מסמכים לא חקרו באופן יסודי. הנייר הזה לומד את אפשרות השימוש באמצעות מייצגת משמעות אבסטרקטית (Abstract Meaning Representation, AMR), מייצגת סמנטית של שפה טבעית המבוססת בתיאוריה שפתית, כצורה של מייצגת תוכן. הגישה שלנו מעבירה מסמכים מקורים לקבוצה של גרפים סכם לאחר הפורמליזם של AMR. הגרפים הקיצוריים משתנים לאחר מכן לקבוצה של משפטים הקיצורים בשלב ההבנה על פני השטח. המסגרת מונעת מידע לגמרי וגמישה. כל רכיב יכול להיות אופטימי באופן עצמאי באמצעות נתוני אימון קטן בתחום. אנחנו מבצעים ניסויים על קבוצות נתונים של רמז רמז ודווחים על תוצאות מבטיחות. אנחנו גם מתארים הזדמנויות ואתגרים לקדמות קו המחקר הזה.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཆ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ནས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་དགོས་པ་ནི་ངོ་མ་འཛམ་གླིང་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དག་གི་ཆོས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་དང་། ཡིན་ནའང་། མི་མང་གསོག་ཡིག་གེའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་བྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཏོང་མཁན་དུ་གཏོང་བ་མེད། This paper studies the feasibility of using Abstract Meaning Representation (AMR), a semantic representation of natural language grounded in linguistic theory, as a form of content representation. ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱིས་ཐོག་མའི་ཡིག་ཆའི་རྣམ་པ་AMR་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བསྡུར་བ་མཚོན་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། མཛུད་འབྲི་རིས་དེ་གདོང་རིས་ངོས་འཛིན་གྱི་གྲལ་ཐིག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན་པ གཞུང་གཞིའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་སྒུལ་ཆས་བྱེད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས། ཆ་ཤས་རེ་རེའི་ནང་དུ་ཆུང་བ་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ཆུང་བའི་འགྱུར་བ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱིས་ཆེ་རུ་བཏང་བ། ང་ཚོས་benchmark summarization datasets ཐོག་ཏུ་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་དང་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Abstractive Unsupervised Multi-Document Summarization using Paraphrastic Sentence Fusion', 'ar': 'تلخيص متعدد المستندات غير خاضع للإشراف باستخدام دمج جملة Paraphrastic', 'fr': "Synthèse abstraite non supervisée de plusieurs documents à l'aide de la fusion de phrases paraphrastiques", 'es': 'Resumen abstractivo de varios documentos sin supervisión mediante fusión de oraciones parafrásticas', 'pt': 'Resumo abstrato de vários documentos não supervisionados usando fusão de sentenças parafrásticas', 'ja': '抽象的で監督されていないマルチドキュメントの要約（パラフラシック文融合を使用）', 'zh': '用释义句融合抽象无监多文档摘要', 'hi': 'अमूर्त Unsupervised बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण का उपयोग कर पैराफ्रैस्टिक वाक्य संलयन', 'ru': 'Абстрактное неконтролируемое обобщение нескольких документов с использованием слияния парафразированных предложений', 'ga': 'Achoimriú Ildhoiciméad Teibí Neamh-mhaoirsithe ag úsáid Comhleá Pianbhreithe paraphrastic', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αφηρητική ανασκόπηση πολλών εγγράφων με τη συγχώνευση παραφραστικών προτάσεων', 'it': 'Sintesi astratta non sorvegliata multi-documento utilizzando fusione parafrastica delle frasi', 'hu': 'Absztrakt felügyelet nélküli többdokumentumos összefoglalás parafrasztikus mondatfúzióval', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті қолданылмаған көптеген құжат тұжырымдамасын парафратистік сөз Fusion көмегімен', 'ms': 'Penapisan Berberapa Dokumen Tidak Disupervisi Abstraktif menggunakan Fusion Sentenza Parafrastik', 'lt': 'Abstraktyvi nesustebima daugiadokumentų santrauka naudojant parafrastinę frazės sintezę', 'mk': 'Апстрактивна ненадгледувана мултидокументарна резултатација со користење на парафрастична фузија на реченици', 'ml': 'അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിക്റ്റിക്റ്റിക്റ്റിക്സിക്ക് ശിക്ഷ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് അധികാരികമായ പല രേഖയുടെ സുക്ഷേ', 'mt': 'Sommarju Abstrattiv Mhux Sorveljat ta’ Multi-Dokumenti bl-użu ta’ Fużjoni Parafrastika tas-Sentenza', 'no': 'Abstraktiv usikkert fleire dokumentsamandringar ved bruk av parafrastisk teiknsfusion', 'mn': 'Абстрактив хэлбэргүй олон баримт нийлүүлэлт Paraphrastic Sentence Fusion', 'pl': 'Abstrakcyjne nienadzorowane podsumowanie wielu dokumentów za pomocą syntezy parafrastycznych zdań', 'ro': 'Rezumat abstractiv nesupravegheat multi-document utilizând fuziunea parafrastică a sentințelor', 'sr': 'Abstraktivna neodređena sažetka višestrukog dokumenta koristeći parafrastičku fuziju izraza', 'so': 'Abstractive Unsupervised Multi-Document Summarization using Paraphrastic Sentence Fusion', 'ur': 'Paraphrastic Sentence Fusion', 'sv': 'Abstraktiv icke övervakad sammanfattning av flera dokument med hjälp av parafrastisk meningsfunktion', 'si': 'පැරාෆ්\u200dරේස්ටික් වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ වාර්තාව සම්පූර්ණය', 'ta': 'அளப்ராஸ்டிக் வாக்கியத்தை பயன்படுத்தி சுருக்கம் பார்க்கப்படவில்லை', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Абстрактивно неконтролирано обобщаване на множество документи с помощта на парафрастичен синтез на изречения', 'nl': 'Abstracte niet-begeleide samenvatting van meerdere documenten met behulp van parafrastische zinsfusie', 'hr': 'Abstraktivno neodređeno višestruko dokumentacijsko sažetanje s korištenjem parafrastičkog fuzije izraza', 'da': 'Abstraktiv ikke-overvåget sammenfatning af flere dokumenter ved hjælp af parafrastisk sætningsfunktion', 'de': 'Abstraktive nicht überwachte Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente mithilfe der paraphrastischen Satzschlüsselung', 'id': 'Penapisan Multi-Dokumen Abstraktif Tidak Disupervisi menggunakan Fusi Sentensi Parafrastik', 'ko': '해석문 융합을 바탕으로 하는 추상적 무감독 다중 문서 요약', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa Makala ya Makala ya Kidokumu ya Kufuatiliwa na Ubaguzi wa Hukumu', 'tr': 'Parafratistik Sened Fusion ullanýan Gatyp-Sened Toplaýyşy', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'تعداد مجموعه\u200cای از سند\u200cهای زیادی غیرقابل حفاظت با استفاده از فشار عبارت پارافراست', 'az': 'Parafrastik Sözü Fusion vasitəsilə Abstraktiv Əlavə edilməmiş Multi-Document Toplaşdırma', 'sq': 'Përmbledhje abstraktive e jo mbikqyrur e shumëdokumenteve duke përdorur Fuzionin Parafrastik të Dënimeve', 'hy': 'Բազմափաստաթղթերի առանձնահատուկ համառոտագրություն օգտագործելով պարաֆրատիկ նախադասությունների ֆուզիա', 'bn': 'প্যারাফ্রাস্টিক শাস্তি ফিশন ব্যবহার করে অনেক নথির সামার্মিজেশন', 'bs': 'Abstraktivna neodređena samarizacija višestrukog dokumenta koristeći parafrastičku fuziju kazne', 'ca': 'Resumen abstractiu sense supervisió de múltiples documents utilitzant la fusió de frases parafràstiques', 'et': 'Järelevalveta mitme dokumendi kokkuvõte parafrastilise lause fusiooni abil', 'cs': 'Abstrakční nesledované shrnutí více dokumentů pomocí fúze parafrastických vět', 'fi': 'Abstrakti valvomaton usean asiakirjan yhteenveto käyttäen parafrastista lausefuusiota', 'am': 'undo-type', 'jv': 'Samurasi Multi-document', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Abstractive Unsupervised Multi-Document Summarization using Paraphrastic Sentence Fusion', 'sk': 'Povzetek večdokumentov brez nadzora z uporabo parafrastičnega stavka', 'bo': 'Abstractive Unsupervised Multi-Document Summarization using Paraphrastic Sentence Fusion'}
{'en': 'In this work, we aim at developing an unsupervised abstractive summarization system in the multi-document setting. We design a paraphrastic sentence fusion model which jointly performs sentence fusion and paraphrasing using skip-gram word embedding model at the sentence level. Our model improves the information coverage and at the same time abstractiveness of the generated sentences. We conduct our experiments on the human-generated multi-sentence compression datasets and evaluate our system on several newly proposed Machine Translation (MT) evaluation metrics. Furthermore, we apply our sentence level model to implement an abstractive multi-document summarization system where documents usually contain a related set of sentences. We also propose an optimal solution for the classical summary length limit problem which was not addressed in the past research. For the document level summary, we conduct experiments on the datasets of two different domains (e.g., news article and user reviews) which are well suited for multi-document abstractive summarization. Our experiments demonstrate that the methods bring significant improvements over the state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'في هذا العمل ، نهدف إلى تطوير نظام تلخيص تجريدي غير خاضع للإشراف في إعداد المستندات المتعددة. نصمم نموذج دمج الجمل المعاد صياغته والذي يؤدي بشكل مشترك دمج الجملة وإعادة صياغتها باستخدام نموذج تضمين كلمة تخطي الجرام على مستوى الجملة. يعمل نموذجنا على تحسين تغطية المعلومات وفي نفس الوقت الطابع التجريدي للجمل التي تم إنشاؤها. نجري تجاربنا على مجموعات بيانات الضغط متعددة الجمل التي أنشأها الإنسان ونقيم نظامنا على عدة مقاييس تقييم مقترحة حديثًا للترجمة الآلية (MT). علاوة على ذلك ، نطبق نموذج مستوى الجملة الخاص بنا لتنفيذ نظام تلخيص تجريدي متعدد المستندات حيث تحتوي المستندات عادةً على مجموعة ذات صلة من الجمل. نقترح أيضًا الحل الأمثل لمشكلة حد طول الملخص الكلاسيكية التي لم يتم تناولها في البحث السابق. بالنسبة لملخص مستوى المستند ، نجري تجارب على مجموعات البيانات الخاصة بنطاقين مختلفين (على سبيل المثال ، مقال إخباري ومراجعات المستخدمين) والتي تكون مناسبة تمامًا للتلخيص التجريدي متعدد المستندات. توضح تجاربنا أن الأساليب تجلب تحسينات كبيرة على أحدث الأساليب.', 'fr': "Dans ce travail, nous visons à développer un système de synthèse abstraite non supervisé dans le cadre de plusieurs documents. Nous concevons un modèle de fusion de phrases paraphrastiques qui effectue conjointement la fusion de phrases et la paraphrase à l'aide d'un modèle d'intégration de mots sautant un gramme au niveau de la phrase. Notre modèle améliore la couverture de l'information et en même temps l'abstraction des phrases générées. Nous menons nos expériences sur les ensembles de données de compression multi-phrases générés par l'homme et évaluons notre système sur la base de plusieurs mesures d'évaluation de la traduction automatique (TA) récemment proposées. De plus, nous appliquons notre modèle de niveau de phrase pour implémenter un système de résumé abstrait multi-documents dans lequel les documents contiennent généralement un ensemble de phrases associées. Nous proposons également une solution optimale au problème classique de la limite de longueur des résumés qui n'a pas été abordé dans les recherches précédentes. Pour le résumé au niveau du document, nous menons des expériences sur les ensembles de données de deux domaines différents (par exemple, les articles de presse et les critiques d'utilisateurs) qui conviennent parfaitement à la synthèse abstraite multi-documents. Nos expériences démontrent que les méthodes apportent des améliorations significatives par rapport aux méthodes de pointe.", 'es': 'En este trabajo, nuestro objetivo es desarrollar un sistema de resumen abstractivo no supervisado en el entorno de varios documentos. Diseñamos un modelo de fusión de oraciones parafrásticas que realiza conjuntamente la fusión de oraciones y la paráfrasis utilizando un modelo de incrustación de palabras de salto de grama a nivel de oración. Nuestro modelo mejora la cobertura de la información y, al mismo tiempo, la abstractividad de las frases generadas. Llevamos a cabo nuestros experimentos con los conjuntos de datos de compresión de múltiples frases generados por humanos y evaluamos nuestro sistema en varias métricas de evaluación de traducción automática (MT) recientemente propuestas. Además, aplicamos nuestro modelo de nivel de oración para implementar un sistema de resumen abstractivo de varios documentos en el que los documentos generalmente contienen un conjunto de oraciones relacionadas. También proponemos una solución óptima para el problema clásico del límite de longitud del resumen que no se abordó en investigaciones anteriores. Para el resumen a nivel de documento, realizamos experimentos en los conjuntos de datos de dos dominios diferentes (por ejemplo, artículos de noticias y reseñas de usuarios) que son adecuados para la sumarización abstractiva de varios documentos. Nuestros experimentos demuestran que los métodos aportan mejoras significativas con respecto a los métodos más avanzados.', 'pt': 'Neste trabalho, visamos desenvolver um sistema de sumarização abstrativa não supervisionada no ambiente multidocumento. Projetamos um modelo de fusão de frases parafrásticas que realiza conjuntamente a fusão de frases e a paráfrase usando o modelo de incorporação de palavras com skip-gram no nível da frase. Nosso modelo melhora a cobertura da informação e ao mesmo tempo a abstração das sentenças geradas. Conduzimos nossos experimentos nos conjuntos de dados de compactação de várias frases gerados por humanos e avaliamos nosso sistema em várias métricas de avaliação de tradução automática (MT) propostas recentemente. Além disso, aplicamos nosso modelo de nível de sentença para implementar um sistema de sumarização multidocumento abstrato onde os documentos geralmente contêm um conjunto relacionado de sentenças. Também propomos uma solução ótima para o problema clássico de limite de comprimento de resumo que não foi abordado em pesquisas anteriores. Para o resumo em nível de documento, realizamos experimentos nos conjuntos de dados de dois domínios diferentes (por exemplo, artigo de notícias e resenhas de usuários) que são adequados para sumarização abstrativa de vários documentos. Nossos experimentos demonstram que os métodos trazem melhorias significativas em relação aos métodos de última geração.', 'ja': '本作では、マルチドキュメントの場面で、監督されていない抽象的な要約システムの開発を目指しています。 文レベルでスキップグラムワード埋め込みモデルを使用して、文融合とパラフレーズを共同で行うパラフレーズ文融合モデルを設計します。 私たちのモデルは、生成された文章の情報カバレッジと同時に抽象性を向上させます。 私たちは、人間が生成した多文圧縮データセットの実験を行い、いくつかの新たに提案された機械翻訳（ MT ）評価指標に基づいてシステムを評価します。 さらに、文レベルモデルを適用して、抽象的なマルチドキュメントサマリシステムを実装します。このシステムでは、ドキュメントには通常、関連する一連の文が含まれています。 また、従来の研究では取り上げられていなかった古典的な要約長制限問題の最適な解法を提案する。 文書レベルの要約については、マルチドキュメントの抽象的な要約に適した2つの異なるドメイン（ニュース記事やユーザーレビューなど）のデータセットの実験を行います。 私たちの実験は、これらの方法が最先端の方法よりも大幅な改善をもたらすことを示しています。', 'zh': '于兹事也,多文档设无监之象摘要统。 设一释义句融合模形,当于句级跳过-gram词嵌模同行句融释义。 吾道重息覆盖率,兼增成句抽象性。 吾等于人为多句压缩据集上实验之,并据数新机器翻译(MT)评指标评吾系统。 以句级成象之多文档摘要,文档常含一组之句。 又为往时考中未解决之经摘要长度限制,最为佳解决方案。 其于文档摘要,二(异域,新闻文章与用户论)数实验之,非常适合多文档象摘要。 臣等实验明,比之先进,其法显改。', 'hi': 'इस काम में, हम बहु-दस्तावेज़ सेटिंग में एक असुरक्षित अमूर्त सारांश प्रणाली विकसित करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं। हम एक पैराफ्रैस्टिक वाक्य संलयन मॉडल डिजाइन करते हैं जो संयुक्त रूप से वाक्य स्तर पर स्किप-ग्राम शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का उपयोग करके वाक्य संलयन और पैराफ्रेसिंग करता है। हमारा मॉडल जानकारी कवरेज में सुधार करता है और एक ही समय में उत्पन्न वाक्यों की अमूर्तता। हम मानव-जनित बहु-वाक्य संपीड़न डेटासेट पर अपने प्रयोगों का संचालन करते हैं और कई नए प्रस्तावित मशीन अनुवाद (एमटी) मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक पर हमारे सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम अपने वाक्य स्तर के मॉडल को एक अमूर्त बहु-दस्तावेज़ सारांशीकरण प्रणाली को लागू करने के लिए लागू करते हैं जहां दस्तावेजों में आमतौर पर वाक्यों का एक संबंधित सेट होता है। हम शास्त्रीय सारांश लंबाई सीमा समस्या के लिए एक इष्टतम समाधान का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसे पिछले शोध में संबोधित नहीं किया गया था। दस्तावेज़ स्तर सारांश के लिए, हम दो अलग-अलग डोमेन (जैसे, समाचार लेख और उपयोगकर्ता समीक्षा) के डेटासेट पर प्रयोग करते हैं जो बहु-दस्तावेज़ अमूर्त सारांशीकरण के लिए अच्छी तरह से उपयुक्त हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि विधियां अत्याधुनिक तरीकों पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार लाती हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой работе мы стремимся к разработке неконтролируемой системы абстрактного обобщения в условиях многодокументарной среды. Мы разработали парафразированную модель слияния предложений, которая совместно выполняет слияние и перефразирование предложений, используя модель вложения слов в скип-граммы на уровне предложений. Наша модель улучшает информационный охват и в то же время абстрактность сгенерированных предложений. Мы проводим наши эксперименты с созданными человеком наборами данных сжатия с несколькими предложениями и оцениваем нашу систему на нескольких недавно предложенных метриках оценки машинного перевода (MT). Кроме того, мы применяем нашу модель уровня предложения для реализации абстрактной системы обобщения нескольких документов, где документы обычно содержат связанный набор предложений. Мы также предлагаем оптимальное решение для классической задачи ограничения суммарной длины, которая не рассматривалась в прошлом исследовании. Для резюме на уровне документа мы проводим эксперименты на наборах данных двух различных областей (например, новостная статья и обзоры пользователей), которые хорошо подходят для абстрактного обобщения нескольких документов. Наши эксперименты показывают, что методы приносят значительные улучшения по сравнению с современными методами.', 'ga': 'San obair seo, tá sé mar aidhm againn córas achoimrithe teibí gan mhaoirseacht a fhorbairt sa suíomh ildhoiciméad. Dearaimid samhail chomhleá abairtí paraphrastic a chomhfheidhmíonn comhleá abairte agus athfhrása ag baint úsáide as samhail leabú focal skip-gram ag leibhéal na habairte. Feabhsaíonn ár múnla clúdach faisnéise agus ag an am céanna teibíocht na habairtí ginte. Déanaimid ár dturgnaimh ar na tacair sonraí comhbhrú il-abairtí a ghineann an duine agus déanaimid luacháil ar ár gcóras ar roinnt méadracht mheastóireachta um Aistriú Meaisín (MT) nua-mholta. Ina theannta sin, cuirimid ár múnla leibhéal na habairte i bhfeidhm chun córas achoimrithe ildhoiciméad teibí a chur i bhfeidhm ina mbíonn sraith abairtí gaolmhar i ndoiciméid de ghnáth. Molaimid freisin réiteach optamach don fhadhb achomair clasaiceach um theorainn faid nár tugadh aghaidh uirthi sa taighde roimhe seo. Maidir leis an achoimre ar leibhéal an doiciméid, déanaimid turgnaimh ar thacair shonraí dhá fhearann éagsúla (m.sh., alt nuachta agus léirmheasanna úsáideoirí) atá feiliúnach go maith le haghaidh achoimre teibí ildhoiciméad. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go dtugann na modhanna feabhsuithe suntasacha ar na modhanna úrscothacha.', 'el': 'Στην εργασία αυτή, στοχεύουμε στην ανάπτυξη ενός συστήματος αφηρημένης σύνοψης χωρίς επίβλεψη στο περιβάλλον πολλαπλών εγγράφων. Σχεδιάζουμε ένα μοντέλο συγχώνευσης παροφραστικών προτάσεων το οποίο από κοινού εκτελεί συγχώνευση και παράφραση προτάσεων χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλο ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων σε επίπεδο προτάσεων. Το μοντέλο μας βελτιώνει την κάλυψη πληροφοριών και ταυτόχρονα την αφαιρετικότητα των παραγόμενων προτάσεων. Διεξάγουμε τα πειράματά μας στα σύνολα δεδομένων συμπίεσης πολλών προτάσεων από τον άνθρωπο και αξιολογούμε το σύστημά μας σε αρκετές πρόσφατα προτεινόμενες μετρήσεις αξιολόγησης μηχανικής μετάφρασης (ΜΤ). Επιπλέον, εφαρμόζουμε το μοντέλο επιπέδου προτάσεων για να εφαρμόσουμε ένα αφηρημένο σύστημα σύνοψης πολλών εγγράφων όπου τα έγγραφα συνήθως περιέχουν ένα σχετικό σύνολο προτάσεων. Προτείνουμε επίσης μια βέλτιστη λύση για το κλασσικό πρόβλημα συνοπτικού ορίου μήκους που δεν αντιμετωπίστηκε στο παρελθόν. Για την περίληψη σε επίπεδο εγγράφου, διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε σύνολα δεδομένων δύο διαφορετικών τομέων (π.χ. άρθρα ειδήσεων και κριτικές χρηστών) τα οποία είναι κατάλληλα για αφηρημένη περίληψη πολλών εγγράφων. Τα πειράματά μας αποδεικνύουν ότι οι μέθοδοι φέρνουν σημαντικές βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με τις μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'Ebben a munkában egy felügyelet nélküli absztraktív összefoglaló rendszer kialakítására törekszünk a többdokumentumos környezetben. Egy parafrásztikus mondatfúziós modellt tervezünk, amely közösen végez mondatfúziót és parafrázást a mondatszinten ugrás-gram szóbeágyazási modellel. Modellünk javítja a generált mondatok információs lefedettségét és absztraktivitását. Kísérleteinket az ember által generált többmondatos tömörítési adatkészleteken végezzük, és rendszerünket több újonnan javasolt Machine Translation (MT) értékelési mutató alapján értékeljük. Ezenkívül mondatszintű modellünket egy absztrakt többdokumentumos összefoglaló rendszer bevezetésére alkalmazzuk, ahol a dokumentumok általában kapcsolódó mondatokat tartalmaznak. Javasoljuk továbbá a klasszikus összefoglaló hosszhatár problémára optimális megoldást, amelyet a korábbi kutatások során nem foglalkoztak. A dokumentumszintű összefoglalóhoz két különböző terület (pl. hírek és felhasználói értékelések) adatállományán végzünk kísérleteket, amelyek jól alkalmasak többdokumentumos absztraktív összefoglalásra. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a módszerek jelentős javulást hoznak a korszerű módszerekhez képest.', 'ka': 'ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ უნდა გავაკეთოთ მრავალური დოკუმენტის განსაზღვრებით არსებული აბსტრაქტიური სისტემა. ჩვენ პარატრასტიული სიტყვას ფუზიციის მოდელს დავყენებთ, რომელიც ერთად ტუზიცია და პაპატრაზიცია გამოყენებთ გამოყენებული სიტყვას სტუზიციის დონეში. ჩვენი მოდელი ინფორმაციის შესახებ და იგივე დროში შექმნილი სიტყვების აბსტრაქტივა. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები ადამიანის შექმნილი მრავალ წესების კომპრესიციის მონაცემების შესახებ გავაკეთებთ და ჩვენი სისტემის შესახებ რამდენიმე ახალი წესების მაქინის გადა დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ჩვენი სიტყვების დონეულის მოდელი, რომ აბსტრაქტიური მრავალე დოკუმენტის სისტემას გამოყენება, სადაც დოკუმენტები საუკეთესო ჩვენ კლასიკალური განსაზღვრების დრიმის პრობლემების ოპტიმალური გარეშე, რომელიც წინა შესწავლობულია. დოკუმენტის საზოგადომის საზოგადომა, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტები ექსპერიმენტები ორი განსხვავებული დიომენტების საზოგადოებში (მაგალითად, ახალგაზომის ანტიკო და მომხმარების გადა ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ მეტებები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანების შესაძლებლობას ხელსაწყოთა მეტებზე.', 'it': "In questo lavoro, puntiamo a sviluppare un sistema di sintesi astratta non supervisionato nell'impostazione multi-documento. Progettiamo un modello parafrastico di fusione di frasi che esegue congiuntamente fusione di frasi e parafrasi utilizzando il modello di incorporazione di parole skip-gram a livello di frase. Il nostro modello migliora la copertura informativa e allo stesso tempo l'astrattezza delle frasi generate. Conduciamo i nostri esperimenti sui set di dati di compressione multi-frase generati dall'uomo e valutiamo il nostro sistema su diverse metriche di valutazione di Machine Translation (MT) recentemente proposte. Inoltre, applichiamo il nostro modello a livello di frase per implementare un sistema astratto di sintesi multi-documento in cui i documenti contengono solitamente un insieme di frasi correlate. Proponiamo anche una soluzione ottimale per il classico problema del limite di lunghezza sommario che non è stato affrontato nella ricerca passata. Per la sintesi a livello di documento, conduciamo esperimenti sui dataset di due domini diversi (ad esempio, articoli di notizie e recensioni degli utenti) che sono adatti per la sintesi astratta multi-documento. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che i metodi apportano miglioramenti significativi rispetto ai metodi all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Šiame darbe siekiame sukurti nepastebimą abstraktišką apibendrinimo sistemą daugiadokumentais. Mes sukuriame parafrastinį frazių sintezės model į, kuris kartu atlieka frazių sintezę ir parafrazę naudodamas frazių lygio žodžių įterpimo modelį skip-gram. Mūsų modelis gerina informacijos aprėptį ir tuo pat metu sukauptų sakinių abstraktumą. Atliekame eksperimentus su žmogaus sukauptais daugelio sakinių kompresinių duomenų rinkiniais ir vertiname savo sistemą pagal keletą naujai pasiūlytų mašinų vertimo (MT) vertinimo metrijų. Be to, mes taikome savo sakinių lygio model į, kad įgyvendintume abstraktišką daugiadokumentę apibendrinimo sistemą, kurioje dokumentuose paprastai yra susiję sakiniai. Taip pat siūlome optimal ų klasikinės santraukos ilgio ribos problemos sprendimą, kuris nebuvo sprendžiamas ankstesniuose tyrimuose. Dokumentų lygio santraukoje atliekame eksperimentus su dviejų skirtingų sričių duomenų rinkiniais (pvz., naujienų straipsniu ir naudotojų apžvalgomis), kurie yra tinkamai pritaikyti daugiadokumentinei abstraktinei santraukai. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad taikant šiuolaikinius metodus gerokai pagerėja modernieji metodai.', 'kk': 'Бұл жұмыс ішінде бірнеше құжат параметрлерінде абстрактивті жазылу жүйесін жасау үшін мақсатымыз. Біз парафрастикалық сөздерді біріктіру үлгісін құрамыз. Бұл сөздерді сөздердің деңгейінде өткізу үлгісін және парафразын қолдану үлгісін қолданады. Біздің үлгіміз мәліметтің мәліметті жасайды және сол уақытта құрылған сөйлемелердің абстрактивтігін жасайды. Біз адамдардың құрылған көп сөйлем компрессия деректер қорларына эксперименттерімізді орындап, жүйемізді бірнеше жаңа таңдаған Машин аудару (MT) мәтірлерінің мәтірлерінде бағалаймыз. Қосымша, біз сөйлеме деңгейінің үлгісін абстрактивті көп құжатты жазылу жүйесіне қолданамыз. Құжаттардың кәдімгі сұлбаларының қатынасы бар. Сонымен қатар, бұрынғы зерттеулерде шешілмеген классикалық тұжырымдық ұзындығының оптималдық шешімін ұсындық. Құжат деңгейінің тұжырымдамасы үшін біз көп құжат абстрактивті тұжырымдамасы үшін екі түрлі доменнің (мысалы, жаңалық мақала және пайдаланушылардың тұжырымдамасы) деректер жиынында тәжірибеле Біздің тәжірибеміз тәжірибелеріміздің әдістері өзгерту әдістерін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Dalam kerja ini, kami bertujuan untuk mengembangkan sistem penghuraian abstraktif tidak diawasi dalam tetapan multi-dokumen. Kami merancang model fusi kalimat parafrastik yang bersama-sama melakukan fusi kalimat dan parafrasasi menggunakan model penyembedding kata skip-gram pada tahap kalimat. Model kami memperbaiki penutupan maklumat dan pada masa yang sama abstraktif kalimat yang dijana. Kami melakukan eksperimen kami pada set data pemampatan multi-kalimat yang dijana oleh manusia dan menilai sistem kami pada beberapa metrik penilaian penerjemah Mesin (MT) yang baru diusulkan. Selain itu, kami melaksanakan model aras kalimat kami untuk melaksanakan sistem penghuraian multi-dokumen abstraktif di mana dokumen biasanya mengandungi set kalimat berkaitan. Kami juga cadangkan penyelesaian optimal untuk masalah sempadan panjang ringkasan klasik yang tidak ditutup dalam kajian yang lalu. Untuk ringkasan aras dokumen, kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data dua domain yang berbeza (cth., artikel berita dan ulasan pengguna) yang sesuai untuk ringkasan abstraktif multi-dokumen. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa kaedah membawa peningkatan yang signifikan atas kaedah-kaedah yang terbaik.', 'mk': 'In this work, we aim at developing an unsupervised abstractive summarization system in the multi-document setting.  Ние дизајнираме парафрастичен модел на фузија на реченици кој заедно извршува фузија на речениците и парафразирање со користење на модел на вградување на зборот skip-gram на ниво на реченица. Нашиот модел ја подобрува информацијата и истовремено апстрактивноста на генерираните реченици. Ние ги спроведуваме нашите експерименти на човечките генерирани компресивни податоци со повеќе реченици и го проценуваме нашиот систем на неколку нови предложени метрики за проценка на Машинска транслекција (МТ). Покрај тоа, го применуваме нашиот модел на ниво на реченици за спроведување апстрактивен систем за резултат на мултидокументи каде документите обично содржат поврзан набор реченици. Ние, исто така, предложуваме оптимално решение за класичниот проблем со ограничувањето на должината на сумирањето, кој не беше решен во минатото истражување. За сумирањето на нивото на документот, спроведуваме експерименти на датотеките од два различни домени (на пример, вести и кориснички рецензии) кои се добро соодветни за мултидокументна апстрактивна сумирање. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека методите донесуваат значителни подобрувања во однос на најновите методи.', 'ml': 'ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു അസംരക്ഷിതമായ സംരക്ഷണ സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പാരാഫ്രാസ്റ്റിക്ക് വാക്കിന്റെ ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. വാക്കിന്റെ നില മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വാക്ക് ഫ്യ നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുടെ കയറ്റം മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുന്നു. ഒരേ സമയത്ത് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളുടെ അസ്വഭാ മനുഷ്യന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല വാക്കുകളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. പുതിയ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മെഷീന അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മുടെ വാക്കിന്റെ നില മോഡല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു അസ്ട്രാക്ടിവേറ്റിവ് പല രേഖകളുടെ സംസ്കാരം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d ക്ലാസ്റ്റസിക്കല്\u200d നീളം പരിധികളുടെ പരിധിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഐച്ഛിക പരിഹരിക്കുന്നു കഴിഞ്ഞ പരിശോധനത രേഖകളുടെ നില വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡോമെനുകളുടെ ഡേറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നാം പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു (ഉദാഹരണമായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പേരും ഉപയോക്താവിന നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ രീതികള്\u200d രാജ്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ രീതിയില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെ', 'mt': 'F’din il-ħidma, għandna l-għan li niżviluppaw sistema ta’ sommarju astrattiv mhux sorveljata fl-isfond ta’ diversi dokumenti. Aħna niddisinjaw mudell parafrastiku ta’ fużjoni ta’ sentenza li b’mod konġunt iwettaq fużjoni ta’ sentenza u parafrażizzazzjoni bl-użu ta’ mudell ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem skip-gram fil-livell tas-sentenza. Our model improves the information coverage and at the same time abstractiveness of the generated sentences.  Aħna nagħmlu l-esperimenti tagħna fuq settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ kompressjoni b’ħafna sentenzi ġġenerati mill-bniedem u jivvalutaw is-sistema tagħna fuq diversi metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni (MT) proposti ġodda. Barra minn hekk, napplikaw il-mudell tal-livell tas-sentenza tagħna biex nimplimentaw sistema ta’ sommarju astrattiva b’diversi dokumenti fejn id-dokumenti normalment jinkludu sett ta’ sentenzi relatati. Aħna nipproponu wkoll soluzzjoni ottimali għall-problema klassika tal-limitu tat-tul fil-qosor li ma ġietx indirizzata fir-riċerka tal-passat. Għas-sommarju tal-livell tad-dokument, nagħmlu esperimenti fuq settijiet tad-dejta ta’ żewġ oqsma differenti (pereżempju, artikolu tal-aħbarijiet u reviżjonijiet tal-utenti) li huma adattati tajjeb g ħal sommarju astrattiv b’diversi dokumenti. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-metodi jġibu titjib sinifikanti fuq il-metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Энэ ажлын тулд бид олон баримт дүгнэлттэй хэмжээнд хүлээн зөвшөөрөгдсөн abstractive summarization system боловсруулахыг зориулсан. Бид өгүүлбэрийг нэгтгэх болон парафразын нэгтгэх үг загварыг бүтээж, өгүүлбэрийн хэмжээ дээр алчуулах үг загварыг ашигладаг. Бидний загвар нь мэдээллийн мэдээллийн мэдээллийг сайжруулж, үүсгэсэн өгүүлбэрүүдийн абстрактив байдлыг сайжруулдаг. Бид хүн төрөлхтний бий болсон олон өгүүлбэрийн дарааллын өгөгдлийн сан дээр туршилтыг хийж, бидний системийг олон шинэ санал дэвшүүлсэн Машин хөрөнгө (MT) дүгнэлтийн метрийг үнэлдэг. Үүнээс гадна бид өгүүлбэрийн түвшин загварыг харьцуулахын тулд хэд хэдэн баримтын жинхэнэ хэмжээсүүдийг ашигладаг. Мөн бид өнгөрсөн судалгаанд зориулагдсан классик хэмжээний урт хязгаарын асуудлын эерэг шийдэл гаргаж байна. Бид баримтын түвшинд хоёр өөр хэсэг (жишээ нь, мэдээллийн баримт, хэрэглэгчийн шалгалт) дээр туршилтыг хийдэг. Мөн олон баримтын агуулагч дүгнэлт нь сайн хангалттай. Бидний туршилтууд арга замыг урлагийн хувьд маш чухал сайжруулах арга замыг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'W niniejszej pracy dążymy do opracowania nienadzorowanego systemu abstrakcyjnego podsumowywania w otoczeniu wielu dokumentów. Projektujemy model fuzji zdań parafrastycznych, który wspólnie wykonuje fuzję zdań i parafrazowanie za pomocą modelu osadzania słów skip-gram na poziomie zdania. Nasz model poprawia pokrycie informacji i jednocześnie abstrakcyjność generowanych zdań. Przeprowadzamy nasze eksperymenty na zbiorach danych kompresji wielu zdań generowanych przez człowieka i oceniamy nasz system na podstawie kilku nowo proponowanych wskaźników oceny tłumaczenia maszynowego (MT). Ponadto stosujemy nasz model poziomu zdań do wdrożenia abstrakcyjnego systemu podsumowywania wielu dokumentów, w którym dokumenty zazwyczaj zawierają powiązany zestaw zdań. Proponujemy również optymalne rozwiązanie klasycznego problemu granicy długości streszczenia, który nie został poruszony w poprzednich badaniach. W celu podsumowania na poziomie dokumentu przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na zbiorach danych dwóch różnych domen (np. artykułów wiadomościowych i recenzji użytkowników), które są dobrze nadają się do abstrakcyjnego podsumowania wielu dokumentów. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że metody te przynoszą znaczące ulepszenia w stosunku do nowoczesnych metod.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, ne propunem să dezvoltăm un sistem de rezumare abstractivă nesupravegheat în cadrul cadrului multi-document. Proiectăm un model parafrastic de fuziune a propozițiilor care efectuează împreună fuziunea și parafrazarea propozițiilor folosind modelul de încorporare a cuvintelor skip-gram la nivelul propoziției. Modelul nostru îmbunătățește acoperirea informațională și, în același timp, abstractivitatea propozițiilor generate. Realizăm experimentele noastre pe seturile de date de compresie multi-propoziții generate de om și evaluăm sistemul nostru pe mai multe măsurători de evaluare nou propuse Machine Translation (MT). Mai mult decât atât, aplicăm modelul nostru de nivel de propoziție pentru a implementa un sistem abstractiv de rezumare multi-document în care documentele conțin, de obicei, un set de propoziții asociat. Propunem, de asemenea, o soluție optimă pentru problema clasică sumară a limitei lungimii, care nu a fost abordată în cercetarea anterioară. Pentru rezumatul la nivel de document, efectuăm experimente pe seturi de date ale două domenii diferite (de exemplu, articole de știri și recenzii ale utilizatorilor) care sunt potrivite pentru rezumarea abstractivă multi-document. Experimentele noastre demonstrează că metodele aduc îmbunătățiri semnificative față de metodele de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'U ovom poslu, ciljamo da razvijemo neodređeni sistem abstraktivnog sažetka u multidokumentu. Mi dizajniramo parafrastički model fuzije rečenica koji zajedno izvodi fuziju rečenica i parafrazaciju koristeći model uključujući rečenice na nivou rečenice. Naš model poboljšava informaciju i u isto vreme abstraktivnost proizvedenih rečenica. Vodimo eksperimente na kompresiji podataka sa mnogim rečenicama koji su stvoreni ljudima i procjenjujemo naš sistem na nekoliko novih predloženih metrika za procjenu mašinskih prevoda (MT). Nadalje, primjenjujemo model razine rečenica da provedemo abstraktivni sistem sažetanja višestrukih dokumenta u kojem dokumenti obično sadrže povezan set rečenica. Takođe predlažemo optimalno rješenje za klasično ograničenje granice sažetka koji nije riješen u prošlim istraživanjima. Za sažetak nivoa dokumenta, provodimo eksperimente na setima podataka dva različita domena (npr. novinski članak i pregled korisnika) koji su dobro odgovarajući za većinu abstraktivnih sažetka dokumenta. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da metode donose značajne poboljšanje nad državnim metodama umjetnosti.', 'no': 'I denne arbeiden må vi utvikla eit ugjennomsiktig abstraktiv samanseringssystem i fleire dokumentinnstillingane. Vi design ein parafrastisk setningsmodul som kopla utfører setningsfunisjon og parafrasing med hopp- gram- ord- innebyggingsmodellen på setningsnivået. Modellen vårt forbedrar informasjonsomslaget og samtidig abstraktivitet av dei lagane setningane. Vi gjer eksperimentene våre på datasettet for komprimering av fleire setningar som er generert med menneske og evaluerer systemet vårt på fleire nytt foreslått evalueringsmetrikar for maskineomsetjing (MT). I tillegg bruker vi setningsnivået til å implementera eit abstraktiv multidokumentsamanseringssystem der dokument vanlegvis inneheld ei relatert setning av setningar. Vi foreslår også ein optimal løysing for den klassiske sammendragsgrensesproblemet som ikkje vart adressert i forrige forskning. For sammendragen av dokumentnivået gjer vi eksperimenter på datasetta av to ulike domene (f.eks. news article and user reviews) som er godt passa for abstractive sammendrag i fleire dokument. Eksperimentane våre viser at metodane gjer signifikante forbedringar over kunstmetodane.', 'si': 'මේ වැඩේ අපි අදහස් කරනවා විශේෂ විශේෂ නැති විශේෂ පද්ධතියක් විස්තර කරන්න. අපි පැරැෆ්\u200dරේස්ටික් වාක්ය සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය මදුල් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වචන සහ පැරැෆ්\u200dරේස්ටික් වචන සඳහා වාක් අපේ මොඩේලය තොරතුරු ආවරණය සහ එකම වෙලාවේ සිද්ධ වාක්ෂාවක් වැඩ කරනවා. අපි මිනිස්සු නිර්මාණය කරපු ගොඩක් වාක්ය සම්ප්\u200dරේෂණ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට අපේ පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න සහ අළුත් පද්ධතිය සඳහා අ තවත්, අපි අපේ වාක්ය ස්තූතිය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් භාවිත කරනවා වගේ වාක්ය සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය පද්ධතියක් අවස්ථාව කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා අතින් පරීක්ෂණයේදී ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි. වෙනස් ඩෝමේන් දෙකක් ගැන දත්ත සෙටුම් සඳහා අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා (උදාහරණය, වාර්තාව ලේඛනය සහ භාවිතා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විශේෂය සඳහා හො අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ විදිහට විශේෂ විදිහට වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'sv': 'I detta arbete str채var vi efter att utveckla ett o철vervakat abstrakt sammanfattningssystem i flerdokumentsinst채llningen. Vi designar en parafrastisk meningsfunktionsmodell som gemensamt utf철r meningsfunktion och parafrasering med hj채lp av skip-gram ordb채ddningsmodell p책 meningsniv책. V책r modell f철rb채ttrar informationst채ckningen och samtidigt abstraktiviteten hos de genererade meningarna. Vi genomf철r v책ra experiment p책 m채nniskogenererade multipensionsdataupps채ttningar och utv채rderar v책rt system utifr책n flera nyligen f철reslagna m채tv채rden f철r maskin철vers채ttning (MT). Dessutom till채mpar vi v책r meningsniv책modell f철r att implementera ett abstrakt system f철r sammanfattning av flera dokument d채r dokument vanligtvis inneh책ller en relaterad upps채ttning meningar. Vi f철resl책r ocks책 en optimal l철sning f철r det klassiska sammanfattande l채ngdgr채nsproblemet som inte togs upp i tidigare forskning. F철r sammanfattningen p책 dokumentniv책 genomf철r vi experiment p책 dataupps채ttningar f철r tv책 olika dom채ner (t.ex. nyhetsartiklar och anv채ndarrecensioner) som l채mpar sig v채l f철r abstraktiv sammanfattning av flera dokument. V책ra experiment visar att metoderna ger betydande f철rb채ttringar j채mf철rt med de senaste metoderna.', 'so': 'In this work, we aim at developing an unsupervised abstractive summarization system in the multi-document setting.  Waxaynu sameynaa model fuushan kalimada, kaas oo si wadajir ah u sameeya fuushan ciqaabka iyo baaritaanka lagu isticmaalo sameynta sameynta sameynta hadalka ku qoran ciqaabka. Tusaale ahaan ayaa horumarinaya daboolka macluumaadka iyo isla waqtigaas is-qabsashada xukunka la soo saaray. Waxaynu sameynaa imtixaankayada ku qoran sawirada kooxaha dadka oo kala duduwan, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa nidaamka oo ku saabsan tarjumaadka machine (MT) ee cusub lagu soo jeeday. Furthermore, waxaynu codsanaynaa qaababka heerka nidaamka si a an u sameeyno nidaamka summarinta dukumentiyada kala duduwan, kaas oo dukumentiyada sida caadiga ah ku qoran qoraal kala duduwan. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo jeedaynaa xal u gaar ah ee dhibaatada ku saabsan dhererka xiliga ee fasaxda, taasoo aan looga hadlin baaritaankii hore. Xarunta heerka dukumentiga, waxaynu sameynaa imtixaamo ku qoran labada meelood oo kala duduwan (tusaale ahaan warqada warqadda iyo warbixinta isticmaalayaasha) oo si wanaagsan u habboon jardiino rasmi ah. Imtixaankayada waxay muujiyaan in qaababka ay keenaan beddelmo aad u weyn oo ka kordhiya habka farshaxanka.', 'ta': 'இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத ஒதுக்கப்படாத சுருக்கல் அமைப்பை பல ஆவண அமைப்பில் உருவாக்குவதற்கு நோக்க நாம் ஒரு வாக்கியத்தின் குறுக்கீட்டு மாதிரி வடிவமைப்பை உருவாக்குகிறோம். அது வாக்கு நிலையில் சேர்க்கும் வாக்கியத்தின் குற எங்கள் மாதிரி தகவல் மற்றும் அதே நேரத்தில் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வாக்குகளின் செயல்பாடு மேம்படுத்துகிறது. நாங்கள் மனிதன் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பல வாக்கு சுருக்கும் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் மீது எங்கள் சோதனைகளை செய்து புதிய பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட இயந்திர மொழிமாற அதற்கு மேலும், நாம் எங்கள் வாக்கு மட்டத்தின் மாதிரி பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட பல்ஆவணங்கள் சுருக்கும் அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்து நாம் ஒரு விருப்பமான தீர்வு முன்பு ஆராய்ச்சியில் குறிப்பிடாத நீளம் வரம்பு பிரச்சினைக்கான தீர்வு ஆவண மட்டத்தின் சுருக்கத்திற்கு, நாம் இரண்டு வேறு வித்தியாசமான தளங்களின் தகவல் அமைப்புகளில் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம் (உ. ம். செய்தி கட்டுரையை மற் நம்முடைய சோதனைகள் முறைமைகளில் முக்கியமான முன்னேற்றங்களை காண்பிக்கிறது என்று.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کام میں ایک غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل تعلیم سیستم کی تولید کرنے کا ارادہ کرتے ہیں. ہم ایک پارافرٹسٹی جماعت فوزین موڈل طراحی کرتے ہیں جو جماعت فوزین اور پارافرٹسٹ کے مطابق جماعت کے مطابق جماعت کے مطابق اسکیپ-گرم لغات ابڈینگ موڈل کرتا ہے۔ ہماری مدل نے معلومات کی پوروٹ اور ایک ہی موقع پیدا ہوئے جماعتوں کی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر ہم انسان کے پیدا کیے ہوئے بہت سی جماعت ڈیٹ سٹ پر ہماری آزمائش کرتے ہیں اور بہت سی نئی پیشنهاد کی مشین ترجمہ (MT) ارزیابی متریک پر ہماری سیستم کا ارزیابی کرتے ہیں۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم اپنے مجلس لائل موڈل کو لازم کریں گے کہ ایک مثبت multi-document summarization سیسٹم کو لازم کریں جہاں دفتروں میں معمولاً ایک ارتباط دار جمع ہے۔ ہم نے کلاسیکی جمع لامٹی مسئلہ کے لئے ایک بہترین حل کا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو اگلے تحقیقات میں حل نہیں کیا گیا تھا۔ ہم دو مختلف ڈومین کے ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں (جیسے اخبار لکھی اور کارساز ریویزوں) جو بہت سے دکھائی دکھائی کے لئے اچھی طرح مناسب ہیں۔ ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ روش کے ذریعے بہت اضافہ کرتی ہیں', 'uz': "Bu ishda, biz ko'pgina hujjatning moslamalarida saqlab qolmagan abstractiv hisoblash tizimni yaratishga qaramaymiz. Biz bir paraphrastik so'zning fusion modelini yaratib, birlashtirilgan so'zning fusion va paraphrasiyasini birlashtirish mumkin. Bizning modelimiz maʼlumotni kodlash va shu paytda yaratilgan so'zlarning asoslanganni oshirish mumkin. Biz inson yaratilgan bir necha so'zlar kompyuterni bajaramiz va bizning tizimimizni yangi yaxshi taklif qilingan mashina tarjima metriklariga qiymatmiz. Koʻrsatgich, biz bir xil hujjatning ko'plab bogʻ'liq soʻzlarni ishga tushirish uchun maxfiy soʻzni qoʻllamiz. Biz o'zimiz oldingi taʼminlovchida qo'llanmagan klassik umumiy uzunligi muammolari uchun optimal solution qilamiz. @ info Our experiments demonstrate that the methods bring significant improvements over the state-of-the-art methods.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi hướng tới việc phát triển một hệ thống tóm tắt trừu tượng không được giám sát trong chế độ đa tài liệu. Chúng tôi thiết kế một mô hình ảnh tâm lý tổng hợp các câu, tiến hành tổng hợp các câu và diễn giải bằng cách trộn từ bỏ qua biểu đồ ở mức độ câu. Mẫu của chúng tôi cải thiện việc che đậy thông tin và đồng thời thu hút các câu đã tạo ra. Chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên các tập tin nén đa phần con người và đánh giá hệ thống của chúng tôi về một số lượng đo đánh giá Machine vừa được đề xuất (MTV). Thêm nữa, chúng tôi áp dụng kiểu mô hình mức án để thực hiện một hệ thống tóm tắt tập thể nhiều tài liệu, nơi các tài liệu thường chứa một câu tương tự. Chúng tôi cũng đề nghị một giải pháp tối ưu cho vấn đề giới hạn ngắn gọn cổ điển chưa được giải quyết trong quá khứ. Để tóm tắt cấp tài liệu, chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm trên các tập tin của hai miền khác nhau (v.v. d., bài báo và bài kiểm tra người dùng) rất thích hợp cho việc tổng hợp các văn bản trừu tượng nhiều tài liệu. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi chứng minh rằng phương pháp mang lại những cải tiến quan trọng.', 'bg': 'В тази работа се стремим да разработим система за абстрактно обобщаване без надзор в мултидокументална обстановка. Проектираме парафрастичен модел за сливане на изречения, който съвместно извършва сливане на изречения и парафразиране, използвайки модел за вграждане на думи на ниво изречение. Нашият модел подобрява информационното покритие и същевременно абстрактността на генерираните изречения. Ние провеждаме нашите експерименти с генерирани от човека множество изречения компресиращи набори от данни и оценяваме нашата система по няколко новопредложени измервателни показатели за машинен превод (МТ). Освен това прилагаме нашия модел на ниво изречения, за да внедрим абстрактна система за обобщаване на множество документи, където документите обикновено съдържат свързан набор от изречения. Предлагаме и оптимално решение на класическия проблем с ограничението на дължината, който не е бил разгледан в предишните изследвания. За обобщението на ниво документ провеждаме експерименти с набори от данни от две различни области (например новинарска статия и потребителски рецензии), които са подходящи за абстрактно обобщаване на множество документи. Нашите експерименти показват, че методите носят значителни подобрения пред най-съвременните методи.', 'nl': 'In dit werk streven we naar het ontwikkelen van een onbeheerd abstractief samenvattingssysteem in de multi-document setting. We ontwerpen een parafrastisch zinsfusiemodel dat gezamenlijk zinsfusie en parafrasering uitvoert met behulp van skip-gram woord embedded model op zinsniveau. Ons model verbetert de informatiedekking en tegelijkertijd de abstractiviteit van de gegenereerde zinnen. We voeren onze experimenten uit op de door mensen gegenereerde multi-zinnen compressie datasets en evalueren ons systeem op verschillende nieuw voorgestelde Machine Translation (MT) evaluatiestatistieken. Verder passen we ons zinsniveau model toe om een abstractief multi-document samenvattingssysteem te implementeren waarbij documenten meestal een verwante set zinnen bevatten. We stellen ook een optimale oplossing voor het klassieke probleem van de samenvattingslengte voor, dat in het verleden niet werd behandeld. Voor de samenvatting op documentniveau voeren we experimenten uit op de datasets van twee verschillende domeinen (bijvoorbeeld nieuwsberichten en gebruikersreviews) die zeer geschikt zijn voor multi-document abstractieve samenvatting. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat de methoden aanzienlijke verbeteringen brengen ten opzichte van de state-of-the-art methoden.', 'da': 'I dette arbejde har vi til formål at udvikle et uautoriseret abstrakt sammenfatningssystem i multidokumentindstillingen. Vi designer en parafrastisk sætning fusionsmodel, der i fællesskab udfører sætning fusion og parafrasering ved hjælp af skip-gram ordindlejring model på sætningsniveau. Vores model forbedrer informationsdækningen og samtidig abstraktiviteten af de genererede sætninger. Vi udfører vores eksperimenter på de menneskelige genererede komprimeringsdatasæt med flere sætninger og evaluerer vores system på flere nyligt foreslåede Machine Translation (MT) evalueringsmetrics. Desuden anvender vi vores sætningsniveau model til at implementere et abstrakt multi-dokument opsummeringssystem, hvor dokumenter normalt indeholder et relateret sæt sætninger. Vi foreslår også en optimal løsning på det klassiske sammenfattende længdegrænseproblem, som ikke blev behandlet i tidligere forskning. Til dokumentniveau resuméet gennemfører vi eksperimenter på datasæt af to forskellige domæner (f.eks. nyhedsartikler og brugeranmeldelser), som er velegnede til abstraktiv opsummering af flere dokumenter. Vores eksperimenter viser, at metoderne bringer betydelige forbedringer i forhold til de nyeste metoder.', 'hr': 'U ovom poslu ciljamo se razviti neodređen sustav abstraktivnog sažetka u višestrukom postavljanju dokumenta. Mi dizajniramo parafrastički model fuzije rečenica koji zajedno izvršava fuziju rečenica i parafrazaciju koristeći model uključivanja riječi preskočivanja na razini rečenica. Naš model poboljšava podatke i u isto vrijeme abstraktivnost proizvedenih rečenica. Provodimo svoje eksperimente na kompresijskim podacima mnogih rečenica u ljudima i procjenjujemo naš sustav na nekoliko novo predloženih metrika za procjenu uređaja prevoda (MT). Osim toga, primjenjujemo model razine rečenica za provedbu apstraktivnog sustava sažetka višestrukih dokumenta gdje dokumenti obično sadrže povezan niz rečenica. Također predlažemo optimalno rješenje za klasično ograničenje trajanja sažetka koji nije riješen u prošlim istraživanjima. Za sažetak razine dokumenta provodimo eksperimente na podacima dva različita domena (npr. novinski članak i pregled korisnika) koji su dobro odgovarajući za većinu apstraktivnih sažetka dokumenta. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da metode donose značajne poboljšanje tijekom države umjetnosti.', 'de': 'Ziel dieser Arbeit ist die Entwicklung eines unbeaufsichtigten abstrakten Zusammenfassungssystems im Multi-Document Setting. Wir entwerfen ein paraphrastisches Satzfusionsmodell, das gemeinsam Satzfusion und Paraphrasierung mittels Skip-Gramm Worteinbettungsmodell auf Satzebene durchführt. Unser Modell verbessert die Informationsabdeckung und gleichzeitig die Abstraktivität der generierten Sätze. Wir führen unsere Experimente an den vom Menschen generierten Datensätzen zur Komprimierung mehrerer Sätze durch und evaluieren unser System anhand mehrerer neu vorgeschlagener Bewertungsmetriken für maschinelle Übersetzung (MT). Darüber hinaus wenden wir unser Satz-Level-Modell an, um ein abstraktives Mehrdokument-Zusammenfassungssystem zu implementieren, bei dem Dokumente normalerweise einen verwandten Satz von Sätzen enthalten. Wir schlagen auch eine optimale Lösung für das klassische Summary Length Limit Problem vor, das in der bisherigen Forschung nicht angesprochen wurde. Für die Zusammenfassung auf Dokumentenebene führen wir Experimente an Datensätzen zweier unterschiedlicher Domänen (z.B. Nachrichtenartikel und Nutzerreviews) durch, die sich gut für die abstraktive Zusammenfassung mehrerer Dokumente eignen. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass die Methoden signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber den State-of-the-Art-Methoden bringen.', 'ko': '이 작업에서 우리의 목표는 다중 문서 환경에서 감독이 없는 요약 시스템을 개발하는 것이다.우리는 해석 문장 융합 모델을 설계했다. 이 모델은 문장 차원에서 skip-gram 단어를 사용하여 삽입 모델을 연합하여 문장 융합과 해석을 집행한다.우리의 모델은 정보 범위율을 높였고 문장 생성의 추상성을 높였다.우리는 인공적으로 생성된 다문장 압축 데이터 집합에서 실험을 하고 몇 가지 새로운 기계번역(MT) 평가 지표에서 우리의 시스템을 평가했다.그 밖에 우리는 우리의 문장급 모델을 응용하여 추상적인 다중 문서 요약 시스템을 실현했다. 그 중에서 문서는 보통 관련 문장을 포함한다.경전의 요약 길이 제한 문제에 대해서도 우리는 가장 좋은 해답을 제시했다.문서급 요약에 대해 우리는 두 가지 서로 다른 분야(예를 들어 뉴스 기사와 사용자 평론)의 데이터 집합에서 실험을 실시했는데 이 두 분야는 다중 문서 요약에 매우 적합하다.우리의 실험은 가장 선진적인 방법에 비해 이런 방법들이 현저한 개선을 가져왔다는 것을 보여 주었다.', 'id': 'Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami bertujuan untuk mengembangkan sistem resumen abstraktif yang tidak diawasi dalam pengaturan multi-dokumen. Kami merancang model fusi kalimat parafrastik yang bersama-sama melakukan fusi kalimat dan parafrasa menggunakan model melewati-gram kata embedding kalimat pada tingkat kalimat. Model kami memperbaiki penutupan informasi dan pada saat yang sama abstraksi kalimat yang dihasilkan. Kami melakukan eksperimen kami pada dataset kompresi multi kalimat yang dibuat manusia dan mengevaluasi sistem kami pada beberapa metrik evaluasi mesin terjemahan (MT) yang baru diusulkan. Selain itu, kami menerapkan model tingkat kalimat kami untuk mengimplementasikan sistem abstraktif multi-dokumen penerangan dimana dokumen biasanya mengandung set kalimat yang berhubungan. Kami juga mengusulkan solusi optimal untuk masalah batas panjang ringkasan klasik yang tidak diselesaikan dalam penelitian masa lalu. Untuk ringkasan tingkat dokumen, kami melakukan eksperimen pada set data dari dua domain yang berbeda (contohnya artikel berita dan penelitian pengguna) yang cocok untuk ringkasan abstraktif multi-dokumen. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa metode membawa peningkatan yang signifikan atas metode state-of-the-art.', 'fa': 'در این کار، ما هدف داریم به توسعه یک سیستم جمع\u200cآوری غیرقابل تحریک در تنظیم سند\u200cهای زیادی داشته باشیم. ما یک مدل فشار جمله پارافراست را طراحی می\u200cکنیم که با استفاده از مدل فشار جمله\u200cای در سطح جمله با استفاده از کلمه\u200cهای فشار گرم\u200cگرم به هم اجرا می\u200cکند. مدل ما پوشش اطلاعات را بهتر می\u200cکند و در همین زمان مطلب\u200cگیری از جمله\u200cهای تولید می\u200cکند. ما آزمایش\u200cهایمان را روی مجموعه\u200cهای فشار مجموعه\u200cای از جمله\u200cهای انسان تولید می\u200cکنیم و سیستم\u200cهایمان را روی چند متریک ارزیابی ماشین ترجمه (MT) تازه پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. علاوه بر این، ما مدل سطح جمله\u200cمان را برای اجرای یک سیستم جمع\u200cآوری چندین سند استفاده می\u200cکنیم که سند معمولاً مجموعه جمله\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای ارتباطی دارد. ما همچنین یک راه حل بهترین برای مشکل طول عمومی کلاسیک پیشنهاد می کنیم که در تحقیقات گذشته درباره آن حل نشده است. برای جمع سطح سند، ما آزمایش\u200cها را روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دو دامنه متفاوت انجام می\u200cدهیم (مثال مقاله اخبار و بررسی\u200cهای کاربر) که برای جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای مختلف سند\u200cها مناسب است. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که روش\u200cها بهترین\u200cهای بزرگی را بر روی روش\u200cهای هنر می\u200cآورند.', 'sw': 'Katika kazi hii, tunakusudia kuendeleza mfumo wa muhtasari usio na uhakika katika mazingira ya nyaraka mbalimbali. Tunaweza kutengeneza modeli ya msemo wa sentenca inayotengenezwa kwa pamoja na kutekeleza msongo wa hukumu na upinzani kwa kutumia muundo wa maneno ya upinzani katika ngazi ya hukumu. Mfano wetu unaboresha taarifa za habari na wakati ule ule ule ule wa kutokuwepo kwa ukatili wa hukumu zilizozaliwa. Tunafanya majaribio yetu kuhusu seti za kompyuta za sentenca mbalimbali za binadamu na kutathmini mfumo wetu kuhusu tafiti za Tafsiri za Mashine mpya zilizopendekezwa (MT). Furthermore, we apply our sentence level model to implement an abstractive multi-document summarization system where documents usually contain a related set of sentences.  Pia tunapendekeza suluhisho la optimal kwa ajili ya tatizo la muda wa muhula wa kipindi hiki ambalo halijadiliwa katika utafiti uliopita. Kwa muhtasari wa kiwango cha nyaraka, tunafanya majaribio katika seti za data za maeneo mawili tofauti (kwa mfano makala ya habari na maoni ya watumiaji) ambazo zinahitajika vizuri kwa ajili ya muhtasari wa nyaraka nyingi za kinyume cha habari. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hizo zinaleta maboresho makubwa zaidi ya njia za sanaa.', 'sq': 'Në këtë punë, ne synojmë të zhvillojmë një sistem abstraktiv të përmbledhur në rregullimin e shumë dokumenteve. Ne dizajnojmë një model parafrastik të fusionit të frazëve që kryen së bashku fusionin e frazëve dhe parafrazën duke përdorur një model skip-gram të përfshirjes së fjalës në nivelin e frazës. Modeli ynë përmirëson mbulimin e informacionit dhe në të njëjtën kohë abstraktivitetin e fjalëve të gjeneruara. Ne kryejmë eksperimentet tona në të dhënat e kompresionit me shumë fjalë të gjeneruara nga njerëzit dhe vlerësojmë sistemin tonë në disa metrika të propozuara për vlerësimin e përkthimit të makinave (MT). Përveç kësaj, ne aplikojmë modelin tonë të nivelit të fjalëve për të zbatuar një sistem abstraktiv të përmbledhjes së shumëdokumenteve ku dokumentet zakonisht përmbajnë një sërë fjalësh të lidhura. Ne propozojmë gjithashtu një zgjidhje optimale për problem in klasik të kufirit të gjatësisë së përmbledhjes që nuk u trajtua në kërkimet e kaluara. Për përmbledhjen e nivelit të dokumentit, ne kryejmë eksperimente në grupet e të dhënave të dy domeneve të ndryshme (për shembull, artikujt e lajmeve dhe përmbledhjet e përdoruesve) që janë të përshtatshme mirë për përmbledhjen abstraktive të shumëdokumenteve. Our experiments demonstrate that the methods bring significant improvements over the state-of-the-art methods.', 'tr': 'Bu işde, birnäçe sened düzümlerinde saklanmaýan abstraktiw bir sistemi bejermek niýetide. Biz bir parafratik sözlem birleşmesini we frazlemleri birleştirýän bir şekilde sözlem bilen atlamak üçin bir parafratik sözlem birleşmesini tasarlýarys Biziň modelimiz maglumaty örän köpürleýär we şol wagtda üretilen sözlerin abstraktylyklygyny üýtgedýär. Biz adamlaryň döredilen köp sözler hasaplamak datajylary üzerinde deneylerimizi çykarýarys we sistemamyzy täze täze teklip eden Maşynyň terjime (MT) deňlenme metriklerde deňleýäris Munuň üçin, sözlerimiz derejesi nusgasyny soňsuz bir multi-sened jemgyýetleme sistemini implement etmek üçin uygulaýarys. Bu ýerde senediň adatça sözleriň ýaly düzümlerni bar. Biz hem soňky araştyrmalarda çözilmedik klasik gyzykly durmuş meselesi üçin optimal çözüm teklip edip görýäris. Sened derejesi holasasy üçin, bir näçe desktap abstraktiw holasasy üçin gowy mümkin edilen 2 dürli sahypalaryň (meseläp, täzelikler makala we ullançylar) deneyleri çykýarys. Biziň deneylerimiz çözümleriň ýagdaýyň durumynda möhüm gelişmeleri getirýändigini görkez.', 'am': 'በዚህ ሥራ በብዙ ሰነድ ማቀናጃ ውስጥ ያልተጠበቀው አቋራጭ ማቀናጃ ሲስተካከል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የፋራፊስቲ ቃላት ፊስዮን ሞዴል እና በተጠቃሚ ቃላት በክፍለ ደረጃ ውስጥ የክፍለ ቃላት አካባቢ እና የግንኙነቶችን መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የመረጃ ክፍተቶችን እና በዚያው ሰዓት የፍጥረት ክፍተቶችን ማሻሻል፡፡ አዲስ በተዘጋጀው የመኪን ትርጉም (MT) ሚትርጓሜዎችን እናስተዋልናለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ ሰነዱን በተቃውሞ የሥርዓት ደረጃን ሞዴል እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት ውስጥ ያልተጨመረበት ለክላሲካዊ የረዘመ ቁጥር ግንኙነት ግንኙነት መፍትሄን እናሳስባለን፡፡ ለሰነዱ ደረጃ ማጠቃለያ፣ ለሁለት ልዩ ዶሜኖችን (ለምሳሌ የዜና አርእስት እና ተጠቃሚው መልዕክቶች) የተጠቃሚ ክፍተቶችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የሥርዓት-አካል ሥርዓት ላይ ትልቅ ማድረግ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie werk doen ons doel om 'n ononderwerpende abstraktiewe opsomming stelsel te ontwikkel in die veelvuldige dokumentinstelling. Ons ontwerp 'n parafratisiese setelsfrasiefusionmodel wat saamstig uitvoer setelsfrasiefusioning en parafrasiering met die gebruik van skip- gram woord inbêring model op die setvlak. Ons model verbeter die inligting omdekking en op dieselfde tyd abstraktiviteit van die genereerde setinge. Ons doen ons eksperimente op die mensgenereerde multi sentence kompressie datastelle en evalueer ons stelsel op verskeie nuwe voorgestelde Masjien Vertaling (MT) evaluering metries. Ons het ook ons setvlak model aanwend om 'n abstraktiewe multidokument opsomming stelsel te implementeer waar dokumente gewoonlik 'n verwante stel setings bevat. Ons het ook 'n optimale oplossing voorgestel vir die klassieke opsomming lengte beperk probleem wat nie in die verlede ondersoek geadres is nie. Vir die dokumentvlak opsomming, doen ons eksperimente op die datastelle van twee verskillende domeine (bv. nuusartikel en gebruikerresensies) wat goed geskik is vir multidokument abstraktiewe opsomming. Ons eksperimente wys dat die metodes betekende verbeteringe oor die staat van die kunstensmetodes bring.", 'hy': 'In this work, we aim at developing an unsupervised abstractive summarization system in the multi-document setting.  Մենք նախագծում ենք մի պարաֆրաստիկ նախադասությունների ֆուզիոն մոդել, որը միասին կատարում է նախադասությունների ֆուզիոն և պարաֆրազիոն՝ օգտագործելով նախադասությունների մակարդակում բառերի ներգրավման օրինակ: Մեր մոդելը բարելավում է տեղեկատվության ծավալը և միաժամանակ ստեղծված նախադասությունների վերացրատիվությունը: Մենք կատարում ենք մեր փորձարկումները մարդկանց կողմից ստեղծված բազմա նախադասությունների ընդգծման տվյալների համակարգերի վրա և գնահատում ենք մեր համակարգը նորից առաջարկված մետրաչափումների վրա: Ավելին, մենք կիրառում ենք մեր նախադասությունների մակարդակի մոդելը վերացական բազմափաստաթղթերի համառոտագրման համակարգի իրականացման համար, որտեղ փաստաթղթերը սովորաբար պարունակում են կապված նախադասություններ: Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք լավագույն լուծում դասական համառոտագրական երկարության սահմանափակումների խնդիրը, որը անցյալ հետազոտություններում չէր լուծվել: Փաստաթղթի մակարդակի համառոտագրության համար մենք կատարում ենք փորձեր երկու տարբեր բնագավառների տվյալների համակարգերի վրա (օրինակ, նորությունների հոդված և օգտագործողների վերլուծություններ), որոնք լավ համապատասխանում են բազմաթիվ փաստաթղթերի վերացական համառոտագր Մեր փորձերը ցույց են տալիս, որ մեթոդները նշանակալի բարելավումներ են բերում ամենաբարձր մեթոդների վերաբերյալ:', 'bn': 'এই কাজে আমরা উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছি বহুল নথিপত্রের বৈশিষ্ট্যের মধ্যে একটি অরক্ষণশীল সংক্ষেপ ব্যবস্থা উন্নয়নের উদ্দেশ্য। আমরা একটি প্যারাফ্রাস্টিক বাক্যের ফ্যাশন মডেল ডিজাইন করি যা একত্রে বাক্য ফ্যাশন এবং প্যারাফ্রেসিং ব্যবহার করে স্পিপ-গ্রাম শব্দের ব আমাদের মডেল তথ্যের কাভারেজ উন্নত করে এবং একই সাথে তৈরি করা শাস্তির অস্বীকার করে দেয়। আমরা মানুষের জন্মিত বহুজাতিক কারাদণ্ড সম্মুখীন ডাটাসেটের উপর আমাদের পরীক্ষা করি এবং নতুন প্রস্তাবিত মেশিন অনুবাদ (এমটি) মূল্যায়নের মেট এছাড়াও, আমরা আমাদের বাক্যের স্তরের মডেল প্রয়োগ করি এক অস্বীকৃতিক মাল্টিডমেন্ট সংক্রান্ত সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করার জন্য যেখানে নথিপত্ আমরা ক্লাসিক্যাল দীর্ঘ সীমাবদ্ধ সমস্যার জন্য একটি অপ্রাপ্ত সমাধান প্রস্তাব করি যা অতীত গবেষণায় নিয়ে কথা বলা হয়নি। ডকুমেন্টের সার্মিটের জন্য আমরা দুটি ভিন্ন ডোমেনের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি (যেমন সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ এবং ব্যবহারকারীর প্রতিবেদন) যা বহ আমাদের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে এই পদ্ধতি রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের পদ্ধতিতে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি প্রদান করে।', 'ca': "En aquest treball, volem desenvolupar un sistema de resume abstracte sense supervisió en un entorn multidocumental. dissenyem un model de fusió de frases parafràstiques que fa fusió de frases i parafrases juntament fent servir un model d'incorporació de parafrases skip-gram a nivell de frases. El nostre model millora la cobertura d'informació i, al mateix temps, la abstracció de les frases generades. Fem els nostres experiments en els conjunts de dades de compressió multifrases generats per humans i evaluem el nostre sistema en diverses mètriques d'evaluació de la traducció màquina (MT) proposades de nou. A més, aplicam el nostre model de nivell de frases per implementar un sistema abstracte de resume multidocumental on els documents normalment contenen un conjunt de frases relacionats. També proposem una solució óptima per al problema clàssic del límit de la llargada de resum que no va ser abordat en la recerca passada. Per al resum del nivell de documentació, fem experiments en conjunts de dades de dos dominis diferents (per exemple, article de notícies i revisions d'usuaris) que són ben adaptats a una resumensió abstracta multidocumental. Els nostres experiments demostren que els mètodes porten millores significatives sobre els mètodes més avançats.", 'cs': 'V této práci se zaměřujeme na vývoj bez dohledu abstraktivního souhrnného systému v multidokumentovém prostředí. Navrhujeme model fúze parafrastických vět, který společně provádí fúzi vět a parafrázu pomocí přeskočeného modelu vložení slov na úrovni věty. Náš model zlepšuje pokrytí informací a zároveň abstraktivitu generovaných vět. Naše experimenty provádíme na datových sadách komprese generovaných člověkem a vyhodnocujeme náš systém na několika nově navržených hodnotících metrikách strojového překladu (MT). Dále používáme náš model úrovně vět k implementaci abstraktivního souhrnného systému více dokumentů, kde dokumenty obvykle obsahují související sadu vět. Navrhujeme také optimální řešení klasického problému mezní délky souhrnu, který v minulém výzkumu nebyl řešen. Pro shrnutí úrovně dokumentu provádíme experimenty na datových sadách dvou různých domén (např. zpravodajský článek a recenze uživatelů), které jsou vhodné pro abstraktivní shrnutí více dokumentů. Naše experimenty ukazují, že metody přinášejí významné zlepšení oproti nejmodernějším metodám.', 'fi': 'T채ss채 ty철ss채 pyrimme kehitt채m채채n valvomattoman abstraktiivisen yhteenvedon j채rjestelm채n moniasiakirjaymp채rist철ss채. Suunnittelemme parafrastisen lausefuusiomallin, joka yhdess채 suorittaa lausefuusion ja parafrasoinnin lausetasolla skip-gramm-sanan upotusmallin avulla. Mallimme parantaa luotujen lauseiden tietokattavuutta ja abstraktisuutta. Teemme kokeita ihmisen tuottamilla monilausepakkausaineistoilla ja arvioimme j채rjestelm채채mme useilla uusilla konek채채nn철ksen arviointimittareilla. Lis채ksi toteutamme lausetasomalliamme abstraktiivisen monidokumenttien yhteenvetoj채rjestelm채n, jossa dokumentit sis채lt채v채t yleens채 niihin liittyvi채 lauseita. Ehdotamme my철s optimaalista ratkaisua klassiseen tiivistelm채n pituusraja ongelmaan, jota ei k채sitelty aiemmassa tutkimuksessa. Dokumenttitason yhteenvetoa varten teemme kokeiluja kahden eri toimialueen aineistoista (esim. uutisartikkeli ja k채ytt채j채arvostelut), jotka soveltuvat hyvin monidokumenttiseen abstraktiin yhteenvetoon. Kokeemme osoittavat, ett채 menetelm채t tuovat merkitt채vi채 parannuksia uusimpiin menetelmiin verrattuna.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös on meie eesmärk arendada järelevalveta abstraktse kokkuvõtlussüsteemi mitme dokumendi seadmes. Me kujundame parafrastilise lausefusiooni mudeli, mis ühiselt teostab lausefusiooni ja parafraseerimist, kasutades lausetasemel skip-gramm sõna manustamise mudelit. Meie mudel parandab genereeritud lausete infokatvust ja abstraktsust. Me teeme oma katseid inimese loodud mitme lausega tihendamise andmekogumitega ja hindame oma süsteemi mitmete hiljuti väljapakutud masintõlke (MT) hindamismeetodite põhjal. Lisaks rakendame oma lausetaseme mudelit abstraktse mitmekordse kokkuvõtliku süsteemi rakendamiseks, kus dokumendid sisaldavad tavaliselt seotud lauseid. Samuti pakume välja optimaalse lahenduse klassikalise kokkuvõtte pikkuse piirmäära probleem, mida ei käsitletud varasemates uuringutes. Dokumenditaseme kokkuvõtte jaoks teostame katseid kahe erineva valdkonna andmekogumitega (nt uudiste artikkel ja kasutajate ülevaated), mis sobivad hästi mitme dokumendi abstraktseks kokkuvõtteks. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et meetodid toovad kaasaegsete meetoditega võrreldes märkimisväärseid parandusi.', 'az': 'Bu işdə, çoxlu belədir qurğularında müəyyən edilməmiş abstraktiv qurğulama sistemini təhsil etmək istəyirik. Biz bir parafrastik cümləlik fəsasiyonu modeli tasarlayırıq ki, cümlələr fəsasiyonu və parafraksiyonu cümlənin səviyyəsinə istifadə edir. Bizim modellərimiz məlumatların örtüsünü daha yaxşılaşdırır və bu vaxt yaratdığı cümlələrin abstraktivi. Biz insanların yaratdığı çoxlu cümlələr kompressiya veri quruları barəsində təcrübələrimizi və sistemimizi yeni təcrübə edilən Machine Translation (MT) değerlendirmə metriklərində təcrübə edirik. Daha sonra, biz cümlələrimizin səviyyə modelini abstraktiv çoxlu belədi təmizləmə sistemini istifadə etmək üçün istifadə edirik. Biz də əvvəlki araştırmalarda çəkilməmiş klasik qısqa uzunluğu problemi üçün optimal çözüm təklif edirik. Dökümət səviyyəsinə g örə, çoxlu dökümət abstraktiv təmizləməsi üçün yaxşı uyğun iki müxtəlif domenin (məsələn, xəbər məlumatı və istifadəçi təmizləməsi üçün) verilən dəyişiklik qurğularını təşviq edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz təcrübələrimiz möhkəm təcrübə metodlarını göstərir.', 'bs': 'U ovom poslu, ciljamo se razviti neodređeni sistem abstraktivnog sažetka u multidokumentnom postavljanju. Mi dizajniramo parafrastički model fuzije rečenica koji zajedno izvršava fuziju rečenica i parafrazaciju koristeći model uključujući riječi preskočivanja na razini rečenica. Naš model poboljšava pokrivanje informacija i u isto vrijeme abstraktivnost proizvedenih rečenica. Provodimo eksperimente na kompresijskim podacima kompresija sa mnogim rečenicama i procjenjujemo naš sistem na nekoliko novih predloženih metrika za procjenu automatskog prevoda (MT). Osim toga, primjenjujemo model razine kazne za provedbu abstraktivnog multidokumentacijskog sustava za sažetak, gdje dokumenti obično sadrže povezan niz rečenica. Također predlažemo optimalno rješenje za klasično ograničenje ograničenja dužine sažetka koji nije riješen u prošlim istraživanjima. Za sažetak nivoa dokumenta, provodimo eksperimente na setima podataka dva različita domena (npr. novinski članak i pregled korisnika) koji su dobro odgovarajući za multidokumentalnu abstraktivnu sažetku. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da metode donose značajne poboljšanje nad državnim metodama umjetnosti.', 'jv': 'Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita aksi kanggo nggawe sistem di sumulasi apakno ora bisa nguasai perusahaan kanggo nggawe multi-dokumen. Monday model kita ngerti nggawe informasi alamat sak ngono cah-cah pisan kelas nang nguasai penting winih sing apik dhéwé. Anyone politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awakdhéwé éntuk nggawe Resolusi Optimisan kanggo nggawe resmi dadi sing nganggo perusahaan sing ora dadi iki dibutuhke sing dumadhi. Sampur dadi nggawe dokumen seneng pisan, kita dadi nggawe operan ning dataset iki dadi bino, dadi sing dibutungan seneng pisan karo usual tapi nggawe akeh operan kanggo resumen multi-document absolute. FindOK Awak dhéwé éntukno ngerasai yang cukup, kuwi hal-hal ngono kuwi nggawe barang langgar sampeyan karo hal-layang.', 'sk': 'V tem delu si prizadevamo razviti sistem nenadzorovanega abstraktivnega povzetka v večdokumentnem okolju. Oblikujemo parafrastični model fuzije stavkov, ki skupaj izvaja fuzijo stavkov in parafraziranje z uporabo modela vgradnje besed preskoči gram na nivoju stavka. Naš model izboljšuje informacijsko pokritost in hkrati abstraktivnost ustvarjenih stavkov. Naše poskuse izvajamo na naborih podatkov o stiskanju večstavkov, ki jih ustvari človek, in ocenjujemo naš sistem na podlagi več novih predlaganih meritev vrednotenja strojnega prevajanja (MT). Poleg tega uporabljamo naš model nivoja stavkov za implementacijo abstraktivnega sistema za povzetek več dokumentov, kjer dokumenti običajno vsebujejo povezan nabor stavkov. Predlagamo tudi optimalno rešitev za problem klasičnega povzetka meje dolžine, ki v preteklih raziskavah ni bil obravnavan. Za povzetek na ravni dokumenta izvajamo poskuse na naborih podatkov dveh različnih domen (npr. novice in preglede uporabnikov), ki so primerni za abstraktivno povzetek večdokumentov. Naši poskusi kažejo, da metode prinašajo znatne izboljšave v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi metodami.', 'ha': "Daga wannan aikin, Munã kwaɗayin mu ƙara wata na'urar tsari wanda ba ta tsare ba, kuma don ka sami tsarin takardar multi-dokuman. Tuna ƙayyade wani motali mai fusarwa na cewa na fassarata wanda ke aiki a haɗi da shi ga fusar da kuma yana amfani da misalin mai ƙunci da maganar cire-gram cikin daraja ga cire. @ info: tooltip Tuna tafiyar da jarrabayanmu a kan danne-danne-danne-danne-danne masu dangantar mutane na-danne, kuma munã hakarin tsarin mu a kan misalin tarjifanin da aka buɗa shi na-yanzu-tarjima na Mashinki (MT). Furan haka, muna amfani da misalin daraja ga cewa don mu yi amfani da tsarin kurejarin dokuman aiki na kanana-dokuman aiki, inda takardun takardun da ke ƙunsa da wasu takardar da aka sani. Tuna goyya da wata shimfiɗa masu amfani da matsayin muhimmanci na kursiga, wanda ba a yi addu'a ba a cikin tafitin da ya shige ta gaba. @ info: whatsthis Our experiments demonstrate that the methods bring significant improvements over the state-of-the-art methods.", 'he': 'בעבודה הזאת, אנו מכוונים לפתח מערכת מסכם אסטרקטיבית ללא השגחה בסיס המסמכים. אנו מעצבים מודל מיזוג משפטים פרפראסטי שמבצע ביחד מיזוג משפטים ובמיזוג פרפראסטי באמצעות מודל מילה skip-gram קישום ברמה המשפטים. המודל שלנו משפר את כיסוי המידע ובאותו הזמן אוסטרקטיבות של המשפטים שנוצרים. אנו מבצעים את הניסויים שלנו על קבוצות נתונים של דחפות רבות משפטים שנוצרו ע"י האדם ונעריך את המערכת שלנו על כמה מטריות הערכה של התרגום המכונית (MT) שהצעו כרגע. בנוסף, אנו משתמשים בדוגמא רמת המשפטים שלנו כדי להפעיל מערכת מסמכים רבים אוסטרקטיבית שבה מסמכים בדרך כלל מכילים קבוצת משפטים קשורה. אנחנו גם מציעים פתרון אופטימי לבעיה של הגבול של אורך הסכם הקלאסי שלא התייחסו למחקר שעבר. למען הסכם רמת המסמכים, אנו מבצעים ניסויים על קבוצת הנתונים של שתי תחומות שונות (למשל, מאמר חדשות ובדיקות משתמשים) שמתאימות היטב לסיוריזציה אוסטרקטיבית במספר מסמכים. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהשיטות מביאות שיפורים משמעותיים על שיטות המדינה.', 'bo': 'འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་ཆ་འདིའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་མེད་པའི་ཕྱོགས་ཉེན་ཁ་ཤས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་ ང་ཚོས་ཚིག ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་དེ་ཚོར་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྣམས་མེད་ཚུལ་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པར་ཡར་རྒྱས We conduct our experiments on the human-generated multi-sentence compression datasets and evaluate our system on several newly proposed Machine Translation (MT) evaluation metrics. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཚིག་གི་ཚིག ང་ཚོས་དུས་འདས་པའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་སྲོལ་རྒྱུན་གྱི་ཆེ་མཐོང་ཚད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བ། For the document level summary, we conduct experiments on the datasets of two different domains (e.g. news article and user reviews) which are well suited for multi-document abstractive summarization. Examples:showusername ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་ཐབས་ལམ་གཙོ་ཅན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་འགྱུར་རྐྱེན་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Adversarial Domain Adaptation for Variational Neural Language Generation in Dialogue Systems', 'es': 'Adaptación de dominios adversarios para la generación de lenguaje neuronal variacional en sistemas de diálogo', 'ar': 'تكييف المجال الخصامي لتوليد اللغة العصبية المتغيرة في أنظمة الحوار', 'pt': 'Adaptação de Domínio Adversário para Geração de Linguagem Neural Variacional em Sistemas de Diálogo', 'fr': 'Adaptation du domaine antagoniste pour la génération de langage neuronal variationnel dans les systèmes de dialogue', 'ja': '対話システムにおける多様な神経言語生成のための対立ドメイン適応', 'hi': 'संवाद प्रणालियों में भिन्नता तंत्रिका भाषा पीढ़ी के लिए प्रतिकूल डोमेन अनुकूलन', 'zh': '言系统中变分神经言生应域', 'ru': 'Адаптация домена противника для генерации вариационного нейронного языка в диалоговых системах', 'ga': 'Oiriúnú Fearainn Sáraíochta do Ghiniúint Néartheanga Athraitheach i gCórais Chomhphlé', 'ka': 'დიალოგი სისტემებში განსხვავებული ნეირალური ენათის შექმნა კონპერაციალური დიომენის ადაპტაცია', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή του αντικρουνικού τομέα για την παραλλαγή της νευρωνικής γλώσσας στα συστήματα διαλόγου', 'hu': 'Adversarial Domain adaptáció a variációs neurális nyelv generálásához a párbeszédrendszerekben', 'it': 'Adattamento del dominio avversario per la generazione del linguaggio neurale variabile nei sistemi di dialogo', 'kk': 'Диалог жүйелерінде айнымалы невралдық тілді құру үшін конверсариялық домен адаптациясы', 'lt': 'Nepageidaujamas domeno pritaikymas dialogo sistemose esančioms įvairių nervinių kalbų generacijoms', 'mk': 'Адаптација на отворен домен за генерација на варијационален неурален јазик во системите за дијалог', 'mt': 'Adattament ta’ Dominju Adversarju għall-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Lingwi Newrali Varjazzjonali fis-Sistemi ta’ Djalogu', 'ms': 'Adversarial Domain Adaptation for Variational Neural Language Generation in Dialogue Systems', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിലെ മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ നെയുറല്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ ജനിപ്പിനുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണന ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന', 'mn': 'Диалог системд өөрчлөлтийн мэдрэлийн хэл үүсгэх төлөвлөгөөний салбар зохицуулалт', 'no': 'Rekursarial domeneadaptasjon for variasjonal neuralspråk i dialogsystemet', 'pl': 'Adaptacja domeny przeciwnej dla wariacyjnego generowania języka neuronowego w systemach dialogowych', 'ro': 'Adaptarea domeniului adversar pentru generarea limbajului neural variabil in sistemele de dialog', 'sr': 'Adversarijska adaptacija domena za generaciju variacionalnog nervnog jezika u dijalogskim sistemima', 'si': 'සංවාද පද්ධතියේ වෙනස් න්\u200dයූරාල භාෂාව නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශක ඩෝමේන් අනුමාණය', 'so': 'Adaptation of Domain for generation of luqada diiwaanka ee kala duwan ee nidaamka diyaarinta', 'sv': 'Adversarial Domain Anpassning för variationsneralt språkgenerering i dialogsystem', 'ta': 'மாறிகளின் மொழி உருவாக்கத்திற்கான முன்னிருப்பு களம்', 'ur': 'Dialog Systems میں مختلف نیورال زبان پیدا کرنے کے لئے مخالف ڈومین اڈپٹیٹ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đặt nền văn hóa thay đổi cho hệ thống ngôn ngữ thần kinh thay đổi', 'bg': 'Адаптиране на рекламния домейн за генериране на вариационен неврален език в диалогови системи', 'nl': 'Aanpassing van tegenstrijdige domeinen voor variatieneurale taalgeneratie in dialoogsystemen', 'da': 'Adversarial Domain Adaption for Variational Neural Language Generation in Dialogue Systems', 'hr': 'Adversarial Domain Adaptation for Variational Neural Language Generation in Dialog Systems', 'id': 'Adaptasi Domain Adversarial untuk Generasi Bahasa Neural Variasi dalam Sistem Dialog', 'de': 'Adversariale Domänenanpassung zur Variationsneuroralen Sprachgenerierung in Dialogsystemen', 'ko': '대화 시스템에서 변분 신경 언어가 생성하는 대항역 자체 적응', 'fa': 'تغییرات دامنی مختلف برای تولید زبان عصبی متفاوتی در سیستم\u200cهای محاوره', 'sw': 'Tamko la Dunia kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa Lugha ya Kiasili katika Mfumo wa Dialogu', 'af': 'Rekursariale Domein Aanpassering vir Veranderlike Neurale Taal Generasie in Dialoog Sistems', 'sq': 'Adaptimi kundërshtar i domenit për Gjenerimin Variacional të Gjuhave Neurale në Sistemet e Dialogut', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'az': 'Dialoog Sistemlərində dəyişikli nöral dil yaradılışı üçün müvəffəqiyyətli Domain Adaptasyonu', 'hy': 'Խաղախտային համակարգերում գտնվող տարբերակային նյարդային լեզուների ստեղծման հակառակ դաշտի ադապտացիան', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমে বিভিন্ন নিউরেল ভাষা জেনারেশনের জন্য প্রাক্তন ডোমেইন অ্যাডাপ্টেশন', 'bs': 'Adversarijska adaptacija domena za generaciju variacionalnog nervnog jezika u dijalogskim sistemima', 'ca': 'Adaptació adversaria del domini per a la generació de llenguatges neuronals variacions en sistemes de diàleg', 'cs': 'Adaptace nepříznivé domény pro variační nerální generaci jazyků v dialogových systémech', 'fi': 'Adversarial Domain Adaptation for Variational Neural Language Generation in Dialogue Systems', 'et': 'Adversariaalne domeeni kohandamine variatsioonilise neurokeele genereerimiseks dialoogisüsteemides', 'tr': 'Dialog Systemleri içinde Çeşitli Nural Diller Bejer üçin Nusgala Etraplar', 'sk': 'Prilagajanje neželenih domen za ustvarjanje variacijskega živčnega jezika v dialognih sistemih', 'jv': 'Advertorial domain Adjustment for Variations Neral Language Generation in Dialog System', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Adversarial Domain Adaptation for Variational Neural Language Generation in Dialogue Systems', 'he': 'שינוי תחום נוגדי ליצירת שפת נוירולית שונות במערכות דיאלוגים'}
{'en': 'Domain Adaptation arises when we aim at learning from source domain a model that can perform acceptably well on a different target domain. It is especially crucial for Natural Language Generation (NLG) in Spoken Dialogue Systems when there are sufficient annotated data in the source domain, but there is a limited labeled data in the target domain. How to effectively utilize as much of existing abilities from source domains is a crucial issue in domain adaptation. In this paper, we propose an adversarial training procedure to train a Variational encoder-decoder based language generator via multiple adaptation steps. In this procedure, a model is first trained on a source domain data and then fine-tuned on a small set of target domain utterances under the guidance of two proposed critics. Experimental results show that the proposed method can effectively leverage the existing knowledge in the source domain to adapt to another related domain by using only a small amount of in-domain data.', 'ar': 'ينشأ تكييف المجال عندما نهدف إلى التعلم من مجال المصدر وهو نموذج يمكن أن يؤدي أداءً جيدًا مقبولاً في مجال هدف مختلف. إنه مهم بشكل خاص لتوليد اللغة الطبيعية (NLG) في أنظمة الحوار المنطوقة عندما تكون هناك بيانات مشروحة كافية في المجال المصدر ، ولكن هناك بيانات معنونة محدودة في المجال الهدف. كيفية الاستفادة الفعالة من القدرات الموجودة من مجالات المصدر هي قضية حاسمة في مجال التكيف. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح إجراء تدريب الخصومة لتدريب مولد لغة قائم على وحدة فك التشفير المتغيرة عبر خطوات تكيف متعددة. في هذا الإجراء ، يتم تدريب النموذج أولاً على بيانات مجال المصدر ثم يتم ضبطه بدقة على مجموعة صغيرة من كلمات المجال الهدف تحت إشراف اثنين من النقاد المقترحين. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن الطريقة المقترحة يمكن أن تستفيد بشكل فعال من المعرفة الموجودة في المجال المصدر للتكيف مع مجال آخر ذي صلة باستخدام كمية صغيرة فقط من البيانات في المجال.', 'es': 'La adaptación de dominios surge cuando pretendemos aprender del dominio de origen un modelo que pueda funcionar aceptablemente bien en un dominio de destino diferente. Es especialmente crucial para la generación de lenguaje natural (NLG) en los sistemas de diálogo oral cuando hay suficientes datos anotados en el dominio de origen, pero hay datos etiquetados limitados en el dominio de destino. Cómo utilizar eficazmente la mayor parte de las capacidades existentes de los dominios de origen es una cuestión crucial en la adaptación de dominios. En este artículo, proponemos un procedimiento de entrenamiento contradictorio para entrenar un generador de lenguaje basado en codificador-decodificador variacional a través de múltiples pasos de adaptación. En este procedimiento, primero se entrena un modelo en los datos de un dominio de origen y, a continuación, se ajusta con precisión en un pequeño conjunto de enunciados de dominio de destino bajo la guía de dos críticos propuestos. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el método propuesto puede aprovechar eficazmente el conocimiento existente en el dominio de origen para adaptarse a otro dominio relacionado mediante el uso de solo una pequeña cantidad de datos dentro del dominio.', 'pt': 'A Adaptação de Domínio surge quando buscamos aprender do domínio de origem um modelo que pode ter um desempenho aceitável em um domínio de destino diferente. É especialmente crucial para a geração de linguagem natural (NLG) em sistemas de diálogo falado quando há dados anotados suficientes no domínio de origem, mas há dados rotulados limitados no domínio de destino. Como utilizar efetivamente o máximo de habilidades existentes dos domínios de origem é uma questão crucial na adaptação do domínio. Neste artigo, propomos um procedimento de treinamento contraditório para treinar um gerador de linguagem baseado em codificador-decodificador Variacional por meio de várias etapas de adaptação. Nesse procedimento, um modelo é primeiro treinado em dados de domínio de origem e, em seguida, ajustado em um pequeno conjunto de enunciados de domínio de destino sob a orientação de dois críticos propostos. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o método proposto pode efetivamente alavancar o conhecimento existente no domínio de origem para se adaptar a outro domínio relacionado usando apenas uma pequena quantidade de dados no domínio.', 'fr': "L'adaptation de domaine survient lorsque nous cherchons à apprendre à partir du domaine source un modèle qui peut fonctionner de manière acceptable sur un domaine cible différent. Elle est particulièrement cruciale pour la génération de langage naturel (GNL) dans les systèmes de dialogue parlé lorsqu'il y a suffisamment de données annotées dans le domaine source, mais que les données étiquetées dans le domaine cible sont limitées. La manière d'utiliser efficacement autant de capacités existantes des domaines sources est une question cruciale dans l'adaptation des domaines. Dans cet article, nous proposons une procédure d'entraînement contradictoire pour entraîner un générateur de langage basé sur un encodeur-décodeur variationnel via plusieurs étapes d'adaptation. Dans cette procédure, un modèle est d'abord formé sur des données de domaine source, puis affiné sur un petit ensemble d'énoncés de domaine cible sous la direction de deux critiques proposées. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que la méthode proposée peut efficacement tirer parti des connaissances existantes dans le domaine source pour s'adapter à un autre domaine connexe en n'utilisant qu'une petite quantité de données internes au domaine.", 'ja': 'ドメイン適応は、異なるターゲットドメインで許容可能な良好なパフォーマンスを発揮できるモデルをソースドメインから学習することを目指す場合に生じます。 ソースドメインに十分な注釈付きデータがあるが、ターゲットドメインにラベル付けされたデータが限られている場合、Spoken Dialogue SystemsのNatural Language Generation （ NLG ）にとって特に重要です。 ソースドメインからの既存の能力をできるだけ有効に活用する方法は、ドメイン適応の重要な問題です。 本稿では，バリエーションエンコーダデコーダベースの言語ジェネレータを複数の適応ステップを介して訓練するための対抗訓練手順を提案する． この手順では、モデルはまずソースドメインデータでトレーニングされ、次に2人の提案された批評家の指導の下、小さなセットのターゲットドメイン発話で微調整される。 実験結果は、提案された方法が、少量のドメイン内データのみを使用することによって、ソースドメイン内の既存の知識を有効に活用して、別の関連ドメインに適応させることができることを示している。', 'zh': '当吾所以学于源域者,异域而应之也。 当源域中有足带注之数,而域中标记有限,于口语系统之自然语言生 (NLG) 尤重。 何以效用源域之见能是域应中之关键问题。 本文中,设对抗性训练程序,以步驿练变分编码器-解码器语生成器。 先练模形于源域数,次于二言之批评者,次于一小组之域。 实验结果表明法以少数,则用源域之知,适其所关。', 'hi': 'डोमेन अनुकूलन तब उत्पन्न होता है जब हम स्रोत डोमेन से एक मॉडल सीखने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं जो एक अलग लक्ष्य डोमेन पर स्वीकार्य रूप से अच्छी तरह से प्रदर्शन कर सकता है। यह विशेष रूप से स्पोकन डायलॉग सिस्टम में प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी (एनएलजी) के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है जब स्रोत डोमेन में पर्याप्त एनोटेट डेटा होता है, लेकिन लक्ष्य डोमेन में एक सीमित लेबल डेटा होता है। स्रोत डोमेन से मौजूदा क्षमताओं के रूप में प्रभावी ढंग से उपयोग कैसे करें, डोमेन अनुकूलन में एक महत्वपूर्ण मुद्दा है। इस पेपर में, हम कई अनुकूलन चरणों के माध्यम से एक परिवर्तनीय एन्कोडर-डिकोडर आधारित भाषा जनरेटर को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए एक प्रतिकूल प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इस प्रक्रिया में, एक मॉडल को पहले एक स्रोत डोमेन डेटा पर प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है और फिर दो प्रस्तावित आलोचकों के मार्गदर्शन में लक्ष्य डोमेन उच्चारण के एक छोटे सेट पर ठीक किया जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित विधि प्रभावी रूप से स्रोत डोमेन में मौजूदा ज्ञान का लाभ उठा सकती है ताकि केवल इन-डोमेन डेटा की एक छोटी राशि का उपयोग करके किसी अन्य संबंधित डोमेन के अनुकूल हो सके।', 'ru': 'Адаптация домена возникает, когда мы стремимся узнать из исходного домена модель, которая может работать приемлемо хорошо на другом целевом домене. Это особенно важно для генерации естественного языка (NLG) в системах разговорного диалога, когда в исходном домене достаточно аннотированных данных, но в целевом домене имеется ограниченное количество помеченных данных. Важнейшим вопросом в адаптации доменов является вопрос о том, как эффективно использовать как можно больше существующих возможностей, связанных с исходными доменами. В этой статье мы предлагаем состязательную процедуру обучения для обучения генератора языка на основе вариационного кодера-декодера посредством нескольких шагов адаптации. В этой процедуре модель сначала обучается на исходных данных домена, а затем дорабатывается на небольшом наборе терминов целевого домена под руководством двух предложенных критиков. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый метод может эффективно использовать существующие знания в исходной области для адаптации к другой связанной области, используя лишь небольшое количество внутридоменных данных.', 'ga': 'Tarlaíonn Oiriúnú Fearainn nuair a bhíonn sé mar aidhm againn foghlaim ón bhfearann foinse ar shamhail atá in ann feidhmiú go maith ar spriocfhearann eile. Tá sé ríthábhachtach go háirithe do Ghiniúint Teanga Nádúrtha (NLG) i gCórais Chomhphlé Labhartha nuair atá dóthain sonraí anótáilte san fhearann foinseach, ach go bhfuil sonraí lipéadaithe teoranta sa spriocfhearann. Saincheist ríthábhachtach maidir le hoiriúnú fearainn is ea an chaoi le húsáid éifeachtach a bhaint as an oiread sin de chumais atá ann cheana féin ó fhearann foinse. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid nós imeachta sáraíochta oiliúna chun gineadóir teanga bunaithe ar ionchódóir-díchódóir Athraitheach a oiliúint trí ilchéimeanna oiriúnaithe. Sa nós imeachta seo, déantar samhail a oiliúint ar fhoinse sonraí fearainn ar dtús agus ansin mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar thacar beag de chainteanna an spriocfhearainn faoi threoir beirt léirmheastóirí molta. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir leis an modh atá beartaithe an t-eolas atá ann cheana féin san fhearann foinseach a ghiaráil chun oiriúnú d’fhearann gaolmhar eile trí úsáid a bhaint as ach líon beag sonraí san fhearann.', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή τομέα προκύπτει όταν στοχεύουμε στην εκμάθηση από τον τομέα προέλευσης ενός μοντέλου που μπορεί να αποδώσει αποδεκτά καλά σε έναν διαφορετικό τομέα προορισμού. Είναι ιδιαίτερα σημαντικό για τη δημιουργία φυσικής γλώσσας στα συστήματα ομιλούμενων διαλόγων όταν υπάρχουν επαρκή σχολιασμένα δεδομένα στον τομέα προέλευσης, αλλά υπάρχουν περιορισμένα δεδομένα με ετικέτα στον τομέα προορισμού. Το πώς να αξιοποιήσετε αποτελεσματικά όσο το δυνατόν περισσότερες από τις υπάρχουσες ικανότητες από τους τομείς προέλευσης είναι ένα κρίσιμο ζήτημα στην προσαρμογή του τομέα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια διαδικασία αντιπαραβολής εκπαίδευσης για την εκπαίδευση μιας γεννήτριας γλώσσας βασισμένης σε μεταβλητό κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή μέσω πολλαπλών βημάτων προσαρμογής. Σε αυτή τη διαδικασία, ένα μοντέλο εκπαιδεύεται πρώτα σε δεδομένα ενός τομέα προέλευσης και στη συνέχεια προσαρμόζεται σε ένα μικρό σύνολο εκφράσεων τομέα-στόχων υπό την καθοδήγηση δύο προτεινόμενων κριτικών. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος μπορεί να αξιοποιήσει αποτελεσματικά την υπάρχουσα γνώση στον τομέα προέλευσης για να προσαρμοστεί σε άλλο σχετικό τομέα χρησιμοποιώντας μόνο μια μικρή ποσότητα δεδομένων εντός του τομέα.', 'hu': 'A Domain adaptáció akkor jön létre, amikor egy olyan modellt kívánunk tanulni a forrástartományból, amely elfogadhatóan jól teljesít egy másik céltartományon. Különösen fontos a beszélő párbeszédrendszerekben lévő természetes nyelv generálása szempontjából, ha elegendő jegyzetelt adat áll rendelkezésre a forrástartományban, de a céltartományban korlátozott címkézett adat áll rendelkezésre. A forrástartományokból származó meglévő képességek minél többségének hatékony kihasználása kulcsfontosságú kérdés a domain adaptációjában. Jelen tanulmányban egy ellenséges képzési eljárást javasolunk egy variációs kódoló-dekóder alapú nyelvgenerátor több adaptációs lépéssel történő képzésére. Ebben az eljárásban a modellt először egy forrástartomány-adatokra képezik, majd két javasolt kritikus irányításával finomhangolják egy kis céltartomány-kimondásra. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt módszer hatékonyan kihasználhatja a forrástartományban lévő ismereteket egy másik kapcsolódó tartományhoz való alkalmazkodáshoz csak kis mennyiségű domain adat felhasználásával.', 'ka': 'დომინის ადაპტიფიკაცია იქნება, როდესაც ჩვენ მინდომის მინდომის მინდომის მინდომიდან სწავლების მოდელი, რომელიც შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ სხვა მინდომის ეს განსაკუთრებით მნიშვნელოვანია თავისუფალური ენახის შექმნა (NLG) სისტემებში, როდესაც კონტაქტიური დიალოგის სისტემებში მნიშვნელოვანი მონაცემები არსებობს, მაგრამ მიზედომის დი როგორ ეფექტიურად გამოიყენება, როგორც მსგავსი შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების გამოყენება მინუს დიომინის აკაპექტირებაში გა ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ გვეძლევთ გარეგრაციონალური კოდექტორის ენერატორის განახლების მრავალური კოდექტირების განახლების გამოყენება განახლების პროცესტის განახლება ამ პროცედიაში, მოდელი პირველად მოსწავლია მხოლოდ დიომინის მონაცემებზე და შემდეგ კონფიგურაცია მარტივი დიომინის გამოსახულების ნაწილზე. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები აჩვენებენ, რომ პროგენტირებული მეტი ექსპერიმენტი შეუძლია ექსპერიმენტიურად გამოიყენოთ სხვა შესახებული დემომინის შესახებ მხო', 'it': "L'adattamento del dominio nasce quando puntiamo a imparare dal dominio sorgente un modello che possa funzionare in modo accettabile su un dominio di destinazione diverso. È particolarmente cruciale per la generazione del linguaggio naturale (NLG) nei sistemi di dialogo parlato quando ci sono dati annotati sufficienti nel dominio sorgente, ma c'è un dato etichettato limitato nel dominio di destinazione. Come utilizzare efficacemente la maggior parte delle capacità esistenti dai domini di origine è una questione cruciale nell'adattamento del dominio. In questo articolo, proponiamo una procedura di formazione avversaria per addestrare un generatore di linguaggio basato su encoder-decoder variabili attraverso più fasi di adattamento. In questa procedura, un modello viene dapprima addestrato sui dati di un dominio sorgente e poi perfezionato su una piccola serie di dichiarazioni di dominio target sotto la guida di due critici proposti. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il metodo proposto può sfruttare efficacemente le conoscenze esistenti nel dominio sorgente per adattarsi ad un altro dominio correlato utilizzando solo una piccola quantità di dati in-domain.", 'lt': 'Domaino pritaikymas atsiranda, kai siekiame iš šaltinio domeno išmokti model į, kuris gali tinkamai veikti kitoje tikslinėje srityje. Ypač svarbu, kad kalbėtojo dialogo sistemose gamtinės kalbos (NLG) būtų generuojamos, kai šaltinio srityje yra pakankamai užrašytų duomenų, tačiau tikslinėje srityje yra ribotų žymėtų duomenų. Kaip veiksmingai panaudoti tiek esamų gebėjimų iš šaltinio sričių yra labai svarbus klausimas prisitaikymo prie sričių srityje. Šiame dokumente siūlome prieštaringo mokymo procedūrą, skirtą įvairiais prisitaikymo etapais mokyti kalbų generatorių, pagrįstą įvairiais kodatoriais. Šioje procedūroje model is pirmą kartą rengiamas naudojant šaltinio domeno duomenis, o vėliau tiksliai pritaikytas nedideliu tikslinės domenos išraiškos rinkiniu, vadovaujantis dviem siūlomiems kritikams. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas metodas gali veiksmingai sutelkti esamas žinias šaltinio srityje, kad būtų galima prisitaikyti prie kitos susijusios srities, naudojant tik nedidelį kiekį domeno duomenų.', 'mk': 'Адаптација на доменот се појавува кога имаме за цел да научиме од доменот на изворот модел кој може да успее прифатливо добро на друг домен на целта. Тоа е особено клучно за генерацијата на природен јазик (НЛГ) во системите за разговаран дијалог кога постојат доволни анотирани податоци во доменот на изворот, но постојат ограничени обележани податоци во доменот на целта. Како ефикасно да се искористат толку многу постоечки способности од домените на изворот е клучно прашање во адаптацијата на домените. Во овој весник, предложуваме противна процедура на обука за обука на генератор на јазик базиран на варијационален кодер-декодер преку повеќе чекори на адаптација. Во оваа процедура, моделот е првпат обучен на податоци од изворот на доменот, а потоа фино прилагоден на мал сет изрази од цел на доменот под водство на двајца предложени критичари. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложениот метод може ефикасно да го искористи постоечкото знаење во доменот на изворот за да се адаптира на друг поврзан домен со користење само мала количина податоци во доменот.', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Domain muncul apabila kita bertujuan untuk belajar dari domain sumber model yang boleh melakukan dengan baik diterima pada domain sasaran yang berbeza. Ia adalah khusus penting untuk Jenerasi Bahasa Alami (NLG) dalam Sistem Dialog Cakap apabila terdapat data yang dicatat cukup dalam domain sumber, tetapi terdapat data yang dicatat terhad dalam domain sasaran. Bagaimana menggunakan secara efektif sebanyak kemampuan yang ada dari domain sumber adalah isu penting dalam penyesuaian domain. In this paper, we propose an adversarial training procedure to train a Variational encoder-decoder based language generator via multiple adaptation steps.  Dalam prosedur ini, model pertama dilatih pada data domain sumber dan kemudian disesuaikan dengan baik pada set kecil ungkapan domain sasaran di bawah petunjuk dua kritik yang diusulkan. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan boleh menggunakan pengetahuan yang wujud dalam domain sumber untuk menyesuaikan kepada domain berkaitan lain dengan menggunakan hanya sejumlah kecil data dalam domain.', 'kk': 'Домендің адаптациясы басқа мақсатты доменден оқытуға мақсат еткенде, басқа мақсатты доменде қабылдануға мүмкін болады. Бұл көздегі доменде белгіленген деректер жеткілікті болса, бірақ мақсатты доменде жарлықталған деректер бар. Бастапқы домендерден барлық мүмкіндіктерді қалай пайдалану - домендің адаптациясында маңызды мәселе. Бұл қағазда, біз бірнеше адаптациялау қадамдары арқылы Тілді генераторын бақылау үшін қарсы оқыту процедурын ұсынамыз. Бұл процедурада, үлгі бірінші көзі доменнің деректеріне оқылған және содан кейін екі критиктердің мәліметінің бағыттамасынан кейінгі мақсатты доменнің сөйлемелеріне жақсы түзетіледі Эксперименталдық нәтижелер келтірілген тәсілі көзінің доменде барлық білімдерді басқа сәйкесті доменге өзгерту үшін тек кішкентай деңгейін домен деректерін қолдану үшін әсер етеді.', 'ml': 'സ്രോതസ്സ് ഡൊമെയില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d എഴുന്നേല്\u200dക്കുന്നു. അത് വ സ്വാക്കിന്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d സോര്\u200dസ് ഡോമെയിനില്\u200d മതിയായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d അതി സ്രോതസ്സ് ഡോമെന്\u200dസില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലവിലുള്ള കഴിവുകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വിരോധമായ പരിശീലന പ്രക്രിയയെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു. ഒരു വേരിയഷന്\u200d കോഡോര്\u200d അടി ഈ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d, ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഡേറ്റായില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് രണ്ട് പരാജയപ്പെട പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള അറിവ് സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഡോമെയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് മറ്റൊ', 'mt': 'Domain Adaptation arises when we aim at learning from source domain a model that can perform acceptably well on a different target domain.  Huwa speċjalment kruċjali għall-Ġenerazzjoni tal-Lingwi Naturali (NLG) fis-Sistemi ta’ Djalogu Spoken meta jkun hemm biżżejjed dejta annotata fid-dominju tas-sors, iżda jkun hemm dejta ttikkettata limitata fid-dominju fil-mira. Kif wieħed jista’ juża b’mod effettiv kemm jista’ jkun l-abbiltajiet eżistenti minn dominji tas-sors hija kwistjoni kruċjali fl-adattament tad-dominji. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu proċedura ta’ taħriġ avversarju biex inħarrġu ġeneratur tal-lingwi bbażat fuq id-dekoder varjazzjonali permezz ta’ diversi passi ta’ adattament. F’din il-proċedura, mudell l-ewwel jitħarreġ fuq dejta tad-dominju tas-sors u mbagħad jiġi rfinut fuq sett żgħir ta’ dikjarazzjonijiet tad-dominju fil-mira taħt il-gwida ta’ żewġ kritiċi proposti. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-metodu propost jista’ effettivament iħeġġeġ l-għarfien eżistenti fid-dominju tas-sors biex jadatta għal dominju relatat ieħor billi juża biss ammont żgħir ta’ dejta fid-dominju.', 'mn': 'Бид эх үүсвэрээс сурах зорилго нь өөр зорилготой холбоонд хүлээн зөвшөөрөх боломжтой загварын загвар юм. Байгалийн хэл төрөлхтөн (NLG) нь эх үүсвэрийн холбоонд хангалттай мэдээллүүд байхад хамгийн чухал юм. Гэхдээ зорилготой холбоонд хэмжээтэй мэдээллүүд байдаг. Хэрэв эх үүсвэрийн хэсэгт байгаа чадварыг хэрхэн үр дүнтэй хэрэглэх вэ гэвэл холбоотой адилтгалын чухал асуудал юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөрчлөлтийн коддогч дээрх хэл үүсгэгч боловсруулахын тулд эсрэг дасгал суралцах процедурыг санал болгож байна. Энэ процедур нь эхлээд загвар эхлээд эх үүсвэрийн холбооны өгөгдлийн талаар сургалтын загвар, дараа нь хоёр санал өгсөн шүүмжлэгчийн загвар дээр жижиг зорилготой холбооны хэлэлцээнд Эмчилгээний үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга нь эх үүсвэр холбоотой мэдлэгийг өөр холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой зөвхөн жижиг хэмжээний мэдээллийг ашиглан эффективно ашиглаж чадна.', 'no': 'Domenetilpassing oppstår når me mål å lære frå kjeldedomene eit modell som kan utføra godt på eit anna målgdomene. Det er spesielt viktig for naturspråk-generering (NLG) i språk-dialogsystemet når det finst nok merkelige data i kjeldedomenet, men det finst ei begrenset merkelige data i målgdomenet. Korleis å bruka så mykje av dei eksisterande kapasitetene frå kjeldedomene er eit viktig problem i domenetilpassing. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein adversarisk opplæringsprosess for å trena ein variasjonal koderingskoderingsbasert språk-generator gjennom fleire tilpassingssteg. I denne prosessen vert eit modell først trent på ei kjeldedomenedata og så fint opp på ein liten sett måldomeneuttaler under retningane til to foreslått kritikar. Eksperimentale resultat viser at den foreslåde metoden kan effektivt levera den eksisterande kunnskapen i kjeldedomenet for å tilpassa til eit anna relatert domenet ved å bruka berre ein liten mengda i domenedata.', 'pl': 'Adaptacja domeny powstaje, gdy dążymy do uczenia się z domeny źródłowej modelu, który może działać akceptowalnie dobrze w innej domenie docelowej. Jest to szczególnie istotne dla generowania języka naturalnego (NLG) w systemach dialogu mówionego, gdy w domenie źródłowej jest wystarczająco dużo danych adnotacyjnych, ale w domenie docelowej jest ograniczona ilość danych oznaczonych. Jak skutecznie wykorzystać jak największą ilość istniejących zdolności z domen źródłowych jest kluczową kwestią adaptacji domen. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy przeciwną procedurę szkoleniową, aby szkolić generator języka oparty na koderze wariancyjnym i dekoderze poprzez wiele etapów adaptacji. W tej procedurze model jest najpierw trenowany na podstawie danych domeny źródłowej, a następnie dostrojony na małym zestawie wypowiedzi domeny docelowej pod kierunkiem dwóch proponowanych krytyków. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowana metoda może skutecznie wykorzystać istniejącą wiedzę w domenie źródłowej do dostosowania się do innej powiązanej dziedziny poprzez wykorzystanie tylko niewielkiej ilości danych wewnątrz domeny.', 'ro': 'Adaptarea domeniului apare atunci când ne propunem să învățăm din domeniul sursă un model care poate funcționa bine acceptabil pe un domeniu țintă diferit. Este crucial în special pentru generarea limbajului natural (NLG) în sistemele de dialog vorbit atunci când există suficiente date adnotate în domeniul sursă, dar există date etichetate limitate în domeniul țintă. Cum să utilizați eficient cât mai multe dintre abilitățile existente din domeniile sursă este o problemă crucială în adaptarea domeniului. În această lucrare, propunem o procedură de instruire adversară pentru instruirea unui generator de limbaj bazat pe encoder-decoder variațional prin mai mulți pași de adaptare. În această procedură, un model este instruit mai întâi pe datele unui domeniu sursă și apoi reglat fin pe un set mic de pronunțări ale domeniului țintă sub îndrumarea a doi critici propuși. Rezultatele experimentale arată că metoda propusă poate valorifica în mod eficient cunoștințele existente în domeniul sursă pentru a se adapta la un alt domeniu conex, utilizând doar o cantitate mică de date în domeniu.', 'si': 'ඩෝමේන් අනුමාණය සිද්ධ වෙනවා අපි මුළු ඩෝමේන් වලින් ඉගෙන ගන්න හැකියාම හොඳින් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනස් ල ස්පෝක් සංවාද පද්ධතියේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව නිර්මාණය (NLG) සඳහා විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙ කොහොමද මුළු ඩෝමේන් වලින් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වෙනසියල් කෝඩෝර් කිරීමක් අධාරිත භාෂා ජීනේටර් වලින් විශ මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, මොඩල් එකක් පළමු ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරධානයක් ඩොමේන් දත්තේ සහ පස්සේ ප්\u200dරධානයක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාර දන්නවට ප්\u200dරතිචාර', 'so': 'Domain Adaptation arises when we aim at learning from source domain a model that can perform acceptably well on a different target domain.  Waxaa si gaar ah u muhiim u ah dhalashada afka dabiiciga (NLG) nidaamka diyaarinta lagu hadlo marka lagu helo macluumaad ku filan oo ku saabsan gudaha asalka, laakiin guriga goalka waxaa ku jira macluumaad cayiman. Sida loo isticmaalayo awoodda aad u badan ee laga soo jeedo deegaanka waa arin muhiim ah oo ku habboon deegaanka. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qoraynaa koorsooyin waxbarasho ka gees ah si a an u tababarinno qoraal ah oo ku qoran qoraal-cododer oo ku saleysan luqada qoraal ah, tallaabooyin adag oo kala duduwan. Markaas waxaa marka hore lagu tababariyaa tusaale ku saabsan macluumaadka gudaha, dabadeedna waxaa lagu qoraa hadal yar oo lagu hago labada qof oo la soo jeeday. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qaababka la soo jeeday uu si faa’iido leh u soo bandhigi karo aqoonta joogta ee gudaha, si uu u beddelo domain kale oo la xiriira, si uu ugu isticmaalo macluumaad yar oo gudaha.', 'sr': 'Domena adaptacija se pojavljuje kada ciljamo učiti iz izvornog domena model koji može prihvatljivo izvršiti na drugoj ciljnoj domeni. Posebno je važno za generaciju prirodnog jezika (NLG) u sistemima razgovornog dijaloga kada postoje dovoljno annotiranih podataka u izvornom domenu, ali postoji ograničeni podaci označeni u ciljnoj domenu. Kako efektivno iskoristiti postojeće sposobnosti iz izvornih domena je ključni problem u adaptaciji domena. U ovom papiru predlažemo neprijateljsku proceduru obuke za obuku generator a jezika na osnovu varijacionalnog kodera na osnovu kodera preko višestrukih koraka adaptacije. U ovoj proceduri, model je prvi put obučen na podacima izvornog domena, a zatim je ispravljen na malim setu ciljnih domena izjava pod vodstvom dva predloženog kritika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda može efektivno uticati na postojeće znanje u izvornom domenu da se prilagodi drugoj povezanoj domenu koristeći samo mala količin a podataka u domenu.', 'ta': 'மூலத்தின் டோமைனிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் போது டொமைன் அமர்த்தல் எழுந்துள்ளது. இது வேறு இலக்கு களத்தில் ஏற்றுக் கொ இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கத்திற்கு இது குறிப்பிட்ட முக்கியமானது, ஆனால் இலக்கு களத்தில் உள்ள வரையறை தகவல் உள்ளது. மூல களங்களிலிருந்து எவ்வாறு இருக்கும் தன்மைகளை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்பது களம் ஒதுக்குதலில் முக்கியமான பிரச்ச இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு எதிர்மறை பயிற்சி செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் பல ஒப்புக்கொள்ளும் படிகள் வழியாக மாறி குறியீட இந்த செயல்பாட்டில், மூல களத்தின் தகவலில் முதலில் ஒரு மாதிரி பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் பின்னர் திருந்திக்கப்பட்ட இரண்டு துறை பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் தெரியும் முறைமையில் இருக்கும் அறிவை பயன்படுத்தி மற்றொரு தொடர்புடைய களத்திற்கு ஒப்பீடு செய்ய முடியும்', 'sv': 'Domänanpassning uppstår när vi strävar efter att från källdomän lära oss en modell som kan prestera acceptabelt bra på en annan måldomän. Det är särskilt viktigt för Natural Language Generation (NLG) i Spoken Dialogue Systems när det finns tillräckligt med kommenterade data i källdomänen, men det finns en begränsad märkt data i måldomänen. Hur man effektivt utnyttjar så mycket av befintliga förmågor från källdomäner är en avgörande fråga i domänanpassning. I den här uppsatsen föreslår vi ett kontradiktoriskt träningsförfarande för att träna en Variational encoder-dekoder baserad språkgenerator via flera anpassningssteg. I detta förfarande tränas en modell först på källdomändata och finjusteras sedan på en liten uppsättning måldomänuttalanden under ledning av två föreslagna kritiker. Experimentella resultat visar att den föreslagna metoden effektivt kan utnyttja befintlig kunskap inom källdomänen för att anpassa sig till en annan relaterad domän genom att endast använda en liten mängd in-domain data.', 'ur': 'ڈومین اڈپٹیٹ پیدا ہوتا ہے جب ہم سورس ڈومین سے سیکھنا چاہتے ہیں ایک موڈل جو ایک مختلف موقع ڈومین پر اچھی طرح کام کرسکتا ہے۔ اسپوک ڈیلوگ سیسٹم میں جسمانی زبان پیدائش (NLG) کے لئے مخصوص ضروری ہے جبکہ سورس ڈیمین میں کافی اظہار کیا گیا ہے، لیکن موجود ڈیمین میں ایک محدودیت لکھی ہوئی ڈیٹا ہے۔ کس طرح موجود موجود قابلیت کے مطابق استعمال کرنا ڈومین کی تعمیر میں ایک ضروری مسئلہ ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک مخالف تدریس پردازش کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ایک متفاوت کوڈر-ڈیکوڈر بنیاد زبان جینراٹر کی تعلیم کرے اس پردازش میں، ایک موڈل پہلی بار ایک سورس ڈومین ڈیٹ پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے اور پھر ایک چھوٹے ٹوکیٹ ڈومین کی باتوں پر سیدھی سیدھی تدبیر کی جاتی ہے، دو منکرین کی راہ پر۔ Experimental results show that the proposed method can effectively leverage the existing knowledge in the source domain to adapt to another related domain by using only a small amount of in-domain data.', 'vi': 'Phục chỉnh miền xuất hiện khi chúng ta hướng tới việc học từ miền gốc một mô hình có thể thực hiện một cách thoải mái trên một miền đích khác. Nó đặc biệt quan trọng với Hệ thống ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLG) trong hệ thống ngôn ngữ nói chuyện khi có đủ dữ liệu ghi chú trong miền gốc, nhưng có một số dữ liệu được ghi rõ trong miền đích. Cách sử dụng hiệu quả nhiều khả năng tồn tại từ lĩnh vực nguồn là một vấn đề quan trọng trong việc thích nghi miền. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một thủ tục huấn luyện đối nghịch để huấn luyện một máy phát ngôn ngữ mã hóa thay đổi thông qua nhiều bước sửa chữa. Trong quy trình này, một mô hình được đào tạo đầu tiên trên dữ liệu miền gốc và sau đó chỉnh lại một số giọng miền đích dưới sự chỉ dẫn của hai nhà phê bình đã đề nghị. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy rằng phương pháp đã được đề nghị có thể hiệu quả kích hoạt kiến thức hiện tại trong lãnh vực nguồn để thích nghi với một miền tương ứng khác bằng cách sử dụng một lượng nhỏ dữ liệu nội bộ.', 'uz': "Name @ info: whatsthis Manba domen adapterining muhim muammoni qanday foydalanish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda biz bir necha adaptatning qadamlari orqali o'zgartirish qoidagi kodlash yaratuvchisini o'rganish uchun foydalanuvchi taʼminlovchi vazifalarni davom qilamiz. Ushbu dasturda, model birinchi manba domen maʼlumotida o'rganadi, keyin keyin ikkita taʼminlovchi kompyuterning qoʻllanmagan bir kichkina domen soʻzlarida juda yaxshi tiladi. Tekshirish natijalari koʻrsatiladi, talab qilingan usulni faqat domen mavjud maʼlumot yordamida foydalanish mumkin.", 'bg': 'Адаптацията на домейна възниква, когато се стремим да научим от домейна източник модел, който може да работи приемливо добре в различен целев домейн. Това е особено важно за генерирането на естествен език (НЛГ) в системите за говорен диалог, когато има достатъчно анотирани данни в домейна източник, но има ограничено етикетирани данни в целевия домейн. Как ефективно да се използва колкото се може повече от съществуващите способности от домейните източник е решаващ въпрос в адаптацията на домейните. В настоящата статия предлагаме процедура за обучение на конкуренция за обучение на езиков генератор на базата на вариационен кодер-декодер чрез множество адаптационни стъпки. В тази процедура моделът първо се обучава върху данни от домейна източник и след това се финализира върху малък набор от целеви домейни изказвания под ръководството на двама предложени критици. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният метод може ефективно да използва съществуващите знания в областта на източника, за да се адаптира към друг свързан домейн, като използва само малко количество данни в областта.', 'da': 'Domain Adaption opstår, når vi sigter mod at lære fra kildedæne en model, der kan fungere acceptabelt godt på et andet måldomæne. Det er især afgørende for Natural Language Generation (NLG) i Spoken Dialogue Systems, når der er tilstrækkelige noterede data i kildedænet, men der er begrænsede mærkede data i måldomænet. Hvordan man effektivt udnytter så meget af eksisterende evner fra kildeområder er et afgørende spørgsmål i domænetilpasning. I denne artikel foreslår vi en modstridende træningsprocedure til at træne en Variational encoder-dekoder baseret sproggenerator via flere tilpasningstrin. I denne fremgangsmåde trænes en model først på kildedamænedata og finjusteres derefter på et lille sæt måldomænenudtalelser under vejledning af to foreslåede kritikere. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede metode effektivt kan udnytte den eksisterende viden i kildedænet til at tilpasse sig et andet relateret domæne ved kun at bruge en lille mængde in-domæne data.', 'nl': 'Domeinaanpassing ontstaat wanneer we vanuit het brondomein een model willen leren dat acceptabel goed kan presteren op een ander doeldomein. Het is vooral cruciaal voor Natural Language Generation (NLG) in Spoken Dialogue Systemen wanneer er voldoende geannoteerde gegevens zijn in het brondomein, maar er een beperkt aantal gelabelde gegevens in het doeldomein. Hoe effectief zoveel mogelijk bestaande vaardigheden uit brondomeinen kunnen worden benut, is een cruciaal probleem bij domeinaanpassing. In dit artikel stellen we een tegenstrijdige trainingsprocedure voor om een variatie encoder-decoder gebaseerde taalgenerator te trainen via meerdere aanpassingsstappen. In deze procedure wordt een model eerst getraind op een brondomein data en vervolgens verfijnd op een kleine set doeldomein uitspraken onder begeleiding van twee voorgestelde critici. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde methode de bestaande kennis in het brondomein effectief kan benutten om zich aan te passen aan een ander gerelateerd domein door slechts een kleine hoeveelheid in-domein data te gebruiken.', 'hr': 'Događa se adaptacija domena kada ciljamo učiti iz izvornog domena model koji može prihvatljivo izvršiti u drugoj ciljnoj domeni. Posebno je ključno za generaciju prirodnog jezika (NLG) u sustavima razgovornog dijaloga kada postoje dovoljno annotiranih podataka u izvornom domenu, ali postoji ograničeni podaci označeni u ciljnoj domenu. Kako je učinkovito iskoristiti toliko postojećih sposobnosti iz izvornih domena ključno je pitanje prilagodbe domena. U ovom papiru predlažemo postupak protivnog obuke kako bi obučili generator jezika baziranog na varijacijskom koderu na temelju raznih kodera putem višestrukih koraka prilagodbe. U ovom postupku, model je prvi put obučen na podacima izvornog domena, a zatim se ispravlja na mali skup ciljnih domena izjava pod vodstvom dva predloženog kritika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda može učinkovito utjecati na postojeće znanje u izvornom domenu da se prilagodi drugoj povezani domenu koristeći samo mala količin a podataka u domenu.', 'de': 'Domain Adaption entsteht, wenn wir versuchen, aus der Quelldomäne ein Modell zu lernen, das auf einer anderen Zieldomäne akzeptabel gut funktionieren kann. Für die Generierung natürlicher Sprache (NLG) in Gesprochenen Dialogsystemen ist es besonders wichtig, wenn genügend annotierte Daten in der Quelldomäne vorhanden sind, aber nur begrenzte markierte Daten in der Zieldomäne vorhanden sind. Wie man möglichst viele vorhandene Fähigkeiten aus Quelldomänen effektiv nutzen kann, ist ein entscheidendes Thema bei der Domänenanpassung. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein adversariales Trainingsverfahren vor, um einen Variations-Encoder-Decoder basierten Sprachgenerator über mehrere Anpassungsschritte zu trainieren. In diesem Verfahren wird ein Modell zunächst auf einer Quelldomänendate trainiert und dann unter Anleitung von zwei vorgeschlagenen Kritikern auf einer kleinen Reihe von Zieldomänenaussagen fein abgestimmt. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene Methode das vorhandene Wissen in der Quelldomäne effektiv nutzen kann, um sich an eine andere verwandte Domäne anzupassen, indem nur eine geringe Menge an In-Domain-Daten verwendet wird.', 'id': 'Adaptasi Domain muncul ketika kita bertujuan untuk belajar dari domain sumber model yang dapat melakukan dengan baik diterima pada domain target yang berbeda. Hal ini khusus penting untuk Generasi Bahasa Alami (NLG) dalam Sistem Dialog Berbicara ketika ada cukup data yang dicatat di domain sumber, tetapi ada data yang dicatat terbatas di domain sasaran. Bagaimana dengan efektif menggunakan sebanyak mungkin kemampuan yang ada dari domain sumber adalah masalah penting dalam adaptasi domain. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan prosedur pelatihan lawan untuk melatih generator bahasa berbasis kode-dekoder variasional melalui langkah-langkah adaptasi berbilang. Dalam prosedur ini, model pertama dilatih pada data domain sumber dan kemudian ditetapkan pada set kecil dari ungkapan domain sasaran di bawah petunjuk dua kritik yang diusulkan. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan dapat efektif menggunakan pengetahuan yang ada di domain sumber untuk beradaptasi ke domain terkait lain dengan menggunakan hanya jumlah kecil data dalam domain.', 'ko': '우리의 목표가 원역에서 서로 다른 목표역에서 좋은 모델을 배울 때 역적응이 생길 수 있다.원본 영역에 충분한 주석 데이터가 있고 목표 영역에 유한한 표기 데이터가 있을 때 자연언어 생성(NLG)은 구어 대화 시스템에서 특히 중요하다.원역에서 온 기존 능력을 어떻게 효과적으로 이용하는지는 역 적응의 관건적인 문제이다.본고에서 우리는 대항적인 훈련 과정을 제시했고 여러 가지 자체 적응 절차를 통해 변분 코딩기를 바탕으로 하는 언어 생성기를 훈련했다.이 과정에서 먼저 원역 데이터에서 훈련 모델을 훈련한 다음에 두 명의 비판자의 지도 아래 일부 목표역 언어를 미세하게 조정한다.실험 결과에 따르면 이 방법은 소량의 역내 데이터만 사용하면 원역에 있는 기존 지식을 효과적으로 이용하여 다른 관련 구역에 적응할 수 있다.', 'fa': 'تغییرات دامین وقتی هدف یاد گرفتن از دامین منبع یک مدل می\u200cتواند در یک دامین هدف متفاوتی به طور قبول انجام دهد. ویژه برای تولید زبان طبیعی (NLG) در سیستم\u200cهای گفتگوی زبان بوجود است وقتی داده\u200cهای نوشته\u200cشده کافی در دامنۀ منبع وجود دارد، ولی داده\u200cهای محدودیت\u200cشده در دامنۀ هدف وجود دارد. چگونه فعالیت استفاده از قدرت موجود از دامنهای منبع یک مسئله مهم در تغییرات دامنی است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش آموزش دشمنی برای آموزش یک ژنراتور زبان\u200cهای متفاوتی با طریق مرحله\u200cهای متفاوتی تغییر دهد. در این روش، یک مدل اول بر روی داده های دامنی منبع آموزش داده می شود و سپس در یک مجموعه کوچک از گفته های دامنی هدف تحت رهنمود دو انتقادی پیشنهاد تحت تأکید قرار داده می شود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که این روش پیشنهاد می\u200cتواند علم موجود در دامنه منبع را به تاثیر برساند تا با استفاده از یک مقدار کوچک داده\u200cهای دامنه\u200cای به دومین متصل شود.', 'sw': 'Adaptation Domain inatokea pale tunalenga kujifunza kutoka kwa kituo cha vyanzo kinachoweza kutekeleza vizuri katika maeneo mbalimbali ya malengo. It is especially crucial for Natural Language Generation (NLG) in Spoken Dialogue Systems when there are sufficient annotated data in the source domain, but there is a limited labeled data in the target domain.  Inawezekana kutumia vifaa vingi vya kuwepo kutoka kwenye maeneo ya vyanzo ni suala muhimu katika kuboresha ndani. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mchakato wa mafunzo yanayopingana na upinzani wa kufundisha mzalishaji wa lugha ya kigaidi kwa kutumia hatua nyingi za kuboresha. Katika utaratibu huu, mwelekeo wa kwanza umefundishwa kwa taarifa za ndani ya vyanzo vya ndani na kisha imetumiwa vizuri katika mazungumzo madogo ya ndani ya lengo chini ya uongozi wa wakosoaji wawili waliopendekezwa. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu hiyo inayopendekezwa inaweza kutumia ufanisi wa ufanisi uliopo kwenye maeneo ya chanzo ili kuunganisha na maeneo mengine yanayohusiana kwa kutumia kiasi kidogo tu cha taarifa za ndani.', 'sq': "Adaptimi i Domenit vjen kur synojmë të mësojmë nga domeni burimi një model që mund të bëjë mirë të pranueshëm në një domeni të ndryshëm objektiv. Është veçanërisht vendimtare për Gjenerimin e Gjuhave Natyrore (NLG) në Sistemet e Dialogut të Folur kur ka të dhëna të mjaftueshme të anotuara në domenin e burimit, por ka të dhëna të kufizuara të etiketuara në domenin e objektivit. Si të përdorim efektivisht aq shumë aftësi ekzistuese nga fushat burimore është një çështje vendimtare në përshtatjen e fushës. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një procedurë stërvitjeje kundërshtare për të stërvitur një gjenerator gjuhësh të bazuar në koduesin variacional-dekoderin nëpërmjet hapave të shumëfishtë të përshtatjes. Në këtë procedurë, një model është trajnuar së pari në një të dhënë burimi domain dhe pastaj i përshtatur në një sërë të vogël fjalësh të domainit objektiv nën udhëzimin e dy kritikëve të propozuar. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda e propozuar mund të nxisë efektivisht njohurinë ekzistuese në domenin e burimit për t'u përshtatur në domenin tjetër të lidhur me të duke përdorur vetëm një sasi të vogël të dhënash në domeni.", 'am': 'የዶሜን አዲስ መግለጫ በተለየ አካላቢ ዶሜን በመማር እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በአዳራዊ ቋንቋ አቀናጃ (NLG) በተጨማሪው የድምፅ አካባቢ ሲስተካከሉ የድረአም መረጃዎች በኩል ሲሆን በአዳራዊ ቋንቋ አቀማመጥ (NLG) የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ከዋናው ውይይት ውስጥ ያሉትን ኃይልን እንዴት እንደሚጠቀም የዶሜን አካባቢ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተቃዋሚ የድምፅ አካባቢ የቋንቋ አካባቢዎችን በብዙ አካባቢ ደረጃዎች ለማስተማርና የተቃዋሚ ተማሪ ፕሮጀክትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ In this procedure, a model is first trained on a source domain data and then fine-tuned on a small set of target domain utterances under the guidance of two proposed critics.  ፈተና ውጤቶች የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የአሁኑን እውቀት በማድረግ በኩል የሚኖረውን የአሁኑን እውቀት በሙሉ አካባቢ እንዲያሳስል ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Դոմենի ադապտացիան առաջանում է, երբ մենք նպատակով ենք սովորել աղբյուր տիեզերքից մի մոդել, որը կարող է ընդունելի լավ աշխատել մեկ այլ նպատակային տիեզերքում: Այն հատկապես կարևոր է Բնական լեզվի ստեղծման համար (ՆԼԳ) խոսակցած դասախոսության համակարգերում, երբ աղբյուրի ոլորտում բավարար annoտացված տվյալներ կան, բայց նպատակային ոլորտում սահմանափակ պիտացված տվյալներ կան: Ինչպե՞ս արդյունավետ օգտագործել աղբյուրների բնագավառներից գոյություն ունեցող հնարավորությունները բնագավառների ադապտացիայի կարևոր խնդիր է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք հակառակ վարժման գործընթաց, որպեսզի վարժեցնենք բազմաթիվ ադապտացիոն քայլերի միջոցով լեզվի գեներատոր, որը հիմնված է բազմաթիվ կոդերով: Այս գործընթացի ընթացքում մոդելը առաջին անգամ սովորեցվում է աղբյուր բնագավառի տվյալների վրա և հետո բարձրացվում է նպատակային բնագավառի փոքր արտահայտումների վրա երկու առաջարկված քննադատողների ուղղությամբ: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդը կարող է արդյունավետ օգտագործել աղբյուրի ոլորտում գոյություն ունեցող գիտելիքները հարմարվել մեկ այլ կապված ոլորտում՝ օգտագործելով միայն մի փոքր քանակությամբ բյուրի տվյա', 'bn': 'ডোমেন এডাপ্যাটেশন উঠছে যখন আমরা উৎস ডোমেইন থেকে শিখতে চাই একটি মডেল যা ভিন্ন টার্গেট ডোমেইনে ভালোভাবে কাজ করতে পারে। It is especially crucial for Natural Language Generation (NLG) in Spoken Dialogue Systems when there are sufficient annotated data in the source domain, but there is a limited labeled data in the target domain.  How to effectively utilize as much of existing abilities from source domains is a crucial issue in domain adaptation.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষণ প্রক্রিয়া প্রস্তাব করি বিভিন্ন কোডার-ডেকোডার ভিত্তিক ভাষায় ভিত্তিক ভাষার জেনারেটরে এই প্রক্রিয়ায় একটি মডেল প্রথমে একটি সোর্স ডোমেইন ডাটা প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয় এবং তারপর দুই প্রস্তাবিত সমালোচকদের হেদায়েত করার নির্দেশে একটি ছো পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি কার্যকর ভাবে উৎস ডোমেইনের বিদ্যমান জ্ঞানের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট ডোমেইনের সাথে যোগাযো', 'af': "Domein aanpassing kom toe ons doel om te leer van bron domein 'n model wat aanvaarlik goed kan uitvoer op 'n ander doel domein. Dit is spesifieke belangrike vir Natuurlike Taal Generasie (NLG) in Spoken Dialoog Sistemes wanneer daar is genoeg annotateerde data in die bron domein, maar daar is 'n beperkteerde data in die doel domein. Hoe om effektief te gebruik so baie bestaande moontlikhede van bron domein te gebruik is 'n belangrike probleem in domein aanpassing. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n teëstandige onderwerking prosedure om 'n Veranderlike enkoder-dekoder gebaseerde taal genereerder te tref deur veelvuldige adaptasie stappe. In hierdie prosedure is 'n model eerste opgelei op 'n bron domein data en dan fin-tuned op 'n klein stel van doel domein uitspraak onder die gids van twee voorgestelde kritiekers. Eksperimentale resultate vertoon dat die voorgestelde metode effektief die bestaande kennis in die bron domein kan aanpas na 'n ander verwante domein deur slegs 'n klein hoeveelheid in-domein data te gebruik.", 'ca': "L'adaptació al domini surt quan volem aprendre a partir del domini de font un model que pot actuar de manera acceptable en un domini d'objectiu diferent. It is especially crucial for Natural Language Generation (NLG) in Spoken Dialogue Systems when there are sufficient annotated data in the source domain, but there is a limited labeled data in the target domain.  Com utilitzar eficaçment tantes habilitats existents dels dominis de fonts és un tema crucial en l'adaptació de dominis. En aquest paper, proposem un procediment d'entrenament adversari per formar un generador de llenguatges basat en codificador variacional a través de múltiples etapes d'adaptació. En aquest procediment, un model s'entrena primer en dades de domini de font i després s'ajusta a un petit conjunt d'expressions de domini d'objectiu sota la guia de dos crítics proposats. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el mètode proposat pot aprofitar efectivament el coneixement existent en el domini de font per adaptar-se a un altre domini relacionat utilitzant només una petita quantitat de dades en domini.", 'cs': 'Adaptace domény vzniká, když se snažíme naučit ze zdrojové domény model, který může přijatelně dobře fungovat na jiné cílové doméně. Pro generování přirozeného jazyka (NLG) v systémech mluvených dialogů je zvláště důležité, když je ve zdrojové doméně dostatek anotovaných dat, ale v cílové doméně je omezené množství označených dat. Jak efektivně využít co nejvíce existujících schopností ze zdrojových domén je klíčovou otázkou při adaptaci domén. V tomto příspěvku navrhujeme kontroverzní tréninkový postup pro trénování jazykového generátoru založeného na variačním kodéru a dekodéru prostřednictvím několika adaptačních kroků. V tomto postupu je model nejprve trénován na zdrojových doménových datech a následně doladěn na malé sadě cílových doménových výroků pod vedením dvou navrhovaných kritiků. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navrhovaná metoda může efektivně využít stávající znalosti ve zdrojové doméně k adaptaci na jinou související doménu pomocí pouze malého množství dat v doméně.', 'az': 'Domain Adjustasyonu, mənbə domeindən öyrənmək niyyətində başqa bir məqsəd domeində yaxşı işlədə bilən modeli olaraq gəlir. Bu təbiətli Dil Yaratılması (NLG) üçün mənbəzi domeində yetər bilən məlumatlar olduğu zaman, məlumat domeində qısa etiketli məlumatlar vardır. Qaynaq domenindən olan mövcud qabiliyyətlərin nə qədər istifadə edilməsi domenin uyğulamasında çox mövcuddur. Bu kağızda, variasiya kodlayıcı dil generatoru çoxlu adaptasiya adımları vasitəsilə təhsil etmək üçün düşmənçilik təhsil prosedüsini təklif edirik. Bu proqramda, bir model ilk dərsə domena verilməsi üçün təhsil edilir və sonra iki nəzarətçilərin doğruluğu altında küçük məqsəd domena sözlərinə təhsil edilir. Experimental sonuçları göstərir ki, təbliğ edilmiş metod mənbə domeində olan bilgiləri başqa bağlı domeinə uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün ancaq bir kiçik dəyişik domenin məlumatlarını istifadə edir.', 'tr': 'Biz çeşmeden domenydan öwrenmek niýetimizi başga maksadda gowy edip biljek bir model öwrenmek üçin sahypa Adaptasy başlaýar. Taryh dili döredişi (NLG) sistemlerinde ýeterlik terjime edilen mektuplar bolan wagtynda nusgala edilen döredigi üçin örän möhüm. Emma maksad domynda etilgeli bir maglumat bar. Kaynak alanlarynyň köp başaryşlaryny nähili täsirli ulanmak domenýäde bir mesele däldir. Bu kagyzda, biz çeşitli kodeýçli dil jeneratoryny birnäçe adaptasyon adımlardan öwrenmek üçin täsirli eğitim procedesini teklip edýäris. Bu prosedürde, bir model ilkinji çeşme domena maglumatynda eğitilýär we soňra bu iki teklif eden kritiýanyň görnöşinde kiçijek hedef domena sözlerine süýtgedilýär. Experimental netijeleri teklip eden yöntemiň çeşme domeniň bar bilgilerini diňe domeniň birnäçe kiçi miktaryny ulanarak başga bir domeniň üstine üýtgetmek üçin etkinleşebilir.', 'et': 'Domeeni kohandamine tekib siis, kui meie eesmärk on õppida lähtedomeenist mudelit, mis suudab teisel sihtdomeenil vastuvõetavalt hästi toimida. Eriti oluline on loomuliku keele genereerimise (NLG) puhul räägitavates dialoogisüsteemides, kui lähtedomeenis on piisavalt märgitud andmeid, kuid sihtdomeenis on piiratud märgistatud andmeid. Kuidas tõhusalt kasutada võimalikult palju olemasolevaid võimeid lähtedomeenidest on oluline teema domeeni kohandamisel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja vastava koolituse protseduuri, et koolitada variatsioonikooder-dekooder põhinevat keelegeneraatorit mitme kohandamise etapi kaudu. Selles protseduuris koolitatakse mudelit esmalt lähtedomeeni andmete põhjal ja seejärel peenestatakse väikeste sihtdomeeni väljendite komplekti kahe väljapakutud kriitika juhendamisel. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud meetod võib tõhusalt kasutada olemasolevaid teadmisi lähtevaldkonnas, et kohaneda teise seotud valdkonnaga, kasutades ainult väikest hulka valdkonnasiseseid andmeid.', 'fi': 'Domain Adaptation syntyy, kun pyrimme oppimaan lähdeverkkotunnuksesta mallin, joka voi toimia hyväksyttävästi eri kohdeverkkotunnuksella. Se on erityisen tärkeää Natural Language Generation (NLG) puhuvissa dialogijärjestelmissä, kun lähdealueella on riittävästi merkintöjä, mutta kohdealueella on vain vähän merkittyjä tietoja. Se, miten hyödyntää mahdollisimman paljon olemassa olevia kykyjä lähdeverkkotunnuksista, on ratkaiseva kysymys verkkotunnusten mukauttamisessa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme vastustajakoulutusta variaatiokooderi-dekooderipohjaisen kieligeneraattorin kouluttamiseksi useiden sopeutusvaiheiden kautta. Tässä menettelyssä malli koulutetaan ensin lähdeverkkotunnuksen datasta ja sen jälkeen hienosäädetään pieniin kohdeverkkotunnuksen lauseisiin kahden ehdotetun kriitikon ohjauksessa. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu menetelmä voi tehokkaasti hyödyntää olemassa olevaa lähdetietoa sopeutuakseen toiseen asiaan liittyvään alueeseen käyttämällä vain pientä määrää verkkotietoa.', 'bs': 'Događa se adaptacija domena kada ciljamo učiti iz izvornog domena model koji može dobro izvršiti na drugoj ciljnoj domeni. Posebno je ključno za generaciju prirodnog jezika (NLG) u sistemima razgovornog dijaloga kada postoje dovoljno annotiranih podataka u izvornom domenu, ali postoji ograničeni podaci označeni u ciljnoj domenu. Kako efektivno iskoristiti toliko postojećih sposobnosti iz izvornih domena je ključni problem u adaptaciji domena. U ovom papiru predlažemo postupak protivnog treninga kako bi obučili generator jezika baziranog na varijacijskom koderu preko višestrukih koraka adaptacije. U ovom postupku, model je prvi put obučen na podacima izvornog domena, a zatim je ispravljen na malim setu ciljnih domena izjava pod vodstvom dva predloženog kritika. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda može učinkovito utjecati na postojeće znanje u izvornom domenu da se prilagodi drugoj povezani domenu koristeći samo mala količin a podataka u domenu.', 'he': 'התאמה לתחום מתרחשת כשאנו מכוונים ללמוד מתחום מקור מודל שיכול להפעיל היטב בתחום מטרה שונה. זה במיוחד קריטי לגורלת שפות טבעיות (NLG) במערכות דיאלוג מדברים כאשר יש מספיק נתונים מועטפים בתחום המקור, אך יש נתונים מוגבלים עם תווים בתחום המטרה. איך להשתמש באופן יעיל במידה רבה מהיכולות קיימות מתחומים מקור היא בעיה קריטית בהתאמה לתחום. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים תהליך אימון יריבי כדי לאמן גנרטור שפה מבוסס על קודד-קודד שונה באמצעות צעדים רבים של התאמה. In this procedure, a model is first trained on a source domain data and then fine-tuned on a small set of target domain utterances under the guidance of two proposed critics.  תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהשיטה המוצעת יכולה להשתמש באופן יעיל במידע הקיום בתחום המקור כדי להתאים לתחום אחר הקשור על ידי השימוש רק כמות קטנה של נתונים בתחום.', 'ha': "Ana tãyar da Adadation ɗin Domen idan an yi nufin mu sanar da wani motel daga duk wuri, wanda zai iya iya yarda da shi kan wani filin daban. @ action: button Yãya amfani da amfani da mafiya amfani da abincin da ke jira daga wurãren kwanan kwanza, yana da muhimu cikin adadin. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani takarin wa'adin na motsi dõmin mu tunkuɗe wani mai zaɓen wata wa'asar-kode-kode-na-baka cikin harshen na dabam-dabam. A cikin wannan aikin da aka sanar da wani misalin na farko a kan danne-danne na komai, sa'an nan kuma a gyara shi da ɗan daidaita magana masu yiwuwa da aka yi amfani da shiryarwa ga matalautan biyu wanda aka buɗa. Matarin jarrabawa ya nuna cewa metoden da aka buƙata, yana iya amfani da ƙarami kaɗan da data cikin-Domen.", 'sk': 'Prilagajanje domen nastane, ko želimo iz izvorne domene učiti model, ki lahko sprejemljivo dobro deluje na drugi ciljni domeni. Zlasti je ključnega pomena za ustvarjanje naravnega jezika (NLG) v sistemih govorjenega dialoga, kadar je v domeni izvora dovolj podatkov z oznakami, vendar je v ciljni domeni omejeno označenih podatkov. Kako učinkovito izkoristiti čim več obstoječih sposobnosti iz izvornih domen je ključno vprašanje pri prilagajanju domen. V prispevku predlagamo postopek konkurenčnega usposabljanja za usposabljanje jezikovnega generatorja na podlagi variacijskih kodirnikov in dekodirnikov prek več korakov prilagajanja. V tem postopku se model najprej usposablja na podlagi podatkov izvorne domene in nato natančno nastavi na majhen nabor izjav ciljne domene pod vodstvom dveh predlaganih kritikov. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da lahko predlagana metoda učinkovito izkoristi obstoječe znanje v domeni vira, da se prilagodi drugi sorodni domeni z uporabo le majhne količine podatkov v domeni.', 'jv': 'domain Alternate It is special key for Normal Language Generation (NLG) in Progress DialogDialog System when there are sufisive anntatid data in the source domain, and there is a limited data in the goal domain. System Nang pepulan iki, kita supoyo perusahaan pakan karo paken nggawe ngupakan Universik koder-decoder sing basa oleh nggawe barang seneng tambahan. In this method, a model is first TRANSLED on a source domain data and after Fin-tuned on a small set of goal domain words under the guides of Two proposal crits. Export data show that the proposal method can efferage the current information in the source domain to align to someone connected domain by use only a small amount of in-domain data.', 'bo': 'Domain Adaptation arises when we aim at learning from source domain a model that can perform acceptably well on a different target domain. It is especially crucial for Natural Language Generation (NLG) in Spoken Dialogue Systems when there are sufficient annotated data in the source domain, but there is a limited labeled data in the target domain. How to effectively use as much of existing abilities from source domains is a crucial problem in domain adaptation. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་གྲ་སྒྲིག་གི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། In this procedure, a model is first trained on a source domain data and then fine-tuned on a small set of target domain utterances under the guidance of two proposed critics. Experimental results show that the proposed method can effectively leverage the existing knowledge in the source domain to adapt to another related domain by using only a small amount of in-domain data.'}
{'en': 'Ask No More : Deciding when to guess in referential visual dialogue', 'ar': 'اسأل لا أكثر: تحديد متى تخمن في الحوار المرئي المرجعي', 'es': 'No preguntes más: Decidir cuándo adivinar en el diálogo visual referencial', 'fr': 'Ne demandez plus\xa0: décider quand deviner dans un dialogue visuel référentiel', 'pt': 'Não pergunte mais: decidindo quando adivinhar no diálogo visual referencial', 'ja': 'これ以上質問しない：参照ビジュアルダイアログで推測するタイミングを決定する', 'hi': 'कोई और अधिक पूछें: यह तय करना कि संदर्भित दृश्य संवाद में कब अनुमान लगाया जाए', 'zh': '不复问:参视决定何时猜测', 'ru': 'Спросите больше нет: Решая, когда угадать в ссылочном визуальном диалоге', 'ga': 'Ní Fiafraigh Níos Mó: Cinneadh a dhéanamh cén uair is ceart buille faoi thuairim a thabhairt in agallamh amhairc tagartha', 'el': 'Μην ρωτάτε περισσότερα: Αποφασίζοντας πότε θα μαντέψετε στον οπτικό διάλογο αναφοράς', 'hu': 'Ne kérdezz többet: Döntsd el, mikor találd ki referenciális vizuális párbeszédben', 'ka': 'მეტი არ მოითხოვთ: რეფერენციალური ვიზუალური დიალოგიში განსაზღვრება', 'kk': 'Қосымша сұрау: Референциялық визуалдық диалогында қазір ойлау', 'it': 'Non chiedere di più: decidere quando indovinare nel dialogo visivo referenziale', 'ms': 'Ask No More: Deciding when to guess in referential visual dialogue', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d ചോദിക്കേണ്ട ആവശ്യമില്ല: റെഫറന്റില്\u200d കാഴ്ചയുള്ള ഡയലോഗ്', 'mn': 'Дахиад хэлэхгүй асуулт:', 'no': 'Spør ingen meir: Besluttar når du skal gjeta i referansiell visuell dialogvindauge', 'pl': 'Nie pytaj więcej: Decydowanie, kiedy zgadnąć w referencyjnym dialogu wizualnym', 'mk': 'Ask No More: Deciding when to guess in referential visual dialogue', 'ro': 'Nu mai întrebați: Decizia când să ghiciți în dialogul vizual referențial', 'lt': 'Klausyti daugiau: nuspręsti, kada spėti referenciniame vizualiniame dialoge', 'sr': 'Ne pitaj više: odlučujući kada pogoditi u referencijalnom vizualnom dijalogu', 'si': 'තව කිසිම දෙයක් අහන්නේ නැහැ: විශ්වාස කවදාවත් අනතුරු වෙන්නේ කියලා', 'sv': 'Fråga inte mer: Bestäm när du ska gissa i referensvisuell dialog', 'ta': 'மேலும் கேட்கவில்லை: குறிப்பிட்ட பார்வையான உரையாடலில் எப்போது திட்டமிடும்', 'so': 'Faahfaahin dheeraad ah weydii: Goorma go’aanka ka gaaraya dhaqanka muuqashada', 'ur': 'اور کچھ نہیں پوچھو: فیصلہ کرتا ہے کہ کس وقت منظور ویزیولی دیالوگ میں آگاہ کرنا ہے', 'mt': 'Mistoqsija Mhux Aktar: Id-deċiżjoni dwar meta wieħed għandu jaħseb fid-djalogu viżwali referenzjali', 'vi': 'Hỏi Không Thêm: Quyết định khi nào đoán trong thoại thị giới hạn', 'uz': 'Qoò£shimcha soò£rash: Decides when to guess in referential visual dialog', 'da': 'Spørg ikke mere: Beslutning af, hvornår du skal gætte i referentiel visuel dialog', 'nl': 'Vraag niet meer: Beslissen wanneer te raden in een referentiële visuele dialoog', 'bg': 'Не питай повече: Решаване кога да отгатнеш в референтен визуален диалог', 'hr': 'Ne pitaj više: odlučujući kada pogoditi u referencijskom vizualnom dijalogu', 'id': 'Tanya Tidak Lebih: Memutuskan kapan untuk menebak dalam dialog visual referensi', 'ko': '더 이상 묻지 마라: 시각 대화를 참고하여 언제 추측할지 결정한다', 'sw': 'Hakuna Zaidi zaidi: Kuamua lini ya kudhani katika mazungumzo ya maoni', 'fa': 'پرسید دیگر نه: تصمیم گرفتن در محاورۀ تصویر', 'tr': 'Daha fazla sora: Referanslar dialogda nähili çaklamak kararynda', 'af': 'Vra Nee meer: Besluit wanneer na weet in verwysing visuele dialoog', 'sq': 'Nuk pyet më: vendos kur të gjesh në dialogun vizual referencial', 'am': 'ከሌላ አይጠይቁም: Deciding when to guess in referential visual dialog', 'az': 'Daha fazla soruŇüma: Referential visual dialogda n…ô zaman tahmin edil…ôc…ôyini q…ôrar edir…ôm', 'hy': 'Ոչ ավելին հարցնել. որոշել, երբ գուշակել վերաբերյալ տեսողական երկխոսում', 'bn': 'আর কোনো জিজ্ঞেস করা হবে না: রেফেন্টাল ভিজুয়াল ডায়ালগে অনুমান করা হবে কিনা সিদ্ধান্ত নেয়া হবে', 'bs': 'Ne pitaj više: odlučujući kada pogoditi u referencijskom vizualnom dijalogu', 'ca': 'No pregunteu més: Decidir quan adivinar en el diàleg visual referencial', 'de': 'Fragen Sie nicht mehr: Entscheiden, wann im referenziellen visuellen Dialog zu erraten ist', 'et': 'Ei küsi enam: otsustamine, millal arvata viidatavas visuaalses dialoogis', 'cs': 'Už se nezeptejte: Rozhodnutí o tom, kdy hádat v referenčním vizuálním dialogu', 'fi': 'Kysy ei enempÃĪÃĪ: PÃĪÃĪtetÃĪÃĪn, milloin arvata viitekehyksessÃĪ nÃĪkyvÃĪssÃĪ dialogissa', 'jv': 'buddy', 'ha': 'QDialogButtonBox', 'he': 'שאל לא יותר: להחליט מתי לנחש בדיולוג ויזואלי רפורנציאלי', 'sk': 'Ne vprašaj več: Odločanje, kdaj ugibati v referenčnem vizualnem dialogu', 'bo': 'ཅི་ཡང་མིན་འདྲི་ཞིབ། དམིགས་བསལ་མཐོང་ནུས་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ནང་གི་གེ་རྟོགས་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Our goal is to explore how the abilities brought in by a dialogue manager can be included in end-to-end visually grounded conversational agents. We make initial steps towards this general goal by augmenting a task-oriented visual dialogue model with a decision-making component that decides whether to ask a follow-up question to identify a target referent in an image, or to stop the conversation to make a guess. Our analyses show that adding a decision making component produces dialogues that are less repetitive and that include fewer unnecessary questions, thus potentially leading to more efficient and less unnatural interactions.', 'pt': 'Nosso objetivo é explorar como as habilidades trazidas por um gerente de diálogo podem ser incluídas em agentes conversacionais visualmente fundamentados de ponta a ponta. Damos os passos iniciais em direção a esse objetivo geral, aumentando um modelo de diálogo visual orientado a tarefas com um componente de tomada de decisão que decide se deve fazer uma pergunta de acompanhamento para identificar um referente alvo em uma imagem ou interromper a conversa para fazer uma pergunta. adivinhar. Nossas análises mostram que adicionar um componente de tomada de decisão produz diálogos menos repetitivos e que incluem menos perguntas desnecessárias, potencialmente levando a interações mais eficientes e menos naturais.', 'ar': 'هدفنا هو استكشاف كيف يمكن تضمين القدرات التي يجلبها مدير الحوار في وكلاء محادثة مرئيون من البداية إلى النهاية. نتخذ خطوات أولية نحو هذا الهدف العام من خلال زيادة نموذج الحوار المرئي الموجه نحو المهام مع مكون صنع القرار الذي يقرر ما إذا كان يجب طرح سؤال متابعة لتحديد مرجع مرجعي مستهدف في صورة ، أو إيقاف المحادثة لإجراء خمن. تُظهر تحليلاتنا أن إضافة عنصر صنع القرار ينتج عنه حوارات أقل تكرارًا والتي تتضمن عددًا أقل من الأسئلة غير الضرورية ، مما قد يؤدي إلى تفاعلات أكثر كفاءة وأقل غير طبيعية.', 'fr': "Notre objectif est d'explorer comment les capacités apportées par un gestionnaire de dialogue peuvent être incluses dans des agents conversationnels visuellement ancrés de bout en bout. Nous faisons les premiers pas vers cet objectif général en complétant un modèle de dialogue visuel axé sur les tâches avec une composante décisionnelle qui décide s'il faut poser une question de suivi pour identifier un référent cible dans une image ou arrêter la conversation pour faire une supposition. Nos analyses montrent que l'ajout d'un élément de prise de décision produit des dialogues moins répétitifs et comportant moins de questions inutiles, ce qui peut mener à des interactions plus efficaces et moins artificielles.", 'es': 'Nuestro objetivo es explorar cómo las habilidades aportadas por un administrador de diálogos se pueden incluir en los agentes conversacionales de principio a fin con base visual. Damos los primeros pasos hacia este objetivo general al aumentar un modelo de diálogo visual orientado a tareas con un componente de toma de decisiones que decide si hacer una pregunta de seguimiento para identificar un referente objetivo en una imagen o detener la conversación para hacer una suposición. Nuestros análisis muestran que agregar un componente de toma de decisiones produce diálogos que son menos repetitivos y que incluyen menos preguntas innecesarias, lo que potencialmente conduce a interacciones más eficientes y menos antinaturales.', 'ja': '私たちの目標は、対話マネージャーによってもたらされた能力を、エンドツーエンドの視覚的に基礎づけられた会話エージェントにどのように含めることができるかを探ることです。この一般的な目標に向けて、タスク指向の視覚的対話モデルを拡張して最初のステップを行います。これには、画像内のターゲット参照元を特定するためにフォローアップの質問をするか、推測するために会話を停止するかを決定する意思決定要素が含まれます。私たちの分析によると、意思決定コンポーネントを追加すると、繰り返しが少なく、不必要な質問が少なくなるため、より効率的で不自然なやり取りが少なくなる可能性があるということです。', 'zh': '我的是探索如何将对话管理器来的能包含在端到端的视基对话。 吾以强视对形,决策组件决后问以识象之所向,抑辍对以测之,而朝此总体目标出焉。 吾之分析表明,决策组件生重复性卑之对,而含少者不必问,则有效少者,非自然之交也。', 'hi': 'हमारा लक्ष्य यह पता लगाना है कि संवाद प्रबंधक द्वारा लाई गई क्षमताओं को एंड-टू-एंड नेत्रहीन आधारित संवादी एजेंटों में कैसे शामिल किया जा सकता है। हम निर्णय लेने वाले घटक के साथ एक कार्य-उन्मुख दृश्य संवाद मॉडल को बढ़ाकर इस सामान्य लक्ष्य की ओर प्रारंभिक कदम उठाते हैं जो यह तय करता है कि किसी छवि में लक्ष्य दिग्दर्शन की पहचान करने के लिए अनुवर्ती प्रश्न पूछना है या अनुमान लगाने के लिए वार्तालाप को रोकना है। हमारे विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि निर्णय लेने वाले घटक को जोड़ने से संवाद पैदा होते हैं जो कम दोहराए जाते हैं और जिनमें कम अनावश्यक प्रश्न शामिल होते हैं, इस प्रकार संभावित रूप से अधिक कुशल और कम अप्राकृतिक बातचीत होती है।', 'ru': 'Наша цель состоит в том, чтобы изучить, как способности, привнесенные менеджером диалога, могут быть включены в сквозных визуально обоснованных разговорных агентов. Мы делаем первые шаги к этой общей цели, дополняя ориентированную на задачу модель визуального диалога компонентом принятия решений, который решает, задавать ли последующий вопрос, чтобы идентифицировать целевого референта на изображении, или остановить разговор, чтобы сделать догадку. Наши анализы показывают, что добавление компонента принятия решений создает диалоги, которые менее повторяются и которые включают меньше ненужных вопросов, что потенциально приводит к более эффективному и менее неестественному взаимодействию.', 'ga': "Is é an sprioc atá againn iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar conas is féidir na cumais a thugann bainisteoir idirphlé isteach a áireamh i ngníomhairí comhrá ceann-go-deireadh atá bunaithe ar fhís. Déanaimid céimeanna tosaigh i dtreo na sprice ginearálta seo trí shamhail amhairc idirphlé tasc-dhírithe a mhéadú le comhpháirt cinnteoireachta a chinneann cé acu ceist leantach a chur chun sprioc-thagairtí a aithint in íomhá, nó stop a chur leis an gcomhrá a dhéanamh. buille faoi thuairim. Léiríonn ár n-anailísí go gcruthaítear idirphlé nach bhfuil chomh athchleachtach agus a áiríonn níos lú ceisteanna gan ghá, rud a d'fhéadfadh idirghníomhaíochtaí níos éifeachtaí agus nach bhfuil chomh mínádúrtha a bheith mar thoradh ar ár n-anailísí.", 'hu': 'Célunk, hogy feltárjuk, hogy a dialógusmenedzser által bevezetett képességek miként vehetők be a end-to-end vizuálisan alapozott beszélgetési ügynökökbe. Ennek az általános célnak a kezdeti lépéseket teszünk azzal, hogy egy feladatorientált vizuális párbeszédmodellt kiegészítünk egy döntéshozatali komponenssel, amely eldönti, hogy felteszünk-e egy utólagos kérdést a célreferent azonosítására egy képen, vagy leállítjuk-e a beszélgetést, hogy tippeljünk. Elemzéseink azt mutatják, hogy egy döntéshozatali komponens hozzáadása kevésbé ismétlődő és kevesebb szükségtelen kérdést tartalmazó párbeszédeket eredményez, ami potenciálisan hatékonyabb és kevésbé természetellenes interakciókhoz vezet.', 'ka': 'ჩვენი მიზეზი არის გავაკვიროთ როგორ დიალოგის მენეჯერი შეიძლება გავაკეთოთ ვიზუალურად გამოსახულებული კონტაქციო ადვნენტებში. ჩვენ ამ საერთო მიზეზის გადავიწყებთ დავიწყებთ დავაკეთებული ვიზუალური დიალოგის მოდელს, რომელიც გადაწყვეტილების კომპონენტებით, რომელიც გადაწყვეტს თუ არა დავაკეთებული კითხვა მიზეზის რეფერენტის განსაზე ჩვენი ანალიზები აჩვენებენ, რომ კომპონენტების დამატება, რომელიც უფრო მეტი განახლებელია და რომელიც უფრო მეტი უნდა დაუჭირდებელია კითხვები, რომელიც უფრო მეტი ეფექტიური და უფ', 'el': 'Στόχος μας είναι να διερευνήσουμε πώς οι ικανότητες που εισάγει ένας διαχειριστής διαλόγου μπορούν να συμπεριληφθούν σε οπτικά θεμελιωμένους πράκτορες συνομιλίας. Κάνουμε πρώτα βήματα προς αυτόν τον γενικό στόχο συμπληρώνοντας ένα μοντέλο οπτικού διαλόγου προσανατολισμένο στην εργασία με ένα στοιχείο λήψης αποφάσεων που αποφασίζει αν θα θέσουμε μια ερώτηση παρακολούθησης για να εντοπίσουμε έναν αναφερόμενο στόχο σε μια εικόνα, ή να σταματήσουμε τη συζήτηση για να κάνουμε μια εικασία. Οι αναλύσεις μας δείχνουν ότι η προσθήκη ενός στοιχείου λήψης αποφάσεων παράγει διαλόγους που είναι λιγότερο επαναλαμβανόμενοι και που περιλαμβάνουν λιγότερες περιττές ερωτήσεις, οδηγώντας ενδεχομένως σε πιο αποτελεσματικές και λιγότερο αφύσικες αλληλεπιδράσεις.', 'it': "Il nostro obiettivo è quello di esplorare come le abilità portate da un gestore di dialogo possono essere incluse in agenti di conversazione end-to-end visivamente fondati. Facciamo i primi passi verso questo obiettivo generale ampliando un modello di dialogo visivo orientato al compito con una componente decisionale che decide se porre una domanda di follow-up per identificare un referente target in un'immagine, o interrompere la conversazione per fare un'ipotesi. Le nostre analisi dimostrano che l'aggiunta di una componente decisionale produce dialoghi meno ripetitivi e che includono meno domande inutili, portando quindi potenzialmente a interazioni più efficienti e meno innaturali.", 'kk': 'Біздің мақсатымыз диалог менеджерінің қалай іске асыратын мүмкіндіктерін көрсету үшін көрінетін сұрақ агенттеріне ендіру. Бұл жалпы мақсатта бастапқы қадамдар жасап, тапсырма бағытталған визуалдық диалог үлгісін көтеріп, кескінде мақсатты референцияны анықтау немесе сұрақтарды таңдау үшін шешімдеу компоненті арқылы шешімдеу үлгісімен Біздің анализациямыз шешім беру компонентін қосу үшін қайталанушы деген диалогтарды жасайды. Бұл сұрақтарды қайталанушы керек емес сұрақтарды кішірейтін диалогтарды жасайды. Сонымен қайталанушы мүмкін кө', 'ml': 'നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d മാത്രം സംസാരിക്കുന്ന സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഏജന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെയാണ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതെന്ന്. ഈ സാധാരണ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലേക്ക് നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യ ചെയ്തുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ജോലിയിലേക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന ദൃഷ്ടാന്തമായ ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് മോഡല്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതി നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഒരു തീരുമാനം ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ഘടകം കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നത്, ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന സംസാരം കുറച', 'lt': 'Mūsų tikslas – ištirti, kaip dialogo vadovo įgyti gebėjimai gali būti įtraukti į visuotiniu požiūriu pagrįstus pokalbių agentus. Mes darome pirmuosius žingsnius siekiant šio bendro tikslo, papildant užduotims orientuoto vizualinio dialogo model į sprendimų priėmimo komponentu, kuris nusprendžia, ar užduoti tolesnį klausimą nustatyti tikslinį referent ą vaizdo atvaizde, ar sustabdyti pokalbį, kad galėtume spėti. Mūsų analizės rodo, kad sprendimų priėmimo sudedamosios dalies papildymas lemia dialogus, kurie yra mažiau kartojantys ir apima mažiau nereikalingų klausimų, todėl gali paskatinti veiksmingesnę ir mažiau nenaturią sąveiką.', 'mn': 'Бидний зорилго бол диалог менеджерын хөгжүүлсэн чадварыг хэрхэн харагдаж буй харилцааны агентуудын төгсгөлд оруулж болно. Бид энэ ерөнхий зорилго руу эхлэх алхам хийдэг бөгөөд ажил дээр ориентирогдсон диалог загварыг шийдвэрлэх компоненттэй нэмэгдүүлж, зураг дээр зорилготой тэмдэглэгчийг тайлбарлах эсэхийг шийдвэрлэх зорилго асуух эсэхийг шийддэг. Бидний шийдвэрлэл хийх компонентийг нэмэх нь давтамжлалт бага хэмжээний яриаг бий болгодог. Энэ нь шаардлагагүй асуултууд бага байдаг. Иймээс илүү үр дүнтэй болон байгалийн харилцаа бага болгодог.', 'ms': 'Tujuan kita ialah untuk mengeksplorasi bagaimana kemampuan yang dibawa oleh pengurus dialog boleh disertai dalam ejen perbualan berakhir-akhir secara visual. We make initial steps towards this general goal by augmenting a task-oriented visual dialogue model with a decision-making component that decides whether to ask a follow-up question to identify a target referent in an image, or to stop the conversation to make a guess.  Analisis kami menunjukkan bahawa menambah komponen pembuat keputusan menghasilkan dialog yang kurang berulang dan yang termasuk kurang soalan yang tidak diperlukan, sehingga berpotensi membawa kepada interaksi yang lebih efisien dan kurang tidak biasa.', 'mk': 'Our goal is to explore how the abilities brought in by a dialogue manager can be included in end-to-end visually grounded conversational agents.  Правиме првични чекори кон оваа генерална цел со зголемување на моделот на визуелен дијалог ориентиран на задачите со компонент за донесување одлуки кој одлучува дали да поставува следно прашање за идентификување на референт на целта на слика или да го сопре разговорот за да претпостави. Нашите анализи покажуваат дека додавањето на компонентот за донесување одлуки произведува дијалози кои се помалку повторни и кои вклучуваат помалку непотребни прашања, што потенцијално води до поефикасни и помалку неприродни интеракции.', 'ro': 'Scopul nostru este de a explora modul în care abilitățile aduse de un manager de dialog pot fi incluse în agenții de conversație end-to-end vizual întemeiați. Facem pași inițiali spre acest obiectiv general prin extinderea unui model de dialog vizual orientat spre sarcini cu o componentă decizională care decide dacă să pună o întrebare ulterioară pentru a identifica un referent țintă într-o imagine sau să oprească conversația pentru a face o presupunere. Analizele noastre arată că adăugarea unei componente decizionale produce dialoguri mai puțin repetitive și care includ mai puține întrebări inutile, ceea ce poate duce la interacțiuni mai eficiente și mai puțin nenaturale.', 'pl': 'Naszym celem jest zbadanie, w jaki sposób umiejętności wniesione przez menedżera dialogu mogą być włączone do kompleksowych wizualnie uziemionych agentów rozmowy. Podejmujemy wstępne kroki w kierunku tego ogólnego celu poprzez rozszerzenie modelu dialogu wizualnego zorientowanego na zadania o komponent decyzyjny, który decyduje, czy zadać pytanie następne w celu zidentyfikowania docelowego referenta na obrazie, czy zatrzymać rozmowę, aby dokonać zgadu. Nasze analizy pokazują, że dodanie komponentu podejmowania decyzji powoduje mniej powtarzalne dialogi i zawierające mniej niepotrzebne pytania, co potencjalnie prowadzi do bardziej efektywnych i mniej nienaturalnych interakcji.', 'mt': 'Our goal is to explore how the abilities brought in by a dialogue manager can be included in end-to-end visually grounded conversational agents.  We make initial steps towards this general goal by augmenting a task-oriented visual dialogue model with a decision-making component that decides whether to ask a follow-up question to identify a target referent in an image, or to stop the conversation to make a guess.  L-analiżi tagħna turi li ż-żieda ta’ komponent tat-teħid tad-deċiżjonijiet tipproduċi djalogi li huma inqas ripetittivi u li jinkludu inqas mistoqsijiet mhux meħtieġa, u b’hekk potenzjalment iwasslu għal interazzjonijiet aktar effiċjenti u inqas mhux naturali.', 'no': 'Målet vårt er å utforske korleis ein dialog-handsamar kan inkluderast i ein visuelt grunnleggjande samtaleagentar. Vi gjer opprinnelige steg mot denne generelle målet ved å auka eit visuell dialogmodell med eit avgjøringskomponent som bestemmer om det skal spørja om ein etterfølgingsspørsmål for å identifisera eit mål-referanse i eit bilete, eller å stoppa samtalen for å gjeta eit gjekk. Analysene våre viser at å leggja til ein avgjøringskomponent, produserer dialogar som er mindre gjentaktive og som inkluderer mindre unnecessare spørsmål, slik at potensielt fører til meir effektiv og mindre ugjennomsiktig samarbeid.', 'si': 'අපේ අරමුණ තමයි සංවාද ප්\u200dරධානකයෙක් අන්තිමට අවසානය කරන්න පුළුවන් කොහොමද කියලා බලන්න. අපි මේ සාමාන්\u200dය අරමුණට පටන් ගත්තා මෙහෙම අරමුණ වෙනුවෙන් වැඩ කරන්නේ වැඩිය ප්\u200dරකාරයක් පිළිබඳින්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අ අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ විශ්ලේෂණයක් තීර්ණාවක් එක්කන් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න සංවාදයක් නිර්මාණය කරනව', 'so': "Ujeedkeennu waa in baaraandegista sida awoodaha ay u soo bandhigto maamulka dialogka ugu dhammaadka ugu dambaysta iyo ugu dambaysta shaqaalaha hadalka si aragga ah. Waxaan tallaabooyin hore ugu soconaynaa goalkan caadiga ah si a an u kordhinno model diyaarinta aragga ee shaqada, kaasoo go’aanka go’aanka go’aanka go’aanka go’aanka ka gaarayo in lagu weyddiiyo su’aal soo socda in uu sawir ku caddeeyo muuqashada goalka ama aan joojinno hadalka si uu wax u maleeyo. Analyadaada waxay muuqataa in ku daryeesho qeyb go’aanka oo go’aanka ah ay soo bixisaa dialogue aan dib u celin karin, kuwaas oo ku jira su'aalo aan u baahnayn, sidaas darteed waxaa suurtagal ah in uu ku hoggaamiyo xiriiro faa’iido badan oo aan la filayn.", 'sr': 'Naš cilj je da istražimo kako se sposobnosti koje predstavlja menadžer dijaloga mogu uključiti u vizualno osnovane razgovorne agente. Počinjemo prve korake prema ovom općem cilju povećanjem model a vizuelnog dijaloga sa komponentom donošenja odluka koja odlučuje da li postavlja pitanje za praćenje da identifikuje meta referenta na sliki, ili da zaustavi razgovor da bi se pogodio. Naše analize pokazuju da dodanje komponenta donošenja odluke proizvodi dijaloge koje su manje ponavljavajuće i koje uključuju manje nepotrebnih pitanja, stoga potencijalno vodi do efikasnijih i manje neprirodnih interakcija.', 'sv': 'Vårt mål är att undersöka hur de förmågor som en dialogchef tillför kan inkluderas i end-to-end visuellt förankrade samtalsagenter. Vi tar inledande steg mot detta allmänna mål genom att utöka en uppgiftsorienterad visuell dialogmodell med en beslutskomponent som bestämmer om vi ska ställa en uppföljningsfråga för att identifiera en målreferent i en bild, eller att stoppa samtalet för att göra en gissning. Våra analyser visar att en beslutskomponent skapar dialoger som är mindre repetitiva och som innehåller färre onödiga frågor, vilket potentiellt leder till effektivare och mindre onaturliga interaktioner.', 'ta': 'எங்கள் இலக்கு என்னவென்றால் ஒரு உரையாடல் மேலாளர் கொண்டுள்ள திறமைகளை எப்படி சேர்க்க முடியும் என்பதை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும். நாம் முதல் படிகளை இந்த பொது இலக்குக்கு மாற்றி செய்கிறோம் செயல் திசைக்கோள் பார்வை உரையாடல் மாதிரி அதிகரித்து ஒரு தீர்ப்பு செய்யும் உறுப்புடன் அதிகரிக்கும் பி நம்முடைய ஆய்வுகள் ஒரு தீர்ப்பு செய்யும் உறுப்புகளை சேர்த்துக் கொண்டு காட்டுகிறது சிறிது திரும்பப்படும் உரையாடல்களை உருவாக்குகிறது மற்', 'ur': 'ہمارا مقصد یہ ہے کہ کس طرح ایک диалог منظور کے ذریعے لائے ہوئے قابلیت کو دیکھ سکتے ہیں کہ آخر-to-end visually grounded conversational agents میں شامل ہو سکتے ہیں. ہم اس عمومی مقصد کی طرف آغاز قدم کرتے ہیں کہ ایک کام کی طرف متوجہ ہوئی ویزیئل دیالوگ موڈل کو اضافہ کرنے کے ذریعہ ایک فیصلہ کرنے کے مطابق تصمیم کرتا ہے کہ ایک تصویر میں موقع ریفرنٹ کی شناسایی کرنا چاہے یا کسی طرح کی بات روک کرنا چاہے. ہمارے تحقیقات کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک فیصلہ کرنے کے مطابق اضافہ کرنے کے لئے بہت کم دفع کرنے والی دائلوں کو پیدا کرتا ہے اور ان میں کم بغیر ضروری سوالات بھی شامل ہوتے ہیں، یہاں سے زیادہ مطابق اور کم ناطبیعی تعاملات کی وجہ سے نک', 'uz': "Mavzumizning maqsadimiz, dialog boshqaruvchisi qanday qobiliyatlarni o'rganishni o'rganamiz va oxiriga ko'rib tashqi qo'llanmalar bilan qo'llaniladi. Biz vazifaning yuqori oyna modelini qoʻshish uchun birinchi qadam orqali boshqaramiz, va xususiyatlarni qoʻshish komponentini qoʻshish mumkin, rasmni koʻrsatish uchun jadvalni ajratish uchun keyingi soʻrov savol soʻrash, yoki to'g'ri qilish uchun muloqatlarni to ʻxtatish mumkin. Analytikiz qo'shish komponentini qoʻshish uchun muloqatlarni takrorlash qo'shib keladi va u juda kam kerakli maslahatlarni qo'shish mumkin, shunday qilib qo'shimcha foydalanuvchi va kam bo'lmagan interfektlar sababchi bo'ladi.", 'vi': 'Mục tiêu của chúng ta là tìm hiểu làm thế nào khả năng được một người quản lý cuộc đối thoại mang lại có thể được tham gia vào các đặc vụ trực tiếp. Chúng tôi tiến hành bước đầu đến mục tiêu chung này bằng cách tăng cường mô hình cuộc đối thoại trực tiếp với một thành phần quyết định có nên hỏi câu hỏi tiếp theo để xác định mục tiêu trong ảnh, hoặc dừng cuộc đối thoại để đoán. Phân tích của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng việc thêm vào một thành phần quyết định sẽ tạo ra các cuộc đối thoại ít lặp lại hơn và bao gồm ít những câu hỏi không cần thiết, có khả năng dẫn đến các tương tác hiệu quả và ít dị thường hơn.', 'bg': 'Нашата цел е да проучим как способностите, внесени от мениджъра на диалога, могат да бъдат включени в визуално обосновани разговорни агенти от край до край. Ние правим първите стъпки към тази обща цел, като разширим модела на визуален диалог, ориентиран към задачите, с компонент за вземане на решения, който решава дали да зададе допълнителен въпрос, за да идентифицира целевия референт в изображението, или да спрем разговора, за да направим предположение. Нашите анализи показват, че добавянето на компонент за вземане на решения води до диалози, които са по-малко повтарящи се и включват по-малко ненужни въпроси, като по този начин потенциално водят до по-ефективни и по-малко неестествени взаимодействия.', 'da': 'Vores mål er at undersøge, hvordan de evner, som en dialog manager bringer ind, kan inkluderes i end-to-end visuelt grundede samtaleagenter. Vi tager de første skridt hen imod dette generelle mål ved at udvide en opgaveorienteret visuel dialog model med en beslutningskomponent, der beslutter, om vi skal stille et opfølgende spørgsmål for at identificere en målreferent i et billede, eller stoppe samtalen for at gætte. Vores analyser viser, at tilføjelse af en beslutningskomponent giver dialoger, der er mindre gentagne og indeholder færre unødvendige spørgsmål, hvilket potentielt fører til mere effektive og mindre unaturlige interaktioner.', 'hr': 'Naš cilj je da istražimo kako se sposobnosti koje je donio menadžer dijaloga mogu uključiti u vizualno osnovane razgovorne agente. Napravimo početne korake prema ovom općem cilju povećanjem model a vizuelnog dijaloga s komponentom donošenja odluka koji odlučuje da li pitati pitanje za praćenje ciljnog referenta na sliki ili zaustaviti razgovor kako bi se pogodio. Naše analize pokazuju da dodavanje komponenta donošenja odluka proizvodi dijaloge koje su manje ponavljavajuće i koje uključuju manje nepotrebnih pitanja, stoga potencijalno dovede do učinkovitijih i manje neprirodnih interakcija.', 'de': 'Unser Ziel ist es zu erforschen, wie die Fähigkeiten, die ein Dialogmanager einbringt, in visuell geerdete End-to-End Gesprächspartner einbezogen werden können. Wir machen erste Schritte zu diesem allgemeinen Ziel, indem wir ein aufgabenorientiertes visuelles Dialogmodell um eine Entscheidungskomponente erweitern, die entscheidet, ob eine Folgefrage gestellt wird, um einen Zielreferenten in einem Bild zu identifizieren, oder ob das Gespräch gestoppt wird, um eine Vermutung zu treffen. Unsere Analysen zeigen, dass durch das Hinzufügen einer Entscheidungskomponente Dialoge entstehen, die sich weniger wiederholen und weniger unnötige Fragen enthalten, was potenziell zu effizienteren und weniger unnatürlichen Interaktionen führt.', 'ko': '우리의 목표는 대화 관리자가 가져오는 능력이 어떻게 시각적 기초 대화 에이전트에 포함되는지 탐색하는 것이다.우리는 임무를 대상으로 하는 시각적 대화 모델에 정책 결정 구성 요소를 추가함으로써 이 전체적인 목표를 실현한다. 이 구성 요소는 이미지의 목표 참조물을 확정하기 위해 후속 문제를 제기할지 아니면 대화를 멈추고 추측을 할지 결정한다.우리의 분석에 의하면 의사결정 구성 요소를 추가하면 중복된 대화가 적고 불필요한 문제가 적기 때문에 더욱 효율적이고 부자연스러운 상호작용을 초래할 수 있다.', 'id': 'Tujuan kita adalah untuk mengeksplorasi bagaimana kemampuan yang dibawa oleh manajer dialog dapat termasuk dalam agen percakapan berakhir ke akhir secara visual. Kita membuat langkah awal menuju tujuan umum ini dengan meningkatkan model dialog visual oriented tugas dengan komponen pembuat keputusan yang memutuskan apakah untuk menanyakan pertanyaan berikutnya untuk mengidentifikasi target referen dalam gambar, atau untuk menghentikan percakapan untuk membuat tebakan. Analisis kami menunjukkan bahwa menambahkan komponen pembuat keputusan menghasilkan dialog yang kurang berulang-ulang dan yang termasuk kurang pertanyaan yang tidak diperlukan, sehingga potensi mengarah ke interaksi yang lebih efisien dan kurang tidak alami.', 'sw': 'Lengo letu ni kutafuta jinsi uwezo ulivyoletwa na msimamizi wa mazungumzo inavyoweza kuingizwa mwishoni mwa mwisho wa majadiliano yanayoweza kuona. Tunafanya hatua za mwanzo kuelekea lengo hili jumla kwa kuongeza muundo wa mazungumzo yenye mwangalizi wa kazi na kiungo cha uamuzi kinachoamua kama kuuliza swali la ufuatiliaji kutambua lengo linaloelezwa katika picha, au kuacha mazungumzo ya kufanya dhana. Uchambuzi wetu unaonyesha kuwa kuongeza sehemu ya uamuzi unaotengeneza mazungumzo ambayo hayana ya kurejea tena na yanayojumuisha maswali machache yasiyoeleweka, kwa hiyo inawezekana kusababisha mazingira yenye ufanisi na isiyo na lazima.', 'nl': 'Ons doel is te onderzoeken hoe de vaardigheden van een dialoogmanager kunnen worden opgenomen in end-to-end visueel geaard gespreksagenten. We zetten eerste stappen naar dit algemene doel door een taakgericht visueel dialoogmodel uit te breiden met een besluitvormingscomponent die beslist of een vervolgvraag wordt gesteld om een doelreferentie in een afbeelding te identificeren, of om het gesprek te stoppen om een gok te maken. Uit onze analyses blijkt dat het toevoegen van een besluitvormingscomponent dialogen oplevert die minder repetitief zijn en minder onnodige vragen bevatten, waardoor mogelijk efficiëntere en minder onnatuurlijke interacties ontstaan.', 'fa': 'هدف ما اینه که بفهمیم که چگونه توانایی که توسط یک مدیر محافظت صحبت می\u200cکنند می\u200cتوانند در پایان و پایان ماموران صحبت بصورت تصویری شامل شوند. ما مرحله\u200cهای اولیه به سمت این هدف عمومی می\u200cکنیم با افزایش یک مدل گفتگوی دیده\u200cای بر روی کار با یک بخش تصمیم گرفتن تصمیم می\u200cگیریم که تصمیم می\u200cگیرد آیا از یک سوال دنبال کردن برای شناسایی یک گزارش هدف در یک تصویر بپرسیم، یا متوقف گفتگوی تا حدس بزنی تحلیل\u200cهای ما نشان می\u200cدهند که اضافه کردن یک قسمت تصمیم گرفتن یک قسمت تصمیم\u200cگیری باعث می\u200cشود گفتگوهای کمتر تکرار کننده باشند و این شامل سوال\u200cهای لازمی کمتر باشد، بنابراین potentially leading to more efficient and less unnatural interactions.', 'af': "Ons doel is om te ondersoek hoe die moontlikhede deur 'n dialoog bestuurder ingevoer kan word in die einde-tot-einde visualiseerde gesprekslykagente. Ons maak aanvanklike stappe na hierdie algemene doel deur 'n taak-orienteerde visuele dialoog model te groei met 'n besluit-maak komponent wat besluit of 'n volg-vraag vra om 'n doel verwysing in 'n beeld te identifiseer of om die gesprek te stop om 'n oog te maak. Ons analiserings wys dat byvoeg van 'n besluit gemaak komponent vervaar dialoog wat minder herhaal is en wat minder onnoodsaaklike vrae insluit, sodat potensieeel na meer effektief en minder onnatuurlike interaksies lei.", 'tr': 'Bizi흫 maksadymyz dijalog m체dirini흫 n채dip i챌eri giri힊en ukyplary g철rsel we so흫ra g철rsel g철r체힊me ajamlarynda dahil edilsin. Biz bu umumy maksady 체챌in ba힊langy챌 ad캇mlary edip, t채blisa흫 y철n체nde g철rsel dialogy흫 nusgasyny artyp, bir surede bir maksady 챌ykmak 체챌in bir soragy soramagy karar ber첵채n, 첵a-da so흫la힊many tahmin etmek 체챌in bes etmek 체챌in. Bizi흫 analyzamyz 챌철zg체t etmek komponenti eklemek 체챌in yzyna t채sirli bir soragy d체힊체r첵채r we bu 힊ekilde daha t채sirli we 첵akyn t채sirli bir etkile힊im 힊eklinde d체힊체r첵채r.', 'hy': 'Մեր նպատակն է ուսումնասիրել, թե ինչպես կարող են խոսակցության մենեջերի ներդրված ունակությունները ներառվել վերջ-վերջ տեսողական հաղորդակցման գործակալների մեջ: Մենք սկզբնական քայլեր ենք անում այս ընդհանուր նպատակի ուղղությամբ, ավելացնելով խնդիրների վրա ուղղությամբ գտնվող տեսողական հաղորդակցման մոդելը որոշումներ կայացնող բաղադրամասով, որը որոշում է, թե պետք է հետևական հարց տալ, որպեսզի նկարում Մեր վերլուծությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ որոշումներ կայացնող բաղադրիչների ավելացումը ստեղծում է ավելի քիչ կրկնվող երկխոսություններ, որոնք ներառում են ավելի քիչ անհրաժեշտ հարցեր, ինչը պոտենցիալ հանգեցնում է ավելի արդյունավետ և ավելի քիչ անբնակ', 'am': 'አጋራችን የዳይሎችን መዳኛ እንዴት እንዲገቡ የሚችሉትን ልማድ ለመፍጠር ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን ደረጃዎች ወደዚህ አቀማመጥ አቀማመጥ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ትምህርታችን የውይይት ጉዳይ መጨመር አካባቢ ጥያቄዎችን መጨመር የሚያሳየው ጥያቄ እና የማይፈለገው ጥያቄዎችን የሚያስፈልጋቸው ጥያቄዎች እና ስለዚህም የበለጠ ጥያቄ እና የማይታወቅ ጥያቄዎችን የሚያሳስፈልጋቸው ይችላል፡፡', 'sq': 'Qëllimi ynë është të eksplorojmë se si aftësitë e sjellura nga një menaxher dialogu mund të përfshihen në agjentë bisedimesh me bazë vizuale. Ne bëjmë hapa fillestarë drejt këtij qëllimi të përgjithshëm duke rritur një model dialogu vizual të orientuar në detyrë me një komponent vendimtar që vendos nëse të bëjë një pyetje të ndjekjes për të identifikuar një objektiv referent në një imazh, ose për të ndaluar bisedën për të bërë një supozim. Our analyses show that adding a decision making component produces dialogues that are less repetitive and that include fewer unnecessary questions, thus potentially leading to more efficient and less unnatural interactions.', 'bn': 'আমাদের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি ডায়ালগ ম্যানেজারের ক্ষমতা কিভাবে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি পর্যন্ত যোগাযোগী এজেন্টের সাথে যোগাযোগ করতে পারে। আমরা এই সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্যের দিকে প্রাথমিক পদক্ষেপ তৈরি করি একটি কাজ-দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিত দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি ডায়ালগ মডেল যোগ করার মাধ্যমে একটি সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারণ করার সিদ্ধান্ত আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ দেখা যাচ্ছে যে একটি সিদ্ধান্ত নির্ধারিত বিষয়বস্তুর সাথে যোগ করা যায় তারা আলোচনা পুনরাবৃত্তি প্রদান করে এবং যার মধ্যে অল্প প প্রশ', 'bs': 'Naš cilj je da istražimo kako se sposobnosti koje predstavlja menadžer dijaloga mogu uključiti u vizualno osnovane razgovorne agente. Napravimo početne korake prema ovom općem cilju povećanjem model a vizuelnog dijaloga sa komponentom donošenja odluka koja odlučuje da li postavlja pitanje za praćenje ciljnog referenta na sliki ili da zaustavi razgovor kako bi se pogodio. Naše analize pokazuju da dodavanje komponenta donošenja odluka proizvodi dijaloge koje su manje ponavljavajuće i koje uključuju manje nepotrebnih pitanja, stoga potencijalno dovede do učinkovitijih i manje neprirodnih interakcija.', 'ca': "El nostre objectiu és explorar com les habilitats portades per un gestor de diàleg es poden incloure en agents de conversació visualment fundamentats. Fem pas inicials cap a aquest objectiu general augmentant un model de diàleg visual orientat a les tasques amb un component de prendre decisions que decideix si fer una pregunta de seguiment per identificar un referent d'objectiu en una imatge o per aturar la conversa per fer una conjectura. Les nostres anàlisis mostren que afegir un component de prendre decisions produeix diàlegs menys repetitius i que inclouen menys preguntes innecessàries, portant així potencialment a interaccions més eficients i menys inneaturals.", 'et': 'Meie eesmärk on uurida, kuidas dialoogijuhi poolt sisse toodud võimeid saab kaasata lõpp-otsa visuaalselt maandatud vestlusagentidesse. Selle üldeesmärgi suunas teeme esimesed sammud, täiendades ülesandepõhist visuaalset dialoogi mudelit otsustava komponendiga, mis otsustab, kas esitada järelküsimus, et tuvastada pildil sihtmärk või peatada vestlus, et teha arvamus. Meie analüüsid näitavad, et otsustamiskomponendi lisamine toob kaasa dialoogid, mis on vähem korduvad ja sisaldavad vähem tarbetuid küsimusi, mis võib viia tõhusamate ja vähem ebaloomulike suhtlusteni.', 'az': 'Bizim məqsədimiz diyalət müdürünün necə yaratdığı bacarıqlarını görünümlü görünümlü müzakirçilərə daxil etmək idi. Biz bu genel məqsədilə başlanğıç adımlar yaratdıq, bir surətdə məqsədil referentini tanıtmaq və ya müzakirə etmək üçün dəyişiklik vermək üçün çəkinmə komponenti ilə göndərilən görünür dialogu modelini artırmaq üçün. Bizim analizimiz göstərir ki, karar vermək komponenti əlavə etmək daha az tekrarlı və daha az təsirli suallar içərisində daha çox faydalı və daha az təsirli interaksiyalar yaradır.', 'fi': 'Tavoitteenamme on selvitt채채, miten dialogihallinnan tuomat kyvyt voidaan sis채llytt채채 p채채st채 p채채h채n visuaalisesti pohjautuviin keskusteluagentteihin. Otamme ensimm채iset askeleet kohti t채t채 yleist채 tavoitetta lis채채m채ll채 teht채v채l채ht철ist채 visuaalista dialogimallia, jossa on p채채t철ksentekokomponentti, joka p채채tt채채, haluammeko esitt채채 lis채kysymyksen kuvan kohdereferentin tunnistamiseksi vai lopetetaanko keskustelu arvauksen tekemiseksi. Analyysimme osoittavat, ett채 p채채t철ksentekokomponentin lis채채minen tuottaa v채hemm채n toistuvia ja v채hemm채n tarpeettomia kysymyksi채 sis채lt채vi채 dialogeja, mik채 saattaa johtaa tehokkaampaan ja v채hemm채n luonnottomaan vuorovaikutukseen.', 'cs': 'Naším cílem je prozkoumat, jak mohou být schopnosti přinášené manažerem dialogu zahrnuty do komplexních vizuálně uzemněných konverzačních agentů. První kroky k tomuto obecnému cíli děláme rozšířením modelu vizuálního dialogu orientovaného na úkoly o rozhodovací složku, která rozhoduje, zda položit následnou otázku k identifikaci cílového referenta na obrázku, nebo zastavit konverzaci, aby odhadl. Naše analýzy ukazují, že přidání rozhodovací složky vytváří dialogy, které se méně opakují a obsahují méně zbytečných otázek, což potenciálně vede k efektivnějším a méně nepřirozeným interakcím.', 'jv': 'Kita goal punika dipoleh kapan kanggo ngerasai kapan kanggo nguasai menejer dialog dumadhi iki ning titik-titik sing alêr-titik neng sistem conversationêr Awake dhéwé éntuk mulai nggawe aturan akeh jenenge iki dadi, iso nggawe task-Orientasi dialog sistem sing beraksi yang kompon sing nggawe barang nggawe geraksi perusahaan langkung dianggawe tarjamahan kanggo kowe ngubah tarjamahan kanggo Ketok Panjenengan', 'he': 'המטרה שלנו היא לחקור איך היכולות שהובילו על ידי מנהל דיאלוג יכולות להיות כוללות בסוכנים שיחה מבוססים מבחינה חזותית סוף-סוף. We make initial steps towards this general goal by augmenting a task-oriented visual dialogue model with a decision-making component that decides whether to ask a follow-up question to identify a target referent in an image, or to stop the conversation to make a guess.  הניתוחים שלנו מראים שההוספת רכיבת קיבלת החלטות יוצרת דיאלוגים פחות חוזרים וכוללים פחות שאלות לא הכרחיות, ולכן פוטנציאלית מובילה לאינטראקציות יותר יעילות ופחות לא טבעיות.', 'ha': "Gayinmu ne dõmin Mu jarraba jini abincin da aka shigar da manajan zauren akwatin bayani na ƙari-ƙari da aka baka mazaɓa da gane. Mu ƙãga hanyõyi na farko zuwa wannan goan gaba, ko kuma Mu ƙara wata motel mai nuna cikin zauren akwatin aiki da yana da wani ƙunci mai yin hukunci, wanda yana hukunta idan an tambayi wani tambayi na daban-daba don a gane maganar da ake cikin wani zane, ko kuma Mu ƙara mazaɓa don ya yi zato. AnalyyinMu na nũna cẽwa, ƙara da kamufin ya hukunta, yana fitar zauren akwatin bayani masu ƙaranci da za'a iya duba, kuma yana cikin su masu tambayar da bã da amfani ba, don haka yana iya ƙaranci masu fasahan aiki da ba'a ƙayyade ba.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས We make initial steps towards this general goal by augmenting a task-oriented visual dialog model with a decision-making component that decides whether to ask a follow-up question to identify a target referent in an image, or to stop the conversation to make a guess. ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་གདམ་གས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་ཁ་སྐོང་རུང་བའི་ཌའི་ལོག་བློ་གཏོང་མི་འདུག', 'sk': 'Naš cilj je raziskati, kako je mogoče sposobnosti, ki jih prinaša vodja dialoga, vključiti v vizualno utemeljene pogovorne agente od konca do konca. Začetni koraki k temu splošnemu cilju naredimo z razširitvijo modela vizualnega dialoga, usmerjenega v nalogo, s komponento odločanja, ki odloča, ali naj postavimo nadaljnje vprašanje za identifikacijo ciljnega referenca na sliki ali ustavimo pogovor, da ugibamo. Naše analize kažejo, da dodajanje komponente odločanja ustvarja dialoge, ki se manj ponavljajo in vključujejo manj nepotrebnih vprašanj, kar lahko vodi do učinkovitejših in manj nenaravnih interakcij.'}
{'en': 'Sequence-to-Sequence Data Augmentation for Dialogue Language Understanding', 'ar': 'تسلسل إلى تسلسل زيادة البيانات لفهم لغة الحوار', 'es': 'Aumento de datos secuencia a secuencia para la comprensión del lenguaje de diálogo', 'pt': 'Aumento de dados de sequência a sequência para compreensão da linguagem de diálogo', 'fr': 'Augmentation des données de séquence en séquence pour la compréhension du langage dialoguant', 'ja': 'ダイアログ言語を理解するためのシーケンス間データ拡張', 'zh': '所以对话解释的序列到序列数据增强', 'hi': 'संवाद भाषा समझ के लिए अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम डेटा संवर्धन', 'ru': 'Расширение данных последовательности к последовательности для понимания языка диалога', 'ga': 'Méadú Sonraí Seicheamh-go-Seicheamh le haghaidh Tuiscint Teanga Agallaimh', 'hu': 'Szekvencia-szekvencia adatok bővítése a párbeszédnyelv megértéséhez', 'el': 'Αύξηση δεδομένων αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχία για κατανόηση γλώσσας διαλόγου', 'ka': 'დიალოგის ენების განსხვავებაზე მონაცემების აგგენტირება', 'it': 'Aumento dei dati sequenziali per la comprensione del linguaggio di dialogo', 'lt': 'Dialogo kalbos supratimo duomenų didinimas iš eilės į eilę', 'kk': 'Диалог тілдерін түсініктіру үшін реттеу- және реттеу деректерін көтеру', 'mk': 'Агментација на податоците од секвенција до секвенција за разбирање на јазикот на дијалогот', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗിന്റെ ഭാഷയ്ക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ആഗ്രഹം', 'mt': 'Sequence-to-Sequence Data Augmentation for Dialogue Language Understanding', 'mn': 'Диалог хэл ойлгохын тулд дарааллаас дарааллаар өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэлт', 'no': 'Sekvens- til- sekvens- data- augmentasjon for dialogforståking av språk', 'pl': 'Rozszerzenie danych sekwencyjnych dla zrozumienia języka dialogowego', 'ro': 'Augmentarea datelor secvență-secvență pentru înțelegerea limbajului de dialog', 'sr': 'Povećavanje podataka za razumevanje jezika dijaloga', 'si': 'සංවාදය භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්න වෙනුවෙන් ක්\u200dරමණාවෙන් ක්\u200dරමණා', 'so': 'Ogeysiinta macluumaadka ee dhamaadka labada xilliga ee la xiriira luuqada garsoorida', 'sv': 'Sekvens-till-sekvens dataökning för dialog språkförståelse', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் மொழிக்கு புரிந்து கொள்ள வேண்டிய தகவல் ஒலிப்பெயர்ப்பு', 'ur': 'دائیلوگ زبان سمجھنے کے لئے سکوئنس- تا- سکوئنس ڈاٹ اگنٹेंٹ', 'uz': 'Dialogga oĘ»xshash uchun davom etish', 'vi': 'Thêm dữ liệu tiết kiệm cho hiểu biết ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Увеличаване на данни от последователност към последователност за разбиране на езика на диалога', 'hr': 'Povećanje podataka za razumijevanje jezika dijaloga', 'nl': 'Sequence-to-Sequence Data Augmentation voor dialoogtaal begrijpen', 'da': 'Sekvens-til-sekvens dataudvidelse til dialog sprogforståelse', 'de': 'Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Datenerweiterung für das Verständnis von Dialogsprachen', 'id': 'Augmentasi Data Sequence-to-Sequence untuk Memahami Bahasa Dialog', 'fa': 'افزایش داده\u200cهای بعدی به بعدی برای فهمیدن زبان محاوره', 'sw': 'Uongezeko wa data kwa ajili ya lugha ya Dialogue', 'tr': 'Dialog dilini düşünmek üçin sıralanjak-täsirlemek Maglumaty Aňlamak', 'ko': '대화 언어 이해에 사용되는 시퀀스에서 시퀀스 데이터 확장', 'af': 'Sequence- to- sequence Data Augmentation for Dialog Language Understanding', 'am': 'የመረጃ ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Rritja e të dhënave nga sekuenca në sekuencë për kuptimin e gjuhës së dialogut', 'hy': 'Հաջորդականության և հաջորդականության տվյալների աճը լեզվի հասկանալու համար', 'az': 'Dialoog dili anlama üçün Sıradan-Sıradan Data Uygulaması', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ ভাষার বুঝতে পারার জন্য সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্ড ডাটা অ্যাগমেন্টেশন', 'bs': 'Povećanje podataka za razumijevanje jezika dijaloga', 'ca': 'Aumentació de dades de secuencia a secuencia per a entendre el llenguatge del diàleg', 'cs': 'Rozšíření dat sekvence na sekvenci pro porozumění dialogovému jazyku', 'et': 'Järjest järjestusse andmete liigendamine dialoogikeele mõistmiseks', 'fi': 'Sequence-to-Sequence Data Augmentation for Dialogue Language Understanding', 'jv': 'Seyense-to-Seyense data AGKLASS kanggo Language Sampeyan Dialog', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Povečanje podatkov iz zaporedja do zaporedja za razumevanje jezika v pogovornem oknu', 'he': 'תוספת מידע מעקב לעקב כדי להבין שפת דיאלוג', 'bo': 'Sequence-to-Sequence Data Augmentation for Dialog Language Understanding'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we study the problem of data augmentation for language understanding in task-oriented dialogue system. In contrast to previous work which augments an utterance without considering its relation with other utterances, we propose a sequence-to-sequence generation based data augmentation framework that leverages one utterance’s same semantic alternatives in the training data. A novel diversity rank is incorporated into the utterance representation to make the model produce diverse utterances and these diversely augmented utterances help to improve the language understanding module. Experimental results on the Airline Travel Information System dataset and a newly created semantic frame annotation on Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset show that our framework achieves significant improvements of 6.38 and 10.04 F-scores respectively when only a training set of hundreds utterances is represented. Case studies also confirm that our method generates diverse utterances.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، ندرس مشكلة زيادة البيانات لفهم اللغة في نظام الحوار الموجه نحو المهام. على عكس العمل السابق الذي يعزز الكلام دون النظر في علاقته بالألفاظ الأخرى ، فإننا نقترح إطارًا لزيادة البيانات قائم على التسلسل إلى التسلسل الذي يعزز البدائل الدلالية نفسها لفظ واحد في بيانات التدريب. تم دمج تصنيف تنوع جديد في تمثيل الكلام لجعل النموذج ينتج أقوالًا متنوعة وتساعد هذه الكلمات المعززة بشكل متنوع على تحسين وحدة فهم اللغة. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة بيانات نظام معلومات السفر بالطائرة والتعليق التوضيحي للإطار الدلالي الذي تم إنشاؤه حديثًا على مجموعة بيانات ستانفورد متعددة الأدوار والحوار متعدد المجالات أن إطار عملنا يحقق تحسينات كبيرة تبلغ 6.38 و 10.04 درجة F على التوالي عندما تكون مجموعة تدريب من مئات الكلمات المنطوقة فقط يتمثل. تؤكد دراسات الحالة أيضًا أن طريقتنا تولد أقوالًا متنوعة.', 'es': 'En este artículo, estudiamos el problema del aumento de datos para la comprensión del lenguaje en un sistema de diálogo orientado a tareas. A diferencia del trabajo anterior que aumenta un enunciado sin considerar su relación con otros enunciados, proponemos un marco de aumento de datos basado en la generación de secuencia a secuencia que aprovecha las mismas alternativas semánticas de un enunciado en los datos de entrenamiento. Se incorpora un rango de diversidad novedoso en la representación de enunciados para que el modelo produzca enunciados diversos y estos enunciados aumentados de manera diversa ayudan a mejorar el módulo de comprensión del lenguaje. Los resultados experimentales en el conjunto de datos del Sistema de Información de Viajes de Aerolíneas y una anotación de marco semántico recién creada en el Conjunto de datos de diálogo multigiro y multidominio de Stanford muestran que nuestro marco logra mejoras significativas de 6.38 y 10.04 puntuaciones F, respectivamente, cuando solo un conjunto de entrenamiento de cientos se representan los enunciados. Los estudios de casos también confirman que nuestro método genera expresiones diversas.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, estudamos o problema de aumento de dados para a compreensão da linguagem em um sistema de diálogo orientado a tarefas. Em contraste com o trabalho anterior que aumenta um enunciado sem considerar sua relação com outros enunciados, propomos uma estrutura de aumento de dados baseada na geração de sequência a sequência que aproveita as mesmas alternativas semânticas de um enunciado nos dados de treinamento. Uma nova classificação de diversidade é incorporada à representação do enunciado para fazer com que o modelo produza diversos enunciados e esses enunciados diversamente aumentados ajudam a melhorar o módulo de compreensão da linguagem. Resultados experimentais no conjunto de dados do Airline Travel Information System e uma anotação de quadro semântico recém-criado no conjunto de dados de diálogo de vários turnos e vários domínios de Stanford mostram que nossa estrutura alcança melhorias significativas de 6,38 e 10,04 F-scores, respectivamente, quando apenas um conjunto de treinamento de centenas de enunciados é representado. Estudos de caso também confirmam que nosso método gera diversos enunciados.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions le problème de l'augmentation des données pour la compréhension de la langue dans un système de dialogue axé sur les tâches. Contrairement aux travaux précédents qui augmentaient un énoncé sans tenir compte de sa relation avec d'autres énoncés, nous proposons un cadre d'augmentation de données basé sur la génération de séquence à séquence qui exploite les mêmes alternatives sémantiques d'un énoncé dans les données d'apprentissage. Un nouveau classement de diversité est incorporé dans la représentation de l'énoncé pour que le modèle produise divers énoncés et ces énoncés augmentés de manière diversifiée aident à améliorer le module de compréhension de la langue. Les résultats expérimentaux sur le jeu de données Airline Travel Information System et une annotation de cadre sémantique nouvellement créée sur le jeu de données de dialogue multi-tours et multi-domaines de Stanford montrent que notre framework obtient des améliorations significatives de 6.38 et 10.04 F-scores respectivement lorsque seul un ensemble d'entraînement de centaines les énoncés sont représentés. Les études de cas confirment également que notre méthode génère divers énoncés.", 'ja': '本稿では、タスク指向の対話システムにおける言語理解のためのデータ増強の問題について研究する。 他の発話との関係を考慮せずに発話を拡張する以前の研究とは対照的に、我々は、トレーニングデータ内の同じ発話の意味的代替手段を活用するシーケンスツーシーケンス生成ベースのデータ拡張フレームワークを提案する。 新規の多様性ランクが発話表現に組み込まれ、モデルが多様な発話を生成するようになり、これらの多様な拡張発話は言語理解モジュールを改善するのに役立ちます。 航空旅行情報システムデータセットの実験結果と、スタンフォードマルチターン、マルチドメイン対話データセットの新たに作成されたセマンティックフレームアノテーションは、数百の発話のトレーニングセットのみが表現された場合、当社のフレームワークがそれぞれ6.38および10.04 F -スコアの大幅な改善を達成することを示しています。 ケーススタディはまた、私たちの方法が多様な発話を生成することを確認します。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणाली में भाषा की समझ के लिए डेटा वृद्धि की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। पिछले काम के विपरीत जो अन्य कथनों के साथ अपने संबंध पर विचार किए बिना एक उच्चारण को बढ़ाता है, हम एक अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम पीढ़ी आधारित डेटा संवर्धन ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो प्रशिक्षण डेटा में एक उच्चारण के समान शब्दार्थ विकल्पों का लाभ उठाता है। मॉडल को विविध कथनों का उत्पादन करने के लिए एक उपन्यास विविधता रैंक को उच्चारण प्रतिनिधित्व में शामिल किया गया है और ये विविध रूप से संवर्धित कथन भाषा समझने वाले मॉड्यूल को बेहतर बनाने में मदद करते हैं। एयरलाइन यात्रा सूचना प्रणाली डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम और स्टैनफोर्ड मल्टी-टर्न, मल्टी-डोमेन डायलॉग डेटासेट पर एक नवनिर्मित सिमेंटिक फ्रेम एनोटेशन से पता चलता है कि हमारा ढांचा क्रमशः 6.38 और 10.04 एफ-स्कोर के महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है जब केवल सैकड़ों कथनों का एक प्रशिक्षण सेट दर्शाया जाता है। केस स्टडीज़ भी इस बात की पुष्टि करती हैं कि हमारी विधि विविध कथन उत्पन्न करती है।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы изучаем проблему расширения данных для понимания языка в целевой диалоговой системе. В отличие от предыдущей работы, которая дополняет высказывание, не рассматривая его связь с другими высказываниями, мы предлагаем фреймворк расширения данных, основанный на последовательности-последовательности, который использует одни и те же семантические альтернативы одного высказывания в обучающих данных. Романный ранг разнообразия включен в представление высказываний, чтобы заставить модель производить разнообразные высказывания, и эти разнообразно дополненные высказывания помогают улучшить модуль понимания языка. Экспериментальные результаты по набору данных Системы информации о путешествиях авиакомпании и недавно созданной семантической рамочной аннотации по набору данных Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue показывают, что наша структура достигает значительных улучшений в 6,38 и 10,04 F-балла соответственно, когда представлен только обучающий набор из сотен фраз. Тематические исследования также подтверждают, что наш метод генерирует различные высказывания.', 'zh': '本文治面语系统中语解数增强。 先不虑其言而强其事,建一以次成数框架,当框架练数以一语同语义代方。 入一新多样性,以生异语,多样化益语模块。 航空旅行信息系统数集之实验与斯坦福大学多合多域对数集上新造之语义框架注,当仅示数百语之训集时,吾框架各得6.3810.04 F之显也。 例究还证,吾法有异语。', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar fhadhb an mhéadaithe sonraí le haghaidh tuiscint teanga i gcóras dialóige tasc-dhírithe. I gcodarsnacht le hobair roimhe seo a mhéadaíonn caint gan a ghaol le cainteanna eile a chur san áireamh, molaimid creat breisithe sonraí bunaithe ar ghiniúint ó sheicheamh go seicheamh a ghiaráil roghanna shéimeantacha aon chaint amháin sna sonraí oiliúna. Tá céim éagsúlachta úrnua ionchorpraithe san léiriú cainte chun an tsamhail a chur ar fáil do chainteanna éagsúla agus cuidíonn na cainte méadaithe ilghnéitheacha seo le feabhas a chur ar an modúl tuiscint teanga. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacar sonraí Córas Faisnéise Taistil Aerlíne agus nóta fráma shéimeantach nuachruthaithe ar Thacar Sonraí Idirphlé Il-uaine, Il-fearainn Stanford go mbaineann ár gcreat feabhsuithe suntasacha amach de 6.38 agus 10.04 F-scóir faoi seach nuair nach bhfuil ach sraith oiliúna de na céadta cainte ann. Tá ionadaíocht. Deimhníonn cás-staidéir freisin go ngineann ár modh cainteanna éagsúla.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მონაცემების აგგენტაციის პრობლემა ვისწავლოთ ენაზე გავისწავლობა დავაკეთებული დიალოგის სისტემაში. პირველი სამუშაო, რომელიც საუკეთესო სიტყვების შესახებ სხვა სიტყვების შესახებ გავუმჯობით, ჩვენ გვეძლავს სერექციის შესახებ მონაცემების აგგენტაციის ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ერთი სიმანტიკური ალ პრომენტის განსხვავებულობის რეგინტი ჩვენებულია, რომელიც მოდელის განსხვავებული სიტყვების გამოსახულება და ეს განსხვავებული სიტყვების გამოსახულება მუშაობა ენის განსხვავებული მოდულის გაუფ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები Airline Travel Information System-ის მონაცემების სისტემა და ახალი შექმნა სენმანტიური ფემენტიური ანოტაცია Stanford Multi-domain დიალოგის მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი ფემენტი 6.38 და 10.04 F-scores-ის მნიშვნელოვანია, როცა მ Case studies also confirm that our method generates various words.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, μελετάμε το πρόβλημα της αύξησης δεδομένων για την κατανόηση της γλώσσας σε σύστημα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένο σε καθήκοντα. Σε αντίθεση με την προηγούμενη εργασία που αυξάνει μια ομιλία χωρίς να εξετάζει τη σχέση της με άλλες εκφράσεις, προτείνουμε ένα πλαίσιο αύξησης δεδομένων βασισμένο σε γενιά αλληλουχίας που αξιοποιεί τις ίδιες σημασιολογικές εναλλακτικές λύσεις μιας ομιλίας στα δεδομένα εκπαίδευσης. Ένας νέος βαθμός ποικιλομορφίας ενσωματώνεται στην αναπαράσταση προφορών για να κάνει το μοντέλο να παράγει ποικίλες εκφράσεις και αυτές οι ποικίλα ενισχυμένες εκφράσεις βοηθούν στη βελτίωση της ενότητας κατανόησης γλωσσών. Πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων του συστήματος ταξιδιωτικών πληροφοριών αεροπορικών εταιρειών και μια πρόσφατα δημιουργημένη σημασιολογική σημείωση πλαισίου στο σύνολο δεδομένων διαλόγου πολλαπλών στροφών του Στάνφορντ δείχνουν ότι το πλαίσιο μας επιτυγχάνει σημαντικές βελτιώσεις των βαθμολογιών 6.38 και 10.04 αντίστοιχα όταν αντιπροσωπεύεται μόνο ένα εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο εκατοντάδων ομιλιών. Μελέτες περιπτώσεων επιβεβαιώνουν επίσης ότι η μέθοδος μας παράγει ποικίλες εκφράσεις.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban a feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerben történő adatbővítés problémáját vizsgáljuk. Az előző munkákkal ellentétben, amelyek anélkül bővítik a kifejezést, hogy figyelembe vennék annak más kifejezésekkel való kapcsolatát, egy szekvencia-szekvencia generációs adatbővítési keretrendszert javasolunk, amely az egyik kifejezés ugyanazon szemantikai alternatíváit használja a képzési adatokban. Egy új sokszínűségi rang kerül beépítésre a kimondási reprezentációba, hogy a modell különböző kimondásokat hozzon létre, és ezek a különbözően kiterjesztett kimondások segítenek a nyelvértési modul javításában. A légitársaságok utazási információs rendszerének kísérleti eredményei és a Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset újonnan létrehozott szemantikai keretjegyzései azt mutatják, hogy a keretrendszerünk jelentős javulást ér el a 6,38, illetve 10,04 F pontszámok esetén, ha csak száz kifejezésből álló képzéskészlet jelenik meg. Esettanulmányok azt is megerősítik, hogy módszerünk különböző kifejezéseket hoz létre.', 'it': "In questo articolo, studiamo il problema dell'aumento dei dati per la comprensione del linguaggio in un sistema di dialogo orientato ai compiti. In contrasto con il lavoro precedente che aumenta un'espressione senza considerare la sua relazione con altre espressioni, proponiamo un framework di aumento dei dati basato sulla generazione sequenza-sequenza che sfrutta le stesse alternative semantiche di una parola nei dati di formazione. Un nuovo grado di diversità è incorporato nella rappresentazione dell'espressione per far sì che il modello produca espressioni diverse e queste espressioni variamente aumentate aiutano a migliorare il modulo di comprensione della lingua. I risultati sperimentali sul set di dati Airline Travel Information System e un'annotazione semantica appena creata su Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset mostrano che il nostro framework raggiunge miglioramenti significativi rispettivamente di 6.38 e 10.04 F-scores quando è rappresentato solo un set di formazione di centinaia di parole. Gli studi di casi confermano anche che il nostro metodo genera espressioni diverse.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, тілдерді түсініп, бағытталған диалог жүйесінде деректерді көптеу мәселесін зерттейміз. Алдыңғы жұмыстың қарсы бұл сөздерді басқа сөздермен қатынасыз көтерілмеген, біз бір сөздердің бірнеше семантикалық альтернативтерін оқыту деректерінде бір сөздердің көтерілігін қолданатын деректерді жасау бағдарламасына қарсы Номандық әртүрлі тілдерді түсіну модуліне көмектесу үшін үлгі түрлі сөйлемелерді жасау үшін сөйлемелерді түсініктіру үшін түсініктемелерді жасайды. Airline Travel Information System деректер жиынының эксперименталдық нәтижелері және станфорд көпшілікті, көпшілікті диалог деректер бағдарламасының жаңа құрылған семантикалық фрейм жазбаларын көрсетеді. Біздің фрейміміздің 6,38 және 10,04 F- нәтижелерін тек жүздеген сөз ба Кейбір әріптерді зерттеу әдіміміздің түрлі сөздерді жасайтынын құптайды.', 'lt': "Šiame dokumente nagrinėjame duomenų didinimo problem ą kalbų supratimui užduotims orientuoto dialogo sistemoje. In contrast to previous work which augments an utterance without considering its relation with other utterances, we propose a sequence-to-sequence generation based data augmentation framework that leverages one utterance's same semantic alternatives in the training data.  Į išraiškos atstovavimą įtraukiamas naujas įvairovės lygis, kad model is gautų įvairaus pobūdžio išraiškas, o šie įvairaus pobūdžio išraiškos padeda pagerinti kalbos supratimo modulį. Eksperimentiniai oro linijų kelionių informacinės sistemos duomenų rinkinio rezultatai ir naujai sukurta semantinė sistemų annotacija Stanfordo daugkartiniame dialogo duomenų rinkinyje rodo, kad mūsų sistema gerokai pagerina atitinkamai 6,38 ir 10,04 F taškų, kai atstovaujama tik šimtų išraiškų mokymo rinkiniui. Atliekant atvejų tyrimus taip pat patvirtinama, kad mūsų metodas sukuria įvairių išraiškų.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, го проучуваме проблемот со зголемувањето на податоците за разбирање на јазикот во системот на дијалог ориентиран на задачите. За разлика од претходната работа која ја зголемува изразата без да се разгледува нејзината врска со другите изрази, предложуваме рамка за зголемување на податоците базирана на секвенца до секвенца, која ги користи истите семантични алтернативи на еден израз во податоците за обука. Нов ранг на различност е вклучен во репрезентацијата на изразите за да се направи моделот да произведува различни изрази и овие различно зголемени изрази помагаат во подобрувањето на модулот за разбирање на јазикот. Експерименталните резултати на податоците на Аерлајн патничкиот информативен систем и новоформираната семантичка рамка на Стенфорд Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset покажуваат дека нашата рамка постигнува значителни подобрувања од 6,38 и 10,04 F-оценки, односно кога се претставува само тренинг на стотици изрази. Случајните студии, исто така, потврдуваат дека нашиот метод генерира различни изрази.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ജോലിക്കുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് സംവിധാനത്തില്\u200d ഭാഷക്ക് മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രശ് മറ്റു വാക്കുകളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടാതെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊടുക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നതിനെ മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു നോവല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dത്തിരിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷയിലെ  എയര്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ട്രാവേല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡില്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ സെമാന്റിക് ഫ്രെയിമ്മെന്റിക് വിവരങ്ങളും സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡില്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്ന കേസ് പഠനങ്ങളും നമ്മുടെ രീതി വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു എന്ന് ഉറപ്പ് വരുത്തുന്നു.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэл ойлгохын тулд өгөгдлийн нэмэлт асуудлыг судалж байна. Өмнөх ажлын эсрэг өөр хэлбэртэй харилцааныг бодохгүй илтгэлийг нэмэгдүүлдэг, бид дарааллаар дарааллаар дарааллаар өгөгдлийн нэмэгдүүлэх хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь нэг хэлэлцээний ижил semantic альтернативуудыг сургалт өгөгдлийн мэдээлл Шинэ олон төрлийн хэлбэр нь загварыг өөр өөр хэлбэрүүдийг бүтээхэд хэлний ойлголтын модулийг сайжруулахад тусалдаг. Airline Travel Information System өгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүнг болон Стэнфорд олон эргэлтийн хэмжээний диалог өгөгдлийн мэдээллийн сангийн шинэ хэмжээний сэтгэл хөдлөл нь 6.38 болон 10.04 Ф-score нь зөвхөн зуун хэмжээний дасгал хөгжүүлэхэд бидний хэмжээний хэмжээний сайхан сайхан сайхан Кэйсийн судалгаагаар бидний арга нь олон хэлбэрүүдийг бий болгодог гэдгийг баталдаг.', 'no': "I denne papiret studerer vi problemet med økning av data for å forstå språk i oppgåveorientert dialogsystem. I contrast to previous work which increases an utterance without considering its relation with other words, we propose a sequence-to-sequence generation based data augmentation framework that levers one utterance's same semantic alternatives in the training data. Eit nytt diversitetsrank er inkludert i uttalerepresentasjonen for å gjera modellen til å produsere ulike uttaler og desse forskjellige økte uttalene hjelper til å forbedra språksforstålmodulen. Eksperimentalne resultat på datasettet for Flytningsinformasjonssystemet og eit nytt oppretta semantisk rammerknader på Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domenedialogdatabaset viser at rammeverket vårt gjer signifikante forbetringar av 6,38 og 10,04 F-poeng respectivt når berre eit opplæringssett av hundre uttrykk vert representert. Skildringar av små bokstavar bestemmer også at metoden vårt generer ulike uttrykk.", 'pl': 'W artykule badamy problem powiększania danych dla rozumienia języka w systemie dialogu zorientowanego na zadania. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich prac zwiększających wypowiedź bez uwzględnienia jej relacji z innymi wypowiedziami, proponujemy oparty na generowaniu sekwencji na sekwencji framework powiększania danych, który wykorzystuje te same alternatywy semantyczne jednej wypowiedzi w danych treningowych. Nowy ranking różnorodności jest włączony do reprezentacji wypowiedzi, aby model produkował różnorodne wypowiedzi, a te różnorodnie rozszerzone wypowiedzi pomagają poprawić moduł rozumienia języka. Wyniki eksperymentalne dotyczące zbioru danych Systemu Informacji Podróży Lotniczej oraz nowo utworzona adnotacja ramki semantycznej na Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset pokazują, że nasz framework osiąga znaczącą poprawę wyników 6.38 i 10.04 F, odpowiednio gdy reprezentowany jest tylko zestaw treningowy setek wypowiedzi. Studia przypadków potwierdzają również, że nasza metoda generuje różnorodne wypowiedzi.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, studiem problema măririi datelor pentru înțelegerea limbii în sistemul de dialog orientat spre sarcini. Spre deosebire de lucrarea anterioară care mărește o pronunțare fără a lua în considerare relația sa cu alte pronunțări, propunem un cadru de generare secvență-la-secvență bazat pe mărirea datelor, care valorifică aceleași alternative semantice ale unei pronunțări în datele de instruire. Un nou grad de diversitate este încorporat în reprezentarea cuvântului pentru a face modelul să producă cuvânturi diverse, iar aceste cuvânturi diferit amplificate ajută la îmbunătățirea modulului de înțelegere a limbii. Rezultatele experimentale privind setul de date al sistemului de informații de călătorie aeriană și adnotările de cadru semantic nou create pe Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset arată că cadrul nostru realizează îmbunătățiri semnificative de scoruri 6.38 și, respectiv, 10.04 F atunci când este reprezentat doar un set de instruire de sute de cuvinte. Studiile de caz confirmă, de asemenea, că metoda noastră generează expresii diverse.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි දත්ත විශාලයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ භාෂාව තේරුම්ගන්නේ කාර්ය ප්\u200dරධානයේ  මුලින් වැඩට විරුද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වැඩ කරනවා කියලා, අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර දත්ත වැඩ කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙන නවාත්මක විවිධානයක් සංවිධානයක් ඇතුළත් කරනවා විවිධ වචනයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න සඳහා භාෂාව තේරුම් මොඩියුල් විශේෂ ක ස්ටැන්ෆෝර්ඩ් Multi-turn, Multi-domain සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සංවාද සැකසුම් 6.38 සහ 10.04 F-scores සංවේදනය කරනවා කියලා පෙන්වන්නේ. කේස් පරීක්ෂණය තහවුරු කරනවා අපේ විදියට වෙනස් කියන්න පුළුවන් කියලා.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo problem povećanja podataka za razumevanje jezika u sistemu dijaloga orijentiranog na zadatke. Za razliku od prethodnog rada koji povećava govor bez razmatranja njegove veze s a drugim rečenicama, predlažemo okvir povećanja podataka osnovanog na sekvenciji generacije podataka koji utiče na iste semantične alternative jednog rečenja u podacima obuke. Novi red raznolikosti se uključuje u predstavljanje govora kako bi model proizveo razne reči i ove raznolikom povećane reči pomogli da poboljša modul razumevanja jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka o avionskoj putovanju informacijskom sustavu i novom stvorenom semantičkom okviru na brojnom okviru Stanford Multi-Turn, Multi-domain Dialog Datasetu pokazuju da naš okvir postiže značajne poboljšanje od 6,38 i 10,04 F-rezultata, odgovarajući, kada se predstavlja samo set a obuke stotina reči. Istraživanje slučajeva takođe potvrđuje da naša metoda stvara različite reči.', 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari masalah peningkatan data untuk pemahaman bahasa dalam sistem dialog orientasi tugas. In contrast to previous work which augments an utterance without considering its relation with other utterances, we propose a sequence-to-sequence generation based data augmentation framework that leverages one utterance's same semantic alternatives in the training data.  Rangkaian pelbagai baru digabungkan dalam perwakilan ungkapan untuk membuat model menghasilkan ungkapan berbeza dan ungkapan-ungkapan bertambah berbeza ini membantu untuk meningkatkan modul pemahaman bahasa. Keputusan percubaan pada set data Sistem Maklumat Perjalanan Talian Terbang dan anotasi bingkai semantik yang baru dicipta pada Set Data Dialog Berlipat-putar, Berlipat-domain Stanford menunjukkan bahawa bingkai kami mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan pada skor-F 6.38 dan 10.04 berdasarkan apabila hanya set latihan ratusan ungkapan diwakili. kajian kes juga mengesahkan bahawa kaedah kita menghasilkan perkataan yang berbeza.", 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaynu ku baranaynaa dhibaatada la kordhinta macluumaadka ee waxgarashada luuqada ee ku qoran nidaamka diyaarinta shaqada. Iska duwan shaqadii hore oo hadal kordhisay, iyadoo a an ka fiirsanayn xiriirka hadallada kale, waxaan soo jeedaynaa qarni ah oo ku saleysan danbiyada kordhiska data-dabar-dabar ah, kaas oo ku hagaajiya hadal isku mid ah oo u bedela labada macluumaadka waxbarashada. Shahaado kala duduwan ee warqada waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa qeybta hadalka, si uu modelku u soo bixiyo hadal kala duduwan iyo hadalladaas oo kala duduwan oo ay u caawiyaan hagaajinta qalabka waxgarashada luqada. Imtixaanka ku saabsan macluumaadka kooxda ee safarka ee Airline Travel Information System (Airline Information System System System) iyo qayb la cusboonaysiiyey sanad semantic frame annotation on Stanford Multi-turn, multi-domain Dialogue Dataset waxay muuqataa in firaaqadeennu uu gaadho hagaajin muhiim ah oo u gaaraya qiyaastii 6.38 iyo 10.04 F scores marka lagu xuquujiyo koox boqol oo hadal oo kaliya. Waxbarashada arrimaha waxaa sidoo kale lagu xaqiijiyaa in qaababkayagu uu sameeyo hadal kala duduwan.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw il-problema ta’ żieda fid-dejta għall-fehim tal-lingwi fis-sistema ta’ djalogu orjentat lejn ix-xogħol. B’kuntrast max-xogħol preċedenti li jżid l-espressjoni mingħajr ma nikkunsidraw ir-relazzjoni tagħha ma’ espressjonijiet oħra, qed nipproponu qafas ta’ żieda tad-dejta bbażat fuq ġenerazzjoni ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza li jiġġenera l-istess alternattivi semantiċi ta’ espressjoni fid-dejta tat-taħriġ. Livell ġdid ta’ diversità huwa inkorporat fir-rappreżentanza tal-espressjonijiet biex il-mudell jipproduċi espressjonijiet differenti u dawn l-espressjonijiet miżjuda b’mod diversifikat jgħinu biex jitjieb il-modulu tal-fehim tal-lingwa. Riżultati esperimentali dwar is-sett tad-dejta tas-Sistema ta’ Informazzjoni dwar il-Vjaġġar tal-Linja tal-Ajru u annotazzjoni semantika ġdida maħluqa fuq is-sett tad-dejta dwar id-djalogu b’diversi dawriet u b’diversi dominji ta’ Stanford juru li l-qafas tagħna jikseb titjib sinifikanti ta’ punteġġi F ta’ 6.38 u 10.04 rispettivament meta jkun rappreżentat biss sett ta’ taħriġ ta’ mijiet ta’  Studji ta’ każijiet jikkonfermaw ukoll li l-metodu tagħna jiġġenera dikjarazzjonijiet differenti.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats studerar vi problemet med dataförstärkning för språkförståelse i uppgiftsorienterat dialogsystem. Till skillnad från tidigare arbete som förstärker ett yttrande utan att beakta dess relation till andra yttranden, föreslår vi ett sekvens-till-sekvensgenerationsbaserat dataförstärkningsramm som utnyttjar samma semantiska alternativ i utbildningsdata. En ny mångfald ranking införlivas i yttranderepresentationen för att få modellen att producera olika yttranden och dessa mångfaldigt utökade yttranden bidrar till att förbättra språkförståelsemodulen. Experimentella resultat på Airline Travel Information System datauppsättningen och en nyskapad semantisk ramkommentar på Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset visar att vårt ramverk uppnår betydande förbättringar på 6,38 respektive 10,04 F-poäng när endast en utbildningsuppsättning av hundratals yttranden representeras. Fallstudier bekräftar också att vår metod genererar olika yttranden.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மொழியை புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் உரையாடல் முறைமையில் தரவு அதிகரிப்பு பிரச்சனை முந்தைய வேலையை அதிகரிக்கும் வார்த்தையை மற்ற வார்த்தைகளுடன் தொடர்பு பார்க்காமல் அதிகப்படுத்தும் முறையில், நாம் பயிற்சி தகவலில் ஒரே வார்த்தையின் ஒத்த ப A novel diversity rank is incorporated into the utterance representation to make the model produce diverse utterances and these diversely augmented utterances help to improve the language understanding module.  விமான பயணிற்சி தகவல் அமைப்பு தகவல் அமைப்புகள் மேலும் புதிய உருவாக்கப்பட்ட semantic சட்டத்தின் அறிவிப்பு, பல- டொமைன் உரையாடல் தகவல் அமைப்புகள் காட்டுகிறது நூறு வார்த்தைகள் மட்டும் பயிற்சி செய்து க கேஸ் ஆய்வுகள் நம் முறைமை பல்வேறு வார்த்தைகளை உருவாக்குகிறது என்று உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறது.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم دنیا کی سمجھ کی زبان کے لئے ڈیٹا اضافہ کے مسئلہ کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں۔ اگلے کام کے مقابلہ میں جو ایک کلام کو اضافہ کرتا ہے اور دوسری کلمات کے ساتھ اس کا ارتباط بغیر نظر نہ کرتا ہے، ہم ایک دفعہ سے سفارش دیتے ہیں جو دفعہ اضافہ کرتی ہے جو ایک کلمات کی ایک سیمنٹی الفاظت کو تدریس دیٹے میں لازم کرتا ہے. ایک نئی مختلف رقم کی بات نمونی میں شامل ہوا ہے کہ مدل مختلف کلمات پیدا کرے اور یہ مختلف افزایش کی کلمات زبان سمجھنے کے موڈل کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے مدد کریں۔ Airline Travel Information System ڈاٹ سٹم پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ اور استنفورد Multi-turn پر ایک نئی سیمنٹی فرم اظہار کرتا ہے، Multi-domain Dialog Dataset دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا فرم 6.38 اور 10.04 F-scores کی بڑی اضافہ پہنچتا ہے جب صرف صدوں کلمات کی تعلیم سٹم کی تعلیم کرتی ہے۔ کیس کی تحقیقات بھی تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ ہمارا طریقہ مختلف باتوں کو پیدا کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz vazifa bilan muloqat tizimda tilni o'rganish uchun maʼlumot yozuvchini o'rganamiz. Oldingi ish bilan so'zlarni boshqa so'zlar bilan bog'liq tashkilotni tasdiqlash mumkin, biz bir so'zni taʼminlovchi maʼlumot uchun bir necha soʻzlashtirish chegarasini qo'llab beradi. Name Name Case studies also confirm that our method generates diverse utterances.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề gia tăng dữ liệu để hiểu ngôn ngữ trong hệ thống đối thoại hướng nhiệm vụ. Trái với những công việc trước đây mà không xem xét mối quan hệ của nó với những lời phát biểu khác, chúng tôi đề xuất một hệ thống gia tăng dữ liệu dựa trên chuỗi-tới-trình tạo-lập-động-lập-động-lập-các-lập-lập-động để điều khiển những thay đổi ngữ-nghĩa giống nhau trong dữ liệu huấn luyện. Một cấp bậc đa dạng mới được nhập vào đại diện phát biểu để làm cho mô hình sản xuất những phát biểu khác nhau và những phát biểu phức tạp này giúp cải thiện mô-đun hiểu ngôn ngữ. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên tập tin Hệ thống thông tin dịch chuyển hàng không Airline và một kỷ lục mới được tạo ra trên Thống kê đa phiên bản Stanford, Truyền hình đa miền cho thấy cơ sở của chúng tôi đạt được những cải tiến quan trọng của 6.38 và 10.0h F-điểm khi chỉ có một bộ huấn luyện hàng trăm phát biểu. Các nghiên cứu điển hình cũng xác nhận rằng phương pháp của chúng ta tạo ra nhiều lời nói.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия изследваме проблема за увеличаване на данните за разбиране на езика в система за диалог, ориентирана към задачи. За разлика от предишна работа, която увеличава дадено изказване, без да се отчита връзката му с други изказвания, ние предлагаме рамка за увеличаване на данните въз основа на генериране последователност към последователност, която използва същите семантични алтернативи на дадено изказване в данните за обучение. Нов ранг на многообразие е включен в представянето на изказванията, за да накара моделът да произвежда разнообразни изказвания и тези разнообразно разширени изказвания спомагат за подобряване на модула за разбиране на езика. Експерименталните резултати на набора от данни за авиационната информационна система за пътуване и новосъздадената семантична рамка анотация на Станфорд многозавой, многодомейн диалог данни показват, че нашата рамка постига значителни подобрения от 6,38 и 10,04 резултата съответно, когато е представен само обучителен набор от стотици изказвания. Проучванията на казусите също потвърждават, че методът ни генерира разнообразни изказвания.', 'da': 'I denne artikel undersøger vi problemet med dataforøgelse til sprogforståelse i opgaveorienteret dialogsystem. I modsætning til tidligere arbejde, der forøger en udtalelse uden at overveje dens relation til andre udtalelser, foreslår vi en sekvens-til-sekvens generation baseret dataaugmentation framework, der udnytter en udtales samme semantiske alternativer i træningsdataene. En ny mangfoldighedsrang er indarbejdet i ytringsrepræsentationen for at få modellen til at producere forskellige ytringer, og disse forskelligt forstærkede ytringer hjælper med at forbedre sprogforståelsesmodulet. Eksperimentelle resultater på Airline Travel Information System datasættet og en nyoprettet semantisk ramme annotation på Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue datasæt viser, at vores ramme opnår betydelige forbedringer på henholdsvis 6,38 og 10,04 F-scores, når kun et træningssæt på hundredvis af udtalelser er repræsenteret. Casestudier bekræfter også, at vores metode genererer forskellige udtalelser.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel bestuderen we het probleem van data augmentatie voor taalbegrip in taakgericht dialoogsysteem. In tegenstelling tot vorig werk dat een uiting uitbreidt zonder rekening te houden met de relatie met andere uitingen, stellen we een sequence-to-sequence generatie gebaseerd data augmentation framework voor dat gebruik maakt van dezelfde semantische alternatieven in de trainingsgegevens. Een nieuwe diversiteit rang is opgenomen in de uiting representatie om het model verschillende uitingen te laten produceren en deze divers augmented uitingen helpen de taal begrijpmodule te verbeteren. Experimentele resultaten op de dataset van het Airline Travel Information System en een nieuw gecreëerde semantische frameanotatie op Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset tonen aan dat ons framework aanzienlijke verbeteringen van respectievelijk 6.38 en 10.04 F-scores bereikt wanneer slechts een trainingsset van honderden uitspraken wordt vertegenwoordigd. Case studies bevestigen ook dat onze methode diverse uitingen genereert.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo problem povećanja podataka za razumijevanje jezika u sustavu dijaloga orijentiranog na zadatke. Za suprotnost prethodnom radu koji povećava govor bez razmatranja njegove veze s drugim govorom, predlažemo okvir povećanja podataka koji se temelji na generaciji sekvence na sekvenci, koji utječe na iste semantičke alternative jednog govora u podacima obuke. Novi rank raznolikosti uključuje se u predstavljanje govora kako bi model proizveo razne govore i ove raznolikosti povećane govore pomogli poboljšati modul razumijevanja jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka o avionskoj putovanju informacijskom sustavu i novom stvorenom semantičkom okviru na brojnom okviru Stanford Multi-Turn, Multi-domain Dialog Datasetu pokazuju da naš okvir postigne značajne poboljšanja od 6,38 i 10,04 F-rezultata, odgovarajući, kada se predstavlja samo set a obuke stotina izjava. Istraživanja slučajeva također potvrđuju da naša metoda stvara različite riječi.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari masalah peningkatan data untuk pemahaman bahasa dalam sistem dialog oriented tugas. Berbeda dengan pekerjaan sebelumnya yang meningkatkan sebuah ucapan tanpa mempertimbangkan hubungannya dengan ucapan lain, kami mengusulkan rangka peningkatan data berdasarkan urutan ke urutan yang menggunakan alternatif semantis yang sama dalam data latihan. Sebuah rangka keagamaan yang baru ditemukan dalam representation ungkapan untuk membuat model menghasilkan ungkapan-ungkapan yang berbeda dan ungkapan-ungkapan yang bertambah berbeda ini membantu untuk meningkatkan modul pemahaman bahasa. Experimental results on the Airline Travel Information System dataset and a newly created semantic frame annotation on Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset show that our framework achieves significant improvements of 6.38 and 10.04 F-scores respectively when only a training set of hundreds utterances is represented.  Studi kasus juga mengkonfirmasi bahwa metode kita menghasilkan kata-kata yang berbeda.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir das Problem der Datenaugmentation für das Sprachverständnis im aufgabenorientierten Dialogsystem. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten, die eine Äußerung erweitern, ohne ihre Beziehung zu anderen Äußerungen zu berücksichtigen, schlagen wir ein sequenzbasiertes Data Augmentation Framework vor, das dieselben semantischen Alternativen einer Äußerung in den Trainingsdaten nutzt. Ein neuartiger Diversity-Rang wird in die Äußerungsrepräsentation integriert, damit das Modell verschiedene Äußerungen produziert und diese unterschiedlich erweiterten Äußerungen helfen, das Sprachverständnismodul zu verbessern. Experimentelle Ergebnisse auf dem Airline Travel Information System Datensatz und eine neu erstellte semantische Frame Annotation auf Stanford Multi-Turn, Multi-Domain Dialogue Dataset zeigen, dass unser Framework signifikante Verbesserungen von 6.38 bzw. 10.04 F-Scores erzielt, wenn nur ein Trainingsset von Hunderten Äußerungen dargestellt wird. Fallstudien bestätigen auch, dass unsere Methode vielfältige Äußerungen generiert.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مشکل افزایش داده\u200cها را برای درک زبان در سیستم گفتگوی مستقیم به کار مطالعه می\u200cکنیم. در مقابل کارهای قبلی که سخنرانی را بدون توجه به ارتباط با کلمات دیگر افزایش می دهد، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهار یک صفحه مختلف نویسی در نمایش سخنرانی شامل شده است تا مدل کلمات مختلف را تولید کند و این کلمات مختلف افزایش داده شده کمک می کند تا مولد درک زبانی را بهتر کند. نتایج تجربه روی مجموعه داده های سیستم اطلاعات پرواز هواپیمایی و نویسندگی سازمانی جدید ساخته شده در مورد چرخه های متعددی استنفورد، اطلاعات دایره های متعدد دومینی نشان می دهد که چرخه های ما بهترین شدید 6.38 و 10.04 فوق العاده را درباره\u200cاش می\u200cرساند، زمانی که فقط یک مجموعه آموزش از صدها سخنرانی مطالعه\u200cهای پرونده\u200cها همچنین تایید می\u200cکنند که روش ما کلمات مختلف را تولید می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunasoma tatizo la kuongeza taarifa kwa ajili ya kuelewa lugha katika mfumo wa mazungumzo yanayoelekea kazi. Tofauti na kazi iliyopita ambayo inaongeza hotuba bila kuzingatia uhusiano wake na maneno mengine, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kuongeza taarifa kwa mfululizo wa vizazi vinavyotokana na mfululizo unaoendelea namna moja ya hotuba yenye tofauti za kimapenzi katika takwimu za mafunzo. Kiwango cha rangi tofauti cha riwaya kinajumuisha katika uwakilishi wa hotuba ili kutengeneza mtindo huo kutengeneza lugha tofauti na maneno haya yanayoongezeka tofauti yanasaidia kuboresha kifaa cha kuelewa lugha. Matokeo ya majaribio juu ya taarifa za mfumo wa Habari za ndege na matangazo ya mpya ya mifumo ya sekondari ya Stanford yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu unapata maboresho makubwa ya vipindi 6.38 na 10.04 wakati tu seti ya mafunzo ya maneno ya mamia tu inawakilishwa. Case studies also confirm that our method generates diverse utterances.', 'ko': '본고는 임무를 위한 대화 시스템에서 언어 이해의 데이터 확충 문제를 연구했다.이전에 다른 말과의 관계를 고려하지 않고 말을 확충하는 작업과 달리 우리는 서열을 바탕으로 서열로 생성된 데이터 확충 구조를 제시했다. 이 구조는 훈련 데이터 중의 한 말의 같은 의미 대체를 이용했다.언어 표현에 새로운 다양성 등급을 추가하여 모델에 다양성 언어를 생성시켰다. 이런 다양성이 강화된 말은 언어 이해 모듈을 향상시키는 데 도움이 된다.항공여행정보시스템 데이터집합과 스탠퍼드대 다회, 다영역 대화 데이터집합에 새로 만들어진 의미 구조 주석에 대한 실험 결과 수백 개의 말만 대표하는 훈련집합에서 우리의 구조는 각각 6.38과 10.04F 점수의 현저한 개선을 이루었다.사례 연구도 우리의 방법이 서로 다른 말을 만들어 낼 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne studiojmë problem in e rritjes së të dhënave për kuptimin e gjuhës në sistemin e dialogut të orientuar ndaj detyrave. Në kundërshtim me punën e mëparshme që rrit një shprehje pa konsideruar lidhjen e saj me shprehjet e tjera, ne propozojmë një kuadër të rritjes s ë të dhënave të bazuar në secuencë-në-sekuencë që nxjerr të njëjtat alternativa semantike të një shprehjeje në të dhënat e trainimit. Një rend i ndryshëm është përfshirë në përfaqësimin e shprehjes për të bërë modelin të prodhojë shprehje të ndryshme dhe këto shprehje të rritura në mënyrë të ndryshme ndihmojnë për të përmirësuar modulin e kuptimit të gjuhës. Rezultatet eksperimentale në grupin e të dhënave të Sistemit të Informacionit të Udhëtimit të Linjave Ajrore dhe një anotacion të ri semantik në grupin e të dhënave të dialogut me shumëkthesa të Stanfordit, me shumëdomeni tregojnë se kuadri ynë arrin përmirësime të rëndësishme respektivisht 6.38 dhe 10.04 pikë F kur përfaqësohet vetëm një grup trajnimi me qindra shprehje. Studimet e rasteve konfirmojnë gjithashtu se metoda jonë gjeneron shprehje të ndryshme.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ ላይ የድምፅ ማስታወቂያውን ለቋንቋ ማስታወቂያውን የምናስተምር መከራ ነው፡፡ ከቀድሞው ሥራ ጋር ንግግርን ባይጨምር ከሌሎች ቃላት ጋር ግንኙነት ባይኖር እናስገድዳለን፡፡ በቋንቋው ማስታወቂያውን ማሻሻል ይችላል፡፡ የ.አየር የመንገድ መረጃ ድምፅ ማድረጊያውን ማድረግ እና በስቴንፎርድ ብዛት ላይ አዲስ የተፈጠረ የsemantic frame ማስታወቂያ፣ ብዙ-ዶሜን ዳይጦማር ማተሚያ ማድረግ ፍሬማችን በቁጥር 6.38 እና 10.04 F-scores በተለየ የመቶዎች ንግግር ማስተካከል ብቻ እንደሆነ የሚያደርግ ፍሬማችን ትልቅ ማድረግ እንዲያገኛል፡፡ Case studies also confirm that our method generates diverse utterances.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons studeer die probleem van data augmentasie vir taal verstanding in taak-orienteerde dialoog stelsel. In kontras met die vorige werk wat 'n uitspraak vergroot sonder om sy verwanting met ander uitspraak te onderwerp, voorstel ons 'n sekvensie-na-sekvensie genereering gebaseerde data vergroot raamwerk wat dieselfde semantiese alternatiewe van een uitspraak in die onderwerp data verwyder. 'n Nuwe diversiteit rank is ingesluit in die uitspraak voorstelling om die model verskeie uitspraak te produseer en hierdie verskeie vergroot uitspraak te help om die taal verstaan module te verbeter. Eksperimentale resultate op die Airline Travel Information System dataset en 'n nuwe gemaakte semantiese raam annotasie op Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialoog Dataset wys dat ons raamwerk betekeurige verbeteringe van 6.38 en 10.04 F-scores indien slegs 'n oefening stel van honderd uitspraak verteenwoordig word. Kas studies bevestig ook dat ons metode verskeie woorde genereer.", 'hy': 'In this paper, we study the problem of data augmentation for language understanding in task-oriented dialogue system.  Ի հակադրություն նախորդ աշխատանքին, որը բարձրացնում է արտահայտությունը առանց հաշվի առնելու դրա հարաբերությունը այլ արտահայտությունների հետ, մենք առաջարկում ենք հաջորդականություն հաջորդականությամբ սերունդ հիմնված տվյալների բարձրացման շրջանակ, որը օգտագործում է արտահայտությունը կրթու Նոր բազմազանությունը ներառվում է արտահայտության ներկայացման մեջ, որպեսզի մոդելը ստեղծի բազմազան արտահայտություններ, և այս բազմազան բարձրացված արտահայտությունները օգնում են բարելավել լեզվի հասկանալու մոդելը: Առևտրային ճանապարհորդական տեղեկատվական համակարգի տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկման արդյունքները և նորից ստեղծված սեմանտիկ շրջանակի annoտացիան Ստենֆորդի բազմաշրջանակի բազմաշրջանակի, բազմատիկ դասընթացի տվյալների համակարգի վրա ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր շրջանակը հասնում է 6.38 և 10.04 F-գնահատակ Կատահական ուսումնասիրությունները նաև հաստատում են, որ մեր մեթոդը ստեղծում է բազմազան արտահայտություններ:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, işlər tərəfindən danışan dialoq sistemində dil anlama üçün məlumatların artırmasının problemini öyrənirik. Əvvəlki işlərə baxmayaraq, s özləri digər sözlərlə əlaqəsini baxmayaraq çox böyükləndirir, biz təhsil məlumatlarında bir sözlərin semantik alternatifi ilə birlikdə təhsil etməyi təhsil edirik. Bu modeli müxtəlif sözləri ürəkləmək üçün yeni müxtəlif dərəcələrə daxil edilir və bu müxtəlif çoxlu sözləri dil anlama modulunun düzəltməsinə kömək edir. Airline Travel Information System verilənlərin təcrübəsi və Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialog Dataset təcrübəsi üçün yeni yaratdığı semantik fram annotasyonu göstərir ki, bizim qurğumuz 6.38 və 10.04 F-scoreların möhkəm düzəltmələrini göstərir. Yalnız yüz sözlərin təcrübəsini göstərildiyi zaman. Məsələlər də təsdiqləyir ki, metodumuz müxtəlif sözləri yaradır.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru, proučavamo problem povećanja podataka za razumijevanje jezika u sistemu dijaloga orijentiranog na zadatke. Za razliku od prethodnog rada koji povećava govor bez razmišljanja o njegovoj vezi s drugim govorom, predlažemo okvir povećanja podataka baziranog na generaciji sekvence na sekvenci koji utječe na iste semantičke alternative jednog govora u podacima obuke. Novi rank raznolikosti uključuje se u predstavljanje govora kako bi model proizveo razne govore i ove raznolikosti povećane govore pomogli u poboljšanju modula razumijevanja jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati na setu podataka o avionskoj putovanju informacijskom sustavu i novom stvorenom semantičkom okviru na Multi-Turn Stanford, Multi-domain Dialog Datasetu pokazuju da naš okvir postigne značajne poboljšanje od 6,38 i 10,04 F-rezultata, odgovarajući, kada se predstavlja samo set a obuke stotina izjava. Istraživanja slučajeva također potvrđuju da naša metoda stvara različite reči.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ভাষার বিষয়টি বোঝার জন্য ডাটা যোগাযোগের সমস্যা পড়ি। পূর্ববর্তী কাজের বিপরীতে যে ভাষার কথা বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে তা অন্য ভাষার সাথে তার সম্পর্ক বিবেচনা করা ছাড়াই, আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্যে একটি বাক্যের একই সেমা মোডেলের প্রতিনিধিত্বে বিভিন্ন ভাষণ উৎপাদনের জন্য একটি উপন্যাসের বৈচিত্র্যের স্তরে যোগ দেয়া হয়েছে এবং এই ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বুঝতে সাহ এয়ারলাইন ট্রাভেল তথ্য সিস্টেমের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল এবং স্ট্যান্ফোর্ড মাল্টিফোর্ড ডায়ালগ ডায়ালগেটে একটি নতুন সেমেন্টিক ফ্রেম বিজ্ঞাপনের পরিণতি দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ফ্রেম প মামলা গবেষণাও নিশ্চিত করেছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন ভাষণের সৃষ্টি করে।', 'ca': "In this paper, we study the problem of data augmentation for language understanding in task-oriented dialogue system.  Al contrari de la feina anterior que augmenta una expressió sense considerar la seva relació amb altres expressions, proposem un marc de augment de dades basat en secuencia a secuencia que aprofiti les mateixes alternatives semàntiques d'una expressió en les dades d'entrenament. Una nova diversitat està incorporada a la representació de les expressions per fer que el model produeixi diverses expressions i aquestes expressions molt augmentates ajuden a millorar el módul d'enteniment del llenguatge. Els resultats experimentals del conjunt de dades del Sistema d'Informació de Viatges Airline i una anotació de marc semàntic a Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialog Dataset mostren que el nostre marc aconsegueix millores significatives de 6,38 i 10,04 puntuacions F respectivament quan només es representa un conjunt d'entrenaments de centenars d'expressions. Els estudis de cas també confirmen que el nostre mètode genera expressions diverses.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou rozšíření dat pro porozumění jazyků v dialogovém systému orientovaném na úkoly. Na rozdíl od předchozí práce, která rozšiřuje výrok bez ohledu na jeho vztah s ostatními výroky, navrhujeme rámec pro rozšiřování dat založený na generování sekvencí, který využívá stejné sémantické alternativy jedné výroky v tréninkových datech. Nová hodnota diverzity je začleněna do reprezentace výroku, aby model produkoval různé výroky a tyto různorodě rozšířené výroky pomáhají zlepšit modul porozumění jazyku. Experimentální výsledky na datové sadě leteckého cestovního informačního systému a nově vytvořená anotace sémantického rámce na Stanford Multi-Turn, Multi-Domain Dialogue Dataset ukazují, že náš framework dosahuje významných zlepšení 6.38 a 10.04 F-skóre, resp. pokud je zastoupena pouze tréninková sada stovek výroků. Případové studie také potvrzují, že naše metoda generuje různé projevy.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös uurime andmete suurendamise probleemi keele mõistmiseks ülesandepõhises dialoogisüsteemis. Erinevalt varasematest töödest, mis täiendab väljendit, arvestamata selle seost teiste väljenditega, pakume välja järjestusest järjestuseni genereerimisel põhineva andmete suurendamise raamistiku, mis kasutab koolitusandmetes ühe väljendi samu semantilisi alternatiive. Väljakujunduse esitusse lisatakse uus mitmekesisuse aste, et mudel toodaks mitmekesiseid väljendeid ja need mitmekesiselt täiendatud väljendid aitavad parandada keeleoskuse mõistmise moodulit. Lennuettevõtja reisi infosüsteemi andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused ja äsja loodud semantilise raami annotatsioon Stanfordi mitme pöörde, mitme domeeni dialoogi andmekogumi kohta näitavad, et meie raamistik saavutab märkimisväärseid parandusi vastavalt 6,38 ja 10,04 F-skoori, kui esindatakse ainult sadu väljendeid. Juhtumiuuringud kinnitavad ka, et meie meetod tekitab erinevaid väljendeid.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz çykyş sisteminde çykyş düşünmesi üçin maglumaty ekleýän mesele. Öňki işiň üstüne bir s özleri başga sözleri bilen baglaýyşyny düşünmeden beýleki sözleri artýan, biz bir sözleri bilim maglumatynda bir semantik seçeneklerini etmän bir şekilde sequence-to-sequence döwletlere tabanly data üýtgetmek framyny teklip edýäris. Täze çeşitli sözleri çykarmak üçin sözleri çykarmak üçin düzüldir we bu dürli sözleri çykarmak üçin kömekleýär. Airline Travel Maglumaty sistemasynda örän netijesi we täze bir semantik frame duýgulamasynyň Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialog Maglumaty çykyşlarynyň çykyşymyzyň 6.38 we 10.04 F-अ अ अंतर we diňe ýüz sanlaryň öňünde boýunça gelişmelerini çykarýandygyny görkez. Meýdançalaryň ýene-de biziň metodamyzyň dürli sözleri döredigini takyklaýar.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä tutkitaan datan lisäämisen ongelmaa kielen ymmärtämiseksi tehtäväkeskeisessä dialogijärjestelmässä. Toisin kuin aiemmassa työssä, jossa lausetta laajennetaan ottamatta huomioon sen suhdetta muihin lauseisiin, ehdotamme sekvenssistä sekvenssiin perustuvaa datan lisäyskehystä, joka hyödyntää yhden lauseen samoja semanttisia vaihtoehtoja koulutusaineistossa. Lausumisesitykseen on sisällytetty uusi monimuotoisuusluokka, jonka avulla malli tuottaa erilaisia lauseita ja nämä moninkertaisesti lisätyt lauseet auttavat parantamaan kielen ymmärtämismoduulia. Kokeelliset tulokset Airline Travel Information System -tietokannasta ja äskettäin luodusta semanttisesta kehyksestä Stanfordin Multi-turn-, Multi-domain Dialogue Datasetistä osoittavat, että viitekehyksemme saavuttaa merkittäviä parannuksia 6,38 ja 10,04 F-pisteitä, kun vain sadan lauseen koulutussarja on edustettuna. Tapaustutkimukset vahvistavat myös, että menetelmämme tuottaa erilaisia ilmaisuja.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã karanta matsalar ƙaramako da aka ƙãra data dõmin fahimta harshe cikin tsarin zauren akwatin aiki da ke shirya. Tsamman da aikin da ya riga ya gaskata wata magana, bã da kula da haɗi da wasu magana ba, sai mu bubuɗa wata firam da za'a samar da danna ƙari-dubiyar da ke samar da salon da data za'a samar da maganar ta samu'a cikin data na ƙidãya. An shigar da wani daraja mai daban-daban da aka shigar da shi cikin shirin maganar, dõmin ya sanya motel ya fitar da wasu magana na daban-daban, kuma waɗannan magana masu ƙari da aka ƙara yana taimako in gyãra modulin hankalin harshen. Experiments on the data set of the Airline Traffic information system and a newly-formed semantic frame information on Stanford multi-turu, multi-Domen Dialog show that framermanmu yana sãmun significant improvements of respective 6.38 and 10.04 F-scores idan only an nuna set of several ɗari hotels kawai. Ana gaskata karatun masu sakan da hanyoyinmu yana ƙara magana-dabam-dabam.", 'jv': 'Nang pember iki, kita mulai perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno dadi nggawe langkung nggawe sistem sing urip nggawe tarjamahan. Tulung gampang ing mungkun gawe nguasai perusahaan langgar sampeyan ingkang liyane karo perusahaan anyar, kita supoyo sistem sing sekondiki-to-sekondiki sing basa dadi ampungan sing dimulai iki bakal terus sabên langgar sampeyan sampeyan mroleh dumaten. Awak dhéwé éntuk sing ngregani dipun ajeng Export data on the airline Trael information System dataset and a new create semanti frame anntation on STANforD Multi-convert, Multi-domain DialogDialog Datease show that we frame access to a Signual Progress of 6.34 and 10.04 F-points responsibly when only a Learning set of stony words is represented. Case Bu tutulamalar yendikondisih barang kelompok kita gambar kelompok nggawe layang kelompok', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו לומדים את הבעיה של גידול נתונים להבנת שפה במערכת דיאלוג ממוקדת למשימות. בניגוד לעבודה הקודמת שמגבירה ביטוי מבלי לשקול את היחסים שלה עם ביטויים אחרים, אנו מציעים מסגרת גידול מידע מבוססת רצף-לרצף שמגבירה את אותן אלטרנטיביות סמנטיות של ביטוי אחד בנתונים האימונים. מדרגת מגוון חדשה מורכבת לתוך מייצג המילים כדי לגרום לדוגמא לייצר מייצגים מגוונים והמייצגים המגודלים האלה עוזרים לשפר את מודול הבנה לשפה. תוצאות ניסויים על קבוצת נתונים של מערכת מידע הנסיעה של קווי התעופה והציון סמנטי שנוצר לאחרונה על קבוצת נתונים של סטנפורד עם סיבובים רבים, דיאלוגים רבים בתחומים מראות שהמסגרת שלנו משיגה שיפורים משמעותיים של 6.38 ו-10.04 נקודות F בהתאם כאשר רק קבוצת אימון של מאות מילים מוצגת. מחקרי מקרים מאשרים גם ששיטתנו יוצרת מבטות מגוונות.', 'sk': 'V prispevku preučujemo problem povečanja podatkov za razumevanje jezika v nalogo usmerjenem dialognem sistemu. V nasprotju s prejšnjim delom, ki povečuje izjavo brez upoštevanja njegove povezave z drugimi izjavami, predlagamo okvir za povečanje podatkov na podlagi generacije zaporedja v zaporedje, ki v podatkih usposabljanja uporablja enake semantične alternative enega izjave. V predstavitev izgovorov je vključena nova raznolikost, da model proizvaja različne izgovore, ti raznoliko povečani izgovori pa pomagajo izboljšati modul razumevanja jezika. Eksperimentalni rezultati o naboru podatkov o potovalnih informacijskih sistemih letalskih prevoznikov in novo ustvarjeni semantični oznaki okvirja na Stanfordskem naboru podatkov o dialogu z več obrati in več domenskimi podatki kažejo, da naš okvir doseže znatne izboljšave 6,38 oziroma 10,04 F-rezultatov, ko je predstavljen le nabor usposabljanja s stotinami izgovorov. Študije primerov potrjujejo tudi, da naša metoda ustvarja različne izgovore.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བ་གཞན་དང་མ་བསམ་པར་ལྡན་པའི་བརྗོད་རྐྱེན་བ་ཅིག་གི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ལྟ་བ་དང་། གསར་བརྗོད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འདི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྲོད་ཅིག་གསར་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ནང་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། Experimental results on the Airline Travel Information System dataset and a newly created semantic frame annotation on Stanford Multi-turn, Multi-domain Dialogue Dataset show that our framework achieves significant improvements of 6.38 and 10.04 F-scores respectively when only a training set of hundreds utterances is represented. ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྣ་ཚོགས་རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུང་མི་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Dialogue-act-driven Conversation Model : An Experimental Study', 'pt': 'Modelo de conversação guiado pelo diálogo: um estudo experimental', 'ar': 'نموذج محادثة يحركها الحوار: دراسة تجريبية', 'es': 'Modelo de conversación basado en actos de diálogo: un estudio experimental', 'fr': 'Modèle de conversation piloté par Dialogue-Act\xa0: une étude expérimentale', 'ja': 'ダイアログアクト主導の会話モデル：実験的研究', 'zh': '言-动之对,一实验究之', 'hi': 'संवाद-अधिनियम-संचालित वार्तालाप मॉडल: एक प्रयोगात्मक अध्ययन', 'ru': 'Модель разговора, основанная на диалоге: Экспериментальное исследование', 'ga': 'Samhail Chomhrá faoi thionchar gnímh : Staidéar Turgnamhach', 'ka': 'დიალოგი-ქექტის მოდელი შესაბამისი მოდელი : ექსპერიმენტური სწავლა', 'el': 'Μοντέλο συζήτησης που βασίζεται σε διάλογο: Μια πειραματική μελέτη', 'hu': 'Párbeszéd-aktus-vezérelt beszélgetési modell: egy kísérleti tanulmány', 'it': 'Modello di conversazione basato sul dialogo: uno studio sperimentale', 'ms': 'Model Perbualan Dipemacu-tindakan-dialog : Sebuah kajian percubaan', 'kk': 'Диалог- әрекетті жасау үлгісі: Эксперименталды зерттеу', 'ml': 'Dialogue-act-driven Conversation Model : An Experimental Study', 'mt': "Mudell ta' konverżjoni mmexxi minn djalogu : Studju Esperimentali", 'mn': 'Диалог-үйл ажиллагааны хөдөлгөөн ярилцлагын загвар : Эмчилгээний судалгаа', 'pl': 'Model konwersacji oparty na dialogu: badanie eksperymentalne', 'lt': 'Dialogue-act-driven Conversation Model : An Experimental Study', 'mk': 'Модел на разговори предводен од дијалогот: Експериментална студија', 'ro': 'Model de conversație bazat pe acte de dialog: un studiu experimental', 'so': 'Modulka talobixinta ee Dialog-act-driven: An Imtixaanka', 'sv': 'Dialogakt-driven konversationsmodell: En experimentell studie', 'ta': 'உரையாடல்- செயல் இயக்கப்பட்ட பேச்சு மாதிரி: ஒரு பரிசோதனை ஆய்வு', 'ur': 'Dialogue-act-driven Conversation Model : An Experimental Study', 'no': 'Dialog-act-driven samtalemodell : Ein eksperimentelt studie', 'sr': 'Model razgovora koji vodi na dijalogu : Eksperimentalno ispitivanje', 'si': 'සංවාදය- ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වාර්තා කතා කරණාකරණ නිර්මාණය : පරීක්ෂණ අධ්\u200dයය', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình thoại quay phim', 'nl': 'Dialoog-act gedreven gespreksmodel: een experimentele studie', 'da': 'Dialog-act-drevet samtalemodel: En eksperimentel undersøgelse', 'hr': 'Model razgovora koji vodi na dijalogu : Eksperimentalno ispitivanje', 'bg': 'Модел на разговор, основан на диалог: експериментално проучване', 'ko': '대화 행위가 구동되는 대화 모델: 실험 연구', 'sw': 'Dialogue-act-driven Conversation Model : An Experimental Study', 'de': 'Dialogaktengesteuertes Gesprächsmodell: Eine experimentelle Studie', 'fa': 'مدل مکالمه\u200cی گفتگوی با حرکت محاوره : یک مطالعه تجربه', 'tr': 'Öňe görkezilen soňra çykyş nusgasy : Bir synagly öwrenme', 'sq': 'Modeli i konversimit i drejtuar nga dialogu: Një studim eksperimental', 'af': "Dialog- act- driven Conversation Model : ' n Experimental Study", 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'id': 'Dialogue-act-driven Conversation Model : An Experimental Study', 'hy': 'Խոսախոսակցության ոլորտում հիմնված հաղորդակցման մոդել՝ փորձարկվող ուսումնասիրություն', 'az': 'Dialog-act-driven Conversation Model: An Experimental Study', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ- কাজ-চালানো কথোপকথন মডেল: একটি পরীক্ষা গবেষণা', 'ca': 'Model de conversació guiat pel diàleg: Un estudi experimental', 'et': 'Dialoogipõhine vestlusmudel: eksperimentaalne uuring', 'fi': 'Dialogue-act-driven Conversation Model: An Experimental Study', 'bs': 'Model razgovora na dijalogu : Eksperimentalno ispitivanje', 'cs': 'Konverzační model založený na dialogu: experimentální studie', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'Dialog-action-drived conversation model: an Test', 'sk': 'Model pogovora, ki temelji na dialogu: eksperimentalna študija', 'he': 'מודל שיחה מונע על ידי מעשה דיאלוג: מחקר ניסיוני', 'bo': 'Dialogue-act-driven Conversation Model : An Experimental Study'}
{'en': 'The utility of additional semantic information for the task of next utterance selection in an automated dialogue system is the focus of study in this paper. In particular, we show that additional information available in the form of dialogue acts when used along with context given in the form of dialogue history improves the performance irrespective of the underlying model being generative or discriminative. In order to show the model agnostic behavior of dialogue acts, we experiment with several well-known models such as sequence-to-sequence encoder-decoder model, hierarchical encoder-decoder model, and Siamese-based models with and without hierarchy ; and show that in all models, incorporating dialogue acts improves the performance by a significant margin. We, furthermore, propose a novel way of encoding dialogue act information, and use it along with hierarchical encoder to build a model that can use the sequential dialogue act information in a natural way. Our proposed model achieves an MRR of about 84.8 % for the task of next utterance selection on a newly introduced Daily Dialogue dataset, and outperform the baseline models. We also provide a detailed analysis of results including key insights that explain the improvement in MRR because of dialog act information.', 'ar': 'إن فائدة المعلومات الدلالية الإضافية لمهمة اختيار الكلام التالي في نظام الحوار الآلي هي محور الدراسة في هذه الورقة. على وجه الخصوص ، نظهر أن المعلومات الإضافية المتاحة في شكل أعمال الحوار - عند استخدامها جنبًا إلى جنب مع السياق المعطى في شكل تاريخ الحوار - تعمل على تحسين الأداء بغض النظر عن النموذج الأساسي الذي يكون توليديًا أو تمييزيًا. من أجل إظهار السلوك اللاأحادي لأفعال الحوار ، نجرب العديد من النماذج المعروفة مثل نموذج فك التشفير المتسلسل المتسلسل ، ونموذج وحدة فك التشفير الهرمي ، والنماذج القائمة على السيامي مع التسلسل الهرمي وبدونه ؛ وإظهار أنه في جميع النماذج ، يؤدي دمج أعمال الحوار إلى تحسين الأداء بهامش كبير. علاوة على ذلك ، نقترح طريقة جديدة لتشفير معلومات فعل الحوار ، واستخدامها جنبًا إلى جنب مع التشفير الهرمي لبناء نموذج يمكنه استخدام معلومات فعل الحوار المتسلسل بطريقة طبيعية. يحقق نموذجنا المقترح نسبة MRR تبلغ حوالي 84.8٪ لمهمة اختيار الكلام التالي في مجموعة بيانات الحوار اليومي المُقدمة حديثًا ، ويتفوق في الأداء على النماذج الأساسية. نقدم أيضًا تحليلاً مفصلاً للنتائج بما في ذلك الأفكار الرئيسية التي تشرح التحسن في MRR بسبب معلومات إجراء الحوار.', 'fr': "L'utilité d'informations sémantiques supplémentaires pour la sélection de l'énoncé suivant dans un système de dialogue automatisé est au centre de l'étude dans cet article. En particulier, nous montrons que les informations supplémentaires disponibles sous la forme d'actes de dialogue — lorsqu'elles sont utilisées avec le contexte donné sous forme d'historique de dialogue — améliorent les performances indépendamment du modèle sous-jacent génératif ou discriminatoire. Afin de montrer le comportement agnostique du modèle des actes de dialogue, nous expérimentons plusieurs modèles bien connus tels que le modèle encodeur-décodeur séquence à séquence, le modèle codeur-décodeur hiérarchique et les modèles siamois avec et sans hiérarchie\xa0; et montrons que dans tous les modèles, l'incorporation d'actes de dialogue améliore la performance d'une marge significative. En outre, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode de codage des informations d'acte de dialogue, et l'utilisons avec un codeur hiérarchique pour construire un modèle qui peut utiliser les informations d'acte de dialogue séquentiel de manière naturelle. Le modèle que nous proposons atteint un MRR d'environ 84,8\xa0% pour la tâche de sélection de l'énoncé suivant sur un ensemble de données Daily Dialogue nouvellement introduit, et surpasse les modèles de base. Nous fournissons également une analyse détaillée des résultats, y compris des informations clés qui expliquent l'amélioration de la MRR grâce aux informations sur les actes de dialogue.", 'es': 'La utilidad de la información semántica adicional para la tarea de selección de la siguiente expresión en un sistema de diálogo automatizado es el centro de estudio de este artículo. En particular, mostramos que la información adicional disponible en forma de actos de diálogo —cuando se utiliza junto con el contexto dado en forma de historial de diálogo— mejora el rendimiento independientemente de que el modelo subyacente sea generativo o discriminatorio. Para mostrar el comportamiento independiente del modelo de los actos de diálogo, experimentamos con varios modelos bien conocidos, como el modelo codificador-decodificador secuencia a secuencia, el modelo codificador-decodificador jerárquico y los modelos basados en el siamés con y sin jerarquía; y mostramos que en todos los modelos, la incorporación de actos de diálogo mejora el rendimiento por un margen significativo. Además, proponemos una forma novedosa de codificar la información del acto de diálogo, y la utilizamos junto con un codificador jerárquico para construir un modelo que pueda utilizar la información del acto de diálogo secuencial de forma natural. Nuestro modelo propuesto logra un MRR de alrededor del 84,8% para la tarea de la siguiente selección de enunciados en un conjunto de datos de Diálogo Diario recientemente introducido, y supera a los modelos de referencia. También ofrecemos un análisis detallado de los resultados que incluye información clave que explica la mejora en MRR debido a la información del acto de diálogo.', 'pt': 'A utilidade de informações semânticas adicionais para a tarefa de seleção do próximo enunciado em um sistema de diálogo automatizado é o foco de estudo deste artigo. Em particular, mostramos que a informação adicional disponível na forma de atos de diálogo – quando usada junto com o contexto dado na forma de histórico de diálogo – melhora o desempenho independentemente do modelo subjacente ser generativo ou discriminativo. A fim de mostrar o comportamento agnóstico do modelo de atos de diálogo, experimentamos vários modelos bem conhecidos, como o modelo codificador-decodificador sequência-a-sequência, modelo codificador-decodificador hierárquico e modelos baseados em siameses com e sem hierarquia; e mostram que em todos os modelos, a incorporação de atos de diálogo melhora o desempenho em uma margem significativa. Além disso, propomos uma nova maneira de codificar as informações do ato de diálogo e usá-lo junto com o codificador hierárquico para construir um modelo que possa usar as informações do ato de diálogo sequencial de maneira natural. Nosso modelo proposto atinge um MRR de cerca de 84,8% para a tarefa de seleção do próximo enunciado em um conjunto de dados de Diálogo Diário recém-introduzido e supera os modelos de linha de base. Também fornecemos uma análise detalhada dos resultados, incluindo os principais insights que explicam a melhoria no MRR devido às informações do ato de diálogo.', 'ja': '自動対話システムにおける次の発話選択のタスクのための追加の意味情報の有用性は、本論文の研究の焦点である。 特に、対話行為の形で利用可能な追加情報は、対話履歴の形で与えられた文脈と共に使用される場合、基礎となるモデルが生成的または差別的であるかどうかにかかわらず、パフォーマンスを向上させることを示している。 対話行為のモデル不可知論的挙動を示すために、シーケンスツーシーケンスエンコーダーデコーダーモデル、階層エンコーダーデコーダーモデル、階層の有無にかかわらずSiameseベースのモデルなど、いくつかの有名なモデルを実験し、すべてのモデルで対話行為を取り入れることでパフォーマンスが大幅に向上することを示した。 さらに、ダイアログアクト情報の斬新な符号化方法を提案し、階層エンコーダとともに自然な形でシーケンスダイアログアクト情報を利用できるモデルを構築する。 当社の提案モデルは、新たに導入されたDaily Dialogueデータセットの次の発話選択のタスクで約84.8 ％のMRRを達成し、ベースラインモデルを上回るパフォーマンスを発揮します。 また、ダイアログアクト情報により、MRRの改善を説明する重要な洞察を含む結果の詳細な分析を提供します。', 'hi': 'एक स्वचालित संवाद प्रणाली में अगले उच्चारण चयन के कार्य के लिए अतिरिक्त शब्दार्थ जानकारी की उपयोगिता इस पेपर में अध्ययन का ध्यान केंद्रित है। विशेष रूप से, हम दिखाते हैं कि संवाद के रूप में उपलब्ध अतिरिक्त जानकारी - जब संवाद इतिहास के रूप में दिए गए संदर्भ के साथ उपयोग किया जाता है - अंतर्निहित मॉडल के उत्पादक या भेदभावपूर्ण होने के बावजूद प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है। संवाद कृत्यों के मॉडल अज्ञेयवादी व्यवहार को दिखाने के लिए, हम कई प्रसिद्ध मॉडलों के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं जैसे अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल, पदानुक्रमित एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल, और सियामी-आधारित मॉडल पदानुक्रम के साथ और बिना; और दिखाते हैं कि सभी मॉडलों में, संवाद कृत्यों को शामिल करने से एक महत्वपूर्ण मार्जिन से प्रदर्शन में सुधार होता है। हम, इसके अलावा, संवाद अधिनियम की जानकारी को एन्कोडिंग करने का एक उपन्यास तरीका प्रस्तावित करते हैं, और इसे पदानुक्रमित एनकोडर के साथ एक मॉडल बनाने के लिए उपयोग करते हैं जो अनुक्रमिक संवाद अधिनियम जानकारी का उपयोग प्राकृतिक तरीके से कर सकता है। हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल एक नए पेश किए गए दैनिक संवाद डेटासेट पर अगले उच्चारण चयन के कार्य के लिए लगभग 84.8% की एमआरआर प्राप्त करता है, और बेसलाइन मॉडल को मात देता है। हम प्रमुख अंतर्दृष्टि सहित परिणामों का एक विस्तृत विश्लेषण भी प्रदान करते हैं जो संवाद अधिनियम जानकारी के कारण एमआरआर में सुधार की व्याख्या करते हैं।', 'zh': '自言系统,语义信择任,本文为重。 所以然者,以对为信 - 以言为上下文 , - 可以为性,以生成性为歧视性。 试诸所知,序于编码器解码器解码器,重编码器解码器及暹罗,有与无层次结构; 明于诸形,言行可见。 新法编码言行息者,与层编码器俱用,以立自然之体。 臣等所陈模形于新入Daily Dialogue数集上下一语择事以成约84.8%之MRR,而优于基线模。 臣等又供其详细分析,兼说以言行信息所致MRR改进之要。', 'ru': 'Полезность дополнительной семантической информации для задачи очередного подбора высказываний в автоматизированной диалоговой системе является предметом исследования в данной работе. В частности, мы показываем, что дополнительная информация, доступная в форме диалоговых актов - при использовании вместе с контекстом, заданным в форме истории диалога - улучшает производительность, независимо от того, является ли базовая модель генеративной или дискриминационной. Для того, чтобы показать модель агностического поведения диалоговых актов, мы экспериментируем с несколькими хорошо известными моделями, такими как модель от последовательности к последовательности кодер-декодер, иерархическая модель кодер-декодер и сиамские модели с иерархией и без нее; и показываем, что во всех моделях включение диалоговых актов улучшает производительность на значительный запас. Кроме того, мы предлагаем новый способ кодирования информации ACT диалога и используем его вместе с иерархическим кодером для построения модели, которая может использовать информацию ACT последовательного диалога естественным образом. Наша предлагаемая модель достигает MRR около 84,8% для задачи следующего отбора высказываний на вновь введенном наборе данных Daily Dialogue и превосходит базовые модели. Мы также предоставляем подробный анализ результатов, включая ключевые выводы, которые объясняют улучшение MRR из-за информации о диалоговом акте.', 'ga': 'Dírítear an staidéar sa pháipéar seo ar úsáid faisnéise shéimeantaí breise le haghaidh an chéad chaint eile a roghnú i gcóras uathoibrithe idirphlé. Léirímid go háirithe go bhfeabhsaíonn faisnéis bhreise atá ar fáil i bhfoirm gníomhartha comhphlé – nuair a úsáidtear é in éineacht leis an gcomhthéacs a thugtar i bhfoirm stair an chomhphlé – an fheidhmíocht beag beann ar an tsamhail bhunúsach a bheith ginitheach nó idirdhealaitheach. Chun iompar agnostic samhail na ngníomhartha comhphlé a thaispeáint, déanaimid triail le roinnt samhlacha aitheanta mar shamhail ionchódóra-díchódóra seicheamh-go-seicheamh, samhail ordlathach ionchódóra-díchódóra, agus samhlacha Siamese-bhunaithe le ordlathas agus gan ordlathas; agus a thaispeáint go gcuirtear feabhas suntasach ar an bhfeidhmíocht trí bhíthin gníomhartha comhphlé a ionchorprú i ngach samhail. Thairis sin, molaimid bealach nua chun faisnéis faoin ngníomh idirphlé a ionchódú, agus úsáidimid é in éineacht leis an ionchódóir ordlathach chun samhail a thógáil a fhéadfaidh faisnéis an ghnímh chomhphlé seicheamhaigh a úsáid ar bhealach nádúrtha. Baineann ár múnla molta amach MRR de thart ar 84.8% don tasc de roghnú cainte eile ar thacar sonraí um Chomhphlé Laethúil a tugadh isteach le déanaí, agus sáraíonn sé na samhlacha bunlíne. Cuirimid anailís mhionsonraithe ar thorthaí ar fáil freisin lena n-áirítear príomhléargais a mhíníonn an feabhas ar MRR mar gheall ar fhaisnéis faoin ngníomh dialóige.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány középpontjában a további szemantikai információk hasznossága az automatizált párbeszédrendszerben történő következő kimondás kiválasztásához. Különösen azt mutatjuk, hogy a párbeszéd formájában rendelkezésre álló további információk – ha a párbeszédtörténet formájában megadott kontextusokkal együtt használják – javítják a teljesítményt, függetlenül attól, hogy az alapul szolgáló modell generáló vagy diszkriminatív. A párbeszédcselekmények modellagnosztikus viselkedésének bemutatása érdekében több jól ismert modellel kísérletezünk, mint például szekvencia-szekvencia kódoló-dekódoló modellek, hierarchikus kódoló-dekódoló modellek, hierarchikus kódoló-dekódoló modellek és sziámi alapú modellek hierarchiával és anélkül; valamennyi modell esetében a párbeszédes aktusok bevonása jelentős mértékben javítja a teljesítményt. Továbbá új módszert javaslunk a párbeszédaktus információinak kódolására, melyet hierarchikus kódolóval együtt olyan modell kialakítására használunk, amely természetes módon tudja felhasználni a párbeszédaktus információit. A javasolt modellünk az újonnan bevezetett Daily Dialogue adatkészleten a következő kimondás kiválasztásához 84,8%-os MRR-t ér el, és felülmúlja az alapvető modelleket. Továbbá részletes elemzést nyújtunk az eredményekről, beleértve a kulcsfontosságú betekintéseket, amelyek magyarázzák az MRR javulását a párbeszédcselekmények információi miatt.', 'el': 'Η χρησιμότητα πρόσθετων σημασιολογικών πληροφοριών για το έργο της επόμενης επιλογής προφορών σε ένα αυτοματοποιημένο σύστημα διαλόγου αποτελεί το επίκεντρο της μελέτης αυτής. Ειδικότερα, καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι πρόσθετες πληροφορίες που διατίθενται με τη μορφή πράξεων διαλόγου -όταν χρησιμοποιούνται μαζί με το πλαίσιο που δίνεται με τη μορφή ιστορικού διαλόγου- βελτιώνουν τις επιδόσεις ανεξάρτητα από το υποκείμενο μοντέλο που είναι παραγωγικό ή διακριτικό. Για να δείξουμε την αγνωστική συμπεριφορά των πράξεων διαλόγου, πειραματιζόμαστε με αρκετά γνωστά μοντέλα όπως το μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας, το ιεραρχικό μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή και τα σιαμικά μοντέλα με και χωρίς ιεραρχία. και δείχνουν ότι σε όλα τα μοντέλα, η ενσωμάτωση πράξεων διαλόγου βελτιώνει σημαντικά την απόδοση. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε έναν νέο τρόπο κωδικοποίησης των πληροφοριών των πράξεων διαλόγου, και το χρησιμοποιούμε μαζί με τον ιεραρχικό κωδικοποιητή για να χτίσουμε ένα μοντέλο που μπορεί να χρησιμοποιήσει τις πληροφορίες των πράξεων διαδοχικού διαλόγου με φυσικό τρόπο. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει MRR περίπου 84,8% για το έργο της επόμενης επιλογής προφορών σε ένα πρόσφατα εισαγόμενο σύνολο δεδομένων καθημερινού διαλόγου και ξεπερνά τα μοντέλα βάσης. Παρέχουμε επίσης μια λεπτομερή ανάλυση των αποτελεσμάτων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των βασικών πληροφοριών που εξηγούν τη βελτίωση της MRR λόγω των πληροφοριών για τις πράξεις διαλόγου.', 'it': "L'utilità di ulteriori informazioni semantiche per il compito di selezione delle parole successive in un sistema di dialogo automatizzato è al centro dello studio in questo articolo. In particolare, dimostriamo che le informazioni aggiuntive disponibili sotto forma di atti di dialogo - se utilizzate insieme al contesto fornito sotto forma di cronologia dei dialoghi - migliorano le prestazioni indipendentemente dal modello sottostante che sia generativo o discriminatorio. Al fine di mostrare il comportamento agnostico modello degli atti di dialogo, sperimentiamo diversi modelli ben noti come il modello encoder-decoder sequenza-sequenza, il modello encoder-decoder gerarchico e modelli siamese con e senza gerarchia; e dimostrare che, in tutti i modelli, incorporare atti di dialogo migliora notevolmente le prestazioni. Inoltre, proponiamo un nuovo modo di codificare le informazioni degli atti di dialogo, e le usiamo insieme ad un encoder gerarchico per costruire un modello in grado di utilizzare le informazioni degli atti di dialogo sequenziali in modo naturale. Il nostro modello proposto raggiunge un MRR di circa l'84,8% per il compito di selezione delle parole successive su un set di dati Daily Dialogue recentemente introdotto, e supera i modelli di base. Forniamo anche un'analisi dettagliata dei risultati, incluse le informazioni chiave che spiegano il miglioramento nell'MRR dovuto alle informazioni sugli atti di dialogo.", 'kk': 'Автоматты диалог жүйесінде келесі сөйлеу тапсырмасын таңдау үшін қосымша семантикалық мәліметтің утилитасы - осы қағаздағы зерттеу көзі. Әрине біз диалог түрінде қосымша мәліметтерді көрсету үшін - диалог тарихы түрінде келтірілген контекстік түрінде қолданылатында - негізгі үлгісінің жасауын жақсарту не дискриминациялық түрінде қарам Диалог әрекеттерінің агностикалық әрекеттерін көрсету үшін, біз кейбір түрлі мәлімет үлгілерімен, мысалы sequence- to- sequence кодер- декодер үлгісі, иерархикалық кодер- декодер үлгісі және сиамез- негіздеген үлгілерімен, иерархиясыз Барлық үлгілерде диалогты қосу әрекеттері маңызды шегінен жақсартады. Сонымен қатар, біз кодтамасы диалогының жаңа мәліметін қолданатын жаңа жолын жұмыс істеп, иерархиялық кодтамасы қолданатын диалогтың келесі мәліметін табиғи түрде қолданатын үлгілерін құру үші Біздің таңдалған үлгіміз жаңа келтірілген күнделік диалог деректер жиынындағы келесі сөйлеу тапсырмасының 84,8% деген MRR дегенді жеткізеді, және негізгі үлгілерді жеткізеді. Мұндай-ақ біз мәліметті диалог әрекетінің мәліметінің себебі MRR жақсартын түсіндіретін негіздердің егжей- тегжейлі анализ береміз.', 'ka': 'დამატებული სემონტიკური ინფორმაციის სუტილიტება შემდეგი სიტყვების მონიშნულებაში ავტომატიკური დიალოგური სისტემაში იქნება ამ გვერდის სწავლების ფოკუსი. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ დამატებული ინფორმაცია დიალოგის ფორმაში აკეთებულია - როდესაც დიალოგის ისტორიის ფორმაში გამოყენებული კონტექსტის შემდეგ გამოყენებულია - გამოყენებული ინფ დიალოგის მოდელის ადნოსტიკური ქცევის გამოჩვენება, ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტებით რამდენიმე უცნობილი მოდელით, როგორც sequence-to-sequence encoder-decoder მოდელით, hiერაქტიკური კოდირების მოდელის მოდელით, და Siamese-based მოდელის იერაქტი და აჩვენებთ, რომ ყველა მოდელში, დიალოგის შეყვარება აკეთებულია, რომელიც გასანიშვნელოვანი მარიზის გამოსახულება. ჩვენ, დამატებით, კოდირება დიალოგის პრომენტი გზა იქნება ინფორმაციას, და იქნება იერაქტიკალური კოდირებით გამოყენება მოდელს, რომელიც შეუძლია გამოყენება შემდეგ დიალოგის ინფორ ჩვენი მოწყობილობული მოდელი მიიღება 84.8%-ის MRR-ის შემდეგი მონიშნულების მონაცემებისთვის ახალი შემდეგი დიალოგის მონაცემების მონაცემებისთვის და გავამუშავებთ ბაზის მოდე ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ დეტალური ანალიზი შედეგების შესახებ, რომლებიც კლავიფიური ინფორმაციების შესახებ, რომლებიც განახსენებენ MRR-ში გაუკეთება ინ', 'lt': 'Papildomos semantinės informacijos, skirtos kitam išraiškos pasirinkimui automatizuoto dialogo sistemoje, nauda šiame dokumente nagrinėjamas klausimas. Visų pirma parodome, kad papildoma informacija, kurią galima gauti dialogo aktų forma - kai ji naudojama kartu su dialogo istorijos forma pateiktais kontekstais - pagerina rezultatus, neatsižvelgiant į tai, ar pagrindinis modelis yra generuojantis ar diskriminuojantis. Siekiant parodyti dialogo veiksmų agnostinį elgesį, eksperimentuojame su keliais gerai žinomais modeliais, pavyzdžiui, sekos-sekos kodavimo-dekoderio modeliu, hierarchiniu kodavimo-dekoderio modeliu ir siamo modeliais su ir be hierarchijos; ir parodyti, kad į visus modelius įtraukti dialogo aktus gerokai pagerina rezultatus. Be to, mes siūlome naują būdą koduoti dialogo veiksmo informaciją ir ją naudoti kartu su hierarchiniu kodatoriumi, kad būtų sukurtas modelis, kuriuo būtų galima natūraliai naudoti eilinio dialogo veiksmo informaciją. Our proposed model achieves an MRR of about 84.8% for the task of next utterance selection on a newly introduced Daily Dialogue dataset, and outperform the baseline models.  Taip pat pateikiame išsamią rezultatų analizę, įskaitant pagrindines įžvalgas, kurios paaiškina MRR pagerėjimą dėl dialogo veiksmų informacijos.', 'ms': 'Utiliti maklumat semantik tambahan untuk tugas pemilihan ungkapan berikutnya dalam sistem dialog automatik adalah fokus kajian dalam kertas ini. Secara khususnya, kami menunjukkan bahawa maklumat tambahan yang tersedia dalam bentuk tindakan dialog - apabila digunakan bersama dengan konteks yang diberi dalam bentuk sejarah dialog - meningkatkan prestasi tidak kira-kira model yang didasarkan adalah generatif atau diskriminatif. In order to show the model agnostic behavior of dialogue acts, we experiment with several well-known models such as sequence-to-sequence encoder-decoder model, hierarchical encoder-decoder model, and Siamese-based models with and without hierarchy;  dan menunjukkan bahawa dalam semua model, memasukkan tindakan dialog meningkatkan prestasi dengan margin yang signifikan. Selain itu, kami mengusulkan cara baru untuk mengekodkan maklumat tindakan dialog, dan menggunakannya bersama dengan pengekod hierarkis untuk membina model yang boleh menggunakan maklumat tindakan dialog urutan secara alami. Our proposed model achieves an MRR of about 84.8% for the task of next utterance selection on a newly introduced Daily Dialogue dataset, and outperform the baseline models.  Kami juga menyediakan analisis terperinci keputusan termasuk pandangan kunci yang menjelaskan perkembangan dalam MRR kerana maklumat tindakan dialog.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വാക്ക് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിനുള്ള കൂടുതല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് സ്വയം സ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഡയലോഗ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ രൂപത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു- ഡയലോഗ് ചരിത്രത്തിന്റെ രൂപം കൊണ്ട് ഉപയോഗിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഡയലോ ഡയലോഗ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ മാതൃകയുടെ ആഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, സെക്കന്\u200dസ്-മുതല്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d, ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക് കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെകോഡെര എല്ലാ മാതൃകങ്ങളിലും, ഡയലോഗ് ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിലും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഒരു ഗുരുതരമായ മാര്\u200dഗി We, furthermore, propose a novel way of encoding dialogue act information, and use it along with hierarchical encoder to build a model that can use the sequential dialogue act information in a natural way.  അടുത്ത വാക്ക് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d 84. 8% എംആര്\u200d പ്രാപ്തികമാക്കുന്നു. ഡെയിലി ഡയലോഗ ഡയലോഗ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d എംആര്\u200dആരില്\u200d മുന്നറിയിപ്പ് വിശദ', 'mt': 'L-utilità ta’ informazzjoni semantika addizzjonali għall-kompitu tal-għażla tal-espressjoni li jmiss f’sistema ta’ djalogu awtomatizzat hija l-fokus tal-istudju f’dan id-dokument. B’mod partikolari, nuru li informazzjoni addizzjonali disponibbli fil-forma ta’ atti ta’ djalogu - meta tintuża flimkien mal-kuntest mogħti fil-forma ta’ storja ta’ djalogu - ittejjeb il-prestazzjoni irrispettivament mill-fatt li l-mudell sottostanti jkun ġenerattiv jew diskriminatorju. Sabiex jintwera l-imġiba agnostika mudell ta’ atti ta’ djalogu, aħna qed nagħmlu esperimenti b’diversi mudelli magħrufa sew bħall-mudell ta’ sekwenza-sekwenza-kodifikatur-dekoder, mudell ġerarkiku-kodifikatur-dekoder, u mudelli bbażati fuq is-Siami bi u mingħajr ġerarkija; and show that in all models, incorporating dialogue acts improves the performance by a significant margin.  Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu mod ġdid kif nikkodifikaw l-informazzjoni dwar l-att tad-djalogu, u nużaha flimkien mal-kodifikatur ġerarkiku biex nibnu mudell li jista’ juża l-informazzjoni dwar l-att tad-djalogu sekwenzjali b’mod naturali. Il-mudell propost tagħna jilħaq MRR ta’ madwar 84.8% għall-kompitu tal-għa żla ta’ dikjarazzjoni li jmiss fuq sett ta’ dejta ta’ Djalogu ta’ Kuljum introdott ġdid, u jwettaq il-mudelli ta’ bażi. Aħna nipprovdu wkoll analiżi dettaljata tar-riżultati inklużi fehmiet ewlenin li jispjegaw it-titjib fl-MRR minħabba informazzjoni dwar l-att ta’ djalogu.', 'mk': 'Корисноста на дополнителни семантични информации за задачата на следниот избор на изрази во автоматизиран дијалог систем е фокусот на студијата во овој документ. Особено, покажуваме дека дополнителните информации достапни во форма на дијалошки акти - кога се користат заедно со контекстот даден во форма на историја на дијалогот - ја подобруваат резултатот без оглед на тоа што основниот модел е генеративен или дискриминативен. За да го покажеме моделот на агностичното однесување на дијалошките активности, експериментираме со неколку познати модели како што се моделот на кодер-кодер-кодер-кодер-секвенца, хиерархичкиот модел на кодер-кодер и сијамски модели со и без хиерархија; и покажуваат дека во сите модели, вклучувањето на дејствата на дијалогот ја подобрува перформансата со значителна маргина. Покрај тоа, ние предложуваме нов начин за кодирање на информациите за дејствувањето на дијалогот, и ги користиме заедно со хиерархичкиот кодер за изградба на модел кој може да ги користи информациите за дејствувањето на секвенцијалниот дијалог на природен начин. Нашиот предложен модел постигнува МРР од околу 84,8 отсто за задачата на следниот избор на изрази на ново воведен датотек за дневен дијалог и ги надминува основните модели. Ние, исто така, обезбедуваме детална анализа на резултатите, вклучувајќи клучни информации кои објаснуваат подобрување на МРР поради информациите за дијалогот.', 'ro': 'Utilitatea informațiilor semantice suplimentare pentru sarcina selectării următoarei pronunțări într-un sistem automatizat de dialog este subiectul studiului în această lucrare. În special, demonstrăm că informațiile suplimentare disponibile sub formă de acte de dialog - atunci când sunt utilizate împreună cu contextul dat sub forma istoricului dialogurilor - îmbunătățesc performanța indiferent de modelul generator sau discriminatoriu. Pentru a arăta comportamentul agnostic model al actelor de dialog, experimentăm cu mai multe modele bine cunoscute, cum ar fi modelul codificator-decodor secvență-secvență, modelul codificator-decodor ierarhic și modele siameze cu și fără ierarhie; și arată că, în toate modelele, încorporarea actelor de dialog îmbunătățește performanța cu o marjă semnificativă. În plus, propunem o modalitate nouă de codificare a informațiilor actelor de dialog și o folosim împreună cu codificatorul ierarhic pentru a construi un model care să poată utiliza informațiile actelor de dialog secvențial în mod natural. Modelul nostru propus atinge un RMR de aproximativ 84,8% pentru sarcina de selectare a următoarei pronunțări pe un set de date nou introdus Daily Dialogue și depășește modelele de bază. De asemenea, oferim o analiză detaliată a rezultatelor, inclusiv informații cheie care explică îmbunătățirea MRR datorită informațiilor privind actele de dialog.', 'pl': 'Przedmiotem badań jest użyteczność dodatkowych informacji semantycznych do wyboru kolejnych wypowiedzi w zautomatyzowanym systemie dialogu. W szczególności pokazujemy, że dodatkowe informacje dostępne w formie aktów dialogowych – stosowane wraz z kontekstem podanym w postaci historii dialogu – poprawiają efektywność niezależnie od tego, czy model podstawowy jest generatywny czy dyskryminujący. W celu pokazania zachowania agnostycznego modelu aktów dialogowych eksperymentujemy z kilkoma dobrze znanymi modelami, takimi jak model kodera-dekodera sekwencji-sekwencji, hierarchiczny model kodera-dekodera oraz syjamskie modele z hierarchią i bez hierarchii; i wykazać, że we wszystkich modelach włączenie aktów dialogowych znacznie poprawia wydajność. Ponadto proponujemy nowatorski sposób kodowania informacji o aktach dialogowych i używamy go wraz z koderem hierarchicznym do zbudowania modelu, który może wykorzystywać informacje o aktach sekwencyjnych w naturalny sposób. Nasz proponowany model osiąga MRR około 84,8% dla zadania kolejnego wyboru wypowiedzi na nowo wprowadzonym zestawie danych Daily Dialogue i przewyższa modele bazowe. Zapewniamy również szczegółową analizę wyników, w tym kluczowe informacje, które wyjaśniają poprawę MRR ze względu na informacje dialogowe.', 'mn': 'Автоматтын диалог системийн дараагийн илтгэл сонголтын ажлын нэмэлт semantic мэдээллийн хэрэглээ бол энэ цаасан дээр судалгааны төвлөрөл юм. Ялангуяа, бид диалог хэлбэрээр нэмэлт мэдээллийг ашиглаж байгааг харуулж байна. Диалог түүхийн хэлбэрээр өгөгдсөн байдлаар ашиглах үед, үндсэн загварын үйл ажиллагааг бүтээлч эсвэл ялгаагүй сайжруулдаг. Диалогийн агностикийн загварыг харуулахын тулд бид дарааллаас дарааллаар шийдвэрлэх загвартай олон сайн мэддэг загвартай туршилт хийдэг. Бүх загваруудын тухай ярианы нэгтгэх үйл ажиллагааг маш чухал загвараар сайжруулдаг. Дараа нь бид кодлох диалогын шинэ арга зам нь мэдээлэл үйлдвэрлэх боломжтой. Иерархик кодлогчтай хамтран ашиглаж, дараагийн диалогын мэдээлэл байгалийн аргаар ашиглах загвар бүтээх боломжтой. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загвар нь дараагийн илтгэлийн сонголтын даалгаврын 84.8% MRR-г ашиглаж, шинээр тайлбарласан Дэлхийн диалог өгөгдлийн сангийн даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврыг ашигладаг. Мөн бид мөн ДОХ-ын сайжруулалтын тулд мэдээллийн шалтгааныг тайлбарлах үндсэн ойлголтын талаар нарийвчлан шинжилгээ өгдөг.', 'so': 'Isticmaalka macluumaadka dheeraadka ah ee shaqada ku qoran doorashada hadalka soo socda ee nidaamka diyaarinta ah ee iskuulka ku qoran warqaddan. In particular, we show that additional information available in the form of dialogue acts -when used along with context given in the form of dialogue history- improves the performance irrespective of the underlying model being generative or discriminative.  In order to show the model agnostic behavior of dialogue acts, we experiment with several well-known models such as sequence-to-sequence encoder-decoder model, hierarchical encoder-decoder model, and Siamese-based models with and without hierarchy;  iyo muujinta in qaababka oo dhan, in sameynta dialog-ku-qabsashada uu horumariyo sameynta xaalad muhiim ah. Furthermore, waxaynu soo jeedinnaa qaab saxda ah oo macluumaad ku saabsan qoraalka codsiga, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa sidoo kale qoraalka hierarchical codsiga, si aan u dhisno model oo u isticmaali karno macluumaad ku saabsan falimaha dialogka dabadeed si dabiicadda ah. Tusaale la soo jeeday wuxuu gaadhaa qiyaastii 84.8% ee shaqada doorashada hadalka soo socda oo cusub lagu soo bandhigay qoraalka Dagaalka, wuxuuna sameynayaa modelalka aasaasiga ah. Anagu waxaan sidoo kale ka siinaynaa baaritaanka faa’iidada, kuwaas oo ku jira aragtida muhiimka ah oo u caddaynaya hagitaanka MRR sababtoo ah macluumaadka hagitaanka diyaarinta.', 'sv': 'Nyttan av ytterligare semantisk information för uppgiften att välja nästa ord i ett automatiserat dialogsystem är i fokus i denna uppsats. Framför allt visar vi att ytterligare information som finns tillgänglig i form av dialogakter – när den används tillsammans med sammanhang som ges i form av dialoghistorik – förbättrar resultatet oavsett om den underliggande modellen är generativ eller diskriminerande. För att visa modellagnostiskt beteende hos dialogakter experimenterar vi med flera välkända modeller såsom sekvens-till-sekvens encoder-dekoder modell, hierarkisk encoder-dekoder modell och siamesiska-baserade modeller med och utan hierarki; och visa att man i alla modeller förbättrar resultaten med betydande marginal genom att införliva dialogakter. Vi föreslår dessutom ett nytt sätt att koda dialoghandlingsinformation, och använder den tillsammans med hierarkisk kodare för att bygga en modell som kan använda sekventiell dialoghandlingsinformation på ett naturligt sätt. Vår föreslagna modell uppnår en MRR på cirka 84,8% för uppgiften att välja nästa ord på en nyligen introducerad Daily Dialogue dataset, och presterar bättre än basmodellerna. Vi ger också en detaljerad analys av resultat inklusive viktiga insikter som förklarar förbättringen i MRR på grund av dialoghandlingsinformation.', 'ta': 'ஒரு தானியங்கியிருக்கும் உரையாடல் முறைமையில் அடுத்த வார்த்தை தேர்வு செய்யும் செயலுக்கான கூடுதல் அரைப்புருவு தகவல குறிப்பிட்டு, உரையாடல் செயல்கள் வடிவத்தில் கிடைக்கும் கூடுதல் தகவல் காட்டுகிறது - உரையாடல் வரலாற்றின் வடிவத்தில் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட சூழலுடன் பயன்படும் உரையாடல் செயல்களின் மாதிரி குறியீட்டு மாதிரி நடத்தையை காட்ட வேண்டுமானால், நாம் சில நன்றாக அறியப்பட்ட மாதிரிகளைக் கொண்டு பரிசோதிக்கிறோம், பின்வரிசையில் வரிசையாக் அனைத்து மாதிரிகளிலும், உரையாடல் சேர்த்தல் செயல்களை முக்கியமான முறையில் செயல்படுத்துகிறது. மேலும், நாங்கள், குறியீட்டு தகவல் குறிமுறையாக்கம் செய்யும் உரையாடல் செய்தியின் புதிய பாதையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், மற்றும் அதை மேலும் ஹ எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி அடுத்த வாக்கு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட செயலில் 84. 8% எம்ஆர் அடுத்த வார்த்தை தேர்ந்தெடுக்கும் புதிய We also provide a detailed analysis of results including key insights that explain the improvement in MRR because of dialog act information.', 'no': 'Verktøyet for ekstra semantisk informasjon for oppgåva av neste utvalet i eit automatisk dialogsystem er fokusen på studieringa i denne papira. I særskilt viser vi at tilgjengelege informasjon som er tilgjengelege i form av dialogvindauge - når brukt saman med kontekst som er gitt i form av dialoghistorie - forbedrar utviklinga uavhengig av den underlagte modellen som er generert eller diskriminert. For å visa den agnostiske oppføringa av dialogvindauget, eksperimenterer vi med fleire godt kjende modeller, som sequence-to-sequence-koderingsmodellen, hierarkiske koderingsmodellen og Siamese-baserte modellen med og utan hierarki. og viser at i alle modeller, inkluderer dialogvindauget, forbetrar utviklinga med ein signifikant margin. I tillegg foreslår vi eit nytt måte å bruka informasjon om kodingsdialogen, og bruka han saman med hierarkisk koder for å bygge eit modell som kan bruka informasjon om dialogen som går inn i følgjande måte. Vårt foreslått modell oppnår ein MRR av omtrent 84,8 % for oppgåva av neste utval på eit nytt innført datasett for dagdialogen og utfører baselinjesmodelane. Vi gjev også ein detaljert analyse av resultat, inkludert nøkkelinnsyningar som forklarer forbetringa i MRR på grunn av informasjon om dialogvindauget.', 'sr': 'Korisnost dodatnih semantičkih informacija za zadatak sljedećeg izbora govora u automatskom dijalogu je fokus studije u ovom papiru. Posebno, pokazujemo da dodatne informacije koje su dostupne u obliku dijaloga - kada se koriste zajedno sa kontekstom datom u obliku istorije dijaloga - poboljšavaju provedbu bez obzira na temeljni model koji je generativni ili diskriminacivni. Da bismo pokazali model agnostičkog ponašanja djela dijaloga, eksperimentirali smo sa nekoliko poznatih modela kao što su modeli kodera na sekvenci do sekvence, hijerarhički model kodera-dekodera i modeli na Siamezu s hijerarhijom i bez hijerarhije; i pokazuju da u svim modelima uključujući dijalog djela poboljšava učinkovitost značajnom marginom. Osim toga, mi predlažemo novi način kodiranja dijaloga koji djeluje informacije, i koristimo ga zajedno sa hijerarhičkim koderom da izgradimo model koji može koristiti sekvencijski dijalog koji djeluje informacije na prirodan naèin. Naš predloženi model postiže MRR od oko 84,8% za zadatak sljedećeg izbora govora na novom uvođenom setu podataka o dnevnom dijalogu i nadmaže osnovne modele. Takođe pružamo detaljnu analizu rezultata uključujući ključne uvide koje objašnjavaju poboljšanje MRR zbog informacija o dijalogu.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සංවාදය පද්ධතියෙන් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ඊළඟ ප්\u200dරකාරය තෝරණය සඳහා විශේෂ සාමාන්\u200dය තොරතුරු සඳහ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අඩුම තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශයේ සංවාදයේ රූපයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශය කරන්න පුළුවන් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරවේශය - සංවාදය ඉතිහා සංවාදයේ මොඩල් agnoසික් හැසිරීම පෙන්වන්න, අපි හොඳින් දන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වගේම sequence- to- sequence code- decoder මොඩල්, ශීර්ෂික සංකේතකය-decoder මොඩල්, සහ ස ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්නේ හැම මොඩේල්ස් වලින්, සංවාදය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ වෙන්නේ. අපි, ඉතින්, සංකේතන සංවාදයේ නියම විදිහක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම සංවාදය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, සහ සංවාදය සමඟ ඒක භාවිත කරන්න, ස අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු මොඩල් එක්ක 84.8% වගේ MRR එකක් ලැබෙනවා ඊළඟ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තෝරාගැනීමේ වැඩේ අලුත් දවස් සංවාදයේ දත්ත සැකස අපි තියෙන්නේ විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණයක් තියෙන්නේ විස්තර විශ්ලේෂණයක් වලින් යතුරු පරීක්ෂණයක් තියෙන්නේ', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں اگلے کلام انتخاب کے کام کے لئے اضافہ سیمانٹیکی معلومات کا استعمال ہے۔ مخصوصا، ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ڈالیلوگ کی شکل میں اضافہ معلومات موجود ہوتی ہے -جب ڈالیلوگ تاریخ کی شکل میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے- اس کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ معلومات کو اضافہ کرتا ہے جو بنیادی موڈل پیدا ہوتا ہے یا تقسیم کرنے والا ہے. ڈالیلوگو کے ماڈل اگنیستیک رفتار کو دکھانے کے لئے ہم بہت خوب جانے والے موڈل کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے ہیں جیسے sequence-to-sequence encoder-decoder موڈل، hierarchical encoder-decoder موڈل، اور سیامز-based موڈل کے ساتھ اور بغیر hierarchy کے ساتھ، اور دکھا دیں کہ تمام نمڈلوں میں، ڈالیوں کے ساتھ شامل ہونے کے باعث ایک اہم مرز کے ذریعہ عمل کو بہتر کر دیتا ہے۔ اور ہم اس کے علاوہ ایک نو طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ اکڈینڈ ڈالیلوگو کے مطابق معلومات عمل کریں اور اسے ہیراراتیکل کوڈر کے ساتھ استعمال کریں کہ ایک مدل بنا سکے جو سفارش ڈالیلوگو کے مطابق معلومات کو طبیعی طریقے سے عمل کرسک ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدل 84.8% کے MRR کو پہنچاتا ہے اور نیا معلوم ہوا دیلی ڈیلوگو ڈیٹ سٹ کے لئے اگلے کلام انتخاب کے کام کے لئے۔ ہم نے بھی نتیجے کا تفصیل دیتا ہے اور اس میں کلی بصیرت شامل کرتا ہے جو MRR میں بہترین تفصیل کرتی ہے اس کی وجہ سے جو ڈالیوں کی اطلاعات کرتی ہے۔', 'vi': 'Việc cung cấp thông tin ngữ pháp bổ sung cho nhiệm vụ tuyển người phát âm tiếp theo trong một hệ thống thoại tự động là tiêu điểm nghiên cứu trong tờ giấy này. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi cho thấy những thông tin bổ sung có thể cung cấp dưới hình thức các hành động đối thoại, khi được sử dụng cùng với ngữ cảnh được đưa ra dưới dạng lịch sử cuộc đối thoại, cải thiện hiệu quả bất kể kiểu mẫu nào là gây ra hay phân biệt chủng tính. Để thể hiện hành vi bồ nghĩa của các hành vi đối thoại, chúng tôi thử nghiệm với một số loại nổi tiếng như mô hình mã hóa mã hóa dãy-tới-trình tự, mô hình mã hóa hệ thống leo thang, và mô hình mẫu Siamese-based với và không hệ thống phân cấp; và cho thấy, trong tất cả các mô hình, chấp nhận các hành động thoại sẽ cải thiện hiệu quả với một khoảng cách đáng kể. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đề xuất một cách mới để mã hóa thông tin hành động thoại, và dùng nó cùng với bộ mã hóa cấp trên để chế tạo một mô hình có thể sử dụng các thông tin theo cách tự nhiên. Một kiểu mẫu đã đề nghị đạt được một MRR khoảng 84.8 Rất lớn cho nhiệm vụ tuyển người phát biểu tiếp theo trên một tập tin mới được nhập vào lịch thoại, và hoàn thành các mô hình cơ bản. Chúng tôi cũng cung cấp một phân tích chi tiết về kết quả, gồm những nhận thức quan trọng giải thích sự cải tiến trong MRX vì thông tin hành thoại.', 'uz': "Name Ko'rsatganda, dialog shaklida qoʻshimcha maʼlumot maʼlumotni koʻrsatishimiz, dialog tarixi shaklida koʻrsatilgan holatda foydalanayotganda - asosidagi model generativ yoki discriminatuvchi bo'lganligini ko'paytirish mumkin. Dialogning xususiyatlarini ko'rsatish uchun, biz bir necha yaxshi ko'proq modellar bilan ko'rib chiqish modeli, hierarchik encoder- decoder modeli, va Siamese asosida yaratilgan modellarni hierarchiya bilan ishlab chiqaramiz; va hamma modellarda muloqat qo'shish xususiyatlarini o'zgartiradi, juda muhim harfni o'zgartiradi. Kodlash oyna haqida maʼlumotni kodlash usulini tahrirlash va uni hierarchik kodlash usuli bilan ishlatish uchun keyingi oyna haqida maʼlumot bajarish mumkin. Mavzu modelimiz keyingi so'zlarni tanlash uchun 84.8% MRR ishga tushiriladi va yangi kundalik Dialog maʼlumoti tugmasini boshlaydi va asosiy modellarni bajaradi. Шунингдек, биз муколама ҳужжатлари сабабидан мувофиқ тажовузкорликни бажаришга бажаришга муҳокама берамиз.", 'bg': 'Полезността на допълнителна семантична информация за задачата за следващия избор на речи в автоматизирана диалогова система е фокус на изследването в настоящата статия. По-специално, ние показваме, че допълнителна информация, налична под формата на диалогови действия, когато се използва заедно с контекста, даден под формата на диалогова история, подобрява ефективността, независимо от това дали базовият модел е генеративен или дискриминиращ. За да покажем моделното агностично поведение на диалоговите актове, експериментираме с няколко добре познати модела като последователност към последователност кодер модел, йерархичен кодер-декодер модел и сиамски базирани модели с и без йерархия; и показват, че във всички модели включването на диалогови действия подобрява ефективността със значителен марж. Освен това предлагаме нов начин за кодиране на диалоговия акт информация и го използваме заедно с йерархичен кодер за изграждане на модел, който може да използва последователния диалог акт информация по естествен начин. Нашият предложен модел постига MRR от около 84,8% за задачата за следващ избор на изказвания на нововъведен набор от данни от дневния диалог и превъзхожда базовите модели. Ние също така предоставяме подробен анализ на резултатите, включително ключови прозрения, които обясняват подобрението на MRR поради диалоговия акт информация.', 'nl': 'Het nut van aanvullende semantische informatie voor de volgende selectie van uitspraken in een geautomatiseerd dialoogsysteem staat centraal in deze paper. In het bijzonder laten we zien dat aanvullende informatie die beschikbaar is in de vorm van dialoghandelingen -wanneer deze wordt gebruikt samen met context gegeven in de vorm van dialooggeschiedenis- de prestaties verbetert, ongeacht of het onderliggende model generatief of discriminerend is. Om het model agnostische gedrag van dialooghandelingen te tonen, experimenteren we met verschillende bekende modellen zoals sequentie-to-sequentie encoder-decoder model, hiërarchisch encoder-decoder model, en Siamese gebaseerde modellen met en zonder hiërarchie; en laten zien dat het opnemen van dialoghandelingen in alle modellen de prestaties aanzienlijk verbetert. Verder stellen we een nieuwe manier voor om informatie over dialoghandelingen te coderen, en gebruiken deze samen met hiërarchische encoder om een model te bouwen dat de sequentiële dialoghandelingen informatie op een natuurlijke manier kan gebruiken. Ons voorgestelde model bereikt een MRR van ongeveer 84,8% voor de taak van de volgende uitspraak selectie op een nieuw geïntroduceerde Daily Dialogue dataset, en presteert beter dan de basismodellen. We bieden ook een gedetailleerde analyse van resultaten, inclusief belangrijke inzichten die de verbetering van MRR verklaren vanwege dialoog act informatie.', 'da': 'Nyttigheden af yderligere semantisk information til opgaven med næste udtalelsesvalg i et automatiseret dialogsystem er fokus for undersøgelsen i denne artikel. Vi viser især, at yderligere oplysninger, der er tilgængelige i form af dialoghandlinger - når de anvendes sammen med sammenhæng givet i form af dialoghistorik - forbedrer resultaterne, uanset den underliggende model er generativ eller diskriminerende. For at vise den model agnostiske adfærd af dialoghandlinger eksperimenterer vi med flere velkendte modeller såsom sekvens-til-sekvens encoder-dekoder model, hierarkisk encoder-dekoder model og siamesisk-baserede modeller med og uden hierarki; og vise, at inddragelse af dialoghandlinger i alle modeller forbedrer resultaterne med en betydelig margen. Vi foreslår desuden en ny måde at kode dialoghandlingsinformation på, og bruge den sammen med hierarkisk koder til at opbygge en model, der kan bruge den sekventielle dialoghandlingsinformation på en naturlig måde. Vores foreslåede model opnår en MRR på omkring 84,8% til opgaven med næste udtalelsesvalg på et nyligt indført Daily Dialogue datasæt og overgår basismodellerne. Vi leverer også en detaljeret analyse af resultater, herunder vigtige indsigter, der forklarer forbedringen i MRR på grund af dialoghandlingsoplysninger.', 'ko': '자동 대화 시스템에서 부가 의미 정보가 다음 언어 선택에서의 역할은 본고 연구의 중점이다.특히 우리는 대화 행위 형식으로 제공된 추가 정보인 대화 역사 형식으로 제공된 언어 환경과 함께 사용할 때 실적을 향상시켰고 밑바닥 모델이 생성적이든 차별적이든 상관없다는 것을 보여준다.대화 행위의 모델인 알 수 없는 행위를 보여주기 위해 우리는 몇 가지 유명한 모델을 실험했다. 예를 들어 서열-서열 인코딩-디코딩 모델, 층 인코딩-디코딩 모델, 그리고 샴페인어를 바탕으로 하는 유차원과 무차원 모델이다.모든 모델에 대화 행위를 넣으면 성능을 현저히 높일 수 있다는 뜻이다.그 밖에 우리는 새로운 대화 행위 정보 인코딩 방법을 제시했고 이를 층별 인코딩기와 결합하여 사용함으로써 자연스러운 방식으로 순서대로 대화 행위 정보를 사용할 수 있는 모델을 구축했다.새로 도입된 일상 대화 데이터 집합에서 우리가 제시한 모델은 다음 언어 선택 임무 중의 MRR이 84.8%에 달했고 기선 모델보다 우수하다.또한 대화 행동 정보로 인해 MRR이 개선되었다는 주요 견해를 설명하는 등 결과를 상세히 분석했습니다.', 'hr': 'Korisnost dodatnih semantičkih informacija za zadatak sljedećeg izbora govora u automatskom dijalogu je fokus ispitivanja u ovom papiru. Posebno, pokazujemo da dodatne informacije koje su dostupne u obliku dijaloga - kada se koriste zajedno s kontekstom datom u obliku povijesti dijaloga - poboljšavaju učinkovitost bez obzira na temeljni model koji je generativni ili diskriminacivni. Da bismo pokazali model agnostičkog ponašanja djela dijaloga, eksperimentirali smo s nekoliko poznatih modela poput modela kodera na sekvenci do sekvence, hierarhijskog modela kodera-dekodera i modela na Siamezu s hijerarhijom i bez hijerarhije; i pokazuju da u svim modelima uključujući dijalog djela poboljšava učinkovitost značajnom marginom. Osim toga, mi predlažemo novi način kodiranja dijaloga koji djeluju informacije i koristimo ga zajedno s hijerarhičkim koderom kako bi izgradili model koji može koristiti sekvencijski dijalog djelovati informacije na prirodan način. Naš predloženi model postiže MRR od oko 84,8% za zadatak sljedećeg izbora govora na novom uvođenom sastavu podataka dnevnog dijaloga i nadmaže početne modele. Također pružamo detaljnu analizu rezultata uključujući ključne uvide koje objašnjavaju poboljšanje MRR zbog informacija o dijalogu.', 'de': 'Der Nutzen zusätzlicher semantischer Informationen für die nächste Äußerungsauswahl in einem automatisierten Dialogsystem steht im Fokus der Arbeit. Insbesondere zeigen wir, dass zusätzliche Informationen, die in Form von Dialogakten zur Verfügung stehen, zusammen mit Kontext, der in Form von Dialoghistorien gegeben wird, die Leistung verbessern, unabhängig davon, ob das zugrunde liegende Modell generativ oder diskriminierend ist. Um das modellagnostische Verhalten von Dialogakten aufzuzeigen, experimentieren wir mit mehreren bekannten Modellen wie Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Encoder-Decoder-Modell, hierarchisches Encoder-Decoder-Modell und Siam-basierte Modelle mit und ohne Hierarchie. und zeigen, dass die Einbeziehung von Dialogakten in allen Modellen die Leistung erheblich verbessert. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir eine neuartige Methode zur Kodierung von Dialogakteninformationen vor und verwenden sie zusammen mit hierarchischem Kodierer, um ein Modell zu erstellen, das die sequentiellen Dialogakteninformationen auf natürliche Weise verwenden kann. Unser vorgeschlagenes Modell erreicht eine MRR von etwa 84,8% für die nächste Äußerungsauswahl auf einem neu eingeführten Daily Dialogue Datensatz und übertrifft die Basismodelle. Wir bieten auch eine detaillierte Analyse der Ergebnisse einschließlich wichtiger Erkenntnisse, die die Verbesserung der MRR aufgrund von Dialogakteninformationen erklären.', 'tr': "Otomatik dijalog sisteminde indiki sözleri saýlamak üçin esasy semantik maglumatyň ullanlygy şu kagyzda okamak üçin fokusdur. Aýratyn, biz dijalogyň şeklinde meňzeş informasiýa görkezýäris -when used as a context given in the form of dialog - the performance improves the underlying model being generative or discriminative. диалогyň nusgasyny görkezmek üçin, biz birnäçe tanyş nusgalar bilen sequence-to-sequence koder modelleri, iýerarhiýa koder-koder modelleri we iýerarhiýa bilen we syamdan tabanly nusgalary bilen synanyşýarys; we ähli nusgalarda, dialogyň içine girişi täze bir gabdalyň üstine çykarýandygyny görkez. Munuň üçin biz, soňky dijalogyň ýagdaýynda ýazma maglumatlary hökman etmek üçin bir roman ýoly teklip edip, we ony yejerarşik kodeçi bilen birlikte bir nusga gurmak üçin bir nusga alýarys. Biziň teklip eden nusgasymyz täze bir güni dialoog veri setirinde täze bir söz saýlamak üçin 84.8% ýagdaýynda MRR berir we baseline nusgalaryny çykar. Biz hem MRR'de gelişmeleri düşündirýän netijelerin detaylaryny çözümleşdirip geçirip otyrys. Daýalýa-da işleýän maglumatlary sebäbi a çary düşünjeleri hem.", 'id': 'Utilitas informasi semantis tambahan untuk tugas seleksi ungkapan berikutnya dalam sistem dialog otomatis adalah fokus studi di kertas ini. Terutama, kami menunjukkan bahwa informasi tambahan yang tersedia dalam bentuk tindakan dialog - ketika digunakan bersama dengan konteks yang diberikan dalam bentuk sejarah dialog - meningkatkan prestasi tidak peduli model yang didasarkan menjadi generatif atau diskriminatif. Untuk menunjukkan model perilaku agnostik dari tindakan dialog, kami eksperimen dengan beberapa model yang terkenal seperti model rangkaian-ke-rangkaian-kode model, model hierarkis-kode model, dan model berasasi Siama dengan dan tanpa hierarki; dan menunjukkan bahwa dalam semua model, memasukkan tindakan dialog meningkatkan prestasi dengan margin yang signifikan. Selain itu, kami mengusulkan cara baru untuk mengkode informasi dialog bertindak, dan menggunakannya bersama dengan pengekode hierarkis untuk membangun model yang dapat menggunakan informasi dialog bertindak secara alami. Model kami yang diusulkan mencapai MRR sekitar 84,8% untuk tugas seleksi ucapan berikutnya pada set data Daily Dialogue yang baru diperkenalkan, dan melampaui model dasar. Kami juga menyediakan analisis rinci dari hasil termasuk penglihatan kunci yang menjelaskan peningkatan MRR karena informasi tindakan dialog.', 'af': "Die nutsprogram van addisionele semantiese inligting vir die taak van volgende uitspraak keuse in 'n outomatiese dialoog stelsel is die fokus van studie in hierdie papier. In besonderhede, wys ons dat addisionele inligting beskikbaar in die vorm van dialoog aktiwiteite - wanneer gebruik word saam met konteks gegee in die vorm van dialoog geskiedenis - verbeter die prestasie onverantlik van die onderstelde model wat genereer of diskrimineer is. Om die model agnostiese gedrag van dialoog te wys, eksperimenteer ons met verskeie goed bekende modele soos sequence-to-sequence encoder-decoder model, hierarkies enkoder-dekoder-model en Siamese-gebaseerde modele met en sonder hierarkie; en wys dat in alle modele, inkorporering van dialoog werk die prestasie verbeter deur 'n betekende marge. Ons, daarna, voorstel 'n nuwe manier van enkodering dialoog om inligting te werk, en gebruik dit saam met hierarkies enkoder om 'n model te bou wat die volgende dialoog kan gebruik om inligting te werk in 'n natuurlike manier. Ons voorgestelde model bereik 'n MRR van omtrent 84.8% vir die taak van volgende uitspraak keuse op 'n nuwe ingevoerde dagdialoog datastel en uitvoer die basisline modele. Ons verskaf ook 'n gedetale analiseer van resultate, insluitend sleutel inligtings wat die verbetering in MRR verduidelik vanweë die dialoog-aksie inligting.", 'sw': 'Utumiaji wa taarifa za ziada kwa jukumu la uchaguzi wa maneno ijayo katika mfumo wa mazungumzo ya kujitegemea ni lengo la utafiti katika karatasi hii. Kwa hakika, tunaonyesha kuwa taarifa za ziada zinazopatikana katika namna ya vitendo vya mazungumzo -ambapo hutumika pamoja na muktadha uliotolewa katika mtindo wa mazungumzo – inaboresha utendaji wa mazungumzo bila kujali muundo wa msingi wa kutengeneza au ubaguzi. Ili kuonyesha mtindo wa tabia za mabadiliko ya vitendo vya mazungumzo, tunajaribu kwa mifano kadhaa maarufu kama vile modeli ya kodi-decodi-mfululizo, modeli ya kodi-decodir ya kiuchimbaji, na mifano yenye asili ya Siamese yenye na bila utawala wa kiuchumi; na kuonyesha kwamba katika mifano yote, kutengeneza mazungumzo yanaboresha utendaji wa mazungumzo makubwa. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza njia ya kutumia taarifa za uchunguzi wa mazungumzo, na kutumia pamoja na taarifa za kihafidhina ili kutengeneza muundo ambao unaweza kutumia taarifa za mazungumzo ya baadae kwa njia ya asili. Mradi wetu ulipendekezwa unapata MRR wa takribani asilimia 84.8 kwa jukumu la uchaguzi wa lugha ijayo kwenye seti mpya ya Dialogue ya Daily, na kutengeneza mifano ya msingi. Pia tunatoa uchambuzi wa matokeo ya kina ikiwa ni pamoja na mitazamo muhimu ambayo inaeleza maboresho ya MRR kwa sababu ya taarifa za mazungumzo.', 'hy': 'The utility of additional semantic information for the task of next utterance selection in an automated dialogue system is the focus of study in this paper.  Մենք հատկապես ցույց ենք տալիս, որ լրացուցիչ տեղեկատվությունը, որը հասանելի է խոսակցային գործողությունների ձևով, երբ օգտագործվում է միասին կոնտեքստի հետ, որը տրվում է խոսակցային պատմության ձևով, բարելավում է արտադրողությունը անկախ նրանից, թե հիմնական մոդել Խոսախոսության գործողությունների ագնոստիկ վարքագիծը ցույց տալու համար մենք փորձում ենք բազմաթիվ հայտնի մոդելների հետ, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ հաջորդականություն-հաջորդականություն-կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելը, հիերարխիկ կոդեր-կոդեր մոդելը, և սիամական հիմնված մոդելները հիերարխիայի and show that in all models, incorporating dialogue acts improves the performance by a significant margin.  Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նոր միջոց, որպեսզի խմբագրենք գործողության ինֆորմացիան և օգտագործենք այն միասին հիերարխիկ կոդերի հետ կառուցելու մոդել, որը կարող է բնական կերպ օգտագործել հաջորդական խմբագրությունը: Մեր առաջարկված մոդելը հասնում է մոտ 84.8 տոկոսի մագնիսական ռեզոնանսային ռեզոնանսային ռեզոնանսային ռեզոնանսային ռեզոնանսային արտահայտություն հաջորդ արտահայտության ընտրության խնդրի համար նորից ներկայացված Daily Disco տվյալ We also provide a detailed analysis of results including key insights that explain the improvement in MRR because of dialog act information.', 'am': 'የአሁኑን ንግግር ምርጫ በጥያቄ አካባቢ መረጃ ላይ የተጨማሪው መረጃዎች በተለየ ጥያቄ ሲስተም በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ መምረጫ ነው፡፡ In particular, we show that additional information available in the form of dialogue acts -when used along with context given in the form of dialogue history- improves the performance irrespective of the underlying model being generative or discriminative.  የመdialog ቃላትን አቀማመጥ ልማድ ለማሳየት፣ በተመሳሳይ እና ያለ hierarchy እና በተመሳሳይ እና በተመሳሳይ ብዙዎች የሚታወቁ ሞዴሎች፣ የኢይሬርክ ኮድዶር-ዴድድ ሞዴል እና የሲሜሲ አካባቢ ምሳሌ እናሞክራለን፡፡ በሁሉም ምሳሌዎች፣ ማኅበራዊ ማኅበረሰብ ጥያቄውን በሙሉ ማድረግ ያሳድጋል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የዳይሬክካዊ አካባቢ እና የዳይማር አካባቢ መረጃዎችን ለመሥራት የሚችል ምሳሌ እናስቀምጠዋለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የአሁኑን አዲስ ዳይሎጂ ዳታዎችን ለመምረጥ ስራ 84.8 በመቶ MRR አግኝቷል፡፡ አዲስ የጥያቄ ማስታወቂያ ምክንያት የMRR ማስታወቂያውን የሚያብራራ የቁልፎች ማስታወቂያ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমে পরবর্তী বক্তব্য নির্বাচনের কাজের জন্য অতিরিক্ত সেমেন্টিক তথ্যের ব্যবহার হচ্ছে এই ক বিশেষ করে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে ডায়ালগের ফর্মে আরো তথ্য পাওয়া যায় - যখন ডায়ালগ ইতিহাসের প্রাপ্ত ব্যবহার করা হয়, তখন ডায়ালগের ইতিহাসের মাধ্যমে ব্যবহার করা হয়- ভূতপূ ডায়ালগ কার্যক্রমের মডেলের আচরণ প্রদর্শনের জন্যে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি পরিচিত মডেল দিয়ে পরীক্ষা করি যেমন সেকেন্স-থেকে সেকেন্স-সেকেন্স-ডেকোডার মডেল, হিয়ারাক্কিল কোডার-ডেকো এবং প্রদর্শন করা যায় যে সকল মডেলে ডায়ালগের মধ্যে যোগাযোগ করার কাজ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মার্গিনের মাধ্যমে উন্নত করে। এছাড়াও আমরা ডায়ালগের এনকোডিং কার্যক্রমের তথ্য প্রস্তাব করি এবং এটি হিয়েরার্কিয়াল কোডারের সাথে ব্যবহার করি একটি মডেল তৈরি করতে যা পরবর্তী ডায়ালগের ক আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেলে পরবর্তী বক্তব্য নির্বাচনের কাজের জন্য ৮৪. ৮% এমআরআর প্রায় ৮৪. ৮% অর্জন করে ডেইলি ডায়ালগ ডাটায়ালগের ডাটাসেটের কা এছাড়াও আমরা তাদের ফলাফলের বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণ প্রদান করি যার মধ্যে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অনুভূতি রয়েছে যা ডায়ালগের কাজের ত', 'bs': 'Korisnost dodatnih semantičkih informacija za zadatak sljedećeg izbora govora u automatskom dijalogu je fokus studija u ovom papiru. Posebno, pokazujemo da dodatne informacije koje su dostupne u obliku dijaloga - kada se koriste zajedno s kontekstom datom u obliku istorije dijaloga - poboljšavaju učinkovitost bez obzira na temeljni model koji je generativni ili diskriminativ. Da bismo pokazali model agnostičkog ponašanja djela dijaloga, eksperimentirali smo sa nekoliko poznatih modela kao što su modeli kodera na sekvenci do sekvence, hijerarhički model kodera-dekodera i modeli na Siamezu s hijerarhijom i bez hijerarhije; i pokazuju da u svim modelima uključujući dijalog djela poboljšava učinkovitost značajnom marginom. Osim toga, mi predlažemo novi način kodiranja dijaloga koji djeluje informacije, i koristimo ga zajedno s hijerarhičkim koderom da izgradimo model koji može koristiti sekvencijski dijalog djeluje informacije na prirodan način. Naš predloženi model postiže MRR od oko 84,8% za zadatak sljedećeg izbora govora na novom uvođenom setu podataka dnevnog dijaloga i nadmaže početne modele. Također pružamo detaljnu analizu rezultata uključujući ključne uvide koje objašnjavaju poboljšanje MRR zbog informacija o dijalogu.', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i informacionit shtesë semantik për detyrën e zgjedhjes së shprehjes së ardhshme në një sistem dialog automatik është fokusi i studimit në këtë letër. Në veçanti, ne tregojmë se informacioni shtesë i disponueshëm në form ën e veprimeve të dialogut - kur përdoret së bashku me kontekstin e dhënë në formën e historisë së dialogut - përmirëson performancën pavarësisht nga modeli themelor të jetë gjenerativ apo diskriminues. Për të treguar sjelljen agnostike të modelit të veprimeve të dialogut, ne eksperimentojmë me disa modele të njohur të tilla si modeli kodues-dekoder-sekuencë-sekuencë-sekuencë-sekuencë, modeli hierarkik kodues-dekoder, dhe modele bazuar në Siame me dhe pa hierarki; dhe tregojnë se në të gjitha modelet, përfshirja e veprimeve të dialogut përmirëson performancën me një margin të rëndësishëm. Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë një mënyrë të re për kodimin e informacionit të veprimit të dialogut dhe e përdorim së bashku me koduesin hierarkik për të ndërtuar një model që mund të përdorë informacionin e dialogut sekuencial të veprimit në një mënyrë natyrore. Modeli ynë i propozuar arrin një MRR prej rreth 84.8% për detyrën e zgjedhjes së ardhshme të shprehjes në një grup të dhënash të paraqitur të sapo në Dialogun e Përditshëm dhe i kalon modelet bazë. Ne ofrojmë gjithashtu një analizë të detajuar të rezultateve duke përfshirë pamjet kryesore që shpjegojnë përmirësimin në MRR për shkak të informacionit të veprimit të dialogut.', 'ca': "The utility of additional semantic information for the task of next utterance selection in an automated dialogue system is the focus of study in this paper.  En particular, demostram que la informació adicional disponible en forma d'actes de diàleg, quan s'utilitza juntament amb el context dada en forma de història de diàleg, millora el rendiment, independentment de que el model subjacent sigui generador o discriminatiu. Per mostrar el model de comportament agnòstic dels actes de diàleg, experimentem amb molts models coneguts com el model de codificador de seqüència a seqüència, el model de codificador-codificador jeràrquic i models basats en Siames amb i sense jeràrquia; i demostrar que en tots els models, incorporar actes de diàleg millora el rendiment d'un marge significatiu. També proposem una nova manera de codificar la informació del diàleg i utilitzar-la juntament amb el codificador jeràrquic per construir un model que pot utilitzar la informació del diàleg seqüencial d'una manera natural. El nostre model proposat aconsegueix un RMR d'aproximadament 84,8% per a la tasca de la següent selecció d'expressions en un nou conjunt de dades de diàleg diari, i supera els models de base. També proporcionem una anàlisi detallada dels resultats, incloent les percepcions clau que explicen la millora de la RMN a causa de la informació de diàleg.", 'et': 'Täiendava semantilise informatsiooni kasulikkus automatiseeritud dialoogisüsteemis järgmise kõnevaliku ülesandeks on käesoleva töö fookuses. Eelkõige näitame, et dialoogi toimingute vormis kättesaadav täiendav teave – kui seda kasutatakse koos dialoogi ajaloo vormis antud kontekstiga – parandab tulemuslikkust olenemata sellest, kas alusmudel on generatiivne või diskrimineeriv. Dialoogiategude mudeli agnostilise käitumise näitamiseks eksperimenteerime mitmeid tuntud mudeleid, näiteks järjestusest järjestuseni kodeerija-dekooder mudel, hierarhiline kodeerija-dekooder mudel ning siaami põhised mudelid hierarhiaga ja ilma; ja näidata, et kõigis mudelites parandab dialoogi aktide kaasamine tulemuslikkust märkimisväärselt. Lisaks pakume välja uudse dialoogi toimingu teabe kodeerimise viisi ja kasutame seda koos hierarhilise kodeerijaga mudeli loomiseks, mis saab kasutada järjestikust dialoogi toimingu teavet loomulikul viisil. Meie kavandatud mudel saavutab hiljuti kasutusele võetud igapäevase dialoogi andmekogumi järgmise väljavaliku ülesande jaoks MRR umbes 84,8% ja saavutab baasmudelitest parema tulemuse. Samuti anname tulemuste üksikasjaliku analüüsi, sealhulgas peamised ülevaated, mis selgitavad MRR paranemist dialoogi akti teabe tõttu.', 'az': "Əvvəlki sözlər seçməsi üçün çox semantik məlumatının istifadəsidir. Bu kağıtda çalışmanın fokusudur. Özellikle, biz müəyyən etdik ki, Dialog şəklində müəyyən edilən əlavə məlumatlar kimi faydalanır - danışma keçmişi şəklində müəyyən edilən məlumatlarla birlikdə istifadə edilərək - nəticə edilən model in in nəticə edilməsindən və ya diskriminat olmasına baxmayaraq Dialoog əməllərinin modeli agnostik davranışlarını göstərmək üçün, biz sequence-to-sequence koder modeli, hierarşik koder-dekoder modeli və Siamese-tabanlı modelləri hiyerarşiyə və olmadan təcrübə edirik. və bütün modellərdə, dialogların birləşdirilməsi müəyyən bir dərəcə ilə performansını yaxşılaşdırır. Biz də kodlama dialogının yeni yolunu təbliğ edirik və onu hiyerarşik kodlayıcıyla birlikdə təbiətli yolla istifadə edə biləcək bir modeli in şa edərik. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz modellərimiz yeni tanıdıqları günlük Dialoog veri qutusunda gələcək sözlər seçməsi üçün 84.8%-dən bir MRR qəbul edər və baseline modellərini daha üstün edərlər. Biz də müəyyən edilmiş nəticələrin detaylı analizi təmin edirik ki, MRR'nin yaxşılıqlarını təsdiqləyici məlumatlarının səbəbi olaraq müəyyən edilən düzgün nəticələri də dahil olacaq.", 'fa': 'استفاده از اطلاعات semantic اضافه برای کار انتخاب سخنرانی بعدی در سیستم محاورۀ محاورۀ خودکار تمرکز مطالعه در این کاغذ است. در خصوص، ما نشان می دهیم که اطلاعات اضافه\u200cای که در شکل گفتگو موجود می\u200cشود، در حالی که با محیط داده شده در شکل تاریخ گفتگو استفاده می\u200cشود، عملکرد را به اخلاق مدل پایه\u200cای که تولید می\u200cشود یا تفریح می\u200cکند، بهتر می\u200c برای نشان دادن رفتار مدل agnostic فعالیت های گفتگو، ما با چند مدل خوب شناخته شده را آزمایش می کنیم، مانند مدل کوردر-تا-رده\u200cی مدل کوردر، مدل کوردر-دیکورد\u200cهای مختلف، و مدل\u200cهای بنیاد سیامیز با و بدون هیرارژی. و نشان دهید که در تمام مدل، شامل گفتگو عملکرد عملکرد را با یک مرز بزرگی بهتر می کند. ما، بعلاوه این، یک راهی نو از محاورۀ رمزبندی، اطلاعات عمل می\u200cکنیم، و همراه با قالب رمزبندی استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا یک مدل بسازیم که می\u200cتواند از محاورۀ محاورۀ بعدی اطلاعات را به طریق طبیعی انجام دهد. مدل پیشنهاد ما به یک MRR از حدود 84.8 درصد برای انتخاب انتخاب سخنرانی بعدی در مجموعه داده\u200cهای دیalog روزی معرفی تازه رسیده است و مدل\u200cهای پایین را بیشتر انجام می\u200cدهد. ما همچنین یک تحلیل جزئیح از نتیجه\u200cها را می\u200cدهیم که شامل مشاهده\u200cهای کلیدی است که توضیح بهترین توسط MRR به دلیل اطلاعات اعمال محاورش را توضیح می\u200cدهد.', 'cs': 'Využití dodatečných sémantických informací pro úlohu dalšího výběru výroku v automatizovaném dialogovém systému je zaměřeno na studium. Zejména ukazujeme, že doplňující informace dostupné ve formě dialogových aktů – při použití spolu s kontextem uvedeným v podobě historie dialogu – zlepšují výkonnost bez ohledu na to, zda je základní model generativní nebo diskriminační. Abychom ukázali modelové agnostické chování dialogových aktů, experimentujeme s několika známými modely, jako jsou sekvenční kodér-dekodér model, hierarchický kodér-dekodér model a siamské modely s hierarchií a bez hierarchie; a ukázat, že ve všech modelech začlenění dialogových aktů výrazně zlepšuje výkon. Navíc navrhujeme nový způsob kódování informací o dialogových aktech a využíváme jej společně s hierarchickým kódováním k vytvoření modelu, který může používat sekvenční dialogové akty přirozeným způsobem. Náš navržený model dosahuje MRR asi 84,8% pro úkol dalšího výběru výroku na nově zavedené datové sadě Denního dialogu a překonává základní modely. Dále poskytujeme detailní analýzu výsledků včetně klíčových poznatků, které vysvětlují zlepšení MRR díky informacím o dialogovém aktu.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä keskitytään semanttisen lisätiedon hyödyllisyyteen seuraavan lausevalinnan tekemiseen automaattisessa dialogijärjestelmässä. Osoitamme erityisesti, että vuoropuhelutoimien muodossa saatavilla olevat lisätiedot – kun niitä käytetään yhdessä vuoropuheluhistorian muodossa annetun kontekstin kanssa – parantavat suorituskykyä riippumatta siitä, onko taustalla oleva malli generatiivinen tai syrjivä. Dialogiaktien agnostisen käyttäytymisen näyttämiseksi kokeilemme useita tunnettuja malleja, kuten sekvenssi-sekvenssi-kooderi-malli, hierarkkinen kooderi-dekooderimalli ja siamilaiset mallit hierarkialla ja ilman hierarkiaa. ja osoittaa, että kaikissa malleissa vuoropuhelun tekojen sisällyttäminen parantaa suorituskykyä merkittävästi. Lisäksi ehdotamme uudenlaista tapaa koodata dialogi act informaatiota, ja käytämme sitä yhdessä hierarkkisen kooderin kanssa rakentaaksemme mallin, joka voi käyttää sekvensaalista dialogi act informaatiota luonnollisella tavalla. Ehdotettu malli saavuttaa noin 84,8 prosentin MRR-arvon seuraavassa lauseiden valinnassa äskettäin julkaistussa Daily Dialogue -aineistossa ja ylittää perusmallit. Tarjoamme myös yksityiskohtaisen analyysin tuloksista, mukaan lukien keskeiset näkemykset, jotka selittävät MRR:n paranemista dialogin tekotietojen perusteella.', 'sk': 'Uporabnost dodatnih semantičnih informacij za nalogo naslednje izbire izgovorov v avtomatiziranem dialogskem sistemu je fokus raziskave v tem prispevku. Zlasti pokažemo, da dodatne informacije, ki so na voljo v obliki dialognih aktov, kadar se uporabljajo skupaj z kontekstom, ki je podan v obliki dialogne zgodovine, izboljšujejo uspešnost ne glede na to, ali je osnovni model generativen ali diskriminativen. Da bi prikazali agnostično vedenje dialognih aktov, eksperimentiramo z več znanimi modeli, kot so model zaporedja v zaporedje kodir-dekoder, hierarhični model kodir-dekoder in siamski modeli z hierarhijo in brez nje; in pokažejo, da vključevanje dialognih aktov v vseh modelih znatno izboljša uspešnost. Poleg tega predlagamo nov način kodiranja informacij o aktu dialoga, ki ga uporabljamo skupaj z hierarhičnim kodirnikom za oblikovanje modela, ki lahko uporablja informacije o aktu zaporednega dialoga na naraven način. Naš predlagani model dosega MRR približno 84,8% za nalogo naslednje izbire izgovorov na novo uvedenem naboru podatkov o dnevnem dialogu in presega osnovne modele. Zagotavljamo tudi podrobno analizo rezultatov, vključno s ključnimi vpogledi, ki pojasnjujejo izboljšanje MRR zaradi informacij o dialognem aktu.', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah sistem sing semantar dumadhi kanggo nggawe Perintah kanggo langgambar kelas nang sampek sing automatik, sistem sing dipoles kanggo kelas nang kuwi iki. Slackke politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Bilih sedhaya bakal maneh akeh model, ditambah dialog patik bakal terus nggawe gerakan kanggo ngilangno barang dumadhi. Awak dhéwé, nggunakake un eleman maneh kanggo nggawe dialog nggawe informasi nggawe koder karo koder karo akeh-akeh lan nggawe model sing bisa ngubah dialog sing berarti informasi ning budhakan budhakan sampek. Monday Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh ndhelik neng dadi nggawe perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo nggawe barang kanggo nyelarakno kanggo MRR mergane tindakan informasi dialoog.', 'ha': "Yi amfani da ɗayan information na ƙaranci wa aikin maganar na daban cikin wani na zauren akwatin bayani na farat ɗaya, yana fokus wa karanta cikin wannan takardan. Kayya, Munã nũna masu tsari masu iya cikin tsari ga abun zauren zauren akwatin bayani - idan an yi amfani da shi sami da context wanda aka bai wa cikin shirin bayanin zauren akwatin bayani - za'a ƙarfafa aikin aiki, ko kuma don idan an sami wata misalin ƙarin da za'a zama mai zafi ko kuma babu wata rabo. Dõmin ya nũna hanyar agnostic game da aikin zauren zauren akwatin zauren akwatin bayani, muna jarraba su da wasu misãlai masu sani kamar misãlin kode-dubi'a-sequence, misãlin kode-dioder-hiera, da misãlai masu daidaita na Siamese da kuma bã da hierrchi; kuma ka nũna cewa, a cikin duk misãlai, ke cikin shirin zauren akwatin bayani, yana ƙara mafarin aikin da ke da wani margin mai girma. Furan wannan, ka buɗa wata hanya na takardar aiki na zauren akwatin bayani na kodi, kuma ka yi amfani da shi sami da kodi na hierrarci dõmin ka sami wani motel wanda zai iya yi amfani da maɓallin abun zauren akwatin bayani ta dabam, cikin hanya na natsi. Shirin da aka buɗa shi ya sami wata MRR wa taki 84.8% wa wa aikin na zaɓen maganar na daban da aka nuna wani tsarin da aka shiga Daily Dialog, kuma ka sami misãlai na ƙarƙashin. Ana sami da wani anayyar da fassaran da ke cikin fassarar, kamar akwai gannai na muhimmi wanda ke bayyana mafarinta ga MRR sabõda shirin jerin zauren zauren akwatin bayani.", 'he': 'השימוש של מידע סמנטי נוסף למשימה של בחירת מילים הבאה במערכת דיאלוג אוטומטית הוא המרכז של הלימוד בעיתון הזה. במיוחד, אנו מראים כי מידע נוסף זמין בצורה של פעולות דיאלוג - כשמשתמשים יחד עם הקשר שנתנה בצורה של היסטוריה דיאלוג - משפר את ההופעה ללא קשר לדוגמא המרכזית להיות יוצר או דיסקרטיבי. כדי להראות את התנהגות האגנוסטית של פעולות דיאלוג, אנו מנסים עם מספר דוגמנים ידועים היטב כמו דוגמני קודם-קודם-קודם-קודם-קודם-קודם, דוגמני קודם-קודם הייררכיים, ודוגמנים מבוססים סיאמיים עם ובלי הייררכיה; ולהראות שבכל הדוגמנים, הכילוי מעשי דיאלוג משפר את ההופעה על ידי שווה משמעותית. בנוסף, אנו מציעים דרך חדשה לקוד מידע על פעולה בדיולוגים, ולהשתמש בו יחד עם הקוד היררכי כדי לבנות מודל שיכול להשתמש במידע על פעולה בדיולוגים רצופיים בדרך טבעית. המודל המוצע שלנו משיג MRR של כ-84.8% עבור המשימה של הבחירה הבאה ביטוי על קבוצת נתונים של דיאלוג יומי שהוציאה כרגע, ומעביר את המודלים הבסיסיים. אנחנו גם מספקים ניתוח פרטי של התוצאות כולל תובנות מפתחיות שמסבירות את השיפור במאר.אר.', 'bo': 'སྒྲ་ཚུལ་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོངས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བརྗོད་རིམ་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ལག་སྟར In particular, we show that additional information available in the form of dialog acts -when used along with context given in the form of dialog history- improves the performance irrespective of the underlying model being generative or discriminative. In order to show the model agnostic behavior of dialog acts, we experiment with several well-known models such as sequence-to-sequence encoder-decoder model, hierarchical encoder-decoder model, and Siamese-based models with and without hierarchy; and མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ཚད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་ཡོད། We, furthermore, propose a novel way of encoding dialog act information, and use it along with hierarchical encoder to build a model that can use the sequential dialog act information in a natural way. ང་ཚོའི་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱིས་འོངས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གདམ་ཀ་ཡོད་པའི་དུས་ཚོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་84.8% སྐོར་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད ང་ཚོས་རྒྱས་ཁབ་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Structured Dialogue Policy with Graph Neural Networks', 'ar': 'سياسة الحوار المهيكل مع الشبكات العصبية للرسم البياني', 'fr': 'Politique de dialogue structuré avec réseaux de neurones graphiques', 'pt': 'Política de Diálogo Estruturado com Redes Neurais de Gráficos', 'es': 'Política de diálogo estructurado con Graph Neural Networks', 'ja': 'グラフニューラルネットワークとの構造化された対話方針', 'hi': 'ग्राफ़ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ संरचित संवाद नीति', 'ru': 'Структурированная политика диалога с нейронными сетями Graph', 'zh': '用图神经网络之结构化,对以方略', 'ga': 'Beartas Comhphlé Struchtúrtha le Líonraí Néaracha Graif', 'ka': 'სტრუქტურული დიალოგის პოლიტიკა გრაფის ნეირალური ქსელებით', 'el': 'Δομημένη πολιτική διαλόγου με τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα γραφήματος', 'hu': 'Strukturált párbeszédpolitika grafikai neurális hálózatokkal', 'kk': 'Құрылған диалог ережесі график нейралық желілерімен', 'it': 'Politica di dialogo strutturato con le reti neurali grafiche', 'lt': 'Struktūrizuota dialogo politika su grafiniais nerviniais tinklais', 'mk': 'Структурирана политика на дијалог со графички неурални мрежи', 'ms': 'Polisi Dialog Struktur dengan Rangkaian Neural Graf', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാഫ് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകളുമായി സ്ഥാപിച്ച ഡയലോഗ് പോളിസി', 'mt': 'Politika ta’ Djalogu Strutturat man-Netwerks Newrali tal-Graff', 'mn': 'График мэдрэлийн сүлжээний бүтээгдэхүүний диалог бодлого', 'no': 'Strukturert dialogpolitikk med graf- neiralnettverk', 'pl': 'Polityka zorganizowanego dialogu z wykresem sieci neuronowych', 'sr': 'Структирана диалогова политика са невралним мрежима графика', 'ro': 'Politica de dialog structurat cu rețelele neurale grafice', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලවාර්ක් සමග සංවාදය සංවාදය පොලිසි', 'so': 'Siyaarada dialogue with Graph Neural Network', 'ta': 'உரையாடல் கொள்கை', 'sv': 'Politik för strukturerad dialog med grafneurala nätverk', 'ur': 'گراف نئورل نیٹورک کے ساتھ ساختہ دیالوگ پولیس', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết cấu đối thoại với mạng thần kinh đồ họa', 'bg': 'Политика за структуриран диалог с графични неврални мрежи', 'nl': 'Gestructureerd dialoogbeleid met grafiekneurale netwerken', 'da': 'Politik for struktureret dialog med grafneurale netværk', 'id': 'Structured Dialogue Policy with Graph Neural Networks', 'de': 'Strukturierte Dialogpolitik mit Graph Neural Networks', 'fa': 'سیاست محاورۀ ساخته شده با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی گراف', 'hr': 'Strukturirana politika dijaloga s nervnim mrežama grafika', 'ko': '도신경 네트워크 기반의 구조화된 대화 전략', 'tr': 'Graph Näraral Netekler bilen Structured Dialog Policy', 'sq': 'Structured Dialogue Policy with Graph Neural Networks', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Struktuurde Dialoog Beleid met Graaf Neurale Netwerke', 'hy': 'Գրաֆի նեյրոնալ ցանցերի միջոցով կառուցվածքային պատմության քաղաքականությունը', 'az': 'Grafik Nöral Ağları ilə Yapılandırılmış Dialoog Siyası', 'bs': 'Strukturirana politika dialoga sa grafom neuronskim mrežama', 'ca': 'Política de diàleg estructurat amb xarxes neurals gràfics', 'sw': 'Sera ya Dialoga imeundwa na Mtandao wa Neural', 'cs': 'Politika strukturovaného dialogu s grafovými neuronovými sítěmi', 'bn': 'গ্রাফ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক দ্বারা নির্মিত ডায়ালগ পলিসি', 'fi': 'Strukturoitu vuoropuhelupolitiikka graafisten hermoverkkojen kanssa', 'et': 'Struktureeritud dialoogipoliitika graafiliste neurovõrkudega', 'jv': 'structural Dialog policy with Graph Neral Network', 'he': 'מדיניות דיאלוג מבוססת עם רשתות עצביות גרפיות', 'sk': 'Politika strukturiranega dialoga z grafičnimi živčnimi omrežji', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'རྩིས་ཐོག་ཕྱིར་མཐོང་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དང་བཟོ་བཀོད་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག་སྐྱོང་བྱེད་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Recently, deep reinforcement learning (DRL) has been used for dialogue policy optimization. However, many DRL-based policies are not sample-efficient. Most recent advances focus on improving DRL optimization algorithms to address this issue. Here, we take an alternative route of designing neural network structure that is better suited for DRL-based dialogue management. The proposed structured deep reinforcement learning is based on graph neural networks (GNN), which consists of some sub-networks, each one for a node on a directed graph. The graph is defined according to the domain ontology and each node can be considered as a sub-agent. During decision making, these sub-agents have internal message exchange between neighbors on the graph. We also propose an approach to jointly optimize the graph structure as well as the parameters of GNN. Experiments show that structured DRL significantly outperforms previous state-of-the-art approaches in almost all of the 18 tasks of the PyDial benchmark.', 'ar': 'في الآونة الأخيرة ، تم استخدام التعلم المعزز العميق (DRL) لتحسين سياسة الحوار. ومع ذلك ، فإن العديد من السياسات القائمة على DRL ليست فعالة في استخدام العينة. تركز أحدث التطورات على تحسين خوارزميات تحسين DRL لمعالجة هذه المشكلة. هنا ، نأخذ طريقًا بديلاً لتصميم بنية الشبكة العصبية الأكثر ملاءمة لإدارة الحوار القائم على DRL. يعتمد التعلم التعزيزي العميق والمنظم المقترح على الشبكات العصبية للرسم البياني (GNN) ، والتي تتكون من بعض الشبكات الفرعية ، كل واحدة لعقدة على الرسم البياني الموجه. يتم تحديد الرسم البياني وفقًا لأنطولوجيا المجال ويمكن اعتبار كل عقدة وكيلًا فرعيًا. أثناء اتخاذ القرار ، يقوم هؤلاء الوكلاء الفرعيون بتبادل الرسائل الداخلية بين الجيران على الرسم البياني. نقترح أيضًا نهجًا لتحسين بنية الرسم البياني بشكل مشترك بالإضافة إلى معلمات GNN. تظهر التجارب أن DRL المنظم يتفوق بشكل كبير على الأساليب السابقة الحديثة في جميع المهام الـ 18 لمعيار PyDial تقريبًا.', 'fr': "Récemment, l'apprentissage par renforcement profond (DRL) a été utilisé pour optimiser les politiques de dialogue. Cependant, de nombreuses politiques basées sur les DRL ne sont pas efficaces en termes d'échantillonnage. Les dernières avancées se concentrent sur l'amélioration des algorithmes d'optimisation des feux de jour pour résoudre ce problème. Ici, nous prenons une autre voie pour concevoir une structure de réseau de neurones mieux adaptée à la gestion des dialogues basée sur le DRL. L'apprentissage par renforcement profond structuré proposé est basé sur des réseaux de neurones de graphes (GNN), qui se composent de certains sous-réseaux, chacun pour un nœud sur un graphe orienté. Le graphe est défini en fonction de l'ontologie du domaine et chaque nœud peut être considéré comme un sous-agent. Au cours de la prise de décision, ces sous-agents échangent des messages internes entre voisins sur le graphique. Nous proposons également une approche pour optimiser conjointement la structure du graphe ainsi que les paramètres de GNN. Les expériences montrent que les feux de jour structurés surpassent de manière significative les approches de pointe précédentes dans presque toutes les 18 tâches du benchmark PyDial.", 'es': 'Recientemente, se ha utilizado el aprendizaje por refuerzo profundo (DRL) para la optimización de las políticas de diálogo. Sin embargo, muchas políticas basadas en DRL no son eficientes en cuanto a las muestras. Los avances más recientes se centran en mejorar los algoritmos de optimización de DRL para abordar este problema. Aquí, tomamos una ruta alternativa para diseñar una estructura de red neuronal que sea más adecuada para la gestión del diálogo basada en DRL. El aprendizaje de refuerzo profundo estructurado propuesto se basa en redes neuronales de gráficos (GNN), que consisten en algunas subredes, cada una para un nodo en un gráfico dirigido. El gráfico se define de acuerdo con la ontología del dominio y cada nodo se puede considerar como un subagente. Durante la toma de decisiones, estos subagentes intercambian mensajes internos entre vecinos en el gráfico. También proponemos un enfoque para optimizar conjuntamente la estructura gráfica y los parámetros de GNN. Los experimentos muestran que la DRL estructurada supera significativamente a los enfoques de vanguardia anteriores en casi todas las 18 tareas del punto de referencia PyDial.', 'pt': 'Recentemente, o aprendizado de reforço profundo (DRL) tem sido usado para otimização de políticas de diálogo. No entanto, muitas políticas baseadas em DRL não são eficientes na amostragem. Os avanços mais recentes se concentram na melhoria dos algoritmos de otimização de DRL para resolver esse problema. Aqui, tomamos uma rota alternativa de projetar a estrutura de rede neural mais adequada para o gerenciamento de diálogo baseado em DRL. O aprendizado de reforço profundo estruturado proposto é baseado em redes neurais de grafos (GNN), que consiste em algumas sub-redes, cada uma para um nó em um grafo direcionado. O grafo é definido de acordo com a ontologia do domínio e cada nó pode ser considerado como um subagente. Durante a tomada de decisão, esses subagentes possuem troca interna de mensagens entre vizinhos no grafo. Também propomos uma abordagem para otimizar conjuntamente a estrutura do grafo, bem como os parâmetros do GNN. Os experimentos mostram que o DRL estruturado supera significativamente as abordagens de última geração em quase todas as 18 tarefas do benchmark PyDial.', 'ja': '最近では、深層強化学習（ DRL ）が対話政策の最適化に使用されている。 しかし、多くのDRLベースのポリシーはサンプル効率が悪い。 最近の進歩は、この問題に対処するためのDRL最適化アルゴリズムの改善に焦点を当てています。 ここでは、DRLベースの対話管理に適したニューラルネットワーク構造を設計する代替ルートを取ります。 提案されている構造化された深層補強学習は、いくつかのサブネットワークからなるグラフニューラルネットワーク（ GNN ）に基づいており、各サブネットワークは有向グラフ上のノードのためのものである。 グラフはドメインオントロジーに従って定義され、各ノードはサブエージェントと見なすことができます。 意思決定の間、これらのサブエージェントはグラフ上の隣人間の内部メッセージ交換を持っています。 また、GNNのパラメータだけでなく、グラフ構造を共同で最適化するアプローチを提案します。 実験によると、構造化されたDRLは、PyDialベンチマークの18のタスクのほぼすべてにおいて、以前の最先端のアプローチを大幅に上回っています。', 'zh': '近者,深度强学(DRL)已施于言策优化。 然多 DRL 之策无采样效率。 近者进集改进DRL优化算法以决之。 用一神经网络结构之道,宜其DRL也。 所建结构化深度化学基于图神经网络(GNN),诸子网络成,每子网络用一节点。 该图据域本体定义,每节点皆得为子代。 决策之际,此子代于图邻之间而内部消息易之。 又条上同优化图形结构及GNN参数之法。 实验明结构化 DRL 于 PyDial 准试者几 18 一任,性明优于前最先进之法。', 'hi': 'हाल ही में, संवाद नीति अनुकूलन के लिए गहरी सुदृढीकरण सीखने (DRL) का उपयोग किया गया है। हालांकि, कई DRL-आधारित नीतियाँ नमूना-कुशल नहीं हैं। सबसे हाल ही में अग्रिम इस समस्या को संबोधित करने के लिए DRL अनुकूलन एल्गोरिदम में सुधार पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। यहां, हम तंत्रिका नेटवर्क संरचना को डिजाइन करने का एक वैकल्पिक मार्ग लेते हैं जो डीआरएल-आधारित संवाद प्रबंधन के लिए बेहतर अनुकूल है। प्रस्तावित संरचित गहरी सुदृढीकरण सीखने ग्राफ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (GNN) पर आधारित है, जिसमें कुछ उप-नेटवर्क होते हैं, जिनमें से प्रत्येक एक निर्देशित ग्राफ पर नोड के लिए होता है। ग्राफ को डोमेन ऑन्टोलॉजी के अनुसार परिभाषित किया गया है और प्रत्येक नोड को उप-एजेंट के रूप में माना जा सकता है। निर्णय लेने के दौरान, इन उप-एजेंटों के पास ग्राफ पर पड़ोसियों के बीच आंतरिक संदेश विनिमय होता है। हम ग्राफ संरचना के साथ-साथ जीएनएन के मापदंडों को संयुक्त रूप से अनुकूलित करने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण का भी प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि संरचित डीआरएल PyDial बेंचमार्क के लगभग सभी 18 कार्यों में पिछले अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों को काफी हद तक मात देता है।', 'ru': 'В последнее время для оптимизации политики в области диалога используется метод углубленного обучения. Однако многие стратегии, основанные на ДХО, не являются эффективными с точки зрения выборки. Самые последние достижения сосредоточены на совершенствовании алгоритмов оптимизации ДХО для решения этой проблемы. Здесь мы берем альтернативный путь конструирования структуры нейронной сети, которая лучше подходит для управления диалогом на основе DRL. Предлагаемое структурированное глубокое обучение усилению основано на графовых нейронных сетях (GNN), которые состоят из нескольких подсетей, каждая из которых для узла на направленном графе. Граф определяется в соответствии с онтологией домена, и каждый узел может рассматриваться как субагент. Во время принятия решений эти субагенты имеют внутренний обмен сообщениями между соседями на графике. Также мы предлагаем подход для совместной оптимизации структуры графа, а также параметров GNN. Эксперименты показывают, что структурированный DRL значительно превосходит предыдущие современные подходы почти во всех 18 задачах эталона PyDial.', 'ga': 'Le déanaí, baineadh úsáid as foghlaim threisithe dhomhain (DRL) le haghaidh barrfheabhsú beartais idirphlé. Mar sin féin, níl go leor polasaithe atá bunaithe ar DRL sampla-éifeachtach. Díríonn an dul chun cinn is déanaí ar halgartaim optamaithe DRL a fheabhsú chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an gceist seo. Anseo, glacaimid bealach eile chun struchtúr néarlíonra a dhearadh a oireann níos fearr do bhainistiú comhphlé bunaithe ar DRL. Tá an fhoghlaim treisithe domhain struchtúrtha atá beartaithe bunaithe ar líonraí néaracha graif (GNN), atá comhdhéanta de roinnt fo-líonraí, gach ceann acu le haghaidh nód ar ghraf dírithe. Sainmhínítear an graf de réir ontology an fhearainn agus is féidir gach nód a mheas mar fho-ghníomhaire. Le linn cinnteoireachta, tá malartú inmheánach teachtaireachta idir na comharsana ar an ngraf ag na fo-ghníomhairí seo. Molaimid freisin cur chuige chun an struchtúr graf chomh maith le paraiméadair GNN a bharrfheabhsú. Léiríonn turgnaimh go sáraíonn DRL struchtúrtha cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha a bhí ann roimhe seo i mbeagnach gach ceann de na 18 dtasc de thagarmharc PyDial.', 'ka': 'ახლა დიალოგის პოლიტიკის ოპტიმიზაციისთვის გამოყენებულია. მაგრამ, ბევრი პოლიტიკები, რომლებიც DRL-დაბათებული პროლიტიკები არიან ჩატვირთვის. ბოლო წინაღალდე პროგრესი პროგრესის გასაკეთებლად DRL ოპტიმიზაციის ალგორიტემის გასაკეთებლად. აქ, ჩვენ ვიყავით ალტენტრუმენტური გეზი, რომელიც DRL-ის ბაზეული დიალოგის მენეზიმისთვის უკეთესია. პროგრამის სტრუქტურაციული ძალიან სწავლებელი სტრუქტურაციის სწავლება დაბაზიან ნეიროლური ქსელების (GNN) დაფარდება, რომელიც ერთ-ერთი სტრუქტური ქსელების შეფარდება,  გრაფიკი მონიშნულია დემომინის ანტოლოგიაზე და ყოველ კოდის შესაძლებელია იყოს სპეადენტი. გადაწყვეტილების განსაზღვრებით, ეს სექანტები აქვს ინტერული შეტყობინებების გაცვლილება საზოგადოებში. ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ერთადერთად გრაფიკური სტრუქტურაციას და GNN-ის პარამეტრების მოწყობინება. ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენებს, რომ სტრუქტურული DRL მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო მეტად გავაკეთება წინახალი სახელსაწყისი მოხდება პირდაპირად ყველა 18 საქმედების PyDial ბანქმარის.', 'hu': 'A közelmúltban a mély erősítésű tanulást (DRL) használták a párbeszédpolitika optimalizálására. Számos DRL-alapú irányelv azonban nem mintahatékony. A legújabb fejlesztések a DRL optimalizálási algoritmusok javítására összpontosítanak a probléma megoldása érdekében. Itt alternatív útvonalat választunk a DRL alapú párbeszédkezeléshez jobban alkalmas neurális hálózati struktúra kialakítására. A javasolt strukturált mélyerősítő tanulás gráf neurális hálózatokon (GNN) alapul, amelyek néhány alhálózatból állnak, mindegyik egy irányított gráf csomópontja. A grafikont a tartomány ontológiájának megfelelően definiáljuk, és minden csomópont alágazatnak tekinthető. A döntéshozatal során ezek az alügynökök belső üzenetcserét folytatnak a grafikonon szereplő szomszédok között. Javasoljuk továbbá a grafikonszerkezet és a GNN paramétereinek közös optimalizálására irányuló megközelítést. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a strukturált DRL jelentősen felülmúlja a korábbi legkorszerűbb megközelítéseket a PyDial benchmark szinte minden 18 feladatában.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα, η βαθιά μάθηση ενίσχυσης έχει χρησιμοποιηθεί για τη βελτιστοποίηση της πολιτικής διαλόγου. Ωστόσο, πολλές πολιτικές που βασίζονται σε DRL δεν είναι αποτελεσματικές ως προς το δείγμα. Οι πιο πρόσφατες εξελίξεις επικεντρώνονται στη βελτίωση αλγορίθμων βελτιστοποίησης για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του ζητήματος. Εδώ, ακολουθούμε μια εναλλακτική διαδρομή σχεδιασμού δομής νευρωνικών δικτύων που είναι καταλληλότερη για τη διαχείριση διαλόγου βασισμένη στην DRL. Η προτεινόμενη δομημένη μάθηση βαθιάς ενίσχυσης βασίζεται σε νευρωνικά δίκτυα γραφής (GNN), τα οποία αποτελούνται από μερικά υπο-δίκτυα, το καθένα για έναν κόμβο σε κατευθυνόμενο γράφημα. Το γράφημα ορίζεται σύμφωνα με την οντολογία του τομέα και κάθε κόμβος μπορεί να θεωρηθεί ως υποπράκτορας. Κατά τη διάρκεια της λήψης αποφάσεων, αυτοί οι υποπράκτορες έχουν εσωτερική ανταλλαγή μηνυμάτων μεταξύ των γειτόνων στο γράφημα. Προτείνουμε επίσης μια προσέγγιση για την κοινή βελτιστοποίηση της δομής γραφήματος καθώς και των παραμέτρων του GNN. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι η δομημένη DRL ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε σχεδόν όλες τις 18ες εργασίες του σημείου αναφοράς PyDial.', 'it': "Recentemente, il deep reinforcement learning (DRL) è stato utilizzato per ottimizzare le politiche di dialogo. Tuttavia, molte politiche basate su DRL non sono efficienti per campione. I progressi più recenti si concentrano sul miglioramento degli algoritmi di ottimizzazione DRL per affrontare questo problema. Qui, prendiamo un percorso alternativo di progettazione della struttura di rete neurale che è più adatto per la gestione del dialogo basato su DRL. L'apprendimento strutturato di rinforzo profondo proposto si basa su reti neurali grafiche (GNN), che consiste di alcune sotto-reti, ognuna per un nodo su un grafico diretto. Il grafico è definito in base all'ontologia del dominio e ogni nodo può essere considerato come un sub-agente. Durante il processo decisionale, questi sub-agenti hanno scambio di messaggi interni tra vicini sul grafico. Proponiamo anche un approccio per ottimizzare congiuntamente la struttura del grafico e i parametri del GNN. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che DRL strutturato supera significativamente i precedenti approcci all'avanguardia in quasi tutti i 18 compiti del benchmark PyDial.", 'lt': 'Neseniai dialogo politikos optimizavimui buvo naudojamas gilesnis mokymasis. Tačiau daugelis DRL grindžiamos politikos nėra veiksmingos atrankos būdu. Pastaruoju metu padaryta pažanga daugiausia dėmesio skiriama DRL optimizavimo algoritmų tobulinimui šiam klausimui spręsti. Čia imame alternatyvų būdą kurti nervinio tinklo struktūrą, kuri geriau pritaikytų DRL grindžiamam dialogui valdyti. Siūlomas struktūrinis gilesnis mokymasis grindžiamas grafinių nervų tinklais (GNN), kuriuos sudaro kai kurie posistemiai, kiekvienas skirtas nukreiptam grafiniam mazgui. Grafikas apibrėžiamas pagal domeno ontologiją ir kiekvienas mazgas gali būti laikomas sudedamąja dalimi. During decision making, these sub-agents have internal message exchange between neighbors on the graph.  Taip pat siūlome bendrai optimizuoti grafikos struktūrą ir BNP parametrus. Eksperimentai rodo, kad struktūrizuota DRL gerokai viršija ankstesnius pažangiausius metodus beveik visose 18 PyDial lyginamojo rodiklio užduočių.', 'kk': 'Жуырда диалог ережесін оптимизациялау үшін қолданылады. Бірақ DRL негіздеген көп саясаттар үлгі эффективні емес. Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін DRL оптимизациялау алгоритмдерін жақсарту үшін ең жаңа жағдайлардың көбірек көбірек. Мұнда біз DRL диалог басқаруы үшін жақсы құрылған неврал желінің құрылымының альтернативті жолын жасаймыз. Бұл құрылған түсіндіру оқытуы негізінде невралдық желілер (GNN) негізінде тұрады. Бұл кейбір ішкі желілерден тұрады, әрбір бағытталған графиктің түбірі үшін. График доменнің онтологиясына сәйкес келтірілген және әрбір түрді субагент ретінде анықталады. Шешім беру кезінде, бұл субагенттер графикалық қосымшалар арасындағы ішкі хаттар ауыстырылады. Сонымен қатар, графикалық құрылғыны және GNN параметрлерін біріктіру үшін біріктіру керектігін таңдаймыз. Тәжірибелер құрылған ДРЛ PyDial бағдарламасының 18 тапсырмаларының алдыңғы күйінде өзгертілген жағдайды.', 'ms': 'Baru-baru ini, pembelajaran penyokong mendalam (DRL) telah digunakan untuk optimasi polisi dialog. Namun, kebanyakan polisi berdasarkan DRL tidak berkesan sampel. Kemajuan terbaru fokus pada meningkatkan algoritma optimasi DRL untuk mengatasi isu ini. Di sini, kita mengambil laluan alternatif untuk merancang struktur rangkaian saraf yang lebih sesuai untuk pengurusan dialog berdasarkan DRL. Pelajaran penyokong mendalam struktur yang direncanakan berdasarkan rangkaian saraf graf (GNN), yang terdiri dari beberapa sub-rangkaian, masing-masing untuk nod pada graf yang direncanakan. Graf ditakrif mengikut ontologi domain dan setiap nod boleh dianggap sebagai sub-ejen. Semasa membuat keputusan, subejen ini mempunyai pertukaran mesej dalaman antara jiran di graf. Kami juga menyarankan pendekatan untuk bersama-sama optimize struktur graf serta parameter GNN. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa DRL struktur secara signifikan melebihi pendekatan state-of-the-art terdahulu dalam hampir semua 18 tugas piawai PyDial.', 'mk': 'Неодамна, длабоко зајакнување на учењето (ДРЛ) се користи за оптимизација на политиката на дијалогот. Сепак, многу политики базирани на ДРЛ не се ефикасни за примероци. Најновите напредоци се фокусираат на подобрувањето на алгоритмите за оптимизација на DRL за решавање на ова прашање. Овде, земаме алтернативна рута за дизајнирање на структурата на нервната мрежа која е подобро соодветна за менаџментот на дијалогот базиран на ДРЛ. Предложеното структурирано длабоко зајакнување учење се базира на графичките неурални мрежи (ГНН), кои се состои од некои подмрежи, секој од нив за јазол на директиран график. Графот е дефиниран според онтологијата на доменот и секој јазол може да се смета за подагент. За време на донесувањето одлуки, овие подагенти имаат внатрешна размена на пораки меѓу соседите на графикот. We also propose an approach to jointly optimize the graph structure as well as the parameters of GNN.  Експериментите покажуваат дека структурираната ДРЛ значително ги надминува претходните најсовремени пристапи во скоро сите 18 задачи од параметрата PyDial.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തിടെ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പോലീസിയുടെ ഐച്ഛികതയ്ക്കായി ആഴമുള്ള പഠന (DRL) ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും ഡിആര്\u200dഎല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ധാരാളം പോളിസികള്\u200d മാതൃകയാണ്. ഈ പ്രശ്നം വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഏറ്റവും അടുത്തുള്ള പുരോഗങ്ങള്\u200d DRL ഐക്യോമിഷനേഷന്\u200d ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d മു ഇവിടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മാറ്റം വഴി ഡിആര്\u200dഎല്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് മാനേജന്റ് മാനേജ്മെന്റിന് ഏറ്റവും നല്ല രീതിയിലാണ്. പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ആഴത്തില്\u200d ശിക്ഷ ആഴത്തില്\u200d ശക്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഗ്രാഫ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കെറ്റുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്. അത് ചില സ ഡൊമെന്\u200d നോട്ടോളജി അനുസരിച്ച് ഈ ഗ്രാഫ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. ഓരോ നോഡും ഉപ- ഏജന്റായി കണക്കാക്കാം. തീരുമാനിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ഈ സബ് ഏജന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫിലെ അയല്\u200dക്കാര്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d ഉള്ളിലെ സന്ദേശം മാറ്റുന്ന We also propose an approach to jointly optimize the graph structure as well as the parameters of GNN.  പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നത് പൈഡിയല്\u200d ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കിന്\u200dറെ 18 ജോലികളില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ', 'mt': 'Dan l-aħħar, it-tagħlim profond ta’ rinfurzar (DRL) intuża għall-ottimizzazzjoni tal-politika tad-djalogu. Madankollu, ħafna politiki bbażati fuq id-DRL mhumiex effiċjenti fil-kampjuni. L-aktar avvanzi reċenti jiffukaw fuq it-titjib tal-algoritmi tal-ottimizzazzjoni tad-DRL biex tiġi indirizzata din il-kwistjoni. Hawnhekk, aħna nieħdu rotta alternattiva għat-tfassil ta’ struttura tan-netwerk newrali li hija adattata aħjar għall-ġestjoni tad-djalogu bbażat fuq id-DRL. It-tagħlim strutturat ta’ rinfurzar profond propost huwa bbażat fuq netwerks newrali tal-graff (GNN), li jikkonsisti f’xi sottonetwerks, kull wieħed għal nodu fuq graff dirett. Il-graff huwa ddefinit skont l-ontoloġija tad-dominju u kull nodu jista’ jitqies bħala sottoaġent. Waqt it-teħid tad-deċiżjonijiet, dawn is-sottoaġenti għandhom skambju intern ta’ messaġġi bejn il-ġirien fuq il-grafika. Aħna nipproponu wkoll approċċ biex l-istruttura tal-grafika kif ukoll il-parametri tal-GNN tiġi ottimizzata b’mod konġunt. Experiments show that structured DRL significantly outperforms previous state-of-the-art approaches in almost all of the 18 tasks of the PyDial benchmark.', 'no': 'Nyleg er læring av dypt reinforcement (DRL) brukt for optimalisering av dialogpolitikk. Men mange DRL-baserte politikk er ikkje effektiv for prøve. Første avanserte fokus på å forbetra DRL-optimaliseralgoritme for å handtera dette problemet. Her tar vi ein alternativ rute for å designa neuralnettverksstrukturen som er bedre passa for DRL-basert dialoghandtering. Den foreslåde strukturerte dype stipringslæringa er basert på grafen for neuralnettverk (GNN), som inneheld av nokre undernettverk, kvar for ein node på eit direkte graf. Grafen er definert etter domeneontologien, og kvar node kan kalla som underagent. I løpet av avgjøringa har dei underagentane interne meldingar mellom naboer på grafen. Vi foreslår også ein tilnærming til å optimalisera grafstrukturen og parametrar for GNN. Eksperimentar viser at strukturerte DRL utfører tidlegare tilstanden av kunsten nærmar i nesten alle 18 oppgåva av PyDial-benchmarken.', 'pl': 'Ostatnio do optymalizacji polityki dialogu wykorzystywano głębokie uczenie się (DRL). Jednakże wiele polityk opartych na DRL nie jest skutecznych pod kątem prób. Najnowsze postępy koncentrują się na ulepszaniu algorytmów optymalizacji DRL w celu rozwiązania tego problemu. Tutaj wybieramy alternatywną drogę projektowania struktury sieci neuronowej, która jest lepiej odpowiednia do zarządzania dialogiem opartym na DRL. Proponowane ustrukturyzowane uczenie się głębokiego wzmocnienia opiera się na wykresach sieci neuronowych (GNN), które składa się z niektórych podsieci, każda z nich dla węzła na ukierunkowanym wykresie. Wykres jest zdefiniowany zgodnie z ontologią domeny i każdy węzeł może być traktowany jako podagent. Podczas podejmowania decyzji ci podagenci mają wewnętrzną wymianę wiadomości między sąsiadami na wykresie. Proponujemy również podejście do wspólnej optymalizacji struktury wykresu oraz parametrów GNN. Eksperymenty pokazują, że strukturyzowany DRL znacznie przewyższa poprzednie najnowocześniejsze podejścia w niemal wszystkich 18-tych zadaniach wynikających z referencji PyDial.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед ДРЛ суралцах гүн гүнзгий нэмэгдүүлэх суралцах нь диалог бодлогуудын сайжруулалт хэрэглэгдсэн. Гэхдээ ДРЛ-ын үндсэн олон бодлого нь жишээ нь үр дүнтэй биш. Хамгийн сүүлийн өмнө нь ДРЛ-ын эерэг санааны алгоритмыг сайжруулахын тулд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Энд бид ДРЛ-д суурилсан диалог удирдлагатай сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний бүтцийг загварчлах өөр зам ашиглаж байна. Бүтээсэн гүн гүнзгий нэмэгдүүлэх сургалтын сургалтыг график мэдрэлийн сүлжээний (GNN) дээр суурилуулдаг. Энэ нь зарим суб-сүлжээний бүрдэл, бүх нь шууд график дээрх товч юм. График нь холбоотой онтологийн тулд тодорхойлогдож байгаа бөгөөд холбоотой бүр суб-агент гэж үзэж болно. Шинэ шийдвэр гаргах үед эдгээр субагентууд график дээрх хөршүүдийн хооронд дотоод захидал байдаг. Мөн бид график бүтэц болон ГНН-ын параметрыг хамтдаа сайжруулахын тулд нэг арга зам зааж байна. Эмчилгээний туршилт нь ПИДАЙЛ-ын урлагийн өмнөх байдал дээр бараг л 18 даалгаварын ажил дээр илүү чухал байдаг.', 'ro': 'Recent, învățarea profundă de consolidare (DRL) a fost utilizată pentru optimizarea politicilor de dialog. Cu toate acestea, multe politici bazate pe DRL nu sunt eficiente din punct de vedere al eșantionului. Cele mai recente progrese se concentrează pe îmbunătățirea algoritmilor de optimizare DRL pentru a aborda această problemă. Aici, luăm o rută alternativă de proiectare a structurii rețelei neurale care este mai potrivită pentru gestionarea dialogului bazat pe DRL. Învățarea structurată de armare profundă propusă se bazează pe rețelele neurale grafice (GNN), care constă din unele subrețele, fiecare pentru un nod pe un grafic direcționat. Graficul este definit în funcție de ontologia domeniului și fiecare nod poate fi considerat ca un subagent. În timpul luării deciziilor, acești subagenți au schimb intern de mesaje între vecini pe grafic. De asemenea, propunem o abordare pentru optimizarea în comun a structurii grafice, precum și a parametrilor GNN. Experimentele arată că DRL structurat depășește semnificativ abordările anterioare de ultimă generație în aproape toate cele 18 sarcini ale benchmark PyDial.', 'sr': 'Nedavno je učenje dubokog pojačanja (DRL) korišćeno za optimizaciju politike dijaloga. Međutim, mnoge politike na temelju DRL-a nisu učinkovite uzoraka. Najskoriji napredak se fokusirao na poboljšanje algoritma optimizacije DRL-a za rješavanje ovog pitanja. Evo, idemo na alternativni put dizajniranja strukture neuralne mreže koja je bolje odgovarana za upravljanje dijalogom na temelju DRL-a. Predloženo structurirano učenje dubokog pojačanja se temelji na grafičkim neuralnim mrežama (GNN), koja se sastoji od nekih podmreža, svakog za čvor na usmjerenom grafiku. Graf je definisan prema ontologiji domena i svaki čvor se može smatrati podagentom. Tokom odluke, ovi podagenti imaju razmjenu unutrašnjih poruka između komšija na grafiku. Takođe predlažemo pristup zajedno optimizaciji grafske strukture kao i parametre GNN-a. Eksperimenti pokazuju da strukturirani DRL značajno iznosi prethodne pristupe umetnosti u skoro svih 18 zadataka PyDial benchmarke.', 'si': 'අවසානයෙන්, ගොඩක් විශ්වාස කරන්න (DRL) සංවාද පොලිසික විශ්වාස කරන්න භාවිත කරලා තියෙනවා. නමුත්, DRL අධාරිත පොලිසිය ගොඩක් නිර්මාණයක් නෙවෙයි. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය කරන්න DRL විශ්වාස කරපු ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලට අතුරුද්ධ විධානය කරන්න. මෙන්න, අපි වෙනස් මාර්ගයක් ගන්නවා න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලය සංවිධානයක් සැකසුම් කරන්න, ඒක DRL-අධාරිත සංවාදය ප්\u200d සංවිධානය කරපු ගොඩක් හොඳ උපකාරණය ඉගෙනගන්නේ ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයුරල් ජාලය (GnN) වල අධාරිත විදියට, ඒක සබ- ජාලය වලින් ඉන් ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඩෝමින් අන්ටෝලෝජිතිය සඳහා හැම නෝඩ් එක සබ- නියෝජි තීරණය කරගන්න වෙලාවේ මේ සබ් නියෝජිතයන්ට අන්තිම පණිවිඩය සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් තියෙනවා. අපි සමහරවිට ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානය සහ ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානය සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් සංවිධානය සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ DRL සංස්ථාපනය විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ පිරිසිද්ධි ස්ථිතියේ කාර්ය 18 වැඩ', 'so': 'Waxbarashada aad u dheer (DRL) waxaa loo isticmaalay si loo beddelo siyaasadda dialogue. Si kastaba ha ahaatee siyaaso badan oo ku saleysan DRL ma ahan sameyn. Dhacdooyinka ugu dambeeyay waxay focus on improvisashada algorithm-optimizka DRL si ay u macaamiloodaan arrintan. Halkan, waxaynu qaadannaa wado kala duwan oo ku sawiranaya dhismaha shabakadda neurada ee ugu haboon maamulka dialogue-ku saleysan DRL. The proposed structured deep reinforcement learning is based on graph neural networks (GNN), which consists of some sub-networks, each one for a node on a directed graph.  Lambarka waxaa lagu qoraa si waafaqsan maamulka deegaanka, hal kastana waxaa looga tirin karaa mid sub-agent ah. Marka uu go’aanka gaarayo, heerarkaasi waxay leeyihiin warqad internetka ah oo u dhexeeya derisyada xarunta. Sidoo kale waxaan horumarinaynaa qaab aan si wadajir ah ugu horumarinno dhismaha sawirada iyo heerarka GNN. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in ay dhisantay DRL si muhiim ah ugu muuqata xaaladdii hore ee farshaxanta ugu horraysay dhammaan 18 shaqooyinkii PyDial.', 'sv': 'Nyligen har deep armering learning (DRL) använts för optimering av dialogpolitiken. Många DRL-baserade policyer är dock inte urvalseffektiva. De senaste framstegen fokuserar på att förbättra algoritmer för DRL-optimering för att åtgärda detta problem. Här tar vi en alternativ väg att utforma neurala nätverksstruktur som är bättre lämpad för DRL-baserad dialoghantering. Det föreslagna strukturerade djupförstärkningslärandet baseras på grafneurala nätverk (GNN), som består av några undernätverk, var och en för en nod på en riktad graf. Grafen definieras enligt domänontologin och varje nod kan betraktas som en underagent. Under beslutsfattandet har dessa underagenter internt meddelandeutbyte mellan grannar på grafen. Vi föreslår också ett tillvägagångssätt för att gemensamt optimera grafstrukturen samt parametrarna för GNN. Experiment visar att strukturerad DRL avsevärt överträffar tidigare state-of-the-art metoder i nästan alla 18 uppgifter i PyDial benchmark.', 'ta': 'அண்மையில், ஆழமான கல்விப்பு (DRL) உரையாடல் கொள்கை முறைமைப்படுத்தலுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. ஆயினும், பல DRL-அடிப்படையில் உள்ள கொள்கைகள் மாதிரி விளைவு இல்லை. பெரும்பாலான முன்னேற்றம் இந்த பிரச்சனையை மேம்படுத்த DRL முன்னேற்றுதல் படிப்பினை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு  இங்கு, நாம் ஒரு மாற்று வழி வடிவமைப்பை எடுத்துக் கொள்கிறோம். இது DRL-அடிப்படையான உரையாடல் மேலாளருக்கு சிறந்தது. The proposed structured deep reinforcement learning is based on graph neural networks (GNN), which consists of some sub-networks, each one for a node on a directed graph.  இந்த வரைப்படம் களம் நோட்டியல் பொருத்தமாக வரையறுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் ஒவ்வொரு குறுக்கும் துணை முகவரியாக கரு முடிவு செய்யும் போது, இந்த துணை முகவரிகள் வரைபடத்தின் இடையே உள்ளார்ந்த செய்தி மாற்றும். நாம் ஒரு சேர்ந்து வரைப்படம் அமைப்பை மேம்படுத்துவதற்கு மற்றும் ஜின்என் அளபுருக்களையும் முன்னிருப்புகி பரிசோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்ட DRL முந்தைய நிலையில்- கலை நெருக்கங்களை முன்னோக்கி செயல்படுத்துகிறது பைடியால் பென்க்மேல் 18 பணி', 'ur': 'اچھے سے، عمیق قوت کی مدد کی تعلیم (DRL) ڈالیٹ پولیس optimization کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے۔ However, many DRL based policies are not sample-efficient. اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے DRL optimization algorithms کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے بہت اچھے پیشرفت کی تدبیر کریں۔ یہاں، ہم نے نئورل نیٹورک ساختار کی طراحی کا ایک الٹ راہ لیا ہے جو DRL بنیادی ڈیلوگ منظورت کے لئے بہتر ہے. پیشنهاد کی عمیق نیورال نیٹ ورک (GNN) کی تعلیم کی بنیاد ہے جو کچھ زیر نیٹ ورک میں سے ہے، ہر ایک ایک ایک مستقیم گراف پر ایک نوڈ کے لئے ہے. گراف ڈومین آنٹلوژی کے مطابق تعریف کی جاتی ہے اور ہر نوڈ کو sub- agent بنا کر سمجھ سکتا ہے. فیصلہ کرنے کے بعد، یہ سابہ اگنٹوں کے لئے گراف میں پڑوسے کے درمیان داخلی پیغام تبدیل ہے. ہم نے بھی ایک طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے کہ گراف ساختار اور GNN کے پارامتروں کو ایک ساتھ اچھی طریقہ کریں۔ تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ساختہ ڈرائل پیدائل بنچم کے 18 کاموں میں پہلے کی حالت-آرت کی تقریباً بہت اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Yaqinda muloqat qoidasi moslamasini qoidaga yordam berish uchun qoʻllanmagan. Lekin, ko'pchilik DRL asosida qoidalar misol effekti emas. Bu muammani boshqarish uchun eng oxirgi darajalar DRL moslamasining algorithini oshirish uchun fokuslash mumkin. Bu yerda, biz neyrol tarmoq tuzuvlarini dizayning boshqa yo'l bilan boshqarishmiz, DRL asosida juda yaxshi muloqat boshqaruvchiga mos keladi. Name Diagramma domen ontologiyasi sifatida aniqlangan va har bir nod sub- agent deb hisoblash mumkin. Hujjatni boshqarish davomida, bu sub-agentlar grafikdagi murojaatlarning orasidagi internal xabar almashtirish bor. We also propose an approach to jointly optimize the graph structure as well as the parameters of GNN.  Name", 'vi': 'Gần đây, để tăng cường học hỏi (DRL) đã được sử dụng cho khả năng cải thiện chính sách đối thoại. Tuy nhiên, nhiều chính sách dựa trên DRL không hiệu quả. Những bước tiến gần đây nhất tập trung vào thuật to án tăng tốc DRL để giải quyết vấn đề này. Ở đây, chúng ta có một tuyến đường khác để thiết kế cấu trúc mạng thần kinh phù hợp hơn cho việc quản lý cuộc đối thoại theo kiểu DRL. Dự kiến kiến kiến kiến kiến kiến kiến kiến kiến việc tăng cường sâu sắc dựa trên các mạng lưới thần kinh đồ thị (GNN), gồm một số mạng phụ, mỗi mạng cho một nút trên một đồ thị chính. Biểu đồ được xác định theo dạng tổ chức miền và mỗi nút có thể được xem là phụ trách. Trong thời gian quyết định, các đặc vụ phụ có trao đổi thông điệp nội bộ giữa hàng xóm trên đồ thị. Chúng tôi cũng đề nghị một phương pháp tối ưu hóa cấu trúc đồ thị và các tham số của GNN. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy DRL được cấu trúc đánh giá cao hơn trước nhiều trong hầu hết các nhiệm vụ 18 của tiêu chuẩn PyDial.', 'nl': 'Recent wordt Deep Enhancement Learning (DRL) gebruikt voor dialoogbeleidsoptimalisatie. Veel op DRL gebaseerde beleidsmaatregelen zijn echter niet steekproefefficiënt. De meest recente vooruitgang richt zich op het verbeteren van DRL optimalisatie algoritmes om dit probleem aan te pakken. Hier nemen we een alternatieve route om neurale netwerkstructuur te ontwerpen die beter geschikt is voor DRL-based dialogmanagement. De voorgestelde gestructureerde diepe versterking leren is gebaseerd op grafiekneurale netwerken (GNN), die bestaat uit een aantal subnetwerken, elk voor een knooppunt op een gerichte grafiek. De grafiek wordt gedefinieerd volgens de domeinontologie en elk knooppunt kan worden beschouwd als een sub-agent. Tijdens de besluitvorming hebben deze subagenten interne berichtuitwisseling tussen buren op de grafiek. We stellen ook een aanpak voor om gezamenlijk de grafiekstructuur en de parameters van GNN te optimaliseren. Experimenten tonen aan dat gestructureerde DRL significant overtreft eerdere state-of-the-art benaderingen in bijna alle 18-taken van de PyDial benchmark.', 'de': 'In letzter Zeit wurde Deep Enhancement Learning (DRL) zur Optimierung der Dialogpolitik eingesetzt. Viele DRL-basierte Richtlinien sind jedoch nicht stichprobeneffizient. Die jüngsten Fortschritte konzentrieren sich auf die Verbesserung von DRL-Optimierungsalgorithmen, um dieses Problem anzugehen. Hier gehen wir einen alternativen Weg, um neuronale Netzwerkstrukturen zu entwerfen, die besser für das DRL-basierte Dialogmanagement geeignet sind. Das vorgeschlagene strukturierte Deep Enforcement Learning basiert auf Graph Neuronal Networks (GNN), das aus einigen Unternetzen besteht, jedes für einen Knoten auf einem gerichteten Graph. Der Graph wird entsprechend der Domänenontologie definiert und jeder Knoten kann als Sub-Agent betrachtet werden. Während der Entscheidungsfindung haben diese Unteragenten internen Nachrichtenaustausch zwischen Nachbarn auf dem Diagramm. Wir schlagen auch einen Ansatz vor, um die Graphenstruktur sowie die Parameter von GNN gemeinsam zu optimieren. Experimente zeigen, dass strukturierte DRL in fast allen 18-Aufgaben des PyDial Benchmarks bisherige State-of-the-Art Ansätze deutlich übertrifft.', 'bg': 'Напоследък за оптимизиране на политиката на диалога се използва дълбоко обучение за подсилване. Въпреки това, много политики, основани на ДРЛ, не са ефективни за извадката. Най-новите постижения се фокусират върху подобряване на алгоритмите за оптимизация на ДРЛ за решаване на този проблем. Тук ние поемаме алтернативен път за проектиране на структура на невронната мрежа, която е по-подходяща за управление на диалога въз основа на ДРЛ. Предложеното структурирано дълбоко усилване обучение се основава на графични невронни мрежи (ГНН), които се състоят от някои подмрежи, всяка от които за възел върху насочена графика. Графиката се определя според домейнната онтология и всеки възел може да се счита за подагент. По време на вземането на решения тези подагенти имат вътрешен обмен на съобщения между съседите на графиката. Предлагаме и подход за съвместно оптимизиране на графичната структура, както и параметрите на ГНН. Експериментите показват, че структурираното ДРЛ значително превъзхожда предишните най-съвременни подходи в почти всички 18 задачи на еталона PyDial.', 'hr': 'Nedavno je učenje dubokog pojačanja (DRL) korišćeno za optimizaciju politike dijaloga. Međutim, mnoge politike na temelju DRL-a nisu učinkovite uzoraka. Najzadnji napredak usredotočio se na poboljšanje algoritma optimizacije DRL-a kako bi se riješio ovaj problem. Ovdje, idemo na alternativni put dizajniranja strukture neuralne mreže koja je bolje odgovarana za upravljanje dijalogom na temelju DRL-a. Predloženo structurirano učenje dubokog pojačanja temeljeno je na grafiku neuralnih mreža (GNN), koja se sastoji od nekih podmreža, svakog za čvor na usmjerenom grafiku. Graf se definira prema ontologiji domena i svaki čvor se može smatrati podagentom. Tijekom odluke, ovi podagenti imaju razmjenu unutrašnjih poruka između susjeda na grafiku. Također predlažemo pristup zajedničkog optimizacije strukture grafa, kao i parametara GNN-a. Eksperimenti pokazuju da strukturirani DRL značajno iznosi prethodne pristupe stanja umjetnosti u skoro svih 18 zadataka skloništa PyDial.', 'da': 'For nylig er dyb forstærkning læring (DRL) blevet brugt til dialog politik optimering. Mange DRL-baserede politikker er dog ikke stikprøveeffektive. De seneste fremskridt fokuserer på at forbedre DRL-optimeringsalgoritmer for at løse dette problem. Her tager vi en alternativ vej til at designe neurale netværksstruktur, der er bedre egnet til DRL-baseret dialogstyring. Den foreslåede strukturerede dyb forstærkning læring er baseret på grafneurale netværk (GNN), som består af nogle undernetværk, hver for en knude på en rettet graf. Grafen er defineret i henhold til domænenontologien og hver node kan betragtes som en underagent. Under beslutningstagningen har disse underagenter intern meddelelsesudveksling mellem naboer på grafen. Vi foreslår også en tilgang til i fællesskab at optimere grafstrukturen samt parametrene for GNN. Eksperimenter viser, at struktureret DRL betydeligt overgår tidligere state-of-the-art tilgange i næsten alle de 18 opgaver i PyDial benchmark.', 'id': 'Baru-baru ini, pembelajaran pendukung dalam (DRL) telah digunakan untuk optimisasi kebijakan dialog. Namun, banyak kebijakan berdasarkan DRL tidak efisien sampel. Kemajuan terbaru fokus pada meningkatkan algoritma optimasi DRL untuk mengatasi masalah ini. Di sini, kita mengambil rute alternatif untuk merancang struktur jaringan saraf yang lebih cocok untuk manajemen dialog berdasarkan DRL. Pembelajaran strukturasi mendalam yang diusulkan berdasarkan jaringan saraf grafik (GNN), yang terdiri dari beberapa sub-jaringan, masing-masing untuk node pada grafik direksi. Graf didefinisikan menurut ontologi domain dan setiap node dapat dianggap sebagai sub-agent. During decision making, these sub-agents have internal message exchange between neighbors on the graph.  Kami juga mengusulkan pendekatan untuk bersama-sama optimisasi struktur grafik dan parameter GNN. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa DRL strukturasi secara signifikan melebihi pendekatan terbaik sebelumnya dalam hampir semua 18 tugas benchmark PyDial.', 'ko': '최근에는 대화의 정책 최적화에 딥 스터디(DRL)가 사용되고 있습니다.그러나 많은 DRL 기반 정책이 유효하지 않습니다.최근의 진전은 이 문제를 해결하기 위해 DRL 최적화 알고리즘을 개선하는 데 집중되었다.여기서 우리는 DRL 기반의 대화 관리에 더욱 적합한 신경 네트워크 구조를 설계하는 또 다른 방법을 채택했다.제시된 구조화 심도 강화 학습은 도신경망(GNN)을 바탕으로 하는 것으로 일부 서브네트워크로 구성되어 있으며 각 서브네트워크는 지향도가 있는 하나의 노드를 대표한다.이 그림은 영역 본체에 따라 정의된 것으로 각 노드는 하위 에이전트로 볼 수 있다.의사결정 과정에서 이 하위 대리인들은 그림에 있는 이웃들 사이에서 내부 정보 교환을 한다.GNN 다이어그램 구조와 매개변수를 공동으로 최적화하는 방법도 제시했습니다.실험에 의하면 구조화된 DRL은 PyDial 기준 테스트의 거의 모든 18개 임무 중에서 이전의 가장 선진적인 방법보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'fa': 'اخیرا، یادگیری عمیق افزایش (DRL) برای optimization of policy dialog استفاده شده است. ولی بسیاری از سیاست\u200cهای بنیاد DRL موثر نمونه\u200cای نیستند. بیشتر پیشرفتهای اخیر روی بهترین الگوریتم\u200cهای optimization DRL برای حل این مسئله تمرکز می\u200cکند. ما مسیر دیگری از طراحی ساختار شبکه عصبی را برمی\u200cگیریم که بهتر برای مدیریت محاورۀ محاورۀ DRL مناسب است. یادگیری عمیق افزایش ساخته شده بر اساس شبکه\u200cهای عصبی (GNN) است که از بعضی شبکه\u200cهای زیر شبکه\u200cهای ساخته شده، هر یک برای یک گراف روی یک گراف مستقیم است. گراف بر اساس آنتولوژی دامنی تعریف می\u200cشود و هر گراف می\u200cتواند به عنوان زیر مامور نظر بگیرد. در موقع تصمیم گرفتن، این زیر ماموران پیام داخلی بین همسایه\u200cها در گراف دارند. ما همچنین یک روش پیشنهاد می کنیم تا ساختار گراف و پارامترهای گراف GNN را با هم بهترین کنیم. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که DRL ساخته شده بسیار بیشتر از حدود ۱۸ وظیفه\u200cای از صندوق پیدایل نزدیک است.', 'sw': 'Hivi karibuni, kujifunza kwa kina zaidi (DRL) imetumiwa kwa ajili ya kuboresha sera za mazungumzo. Hata hivyo, sera nyingi za DRL hazina ufanisi. Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni yanajikita kwenye kuboresha algorithi za ubora wa DRL ili kutangaza suala hili. Hapa, tunachukua njia mbadala ya kutengeneza muundo wa mtandao wa neura ambao unafaa zaidi kwa ajili ya utawala wa mazungumzo yanayotokana na DRL. Tayari hilo lililopendekezwa kuimarisha elimu ya kina zaidi inatokana na mitandao ya neurali (GNN), ambayo ni pamoja na baadhi ya mitandao ya mitandao ya chini, kila mmoja kwa njia ya picha inayoongozwa. Toleo hilo linaelezwa kwa mujibu wa utaalamu wa ndani na kila kipande kinaweza kuchukuliwa kama mtumiaji. Wakati wa uamuzi huo, watumishi hawa wa kituo hicho wana mabadiliko ya ujumbe wa ndani kati ya majirani kwenye ramani hiyo. Pia tunapendekeza mbinu ya kutengeneza muundo wa picha pamoja na vipimo vya GNN. Majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba DRL imeundwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kinafanya mbinu za hali iliyopita za sanaa katika takribani kazi zote 18 za bendera ya PyDial.', 'af': "Onlangs, diep versterking leer (DRL) is gebruik vir dialoog beleid optimaliseer. Maar baie DRL-gebaseerde beleid is nie voorbeeld-effektief nie. Mees onlangse vorderings fokus op die verbetering van DRL optimalisasie algoritme om hierdie probleem te adres. Hier, ons neem 'n alternatiewe raad van die ontwerp van neurale netwerk struktuur wat beter geskik is vir DRL-gebaseerde dialoog bestuur. Die voorgestelde structureerde diep versterking leer is gebaseer op graaf neuralnetwerke (GNN), wat bestaan van sommige subnetwerke, elkeen vir 'n node op 'n direkte graaf. Die graaf is gedefinieerd volgens die domein ontologie en elke node kan beskou word as 'n sub- agent. In die besluit, hierdie subagente het interne boodskap vervang tussen naaste op die graf. Ons het ook 'n toegang voorgestel om die graafstruktuur bymekaar te optimaliseer en die parameters van GNN. Eksperimente wys dat struktureerde DRL betekeurig uitvoer vorige staat-van-kuns toegang in amper al die 18 taak van die PyDial benchmark.", 'tr': "Soňky wagtlar, derejesi gowy gaýtalap öwrenmek üçin ullanýar. Ýöne DRL'e daýanýan köp syýasy örän nusgadan etkinlik däldir. Eň soňky ösümlikler DRL optimizasyň algoritmalaryny bu meselede çözmek üçin üýtgetmek üçin fokusy edýärler. Bu ýerde, DRL'a daýan ýan dijalog yönetimi üçin gowy bir nuýral aýulyk düzenlemegini saýlamak üçin başga bir ýoly görýäris. Gestirilen strukturly gaty güçlendirmek öwrenmegi näyral şebekelere (GNN) daýanýar. Bu grafik şebekeleriň birnäçe sub-şebekleriň içinde, her biri bir görkezilen grafikde node üçin bar. Grafik domena ontologiýa görä belirlenýär we her düğüm sub-agent olarak düşünebilir. Karar bermek üçin bu subagentlar grafikde goňşularyň arasynda daşary mesaj almagyny bar. Biz hem grafik düzenini hem GNN düzenini hem de birleştirmek üçin bir yaklaşmayı teklif ediyoruz. Denminatlar PyDial benchmarkynyň 18 zadynyň hemmesinde döredilen DRL-iň öňki durumynda ýakynlaşygynyň üstünden çykýandygyny görkezýär.", 'am': 'በአዲስ መጨረሻ የጥልቅ ማስተማር (DRL) ለጥያቄ ፖሊሲ ማቀናጃ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን ብዙዎች DRL-based ፖሊሲዎች ምሳሌ ጥቅም አይደሉም፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር እዚህ፣ በዲ.ஆர.எல_-አካባቢ ዳይሎችን መቆጣጠር የሚሻለውን የናውሬል መረብ አካባቢ መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተገኘው ጥልቅ ትምህርት የኖሮል መረብ (GNN) በመሠረት ላይ ነው፡፡ ግንኙነቱ እንደ ዶሜን አውቶሎጂ የተረጋገጠ ነው፣ ሁሉም ንድፎች እንደ አዲስ አካባቢ ሆኖ ይቆጠር ይችላል። በተፈረደበት ጊዜ እነዚህ ደብዳቤዎች በአገር ጎረቤቶች መካከል የውስጥነት መልዕክት አላቸው፡፡ We also propose an approach to jointly optimize the graph structure as well as the parameters of GNN.  ከፈተናዎች በ18 የPyDial benchmark ስራቶች ሁሉ ውስጥ DRL በመሠረቱ የፊተኛውን የ-art-ስርዓት ግንኙነትን በሚያሳየው ግንኙነት ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Kohët e fundit, mësimi i thellë i forcimit (DRL) është përdorur për optimizimin e politikës së dialogut. Megjithatë, shumë politika të bazuara në DRL nuk janë të efektshme për mostra. Përparimet më të fundit përqëndrohen në përmirësimin e algoritmave të optimizimit të DRL për të trajtuar këtë çështje. Këtu, ne marrim një rrugë alternative për të dizajnuar strukturën e rrjetit nervor që është më e përshtatshme për menaxhimin e dialogut me bazë në DRL. Mësimi i përforcimit të thellë i strukturuar i propozuar bazohet në rrjetet nervore të grafikut (GNN), që përbëhet nga disa nënrrjete, secili për një nyje në një grafik të drejtuar. Grafi është përcaktuar sipas ontologjisë së domenit dhe çdo nyje mund të konsiderohet si një nënagjent. Gjatë marrjes së vendimeve, këta nënagjentë kanë shkëmbim mesazh të brendshëm midis fqinjëve në grafik. Ne propozojmë gjithashtu një qasje për të optimizuar së bashku strukturën e grafikut si dhe parametrat e GNN. Eksperimentet tregojnë se DRL e strukturuar tejkalon ndjeshëm qasjet e mëparshme të state-of-the-art në pothuajse të gjitha 18 detyrat e referencës PyDial.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս, խորը ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրությունը օգտագործվել է խոսակցության քաղաքականության օպտիմացման համար: However, many DRL-based policies are not sample-efficient.  Վերջին առաջընթացները կենտրոնանում են ԴՌԼ-ի օպտիմացման ալգորիթմների բարելավման վրա այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար: Այստեղ մենք ընդունում ենք նյարդային ցանցի կառուցվածքի նախագծման այլընտրանքային ճանապարհ, որը ավելի լավ համապատասխանում է ԴՌԼ-ի հիմնված հաղորդակցման համար: The proposed structured deep reinforcement learning is based on graph neural networks (GNN), which consists of some sub-networks, each one for a node on a directed graph.  Գրաֆիկը սահմանվում է ըստ տիեզերքի օնտոլոգիայի, և յուրաքանչյուր կետ կարող է համարվել ենթագործականի: որոշումների կայացման ընթացքում այս ենթագործականները ունեն գծագրում գտնվող հարևանների միջև ներքին հաղորդագրությունների փոխանակում: Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք մի մոտեցում, որպեսզի միասին օպտիմացվի գծագրի կառուցվածքը, ինչպես նաև GNN-ի պարամետրերը: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ կառուցվածված ԴՌԼ-ը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է նախորդ ամենահետաքրքիր մոտեցումները', 'az': "Son zamanlarda, çox qüvvətli öyrənmək (DRL) dijalog siyasəti optimizasiya üçün istifadə edildi. Ancaq çoxlu DRL-ə dayanan siyasətlər nümunə faydalı deyildir. Bu məsələni çəkmək üçün DRL optimizasyon algoritmini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün ən yeni ilerləşdirilmiş ilerləşdirilmiş. Burada, DRL-ə dayanan dijalog idarəsi üçün daha yaxşı uyğun nöral ağ strukturasını tasarlamaq üçün alternatif yolu alırıq. Yapılmış qurulmuş derin güclü öyrənmək grafik nöral a ğları (GNN) üzərində dayanılır. Bu, bazı sub-ağların içindədir, hər biri müəyyən edilmiş grafik üzərində bir düyüm üçün. Grafik domeinin ontologiyasına görə belə tanımlanır və hər düyün sub-agent olaraq hesab edilir. Karar vermək vaxtında, bu apa-agentlar grafikdə qoşunların arasında iç mesaj alanı var. Biz də Grafik strukturunu və GNN parametrularını birlikdə optimizləmək üçün bir yol təklif edirik. Yaxınlıqlar PyDial benchmark ının 18 işində yapılmış DRL'in əvvəlki mövzunun yaxınlıqlarını çox yüksək göstərir.", 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি ডায়ালগ নীতির অপারেশনের জন্য গভীর শক্তিশালী (DRL) ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। তবে অনেক ডিআরএল ভিত্তিক নীতি নমুনা কার্যকর নয়। সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতি এই বিষয়টি ঠিক করার জন্য DRL অপারেশন অ্যালগোরিদমের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়ে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। এখানে আমরা নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো গঠনের একটি বিকল্প রাস্তা নিয়ে যাচ্ছি যা ডিআরএল ভিত্তিক ডায়ালগ ম্যানেজেন্টেশনের জন প্রস্তাবিত গভীর গভীর শক্তিশালী শিক্ষা গ্রাফ নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (জিনি) ভিত্তিতে রয়েছে, যার মধ্যে কিছু সাব-নেটওয়ার্কের অন্তর্ভুক্ত, য ডোমেইন অটলোজির অনুসারে এই গ্রাফ নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে এবং প্রত্যেক নোড সাব- এজেন্ট হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা যাবে। সিদ্ধান্ত নিতে এই সাব-এজেন্ট গ্রাফের প্রতিবেশীদের মধ্যে ইন্তর্জাতিক বার্তা বিনিময়ে আছে। আমরা একসাথে গ্রাফ কাঠামো এবং জিনিনের প্যারামিটার সম্পূর্ণ করার একটি উপায় প্রস্তাব করি। পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে পাইডায়াল বেনম্যার্কের প্রায় ১৮টি কাজের মধ্যে পূর্ববর্তী রাষ্ট্রের ক্ষেত্রে ডিআরএল তৈরি করা হয়েছে।', 'cs': 'V poslední době bylo pro optimalizaci politiky dialogu využíváno hluboké zesílení učení (DRL). Mnoho zásad založených na DRL však není efektivních pro vzorky. Nejnovější pokroky se zaměřují na zlepšení algoritmů optimalizace DRL pro řešení tohoto problému. Zde využíváme alternativní cestu navrhování struktury neuronové sítě, která je vhodnější pro řízení dialogu založené na DRL. Navržené strukturované hluboké zesílení učení je založeno na grafových neuronových sítích (GNN), které se skládá z některých podsítí, každá z nich pro uzel na směřovaném grafu. Graf je definován podle ontologie domény a každý uzel může být považován za subagenta. Během rozhodování mají tito subagenti interní výměnu zpráv mezi sousedy na grafu. Navrhujeme také přístup k společné optimalizaci struktury grafu a parametrů GNN. Experimenty ukazují, že strukturovaný DRL výrazně překonává předchozí nejmodernější přístupy téměř ve všech osmnácti úkolech benchmarku PyDial.', 'ca': "Recentment, l'aprenentatge profund de reforç (DRL) s'ha utilitzat per optimitzar la política de diàleg. Però moltes polítiques basades en LDR no són eficients en la mostra. Els avanços més recents es centren en millorar els algoritmes d'optimització del LDR per abordar aquest tema. Aquí tenim una ruta alternativa de disseny d'estructura de xarxa neural millor adaptada a la gestió del diàleg basat en DRL. L'aprenentatge de reforç estructurat proposat està basat en xarxes neurals gràfics (GNN), que consisteix en algunes subxarxes, cada una per un node en un gràfic orientat. El gràfic és definit segons l'ontologia del domini i cada nod pot ser considerat un sub agent. Durant la toma de decisions, aquests sub agents tenen intercanvi intern de missatges entre veïns al gràfic. També proposem un enfocament per optimitzar conjuntament l'estructura del gràfic i els paràmetres del GNN. Els experiments demostren que la LDR estructurada supera significativament els enfocaments més avançats anteriors en gairebé totes les 18 tasques del punt de referència PyDial.", 'bs': 'Nedavno je učenje dubokog pojačanja (DRL) korišćeno za optimizaciju politike dijaloga. Međutim, mnoge politike na temelju DRL-a nisu učinkovite uzoraka. Najskoriji napredak se fokusirao na poboljšanje algoritma optimizacije DRL-a za rješavanje ovog pitanja. Evo, idemo na alternativni put dizajniranja strukture neuralne mreže koja je bolje odgovarana za upravljanje dijalogom na temelju DRL-a. Predloženo strukturirano učenje dubokog pojačanja temelje se na grafu neuralnih mreža (GNN), koja se sastoji od nekih podmreža, svakog za čvor na usmjerenom grafiku. Graf je definisan prema ontologiji domena i svaki čvor se može smatrati podagentom. Tokom odluke, ovi podagenti imaju razmjenu unutrašnjih poruka između susjeda na grafiku. Također predlažemo pristup zajedno optimizaciji grafske strukture kao i parametre GNN-a. Eksperimenti pokazuju da strukturirani DRL značajno iznosi prethodne pristupe stanja umjetnosti u skoro svih 18 zadataka PyDial benchmarke.', 'fi': 'Viime aikoina dialogipolitiikan optimoinnissa on käytetty DRL-oppimista. Monet DRL-pohjaiset politiikat eivät kuitenkaan ole otostehokkaita. Viimeisimmät edistysaskeleet keskittyvät parantamaan DRL-optimointialgoritmeja ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Tässä valitaan vaihtoehtoinen tapa suunnitella neuroverkkorakenne, joka soveltuu paremmin DRL-pohjaiseen dialogin hallintaan. Ehdotettu strukturoitu syvävahvistuksen oppiminen perustuu graafineuroverkkoihin (GNN), jotka koostuvat joistakin aliverkoista, joista jokainen on suunnattua graafista solmua varten. Kaavio määritellään toimialueen ontologian mukaan ja jokaista solmua voidaan pitää alaagenttina. Päätöksenteon aikana näillä alaedustajilla on sisäinen viestinvaihto naapureiden välillä kaaviossa. Lisäksi ehdotamme lähestymistapaa graafisen rakenteen ja GNN:n parametrien optimoimiseksi yhdessä. Kokeet osoittavat, että strukturoitu DRL on huomattavasti parempi kuin aiemmat huipputekniset lähestymistavat lähes kaikissa PyDial-vertailuarvon 18 tehtävässä.', 'et': 'Hiljuti on dialoogipoliitika optimeerimiseks kasutatud sügavat tugevdamisõpet (DRL). Paljud DRL-põhised poliitikad ei ole siiski valimitõhusad. Viimased edusammud keskenduvad DRL optimeerimisalgoritmide parandamisele selle probleemi lahendamiseks. Siin võtame alternatiivse tee neurovõrgu struktuuri kujundamiseks, mis sobib paremini DRL-põhiseks dialoogijuhtimiseks. Kavandatud struktureeritud sügavtugevdusõpe põhineb graafilistel närvivõrkudel (GNN), mis koosnevad mõnest alamvõrgust, igaüks neist suunatud graafikul asuva sõlme jaoks. Graafik on määratletud vastavalt domeeniontoloogiale ja iga sõlme võib pidada alamagendiks. Otsuste tegemise ajal on neil alamagentidel graafikul naabrite vaheline sisemine teabevahetus. Samuti pakume välja lähenemisviisi graafilise struktuuri ja GNN parameetrite ühiseks optimeerimiseks. Katsed näitavad, et struktureeritud DRL-i tulemused ületavad oluliselt varasemaid tipptasemel lähenemisviise peaaegu kõigis PyDiali võrdlusaluse 18 ülesandes.', 'jv': 'plug-in-action politenessoffpolite, "), and when there is a change ("assertive NAME OF TRANSLATORS Punika, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo nggawe sistem neterungan sing luwih apik kanggo nggawe barang nggo resmi dialoog sing bisa digawe DroL. Gelangan nambah keamanan sistem padhas sistem keamanan untaraning nggawe sistem sistem n\'er basa kang kaamburti Neral (GNN), kiye sembarang akeh sistem pod-netwisan, saben saben keamanan node nang un diagram sing bisa diagram. The graph is defined by the domain ontlogies and every node can be contexted as a Sub-editor. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We unyangke kontribusi nggawe gerasane nggawe sistem dadi nggawe gerakan dadi GNN dumateng. Name', 'sk': 'V zadnjem času se za optimizacijo politike dialoga uporablja globinsko ojačevanje učenja (DRL). Vendar pa številne politike, ki temeljijo na opustitvi drog, niso učinkovite na vzorcu. Najnovejši napredek se osredotoča na izboljšanje algoritmov za optimizacijo DRL za reševanje tega problema. Tukaj se lotimo alternativnega načina oblikovanja strukture nevronskega omrežja, ki je bolj primerna za upravljanje dialoga na osnovi DRL. Predlagano strukturirano globinsko ojačevalno učenje temelji na grafskih nevronskih omrežjih (GNN), ki so sestavljene iz nekaterih podomrežij, vsaka za vozlišče na usmerjenem grafu. Graf je definiran glede na domensko ontologijo in vsako vozlišče se lahko šteje za podagent. Med sprejemanjem odločitev imajo ti podagenti notranjo izmenjavo sporočil med sosedi na grafu. Predlagamo tudi pristop za skupno optimizacijo grafske strukture in parametrov GNN. Eksperimenti kažejo, da strukturirani DRL bistveno presega prejšnje najsodobnejše pristope pri skoraj vseh 18 opravilih referenčne vrednosti PyDial.', 'ha': "An yi amfani da kwamfyutan zauren zauren akwatin bayanin zauren akwatin bayani na ƙarani da ake ƙari (DRL). A lokacin da, misãlai mãsu yawa ba ta sami'a kan DRL ba. @ info: whatsthis Wannan, munã tafiyar wata hanya na daban wa'urar da za'a designe tsarin zanen jerin neural wanda ke da mafi kyau ga manajan zauren zauren akwatin bayani na DRL. Ana son an ƙara wa ƙari da aka buƙata, yana a kan zane-zanen grafi na neural (GNN), wanda ke ƙunsa da wasu masu shawara masu ƙananan-tarayya, kõwana zuwa wani node kan wata grafi wanda aka shirya. Ana bayyana graphin da aka ƙayyade lokalogi na Domin, kuma za'a iya ƙayyade kowace node kamar wani mai shawara. Ga bayan yin hukunci, waɗannan sub-ajansa sunã da musanya maganar guda a tsakanin majiɓinci da kan grafi. Kayya, Munã buɗe wata hanyoyi zuwa a tsakanin sigar grafi da parameter na GNN. Experiments show that the founded DRL significantly outperforms previous state-of-the-art takings in nearly all the 18 jobs of the PyDial bangment.", 'he': 'לאחרונה, למידת תגבורת עמוקה (DRL) השתמשה באופטיזציה של מדיניות דיאלוג. עם זאת, מדיניות רבות מבוססות על DRL אינן יעילות בדגימות. התקדמות האחרונות מתמקדות בשיפור אלגוריתם אופטימציה DRL כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה. כאן, אנחנו לוקחים נתיב אלטרנטיבי של עיצוב מבנה רשת עצבית שמתאים יותר לניהול דיאלוג מבוסס על DRL. הלימודים העמוקים המובנים המוצעים מתבוססים על רשתות עצביות גראפ (GNN), אשר מורכבת מכמה רשתות תת-רשת, כל אחד עבור קשר על גראפ מכוון. The graph is defined according to the domain ontology and each node can be considered as a sub-agent.  במהלך קיבלת החלטות, לסוכנים האלה יש מחליף הודעות פנימי בין שכנים על הגרף. אנחנו גם מציעים גישה כדי לאופטיזם ביחד את מבנה הגרף כמו גם את הפרמטרים של GNN. ניסויים מראים ש DRL מובנה משמעותית יותר מגישות מוקדמות במקרה כל 18 המשימות של המפקד PyDial.', 'bo': 'Recently, deep reinforcement learning (DRL)has been used for dialog policy optimization. ཡིན་ནའང་། DRL ལ་རྟེན་ནས་ཡོད་པའི་བྲིས་སྟངས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རྩལ་བ་སྤྱོད་མེད། DRL འི་ཉེན་རིས་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་ལ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བའི་མཐོ་རིམ་སྣེ་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད། འདིར་འུ་ཅག་གིས་DRL ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་སྒྲ་ཚུལ་དོ་དམ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུལ་མཐུན་གྱི་གྲོས་ལམ་ཞིག་འབྱེད་དགོས། The proposed structured deep reinforcement learning is based on graph neural networks (GNN), which consists of some sub-networks, each for a node on a directed graph. The graph is defined according to the domain ontology and each node can be considered as a sub-agent. གདམ་གས་འགོད་པའི་སྐབས་སུ། sub-agents་འདི་ཚོ་ནང་དུ་ཁྱིམ་མཚེས་པའི་ཁྱིམ་མཚེས་པའི་ནང་འཁོར་སྐྱེལ་བ་ཡོད། We also propose an approach to jointly optimize the graph structure as well as the parameters of GNN. Experiments show that structured DRL has significantly outperformed the previous state-of-the-art approaches in almost all the tasks of the PyDial benchmark.'}
{'en': 'JTAV : Jointly Learning Social Media Content Representation by Fusing Textual, Acoustic, and Visual Features', 'ar': 'JTAV: التعلم المشترك لمحتوى الوسائط الاجتماعية من خلال دمج الميزات النصية والصوتية والمرئية', 'pt': 'JTAV: Aprendizagem conjunta de representação de conteúdo de mídia social pela fusão de recursos textuais, acústicos e visuais', 'fr': 'JTAV\xa0: Apprentissage conjoint de la représentation de contenu sur les réseaux sociaux en fusionnant des fonctionnalités textuelles, acoustiques et visuelles', 'es': 'JTAV: Aprendizaje conjunto de la representación de contenido en redes sociales mediante la fusión de características textuales, acústicas y visuales', 'ja': 'JTAV ：テキスト機能、音響機能、視覚機能の融合によるソーシャルメディアコンテンツ表現の共同学習', 'zh': 'JTAV曰:合其文,声学与视同社交媒体也', 'hi': 'JTAV: संयुक्त रूप से सीखना सामाजिक मीडिया सामग्री प्रतिनिधित्व पाठ्य, ध्वनिक, और दृश्य सुविधाओं को फ्यूज करके', 'ru': 'JTAV: Совместное обучение представлению контента в социальных сетях путем объединения текстовых, акустических и визуальных функций', 'ga': 'JTAV: Comhfhoghlaim Ábhar na Meán Sóisialta a Léiriú trí Gnéithe Téacsúla, Fuaimiúla agus Amhairc a Chomhleá', 'hu': 'JTAV: K철z철ss챕gi m챕dia tartalom-reprezent찼ci처 k철z철s tanul찼sa textu찼lis, akusztikus 챕s vizu찼lis funkci처k 철tv철z챕s챕vel', 'el': 'Κοινή εκμάθηση της αναπαράστασης περιεχομένου κοινωνικών μέσων μέσω της συγχώνευσης κειμένων, ακουστικών και οπτικών χαρακτηριστικών', 'ka': 'JTAV: ერთადერთი სოციალური მედიაში სამყარო სამყარო პროცენტაცია ტექსტულური, აკუსტიური და ვიზუალური სამყარო', 'it': 'JTAV: Apprendimento congiunto della rappresentazione dei contenuti dei social media fondendo caratteristiche testuali, acustiche e visive', 'kk': 'JTAV: Социалдық медиа мазмұнын біріктіру мәтін, акустикалық және көрінетін қасиеттер', 'ms': 'JTAV: Perwakilan Kandungan Media Sosial Mempelajari Bersama-sama Oleh Fusing Features Textual, Acoustic, and Visual', 'ml': 'ജെട്ടാവി: സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയുടെ ഉള്ളടക്കം പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുക', 'mk': 'ЈТАВ: Соединето учење на социјалните медиуми Претстава од Fusing Textual, Acoustic и Visual Features', 'mt': 'JTAV: Jointly Learning Social Media Content Representation by Fusing Textual, Acoustic, and Visual Features', 'no': 'JTAV: Kopla læring av sosiale mediainnhald- representasjon av Fusing Textual, Acoustic and Visual Features', 'mn': 'JTAV: Нийгмийн Мэдээлэл Сургуулийн Content Representation by Fusing Textual, Acoustic, Visual Features', 'ro': 'JTAV: Învățarea comună a reprezentării conținutului social media prin combinarea caracteristicilor textuale, acustice și vizuale', 'pl': 'JTAV: Wspólne uczenie się reprezentacji treści mediów społecznościowych poprzez łączenie funkcji tekstowych, akustycznych i wizualnych', 'lt': 'JTAV: Bendras socialinių žiniasklaidos turinio mokymasis Tekstualinių, akustinių ir vizualinių savybių jungimas', 'si': 'JTAV: සාමාජික මිඩියාව සාමාජික සාමාජික ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සඳහා Fusing Text, Acoustic, and Visal Featuries', 'so': 'JTAV: Joint Learning Social Media Content Representation by Fusing Textual, Acoustic, and Visual Features', 'sr': 'JTAV: Zajednički predstavljanje sadržaja društvenih medija fušenjem tekstualnih, akustičnih i vizuelnih karaktera', 'sv': 'JTAV: Gemensamt lärande Social Media Content Representation genom att kombinera textuella, akustiska och visuella funktioner', 'ta': 'ஜாடிவி: சேர்ந்து கொண்டு சமூக ஊடகங்களின் உள்ளடக்கத்தில் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பிரதிநிதித்தல் மூலம் சேர்க்கும் உரையாடல்,', 'ur': 'JTAV: سوسیل میڈیا منڈوبی منڈوبی معلومات کی تعلیم کی جگہ لکھنے کے ذریعہ، اکوسٹیک اور دکھانے والی معلومات کے ذریعہ', 'uz': 'JTAV: Tashqi matn, Acoustic va Koʻrinadigan xususiyatlar bilan birlashtirish', 'vi': 'Tập tin về phương tiện truyền thông xã hội phát triển cùng nhau qua ảnh hưởng âm thanh, âm tính và hình thức', 'da': 'JTAV: Fælles læring af repræsentation af indhold på sociale medier ved at fusionere tekstuelle, akustiske og visuelle funktioner', 'nl': 'JTAV: Samen leren vertegenwoordiging van sociale media door tekstuele, akoestische en visuele kenmerken te fuseren', 'bg': 'Съвместно изучаване на представяне на съдържание в социалните медии чрез сливане на текстови, акустични и визуални характеристики', 'de': 'JTAV: Gemeinsames Lernen der Repräsentation von Social Media Inhalten durch Verschmelzung textueller, akustischer und visueller Merkmale', 'id': 'JTAV: Perwakilan Konten Media Sosial Belajar Bersama-sama oleh Fusing Textual, Acoustic, dan Visual Features', 'fa': 'JTAV: با همراه آموزش محتوای رسانه اجتماعی توسط فشار Textual, Acoustic and Visual Features', 'hr': 'JTAV: Zajednički predstavljanje sadržaja društvenih medija fušenjem tekstualnih, akustičnih i vizuelnih karaktera', 'sw': 'paper size', 'ko': 'JTAV: 텍스트, 음성, 시각적 특징을 융합시켜 소셜 미디어 내용 표시를 함께 학습한다.', 'af': 'JTAV: Soziale Media Inhoud voorstel by Fusing Textual, Acoustic and Visual Features', 'tr': 'JTAV: Jointly Learning Social Media Content Representation by Fusing Textual, Acoustic, and Visual Features', 'sq': 'JTAV: Mëson së bashku përmbajtjen e medias sociale nga Fusing Textual, Acoustic dhe Visual Features', 'am': 'JTAV: ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ Content Representation by Fusing Textual, Acoustic and Visual Features', 'az': 'JTAV: Sosyal Media Content Representation by Fusing Textual, Acoustic and Visual Features', 'bn': 'জেটাভি: সামাজিক মিডিয়া বিষয়বস্তুর প্রতিনিধি যোগ দিয়ে যোগ দিয়েছে প্রতিনিধি', 'ca': 'JTAV: Jointly Learning Social Media Content Representation by Fusing Textual, Acoustic, and Visual Features', 'et': 'JTAV: ühiselt õppida sotsiaalmeedia sisu esindamist, ühendades tekstilised, akustilised ja visuaalsed omadused', 'fi': 'JTAV: Yhteisessä oppimisessa sosiaalisen median sisällönedustusta yhdistämällä tekstilliset, akustiset ja visuaaliset ominaisuudet', 'hy': 'ՋՏԱՎ. Միասնական սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պարունակությունը սովորելու միջոցով', 'bs': 'JTAV: Zajednički predstavljanje sadržaja socijalnih medija fušenjem tekstualnih, akustičnih i vizuelnih karaktera', 'cs': 'JTAV: Společné učení reprezentace obsahu sociálních médií spojením textových, akustických a vizuálních prvků', 'he': 'JTAV: ללמוד יחד תוכן מדיה חברתית מייצג על ידי Fusing Textual, Acoustic, and Visual Features', 'jv': 'jTaV: Joinly Learning Media Content representation by Fsing textual, aceastic, and Visual Attributions', 'sk': 'JTAV: Skupno učenje predstavljanja vsebin družbenih medijev z združevanjem besedilnih, akustičnih in vizualnih funkcij', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'JTAV: ཆ་མཐུན་གྱིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ནང་དུ་Fusing Textual, Acoustic and Visual Features Representation་གིས་'}
{'en': 'Learning social media content is the basis of many real-world applications, including information retrieval and recommendation systems, among others. In contrast with previous works that focus mainly on single modal or bi-modal learning, we propose to learn social media content by fusing jointly textual, acoustic, and visual information (JTAV). Effective strategies are proposed to extract fine-grained features of each modality, that is, attBiGRU and DCRNN. We also introduce cross-modal fusion and attentive pooling techniques to integrate multi-modal information comprehensively. Extensive experimental evaluation conducted on real-world datasets demonstrate our proposed model outperforms the state-of-the-art approaches by a large margin.', 'ar': 'يعد تعلم محتوى الوسائط الاجتماعية أساسًا للعديد من تطبيقات العالم الحقيقي ، بما في ذلك استرجاع المعلومات وأنظمة التوصية ، من بين أمور أخرى. على عكس الأعمال السابقة التي تركز بشكل أساسي على التعلم الفردي أو ثنائي الوسائط ، نقترح تعلم محتوى الوسائط الاجتماعية من خلال دمج المعلومات النصية والصوتية والمرئية (JTAV) بشكل مشترك. تم اقتراح استراتيجيات فعالة لاستخراج الميزات الدقيقة لكل طريقة ، أي attBiGRU و DCRNN. نقدم أيضًا تقنيات الانصهار عبر الوسائط والتجميع اليقظ لدمج المعلومات متعددة الوسائط بشكل شامل. يوضح التقييم التجريبي المكثف الذي تم إجراؤه على مجموعات البيانات الواقعية أن نموذجنا المقترح يتفوق على أحدث الأساليب بهامش كبير.', 'pt': 'Aprender conteúdo de mídia social é a base de muitas aplicações do mundo real, incluindo recuperação de informações e sistemas de recomendação, entre outros. Em contraste com trabalhos anteriores que se concentram principalmente no aprendizado modal único ou bimodal, propomos aprender conteúdo de mídia social fundindo informações textuais, acústicas e visuais (JTAV) conjuntamente. Estratégias eficazes são propostas para extrair características de granulação fina de cada modalidade, ou seja, attBiGRU e DCRNN. Também introduzimos a fusão multimodal e técnicas de agrupamento atencioso para integrar informações multimodais de forma abrangente. Extensa avaliação experimental realizada em conjuntos de dados do mundo real demonstram que nosso modelo proposto supera as abordagens de última geração por uma grande margem.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage du contenu des réseaux sociaux est la base de nombreuses applications du monde réel, y compris les systèmes de recherche d'informations et de recommandation, entre autres. Contrairement aux travaux précédents qui se concentrent principalement sur l'apprentissage monomodal ou bi-modal, nous proposons d'apprendre le contenu des réseaux sociaux en fusionnant conjointement des informations textuelles, acoustiques et visuelles (JTAV). Des stratégies efficaces sont proposées pour extraire les caractéristiques fines de chaque modalité, c'est-à-dire AttBigRU et DCRNN. Nous introduisons également des techniques de fusion intermodale et de mise en commun attentive pour intégrer les informations multimodales de manière globale. Une évaluation expérimentale approfondie menée sur des ensembles de données du monde réel démontre que notre modèle proposé surpasse largement les approches de pointe.", 'es': 'El aprendizaje del contenido de las redes sociales es la base de muchas aplicaciones del mundo real, incluidos los sistemas de recuperación de información y recomendación, entre otros. A diferencia de trabajos anteriores que se centran principalmente en el aprendizaje monomodal o bimodal, proponemos aprender el contenido de las redes sociales mediante la fusión conjunta de información textual, acústica y visual (JTAV). Se proponen estrategias eficaces para extraer características detalladas de cada modalidad, es decir, AttBigRU y DCRNN. También introducimos técnicas de fusión intermodal y agrupación atenta para integrar la información multimodal de manera integral. La amplia evaluación experimental realizada en conjuntos de datos del mundo real demuestra que nuestro modelo propuesto supera en gran medida a los enfoques más avanzados.', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアコンテンツを学習することは、情報検索や推奨システムなどを含む多くの現実世界のアプリケーションの基礎です。主に単一のモーダルまたはバイモーダル学習に焦点を当てたこれまでの作品とは対照的に、テキスト、音響、視覚情報（ JTAV ）を共同で融合することで、ソーシャルメディアコンテンツを学習することを提案している。各モダリティ、すなわちattBiGRU及びDCRNNの細かい特徴を抽出するための効果的な戦略が提案される。また、マルチモーダル情報を総合的に統合するためのクロスモーダル融合と注意深いプーリング技術も導入しています。現実のデータセットで実施された広範な実験的評価は、提案されているモデルが最先端のアプローチを大幅に上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '学社交媒体者,世应用程序之基,信息检索荐之统也。 比之前主模态双模态之作,建议融合,声学视息(JTAV)以习社交媒体义。 有效之策,以取模态之细粒度,即attBiGRU、DCRNN也。 引入跨模态融合细心池化术,以周整合多模态信息。 广真实世界数集实验评估,先最先进者善。', 'ru': 'Изучение контента социальных сетей является основой многих реальных приложений, включая, в частности, системы поиска информации и рекомендации. В отличие от предыдущих работ, которые фокусируются в основном на одномодальном или двухмодальном обучении, мы предлагаем изучать контент социальных сетей, объединяя совместно текстовую, акустическую и визуальную информацию (JTAV). Предложены эффективные стратегии извлечения мелкозернистых признаков каждой модальности, то есть attBiGRU и DCRNN. Мы также внедряем методы кросс-модального слияния и внимательного объединения для комплексной интеграции мультимодальной информации. Обширная экспериментальная оценка, проведенная на реальных наборах данных, демонстрирует, что предлагаемая нами модель значительно превосходит современные подходы.', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया सामग्री सीखना कई वास्तविक दुनिया के अनुप्रयोगों का आधार है, जिसमें सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति और सिफारिश प्रणाली शामिल हैं, दूसरों के बीच। पिछले कार्यों के विपरीत जो मुख्य रूप से एकल मोडल या द्वि-मोडल सीखने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, हम संयुक्त रूप से पाठ्य, ध्वनिक और दृश्य जानकारी (जेटीएवी) को फ्यूज करके सोशल मीडिया सामग्री सीखने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रभावी रणनीतियों को प्रत्येक रूपरेखा की बारीक विशेषताओं को निकालने के लिए प्रस्तावित किया गया है, अर्थात्, attBiGRU और DCRNN। हम बहु-मोडल जानकारी को व्यापक रूप से एकीकृत करने के लिए क्रॉस-मोडल संलयन और चौकस पूलिंग तकनीकों को भी पेश करते हैं। वास्तविक दुनिया के डेटासेट पर किए गए व्यापक प्रयोगात्मक मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारे प्रस्तावित मॉडल एक बड़े अंतर से अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों को मात देते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá foghlaim ábhar meáin shóisialta mar bhunús le go leor feidhmchláir fhíorshaolacha, lena n-áirítear aisghabháil faisnéise agus córais mholta, i measc daoine eile. I gcodarsnacht le saothair roimhe seo a dhíríonn go príomha ar fhoghlaim mhódúil aonair nó dhémhódúil, tá sé beartaithe againn ábhar meán sóisialta a fhoghlaim trí fhaisnéis théacsúil, fhuaimiúil agus amhairc (JTAV) a chomhcheangal. Moltar straitéisí éifeachtacha chun gnéithe mínghlana a bhaint as gach modhúlacht, is é sin, attBiGRU agus DCRNN. Tugaimid isteach freisin teicnící comhleá trasmhódúla agus comhthiomsaithe aireach chun faisnéis ilmhódúil a chomhtháthú go cuimsitheach. Léiríonn measúnú turgnamhach fairsing a rinneadh ar thacair shonraí an fhíorshaol go sáraíonn ár múnla molta na cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha go mór.', 'hu': 'A közösségi média tartalmak tanulása számos valós alkalmazás alapja, beleértve többek között az információvisszakereső és ajánlási rendszereket. A korábbi munkákkal ellentétben, amelyek elsősorban az egymodális vagy bimodális tanulásra összpontosítanak, a közösségi média tartalmak tanulását javasoljuk szöveges, akusztikus és vizuális információk (JTAV) egyesítésével. Hatékony stratégiákat javasolnak az egyes módszerek finomszemcsés jellemzőinek kivonására, azaz attBiGRU és DCRNN. Emellett bevezetjük a multimodális információk átfogó integrációját célzó multimodális fúziós technikákat és figyelmes összevonási technikákat. A valós adatkészleteken végzett kiterjedt kísérleti értékelések azt mutatják, hogy javasolt modellünk nagy mértékben felülmúlja a korszerű megközelítéseket.', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση περιεχομένου κοινωνικών μέσων αποτελεί τη βάση πολλών εφαρμογών πραγματικού κόσμου, συμπεριλαμβανομένων συστημάτων ανάκτησης πληροφοριών και συστάσεων, μεταξύ άλλων. Σε αντίθεση με προηγούμενα έργα που επικεντρώνονται κυρίως στην ενιαία ή αμφίδρομη μάθηση, προτείνουμε να μάθουμε περιεχόμενο κοινωνικών μέσων συνδυάζοντας από κοινού κειμενικές, ακουστικές και οπτικές πληροφορίες (JTAV). Προτείνονται αποτελεσματικές στρατηγικές για την εξαγωγή λεπτόκοκκων χαρακτηριστικών κάθε τρόπου, δηλαδή, attBiGRU και DCRNN. Επίσης εισάγουμε τεχνικές διασύνδεσης και προσεκτικής συγκέντρωσης για την ολοκληρωμένη ενσωμάτωση των πολυμορφικών πληροφοριών. Η εκτεταμένη πειραματική αξιολόγηση που διεξήχθη σε σύνολα δεδομένων του πραγματικού κόσμου αποδεικνύει ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά κατά μεγάλο βαθμό τις σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში შესახებ იყო მრავალური მსოფლიო პროგრამების ბაზი, რომელიც ინფორმაციის მიღება და მოწყვების სისტემის შესახებ. პირველი სამუშაო, რომელიც ერთი მოდიალური ან ორი მოდიალური სწავლებისთვის კონტაქტირებულია, ჩვენ მინდა სოციალური მედიალური ინფორმაციის შესახებ გავისწავლათ, ერთადერთად ტექსტულური, აკ ეფექტიური სტრატიგიები იყენება, რომ ყველა მოდიალობის, რაც attBiGRU და DCRNN-ის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ასევე შევცვალოთ მრავალური მოდიალური ფუზიცია და დააყენებელი ტექნოგიები, რომ მრავალური მოდიალური ინფორმაცია ყველაფერად ინტერგურაცით. განსაზღვრებული ექსპერიმენტიური განსაზღვრება, რომელიც რეალური მსოფლიოს მონაცემებით გავაკეთებულია ჩვენი მოდელის მოდელის უფრო გავაკეთება მსოფლიოს შესაძლებლობას', 'it': "L'apprendimento dei contenuti dei social media è alla base di molte applicazioni del mondo reale, tra cui i sistemi di recupero delle informazioni e di raccomandazione, tra gli altri. A differenza dei lavori precedenti che si concentrano principalmente sull'apprendimento monomodale o bimodale, proponiamo di apprendere i contenuti dei social media fondendo congiuntamente informazioni testuali, acustiche e visive (JTAV). Vengono proposte strategie efficaci per estrarre le caratteristiche a grana fine di ogni modalità, cioè attBiGRU e DCRNN. Introduciamo anche la fusione transmodale e tecniche attente di pooling per integrare in modo completo le informazioni multimodali. Un'ampia valutazione sperimentale condotta su set di dati reali dimostra che il nostro modello proposto supera di gran lunga gli approcci all'avanguardia.", 'lt': 'Mokymasis socialinės žiniasklaidos turiniu yra daugelio realaus pasaulio programų, įskaitant informacijos gavimo ir rekomendavimo sistemas, pagrindas. In contrast with previous works that focus mainly on single modal or bi-modal learning, we propose to learn social media content by fusing jointly textual, acoustic, and visual information (JTAV).  Siūlomos veiksmingos strategijos, skirtos ištraukti kiekvieno būdo, t. y. attBiGRU ir DCRNN, smulkių grūdų savybes. Taip pat diegiame įvairiarūšio transporto sintezės ir atidžiai sujungimo metodus siekiant visapusiškai integruoti daugiarūšio transporto informaciją. Išsamus eksperimentinis realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkinių vertinimas rodo, kad mūsų pasiūlytas modelis daug geriausiai vertina pažangiausius metodus.', 'kk': 'Социалдық медиа мазмұнын үйрену - бірнеше әлемдегі қолданбалардың негізі, мәліметті алу және рекомендациялау жүйелерін, басқалардың арасында. Алдыңғы жұмыстың қарсы бір модалдық немесе екі модалдық оқытуға көмектесетін жұмыстың мазмұнын біріктіру, акустикалық және визуалдық мәліметтерді (JTAV) біріктіріп, социалдық медиақшаларды Эффективтік стратегиялар әрбір модельдің, т. е. attBiGRU және DCRNN, қарапайым қасиеттерін тарқату үшін қолданылады. Біз сондай-ақ бірнеше модалдық мәліметті толық біріктіру үшін бірнеше модалдық біріктіру және тәртіпсіздік біріктіру техникаларын келтіреміз. Шын әлемді деректер қорларында жасалған эксперименталдық оқиғалардың кеңейтілген үлкен үлгісін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Учењето на социјалните медиуми е основа на многу реални апликации, вклучувајќи ги и системите за собирање информации и препораки, меѓу другите. За разлика од претходните дела кои се фокусираат главно на единствено модално или бимодално учење, предлагаме да се научи социјалните медиуми со заедничка фузија на текстуални, акустички и визуелни информации (ЈТАВ). Ефективни стратегии се предложени за извлекување на фини карактеристики од секој модел, тоа е attBiGRU и DCRNN. Ние, исто така, воведуваме крстомодална фузија и внимателни техники на спојување за целосно интегрирање на мултимодалните информации. Експерименталната експериментална проценка спроведена на базите на податоци на реалниот свет покажува дека нашиот предложен модел ги надминува најсовремените пристапи со голема маргина.', 'ms': 'Mempelajari kandungan media sosial adalah dasar banyak aplikasi dunia nyata, termasuk sistem pemulihan maklumat dan rekomendasi, antara lain. Sebaliknya dengan kerja-kerja sebelumnya yang fokus terutamanya pada pembelajaran modal tunggal atau bi-modal, kami cadangkan untuk belajar kandungan media sosial dengan menggabungkan bersama maklumat tekstual, akustik, dan visual (JTAV). Strategi yang berkesan diusulkan untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri-ciri-ciri ganda setiap modaliti, iaitu attBiGRU dan DCRNN. Kami juga memperkenalkan teknik fusi transmodal dan pengumpulan perhatian untuk mengintegrasikan maklumat multi modal secara keseluruhan. Evaluasi eksperimen luas yang dilakukan pada set data dunia nyata menunjukkan model kami yang direncanakan melampaui pendekatan state-of-the-art dengan margin besar.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн хэвлэлийн бүтээгдэхүүнийг сурах нь олон бодит ертөнцийн хэрэглээний суурь юм. Мэдээлэл авах, зөвлөлтийн системүүд, бусад хүмүүсийн хооронд. Өмнөх үйл явцуудын эсрэг ихэвчлэн нэг загвар, хоёр загвар суралцах үйл явц дээр анхаарлаа бид нийгмийн медиа агууллагуудыг textual, acoustic, visual information (JTAV) цуглуулж суралцах хэрэгтэй. Эффективны стратеги нь загвар бүрийн цэвэрхэн жимс хэмжээсүүдийг татаж авахын тулд санал болдог. Бид мөн олон загварын мэдээллийг бүрэн нэгтгэхэд олон загварын цуглуулах болон ухаантай цуглуулах техникуудыг илтгэдэг. Бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн санд хийгдсэн өргөн туршилтын шалгалт нь бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн загвараас илүү том загвараар урлагийн тусламжийг дамжуулдаг.', 'ml': 'മറ്റുള്ളവരുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ശേഖരിക്കുന്നതും ശുപാര്\u200dശ സിസ്റ്റമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നതും കൂടുതല്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോ മുമ്പുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ വിരോധത്തില്\u200d, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു മോഡലോ ബി-മോഡാല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരുമിച്ച് ടെക്സ്കൂ എല്ലാ രീതിയിലും നല്ല കിട്ടിയ സ്വഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായോഗിക്കുന്ന പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു ക്രിസ്മോഡല്\u200d ഫ്യൂഷനും ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന പൂലിംഗ് സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളും നമ്മള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പല മോഡിയല്\u200d വിവരങ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കപ്പെട്ട പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച ഒരു വലിയ മാര', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim tal-kontenut tal-midja soċjali huwa l-bażi ta’ ħafna applikazzjonijiet fid-dinja reali, inklużi sistemi ta’ ġbir ta’ informazzjoni u rakkomandazzjonijiet, fost oħrajn. B’kuntrast max-xogħlijiet preċedenti li jiffukaw l-aktar fuq tagħlim modali wieħed jew bi-modali, qed nipproponu li jitgħallmu l-kontenut tal-midja soċjali billi niffużaw flimkien l-informazzjoni testwali, akustika u viżiva (JTAV). Huma proposti strateġiji effettivi biex jiġu estratti karatteristiċi tal-ħbub fin ta’ kull modalità, jiġifieri attBiGRU u DCRNN. Aħna nintroduċu wkoll tekniki ta’ fużjoni transmodali u ta’ raggruppament attent biex nintegraw l-informazzjoni multimodali b’mod komprensiv. Evalwazzjoni esperimentali estensiva mwettqa fuq settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali turi li l-mudell propost tagħna jirriżulta mill-approċċi l-aktar avvanzati b’marġini kbir.', 'pl': 'Nauka treści mediów społecznościowych jest podstawą wielu aplikacji realnych, w tym m.in. systemów pobierania informacji i rekomendacji. W przeciwieństwie do poprzednich prac koncentrujących się głównie na pojedynczym modalnym lub bi-modalnym uczeniu się, proponujemy naukę treści mediów społecznościowych poprzez łączenie wspólnie informacji tekstowych, akustycznych i wizualnych (JTAV). Proponowane są skuteczne strategie wydobycia drobnoziarnistych cech każdej modalności, czyli attBiGRU i DCRNN. Wprowadzamy również multimodalne techniki fuzji i uważnego łączenia w celu kompleksowej integracji informacji multimodalnych. Obszerna eksperymentalna ocena przeprowadzona na rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazuje, że proponowany model znacznie przewyższa najnowocześniejsze podejścia.', 'ro': 'Învățarea conținutului social media este baza multor aplicații din lumea reală, inclusiv sistemele de recuperare a informațiilor și recomandare, printre altele. Spre deosebire de lucrările anterioare care se concentrează în principal pe învățarea modală unică sau bimodală, propunem să învățăm conținutul social media prin fuziunea comună a informațiilor textuale, acustice și vizuale (JTAV). Sunt propuse strategii eficiente pentru extragerea caracteristicilor fine ale fiecărei modalități, adică atBiGRU și DCRNN. De asemenea, introducem fuziunea transmodală și tehnici atente de punere în comun pentru a integra informațiile multimodale în mod cuprinzător. Evaluarea experimentală extinsă efectuată pe seturi de date din lumea reală demonstrează că modelul nostru propus depășește abordările de ultimă generație cu o marjă mare.', 'sr': 'Naučenje sadržaja društvenih medija je osnova mnogih realnih aplikacija, uključujući sisteme prikupljanja informacija i preporuke, među drugim. U suprotnosti sa prethodnim radovima koji se fokusiraju uglavnom na jedno modalno ili dvomodalno učenje, predlažemo naučiti sadržaj društvenih medija zajedno zajedno sa tekstualnim, akustičnim i vizualnim informacijama (JTAV). Предлагају се ефективне стратегије да изваде сваку моделност, т.е. attBiGRU и DCRNN. Također predstavljamo i međumodalnu fuziju i pažljive tehnike okupljanja za integraciju multimodalnih informacija u sveobuhvatnosti. Eksperimentalna procjena provedena na podacima realnog sveta pokazuje da naš predloženi model iznosi državni pristup umjetnosti velikom marginom.', 'no': 'Læring av sosiale media-innhaldet er grunnlag av mange verdsprogrammer, inkludert informasjonshenting og anbefalingssystemar, mellom andre. I contrast with previous works that focus mainly on single modal or bi-modal learning, we propose to learn social media content by fusing joint textual, acoustic and visual information (JTAV). Effektiv strategiar er foreslått for å pakka ut fin-korn funksjonar av kvar modalitet, dvs. attBiGRU og DCRNN. Vi introduserer også krysmodal fusjon og attentive pooling-teknikk for å integrere fleire modal informasjon komplett. Ekstra eksperimentelt evaluering gjennomført på verkelege datasett viser at vår foreslått modell utfører tilstanden til kunsten ved ein stor margin.', 'sv': 'Att lära sig innehåll i sociala medier är grunden för många verkliga applikationer, bland annat informationshämtning och rekommendationssystem. I motsats till tidigare verk som främst fokuserar på enkelmodalt eller bimodalt lärande föreslår vi att lära oss innehåll i sociala medier genom att kombinera text, akustisk och visuell information (JTAV). Effektiva strategier föreslås för att extrahera finkorniga egenskaper hos varje modalitet, det vill säga attBiGRU och DCRNN. Vi introducerar också tvärmodal fusion och uppmärksam poolningsteknik för att integrera multimodal information på ett heltäckande sätt. Omfattande experimentell utvärdering utförd på verkliga datauppsättningar visar att vår föreslagna modell överträffar de senaste tillvägagångssätten med stor marginal.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මිඩියාව සාමාජික අවස්ථාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ඇත්ත ලෝක විශ්වාස යොදාගන්න, තොරතුරු  මුලින්ම වැඩකට ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් එක්ක මොඩ ප්\u200dරභාවිත සාධාරණාත්මක සැලසුම් හැම ප්\u200dරමාණයෙක්ම පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන්. අපි සමහරවිරුද්ධ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ අවධානය සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න. ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සේට් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා අප', 'so': 'Waxbarashada macluumaadka bulshada ayaa ku saleysan codsiyada caalamiga ah oo badan, kuwaas oo ka mid ah nidaamka helitaanka macluumaadka iyo hagitaanka. Isku xiriirta shuqullada hore oo si gaar ah u fiirsashada hal qaab ama mid-qaab ah, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan barto wax ku qoran macluumaadka bulshada, si wadajir ah u fududayno qoraalka, dhamaanka iyo macluumaadka aragga (JTAV). Qorshooyinka waxqabadka ah waxaa la soo jeedaa in la soo saaro qalab kasta oo wanaagsan, taas oo ah attBiGRU iyo DCRNN. We also introduce cross-modal fusion and attentive pooling techniques to integrate multi-modal information comprehensively.  Qiimeynta baaritaanka dheer ee lagu sameeyay sawirada runta ah ee adduunka ayaa muujiya modelkeeni la soo jeeday inuu sameeyo qaabab aad u weyn oo u soo jeeda xaaladda farshaxanka.', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகங்களின் உள்ளடக்கங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்வது பல உண்மையான உலக பயன்பாடுகளின் அடிப்படை முந்தைய செயல்களுடன் முதலில் ஒரு மாதிரி அல்லது பி மாதிரி கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறையாக இருக்கும் வேலைகளுடன் மாறுபட்டால், நாம் சேர்ந்து நிரல், மாற்ற ஒவ்வொரு வகையிலும் நன்றாக கிடைக்கப்பட்ட தன்முகங்களை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்படுகிறது, attBiGRU மற்றும் DCRNN. பல-modal தகவலை முழுமையாக ஒன்று சேர்க்க முடியும் முயற்சிக்கும் தொழில்நுட்பத்தை நாம் கூறுகிறோம். உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களில் செயல்படுத்தப்பட்ட விரிவான பரிசோதனையின் மதிப்புரை', 'ur': 'سوسیلی میڈیا موجود کی تعلیم کی تعلیم بہت سی حقیقی دنیاوی کاربریوں کی بنیاد ہے، جیسے اطلاعات اٹھانے اور سفارش سیستموں کے ساتھ۔ اگلے کاموں کے مقابلہ میں جو اکثر ایک موڈال یا دوم موڈال کی تعلیم پر تمرکز کرتی ہیں، ہم نے سوسیل میڈیا کی منصوبات کی تعلیم لینے کی پیشنهاد کرتی ہیں کہ ایک ساتھ تفصیل, آکوسٹی اور دیدھی معلومات (JTAV) کو جمع کریں۔ اثرات استراتژی کی پیشنهاد کی جاتی ہے کہ ہر موڈلی کی پاکیزہ اندھیری ویژگی نکالیں، یعنی attBiGRU اور DCRNN۔ ہم نے بہت سی موڈل معلومات کو جمع کرنے کے لئے مختلف موڈل فوجین اور مواظب پولینگ ٹیکنیک کو معلوم کیا ہے۔ حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ پر عمدہ آزمائش کی گھیری آزمائش دکھائی جاتی ہے کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدل ایک بڑی مرز کے ذریعہ سے آزمائش کی موجود کو اضافہ کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Oldingi ish bilan boshqa bir modal yoki bir modal o'rganishga qarshi mumkin, biz birlashtirilgan texnologiya, acoustic, va ko'rinish haqida maʼlumotni olishni davom qilamiz. @ info We also introduce cross-modal fusion and attentive pooling techniques to integrate multi-modal information comprehensively.  Mavjud dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi kengaytirish muvaffaqiyatlarini ko'rsatish mumkin. Bu katta harfda ishlatilgan modelimizning davlat sohasini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Học nội dung truyền thông xã hội là cơ sở của nhiều ứng dụng trên thế giới thực, bao gồm cả hệ thống thu thập thông tin và tiến cử. Tương đối với những tác phẩm trước đây chủ yếu tập trung vào việc học theo phương thức đơn hay hai phương tiện, chúng tôi đề nghị học nội dung truyền thông xã hội bằng cách kết hợp kết cấu, âm thanh và hình ảnh (JTWA). Sẽ có chiến lược hiệu quả để trích xuất các chi tiết sắc đẹp của mỗi chiều, tức là, attBiGRU và DCRNN. Chúng tôi cũng áp dụng các phương pháp khác nhau và cẩn thận hợp hồ sơ để thông tin đa phương. Sự thử nghiệm dồi dào được thực hiện trên các tập tin trên thế giới thực chứng minh mẫu thử nghiệm của chúng tôi hoàn thành các phương pháp hiện đại.', 'da': 'Læring af indhold på sociale medier er grundlaget for mange virkelige applikationer, herunder informationssøgnings- og anbefalingssystemer, blandt andre. I modsætning til tidligere værker, der hovedsageligt fokuserer på enkeltmodal eller bimodal læring, foreslår vi at lære indhold på sociale medier ved at sammensætte tekst-, akustisk- og visuel information (JTAV). Effektive strategier foreslås for at udtrække finkornede træk af hver modalitet, det vil sige attBiGRU og DCRNN. Vi indfører også tværmodal fusion og opmærksomme poolingsteknikker for at integrere multimodal information i en omfattende grad. Omfattende eksperimentel evaluering udført på virkelige datasæt viser, at vores foreslåede model overgår de nyeste tilgange med stor margin.', 'hr': 'Naučenje sadržaja društvenih medija je osnova mnogih primjena u stvarnom svijetu, uključujući sustave prikupljanja informacija i preporuke, među ostalima. U suprotnosti s prethodnim radovima koji se fokusiraju uglavnom na jedno modalno ili dvomodalno učenje, predlažemo naučiti sadržaj društvenih medija zajedno zajedno zajedno tekstualne, akustične i vizualne informacije (JTAV). Predložene su učinkovite strategije za izvlačenje zgodnih karakteristika svakog modaliteta, tj. attBiGRU i DCRNN. Također predstavljamo međumodalnu fuziju i pažljive tehnike skupljanja kako bi se sveobuhvatno integrirali multimodalne informacije. Provećana eksperimentalna procjena provedena na podacima stvarnog svijeta pokazuje da naš predloženi model nadmašuje pristupe države umjetnosti velikom marginom.', 'nl': 'Het leren van social media content is de basis van veel real-world toepassingen, waaronder informatie retrieval en aanbevelingssystemen, onder andere. In tegenstelling tot eerdere werken die voornamelijk gericht zijn op single modal of bi-modal leren, stellen we voor om social media content te leren door gezamenlijk tekstuele, akoestische en visuele informatie (JTAV) te fuseren. Effectieve strategieën worden voorgesteld om fijnkorrelige kenmerken van elke modaliteit te extraheren, dat wil zeggen attBiGRU en DCRNN. We introduceren ook crossmodale fusie en attente pooling technieken om multimodale informatie volledig te integreren. Uitgebreide experimentele evaluaties uitgevoerd op real-world datasets tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model de state-of-the-art benaderingen met een grote marge overtreft.', 'de': 'Das Erlernen von Social-Media-Inhalten ist die Grundlage vieler realer Anwendungen, einschließlich Informationsabruf- und Empfehlungssysteme, unter anderem. Im Gegensatz zu früheren Arbeiten, die sich hauptsächlich auf das einzelne modale oder bi-modale Lernen konzentrieren, schlagen wir vor, Social Media Inhalte zu lernen, indem wir textuelle, akustische und visuelle Informationen (JTAV) miteinander verbinden. Effektive Strategien werden vorgeschlagen, um feinkörnige Merkmale jeder Modalität zu extrahieren, das heißt attBiGRU und DCRNN. Wir führen auch crossmodale Fusion und aufmerksame Pooling-Techniken ein, um multimodale Informationen umfassend zu integrieren. Umfangreiche experimentelle Auswertungen an realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell die aktuellen Ansätze deutlich übertrifft.', 'ko': '소셜 미디어 내용을 배우는 것은 많은 실제 응용의 기초로 정보 검색과 추천 시스템 등을 포함한다.단일모드나 이중모드 학습에 초점을 맞춘 기존의 작업과 달리 텍스트, 소리, 시각정보(JTAV)를 융합해 소셜미디어 콘텐츠를 배울 것을 제안한다.각 모드의 세립도 특징, 즉attBiGRU와 DCRNN을 추출하는 효과적인 전략을 제시했다.우리는 또한 다중모드 융합과 주의탱크 기술을 도입하여 다중모드 정보를 종합적으로 집적했다.실제 데이터 집합에서 진행된 대량의 실험 평가에 의하면 우리가 제시한 모델은 어느 정도에 가장 선진적인 방법보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'id': 'Mempelajari konten media sosial adalah dasar dari banyak aplikasi dunia nyata, termasuk sistem penemuan informasi dan rekomendasi, diantara lainnya. Sebaliknya dengan pekerjaan sebelumnya yang fokus terutama pada belajar modal tunggal atau bi-modal, kami mengusulkan untuk belajar isi media sosial dengan menggabungkan bersama informasi tekstual, akustik, dan visual (JTAV). Strategi efektif diusulkan untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri gandum dari setiap modalitas, yaitu attBiGRU dan DCRNN. We also introduce cross-modal fusion and attentive pooling techniques to integrate multi-modal information comprehensively.  Evaluasi eksperimen luas yang dilakukan pada set data dunia nyata menunjukkan model kami yang diusulkan lebih berharga dari pendekatan state-of-the-art dengan margin besar.', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن محتوای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی بنیاد بسیاری از کاربردهای دنیای واقعی است، شامل سیستم\u200cهای بازیابی و پیشنهاد اطلاعات، بین دیگر. در مقابل کارهای قبلی که بیشتر روی یک یادگیری modal یا دو modal تمرکز می کنند، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم که محتوای رسانه های اجتماعی را با جمع کردن اطلاعات متن، آکوستیک و دیده (JTAV) یاد بگیریم. استراتژی\u200cهای تاثیر پیشنهاد می\u200cشود که ویژگی\u200cهای دانه\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای از هر روش، یعنی attBiGRU و DCRNN خارج کنند. ما همچنین تکنیک\u200cهای جمع کردن متوسط مدال و مواظب توجه را برای جمع اطلاعات متوسط متوسط معرفی می\u200cکنیم. ارزیابی آزمایش زیادی که روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای دنیای واقعی انجام می\u200cشود نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل پیشنهاد ما با یک مرز بزرگ به نزدیک وضعیت هنر برسد.', 'bg': 'Ученето на съдържание в социалните медии е в основата на много приложения от реалния свят, включително системи за извличане на информация и препоръки, наред с други. За разлика от предишни произведения, които се фокусират главно върху едномодално или двумодално обучение, предлагаме да се научи съдържание в социалните медии чрез сливане на съвместна текстова, акустична и визуална информация. Предлагат се ефективни стратегии за извличане на фино зърнести характеристики на всеки модал, т.е. атБиГРУ и DCRNN. Също така въвеждаме междумодален синтез и внимателни техники за обединяване на мултимодалната информация. Обширната експериментална оценка, проведена на набори от данни от реалния свят, демонстрира, че предлаганият модел надминава съвременните подходи с голям марж.', 'sw': 'Kujifunza maudhui ya mitandao ya kijamii ni msingi wa matumizi mengi ya dunia halisi, ikiwa ni pamoja na mfumo wa kupata taarifa na mapendekezo, miongoni mwa wengine. Tofauti na kazi zilizopita ambazo zinalenga hasa juu ya kujifunza kwa njia moja au mbili, tunapendekeza kujifunza maudhui ya mitandao ya kijamii kwa kuifuta taarifa za pamoja za mfumo wa simu, yenye uchunguzi na yenye kuona (JTAV). Mipango yenye ufanisi unapendekezwa kuondoa vipengele vizuri vya kila aina, ambayo ni, attBiGRU na DCRNN. Tunaweza pia kutangaza mbinu za kupambana na upasuaji ili kuunganisha taarifa mbalimbali kwa ujumla. Utafiti mkubwa wa majaribio uliofanywa katika seti za data halisi duniani unaonyesha mtindo wetu wa pendekezo unaonyesha hali ya mambo ya sanaa na marufuku makubwa.', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ማድረግ በተጨማሪው መረጃ ማግኘት እና የመታሰቢያ ስርዓቶች ውስጥ በብዙ አካባቢዎች ላይ መሠረት ነው፡፡ በተለየ፣ በተለየ አንዲት ሞዴል ወይም በቢ-ሞዴል ትምህርት ላይ በሚያስተምሩ ከቀድሞው ሥራ ጋር በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ተቃውሞ የተጠቃሚ ጽሑፍ፣ ማስታወቂያ እና የራእይ መረጃ (JTAV) በመጠቀም እናስመክራለን፡፡ የጥያቄ ስርዓት፣ ይሄ ቢጂሩU እና DCRNN ነው፡፡ ብዙ-modal መረጃዎችን ለመቀነስ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ እውነተኛ ዓለም ዳታዎች ላይ የተደረገው የረጅም ፈተና ማውጣት በተዘጋጀው ሞዴላታችንን በታላቅ ማረፊያ የዓለምን ሥርዓት ግንኙነት የሚያደርግ ነው፡፡', 'af': "Onderleer sosiale media inhoud is die basis van baie reël wêreld toepassings, insluitend inligting ontvang en aanbevelingsstelsels, onder ander. In contrast with previous works that focus mainly on single modal or bi-modal learning, we propose to learn social media content by fusing joint textual, acoustic and visual information (JTAV). Effektiewe strategies word voorgestel om fyn-graad funksies van elke modaliteit uit te trek, dit is, attBiGRU en DCRNN. Ons introduseer ook kruismodaal fuisie en aandaglike pooling teknike om multimodaal inligting kompleksief te integreer. Ekstensiewe eksperimentale evaluering wat op reël-wêreld datastelle gedoen is, vertoon ons voorgestelde model wat die staat-van-kuns-toegang deur 'n groot marge uitvoer.", 'tr': 'Sosial mediýaly maglumatlary öwrenmek aslyndaky dünýäde birnäçe guramlaryň esasy, maglumatlary almak we maslahat sistemalary ýagdaýynda. Öňki işleriň ýagdaýynda modal ýa-da modal öwrenmegi üçin üns berýän eserlerlerlere görä sosial mediýalaryň maksadyny tekst, akustik we görsel maglumatlary birleşerek (JTAV) öwrenmegi teklip berýäris. Etkinlik stratejiýasy her modalitet, attBiGRU we DCRNN, dykkatly atjylyk çykarmak üçin teklip edildi. Biz hem modal birleşme we ünsli birleşme tekniklerini daşarylýarys, çoklu modal maglumatlary dolu şekilde birleştirmek üçin. Gerçek-dünýä veri setirlerinde geçirilen örän denetimli çykyş biziň teklip eden nusgymyzyň uly gabdalyk bilen durumynyň golaýyny çykarýandygyny görkez.', 'az': 'Sosyal media məlumatlarını öyrənmək, digər insanların arasında informasyon alınması və tövsiyə sistemlərinin çoxlu real dünya uyğulamalarının temidir. Əvvəlki işlərə baxmayaraq, çox modal və ya iki modal öyrənməyə odaklanan işlərə baxmayaraq, biz sosyal media içərisində textual, acoustic və visual məlumatları (JTAV) birlikdə birləşdirib öyrənməyi təklif edirik. Efektiv stratejilər hər modaliyyətin, həmçinin attBiGRU və DCRNN tərzlərini çıxartmaq üçün təklif edilir. Biz həmçinin çoxlu modal məlumatları bütün məlumatları birləşdirmək üçün çoxlu modal birləşdirmək və dikkatli birləşdirmək tekniklərini təşkil edirik. Gerçek dünya veri qurularında işlədilən geniş eksperimental değerlendirmək bizim təklif etdiyimiz modelimiz böyük bir margin tərəfindən müəyyən edilən məlumatın yaxınlıqlarını göstərir.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের বিষয়বস্তু শিক্ষা হচ্ছে অনেক বাস্তব বিশ্বের অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের ভিত্তি In contrast with previous works that focus mainly on single modal or bi-modal learning, we propose to learn social media content by fusing jointly textual, acoustic, and visual information (JTAV).  কার্যকর কৌশল প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে প্রত্যেক ধরনের ভালোভাবে গ্রেফতার করা বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং DCRNN। আমরা অনেক মোডাল তথ্য সম্পূর্ণভাবে একত্রিত করার জন্য ক্রস-মডেল ফ্লুশন এবং পুলিং প্রযুক্তির প্রযুক্তি চিহ্নিত করি। বাস্তব বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটগুলোতে অনুষ্ঠিত বিশেষ পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষার মূল্য প্রদর্শন করে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল প্রদর্শন করে একটি বিশাল মা', 'bs': 'Naučenje sadržaja društvenih medija je osnova mnogih primjena u stvarnom svijetu, uključujući sisteme prikupljanja informacija i preporuke, među drugima. U suprotnosti sa prethodnim radovima koji se fokusiraju uglavnom na jedno modalno ili dvomodalno učenje, predlažemo naučiti sadržaj društvenih medija zajedno zajedničkim tekstualnim, akustičnim i vizualnim informacijama (JTAV). Predložene su učinkovite strategije za izvlačenje zgodnih karakteristika svakog modaliteta, to je, attBiGRU i DCRNN. Također predstavljamo međumodalnu fuziju i pažljive tehnike okupljanja za integraciju multimodalnih informacija u sveobuhvatnosti. Eksperimentalna procjena provedena na podacima realnog svijeta pokazuje da naš predloženi model iznosi državne pristupe umjetnosti velikom marginom.', 'sq': 'Learning social media content is the basis of many real-world applications, including information retrieval and recommendation systems, among others.  Në kundërshtim me punët e mëparshme që përqëndrohen kryesisht në mësimin e vetëm modal apo të dy-modal, ne propozojmë të mësojmë përmbajtjen e medias sociale duke bashkuar informacionin tekstual, akustik dhe vizual (JTAV). Strategjitë efektive propozohen për të nxjerrë karakteristika të holla të çdo modaliteti, që është attBiGRU dhe DCRNN. Ne gjithashtu futim teknika të fuzionit ndërmodal dhe bashkimit të vëmendshëm për të integruar informacionin multi modal në mënyrë tërësore. Vlerësimi eksperimental i zgjeruar i kryer në grupet e të dhënave të botës reale demonstron se modeli ynë i propozuar përfundon me një margin të madh qasjet më të larta.', 'ca': "Aprendre continguts dels mitjans socials és la base de moltes aplicacions del món real, incloent els sistemes de recuperació d'informació i recomanació, entre altres. Contrariament a treballs anteriors centrats principalment en l'aprenentatge únic modal o bi-modal, proposem aprendre continguts dels mitjans socials fusionant conjuntament informació textual, acústica i visual (JTAV). S'proponen estratègies eficaces per extreure les característiques fines de cada modalitat, és a dir, attBiGRU i DCRNN. També introduïm tècniques de fusió transmodal i d'agrupament atent per integrar la informació multi modal de manera completa. Una extensa evaluació experimental feta en conjunts de dades del món real demostra que el nostre model proposat supera els enfocaments més avançats en gran marge.", 'cs': 'Učení se obsahu sociálních médií je základem mnoha reálných aplikací, mimo jiné včetně systémů vyhledávání informací a doporučení. Na rozdíl od předchozích prací, které se zaměřují především na jednotlivé modální nebo bimodální učení, navrhujeme učit se obsah sociálních médií spojením textových, akustických a vizuálních informací (JTAV). Jsou navrženy efektivní strategie pro extrakci jemnozrnných rysů každé modality, tj. attBiGRU a DCRNN. Představujeme také multimodální fúzi a techniky pozorného sdružování pro komplexní integraci multimodálních informací. Rozsáhlé experimentální vyhodnocení provedené na reálných datových sadách ukazuje, že náš navrhovaný model výrazně překonává moderní přístupy.', 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia sisu õppimine on paljude reaalmaailma rakenduste, sealhulgas muu hulgas teabe hankimise ja soovitussüsteemide alus. Erinevalt varasematest töödest, mis keskenduvad peamiselt ühe- või bi-modaalsele õppele, teeme ettepaneku õppida sotsiaalmeedia sisu, ühendades ühiselt teksti-, akustilise ja visuaalse informatsiooni (JTAV). Pakutakse välja tõhusad strateegiad, et eraldada peeneteralised omadused iga transpordiliigi, st attBiGRU ja DCRNN. Lisaks võtame kasutusele mitmeliigilise ühendamise ja tähelepaneliku ühendamise meetodeid, et integreerida mitmeliigilist teavet terviklikult. Reaalmaailma andmekogumite põhjalik eksperimentaalne hindamine näitab, et meie kavandatud mudel ületab suure hulga kaasaegseid lähenemisviise.', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պարունակությունը բազմաթիվ իրական աշխարհի ծրագրերի հիմքն է, ներառյալ տեղեկատվության վերադարձման և խորհուրդ տալու համակարգերը, մյուսների համար: Հակառակը նախորդ աշխատանքներին, որոնք հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են միակ մոդալ կամ երկմոդալ ուսումնասիրության վրա, մենք առաջարկում ենք սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների պարունակությունը սովորել միասին տեքստային, ձայնային և տեսողական ինֆորմացիայի (JTI Ավելի արդյունավետ ռազմավարություններ են առաջարկում յուրաքանչյուր մեթոդի նրբագեղ հատկանիշների հանելու համար, այսինքն, աթԲիGRU և ԴՔՌՆ: Մենք նաև ներկայացնում ենք խաչմոդային ֆունզիայի և ուշադիր միավորման տեխնիկաներ, որոնք օգնում են ամբողջովին ինտեգրել բազմոդային տեղեկատվությունը: Իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի վրա կատարված ընդլայնված փորձարկվող գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված մոդելը արտադրում է ամենահետաքրքիր մոտեցումները մեծ տարբերակով:', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisen median sisällön oppiminen on monien todellisten sovellusten perusta, muun muassa tiedonhaku- ja suositusjärjestelmät. Toisin kuin aiemmat teokset, jotka keskittyvät pääasiassa yksimodaaliseen tai bimodaaliseen oppimiseen, ehdotamme sosiaalisen median sisällön oppimista yhdistämällä yhdessä tekstuaalista, akustista ja visuaalista tietoa (JTAV). Ehdotetaan tehokkaita strategioita kunkin liikennemuodon hienorakeisten ominaisuuksien, eli attBiGRU:n ja DCRNN:n, erottamiseksi. Otamme käyttöön myös multimodaalisen fuusion ja tarkkaavaisen yhdistämisen tekniikoita multimodaalisen tiedon kokonaisvaltaiseksi integroimiseksi. Laaja kokeellinen arviointi reaaliaikaisista aineistoista osoittaa, että ehdotettu malli ylittää huipputekniikan lähestymistavat suurella marginaalilla.', 'ha': "Ana karanta maɓallin mitandai da jamii yana a kan bayan wasu shiryoyin ayuka masu cikin duniya masu gaskiya, kamar da tsarin da ake samu da masu shawara da shiryarwa. Tsamman da aikin da suka gabãta, wanda ke fokus mainli a kan karatun ta guda ko kuma a bi-modal, za mu buƙata karanta maɓallin mitandai da jamii da kuma mu samu da ƙaramako na haɗi littãfi, akostic da bayani (JTAV). An buƙata masu Effective game da su sami wasu misfealumai mai kyau wa kowace tsari, that is, attBiGRU da DCRNN. Kayya, Munã ƙara kowace masu motsi da kuma masu samura na hanyoyin shirin sami'a ga masu tsari masu yawa. Ana ƙidãya mai shimfiɗawa da aka samar a kan data masu cikin duniya gaske sun nuna misalinmu wanda aka buƙata yana samar da mazaɓan-halin-sanawa da ke cikin margin babba.", 'sk': 'Učenje vsebin družbenih omrežij je temelj številnih aplikacij v realnem svetu, med drugim tudi sistemov za pridobivanje informacij in priporočila. V nasprotju s prejšnjimi deli, ki se osredotočajo predvsem na enomodalno ali bimodalno učenje, predlagamo učenje vsebin družbenih medijev z združevanjem besedilnih, akustičnih in vizualnih informacij (JTAV). Predlagane so učinkovite strategije za pridobivanje drobnozrnatih značilnosti vsake modalnosti, to je attBiGRU in DCRNN. Uvajamo tudi medmodalno fuzijo in tehnike pozornega združevanja za celovito integracijo multimodalnih informacij. Obsežno eksperimentalno vrednotenje, opravljeno na resničnih podatkovnih nizih, kaže, da je naš predlagani model veliko boljši od najsodobnejših pristopov.', 'jv': 'Ngerti ndhelik media sotiki dadi sabanjuré akeh aplikasi sing gagal-sangani, misale informasi pengaturan ngono sistem kuturan, sing wis ana. Tulung gantiné karo karo uwong sing dipun-ingkang modal apa uwis-modal Tatanan effectual Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe sistem sistem sing gawe modal karo ngono teknik sing wis ngawe lan tambah-sistem sing gawe informasi luwih modal AllProgressBar', 'he': 'ללמוד תוכן התקשורת החברתית הוא הבסיס של שימושים רבים בעולם האמיתי, כולל מערכות גילוי מידע ומלצות, בין אחרות. בניגוד לעבודות קודמות שמתמקדות בעיקר על לימוד מודאלי בודד או בימודאלי, אנו מציעים ללמוד תוכן מדיה חברתית על ידי מיזוג יחד מידע טקסטלי, אקוסטי ויזואלי (JTAV). אסטרטגיות יעילות מוצעות כדי להוציא תכונות עצומות של כל מודיאליות, כלומר, attBiGRU ודCRNN. אנחנו גם מציגים טכניקות התמזגות דרך-מודלית וטכניקות שיתוף תשומת לב כדי להשתלב מידע רב-מודלית באופן כללי. הערכה ניסיונית רחבה שעושה על קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי מראה שהמודל המוצע שלנו מציג את הגישות המאודמות על ידי שווה גדולה.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་དང་མ་མཐུན་གྱིས་སྔོན་གྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་པ་ཁག་གིས་མཐུན་གྱིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དོན་དག་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་འདོན ནུས་པ་གཙོ་བོ་ལ་དམ་འབྱོར་ཚོགས་སྣང་མེད་པར་ཆས་པ་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་ཐབས་ལམ་འདྲ་བརྩེ་བ་དང་རྟོགས་པའི་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Extensive experimental evaluation conducted on real-world datasets demonstrate our proposed model outperforms the state-of-the-art approaches by a large margin.'}
{'en': 'MEMD : A Diversity-Promoting Learning Framework for Short-Text Conversation', 'ar': 'MEMD: إطار عمل تعليمي يعزز التنوع للمحادثة النصية القصيرة', 'es': 'MEMD: Un marco de aprendizaje que promueve la diversidad para conversaciones de texto breves', 'ja': 'MEMD ：短文会話のための多様性促進学習フレームワーク', 'pt': 'MEMD: Uma Estrutura de Aprendizagem Promovendo a Diversidade para Conversação em Texto Curto', 'fr': "MEMD\xa0: Un cadre d'apprentissage favorisant la diversité pour les conversations en texte court", 'zh': 'MEMD:短文多样性学框架', 'hi': 'MEMD: लघु-पाठ वार्तालाप के लिए एक विविधता-प्रचार सीखने की रूपरेखा', 'ga': 'MEMD: Creat Foghlama um Chomhrá Gearrthéacs a Chothaíonn na hÉagsúlachta', 'ru': 'MEMD: Учебная основа, способствующая многообразию, для краткого текстового общения', 'ka': 'MEMD: პარამეტრი ტექსტის პარამეტრებისთვის განსხვავებული სწავლების პარამეტრები', 'kk': 'MEMD: Қысқа мәтін сөйлесу үшін айырмашылық оқу фреймісі', 'hu': 'MEMD: A sokszínűséget előmozdító tanulási keret rövid szövegű beszélgetéshez', 'el': 'Ένα μαθησιακό πλαίσιο προώθησης της ποικιλομορφίας για συζήτηση μικρού κειμένου', 'mk': 'MEMD: Рамка за учење за промовирање на различност за кратко текст', 'it': 'MEMD: Un quadro di apprendimento che promuove la diversità per la conversazione a breve termine', 'ml': 'മെഎംഡി: ചെറുതായ പദാവലി പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെമ്മോര്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യാസം- പ്രോയോജിപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'MEMD: Богино-текст ярилцлагын төлөө олон төрлийн суралцах үйл ажиллагааг дэмжих', 'lt': 'MEMD: Mokymosi, skatinančio įvairovę, sistema trumpojo teksto konversacijai', 'no': 'MEMD: Eit rammeverk for kort tekstsamtale', 'ro': 'MEMD: Un cadru de învățare pentru promovarea diversității pentru conversațiile pe text scurt', 'ms': 'MEMD: Sebuah kerangka Belajar Mempromosikan Keberagaman untuk Perbualan Teks-pendek', 'mt': 'MEMD: Qafas ta’ Tagħlim għall-Promozzjoni tad-Diversità għal Konversjoni ta’ Test Qasir', 'sr': 'MEMD: Различност-поощрявајући рамки научања за кратки текст разговор', 'pl': 'MEMD: Różnorodność promujące ramy uczenia się dla konwersacji krótkoterminowych', 'so': 'MEMD: A Diversity-Promoting Learning Framework for Short-Text Conversation', 'ta': 'MEMD: சிறிய உரையாடலுக்கான வித்தியாசம்- மேம்படுத்தல் சட்டம்', 'ur': 'MEMD: کوٹی-ٹیکسٹ کی بات کے لئے ایک مختلف-پیدائش یادہانی فرارمورک', 'sv': 'MEMD: En ram för lärande som främjar mångfald för korttextkonversationer', 'si': 'MEMD: කොටි පාළුවක් සමාවාදය සඳහා විවිධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරනවා', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một bộ kiểm soát đại diễn lớn truyền thuyết ngắn', 'hr': 'MEMD: okvir za razgovor s kratkom tekstom o raznovrstvu raznolikovanja raznolikosti', 'da': 'MEMD: En mangfoldighedsfremmende læringsramme for korttekstsamtaler', 'bg': 'Рамка за обучение, насърчаваща многообразието, за краткотекстов разговор', 'nl': 'MEMD: Een diversiteit-bevorderend leerkader voor korte tekst conversatie', 'id': 'MEMD: Sebuah Framework Belajar Mempromosikan Keberagaman untuk Perbualan Teks Kurang', 'ko': 'MEMD: 짧은 대화의 다양성을 촉진하는 학습 프레임워크', 'sw': 'MEMD: Mfumo wa Kujifunza kwa Ujumbe mfupi wa Mazungumzo', 'de': 'MEMD: Ein diversitätsfördernder Lernrahmen für Kurztextgespräche', 'af': "MEMD: ' n Verskeidenheid-Promoting Leer Raamwerk vir Kort-Teks Gespraak", 'am': 'MEMD: A Diversity-Promoting Learning Framework for Short-Text Conversation', 'fa': 'MEMD: یک چشمه یادگیری برای گفتگوی کوتاه\u200cی متن', 'tr': 'MEMD: Kiçi-Metin Qonuşmak üçin bir Çeşitlik-täsir öwrenmek Framesi', 'bn': 'মেমডি: সংক্ষিপ্ত টেক্সটের কথোপকথনের জন্য একটি ডিভার্সিটি প্রচার শিক্ষা শিক্ষা ফ্রেমার্ক', 'az': 'MEMD: Qısqa-Metin Qonuşması üçün Çeşitmə-Promoting Öyrənmə Framework', 'ca': "MEMD: Un marc d'aprenentatge que promou la diversitat per a conversar curts textos", 'cs': 'MEMD: Rámec vzdělávání podporující rozmanitost pro konverzaci s krátkým textem', 'bs': 'MEMD: okvir za razgovor s kratkom tekstom o raznovrstvu raznolikovanja raznolikosti', 'hy': 'ՄԵՄԴ. Կարճ տեքստի հաղորդակցման համար բազմազանություն խրախուսացող սովորելու շրջանակ', 'et': 'MEMD: Mitmekesisust edendav õpperaamistik lühitekstidest vestluseks', 'fi': 'MEMD: Monimuotoisuutta edistävä oppimiskehys lyhyttekstikeskusteluja varten', 'sq': 'MEMD: A Diversity-Promoting Learning Framework for Short-Text Conversation', 'jv': 'MEMP: A Multirsity-Progressing Learning frame for shortText conversations', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'MEMD: Okvir učenja za spodbujanje raznolikosti za pogovor o kratkih besedilih', 'he': 'MEMD: A Diversity-Promoting Learning Framework for Short-Text Conversation', 'bo': 'MEMD：སྣ་འདྲ་བ་དང་Promoting Learning Framework for Short-Text Conversation'}
{'en': 'Neural encoder-decoder models have been widely applied to conversational response generation, which is a research hot spot in recent years. However, conventional neural encoder-decoder models tend to generate commonplace responses like I do n’t know regardless of what the input is. In this paper, we analyze this problem from a new perspective : latent vectors. Based on it, we propose an easy-to-extend learning framework named MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), in which an auxiliary encoder and an auxiliary decoder are introduced to provide necessary training guidance without resorting to extra data or complicating network’s inner structure. Experimental results demonstrate that our method effectively improve the quality of generated responses according to automatic metrics and human evaluations, yielding more diverse and smooth replies.', 'ar': 'تم تطبيق نماذج وحدة فك التشفير والتشفير العصبية على نطاق واسع لتوليد الاستجابة التخاطبية ، وهي نقطة بحث ساخنة في السنوات الأخيرة. ومع ذلك ، تميل نماذج مفكك التشفير العصبية التقليدية إلى توليد استجابات شائعة مثل "لا أعرف" بغض النظر عن ماهية المدخلات. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتحليل هذه المشكلة من منظور جديد: النواقل الكامنة. بناءً عليه ، نقترح إطارًا تعليميًا سهل التوسيع يسمى MEMD (التشفير المتعدد إلى جهاز فك التشفير المتعدد) ، حيث يتم تقديم مشفر إضافي ووحدة فك ترميز إضافية لتوفير إرشادات التدريب اللازمة دون اللجوء إلى بيانات إضافية أو تعقيد الشبكة. الهيكل الداخلي. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقتنا تحسن بشكل فعال جودة الردود التي تم إنشاؤها وفقًا للمقاييس التلقائية والتقييمات البشرية ، مما يؤدي إلى ردود أكثر تنوعًا وسلاسة.', 'es': 'Los modelos de codificador-decodificador neuronal se han aplicado ampliamente a la generación de respuestas conversacionales, que es un punto caliente de investigación en los últimos años. Sin embargo, los modelos convencionales de codificador-decodificador neuronal tienden a generar respuestas comunes como «no sé» independientemente de cuál sea la entrada. En este artículo analizamos este problema desde una nueva perspectiva: los vectores latentes. Sobre esta base, proponemos un marco de aprendizaje fácil de ampliar llamado MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), en el que se introducen un codificador auxiliar y un decodificador auxiliar para proporcionar la orientación de entrenamiento necesaria sin recurrir a datos adicionales ni complicar la estructura interna de la red. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro método mejora eficazmente la calidad de las respuestas generadas de acuerdo con métricas automáticas y evaluaciones humanas, lo que produce respuestas más diversas y fluidas.', 'pt': 'Modelos de codificadores-decodificadores neurais têm sido amplamente aplicados à geração de respostas conversacionais, que é um ponto importante de pesquisa nos últimos anos. No entanto, os modelos convencionais de codificador-decodificador neural tendem a gerar respostas comuns como “não sei”, independentemente de qual seja a entrada. Neste artigo, analisamos esse problema a partir de uma nova perspectiva: vetores latentes. Com base nele, propomos um framework de aprendizado fácil de estender chamado MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), no qual um codificador auxiliar e um decodificador auxiliar são introduzidos para fornecer as orientações de treinamento necessárias sem recorrer a dados extras ou complicar a rede estrutura interna. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que nosso método efetivamente melhora a qualidade das respostas geradas de acordo com métricas automáticas e avaliações humanas, produzindo respostas mais diversificadas e suaves.', 'fr': "Les modèles encodeur-décodeur neuronal ont été largement appliqués à la génération de réponse conversationnelle, qui est un point chaud de la recherche ces dernières années. Cependant, les modèles codeur-décodeur neuronal conventionnels ont tendance à générer des réponses courantes telles que «\xa0Je ne sais pas\xa0», quelle que soit l'entrée. Dans cet article, nous analysons ce problème sous un nouvel angle\xa0: les vecteurs latents. Sur cette base, nous proposons un framework d'apprentissage facile à étendre appelé MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), dans lequel un codeur auxiliaire et un décodeur auxiliaire sont introduits pour fournir les conseils de formation nécessaires sans recourir à des données supplémentaires ou compliquer la structure interne du réseau. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que notre méthode améliore efficacement la qualité des réponses générées selon des mesures automatiques et des évaluations humaines, produisant des réponses plus diversifiées et plus fluides.", 'hi': 'तंत्रिका एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल को व्यापक रूप से संवादात्मक प्रतिक्रिया पीढ़ी पर लागू किया गया है, जो हाल के वर्षों में एक शोध गर्म स्थान है। हालांकि, पारंपरिक तंत्रिका एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल आम प्रतिक्रियाएं उत्पन्न करते हैं जैसे कि "मुझे नहीं पता" इनपुट क्या है। इस पेपर में, हम इस समस्या का विश्लेषण एक नए परिप्रेक्ष्य से करते हैं: अव्यक्त वैक्टर। इसके आधार पर, हम MEMD (मल्टी-डिकोडर से मल्टी-डिकोडर) नामक एक आसान-से-विस्तारित सीखने के ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसमें एक सहायक एन्कोडर और एक सहायक डिकोडर को अतिरिक्त डेटा का सहारा लिए बिना आवश्यक प्रशिक्षण मार्गदर्शन प्रदान करने या नेटवर्क की आंतरिक संरचना को जटिल बनाने के बिना आवश्यक प्रशिक्षण मार्गदर्शन प्रदान करने के लिए पेश किया जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारी विधि प्रभावी रूप से स्वचालित मीट्रिक और मानव मूल्यांकन के अनुसार उत्पन्न प्रतिक्रियाओं की गुणवत्ता में सुधार करती है, जिससे अधिक विविध और चिकनी उत्तर मिलते हैं।', 'ja': 'ニューラルエンコーダーデコーダーモデルは、近年の研究ホットスポットである会話応答生成に広く応用されている。しかしながら、従来のニューラルエンコーダデコーダモデルは、入力が何であるかにかかわらず、「私は知らない」のような一般的な応答を生成する傾向がある。本稿では、潜伏ベクトルという新しい視点からこの問題を分析する。これを踏まえ、MEMD （ Multi - Encoder to Multi - Decoder ）という拡張しやすい学習フレームワークを提案します。このフレームワークでは、補助エンコーダと補助デコーダを導入し、余分なデータを使用したり、ネットワークの内部構造を複雑にすることなく、必要なトレーニングガイダンスを提供します。実験結果は、当社の方法が自動指標と人間の評価に従って生成された応答の品質を効果的に改善し、より多様でスムーズな応答をもたらすことを実証しています。', 'zh': '神经编码器-解码器模形已广泛应用于会话应生,此近年之究热点。 然旧神经编码器-解码器向生常应之,如"我不知",而不顾所输。 于本文中,从一新度析之,潜在向量。 此MEMD(多编码器至多解码器)易广之学框架,引入佐编码器辅解码器,以供培训导,而无告诸额外数据、使网络之内部结构复杂化。 实验结果表明以自指标人工,有益于所生成应,使复益多样化流。', 'ru': 'Нейронные модели кодировщик-декодер были широко применены для генерации разговорного ответа, который является горячей точкой исследования в последние годы. Тем не менее, обычные модели нейронный кодер-декодер, как правило, генерируют общепринятые ответы, такие как «Я не знаю», независимо от того, какой входной сигнал. В данной работе мы анализируем эту задачу с новой точки зрения: латентные векторы. На его основе мы предлагаем простой в расширении обучающий фреймворк под названием MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), в котором введены вспомогательный кодер и вспомогательный декодер, чтобы обеспечить необходимое руководство по обучению, не прибегая к дополнительным данным или усложняя внутреннюю структуру сети. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш метод эффективно улучшает качество сгенерированных ответов в соответствии с автоматическими метриками и оценками человека, давая более разнообразные и плавные ответы.', 'ga': 'Tá samhlacha ionchódóra-néaracha curtha i bhfeidhm go forleathan ar ghiniúint freagairt chomhrá, rud atá ina láthair te taighde le blianta beaga anuas. Mar sin féin, is gnách go ngintear gnáth-samhlacha néarchódóra-díchódóra freagraí coitianta mar “níl a fhios agam” beag beann ar an ionchur. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid anailís ar an bhfadhb seo ó pheirspictíocht nua: veicteoirí folaigh. Bunaithe air, molaimid creat foghlama atá éasca le leathnú darb ainm MEMD (Il-ionchódóir go Il-Dhichódóir), ina dtabharfar isteach ionchódóir cúnta agus díchódóir cúnta chun treoir oiliúna riachtanach a sholáthar gan dul i muinín sonraí breise nó castaí líonra. struchtúr istigh. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfeabhsaíonn ár modh go héifeachtach cáilíocht na bhfreagraí ginte de réir méadrachta uathoibríocha agus meastóireachtaí daonna, rud a thugann freagraí níos éagsúla agus níos réidhe.', 'ka': "ნეიროლური კოდირების მოდელები უფრო დიდი გამოყენებულია კონტრაციოლური რეაქციის განახლებისთვის, რომელიც ახლა წლის განახლებისთვის შესაძლებელია. მაგრამ, კონტუნციონალური ნეიროლური კოდერის რეკოდერის მოდელები უნდა იქნება საერთო ადგილური პასუხები, როგორც 'არ ვიცი' იყოს თუ რა არის ჩანაწერა. ჩვენ ეს პრობლემა ახალი პერვიკუტიდან ანალიზაცით: ლატენტი გვექტორიდან. ჩვენ მხოლოდ ამის გადავიწყებთ მარტივი სწავლების ფრამეტრი MEMD (მრავალ-კოდერი მრავალ-ევკოდერისთვის), რომელიც მხოლოდ კოდერი და დახმარებელი ევკოდერისთვის ჩვენებულია, რომელიც უნდა გადავიწყებთ მჭირო სწავლების მოწყობინებ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი მედიოდი ეფექტიურად უფრო მეტრიკურად განახლების კალგატის გაუფლება, მაგალითად მეტრიკურად და ადამიანის გაუფლებები", 'hu': 'A neurális útmérő-dekódoló modelleket széles körben alkalmazzák a beszélgetési válasz generálására, ami kutatási forró pont az elmúlt években. A hagyományos neurális kódoló-dekódoló modellek azonban általában olyan általános válaszokat generálnak, mint a "Nem tudom", függetlenül attól, hogy mi a bemenet. Ebben a tanulmányban új perspektívából elemezzük ezt a problémát: látens vektorok. Ennek alapján egy MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder) nevű, könnyen kiterjeszthető tanulási keretrendszert javasolunk, amelyben egy kiegészítő kódolót és egy kiegészítő dekódolót vezetünk be, hogy a szükséges képzési útmutatást nyújtsanak anélkül, hogy extra adatokat igényelnénk vagy bonyolítanánk a hálózat belső struktúráját. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk hatékonyan javítja a generált válaszok minőségét automatikus mérőszámok és emberi értékelések alapján, így sokszínűbb és zökkenőmentesebb válaszokat eredményez.', 'el': 'Τα μοντέλα νευρωνικών κωδικοποιητών-αποκωδικοποιητών έχουν εφαρμοστεί ευρέως στη δημιουργία συνομιλίας απόκρισης, η οποία είναι ένα καυτό σημείο έρευνας τα τελευταία χρόνια. Ωστόσο, τα συμβατικά μοντέλα νευρικού κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή τείνουν να παράγουν κοινές απαντήσεις όπως "δεν ξέρω" ανεξάρτητα από το ποια είναι η εισαγωγή. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναλύουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα από μια νέα προοπτική: λανθάνοντα διανύσματα. Με βάση αυτό, προτείνουμε ένα εύκολο στην επέκταση μαθησιακό πλαίσιο με το όνομα Πολυκωδικοποιητής σε Πολυαποκωδικοποιητή, στο οποίο εισάγονται ένας βοηθητικός κωδικοποιητής και ένας βοηθητικός αποκωδικοποιητής για να παρέχουν την απαραίτητη καθοδήγηση εκπαίδευσης χωρίς να καταφεύγουν σε επιπλέον δεδομένα ή να περιπλέκουν την εσωτερική δομή του δικτύου. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν ότι η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνει αποτελεσματικά την ποιότητα των παραγόμενων απαντήσεων σύμφωνα με τις αυτόματες μετρήσεις και τις ανθρώπινες αξιολογήσεις, δίνοντας πιο ποικίλες και ομαλές απαντήσεις.', 'it': "I modelli di encoder-decoder neurali sono stati ampiamente applicati alla generazione di risposta conversazionale, che è un punto caldo della ricerca negli ultimi anni. Tuttavia, i modelli convenzionali di encoder-decoder neurali tendono a generare risposte comuni come 'Non so' indipendentemente da quale sia l'input. In questo articolo analizziamo questo problema da una nuova prospettiva: vettori latenti. Sulla base di esso, proponiamo un framework di apprendimento facile da estendere chiamato MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), in cui un encoder ausiliario e un decoder ausiliario sono introdotti per fornire la necessaria guida di formazione senza ricorrere a dati aggiuntivi o complicare la struttura interna della rete. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro metodo migliora efficacemente la qualità delle risposte generate secondo metriche automatiche e valutazioni umane, fornendo risposte più diversificate e fluide.", 'kk': 'Нейрондық кодер- декодер үлгілері сәйкестік жауап жасау үшін көп қолданылды, бұл соңғы жылдарда зерттеулердің жылдары. Бірақ, кәдімгі невралдық кодер- декодер үлгілері, келтірілген нәрсені қайта, "білмеймін" секілді көпшілік жауап береді. Бұл қағазда, бұл мәселеді жаңа перспективадан анализирақ: латенті векторлар. Осының негізінде біз MEMD деп аталатын оқыту бағдарламасын (көптеген кодерлерді көптеген декодерге көмектесу бағдарламасын және көмектесу декодерге көмектесу үшін керек оқыту бағдарламасын келтіріп, желінің ішкі құрылымына қосымша деректерді не кө Эксперименталдық нәтижелеріміздің әдіміміз автоматты метрикалық және адамдардың оқиғаларына сәйкес жауаптарының сапатын өзгерту әдістерін көрсетеді. Біздің әдіміздің ә', 'mk': 'Neural encoder-decoder models have been widely applied to conversational response generation, which is a research hot spot in recent years.  Сепак, конвенционалните модели на нервен кодер-декодер имаат тенденција да генерираат обични одговори како "Не знам" без оглед на тоа што е внесувањето. Во овој весник, го анализираме овој проблем од нова перспектива: тајни вектори. Базирано на тоа, предложуваме лесна рамка за учење наречена MEMD (Мулти-кодер на Мулти-декодер), во која се воведува помошниот кодер и помошниот декодер за да се обезбеди потребно упатство за обука без користење на дополнителни податоци или комплицирање на внатрешната структура на мрежата. Experimental results demonstrate that our method effectively improve the quality of generated responses according to automatic metrics and human evaluations, yielding more diverse and smooth replies.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പ്രതികരണ തലമുറയ്ക്ക് വേണ്ടി ന്യൂറല്\u200d കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെകോഡേര്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് അടുത എന്നാലും, സാധാരണ നെയുറല്\u200d കോഡോര്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാമാന്യ സ്ഥലത്തെ ഉത്തരവുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് എന്താണെന്ന് വിചാരിച്ചാലും എനി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെ പുതിയ കാഴ്ചപ്പാടില്\u200d നിന്ന് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു: അതിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder) എന്നൊരു എളുപ്പമുള്ള പഠിപ്പിനുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമ്പ് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ ഒരു കൂട്ടുതല്\u200d കോഡെരും ഒരു കൂടു Experimental results demonstrate that our method effectively improve the quality of generated responses according to automatic metrics and human evaluations, yielding more diverse and smooth replies.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli tad-dekodifikatur newrali ġew applikati b’mod wiesa’ għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ rispons konverżjonali, li huwa post ta’ riċerka sħun f’dawn l-a ħħar snin. Madankollu, mudelli konvenzjonali ta’ kodifikatur newrali għandhom it-tendenza li jiġġeneraw reazzjonijiet komuni bħal “I don’t know” irrispettivament minn x’inhu l-input. F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu analiżi ta’ din il-problem a minn perspettiva ġdida: vetturi latenti. Abbażi ta’ dan, qed nipproponu qafas ta’ tagħlim faċli biex jiġi estiż imsejjaħ MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), li fih jiddaħħlu kodifikatur awżiljarju u dekoder awżiljarju biex jipprovdu gwida meħtieġa għat-taħriġ mingħajr ma jirrikorru għal dejta addizzjonali jew jikkumplikaw l-istruttura interna tan-netwerk. Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-metodu tagħna effettivament itejjeb il-kwalità tar-reazzjonijiet iġġenerati skont il-metriċi awtomatiċi u l-evalwazzjonijiet tal-bniedem, u jagħti risposti aktar diversifikati u mingħajr xkiel.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүдэд судалгааны халуун хэсэг юм. Гэхдээ энгийн мэдрэлийн коддогч загварууд нь "Би мэдэхгүй" гэх мэт ихэвчлэн хариултыг гаргадаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид энэ асуудлыг шинэ харцгаанаас шинжлэх ухаанаас шинжлэх ухаан олгодог. Үүнээс үндсэн нь бид MEMD гэдэг суралцах амархан хөгжүүлэх хэлбэрийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Энэ дотор нь нэмэлт өгөгдлийн болон төвөгтэй сүлжээний бүтээгдэхүүн болон тусламжтайгаар тусламжтайгаар ашиглах боломжтой багшлах багшлал хангах хэрэгтэй. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь автоматически метрик болон хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын хариултын чанарыг эффективно сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ms': "Neural encoder-decoder models have been widely applied to conversational response generation, which is a research hot spot in recent years.  However, conventional neural encoder-decoder models tend to generate commonplace responses like 'I don't know' regardless of what the input is.  Dalam kertas ini, kita menganalisis masalah ini dari sudut pandang baru: vektor tersembunyi. Berdasarkan ia, kami cadangan pembelajaran mudah-untuk-lanjutkan bernama MEMD (Multi-Encoder ke Multi-Decoder), di mana pengekod bantuan dan pengekod bantuan diperkenalkan untuk menyediakan petunjuk latihan yang diperlukan tanpa menggunakan data tambahan atau menyusun struktur dalaman rangkaian. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita secara efektif meningkatkan kualiti balas yang dijana menurut metrik automatik dan penilaian manusia, memberikan balasan yang lebih berbeza dan licin.", 'ro': 'Modelele encoder-decoder neurale au fost aplicate pe scară largă la generarea de răspuns conversațional, care este un punct fierbinte de cercetare în ultimii ani. Cu toate acestea, modelele convenționale de encoder-decoder neurale tind să genereze răspunsuri obișnuite precum "Nu știu" indiferent de ce este intrarea. În această lucrare, analizăm această problemă dintr-o nouă perspectivă: vectorii latenți. Pe baza acestuia, propunem un cadru de învățare ușor de extins numit MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), în care un encoder auxiliar și un decoder auxiliar sunt introduse pentru a oferi îndrumarea necesară de instruire fără a recurge la date suplimentare sau complica structura interioară a rețelei. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că metoda noastră îmbunătățește eficient calitatea răspunsurilor generate conform măsurătorilor automate și evaluărilor umane, oferind răspunsuri mai diverse și mai fluide.', 'no': 'Nøyrale koderingsmodeller har blitt brukt for generering av omtale svar, som er eit forskningsvarmte punkt i siste år. Men konvensjonelle neuralkoderingsmodeller har tendens til å laga vanleg svar som «eg ikkje kjenner» uansett kva inndata er. I denne papiret analyserer vi dette problemet frå ein ny perspektiv: latent vektorar. Basert på det, fører vi ein enkel å utvide læringsrammeverk med namn MEMD (fleire kodar til fleire kodar), der ein hjelp kodar og ei hjelp dekoder vert introdusert for å gje nødvendig opplæringshjelp utan å korta til ekstra data eller kompliserer interne struktur på nettverket. Eksperimentale resultat viser at metoden vårt er effektivt forbetra kvaliteten av genererte svar etter automatiske metriske og menneske evalueringar, og gjer meir diverse og glade svar.', 'sr': "Modeli neuronskog kodera široko su primjenjeni na generaciju razgovornog odgovora, što je u poslednjih godina istraživanje vruće mjesto. Međutim, konvencionalni modeli neuralnog kodera-dekodera obično stvaraju uobičajene odgovore poput 'ne znam' bez obzira šta je ulaz. U ovom papiru analiziramo ovaj problem iz novih perspektiva: latentni vektori. Na temelju toga predlažemo lako proširenje učenjskog okvira po imenu MEMD (Multi-Encoder za Multi-Decoder), u kojem se uvede pomoćni koder i pomoćni dekoder kako bi pružili potrebne vodstvo za obuku bez rezultacije dodatnih podataka ili kompliciranja unutrašnje strukture mreže. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda efikasno poboljšava kvalitet proizvedenih odgovora prema automatskim metrikama i ljudskim procenama, dajući različite i glatne odgovore.", 'pl': 'Modele kodera-dekodera neuronowego są szeroko stosowane do generowania odpowiedzi konwersacyjnej, która jest gorącym punktem badawczym w ostatnich latach. Jednak konwencjonalne modele koderów neuronowych mają tendencję do generowania powszechnych odpowiedzi, takich jak "Nie wiem", niezależnie od tego, jakie są dane wejściowe. W artykule analizujemy ten problem z nowej perspektywy: wektorów utajonych. Na jego podstawie proponujemy łatwy do rozszerzenia framework edukacyjny o nazwie MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), w którym wprowadzono koder pomocniczy i dekoder pomocniczy, aby zapewnić niezbędne wskazówki szkoleniowe bez uciekania się do dodatkowych danych lub komplikowania wewnętrznej struktury sieci. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasza metoda skutecznie poprawia jakość generowanych odpowiedzi według automatycznych wskaźników i ocen ludzkich, dając bardziej zróżnicowane i płynne odpowiedzi.', 'sv': 'Neural encoder-dekoder modeller har använts i stor utsträckning för konversations responsgenerering, vilket är en forskningshot spot under de senaste åren. Men konventionella neurala encoder-dekoder modeller tenderar att generera vanliga svar som "Jag vet inte" oavsett vad ingången är. I denna uppsats analyserar vi detta problem ur ett nytt perspektiv: latenta vektorer. Baserat på det föreslår vi ett lättutbyggt lärramverk som heter MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), där en extra kodare och en extra dekoder introduceras för att ge nödvändig utbildning vägledning utan att tillgripa extra data eller komplicera nätverkets inre struktur. Experimentella resultat visar att vår metod effektivt förbättrar kvaliteten på genererade svar enligt automatiska mätvärden och mänskliga utvärderingar, vilket ger mer varierade och smidiga svar.', 'ta': "அண்மைய ஆண்டுகளில் பேசும் பதில் உருவாக்கத்திற்கான நெருக்கி குறியீட்டு மாதிரிகள் பெரிய பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. ஆனால், வழக்கமான புதிய புதிய குறியீட்டு மாதிரிகள் உள்ளீடு என்ன என்றாலும் 'எனக்கு தெரியாது' போன்ற பொதுவான இடத்தில் பதில் உருவாக இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனையை புதிய காட்சியில் இருந்து ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம்: சமீபத்தில் ந Based on it, we propose an easy-to-extend learning framework named MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), in which an auxiliary encoder and an auxiliary decoder are introduced to provide necessary training guidance without resorting to extra data or complicating network's inner structure.  முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கிறது என்றால் தானியங்கி மெட்ரிக்கள் மற்றும் மனித மதிப்புகள் பொருட்டு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட பதில்களின் தரத்தை மேம", 'lt': 'Neural encoder-decoder models have been widely applied to conversational response generation, which is a research hot spot in recent years.  Tačiau įprasti nervų kodavimo modeliai paprastai sukuria įprastus atsakus, pavyzdžiui, "Nežinau", nepriklausomai nuo to, kas yra įvestis. Šiame dokumente analizuojame šią problem ą iš naujos perspektyvos: latent ūs vektoriai. Based on it, we propose an easy-to-extend learning framework named MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), in which an auxiliary encoder and an auxiliary decoder are introduced to provide necessary training guidance without resorting to extra data or complicating network\'s inner structure.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų metodas veiksmingai gerina gautų atsakų kokybę pagal automatinius metrinius rodiklius ir žmogaus vertinimus ir suteikia įvairesnių ir sklandesnių atsakų.', 'si': "න්\u200dයූරල් කෝඩාර්-ඩිකෝඩර් මෝඩේල්ස් වර්ගයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරලා තිය නමුත්, සාමාන්\u200dය න්\u200dයූරාල් සංකේතනය කොඩර් ඩිකොඩර් මොඩේල්ස් වලින් සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා 'මම දන් මේ පත්තරේ අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිසා: ලේටෙන්ට් වෙක්ටර්. අපි ඒක අධාරණය කරනවා MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder) කියලා ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ උදව් කෝඩාර් සහ උදව් කෝඩාර් සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපේ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශේෂයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය මෙට්\u200dරික් සහ මිනිස් විශ", 'ur': "نیورال اکڈر-ڈیکوڈر موڈل کی عمدہ مصاحبات کی نسل پر پھیلائی گئی ہے، جو اگلے سالوں میں ایک تحقیق گرم نقطہ ہے. However, conventional neural encoder-decoder models tend to generate commonplace responses like 'I don't know' regardless of what the input is. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے اس مسئلہ کو نئی نظر سے تحقیق کیا ہے: لاٹینٹ ویکتور۔ اس پر ہم ایک آسان استفاده کرنے کے لئے مدد کریں گے MEMD (Multi-Encoder Multi-Decoder) کا نام، جہاں ایک مددگار کوڈر اور ایک مددگار ڈیکوڈر معلوم کیا جاتا ہے کہ اس میں اضافہ ڈیٹا یا پیچیدہ نیٹ ورک کے اندر کی ساختار کے لئے اضافہ کرنے کے بغیر ضرورت کی آموزش راہ دکھانے کے لئے لازم ہے۔ آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ اثبات سے اثبات کے ساتھ پیدا کیا گیا جواب دینے کے کیفیت کو اثبات سے زیادہ کرتا ہے، اور انسان کی ارزش سے زیادہ مختلف اور ہلکا جواب دیتا ہے.", 'so': "Tusaalada koordirada ee neurada waxaa lagu codsaday mid aad u badan dhaqdhaqaaqa jawaabta la hadlo, taas oo ah goob aad u kulul sanadkii ugu dambeeyey. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, qaababka kooxaha ah ee kooxda kooxda ayaa inta badan soo saara jawaabo caadiga ah, sida `aanan ogayn' in kastoo ay tahay waxa gudaha ku jira. Warqadan, waxan dhibaatadan waxaannu ka baaraynaa aragtida cusub: wadooyinka ugu dambeeya. Sida lagu saleynayo, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa frame waxbarasho oo fudud oo la sii wado, magaca MEMD (Qodeynta Multi-Decoder), kaas oo lagu soo bandhigaa koodeynta dheeraadka iyo deynta kordhiska dheeraadka ah, si loo siiyo hagitaan waxbarasho u baahan, iyadoo aan isticmaalin macluumaad dheeraad ah ama aan ku complicsanayn dhismaha hoose ee shabakadda. Abaalka imtixaanka waxaa muujiya in qaababkayagu uu si fiican u kordhin karo qiimeeya jidhka lagu sameeyo sida ay tahay qaabab bilowga ah iyo qiimeynta dadku, wuxuuna keenaa jawaabyo kala duduwan oo fudud.", 'vi': "Mẫu mã hóa thần kinh đã được phổ biến trong hệ thống phản ứng đối thoại, một điểm nóng của nghiên cứu trong những năm gần đây. Tuy nhiên, mô hình bộ mã hóa thần kinh truyền thống thường t ạo ra các phản ứng thông thường như'Tôi không biết'cho dù nó là cái gì. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta phân tích vấn đề từ một quan điểm mới: các sinh vật tiềm ẩn. Dựa trên đó, chúng tôi đề nghị một hệ thống học dễ tìm hiểu có thể mở rộng được tên là MEMD (đa mã hóa đa-Encoder-Decder), trong đó một bộ mã hóa hỗ trợ và một bộ giải mã phụ trợ được tạo ra để cung cấp những hướng dẫn huấn luyện cần thiết mà không cần phải dùng thêm dữ liệu hay phức tạp cấu trúc bên trong mạng. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có hiệu quả cải thiện chất lượng của các phản ứng sinh ra dựa theo đo lường tự động và đánh giá con người, cung cấp các phản ứng khác nhau và êm thấm.", 'uz': "Name Lekin, oddiy neyron kodekoder modellari oddiy narsalarni `билмайман' kabi javoblarni yaratadi. Bu qogʻozda, biz bu muammolarni yangi shaklga nazar qilamiz: yangi vectorlar. Bu asosida, biz MEMD (Multi-Decoder uchun Multi Kodlash usuli) nomli o'rganishni foydalanish uchun oddiy foydalanish freymini talab qilamiz. Bu yerda foydalanuvchi kodlash imkoniyatini va foydalanuvchi kodlash imkoniyatini ishlatish mumkin. Tajriba natijalari ko'rsatadi, bizning usuli avtomatik metrik va одамлар qiymatlari bilan yaratilgan javoblarning sifatini bajaradi va ko'proq va oddiy javoblarni bajaradi.", 'hr': "Modeli neuronskog kodera široko su primjenjeni na generaciju razgovornog odgovora, što je u posljednjih godina istraživanje vruće mjesto. Međutim, konvencionalni modeli neuralnog kodera-dekodera obično stvaraju uobičajene odgovore poput 'ne znam' bez obzira na što je ulaz. U ovom papiru analiziramo ovaj problem iz novih perspektiva: latentni vektori. Na temelju toga predlažemo lako proširenje učenjskog okvira po imenu MEMD (Multi-Encoder za Multi-Decoder), u kojem se uvede pomoćni koder i pomoćni dekoder kako bi pružili potrebne upute za obuku bez rezultacije dodatnih podataka ili kompliciranja unutrašnje strukture mreže. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda učinkovito poboljšava kvalitet proizvedenih odgovora u skladu s automatskim metrikama i ljudskim procjenama, dajući različite i glatne odgovore.", 'bg': 'Моделите на невронен кодер-декодер са широко приложени за генериране на разговорни реакции, което е гореща точка за научни изследвания през последните години. Въпреки това, конвенционалните модели на невронен кодер-декодер са склонни да генерират обикновени отговори като "не знам", независимо от това какво е входът. В настоящата статия анализираме този проблем от нова гледна точка: латентни вектори. Въз основа на нея предлагаме лесна за разширяване учебна рамка, наречена в която се въвеждат помощен кодер и помощен декодер, за да се предоставят необходимите насоки за обучение без прибягване до допълнителни данни или усложняване на вътрешната структура на мрежата. Експерименталните резултати показват, че методът ни ефективно подобрява качеството на генерираните отговори според автоматични показатели и човешки оценки, като дава по-разнообразни и плавни отговори.', 'da': "Neural encoder-dekoder modeller er blevet bredt anvendt til konversations responsgenerering, som er et forskningshot spot i de seneste år. Men konventionelle neurale encoder-dekoder modeller har tendens til at generere almindelige svar som 'Jeg ved ikke' uanset hvad input er. I denne artikel analyserer vi dette problem fra et nyt perspektiv: latente vektorer. Baseret på det foreslår vi en let at udvide læringsramme kaldet MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), hvor en ekstra encoder og en ekstra dekoder introduceres for at give nødvendig træningsvejledning uden at ty til ekstra data eller komplicere netværkets indre struktur. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores metode effektivt forbedrer kvaliteten af genererede svar i henhold til automatiske målinger og menneskelige evalueringer, hvilket giver mere forskelligartede og glatte svar.", 'nl': "Neurale encoder-decoder modellen zijn op grote schaal toegepast op conversational response generatie, wat de laatste jaren een onderzoekshot spot is. Echter, conventionele neurale encoder-decoder modellen hebben de neiging om gewone reacties zoals 'Ik weet het niet' te genereren, ongeacht wat de invoer is. In dit artikel analyseren we dit probleem vanuit een nieuw perspectief: latente vectoren. Op basis daarvan stellen we een eenvoudig uit te breiden leerframework voor, genaamd MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), waarin een hulpencoder en een hulpdecoder worden geïntroduceerd om noodzakelijke trainingsbegeleiding te bieden zonder toevlucht te nemen tot extra gegevens of de interne structuur van het netwerk te compliceren. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze methode effectief de kwaliteit van gegenereerde reacties verbetert op basis van automatische statistieken en menselijke evaluaties, wat resulteert in meer gevarieerde en soepele antwoorden.", 'ko': "신경 코딩 모델은 세션 응답 생성에 광범위하게 응용되어 최근 몇 년 동안의 연구 이슈이다.그러나 입력이 무엇이든지 전통적인 신경 인코더 - 디코더 모델은 흔히 볼 수 있는 응답을 일으킨다. 예를 들어'나는 모른다'.본고에서 우리는 새로운 각도에서 이 문제인 잠재적 벡터를 분석한다.이를 바탕으로 우리는 확장하기 쉬운 학습 프레임워크인 MEMD(Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder)를 제시했다. 그 중에서 하나의 보조 인코더와 하나의 보조 디코더를 도입하여 필요한 훈련 지도를 제공하고 추가 데이터를 빌리거나 네트워크의 내부 구조를 복잡하게 할 필요가 없다.실험 결과에 따르면 우리의 방법은 자동 도량과 인공 평가에 따라 생성된 응답의 질을 효과적으로 향상시키고 더욱 다양하고 매끄러운 응답을 발생시켰다.", 'id': "Model pengkode-dekoder saraf telah diterapkan secara luas untuk generasi respon konversasi, yang merupakan tempat panas penelitian di tahun-tahun terakhir. Namun, model pengkode saraf konvensional cenderung menghasilkan respon biasa seperti 'Saya tidak tahu' tidak peduli apa input itu. Dalam kertas ini, kami menganalisis masalah ini dari sudut pandang baru: vektor latent. Berdasarkan itu, kami mengusulkan cadangan belajar mudah untuk diperoleh bernama MEMD (Multi-Encoder ke Multi-Decoder), di mana pengekode bantuan dan pengekode bantuan diperkenalkan untuk menyediakan petunjuk latihan yang diperlukan tanpa menggunakan data ekstra atau menyusun struktur dalam jaringan. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kita secara efektif meningkatkan kualitas respon yang dihasilkan menurut metrik otomatis dan evaluasi manusia, memberikan respon yang lebih berbeda dan licin.", 'de': 'Neuronale Encoder-Decoder-Modelle wurden weit verbreitet für die Erzeugung von Konversationsantworten angewendet, die ein Forschungshot-Spot in den letzten Jahren ist. Herkömmliche neuronale Encoder-Decoder-Modelle neigen jedoch dazu, alltägliche Antworten wie "Ich weiß nicht" zu erzeugen, unabhängig davon, was der Eingang ist. In diesem Beitrag analysieren wir dieses Problem aus einer neuen Perspektive: latente Vektoren. Darauf aufbauend schlagen wir ein einfach zu erweiterndes Lernframework namens MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder) vor, in dem ein Hilfsencoder und ein Hilfsdecoder eingeführt werden, um notwendige Schulungsanleitungen bereitzustellen, ohne auf zusätzliche Daten zurückzugreifen oder die innere Struktur des Netzwerks zu erschweren. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere Methode die Qualität der generierten Antworten anhand automatischer Metriken und menschlicher Auswertungen effektiv verbessert und zu vielfältigeren und reibungsloseren Antworten führt.', 'fa': 'مدل\u200cهای رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی عصبی برای نسل پاسخ\u200cدهنده\u200cی مکالمه\u200cای که در سال\u200cهای اخیر یک نقطه جذاب تحقیق می\u200cکند، وسیع کاربرد شده\u200cاند. با این حال، مدل\u200cهای رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cهای عصبی معمولی به عنوان پاسخ\u200cهای معمولی مانند «نمی\u200cدانم» به هر حال ورودی چیه. در این کاغذ، ما این مشکل را از دیدگاه جدید تحلیل می کنیم: ویکتورهای latent. بر اساس آن، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک چهارچوب آموزش آسانی به نام MEMD (Multi-Encoder به Multi-Decoder) که در آن یک کودهر کمک و یک dekoder کمک برای هدایت آموزش نیاز بدون اجازه دادن داده\u200cهای اضافه یا ساختار داخلی شبکه پیچیده می\u200cشود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما به طور موثرت کیفیت پاسخ\u200cهای تولید شده را بر اساس متریک\u200cهای خودکار و ارزیابی\u200cهای انسان بهبود می\u200cدهد، و جواب\u200cهای مختلف\u200cتر و آسانتر می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': "Mradi wa kodi ya neura umetumiwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwa ajili ya kizazi cha mazungumzo, ambacho ni sehemu ya utafiti yenye moto katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. Hata hivyo, mifano ya kodi ya kawaida huenda kutengeneza majibu ya kawaida kama 'sijui' bila kujali kile kinachoingia. Katika karatasi hii, tunachambua tatizo hili kutoka mtazamo mpya: vectors za hivi karibuni. Kwa mujibu wa hilo, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kujifunza rahisi unaoitwa MEMD (Kujumuisha Ujumbe wa Zaidi wa Miongoni), ambapo kodi ya ushirikiano na kodi ya ziada inaonyesha kutoa maelekezo yanayohitajika bila kutumia taarifa za ziada au kutumia muundo wa ndani wa mtandao wa intaneti. Experimental results demonstrate that our method effectively improve the quality of generated responses according to automatic metrics and human evaluations, yielding more diverse and smooth replies.", 'am': 'የኔural encoder-decoder models በጊዜው ባለፉት ዓመታት ውይይት ለጥያቄ መልስ ትውልድ የተጠቃሚ ቦታ ነው፡፡ ነገር ግን የባሕላዊ የሆኑት የኮድዶር-የድምፅ መልስ ‹አላውቅም› ምንም እንኳን ቢሆንም ማድረግ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ይህንን ጉዳይ ከአዲስ ስሜት እናስተምር::አዲስ መንገድ በሚያሳየው፣ MEMD (Multi-Encoder ለMulti-Decoder) የሚባልን ለቀላል ትምህርት መሠረት መፍረጃን እና የመግለጫ ኮድ መግለጫ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ እና መረብ ውስጥነት መግለጫ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ ማቅረብ መግለጫ እና መግለጫ ማቅረብ በማይችል እና ፈተና ፍሬዎች፣ የፍጥረታችን ሥርዓት የፍጥረት መልስ ጥያቄን በማድረግ እና የሰው ውጤቶች በማድረግ እና ብዙ ልዩ ልዩ እና ቀላል መልሶችን እንዲሰጥ ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': 'Neurale enkoder-dekoder modele is heeltemal aangepas na omskakelike reaksie genereering, wat is \'n reseksie warm spot in onlangse jaar. Alhoewel, konvensionele neurale enkoder- dekoder modele tendeer na genereer gemeenskaplike reaksies soos "Ek weet nie" ongeag van wat die invoer is. In hierdie papier, ons analyseer hierdie probleem van \'n nuwe perspektief: latent vektore. Ons voorstel daarop \'n maklik na-uitbreiding leer raamwerk genaamd MEMD (Multi-Encoder na Multi-Decoder), waarin \'n hulpbrekender en \'n hulpbrekende dekoder ingevoer word om nodige onderwerp gidse te verskaf sonder om te kort na ekstra data of komplisering netwerk se binneste struktuur. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons metode effektief die kwaliteit van genereerde reaksies verbeter volgens outomatiese metries en menslike evaluasies, wat meer verskeie en glade antwoorde vergeet.', 'tr': 'Nural ködleme modelleri taryh etmek üçin ullanýar. Bu son ýyllarda araştyrma sıcak nokadyr. Bu şekilde, geleneksel nöral kodlayıcı modelleri, girişin ne olduğuna rağmen bu şekilde sıradan sorgular oluşturur. Bu kağıtda, bu sorunu yeni bir perspektivden analiz ediyoruz: geçmiş vektörler. Munuň üstine biz MEMD (Multi-Encoder) adynda ýeňil öwrenmek üçin ýeňil öwrenmek framyny teklip edýäris we onuň içinde kömekleyici koder we kömekleyici koder bolup gerekli öwrenmek üçin gerekli öwrenmek gurultatyny saýlamak üçin guruldyrylýar. Testiýa netijeleri biziň ýüregimiziň ulaganyň özünden üretilen jogaplaryň kalitesini awtomatik metriýa we adamlaryň deňleşmelerine görä täsirli ýagdaýda gowurak bolandygyny görkez.', 'sq': 'Modelet e koduesit-dekoderit nervor janë aplikuar gjerësisht në gjeneratën e përgjigjes bisedimore, e cila është një kërkim i nxehtë në vitet e fundit. Megjithatë, modelet konvencionale t ë koduesit-dekoderit nervor kanë tendencë të gjenerojnë përgjigje të zakonshme si "Nuk e di" pavarësisht se çfarë është input. In this paper, we analyze this problem from a new perspective: latent vectors.  Bazuar në këtë, ne propozojmë një kuadër mësimi të lehtë për të zgjeruar të quajtur MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), në të cilin një kodues ndihmës dhe një dekoder ndihmës janë futur për të ofruar udhëzime të nevojshme trajnimi pa përdorur të dhëna shtesë apo ndërlikuar strukturën e brendshme të rrjetit. Rezultatet eksperimentale demonstrojnë se metoda jonë përmirëson efektivisht cilësinë e përgjigjeve të gjeneruara sipas metrikave automatike dhe vlerësimeve njerëzore, duke dhënë përgjigje më të ndryshme dhe të lehta.', 'az': 'Nöral koder-dekoder modelləri müzakirə cavab verənlərə çox uyğunlaşdırılmışdır. Bu son illərdə araşdırma sıcak noktasıdır. Halbuki, yayılan nöral kodlayıcı modellər içərisində nə olduğuna baxmayaraq "bilmirəm" kimi sıradan cavab verər. Bu kağızda, bu problemi yeni bir perspektivdən analiz edirik: latent vektörlər. Buna baxmayaraq, biz MEMD adlı öyrənmə qurğusunu asanlaşdırmaq üçün təklif edirik, içində kömək kodlayıcı və yardımcı dekoder daxilində daxil məlumatların daxilində olmadan, ehtiyacı olan təhsil yolu göstərmək üçün təhsil edilməsi üçün təhsil edirik. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları göstərir ki, təşkil edilmiş reaksiyonların kalitetini otomatik metriklərə və insan değerlendirmələrinə görə, daha müxtəlif və düzgün cavab verir.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային կոդերի-կոդերի մոդելները լայնորեն կիրառվել են հաղորդակցման արձագանքի սերունդների համար, որը վերջին տարիների ընթացքում հետազոտությունների տաք կետ է: Այնուամենայնիվ, ավանդական նյարդային կոդավորման մոդելները հակված են ստեղծել ընդհանուր արձագանքներ, ինչպիսիք են «Չգիտեմ» անկախ նյութից: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք վերլուծում ենք այս խնդիրը նոր տեսանկյունից՝ թաքնված վեկտորներից: Հաշվի առնելով դրան, մենք առաջարկում ենք մի հեշտ ընդլայնելի ուսումնական շրջանակ, որը կոչվում է "Մեծ-կոդեր բազմա-կոդեր", որտեղ ներկայացվում է օգնական կոդեր և օգնական կոդեր, որպեսզի տրամադրվի անհրաժեշտ ուսումնական ուղղություն առանց օգտագործելու ավելին տվյալներ կամ բարդ կառու Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը արդյունավետ բարելավում է ստեղծված արձագանքների որակը, ըստ ավտոմատիկ մետրիկայի և մարդկային գնահատումների, բերելով ավելի բազմազան և հարմար պատասխաններ:', 'bn': "সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোর মধ্যে একটি গবেষণা গবেষণা গরম স্থান। তবে সাধারণ নিউরেল এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল সাধারণ স্থানের প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করে যেমন 'আমি জানি না' ইনপুট কি হোক না কেন। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এই সমস্যা নতুন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে বিশ্লেষণ করি: সাম্প্রতিক ভেক্টর। এর ভিত্তিতে আমরা মেএমডি নামের একটি সহজ-বাড়াতে শিক্ষা কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করি (বহুল ডিকোডারের জন্য মাল্টি এনকোডার), যেখানে একটি প্রতিযোগিতা এনকোডার এবং এক্সিলিয়ের ডেকোডার পরিচালনা করা হয় যা পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি স্বয়ংক্রিয় মেট্রিক এবং মানুষের মূল্য অনুসারে সৃষ্টি করা প্রতিক্রিয়ার মানে কার্যকর কর করে উন্নত", 'bs': 'Modeli neuronskog kodera široko su primjenjeni na generaciju razgovornog odgovora, što je u posljednjih godina istraživanje vruće mjesto. Međutim, konvencionalni modeli neuralnog kodera-dekodera obično stvaraju uobičajene odgovore poput "ne znam" bez obzira šta je ulaz. U ovom papiru analiziramo ovaj problem iz novih perspektiva: latentni vektori. Na temelju toga predlažemo lako proširenje učenjskog okvira po imenu MEMD (Multi-Encoder za Multi-Decoder), u kojem se uvede pomoćni koder i pomoćni dekoder kako bi pružili potrebne upute za obuku bez rezultacije dodatnih podataka ili kompliciranja unutrašnje strukture mreže. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naša metoda učinkovito poboljšava kvalitet proizvedenih odgovora prema automatskim metrikama i ljudskim procjenama, dajući različite i glatne odgovore.', 'ca': "Els models de decodificació neuronal s'han aplicat ampliament a la generació de resposta conversacional, que és un punt de recerca calent en els últims anys. However, conventional neural encoder-decoder models tend to generate commonplace responses like 'I don't know' regardless of what the input is.  En aquest article, analitzem aquest problem a d'una nova perspectiva: vectors latents. Sobre la base d'això, proposem un marc d'aprenentatge fàcil d'estendre anomenat MEMD (Multicodificador a Multicodificador), en el qual s'introdueix un codificador auxiliar i un codificador auxiliar per proporcionar orientació de formació necessària sense recurrir a dades adicionals o complicar l'estructura interior de la xarxa. Els resultats experimentals demostren que el nostre mètode millora efectivament la qualitat de les respostes generades segons les mètriques automàtiques i les evaluacions humanes, donant respostes més diverses i senzilles.", 'et': 'Närvikodeeri-dekooderi mudeleid on laialdaselt rakendatud vestlusreaktsiooni genereerimisel, mis on viimastel aastatel uuringute kuumpunkt. Tavapärased neurokodeeri-dekooderi mudelid kipuvad siiski genereerima tavalisi vastuseid nagu "Ma ei tea", olenemata sellest, mis sisend on. Selles töös analüüsime seda probleemi uuest vaatenurgast: latentsed vektorid. Selle põhjal pakume välja lihtsalt laiendatava õpperaamistiku nimega MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), kus kasutusele võetakse abikodeerija ja abidekooder, et anda vajalikke koolitusjuhiseid ilma lisaandmete kasutamiseta või raskendamata võrgu sisemist struktuuri. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod tõhusalt parandab genereeritud vastuste kvaliteeti vastavalt automaatsetele mõõdikutele ja inimhinnangutele, andes mitmekesisemaid ja sujuvamaid vastuseid.', 'cs': 'Modely neurálních kodérů a dekodérů byly široce aplikovány na generování konverzační odezvy, což je v posledních letech horkým bodem výzkumu. Nicméně, konvenční neuronové kodéry-dekodéry modely mají tendenci generovat běžné reakce, jako je "Nevím", bez ohledu na to, jaký vstup je. V tomto článku analyzujeme tento problém z nové perspektivy: latentní vektory. Na základě něj navrhujeme snadno rozšířitelný učební framework s názvem MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), ve kterém jsou zavedeny pomocné snímače a pomocný dekodér, které poskytují potřebné školení vedení bez uchylování se k dalším datům nebo komplikace vnitřní struktury sítě. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše metoda efektivně zlepšuje kvalitu generovaných odpovědí podle automatických metrik a lidských hodnocení, čímž přináší rozmanitější a hladší odpovědi.', 'fi': 'Neurokooderi-dekooderimalleja on sovellettu laajasti keskusteluvasteen tuottamiseen, joka on tutkimuksen hotspot viime vuosina. Perinteiset neurokooderi-dekooderimallit tuottavat kuitenkin tavallisia vastauksia, kuten "en tiedä", riippumatta siitä, mitä syöttö on. Tässä artikkelissa analysoimme tätä ongelmaa uudesta näkökulmasta: latenteista vektoreista. Sen pohjalta ehdotamme helposti laajennettavaa oppimiskehystä nimeltä MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), jossa otetaan käyttöön apukooderi ja apudekooderi, jotka antavat tarvittavaa koulutusohjausta turvautumatta ylimääräiseen dataan tai vaikeuttamatta verkon sisäistä rakennetta. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että menetelmämme parantaa tehokkaasti tuotettujen vastausten laatua automaattisten mittareiden ja ihmisten arviointien avulla, tuottaen monipuolisempia ja sujuvampia vastauksia.', 'jv': 'model de koder-decoder politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness InsertInsert" [Entry] "at the end Ngawe digawe nggunakake kuwi, kita supoyo akeh lan gampang-pakan kanggo ngilangno hukum nggambar MEMP Perintah sing paling-perintah uwong ngomongke awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang penggunaké sing luwih apik dhéwé kuwi mau, kuwi nggawe barang sistem sing otomatik karo dolang-dolang sing uwong, winih uwong sing paling-uwong sing apik lan tambah bantuan.', 'ha': "An amfani da misãlai na kode-kode-neural don a yi amfani da su kode wa mai haɗuwa da matsayi, wanda ke zama wani matsayi mai hoto a cikin shekara na farko. A lokacin da, misãlai na kode-kode-na'ura na ɗabi'a, za su iya ƙiƙiro majibu masu zama daidai kamar 'Ban sani' ko da yauni na cikin. Ga wannan takardan, Munã yin anayya ga wannan matabbata daga wani mtazami na dabam: masu sakata. Basan da shi, Munã ƙayyade wani firam mai amfani da kwamfyuta mai sauƙi zuwa-faɗi sunan MEMD (Muda-Encodir zuwa Muda-Koder), a cikinsa, za'a introduce wani kodi mai inganci da kwamfyuta masu inganci dõmin a bãyar da shiryarwa wanda ake amfani da shi don ya yi amfani da wa ƙara data ko kuma za'a lissafa wa tsarin na'urar da ke ƙarani. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa metric da metric da mutane, yana ƙara musamman dabam-dabam da sauri.", 'sk': 'Modeli živčnih kodirnikov-dekodirnih modelov se široko uporabljajo za generiranje pogovornih odzivov, ki je v zadnjih letih vroča točka raziskav. Vendar pa običajni modeli nevronskih kodirnikov-dekoderjev ponavadi ustvarjajo običajne odzive, kot je "ne vem", ne glede na to, kaj je vhod. V prispevku analiziramo ta problem iz nove perspektive: latentnih vektorjev. Na podlagi tega predlagamo enostaven za razširitev učnega okvira MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), v katerem sta uvedena pomožni kodirnik in pomožni dekodirnik za zagotavljanje potrebnih smernic za usposabljanje brez uporabe dodatnih podatkov ali zapletenja notranje strukture omrežja. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naša metoda učinkovito izboljšuje kakovost ustvarjenih odzivov v skladu s samodejnimi metrikami in človeškimi vrednotenji, kar prinaša bolj raznolike in gladke odgovore.', 'he': 'דוגמני קודד-קידור נוירואלים הופעו באופן רחב לדור התגובה לשיחה, שזה נקודת חם מחקר בשנים האחרונות. בכל אופן, דוגמנים קונסיונציוניים של קודד-קידור עצבי נוטים לייצר תגובות משותפות כמו "אני לא יודע" לא משנה מה זה הכניסה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מנתחים את הבעיה הזאת מנקודת מבט חדשה: ווקטורים מוסתרים. בהתבסס עליו, אנו מציעים מסגרת לימוד קלה להאריך בשם MEMD (קודד רבי למקודד רבי), שבה קודד עזרי ומקודד עזרי מוצג כדי לספק כיוון הכרחי בלי להשתמש בנתונים נוספים או מסבך את המבנה הפנימי של הרשת. תוצאות ניסויים מראות ששיטתנו משפר באופן יעיל את איכות התגובות שנוצרות על פי מטריקה אוטומטית והערכות האנושית, ומביאה תשובות יותר מגוונות ומחלקות.', 'bo': "དཔེ་དབུས་ཀྱི་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌིར་ཌིའོ་ཌིར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་ནང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་འཕགས་ཀྱི་བསླབ་སྒྲུབ་ལ་འཇུག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་དཔེ་དབུས་ཀྱི་ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌིར་ཌིཀ་ཌིར་ཐབས་རྣམས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་ཚན་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཔེར་ན། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་མཐོང་བའི་མཐོང་སྣང་གསར་བ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་གི་ཡོད། Based on it, we propose an easy-to-extend learning framework named MEMD (Multi-Encoder to Multi-Decoder), in which an auxiliary encoder and an auxiliary decoder are introduced to provide necessary training guidance without resorting to extra data or complicating network's inner structure. Experimental results demonstrate that our method effectively improve the quality of generated responses according to automatic metrics and human evaluations, yielding more diverse and smooth replies."}
{'en': 'An Evaluation of Neural Machine Translation Models on Historical Spelling Normalization', 'ar': 'تقييم لنماذج الترجمة الآلية العصبية في تطبيع الإملاء التاريخي', 'pt': 'Uma avaliação de modelos de tradução automática neural na normalização ortográfica histórica', 'es': 'Una evaluación de los modelos neuronales de traducción automática sobre la normalización ortográfica histórica', 'fr': 'Évaluation de modèles de traduction automatique neuronale sur la normalisation orthographique historique', 'hi': 'ऐतिहासिक वर्तनी सामान्यीकरण पर तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल का मूल्यांकन', 'ja': '歴史的スペル正規化における神経機械翻訳モデルの評価', 'zh': '史拼写规范化神经机器翻译模形之评', 'ru': 'Оценка моделей нейронного машинного перевода на основе исторической орфографической нормализации', 'ga': 'Meastóireacht ar Mhúnlaí Aistrithe Néaracha Meaisín ar Normalú Litrithe Stairiúil', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση μοντέλων νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης στην ιστορική τυποποίηση', 'hu': 'Neurális gépi fordítási modellek értékelése a történelmi helyesírás normalizációjáról', 'it': 'Valutazione dei modelli di traduzione automatica neurale sulla normalizzazione ortografica storica', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Таригиялық емле нормализациясындағы нейрондық машинаның аудару үлгілерін оқу', 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašinų vertimo modelių, susijusių su istoriniu ortografiniu raštu normalizavimu, vertinimas', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ചരിത്രത്തിലെ അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയത്തിന്റെ നെയുറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രത്യേക പരിശോധന', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Түүхэн бичлэгийн нормализацийн мэдрэлийн машин орчуулах загварын үнэлгээ', 'pl': 'Ocena neuronowych modeli tłumaczenia maszynowego w historycznej normalizacji pisowni', 'ro': 'Evaluarea modelelor de traducere automată neurală privind normalizarea ortografiei istorice', 'si': 'Name', 'mt': 'Evalwazzjoni ta’ Mudelli ta’ Traduzzjoni ta’ Magni Newrali dwar in-Normalizzazzjoni Storika tal-Ortografija', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'sr': 'Evaluacija modela neurološkog prevoda uređaja o normalizaciji istorijskog pisma', 'so': 'Evaluation of Neural machine Translation Models on Historical Spelling Normalization', 'sv': 'En utvĂ¤rdering av neurala maskinĂ¶versĂ¤ttningsmodeller pĂ¥ historisk stavning normalisering', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bài đánh giá cấu trúc thần kinh về hoá đơn Câu nói lịch sử', 'bg': 'Оценка на моделите на неврален машинен превод за историческа нормализация на правописа', 'hr': 'Evaluacija modela neurološkog prevoda uređaja o normalizaciji povijesnih pisma', 'da': 'En evaluering af neurale maskinoversættelsesmodeller på historisk stavning normalisering', 'nl': 'Een evaluatie van neuronale machinevertaalmodellen op historische spellingsnormalisatie', 'ko': '역사 맞춤법 규범화에 기초한 신경기계 번역 모델 평가', 'de': 'Eine Bewertung neuronaler maschineller Übersetzungsmodelle zur historischen Rechtschreibnormalisierung', 'id': 'Sebuah Evaluasi Model Translation Mesin Neural pada Normalisasi Spelling Sejarah', 'sw': 'Tathmini ya Utafiti wa Mashine ya Kifaransa kuhusu Uchunguzi wa Habari wa Kihistoria', 'tr': 'Nural Maşynyň Terjime Mody Taryhy Ymlany Däplikeýşende Taýýarlama', 'fa': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një vlerësim i modeleve të përkthimit të makinave nervore mbi Normalizacionin Historik të Zgjidhjes', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելների գնահատումը պատմական գրության նորմալիզացիայի մասին', 'az': 'Tarihi 캻ml톛r Normalizat캼 bar톛sind톛 N칬ral Makin 칂eviri Modell톛rinin Q캼ymeti', 'ca': 'Una evaluació dels models de traducció de màquines neurones sobre normalització ortogràfica històrica', 'am': 'An Evaluation of Neural Machine Translation Models on Historical Spelling Normalization', 'cs': 'Hodnocení neuronových strojových překladů na historické normalizaci pravopisu', 'bn': 'Name', 'et': 'Neuraalse masintõlke mudelite hindamine ajaloolise õigekirja normaliseerimise kohta', 'fi': 'Neuraalisten konekäännösmallien arviointi historiallisesta oikeinkirjoituksen normalisoinnista', 'bs': 'Evaluacija modela neurološkog prevoda uređaja o normalizaciji povijesnih pisma', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Ocena modelov nevralnega strojnega prevajanja o normalizaciji zgodovinskega črkovanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'הערכה של דוגמני התרגום של מכונות נוירויות על נורמליזציה של כתיבה היסטורית', 'bo': 'Historical Spelling Normalization'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we apply different NMT models to the problem of historical spelling normalization for five languages : English, German, Hungarian, Icelandic, and Swedish. The NMT models are at different levels, have different attention mechanisms, and different neural network architectures. Our results show that NMT models are much better than SMT models in terms of character error rate. The vanilla RNNs are competitive to GRUs / LSTMs in historical spelling normalization. Transformer models perform better only when provided with more training data. We also find that subword-level models with a small subword vocabulary are better than character-level models. In addition, we propose a hybrid method which further improves the performance of historical spelling normalization.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نطبق نماذج مختلفة من NMT على مشكلة تطبيع الإملاء التاريخي لخمس لغات: الإنجليزية والألمانية والهنغارية والأيسلندية والسويدية. توجد نماذج NMT على مستويات مختلفة ، ولها آليات انتباه مختلفة ، وبنى شبكة عصبية مختلفة. تظهر نتائجنا أن نماذج NMT أفضل بكثير من نماذج SMT من حيث معدل خطأ الأحرف. إن الفانيليا RNNs منافسة لـ GRUs / LSTMs في تطبيع الإملاء التاريخي. تعمل نماذج المحولات بشكل أفضل فقط عند تزويدها بمزيد من بيانات التدريب. نجد أيضًا أن النماذج على مستوى الكلمات الفرعية ذات مفردات الكلمات الفرعية الصغيرة أفضل من النماذج على مستوى الأحرف. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقترح طريقة هجينة تعمل على تحسين أداء التطبيع الإملائي التاريخي.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous appliquons différents modèles NMT au problème de la normalisation orthographique historique pour cinq langues\xa0: anglais, allemand, hongrois, islandais et suédois. Les modèles NMT se situent à différents niveaux, ont des mécanismes d'attention différents et des architectures de réseaux neuronaux différentes. Nos résultats montrent que les modèles NMT sont bien meilleurs que les modèles SMT en termes de taux d'erreur de caractères. Les RNN Vanilla sont compétitifs par rapport aux GRUS/LSTM dans la normalisation orthographique historique. Les modèles de transformateurs ne sont plus performants que s'ils disposent de données d'entraînement supplémentaires Nous constatons également que les modèles au niveau des sous-mots avec un petit vocabulaire de sous-mots sont meilleurs que les modèles au niveau des caractères. En outre, nous proposons une méthode hybride qui améliore encore les performances de la normalisation orthographique historique.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, aplicamos diferentes modelos NMT ao problema de normalização ortográfica histórica para cinco idiomas: inglês, alemão, húngaro, islandês e sueco. Os modelos NMT estão em diferentes níveis, possuem diferentes mecanismos de atenção e diferentes arquiteturas de rede neural. Nossos resultados mostram que os modelos NMT são muito melhores do que os modelos SMT em termos de taxa de erro de caracteres. As RNNs vanilla são competitivas com as GRUs/LSTMs na normalização ortográfica histórica. Os modelos de transformador têm melhor desempenho apenas quando fornecidos com mais dados de treinamento. Também descobrimos que os modelos de nível de subpalavra com um vocabulário de subpalavra pequeno são melhores do que os modelos de nível de caractere. Além disso, propomos um método híbrido que melhora ainda mais o desempenho da normalização ortográfica histórica.', 'es': 'En este artículo, aplicamos diferentes modelos de NMT al problema de la normalización ortográfica histórica para cinco idiomas: inglés, alemán, húngaro, islandés y sueco. Los modelos de NMT están en diferentes niveles, tienen diferentes mecanismos de atención y diferentes arquitecturas de redes neuronales. Nuestros resultados muestran que los modelos NMT son mucho mejores que los modelos SMT en términos de tasa de error de caracteres. Los RNN vainilla son competitivos con los GRUS/LSTM en la normalización ortográfica histórica. Los modelos de transformadores funcionan mejor solo cuando se les proporcionan más datos de entrenamiento. También encontramos que los modelos a nivel de subpalabras con un vocabulario de subpalabras pequeño son mejores que los modelos a nivel de caracteres. Además, proponemos un método híbrido que mejora aún más el rendimiento de la normalización ortográfica histórica.', 'ja': '本稿では、英語、ドイツ語、ハンガリー語、アイスランド語、スウェーデン語の5言語の歴史的スペル正規化の問題に異なるNMTモデルを適用する。ＮＭＴモデルは、異なるレベルであり、異なる注目メカニズムを有し、異なるニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャを有する。我々の結果は、NMTモデルは文字エラー率の点でSMTモデルよりもはるかに優れていることを示しています。バニラＲＮＮは、歴史的なスペルの正規化においてＧＲＵ ／ ＬＳＴＭと競合する。変圧器モデルは、より多くのトレーニングデータが提供されている場合にのみ、より良いパフォーマンスを発揮します。また、小さなサブワード語彙を持つサブワードレベルのモデルは、キャラクターレベルのモデルよりも優れていることがわかります。さらに、歴史的なスペル正規化の性能をさらに向上させるハイブリッド法を提案します。', 'zh': '其在本文,NMT用五语拼写规范化:英语,德语,匈牙利语,冰岛语瑞典语。 NMT形异水,异机异神经网络架构。 结果表明,NMT字符错误率多于SMT。 于史拼写规范化,始 RNN 与 GRU/LSTM 有竞争力。 唯当益练数,转换器模则愈。 又见少量子词词汇表子词级模形比字符级模。 此外混法,进一步提高拼写规范化史性也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम पांच भाषाओं के लिए ऐतिहासिक वर्तनी सामान्यीकरण की समस्या के लिए विभिन्न एनएमटी मॉडल लागू करते हैं: अंग्रेजी, जर्मन, हंगेरियन, आइसलैंडिक और स्वीडिश। एनएमटी मॉडल विभिन्न स्तरों पर हैं, अलग-अलग ध्यान तंत्र हैं, और विभिन्न तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर हैं। हमारे परिणाम बताते हैं कि एनएमटी मॉडल चरित्र त्रुटि दर के मामले में एसएमटी मॉडल की तुलना में बहुत बेहतर हैं। वेनिला आरएनएन ऐतिहासिक वर्तनी सामान्यीकरण में जीआरआई / एलएसटीएम के लिए प्रतिस्पर्धी हैं। ट्रांसफॉर्मर मॉडल केवल तभी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं जब अधिक प्रशिक्षण डेटा प्रदान किया जाता है। हम यह भी पाते हैं कि एक छोटे से सबवर्ड शब्दावली के साथ सबवर्ड-स्तर के मॉडल चरित्र-स्तर के मॉडल से बेहतर हैं। इसके अलावा, हम एक हाइब्रिड विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो ऐतिहासिक वर्तनी सामान्यीकरण के प्रदर्शन में और सुधार करता है।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы применяем различные модели НМТ к проблеме нормализации исторического правописания для пяти языков: английского, немецкого, венгерского, исландского и шведского. Модели NMT находятся на разных уровнях, имеют разные механизмы внимания и разные архитектуры нейронных сетей. Наши результаты показывают, что модели NMT намного лучше моделей SMT с точки зрения частоты ошибок символов. Ванильные RNN конкурируют с GRU/LSTM в нормализации исторического правописания. Модели трансформаторов работают лучше только при наличии большего количества обучающих данных. Мы также обнаружили, что подсловообразные модели с небольшим подслововым словарным запасом лучше, чем персонажевые модели. Кроме того, мы предлагаем гибридный метод, который дополнительно улучшает производительность нормализации исторического правописания.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid múnlaí éagsúla NMT i bhfeidhm ar fhadhb normalú litrithe stairiúil do chúig theanga: Béarla, Gearmáinis, Ungáiris, Íoslainnis agus Sualainnis. Tá na samhlacha NMT ag leibhéil éagsúla, tá meicníochtaí aird éagsúla acu, agus ailtireachtaí líonra néaracha éagsúla. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go bhfuil samhlacha NMT i bhfad níos fearr ná samhlacha SMT i dtéarmaí ráta earráide carachtair. Tá na RNNanna fanaile iomaíoch le GRUanna/LSTManna maidir le normalú litrithe stairiúil. Feidhmíonn samhlacha claochladán níos fearr ach amháin nuair a chuirtear níos mó sonraí oiliúna ar fáil dóibh. Faighimid amach freisin gur fearr samhlacha leibhéal fofhocail a bhfuil foclóir beag fofhocail acu ná samhlacha ar leibhéal carachtar. Ina theannta sin, molaimid modh hibrideach a fheabhsaíonn feidhmíocht normalú litrithe stairiúil tuilleadh.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ განსხვავებული NMT მოდელების გამოყენება ისტორიური წერილების ნორმალიზაციის პრობლემაში ხუთ ენაზე: ანგლისური, გერმანეთი, გუნდარიი, თლანდიული და შვედიული NMT მოდელები განსხვავებული დონეში არიან, არიან განსხვავებული ინტერნეციის მექანემისთვის და განსხვავებული ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტურები. ჩვენი წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენება, რომ NMT მოდელები უფრო უკეთესია SMT მოდელებისგან, როგორც სიმბოლოების შეცდომა სიმართზე. განილია RNN კონპექტიურია GRUs/LSTMs-თან ისტორიური სიკითხვის ნორმალიზაციაში. ტრანფორმაციის მოდელები უკეთესია მხოლოდ, როდესაც უფრო მეტი განათლების მონაცემებით მომხმარება. ჩვენ ასევე აღმოჩნეთ, რომ სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო მოდე დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაპირებთ ჰიბრიდის მეტი, რომელიც უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, εφαρμόζουμε διαφορετικά μοντέλα στο πρόβλημα της κανονικοποίησης της ιστορικής ορθογραφίας για πέντε γλώσσες: αγγλικά, γερμανικά, ουγγρικά, ισλανδικά και σουηδικά. Τα μοντέλα βρίσκονται σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα, έχουν διαφορετικούς μηχανισμούς προσοχής και διαφορετικές αρχιτεκτονικές νευρωνικών δικτύων. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν ότι τα μοντέλα είναι πολύ καλύτερα από τα μοντέλα όσον αφορά το ποσοστό σφαλμάτων χαρακτήρων. Τα RNN βανίλιας είναι ανταγωνιστικά με GRU/LSTMs στην ιστορική ορθογραφία ομαλοποίηση. Τα μοντέλα μετασχηματιστών αποδίδουν καλύτερα μόνο όταν παρέχονται με περισσότερα δεδομένα κατάρτισης. Επίσης, διαπιστώνουμε ότι τα μοντέλα επιπέδου υπολέξεων με μικρό λεξιλόγιο υπολέξεων είναι καλύτερα από τα μοντέλα επιπέδου χαρακτήρων. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε μια υβριδική μέθοδο που βελτιώνει περαιτέρω την απόδοση της ιστορικής ορθογραφικής ομαλοποίησης.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз бес тілдерге тарихлық емлер нормализациясының түрлі NMT үлгілерін: ағылшын, неміс, Венгрия, Исландия және Швед тілдерінің мәселесіне қолданамыз. NMT үлгілері әртүрлі деңгейлерде, әртүрлі түсініктер механизмі және әртүрлі неврал желі архитектуралары бар. Біздің нәтижеміз NMT үлгілері SMT үлгілерінен артық болатынын көрсетеді. Ванилла RNN тарихлық емлеулердің нормализациясында GRUs/LSTMs-ге сәйкес келеді. Трансформация үлгілері тек бірнеше оқыту деректері келтірілгенде жақсы жұмыс істейді. Біз сондай-ақ кішкентай ішкі сөздер үлгілері таңбалардың деңгейіндегі үлгілерінен жақсы болады. Қосымша, біз тарихый мәтін нормализациясының істеуін жақсартатын гибрид әдісін ұсынамыз.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban különböző NMT modelleket alkalmazunk a történelmi helyesírás normalizálásának problémájára öt nyelven: angol, német, magyar, izlandi és svéd. Az NMT modellek különböző szinteken vannak, különböző figyelemmechanizmusokkal és különböző neurális hálózati architektúrákkal rendelkeznek. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy az NMT modellek karakterhibák szempontjából sokkal jobb, mint az SMT modellek. A vanília RNN-ek versenyképesek a GRU/LSTMs-ekkel a történelmi helyesírás normalizálásában. A transzformátormodellek csak akkor teljesítenek jobban, ha több edzési adatot tartalmaznak. Azt is találjuk, hogy az alszó szintű modellek kis alszó szókincsekkel jobbak, mint a karakter szintű modellek. Ezenkívül olyan hibrid módszert javasolunk, amely tovább javítja a történelmi helyesírás normalizálásának teljesítményét.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, применуваме различни НМТ модели на проблемот на историската нормализација на правописот за пет јазици: англиски, германски, унгарски, исландски и шведски. Моделите на НМТ се на различни нивоа, имаат различни механизми на внимание и различни архитектури на нервната мрежа. Нашите резултати покажуваат дека НМТ моделите се многу подобри од СМТ моделите во однос на стапката на грешки на карактерите. Ванила РНН се конкурентни со GRUs/LSTMs во историска нормализација на правописот. Трансформираните модели се подобри само кога се обезбедуваат повеќе податоци за обука. Исто така, откривме дека моделите на ниво на подзборови со мал речник на подзборови се подобри од моделите на ниво на карактери. Покрај тоа, предложуваме хибриден метод кој понатаму ја подобрува извршноста на историската нормализација на правописот.', 'it': "In questo articolo, applichiamo diversi modelli NMT al problema della normalizzazione ortografica storica per cinque lingue: inglese, tedesco, ungherese, islandese e svedese. I modelli NMT sono a diversi livelli, hanno diversi meccanismi di attenzione e diverse architetture di rete neurale. I nostri risultati mostrano che i modelli NMT sono molto migliori dei modelli SMT in termini di tasso di errore dei caratteri. Gli RNN alla vaniglia sono competitivi rispetto ai GRU/LSTMs nella normalizzazione storica dell'ortografia. I modelli Transformer funzionano meglio solo quando vengono forniti più dati di allenamento. Troviamo anche che i modelli a livello di subparola con un piccolo vocabolario di subparola sono migliori dei modelli a livello di carattere. Inoltre, proponiamo un metodo ibrido che migliora ulteriormente le prestazioni della normalizzazione ortografica storica.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ NMT മോഡലുകള്\u200d അഞ്ചു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കായി ചരിത്രത്തിലെ അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിപ്പിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക് NMT models are different levels, different attention mechanisms and different neural network architectures. നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് NMT മോഡലുകള്\u200d SMT മോഡലുകളെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ലതാണെന്നാണ്. ചരിത്രത്തിലെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സാധാരണ വാക്കുകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d മാത്രം ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ഫാര്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തി ഒരു ചെറിയ സബ്\u200cവോര്\u200dഡ് പദവിയുള്ള സബ്\u200cവോര്\u200dഡ് നില മോഡലുകള്\u200d അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ നില മോഡലുകളെക്കാള്\u200d നല്ലതാണെന്ന അതുകൂടാതെ, ചരിത്രത്തിലെ വാക്കുകളുടെ സാധാരണ സ്വാഭാവികമാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രകടനത്തെ കൂടുതല്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടു', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed napplikaw mudelli NMT differenti għall-problema tan-normalizzazzjoni storika tal-ortografija għal ħames lingwi: Ingliż, Ġermaniż, Ungeriż, Islandiż u Żvediż. Il-mudelli NMT huma f’livelli differenti, għandhom mekkaniżmi differenti ta’ attenzjoni, u arkitetturi differenti tan-netwerks newrali. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru li l-mudelli NMT huma ħafna aħjar mill-mudelli SMT f’termini tar-rata ta’ żball fil-karattru. L-RNNs tal-vanilla huma kompetittivi għall-GRUs/LSTMs fin-normalizzazzjoni storika tal-ortografija. Il-mudelli tat-trasformaturi jwettqu aħjar biss meta jkunu pprovduti b’aktar dejta ta’ taħriġ. Issibu wkoll li mudelli fil-livell ta’ sottokliem b’vokabulariju ta’ sottokliem żgħir huma a ħjar mill-mudelli fil-livell ta’ karattru. Barra minn hekk, qed nipproponu metodu ibridu li jkompli jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni tan-normalizzazzjoni storika tal-ortografija.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөр NMT загваруудыг таван хэл дээр түүхэн бичлэгийн нормализацийн асуудалд ашиглаж байна: Англи, Герман, Венгрийн, Исландийн, Швед. NMT загварууд өөр хэмжээнд байдаг, анхаарлын механизмууд, мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектурууд байдаг. Бидний үр дүнд NMT загвар нь SMT загвараас илүү сайн байдаг. Ванилла РНХ нь түүхэн бичлэгийн нормализацийн GRUs/LSTMs-тэй өрсөлдөг. Трансформатор загварууд зөвхөн илүү сургалтын өгөгдлийг хангах үед илүү сайн ажилладаг. Мөн бид жижиг суб үгийн үг үгсийн суб үг хэмжээний загварууд харьцаа хэмжээний загвараас илүү сайн байдаг. Түүнчлэн бид түүхийн бичлэгийн нормализацийг илүү сайжруулдаг гибрид аргыг санал болгож байна.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente taikome skirtingus NMT modelius istorinės rašybos normalizacijos problemai penkioms kalboms: anglų, vokiečių, vengrų, islandų ir švedų kalbomis. The NMT models are at different levels, have different attention mechanisms, and different neural network architectures.  Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad NMT modeliai yra gerokai geresni nei SMT modeliai, atsižvelgiant į savybių klaidų lygį. Vanilės RNN yra konkurencingos su GRU/LSTM istorinio rašymo normalizavimo metu. Transformuotojų modeliai geriau veikia tik tuo atveju, jei jie turi daugiau mokymo duomenų. Taip pat manome, kad paražodžių lygio modeliai su mažu paražodžių žodynu yra geresni nei simbolių lygio modeliai. Be to, siūlome hibridinį metodą, kuris toliau gerintų istorinės rašybos normalizacijos rezultatus.', 'no': 'I denne papiret bruker vi ulike NMT-modeller på problemet med historisk staveringsnormalisering for fem språk: engelsk, tysk, ungarsk, islandsk og svensk. NMT-modelane er på ulike nivå, har ulike oppmerkingsmekanismar og ulike neuralnettverksarkitekturar. Resultatet våre viser at NMT- modeller er mykje bedre enn SMT- modeller i teiknefeilighet. Vanilla RNN-ane er konkurrente med GRUs/LSTMs i historisk staveringsnormalisering. Transformeringsmodeller utfører berre betre når det er oppgjeven med fleire treningsdata. Vi finn også at underordnivåmodeller med ein liten underordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordordliste er bedre enn teiknivåmodeller. I tillegg foreslår vi ein hybridmetode som forbedrar utviklinga av historisk stavekormalisering.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami melaksanakan model NMT yang berbeza kepada masalah normalisasi ejaan sejarah untuk lima bahasa: Inggeris, Jerman, Hungari, Icelandic, dan Swedish. Model NMT berada di aras yang berbeza, mempunyai mekanisme perhatian yang berbeza, dan arkitektur rangkaian saraf yang berbeza. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahawa model NMT jauh lebih baik daripada model SMT dalam terma kadar ralat aksara. The vanilla RNNs are competitive to GRUs/LSTMs in historical spelling normalization.  Model pengubah berjalan lebih baik hanya bila diberikan dengan data latihan lebih lanjut. Kami juga mendapati bahawa model tahap subkata dengan vokbulari subkata kecil lebih baik daripada model tahap aksara. In addition, we propose a hybrid method which further improves the performance of historical spelling normalization.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, aplicăm diferite modele NMT problemei normalizării ortografiei istorice pentru cinci limbi: engleză, germană, maghiară, islandeză și suedeză. Modelele NMT sunt la niveluri diferite, au mecanisme diferite de atenție și arhitecturi diferite de rețele neurale. Rezultatele noastre arată că modelele NMT sunt mult mai bune decât modelele SMT în ceea ce privește rata de eroare a caracterelor. RNN-urile de vanilie sunt competitive cu GRU/LSTMs în normalizarea ortografiei istorice. Modelele de transformator funcționează mai bine numai atunci când sunt furnizate mai multe date de antrenament. De asemenea, găsim că modelele de nivel de subcuvânt cu un vocabular mic de subcuvânt sunt mai bune decât modelele de nivel de caractere. În plus, propunem o metodă hibridă care îmbunătățește în continuare performanța normalizării ortografiei istorice.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි වෙනස් NMT මෝඩේල් වලට භාෂා පහක් වලට අතිහාසික සාමාන්\u200dය කරනවා: ඉංග්\u200dරීසි, ජර්මන්, හුන්ගාරියාන්, අය NMT මොඩල් වෙනස් ස්ථානයක් තියෙනවා, වෙනස් අවධානයක් තියෙනවා, වගේම වෙනස් න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය සංවිධ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ NMT මොඩල් SMT මොඩල් වඩා හොඳයි කියලා ප්\u200dරතිචාර වැරදි විදියට. වැනිලා RNN සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසයෙන් GRUS/LSTMs ගැන සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා. ප්\u200dරවර්තනය විද්\u200dයාපකය විද්\u200dයාපකය විතරයි විතරයි ප්\u200dරවේශනය දත්ත ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් වචන වචන වචන වචන වචනයක් වඩා පොඩි වචන වචන වචනයක් වඩා හොඳයි කියලා. ඒ වගේම, අපි හායිබ්\u200dරිඩ් විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ඉතිහාසික වචන සාමාන්\u200dය විධානය වැඩ කරන', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku codsanaynaa noocyo kala duduwan oo ah dhibaatada taariikhda caadi ah ee warqada ah shan luqadood: Ingiriis, Jarmal, Hungarian, Icelandic iyo Iswidish. Tusaalada NMT waxay leeyihiin heerar kala duduwan, waxay leeyihiin meymisyo kala duduwan, iyo dhismaha shabakadda neurada oo kala duduwan. Fashiyadeena waxay muuqataa in daymooyinka NMT ay ka wanaagsan yihiin tusaalaha SMT, si ay u jeedaan xarafta qaladka. Rugta vanilla RNNs waxay u competitiyaan GRUs/LSTMs in historical spelling normalization. Tusaale turjumista ayaa si wanaagsan u sameeya marka lagu siiyo macluumaad waxbarasho badan. Sidoo kale waxaynu helnaa tusaalaha heerka hoose ee hadal hoose ah oo ay leeyihiin hadal yar oo ka wanaagsan qaababka heerka saxda. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu horumarinaynaa qaab dhaqan ah oo horumarinaya tababarka la-hormariyo tababarka taariikhda.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats tillämpar vi olika NMT-modeller på problemet med historisk stavning normalisering för fem språk: engelska, tyska, ungerska, isländska och svenska. NMT-modellerna är på olika nivåer, har olika uppmärksamhetsmekanismer och olika neurala nätverksarkitekturer. Våra resultat visar att NMT-modeller är mycket bättre än SMT-modeller vad gäller teckenfeltfrekvens. Vanilj RNN är konkurrenskraftiga mot GRU/LSTMs i historisk stavning normalisering. Transformermodeller presterar bättre endast om de förses med mer träningsdata. Vi finner också att underordsmodeller med ett litet underordsforråd är bättre än modeller på teckenivå. Dessutom föreslår vi en hybridmetod som ytterligare förbättrar prestanda för historisk stavning normalisering.', 'pl': 'W artykule stosujemy różne modele NMT do problemu normalizacji pisowni historycznej dla pięciu języków: angielskiego, niemieckiego, węgierskiego, islandzkiego i szwedzkiego. Modele NMT są na różnych poziomach, mają różne mechanizmy uwagi i różne architektury sieci neuronowych. Nasze wyniki pokazują, że modele NMT są znacznie lepsze od modeli SMT pod względem wskaźnika błędów znaków. RNN waniliowe są konkurencyjne dla GRU/LSTMs w historycznej normalizacji pisowni. Modele transformatorów działają lepiej tylko wtedy, gdy dostarczone są więcej danych treningowych. Odkrywamy również, że modele na poziomie podsłów z małym słownictwem podsłów są lepsze niż modele na poziomie znaków. Ponadto proponujemy metodę hybrydową, która jeszcze bardziej poprawia wydajność normalizacji pisowni historycznej.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم مختلف NMT موڈلوں کو پانچ زبانوں کے لئے تاریخی اسپلینگ نورمیزی کے مسئلہ پر لازم کرتے ہیں: انگلیسی، جرمن، ہنگرین، اسلاندی اور سوئدی. NMT موڈل مختلف سطح میں ہیں، مختلف توجه مکانیزوں اور مختلف نیورال نیٹ ورک معماری ہیں. ہمارے نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ NMT موڈل SMT موڈل سے بہت اچھے ہیں علامت خطا رچم کے مطابق۔ vanilla RNN تاریخی سپکٹ نورمنیزی میں GRUs/LSTMs کے ساتھ مساوی ہیں. ترنفسر موڈل صرف جب زیادہ ترینس ڈیٹے کے ساتھ پیش کئے جائیں تو بہتر عمل کریں۔ ہم نے بھی دیکھا ہے کہ ایک چھوٹی سوبرویڈ لفظ کے ساتھ سوبرویڈ لفظ موڈل شخص لفظ موڈل سے بہتر ہیں۔ اور ہم ایک ہیبریڈ طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو تاریخی سیپے سیپے سیپے کی عمدگی کو اضافہ کرتا ہے۔', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru primjenjujemo različite modele NMT na problem istorijske normalizacije pisanja na pet jezika: engleski, nemački, mađarski, islandski i švedski. Modeli NMT su na različitim nivoima, imaju različite mehanizme pažnje i različite arhitekture neuronske mreže. Naši rezultati pokazuju da su modeli NMT mnogo bolji od modela SMT u smislu stope greške karaktera. Vanila RNN su konkurentni sa GRUs/LSTMs u istorijskoj normalizaciji pisanja. Модели трансформирања се добију само када су предоставени више података обучения. Takoðe smatramo da su modeli podrijeèi sa malim podrijeèima bolji od modela nivoa karaktera. Osim toga, predlažemo hibridnu metodu koja dodatno poboljšava izvođenje istorijske normalizacije pisanja.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் வேறு NMT மாதிரிகளைப் பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் ஐந்து மொழிகளுக்கு வரலாற்று சொல்லும் இயல்பாக்கத்திற்கான பி NMT மாதிரிகள் வெவ்வேறு நிலைகளில் உள்ளன, வேறு கவனம் முறைமைகள் உள்ளன, மற்றும் வேறு புதிய புதிய பிணைய அமைப்புகள். நம் முடிவுகள் NMT மாதிரிகள் SMT மாதிரிகளை எழுத்து பிழை விகிதத்தில் மேலானதாக காட்டுகிறது. வானில்லா ஆர்என்னிஸ் வரலாற்று எழுத்து வழக்கமாக்கத்தில் GRUs/LSTMs போராடும். மாற்றும் மாதிரி மாதிரிகள் மேலும் பயிற்சி தரவுகளை வழங்கும்போது மட்டும் சிறந்த செயல் ஒரு சிறிய துணை சொல்வளத்தின் உச்சொல்- மட்டத்தின் மாதிரிகள் எழுத்து மட்டத்தை விட சிறந்ததாக இருக்கிறது என்பதை நா மேலும், நாம் ஒரு ஹைப்ரிட் முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது வரலாற்று சொல்லும் சாதாரண செயலை மேம்படுத்தும', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz besh tillar uchun tarixiy imloning oddiylik muammolariga boshqa NMT modellarini qoʻllamiz: Inglizcha, Olmoncha, HungariyaName Comment Bizning natijalarimiz, NMT modellari SMT modellaridan juda yaxshi ko'rinadi. Name @ info Biz shunday o'ylaymiz, bir kichik soʻz tilida subword darajasi modellari character darajadagi modelлардан яхшироқдир. Ko'pchilik, biz tarixiy imkoniyatlarni o'zgartirishni o'zgartiradi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi áp dụng các mô hình NMT khác nhau để giải quyết vấn đề phục hồi chính tả lịch sử cho năm ngôn ngữ: Anh, Đức, Hung, Iceland và Thụy Điển. Các mô hình NMB ở các cấp độ khác nhau, có các cơ quan tập trung khác nhau, và các kiến trúc mạng thần kinh khác nhau. Kết quả của chúng tôi cho thấy các mô hình NMB còn tốt hơn các mô hình SMT nhiều về tỷ lệ lỗi tính cách. The vani RNC là cạnh tranh với GRU/LSTM trong quá trình phục hồi âm tả. Các mô hình transformer chỉ hiệu quả tốt hơn khi cung cấp thêm thông tin về huấn luyện. Chúng tôi cũng thấy rằng các mô hình cấp chữ dưới với một từ nhỏ có thể dùng từ ngầm tốt hơn các mô hình cấp ký tự. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp hỗn hợp giúp cải thiện khả năng phục hồi quy định chính tả lịch sử.', 'da': "I denne artikel anvender vi forskellige NMT-modeller på problemet med historisk stavning normalisering for fem sprog: engelsk, tysk, ungarsk, islandsk og svensk. NMT modellerne er på forskellige niveauer, har forskellige opmærksomhedsmekanismer og forskellige neurale netværksarkitekturer. Vores resultater viser, at NMT modeller er meget bedre end SMT modeller med hensyn til karakterfejl rate. De vanilje RNN'er er konkurrencedygtige over for GRU / LSTMs i historisk stavning normalisering. Transformermodeller fungerer kun bedre, når de forsynes med flere træningsdata. Vi finder også, at underordsmodeller med et lille underordsforråd er bedre end tegneniveau modeller. Derudover foreslår vi en hybrid metode, der yderligere forbedrer ydeevnen af historisk stavning normalisering.", 'bg': 'В тази статия ние прилагаме различни модели на НМТ към проблема с историческото нормализиране на правописа за пет езика: английски, немски, унгарски, исландски и шведски. Моделите на НМТ са на различни нива, имат различни механизми на внимание и различни архитектури на невронните мрежи. Нашите резултати показват, че моделите са много по-добри от моделите по отношение на честотата на грешките на знаците. Ваниловите RNN са конкурентни на GRU/LSTMs в историческа нормализация на правописа. Моделите на трансформаторите се представят по-добре само когато разполагат с повече данни за обучение. Също така откриваме, че моделите на ниво поддума с малък речник на поддума са по-добри от моделите на ниво символ. В допълнение, предлагаме хибриден метод, който допълнително подобрява ефективността на историческото правописно нормализиране.', 'nl': "In dit artikel passen we verschillende NMT modellen toe op het probleem van historische spelling normalisatie voor vijf talen: Engels, Duits, Hongaars, IJslands en Zweeds. De NMT modellen bevinden zich op verschillende niveaus, hebben verschillende aandachtsmechanismen en verschillende neurale netwerkarchitecturen. Onze resultaten tonen aan dat NMT-modellen veel beter zijn dan SMT-modellen in termen van tekenfouten. De vanille RNN's zijn concurrerend met GRU's/LSTMs in historische spelling normalisatie. Transformatormodellen presteren alleen beter als ze voorzien zijn van meer trainingsgegevens. We vinden ook dat modellen op subwoordniveau met een kleine woordenschat beter zijn dan modellen op karakterniveau. Daarnaast stellen we een hybride methode voor die de prestaties van historische spelling normalisatie verder verbetert.", 'hr': 'U ovom papiru primjenjujemo različite modele NMT na problem normalizacije povijesnih pisanja na pet jezika: engleski, njemački, mađarski, islandski i švedski. Modeli NMT-a su na različitim razinama, imaju različite mehanizme pažnje i različite arhitekture neuralne mreže. Naši rezultati pokazuju da su modeli NMT mnogo bolji od modela SMT u smislu stope greške karaktera. Vanila RNN su konkurentni s GRUs/LSTMs u istorijskoj normalizaciji pisanja. Modeli transformera obavljaju bolje samo kada se pružaju više podataka o obuci. Također smatramo da su modeli podriječje razine s malim podriječjem riječju bolji od modela razine karaktera. Osim toga, predlažemo hibridnu metodu koja dodatno poboljšava učinkovitost normalizacije povijesnih pisanja.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menerapkan model NMT yang berbeda untuk masalah normalisasi ejaan sejarah untuk lima bahasa: Inggris, Jerman, Hungari, Islandia, dan Swedia. Model NMT berada di tingkat yang berbeda, memiliki mekanisme perhatian yang berbeda, dan arkitektur jaringan saraf yang berbeda. Hasil kami menunjukkan bahwa model NMT jauh lebih baik dari model SMT dalam terma kadar kesalahan karakter. RNN vanilla adalah kompetitif untuk GRU/LSTM dalam normalisasi ejaan sejarah. Model Transformer hanya berhasil lebih baik ketika disediakan dengan lebih banyak data latihan. Kami juga menemukan bahwa model tingkat subword dengan kata subword kecil lebih baik daripada model tingkat karakter. Selain itu, kami mengusulkan metode hibrid yang lebih memperbaiki prestasi normalisasi ejaan sejarah.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag wenden wir verschiedene NMT-Modelle auf das Problem der historischen Rechtschreibnormalisierung für fünf Sprachen an: Englisch, Deutsch, Ungarisch, Isländisch und Schwedisch. Die NMT-Modelle sind auf verschiedenen Ebenen, haben unterschiedliche Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen und unterschiedliche neuronale Netzwerkarchitekturen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass NMT-Modelle hinsichtlich der Zeichenfehlerrate deutlich besser sind als SMT-Modelle. Die Vanille RNNs sind wettbewerbsfähig zu GRUs/LSTMs in der historischen Rechtschreibnormalisierung. Transformer-Modelle funktionieren nur dann besser, wenn sie mehr Trainingsdaten zur Verfügung stellen. Wir finden auch, dass Subword-Level-Modelle mit einem kleinen Subword-Vokabular besser sind als Zeichen-Level-Modelle. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir eine hybride Methode vor, die die Leistung der historischen Rechtschreibnormalisierung weiter verbessert.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 서로 다른 NMT 모델을 다섯 가지 언어의 역사 맞춤법 규범화 문제인 영어, 독일어, 헝가리어, 아이슬란드어와 스웨덴어에 응용할 것이다.NMT 모델은 서로 다른 차원에 있고 서로 다른 주의 메커니즘과 서로 다른 신경 네트워크 구조를 가지고 있다.우리의 결과는 문자 오류율에 있어서 NMT 모델이 SMT 모델보다 훨씬 좋다는 것을 나타냈다.바닐라 RNN은 역사 맞춤법 규범화에서 GRU/LSTM과 경쟁한다.변압기 모형은 더 많은 교육 데이터를 제공할 때만 더욱 잘 표현할 수 있다.우리는 또 자어의 어휘량이 비교적 작은 자어급 모델이 문자급 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.그 밖에 우리는 혼합 방법을 제시하여 역사 맞춤법의 규범화 성능을 한층 높였다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مدلهای NMT متفاوت را برای مشکل نوازی حرف تاریخی برای پنج زبان استفاده می کنیم: انگلیسی، آلمان، هنگری، اسلاندی و سوئدی. Models NMT are at different levels, have different attention mechanisms, and different neural network architectures. نتایج ما نشان می دهند که مدل NMT خیلی بهتر از مدل SMT در نرخ خطای شخصیت هستند. RNN\u200cهای وانیلا با GRUs/LSTMs در طبیعی نوشته\u200cهای تاریخی رقابت می\u200cکنند. مدل تغییر دهنده فقط وقتی داده های آموزش بیشتری داده می شود بهتر عمل می کنند. ما همچنین یافتیم که مدل سطح زیر کلمه با یک کلمه زیر کلمه کوچک از مدل سطح شخصیت بهتر است. در addition, we propose a hybrid method which further improves the performance of historical spelling normalization.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunatumia mifano tofauti ya NMT kwenye tatizo la utaratibu wa kujieleza kihistoria kwa lugha tano: Kiingereza, Kijerumani, Kihispania, Kiisland na Kiswaidi. Mradi wa NMT upo katika ngazi tofauti, wana mfumo tofauti wa kutangaza, na majengo tofauti ya mitandao ya kijamii. Our results show that NMT models are much better than SMT models in terms of character error rate.  Wa-RNN hawana ushindani wa kushindana na GRU/LST kwa utaratibu wa habari wa kihistoria. Mradi wa zamani unafanya vizuri zaidi pale tu unapotoa takwimu zaidi za mafunzo. Pia tunagundua kuwa mifano ya kiwango cha chini ya maneno yenye ujumbe mdogo wa maneno ni bora kuliko mifano ya tabia. Zaidi ya hayo, tunapendekeza mbinu ya usambazaji wa kihistoria ambayo inaboresha ufanisi wa utaratibu wa kujieleza.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons wend verskillende NMT-modelles aan die probleem van historiese spelling normalisering vir vyf tale: Engels, Duits, Hongaars, Islandse en Sweedse. Die NMT-modelles is op verskillende vlakke, het verskillende aandag-mekanisme en verskillende neuralnetwerk-arkitektuure. Ons resultate vertoon dat NMT-modelles baie beter is as SMT-modelles in terms of character error rate. Die vanilla RNN is medelykbaar met GRUs/LSTMs in historiese spelling normalisering. Transformer modelles uitvoer slegs beter wanneer verskaf word met meer oefening data. Ons vind ook dat subwoord-vlak modele met 'n klein subwoord woord woordeboek beter is as karaktervlak-modele. In addition, we propose a hybrid method which further improves the performance of historical spelling normalization.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, beş diller üçin taryhy ymla normalizasynda farklı NMT nusgalaryny uygulaýarys: iňlisçe, nemesçe, maňgara, isländçe we şwedçe. NMT modelleri farklı derejelerde, farklı üns meýdançalarynda we farklı neural şebek arhitekterileri bar. NMT modelleriň SMT modelleriň karakter hata derejesinden has gowydygyny görkezýäris. Vanilýa RNN taryhy ymlany düzenlemekde GRU/LSTM bilen duşuşykly. Çaltylyk nusgalary diňe köp okuw maglumaty bilen berilýan bolsa gowy edip biler. Biz hem şu ýerde esasy düzeden nusgalary kiçi söz sözleri karakter derejesinden gowydyr. Munuň üstine, biz hybrid bir yöntemi teklip edip geçmişiň ymlanyň normalizasyonynyň täsirini geliştirir.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne aplikojmë modele të ndryshme NMT në problemin e normalizimit historik të ortografikës për pesë gjuhë: anglisht, gjermanisht, hungarez, islandez dhe suedez. Modelet NMT janë në nivele të ndryshme, kanë mekanizma të ndryshme vëmendjeje dhe arkitektura të ndryshme të rrjetit nervor. Rezultatet tona tregojnë se modelet NMT janë shumë më të mirë se modelet SMT lidhur me normën e gabimeve të karakterit. RNN-të e vanilës janë konkurruese ndaj GRUs/LSTMs në normalizimin historik të ortografikës. Modelet e transformuesve funksionojnë më mirë vetëm kur janë furnizuar me më shumë të dhëna treinimi. Gjithashtu gjejmë se modelet në nivelin e nënfjalëve me një fjalor të vogël nënfjalësh janë më të mirë se modelet në nivelin e karakterit. Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë një metodë hibride që përmirëson më tej performancën e normalizimit historik të ortografikës.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք տարբեր NMT-ի մոդելներ ենք կիրառում հինգ լեզուների պատմական գրավորման նորմալիզացիայի խնդիրը՝ անգլերեն, գերմաներեն, հունգարեն, իսլանդերեն և շվեդիացի: ՆՄԹ մոդելները տարբեր մակարդակներում են, ունեն տարբեր ուշադրության մեխանիզմներ և տարբեր նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետություններ: Our results show that NMT models are much better than SMT models in terms of character error rate.  Վանիլիայի ՌՆԹ-ները մրցակցում են GRU-ների և LSMT-ների հետ պատմական նորմալիզացիայի ժամանակ: Տանֆորմացիոն մոդելները ավելի լավ են աշխատում միայն այն ժամանակ, երբ տրամադրվում են ավելի շատ ուսուցման տվյալներ: Մենք նաև հայտնաբերում ենք, որ ենթաբառի մակարդակի մոդելները փոքր ենթաբառի բառարանով ավելի լավ են, քան բնավորի մակարդակի մոդելները: Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք հիբրիդային մեթոդ, որը ավելի լավ է բարելավում պատմական ուղղագրության նորմալիզացիայի արդյունքը:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা পাঁচ ভাষার জন্য ঐতিহাসিক বানান বানানোর স্বাভাবিকভাবে বিভিন্ন এনএমটি মডেল প্রয়োগ করি: ইংরেজি, জার্মান, হাঙ্গ এনএমটি মডেল বিভিন্ন পর্যায়ে রয়েছে, বিভিন্ন মনোযোগ মেশিন আছে এবং বিভিন্ন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো আছে। আমাদের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এনএমটি মডেল এসএমটি মডেলের চেয়ে অনেক ভালো আছে ক্যারেক্টারের ত্রুটির হারের ঐতিহাসিক বানানোর স্বাভাবিক বানানোর প্রতিযোগিতায় ভ্যানিয়ালা আরএনএন-এর প্রতিযোগিতা করছে। ট্রান্সফার্নার মডেল শুধুমাত্র আরও প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য প্রদান করার পরেই ভালো কাজ করে। আমরা একই সাথে খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে একটি ছোট সাবওয়ার্ডের শব্দভাণ্ডারের সাবওয়ার্ড-স্তরের মডেল চরিত্র-স্তরের চেয় এছাড়াও আমরা একটি হাইব্রিড পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যা ঐতিহাসিক বানান বানানোর স্বাভাবিকভাবে উন্নতি প্রদান করে।', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ፣ የአምስት ቋንቋዎች፣ ጀርመን፣ ሀንጋሪኛ፣ ኢስላንድኛ እና ስዊድንኛ የተለየ የአፍስት ቋንቋዎች የታሪክ የጽሕፈት ትምህርት የተደረገውን መልክ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የNMT ዓይነቶች በተለየ ደረጃዎች ናቸው፣ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ የልዩ ልዩ ልዩ የኔትዌር መረብ መሠረት አላቸው፡፡ ፍሬቶቻችን NMT ሞዴላዎች በጽሑፍ ስህተት ቁጥር እንዲሻሉ ያሳያል፡፡ The vanilla RNNs are competitive to GRUs/LSTMs in historical spelling normalization.  ትርጉም ዓይነቶች በተጨማሪው ትምህርት ዳታ ሲሰጡ ብቻ ይሻላል፡፡ አነስተኛ ቃላት ታናሽ ቃላት ያላቸው አዲስ ቃላት በሥርዓት ደረጃዎች የተሻሉ ናቸው ብለን እናገኛለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ታሪካዊ የንግግር አነፃ መደገፊያውን የሚሻለውን የኬብሪድ ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'cs': 'V tomto článku aplikujeme různé NMT modely na problém normalizace historického pravopisu pro pět jazyků: angličtinu, němčinu, maďarštinu, islandštinu a švédštinu. NMT modely jsou na různých úrovních, mají různé mechanismy pozornosti a různé architektury neuronových sítí. Naše výsledky ukazují, že NMT modely jsou mnohem lepší než SMT modely, pokud jde o znakovou chybu. Vanilkové RNN jsou konkurenceschopné GRU/LSTMs v historické normalizaci pravopisu. Modely transformátorů fungují lépe pouze tehdy, když jsou poskytnuty více tréninkových dat. Zjišťujeme také, že modely na úrovni podslov s malou slovní zásobou jsou lepší než modely na úrovni znaků. Navíc navrhujeme hybridní metodu, která dále zlepšuje výkon normalizace historického pravopisu.', 'ca': "En aquest article, aplicam diferents models NMT al problema de la normalització històrica de l'ortografia per cinc llengües: anglès, alemany, húngar, islandès i suec. The NMT models are at different levels, have different attention mechanisms, and different neural network architectures.  Els nostres resultats demostren que els models NMT són molt millors que els SMT en termes de taxa d'error de caràcter. Els RNA de vanilla són competitius als GRUs/LSTMs en la normalització històrica de l'ortografia. Els models transformadors només funcionen millor quan es proporcionen més dades d'entrenament. També descobrim que els models de nivell de subparaules amb un petit vocabulari de subparaules són millors que els models de nivell de caràcter. A més, proposem un mètode híbrid que millora encara més el rendiment de la normalització històrica de l'ortografia.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös rakendame erinevaid NMT mudeleid ajaloolise õigekirja normaliseerimise probleemile viies keeles: inglise, saksa, ungari, islandi ja rootsi keeles. NMT mudelid on erinevatel tasanditel, neil on erinevad tähelepanumehhanismid ja erinevad neurovõrgu arhitektuurid. Meie tulemused näitavad, et NMT mudelid on märgiveamäära osas palju paremad kui SMT mudelid. Vanilli RNN-d on konkurentsivõimelised GRU/LSTMdega ajaloolises õigekirja normaliseerimises. Transformerite mudelid toimivad paremini ainult siis, kui neil on rohkem koolitusandmeid. Samuti leiame, et alamsõna tasemel mudelid, millel on väike alamsõna sõnavara, on paremad kui märgi tasemel mudelid. Lisaks pakume välja hübriidmeetodi, mis parandab veelgi ajaloolise õigekirja normaliseerimise tulemuslikkust.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä sovellamme erilaisia NMT-malleja historiallisen oikeinkirjoituksen normalisoinnin ongelmaan viidellä kielellä: englanti, saksa, unkari, islanti ja ruotsi. NMT-mallit ovat eri tasoilla, niillä on erilaiset huomiomekanismit ja erilaiset neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurit. Tuloksemme osoittavat, että NMT-mallit ovat paljon parempia kuin SMT-mallit merkkivirheiden suhteen. Vaniljan RNN:t ovat kilpailukykyisiä GRU:n / LSTMin kanssa historiallisessa oikeinkirjoituksen normalisoinnissa. Muuntajamallit suoriutuvat paremmin vain, jos niissä on enemmän harjoitusdataa. Havaitsemme myös, että alasanatason mallit, joissa on pieni sanasto, ovat parempia kuin merkkitason mallit. Lisäksi ehdotamme hybridimenetelmää, joka parantaa entisestään historiallisen oikeinkirjoituksen normalisoinnin suorituskykyä.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, beş dillər üçün tarixi imzalaması problemlərinə müxtəlif NMT modellərini: İngilizce, Almanca, Macarya, İslandiya və İsveçə dillərinə uygulayırıq. NMT modelləri fərqli səviyyələrdə, fərqli dikkat mehānismi və fərqli nöral ağ arhitektarı vardır. NMT modellərimizin karakter xətası hüquqları ilə SMT modellərdən daha yaxşıdır. Vanilya RNN tarixi imzalama normalizasyonda GRUs/LSTMs ilə müqayisədir. Transformer modelləri yalnız daha çox təhsil verilənlərlə daha yaxşı işlər edirlər. Biz də belə görürük ki, küçük söz sözləri olan altsözlərin səviyyəsi modellərinin karakter səviyyəsindən daha yaxşıdır. Əvvəlcə, biz tarixəli imzalama normalizasyonunun performansını daha yaxşılaşdıran hibrid yolunu təklif edirik.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru primjenjujemo različite modele NMT na problem istorijske normalizacije pisanja na pet jezika: engleski, nemački, mađarski, islandski i švedski. Modeli NMT su na različitim nivoima, imaju različite mehanizme pažnje i različite arhitekture neuronske mreže. Naši rezultati pokazuju da su modeli NMT mnogo bolji od modela SMT u smislu stope greške karaktera. Vanila RNN su konkurentni za GRUs/LSTMs u istorijskoj normalizaciji pisanja. Modeli transformera obavljaju bolje samo kada se pružaju više podataka o obuci. Također smatramo da su modeli podriječja nivoa sa malim podriječjim riječima bolji od modela nivoa karaktera. Osim toga, predlažemo hibridnu metodu koja dodatno poboljšava učinkovitost normalizacije povijesnog pisanja.', 'jv': 'Nang peurén iki, kéné aplikasi model NMT sing sampeyan kanggo kelas kanggo kelas telu basa: Inggris, alaman, Ungaryen, Isilan lan Suwit. model NMT sing sampeyan sampeyan ing sampeyan, dadi mejana pakan titik, lan akeh sampeyan tambah alah sing sampeyan. Rasane dadine NMT kuwi model sing luwih luwih tenan karo model SMT, sampeyan karo kelalahan eror. Validity Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé éné luwih-luwih model sing sampek akeh-kelas ngono kuwi gambar kelas telu, kuwi model sing luwih apik ke ditambalo caratar-kalih. Nambah, kita supoyo sistem histogram sing bisa supoyo akeh bantuan kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo awak dhéwé.', 'sk': 'V prispevku uporabljamo različne modele NMT za problem normalizacije zgodovinskega črkovanja za pet jezikov: angleščina, nemščina, madžarska, islandska in švedščina. Modeli NMT so na različnih ravneh, imajo različne mehanizme pozornosti in različne arhitekture nevronskih omrežij. Naši rezultati kažejo, da so modeli NMT veliko boljši od modelov SMT glede stopnje napak znakov. Vanilijevi RNN so konkurenčni GRU/LSTMs v zgodovinski normalizaciji črkovanja. Modeli transformatorjev delujejo bolje le, če imajo več podatkov o usposabljanju. Ugotovili smo tudi, da so modeli na ravni podbesed z majhnim besednim besediščem boljši od modelov na ravni znakov. Poleg tega predlagamo hibridno metodo, ki dodatno izboljšuje uspešnost normalizacije zgodovinskega črkovanja.', 'ha': 'Ga wannan takardan, Munã amfani da misãlai masu daban NMT zuwa matsalar masu cikin littafin da aka rubutu a cikin littafan watan harshe: Ingiriya, Jarman, Hungarian, Icaland, kuma Iswidish. Modellun NMT suna cikin darajõji daban-daban, sunã da alama masu kiyayi daban, da masu matsakan tarayyan na neural. MatamayinMu na nũna cewa misalin NMT ne mafi alhẽri daga misalin SMT cikin tsarin ɓata. @ item license (short name) Transformer models perform better only when provided with more training data.  Tuna sami da misãlai masu ƙarƙashin maganar-daraja da wani abu mai ƙaranci, su fi zama mafi alhẽri daga misalin-daraja. Da wannan, Munã goyya da wata hanyor hibir wadda ke ƙara ƙara mafarin aikin littafan da aka baka littafin.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו משתמשים בדוגמנים NMT שונים לבעיה של נורמליזציה האיתוי היסטורית לחמש שפות: אנגלית, גרמנית, הונגרית, איסלנדית ושוודית. הדוגמנים של NMT נמצאים ברמות שונות, יש מכונות תשומת לב שונים, וארכיטקטורות רשת עצבית שונות. התוצאות שלנו מראות שמודלים NMT הרבה יותר טובים ממודלים SMT בנוגע לקצב טעויות אופי. The vanilla RNNs are competitive to GRUs/LSTMs in historical spelling normalization.  דוגמנים מעברים מצליחים יותר רק כשהם נותנים יותר נתונים אימונים. אנחנו גם מוצאים שדוגמנים ברמה תת מילים עם מילים קטנים מתחת מילים הם טובים יותר ממודלים ברמה אופיים. בנוסף, אנו מציעים שיטה היברידית שממשיך לשפר את ההופעה של נורמליזציה האיתוית היסטורית.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་NMT་རྣམ་པ་མི་འདྲ་བའི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་དག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག NMT མིག་ཆས་འདི་གནས་ཚད་མ་འདྲ་བར་ཡོད་པ་ལས་སྦྲེལ་བཞག་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སོ་སོ་ཡོད་པ་དང་། སྒུལ་ཆས་དྲ་བར་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བྱ་བ་དག་དེ་ནི་NMT མིག་དཔེ་དབྱེ་བ་མང་པོ་ཡིན་པ་མིན་འདུག vanilla RNNs ཚོ་ནི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་དག་ཆ་དག་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་GRUs/LSTMs ལ་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཆ་དབྱིབས་འགྱུར་བ་ཅན་མ་དབྱིབས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཚད་མང་ཙམ་བྱེད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པའི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་བོ་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ཉེར་བ་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་དག་ཆ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་བྱེད་སྟངས་ཁྱད་པར་མཐོ་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Local String Transduction as Sequence Labeling', 'pt': 'Transdução de String Local como Rotulagem de Sequência', 'fr': "Transduction de chaîne locale en tant qu'étiquetage de séquence", 'ar': 'نقل السلاسل المحلية كتوسيم التسلسل', 'es': 'Transducción de cadenas locales como etiquetado de secuencias', 'ja': 'シーケンスラベルとしての局所文字列変換', 'zh': '为序表本字符串转导', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम लेबलिंग के रूप में स्थानीय स्ट्रिंग ट्रांसडक्शन', 'ru': 'Локальная трансдукция в виде маркировки последовательности', 'ga': 'Aistriú Teaghrán Áitiúil mar Lipéadú Seicheamh', 'ka': 'ლოკალური სტრიქონის გადატანაცია როგორც წერტილი', 'hu': 'Helyi karakterláncok átvitele sorozatcímkézésként', 'el': 'Τοπική μεταγραφή συμβολοσειράς ως επισήμανση ακολουθίας', 'lt': 'Vietinė eilutės perskaičiavimas kaip sekos ženklinimas', 'mk': 'Локална превод на линии како ознака на секвенција', 'it': 'Trasduzione locale delle stringhe come etichettatura di sequenza', 'kk': 'Жергілікті жолдарды реттеу жарлығы ретінде аудару', 'ml': 'സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലാബില്\u200dങ്ങിനായി ലോക്കല്\u200d സ്ട്രൈങ്ങ് മാറ്റുന്നത്', 'ms': 'Transduction Local String as Sequence Labeling', 'mt': 'Traduzzjoni tal-Strings Lokali bħala Tikkettar tas-Sequenza', 'mn': 'Орон нутгийн хэлбэрийн шилжүүлэлт', 'pl': 'Lokalna transdukcja ciągów jako etykietowanie sekwencji', 'no': 'Lokal tekstoverføring som sekvensmerkelapp', 'sr': 'Lokalna prevoda String kao etiketiranje sekvence', 'so': 'Ka wareejinta jardiinada degmada sida Sequence Labeling', 'ro': 'Transducere locală a șirurilor ca etichetare secvențială', 'si': 'ස්ථානික ස්ට්\u200dරින්ස් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය', 'sv': 'Lokal strängtransduktion som sekvensmärkning', 'ur': 'Local String Transduction as Sequence Labeling', 'ta': 'உள்ளார்ந்த சரத்தின் மாற்றுதல் வரிசையின் மாற்றம்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền Chuỗi cục bộ như nhãn dãy', 'hr': 'Lokalna prevedena rečenica kao označavanje sekvence', 'da': 'Lokal strengtransduktion som sekvensmærkning', 'nl': 'Lokale tekenreeks transductie als sequentie labeling', 'bg': 'Локално предаване на низове като последователно етикетиране', 'id': 'Transduksi Garis Lokal sebagai Label Sekuensi', 'ko': '시퀀스로 표시된 부분 문자열 변환', 'de': 'Lokale ZeichenfolgenĂ¼bertragung als Sequenz-Beschriftung', 'fa': 'تغییر خط محلی به عنوان برچسب سطح', 'sq': 'Traduction Local String as Sequence Labeling', 'sw': 'Usafirishaji wa viwanja vya ndani kama mfululizo wa Labeling', 'tr': 'Ýerli Metini Dolamak', 'af': 'Plaaslike String Oordrag as Sequence Labeling', 'am': 'Local String Transduction as Sequence Labeling', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Yerli Tizgi Sequence Labelini', 'bn': 'সেকেন্স ল্যাবিং হিসেবে স্থানীয় স্ট্রিং পরিবর্তন', 'bs': 'Lokalna prevoda String kao etiketa sekvence', 'ca': 'Traducció local de cadenes com etiqueta de secuencia', 'et': 'Kohalik stringiülekanne järjestikuse märgistusena', 'fi': 'Paikallinen merkkijonon siirto sekvenssimerkinnänä', 'cs': 'Místní řetězcová transdukce jako sekvenční popisování', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Prenos lokalnih nizov kot označevanje zaporedja', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'རང་ཁུལ་ཡིག་སྒྲོམ་འདྲེན་ལ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་བཞིན་'}
{'en': 'We show that the general problem of string transduction can be reduced to the problem of sequence labeling. While character deletion and insertions are allowed in string transduction, they do not exist in sequence labeling. We show how to overcome this difference. Our approach can be used with any sequence labeling algorithm and it works best for problems in which string transduction imposes a strong notion of locality (no long range dependencies). We experiment with spelling correction for social media, OCR correction, and morphological inflection, and we see that it behaves better than seq2seq models and yields state-of-the-art results in several cases.', 'ar': 'نظهر أنه يمكن اختزال المشكلة العامة لتوصيل الأوتار إلى مشكلة تسمية التسلسل. بينما يُسمح بحذف الأحرف وإدراجها في تحويل السلسلة ، إلا أنها غير موجودة في تسمية التسلسل. نظهر كيفية التغلب على هذا الاختلاف. يمكن استخدام نهجنا مع أي خوارزمية لوضع العلامات على التسلسل وهو يعمل بشكل أفضل مع المشكلات التي يفرض فيها تحويل السلسلة فكرة قوية عن الموقع (لا توجد تبعيات طويلة المدى). نجرب التصحيح الإملائي لوسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، وتصحيح التعرف الضوئي على الحروف ، والتصريف الصرفي ، ونرى أنه يتصرف بشكل أفضل من نماذج seq2seq ويعطي نتائج متطورة في العديد من الحالات.', 'es': 'Demostramos que el problema general de la transducción de cadenas se puede reducir al problema del marcaje de secuencias. Si bien la eliminación e inserción de caracteres están permitidas en la transducción de cadenas, no existen en el etiquetado de secuencias. Mostramos cómo superar esta diferencia. Nuestro enfoque se puede utilizar con cualquier algoritmo de etiquetado de secuencias y funciona mejor para problemas en los que la transducción de cadenas impone una fuerte noción de localidad (sin dependencias de largo alcance). Experimentamos con la corrección ortográfica para redes sociales, la corrección de OCR y la inflexión morfológica, y vemos que se comporta mejor que los modelos seq2seq y produce resultados de última generación en varios casos.', 'pt': 'Mostramos que o problema geral da transdução de cordas pode ser reduzido ao problema da rotulagem de sequências. Embora a exclusão e as inserções de caracteres sejam permitidas na transdução de strings, elas não existem na rotulagem de sequência. Mostramos como superar essa diferença. Nossa abordagem pode ser usada com qualquer algoritmo de rotulagem de sequência e funciona melhor para problemas em que a transdução de strings impõe uma forte noção de localidade (sem dependências de longo alcance). Experimentamos correção ortográfica para mídias sociais, correção de OCR e inflexão morfológica, e vemos que ela se comporta melhor que os modelos seq2seq e produz resultados de última geração em vários casos.', 'fr': "Nous montrons que le problème général de la transduction de chaînes peut être réduit au problème de l'étiquetage des séquences. Bien que la suppression et l'insertion de caractères soient autorisées dans la transduction de chaînes, elles n'existent pas dans l'étiquetage de séquence. Nous montrons comment surmonter cette différence. Notre approche peut être utilisée avec n'importe quel algorithme d'étiquetage de séquence et elle fonctionne mieux pour les problèmes dans lesquels la transduction de chaînes impose une forte notion de localité (pas de dépendances à longue distance). Nous expérimentons la correction orthographique pour les réseaux sociaux, la correction OCR et l'inflexion morphologique, et nous constatons qu'elle se comporte mieux que les modèles seq2seq et donne des résultats de pointe dans plusieurs cas.", 'ja': '文字列変換の一般的な問題は、シーケンス標識の問題に還元できることを示しています。文字の削除と挿入は文字列の変換で許可されていますが、それらはシーケンスラベルには存在しません。この違いを克服する方法を示します。私たちのアプローチは、任意のシーケンスラベリングアルゴリズムで使用することができ、文字列変換が局所性の強い概念（長距離依存性なし）を課す問題に最適です。ソーシャルメディアのスペル補正、OCR補正、形態学的変動を実験したところ、seq 2 seqモデルよりも優れた挙動を示し、いくつかのケースで最先端の結果をもたらします。', 'zh': '吾言弦转导者,可以简为序也。 虽字符串转导中许删字符插入,然其序标不存。 将何以克异? 吾法可施于一切标记算法,其最宜字符串转导强局部性其概(无长程依赖性)。 尝试社交媒体之拼写正,OCR正形之拐点,见其行贤于seq2seq形,而先进于数者。', 'hi': 'हम दिखाते हैं कि स्ट्रिंग ट्रांसडक्शन की सामान्य समस्या को अनुक्रम लेबलिंग की समस्या के लिए कम किया जा सकता है। जबकि स्ट्रिंग ट्रांसडक्शन में वर्ण विलोपन और सम्मिलन की अनुमति है, वे अनुक्रम लेबलिंग में मौजूद नहीं हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि इस अंतर को कैसे दूर किया जाए। हमारे दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग किसी भी अनुक्रम लेबलिंग एल्गोरिथ्म के साथ किया जा सकता है और यह उन समस्याओं के लिए सबसे अच्छा काम करता है जिनमें स्ट्रिंग ट्रांसडक्शन स्थानीयता की एक मजबूत धारणा (कोई लंबी दूरी की निर्भरता नहीं) लागू करता है। हम सोशल मीडिया, ओसीआर सुधार और रूपात्मक मोड़ के लिए वर्तनी सुधार के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं, और हम देखते हैं कि यह seq2seq मॉडल से बेहतर व्यवहार करता है और कई मामलों में अत्याधुनिक परिणाम देता है।', 'ru': 'Показано, что общая проблема трансдукции струн может быть сведена к проблеме маркировки последовательностей. Несмотря на то, что делеция символов и вставки разрешены при трансдукции строки, они не существуют в маркировке последовательности. Мы покажем, как преодолеть эту разницу. Наш подход может быть использован с любым алгоритмом маркировки последовательностей, и он лучше всего подходит для задач, в которых трансдукция строк налагает сильное понятие локальности (без зависимостей от дальнего диапазона). Мы экспериментируем с коррекцией орфографии для социальных сетей, коррекцией OCR и морфологическим перегибом, и мы видим, что она ведет себя лучше, чем модели seq2seq, и в некоторых случаях дает самые современные результаты.', 'ga': 'Léiríonn muid gur féidir an fhadhb ghinearálta a bhaineann le trasdul teaghrán a laghdú go dtí an fhadhb a bhaineann le lipéadú seicheamh. Cé go gceadaítear scriosadh carachtar agus cuir isteach i dtrasduchtadh teaghrán, ní bhíonn siad ann i lipéadú seichimh. Léiríonn muid conas an difríocht seo a shárú. Is féidir ár gcur chuige a úsáid le haon algartam lipéadaithe seicheamh agus is fearr a oibríonn sé d’fhadhbanna a chuireann trasduchtadh sreinge i bhfeidhm ar nóisean láidir ceantair (gan aon spleáchais fadraoin). Déanaimid turgnamh le ceartú litrithe do na meáin shóisialta, ceartú OCR, agus infhilleadh moirfeolaíoch, agus feicimid go n-iompraíonn sé níos fearr ná samhlacha seq2seq agus go dtugann sé torthaí úrscothacha i gcásanna éagsúla.', 'el': 'Δείχνουμε ότι το γενικό πρόβλημα της μεταγωγής χορδών μπορεί να μειωθεί στο πρόβλημα της σήμανσης ακολουθίας. Ενώ η διαγραφή χαρακτήρων και οι εισαγωγές επιτρέπονται στη μεταγωγή συμβολοσειρών, δεν υπάρχουν στη σήμανση ακολουθίας. Δείχνουμε πώς να ξεπεράσουμε αυτή τη διαφορά. Η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί με οποιονδήποτε αλγόριθμο σήμανσης ακολουθίας και λειτουργεί καλύτερα για προβλήματα στα οποία η μεταγραφή συμβολοσειρών επιβάλλει μια ισχυρή έννοια της τοποθεσίας (χωρίς μακροχρόνιες εξαρτήσεις). Πειραματιζόμαστε με ορθογραφία για τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης, διόρθωση OCR και μορφολογική καμπύλη, και βλέπουμε ότι συμπεριφέρεται καλύτερα από τα μοντέλα seq2seq και αποδίδει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε αρκετές περιπτώσεις.', 'hu': 'Megmutatjuk, hogy a karakterlánc átalakításának általános problémája csökkenthető a szekvencia címkézés problémájára. Míg a karakterek törlése és beszúrása engedélyezett a karakterláncok átalakításában, azok nem léteznek sorozatcímkézésben. Megmutatjuk, hogyan lehet leküzdeni ezt a különbséget. Megközelítésünk bármilyen szekvencia címkézési algoritmussal használható, és a legjobban működik olyan problémákra, amelyekben a karakterlánc átalakítása erős lokalitási fogalmat követel meg (nincs hosszú távú függőség). A közösségi média helyesírási korrekciójával, OCR korrekciójával és morfológiai inflexiójával kísérletezünk, és látjuk, hogy jobban viselkedik, mint a seq2seq modellek, és több esetben korszerű eredményeket hoz.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სტრიქონის გადაწყვეტილების საერთო პრობლემა შეიძლება გადაწყვეტილი სტრიქონის პრობლემაში. როცა სიმბოლოების წაშლა და დაყენების შესაძლებელია სიმბოლოების წაშლაში, ისინი არ არსებობს სიმბოლოების წაშლაში. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ როგორ გადავიწყოთ ეს განსხვავება. ჩვენი პროგრამა შეიძლება გამოყენება ყველაფერი წერტილის ალგორიტიმზე და ის მუშაობა პრობლემებისთვის, რომელიც სიტყვების გადატანაცია ლოკაციის ძალიან წარმოდგენა (სიტყვების ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტირებით სოციალური მედიაში, OCR რექტირებით და მორპოლოგიური ინფლექციისთვის, და ჩვენ ვხედავთ, რომ ეს ექსპერიმენტირებით უკეთესი მოდელები, რომლებიც seq2seq მოდელებით და', 'kk': 'Біз жолдарды аудару жалпы мәселесін реттеу жарлықтарының мәселесіне шектеуге болады. Таңбаларды өшіру мен ендіру рұқсат етілген кезде, олар реттеу жарлығында жоқ. Біз бұл айырмашылығын қалай көтеру керектігін көрсетедік. Біздің тәсіліміміз кез келген реттеу алгоритмімен қолданылады, және бұл жол аудару мәселелерінде жергіліктердің күшті ойымыз (ұзын аумағындағы тәуелдіктері жоқ). Біз әлемдік медиақтар, OCR түзету және морфологиялық инфлекциясы үшін мәтінді түзетумен тәжірибелеміз. Бұл сек2сек моделінен жақсы тәжірибе және оның бірнеше жағдайда күй- жайымдық нәти', 'lt': 'Mes parodome, kad bendra sričių perkėlimo problema gali būti sumažinta iki sekos ženklinimo problemos. Nors simbolių išbraukimas ir įdėjimai leidžiami juostų transduccijoje, jų nėra sekos etiketėse. Mes parodysime, kaip įveikti šį skirtumą. Mūsų metodas gali būti naudojamas bet kokiu sekos ženklinimo algoritmu ir jis geriausiai padeda išspręsti problemas, kuriomis juostų transduccija sukuria tvirtą vietinės sąvokos sąvoką (be ilgo nuotolio priklausomybės). Eksperimentuojame su social in ės žiniasklaidos raštų koregavimu, OCR koregavimu ir morfologiniu įtaisu, ir matome, kad jis elgiasi geriau nei sek2seq modeliai ir daugeliu atvejų duoda pažangiausių rezultatų.', 'it': "Mostriamo che il problema generale della trasduzione delle stringhe può essere ridotto al problema dell'etichettatura di sequenza. Mentre l'eliminazione e l'inserimento dei caratteri sono consentiti nella trasduzione di stringhe, non esistono nell'etichettatura di sequenza. Mostriamo come superare questa differenza. Il nostro approccio può essere utilizzato con qualsiasi algoritmo di etichettatura di sequenza e funziona meglio per i problemi in cui la trasduzione di stringhe impone una forte nozione di località (nessuna dipendenza a lungo raggio). Sperimentiamo la correzione ortografica per i social media, la correzione OCR e l'inflessione morfologica, e vediamo che si comporta meglio dei modelli seq2Seq e produce risultati all'avanguardia in diversi casi.", 'ml': 'സ്ട്രിങ്ങ് ട്രാന്\u200dഡ്രാന്\u200dഡ്യൂക്ഷന്\u200dറെ പൊതുവായ പ്രശ്നമെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു സ്ട്രിങ്ങ് ട്രാന്\u200dഡ്യൂക്ഷനില്\u200d അക്ഷരരൂപം നീക്കം ചെയ്യുന്നതും ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതും അനുവദിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, അവയുടെ  ഈ വ്യത്യാസം എങ്ങനെയാണ് പരാജയപ്പെടുന്നതെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് എല്ലാ സെക്കന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെയും ലാഗോരിത്മിന്\u200dറെയും കൊണ്ടും ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d സ്ട്രിങ്ക് ട്ര സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ, ഒക്സിറി സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. അത് സെക്ക്2സെക്ക് മോഡലി', 'ms': 'Kita tunjukkan bahawa masalah umum pengubahan rentetan boleh dikurangkan kepada masalah penglabel urutan. Sementara pemadaman aksara dan penyisihan dibenarkan dalam transduksi rentetan, mereka tidak wujud dalam label urutan. Kita tunjukkan cara untuk mengatasi perbezaan ini. pendekatan kita boleh digunakan dengan mana-mana algoritma pencetakan jujukan dan ia berfungsi terbaik untuk masalah di mana transduksi rentetan memaksa pemahaman kuat lokasi (tiada dependensi julat panjang). Kami eksperimen dengan penyelesaian ejaan untuk media sosial, penyelesaian OCR, dan penyelesaian morfologik, dan kami melihat bahawa ia bertindak lebih baik daripada model seq2seq dan memberikan hasil state-of-the-art dalam beberapa kes.', 'mk': 'Покажуваме дека општиот проблем со трансдукцијата на линии може да се намали на проблемот со етикетирање на секвенца. Иако избришувањето и внесувањето знаци се дозволени во трансдукцијата на линии, тие не постојат во етикетата на секвенца. Ние покажуваме како да ја надминеме оваа разлика. Нашиот пристап може да се користи со било кој алгоритм за означување на секвенца и работи најдобро за проблемите во кои трансдукцијата на линии наметнува силна идеја за локалност (без зависности од долг домет). Експериментираме со корекција на правописот за социјалните медиуми, корекција на ОКР и морфолошки прилив, и гледаме дека се однесува подобро од моделите seq2seq и дава најсовремени резултати во неколку случаи.', 'mn': 'Бид стринг шилжүүлэхийн ерөнхий асуудлыг дарааллын маркингийн асуудлыг багасгаж болно. Хэрэв тэмдэгтийг устгах болон орлуулах нь стринг орлуулах боломжтой байвал, тэд дарааллын маркилгаанд байхгүй. Бид энэ ялгааг хэрхэн алдагдах талаар харуулж байна. Бидний арга хэмжээний алгоритмыг алгоритмын хувьд ашиглаж болно. Энэ нь стринг хувьд орон нутгийн хүчтэй ойлголтыг (урт хугацааны хамаарал байхгүй) сайн ажилладаг. Бид нийгмийн мэдээлэл, ОКР зөв, морфологик нөлөөлөлд бичлэгийг зөвшөөрөхөд туршилт хийдэг. Энэ нь seq2seq загвараас илүү дээр ажиллаж, олон тохиолдолд урлагийн үр дүнг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Vi viser at det generelle problemet med tekstoverføring kan reduserast til problemet med sekvensetiketting. Med sletting av teikn og innsetjingar er tillatt i tekstoverføring, finst dei ikkje i rekkjefølgja. Vi viser korleis å overføra denne forskjellen. Nærminga vårt kan brukast med algoritmen for merking av rekkjefølgjer, og det fungerer best for problemar der tekstoverføring legg inn ein sterk noe på lokalitet (ingen lang område avhengighet). Vi eksperimenterer med stavekorreksjon for sosiale medier, OCR-korreksjon og morfologiske infleksjon, og vi ser at det oppfører bedre enn seq2seq-modeller og gjer tilstanden til kunsten i fleire tilfeller.', 'mt': 'Aħna nuru li l-problema ġenerali tat-trasduzzjoni tal-istrejn tista’ titnaqqas għall-problema tat-tikkettar tas-sekwenzi. Filwaqt li t-tħassir tal-karattri u l-inserzjonijiet huma permessi fit-trasduzzjoni tal-kordi, ma jeżistux fit-tikkettar tas-sekwenza. We show how to overcome this difference.  L-approċċ tagħna jista’ jintuża ma’ kwalunkwe algoritmu ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza u jaħdem bl-a ħjar mod għal problemi li fihom it-trasduzzjoni tal-linji timponi kunċett qawwi ta’ lokalità (l-ebda dipendenza fuq medda twila). Aħna ninsperimentaw bil-korrezzjoni tal-ortografija għall-midja soċjali, il-korrezzjoni tal-OCR, u l-inflezzjoni morfoloġika, u naraw li dan jaġixxi aħjar minn mudelli seq2seq u jagħti riżultati l-aktar avvanzati f’diversi każijiet.', 'ro': 'Arătăm că problema generală a traducerii șirurilor poate fi redusă la problema etichetării secvențelor. În timp ce ștergerea și inserarea caracterelor sunt permise în traducerea șirurilor, ele nu există în etichetarea secvențelor. Arătăm cum să depăşim această diferenţă. Abordarea noastră poate fi folosită cu orice algoritm de etichetare a secvențelor și funcționează cel mai bine pentru problemele în care traducerea șirurilor impune o noțiune puternică de localitate (fără dependențe de rază lungă). Experimentăm corecția ortografică pentru social media, corecția OCR și inflexiunea morfologică și observăm că se comportă mai bine decât modelele seq2seq și oferă rezultate de ultimă generație în mai multe cazuri.', 'sr': 'Pokazujemo da se opći problem prevode string može smanjiti na problem označavanja sekvence. Dok se uklanjanje i uklanjanje karaktera dozvoljavaju u prevodu žica, oni ne postoje u etiketi sekvence. Pokazujemo kako da prevaziđemo ovu razliku. Naš pristup se može iskoristiti sa algoritmom označavanja sekvence i radi najbolje za probleme u kojima se prevoda string uvede jaku pojam lokalnosti (bez dugog ovisnosti u dometu). Eksperimentiramo sa ispravnom korekcijom za društvene medije, korekcijom OCR-a i morfološku inflekciju, i vidimo da se ponaša bolje od seq2seq modela i pruža rezultate stanja umjetnosti u nekoliko slučajeva.', 'pl': 'Pokazujemy, że ogólny problem transdukcji strun można zredukować do problemu etykietowania sekwencji. Podczas gdy usuwanie i wstawianie znaków są dozwolone w transdukcji ciągów, nie istnieją one w etykietowaniu sekwencji. Pokazujemy, jak przezwyciężyć tę różnicę. Nasze podejście może być stosowane z dowolnym algorytmem etykietowania sekwencji i najlepiej sprawdza się w problemach, w których transdukcja łańcuchów narzuca silne pojęcie lokalności (brak długich zależności). Eksperymentujemy z korekcją pisowni dla mediów społecznościowych, korekcją OCR i zmianą morfologiczną i widzimy, że zachowuje się lepiej niż modele seq2seq i daje najnowocześniejsze wyniki w kilku przypadkach.', 'so': 'Waxaynu tusnaynaa in dhibaatada caadiga ah ee iskutallaabta jidhka lagu soo wareejiyo dhibaatada baaritaanka dabarka. Inta lagu isticmaalayo baaritaanka sawirida xarafka iyo lagu daro, ma jirto mid ku qoran baasabka dabaqada ah. Waxaynu tusaynaa sida aan u adkaan kala duwanaanta. Dhaqdhaheenna waxaa lagu isticmaali karaa algorithm kasta oo lagu isticmaalayo, waxayna ugu wanaagsan tahay dhibaatooyin ay ku leedahay dhibaatooyin ay leedahay fikrad xoog leh oo degmada ah (ku xiran tahay waqti dheer). Waxaynu tijaabinaynaa hagaajinta saxafka shabakadda bulshada, hagaajinta OCR iyo saameynta morphologiga, waxaynu aragnaa inay ka wanaagsan tahay qaababka saxafka 2seq kadibna ay soo bixisaa xaalada farshaxanka.', 'si': 'අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අක්ෂර නිර්මාණය සහ ඇතුළුම් සඳහා ස්ට්\u200dරින්ස් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න, ඔවුන් ක්\u200dරමය ලේබිල්  අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ වෙනස් වලට කොහොමද වැඩ කරන්නේ. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් කිසිම පරීක්ෂණ ලේබෝරිතම් එක්ක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයකට හොඳම වැඩ කරන්න,  අපි සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයානය, OCR නිරීක්ෂණය, සහ මොර්ෆෝලෝජික ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා සාමාජික ප්\u200dරශ්නය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, අපිට පේනවා ඒක seq2seq ම', 'sv': 'Vi visar att det allmänna problemet med strängtransduktion kan reduceras till problemet med sekvensmärkning. Även om radering av tecken och infogningar är tillåtna i strängdransduktion, finns de inte i sekvensmärkning. Vi visar hur vi kan övervinna denna skillnad. Vårt tillvägagångssätt kan användas med vilken sekvensmärkningsalgoritm som helst och det fungerar bäst för problem där strängtransduktion kräver en stark uppfattning om lokalitet (inga långdistansberoenden). Vi experimenterar med stavningskorrektion för sociala medier, OCR-korrigering och morfologisk böjning, och vi ser att den beter sig bättre än sek2seq-modeller och ger toppmoderna resultat i flera fall.', 'ta': 'சரத்தை மாற்றுதல் பொதுவான பிரச்சனையை நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் வரிசையின் சிக்கலை குறைக்க முடியும். எழுத்து நீக்கு மற்றும் சொருகுப்பொருள் சரத்தை மாற்றுதலில் அனுமதிக்கப்படும் போது, வரிசையில் உள்ள அட்டவணையில்  நாம் இந்த வித்தியாசம் எவ்வாறு பெற காண்பிக்கிறோம். எங்கள் செயல்பாடு எந்த வரிசையில் அடிக்குறியீட்டு வரிசையில் சிக்கல்களுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படும் அது சிறந்த செயல்படுகிறது அதில் சரம் மாற்றுதல்  நாம் சமூக ஊடகங்கள், OCR திருத்தம் மற்றும் morphological தொடர்பு சொல்லுதல் திருத்தம் சோதனையில் செய்கிறோம். இது செக்கு 2seq மாதிரிகளை விட சிறந்ததாக நடத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ سیٹرینگ ٹرندوٹ کی عمومی مسئلہ کو سیٹرینگ لابلینگ کے مسئلہ میں کم کر سکتا ہے۔ جبکہ تعریف حذف اور پیدائش استرینگ ٹرندڈوٹ میں اجازت دی جاتی ہے، وہ سطح لابلینگ میں موجود نہیں ہیں. ہم اس فرق کو کس طرح غالب کر سکتے ہیں۔ ہمارا طریقہ کس طریقہ کے ساتھ استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں جو لکڑ لیبوریٹ الگوریٹم کے ساتھ ہے اور یہ بہترین مشکلات کے لئے کام کرتا ہے جس میں استرینگ ٹرندٹ ڈرندٹ ایک مضبوط نظریہ لکڑتا ہے۔ ہم سوسیل میڈیا، OCR اصلاح اور مورفولوجی اثرات کے ساتھ اسپے سمجھنے کے ساتھ آزمائش کرتے ہیں، اور ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ یہ سq2seq موڈل سے بہتر عمل کرتا ہے اور بہت سی موضوعوں میں اثرات دیتا ہے.', 'uz': "Biz buni ko'rayapmiz, Shrift tarjimalarining umumiy muammolari cheksiz lab chiqarish muammolariga kamaytirishi mumkin. Ushbu hodisa yoki vazifa sarlavhasini moslash. Biz buni qanday o'zgarishni ko'rsamiz. Bizning qismlarimiz algoritni qo'yish uchun qo'llanman foydalanishi mumkin, va bu qanchalik tarkibi lokal fikrlarini qo'llash uchun juda yaxshi ishlaydi. Biz jamiyat media, OCR toʻgʻriligi va morfologik ishlash uchun imtiyozni tahrirlash imkoniyatini ko'rib chiqaramiz. Biz buni seq2seq modellaridan yaxshi harakat qilishimizni ko'p holatda ishlab chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi cho thấy vấn đề chung của sự phân phối dây có thể giảm thiểu cho vấn đề hiệu suất của các chuỗi. Trong khi sự xoá ký tự và nhét được phép vào trong sự phân phối chuỗi, chúng không tồn tại trong hiệu ứng. Chúng tôi chỉ cách vượt qua sự khác biệt này. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta có thể sử dụng với bất kỳ thuật toán hiệu suất nào và nó hoạt động tốt nhất cho các vấn đề mà sự phân phối dây buộc một khái niệm vững chắc về địa điểm (không phụ thuộc phạm vi dài). Chúng tôi thí nghiệm với sự sửa chữa chính tả cho các phương tiện xã hội, sửa chữa OCR, và cơ thể uốn cong lịch sử, và chúng tôi thấy nó cư xử tốt hơn cách mô hình Kq2seq và cung cấp kết quả hiện đại trong nhiều trường.', 'da': 'Vi viser, at det generelle problem med strengtransduktion kan reduceres til problemet med sekvensmærkning. Selvom sletning af tegn og indsættelser er tilladt i strengtransduktion, findes de ikke i sekvensmærkning. Vi viser, hvordan vi kan overvinde denne forskel. Vores tilgang kan bruges med enhver sekvens mærkning algoritme, og den fungerer bedst til problemer, hvor streng transduktion pålægger en stærk begreb om lokalitet (ingen lang rækkevidde afhængigheder). Vi eksperimenterer med stavekorrektion til sociale medier, OCR korrektion og morfologisk bøjning, og vi ser, at det opfører sig bedre end sek2seq modeller og giver state-of-the-art resultater i flere tilfælde.', 'bg': 'Показваме, че общият проблем с трансдукцията на низовете може да бъде сведен до проблема с етикетирането на последователността. Въпреки че изтриването и вмъкването на символи са разрешени при трансдукцията на низове, те не съществуват в последователно етикетиране. Показваме как да преодолеем тази разлика. Нашият подход може да се използва с всеки алгоритъм за етикетиране на последователност и работи най-добре при проблеми, при които трансдукцията на низове налага силна представа за локалност (без зависимости от дълъг обхват). Експериментираме с корекция на правописа за социални медии, корекция на ОКР и морфологична инфлекция и виждаме, че тя се държи по-добре от моделите и дава най-съвременни резултати в няколко случая.', 'nl': 'We laten zien dat het algemene probleem van snarentransductie kan worden teruggebracht tot het probleem van sequentie labeling. Hoewel het verwijderen en invoegen van tekens toegestaan is in tekenreeks transductie, bestaan ze niet in volgorde labeling. We laten zien hoe we dit verschil kunnen overwinnen. Onze aanpak kan worden gebruikt met elk sequence labeling algoritme en het werkt het beste voor problemen waarbij string transductie een sterk begrip van lokaliteit oplegt (geen langeafstandsafhankelijkheden). We experimenteren met spellingscorrectie voor sociale media, OCR-correctie en morfologische buiging, en we zien dat het zich beter gedraagt dan seq2seq modellen en in verschillende gevallen state-of-the-art resultaten oplevert.', 'hr': 'Pokazujemo da se opći problem prevode žica može smanjiti na problem označavanja sekvence. Dok se dozvoljavaju uklanjanje i uklanjanje karaktera u prevod žica, oni ne postoje u označavanju sekvence. Pokazujemo kako prevladati ovu razliku. Naš pristup se može koristiti s algoritmom označavanja sekvence i najbolje radi za probleme u kojima se prevod žica uloži jaku pojmu lokalnosti (nema dugih ovisnosti o rasponu). Eksperimentiramo ispravnu korekciju za društvene medije, korekciju OCR-a i morfološku inflekciju, i vidimo da se ponaša bolje od modela seq2seq-a i pruža rezultate stanja umjetnosti u nekoliko slučajeva.', 'de': 'Wir zeigen, dass das allgemeine Problem der Stringtransduktion auf das Problem der Sequenzmarkierung reduziert werden kann. Während das Löschen und Einfügen von Zeichen in der Zeichenfolgenübertragung erlaubt ist, existieren sie nicht in der Sequenz-Beschriftung. Wir zeigen, wie man diesen Unterschied überwinden kann. Unser Ansatz kann mit jedem Sequenz-Labeling-Algorithmus verwendet werden und funktioniert am besten für Probleme, bei denen String-Transduktion eine starke Vorstellung von Lokalität (keine langen Entfernungsabhängigkeiten) erfordert. Wir experimentieren mit Rechtschreibkorrektur für soziale Medien, OCR-Korrektur und morphologischer Flexion, und wir sehen, dass sie sich besser verhält als seq2seq Modelle und in mehreren Fällen State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse liefert.', 'ko': '우리는 일반적인 문자열 변환 문제를 서열 표기 문제로 간소화할 수 있음을 증명했다.문자열 변환에서 문자를 삭제하고 삽입할 수 있지만 시퀀스 태그에는 없습니다.우리는 이런 차이를 어떻게 극복하는지 보여줄 것이다.우리의 방법은 문자열 변환이 국부적 개념(장거리 의존 없음)을 강화하는 문제에 가장 적합하다.우리는 소셜 미디어의 맞춤법 교정, OCR 교정과 어형 변화에 대해 실험을 진행했는데 이것은 seq2seq모델보다 더 잘 표현되고 일부 상황에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻었다.', 'id': 'Kami menunjukkan bahwa masalah umum dari transduksi string dapat dikurangi ke masalah dari label urutan. Sementara penghapusan dan insegasi karakter diizinkan dalam transduksi string, mereka tidak ada dalam label urutan. We show how to overcome this difference.  pendekatan kita dapat digunakan dengan algoritma label urutan apapun dan bekerja terbaik untuk masalah di mana transduksi string memaksa gagasan kuat lokasi (tidak ada dependensi jangkauan panjang). Kami eksperimen dengan koreksi ejaan untuk media sosial, koreksi OCR, dan infleksi morfologi, dan kami melihat bahwa itu berperilaku lebih baik dari model seq2seq dan memberikan hasil state-of-the-art dalam beberapa kasus.', 'af': "Ons wys dat die algemene probleem van string oordrag kan verduur word na die probleem van sekwensieetiketting. Terwyl karakter uitvee en voegings toegelaat word in string oordrag, bestaan hulle nie in volgorde etiket nie. Ons wys hoe om hierdie verskil te oorwin. Ons toegang kan gebruik word met enige volgorde etiketting algoritme en dit werk beste vir probleme waarin string oordraging 'n sterk noesie van lokaliteit (geen lang omvang afhanklikhede) ingestel word nie. Ons eksperimenteer met speletjie korreksie vir sosiale media, OCR korreksie en morfologiese infleksie, en ons sien dat dit beter behandel as seq2seq-modelle en die state-of-the-art resultaat in verskeie gevalle.", 'fa': 'ما نشان می دهیم که مشکل عمومی ترجمه ریشه می تواند به مشکل برچسب ریشه کاهش شود. در حالی که حذف و وارد کردن شخصیت\u200cها در ترجمه\u200cهای string اجازه دارند، آنها در برچسب\u200cهای ترجمه وجود ندارند. ما نشان می دهیم چگونه این تفاوت را فراگیر کنیم. دستور ما می\u200cتواند با هر الگوریتم برچسب برچسب برچسب\u200cهای برچسب استفاده شود و برای مشکلات بهتر کار می\u200cکند که تغییر برچسب\u200cهای برچسب\u200cها یک نظر قوی از محل (بستگی\u200cهای مدت طولانی نیست). ما با توجه به درست کردن نوشته\u200cها برای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی، درست کردن OCR، و تأثیر مورفولوژیکی آزمایش می\u200cکنیم، و می\u200cبینیم که این بهتر از مدل\u200cهای seq2seq رفتار می\u200cکند و نتیجه\u200cهای حالت هنری را در چندین پرونده می\u200cدهد.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha kwamba tatizo la usambazaji wa mfumo unaweza kupunguza kwenye tatizo la maabara ya mfululizo. Wakati wahusika huruhusiwa kuondolewa na kuongezeka kwa mfululizo wa mfululizo, hawana katika alama ya mfululizo. Tunaonyesha jinsi ya kushinda tofauti hii. Hatua yetu inaweza kutumika kwa utaratibu wowote unaohusika na utaalamu na inafanya kazi vizuri kwa matatizo ambayo usambazaji wa mfululizo unaweka dhana kali ya wenyeji (bila kutegemea kwa kiasi kikubwa). Tunajaribu kwa ajili ya uharibifu wa uandishi wa habari za kijamii, uharibifu wa OCR, na ushawishi wa kimaadili, na tunaona kwamba inafanya vizuri zaidi ya mifano ya sekq2seq na inatoa hali ya sanaa yanayotokana na matukio kadhaa.', 'tr': 'Biz string terjime etmek üçin umumy meseleniň dini etiketleme problemine düşürilebilir. @ action: inmenu Karakter eliminlemek we gaýd etmek üçin metini terjime etmek üçin yada edilmez. Biz bu tapawudyn nädip üstünlik etmelidigini görkeýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz her hat etiketleme algoritmi bilen ullanılabilir we bu ýerlerde string terjime etmek üçin has gowy işleýär (uzak aralygyň bağlılıklary ýok). Biz sosial mediýatlar, OCR düzeltmesi we morfolojik näsazlyklary üçin ymla düzeltmesi bilen synanyşýarys. Biz bu seq2seq nusgalaryndan gowy hereket edip, sungatyň durumyny birnäçe ýagdaýda etýän netijesini görýäris.', 'sq': 'Ne tregojmë se problemi i përgjithshëm i transdukimit të rreshtave mund të reduktohet në problemin e etiketave të sekuencës. Ndërsa heqja dhe shtimi i karaktereve janë lejuar në transdukimin e rreshtave, ato nuk ekzistojnë në etiketën e sekuencës. Ne tregojmë se si të kapërcejmë këtë ndryshim. Përqasja jonë mund të përdoret me çdo sekuencë që etiketon algoritmin dhe funksionon më mirë për problemet në të cilat transducimi i rreshtave imponon një koncept të fortë të lokalitetit (pa varësi të distancës së gjatë). Eksperimentojmë me korreksionin e ortografikës për mediat sociale, korreksionin e OCR-së dhe rrjedhjen morfologjike dhe shohim se ajo sillet më mirë se modelet seq2seq dhe jep rezultate më të larta në disa raste.', 'hy': 'Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ լարերի հաղորդակցման ընդհանուր խնդիրը կարելի է նվազեցնել հաջորդականության պիտակների խնդիրը: Մինչդեռ իմպերի ջնջման և ներմուծման հնարավորություն է տալիս լարերի հաղորդակցման մեջ, դրանք գոյություն չունեն հաջորդականության պիտակներում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես հաղթահարել այս տարբերությունը: Մեր մոտեցումը կարող է օգտագործվել ցանկացած հաջորդականության ալգորիթմի վրա, և այն լավագույնս աշխատում է այն խնդիրների համար, որոնց ընթացքում լարերի հաղորդակցությունը պարտադրում է տեղակայության ուժեղ հասկացություն (առանց երկար տարածության կախվա Մենք փորձում ենք հասարակական լրատվամիջոցների, OCR-ի և մորֆոլոգիական ազդեցության ուղղությամբ ուղղությամբ, և տեսնում ենք, որ այն ավելի լավ է վարվում, քան Sex2Sex մոդելները, և որոշ դեպքերում առաջին արդյունքներ է ստանում:', 'am': 'የግንኙነት መቀናቀል መሆኑን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ReplyForward ይሄንን ልዩነት እንዴት ማሸነፍ እናሳየዋለን የግንኙነታችን አሌጎርቲም በማንኛውም ግንኙነት የሚጠቀም ይችላል፡፡ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ፣ ኦኮር ማስታወቂያ እና የሞፎሎጂ ጥያቄ አፍቃሪን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'az': "Biz göstəririk ki, string tərcümünün genel problemi sıralama etiketlərinin probleminə düşürilə bilər. Karakter silinməsi və daxilinməsi mə'lumatda istifadə edilməsi mümkün deyildir, onlar seçmə etiketində yoxdur. Biz bu fərqliyi necə üstün edəcəyini göstəririk. Bizim yaxınlığımız hər hansı sıralar etiketlənməsi algoritmi ilə istifadə edilə bilər və bu sıralar tərcümlənməsi üçün ən yaxşı işlər edir ki, yerləşdirilməsi möhkəm bir fikir qoyur (uzun müddət bağlılıqları yoxdur). Biz sosyal media, OCR düzəltməsi və morfolojik infleksiyası üçün yazılı düzəltməsi ilə təcrübə edirik. Biz seq2seq modellerindən daha yaxşı davranır və bir neçə məsəllərdə mövcuddur.", 'bn': 'আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে স্ট্রিং ট্র্যান্ড্রান্ডাকশনের সাধারণ সমস্যা সংক্রান্ত ল্যাবেলের সমস্যার ক্ষেত্রে  যখন অক্ষর মুছে ফেলা এবং যোগাযোগ স্ট্রীন ট্রান্ডগ্রান্ডকেশনে অনুমোদন করা হয়, তখন সেকেন্ড ল্যাবেলিং এর মধ্যে তাদে আমরা এই পার্থক্য কিভাবে জয় করতে দেখাচ্ছি। আমাদের পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করতে পারে যে কোন সেকেন্ড লেবার্ডিং নিয়ে আর এটা সমস্যার জন্য ভালো কাজ করে যায় যেখানে স্ট্রান্ড্রান্ডাকশন স্থানী আমরা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের বানান সংশোধন, অক্সির সংশোধন এবং নৈতিক প্রভাবের জন্য পরীক্ষা করছি, আর আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে এটা সেক্ট২সেক মডেলের চেয়ে ভালো কাজ কর', 'cs': 'Ukazujeme, že obecný problém transdukce řetězců lze redukovat na problém značení sekvence. Zatímco smazání znaků a vložení jsou povoleny v transdukci řetězců, neexistují v popisování sekvence. Ukážeme, jak tento rozdíl překonat. Náš přístup lze použít s libovolným algoritmem značení sekvencí a funguje nejlépe pro problémy, kdy transdukce řetězců vynucuje silný pojem lokality (žádné dlouhodobé závislosti). Experimentujeme s korekcí pravopisu na sociálních médiích, korekcí OCR a morfologickou flexí a vidíme, že se chová lépe než modely seq2seq a v několika případech přináší nejmodernější výsledky.', 'ca': "Mostrem que el problema general de la transducció de cadenes pot ser reduït al problema de l'etiquetada de seqüències. Mentre la supresió de caràcters i les insercions són permeses en la transducció de cadenes, no existeixen en etiquetes de seqüència. Mostrem com superar aquesta diferència. El nostre enfocament pot ser utilitzat amb qualsevol algoritme d'etiqueta de seqüència i funciona millor per a problemes en els quals la transducció de cadenes imponen una forta noció de localitat (sense dependencies a llarg rangs). We experiment with spelling correction for social media, OCR correction, and morphological inflection, and we see that it behaves better than seq2seq models and yields state-of-the-art results in several cases.", 'et': 'Me näitame, et üldine probleem string transduktsioon saab vähendada probleemi jada märgistamine. Kuigi märkide kustutamine ja lisamine on stringi transduktsioonis lubatud, siis neid ei eksisteeri järjestuse märgistamisel. Me näitame, kuidas sellest erinevusest üle saada. Meie lähenemisviisi saab kasutada mis tahes järjestuse märgistamise algoritmiga ja see töötab kõige paremini probleemide korral, kus stringi transduktsioon kehtestab tugeva kohaliku mõiste (pika vahemiku sõltuvusi puuduvad). Eksperimenteerime sotsiaalmeedia õigekirja korrigeerimist, OCR korrigeerimist ja morfoloogilist paindlikkust ning näeme, et see käitub paremini kui seq2seq mudelid ja annab mitmel juhul kaasaegseid tulemusi.', 'fi': 'Osoitamme, että merkkijonojen muuntamisen yleinen ongelma voidaan vähentää sekvenssimerkinnän ongelmaan. Merkkien poisto ja lisäykset ovat sallittuja merkkijonojen muuntamisessa, mutta niitä ei ole olemassa järjestyksessä. Me näytämme, miten tämä ero voidaan voittaa. Lähestymistapamme voidaan käyttää minkä tahansa sekvenssimerkintäalgoritmin kanssa ja se toimii parhaiten ongelmissa, joissa merkkijonojen transduktio asettaa vahvan paikallisuuden käsitteen (ei pitkän kantaman riippuvuuksia). Kokeilemme sosiaalisen median oikeinkirjoituksen korjausta, OCR-korjausta ja morfologista taipumusta, ja näemme, että se käyttäytyy paremmin kuin seq2seq-mallit ja tuottaa huipputason tuloksia useissa tapauksissa.', 'bs': 'Pokazujemo da se opći problem prevode string može smanjiti na problem označavanja sekvence. Dok se dozvoljavaju uklanjanje i uklanjanje karaktera u prevodu žica, oni ne postoje u etiketi sekvence. Pokazujemo kako da prevaziđemo ovu razliku. Naš pristup se može koristiti sa algoritmom označavanja sekvence i radi najbolje za probleme u kojima se prevod žica uloži jaku pojmu lokalnosti (nema dugih ovisnosti o rasponu). Mi eksperimentiramo ispravnu korekciju za socijalne medije, korekciju OCR-a i morfološku inflekciju, i vidimo da se ponaša bolje od modela seq2seq-a i pruža rezultate umjetnosti u nekoliko slučajeva.', 'jv': 'bookmark politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Awak dhéwé ngerti piye ngerasakno iki. Ndoleh dhéwé iso nggunakake karo Algorithm sing beranduh akeh sekèn banjur iki dadi nggawe barang nggawe gerangkamu nggawe sistem sing gawe ngubah dhéwé operasi sistem sing gawe ngubah tanggal gawe lokale (ora iso diagonang langkung diagonalan cara-diagonalan cara-dia Awak dhéwé éntukno karo akeh pisan urip nggawe media sothik, dadi nambah tentang, lan kelangan maneh dumateng, lan kita ngubah dhéwé kuwi dakéwan model sing luwih apik seq2seq lan ujaran langgar state-of-the-arts banjuré sak ilang sakjane.', 'sk': 'Pokazali smo, da je splošni problem pretvorbe nizov mogoče zmanjšati na problem označevanja zaporedja. Čeprav so brisanje znakov in vstavki dovoljeni v pretvorbi nizov, ne obstajajo v zaporednem označevanju. Pokazali bomo, kako premagati to razliko. Naš pristop se lahko uporablja s katerim koli algoritmom označevanja zaporedja in najbolje deluje pri težavah, pri katerih pretvorba nizov nalaga močan pojem lokalnosti (brez odvisnosti dolgega obsega). Eksperimentiramo s korekcijo črkovanja za družabna omrežja, korekcijo OCR in morfološko infleksijo in vidimo, da se obnaša bolje kot modeli seq2seq in v več primerih prinaša najsodobnejše rezultate.', 'ha': "Tuna nũna cewa matabbata mai jumla da za'a ƙara zuwa matsalar mai lissafa. Waka da aka yarda da tafiyar da takardar da za'a shigar da cikin mai shige, ba za'a ba su ƙayyade cikin alama mai sequence. Munã nũna yadda zã mu rinjãya wannan. Tsarakanmu za'a yi amfani da kowane matsayin algoritm na daban, kuma yana aiki mafi alhẽri ga matabbata wanda transducin strife na sanya wani notion mai ƙarfi na lokaci (kuma bã da daidaita mai tsawo). Tuna jarrabi da tsari na fasalin mutane, da tsari na OCR, da kuma masu shawarar mutane, kuma muna ganin ta yi mafiya alhẽri daga misãlai na seq2seq kuma yana ƙara halin-sanar ta ƙara cikin masu yawa.", 'he': 'אנחנו מראים שהבעיה הכללית של העברת קווים יכולה להיפחות לבעיה של תיקון רצף. בעוד מחיקת אופיים וההוציאות מאפשרות בתרגיל רצועות, הן לא קיימות בתווית רצף. אנחנו מראים איך להתגבר על ההבדל הזה. הגישה שלנו יכולה להשתמש בכל רצף תווית אלגוריתם והיא עובדת הכי טוב עבור בעיות שבהן העברת רצועות מכריחה רעיון חזק של מקום (בלי תלויות לטווח ארוך). We experiment with spelling correction for social media, OCR correction, and morphological inflection, and we see that it behaves better than seq2seq models and yields state-of-the-art results in several cases.', 'bo': 'We show that the general problem of string transduction can be reduced to the problem of sequence labeling. While character deletion and insertions are allowed in string transduction, they do not exist in sequence labeling. ང་ཚོས་ཇི་ལྟར་ཁྱད་པར་ཇི་ལྟར་བསྐྱེད་བྱེད་པར་སྟོན་ཡོད། Our approach can be used with any sequence labeling algorithm and it works best for problems in which string transduction imposes a strong notion of locality (no long range dependencies). ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། གནད་དོན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་དག་བཟོ་བཅོས་དང་། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང'}
{'en': 'Diachronic word embeddings and semantic shifts : a survey', 'ar': 'حفلات الزفاف غير المتزامنة والتحولات الدلالية: مسح', 'pt': 'Embeddings diacrônicos de palavras e deslocamentos semânticos: uma pesquisa', 'es': 'Inserciones diacrónicas de palabras y cambios semánticos: una encuesta', 'fr': "L'intégration des mots diachroniques et les changements sémantiques\xa0: une enquête", 'hi': 'डायक्रोनिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग और शब्दार्थ बदलाव: एक सर्वेक्षण', 'ja': 'Diachronic word embeding and semantic shifts: a survey', 'zh': '历词嵌和语义转换:勘', 'ru': 'Диахронические вложения слов и семантические сдвиги: опрос', 'ga': 'Leabú focal diacrónach agus aistrithe shéimeantacha: suirbhé', 'ka': 'Diachronic words embedding and semantic shifts: a survey', 'hu': 'Diakrónikus szóbeágyazások és szemantikai eltolódások: felmérés', 'el': 'Διασχρόνια ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και σημασιολογικές μετατοπίσεις: μια έρευνα', 'it': 'Incorporazioni diacroniche di parole e cambiamenti semantici: un sondaggio', 'kk': 'Диахроникалық сөздерді ендіру және семантикалық түрлендіру: зерттеу', 'lt': 'Diachroniniai žodžių įterpimai ir semantiniai pokyčiai: apklausa', 'mk': 'Дијахронични зборови и семантични промени: истражување', 'ml': 'ഡൈക്രോണിക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഇങ്ങോട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'ms': 'Penampilan perkataan diakronik dan perubahan semantik: suatu penyelidikan', 'mt': 'Inkorporazzjonijiet dijakroniċi tal-kliem u bidliet semantiċi: stħarriġ', 'pl': 'Diachroniczne osadzenia słów i przesunięcia semantyczne: ankieta', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Диахроник үгнүүд, семантик өөрчлөлт: судалгаа', 'ro': 'Încorporări diacronice de cuvinte și schimbări semantice: un sondaj', 'sr': 'Dijahronički integraciji riječi i semantičke smjene: istraživanje', 'si': 'Description', 'so': 'Hadalka caadiga ah ee ku qoran iyo isbedelka semantiga: baaritaanka', 'sv': 'Diakroniska ordinbäddningar och semantiska skift: en undersökning', 'ta': 'வார்த்தைகள் உள்ளடக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் அரை மாற்றங்கள்: ஒரு ஆய்வு', 'ur': 'ایک سؤرے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự ghép nối chữ mãn tính và luân phiên ngữ nghĩa: một cuộc khảo sát', 'da': 'Diakroniske ordindlejringer og semantiske skift: en undersøgelse', 'hr': 'Dijahronički integraciji riječi i semantičke smjene: istraživanje', 'bg': 'Диахронично вграждане на думи и семантични промени: проучване', 'nl': 'Diachrone woordinbeddingen en semantische verschuivingen: een enquête', 'id': 'Diachronic word embeddings and semantic shifts: a survey', 'de': 'Diachrone Worteinbettungen und semantische Verschiebungen: eine Umfrage', 'fa': 'یک تحقیق', 'ko': '역대 단어 삽입과 의미 변환: 조사', 'sw': 'Diachronic word embeddings and semantic shifts: a survey', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Përfshirje fjalësh diakronike dhe ndryshime semantike: një sondazh', 'tr': 'Galan söz ködlemeleri we semantik üýtgeşmeleri: a survey', 'az': 'Diakroniki söz inşalları və semantik dəyişiklikləri: bir araşdırma', 'am': 'Diachronic word embeddings and semantic shifts: a survey', 'hy': 'Diachronic word embeddings and semantic shifts: a survey', 'bn': 'ডায়ারোনিক শব্দ বিভিন্ন এবং সেমেন্টিক পরিবর্তন: একটি জরিপ', 'bs': 'Dijahronički integraciji riječi i semantičke smjene: istraživanje', 'ca': 'Incorporació diacrònica de paraules i canvis semàntics: un estudi', 'cs': 'Diachronické vkládání slov a sémantické posuny: průzkum', 'et': 'Diakroonilised sõnade manustamine ja semantilised nihked: uuring', 'fi': 'Diakrooniset sanaupotukset ja semanttiset muutokset: kysely', 'jv': 'tips-locale:de', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Diakronične vključitve besed in semantični premiki: anketa', 'he': 'מערכות מילים דיאכרוניות ושינויים סמנטיים: סקר', 'bo': 'འཚོལ་བཤེར་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ནང་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་དང་semantic shifts:'}
{'en': 'Recent years have witnessed a surge of publications aimed at tracing temporal changes in lexical semantics using distributional methods, particularly prediction-based word embedding models. However, this vein of research lacks the cohesion, common terminology and shared practices of more established areas of natural language processing. In this paper, we survey the current state of academic research related to diachronic word embeddings and semantic shifts detection. We start with discussing the notion of semantic shifts, and then continue with an overview of the existing methods for tracing such time-related shifts with word embedding models. We propose several axes along which these methods can be compared, and outline the main challenges before this emerging subfield of NLP, as well as prospects and possible applications.', 'ar': 'شهدت السنوات الأخيرة موجة من المنشورات التي تهدف إلى تتبع التغيرات الزمنية في الدلالات المعجمية باستخدام طرق التوزيع ، ولا سيما نماذج تضمين الكلمات القائمة على التنبؤ. ومع ذلك ، فإن هذا المسار البحثي يفتقر إلى التماسك والمصطلحات الشائعة والممارسات المشتركة للمجالات الأكثر رسوخًا في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بمسح الحالة الحالية للبحث الأكاديمي المتعلق بحفلات الزفاف المزخرفة بالكلمات واكتشاف التحولات الدلالية. نبدأ بمناقشة فكرة التحولات الدلالية ، ثم نتابع بإلقاء نظرة عامة على الأساليب الحالية لتتبع مثل هذه التحولات المرتبطة بالوقت باستخدام نماذج تضمين الكلمات. نقترح عدة محاور يمكن من خلالها مقارنة هذه الأساليب ، ونحدد التحديات الرئيسية قبل هذا الحقل الفرعي الناشئ من البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، بالإضافة إلى التوقعات والتطبيقات الممكنة.', 'es': 'En los últimos años se ha producido un aumento de publicaciones destinadas a rastrear los cambios temporales en la semántica léxica utilizando métodos de distribución, en particular modelos de incrustación de palabras basados en la predicción. Sin embargo, esta línea de investigación carece de la cohesión, la terminología común y las prácticas compartidas de áreas más establecidas del procesamiento del lenguaje natural. En este artículo, analizamos el estado actual de la investigación académica relacionada con la inserción de palabras diacrónicas y la detección de cambios semánticos. Comenzamos discutiendo la noción de cambios semánticos y luego continuamos con una visión general de los métodos existentes para rastrear dichos cambios relacionados con el tiempo con modelos de incrustación de palabras. Proponemos varios ejes a lo largo de los cuales se pueden comparar estos métodos, y esbozamos los principales desafíos ante este subcampo emergente de la PNL, así como las perspectivas y posibles aplicaciones.', 'fr': "Ces dernières années, on a assisté à une vague de publications visant à retracer les changements temporels de la sémantique lexicale à l'aide de méthodes distributionnelles, en particulier des modèles d'intégration de mots basés sur la prédiction. Cependant, cette filière de recherche manque de cohésion, de terminologie commune et de pratiques communes à des domaines plus établis du traitement du langage naturel. Dans cet article, nous examinons l'état actuel de la recherche universitaire liée à l'intégration de mots diachroniques et à la détection des décalages sémantiques. Nous commençons par discuter de la notion de changements sémantiques, puis nous poursuivons par un aperçu des méthodes existantes pour suivre de tels changements liés au temps à l'aide de modèles d'intégration de mots. Nous proposons plusieurs axes selon lesquels ces méthodes peuvent être comparées, et soulignons les principaux défis auxquels doit faire face ce sous-domaine émergent de la PNL, ainsi que les perspectives et les applications possibles.", 'pt': 'Os últimos anos testemunharam um surto de publicações destinadas a rastrear mudanças temporais na semântica lexical usando métodos de distribuição, particularmente modelos de incorporação de palavras baseados em previsão. No entanto, esta linha de pesquisa carece da coesão, terminologia comum e práticas compartilhadas de áreas mais estabelecidas de processamento de linguagem natural. Neste artigo, examinamos o estado atual da pesquisa acadêmica relacionada à incorporação de palavras diacrônicas e detecção de mudanças semânticas. Começamos discutindo a noção de mudanças semânticas e, em seguida, continuamos com uma visão geral dos métodos existentes para rastrear essas mudanças relacionadas ao tempo com modelos de incorporação de palavras. Propomos vários eixos ao longo dos quais esses métodos podem ser comparados e delineamos os principais desafios diante desse subcampo emergente da PNL, bem como perspectivas e possíveis aplicações.', 'zh': '近年以来,旨在用分布之法(尤基于占候之词)踪迹词汇语义中时变之出版物激增。 然则脉络乏自然语言治成熟之凝聚力,通以术语享之。 本文中,按历词嵌和语义移位检测相关学术研究状。 论语义转换之概,然后概述用词嵌模型与此时相关转换之法。 建此数轴,概述此新兴NLP要与前景可用。', 'ru': 'В последние годы наблюдается всплеск публикаций, направленных на отслеживание временных изменений в лексической семантике с использованием методов распределения, в частности моделей встраивания слов на основе прогнозов. Однако этому направлению исследований недостает сплоченности, общей терминологии и общих практик более устоявшихся областей обработки естественного языка. В этой статье мы исследуем текущее состояние академических исследований, связанных с диахроническими вложениями слов и обнаружением семантических сдвигов. Мы начинаем с обсуждения понятия семантических сдвигов, а затем переходим к обзору существующих методов отслеживания таких временных сдвигов с помощью моделей встраивания слов. Мы предлагаем несколько осей, по которым эти методы могут быть сопоставлены, и описываем основные проблемы перед этим возникающим подполем NLP, а также перспективы и возможные применения.', 'hi': 'हाल के वर्षों में वितरण विधियों, विशेष रूप से भविष्यवाणी-आधारित शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल का उपयोग करके लेक्सिकल शब्दार्थ में अस्थायी परिवर्तनों का पता लगाने के उद्देश्य से प्रकाशनों की वृद्धि देखी गई है। हालांकि, अनुसंधान की इस नस में प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के अधिक स्थापित क्षेत्रों के सामंजस्य, सामान्य शब्दावली और साझा प्रथाओं का अभाव है। इस पेपर में, हम डायक्रोनिक शब्द एम्बेडिंग और सिमेंटिक शिफ्ट डिटेक्शन से संबंधित अकादमिक अनुसंधान की वर्तमान स्थिति का सर्वेक्षण करते हैं। हम शब्दार्थ बदलावों की धारणा पर चर्चा करने के साथ शुरू करते हैं, और फिर शब्द एम्बेडिंग मॉडल के साथ इस तरह के समय से संबंधित बदलावों का पता लगाने के लिए मौजूदा तरीकों के अवलोकन के साथ जारी रखते हैं। हम कई अक्षों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिनके साथ इन तरीकों की तुलना की जा सकती है, और एनएलपी के इस उभरते उपक्षेत्र से पहले मुख्य चुनौतियों को रेखांकित करते हैं, साथ ही साथ संभावनाओं और संभावित अनुप्रयोगों को भी रेखांकित करते हैं।', 'ja': '近年、分布モデル、特に予測ベースの単語埋め込みモデルを使用して、語彙意味論の時間的変化を追跡することを目的とした出版物が急増している。しかし、この研究の静脈は、自然言語処理のより確立された領域のまとまり、共通の用語、および共有された実践を欠いている。本稿では、ダイアクロニックワード埋め込みや意味論的シフト検出に関する学術研究の現状を調査した。セマンティックシフトの概念について議論し、その後、そのような時間関連のシフトをワード埋め込みモデルで追跡するための既存の方法の概要を続けます。これらの方法を比較できるいくつかの軸を提案し、NLPのこの新たなサブフィールドの前の主な課題と、見通しと可能性のある応用を概説します。', 'ga': 'Le blianta beaga anuas tá borradh faoi fhoilseacháin a bhfuil sé d’aidhm acu athruithe ama i séimeantaic foclóireachta a rianú ag baint úsáide as modhanna dáileacháin, go háirithe samhlacha leabú focal atá bunaithe ar thuar. Mar sin féin, níl an comhtháthú, an téarmaíocht choiteann agus na cleachtais chomhroinnte i réimsí níos seanbhunaithe de phróiseáil teanga nádúrtha in easnamh ar an gcineál taighde seo. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid suirbhé ar staid reatha an taighde acadúil a bhaineann le leabú focal diacrónach agus braite sealanna séimeantaigh. Tosaímid le coincheap na n-athruithe séimeantacha a phlé, agus ansin leanaimid ar aghaidh le forbhreathnú ar na modhanna atá ann cheana chun athruithe den sórt sin a bhaineann le ham a rianú le samhlacha leabú focal. Molaimid roinnt aiseanna inar féidir na modhanna seo a chur i gcomparáid lena chéile, agus breacaimid síos ar na príomhdhúshláin roimh an bhfo-réimse seo atá ag teacht chun cinn de NLP, chomh maith leis na hionchais agus na feidhmeanna féideartha.', 'hu': 'Az elmúlt években a lexikai szemantika időbeli változásainak nyomon követésére irányuló publikációk széles skálájának tanúja volt, különösen a predikciós alapú szóbeágyazási modellek segítségével. Ez a kutatási irány azonban hiányzik a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás már kialakult területeinek kohéziójával, közös terminológiájával és közös gyakorlatával. Jelen tanulmányban a diakrónikus szóbeágyazással és a szemantikai eltolódások felismerésével kapcsolatos tudományos kutatások aktuális állapotát vizsgáljuk. Kezdjük a szemantikai eltolódások fogalmának megvitatásával, majd folytatjuk az ilyen idővel kapcsolatos eltolódások nyomon követésének meglévő módszereit szóbeágyazási modellekkel. Több tengelyt javasolunk, amelyek mentén ezeket a módszereket összehasonlíthatjuk, és felvázoljuk a legfontosabb kihívásokat, amelyeket az NLP e feltörekvő alterülete előtt, valamint a kilátásokat és a lehetséges alkalmazásokat.', 'el': 'Τα τελευταία χρόνια υπήρξαν μάρτυρες ενός κύματος δημοσιεύσεων που αποσκοπούσαν στην ανίχνευση χρονικών αλλαγών στη λεξική σημασιολογία χρησιμοποιώντας μεθόδους διανομής, ιδιαίτερα μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων βασισμένα σε προβλέψεις. Ωστόσο, αυτή η ροή έρευνας στερείται της συνοχής, της κοινής ορολογίας και των κοινών πρακτικών των πιο καθιερωμένων τομέων επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, ερευνούμε την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της ακαδημαϊκής έρευνας σχετικά με τη διαχρονική ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και την ανίχνευση σημασιολογικών μετατοπίσεων. Ξεκινάμε με τη συζήτηση της έννοιας των σημασιολογικών μετατοπίσεων, και στη συνέχεια συνεχίζουμε με μια επισκόπηση των υφιστάμενων μεθόδων για την ανίχνευση τέτοιων χρονικών μετατοπίσεων με μοντέλα ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων. Προτείνουμε διάφορους άξονες κατά μήκος των οποίων μπορούν να συγκριθούν αυτές οι μέθοδοι, και περιγράφουμε τις κύριες προκλήσεις πριν από αυτό το αναδυόμενο υποπεδίο, καθώς και τις προοπτικές και τις πιθανές εφαρμογές.', 'ka': 'ბოლოდან წლის შემდეგ მონაცემები დაახლოებით, რომლებიც ლექსიკალური სიმენტიკის ცვლილებების შესახებ, განსაკუთრებით განსაზღვრებული სიტყვების მოდელების გამოყენება. მაგრამ, ამ შესწავლობის ცენი უნდა იყოს კოჰეცია, საერთო ტერმინოლოგია და გაყოფილი პრაქტიკები, რაც უფრო დარწმუნებული ნახვა ენერგიის პროცესის გარეშე ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აკედემიური სწავლებების მიმდინარე სტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატისტატის ჩვენ დავიწყებთ სიმენტიკური ცვლილებების შესახებით და შემდეგ გადავიწყებთ მსგავსი მეტოვების შესახებით, რომლებიც ამ დროის შესახებ შეცვლილებების შესახებით სიტყვების შესახებ ჩვენ გვეძლევა რამდენიმე აკუთები, რომლებიც ეს მეტივები შეუძლიათ გადამდგომარება და გამოსახულება მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილებების წინ, რომლებიც NLP-ის გახსენებული სკუთ', 'it': "Negli ultimi anni si è assistito a un'ondata di pubblicazioni volte a tracciare i cambiamenti temporali nella semantica lessicale utilizzando metodi distributivi, in particolare modelli predittivi basati sull'embedding di parole. Tuttavia, questa vena di ricerca manca della coesione, della terminologia comune e delle pratiche condivise di aree più consolidate dell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. In questo articolo, analizziamo lo stato attuale della ricerca accademica relativa alle incorporazioni diacroniche di parole e alla rilevazione dei cambiamenti semantici. Iniziamo con la discussione della nozione di cambiamento semantico, per poi continuare con una panoramica dei metodi esistenti per tracciare tali cambiamenti correlati al tempo con modelli di embedding di parole. Proponiamo diversi assi lungo i quali questi metodi possono essere confrontati e delineamo le principali sfide di fronte a questo sottocampo emergente della PNL, nonché le prospettive e le possibili applicazioni.", 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдар тарату әдістерін қолданатын лексикалық семантикасының уақытша өзгерістерін қадағалау үшін басып шығаруларды көзгертіп тұрады, өзгертілген сөздерді басып шығару үлгіле Бірақ бұл зерттеулердің көпшілігі табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін көпшілікті терминология және ортақ тәжірибелері жоқ. Бұл қағазда біз диагроникалық сөздерді ендіру және семантикалық түрлендірудің қазіргі күйін зерттейміз. Біз семантикалық өзгертулердің ойымызды талқылап бастап, содан кейін мұндай уақытта қатынаған өзгертулерді сөздерді ендіру үлгілерімен қадағалау әдістерін қарап жатқан. Біз бұл әдістерді салыстыруға болатын бірнеше бұрыштарды және NLP жұмыс ішкі өрісінің алдындағы негізгі шақыруларды, және мүмкін қолданбаларды салыстыруға болады.', 'lt': 'Pastaraisiais metais išaugo leidinių, kuriais siekiama nustatyti laikinus lexinės semantikos pokyčius naudojant platinimo metodus, ypač prognozėmis pagrįstus žodžių įterpimo modelius. Tačiau šioje mokslinių tyrimų srityje trūksta labiau įsitvirtintų gamtos kalbų apdorojimo sričių sanglaudos, bendros terminologijos ir bendros praktikos. Šiame dokumente apžvelgiame dabartinę akademinių tyrimų padėtį, susijusią su diachroniniais žodžių įdėjimais ir semantiniais pokyčiais aptikimu. Pradedame aptarti semantinių pokyčių sąvoką ir toliau apžvelgiame esamus su laiku susijusių pokyčių nustatymo metodus su žodžių įterpimo modeliais. Siūlome keletą krypčių, kuriose galima palyginti šiuos metodus, ir apibūdinami pagrindiniai iššūkiai, kylantys prieš šią kylančią NLP subsritį, taip pat perspektyvos ir galimos taikymo sritys.', 'ms': 'Tahun-tahun terakhir telah menyaksikan kebangkitan penerbitan yang bertujuan untuk mengesan perubahan sementara dalam semantik leksikal menggunakan kaedah distribusi, terutama model penyambungan perkataan berdasarkan ramalan. Namun, penyelidikan ini kekurangan persatuan, terminologi umum dan praktek berkongsi di kawasan yang lebih tertentu pemprosesan bahasa alam. Dalam kertas ini, kami survei keadaan penyelidikan akademik semasa berkaitan dengan penemuan perkataan diakronik dan pengesan perubahan semantik. Kita mula dengan membincangkan konsep perubahan semantik, dan kemudian teruskan dengan paparan ringkasan kaedah yang ada untuk mengesan perubahan berkaitan dengan masa dengan model penyampaian perkataan. Kami mencadangkan beberapa paksi di mana kaedah ini boleh dibandingkan, dan menjelaskan cabaran utama sebelum submedan NLP yang muncul ini, serta prospek dan aplikasi yang mungkin.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните години се сведоци на зголемен број публикации кои имаат за цел следење на температурните промени во лексикалната семантика користејќи дистрибуционални методи, особено модели за внесување зборови базирани на предвидување. Сепак, оваа вена на истражување недостасува од кохезија, заедничка терминологија и споделени практики на повоспоставени области на природното обработување јазик. In this paper, we survey the current state of academic research related to diachronic word embeddings and semantic shifts detection.  Почнуваме со дискутирање за идејата за семантични смени, а потоа продолжуваме со преглед на постоечките методи за следење на вакви смени поврзани со времето со модели на вградување на зборови. Предложуваме неколку оски со кои може да се споредат овие методи, и ги опишуваме главните предизвици пред овој појавен подполе на НЛП, како и изгледите и евентуалните апликации.', 'mt': 'Recent years have witnessed a surge of publications aimed at tracing temporal changes in lexical semantics using distributional methods, particularly prediction-based word embedding models.  Madankollu, din il-vina tar-riċerka hija nieqsa mill-koeżjoni, it-terminoloġija komuni u l-prattiki kondiviżi ta’ oqsma aktar stabbiliti tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nistħarrġu l-istat attwali tar-riċerka akkademika relatata mal-inkorporazzjoni diakronika tal-kliem u l-identifikazzjoni ta’ ċaqliq semantiku. Aħna bdew niddiskutu l-kunċett ta’ bidliet semantiċi, u mbagħad ikomplu b’ħarsa ġenerali lejn il-metodi eżistenti għat-traċċar ta’ tali bidliet relatati mal-ħin b’mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem. Aħna nipproponu diversi assi li matulhom jistgħu jitqabblu dawn il-metodi, u nippreżentaw l-isfidi ewlenin qabel dan is-sottoqasam emerġenti tal-NLP, kif ukoll prospetti u applikazzjonijiet possibbli.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങള്\u200d വിതരണ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ലെക്സിക്സിക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്\u200dറിക്കുകളില്\u200d സമയ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു പ്രസംഗ എന്നാലും പഠിക്കാനുള്ള ഈ വയറിന് സാധാരണ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയപരിപാടികളുടെ കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്വ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള അക്കാഡിക്കല്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനത്ത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു നമ്മള്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ഷിഫ്റ്റുകളുടെ ആശയം സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d തുടങ്ങുന്നു. പിന്നീട് നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d തുടങ്ങുന്ന ഈ രീതികള്\u200d തുല്യമാക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന കുറച്ചു അക്ഷരങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിന് മുമ്പായി ഈ', 'pl': 'Ostatnie lata były świadkami wzrostu publikacji mających na celu śledzenie zmian czasowych w semantyce leksykalnej za pomocą metod dystrybucyjnych, w szczególności modeli osadzania słów opartych na predykcjach. Jednak w tej żyłie badań brakuje spójności, wspólnej terminologii i wspólnych praktyk bardziej ugruntowanych obszarów przetwarzania języka naturalnego. W niniejszym artykule badamy aktualny stan badań naukowych związanych z diachronicznymi osadzeniami słów i wykrywaniem zmian semantycznych. Zaczynamy od omówienia pojęcia przesunięć semantycznych, a następnie kontynuujemy przegląd istniejących metod śledzenia takich zmian związanych z czasem za pomocą modeli osadzania słów. Proponujemy kilka osi, wzdłuż których można porównać te metody oraz przedstawiamy główne wyzwania stojące przed powstającym podobszarem NLP, a także perspektywy i możliwe zastosowania.', 'ro': 'În ultimii ani au fost martorii unei creșteri a publicațiilor menite să urmărească schimbările temporale în semantica lexicală folosind metode distribuționale, în special modele de încorporare a cuvintelor bazate pe predicție. Cu toate acestea, această tendință de cercetare lipsește coeziunea, terminologia comună și practicile comune ale domeniilor mai consolidate ale procesării limbajului natural. În această lucrare, analizăm starea actuală a cercetărilor academice legate de încorporarea diacronică a cuvintelor și detectarea schimbărilor semantice. Începem cu a discuta noțiunea de schimbări semantice și apoi continuăm cu o imagine de ansamblu a metodelor existente pentru a urmări astfel de schimbări legate de timp cu modele de încorporare a cuvintelor. Propunem mai multe axe de-a lungul cărora aceste metode pot fi comparate și prezentăm principalele provocări înaintea acestui subdomeniu emergent al PNL, precum și perspectivele și posibilele aplicații.', 'mn': 'Өнгөрсөн жилүүд хэвлэлүүдийн хувьд хуваарилалтын аргыг ашиглаж, ялангуяа таамаглалтын үндсэн үгний загварын хувьд хугацааны өөрчлөлтүүдийг дагах зорилготой хэвлэлүүд нэмэгдсэн. Гэвч энэ судалгааны шинжлэх ухаан нь байгалийн хэлний үйлдвэрлэлийн бүс нутагтай, нийтлэг терминологи болон хуваалцах үйл ажиллагааны холбоотой байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид одоогийн академикийн судалгааны байдлыг судалж байна. Диахроник үгний солилцоо, семантик шилжилт олох холбоотой. Бид семантик шилжилтийн ойлголтыг ярьж эхэлсэн, дараа нь ийм цаг хугацааны холбоотой шилжилтийг үгийг нэвтрүүлэх загвартай хамтдаа ойлгох арга загварын тухай ярьж эхэлсэн. Бид эдгээр аргыг харьцуулж болох олон тэнхлэг сануулж, НLP-ын шинэчлэх суурь салбарын өмнө гол сорилтуудыг тайлбарлаж, боломжтой боломжтой хэрэглээ.', 'no': 'I løpet av siste år har vitne at utgåver som er gjennomført å spora tidlegare endringar i leksiske semantikk ved hjelp av distribusjonsmetoder, særleg foregåver basert ord innebæringsmodeller. Denne forskningsveien manglar imidlertid kohesisjonen, felles terminologi og delte praksis for fleire utviklingar av naturspråksbehandling. I denne papiret undersøker vi gjeldande tilstand til akademiske forskning relatert til diakroniske ordinnbygging og semantiske forskyving. Vi startar med å diskutera ideen om semantiske forskyvingar, og så fortsetter med oversikt over dei eksisterande metodane for å spora slike tidsratte forskyvingar med ord innebygde modeller. Vi foreslår fleire aksar som disse metodane kan sammenlignast, og omformar hovudutfordringane før denne oppgående underfeltet i NLP, og framsyningar og moglege program.', 'sr': 'Poslednje godine su svjedoci porast publikacija u cilju praćenja vremenskih promjena leksičkih semantika koristeći distribucijske metode, posebno na predviđanju osnovane reči uključujući modele. Međutim, ova vena istraživanja nedostaje kohezija, zajednička terminologija i zajednička prakse više utvrđenih područja prirodnog obradivanja jezika. U ovom papiru, istražujemo trenutno stanje akademijskih istraživanja povezanog sa dijagronskim rečima ugrađenja i detekcijom semantičkih smjena. Počeli smo s objašnjavanjem pojma semantičkih smjena i nastaviti s pregledom postojećih metoda praćenja takvih vremenskih smjena sa modelima uključenih reči. Predlažemo nekoliko sjekira u kojima se te metode mogu usporediti, i predstavljamo glavne izazove prije ovog pojavljivog podpolja NLP-a, kao i izglede i moguće aplikacije.', 'so': 'Sannadihii ugu dhowayd waxay arkeen baaritaano badan oo lagu talo galay in lagu soo dabarayo beddelaadka mudada ah ee leksikalka ah ee lagu isticmaalo qaababka kala qaybsan, khusuusan qaababka sii-sheegidda oo ku qoran qoraalka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qalabkan waxbarashadu waa ka baahan yihiin iskaashatada, xirfadda caadiga ah iyo qaababka kala duduwan ee meelo badan oo lagu qoray baaritaanka luqada dabiicadda ah. Warqaddan waxaynu baaritaan xaaladda hada ee iskuulka ah oo la xiriira hadalka dhakhtarka ah iyo bedelka bedelka labaad. Waxaynu bilaabaynaa inaan ka sheekayno fikrada isbedelka ah, kadibna waxaynu sii soconaynaa aragtida joogta oo ku qoran qaababka ku saabsan saacadda ah oo ku qoran qaababka codsiga. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa faasasyo badan oo lagu barbaran karo qaababkan, waxaana ku qoraynaa dhibaatooyin muhiimka ah intaan ka hor imaanayn subfield NLP, sidoo kale filimaha iyo codsiyada suurtagalka ah.', 'sv': 'De senaste åren har bevittnat en uppsjö av publikationer som syftar till att spåra tidsmässiga förändringar i lexikal semantik med hjälp av distributionsmetoder, särskilt förutsägelsebaserade ordinbäddningsmodeller. Denna forskningsinriktning saknar dock sammanhållning, gemensam terminologi och gemensam praxis inom mer etablerade områden av naturspråksbehandling. I denna uppsats undersöker vi det aktuella tillståndet för akademisk forskning relaterad till diakroniska ordinbäddningar och detektering av semantiska skift. Vi börjar med att diskutera begreppet semantiska skift och fortsätter sedan med en översikt över de befintliga metoderna för att spåra sådana tidsrelaterade skift med ordinbäddningsmodeller. Vi föreslår flera axlar längs vilka dessa metoder kan jämföras och skisserar de viktigaste utmaningarna inför detta framväxande delområde av NLP, samt framtidsutsikter och möjliga tillämpningar.', 'si': 'අන්තිම අවුරුද්දේවල් සාක්ෂි කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරකාශන විදිහට පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ ලෙක්සිකල් සෙමැන්ටික් වල විදි නමුත්, මේ පරීක්ෂණාවේ සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ සාමාන්\u200dය භාවිතාව සමාන්\u200dය භාවිතාවේ ස්ථාපනය කරප මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා විද්\u200dයාවික පරීක්ෂණාව සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාව සහ සැමැන්තික වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණය ගැන. අපි පටන් ගන්නවා සෙමැන්ටික් වෙනස් විදිහට පටන් ගන්න, ඊට පස්සේ පටන් ගන්න විදිහට තියෙන විදිහට පටන් ගන්න විදිහට මෙහෙම වෙන අපි අක්ෂ කිහිපයක් ප්\u200dරසිද්ධා කරනවා මේ විදිහට තියෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුව', 'ur': 'اگلے سالوں نے ایک جماعت کی جگہ دیکھی ہے جو لکسیکی سیمانٹیکوں میں موقت بدلوں کی تلاش کرنا چاہتی ہے، تقسیم طریقے کے مطابق، مخصوصاً پیش بینی بوسیدہ لغات میں ڈوبنے کی مدل کے مطابق۔ However, this vein of research lacks the cohesion, common terminology and shared practices of more established areas of natural language processing. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے علمی تحقیقات کے موقع موجود موجود موجود موقعیت کی تحقیقات کی تحقیقات کی ہے جو دیاکرونک لفظ ابڈینگ اور سیمنٹی شیفٹ ڈیٹینگ کے معاملہ میں ہے. ہم سیمنٹی شیفٹوں کی نظریہ سے بحث کرنے کے ساتھ شروع کرتے ہیں اور پھر ایسی طریقے کے متعلق تغییرات کی تلاش کرنے کے لئے ایسی طریقے کے متعلق تغییرات کے ذریعہ لکھنے کے ساتھ ادامه دیتے ہیں۔ ہم بہت سی آکس پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جن کے ساتھ یہ طریقے مقایسہ کر سکتے ہیں اور اس سے پہلے NLP کے پیدا ہونے کے زیر فیلڈ کی اصلی چالیں بیان کر سکتے ہیں، اور امکانات اور امکانات کاربرد.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் வருடங்கள் விதியாசமான முறைமைகளை பயன்படுத்தி நேரமான மாற்றங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டிய பொருள்களை பார்த்துள்ளார் ஆனால், இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியின் தொகுப்பு குறைந்தது, பொதுவான முனையம் மற்றும் பங்கிட்ட செயல்கள் மற்றும் மேலும் நிறுவப் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தற்போதைய கல்வியல் ஆராய்ச்சியின் நிலையைப் பரிசோதிக்க வேண்டும் என்று அறிவிப்போம். நாம் பெமான்டிக் மாற்றங்களைப் பற்றி விவாதம் செய்ய ஆரம்பிக்கிறோம், பின்னர் நடப்பு முறைகளைக் கண்டறிந்து கொண்டு இருக்கும் முறைகள இந்த முறைகள் ஒப்பிட முடியும் மற்றும் இந்த NLP துணை புலத்திற்கு முன்னால் முதன்மையான சவால்களை வெளியீடுகிறோம் மற்றும் சாத்தி', 'uz': "Yaqinda yil o'tkazida, leksikal semantika vaqt oʻzgarishlarini qidirish uchun vaqt tarkibini ko'rsatadi, hozir prediction asosida soʻzni koʻpaytirish modellarini ishlatish uchun. Lekin, bu o'rganish veyosi, umumiy terminologi va ko'proq qo'shilgan tilni boshqarish sohalarining ko'proq qo'llanmalar yo'q. Bu qogʻozda, biz diakronisk so'zlar bilan bog'liq, va semantik shiftlarni aniqlash holatini o'rganamiz. We start with discussing the notion of semantic shifts, and then continue with an overview of the existing methods for tracing such time-related shifts with word embedding models.  Biz bir necha aks bilan bu usullarni kamaytirish mumkin, va NLP'ning kichkina chegarasini va hozirgi dasturlardan oldin asosiy muammolarni tugatamiz.", 'vi': 'Những năm gần đây đã chứng kiến một sự tăng vọt của các tạp chí nhằm quét theo thời gian thay đổi ngôn ngữ văn học bằng các phương pháp phân phát, đặc biệt là các mô hình dự đoán. Tuy nhiên, hướng nghiên cứu này thiếu sự đồng bộ, thuật ngữ chung và chia sẻ các lĩnh vực hiểu biết về ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi khảo sát tình trạng hiện nay của nghiên cứu về lĩnh vực này liên quan đến sự tổng hợp các từ và tìm ra các phiên bản. Chúng ta bắt đầu thảo luận về khái niệm về luân phiên theo ngữ nghĩa, rồi tiếp tục với một hình thức tổng quát về các phương pháp theo dõi các ca trực thời gian với các mô hình ghép từ. Chúng tôi đề xuất một số trục để so sánh các phương pháp này, và mô tả những thử thách chính trước mặt mặt sân khấu mới nổi của Njala, cùng với triển vọng và các ứng dụng có thể.', 'bg': 'Последните години станаха свидетели на нарастване на публикациите, насочени към проследяване на времевите промени в лексикалната семантика, използвайки дистрибуционни методи, особено базирани на прогнозиране модели за вграждане на думи. Въпреки това, тази линия на изследвания липсва съгласуваност, обща терминология и споделени практики на по-утвърдени области на обработка на естествения език. В настоящата статия се изследва текущото състояние на академичните изследвания, свързани с диахроничните вграждания на думи и откриването на семантични промени. Започваме с обсъждане на понятието семантични промени, а след това продължаваме с преглед на съществуващите методи за проследяване на такива промени във времето с модели за вграждане на думи. Предлагаме няколко оси, по които тези методи могат да бъдат сравнени, и очертаваме основните предизвикателства пред това нововъзникващо подполе на НЛО, както и перспективите и възможните приложения.', 'da': 'De seneste år har været vidne til en bølge af publikationer, der har til formål at spore tidsmæssige ændringer i leksikalsk semantik ved hjælp af distributionsmetoder, især forudsigelsesbaserede ordindlejringsmodeller. Denne forskning mangler imidlertid sammenhæng, fælles terminologi og fælles praksis inden for mere etablerede områder af naturlig sprogbehandling. I denne artikel undersøger vi den aktuelle tilstand af akademisk forskning relateret til diakroniske ordindlejringer og semantiske skift detektion. Vi starter med at diskutere begrebet semantiske skift og fortsætter derefter med et overblik over de eksisterende metoder til sporing af sådanne tidsrelaterede skift med ordindlejringsmodeller. Vi foreslår flere akser, hvor disse metoder kan sammenlignes, og skitserer de vigtigste udfordringer inden for dette nye underområde af NLP samt mulige anvendelsesmuligheder.', 'hr': 'Posljednje godine su svjedočili porast publikacija u cilju praćenja privremenih promjena leksičkih semantika koristeći distribucijske metode, posebno modele uključujući riječi na temelju predviđanja. Međutim, ova vena istraživanja nedostaje kohezija, zajednička terminologija i zajednička prakse više utvrđenih područja prirodnog obradivanja jezika. U ovom papiru, istražujemo trenutno stanje akademijskih istraživanja povezane s dijagronskim uključenjem riječi i otkrivanjem semantičkih smjena. Počeli smo razgovarati o pojmu semantičkih smjena i nastaviti s pregledom postojećih metoda praćenja takvih vremenskih smjena s modelima uključujući riječi. Predlažemo nekoliko sjekira u kojima se te metode mogu usporediti, i predstavljamo glavne izazove prije ovog pojavljujućeg podpolja NLP-a, kao i izgleda i mogućih primjena.', 'nl': 'De afgelopen jaren is er sprake geweest van een toename van publicaties gericht op het traceren van tijdelijke veranderingen in lexicale semantiek met behulp van distributiemethoden, met name op voorspellingen gebaseerde woord embedding modellen. Deze onderzoeksader mist echter de samenhang, gemeenschappelijke terminologie en gedeelde praktijken van meer gevestigde gebieden van de verwerking van natuurlijke talen. In dit artikel onderzoeken we de huidige stand van academisch onderzoek met betrekking tot diachrone woordinbeddingen en semantische verschuivingen detectie. We beginnen met het bespreken van het begrip semantische verschuivingen, en dan gaan we verder met een overzicht van de bestaande methoden om dergelijke tijdgerelateerde verschuivingen te traceren met woord embedding modellen. We stellen verschillende assen voor waarlangs deze methoden kunnen worden vergeleken, en schetsen de belangrijkste uitdagingen voor dit opkomende deelgebied van NLP, evenals vooruitzichten en mogelijke toepassingen.', 'fa': 'سالهای اخیر شاهد افزایش منتشر شدند که هدف دارند تغییرات موقتی در سیمانتیک\u200cهای زبانی با استفاده از روش\u200cهای تقسیم، مخصوصاً کلمه\u200cهای پیش\u200cبینی در مدل\u200cهای پیدا کردن است. ولی این رگ تحقیقات به تعلق، ترمینالوژی مشترک و تمرین مشترک بیشتری از منطقه\u200cهای ثابت شده\u200cای از پردازش زبان طبیعی کمتر است. در این کاغذ، ما موقعیت فعلی تحقیقات علمی که مربوط به پیدا کردن کلمه\u200cهای دیاکرونیک و شناسایی تغییرات semantic را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما با توجه به نظر تغییرات semantic شروع می\u200cکنیم، و بعد با توجه به روش\u200cهای موجود برای ردیابی چنین تغییرات رابطه به زمان با مدل\u200cهای تغییرات کلمه\u200cای ادامه می\u200cدهیم. ما چندین محور پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که این روش\u200cها می\u200cتوانند مقایسه شوند، و پیش از این زیر زمینه\u200cی NLP، و فرصت\u200cها و کاربردهای ممکن، چالش\u200cهای اصلی را مشخص کنند.', 'de': 'In den letzten Jahren wurden zahlreiche Publikationen veröffentlicht, die darauf abzielen, zeitliche Veränderungen in der lexikalischen Semantik mithilfe von Verteilungsmethoden nachzuvollziehen, insbesondere Vorhersage-basierte Wort-Einbettungsmodelle. Dieser Forschungsgang fehlt jedoch der Zusammenhalt, die gemeinsame Terminologie und die gemeinsamen Praktiken etablierterer Bereiche der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. In dieser Arbeit untersuchen wir den aktuellen Stand der wissenschaftlichen Forschung in Bezug auf diachrone Worteinbettungen und semantische Verschiebungsdetektion. Wir beginnen mit der Diskussion des Begriffs semantischer Verschiebungen und setzen dann mit einem Überblick über die bestehenden Methoden fort, solche zeitbezogenen Verschiebungen mit Wort-Einbettungsmodellen nachzuverfolgen. Wir schlagen mehrere Achsen vor, entlang derer diese Methoden verglichen werden können, und skizzieren die wichtigsten Herausforderungen vor diesem aufkommenden Teilfeld des NLP sowie Perspektiven und mögliche Anwendungen.', 'id': 'Tahun-tahun terakhir telah menyaksikan kebangkitan publikasi yang bertujuan untuk melacak perubahan temporal dalam semantik leksik menggunakan metode distribusi, terutama model pembangunan kata berdasarkan prediksi. Namun, vena penelitian ini kekurangan kohesi, terminologi umum dan praktek berbagi dari daerah yang lebih tertentu proses bahasa alam. In this paper, we survey the current state of academic research related to diachronic word embeddings and semantic shifts detection.  Kita mulai dengan mendiskusikan gagasan perubahan semantis, dan kemudian terus dengan overview dari metode yang ada untuk mengikuti perubahan-perubahan yang berhubungan dengan waktu dengan model penerbangan kata. Kami mengusulkan beberapa kapak di mana metode-metode ini dapat dibandingkan, dan menggambarkan tantangan utama sebelum subbidang NLP ini muncul, serta prospek dan kemungkinan aplikasi.', 'sw': 'Miaka ya hivi karibuni imeshuhudia ongezeko la kuchapisha lengo la kutafuta mabadiliko ya muda katika sekta za lexico kwa kutumia njia za usambazaji, hususani mifano ya neno linalohusu kutabiri. Hata hivyo, utafiti huu unakosa ushirikiano, utambulisho wa kawaida na mazoea yanayoshirikiana katika maeneo mengine yaliyowekwa katika upasuaji wa lugha asili. Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza hali ya sasa ya utafiti wa kitaaluma zinazohusiana na neno la kihistoria na mabadiliko ya kimapenzi. Tunaanza kujadili dhana ya mabadiliko ya kimapenzi, na kisha kuendelea na mtazamo wa njia zilizopo kwa ajili ya kutafuta mabadiliko yanayohusiana na wakati huo kwa mitindo ya maneno yanayoandikwa. Tunazipendekeza mistari kadhaa ambazo mbinu hizi zinaweza kulinganishwa, na kutangaza changamoto kuu kabla ya utaratibu huu wa NLP, pamoja na matumaini na matumizi yanayoweza.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 대량의 출판물이 출현했는데 분포식 방법, 특히 예측된 단어 삽입 모델을 바탕으로 어휘의 의미의 시간 변화를 추적하는 데 목적을 둔다.그러나 이런 연구는 자연 언어 처리가 더욱 성숙한 분야의 응집력, 통용 용어와 공유 실천이 부족하다.본고는 역사어 삽입과 의미 이동 검측에 관한 학술 연구 현황을 종합적으로 서술하였다.우리는 먼저 의미 이동의 개념을 토론한 다음에 기존의 방법을 계속 개술하고 단어 삽입 모델로 시간과 관련된 이동을 추적한다.우리는 이러한 방법을 비교할 수 있는 몇 가지 축을 제시했고 NLP라는 신흥 서브 분야가 직면한 주요 도전과 전망과 응용 가능성을 개괄했다.', 'af': "Onlangse jaar het 'n verhoeging van publikasies getuig om tydelike veranderinge in leksiese semantieke te volg deur verspreidingsmetodes te gebruik, spesiaal voorskou-gebaseerde woord inbediende modele. Maar hierdie vein van ondersoek het die kohesie, gemeenskaplike terminologie en gedeelde praksies van meer geïnstalleerde areas van natuurlike taal verwerking ontbreek. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek die huidige staat van akademiese ondersoek wat verwanter is met diakroniske woord inbettings en semantiese verskuiwende opdekking. Ons begin met die besprekking van die noisie van semantiese skakels, en dan voortgaan met 'n oorskou van die bestaande metodes vir tracking van sodanige tyd verwante skakels met woord inbêring modele. Ons voorstel verskeie as waarin hierdie metodes vergelyk kan word, en die hoofde uitdagings voor hierdie uitkomende subveld van NLP, en voorspoedies en moontlike toepassings.", 'sq': 'Vitet e fundit kanë dëshmuar një rritje publikimesh që kanë për qëllim gjurmimin e ndryshimeve të përkohshme në semantikën lexike duke përdorur metoda shpërndarëse, veçanërisht modelet e përfshirjes së fjalëve bazuar në parashikime. Megjithatë, kjo venë e kërkimit mungon kohezioni, terminologjia e përbashkët dhe praktikat e përbashkëta të fushave më të vendosura të përpunimit natyror të gjuhës. Në këtë gazetë, ne vëzhgojmë gjendjen aktuale të kërkimit akademik lidhur me përfshirjen diakronike të fjalëve dhe zbulimin e ndryshimeve semantike. Fillojmë me diskutimin e konceptit të ndryshimeve semantike, dhe pastaj vazhdojmë me një përmbledhje të metodave ekzistuese për gjurmimin e ndryshimeve të tilla të lidhura me kohën me modelet e përfshirjes së fjalëve. Ne propozojmë disa aksesa përgjatë të cilave këto metoda mund të krahasohen dhe përshkruajmë sfidat kryesore përpara kësaj nënfushe të daljes së NLP si dhe perspektivat dhe aplikimet e mundshme.', 'am': 'በቅርብ ዓመታት፣ በተለያዩ የንግግር ቃላት አካባቢ ሞዴላዎችን በመጠቀም የመግቢያ ክፍተቶችን ለመግለጽ የሚደረገውን የክፍለ ዘመቻ አካባቢዎች አግኝተዋል፡፡ ነገር ግን ይህ የፍጥረት ሀብት የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ተርሚኖጂ እና የተለየ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል የተደረገው ተግባር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የአሁኑን የአካዳቢ ትምህርት ግንኙነት እና የስሜት መለወጥ ጥያቄ እና መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የsemantic ለውጦች አሳብ እናሳውቃለን፣ ከዚያም የዚህን ሰዓት የተጠቃሚ ለውጦችን በመፍጠር እናስቀራለን፡፡ እነዚህም ሥርዓቶች ይተካክሉ ዘንድ የሚችሉትን ብዙዎች እና የNLP ደብዳቤ እና ምናልባት ፕሮግራሞች እና የሚችሉትን የዋነቱን ጥያቄዎች እና መግለጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'tr': 'Soňky ýyllar paýlaşma yöntemlerini ulanyp, a ňsatlyk taýýarlamak üçin wagt semantikleriň üýtgewlerini taýýarlamak amalydyr. Ýöne bu araştyrmalaryň aýynyň ýerinde kohesiýa, umumy terminologiýa we tebigy diller işlemegi üçin gurnalan bölekleri ýok. Bu kagyzda, biz akademiki araştyrmalaryň häzirki durumyny diachronik söz integrasy we semantik çarpyşlyklaryň tapylmagy barada pikir edýäris. Biz semantik değişikliklerin düşünmesini tartışmaya başladyk we soňra şu şekilde mevcut yöntemleri, zamanla ilgili değişiklikleri kelime içeren modellerle arkada geçirip duruyoruz. Biz birnäçe asyr boyunca bu yönler gurlap biljek we NLP subsahasından öň esasy kynçylyklary we mümkin uygulamalaryny tassyklaýarys.', 'az': 'Son illərdə, əlbəttə ki, tədbir-tədbir yazılı modellərini istifadə etmək üçün leksik semantik dəyişiklikləri izləmək məqsədilə müxtəlif dəyişikliklərin çoxluğuna şahid oldular. Ancaq bu araştırma damarının təbiətli dil işləməsində daha çox möhkəm məlumatların birləşməsi, ortaq terminoloji və paylaşılmış praksisi yoxdur. Bu kağıtda, biz diakroniki sözlərlə və semantik dəyişiklik keşfetməyə bağlı akademik araştırmaların günümüzün durumunu incidirik. Biz semantik dəyişikliklərin fikri ilə mübahisə edirik, sonra da mövcuddur metodları ilə yazılmış dəyişiklikləri ilə istifadə etmək üçün həmişə keçirdik. Biz bu metodların qarşılaşdırılmasını və NLP ortaya çıxan alt sahəsindən əvvəl əsl çətinliklərini, mümkün və mümkün uyğulamaları təklif edirik.', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি বছর লেক্সিক্যাল সেম্যান্টিকের সময় পরিবর্তন অনুসন্ধানের উদ্দেশ্যে একটি প্রকাশনা প্রত্যক্ষ করেছে, বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক শব্দের ভিত্তিক মড তবে গবেষণার এই ভেইন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার বিভিন্ন এলাকার সাথে সাধারণ মানুষের সাথে সংযোগ, সাধারণ টার্মিনিলজি  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বর্তমান একাডেমিক গবেষণার পরিস্থিতি পর্যবেক্ষণ করছি যা ডায়ারোনাক্রিয় শব্দের সাথে যুক্ত এবং সেমেন্টিক পরি আমরা সেমেন্টিক পরিবর্তনের ধারণা নিয়ে আলোচনা শুরু করি এবং তারপর এই ধরনের সময়-সম্পর্কিত পরিবর্তনের জন্যে বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি অনুসন্ধানের বিষয়টি চালু করি। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি অক্ষেত্র প্রস্তাব করছি যেখানে এই পদ্ধতিগুলো তুলনা করতে পারে এবং এনএলপির সাবফিল্ডের পূর্বে প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জের লেখা', 'bs': 'Posljednje godine su svjedocili porast publikacija u cilju praćenja vremenskih promjena leksičkih semantika koristeći distribucijske metode, posebno modele uključujući riječi na temelju predviđanja. Međutim, ova vena istraživanja nedostaje kohezija, zajednička terminologija i zajednička prakse utvrđenih područja prirodnog obradivanja jezika. U ovom papiru, istražujemo trenutno stanje akademijskih istraživanja povezanog sa dijagronskim uključenjem riječi i otkrivanjem semantičkih smjena. Počeli smo s objašnjavanjem pojma semantičkih smjena i nastaviti s pregledom postojećih metoda praćenja takvih vremenskih smjena sa modelima uključenih riječi. Predlažemo nekoliko sjekira u kojima se te metode mogu usporediti, i predstavljamo glavne izazove prije ovog pojavljivog podpolja NLP-a, kao i mogućih izgleda i primjena.', 'hy': 'Recent years have witnessed a surge of publications aimed at tracing temporal changes in lexical semantics using distributional methods, particularly prediction-based word embedding models.  Այնուամենայնիվ, հետազոտության այս տեսանկյունից բացակայում է համատերմինոլոգիան, ընդհանուր տերմինոլոգիան և ավելի հաստատուն բնական լեզվի վերամշակման ոլորտների ընդհանուր գործողությունները: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ակադեմիական հետազոտությունների ներկայիս վիճակը, որը կապված է դիաքրոնիկ բառերի ներդրման և սեմանտիկ փոփոխությունների հայտնաբերման հետ: Մենք սկսում ենք քննարկել սեմանտիկ փոփոխությունների գաղափարը, և հետո շարունակում ենք գոյություն ունենալ գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտագործում են ժամանակի հետ կապված փոփոխությունները բառերի ներգրավման մոդելների հետ: Մենք առաջարկում ենք մի քանի առանցքներ, որոնց օգնությամբ այս մեթոդները կարող են համեմատել, և ներկայացնում ենք գլխավոր մարտահրավերները նախքան ՆԼՊ-ի զարգացող ենթադաշտը, ինչպես նաև նախատեսումները և հնարավոր կիրառու', 'cs': 'V posledních letech došlo k nárůstu publikací zaměřených na sledování časových změn lexikální sémantiky pomocí distribučních metod, zejména predikčních modelů vkládání slov. Tento výzkum však postrádá soudržnost, společnou terminologii a sdílené postupy zavedenějších oblastí zpracování přirozeného jazyka. V tomto článku se zabýváme současným stavem akademického výzkumu týkajícího se diachronického vkládání slov a detekce sémantických posunů. Začneme diskutovat o pojmu sémantických posunů a pak pokračujeme v přehledu existujících metod sledování takových časově souvisejících posunů pomocí modelů vkládání slov. Navrhujeme několik os, podél kterých lze tyto metody porovnat, a nastíníme hlavní výzvy před tímto vznikajícím podpolím NLP, jakož i perspektivy a možné aplikace.', 'ca': "Els últims anys han vist un augment de publicacions destinades a detectar canvis temporals en la semàntica lèxica utilitzant mètodes de distribució, especialment models d'incorporació de paraules basats en predicció. No obstant això, aquesta vena de recerca no té la cohesió, la terminologia comú i pràctiques compartides d'àrees més estables de processament natural de llenguatges. En aquest article, estudiem l'estat actual de la recerca acadèmica relacionada amb l'incorporació diacrònica de paraules i la detecció de canvis semàntics. Comencem amb discutir la noció de canvis semàntics, i després continuem amb una visió general dels mètodes existents per rastrear aquests canvis relacionats amb el temps amb models d'incorporació de paraules. Proposem diverses destrals al llarg de les quals aquests mètodes es poden comparar, i esboquem els principals reptes abans d'aquest subcamp emergent de NLP, com també perspectives i possibles aplicacions.", 'et': 'Viimastel aastatel on levinud publikatsioonid, mille eesmärk on jälgida ajalisi muutusi leksikaalses semantikas, kasutades distributsioonimeetodeid, eelkõige ennustuspõhiseid sõnade manustamise mudeleid. Siiski puudub selles uurimissuunas looduskeele töötlemise väljakujunenud valdkondade ühtekuuluvus, ühine terminoloogia ja ühised tavad. Käesolevas töös uurime diakrooniliste sõnade manustamise ja semantiliste muutuste tuvastamisega seotud akadeemiliste uuringute hetkeseisu. Alustame semantiliste muutuste mõiste arutamisega ning seejärel jätkame ülevaadet olemasolevatest meetoditest selliste ajaliste muutuste jälgimiseks sõnade manustamise mudelitega. Me pakume välja mitu telge, millega neid meetodeid saab võrrelda, ning kirjeldame peamisi väljakutseid uue arengukava alamvaldkonnas, samuti väljavaateid ja võimalikke rakendusi.', 'fi': 'Viime vuosina julkaisut, joiden tarkoituksena on jäljittää sanastosemantiikan ajallisia muutoksia, ovat lisääntyneet jakelumenetelmillä, erityisesti ennustuspohjaisilla sanaupotusmalleilla. Tästä tutkimuksesta puuttuu kuitenkin vakiintuneempien luonnonkielten käsittelyn alojen yhtenäisyys, yhteinen terminologia ja yhteiset käytännöt. Tässä työssä kartoitamme diakroonisiin sanaupotuksiin ja semanttisten muutosten havaitsemiseen liittyvän akateemisen tutkimuksen nykytilaa. Aloitamme keskustelemalla semanttisten muutosten käsitteestä ja jatkamme sitten yleiskatsauksella olemassa olevista menetelmistä, joilla voidaan jäljittää tällaisia aikasidonnaisia muutoksia sanan upotusmalleilla. Ehdotamme useita toimintalinjoja, joiden avulla näitä menetelmiä voidaan vertailla, ja hahmottelemme tämän nousevan uuden ohjelman alakentän tärkeimmät haasteet sekä tulevaisuudennäkymät ja mahdolliset sovellukset.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk éntuk akeh pisan winih dhéwé nggawe ngubah tarjamahan tentang kanggo tukang semanti sing leksikalé nggambar maneh Distribubution, supayano ngerasakno-basa gambar model embedding. Kamunyatan, winih punika ingkang dipunangguna kuwi mbok saiki, kawit terminal kang dipunangguna karo perusahaan anyar tentang kanggo nguasai ingkang adalah. Awak dhéwé éntuk kuwi, awak dhéwé ngerasakno perusahaan kawit karo hal dadi, nik awak dhéwé kuwi basa gambar nggambar terakhi karo hal basa gambar terakhi. Awak dhéwé mulai ngono nggawe barang semanti shift, dadi mulai ngono nggawe sistem sistem sing gawe nggawe tarjamahan kanggo tracing time-connected shifts with word embedding model. Awak dhéwé ngerasah éwé éntuk kanggo nggawe sistem iki dadi, lan nggawe ngubah perbudhakan tuak dhéwé iki éwé negoro perusahaan negoro NLP, lan nggawe Perintah lan aplikasi sing bisa dianggap.', 'he': 'בשנים האחרונות היו עדים לערימה של פרסומות שמתכוונות לאתר שינויים זמניים בסמנטיקה לקסיקה באמצעות שיטות פיצוי, במיוחד דוגמני קיצוב מילים מבוססים על צפייה. עם זאת, הוורד המחקר הזה חסר בתיכון, טרמולוגיה משותפת ופרקטיקות משותפות של אזורים יותר מוסדות של עיבוד שפה טבעית. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו סוקרים את המצב הנוכחי של מחקרים אקדמיים שקשורים למילים דיאכרוניות ולגלות שינויים סמנטיים. אנו מתחילים לדון על הרעיון של שינויים סמנטיים, ואז ממשיכים עם מבט מושלם של השיטות הקיומות לאתר שינויים קשורים לזמן כאלה עם דוגמנים של קישום מילים. We propose several axes along which these methods can be compared, and outline the main challenges before this emerging subfield of NLP, as well as prospects and possible applications.', 'ha': "Ga shekara na farko sun halarce wani takarda da aka yi aimar ka trace musanyoyin mutane cikin semantiki na loksika, kuma don su yi amfani da shiryoyin rabo, kuma da haske da misãlai masu bastarwa da kalma ke cikin basĩra. A lokacin da, wannan hani na fassarar tafarki yana kasancẽwa na samura, tsakanin da kawaici da kuma masu sambawa da mazaɓa na saurari masu cikin kashi da aka rubũta lugha na natsuwa. Daga wannan takardan, Munã tambayi halin da aka sanar da ma'abũcin akalimi da ke yi na ganin maganar taƙaita da musanya na sakan hani. Za fara a yi jayayya game da zaɓen musanya na semanti, sa'an nan kuma ke ƙara bayani kan hanyoyin wanda ke da za'a trace musanya na da waɗancan da aka yi danganta da shi da misãlai da aka shigar da shi. Munã buɗe wasu axis da za'a samu'a da waɗannan hanyõyin, kuma Mu ƙayyade masu muhimmi gaba ga wannan subfield na NLP mai fitarwa, da sami filayen da shiryoyin ayuka da ake iya iya.", 'sk': 'V zadnjih letih je priča porastu publikacij, namenjenih sledenju časovnih sprememb v leksikalni semantiki z uporabo distribucijskih metod, zlasti modelov vključevanja besed, ki temeljijo na napovedih. Vendar pa v tej smeri raziskav primanjkuje kohezije, skupne terminologije in skupne prakse bolj uveljavljenih področij obdelave naravnega jezika. V prispevku pregledujemo trenutno stanje akademskih raziskav, povezanih z diakroničnimi vključitvami besed in zaznavanjem semantičnih premikov. Začnemo z razpravo o pojmu semantičnih premikov, nato pa nadaljujemo s pregledom obstoječih metod sledenja takšnih časovnih premikov z modeli vključevanja besed. Predlagamo več osi, po katerih je mogoče te metode primerjati, in opisujemo glavne izzive pred tem nastajajočim podpodročjem NLP ter obete in možne aplikacije.', 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་ལོ་ཚིགས་རྗེས་སུ་དཔར་བསྐྲུན་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་ལྟ་སྟངས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་ཁྱད་པར་རྟོགས་བཞག་པའི་ག ཡིན་ནའང་། དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རིག་ཚན་དེ་ལ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དང་མཐུན་རིམ་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་མང་ཙམ་མཐུན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐོང་སྣང་གྲངས་རྩིས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཐོང་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བཙལ་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྔོན་ལྟར་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཀྱི་དོན་ལྟར་བཤད་པ་དང་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་ནུས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྗེས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བའི་ We propose several axes along which these methods can be compared, and outline the main challenges before this emerging subfield of NLP, as well as prospects and possible applications.'}
{'en': 'Interaction-Aware Topic Model for Microblog Conversations through Network Embedding and User Attention', 'ar': 'نموذج موضوع التفاعل المدرك لمحادثات المدونات الصغيرة من خلال تضمين الشبكة واهتمام المستخدم', 'pt': 'Modelo de tópico sensível à interação para conversas de microblog por meio de incorporação de rede e atenção do usuário', 'es': 'Modelo de tema sensible a la interacción para conversaciones de microblogs a través de la integración de redes y la atención del usuario', 'fr': "Modèle de sujet sensible aux interactions pour les conversations sur microblog grâce à l'intégration réseau et à l'attention des utilisateurs", 'ja': 'ネットワーク埋め込みとユーザーアテンションによるマイクロブログ会話のためのインタラクション意識トピックモデル', 'zh': '盖网络嵌用户注之微博对话交感主题', 'hi': 'नेटवर्क एम्बेडिंग और उपयोगकर्ता ध्यान के माध्यम से Microblog वार्तालापों के लिए इंटरैक्शन-जागरूक विषय मॉडल', 'ru': 'Взаимодействие-понимающая модель темы для микроблогов через сетевое встраивание и внимание пользователя', 'ga': 'Samhail Topaic atá Feasach ar Idirghníomhaíocht le haghaidh Comhráite Micribhleoige trí Leabú Líonra agus Aire Úsáideora', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Interakciótudatos téma modell mikroblog beszélgetésekhez a hálózati beágyazás és a felhasználói figyelem segítségével', 'lt': 'Interaction-Aware Theme Model for Microblog Conversations through Network Embedding and User Attention', 'kk': 'Name', 'mk': 'Interaction-Aware Topic Model for Microblog Conversations through Network Embedding and User Attention', 'el': 'Μοντέλο θέματος για συζητήσεις μέσω ενσωμάτωσης δικτύου και προσοχής χρήστη', 'it': "Modello di argomento consapevole dell'interazione per le conversazioni sui microblog attraverso l'embedding di rete e l'attenzione degli utenti", 'mn': 'Майкроблог ярилцлагуудын интерактив-Aware Theme Model through Network Embedding and User Attention', 'ms': 'Name', 'no': 'Name', 'ml': 'മൈക്രോബോഗ് സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഇന്റര്\u200dക്ഷന്\u200d അറിയുന്ന പ്രമേയ മോഡല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങും ഉപയ', 'ro': 'Model de subiect conștient de interacțiune pentru conversațiile Microblog prin încorporarea rețelei și atenția utilizatorilor', 'mt': 'Mudell Tematiku Konxju mill-Interazzjoni għall-Konversjonijiet tal-Mikroblogs permezz tal-Inkorporazzjoni tan-Netwerk u l-Attenzjoni tal-Utenti', 'so': 'Interaction-aware Model for Microblog Conversations via Network Embedding and User Attention', 'pl': 'Interakcyjny model tematyczny dla rozmów mikroblogowych poprzez osadzanie sieci i uwagę użytkownika', 'sr': 'Интеракционно-известно модел теме за микроблог разговоре через интеграцију мреже и признање потребитела', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Interaktionsmedveten ämnesmodell för mikrobloggskonversationer genom nätverksinbäddning och användaruppmärksamhet', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Tương tác-Nhận thức chương trình đối thoại Microblog qua mạng đệm và chú ý người dùng', 'bg': 'Модел на тема, осъзнат за взаимодействието, за разговори с микроблог чрез вграждане в мрежа и внимание на потребителя', 'nl': 'Interactie-Aware Topic Model voor Microblog gesprekken door middel van netwerk embedding en gebruikersaandacht', 'hr': 'Interakcijski model tema za mikroblog razgovore kroz integraciju mreže i pozornost korisnika', 'da': 'Interaktionsbevidst emnemodel for Microblog samtaler gennem netværksindlejring og brugeropmærksomhed', 'id': 'Model Topik Awas Interaksi untuk Perbualan Microblog melalui Pencampuran Jaringan dan Perhatian Pengguna', 'ko': '네트워크 삽입과 사용자의 관심을 바탕으로 하는 마이크로 블로그 상호작용 화제 모델', 'de': 'Interaktionsbewusstes Themenmodell für Microblog-Gespräche durch Netzwerk-Einbettung und Benutzeraufmerksamkeit', 'sw': 'Modala ya Mada inayofahamika kwa ajili ya Mazungumzo ya Microblog kupitia Mtandao wa Kuzingatia na Mtumiaji', 'tr': 'Mikroblog soňlaşmalar üçin Interaction-Aware Topary Modeli Aýry Girdirmek we Ullançy Aralygy bilen', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Modeli i temës së ndërveprimit për bisedimet e mikroblogut nëpërmjet përfshirjes së rrjetit dhe vëmendjes së përdoruesit', 'am': 'Interaction-aware Topic Model for Microblog Conversations via Network Embedding and User Attention', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Şəbəkə İşləndirməsi və Qullanıcı Dikkati Aracılığı ilə Mikroblog Konuşmalarının İşləndirməsi-Aware Topic Modeli', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Interakcijski model tema za mikroblog razgovore kroz integraciju mreže i pozornost korisnika', 'fa': 'مدل موضوع بینایی برای مکالمات میکروبلاگ از طریق وارد کردن شبکه و توجه کاربر', 'ca': "Model de tema conscient d'interacció per converses de microblogs a través de l'integració de xarxa i l'atenció dels usuaris", 'cs': 'Interakční tématický model pro konverzace na Microblogu prostřednictvím síťového vložení a pozornosti uživatelů', 'et': 'Mikroblogi vestluste teemamudel võrgupõimimise ja kasutaja tähelepanu kaudu', 'fi': 'Interaktiotietoinen aihemalli Mikroblogikeskusteluille verkon upottamisen ja käyttäjän huomion kautta', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Model teme, ki se zaveda interakcije za pogovore mikroblogov prek vgradnje omrežja in uporabniške pozornosti', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Interaction-Aware Topic Model for Microblog Conversations through Network Embedding and User Attention', 'bo': 'Interaction-Aware Topic Model for Microblog Conversations through Network Embedding and User Attention'}
{'en': 'Traditional topic models are insufficient for topic extraction in social media. The existing methods only consider text information or simultaneously model the posts and the static characteristics of social media. They ignore that one discusses diverse topics when dynamically interacting with different people. Moreover, people who talk about the same topic have different effects on the topic. In this paper, we propose an Interaction-Aware Topic Model (IATM) for microblog conversations by integrating network embedding and user attention. A conversation network linking users based on reposting and replying relationship is constructed to mine the dynamic user behaviours. We model dynamic interactions and user attention so as to learn interaction-aware edge embeddings with social context. Then they are incorporated into neural variational inference for generating the more consistent topics. The experiments on three real-world datasets show that our proposed model is effective.', 'ar': 'نماذج الموضوعات التقليدية غير كافية لاستخراج الموضوع في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. الأساليب الحالية فقط تأخذ في الاعتبار المعلومات النصية أو تقوم في نفس الوقت بنمذجة المنشورات والخصائص الثابتة لوسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. يتجاهلون أن المرء يناقش مواضيع متنوعة عند التفاعل الديناميكي مع أشخاص مختلفين. علاوة على ذلك ، فإن الأشخاص الذين يتحدثون عن نفس الموضوع لديهم تأثيرات مختلفة على الموضوع. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نموذج موضوع التفاعل المدرك (IATM) لمحادثات المدونات الصغيرة من خلال دمج تضمين الشبكة واهتمام المستخدم. يتم إنشاء شبكة محادثة تربط المستخدمين بناءً على علاقة إعادة الإرسال والرد لتعدين سلوكيات المستخدم الديناميكية. نحن نمثل التفاعلات الديناميكية واهتمام المستخدم حتى نتعلم حفلات الزفاف المدركة للتفاعل مع السياق الاجتماعي. ثم يتم دمجهم في الاستدلال العصبي المتغير لتوليد موضوعات أكثر اتساقًا. تُظهر التجارب على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات حقيقية أن نموذجنا المقترح فعال.', 'es': 'Los modelos de temas tradicionales son insuficientes para la extracción de temas en las redes sociales. Los métodos existentes solo consideran la información de texto o modelan simultáneamente las publicaciones y las características estáticas de las redes sociales. Ignoran que se discuten temas diversos cuando se interactúa dinámicamente con diferentes personas. Además, las personas que hablan del mismo tema tienen diferentes efectos sobre el tema. En este artículo, proponemos un modelo de tema sensible a la interacción (IATM) para las conversaciones de microblogs mediante la integración de la red y la atención del usuario. Se construye una red de conversación que vincula a los usuarios en función de la relación de republicación y respuesta para minar los comportamientos dinámicos de los usuarios. Modelamos las interacciones dinámicas y la atención del usuario para aprender las incorporaciones de borde sensibles a la interacción con el contexto social. Luego se incorporan a la inferencia variacional neuronal para generar los temas más consistentes. Los experimentos en tres conjuntos de datos del mundo real muestran que el modelo propuesto es eficaz.', 'fr': "Les modèles thématiques traditionnels sont insuffisants pour l'extraction de sujets dans les médias sociaux. Les méthodes existantes ne prennent en compte que les informations textuelles ou modélisent simultanément les publications et les caractéristiques statiques des réseaux sociaux. Ils ignorent que l'on discute de divers sujets lorsqu'on interagit dynamiquement avec différentes personnes. De plus, les personnes qui parlent d'un même sujet ont des effets différents sur le sujet. Dans cet article, nous proposons un modèle IATM (Interaction-Aware Topic Model) pour les conversations de microblog en intégrant l'intégration réseau et l'attention des utilisateurs. Un réseau de conversation reliant les utilisateurs sur la base d'une relation de republication et de réponse est construit pour explorer les comportements dynamiques des utilisateurs. Nous modélisons les interactions dynamiques et l'attention des utilisateurs afin d'apprendre les intégrations périphériques sensibles aux interactions avec le contexte social. Ils sont ensuite intégrés à l'inférence variationnelle neuronale pour générer les sujets les plus cohérents. Les expériences sur trois ensembles de données du monde réel montrent que le modèle que nous proposons est efficace.", 'pt': 'Modelos de tópicos tradicionais são insuficientes para extração de tópicos nas mídias sociais. Os métodos existentes consideram apenas informações de texto ou modelam simultaneamente as postagens e as características estáticas das mídias sociais. Eles ignoram que se discute temas diversos ao interagir dinamicamente com pessoas diferentes. Além disso, pessoas que falam sobre o mesmo assunto têm efeitos diferentes sobre o assunto. Neste artigo, propomos um Interaction-Aware Topic Model (IATM) para conversas em microblogs, integrando a incorporação de rede e a atenção do usuário. Uma rede de conversação ligando usuários com base no relacionamento de repostagem e resposta é construída para explorar os comportamentos dinâmicos do usuário. Nós modelamos interações dinâmicas e a atenção do usuário para aprender a integração de bordas sensíveis à interação com o contexto social. Em seguida, eles são incorporados à inferência variacional neural para gerar os tópicos mais consistentes. Os experimentos em três conjuntos de dados do mundo real mostram que nosso modelo proposto é eficaz.', 'ja': '従来のトピックモデルは、ソーシャルメディアでのトピック抽出には不十分です。既存のメソッドは、テキスト情報のみを考慮するか、投稿とソーシャルメディアの静的特性を同時にモデル化します。彼らは、さまざまな人とダイナミックにやり取りする際に、さまざまなトピックについて話し合うことを無視します。さらに、同じトピックについて話す人は、そのトピックにさまざまな効果があります。本稿では，ネットワーク埋め込みとユーザーの注目度を統合することで，マイクロブログ会話のためのInteraction - Aware Topic Model (IATM)を提案する．リポストと返信の関係に基づいてユーザーをリンクする会話ネットワークは、動的なユーザーの行動をマイニングするために構築されます。私たちは、ソーシャルコンテキストとの相互作用を意識したエッジ埋め込みを学ぶために、動的な相互作用とユーザーの注意をモデル化します。次いで、それらは、より一貫したトピックを生成するために、神経変動推論に組み込まれる。3つの実際のデータセットの実験では、提案されたモデルが効果的であることが示されています。', 'zh': '旧题模形不足以取题于社交媒体。 今惟思文本信息、同时帖社交媒体静态特建模。 忽于异人动互动议论不同题。 此外,谈论同主题者,有异于此。 本文因整合网络嵌用户注意,设一施于微博对话交互感知主题模(IATM)。 构基转报之链接用户,网络以掘动用户行。 建模于动用户,以学社交情。 然后并之神经变分理,以成其一。 3实数集上之实验,有效也。', 'hi': 'पारंपरिक विषय मॉडल सामाजिक मीडिया में विषय निष्कर्षण के लिए अपर्याप्त हैं। मौजूदा तरीके केवल पाठ जानकारी पर विचार करते हैं या साथ ही साथ पोस्ट और सोशल मीडिया की स्थैतिक विशेषताओं को मॉडल करते हैं। वे इस बात की अनदेखी करते हैं कि विभिन्न लोगों के साथ गतिशील रूप से बातचीत करते समय कोई विभिन्न विषयों पर चर्चा करता है। इसके अलावा, जो लोग एक ही विषय के बारे में बात करते हैं, उनका विषय पर अलग-अलग प्रभाव पड़ता है। इस पेपर में, हम नेटवर्क एम्बेडिंग और उपयोगकर्ता ध्यान को एकीकृत करके माइक्रोब्लॉग वार्तालापों के लिए एक इंटरैक्शन-अवेयर टॉपिक मॉडल (IATM) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। एक वार्तालाप नेटवर्क जो उपयोगकर्ताओं को रीपोस्टिंग और रिप्लाईिंग संबंध के आधार पर लिंक करता है, गतिशील उपयोगकर्ता व्यवहारों को माइन करने के लिए बनाया जाता है। हम गतिशील इंटरैक्शन और उपयोगकर्ता का ध्यान मॉडल करते हैं ताकि सामाजिक संदर्भ के साथ इंटरैक्शन-जागरूक एज एम्बेडिंग सीख सकें। फिर उन्हें अधिक सुसंगत विषयों को उत्पन्न करने के लिए तंत्रिका भिन्नतात्मक अनुमान में शामिल किया जाता है। तीन वास्तविक दुनिया डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल प्रभावी है।', 'ru': 'Традиционные тематические модели недостаточны для извлечения темы в социальных сетях. Существующие методы учитывают только текстовую информацию или одновременно моделируют посты и статические характеристики социальных сетей. Они игнорируют тот факт, что при динамичном взаимодействии с разными людьми обсуждаются различные темы. Более того, люди, которые говорят на одну и ту же тему, по-разному влияют на эту тему. В этой статье мы предлагаем интерактивно-зависимую тематическую модель (IATM) для разговоров в микроблоге путем интеграции сетевого встраивания и внимания пользователя. Разговорная сеть, связывающая пользователей на основе отношений репостинга и ответа, создается для майнинга динамического поведения пользователей. Мы моделируем динамические взаимодействия и внимание пользователей таким образом, чтобы изучать интеграцию взаимодействия с социальным контекстом. Затем они включаются в нейронный вариационный вывод для генерации более последовательных тем. Эксперименты на трех реальных наборах данных показывают, что предлагаемая нами модель эффективна.', 'ga': 'Ní leor samhlacha traidisiúnta topaicí chun topaicí a bhaint as na meáin shóisialta. Ní bhreithníonn na modhanna atá ann faoi láthair ach faisnéis téacs nó múnla a dhéanamh go comhuaineach ar phoist agus ar shaintréithe statacha na meán sóisialta. Déanann siad neamhaird de go bpléann duine ábhair éagsúla agus iad ag idirghníomhú go dinimiciúil le daoine éagsúla. Thairis sin, tá éifeachtaí éagsúla ar an ábhar ag daoine a labhraíonn faoin ábhar céanna. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid Samhail Topaic atá Feasach ar Idirghníomhaíocht (IATM) le haghaidh comhráite micreabhlog trí leabú líonra agus aird úsáideoirí a chomhtháthú. Tógtar líonra comhrá a nascann úsáideoirí bunaithe ar chaidreamh athphostála agus freagartha chun iompraíochtaí dinimiciúil an úsáideora a mhianlú. Déanaimid idirghníomhaíochtaí dinimiciúla agus aird úsáideoirí a shamhaltú ionas go bhfoghlaimímid idirghníomhaíochtaí feasacha ar idirghníomhaíocht le comhthéacs sóisialta. Ansin déantar iad a ionchorprú i tátal athraitheach néareolaíoch chun na hábhair níos comhsheasmhaí a ghiniúint. Léiríonn na turgnaimh ar thrí thacar sonraí den fhíorshaol go bhfuil an tsamhail atá beartaithe againn éifeachtach.', 'el': 'Τα παραδοσιακά μοντέλα θεμάτων δεν επαρκούν για την εξαγωγή θεμάτων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι λαμβάνουν υπόψη μόνο πληροφορίες κειμένου ή μοντελοποιούν ταυτόχρονα τις δημοσιεύσεις και τα στατικά χαρακτηριστικά των μέσων κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Αγνοούν ότι κάποιος συζητά διάφορα θέματα όταν αλληλεπιδρά δυναμικά με διαφορετικούς ανθρώπους. Επιπλέον, οι άνθρωποι που μιλούν για το ίδιο θέμα έχουν διαφορετικές επιπτώσεις στο θέμα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο αλληλεπίδρασης για συζητήσεις μικροιστολογίων ενσωματώνοντας την ενσωμάτωση δικτύου και την προσοχή των χρηστών. Ένα δίκτυο συνομιλίας που συνδέει τους χρήστες με βάση τη σχέση επανατοποθέτησης και απάντησης κατασκευάζεται για να εξορύξει τις δυναμικές συμπεριφορές των χρηστών. Μοντελοποιούμε δυναμικές αλληλεπιδράσεις και προσοχή των χρηστών, έτσι ώστε να μάθουμε ενσωμάτωση άκρων με το κοινωνικό πλαίσιο. Στη συνέχεια ενσωματώνονται στο συμπέρασμα νευρολογικών παραλλαγών για τη δημιουργία των πιο συνεπών θεμάτων. Τα πειράματα σε τρία σύνολα πραγματικών δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο είναι αποτελεσματικό.', 'hu': 'A hagyományos téma modellek nem elegendőek a téma kivonásához a közösségi médiában. A meglévő módszerek csak a szöveges információkat veszik figyelembe, vagy egyidejűleg modellezik a bejegyzéseket és a közösségi média statikus jellemzőit. Figyelmen kívül hagyják, hogy különböző témákat vitatnak meg, amikor dinamikusan interakcióba lépnek különböző emberekkel. Továbbá azoknak az embereknek, akik ugyanarról a témáról beszélnek, különböző hatással vannak a témára. Jelen tanulmányban egy interakciótudatos téma modellt (IATM) javasolunk mikroblog beszélgetésekhez a hálózati beágyazás és a felhasználói figyelem integrálásával. A dinamikus felhasználói viselkedések bányászatára kialakított beszélgetési hálózat, amely a felhasználók újrakezdésén és válaszadási kapcsolaton alapul. Modelláljuk a dinamikus interakciókat és a felhasználói figyelmet, hogy megtanuljuk az interakciótudatos élbeágyazásokat a közösségi kontextusban. Ezután beépülnek a neurális variációs következtetésbe, hogy a konzisztensebb témákat generálják. A három valós adathalmazon végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell hatékony.', 'ka': 'ტრადიციონალური ტემების მოდელები სოციალური მედიაში ტემების ექსტრაქციისთვის არაფექციელია. მხოლოდ სოციალური მედიდიის სტატიკური პროგრამეტრები და სოციალური მედიდიის სტატიკური პროგრამეტრები აღმოჩენა. ისინი იგნურაციენ, რომ ერთი განსხვავებული ტემების განსაზღვრება, როდესაც დინამიკურად განსხვავებული ადამიანებთან შესახებ. მაგრამ, ადამიანები, რომლებიც იგივე თემის შესახებ ვისაუბრებენ, აქვს განსხვავებული ეფექტები ამ თემის შესახებ. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ ინტერქქცია-დავიწყებელი ტემიკური მოდელი (IATM) მიკრობლოგური პარამეტრების ინტერქცია ქსელის ინტერქცია და გამოყენებელი ინტერქცია. პარამეტრების ქსელი, რომელიც გამოყენებელების რეპოსტირება და გასაღებისთვის შესაბამისად დაკავშირებულია დინამიკური მომხმარებელი ქცევაზე. ჩვენ დინამიკური ინტერფექციები და მომხმარებელი ინტერფექციები მოდელურობით, რომ ინტერფექციის ინტერფექციას სოციალური კონტექსტურით შემდეგ ისინი ნეიროლური გარიაციალური ინფრენციაში დაყენებულია უფრო კონსტენსტური ტემების შექმნა. ექსპერიმენტები სამი რეალური მსოფლიო მონაცემების დანაცემებით ჩვენი მოდელი ეფექტიურია.', 'it': "I modelli tematici tradizionali sono insufficienti per l'estrazione di argomenti nei social media. I metodi esistenti considerano solo le informazioni testuali o contemporaneamente modellano i post e le caratteristiche statiche dei social media. Ignorano che si discute argomenti diversi quando si interagisce dinamicamente con persone diverse. Inoltre, le persone che parlano dello stesso argomento hanno effetti diversi sull'argomento. In questo articolo, proponiamo un modello di argomento consapevole dell'interazione (IATM) per le conversazioni sui microblog integrando l'embedding della rete e l'attenzione degli utenti. Una rete di conversazione che collega gli utenti in base alla relazione di repost e risposta è costruita per minare i comportamenti dinamici degli utenti. Modelliamo le interazioni dinamiche e l'attenzione dell'utente in modo da imparare l'interazione con il contesto sociale. Poi sono incorporati nell'inferenza variazionale neurale per generare argomenti più coerenti. Gli esperimenti su tre set di dati reali dimostrano che il modello proposto è efficace.", 'kk': 'Тәдімгі нақыштардың үлгілері социалдық медиақтарда нақышты тартыруға жеткіліксіз. Бар әдістер тек мәтін мәліметін қалайды немесе социалдық медиақтардың статикалық қасиеттерін қалайды. Олар әртүрлі адамдармен динамикалық қатынас жасағанда, әртүрлі нақыштарды талқылады. Сонымен қатар, бір нақышты туралы сөйлейтін адамдар тақырыпта айырмашылық эффекттері бар. Бұл қағазда, желі ендіру және пайдаланушылардың нақышты (IATM) үшін микроблог сөйлесу үшін интерактивтік-Aware нақышты үлгісін ұсынамыз. Қайталану және жауап беру қатынасына негізделген пайдаланушыларды қосылу желі динамикалық пайдаланушылардың қасиеттеріне құрылады. Біз динамикалық интерфейстерді және пайдаланушылардың маңыздылығын өзгерту үшін әлеуметтік контекстікті қолдануды оқыту үшін түсіндіреміз. Содан кейін олар көптеген нақыштарды жасау үшін невралдық айнымалылық инференциясына қосылған. Үш әлемдегі деректер қорларының тәжірибелері біздің таңдалған моделіміздің эффективнігін көрсетеді.', 'ms': 'Model topik tradisional tidak cukup untuk ekstraksi topik dalam media sosial. Kaedah yang wujud hanya mempertimbangkan maklumat teks atau simultan model pos dan karakteristik statik media sosial. They ignore that one discusses diverse topics when dynamically interacting with different people.  Lagipun, orang yang bercakap tentang topik yang sama mempunyai kesan yang berbeza pada topik. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan Model Topik Berkesadaran (IATM) untuk perbualan mikroblog dengan mengintegrasikan penyambungan rangkaian dan perhatian pengguna. Name Kami model interaksi dinamik dan perhatian pengguna supaya belajar penyelesaian pinggir yang sedar interaksi dengan konteks sosial. Kemudian mereka disertai dalam kesimpulan variasi saraf untuk menghasilkan topik yang lebih konsisten. Eksperimen pada tiga set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa model yang kami cadangkan adalah berkesan.', 'mk': 'Традиционалните темски модели не се доволни за екстракција на темата во социјалните медиуми. Постојаните методи ги сметаат само текстовите информации или истовремено ги моделираат постовите и статичките карактеристики на социјалните медиуми. Тие игнорираат дека дискутираат за различни теми кога динамично интерактираат со различни луѓе. Покрај тоа, луѓето кои зборуваат за истата тема имаат различни ефекти на темата. In this paper, we propose an Interaction-Aware Topic Model (IATM) for microblog conversations by integrating network embedding and user attention.  Разговарачка мрежа која ги поврзува корисниците базирана на врската со реставирање и одговор е изградена за да се искористат динамичните однесувања на корисниците. Ние моделираме динамични интеракции и внимание на корисникот за да научиме интеракционално свесни рамки вградени во социјалниот контекст. Потоа се вклучени во нервната варијационална инференција за генерирање на поконстантни теми. Експериментите на три податоци од реалниот свет покажуваат дека нашиот предложен модел е ефикасен.', 'lt': 'Traditional topic models are insufficient for topic extraction in social media.  Esamuose metoduose atsižvelgiama tik į tekstinę informaciją arba tuo pačiu metu modeliuojama socialinės žiniasklaidos pareigybė ir statinės savybės. Jie ignoruoja tai, kad dinamiškai bendraujant su skirtingais žmonėmis diskutuojama apie įvairias temas. Be to, žmonės, kurie kalba apie tą pačią temą, turi skirtingą poveikį temai. Šiame dokumente siūlome mikroblogų pokalbių sąveikos žinomo teminio modelio (IATM), integruojant tinklo įtraukimą ir vartotojų dėmesį. Siekiant išsaugoti dinamiškus naudotojų elgesius, sukurtas pokalbių tinklas, jungiantis naudotojus, grindžiamas perskaitymu ir atsakymu. Mes modeliuojame dinamišką sąveiką ir vartotojų dėmesį, kad mokytume sąveiką suvokiančių kraštų įtraukimo į socialinį kontekstą. Tada jie įtraukiami į neurologinę variacinę išvadą, kad būtų sukurtos nuoseklesnės temos. Eksperimentai su trimis realaus pasaulio duomenų rinkiniais rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas model is yra veiksmingas.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн салбарт сэдэв гаргахын тулд уламжлалт сэдэв загварууд хангалтгүй. Бүгдээрээ байгаа арга нь зөвхөн текст мэдээллийг эсвэл нийгмийн мэдээллийн загваруудыг зөвхөн загвар, статистикийн харьцаа гэж боддог. Тэд өөр хүмүүстэй харилцах үед өөр өөр сэдвүүдийн тухай ярилцаж байхыг хичээдэг. Мөн адилхан сэдвийн тухай ярьдаг хүмүүс сэдвийн тухай өөр нөлөөтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид микроблог ярилцлагуудын интерактив-Aware Theme Model (IATM) болон хэрэглэгчдийн анхаарал татаж сүлжээг нэгтгэх болон интерактив-Aware Thematic Model (IATM) санал өгдөг. Хэрэглэгчидтэй холбоотой ярианы сүлжээний холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой. Хэрэглэгчийн харилцааны харилцаа миний хувьд хөдөлгөөнтэй үйл явдал Бид динамикийн харилцаа болон хэрэглэгчийн анхаарлыг загварлаж, нийгмийн нөхцөлд харилцаа ойлгохын тулд харилцаа ойлгох талаар суралцаж байна. Дараа нь эдгээр нь илүү тогтмол сэдэв бий болгохын тулд мэдрэлийн өөрчлөлтийн халдвар үүсгэдэг. Гурван бодит ертөнцийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтууд бидний санал өгөгдлийн загвар үр дүнтэй гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയയില്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന് പാരാഗത്തികമായ പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ആവശ്യമില്ല. നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഒരേ സമയത്ത് പോസ്റ്റുകളും സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയയുടെ സ്ഥിതിക വ വ്യത്യസ്തമായി വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഷയങ്ങള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d അവരത് അവഗണിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ടും, ഒരേ കാര്യത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് സംസാരിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ട്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഇന്റര്\u200dക്ഷന്\u200d അറിയുന്ന ടെപ്പിക്ക് മോഡല്\u200d (IATM) മൈക്രോബോഗ് സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചെയ്യുന്നു. നെറ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ലിങ്ക് ചെയ്യുന്ന ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടും പിന്തിരിക്കുന്നതും എന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സാമൂഹിക കോണ്\u200dസെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റിങ്ങുമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധയും മ Then they are incorporated into neural variational inference for generating the more consistent topics.  മൂന്നു യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിച്ച മോഡല', 'ro': 'Modelele tradiționale de subiecte sunt insuficiente pentru extragerea subiectelor în rețelele sociale. Metodele existente iau în considerare doar informațiile text sau modelează simultan postările și caracteristicile statice ale rețelelor sociale. Ei ignoră faptul că se discută subiecte diverse atunci când interacționează dinamic cu diferiți oameni. Mai mult decât atât, oamenii care vorbesc despre același subiect au efecte diferite asupra subiectului. În această lucrare, propunem un model de subiect conștient de interacțiune (IATM) pentru conversațiile microblog prin integrarea rețelei și atenția utilizatorilor. O rețea de conversație care leagă utilizatorii pe baza relației de repostare și răspuns este construită pentru a mina comportamentele dinamice ale utilizatorilor. Modelăm interacțiunile dinamice și atenția utilizatorilor astfel încât să învățăm încorporările de margine conștiente de interacțiune cu contextul social. Apoi, ele sunt încorporate în inferența variațională neurală pentru generarea subiectelor mai consistente. Experimentele pe trei seturi de date din lumea reală arată că modelul nostru propus este eficient.', 'mt': 'Mudelli tematiċi tradizzjonali mhumiex biżżejjed għall-estrazzjoni tematika fil-midja soċjali. The existing methods only consider text information or simultaneously model the posts and the static characteristics of social media.  Huma jinjoraw li wieħed jiddiskuti suġġetti differenti meta jinteraġixxi b’mod dinamiku ma’ nies differenti. Barra minn hekk, in-nies li jitkellmu dwar l-istess suġġett għandhom effetti differenti fuq is-suġġett. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu Mudell Tematiku ta’ Interazzjoni Aware (IATM) għall-konverżjonijiet tal-mikroblogs billi nintegraw l-inkorporazzjoni tan-netwerk u l-attenzjoni tal-utent. Netwerk ta’ konverżjoni li jgħaqqad lill-utenti bbażat fuq ir-relazzjoni ta’ tfassil mill-ġdid u rispons huwa mibni biex jinġabru l-imġibiet dinamiċi tal-utenti. Aħna nimmudellaw l-interazzjonijiet dinamiċi u l-attenzjoni tal-utent sabiex nitgħallmu l-inkorporazzjonijiet tat-tarf konxji mill-interazzjoni mal-kuntest so ċjali. Imbagħad huma inkorporati f’inferenza varjazzjonali newrali għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ suġġetti aktar konsistenti. L-esperimenti fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali juru li l-mudell propost tagħna huwa effettiv.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමේ විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dත විද්\u200dය ඉතින් විදියට පාළ තොරතුරු විතරයි සමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයමයේ පොස්ටම් සහ ස්ථිර සාක්ෂික සුද්ධ ඔවුන් වෙනස් මිනිස්සුන්ට සම්බන්ධ වෙනස් විදිහට කතා කරනවා කියලා අවධානය කරනවා කියලා. ඒ වගේම, එකම ප්\u200dරශ්නය ගැන කතා කරපු මිනිස්සුන්ට වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. මේ පැත්තට, අපි සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (IATM) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ජාලය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජකය අවධානය සඳහ සම්බන්ධ ජාලය සම්බන්ධයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාකරණය සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්බන්ධය සඳහා අධිරූපය සම්බන අපි සාමාජික සම්බන්ධතාවය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජකය අවධානය කරනවා සමාජික සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන් සම්බන්ධතාවය අව ඊට පස්සේ ඔවුන් න්\u200dයූරාල් වෙනස් විදියට සංවිධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. තව සංවිධානය විදියට සංව ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සැට් තුනක් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ අප', 'no': 'Tradisjonale temamodeller er ikkje nok for utpakking av tema i sosiale medier. Dei eksisterande metodane ser berre på tekstinformasjonen eller på samtidig modeller meldingane og statiske karakteristika for sosialmedia. Dei ignorerer at ein diskuterer ulike emne når dynamisk samarbeid med ulike mennesker. Dei som snakkar om det same emnet har forskjellige effektar på emnet. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit interaksjonsverkt temamodell (IATM) for mikrobloggsamtaler ved å integrere nettverksinnbygging og brukaroppmerksomhet. Name Vi modeller dynamiske interaksjonar og brukargrensesjon slik at du kan lære interaksjonsverkt kantinnbygging med sosiale kontekst. Deretter er dei inkluderte i neuralvariasjon infeksjon for å laga dei meir konsistente emne. Eksperimentane på tre verdsdataset viser at vår foreslått modell er effektiv.', 'pl': 'Tradycyjne modele tematów są niewystarczające do ekstrakcji tematów w mediach społecznościowych. Istniejące metody uwzględniają jedynie informacje tekstowe lub jednocześnie modelują posty i statyczne cechy mediów społecznościowych. Ignorują, że podczas dynamicznej interakcji z różnymi ludźmi omawia się różne tematy. Ponadto osoby, które mówią o tym samym temacie, mają różny wpływ na ten temat. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy interakcyjny model tematyczny (IATM) dla rozmów mikroblogowych poprzez integrację osadzenia sieci i uwagi użytkowników. Sieć konwersacyjna łącząca użytkowników w oparciu o relację repositowania i odpowiedzi jest skonstruowana w celu wydobycia dynamicznych zachowań użytkowników. Modelujemy dynamiczne interakcje i uwagę użytkowników, aby nauczyć się świadomych interakcji osadzeń krawędzi z kontekstem społecznym. Następnie są one włączone do wniosków wariacyjnych nerwowych w celu generowania bardziej spójnych tematów. Eksperymenty na trzech rzeczywistych zbiorach danych pokazują, że proponowany model jest skuteczny.', 'ta': 'பாரம்பரிய தலைப்பு மாதிரிகள் சமூக ஊடகங்களில் தலைப்புகளை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு போதுமானது. இருக்கும் முறைகள் மட்டும் உரை தகவல் அல்லது ஒரே நேரத்தில் மாதிரியும் போது புதிகள் மற்றும் சமூக ஊடகங்களின் static characteristics. ஒருவர் பல்வேறு தலைப்புகளை பேசுகிறார்கள் என்பதை அவர்கள் புறக்கணித்து விடுகிறார்கள். மேலும், அதே தலைப்பை பற்றி பேசுபவர்களுக்கு வேறு விளைவுகள் உள்ளன. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மைக்ரோப்பாக்கி பேசும் பிணையத்தில் உள்ளிடும் பயனர் கவனத்தை முழுமைப்படுத்தும் மூலம் ஒரு இடைவெளிப்படை A conversation network linking users based on reposting and replying relationship is constructed to mine the dynamic user behaviours.  நாங்கள் இயங்கும் இடைவெளி செயல்பாடுகள் மற்றும் பயனர் கவனத்தை மாதிரியிடுகிறோம் அதனால் சமூக சூழல் மூலம் உள்ளிடும பிறகு அவர்கள் மேலும் நிலையான தலைப்பு மூன்று உண்மையான உலக தரவுத்தளங்களில் உள்ள சோதனைகள் நமது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி செயல்படுத்தும் என', 'sr': 'Tradicionalni modeli teme nisu dovoljni za ekstrakciju teme u društvenim medijima. Postoje metode smatraju samo tekstualne informacije ili istovremeno modeliraju postove i statične karakteristike društvenih medija. Oni ignorišu da razgovara o različitim temama kada dinamički interakcija sa različitim ljudima. Osim toga, ljudi koji govore o istoj temi imaju različite efekate na temu. U ovom papiru predlažemo model tema za interakciju-obavještenje (IATM) za mikroblogske razgovore integracijom mreže uključujući i pozornost korisnika. Razgovorna mreža koja povezuje korisnike na osnovu ponovnog ponašanja i odgovaranja odnosa je izgrađena za moje dinamièno ponašanje korisnika. Mi modeliramo dinamičke interakcije i pažnju korisnika kako bi naučili integraciju granica sa društvenim kontekstom. Onda su uključeni u neuralnu varijaciju infekciju za stvaranje konsekventnijih tema. Eksperimenti na tri seta podataka na stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da je naš predloženi model efikasan.', 'so': 'Tusaale ahaan mada caadiga ah kuma filna in la soo bixiyo macluumaadka bulshada. Wadamada joogta oo keliya waxay ka fikiraan macluumaadka qoraalka ama tusaale ahaan boostada iyo takhasuska isticmaalka shabakadda bulshada. Waxay iska jeedaan in qof ka sheekeystaa maadooyin kala duduwan, marka ay si dabiiqada ah ula xiriiraan dadka kala duduwan. Sidoo kale dadka isla mada ka hadla waxay saameyn kala duwan ku leeyihiin arrimaha. Qoraalkan waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa muusiko la xiriira microblog ee Interaction-aware (IATM) si aan ugu sameynno shabakadda internetka oo ku habboon iyo isticmaalayaasha. Shabakada hadalka ee ku xiriira isticmaalayaasha oo ku saleysan dib u celinta iyo dib u celinta xiriirka waxaa laygu dhisay dabeecada isticmaalaha. Waxaannu sameynaa iskaashatada dabiicadda ah iyo xigta isticmaalayaasha si aan u barno meelaha dhexe-aqoonta ku jirta hoose bulshada. Then they are incorporated into neural variational inference for generating the more consistent topics.  Imtixaanka saddexda takhasuska ee dunida ee runta ah waxay muuqataa in qaababkayaga la soo jeeday ay ay tayo u leedahay.', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا میں ٹوپ اخراج کے لئے منطقی ٹوپ موڈل کافی نہیں ہیں۔ موجود طریقے صرف ٹیکسٹ معلومات کو سمجھتے ہیں یا ایک دفعہ پوسٹ اور سوسیل میڈیا کے سیٹیکل معلومات کو مدل کرتے ہیں. وہ غفلت کرتے ہیں کہ ایک شخص مختلف موضوع میں بحث کرتا ہے جبکہ مختلف آدمیوں کے ساتھ مصاحبہ کرتا ہے۔ اور جو لوگ ایک ہی موضوع کے بارے میں بات کرتے ہیں اس موضوع پر مختلف اثرات ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے نیٹ ورک ڈینڈ اور کارس کی توجه کے مطابق میکروبلوگ کی باتوں کے لئے ایک ایٹراکسٹ-Aware ٹیکس موڈل (IATM) کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے۔ Name ہم ڈینمانیک تعاملات اور کارساز کی توجه کی مدل کرتے ہیں تاکہ اجتماعی کنٹنس کے ساتھ تعاملات کی سمجھ سکیں۔ اس کے بعد وہ نئورل مختلف عفونت میں شامل کئے جاتے ہیں اور اس سے زیادہ موضوع پیدا کرنے کے لئے۔ تین حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹ سٹ کے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی مدل اثر ہے.', 'sv': 'Traditionella temamodeller är otillräckliga för ämnesutvinning i sociala medier. De befintliga metoderna beaktar endast textinformation eller modellerar samtidigt inlägg och statiska egenskaper hos sociala medier. De ignorerar att man diskuterar olika ämnen när man dynamiskt interagerar med olika människor. Dessutom har människor som talar om samma ämne olika effekter på ämnet. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en Interaction-Aware Topic Model (IATM) för mikrobloggskonversationer genom att integrera nätverksinbäddning och användaruppmärksamhet. Ett konversationsnätverk som kopplar samman användare baserat på repoting och svarsrelation är konstruerat för att mina dynamiska användarbeteenden. Vi modellerar dynamiska interaktioner och användaruppmärksamhet för att lära oss interaktionsberoende edge embeddings med social kontext. Sedan är de införlivade i neural variationsinferens för att generera de mer konsekventa ämnena. Experimenten på tre verkliga datauppsättningar visar att vår föreslagna modell är effektiv.', 'uz': "Name Mavjud usullar faqat matn haqida maʼlumot yoki bir xil paytda postlar va sosial media statistik 特点ларини ўйлайди. Ular shunday qilib, bir necha mavzularni boshqa odamlar bilan boshqarishda gapiradi. Ko'pchilik, bitta mavzu haqida gapiradigan odamlar mavzuga har xil effektlar bor. Ushbu qogʻozda, biz Interaction-aware Mavzu Model (IATM) bilan birlashtirish va foydalanuvchi tarmoqni birlashtirish mumkin. Name Biz oddiy interfektlar va foydalanuvchiga qaramasdan foydalanuvchilarni o'rganish uchun jamiyat muhit bilan o'rganamiz. Then they are incorporated into neural variational inference for generating the more consistent topics.  Uchta dunyo haqiqiy maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi tajribalarni ko'rsatadi bizning pendilgan modelmiz ishlaydi.", 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết chủ đề truyền thống không đủ để trích xuất về chủ đề trên phương tiện xã hội. Các phương pháp hiện tại chỉ xem xét thông tin văn bản hoặc cùng lúc mô hình các bài và các đặc điểm tĩnh của các phương tiện xã hội. Họ lờ đi rằng người ta bàn về các chủ đề khác nhau khi tương tác động động động động động động động với người khác. Hơn nữa, những người nói về cùng một chủ đề có tác động khác nhau về chủ đề này. Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi đề nghị Interaction-Nhận thức Topic Model (YTM) cho các cuộc trò chuyện microblog bằng cách nhập mạng và tập trung người dùng. Một mạng lưới đối thoại kết nối người dùng dựa trên việc sắp đặt và đáp trả mối quan hệ được xây dựng để khai thác hành vi người dùng. Chúng tôi mô tả các tương tác động động và sự chú ý của người dùng để học sự gắn kết cạnh sắc xã hội. Sau đó họ được nhập vào kết luận sóng thần kinh để tạo ra các chủ đề liên quan hơn. Các thí nghiệm trên ba nhà dữ liệu thực tế cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có hiệu quả.', 'nl': 'Traditionele topic modellen zijn onvoldoende voor topic extraction in social media. De bestaande methoden houden alleen rekening met tekstinformatie of modelleren tegelijkertijd de posts en de statische kenmerken van sociale media. Ze negeren dat men verschillende onderwerpen bespreekt bij dynamische interactie met verschillende mensen. Bovendien hebben mensen die over hetzelfde onderwerp praten verschillende effecten op het onderwerp. In dit artikel stellen we een Interaction-Aware Topic Model (IATM) voor voor microbloggesprekken door netwerkinbedding en gebruikersaandacht te integreren. Een conversatienetwerk dat gebruikers koppelt op basis van repositing- en antwoordrelatie is geconstrueerd om het dynamische gebruikersgedrag te analyseren. We modelleren dynamische interacties en gebruikersaandacht om interactiebewuste edge embeddings met sociale context te leren. Vervolgens worden ze opgenomen in neurale variatie inferentie voor het genereren van de meer consistente onderwerpen. De experimenten op drie real-world datasets tonen aan dat ons voorgestelde model effectief is.', 'bg': 'Традиционните тематични модели са недостатъчни за извличане на темата в социалните медии. Съществуващите методи разглеждат само текстова информация или едновременно моделират постовете и статичните характеристики на социалните медии. Те игнорират, че човек обсъжда различни теми, когато динамично взаимодейства с различни хора. Освен това, хората, които говорят за една и съща тема имат различни ефекти върху темата. В настоящата статия предлагаме модел на тема, осъзнат за взаимодействието (ИТМ) за разговори в микроблога чрез интегриране на вграждането на мрежата и вниманието на потребителите. Създадена е мрежа за разговори, свързваща потребителите въз основа на повторно изпращане и отговаряне на взаимоотношенията, за да се извлича динамичното поведение на потребителите. Ние моделираме динамичните взаимодействия и вниманието на потребителите, така че да научим взаимодействието-осъзнаващи ръбове вграждания със социален контекст. След това те се включват в невронно вариационно заключение за генериране на по-последователни теми. Експериментите с три реални набора от данни показват, че предложеният модел е ефективен.', 'da': 'Traditionelle emnemodeller er utilstrækkelige til emneudvikling i sociale medier. De eksisterende metoder tager kun hensyn til tekstinformation eller modellerer samtidig indlæggene og de statiske karakteristika ved sociale medier. De ignorerer, at man diskuterer forskellige emner, når man dynamisk interagerer med forskellige mennesker. Desuden har folk, der taler om det samme emne forskellige virkninger på emnet. I denne artikel foreslår vi en Interaction-Aware Topic Model (IATM) til mikroblogsamtaler ved at integrere netværksindlejring og brugeropmærksomhed. Et samtalenetværk, der forbinder brugere baseret på relating til repoting og svar, er konstrueret til at minimere den dynamiske brugeradfærd. Vi modellerer dynamiske interaktioner og brugeropmærksomhed for at lære interaktionsbevidste edge embeddings med social kontekst. Derefter indarbejdes de i neural variationsinferens for at generere de mere konsekvente emner. Eksperimenterne med tre datasæt i virkeligheden viser, at vores foreslåede model er effektiv.', 'de': 'Traditionelle Themenmodelle reichen für die Themenextraktion in sozialen Medien nicht aus. Die bestehenden Methoden berücksichtigen nur Textinformationen oder modellieren gleichzeitig die Beiträge und die statischen Eigenschaften von Social Media. Sie ignorieren, dass man im dynamischen Umgang mit verschiedenen Menschen unterschiedliche Themen diskutiert. Darüber hinaus haben Menschen, die über dasselbe Thema sprechen, unterschiedliche Auswirkungen auf das Thema. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir ein Interaction-Aware Topic Model (IATM) für Mikroblog-Gespräche vor, indem Netzwerkeinbettung und Benutzeraufmerksamkeit integriert werden. Ein Konversationsnetzwerk, das Benutzer auf Basis von Reposition- und Antwortbeziehungen verbindet, wird aufgebaut, um das dynamische Nutzerverhalten zu analysieren. Wir modellieren dynamische Interaktionen und Benutzeraufmerksamkeit, um interaktionsbewusste Edge-Einbettungen mit sozialem Kontext zu erlernen. Anschließend werden sie in die neuronale Variationale Inferenz integriert, um konsistentere Themen zu generieren. Die Experimente an drei realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Modell effektiv ist.', 'hr': 'Tradicionalni modeli teme nisu dovoljni za ekstrakciju teme u društvenim medijima. Postoje metode razmatraju samo tekstne informacije ili istovremeno modeliraju postove i statične karakteristike društvenih medija. Oni ignoriraju da razgovara o različitim temama kada dinamički interakcija s različitim ljudima. Osim toga, ljudi koji pričaju o istoj temi imaju različite učinke na temu. U ovom papiru predlažemo model tema Interakcije-Aware (IATM) za mikroblogske razgovore integracijom mreže uključujući i pozornost korisnika. Razgovorna mreža koja povezuje korisnike na temelju repostiranja i odgovaranja odnosa je izgrađena za moje dinamičko ponašanje korisnika. Mi modeliramo dinamičke interakcije i pažnju korisnika kako bi naučili integraciju granica s društvenim kontekstom. Onda su uključeni u neuralnu variacionalnu infekciju za stvaranje dosljednijih tema. Eksperimenti na tri podataka o stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da je naš predloženi model učinkovit.', 'id': 'Model topik tradisional tidak cukup untuk ekstraksi topik di media sosial. Metode yang ada hanya mempertimbangkan informasi teks atau simultan model pos dan karakteristik statis media sosial. Mereka mengabaikan bahwa satu mendiskusikan topik yang berbeda ketika secara dinamik berinteraksi dengan orang-orang yang berbeda. Selain itu, orang-orang yang berbicara tentang topik yang sama memiliki efek yang berbeda pada topik tersebut. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan Model Topik Interaksi-Aware (IATM) untuk percakapan mikroblog dengan mengintegrasi penerbangan jaringan dan perhatian pengguna. Sebuah jaringan percakapan yang menghubungkan pengguna berdasarkan hubungan reposting dan menjawab dibangun untuk menambah perilaku pengguna dinamik. Kami model interaksi dinamik dan perhatian pengguna untuk belajar interaksi-sadar pinggir embedding dengan konteks sosial. Kemudian mereka terlibat dalam kesimpulan variasi saraf untuk menghasilkan topik yang lebih konsisten. Eksperimen pada tiga set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa model kami yang diusulkan adalah efektif.', 'ko': '전통적인 화제 모델은 소셜 미디어에서 화제를 추출하기에는 부족하다.기존의 방법은 텍스트 정보만 고려하거나 게시물과 소셜미디어의 정적 특징을 동시에 모의하는 것이다.그들은 한 사람이 서로 다른 사람과 동태적으로 상호작용할 때 서로 다른 화제를 토론하는 것을 소홀히 했다.그 밖에 같은 화제를 이야기하는 사람은 이 화제에 서로 다른 영향을 미친다.본고에서 우리는 네트워크 삽입과 사용자의 주의를 통합시켜 마이크로 블로그 대화에 사용되는 상호작용 감지 주제 모델(IATM)을 제시했다.동적 사용자 행위를 발굴하기 위해 전송과 회답 관계를 바탕으로 사용자를 연결하는 세션 네트워크를 구축했다.우리는 동적 상호작용과 사용자에 대해 모델링을 해서 사교 언어 환경에서의 상호작용 감지 테두리를 학습한다.그리고 이를 신경 변분 추리에 포함시켜 더욱 일치된 주제를 만들어 낸다.세 개의 실제 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 우리가 제시한 모델이 효과적임을 나타낸다.', 'sw': 'Mradi wa mada za kiutamaduni hautoshi kwa ajili ya kuchaguliwa mada kwenye mitandao ya kijamii. The existing methods only consider text information or simultaneously model the posts and the static characteristics of social media.  Wanapuuza kwamba mtu anajadili mada tofauti pale anapohusiana na watu tofauti. Zaidi ya hayo, watu wanaozungumzia mada hiyo wana madhara tofauti katika mada hii. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza Modeli ya Mitandao ya Kimataifa yenye kujua (IATM) kwa ajili ya mazungumzo ya kijamii kwa kuunganisha mtandao wa intaneti na kutoa maoni ya watumiaji. Mtandao wa mazungumzo unaowaunganisha watumiaji wenye msingi wa kurekebisha na kubadilisha uhusiano unajengwa kwangu tabia za watumiaji wenye msimamo mkali. Tunaweza kutengeneza mahusiano yanayohusiana na watumiaji ili kujifunza mazingira yanayofahamika na mazingira ya kijamii. Kisha hujumuishwa na maambukizi yanayotofautiana na neura kwa kutengeneza mada yanayoendelea zaidi. Majaribio kwenye taarifa tatu za dunia zinaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unapendekezwa una ufanisi.', 'af': "Tradisjoneel onderwerp model is onvoldoende vir onderwerp uittrek in sosiale media. Die bestaande metodes beskou slegs teks inligting of samekomstig model die pos en die statiese karakteristieke van sosiale media. Hulle ignoreer dat een verskillende onderwerpe bespreek wanneer dinamies interaksie met verskillende mense. Maar mense wat oor dieselfde onderwerp praat, het verskillende effekte op die onderwerp. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n Interaksie-Aware Tema Model (IATM) vir mikroblog gesprekke deur netwerk inbêring en gebruiker aandag te integreer. Name Ons model dinamiese interaksies en gebruiker aandag sodat interaksie-bevestig rand inbettings met sosiale konteks leer. Dan is hulle ingesluit in neurale variasionale inferensie vir die genereering van die meer konsistente onderwerpe. Die eksperimente op drie regte wêreld datastelle wys dat ons voorgestelde model effektief is.", 'tr': 'Däpli tema nusgalary sosial medýdançasynda tapmakda ýeterlik däl. Öň bar metin maglumaty diňe metin maglumatyny düşünýär ýa-da simal meýdançalaryň postalaryny we statik karakterlerini görkez. Çeşitli adamlar bilen dinamik bilen daşyklaşykda, birnäçe temalar gepleşip geçýändigini görmezden çykýarlar. Mundan soňra bir tema hakda gürrüň edenler temada farklı täsirler bar. Bu kagyzda, microblog soňunlarynyň içine syýal içine we ullançylar ünsüni integralýan Interaction-Aware Topik Modeli (IATM) teklip edýäris. Gespräk şebeki gaýd etmek we jogap beren baglaşyklary oňa dinamik ullançylaryň davranışyny meniň üçin guruldy. Biz dinamik tejribeleri we wužiwarlaryň ünsüni sosial kontekst bilen öwrenmek üçin örän dinamik tejribeleri we ünsüni çykýarys. Soňra, olar neural çarpyşyklaryň içine daşary bir tema döretmek üçin üýtgedildi. 3 sany dünýäde maglumat setiriniň deneyleri biziň teklip eden nusgymyzyň täsirli bolandygyny görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Modelet tradicionale të temës janë të pamjaftueshme për nxjerrjen e temës në media sociale. Metodat ekzistuese konsiderojnë vetëm informacion teksti apo në të njëjtën kohë modelojnë postet dhe karakteristikat statike të medias sociale. Ata injorojnë se një diskuton temat e ndryshme kur ndërvepron dinamikisht me njerëz të ndryshëm. Përveç kësaj, njerëzit që flasin për të njëjtin temë kanë efekte të ndryshme në temë. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një model temë të ndërveprimit (IATM) për bisedimet me mikroblog duke integruar përfshirjen e rrjetit dhe vëmendjen e përdoruesit. Një rrjet bisedimesh që lidh përdoruesit bazuar në lidhjen e riprodhimit dhe përgjigjes është ndërtuar për të miniuar sjelljet dinamike të përdoruesve. Ne modelojmë ndërveprimet dinamike dhe vëmendjen e përdoruesit në mënyrë që të mësojmë përfshirje të kufijve të ndërveprimit me kontekstin social. Then they are incorporated into neural variational inference for generating the more consistent topics.  Eksperimentet në tre grupe të dhënash të botës reale tregojnë se modeli ynë i propozuar është efektiv.', 'am': 'የባሕላዊ ጉዳዩ ሞዴላዎች በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውስጥ ለመውጣት አይበቃቸውም፡፡ የአሁኑ ሥርዓቶች የጽሑፍ መረጃዎችን ወይም በመሰብሰብ የፖስቲካዎችን እና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያን የstatic ስርዓት ብቻ ይመለከታሉ፡፡ አንድ ሰው ከሌሎች ሰዎች ጋር በመቀላቀል በተለየ ትምህርት የተለያየ ጉዳዮች እንደተቃወሙ ይተዋሉ፡፡ ደግሞም በአንድ ጉዳይ ላይ የሚናገሩት ሰዎች ለዚህ ጉዳይ የተለየ ጥያቄ አላቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ Interaction-aware Topic Model (IATM) ለሚያነክሮብ ንግግር በመጠቀም እና ተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚዎችን በመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ ግንኙነት በመመለስ እና በመመለስ የተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚዎች ላይ የሚታያየው የግንኙነት መረብ ለኔ የተደረገ ነው፡፡ ማኅበራዊ ግንኙነት እና ተጠቃሚዎች የግንኙነት ማቀናቀል እናስማራለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ አብዛኛውን ትክክለኛ ጉዳዮች ለመፍጠር የደዌብ ውይይት ተለይተዋል፡፡ The experiments on three real-world datasets show that our proposed model is effective.', 'fa': 'مدل موضوع سنتی برای اخراج موضوع در رسانه اجتماعی کافی نیست. روش\u200cهای موجود فقط اطلاعات متن را در نظر می\u200cگیرند یا همزمان نقشه\u200cها و ویژگی\u200cهای ثابت رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی را مدل می\u200cکند. آنها نادیده می\u200cگیرند که یک نفر موضوع مختلف را در مورد گفتگو می\u200cکند وقتی با مردم مختلف با دینامیک تعامل می\u200cکند. علاوه بر این، افرادی که در مورد یک موضوع صحبت می کنند، اثرات مختلف روی موضوع دارند. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل موضوع معلوم با تفاوت\u200cسازی (IATM) برای مکالمات میکروبلاگ توسط توجه شبکه\u200cای وارد کردن و کاربر پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. Name ما تفاوت\u200cهای دینامیک و توجه کاربر را مدل می\u200cکنیم تا یاد بگیریم که تفاوت\u200cهای کنترل با محیط اجتماعی را بفهمیم. سپس آنها در بیماری متفاوتی عصبی برای تولید موضوع\u200cهای متفاوت بیشتری شریک می\u200cشوند. آزمایشات در سه مجموعه داده های دنیای واقعی نشان می دهند که مدل پیشنهاد ما موثر است.', 'hy': 'ավանդական թեմային մոդելները բավարար չեն սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներում թեմային հանելու համար: Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները հաշվի առնում են միայն տեքստի ինֆորմացիա կամ միաժամանակ մոդելավորում են սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների դիրքերը և կայուն հատկությունները: Նրանք անտեսում են, որ մեկը քննարկում է տարբեր թեմաներ, երբ դինամիկ շփվում է տարբեր մարդկանց հետ: Ավելին, մարդիկ, ովքեր խոսում են նույն թեմայի մասին, տարբեր ազդեցություններ ունեն թեմայի վրա: In this paper, we propose an Interaction-Aware Topic Model (IATM) for microblog conversations by integrating network embedding and user attention.  Մի խոսակցության ցանց, որը կապում է օգտագործողներին, հիմնված վերափոխելու և պատասխանելու հարաբերության վրա, կառուցվում է դինամիկ օգտագործողների վարքագիծը հանելու համար: We model dynamic interactions and user attention so as to learn interaction-aware edge embeddings with social context.  Այնուհետև դրանք ներառվում են նյարդային տարբերակային հետևանքների մեջ, որպեսզի ստեղծեն ավելի համապատասխան թեմաներ: Երեք իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձերը ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մոդելը արդյունավետ է:', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমে বিষয় নির্বাচনের জন্য প্রচলিত বিষয়ের মডেল যথেষ্ট নয়। বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি শুধুমাত্র টেক্সট তথ্য বা একই সাথে সামাজিক মিডিয়ার পোস্ট এবং স্ট্যাটিক বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর ব তারা উপেক্ষা করে যে কেউ বিভিন্ন বিষয় নিয়ে আলোচনা করে যখন বিভিন্ন মানুষের সাথে আলোচনা করে। এছাড়াও, যারা একই বিষয়ে কথা বলে তারা এই বিষয়ে বিভিন্ন প্রভাব রয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি ইন্টারনেকশন-পরিচিত বিষয় মডেল (আইএটম) প্রস্তাব করি মাইক্রোব্লগ আলোচনার জন্য, যা নেটওয়ার্কে প্রবেশ করে এবং ব্যবহারকার একটি আলোচনার নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহারকারীদের সংযুক্ত করা হয়েছে পুনরায় প্রতিস্থাপন এবং সম্পর্ক পুনরায় প্রতিস্থাপন করার ভিত্তিতে  আমরা ব্যবহারকারীদের মনোযোগ মডেল করি যাতে সামাজিক প্রতিক্রিয়ার সাথে যোগাযোগ বিষয়বস্তু শিখতে পারি। তারপর তাদেরকে নিউরেল ভেরিয়েশনের আক্রান্তে যুক্ত করা হয়েছে আরো সাধারণ বিষয় তৈরি করার জন্য। তিন আসল বিশ্বের ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল কার্যকর।', 'az': 'Məsələn məsələlər sosyal media içində məsələlər çıxarmaq üçün kifayət deyildir. Mevcut metodlar yalnız metin məlumatlarını və ya birlikdə sosyal media məlumatlarının statik xüsusiyyətlərini modelləyir. Onlar müxtəlif insanlarla dinamik olaraq müxtəlif məsələlər barəsində mübahisə edirlər. Daha sonra, aynı məsələlər haqqında danışan insanlar bu məsələdə farklı təsirlər vardır. Bu kağızda, ağ içərisində və istifadəçilərin məlumatlarını birləşdirən mikroblog danışmaları üçün Interaction-Aware Topic Modeli (IATM) təklif edirik. İstifadəçiləri yenidən qoyub cavab verən və cavab verən ilişkisi mənim üçün dinamik istifadəçi davranışlarına bağlanır. Biz dinamik etkileşimleri və istifadəçilərin dikkatini modelləyirik, sosyal kontekst ilə etkileşimli tərəfləri öyrənmək üçün. Sonra onlar daha müxtəlif məsələləri yaratmaq üçün nöral variasiyonlu infeksiya girdilər. Üç real dünya veri qurularındaki eksperimentlər bizim təklif etdiyimiz modelimiz etkilidir.', 'ca': "Els models tradicionals de tema són insuficients per a l'extracció de tema als mitjans socials. Els mètodes existents només consideran informació de text o modelen simultàneament les publicacions i les característiques estatiques dels mitjans socials. Ignoren que es discuten diversos temes quan interacten dinàmicament amb persones diferents. A més, les persones que parlen del mateix tema tenen efectes diferents sobre el tema. En aquest article, proposem un model de tema d'interacció conscient (IATM) per converses de microblogs integrant l'integració de la xarxa i l'atenció dels usuaris. Una xarxa de converses que enllaça els usuaris basada en una relació de reposta i resposta es construeix per a minar els comportaments dinàmics dels usuaris. Modelem interaccions dinàmiques i atenció dels usuaris per aprendre enganxaments de bords conscients de la interacció amb el context social. Llavors s'incorporan en la inferència de variació neuronal per generar temes més consistents. The experiments on three real-world datasets show that our proposed model is effective.", 'cs': 'Tradiční tématické modely nejsou dostatečné pro extrakci témat v sociálních médiích. Stávající metody zohledňují pouze textové informace nebo současně modelují příspěvky a statické charakteristiky sociálních médií. Ignorují, že člověk diskutuje různá témata při dynamické interakci s různými lidmi. Navíc lidé, kteří hovoří o stejném tématu, mají na toto téma různé účinky. V tomto článku navrhujeme interakce-aware tematický model (IATM) pro mikroblogové konverzace integrovaný síťovým vkládáním a pozorností uživatelů. Konverzační síť propojující uživatele na základě repositování a odpovědí vztahu je vytvořena tak, aby mohla dolovat dynamické chování uživatelů. Modelujeme dynamické interakce a pozornost uživatelů tak, abychom se naučili interakce orientované na hrany vložení do sociálního kontextu. Poté jsou začleněny do nervové variační inference pro generování konzistentnějších témat. Experimenty na třech reálných datových sadách ukazují, že náš navrhovaný model je efektivní.', 'bs': 'Tradicionalni modeli teme nisu dovoljni za ekstrakciju teme u društvenim medijima. Postoje metode razmatraju samo tekstne informacije ili istovremeno modeliraju postove i statične karakteristike društvenih medija. Ignoriraju da razgovara o različitim temama kada dinamički interakcija sa različitim ljudima. Osim toga, ljudi koji pričaju o istoj temi imaju različite učinke na temu. U ovom papiru predlažemo model tema za interakciju-svijest (IATM) za mikroblogske razgovore integracijom mreže uključujući i pozornost korisnika. Razgovorna mreža koja povezuje korisnike na osnovu ponovnog ponavljanja i odgovaranja odnosa izgrađena je za moje dinamično ponašanje korisnika. Mi modeliramo dinamične interakcije i pažnju korisnika kako bi naučili integraciju granica sa društvenim kontekstom. Onda su uključeni u neuralnu variacionalnu infekciju za stvaranje dosljednijih tema. Eksperimenti na tri podataka na stvarnom svijetu pokazuju da je naš predloženi model efikasan.', 'fi': 'Perinteiset teemamallit eivät riitä aiheen poimimiseen sosiaalisessa mediassa. Nykyiset menetelmät huomioivat vain tekstitiedon tai mallintavat samanaikaisesti sosiaalisen median julkaisuja ja staattisia ominaisuuksia. He eivät välitä siitä, että keskustellaan erilaisista aiheista dynaamisesti vuorovaikutuksessa eri ihmisten kanssa. Lisäksi samasta aiheesta keskustelevilla ihmisillä on erilaisia vaikutuksia aiheeseen. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme Interaction-Aware Topic Modelia (IATM) mikroblogikeskusteluihin integroimalla verkon upottamisen ja käyttäjien huomion. Käyttäjän dynaamisen käyttäytymisen louhimiseksi rakennetaan uudelleenlähettämiseen ja vastaamiseen perustuva keskusteluverkosto, joka yhdistää käyttäjiä. Mallistamme dynaamista vuorovaikutusta ja käyttäjän huomiota siten, että opimme vuorovaikutusta tietoisia reunaupotuksia sosiaaliseen kontekstiin. Sitten ne yhdistetään neurovariaatiopäättelyyn johdonmukaisempien aiheiden tuottamiseksi. Kolmen reaalimaailman aineiston kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli on tehokas.', 'et': 'Traditsioonilised teemamudelid ei ole sotsiaalmeedias teemade ekstraheerimiseks piisavad. Olemasolevad meetodid arvestavad ainult tekstiinfot või modelleerivad samaaegselt postitusi ja sotsiaalmeedia staatilisi omadusi. Nad ignoreerivad, et erinevate inimestega dünaamilisel suhtlemisel arutatakse erinevaid teemasid. Lisaks on samast teemast rääkivatel inimestel teemale erinev mõju. Käesolevas artiklis pakume välja interaktsiooniteadliku teemamudeli (IATM) mikroblogivestluste jaoks, integreerides võrgu manustamise ja kasutaja tähelepanu. Dünaamilise kasutaja käitumise kaevandamiseks on loodud vestlusvõrk, mis ühendab kasutajaid uuesti postitamisel ja vastamisel. Modelleerime dünaamilisi interaktsioone ja kasutajate tähelepanu, et õppida interaktsiooniteadlikke servade põimimisi sotsiaalse kontekstiga. Seejärel lisatakse need neuraalsele variatsioonilisele järeldusele järjepidevamate teemade genereerimiseks. Kolme reaalmaailma andmekogumiga tehtud katsed näitavad, et meie pakutud mudel on tõhus.', 'jv': 'Traditional tema model ora ase dadi kanggo nggolaké temu nang media sotiki. Ndoleh sing kana barang kelas kuwi informasi teks apa, dadi model kuwi duluran lan nganggo cara-cara sing media sotiki. Debian nganggep sistem sing paling-pernik nik sak temalan nganggep dinomik sing samihan karo pernik sing samihan. Manyak, wong-wong sing pisan banjur tema sing gak bener efek nang tema sing mengko. Nang pemilih iki, kita mudhaya interaction-Awake Subject model (IBT M) kanggo miklog conversations si tambah embedding lan atens usual Dialog network We model dynamics Amarok ugo wong liyo nggawe nik kuwi nggawe luwih operasi sing mengko perusahaan karo hal-hal nganggo perusahaan sing sumulakno. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo telu dadi-sangan sing ngomong nik awak dhéwé nambah model sing apik dhéwé.', 'he': 'דוגמנים נושאים מסורתיים אינם מספיקים לחלץ נושאים בתקשורת חברתית. השיטות הקיומות שוקלות רק מידע טקסט או באותו הזמן דוגמנים את המשימות והאופיינים הסטטיים של התקשורת החברתית. הם מתעלמים מזה שאדם מדבר על נושאים מגוונים כאשר הוא מתקשר דינמית עם אנשים שונים. בנוסף, לאנשים שמדברים על אותו נושא יש השפעות שונות על הנושא. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מודל נושא מודע לאינטראקציה (IATM) לשיחות מיקרובלוגים על ידי השתלב של רשת ומשתמש. רשת שיחה שמקשרת משתמשים מבוססת על מערכת יחסים מחדש ותגובה נבנתה כדי למכר את התנהגות המשתמשים הדינמיות. We model dynamic interactions and user attention so as to learn interaction-aware edge embeddings with social context.  ואז הם מעורבים למסקנה שונה נוירונית לייצור נושאים יותר קבועים. הניסויים על שלושה קבוצות נתונים בעולם האמיתי מראים שהמודל המוצע שלנו יעיל.', 'sk': 'Tradicionalni tematski modeli niso zadostni za ekstrakcijo teme v družbenih medijih. Obstoječe metode upoštevajo le besedilne informacije ali hkrati modelirajo objave in statične značilnosti družbenih medijev. Pri dinamičnem interakciji z različnimi ljudmi ne upoštevajo različnih tem. Poleg tega imajo ljudje, ki govorijo o isti temi, različne učinke na temo. V tem prispevku predlagamo model teme, ozaveščen o interakciji (IATM) za pogovore v mikroblogu z integracijo vgradnje omrežja in pozornosti uporabnikov. Mreža pogovorov, ki povezuje uporabnike na podlagi ponovnega pošiljanja in odgovarjanja, je zgrajena za izkoriščanje dinamičnega vedenja uporabnikov. Modeliramo dinamične interakcije in pozornost uporabnikov, da bi se naučili interakcijsko zavedanja robnih vključitev v socialni kontekst. Nato so vključeni v nevronsko variacijsko sklepanje za ustvarjanje bolj doslednih tem. Poskusi na treh resničnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da je naš predlagani model učinkovit.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་འཇུག་ཟམ་ནང་གི་གནད་དོན་དཔེ་གཞི་རྣམས་ལས་ཕར་ཆེན་མེད་པ་རེད། གནས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཁོ་ན ཁོང་ཚོས་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏམ་མིན་པའི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་སྣང་མེད་བཞག་གི་ཡོད། ད་དུང་། གནད་དོན་གཅིག་གི་གནས་དོན་གཅིག་གི་སྐོར་བཤད་པའི་མི་མང་གིས་གནད་དོན་གཞན་མི་འདུག ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་Interaction-Aware Topic Model གཏམ་གླེང་དྲ་བ་ཞིག ང་ཚོས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་དང་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན དེ་ནས་འདི་ཚོ་ནི་ཀུང་བ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ནད་ཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་བཙུགས་སྟེ། ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འཛམ་གླིང་ཐོག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་བརྟག་ཞིག་ནི་འོང་བའི་མ་དཔེ་', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Suna tunkuɗe da cẽwa wani ya yi musu magana a cikin wasu masu turu da bakwai idan an yi mataimaka da wasu mutane dabam. Da haka, mutane da ke faɗi game da wannan madaidaici sun da wasu matsayi dabam a kan madaidaita. Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata Model na masu iya sani na IATM wa mazaɓa masu haɗi na masu microlog da za'a haɗa jerin da ke cikin haɗi da aikin mai amfani da. An ƙiƙira wani shirin mazaɓa wanda ke haɗa da wasu mãsu amfani da shi, a kan baka yin restori da kuma ya karɓa wa haɗi zuwa na aikin mai amfani da kwamfyuta. We model dynamic interactions and user attention so as to learn interaction-aware edge embeddings with social context.  Sa'an nan kuma aka shigar da su wata cutar tarayya dõmin ya zaɓe wasu madaidaita masu kamfata. Kayan jarrabai kan data masu cikin duniya uku sun nuna cewa misalinmu da ake buƙata yana da amfani."}
{'en': 'Extracting Parallel Sentences with Bidirectional Recurrent Neural Networks to Improve Machine Translation', 'pt': 'Extraindo sentenças paralelas com redes neurais recorrentes bidirecionais para melhorar a tradução automática', 'fr': 'Extraction de phrases parallèles avec des réseaux de neurones récurrents bidirectionnels pour améliorer la traduction', 'ja': '機械翻訳を改善するための双方向再帰ニューラルネットワークを使用した並列文の抽出', 'es': 'Extracción de oraciones paralelas con redes neuronales recurrentes bidireccionales para mejorar la traducción automática', 'hi': 'मशीन अनुवाद में सुधार करने के लिए द्विदिश आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ समानांतर वाक्यों को निकालना', 'ru': 'Извлечение параллельных предложений с двунаправленными рекуррентными нейронными сетями для улучшения машинного перевода', 'ar': 'استخراج الجمل المتوازية مع الشبكات العصبية المتكررة ثنائية الاتجاه لتحسين الترجمة الآلية', 'zh': '用双向递归神经网络取并行句以改善机器翻译', 'ga': 'Pianbhreitheanna Comhthreomhara a Bhaint le Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha Déthreo chun Aistriú Meaisín a Fheabhsú', 'ka': 'პარალელური სიტყვების გამოყენება ორედირექციონალური გამოყენებული ნეიროლური ქსელებით მაქსინის გასაგრძელება', 'hu': 'Párhuzamos mondatok kivonása kétirányú ismétlődő ideghálózatokkal a gépi fordítás javítása érdekében', 'el': 'Εξαγωγή παράλληλων προτάσεων με αμφίδρομη επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα για τη βελτίωση της μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'it': 'Estrazione di frasi parallele con reti neurali bidirezionali ricorrenti per migliorare la traduzione automatica', 'lt': 'Paralelių sakinių ekstrahavimas su dvikryptiniais pakartotiniais nerviniais tinklais mašinų vertimui gerinti', 'mk': 'Екстрактирање на паралелни реченици со двојно рецидентни неурални мрежи за подобрување на преведувањето на машините', 'kk': 'Компьютердің аудармасын жақсарту үшін екі бағытты қайталанатын невралдық желімен параллелі сөздерді тарқату', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷണം മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി രണ്ടാധികാരികമായി വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni ta’ Sentenzi Paraleli ma’ Netwerks Newrali Bidirezzjonali Rikorrenti biex itejbu t-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni', 'ms': 'Menekstrak Hukuman Paralel dengan Rangkaian Neural Berulang Dua Arah untuk meningkatkan Terjemahan Mesin', 'no': 'Pakk ut parallelle teikn med to retning gjentaande neuralnettverk for å forbetra maskinsomsetjing', 'pl': 'Wyodrębnianie zdań równoległych z dwukierunkowymi powtarzalnymi sieciami neuronowymi w celu poprawy tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Extragerea sentințelor paralele cu rețele neurale recurente bidirecționale pentru a îmbunătăți traducerea automată', 'sr': 'Izvlaèenje paralelnih reèenica sa dvosmjernim povratnim neuronskim mrežama za poboljšanje prevoda mašine', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණ වාර්තාවන් ප්\u200dරමාණික වාර්තාවන් දෙපාර්ථික වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණික වාර්තාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණ', 'mn': 'Машин хөгжүүлэхийн тулд хоёр дахин дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл хөдөлгөөнтэй параллел үгсийг татаж байна.', 'so': 'Iska soo saarista daryeelka jardiinada iyo shabakada Neural ee lagu soo degay ee labada-dir si uu u beddelo tarjumaadda mashiinka', 'sv': 'Extrahera parallella meningar med dubbelriktade återkommande neurala nätverk för att förbättra maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Extracting Parallel Sentences with Bidirectional Recurrent Neural Networks to Improve Machine Translation', 'ur': 'ماشین ترجمہ کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے پارالئل سنٹ نکالے جاتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Rút câu chuyện song song với mạng thần kinh chạy hai hướng để hoàn thành máy móc', 'bg': 'Извличане на паралелни изречения с двупосочни повтарящи се неврални мрежи за подобряване на машинния превод', 'da': 'Udtrækning af parallelle sætninger med bidirektionelle tilbagevendende neurale netværk for at forbedre maskinoversættelse', 'nl': 'Extraheren van parallelle zinnen met bidirectionele terugkerende neuronale netwerken om machinevertaling te verbeteren', 'hr': 'Izvlačenje paralelnih rečenica sa dvosmjernim povratnim neuronskim mrežama za poboljšanje prevoda strojeva', 'ko': '쌍방향 귀속 신경 네트워크로 평행문 추출 향상', 'id': 'Menekstrak Hukuman Paralel dengan Rangkaian Neural Berikut Biarah untuk meningkatkan Terjemahan Mesin', 'de': 'Extrahieren paralleler Sätze mit bidirektionalen wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzwerken zur Verbesserung der maschinellen Übersetzung', 'fa': 'استخراج کردن کلمات پارالی با شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دورانی برای تغییرات ماشین', 'sw': 'Akiondoa Makosa ya Parallel kwa Mtandao wa Nyasiri inayoendelea kwa mara mbili ili kuboresha Tafsiri ya Mashiniki', 'tr': 'Maşynyň terjimesini Improved etmek üçin parallel sözleri çykarylýar', 'af': 'Uitpak Parallele Utdrukkings met twee rigting Herhaling Neurale Netwerke om Masjien Vertaling te verbeter', 'sq': 'Duke nxjerrë dënimet paralele me rrjete nervore të përsëritura dy-drejtore për të përmirësuar përkthimin e makinës', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Երկու ուղղությամբ կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցերով հավասար նախադասություններ արտահանելը մեքենայի թարգմանման բարելավելու համար', 'az': 'Makinat tercüməsini Improved etmək üçün iki tərəfli Nöral Ağları ilə Parallel Sözü Çıkarılır', 'bn': 'Extracting Parallel Sentences with Bidirectional Recurrent Neural Networks to Improve Machine Translation', 'bs': 'Izvlačenje paralelnih rečenica sa dvosmjernim povratnim neuronskim mrežama za poboljšanje prevoda mašine', 'ca': 'Extraer sentences paralleles amb xarxes neuronals recurrents bidireccionals per millorar la traducció de màquines', 'cs': 'Extrahování paralelních vět s obousměrnými recidivními neuronovými sítěmi pro zlepšení strojového překladu', 'et': 'Paralleelsete lausete ekstraheerimine kahesuunaliste korduvate neurovõrkudega masintõlke parandamiseks', 'fi': 'Rinnakkaisten lauseiden purkaminen kaksisuuntaisilla toistuvilla hermoverkoilla konekäännöksen parantamiseksi', 'jv': 'Ngubah Kemerdekaan Seneng Paralelsing karo Bidirectiontel Cenel Network kang Ngawe Perintah Majin Terjamahan', 'he': 'הוציאה משפטים parallels עם רשתות נוירוליות דו-כיווניות חוזרות כדי לשפר תרגום מכונות', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Izvlečevanje vzporednih stavkov z dvosmernimi ponavljajočimi se živčnimi omrežji za izboljšanje strojnega prevajanja', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འཁོར་གཞུང་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་དང་འདྲ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཚིག་ཕྱིར་འདོན་པ'}
{'en': 'Parallel sentence extraction is a task addressing the data sparsity problem found in multilingual natural language processing applications. We propose a bidirectional recurrent neural network based approach to extract parallel sentences from collections of multilingual texts. Our experiments with noisy parallel corpora show that we can achieve promising results against a competitive baseline by removing the need of specific feature engineering or additional external resources. To justify the utility of our approach, we extract sentence pairs from Wikipedia articles to train machine translation systems and show significant improvements in translation performance.', 'ar': 'استخراج الجمل المتوازي هو مهمة تعالج مشكلة تباين البيانات الموجودة في تطبيقات معالجة اللغات الطبيعية متعددة اللغات. نقترح نهجًا ثنائي الاتجاه قائم على الشبكة العصبية المتكررة لاستخراج جمل متوازية من مجموعات النصوص متعددة اللغات. تُظهر تجاربنا مع الشركات الموازية الصاخبة أنه يمكننا تحقيق نتائج واعدة مقابل خط أساس تنافسي عن طريق إزالة الحاجة إلى هندسة ميزة معينة أو موارد خارجية إضافية. لتبرير فائدة منهجنا ، نقوم باستخراج أزواج الجمل من مقالات ويكيبيديا لتدريب أنظمة الترجمة الآلية وإظهار تحسينات كبيرة في أداء الترجمة.', 'pt': 'A extração de frases paralelas é uma tarefa que aborda o problema de esparsidade de dados encontrado em aplicativos de processamento de linguagem natural multilíngue. Propomos uma abordagem baseada em rede neural recorrente bidirecional para extrair sentenças paralelas de coleções de textos multilíngues. Nossos experimentos com corpora paralelos barulhentos mostram que podemos alcançar resultados promissores em relação a uma linha de base competitiva, eliminando a necessidade de engenharia de recursos específicos ou recursos externos adicionais. Para justificar a utilidade de nossa abordagem, extraímos pares de frases de artigos da Wikipedia para treinar sistemas de tradução automática e mostrar melhorias significativas no desempenho da tradução.', 'fr': "L'extraction de phrases en parallèle est une tâche qui permet de résoudre le problème de la rareté des données que l'on retrouve dans les applications multilingues de traitement Nous proposons une approche basée sur un réseau neuronal récurrent bidirectionnel pour extraire des phrases parallèles à partir de collections de textes multilingues. Nos expériences avec des corpus parallèles bruyants montrent que nous pouvons obtenir des résultats prometteurs par rapport à une base de référence concurrentielle en supprimant la nécessité d'une ingénierie de fonctionnalités spécifiques ou de ressources externes supplémentaires. Pour justifier l'utilité de notre approche, nous extrayons des paires de phrases des articles Wikipédia afin de former les systèmes de traduction automatique et de montrer des améliorations significatives des performances de traduction.", 'es': 'La extracción paralela de oraciones es una tarea que aborda el problema de la escasez de datos que se encuentra en las aplicaciones multilingües de procesamiento de lenguaje Proponemos un enfoque basado en redes neuronales recurrentes bidireccionales para extraer oraciones paralelas de colecciones de textos multilingües. Nuestros experimentos con cuerpos paralelos ruidosos muestran que podemos lograr resultados prometedores en comparación con una línea de base competitiva al eliminar la necesidad de ingeniería de características específicas o recursos externos adicionales. Para justificar la utilidad de nuestro enfoque, extraemos pares de oraciones de los artículos de Wikipedia para entrenar los sistemas de traducción automática y mostrar mejoras significativas en el rendimiento de la traducción.', 'ja': '並列文抽出は、多言語の自然言語処理アプリケーションに見られるデータ希少性の問題に対処するためのタスクです。多言語テキストのコレクションから並列文を抽出するための双方向再帰ニューラルネットワークベースのアプローチを提案します。ノイズの多い平行コーラの実験では、特定の機能エンジニアリングや追加の外部リソースの必要性を排除することで、競争力のあるベースラインに対して有望な結果を達成できることが示されています。私たちのアプローチの有用性を正当化するために、ウィキペディアの記事から文章ペアを抽出して機械翻訳システムをトレーニングし、翻訳パフォーマンスの大幅な改善を示します。', 'zh': '并行句提取是解多语言自然语言处应用程序中见数疏性。 立双向递归神经网络之法,并行句于多语言文本。 并行语料库实验,消特定特征、额外资源之需,可以争基线而望也。 证吾法之实用性,取句于维基百科文机器翻译统,显译性之显崇。', 'hi': 'समानांतर वाक्य निष्कर्षण बहुभाषी प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण अनुप्रयोगों में पाए जाने वाले डेटा स्पार्सिटी समस्या को संबोधित करने वाला एक कार्य है। हम बहुभाषी ग्रंथों के संग्रह से समानांतर वाक्यों को निकालने के लिए एक द्विदिश आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आधारित दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। शोर समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट के साथ हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हम विशिष्ट सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग या अतिरिक्त बाहरी संसाधनों की आवश्यकता को दूर करके एक प्रतिस्पर्धी आधार रेखा के खिलाफ आशाजनक परिणाम प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। हमारे दृष्टिकोण की उपयोगिता को सही ठहराने के लिए, हम मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों को प्रशिक्षित करने के लिए विकिपीडिया लेखों से वाक्य जोड़े निकालते हैं और अनुवाद प्रदर्शन में महत्वपूर्ण सुधार दिखाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Параллельное извлечение предложений - это задача, решающая проблему ограниченности данных, которая встречается в многоязычных приложениях для обработки естественного языка. Мы предлагаем двунаправленный подход на основе рекуррентной нейронной сети для извлечения параллельных предложений из коллекций многоязычных текстов. Наши эксперименты с шумными параллельными телами показывают, что мы можем достичь многообещающих результатов в сравнении с конкурентной базовой линией, устранив потребность в конкретной функциональной инженерии или дополнительных внешних ресурсах. Чтобы оправдать полезность нашего подхода, мы извлекаем пары предложений из статей Википедии, чтобы обучить системы машинного перевода и показать значительные улучшения в производительности перевода.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá in eastóscadh abairtí comhthreomhara ná tasc a théann i ngleic leis an bhfadhb ghanntanas sonraí a aimsítear i bhfeidhmchláir ilteangacha próiseála teanga nádúrtha. Molaimid cur chuige déthreorach athfhillteach líonra néar-bhunaithe chun abairtí comhthreomhara a bhaint as bailiúcháin de théacsanna ilteangacha. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh le corpora comhuaineach torannacha gur féidir linn torthaí a bhfuil gealladh fúthu a bhaint amach i gcoinne bunlíne iomaíoch trí dheireadh a chur leis an ngá atá le gné-innealtóireacht sainiúil nó le hacmhainní seachtracha breise. Chun fóntas ár gcur chuige a chosaint, bainimid péirí abairtí as ailt Vicipéide chun córais aistriúcháin mheaisín a oiliúint agus léirímid feabhsuithe suntasacha ar fheidhmíocht aistriúcháin.', 'el': 'Η παράλληλη εξαγωγή προτάσεων είναι μια εργασία που αντιμετωπίζει το πρόβλημα σπανιότητας δεδομένων που βρίσκεται σε πολυγλωσσικές εφαρμογές επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Προτείνουμε μια αμφίδρομη επαναλαμβανόμενη προσέγγιση νευρωνικών δικτύων για την εξαγωγή παράλληλων προτάσεων από συλλογές πολύγλωσσων κειμένων. Τα πειράματά μας με θορυβώδη παράλληλα σώματα δείχνουν ότι μπορούμε να επιτύχουμε ελπιδοφόρα αποτελέσματα έναντι μιας ανταγωνιστικής βάσης αφαιρώντας την ανάγκη ειδικής μηχανικής χαρακτηριστικών ή πρόσθετους εξωτερικούς πόρους. Για να δικαιολογήσουμε τη χρησιμότητα της προσέγγισής μας, εξάγουμε ζεύγη προτάσεων από άρθρα της Βικιπαίδειας για να εκπαιδεύσουμε συστήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης και να δείξουμε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στην απόδοση μετάφρασης.', 'hu': 'A párhuzamos mondatok kivonása olyan feladat, amely a többnyelvű természetes nyelvfeldolgozó alkalmazásokban található adatszűrés problémáját kezeli. Kétirányú visszatérő neurális hálózat alapú megközelítést javasolunk a párhuzamos mondatok kivonására többnyelvű szöveggyűjteményekből. Zajos párhuzamos korpuszokkal végzett kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy ígéretes eredményeket érhetünk el versenyképes alapvonalakkal szemben azzal, hogy eltávolítjuk a speciális funkciótervezés vagy további külső erőforrások igényét. A megközelítés hasznosságának igazolása érdekében mondatpárokat vonunk ki a Wikipédia cikkekből, hogy gépi fordítási rendszereket képezzünk, és jelentős javulást mutatjunk a fordítási teljesítményben.', 'ka': 'პარალელი სიტყვების ექსტრექცია არის მონაცემების პრობლემაში, რომელიც მრავალენგური ენერგიის პროცესის პრობლემაში მოიძებნა მონაცემები. ჩვენ მრავალენგური ტექსტის კოლექციებიდან პარალელი სიტყვების გამოყენებას მივიღეთ მეორექციური რეკურაციური ნეიროლური ქსელის მიღება. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც ძალიან პარალელი კორპორაზე გამოიყენება, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ მუშაობელი წარმოდგენების შესაძლებლობად კონკონტებული ფეს ჩვენი წარმოდგენის სუტილურობის გამოსახულებლად, ვიკიპედიაში წარმოდგენების ორივე წარმოდგენების გამოყენება მაქსინური გარგენის სისტემის გარგენება და გაჩვენება მ', 'kk': 'Көптеген тілді өңдеу қолданбаларында тапсырма - деректердің жиілігі мәселесін шешу тапсырмасы. Біз бірнеше тілді мәтін жинақтарынан параллель сөздерді тарқату үшін қайталанатын неврал желінің негізінде қайталанатын қайталанатын тәртібін ұсынамыз. Қызықты параллель корпора тәжірибелерімізде біз бұл жағдайдың қажеттігін өшіруіміз мен қосымша сыртқы ресурстардың қажеттігін өшіруімізді көрсетеді. Өзіміздің көмегіміздің утилитациясын дұрыстыру үшін, Википедияның мақалаларын машинаны аудару жүйелерін оқыту үшін, аудару жүйесінде маңызды жақсартуларын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Lygiakalbis sakinių išrašymas yra užduotis spręsti duomenų trūkumo problem ą, nustatytą daugiakalbėse gamtos kalbų apdorojimo programose. Siūlome dvikrypčių pasikartojančio nervų tinklo metodą, kuriuo siekiama ištraukti lygiagrečius sakinius iš daugiakalbių tekstų rinkinių. Mūsų eksperimentai su triukšmingomis paralelinėmis korporais rodo, kad galime pasiekti pažadus rezultatus, palyginti su konkurenciniu pagrindu, pašalinant specifinių savybių inžinerijos ar papildomų išor ės išteklių poreikį. Siekiant pateisinti mūsų požiūrio naudingumą, iš Wikipedia straipsnių ištraukiame sakinių poras, kad treniruotume mašin ų vertimo sistemas ir parodysime reikšmingus vertimo rezultatų pagerinimus.', 'mk': 'Паралелното извлекување на реченици е задача која се обраќа на проблемот со скратноста на податоците пронајден во мултијазичните природни апликации за обработување јазик. We propose a bidirectional recurrent neural network based approach to extract parallel sentences from collections of multilingual texts.  Нашите експерименти со бучни паралелни корпора покажуваат дека можеме да постигнеме ветувачки резултати против конкурентна основа со отстранување на потребата од специфична инженерија или дополнителни надворешни ресурси. За да ја оправдиме корисноста на нашиот пристап, извадуваме парови реченици од статиите на Википедија за обука на машинските преведувачки системи и покажуваме значителни подобрувања во преведувањето.', 'ml': 'പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില്\u200d കണ്ടിട്ടുള്ള ഡാറ്റ സ്പെസിറ്റി പ്രശ് പല ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ ടെക്സ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും അടയാള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബിട്ടിരിക്കക്ഷന്\u200d ആവര്\u200d ശബ്ദമുള്ള പാരല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ കൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമുക്ക് പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള പ്രത്യേക വിഭവങ് നമ്മുടെ പ്രോഗത്തിന്റെ ഉപയോഗം നീതിപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, വിക്കിപിഡിയാ ലേഖനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ജോണികളെ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നു. മെഷീന്\u200d പരി', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni parallela tas-sentenzi hija kompitu li jindirizza l-problem a tal-iskarsezza tad-dejta misjuba fl-applikazzjonijiet multilingwi għall-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Aħna nipproponu approċċ rikorrenti bidirezzjonali bbażat fuq netwerk newrali biex jiġu estratti sentenzi paralleli minn kollezzjonijiet ta’ testi multilingwi. L-esperimenti tagħna b’korpora parallel a storbjuża juru li nistgħu niksbu riżultati promettenti kontra linja bażi kompetittiva billi neħħew il-ħtieġa ta’ inġinerija b’karatteristiċi speċifiċi jew riżorsi esterni addizzjonali. Biex niġġustifikaw l-utilità tal-approċċ tagħna, neħħew pari ta’ sentenzi mill-artikoli tal-Wikipedia biex in ħarrġu sistemi ta’ traduzzjoni tal-magni u nuru titjib sinifikanti fil-prestazzjoni tat-traduzzjoni.', 'ms': 'Ekstrasi kalimat paralel adalah tugas yang mengatasi masalah kecepatan data yang ditemui dalam aplikasi pemprosesan bahasa alam berbilang bahasa. Kami cadangkan pendekatan berdasarkan rangkaian saraf berulang dua arah untuk mengekstrak kalimat selari dari koleksi teks berbilang bahasa. Eksperimen kita dengan korpra selari yang bunyi menunjukkan bahawa kita boleh mencapai hasil yang berjanji melawan dasar kompetitif dengan membuang perlukan teknik ciri spesifik atau sumber luar tambahan. Untuk membenarkan utiliti pendekatan kita, kita mengekstrak pasangan kalimat dari artikel Wikipedia untuk melatih sistem terjemahan mesin dan menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan dalam prestasi terjemahan.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх хэл хэлний үйлдвэрлэлийн хэрэглээнд олсон мэдээллийн жинхэнэ асуудлыг олон хэлний хэлний үйлдвэрлэлд тайлбарлах үйл ажиллагаа юм. Бид олон хэлний текстүүдийн цуглуулалтын параллел өгүүлбэрийг авахын тулд хоёр дахин дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээнд суурилсан ойлголт санал болгож байна. Бидний сонсолтой параллел корпора дахь туршилтууд нь бид өрсөлдөөний эх шугамны эсрэг амлалтай үр дүнг гаргаж чадна гэдгийг харуулж байна. Өөрийнхөө арга хэмжээний хэрэглээ зөвшөөрөхийн тулд бид Википедиадаас өгүүлбэрийг машин орчуулах системүүдийг сургуульд, орчуулах үйл ажиллагаанд маш чухал сайжруулалт гаргадаг.', 'pl': 'Równoległa ekstrakcja zdań to zadanie rozwiązujące problem ograniczenia danych występujący w wielojęzycznych aplikacjach do przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Proponujemy podejście oparte na dwukierunkowej powtarzającej się sieci neuronowej do ekstrakcji zdań równoległych ze zbiorów tekstów wielojęzycznych. Nasze eksperymenty z głośnymi korporami równoległymi pokazują, że możemy osiągnąć obiecujące rezultaty w stosunku do konkurencyjnej bazy bazowej, eliminując potrzebę specyficznej inżynierii funkcji lub dodatkowych zasobów zewnętrznych. Aby uzasadnić użyteczność naszego podejścia, wyodrębniamy pary zdań z artykułów Wikipedii w celu szkolenia systemów tłumaczenia maszynowego i pokazujemy znaczną poprawę wydajności tłumaczeń.', 'ro': 'Extragerea paralelă a propozițiilor este o sarcină care abordează problema spartății datelor găsită în aplicațiile multilingve de procesare a limbajului natural. Propunem o abordare bidirecțională recurentă bazată pe rețea neurală pentru extragerea frazelor paralele din colecții de texte multilingve. Experimentele noastre cu corpuri paralele zgomotoase arată că putem obține rezultate promițătoare față de o bază competitivă prin eliminarea nevoii de inginerie specifică a caracteristicilor sau resurse externe suplimentare. Pentru a justifica utilitatea abordării noastre, extragem perechile de propoziții din articolele Wikipedia pentru a instrui sistemele de traducere automată și pentru a arăta îmbunătățiri semnificative în performanța traducerii.', 'no': 'Parallel utpakking av setningar er ei oppgåve som adresserar problemet med data sparsitet funne i fleirspråkspråkingspråkprogramma. Vi foreslår eit bidireksjonal gjentakelig nøyralnettverk basert tilnærming for å pakka ut parallelle setningar frå samlingar av fleirspråk tekstar. Eksperimentane våre med støy parallelle korpora viser at vi kan oppnå promiserende resultat mot ein konkurenten baseline ved å fjerna nødvendighet for spesifikke funksjonsengineering eller eksterne ressursar. For å justere verktøyet på tilnærminga vårt, pakkar vi ut setningpar frå Wikipedia-artiklar for å trene maskineoversettelsystemet og vise signifikante forbedringar i oversettelsefunksjonen.', 'it': "L'estrazione parallela di frasi è un compito che affronta il problema di sparsità dei dati trovato nelle applicazioni multilingue di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Proponiamo un approccio bidirezionale basato sulla rete neurale ricorrente per estrarre frasi parallele da raccolte di testi multilingue. I nostri esperimenti con corpi paralleli rumorosi dimostrano che possiamo ottenere risultati promettenti rispetto a una base di riferimento competitiva eliminando la necessità di specifiche funzionalità ingegneristiche o risorse esterne aggiuntive. Per giustificare l'utilità del nostro approccio, estraiamo coppie di frasi dagli articoli di Wikipedia per formare sistemi di traduzione automatica e mostrare miglioramenti significativi nelle prestazioni di traduzione.", 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමණය තමයි තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් භාෂාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාපනය අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා විශාල භාෂාවක් පාළුවන්ගේ සංමූතිකයෙන් සමාන්\u200dය වචනයක් පිටපත් කරන්න. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සමඟ සමාන්\u200dය සමාන්\u200dය කාර්පෝරා එක්ක පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපිට ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200d අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා විකිපිඩියා වලින් වාක්ය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න, අපි විකිපිඩියා වලින් වාක්ය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය', 'sr': 'Paralelna izvlačenja rečenica je zadatak koji se rješava problem sa rezervitetom podataka pronađen u višejezičkim prirodnim aplikacijama obrade jezika. Predlažemo dvodirektivni ponovni neuralnu mrežu bazirani pristup izvlačenju paralelnih rečenica iz kolekcije multijezičkih tekstova. Naši eksperimenti sa bukom paralelnim korporama pokazuju da možemo ostvariti obećavajuće rezultate protiv konkurentne osnovne linije uklanjanjem potrebe specifičnog inženjeringa ili dodatnih vanjskih resursa. Da bismo opravdavali korisnost našeg pristupa, izvlačimo par rečenica iz Wikipedijskih članaka da obučimo sisteme prevođenja mašina i pokažemo značajne poboljšanje u provedbi prevođenja.', 'so': 'Xafiiska qeybta ah waa shaqo ku saabsan dhibaatada la xiriira macluumaadka la xiriira baaraandegista luuqadaha kala duduwan. Waxaannu soo jeedaynaa shabakadda neurada ee ku soo socda oo ku saleysan qaab aan ka soo bixino xarumaha qoraalka kala duduwan. Imtixaanka aan shirkadaha qaylada ah ku sameyn karno tusaale ahaan, waxaynu heli karnaa resultooyin ballanqaadsan oo ka gees ah shabakadda tartanka, si aan u qaadno baahida injiilka gaarka ah ama hantidiisa dibadda ah. Si aan u xaq u dhigno isticmaalka qaababkayaga, waxaynu ka soo bixinaa qoraalada Wikipedia labo ah si aan u tababarinno nidaamka turjumidda machineyda, waxaana tusnaa hagaajiyada horumarinta tarjumaadda.', 'sv': 'Parallell meningsextraktion är en uppgift som tar itu med problemet med datasparhet som finns i flerspråkiga program för behandling av naturligt språk. Vi föreslår ett dubbelriktat återkommande neuralt nätverksbaserat tillvägagångssätt för att extrahera parallella meningar från samlingar av flerspråkiga texter. Våra experiment med bullriga parallella korpor visar att vi kan uppnå lovande resultat mot en konkurrenskraftig bas genom att eliminera behovet av specifik feature engineering eller ytterligare externa resurser. För att motivera nyttan av vårt tillvägagångssätt extraherar vi meningspar från Wikipedia-artiklar för att utbilda maskinöversättningssystem och visar betydande förbättringar i översättningens prestanda.', 'ta': 'பல மொழி இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுகளில் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் வெளியீடு பிரச்சனையை சேர்க்கும் செயலாகும். பல மொழிகளின் தொகுப்பிலிருந்து இணைய வாக்கியங்களை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு நாம் ஒரு பிடிடியாக மீண்டும் திரும்ப நிகழ்வு நெ குறிப்பிட்ட பண்புப் பொறியியல் அல்லது வெளிப்புறை வளங்களை நீக்கினால் நாம் வாக்களிக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகளை பெற முடியும் என்று நம் சோதனைகள்  எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் பயன்பாட்டை நிர்ணயிக்க, நாம் விகிபிடியா கட்டுரைகளில் இருந்து ஜோடி ஜோடி வெளியேற்றி இயந்திர மொழிபெயர', 'ur': 'پارالئل جماعت اخراج کا ایک ٹاکس ہے جسے ڈاکٹی سیٹی مسئلہ کے بارے میں ملتی زبان کی طبیعی زبان پرینسٹ کی کاربریوں میں پایا گیا ہے. ہم ایک دوبارہ دوبارہ نئورل نیٹ ورک کی تقریبا کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ بہت سی زبان متن کی جماعت سے پارالی جماعت نکالیں۔ ہمارے آزمائش آواز پارالی کورورا کے ساتھ دکھائے جاتے ہیں کہ ہم ایک مسابقات بنسلین کے مقابلہ میں وعدہ دینے والے نتیجے پہنچ سکتے ہیں اور ایک مشابہ بنسلین کے مقابلہ میں ویسے خاص فرصت انجینری یا اضافہ خارجی ہم ویکیپیڈیا کے لکھوں سے جوڑے نکالتے ہیں کہ ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم کو ٹرین کریں اور ترجمہ کی عملکرد میں بہت اضافہ کریں۔', 'uz': "Name Biz bir necha til matnlarni bir necha tarmoqni olib tashlash uchun qo'llanmalar tarmoqning asosida qo'llaniladik. Ko'pchilik kompaniyalarimizning tajribalarimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, biz tashqi muhit muhandislarni yoki qoʻshimcha tashqi rasmlarni olib tashlashimiz mumkin. Ushbu usulning foydalanishimizni saqlash uchun biz Wikipedia maqoladan bir so'zni chiqaramiz va Mashine tarjima tizimini tahrirlash va tarjima qilish imkoniyatini juda muhim yaxshi ko'rsatuvchimiz.", 'vi': 'Việc trích chữ song song là một nhiệm vụ nhằm giải quyết vấn đề rò rỉ dữ liệu được tìm thấy trong ứng dụng xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên đa dạng. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mạng thần kinh chạy xuyên qua và di truyền để trích các câu song song trong các bộ sưu tập văn bản đa dạng. Những thí nghiệm của chúng ta với vật thể đồng loạt ồn ào cho thấy chúng ta có thể đạt được kết quả hứa hẹn dựa trên một cơ sở thi đấu bằng cách xóa bỏ nhu cầu của kỹ thuật đặc biệt hay nguồn tài nguyên ngoài. Để biện minh cho lợi ích của phương pháp này, chúng tôi trích dẫn các câu chữ từ các bài báo Wikipedia để huấn luyện dịch vụ máy tính và cho thấy những cải tiến đáng kể trong việc dịch chuyển.', 'bg': 'Паралелното извличане на изречения е задача за решаване на проблема с оскъдността на данните, открит в многоезичните приложения за обработка на естествен език. Предлагаме двупосочен рецидивиращ се невронен подход за извличане на паралелни изречения от колекции от многоезични текстове. Нашите експерименти с шумни паралелни корпуси показват, че можем да постигнем обещаващи резултати срещу конкурентна база, като премахнем необходимостта от специфичен инженеринг на функции или допълнителни външни ресурси. За да оправдаем полезността на нашия подход, извличаме двойки изречения от статиите в Уикипедия, за да обучим системи за машинен превод и да покажем значителни подобрения в ефективността на превода.', 'hr': 'Paralelna izvlačenja rečenica je zadatak koji se rješava problem rezerviteta podataka pronađen u višejezičkim prirodnim aplikacijama obrade jezika. Predlažemo dvodirektivni rekonstruirani neuralnu mrežu bazirani pristup izvlačenju paralelnih rečenica iz kolekcije multijezičkih tekstova. Naši eksperimenti s bukom paralelnim korporama pokazuju da možemo postići obećavajući rezultati protiv konkurentne početne linije uklanjanjem potrebe specifičnog inženjeringa ili dodatnih vanjskih resursa. Da bismo opravdavali korisnost našeg pristupa, izvlačimo par rečenica iz članaka Wikipedije kako bi obučili sustave prevoda strojeva i pokazali značajne poboljšanje učinka prevoda.', 'da': 'Parallel sætningsudtrækning er en opgave, der løser datasparthedsproblemet i flersprogede programmer til behandling af natursprog. Vi foreslår en bidirektionel tilbagevendende neuralt netværk baseret tilgang til at udtrække parallelle sætninger fra samlinger af flersprogede tekster. Vores eksperimenter med støjende parallelle korpora viser, at vi kan opnå lovende resultater mod en konkurrencedygtig baseline ved at fjerne behovet for specifikke feature engineering eller yderligere eksterne ressourcer. For at retfærdiggøre nytten af vores tilgang udtrækker vi sætningspar fra Wikipedia-artikler for at træne maskinoversættelsessystemer og vise betydelige forbedringer i oversættelsesevnen.', 'nl': 'Parallelle zinnenextractie is een taak die het probleem van dataschaarste aanpakt dat wordt aangetroffen in meertalige toepassingen voor natuurlijke taalverwerking. We stellen een bidirectionele recidivierende neurale netwerk gebaseerde benadering voor om parallelle zinnen uit verzamelingen meertalige teksten te extraheren. Onze experimenten met noise parallelle corpora tonen aan dat we veelbelovende resultaten kunnen bereiken tegen een concurrerende baseline door de noodzaak van specifieke feature engineering of extra externe bronnen te elimineren. Om het nut van onze aanpak te rechtvaardigen, extraheren we zinsparen uit Wikipedia-artikelen om machinevertaalsystemen te trainen en significante verbeteringen in vertaalprestaties te laten zien.', 'ko': '병렬 문장 추출은 다중 언어의 자연 언어 처리 응용에서 데이터가 희소한 문제를 해결하는 임무이다.우리는 다중 언어 텍스트 집합에서 평행 문장을 추출하기 위해 양방향 귀속 신경 네트워크를 기반으로 하는 방법을 제시했다.우리는 소음이 있는 평행 어료 라이브러리에서의 실험을 통해 특정한 특징 공사나 추가 외부 자원의 수요를 제거함으로써 경쟁적인 기선에서 희망적인 결과를 얻을 수 있음을 나타냈다.우리의 방법의 실용성을 증명하기 위해 우리는 위키백과 문장에서 문장 대조를 추출하여 기계 번역 시스템을 훈련시키고 번역 성능의 현저한 개선을 나타냈다.', 'de': 'Die parallele Satztextraktion ist eine Aufgabe, die das Problem der Datensparsamkeit in mehrsprachigen Anwendungen zur Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache angeht. Wir schlagen einen bidirektionalen rezidivierenden neuronalen Netzwerk-basierten Ansatz vor, um parallele Sätze aus Sammlungen mehrsprachiger Texte zu extrahieren. Unsere Experimente mit rauschenden parallelen Korpora zeigen, dass wir vielversprechende Ergebnisse gegenüber einer wettbewerbsfähigen Basis erzielen können, indem wir den Bedarf an spezifischem Feature Engineering oder zusätzlichen externen Ressourcen beseitigen. Um den Nutzen unseres Ansatzes zu rechtfertigen, extrahieren wir Satzpaare aus Wikipedia-Artikeln, um maschinelle Übersetzungssysteme zu trainieren und signifikante Verbesserungen in der Übersetzungsleistung aufzuzeigen.', 'id': 'Ekstrasi kalimat paralel adalah tugas yang mengatasi masalah kecepatan data yang ditemukan dalam aplikasi proses bahasa alam multibahasa. Kami mengusulkan pendekatan berdasarkan jaringan saraf berkurang bidireksi untuk mengekstrak kalimat paralel dari koleksi teks multibahasa. Eksperimen kita dengan kopora paralel yang berisik menunjukkan bahwa kita dapat mencapai hasil yang berjanji melawan dasar kompetitif dengan menghapus kebutuhan dari teknik spesifik atau sumber daya eksternal tambahan. Untuk membenarkan utilitas pendekatan kita, kita mengekstrak pasangan kalimat dari artikel Wikipedia untuk melatih sistem terjemahan mesin dan menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan dalam prestasi terjemahan.', 'fa': 'اخراج جمله پارالی یک کار است که در کاربردهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی چندین زبان پیدا شده است. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک شبکه عصبی دوباره\u200cای بر پایه\u200cای برای اخراج کردن جمله\u200cهای متن\u200cهای زیادی زبان\u200cها از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cها. آزمایش\u200cهای ما با شرکت\u200cهای متفاوت صوتی نشان می\u200cدهند که می\u200cتوانیم نتایج\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده بر خلاف یک خط پایین مسابقه\u200cی مسابقه\u200cای را با حذف نیاز مهندسی ویژه\u200cهای خاص یا منابع خارجی اضافه کنی برای تعریف استفاده از دستور ما، جفت جمله را از مقاله های ویکیپدیا خارج می کنیم تا سیستم ترجمه ماشین را آموزش دهیم و بهترین ترجمه های مهم را در انجام ترجمه نشان دهیم.', 'sw': 'Utoa wa hukumu ya Parallel ni jukumu la kuhusiana na tatizo la ukosefu wa taarifa zilizopatikana katika matumizi ya utaratibu wa lugha za asili. Tunazipendekeza mtandao wa neura unaoendelea mara kwa mara ya pili ili kutengeneza sentenco tofauti kutoka kwenye mkusanyiko wa maandishi ya lugha mbalimbali. Mijaribu yetu yenye kelele inayofanana na kampuni hiyo inaonyesha kwamba tunaweza kupata matokeo ya kuahidini dhidi ya msingi wa ushindani kwa kuondoa mahitaji ya uhandisi maalum au rasilimali za nje. Ili kuhalalisha matumizi ya mbinu yetu, tunatoa hukumu kutoka makala za Wikipedia kwa ajili ya kufundisha mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine na kuonyesha maboresho muhimu katika utendaji wa tafsiri.', 'af': "Parallele teiken uitpakking is 'n taak wat die data sparsiteit probleem gevind is in multilinglike natuurlike taal verwerking toepassings. Ons voorstel 'n bidireksjoneel herhaalde neuralnetwerk gebaseerde toegang om parallele setnings uit versameling van multitaalteks teks te uitpak. Ons eksperimente met geluid parallele korpora wys dat ons beloftende resultate kan bereik teen 'n mededingste basislien deur die behoefte van spesifieke funksie inženiering of eksterne eksterne hulpbronne te verwyder. Om die nutsprogram van ons toegang regverdig te maak, trek ons sin paar uit Wikipedia-artikels uit om masjien vertalingsstelsels te oefen en betekeurige verbeteringe in vertalingsprestasie te wys.", 'tr': 'Parallel sözlem a çylyş multi dil işleýän programlerde tapylýan maglumaty ýazmak meselesini çözmekdir. Biz birnäçe dilli metinlerden parallel sözleri çykarmak üçin tekrar edip teklip edip görýäris. Gaty parallel korpora bilen experimentalarymyz biziň konkursiýaly baseline mümkinçilik we daşarydaky çeşmeleriň gerekligini çykaryp başaryp biljekdigimizi görkez. Biziň ýaryşymyzyň işiňizi dogry etmek üçin, Wikipediýadan sözlem çiftini maşynyň terjime sistemalaryny öwretmek üçin çykarýarys we terjime etmäge wajyp gelişmeleri görkezmek üçin çykarýarys.', 'sq': 'Zgjidhja paralele e fjalëve është një detyrë që trajton problem in e shpejtësisë së të dhënave të gjetur në aplikimet shumëgjuhësore të procesimit të gjuhës natyrore. Ne propozojmë një qasje dy-drejtuese të përhershme të rrjetit nervor të bazuar për të nxjerrë fraza paralele nga koleksionet e teksteve shumëgjuhësore. Eksperimentet tona me korpra të zhurmshme paralele tregojnë se ne mund të arrijmë rezultate premtuese kundër një baze konkurruese duke hequr nevojën e inxhinierisë specifike apo burimeve shtesë të jashtme. Për të justifikuar shërbimin e qasjes sonë, nxjerrim çifte fjalësh nga artikujt e Wikipedias për të trajnuar sistemet e përkthimit të makinave dhe tregojmë përmirësime të rëndësishme në performancën e përkthimit.', 'hy': 'Բազմալեզվով բնական լեզվի վերամշակման ծրագրերում գտնվող տվյալների հազվադեպության խնդիրը լուծելու համար է: Մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու ուղղությամբ կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված մոտեցում բազլեզու տեքստների հավաքածուներից զուգահեռ նախադասություններ հանելու համար: Our experiments with noisy parallel corpora show that we can achieve promising results against a competitive baseline by removing the need of specific feature engineering or additional external resources.  Որպեսզի արդարացնենք մեր մոտեցումների օգտակարությունը, մենք Վիքիփեդիայի հոդվածներից հանում ենք նախադասությունների զույգեր մեքենային թարգմանման համակարգերի վարժեցնելու համար և ցույց ենք տալիս թարգմանման արտադրողությունների կարև', 'az': 'Parallel cümlələr çıxarılması çoxlu dil təbiətli dil işləmə proqramlarında bulunan məlumatların küçük problemlərini çəkən bir işdir. Biz çoxlu dil mətnlərin koleksiyonlarından paralel sözləri çıxartmaq üçün ikinci dəyişiklik nöral a ğ təklif edirik. Bizim səs paralelə korpora təcrübələrimiz göstərir ki, müqayisədə olan təcrübə səhifələrinə və ya ekstra dış kaynaqlarına ehtiyacımızı almaq üçün vəd verən sonuçlarımızı başa düşə bilərik. Yaxınlığımızın istifadəsini təsdiqləmək üçün, Wikipedia məqamlarından cümlələr çift alırıq maşın çevirim sistemlərini təhsil etmək üçün və çevirim performansındakı möhkəm uzlaşmaları göstərək.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার অ্যাপ্লিকেশনে তথ্য স্পারিসি সমস্যার সাথে পাওয়া একটি কাজ। আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি পুনরাবৃত্তিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক ক্ষেত্রে প্যারালেল শাস্তি বের করার জন্য। আমাদের কণ্ঠস্বর প্যারালেল কোর্পোরা দিয়ে আমাদের পরীক্ষা যে আমরা প্রতিদ্বন্দ্বিতা বেসাইনের বিরুদ্ধে প্রতিশ্রুত ফলাফল অর্জন করতে পারি বিশে To justify the utility of our approach, we extract sentence pairs from Wikipedia articles to train machine translation systems and show significant improvements in translation performance.', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች በተለየ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ፕሮግራሞች ውስጥ የተገኘውን የዳታ ምርጫዎች ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ጽሑፎችን ለማውጣት የሚተያያየውን የደዌብ መረብ ለመቀናቀል እናስባለን፡፡ በተጨማሪው የኮርፖራ ተሟጋቾቻችን የተስፋ ፍሬዎችን ለመግለጥ ወይም የውጭ ሀብትን ለመግለጥ የሚችሉትን የጥቅረት መሠረት ማግኘት እናችላለን፡፡ የግንኙነታችንን ጥያቄ ለማስተካከል፣ ከWikipedia ጽሑፎች ሁለት ዓይነቶችን የመሳሳይ ትርጉም ስርዓቶችን ለማስተማር እና ትርጓሜዎችን ለማሳየት እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Paralelna izvlačenja rečenice je zadatak koji se rješava problem rezerviteta podataka pronađen u višejezičkim prirodnim aplikacijama obrade jezika. Predlažemo dvodirektivni rekonstruirani neuralnu mrežu bazirani pristup izvlačenju paralelnih rečenica iz kolekcije multijezičkih tekstova. Naši eksperimenti s buknim paralelnim korporama pokazuju da možemo postići obećavajući rezultati protiv konkurentne osnovne linije uklanjanjem potrebe specifičnog inženjeringa ili dodatnih vanjskih resursa. Da bismo opravdavali korisnost našeg pristupa, izvlačimo par rečenica iz Wikipedijskih članaka kako bi obučili sisteme prevoda mašina i pokazali značajne poboljšanje u provedbi prevoda.', 'ca': "L'extracció parallela de frases és una tasca que aborda el problem a de la escassetat de dades trobat en aplicacions multilingües de processament de llenguatges naturals. Proposem un enfocament bidireccional basat en la xarxa neural recurrent per extrair frases paralleles de col·leccions de textos multilingües. Els nostres experiments amb corpores parallels sorollosos mostren que podem aconseguir resultats prometedors en comparació amb una base competitiva eliminant la necessitat d'enginyeria específica o recursos externs adicionals. Per justificar la utilitat del nostre enfocament, extreuem parells de frases d'articles de Wikipedia per entrenar sistemes de traducció màquina i mostrar millors significatives en el rendiment de traducció.", 'cs': 'Paralelní extrakce vět je úkol řešit problém řídkosti dat, který se nachází ve vícejazyčných aplikacích pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Navrhujeme obousměrný recidivní přístup založený na neuronové síti k extrakci paralelních vět ze sbírek vícejazyčných textů. Naše experimenty s hlučnými paralelními korpusy ukazují, že můžeme dosáhnout slibných výsledků oproti konkurenčnímu základnímu principu tím, že odstraníme potřebu specifického inženýrství nebo dalších externích zdrojů. Abychom ospravedlnili užitečnost našeho přístupu, extrahujeme větové páry z článků Wikipedie pro trénink strojového překladu systémů a ukazujeme výrazné zlepšení překladové výkonnosti.', 'et': 'Paralleelne lause ekstraheerimine on ülesanne lahendada mitmekeelsete looduskeelte töötlemise rakenduste andmete hõreduse probleemi. Pakume välja kahesuunalise korduva närvivõrgu põhise lähenemisviisi paralleelsete lausete ekstraheerimiseks mitmekeelsete tekstide kogumitest. Meie eksperimendid mürakate paralleelkorporadega näitavad, et me suudame saavutada paljutõotavaid tulemusi konkurentsivõimelise algtasemega võrreldes, kõrvaldades vajaduse spetsiifiliste funktsioonide projekteerimise või täiendavate välisressursside järele. Oma lähenemisviisi kasulikkuse õigustamiseks ekstraheerime lausepaarid Wikipedia artiklitest masintõlkesüsteemide koolitamiseks ja tõlkimise tulemuslikkuse märkimisväärseks paranemiseks.', 'fi': 'Rinnakkainen lauseen purkaminen on tehtävä, joka käsittelee monikielisten luonnonkielen käsittelysovellusten datan niukkuutta. Ehdotamme kaksisuuntaista toistuvaa neuroverkkopohjaista lähestymistapaa rinnakkaislauseiden poimimiseen monikielisten tekstien kokoelmista. Kokeemme meluisilla rinnakkaiskorpusilla osoittavat, että voimme saavuttaa lupaavia tuloksia kilpailukykyiseen lähtötilanteeseen verrattuna poistamalla erityispiirteiden suunnittelun tai ulkoisten resurssien tarpeen. Perustellaksemme lähestymistapamme hyödyllisyyden, otamme lausepareja Wikipedian artikkeleista konekäännösjärjestelmien kouluttamiseksi ja osoitamme merkittäviä parannuksia käännösten suorituskyvyssä.', 'sk': 'Vzporedno ekstrakcijo stavkov je naloga, ki obravnava problem redkosti podatkov v večjezičnih aplikacijah za obdelavo naravnega jezika. Predlagamo dvosmerni pristop, ki temelji na ponavljajočem se nevronskem omrežju, za ekstrakcijo vzporednih stavkov iz zbirk večjezičnih besedil. Naši poskusi s hrupnimi vzporednimi korpusi kažejo, da lahko dosežemo obetavne rezultate glede na konkurenčno osnovo z odpravo potrebe po specifičnem inženiringu funkcij ali dodatnih zunanjih virov. Da bi upravičili uporabnost našega pristopa, iz Wikipedijskih člankov izvlečemo stavkovne pare za usposabljanje sistemov strojnega prevajanja in pokažemo znatne izboljšave v učinkovitosti prevajanja.', 'ha': "Salon maganar fanel yana da wani aikin ka yi addu'a ga matsalar masu tsari da aka samu cikin shiryoyin ayuka masu cikin multi-lingui. Tuna goyyar da wata shirin tarayya na'urar da aka kari a bakin ciki na fara-ƙari zuwa ka fitar saurari masu daidaita daga koma-takardar mistakardar multi-lingui. KayyayinMu da sauri da kamfani na nuna cewa, za mu iya sãmu matsayi mai yi wa'adi a kan bangon tarayya da za'a tafiyar da umarnin muhimmin muhimmada masu muhimmi ko kuma ma'abũcin bayani. To justify the utility of our approach, we extract sentence pairs from Wikipedia articles to train machine translation systems and show significant improvements in translation performance.", 'he': 'הוצאת משפט פעמונית היא משימה שמטפלת בבעיית חסרת הנתונים שנמצאה בתוכניות מעבדת שפת טבעית רבות שפות. אנו מציעים גישה דו-כיוונית מבוססת על רשת עצבית מבוססת כדי להוציא משפטים מקבילים מאספות טקסטים רבות שפותיים. הניסויים שלנו עם גופורה מקבילה רעילה מראים שאנחנו יכולים להשיג תוצאות מבטיחות נגד בסיס תחרותי על ידי להסיר את הצורך של הנדסה של תכונות ספציפיות או משאבים חיצוניים נוספים. כדי להצדיק את שימושי הגישה שלנו, אנו מוציאים זוגות משפטים ממאמרים בוויקיפדיה כדי לאמן מערכות התרגום מכונות ולהראות שיפורים משמעותיים בתפקיד התרגום.', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Awak dhéwé ngerasah akeh langgar sampeyan wigatik Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan nganggo perusahaan kelas-perusahaan nganggo kuwi dianggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang kejahatan Mbok nggawe justificati kanggo kalalah kanggo diandelak dhéwé, kéné nggoleki ujian winih kanggo nganggo sistem tarjamahan karo ingkang dipoleh kanggo ngerasakno itoleh operasi tarjamahan', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཚིག་རྗེས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྐད་རིགས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་འབྲུ་ཚིག་ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ལས་ཚོར་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་རྩོམ་གཏོང་། Our experiments with noisy parallel corpora show that we can achieve promising results against a competitive baseline by removing the need of specific feature engineering or additional external resources. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་སྤྱོད་ཆ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་ང་ཚོས་Wikipedia་ནང་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚིག་རྩིས་འཁོར་ནས་མ་ལག་གི་ས translation་རིམ་ལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད'}
{'en': 'Transfer Learning for a Letter-Ngrams to Word Decoder in the Context of Historical Handwriting Recognition with Scarce Resources', 'ar': 'نقل التعلم من أجل حرف Ngrams إلى وحدة فك ترميز الكلمات في سياق التعرف على خط اليد التاريخي مع الموارد النادرة', 'es': 'Transfiera el aprendizaje de un decodificador de letras y ngramas a Word en el contexto del reconocimiento histórico de la escritura a mano con escasos recursos', 'pt': 'Transferência de Aprendizagem para um Decodificador de Letras-Ngrams para Word no Contexto do Reconhecimento Histórico de Manuscrito com Recursos Escassos', 'fr': "Apprentissage par transfert d'un décodeur Letter-Ngrams vers Word dans le contexte de la reconnaissance historique de l'écriture manuscrite avec des ressources limitées", 'ja': '乏しいリソースでの歴史的な筆跡認識の文脈で、文字-グラムの学習をWordデコーダーに転送する', 'hi': 'दुर्लभ संसाधनों के साथ ऐतिहासिक हस्तलिपि मान्यता के संदर्भ में वर्ड डिकोडर के लिए एक पत्र-Ngrams के लिए सीखने को स्थानांतरित करें', 'zh': '识稀缺资源史背景移字母Ngrams于单词解码器', 'ru': 'Передача обучения для буквенно-граммового декодера в контексте исторического распознавания рукописного текста с дефицитными ресурсами', 'ga': 'Aistrigh Foghlaim do Litir-Ngram go Díchódóir Focal i gComhthéacs Aitheantas na Lámhscríbhneoireachta Stairiúla le hAcmhainní Ganna', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Tanulás átadása egy betű-Ngramokhoz Word dekódolóhoz a történelmi kézírás felismerésének kontextusában kevés erőforrásokkal', 'el': 'Μεταφορά Μάθησης για ένα γράμμα-σε αποκωδικοποιητή λέξεων στο πλαίσιο της ιστορικής αναγνώρισης χειρόγραφου με περιορισμένους πόρους', 'it': 'Trasferimento di apprendimento per un Letter-Ngram a Decoder Word nel contesto del riconoscimento storico della scrittura a mano con risorse scarse', 'kk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Perkelti mokymąsi laiškų raidėmis į žodžių dekoderį istorinio rašymo pripažinimo su ribotais ištekliais kontekste', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'എഴുത്ത്- Nഗ്രാമിനുള്ള പഠനം നീക്കം ചരിത്ര കൈഎഴുതുന്നതിന്റെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d വാക്ക് ഡെക്കോഡെരിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുക', 'mt': 'It-Tagħlim tat-Trasferiment għal Ittra-Ngrams għad-Dekodifikatur tal-kliem fil-Kuntest tar-Rikonoxximent tal-Iskrizzjoni tal-Idid Storika b’Riżorsi Skarsi', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Belajar untuk Huruf-Ngram ke Pengkod Perkataan dalam Konteks Pengenalan Tulisan Tangan Sejarah dengan Sumber Kurang', 'mn': 'Захиа-Ngrams-ын суралцах суралцах нь түүхийн гар бичих боловсролын контекст дээр хэлбэрээр шийдвэрлэгч хүртэл', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Transfer Learning for a Letter-Ngrams to Word Decoder w kontekście historycznego rozpoznawania pisma ręcznego z małymi zasobami', 'ro': 'Transfer de învățare pentru o literă-Ngrams la decodor Word în contextul recunoașterii istorice a scrisului de mână cu resurse limitate', 'sr': 'Prebaci učenje za slovo-Ngrams na dekoder reči u kontekstu povijesnog prepoznavanja rukopisa sa korisnim resursima', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Transfer Learning for a Letter-Ngram to Word Decoder in the Context of Historical Handwriting Recognition with Scarce resources', 'ur': 'Name', 'sv': 'Överföra lärande för en bokstav-Ngrams till ordavkodare i samband med historisk handskriftserkännande med få resurser', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền học chuyển thư cho một mục thư tới mục giải Từ trong ngữ cảnh ghi bàn tay lịch sử ghi nhận bằng các nguồn văn học', 'bg': 'Прехвърляне на обучение за букви-грами към декодер на думи в контекста на историческото разпознаване на почерк с оскъдни ресурси', 'hr': 'Prebaci učenje za slovo-Ngrams na dekoder riječi u kontekstu povijesne prepoznavanje rukopisa sa izvorima Scarce', 'nl': 'Overdracht Leren voor een Letter-Ngrams naar Word Decoder in de context van historische handschriftherkenning met schaarse middelen', 'da': 'Overfør læring for en Letter-Ngrams til Word Decoder i sammenhæng med historisk håndskrift anerkendelse med ringe ressourcer', 'id': 'Transfer Learning for a Letter-Ngrams to Word Decoder in the Context of Historical Handwriting Recognition with Scarce Resources', 'de': 'Lernen für einen Buchstaben-Ngrams auf Word Decoder im Kontext historischer Handschrifterkennung mit knappen Ressourcen übertragen', 'fa': 'Transfer Learning for a Letter-Ngrams to Word Decoder in the Context of Historical Handwriting Recognition with Scarce Resources', 'ko': '자원이 희소한 역사 핸드폰 식별 환경에서 알파벳 Ngrams에서 단어 디코더로 이동 학습', 'af': "Oordrag Leer vir 'n Letter- Ngrams na Woorddekoder in die Konteks van Historiese Handskrif Herkenning met Scarce Hulpbronne", 'sq': 'Transfero Mësimin për një ngramë letrash në dekoderin e fjalëve në kontekstin e njohjes historike të shkrimit të dorës me burime të pakta', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'sw': 'Kubadilisha Ufunzi kwa ajili ya barua-Ngram kwenda Kwenye Hadithi Katika Mkutano wa Kihistoria Kutambuwa na rasilimali za Kisayansi', 'tr': 'Name', 'hy': 'Գործերի Ngram-ի ուսումնասիրությունը փոխանցելը բառերի դիկոդերին պատմական գրքի ճանաչման կոնտեքստում քիչ ռեսուրսներով', 'bs': 'Prebaci učenje za slovo-Ngrams na dekoder riječi u kontekstu povijesne prepoznavanje rukopisa sa izvorima Scarce', 'az': 'Tarihi Əl Yazılışının Kontekstündə Öyrənməsini Qərc-Ngramlar üçün Söz Dekodlayıcısına Transfer', 'ca': 'Transfer Learning for a Letter-Ngrams to Word Decoder in the Context of Historical Handwriting Recognition with scarce Resources', 'cs': 'Přenos učení písmen-ngramů do dekodéru slov v kontextu historického rozpoznávání rukopisu s nedostatečnými zdroji', 'et': 'Kirja-Ngrammide ülekandmine sõna dekooderisse ajaloolise käekirja äratundmise kontekstis vähese ressursiga', 'bn': 'Name', 'fi': 'Siirtää oppimista kirje-Ngrammit sanan dekooderiin historiallisen käsikirjoituksen tunnistamisen kontekstissa niukalla resursseilla', 'jv': 'Layaran Ngrams nggo Kemerdekorasi Layar', 'he': 'העברת לימוד למכתב-Ngrams לקודר מילים בתוך הקונקסט של זיהוי כתב יד היסטורי עם משאבים נמוכים', 'sk': 'Prenos učenja za črke-Ngrame v dekodirnik besed v kontekstu zgodovinskega prepoznavanja rokopisa z malo virov', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Transfer Learning for a Letter-Ngrams to Word Decoder in the Context of Historical Handwriting Recognition with Scarce Resources'}
{'en': 'Lack of data can be an issue when beginning a new study on historical handwritten documents. In order to deal with this, we present the character-based decoder part of a multilingual approach based on transductive transfer learning for a historical handwriting recognition task on Italian Comedy Registers. The decoder must build a sequence of characters that corresponds to a word from a vector of letter-ngrams. As learning data, we created a new dataset from untapped resources that covers the same domain and period of our Italian Comedy data, as well as resources from common domains, periods, or languages. We obtain a 97.42 % Character Recognition Rate and a 86.57 % Word Recognition Rate on our Italian Comedy data, despite a lexical coverage of 67 % between the Italian Comedy data and the training data. These results show that an efficient system can be obtained by a carefully selecting the datasets used for the transfer learning.', 'ar': 'يمكن أن يكون نقص البيانات مشكلة عند بدء دراسة جديدة على المستندات المكتوبة بخط اليد التاريخية. من أجل التعامل مع هذا ، نقدم جزء وحدة فك التشفير المستند إلى الأحرف من نهج متعدد اللغات يعتمد على التعلم التحويلي لمهمة التعرف على خط اليد التاريخي في سجلات الكوميديا الإيطالية. يجب أن يبني مفكك التشفير سلسلة من الأحرف التي تتوافق مع كلمة من متجه لأحرف- ngrams. كبيانات تعليمية ، أنشأنا مجموعة بيانات جديدة من موارد غير مستغلة تغطي نفس المجال والفترة لبيانات الكوميديا الإيطالية ، بالإضافة إلى الموارد من المجالات أو الفترات أو اللغات الشائعة. حصلنا على معدل التعرف على الأحرف بنسبة 97.42٪ ومعدل التعرف على الكلمات بنسبة 86.57٪ على بيانات الكوميديا الإيطالية ، على الرغم من التغطية المعجمية بنسبة 67٪ بين بيانات الكوميديا الإيطالية وبيانات التدريب. توضح هذه النتائج أنه يمكن الحصول على نظام فعال من خلال التحديد الدقيق لمجموعات البيانات المستخدمة في نقل التعلم.', 'pt': 'A falta de dados pode ser um problema ao iniciar um novo estudo sobre documentos manuscritos históricos. Para lidar com isso, apresentamos o decodificador baseado em caracteres parte de uma abordagem multilíngue baseada no aprendizado de transferência transdutiva para uma tarefa de reconhecimento de caligrafia histórica em registros de comédia italianos. O decodificador deve construir uma sequência de caracteres que corresponda a uma palavra a partir de um vetor de letras-gramas. Como dados de aprendizado, criamos um novo conjunto de dados de recursos inexplorados que abrange o mesmo domínio e período de nossos dados de comédia italiana, bem como recursos de domínios, períodos ou idiomas comuns. Obtemos uma taxa de reconhecimento de caracteres de 97,42% e uma taxa de reconhecimento de palavras de 86,57% em nossos dados de comédia italiana, apesar de uma cobertura lexical de 67% entre os dados de comédia italiana e os dados de treinamento. Esses resultados mostram que um sistema eficiente pode ser obtido selecionando cuidadosamente os conjuntos de dados usados para o aprendizado de transferência.', 'es': 'La falta de datos puede ser un problema al iniciar un nuevo estudio sobre documentos manuscritos históricos. Para hacer frente a esto, presentamos la parte del decodificador basado en caracteres de un enfoque multilingüe basado en el aprendizaje de transferencia transductiva para una tarea de reconocimiento de escritura a mano histórica en Italian Comedy Registers. El decodificador debe construir una secuencia de caracteres que corresponda a una palabra de un vector de letras ngramas. Como datos de aprendizaje, creamos un nuevo conjunto de datos a partir de recursos sin explotar que cubre el mismo dominio y período de nuestros datos de comedia italiana, así como recursos de dominios, períodos o idiomas comunes. Obtenemos una tasa de reconocimiento de personajes del 97,42% y una tasa de reconocimiento de palabras del 86,57% en nuestros datos de comedia italiana, a pesar de una cobertura léxica del 67% entre los datos de comedia italiana y los datos de entrenamiento. Estos resultados muestran que se puede obtener un sistema eficiente seleccionando cuidadosamente los conjuntos de datos utilizados para el aprendizaje de transferencia.', 'fr': "Le manque de données peut constituer un problème lorsqu'on entreprend une nouvelle étude sur des documents manuscrits historiques. Pour y remédier, nous présentons la partie décodeur basé sur les caractères d'une approche multilingue basée sur l'apprentissage par transfert transductif pour une tâche de reconnaissance d'écriture manuscrite historique sur des registres comiques italiens. Le décodeur doit construire une séquence de caractères qui correspond à un mot à partir d'un vecteur de lettres ngrammes. En tant que données d'apprentissage, nous avons créé un nouveau jeu de données à partir de ressources inexploitées qui couvre le même domaine et la même période que nos données Comedy italiennes, ainsi que des ressources provenant de domaines, de périodes ou de langues courants. Nous obtenons un taux de reconnaissance des caractères de 97,42\xa0% et un taux de reconnaissance des mots de 86,57\xa0% sur nos données de comédie italienne, malgré une couverture lexicale de 67\xa0% entre les données de comédie italienne et les données d'entraînement. Ces résultats montrent qu'un système efficace peut être obtenu en sélectionnant soigneusement les ensembles de données utilisés pour l'apprentissage par transfert.", 'ja': '過去の手書き文書に関する新しい研究を開始する際には、データが不足していることが問題となる可能性があります。これに対処するために、イタリアのコメディレジスターの歴史的な筆跡認識タスクのためのトランスフォーカル転送学習に基づく多言語アプローチの文字ベースのデコーダー部分を提示します。デコーダは、文字-グラムのベクトルからの単語に対応する文字のシーケンスを構築する必要があります。学習データとして、未利用のリソースから新しいデータセットを作成しました。これは、イタリアのコメディデータの同じドメインと期間、および一般的なドメイン、期間、言語のリソースをカバーしています。イタリアンコメディのデータとトレーニングデータの間に67%のカバレッジがあるにもかかわらず、当社はイタリアンコメディのデータで97.42%の文字認識率と86.57%の単語認識率を取得しています。これらの結果は、転送学習に使用されるデータセットを慎重に選択することによって、効率的なシステムを得ることができることを示している。', 'zh': '始新于史文档,阙数或一。 为此者,转导移学之多言,以解码器于字符之解码器,以别于意大利喜剧寄存器史。 解码器必构一字符序,当应字母 ngram 向量中之单词。 为学数者,未尝开其资源中创一新数集,当数集涵盖余意大利喜剧数之同领时,及自常见领域,时语之资也。 于意大利喜剧数中得97.42%角色识别率与86.57%之单词识别率,虽意大利喜剧数练数之间词汇覆盖率为67%。 此结果表明,详择迁徙之数,可得高效之统也。', 'hi': 'ऐतिहासिक हस्तलिखित दस्तावेजों पर एक नया अध्ययन शुरू करते समय डेटा की कमी एक मुद्दा हो सकती है। इससे निपटने के लिए, हम इतालवी कॉमेडी रजिस्टरों पर एक ऐतिहासिक हस्तलिपि मान्यता कार्य के लिए ट्रांसडक्टिव ट्रांसफर लर्निंग के आधार पर एक बहुभाषी दृष्टिकोण के चरित्र-आधारित विकोडक भाग को प्रस्तुत करते हैं। डिकोडर को वर्णों का एक अनुक्रम बनाना होगा जो अक्षर-ngrams के वेक्टर से किसी शब्द से मेल खाता हो. डेटा सीखने के रूप में, हमने अप्रयुक्त संसाधनों से एक नया डेटासेट बनाया है जो हमारे इतालवी कॉमेडी डेटा के समान डोमेन और अवधि को कवर करता है, साथ ही साथ सामान्य डोमेन, अवधि या भाषाओं के संसाधनों को भी शामिल करता है। हम इतालवी कॉमेडी डेटा और प्रशिक्षण डेटा के बीच 67% के लेक्सिकल कवरेज के बावजूद, हमारे इतालवी कॉमेडी डेटा पर 97.42% चरित्र मान्यता दर और 86.57% शब्द मान्यता दर प्राप्त करते हैं। इन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि स्थानांतरण सीखने के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले डेटासेट का सावधानीपूर्वक चयन करके एक कुशल प्रणाली प्राप्त की जा सकती है।', 'ru': 'Отсутствие данных может быть проблемой при начале нового исследования по историческим рукописным документам. Чтобы справиться с этим, мы представляем декодер на основе символов в многоязычном подходе, основанном на трансдуктивном обучении переносу для исторической задачи распознавания рукописного текста на итальянских комедийных регистрах. Декодер должен построить последовательность символов, соответствующую слову из вектора буквенно-грамм. В качестве обучающих данных мы создали новый набор данных из неиспользованных ресурсов, который охватывает ту же область и период наших данных итальянской комедии, а также ресурсы из общих областей, периодов или языков. Мы получаем 97,42% -ную частоту распознавания символов и 86,57% -ную частоту распознавания слов по нашим данным итальянской комедии, несмотря на лексический охват 67% между данными итальянской комедии и данными обучения. Эти результаты показывают, что эффективная система может быть получена путем тщательного отбора наборов данных, используемых для обучения передаче.', 'ga': "Is féidir le heaspa sonraí a bheith ina ábhar imní agus staidéar nua á thosú ar dhoiciméid stairiúla lámhscríofa. Chun déileáil leis seo, cuirimid i láthair an díchódóra carachtar-bhunaithe mar chuid de chur chuige ilteangach atá bunaithe ar fhoghlaim aistrithe tras-aistrithe do thasc stairiúil aitheantais peannaireachta ar Chláir Coiméide na hIodáile. Caithfidh an díchódóir seicheamh carachtar a thógáil a fhreagraíonn d'fhocal ó veicteoir litreacha ngram. Mar shonraí foghlama, chruthaíomar tacar sonraí nua ó acmhainní nár baineadh leas astu a chlúdaíonn an fearann agus an tréimhse chéanna dár sonraí Coiméide Iodálach, chomh maith le hacmhainní ó fhearann, tréimhsí nó teangacha coitianta. Faighimid Ráta Aitheanta Carachtar 97.42% agus Ráta Aitheantais Focal 86.57% ar ár sonraí Coiméide Iodálach, in ainneoin clúdach foclóireachta 67% idir sonraí Coiméide na hIodáile agus na sonraí oiliúna. Léiríonn na torthaí seo gur féidir córas éifeachtach a fháil trí na tacair sonraí a úsáidtear don fhoghlaim aistrithe a roghnú go cúramach.", 'hu': 'Az adatok hiánya problémát jelenthet a történelmi kézzel írt dokumentumok új tanulmányának megkezdésekor. Ennek megoldása érdekében bemutatjuk a transzduktív transzfertanuláson alapuló többnyelvű megközelítés karakteralapú dekódoló részét az olasz vígjátékok történelmi kézírás felismerésére. A dekódolónak olyan karaktersorozatot kell létrehoznia, amely megfelel egy szónak egy betű-ngramok vektorából. Tanulási adatként új adatkészletet hoztunk létre kiaknázatlan erőforrásokból, amelyek ugyanazt a területet és időszakot fedik le olasz komédia adataink, valamint közös domainek, időszakok vagy nyelvek forrásait. Olasz vígjáték adataink alapján 97,42%-os karakterfelismerési arányt és 86,57%-os szófelismerési arányt kapunk, annak ellenére, hogy az olasz vígjáték adatai és a tréning adatai között 67%-os lexikális lefedettség van. Ezek az eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a transzfer tanuláshoz használt adatkészletek gondos kiválasztásával hatékony rendszert lehet elérni.', 'el': 'Η έλλειψη δεδομένων μπορεί να αποτελέσει ζήτημα κατά την έναρξη μιας νέας μελέτης για ιστορικά χειρόγραφα έγγραφα. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό, παρουσιάζουμε το τμήμα αποκωδικοποιητή βασισμένο σε χαρακτήρες μιας πολύγλωσσης προσέγγισης βασισμένης στη μεταδοτική μάθηση μεταφοράς για μια εργασία αναγνώρισης ιστορικού γραφικού χαρακτήρα στα ιταλικά μητρώα κωμωδίας. Ο αποκωδικοποιητής πρέπει να δημιουργήσει μια ακολουθία χαρακτήρων που αντιστοιχεί σε μια λέξη από ένα διάνυσμα γραμμάτων. Ως μαθησιακά δεδομένα, δημιουργήσαμε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων από ανεκμετάλλευτους πόρους που καλύπτουν τον ίδιο τομέα και την ίδια περίοδο των δεδομένων της ιταλικής κωμωδίας μας, καθώς και πόρους από κοινούς τομείς, περιόδους ή γλώσσες. Λαμβάνουμε ένα 97,42% ποσοστό αναγνώρισης χαρακτήρων και ένα 86,57% ποσοστό αναγνώρισης λέξεων στα δεδομένα της ιταλικής κωμωδίας, παρά την λεξική κάλυψη 67% μεταξύ των δεδομένων της ιταλικής κωμωδίας και των δεδομένων εκπαίδευσης. Τα αποτελέσματα αυτά δείχνουν ότι ένα αποτελεσματικό σύστημα μπορεί να επιτευχθεί με την προσεκτική επιλογή των συνόλων δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιούνται για τη μάθηση μεταφοράς.', 'ka': 'მონაცემების არაა შეიძლება იყოს პრობლემა, როდესაც ისტორიური ხელსაწერილი დოკუმენტებზე ახალი სწავლა დაწყება. ამის შესახებ, ჩვენ მრავალენგური პროგრამის ფაილი, რომელიც განვითარებული ტრანსპექტური გასწავლად ისტორიური ხელსაწერის განაცნობის საქმე იტალიანური კომედი რეგისტრისტებში და ევკოდერები უნდა შექმნა სიმბოლოების წერტილი, რომელიც კონფიგურაცია სიმბოლოების გვქტორიდან. როგორც მასწავლის მონაცემები, ჩვენ შევქმნა ახალი მონაცემების კომედიის მონაცემების დემომინი და პერიოდი, რომელიც ჩვენი იტალიანური კომედიის მონაცემების, და საერთო დემომინი,  ჩვენ მივიღეთ 97.42% სიმბოლოების განაცნობა და 86.57% სიმბოლოების განაცნობის სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების სიმბოლოების განაცნობის სიმბოლო ეს შედეგი გამოჩვენება, რომ ეფექტიური სისტემა შეიძლება მოიღება მონაცემულად მონიშნოთ მონაცემების სწავლებისთვის გამოყენებული მონაცემები.', 'it': "La mancanza di dati può essere un problema quando si inizia un nuovo studio su documenti storici manoscritti. Per affrontare questo problema, presentiamo la parte del decoder basato sui caratteri di un approccio multilingue basato sull'apprendimento trasttivo del trasferimento per un compito storico di riconoscimento della scrittura a mano sui registri della commedia italiana. Il decoder deve costruire una sequenza di caratteri che corrisponde ad una parola da un vettore di lettere-ngram. Come dati di apprendimento, abbiamo creato un nuovo dataset da risorse non sfruttate che copre lo stesso dominio e periodo dei nostri dati della Commedia Italiana, così come risorse da domini, periodi o lingue comuni. Otteniamo un tasso di riconoscimento dei personaggi del 97,42% e un tasso di riconoscimento delle parole dell'86,57% sui nostri dati della Commedia Italiana, nonostante una copertura lessicale del 67% tra i dati della Commedia Italiana e i dati di formazione. Questi risultati dimostrano che un sistema efficiente può essere ottenuto selezionando attentamente i dataset utilizzati per il transfer learning.", 'kk': 'Деректер жоқ, тарихый құжаттар туралы жаңа зерттеу басталғанда мәселе болуы мүмкін. Бұл көмектесу үшін, Италия Комедия Регистрлерінде тарихлық қолмен жазу тапсырмасын түсініктіру үшін көптілік тәртібінің бірнеше тілдік тәртібін бағдарламасына негізделген таңбалар Декодердің әріптер- граммдар векторынан сәйкес келетін сөздердің ретін таңбаларын құру керек. Мәліметтерді оқыту үшін, біз бір доменге және итальяндық комедиялық деректерінің келесі кезінде, жалпы домендерден, кезектерден, не тілдерден ресурстарды жасадық. Біз 97,42% таңбаларды таңдау жиілігін және 86,57% Италия комедиялық деректерімізде сөздерді таңдау жиілігін аламыз. Италия комедиялық деректері мен оқыту деректері арасындағы 67% лексикалық мәліметі бар. Бұл нәтижелер тасымалдау оқыту үшін қолданылатын деректер қорларын тәжірибелі жүйесіне көмектесу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Duomenų trūkumas gali būti problema pradedant naują istorinių rašytinių dokumentų tyrimą. Siekdami išspręsti šį klausimą, pristatome daugiakalbio metodo, pagrįsto transdukciniu perdavimo mokymu istoriniam rašto pripažinimo uždaviniui Italijos komedijos registruose, simboliu pagrįstą dekoderių dalį. Dekodorius turi sukurti simbolių seką, atitinkančią žodį, gautą iš laiškų-ngrams vektoriaus. As learning data, we created a new dataset from untapped resources that covers the same domain and period of our Italian Comedy data, as well as resources from common domains, periods, or languages.  Mes gauname 97,42 proc. ženklų pripažinimo lygį ir 86,57 proc. žodžių pripažinimo lygį mūsų Italijos komedijos duomenise, nepaisant 67 proc. laipsniško Italijos komedijos duomenų ir mokymo duomenų aprėpties. These results show that an efficient system can be obtained by a carefully selecting the datasets used for the transfer learning.', 'ms': 'Kekurangan data boleh menjadi isu bila memulakan kajian baru mengenai dokumen tertulis tangan sejarah. Untuk menangani ini, kami memperkenalkan bahagian dekoder berdasarkan aksara pendekatan berbilang bahasa berdasarkan pembelajaran pemindahan transduktif untuk tugas pengenalan tulisan tangan sejarah pada Rekod Komedi Italia. Dekoder mesti membina urutan aksara yang sepadan dengan perkataan dari vektor huruf-ngrams. Sebagai belajar data, kami mencipta set data baru dari sumber yang tidak digunakan yang meliputi domain dan masa yang sama data Comedy Italia kami, serta sumber dari domain, periode, atau bahasa umum. Kami mendapat Kadar Pengenalan Aksara 97.42% dan Kadar Pengenalan Perkataan 86.57% pada data Komedi Italia kami, walaupun penyamaran leksikal 67% antara data Komedi Italia dan data latihan. These results show that an efficient system can be obtained by a carefully selecting the datasets used for the transfer learning.', 'mk': 'Недостатокот на податоци може да биде проблем кога ќе започне нова студија за историските рачно напишани документи. За да се справиме со ова, го претставуваме делот од декодерот базиран на карактери на мултијазичен пристап базиран на трансдуктивното преносно учење за историско препознавање на ракописот на италијанските комедиски регистри. Декодерот мора да изгради секвенца на знаци кои одговараат на збор од вектор на букви- грams. Како учење на податоци, создадовме нов податок од неискористени ресурси кој го покрива истиот домен и период на податоците на Италијанската комедија, како и ресурсите од заеднички домени, периоди или јазици. Добиваме 97,42 отсто стапка на признавање знаци и 86,57 отсто стапка на признавање на зборови на нашите податоци за италијанска комедија, и покрај лексичното покривање од 67 отсто помеѓу податоците за италијанска комедија и податоците за обука. Овие резултати покажуваат дека ефикасен систем може да се добие со внимателно избирање на датотеките кои се користат за учењето на трансферот.', 'mt': 'In-nuqqas ta’ dejta jista’ jkun kwistjoni meta jinbeda studju ġdid dwar dokumenti storiċi miktuba bl-idejn. Sabiex nindirizzaw dan, nippreżentaw il-parti tad-dekoder ibbażat fuq il-karattru ta’ approċċ multilingwi bbażat fuq tagħlim trasduttiv tat-trasferiment għal kompitu storiku ta’ rikonoxximent tal-kitba tal-idejn fir-Reġistri Taljani tal-Komedy. Id-dekoder għandu jibni sekwenza ta’ karattri li tikkorrispondi għal kelma minn vettur ta’ ittri-ngrams. Bħala dejta ta’ tagħlim, ħolqu sett ġdid ta’ dejta minn riżorsi mhux sfruttati li jkopri l-istess dominju u perjodu tad-dejta Taljana tal-Komedy tagħna, kif ukoll riżorsi minn dominji, perjodi jew lingwi komuni. Aħna nkisbu Rata ta’ Rikonoxximent tal-Karatteri ta’ 97.42% u Rata ta’ Rikonoxximent tal-Kliem ta’ 86.57% fuq id-dejta tal-Komedija Taljana tagħna, minkejja kopertura lexikali ta’ 67% bejn id-dejta tal-Komedija Taljana u d-dejta tat-taħriġ. Dawn ir-riżultati juru li sistema effiċjenti tista’ tinkiseb permezz ta’ għa żla bir-reqqa tas-settijiet tad-dejta użati għat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment.', 'ml': 'Lack of data can be an issue when beginning a new study on historical handwritten documents.  ഇത് കൊണ്ട് നോക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, ഇറ്റാലിയന്\u200d കോമീഡി റെജിസ്റ്റര്\u200dസിലെ ചരിത്ര കൈഎഴുതുന്ന തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന പണിയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി പല ഭാഷകങ് അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയം ഒരു വെക്റ്റര്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, അപ്പോള്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്ത വിഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പുതിയ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നാം ഉണ്ടാക്കി. അത് നമ്മുടെ ഇറ്റാലിയന്\u200d കോമീഡി ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് 97.42% അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള വാക്കും 86.57% വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഇറ്റാലിയന്\u200d കോമീഡി ഡേറ്റായുള്ള വിവരങ ഈ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു മാറ്റം പഠിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിച്ച് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന', 'mn': 'Өгөгдлийн алдаа нь түүхийн гар бичсэн баримтуудын шинэ судалгааг эхлэхэд асуудал болно. Энэ талаар бодохын тулд бид Италийн Комеди Регистр дээр түүхийн гар бичилгээний хүлээн зөвшөөрөл суралцах сургалтын үндсэн олон хэлний арга замын хэсгийг илтгэдэг. Декодер нь захиа-нграмдын векторын нэг үгнэмтэй холбогдох хэмжээний дарааллыг бүтээх хэрэгтэй. Мэдээлэл сурах үед бид Италийн Комедийн өгөгдлийн хугацааны адилхан зорилго, цаг хугацааны мөн ижил зорилго, мөн нийтийн зорилго, цаг хугацааны болон хэлний нөөц бүтээгдэхүүнийг бүтээсэн. Бид 97.42% харьцааны танихын түвшин, 86.57% бидний Италийн Комедийн өгөгдлийн хувьд илэрхийлэл өгөгдлийн хувьд 67% болон сургалтын өгөгдлийн хоорондох лексикийн тухай мэдээллийг авдаг. Эдгээр үр дүнд шилжүүлэх сургалтын тулд хэрэглэгдсэн өгөгдлийн сангуудыг анхааралтай сонгож чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'Lipsa datelor poate fi o problemă la începerea unui nou studiu asupra documentelor istorice scrise de mână. Pentru a rezolva acest lucru, prezentăm partea decodorului bazat pe caractere dintr-o abordare multilingvă bazată pe învățarea transductivă a transferului pentru o sarcină istorică de recunoaștere a scrisului de mână pe Registrele Comediei Italiene. Decodorul trebuie să construiască o secvență de caractere care corespunde unui cuvânt dintr-un vector de litere-ngrams. Ca date de învățare, am creat un nou set de date din resurse neexploatate care acoperă același domeniu și perioadă a datelor comediei italiene, precum și resurse din domenii comune, perioade sau limbi. Obținem o rată de recunoaștere a caracterelor de 97,42% și o rată de recunoaștere a cuvintelor de 86,57% pe datele comediei italiene, în ciuda unei acoperiri lexicale de 67% între datele comediei italiene și datele de formare. Aceste rezultate arată că un sistem eficient poate fi obținut prin selectarea atentă a seturilor de date utilizate pentru învățarea transferului.', 'pl': 'Brak danych może stanowić problem przy rozpoczynaniu nowych badań nad historycznymi dokumentami ręcznie pisanymi. W tym celu przedstawiamy część dekodera opartego na postaciach wielojęzycznego podejścia opartego na transduktywnej nauce transferowej dla zadania rozpoznawania pisma historycznego na włoskich rejestrach komedii. Dekoder musi zbudować sekwencję znaków odpowiadającą słowu z wektora liter-ngramów. Jako dane uczące się stworzyliśmy nowy zestaw danych z niewykorzystanych zasobów, który obejmuje tę samą domenę i okres naszych danych Komedii Włoskiej, a także zasoby z popularnych domen, okresów lub języków. Uzyskujemy 97,42% współczynnik rozpoznawania znaków i 86,57% współczynnik rozpoznawania słów na naszych danych komedii włoskiej, pomimo zasięgu leksykalnego 67% między danymi komedii włoskiej a danymi treningowymi. Wyniki te pokazują, że efektywny system można uzyskać poprzez staranny dobór zbiorów danych wykorzystywanych do uczenia się transferowego.', 'no': 'Manglar data kan vera eit problem når ein ny studie startar på historisk handskriven dokument. For å handsama dette, presenterer vi den teiknbaserte dekoderdelen av ein fleirspråk tilnærming basert på transduktiv overskriving for ein historisk handskriftsoppgåve på italienske komedy registrer. Dekoderen må bygge ei rekkjefølgje teikn som tilsvarar ei ord frå ein vektor av bokstav- ngrammer. Som læring av data, oppretta vi ei ny dataset frå utbygde ressursar som dekkar samme domene og perioden av våre italianske komedy-data, og ressursar frå felles domene, periodar eller språk. Vi får eit 97,42% teiknkogningsrate og ein 86,57% ord-gjenkjenning på våre italianske komedy-data, selv om det er ein leksisk dekking av 67% mellom italianske komedy-data og opplæringsdata. Desse resultatene viser at eit effektivt system kan hentast ved å velja dei datasetta som vert brukte for å læra overføringar.', 'sv': 'Brist på data kan vara ett problem när man påbörjar en ny studie om historiska handskrivna dokument. För att hantera detta presenterar vi den karaktärsbaserade avkodningsdelen av ett flerspråkigt tillvägagångssätt baserat på transduktiv överföring inlärning för en historisk handstilsegenkänningsuppgift på italienska komediregister. Dekodaren måste bygga en sekvens av tecken som motsvarar ett ord från en vektor av bokstav-ngrams. Som inlärningsdata skapade vi en ny datauppsättning från outnyttjade resurser som täcker samma domän och period av våra italienska komedidata, samt resurser från gemensamma domäner, perioder eller språk. Vi får 97,42% Character Recognition Rate och 86,57% Word Recognition Rate på våra italienska komedidata, trots en lexikal täckning på 67% mellan italienska komedidata och träningsdata. Resultaten visar att ett effektivt system kan erhållas genom att noggrant välja de datauppsättningar som används för överföringsinlärningen.', 'sr': 'Nedostatak podataka može biti pitanje kada počne novu studiju o istorijskim rukopisnim dokumentima. Da bi se riješili ovoga, predstavljamo deo multijezičkog pristupa na osnovu učenja transduktivnog prijenosa za povijesni zadatak prepoznavanja rukopisa na italijanskim registrima komedija. Dekoder mora izgraditi sekvencu likova koja odgovara reèi iz vektora slova-ngrama. Kao podaci o učenju, stvorili smo novi set podataka iz neodređenih resursa koji pokrivaju iste domene i periode našeg italijanskog komedijskog podataka, kao i resurse iz zajedničkih domena, period a ili jezika. Dobili smo stopu prepoznavanja znakova 97,42% i stopu prepoznavanja riječi 86,57% na našim italijanskim komedijskim podacima, uprkos leksičkim pokrivanjem 67% između italijanskih podataka o komediji i podataka o obuci. Ovi rezultati pokazuju da se efikasni sistem može dobiti pažljivo odabrati datumske sete koje koriste za učenje transfer a.', 'so': 'Lacagta macluumaadku waxay noqon kartaa dhibaato marka aad bilowdo waxbarasho cusub oo ku saabsan dukumentiyada taariikhda. Si aan u qabsado waxan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qeyb ka mid ah codcodsiga qofka ku saleysan qaab luuqadaha kala duduwan oo ku saleysan barashada iskuullada dib u wareejinta ee taariikhda aqoonsiga gacanta ee diiwaangelinta Italian Comedy. Qordiyuhu waa in uu dhisaa xaraf isku mid ah oo ku habboon eray ka mid ah vector xaraf-ngrams. Sida lagu baranayo macluumaad cusub ayaannu ka abuurnay macluumaad cusub oo aan la sameyn, kaas oo ku daboolaya macluumaadkayaga arimaha la yidhaahdo Italian Comedy iyo sidoo kale resources ka soo baxay meelaha caadiga ah, xilliyada, ama luuqadaha. Dharka aqoonsashada oo 97.42% iyo 86.57% erayga aqoonsashada qiimaheeda ee data Italian Comedy, haba yeeshee qarsoodiga leksikal ah 67% u dhexeeya data iyo waxbarashada. Arrimahaas waxay muuqataa in aad si taxadar leh u dooran karto koorasyada waxbarashada la wareejiyo.', 'si': 'දත්ත නැති ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් අළුත් අධ්\u200dයානයක් පටන් ගන්න තියෙන්නේ අතිත්\u200dයාත් මේක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, අපි ඉතාලියානු කොමේඩි රිජිස්ටර්ස් වල ඉතාරික විදියට අතිහාසික විදියට අතිහාසික විදියට අතිහාසික වි ඩිකොඩර් අක්ෂර ක්\u200dරමයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ඕන. අක්ෂර- ngrams වෙක්ටර් වලින් වචනයට සම්බන්ධයි. අපි දත්ත ඉගෙන ගන්නේ අලුත් දත්ත සූදානයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැති උපකරණ වලින් අපේ ඉතාලියාන් කොමේඩි දත්ත, සහ සමාන්\u200dය ඩ අපිට 97.42% අක්ෂර ක්\u200dරියාක්ෂර ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ අවශ්\u200dයාවක් සහ 86.57% වචනය ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ අවශ්\u200dයාවක් තියෙනවා අපේ ඉතාලියානු කොමේඩි දත්තේ ඉන්තාලියාන මේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිපද්ධතියක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති', 'ta': 'வரலாற்று கையேடும் ஆவணங்களில் புதிய படிப்பை துவங்கும்போது தரவின் குறைவாக இருக்கலாம். இதைப் பற்றி தீர்க்க, நாம் எழுத்து அடிப்படையான குறியீட்டு பகுதியை காண்பிக்கிறோம் இத்தாலியன் காம்டி பதிவுகள் மீது வரலாற்று கையேடு அறிவிப குறியீட்டாளர் எழுத்துருவின் தொடர்ச்சியை உருவாக்க வேண்டும், அது எழுத்து- ங்கிராம் வெக்டாரில் இருந்து ஒரு வ படிக்கும் தகவல் போது, நாங்கள் திறக்கப்படாத வளங்களிலிருந்து புதிய தகவல் அமைப்பை உருவாக்கினோம். இது எங்கள் இத்தாலிய கோமிடி தரவை மற்றும் காலத்த நாங்கள் 97.42% எழுத்து அடையாளம் விகிதம் மற்றும் 86.57% வார்த்தை அறிந்து கொள்ள விகிதம் எங்கள் இத்தாலிய கோமீடி தகவல் மீது, இத்தாலிய காம்டி தகவல் மற்றும் பயிற் முடிவு', 'ur': '趫蹖俟丕 讴賲蹖 丕蹖讴 賲爻卅賱蹃 蹃賵 爻讴鬲蹖 蹃蹝 噩亘 鬲丕乇蹖禺蹖 蹃丕鬲诰 賱讴诰蹖 丿讴诰丕賳賵诤 讴蹝 亘丕乇蹝 賲蹖诤 賳卅蹖 鬲丨賯蹖賯 卮乇賵毓 讴乇鬲蹖 蹃蹝蹟 丕爻 讴蹝 亘丕乇蹝 賲蹖诤 蹃賲 丕蹖讴 賲鬲毓丿丿 夭亘丕賳 讴蹝 胤乇蹖賯蹝 讴蹝 毓賱丕卅賲 亘賳蹖丕丿蹖 丿诰賵趫乇 讴丕 丨氐蹃 倬蹖卮 讴乇鬲蹝 蹃蹖诤 噩賵 鬲丕乇蹖禺蹖 蹃丕鬲诰 賱讴诰賳蹝 讴蹝 賱卅蹝 鬲睾蹖蹖乇丕鬲 讴蹖 鬲毓賱蹖賲 讴蹝 匕乇蹖毓蹝 丕蹖讴 鬲丕乇蹖禺蹖 蹃丕鬲诰 賱讴诰賳蹝 讴蹝 賱卅蹝 丕蹖鬲丕賱蹖丕蹖蹖 讴賲趫蹖 乇丕噩爻鬲乇 讴蹝 匕乇蹖毓蹝 蹃蹝蹟 趫蹖讴賵趫乇 讴蹝 賱卅蹝 丕蹖讴 賱讴诰賳蹝 讴蹖 爻賮丕乇卮 蹃蹝 噩賵 丕蹖讴 賱讴诰賳蹝 賵丕賱蹖 賱讴诰賳蹝 賵丕賱蹖 賱讴诰賳蹝 賵丕賱蹖 賱讴诰賳蹝 賵丕賱蹖 賱讴诰賳蹝 賵丕賱蹖 賱讴诰賳蹝 賵丕賱蹖 蹃蹝. 蹃賲 賳蹝 趫丕俟丕 爻讴诰丕蹖丕 鬲诰丕貙 蹃賲 賳蹝 丕蹖讴 賳卅蹖 趫丕俟 爻俟 倬蹖丿丕 讴蹖 鬲诰蹖 噩賵 蹃賲丕乇蹝 丕蹖鬲丕賱蹖丕蹖蹖 讴賲趫蹖 趫丕俟丕 讴蹝 丿丕賲賳蹝 丕賵乇 丿賵賲蹖賳貙 Periodics貙 蹖丕 夭亘丕賳賵诤 爻蹝 丕蹖讴 丿賵賲蹖賳 趫賵賲蹖賳 丕賵乇 丿賵賲蹖賳 倬乇 倬賵乇蹝 蹃賵鬲蹝 蹃蹖诤蹟 蹃賲 賳蹝 97.42% 讴乇蹖俟乇 倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲倬鬲蹃 丕賵乇 86.57% 蹃賲丕乇蹝 丕蹖鬲丕賱蹖丕蹖蹖 讴賲趫蹖 趫蹖俟丕 倬乇貙 禺賵丕蹃 丕蹖鬲丕賱蹖丕蹖蹖 讴賲趫蹖 趫蹖 蹖蹃 賳鬲丕卅噩 丿讴诰丕鬲蹝 蹃蹖诤 讴蹃 丕蹖讴 賮毓丕賱蹖鬲 爻蹖爻鬲賲 讴賵 丕蹖讴 丿賯鬲 爻蹝 丕賳鬲賯丕賱 讴蹝 賱卅蹝 丕爻鬲毓賲丕賱 讴蹖丕 噩丕鬲丕 蹃蹝.', 'uz': "Name Buni boshqarish uchun biz Italyani Komedy Registratoriga tarixi qoʻllanmalarning tarixi qismini o'rganish asosida bir necha tildagi kodlash usulining qismini hosil qilamiz. Name As learning data, we created a new dataset from untapped resources that covers the same domain and period of our Italian Comedy data, as well as resources from common domains, periods, or languages.  Biz 97.42% belgilarni Tasdiqlash darajasi va 86.57% so'zni Italyaning Kamedya maʼlumotimiz haqida qiymatlashtirish darajasi bo'ladi, chunki Italyaning Kamedya maʼlumotlari va taʼminlovchi maʼlumotlar orasidagi 67% yozuvchi bo'lsa. Ushbu natijalar o'rganish uchun foydalanilgan maʼlumotlarni taqlid qilish uchun foydali tizimni olib tashlash mumkin.", 'vi': 'Thiếu dữ liệu có thể là vấn đề khi bắt đầu một nghiên cứu mới về tài liệu viết tay lịch sử. Để giải quyết chuyện này, chúng tôi giới thiệu phần giải mã nhân tạo của một phương pháp đa dạng dựa trên việc chuyển truyền dẫn học cho một nhiệm vụ nhận diện chữ viết trong lịch sử của các Sổ trình soạn nhạc Comedy Ý. Bộ giải mã phải xây dựng một chuỗi ký tự tương ứng với một từ từ từ của một cỗ máy đọc thư. Chúng tôi tạo ra một bộ dữ liệu mới từ các nguồn chưa khai thác bao gồm cùng một miền và thời gian của dữ liệu Cuộc thi hài Ý, cũng như nguồn lực từ các miền, thời tiết hay ngôn ngữ phổ biến. Chúng tôi nhận được tỉ lệ nhận dạng ký tự 97.2. và 86.57=. Từ recognition Rate on our Italian Comedy data, although a lexical coverage of 67. between the Italian Comedy data and the đào tạo data. Những kết quả này cho thấy một hệ thống có hiệu quả có thể được lấy bằng cách chọn cẩn thận các bộ dữ liệu dùng cho việc học chuyển nhượng.', 'bg': 'Липсата на данни може да бъде проблем при започване на ново проучване на исторически ръчно написани документи. За да се справим с това, представяме декодиращата част от многоезичен подход, базиран на трансдуктивно трансферно обучение за задача за разпознаване на исторически почерк в италианските комедийни регистри. Декодерът трябва да изгради последователност от знаци, която съответства на дума от вектор на буквени нграми. Като учебни данни създадохме нов набор от данни от неизползвани ресурси, който обхваща същия домейн и период на нашите данни за италианска комедия, както и ресурси от общи домейни, периоди или езици. Получаваме 97,42% процент на разпознаване на знаци и 86,57% процент на разпознаване на думи на нашите данни за италианска комедия, въпреки лексикалното покритие от 67% между данните за италианска комедия и данните за обучение. Тези резултати показват, че ефективна система може да бъде получена чрез внимателно подбор на наборите от данни, използвани за трансферното обучение.', 'da': 'Manglende data kan være et problem, når man starter en ny undersøgelse af historiske håndskrevne dokumenter. For at håndtere dette præsenterer vi den karakterbaserede dekoder del af en flersproget tilgang baseret på transduktiv overførselslæring til en historisk håndskriftsgenkendelsesopgave på italienske komedieregistere. Dekoderen skal opbygge en sekvens af tegn, der svarer til et ord fra en vektor af bogstav-ngrams. Som læringsdata skabte vi et nyt datasæt ud fra uudnyttede ressourcer, der dækker det samme domæne og periode af vores Italian Comedy data, samt ressourcer fra fælles domæner, perioder eller sprog. Vi opnår 97,42% Karaktergenkendelse Rate og 86,57% Ordgenkendelse Rate på vores Italian Comedy data, trods en leksikisk dækning på 67% mellem Italian Comedy data og træningsdata. Resultaterne viser, at et effektivt system kan opnås ved omhyggeligt at vælge de datasæt, der anvendes til overførselslæringen.', 'hr': 'Nedostatak podataka može biti pitanje kada počne novo ispitivanje o povijesnim rukopisnim dokumentima. Da bismo se riješili s tim, predstavljamo dio multijezičkog pristupa na osnovu učenja transduktivnog prijenosa za povijesni zadatak prepoznavanja rukopisa na italijanskim registrima komedija. Dekoder mora izgraditi sekvencu znakova koji odgovara riječi iz vektora slova-ngrama. Kao podaci o učenju, stvorili smo novi komplet podataka iz neodređenih resursa koji pokriva iste domene i razdoblje podataka italijanske komedije, kao i resursa iz zajedničkih domena, period a ili jezika. Dobili smo stopu prepoznavanja znakova 97,42% i stopu prepoznavanja riječi 86,57% na našim datovima italijanske komedije, uprkos leksičkim pokrivanjem 67% između podataka italijanske komedije i podataka o obuci. Ovi rezultati pokazuju da se učinkovit sustav može dobiti pažljivo odabrati podatke koje se koriste za učenje prijenosa.', 'id': 'Kekurangan data bisa menjadi masalah ketika memulai studi baru tentang dokumen tertulis tangan sejarah. Untuk menangani hal ini, kami mempersembahkan bagian dekoder berdasarkan karakter dari pendekatan multibahasa berdasarkan belajar transduktif transfer untuk tugas pengakuan tulisan tangan sejarah di Italian Comedy Registers. Dekoder harus membangun urutan karakter yang sesuai dengan kata dari vektor huruf-ngrams. Sebagai belajar data, kami menciptakan set data baru dari sumber daya yang tidak digunakan yang meliputi domain dan periode yang sama dari data Comedy Italia kami, serta sumber daya dari domain, periode, atau bahasa umum. Kami mendapatkan Rata Pengenalan Aksara 97,42% dan Rata Pengenalan Perkataan 86,57% pada data Komedi Italia kami, meskipun menutupi lexik 67% antara data Komedi Italia dan data latihan. Hasil ini menunjukkan bahwa sistem efisien dapat diperoleh dengan memilih dengan hati-hati dataset yang digunakan untuk belajar transfer.', 'ko': '역사 손으로 쓴 파일에 대한 새로운 연구를 시작할 때 데이터가 부족한 것이 문제일 수도 있다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 전환 학습을 바탕으로 하는 다국어 방법의 문자 기반 디코더 부분을 제시하여 이탈리아 코미디 레지스터의 역사적 핸드폰 식별 임무에 사용했다.디코더는 알파벳 벡터의 단어에 대응하는 문자 서열을 만들어야 한다.학습 데이터로서 우리가 개발하지 못한 자원에 새로운 데이터 집합을 만들었다. 이 자원들은 우리 이탈리아 코미디 데이터의 같은 분야와 시기, 그리고 공공 분야, 시기 또는 언어에서 온 자원을 포함한다.비록 이탈리아 코미디 데이터와 훈련 데이터 사이의 어휘 범위는 67%이지만 우리는 이탈리아 코미디 데이터에서 97.42%의 문자인식률과 86.57%의 단어인식률을 얻었다.이러한 결과는 이동 학습에 사용할 데이터 집합을 꼼꼼히 선택함으로써 효과적인 시스템을 얻을 수 있음을 나타낸다.', 'fa': 'فقدان داده\u200cها می\u200cتواند موضوع باشد وقتی یک مطالعه جدید در مورد سند\u200cهای تاریخی نوشته شده است. برای حل این کار، ما بخشی از طریق بسیاری از زبان\u200cهای زیادی را بر اساس یادگیری انتقال تغییرات تاریخی برای یک کار شناسایی دستی\u200cنوشته\u200cی تاریخی در ثبت\u200cنامه\u200cهای کمدی ایتالیایی را نشان می\u200cدهیم. دکوردر باید یک دسته از شخصیت\u200cها بسازد که با یک کلمه از یک vektor حرف\u200cانگرام متفاوت است. به عنوان داده\u200cهای یادگیری، ما یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید از منابع غیر محفوظه ایتالیایی ایتالیایی ایتالیایی ایتالیایی را ایجاد کردیم که همان دامنه\u200cای و دوره\u200cای از داده\u200cهای کمدی ایتالیایی ما را پوشش می\u200cدهد، همچن ما میزان شناسایی caracters 97.42% و میزان شناسایی کلمات 86.57% بر اطلاعات کمدی ایتالیایی ایتالیایی ما را دریافت می\u200cکنیم، با وجود حفاظت لیکسیک 67% بین داده\u200cهای کمدی ایتالیایی و داده\u200cهای آموزش. این نتایج نشان می دهند که یک سیستم موثرت می\u200cتواند با یک انتخاب دقتی از مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها برای یادگیری انتقال استفاده می\u200cشود.', 'sw': 'Ukosefu wa taarifa unaweza kuwa suala la kuanza utafiti mpya kuhusu nyaraka za kihistoria zilizoandikwa kwa mkono. In order to deal with this, we present the character-based decoder part of a multilingual approach based on transductive transfer learning for a historical handwriting recognition task on Italian Comedy Registers.  Kodi lazima kutengeneza mfululizo wa wahusika unaohusika na neno kutoka kwenye vector ya barua. Kama ilivyokuwa na taarifa za kujifunza, tulitengeneza taarifa mpya kutoka rasilimali zisizotumiwa zinazohusu maeneo hayo na kipindi hicho cha taarifa za Komedy za Italia, pamoja na rasilimali kutoka kwenye maeneo ya kawaida, period a, au lugha. Tumepata asilimia 97.42 ya Kutambua Sheria na kiwango cha Soma cha 86.57 cha asilimia 86.57 cha Kutambua kiwango cha Takwimu zetu za Kamedya ya Italia, pamoja na kuweka habari za kiukosefu wa asilimia 67 kati ya data za Kamedy ya Italia na data za mafunzo. Matokeo haya yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo mzuri unaweza kupatikana na kuchagua seti za data zinazotumiwa kwa ajili ya kujifunza.', 'nl': 'Gebrek aan gegevens kan een probleem zijn bij het starten van een nieuw onderzoek naar historische handgeschreven documenten. Om dit aan te pakken, presenteren we het karaktergebaseerde decodergedeelte van een meertalige aanpak gebaseerd op transductief overdrachtsleren voor een historische handschriftherkenning op Italiaanse Comedy Registers. De decoder moet een reeks tekens bouwen die overeenkomt met een woord uit een vector van letterngrams. Als leerdata hebben we een nieuwe dataset gemaakt van onbenutte bronnen die hetzelfde domein en dezelfde periode van onze Italiaanse Comedy-gegevens bestrijkt, evenals bronnen uit gemeenschappelijke domeinen, periodes of talen. We verkrijgen een 97,42% karakterherkenningsgraad en een 86,57% woordherkenningsgraad op onze Italiaanse komediegegevens, ondanks een lexicale dekking van 67% tussen de Italiaanse komediegegevens en de trainingsgegevens. Deze resultaten tonen aan dat een efficiënt systeem kan worden verkregen door zorgvuldig de datasets te selecteren die worden gebruikt voor het overdrachtsleren.', 'de': 'Datenmangel kann ein Problem beim Beginn einer neuen Studie zu historischen handschriftlichen Dokumenten sein. Um dies zu bewältigen, stellen wir den charakterbasierten Decoder-Teil eines mehrsprachigen Ansatzes vor, der auf transduktivem Transferlernen für eine historische Handschrifterkennung in italienischen Comedy Registern basiert. Der Decoder muss eine Zeichenfolge erstellen, die einem Wort aus einem Vektor von Buchstaben-ngrams entspricht. Als Lerndaten haben wir einen neuen Datensatz aus ungenutzten Ressourcen erstellt, der den gleichen Bereich und Zeitraum unserer italienischen Comedy-Daten sowie Ressourcen aus gemeinsamen Domänen, Perioden oder Sprachen abdeckt. Wir erhalten eine 97,42% Zeichenerkennungsrate und eine 86,57% Worterkennungsrate auf unseren italienischen Comedy-Daten, trotz einer lexikalischen Abdeckung von 67% zwischen den italienischen Comedy-Daten und den Trainingsdaten. Diese Ergebnisse zeigen, dass durch eine sorgfältige Auswahl der für das Transferlernen verwendeten Datensätze ein effizientes System erreicht werden kann.', 'tr': 'Maglumatyň ýetmesi geçmiş eliň ýazylan senedler barada täze bir okuw başlandygynda mesele bolup biler. Biz bu şekilde çözmek üçin karakterlere tabanly bir çoxlu dil taýýarlamanyň bir parçasyny italiýa komedi reģistrlarynda geçmiş el ýazma öwrenmesine dayanýarys. Bu dekoder, harf-ngramların vektöründen bir söze uygulamalıdır. Maglumatlary öwrenmek üçin, bireme sahypalarymyz, periyodlarymyz we dillerimiziň bir domain we periyodlarymyzdan täze bir veri setirini döredik. Biz 97.42% Karakter tanyş hasaplarymyz we 86.57% Karakter tanyş hasaplarymyzyň ýöne, italiýa birleşigi we eğitim maglumatymyzyň arasynda 67% läsiýet tapylýarys. Bu netijeler transfers öwrenmegi üçin ullanýan veri setirleri ünsli saýlamak üçin etkinlik sistemiň berilip biljegini görkez.', 'am': 'Lack of data can be an issue when beginning a new study on historical handwritten documents.  ለዚህ ለማስተካከል፣ በተባለው ታሪካዊ እጁን ጽሑፍ የሚያስተውል ስራ በኢጣሊያዊ ኮሜዲ ሪዝርዝር ላይ በተመሳሳይ የብዙ ቋንቋ ልዩ ቋንቋ አካባቢ ክፍል እናቀርባታለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ዳታ እንደተማርክ አዲስ ዳታዎችን ከመፍጠር ጀምር አፈጣጠርን፤ የኢጣሊያዊ ኮሜዲ ዳራዎችን እና በተለየ የውይይት ሀብት፣ ዘመናት ወይም ቋንቋዎች የሚኖረውን አዲስ ዳታተር አፈጣጠርን፡፡ በጣሊያንኛ ኮሜዲ ዳታ እና አስተማሪው ዳታዎችን መካከል 67 በመቶ የልኩስነኛ ክፍል ሲሆን የጣሊያንኛ ካምዶ ዳታ የሚያውቀው ቃላትን የሚያውቀው ቁጥር እና 86.57 በመቶ አግኝተናል፡፡ ይሄ ፍሬዎች ለመስጠት የተጠቃሚ ስርዓት የተደረገውን ዳታዎችን በመምረጥ በዝግታ እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'af': "Ontbrek van data kan 'n probleem wees wanneer 'n nuwe studie begin op historiese handskryfde dokumente. Om hierdie te behandel, voorsien ons die karakter-gebaseerde dekoderdeel van 'n multitaalske toegang gebaseer op transduktiewe oordrag leer vir 'n historiese handskryf herkening taak op Italiese Comedy Registers. Die dekoder moet 'n volgorde van karakters bou wat ooreenstem na 'n woord van' n vektor van letter- ngrams. As geleer data, skep ons 'n nuwe datastel van onverwerp hulpbronne wat die selfde domein en periode van ons Italiese Komedie data oordek, en hulpbronne van gemeenskaplike domeine, periode of tale. Ons kry 'n 97.42% Karakter-herkening tempo en 'n 86.57% Woord-herkening tempo op ons Italiese Komedie data, alhoewel 'n leksiese dekking van 67% tussen die Italiese Komedie-data en die onderwerp data. Hierdie resultate vertoon dat 'n effektief stelsel kan ontvang word deur 'n versigtig kies van die datastelle wat gebruik word vir die oordrag leer.", 'hy': 'Տվյալների բացակայությունը կարող է խնդիր լինել, երբ սկսում է պատմական ձեռքով գրված փաստաթղթերի նոր ուսումնասիրություն: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք բազլեզու մոտեցումների հիմնված բնավորության կոդավորման մասը, որը հիմնված է տեղափոխման միջոցով սովորելու համար պատմական ձեռքերի ճանաչելու խնդիր Իտալիական Կոմեդիայի Ռեժիստրերի համար: Դեկոդերը պետք է ստեղծի մի հաջորդականություն նշանների, որոնք համապատասխանում են նշանների-նշանների վեկտորից բառին: Որպես տվյալներ սովորելու համար, մենք ստեղծեցինք նոր տվյալներ անօգտագործված ռեսուրսներից, որոնք ներառում են մեր Իտալիական Կոմեդիայի տվյալների նույն ոլորտը և ժամանակահատվածը, ինչպես նաև ընդհանուր ոլորտների, ժամանակահատվածների կամ լե Մենք ստանում ենք 97.42 տոկոս բնորոշների ճանաչության և 86.57 տոկոս բառերի ճանաչության մակարդակ մեր Իտալիական կոմեդիայի տվյալների վրա, չնայած 67 տոկոսի լեքսիկական ծավալը Իտալիական կոմեդիայի տվյալների և ուսուցման տվյալների միջև: These results show that an efficient system can be obtained by a carefully selecting the datasets used for the transfer learning.', 'sq': 'Mungesa e të dhënave mund të jetë një çështje kur fillon një studim i ri mbi dokumentet historike të shkruara me dorë. Në mënyrë që të trajtojmë këtë, ne paraqesim pjesën e dekodimit bazuar në karakter të një qasje shumëgjuhëse bazuar në mësimin transduktiv të transferimit për një detyrë historike njohjeje dorëshkrimi në regjistrat italiane të Komedisë. Dekoduesi duhet të ndërtojë një sekuencë karakterësh që korrespondojnë me një fjalë nga një vektor letra-ngrams. Si mësim të dhënash, krijuam një grup të ri të dhënash nga burimet e papërdorura që mbulon të njëjtin domeni dhe periudhë të të dhënave tona të Komedisë Italiane, si dhe burime nga domeni, periudha apo gjuhë të përbashkëta. Ne marrim një normë 97.42% të njohjes së karaktereve dhe një normë 86.57% të njohjes së fjalëve në të dhënat tona të Komedisë Italiane, pavarësisht nga një mbulim lexik prej 67% midis të dhënave të Komedisë Italiane dhe të dhënave të trajnimit. Këto rezultate tregojnë se një sistem i efektshëm mund të arrihet duke zgjedhur me kujdes grupet e të dhënave të përdorura për mësimin e transferimit.', 'az': 'Məlumat yoxdur ki, tarihi əl yazılmış dökümələr barəsində yeni təhsil başladığında məsəl olar. Bununla çəkilmək üçün, İtalyan Comedy Registers üzerində tarixəli əl yazısı tanıma görevi üçün çoxlu dil tərəflərinin bir parçasını göstəririk. Dekoder səhifələr ngramların vektorundan bir sözlə uyğun bir karakter sequence inşa etməlidir. Öyrəndiyimiz məlumatlar kimi, istifadə edilməmiş kaynaqlardan və İtalyan Comedy məlumatlarının aynı domeini və periyodlarından istifadə edən yeni veri qurması yaratdıq. Biz 97.42% Karakter Recognition Rate və 86.57% Kelimlərin İtalyan Komedi məlumatlarımızın əlaqəsində təşkil edilməsi üçün, İtalyan Komedi məlumatları və təhsil məlumatları arasında 67% leksik örtüyünü alırıq. Bu növbətlər təkrar öyrənmək üçün istifadə edilən verilən qurma qurmaqlarını dikkatli seçən bir sistemin alınabilir.', 'bs': 'Nedostatak podataka može biti pitanje kada počne novo ispitivanje o istorijskim rukopisnim dokumentima. Da bi se s tim riješili, predstavljamo dio multijezičkog pristupa na osnovu učenja transduktivnog prijenosa za povijesni zadatak prepoznavanja rukopisa na italijanskim registrima komedija. Dekoder mora izgraditi sekvencu likova koja odgovara rijeci iz vektora slova-ngrama. Kao podaci o učenju, stvorili smo novi set podataka iz neodređenih resursa koji pokrivaju iste domene i periode našeg italijanskog komedijskog podataka, kao i resurse iz zajedničkih domena, period a ili jezika. Dobili smo stopu prepoznavanja znakova 97,42% i stopu prepoznavanja riječi 86,57% na našim italijanskim podacima o komediji, uprkos leksičkim pokrivanjem 67% između italijanskih podataka o komediji i podataka o obuci. Ovi rezultati pokazuju da se efikasni sistem može dobiti pažljivo odabrati podatke koje se koriste za učenje prijenosa.', 'bn': 'ঐতিহাসিক হাতে লিখিত নথিপত্রের নতুন গবেষণা শুরু করার সময় তথ্যের অভাব একটি বিষয় হতে পারে। ইতালিয়ান কমেডি রেজিস্টারের একটি ঐতিহাসিক হাতিলিখিত স্বীকৃতির কাজের উপর ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক কোডারের অংশের উপর ভিত্তিক একটি বহুভাষা ডেকোডার অবশ্যই একটি অক্ষর তৈরি করতে হবে যা একটি অক্ষরের কাছ থেকে একটি ভেক্টরের সাথে যোগ দেয়। আমাদের ইতালিয়ান কোমেডি ডাটা এবং সময় সম্পর্কে একই ধরনের ডোমেইন এবং সময় কাভার করে একটি নতুন তথ্য সৃষ্টি করেছি এবং একই সাথে সাধারণ ডোমেন, সময়স, ভাষ ইতালিয়ান কমিডি ডাটা ও প্রশিক্ষণের মধ্যে ৬৭% লেক্সিক কাভারেজের মধ্যে ৬৭% লেক্সিকাল কাভারেজ রয়েছে। এই ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে ট্রান্সফার্নার শিক্ষার জন্য ব্যবহৃত তথ্য নির্বাচনের কারণে কার্যকর সিস্টেম পাওয়া যাবে।', 'ca': "La falta de dades pot ser un problema al començar un nou estudi sobre documents històrics escrits a mà. Per tractar-se d'això, presentem la part de decodificació basada en caràcters d'un enfocament multilingüe basat en l'aprenentatge transdutiu de transfer ència per a una tasca històrica de reconeixement d'escriptura manual als registres italians de comèdia. El decodificador ha de construir una seqüència de caràcters que correspon a una paraula d'un vector de lletres-ngrams. Com a dades d'aprenentatge, vam crear un nou conjunt de dades a partir de recursos no utilitzats que cobreix el mateix domini i període de les nostres dades de la Comedia Italiana, com també recursos de dominis, períodes o llengües comuns. Obtenim una tasa de reconeixement de caràcters del 97,42% i una tasa de reconeixement de paraules del 86,57% en les nostres dades de comedia italiana, malgrat una cobertura lèxica del 67% entre les dades de comedia italiana i les dades d'entrenament. Aquests resultats demostren que un sistema eficient es pot obtenir seleccionant cuidadosament els conjunts de dades utilitzats per l'aprenentatge de transfer ència.", 'cs': 'Nedostatek dat může být problémem při zahájení nové studie historických ručně psaných dokumentů. Abychom se s tím vypořádali, představujeme část dekódování založené na znakách vícejazyčného přístupu založeného na transduktivním transferovém učení pro úlohu rozpoznávání historického rukopisu na italských komediálních registrech. Dekodér musí sestavit sekvenci znaků, která odpovídá slovu z vektoru písmen-ngramů. Jako učební data jsme vytvořili novou sadu dat z nevyužitých zdrojů, která pokrývá stejnou doménu a období našich dat italské komedie, stejně jako zdroje z běžných domén, period nebo jazyků. Na našich údajích o italské komedii získáváme 97,42% míru rozpoznávání znaků a 86,57% míru rozpoznávání slova, navzdory lexikálnímu pokrytí 67% mezi údaji o italské komedii a výcvikovými údaji. Tyto výsledky ukazují, že efektivní systém lze získat pečlivým výběrem datových sad použitých pro transferové učení.', 'et': 'Andmete puudumine võib olla probleem ajalooliste käsitsi kirjutatud dokumentide uue uuringu alustamisel. Sellega tegelemiseks tutvustame mitmekeelse lähenemisviisi iseloomupõhist dekooderit, mis põhineb transduktiivsel siirdeõppel ajaloolise käekirja tuvastamise ülesande jaoks Itaalia komöödiaregistrites. Dekooder peab looma tähemärkide jada, mis vastab tähemärkide vektorist pärit sõnale. Õppeandmetena lõime kasutamata ressurssidest uue andmekogumi, mis hõlmab meie Itaalia Komöödia andmete sama domeeni ja perioodi ning ressursse ühistest domeenidest, perioodidest või keeltest. Me saame 97,42% märgituvastuse määra ja 86,57% sõnatuvastuse määra Itaalia komöödia andmetel, vaatamata 67% leksikaalsele katvusele Itaalia komöödia andmete ja koolitusandmete vahel. Need tulemused näitavad, et tõhusa süsteemi saab saavutada siirdeõppes kasutatavate andmekogumite hoolika valimisega.', 'fi': 'Tietojen puute voi olla ongelma aloitettaessa uutta tutkimusta historiallisista käsin kirjoitetuista asiakirjoista. Tämän ratkaisemiseksi esittelemme hahmopohjaisen dekooderin osan monikielisestä lähestymistavasta, joka perustuu transduktiiviseen siirtooppimiseen historialliseen käsialan tunnistustehtävään italialaisissa komediarekistereissä. Dekooderin on rakennettava merkkisarja, joka vastaa kirjainmerkkien vektorin sanaa. Oppimistietona olemme luoneet uuden aineiston hyödyntämättömistä resursseista, jotka kattavat saman toimialueen ja ajanjakson kuin Italian Komedia data, sekä resursseja yhteisistä toimialueista, jaksoista tai kielistä. Saamme 97,42%:n merkkien tunnistusprosentin ja 86,57%:n sanantunnistusprosentin Italian Komedian tiedoista huolimatta siitä, että Italian Komedian ja harjoitustietojen välillä on 67%:n leksikaalinen kattavuus. Tulokset osoittavat, että tehokas järjestelmä voidaan saavuttaa valitsemalla huolellisesti siirtooppimiseen käytettävät aineistot.', 'sk': 'Pomanjkanje podatkov je lahko problem pri začetku nove študije o zgodovinskih ročno napisanih dokumentih. Za obravnavo tega predstavljamo dekodirni del večjezičnega pristopa, ki temelji na transduktivnem transfernem učenju za nalogo prepoznavanja zgodovinske pisave na italijanskih komedijskih registrih. Dekodir mora zgraditi zaporedje znakov, ki ustreza besedi iz vektorja črk ngramov. Kot učni podatki smo ustvarili nov nabor podatkov iz neizkoriščenih virov, ki zajema isto področje in obdobje naših italijanskih komedijskih podatkov ter vire iz skupnih domen, obdobij ali jezikov. Pridobimo 97,42-odstotno stopnjo prepoznavanja znakov in 86,57-odstotno stopnjo prepoznavanja besed na podatkih italijanske komedije, kljub 67-odstotni leksikalni pokritosti med podatki italijanske komedije in podatki o usposabljanju. Ti rezultati kažejo, da je učinkovit sistem mogoče doseči s skrbno izbiro naborov podatkov, ki se uporabljajo za prenosno učenje.', 'ha': "Ba'a zartar da data ba za ta kasance wani masu zartar da idan an fara wani lõkaci na takardun takardun kwanan nan da aka rubũta. In order to deal with this, we present the character-based decoder part of a multilingual approach based on transductive transfer learning for a historical handwriting recognition task on Italian Comedy Registers.  @ info: whatsthis Kama da za'a sani, mun sami wani danne na daban daga abincin da ba'a buɗe ba, wanda ke rufe daidai da kuma lokacin data na Comedy Italian, da kuma ruzukãta daga daidaita, ko da harshen. Tuna sami karatun Aƙatancin RaRate 97.42% da wata 86.57% QFontDatabase Haƙĩƙa waɗannan matsalar za'a nuna cewa an iya sãmu wata na'ura mai amfani da kwamfyuta don a sami tsarin da aka yi amfani da shi wa shirin motsi.", 'he': 'חוסר נתונים יכול להיות בעיה כשמתחילים מחקר חדש על מסמכים היסטוריים כתבים יד. כדי להתמודד עם זה, אנו מציגים את החלק המבוסס על אופיים של גישה רבת-שפותית מבוססת על לימוד העברה טרנסדוקטיבית עבור משימה זיהוי כתיבת יד היסטורית על רשומות קומדיה איטלקיים. הדיקודר חייב לבנות רצף של דמויות שמתאימות למילה מאוקטור של מכתבים. בתור נתונים ללמוד, יצרנו קבוצת נתונים חדשה משאבים לא משתמשים שמכסה את אותו התחום והתקופה של נתוני הקומדיה האיטלקית שלנו, כמו גם משאבים מתחומים, תקופות או שפות משותפים. אנחנו מקבלים מעצב זיהוי אופיינים 97.42% ועצב זיהוי מילים 86.57% על נתוני הקומדיה האיטלקית שלנו, למרות כיסוי לקסי של 67% בין נתוני הקומדיה האיטלקית לבין נתוני האימונים. התוצאות האלה מראות כי מערכת יעילה יכולה להשיג על ידי בחירה בזהירות של קבוצות נתונים שמשתמשים ללמוד ההעברה.', 'jv': 'Mangkin data iso ketahan mungkin isi mungkin nang mulai akeh mlaku nang kasulatan dadi. Digawe nggo nganggo kuwi, kita ngubah akeh basa ning caratar-basa ning multi-lengkang dadi sing basa supoyo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngerwih operasi manungsa manungsa nggawe basa sing rumangsa layan ning italian Komedy decoder In Learning data, we create a new dataset from untapped tools that Coves the same domain and period of the italian Komedy data, as as and source from Common domain, periods, or language. The first language is from Awakdhéwé ngênggunian caratar nêmên, ngêngêngêngêngêngêng caratar uwong ngêngêngêng ngêngêng wiharé italiano Komedy ngêngé awakdhéwé, lha mbok dhéwé ngêngêngêngé suwek caratar sampek section 6% terus kuwi ngêngêngêng kuw Rejaling iki dipontrol mengko sistem sing isa nggawe barang seneng dataset sing digawe kanggo ngilangno nggawe barang seneng pisan', 'bo': 'གནས་ཚུལ་མངོན་གསལ་ཞིག་ནི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་འགོ་འཛུགས་སྐབས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅིག འོན་ཀྱང་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ན། ང་ཚོས་རྨས་གཞི་ཡོད་པའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་གི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྐྱེས་འབྲི་ནི་ལ་ར སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་འདིས་ཡིག་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་མཐུན་པའི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་གི་གོ་རྟགས་ཤིག་བཟོ་དགོས་པ། As learning data, we created a new data set from untapped resources that covers the same domain and period of our Italian Comedy data, as well as resources from common domains, periods, or languages. ང་ཚོས་97.42% ཡིག་འབྲི་རྩོམ་མཁན་ཀྱི་ཚད་དང་ 86.57% ཡིག རྐྱེན་འབྲས་འདི་དག་ལ་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པའི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྐྱེལ་གྱིས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་བྱས་པར་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འགོད'}
{'en': 'SMHD : a Large-Scale Resource for Exploring Online Language Usage for Multiple Mental Health Conditions', 'fr': "SMHD\xa0: une ressource à grande échelle pour explorer l'utilisation de la langue en ligne pour de multiples problèmes de santé mentale", 'es': 'SMHD: un recurso a gran escala para explorar el uso del lenguaje en línea para múltiples afecciones de salud mental', 'pt': 'SMHD: um recurso em grande escala para explorar o uso de idiomas on-line para várias condições de saúde mental', 'ar': 'SMHD: مورد واسع النطاق لاستكشاف استخدام اللغة عبر الإنترنت لحالات الصحة العقلية المتعددة', 'ja': 'SMHD ：複数のメンタルヘルスコンディションのオンライン言語使用状況を探るための大規模リソース', 'zh': 'SMHD:求心理健康,在线言大资', 'ru': 'SMHD: Крупномасштабный Ресурс для Изучения Онлайн Использование Языка для Множественных Психических Состояний', 'hi': 'SMHD: एकाधिक मानसिक स्वास्थ्य स्थितियों के लिए ऑनलाइन भाषा उपयोग की खोज के लिए एक बड़े पैमाने पर संसाधन', 'ga': 'SMHD: Acmhainn Mhórscála chun Úsáid Teanga Ar Líne le hAghaidh Coinníollacha Meabhairshláinte Iolracha a Iniúchadh', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'SMHD: egy nagyméretű erőforrás az online nyelvhasználat feltárására többszörös mentális egészségügyi állapotok esetén', 'el': 'Ένας μεγάλης κλίμακας πόρος για την εξερεύνηση της διαδικτυακής χρήσης γλωσσών για πολλαπλές ψυχικές συνθήκες υγείας', 'it': "SMHD: una risorsa su larga scala per esplorare l'uso del linguaggio online per molteplici condizioni di salute mentale", 'kk': 'SMHD: Бірнеше мәзірдегі саулық шарттарының онлайн тіл пайдалануын зерттеу үшін үлкен масштабтау ресурсы', 'lt': 'SMHD: a Large-Scale Resource for Exploring Online Language Usage for Multiple Mental Health Conditions', 'mk': 'SMHD: голем ресурс за истражување на онлајн јазик за користење на повеќе ментални здравствени услови', 'ms': 'SMHD: a Large-Scale Resource for Exploring Online Language Usage for Multiple Mental Health Conditions', 'ml': 'SMHD: ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഭാഷ പരിശോധിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വലിയ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'SMHD: Riżorsa fuq skala kbira għall-Esplorazzjoni tal-Użu tal-Lingwa Online għal Kundizzjonijiet Multipli tas-Saħħa Mentali', 'mn': 'SMHD: олон сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн нөхцөлд онлайн хэл хэрэглээний судалгаанд том хэмжээний нөөц', 'sr': 'SMHD: velika skala resursa za istraživanje korištenja online jezika za višestruke stanje mentalnog zdravlja', 'no': 'SMHD: ein stor skala ressurs for utforsking av nettspråkbruk for fleire menneskelige helseforhold', 'pl': 'SMHD: wielkoskalowy zasób do badania wykorzystania języka online w wielu warunkach zdrowia psychicznego', 'ro': 'SMHD: o resursă la scară largă pentru explorarea utilizării limbajului online pentru condiții multiple de sănătate mintală', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'SMHD: A Large-Scale Source for Exploring Online Language Usage for Multiple Health Mental Conditions', 'sv': 'SMHD: en storskalig resurs för att utforska språkanvändning online för flera psykiska tillstånd', 'ta': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'ur': 'SMHD', 'uz': 'SMHD: Online tilni ajratish uchun katta- oʻlchami manbasi', 'vi': 'SMHD: Một nguồn phát triển lớn cho việc tìm hiểu ngôn ngữ trực tuyến cho nhiều điều kiện sức khỏe tinh thần.', 'nl': 'SMHD: een grootschalige bron voor het verkennen van online taalgebruik voor meerdere psychische gezondheidsaandoeningen', 'bg': 'Голям ресурс за изследване на онлайн езиковата употреба при множество психични заболявания', 'da': 'SMHD: en stor ressource til at udforske online sprogbrug for flere psykiske sundhedsforhold', 'de': 'SMHD: eine umfangreiche Ressource zur Erforschung der Online-Sprachverwendung für multiple psychische Erkrankungen', 'ko': 'SMHD: 온라인 언어에서 사용할 수 있는 다양한 심리적 건강 상태를 위한 대규모 리소스 탐색', 'hr': 'SMHD: velika skala resursa za istraživanje korištenja online jezika za višestruke stanja mentalnog zdravlja', 'id': 'SMHD: Sumber Skala Besar untuk Menjelas Penggunaan Bahasa Online untuk Multiple Mental Health Conditions', 'tr': 'SMHD: 횉oklu Mental Saglyk Durumlar 체챌in Online Dili Ta첵첵arlamak 체챌in Ullakan Ressurat', 'sw': 'SMHD: Rasilimali kubwa kwa ajili ya Utumiaji wa Lugha ya Mtandaoni kwa Hali ya Afya Zaidi', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'SMHD: یک منابع مقیاس بزرگ برای تحقیق استفاده از زبان آنلاین برای شرایط سلامت متعدد Mental', 'sq': 'SMHD: një burim në shkallë të madhe për eksplorimin e përdorimit të gjuhës në internet për kushtet e shumëfishtë të shëndetit mental', 'am': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'hy': 'SMHD: Մեծ մասշտաբ ռեսուրսը ցանցային լեզուների ուսումնասիրելու համար, որը օգտագործվում է բազմաթիվ հոգեկան առողջապահության պայմաններում', 'az': 'SMHD: çoxlu Mental Sağlığı Şərfələri üçün Online Dil Qullanılması üçün böyük ölçülü Ressource', 'bs': 'SMHD: velika skala resursa za istraživanje korištenja online jezika za višestruke stanja mentalnog zdravlja', 'bn': 'SMHD: a Large-Scale Resource for Exploring Online Language Usage for Multiple Mental Health Conditions', 'et': 'SMHD: laiaulatuslik ressurss online keele kasutamise uurimiseks mitmete vaimse tervise seisundite korral', 'cs': 'SMHD: rozsáhlý zdroj pro zkoumání online jazykového využití pro více duševních zdravotních stavů', 'ca': "SMHD: Un recurso a gran escala per explorar l'ús en línia de llenguatges per a condicions de salut mental múltiples", 'fi': 'SMHD: laajamittainen resurssi Internetin kielen käytön tutkimiseen useissa mielenterveysolosuhteissa', 'jv': 'SMHT: a big-scale Resolute kanggo Kebebasan online Language Utilisi kanggo Multiple Menal Sans kondision', 'sk': 'SMHD: obsežni vir za raziskovanje spletne uporabe jezika za več duševnih bolezni', 'he': 'SMHD: משאב במידה גדולה לחקור שימוש בשפה באינטרנט עבור תנאי בריאות נפשיים רבים', 'ha': '@ item license', 'bo': 'SMHD: Online Language Usage for Multiple Mental Health Conditions'}
{'en': 'Mental health is a significant and growing public health concern. As language usage can be leveraged to obtain crucial insights into mental health conditions, there is a need for large-scale, labeled, mental health-related datasets of users who have been diagnosed with one or more of such conditions. In this paper, we investigate the creation of high-precision patterns to identify self-reported diagnoses of nine different mental health conditions, and obtain high-quality labeled data without the need for manual labelling. We introduce the SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) dataset and make it available. SMHD is a novel large dataset of social media posts from users with one or multiple mental health conditions along with matched control users. We examine distinctions in users’ language, as measured by linguistic and psychological variables. We further explore text classification methods to identify individuals with mental conditions through their language.', 'ar': 'الصحة النفسية هي مصدر قلق كبير ومتزايد للصحة العامة. نظرًا لأنه يمكن الاستفادة من استخدام اللغة للحصول على رؤى حاسمة حول حالات الصحة العقلية ، فهناك حاجة إلى مجموعات بيانات واسعة النطاق ومُصنفة وذات صلة بالصحة العقلية للمستخدمين الذين تم تشخيصهم بواحد أو أكثر من هذه الحالات. في هذه الورقة ، نحقق في إنشاء أنماط عالية الدقة لتحديد التشخيصات المبلغ عنها ذاتيًا لتسع حالات صحية عقلية مختلفة ، والحصول على بيانات ذات تصنيف عالي الجودة دون الحاجة إلى وضع العلامات اليدوية. نقدم مجموعة بيانات SMHD (تشخيصات الصحة العقلية المبلغ عنها ذاتيًا) ونجعلها متاحة. SMHD عبارة عن مجموعة بيانات كبيرة جديدة من منشورات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي من مستخدمين يعانون من حالة صحية عقلية واحدة أو عدة حالات إلى جانب مستخدمي التحكم المتطابقين. ندرس الفروق في لغة المستخدمين مقاسة بالمتغيرات اللغوية والنفسية. نستكشف أيضًا طرق تصنيف النص لتحديد الأفراد الذين يعانون من حالات عقلية من خلال لغتهم.', 'es': 'La salud mental es un problema de salud pública importante y creciente. Dado que se puede aprovechar el uso del idioma para obtener información crucial sobre las condiciones de salud mental, se necesitan conjuntos de datos a gran escala, etiquetados y relacionados con la salud mental de los usuarios a los que se les ha diagnosticado una o más de estas afecciones. En este artículo, investigamos la creación de patrones de alta precisión para identificar diagnósticos autoinformados de nueve afecciones de salud mental diferentes y obtener datos etiquetados de alta calidad sin necesidad de etiquetado manual. Presentamos el conjunto de datos SMHD (diagnósticos de salud mental autorreportados) y lo ponemos a disposición. SMHD es un novedoso conjunto de datos grande de publicaciones en redes sociales de usuarios con una o varias afecciones de salud mental junto con usuarios de control coincidentes. Examinamos las distinciones en el idioma de los usuarios, medidas por variables lingüísticas y psicológicas. Además, exploramos los métodos de clasificación de textos para identificar a las personas con enfermedades mentales a través de su idioma.', 'fr': "La santé mentale est une préoccupation de santé publique importante et croissante. Comme l'utilisation de la langue peut être mise à profit pour obtenir des informations cruciales sur les problèmes de santé mentale, il est nécessaire de disposer d'ensembles de données étiquetés à grande échelle sur la santé mentale des utilisateurs qui ont reçu un diagnostic d'une ou de plusieurs de ces affections. Dans cet article, nous étudions la création de modèles de haute précision pour identifier les diagnostics autodéclarés de neuf problèmes de santé mentale différents et obtenir des données étiquetées de haute qualité sans avoir besoin d'un étiquetage manuel. Nous introduisons le jeu de données SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) et le rendons disponible. SMHD est un nouveau grand ensemble de données de publications sur les réseaux sociaux provenant d'utilisateurs souffrant d'un ou de plusieurs problèmes de santé mentale ainsi que d'utilisateurs témoins correspondants. Nous examinons les distinctions dans la langue des utilisateurs, telles que mesurées par des variables linguistiques et psychologiques. Nous explorons également les méthodes de classification des textes pour identifier les personnes souffrant de troubles mentaux grâce à leur langage.", 'pt': 'A saúde mental é uma preocupação significativa e crescente de saúde pública. Como o uso da linguagem pode ser aproveitado para obter informações cruciais sobre condições de saúde mental, há a necessidade de conjuntos de dados relacionados à saúde mental em larga escala e rotulados de usuários que foram diagnosticados com uma ou mais dessas condições. Neste artigo, investigamos a criação de padrões de alta precisão para identificar diagnósticos autorrelatados de nove diferentes condições de saúde mental e obter dados rotulados de alta qualidade sem a necessidade de rotulagem manual. Apresentamos o conjunto de dados SMHD (Diagnósticos de Saúde Mental Auto-relatados) e o disponibilizamos. O SMHD é um novo grande conjunto de dados de postagens de mídia social de usuários com uma ou várias condições de saúde mental, juntamente com usuários de controle correspondentes. Examinamos as distinções na linguagem dos usuários, medidas por variáveis linguísticas e psicológicas. Exploramos ainda métodos de classificação de texto para identificar indivíduos com problemas mentais por meio de sua linguagem.', 'ja': 'メンタルヘルスは、公衆衛生上重要で増大している懸念事項です。言語の使用は、メンタルヘルス状態に関する重要な洞察を得るために利用され得るため、そのような状態のうちの１つ以上と診断されたユーザーの大規模でラベル付けされたメンタルヘルス関連データセットが必要である。本稿では， 9つの異なる精神衛生状態の自己報告診断を特定し，手動ラベリングを必要とせずに高品質のラベリングデータを得るための高精度パターンの作成について検討する． SMHD （ Self - reported Mental Health Diagnoses ）データセットを紹介し、利用可能にします。SMHDは、マッチングしたコントロールユーザーと共に、1つまたは複数の精神状態のユーザーからのソーシャルメディア投稿の新規の大きなデータセットです。私たちは、言語的および心理的変数によって測定される、ユーザーの言語における区別を検討します。さらに、言語を通じて精神疾患を持つ個人を識別するためのテキスト分類方法を探求します。', 'hi': 'मानसिक स्वास्थ्य एक महत्वपूर्ण और बढ़ती सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य चिंता है। चूंकि मानसिक स्वास्थ्य स्थितियों में महत्वपूर्ण अंतर्दृष्टि प्राप्त करने के लिए भाषा के उपयोग का लाभ उठाया जा सकता है, इसलिए उन उपयोगकर्ताओं के बड़े पैमाने पर, लेबल, मानसिक स्वास्थ्य से संबंधित डेटासेट की आवश्यकता होती है, जिन्हें ऐसी स्थितियों में से एक या अधिक का निदान किया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम नौ अलग-अलग मानसिक स्वास्थ्य स्थितियों के स्व-रिपोर्ट किए गए निदान की पहचान करने के लिए उच्च-परिशुद्धता पैटर्न के निर्माण की जांच करते हैं, और मैनुअल लेबलिंग की आवश्यकता के बिना उच्च गुणवत्ता वाले लेबल डेटा प्राप्त करते हैं। हम SMHD (स्व-रिपोर्ट किए गए मानसिक स्वास्थ्य निदान) डेटासेट को पेश करते हैं और इसे उपलब्ध कराते हैं। SMHD मिलान नियंत्रण उपयोगकर्ताओं के साथ एक या कई मानसिक स्वास्थ्य स्थितियों के साथ उपयोगकर्ताओं से सोशल मीडिया पोस्ट का एक उपन्यास बड़ा डेटासेट है। हम उपयोगकर्ताओं की भाषा में भेद की जांच करते हैं, जैसा कि भाषाई और मनोवैज्ञानिक चर द्वारा मापा जाता है। हम आगे अपनी भाषा के माध्यम से मानसिक स्थितियों वाले व्यक्तियों की पहचान करने के लिए पाठ वर्गीकरण विधियों का पता लगाते हैं।', 'ru': 'Психическое здоровье является серьезной и растущей проблемой общественного здравоохранения. Поскольку использование языка может быть использовано для получения критически важной информации о состоянии психического здоровья, существует потребность в крупномасштабных, маркированных, связанных с психическим здоровьем наборах данных пользователей, у которых было диагностировано одно или несколько таких состояний. В этой статье мы исследуем создание высокоточных шаблонов для выявления саморегистрируемых диагнозов девяти различных состояний психического здоровья и получения высококачественных маркированных данных без необходимости ручной маркировки. Мы вводим набор данных SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnosis) и делаем его доступным. SMHD - это новый большой набор данных постов в социальных сетях от пользователей с одним или несколькими состояниями психического здоровья наряду с соответствующими контрольными пользователями. Мы изучаем различия в языке пользователей, измеряемые лингвистическими и психологическими переменными. Мы далее изучаем методы классификации текста для идентификации людей с психическими расстройствами через их язык.', 'zh': '精神卫生者,大而日甚之公共卫生也。 可以言用得心理健康,故有大用户于诊候,大关心理健康数。 于本文中,研高精度模式之创,以识九心理健康之自告,并得高质量之标数,而无手动标记。 余言SMHD(自言心理健康诊)数集而可用。 SMHD是一新大社交媒体帖数集,自一心数健康状况用户及匹配对照用户。 检用户言语之异,以言心变量量之。 更探文本分类方法,以识精神疾病之个体。', 'ga': 'Is ábhar imní suntasach don tsláinte phoiblí í meabhairshláinte atá ag dul i méid. Toisc gur féidir úsáid teanga a ghiaráil chun léargais ríthábhachtacha a fháil ar riochtaí meabhairshláinte, tá gá le tacair shonraí ar scála mór, lipéadaithe a bhaineann le meabhairshláinte, d’úsáideoirí ar diagnóisíodh go raibh ceann amháin nó níos mó de na riochtaí sin orthu. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid imscrúdú ar chruthú patrúin ardchruinneas chun diagnóisí féin-thuairiscithe de naoi riocht meabhairshláinte éagsúla a aithint, agus sonraí lipéadaithe ardchaighdeáin a fháil gan gá le lipéadú láimhe. Cuirimid an tacar sonraí SMHD (Fáthmheasúnú Meabhairshláinte Féin-thuairiscithe) isteach agus cuirimid ar fáil é. Is tacar sonraí mór nua é SMHD de phoist meán sóisialta ó úsáideoirí a bhfuil riocht meabhairshláinte amháin nó níos mó acu mar aon le húsáideoirí rialaithe comhoiriúnaithe. Scrúdaímid idirdhealaithe i dteanga úsáideoirí, arna dtomhas ag athróga teanga agus síceolaíochta. Déanaimid iniúchadh breise ar mhodhanna aicmithe téacs chun daoine aonair a bhfuil riochtaí meabhrach orthu a shainaithint trína dteanga.', 'ka': 'მენტალური ჯანმრთელობა მნიშვნელოვანი და განვითარებული ადამიანის ჯანმრთელობა. რადგან ენის გამოყენება შეიძლება გავაკეთება საკუთარ მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაციების შესახებ, არსებობს უფრო დიდი მაგალითი, ნიშვნელოვანი, მენტიკური ჯანმრთელოვანი მომხმარების მონაცემების მონაც ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ შევხედავთ, რომელიც უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი შაბლოების შექმნის შექმნა, რომ განსაზღვრება სახლა განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრებული 9 განსხვავებული ფექციალური სიცოცხლეების განსა ჩვენ SMHD (სახელსაწინო მენტალური ჯანდართის დიაგნოზები) მონაცემების სახელსაწინო და დავწყებთ. Name ჩვენ მომხმარებლის ენაში განსხვავებების განსხვავება, როგორც ლინგურისტიკური და ფსიკოლოგიური განსხვავებებით განსხვავებული. ჩვენ შემდეგ ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის მეტოვები განვიცნობით ადამიანები, რომლებიც მათი ენაზე მეტიკური შესახებ განვიცნობით.', 'el': 'Η ψυχική υγεία αποτελεί σημαντική και αυξανόμενη ανησυχία για τη δημόσια υγεία. Δεδομένου ότι η χρήση γλώσσας μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί για την απόκτηση κρίσιμων πληροφοριών σχετικά με τις συνθήκες ψυχικής υγείας, υπάρχει ανάγκη για μεγάλης κλίμακας, επισημασμένα, σχετικά με την ψυχική υγεία σύνολα δεδομένων χρηστών που έχουν διαγνωστεί με μία ή περισσότερες από αυτές τις καταστάσεις. Στην παρούσα εργασία, διερευνούμε τη δημιουργία προτύπων υψηλής ακρίβειας για τον προσδιορισμό των αυτοαναφερθέντων διαγνώσεων εννέα διαφορετικών παθήσεων ψυχικής υγείας και την απόκτηση δεδομένων υψηλής ποιότητας με ετικέτα χωρίς την ανάγκη χειροκίνητης επισήμανσης. Εισάγουμε το σύνολο δεδομένων και το κάνουμε διαθέσιμο. Το SMHD είναι ένα νέο μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων δημοσιεύσεων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης από χρήστες με μία ή πολλαπλές ψυχικές παθήσεις μαζί με τους αντίστοιχους χρήστες ελέγχου. Εξετάζουμε τις διακρίσεις στη γλώσσα των χρηστών, όπως μετρώνται από γλωσσικές και ψυχολογικές μεταβλητές. Εξετάζουμε περαιτέρω μεθόδους ταξινόμησης κειμένων για τον εντοπισμό ατόμων με ψυχικές παθήσεις μέσω της γλώσσας τους.', 'hu': 'A mentális egészség jelentős és egyre növekvő közegészségügyi problémát jelent. Mivel a nyelvhasználat alapvető fontosságú betekintést nyerhet a mentális egészségügyi állapotokba, nagyszabású, címkézett, mentális egészségügyi adatokra van szükség azokról a felhasználókról, akiknek egy vagy több ilyen állapotot diagnosztizáltak. Jelen tanulmányban nagy pontosságú minták létrehozását vizsgáljuk kilenc különböző mentális egészségügyi állapot önjelentett diagnózisának azonosítására, és kiváló minőségű címkézett adatokat gyűjtünk manuális címkézés nélkül. Bemutatjuk és elérhetővé tesszük az SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) adatkészletet. Az SMHD egy új, nagy adatkészlet a közösségi média bejegyzésekből, amelyek egy vagy több mentális egészségügyi állapotban szenvedő felhasználóktól származnak, illetve amelyek megfelelnek a kontrollfelhasználóknak. Vizsgáljuk a felhasználók nyelvi és pszichológiai változókkal mért különbségeket. Továbbá vizsgáljuk a szövegosztályozási módszereket, hogy azonosítsuk a mentális állapotokkal küzdő egyéneket a nyelvükön keresztül.', 'kk': 'Мысалық саулық - көпшілік саулық көбірек. Тілдерді қолдану үшін психикалық саулық шарттарына маңызды түсініктерді алу үшін көп маңызды, белгіленген, психикалық саулық мәліметтерінің бір не бірнеше шарттармен диагностикацияланған пайдаланушылардың деректер жи Бұл қағазда біз 9 әртүрлі психикалық саулық шарттарын анықтау үшін көңіл дәрежелерді құру үшін зерттеп, қолмен белгілеу қажеттілмеген деректердің жоғары сапасы бар. Біз SMHD деректерді (өзімізге хабарлаған Mental Health диагнозы) келтіріп, оны қол жеткізуге болады. SMHD - бір немесе бірнеше психикалық саулық шарттары бар пайдаланушылардың социалдық медиа жіберіліктерінің романы. Біз пайдаланушылардың тілінде, лингвистикалық және психологикалық айнымалылықтар бойынша өлшемімізді тексереміз. Біз мәтін классификациялау әдістерін тілдері арқылы адамдарды психикалық шарттарды анықтау үшін анықтаймыз.', 'it': "La salute mentale è una preoccupazione significativa e crescente per la salute pubblica. Poiché l'uso della lingua può essere sfruttato per ottenere informazioni cruciali sulle condizioni di salute mentale, è necessario disporre di set di dati su larga scala, etichettati, relativi alla salute mentale degli utenti a cui è stata diagnosticata una o più di tali condizioni. In questo articolo, esaminiamo la creazione di modelli di alta precisione per identificare diagnosi auto-segnalate di nove diverse condizioni di salute mentale e ottenere dati etichettati di alta qualità senza la necessità di etichettatura manuale. Introducemo il set di dati SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) e lo rendiamo disponibile. SMHD è un nuovo grande set di dati di post sui social media da utenti con una o più condizioni di salute mentale insieme a utenti di controllo abbinati. Esaminiamo le distinzioni nella lingua degli utenti, misurate da variabili linguistiche e psicologiche. Esploriamo ulteriormente i metodi di classificazione del testo per identificare gli individui con condizioni mentali attraverso il loro linguaggio.", 'lt': 'Mentalinė sveikata yra didelė ir auganti visuomenės sveikatos problema. Kadangi kalbos naudojimas gali būti naudojamas siekiant įgyti esminį supratimą apie psichikos sveikatos sąlygas, reikia didelio masto, pažymėtų, su psichikos sveikata susijusių naudotojų duomenų rinkinių, kuriems diagnozuota viena ar daugiau tokių ligų. Šiame dokumente tiriame aukšto tikslumo modelių sukūrimą, siekiant nustatyti savarankiškai praneštas devynių skirtingų psichikos sveikatos sąlygų diagnozes ir gauti aukštos kokybės paženklintus duomenis be rankinio ženklinimo poreikio. Pateikiame SMHD (Saviregistruojamos psichikos sveikatos diagnozės) duomenų rinkinį ir jį paskelbiame prieinamu. SMHD yra naujas didelis socialinių žiniasklaidos postų rinkinys iš naudotojų, turinčių vieną ar kelis psichikos sveikatos sutrikimus, kartu su atitinkamais kontrolės naudotojais. Mes nagrinėjame skirtumus naudotojų kalba, matuojamus pagal kalbinius ir psichologinius kintamuosius. Toliau tiriame tekstų klasifikavimo metodus asmenims, sergantiems psichikos būklėmis, nustatyti jų kalba.', 'ml': 'മാനസിക ആശ്വാസവും വളരെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സുഖവുമാണ്. ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d മാനസികമായ ആശ്വാസത്തിലേക്ക് കിട്ടാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നതിനായി ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ടാ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് സ്വയം റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്ത 9 വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മാനസികാരോഗ്യത്തിന്റെ നിരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നതിന നമ്മള്\u200d SMHD (സ്വയം റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്ത മാന്ത്രിക ആശ്വാസ്ത്രിക്കുന്ന ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് പരി SMHD ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസേറ്റ് സാമൂഹ്യ മീഡിയ പോസ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ഒരു അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഒരു മാനസിക സ്വാ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, ഭാഷക്കാരും മൈക്കോളജിക്കല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d മു മാനസിക അവസ്ഥയുള്ള വ്യക്തികളെ അവരുടെ ഭാഷയിലൂടെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന', 'mk': 'Mental health is a significant and growing public health concern. Бидејќи употребата на јазикот може да се искористи за да се добијат клучни сфаќања за менталните здравствени услови, постои потреба од големи, обележани, ментално здравствени податоци на корисниците кои се дијагнозирани со една или повеќе од ваквите услови. Во овој весник, го истражуваме создавањето на модели со висока прецизност за идентификување на самопројавени дијагнози на девет различни ментални здравствени услови и добивање на висококвалитетни означени податоци без потреба од рачни означувања. Ги претставуваме податоците на СМХД (Самообјавени Дијагнози за ментално здравје) и ги направиме достапни. СМХД е нов голем набор на податоци за постови на социјалните медиуми од корисниците со еден или повеќе ментални услови заедно со соодветните контролни корисници. Ги проверуваме разликите на јазикот на корисниците, мерени со јазички и психолошки променливи. Понатаму ги истражуваме методите на класификација на текст за идентификување на поединци со ментални услови преку нивниот јазик.', 'ms': 'Kesehatan mental merupakan masalah kesehatan awam yang berkembang dan berkembang. Sebab penggunaan bahasa boleh digunakan untuk mendapatkan pandangan penting dalam keadaan kesehatan mental, ada kebutuhan untuk set data berkaitan dengan kesehatan mental yang skala besar, ditabel, pengguna yang telah dijanjosi dengan salah satu atau lebih keadaan tersebut. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki penciptaan corak ketepatan tinggi untuk mengenalpasti diagnosis-laporan diri 9 keadaan kesehatan mental yang berbeza, dan mendapatkan data labeled kualiti tinggi tanpa perlukan label manual. Kami perkenalkan set data SMHD (Diagnosis Kesehatan Mental Dilaporkan Sendiri) dan membuatnya tersedia. SMHD is a novel large dataset of social media posts from users with one or multiple mental health conditions along with matched control users.  Kami memeriksa perbezaan dalam bahasa pengguna, seperti diukur oleh pembolehubah bahasa dan psikologi. We further explore text classification methods to identify individuals with mental conditions through their language.', 'mn': 'Mental health is an important and growing public health concern. Хүмүүсийн хэрэглээ сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн нөхцөлд чухал оюун ухаан олж чадах боломжтой учраас маш том хэмжээний, тэмдэглэгдсэн, сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн хэрэглэгчийн нэг эсвэл олон нөхцөлд оногдсон хэрэглэ Энэ цаасан дээр бид өөрсдийгөө мэдрэлийн эрүүл мэндийн нөхцөл байдлыг тодорхойлдохын тулд өндөр тодорхой хэлбэрийн бүтээгдэхүүнийг судалж, гарын маркингүйгээр өндөр чанартай өгөгдлийг авах хэрэгтэй. Бид SMHD (Өөрөөр мэдээллийн эрүүл мэндийн диагноз) өгөгдлийг танилцуулж, үүнийг ашиглаж чадна. SMHD бол нэг эсвэл олон сэтгэл санааны эрүүл мэндийн нөхцөлтэй хэрэглэгчидтэй хамт нийгмийн мэдээллийн нийтлэл хуудас юм. Бид хэрэглэгчийн хэл дээр ялгааг судалж, хэлний, психологийн өөрчлөлтүүд хэмжээтэй. Бид өөрсдийн хэл дээр сэтгэл санааны нөхцөл байдлыг тодорхойлох текст хуваалцах арга замыг судалж байна.', 'pl': 'Zdrowie psychiczne jest istotnym i rosnącym problemem zdrowia publicznego. Ponieważ używanie języka może być wykorzystane do uzyskania kluczowych informacji na temat stanów zdrowia psychicznego, istnieje potrzeba dużej skali, oznakowanych, związanych ze zdrowiem psychicznym zbiorów danych użytkowników, u których zdiagnozowano jeden lub więcej z takich schorzeń. W niniejszym artykule badamy tworzenie precyzyjnych wzorców identyfikacji samodzielnie zgłaszanych diagnoz dziewięciu różnych stanów zdrowia psychicznego oraz uzyskanie wysokiej jakości etykietowanych danych bez konieczności ręcznego etykietowania. Wprowadzamy zbiór danych SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) i udostępniamy go. SMHD to nowatorski duży zestaw danych postów w mediach społecznościowych od użytkowników z jednym lub wieloma schorzeniami psychicznymi wraz z dopasowanymi użytkownikami kontroli. Badamy różnice w języku użytkowników mierzone zmiennymi językowymi i psychologicznymi. Dalej badamy metody klasyfikacji tekstu, aby zidentyfikować osoby z chorobami psychicznymi poprzez ich język.', 'ro': 'Sănătatea mintală reprezintă o preocupare semnificativă și tot mai mare pentru sănătatea publică. Deoarece utilizarea limbii poate fi folosită pentru a obține informații esențiale asupra condițiilor de sănătate mintală, este nevoie de seturi de date pe scară largă, etichetate, legate de sănătatea mintală, ale utilizatorilor care au fost diagnosticați cu una sau mai multe dintre aceste afecțiuni. În această lucrare, investigăm crearea de modele de înaltă precizie pentru identificarea diagnosticelor auto-raportate ale nouă afecțiuni de sănătate mintală diferite și obținerea de date etichetate de înaltă calitate fără a fi nevoie de etichetare manuală. Introducem și îl punem la dispoziție setul de date SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses). SMHD este un nou set de date mare de postări de pe rețelele de socializare de la utilizatorii cu una sau mai multe afecțiuni de sănătate mintală, împreună cu utilizatorii de control corespunzători. Examinăm distincțiile în limba utilizatorilor, măsurate prin variabile lingvistice și psihologice. Explorăm în continuare metodele de clasificare a textelor pentru a identifica persoanele cu condiții mentale prin limbajul lor.', 'mt': "Is-saħħa mentali hija tħassib sinifikanti u dejjem jikber dwar is-saħħa pubblika. Peress li l-użu tal-lingwa jista’ jiġi sfruttat biex jinkisbu fehmiet kruċjali fil-kundizzjonijiet tas-saħħa mentali, hemm il-ħtieġa għal settijiet ta’ dejta fuq skala kbira, ittikkettati u relatati mas-saħħa mentali ta’ utenti li ġew dijanjostikati b’waħda jew aktar minn dawn il-kundizzjonijiet. F’dan id-dokument, ninvestigaw il-ħolqien ta’ mudelli ta’ preċiżjoni għolja biex nidentifikaw id-dijanjożi rrappurtati lilna nnifisha ta’ disa’ kundizzjonijiet differenti tas-saħħa mentali, u niksbu dejta ttikkettata ta’ kwalità għolja mingħajr il-ħtieġa għal tikkettar manwali. We introduce the SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) dataset and make it available.  L-SMHD hija sett ta’ dejta kbir ġdid ta’ postijiet tal-midja soċjali minn utenti b’kundizzjoni waħda jew multipla tas-saħħa mentali flimkien ma’ utenti ta’ kontroll imqabbla. Eżaminaw id-distinzjonijiet fil-lingwa tal-utenti, kif imkejla minn varjabbli lingwistiċi u psikoloġiċi. Aħna qed nesploraw aktar metodi ta' klassifikazzjoni tat-testi biex nidentifikaw individwi b'kundizzjonijiet mentali permezz tal-lingwa tagħhom.", 'no': 'Mentalhelse er ein betydelig og økende offentlige helse. Som språkbruk kan leverast til å få viktige innsyn i mentale helseforhold, er det ein treng for stor, merkelig, mentale helseforhold datasett av brukarar som er diagnoserte med ein eller fleire av slike vilkåra. I denne papiret undersøker vi opprettinga av høypresisjonsmaterne for å identifisera sjølvrapporterte diagnoser med ni ulike mentalske helseforhold, og få høg kvalitet merket data utan nødvendig for manuelt merking. Vi introduserer datasettet for SMHD (selvrapporterte menneskelheilsdiagnoser) og gjer det tilgjengeleg. Name Vi undersøker forskjellingar i brukarspråket, som målt av lingviske og psihologiske variabler. Vi utforskar tekstklassifikasjonsmetoder for å identifisera individuane med mentale vilkår gjennom språket sine.', 'sr': 'Mentalno zdravlje je značajna i rastuća zabrinutost za javno zdravlje. Pošto se upotreba jezika može uticati na značajne uvjete u mentalno zdravlje, potrebna je velika skala, označena, kompleta podataka o mentalnom zdravlju korisnika koji su dijagnosticirani sa jednim ili više takvih uvjeta. U ovom papiru istražujemo stvaranje visokopreciznih obrazaca kako bi identifikovali samopojavljene dijagnoze devet različitih mentalnih zdravstvenih uvjeta i dobili visokokvalitetnih označenih podataka bez potrebe za ručnim označavanjem. Predstavljamo podatke o SMHD-u (samopojavljene dijagnoze mentalnog zdravlja) i učinimo ga dostupnim. SMHD je novi veliki komplet podataka o postima društvenih medija od korisnika sa jednim ili više mentalnih stanja zdravlja zajedno sa odgovarajućim korisnicima kontrole. Pregledavamo razlike na jeziku korisnika, mjerene jezičkim i psihološkim varijantima. Dalje istražujemo metode klasifikacije teksta za identifikaciju pojedinaca sa mentalnim uvjetima kroz njihov jezik.', 'si': 'මනුෂ්\u200dය ස්වාස්ත්වය තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සාමාන්\u200dය ස්වාස්ත්වයක්. භාෂාව භාවිතාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ ස්වාස්ථාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්න, ලැබෙන්න, මානසික ස්වාස්ත්වය සම්බන්ධ විදි මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා හොඳ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ස්වයංගත වෙනස් මානසික ස්වාස්ත්වයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙ අපි SMHD (ස්වයංගික වාර්තා කරපු මනුෂ්\u200dය ස්වාස්ත්\u200dය සැකසුම්) දත්ත සැකසුම් සඳහා ඒක පුළුවන් කරන්න. Name අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ භාෂාවේ විශේෂය පරීක්ෂා කරනවා, භාෂාවාද්\u200dයාත්මක සහ මනුස්සික වෙනස් වලි අපි තව පරික්ෂා කරන්න පාළුවන් විශේෂණ විදිහට පරික්ෂා කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ භාෂාවෙන් මානසික', 'ta': 'மருத்துவமனைவு ஒரு முக்கியமான மற்றும் அதிகரிக்கப்பட்ட பொது உடல் வளர்க்கிறது. மொழியின் பயன்பாடு முக்கியமான உணர்வுகளைப் பெற முடியும் என்பதால், முக்கியமான பாதுகாப்பு நிலைகளுக்கு, பெரிய அளவு, குறிப்பிட்ட, மருத்து உடைய தகவல் அமைப் In this paper, we investigate the creation of high-precision patterns to identify self-reported diagnoses of nine different mental health conditions, and obtain high-quality labeled data without the need for manual labelling.  நாங்கள் SMHD (சுதந்து அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட மனநோக்கு ஆரோக்க கண்டுபிடிப்பு) தகவல் அமைப்பை அறிவிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் அத SMHD என்பது பொருத்தமான கட்டுப்பாட்டு பயனீட்டாளர்களுடன் ஒன்று அல்லது பல மருத்துவ நிலைகளுடன் இருந்துள்ள சமூக ஊடகங்களின் புதி நாம் பயனர்களின் மொழியில் மாறுபாடுகளை பரிசோதிக்கிறோம், மொழிமாற்றங்கள் மற்றும் மனநிலை மாறிகள் மூலம் அளவிட நாம் இன்னும் உரை வகுப்பு முறைகளை தேடுகிறோம் மொழியில் தனிப்பட்ட மொழிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும்.', 'so': 'Mental health is a significant and growing public health concern.  Sida lagu isticmaali karo isticmaalka luuqada si uu u helo aragtida muhiimka ah oo uu u helo xaaladaha caafimaadka dhimirka, waxaa loo baahan yahay baahida warbixinta caafimaadka maskaxda ee isticmaalayaasha oo lagu yaqaan xaaladahaas ka mid ah ama ka badan. Qoraalkan waxaynu baaraynaa abuuridda qaabab aad u sahlan si aan u caddeyno nidaamka si aan u aragno sagaalka xaaladaha caafimaadka dhimirka oo kala duduwan, waxaana helaynaa macluumaad aad u taxeysan, iyadoon u baahnayn baahida sawirada gacanta. Waxaannu soo bandhignaa sawirada SMHD (suurtagalka caafimaadka dhimirka) oo aan ka helno. SMHD waa qoraal macluumaad weyn oo ay ka buuxaan warqado macluumaadka bulshada ah ee isticmaalayaasha oo ay leeyihiin hal ama mid badan xaaladaha caafimaadka dhimirka iyo isticmaalayaasha maamulka. Waxaynu imtixaamaynaa kala duwan afka isticmaalayaasha, sida loo qiyaasay isbedelka luuqadaha iyo cilmi-cilmi ah. Sidoo kale waxaynu baaraynaa qaababka qoraalka si aan u aqoonsanno qofka qaba shuruudaha dhimirka ee luqadooda.', 'sv': 'Psykisk hälsa är ett betydande och växande folkhälsoproblem. Eftersom språkanvändning kan utnyttjas för att få avgörande insikter i psykiska tillstånd, finns det ett behov av storskaliga, märkta, psykiska hälsorelaterade datauppsättningar för användare som har diagnostiserats med en eller flera av dessa tillstånd. I den här uppsatsen undersöker vi skapandet av högprecisionsmönster för att identifiera självrapporterade diagnoser av nio olika psykiska tillstånd och få fram högkvalitativa märkta data utan behov av manuell märkning. Vi introducerar datauppsättningen SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) och gör den tillgänglig. SMHD är en ny stor datauppsättning sociala medier inlägg från användare med en eller flera psykiska tillstånd tillsammans med matchade kontrollanvändare. Vi undersöker skillnader i användarnas språk, mätta med språkliga och psykologiska variabler. Vi undersöker vidare textklassificeringsmetoder för att identifiera individer med psykiska tillstånd genom deras språk.', 'ur': 'مذہب سلامتی ایک اہم اور بڑھنے کی خطر ہے۔ جس طرح زبان کا استعمال ذهنی سلامتی شرایط میں ضروری اثبات حاصل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کر سکتا ہے، اس طرح بہت بڑی مقدار، لابلیٹ، ذهنی سلامتی کے متعلق ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے ضرورت ہے جو اس طرح سے ایک یا زیادہ شرایط سے تشخیص کیا گیا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے نو مختلف روانی سلامتی شرایطوں کی خود راپورٹ کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے بلند دقیق نمونوں کے پیدا کرنے کی تحقیق کی ہے اور مہمانی لابلینگ کے لائق کے بغیر اچھی کیفیت لکھی ہوئی ڈیٹا حاصل کریں۔ ہم SMHD کو معرفی کرتے ہیں اور اسے موجود بناتے ہیں. SMHD ایک یا بہت سی مذہنی سلامتی شرایط کے ساتھ ملے ہوئے کنٹرول کارساز کے ساتھ سوسیل میڈیا پوسٹ کے بڑے ڈیٹ سٹ ہے۔ ہم کارساز کی زبان میں تفریقوں کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں، جیسے زبان شناسی اور روانی متغیروں سے اندازہ کیا گیا ہے. ہم ان کی زبان کے ذریعہ ایک شخص کو روانی شرایط سے پہچان سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Menyuk qobiliyat juda muhim va umumiy sog'loqni ko'paytirish. Tilning foydalanishi mumkin o'xshash holatga ega bo'lishi mumkin bo'lganda, bu holatning bir yoki bir necha ko'proq holatda o'rganilgan foydalanuvchilarga ko'proq bog'liq maʼlumot tizimi kerak. Bu qogʻozda, biz o'zimni boshqa 9 ta'lim sohalarini aniqlashga o'rganish uchun yuqori murakkablik tuzilishini qidirimiz va qoʻlbola yozish kerak emas. @ info: status Name Biz foydalanuvchilar tillarida o'zgarishni o'rganamiz, lingvistik va psykologik variablelarini o'zgartirishimiz mumkin. Biz tilning tillari orqali o'xshash holatda odamlarni aniqlash uchun matn classification usullarini boshqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Tâm thần là mối quan tâm lớn và đang ngày càng lớn về sức khỏe cộng đồng. Khi sử dụng ngôn ngữ có thể được dùng để cung cấp những hiểu biết quan trọng về các điều kiện sức khỏe tinh thần, cần những tập tin liên quan đến tâm thần người dùng được chẩn đoán với một hoặc nhiều điều kiện như thế. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu việc tạo ra các mô hình độ chính xác cao để xác định các chẩn đoán tự báo về chín điều kiện sức khỏe tinh thần khác nhau, và kiếm được những dữ liệu nhãn chất lượng cao mà không cần phải mô phỏng bằng tay. Chúng tôi sẽ giới thiệu dữ liệu SMB (tự báo cáo các tiêu chuẩn Y tế thần) và phát triển nó luôn. SMHD là một tập tin dữ liệu lớn mới từ những người dùng có một hoặc nhiều điều kiện sức khỏe tinh thần cùng với người dùng kiểm soát phối hợp. Chúng tôi xem xét sự khác biệt trong ngôn ngữ của người dùng, đo bằng các biến số ngôn ngữ và tâm lý. Chúng tôi còn nghiên cứu các phương pháp phân loại văn bản để xác định cá nhân với điều kiện tinh thần qua ngôn ngữ của họ.', 'bg': 'Психичното здраве е важен и нарастващ проблем за общественото здраве. Тъй като използването на езика може да бъде използвано, за да се получи ключова представа за състоянието на психичното здраве, има нужда от широкомащабни, етикетирани, свързани с психичното здраве набори от данни за потребители, които са диагностицирани с едно или повече от тези състояния. В тази статия изследваме създаването на модели с висока точност за идентифициране на диагнози за девет различни психични заболявания и получаване на висококачествени етикетирани данни, без да е необходимо ръчно етикетиране. Представяме набора от данни за самодокладвани диагнози на психичното здраве и го правим достъпен. СМХД е нов голям набор от данни от публикации в социалните медии от потребители с едно или няколко психични заболявания, заедно със съвпадащи контролни потребители. Разглеждаме различията в езика на потребителите, измерени чрез лингвистични и психологически променливи. Освен това изследваме методите за класификация на текста за идентифициране на лица с психични заболявания чрез техния език.', 'hr': 'Mentalno zdravlje je značajna i rastuća zabrinutost javnog zdravlja. Pošto se koristiti jezik može utjecati na ostvarenje ključnih uvjeta u mentalno zdravlje, potrebna je velika skala, označena, kompleta podataka o mentalnom zdravlju korisnika koji su dijagnosticirani s jednim ili više takvih uvjeta. U ovom papiru istražujemo stvaranje visokopreciznih obrazaca kako bi identifikovali samopojavljene dijagnoze devet različitih stanja mentalnog zdravlja i dobili visokokvalitetne označene podatke bez potrebe za ručnim označavanjem. Predstavljamo podatke o SMHD-u (samopojavljene dijagnoze mentalnog zdravlja) i učinimo ga dostupnim. SMHD je novi veliki komplet podataka o postima društvenih medija od korisnika s jednim ili više mentalnih uvjeta zdravlja zajedno s odgovarajućim korisnicima kontrole. Pregledavamo razlike na jeziku korisnika, mjerene jezičkim i psihološkim promjenama. Dalje istražujemo metode klasifikacije teksta za identifikaciju pojedinaca s mentalnim uvjetima kroz njihov jezik.', 'nl': 'Geestelijke gezondheid is een belangrijke en groeiende zorg voor de volksgezondheid. Aangezien taalgebruik kan worden benut om cruciale inzichten te verkrijgen in geestelijke gezondheidsaandoeningen, is er behoefte aan grootschalige, gelabelde, mentale gezondheidsgerelateerde datasets van gebruikers bij wie een of meer van dergelijke aandoeningen zijn gediagnosticeerd. In dit artikel onderzoeken we de creatie van zeer nauwkeurige patronen om zelf gerapporteerde diagnoses van negen verschillende psychische aandoeningen te identificeren en hoogwaardige gelabelde gegevens te verkrijgen zonder handmatige etikettering. We introduceren de SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) dataset en stellen deze beschikbaar. SMHD is een nieuwe grote dataset van social media posts van gebruikers met één of meerdere psychische aandoeningen samen met gematchte control gebruikers. We onderzoeken verschillen in de taal van gebruikers, gemeten aan de hand van taalkundige en psychologische variabelen. We onderzoeken verder tekstclassificatiemethoden om personen met mentale aandoeningen te identificeren via hun taal.', 'da': 'Mental sundhed er et væsentligt og voksende problem for folkesundheden. Da sprogbrug kan udnyttes til at opnå afgørende indsigt i psykiske sundhedsforhold, er der behov for omfattende, mærkede, psykiske sundhedsrelaterede datasæt af brugere, der er blevet diagnosticeret med en eller flere af disse tilstande. I denne artikel undersøger vi skabelsen af høj præcision mønstre til identificering af selvrapporterede diagnoser af ni forskellige psykiske sygdomme og opnå mærkede data af høj kvalitet uden behov for manuel mærkning. Vi introducerer SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) datasættet og gør det tilgængeligt. SMHD er et nyt stort datasæt af sociale medier indlæg fra brugere med en eller flere psykiske sygdomme sammen med matchede kontrolbrugere. Vi undersøger forskelle i brugernes sprog målt ved sproglige og psykologiske variabler. Vi undersøger yderligere tekstklassifikationsmetoder for at identificere personer med psykiske tilstande gennem deres sprog.', 'id': 'Kesehatan mental adalah masalah kesehatan publik yang signifikan dan meningkat. Karena penggunaan bahasa dapat digunakan untuk mendapatkan pandangan penting dalam kondisi kesehatan mental, ada kebutuhan untuk set data besar, berlabel, berkaitan dengan kesehatan mental dari pengguna yang telah didiagnosis dengan salah satu atau lebih dari kondisi tersebut. Dalam kertas ini, kami menyelidiki penciptaan pola presisi tinggi untuk mengidentifikasi diagnosis melaporkan diri dari sembilan kondisi kesehatan mental yang berbeda, dan mendapatkan data label kualitas tinggi tanpa membutuhkan label manual. Kami memperkenalkan dataset SMHD dan membuatnya tersedia. SMHD is a novel large dataset of social media posts from users with one or multiple mental health conditions along with matched control users.  Kami memeriksa perbedaan dalam bahasa pengguna, seperti diukur oleh variabel bahasa dan psikologi. Kami lebih lanjut mengeksplorasi metode klasifikasi teks untuk mengidentifikasi individu dengan kondisi mental melalui bahasa mereka.', 'de': 'Die psychische Gesundheit ist ein wichtiges und wachsendes Anliegen der öffentlichen Gesundheit. Da der Sprachgebrauch genutzt werden kann, um entscheidende Einblicke in psychische Erkrankungen zu erhalten, besteht Bedarf an umfangreichen, markierten, psychischen Gesundheitsdatensätzen von Benutzern, bei denen eine oder mehrere dieser Erkrankungen diagnostiziert wurde. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir die Erstellung von hochpräzisen Mustern, um selbstberichtete Diagnosen von neun verschiedenen psychischen Erkrankungen zu identifizieren und qualitativ hochwertige markierte Daten ohne manuelle Kennzeichnung zu erhalten. Wir stellen den Datensatz SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) vor und stellen ihn zur Verfügung. SMHD ist ein neuartiger großer Datensatz von Social-Media-Posts von Benutzern mit einer oder mehreren psychischen Erkrankungen zusammen mit übereinstimmenden Kontrollbenutzern. Wir untersuchen Unterschiede in der Sprache der Nutzer, gemessen an sprachlichen und psychologischen Variablen. Wir untersuchen weiter Textklassifizierungsmethoden, um Personen mit psychischen Erkrankungen durch ihre Sprache zu identifizieren.', 'ko': '심리 건강은 중요하고 날로 증가하는 공공 위생 문제이다.언어 사용을 통해 심리 건강 상태에 대한 중요한 통찰을 얻을 수 있기 때문에 한 가지 또는 여러 가지 심리 건강 상태를 진단받은 사용자에게 대규모, 라벨이 있는, 심리 건강과 관련된 데이터 집합이 필요하다.본고에서 우리는 9가지 서로 다른 심리 건강 상태의 자기 보고 진단을 식별하고 고품질의 표기 데이터를 얻어 수동으로 표기할 필요가 없도록 고정밀 모델의 창설을 연구했다.SMHD(자가 보고 심리 상태 진단) 데이터 세트를 소개하여 사용할 수 있도록 했습니다.SMHD는 하나 이상의 심리적 건강 상태를 가진 사용자와 일치하는 대조 사용자로부터 새로운 대형 소셜 미디어 게시물 데이터 세트이다.우리는 언어와 심리 변수를 통해 사용자 언어의 차이를 검증한다.우리는 텍스트 분류 방법을 더욱 탐색하여 언어를 통해 심리적 질병이 있는 개체를 식별한다.', 'fa': 'سلامتی ذهنی یک نگرانی مهم و رشد سلامتی عمومی است. به عنوان استفاده از زبان برای دریافت مشاهده های مهم در شرایط سلامت روانی، نیازی برای مقیاس بزرگ، علامت زده، اطلاعات داده های مربوط به سلامت روانی از کاربران وجود دارد که با یک یا بیشتر از این شرایط تشخیص داده شده اند. در این کاغذ، ما در آفرینش الگوهای دقیق بالا تحقیق می\u200cکنیم تا تشخیص\u200cهای خود را شناسایی کنیم که نو شرایط سلامت روانی مختلف هستند، و اطلاعات با کیفیت بالا برچسب شده بدون نیازی به برچسب دستی دریافت کنیم. ما مجموعه داده\u200cهای SMHD را معرفی می\u200cکنیم و آن را در دسترس می\u200cدهیم. SMHD یک مجموعه داده های بزرگ از پوست رسانه های اجتماعی از کاربران با یک یا چند شرایط سلامتی روانی با کاربران کنترل متفاوت است. ما تفاوت\u200cها را در زبان کاربران تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، همان طور که با تغییرات زبان\u200cشناسی و روانی اندازه می\u200cگیریم. ما روش\u200cهای مختصات متن را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم تا افراد را با شرایط روانی با زبانشان شناسایی کنیم.', 'sw': 'Mental health is a significant and growing public health concern.  Kwa kuwa matumizi ya lugha yanaweza kutumika ili kupata mitazamo muhimu katika mazingira ya afya ya akili, kuna haja ya kiwango kikubwa, yenye taarifa zinazohusiana na afya ya akili ambazo zimepunguzwa kwa hali moja au zaidi ya namna hiyo. Katika karatasi hii, tunachunguza kutengeneza miundo yenye uhakika wa juu ili kutambua uchunguzi wa mazingira tisa tofauti ya afya ya akili, na kupata taarifa za kiwango kikubwa bila haja ya kutambua vifaa vya mkono. Tunaonyesha taarifa za SMHD (Uchunguzi wa Afya ya Kiakili inayoripotiwa kujitegemea) na kufanya iwezekanavyo. SMHD ni seti kubwa ya taarifa za jumbe za mitandao ya kijamii kutoka kwa watumiaji wenye mazingira ya afya ya akili moja au nyingi pamoja na watumiaji wa udhibiti. Tunajaribu tofauti katika lugha ya watumiaji, kama ilivyopima mabadiliko ya lugha na kisaikolojia. Tunafahamu zaidi njia za usambazaji wa maandishi ili kuwatambua watu wenye hali ya akili kupitia lugha yao.', 'tr': "Mensiýet saglygyny örän wajyply we ösdüren kampany saglygyny alada edýär. Dilleriň ýüze çykyşynyň düýbünden bir ýa-da birnäçe şertler diagnostik edilen ullanlygy üçin örän möhüm pikirleri çykmak üçin etmäge mümkin edip bilýär. Bu kagyzda, beýik hasaplanjak nusgalaryň beýleki hasaplanjak üçin özüne bildirilen 9 dürli hasaplanjak çykyşyny barlap barýarys we elimizde etiketlemek gereksiz ýokary hasaplanýan hasaplanjak üçin ýokary hasaplanýarys. SMHD'i (özi bellenen Mental Sağlygy Diagnozlary) maglumatlaryny tanyşdyrýarys we muny ulagatlaýarys. SMHD, Ullançylaryň bir ýa-da birnäçe mental saýlawy şartlary bilen birlikde sosial mediýalyň ýerleriniň uly maglumatlarydyr. Ullançylaryň dilinde tapawutlaryny, lingwistiki we psikolojik üýtgeşmeleri bilen ölçülendirilýäris. Biz esasy taýýarlama yöntemlerini adamlary diňe ýüzünlik şertleri bilen aýdyşylary bilen tanyşdyrmak üçin tekst taýýarlama yöntemleri keşfedýäris.", 'af': "Mental gesondheid is 'n betekende en groei openbare gesondheid bekommerding. Soos taal gebruik kan aanvaar word om gekruisigde insigte te kry in menslike gesondheidsvoorwaardes, is daar 'n benodig vir groot skaal, etiketeerde, menslike gesondheidsverwante datastel van gebruikers wat met een of meer van sodanige voorwaardes gedagnosteer is. In hierdie papier, ons ondersoek die skepping van hoë-presisie patrone om self-verkondigeerde diagnose van nege verskillende mentale gesondige voorwaardes te identifiseer, en ons kry hoë-kwaliteit etiketeerde data sonder die benodig vir handmerking. Ons introduseer die SMHD (Selfgebiede Mental Health Diagnoses) datastel en maak dit beskikbaar. SMHD is 'n roman groot dataset van sosiale media-pos van gebruikers met een of veelvuldige menslike gesondige voorwaardes saam met ooreenstemmende beheer gebruikers. Ons ondersoek verskilte in gebruikers se taal, soos gemeet deur lingwisiese en psykologiese veranderlikes. Ons verder uitsoek teks klassifikasie metodes om individuele met menslike voorwaardes deur hul taal te identifiseer.", 'am': 'የmental ጤና የህዝብ ጤናዊ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የቋንቋ ተጠቃሚ ማስታወቂያውን ወደ አካባቢ ጤና አካባቢ ለማግኘት ሲችል፣ በአንድ ወይም በብዙ ጉዳይ የተገኘው የmental ጤና ዳታተር ተጠቃሚዎች ማድረግ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የራሳቸውን የዘጠኝ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ የmental ጤና አካላትን ለማግኘት የራሳችንን አካባቢ አካባቢ እና በኩል ጥሩ የደረጃ መረጃዎችን ማግኘት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የSMHD (የራሳቸው የተዘጋጀውን የmental ጤና Diagnosis) ዳታዎችን እናሳውቃለን እናገኘዋለን፡፡ SMHD የመጠቀም ማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያዎች ጽሑፎች ከተጠቃሚዎች በአንድ ወይም በብዙ የmental ጤና አካባቢዎች ጋር በተቃራኒ ተጠቃሚዎች ጋር የተመሳሳይ የዳታ ዘርፍ ነው፡፡ ቋንቋ እና psychological variables እንደተለካ በተጠቃሚ ቋንቋ ልዩነትን እንፈትናለን፡፡ በቋንቋቸው የmental አካላት ያሉትን ሰዎች ለማግኘት የጽሑፍ መግለጫ ሥርዓቶችን እንፈልጋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Shëndetja mentale është një shqetësim i rëndësishëm dhe në rritje i shëndetit publik. Ndërsa përdorimi i gjuhës mund të përdoret për të marrë kuptime vendimtare në kushtet e shëndetit psikologjik, ekziston një nevojë për të dhëna të mëdha, të etiketuara, të lidhura me shëndetin psikologjik të përdoruesve që janë diagnostikuar me një apo më shumë nga kushtet e tilla. In this paper, we investigate the creation of high-precision patterns to identify self-reported diagnoses of nine different mental health conditions, and obtain high-quality labeled data without the need for manual labelling.  Ne paraqesim të dhënat SMHD dhe e bëjmë të disponueshme. SMHD është një grup i ri i madh i të dhënave të postimeve të medias sociale nga përdoruesit me një apo më shumë kushte të shëndetit mendor së bashku me përdoruesit e kontrollit të përshtatshëm. Ne shqyrtojmë dallimet në gjuhën e përdoruesve, siç matën nga ndryshuesit gjuhësor dhe psikologjikë. Ne eksplorojmë më tej metodat e klasifikimit të tekstit për të identifikuar individët me kushte mendore nëpërmjet gjuhës së tyre.', 'bn': "মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ এবং জনগণের স্বাস্থ্য বৃদ্ধির উদ্বেগ। যেহেতু ভাষার ব্যবহার মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য পরিস্থিতিতে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি পেতে পারে, বিশাল পরিমাণ, লেবেল, মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য সংক্রান্ত ত এই কাগজটিতে আমরা নিজেদের নিজেদের স্বাস্থ্য সংক্রান্ত নয়টি বিভিন্ন মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য পরিস্থিতি সনাক্ত করার জন্য হাই-পলিসিটি প্যানে আমরা এসএমএইচডিকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি (স্বয়ংক্রিয় মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য ডিজাইন) ডাটাসেট পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি এবং এটি পা এসএমএইচডি হচ্ছে সামাজিক মিডিয়া পোস্ট ব্যবহারকারীদের কাছ থেকে এক বা বেশ কিছু মানসিক স্বাস্থ্য পরিস্থিতির সাথে মিল We examine distinctions in users' language, as measured by linguistic and psychological variables.  আমরা তাদের ভাষার মাধ্যমে মানসিক অবস্থার মাধ্যমে ব্যক্তিদের চিহ্নিত করার টেক্সট বিভাগের মাধ্যমে আরো ব", 'hy': 'Mental health is a significant and growing public health concern.  Քանի որ լեզվի օգտագործումը կարող է օգտագործվել հոգեկան առողջապահության պայմաններում կարևոր ընկալումների հասկանալու համար, կարիք ունի օգտագործողների, ովքեր ախտորոշվել են մեկ կամ ավելի նման պայմաններով, մեծ մասշտաբ, պիտակուցված, հոգեկան առողջապահու Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք բարձր ճշգրիտ կաղապարների ստեղծումը, որպեսզի հայտնաբերենք ինը տարբեր հոգեկան առողջապահության վիճակների ախտորոշումը և ստանանք բարձր որակի պիտակուցված տվյալներ առանց ձեռքի պիտակում կար Մենք ներկայացնում ենք SMHD (ինքնահայտարարված մտավոր առողջապահության ախտորոշներ) տվյալների համակարգը և դրանք հասանելի դարձնում ենք: SMHD-ը սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների նոր մեծ տվյալների համակարգ է օգտագործողներից, ովքեր ունեն մեկ կամ բազմաթիվ հոգեկան առողջապահության պայմաններ և համապատասխան վերահսկողների հետ: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբերությունները օգտագործողների լեզուներում, չափված լեզվաբանական և հոգեբանական փոփոխականների միջոցով: Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք տեքստի դասակարգման մեթոդները, որպեսզի հայտնաբերենք հոգեկան վիճակներով ունեցող անհատներ իրենց լեզվի միջոցով:', 'bs': 'Mentalno zdravlje je značajna i rastuća zabrinutost za javno zdravlje. Pošto se koristiti jezik može uticati na otkrivanje ključnih uvjeta u mentalno zdravlje, potrebna je velika skala, označena, kompleta podataka o mentalnom zdravlju korisnika koji su dijagnosticirani s jednim ili više takvih uvjeta. U ovom papiru istražujemo stvaranje visokopreciznih obrazaca kako bi identifikovali samopojavljene dijagnoze devet različitih mentalnih zdravstvenih uvjeta i dobili visokokvalitetnih označenih podataka bez potrebe za ručnim označavanjem. Predstavljamo podatke o SMHD-u (samopojavljene dijagnoze mentalnog zdravlja) i učinimo ga dostupnim. SMHD je novi veliki komplet podataka o postima društvenih medija od korisnika sa jednim ili više mentalnih stanja zdravlja zajedno s odgovarajućim korisnicima kontrole. Pregledavamo razlike na jeziku korisnika, mjerene jezičkim i psihološkim varijantima. Dalje istražujemo metode klasifikacije teksta za identifikaciju pojedinaca sa mentalnim uvjetima kroz njihov jezik.', 'az': 'Mensiyyət sağlamlığı möhkəm və böyüklənən halkı sağlamlıq məqsədilidir. Dil istifadəsi məqsədil sağlamlıq şərtlərinə çox mövcud baxımı almaq üçün yaradıla bilər, böyük ölçüdə, etiket edilmiş, ruhsal sağlamlıq əlaqəsində olan istifadəçilərin bir ya da çox şərtlərlə diagnostik edilmiş istifadəçilər üçün ehtiyacı var. Bu kağızda, özümüzə bildirilmiş doqquz müxtəlif mental sağlığı şartlarını təsdiqləmək üçün yüksək nöqsanlıq örtüklərinin yaradılışını incidirik və əlli etiketə ehtiyacı olmadan yüksək kaliteli etiketli məlumatları alırıq. Biz SMHD (Öz-bildirilmiş Mental Health Diagnosis) verilənləri tanıyırıq və onu mümkün edərik. SMHD, bir ya da çoxlu mental sağlığı şartları olan istifadəçilərin sosyal media poçtlarının çox böyük məlumatdır. Biz istifadəçilərin dilində fərqlənmələri, dil və psikolojik dəyişiklikləri ilə ölçülür. Biz daha çox mətn klasifikasiya metodlarını dilləri ilə insanları təsdiqləmək üçün keşf edirik.', 'cs': 'Duševní zdraví je významným a rostoucím problémem veřejného zdraví. Vzhledem k tomu, že používání jazyka lze využít k získání klíčových poznatků o stavech duševního zdraví, existuje potřeba rozsáhlé označené datové sady uživatelů, kteří byli diagnostikováni s jedním nebo více takových onemocnění. V tomto článku zkoumáme tvorbu vysoce přesných vzorů pro identifikaci samozřejmě hlášených diagnóz devíti různých duševních zdravotních stavů a získání kvalitních označených dat bez nutnosti ručního označování. Představujeme datovou sadu SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) a zpřístupníme ji. SMHD je nový velký datový soubor příspěvků na sociálních sítích od uživatelů s jedním nebo více duševními stavy spolu s odpovídajícími kontrolními uživateli. Zkoumáme rozdíly v jazyce uživatelů měřené jazykovými a psychologickými proměnnými. Dále zkoumáme metody klasifikace textů pro identifikaci jedinců s duševními stavy prostřednictvím jazyka.', 'ca': "La salut mental és una preocupació significativa i creixent en la salut pública. Com que l'ús del llenguatge es pot aprofitar per obtenir insights crucials sobre les condicions de salut mental, hi ha la necessitat d'un conjunt de dades a gran escala, etiquetat i relacionat amb la salut mental dels usuaris que han estat diagnosticats amb una o més d'aquestes condicions. En aquest paper investigam la creació de patrons d'alta precisió per identificar els diagnòstics auto-notificats de nou malalties de salut mental diferents i obtenir dades etiquetades d'alta qualitat sense la necessitat d'etiquetar manualment. Introduïm el conjunt de dades de SMHD (Dianòstics de Salut Mental Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) i la fem disponible. SMHD és un nou gran conjunt de dades de publicacions dels mitjans socials dels usuaris amb una o múltiples malalties de salut mental juntament amb usuaris de control comparats. We examine distinctions in users' language, as measured by linguistic and psychological variables.  Explorem més mètodes de classificació de textos per identificar individus amb condicions mentals a través del seu llenguatge.", 'et': 'Vaimne tervis on oluline ja kasvav rahvatervise probleem. Kuna keelekasutust saab kasutada vaimse tervise seisundite olulise ülevaate saamiseks, on vaja laiaulatuslikke märgistatud vaimse tervisega seotud andmekogumeid kasutajate kohta, kellel on diagnoositud üks või mitu sellist seisundit. Käesolevas töös uurime täpsete mustrite loomist, et tuvastada üheksa erineva vaimse tervise haiguse enesest teatatud diagnoosid ja saada kvaliteetseid märgistatud andmeid ilma käsitsi märgistamiseta. Tutvustame SMHD (Self-Reported Mental Health Diagnostics) andmekogumit ja teeme selle kättesaadavaks. SMHD on uus suur andmekogum sotsiaalmeedia postitustest kasutajatelt, kellel on üks või mitu vaimse tervise seisundit koos sobivate kontrollkasutajatega. Uurime erinevusi kasutajate keeles, mida mõõdetakse keeleliste ja psühholoogiliste muutujate abil. Lisaks uurime teksti klassifitseerimise meetodeid vaimsete seisunditega isikute tuvastamiseks nende keele kaudu.', 'fi': 'Mielenterveys on merkittävä ja kasvava kansanterveysongelma. Koska kielten käyttöä voidaan hyödyntää keskeisten näkemysten saamiseksi mielenterveysongelmista, tarvitaan laaja-alaisia, merkittyjä, mielenterveyteen liittyviä tietokokonaisuuksia käyttäjistä, joilla on diagnosoitu yksi tai useampi tällainen sairaus. Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme tarkkojen kuvioiden luomista yhdeksän eri mielenterveyssairauden itseraportoitujen diagnoosien tunnistamiseksi ja korkealaatuisten merkittyjen tietojen hankkimiseksi ilman manuaalista merkintää. Esittelemme SMHD (Self-reported Mental Health Diagnoses) -aineiston ja tuomme sen saataville. SMHD on uusi suuri tietokokonaisuus sosiaalisen median viesteistä käyttäjiltä, joilla on yksi tai useampi mielenterveysongelma, sekä verrokkikäyttäjiltä. Tutkimme käyttäjien kielen eroja kielellisillä ja psykologisilla muuttujilla mitattuna. Tutkimme myös tekstin luokittelumenetelmiä, joilla tunnistetaan mielenterveysongelmia sairastavat henkilöt heidän kielensä kautta.', 'ha': "Afar zartar fikanci yana da muhimmi kuma yana ƙara wa'adin wata matsayi. Kama da za'a iya samar amfani da harshe dõmin a sami gannai muhimu zuwa sharri'a mataimaki, za'a buƙata wani muhimu na zartar da matsayi mai girma, da lissafa, da masu husũma na masu amfani da masu amfani da su wanda aka gane su da wani ko kuma ƙari daga wannan halin. Daga wannan takardan, Munã yin ƙidãya a ƙiƙiro misãlai masu tsari da kuma dõmin mu gane diagnoni na halin mutane na guda da aka rubũta, kuma mu sami data da aka siffanta siffantawa da hannun. Kana ƙara bayani na SMHD (Diagnostic Afar Madaidaici na da ɗabi'a da aka faɗa kansa) kuma ke sami da shi. @ info Kana jarraba rarrabai cikin harshen mãsu amfani da, kamar an ƙaddara shi da wasu variabler harshe da kisaikoloji. Ko ƙara, Munã sami shiryoyin fassarar matsayi dõmin Mu gane wasu da ke da mazaɓa, a cikin harshensu.", 'sk': 'Duševno zdravje je pomemben in naraščajoč problem javnega zdravja. Ker je uporaba jezika mogoče izkoristiti za pridobitev ključnih vpogledov v duševno zdravje, je potrebna obsežna, označena, z duševnim zdravjem povezana zbirka podatkov o uporabnikih, ki so jim diagnosticirali eno ali več takih bolezni. V tem prispevku raziskujemo oblikovanje visoko natančnih vzorcev za identifikacijo diagnoz devetih različnih duševnih zdravstvenih stanj in pridobivanje kakovostnih označenih podatkov brez potrebe po ročnem označevanju. Predstavljamo nabor podatkov SMHD (samoporočane diagnoze duševnega zdravja) in ga dajemo na voljo. SMHD je nov obsežen nabor podatkov objav v družabnih omrežjih uporabnikov z enim ali več duševnimi boleznimi skupaj z ustreznimi kontrolnimi uporabniki. Preučujemo razlike v jeziku uporabnikov, merjene z jezikovnimi in psihološkimi spremenljivkami. Nadalje raziskujemo metode klasifikacije besedil za identifikacijo posameznikov z duševnimi motnjami skozi njihov jezik.', 'he': 'Mental health is a significant and growing public health concern.  כיוון שהשימוש בשפה יכול להשתמש בכדי להשיג תובנות קריטיות לתנאי בריאות נפשית, יש צורך של קבוצות מידע גדולות, מסוימות, קשורות לבריאות נפשית של משתמשים שאבחנו עם אחת או יותר מתנאים כאלה. בעיתון הזה, אנו חוקרים את יצירת דפוסים מדויקים גבוהים כדי לזהות אבחנות דווחות בעצמנו של תשעה תנאי בריאות נפשית שונים, ולקבל נתונים עם תווית איכות גבוהה ללא הצורך לתייג ידני. אנחנו מציגים את קבוצת הנתונים של SMHD SMHD הוא קבוצת נתונים גדולה חדשה של משימות תקשורת חברתית משתמשים עם תנאי בריאות נפשית אחד או רבים יחד עם משתמשים בשליטה מתאימים. אנחנו בודקים הבדיקות בשפה של המשתמשים, כפי שמדודה על ידי משתנים שפתיים ופסיכולוגיים. אנחנו חוקרים עוד שיטות מסווג טקסטים לזהות אנשים עם תנאי נפש דרך שפתם.', 'jv': 'Mentalno sing paling apik tenan dumadhi sakjane sakjane seneng pisan bakal dumadhi Taning bener, iso nglanggar langkung dipunangé kuwi nggawe informasi sing klêr kanggo ngerasai winih sing isi luwih, ana sing kudu nggawe kalaha-kalaha, sing berarti, awak dhéwé kuwi ngêdol dataset sing mengko aké perusahaan winih, sing berarti susahé awak dhéwé susahé awak dhéwé.  Nang pepul iki, kita yatêngguna perusahaan kelangan anyar-perusahaan kanggo ngilangno sistem sing gak dhéwé nggawe barang dhéwé, ngono ngêmên ngerasakno dadi sing paling dhéwé, sing uwis ngono ngêmên kuwi dianggap dhéwé kuwi mau. Awak dhéwé nggawe dataset SMDH (Self-Report Menal Care diagn) SMDH kuwi nganggo data sithik gawe media sothik sabanjuré karo perusahaan sing sampeyan karo perusahaan sing sampeyan sampek dadi. Awak dhéwé éntukno karo caffes nggambar luwih panelusatik lan kelangan kelangan langgambar lan saiki. Awak dhéwé nglanggar maneh kanggo kelas teks kanggo ingkang sampeyan éwé Perkara sing larang langgar luwih.', 'bo': 'སྐྱེས་ཆེན་གྱི་འཕྲོད་བསྟེན་ནི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་འཕྲོད་བསྟེན་གྱི་ཞལ སྐད་ཡིག་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ནི་ལ་གལ་ཆེ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་བཟའ་བློ་གཏོང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ནང་དུ་ཆེ་བའི་དགོས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། In this paper, we investigate the creation of high-precision patterns to identify self-reported diagnoses of nine different mental health conditions, and obtain high-quality labeled data without the need for manual labelling. ང་ཚོས་SMHD(རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྐྱོན་བརྗོད་ཡོད་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་སྐྱེས་ཀྱི་བཀོད་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་་སྒྲུབ་ཐུབ་པའི་གནས SMHD ནི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་ལས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཅིག་ཡང་ན་ཕྱི་རྣམ་ནད་སྤྲོད་ ང་ཚོས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་དག་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པ་ལས།'}
{'en': 'Cross-lingual Knowledge Projection Using Machine Translation and Target-side Knowledge Base Completion', 'ar': 'إسقاط المعرفة عبر اللغات باستخدام الترجمة الآلية وإكمال قاعدة المعرفة من جانب الهدف', 'pt': 'Projeção de conhecimento multilíngue usando tradução automática e conclusão da base de conhecimento do lado do destino', 'fr': "Projection des connaissances multilingues à l'aide de la traduction automatique et de la complétion de la base de", 'es': 'Proyección de conocimiento multilingüe mediante traducción automática y finalización de la base de conocimientos del lado del objetivo', 'zh': '用机器翻译与趋方知识库成者跨语投影', 'ja': '機械翻訳とターゲット側のナレッジベースの完了を使用したクロスリンガルナレッジプロジェクション', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-भाषी ज्ञान प्रक्षेपण मशीन अनुवाद और लक्ष्य-पक्ष नॉलेज बेस पूर्णता का उपयोग करके', 'ru': 'Проекция межъязыковых знаний с использованием машинного перевода и заполнения целевой базы знаний', 'ga': 'Teilgean Eolais Trastheangach ag Úsáid Aistriúchán Innealra agus Críochnú Bhonn Eolais ar Thaobh an Sprice', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Διάγλωσση προβολή γνώσης χρησιμοποιώντας τη μηχανική μετάφραση και ολοκλήρωση της βάσης γνώσης', 'hu': 'Nyelvek közötti tudásvezetés gépi fordítással és céloldali tudásbázis-kiegészítéssel', 'it': 'Proiezione della conoscenza multilingue mediante traduzione automatica e completamento della Knowledge Base sul lato target', 'kk': 'Машин аудару және мақсатты білім негізін толтыру', 'lt': 'Tarpkalbės žinių projektavimas naudojant mašinų vertimą ir tikslinės žinių bazės užbaigimą', 'mk': 'Проекција на меѓујазични знаења со користење на машински преведувања и комплетирање на базата на знања на страната на целта', 'ml': 'മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ക്രോസ്- ഭാഷ അറിവ് പദ്ധതി', 'mt': 'Cross-lingual Knowledge Projection Using Machine Translation and Target-side Knowledge Base Completion', 'mn': 'Хөгжлийн мэдлэг төсөл Машин хөрөнгө болон Цагаан талын мэдлэг суурь төгсгөл', 'ms': 'Projeksi Pengetahuan Selasa Bahasa Menggunakan Terjemahan Mesin dan Penyempurnaan Pangkalan Pengetahuan Sisi Sasaran', 'no': 'Krysspråk kunnskap- prosjekt Bruk maskinsomsetjing og målside kunnskap- basekomplettering', 'pl': 'Wielojęzyczna projekcja wiedzy za pomocą tłumaczenia maszynowego i uzupełniania bazy wiedzy po stronie docelowej', 'ro': 'Proiectarea cunoștințelor interlingve utilizând traducerea automată și finalizarea bazei de cunoștințe vizate', 'sr': 'Projekcija znanja preko jezika korištenja automatskog prevoda i završetka baze znanja na cilju', 'ta': 'கிராஸ்- மொழி அறிவிப்பு திட்டம் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மற்றும் சேருமிடத்தில் அறிவு அடிப்படை முடிவு', 'ur': 'Cross-lingual Knowledge Projection Using Machine Translation and Target-side Knowledge Base Completion', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Tvärspråkig kunskapsprojektion med hjälp av maskinöversättning och färdigställande av kunskapsbasen på målsidan', 'so': 'Qoraalka aqoonta luuqadaha iskuulka ah ee isticmaalka tarjumidda mashiinka iyo dhammaystirka aqoonta aasaasiga ah', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dự án hiểu biết xuyên rộng Sử dụng việc dịch cơ bản và trí thức bên ngoài đích', 'bg': 'Проекция на междуезични знания с помощта на машинен превод и завършване на целевата база от знания', 'hr': 'Projekcija prijezičkih znanja koristeći prijevod stroja i završenje baze znanja na cilju', 'nl': 'Meertalige kennisprojectie met behulp van machinevertaling en voltooiing van de doelmatige kennisbank', 'da': 'Tværsproget vidensprojektion ved hjælp af maskinoversættelse og færdiggørelse af målbaseret vidensbase', 'de': 'Sprachübergreifende Wissensprojektion mit maschineller Übersetzung und zielseitiger Wissensdatenbank-Vervollständigung', 'id': 'Projeksi pengetahuan saling bahasa menggunakan penerjemah mesin dan penyelesaian dasar pengetahuan sisi sasaran', 'fa': 'پروژه دانش\u200cهای متوسط زبان استفاده از ترجمه ماشین و پایه\u200cهای دانش\u200cهای هدف', 'ko': '기계 번역과 목표단 지식 라이브러리를 바탕으로 완성된 다중 언어 지식 투영', 'sw': 'Mradi wa ufahamu wa lugha ya Cross kwa kutumia Tafsiri ya Mashiniki na Kutimiza Ujuzi', 'tr': 'Çot dilli Bilgi Projesi Maşynyň Çevirmesi we Maksad-tarap Bilgi Basesi Tamamlamasyny ullanýar', 'sq': 'Projekti i njohurive ndërgjuhësore duke përdorur përkthimin e makinës dhe kompletimin e bazës së njohurive në anën e objektivit', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Գիտությունների միջլեզվի պրոեկցիան, օգտագործելով մեքենայի թարգմանություն և նպատակային գիտելիքների հիմքի ավարտում', 'az': 'Müxtəlif Bilim Proqramı Makinelərin Çeviri və Görəşdirilmiş Bilim Basi Tamamlama', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Projekcija znanja preko jezika korištenja automatskog prevoda i završetka baze znanja na cilju', 'cs': 'Projekce znalostí v různých jazycích pomocí strojového překladu a doplňování znalostní báze na cílové straně', 'ca': "Projecció translingüística del coneixement utilitzant traducció de màquines i completament de la base de coneixements per l'objectiu", 'et': 'Keeleülene teadmiste prognoosimine masintõlke ja sihtkülje teabebaasi lõpetamise abil', 'fi': 'Monikielinen tietämyksen projisointi konekäännöksen ja kohdepuolen tietokannan täydennyksen avulla', 'jv': 'Progress', 'he': 'Cross-lingual Knowledge Projection Using Machine Translation and Target-side Knowledge Base Completion', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Projekcija medjezičnega znanja s strojnim prevajanjem in dokončanjem zbirke znanja na ciljni strani', 'bo': 'Cross-lingual Knowledge Projection Using Machine Translation and Target-side Knowledge Base Completion'}
{'en': 'Considerable effort has been devoted to building commonsense knowledge bases. However, they are not available in many languages because the construction of KBs is expensive. To bridge the gap between languages, this paper addresses the problem of projecting the knowledge in English, a resource-rich language, into other languages, where the main challenge lies in projection ambiguity. This ambiguity is partially solved by machine translation and target-side knowledge base completion, but neither of them is adequately reliable by itself. We show their combination can project English commonsense knowledge into Japanese and Chinese with high precision. Our method also achieves a top-10 accuracy of 90 % on the crowdsourced EnglishJapanese benchmark. Furthermore, we use our method to obtain 18,747 facts of accurate Japanese commonsense within a very short period.', 'pt': 'Um esforço considerável tem sido dedicado à construção de bases de conhecimento de senso comum. No entanto, eles não estão disponíveis em muitos idiomas porque a construção de KBs é cara. Para preencher a lacuna entre as línguas, este artigo aborda o problema de projetar o conhecimento em inglês, uma língua rica em recursos, em outras línguas, onde o principal desafio está na ambiguidade da projeção. Essa ambiguidade é parcialmente resolvida pela tradução automática e pelo preenchimento da base de conhecimento do lado do destino, mas nenhum deles é adequadamente confiável por si só. Mostramos que sua combinação pode projetar o conhecimento do senso comum do inglês em japonês e chinês com alta precisão. Nosso método também atinge uma precisão top 10 de 90% no benchmark inglês-japonês de crowdsourcing. Além disso, usamos nosso método para obter 18.747 fatos de bom senso japonês preciso em um período muito curto.', 'ar': 'تم تكريس جهود كبيرة لبناء قواعد المعرفة المنطقية. ومع ذلك ، فهي غير متوفرة بالعديد من اللغات لأن بناء KBs مكلف. لسد الفجوة بين اللغات ، تتناول هذه الورقة مشكلة عرض المعرفة باللغة الإنجليزية ، وهي لغة غنية بالموارد ، إلى لغات أخرى ، حيث يكمن التحدي الرئيسي في غموض الإسقاط. يتم حل هذا الغموض جزئيًا عن طريق الترجمة الآلية وإكمال قاعدة المعرفة من جانب الهدف ، ولكن لا يمكن الاعتماد على أي منهما بشكل كافٍ في حد ذاته. نظهر أن مجموعتهم يمكنها إبراز المعرفة المنطقية باللغة الإنجليزية إلى اليابانية والصينية بدقة عالية. تحقق طريقتنا أيضًا دقة أعلى 10 بنسبة 90٪ في معيار التعهيد الجماعي للغة الإنجليزية - اليابانية. علاوة على ذلك ، نستخدم طريقتنا للحصول على 18747 حقيقة من الحقائق اليابانية الدقيقة في غضون فترة قصيرة جدًا.', 'fr': "Des efforts considérables ont été consacrés à la création de bases de connaissances sensées. Cependant, ils ne sont pas disponibles dans de nombreuses langues car la construction de KB est coûteuse. Pour combler le fossé entre les langues, cet article aborde le problème de la projection des connaissances en anglais, une langue riche en ressources, dans d'autres langues, où le principal défi réside dans l'ambiguïté de la projection. Cette ambiguïté est partiellement résolue par la traduction automatique et la complétion de la base de connaissances côté cible, mais aucune d'elles n'est suffisamment fiable en soi. Nous montrons que leur combinaison peut projeter la connaissance du bon sens de l'anglais en japonais et en chinois avec une grande précision. Notre méthode atteint également une précision du top 10 de 90\xa0% sur le benchmark anglais-japonais crowdsourcé. De plus, nous utilisons notre méthode pour obtenir 18 747 faits exacts de bon sens japonais en très peu de temps.", 'es': 'Se ha dedicado un esfuerzo considerable a construir bases de conocimiento de sentido común. Sin embargo, no están disponibles en muchos idiomas porque la construcción de KB es cara. Para cerrar la brecha entre idiomas, este artículo aborda el problema de proyectar el conocimiento en inglés, un idioma rico en recursos, en otros idiomas, donde el principal desafío radica en la ambigüedad de la proyección. Esta ambigüedad se resuelve parcialmente mediante la traducción automática y la finalización de la base de conocimientos del objetivo, pero ninguna de ellas es suficientemente fiable por sí sola. Demostramos que su combinación puede proyectar el conocimiento del sentido común del inglés en japonés y chino con alta precisión. Nuestro método también logra una precisión de los 10 primeros del 90% en el índice de referencia inglés-japonés colaborativo. Además, utilizamos nuestro método para obtener 18.747 datos de sentido común japonés preciso en un período muy corto.', 'ja': '常識的な知識ベースを構築するためにかなりの努力が払われてきました。しかし、KBの構築にはコストがかかるため、多くの言語では利用できません。言語間のギャップを埋めるために、本稿では、リソースの豊富な言語である英語の知識を他の言語に投影する問題について述べる。ここでの主な課題は、投影の曖昧さである。この曖昧さは、機械翻訳とターゲット側の知識ベースの完了によって部分的に解決されますが、どちらもそれ自体が十分に信頼できるものではありません。英語の常識的な知識を日本語と中国語に高精度に投影することができる彼らの組み合わせを示しています。当社の方法は、クラウドソーシングされた英和ベンチマークでも90 ％のトップ10の精度を実現しています。さらに、私たちの方法を使用して、非常に短期間で正確な日本語の常識の18,747の事実を取得します。', 'zh': '立常识性知识库之力多矣。 然无言语版本,KB构甚贵。 为弥合言语之差,本文论英语(一资富语)之知射他语,其要在射模糊性。 模糊性以机器翻译、趋端知识库成,而不足恃也。 展其组可高精度射英语常识日语中文。 吾法在众包英语- 日语准试中,犹得90%前10名准确率。 此外用我法得18于短时,747日本常识事实。', 'hi': 'कॉमनसेंस नॉलेज बेस बनाने के लिए काफी प्रयास किए गए हैं। हालांकि, वे कई भाषाओं में उपलब्ध नहीं हैं क्योंकि केबी का निर्माण महंगा है। भाषाओं के बीच की खाई को पाटने के लिए, यह पेपर अंग्रेजी में ज्ञान को पेश करने की समस्या को संबोधित करता है, एक संसाधन-समृद्ध भाषा, अन्य भाषाओं में, जहां मुख्य चुनौती प्रक्षेपण अस्पष्टता में निहित है। यह अस्पष्टता आंशिक रूप से मशीन अनुवाद और लक्ष्य-पक्ष ज्ञान आधार पूरा होने से हल की जाती है, लेकिन उनमें से कोई भी अपने आप में पर्याप्त रूप से विश्वसनीय नहीं है। हम दिखाते हैं कि उनका संयोजन उच्च परिशुद्धता के साथ जापानी और चीनी में अंग्रेजी कॉमनसेंस ज्ञान को प्रोजेक्ट कर सकता है। हमारी विधि भी crowdsourced अंग्रेजी-जापानी बेंचमार्क पर 90% की एक शीर्ष -10 सटीकता प्राप्त करता है। इसके अलावा, हम बहुत कम अवधि के भीतर सटीक जापानी कॉमनसेंस के 18,747 तथ्यों को प्राप्त करने के लिए अपनी विधि का उपयोग करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Значительные усилия были направлены на создание баз знаний здравого смысла. Тем не менее, они не доступны на многих языках, потому что строительство КБ является дорогостоящим. Для преодоления разрыва между языками в настоящем документе рассматривается проблема проекции знаний на английском языке, богатом ресурсами, на другие языки, где основная проблема заключается в двусмысленности проекции. Эта двусмысленность частично решается машинным переводом и заполнением целевой базы знаний, но ни одно из них не является достаточно надежным само по себе. Мы показываем, что их комбинация может проецировать знания английского здравого смысла на японский и китайский языки с высокой точностью. Наш метод также достигает топ-10 с точностью до 90% по краудсорсинговому англо-японскому эталону. Кроме того, мы используем наш метод для получения 18 747 фактов точного японского здравого смысла в течение очень короткого периода времени.', 'ga': 'Tá an-iarracht déanta ar bhunachar eolais tuiscint coiteann a thógáil. Mar sin féin, níl siad ar fáil i go leor teangacha mar go bhfuil tógáil KBanna costasach. Chun an bhearna idir teangacha a líonadh, tugann an páipéar seo aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le heolas a chur i mBéarla, teanga atá saibhir ó thaobh acmhainní de, i dteangacha eile, áit a bhfuil an príomhdhúshlán ag débhríocht an teilgin. Réitítear an débhríocht seo go páirteach trí mheaisínaistriúchán agus críochnú bonn eolais ar an taobh sprice, ach níl ceachtar acu iontaofa a dhóthain ann féin. Léirímid gur féidir lena gcomhcheangal eolas ciallmhar Béarla a chur i Seapáinis agus i Sínis le cruinneas ard. Baintear amach cruinneas 10 mbarr de 90% ar an tagarmharc sluafhoinsithe Béarla-Seapáinis lenár modh. Ina theannta sin, úsáidimid ár modh chun 18,747 fíric de chiall chruinn Seapánach a fháil laistigh de thréimhse an-ghearr.', 'el': 'Έχει καταβληθεί σημαντική προσπάθεια για την οικοδόμηση βάσεων γνώσης κοινής λογικής. Ωστόσο, δεν είναι διαθέσιμα σε πολλές γλώσσες επειδή η κατασκευή των KBs είναι δαπανηρή. Για να γεφυρωθεί το χάσμα μεταξύ των γλωσσών, η παρούσα εργασία εξετάζει το πρόβλημα της προβολής της γνώσης στα αγγλικά, μια πλούσια σε πόρους γλώσσα, σε άλλες γλώσσες, όπου η κύρια πρόκληση έγκειται στην ασάφεια προβολής. Αυτή η ασάφεια επιλύεται εν μέρει με τη μηχανική μετάφραση και την ολοκλήρωση της βάσης γνώσεων από την πλευρά του στόχου, αλλά κανένα από αυτά δεν είναι επαρκώς αξιόπιστο από μόνο του. Δείχνουμε ότι ο συνδυασμός τους μπορεί να προβάλει την αγγλική γνώση κοινής λογικής στα ιαπωνικά και τα κινέζικα με υψηλή ακρίβεια. Η μέθοδος μας επιτυγχάνει επίσης μια ακρίβεια κορυφής-10 90% στο αγγλο-ιαπωνικό πρότυπο αναφοράς. Επιπλέον, χρησιμοποιούμε τη μέθοδο μας για να λάβουμε 18,747 γεγονότα ακριβούς ιαπωνικής κοινής λογικής μέσα σε πολύ σύντομο χρονικό διάστημα.', 'ka': 'აღმოჩენებელი ძალადობა იყო განსაზღვრებული ცნობილის ბაზების შექმნა. მაგრამ, ისინი ბევრი ენაში არ აქვს, რადგან KBs-ის კონფიგურაცია ცოტა. ამ წიგნის განსხვავებას ინგლისურში პროექტირების პრობლემენტის პრობლემენტის განსხვავება, რესურსების ბეჭდვილი ენაში, სხვა ენაში, სადაც პროექტირების ამბიდუტირებაში მნიშვნ ეს ამბიდუტია ფართობით გადაწყვეტილია მანქანის გარგულისხმებით და მისაწყისხმებით მეცნიერების დასრულისხმებით, მაგრამ არ ერთი მანქანიდან მუშაობელია ჩვენ ჩვენ ისინი კომბინეციაში შეგვიძლია ინგლისური საზოგადოებო ცნობიერების პროექტირება წაპონეთში და ჩინეთში უფრო მარ ჩვენი მეთოდი ასევე მიიღება 90% დამატებული ინგლისური-იაპონური ბანქმარი. დამატებით, ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ ჩვენი მეთოდი, რომ 18 747 ფაქტი წაპონიურ საზოგადოებო პერიოდში მიიღებთ.', 'hu': 'Jelentős erőfeszítéseket szenteltek a józan tudásbázisok kialakítására. Ezek azonban nem sok nyelven érhetők el, mivel a KBek építése drága. A nyelvek közötti szakadék áthidalása érdekében a tanulmány azzal a problémával foglalkozik, hogy a tudást angolul, az erőforrásokban gazdag nyelven, más nyelvekre vetítik ki, ahol a fő kihívás a vetítés kétértelműsége. Ezt a kétértelműséget részben gépi fordítással és céloldali tudásbázis-kiegészítéssel oldják meg, de egyikük sem megfelelően megbízható önmagában. Megmutatjuk, hogy kombinációjuk nagy pontossággal tudja kivetíteni az angol közérzeti ismereteket japán és kínai nyelvre. Módszerünk 90%-os top 10 pontosságot ér el a crowdsourcing angol-japán referenciaértéken. Továbbá a módszerünket arra használjuk, hogy nagyon rövid időn belül 18 747 pontos japán közérzetű tényt szerezzünk meg.', 'it': "Un notevole sforzo è stato dedicato alla costruzione di basi di conoscenza di buon senso. Tuttavia, non sono disponibili in molte lingue perché la costruzione di KBs è costosa. Per colmare il divario tra le lingue, questo articolo affronta il problema della proiezione della conoscenza in inglese, una lingua ricca di risorse, in altre lingue, dove la sfida principale risiede nell'ambiguità della proiezione. Questa ambiguità è parzialmente risolta dalla traduzione automatica e dal completamento della base di conoscenze sul lato target, ma nessuna di esse è sufficientemente affidabile da sola. Mostriamo che la loro combinazione può proiettare la conoscenza del senso comune inglese in giapponese e cinese con alta precisione. Il nostro metodo raggiunge anche una precisione top 10 del 90% sul benchmark inglese-giapponese crowdsourcing. Inoltre, utilizziamo il nostro metodo per ottenere 18.747 fatti di buon senso giapponese in un periodo molto breve.", 'kk': 'Бұл көпшілікті білім негізін құру үшін маңызды жұмыс істейді. Бірақ олар көп тілде қол жеткізбейді, себебі КБ құрылымы бағатты. Тілдер арасындағы аралығын көшірмелеу үшін, бұл қағаз ағылшынша білім, ресурстар бағасы тіліне, басқа тілдерге, бұл жерде негізгі мәселе проекциялардың амбиквитациясында тұрады. Бұл амбикциялық компьютердің аударуы мен мақсатты білім негізінің біріктірімі арқылы бөлек шешілмейді, бірақ олардың бір-бірі өзінің ішінде сенімді болмайды. Біз олардың біріктіріміз ағылшын тілінің көпшілігін жапон және қытайша мәліметтерін жобалай аламыз. Біздің әдіміміз сондай-ағылшын-япон бағдарламасында 90% деген жоғары деңгейін жеткізеді. Қосымша, біз өзіміздің әдімімізді өте қысқа уақыт бойынша 18 747 жалғыз жапон көпшілігін алу үшін қолданамыз.', 'lt': 'Didelės pastangos buvo dedamos kuriant bendrą suprantamą žinių bazę. Tačiau jos nėra prieinamos daugeliu kalbų, nes KB kūrimas brangus. Siekiant pašalinti kalbų atotrūkį, šiame dokumente nagrinėjama žinių anglų kalba, turinti daug išteklių, projektavimo į kitas kalbas problem a, kur pagrindinis uždavinys yra prognozės dviprasmiškumas. Šis dviprasmiškumas iš dalies išspręsiamas vertimo mašinomis ir tikslinės žinių bazės sukūrimo būdu, tačiau nė viena iš jų nėra pakankamai patikima pati. Mes rodome, kad jų derinys gali labai tiksliai projektuoti anglų bendrus žinius į japonų ir kinų kalbas. Mūsų metodas taip pat užtikrina didžiausią 90 proc. tikslumą pagal gaunamą anglų ir japonų lyginamąjį rodiklį. Be to, mes naudojame savo metodą, kad per labai trumpą laikotarpį gautume 18 747 tikslios Japonijos bendros nuomonės faktus.', 'ms': 'Banyak usaha telah ditujukan untuk membina pangkalan pengetahuan yang sama. Namun, ia tidak tersedia dalam banyak bahasa kerana pembangunan KB mahal. Untuk memecahkan ruang antara bahasa, kertas ini mengatasi masalah projeksi pengetahuan dalam bahasa Inggeris, bahasa kaya sumber, ke bahasa lain, di mana cabaran utama berada dalam ambiguiti projeksi. Ketambilan ini dipecahkan sebahagian dengan terjemahan mesin dan penyelesaian asas pengetahuan sisi-sasaran, tetapi tiada satupun dari mereka yang cukup dipercayai oleh diri sendiri. Kita tunjukkan kombinasi mereka boleh projek pengetahuan bahasa Inggeris secara umum ke bahasa Jepun dan Cina dengan ketepatan tinggi. Kaedah kami juga mencapai keperluan top-10 90% pada benchmark Inggeris-Jepun sumber ramai. Selain itu, kami menggunakan kaedah kami untuk mendapatkan 18,747 fakta persis Jepun yang sama dalam jangka yang sangat pendek.', 'ml': 'ആലോചിക്കുന്ന ശ്രമം കമ്പന്\u200dസണ്\u200dസ് അറിവ് ബേസ് പണിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടിയാണ്. എങ്കിലും കെബികളുടെ നിര്\u200dമ്മാണം വിലയാണ്. ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലെ അറിവ് പ്രോജക്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതി മെഷിന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്\u200dറെയും ലക്ഷ്യ അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെയും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെയും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി ഈ അഗ അവരുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് കമ്പന്\u200dസണ്\u200dസ് അറിവ് ജപ്പാനീസിലേക്കും ചൈനീസിലേക്കും പ്രോജക്ട് ചെയ് നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d 90% മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പ്രാധാന്യം പ്രാപിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യും. അതിനുശേഷം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു 18,747 കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൃത്യമായി ജാപ്പനീസ് കമോണ്\u200dസണ്\u200dസെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ', 'no': 'Sjølvvalde påminningar er spelt til å bygge vanleg kunnskapsbaser. Dei er imidlertid ikkje tilgjengelege i mange språk fordi bygging av KBs er dykka. For å bryta mellom språk, denne papiret adresserer problemet med å prosjektera kunnskapen på engelsk, ein ressursryk språk, til andre språk, der hovudutfordringa ligg i projeksjonsbruk. Denne ambiguiteten er delvis løyst av maskineoversettelse og målside kunnskapsbasefullføring, men ingen av dei er tilstrekkeleg tilstrekkelig av seg selv. Vi viser sine kombinasjon kan prosjektera anglesk vanleg kunnskap til japansk og kinesisk med høy nøyaktig. Metoden vårt finn også eit topp-10-nøyaktig 90% på den populære engelsk-japanske benchmarken. I tillegg bruker vi metoden vårt for å få 18,747 faktar av nøyaktig japansk fellesskap i ein svært kort periode.', 'mt': 'Sar sforz konsiderevoli għall-bini ta’ bażi ta’ għarfien komuni. Madankollu, mhumiex disponibbli f’ħafna lingwi minħabba li l-kostruzzjoni tal-KBs hija għalja. To bridge the gap between languages, this paper addresses the problem of projecting the knowledge in English, a resource-rich language, into other languages, where the main challenge lies in projection ambiguity.  Din l-ambigwità tiġi solvuta parzjalment permezz tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni u t-tlestija tal-bażi tal-għarfien min-naħa tal-mira, iżda l-ebda waħda minnhom ma hija affidabbli b’mod adegwat waħedha. Aħna nuru li l-kombinazzjoni tagħhom tista’ tipproġetta għarfien komuni bl-Ingliż fil-Ġappuniż u ċ-Ċiniż bi preċiżjoni għolja. Il-metodu tagħna jikseb ukoll l-ogħla 10 preċiżjonijiet ta’ 90% fuq il-punt ta’ riferiment Ingliż-Ġappuniż crowdsourced. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nużaw il-metodu tagħna biex niksbu 18,747 fatt ta’ kunsens komuni preċiż Ġappuniż fi żmien qasir ħafna.', 'pl': 'Poświęcono znaczne wysiłki na budowę baz wiedzy zdrowego rozsądku. Nie są one jednak dostępne w wielu językach, ponieważ budowa KBs jest kosztowna. Aby wypełnić lukę między językami, niniejszy artykuł porusza problem projektowania wiedzy w języku angielskim, języku bogatym w zasoby, na inne języki, gdzie głównym wyzwaniem jest dwuznaczność projekcji. Ta niejednoznaczność jest częściowo rozwiązana przez tłumaczenie maszynowe i uzupełnienie docelowej bazy wiedzy, ale żadna z nich nie jest odpowiednio wiarygodna sama w sobie. Pokazujemy, że ich połączenie może z wysoką precyzją projektować angielską wiedzę zdrowego rozsądku na japoński i chiński. Nasza metoda osiąga również najwyższą dokładność 90% na crowdsourcing angielsko-japońskim benchmarku. Ponadto używamy naszej metody, aby uzyskać 18,747 fakty dokładnego japońskiego zdrowego rozsądku w bardzo krótkim czasie.', 'ro': 'S-au depus eforturi considerabile pentru construirea bazelor de cunoștințe de bunăvoință. Cu toate acestea, acestea nu sunt disponibile în multe limbi, deoarece construirea KBs-urilor este costisitoare. Pentru a reduce decalajul dintre limbi, această lucrare abordează problema proiectării cunoștințelor în limba engleză, o limbă bogată în resurse, în alte limbi, unde principala provocare constă în ambiguitatea proiecției. Această ambiguitate este parțial rezolvată prin traducerea automată și completarea bazei de cunoștințe vizate, însă niciuna dintre ele nu este adecvată de încredere în sine. Vă arătăm că combinația lor poate proiecta cunoștințele de bun simț în limba engleză în japoneză și chineză cu mare precizie. Metoda noastră atinge, de asemenea, o precizie top-10 de 90% pe benchmark crowdsourcing englez-japonez. Mai mult decât atât, folosim metoda noastră pentru a obține 18.747 de fapte de bun simț japonez exact într-o perioadă foarte scurtă.', 'mk': 'Големи напори се посветени на изградбата на заеднички бази на знаење. Сепак, тие не се достапни на многу јазици бидејќи изградбата на КБ е скапа. За да се премине јазикот помеѓу јазиците, овој весник го решава проблемот со проектирање на знаењето на англиски јазик, богат со ресурси, на други јазици, каде што главниот предизвик лежи во проектираната двосмисленост. Оваа нејасност е делумно решена со машински превод и комплетирање на базата на знаење на страната на метата, но ниту еден од нив не е доволно доверлив сам по себе. We show their combination can project English commonsense knowledge into Japanese and Chinese with high precision.  Нашиот метод, исто така, постигнува највисока точност од 90 отсто во однос на англиско-јапонското преземање. Покрај тоа, го користиме нашиот метод за да добиеме 18.747 факти за точна јапонска заедница во многу краток период.', 'si': 'හිතන්න පුළුවන් උත්සාහ කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය දැනගන්න අධාර්\u200dයය නිර්මාණය කරන්න. නමුත්, ඔවුන් බොහොම භාෂාවක් වලින් පුළුවන් නැහැ මොකද KBs ගොඩක් විශාල නිර්මාණය විශ භාෂාවල් අතර විශාලයක් පිරිසිදු කරන්න, මේ පැත්තේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ දන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, සම්බන්ධ භාෂාවක්, අනිත් භාෂාවට මේ අවශ්\u200dයතාවක් පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය සහ ඉලක්ෂ පැත්තේ දන්න අධ්\u200dයතාවක් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් විසිද්ධ වෙල අපි ඔවුන්ගේ සම්බන්ධය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සාමාන්\u200dය දැනගන්න ජාපානි සහ චීනි ව අපේ විධානය සමහරවිට ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ජාපාන් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක 90% විශේෂතාවක් ලැබෙනවා. තවත්, අපි අපේ විධානය පාවිච්චි කරනවා හරියට ජාපාන් සාමාන්\u200dය අවස්ථාවක් ගැන 18,747 ඇත්ත ගන්න.', 'sr': 'Razmotreni napori su posvećeni izgradnji baza znanja. Međutim, oni nisu dostupni na mnogim jezicima jer je izgradnja KBs skupa. Da bi se predomislio praznina između jezika, ovaj papir rješava problem projektiranja znanja na engleskom jeziku, bogat jezik resursa, na drugim jezicima, gde je glavni izazov u projekcijama ambiguitet. Ova dvosmislenost je djelomično rešena putem prevoda mašine i završetka baze znanja na cilju, ali nijedan od njih nije dovoljno pouzdan sam. Pokazujemo da njihova kombinacija može projektirati znanje engleskog zajedničkog znanja na japanski i kineski sa visokom preciznošću. Naša metoda takođe postiže tačnost od 10 najvišeg od 90% na masovnoj engleskoj-japanskoj bazi. Osim toga, koristimo našu metodu da bi dobili 18.747 činjenica tačnog japanskog zajedničkog smisla u kratkom periodu.', 'so': 'Jahaadada la fiirsado waxaa loogu talogalay in la dhiso aasaaska aqoonta shirkadda. Si kastaba ha ahaatee lama helo luuqado badan, sababtoo ah dhismaha KBs waa qaali. To bridge the gap between languages, this paper addresses the problem of projecting the knowledge in English, a resource-rich language, into other languages, where the main challenge lies in projection ambiguity.  Caqligan waxaa qeyb ahaan looga xambaaraa tarjumaadka machine iyo dhamaadka aasaaska aqoonta ee agagaarka ah, laakiin midkoodna iskama aamin karo. Waxaynu tusnaynaa wadajirkooda waxay ku soo bandhigi karaan aqoonta shirkadda Ingiriiska ee Japoniya iyo Shiino si aad u sahlan. Sidoo kale qaababkayagu wuxuu gaadhaa saxda ugu sareeya 90% oo ku saabsan bangiga Ingiriis-Japanese. Markaas waxaa kale oo aan isticmaalnaa qaababka aan soo gaadhno 18,747 waxyaabo saxda ah oo ah warqad gaaban oo japaniya ah.', 'sv': 'Stora ansträngningar har gjorts för att bygga upp allmännyttiga kunskapsbaser. De finns dock inte på många språk eftersom konstruktionen av KBs är dyr. För att överbrygga klyftan mellan språk behandlar denna uppsats problemet med att projicera kunskapen på engelska, ett resursrikt språk, till andra språk, där den största utmaningen ligger i projektionstvetydighet. Denna tvetydighet löses delvis genom maskinöversättning och färdigställande av kunskapsbasen på målsidan, men ingen av dem är tillräckligt tillförlitlig av sig själv. Vi visar att deras kombination kan projicera engelska allmännyttiga kunskaper till japanska och kinesiska med hög precision. Vår metod uppnår också en topp-10 noggrannhet på 90% på crowdsourcing engelsk-japansk riktmärke. Dessutom använder vi vår metod för att få fram 18 747 fakta av korrekt japansk allmänst inom en mycket kort period.', 'ta': 'சிந்திக்கப்பட்ட முயற்சி தொழில்நுட்பமான அறிவு அடிப்படைகளை உருவாக்கும். ஆனால், அவை பல மொழிகளில் கிடைக்கவில்லை ஏனெனில் KBs கட்டுதல் விலையானது. மொழிகளுக்கிடையே இருக்கும் வேறுபாட்டை பிரித்து, இந்த காகிதம் ஆங்கிலத்தில் அறிவை திட்டமைக்கும் பிரச்சினையைக் குறிக்கிறது, மூலம இந்த விருப்பங்கள் பாகமாக கணினி மொழிபெயர்ப்பால் தீர்க்கப்படுகிறது மற்றும் இலக்க- பக்கத்தில் அறிவு தளத்தை முடித்துவி நாங்கள் அவர்களுடைய இணைப்பை காட்டுகிறோம் அதிக துல்லியமாக ஜாப்பானிய மற்றும் சீன்களில் ஆங்கிலம் தொழ எங்கள் முறைமையில் 90% துல்லியமான சரிபாட்டை பெறுகிறது மக்கள் மூலம் ஆங்கிலம்- ஜப்பானிய மூலம் மூலம். அதற்கு மேலும், நாம் எங்கள் முறையை பயன்படுத்தி சரியான ஜப்பானிய கூட்டத்திற்கு 18,747 காரணிகளை பெறுவதற்கு மிகவும் சிற', 'mn': 'Олон ойлголттой мэдлэг үндсэн суурь бүтээхэд зориулагдсан. Гэвч тэд олон хэл дээр байхгүй. Учир нь КБ-ын бүтээл үнэтэй. Хүмүүсийн хоорондын ялгааг олохын тулд энэ цаас Англи хэлний мэдлэгийг төсөөлөх асуудлыг, нөөц баялаг хэл, бусад хэл руу шилжүүлнэ. Харин хамгийн гол сорилт нь төсөөлөлдөггүй байдалд байдаг. Энэ хэмжээсгүй байдал нь машины хөрөнгө оруулалт болон зорилготой мэдлэгийн суурь бүтээлч байдаг. Гэхдээ эдгээрийн аль ч өөрөө итгэлтэй байхгүй. Бид тэдний холбоотой нь англи хэлний мэдрэмжтэй мэдлэг Япон болон Хятад хэлний хувьд үнэхээр тодорхой төсөөлж чадна. Мөн бидний арга нь олон нийтэд Англи-Японы хэлбэр дээрх 10 гаруй тохиромжтой 90% байдаг. Мөн бид өөрсдийнхөө арга хэрэглэдэг нь маш богино хугацаанд Японы тодорхой мэдрэмжтэй 18 747 жинхэнэ зүйлийг олж авна.', 'ur': 'سمجھنے والی کوشش کی گئی ہے کہ معمولی علم کی بنیاد بنانے کے لئے۔ However, they are not available in many languages because the construction of KBs is expensive. زبانوں کے درمیان تفاوت کے لئے یہ کاغذ انگلیسی میں علم کی پروژیکٹ کرنے کی مشکل ہے، ایک سرمایہ دار زبان، اور دوسری زبانوں میں، جہاں سب سے بڑا چالیٹ پروژیکٹ کثیفیت میں ہے. یہ غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر ہم ان کی ترکیب کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ انگلیسی کی معمولی علم جاپانی اور چینی میں بالکل مضبوط ہے۔ ہمارا طریقہ بھی 90% کے سب سے بالا 10 دقیق پہنچتا ہے انگلیسی-جاپانی بنچم پر۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہم اپنے طریقے کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ایک بہت چھوٹی مدت میں 18 747 حقیقت حاصل کریں۔', 'uz': "Ko'rsatiladigan jarayonlar faqat maʼlumot bazasini yaratishga qo'shiladi. Lekin ular ko'p tillarda mavjud emas, chunki KBs'ning qurishi qiymati. Бу саҳифа ingliz tilida илмни тарқатиш, манбаъ маҳалли tillarda boshqa tillarda ajratish muammolarini anglatadi. Bu yerda eng muhimkoniyat rivojlanishni tasavvur qiladi. Bu haqida bir qismi mashina tarjima va qanday maʼlumot bazasi tuzilishi mumkin, lekin ularning o'zida yetarli yetarli emas. Biz ularning birlashtirishlarini ko'rsatdik, Yaponiya va Xitoycha xitoycha bilan eng ingliz kommunikasi muvaffaqiyatlarini yaratish mumkin. Bizning usuli ingliz-Япон асбоблари манзилга эгаси 90% аниқ мўъжизага етади. Ko'rsatganda, biz juda qisqa muddatda Yaponiya kompyuterning 18,747 faqatlarini olish usulini foydalanamiz.", 'vi': 'Đã nỗ lực rất lớn để xây dựng căn cứ kiến thức thông thường. Tuy nhiên, chúng không có ở nhiều ngôn ngữ vì cấu trúc của KB rất đắt. Để lấp chỗ trống giữa các ngôn ngữ, bài báo này đề cập đến vấn đề cung cấp kiến thức bằng tiếng Anh, một ngôn ngữ giàu tài nguyên, vào các ngôn ngữ khác, nơi thử thách chính nằm ở sự mơ hồ về dự đoán. Sự tối nghĩa này được giải quyết một phần bằng việc dịch-ra-máy và hoàn thành kiến thức bên ngoài mục tiêu, nhưng không ai trong số chúng tự tin được. Chúng tôi cho thấy kết hợp của họ có thể cung cấp thông tin tiếng Anh sang tiếng Nhật và Trung rất chính xác. Cách của chúng tôi cũng có một sự chính xác cao nhất của 90. Trên cái kiểm chết đầy Anh-Nhật. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi dùng phương pháp của mình để đạt được 18,747 thực tế chính xác của Nhật trong một thời gian rất ngắn.', 'bg': 'Отдадени са значителни усилия за изграждане на общи разумни бази от знания. Те обаче не са налични на много езици, тъй като изграждането на КБ е скъпо. За да се преодолее пропастта между езиците, настоящата статия разглежда проблема за прожектирането на знанията на английски език, богат на ресурси език, на други езици, където основното предизвикателство се крие в прожекционната неяснота. Тази неяснота се решава частично чрез машинен превод и завършване на базата от знания от целевата страна, но нито един от тях не е достатъчно надежден само по себе си. Показваме, че комбинацията им може да проектира английски познания на японски и китайски с висока точност. Нашият метод също така постига топ-10 точност от 90% на crowdsourcing английски-японски бенчмарк. Освен това използваме нашия метод, за да получим 18 747 факти с точен японски разум в много кратък период от време.', 'da': 'Der er gjort en betydelig indsats for at opbygge almindelige videnbaser. De er imidlertid ikke tilgængelige på mange sprog, fordi konstruktionen af KBs er dyr. For at bygge bro over kløften mellem sprogene behandler dette dokument problemet med at projicere viden på engelsk, et ressourcerigt sprog, til andre sprog, hvor den største udfordring ligger i projektionstvetydighed. Denne tvetydighed løses delvist ved maskinoversættelse og færdiggørelse af målsidens videnbase, men ingen af dem er tilstrækkeligt pålidelige i sig selv. Vi viser, at deres kombination kan projicere engelsk almindelig viden til japansk og kinesisk med høj præcision. Vores metode opnår også en top-10 nøjagtighed på 90% på crowdsourcing engelsk-japansk benchmark. Desuden bruger vi vores metode til at opnå 18.747 fakta af nøjagtig japansk almindelighed inden for en meget kort periode.', 'nl': 'Er is aanzienlijke inspanning besteed aan het opbouwen van gezonde kennisbases. Ze zijn echter niet in veel talen beschikbaar omdat de bouw van KBs duur is. Om de kloof tussen talen te overbruggen, behandelt deze paper het probleem van het projecteren van de kennis in het Engels, een bronnenrijke taal, in andere talen, waar de grootste uitdaging ligt in projectie ambiguïteit. Deze ambiguïteit wordt gedeeltelijk opgelost door machine translation en target-side knowledge base completion, maar geen van beide is op zichzelf voldoende betrouwbaar. We laten zien dat hun combinatie Engelse gezond verstand kennis met hoge precisie kan projecteren in Japans en Chinees. Onze methode bereikt ook een top-10 nauwkeurigheid van 90% op de crowdsourced Engels-Japanse benchmark. Bovendien gebruiken we onze methode om 18.747 feiten van accurate Japanse gezond verstand binnen een zeer korte periode te verkrijgen.', 'de': 'Es wurden beträchtliche Anstrengungen unternommen, um gesunde Wissensgrundlagen aufzubauen. Sie sind jedoch nicht in vielen Sprachen verfügbar, da der Bau von KBs teuer ist. Um die Lücke zwischen den Sprachen zu schließen, befasst sich dieser Beitrag mit dem Problem, das Wissen in Englisch, einer ressourcenreichen Sprache, in andere Sprachen zu projizieren, wobei die größte Herausforderung in der Mehrdeutigkeit der Projektion liegt. Diese Mehrdeutigkeit wird teilweise durch maschinelle Übersetzung und zielseitige Wissensdatenbank-Vervollständigung gelöst, aber keiner von ihnen ist für sich ausreichend zuverlässig. Wir zeigen, dass ihre Kombination englisches gesundes Wissen in Japanisch und Chinesisch mit hoher Präzision projizieren kann. Unsere Methode erreicht auch eine Top-10 Genauigkeit von 90% auf dem Crowdsourcing Englisch-Japanisch Benchmark. Darüber hinaus nutzen wir unsere Methode, um 18.747 Fakten über korrekten japanischen gesunden Menschenverstand innerhalb kürzester Zeit zu erhalten.', 'ko': '상식지식고 건립에 상당한 노력을 기울였다.그러나 많은 언어의 KBS 구조는 비싸지 않다.언어 간의 갭을 메우기 위해 본고는 영어라는 자원이 풍부한 언어의 지식을 다른 언어에 투사하는 문제를 논의했는데 그 중에서 주요한 도전은 잘못된 뜻을 투사하는 데 있다.기계 번역과 목표단 지식 라이브러리의 완성 부분은 이런 모호성을 해결했지만 그 자체는 믿을 만하지 못했다.우리는 그것들의 결합이 영어 상식을 일본어와 중국어에 고정밀하게 투사할 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.우리의 방법은 패키지 영어-일본어 기준 테스트에서도 90% 상위 10위의 정확도를 기록했다.이 밖에 우리는 우리의 방법을 사용하여 짧은 시간 안에 18747개의 정확한 일본 상식 사실을 얻었다.', 'id': 'Usaha yang besar telah ditujukan untuk membangun dasar pengetahuan yang sama. Namun, mereka tidak tersedia dalam banyak bahasa karena konstruksi KB mahal. Untuk menyelesaikan perbedaan antara bahasa, kertas ini mengatasi masalah proyeksi pengetahuan dalam bahasa Inggris, bahasa yang kaya sumber daya, ke bahasa lain, di mana tantangan utama berada dalam persamaan proyeksi. This ambiguity is partially solved by machine translation and target-side knowledge base completion, but neither of them is adequately reliable by itself.  Kami menunjukkan kombinasi mereka bisa proyeksikan pengetahuan bahasa Inggris ke bahasa Jepang dan Cina dengan presisi tinggi. Metode kami juga mencapai akurasi top-10 90% pada benchmark sumber masyarakat Inggris-Jepang. Selain itu, kami menggunakan metode kami untuk mendapatkan 18.747 fakta akurat bahasa Jepang dalam waktu yang sangat singkat.', 'sw': 'Jitihada nzuri zimekuwa zikitumia kujenga msingi wa maarifa ya umma. Hata hivyo, hawapatikani kwa lugha nyingi kwa sababu ujenzi wa KBs ni ghali. Ili kuunganisha tofauti kati ya lugha, gazeti hili linahusu tatizo la kutangaza maarifa kwa lugha ya Kiingereza, lugha yenye rasilimali, kwa lugha nyingine, ambapo changamoto kubwa ni katika uchochezi wa miradi. Uhambuzi huu umesuliwa kwa sehemu ya utafsiri wa mashine na utaratibu wa msingi wa maarifa kwa lengo, lakini hakuna miongoni mwao kinatosha kutegemea. Tunaonyesha muungano wao unaweza kuandaa maarifa ya jumuiya ya Kiingereza kwa Kijapani na Kichina kwa kiasi kikubwa. Utawala wetu pia unaweza kupata uhakika wa asilimia 90 kwenye bendera ya Kiingereza na Kijapani. Zaidi ya hayo, tunatumia njia yetu kupata ukweli wa 18,747 wa tume sahihi ya Japani ndani ya kipindi kifupi.', 'fa': 'تلاش قابل توجه به ساختن پایگاه\u200cهای دانش معمولی استفاده شده است. با این حال، آنها در بسیاری از زبانها دسترسی ندارند چون ساختن کیب ها گرون است. برای تفاوت بین زبانها، این کاغذ مشکل پروژه علم به انگلیسی، یک زبان ثروتمند منبع، به زبان دیگر، که چالش اصلی در غیر قابل توجه است. این غیرقابلیت بخشی از طریق ترجمه ماشین و پایگاه علم هدف حل می شود، ولی هیچ یک از آنها تنها قابل اعتماد نیست. ما ترکیب آنها را نشان می دهیم که می توانند دانش عادی انگلیسی را به ژاپن و چینی با دقیق بالا پروژه دهند. روش ما همچنین دقیقات ۱۰ بالا از ۹۰ درصد در صندوق انگلیسی-ژاپنی جمعیت رسیده است. ما از روش خودمان استفاده می کنیم تا در طول مدت خیلی کوتاه واقعیت های مستقیم ژاپنی 18.747 را دریافت کنیم.', 'tr': 'Umumy bilgi bazlaryny gurmana düşünýän çabalar berildi. Ýöne olar köp dilde tapylmadylar sebäbi KB gurluşy wagt. Diller arasyndaky boşluklary köpräk etmek üçin bu kagyz bilen iňlis dilinde bilgi tassyklamak kynçylygyny çözýär, resurslar baý dillere, başga dillere görýär. Beýik kynçylyklaryň tassyklanmasynda esasy kynçylyklary çözýär. Bu maksadat maşynyň terjime edilmesi we maksady tarapyndan bilim üýtgetmesi bilen boşadylýar, ýöne olaryň hiç biri özüne ýeterlik we ynamly däldir. Biz olaryň birleşiklerini iňlisçe bilimi ýokary derejesi bilen Japonça we Çinçe bilen tassyklap bileris. Biziň ýüzümiz hem adamlaryň üstünde 10% iňlisçe-japonça benchmark hasaplanýar. Mundan soňra, biz öz ýüregimizi örän gysga wagtda 18.747 takyk japonça duýgularyny almak üçin ulanýarys.', 'af': "Aandag versoek is gewys om gewone kennisbasis te bou. Maar hulle is nie beskikbaar in baie tale omdat die konstruksie van Kbs koste is nie. Om die ontbreiding tussen tale te brui, sal hierdie papier die probleem van die projeksie van die kennis in Engels, 'n hulpbron-ryk taal, in ander tale, waar die hoof uitdrukking lê in projeksie ambiguiteit. Hierdie ongelukkigheid is gedeeltelik opgelos deur masjien vertaling en doel-kant kennis basis voltooiing, maar niemand van hulle is adequately betroubaar deur self. Ons wys hulle kombinasie kan Engels gemeenskaplike kennis in Japans en Sjinees met hoë presisie projek. Ons metode het ook 'n boonste-10 presies van 90% op die skare ingelse-japanse benchmark bereik. Ons gebruik ook ons metode om 18.747 fakte van geregte japanse gemeenskap in 'n baie kort tyd te kry.", 'sq': 'Përpjekje të konsiderueshme është përkushtuar për ndërtimin e bazave të njohurive të përbashkëta. Megjithatë, ato nuk janë në dispozicion në shumë gjuhë sepse ndërtimi i KB-ve është i shtrenjtë. Për të mbuluar dallimin midis gjuhëve, kjo letër trajton problem in e projektimit të njohurisë në anglisht, një gjuhë të pasur me burime, në gjuhë të tjera, ku sfida kryesore gjendet në dyshimin e projektimit. Kjo paqartësi zgjidhet pjesërisht nga përkthimi i makinave dhe kompletimi i bazës së njohurive në anën e objektivit, por asnjë prej tyre nuk është i besueshëm në mënyrë të përshtatshme vetë. Ne tregojmë se kombinimi i tyre mund të projektojë njohuri të përbashkët anglez në japonezë dhe kinezë me saktësi të lartë. Metoda jonë arrin gjithashtu një saktësi prej 10% më të mirë në referencën anglo-japoneze. Përveç kësaj, ne përdorim metodën tonë për të marrë 18,747 fakte të saktë të komunitetit japonez brenda një periudhe shumë të shkurtër.', 'am': 'የተመለከቱ ጉዳይ የሙሉ እውቀት መቀመጫዎችን ለመሥራት ነው፡፡ However, they are not available in many languages because the construction of KBs is expensive.  በቋንቋዎች መካከል የልዩነት መለያየት ለመቀበል፣ ይህች ገጽ በንግግሊዝኛ እውቀትን ለማግኘት፣ የሀብት ቋንቋ፣ ለሌሎች ቋንቋዎች መሆኑን በመጠቀም የዋነኛው ጥቃት በመፍጠር ላይ ነው፡፡ ይህ ፍላጎት በመሣሪያው ትርጓሜ እና የቦታ እውቀት መሠረት ተፈጸመ፤ ነገር ግን ከእነርሱ በአንዱ በራሱ የሚበቃ አይደለም። We show their combination can project English commonsense knowledge into Japanese and Chinese with high precision.  አካሄዳችን በጉዳዩ የኢንግሊዝኛ-ጃፓን የኢንጂል-የፖንቲካዊ ደብዳቤ ላይ 90 በመቶ የክፍለጋውን አግኝቷል፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ 18,747 እውነተኞችን የጃፓን ኮምፒሽሽን ለመግኘት ሥርዓታችንን እናስቀምጣለን፡፡', 'az': 'Gördüyünüz mümkün səbəbi bilgi üssələrini inşa etmək üçün istifadə edilmişdir. Ancaq onlar çox dillərdə faydalanmırlar, çünki KB in şalları mal idi. Dillərin arasındakı boşluqlarını köçürmək üçün bu kağıt İngilizce elmi projeksiyonun problemini, qüvvətli-qüvvətli dili, başqa dillərə çəkir. Ən böyük çətinlik projeksiyonun məqsədilində idi. Bu məcburiyyət maşın çevirilməsi və məqsəd tərəfindən elm üssünün tamamlanması ilə parça çəkilir, amma onların heç biri özünə yeterli güvenilir. Biz onların birləşdirilməsini ən yüksək qiymətlə Japonca və Çinə dilində İngilizce dilində bilənləri təşkil edə bilərik. Bizim metodumuz da İngilizə-Japonca benchmark ı üzərində 90%-in ən yüksək 10 dəqiqliyinə nail ola bilər. Daha sonra, çox qısa bir müddət içində həqiqət Japonca hissəsinin 18.747 faktlarını almaq üçün metodumuzu istifadə edirik.', 'hy': 'Considerable effort has been devoted to building commonsense knowledge bases.  However, they are not available in many languages because the construction of KBs is expensive.  To bridge the gap between languages, this paper addresses the problem of projecting the knowledge in English, a resource-rich language, into other languages, where the main challenge lies in projection ambiguity.  This ambiguity is partially solved by machine translation and target-side knowledge base completion, but neither of them is adequately reliable by itself.  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նրանց համադրումը կարող է անգլերեն հասարակ գիտելիքներ նախագծել ճապոներեն և չինարեն բարձր ճշգրտությամբ: Our method also achieves a top-10 accuracy of 90% on the crowdsourced English-Japanese benchmark.  Furthermore, we use our method to obtain 18,747 facts of accurate Japanese commonsense within a very short period.', 'bn': 'বিবেচনা করা প্রচেষ্টা কমাউন্সেন্সের জ্ঞান বেস তৈরি করার জন্য ব্যবস্থা করা হয়েছে। তবে তারা অনেক ভাষায় পাওয়া যাচ্ছে না কারণ কেবিএস নির্মাণ দাম। To bridge the gap between languages, this paper addresses the problem of projecting the knowledge in English, a resource-rich language, into other languages, where the main challenge lies in projection ambiguity.  মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং লক্ষ্য-পাশের জ্ঞানের বেস সমাপূর্ণ করে এই বিদ্বেষ সমাধান করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু তাদের কেউ নিজেরা যথেষ্ট নি আমরা তাদের সংযোগ দেখাচ্ছি যে ইংরেজি কমিউনিসেন্সের জ্ঞান জাপানি এবং চীনের জায়গায় প্রকল্প করতে পারে উচ আমাদের পদ্ধতিও জনগণের সূত্রে ইংরেজী ও জাপানী বেনম্যার্কে ৯০% এর উপরের বেশি পরিমাণ অর্জন করে। এছাড়াও, আমরা আমাদের পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করি খুব সংক্ষিপ্ত সময়ের মধ্যে জাপানী কমন্সেন্সের সঠিক তথ্য পাওয়ার জন্য ১৮,৭৪ ত', 'bs': 'Razmotreni napori su posvećeni izgradnji baza znanja zajedničkog smisla. Međutim, oni nisu dostupni na mnogim jezicima jer je izgradnja KBs skupa. Da bi se predomislio praznina između jezika, ovaj papir rješava problem projektiranja znanja na engleskom jeziku, bogat jezik resursa, na drugim jezicima, gdje je glavni izazov u projekcijama ambiguitet. Ova dvosmislenost je djelomično riješena od strane prevoda mašine i završetka baze znanja na cilju, ali nijedan od njih nije dovoljno pouzdan sam. Pokazujemo da njihova kombinacija može projektirati znanje engleskog zajedničkog znanja na japanski i kineski sa visokom preciznošću. Naš metod također postiže točnost od 10 najvišeg od 90% na masovnom engleskom-japanskom referenciji. Osim toga, koristimo našu metodu da bi dobili 18.747 činjenica tačnog japanskog češćenja u kratkom periodu.', 'ca': "Considerable effort has been devoted to building commonsense knowledge bases.  No obstant això, no estan disponibles en moltes llengües perquè la construcció de KB és cara. Per superar la bretxa entre les llengües, aquest article aborda el problem a de projectar el coneixement en anglès, un llenguatge ric en recursos, a altres llengües, on el repte principal és l'ambigüitat de projectió. This ambiguity is partially solved by machine translation and target-side knowledge base completion, but neither of them is adequately reliable by itself.  Mostrem que la seva combinació pot projectar coneixement comú anglès en japonès i xinès amb alta precisió. Our method also achieves a top-10 accuracy of 90% on the crowdsourced English-Japanese benchmark.  A més, utilitzem el nostre mètode per aconseguir 18.747 fets d'un acut consens japonès en un període molt curt.", 'cs': 'Značné úsilí bylo věnováno budování zdravých znalostních základů. Nejsou však k dispozici v mnoha jazycích, protože výstavba KBs je drahá. Aby překlenout mezeru mezi jazyky, tento článek se zabývá problematikou promítání znalostí v angličtině, jazyce bohatém na zdroje, do jiných jazyků, kde hlavní výzvou spočívá v nejednoznačnosti projekce. Tato nejasnost je částečně řešena strojovým překladem a doplňováním cílové znalostní báze, ale žádná z nich není sama o sobě dostatečně spolehlivá. Ukážeme, že jejich kombinace dokáže promítat anglické znalosti zdravého rozumu do japonštiny a čínštiny s vysokou přesností. Naše metoda také dosahuje nejvyšší 10 přesnosti 90% na crowdsourcingovém anglicko-japonském benchmarku. Dále používáme naši metodu k získání 18,747 faktů o přesném japonském zdravém rozumu ve velmi krátkém období.', 'et': 'Märkimisväärseid jõupingutusi on pühendatud mõistlike teadmistebaaside loomisele. Siiski ei ole need saadaval paljudes keeltes, sest KBde ehitamine on kallis. Keeltevahelise lõhe ületamiseks käsitletakse käesolevas dokumendis ressursirikkas keeles inglise keeles teadmiste projekteerimise probleemi teistesse keeltesse, kus peamine väljakutse seisneb projektide ebaselguses. See ebaselgus on osaliselt lahendatud masintõlke ja sihtkülje teadmistebaasi lõpetamisega, kuid kumbki neist ei ole iseenesest piisavalt usaldusväärne. Näitame, et nende kombinatsioon suudab ülitäpselt projitseerida inglise keele tavapäraseid teadmisi jaapani ja hiina keelde. Meie meetod saavutab ka inglise-jaapani võrdlusalusel 90% tipp10 täpsuse. Lisaks kasutame oma meetodit, et saada väga lühikese aja jooksul 18 747 täpset Jaapani mõistust.', 'fi': 'Järkevän tietopohjan rakentamiseen on panostettu huomattavasti. Niitä ei kuitenkaan ole saatavilla monilla kielillä, koska KB:n rakentaminen on kallista. Kielten välisen kuilun kuromiseksi umpeen tässä asiakirjassa käsitellään ongelmaa, joka koskee englannin kielen, resurssien rikkaan kielen, projisointia muille kielille, joissa suurin haaste on projisoinnin epäselvyys. Tämä epäselvyys ratkaistaan osittain konekäännöksellä ja kohdepuolen tietopohjan täydennyksellä, mutta kumpikaan niistä ei sinänsä ole riittävän luotettava. Osoitamme, että niiden yhdistelmä voi projisoida englannin maalaisjärjestystä japaniksi ja kiinaksi erittäin tarkasti. Menetelmämme saavuttaa myös 90%:n tarkkuuden joukkolähdepohjaisessa englanti-japanilaisessa vertailussa. Lisäksi käytämme menetelmää saadaksemme 18 747 faktaa tarkkaa japanilaista järkeä hyvin lyhyessä ajassa.', 'hr': 'Razmotreni napori su posvećeni izgradnji baza znanja zajedničkog smisla. Međutim, oni nisu dostupni na mnogim jezicima jer je izgradnja KBs skupa. Da bi se predomislio praznina između jezika, ovaj papir rješava problem projektiranja znanja na engleskom jeziku, bogatim jezikom resursa, na drugim jezicima, gdje je glavni izazov u projekciji ambiguitet. Ova dvosmislenost je djelomično riješena putem prevoda strojeva i završetka baze znanja na cilju, ali nijedan od njih nije dovoljno pouzdan sam. Pokazat ćemo njihovu kombinaciju da proizvode znanje engleskog zajedničkog znanja na japanske i kineske sa visokom preciznošću. Naš metod također postiže točnost od 10 najvišeg od 90% na masovnom engleskom-japanskom kriteriju. Osim toga, koristimo našu metodu da bi dobili 18.747 činjenica to čnog japanskog češća u vrlo kratkom razdoblju.', 'jv': 'Global bending Nanging, wong-wong kuwi ora bisa nèng akeh luwih lan kaya nggawe kbs karo akeh kudu. Mbok nggawe gerakan karo langkung banjur, mapaké iki dadi ngembukak kanggo nggawe kesempatan kanggo ingkang, kesempatan-aké sing nggawe luwih apik, ning langa sing ngengataké awak dhéwé, ning awak dhéwé sing nguasai perbudhakan kanggo mbanjurakno. Bilih Awak dhéwé ngerasakno Panjenenganipun ingkang dipunangé awak dhéwé kesempatan kanggo barang Panjenenganipun lan barang barang dhéwé. Awakdhéwé éntuk nggawe barang pengguna-10% sing katêpakan karo bendhuwur Inggris-Jepang Mungkin kok, kita gambar kelas telu kanggo ngerasakno 18.', 'ha': "Kayan aikin da aka yi wa kuɓutar da bakin saninta. Haƙĩƙa, ba za'a iya sãmu su da wasu harshe masu yawa, kwanin ginanin KBs yana kasanci. To, dõmin ya sami gaɓa a tsakanin harshe, wannan takardar na addu'a matsayin ya wajabta kunyar cikin Ingiriya, wata harshe na'asar-matalauci, cikin harshen dabam-dabam, inda muhimmin muhimmada ke cikin kunnuwa. Wannan bakarãrar da aka raba shi da fassarar maɓalli da kuma ma'abũcin ilmi na gabatar da shi, kuma ba ta kamid da shi ba. Tuna nũna komajansu, za'a iya jarraba ma'anar Ingiriya zuwa japane da China da haske mai girma. Kayan hanyoyinMu yana sami tsarin da 90% na'yan mutane da aka rufe English-japane. Da haka, munã amfani da hanyoyinmu dõmin mu sami matsayin 18,747 masu gaskiya na japane guda na ƙari kaɗan.", 'he': 'מאמץ חשוב הוקדש לבניין בסיסי ידע משותפים. However, they are not available in many languages because the construction of KBs is expensive.  כדי לשבור את הפער בין שפות, העיתון הזה מתייחס לבעיה של פרוייקציה של הידע באנגלית, שפה עשירה במשאבים, לשפות אחרות, היכן שהאתגר העיקרי נמצא באמבטיות פרוייקציה. השתבשות הזו פותרת חלקית על ידי התרגום מכונת ובסיס הידע לצד המטרה, אך אף אחד מהם לא אמין בכוחות עצמו. We show their combination can project English commonsense knowledge into Japanese and Chinese with high precision.  השיטה שלנו גם משיגה מדויקת של 90% ביותר על נקודת המקור האנגלי-יפני. בנוסף, אנו משתמשים בשיטה שלנו כדי להשיג 18,747 עובדות של משפט יפני מדויק בתוך תקופה קצרה מאוד.', 'sk': 'Znatna prizadevanja so bila namenjena gradnji splošnih razumnih baz znanja. Vendar pa niso na voljo v mnogih jezikih, ker je gradnja KB draga. Da bi premostili vrzel med jeziki, ta prispevek obravnava problem projiciranja znanja v angleščini, jeziku, bogatem z viri, v druge jezike, kjer je glavni izziv v projekcijski dvoumnosti. Ta dvoumnost je delno rešena s strojnim prevajanjem in dokončanjem baze znanja na ciljni strani, vendar nobena od njiju sama ni ustrezno zanesljiva. Pokazali smo, da lahko njihova kombinacija projicira angleško splošno znanje v japonščino in kitajščino z visoko natančnostjo. Naša metoda dosega tudi najboljšo točnost 10 v višini 90% na angleško-japonskem merilu množičnega izvora. Poleg tega uporabljamo našo metodo, da v zelo kratkem času pridobimo 18.747 dejstev točnega japonskega smisla.', 'bo': 'ལྟ་བུའི་སྐྱེས་ཚད་ལྟ་བུ་དག་གི་ཆེས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་ཞིག་འཇུག་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད སྐད་རིགས་དབར་གྱི་བར་སྟོང་དེ་ལ་ཤོག This ambiguity is partially solved by machine translation and target-side knowledge base completion, but neither of them is adequately reliable by itself. ང་ཚོས་ཁོང་ཚོའི་མཉམ་སྡུད་གྱིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་རྒྱ་ནག་ལ་ཐོག་ཏུ་མཐུན ང་ཚོའི་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱིས་མང་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་ཀྱི་མགོ་འགྲམ་༡༠་ཙམ་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་བས། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྱད་ནས་ཕལ་ཆེར་ཉེན་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ཡང་ཆགས་པ་ཅིག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Assessing Quality Estimation Models for Sentence-Level Prediction', 'ar': 'تقييم نماذج تقدير الجودة للتنبؤ على مستوى الجملة', 'es': 'Evaluación de modelos de estimación de calidad para la predicción a nivel de oración', 'fr': "Évaluation des modèles d'estimation de la qualité pour la prédiction au niveau de", 'pt': 'Avaliação de modelos de estimativa de qualidade para previsão em nível de sentença', 'ja': '文章レベルの予測のための品質推定モデルの評価', 'ru': 'Оценка моделей оценки качества для прогнозирования на уровне предложения', 'zh': '评估句级测量模形', 'hi': 'वाक्य-स्तर की भविष्यवाणी के लिए गुणवत्ता अनुमान मॉडल का आकलन करना', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Meastacháin Cáilíochta a Mheas le hAghaidh Réamh-mheastacháin ar Leibhéal Pianbhreithe', 'hu': 'Minőségbecslési modellek értékelése az ítéletszintű előrejelzéshez', 'ka': 'კვალეტის განსაზღვრების მოდელების შესახებ სიტყვების დონეზე', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση μοντέλων εκτίμησης ποιότητας για την πρόβλεψη επιπέδου ποινών', 'it': 'Valutazione dei modelli di stima della qualità per la previsione a livello di frase', 'kk': 'Сөздік деңгейінің қасиетті оқу үлгілерін оқу', 'lt': 'Bausmės lygio prognozės kokybės vertinimo modelių vertinimas', 'mk': 'Assessing Quality Estimation Models for Sentence-Level Prediction', 'ms': 'Assessing Quality Estimation Models for Sentence-Level Prediction', 'mt': 'Valutazzjoni tal-Mudelli ta’ Stima tal-Kwalità għat-Tbassir tal-Livell tas-Sentenza', 'ml': 'വാക്ക്- നില മുന്\u200dഗണന മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'no': 'Assenserer kvalitetevalueringsmodeller for førehandsvising av setningsnivå', 'mn': 'Үүний хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний үнэлгээ', 'pl': 'Ocena modeli oceny jakości dla prognozowania poziomu zdań', 'ro': 'Evaluarea modelelor de estimare a calității pentru predicția la nivel de sentință', 'sr': 'Procjenjivanje modela procjene kvalitete za predviđanje na nivou kazne', 'si': 'වාර්තාව- තත්වයට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂය අනුමාණ විශේෂය', 'so': 'Isticmaalka xisaabta qiimeynta qiimeynta', 'sv': 'BedĂ¶mning av kvalitetsberĂ¤kningsmodeller fĂ¶r fĂ¶rutsĂ¤gelse av meningsnivĂ¥', 'ta': 'வாக்கியம்- நிலை முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'سنٹنس-سطح پیش بینی کے لئے کیفیت کا ارزش موڈل کا ارزش', 'uz': 'Andoza moslamalar', 'vi': 'Đánh giá thử nghiệm chất lượng cho khả năng đoán cấp', 'da': 'Vurdering af kvalitetsestimeringsmodeller for forudsigelse af sætningsniveau', 'bg': 'Оценка на моделите за оценка на качеството за прогнозиране на ниво присъда', 'hr': 'Procjenjivanje modela procjene kvalitete predviđanja na nivou kazne', 'nl': 'Evaluatie van kwaliteitsschattingsmodellen voor voorspelling op zinsniveau', 'id': 'Assessing Quality Estimation Models for Sentence-Level Prediction', 'fa': 'ارزیابی نمونه\u200cهای ارزیابی کیفیت برای پیش\u200cبینی سطح کلمه\u200c', 'de': 'Bewertung von QualitĂ¤tsschĂ¤tzungsmodellen fĂ¼r die Vorhersage auf Satz-Ebene', 'tr': 'Sözleme Derjesi önlemek üçin kaliwatly Taýýarlama Modelleri', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Hesabu wa Utawala wa Udhibiti', 'af': 'Assensie Kwaliteit Estimasie Modelle vir Sagte- Vlak Voorskou', 'ko': '문장 수준 예측의 품질 평가 모델', 'am': 'undo-type', 'hy': 'Արժեքի մակարդակի կանխատեսման որակի գնահատման մոդելների գնահատումը', 'bn': 'শাস্তি- স্তরের পছন্দের জন্য মান গণনা মডেল পরিমাপ করা হচ্ছে', 'sq': 'Assessing Quality Estimation Models for Sentence-Level Prediction', 'bs': 'Procjenjivanje modela procjene kvalitete predviđanja na nivou kazne', 'ca': "Evaluar els models d'estimació de qualitat per a la predicció del nivell de sentencia", 'az': 'S칬z칲m-s톛viyy톛si t톛siri 칲칞칲n X칲susiyy톛t N칬mr톛si', 'cs': 'Hodnocení modelů odhadu kvality pro predikci úrovně věty', 'et': 'Kohtuotsuse taseme prognoosimise kvaliteedi hindamise mudelite hindamine', 'fi': 'Laadunarviointimallien arviointi tuomiotason ennustusta varten', 'jv': 'Validity', 'he': 'הערכה של דוגמני הערכת איכות לקיום רמת גזרה', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Ocena modelov ocenjevanja kakovosti za napoved ravni kazni', 'bo': 'ཚིག་རྟགས་གནས་རིམ་གྱི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཚད་རྣམ་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper provides an evaluation of a wide range of advanced sentence-level Quality Estimation models, including Support Vector Regression, Ride Regression, Neural Networks, Gaussian Processes, Bayesian Neural Networks, Deep Kernel Learning and Deep Gaussian Processes. Beside the accurateness, our main concerns are also the robustness of Quality Estimation models. Our work raises the difficulty in building strong models. Specifically, we show that Quality Estimation models often behave differently in Quality Estimation feature space, depending on whether the scale of feature space is small, medium or large. We also show that Quality Estimation models often behave differently in evaluation settings, depending on whether test data come from the same domain as the training data or not. Our work suggests several strong candidates to use in different circumstances.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة تقييمًا لمجموعة واسعة من نماذج تقدير الجودة المتقدمة على مستوى الجملة ، بما في ذلك انحدار ناقل الدعم ، وانحدار الركوب ، والشبكات العصبية ، والعمليات الغاوسية ، والشبكات العصبية البايزية ، والتعلم العميق للنواة ، والعمليات الغوسية العميقة. إلى جانب الدقة ، فإن اهتماماتنا الرئيسية هي أيضًا متانة نماذج تقدير الجودة. يثير عملنا صعوبة بناء نماذج قوية. على وجه التحديد ، نوضح أن نماذج تقدير الجودة غالبًا ما تتصرف بشكل مختلف في مساحة ميزة تقدير الجودة ، اعتمادًا على ما إذا كان حجم مساحة الميزة صغيرًا أم متوسطًا أم كبيرًا. نوضح أيضًا أن نماذج تقدير الجودة غالبًا ما تتصرف بشكل مختلف في إعدادات التقييم ، اعتمادًا على ما إذا كانت بيانات الاختبار تأتي من نفس المجال مثل بيانات التدريب أم لا. يقترح عملنا عدة مرشحين أقوياء لاستخدامهم في ظروف مختلفة.', 'pt': 'Este artigo fornece uma avaliação de uma ampla gama de modelos avançados de Estimativa de Qualidade em nível de sentença, incluindo Regressão de vetor de suporte, Regressão de passeio, Redes neurais, Processos gaussianos, Redes neurais bayesianas, Aprendizado de kernel profundo e Processos gaussianos profundos. Além da precisão, nossas principais preocupações são também a robustez dos modelos de Estimativa de Qualidade. Nosso trabalho levanta a dificuldade de construir modelos fortes. Especificamente, mostramos que os modelos de estimativa de qualidade geralmente se comportam de maneira diferente no espaço de recursos de estimativa de qualidade, dependendo se a escala do espaço de recursos é pequena, média ou grande. Também mostramos que os modelos de estimativa de qualidade geralmente se comportam de maneira diferente em configurações de avaliação, dependendo se os dados de teste vêm do mesmo domínio dos dados de treinamento ou não. Nosso trabalho sugere vários candidatos fortes para usar em diferentes circunstâncias.', 'fr': "Cet article fournit une évaluation d'un large éventail de modèles avancés d'estimation de la qualité au niveau de la phrase, y compris la régression vectorielle de support, la régression de trajet, les réseaux de neurones, les processus gaussiens, les réseaux neuronaux bayésiens, l'apprentissage par noyau profond et les processus gaussiens profonds. Outre la précision, nos principales préoccupations concernent également la robustesse des modèles d'estimation de la qualité. Notre travail soulève la difficulté de construire des modèles solides. Plus précisément, nous montrons que les modèles d'estimation de la qualité se comportent souvent différemment dans l'espace des entités d'estimation de la qualité, selon que l'échelle de l'espace des entités est petite, moyenne ou grande. Nous montrons également que les modèles d'estimation de la qualité se comportent souvent différemment dans les paramètres d'évaluation, selon que les données de test proviennent du même domaine que les données d'entraînement ou non. Notre travail suggère plusieurs candidats solides à utiliser dans différentes circonstances.", 'es': 'Este artículo proporciona una evaluación de una amplia gama de modelos avanzados de estimación de calidad a nivel de oración, que incluyen regresión vectorial de soporte, regresión de paseo, redes neuronales, procesos gaussianos, redes neuronales bayesianas, aprendizaje profundo del núcleo y procesos gaussianos profundos. Además de la precisión, nuestras principales preocupaciones también son la solidez de los modelos de estimación de calidad. Nuestro trabajo plantea la dificultad de construir modelos sólidos. Específicamente, mostramos que los modelos de estimación de calidad a menudo se comportan de manera diferente en el espacio de características de estimación de calidad, dependiendo de si la escala del espacio de características es pequeña, mediana o grande. También mostramos que los modelos de estimación de calidad a menudo se comportan de manera diferente en los entornos de evaluación, dependiendo de si los datos de las pruebas provienen del mismo dominio que los datos de entrenamiento o no. Nuestro trabajo sugiere varios candidatos fuertes para usar en diferentes circunstancias.', 'ja': '本論文は、サポートベクトル回帰、ライド回帰、ニューラルネットワーク、ガウス過程、ベイズニューラルネットワーク、ディープカーネル学習、ディープガウス過程を含む、幅広い高度な文章レベルの品質推定モデルの評価を提供する。正確性に加えて、当社の主な懸念は、品質推定モデルの堅牢性です。私たちの仕事は、強力なモデルを構築することの難しさを引き起こします。具体的には、品質推定モデルは、特徴空間のスケールが小さいか、中規模か、大規模かに応じて、品質推定特徴空間で異なる挙動を示すことが多い。また、品質推定モデルは、テストデータがトレーニングデータと同じドメインから来ているかどうかに応じて、評価設定で異なる挙動を示すことがよくあります。私たちの仕事は、さまざまな状況で使用する強力な候補者をいくつか提案しています。', 'zh': '本文于诸高句级量模形为质,其支向量归、骑乘归、神经网络、高斯、贝叶斯神经网络、深度核学、深度高斯之事。 自准确性之外,关注者犹有质量模形之稳健性。 我事增立强模难。 吾言量形于量空中者,小中大也。 又明质料形于估设之中者常不同,在测试数据与训练之数同域。 臣等议用数强药。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर उन्नत वाक्य-स्तर के गुणवत्ता आकलन मॉडल की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला का मूल्यांकन प्रदान करता है, जिसमें समर्थन वेक्टर प्रतिगमन, सवारी प्रतिगमन, तंत्रिका नेटवर्क, गाऊसी प्रक्रियाएं, बायेसियन न्यूरल नेटवर्क, डीप कर्नेल लर्निंग और डीप गॉसियन प्रक्रियाएं शामिल हैं। सटीकता के अलावा, हमारी मुख्य चिंताएं गुणवत्ता अनुमान मॉडल की मजबूती भी हैं। हमारा काम मजबूत मॉडल बनाने में कठिनाई को बढ़ाता है। विशेष रूप से, हम दिखाते हैं कि गुणवत्ता आकलन मॉडल अक्सर गुणवत्ता अनुमान सुविधा स्थान में अलग-अलग व्यवहार करते हैं, यह इस बात पर निर्भर करता है कि फीचर स्पेस का पैमाना छोटा, मध्यम या बड़ा है या नहीं। हम यह भी दिखाते हैं कि गुणवत्ता आकलन मॉडल अक्सर मूल्यांकन सेटिंग्स में अलग-अलग व्यवहार करते हैं, यह इस बात पर निर्भर करता है कि परीक्षण डेटा प्रशिक्षण डेटा के समान डोमेन से आता है या नहीं। हमारा काम विभिन्न परिस्थितियों में उपयोग करने के लिए कई मजबूत उम्मीदवारों का सुझाव देता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье дается оценка широкого спектра передовых моделей оценки качества на уровне предложений, включая поддержку векторной регрессии, регрессии Ride, нейронных сетей, гауссовых процессов, байесовских нейронных сетей, глубокого обучения ядра и глубоких гауссовых процессов. Помимо точности, наши основные проблемы также связаны с надежностью моделей оценки качества. Наша работа вызывает трудности в построении сильных моделей. В частности, мы показываем, что модели оценки качества часто ведут себя по-разному в пространстве признаков оценки качества в зависимости от того, является ли пространство признаков малым, средним или большим. Мы также показываем, что модели оценки качества часто ведут себя по-разному в настройках оценки в зависимости от того, поступают ли тестовые данные из той же области, что и учебные данные, или нет. Наша работа предлагает несколько сильных кандидатов для использования в различных обстоятельствах.', 'ga': 'Soláthraíonn an páipéar seo meastóireacht ar raon leathan samhlacha Ardleibhéil Meastacháin Cáilíochta, lena n-áirítear Cúlchéimniú Veicteoir Tacaíochta, Cúlchéimniú Taistil, Líonraí Néaracha, Próisis Ghausacha, Líonraí Néaracha Bayesian, Foghlaim Eithne Dhomhain agus Próisis Dhomhain-Ghúiseacha. In aice leis an cruinneas, is iad na príomhábhair imní atá againn ná stóinseacht na múnlaí Meastachán Cáilíochta. Ardaíonn ár gcuid oibre an deacracht a bhaineann le samhlacha láidre a thógáil. Go sonrach, léirímid go n-iompraíonn samhlacha Meastachán Cáilíochta go minic go difriúil i spás gné Meastachán Cáilíochta, ag brath ar cibé an bhfuil scála an spáis gné beag, meánach nó mór. Léirímid freisin go n-iompraíonn samhlacha Meastacháin Cáilíochta ar bhealach difriúil go minic i suíomhanna meastóireachta, ag brath ar cibé an dtagann sonraí tástála ón bhfearann céanna leis na sonraí oiliúna nó nach dtagann. Molann ár gcuid oibre roinnt iarrthóirí láidre le húsáid i gcúinsí éagsúla.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány a fejlett mondatszintű minőségbecslési modellek széles skálájának értékelését tartalmazza, beleértve a támogató vektoros regressziót, Ride regressziót, Neurális hálózatokat, Gauss folyamatokat, Bayesiai neurális hálózatokat, Deep mag tanulást és Deep Gauss folyamatokat. A pontosság mellett a minőségbecslési modellek robusztussága is fő aggodalmunk. Munkánk felveti az erős modellek kiépítésének nehézségét. Konkrétan azt mutatjuk, hogy a Minőségbecslési modellek gyakran eltérően viselkednek a Minőségbecslési funkciótérben attól függően, hogy a funkciótér mérete kicsi, közepes vagy nagy. Azt is megmutatjuk, hogy a minőségbecslési modellek gyakran eltérően viselkednek az értékelési beállításokban, attól függően, hogy a tesztadatok ugyanarról a területről származnak-e, mint a képzési adatok. Munkánk több erős jelöltet javasol különböző körülmények között.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρέχει μια αξιολόγηση ενός ευρέος φάσματος προηγμένων μοντέλων εκτίμησης ποιότητας σε επίπεδο προτάσεων, συμπεριλαμβανομένων της υποβάθμισης διανυσματικών σημάτων υποστήριξης, της υποβάθμισης οδήγησης, των νευρωνικών δικτύων, των Gaussian Processes, των Bayesian Neuroral Networks, της βαθιάς μάθησης πυρήνων και των βαθέων Gaussian Processes. Εκτός από την ακρίβεια, οι κυριότερες ανησυχίες μας είναι επίσης η ανθεκτικότητα των μοντέλων Εκτίμησης Ποιότητας. Η δουλειά μας αυξάνει τη δυσκολία στην κατασκευή ισχυρών μοντέλων. Συγκεκριμένα, δείχνουμε ότι τα μοντέλα εκτίμησης ποιότητας συχνά συμπεριφέρονται διαφορετικά στο χώρο χαρακτηριστικών εκτίμησης ποιότητας, ανάλογα με το αν η κλίμακα του χώρου χαρακτηριστικών είναι μικρή, μεσαία ή μεγάλη. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι τα μοντέλα εκτίμησης ποιότητας συχνά συμπεριφέρονται διαφορετικά στις ρυθμίσεις αξιολόγησης, ανάλογα με το αν τα δεδομένα δοκιμής προέρχονται από τον ίδιο τομέα με τα δεδομένα κατάρτισης ή όχι. Η εργασία μας προτείνει πολλούς ισχυρούς υποψήφιους για χρήση σε διαφορετικές συνθήκες.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი განსაზღვრებას უფრო დიდი განსაზღვრებული წესების კვალეტის განსაზღვრების მოდელების განსაზღვრება, რომლებიც დახმარება გვექტორის რეგრესი, რეგრესი, ნეიროლური ქსელი, დაუსიანის პროცესები, ნეიროლური ქსელი,  დამატებით, ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი დარწმუნება კვალეტური განსაზღვრების მოდელების ძალიან ძალიან. ჩვენი სამუშაო უფრო ძალიან მოდელეების შექმნაში გაზრუნდება. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ კვალეტის განსაკუთრებული მოდელები ძალიან განსხვავებულია კვალეტის განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებული განსაკ ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ კვალეტის განსაზღვრების მოდელები ზოგიერთად განსხვავებულია განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებულია, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია განსაზ ჩვენი სამუშაო მუშაობა რამდენიმე ძალიან კანდიდენტები გამოყენება განსხვავებულ სურათში.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз кеңейтілген сөз деңгейіндегі көптеген сапатты оқу үлгілерін бағалады, қолдау вектордың регрессиясы, регрессиясы, нейрондық желі, гаусия процесстері, бейесия нейрондық желі, тұтас Kernel оқу және қалыпты гаусия процесстері. Біздің негізгі маңыздылығымыз да сапалық оқу үлгілерінің құндылығы. Біздің жұмысамыз күшті моделдерді құру қиындығын өзгертеді. Сәйкес, біз сапатты бағалау үлгілерін сапатты бағалау мүмкіндіктерінің кеңістіктерінің масштабы кішкентай, орташа немесе үлкен кеңістіктеріне тәуелді деп көрсетедік. Мұндай-ақ біз сапаттық оқу үлгілерін оқу параметрлерінде әртүрлі әртүрлі әртүрлі әрекеттерді көрсетедік. Тест деректері оқу деректерінің бір доменден келген немесе емес дегенге Біздің жұмысамыз бірнеше күшті кандидаттарды түрлі жағдайда қолдануға мүмкіндік береді.', 'it': "Questo articolo fornisce una valutazione di una vasta gamma di modelli avanzati di stima della qualità a livello di frase, tra cui regressione vettoriale di supporto, regressione di ride, reti neurali, processi gaussiani, reti neurali bayesiane, apprendimento profondo del kernel e processi gaussiani profondi. Oltre all'accuratezza, le nostre principali preoccupazioni sono anche la robustezza dei modelli di stima della qualità. Il nostro lavoro solleva la difficoltà di costruire modelli forti. Nello specifico, mostriamo che i modelli di stima della qualità spesso si comportano in modo diverso nello spazio delle funzionalità di stima della qualità, a seconda che la scala dello spazio delle funzionalità sia piccola, media o grande. Mostriamo anche che i modelli di valutazione della qualità spesso si comportano in modo diverso nelle impostazioni di valutazione, a seconda che i dati di test provengano dallo stesso dominio dei dati di formazione o meno. Il nostro lavoro suggerisce diversi candidati forti da utilizzare in circostanze diverse.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiamas įvairių pažangių sakinių lygio kokybės vertinimo modelių, įskaitant paramos vektorių regresiją, važiavimo regresiją, nervinius tinklus, Gauzijos procesus, Bayezijos nervinius tinklus, gilaus branduolio mokymąsi ir gilaus gausijos procesus, vertinimas. Beside the accurateness, our main concerns are also the robustness of Quality Estimation models.  Mūsų darbas kelia sunkumų kuriant tvirtus modelius. Konkrečiai rodome, kad kokybės vertinimo modeliai dažnai elgiasi skirtingai kokybės vertinimo savybių erdvėje, priklausomai nuo to, ar savybių erdvės mastas yra mažas, vidutinis ar didelis. Taip pat rodome, kad kokybės vertinimo modeliai vertinimo sąlygose dažnai elgiasi skirtingai, priklausomai nuo to, ar bandymų duomenys yra iš tos pačios srities kaip ir mokymo duomenys. Mūsų darbe siūloma skirtingomis aplinkybėmis naudoti keletą stiprių kandidatų.', 'mk': 'Овој документ обезбедува проценка на широк опсег на напредни модели за проценка на квалитетот на ниво на реченици, вклучително и поддршка на регресијата на векторите, регресијата на возењето, невралните мрежи, гаусските процеси, бејезиските неврални мрежи, длабоко научување на јадрото и длабоко Покрај точноста, нашите главни загрижености се и силноста на моделите за проценка на квалитетот. Нашата работа ја зголемува тешкотијата во изградбата на силни модели. Специфично, покажуваме дека моделите за проценка на квалитетот честопати се однесуваат различно во просторот за проценка на квалитетот, во зависност од тоа дали скалата на просторот за проценка на квалитетот е мала, средна или голема. Исто така покажуваме дека моделите за проценка на квалитетот честопати се однесуваат различно во поставувањата за проценка, во зависност од тоа дали тестовите податоци доаѓаат од истиот домен како податоците за обука или не. Нашата работа предлага неколку силни кандидати за користење во различни околности.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menyediakan penilaian bagi julat luas model penilaian kualiti tahap kalimat kalimat maju, termasuk Regresi Vektor Sokongan, Regresi Naik, Rangkaian Neural, Proses Gaussian, Rangkaian Neural Bayesian, Pembelajaran Kernel Dalam dan Proses Gaussian Dalam. Selain ketepatan, kebimbangan utama kita juga adalah kepekatan model penilaian Kualiti. Kerja kami meningkatkan kesulitan untuk membina model yang kuat. Secara khusus, kami menunjukkan bahawa model Perkiraan Kualiti sering bertindak berbeza dalam ruang ciri-ciri Perkiraan Kualiti, bergantung sama ada skala ruang ciri-ciri kecil, tengah atau besar. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa model penilaian kualiti sering bertindak berbeza dalam tetapan penilaian, bergantung sama ada data ujian berasal dari domain yang sama dengan data latihan atau tidak. Kerja kami menyarankan beberapa calon kuat untuk digunakan dalam keadaan yang berbeza.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d വികസിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളുടെ മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d രെഗ്രേഷന്\u200d, റൈഡ് റിഗ്രേഷന്\u200d, നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d, ബെയിസിയന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200d സത്യത്തെക്കൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ആലോചിക്കുന്നത് മാതൃകയുടെ ഗുണപൂര്\u200dവ്വം എസ്റ്റിമേഷന്\u200d മോഡ നമ്മുടെ ജോലി ശക്തിയുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d പണിയുന്നതില്\u200d കഷ്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നു ഗുണപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ എസ്റ്റിമേഷന്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പലപ്പോഴും വ്യത്യസ്തമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു, പ We also show that Quality Estimation models often behave differently in evaluation settings, depending on whether test data come from the same domain as the training data or not.  നമ്മുടെ ജോലി പല ശക്തിയുള്ള പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും വ്യത്യസ്ത സാഹചര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d പ', 'mt': 'This paper provides an evaluation of a wide range of advanced sentence-level Quality Estimation models, including Support Vector Regression, Ride Regression, Neural Networks, Gaussian Processes, Bayesian Neural Networks, Deep Kernel Learning and Deep Gaussian Processes.  Minbarra l-preċiżjoni, it-tħassib ewlieni tagħna huwa wkoll ir-robustezza tal-mudelli tal-istima tal-kwalità. Ix-xogħol tagħna jqajjem id-diffikultà fil-bini ta’ mudelli b’saħħithom. Speċifikament, nuru li l-mudelli tal-istima tal-kwalità ta’ spiss jaġixxu b’mod differenti fl-ispazju tal-karatteristiċi tal-istima tal-kwalità, skont jekk l-iskala tal-ispazju tal-karatteristiċi hijiex żgħira, medja jew kbira. Aħna nuru wkoll li mudelli ta’ Stima tal-Kwalità ta’ spiss jaġixxu b’mod differenti fl-ambjenti ta’ evalwazzjoni, skont jekk id-dejta tat-test ġewx mill-istess qasam bħad-dejta tat-taħriġ jew le. Ix-xogħol tagħna jissuġġerixxi diversi kandidati b’saħħithom biex jintużaw f’ċirkostanzi differenti.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь хэвлэлийн хэмжээний хөгжүүлсэн хэмжээний хэмжээний сайн багасгах загваруудыг шалгаж өгдөг. Үнэндээ, бидний гол асуудал нь чадварын тооцоолох загварын чадвартай байдал юм. Бидний ажил хүчтэй загваруудыг бүтээхэд хэцүү болгодог. Ялангуяа, бид Quality Estimation загварууд нь квалификацийн Estimation feature space дээр ихэвчлэн өөр өөрчлөгдөж байгааг харуулдаг. Бид мөн чадварын тооцоолох загварууд үнэлгээний тооцоололд өөр өөрчлөлт хийдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Тест өгөгдлийг сургалтын өгөгдлийн эсэхээс хамааралтай. Бидний ажил өөр нөхцөлд хэрэглэх хэд хэдэн хүчтэй удирдагчид сануулдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret gjev eit evaluering av eit brett område av avanserte setningsverdievalueringsmodeller, inkludert støtte vektorregresjon, Ride Regresjon, Neuralnettverk, Gaussianske prosessar, Bayesianske neuralnettverk, dypskjernelæring og dypske Gaussianske prosessar. I tillegg til nøyaktigheten er hovudbekymringane våre også kraftigheten av kvalitetevalueringsmodeller. Arbeidet vårt hevar vanskeligheten i å bygge sterke modeller. Spesielt viser vi at kvalitetevalueringsmodeller ofte behaver forskjellig i kvalitetevalueringsplass, avhengig av om skala på funksjonsplass er lite, medium eller stor. Vi viser også at kvalitetevalueringsmodeller ofte behaver ulike i evalueringsinnstillingar, avhengig av om test data kommer frå same domene som opplæringsdata eller ikkje. Arbeidet vårt foreslår fleire sterke kandidater å bruka i ulike omstandar.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł zawiera ocenę szerokiego zakresu zaawansowanych modeli oceny jakości na poziomie zdań, w tym wsparcia regresji wektorowej, regresji jazdy, sieci neuronowych, procesów Gaussowskich, Bayesowskich sieci neuronowych, głębokiego uczenia się jądra i procesów głębokich Gaussowskich. Poza dokładnością, naszym głównym problemem jest również solidność modeli oceny jakości. Nasza praca zwiększa trudności w budowaniu silnych modeli. W szczególności pokazujemy, że modele oceny jakości często zachowują się inaczej w przestrzeni cech oceny jakości, w zależności od tego, czy skala przestrzeni cech jest mała, średnia czy duża. Pokazujemy również, że modele oceny jakości często zachowują się inaczej w ustawieniach oceny, w zależności od tego, czy dane testowe pochodzą z tej samej domeny co dane treningowe, czy nie. Nasza praca sugeruje kilku silnych kandydatów do wykorzystania w różnych okolicznościach.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir pruža procjenu širokog niza naprednih modela za procjenu kvalitete na nivou rečenica, uključujući regresiju vektora podrške, regresiju jahanja, nervne mreže, Gausijske procese, Bejzijanske neurone mreže, duboko učenje kernela i duboke Gausijske procese. Pored tačnosti, naša glavna briga su takođe robotnost modela procjene kvalitete. Naš rad podiže teškoće u izgradnji jakih modela. Posebno pokazujemo da se modeli procjene kvalitete često ponašaju drugačije u prostoru kvalitete procjene, ovisno o tome da li je skala svemira mala, srednja ili velika. Takođe pokazujemo da se modeli procjene kvalitete često ponašaju drugačije u nastavama procjene, ovisno o tome da li podaci testova dolaze iz istog domena kao podaci o obuci ili ne. Naš rad predlaže nekoliko jakih kandidata da koriste u različitim okolnostima.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare oferă o evaluare a unei game largi de modele avansate de estimare a calității la nivel de propoziții, inclusiv Regresia Vectorului de Suport, Regresia Ride, Rețelele Neurale, Procesele Gaussiene, Rețelele Neurale Bayesiane, Învățarea Deep Kernel și Procesele Gaussiane profunde. Pe lângă acuratețe, principalele noastre preocupări sunt și robustețea modelelor de estimare a calității. Munca noastră ridică dificultatea de a construi modele puternice. În mod specific, arătăm că modelele de estimare a calității se comportă adesea diferit în spațiul caracteristicilor de estimare a calității, în funcție de dimensiunea spațiului caracteristicilor este mică, medie sau mare. De asemenea, demonstrăm că modelele de estimare a calității se comportă adesea diferit în setările de evaluare, în funcție de faptul că datele de testare provin din același domeniu ca datele de formare sau nu. Munca noastră sugerează mai mulți candidați puternici pentru a utiliza în diferite circumstanțe.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා වාර්තාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ විශේෂ මෝඩේලය, උදව්වක වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, රිඩ් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, න්\u200dය හරියටම, අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි කුළුවත් අනුමාණ විශ්වාස විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපේ වැඩේ බලාපොරොත්තු මොඩේල් හදන්න අමාරුයි. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කුළුවත් අනුමාණය විශේෂ මොඩේල්ස් වෙනස් විශේෂ විශේෂ අනුමාණයේ වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්  අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කුළුවත් අනුමාණය අනුමාණය අනුමාණය නිර්මාණය වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වි අපේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා වෙනස් අවස්ථාවක් වලින් පාවිච්චි කරන්න.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan wuxuu qiimeynayaa tusaalooyin kala duduwan tijaabada qiimo-quality Estimation, including Support Vector Regression, Ride Regression, Neural Networks, Gaussian Processes, Bayesian Neural Networks, Deep Kernel Learning and Deep Gaussian Processes. Xaqiiqnimada ka sokow, xisaabtanada ugu horeeya waa qalabka xisaabta qiimaanta. Shaqo-keenistayagu wuxuu kor u qaadaa dhibaatada dhisidda modelal xoog leh. Si gaar ah, waxaynu muujinnaa in qaababka xisaabta qiimaanshaha inta badan si kala duwan u dhaqdhaqaaqno goobta qiyaastiga, waxaan ku xiran nahay qiyaastii cirka gaarka ah inuu yar yahay, dhexe ama wayn yahay. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in tusaalayaasha xisaabta qiimeynta qiimeynta inta badan ay u dhaqdhaqaaqsadaan si kala duwan, iyadoo ku xiran, in macluumaadka imtixaanka looga yimaado hal domain oo kale sida macluumaadka waxbarashada ama aysan ahayn. Shaqo-bixinta waxaa looga jeedinayaa qaar madaxweyne ah inay isticmaalaan xaaladaha kala duduwan.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats ger en utvﾃ､rdering av ett brett spektrum av avancerade meningsnivﾃ･ kvalitetsestimeringsmodeller, inklusive Support Vector Regression, Ride Regression, Neural Networks, Gaussian Processes, Bayesian Neural Networks, Deep Kernel Learning och Deep Gaussian Processes. Fﾃｶrutom noggrannheten ﾃ､r vﾃ･ra frﾃ､msta bekymmer ocksﾃ･ robustheten hos kvalitetsberﾃ､kningsmodeller. Vﾃ･rt arbete ﾃｶkar svﾃ･righeten att bygga starka modeller. Specifikt visar vi att kvalitetsestimeringsmodeller ofta beter sig annorlunda i funktionsutrymmet fﾃｶr kvalitetsestimering, beroende pﾃ･ om funktionsutrymmet ﾃ､r liten, medelstor eller stor. Vi visar ocksﾃ･ att kvalitetsberﾃ､kningsmodeller ofta beter sig annorlunda i utvﾃ､rderingsinstﾃ､llningar, beroende pﾃ･ om testdata kommer frﾃ･n samma domﾃ､n som trﾃ､ningsdata eller inte. Vﾃ･rt arbete fﾃｶreslﾃ･r flera starka kandidater att anvﾃ､nda under olika omstﾃ､ndigheter.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் ஒரு முன்னேற்றப்பட்ட வாக்கின் தரம் நிலையான கணக்கீட்டு மாதிரிகளின் மதிப்பெண்களைக் கொடுக்கும், ஆதரவு வெக்டர் கடிகாரத்தைக் கூடும், ரைட் பதிவு, நெயுரால் நெடுவர்க்கள், காஸ்சியன் செ சரியாக இருந்தால், எங்கள் முக்கிய கவலைகள் தான் தரம் கணக்கீடு மாதிரிகளின் ஆட்டம். எங்கள் வேலை வலிமை மாதிரிகளை உருவாக்கும் கடினம் உயர்த்துகிறது. குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் குறிப்பிட்டு காட்டுகிறோம் தரம் கணக்கீட்டு மாதிரிகள் பெரும்பாலும் தரம் கணக்கீடு குணங்கள் வெளியில் வேறுபட்டு தரம் கணக்கீட்டு மாதிரிகள் பெரும்பாலும் மதிப்பெண் மாதிரிகள் மதிப்பெண் மாதிரியாக நடக்கும், சோதனை தகவல் பயிற்சி தகவல் போன்ற ஒரே த எங்கள் வேலை பல வலிமையான தேர்வாளர்கள் வேறு நிலைகளில் பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு பரிந்துரைக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'This paper provides an evaluation of a wide range of advanced sentence-level Quality Estimation models, including Support Vector Regression, Ride Regression, Neural Networks, Gaussian Processes, Bayesian Neural Networks, Deep Kernel Learning and Deep Gaussian Processes. دقیق کے علاوہ، ہماری اصلی نگرانی بھی کیفیت کی ارزش نمونوں کی قوت ہے۔ ہمارا کام مضبوط مدل بنانے کے لئے مشکل ہے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ کیلوٹی آسانی موڈل کبھی گوارتی آسانی آسانی جگہ میں مختلف طریقے کے ساتھ عمل کرتے ہیں، اس پر مطمئن ہوتے ہیں کہ کیلوٹی آسانی جگہ چھوٹی، میڈی یا بڑی جگہ ہے. ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ کیلوٹی آزمائش موڈل اکثر آزمائش سیٹیوں میں مختلف طریقے کے ساتھ عمل کرتے ہیں، اس پر مضبوط ہے کہ آزمائش ڈاٹی ایسی دامنی سے آتی ہے جیسے آزمائش ڈاٹی کے ساتھ یا نہ آتی ہے. ہمارا کام مختلف شرایطوں میں استعمال کرنے کے لئے بہت سی طاقتور کاندیدٹوں کو پیش کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qoʻllar qoʻllanmalar, Vektor boshqarish, Rid Regression, Neural Network, Gaussian vazifalar, Bayesian Neural Tarmoqlari, Kernel ta'lim va Deep Gaussian vazifalar bilan qoʻllaniladi. Tasdiqlik bilan, bizning asosiy haqida o'ylaymiz Quality Estimation modellarining o'xshasi. Bizning ishimiz sterk modellarni yaratishga qiyin beradi. Ko'rsatganda, Quality Estimatsiya modellari ko'p holatda o'zgarishni ko'rsatdik, xossalar boʻsh joy chegarasi kichkina, o'rtacha yoki katta boʻlishi mumkin. Шунингдек, Биз ҳам кўрсатамиз, сифат сифатлаш мосламалари домендан маълумотлар келишини ёки манфаатли маълумотлардан кейинги ўзгартиришларни тафаккур қилишга қарамаймиз. Our work suggests several strong candidates to use in different circumstances.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cung cấp một đánh giá rộng của một loạt các mẫu cung cấp cấp cấp cấp độ lượng cao, bao gồm hỗ trợ kềm chế, kỵ phục hồi, mạng thần kinh, tiến trình kiểu Gauss, mạng thần kinh Bayisian, Deep Kernel Learning và Deep Gauss Quá trình. Bên cạnh độ chính xác, mối quan tâm chính của chúng ta cũng là sự bền vững của mô hình ước lượng Chất lượng. Công việc của chúng tôi làm tăng khó khăn trong việc tạo ra những mẫu mạnh. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi cho thấy các mô hình ước lượng Chất lượng thường hành xử khác nhau trong khoảng trống của tính toán Chất lượng, tùy thuộc vào độ rộng của khoảng trống đặc trưng nhỏ, vừa nhỏ hay lớn. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy các mô hình ước lượng Chất lượng thường hành xử khác nhau trong các thiết lập đánh giá, tùy thuộc vào việc liệu thử nghiệm có đến từ cùng miền với dữ liệu đào tạo hay không. Công việc của chúng tôi gợi ý nhiều ứng viên mạnh mẽ để sử dụng trong hoàn cảnh khác.', 'bg': 'Тази статия предоставя оценка на широка гама от усъвършенствани модели за оценка на качеството на ниво изречение, включително подкрепа на векторна регресия, регресия на езда, неврални мрежи, гауси процеси, баезийски неврални мрежи, дълбоко изучаване на ядра и дълбоки гауси процеси. Освен точността, основните ни притеснения са и здравината на моделите за оценка на качеството. Работата ни повдига трудността при изграждането на силни модели. По-конкретно, ние показваме, че моделите за оценка на качеството често се държат различно в функционалното пространство за оценка на качеството, в зависимост от това дали мащабът на функционалното пространство е малък, среден или голям. Показваме също, че моделите за оценка на качеството често се държат различно в настройките за оценка, в зависимост от това дали данните от теста идват от същата област като данните за обучение или не. Работата ни предлага няколко силни кандидата, които да се използват при различни обстоятелства.', 'da': 'Denne artikel giver en evaluering af en lang række avancerede sætningsniveau kvalitetsestimeringsmodeller, herunder Support Vector Regression, Ride Regression, Neural Networks, Gaussian Processes, Bayesian Neural Networks, Deep Kernel Learning og Deep Gaussian Processes. Ud over nøjagtigheden er vores vigtigste bekymringer også robustheden af kvalitetsestimeringsmodeller. Vores arbejde rejser vanskelighederne med at opbygge stærke modeller. Specielt viser vi, at kvalitetsestimeringsmodeller ofte opfører sig anderledes i kvalitetsestimeringsfunktionsrummet, afhængigt af om omfanget af funktionsrummet er lille, medium eller stor. Vi viser også, at kvalitetsestimeringsmodeller ofte opfører sig anderledes i evalueringsindstillinger, afhængigt af om testdata kommer fra samme domæne som træningsdata eller ej. Vores arbejde foreslår flere stærke kandidater at bruge under forskellige omstændigheder.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit bietet eine Evaluation einer breiten Palette von fortgeschrittenen Qualit채tssch채tzungsmodellen auf Satzebene, einschlie횩lich Support Vector Regression, Ride Regression, Neuronale Netzwerke, Gau횩sche Prozesse, Bayesische neuronale Netzwerke, Deep Kernel Learning und Deep Gau횩 Prozesse. Neben der Genauigkeit sind unsere Hauptanliegen auch die Robustheit von Qualit채tssch채tzungsmodellen. Unsere Arbeit erh철ht die Schwierigkeit, starke Modelle zu bauen. Insbesondere zeigen wir, dass sich Qualit채tsmodelle im Qualit채tsmessungsraum h채ufig unterschiedlich verhalten, je nachdem, ob die Skala des Funktionsraums klein, mittel oder gro횩 ist. Wir zeigen auch, dass sich Qualit채tsmodelle in Evaluationseinstellungen oft unterschiedlich verhalten, je nachdem, ob Testdaten aus der gleichen Dom채ne wie die Trainingsdaten stammen oder nicht. Unsere Arbeit schl채gt mehrere starke Kandidaten vor, die unter verschiedenen Umst채nden eingesetzt werden k철nnen.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja procjenu širokog raspona naprednih modela procjene kvalitete na razini rečenica, uključujući regresiju vektora podrške, regresiju vagona, neuronske mreže, Gausijske procese, Neuralne mreže Bayesijske mreže, duboko učenje kernela i duboke Gausijske procese. Osim točnosti, naša glavna briga su i robotnost modela procjene kvalitete. Naš rad povećava teškoće u izgradnji jakih modela. Posebno, pokazujemo da se modeli procjene kvalitete često ponašaju drugačije u prostoru kvalitetne procjene, ovisno o tome da li je skala funkcionalnog prostora mala, srednja ili velika. Također pokazujemo da se modeli procjene kvalitete često ponašaju drugačije u postavkama procjene, ovisno o tome da li podaci testova dolaze iz istog domena kao podaci o obuci ili ne. Naš rad predlaže nekoliko jakih kandidata da koriste u različitim okolnostima.', 'nl': 'Dit document biedt een evaluatie van een breed scala aan geavanceerde kwaliteitsschattingsmodellen op zinnenniveau, waaronder ondersteuning vectorregressie, ritregressie, neurale netwerken, Gaussiaanse processen, Bayesiaanse neurale netwerken, diep kernel leren en diepe Gaussiaanse processen. Naast de nauwkeurigheid zijn onze belangrijkste zorgen ook de robuustheid van kwaliteitsschattingsmodellen. Ons werk verhoogt de moeilijkheid om sterke modellen te bouwen. Specifiek laten we zien dat Kwaliteitsschattingsmodellen zich vaak anders gedragen in de kenmerkenruimte Kwaliteitsschatting, afhankelijk van of de schaal van de kenmerkenruimte klein, gemiddeld of groot is. We laten ook zien dat Quality Estimation modellen zich vaak anders gedragen in evaluatieinstellingen, afhankelijk van of testdata uit hetzelfde domein komen als de trainingsdata of niet. Ons werk suggereert verschillende sterke kandidaten om in verschillende omstandigheden te gebruiken.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linatoa tathmini ya mifano yenye kiwango kikubwa cha Hesabu, ikiwa ni pamoja na Uthibitisho wa Kuunga mkono Vector Regression, Mapinduzi ya Mapinduzi, Mtandao wa Neural, Mashirika ya KiGaussia, Mtandao wa Neural wa Kibayesia, Mafunzo ya Kernel na Kirusia Kuu. Zaidi ya ukweli, wasiwasi wetu mkuu ni ukatili wa mifano ya Hesabu. Kazi yetu inaibua matatizo katika kujenga mifano yenye nguvu. Kwa ujumla, tunaonyesha kwamba mifano ya Hesabu mara nyingi hufanya tofauti katika nafasi yenye sifa za Hesabu, kutegemea ikiwa kiwango cha nafasi maalum ni ndogo, kati au kubwa. Tunaonyesha pia kuwa mifano ya Hesabu mara nyingi hufanya kazi tofauti katika mazingira ya uchunguzi, kutegemea ikiwa taarifa za jaribio zinakuja kutoka kwenye eneo hilo kama data za mafunzo au la. Kazi yetu inapendekeza wagombea kadhaa wenye nguvu kutumia katika mazingira tofauti.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menyediakan evaluasi dari jangkauan luas dari model penilaian kualitas tingkat kalimat yang maju, termasuk dukungan Regresi Vektor, Regresi Ride, Rangkaian Neural, Proses Gaussian, Rangkaian Neural Bayesian, Pelajaran Kernel Dalam dan Proses Gaussian Dalam. Selain ketepatan, kekhawatiran utama kita juga adalah kepekatan model Perkiraan Kualitas. Pekerjaan kami meningkatkan kesulitan dalam membangun model yang kuat. Secara spesifik, kami menunjukkan bahwa model Perkiraan Kualitas sering berperilaku berbeda dalam ruang karakteristik Perkiraan Kualitas, tergantung apakah skala ruang karakteristik kecil, medium atau besar. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa model Perkiraan Kualitas sering berperilaku berbeda dalam pengaturan evaluasi, tergantung apakah data tes berasal dari domain yang sama dengan data latihan atau tidak. Pekerjaan kami menunjukkan beberapa kandidat yang kuat untuk digunakan dalam keadaan yang berbeda.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک ارزیابی از مدل\u200cهای ارزیابی کیفیت سطح جمله پیشرفته را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند، شامل تأخیر ویکتورهای پشتیبانی، سرعت\u200cهای عصبی، پردازش\u200cهای گاوسی، شبکه\u200cهای عصبی بیزیان، یادگیری Kernel Deep and Deep Gaussian Processes. غیر از دقیق، نگرانی اصلی ما نیز دقت مدل ارزیابی کیفیت هستند. کار ما مشکل ساختن مدلهای قوی را بلند می کند. دقیقاً ما نشان می دهیم که مدلهای ارزیابی کیفیت اغلب در فضای ویژه\u200cهای ارزیابی کیفیت متفاوت رفتار می\u200cکنند، بستگی به مقیاس فضای ویژه کوچک، میانگین یا بزرگ است. ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که مدلهای ارزیابی کیفیت اغلب در تنظیمات ارزیابی متفاوت رفتار می کنند، بستگی به این است که داده های آزمایش از یک دامنه مانند داده های آموزش یا نه. کارمون به چند تا کاندیدای قوی پیشنهاد میده که در شرایط مختلف استفاده کنند.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz bir döwletlere gelişmiş sözlem derejesi ýüze çykyş nusgalaryny üýtgedýär Dyggat ýagdaýda, esasy soraglarymyz hökmünde quality Taýýarlyk nusgalarynyň güýçlidir. Biziň işimiz güýçli nusgalary gurmakda kyndyrýar. Adatça, Biz Quality Taýýarlama nusgalaryň köplenç Quality Taýýarlama feýsyýasynda görkezilýäni görkez. Biz hem Quality Taýýarlama nusgalarynyň köplenç deňlenme düzümlerinde üýtgeşmeleri ýöne-de test maglumatynyň bir domeniň üstünde bolup-da däl edilýändigini görkeýäris. Biziň işimiz birnäçe güýçli kandidyň dürli ýagdaýda ulanmagy maslahat berýär.', 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የደረጃ ቁጥር ቁጥር እና የግል ጉዳይ ሥርዓት ሞዴላዎችን ያስተካክላል፡፡ ከውነት በቀር የዋነታችን ምክንያት የብልሃት መቆጣጠር ዓይነት ነው፡፡ ሥራችን ብርቱ ምሳሌዎችን ለመሥራት ጭንቀትን ያቆማል፡፡ በተለያይነት፣ የጥብረት ማስታወቂያው ዓይነቶች ብዙ ጊዜ በተለየ ሥርዓት ክፍተት የሚደርስ እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ እንደዚህም እናሳያቸዋለን የጥያቄ ማስታወቂያ ዓይነቶች ብዙ ጊዜ በተለየ በማድረግ አስተዳደር ይደረጋሉ፡፡ ሥራችን በብዙ ኃይለኞች አማካሪዎችን በተለዩ ሁኔታ ለመጠቀም ይገልጻል፡፡', 'hy': 'This paper provides an evaluation of a wide range of advanced sentence-level Quality Estimation models, including Support Vector Regression, Ride Regression, Neural Networks, Gaussian Processes, Bayesian Neural Networks, Deep Kernel Learning and Deep Gaussian Processes.  Բացի ճշգրտության, մեր հիմնական անհանգստացումները նաև որակի գնահատման մոդելների կայունությունն են: Մեր աշխատանքը բարդ է դարձնում ուժեղ մոդելներ կառուցելու համար: Հատկապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ որակի գնահատման մոդելները հաճախ տարբերվում են որակի գնահատման հատկանիշների տարածքում, կախված նրանից, թե որակի տարածքի չափը փոքր, միջին կամ մեծ է: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ որակի գնահատման մոդելները հաճախ տարբերվում են գնահատման միջոցներում, կախված նրանից, թե արդյոք փորձարկման տվյալները գալիս են նույն ոլորտից, ինչպիսիք են վարժեցման տվյալները, թե ոչ: Մեր աշխատանքը առաջարկում է, որ մի քանի հզոր թեկնածուներ օգտագործեն տարբեր իրավիճակներում:', 'ko': '본고는 각종 선진적인 문장 품질 평가 모델에 대해 평가를 실시했는데 벡터 회귀 지원, 탑승 회귀, 신경 네트워크, 고스 과정, 베일스 신경 네트워크, 깊이 핵 학습과 깊이 고스 과정을 포함한다.정확성을 제외하고 우리가 주로 주목하는 것은 품질 평가 모델의 안정성이다.우리의 일은 강력한 모형을 세우는 데 어려움을 증가시켰다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 품질 평가 모델이 품질 평가 특징 공간에서의 표현이 종종 다르다는 것을 증명했다. 이것은 특징 공간의 규모가 작은지, 작은지, 크는지에 달려 있다.우리는 또한 품질 평가 모델이 평가 환경에서의 표현이 종종 다르다는 것을 보여준다. 이것은 테스트 데이터와 훈련 데이터가 같은 분야에서 왔는지에 달려 있다.우리의 업무는 서로 다른 상황에서 몇 명의 강력한 후보자를 사용하자고 건의한다.', 'af': "Hierdie papier verskaf 'n evaluering van' n wyse omvang van gevorderde seting- vlak kwaliteit evaluering modele, insluitend ondersteuning vektor regresie, Ride Regresie, Neurale Netwerke, Gaussie Prosesse, Bayesian Neurale Netwerke, Deep Kernel Leer en Deep Gaussie Prosesse. Ons hoofbelang is ook die kragtigheid van Kwaliteit Estimation models. Ons werk verwek die moeilikheid in die bou van sterke modele. Spesifieke, ons wys dat Kwaliteit Estimation models dikwels anders gedra in Kwaliteit Estimation funksie spasie, afhanklik van of die skaal van funksie spasie klein, middelste of groot is. Ons wys ook dat Kwaliteit Estimation models dikwels in evalueringsinstellings anders gedrag, afhang van of toets data van dieselfde domein kom as die onderwerp data of nie. Ons werk beveel verskeie sterke kandidate om in verskillende omstandighede te gebruik.", 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt, destek vekt√∂r Regresi, Ride Regression, Neural Networks, Gaussian Processes, Bayesian Neural Networks, Deep Kernel √Ėyr…ônm…ôsi v…ô Deep Gaussian Procesl…ôrinin √ßoxlu d…ôyiŇüiklik s…ôviyy…ôl…ôrinin deńüerlendirm…ôsini t…ômin edir. Dońürudan da, bizim baŇüqa m…ôxluqatńĪmńĪz h…ôm√ßinin Quality Estimation Modell…ôrinin s…ôrtliyidir. Bizim iŇüimiz g√ľcl√ľ modell…ôri in Ňüa etm…ôk √ß…ôtinlikl…ôrini artńĪrar. √Ėzellikle, biz Quality Estimation modell…ôrinin Kvalitat Estimation √∂zellikl…ôri boŇüluńüunda √ßox f…ôrqli davranńĪŇülarńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôririk, f…ôrqli boŇüluńüun √∂l√ß√ľs√ľ ki√ßik, orta ya da b√∂y√ľk olduńüuna bańülńĪ olaraq. Biz d…ô g√∂st…ôririk ki, t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn olduńüu kimi t…ôhsil m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn d…ôyiŇüm…ôsind…ôn v…ô ya yoxdur. Bizim iŇüimiz m√ľxt…ôlif Ňü…ôrtl…ôrd…ô istifad…ô etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn √ßox q√ľvv…ôtli kandidńĀtlarńĪ t…ôblińü edir.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument ofron një vlerësim të një game të gjerë modelesh të përparuar të vlerësimit të cilësisë në nivelin e dënimeve, duke përfshirë Regresionin e Vektorit të Mbështetjes, Regresionin e Udhëtimit, Rrjetet Neurale, Proceset Gauziane, Rrjetet Neurale Bayesiane, Mësimin e thellë të Kernelit dhe Proceset e thellë të Gauzianit. Përveç saktësisë, shqetësimet tona kryesore janë gjithashtu fuqia e modeleve të vlerësimit të cilësisë. Puna jonë rrit vështirësinë në ndërtimin e modeleve të forta. Veçanërisht, ne tregojmë se modelet e vlerësimit të cilësisë shpesh sillen ndryshe në hapësirën e vlerësimit të cilësisë, në varësi se shkalla e hapësirës së cilësisë është e vogël, e mesme apo e madhe. Ne gjithashtu tregojmë se modelet e vlerësimit të cilësisë sillen shpesh ndryshe në rregullimet e vlerësimit, në varësi se nëse të dhënat e testit vijnë nga e njëjta fushë si të dhënat e stërvitjes apo jo. Puna jonë sugjeron disa kandidatë të fortë për të përdorur në rrethana të ndryshme.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটি বিস্তারিত বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ব্যাপারে উন্নত কারাদণ্ড-স্তরের মান নির্ধারণ মডেল, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে সমর্থন ভেক্টর নিয়ন্ত্রণ, রাইড রেগ্রেশন, নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক, গাসিয়ান প্রক্রি সঠিকভাবে ছাড়াও, আমাদের প্রধান উদ্বেগ হচ্ছে মান গণনার মডেলের ধোঁকা। Our work raises the difficulty in building strong models.  বিশেষ করে, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে মান গণনার মডেল প্রায়শই মান গণনা বৈশিষ্ট্যের স্থানে ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাবে আচরণ করে, বৈশিষ্ট্যের স্থানের মাপ ছ আমরা একই সাথে দেখিয়ে দেখিয়েছি যে মান গণনার মডেল প্রায়শই মূল্যের বৈশিষ্ট্যে ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাবে আচরণ করে, নির্ভর করে টেস্ আমাদের কাজ অনেক শক্তিশালী প্রার্থীকে বিভিন্ন পরিস্থিতিতে ব্যবহার করার পরামর্শ দেয়।', 'cs': 'Tento článek poskytuje hodnocení široké škály pokročilých modelů odhadu kvality na úrovni věty, včetně podpory vektorové regrese, jízdní regrese, neuronové sítě, Gaussovské procesy, Bayesovské neuronové sítě, hluboké učení jádra a hluboké Gaussovské procesy. Kromě přesnosti je naším hlavním zájmem i robustnost modelů odhadu kvality. Naše práce zvyšuje obtížnost při budování silných modelů. Konkrétně ukazujeme, že modely odhadu kvality se často chovají odlišně v prostoru prvků odhadu kvality, v závislosti na tom, zda je rozsah prostoru prvků malý, střední nebo velký. Ukazujeme také, že modely odhadu kvality se často chovají v nastavení hodnocení odlišně, v závislosti na tom, zda testovací data pocházejí ze stejné domény jako tréninková data. Naše práce navrhuje několik silných kandidátů k použití v různých okolnostech.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö annab hinnangu paljudele täiustatud lausetasemel kvaliteedi hindamise mudelitele, sealhulgas toetusvektori regressioon, sõidu regressioon, neuraalsed võrgud, Gaussi protsessid, Bayesi neuraalsed võrgud, sügavkerneli õppimine ja sügavgaussi protsessid. Lisaks täpsusele on meie peamised mured ka kvaliteedi hindamise mudelite tugevus. Meie töö tõstab raskusi tugevate mudelite ehitamisel. Täpsemalt näitame, et kvaliteedi hindamise mudelid käituvad kvaliteedi hindamise funktsiooniruumis sageli erinevalt, sõltuvalt sellest, kas funktsiooniruumi ulatus on väike, keskmine või suur. Samuti näitame, et kvaliteedi hindamise mudelid käituvad hindamise seadetes sageli erinevalt, sõltuvalt sellest, kas testiandmed pärinevad samast valdkonnast kui koolitusandmed või mitte. Meie töö soovitab mitmeid tugevaid kandidaate kasutada erinevates tingimustes.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir pruža procjenu širokog niza naprednih modela za procjenu kvalitete na nivou kazne, uključujući regresiju vektora podrške, regresiju vagona, neuronske mreže, Gausijske procese, Neuralne mreže Bayesijske mreže, duboko učenje kernela i duboko Gausijske procese. Pored tačnosti, naša glavna briga su i robustnost modela procjene kvalitete. Naš rad povećava teškoće u izgradnji jakih modela. Posebno pokazujemo da se modeli procjene kvalitete često ponašaju drugačije u prostoru kvalitetne procjene, ovisno o tome da li je skala svemira mala, srednja ili velika. Također pokazujemo da se modeli procjene kvalitete često ponašaju drugačije u postavkama procjene, ovisno o tome da li podaci testova dolaze iz istog domena kao podaci o obuci ili ne. Naš rad predlaže nekoliko jakih kandidata da koriste u različitim okolnostima.', 'ca': "Aquest paper ofereix una evaluació d'una gran gama de models avançats d'estimació de qualitat a nivell de frases, incloent la regressió de suport de vectors, la regressió de conducció, les xarxes neuronales, els processos gaussians, les xarxes neuronales bayèsienes, l'aprenentatge profund del nucli i els processos gaussians profunds. A part de la precisió, les nostres principals preocupacions són també la robustet dels models d'estimació de qualitat. Our work raises the difficulty in building strong models.  Especificament, demostram que els models d'estimació de qualitat sovint es comporten de manera diferent en l'espai de característiques d'estimació de qualitat, segons si l'escala de l'espai de característiques és petit, mitjà o gran. També demostram que els models d'estimació de qualitat sovint es comporten de manera diferent en els entorns d'evaluació, segons si les dades de prova provenen del mateix domini que les dades d'entrenament o no. La nostra feina suggereix que varis candidats forts utilitzen en diferents circumstàncies.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa arvioidaan useita kehittyneitä lausetason laadunvarmistusmalleja, mukaan lukien tukivektoriregressio, ajoregressio, hermoverkot, gaussilaiset prosessit, bayesilaiset hermoverkot, syväytimen oppiminen ja syvägaussilaiset prosessit. Tarkkuuden lisäksi tärkeintä huolenaiheitamme ovat myös laadunvarmistusmallien kestävyys. Työmme herättää vaikeuksia rakentaa vahvoja malleja. Erityisesti osoitamme, että laadunvarmistusmallit käyttäytyvät usein eri tavalla laadunvarmistuksen ominaisuustilassa riippuen siitä, onko ominaisuustilan mittakaava pieni, keskikokoinen vai suuri. Osoitamme myös, että laadunarviointimallit käyttäytyvät usein eri tavoin arviointiasetuksissa riippuen siitä, ovatko testitiedot samalta alalta kuin koulutustiedot. Työssämme ehdotetaan useita vahvoja ehdokkaita käytettäväksi eri olosuhteissa.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja oceno širokega nabora naprednih modelov ocenjevanja kakovosti stavkov, vključno s podporno regresijo vektorjev, regresijo vožnje, nevralnimi omrežji, gausijskimi procesi, bajezijskimi nevralnimi omrežji, učenjem globokih jedr in gausijskimi procesi. Poleg natančnosti so naše glavne skrbi tudi robustnost modelov ocenjevanja kakovosti. Naše delo povzroča težave pri gradnji močnih modelov. Natančneje pokažemo, da se modeli ocene kakovosti v funkcijskem prostoru ocene kakovosti pogosto obnašajo drugače, odvisno od tega, ali je obseg funkcijskega prostora majhen, srednje ali velik. Pokazali smo tudi, da se modeli ocenjevanja kakovosti pogosto obnašajo drugače v okoljih ocenjevanja, odvisno od tega, ali podatki o testiranju prihajajo iz istega področja kot podatki o usposabljanju ali ne. Naše delo predlaga več močnih kandidatov za uporabo v različnih okoliščinah.', 'ha': "Wannan littafin na bãyar da evaluation ga wasu masu ƙayyade tsarin Quality-levels na cewa, kamar Support Vertor Regression, Ride Regression, Neural Networks, Gaussian Kirafas, Bayesian Neural Networks, Dep Kernl Learn and Depth Gaussian Kirafas. Ga gaskiyar, ma'anarmu masu ƙaranci ne misalin misãlai na Hikima. Kaimarmu yana tãyar da mataimaki a samun misãlai mai ƙarfi. Aka ƙayyade, Munã nũna wa misãlai na Kiddari da Kawai masu ƙididdige a cikin filin tsarin Taimaki na Kawai, ana ƙayyade, ko da takalin filin fani na ɗayan, mai ƙarami ko mai girma. Tuna nũna wa misãlai na Mataimakin Kiddari, ko da yawa, za'a yi ƙidãya a cikin tsarin ƙaddara, yana dõgara a kan jarrabar data za su zo daga duk guda kamar da ya yi amfani da shi, ko kuma ba. Kaimarmu yana shauri da waɗandasu mãsu ƙarfi su yi amfani da wasu mazauni dabam-dabam.", 'he': 'העבודה הזו מספקת עריכה של טווח רחב של דוגמני עריכת איכות ברמה משפטים מתקדמות, כולל תמיכה בקטור ריגרסיה, ריגרסיה רכב, רשתות נוירוליות, תהליכים גוסיים, רשתות נוירוליות בייזיות, לימוד קרנל עמוק ותהליכים גאוסיים עמוקים. חוץ מהמדויקה, הדאגה העיקרית שלנו היא גם החזקה של דוגמני הערכת איכות. העבודה שלנו מעלה את הקשה בניית דוגמנים חזקים. במיוחד, אנו מראים שדוגמני הערכת איכות לעתים קרובות מתנהגים בצורה שונה במרחב תכונות הערכת איכות, בהתאם אם הסולם של חלל תכונות הוא קטן, בינוני או גדול. אנחנו גם מראים שדוגמני הערכת איכות לעתים קרובות מתנהגים אחרת במסדרות הערכה, בהתאם אם נתוני מבחן מגיעים מאותו תחום כמו נתוני האימון או לא. Our work suggests several strong candidates to use in different circumstances.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་མཐོ་རིམ་གནས་སྟངས་ལྡན་གྱི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྲངས་ཀ་རིམ་པ་ཚོགས་ནང་ལུ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བརྗོད་དང་། Ride Regression、Neural Networks ། Gaussian Processes, Bayesian Neural Networks ། Deep Kernel Learning and Deep Gaussian Processes ། དེ་ལས་དྲང་ཚད་ལྟར། ང་ཚོའི་རྩ་བའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་སྐྱེས་ཚད་གླེང་ཚད་ཀྱི་མཐོ་ཤོང་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོབས་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་དཀའ་ངལ་ཁྱབ་གཏོང་ཡོད། Specifically, we show that Quality Estimation models often behave differently in Quality Estimation feature space, depending on whether the scale of feature space is small, medium or large. We also show that Quality Estimation models often behave differently in evaluation settings, depending on whether test data come from the same domain as the training data or not. ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་རྐྱེན་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་ལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྱོད་རྒྱུ་བསམ་ཡོད།', 'jv': 'Perintah sing nyebute assertion karo akeh gambar akeh akeh perusahaan kelas nyong, gambar Daftar vector Regresyon, Ride Regresyon, Neral netwark, Gossyan Proses, bayesi Neral netwark, deep Kernel Learning lan deep Gossyan Proses layers-action Awakdhéwé nggawe kalungan kuwi nggawé ning model sing bisa kerjane. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink We awso menehi, dadi Quality estemation modellu diunting menehi sak lho, dadi kapan mulai test data from the same domain as the Learning data or not. Awak dhéwé nggawe barang-barang sing sabanjuré kandidé sing bisa nyeluké ning sakjané surok.'}
{'en': 'Ab Initio : Automatic Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'ar': 'بداية الأب: إعادة بناء كلمة أولية لاتينية تلقائية', 'es': 'Ab Initio: Reconstrucción automática de protopalabras latinas', 'fr': 'Ab Initio\xa0: Reconstruction automatique de proto-mots latins', 'pt': 'Ab Initio: Reconstrução automática de proto-palavras latinas', 'ja': 'Ab Initio ：自動ラテン語プロトワード再構築', 'zh': 'Ab Initio:自拉丁语始单词重建', 'hi': 'Ab Initio: स्वचालित लैटिन प्रोटो-शब्द पुनर्निर्माण', 'ru': 'Ab Initio: Автоматическая реконструкция латинского протословья', 'ga': 'Tús: Atógáil Uathoibríoch Prótacail Laidine', 'el': 'ab initio: Αυτόματη λατινική πρωτολέξη ανακατασκευή', 'ka': 'Ab Initio: ავტომატური ლატინული პროტო- სიტყვის განახლება', 'it': 'Ab Initio: Ricostruzione automatica di proto-parola latina', 'lt': 'Ab Initio: Automatic Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'hu': 'Ab Initio: Automatic Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'mk': 'Ab Initio: Automatic Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'ml': 'ആബ് തുടക്കം: സ്വയം ലാറ്റിന്\u200d പ്രോട്ടോ വാക്ക് പുനരുത്തല്\u200d', 'kk': 'Аб иницио: Латын протоколын қайта құру', 'mt': 'Ab Initio: Rikostruzzjoni Awtomatika tal-Protokelma Latina', 'no': 'Ab Initio: Automatisk Latin protoordrekonstruksjon', 'pl': 'Ab Initio: Automatyczna łacińska rekonstrukcja proto-słowa', 'sr': 'Ab Initio: Automatska rekonstrukcija latinskih protoriječi', 'mn': 'Аб Иницио: Автоматтын Латин протокол үгний дахин сэргээх', 'ro': 'Inițiativă: Reconstrucție automată latină proto-cuvânt', 'so': 'Ab Initio: Automatic Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'ms': 'Ab Initio: Automatic Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'ta': 'Ab துவக்கம்: தன்னியக்கமாக லாட்டின் நெறி வார்த்தை மீட்டமைப்பு', 'si': 'ඇබ් ඉනිටියෝ: ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ලැටින් ප්\u200dරොටෝක් වචන ආපහු නිර්මාණය', 'ur': 'آب اینیٹیو: آٹوٹی لاٹینی پروٹوٹ ورڈ دوبارہ ساخت', 'sv': 'Ab Initio: Automatisk Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'uz': 'Ab ishga tushirish: Avtomatik Latin soʻzni qaytarish', 'vi': 'Diệp Vấn: Đầu cuốiComment', 'bg': 'Ab Initio: Автоматично възстановяване на латински протодуми', 'da': 'Ab Initio: Automatisk latinsk protoordrekonstruktion', 'de': 'Ab Initiao: Automatische lateinische Proto-Wort Rekonstruktion', 'ko': '처음부터: 자동 라틴어 원형어 재구성', 'nl': 'Ab Initiao: Automatische Latijnse Proto-woord Reconstructie', 'fa': 'عب Initio: بازسازی کلمه\u200cهای لاتین خودکار', 'hr': 'Ab Initio: Automatska rekonstrukcija latinskih protoriječi', 'af': 'Ab Initio: Outomatiese Latyn Proto- woord Herkonstruksie', 'tr': 'Otomatik Latynyň Proto-sözi ýene-täzelenmesi', 'id': 'Ab Initio: Automatic Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'am': 'Automatically Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'hy': 'Automatic', 'bn': 'Ab Initio: Automatic Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'sw': 'Ab Initio: Ujengenezaji binafsi wa Kilatini', 'sq': 'Ab Initio: Automatic Latin Proto-word Reconstruction', 'ca': 'Ab Initio: Reconstrucció automàtica de la paraula prototètica llatí', 'bs': 'Ab Initio: Automatska rekonstrukcija latinskih protoriječi', 'cs': 'Ab Initio: Automatická rekonstrukce latinského protoslova', 'et': 'Ab Initio: automaatne ladina protosõna rekonstrueerimine', 'fi': 'Alku: Automaattinen latinan protosana rekonstruktio', 'az': 'Ab Initio: Avtomatik Latin Proto-Kelimi Yenidən Yapılandırma', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Ab Initio: Avtomatska obnova latinskih protobesed', 'jv': 'Ab Initio: Otomatis Latin Proto-word Gak Kenal', 'he': 'Ab Initio: Automatic Latin Proto- word reconstruction', 'bo': 'Ab Initio: རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་Latin Proto-word Reconstruction'}
{'en': 'Proto-word reconstruction is central to the study of language evolution. It consists of recreating the words in an ancient language from its modern daughter languages. In this paper we investigate automatic word form reconstruction for Latin proto-words. Having modern word forms in multiple Romance languages (French, Italian, Spanish, Portuguese and Romanian), we infer the form of their common Latin ancestors. Our approach relies on the regularities that occurred when the Latin words entered the modern languages. We leverage information from all modern languages, building an ensemble system for proto-word reconstruction. We use conditional random fields for sequence labeling, but we conduct preliminary experiments with recurrent neural networks as well. We apply our method on multiple datasets, showing that our method improves on previous results, having also the advantage of requiring less input data, which is essential in historical linguistics, where resources are generally scarce.', 'ar': 'تعد إعادة بناء الكلمات الأولية أمرًا أساسيًا لدراسة تطور اللغة. وهو يتألف من إعادة صياغة الكلمات بلغة قديمة من لغات ابنتها الحديثة. في هذه الورقة ، نتحرى إعادة بناء صيغة الكلمات تلقائيًا للكلمات الأولية اللاتينية. بوجود أشكال كلمات حديثة بلغات رومانسية متعددة (الفرنسية والإيطالية والإسبانية والبرتغالية والرومانية) ، فإننا نستنتج شكل أسلافهم اللاتينيين المشتركين. يعتمد نهجنا على الانتظام الذي حدث عندما دخلت الكلمات اللاتينية اللغات الحديثة. نحن نستفيد من المعلومات من جميع اللغات الحديثة ، ونبني نظامًا جماعيًا لإعادة بناء الكلمات الأولية. نستخدم الحقول العشوائية الشرطية لوصف التسلسل ، لكننا نجري أيضًا تجارب أولية مع الشبكات العصبية المتكررة. نحن نطبق طريقتنا على مجموعات بيانات متعددة ، مما يوضح أن طريقتنا تتحسن على النتائج السابقة ، ولدينا أيضًا ميزة طلب بيانات إدخال أقل ، وهو أمر ضروري في علم اللغة التاريخي ، حيث تكون الموارد شحيحة بشكل عام.', 'es': 'La reconstrucción de protopalabras es fundamental para el estudio de la evolución del lenguaje. Consiste en recrear las palabras en un idioma antiguo a partir de sus lenguas hijas modernas. En este artículo investigamos la reconstrucción automática de formas de palabras para protopalabras latinas. Al tener formas de palabras modernas en múltiples idiomas romances (francés, italiano, español, portugués y rumano), inferimos la forma de sus antepasados latinos comunes. Nuestro enfoque se basa en las regularidades que ocurrieron cuando las palabras latinas entraron en los idiomas modernos. Aprovechamos la información de todos los idiomas modernos, creando un sistema de conjunto para la reconstrucción de protopalabras. Utilizamos campos aleatorios condicionales para el etiquetado de secuencias, pero también realizamos experimentos preliminares con redes neuronales recurrentes. Aplicamos nuestro método en múltiples conjuntos de datos, lo que demuestra que nuestro método mejora los resultados anteriores, teniendo también la ventaja de requerir menos datos de entrada, lo cual es esencial en la lingüística histórica, donde los recursos son generalmente escasos.', 'fr': "La reconstruction de proto-mots est au cœur de l'étude de l'évolution du langage. Elle consiste à recréer les mots d'une langue ancienne à partir de ses langues filles modernes. Dans cet article, nous étudions la reconstruction automatique de la forme des mots pour les proto-mots latins. Avec des formes de mots modernes dans plusieurs langues romanes (français, italien, espagnol, portugais et roumain), nous en déduisons la forme de leurs ancêtres latins communs. Notre approche repose sur les régularités qui se sont produites lorsque les mots latins sont entrés dans les langues modernes. Nous exploitons les informations de tous les langages modernes pour créer un système d'ensemble pour la reconstruction de proto-mots. Nous utilisons des champs aléatoires conditionnels pour le marquage des séquences, mais nous menons également des expériences préliminaires avec des réseaux de neurones récurrents. Nous appliquons notre méthode à plusieurs ensembles de données, ce qui montre que notre méthode améliore les résultats précédents, ayant également l'avantage de nécessiter moins de données d'entrée, ce qui est essentiel en linguistique historique, où les ressources sont généralement rares.", 'pt': 'A reconstrução de proto-palavras é central para o estudo da evolução da linguagem. Consiste em recriar as palavras em uma língua antiga a partir de suas línguas filhas modernas. Neste artigo investigamos a reconstrução automática de formas de palavras para protopalavras latinas. Tendo formas de palavras modernas em várias línguas românicas (francês, italiano, espanhol, português e romeno), inferimos a forma de seus ancestrais latinos comuns. Nossa abordagem se baseia nas regularidades que ocorreram quando as palavras latinas entraram nas línguas modernas. Alavancamos informações de todas as linguagens modernas, construindo um sistema de conjunto para reconstrução de proto-palavras. Usamos campos aleatórios condicionais para rotulagem de sequência, mas também realizamos experimentos preliminares com redes neurais recorrentes. Aplicamos nosso método em vários conjuntos de dados, mostrando que nosso método melhora os resultados anteriores, tendo também a vantagem de exigir menos dados de entrada, o que é essencial em linguística histórica, onde os recursos geralmente são escassos.', 'ja': 'プロトワード復興は言語進化の研究の中心である。現代の娘言語から古代の言語で言葉を再現することで構成されています。本稿では、ラテン語の原語の自動語形再構を調査する。複数のロマンス諸語（フランス語、イタリア語、スペイン語、ポルトガル語、ルーマニア語）の現代語形を持ち、共通のラテン語の祖先の形を推測します。私たちのアプローチは、ラテン語の単語が現代の言語に入ったときに起こった規則性に依存しています。現代のあらゆる言語からの情報を活用し、プロトワード再構築のためのアンサンブルシステムを構築しています。シーケンス標識には条件付きランダムフィールドを使用していますが、再発ニューラルネットワークでも予備実験を行っています。私たちは、複数のデータセットにメソッドを適用し、メソッドが以前の結果よりも改善され、入力データが少ないという利点もあります。これは、一般にリソースが乏しい歴史的言語学では不可欠です。', 'zh': '原始词重建者,言进化心也。 盖自今子语言中以古语更创单词。 于本文中,究拉丁语始单词自文重建。 罗曼语系言语(法语,意大利语西班牙语,葡萄牙语罗马尼亚语)有今单词,推断出其同拉丁语祖文。 吾道赖拉丁语单词入言时。 用诸今世语言信息,构一以原始单词重建融合系统。 我则随机字段序,我亦用递归神经网络初步实验。 宜用于数集,明有改进于前,有少输于数,此遍稀缺之史语言学要也。', 'ru': 'Реконструкция протослов занимает центральное место в изучении языковой эволюции. Он состоит из воссоздания слов на древнем языке из его современных дочерних языков. В этой статье мы исследуем автоматическую реконструкцию формы слова для латинских протослов. Имея современные словоформы на нескольких романских языках (французском, итальянском, испанском, португальском и румынском), мы выводим форму их общих латинских предков. Наш подход опирается на закономерности, которые произошли, когда латинские слова вошли в современные языки. Мы используем информацию со всех современных языков, создавая ансамблевую систему для реконструкции протослов. Мы используем условные случайные поля для маркировки последовательностей, но мы проводим предварительные эксперименты и с рекуррентными нейронными сетями. Мы применяем наш метод на нескольких наборах данных, показывая, что наш метод улучшается по сравнению с предыдущими результатами, имея также преимущество, требующее меньшего количества входных данных, что имеет важное значение в исторической лингвистике, где ресурсы, как правило, скудны.', 'hi': 'प्रोटो-शब्द पुनर्निर्माण भाषा विकास के अध्ययन के लिए केंद्रीय है। इसमें अपनी आधुनिक बेटी भाषाओं से एक प्राचीन भाषा में शब्दों को फिर से बनाना शामिल है। इस पेपर में हम लैटिन प्रोटो-शब्दों के लिए स्वचालित शब्द रूप पुनर्निर्माण की जांच करते हैं। कई रोमांस भाषाओं (फ्रेंच, इतालवी, स्पेनिश, पुर्तगाली और रोमानियाई) में आधुनिक शब्द रूपों के होने के कारण, हम उनके सामान्य लैटिन पूर्वजों के रूप का अनुमान लगाते हैं। हमारा दृष्टिकोण नियमितताओं पर निर्भर करता है जो तब हुआ जब लैटिन शब्दों ने आधुनिक भाषाओं में प्रवेश किया। हम सभी आधुनिक भाषाओं से जानकारी का लाभ उठाते हैं, प्रोटो-शब्द पुनर्निर्माण के लिए एक पहनावा प्रणाली का निर्माण करते हैं। हम अनुक्रम लेबलिंग के लिए सशर्त यादृच्छिक क्षेत्रों का उपयोग करते हैं, लेकिन हम आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ प्रारंभिक प्रयोग भी करते हैं। हम कई डेटासेट पर अपनी विधि लागू करते हैं, यह दिखाते हुए कि हमारी विधि पिछले परिणामों पर सुधार करती है, जिसमें कम इनपुट डेटा की आवश्यकता का लाभ भी होता है, जो ऐतिहासिक भाषाविज्ञान में आवश्यक है, जहां संसाधन आमतौर पर दुर्लभ होते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá atógáil prótón-focal lárnach don staidéar ar éabhlóid teanga. Is éard atá ann na focail i dteanga ársa a athchruthú óna hiníonteangacha. Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid imscrúdú ar atógáil uathfhoirmeacha focal le haghaidh proto-focail Laidine. Le foirmeacha nua-aimseartha focal in iliomad teangacha Rómánsacha (Fraincis, Iodáilis, Spáinnis, Portaingéilis agus Rómáinis), tátal againn cén fhoirm a bhí ag a sinsir coitianta Laidine. Braitheann ár gcur chuige ar na rialtachtaí a tharla nuair a chuaigh na focail Laidine isteach sna nuatheangacha. Bainimid úsáid as faisnéis ó na nuatheangacha go léir, ag tógáil córas ensemble le haghaidh atógáil prótón-focal. Bainimid úsáid as réimsí randamacha coinníollach le haghaidh lipéadú seicheamh, ach déanaimid réamh-turgnaimh le líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha freisin. Cuirimid ár modh i bhfeidhm ar thacair sonraí iolracha, a thaispeánann go dtagann feabhas ar ár modh ar thorthaí roimhe seo, agus tá sé de bhuntáiste aige freisin go dteastaíonn níos lú sonraí ionchuir, rud atá riachtanach sa teangeolaíocht stairiúil, áit a bhfuil acmhainní gann go ginearálta.', 'ka': 'პროტო სიტყვების რესტრუქტურაცია ენის ევოლუციის სწავლად ცენტრალურია. ეს შექმნია სიტყვების შექმნის ასეთი ენაში თავს მოდინარე ქალური ენაზე. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ავტომატური სიტყვების ფორმა რესტრუქცია ლატინული პროტო სიტყვებისთვის. ჩვენ მივიღეთ მოდინარე სიტყვების ფორმები რამდენიმე პრომინური ენაში (ფრანუსი, თრალიანი, თოგრალური, პორტეგური და პრომინური), ჩვენ მივიღეთ მათი საერთ ჩვენი პროგორმაცია დარწმუნება რეგულაციას, რომელიც მოხდა, როდესაც ლატინური სიტყვები მოთავსდება მოდინარებული ენაში. ჩვენ ინფორმაციას ყველა მოდინარე ენებიდან გამოყენებთ, პროტო სიტყვების რესტრუქტურაციისთვის ინფორმაციის სისტემის შექმნა. ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ კონდიციური დასხვავებული ფერები, მაგრამ ჩვენ გამოვიყენებთ კონდიციური ნეიროლური ქსელებით პირველური ექსპერიმენტები. ჩვენ ჩვენი მეთოდის გამოყენება რამდენიმე მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, რომელიც ჩვენი მეთოდი უფრო მეტივად გავაკეთება წინ შედეგი შედეგი შედეგი შედეგი მონაცემების გამოსახულება', 'hu': 'A protoszó rekonstrukció központi szerepet játszik a nyelvevolúció tanulmányozásában. Ez azt jelenti, hogy a szavakat egy ősi nyelven újraalkotja a modern leánynyelvekből. Ebben a tanulmányban a latin protoszavak automatikus szóformájának rekonstrukcióját vizsgáljuk. A modern szóformákkal több román nyelven (francia, olasz, spanyol, portugál és román) következtetjük közös latin őseik formáját. Megközelítésünk azon rendszerességeken alapul, amelyek akkor történtek, amikor a latin szavak beléptek a modern nyelvekbe. Az összes modern nyelvről származó információt kihasználjuk, együttes rendszert építünk a proto-szó rekonstrukciójára. Feltételes véletlenszerű mezőket használunk a szekvencia jelöléséhez, de előzetes kísérleteket végezünk visszatérő neurális hálózatokkal is. Módszerünket több adatkészletre alkalmazzuk, bizonyítva, hogy módszerünk javul a korábbi eredményekhez képest, azzal az előnnyel jár, hogy kevesebb beviteli adatot igényel, ami elengedhetetlen a történelmi nyelvészetben, ahol az erőforrások általában szűkösek.', 'el': 'Η αναδόμηση πρωτολέξεων είναι κεντρική στη μελέτη της γλωσσικής εξέλιξης. Αποτελείται από την αναπαράσταση των λέξεων σε μια αρχαία γλώσσα από τις σύγχρονες θυγατρικές γλώσσες της. Στην παρούσα εργασία ερευνούμε την αυτόματη ανασυγκρότηση λέξεων για λατινικές πρωτολέξεις. Έχοντας σύγχρονες μορφές λέξεων σε πολλές Ρομαντικές γλώσσες (γαλλικά, ιταλικά, ισπανικά, πορτογαλικά και ρουμανικά), συμπεραίνουμε τη μορφή των κοινών λατινικών προγόνων τους. Η προσέγγισή μας βασίζεται στις κανονικότητες που συνέβησαν όταν οι λατινικές λέξεις μπήκαν στις σύγχρονες γλώσσες. Αξιοποιούμε πληροφορίες από όλες τις σύγχρονες γλώσσες, χτίζοντας ένα σύστημα συνόλων για την αναδόμηση πρωτολέξεων. Χρησιμοποιούμε τυχαία πεδία υπό όρους για τη σήμανση ακολουθίας, αλλά διεξάγουμε προκαταρκτικά πειράματα και με επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα. Εφαρμόζουμε τη μέθοδο μας σε πολλαπλά σύνολα δεδομένων, δείχνοντας ότι η μέθοδος μας βελτιώνεται σε σχέση με τα προηγούμενα αποτελέσματα, έχοντας επίσης το πλεονέκτημα ότι απαιτούνται λιγότερα δεδομένα εισόδου, κάτι που είναι απαραίτητο στην ιστορική γλωσσολογία, όπου οι πόροι γενικά είναι περιορισμένοι.', 'it': "La ricostruzione proto-parola è centrale per lo studio dell'evoluzione del linguaggio. Consiste nel ricreare le parole in una lingua antica dalle lingue figlie moderne. In questo articolo esaminiamo la ricostruzione automatica della forma di parola per proto-parole latine. Avendo forme di parola moderne in più lingue romanze (francese, italiano, spagnolo, portoghese e rumeno), deduciamo la forma dei loro antenati latini comuni. Il nostro approccio si basa sulle regolarità che si sono verificate quando le parole latine sono entrate nelle lingue moderne. Sfruttamo le informazioni provenienti da tutte le lingue moderne, costruendo un sistema ensemble per la ricostruzione proto-parola. Usiamo campi casuali condizionali per l'etichettatura delle sequenze, ma conduciamo esperimenti preliminari anche con reti neurali ricorrenti. Applichiamo il nostro metodo su più set di dati, dimostrando che il nostro metodo migliora rispetto ai risultati precedenti, avendo anche il vantaggio di richiedere meno dati di input, che è essenziale nella linguistica storica, dove le risorse sono generalmente scarse.", 'kk': 'Протокол сөздерді қайта құру - тіл эволюциясын зерттеу үшін негізгі. Бұл әзіргі қызының тілдерінен артық тілде сөздерді қайта құру құрылады. Бұл қағазда латын протосөздер үшін автоматты сөз пішіміне қайта құрылуын зерттейміз. Қазіргі сөз түрінде бірнеше романдық тілдерде (француз, итальян, испан, португал және румандық), олардың жалпы латын атауларының түрін келтіреміз. Біздің тәсіліміз латын сөздер күнделікті тілдерге келтіргенде болатын тәуліктеріне тәуелді. Біз бүкіл күнделікті тілдерден мәліметті құрып, протосөзді қайта құру үшін ензембл жүйесін құрамыз. Біз кездейсоқ өрістерді реттеу жарлығы үшін қолданамыз, бірақ қайталанатын невралды желілердің алдындағы тәжірибелерін қолданамыз. Біз әдімізді бірнеше деректер қорларына қолданып, әдіміздің алдыңғы нәтижелерімізді жақсы көрсетеді, сондай-ақ кіріс деректерді қажет етеді, бұл тарихый лингвистикалық тілдерінде негізгі, ресур', 'lt': 'Proto žodžių atstatymas yra pagrindinis kalbų raidos tyrimui. Jį sudaro žodžių atgaivinimas senovine kalba iš savo šiuolaikinių dukterinių kalbų. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame automatinę žodžių formos atkūrimą Lotynų proto žodžiams. Turėdami šiuolaikinių žodžių form ų daugeliu rumunų kalbų (prancūzų, italų, ispanų, portugalų ir rumunų), mes darome išvadą apie jų bendrų Lotynų protėvių formą. Mūsų požiūris grindžiamas reguliarumu, kuris įvyko, kai Lotynų žodžiai pateko į šiuolaikines kalbas. Mes panaudojame informaciją iš visų šiuolaikinių kalbų, kuriant antižodžių atstatymo komplekso sistemą. Mes naudojame sąlyginius atsitiktinius laukus sekos ženklinimui, bet atliekame preliminarius eksperimentus ir su pasikartojančiais nerviniais tinklais. Mes taikome savo metodą daugeliui duomenų rinkinių, rodantį, kad mūsų metodas pagerėja ankstesnių rezultatų atžvilgiu, taip pat turint pranašumą reikalauti mažiau įvestų duomenų, kurie yra esminiai istorinėje kalboje, kur išteklių paprastai trūksta.', 'mk': 'Протозборната реконструкција е централна за студијата на јазичката еволуција. Сочинува рекреација на зборовите на антички јазик од модерните ќерки јазици. Во овој весник ние истражуваме автоматска реконструкција на зборови за латински прото-зборови. Со модерни форми на зборови на повеќето романски јазици (француски, италијански, шпански, португалски и романски), ја заклучуваме формата на нивните заеднички латински предци. Нашиот пристап зависи од регулативностите кои се случија кога латинските зборови влегоа во модерните јазици. We leverage information from all modern languages, building an ensemble system for proto-word reconstruction.  Користиме условни случајни пола за етикетирање на секвенца, но спроведуваме прелиминарни експерименти и со рецидентни нервни мрежи. Ние го применуваме нашиот метод на повеќе податоци, покажувајќи дека нашиот метод се подобрува на претходните резултати, имајќи ја и предност од барање помалку податоци, што е суштинско во историската лингвистика, каде ресурсите се генерално мали.', 'mn': 'Протокол үг дахин бүтээх нь хэл хөгжлийн судалгаанд төвөгтэй. Энэ нь орчин үеийн охины хэлээсээ эртний хэл дээр үгсийг дахин бүтээх юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Латин протоколын үгийг автоматик үгийг дахин бүтээсэн гэдгийг судалж байна. Орчин үеийн хэлбэрээр олон Ромын хэл (Француз, Итали, Испан, Португали, Румын хэл), бид тэдний ерөнхий Латин өвгүүдийн хэлбэрийг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Бидний ойлголт нь Латин үг орчин үеийн хэл рүү орших үед болсон үед тохиолдсон байдал дээр байдаг. Бид бүх орчин үеийн хэлээс мэдээллийг ашиглаж, протон үгийн дахин бүтээх системийг бүтээж байна. Бид дарааллаар дарааллаар нэрлэх шаардлагатай салбаруудыг ашиглаж байна. Гэхдээ бид дахин дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээгээр дахин эхний туршилт хийдэг. Бид олон өгөгдлийн сангийн аргыг ашиглаж, өмнөх үр дүнд бидний аргыг сайжруулж, бага өгөгдлийн мэдээллийг хэрэглэх хэрэгтэй боломжтой байдаг. Энэ нь түүхийн хэлний сургуульд хамгийн чухал бөгөөд нөөц бага байдаг.', 'no': 'Protoordrekonstruksjon er sentralt til studien av språk-evolusjon. Det inneheld av å gjenoppretta ord på nytt i ein gammal språk frå dei moderne dogspråka. I denne papiret undersøker vi automatisk ordskjemarekonstruksjon for latinske protoord. For å ha moderne ord-formar i fleire romenske språk (fransk, italsk, spansk, portugisk og rumensk), har vi formen til dei vanlege latinske foreldra. Tilnærminga vårt dependerer på regulariteten som oppstod når latinske ord oppstod i moderne språk. Vi leverer informasjon frå alle moderne språk, og bygger eit ensembelsystem for protoordrekonstruksjon. Vi brukar vilkårleg tilfeller for sekvensmerkelapp, men vi gjer første eksperimenter med rekurserande neuralnettverk også. Vi bruker metoden vårt på fleire datasett, viser at metoden vårt forbetrar på førre resultat, og har også fordel til å kreve mindre inndata, som er viktig i historiske lingvistikk, der ressursar er vanlegvis kraftig.', 'mt': 'Ir-rikostruzzjoni tal-kliem protokolli hija ċentrali għall-istudju tal-evoluzzjoni tal-lingwa. Din tikkonsisti fil-ħolqien mill-ġdid tal-kliem f’lingwa antika mil-lingwi tal-bniet moderni tagħha. F’dan id-dokument ninvestigaw ir-rikostruzzjoni awtomatika tal-formola tal-kliem għall-proto-kliem Latin. B’forom moderni ta’ kliem f’diversi lingwi Romani (Franċiż, Taljan, Spanjol, Portugiż u Rumen), aħna niddeduċu l-forma tal-ancestri Latini komuni tagħhom. L-approċċ tagħna jiddependi fuq ir-regolaritajiet li seħħew meta l-kliem Latin daħal fil-lingwi moderni. Aħna nixprunaw l-informazzjoni mill-lingwi moderni kollha, billi nibnu sistema ta’ ensemble għar-rikostruzzjoni tal-protokletri. We use conditional random fields for sequence labeling, but we conduct preliminary experiments with recurrent neural networks as well.  Aħna napplikaw il-metodu tagħna fuq settijiet ta’ dejta multipli, li juru li l-metodu tagħna jtejjeb fuq ir-riżultati preċedenti, li għandu wkoll il-vantaġġ li jeħtieġ inqas dejta input, li hija essenzjali fil-lingwistika storika, fejn ir-riżorsi ġeneralment huma skarsi.', 'ms': 'Pembangunan semula perkataan-protokol adalah pusat untuk kajian evolusi bahasa. Ia terdiri daripada mencipta semula perkataan dalam bahasa kuno dari bahasa anak perempuan modern. Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki pembangunan semula bentuk perkataan automatik untuk proto-perkataan Latin. Memiliki bentuk perkataan modern dalam berbagai bahasa Roman (Perancis, Itali, Sepanyol, Portugis dan Romani), kami menyimpulkan bentuk nenek moyang Latin mereka yang biasa. pendekatan kita bergantung pada kebijaksanaan yang berlaku apabila kata-kata Latin memasuki bahasa modern. Kami menggunakan maklumat dari semua bahasa modern, membina sistem ensemble untuk pembangunan semula kata-kata proto. Kami menggunakan medan rawak bersyarat untuk label urutan, tetapi kami melakukan eksperimen awal dengan rangkaian saraf yang berulang juga. Kami melaksanakan kaedah kami pada set data berbilang, menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami meningkat pada keputusan sebelumnya, juga mempunyai keuntungan untuk memerlukan data input kurang, yang penting dalam bahasa sejarah, di mana sumber-sumber secara umum jarang.', 'ml': 'പ്രോട്ടോ വാക്ക് പുനര്\u200dമ്മിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഭാഷയുടെ പരിശോധനത്തിന് മദ്ധ്യമാണ്. അതിന്റെ ആധുനിക മകളുടെ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഴയ ഭാഷയിലെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുതുക്കുന്നതിനാലാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ലാറ്റിന്\u200d പ്രോട്ടോ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി സ്വയം വാക്കുകള്\u200d രൂപപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് നമ്മള ആധുനിക വാക്കുകള്\u200d പല റോമാന്\u200dസ് ഭാഷകളിലുണ്ട് (ഫ്രെഞ്ച്, ഇറ്റലിയന്\u200d, സ്പാനിഷ്, പോര്\u200dട്ടുഗീഷ് റോമാനിയന്\u200d, അവരുടെ പിതാക്കന്മാര Our approach relies on the regularities that occurred when the Latin words entered the modern languages.  ആധുനിക ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും എല്ലാ വിവരങ്ങളും ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരം കൊടുക്കുന്നു. പ്രോട്ടോ വാക്ക് പുനര്\u200dമ്മിപ്പിക് സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലേബിളിലേക്ക് വേണ്ടി നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ നമുക്ക് ആദ്യ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ ഒരുപാട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പുള്ള ഫലങ്ങളില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d മുന്\u200dകൂട', 'ro': 'Reconstrucția protocuvintelor este esențială pentru studiul evoluției limbii. Constă în recreerea cuvintelor într-o limbă antică din limbile fiicei sale moderne. În această lucrare investigăm reconstrucția automată a formei de cuvânt pentru protocuvintele latine. Având forme moderne de cuvânt în mai multe limbi romanice (franceză, italiană, spaniolă, portugheză și română), deducem forma strămoșilor lor latini comuni. Abordarea noastră se bazează pe regularitatea apărută atunci când cuvintele latine au intrat în limbile moderne. Folosim informații din toate limbile moderne, construind un sistem ansamblu pentru reconstrucția proto-cuvintelor. Folosim câmpuri aleatorii condiționate pentru etichetarea secvențelor, dar efectuăm experimente preliminare și cu rețele neurale recurente. Aplicăm metoda noastră pe mai multe seturi de date, arătând că metoda noastră se îmbunătățește față de rezultatele anterioare, având, de asemenea, avantajul de a necesita mai puține date de intrare, ceea ce este esențial în lingvistica istorică, unde resursele sunt în general limitate.', 'pl': 'Rekonstrukcja protosłowa ma kluczowe znaczenie dla badań ewolucji języka. Polega on na odtworzeniu słów w starożytnym języku z jego nowoczesnych języków córkowych. W niniejszym artykule badamy automatyczną rekonstrukcję form słów dla łacińskich proto-słów. Posiadając nowoczesne formy słów w wielu językach romańskich (francuski, włoski, hiszpański, portugalski i rumuński), wnioskujemy formę ich wspólnych łacińskich przodków. Nasze podejście opiera się na regularnościach, które występowały, gdy łacińskie słowa weszły do nowoczesnych języków. Wykorzystujemy informacje ze wszystkich nowoczesnych języków, budując system zespołu do rekonstrukcji proto-słowa. Do znakowania sekwencji używamy warunkowych pola losowych, ale przeprowadzamy wstępne eksperymenty również z powtarzającymi się sieciami neuronowymi. Naszą metodę stosujemy na wielu zbiorach danych, pokazując, że nasza metoda ulepsza się w stosunku do poprzednich wyników, mając również tę zaletę wymagania mniejszej ilości danych wejściowych, co jest niezbędne w językoznawstwie historycznym, gdzie zasoby są ogólnie ograniczone.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරොටෝක්-වචන ආපහු නිර්මාණය කිරීමේ භාෂාව විකෘතියේ අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා. ඒක තමයි පරණ භාෂයෙන් වචන් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිර්මාණය කරන්න ලැටින් ප්\u200dරොටෝවල් වචන සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරි අධ්\u200dයාත්මක වචන වචන වර්ගයක් තියෙනවා වගේ රෝමාන්සි භාෂාවල් වලින් (ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස්, ඉතාලිය, ස්පැන්සින්, පො අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශ්වාස කරනවා ලැටින් වචන් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක භාෂාවට ඇතුළු වෙලාවට සාමාන්\u200dය විධ අපි සියළු අධ්\u200dයාතික භාෂාවෙන් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරොටෝවර්ඩ් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරොටෝවර්ඩ් පද්ධතිය අපි පරීක්ෂණ ලේබිලන් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණ ක්\u200dෂේත්රයක් භාවිත කරනවා, ඒත් අපි පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා පුරාවර අපි ගොඩක් දත්ත සැට් වලට අපේ විධානය භාවිතා කරන්න, පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය පිළිබඳ ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වැඩි වෙනවා කියලා, අපේ විධ', 'sr': 'Rekonstrukcija protoriječi je centralna za studiju jezičke evolucije. To se sastoji od ponovnog stvaranja reči na drevnom jeziku iz modernog jezika kćerke. U ovom papiru istražujemo automatsku reč za rekonstrukciju latinskih protoriječi. Imajući moderne reči u višestrukim rumunskim jezicima (francuski, italijanski, španjolski, portugalski i rumunski), uvećavamo oblik njihovih zajedničkih latinskih predaka. Naš pristup se oslanja na regularnost koja se desila kada su latinske reči ušle u moderne jezike. Privlačimo informacije iz svih modernih jezika, izgradimo sistem ensemble za rekonstrukciju protoriječi. Koristimo uslovne nasumične polje za označavanje sekvence, ali i predviđamo preliminarne eksperimente sa rekonstruiranim neuralnim mrežama. Primjenjujemo našu metodu na višestruke datasete, pokazujući da se naša metoda poboljšava na prethodnim rezultatima, imati takođe prednost zahteva manje ulaznih podataka, što je ključno u istorijskoj jezičini, gdje su resursi uobičajeno manji.', 'so': "Barbaarinta hadalka la dhigo waa mid ugu muhiim ah waxbarashada beddelka luqada. Waxay ku jirtaa dib u soo celinta hadalka luuqada hore oo ka soo jeeda luuqadaha gabdhaha hooyadeed. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka baaraynaa foomka qoraalka ah oo automaticka ah oo la dhisayo qoraalka qoraalka qoraalka Latin. Waxaynu haysannaa foomka hadalka modern oo ku qoran luuqado badan oo Romaniyan ah (Faraansiis, Talyaani, Isbanish, Burtuqiis iyo Romaniyan), waxaynu ka fekernaa qaabka ay awowayaashood oo afka lataniya ah ku nool yihiin. Dhaqdhaheenna waxay ku xiran tahay sharciyada soo dhacay marka luqada Latin lagu soo galo luqadaha modera. Waxaannu macluumaad ka soo dirnaa luuqadaha asalka ah oo dhan, waxaynu dhisnaa nidaam qaab ah oo loo sameynayo sameynta qoraalka sameynta. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa beeraha shuruudaha ah oo ku haboon, laakiin waxaynu sameynaa imtixaanka hore oo ku qoran shabakada neurada ee soo socda. Waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa qaababkayaga kooxaha macluumaadka kala duduwan, waxaynu tusnaynaa in qaababkayaga uu horumarinayo resultiyada hore, waxaana sidoo kale faa'iido u leh in laga baahan yahay macluumaad ka yar input, taasoo ugu muhiimsan luuqadaha taariikhda ah, meesha ay resources ugu yaraan yihiin.", 'sv': 'Proto-ord rekonstruktion är central för studiet av språkutveckling. Den består av att återskapa orden på ett gammalt språk från dess moderna dotterspråk. I denna uppsats undersöker vi automatisk ordform rekonstruktion för latinska protoord. Med moderna ordformer på flera romanska språk (franska, italienska, spanska, portugisiska och rumänska), utgår vi från formen av deras gemensamma latinska förfäder. Vårt tillvägagångssätt bygger på de regelbundenhet som inträffade när de latinska orden kom in i de moderna språken. Vi utnyttjar information från alla moderna språk och bygger ett ensemblesystem för protoords rekonstruktion. Vi använder villkorliga slumpmässiga fält för sekvensmärkning, men vi genomför preliminära experiment med återkommande neurala nätverk också. Vi tillämpar vår metod på flera datauppsättningar, vilket visar att vår metod förbättras jämfört med tidigare resultat, vilket också har fördelen att kräva mindre indata, vilket är viktigt i historisk lingvistik, där resurserna generellt är knappa.', 'ta': 'மொழி வளர்ச்சியின் படிப்பு மையமாக உள்ளது. இது ஒரு பழைய மொழியில் இருந்து வார்த்தைகளை மீட்டெடுக்கும் பொழுது உள்ளது. இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் தானியங்கி வார்த்தை மீண்டும் உருவாக்கத்தை தேடுகிறோம். பல ரோமான்ஸ் மொழிகளில் (பிரெஞ்சு, இத்தாலியன், ஸ்பானிஷ், போர்த்துகீசிஷ் மற்றும் ரோமானியன்) அமர்ந்த வார்த்தைகளின் வடிவமைப்பு நம்முடைய அணுகல் அணுவ மொழிகளில் உள்ள போது நடந்த விதிமுறைகளை நம்புகிறது. நாங்கள் அனைத்து நவீன மொழிகளிலிருந்தும் தகவல்களை வழங்குகிறோம், நெறிமுறை- சொல்லை மீட்டமைப்பிற்கு ஒர நாங்கள் நிபந்தனையான புலங்களை தொடர்ந்து குறிப்பிடுவதற்காக பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், ஆனால் நாம் முன்னோர்வாக சோதனைகளை மறுநி நாம் பல தரவுத்தளங்களில் எங்கள் முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், முந்தைய முடிவுகளில் மேம்படுத்தும் என்று காட்டுகிறோம், அதில் குறைந்த உள்ளீட்டு தகவல் த', 'ur': 'پیٹروٹ ویڈ دوبارہ ساخت زبان تکامل کی تحقیق کے لئے مرکز ہے۔ یہ ایک قدیم زبان سے کلمات پیدا کرنا ہے اس کی مدرنی بیٹی زبانوں سے۔ ہم اس کاغذ میں لاتین پروٹو-کلمات کے لئے آٹوٹی کلمات فرم کی بازسازی کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں. ہم ان کے سارے لاتین باپ دادا کے شکل میں آغاز کلمات کی شکل رکھتے ہیں۔ ہمارا طریقہ اس قانون پر ہے جس میں لاتین کلمات آسانی زبانوں میں داخل ہوتے ہیں۔ ہم تمام مدرنی زبانوں سے معلومات کو استعمال کرتے ہیں، پروٹ ورڈ دوبارہ ساخت کرنے کے لئے ایک انامبل سیستم بناتے ہیں. ہم کانڈیونٹ لیبلینگ کے لئے کانڈیونٹ رنجینٹ فیلڈ استعمال کرتے ہیں، لیکن ہم نے دوبارہ نئورل نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ پہلی آزمائش کرلیں۔ ہم بہت سی ڈاٹ سٹ پر اپنے طریقے کا استعمال کرتے ہیں، دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا طریقہ پہلے کے نتیجے پر بہتر ہوتا ہے، اور کم اینٹ ڈاٹ کی لازم بھی ہے، جو تاریخی زبان شناسی میں ضروری ہے، جہاں منابع کم ہیں.', 'uz': "Tilning evolyutsiyatini o'rganish uchun so'zni qayta yuklash eng katta. Bu asbob tildagi so'zlarni yangilik qismi tilidan qaytadan qayta yaratish mumkin. Bu hujjatda, lotin protokollar so'zlari uchun avtomatik so'zni qayta ishlab chiqaramiz. Ko'pchilik Romansiya tilida yangi so'zlar rasmlarida (Fransuz, Italiya, Ispanchada, Portugalcha va Rumincha) aytganda, biz ularning umumiy latincha avval shaklida kamaytamiz. Lekin so'zlari yangi so'zlarni yangilik tilga kirishda sodir bo'lgan qoidalarga ishonadi. Biz hamma yangilik tillardan maʼlumot yozib olib tashlamiz, protokol so'zni qayta olish uchun foydalanuvchi tizimni yaratishmiz. Biz chegara taʼminlovchi davom etish uchun davom etishni foydalanamiz, lekin avtomatik davom etilgan tarmoqlar bilan bajaramiz. Biz bir necha maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi metodlarimizni qo'llamiz. Biz oldingi natijalarda o'zgarishni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Bu tarixi tillarida qisqa narsalar kerak bo'lgan narsalarning foydalanishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc phục hồi từ Proto là trung tâm của nghiên cứu tiến hóa ngôn ngữ. Nó có thể tái tạo lại những từ ngữ cổ đại từ những ngôn ngữ con gái hiện đại của nó. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta điều tra hình thức chữ tự động tái tạo thành chữ "Proto-words" Latin. Có các từ hiện đại trong nhiều ngôn ngữ Romance (Pháp, Ý, Tây Ban Nha, Bồ Đào Nha và Rumani), chúng tôi có ngụ ý hình dạng của tổ tiên Latin của họ. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta dựa trên các quy tắc xảy ra khi các từ Latin nhập vào những ngôn ngữ hiện đại. Chúng tôi sử dụng thông tin từ tất cả các ngôn ngữ hiện đại, xây dựng hệ thống kết hợp để tái thiết. Chúng tôi sử dụng các trường ngẫu nhiên có các hiệu ứng để phân loại các chuỗi, nhưng chúng tôi tiến hành thí nghiệm sơ bộ với các mạng thần kinh liên tục. Chúng tôi sử dụng phương pháp của chúng tôi trên nhiều nhà dữ liệu, cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi cải thiện các kết quả trước, cũng có lợi thế đòi hỏi ít dữ liệu nhập, điều cần thiết trong ngôn ngữ lịch sử, nơi nguồn tài nguyên thường rất ít.', 'bg': 'Реконструкцията на протодумата е от основно значение за изучаването на езиковата еволюция. Тя се състои в пресъздаване на думите на древен език от съвременните си дъщерни езици. В настоящата статия изследваме автоматична реконструкция на думи за латински прото-думи. Имайки съвременни словни форми на множество романски езици (френски, италиански, испански, португалски и румънски), ние извеждаме формата на техните общи латински предци. Нашият подход разчита на редовността, настъпила при навлизането на латинските думи в съвременните езици. Използваме информация от всички съвременни езици, изграждайки ансамбълна система за реконструкция на прото-думи. Използваме условни случайни полета за етикетиране на последователността, но провеждаме предварителни експерименти и с повтарящи се невронни мрежи. Прилагаме метода си върху множество набори от данни, показвайки, че методът ни се подобрява спрямо предишните резултати, като имаме и предимството да изискваме по-малко входни данни, което е от съществено значение в историческата лингвистика, където ресурсите обикновено са оскъдни.', 'nl': 'Proto-woord reconstructie is centraal in de studie van taalevolutie. Het bestaat uit het nabootsen van de woorden in een oude taal uit de moderne dochtertalen. In dit artikel onderzoeken we automatische woordvormreconstructie voor Latijnse proto-woorden. Met moderne woordvormen in meerdere Romaanse talen (Frans, Italiaans, Spaans, Portugees en Roemeens), concluderen we de vorm van hun gemeenschappelijke Latijnse voorouders. Onze aanpak berust op de regelmatigheden die zich voordeden toen de Latijnse woorden de moderne talen binnenkwamen. We maken gebruik van informatie uit alle moderne talen en bouwen een ensemblesysteem voor proto-woord reconstructie. We gebruiken voorwaardelijke random velden voor sequentie labeling, maar we voeren ook voorlopige experimenten uit met terugkerende neurale netwerken. We passen onze methode toe op meerdere datasets, waaruit blijkt dat onze methode verbetert ten opzichte van eerdere resultaten, met ook het voordeel dat er minder invoergegevens nodig zijn, wat essentieel is in de historische taalkunde, waar middelen over het algemeen schaars zijn.', 'hr': 'Rekonstrukcija protoriječi je centralna za ispitivanje evolucije jezika. To se sastoji od povratka riječi na drevnom jeziku iz modernog jezika kćerke. U ovom papiru istražujemo automatsku reč za rekonstrukciju latinskih protoriječi. Imajući moderne riječi u višestrukim rumunskim jezicima (francuski, italijanski, španjolski, portugalski i rumunski), uvodimo oblik njihovih zajedničkih latinskih predaka. Naš pristup se oslanja na regularnost koja se dogodila kada su latinske riječi ušle u moderne jezike. Privlačimo informacije iz svih modernih jezika, izgradimo ensemble za rekonstrukciju protoriječi. Koristimo uslovne nasumične polje za označavanje sekvencije, ali provodimo i preliminarne eksperimente s rekonstruiranim nervnim mrežama. Primjenjujemo našu metodu na višestruke datasete, pokazujući da se naša metoda poboljšava na prethodnim rezultatima, imati također prednost zahtijevanja manjih ulaznih podataka, što je ključno u istorijskoj jezičini, gdje su resursi obično manji.', 'de': 'Proto-Wort Rekonstruktion ist zentral für das Studium der Sprachentwicklung. Es besteht darin, die Wörter in einer alten Sprache aus ihren modernen Tochtersprachen nachzubilden. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir die automatische Wortformrekonstruktion für lateinische Proto-Wörter. Mit modernen Wortformen in mehreren romanischen Sprachen (Französisch, Italienisch, Spanisch, Portugiesisch und Rumänisch) leiten wir die Form ihrer gemeinsamen lateinischen Vorfahren ab. Unser Ansatz beruht auf den Regelmäßigkeiten, die auftraten, als die lateinischen Wörter in die modernen Sprachen eintraten. Wir nutzen Informationen aus allen modernen Sprachen und bauen ein Ensemblesystem für die Proto-Wort-Rekonstruktion auf. Wir verwenden bedingte Zufallsfelder zur Sequenzmarkierung, führen aber auch Vorversuche mit wiederkehrenden neuronalen Netzen durch. Wir wenden unsere Methode auf mehrere Datensätze an, was zeigt, dass sich unsere Methode gegenüber früheren Ergebnissen verbessert und auch den Vorteil hat, dass weniger Eingabedaten benötigt werden, was in der historischen Sprachwissenschaft, wo Ressourcen generell knapp sind, unerlässlich ist.', 'id': 'Rekonstruksi kata-kata proto adalah pusat untuk mempelajari evolusi bahasa. Ini terdiri dari menciptakan kembali kata-kata dalam bahasa kuno dari bahasa putrinya modern. Dalam kertas ini kami menyelidiki rekonstruksi otomatis bentuk kata untuk proto-kata Latin. Memiliki bentuk kata modern dalam berbagai bahasa Romawi (Perancis, Italia, Spanyol, Portugis dan Rumania), kami menyimpulkan bentuk nenek moyang Latin umum mereka. Our approach relies on the regularities that occurred when the Latin words entered the modern languages.  Kami menggunakan informasi dari semua bahasa modern, membangun sistem ensemble untuk rekonstruksi kata-kata proto. Kami menggunakan medan acak kondisional untuk label urutan, tapi kami melakukan percobaan preliminar dengan jaringan saraf yang berkurang juga. Kami menerapkan metode kami pada beberapa set data, menunjukkan bahwa metode kami meningkat pada hasil sebelumnya, juga memiliki keuntungan untuk membutuhkan data input yang lebih sedikit, yang penting dalam bahasa sejarah, di mana sumber daya umumnya sedikit.', 'ko': '원어 재구성은 언어 진화 연구의 핵심이다.그것은 현대 자언어에서 고대 언어의 단어를 재창조하는 것을 포함한다.본고에서 우리는 라틴어 원어의 자동 어형 재건을 연구했다.여러 종류의 로맨스(프랑스어, 이탈리아어, 스페인어, 포르투갈어와 루마니아어)가 모두 현대 어휘 형식을 가지고 있기 때문에 우리는 그것들의 공통된 라틴 조상의 형식을 추정해 낸다.우리의 방법은 라틴어가 현대 언어에 들어갈 때 나타나는 규칙에 의존한다.우리는 모든 현대 언어의 정보를 이용하여 원어 재건에 사용되는 통합 시스템을 구축한다.우리는 조건 랜덤장으로 서열 표시를 했지만, 귀속신경 네트워크로 초보적인 실험을 진행했다.우리는 여러 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법을 응용했다. 이것은 우리의 방법이 이전의 결과를 개선하고 데이터를 적게 입력해야 하는 장점을 가진다는 것을 나타낸다. 이것은 자원이 통상적으로 희소한 역사 언어학에서 없어서는 안 될 것이다.', 'da': 'Proto-ord rekonstruktion er centralt for studiet af sprogudvikling. Det består i at genskabe ordene på et gammelt sprog fra sine moderne dattersprog. I denne artikel undersøger vi automatisk ordform rekonstruktion for latinske protoord. Med moderne ordformer på flere romanske sprog (fransk, italiensk, spansk, portugisisk og rumænsk), udleder vi formen af deres fælles latinske forfædre. Vores tilgang er baseret på de regelmæssigheder, der opstod, da de latinske ord kom ind i de moderne sprog. Vi udnytter information fra alle moderne sprog og bygger et ensemblesystem til proto-ordrekonstruktion. Vi bruger betingede tilfældige felter til sekvensmærkning, men vi udfører også foreløbige eksperimenter med tilbagevendende neurale netværk. Vi anvender vores metode på flere datasæt, hvilket viser, at vores metode forbedres i forhold til tidligere resultater, og har også den fordel at kræve mindre input data, hvilket er afgørende i historisk lingvistik, hvor ressourcerne generelt er knappe.', 'sw': 'Ujengaji wa maneno ya upya ni wa muhimu katika utafiti wa mabadiliko ya lugha. Ni pamoja na kutengeneza maneno katika lugha ya zamani kutoka lugha za binti zake za kisasa. Katika karatasi hii tunachunguza neno la kujitegemea kutengeneza tena kwa maneno ya protoko ya Latin. Kwa kuwa na maneno ya kisasa katika lugha mbalimbali za KiRomania (Kifaransa, Kiitalia, Kihispania, Kireno na KiRomania), tunapungua aina ya baba zao wa Kilatini. Hatua yetu inategemea sheria zilizotokea wakati maneno ya Kilatini yalipoingia lugha za kisasa. Tunaweza kutoa taarifa kutoka lugha zote za kisasa, kutengeneza mfumo wa upya wa maneno ya protoko. Tunatumia maeneo ya hali ya kawaida kwa ajili ya kuthibitisha mifano, lakini tunafanya majaribio ya awali kwa mitandao ya neura yanayoendelea pia. Tunatumia mbinu yetu kwenye seti za takwimu mbalimbali, kuonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inaongezeka kwenye matokeo yaliyopita, ikiwa pia ni faida ya kutaka takwimu zisizo za ndani, ambazo ni muhimu katika lugha za kihistoria, ambapo rasilimali kwa ujumla ni nadra.', 'fa': 'بازسازی کلمه\u200cهای پروتورات مرکز مطالعه تکامل زبانی است. این کلمات را در زبان قدیمی از زبان دختر مدرنش بازسازی می کند. در این کاغذ ما به عنوان اصلاح کلمه\u200cهای خودکار برای کلمه\u200cهای لاتین تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. با فرم کلمه مدرنی در زبان های رومانی (فرانسوی، ایتالیایی، اسپانیایی، پورتوژیک و رومانی) شکل نیاکان لاتین مشترک آنها را وارد می\u200cکنیم. دسترسی ما بر روی معمولی که اتفاق افتاد وقتی کلمات لاتین به زبانهای مدرن وارد شد، بستگی دارد. ما اطلاعات را از همه زبان مدرن تحت تأثیر قرار می دهیم، یک سیستم تأثیر برای بازسازی پیش کلمات. ما از زمینه های تصادفی استفاده می کنیم برای برچسب برچسب برچسب برچسب، اما ما هم آزمایش های پیشینی با شبکه های عصبی بازگشت را انجام می دهیم. ما روش خودمان را روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متعدد استفاده می\u200cکنیم، نشان می\u200cدهیم که روش ما در نتیجه\u200cهای قبلی بهتر می\u200cشود، و به نیازی داده\u200cهای ورودی کمتر نیاز دارد، که در زبان\u200cشناسی تاریخی ضروری دارد، جایی منابع عمو', 'af': "Protowoord herkonstruksie is sentrale vir die studie van taal evolusie. Dit bestaan van die werk van die woorde in 'n ou taal van sy moderne dogter tale. In hierdie papier ondersoek ons outomatiese woord vorm herkonstruksie vir Latynse protowoorde. Om moderne woord vorms in veelvuldige Romanse tale (Frans, Italiese, Spaanse, Portugese en Romaniese), het ons die vorm van hulle gemeenskaplike Latynse voorvaders ingevoer. Ons toegang verlig op die regulariteite wat voorgekom het wanneer die Latynse woorde die moderne tale ingevoer het. Ons verwyder inligting van alle moderne tale, bou 'n ensemble stelsel vir protowoord herkonstruksie. Ons gebruik voorwaardes willekeurige velde vir volgorde etiketting, maar ons doen voorwaardes eksperimente met herhaalde neuralnetwerke ook. Ons het ons metode aanwend op veelvuldige datastelle, wat wys dat ons metode op vorige resultate verbeter word, en dit het ook die voordeel van minder ingevoerde data nodig, wat in historiese lingvistike behoorlik is, waar hulpbronne generellik skaars is.", 'am': 'የፕሮጀክት ቃላት መሥራት የቋንቋ ልውጤት ትምህርት ማዕከላዊ ነው፡፡ በአሁኑ የሴት ልጅ ቋንቋ ቃላትን በመጀመሪያው ቋንቋ መፍጠር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ለላቲን ፕሮሮጀክት ቃላት የራሳቸውን ቃላት መሠረት እናምርመራለን፡፡ አዲስ ቃላት በሮማንኛ ቋንቋ (ፈረንሳይ፣ ጣሊያንኛ፣ ስፓኒሽ፣ ፖርቱጋዊ እና ሮማኒያን) እናስፈራራለን፡፡ የLatin ቃላት በአዲስ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ሲገቡ በተደረገው ሥርዓት ላይ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን ቋንቋዎች ሁሉ መረጃዎችን እናስሰጥታለን፣ ለፕሮሮግራም ቃላት መሠረት የሚደረገውን ስርዓት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአካባቢው እርሻን በሥርዓት ለመፈለግ እናስቀምጣለን፤ ነገር ግን የመጀመሪያውን ፈተና በቀጥሎ የደዌብ መረብ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የዳታ ቋንቋዎች በተለየ ታሪካዊ ቋንቋ ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ የሀብት መብት በጠቅላላ ባለበት ታሪክ ቋንቋ ውስጥ የጎደለውን የድምፅ ጥቅም እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Rindërtimi proto-fjalësh është qendror për studimin e evolucionit të gjuhës. Përbëhet nga rikrijimi i fjalëve në një gjuhë të lashtë nga gjuhët moderne të vajzës së saj. Në këtë letër ne hetojmë rindërtimin automatik të form ës së fjalëve për proto-fjalët latine. Duke pasur form ë fjalësh moderne në gjuhë të shumta rumune (franceze, italiane, spanjolle, portugale dhe rumune), ne përfundojmë formën e paraardhësve të tyre të përbashkët latinë. Përqasja jonë mbështetet në rregullitetet që ndodhën kur fjalët latine hynë në gjuhët moderne. Ne përdorim informacionin nga të gjitha gjuhët moderne, duke ndërtuar një sistem ensemble për rindërtimin e proto-fjalëve. Ne përdorim fusha të rastësishme të kushtueshme për etiketën e sekuencës, por ne kryejmë eksperimente paraprake me rrjete neurale të përsëritura gjithashtu. Ne aplikojmë metodën tonë në grupe të shumta të dhënash, duke treguar se metoda jonë përmirësohet në rezultatet e mëparshme, duke pasur gjithashtu avantazhin e kërkuar më pak të dhëna të hyrjes, gjë që është thelbësore në gjuhën historike, ku burimet janë përgjithësisht të pakta.', 'hy': 'Նախաբառի վերականգնումը լեզվի էվոլյուցիայի ուսումնասիրության կենտրոնական մասն է կազմում: Այն կազմված է բառերի վերականգնումից հին լեզվով իր ժամանակակից դուստր լեզվով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք լատիներեն նախաբառերի ավտոմատիկ բառի ձևի վերականգնումը: Մենք ունենք ժամանակակից բառերի ձևեր բազմաթիվ ռոմաներեն լեզուներում (ֆրանսերեն, իտալիա, իսպաներեն, պորտուգալերեն և ռոմաներեն), մենք եզրակացնում ենք նրանց ընդհանուր լատիներեն նախնիների ձևը: Մեր մոտեցումը հիմնված է այն օրինակությունների վրա, որոնք տեղի ունեցան, երբ լատիներեն բառերը մտան ժամանակակից լեզուներին: Մենք օգտագործում ենք տեղեկատվությունը բոլոր ժամանակակից լեզուներից, ստեղծում ենք նախաբառերի վերականգնման համակարգ: Մենք օգտագործում ենք պայմանավոր պատահական դաշտեր հաջորդականության պիտակ տալու համար, բայց մենք նախաձեռնական փորձեր ենք կատարում նաև կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցերի հետ: Մենք կիրառում ենք մեր մեթոդը բազմաթիվ տվյալների համակարգերի վրա, ցույց տալով, որ մեր մեթոդը բարելավվում է նախկին արդյունքների վրա, ունենալով նաև առավելությունը պակասելու ավելի քիչ տվյալներ, ինչը կարևոր է պատմական լեզվաբանության մեջ, որտեղ ռեսուր', 'bn': 'ভাষা বিবর্তনের গবেষণার জন্য প্রথম শব্দ পুনর্গঠন কেন্দ্রীয়। এটি আধুনিক মেয়ের ভাষা থেকে পুরোনো ভাষায় শব্দগুলো পুনরুদ্ধার করার জন্য। In this paper we investigate automatic word form reconstruction for Latin proto-words.  অনেক রোমানিস ভাষায় আধুনিক শব্দের ফর্ম (ফরাসী, ইতালিয়ান, স্প্যানিশ, পর্তুগীজ এবং রোমানীয়), আমরা তাদের সাধারণ ল্যাটিন পূর আমাদের পদক্ষেপ নির্ভর করে যখন ল্যাটিন শব্দ আধুনিক ভাষায় প্রবেশ করেছিল তখন সেই নিয়মের উপর। আমরা আধুনিক ভাষা থেকে তথ্য প্রদান করি, প্রোটো-ওয়ার্ড পুনঃনির্মাণের জন্য একটি সিস্টেম তৈরি করি। কিন্তু আমরা প্রাথমিক পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা করি প্রাথমিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক দিয়ে। আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি ডাটাসেটে আমাদের পদ্ধতি প্রয়োগ করি, যেখানে দেখাচ্ছি যে পূর্বের ফলাফলে আমাদের পদ্ধতি উন্নত হয়েছে, এছাড়াও কম ইনপুটের তথ্য প্রয়োজন, যা ঐতিহাসি', 'ca': "La reconstrucció de paraules protogròniques és central en l'estudi de l'evolució del llenguatge. consisteix en recrear les paraules en un llenguatge antic de les seves llengües filles modernes. En aquest article investigam la reconstrucció automàtica de forma de paraules per proto-paraules llatins. Tenint formes modernes de paraules en múltiples llengües romanes (francès, italià, espanyol, portuguès i rumà), inferim la forma dels seus avantpassats llatins comuns. El nostre enfocament es basa en les regularitats que van passar quan les paraules llatins van entrar en les llengües modernes. Utilitzem informació de totes les llengües modernes, construint un sistema d'ensemble per a la reconstrucció de protoclars. Utilitzem camps aleatoris condicionats per etiquetar seqüències, però també fem experiments preliminars amb xarxes neurals recurrents. Aplicam el nostre mètode en múltiples conjunts de dades, mostrant que el nostre mètode millora en resultats anteriors, tenint també l'avantatge de requerir menys dades d'entrada, que és essencial en la lingüística històrica, on els recursos són generalment escassos.", 'cs': 'Protoslovní rekonstrukce je ústřední pro studium jazykové evoluce. Skládá se z obnovení slov ve starověkém jazyce ze svých moderních dceřiných jazyků. V tomto článku zkoumáme automatickou rekonstrukci slovních forem pro latinská proto-slova. S moderními slovními formami v několika románských jazycích (francouzština, italština, španělština, portugalština a rumunština) odvozujeme podobu jejich společných latinských předků. Náš přístup spoléhá na pravidelnosti, které nastaly, když latinská slova vstoupila do moderních jazyků. Využíváme informace ze všech moderních jazyků a budujeme souborový systém pro rekonstrukci protoslov. Pro značení sekvencí používáme podmíněná náhodná pole, ale provádíme i předběžné experimenty s rekurentními neuronovými sítěmi. Naši metodu aplikujeme na více datových sadách, což ukazuje, že naše metoda se zlepšuje oproti předchozím výsledkům a má také tu výhodu, že vyžaduje méně vstupních dat, což je nezbytné v historické lingvistice, kde jsou zdroje obecně vzácné.', 'az': 'Proto-s√∂zl…ôrin yenid…ôn inŇüallarńĪ dil evrimini √∂yr…ônm…ôy…ô m…ôqs…ôdildir. Bu s√∂zl…ôri …ôvv…ôlki dilind…ôn yenid…ôn yaratmaqdan idi. Bu kańüńĪzda Latinc…ô proto-s√∂zl…ôrinin avtomatik s√∂z formunu yenid…ôn inŇüa edirik. Ňěimdiki kelimel…ôr √ßoxlu RomalńĪ dill…ôrind…ô (FransńĪz, ńįtalyan, ńįspanyol, Portugal v…ô Rumun dill…ôrind…ô) formalarńĪ vardńĪr. Biz onlarńĪn ortaq Latinc…ô atalarńĪnńĪn formunu bel…ô bildiririk. Bizim yaxńĪnlńĪńüńĪmńĪz, Latinc…ô s√∂zl…ôrin modern dill…ôr…ô girdiyi zaman g…ôl…ôn d√ľzg√ľnl√ľkl…ôr…ô t…ôv…ôkk√ľl edir. Biz b√ľt√ľn modern dill…ôrin m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪ, proto-s√∂zl…ôrin yenid…ôn inŇüallaŇüdńĪrma sistemini inŇüa edirik. Biz sńĪralama etiketi √ľ√ß√ľn m√ľ…ôyy…ôn vaxtlńĪ sah…ôl…ôri istifad…ô edirik, amma yenid…ôn n√∂ral ańülarńĪ il…ô …ôvv…ôlki t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôr d…ô istifad…ô edirik. Biz metodumuzu √ßoxlu veril…ôn qurńüulara istifad…ô edirik, metodumuzun …ôvv…ôlki sonu√ßlarńĪnda daha yaxŇüńĪlaŇüńĪr, daha az giriŇü veril…ôn veril…ôn veril…ônl…ôrin istifad…ôsin…ô d…ô istifad…ô edirik. Bu tarihi dil istiqam…ôtind…ô √ßoxlu m√∂vcuddur, √ßoxlu m…ônb…ôtl…ôr d…ô az idi.', 'tr': 'Proto-sözler täzeden inşaat dili evoluciýasynyň adyna göz öňünde durulýar. Bu sözleri moderni gyz dilinden öňki dilde täzeden döretmäge meňzeýär. Biz bu kagyzda Latynyň proto-sözleri üçin otomatik sözleriň nusgasyny barýarys. Modern sözlerimiz birnäçe romança dilinde (fransuzça, italiýa, espaýnça, portugalça we rumynça) bar we olaryň orta latin atalarynyň şeklini görkeýäris. Biziň ýaryşymyz Latynyň sözleri modern dillerde girdikde bolan düzgünliklere ynanýar. Biz ähli modern dillerden maglumat taýýarlap, proto-söz täzeden inşa etmek üçin bir sistem guralýarys. Biz şartlarda rastgele sahypalary düzenlemek üçin ulanýarys ýöne tekrarly näyral şebekeleri bilen ilkinji deneyler çykýarys. Biz öz yönümizi birnäçe veri setirlere uygulaýarys. Öňki netijelerimizde ýakynlaşýar we daş giriş maglumatlary gerek däldir. Bu taryhy lingwistiklerde möhüm däldir. Ýöne çeşmelerimiz az bolan ýerde ýok bolýar.', 'et': 'Protosõna rekonstruktsioon on keele evolutsiooni uurimisel keskse tähtsusega. See koosneb sõnade taastamisest iidses keeles oma kaasaegsetest tütrekeeltest. Käesolevas töös uurime automaatset sõnavormi rekonstrueerimist ladina protosõnadele. Kaasaegsed sõnavormid mitmes romaani keeles (prantsuse, itaalia, hispaania, portugali ja rumeenia keeles), järeldame nende ühiste ladina esivanemate vormi. Meie lähenemine tugineb korrapärasustele, mis ilmnesid ladina keelsete sõnade sisenemisel kaasaegsetesse keeltesse. Me kasutame infot kõigist kaasaegsetest keeltest, ehitades ansambli süsteemi protosõnade rekonstrueerimiseks. Järjekordade märgistamiseks kasutame tingimuslikke juhuslikke välju, kuid teeme ka esialgseid katseid korduvate närvivõrkudega. Me rakendame oma meetodit mitmetele andmekogumitele, näidates, et meie meetod paraneb varasematest tulemustest, omades ka eelist, et nõutakse vähem sisendandmeid, mis on oluline ajaloolises keeleteaduses, kus ressursse on üldiselt vähe.', 'fi': 'Protosanarekonstruktio on keskeisessä asemassa kielen kehityksen tutkimuksessa. Se koostuu sanojen uudelleenluomisesta muinaisella kielellä sen nykyaikaisista tytärkielistä. Tässä työssä tutkimme automaattista sanamuodon rekonstruktiota latinalaisille protosanoille. Nykyaikaiset sanamuodot useilla romaanisilla kielillä (ranska, italia, espanja, portugali ja romania), päättelemme niiden yhteisten latinalaisten esi-isien muodon. Lähestymistapamme perustuu sääntöihin, jotka ilmenivät latinan sanojen tultua nykyaikaisiin kieliin. Hyödynnämme tietoa kaikilta nykyaikaisilta kieliltä ja rakennamme ryhmäjärjestelmän protosanarekonstruktiota varten. Käytämme ehdollisia satunnaiskenttiä sekvenssimerkinnässä, mutta teemme myös alustavia kokeita toistuvilla hermoverkoilla. Sovellamme menetelmää useisiin aineistoihin, mikä osoittaa, että menetelmämme paranee aikaisempiin tuloksiin verrattuna, ja sen etuna on myös se, että syöttödataa tarvitaan vähemmän, mikä on olennaista historiallisessa kielitieteessä, jossa resursseja on yleensä niukasti.', 'bs': 'Rekonstrukcija protoriječi je centralna za studiju evolucije jezika. To se sastoji od ponovnog stvaranja riječi na drevnom jeziku iz modernog jezika kćerke. U ovom papiru istražujemo automatsku reč za rekonstrukciju latinskih protoriječi. Imajući moderne formulare riječi na višestrukim rimunskim jezicima (francuski, italijanski, španjolski, portugalski i rumunski), uvodimo oblik njihovih zajedničkih latinskih predaka. Naš pristup se oslanja na regularnost koja se desila kada su latinske riječi ušle u moderne jezike. Privlačimo informacije iz svih modernih jezika, izgradimo sistem ensemble za rekonstrukciju protoriječi. Koristimo uslovne nasumične polje za etiketiranje sekvence, ali provodimo i preliminarne eksperimente sa rekonstruiranim nervnim mrežama. Primjenjujemo našu metodu na višestruke datasete, pokazujući da se naša metoda poboljšava na prethodnim rezultatima, imati također prednost zahteva manje ulaznih podataka, što je ključno u istorijskoj jezičini, gdje su resursi obično manji.', 'ha': "Salon da aka canza tsarin magana na tsakanin zuwa karatun na buƙatan harshen. Ina ƙunsa da ya sami magana cikin harshen tsohon daga harshen 'yanzu' yanzu. Ga wannan takardan, muna tambayar ka tsarin tsarin maganar farat ɗaya wa masu shirya wa shiryoyin ayuka na Latin. Ko da tsarin magana na yanzu a cikin wasu harshen Rumitse (Faransiya, Italian, Isbanish, Portugueski da Rumiyaniya), za'a ƙaranci kamar irin ubanninsu na farko na Latin. Mataimakinmu yana dõgara ga dasuka da ta zo a lokacin da maganar Latin suka shiga harshen nan yanzu. Muna samun bayani ga duk harshe na yanzu, suna samun wani na'urar da za'a samu'ar da tsari na-faɗi. Tuna yi amfani da field masu buƙata wa masu lissafa, kuma amma muna samun jarrabãwa na farko da tsarin neura wanda ya dace. Tuna amfani da hanyoyinmu a kan wasu mutane da aka nuna, hanyoyinmu za'a ƙarfafa game da matsalan na farko, kuma yana da amfani da ya kamata data ƙaranci, da kuma yana da muhimu a cikin linguin historical, inda manyan mutane ke da abu kaɗan.", 'sk': 'Rekonstrukcija protobesed je ključnega pomena pri študiju jezikovne evolucije. Sestavljen je iz ustvarjanja besed v starodavnem jeziku iz sodobnih hčerinskih jezikov. V prispevku raziskujemo avtomatsko rekonstrukcijo oblik besed za latinske protobesede. S sodobnimi besednimi oblikami v več romanskih jezikih (francoščina, italijanščina, španščina, portugalščina in romunščina) sklepamo obliko njihovih skupnih latinskih prednikov. Naš pristop temelji na pravilnostih, ki so se pojavile, ko so latinske besede vstopile v sodobne jezike. Izkoriščamo informacije iz vseh sodobnih jezikov in gradimo ansambelni sistem za rekonstrukcijo protobesed. Za označevanje zaporedja uporabljamo pogojna naključna polja, izvajamo pa tudi predhodne poskuse s ponavljajočimi se nevronskimi omrežji. Našo metodo uporabljamo na več naborih podatkov, kar kaže, da se naša metoda izboljšuje od prejšnjih rezultatov in ima tudi prednost, da zahteva manj vhodnih podatkov, kar je bistveno v zgodovinski jezikoslovnosti, kjer so viri na splošno omejeni.', 'jv': 'Proto-word rebus sestruksi punika ingkang karo akeh basa anyar luwih dumadhi Muh bener sing nggawe kelangen langkung banjuré, ning langkung endi. Nan pepulan iki, kita mulai perbudhakan maneh pawaran sawar nggawe ngupakan kanggo proto-pawaran Latin. Teng awak modèrn kuwi kalem karo akeh luwih basa rumani (Perancis, Itilian, Spanish, portugis, lan rumani), awak dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang kelas kuwi padha pawaran Latin é. Ndheke awak dhéwé kuwi nglanggar aturan mruput sing bisa kelas nang kelas Latin kuwi barang modèrn. Awak dhéwé ngewehke informasi ning saben lawang, nggawe sistem simbol kanggo nggawe proto-word nggawe gerakan. Monday section', 'bo': 'གནད་སྡུད་གྱི་གནད་དོན་གཅིག་སྒྲིག་ཆ་བསྐྱར་བཟོ་བ་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད་མིན་ལ་དབུས་ དེ་ནི་དུས་ཀྱི་བུ་མོའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་རྙིང་གི་སྐད་ཆ་ཞིག་གིས་གཞན་ཡང་བསྐྱར་བཟོ་བ་དེ་རེད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཀྱི་རྩིས་གཞི་ལ་ཡང་བསྐྱར་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་ད་ལྟོའི་ཐ་སྙད་འདི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདི་དག་རྣམས་ལས་ སྐད་རིས། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཆེས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ནང་དུ་འཇུག ང་ཚོས་ད་ལྟོའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་མང་ཙམ་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We use conditional random fields for sequence labeling, but we conduct preliminary experiments with recurrent neural networks as well. ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཕྱགས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་ནས་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱི་རྗེས་འབྲས་ཐོག', 'he': 'שיפוי מילים פרוטו מרכזית למחקר האבולוציה של השפה. הוא מורכב ביצירת מחדש את המילים בשפה עתיקה משפה הבת המודרנית שלה. In this paper we investigate automatic word form reconstruction for Latin proto-words.  עם צורות מילים מודרניות בשפות רומניות רבות (צרפתית, איטלקית, ספרדית, פורטוגזית ורומנית), אנו מסתכלים על צורת אבותיהם הלטיניים המשותפים. הגישה שלנו מסמכת על החוקיות שקרו כשהמילים הלטיניות נכנסו לשפות המודרניות. We leverage information from all modern languages, building an ensemble system for proto-word reconstruction.  אנו משתמשים בשדות אקראיים בתנאים לתווית רצף, אבל אנו מבצעים ניסויים מקדימים גם עם רשתות עצביות חוזרות. אנו משתמשים בשיטה שלנו על קבוצות נתונים רבות, מראים שהשיטה שלנו משתפרת על תוצאות קודמות, שיש לנו גם יתרון לדרוש נתונים כניסה פחות, שזה חיוני בלשון היסטורי, שבו משאבים הם בדרך כלל נדירים.'}
{'en': 'A Computational Model for the Linguistic Notion of Morphological Paradigm', 'ar': 'نموذج حسابي للمفهوم اللغوي للنموذج الصرفي', 'fr': 'Un modèle informatique pour la notion linguistique de paradigme morphologique', 'es': 'Un modelo computacional para la noción lingüística del paradigma morfológico', 'pt': 'Um modelo computacional para a noção linguística de paradigma morfológico', 'ja': '形態パラダイムの言語学的概念のための計算モデル', 'zh': '形容范式语言者算模形', 'hi': 'रूपात्मक प्रतिमान की भाषाई धारणा के लिए एक कम्प्यूटेशनल मॉडल', 'ru': 'Вычислительная модель для лингвистического понятия морфологической парадигмы', 'ga': 'Samhail Ríomhaireachta do Nóisean Teangeolaíoch Paraidím Mhoirfeolaíochta', 'hu': 'A morfológiai paradicsom nyelvi fogalmának számítástechnikai modell', 'el': 'Ένα υπολογιστικό μοντέλο για τη γλωσσική αντίληψη του Μορφολογικού Παραδείγματος', 'kk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Kompiuterinis morfologinės paradigmos kalbinės sąvokos modelis', 'it': 'Un modello computazionale per la nozione linguistica del paradigma morfologico', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'A Computational Model for the Linguistic Notion of Morphological Paradigm', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Mudell tal-Komputazzjoni għall-Kunċett Lingwistiku tal-Paradigma Morfoloġika', 'mn': 'Морфологик парадигм-ын Linguistic Notion of the Computational Model for the Linguistic Model of the Morphological Paradigm', 'no': 'Name', 'ka': 'Name', 'pl': 'Model obliczeniowy językowego pojęcia paradygmatu morfologicznego', 'ro': 'Un model computațional pentru noțiunea lingvistică a Paradigmului Morfologic', 'sr': 'Kompjuterski model za lingvističku obavijest o morfološkoj paradigmi', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Computation Model for the Linguistic Notion of Morphological Paradigm', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'En beräkningsmodell för den språkliga föreställningen om morfologiskt paradigm', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một Mô hình vi tính cho Thông báo ngôn ngữ của Morphological Paradigm', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Изчислителен модел за лингвистичното понятие на морфологичната парадигма', 'nl': 'Een computermodel voor de taalkundige opvatting van morfologisch paradigma', 'hr': 'Kompjuterski model za Lingističku obavijest o morfološkoj paradigmi', 'da': 'En beregningsmodel for den sproglige opfattelse af morfologisk paradigme', 'ko': '형태 모범 언어학 개념의 계산 모델', 'de': 'Ein Computermodell für die sprachliche Auffassung des morphologischen Paradigmas', 'id': 'Model Komputasi untuk Notisi Linguistik Paradigma Morfologis', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Modeli ya Hesabu kwa Tamko la Kilinguistic ya Paradigm ya Kimorphological', 'sq': 'Një model kompjuterik për njoftimin gjuhësor të Paradigmit Morfologjik', 'am': 'የመርፎሎጂ ፋራዳጊ ማስታወቂያ አቋራጭ', 'hy': 'Մորֆոլոգիական պարադիգմայի լեզվաբանական հասկացության համակարգչային մոդել', 'az': 'Name', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'Un model computacional per la noció lingüística del paradigme morfològic', 'cs': 'Výpočetní model jazykového pojetí morfologického paradigma', 'bs': 'Kompjuterski model za Lingističku obavijest o morfološkoj paradigmi', 'et': 'Morfoloogilise paradigmi keelelise mõiste arvutuslik mudel', 'fi': 'A Computational Model for the Linguistic Notion of Morfological Paradigm', 'tr': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'he': 'Name', 'jv': 'A Digital model for the Linguist Notion of', 'sk': 'Računalniški model za jezikovni pojem morfološke paradigme', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'A Computer Model for the Linguistic Notion of Morphological Paradigm'}
{'en': 'In supervised learning of morphological patterns, the strategy of generalizing inflectional tables into more abstract paradigms through alignment of the longest common subsequence found in an inflection table has been proposed as an efficient method to deduce the inflectional behavior of unseen word forms. In this paper, we extend this notion of morphological ‘paradigm’ from earlier work and provide a formalization that more accurately matches linguist intuitions about what an inflectional paradigm is. Additionally, we propose and evaluate a mechanism for learning full human-readable paradigm specifications from incomplete dataa scenario when we only have access to a few inflected forms for each lexeme, and want to reconstruct the missing inflections as well as generalize and group the witnessed patterns into a model of more abstract paradigmatic behavior of lexemes.', 'ar': 'في التعلم الخاضع للإشراف للأنماط المورفولوجية ، تم اقتراح استراتيجية تعميم جداول التصريف في نماذج أكثر تجريدًا من خلال محاذاة أطول النتائج الشائعة الموجودة في جدول التصريف كطريقة فعالة لاستنتاج السلوك التصريف لأشكال الكلمات غير المرئية. في هذه الورقة ، نوسع مفهوم "النموذج" الصرفي من العمل السابق ونقدم شكلاً يتطابق بشكل أكثر دقة مع الحدس اللغوي حول ماهية النموذج التصريف. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقترح ونقيم آلية لتعلم مواصفات نموذجية كاملة يمكن للبشر قراءتها من بيانات غير كاملة - وهو سيناريو عندما يكون لدينا فقط إمكانية الوصول إلى عدد قليل من النماذج المنعكسة لكل معجم ، ونريد إعادة بناء التصريفات المفقودة وكذلك تعميم وتجميع شهدت أنماطًا في نموذج لسلوك نموذجي أكثر تجريدًا من lexemes.', 'es': 'En el aprendizaje supervisado de patrones morfológicos, se ha propuesto la estrategia de generalizar tablas de inflexión en paradigmas más abstractos a través de la alineación de la subsecuencia común más larga encontrada en una tabla de inflexión como un método eficiente para deducir el comportamiento de inflexión de formas de palabras invisibles. En este artículo, ampliamos esta noción de «paradigma» morfológico de trabajos anteriores y proporcionamos una formalización que coincide más exactamente con las intuiciones lingüistas sobre lo que es un paradigma de inflexión. Además, proponemos y evaluamos un mecanismo para aprender especificaciones de paradigmas legibles por humanos a partir de datos incompletos, un escenario en el que solo tenemos acceso a unas pocas formas flexionadas para cada lexema y queremos reconstruir las inflexiones faltantes, así como generalizar y agrupar los patrones observados en un modelo de comportamiento paradigmático más abstracto de los lexemas.', 'pt': "No aprendizado supervisionado de padrões morfológicos, a estratégia de generalizar tabelas flexionais em paradigmas mais abstratos através do alinhamento da subsequência comum mais longa encontrada em uma tabela de inflexão foi proposta como um método eficiente para deduzir o comportamento flexional de formas de palavras não vistas. Neste artigo, estendemos essa noção de 'paradigma' morfológico de trabalhos anteriores e fornecemos uma formalização que corresponde com mais precisão às intuições linguísticas sobre o que é um paradigma flexional. Além disso, propomos e avaliamos um mecanismo para aprender especificações completas de paradigmas legíveis por humanos a partir de dados incompletos - um cenário em que só temos acesso a algumas formas flexionadas para cada lexema e queremos reconstruir as inflexões ausentes, bem como generalizar e agrupar as padrões testemunhados em um modelo de comportamento paradigmático mais abstrato de lexemas.", 'fr': "Dans l'apprentissage supervisé de modèles morphologiques, la stratégie de généralisation des tables d'inflexion en paradigmes plus abstraits par l'alignement de la plus longue sous-séquence commune trouvée dans une table d'inflexion a été proposée comme méthode efficace pour déduire le comportement d'inflexion de formes de mots invisibles. Dans cet article, nous étendons cette notion de «\xa0paradigme\xa0» morphologique à partir de travaux antérieurs et proposons une formalisation qui correspond plus exactement aux intuitions des linguistes sur ce qu'est un paradigme flexionnel. De plus, nous proposons et évaluons un mécanisme pour apprendre des spécifications de paradigmes lisibles par l'homme à partir de données incomplètes, un scénario dans lequel nous n'avons accès qu'à quelques formes fléchies pour chaque lexème, et que nous voulons reconstruire les inflexions manquantes ainsi que généraliser et regrouper les modèles observés dans un modèle de comportement paradigmatique plus abstrait des lexèmes.", 'ja': '形態パターンの監視学習では、変形テーブルに見られる最長の共通点の整列を通じて、変形テーブルをより抽象的なパラダイムに一般化する戦略が、見えない単語形式の変形挙動を推論する効率的な方法として提案されている。この論文では、以前の研究からこの「形態的パラダイム」の概念を拡張し、言語学者の直観とより正確に屈折パラダイムとは何かを一致させる形式化を提供する。さらに、私たちは、不完全なデータから完全な人間が読み取り可能なパラダイム仕様を学習するためのメカニズムを提案し、評価します。このシナリオは、各lexemeのいくつかの屈折されたフォームにのみアクセスでき、欠落している屈折を再構築し、目撃されたパターンを一般化し、lexemesのより抽象的なパラダイム行動のモデルにグループ化したい場合です。', 'zh': '监督于形模之中,因对齐词形变化之最长者公共子序,推词形变化之表于更象之策已发,以为推不见之单词屈行之效。 于本文中,展形态学范式之名,供一形式化,配语言学家屈折之直觉。 又估一不完之数可读规范之机-当访词素数屈折,欲重建阙失之词形,及推广见证之式,及分组之词素。', 'hi': "रूपात्मक पैटर्न के पर्यवेक्षित सीखने में, एक इन्फ्लेक्शन टेबल में पाए जाने वाले सबसे लंबे समय तक सामान्य उप-अनुक्रम के संरेखण के माध्यम से अधिक अमूर्त प्रतिमानों में इन्फ्लेक्शनल तालिकाओं को सामान्यीकृत करने की रणनीति को अनदेखी शब्द रूपों के प्रतिबिंबित व्यवहार को कम करने के लिए एक कुशल विधि के रूप में प्रस्तावित किया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम पहले के काम से रूपात्मक 'प्रतिमान' की इस धारणा का विस्तार करते हैं और एक औपचारिकता प्रदान करते हैं जो अधिक सटीक रूप से भाषाविद अंतर्ज्ञान से मेल खाता है कि एक इन्फ्लेक्शनल प्रतिमान क्या है। इसके अतिरिक्त, हम अधूरे डेटा से पूर्ण मानव-पठनीय प्रतिमान विनिर्देशों को सीखने के लिए एक तंत्र का प्रस्ताव और मूल्यांकन करते हैं- एक परिदृश्य जब हमारे पास केवल प्रत्येक लेक्सेम के लिए कुछ इनफ्लेक्टेड रूपों तक पहुंच होती है, और लापता इन्फ्लेक्शन्स का पुनर्निर्माण करना चाहते हैं और साथ ही साथ देखे गए पैटर्न को लेक्सेम्स के अधिक अमूर्त रूपात्मक व्यवहार के मॉडल में सामान्यीकृत और समूहित करना चाहते हैं।", 'ru': 'В контролируемом изучении морфологических закономерностей была предложена стратегия обобщения флексиальных таблиц в более абстрактные парадигмы посредством выравнивания самой длинной общей подпоследовательности, найденной в таблице флексий, в качестве эффективного метода для вывода флексиального поведения невидимых форм слов. В этой статье мы расширяем это понятие морфологической «парадигмы» из более ранней работы и предоставляем формализацию, которая более точно соответствует интуиции лингвиста о том, что такое флексивная парадигма. Кроме того, мы предлагаем и оцениваем механизм изучения полных человекочитаемых спецификаций парадигмы из неполных данных - сценарий, когда мы имеем доступ только к нескольким перекошенным формам для каждой лексемы, и хотим реконструировать недостающие перекосы, а также обобщить и сгруппировать наблюдаемые закономерности в модель более абстрактного парадигматического поведения лексем.', 'ga': "Agus patrúin mhoirfeolaíocha á bhfoghlaim faoi mhaoirseacht, moltar an straitéis maidir le táblaí infhillte a ghinearálú go paraidímí níos teibí tríd an iar-sheicheamh coitianta is faide a fhaightear i dtábla infhillte a ailíniú mar mhodh éifeachtach chun iompar infhillte na bhfocal neamhfheicthe a bhaint amach. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid síneadh leis an nóisean seo de `paradigm' moirfeolaíoch ó shaothar níos luaithe agus cuirimid foirmeáltacht ar fáil a mheaitseálann níos cruinne le hintleachta teangeolaithe faoi cad is paraidím infhillte ann. Ina theannta sin, molaimid agus luachálaimid meicníocht chun sonraíochtaí paraidím iomlána inléite ag an duine a fhoghlaim ó shonraí neamhiomlána - cás nuair nach bhfuil rochtain againn ach ar chúpla foirm infhillte do gach lexeme, agus gur mhaith linn na hinfhillteacha atá in easnamh a athchruthú chomh maith leis na cinn a ghinearálú agus a ghrúpáil. patrúin fianaithe isteach i múnla d'iompar paradigmatic níos teibí na lexemes.", 'ka': 'მოპლექციოლური შაბლოგიების შესწავლებაში, ინფრექციოლური ტაბლოების სტრატიგია უფრო აბსტრაქტური პარადიგმებში, რომელიც ინფრექციოლური ტაბლოგიში აღმოჩენა უფრო დიდი საერთო საერთო სტაბლოგიის შესწავლებაზე,  ამ დოკუნეში, ჩვენ მოპოროლოგიური პარადიგმის შესახებ უფრო წინ მუშაობით და უფრო უფრო წესიერად მსგავსი ინტეუციების შესახებ, როგორც ინტექციონალური პარადიგმი არის. დამატებით, ჩვენ მოძლევთ და გავაკეთებთ მექანიზმის შესაძლებლობა სამყარო ადამიანის კითხვა პარადიგმის სპეციფიკაციების შესახებ, როდესაც ჩვენ გვაქვს მხოლოდ რამდენიმე ინფრექტირებული ფორმები ყოველ ლექსიმისთვის, და გვინდა განაკეთებული ინფრექციების განაკეთება და გ', 'el': 'Στην εποπτευόμενη μάθηση μορφολογικών προτύπων, η στρατηγική της γενικοποίησης των διαστρεβλωτικών πινάκων σε πιο αφηρημένα παραδείγματα μέσω ευθυγράμμισης της μακρύτερης κοινής ακολουθίας που βρίσκεται σε έναν πίνακα διαστρέβλωσης έχει προταθεί ως αποτελεσματική μέθοδος για τον προσδιορισμό της διαστρεβλωτικής συμπεριφοράς των αόρατων μορφών λέξεων. Σε αυτή την εργασία, επεκτείνουμε αυτή την έννοια του μορφολογικού "παραδείγματος" από παλαιότερες εργασίες και παρέχουμε μια τυπικοποίηση που ταιριάζει με τις γλωσσικές διαισθήσεις σχετικά με το τι είναι ένα καμπυλωτό παράδειγμα. Επιπλέον, προτείνουμε και αξιολογούμε έναν μηχανισμό για την εκμάθηση ολοκληρωμένων προδιαγραφών παραδείγματος από ελλιπή δεδομένα-ένα σενάριο όπου έχουμε πρόσβαση μόνο σε λίγες καμπυλωμένες μορφές για κάθε λεκέμιο, και θέλουμε να αναδημιουργήσουμε τις ελλείπουσες καμπύλες καθώς και να γενικεύσουμε και να ομαδοποιήσουμε τα παρατηρηθέντα μοτίβα σε ένα μοντέλο πιο αφηρημένης παραδειγματικής συμπεριφοράς των λεξωμάτων.', 'hu': 'A morfológiai minták felügyelt tanulásában az inflexiós táblázatok absztrakt paradigmákká általánosításának stratégiáját javasoltuk az inflexiós táblázatban található leghosszabb közös alszencia igazításával, mint hatékony módszert a láthatatlan szóformák inflexiós viselkedésének levonására. Ebben a tanulmányban kiterjesztjük a korábbi munkákból származó morfológiai paradigma fogalmát, és olyan formalizációt adunk, amely pontosabban illeszkedik a nyelvészi intuíciókhoz arról, hogy mi az az inflexiós paradigma. Továbbá javaslatot teszünk és értékelünk egy olyan mechanizmust, amely lehetővé teszi a teljes, ember által olvasható paradigma specifikációk elsajátítását hiányos adatokból – egy olyan forgatókönyvet, amikor minden lexem esetében csak néhány inflexált formához férünk hozzá, és rekonstruálni szeretnénk a hiányzó inflexiókat, valamint általánosítani és csoportosítani a tanúsított mintákat a lexemek absztrakt paradigmatikusabb viselkedésének modelljévé.', 'it': 'Nell\'apprendimento supervisionato dei modelli morfologici, la strategia di generalizzare le tabelle inflessionali in paradigmi più astratti attraverso l\'allineamento della più lunga sottoquenza comune trovata in una tabella inflessionale è stata proposta come metodo efficace per dedurre il comportamento inflessionale delle forme di parola invisibili. In questo articolo, estendiamo questa nozione di "paradigma" morfologico dal lavoro precedente e forniamo una formalizzazione che meglio corrisponde alle intuizioni linguistiche su cosa sia un paradigma inflessionale. Inoltre, proponiamo e valutiamo un meccanismo per imparare specifiche paradigmatiche complete leggibili dall\'uomo da dati incompleti, uno scenario in cui abbiamo accesso solo a poche forme flesse per ogni lexeme, e vogliamo ricostruire le flessioni mancanti, nonché generalizzare e raggruppare i modelli testimoni in un modello di comportamento paradigmatico più astratto dei lexemi.', 'lt': 'Prižiūrint morfologinių modelių mokymąsi buvo pasiūlyta strategija, pagal kurią į abstraktesnius paradigmus įtraukiamos inflekcinės lentelės, suderinant ilgiausią bendrą pasekmę, nustatytą inflekcinėje lentelėje, kaip veiksmingą metodą atskaityti nenumatytų žodžių formų inflekcinį elgesį. Šiame dokumente išplečiame morfologinio "paradigmos" sąvoką nuo ankstesnio darbo ir pateikiame formalizaciją, kuri tiksliau atitinka kalbos intuicijas apie tai, kas yra inflekcinis paradigmas. Be to, siūlome ir vertiname mechanizmą, pagal kurį būtų galima mokytis visapusiškų žmogaus skaitomų paradigm ų specifikacijų iš neišsamių duomenų – scenarijaus, kai turime galimybę naudotis tik keliomis kiekvienam leksumui paveiktomis formomis, ir norime atkurti trūkstamas inflekcijas, taip pat generalizuoti ir grupuoti liudytus modelius į labiau abstraktaus paradigminio leksumų elgesio model į.', 'mk': 'Во надгледуваното учење на морфолошките шеми, стратегијата за генерализација на инфекционалните табли во поапстрактни парадигми преку прилагодување на најдолгите заеднички потеквенции пронајдени во масата за инфекција е предложена како ефикасен метод за одлучување на инфекционалното однесување на невидливите форми на зборови. Во овој весник, ја прошируваме оваа идеја на морфолошки „парадигм“ од претходната работа и обезбедуваме формализација која попрецизно се совпаѓа со јазичките интуиции за тоа што е привлечен парадигм. Покрај тоа, предложуваме и оценуваме механизам за учење на целосни човечки читливи спецификации на парадигмата од нецелосни податоци-сценарио кога имаме пристап до само неколку привлечени форми за секој лексем, и сакаме да ги реконструираме исчезнатите привлечности, како и да ги генерализираме и групираме сведочените шеми во модел на поапстрактно парадигматско одн', 'ms': "Dalam pembelajaran mengawasi corak morfologik, strategi untuk menyebarkan jadual pendapatan ke dalam paradigm yang lebih abstrak melalui penyesuaian sekuwensi umum paling panjang yang ditemui dalam jadual pendapatan telah diusulkan sebagai kaedah efisien untuk mencatat perilaku pendapatan bentuk perkataan yang tidak terlihat. Dalam kertas ini, kita memperluas akal 'paradigm a' morfologik ini dari kerja sebelumnya dan menyediakan formalisasi yang lebih tepat sepadan dengan intuisi bahasa tentang apa paradigma inflection. Selain itu, kami melamar dan menilai mekanisme untuk mempelajari spesifikasi paradigm a yang boleh dibaca oleh manusia penuh dari data yang tidak lengkap-skenario apabila kita hanya mempunyai akses kepada beberapa bentuk yang disebabkan untuk setiap lexem, dan mahu membina semula pengaruh yang hilang serta menyebarkan dan kumpulkan corak saksi menjadi model perilaku paradigma yang lebih abstrak dari lexem.", 'ml': "മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഒളിഞ്ഞ വാക്കുകളുടെ ഫോമുകളില്\u200d കണ്ട ഏറ്റവും നീളമായ സാധാരണയുടെ പ്രകൃതിയുടെ പ്രകൃതിയെ വെറുതെ പ്രകൃതിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d മുമ്പ് ജോലിയില്\u200d നിന്ന് 'പാരാഡിഗി' എന്ന ആശയം വികസിപ്പിക്കുകയും, ഒരു ഫോര്\u200dമിഷന്\u200d നല്\u200dകുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിന്\u200dറെ ഭാഷ്യക്കാര അതുകൂടാതെ നാം മുഴുവന്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്\u200d വായിക്കാവുന്ന പാരാഡിമി പ്രത്യേകങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു സാധ്യതയും പരിഗണിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. നമുക്ക് എല്ലാ ലെക്സിമിന്റെയും കുറച്ച് ബാധിക്കുന്ന രൂപത്തില്\u200d മാത്രമേ പ", 'mt': "Fit-tagħlim sorveljat ta’ mudelli morfoloġiċi, l-istrateġija ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni tat-tabelli inflezzjonali f’paradigmi aktar astratti permezz tal-allinjament tal-itwal sussegwenza komuni misjuba f’tabella inflezzjonali ġiet proposta bħala metodu effiċjenti biex jitnaqqas l-imġiba inflezzjonali ta’ forom ta’ kliem mhux osservati. In this paper, we extend this notion of morphological `paradigm' from earlier work and provide a formalization that more accurately matches linguist intuitions about what an inflectional paradigm is.  Barra minn hekk, nipproponu u nivvalutaw mekkaniżmu għat-tagħlim sħiħ tal-ispeċifikazzjonijiet tal-paradigm a li jistgħu jinqraw mill-bniedem minn dejta mhux kompluta – xenarju meta għandna a ċċess biss għal ftit forom inflessi għal kull lexeme, u nixtiequ jirrikostruw l-inflezzjonijiet nieqsa kif ukoll jiġġeneralizzaw u jiġbru l-mudelli xhieda f’mudell ta’ mġiba paradigmatika aktar astratta tal-lexemes.", 'mn': 'Морфологик хэлбэрийн судалгаагаар нөлөөлөлтийн хүснэгтийг илүү abstract парадигм болгох стратеги нь нөлөөлөлтийн хүснэгтийн хамгийн урт нийтлэг давтамжтайгаар харагдаж байгаа хамгийн урт нийтлэг давтамжтайгаар шилжүүлэх арга хэмжээний үр дүнтэй арга болгон санал болгож Энэ цаасан дээр бид өмнөх ажлаас морфологик парадигм гэдэг ойлголтыг нэмэгдүүлж, илүү шууд хэлний үзэл бодлыг харуулж чадна. Мөн бид хүн төрөлхтний уншиж чадах парадигм тодорхойлолтуудыг бүрэн ойлгох механизмийг санал, үнэлэх боломжтой болгодог. Бид зөвхөн лексемийн хэд хэдэн нөлөөлдөг хэлбэрүүдэд хүрэх боломжтой болсон үед, бусад нөлөөлдөг нөлөөлдөг нөлөөлдөг, ерөнхийлөгч, харагдаж байгаа загваруудыг ил', 'no': 'I oversikt av læring av morfologiske mønster er strategien for å generellisere infleksjonelle tabeller i meir abstrakt paradigmar gjennom innrettinga av den langste felles subsekvensen funne i eit infleksjonstabell er foreslått som ein effektiv metode for å deklare infleksjonelle atferden av ukjende ordformar. I denne papiret utvidar vi denne ideen om morfologisk «paradigm» frå tidlegare arbeid og tilbyr ein formalisering som meir nøyaktig passar med linguistiske intuisjoner om kva ein effektiv paradigm er. I tillegg, vi foreslår og evaluerer ein mekanisme for å lære fulle menneskelige paradigsmespesifikasjonar frå ufullstende data-ein scenario når vi berre har tilgang til noen påvirka skjemar for kvar lexem, og ønskjer å gjenoppretta dei manglande infleksjonane, og generellisere og gruppere gjennomsiktene i eit modell av meir abstrakt paradigmatisk atferd av lexemmer.', 'pl': 'W nadzorowanym uczeniu się wzorców morfologicznych, strategia uogólniania tabel inflekcyjnych w bardziej abstrakcyjne paradygmaty poprzez wyrównanie najdłuższej wspólnej podsekwencji występującej w tabeli inflekcji została zaproponowana jako skuteczna metoda wydedukowania zachowania inflekcyjnego niewidocznych form słowowych. W niniejszym artykule rozszerzamy pojęcie morfologicznego "paradygmatu" z wcześniejszych prac i dostarczamy formalizacji, która dokładniej pasuje do intuicji lingwistycznych na temat tego, czym jest paradygmat inflekcyjny. Dodatkowo proponujemy i oceniamy mechanizm uczenia się pełnych paradygmatów czytelnych dla człowieka z niekompletnych danych – scenariusz, w którym mamy dostęp tylko do kilku form przekształconych dla każdego leksemu i chcemy zrekonstruować brakujące przekształcenia oraz uogólnić i grupować świadczone wzorce w model bardziej abstrakcyjnego paradygmatycznego zachowania leksemów.', 'ro': 'În învăţarea supravegheată a modelelor morfologice, strategia generalizării tabelelor inflexionale în paradigme mai abstracte prin alinierea celei mai lungi subsecvenţe comune găsite într-un tabel de inflexiune a fost propusă ca metodă eficientă de deducere a comportamentului inflexional al formelor de cuvinte nevăzute. În această lucrare, extindem această noțiune de "paradigmă" morfologică din lucrările anterioare și oferim o formalizare care corespunde mai precis intuițiilor lingvistice despre ceea ce este o paradigmă inflexională. În plus, propunem și evaluăm un mecanism de învățare a specificațiilor paradigmei complete citibile de om din datele incomplete - un scenariu în care avem acces doar la câteva forme inflectate pentru fiecare lexem și dorim să reconstruim inflexiunile lipsă, precum și să generalizăm și grupăm modelele martore într-un model de comportament paradigmatic mai abstract al lexemelor.', 'sr': 'U nadzornom učenju morfoloških obrazaca, strategija generalizacije inflekcionalnih stolova u više apstraktivnih paradigma putem usklađenja najduže zajedničke sekvence pronađene u stolu inflekcije predložena je kao efikasna metoda da se smanji inflekcionalno ponašanje nevidljivih formulara riječi. U ovom papiru proširimo ovu ideju morfološke paradigme iz ranijeg posla i pružamo formalizaciju koja se točnije odgovara jezičkim intuicijama o tome šta je uticajna paradigm a. Osim toga, predlažemo i procjenjujemo mehanizam za učenje potpunih specifikacija paradigm a koji može čitati ljude iz nepotpunog scenarija podataka, kad imamo pristup samo nekoliko uticajnih oblika za svaku leksemu, i želimo rekonstruisati nestale inflekcije, kao i generalizovati i grupirati svjedoke šablone u model apstraktnijeg paradigmatskog ponašanja leksema.', 'kk': 'Морфологиялық үлгілерді бақылау үшін инффекциялық кестелерді жалпы түрлендіру стратегиясы көбірек абстрактық парадигмдерге, инффекциялық кестеде табылған ең ұзындық ілеспелерді түрлендіру кестесінде ең ұзындық ілеспелерді түрленд Бұл қағазда морфологиялық "парадигм" деген ойын алдыңғы жұмыстан кеңейтіп, лингвистикалық интузиялық тәжірибесінің қандай парадигм туралы дұрыс сәйкес келетін офилизациялық береміз. Сонымен қатар, біз әрбір лексемге тек бірнеше қанша әсер етілген пішімдерге қатынау үшін адам оқуға мүмкін парадигм спецификацияларын оқуға және оқуға мүмкіндік беретін механизмін жұмыс істейміз. Жоқ инфлекцияларды және жалпы түрлендіру және көрінетін үлгілерді ле', 'si': "In supervised learnt of Morphology patterns, the policy of genelizing affectective dashtags in more appartractive paraigms Through Aliment of the longest shared subsequence find in an Infection tab has be advised as an Effective way to deduce the affectective Behaviour of unseen word form. මේ පත්තරේ අපි මේ අදහසක් විස්තර කරන්නේ පළවෙනි වැඩෙන් `පැරැඩිග්ම්' කියලා මේ අදහසක් විස්තර කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විස්තර කර අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සම්පූර්ණ මිනිස්සු කියවන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙනගන්න සම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා සාක්ෂිත ප්\u200dරශ", 'so': "Sida lagu ilaaliyo barashada qaababka morphological, waxaa looga soo jeeday qalabka ku dhaqashada miisaska waxqabadka oo ka mid ah meelaha aad u dhaadheer ee ugu dhaadheer isku xirka laga helay miiska iskujoorida, taas oo ah qaab faa’iido ah oo ku saabsan dabeecada hadalka maqan. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo fidinnaa fikradan morphological `paradigm' xagga shaqada hore, waxaana sameynaynaa qaabilnaan oo si saxda ah u eg fikrada luuqada ee ku saabsan waxa ay tahay mid ku saabsan. Sidoo kale waxaynu soo jeedaynaa oo ku qiimeynaynaa meymisyo barashada qoraalka dadweynaha oo dhan ee lagu akhriyo ee aan dhamaan taariikhda markaynu u helno noocyo saameyn ah oo kaliya oo aan u helno noocyo labxeed oo kaliya, waxaana rabnaa in la cusboonaysiiyo dhibaatada la'aanta iyo in aan la soo bandhignayo noocyada markhaatiyaasha ka mid ah qaab ka mid ah dhaqdhaqaaqsan dabeecada lexemyada.", 'sv': 'I övervakad inlärning av morfologiska mönster har strategin att generalisera böjningstabeller till mer abstrakta paradigmer genom justering av den längsta gemensamma subsequens som finns i en böjningstabell föreslagits som en effektiv metod för att härleda böjningstabellernas beteende hos osynliga ordformer. I denna uppsats utvidgar vi begreppet morfologiskt paradigm från tidigare arbeten och ger en formalisering som mer exakt matchar lingvistiska intuitioner om vad ett böjande paradigm är. Dessutom föreslår och utvärderar vi en mekanism för att lära oss fullständiga mänskliga läsbara paradigmspecifikationer från ofullständiga data – ett scenario där vi bara har tillgång till några få böjda former för varje lexem, och vill rekonstruera de saknade böjningarna samt generalisera och gruppera de bevittna mönstren till en modell av mer abstrakt paradigmatiskt beteende av lexem.', 'ur': 'Morfological patterns کی تعلیم پر نظارت کیا گیا ہے، فعالیت ٹیبلوں کی استراتژی زیادہ غیر معلوم ہونے کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ غیر معلوم غیر معلوم ہونے والی ٹیبل میں پائی جاتی ہے، اس طریقہ کے طور پر فعال طریقہ کے طور پر پیش کیا گیا ہے کہ غیر معلوم ہونے والی کلمات فرموں کے اثرات اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلے کے کام سے مورفالجیک "پارادیگ" کا اظہار پھیلاتے ہیں اور ایک فرمولیزی دیتے ہیں جو زبان شناسی نظریوں سے زیادہ دقیق مطابق مطابق ملتی ہے کہ ایک پارادیگ کیا ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک مکانیسم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں اور ارزش کرتے ہیں کہ تمام انسان پڑھنے کے قابل پڑھنے کے قابل پڑھنے والی پارادیگ مثالیں سکھانے کے لئے ایک مکانیسم کی مکانیسم کی تصویر کریں جب ہمارے پاس صرف ایک چند قسم کے مثالیں ہیں جو ہر لکسم کے لئے پہنچ رہے ہیں، اور گم ہونے والی اثرات کو دوبارہ ساختہ کرنا چاہتے ہیں اور گواہ پٹرنوں کو', 'ta': "ஒரு தொகுதி அட்டவணையில் கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட நீண்ட பொது துண்டுகளை ஒழுங்குபடுத்தும் மூலம் காண்பிக்கும் பொதுவான துண்டுகளை பொருத்தும் முறையில், மறைக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகளின இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முந்தைய வேலையிலிருந்து 'அளபுரும்' யோசனை விரிவாக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் ஒரு வடிவமைப்பை வழங்குகிறோம். அது மொழியில் சர கூடுதலாக, நாம் முழுமையான தரவு படிக்கக்கூடிய அலகுரு குறிப்புகளை கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறைமையிலிருந்து பரிந்துரைக்கவும் மற்றும் பார்க்கப்படும் முறைமையை முழுமையான தகவல் காட்சியிலிருந்து கற்றுக்கொள்ளும", 'vi': 'Trong việc nghiên cứu giám sát các mô hình lịch sự, chiến lược tổng hợp các biểu đồ dẫn tới các biểu tượng trừu tượng bằng việc thẳng hàng các tần số phổ biến dài nhất được tìm thấy trong một biểu đồ từ chối đã được đề xuất như một phương pháp hiệu quả để kết luận phương pháp dẫn tới các dạng chữ không nhìn thấy. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta mở rộng khái niệm "biểu tượng hình mẫu" từ công việc trước đó và đưa ra sự chính thức tương thích chính xác hơn với ý thức ngôn ngữ về sự sắp đặt của mô hình. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đề xuất và đánh giá một cơ chế để học những định hướng hoàn to àn có thể đọc được từ dữ liệu chưa hoàn tất, một kịch bản khi chúng tôi chỉ có thể truy cập vào vài dạng ngẫu nhiên cho mỗi từ, và muốn tái tạo lại dòng chảy mất tích, cũng như tổng hợp và tập hợp các mô hình nhân chứng thành mô hình mô hình mô hình mô hình thiên văn hơn trừu tượng của các từ.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda, biz oldingi ishdan oddiy `paradigm' g'oyalarini ko'payapmiz va bir tashkilotni tasavvur qilamiz va eng muhimiy tildagi fikrlarning g'oyalarini o'xshash qo'shiladik. Ko'pchilik, biz butun inson oʻqib boʻladigan paradigm xususiyatlarini o'rganish va qiymatimiz, biz faqat har bir necha qancha shakllarga murojaat qiladigan foydalanuvchiga murojaat qilayotganda, yetishmaydigan tashkilotlarni qayta ishlab chiqarishni istaysizmi va koʻrsatilgan shakllarni teskarisiga qaytadan guruhlashni istaysizki, lektiklash xuddi asosabatlarni ko'proq abstrakt paradigmatik xuddi modeliga", 'bg': 'При наблюдаваното изучаване на морфологични модели стратегията за генерализиране на флексионни таблици в по-абстрактни парадигми чрез подравняване на най-дългата обща субпоследователност, открита в флексионна таблица, е предложена като ефективен метод за извеждане на флексионното поведение на невидими думи форми. В тази статия ние разширяваме това понятие за морфологична "парадигма" от по-ранна работа и осигуряваме формализация, която по-точно съответства на лингвистичните интуиции за това какво е флексионна парадигма. Освен това, ние предлагаме и оценяваме механизъм за изучаване на пълни, четими за човека парадигматични спецификации от непълни данни - сценарий, в който имаме достъп само до няколко флексирани форми за всеки лексем и искаме да реконструираме липсващите флекси, както и да обобщим и групираме свидетелстващите модели в модел на по-абстрактно парадигматично поведение на лексемите.', 'nl': "Bij supervised leren van morfologische patronen is de strategie van het generaliseren van buigingstabellen in meer abstracte paradigma's door uitlijning van de langste gemeenschappelijke subsequentie gevonden in een buigingstabel voorgesteld als een efficiënte methode om het buigingsgedrag van onzichtbare woordvormen af te leiden. In dit artikel breiden we dit begrip van morfologisch 'paradigma' uit eerder werk uit en bieden we een formalisering die nauwkeuriger overeenkomt met linguïstische intuïties over wat een inflectioneel paradigma is. Daarnaast stellen we voor en evalueren we een mechanisme voor het leren van volledige mensleesbare paradigmaspecificaties van onvolledige gegevens-een scenario waarin we slechts toegang hebben tot een paar gebogen vormen voor elk lexeem, en willen we de ontbrekende buigingen reconstrueren en de getuige genomen patronen generaliseren en groeperen tot een model van meer abstract paradigmatisch gedrag van lexemen.", 'hr': 'U nadzornom učenju morfoloških obrazaca, strategija generalizacije inflekcionalnih tablica u više apstraktivnih paradigma putem usklađenja najduže zajedničke sekvence pronađene u tablici uticaja predložena je kao učinkovit način za smanjenje inflekcionalnog ponašanja nevidljivih oblika riječi. U ovom papiru proširimo ovu ideju morfološke paradigme iz ranijeg posla i pružamo formalizaciju koja se točnije odgovara jezičkim intuicijama o tome što je uticajna paradigm a. Osim toga, predlažemo i procjenjujemo mehanizam za učenje potpunih specifikacija paradigm a koji može čitati ljude iz nepotpunog scenarija podataka - scenarija kada imamo pristup samo nekoliko uticajnih oblika za svaku lexemu, i želimo rekonstruirati nestale inflekcije, kao i generalizirati i skupiti svjedočene obrasce u model apstraktnijeg paradigmatskog ponašanja lexema.', 'da': 'I overvåget læring af morfologiske mønstre er strategien for at generalisere bøjningstabeller til mere abstrakte paradigmer gennem justering af den længste almindelige undersekvens fundet i en bøjningstabel blevet foreslået som en effektiv metode til at udlede bøjningstabellernes adfærd af usynlige ordformer. I denne artikel udvider vi denne begreb om morfologisk paradigme fra tidligere arbejde og giver en formalisering, der mere præcist matcher lingvistiske intuitioner om, hvad et fleksionsparadigme er. Derudover foreslår og evaluerer vi en mekanisme til at lære fulde menneskeligt læsbare paradigmespecifikationer fra ufuldstændige data – et scenario, hvor vi kun har adgang til nogle få bøjede former for hvert lexem, og ønsker at rekonstruere de manglende bøjede bøjede samt generalisere og gruppere de vidnede mønstre i en model af mere abstrakt paradigmatisk adfærd af lexemer.', 'de': 'Im überwachten Lernen morphologischer Muster wurde die Strategie der Verallgemeinerung von Flexionstabellen in abstraktere Paradigmen durch Ausrichtung der längsten gemeinsamen Teilfolge in einer Flexionstabelle als effiziente Methode vorgeschlagen, um das Flexionsverhalten unsichtbarer Wortformen abzuleiten. In diesem Beitrag erweitern wir diesen Begriff des morphologischen Paradigmas aus früheren Arbeiten und liefern eine Formalisierung, die genauer mit linguistischen Intuitionen übereinstimmt, was ein Flexionsparadigma ist. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir einen Mechanismus vor, mit dem wir aus unvollständigen Daten vollständig lesbare Paradigmaspezifikationen lernen können – ein Szenario, in dem wir nur Zugriff auf wenige gebeugte Formen für jedes Lexem haben und die fehlenden Flexionen rekonstruieren sowie die beobachteten Muster zu einem Modell abstrakteren paradigmatischen Verhaltens von Lexemen verallgemeinern und gruppieren wollen.', 'ko': "형태 모델의 감독 학습에서 굴절표에서 가장 긴 공공 서열을 맞추어 굴절표를 더욱 추상적인 모델로 요약하는 것은 보이지 않는 어형의 굴절 행위를 추정하는 효과적인 방법이다.본고에서 우리는 초기의 작업에서 형태학적'범식'의 개념을 확장하고 형식화를 제공하여 언어학자들이 굴절범식이 무엇인지에 대한 직감을 더욱 정확하게 일치시켰다.그 밖에 우리는 불완전한 데이터에서 완전한 인류가 읽을 수 있는 모범규범을 배우는 메커니즘을 제시하고 평가했다. 우리가 모든 어소의 몇 가지 굴절 형식만 방문할 수 있을 때 우리는 부족한 굴절 형식을 재건하고 목격한 모델을 더욱 추상적인 어소 모범 행위 모델로 요약하고 그룹화하기를 바란다.", 'id': "Dalam pembelajaran yang diawasi pola morfologi, strategi untuk menyebarkan tabel infleksional ke paradigma yang lebih abstrak melalui penyesuaian dari susekuensi umum paling panjang yang ditemukan dalam tabel infleksi telah diusulkan sebagai metode efisien untuk menentukan perilaku infleksional dari bentuk kata yang tidak terlihat. Dalam kertas ini, kita memperluas gagasan morfologis 'paradigm a' dari pekerjaan sebelumnya dan menyediakan formalisasi yang lebih akurat cocok dengan intuisi bahasa tentang apa paradigma infleksional. Selain itu, kami mengusulkan dan mengevaluasi mekanisme untuk mempelajari spesifikasi paradigm a yang dapat dibaca manusia penuh dari data yang tidak lengkap-sebuah skenario ketika kita hanya memiliki akses ke beberapa bentuk yang disebabkan untuk setiap lexem, dan ingin membangun kembali infleksi yang hilang serta menyebarkan dan mengumpulkan pola saksi menjadi model perilaku paradigma yang lebih abstrak dari lexem.", 'fa': 'در یادگیری از الگوهای مورفولوژیکی تحت نظر گرفته شده، استراتژی از تولید کردن میز های اثرات عمومی به پارادیگ های اثرات بیشتری از طریق تنظیم کردن بزرگترین اتفاق عمومی که در میز تاثیر اثرات پیدا شده، به عنوان روش موثرتی پیشنهاد شده است تا رفتار اثرات الگوهای غیب را کا در این کاغذ، ما این نظر مرفولژیک «پارادیگ» را از کارهای قبلی گسترده می\u200cکنیم و یک فرمولی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که دقیقاً به نظر زبان\u200cشناسی در مورد یک پارادیگ اثبات چیست. به اضافه، ما یک مکانیسم برای یادگیری مشخص\u200cهای پارادیگ قابل خواندن کامل بشر را از سناریو ناکامل پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، وقتی ما فقط دسترسی به چند فرم\u200cهای تاثیر\u200cگیری برای هر جسم داریم، و می\u200cخواهیم تأثیر\u200cگیری\u200cهای ناپدید شده و عمومی\u200cسازیم و مدل\u200cهای شاهد را به یک مدل رفتار پارادیگرماتی بیشتر از ج', 'sw': "Katika kufuatiliwa kujifunza kwa mitindo ya kifolojia, mkakati wa kutengeneza meza za yenye ushawishi katika vifaa vingi vya kutengeneza vifaa vinavyojitenga kwa kupitisha mfumo wa muda mrefu zaidi uliopatikana katika meza ya kuhusiana umependekezwa kama njia yenye ufanisi wa kutetea tabia za neno lisilojulikana. Katika gazeti hili, tunaongeza dhana hii ya 'unyanyasaji' ya kimaadilojia kutoka kwenye kazi za mwanzo na kutoa ufanisi unaohusiana na mtazamo wa lugha kuhusiana na upinzani wa kimapenzi. Kwa nyongeza, tunapendekeza na kutathmini mfumo wa kujifunza utambulisho kamili wa binadamu unaotumika kutoka kwenye hali isiyo kamili ya data ambapo tunaweza tu kupata matumizi machache yanayoathirika kwa kila lexeme, na tunataka kujenga tena maambukizi yanayopotea pamoja na kutengeneza na kikundi hicho kinachoshuhudiwa kuwa mfano wa tabia za kibaguzi.", 'tr': "Morfolojik düzlüklerini gözlemli öwrenmek üçin, etkileşimli tabletleri döredilemek üçin has abstrakt paradigmlara geçirilmek üçin bir täsirler täblisinde bulunan en uzak düzlük süregeni çykarmak üçin etkileşimli bir yöntem şeklinde teklip edildi. Bu kagyzda, biz öňki işden morfolojik `paradigm' düşünüşini uzatıp, we munyň etkileşikli paradigm hakynda dogry bir formaliziýa düzenleýäris. Munuň ýene-de, adam okalabilir paradigm hasaplamalaryny tapylmadyk bir senarydan öwrenmek üçin bir mehanizmini teklip edip deňdirýäris. Bu mehanizmini diňe her leksem üçin birnäçe täsirli şekillere erişmek isleýäris we ýok täsirlerini döredilemek we şahit düzlerini lukmanlaryň has abstrakt paradigmatik bir nusga üýtgetmek isleýäris.", 'sq': "Në mësimin e mbikqyrur të modeleve morfologjike, strategjia e gjeneralizimit të tabelave të përkthimit në paradigma më abstrakte nëpërmjet përshtatjes së pasojave më të gjata të përbashkëta të gjetura në një tabelë të përkthimit është propozuar si një metodë e efektshme për të përfshirë sjelljen e përkthimit të formave të fjalëve të padukshme. Në këtë letër, ne zgjerojmë këtë koncept të 'paradigm ës' morfologjike nga punët e mëparshme dhe ofrojmë një formalizim që më saktësisht përputhet me intuicionet gjuhësore rreth asaj që është një paradigmë të pakëndshme. Përveç kësaj, ne propozojmë dhe vlerësojmë një mekanizëm për mësimin e specifikimeve të plota të paradigm ës të lexueshme njerëzore nga të dhënat e pakompletuara-një skenar kur ne kemi akses vetëm në disa forma të përdorura për çdo lexem, dhe duam të rindërtojmë përdorimet e munguara si dhe të gjeneralizojmë dhe grupojmë modelet e dëshmuara në një model të sjelljes më abstrakte paradigmatike të lexemeve.", 'am': 'በሞሮፎሎጂ ዓይነቶች ማወቅ በተጠበቀው ጊዜ፣ የውይይት ቃላት ፎርማቶች ላይ የሚታወቀውን የረጅም ትልቅ ትምህርት ማቀናቀል በተገኘው ረጅም የውይይት ቃላት አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ማቀናቀል ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ይህንን የሞሮፎሎጂ ‹ተራዳፊ› ከቀድሞ ሥራ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ሙሉ የሰው-አነብብ ፍላጎቶችን ለመማር እናስተዋልናለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մորֆոլոգիական կաղապարների վերահսկվող ուսումնասիրության մեջ, մորֆոլոգիական կաղապարների ընդհանուր աղյուսակների ընդհանուր վերացական պարադիգմերի ընդհանուր ընդհանուր ամենաերկար հաջորդականության հարմարեցման միջոցով առաջարկվել է որպես արդյունավետ մեթոդ անտեսանելի բառերի կաղապարների վերացման հաջորդականու Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ընդլայնում ենք մորֆոլոգիական «պարադիգմային» գաղափարը նախկինում աշխատանքից և ապահովում ենք ձևափոխություն, որը ավելի ճշգրիտ համապատասխանում է լեզվաբանական ինտուիցիաներին այն մասին, թե ինչ է ազդեցության պարադիգմային: Ավելին, մենք առաջարկում ենք և գնահատում մարդկային կարդալի պարադիգմային մասնավորումներ սովորելու մեխանիզմը ոչ ամբողջական տվյալներից. մի սցենարից, երբ մենք ունենք ընդամենը յուրաքանչյուր լեքսեմ մի քանի ազդեցություն ունեցող ձևերի հնարավորություն, և ուզում ենք վերակառուցել բացակայած ազդեցությունները, ինչպես նաև ընդհանրացնել և խմբավորել ականատես կաղապարները լեք', 'bn': 'মোরফোলিক্যাল প্যান্টারের শিক্ষার পর, অদৃশ্য শব্দের ফর্মের প্রভাবশালী আচরণ উল্লেখের মাধ্যমে অনেক দীর্ঘ সাধারণ সাধারণ প্রতিক্রিয়ার প্রতিক্রিয়ার প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পূর্ববর্তী কাজ থেকে মরোফোলজিক্যাল ‘প্যারাডিম’ ধারণা বৃদ্ধি করি এবং একটি বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করি যা ভাষায় ভাষার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি সম্পর্ এছাড়াও আমরা প্রস্তাব করি এবং মূল্যায়ন করি সম্পূর্ণ মানুষ-পাঠযোগ্য প্যারাডিম বিশেষ বিষয়গুলো সম্পূর্ণ তথ্য থেকে শিখতে পারি যখন আমরা প্রত্যেক লেক্সিমের জন্য কয়েকটি প্রভাবিত বিষয়গুলো প্রবেশ করতে পারি, আর হারিয়ে যা', 'ca': "En l'aprenentatge supervisat de patrons morfològics, l'estratègia de generalitzar les taules inflexionals en paradigmes més abstracts a través de l'allinjament de la més llarga subseqüència comú trobada en una taula inflexional s'ha proposat com un mètode eficient per deduir el comportament inflexional de formes de paraules invisibles. En aquest paper estenem aquesta noció de 'paradigm a' morfològica des de la feina anterior i proporcionem una formalització que coincidi més precisament amb les intuïcions lingüistes sobre què és un paradigma inflexional. A més, proposem i evaluem un mecanisme per aprendre especificacions completas de paradigm a llegibles per a la humanitat a partir de dades incompletes-un escenari quan només tenim accés a unes quantes formes influïdes per cada lexem, i volem reconstruir les inflexions que falten, també generalitzar i agrupar els patrons testimonis en un model de comportament paradigm àtic més abstract dels lexemes.", 'cs': 'Ve sledovaném učení morfologických vzorů byla navržena strategie zobecnění flexiálních tabulek do abstraktnějších paradigmatů prostřednictvím zarovnání nejdelší společné subsekvence nalezené v flexiční tabulce jako efektivní metoda pro odvození flexiálního chování neviditelných slovních forem. V tomto článku rozšiřujeme tento pojem morfologického "paradigmatu" z dřívější práce a poskytujeme formalizaci, která přesněji odpovídá lingvistickým intuicím o tom, co je flexionální paradigmat. Navíc navrhujeme a vyhodnocujeme mechanismus učení plných specifikací paradigmatů čitelných pro člověka z neúplných dat – scénář, kdy máme přístup pouze k několika zkloněným forem pro každý lexem a chceme rekonstruovat chybějící zklonění, zobecňovat a seskupovat svědky do modelu abstraktnějšího paradigmatického chování lexemů.', 'et': "Morfoloogiliste mustrite juhendatud õppes on välja pakutud strateegia generaliseerida paindlikud tabelid abstraktsemateks paradigmadeks paindliku tabeli pikima levinud alamjärje joondamise kaudu kui efektiivne meetod nähtamatute sõnavormide paindliku käitumise järeldamiseks. Käesolevas töös laiendame seda morfoloogilise `paradigma' mõistet varasematest töödest ja pakume formaalsust, mis sobib täpsemalt lingvistiliste intuitsioonidega, mis on paindlik paradigma. Lisaks pakume välja ja hindame mehhanismi täielike inimloetavate paradigmaspetsifikatsioonide õppimiseks mittetäielikest andmetest – stsenaariumi, kus meil on juurdepääs ainult mõnele kallutatud vormile iga lekseemi kohta ning soovime rekonstrueerida puuduvad painded ning üldistada ja grupeerida tunnistatud mustrid lekseemide abstraktsema paradigmaatilise käitumise mudeliks.", 'fi': "Morfologisten kuvioiden ohjatussa oppimisessa taipumistaulukkojen yleistämistä abstraktimmiksi paradigmoiksi taipumistaulukon pisimmän yleisen alasekvenssin kohdistamisen avulla on ehdotettu tehokkaaksi menetelmäksi päätellä näkymättömien sanamuotojen taipumusta. Tässä artikkelissa laajennamme tätä morfologisen `paradigman' käsitettä aikaisemmista töistä ja tarjoamme muodollisuuden, joka vastaa paremmin lingvististen intuitioita siitä, mitä taipuvainen paradigma on. Lisäksi ehdotamme ja arvioimme mekanismia, jolla opitaan täydelliset ihmisluettavat paradigmaspesifikaatiot epätäydellisestä datasta - skenaario, jossa meillä on pääsy vain muutamaan taipuneeseen muotoon kullekin lexeemille, ja haluamme rekonstruoida puuttuvat taipumukset sekä yleistää ja ryhmitellä todistukset malliksi, jossa lexeemien paradigmaattinen käyttäytyminen on abstraktia.", 'af': "In die ondersoekte leer van morfologiese patrone is die strategie van generellisering van infleksionele tabelle binne meer abstrakte paradigme deur die gelyking van die langste gemeenskaplike subekswensie wat in 'n inflekvenstabel gevind is, voorgestel word as 'n effektief metode om die infleksionele gedrag van ongesiende woorde vorms te verduur. In hierdie papier, ons uitbrei hierdie notie van morfologiese `paradigm' van vroeër werk en verskaf 'n formalisasie wat meer presies ooreenstem met lingvisse intuisies oor wat 'n infleksionele paradigm is. In addition, we propose and evaluate a mechanism for learning full human-readable paradigm specifications from incomplete data-a scenario when we only have access to a few inflected forms for each lexeme, and want to reconstruct the missing inflections as well as generalise and group the witnessed patterns in a model of more abstract paradigmatic behavior of lexemes.", 'az': 'Morfolojik modellərin öyrənməsinin gözləyirlənməsi üçün, görünməyən söz formlarının etkileşimli davranışlarını çəkmək üçün ən uzun orta sıra-sıra çəkmək vasitəsilə daha çox abstraktik paradiglərə nəzarətlənmək stratejisi təklif edildi. Bu kağızda, əvvəlki işdən morfolojik "paradigm" fikrini genişləyirik və daha doğru bir dil müşriklərinə uyğunlaşdırırıq. Əksinə, biz insan oxuyabilən paradigm müəyyənləşdirilməsi öyrənmək üçün bir mehanizmini təbliğ edirik və değerlendiririk ki, hər lexem üçün yalnız bir neçə təsirli formlara istifadə edək, yox etmiş infleksiyyətləri və generalize etmək istəyirik və şahidlərin şahidlərini daha abstrakt paradigmatik davranışların modeli olaraq qoşulmaq istəyirik.', 'bs': 'U nadzornom učenju morfoloških obrazaca, strategija generalizacije inflekcionalnih stolova u više apstraktivnih paradigma putem usklađenja najduže zajedničke sekvence nalažene u tablici za uticaj je predložena kao efikasni metod da se smanji uticajno ponašanje nevidljivih formulara riječi. U ovom papiru proširimo ovu ideju morfološke paradigme iz ranijeg posla i pružamo formalizaciju koja se točnije odgovara jezičkim intuicijama o tome što je uticajna paradigm a. Osim toga, predlažemo i procjenjujemo mehanizam za učenje potpunih specifikacija paradigm a koji može čitati ljude iz nepotpunog scenarija podataka - scenarija kada imamo pristup samo nekoliko uticajnih oblika za svaku leksemu, i želimo rekonstruisati nestale inflekcije, kao i generalizirati i grupirati svjedoke šablone u model apstraktnijeg paradigmatskog ponašanja leksema.', 'ha': "In da aka tsare wa zanen tsarin morfologi, an buƙata ƙidãya wa mai nuna abun su cikin paradigm masu ƙaranci cikin juyi da sauri mafi ƙas ƙanci wanda aka sãmu a cikin wani jahawan yin sura, an buƙata shi kamar wata hanyor mai amfani da ya canza aikin da za'a ƙayyade abun da ba'a sani ba. In this paper, we extend this notion of morphological `paradigm' from earlier work and provide a formalization that more accurately matches linguist intuitions about what an inflectional paradigm is.  Da ƙaranci, Munã shawarar da kuma Muke ƙayyade wani aminci na karanta cikakken paradigm masu karatun mutane daga tsarin da ba'a cikakken data ba idan ana iya iya sãmun ko kaɗan da aka yi wa hisãbi ga kowace lexeme, kuma munã nufin a rekarinta masu sako da aka sava, da kuma Mu ƙididdige misãlai masu shawara da suka shaida zuwa wani misali na ƙaranci da abun paradigmati na lexemi.", 'sk': "Pri nadzorovanem učenju morfoloških vzorcev je bila predlagana strategija generalizacije inflekcijskih tabel v bolj abstraktne paradigme prek poravnave najdaljše skupne podsekvence v inflekcijski tabeli kot učinkovita metoda za ugotavljanje inflekcijskega vedenja nevidnih besednih oblik. V prispevku razširimo ta pojem morfološke `paradigme' iz prejšnjega dela in zagotovimo formalizacijo, ki natančneje ujema jezikoslovne intuicije o tem, kaj je inflekcijska paradigma. Poleg tega predlagamo in ocenjujemo mehanizem za učenje popolnih človeško berljivih paradigmskih specifikacij iz nepopolnih podatkov – scenarij, ko imamo dostop do le nekaj upognjenih oblik za vsak leksim in želimo rekonstruirati manjkajoče infleksije ter posplošiti in združiti pričakovane vzorce v model bolj abstraktnega paradigmatičnega vedenja leksimov.", 'jv': "Jejaring Nang mapun iki, kita mudhun kuwi nggawe kno karo modorologik 'paradigm' sing mungkin karo karo ngono nggawe modorologi sing dadi angat luwih apik sing titimela karo perbudhakan langgambar uwong. Mungkin maneh, awak dhéwé nggunaké karo nggawe sistem kanggo ngerasai winih apakno sing perusahaan karo perusahaan-winih sing gak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé iki bakal terus akses karo perusahaan langkung sampeyan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan luwih-sampeyan gak dhéwé, lan uwis mbok dhéwé nggawe unyasai iki luwih dumadhi kaé perusahaan langgar sampeyan luwih dumadhi.", 'he': "In supervised learning of morphological patterns, the strategy of generalizing inflectional tables into more abstract paradigms through alignment of the longest common subsequence found in an inflection table has been proposed as an efficient method to deduce the inflectional behavior of unseen word forms.  בעיתון הזה, אנו ממרחקים את הרעיון הזה של 'פרדיגמה' מורפולוגית מעבודה קודמת ומספקים רשמיות שמתאימות יותר מדויקת לאינטואיציות שפתיות על מה פרדיגמה אינפלקטיבית. בנוסף, אנו מציעים ומערכים מנגנון ללמוד פרדיגמה מלאה קריאה אנושית מתרחיש נתונים לא מלאים-התרחיש כאשר יש לנו גישה רק לכמה צורות מושפעות לכל לקסם, ורוצים לשחזר את ההשפעות הנעדרות, וגנרליזם ולקבוע את הדפוסים העדים למודל של התנהגות פרדיגמטית מוזרה יותר של לקסמים.", 'bo': 'ལྟ་རྟོག་བྱས་བའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ཆེ་རུ་གཏོང་བཞིན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་མི་མང་ཆོས་ཡོད་པའི་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གི་སྐོར་ལས།'}
{'en': 'Relation Induction in Word Embeddings Revisited', 'ar': 'استقراء العلاقة في Word Embeddings تمت إعادة النظر فيه', 'pt': 'Indução de relação em incorporação de palavras revisitada', 'fr': "L'induction de la relation dans les intégrations de mots revisitées", 'es': 'Revisión de la inducción de relaciones en incrustaciones de palabras', 'ja': '単語埋め込みにおける関係誘導の再検討', 'hi': 'Word Embeddings में संबंध प्रेरण Revisited', 'zh': '重审词嵌', 'ru': 'Вводный курс по отношениям во встраиваемых словах', 'ga': 'Athchuairt ar Ionduchtú Caidrimh i Leabú Focal', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Επαγωγή σχέσεων σε ενσωμάτωση λέξεων επανεξετασμένο', 'kk': 'Сөздерді ендіру қатынасының индикциясы қайталанған', 'it': 'Induzione delle relazioni negli incorporamenti di parole rivisitati', 'lt': 'Ryšių indukcija persvarstytose žodžių įrangose', 'ms': 'Penyulitan Hubungan dalam Penyulitan Perkataan Diubah Semula', 'hu': 'Kapcsolat indukció a szóbeágyazásokban', 'mn': 'Хувь нэвтрүүлэлтийн харилцааны индукцийг дахин сэргээгдсэн', 'mk': 'Индукција на врските во ревизираните вградувања на зборови', 'pl': 'Indukcja relacji w osadzeniach słowa', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന നിര്\u200dണ്ണയം', 'mt': 'L-Induzzjoni tar-Relazzjoni fl-Inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem riveduti', 'ro': 'Inducția relației în încorporările de cuvinte revizuite', 'no': 'Induksjon for relasjon i tekstinnbygging gjenopprett', 'si': 'වචන සම්බන්ධයේ සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමණය', 'so': 'Midowga xiriirka ee ku qoran qalabka hadalka', 'sv': 'Relationsinduktion i ordinbäddningar Reviderad', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Word Embeddings میں رابطہ اضطراری', 'sr': 'Indukcija odnosa u uključenju reèi Revizitirana', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu về kết quả từ ngữ', 'bg': 'Промяна на връзката при вграждането на думи', 'hr': 'Indukcija odnosa u uključenju riječi Revizitirana', 'nl': 'Relatie Inductie in Word Embeddings herzien', 'da': 'Relationsinduktion i ordindlejringer revideret', 'id': 'Induksi Hubungan dalam Penampilan Kata Direvisit', 'de': 'Beziehungsinduktion in Word Embeddings Revisited', 'ko': '어휘 삽입 중의 관계 귀납법을 재론하다', 'fa': 'تأثیر ارتباط در ورودهای کلمه بازگردانده شده', 'tr': 'Sözler Girişinde Mazmunlar', 'sq': 'Relation Induction in Word Embeddings Revisited', 'af': 'Relasie Induksie in Woord Inbetering Hersien', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Sözlük İfadələrində İlişkil İdarəti', 'hy': 'Խոսքերի ներգրավման հարաբերությունների արտադրումը', 'bn': 'Relation Induction in Word Embeddings Revisited', 'bs': 'Indukcija veze u uključenju riječi Revizitirana', 'ca': "L'Inducció de Relacions en l'incorporació de paraules revisada", 'cs': 'Indukce vztahů v vložení slov Revisit', 'et': 'Seose induktsioon sõnade põimimises muudetud', 'fi': 'Suhteen induktio sanaupotuksissa tarkistettuna', 'sw': 'Uonesha wa Kuhusiana katika Mazingiro ya Neno imepitishwa', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'מערכת יחסים בתכניות מילים', 'sk': 'Sprememba povezave v vdelavah besed', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་འབྲེལ་བ་སྐྱེལ་གཞུང་ཕྱིར་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་ཡོད་པ'}
{'en': 'Given a set of instances of some relation, the relation induction task is to predict which other word pairs are likely to be related in the same way. While it is natural to use word embeddings for this task, standard approaches based on vector translations turn out to perform poorly. To address this issue, we propose two probabilistic relation induction models. The first model is based on translations, but uses Gaussians to explicitly model the variability of these translations and to encode soft constraints on the source and target words that may be chosen. In the second model, we use Bayesian linear regression to encode the assumption that there is a linear relationship between the vector representations of related words, which is considerably weaker than the assumption underlying translation based models.', 'ar': 'بالنظر إلى مجموعة من الأمثلة على بعض العلاقات ، فإن مهمة الاستقراء للعلاقة هي التنبؤ بأزواج الكلمات الأخرى التي من المحتمل أن تكون مرتبطة بنفس الطريقة. في حين أنه من الطبيعي استخدام تضمين الكلمات لهذه المهمة ، إلا أن الأساليب القياسية القائمة على ترجمات المتجهات تبين أنها ضعيفة الأداء. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح نموذجين تحريض للعلاقة الاحتمالية. يعتمد النموذج الأول على الترجمات ، ولكنه يستخدم Gaussians لنمذجة صراحة تنوع هذه الترجمات ولتشفير القيود اللينة على الكلمات المصدر والهدف التي يمكن اختيارها. في النموذج الثاني ، نستخدم الانحدار الخطي Bayesian لتشفير الافتراض بأن هناك علاقة خطية بين تمثيلات المتجهات للكلمات ذات الصلة ، وهي أضعف بكثير من الافتراضات الكامنة وراء النماذج القائمة على الترجمة.', 'fr': "Compte tenu d'un ensemble d'instances d'une relation, la tâche d'induction de relation consiste à prédire quelles autres paires de mots sont susceptibles d'être liées de la même manière. Bien qu'il soit naturel d'utiliser des intégrations de mots pour cette tâche, les approches standard basées sur les traductions vectorielles s'avèrent peu performantes. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons deux modèles d'induction relationnels probabilistes. Le premier modèle est basé sur des traductions, mais utilise des gaussiens pour modéliser explicitement la variabilité de ces traductions et pour coder des contraintes souples sur les mots source et cible qui peuvent être choisis. Dans le second modèle, nous utilisons la régression linéaire bayésienne pour coder l'hypothèse selon laquelle il existe une relation linéaire entre les représentations vectorielles de mots apparentés, ce qui est considérablement plus faible que l'hypothèse sous-jacente aux modèles basés sur la traduction.", 'es': 'Dado un conjunto de casos de alguna relación, la tarea de inducción de la relación es predecir qué otros pares de palabras probablemente estén relacionados de la misma manera. Si bien es natural utilizar incrustaciones de palabras para esta tarea, los enfoques estándar basados en traducciones vectoriales resultan tener un rendimiento deficiente. Para abordar este problema, proponemos dos modelos de inducción de relaciones probabilísticas. El primer modelo se basa en las traducciones, pero utiliza gaussianos para modelar explícitamente la variabilidad de estas traducciones y para codificar restricciones blandas en las palabras de origen y destino que se pueden elegir. En el segundo modelo, utilizamos la regresión lineal bayesiana para codificar la suposición de que hay una relación lineal entre las representaciones vectoriales de palabras relacionadas, que es considerablemente más débil que la suposición subyacente a los modelos basados en la traducción.', 'pt': 'Dado um conjunto de instâncias de alguma relação, a tarefa de indução de relação é prever quais outros pares de palavras provavelmente estão relacionados da mesma maneira. Embora seja natural usar incorporação de palavras para essa tarefa, as abordagens padrão baseadas em traduções de vetores acabam tendo um desempenho ruim. Para resolver este problema, propomos dois modelos de indução de relações probabilísticas. O primeiro modelo é baseado em traduções, mas usa Gaussianos para modelar explicitamente a variabilidade dessas traduções e para codificar restrições suaves nas palavras de origem e destino que podem ser escolhidas. No segundo modelo, usamos a regressão linear Bayesiana para codificar a suposição de que existe uma relação linear entre as representações vetoriais de palavras relacionadas, que é consideravelmente mais fraca do que a suposição subjacente aos modelos baseados em tradução.', 'ja': '何らかの関係の一連のインスタンスを考慮すると、関係帰納タスクは、どの他の単語ペアが同じように関連している可能性が高いかを予測することである。このタスクに単語埋め込みを使用するのは当然ですが、ベクトル翻訳に基づく標準的なアプローチは、パフォーマンスが悪いことが判明しました。この問題に対処するために、2つの確率的関係帰納モデルを提案します。最初のモデルは翻訳に基づいていますが、ガウスはこれらの翻訳の可変性を明示的にモデル化し、選択される可能性のあるソースおよびターゲット単語のソフト制約をエンコードするために使用します。2番目のモデルでは、ベイズ線形回帰を使用して、関連する単語のベクトル表現の間に線形関係があるという仮定をエンコードします。これは、翻訳ベースのモデルの仮定よりもかなり弱いです。', 'zh': '给定其例,归其任单词或同或异。 虽用词销成自然,然矢量译之法性劣也。 为此二者,二概率归之。 首模于译者,而以斯显式拟其可变性,择其源词、趋词之软束编码之。 二者,吾以贝叶斯线性归编码关单词之向量示有线性关系之设,甚于平移之假弱得多也。', 'ru': 'Учитывая набор экземпляров некоторого отношения, задача индукции отношения заключается в том, чтобы предсказать, какие другие пары слов, вероятно, будут связаны таким же образом. Хотя естественно использовать вложения слов для этой задачи, стандартные подходы, основанные на векторных переводах, оказываются неэффективными. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем две вероятностные индукционные модели соотношения. Первая модель основана на переводах, но использует Gaussians, чтобы явно моделировать изменчивость этих переводов и кодировать мягкие ограничения на исходные и целевые слова, которые могут быть выбраны. Во второй модели мы используем байесовскую линейную регрессию для кодирования предположения о том, что существует линейная зависимость между векторными представлениями родственных слов, которая значительно слабее, чем предположение, лежащее в основе моделей, основанных на переводе.', 'hi': 'कुछ संबंधों के उदाहरणों के एक सेट को देखते हुए, संबंध प्रेरण कार्य यह अनुमान लगाना है कि कौन से अन्य शब्द जोड़े उसी तरह से संबंधित होने की संभावना है। हालांकि इस कार्य के लिए शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करना स्वाभाविक है, वेक्टर अनुवाद के आधार पर मानक दृष्टिकोण खराब प्रदर्शन करने के लिए बाहर निकलते हैं। इस मुद्दे को हल करने के लिए, हम दो संभाव्य संबंध प्रेरण मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पहला मॉडल अनुवाद पर आधारित है, लेकिन इन अनुवादों की परिवर्तनशीलता को स्पष्ट रूप से मॉडल करने और चुने जा सकने वाले स्रोत और लक्ष्य शब्दों पर नरम बाधाओं को एन्कोड करने के लिए गॉसियन का उपयोग करता है। दूसरे मॉडल में, हम इस धारणा को एन्कोड करने के लिए बायेसियन रैखिक प्रतिगमन का उपयोग करते हैं कि संबंधित शब्दों के वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व के बीच एक रैखिक संबंध है, जो अंतर्निहित अनुवाद आधारित मॉडल की धारणा की तुलना में काफी कमजोर है।', 'ga': 'Nuair a chuirtear sraith cásanna de ghaol áirithe san áireamh, is é an tasc ionduchtaithe coibhneasa ná a thuar cé na péirí focal eile ar dócha go mbeidh baint acu leis an mbealach céanna. Cé go bhfuil sé nádúrtha leabaithe focal a úsáid don tasc seo, is beag a fheidhmíonn cineálacha cur chuige caighdeánacha atá bunaithe ar aistriúcháin veicteora. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, molaimid dhá mhúnla ionduchtaithe caidrimh dóchúlachta. Tá an chéad mhúnla bunaithe ar aistriúcháin, ach úsáideann Gaussians chun éagsúlacht na n-aistriúchán seo a shamhaltú go follasach agus chun srianta boga ar an bhfoinse agus ar na spriocfhocail a d’fhéadfaí a roghnú a ionchódú. Sa dara múnla, bainimid úsáid as aischéimniú líneach Bayesian chun an toimhde a ionchódú go bhfuil gaol líneach idir léirithe veicteoirí na bhfocal gaolmhar, atá i bhfad níos laige ná an toimhde atá mar bhonn leis na samhlacha atá bunaithe ar an aistriúchán.', 'ka': 'რამდენიმე შესახებ შესახებ, შესახებ ინდუქციის რაოდენობა იქნება, რომელიც სხვა სიტყვების ორივე შესახებ იგივე გზით. თუმცა ეს რაოდენობისთვის სიტყვების შებრძნობის გამოყენება, სტანდარტური შებრძნობები, რომლებიც გვეკტორის შებრძნობისთვის დაბაზეულია, ცოტ ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტის შესახებ, ჩვენ მუშაობით ორი პრობლემისტიური შესახებ ინდიქციის მოდელები. პირველი მოდელი გადაწყვეტილების დაბაზია, მაგრამ დაუსიანს გამოყენება, რომ გადაწყვეტილების განსხვავებელობა მოდელურად მოდელურად, და გამოყენება მარტივი განსხვავებული სიტყვების შესაძლებლო მეორე მოდელში, ჩვენ ვიყენებთ ბეიზიანური რეგრესია, რომელიც იქნება წარმოდგენისთვის, რომ გვეკტორის გამოსახულებების რესპერსიაში, რომელიც უფრო ძალიან ცოტა, ვიდრე გადაწყვეტილი მოდელეების დასახულებ', 'el': 'Δεδομένου ενός συνόλου περιπτώσεων κάποιας σχέσης, η εργασία επαγωγής σχέσης είναι να προβλέψει ποια άλλα ζεύγη λέξεων είναι πιθανό να σχετίζονται με τον ίδιο τρόπο. Ενώ είναι φυσικό να χρησιμοποιήσετε ενσωμάτωση λέξεων για αυτό το έργο, οι τυποποιημένες προσεγγίσεις που βασίζονται σε διανυσματικές μεταφράσεις αποδεικνύονται να αποδίδουν άσχημα. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε δύο πιθανολογικά μοντέλα επαγωγής σχέσεων. Το πρώτο μοντέλο βασίζεται σε μεταφράσεις, αλλά χρησιμοποιεί Gaussians για να μοντελοποιήσει ρητά τη μεταβλητότητα αυτών των μεταφράσεων και να κωδικοποιήσει μαλακούς περιορισμούς στις λέξεις προέλευσης και στόχου που μπορούν να επιλεγούν. Στο δεύτερο μοντέλο, χρησιμοποιούμε Bayesian γραμμική παλινδρόμηση για να κωδικοποιήσουμε την υπόθεση ότι υπάρχει γραμμική σχέση μεταξύ των διανυσματικών αναπαραστάσεων των σχετικών λέξεων, η οποία είναι σημαντικά ασθενέστερη από την υπόθεση που βασίζεται στα μοντέλα μετάφρασης.', 'hu': 'Néhány példány kapcsolat esetében a kapcsolat indukciós feladat az, hogy megjósoljuk, mely más szópárok valószínűleg ugyanilyen módon kapcsolódnak össze. Bár természetes szóbeágyazásokat használni ehhez a feladathoz, a vektorfordításokon alapuló szabványos megközelítések rosszul teljesítenek. Ennek a kérdésnek a megoldására két valószínűségi viszony indukciós modellt javasolunk. Az első modell fordításokon alapul, de Gauss nyelveket használ a fordítások változékonyságának modellezésére és a kiválasztható forrás- és célszavak puha korlátozásainak kódolására. A második modellben bayesiai lineáris regressziót használunk arra a feltételezésre, hogy lineáris kapcsolat van a kapcsolódó szavak vektorreprezentációi között, ami lényegesen gyengébb, mint a feltételezés alapjául szolgáló fordítási alapú modellek.', 'it': "Dato un insieme di istanze di qualche relazione, il compito di induzione delle relazioni è quello di prevedere quali altre coppie di parole sono probabilmente correlate nello stesso modo. Anche se è naturale utilizzare le incorporazioni di parole per questo compito, gli approcci standard basati sulle traduzioni vettoriali risultano avere prestazioni scarse. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo due modelli di induzione delle relazioni probabilistiche. Il primo modello è basato sulle traduzioni, ma usa gaussiani per modellare esplicitamente la variabilità di queste traduzioni e per codificare vincoli morbidi sulle parole sorgente e target che possono essere scelte. Nel secondo modello, usiamo la regressione lineare bayesiana per codificare l'ipotesi che ci sia una relazione lineare tra le rappresentazioni vettoriali di parole correlate, che è notevolmente più debole dell'ipotesi sottostante i modelli basati sulla traduzione.", 'lt': 'Given a set of instances of some relation, the relation induction task is to predict which other word pairs are likely to be related in the same way.  Nors šioje užduotyje yra natūralu naudoti žodžių įterpimus, standartiniai metodai, pagrįsti vektorių vertimais, pasirodo blogai veikiantys. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, siūlome du probabilistinių santykių indukcijos modelius. Pirmasis model is grindžiamas vertimais, tačiau naudoja gausių kalbas aiškiai modeliuoti šių vertimų kintamumą ir koduoti švelnius apribojimus, taikomus pasirinktiems šaltiniams ir tiksliniams žodžiams. Antrajame modelyje naudojame Bayezijos linijinę regresiją, koduojančią prielaidą, kad yra linijinis ryšys tarp susijusių žodžių vektorių rodmenų, kuris yra žymiai silpnesnis nei prielaida, pagrįsta vertimu pagrįstais modeliais.', 'mk': 'Со оглед на некои случаи на некоја врска, задачата за индукција на врската е да се предвиди кои други зборови парови најверојатно ќе бидат поврзани на истиот начин. И покрај тоа што е природно да се користат зборови вградени за оваа задача, стандардните пристапи базирани на векторни преводи се покажуваат лошо. За да го решиме ова прашање, предложуваме два веројатни модели за индукција на односи. Првиот модел се базира на преводи, но ги користи гаусите за експлицитно да ја моделираат варијабилноста на овие преводи и да ги кодираат меките ограничувања на изворот и целните зборови кои може да се изберат. Во вториот модел, користиме бејезиска линијарна регресија за кодирање на претпоставката дека постои линијарна врска помеѓу векторските претставувања на поврзани зборови, што е значително послабна од претпоставката на основата на преводот базирани модели.', 'kk': 'Кейбір қатынастың нәтижелері болса, қатынастың индукциялық тапсырмасы, басқа сөздердің екеуі бірдей тәсілді болуы мүмкін. Бұл тапсырма үшін сөздерді ендіру тәуелсіз болса, вектордың аудармасына негізделген стандартты жағдай жағдай жасайды. Бұл мәселеге шешу үшін біз екі ықтималдық қатынас индукциялық үлгілерін ұсынамыз. Бірінші үлгі аудармаларда негізделген, бірақ бұл аудармалардың айнымалылығын түсіндіру үшін Гаусияндарды қолданып, таңдалған сөздердің көзі мен мақсатты шектеулерін кодтау үшін қолданылады. Екінші үлгі бойынша, біз Байезия сызық регрессиясын қолданамыз, аудармалардың негіздеген үлгілерінен артық қатынас бар дегенді кодтамыз.', 'mt': 'Minħabba sett ta’ każijiet ta’ xi relazzjoni, il-kompitu ta’ induzzjoni tar-relazzjoni huwa li wieħed jipprevedi liema pari oħra ta’ kliem x’aktarx ikunu relatati bl-istess mod. Filwaqt li huwa naturali li jintużaw l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem għal dan il-kompitu, l-approċċi standard ibbażati fuq it-traduzzjonijiet tal-vetturi jirriżultaw li jwettqu ħażin. Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, nipproponu żewġ mudelli ta’ induzzjoni ta’ relazzjoni probabbli. L-ewwel mudell huwa bbażat fuq traduzzjonijiet, iżda juża Gaussjani biex jimmudellaw espliċitament il-varjabbiltà ta’ dawn it-traduzzjonijiet u biex jikkodifikaw restrizzjonijiet mhux vinkolanti fuq is-sors u l-kliem fil-mira li jistgħu jintgħażlu. Fit-tieni mudell, a ħna nużaw ir-rigressjoni lineari Bajesjana biex nikkodifikaw is-suppożizzjoni li hemm relazzjoni lineari bejn ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vettur ta’ kliem relatat, li hija konsiderevolment aktar dgħajfa mis-suppożizzjoni bbażata fuq it-traduzzjoni.', 'ms': 'Berdasarkan set contoh dari beberapa hubungan, tugas induksi hubungan adalah untuk meramalkan mana pasangan perkataan lain mungkin berkaitan dengan cara yang sama. Sementara ia semulajadi untuk menggunakan penyambungan perkataan untuk tugas ini, pendekatan piawai berdasarkan terjemahan vektor ternyata berjalan buruk. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami cadangkan dua model induksi hubungan kemungkinan. Model pertama berdasarkan terjemahan, tetapi menggunakan Gaussian untuk secara eksplicit modelkan variabiliti terjemahan ini dan untuk mengekodkan keterangan lembut pada sumber dan kata sasaran yang boleh dipilih. Dalam model kedua, kita gunakan regresi linear Bayesia untuk mengekod asumsi bahawa terdapat hubungan linear antara persembahan vektor perkataan berkaitan, yang jauh lebih lemah daripada asumsi model berdasarkan terjemahan.', 'mn': 'Зарим харилцааны нэг хэсэг тохиолдолд харилцаа үйлдвэрлэх үйлдвэрлэл нь өөр үгний хоёр нь яг адилхан харилцаа байх боломжтой гэдгийг таамаглах юм. Энэ үйл ажилд үг нэмж хэрэглэх нь байгалийн хэдий ч, вектор орчуулалтын үндсэн стандарт ойлголт нь буруу байдаг. Энэ асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид хоёр магадлал үйлдвэрлэлийн холбоотой загварыг санал болгоно. Эхний загвар нь орчуулалт дээр суурилсан, гэхдээ Гаусс хүмүүсийг эдгээр орчуулалтын өөрчлөлтийг тодорхой загварчлахын тулд ашиглаж, сонгогдох эх үүсвэр болон зорилготой үгсийг бага хязгаарлах хэрэгтэй. Хоёр дахь загварт бид Байзийн шулуун регрессийг ашиглаж, харилцааны үгнүүдийн векторын харилцааны шулуун харилцаа байдгийг ойлгохын тулд хэрэглэдэг. Энэ нь орчуулах загварын үндсэн загвараас илүү бага байдаг.', 'ml': 'ചില ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു സാഹചര്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട്, ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പണിയാണ് മറ്റൊരു വാക്ക് ജോട്ടുകാര്\u200d ഒരേ ര ഈ ജോലിക്കുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ അകത്തേക്കുള്ള അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായിരിക്കുമ്പോഴും, വെക്റ്റര്\u200d  ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് സാധ്യതയുള്ള ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മോഡല്\u200d പ ആദ്യത്തെ മോഡല്\u200d പരിഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്, പക്ഷെ ഗാസ്സിയക്കാര്\u200d ഈ ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യാസവും വ്യക്തമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. സ്രോതസ്സില്\u200d  രണ്ടാമത്തെ മാതൃകയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d ലൈനര്\u200d രീക്രഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. വെക്റ്റര്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള ഒരു ലൈനര്\u200d ബന്ധമുണ്ടെന്ന്', 'pl': 'Biorąc pod uwagę zestaw przypadków pewnej relacji, zadaniem indukcji relacji jest przewidywanie, które inne pary słów prawdopodobnie będą powiązane w ten sam sposób. Chociaż naturalne jest używanie osadzeń słowowych do tego zadania, standardowe podejścia oparte na tłumaczeniach wektorowych okazują się źle sprawdzać. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy dwa modele indukcji relacji probabilistycznych. Pierwszy model opiera się na tłumaczeniach, ale wykorzystuje Gaussa do wyraźnego modelowania zmienności tych tłumaczeń i kodowania miękkich ograniczeń dla wybranych słów źródłowych i docelowych. W drugim modelu używamy Bayesowskiej regresji liniowej do zakodowania założenia, że istnieje liniowa relacja między reprezentacjami wektorowymi powiązanych słów, która jest znacznie słabsza niż założenie leżące u podstaw modeli translacyjnych.', 'sr': 'S obzirom na niz slučajeva neke veze, zadatak za indukciju veze je predviđati koji će drugi parovi reči vjerojatno biti povezan na isti način. Iako je prirodno koristiti reèi za ovaj zadatak, standardni pristupi na osnovu prevoda vektora ispadnu loše. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo dva verovatnih modela indukcije veze. Prvi model je baziran na prevodima, ali koristi Gausijance da biste izrazili variabilnost tih prevoda i kodirali meke ograničenja na izvoru i ciljne reči koje bi mogle izabrati. U drugom modelu, koristimo Bejzijsku linearnu regresiju kako bi kodirali pretpostavku da postoji linearna veza između predstavljanja vektora povezanih reči, koja je značajno slaba od pretpostavke na temelju model a prevoda.', 'no': 'Given eit sett av instansar for nokre relasjon, er relasjonsinduksjonsprogrammet å foregå kva andre ord par sannsynlegvis vil vera relatert på same måte. Mens det er naturleg å bruka ord- innbøykingar for denne oppgåva, så blir standard tilnærming basert på vektoromsetjingar vist ut for å utføra slik dårlig. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi to sannsynlige relasjonsmodeller. Den første modellen er basert på omsetjingane, men brukar Gaussiane for å eksplisisere modeller variabelen av desse omsetjingane og koda målsordene som kan veljast på kjelde og målsettinga. I den andre modellen bruker vi Bayesianske lineære regresjon for å kode assumpsjonen at det finst ein lineær forhold mellom vektorrepresentasjonane av relaterte ord, som er svært svakere enn assumpsjonen basert på omsetjingsbaserte modeller.', 'ro': 'Având în vedere un set de cazuri ale unei relații, sarcina de inducție a relației este de a prezice ce alte perechi de cuvinte sunt probabil să fie legate în același mod. Deși este natural să folosiți încorporări de cuvinte pentru această sarcină, abordările standard bazate pe traduceri vectoriale se dovedesc a performa slab. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem două modele de inducție a relațiilor probabilistice. Primul model se bazează pe traduceri, dar folosește gaussiani pentru a modela în mod explicit variabilitatea acestor traduceri și pentru a codifica constrângeri moi asupra cuvintelor sursă și țintă care pot fi alese. În al doilea model, folosim regresia liniară bayesiană pentru a codifica presupunerea că există o relație liniară între reprezentările vectoriale ale cuvintelor asociate, care este considerabil mai slabă decât presupunerea bazată pe modelele traducerii.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙන්නේ සම්බන්ධ විදියට, සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අනිත් වචනය සම්බන්ධ විදියට කො මේ වැඩ සඳහා වෙක්ටර් පරිවර්තනය අධාරිත වෙක්ටර් පරිවර්තනය සඳහා වචනය භාවිත කරන්න ස්වභාවිතයි. මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට සම්බන්ධතාවක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්න කරනවා. මුලින් මොඩේල් අභාවිතයේ අධාරණය, නමුත් ගෝසියාන්ව ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් භාවිත කරනවා මෙම අභාවිතයේ වෙනස් විදියට මොඩේල් කරන්න දෙවෙනි මොඩල් එකේ අපි බේසියාන් ලේනියාර් රිග්\u200dරේෂණය භාවිතා කරනවා හිතන්නේ වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන වචන වලට ලේනියාර් සම්බන්ධයක් තියෙනවා කියල', 'sv': 'Med en uppsättning exempel på någon relation är relationsindikationsuppgiften att förutsäga vilka andra ordpar som sannolikt kommer att relateras på samma sätt. Även om det är naturligt att använda ordinbäddningar för denna uppgift, visar standardmetoder baserade på vektoröversättningar sig fungera dåligt. För att ta itu med denna fråga föreslår vi två probabilistiska relationsindikationsmodeller. Den första modellen är baserad på översättningar, men använder gaussiska för att explicit modellera variationen i dessa översättningar och för att koda mjuka begränsningar för käll- och målord som kan väljas. I den andra modellen använder vi Bayesian linjär regression för att koda antagandet att det finns ett linjärt förhållande mellan vektorrepresentationer av relaterade ord, vilket är betydligt svagare än antagandet bakom översättningsbaserade modeller.', 'so': 'Sida lagu jiro tusaalooyin kala duduwan, shaqada xiriirka waa in la sii sheegaa qofka kale oo laga yaabaa inay si isku mid ah u xiriiraan. Inta lagu isticmaalayo hadalka ku habboon shaqadaas, waxaa habboon qaababka caadiga ah oo ku saleysan turjumaadda vector si ay u sameeyaan si xun. Si aan arrintan ula macaamilo karno, waxaan soo jeedaynaa laba noocyo oo suurtagal ah oo xiriir ah. Tusaale kowaad waxaa ku saleysan turjubaano, laakiin wuxuu isticmaalaa Gaussian si cad u sameyn kara bedelka turjumyadan iyo qoraalka kooban ee asalka iyo hadallada waxyaabaha la dooran karo. Tusaale labaad, waxaynu isticmaalnaa dib u celinta Bayesian liner si aan u qorno malaynta inay heysato xiriir qarsoon oo u dhexeeya qofka vector ka tirsan hadallada la xiriira, taasoo aad uga itaal yar tahay malayaasha ku qoran turjumidda hoose.', 'ta': 'சில நிகழ்வுகளின் கூட்டு நிகழ்வுகள் கொடுத்தால், தொடர்பு தொடர்பு தொடர்பு செய்தல் செயல் என்னவென்றால் மற்ற வார்த்தை ஜோடி அத இந்த செயலுக்கான வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்களை பயன்படுத்த இயற்கையாக இருக்கும் போது, நெறிய மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை அடிப்படையில் ந இந்த பிரச்சனையை நிர்வகிக்க, நாம் இரண்டு சாத்தியமான தொடர்பு தொடர்பு தொடர்பு மாதிரிகளை பரிந்துரை முதல் மாதிரி மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது, ஆனால் காஸ்சியன்களை பயன்படுத்தி இந்த மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளின் மாறியை வெளிப்படையாக மாற்றி மூ இரண்டாவது மாதிரியில், நாம் பேயேசியன் வரிசை திருப்பத்தை பயன்படுத்தி குறியீட்டிடுகிறோம் என்று நினைக்கிறோம் வெக்டர் தொடர்பு வார்த்தைகளுக்கு இடையே', 'ur': 'کسی رابطہ کی ایک مجموعہ کے ذریعہ سے رابطہ اختیار کا کام یہ ہے کہ اس سے پیش کرنا ہے کہ دوسرے کلمات کے جوڑے ایک ہی طرح رابطہ دار ہوں گے۔ جبکہ اس کام کے لئے کلمات ابڈینگ استعمال کرنا طبیعی ہے، وکتور ترجمہ پر بنیاد استاندارڈ کی تقریبا کمی کرنا ہے. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم دو احتمالی رابطہ کے معاملہ میں ڈال دیتے ہیں۔ پہلی موڈل ترجمہ پر بنیاد ہے، لیکن گاوسی والوں کو صریح طور پر ان ترجمہ کے متغیر قابلیت کی مدل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتا ہے اور سورج اور موجود لغات پر نرم محدودیت کا اندازہ کرتا ہے جو انتخاب کئے جائیں۔ دوسرے موڈل میں، ہم بائیسی لینیر ریگرس کا استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ اس گمان کو کوڈ کرنا چاہتے ہیں کہ ویکتور کے معاملات کے درمیان ایک لینی رابطہ ہے، جو ترجمہ کی بنیادی موڈل سے زیادہ کمزور ہے۔', 'uz': "Bir necha munosabatlar bilan bir xil holatlar bilan bog'liq vazifani predicting boshqa so'zlar qanday bir xil bilan bog'liq bo'lishi mumkin. @ info Bu muammolani boshqarish uchun biz ikkita muhimlik narsa modellarini rivojlanamiz. @ info Ikkinchi modelda, biz Bayezcha tarjima boshqaruvchidan foydalanamiz, va vektor bilan bog'liq so'zlar orasidagi bog'liq bog'liq bo'lganligini kodlash uchun o'ylaymiz. Bu o'zgarishning asosida o'zgarishning asosiy modellaridan juda yoqtirdi.", 'vi': 'Dựa vào một nhóm các trường hợp của một số liên quan, nhiệm vụ cưỡng ứng quan hệ là dự đoán các cặp từ khác có thể tương ứng giống nhau. Trong khi việc sử dụng sự nhúng vào từ cho nhiệm vụ này, các phương pháp tiêu chuẩn dựa trên dịch vector trở nên tồi tệ. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất hai mẫu cảm ứng thử nghiệm. The first model is based on translations, but uses Gausss to exactly model the variation of these translations and to declare soft chairs on the source and the mục words which may be chọn. Trong mô hình thứ hai, chúng tôi sử dụng sự phục hồi tuyến tính Bayisian để mã hóa giả định rằng có một mối quan hệ tuyến tính giữa các biểu hiện vector của từ tương ứng, mà còn yếu hơn nhiều so với giả thuyết căn cứ dịch.', 'da': 'I betragtning af et sæt tilfælde af en relation er relationsindikationsopgaven at forudsige, hvilke andre ordpar der sandsynligvis vil være relateret på samme måde. Selvom det er naturligt at bruge ordindlejringer til denne opgave, viser standardtilgange baseret på vektoroversættelser sig at fungere dårligt. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi to probabilistiske relationsindikationsmodeller. Den første model er baseret på oversættelser, men bruger gaussisk til eksplicit at modellere variabiliteten af disse oversættelser og til at kode bløde begrænsninger på kilde- og målord, der kan vælges. I den anden model bruger vi bayesisk lineær regression til at indkode antagelsen om, at der er et lineært forhold mellem vektorrepræsentationerne af relaterede ord, som er betydeligt svagere end antagelsen bag oversættelsesbaserede modeller.', 'hr': 'S obzirom na niz slučajeva neke veze, zadatak indukcije veze je predvidjeti koji će drugi parovi riječi vjerojatno biti povezani na isti način. Iako je prirodno upotrijebiti priključenje riječi za ovaj zadatak, standardni pristupi na temelju prevoda vektora pokazuju se loše izvršiti. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo dvije verovatne modele indukcije veze. Prvi model je baziran na prevodima, ali koristi Gausijance kako bi se pojasno modelirali variabilnost tih prevoda i kodirali meke ograničenja na izvoru i ciljne riječi koje mogu izabrati. U drugom modelu, koristimo Bayesiansku linearnu regresiju kako bi kodirali pretpostavku da postoji linearna veza između predstavljanja vektora povezanih riječi, što je značajno slabije od pretpostavke na temelju model a prevoda.', 'nl': 'Gezien een reeks gevallen van een relatie, is de relatie inductie taak om te voorspellen welke andere woordparen waarschijnlijk op dezelfde manier gerelateerd zijn. Hoewel het natuurlijk is om woord embeddings te gebruiken voor deze taak, blijken standaardbenaderingen gebaseerd op vectorvertalingen slecht te presteren. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we twee probabilistische relatieonductiemodellen voor. Het eerste model is gebaseerd op vertalingen, maar gebruikt Gaussians om expliciet de variabiliteit van deze vertalingen te modelleren en om zachte beperkingen te coderen op de bron- en doelwoorden die kunnen worden gekozen. In het tweede model gebruiken we Bayesiaanse lineaire regressie om de veronderstelling te coderen dat er een lineaire relatie is tussen de vectorrepresentaties van verwante woorden, die aanzienlijk zwakker is dan de veronderstelling die ten grondslag ligt aan vertaalmodellen.', 'bg': 'Предвид набор от случаи на някаква връзка, задачата за индукция на връзката е да се предскаже кои други двойки думи вероятно ще бъдат свързани по същия начин. Въпреки че е естествено да се използват вграждания на думи за тази задача, стандартните подходи, базирани на векторни преводи, се оказват слабо. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме два модела за индукция на вероятни релации. Първият модел се основава на преводи, но използва гауси за изрично моделиране на променливостта на тези преводи и за кодиране на меки ограничения върху източника и целевите думи, които могат да бъдат избрани. Във втория модел използваме Байезианска линейна регресия, за да кодираме предположението, че има линейна връзка между векторните представи на сродните думи, което е значително по-слабо от предположението, базирано на моделите на превод.', 'de': 'Angesichts einer Reihe von Instanzen einer Beziehung besteht die Aufgabe der Beziehungsinduktion darin, vorherzusagen, welche anderen Wortpaare wahrscheinlich auf die gleiche Weise verwandt werden. Während es natürlich ist, Worteinbettungen für diese Aufgabe zu verwenden, erweisen sich Standardansätze, die auf Vektorübersetzungen basieren, als schlecht. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir zwei probabilistische Beziehungsinduktionsmodelle vor. Das erste Modell basiert auf Übersetzungen, verwendet aber Gaußsche, um explizit die Variabilität dieser Übersetzungen zu modellieren und weiche Einschränkungen für die Quell- und Zielwörter zu kodieren, die ausgewählt werden können. Im zweiten Modell verwenden wir Bayessche lineare Regression, um die Annahme zu kodieren, dass es eine lineare Beziehung zwischen den Vektorrepräsentationen verwandter Wörter gibt, die deutlich schwächer ist als die Annahme, die translationsbasierten Modellen zugrunde liegt.', 'id': 'Berdasarkan set contoh dari beberapa hubungan, tugas induksi hubungan adalah untuk memprediksi mana pasangan kata lain mungkin berhubungan dengan cara yang sama. Sementara alami untuk menggunakan pembangunan kata untuk tugas ini, pendekatan standar berdasarkan terjemahan vektor ternyata tidak baik. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan dua model induksi hubungan probabilis. Model pertama berdasarkan terjemahan, tetapi menggunakan Gaussian untuk secara eksplicit model variabilitas terjemahan-jemahan ini dan untuk mengkode batas lembut pada sumber dan kata-kata sasaran yang dapat dipilih. Dalam model kedua, kita menggunakan regresi linear Bayesian untuk mengkode asumsi bahwa ada hubungan linear antara representation vektor kata-kata yang berhubungan, yang jauh lebih lemah dari asumsi model berdasarkan terjemahan.', 'ko': '하나의 관계 실례를 정하고 관계 귀납 임무는 어떤 다른 단어가 같은 방식으로 관련될 수 있는지 예측하는 것이다.이 작업에서 단어를 삽입하는 것은 자연스럽지만, 벡터 번역을 기반으로 하는 표준 방법의 성능은 매우 떨어진다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 두 가지 확률 관계 귀납 모델을 제시했다.첫 번째 모델은 번역을 바탕으로 하지만 고스 함수를 사용하여 이러한 번역의 가변성을 명확하게 모델링하고 선택할 수 있는 원어와 목표어를 소프트 제약 인코딩한다.두 번째 모델에서 우리는 베일스의 선형 회귀를 이용하여 관련 단어의 벡터 표시 사이에 선형 관계가 존재한다는 가설을 인코딩하는데 이것은 번역된 모델을 바탕으로 하는 가설보다 훨씬 약하다.', 'tr': 'Käbir baglaýyşyň esaslaryny görä, syýahat işi başga bir söz çiftleriniň bir şekilde baglanyp boljakdygyny tahmin etmekdir. Bu görev için kitap içeren kelime eklemek doğal olsa da, vektör tercümlerine dayanan standart yaklaşımlar yanlış şekilde gösteriyor. Bu meselede çözmek üçin, iki sanal wajyp senagatlaşdyrma nusgasyny teklip edýäris. Ilkinji model terjime edip baglanýar, ýöne bu terjimeleriň üýtgeşiklerini açıklamak üçin Gausyýany çaplamak üçin ullanýar we saýlayabilen täze sözlerni kodlamak üçin ullanýar. Ikinji modelde, terjime tabanlı modellerden daha zayıflatan Bayezi çizgi regresi kullanırız.', 'af': "Gien 'n stel voorbeelde van sommige verwanting, is die verwanting induksie taak om te voorskou wat ander woord paar waarskynlik verwante moet word op dieselfde manier. Alhoewel dit natuurlik is om woord inbettings vir hierdie taak te gebruik, word standaard toegang gebaseer op vektor vertalings uitgeskakel om slegs te doen. Om hierdie probleem te besluit, voorstel ons twee waarskynlik verhoudingsmodule. Die eerste model is gebaseer op vertalings, maar gebruik Gaussians om uitduidelik die veranderlikheid van hierdie vertalings te model en om sagte begrense te kodeer op die bron en doel woorde wat dalk kan gekies word. In die tweede model gebruik ons Bayesian lineêre regresie om die aanvaar te kodeer dat daar 'n lineêre verhouding tussen die vektor voorstellings van verwante woorde is, wat is betekenlik swakker as die aanvaar onderstelling oorsetting gebaseerde modele.", 'sw': 'Kutokana na matukio mengine ya uhusiano, kazi ya uzalishaji ni kutabiri ni nani neno jingine ambalo wanandoa wanaweza kuwa na uhusiano kwa namna hiyo. Wakati ni asili kutumia ujumbe wa maneno kwa kazi hii, mbinu za kawaida zinazotumiwa na tafsiri za vector zinaonekana kufanya kazi mbaya. Kupambana na suala hili, tunapendekeza mifano miwili yenye uwezekano wa uzalishaji wa mahusiano. Mfano wa kwanza unajikita na tafsiri, lakini inatumia Wa-Gaussia kuonyesha mabadiliko ya tafsiri hizi kwa uwazi na kuweka vikwazo myeufu kwenye chanzo na maneno yanayoweza kuchaguliwa. Katika mifano ya pili, tunatumia vikwazo vya msitari wa Bayesia ili kutambua dhana kwamba kuna uhusiano wa karibu kati ya uwakilishi wa maneno yanayohusiana na vector, ambavyo ni dhaifu zaidi ya dhana ya mifano inayohusiana na utafsiri.', 'sq': 'Duke pasur parasysh një sërë rastesh të disa marrëdhënieve, detyra e induksionit të marrëdhënieve është të parashikohet cilat palë fjalësh të tjera ka gjasa të jenë të lidhura në të njëjtën mënyrë. Ndërsa është natyrore të përdorësh përfshirjet e fjalëve për këtë detyrë, metodat standarde të bazuara në përkthimet vektorë dalin të bëjnë keq. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne propozojmë dy modele të induksionit të lidhjes probabiliste. The first model is based on translations, but uses Gaussians to explicitly model the variability of these translations and to encode soft constraints on the source and target words that may be chosen.  Në modelin e dytë, ne përdorim regresionin linear Bayesian për të koduar supozimin se ka një lidhje lineare midis përfaqësimeve vektorësh të fjalëve të lidhura, e cila është konsiderueshëm më e dobët se supozimi bazuar në modelet e përkthimit.', 'am': 'Given a set of instances of some relation, the relation induction task is to predict which other word pairs are likely to be related in the same way.  ምንም እንኳን ለዚህ ስራ የቃላት ግንኙነት ለመጠቀም ፍጥረት ቢሆን፣ በvector ትርጉም በመሠረት የተመሳሳይ ደረጃዎች ክፋት እንዲያደርጉ ይመለሳሉ፡፡ ለዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል ሁለት የግንኙነት የግንኙነት ምሳሌዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ሞዴል በተርጓሚዎች ላይ የተገኘ ነው፥ ነገር ግን ጋውስሲውያን የዚህን ትርጓሜዎች ልዩነቱን ግልፅ ለመግለጥ እና በመረጠው ቋንቋ ላይ የሶፍታ ግንኙነት እና በሚያሳዩት ቃላት ለመቆጣጠር ይጠቅማል፡፡ በሁለተኛው ምሳሌ፣ ባያይስያ የኢትዮጵያ የኢንተርኔት ምሳሌ በሚያሳየው የዋና ቃላት ግንኙነት የቅርብ ግንኙነት እንዲኖር እናስባለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Որոշ հարաբերությունների մի շարք օրինակներ հաշվի առնելով, հարաբերությունների ինդուկցիայի խնդիրը կանխատեսելն է, թե որպիսի այլ բառերի զույգեր հավանաբար նույն կերպ են կապված: Մինչդեռ բնական է օգտագործել բառերի ներդրումներ այս խնդրի համար, ստանդարտ մոտեցումները, հիմնված վեկտորների թարգմանությունների վրա, պարզվում են վատ են: Այս հարցի լուծման համար մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու հավանական հարաբերության ինդուկցիոն մոդել: Առաջին մոդելը հիմնված է թարգմանությունների վրա, սակայն օգտագործում է գաուսացիներին, որպեսզի բացահայտորեն մոդելավորի այս թարգմանությունների տարբերակությունը և կոդավորի այն աղբյուրի և նպատակային բառերի համար, որոնք կարող են ընտրվել: Երկրորդ մոդելի մեջ մենք օգտագործում ենք Բեյեզիայի գծային ռեգրեսիան ենթադրելու համար, որ կա գծային հարաբերություն կապված բառերի վեկտորների ներկայացումների միջև, որը շատ ավելի թույլ է, քան թարգմանման հիմնական մոդելները:', 'az': 'Bazı ilişkilərin bir neçə məsəllərinə görə, ilişki induksyon işləri, digər söz cütlərinin eyni yolla ilişkilərini təmin etməkdir. Bu işin sözlərini istifadə etmək təbiətli olaraq, vektor tercümələrinə dayanan standart yaxınlıqlar pis işləməyə başlayar. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün, iki mümkün olaraq əlaqəsi induksyon modeli təklif edirik. İlk model tercümələrə dayanılır, amma bu tercümələrin dəyişikliyini açıq-aydın modelləşdirmək və seçilmək olaraq mənbənin və məqsəd sözlərinin ucundan yumuşaq müəyyənləşdirmək üçün Gaussianları istifadə edir. İkinci modellərdə, biz Bayeziya linear regresiyasını kullanırıq ki, tərcümə altındakı modellərdən çox zəif olduğu zənn verən vektorların ifadəsi arasında linear bir ilişki var.', 'bn': 'কিছু সম্পর্কের কিছু ঘটনা দিয়ে সম্পর্ক শিল্পের কাজটি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা হচ্ছে যে অন্যান্য শব্দ জোড়া কোনটা একই ভাবে সম্পর্কের সা এই কাজের জন্য শব্দ ব্যবহারের প্রাকৃতিক ব্যবহার করা হলেও ভেক্টর অনুবাদের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে স্বাভাবিক উপায় খারাপ করা  এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে কথা বলার জন্য আমরা দুটি সম্ভাব্য সম্পর্কের মোডেল প্রস্তাব করি। The first model is based on translations, but uses Gaussians to explicitly model the variability of these translations and to encode soft constraints on the source and target words that may be chosen.  দ্বিতীয় মডেলে আমরা বেয়েসিয়ান লাইনিয়ার পুনরুদ্ধার ব্যবহার করি এই ধারণার জন্য যে ভেক্টরের সংশ্লিষ্ট শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের মধ্যে একটি লাইনিয়ার সম্পর্ক আছে, য', 'bs': 'S obzirom na niz slučajeva neke veze, zadatak indukcije veze je predvidjeti koji će drugi parovi riječi vjerojatno biti povezani na isti način. Iako je prirodno upotrijebiti riječi integracije za ovaj zadatak, standardni pristupi na osnovu prevoda vektora ispadnu loše izvršavanje. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo dva verovatnih modela indukcije veze. Prvi model je baziran na prevodima, ali koristi Gausijance da biste jasno modelili variabilnost tih prevoda i kodirali meke ograničenja na izvoru i ciljne riječi koje mogu izabrati. U drugom modelu koristimo linearnu regresiju Bejzije kako bi kodirali pretpostavku da postoji linearna veza između predstavljanja vektora povezanih riječi, koja je značajno slaba od pretpostavke na temelju model a prevoda.', 'fa': 'با توجه به مجموعه\u200cی نمونه\u200cهای بعضی رابطه\u200cها، وظیفه\u200cی تحریک رابطه\u200cای است که پیش\u200cبینی کردن کدام یک جور کلمه دیگر احتمالاً به همان رابطه ارتباط دارند. در حالی که از استفاده از ابزارهای کلمه برای این کار طبیعی است، تقریبا استاندارد بر اساس ترجمه\u200cهای ویکتور به بدی انجام می\u200cدهد. برای حل این مسئله، ما دو مدل رابطه احتمالاتی را پیشنهاد می کنیم. اولین مدل بر اساس ترجمه\u200cها بنیاد دارد، اما از گاوسیان استفاده می\u200cکند تا بطور واضح تغییرات این ترجمه\u200cها را مدل کند و محدودیت نرم بر اساس منبع و کلمات هدف که ممکن است انتخاب شود رمز کند. در مدل دوم، ما از بازگشت خطی بیزیایی استفاده می کنیم تا فرض کنیم که یک رابطه خطی بین نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور کلمات مربوط به آن وجود دارد، که خیلی ضعیف تر از فرض که مدل\u200cهای زیر ترجمه است.', 'ca': "Given a set of instances of some relation, the relation induction task is to predict which other word pairs are likely to be related in the same way.  Mentre és natural utilitzar integracions de paraules per a aquesta tasca, els enfocaments estàndard basats en traduccions de vectors resulten ser dolents. Per abordar aquest tema, proposem dos models d'inducció de relació probabilista. El primer model es basa en traduccions, però utilitza gaussians per modelar explícitament la variabilitat d'aquestes traduccions i codificar restriccions suaves a la font i les paraules alvo que es poden escollir. En el segon model, utilitzem la regressió linear bayèsia per codificar la suposició de que hi ha una relació linear entre les representacions vectorials de paraules relacionades, que és considerablement més dèbil que la suposició basada en models de traducció.", 'cs': 'Vzhledem k množině případů některých vztahů je úkolem indukce vztahů předpovědět, které další slovní páry budou pravděpodobně vztahovány stejným způsobem. Zatímco je přirozené používat slovní vložení pro tento úkol, standardní přístupy založené na vektorových překladech se ukázaly jako špatné. Pro řešení této problematiky navrhujeme dva pravděpodobnostní indukční modely vztahů. První model je založen na překladech, ale používá Gaussovy jazyky k explicitnímu modelování variability těchto překladů a kódování měkkých omezení na zdrojová a cílová slova, která mohou být zvolena. Ve druhém modelu používáme Bayesovskou lineární regresi k zakódování předpokladu, že existuje lineární vztah mezi vektorovými reprezentacemi souvisejících slov, který je podstatně slabší než předpoklad založený na překladových modelech.', 'et': 'Arvestades teatud seose juhtumeid, on seose induktsiooni ülesanne ennustada, millised teised sõnapaarid on tõenäoliselt seotud samal viisil. Kuigi selle ülesande jaoks on loomulik kasutada sõna manustamist, osutuvad vektortõlketel põhinevad standardsed lähenemisviisid halvasti toimivaks. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja kaks tõenäosuslikku seose induktsiooni mudelit. Esimene mudel põhineb tõlketel, kuid kasutab gaussikeelseid, et selgesõnaliselt modelleerida nende tõlkete varieeruvust ja kodeerida pehmeid piiranguid lähte- ja sihtsõnadele, mida võib valida. Teises mudelis kasutame Bayesi lineaarset regressiooni eelduse kodeerimiseks, et seotud sõnade vektorikujutiste vahel on lineaarne seos, mis on oluliselt nõrgem kui tõlkepõhiste mudelite aluseks olev eeldus.', 'fi': 'Kun otetaan huomioon joukko tapauksia jonkin suhteen suhteen induktiotehtävä on ennustaa, mitkä muut sanaparit todennäköisesti liittyvät samalla tavalla. Vaikka tähän tehtävään on luonnollista käyttää sanaupotuksia, vektorikäännöksiin perustuvat vakiolähestymistavat osoittautuvat heikoksi. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme kahta todennäköisyyssuhdeinduktiomallia. Ensimmäinen malli perustuu käännöksiin, mutta käyttää gaussilaisia nimenomaan mallintamaan näiden käännösten vaihtelua ja koodaamaan pehmeitä rajoituksia lähde- ja kohdesanoille, jotka voidaan valita. Toisessa mallissa käytetään bayesilaista lineaarista regressiota koodaamaan oletusta siitä, että samankaltaisten sanojen vektoriesitysten välillä on lineaarinen suhde, joka on huomattavasti heikompi kuin translaatiopohjaisten mallien taustalla oleva oletus.', 'jv': 'Ingat kalah sampeyan kelompok perusahaan anyar politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Mbok ngomong alam iki, kita supoyo model sing tapi perusahaan resmi. Model sing isih basa ning tarjamahan, nguasai Gambar uwis nggambar kelas Nang model sekondi, awak dhéwé nggawe réaksyon linear bayesi nggawe ampuhi perusahaan karo perusahaan linear nggawe vector-perusahaan karo perusahaan kelangan kelangan gambar dhéwé, sing paling nggawe luwih akeh perusahaan model sing dibutuhke ditambah.', 'he': 'Given a set of instances of some relation, the relation induction task is to predict which other word pairs are likely to be related in the same way.  למרות שזה טבעי להשתמש בתכניות מילים למשימה הזאת, גישות סטנדרטיות מבוססות על תרגומות ווקטורים מסתברו לבצע רעות. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים שני דוגמנים מערכת יחסים סביריים. המודל הראשון מבוסס על תרגומות, אבל משתמש בגאוסים כדי למדל באופן ברור את ההתנהגות של התרגשות הללו ולקוד מחסומות רכות על המקור ומילות המטרה שאפשר לבחור. במודל השני, אנו משתמשים בגדרסיה לינרית בייסיאנית כדי לקוד את ההנחה שיש מערכת יחסים לינרית בין מייצגי הוקטור של מילים קשורות, אשר חלשה בהרבה מההניחוש שמבוסס על מודלים התרגום.', 'sk': 'Glede na niz primerov neke relacije je naloga indukcije relacij napovedati, kateri drugi par besed bodo verjetno povezani na enak način. Čeprav je za to opravilo naravno uporabljati vdelave besed, se standardni pristopi, ki temeljijo na vektorskih prevodih, izkažejo za slabo delovanje. Za reševanje tega vprašanja predlagamo dva modela indukcije verjetnostnih relacij. Prvi model temelji na prevodih, vendar uporablja gaussi za eksplicitno modeliranje variabilnosti teh prevodov in kodiranje mehkih omejitev na izvornih in ciljnih besedah, ki jih je mogoče izbrati. V drugem modelu uporabljamo bajezijsko linearno regresijo za kodiranje predpostavke, da obstaja linearna povezava med vektorskimi reprezentacijami sorodnih besed, ki je precej šibkejša od predpostavke, ki temeljijo na modelih prevajanja.', 'ha': "Gida wani misãlan masu husũma na wani abu, aikin muhimmanci yana iya ƙayyade wa'adi da wasu kalmõmi masu yiwuwa su yi haɗi da shi. Idan yana da amfani da tsarin maganar da ke fitarwa wa wannan aikin, za'a yi amfani da matsayin daidaita a kan fassarori masu sakan hanyor hanya, sai ya nuna don ya yi aiki daidai. Domin ka yi magana ga wannan masu al'amarin, za'a buƙata misãlai biyu masu yiwuwa da ake samu'a da shi. @ info: whatsthis Daga motsi na ƙari, za'a yi amfani da rajistan rawaya na Bayesian zuwa kodi da za'a yi zaton there wani danganci na danganta a tsakanin tsakanin masu dangantar maganar da ke yi danganta, wanda ya kasa rauni ne mafi ƙaranci daga zato da za'a ƙayyade misãlai a bakin fassarar.", 'bo': 'འབྲེལ་བ་གཞན་ཞིག་གི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ན། འབྲེལ་བ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དོན་དག་གང་འདྲ་ཞིག་དང་མི་འདྲ་བརྗོད་ཐུབ རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་བྱ་ཚིག་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག དོན་དག་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ན་ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་གྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་གཉིས་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། The first model is based on translations, but uses Gaussian to explicitly model the variability of these translations and to encode soft constraints on the source and target words that may be chosen. འདི་མིག་གཟུགས་གཉིས་པ་གིས་ངེད་ཚོར་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Contextual String Embeddings for Sequence Labeling', 'fr': "Embeddings de chaînes contextuels pour l'étiquetage des séquences", 'ar': 'تطعيمات السلسلة السياقية لوصف التسلسل', 'es': 'Incorporación de cadenas contextuales para el etiquetado de secuencias', 'pt': 'Incorporações de string contextuais para rotulagem de sequência', 'ja': 'シーケンスラベリングのためのコンテキスト文字列埋め込み', 'zh': '以序上下文字符串嵌之', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम लेबलिंग के लिए प्रासंगिक स्ट्रिंग एम्बेडिंग', 'ru': 'Контекстные строковые вставки для маркировки последовательностей', 'ga': 'Leabú Teaghrán Comhthéacsúil le haghaidh Lipéadú Seicheamh', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Kontextuális karakterlánc beágyazások a sorozatcímkézéshez', 'el': 'Ενσωματώσεις συμβολοσειράς περιβάλλοντος για επισήμανση ακολουθίας', 'it': "Incorporazioni di stringhe contestuali per l'etichettatura di sequenza", 'lt': 'Kontekstinės eilutės, skirtos sekos ženklinimui', 'kk': 'Тізбекті белгілеу үшін контексті жол ендіру', 'mk': 'Вклучувања на контекстни линии за ознака на секвенција', 'mn': 'Дараагийн лабораторийн тусламж', 'ms': 'Penjelmaan Rentetan Konteksual untuk Label Kelajuan', 'ml': 'സെക്കന്\u200dസ് ലാബിലിങ്ങിനുള്ള ഉള്ളിലുള്ള സ്ട്രിങ്ങ് എംബഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ Strings Kuntest għat-Tikkettar tas-Sewwenza', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'Kontekstualne integracije String za označavanje sekvence', 'pl': 'Kontekstowe osadzenia ciągów do etykietowania sekwencji', 'ro': 'Încorporarea șirurilor contextuale pentru etichetarea secvențelor', 'so': 'Heeganka String ee gudaha ah', 'sv': 'SammanhangsstrĂ¤nginbĂ¤ddningar fĂ¶r sekvensmĂ¤rkning', 'ta': 'வரிசையின் பாலிங்குக்கான உள்ளமைப்பு சரம் உட்பொதிகள்', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණ ලේබිලින් වෙනුවෙන් පරීක්ෂණ ස්ට්\u200dරින් ඇම්බෙඩින්ග්', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'Ảnh nền Chuỗi tương ứng cho nhãn dãy', 'uz': 'Ketma- ketlikni oʻchirish uchun kattalashtirish', 'nl': 'Contextuele tekenreeks insluitingen voor sequentie labeling', 'bg': 'Контекстни вграждания на низове за последователно етикетиране', 'da': 'Kontekstuelle strengindlejringer til sekvensmærkning', 'hr': 'Kontekstualne integracije teksta za označavanje sekvence', 'id': 'Embedding String Konteksual untuk Labeling Sequensi', 'sw': 'Mipango ya Mitandao ya Ndani kwa Kuzungumzia', 'de': 'Kontextuelle String-Einbettungen für die Sequenz-Beschriftung', 'fa': 'Comment', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Korniza Konteksuale për Etiketimin e Sekuencës', 'tr': 'Sonraki Etiketler üçin Metini Dolamak', 'hy': 'Հաջորդականության նշանների կոնտեքստային լարերի ներգրավումներ', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'bn': 'সেকেন্স ল্যাবিং এর জন্য বিদ্যমান স্ট্রীন স্ট্রিং এমবেডিং', 'ko': '시퀀스 태그에 대한 컨텍스트 문자열 포함', 'az': 'Sıradan Etilməsi üçün Kontext Tizgi İdxalışları', 'ca': 'Embeddings Contextual String for Sequence Labelling', 'cs': 'Kontextové vložení řetězců pro popisování sekvencí', 'et': 'J채rjekordade m채rgistamise kontekststringip천imimised', 'bs': 'Kontekstualne integracije strija za označavanje sekvence', 'fi': 'Sekvenssimerkinnän taustamerkkijonojen upotukset', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Vgradnje vsebinskih nizov za označevanje zaporedja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'תוכניות רשתות קונטקסטיות לטביעות רצף', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡི་གེ་མཚོན་རྟགས'}
{'en': 'Recent advances in language modeling using recurrent neural networks have made it viable to model language as distributions over characters. By learning to predict the next character on the basis of previous characters, such models have been shown to automatically internalize linguistic concepts such as words, sentences, subclauses and even sentiment. In this paper, we propose to leverage the internal states of a trained character language model to produce a novel type of word embedding which we refer to as contextual string embeddings. Our proposed embeddings have the distinct properties that they (a) are trained without any explicit notion of words and thus fundamentally model words as sequences of characters, and (b) are contextualized by their surrounding text, meaning that the same word will have different embeddings depending on its contextual use. We conduct a comparative evaluation against previous embeddings and find that our embeddings are highly useful for downstream tasks : across four classic sequence labeling tasks we consistently outperform the previous state-of-the-art. In particular, we significantly outperform previous work on English and German named entity recognition (NER), allowing us to report new state-of-the-art F1-scores on the CoNLL03 shared task. We release all code and pre-trained language models in a simple-to-use framework to the research community, to enable reproduction of these experiments and application of our proposed embeddings to other tasks : https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ar': 'جعلت التطورات الحديثة في نمذجة اللغة باستخدام الشبكات العصبية المتكررة من الممكن تصميم لغة كتوزيعات على الأحرف. من خلال تعلم التنبؤ بالحرف التالي على أساس الشخصيات السابقة ، فقد ثبت أن هذه النماذج تستوعب تلقائيًا المفاهيم اللغوية مثل الكلمات والجمل والجمل الفرعية وحتى المشاعر. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح الاستفادة من الحالات الداخلية لنموذج لغة شخصية مُدرَّب لإنتاج نوع جديد من تضمين الكلمات والذي نشير إليه بضمانات السلسلة السياقية. تتميز حفلات الزفاف المقترحة لدينا بخصائص مميزة وهي (أ) تم تدريبها دون أي فكرة صريحة للكلمات وبالتالي نموذج الكلمات بشكل أساسي كتسلسل من الأحرف ، و (ب) يتم وضعها في سياق النص المحيط بها ، مما يعني أن الكلمة نفسها سيكون لها زخارف مختلفة اعتمادًا على استخدامه السياقي. نجري تقييمًا مقارنًا مقابل حفلات الزفاف السابقة ووجدنا أن حفلات الزفاف لدينا مفيدة للغاية للمهام النهائية: عبر أربع مهام لوضع العلامات التسلسلية الكلاسيكية ، نتفوق باستمرار على أحدث التقنيات السابقة. على وجه الخصوص ، لقد تفوقنا بشكل كبير على العمل السابق على التعرف على الكيانات المسمى باللغة الإنجليزية والألمانية (NER) ، مما يسمح لنا بالإبلاغ عن أحدث درجات F1 في المهمة المشتركة CoNLL03. نقوم بإصدار جميع الرموز ونماذج اللغة المدربة مسبقًا في إطار عمل سهل الاستخدام لمجتمع البحث ، لتمكين إعادة إنتاج هذه التجارب وتطبيق حفلات الزفاف المقترحة لدينا على الآخرين.\nالمهام: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'es': 'Los avances recientes en el modelado del lenguaje mediante redes neuronales recurrentes han hecho viable modelar el lenguaje como distribuciones sobre caracteres. Al aprender a predecir el siguiente personaje sobre la base de los caracteres anteriores, se ha demostrado que estos modelos internalizan automáticamente conceptos lingüísticos como palabras, oraciones, subcláusulas e incluso el sentimiento. En este artículo, proponemos aprovechar los estados internos de un modelo de lenguaje de caracteres entrenado para producir un tipo novedoso de incrustación de palabras que denominamos incrustaciones de cadenas contextuales. Nuestras incorporaciones propuestas tienen las propiedades distintivas de que (a) están entrenadas sin ninguna noción explícita de palabras y, por lo tanto, modelan fundamentalmente las palabras como secuencias de caracteres, y (b) están contextualizadas por el texto que la rodea, lo que significa que la misma palabra tendrá diferentes incrustaciones según su uso contextual. Llevamos a cabo una evaluación comparativa con las incorporaciones anteriores y descubrimos que nuestras incrustaciones son muy útiles para las tareas posteriores: en cuatro tareas clásicas de etiquetado de secuencias, superamos sistemáticamente el estado de la técnica anterior. En particular, superamos significativamente el trabajo anterior sobre el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) en inglés y alemán, lo que nos permite reportar nuevos puntajes F1 de última generación en la tarea compartida de ConLL03. Publicamos todo el código y los modelos de lenguaje previamente entrenados en un marco fácil de usar para la comunidad de investigación, para permitir la reproducción de estos experimentos y la aplicación de nuestras incorporaciones propuestas a otros\ntareas: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ja': '最近の再帰ニューラルネットワークを用いた言語モデリングの進歩により、文字を超える分布として言語をモデル化することが可能になった。 前の文字に基づいて次の文字を予測することを学ぶことによって、そのようなモデルは、単語、文章、サブクローズ、さらには感情などの言語学的概念を自動的に内面化することが示されている。 本稿では、訓練された文字言語モデルの内部状態を活用して、文脈文字列埋め込みと呼ばれる新規のタイプの単語埋め込みを生成することを提案する。 私たちの提案された埋め込みには、（ a ）単語の明示的な概念なしにトレーニングされ、したがって、単語を文字のシーケンスとして根本的にモデル化すること、および（ b ）その周囲のテキストによってコンテキスト化されること、つまり、同じ単語がそのコンテキストの使用に応じて異なる埋め込みを持つことを意味するという、明確な性質があります。 私たちは、以前の埋め込みとの比較評価を行い、埋め込みがダウンストリームタスクに非常に有用であることを発見しました。4つの古典的なシーケンスラベリングタスクで、私たちは常に以前の最先端のタスクを上回っています。 特に、私たちは、英語とドイツ語の名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）に関する以前の作業を大幅に上回り、CoNLL 03共有タスクの最新のF 1スコアを報告することができます。 私たちは、これらの実験の再現と他の実験への組み込み提案の適用を可能にするために、すべてのコードおよび事前にトレーニングされた言語モデルを、簡単に使用できるフレームワークで研究コミュニティにリリースします\nタスク: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'pt': 'Avanços recentes na modelagem de linguagem usando redes neurais recorrentes tornaram viável modelar a linguagem como distribuições sobre caracteres. Ao aprender a prever o próximo caractere com base em caracteres anteriores, esses modelos demonstraram internalizar automaticamente conceitos linguísticos, como palavras, frases, subcláusulas e até sentimentos. Neste artigo, propomos alavancar os estados internos de um modelo de linguagem de caracteres treinados para produzir um novo tipo de incorporação de palavras que chamamos de incorporação de strings contextuais. Nossos embeddings propostos têm as propriedades distintas de que (a) são treinados sem qualquer noção explícita de palavras e, portanto, modelam fundamentalmente palavras como sequências de caracteres, e (b) são contextualizados pelo texto circundante, o que significa que a mesma palavra terá diferentes embeddings dependendo do seu uso contextual. Conduzimos uma avaliação comparativa em relação a incorporações anteriores e descobrimos que nossas incorporações são altamente úteis para tarefas de downstream: em quatro tarefas clássicas de rotulagem de sequência, superamos consistentemente o estado da arte anterior. Em particular, superamos significativamente o trabalho anterior em reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) em inglês e alemão, permitindo-nos relatar novas pontuações F1 de última geração na tarefa compartilhada CoNLL03. Liberamos todos os códigos e modelos de linguagem pré-treinados em uma estrutura simples de usar para a comunidade de pesquisa, para permitir a reprodução desses experimentos e a aplicação de nossos embeddings propostos a outros\ntarefas: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'fr': "Les récents progrès dans la modélisation du langage utilisant des réseaux neuronaux récurrents ont rendu viable la modélisation du langage sous forme de distributions sur des caractères. En apprenant à prédire le personnage suivant sur la base des caractères précédents, il a été démontré que de tels modèles internalisaient automatiquement des concepts linguistiques tels que les mots, les phrases, les sous-clauses et même les sentiments. Dans cet article, nous proposons de tirer parti des états internes d'un modèle de langage de caractères entraîné pour produire un nouveau type d'incorporation de mots que nous appelons intégration de chaînes contextuelles. Les intégrations que nous proposons ont les propriétés distinctes suivantes\xa0: (a) elles sont entraînées sans aucune notion explicite de mots et modélisent donc fondamentalement les mots comme des séquences de caractères, et (b) sont contextualisées par leur texte environnant, ce qui signifie qu'un même mot aura des intégrations différentes en fonction de son utilisation contextuelle. Nous effectuons une évaluation comparative par rapport aux intégrations précédentes et constatons que nos intégrations sont très utiles pour les tâches en aval\xa0: pour quatre tâches d'étiquetage de séquences classiques, nous surpassons constamment les performances de pointe précédentes. En particulier, nous surpassons de manière significative les travaux précédents sur la reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) en anglais et en allemand, ce qui nous permet de signaler de nouveaux scores F1 de pointe sur la tâche partagée ConLL03. Nous publions tous les codes et modèles de langage préformés dans un cadre simple à utiliser pour la communauté de recherche, afin de permettre la reproduction de ces expériences et l'application de nos intégrations proposées à d'autres\ntâches\xa0: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair", 'zh': '用递归神经网络言建模者最新进展使建模书符可行也。 以学前符为字符,已验自内化语言,如单词句,子句至情。 于本文中,建议以训练字符语言模样内形,以成新词嵌入,谓之上下文字符串嵌。 臣等所陈异性,(a)教习无明单词,故从根本上将单词建模为符序,而(b)上下文本,同一单词将随其上下文用不同者。 与前所嵌较较,见吾辈嵌于下流甚有用:于四经序标记,终优前最先进之物。 英语、德语名实识(NER)明优于前事,使得告新于CoNLL03F1之分。 凡易用之框架,布诸代码、豫教之语,以复制其实验而用之于他\n任,https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'hi': 'आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके भाषा मॉडलिंग में हाल की प्रगति ने इसे पात्रों पर वितरण के रूप में भाषा को मॉडल करने के लिए व्यवहार्य बना दिया है। पिछले पात्रों के आधार पर अगले चरित्र की भविष्यवाणी करना सीखकर, ऐसे मॉडलों को भाषाई अवधारणाओं जैसे शब्दों, वाक्यों, उप-दृश्यों और यहां तक कि भावनाओं को स्वचालित रूप से आंतरिक बनाने के लिए दिखाया गया है। इस पेपर में, हम एक प्रशिक्षित चरित्र भाषा मॉडल के आंतरिक राज्यों का लाभ उठाने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं ताकि एक उपन्यास प्रकार के शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उत्पादन किया जा सके जिसे हम प्रासंगिक स्ट्रिंग एम्बेडिंग के रूप में संदर्भित करते हैं। हमारे प्रस्तावित एम्बेडिंग में अलग-अलग गुण हैं कि वे (ए) शब्दों की किसी भी स्पष्ट धारणा के बिना प्रशिक्षित होते हैं और इस प्रकार मूल रूप से पात्रों के अनुक्रमों के रूप में शब्दों को मॉडल करते हैं, और (बी) उनके आसपास के पाठ द्वारा संदर्भित होते हैं, जिसका अर्थ है कि एक ही शब्द में इसके प्रासंगिक उपयोग के आधार पर अलग-अलग एम्बेडिंग होंगे। हम पिछले एम्बेडिंग के खिलाफ एक तुलनात्मक मूल्यांकन करते हैं और पाते हैं कि हमारे एम्बेडिंग डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के लिए अत्यधिक उपयोगी हैं: चार क्लासिक अनुक्रम लेबलिंग कार्यों में हम लगातार पिछले राज्य-कला से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम अंग्रेजी और जर्मन नामित इकाई मान्यता (एनईआर) पर पिछले काम को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाते हैं, जिससे हमें CoNLL03 साझा कार्य पर नए अत्याधुनिक F1-स्कोर की रिपोर्ट करने की अनुमति मिलती है। हम अनुसंधान समुदाय के लिए एक सरल-से-उपयोग ढांचे में सभी कोड और पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित भाषा मॉडल जारी करते हैं, ताकि इन प्रयोगों के प्रजनन और अन्य के लिए हमारे प्रस्तावित एम्बेडिंग के आवेदन को सक्षम किया जा सके।\nकार्य: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ru': 'Недавние достижения в языковом моделировании с использованием рекуррентных нейронных сетей сделали его жизнеспособным для моделирования языка как распределения по символам. Научившись предсказывать следующий символ на основе предыдущих символов, такие модели автоматически интернализируют лингвистические понятия, такие как слова, предложения, подпараграфы и даже настроения. В этой статье мы предлагаем использовать внутренние состояния обученной языковой модели символов для создания нового типа вложения слов, который мы называем контекстными строковыми вложениями. Наши предлагаемые вложения обладают отличительными свойствами, что они (а) обучаются без какого-либо явного понимания слов и, таким образом, принципиально моделируют слова как последовательности символов, и (б) контекстуализируются их окружающим текстом, что означает, что одно и то же слово будет иметь разные вложения в зависимости от его контекстуального использования. Мы проводим сравнительную оценку по сравнению с предыдущими вложениями и обнаруживаем, что наши вставки очень полезны для последующих задач: во всех четырех классических задачах маркировки последовательностей мы последовательно превосходим предыдущий уровень техники. В частности, мы значительно превосходим предыдущую работу по распознаванию сущностей на английском и немецком языках (NER), что позволяет нам сообщать о новых современных показателях F1 по общей задаче CoNLL03. Мы выпускаем все коды и предварительно обученные языковые модели в простой в использовании форме для исследовательского сообщества, чтобы обеспечить воспроизведение этих экспериментов и применение наших предлагаемых вложений к другим\nзадачи: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar dhul chun cinn le déanaí i samhaltú teanga ag baint úsáide as líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha tá sé inmharthana teanga a shamhaltú mar dháileacháin thar charachtair. Trí fhoghlaim conas an chéad charachtar eile a thuar ar bhonn na gcarachtar roimhe seo, léiríodh go n-inmheánaíonn samhlacha den sórt sin coincheapa teangeolaíocha amhail focail, abairtí, fochlásail agus fiú meon. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé beartaithe againn stáit inmheánacha mhúnla teanga oilte carachtair a ghiaráil chun cineál nua de leabú focal a tháirgeadh a dtagraíonn muid mar leabú teaghrán comhthéacsúla. Tá na hairíonna ar leith ag ár leabú molta go (a) go ndéantar iad a oiliúint gan aon nóisean follasach focal agus mar sin go bunúsach múnlaítear focail mar sheichimh de charachtair, agus (b) go ndéantar iad a chomhthéacsú ag an téacs mórthimpeall orthu, rud a chiallaíonn go mbeidh leabaithe éagsúla ag an bhfocal céanna. ag brath ar a úsáid chomhthéacsúil. Déanaimid meastóireacht chomparáideach i gcoinne leabú roimhe seo agus feicimid go bhfuil ár leabú an-úsáideach le haghaidh tascanna iartheachtacha: thar cheithre thasc lipéadaithe seichimh chlasaiceach is fearr linn go seasta ná an úrscothacht roimhe seo. Go háirithe, táimid i bhfad níos fearr ná an obair a rinneadh roimhe seo ar aitheantas aonáin ainmnithe i mBéarla agus i nGearmáinis (NER), rud a ligeann dúinn scóir F1 nua-aimseartha a thuairisciú ar thasc comhroinnte CoNLL03. Scaoilimid gach cód agus múnla teanga réamh-oilte i gcreat simplí le húsáid don phobal taighde, chun atáirgeadh na dturgnaimh seo a chumasú agus ár leabaithe molta a chur i bhfeidhm i réimsí eile.\ntascanna: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'it': "I recenti progressi nella modellazione del linguaggio utilizzando reti neurali ricorrenti hanno reso possibile modellare il linguaggio come distribuzioni sui caratteri. Imparando a prevedere il personaggio successivo sulla base dei caratteri precedenti, tali modelli hanno dimostrato di interiorizzare automaticamente concetti linguistici come parole, frasi, sottoclause e persino sentiment. In questo articolo, proponiamo di sfruttare gli stati interni di un modello di linguaggio dei caratteri addestrato per produrre un nuovo tipo di embedding di parole che chiamiamo embedding di stringhe contestuali. Le nostre incorporazioni proposte hanno le proprietà distinte che (a) sono addestrate senza alcuna nozione esplicita di parole e quindi fondamentalmente modellano le parole come sequenze di caratteri, e (b) sono contestualizzate dal testo circostante, il che significa che la stessa parola avrà incorporazioni diverse a seconda del suo uso contestuale. Conduciamo una valutazione comparativa rispetto alle precedenti incorporazioni e scopriamo che le nostre incorporazioni sono molto utili per le attività a valle: attraverso quattro classiche attività di etichettatura delle sequenze superiamo costantemente le precedenti state-of-the-art. In particolare, abbiamo superato significativamente i precedenti lavori sul riconoscimento delle entità nominate inglese e tedesco (NER), consentendoci di segnalare nuovi punteggi F1 all'avanguardia sul compito condiviso CoNLL03. Rilasciamo tutti i codici e i modelli linguistici pre-formati in un framework semplice da usare alla comunità di ricerca, per consentire la riproduzione di questi esperimenti e l'applicazione dei nostri embedding proposti ad altri\ncompiti: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair", 'ka': 'მიმდინარე ენის მოდელირებაში გამოყენებული რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელების გამოყენებაში მოდელური ენის მოდელურად გამოყენება, როგორც სიმბოლოების გარეშე წინა სიმბოლოების ბაზაზე შემდეგი სიმბოლოების შესაბამისად ასეთი მოდელები აჩვენებულია, რომ ავტომატურად ინტერნელიზომისტიკური კონცეტები, როგორც სიტყვები, სიტყვები, სბუ ამ გვერდიში ჩვენ მინდომარებთ, რომ შესწავლობული სიტყვის მოდელის ინტერესტური სტატურების მოდულის გამოყენება, რომელიც ჩვენ შევხედავთ, როგორც კონტექსტური სიტყვის შემდეგ. ჩვენი წარმოიდგინეთ სიტყვების განსხვავებული შესახებ აქვს, რომელიც a) სიტყვების განსხვავებული შესახებ არსებობს და ამიტომ ფუნდამეტურად მოდელური სიტყვები, როგორც სიტყვების განსხვავებული სიტყვები, და b) იქნება შესახებ შესახებ ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ კომპორატიური განსაზღვრება წინ შემდეგ და ვიფიქრობთ, რომ ჩვენი შემდეგ კომპორატიური დავალებისთვის ძალიან გამოიყენებელია: ოთხი კლასიკური განსაზღვრებული დავალებისთვის ჩვენ წინ შე განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ მნიშვნელოვანია წინა სამუშაო ანგლისური და გერმანური სახელსაწყისათვის განაცნობა (NER) დაგვიძლია ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ახალი სახელსაწყისათვის F1-scores CoNLL03 ჩვენ ყველა კოდის და წინასწარმოადგენებული ენის მოდელების გამოყენება მარტივი გამოყენებელი ფრამეტრებში სწავლის საზოგადოებაში, რომ ამ ექსპერიმენტების გამოყენება და ჩვენი მოძლ\nდავალება: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στη γλωσσική μοντελοποίηση χρησιμοποιώντας επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα έχουν καταστήσει εφικτό να μοντελοποιήσουμε τη γλώσσα ως διανομές πάνω από χαρακτήρες. Μαθαίνοντας να προβλέπουν τον επόμενο χαρακτήρα με βάση προηγούμενους χαρακτήρες, αυτά τα μοντέλα έχουν αποδειχθεί ότι εσωτερικεύουν αυτόματα γλωσσικές έννοιες όπως λέξεις, προτάσεις, υποκλέψεις, ακόμη και συναισθήματα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε να αξιοποιήσουμε τις εσωτερικές καταστάσεις ενός εκπαιδευμένου μοντέλου γλώσσας χαρακτήρων για να παραγάγουμε έναν νέο τύπο ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων που αναφερόμαστε ως ενσωμάτωση συμβολοσειρών στο πλαίσιο. Οι προτεινόμενες ενσωματώσεις μας έχουν τις διακριτές ιδιότητες ότι (α) εκπαιδεύονται χωρίς καμία ρητή έννοια λέξεων και ως εκ τούτου μοντελοποιούν τις λέξεις ως ακολουθίες χαρακτήρων, και (β) ενσωματώνονται στο πλαίσιο του περιβάλλοντος κειμένου τους, πράγμα που σημαίνει ότι η ίδια λέξη θα έχει διαφορετικές ενσωματώσεις ανάλογα με τη χρήση του περιβάλλοντος. Πραγματοποιούμε μια συγκριτική αξιολόγηση σε σχέση με προηγούμενες ενσωματώσεις και διαπιστώνουμε ότι οι ενσωματώσεις μας είναι ιδιαίτερα χρήσιμες για μεταγενέστερες εργασίες: σε τέσσερις κλασικές εργασίες επισήμανσης ακολουθίας ξεπερνάμε σταθερά την προηγούμενη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Ειδικότερα, ξεπερνάμε σημαντικά τις προηγούμενες εργασίες σχετικά με την αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων στην αγγλική και γερμανική γλώσσα, επιτρέποντας μας να αναφέρουμε νέες βαθμολογίες τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για την κοινή εργασία του CoNLL03. Απελευθερώνουμε όλο τον κώδικα και τα προ-εκπαιδευμένα γλωσσικά μοντέλα σε ένα απλό στη χρήση πλαίσιο στην ερευνητική κοινότητα, για να επιτρέψουμε την αναπαραγωγή αυτών των πειραμάτων και την εφαρμογή των προτεινόμενων ενσωμάτωσής μας σε άλλα μέρη.\nκαθήκοντα: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'hu': 'A visszatérő neurális hálózatok használatával kapcsolatos nyelvmodellezés legutóbbi előrelépései lehetővé tették a nyelv modellezését karakterek feletti eloszlásként. Azáltal, hogy megtanulták megjósolni a következő karaktert a korábbi karakterek alapján, az ilyen modellek megmutatták, hogy automatikusan interiorizálják a nyelvi fogalmakat, mint a szavak, mondatok, alklauzek és akár az érzelmek. Ebben a tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy egy képzett karakter nyelvi modell belső állapotát kihasználjuk egy új típusú szóbeágyazás létrehozására, amelyet kontextuális karakterlánc beágyazásnak nevezünk. Javasolt beágyazásaink különböző tulajdonságokkal rendelkeznek, hogy (a) a szavak kifejezett fogalma nélkül képezik őket, és ezáltal alapvetően karaktersorozatként modellezik a szavakat, és (b) kontextusba helyezik a környező szöveget, ami azt jelenti, hogy ugyanannak a szónak a kontextuális használatától függően különböző beágyazásai lesznek. Összehasonlító értékelést végzünk a korábbi beágyazásokkal szemben, és úgy találjuk, hogy beágyazásaink rendkívül hasznosak a downstream feladatokhoz: négy klasszikus sorozatcímkézési feladat során következetesen felülmúljuk a korábbi korszerűséget. Különösen az angol és német elnevezett entitás elismerésével kapcsolatos korábbi munkákat (NER) jelentősen felülmúltuk, lehetővé téve számunkra, hogy új, korszerű F1-pontszámokat jelentsünk a CoNLL03 megosztott feladaton. Minden kódot és előre képzett nyelvi modellt egyszerűen használható keretrendszerben bocsátunk ki a kutatóközösség számára, hogy lehetővé tegyük ezen kísérletek reprodukálását és javasolt beágyazásaink alkalmazását más területekre.\nfeladatok: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'kk': 'Қайталанған невралды желілерді қолдану үшін тілдерді моделдеу үшін жаңа жағдайларды таңбалар бойынша тарату үшін тілді үлгілеу мүмкіндігі болады. Алдыңғы таңбалардың негізінде келесі таңбаны таңдау үшін, бұл үлгілер сөздер, сөздер, субклауз және сенімдер секілді лингвистикалық концепттерді автоматты түрде интернетализациялау үшін көрсетілді. Бұл қағаздың ішкі күйін таңбалар тіл үлгісінің ішкі күйін жасау үшін біз мәтіндік жолдардың ендіру түрін жасау үшін ұсынамыз. Біздің келтірілген ендіруіміздің қасиеттері (a) сөздердің түсінікті түсінікті түсінікті емес, сондықтан негізгі түсінікті сөздердің таңбалар ретінде үлгіледі, және (b) мәтіндердің орналасқан мәтіндеріне тәртіпті болады, мәлімет Біз алдыңғы ендіргендерге сәйкестік оқиға жасап, ендіргендеріміз төменгі тапсырмалар үшін көп пайдалы болып табылады: төрт классикалық реттеу тапсырмаларында біз алдыңғы орындау күйіне арналған. Мысалы, біз ағылшын және неміс аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) үшін алдыңғы жұмыс істеп, CoNLL03 ортақ тапсырмасына жаңа істеу F1- нұсқаларды жөндеуге мүмкіндік береміз. Біз барлық код және алдын- ала оқылған тіл үлгілерін зерттеу коммуникасына қарапайым қолданатын қоршауы үшін, осы тәжірибелерді қайталау және қолданған қолданбаларымызды басқаларға қолд\nтапсырмалар: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'lt': 'Naujausi kalbų modeliavimo pažanga naudojant pakartotinius nervinius tinklus suteikė galimybę modeliuoti kalbą kaip simbolių paskirstymą. By learning to predict the next character on the basis of previous characters, such models have been shown to automatically internalize linguistic concepts such as words, sentences, subclauses and even sentiment.  In this paper, we propose to leverage the internal states of a trained character language model to produce a novel type of word embedding which we refer to as contextual string embeddings.  Mūsų siūlomi įterpimai turi skirtingas savybes, kad a) jie mokomi be jokios aiškios žodžių sąvokos, taigi iš esmės modeliuojami žodžiai kaip simbolių sekos, ir b) juos supa aplinkinis tekstas, tai reiškia, kad tas pats žodis turės skirtingas įterpimas priklausomai nuo jo kontekstinio naudojimo. Atliekame lyginamąjį vertinimą su ankstesniais įterpimais ir nustatome, kad mūsų įterpimai yra labai naudingi tolesnėms užduotims: per keturias klasikines sekos ženklinimo užduotis nuosekliai vykdome ankstesnę pažangiausią padėtį. Visų pirma mes gerokai viršijame ankstesnį darbą dėl anglų ir vokiečių vardu pažymėtų subjektų pripažinimo (NER), leidžiant mums pranešti apie naujausius pažangiausius F1 rezultatus dėl bendros CoNLL03 užduoties. Mokslininkų bendruomenei skelbiame visus kodus ir iš anksto apmokytus kalbų modelius paprasta naudojimosi sistema, kad būtų galima šių eksperimentų reprodukcija ir mūsų siūlomų medžiagų taikymas kitoms\nužduotys: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните напредоци во моделирањето на јазиците користејќи рецидентни нервни мрежи го направија достапно моделирањето на јазикот како дистрибуција преку знаци. Со учењето да го предвиде следниот карактер врз основа на претходните карактери, ваквите модели се покажаа дека автоматски ги интернализираат јазичните концепти како што се зборовите, речениците, подклаузите и дури и чувството. Во овој весник, предлагаме да ги искористиме внатрешните состојби на обучен јазик на карактери за да произведеме нов тип на зборови вградени кои ние ги нарекуваме контекстни вградувања на линии. Нашите предложени вградувања имаат различни сопствености дека (a) се тренирани без никаква експлицитна идеја на зборови и со тоа фундаментално моделирани зборови како секвенци на знаци, и (b) се контекстулизирани од нивниот околни текст, што значи дека истиот збор ќе има различни вградувања во зависност од неговата контекстуална употреба Правиме споредба со претходните вградувања и откриваме дека нашите вградувања се многу корисни за понатамошните задачи: преку четири класични задачи за означување на секвенца постојано ги надминуваме претходните најнови. Особено, значително ја надминуваме претходната работа на англиското и германското препознавање на ентитетите (НЕР), што ни овозможува да известиме нови најсовремени резултати на Ф1 за заедничката задача на CoNLL03. Ги ослободуваме сите кодови и предобучени јазички модели во едноставна рамка за употреба на истражувачката заедница, за да овозможиме репродукција на овие експерименти и апликација на нашите предложени вложувања на други\nзадачи: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ms': 'Kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam pemodelan bahasa menggunakan rangkaian saraf berulang telah membuatnya mudah untuk model bahasa sebagai distribusi atas aksara. Dengan belajar untuk meramalkan aksara berikutnya berdasarkan aksara sebelumnya, model tersebut telah dipaparkan untuk secara automatik memasukkan konsep bahasa seperti perkataan, kalimat, subklasa dan walaupun sentimen. In this paper, we propose to leverage the internal states of a trained character language model to produce a novel type of word embedding which we refer to as contextual string embeddings.  Pencampuran yang kami cadangkan mempunyai ciri-ciri yang berbeza bahawa mereka (a) dilatih tanpa sebarang pengertian jelas perkataan dan oleh itu pada dasarnya perkataan model sebagai urutan aksara, dan (b) dikonteksualisasi oleh teks sekeliling mereka, bermakna bahawa perkataan yang sama akan mempunyai penyampatan berbeza bergantung pada penggunaan kontekstual. Kami melakukan penilaian perbandingan terhadap penyembedding terdahulu dan mencari bahawa penyembedding kami sangat berguna untuk tugas turun: melalui empat tugas jujukan klasik kami secara konsisten melampaui keadaan-kemajuan terdahulu. Secara khususnya, kami melampaui batas kerja terdahulu pada pengenalan entiti bernama Inggeris dan Jerman (NER), membolehkan kami melaporkan skor F1 baru pada tugas kongsi CoNLL03. Kami melepaskan semua kod dan model bahasa yang dilatih-dilatih dalam kerangka mudah-untuk-digunakan untuk komuniti kajian, untuk memungkinkan reproduksi eksperimen ini dan aplikasi penerbangan yang kami cadangkan kepada yang lain\ntugas: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ml': 'ആവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയില്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള മുന്\u200dഗണന മുന്\u200dഗണനം അതിനെ മ മുമ്പുള്ള അക്ഷരങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d അടുത്ത അക്ഷരത്തെ പ്രവചിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d സ്വയം വാക്കുകള്\u200d, വാക്ക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശീലനിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ ഭാഷ മോഡലിന്റെ ആന്തരിക സ്ഥാനങ്ങള്\u200d പുലര്\u200dത്താന്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. ഒര Our proposed embeddings have the distinct properties that they (a) are trained without any explicit notion of words and thus fundamentally model words as sequences of characters, and (b) are contextualized by their surrounding text, meaning that the same word will have different embeddings depending on its contextual use.  നമ്മള്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കെതിരെ തുല്യമായ വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു എന്നിട്ട് നമ്മുടെ അകത്തുനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് വളരെ ഉപയോഗമുണ്ടെന്ന് കണ്ടെ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d മുമ്പ് ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലും പേരുള്ള സാക്ഷ്യം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിലും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയില്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്ക നമ്മള്\u200d എല്ലാ കോഡും മുമ്പ് പരിശീലന ഭാഷ മോഡലുകളും എളുപ്പമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമോളുകളിലേക്ക് വിടുന്നു. ഈ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പുതുക്കുവാ\nജോലി: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'mt': 'L-avvanzi reċenti fl-immudellar tal-lingwi bl-użu ta’ netwerks newrali rikorrenti għamluha vijabbli li l-lingwa tiġi mmudellara bħala distribuzzjonijiet fuq karattri. Billi jitgħallmu jipprevedu l-karattru li jmiss abbażi ta’ karattri preċedenti, dawn il-mudelli ntwerew li awtomatikament jinternalizzaw kunċetti lingwistiċi bħall-kliem, is-sentenzi, is-sottoklawżi u saħansitra s-sentiment. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu li ninfurzaw l-istati interni ta’ mudell ta’ lingwa tal-karattru mħarreġ biex jipproduċu tip ġdid ta’ inkorporazzjoni ta’ kliem li nirreferu għalihom bħala inkorporazzjoni ta’ strings kuntestwali. Our proposed embeddings have the distinct properties that they (a) are trained without any explicit notion of words and thus fundamentally model words as sequences of characters, and (b) are contextualized by their surrounding text, meaning that the same word will have different embeddings depending on its contextual use.  Aħna nagħmlu evalwazzjoni komparattiva kontra l-inkorporazzjonijiet preċedenti u nsibu li l-inkorporazzjonijiet tagħna huma utli ħafna għall-kompiti downstream: matul erba’ kompiti ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza klassika a ħna b’mod konsistenti twettaq l-aktar avvanzati preċedenti. B’mod partikolari, aħna qed nagħmlu xogħol preċedenti b’mod sinifikanti fuq ir-rikonoxximent tal-entità bl-Ingliż u l-Ġermaniż (NER), li jippermettilna nirrappurtaw punteġġi ġodda tal-aħħar F1 dwar il-kompitu kondiviż CoNLL03. Aħna nirrilaxxaw il-kodiċi kollha u l-mudelli lingwistiċi mħarrġa minn qabel f’qafas sempliċi għall-użu lill-komunità tar-riċerka, biex jippermettu r-riproduzzjoni ta’ dawn l-esperimenti u l-applikazzjoni tal-inkorporazzjonijiet proposti tagħna għal oħrajn\nkompiti: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'pl': 'Ostatnie postępy w modelowaniu językowym za pomocą powtarzających się sieci neuronowych sprawiły, że możliwe jest modelowanie języka jako rozkładów na znakach. Naucząc się przewidywać następny znak na podstawie poprzednich znaków, takie modele okazały się automatycznie internalizować pojęcia językowe, takie jak słowa, zdania, podklady, a nawet sentymenty. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wykorzystanie stanów wewnętrznych trenowanego modelu języka znaków do stworzenia nowego rodzaju osadzenia słów, które nazywamy kontekstowymi osadzeniami ciągów. Nasze proponowane osadzenia mają wyraźne właściwości, że (a) są trenowane bez żadnego wyraźnego pojęcia słów i tym samym fundamentalnie modelują słowa jako sekwencje znaków, a (b) są kontekstualizowane przez otaczający tekst, co oznacza, że to samo słowo będzie miało różne osadzenia w zależności od jego kontekstowego użycia. Przeprowadzamy ocenę porównawczą z wcześniejszymi osadzeniami i stwierdzamy, że nasze osadzenia są bardzo przydatne do dalszych zadań: w przypadku czterech klasycznych zadań etykietowania sekwencji konsekwentnie przewyższamy poprzednie najnowocześniejsze. W szczególności znacznie przewyższamy poprzednie prace nad rozpoznawaniem angielskich i niemieckich nazwanych entit (NER), co pozwala nam zgłaszać nowe najnowocześniejsze wyniki F1 na wspólnym zadaniu CoNLL03. Wszystkie kody i wstępnie przeszkolone modele językowe w prostym w użyciu frameworku udostępniamy społeczności badawczej, aby umożliwić reprodukcję tych eksperymentów i zastosowanie proponowanych osadzeń do innych\nzadania: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'mn': 'Дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээг ашиглан хэл загварын хөгжлийн хөгжлийг хүмүүсийн хуваарилалтын хуваарилалт болгон загварчлах боломжтой болгодог. Дараагийн дүрсийг нь өмнөх дүрсийн үндсэн байгууллагын тулд суралцаж, ийм загварууд нь хэл, өгүүлбэрүүд, субблокууд болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийг автоматжуулахад харагдсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид сургалтын хүний хэл загварын дотоод байр сургалтын загварын дотоод байр сургалтын тухай шинэ хэлбэрийг бий болгохыг санал болгодог. Бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн орнуудын өөр өөр өөр өөрчлөлтийг (a) нь үгийн тухай тодорхой ойлголтыгүйгээр суралцах боломжтой. Тэгэхээр үндсэн үг нь дүрсийн дарааллын дарааллаар загварчлагдсан бөгөөд (b) нь тэдний эргэн тойрны текстэй дамжуулагдсан бөгөөд тэр үг ижил Бид өмнө дамжуулалтын эсрэг харьцуулалтын үнэлгээ хийж, бидний дамжуулалтын дамжуулалтын тулд маш хэрэгтэй гэдгийг олж мэднэ: 4 дамжуулалтын дараа бид өмнө урлагийн дамжуулалтын тулд үргэлжилдэг. Ялангуяа, бид Англи болон Германы нэрлэгдсэн бүтээлүүдийн хүлээн зөвшөөрөл (НЕР) тухай өмнө ажилдаа илүү чухал ажил гаргаж чадна. CoNLL03-ын хуваалтын ажил дээр шинэ урлагийн F1-тоо өгөх боломжтой Бид бүх код болон сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэл загваруудыг судалгааны нийгэмд энгийн хэрэглэх хэлбэрээр, эдгээр туршилтуудын үржигдэх болон өөрсдийн сургалтын үйлдвэрлэлүүдийг бусад хүмүүст ашиглан\nдаалгавар: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'no': 'Nyleg foregåver i språk- modellering med gjentakelige neuralnettverk har gjort det mogleg å modellere språk som distribusjonar over teikn. Ved å læra å forhåndsvisa neste teikn på grunnlag av førre teikn, har slike modeller vist for å automatisk internalisere språkkoppsett som ord, setningar, underklausar og til og med sentiment. I denne papiret foreslår vi å levera interne tilstandane i eit trengte teiknspråsmodul for å produsera ein novel type ord innebygging som vi refererer til som kontekst- streng innebygging. Våre foreslått innbygging har dei eigenskapane at dei (a) vert trenta utan nokon ekspliskt notis om ord, og dermed fundamentalt modeller ord som rekkjefølgjer av teikn, og b) vert kontekstualisert av omgivnande tekst, som betyr at det same ordet vil ha ulike innbygging avhengig av kontekstalt bruk. Vi gjer ei sammenlignbare evaluering mot førre innbygging og finn at innbygginga våre er veldig nyttig for nedstrekkoppgåver: over fire klassiske sekvens som merker oppgåver vi konsekvent utfører den førre tilstanden av kunsten. I særskilt utfører vi tidlegare arbeid på engelsk og tysk gjenkjenning av entitetet (NER), som tillater oss å rapportera nye tilstand-av-kunsten F1-scorer på delt oppgåve CoNLL03. Vi løyser alle kode- og føretrainerte språk- modeller i eit enkelt- for bruk- rammeverk til forskningssamfunnet, for å aktivera reproduksjon av desse eksperimentene og bruk av våre foreslått innbygging til andre\noppgåver: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ro': 'Progresele recente în modelarea limbajului folosind rețele neurale recurente au făcut viabilă modelarea limbajului ca distribuții peste caractere. Prin învățarea de a prezice următorul personaj pe baza caracterelor anterioare, astfel de modele au fost demonstrate pentru a internaliza automat concepte lingvistice precum cuvinte, propoziții, sublauze și chiar sentiment. În această lucrare, propunem să valorificăm stările interne ale unui model de limbaj de caractere instruit pentru a produce un tip nou de încorporare de cuvinte pe care îl numim încorporarea de șiruri contextuale. Încorporările noastre propuse au proprietățile distincte că (a) sunt instruite fără nicio noțiune explicită de cuvinte și astfel modelează fundamental cuvintele ca secvențe de caractere, și (b) sunt contextualizate de textul lor înconjurător, ceea ce înseamnă că același cuvânt va avea încorporări diferite în funcție de utilizarea sa contextuală. Realizăm o evaluare comparativă în raport cu încorporările anterioare și constatăm că încorporările noastre sunt extrem de utile pentru activitățile din aval: în cadrul a patru sarcini clasice de etichetare a secvențelor, depășim în mod constant cele mai recente. În special, am depășit semnificativ lucrările anterioare privind recunoașterea entităților denumite în engleză și germană (NER), permițându-ne să raportăm noi scoruri F1 de ultimă generație pe sarcina partajată CoNL03. Lansăm toate modelele de cod și limbi pre-instruite într-un cadru simplu de utilizat comunității de cercetare, pentru a permite reproducerea acestor experimente și aplicarea încorporărilor propuse la alte\nsarcini: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'sr': 'Nedavni napredak u modeliranju jezika koristeći rekonstruirane neuralne mreže učinio je dostupnim za modeliranje jezika kao distribucije preko karaktera. Učenjem predviđanja sledećeg karaktera na osnovu prethodnih likova pokazalo se da su takvi modeli automatski internalizirani jezički koncept poput reči, rečenica, podklauzula i čak osjećanja. U ovom papiru predlažemo da utièemo na unutrašnje države treniranog jezičkog model a za proizvodnju novog tipa reèi ukljuèujuæi se kao kontekstualne integracije žica. Naši predloženi integraciji imaju različite vlasništvo koje su obučene bez objašnjenja riječi i tako osnovno model reči kao sekvence znakova, a b) su kontekstualizirani od njihovog okruženog teksta, znači da će isto reč imati različite integracije ovisno o njegovoj kontekstualnoj upotrebi. Provodimo komparativnu procjenu protiv prethodnih ugrađenja i otkrivamo da su naše ugrađenje vrlo korisne za zadatak koji se nalaze u skladu s četiri klasične sekvence, koji smo stalno iznosili prethodno stanje umjetnosti. Posebno, značajno iznosimo prethodni rad o priznanju entiteta na engleskom i njemačkom jeziku (NER), omogućavajući nam da prijavimo novi rezultati stanja umjetnosti F1-rezultata o zajedničkom zadatku CoNLL03. Puštamo sve kodove i predobučene jezičke modele u jednostavnom okviru za upotrebu istraživačke zajednice, kako bi omogućili reprodukciju tih eksperimenata i primjenu naših predloženih integracija drugima\nзадачи: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'si': 'භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරණ න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය භාවිත කරලා තියෙන්නේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරමාණය විතරයෙන්  පසුගිය අක්ෂර වලින් පසුගිය අක්ෂර වලින් පසුගිය අක්ෂර වලින් ඉගෙනගන්න ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදියට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට භාෂ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කළු භාෂාවක් ඇතුළු ස්ථානයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදි අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් තියෙනවා ඔවුන් (a) කිසිම ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් වචනයක් නැති ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම මූලික වචනයක් වචනයක් වගේ අක් අපි පසුගින් ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් විරුද්ධ විශේෂයක් කරනවා, අපේ ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් හොයාගන්නවා අපේ ඇම්බෙන්ඩින්ග් වඩා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් වැඩිය විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ජර්මන් නාමයි අන්තිම අන්තිමත් අඳුරණය (NER) ගැන පිළිබඳ වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා, අපිට CoNLL03 කොටස්  අපි සියළු කෝඩ් සහ ප්\u200dරධානය කරපු භාෂා මොඩේල්ස් විස්තර කරනවා පරීක්ෂණ සමාජාත්මකයෙන් සරල භාෂාව ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් සඳ\nවැඩ: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'so': 'Horumarinta ugu dambeysashada qoraalka luuqada oo lagu isticmaalayo shabakadaha neurada ee soo socda waxay ka dhigtay mid u habboon in luqada qaabilsan oo ay u kala qaybsadaan qoraalka. Sida lagu baro inaad soo hor dhigto xarafta soo socda oo ku saleysan aqoonta hore, tusaale ahaan waxaa lagu tusay tusaale ahaan si automatic ah loo soo bandhigaa fikrada luuqada sida hadalka, hadalka, tababarka iyo xittaa fikrada. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa in aan u soo dirno wadamada gudaha ah oo u qoran qaabka aqoonta luqada, si aan u soo saarno nooca qoyska ee warqada ah oo aynu u u malaynayno sida xarunta joogtada ah. Xiriiriyadayada la soo jeeday waxay leeyihiin hanti kala duduwan oo ay (a) wax lagu baran karo iyagoo aan waxba ka fiirsanayn hadal, sidaas darteed hadallada asalka ah oo u jeeda qoraalka ku wareegsan, oo (b) waxaa looga fikiraa xarafkooda, taasoo micneheedu waxay leedahay mid kala duduwan oo ku xiran isticmaalkiisa joogtada ah. Waxaynu sameynaa qiimeynta isbardhig ah oo ka hor jeeda wadamada hore, waxaynu ogaanaynaa in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu ay aad u faa’iido u leedahay shaqaalaha hoose-dureerka: afarta xiliga ee fasaxa ah oo dhamaantood waxaan sameynaynaa shuqulladii aan horay u qoray. Si gaar ah, waxaynu u sameynaynaa shuqulkii hore ee Ingiriis iyo Jarmalka lagu magacaabay aqoonsiga entity (NER), waxaynu fasaxaynaa inaannu wargelino xaaladda cusub ee farshaxanka F1-da ee CoNLL03 shaqo la waday. Dhammaan kaararka iyo modelalka afka hore oo lagu tababariyey ayaannu ugu dirnaa noocyo fudud oo lagu isticmaalayo bulshada waxbarashada, si aan u awoodno in la soo celiyo imtixaankan iyo in lagu codsado wadamada kale ee la soo jeeday\nshaqooyinka: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'sv': 'Nya framsteg inom språkmodellering med återkommande neurala nätverk har gjort det möjligt att modellera språk som fördelningar över tecken. Genom att lära sig förutsäga nästa tecken utifrån tidigare tecken har sådana modeller visat sig automatiskt internalisera språkliga begrepp som ord, meningar, sublauses och till och med sentiment. I denna uppsats föreslår vi att utnyttja de interna tillstånden i en utbildad teckenspråksmodell för att producera en ny typ av ordinbäddning som vi kallar kontextuella strängbäddningar. Våra föreslagna inbäddningar har de distinkta egenskaperna att de (a) tränas utan någon uttrycklig uppfattning om ord och därmed i grunden modellerar ord som sekvenser av tecken, och (b) kontextualiseras av sin omgivande text, vilket innebär att samma ord kommer att ha olika inbäddningar beroende på dess kontextuella användning. Vi gör en jämförande utvärdering mot tidigare inbäddningar och finner att våra inbäddningar är mycket användbara för nedströmsuppgifter: över fyra klassiska sekvensmärkningsuppgifter presterar vi konsekvent bättre än tidigare state-of-the-art. Framför allt presterar vi betydligt bättre än tidigare arbete med engelska och tyska namngivna entitetserkännande (NER), vilket gör att vi kan rapportera nya toppmoderna F1-poäng på CoNLL03 delade uppgift. Vi släpper all kod och förklädda språkmodeller i ett lättanvänt ramverk till forskarsamhället, för att möjliggöra reproduktion av dessa experiment och tillämpning av våra föreslagna inbäddningar till andra\nUppgifter: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ta': 'மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரி முன்னேற்றம் மறுநிகழ்ந்த புதிய பிணையம் முந்தைய எழுத்துகளின் அடுத்த எழுத்துக்களை முன்னோக்கிய எழுத்துக்களின் அடிப்படையில் கற்றுக் கொண்டு, மாதிரிகள் தானாகவே உள்ளமைக்கும் மொழியின In this paper, we propose to leverage the internal states of a trained character language model to produce a novel type of word embedding which we refer to as contextual string embeddings.  எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பொருள்களில் அவர்கள் (a) பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட வித்தியாசமான விஷயங்கள் இல்லாமல் இருக்கிறது அதனால் அடிப்படையான மாதிரி வார்த்தைகள் எழுத்துகளின் வரிசைகளாக இருக்கும் மற் நாம் முந்தைய பொருள்களுக்கு எதிராக ஒப்பிடுப்பான மதிப்பீடு செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் எங்கள் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் கீழே நீர் பணிகளுக்கு மிகவும் பயனுள்ளது என்று கண்டுபிடி குறிப்பிட்டு, நாங்கள் முந்தைய வேலையை முன்பு ஆங்கிலத்தில் மற்றும் ஜெர்மன் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடையாளம் (NER) மீது செயல்படுத்துகிறோம், புத நாங்கள் அனைத்து குறியீடுகளையும் முன் பயிற்சி மொழி மாதிரிகளையும் வெளியிடுகிறோம் எளிதாக பயன்படுத்தும் சட்டத்தில் ஆராய்ச்சி சம\nபணிகள்: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ur': 'تکرار نئورل نیٹورل نیٹورک کے مطابق زبان کی موڈلینگ میں اخیر اضافہ اس کی مدل کی ہے کہ زبان کی موڈلینگ کو شخصیٹوں پر تقسیم کرتی ہے۔ اگلے شخصوں کے بنیاد پر اگلے شخص کو پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے سیکھنے کے ذریعہ، ایسے مدلز اپنے ساتھ زبان شناسی نظریوں کو داخل کرنے کے لئے دکھائے گئے ہیں جیسے کلمات، جماعت، زیربکلاس اور حتی احساس. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک تعلیم کیٹر کی زبان مدل کے داخلی ایٹیٹوں کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ ایک نو پیدائش کلمات کی نو پیدائش کریں جسے ہم contextual string embeddings بناتے ہیں. ہمارے پیغام پہنچائے ہوئے انڈینگ کے لئے مختلف خصوصے ہیں کہ ان کو کلمات کے بغیر کوئی واضح نظر نہیں سکھایا جاتا ہے اور اسی طرح بنیاد دلیل کلمات کی تعریف کے مطابق مختلف تعریف کی جاتی ہیں اور (b) ان کے اطراف پیغام کے مطابق تدبیر کی جاتی ہیں، یعنی اسی کلمات کے مطابق مختلف ہم اگلے ایمبڈینگ کے مقابلہ میں ایک مقایسہ ارزش کرتے ہیں اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ ہمارے ایمبڈینگ ڈونسٹریم ٹاکس کے لئے بہت فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں: چار کلاسیک سٹرنگ ٹاکس کے ذریعے ہم اگلے ایمڈینگ سے بہت فائدہ اٹھاتے ہیں۔ مخصوصا، ہم انگلیسی اور جرمانی کے نام پر پہلے کی عملی اضافہ کر رہے ہیں (NER) جس کے ذریعہ ہم کو CoNLL03 شریک کار کے بارے میں نئی ایٹیٹ کی F1-اسکوروں کی راپورت کرنے کی اجازت دیتے ہیں. ہم تمام کوڈ اور پہلے تربین کی زبان مدل کو تحقیق کمونٹی کے لئے ساده استعمال کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرنے کے لئے آزاد کریں گے، ان تجربات اور ہمارے پیشنهاد ایمبڈینگ کے استعمال کو دوسرے لوگوں کے لئے فعال کریں گے\nدنیا: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'vi': 'Những tiến bộ gần đây trong việc tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ sử dụng mạng thần kinh thường xuyên đã làm cho ngôn ngữ mô hình thành phân phát trên các ký tự. Bằng cách học dự đoán nhân vật tiếp theo dựa trên các ký tự trước, các mô hình này đã được cho thấy tự động vận chuyển các khái niệm ngôn ngữ như từ, câu, mê hoặc thậm chí cảm xúc. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị thúc đẩy các bang nội bộ của một mô hình chữ tượng đã được đào tạo để tạo ra một kiểu mới được ghép từ mà chúng tôi gọi là sự nhúng lót chuỗi ngữ định. Những sự tham ô đề nghị của chúng tôi có các tính chất khác nhau mà chúng (a) được đào tạo mà không có một khái niệm rõ ràng về từ và từ cơ b ản là các chuỗi các ký tự, và (b) được kết nối bằng văn bản bao quanh, nghĩa là từ đó sẽ có sự nhúng tay khác nhau tùy thuộc vào nội dung của nó. Chúng tôi tiến hành một đánh giá tương đối với sự nhúng tay trước và thấy sự nhúng tay của chúng tôi rất hữu ích cho các công việc nối tiếp theo: trong bốn công việc mô tả cổ điển chúng tôi hoàn toàn vượt trội trước đây. Đặc biệt, chúng tôi vượt trội hơn nhiều công việc trước về tiếng Anh và Đức gọi là công ty dương diện (NER), cho phép chúng tôi báo cáo con số F1-số lượng hiện đại trên cùng một nhiệm vụ. Chúng tôi công bố các mô hình ngôn ngữ đã được đào tạo trong một quy định đơn giản để sử dụng cho cộng đồng nghiên cứu, để có thể tái tạo các thí nghiệm này và áp dụng những kế hoạch tác dụng của chúng tôi\nnhiệm vụ: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Keyingi harfni oldingi belgilar asosida o'rganishdan foydalanish mumkin, bu modellarni avtomatik murakkab qilish mumkin, so'z, soʻzlar, subklayasiz va xato hissiyalarni koʻrsatish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz o'rganilgan harf modeli ichki holatning ichki holatlarini qo'llashni talab qilamiz. Bu qogʻozdagi darajadagi harf modelidagi yoʻl turini yaratish uchun, biz bu soʻzni bir xil harf deb ataymiz. Bizning taʼminlovchimiz boshqa ma'lumot so'zlar bilan o'rganadigan ma'lumot ma'lumotlar bor va asosiy so'zlar qo'llangan qoidalar kabi qoidalar, va (b) ularning атрофи matnning orqali taʼminlovchi bo'lishi mumkin, bu so'zlarining bir so'zlariga bir xil foydalanishiga bir xil bo'ladi. Biz oldingi tashkilotlarga qiymatni bajaramiz va bizning ilovalarimiz quyidagi vazifalarga juda foydalanishimiz mumkin: to'rt klassik sevimli vazifalar ichida biz oldingi holatning oldingi vazifasini bajaramiz. Ko'pchilik, biz oldingi ingliz va Olmoncha tashkilotni tasdiqlash (NER) deb nomlangan ishni bajaramiz, bizga qo'llangan vazifani CoNLL03 bilan birlashtirilgan vazifani yangi xabar berishga ruxsat beramiz. Biz hamma kodlash va o'rganilgan tillar modellarini oddiy foydalanish uchun foydalanish asosida o'rganish jamiyatlariga chiqaramiz. Bu tajribalarni qayta chiqarish va boshqa tashkilotlarimizni qo'llash uchun\nvazifalar: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair", 'bg': 'Последните постижения в езиковото моделиране, използвайки повтарящи се невронни мрежи, правят възможно моделирането на езика като разпределение върху знаци. Като се научите да предсказвате следващия знак въз основа на предишни знаци, такива модели автоматично интернализират езикови понятия като думи, изречения, подклаузи и дори сантименти. В тази статия предлагаме да се използват вътрешните състояния на обучен модел на езика на знаците, за да се създаде нов тип вграждане на думи, което наричаме контекстуални вграждания на низове. Нашите предложени вграждания имат отличителните свойства, че (а) са обучени без никаква изрична представа за думите и по този начин фундаментално моделират думите като последователности от знаци, и (б) са контекстуализирани от заобикалящия ги текст, което означава, че една и съща дума ще има различни вграждания в зависимост от контекстуалната й употреба. Ние провеждаме сравнителна оценка спрямо предишните вграждания и откриваме, че нашите вграждания са изключително полезни за задачи надолу по веригата: при четири класически задачи за етикетиране на последователност ние постоянно надминаваме предишните най-съвременни. По-специално, ние значително надминаваме предишната работа по признаване на английски и немски имена на субекти (НР), което ни позволява да докладваме нови най-съвременни резултати от Формула 1 по споделената задача на CoNLL03. Ние пускаме всички кодове и предварително обучени езикови модели в лесна за използване рамка за изследователската общност, за да позволим възпроизвеждането на тези експерименти и прилагането на предложените ни вграждания към други\nзадачи: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'da': 'Nylige fremskridt i sprogmodellering ved hjælp af tilbagevendende neurale netværk har gjort det muligt at modellere sprog som fordelinger over tegn. Ved at lære at forudsige det næste tegn på grundlag af tidligere tegn, har sådanne modeller vist sig automatisk at internalisere sproglige begreber som ord, sætninger, sublauses og endda sentiment. I denne artikel foreslår vi at udnytte de interne tilstande i en trænet tegnsprogsmodel til at producere en ny type ord indlejring, som vi refererer til som kontekstuelle strenge indlejringer. Vores foreslåede indlejringer har de særskilte egenskaber, at de (a) er trænet uden nogen eksplicit begreb af ord og dermed grundlæggende modellerer ord som sekvenser af tegn, og (b) er kontekstualiseret af deres omgivende tekst, hvilket betyder, at det samme ord vil have forskellige indlejringer afhængigt af dets kontekstuelle brug. Vi foretager en sammenlignende evaluering i forhold til tidligere indlejringer og finder ud af, at vores indlejringer er meget nyttige til downstream opgaver: På tværs af fire klassiske sekvensmærkningsopgaver overgår vi konsekvent de tidligere state-of-the-art. Især har vi overgået tidligere arbejde med engelsk og tysk navngivet enhedsanerkendelse (NER), hvilket giver os mulighed for at rapportere nye state-of-the-art F1-scores på CoNLL03 delte opgave. Vi frigiver alle kode og forududdannede sprogmodeller i en brugervenlig ramme til forskningssamfundet, for at muliggøre reproduktion af disse eksperimenter og anvendelse af vores foreslåede indlejringer til andre forskere.\nopgaver: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'nl': 'Recente vooruitgang in taalmodellering met behulp van terugkerende neurale netwerken hebben het levensvatbaar gemaakt om taal te modelleren als distributies over karakters. Door het leren voorspellen van het volgende teken op basis van eerdere karakters, is aangetoond dat dergelijke modellen automatisch linguïstische concepten zoals woorden, zinnen, subclauses en zelfs sentiment internaliseren. In dit artikel stellen we voor om de interne toestanden van een getraind karaktertaalmodel te gebruiken om een nieuw type woord embedding te produceren dat we verwijzen naar contextuele string embeddings. Onze voorgestelde inbeddingen hebben de duidelijke eigenschappen dat ze (a) worden getraind zonder expliciete notie van woorden en dus fundamenteel woorden modelleren als reeksen van tekens, en (b) worden gecontextualiseerd door hun omringende tekst, wat betekent dat hetzelfde woord verschillende inbeddingen zal hebben afhankelijk van zijn contextueel gebruik. We voeren een vergelijkende evaluatie uit met eerdere embeddings en constateren dat onze embeddings zeer nuttig zijn voor downstreamtaken: bij vier klassieke sequence labeling taken presteren we consistent beter dan de vorige state-of-the-art. Met name presteren we aanzienlijk beter dan vorig werk op het gebied van naamloze entiteitsherkenning (NER), waardoor we nieuwe state-of-the-art F1-scores kunnen rapporteren over de gedeelde taak van CoNLL03. We geven alle code en voorgetrainde taalmodellen in een eenvoudig te gebruiken framework vrij aan de onderzoeksgemeenschap, om reproductie van deze experimenten en toepassing van onze voorgestelde embeddings op andere\ntaken: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'id': 'Kemajuan baru-baru ini dalam model bahasa menggunakan jaringan saraf berkurang telah membuatnya mudah untuk model bahasa sebagai distribusi atas karakter. Dengan belajar untuk memprediksi karakter berikutnya berdasarkan karakter sebelumnya, model tersebut telah ditunjukkan untuk secara otomatis internalisasi konsep bahasa seperti kata, kalimat, subklasa dan bahkan sentimen. In this paper, we propose to leverage the internal states of a trained character language model to produce a novel type of word embedding which we refer to as contextual string embeddings.  Pencampuran yang diusulkan kami memiliki properti yang berbeda bahwa mereka (a) dilatih tanpa konsep eksplicit kata-kata dan oleh itu pada dasarnya kata-kata model sebagai urutan karakter, dan (b) dikonteksualisasi oleh teks sekitar mereka, artinya kata yang sama akan memiliki penembakan berbeda bergantung pada penggunaan kontekstual. Kami melakukan evaluasi perbandingan terhadap embedding sebelumnya dan menemukan bahwa embedding kami sangat berguna untuk tugas turun: melalui empat urutan klasik tugas label kami konsisten melampaui state-of-the-art sebelumnya. Khususnya, kami melakukan pekerjaan sebelumnya pada pengenalan entitas bernama Inggris dan Jerman (NER), yang memungkinkan kami melaporkan skor F1 terbaru pada tugas kongsi CoNLL03. Kami melepaskan semua kode dan model bahasa terlatih dalam rangka sederhana-untuk-digunakan untuk komunitas penelitian, untuk memungkinkan reproduksi eksperimen ini dan aplikasi penerbangan kami yang diusulkan untuk lainnya\ntugas: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'hr': 'Nedavni napredak u modelima jezika koristeći rekonstruirane neuralne mreže učinio je dostupnim modelima jezika kao distribucije preko znakova. Naučavajući predvidjeti sljedeći karakter na temelju prethodnih znakova, pokazali su se takvi modeli automatski internalizirati jezički koncept poput riječi, rečenica, podklauzula i čak osjećanja. U ovom papiru predlažemo utjecati na unutrašnje države obučenog jezičkog model a za proizvodnju novog vrsta riječi uključujući se na koje se smatramo kontekstualnim ugrađenjima žica. Naši predloženi integraciji imaju različite vlasništvo koje su a) obučene bez objašnjenja riječi i tako osnovno model riječi kao sekvence znakova, a b) su kontekstualizirani svojim okruženim tekstom, znači da će isti riječ imati različite integracije ovisno o njegovoj kontekstualnoj upotrebi. Provodimo komparativnu procjenu protiv prethodnih ugrađenja i otkrivamo da su naše ugrađenje vrlo korisne za ležanje zadataka: preko četiri klasične uzorke označavanja klasičnih sekvencija stalno iznosimo prethodno stanje umjetnosti. Posebno, značajno iznosimo prethodni rad o priznanju entiteta na engleskom i njemačkom imenu (NER), omogućavajući nam da prijavimo novi rezultati stanja umjetnosti F1-rezultata o zajedničkom zadatku CoNLL03. Mi objavljujemo sve šifre i predobučene jezičke modele u jednostavnom okviru za upotrebu istraživačke zajednice, kako bi omogućili reprodukciju tih eksperimenata i primjenu naših predloženih integracija drugim\nzadatak: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'de': 'Jüngste Fortschritte in der Sprachmodellierung unter Verwendung wiederkehrender neuronaler Netzwerke haben es möglich gemacht, Sprache als Verteilungen über Zeichen zu modellieren. Indem man lernt, das nächste Zeichen anhand vorheriger Zeichen vorherzusagen, konnte gezeigt werden, dass solche Modelle sprachliche Konzepte wie Wörter, Sätze, Unterklause und sogar Gefühle automatisch verinnerlichen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir vor, die internen Zustände eines trainierten Zeichensprachenmodells zu nutzen, um eine neuartige Art der Worteinbettung zu erzeugen, die wir als kontextuelle Stringeinbettungen bezeichnen. Unsere vorgeschlagenen Einbettungen haben die eindeutigen Eigenschaften, dass sie (a) ohne explizite Begriffe trainiert werden und somit Wörter grundsätzlich als Zeichenfolgen modellieren und (b) durch ihren umgebenden Text kontextualisiert werden, was bedeutet, dass dasselbe Wort je nach kontextueller Verwendung unterschiedliche Einbettungen hat. Wir führen eine vergleichende Bewertung mit früheren Einbettungen durch und stellen fest, dass unsere Einbettungen für nachgelagerte Aufgaben sehr nützlich sind: Über vier klassische Sequenz-Beschriftungsaufgaben hinweg übertreffen wir konsequent den bisherigen Stand der Technik. Insbesondere übertreffen wir bisherige Arbeiten zur Erkennung von benannten Entitäten (NER) in Englisch und Deutsch deutlich und ermöglichen es uns, neue state-of-the-art F1-Scores für die gemeinsame Aufgabe CoNLL03 zu melden. Wir geben alle Code- und vortrainierten Sprachmodelle in einem einfach zu bedienenden Framework für die Forschungsgemeinschaft frei, um die Reproduktion dieser Experimente und die Anwendung unserer vorgeschlagenen Einbettungen auf andere\nAufgaben: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'sw': 'Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika mifano ya lugha kwa kutumia mitandao ya neura yanayoendelea imefanya kuwa na uwezekano wa kutengeneza lugha kama usambazaji wa wahusika. Kwa kujifunza kutabiri tabia inayofuata kwa msingi wa wahusika wa zamani, mifano kama vile imeonyesha kuingiza mitazamo ya lugha kama vile maneno, hukumu, misingi na hata hisia. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kuitumia majimbo ya ndani ya mfumo wa lugha iliyoendeshwa ili kutengeneza aina ya riwaya ya neno ambalo tunamaanisha kuwa mfumo wa mfumo wa zamani. Mapendekezo yetu yanakuwa na utaalam tofauti ambao (a) wanafundishwa bila mtazamo wowote wa maneno na kwa hiyo maneno ya msingi kama mfululizo wa wahusika, na (b) yanavutiwa na maana yake yanayozunguka, yanamaanisha kuwa neno hilo litakuwa na maeneo tofauti yanategemea matumizi yake ya sasa. Tunafanya tathmini za kulinganisha dhidi ya makubaliano yaliyopita na kutambua kuwa vifaa vyetu vina manufaa sana kwa kazi za chini ya mto: katika mifumo minne ya viwanne vya darasa ambavyo kwa kawaida tunafanya kazi za kufanya hali ya sanaa iliyopita. Kwa hakika, tunafanya kazi zilizopita katika Kiingereza na Ujerumani kwa jina la kutambua entity (NER), tunaruhusu turipoti hali mpya ya sanaa ya F1 kwenye kazi inayosambazwa na CoNLL03. Tunaachia sheria zote na mifano ya lugha zilizofunzwa kabla katika mfumo rahisi wa matumizi kwa jamii ya utafiti, ili kuwezesha uzalishaji wa majaribio haya na matumizi ya mazingira yetu yanayopendekezwa kwa wengine\nkazi: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'fa': 'پیشرفتهای اخیر در مدل زبانی با استفاده از شبکه های عصبی تکرار آن را برای مدل زبان به عنوان توزیع بر روی شخصیت قابل قابل سازی ساخته است. با یاد گرفتن برای پیش بینی شخصیت بعدی بر اساس شخصیت های قبلی، این مدلها نشان داده شده\u200cاند که مفهوم زبان\u200cشناسی مثل کلمات، جمله\u200cها، زیر کلاس\u200cها و حتی احساسات را به طور خودکار انجمن کند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم که وضعیت داخلی یک مدل زبان شخصیت آموزش داده شده برای تولید یک نوع نوع کلمه داخلی که ما به عنوان داخل ریشه\u200cهای متوسط ارائه می\u200cکنیم. پیوسته\u200cهای پیشنهاد ما ویژه\u200cهای مخصوص را دارند که (a) بدون هیچ نظر خاصی از کلمات آموزش داده می\u200cشوند، و بنابراین کلمات بنیادی به عنوان دسته\u200cهای شخصیت\u200cها مدل می\u200cشوند، و (b) به عنوان متن محاصره\u200cی آنها محاصره می\u200cشوند، یعنی این کلمات همان دسته\u200cای متفاوت به بستگی از استفاده از ما یک ارزیابی مقایسه بر خلاف پیوندهای قبلی انجام می\u200cدهیم و می\u200cبینیم که پیوندهای ما برای کارهای پایین پایین مفید هستند: در طول چهار دسته\u200cهای نقاشی کلاسیک ما همیشه از وضعیت گذشته\u200cی هنر بیشتری انجام می\u200cدهیم. مخصوصا، ما کارهای قبلی در مورد شناسایی entities (NER) انگلیسی و آلمانی بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهیم، که به ما اجازه می\u200cدهد که در مورد کار مشترک CoNLL03 گزارش دهیم. ما تمام مدل های کد و زبان پیش آموزش شده را در یک چهارچوب ساده برای استفاده از استفاده برای جامعه تحقیقات آزاد می کنیم، تا توان تولید این آزمایشات و کاربرد پیشنهاد پیشنهاد ما به دیگران\nوظیفه\u200cها: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'tr': "Ýakyndaky täzelikler görkezilýän dili modellendirilýän täzelikleri karakterlerden daýratma üçin eserlendirdi. Öňki karakterleriň esasynda indiki karakteri öňlemek üçin öwrenmek üçin, bu modeller dillerin sözleri, sözleri, subklawuslary we hatda duýgularyny öz-özüne internalize edip görkezildi. Bu kagyzda, biz üns berilen karakter dili nusgasyny daşarylan şeklinde metini daşarylýan söz hilini döretmek üçin teklip berýäris. Biziň teklip eden guramlarymyz(a) sözleriniň düşünmesi bolmadyk özleriniň üýtgeşik hasaplarynyň bar we bu sebäpli esasy karakterleriň sözleri (karakterleriň serinleri) häzirki metinleriniň tarapynda dury hasaplanýar, we (b) şol sözleriniň içinde dury düzümleri bar diýip kabul edilýär. Öňki depelere garşy bilen hoýa ştyrylyk çykyş edip görkezip çykyş edip görkezip çykyşlarymyz indiki görevler üçin gaty faydaldyr: dört klasik sanat sanatynyň içinde we öňki sanatynyň durumyny diýipdir. Iňlisçe we nemesçe adly zatlary tanamak üçin öňki işimizi (NER) taýýarlapdyr. Bize CoNLL03'iň paylaşyk işinde täze möhüm-bolan F1-scorelaryň barlamagyna rugsat berýäris. Hemme köd we öňünden bilinmeli dil nusgalaryny araştyrma jemgyýetiniň ýene bir nusgasynda çykarýarys, bu deneyleriň täzeliklerini we teklip eden düzmeklerimizi başga bir nusga etmäge rugsat bermek üçin çykarýarys.\nGörevler: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair", 'hy': 'Recent advances in language modeling using recurrent neural networks have made it viable to model language as distributions over characters.  Երբ սովորեցինք հաջորդ կերպարը կանխագուշակել նախորդ կերպարների հիմքում, ապացուցել է, որ նման մոդելները ինքնաբերաբար ներքին են ներառում լեզվաբանական գաղափարները, ինչպիսիք են բառերը, նախադասությունները, ենթադասությունները և նույնիսկ զգացմունքները Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել վարժեցված կերպարի լեզվի մոդելի ներքին նահանգները, որպեսզի ստեղծենք նոր տեսակ բառեր, որոնք մենք անվանում ենք կոնտեքստային լարերի ներդրումներ: Մեր առաջարկած ներդրումները ունեն առանձնահատկություններ, որոնք նրանք (a) սովորեցվում են առանց բառերի բացահայտ հասկացության, և այսպես հիմնականում մոդելներ են տալիս բառերը որպես հերոսների հաջորդականություններ, և (b) կոնտեքստիզացվում են շրջապատող տեքստի միջոցով, ինչը նշանակում է, որ նույն բառը տարբեր ներ Մենք կատարում ենք համեմատական գնահատականներ նախորդ ներդրումների հետ և հայտնաբերում ենք, որ մեր ներդրումները շատ օգտակար են հետագա առաջադրանքների համար. չորս դասական հաջորդականության նշանակման առաջադրանքների ընթացքում մենք մշտապես գերազանցում ենք նախորդ տեխնոլոգիանե Մենք հատկապես շատ ավելի լավ ենք կատարում նախորդ աշխատանքը անգլերեն և գերմաներեն անհատականության ճանաչման (ՆԵՌ) վրա, որը թույլ է տալիս մեզ զեկուցել նոր ամենահետաքրքիր F1-գնահատականներ ԿոՆԼԼ03-ի ընդհանուր խնդրի Մենք հրապարակում ենք բոլոր կոդի և նախապատրաստված լեզվի մոդելները մի պարզ օգտագործման շրջանակում հետազոտության համայնքի համար, որպեսզի հնարավորություն տանք այս փորձերի վերարտադրման և մեր առաջարկած ներդրումների կիրառման այլ\nառաջադրանքներ. https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'sq': 'Përparimet e fundit në modelimin e gjuhëve duke përdorur rrjetet e përsëritura nervore e kanë bërë të jetueshme modelimin e gjuhës si shpërndarje mbi karaktere. Duke mësuar të parashikojë karakterin tjetër në bazë të karaktereve të mëparshëm, modelet e tilla janë treguar që automatikisht internalizojnë koncepte gjuhësore të tilla si fjalët, fjalët, nënklasat dhe madje ndjenjat. Në këtë letër, propozojmë të përdorim shtetet e brendshme të modelit të gjuhës së trajnuar të karakterit për të prodhuar një lloj të ri fjalësh të përfshirë që ne e referojmë si përfshirje kontekstuale të rreshtave. Ndërtesat tona të propozuara kanë propozimet e veçanta që ata (a) janë trajnuar pa asnjë koncept të shprehur të fjalëve dhe kështu në thelb modelojnë fjalët si sekuenca karakterësh, dhe (b) janë kontekstualizuar nga teksti rreth tyre, që do të thotë se e njëjta fjalë do të ketë përfshirje të ndryshme në varësi të përdorimit kontekstual të saj. Ne kryejmë një vlerësim krahasues ndaj përfshirjeve të mëparshme dhe zbulojmë se përfshirjet tona janë shumë të dobishme për detyrat më poshtë: nëpërmjet katër detyrave klasike të shënimit të sekuencës ne vazhdimisht kryejmë më tepër se më të mirat e mëparshme. Ne veçanërisht, ne kryejmë punë të mëparshme në njohjen e njësisë së quajtur Anglisht dhe Gjermanisht (NER), duke na lejuar të raportojmë rezultate të reja të state-of-the-art F1 në detyrën e përbashkët të CoNLL03. Ne lëshojmë të gjitha modelet e kodeve dhe gjuhëve të trajnuara në një kuadër të thjeshtë për përdorim për komunitetin kërkimor, për të mundësuar riprodhimin e këtyre eksperimenteve dhe aplikimin e përfshirjeve tona të propozuara në të tjera\ntasks:  https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'af': "Onlangse vorderings in taal modeling gebruik herhaalde neuralnetwerke het dit gebruik om taal te model as verspreidings oor karakters te maak. Deur te leer om die volgende karakter te voorskou op die basis van vorige karakters, het sodanige modele vertoon om die lingwisiese konsepte outomaties te internaliseer soos woorde, setnings, subklauses en selfs sentiment. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons om die interne staatste van 'n onderwerp karaktertaal model te verwys om 'n novele tipe woord inbêring te produseer wat ons verwys na as contextual string inbêding. Ons voorgestelde inbêdings het die eienskappe wat hulle (a) onderwerp word sonder enige eksplisiese nodiging van woorde en dus fundamenteel model woorde as sekwensies van karakters, en (b) word contextualiseer deur hulle omgewing teks, beteken dat die selfde woord verskillende inbêdings sal hê, afhanklik van sy kontekslike gebruik. Ons doen 'n vergelykbare evaluering teen vorige inbêdings en vind dat ons inbêdings baie nuttig is vir onderstreem opdragte: oor vier klassieke sekvensie etiket opdragte wat ons konsistentlik die vorige staat van die kuns uitvoer. In besonderhede, ons betekenlik uitvoer vorige werk op Engels en Duits genaamde entiteiterkenning (NER), wat ons toelaat om nuwe status-of-the-art F1-scores op die CoNLL03 gedeelde taak te rapporteer. Ons verlos alle kode en vooraf-opgelei taal modele in 'n eenvoudig-gebruik raamwerk vir die ondersoek gemeenskap, om die reproduksie van hierdie eksperimente en toepassing van ons voorgestelde inbêdinge aan ander te aktiveer\nOpdragte: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair", 'am': 'የቋንቋ አካባቢ ጥያቄ በመጠቀም የሚቆጠሩ ጠቃሚ መረብ በመስመር ቋንቋን በጽሑፎች ላይ የተለየ ማሰናከል አድርጎታል፡፡ የቀድሞው ጽሑፎችን በመቀበል በማስተማር፣ ምሳሌዎች ቃላት፣ ቃላት፣ ቃላት፣ ደብዳቤዎች እና አስተያየት እንደሚመስል የቋንቋዊ አእምሮዎች በራስነት ያስገኛሉ፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የተጠቃሚ የፊደል ቋንቋ ሞዴል የውስጡ ሀገር አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው የአገራቢዎች (a) የተለየ የቃላት ማስታወቂያ ሳይኖር የተማሩ የልዩ properties አላቸው፣ እናም በመሠረት ቃላት የፊደል ግንኙነት እና (b) በዙሪያቸው የጽሑፍ ግንኙነት ያስተካክሉታል፡፡ የቀድሞው አካባቢዎች ላይ የሚተካክል ማስታወቂያ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ አስቀድሞ የኢንጂልኛ እና የጀርመን አካል ማውቀትን (NER) በሚሉት ሥራ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የድምፅ ቃላት እና የቀድሞው የቋንቋ ሞዴላዎችን ለመጠቀም በተፈተና ማኅበረሰብ ላይ እናስቀራለን፡፡\nስራዎች https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'bn': 'প্রত্যাবর্তিত নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে ভাষার মডেলের সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতির উন্নয়নগুলো অক্ষরের উপর বিতরণ হিসেবে  পূর্ববর্তী অক্ষরের ভিত্তিতে পরবর্তী অক্ষর ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করতে শিখার মাধ্যমে মডেল স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ভাষাগত ধারণাকে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ভাষাগত ভা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি প্রশিক্ষিত অক্ষরের ভাষার মডেলের অভ্যন্তরীণ অবস্থানের প্রস্তাব প্রদান করার জন্য একটি নভেলের ধরনের শব্দের প্রবেশ কর আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্য রয়েছে যে তারা (a) কোনো বিস্তারিত ধারণা ছাড়া তাদের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয়েছে এবং তাই মৌলিক শব্দগুলো চরিত্রের বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে হিসেবে বিতর্ক আমরা পূর্ববর্তীদের বিরুদ্ধে একটি তুলনামূল্য প্রদান করি এবং আমরা খুঁজে বের করি যে আমাদের প্রবেশাধিকার নীচের কাজের জন্য অত্যন্ত কার্যকর: চার ক্লাসিক সেকেন্ড লেব বিশেষ করে, আমরা পূর্ববর্তী ইংরেজি এবং জার্মানী নামের বস্তু স্বীকৃতির (নেআর) কাজের উপর প্রচার করেছি, যাতে আমাদের সাহায্য করা হয়েছে কনএলেম্বুর শেয়া আমরা সকল কোড এবং প্রশিক্ষিত ভাষার মডেল একটি সাধারণ ব্যবহারের ফ্রেমে গবেষণা সম্প্রদায়ের কাছে মুক্তি দেই, যাতে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পরীক্ষার পু\nকাজ: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ko': '귀속 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 언어 모델링을 하는 최신 진전은 언어 모델링을 문자의 분포로 가능하게 한다.앞의 문자를 학습한 토대에서 다음 문자를 예측함으로써 이러한 모델은 언어 개념을 자동으로 내재화할 수 있다는 것이 증명되었다. 예를 들어 단어, 문장, 자류, 심지어 감정까지.본고에서 우리는 훈련된 문자 언어 모델의 내부 상태를 이용하여 새로운 단어 삽입을 제안하는데 이를 상하문 문자열 삽입이라고 부른다.우리가 제시한 삽입은 서로 다른 특성을 가진다. (a) 명확한 단어 개념이 없는 상황에서 훈련을 하기 때문에 근본적으로 단어를 문자 서열로 모델링한다. (b)는 그 주변의 텍스트에 의해 어경화된다. 이것은 같은 단어가 상하문에 따라 서로 다른 삽입을 한다는 것을 의미한다.우리는 이전의 삽입에 대해 비교 평가를 실시한 결과 우리의 삽입이 하위 임무에 매우 유용하다는 것을 발견했다. 네 개의 고전적인 서열 표기 임무 중에서 우리의 성능은 시종 이전의 가장 선진적인 수준보다 우수하다.특히 영어와 독일어 명칭 실체식별(NER)에 있어서의 활약이 이전의 업무보다 현저히 뛰어나 CoNLL03 공유 임무에서 최신 F1 성적을 보고할 수 있다.우리는 간단하고 사용하기 쉬운 구조에서 연구 지역사회에 모든 코드와 미리 훈련된 언어 모델을 발표하여 이러한 실험을 복제하고 우리가 제시한 삽입을 다른 분야에 응용할 수 있도록 한다\n작업:https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'bs': 'Nedavni napredak u modelima jezika koristeći rekonstruirane neuralne mreže učinio je dostupnim modelima jezika kao distribucije preko karaktera. Učenjem predviđanja sljedećeg karaktera na osnovu prethodnih likova pokazalo je da su takvi modeli automatski internalizirani jezički koncept poput riječi, rečenica, podklauzula i čak osjećanja. U ovom papiru predlažemo utjecati na unutrašnje države obučenog jezika za proizvodnju novog tipa riječi uključujući se na koje se zovemo kao kontekstualni integraciji žica. Naši predloženi integraciji imaju različite vlasništvo koje su obučene bez objašnjenja riječi i tako osnovno modeliraju riječi kao sekvence znakova, a b) se kontekstualiziraju njihovim okruženim tekstom, znači da će isti riječ imati različite integracije ovisno o njegovoj kontekstualnoj upotrebi. Provodimo komparativnu procjenu protiv prethodnih ugrađenja i otkrivamo da su naše ugrađenje vrlo korisne za zadatke u sklopu: preko četiri klasične sekvence označavamo zadatke za označavanje etikete koje stalno iznosimo prethodno stanje umjetnosti. Posebno, značajno iznosimo prethodni posao o priznanju entiteta na engleskom i njemačkom jeziku (NER), omogućavajući nam da prijavimo novi rezultati stanja umjetnosti F1-rezultata o zajedničkom zadatku CoNLL03. Mi objavljujemo sve šifre i predobučene jezičke modele u jednostavnom okviru za upotrebu istraživačke zajednice, kako bi omogućili reprodukciju tih eksperimenata i primjenu naših predloženih integracija drugim\nzadatak: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'cs': 'Nedávné pokroky v modelování jazyků s využitím rekurentních neuronových sítí umožnily modelovat jazyk jako distribuce nad znaky. Naučením se předpovídat další znak na základě předchozích znaků bylo ukázáno, že tyto modely automaticky internalizují jazykové pojmy, jako jsou slova, věty, podklady a dokonce sentiment. V tomto článku navrhujeme využít vnitřní stavy trénovaného znakového jazykového modelu k vytvoření nového typu vložení slov, který označujeme jako kontextové vkládání řetězců. Naše navržené vložení mají zřetelné vlastnosti, že (a) jsou trénovány bez jakéhokoliv explicitního pojmu slov a proto v zásadě modelují slova jako sekvence znaků, a (b) jsou kontextualizovány jejich okolním textem, což znamená, že stejné slovo bude mít různé vložení v závislosti na jeho kontextovém použití. Provádíme srovnávací hodnocení s předchozími vloženími a zjišťujeme, že naše vložení jsou velmi užitečné pro následné úlohy: napříč čtyřmi klasickými úlohami označování sekvencí důsledně překonáváme předchozí stav techniky. Zejména výrazně překonáváme předchozí práce na anglickém a německém rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit (NER), což nám umožňuje nahlásit nové nejmodernější F1 skóre na sdíleném úkolu CoNLL03. Veškerý kód a předškolené jazykové modely vydáváme výzkumné komunitě v jednoduchém frameworku, abychom umožnili reprodukci těchto experimentů a aplikaci našich navrhovaných embeddedů na další\núkoly: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'et': 'Hiljutised edusammud keele modelleerimises korduvate närvivõrkude abil on teinud keele modelleerimise tähemärkide jaotusena. Õppides ennustama järgmist märki varasemate märkide põhjal, on näidatud, et sellised mudelid sisestavad automaatselt keelelisi kontseptsioone nagu sõnad, laused, alaklaused ja isegi sentimentaalsus. Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku kasutada koolitatud märgikeele mudeli siseseid olekuid, et luua uudset tüüpi sõna manustamine, mida me nimetame kontekstiliseks stringi manustamiseks. Meie kavandatud manustamistel on erinevad omadused: a) neid koolitatakse ilma mingisuguse selgesõnalise mõisteta sõnadest ja seega modelleeritakse põhimõtteliselt sõnu tähemärkide jadana ja b) kontekstiseeritakse nende ümbritseva teksti abil, mis tähendab, et samal sõnal on erinevad manustamised sõltuvalt konteksti kasutamisest. Viime läbi võrdleva hindamise varasemate manustamistega ja leiame, et meie manustamised on väga kasulikud järgnevate ülesannete jaoks: nelja klassikalise järjestuse märgistamise ülesande puhul on meil järjepidevalt üle eelmise tehnika taseme. Eelkõige ületame oluliselt varasemaid tööd inglise ja saksa nimega üksuste tunnustamise (NER) alal, mis võimaldab meil teatada CoNLL03 jagatud ülesande uutest tipptasemel F1 tulemustest. Vabastame teadusringkonnale kõik koodid ja eelkoolitud keelemudelid lihtsalt kasutatavas raamistikus, et võimaldada nende eksperimentide reprodutseerimist ja meie kavandatud manustamist teistele.\nülesanded: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'az': 'Yenidən təkrarlanan nöral ağları vasitəsilə dil modelləri modellərində daha yeni öyüd-nəsihətlər karakterlərin üstündə dağıtılması üçün dil modellərinə faydalandırdı. Əvvəlki karakterlərin təsəvvür etməyi öyrənərək, bu modellər, sözlər, cümlələr, subklauzular və hətta duyguları kimi dil fikirlərini öz-özünə internalizə etmək üçün göstərildilər. Bu kağızda, təhsil edilmiş karakter dili modelinin içəri durumlarını təmin etmək üçün yeni bir növ sözlər yaratmaq üçün təklif edirik ki, bu növbənöv məsələlər kimi təhsil edilir. Bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz səhifələrimiz, a) sözlərin a çıq fikri olmadan təhsil edildiklərini təhsil edirlər və bu səhifələrin səhifələri təhsil edirlər və b) ətrafındakı mətnlərlə təhsil edilir ki, aynı sözlərin müxtəlif istifadə edilməsinə müvəffəqiyyət edirlər. Biz əvvəlki inbinglər ilə qarşılaşdığımız müqayisədə müəyyən bir değerlendirməyi təşkil edirik və biz inbinglərimizin a şağı inbinglər üçün çox faydalı olduğunu görürük: dörd klasik seçmə işarələrində əvvəlki sanatın vəziyyətindən daha çox istifadə edirik. Özellikle, biz İngilizce və Almanca adlı entity tanımlaması (NER) barəsində əvvəlki işləri çox üstün etdik ki, CoNLL03 paylaşılan işlər barəsində yeni mövcud F1-scores xəbər veririk. Biz bütün kodlar və əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş dil modellərini araşdırma toplumuna asanlıqla istifadə etmək üçün, bu eksperimentlərin yenilənməsini və təhsil etdiyimiz məsələlərimizin uyğulamasını başqalarına qaytarmaq üçün\nişlər: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ca': "Els avanços recents en la modelació lingüística utilitzant xarxes neurals recurrents han fet viable modelar el llenguatge com distribucions sobre caràcters. Aprenent a predir el següent caràcter basat en caràcters anteriors, s'ha demostrat que aquests models internalitzen automàticament conceptes lingüístics com paraules, frases, subclauses i fins i tot sentiment. En aquest article, proposem aprofitar els estats interns d'un model de llenguatge de caràcter entrenat per produir un nou tipus de paraula incorporada que anomenem incorporacions de cadenes contextuals. Les nostres incorporacions proposades tenen les propietats distintes que (a) estan entrenades sense cap noció explícita de paraules i, per tant, fonamentalment, modelen paraules com seqüències de caràcters, i (b) estan contextualitzades pel seu text al voltant, significant que la mateixa paraula tindrà diferents incorporacions segons l'ús contextual. Fem una evaluació comparativa en comparació amb les incorporacions anteriors i descobrim que les nostres incorporacions són molt útils per a tasques avall: en quatre tasques clàssiques d'etiquetage de seqüències, sempre superem l'última. En particular, superem significativament la feina anterior sobre el reconeixement d'entitats anomenades en anglès i alemanya (NER), permetent-nos informar sobre la tasca compartida CoNLL03. We release all code and pre-trained language models in a simple-to-use framework to the research community, to enable reproduction of these experiments and application of our proposed embeddings to other\ntasques: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair", 'fi': 'Viimeaikaiset edistysaskeleet kielimallinnuksessa toistuvia hermoverkkoja käyttäen ovat mahdollistaneet kielen mallintamisen merkkijakaumina. Oppimalla ennustamaan seuraavaa merkkiä aikaisempien merkkien perusteella tällaisten mallien on osoitettu automaattisesti sisäistävän kielellisiä käsitteitä, kuten sanoja, lauseita, alalauseita ja jopa tunteita. Tässä työssä ehdotamme, että koulutetun merkkikielimallin sisäisiä tiloja hyödynnetään uudenlaisen sanaupotuksen tuottamiseksi, jota kutsumme kontekstuaalisiksi merkkijonojen upotuksiksi. Ehdotetuilla upotuksilla on erilliset ominaisuudet, että ne (a) koulutetaan ilman nimenomaista sanakäsitystä ja siten pohjimmiltaan mallinnetaan sanoja merkkisekvensseinä, ja (b) ne kontekstisoidaan ympäröivällä tekstillä, mikä tarkoittaa, että samalla sanalla on erilaisia upotuksia kontekstuaalisen käytön mukaan. Teemme vertailevan arvioinnin aiempiin upotuksiin verrattuna ja huomaamme, että upotuksemme ovat erittäin hyödyllisiä jatkojalostustehtävissä: neljässä klassisessa sekvenssimerkinnätehtävässä suoritamme johdonmukaisesti edellistä huipputekniikkaa paremmin. Etenkin suoriudumme huomattavasti paremmin kuin aiemmat englannin- ja saksankieliset nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistustyöt (NER), minkä ansiosta voimme raportoida uusista huippuluokan F1-pisteistä CoNLL03:n yhteisessä tehtävässä. Julkaisemme kaikki koodit ja esikoulutetut kielimallit helppokäyttöisessä kehyksessä tutkimusyhteisölle mahdollistaaksemme näiden kokeilujen toistamisen ja ehdotettujen upotusten soveltamisen muihin sovelluksiin.\ntehtävät: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'jv': 'FindOK Taning Nang pentungé iki, kita nggunakake beraksi kanggo mbatalé sampek anyar luwih dumateng cara nggawe ngetik balêr sing dirampakan akeh basa sing apik dhéwé nyimpen nganggo gambar aturan tambah. Ok Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan langgar akeh embedding dhéwé lan nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang dhéwé: Juara-Juara, awak dhéwé ngerasakno hukum sing berarti barêng-barêng kanggo ngerasakno ning basa Perancis lan alam kuwi nambah acethi Entire (NR), iso nggawe ngubah dhéwé ngerasakno state-of-the-arts F1-scoos kanggo kelompok CoNLL 2003. Awak dhéwé mbukaké kabèh kode lan model sing luwih-luwih dumateng ning nguasai perusahaan sampeyan kanggo nggunakake komunitas, nggawe ngubah perusahaan kelompok lan aplikasi kanggo ngerasai winih dhéwé.\ntasks: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'sk': 'Nedavni napredek pri modeliranju jezikov z uporabo ponavljajočih se nevronskih omrežij je omogočil modeliranje jezika kot distribucije preko znakov. Z učenjem napovedovanja naslednjega znaka na podlagi prejšnjih znakov je bilo dokazano, da takšni modeli samodejno internalizirajo jezikovne koncepte, kot so besede, stavki, podklavzi in celo čustva. V tem prispevku predlagamo izkoristitev notranjih stanj usposobljenega modela znakovnega jezika za izdelavo nove vrste vdelave besed, ki jo imenujemo kontekstualne vdelave nizov. Naše predlagane vdelave imajo različne lastnosti, da (a) so usposobljene brez kakršnega koli eksplicitnega pojma besed in tako temeljno modelirajo besede kot zaporedja znakov, in (b) so kontekstualizirane z njihovim okoliškim besedilom, kar pomeni, da ima ista beseda različne vdelave glede na njeno kontekstualno uporabo. Izvajamo primerjalno oceno s prejšnjimi vdelavami in ugotavljamo, da so naše vdelave zelo koristne za nadaljnja opravila: pri štirih klasičnih nalogah označevanja zaporedja dosledno presegamo prejšnje najsodobnejše. Zlasti znatno presegamo prejšnje delo na področju angleškega in nemškega imenovanega subjekta (NER), kar nam omogoča poročanje o novih najsodobnejših rezultatih F1 pri deljeni nalogi CoNLL03. Raziskovalni skupnosti objavljamo vse kode in vnaprej usposobljene jezikovne modele v enostavnem okviru, da bi omogočili reprodukcijo teh eksperimentov in uporabo naših predlaganih vdelav v druge\nnaloge: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'he': 'התקדמות האחרונות בנוגע לדוגמאות שפות באמצעות רשתות עצביות חוזרות גרמו לזה להיות אפשרי לדוגמא שפה כפיצוי על הדמויות. על ידי ללמוד לחזות את הדמות הבאה על בסיס הדמות הקודמות, דוגמנים כאלה הוראו להפיל באופן אוטומטי מושגים שפתיים כמו מילים, משפטים, תת-קלאוסים ואפילו רגשות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים להשתמש במדינות הפנימיות של מודל שפת אופים מאומן כדי לייצר סוג חדש של מילה קיבלה שאנחנו קוראים לזה כקיבלות קונטקסטיות. התכנויות המוצעות שלנו יש את הכישורים הבודדים שהם (a) מאומנים ללא כל רעיון ברור של מילים ולכן בעיקרון מודל מילים כרצפים של דמויות, ו (b) מקונטלקטואליזציה על ידי הטקסט הסביב שלהם, מה שאומר שאותה מילה תהיה תוכנויות שונות בהתאם לשימוש הקונטקטי שלהם. אנו מבצעים עריכה שיוותית נגד התקפים הקודמים ומצאים שההתקפים שלנו שימושיים מאוד למשימות מתקדמות: בארבעה משימות טביעות רצף קלאסיים אנו מבצעים באופן קבוע את המצב הקודם של האמנות. במיוחד, אנו מבצעים במידה משמעותית עבודה קודמת על זיהוי ישויות בשם אנגלי וגרמני (NER), מאפשרים לנו לדווח על ציוני F1 חדשים במשימה המשותפת CoNLL03. We release all code and pre-trained language models in a simple-to-use framework to the research community, to enable reproduction of these experiments and application of our proposed embeddings to other\nמשימות: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Ko iya baro ka gane taki na biyu a kan karatun na zaman, an nuna misalin misãlai da ke cikin ɗabi'a ɗabi'a ɗabi'a ɗabi'a wa'anar linguistic, kamar maganar, maganar, masu buƙata da kuma don za'a iya lokacin. Daga wannan takardan, Munã bukãta zuwa a samar da halin wanda ke cikin wani misalin na tsari na fassarar harshen, dõmin ya ƙãga wani nau'in magana da za'a fitarwa da shi idan za'a ƙayyade kamar string na guda. Bayanmu da aka buɗa da su, sunã da wasu properties dabam-daban (a) wanda aka yi wa wa'anar su ba da wani baini mai bayyanãwa na magana, da haka, misalin misalin ayuka masu bin haske, kuma (b) ana yi amfani da littãfin da ke kẽwayen, kuma yana da muhimmin da za'a sami maganar ta samu da wasu masu cikin amfani da ke kai yanzu. Tuna samar rabo game da shirin da suka shige ta farko, kuma munã gane cewa masu amfani da amfani mai yawa ga aikinanmu na ƙarami: bakin huɗu mai fassarawa na fassarar aikin mu daidai a gabanin-state-of-the-art. Kayya, masu fara aiki na gaba a kan Ingiriya da Jamanya wanda aka suna sunan shaidar abuni (NER), kuma yana yarda da mu bãyar da bayani ga rubutun-sanar F1-score a kan aikin CoNLL03 wanda aka raba. Mu saka kode kodi da misãlai masu da aka yi wa zaman-hakarin harshen cikin firam mai amfani da amfani da shi zuwa jamii na lõkaci, dõmin ya iya fara a kanana zafi masu jarrabi da shiryoyin ayukanmu da aka buƙata zuwa wasu\nShawarar: https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair", 'bo': 'འཕྲལ་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་མ་དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བར་མཁན་གྱི་འགྱུར་རིམ་དྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས སྔོན་གྱི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་གི་རྨི་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ཁྱད་པར་གྱི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རྟོགས་པ་ལས་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་སྐད་ཆ་ལྟ་བུ་སྟོན་ཚར་བ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ནང་འཁོར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་ཨིན་རྟགས་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་རྟགས་ཀྱི་ངོ་བོའི་ཡིག We conduct a comparative evaluation against previous embeddings and find that our embeddings are highly useful for downstream tasks: across four classic sequence labeling tasks we consistently outperform the previous state-of-the-art. དམིགས་བསལ་ནི། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞུང་ཡོངས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའ\ntasks:  https://github.com/zalandoresearch/flair'}
{'en': 'Variational Attention for Sequence-to-Sequence Models', 'pt': 'Atenção Variacional para Modelos de Sequência a Sequência', 'ar': 'الاهتمام المتغير لنماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل', 'fr': 'Attention variationnelle pour les modèles séquence à séquence', 'es': 'Atención variacional para modelos secuencia a secuencia', 'ja': '配列間モデルのバリエーションへの注意', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल के लिए परिवर्तनीय ध्यान', 'zh': '序至序者变分关', 'ru': 'Внимание к вариациям для моделей последовательности-последовательности', 'ga': 'Aird Athróg do Mhúnlaí Seicheamh-go-Seicheamh', 'ka': 'განსაზღვრებული მოდელების განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'Variációs figyelem a szekvencia-szekvencia modellekre', 'el': 'Προσοχή παραλλαγής για μοντέλα ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία', 'it': 'Attenzione variabile per i modelli sequenziali', 'kk': 'Түрлі реттеу үлгілерінің айнымалы назары', 'lt': 'Įvairus dėmesys sekos modeliams', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Perhatian Perubahan untuk Model Kelajuan-ke-Kelajuan', 'mt': 'Variational Attention for Sequence-to-Sequence Models', 'ml': 'സെക്കന്\u200dസ്- മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വേറിയല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ', 'mn': 'Дараагийн-дараагийн загваруудын өөрчлөлт анхаарал', 'no': 'Variansjonal merking på sekvens- til- sekvensmodeller', 'ro': 'Atenție variabilă pentru modelele secvență-secvență', 'pl': 'Wariantowa uwaga dla modeli sekwencji do sekwencji', 'sr': 'Varijacionalna pažnja za modele sekvence do sekvence', 'si': 'වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් අවධානය', 'so': 'Dhaqdhaqaaq kala duduwan', 'sv': 'Variationsuppmärksamhet för sekvensmodeller', 'ta': 'வரிசையில் இருந்து வரிசை மாதிரிகளுக்கு மாறிகள் கவனம்', 'ur': 'سکوئنس-تا-سکوئنس موڈل کے لئے ویریشن توجه', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chú ý giá trị dãy', 'da': 'Variationsopmærksomhed for sekvensmodeller', 'bg': 'Вариационно внимание при моделите последователност към последователност', 'nl': 'Variatieve aandacht voor opeenvolgingsmodellen', 'hr': 'Varijacijska pažnja za modele sekvence do sekvence', 'de': 'Variations-Aufmerksamkeit für Sequenz-zu-Sequenz Modelle', 'id': 'Perhatian Variasi untuk Model Sequensi-ke-Sequensi', 'fa': 'توجه متفاوتی برای مدل\u200cهای بعدی و بعدی', 'sw': 'Variational Attention for Sequence-to-Sequence Models', 'tr': 'Syzlanma-tä-Syzlanma Modelleri üçin üýtgeşik', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Vëmendje variative për modelet sekuence-to-sequence', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Հաջորդականության և հաջորդականության մոդելների բազմազան ուշադրություն', 'az': 'Sequence-to-Sequence ModellÉ™ri Ă¼Ă§Ă¼n dÉ™yiÅŸiklik Dikkati', 'bn': 'সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স মোডেলের জন্য বিভিন্ন মনোযোগ', 'bs': 'Varijantna pažnja za modele sekvence do sekvence', 'ca': 'Atenció variacional pels models de secuencia a secuencia', 'ko': '시퀀스에서 시퀀스 모델로의 변분 주의', 'cs': 'Variační pozornost pro modely sekvence na sekvenci', 'fi': 'Sekvenssimallien variaatiohuomio', 'et': 'Variatsiooniline tähelepanu järjestuse-järjestuse mudelitele', 'jv': 'Attribute', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'תשומת לב שונה למודלים רצף-לרצף', 'sk': 'Variacijska pozornost za modele od zaporedja do zaporedja', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་དབྱེ་རིམ་དབྱེ་བ་ལ་སྤྲོད་པའི་སྣ་ཚོགས'}
{'en': 'The variational encoder-decoder (VED) encodes source information as a set of random variables using a neural network, which in turn is decoded into target data using another neural network. In natural language processing, sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) models typically serve as encoder-decoder networks. When combined with a traditional (deterministic) attention mechanism, the variational latent space may be bypassed by the attention model, and thus becomes ineffective. In this paper, we propose a variational attention mechanism for VED, where the attention vector is also modeled as Gaussian distributed random variables. Results on two experiments show that, without loss of quality, our proposed method alleviates the bypassing phenomenon as it increases the diversity of generated sentences.', 'es': 'El codificador-decodificador variacional (VED) codifica la información de origen como un conjunto de variables aleatorias utilizando una red neuronal, que a su vez se decodifica en datos objetivo utilizando otra red neuronal. En el procesamiento del lenguaje natural, los modelos de secuencia a secuencia (Seq2Seq) suelen servir como redes de codificadores-decodificadores. Cuando se combina con un mecanismo de atención tradicional (determinista), el modelo de atención puede eludir el espacio latente variacional y, por lo tanto, se vuelve ineficaz. En este artículo, proponemos un mecanismo de atención variacional para VED, donde el vector de atención también se modela como variables aleatorias distribuidas gaussianas. Los resultados de dos experimentos muestran que, sin pérdida de calidad, nuestro método propuesto alivia el fenómeno de la derivación a medida que aumenta la diversidad de oraciones generadas.', 'ar': 'يقوم جهاز فك التشفير المتغير (VED) بترميز معلومات المصدر كمجموعة من المتغيرات العشوائية باستخدام شبكة عصبية ، والتي بدورها يتم فك تشفيرها إلى بيانات مستهدفة باستخدام شبكة عصبية أخرى. في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية ، تعمل نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل (Seq2Seq) عادةً كشبكات فك التشفير. عندما يقترن بآلية انتباه تقليدية (حتمية) ، قد يتم تجاوز المساحة الكامنة المتغيرة بواسطة نموذج الانتباه ، وبالتالي تصبح غير فعالة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح آلية انتباه متغيرة لـ VED ، حيث يتم نمذجة متجه الانتباه أيضًا كمتغيرات عشوائية موزعة على Gaussian. تظهر النتائج في تجربتين أنه بدون فقدان الجودة ، فإن طريقتنا المقترحة تخفف من ظاهرة التجاوز لأنها تزيد من تنوع الجمل المولدة.', 'fr': "Le codeur-décodeur variationnel (VED) code les informations sources sous la forme d'un ensemble de variables aléatoires au moyen d'un réseau neuronal, qui à son tour est décodé en données cibles au moyen d'un autre réseau neuronal. Dans le traitement du langage naturel, les modèles séquence à séquence (Seq2Seq) servent généralement de réseaux encodeur-décodeur. Lorsqu'il est combiné à un mécanisme d'attention traditionnel (déterministe), l'espace latent variationnel peut être contourné par le modèle d'attention, et devient ainsi inefficace. Dans cet article, nous proposons un mécanisme d'attention variationnelle pour la VED, où le vecteur d'attention est également modélisé sous forme de variables aléatoires distribuées gaussiennes. Les résultats de deux expériences montrent que, sans perte de qualité, notre méthode proposée atténue le phénomène de contournement en augmentant la diversité des phrases générées.", 'pt': 'O codificador-decodificador variacional (VED) codifica as informações de origem como um conjunto de variáveis aleatórias usando uma rede neural, que por sua vez é decodificada em dados de destino usando outra rede neural. No processamento de linguagem natural, os modelos de sequência a sequência (Seq2Seq) normalmente servem como redes de codificador-decodificador. Quando combinado com um mecanismo de atenção tradicional (determinístico), o espaço latente variacional pode ser contornado pelo modelo de atenção e, assim, torna-se ineficaz. Neste artigo, propomos um mecanismo de atenção variacional para VED, onde o vetor de atenção também é modelado como variáveis aleatórias distribuídas gaussianas. Os resultados de dois experimentos mostram que, sem perda de qualidade, nosso método proposto ameniza o fenômeno de bypass, pois aumenta a diversidade de sentenças geradas.', 'ja': '変動型エンコーダデコーダ（ ｖｅｄ ）は、ニューラルネットワークを使用してランダム変数のセットとしてソース情報を符号化し、次に別のニューラルネットワークを使用してターゲットデータに復号化される。自然言語処理において、シーケンスツーシーケンス（ Ｓｅｑ ２ Ｓｅｑ ）モデルは、典型的には、エンコーダデコーダネットワークとして機能する。従来の（決定論的な）注目メカニズムと組み合わせると、変動潜在空間は注目モデルによって迂回され得るため、効果がない。本稿では、注意ベクトルもガウス分布ランダム変数としてモデル化されるVEDの変動注意メカニズムを提案する。2つの実験の結果は、品質を損なうことなく、生成された文章の多様性を高めるため、バイパス現象を緩和することを示しています。', 'zh': '变分编码器解码器(VED)用神经网络将源信息编码为一朋随机变量,然后用一神经网络以解码为的数。 于自然语言处之,序于序(Seq2Seq)常以为编码器- 解码器网络。 当与旧(确定性之),意机相合,或绕变分潜伏,因而无效。 本文VED变分机制,建模建模为斯布随机变量。 二实验结果表明者,不损其质,吾道损其迂者,以其增句之多样性也。', 'ru': 'Вариационный кодер-декодер (VED) кодирует исходную информацию как набор случайных переменных с использованием нейронной сети, которая, в свою очередь, декодируется в целевые данные с использованием другой нейронной сети. В естественной языковой обработке модели последовательности (Seq2Seq) обычно служат сетями кодировщик-декодер. В сочетании с традиционным (детерминированным) механизмом внимания вариационное скрытое пространство может быть обойдено моделью внимания и, таким образом, становится неэффективным. В этой работе мы предлагаем вариационный механизм внимания для VED, где вектор внимания также моделируется как распределенные случайные переменные Гаусса. Результаты двух экспериментов показывают, что без потери качества предлагаемый нами метод облегчает явление обхода, поскольку он увеличивает разнообразие сгенерированных предложений.', 'hi': 'परिवर्तनीय एन्कोडर-डिकोडर (वीईडी) एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके यादृच्छिक चर के एक सेट के रूप में स्रोत जानकारी को एन्कोड करता है, जिसे बदले में एक अन्य तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करके लक्ष्य डेटा में डीकोड किया जाता है। प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में, अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम (Seq2Seq) मॉडल आमतौर पर एनकोडर-डिकोडर नेटवर्क के रूप में कार्य करते हैं। जब एक पारंपरिक (नियतात्मक) ध्यान तंत्र के साथ जोड़ा जाता है, तो भिन्नतात्मक अव्यक्त स्थान को ध्यान मॉडल द्वारा दरकिनार किया जा सकता है, और इस प्रकार अप्रभावी हो जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम वीईडी के लिए एक भिन्नतापूर्ण ध्यान तंत्र का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जहां ध्यान वेक्टर को गाऊसी वितरित यादृच्छिक चर के रूप में भी मॉडलिंग की जाती है। दो प्रयोगों के परिणाम बताते हैं कि, गुणवत्ता के नुकसान के बिना, हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि बाईपासिंग घटना को कम करती है क्योंकि यह उत्पन्न वाक्यों की विविधता को बढ़ाती है।', 'ga': 'Ionchódaíonn an díchódóir-ionchódóir athraitheach (VED) faisnéis foinseach mar thacar athróg randamach ag baint úsáide as líonra néarchóras, a dhíchódaítear ina sprioc-shonraí ag baint úsáide as líonra néareolaíoch eile. I bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha, feidhmíonn samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh (Seq2Seq) mar líonraí ionchódóra-díchódóra. Nuair a dhéantar é a chomhcheangal le meicníocht aird thraidisiúnta (cinntitheach), féadfaidh an tsamhail aire an spás folaigh athraitheach a sheachaint, agus mar sin éiríonn sé neamhéifeachtach. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid meicníocht aird athraitheach do VED, ina ndéantar an veicteoir aird a shamhaltú freisin mar athróga randamach dáilte Gaussach. Léiríonn torthaí ar dhá thurgnamh, gan chailliúint cáilíochta, go maolaíonn ár modh molta an feiniméan seachaint mar go méadaíonn sé éagsúlacht na n-abairtí ginte.', 'ka': 'გარიციონალური კოდერი- ევკოდერი (VED) იქნება მხოლოდ ინფორმაციას როგორც გამოყენება ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენებული შეცვლელების ნახვა, რომელიც სხვა ნეიროლური ქსელის გამოყენება თავისუფალური ენის პროცესიაში, sequence- to- sequence (Seq2Seq) მოდელები ტიპოლურად იყენებენ როგორც კოდერის- ევკოდერის ქსელებით. როცა ტრადიციონალური (დერისტიური) აღმოჩენის მექანსისთვის შემდეგ გარიაციონალური ლატენტიური სივრცე შეიძლება აღმოჩენა აღმოჩენის მოდელზე, და ამიტომ იქნება არა ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ გვაქვს განრავლებული გონისტური მექანსი VED-ს, სადაც გონისტური გვექტორი მოდელეულია როგორც დაუსიანის გაყოფილი შემდეგ ცვლილები. ორი ექსპერიმენტების შედეგები გამოჩვენება, რომ, საკუთარი წარმატებით, ჩვენი წარმატებული მეთოდომის გამოყენება გამოყენებული ფენომენოს, როგორც ის გამოყენებული წარმატე', 'el': 'Ο αποκωδικοποιητής μεταβλητών κωδικοποιεί τις πληροφορίες πηγής ως σύνολο τυχαίων μεταβλητών χρησιμοποιώντας ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο, το οποίο με τη σειρά του αποκωδικοποιείται σε δεδομένα στόχου χρησιμοποιώντας ένα άλλο νευρωνικό δίκτυο. Στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας, τα μοντέλα ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας (Seq2Seq) χρησιμοποιούνται συνήθως ως δίκτυα κωδικοποιητών-αποκωδικοποιητών. Όταν συνδυαστεί με έναν παραδοσιακό (ντετερμινιστικό) μηχανισμό προσοχής, ο λανθάνοντας μεταβλητός χώρος μπορεί να παρακάμψει το μοντέλο προσοχής και έτσι να καταστεί αναποτελεσματικός. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε έναν μηχανισμό μεταβλητής προσοχής για την VED, όπου το διάνυσμα προσοχής μοντελοποιείται επίσης ως Gaussian κατανεμημένες τυχαίες μεταβλητές. Τα αποτελέσματα δύο πειραμάτων δείχνουν ότι, χωρίς απώλεια ποιότητας, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος μετριάζει το φαινόμενο παράκαμψης καθώς αυξάνει την ποικιλομορφία των παραγόμενων προτάσεων.', 'hu': 'A variációs kódoló-dekóder (VED) a forrásinformációt véletlenszerű változóként kódolja egy neurális hálózat segítségével, amelyet viszont céladatokká dekódolnak egy másik neurális hálózat segítségével. A természetes nyelvfeldolgozásban a szekvencia-szekvencia (Seq2Seq) modellek jellemzően kódoló-dekódoló hálózatként szolgálnak. Egy hagyományos (determinisztikus) figyelemmechanizmussal kombinálva a variációs látens tér megkerülheti a figyelemmodell, így hatástalanná válik. Jelen tanulmányban egy variációs figyelem mechanizmust javasolunk VED-re, ahol a figyelem vektort Gauss elosztott random változóként is modellezzük. Két kísérlet eredményei azt mutatják, hogy minőségvesztés nélkül javasolt módszerünk enyhíti a megkerülési jelenséget, mivel növeli a generált mondatok sokszínűségét.', 'it': "L'encoder-decoder variazionale (VED) codifica le informazioni sorgente come un insieme di variabili casuali utilizzando una rete neurale, che a sua volta viene decodificata in dati target utilizzando un'altra rete neurale. Nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, i modelli sequenza-sequenza (Seq2Seq) servono tipicamente come reti encoder-decoder. Quando combinato con un meccanismo di attenzione tradizionale (deterministico), lo spazio latente variazionale può essere aggirato dal modello di attenzione, e quindi diventa inefficace. In questo articolo, proponiamo un meccanismo di attenzione variazionale per VED, dove il vettore di attenzione è anche modellato come variabili casuali distribuite gaussiane. I risultati di due esperimenti mostrano che, senza perdita di qualità, il nostro metodo proposto allevia il fenomeno bypass in quanto aumenta la diversità delle frasi generate.", 'lt': 'Variacinis koduotojas (VED) koduoja šaltinio informaciją kaip atsitiktinių kintamųjų rinkinį naudojant nervinį tinklą, kuris savo ruožtu yra koduotas į tikslinius duomenis naudojant kitą nervinį tinklą. Gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo procese sekos po sekos (Seq2Seq) modeliai paprastai naudojami kaip koduotojų ir dekoderių tinklai. Kartu su tradiciniu (lemiamuoju) dėmesio mechanizmu, dėmesio modelis gali ignoruoti latentinę erdvę, todėl ji tampa neveiksminga. Šiame dokumente siūlome skirtingo dėmesio VED mechanizmą, kuriame dėmesio vektorius taip pat modeliuojamas kaip Gausijos paskirstyti atsitiktiniai kintamieji. Dviejų eksperimentų rezultatai rodo, kad be kokybės praradimo mūsų siūlomas metodas palengvina praeinantį reiškinį, nes didina sukauptų sakinių įvairovę.', 'kk': 'Айнымалы кодер- декодері (VED) көзінің мәліметін невралды желі қолданатын кездейсоқ айнымалылықтар ретінде кодтады. Бұл басқа невралды желі менен мақсатты деректерге декодтады. Табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үлгілерінде, sequence- to- sequence (Seq2Seq) моделдері әдетте кодер- декодер желілері ретінде қолданылады. Дәстүрлі (deterministic) қызмет механизмімен біріктірілген кезде, әртүрлі latent кеңістік кеңістік кеңістігін өзгерту үлгісі болып, сондықтан бұл мүмкін емес болады. Бұл қағазда, VED үшін айырмашылық қатынас механизмін ұсынамыз. Бұл қағазда қатынас векторы басқа қатынасыз кездейсоқ айнымалылықтар ретінде үлгіледі. Екі тәжірибенің нәтижесі, сапасы жоғалмай, біздің таңдалған әдіміміз жасалған сөйлемелердің әртүрлігін көбейту үшін өзгертіп жатыр.', 'mk': 'Варијационалниот кодер- декодер (VED) ги кодира изворните информации како набор на случајни променливи користејќи неврална мрежа, која е декодирана во метни податоци користејќи друга неврална мрежа. Во природното обработување на јазикот, моделите од секвенца до секвенца (Seq2Seq) обично служат како мрежи за декодирање на кодери. Кога се комбинира со традиционален (децентристички) механизам на внимание, варијационалниот лантен простор може да биде избегнат од моделот на внимание, и така станува неефикасен. Во овој документ, предложуваме варијационален механизам на внимание за ВЕД, каде што векторот на внимание, исто така, е моделиран како гауски дистрибуирани случајни променливи. Results on two experiments show that, without loss of quality, our proposed method alleviates the bypassing phenomenon as it increases the diversity of generated sentences.', 'ms': 'Pengekod-pengekod variasi (VED) mengekodkan maklumat sumber sebagai set pembolehubah rawak menggunakan rangkaian saraf, yang pada gilirannya disedekod ke data sasaran menggunakan rangkaian saraf lain. In natural language processing, sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) models typically serve as encoder-decoder networks.  Apabila digabungkan dengan mekanisme perhatian tradisional (deterministic), ruang tersembunyi variasi boleh dilewati oleh model perhatian, dan jadi tidak berkesan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan mekanisme perhatian variasi untuk VED, di mana vektor perhatian juga dipodelkan sebagai pembolehubah rawak yang disebarkan Gaussia. Hasil dua eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa, tanpa kehilangan kualiti, kaedah kami diusulkan mengurangkan fenomena penghalang kerana ia meningkatkan pelbagai kalimat yang dijana.', 'ml': 'മറ്റൊരു നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സോര്\u200dസ് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എന്\u200dകോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്ന മാറ്റങ്ങളായി മാറിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിനുശേഷം മറ് സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d, സെക്സെക്സെക്സിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി കോഡെര്\u200d ഡെകോഡെര്\u200d നെറ്റുകളായി സേവിക ഒരു പാരമ്പര്യമായ (നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന) ശ്രദ്ധ വ്യവസ്ഥയോടൊപ്പം കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d, മാറിവെച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥലം ശ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വെവിഡിക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യസ്ത ശ്രദ്ധ മെനിസ്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അവിടെ ഗാസ്സിയന്\u200d വിതരണം ചെയ്ത രണ്ടു പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതി നഷ്ടപ്പെടാതെ നമ്മുടെ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കപ്പെട', 'mt': 'Il-varjazzjoni tal-kodifikatur-dekoder (VED) tikkodifika l-informazzjoni tas-sors bħala sett ta’ varjabbli aleatorji bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali, li min-naħa tiegħu jiġi dekodifikat f’dejta fil-mira bl-użu ta’ netwerk newrali ieħor. Fl-ipproċessar naturali tal-lingwi, mudelli minn sekwenza għal sekwenza (Seq2Seq) tipikament iservu bħala netwerks ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder. When combined with a traditional (deterministic) attention mechanism, the variational latent space may be bypassed by the attention model, and thus becomes ineffective.  F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni varjazzjonali għall-VED, fejn il-vettur tal-attenzjoni huwa mmudellat ukoll bħala varjabbli każwali distribwiti Gaussjani. Ir-riżultati fuq żewġ esperimenti juru li, mingħajr telf ta’ kwalità, il-metodu propost tagħna jtaffi l-fenomenu ta’ evażjoni billi jżid id-diversità tas-sentenzi ġġenerati.', 'no': 'Variasjonal koding- koding (VED) kodar kjeldeinformasjon som eit sett av tilfeldige variabler med ein neuralnettverk, som i tillegg er dekodert til måldatar med ein annan neuralnettverk. I naturleg språk-handsaming kan modeller sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) normalt brukast som koderingsnettverk. Når det er kombinert med ein tradisjonell (deterministisk) oppmerksmekanisme, kan det variasjonale latentet plassen bli overført av oppmerksmodellen, og derfor blir ikkje effektivt. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein variasjonal oppmerksmekanisme for VED, der oppmerksvektoren også er modelert som Gaussiansk distribuert tilfeldige variabler. Resultat på to eksperimenter viser at, utan tapt av kvaliteten, vår foreslått metode reduserer den gjennomgåande fenomenen sidan den øker mangfolden av genererte setningar.', 'mn': 'Өөр өөрчлөлтийн кодер-декодер (VED) нь эх үүсвэрийн мэдээллийг мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглан санамсаргүй хувьсагчийн хэлбэрүүд болгон коддог. Энэ нь өөр мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ашиглан зорилготой өгөгдлийн хувь Байгалийн хэл процесс дээр дарааллаас дарааллаар (Seq2Seq) загварууд ихэвчлэн кодлогчийн сүлжээ болдог. Ууламжлалт (deterministic) анхаарлын механизмтэй холбогдоход, анхаарлын загвар нь өөр өөр өнцөг зай нь анхаарлын загвараар алдагдах боломжтой. Иймээс үр дүнгүй болдог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид VED-ийн төлөө төрлийн анхаарлын механизмийг санал болгож байна. Гауссийн төлөөлөгчийн төлөөлөгчийн хувьсагчийн төлөөлөгчийн төлөөлөгчийн төлөөлөгчийн төлөөлөгчийн төлөө Хоёр туршилтын үр дүнд бидний санал өгсөн арга нь чадварыг алдаггүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний санал өгсөн арга нь үйлдвэрлэх үзэгдлийг багасгаж байна.', 'pl': 'Koder-dekoder wariancyjny (VED) koduje informacje źródłowe jako zestaw zmiennych losowych za pomocą sieci neuronowej, która z kolei jest dekodowana w dane docelowe za pomocą innej sieci neuronowej. W przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego modele sekwencji-sekwencji (Seq2Seq) zazwyczaj służą jako sieci kodera-dekodera. W połączeniu z tradycyjnym (deterministycznym) mechanizmem uwagi wariancyjna przestrzeń utajona może zostać ominięta przez model uwagi, a tym samym staje się nieskuteczna. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy wariancyjny mechanizm uwagi dla VED, gdzie wektor uwagi jest również modelowany jako Gaussowskie rozproszone zmienne losowe. Wyniki dwóch eksperymentów pokazują, że bez utraty jakości, proponowana metoda łagodzi zjawisko omijania, zwiększając różnorodność generowanych zdań.', 'ro': 'Encoder-decoder variațional (VED) codează informațiile sursă ca un set de variabile aleatorii folosind o rețea neurală, care, la rândul său, este decodată în date țintă folosind o altă rețea neurală. În procesarea limbajului natural, modelele secvență-la-secvență (Seq2Seq) servesc de obicei ca rețele encoder-decoder. Atunci când este combinat cu un mecanism tradițional de atenție (determinist), spațiul latent variațional poate fi ocolit de modelul atenției, devenind astfel ineficient. În această lucrare, propunem un mecanism variațional de atenție pentru VED, unde vectorul atenției este, de asemenea, modelat ca variabile aleatorii distribuite Gaussian. Rezultatele celor două experimente arată că, fără pierderi de calitate, metoda propusă atenuează fenomenul de ocolire, deoarece crește diversitatea propozițiilor generate.', 'si': 'වෙනස් කෝඩාර්-ඩිකෝඩර් (VED) මුළු තොරතුරු කෝඩ් කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය භාවිත වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් සැකයක් විදියට, ඒක අ ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාසයෙන්, sequence- to- sequence (Seq2Seq) මොඩේල් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට කෝඩර් ඩිකෝඩර් ජාලය වල ස සාමාන්\u200dය (විශ්වාසික) අවධානය සැකසුම් සමග සම්බන්ධ වුනාම, අවධානය අවධානය අවධානයෙන් අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන මේ පැත්තට, අපි VED වෙනුවෙන් වෙනස් අවධාන පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම අවධාන වෙක්ටර් ගෝසියාන් වෙනුවෙන්  පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් ගැන ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නැති විදියට, අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ', 'so': "Qordirada codsiga kala duwan (VED) waxay macluumaad sourceed ah ugu qoran yihiin koox kala duwan oo kala duwan oo ku isticmaalaya shabakadda neurada, taas oo loogu beddelaa macluumaad kaalmo ah oo isticmaalaya shabakadda neurada kale. Isticmaalka afka dabiiciga ah waxaa sida caadiga ah u adeega shabakado kookooxerada. Marka lagu xiriiro meyminimo caadiga ah (xuquuqda) oo aad taxadar u leedahay, waxaa laga yaabaa in goobta kala beddelan lagu soo dhaafo modelka dareemada, taasuna waxay noqon kartaa mid aan waxtar lahayn. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa meyminimo kala duwan ee VED, kaas oo lagu sameynayo wadanka xanaaneynta sida Gaussian u kala qaybiyey bedelayaal. Midhaha labada baaritaanka waxaa ka muuqata in qaab la'aan ah qaabkeenkeenu uu soo jeeday inuu fududeeyo baaritaanka marka ay kordhiso kala duduwan hadallada dhalatay.", 'sr': 'Varijacionalni koder-dekoder (VED) kodira izvornu informaciju kao setu nasumičnih promjena koristeći neuralnu mrežu, koja je u turn dekodirana u ciljne podatke koristeći drugu neuralnu mrežu. U prirodnoj obradi jezika, modeli sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) obično služe kao mreže kodera. Kada se kombinira sa tradicionalnim (determinističkim) pažnjom, variacionalni latentni prostor može da prebaci model pažnje, i tako postane neiffektivan. U ovom papiru predlažemo variacionalni mehanizam pažnje za VED, gdje je i vektor pažnje modeliran kao slučajne varijante Gausijanca. Rezultati dva eksperimenta pokazuju da, bez gubitka kvalitete, naša predložena metoda smanjuje prošli fenomen jer povećava raznolikost proizvedenih rečenica.', 'sv': 'Variational encoder-dekoder (VED) kodar källinformation som en uppsättning slumpmässiga variabler med hjälp av ett neuralt nätverk, som i sin tur avkodas till måldata med hjälp av ett annat neuralt nätverk. Vid behandling av naturligt språk fungerar sekvens-till-sekvens (Seq2Seq) modeller vanligtvis som kodare-avkodare nätverk. När det kombineras med en traditionell (deterministisk) uppmärksamhetsmekanism, kan det variationella latenta rummet kringgås av uppmärksamhetsmodellen, och därmed blir ineffektivt. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en variationsuppmärksamhetsmekanism för VED, där uppmärksamhetsvektorn också modelleras som gaussiska distribuerade slumpvariabler. Resultat från två experiment visar att vår föreslagna metod, utan kvalitetsförlust, lindrar kringgående fenomenet eftersom den ökar mångfalden av genererade meningar.', 'ta': 'மாறிகள் குறியீடு- குறியீட்டாளர் (VED) மூலத்தின் தகவலை ஒரு குறியீட்டிடும் குறியீட்டாக்கும் புதிய பிணையத்தை பயன்படுத்தி குறியீடு இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலில், பின்வரிசையில் இருந்து தொடர்ச்சி( Seq2Seq) மாதிரிகள் வழக்கமாக குறியீட்டாளர் குறியீட ஒரு மரபார்ந்த (நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட) கவனம் முறைமையுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டால், மாறிகள் சமீபத்தில் வெளியேறு இடம் கவனத்தின் மாதிரியால் ம இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் VED க்கு ஒரு மாறுபாடு கவனத்தின் முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அங்கு கவனத்தின் நெறிமுறை காஸ்சியன் வழங இரண்டு சோதனைகளின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'ویریشن اکڈر-ڈیکوڈر (VED) سورج معلومات کو نیورال نیٹ ورک کے مطابق ایک مجموعہ کے طور پر سٹ کے ذریعہ اکڈ کرتا ہے، جسے دوسرے نیورل نیٹ ورک کے مطابق موجود ڈائٹ میں ڈکوڈ کیا جاتا ہے. طبیعی زبان پردازشی میں، sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) موڈل معمولاً اکڈر-ڈیکڈر نیٹ ورک کے طور پر عمل کرتے ہیں. جب ایک سنتی (مقررہ) توجه مکانیسم کے ساتھ ملے تو متفاوت لاٹینٹ فضا کو توجه کی مدل سے دفع کر سکتا ہے اور اسی طرح غیرفعال ہوجاتا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے VED کے لئے ایک متغیر توجه مکانیسم کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جہاں توجه ویکتور بھی گاوسی کی طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر دو آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کے بغیر کیفیت کا خسارہ نہیں ہوتا، اس طریقہ سے کہ یہ پیدا ہوئے جماعت کی مختلف طریقہ کو کمزور کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Natalik tilni boshqarish uchun seksiyatlar (Seq2Seq) modellari oddiy koddekoder tarmoqlari sifatida ishlatiladi. When combined with a traditional (deterministic) attention mechanism, the variational latent space may be bypassed by the attention model, and thus becomes ineffective.  Bu qogʻozda biz VED uchun variant taqdimot mechanisini tahlil qilamiz. Bu yerda foydalanuvchi vektori oddiy oʻzgarishlar kabi Gaussian tarqatishda modellanadi. Ikki tajriba natijalari sifatida qo'llanmagan so'zlarimiz o'zgarishni o'zgartiradi. Chunki u yaratilgan soʻzlarning tarqatish kuchini oshirishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự giải mã đa số (VED) đã mã hóa nguồn thông tin như một bộ số ngẫu nhiên dùng mạng thần kinh, thứ được giải mã thành dữ liệu đích bằng một mạng thần kinh khác. Trong chế độ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, các mô- trình-tới-trình (Sep2Seq) được dùng như hệ thống mã hóa. Khi kết hợp với cơ chế tập trung truyền thống (bộ phân biệt) có thể tránh được các khoảng trống tiềm ẩn khác nhau từ mô hình chú ý, và trở nên vô dụng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ chế tập trung đa số cho DEO, nơi mà véc- tơ chú ý cũng được mô hình hóa như các biến số kiểu Gauss phân phối ngẫu nhiên. Kết quả của hai thí nghiệm cho thấy, mà không mất chất lượng, phương pháp đề nghị giúp giảm bỏ qua hiện tượng khi nó tăng sự khác biệt trong các câu trích tạo ra.', 'bg': 'Вариационалният кодер-декодер кодира източната информация като набор от случайни променливи, използвайки невронна мрежа, която от своя страна се декодира в целеви данни с помощта на друга невронна мрежа. При обработката на естествен език моделите последователност към последователност (Seq2Seq) обикновено служат като кодер-декодерни мрежи. Когато се комбинира с традиционен (детерминистичен) механизъм на внимание, вариационното латентно пространство може да бъде заобиколено от модела на вниманието и по този начин става неефективно. В тази статия предлагаме вариационен механизъм за внимание за ВЕД, където векторът на вниманието също е моделиран като гаусови разпределени случайни променливи. Резултатите от два експеримента показват, че без загуба на качество, предложеният метод облекчава заобикалянето на явлението, тъй като увеличава разнообразието на генерираните изречения.', 'nl': 'De variantionele encoder-decoder (VED) codeert broninformatie als een reeks willekeurige variabelen met behulp van een neuraal netwerk, dat op zijn beurt wordt gedecodeerd in doelgegevens met behulp van een ander neuraal netwerk. Bij de verwerking van natuurlijke taal dienen sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) modellen meestal als encoder-decoder netwerken. In combinatie met een traditioneel (deterministisch) aandachtsmechanisme kan de variatiele latente ruimte worden omzeild door het aandachtsmodel, waardoor deze ineffectief wordt. In dit artikel stellen we een variatieel aandachtsmechanisme voor voor VED, waarbij de aandachtsvector ook wordt gemodelleerd als Gaussiaanse gedistribueerde willekeurige variabelen. Resultaten van twee experimenten tonen aan dat, zonder kwaliteitsverlies, onze voorgestelde methode het bypassing fenomeen verlicht omdat het de diversiteit van gegenereerde zinnen vergroot.', 'da': 'Variational encoder-dekoder (VED) koder kildeoplysninger som et sæt af tilfældige variabler ved hjælp af et neuralt netværk, som igen afkodes til måldata ved hjælp af et andet neuralt netværk. I naturlig sprogbehandling fungerer sekvens-til-sekvens (Seq2Seq) modeller typisk som encoder-dekoder netværk. Når det kombineres med en traditionel (deterministisk) opmærksomhedsmekanisme, kan det variable latente rum omgås af opmærksomhedsmodellen og dermed blive ineffektivt. I denne artikel foreslår vi en variabel opmærksomhedsmekanisme for VED, hvor opmærksomhedsvektoren også modelleres som Gaussiske distribuerede tilfældige variabler. Resultater fra to eksperimenter viser, at vores foreslåede metode, uden tab af kvalitet, lindrer omgående fænomenet, da det øger diversiteten af genererede sætninger.', 'de': 'Der Variational Encoder-Decoder (VED) codiert Quellinformationen als eine Reihe von Zufallsvariablen unter Verwendung eines neuronalen Netzes, das wiederum mit Hilfe eines anderen neuronalen Netzes in Zieldaten dekodiert wird. Bei der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache dienen Sequenz-zu-Sequenz (Seq2Seq)-Modelle typischerweise als Encoder-Decoder-Netzwerke. In Kombination mit einem traditionellen (deterministischen) Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus kann der Variationsraum durch das Aufmerksamkeitsmodell umgangen werden und wird somit unwirksam. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen Variationsmechanismus für VED vor, bei dem der Aufmerksamkeitsvektor auch als Gauß verteilte Zufallsvariablen modelliert wird. Die Ergebnisse zweier Experimente zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagene Methode ohne Qualitätsverlust das Bypassing-Phänomen lindert, da sie die Vielfalt der erzeugten Sätze erhöht.', 'hr': 'Varijacionalni koder-dekoder (VED) kodira izvorne informacije kao setu nasumičnih promjena koristeći neuralnu mrežu, koja je u turn dekodirana u ciljne podatke koristeći drugu neuronu mrežu. U prirodnoj obradi jezika, modeli sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) obično služe kao mreže kodera. Kada se kombinira sa tradicionalnim (determinističkim) mehanizam pažnje, variacionalni latentni prostor može zamijeniti modelom pažnje i tako postati neefektivan. U ovom papiru predlažemo variacionalni mehanizam pažnje za VED-u, gdje se i vektor pažnje modelira kao slučajne varijacije distribucije Gaussian a. Rezultati dva eksperimenta pokazuju da, bez gubitka kvalitete, naša predložena metoda smanjuje prošli fenomen jer povećava raznolikost proizvedenih rečenica.', 'id': 'Variasi encoder-decoder (VED) mengkode informasi sumber sebagai set variabel acak menggunakan jaringan saraf, yang bertukar menjadi data target menggunakan jaringan saraf lain. Dalam proses bahasa alam, model urutan-ke-urutan (Seq2Seq) biasanya melayani sebagai jaringan pengekode-dekoder. Ketika dikombinasikan dengan mekanisme perhatian tradisional (determinis), ruang laten variasi mungkin diabaikan oleh model perhatian, dan dengan itu menjadi tidak efektif. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan mekanisme perhatian variasi untuk VED, di mana vektor perhatian juga dipodelkan sebagai variabel acak yang didistribusikan Gaussia. Results on two experiments show that, without loss of quality, our proposed method alleviates the bypassing phenomenon as it increases the diversity of generated sentences.', 'tr': 'Çeşitli Ködler-kodeçi Natal diller işlemeginde, sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) modelleri adatça ködleme aňlary diýip işleýär. Däpli bir (deterministik) üns mekanizmasy bilen birleşende, üýtgeşik latent mekanizmasy üns nusgasy bilen geçirilip biler we şol sebäpli netijeli bolar. Bu kağıt içinde, VED için farklı bir ilgi mehanizmini teklif ediyoruz ve dikkat vektörü de Gaussian bölünen tesadüf değerleri olarak modellendiriliyor. İki deneyde netijeler şol şekilde, kaliteden ýitilmekden soňra teklip eden yöntemimiz täsirli sözlerin näçenligini azaltýar.', 'sw': 'Kodi-decodi ya mabadiliko (VED) inajumuisha taarifa za vyanzo kama seti ya mabadiliko yasiyo na uhakika kwa kutumia mtandao wa neura, ambazo vingeuka kuwa takwimu za target kwa kutumia mtandao mwingine wa neurali. Katika upasuaji wa lugha asili, mifano ya mfululizo (Seq2Seq) kwa kawaida huhudumia kama mitandao ya kodi-decoder. Wakati ukiunganishwa na mfumo wa utamaduni (utamaduni) wa kusikiliza, nafasi ya mabadiliko ya hivi karibuni inaweza kupitishwa na muundo wa ufuatiliaji, na hivyo inakuwa haina ufanisi. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kutoa maoni tofauti kwa ajili ya VED, ambapo vector ya uchunguzi pia inatengenezwa kama mabadiliko ya asili ya Gaussia. Matokeo ya majaribio mawili yanaonyesha kuwa, bila kupoteza kiwango, njia yetu ya pendekezo inapunguza hali ya kutokea kwa sababu inaongezea tofauti ya adhabu zilizozaliwa.', 'fa': 'Encoder-decoder متفاوت (VED) اطلاعات منبع را به عنوان مجموعه از متغیرات تصادفی با استفاده از شبکه عصبی، که در عوض به داده های هدف با استفاده از شبکه عصبی دیگر دکتر می\u200cشود. در پردازش زبان طبیعی، مدل\u200cهای sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) معمولاً به عنوان شبکه\u200cهای رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزبندی می\u200cکنند. وقتی با یک مکانیسم توجه سنتی (تصدیق کننده) ترکیب می\u200cشود، فضا متفاوتی latent ممکن است از طریق مدل توجه تغییر دهد، و بدین\u200cسان بی\u200cتاثیر شود. در این کاغذ، ما یک مکانیسم توجه متفاوتی برای VED پیشنهاد می کنیم، جایی که ویکتور توجه همچنین به عنوان متغیرات تصادفی گوسی تقسیم شده است. نتیجه\u200cهای دو آزمایش نشان می\u200cدهد که بدون از دست دادن کیفیت، روش پیشنهاد ما رویداد غیرقابل تغییر می\u200cدهد، در حالی که مختلف جمله\u200cهای تولید شده را افزایش می\u200cدهد.', 'af': "Die variasionale enkoder- dekoder (VED) kodeer bron inligting as 'n stel van willekeurige veranderlikes gebruik 'n neuralnetwerk, wat in draai is dekodeer in doel data deur 'n ander neuralnetwerk te gebruik. In natuurlike taal verwerking, sekwensie- na- sekwensie (Seq2Seq) modele tipies dien as enkoder- dekodernetwerke. Wanneer gekombineer word met 'n tradisionele (deterministiese) aandag mekanisme, kan die variasionale latente ruimte deur die aandag-model verbygaan word en daarom oneffektief word. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n variasionale aandag mekanisme vir VED, waar die aandagvektor ook as Gaussian versprei willekeurige veranderlikes is. Resultate op twee eksperimente vertoon dat, sonder verlies van kwaliteit, ons voorgestelde metode die verwagte fenomene verklein as dit die verskeidigheid van genereerde setinge vergroot.", 'sq': 'Variacioni i koduesit-dekoderit (VED) kodon informacionin e burimit si një sërë variabilësh të rastësishme duke përdorur një rrjet nervor, i cili nga ana tjetër është dekoderuar në të dhëna objektive duke përdorur një rrjet tjetër nervor. In natural language processing, sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) models typically serve as encoder-decoder networks.  Kur kombinohet me një mekanizëm tradicional (përcaktues) vëmendjeje, hapësira variacionale e fshehtë mund të kalohet nga modeli i vëmendjes dhe kështu bëhet e paefektshme. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një mekanizëm variacioni vëmendjeje për VED, ku vektori i vëmendjes është modeluar gjithashtu si variabilët e shpërndarë të rastësishëm Gausian. Rezultatet e dy eksperimenteve tregojnë se, pa humbjen e cilësisë, metoda jonë e propozuar lehtëson fenomenin e kalimit ndërsa rrit diversitetin e fjalëve të gjeneratuara.', 'am': 'የውይይት የሆሄያት ኮድ-ኮድ (VED) የኩነቶች መረጃዎች የኩነቶች መረጃዎች በጠቅላላ መረብ ተጠቃሚ የተለየ ጥያቄ ሆኖ ይክፈትላቸዋል፤ በኋላም በሌላ ጀምር መረብ የተጠቃሚ መረብ ይሆኑበታል። በፍጥረቱ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ፣ ቁጥጥር-ወደ-sequence (Seq2Seq) ሞዴላዎች በተለየ ጊዜ የencoder-decoder መረብ እንዲሆን ይጠቀማሉ። ባሕላዊ (ፍጥረታዊ) ማስታወቂያ ማሰናከል በተጠቀሙ ጊዜ፣ የተለየ ቅርብ ቦታ በዓይነቱ ምሳሌ ያልፋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለVED የተለየ ትኩረት ማሰናከል እናስጀራለን፣ የጥያቄ vector እና ጋውስሲ የተለየ መለወጥ እንደተካፈለ ነው፡፡ በሁለቱ ፈተናዎች ላይ ፍሬዎች፣ ጥሩ ሳይጎድል የተዘጋጀውን የሥርዓት ግንኙነታችንን ሲያሳድጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Վերացիցիոն կոդեր-կոդերը (ՎԵԴ) կոդավորում է աղբյուրների տեղեկատվությունը որպես պատահական փոփոխականների համակարգ, օգտագործելով նեյրոնային ցանց, որը իր հերթին կոդավորվում է նպատակային տվյալների, օգտագործելով մեկ այլ նեյրոնային ցան Բնական լեզվի վերամշակում SeQ2SeQ-ի մոդելները սովորաբար ծառայում են որպես կոդեր-կոդեր ցանցեր: Երբ միավորվում է ավանդական (որոշող) ուշադրության մեխանիզմի հետ, ուշադրության մոդելը կարող է կորցնել տարբերակային թաքնված տարածքը, և այնպես դառնալ անարդյունավետ: In this paper, we propose a variational attention mechanism for VED, where the attention vector is also modeled as Gaussian distributed random variables.  Երկու փորձարկումների արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առանց որակի կորստի մեր առաջարկած մեթոդը նվազեցնում է պտտվող երևույթը, քանի որ այն բարձրացնում է ստեղծված նախադասությունների բազմազանությունը:', 'bn': 'ভেরিয়েশন এনকোডার- ডেকোডার (VED) একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে সোর্স তথ্য হিসেবে সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত ভেরিয়েল হিসেবে এনকোড করেছে, যা পরি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ায় সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স (Seq2Seq) মডেল সাধারণত এনকোডার-ডেকোডার নেটওয়ার্ক হিসেবে সেবা  যখন একটি ঐতিহ্যবাহী  (নির্ধারিত) মনোযোগ মাধ্যমের সাথে একত্রিত হয়, তখন ভিন্ন সাম্প্রতিক স্থান মনোযোগ মডেলের দ্বারা পাশ করা যাবে, এব এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ভিডির জন্য ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন মনোযোগ প্রস্তাব করি, যেখানে গাউসিয়ান বিতরণের ক্ষেত্রে মনোযোগ প্রদ দুটি পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে, মানের কোন ক্ষতি ছাড়া আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি হারিয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে যেহেতু তা প্রজন্মিত শাস্ত', 'ko': '변분 인코더 - 디코더(VED)는 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 원본 정보를 무작위 변수로 인코딩한 다음 다른 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 대상 데이터로 인코딩한다.자연 언어 처리에서 시퀀스부터 시퀀스(Seq2Seq) 모델은 일반적으로 인코더-디코더 네트워크로 사용된다.전통(확정성) 주의 메커니즘과 결합할 때 변화하는 잠재적 공간은 주의 모델에 의해 빙빙 돌면서 무효가 될 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 변분 주의 메커니즘을 제기했는데 그 중에서 주의 벡터도 고스 분포의 무작위 변수로 모델링되었다.두 실험의 결과에 따르면 질을 손상시키지 않는 상황에서 우리가 제시한 방법은 빙빙 돌아가는 현상을 감소시켰다. 왜냐하면 문장 생성의 다양성을 증가시켰기 때문이다.', 'bs': 'Varijacionalni koder-dekoder (VED) kodira izvornu informaciju kao setu nasumičnih promjena koristeći neuralnu mrežu, koja je u turn dekodirana u ciljne podatke koristeći drugu neuralnu mrežu. U prirodnoj obradi jezika, modeli sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) obično služe kao mreže kodera. Kada se kombinira sa tradicionalnim (determinističkim) mehanizam pažnje, variacionalni latentni prostor može biti prekinut pažnjom modelom i tako postati neiffektivan. U ovom papiru predlažemo variacionalni mehanizam pažnje za VED, gdje je i vektor pažnje modeliran kao nasumične varijacije distribucije Gausijana. Rezultati dva eksperimenta pokazuju da, bez gubitka kvalitete, naša predložena metoda smanjuje prošli fenomen jer povećava raznolikost proizvedenih rečenica.', 'et': 'Variatsioonikooder-dekooder (VED) kodeerib lähteinformatsiooni juhuslike muutujatena, kasutades närvivõrku, mis omakorda dekodeeritakse sihtandmeteks teise närvivõrgu abil. Loomuliku keele töötlemisel kasutatakse jadast järjestusse (Seq2Seq) mudeleid tavaliselt kodeerija-dekooderi võrkudena. Kui kombineeritakse traditsioonilise (deterministliku) tähelepanumehhanismiga, võib varieeruv latentne ruum tähelepanumudeli kaudu mööda hiilida ja see muutub ebatõhusaks. Käesolevas töös pakume välja VED variatsioonilise tähelepanu mehhanismi, kus tähelepanu vektor modelleeritakse ka Gaussi jaotatud juhuslike muutujatena. Kahe katse tulemused näitavad, et kvaliteedi kaotamata leevendab meie kavandatud meetod möödumise nähtust, suurendades genereeritud lausete mitmekesisust.', 'ca': "El codificador-decodificador variacional (VED) codifica la informació de fonts com un conjunt de variables aleatòries utilitzant una xarxa neural, que a la vegada està decodificada en dades destinatòries utilitzant una altra xarxa neural. En el processament natural de llenguatges, els models seqüència a seqüència (Seq2Seq) serveixen típicament com a xarxes de codificadors. Quan es combina amb un mecanisme d'atenció tradicional (determinista), l'espai latent variacional pot ser superat pel model d'atenció i, per tant, esdevé ineficat. En aquest paper, proposem un mecanisme d'atenció variacional per a la VED, on el vector d'atenció també es modela com variables aleatòries distribuïdes gaussianes. Els resultats de dos experiments mostren que, sense pèrdua de qualitat, el nostre mètode proposat alivia el fenomen de circumència mentre augmenta la diversitat de frases generades.", 'cs': 'Variační kodér-dekodér (VED) kóduje zdrojové informace jako sadu náhodných proměnných pomocí neuronové sítě, která je dekódována do cílových dat pomocí jiné neuronové sítě. Při zpracování přirozeného jazyka modely sekvence-to-sekvence (Seq2Seq) obvykle slouží jako sítě kodérů a dekodérů. V kombinaci s tradičním (deterministickým) mechanismem pozornosti může být variační latentní prostor obcházen modelem pozornosti, a tím se stává neúčinným. V tomto článku navrhujeme variační mechanismus pozornosti pro VED, kde je vektor pozornosti modelován také jako Gaussovské distribuované náhodné proměnné. Výsledky dvou experimentů ukazují, že naše navržená metoda bez ztráty kvality zmírňuje fenomén bypass, protože zvyšuje rozmanitost generovaných vět.', 'fi': 'Variaatiokooderi-dekooderi (VED) koodaa lähdetiedot satunnaismuuttujien joukkona käyttäen neuroverkkoa, joka puolestaan dekoodataan kohdedataksi käyttämällä toista neuroverkkoa. Luonnonkielen käsittelyssä Seq2Seq-mallit toimivat tyypillisesti kooderi-dekooderiverkoina. Kun se yhdistetään perinteiseen (deterministiseen) huomiomekanismiin, huomiomalli voi ohittaa piilevän avaruuden, jolloin siitä tulee tehoton. Tässä työssä ehdotamme VED:n variaatiohuomiomekanismia, jossa huomiovektori mallinnetaan myös Gaussin hajautettuina satunnaismuuttujina. Kahdesta kokeesta saadut tulokset osoittavat, että ilman laadun heikkenemistä ehdotettu menetelmä lievittää ohittamista, koska se lisää luotujen lauseiden monimuotoisuutta.', 'az': 'DeńüiŇüiklik kodlayńĪcńĪ (VED) m…ônb…ô m…ôlumatńĪnńĪ bir neyral a ńü vasit…ôsil…ô istifad…ô ed…ôn t…ôsirli d…ôyiŇüiklik kimi kodlayńĪr. Bu, baŇüqa n√∂ral ańü vasit…ôsil…ô m…ôlumat m…ôlumatńĪna kodlanńĪr. T…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ôsind…ô, sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) modelleri genellikle kodlayńĪcńĪ ańülarńĪ olaraq iŇül…ôyir. D…ôst…ôliyi (deterministik) g√∂zl…ôm…ô mehńĀnismi il…ô birl…ôŇüdirildikd…ô, d…ôyiŇüiklik latent alanńĪ g√∂zl…ôm…ô modeli il…ô d…ôyiŇüib ed…ô bil…ôr v…ô buna g√∂r…ô d…ô he√ß bir fayda verm…ôz. Bu kańüńĪzda, VED √ľ√ß√ľn variasiyonlu t…ôsirli bir mehanizmi t…ôklif edirik, paylaŇüma vektoru da Gaussian t…ôsirli d…ôyiŇüiklik kimi modell…ôŇüdirildir. ńįki eksperimentin sonu√ßlarńĪ g√∂st…ôrir ki, t…ôklif edilmiŇü metodumuz, t…ôklif edilmiŇü c√ľml…ôl…ôrin m√ľxt…ôlifliyini artńĪrmasńĪna g√∂r…ô, t…ôklif etdiyimiz f…ôaliyy…ôti azaldńĪrńĪr.', 'sk': 'Variacijski kodirni dekoder (VED) kodira izvorne informacije kot nabor naključnih spremenljivk z uporabo nevronskega omrežja, ki se dekodira v ciljne podatke z uporabo drugega nevronskega omrežja. Pri obdelavi naravnega jezika modeli zaporedja v zaporedje (Seq2Seq) običajno služijo kot kodirni in dekodirni omrežji. V kombinaciji s tradicionalnim (determinističnim) mehanizmom pozornosti lahko model pozornosti zaobide variacijski latentni prostor in tako postane neučinkovit. V prispevku predlagamo variacijski mehanizem pozornosti za VED, kjer je vektor pozornosti modeliran tudi kot gaussijsko porazdeljene naključne spremenljivke. Rezultati dveh poskusov kažejo, da brez izgube kakovosti naša predlagana metoda ublaži pojav obvoznosti, saj povečuje raznolikost ustvarjenih stavkov.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis cikin shirin jarraba harshen kwance, misalin sauri-zuwa-sequence (Seq2Seq) mai amfani da shi yana da amfani da ɗabi'a kamar zanen kode-cododer. Idan an haɗa da shirin aikin ɗabi'a na watani (na'urar-ɗabi'a), zai iya cire filin mai gauraya a lokacin, watau za'a shige shi da misali na kiyaye, sa'an nan kuma ya zama mai fara. Gansa da wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani matsayi mai gauraya wa masu nau'i wa WD, a inda an samo hanyar muhimmada kamar an raba variablen gaussian da ba'a ƙayyade ba. Mataimakin biyu na jarrabi ya nuna cewa, bã da ɓata ga wani nau'i ba, hanyoyinmu da aka buƙata, yana sauƙaƙara mazaɓa da bayani, kwanin da yana ƙara diffuka ga kalmõmi wanda aka ƙãga.", 'he': 'המקודד המקודם (VED) קודם מידע מקור כקבוצה של משתנים אקראיים באמצעות רשת עצבית, אשר בתור מוקודם לתוך מידע מטרה באמצעות רשת עצבית אחרת. בעבודת שפת טבעית, דוגמנים רצף לרצף (Seq2Seq) בדרך כלל משתמשים בתור רשתות קוד-קידור. When combined with a traditional (deterministic) attention mechanism, the variational latent space may be bypassed by the attention model, and thus becomes ineffective.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מנגנון תשומת לב שונה עבור VED, שבו הוקטור תשומת לב גם מודל כמשתנים אקראיים מתפזרים גאוסיים. תוצאות שני ניסויים מראות, ללא איבדון איכות, השיטה המוצעת שלנו מקלה את התופעה המעוברת בזמן שזה מגביר את מגוון המשפטים שנוצרים.', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates Nang pribadi nglanggar-perusasi, model sing sekondi-to-sekondi (Seq2Seq) padha usul karo koder-decoder network. Definistik In this paper, we proposal a Variation Attribute Method for VE D, Where the Attribute vector is again modeed as Pametuné awak dhéwé éntukong saiki, gak dhéwé kuwi nggawe kalite, nik awak dhéwé nggawe Perintah sing beraksi kanggo ngubah ujaran kanggo ngerasai winih dhéwé kuwi nggawe winih sing paling-uwong sing paling-uwong.', 'bo': 'The variational encoder-decoder (VED) encodes source information as a set of random variables using a neural network, which in turn is decoded into target data using another neural network. In natural language processing, sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) models typically serve as encoder-decoder networks. སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡོམས་པའི་སྐབས་སུ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་VED(attention)ཡི་གེ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཟོ་རྣམ་པ་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གྲུབ་འབྲས་བརྟག་ཞིབ་པའི་གྲངས་འབྱོར་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་སྣང་མེད་པར། རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་འཛུགས་གྱི་ལམ་ལུགས་དེ་ཚོར་མཐོང་སྐྱེ'}
{'en': 'Learning from Measurements in Crowdsourcing Models : Inferring Ground Truth from Diverse Annotation Types', 'ar': 'التعلم من القياسات في نماذج التعهيد الجماعي: استنتاج الحقيقة الأساسية من أنواع التعليقات التوضيحية المتنوعة', 'es': 'Aprendiendo de las mediciones en los modelos de crowdsourcing: inferir la verdad fundamental a partir de diversos tipos de anotación', 'fr': "Apprendre des mesures dans les modèles de crowdsourcing\xa0: inférer la vérité de terrain à partir de divers types d'annotations", 'pt': 'Aprendendo com as medições em modelos de crowdsourcing: inferindo a verdade do terreno a partir de diversos tipos de anotação', 'zh': '从众包模中测量中学,从异类中推本', 'ja': 'クラウドソーシングモデルの測定から学ぶ：多様なアノテーションタイプからグラウンドトゥルースを推論する', 'hi': 'Crowdsourcing मॉडल में माप से सीखना: विविध एनोटेशन प्रकार से जमीन सत्य का अनुमान लगाना', 'ru': 'Извлечение уроков из измерений в краудсорсинговых моделях: вывод наземной правды из различных типов аннотаций', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim ó Thomhais i Samhlacha Sluaite: An Fhírinne Bunúsach a Bhaint as Cineálacha Nótaí Éagsúla', 'el': 'Μάθηση από μετρήσεις σε μοντέλα Συμπερασματικά Αλήθεια εδάφους από διάφορους τύπους σχολίων', 'hu': 'Tanulás a mérésekből a crowdsourcing modellekben: a talaj igazságának elterjedése a különböző jegyzéktípusokból', 'kk': 'Көлемдеу үлгілеріндегі өлшемдерден оқыту: Түрлі жазбалардың түрлерінен көлемдеу тәртібі', 'lt': 'Mokymasis iš įvairių pranešimų tipų matavimų, gaunamų iš visuomenės išteklių modelių: įgaunama žeminė tiesa iš įvairių pranešimų tipų', 'ka': 'მასწავლის შესაბამისების მოდელში: სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა', 'it': 'Imparare dalle misure nei modelli di crowdsourcing: Inferire la verità del terreno da diversi tipi di annotazione', 'mt': 'Tagħlim mill-Kejl fil-Mudelli ta’ Crowdsourcing: Inferring Ground Truth minn Tipi Diversi ta’ Annotazzjoni', 'mk': 'Учење од мерките во моделите на групното сурсирање: Влегувањето на вистината на земјата од различни типови на анотации', 'ml': 'sourceing Models: Inferring Ground Truth from Diverse Annotation Types', 'ms': 'Belajar dari Keukuran dalam Model Penyesuaian Crowdsourcing: Melanggar Kebenaran Tanah dari Jenis Annotasi Lain-lain', 'ro': 'Învățarea din măsurători în modelele de crowdsourcing: Inferirea adevărului teren din diferite tipuri de adnotare', 'mn': 'Хорвоосорсингийн хэмжээсүүдийн хэмжээсүүдийн суралцах: Төрсөн газар үнэнийг олон хэлбэрээс', 'pl': 'Uczenie się z pomiarów w modelach crowdsourcingowych: wyciągnięcie prawdy podstawowej z różnych typów adnotacji', 'no': 'Læring frå målingar i Crowdsourcing Modellar: Inferring Ground Truth frå Diverse Annotation Types', 'sr': 'Naučenje iz mjerenja u modelima Crowdsourcing: nedovoljavajuća zemlja istina iz različitih tipova oznake', 'so': 'Learning from Measures in Crowdsourcing Models: Inferring Ground Truth from Different Annotation Types', 'sv': 'Att lära sig av mätningar i Crowdsourcing modeller: Att sprida marksanning från olika noteringstyper', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Crowdsourcing Models میں Measurements سے سیکھا جاتا ہے: مختلف یادہانی ٹیپ سے غیر غیر غریب حقیقت', 'ta': 'sourceing Models: Inferring Ground Truth from various Annotation Types', 'uz': 'sourceing Models: Gestur Truth from various Annotation Types', 'vi': 'Học hỏi từ Các biện pháp đo giới thiệu Tập tin Người Nhện:', 'bg': 'Учене от измервания в моделите на crowdsourcing: извличане на земната истина от различни типове анотация', 'da': 'Lære af målinger i crowdsourcing modeller: Inferring Ground Sandhed fra forskellige noteringstyper', 'nl': 'Leren van metingen in crowdsourcing modellen: het afleiden van grondwaarheid uit verschillende annotatietypen', 'hr': 'Naučenje iz mjerenja u modelima Crowdsourcing: nedovoljavajuća zemlja istina iz različitih tipova oznake', 'de': 'Lernen aus Messungen in Crowdsourcing-Modellen: Ableitung der Grundwahrheiten aus verschiedenen Annotationstypen', 'id': 'Learning from Measurements in Crowdsourcing Models: Inferring Ground Truth from Diverse Annotation Types', 'ko': '패키지 모델에서의 측정에서 배우기: 서로 다른 주석 유형에서 기본 사실을 추정한다', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن از اندازه\u200cها در مدل\u200cهای خروجی: حقیقت زمینی از نوع\u200cهای نوشته\u200cهای مختلف', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kutoka kwenye mizani katika Modeli za Crowdsources: Kuingiza Ukweli wa Dunia kutoka aina tofauti za Tamko', 'tr': 'Hat tarlasyndaky Measuratlardan öwrenmek: Inferring Ground Truth from Diverse Annotation Types', 'af': 'Leer van Measurements in Crowdsourcing Models: Inferring Grondwaarheid van Verskeie Annotation Types', 'sq': 'Mësimi nga matjet në modelet e burimeve të turmës: Futja e të vërtetës së tokës nga llojet e ndryshme të anotacioneve', 'am': 'sourceing Models: Inferring Ground Truth from Diverse Annotation Types', 'hy': 'Learning from Measurements in Crowdsourcing Models: Inferring Ground Truth from Diverse Annotation Types', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛k 칞톛kilm톛 modell톛rind톛 칐yr톛nm톛k', 'bn': 'ক্রোডসোর্সিং মডেলে মাপমেন্ট থেকে শিখা: বিভিন্ন বিজ্ঞাপনের ধরন থেকে গ্রাউন্ড সত্য ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Učení se z měření v crowdsourcingových modelech: odvození pravdy z různých typů anotací', 'ca': "Aprendre de mesures en Models de Crowdsourcing: Inferring Ground Truth de diversos tipus d'anotació", 'bs': 'Naučenje iz mjerenja u modelima Crowdsourcing: nedostajanje zemlje istine iz različitih tipova oznake', 'et': 'Õppimine mõõtmistest ühisturundusmudelites: maapinna tõde põhjustamine erinevatest annotatsioonitüüpidest', 'fi': 'Oppiminen joukkohankintamallien mittauksista: pohjatotuuden purkaminen erilaisista huomautustyypeistä', 'jv': 'tips', 'ha': 'sourceing Models: Infiring Ground gaskiya from Diversity Types', 'he': 'לומד ממדידות במודלים של משאבים: נכנסת אמת אדמה מסוגי הערות שונים', 'sk': 'Učenje iz meritev v množičnih modelih: razkrivanje zemeljske resnice iz različnih vrst opomb', 'bo': 'Learning from Measurements in Crowdsourcing Models: Inferring Ground Truth from Diverse Annotation Types'}
{'en': 'Annotated corpora enable supervised machine learning and data analysis. To reduce the cost of manual annotation, tasks are often assigned to internet workers whose judgments are reconciled by crowdsourcing models. We approach the problem of crowdsourcing using a framework for learning from rich prior knowledge, and we identify a family of crowdsourcing models with the novel ability to combine annotations with differing structures : e.g., document labels and word labels. Annotator judgments are given in the form of the predicted expected value of measurement functions computed over annotations and the data, unifying annotation models. Our model, a specific instance of this framework, compares favorably with previous work. Furthermore, it enables active sample selection, jointly selecting annotator, data item, and annotation structure to reduce annotation effort.', 'ar': 'تمكن المؤسسات المشروحة من التعلم الآلي الخاضع للإشراف وتحليل البيانات. لتقليل تكلفة التعليقات التوضيحية اليدوية ، غالبًا ما يتم تعيين المهام للعاملين في الإنترنت الذين يتم التوفيق بين أحكامهم من خلال نماذج التعهيد الجماعي. نحن نتعامل مع مشكلة التعهيد الجماعي باستخدام إطار عمل للتعلم من المعرفة السابقة الغنية ، ونحدد مجموعة من نماذج التعهيد الجماعي مع القدرة الجديدة على الجمع بين التعليقات التوضيحية مع الهياكل المختلفة: على سبيل المثال ، تسميات المستندات وتسميات الكلمات. يتم تقديم أحكام المعلق في شكل القيمة المتوقعة المتوقعة لوظائف القياس المحسوبة على التعليقات التوضيحية والبيانات ، وتوحيد نماذج التعليقات التوضيحية. نموذجنا ، مثال محدد لهذا الإطار ، يقارن بشكل إيجابي مع العمل السابق. علاوة على ذلك ، فإنه يتيح اختيار العينة النشط ، والاختيار المشترك للمضيف ، عنصر البيانات ، وهيكل التعليقات التوضيحية لتقليل جهد التعليقات التوضيحية.', 'fr': "Les corpus annotés permettent l'apprentissage automatique supervisé et l'analyse des données. Pour réduire le coût de l'annotation manuelle, les tâches sont souvent attribuées à des travailleurs Internet dont les jugements sont conciliés par des modèles de crowdsourcing. Nous abordons le problème de l'externalisation participative en utilisant un cadre d'apprentissage à partir de connaissances antérieures riches, et nous identifions une famille de modèles de crowdsourcing dotés de la capacité novatrice de combiner des annotations avec des structures différentes\xa0: par exemple, des étiquettes de documents et des étiquettes de mots. Les jugements des annotateurs sont donnés sous la forme de la valeur attendue prévue des fonctions de mesure calculées sur les annotations et les données, unifiant ainsi les modèles d'annotation. Notre modèle, un exemple spécifique de ce cadre, se compare favorablement aux travaux antérieurs. En outre, il permet la sélection active des échantillons, en sélectionnant conjointement l'annotateur, l'élément de données et la structure d'annotation afin de réduire l'effort d'annotation.", 'pt': 'Corpora anotados permitem aprendizado de máquina supervisionado e análise de dados. Para reduzir o custo da anotação manual, as tarefas geralmente são atribuídas a trabalhadores da Internet cujos julgamentos são reconciliados por modelos de crowdsourcing. Abordamos o problema do crowdsourcing usando uma estrutura para aprender a partir de um rico conhecimento prévio e identificamos uma família de modelos de crowdsourcing com a nova capacidade de combinar anotações com diferentes estruturas: por exemplo, rótulos de documentos e rótulos de palavras. Os julgamentos do anotador são dados na forma do valor esperado previsto das funções de medição calculadas sobre as anotações e os dados, unificando os modelos de anotação. Nosso modelo, uma instância específica dessa estrutura, compara-se favoravelmente com trabalhos anteriores. Além disso, permite a seleção ativa de amostras, selecionando conjuntamente anotador, item de dados e estrutura de anotação para reduzir o esforço de anotação.', 'es': 'Los corpus anotados permiten el aprendizaje automático supervisado y el análisis de datos. Para reducir el costo de la anotación manual, a menudo se asignan tareas a los trabajadores de Internet cuyos juicios se concilian mediante modelos de crowdsourcing. Abordamos el problema del crowdsourcing utilizando un marco para aprender del rico conocimiento previo e identificamos una familia de modelos de crowdsourcing con la novedosa capacidad de combinar anotaciones con diferentes estructuras: por ejemplo, etiquetas de documentos y etiquetas de palabras. Los juicios del anotador se dan en forma del valor esperado previsto de las funciones de medición calculadas sobre las anotaciones y los datos, unificando los modelos de anotación. Nuestro modelo, un ejemplo específico de este marco, se compara favorablemente con trabajos anteriores. Además, permite la selección activa de muestras, seleccionando conjuntamente el anotador, el elemento de datos y la estructura de anotación para reducir el esfuerzo de anotación.', 'ja': '注釈付きコーパスは、監視された機械学習とデータ分析を可能にします。手動アノテーションのコストを削減するために、タスクは多くの場合、判断がクラウドソーシングモデルによって調整されるインターネットワーカーに割り当てられます。私たちは、豊富な既存知識から学習するためのフレームワークを使用してクラウドソーシングの問題に取り組み、異なる構造を持つ注釈を組み合わせる新規の能力を持つクラウドソーシングモデルのファミリーを特定します。例えば、文書ラベルとワードラベルです。注釈者の判断は、注釈とデータにわたって計算された測定関数の予測される期待値の形で与えられ、注釈モデルを統一する。このフレームワークの特定の例である私たちのモデルは、以前の仕事と比較して好ましいです。さらに、アクティブなサンプルの選択、アノテーター、データ項目、およびアノテーション構造の共同選択を可能にし、アノテーションの手間を軽減します。', 'hi': 'एनोटेट कॉर्पोरेट पर्यवेक्षित मशीन सीखने और डेटा विश्लेषण को सक्षम करता है। मैनुअल एनोटेशन की लागत को कम करने के लिए, कार्यों को अक्सर इंटरनेट श्रमिकों को सौंपा जाता है जिनके निर्णय क्राउडसोर्सिंग मॉडल द्वारा सामंजस्य स्थापित किए जाते हैं। हम समृद्ध पूर्व ज्ञान से सीखने के लिए एक ढांचे का उपयोग करके क्राउडसोर्सिंग की समस्या से संपर्क करते हैं, और हम अलग-अलग संरचनाओं के साथ एनोटेशन को संयोजित करने की उपन्यास क्षमता के साथ क्राउडसोर्सिंग मॉडल के एक परिवार की पहचान करते हैं: उदाहरण के लिए, दस्तावेज़ लेबल और शब्द लेबल। Annotator निर्णय एनोटेशन और डेटा पर परिकलित माप कार्यों के अनुमानित अपेक्षित मूल्य के रूप में दिए जाते हैं, एनोटेशन मॉडल को एकजुट करते हैं। हमारा मॉडल, इस ढांचे का एक विशिष्ट उदाहरण, पिछले काम के साथ अनुकूल रूप से तुलना करता है। इसके अलावा, यह सक्रिय नमूना चयन को सक्षम बनाता है, संयुक्त रूप से एनोटेशन प्रयास को कम करने के लिए एनोटेटर, डेटा आइटम और एनोटेशन संरचना का चयन करता है।', 'ru': 'Аннотированные корпусы обеспечивают контролируемое машинное обучение и анализ данных. Чтобы снизить стоимость ручной аннотации, задачи часто назначаются интернет-работникам, чьи суждения согласуются с моделями краудсорсинга. Мы подходим к проблеме краудсорсинга, используя фреймворк для обучения на основе богатых предшествующих знаний, и идентифицируем семейство моделей краудсорсинга с новой способностью комбинировать аннотации с различными структурами: например, метки документов и метки слов. Оценки аннотаторов приведены в виде прогнозируемого ожидаемого значения функций измерений, вычисленных по аннотациям и данным, унифицирующих модели аннотаций. Наша модель, конкретный пример этого фреймворка, выгодно сравнивается с предыдущей работой. Кроме того, он позволяет осуществлять активный выбор образца, совместно выбирая аннотатор, элемент данных и структуру аннотации для уменьшения усилия аннотации.', 'zh': '带注者语料库主监督机器学数据分析。 降手动注本,常分互联网工作者,其决以众包调之。 吾用博先验之框架以决众包,而吾定列众包,有新能之属:文档单词标。 注器断以量函数,同其模形。 吾模者,框架之一特定,利于前事也。 又赞自择样本,共择注器、数据项、注构,以省注量。', 'ga': 'Cumasaíonn corpora anótáilte meaisínfhoghlama maoirsithe agus anailís sonraí. Chun costas anótála láimhe a laghdú, is minic a shanntar tascanna d’oibrithe idirlín a ndéantar a mbreithiúnas a réiteach trí mhúnlaí sluafhoinsithe. Téimid i ngleic le fadhb an tsluafhoinsithe trí úsáid a bhaint as creat chun foghlaim ó eolas saibhir roimhe seo, agus sainaithnímid teaghlach de mhúnlaí sluafhoinsithe a bhfuil an cumas nua acu nótaí a chomhcheangal le struchtúir éagsúla: m.sh., lipéid doiciméad agus lipéid focal. Tugtar breithiúnais anótaire i bhfoirm luach ionchais na bhfeidhmeanna tomhais a ríomhtar thar anótáil agus na sonraí, ag aontú samhlacha anótála. Is fearr ár samhail, sampla sonrach den chreat seo, agus an obair a rinneadh roimhe seo. Ina theannta sin, cuireann sé ar chumas roghnú gníomhach samplaí, comhroghnú anótaire, mír sonraí, agus struchtúr anótála chun iarracht anótála a laghdú.', 'ka': 'ანოტირებული კოპორა შესაძლებელია მონაცემებული მაქანის სწავლება და მონაცემების ანალიზაცია. მანძილური ანოტაციის კონტაქტის შემცირებისთვის, სამუშაოდ ინტერნეტი სამუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მოდელებისთვის გადასრულება. ჩვენ მივიღეთ პრობლემას, რომელიც მსოფლიოს სტრუქტურის გამოყენება სტრუქტურის გამოყენებას, რომელიც მსოფლიოს სტრუქტურის მოდელების ოჯახი, რომელიც პრომენტის შესაძლებლობა დაბრუქება გან ანტოტორის განსაზღვრებები იქნება განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციების განსაზღვრებული მნიშვნელობის ფუნქციების ფორმაში, რომლებიც ანტოციების და მონაცემების შესახებ გამომუშავებული, ანტო ჩვენი მოდელი, ამ ფრამეტრის განსაკუთრებული ინსტანცია, უკეთესი სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაოდ შემდგენება. დამატებით, ის შესაძლებელია აქტიური მონიშნულების არჩევა, ერთად მონიშნულების არჩევა, მონაცემების ელემენტის და მონიშნულების სტრუქტურაციის შემცირებისთვის.', 'el': 'Τα σχολιασμένα σώματα επιτρέπουν την εποπτευμένη μηχανική μάθηση και την ανάλυση δεδομένων. Για να μειωθεί το κόστος της χειροκίνητης σχολιασμού, οι εργασίες συχνά ανατίθενται σε εργαζόμενους στο διαδίκτυο των οποίων οι κρίσεις συμβιβάζονται με μοντέλα crowdsourcing. Προσεγγίζουμε το πρόβλημα της χρησιμοποιώντας ένα πλαίσιο μάθησης από πλούσια προηγούμενη γνώση και εντοπίζουμε μια οικογένεια μοντέλων με τη νέα ικανότητα να συνδυάζουν σχολιασμούς με διαφορετικές δομές: π.χ. ετικέτες εγγράφων και ετικέτες λέξεων. Οι εκτιμήσεις σχολιαστών δίνονται με τη μορφή της προβλεπόμενης αναμενόμενης τιμής των συναρτήσεων μέτρησης που υπολογίζονται πάνω από σχολιασμούς και τα δεδομένα, ενοποιώντας μοντέλα σχολιασμού. Το μοντέλο μας, ένα συγκεκριμένο παράδειγμα αυτού του πλαισίου, συγκρίνεται ευνοϊκά με προηγούμενες εργασίες. Επιπλέον, επιτρέπει την ενεργή επιλογή δειγμάτων, από κοινού επιλέγοντας σχολιαστή, στοιχείο δεδομένων και δομή σχολιασμού για να μειώσει την προσπάθεια σχολιασμού.', 'hu': 'A jegyzetelt corpora lehetővé teszi a felügyelt gépi tanulást és az adatelemzést. A manuális jegyzetelés költségeinek csökkentése érdekében a feladatokat gyakran olyan internetes dolgozókra osztják ki, akiknek ítéletét a közösségi források modellei egyeztetik össze. A közösségi források problémáját a gazdag előzetes ismeretekből való tanulás keretével közelítjük meg, és azonosítjuk a közösségi források modellcsaládját, amelyek új képességgel kombinálhatják a megjegyzéseket különböző struktúrákkal: például dokumentumcímkékkel és szócímkékkel. A jegyzetelőítéleteket a jegyzetelések és adatok alapján kiszámított mérési függvények várható értéke formájában adják meg, egységesítve a jegyzetelési modelleket. Modellünk, ennek a keretrendszernek egy konkrét példája, kedvezően hasonlít össze a korábbi munkákkal. Ezenkívül lehetővé teszi az aktív mintaválasztást, közösen kiválasztva a jegyzetelési erőfeszítéseket, az adatelemet és a jegyzetelési struktúrát.', 'it': "Corpora annotati consentono l'apprendimento automatico supervisionato e l'analisi dei dati. Per ridurre il costo dell'annotazione manuale, le attività sono spesso assegnate ai lavoratori di Internet i cui giudizi sono riconciliati da modelli di crowdsourcing. Approfondiamo il problema del crowdsourcing utilizzando un framework per imparare da una ricca conoscenza preliminare, e identifichiamo una famiglia di modelli di crowdsourcing con la nuova capacità di combinare annotazioni con strutture diverse: ad esempio etichette di documenti e etichette di parole. I giudizi degli annotatori sono forniti sotto forma del valore atteso previsto delle funzioni di misura calcolate sulle annotazioni e sui dati, unificando i modelli di annotazione. Il nostro modello, un esempio specifico di questo framework, si confronta positivamente con i lavori precedenti. Inoltre, consente la selezione attiva del campione, selezionando congiuntamente annotatore, elemento di dati e struttura di annotazione per ridurre lo sforzo di annotazione.", 'kk': 'Анықталған корпора компьютерді бақылау және деректер анализациясын рұқсат ету. Қолмен жазбалардың бағаларын азайту үшін, тапсырмалар көбірек интернет жұмыстарына, олардың сұрақтарын көпшілікті үлгілер арқылы түзетіледі. Біз көпшілік мәселелерді өткен білімдерден үйрену үшін қолданатын фреймді қолдану мәселесіне көпшілік береміз. Біз көпшілік үлгілер үлгілерін, түрлі құрылымдармен біріктіру мүмкіндігімен, мысалы Жаңартушылар мәліметтері, жаңарту үлгілерін біріктіру үлгілері бойынша есептелген өлшем функцияларының күтпеген мәнінің түрінде беріледі. Біздің үлгіміз, бұл фреймінің ерекше инстанциясы, алдыңғы жұмысын салыстырады. Қосымша, ол белсенді таңдау үшін белсенді үлгілеу құралын, жазбаларды, деректер нәтижесін және жазбалардың құралын көшірмелеу үшін таңдайды.', 'lt': 'Nurodytas korporas leidžia prižiūrėti mašinų mokymąsi ir duomenų analizę. Siekiant sumažinti rankinių anotacijų sąnaudas, užduotys dažnai priskiriamos interneto darbuotojams, kurių sprendimai suderinami taikant visuomenės išteklių modelius. We approach the problem of crowdsourcing using a framework for learning from rich prior knowledge, and we identify a family of crowdsourcing models with the novel ability to combine annotations with differing structures: e.g., document labels and word labels.  Annotator judgments are given in the form of the predicted expected value of measurement functions computed over annotations and the data, unifying annotation models.  Mūsų modelis, konkretus šios sistemos pavyzdys, palyginamas palankiai su ankstesniu darbu. Be to, ji leidžia aktyviai atrinkti mėginius, kartu atrinkti anotatorių, duomenų elementų ir anotacijos struktūros, kad būtų sumažintos anotacijos pastangos.', 'mk': 'Анотирано тело овозможува надгледувано машинско учење и анализа на податоци. За да се намалат трошоците на рачните анотации, задачите честопати им се доделени на интернет работниците чии пресуди се усогласени со моделите за пулсорсирање. Ние се приближуваме до проблемот на пулсорсирање со користење на рамка за учење од богато претходно знаење, и идентификуваме семејство на модели на пулсорсирање со новата способност да комбинираме анотации со различни структури: на пример, документарни етикети и зборни етикети. Судиите на анотаторите се дадени во форма на предвидената очекувана вредност на функциите за мерење кои се обчистуваат преку анотациите и податоците, обединувајќи ги моделите на анотациите. Нашиот модел, специфичен пример на оваа рамка, се споредува со претходната работа. Furthermore, it enables active sample selection, jointly selecting annotator, data item, and annotation structure to reduce annotation effort.', 'ms': 'Korpora yang dicatat benarkan pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi dan analisis data. Untuk mengurangi biaya anotasi manual, tugas sering ditugaskan kepada pekerja internet yang hakim ditetapkan oleh model crowdsourcing. We approach the problem of crowdsourcing using a framework for learning from rich prior knowledge, and we identify a family of crowdsourcing models with the novel ability to combine annotations with differing structures: e.g., document labels and word labels.  Penghakiman anotator diberikan dalam bentuk nilai dijangka fungsi pengukuran dikira melalui anotasi dan data, menyatukan model anotasi. Model kita, contoh khusus kerangka ini, dibandingkan dengan kerja sebelumnya. Lagipun, ia membolehkan pemilihan sampel aktif, memilih bersama-sama annotator, item data, dan struktur anotasi untuk mengurangi usaha anotasi.', 'ml': 'അറിയിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ മെഷീന്\u200d പഠനം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതും ഡേറ്റാ അന്വേഷണം സജ്ജമാക്കു കൈകൊണ്ട് വില കുറച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ വില കുറച്ച് കൂടി ജോലികള്\u200d ഇന്റര്\u200dനെറ്റ് പണിക്കാര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നിര്\u200dബന മുമ്പ് സമ്പന്നജ്ഞാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമെക്കോര്\u200dഡ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സമ്മതിക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നം സമ്മതിക്കുന്നു.  പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട മൂല്ല്യം അളക്കുന്നതിന്റെ മൂല്യം കണക്കാക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വിശദീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ഒരു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d, ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്പിന്റെ ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ഉദാഹരണമാണ്, മുമ്പുള്ള പണിയോടൊപ്പം മാത്രം താല്\u200dപ് അതിനുശേഷം, സജ്ജീവമായ മാമ്പിള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത്, അനറ്റേറ്റര്\u200d, ഡേറ്റാ വസ്തുവും അഭിപ്രായശ്രമം കുറവാക്കുന്നതിനും', 'mt': 'Annotated corpora enable supervised machine learning and data analysis.  Biex jitnaqqas l-ispiża tal-annotazzjoni manwali, il-kompiti ta’ spiss jiġu assenjati lill-ħaddiema tal-internet li s-sentenzi tagħhom jiġu rikonċiljati permezz ta’ mudelli ta’ crowdsourcing. Aħna nindirizzaw il-problem a tal-crowdsourcing bl-użu ta’ qafas g ħat-tagħlim minn għarfien minn qabel għoli, u nidentifikaw familja ta’ mudelli ta’ crowdsourcing bil-kapaċità ġdida li nikkombinaw annotazzjonijiet ma’ strutturi differenti: e ż., tikketti tad-dokumenti u tikketti tal-kliem. Is-sentenzi tal-annotaturi jingħataw fil-forma tal-valur mistenni mbassar tal-funzjonijiet tal-kejl ikkalkulat fuq l-annotazzjonijiet u d-dejta, li jgħaqqdu l-mudelli tal-annotazzjoni. Il-mudell tagħna, eżempju speċifiku ta’ dan il-qafas, iqabbel b’mod favorevoli max-xogħol preċedenti. Barra minn hekk, tippermetti l-għażla attiva tal-kampjun, bl-għażla konġunta tal-annotatur, tal-element tad-dejta, u tal-istruttura tal-annotazzjoni biex jitnaqqas l-isforz tal-annotazzjoni.', 'no': 'Merkerte korpora slår på oversikte maskinelæring og dataanalyse. For å redusera kostnaden til manuelt notasjon, vert oppgåver ofte tildelt til internetarbeidarar der sprøytebrukane er samsvara med crowdsourcing modeller. Vi nærmer problemet med å bruka eit rammeverk for læring frå rike førre kunnskap, og vi identifiserer ein familie av crowdsourcing-modeller med den romanske kapasiteten for å kombinere notasjonar med ulike strukturar: f.eks. dokumentetikettar og ordetikettar. Notatorsprøytebrukane vert oppgjeve i form av den forventa verdien for målingsfunksjonane som rekna ut over notasjonar og dataene, og unifiserer merkingsmodular. Modellen vårt, eit spesifikke instans av dette rammeverket, samanliknar favoritt med førre arbeid. I tillegg kan det gjere det aktive utvalet av prøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøveprøvemerking, data- element og annotasjonsstruktur for å redusera innstilling', 'pl': 'Korpusy komentowane umożliwiają nadzorowane uczenie maszynowe i analizę danych. Aby zmniejszyć koszt ręcznej adnotacji, zadania są często przypisywane pracownikom internetu, których oceny są godzone za pomocą modeli crowdsourcingu. Podchodzimy do problemu crowdsourcingu za pomocą frameworku uczenia się z bogatej wiedzy wcześniejszej i identyfikujemy rodzinę modeli crowdsourcingu z nowatorską zdolnością łączenia adnotacji z różnymi strukturami: np. etykietami dokumentów i etykietami słów. Oceny annotatorów podawane są w postaci przewidywanej wartości oczekiwanej funkcji pomiarowych obliczanej na adnotacjach i danych, ujednolicając modele annotacji. Nasz model, konkretny przykład tego frameworku, korzystnie porównuje się z poprzednimi pracami. Ponadto umożliwia aktywny wybór próbek, wspólne wybieranie adnotatora, elementu danych i struktury adnotacji, aby zmniejszyć nakład adnotacji.', 'ro': 'Corporele adnotate permit învățarea automată supravegheată și analiza datelor. Pentru a reduce costul adnotării manuale, sarcinile sunt deseori atribuite lucrătorilor de pe internet ale căror judecăți sunt reconciliate prin modele de crowdsourcing. Abordăm problema crowdsourcing folosind un cadru pentru a învăța din cunoștințe anterioare bogate și identificăm o familie de modele de crowdsourcing cu capacitatea nouă de a combina adnotările cu structuri diferite: de exemplu, etichete de documente și etichete de cuvinte. Judecățile adnotatorilor sunt date sub forma valorii preconizate a funcțiilor de măsurare calculate prin adnotări și date, unificand modelele de adnotări. Modelul nostru, un exemplu specific al acestui cadru, se compară favorabil cu lucrările anterioare. În plus, permite selectarea activă a eșantionului, selectând împreună adnotatorul, elementul de date și structura de adnotare pentru a reduce efortul de adnotare.', 'mn': 'Ангилагдсан корпора машин суралцах болон өгөгдлийн шинжилгээг ашигладаг. Холбоо сэтгэл хөдлөлийн үнэ багасгахын тулд ажил ихэвчлэн интернет ажилтнуудын хувьд шийдвэрлэх загваруудын хувьд шийдвэрлэгддэг. Бид өмнө нь баян мэдлэгтэй суралцахын тулд олон нийтийн асуудлыг ашиглах боломжтой асуудлыг ойлгож, олон нийтийн загварын загварын гэр бүлийг өөр өөр бүтцийг нийлүүлэх шинэ чадвартай тодорхойлдог. Жишээ нь, баримт etiketүүд,  Аннотаторын шүүмжүүд нь нотолгоо болон өгөгдлийн хувьд тооцоолж байгаа хэмжээний функцийн тооцоолж байгаа хэмжээний утга хэлбэрээр өгсөн. Бидний загвар, энэ хэлбэрийн тодорхой жишээ нь өмнөх ажлыг харьцуулдаг. Үүнээс гадна, энэ нь актив жишээ сонголтыг боломж олгодог, анзаарч, өгөгдлийн элемент, анзаарлын бүтэц нь анзаарлын хичээлийг багасгах боломж олгодог.', 'sr': 'Annotirane korporacije omogućavaju nadzorno učenje mašine i analizu podataka. Da bi smanjili troškove manualne annotacije, zadatak se često određuje internetskim radnicima čije su osude usklađene modelima crowdsourcing. Približavamo se problemu crowdsourcing koristeći okvir za učenje bogatih ranijih znanja, i identifikujemo porodicu modela crowdsourcing sa novom sposobnošću kombinacije annotacija sa različitim strukturama: na primer, etikete dokumenta i etikete riječi. Optužbe za annotatore daju se u obliku predviđene očekivane vrijednosti funkcija mjerenja računale su preko annotacija i podataka, ujedinjavajući modele annotacije. Naš model, određeni primer ovog okvira, uspoređuje favoritno sa prethodnim poslom. Osim toga, omogućava aktivnu selekciju uzoraka, zajedno odabrati annotator, podatke i strukturu annotacije kako bi smanjila napore za annotaciju.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරකාශ කර්පෝරා පරික්ෂා කරලා පරික්ෂා කරලා යන්ත්\u200dරය ඉගෙනීම සහ දත්ත විශ්ලේෂණය ස අයිතියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අඩු කරන්න, අයිතියෙන් ඉන්ටර්නේට් වැඩකරුවන්ට සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ අයිතියෙන් ව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය Comment අපේ මෝඩේල්, මේ විශේෂ ස්ථානයක්, කලින් වැඩත් එක්ක ප්\u200dරියෝජනය කරනවා. ඊට පස්සේ, ඒක සක්\u200dරිය සැමැල් තෝරණය සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා, සම්බන්ධයෙන් නිරීක්ෂකය, දත්ත අයිති අයිති තෝරණය කරන්න, සම්බ', 'so': 'Shirkadda la magacaabay wuxuu awoodaa in lagu barto waxbarashada machadka iyo baaritaanka data. Si ay u yaraato kharashka dhibaatada qofka gacanta laga qabto, shaqaalaha waxaa inta badan loo qeybiyaa shaqaalaha internetka, kuwaas oo xukummadooda lagu heshiiyo samooyin kooxaha. Waxaynu u soo dhowaynaa dhibaatada kooxaha badan e e isticmaalka qalabka waxbarashada taajirka ah ee horumarinta aqoonta, waxaynu aqoonsanaynaa qoys ka mid ah modellada kooxaha dadku, kaas oo awooddiisa la xiriiro qalabka kala duduwan: tusaale ahaan calaamada dukumentiga iyo calaamada hadalka. Xukummada ku qoran karta waxaa lagu sameeyaa qaab ka mid ah qiimaha la doortay oo lagu xisaabiyay qiimaha qiyaasta oo lagu xisaabiyay dhibaatooyin iyo macluumaadka, qaababka la isku daro. Tusaale ahaan, tusaale cayiman oo ka mid ah shuqulkan hore. Sidoo kale waxaa suurtogal u yeelan kara doorashada sameynta shaqeeya, si wadajir ah ayay u doorataan alaabta, alaabta macluumaadka iyo hagitaanka si ay u hoosayso hawlaha la xiriira.', 'sv': 'Annotated corpora möjliggör övervakad maskininlärning och dataanalys. För att minska kostnaden för manuell notering tilldelas uppgifter ofta internetarbetare vars bedömningar förenas med crowdsourcing-modeller. Vi närmar oss problemet med crowdsourcing med hjälp av ett ramverk för att lära av rika förkunskaper, och vi identifierar en familj av crowdsourcingmodeller med den nya förmågan att kombinera anteckningar med olika strukturer: t.ex. dokumentetiketter och ordetiketter. Annotatorbedömningar ges i form av det förutspådda förväntade värdet av mätfunktioner som beräknats över anteckningar och data, vilket förenar annoteringsmodeller. Vår modell, ett specifikt exempel på detta ramverk, jämför positivt med tidigare arbete. Dessutom möjliggör den ett aktivt urval av exempel genom att gemensamt välja kommentator, dataobjekt och kommentarstruktur för att minska kommenteringsansträngningen.', 'ur': 'اظہار کیا گیا کورپورا ماشین کی تعلیم اور ڈیٹا تحلیل کو فعال کرتا ہے۔ مہمانی اظہار کی قیمت کم کرنے کے لئے، اغلبہ اغلبہ اظہار کرنے والوں کے لئے اظہار کیے جاتے ہیں جن کے فیصلے جماعت سورسینگ موڈل کے ذریعے صلح کر دیئے جاتے ہیں. ہم اس مشکل سے پہلے بہترین علم سے سیکھنے کے لئے ایک فرمود کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے موجود ہوتے ہیں، اور ہم ایک خاندان کو مشکل دیتے ہیں جو جمعیت سورسینگ موڈل کے مطابق مختلف ساختاروں کے ساتھ پیدا کرنے کے لئے نومین قابلیت کے ساتھ پیدا کرتا ہے، مثال سند لیبل اور کلمات لیبل نوٹوٹور فیصلے مطابق مطابق مقدار کی انتظام کی ارزش کے شکل میں دیے جاتے ہیں جو مطابق اور ڈاکٹر کے ذریعے کامپیوتر کیے جاتے ہیں، مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق ہے. ہماری مدل، اس فرم کے ایک خاص مثال، اگلے کام کے ساتھ مہربانی کرتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، یہ فعال نمونے کا انتخاب کرنا امکان کرتا ہے، انٹاتور، ڈیٹا اتم، اور انٹاتور کی ساختاری کو آہستہ تلاش کے لئے کم کرنا چاہتا ہے.', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட நிறுவனம் கணினி கற்றல் மற்றும் தரவு ஆய்வு செயல்படுத்தும். கைமுறையாக கைமுறையில் செலவை குறைக்க, செயல்கள் பெரும்பாலும் இணைய செயல்களுக்கு வழங்கப்படுகின்றன, அவர்கள் தீர்ப்புகள நாம் மக்கள் மூலங்களின் பிரச்சினையை பயன்படுத்தும் பணக்கூடிய அறிவு முன்னால் கற்றுக்கொள்வதற்கான சட்டத்தை நெருங்குகிறோம், மற்றும் நாம் ஒரு குடும்பத்தை குட எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்ட மதிப்பு கணக்கிடப்பட்டுள்ள அளவு செயல்பாடு எங்கள் மாதிரி, இந்த சட்டத்தின் குறிப்பிட்ட எடுத்துக்காட்டு, முந்தைய வேலையை ஒப்பிடுகிறது. அதற்கும், அது செயலில் உள்ள மாதிரி தேர்வு, அறிவிப்பு முயற்சியை குறைக்க ஒன்றாக தேர்ந்தெடுக்க, தகவல் உருப்படி மற்றும் அறிவி', 'uz': "Izoh Vazifalar ko'pincha Internetdagi ishlarni kamaytirish uchun ishlarni ko'p paydo qilinadi, ularning xukunalari jamoatlar modellari bilan bog'langan. Biz hozirgi taʼminot bilan o'rganish uchun jamoatlarning muammolari bilan o'rganish muammolariga qarasamiz, va biz jamoatlar modellarini ko'rsatumiz va har hil tuzuvlar bilan taʼminlovchilar bilan birlashtirish imkoniyatini aniqlamiz. Masalan, hujjat yordamlari va soʻzning tugmalari yordamida birlashtirish im @ info: whatsthis Bizning modelmiz, bu freymning xususiyatli misol, oldingi ish bilan yaxshi o'xshash. Koʻrsatilgan, u aktiv namunani tanlash, annotator, maʼlumot elementini birlashtirish va taʼminlovchi structuriyasini kamaytirish imkoniyatini yaratish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Ghi chú cơ thể cho phép giám sát việc học máy và phân tích dữ liệu. Để giảm chi phí ghi chú bằng tay, công việc thường được giao cho nhân viên internet, những người đã xét xử bằng cách xếp hạng. Chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề về tẩy não bằng cách sử dụng một cơ sở để học hỏi từ những kiến thức giàu có trước đây, và chúng ta xác định một gia đình các mô hình tụ tập tài chính với một khả năng mới có thể kết hợp ghi chú với các cấu trúc khác nhau: ví dụ, nhãn tài liệu và nhãn từ. Thông báo cáo được đưa ra bằng dạng giá trị dự đoán của các chức năng đo định trên ghi chú và dữ liệu, thống nhất các mô hình chú thích. Mẫu của chúng tôi, một ví dụ cụ thể của khung hình này, được so sánh tốt với công việc trước. Bên cạnh đó, nó có khả năng chọn mẫu, cùng nhau chọn chú thích, mục dữ liệu, và cấu trúc ghi chú để giảm sức mạnh ghi chú.', 'bg': 'Анотираните корпуси позволяват контролирано машинно обучение и анализ на данни. За да се намалят разходите за ръчно анотиране, задачите често се възлагат на интернет работници, чиито преценки са съгласувани чрез модели на crowdsourcing. Ние подхождаме към проблема с crowdsourcingа, използвайки рамка за учене от богати предишни знания, и идентифицираме семейство от модели на crowdsourcing с новата способност да комбинират анотации с различни структури: например етикети на документи и етикети на думи. Анотаторните преценки се дават под формата на прогнозната очаквана стойност на измервателните функции, изчислени върху анотациите и данните, обединявайки моделите на анотация. Нашият модел, специфичен пример на тази рамка, се сравнява благоприятно с предишната работа. Освен това тя позволява активен избор на извадка, съвместно избиране на анотатор, елемент от данни и структура на анотация, за да се намали усилието за анотация.', 'hr': 'Notirana korpora omogućava nadzorno učenje strojeva i analizu podataka. Da bi smanjili troškove manualne annotacije, zadatak se često određuje internetskim radnicima čiji su osuđenja usklađeni modelima crowdsourcing. Približavamo problem crowdsourcing koristeći okvir za učenje bogatih prije znanja i identificiramo obitelj modela crowdsourcing s novom sposobnošću kombiniranja annotacija sa različitim strukturama: na primjer, etikete dokumenta i etikete riječi. Optužbe Annotatora daju se u obliku predviđene očekivane vrijednosti funkcija mjerenja izračunatih preko annotacija i podataka, ujedinjavajući modele annotacije. Naš model, određeni primjer ovog okvira, uspoređuje favoritno sa prethodnim radom. Osim toga, omogućava aktivni izbor uzoraka, zajednički odabrati annotator, podatke i strukturu annotacije kako bi smanjila napor za annotaciju.', 'da': 'Annotated corpora muliggør overvåget maskinlæring og dataanalyse. For at reducere omkostningerne ved manuel notering tildeles opgaver ofte til internetmedarbejdere, hvis vurderinger afstemmes af crowdsourcing-modeller. Vi nærmer os problemet med crowdsourcing ved hjælp af en ramme for at lære af rig forudgående viden, og vi identificerer en familie af crowdsourcing modeller med den nye evne til at kombinere annoteringer med forskellige strukturer: f.eks. dokumentetiketter og ordetiketter. Annotatorvurderinger gives i form af den forventede forventede værdi af målefunktioner beregnet over noteringer og data, der forener anmærkningsmodeller. Vores model, et specifikt eksempel på denne ramme, sammenlignes positivt med tidligere arbejde. Desuden gør det muligt at vælge aktiv eksempelvalg ved i fællesskab at vælge annotator, dataelement og annotationsstruktur for at reducere annoteringsindsatsen.', 'nl': "Geanoteerde corpora's maken supervised machine learning en data-analyse mogelijk. Om de kosten van handmatige annotatie te verminderen, worden taken vaak toegewezen aan internetwerkers wiens oordeel wordt verzoend door crowdsourcing modellen. We benaderen het probleem van crowdsourcing met behulp van een raamwerk om te leren van rijke voorkennis, en we identificeren een familie van crowdsourcingmodellen met de nieuwe mogelijkheid om annotaties te combineren met verschillende structuren: bijvoorbeeld documentlabels en woordlabels. Annotatoroordelen worden gegeven in de vorm van de voorspelde verwachte waarde van meetfuncties berekend over annotaties en de gegevens, waardoor annotatiemodellen worden verenigd. Ons model, een specifiek voorbeeld van dit framework, is gunstig vergeleken met vorig werk. Bovendien maakt het actieve steekproefselectie mogelijk, waarbij gezamenlijk annotator, gegevensitem en annotatiestructuur worden geselecteerd om annotatie-inspanning te verminderen.", 'de': 'Annotierte Korpora ermöglichen überwachtes maschinelles Lernen und Datenanalyse. Um die Kosten für manuelle Annotation zu reduzieren, werden Aufgaben häufig Internetarbeitern zugewiesen, deren Urteile durch Crowdsourcing-Modelle abgeglichen werden. Wir nähern uns dem Problem des Crowdsourcings mit einem Framework zum Lernen aus umfangreichen Vorkenntnissen und identifizieren eine Familie von Crowdsourcing-Modellen mit der neuartigen Fähigkeit, Anmerkungen mit unterschiedlichen Strukturen zu kombinieren: z.B. Dokumentenbeschriftungen und Wortbeschriftungen. Annotator-Beurteilungen werden in Form des prognostizierten Erwartungswerts von Messfunktionen gegeben, die über Annotationen und die Daten berechnet werden, um Annotationsmodelle zu vereinheitlichen. Unser Modell, eine spezifische Instanz dieses Frameworks, vergleicht sich positiv mit früheren Arbeiten. Darüber hinaus ermöglicht es die aktive Stichprobenauswahl, die gemeinsame Auswahl von Annotator, Datenelement und Annotationsstruktur, um den Annotationsaufwand zu reduzieren.', 'id': 'Korpora anotasi memungkinkan pembelajaran mesin yang diawasi dan analisis data. Untuk mengurangi biaya anotasi manual, tugas sering ditugaskan kepada pekerja internet yang hakim disesuaikan oleh model crowdsourcing. Kami mendekati masalah crowdsourcing menggunakan rangkaian untuk belajar dari pengetahuan sebelumnya yang kaya, dan kami mengidentifikasi sebuah keluarga model crowdsourcing dengan kemampuan baru untuk menggabungkan anotasi dengan struktur yang berbeda: contohnya, label dokumen dan label kata. Penghakiman anotator diberikan dalam bentuk nilai yang diharapkan dari fungsi pengukuran dikomputerkan melalui anotasi dan data, menyatukan model anotasi. Model kita, contoh spesifik dari kerangka ini, dibandingkan dengan pekerjaan sebelumnya. Lagipula, ini memungkinkan seleksi sampel aktif, secara kongsi memilih annotator, item data, dan struktur annotasi untuk mengurangi usaha annotasi.', 'sw': 'Kampuni iliyotangazwa inawezesha kufuatiliwa na uchambuzi wa mashine. Ili kupunguza gharama za uchochezi wa mikononi, kazi mara nyingi huwekwa kwa wafanyakazi wa intaneti ambao maamuzi yao yanaunganishwa na mitindo ya vyanzo vya umma. We approach the problem of crowdsourcing using a framework for learning from rich prior knowledge, and we identify a family of crowdsourcing models with the novel ability to combine annotations with differing structures: e.g., document labels and word labels.  Hukumu za watangazaji zinapewa kwa namna ya kutabiriwa thamani ya kazi za upasuaji zilizohesabiwa zaidi ya matangazo na taarifa, pamoja na mifano ya uchunguzi. Mfano wetu, mfano maalum wa mradi huu, unalinganisha vizuri na kazi zilizopita. Zaidi ya hayo, inawezesha kuchaguliwa kwa sampuli moja kwa moja, kuchagua matangazo, bidhaa ya data, na muundo wa kutangaza ili kupunguza juhudi za uchunguzi.', 'ko': '주석이 있는 어료 라이브러리는 감독이 있는 기계 학습과 데이터 분석을 지원한다.수동 주석의 원가를 낮추기 위해 임무는 보통 인터넷 종사자에게 분배되고 그들의 판단은 하도급 모델에 의해 조화된다.우리는 풍부한 선험지식에서 배운 구조를 이용하여 패키지 문제를 처리했다. 우리는 일련의 패키지 모델을 확정했다. 이런 모델은 주석과 서로 다른 구조(예를 들어 문서 라벨과 단어 라벨)를 결합시키는 새로운 능력을 가진다.주석자의 판단은 주석과 데이터에 따라 계산된 측정 함수의 예측 기대치를 형식으로 제시하여 주석 모델을 통일시킨다.우리의 모형은 이 틀의 구체적인 실례로 이전의 업무에 비해 비교적 좋다.또한 주동적인 견본 선택을 지원하고 주석기, 데이터 항목과 주석 구조를 연합하여 주석 작업량을 줄인다.', 'fa': 'شرکت اعلام شده به یادگیری ماشین و تحلیل داده\u200cها فعال می\u200cکند. برای کاهش هزینه اظهار دستی، وظیفه\u200cها اغلب برای کارگران اینترنت تعیین می\u200cشوند که قضاوت\u200cهایشان توسط مدل\u200cهای سرمایه\u200cگذاری جمعیت صلح می\u200cشوند. ما به مشکل سوراخ کردن جمعیت با استفاده از یک چهارچوب برای یادگیری از دانش قبلی پولدار نزدیک می\u200cشویم، و خانواده مدل سوراخ کردن جمعیت را با توانایی نویسی برای ترکیب نویسی با ساختارهای متفاوت، مثال، نقاشی سند و نقاشی کلمه شناسایی می\u200c قضاوت نویسنده\u200cها در شکل ارزش پیش\u200cبینی از تابع\u200cهای اندازه\u200cگیری که بر روی نویسندگان و داده\u200cها محاسبه می\u200cشوند، به صورت نماد\u200cهای نویسندگی، داده می\u200cشوند. مدل ما، یک نمونه خاصی از این چهارچوب، با کارهای قبلی مقایسه می کند. علاوه بر این، به انتخاب نمونه\u200cهای فعالی توان می\u200cکند، با همراه انتخاب نمونه\u200cکننده، عنوان داده\u200cها و ساختار نوشته\u200cها برای کاهش تلاش نوشته\u200cها.', 'sq': 'Korpora e anotuar aktivizon mësimin e mbikqyrur të makinave dhe analizën e të dhënave. Për të reduktuar koston e anotacionit manual, detyrat shpesh i caktohen punëtorëve të internetit gjykimet e të cilëve janë pajtuar nga modelet crowdsourcing. Ne afrohemi problemit të crowdsourcing duke përdorur një kuadër për mësimin nga njohuritë e pasura të mëparshme dhe identifikojmë një familje modelesh crowdsourcing me aftësinë e re për të kombinuar anotacionet me struktura të ndryshme: për shembull etiketat e dokumenteve dhe etiketat e fjalëve. Vendimet e anotatorëve janë dhënë në form ën e vlerës së parashikuar të funksioneve të matjeve të llogaritura mbi anotacionet dhe të dhënat, duke bashkuar modelet e anotacioneve. Modeli ynë, një shembull specifik i këtij kuadri, krahasohet favorisht me punën e mëparshme. Përveç kësaj, ajo lejon zgjedhjen aktive të mostrave, duke zgjedhur së bashku anotatorin, elementin e të dhënave dhe strukturën e anotacionit për të reduktuar përpjekjen e anotacionit.', 'am': 'የኮርፖር ማተማር እና ዳታ analysis ያስችላል፡፡ የድጋፍ ውሳኔን ለማጎድልበት፣ ስራዎቹ ብዙ ጊዜ የህዝብ ብሔራዊ ብሔራዊ አካባቢ ሞላዎችን ለመታሰል ወደ Internetን ሠራተኞች ይታሰራሉ፡፡ የብዙ አካባቢዎች ጉዳይ ከሀብታም በፊት ባለጠጋ እውቀት ለመማር የፍሬማክበርን እናቀርባለን እና የብዙsources models እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የአሳባቢው ፍርድ በተቀጠቀጠ መጠን በሚቆጠሩ አካባቢዎች እና ዳታዎች በተለየ ማሳየት ዓይነቶች ውስጥ እንዲያስቀምጥ ነው፡፡ ምሳሌያችን፣ የዚህን ፍሬም የተለየ ምሳሌ፣ የቀድሞውን ሥራ ይሻላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የመስመር ምርጫዎች፣ ማስታወቂያ፣ የዳታ አካል እና ማሳያየት ግንኙነትን ለማጎድል ይችላል፡፡', 'af': "Noteerde korpora aktiveer superviseerde masjien leer en data analiseer. Om die koste van hande annotasie te verminder, word taakke dikwels aan internetwerkers toegelaat, wie se oordelinge versamel word deur verskeidende modele. Ons naby die probleem van skapsourcing te gebruik 'n raamwerk vir leer van ryk voorheede kennis, en ons identifiseer 'n familie van skapsourcing modele met die novel e kapasiteit om notasies te kombinerer met verskillende strukture: bv. dokumentetikette en woord etikette. Annotator- oordelings word gegee in die vorm van die voorskoude verwagte waarde van measurement funksies wat bereken word oor annotasies en die data, eenmaak annotasie modelles. Ons model, 'n spesifieke voorbeeld van hierdie raamwerk vergelyk genadig met vorige werk. Verder, dit aktiveer aktiewe voorbeeld kies, saamstig kies annotator, data item en annotasie struktuur om annotasie versoek te reduseer.", 'hy': 'Անտորացված մարմինը հնարավորություն է տալիս վերահսկվող մեքենային ուսումնասիրությունը և տվյալների վերլուծությունը: Ձեռքի annoտացիայի արժեքը նվազեցնելու համար առաջադրանքները հաճախ տրվում են ինտերնետի աշխատակիցներին, որոնց դատողությունները համընկնում են ժողովրդավար մոդելների միջոցով: Մենք մոտենում ենք ժողովրդավարման խնդիրը օգտագործելով հիմք հարուստ նախորդ գիտելիքներից սովորելու համար, և մենք հայտնաբերում ենք ժողովրդավարման մոդելների ընտանիքը նորարար ունակության հետ միավորելու նոտացիաները տարբեր կառուցվածքների հետ, օրինակ փաստաթղթերի պիտակների և բառ Նոտատորների դատողությունները տրվում են նշումների և տվյալների վրա հաշվարկված չափման ֆունկցիաների կանխատեսված արժեքի տեսքով, միավորելով նշումների մոդելները: Մեր մոդելը, այս շրջանակի հատուկ օրինակը, համեմատում է նախորդ աշխատանքի հետ: Ավելին, այն հնարավորություն է տալիս ակտիվ նմուշների ընտրությունը, միասին ընտրելով annoտոր, տվյալներ և annoտացիոն կառուցվածք, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք annoտացիոն ջանքերը:', 'az': 'Annotated corpora supervised machine learning and data analysis enable. Əlaqə təbliğlərinin maliyyətini azaltmaq üçün, işləri sık-sık internet işçilərinə verilir ki, hökmləri crowdsourcing modelleri ilə birləşdirilir. Biz əvvəlki bilgindən öyrənmək üçün qövmünün sərvətini istifadə etmək üçün qövmünün probleminə yaxınlaşdırırıq, qövmünün modellərinin ailəsini müxtəlif yapılarla birləşdirmək bacarıqları ilə birləşdiririk: məsələn, məsələlər etiketləri və söz etiketləri. Annotator hökmləri, məlumatlar və məlumatlar üzərində hesablanmış ölçü fonksiyonların tədbir edilmiş qiymətlərin formu ilə veriləcəkdir. Bizim modelimiz, bu çerçivesinin müəyyən bir məsəli, əvvəlki iş ilə yaxşılıq edir. Daha sonra, o, aktif nümunə seçməsini, annotator, məlumat elementini və annotation strukturasını azaltmaq üçün birlikdə seçir.', 'bn': 'বর্ণনা কর্পোরা মেশিন শিক্ষা ও তথ্য বিশ্লেষণ সক্রিয় করে। মানুষের দাম কমানোর জন্য, ইন্টারনেট শ্রমিকদের কাজ প্রায়শই দায়িত্ব দেয়া হয়, যাদের বিচার জনস্কোর্সিং মডেল দ্বারা মিল আমরা সমৃদ্ধ জ্ঞান থেকে সমৃদ্ধ জ্ঞান থেকে শিক্ষা ব্যবহারের একটি ফ্রেম কার্যক্রম ব্যবহার করে জনসোর্সিং মডেল ব্যবহারের সমস্যার কাছে পৌঁছাই এবং আমরা একটি পরিবারের পরিচয় চিহ্নি প্রত্যাশিত প্রত্যাশিত পরিমাপের মান এবং তথ্যের বিরুদ্ধে গণনা করা হয়েছে বিশ্লেষণীয় বিচারের মাধ্যমে প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যা প্রত্ আমাদের মডেল, এই ফ্রেমের একটি নির্দিষ্ট উদাহরণ, পূর্বের কাজের সাথে তুলনা করেছে। এছাড়াও, এটি সক্রিয় নমুনা নির্বাচন সক্রিয় করে, অ্যান্ট্যান্টেটার, ডাটা বস্তুকে নির্বাচন করে এবং অ্যান্টারেশন কাঠামো কম', 'bs': 'Annotirano korporacije omogućava nadzorno učenje strojeva i analizu podataka. Da bi smanjili troškove manualne annotacije, zadatak se često određuje internetskim radnicima čije su osude usklađene modelima crowdsourcing. Približavamo se problemu crowdsourcing koristeći okvir za učenje bogatih prije znanja, i identificiramo porodicu modela crowdsourcing sa novom sposobnošću kombiniranja annotacija sa različitim strukturama: na primjer, etikete dokumenta i etikete riječi. Optužbe Annotatora daju se u obliku predviđene očekivane vrijednosti funkcija mjerenja računale su preko annotacija i podataka, ujedinjavajući modele annotacije. Naš model, određeni primjer ovog okvira, uspoređuje favoritno sa prethodnim radom. Osim toga, omogućava aktivnu selekciju uzorka, zajedno odabrati annotator, podatke i strukturu annotacije kako bi smanjila napore za annotaciju.', 'ca': "Els corpores anotats permeten l'aprenentatge màquinari supervisat i l'anàlisi de dades. Per reduir el cost de l'anotació manual, les tasques sovint s'assenyen a treballadors d'Internet els judicis dels quals es reconcilien pels models de crowdsourcing. Aproximem el problem a de crowdsourcing fent servir un marc per aprendre amb coneixements anticipats rics, i identificem una família de models crowdsourcing amb la novel habilitat de combinar anotacions amb e structures diferents: per exemple etiquetes de documents i etiquetes de paraules. Els judicis d'anotació es donen en forma de valor previst de les funcions de mesura calculades sobre les anotacions i les dades, unificant els models d'anotació. El nostre model, un exemple específic d'aquest marc, es compara favorablement amb la feina anterior. A més, permet la selecció activa de mostres, seleccionant conjuntament anotator, item de dades i estructura d'anotació per reduir l'esforç d'anotació.", 'cs': 'Anotované korpusy umožňují kontrolované strojové učení a analýzu dat. Pro snížení nákladů na ruční anotaci jsou úkoly často přidělovány internetovým pracovníkům, jejichž úsudky jsou sladěny crowdsourcingovými modely. K problematice crowdsourcingu přistupujeme pomocí rámce pro učení se z bohatých předchozích znalostí a identifikujeme rodinu crowdsourcingových modelů s novou schopností kombinovat anotace s různými strukturami: např. štítky dokumentů a slovní štítky. Anotátorové hodnocení jsou uvedeny ve formě předpokládané očekávané hodnoty měřicích funkcí vypočítané nad anotacemi a daty, sjednocující anotační modely. Náš model, konkrétní instance tohoto rámce, se příznivě srovnává s předchozími pracemi. Dále umožňuje aktivní výběr vzorků, společný výběr anotátoru, datové položky a anotace struktury pro snížení námahy na anotaci.', 'tr': 'Annotated corpora controlled machine learning and data analysis enable. El ýagşyrymyň tölegini azaltmak üçin, işleri köplenç internet işgärlerine, adamlaryň halkara nusgalary tarapyndan barlap çykýarlar. Biz gaty adamlary öňki bilgilerinden öwrenmek üçin çerçewçilikden ullanýan eserlere golaýlaşýarys we biz gaty adamlaryň nusgalaryny farklı düzümleri bilen birleşdirmek üçin bir maşgalasyny tanyýarys. mysal. sened etiketleri we söz etiketleri. Notatörler yargılamalar, notasyon modellerini birleştirmek üzere hesaplanmış ölçüm fonksiyonların önlenmiş beklenen değerinde verildir. Biziň nusgymyz, bu çerýädäki a ýratyn bir örnek, öňki işiň bilen gowy görýär. Munuň üstine, bu janlaşdyrma saýlawy mümkin edýär, ýazgytçi saýlawy bilen saýlaýar, maglumat täblisasini azaltmak üçin sözleşdirmek üçin.', 'et': 'Annoteeritud korpused võimaldavad juhendatud masinõppe ja andmete analüüsi. Käsitsi märgistamise kulude vähendamiseks määratakse ülesanded sageli internetitöötajatele, kelle hinnangud ühitatakse ühishankimise mudelitega. Läheneme ühishankimise probleemile, kasutades raamistikku rikkalikest varasematest teadmistest õppimiseks, ning tuvastame ühishankimise mudelite perekonna, millel on uudne võime kombineerida märkusi erinevate struktuuridega: nt dokumendi- ja sõnasildid. Annotatorhinnangud antakse annotatsioonide ja andmete kaudu arvutatud mõõtefunktsioonide prognoositava oodatava väärtuse kujul, ühendades annotatsioonimudelid. Meie mudel, selle raamistiku konkreetne näide, võrdleb eelmise tööga soodsalt. Lisaks võimaldab see aktiivset valimit, valides ühiselt annotaatori, andmeüksuse ja annotatsiooni struktuuri, et vähendada annotatsioonijõupingutust.', 'fi': 'Annotoidut korpuset mahdollistavat ohjatun koneoppimisen ja datan analysoinnin. Manuaalisen merkinnän kustannusten vähentämiseksi tehtäviä annetaan usein internetin työntekijöille, joiden arviot sovitetaan yhteen joukkoistamismallien avulla. Lähestymme joukkoistamisen ongelmaa käyttämällä viitekehystä, jolla opitaan rikkaasta aikaisemmasta tiedosta, ja tunnistamme joukkoistamismallien perheen, jolla on uudenlainen kyky yhdistää huomautuksia erilaisiin rakenteisiin: esim. dokumentti- ja sanalaput. Annotatoriarviot annetaan mittausfunktioiden ennakoidun odotetun arvon muodossa, joka lasketaan merkintöjen ja tietojen avulla yhdistäen annotaatiomalleja. Mallimme, joka on tämän viitekehyksen erityinen esimerkki, vertailee suotuisasti aikaisempaan työhön. Lisäksi se mahdollistaa aktiivisen otoksen valinnan, jossa yhdessä valitaan huomautus, tietokohde ja huomautusrakenne merkintöjen tekemisen vähentämiseksi.', 'jv': 'Ngalesi Cep Siji digawe manut manut manut karo akeh pengguna-manut karo data antali Rasané mbugal manut, dadi sing ngomong nik wektu nggawe Internet karo perbudhakan kanggo didasai nggawe barang manit Awak dhéwé beraksi perbudhakan kanggo nggambar nggawe sistem sing nyimpen kanggo ngerasah juta luwih dumadhi, lan awak dhéwé nggawe lanjut panelusuran model sing beraksi lan ijolan winih sing beraksi lan akeh dumadhi nggawe alamat sak sampeyan wigatining ketahanan sampeyan sampeyan: p.esb. unit-format Sampeyan, akeh pengguna sampeyan ingkang sampeyan karo akeh barêt nang arep sing dibutuhke politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': "Anã sanar da shirin firma na fara a kan tsari da zane-zane da aka yi tsari. To reduce the cost of manual annotation, tasks are often assigned to internet workers whose judgments are reconciled by crowdsourcing models.  Munã kusantar masu matsalar mutane da za'a yi amfani da wani firam wa learning daga tajiri a gabãnin wani ilmi, kuma tuna gane wani gidan misãlai na umarni da abincin ya sami taƙaitacce da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane. Ana motsa masu motsi cikin tsarin mai ƙayyade kima da aka ƙayyade shi a lissafa wa shirin haske da aka lissafa wa taƙaita da data, kuma, ana daidaita misãlai masu alama. Misalinmu, misali mai ƙayyade wannan firam, yana sami mafi kyaun aiki da ya gabata. Furan haka, yana tafiyar da zaɓen misãlai masu fara, kuma yana zãɓi mai nuna, abun data da shirin ayuka da za'a ƙara aikin taƙaita.", 'sk': 'Anotirani korpusi omogočajo nadzorovano strojno učenje in analizo podatkov. Da bi zmanjšali stroške ročnega označevanja, so naloge pogosto dodeljene internetnim delavcem, katerih presoje se uskladijo z modeli množičnega nabora. Problem množičnega sourcinga pristopamo s pomočjo okvira za učenje iz bogatega predhodnega znanja in prepoznamo družino modelov množičnega sourcinga z novo sposobnostjo kombiniranja opomb z različnimi strukturami: npr. nalepke dokumentov in besednih nalepk. Anotatorske presoje so podane v obliki predvidene pričakovane vrednosti merilnih funkcij, izračunane prek opomb in podatkov, ki združujejo modele opomb. Naš model, specifičen primer tega okvira, se ugodno primerja s prejšnjim delom. Poleg tega omogoča aktivno izbiro vzorca, skupno izbiro označevalnika, podatkovnega elementa in strukture označevanja za zmanjšanje napora z označevanjem.', 'he': 'הקופורה הנתונה מאפשרת לימוד מכונות ומחקר נתונים. כדי להפחית את העלות של הערות ידנית, משימות נותנות לעתים קרובות לעובדים באינטרנט ששיפוטים שלהם מתאימים על ידי דוגמנים של crowdsourcing. אנו מתקרבים לבעיה של crowdsourcing באמצעות מסגרת ללמוד מידע עשיר קודם לכן, ואנחנו מזהה משפחה של מודלים crowdsourcing עם היכולת הרומנית לשלב הערות עם מבנים שונים: למשל תוויות מסמכים ותויות מילים. שיפוטים נותנים בצורה של ערך צפוי צפוי של פונקציות המדידה מחשבים על ידי ציונים והנתונים, מאחדים דוגמנים של ציונים. המודל שלנו, דוגמה מסוימת של המסגרת הזו, משווה בעדיפות עם עבודה קודמת. חוץ מזה, זה מאפשר לבחור דגימה פעילה, לבחור ביחד מצביע, פריט נתונים ומבנה הצביעה כדי להפחית מאמץ הצביעה.', 'bo': 'སྐུལ་མཐུད་བྱས་པའི་མཁན་གྱི་རྩིས་འཁོར་ལྟ་རྟོག་པ་དང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ ལག་བཟོས་ཟིན་བྲིས་གྱི་སྐོར་ཚད་དམའ་དགོས་བྱས་ན། དྲ་རྒྱའི་ནང་དུ་ལས་ཀ་དག་གི་མིང་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་མང་པོའི་མིང་དཔེ་གཏོང་བ་དང་མ We approach the problem of crowdsourcing using a framework for learning from rich prior knowledge, and we identify a family of crowdsourcing models with the novel ability to combine annotations with differing structures: e.g., document labels and word labels. Examples: Annotator judgments are given in the form of the predicted expected value of measurement functions computed over annotations and the data, unifying annotation models. Annotator judgments are given in the form of the predicted expected value of measurement functions computed over annotations and the data, unifying annotation models. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས། དཔེ་གཞུང་འདིའི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་གཅིག་ནི་སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་ཐང་ཡོད། དེ་ཡང་མིན་ན། འདིས་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སེལ་འཐུ་བྱེད་པར་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Structure-Infused Copy Mechanisms for Abstractive Summarization', 'ar': 'آليات النسخ المشبعة بالبنية للتلخيص التجريدي', 'pt': 'Mecanismos de cópia estruturados para sumarização abstrativa', 'es': 'Mecanismos de copia basada en la estructura para la sumarización abstractiva', 'fr': 'Mécanismes de copie imprégnés de structure pour la synthèse abstraite', 'zh': '用抽象摘要结构注复制机制', 'hi': 'Abstractive Summarization के लिए Structure-Infused Copy Mechanisms', 'ja': '抽象的な要約のための構造情報コピーメカニズム', 'ru': 'Механизмы копирования с учетом структуры для абстрактного обобщения', 'ga': 'Meicníochtaí Cóipeála Struchtúr-Insileadh le haghaidh Achoimriú Teibí', 'hu': 'Strukturális másolási mechanizmusok absztrakt összefoglaláshoz', 'el': 'Δομικοί μηχανισμοί αντιγραφής για την αφηρημένη περίληψη', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Meccanismi di copia incorporati nella struttura per la sintesi astratta', 'lt': 'Struktūroje naudojami kopijos mechanizmai abstrakčiai apibendrinti', 'mk': 'Механизми за копирање со структура за апстрактивна резервација', 'kk': 'Абстрактивті тұжырымдамасы үшін құрылғының көшірме механизмі', 'ml': 'അബ്ട്രാക്ട്രാക്ടിവിന്റെ ചുരുക്കത്തിനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനം- ഇന്\u200dഫുള്\u200dസ് ചെയ്തു', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Structure-Infused Copy Mechanisms for Abstractive Summarization', 'mn': 'Абстрактив тодруулалтын бүтэц-хязгаарлагдсан хуулийн механизм', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Mechanizmy kopiowania oparte na strukturze dla abstrakcyjnego podsumowania', 'ro': 'Mecanisme de copiere în structură pentru rezumare abstractă', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Struktura-Infuzirani kopijski mehanizam za abstraktivnu sažetku', 'so': 'Build-Infused Copy mechanisms for Abstractive Summariisation', 'sv': 'Strukturinförda kopieringsmekanismer för abstraktiv sammanfattning', 'ta': 'சுருக்கமாக்கத்திற்கான அமைப்பு- Infused நகல் முறைமைகள்', 'ur': 'Structure-Infused Copy Mechanisms for Abstractive Summarization', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': "Bộ cấu trúc'truyền thông'cho tổng hợp ngẫu nhiên", 'bg': 'Структурни копирни механизми за абстрактивно обобщаване', 'da': 'Strukturtilførte kopieringsmekanismer til abstrakt opsummering', 'hr': 'Struktura-infuzirani kopijski mehanizam za abstraktivnu sažetku', 'nl': 'Door structuur geïnspireerde kopieermechanismen voor abstracte samenvatting', 'de': 'Strukturbasierte Kopiermechanismen zur abstrakten Zusammenfassung', 'fa': 'مکانیسم\u200cهای کپی ساختار بی\u200cاستفاده برای جمع\u200cآوری بی\u200cاستفاده', 'id': 'Mekanisme Salin Infusi Struktur untuk Penapisan Abstraktif', 'ko': '구조 주입의 추상적 요약 복제 메커니즘', 'sw': 'Structure-Infused Copy Mechanisms for Abstractive Summarization', 'tr': 'Abstraktiv Iňleşdirmek üçin struktur-Girişmiş Nusgala Meýdançalary', 'af': 'Comment', 'sq': 'Structure-Infused Copy Mechanisms for Abstractive Summarization', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'আবট্র্যাক্ট্রাক্টিভ সামারিজেশনের ক্ষেত্র- ইনফাউট করা কপি মেকানিস্টেম', 'ca': 'Mécanismes de copia per a resumir', 'bs': 'Struktura-Infuzirani kopijski mehanizam za abstraktivnu sažetku', 'cs': 'Kopírovací mechanismy podporované strukturou pro abstraktní shrnutí', 'et': 'Struktuuri sisestatud koopiamehhanismid kokkuvõtlikuks kokkuvõtteks', 'fi': 'Structure-Infused Copy Mechanisms for Abstractive Summarization', 'az': 'Structure-Infused Copy Mechanisms for Abstractive Summarization', 'sk': 'Strukturni mehanizmi kopiranja za povzetek', 'jv': 'Name', 'he': 'Mechanisms of Copy Infused-Structure for Abstractive Summarization', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Structure-Infused Copy Mechanisms for Abstractive Summarization'}
{'en': 'Seq2seq learning has produced promising results on summarization. However, in many cases, system summaries still struggle to keep the meaning of the original intact. They may miss out important words or relations that play critical roles in the syntactic structure of source sentences. In this paper, we present structure-infused copy mechanisms to facilitate copying important words and relations from the source sentence to summary sentence. The approach naturally combines source dependency structure with the copy mechanism of an abstractive sentence summarizer. Experimental results demonstrate the effectiveness of incorporating source-side syntactic information in the system, and our proposed approach compares favorably to state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'أنتج تعلم Seq2seq نتائج واعدة في التلخيص. ومع ذلك ، في كثير من الحالات ، لا تزال ملخصات النظام تكافح للحفاظ على المعنى الأصلي كما هو. قد يفوتهم الكلمات أو العلاقات المهمة التي تلعب أدوارًا حاسمة في البنية النحوية لجمل المصدر. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم آليات نسخ مفعمة بالهيكل لتسهيل نسخ الكلمات والعلاقات المهمة من الجملة المصدر إلى الجملة الموجزة. يجمع النهج بشكل طبيعي بين بنية تبعية المصدر وآلية النسخ لملخص الجملة التجريدي. تظهر النتائج التجريبية فعالية دمج المعلومات النحوية من جانب المصدر في النظام ، ونهجنا المقترح يقارن بشكل إيجابي مع أحدث الأساليب.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage Seq2seq a produit des résultats prometteurs en matière de synthèse. Cependant, dans de nombreux cas, les résumés système ont encore du mal à conserver le sens de l'original intact. Ils peuvent passer à côté de mots ou de relations importants qui jouent un rôle essentiel dans la structure syntaxique des phrases sources. Dans cet article, nous présentons des mécanismes de copie intégrés à la structure pour faciliter la copie de mots et de relations importants de la phrase source à la phrase récapitulative. L'approche combine naturellement la structure de dépendance de la source avec le mécanisme de copie d'un synthétiseur de phrases abstraites. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent l'efficacité de l'intégration d'informations syntaxiques côté source dans le système, et l'approche que nous proposons se compare favorablement aux méthodes de pointe.", 'es': 'El aprendizaje de Seq2seq ha producido resultados prometedores en el resumen. Sin embargo, en muchos casos, los resúmenes del sistema siguen teniendo dificultades para mantener intacto el significado del original. Es posible que pierdan palabras o relaciones importantes que desempeñan un papel fundamental en la estructura sintáctica de las oraciones fuente. En este artículo, presentamos mecanismos de copia con estructura infundida para facilitar la copia de palabras y relaciones importantes de la oración fuente a la oración resumida. El enfoque combina naturalmente la estructura de dependencia de la fuente con el mecanismo de copia de un resumidor de oraciones abstractivas. Los resultados experimentales demuestran la eficacia de incorporar información sintáctica del lado de la fuente en el sistema, y nuestro enfoque propuesto se compara favorablemente con los métodos más avanzados.', 'pt': 'A aprendizagem Seq2seq produziu resultados promissores na sumarização. No entanto, em muitos casos, os resumos do sistema ainda lutam para manter intacto o significado do original. Eles podem perder palavras ou relações importantes que desempenham papéis críticos na estrutura sintática das frases de origem. Neste artigo, apresentamos mecanismos de cópia infundidos de estrutura para facilitar a cópia de palavras e relações importantes da frase de origem para a frase de resumo. A abordagem combina naturalmente a estrutura de dependência da fonte com o mecanismo de cópia de um sumarizador de frases abstrativo. Os resultados experimentais demonstram a eficácia da incorporação de informações sintáticas do lado da fonte no sistema, e nossa abordagem proposta se compara favoravelmente aos métodos de última geração.', 'ja': 'Seq 2 seq学習は、要約に関する有望な結果をもたらした。しかしながら、多くの場合、システムの要約は依然として元の意味をそのまま維持するのに苦労している。ソース文の構文構造において重要な役割を果たす重要な単語や関係を見逃す可能性があります。本稿では，重要な単語や関係をソース文から要約文へコピーすることを容易にするための構造化されたコピーメカニズムを提示する．このアプローチは、ソース依存構造と抽象的な文のサマライザのコピーメカニズムを自然に組み合わせている。実験結果は、ソース側の構文情報をシステムに組み込むことの有効性を実証し、当社の提案アプローチは最先端の手法と比較して有利です。', 'zh': 'Seq2seq学于总结而可喜也。 然系统摘要难守也。 或失于源句句法中起关键作用之要单词。 于本文中,条上复制机,以便单词从源句复制到摘要句。 自然结构抽象句摘要生成器复制机合。 实验验纳源端句法息之有效性,与先进为便。', 'hi': 'Seq2seq सीखने summarization पर आशाजनक परिणाम का उत्पादन किया है. हालांकि, कई मामलों में, सिस्टम सारांश अभी भी मूल के अर्थ को बरकरार रखने के लिए संघर्ष करते हैं। वे महत्वपूर्ण शब्दों या संबंधों को याद कर सकते हैं जो स्रोत वाक्यों की वाक्यात्मक संरचना में महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम स्रोत वाक्य से सारांश वाक्य तक महत्वपूर्ण शब्दों और संबंधों की प्रतिलिपि बनाने की सुविधा के लिए संरचना-संक्रमित प्रतिलिपि तंत्र प्रस्तुत करते हैं। दृष्टिकोण स्वाभाविक रूप से एक अमूर्त वाक्य summarizer की प्रतिलिपि तंत्र के साथ स्रोत निर्भरता संरचना को जोड़ती है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम सिस्टम में स्रोत-पक्ष वाक्यात्मक जानकारी को शामिल करने की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं, और हमारा प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से अनुकूल रूप से तुलना करता है।', 'ru': 'Обучение Seq2seq дало многообещающие результаты по обобщению. Тем не менее, во многих случаях системные резюме все еще пытаются сохранить значение первоначального текста в неизменном виде. Они могут пропустить важные слова или отношения, которые играют решающую роль в синтаксической структуре исходных предложений. В этой статье мы представляем механизмы копирования, основанные на структуре, для облегчения копирования важных слов и отношений от исходного предложения к сводному предложению. Подход, естественно, сочетает структуру зависимости источника с механизмом копирования абстрактного реферата. Экспериментальные результаты демонстрируют эффективность включения в систему исходной синтаксической информации, и предлагаемый нами подход выгодно отличается от современных методов.', 'ga': 'Tá torthaí tuar dóchais inti maidir le hachoimriú ag foghlaim Seq2seq. Mar sin féin, i go leor cásanna, tá achoimrí córais fós ag streachailt le brí an bhunaidh a choinneáil slán. Seans go gcaillfidh siad focail nó caidreamh tábhachtach a imríonn róil ríthábhachtacha i struchtúr comhréire abairtí foinse. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid meicníochtaí cóipeála struchtúr-inste i láthair chun cóipeáil focail agus caidrimh thábhachtacha ón abairt fhoinse go dtí an abairt achomair a éascú. Nascann an cur chuige struchtúr spleáchais foinse go nádúrtha le meicníocht chóip d’achoimreoir abairtí teibí. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha a éifeachtaí atá sé faisnéis chomhréire ó thaobh na foinse a ionchorprú sa chóras, agus tá comparáid fhabhrach idir ár gcur chuige molta agus modhanna úrscothacha.', 'hu': 'A Seq2seq tanulás ígéretes eredményeket hozott az összefoglalásban. Sok esetben azonban a rendszer összefoglalói még mindig nehezen tudják megőrizni az eredeti jelentését. Előfordulhat, hogy fontos szavakat vagy kapcsolatokat hagynak ki, amelyek kritikus szerepet játszanak a forráspontok szintaktikus struktúrájában. Ebben a tanulmányban olyan strukturális másolási mechanizmusokat mutatunk be, amelyek megkönnyítik a fontos szavak és kapcsolatok másolását a forrásból az összefoglaló mondatba. A megközelítés természetesen kombinálja a forrásfüggőség struktúráját egy absztrakt mondat összefoglaló másolási mechanizmusával. Kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják, hogy a forrás oldali szintaktikus információk beépítésének hatékonyságát a rendszerbe, és javasolt megközelítésünk kedvezően hasonlít össze a korszerű módszerekkel.', 'el': 'Η μάθηση έχει παράγει πολλά υποσχόμενα αποτελέσματα στην περίληψη. Ωστόσο, σε πολλές περιπτώσεις, οι περιλήψεις συστημάτων εξακολουθούν να αγωνίζονται να διατηρήσουν ανέπαφη την έννοια του αρχικού. Μπορεί να παραλείψουν σημαντικές λέξεις ή σχέσεις που παίζουν κρίσιμο ρόλο στη συντακτική δομή των προτάσεων προέλευσης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μηχανισμούς αντιγραφής με δομή που διευκολύνουν την αντιγραφή σημαντικών λέξεων και σχέσεων από την πρόταση προέλευσης έως τη συνοπτική πρόταση. Η προσέγγιση συνδυάζει φυσικά τη δομή εξάρτησης από την πηγή με τον μηχανισμό αντιγραφής ενός αφηρημένου συνοψίματος προτάσεων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της ενσωμάτωσης συντακτικών πληροφοριών στην πλευρά της πηγής στο σύστημα, και η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση συγκρίνεται ευνοϊκά με τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους.', 'ka': 'Name მაგრამ, ბევრი შემთხვევაში სისტემის საზოგადოებები უკვე მუშაობენ, რომ ორიგინალური საზოგადოებას დაუყურებთ. ისინი შეიძლება გამოსხვა მნიშვნელოვანი სიტყვები ან შესახებ, რომლებიც კრიტიკური პროლის შესახებ სინტაქტიური სტრუქტურაციაში. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სტრუქტურაციის ინფორმაციული კომენციური მექანიზები, რომელიც უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი სიტყვების და შესახებების კომენტირება პროგრამა ნაირად გამოიყენება წიგნის დასახლოების სტრუქტურაციას აბსტრაქტიგური სიმბოლოების კოპერის მექანიზმისთვის. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოიყენებენ სინტაქტიური ინფორმაციის გამოყენება სისტემიში, და ჩვენი მიზეზეზი პროგენტის გამოყენება საუკეთესო სინტაქტიური მეტისთან', 'it': "L'apprendimento Seq2Seq ha prodotto risultati promettenti sulla sintesi. Tuttavia, in molti casi, i riassunti di sistema ancora faticano a mantenere intatto il significato dell'originale. Possono perdere parole importanti o relazioni che svolgono un ruolo critico nella struttura sintattica delle frasi di origine. In questo articolo, presentiamo meccanismi di copia strutturati per facilitare la copia di parole e relazioni importanti dalla frase di origine alla frase di sintesi. L'approccio combina naturalmente la struttura di dipendenza della fonte con il meccanismo di copia di un riassunto astratto di frasi. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano l'efficacia di incorporare informazioni sintattiche sul lato sorgente nel sistema, e il nostro approccio proposto si confronta favorevolmente con metodi all'avanguardia.", 'kk': 'Seq2seq оқыту жалғастыратын нәтижелерді жасады. Бірақ көптеген жағдайда жүйелік тұжырымдары бастапқы мәліметті сақтау үшін әлі қиындайды. Олар көздегі сөздер синтактикалық құрылымында маңызды сөздер немесе қатынастар жоқ болуы мүмкін. Бұл қағазға құрылымызды көшірмелеу механизмтерді көшірмелеу үшін маңызды сөздер мен қатынастарды көшірмелеу үшін көшірмелеу үшін көшірмелеу механизмтерді таңдаймыз. Бұл тәртібі көзінің тәуелдік құрылғысын абстрактивті сөздердің көшірмелеу механизмімен біріктіреді. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер жүйеңізде көзінің синтактикалық мәліметін қосу мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Біздің таңдаған тәсіліміз жүйеңіздің күй- жай әдістеріне салыстырады.', 'mk': 'Учењето Seq2seq предизвика ветувачки резултати за резултатите. Сепак, во многу случаи, резултатите на системот сé уште се борат за да го задржат значењето на оригиналот intact. Тие може да пропуштат важни зборови или односи кои играат критична улога во синтактичката структура на изворните реченици. Во овој документ, претставуваме механизми за копирање со структура за олеснување на копирање важни зборови и односи од изворната реченица до кратка реченица. The approach naturally combines source dependency structure with the copy mechanism of an abstractive sentence summarizer.  Експерименталните резултати ја покажуваат ефикасноста на вклучувањето на синтактичките информации од страна на изворот во системот, и нашиот предложен пристап се споредува со најдобрите методи.', 'lt': '„Seq2seq“ mokymasis suteikė perspektyvių rezultatų santraukai. Tačiau daugeliu atvejų sistemų santraukos vis dar stengiasi išlaikyti originalo reikšmę nepažeidžiama. Jie gali praleisti svarbius žodžius arba santykius, kurie atlieka lemiamą vaidmenį sintaksinėje pradinių sakinių struktūroje. Šiame dokumente pristatome struktūrinius kopijų mechanizmus, kad būtų lengviau kopijuoti svarbius žodžius ir santykius nuo pradinio sakinio iki santraukinio sakinio. The approach naturally combines source dependency structure with the copy mechanism of an abstractive sentence summarizer.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo sintaksinės informacijos iš šaltinio įtraukimo į sistemą veiksmingumą, o mūsų siūlomas metodas yra palankiai lyginamas su naujausiais metodais.', 'ml': 'സെക്ക്2സെക്ക് പഠിക്കുന്നത് ചുരുക്കത്തില്\u200d പ്രത്യേക ഫലം ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. എങ്കിലും പല കാര്യങ്ങളിലും, സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ വേര്\u200dപ്പുകള്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴും പോരാടുന്നു. അതിന്റെ അർത്ഥം പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമ സോര്\u200dസ്റ്റിക്ക് വാക്കുകളുടെ സിനിട്ടാക്ടിക്ക് സംഘടിപ്പില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളോ ബന്ധങ്ങളോ അവര ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകളും ബന്ധങ്ങളും സൂര്യശിക്ഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും വാക്കുകള The approach naturally combines source dependency structure with the copy mechanism of an abstractive sentence summarizer.  പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d സോര്\u200dസിഡ് സിനിറ്റാക്റ്റിക്ക് വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പ്ര', 'mn': 'Seq2seq суралцах нь жинхэнэ хэмжээний үр дүнг бүтээсэн. Гэхдээ ихэнх тохиолдолд системийн жишээлүүд нь эхний утгыг сайжруулахын тулд тэмцдэг. Тэд эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэрүүдийн синтактик бүтээгдэхүүний чухал үг эсвэл харилцаа холбоотой байж магадгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид бүтээгдэхүүний хэрэглэгдсэн хуулийн механизм бий болгож эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэрээс хамаарах чухал үг, харилцаа хуулбарлах боломжтой болгож байна. Байгалийн арга нь эх үүсвэрийн хамааралтай бүтцийг abstractive sentence summarizer-ын хууль механизмтэй холбоотой. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд системд эх үүсвэрийн синтактик мэдээллийг нэгтгэх үр дүнг харуулж байна. Бидний санал өгсөн арга барилга нь урлагийн хувьд илүү сайн харьцуулдаг.', 'no': 'Seq2seq-læring har laga forelæringsresultat på sammendraging. I mange tilfeller kan imidlertid systemsamandringar fortsatt strømme for å halda meningen til den opprinnelige innteken. Dei kan mista viktige ord eller relasjonar som speler kritiske rolar i den syntaktiske strukturen av kjeldesetninga. I denne papiret presenterer vi struktureinfuserte kopimekanisme for å gjera kopiering av viktige ord og relasjonar frå kjeldesetninga til samandrag. Tilnærminga kombinerer naturleg kjeldeavhengighetsstrukturen med kopimekanismen til ein abstraktiv setjingsamandrag. Eksperimentale resultat viser effektiviteten for inkludering av kjeldesidesyntaktiske informasjon i systemet, og vår foreslått tilnærming sammenlignar favoritt med kunstmetodar.', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim Seq2seq ipproduċa riżultati promettenti dwar is-sommarju. However, in many cases, system summaries still struggle to keep the meaning of the original intact.  Jistgħu jitilfu kliem jew relazzjonijiet importanti li għandhom rwoli kritiċi fl-istruttura sintattika tas-sentenzi tas-sors. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw mekkaniżmi ta’ kopja infużi bl-istruttura biex niffaċilitaw il-kopja ta’ kliem u relazzjonijiet importanti mis-sentenza tas-sors għas-sentenza fil-qosor. L-approċċ naturalment jikkombina l-istruttura tad-dipendenza tas-sors mal-mekkaniżmu ta’ kopja ta’ sommarju tas-sentenzi astrattivi. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru l-effettività tal-inkorporazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni sintattika min-naħa tas-sors fis-sistema, u l-approċċ propost tagħna jqabbel b’mod favorevoli mal-metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'pl': 'Nauka Seq2seq przyniosła obiecujące rezultaty w zakresie podsumowania. Jednak w wielu przypadkach podsumowania systemowe wciąż starają się utrzymać znaczenie oryginału w nienaruszonym stanie. Mogą ominąć ważne słowa lub relacje, które odgrywają kluczową rolę w składni zdań źródłowych. W artykule przedstawiamy strukturalne mechanizmy kopiowania, które ułatwiają kopiowanie ważnych słów i relacji od zdania źródłowego do zdania podsumowującego. Podejście to naturalnie łączy strukturę zależności źródła z mechanizmem kopiowania abstrakcyjnego podsumowywania zdań. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują skuteczność włączania do systemu informacji składniowych po stronie źródła, a proponowane podejście jest korzystne do najnowocześniejszych metod.', 'sr': 'Seq2seq učenje proizvela je obećavajuće rezultate za sažetanje. Međutim, u mnogim slučajevima, sažetke sistema se još uvek bore da bi zadržali smisao originalnog nenasilnog. Možda im nedostaju važne reči ili odnose koji igraju kritične uloge u sintaktičkoj strukturi izvornih rečenica. U ovom papiru predstavljamo mehanizme za kopiranje važnih reči i odnosa iz izvorne rečenice do sažetke rečenice. Prirodno pristup kombinira strukturu zavisnosti izvora sa kopijskim mehanizam sažetelja abstraktivnih rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju učinkovitost uključivanja sintaktičkih informacija na izvorsku stranu u sistemu, a naš predloženi pristup uspoređuje u dobrobiti sa metodama umjetnosti.', 'ro': 'Învățarea Seq2Seq a produs rezultate promițătoare în rezumat. Cu toate acestea, în multe cazuri, rezumatele sistemului încă se luptă pentru a păstra intact sensul originalului. Ele pot pierde cuvinte importante sau relații care joacă roluri critice în structura sintactică a propozițiilor sursă. În această lucrare, prezentăm mecanisme de copiere infuzate de structură pentru a facilita copierea cuvintelor și relațiilor importante de la propoziția sursă la propoziția sumară. Abordarea combină în mod natural structura dependenței sursei cu mecanismul de copiere al unui rezumator abstractiv de propoziții. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează eficiența încorporării informațiilor sintactice din partea sursei în sistem, iar abordarea noastră propusă se compară favorabil cu metodele de ultimă generație.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada Seq2seq wuxuu soo saaray resulto ballan ah oo ku saabsan dhamaadka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee xaalado badan, nidaamka xiligiisu weli wuxuu u dagaalamaa inuu haysto micneheeda asalka ah. Waxay ka baaqan karaan erayo muhiim ah ama xiriir muhiim ah oo qayb muhiim ah ku ciyaaraya dhismaha isbitaalka ee xukunka sourceed. Qoraalkan waxaynu ku soo qornaa meymisyo koopiyo ah oo la isticmaalay si aan u fududayno qoraalada muhiimka ah iyo xiriirka laga soo qoro xafiiska asalka ilaa xafiiska summiga ah. Xaalku wuxuu si dabiiqada ah ugu soo bandhigaa dhismaha rasmiga ku xiran lahaanshaha suurtagalka ah, kaas oo ku qoran qoraalka koobiga ee xafiiska xafiiska ah. Abaalka imtixaanka waxaa muujiya saameynta ku qorashada macluumaadka kooxaha ee dhinaca iyo dhinaca issyntactic ee nidaamka, qaababka la soo jeedeyna ayaa si fiican u dhigi karta qaababka farshaxanka.', 'sv': 'Sek2seq lärande har gett lovande resultat på sammanfattning. Men i många fall kämpar systemsammanfattningar fortfarande för att behålla innebörden av originalet intakt. De kan missa viktiga ord eller relationer som spelar viktiga roller i den syntaktiska strukturen av källmeningar. I denna uppsats presenterar vi strukturerade kopieringsmekanismer för att underlätta kopiering av viktiga ord och relationer från källmeningen till sammanfattande mening. Metoden kombinerar naturligt källberoendestruktur med kopieringsmekanismen för en abstraktiv meningssummanfattning. Experimentella resultat visar effektiviteten av att införliva källsyntaktisk information i systemet, och vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt jämför positivt med state-of-the-art metoder.', 'si': 'Seq2seq ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරලා තියෙනවා. නමුත්, ගොඩක් විදිහට, පද්ධතිය සාමාව තාමත් සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ පද්ධතියේ අදහසක් තියාගන්න. ඔවුන්ට වැදගත් වචන නැති සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැති වෙන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ වචන නැති සම්බන්ධතාවක් නැත මේ පැත්තට, අපි ස්ථාපනය සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ වැදගත් වචන සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් පිළිබඳ වචන සම්බන්ධ කරල ප්\u200dරවේශය ස්වභාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ විශේෂකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ විශේෂතාව සම්බන්ධ කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර සංකේතික තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධතාවක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්', 'ur': 'Seq2seq کی تعلیم تعلیم تعلیم کے ساتھ وعدہ کا نتیجہ پیدا کیا گیا ہے۔ However, in many cases, system summaries still struggle to keep the meaning of the original intact. وہ اہم کلمات یا ارتباط کو چھوڑ سکتے ہیں جو سورج جماعتوں کی سینٹکتیک ساختار میں ضروری رول کھیلتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ساختاری مکانیسم کی مکانیسم پیش کیے ہیں کہ کلمات اور ارتباط کو سورس جماعت سے جمع کرنے کے لئے آسان کریں۔ اس طریقہ کو طبیعی طور پر سورج اعتباری ساختار سے ایک مکاپی مکانیزمن کے ساتھ ترکیب کرتا ہے. آزمائش کے نتائج سٹم میں سورج جانب سینٹکتیک معلومات کے ساتھ شامل ہونے کا اثرات دکھاتے ہیں، اور ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ آزمائش کے طریقے سے بہترین مقایسہ کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'செக்2seq கற்றல் சுருக்கியத்தில் வாக்கும் விளைவுகளை உருவாக்கியது. இருந்தாலும், பல நிலைகளில், முறைமையின் சுருக்கம் இன்னும் முதல் பாதுகாப்பு என்ற அர்த்தத்தை வைத்து போர மூல வாக்குகளின் ஒத்திசைவு கட்டுப்பாட்டில் விளையாடும் முக்கியமான வார்த்தைகள் அல்லது தொடர்புகளை அவர்கள இந்த காகிதத்தில், மூல வாக்கியத்திலிருந்து சுருக்கம் வாக்கியத்திற்கு முக்கியமான வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகளை நகல இந்த அணுகல் இயற்கையாக மூலத்தை சார்ந்த அமைப்புடன் நகல் முறைமையை சேர்க்கும் சேர்க்கிறது. முயற்சி முடிவுகள் கணினியில் மூல- பக்கத்தில் ஒத்திசைவு தகவலை சேர்க்கும் விளைவை காட்டுகிறது, மற்றும் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைய செயல்பாடு ம', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Seq2seq telah menghasilkan keputusan yang berjanji dalam ringkasan. Bagaimanapun, dalam banyak kes, ringkasan sistem masih berjuang untuk menjaga makna asal yang selamat. Mereka mungkin melewatkan kata-kata penting atau hubungan yang bermain peran kritik dalam struktur sintaktik kalimat sumber. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan mekanisme salinan yang diberi struktur untuk memudahkan salinan perkataan penting dan hubungan dari kalimat sumber ke kalimat ringkasan. The approach naturally combines source dependency structure with the copy mechanism of an abstractive sentence summarizer.  Keputusan eksperimen menunjukkan keefektivitas memasukkan maklumat sintaktik sisi sumber dalam sistem, dan pendekatan yang kami cadangkan dibandingkan dengan kaedah terbaik.', 'uz': "Name Lekin ko'pchilik holatda, tizimning qismlari esa aslida hech qanday narsa davom etishga harakat qiladi. Ular manba soʻzlarning sintaktik tuzuvlarida muhim so'zlar yoki murakkablarini yoʻqolishi mumkin. Bu hujjatda, biz asboblar soʻzdagi muhim soʻzlarni nusxa olish va bogʻlamalarni kichik soʻzga nusxa olishga yordam beramiz. Name Name", 'vi': 'Việc học cách Seq2seq đã tạo ra những kết quả hứa hẹn về việc tổng hợp. Tuy nhiên, trong nhiều trường hợp, các bản tóm tắt hệ thống vẫn không thể giữ nguyên ý nghĩa của bản gốc. Họ có thể bỏ lỡ những từ hay quan hệ quan trọng đóng vai trò quan trọng trong cấu trúc cấu trúc cú pháp của các câu từ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi có những cơ chế tạo bản sao giúp việc sao chép những từ và quan hệ quan trọng từ câu đầu đến câu tổng hợp. Phương pháp này kết hợp cấu trúc phụ thuộc nguồn với cơ cấu sao chép của một bản trích dẫn tổng hợp. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy hiệu quả của việc nhập thông tin cú pháp từ nguồn vào hệ thống, và phương pháp được đề nghị tương thích với phương pháp hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Обучението е довело до обещаващи резултати при обобщаване. Въпреки това, в много случаи системните резюмета все още се борят да запазят смисъла на оригинала непокътнат. Те могат да пропуснат важни думи или отношения, които играят критична роля в синтактичната структура на изходните изречения. В тази статия представяме структурни копирни механизми, които улесняват копирането на важни думи и връзки от изходното изречение до обобщеното изречение. Подходът естествено съчетава структурата на зависимост от източника с механизма за копиране на абстрактен обобщаващ изречения. Експерименталните резултати показват ефективността на включването на синтактична информация от източника в системата, а предложеният ни подход се сравнява благоприятно с най-съвременните методи.', 'nl': 'Seq2seq leren heeft veelbelovende resultaten opgeleverd op het gebied van samenvatting. In veel gevallen worstelen systeemsamenvattingen echter nog steeds om de betekenis van het origineel intact te houden. Ze kunnen belangrijke woorden of relaties missen die een cruciale rol spelen in de syntactische structuur van bronzinnen. In dit artikel presenteren we structurele kopieermechanismen om het kopiëren van belangrijke woorden en relaties van de bronzin naar de samenvattende zin te vergemakkelijken. De aanpak combineert natuurlijk bronafhankelijkheidsstructuur met het kopieermechanisme van een abstracte zinssamenvatter. Experimentele resultaten tonen de effectiviteit aan van het opnemen van bronzijde syntactische informatie in het systeem, en onze voorgestelde aanpak vergelijkt gunstig met state-of-the-art methoden.', 'da': 'Sek2seq læring har givet lovende resultater på opsummering. Men i mange tilfælde har systemresuméer stadig svært ved at bevare betydningen af originalen intakt. De kan gå glip af vigtige ord eller relationer, der spiller kritiske roller i den syntaktiske struktur af kildesætninger. I denne artikel præsenterer vi strukturerede kopieringsmekanismer for at lette kopiering af vigtige ord og relationer fra kildesætningen til summarisk sætning. Tilgangen kombinerer naturligvis kildeafhængighedsstruktur med kopieringsmekanismen af en abstraktiv sætningsopsummer. Eksperimentelle resultater viser effektiviteten af at indarbejde kildeside syntaktisk information i systemet, og vores foreslåede tilgang sammenligner positivt med state-of-the-art metoder.', 'hr': 'Seq2seq učenje proizvelo je obećavajuće rezultate za sažetak. Međutim, u mnogim slučajevima, sažetke sustava se još uvijek bore za održavanje smisla originalnog nesposobnog. Mogu propustiti važne riječi ili odnose koji igraju kritične uloge u sintaktičkoj strukturi izvornih rečenica. U ovom papiru predstavljamo mehanizam kopije pod strukturom kako bi olakšali kopiranje važnih riječi i odnosa iz izvorne rečenice do sažetke rečenice. Prirodno pristup kombinira strukturu ovisnosti izvora s kopijskim mehanizam sažetelja abstraktivnih rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju učinkovitost uključivanja sintaktičkih informacija na izvorskoj strani u sustavu, a naš predloženi pristup uspoređuje u dobrobiti s metodama stanja umjetnosti.', 'de': 'Seq2seq-Lernen hat vielversprechende Ergebnisse bei der Zusammenfassung hervorgebracht. In vielen Fällen kämpfen Systemzusammenfassungen jedoch immer noch darum, die Bedeutung des Originals intakt zu halten. Sie können wichtige Wörter oder Beziehungen verpassen, die in der syntaktischen Struktur von Quellsätzen eine entscheidende Rolle spielen. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir strukturierte Kopiermechanismen vor, die das Kopieren wichtiger Wörter und Beziehungen vom Ausgangssatz in den zusammenfassenden Satz erleichtern. Der Ansatz kombiniert natürlich die Struktur der Quellenabhängigkeit mit dem Kopiermechanismus eines abstraktiven Satzes. Experimentelle Ergebnisse belegen die Effektivität der Integration quellenseitiger syntaktischer Informationen in das System, und unser vorgeschlagener Ansatz vergleicht sich günstig mit modernen Methoden.', 'id': 'Pembelajaran Seq2seq telah menghasilkan hasil yang berjanji dalam ringkasan. Namun, dalam banyak kasus, ringkasan sistem masih berjuang untuk menjaga arti asli intak. Mereka mungkin melewatkan kata-kata penting atau hubungan yang bermain peran kritis dalam struktur sintaks kalimat sumber. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan mekanisme salinan struktur-infused untuk memudahkan salinan kata-kata penting dan hubungan dari kalimat sumber ke kalimat ringkasan. Pendekatan secara alami menggabungkan struktur dependensi sumber dengan mekanisme salinan dari penghasil kalimat abstraktif. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan efektivitas inkorporasi informasi sintaksi sisi sumber dalam sistem, dan pendekatan kami yang diusulkan dibandingkan dengan metode terbaik.', 'ko': 'Seq2seq 학습은 총결산 방면에서 고무적인 성과를 거두었다.그러나 많은 상황에서 시스템 요약은 원시 내용의 완전성을 유지하기 어렵다.그들은 원문 문법 구조에서 중요한 역할을 하는 중요한 단어나 관계를 빠뜨릴 수도 있다.본고에서 우리는 주입 구조의 복제 메커니즘을 제시하여 원문에서 요약문까지의 중요한 단어와 관계의 복제를 추진했다.이 방법은 자연히 원소 의존 구조와 추상 문장 요약기의 복제 메커니즘을 결합시킨다.실험 결과는 시스템에 원단 문법 정보를 넣는 유효성을 증명했고 우리가 제시한 방법은 가장 선진적인 방법에 비해 우위를 가진다.', 'sw': 'Ufunzi wa Seq2seq umesababisha matokeo yanayopaswa kwa muhtasari. Hata hivyo, katika matukio mengi, muhtasari wa mfumo bado unajitahidi kuendeleza maana ya asili. Wanaweza kushindwa maneno muhimu au mahusiano yanayocheza nafasi muhimu katika muundo wa pamoja wa sentensi za vyanzo. Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mfumo wa nakala zilizotumiwa na miundombinu ili kusaidia kupata nakala ya maneno muhimu na mahusiano kutoka hukumu ya msingi hadi hukumu ya muhimu. Hatua hii inaunganisha muundo wa kutegemea rasmi na mfumo wa nakala wa mjumbe wa hukumu isiyo na maana. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha ufanisi wa kuingiza taarifa za ushirikiano wa vyanzo vya habari katika mfumo huo, na hatua yetu inayopendekezwa inalinganisha zaidi na njia za sanaa.', 'tr': 'Seq2seq öwrenmesi sumlaýyşyň üstünde söz berjek netijesi bar. Ýöne köp wagtlarda sistemiň toplamlary original maslahatyny boýun gaýd etmek üçin mücadele edýärler. Olar çeşme sözleriniň sintaktik strukturynda wajyp sözleri ýa-da baglaýyşlary ýitiräp bilerler. Bu kagyzda, biziň strukturyň gaýd edilmegi meýdançalary daşary sözleriň we golaý sözleriň kopyalamagyny aňsat etmek üçin mekanizmalary görkeýäris. Bu ýagdaý görnöşi baglançylyk strukturyny abstraktiv sözlem jeminatçysynyň nusgasyny bilen birleşýär. Aramanyň netijeleri sistemada çeşme tarapyndan sintaktik maglumatlary daşary ýagdaýyny görkez we teklip eden ýagdaýymyz sungat yöntemlerine gowy görýär.', 'af': "Seq2seq leer het beloftende resultate op opsomming geproduseer. Maar in baie gevalle, stelsel opsommings het nog steeds struikel om die betekening van die oorspronklike onthou te hou. Hulle mag belangrike woorde of relasies wat kritiese roles speel in die sintaktieke struktuur van bron setnings. In hierdie papier, ons stel struktuur-infused kopie mekanisme om belangrike woorde en relasies te kopieer van die bron seting na opsomming seting te maak. Die toegang natuurlik kombinieer bron afhanklikheid struktuur met die kopie mekanisme van 'n abstraktiewe setopsomming. Eksperimentele resultate vertoon die effektiviteit van inkorporering van bron-kant sintakteel inligting in die stelsel, en ons voorgestelde toegang vergelyk gunstig met staat-van-kunstensmetodes.", 'fa': 'یادگیری Seq2seq نتیجه\u200cهای قول\u200cدهنده در جمعیت تولید کرده است. ولی در بسیاری موارد، جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای سیستم هنوز برای نگه داشتن معنی اصلی جهت می\u200cکنند. ممکن است کلمات مهم یا رابطه\u200cهای مهم را از دست داده باشند که نقش\u200cهای مهم در ساختار سنتاکتیک جمله\u200cهای منبع بازی می\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما مکانیسم\u200cهای کپی متفاوت ساختار را نشان می\u200cدهیم تا آسان\u200cسازی کلمات مهم و ارتباط از جمله منبع به جمله جمع کنیم. این دستور طبیعی ساختار بستگی منبع را با مکانیسم کپی یک جمع\u200cکننده جمله\u200cی مطلوب ترکیب می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای موثرت\u200cپذیری اطلاعات سنتاکتیک از طرف منبع را در سیستم نشان می\u200cدهد، و دستور پیشنهاد ما به طور مناسب با روش\u200cهای هنر مقایسه می\u200cکند.', 'sq': 'Mësimi Seq2seq ka prodhuar rezultate premtuese mbi përmbledhjen. Megjithatë, në shumë raste, përmbledhjet e sistemit ende luftojnë për të mbajtur kuptimin e origjinales të paprekur. Ata mund të humbasin fjalë të rëndësishme apo marrëdhënie që luajnë role kritike në strukturën sintaktike të fjalëve burimore. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim mekanizma të përdorura nga struktura për të lehtësuar kopjimin e fjalëve dhe marrëdhënieve të rëndësishme nga fjala e burimit në fjalën e shkurtër. Përqasja kombinon natyralisht strukturën e varësisë së burimit me mekanizmin e kopjes të një përmbledhje abstraktive të fjalëve. Rezultatet eksperimentale demonstrojnë efektshmërinë e përfshirjes së informacionit sintaktik nga ana e burimit në sistem dhe metodat tona të propozuara krahasohen favorisht me metodat më të larta.', 'am': 'Seq2seq ትምህርት በተስፋ ውጤቶች አቀረበ፡፡ ነገር ግን በብዙ ጉዳዮች፣ የሲስተም ጉዳይ ግን የፊተኛውን አእምሮውን ለመጠበቅ ይጋደላሉ፡፡ የኩነቶች ፍርድ ክፍሎች ውስጥ የሚያሳልፉት የአስቸጋሪ ቃላት ወይም ግንኙነት ማሰናከል ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ካላት፣ የተጠቃሚ ቃላት እና ግንኙነትን ከመጀመሪያው ፍርድ ወደ አነስተኛ ፍርድ እና ግንኙነት ለማቅረብ እናስቸጋለን፡፡ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት በተለየ የኩነቶች መጠቀሚያ ሥርዓት አቋራጭ በኩል አካባቢ እና አጣራጭ ነው፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የኩነቶች-side መረጃዎችን በሲስተም ውስጥ ለማግባት ጥቃት ያሳያል፡፡ በተዘጋጀነውም ጥያቄያችን ለጥያቄ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት ይተካክላል፡፡', 'az': 'Seq2seq öyrənməsi təmizlənmək üçün vəd verən sonuçları yaratdı. Ancaq çoxlu məsələlərdə sistem toplamları hələ də orijinal anlamını saxlamaq üçün mübahisə edirlər. Onlar mənbə cümlələrinin sintaktik quruluğunda kritik rollər oynayan möhüm sözləri və əlaqələri qeyb edə bilərlər. Bu kağızda, mühüm sözləri və bağlantıları mənbə sözlərindən qeyd sözlərinə kömək etmək üçün strukturlu infused kopiya mehanizmiləri göstəririk. Yaxınlıq mənbə bağımlılıq strukturunu abstraktiv cümlələr təmizləyicisinin kopyalama mehānismi ilə birləşdirir. Müxtəlif sonuçları sistemdə mənbə tərəfindən sintaktik məlumatların istifadə edilməsini göstərir, və bizim təklif etdiyimiz tərzim şəkildə sanat metodlarına daha yaxşı qarşılaşdırır.', 'bn': 'সেক২সেক শিক্ষা সংক্ষেপের সময় প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল তৈরি করেছে। তবে অনেক ক্ষেত্রে সিস্টেমের সারসংক্ষিপ্ত সংক্ষেপ এখনও সংগ্রাম করছে যার মানে প্রাথমিক অক্ষর রাখা তারা সম্পর্কের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কথা বা সম্পর্কের মুখোমুখি হতে পারে যারা সোর্সের শাস্তির সাথে গুরুত্বপূর এই কাগজটিতে আমরা সংক্ষিপ্ত শাস্তি থেকে সংক্ষিপ্ত শাস্তি থেকে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ শব্দ এবং সম্পর্ক কপি করার জন্য কাঠামো ব্যবহৃ এই পদ্ধতি স্বাভাবিকভাবে সোর্স নির্ভরশীল কাঠামোর সাথে সংযুক্ত করে একটি আত্মীয় বাক্যের সারিজারের কপি মেকানিস পরীক্ষার ফলাফল সিস্টেমের উৎস-পাশের সিন্টেক্টিক তথ্য অন্তর্ভুক্ত করার কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে এবং আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির সাথে রাষ্ট', 'hy': 'SeQ2Sex-ի ուսումնասիրությունը հանդիսանում է համառոտագրության խոստացնող արդյունքներ: Այնուամենայնիվ, շատ դեպքերում համակարգի համառոտագրությունները դեռևս պայքարում են, որպեսզի պահպանեն սկզբնական իմաստը անվտանգված: Նրանք կարող են կորցնել կարևոր բառեր կամ հարաբերություններ, որոնք կարևոր դեր են խաղում աղբյուր նախադասությունների սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք կառուցվածքով ներդրված կոպիայի մեխանիզմներ, որպեսզի հեշտացնենք կարևոր բառերի և հարաբերությունների կոպիային սկսած նախադասությունից մինչև համառոտագրական նախա Բնական մոտեցումը միավորում է աղբյուրի կախվածության կառուցվածքը վերացական նախադասությունների համառոտագրման մեխանիզմի հետ: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս աղբյուրի կողմից սինտակտիկ տեղեկատվության ներառման արդյունավետությունը համակարգում, և մեր առաջարկած մոտեցումը համեմատում է լավագույն մեթոդների հետ:', 'cs': 'Seq2seq učení přineslo slibné výsledky na shrnutí. Nicméně v mnoha případech se systémové shrnutí stále snaží udržet význam originálu nedotčený. Mohou přehlédnout důležitá slova nebo vztahy, které hrají kritickou roli v syntaktické struktuře zdrojových vět. V tomto článku představujeme strukturované kopírovací mechanismy, které usnadňují kopírování důležitých slov a vztahů ze zdrojové věty do souhrnné věty. Tento přístup přirozeně kombinuje strukturu závislosti na zdroji s kopírovacím mechanismem abstraktivního shrnutí vět. Experimentální výsledky ukazují efektivitu začlenění syntaktických informací na straně zdroje do systému a náš navržený přístup se příznivě srovnává s nejmodernějšími metodami.', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge Seq2seq ha produït resultats prometedors en la resumen. Però en molts casos, els resums del sistema encara lluiten per mantenir el significat del original intacte. Pot perdre paraules importants o relacions que juguen rols crítics en l'estructura sinàctica de les frases d'origen. En aquest paper, presentem mecanismes de còpia perfusos per estructura per facilitar la còpia de paraules i relacions importants des de la frase d'origen a la frase resumida. L'enfocament combina naturalment l'estructura de dependencia de fonts amb el mecanisme de còpia d'un resumen abstracte de frases. Els resultats experimentals demostren l'eficacia de l'incorporació de la informació sinàctica de la font al sistema, i el nostre enfocament proposat es compara favorablement amb els mètodes més avançats.", 'et': 'Seq2seq õppimine on andnud paljulubavaid tulemusi kokkuvõtliku koostamise osas. Paljudel juhtudel on süsteemi kokkuvõtetel siiski raskusi originaali tähenduse säilitamiseks. Nad võivad unustada olulised sõnad või suhted, mis mängivad kriitilist rolli lähtelausete süntaktilises struktuuris. Käesolevas töös tutvustame struktuuripõhiseid kopeerimismehhanisme, mis hõlbustavad oluliste sõnade ja seoste kopeerimist lähtelausest kokkuvõttelauseni. Lähenemine ühendab loomulikult allikasõltuvuse struktuuri abstraktse lause kokkuvõtja koopiamehhanismiga. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad allika poolse süntaktilise informatsiooni lisamise efektiivsust süsteemi ja meie pakutud lähenemisviis võrdleb soodsalt kaasaegsete meetoditega.', 'bs': 'Seq2seq učenje proizvela je obećavajuće rezultate za sažetak. Međutim, u mnogim slučajevima, sažetke sustava se još uvijek bore za održavanje smisla originalnog neraspoloženog. Mogu propustiti važne riječi ili odnose koji igraju kritične uloge u sintaktičkoj strukturi izvornih rečenica. U ovom papiru predstavljamo mehanizam kopije koje se ne koriste struktura kako bi olakšali kopiranje važnih riječi i odnosa iz izvorne rečenice do sažetke rečenice. Prirodno pristup kombinira strukturu zavisnosti izvora sa kopijskim mehanizam sažetača abstraktivnih rečenica. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju učinkovitost uključenja sintaktičkih informacija na izvorskoj strani u sistem, a naš predloženi pristup uspoređuje u dobrobiti sa metodama umjetnosti.', 'fi': 'Seq2seq oppiminen on tuottanut lupaavia tuloksia tiivistelmässä. Monissa tapauksissa järjestelmän yhteenvedot kuitenkin edelleen kamppailevat säilyttääkseen alkuperäisen merkityksen koskemattomana. He saattavat jättää huomiotta tärkeitä sanoja tai suhteita, joilla on kriittinen rooli lähdelauseiden syntaktisessa rakenteessa. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään rakenteisiin pohjautuvia kopiointimekanismeja, jotka helpottavat tärkeiden sanojen ja suhteiden kopiointia lähdelauseesta yhteenvetolauseeseen. Lähestymistapa yhdistää luonnollisesti lähderiippuvuuden rakenteen abstraktin lauseyhteenvedon kopiomekanismiin. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat lähdepuolen syntaktisen tiedon integroinnin tehokkuuden järjestelmään, ja ehdotettu lähestymistapa on suotuisa verrattuna viimeisimpiin menetelmiin.', 'jv': 'Seq2seq ciling sumungane bukane mungkun dadi seneng sumungane Nanging, ono akeh durung, dadi resmi sistem bisa ngedol kanggo ngilanggar seneng pisan sing apik dadi. Awak dhéwé iso ngesir kuwi nglanggar wigatining apat karo pawaran sing berarti barang kelas kuwi nggawe barang seneng dolanan sing dikarepaké. Nang pepul iki, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem-pakan karo perusahaan kanggo nguasai pawaran sing dikarepaké karo pawaran sing dikarepaké kanggo kelas politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Laptop" and "Desktop', 'sk': 'Seq2seq učenje je prineslo obetavne rezultate pri povzetku. Vendar pa v mnogih primerih sistemski povzetki še vedno težko ohranijo pomen izvirnika nedotaknjen. Lahko zamudijo pomembne besede ali odnose, ki igrajo kritično vlogo v sintaktični strukturi izvornih stavkov. V prispevku predstavljamo strukturne mehanizme kopiranja, ki olajšajo kopiranje pomembnih besed in relacij od izvornega stavka do povzetka stavka. Pristop seveda združuje strukturo izvorne odvisnosti z mehanizmom kopiranja abstraktivnega povzetka stavkov. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo učinkovitost vključevanja sintaktičnih informacij na strani vira v sistem, naš predlagani pristop pa ugodno primerja z najsodobnejšimi metodami.', 'ha': "Lean Seq2seq ya ƙãga matsalar da ake yi wa'adi a cikin kurarin. Amma, a cikin masu yawa, masu ƙaranci na'ura yana ƙara yin jihãdi dõmin ya tsare ma'anar farko na intake. Kana kasancẽwa su sava magana masu muhimu ko da mazauni waɗanda ke yi gamuwa da role mai muhimu a cikin rukacin sanctatiki na halarcen kwanza. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da mekanin kodi da aka bincike shi na rubutu don ya yi amfani da kwamfyuta kalmõmi da muhimmi daga cewa kwanan kwance zuwa zuwa maganar ƙarami. Tsarin ya haɗa kiyayen da ɗabi'a, yana koma da tsarin masu inganci na source, kuma yana da mekanin kofi na ƙararin maganar ta kanana. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna aikin ta shigar da data na-side syntactic a cikin system, kuma hanyarmu da aka buƙata yana kamata da mafiya kyauta zuwa-state-of-art.", 'he': 'הלימודים Seq2seq הביאו תוצאות מבטיחות על הסכם. בכל אופן, במקרים רבים, סדרות המערכת עדיין נאבקות לשמור על המשמעות של המקורי intact. הם עלולים לפספס מילים חשובות או יחסים שמשחקים תפקידים קריטיים במבנה הסינטקטי של משפטי מקור. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים מנגנונים עותקים מוכנים במבנה כדי להקל לעתק מילים חשובות ומערכות יחסים מהמשפט המקורי למשפט סדרתי. הגישה משלבת באופן טבעי מבנה תלויות מקור עם מנגנון העתק של מסכם משפטים אסטרקטיבי. תוצאות ניסויים מראות את היעילות של הכילוי מידע סינטקטי מצד מקור במערכת, והגישה המוצעת שלנו משווה בצורה טובה לשיטות חדשות.', 'bo': 'Seq2seq དགོས་བརྗོད་ནི་བཅུད་སྡུད་རྗེས་ཐོག་ལས་ཁས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ཕལ་ཆེར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་མ་ལག་གི་བཅུད་སྡུད་དུ་ནམ་ཡང་རྩོད་ལ་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད། ཁོང་ཚོས་ནང་གི་ཚིག་རྩལ་ཆེ་བའི་ཐ་སྙད་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་དག་ཐུབ་པས་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་གྱི་དབང་རྩིས་གཏོང་བ་དང་། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྩ་བའི་སྒྲིག འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཐོག་མའི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་དབྱིབས་མཉམ་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་མཉམ་བསྡུར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experimental results demonstrate the effectiveness of incorporating source-side syntactic information in the system.'}
{'en': 'Measuring the Diversity of Automatic Image Descriptions', 'es': 'Medición de la diversidad de las descripciones de imágenes automáticas', 'ar': 'قياس تنوع الأوصاف التلقائية للصور', 'ja': '自動画像説明の多様性の測定', 'pt': 'Medindo a diversidade de descrições automáticas de imagens', 'fr': "Mesurer la diversité des descriptions d'images automatiques", 'zh': '测自图之多样性', 'hi': 'स्वचालित छवि विवरण की विविधता को मापने', 'ru': 'Измерение разнообразия автоматических описаний изображений', 'ga': 'Éagsúlacht na dTuairiscí Íomhánna Uathoibríocha a Thomhas', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Az automatikus képelírások sokféleségének mérése', 'el': 'Μέτρηση της ποικιλομορφίας των αυτόματων περιγραφών εικόνας', 'it': 'Misurare la diversità delle descrizioni automatiche delle immagini', 'lt': 'Automatinių vaizdo aprašų įvairovės matavimas', 'kk': 'Автоматты кескін сипаттамасының айырмашылығын өлшеу', 'mk': 'Мерање на различноста на автоматски описи на сликите', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ചിത്ര വിവരണങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യാസം', 'ms': 'Measuring the Diversity of Automatic Image Descriptions', 'mn': 'Автоматтын зураг тодорхойлолтын өөрчлөлтийг хэмжих', 'mt': 'Il-kejl tad-Diversità tad-Deskrizzjonijiet Awtomatiċi tal-Immaġni', 'no': 'Å måle ulikheten av automatisk biletskrivelse', 'pl': 'Pomiar różnorodności automatycznych opisów obrazów', 'ro': 'Măsurarea diversității descrierilor automate a imaginilor', 'sr': 'Mjerenje raznolikosti automatskih opisa slika', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Measuremeynta Iswidishka sawirka Automatic Image', 'sv': 'Mätning av mångfalden i automatiska bildbeskrivningar', 'ta': 'தானியங்கி பிம்பத்தை விவரிப்புகளின் வேறுபாட்டை அளவிடுகிறது', 'ur': 'Automatic Image Descriptions', 'vi': 'Đang đo độ phân biệt của các mô tả ảnh tự động', 'uz': 'Rasm tafsilotlarini avtomatik toò£gò£rilash', 'bg': 'Измерване на многообразието на автоматичните описания на изображенията', 'nl': 'Het meten van de diversiteit van automatische afbeeldingsbeschrijvingen', 'hr': 'Mjerenje raznolikosti automatičkih opisa slika', 'da': 'Måling af mangfoldigheden af automatiske billedbeskrivelser', 'de': 'Messung der Vielfalt automatischer Bildbeschreibungen', 'id': 'Measuring the Diversity of Automatic Image Descriptions', 'fa': 'اندازه مختلف توضیح تصویر خودکار', 'sw': 'Kupima tofauti ya maelezo ya Picha', 'ko': '자동 이미지 기술의 다양성을 측정하다', 'tr': 'Otomatik Resim Aýratmasynyň Çeşitliklerini ölçüýär', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Mësimi i ndryshimit të përshkrimeve automatike të imazheve', 'az': 'Otomatik R톛sm A칞캼qlar캼n캼n M칲xt톛lifliyini 칐l칞칲r', 'hy': 'Ավտոմատիկ նկարների բազմազանությունը չափելը', 'bs': 'Mjerenje raznolikosti automatičkih opisa slika', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় ছবি বিবরণের বৈচিত্র্য পরিমাপ', 'ca': "Midir la diversitat de les descripcions automàtiques d'imatges", 'et': 'Automaatsete pildikirjelduste mitmekesisuse mõõtmine', 'cs': 'Měření rozmanitosti automatických popisů obrazu', 'fi': 'Automaattisten kuvakuvausten moninaisuuden mittaaminen', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'sk': 'Merjenje raznolikosti avtomatskih opisov slik', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱི་བརྙན་རིས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་Diversity་ཚད་ཚད་བཟོ་བཞིན་པ', 'he': 'למדוד את ההגון של תיאור תמונות אוטומטי'}
{'en': 'Automatic image description systems typically produce generic sentences that only make use of a small subset of the vocabulary available to them. In this paper, we consider the production of generic descriptions as a lack of diversity in the output, which we quantify using established metrics and two new metrics that frame image description as a word recall task. This framing allows us to evaluate system performance on the head of the vocabulary, as well as on the long tail, where system performance degrades. We use these metrics to examine the diversity of the sentences generated by nine state-of-the-art systems on the MS COCO data set. We find that the systems trained with maximum likelihood objectives produce less diverse output than those trained with additional adversarial objectives. However, the adversarially-trained models only produce more types from the head of the vocabulary and not the tail. Besides vocabulary-based methods, we also look at the compositional capacity of the systems, specifically their ability to create compound nouns and prepositional phrases of different lengths. We conclude that there is still much room for improvement, and offer a toolkit to measure progress towards the goal of generating more diverse image descriptions.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما تنتج أنظمة وصف الصور التلقائية جملًا عامة تستخدم فقط مجموعة فرعية صغيرة من المفردات المتاحة لها. في هذه الورقة ، نعتبر إنتاج الأوصاف العامة على أنه نقص في التنوع في المخرجات ، والذي نحدده كمياً باستخدام المقاييس المعمول بها ومقياسين جديدين يؤطران وصف الصورة كمهمة استدعاء كلمة. يسمح لنا هذا الإطار بتقييم أداء النظام على رأس المفردات ، وكذلك على الذيل الطويل ، حيث يتدهور أداء النظام. نستخدم هذه المقاييس لفحص تنوع الجمل الناتجة عن تسعة أنظمة حديثة على مجموعة بيانات MS COCO. نجد أن الأنظمة المدربة بأهداف ذات احتمالية قصوى تنتج مخرجات أقل تنوعًا من تلك المدربة بأهداف عدائية إضافية. ومع ذلك ، فإن النماذج المدربة على الخصوم تنتج فقط أنواعًا أكثر من رأس المفردات وليس الذيل. إلى جانب الأساليب القائمة على المفردات ، ننظر أيضًا إلى القدرة التركيبية للأنظمة ، وتحديداً قدرتها على إنشاء الأسماء المركبة وعبارات الجر بأطوال مختلفة. نستنتج أنه لا يزال هناك مجال كبير للتحسين ، ونقدم مجموعة أدوات لقياس التقدم نحو الهدف المتمثل في إنشاء أوصاف صور أكثر تنوعًا.', 'pt': 'Os sistemas automáticos de descrição de imagens geralmente produzem frases genéricas que fazem uso apenas de um pequeno subconjunto do vocabulário disponível para eles. Neste artigo, consideramos a produção de descrições genéricas como uma falta de diversidade na saída, que quantificamos usando métricas estabelecidas e duas novas métricas que enquadram a descrição de imagens como uma tarefa de recordação de palavras. Esse enquadramento nos permite avaliar o desempenho do sistema na cabeça do vocabulário, bem como na cauda longa, onde o desempenho do sistema se degrada. Usamos essas métricas para examinar a diversidade das sentenças geradas por nove sistemas de última geração no conjunto de dados MS COCO. Descobrimos que os sistemas treinados com objetivos de máxima verossimilhança produzem resultados menos diversificados do que aqueles treinados com objetivos adversários adicionais. No entanto, os modelos treinados adversamente só produzem mais tipos a partir da cabeça do vocabulário e não da cauda. Além dos métodos baseados em vocabulário, também analisamos a capacidade composicional dos sistemas, especificamente sua capacidade de criar substantivos compostos e frases preposicionais de diferentes comprimentos. Concluímos que ainda há muito espaço para melhorias e oferecemos um kit de ferramentas para medir o progresso em direção ao objetivo de gerar descrições de imagens mais diversificadas.', 'es': 'Los sistemas automáticos de descripción de imágenes suelen producir oraciones genéricas que solo utilizan un pequeño subconjunto del vocabulario disponible para ellos. En este artículo, consideramos la producción de descripciones genéricas como una falta de diversidad en la salida, que cuantificamos mediante métricas establecidas y dos nuevas métricas que enmarcan la descripción de la imagen como una tarea de recordar palabras. Este encuadre nos permite evaluar el rendimiento del sistema en la cabecera del vocabulario, así como en la cola larga, donde el rendimiento del sistema se degrada. Utilizamos estas métricas para examinar la diversidad de las frases generadas por nueve sistemas de última generación en el conjunto de datos de MS COCO. Encontramos que los sistemas entrenados con objetivos de máxima verosimilitud producen resultados menos diversos que aquellos entrenados con objetivos adversarios adicionales. Sin embargo, los modelos entrenados de manera adversa solo producen más tipos de la cabecera del vocabulario y no de la cola. Además de los métodos basados en vocabulario, también observamos la capacidad compositiva de los sistemas, específicamente su capacidad para crear sustantivos compuestos y frases preposicionales de diferentes longitudes. Llegamos a la conclusión de que todavía hay mucho margen de mejora y ofrecemos un conjunto de herramientas para medir el progreso hacia el objetivo de generar descripciones de imágenes más diversas.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de description automatique d'images produisent généralement des phrases génériques qui n'utilisent qu'un petit sous-ensemble du vocabulaire disponible. Dans cet article, nous considérons la production de descriptions génériques comme un manque de diversité dans la sortie, que nous quantifions à l'aide de mesures établies et de deux nouvelles mesures qui encadrent la description d'une image comme une tâche de rappel de mots. Ce cadrage nous permet d'évaluer les performances du système en tête de vocabulaire, ainsi que sur la longue traîne, où les performances du système se dégradent. Nous utilisons ces mesures pour examiner la diversité des phrases générées par neuf systèmes de pointe sur l'ensemble de données MS COCO. Nous constatons que les systèmes entraînés avec des objectifs de probabilité maximale produisent des résultats moins diversifiés que ceux entraînés avec des objectifs contradictoires supplémentaires. Cependant, les modèles entraînés par l'adversaire ne produisent que plus de types à partir de la tête du vocabulaire et non de la queue. Outre les méthodes basées sur le vocabulaire, nous examinons également la capacité de composition des systèmes, en particulier leur capacité à créer des noms composés et des phrases prépositionnelles de différentes longueurs. Nous concluons qu'il y a encore beaucoup à faire et proposons une boîte à outils pour mesurer les progrès vers l'objectif de générer des descriptions d'images plus diversifiées.", 'ja': '自動画像記述システムは、通常、利用可能な語彙の小さなサブセットのみを利用する一般的な文章を生成する。 この論文では、一般的な記述の生成を出力の多様性の欠如と見なし、確立された指標と2つの新しい指標を使用して、単語リコールタスクとして画像記述をフレーム化します。 このフレーミングにより、システムのパフォーマンスが低下する長いテールだけでなく、ボキャブラリーのヘッドのシステムパフォーマンスを評価することができます。 これらの指標を使用して、MS COCOデータセット上の9つの最先端システムによって生成された文章の多様性を調べます。 私たちは、最大の可能性の目標でトレーニングされたシステムは、追加の対抗目標でトレーニングされたシステムよりも多様な出力が少ないことを発見しました。 しかし、対抗訓練を受けたモデルは、語彙の頭からより多くの種類を生み出すだけで、語尾からは生み出さない。 語彙ベースの方法に加えて、我々はまた、システムの構成能力、具体的には、異なる長さの複合名詞および前置詞句を作成するそれらの能力にも注目する。 私たちは、まだ改善の余地があると結論付け、より多様な画像説明を生成するという目標への進捗状況を測定するためのツールキットを提供します。', 'zh': '自图像描述系统常生成通用句子,这些句子只用其可用词汇的一小部分。 本文以通用为输中乏多样性,用已建指标二新指标量化之,指标将图像描述框定为单词召还。 此框架许于词汇表首及长尾上评之。 用此指标检MS COCO数集上九最先进系统成多样性。 吾见用他对抗性之统,有大似然者输多样性小也。 然从词汇表首而非尾多也。 词汇之术外,究其统能,特其创复名词介词短语之力也。 吾之所论,犹有大改于空间,而资一工具包以量成更多样化之象而取焉。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित छवि विवरण सिस्टम आमतौर पर जेनेरिक वाक्यों का उत्पादन करते हैं जो केवल उनके लिए उपलब्ध शब्दावली के एक छोटे से सबसेट का उपयोग करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम आउटपुट में विविधता की कमी के रूप में जेनेरिक विवरणों के उत्पादन पर विचार करते हैं, जिसे हम स्थापित मीट्रिक और दो नए मीट्रिक का उपयोग करके निर्धारित करते हैं जो छवि विवरण को शब्द याद करने के कार्य के रूप में फ्रेम करते हैं। यह फ्रेमिंग हमें शब्दावली के सिर पर सिस्टम प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करने की अनुमति देता है, साथ ही साथ लंबी पूंछ पर भी, जहां सिस्टम प्रदर्शन कम हो जाता है। हम इन मैट्रिक्स का उपयोग एमएस कोको डेटा सेट पर नौ अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों द्वारा उत्पन्न वाक्यों की विविधता की जांच करने के लिए करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि अधिकतम संभावना उद्देश्यों के साथ प्रशिक्षित सिस्टम अतिरिक्त प्रतिकूल उद्देश्यों के साथ प्रशिक्षित लोगों की तुलना में कम विविध आउटपुट का उत्पादन करते हैं। हालांकि, प्रतिकूल रूप से प्रशिक्षित मॉडल केवल शब्दावली के सिर से अधिक प्रकार का उत्पादन करते हैं, न कि पूंछ। शब्दावली-आधारित विधियों के अलावा, हम प्रणालियों की रचनात्मक क्षमता को भी देखते हैं, विशेष रूप से विभिन्न लंबाई के यौगिक संज्ञाओं और प्रीपोज़िशनल वाक्यांशों को बनाने की उनकी क्षमता। हम निष्कर्ष निकालते हैं कि सुधार के लिए अभी भी बहुत जगह है, और अधिक विविध छवि विवरण उत्पन्न करने के लक्ष्य की दिशा में प्रगति को मापने के लिए एक टूलकिट प्रदान करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Автоматические системы описания изображений обычно производят общие предложения, которые используют только небольшое подмножество доступной им лексики. В этой статье мы рассматриваем производство общих описаний как отсутствие разнообразия в выходе, которое мы количественно оцениваем с использованием установленных метрик и двух новых метрик, которые формулируют описание изображения как задачу запоминания слов. Такое обрамление позволяет нам оценить производительность системы на вершине словарного запаса, а также на длинном хвосте, где производительность системы ухудшается. Мы используем эти показатели для изучения разнообразия предложений, генерируемых девятью современными системами на наборе данных MS COCO. Мы обнаружили, что системы, обученные с целями максимальной вероятности, дают менее разнообразный результат, чем те, которые обучены с дополнительными соперническими целями. Тем не менее, враждебно-тренированные модели производят больше типов только из головы словаря, а не из хвоста. Помимо лексико-ориентированных методов, мы также рассматриваем композиционную способность систем, в частности их способность создавать составные существительные и предлоги различной длины. Мы делаем вывод о том, что многое еще предстоит улучшить, и предлагаем инструментарий для измерения прогресса в достижении цели создания более разнообразных описаний изображений.', 'ga': 'De ghnáth cruthaíonn córais uathoibríocha tuairiscithe íomhánna abairtí cineálacha nach n-úsáideann ach fo-thacar beag den stór focal atá ar fáil dóibh. Sa pháipéar seo, breithnímid ar tháirgeadh tuairiscí cineálacha mar easpa éagsúlachta san aschur, a dhéanaimid a chainníochtú ag baint úsáide as méadracht bhunaithe agus dhá mhéadracht nua a fhrámaíonn cur síos ar íomhá mar thasc chun cuimhne focal a dhéanamh. Ligeann an frámaíocht seo dúinn feidhmíocht an chórais a mheas ar cheann an stór focal, chomh maith leis an eireaball fada, nuair a dhíghrádaíonn feidhmíocht an chórais. Bainimid úsáid as na méadrachtaí seo chun scrúdú a dhéanamh ar éagsúlacht na n-abairtí ginte ag naoi gcóras úrscothach ar thacar sonraí MS COCO. Faighimid amach go mbíonn aschur nach bhfuil chomh héagsúil céanna ag na córais a oiltear le huaschuspóirí dóchúlachta ná na cinn atá oilte le cuspóirí sáraíochta breise. Mar sin féin, ní tháirgeann na samhlacha sár-oilte ach níos mó cineálacha ó cheann an fhoclóra agus ní ón eireaball. Seachas modhanna foclóra-bhunaithe, féachaimid freisin ar chumas cumadóireachta na gcóras, go sonrach ar a gcumas ainmfhocail chumaisc agus frásaí réamhfhoclacha d’fhaid éagsúla a chruthú. Bainimid de thátal as go bhfuil go leor spáis fós le feabhsú, agus cuirimid foireann uirlisí ar fáil chun dul chun cinn a thomhas i dtreo an chuspóra maidir le cur síos ar íomhánna níos éagsúla a ghiniúint.', 'el': 'Τα αυτόματα συστήματα περιγραφής εικόνων συνήθως παράγουν γενικές προτάσεις που χρησιμοποιούν μόνο ένα μικρό υποσύνολο του λεξιλογίου που είναι διαθέσιμο σε αυτούς. Στην παρούσα εργασία, θεωρούμε την παραγωγή γενικών περιγραφών ως έλλειψη διαφορετικότητας στην παραγωγή, την οποία ποσοτικοποιούμε χρησιμοποιώντας καθιερωμένες μετρήσεις και δύο νέες μετρήσεις που πλαισιώνουν την περιγραφή της εικόνας ως εργασία ανάκλησης λέξεων. Αυτή η πλαισίωση μας επιτρέπει να αξιολογούμε την απόδοση του συστήματος στο κεφάλι του λεξιλογίου, καθώς και στην μακριά ουρά, όπου η απόδοση του συστήματος υποβαθμίζεται. Χρησιμοποιούμε αυτές τις μετρήσεις για να εξετάσουμε την ποικιλομορφία των προτάσεων που παράγονται από εννέα συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας στο σύνολο δεδομένων MS COCO. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι τα συστήματα που εκπαιδεύονται με στόχους μέγιστης πιθανότητας παράγουν λιγότερο διαφορετικό αποτέλεσμα από εκείνα που εκπαιδεύονται με πρόσθετους αντικρουόμενους στόχους. Ωστόσο, τα αντίθετα εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα παράγουν περισσότερους τύπους μόνο από το κεφάλι του λεξιλογίου και όχι από την ουρά. Εκτός από τις μεθόδους που βασίζονται στο λεξιλόγιο, εξετάζουμε επίσης την ικανότητα σύνθεσης των συστημάτων, συγκεκριμένα την ικανότητά τους να δημιουργούν σύνθετα ουσιαστικά και προθεσμιακές φράσεις διαφορετικού μήκους. Συμπεραίνουμε ότι εξακολουθούν να υπάρχουν πολλά περιθώρια βελτίωσης και προσφέρουμε μια εργαλειοθήκη για τη μέτρηση της προόδου προς τον στόχο της δημιουργίας πιο ποικίλων περιγραφών εικόνας.', 'ka': 'ავტომატური გამოსახულების გამოსახულების სისტემი, რომელიც მხოლოდ სახელსაწყოთა სიტყვებლის პატარა სექსეტის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ განსხვავებული განსხვავებების გამოყენება და ორი ახალი მეტრიკის გამოყენება, რომელიც გამოყენებული მეტრიკის გამოყენება, რომელიც გამოყენებული სურათის გამოყენება როგორც სიტყვების ამ ფრამის შესაძლებელია ჩვენ სისტემის გამოყენება სიტყვებულის თავიდან, და სიტყვებულის განმავლობაში, სადაც სისტემის გამოყენება განმავლებულია. ჩვენ ამ მეტრიკის გამოყენება MS COCO მონაცემების სეტატის განსხვავებულობის განსხვავება, რომელიც აღმოქმნა 9 წარმოქმნის სისტემაში. ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ სისტემები, რომელიც მაქსიმალური შესაძლებლობა მიზეზებით, უფრო განსხვავებული გამოყენება, ვიდრე განსხვავებული გამოყენება, რომელიც დამატე მაგრამ, განსაკუთრებული მოდელები მხოლოდ უფრო მეტი ტიპები გამოყენებენ სიტყვებულაციის თავიდან და არა თავიდან. სიტყვებულების დამატებით, ჩვენ შევხედავთ სისტემის კომპოზიციონალური კანოსტაციას, განსაკუთრებულად ისინი შესაძლებლობა შექმნა მნიშვნელი და განსხვავებული სიტყვების განსხვ ჩვენ დავაკვირდებით, რომ უფრო დიდი სივრცე აქვს შესაძლებლობისთვის, და მინდომა ხელსაწყობილობის კიტი, რომელიც უფრო დიდი განსხვავებული გამოსახულების განსახულ', 'hu': 'Az automatikus képleíró rendszerek általában általános mondatokat állítanak elő, amelyek csak a rendelkezésükre álló szókincsek kis részhalmazát használják fel. Ebben a tanulmányban az általános leírások előállítását a kimenet sokszínűségének hiányát tekintjük, amelyet megalapozott mutatók és két új mutató segítségével számszerűsítünk, amelyek a kép leírását szóvisszahívási feladatként keretezik meg. Ez a keretezés lehetővé teszi a rendszer teljesítményének értékelését a szókincs fején, valamint a hosszú farkon, ahol a rendszer teljesítménye romlik. Ezeket a mutatókat arra használjuk, hogy megvizsgáljuk a kilenc korszerű rendszer által generált mondatok sokféleségét az MS COCO adatkészleten. Úgy találjuk, hogy a maximális valószínűséggel kiképzett rendszerek kevésbé változatos eredményeket eredményeznek, mint a további ellentétes célokkal kiképzettek. Az ellenségesen kiképzett modellek azonban csak több típust hoznak létre a szókincs fejéből, nem pedig a farokból. A szókincs alapú módszerek mellett a rendszerek kompozíciós kapacitását is vizsgáljuk, különösen azokat a képességeket, amelyek különböző hosszúságú összetett főneveket és prepozíciós kifejezéseket hoznak létre. Arra a következtetésre jutunk, hogy még mindig sok hely van a fejlesztésre, és eszköztárat kínálunk arra, hogy mérjük az előrehaladást a különböző képleírások létrehozásának célja felé.', 'it': "I sistemi automatici di descrizione delle immagini in genere producono frasi generiche che utilizzano solo un piccolo sottoinsieme del vocabolario a loro disposizione. In questo articolo, consideriamo la produzione di descrizioni generiche come una mancanza di diversità nell'output, che quantificamo utilizzando metriche consolidate e due nuove metriche che inquadrano la descrizione dell'immagine come attività di richiamo delle parole. Questa inquadratura ci permette di valutare le prestazioni del sistema sulla testa del vocabolario, così come sulla coda lunga, dove le prestazioni del sistema degradano. Utilizziamo queste metriche per esaminare la diversità delle frasi generate da nove sistemi all'avanguardia sul set di dati MS COCO. Troviamo che i sistemi addestrati con obiettivi di massima probabilità producono risultati meno diversi rispetto a quelli addestrati con obiettivi avversi aggiuntivi. Tuttavia, i modelli addestrati contro gli avversari producono solo più tipi dalla testa del vocabolario e non dalla coda. Oltre ai metodi basati sul vocabolario, esaminiamo anche la capacità compositiva dei sistemi, in particolare la loro capacità di creare sostantivi composti e frasi preposizionali di diversa lunghezza. Concludiamo che c'è ancora molto spazio per migliorare e offriamo un toolkit per misurare i progressi verso l'obiettivo di generare descrizioni di immagini più diversificate.", 'kk': 'Автоматты кескіндердің сипаттамасының жүйелері әдетте сөздердің кішкентай бөлігін қолдану үшін жалпы сөздерді жасайды. Бұл қағазда, жалпы түсініктемелерді шығарудың әртүрлі түсініктемесі деп ойлаймыз. Бұл кескіндің түсініктемесі сөзді еске салу үшін құрылған метрикалық мен екі жаңа метрикалық түсініктемесі Бұл фрейм сөздердің басындағы жүйелік әрекеттерін, жүйелік әрекеттерін деградициялау үшін жүйелік жұмысын оқытуға мүмкіндік береді. Біз бұл метрикаларды MS COCO деректер жиынындағы 9 күй-жайы жүйелердің құрылған сөздердің түрлігін тексеру үшін қолданамыз. Біз максималдық мақсаттылық мақсаттарынан оқылған жүйелер қосымша қарсы мақсаттарынан артық түрлі шығыс жасайды. Бірақ қарсы оқылған үлгілер тек сөздердің басынан бірнеше түрлерді жасайды, жұлдық емес. Сөздерді негіздеген әдістерден басқа, жүйелердің композиционалық көмегімен қараймыз, осындай-ақ олардың бірнеше ұзындығының біріктірілген атаулар мен препозиционалық сөздерін құру мүмкіндігі Біз әлі жақсарту үшін көп орын бар деп ойлаймыз. Құралдар тізіміне көптеген кескіндердің түрлі сипаттамасын құру мақсатына жасау үшін жағдайын өлшеу үшін қолдану', 'lt': 'Automatinės vaizdo aprašymo sistemos paprastai gamina bendruosius sakinius, kurie naudoja tik nedidelį jų turimą žodyno pogrupį. Šiame dokumente bendrųjų apibūdinimų kūrimas laikomas įvairovės trūkumu, kurį kiekybiškai vertiname naudojant nustatytas metrijas ir dvi naujas metrijas, kurios apibūdina vaizdo aprašymą kaip žodžio atšaukimo užduotį. This framing allows us to evaluate system performance on the head of the vocabulary, as well as on the long tail, where system performance degrades.  Mes naudojame šiuos rodiklius, kad išnagrinėtume valstybių narių COCO duomenų rinkinio devynių naujausių sistemų sukauptų sakinių įvairovę. Mes manome, kad sistemose, kuriose įgytas didžiausios tikimybės tikslas, rezultatai yra mažiau įvairūs nei sistemose, kuriose įgyti papildomi prieštaringi tikslai. However, the adversarially-trained models only produce more types from the head of the vocabulary and not the tail.  Be žodynu grindžiamų metodų, mes taip pat vertiname sistemų sudėtinį pajėgumą, ypač jų gebėjimą sukurti sudėtines vardas ir skirtingų ilgių išankstines frazes. Galime daryti išvadą, kad dar yra daug vietos tobulinti ir siūlyti priemonių rinkinį, skirtą įvertinti pažangą siekiant tikslo sukurti įvairesnius vaizdo aprašymus.', 'ms': 'Sistem keterangan imej automatik biasanya menghasilkan kalimat generik yang hanya menggunakan subset kecil dari vokbulari yang tersedia bagi mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kita mempertimbangkan produksi deskripsi generik sebagai kekurangan pelbagai dalam output, yang kita kuantifikasikan menggunakan metrik yang ditetapkan dan dua metrik baru yang menggunakan deskripsi imej bingkai sebagai tugas pengingat perkataan. Bingkai ini membolehkan kita menilai prestasi sistem pada kepala vokbulari, serta pada ekor panjang, di mana prestasi sistem berkurang. Kami menggunakan metrik ini untuk memeriksa pelbagai kalimat yang dijana oleh sembilan sistem state-of-the-art pada set data MS COCO. Kami mendapati bahawa sistem dilatih dengan tujuan kemungkinan maksimum menghasilkan output yang kurang berbeza daripada yang dilatih dengan tujuan musuh tambahan. Namun, model yang dilatih melawan hanya menghasilkan lebih banyak jenis dari kepala vokbulari dan bukan ekor. Selain kaedah berdasarkan vokbulari, kita juga melihat kemampuan komposisi sistem, khususnya kemampuan mereka untuk mencipta nama komponen dan frasa preposisi panjang yang berbeza. We conclude that there is still much room for improvement, and offer a toolkit to measure progress towards the goal of generating more diverse image descriptions.', 'mk': 'Автоматски системи за опис на сликата обично создаваат генерални реченици кои користат само мал подгруп на словникот што им е достапен. Во овој документ, го сметаме производството на генерални описи за недостаток на различност во излезот, кој го квантификуваме користејќи поставени метрики и две нови метрики кои го рамка описот на сликата како задача за повлекување на зборовите. Оваа рамка ни овозможува да ја процениме системската перформанса на главата на речникот, како и на долга опашка, каде што системската перформанса се деградира. Ние ги користиме овие метрики за да ја испитаме различноста на речениците генерирани од девет најнови системи на податоците на MS COCO. Најдовме дека системите обучени со максимални веројатни цели произведуваат помалку различни резултати отколку оние обучени со дополнителни противни цели. Сепак, непријателски обучените модели произведуваат само повеќе типови од главата на речникот, а не опашката. Покрај методите базирани на зборови, ние исто така го гледаме композицискиот капацитет на системите, посебно нивната способност да создадат композициони именици и препозиционални фрази од различни должини. Завршуваме дека сé уште има многу место за подобрување и нудиме алатки за мерење на напредокот кон целта на генерирање поразлични описи на сликите.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ചിത്ര വിശദീകരണ സിസ്റ്റം സാധാരണ അവയ്ക്ക് ലഭ്യമല്ലാത്ത ഒരു ചെറിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാത്രം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഫലത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള കുറവാണെന്ന് കരുതുന്ന ഈ ഫ്രിമിംഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടനം സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെ തലയിലും നീണ്ട വാലിലും നമുക്ക് വിലപിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്നു. സിസ ഈ മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. എംഎസ് കോ_ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണത്തില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ വാക്കുകളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത വ്യത്യാസ ഏറ്റവും സാധ്യതയുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങളുള്ള പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വൈരിക്കുന്ന ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിശീലനം നല പക്ഷെ, എതിരാളിയായ പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലുകള്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ തലയില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d തരത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും മാത്രമേ ഉല്\u200d പദാവലിയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200dക്ക് കൂടാതെ, സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള ശക്തിയെയും നാം നോക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് അവരുട മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്താനുള്ള സ്ഥലമുണ്ടെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത ചിത്ര വിവരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാനുള്ള ലക്ഷ', 'mt': "Sistemi awtomatiċi ta’ deskrizzjoni tal-immaġni tipikament jipproduċu sentenzi ġeneriċi li jużaw biss sottosett żgħir tal-vokabulari disponibbli għalihom. F’dan id-dokument, a ħna nqisu l-produzzjoni ta’ deskrizzjonijiet ġeneriċi bħala nuqqas ta’ diversità fil-produzzjoni, li nikkwantifikaw bl-użu ta’ metriċi stabbiliti u żewġ metriċi ġodda li jfasslu d-deskrizzjoni tal-immaġni bħala kompitu ta’ ġbir lura tal-kelma. Dan l-oqfsa jippermettilna li tevalwa l-prestazzjoni tas-sistema fuq ir-ras tal-vokabulari, kif ukoll fuq id-denb twil, fejn il-prestazzjoni tas-sistema tiddegrada. Aħna nużaw dawn il-metriċi biex jeżaminaw id-diversità tas-sentenzi ġġenerati minn disa' sistemi l-aktar avvanzati fis-sett tad-dejta tal-MS COCO. Aħna nsibu li s-sistemi mħarrġa b’objettivi ta’ probabbiltà massima jipproduċu produzzjoni inqas diversifikata minn dawk imħarrġa b’objettivi avversarji addizzjonali. However, the adversarially-trained models only produce more types from the head of the vocabulary and not the tail.  Besides vocabulary-based methods, we also look at the compositional capacity of the systems, specifically their ability to create compound nouns and prepositional phrases of different lengths.  Aħna nikkonkludu li għad hemm ħafna lok għat-titjib, u noffru sett ta' għodod biex jitkejjel il-progress lejn l-għan li jiġu ġġenerati deskrizzjonijiet ta' immaġni aktar diversifikati.", 'no': 'Automatiske biletsskildringssystemet gjer generelle setningar som berre brukar ein liten undertekst av ordboka som er tilgjengeleg for dei. I denne papiret ser vi ut for produksjonen av generiske skildringar som mangling av mangfold i utdata, som vi kvantifiserer ved hjelp av konstruerte metrikar og to nye metrikar som rammebeskriving av biletet som eit ordrekolloppgåve. Denne ramma lèt oss evaluere systemutviklinga på hovudet på ordboka, og på lange hald, der systemutviklinga degraderer. Vi bruker desse metrikane for å undersøke kva mange setningane som er generert av ni kunstsystemer på MS COCO-datasettet. Vi finn at systemene trengte med maksimum sannsynlegheitsmål produserer mindre forskjellige utdata enn dei trengte med fleire adversariale mål. Desse motsetningane som er trevne med negativt, produserer berre fleire typar frå hovudet på ordboka, og ikkje haldet. I tillegg til ordbokaserte metodar, ser vi også på komposisjonskapasiteten av systemet, spesielt dei kapasiteten til å laga samanserte namn og preposeesjonsfrasar med ulike lengder. Vi avsluttar at det finst framleis mykje plass for forbedringar, og tilbyr eit verktøykassett for å måle framgang til målet for å laga meir forskjellige biletskrifter.', 'mn': 'Автоматтын зураг тодорхойлолтын систем нь тэдэнд зөвхөн ашиглах жижиг хэсгийг ашигладаг ерөнхий өгүүлбэрүүдийг бий болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид ерөнхий тодорхойлолтын үйлдвэрлэлийг үр дүнд олон төрлийн тодорхойлолт гэж үздэг. Энэ тодорхойлолтыг бид бүтээсэн метрик болон хоёр шинэ метрик ашиглан хэмжээний тодорхойлолт нь хэлбэрээр сан Энэ фрейм нь бидэнд системийн үйл ажиллагааг үгийн толгой дээр, урт сүүлийн дээр, системийн үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг багасгаж чадна. Бид эдгээр метриктикүүдийг MS COCO өгөгдлийн хэмжээнд 9 урлагийн системээр гарсан өгүүлбэрүүдийг судалж хэрэглэдэг. Бид хамгийн их магадлалын зорилготой системүүд нэмэлт эсрэг зорилготой хүмүүсээс илүү олон үр дүн гаргадаг гэдгийг олж мэднэ. Гэвч эсрэг сургалтын загварууд зөвхөн үгийн толгойд илүү олон төрлийг бий болгодог. Үгийн үндсэн арга нь бид мөн системийн бүтээлтийн чадварыг харж байна. Ялангуяа тэдний өөр урттай холбоотой нэр болон хүлээн зөвшөөрөх чадварыг бий болгодог. Бид сайжруулахын тулд маш олон орон байгааг төсөөлж, олон төрлийн зураг тайлбарлах зорилго руу хөгжлийг хэмжих хэрэгсэл хэрэглэх хэрэгсэл өгч байна.', 'pl': 'Automatyczne systemy opisu obrazów zazwyczaj produkują zdania ogólne, które wykorzystują tylko niewielki podzbiór słownictwa dostępnego dla nich. W niniejszym artykule uważamy produkcję opisów ogólnych za brak różnorodności w wynikach, którą ilościowo określamy za pomocą ustalonych wskaźników i dwóch nowych wskaźników, które ramują opis obrazu jako zadanie przypominania słów. Takie ramowanie pozwala nam ocenić wydajność systemu na głowie słownictwa, jak również na długim ogonie, gdzie wydajność systemu spada. Wykorzystujemy te wskaźniki do zbadania różnorodności zdań generowanych przez dziewięć najnowocześniejszych systemów na zbiorze danych MS COCO. Stwierdzamy, że systemy przeszkolone z maksymalnym prawdopodobieństwem wytwarzają mniej zróżnicowane wyniki niż te przeszkolone z dodatkowymi celami przeciwnymi. Jednak przeciwnie trenowane modele produkują więcej typów tylko z głowy słownictwa, a nie ogona. Oprócz metod opartych na słownictwie, analizujemy również zdolność kompozycyjną systemów, w szczególności ich zdolność do tworzenia rzeczowników złożonych i zwrotów przyimkowych o różnej długości. Stwierdzamy, że jest jeszcze dużo miejsca do poprawy i oferujemy zestaw narzędzi do mierzenia postępów w kierunku generowania bardziej zróżnicowanych opisów obrazów.', 'ro': 'Sistemele automate de descriere a imaginilor produc de obicei propoziții generice care utilizează doar un mic subset al vocabularului disponibil pentru ei. În această lucrare, considerăm producția de descrieri generice ca o lipsă de diversitate în rezultat, pe care o cuantificăm folosind metrici stabilite și două noi metrice care încadrează descrierea imaginii ca o sarcină de recuperare a cuvintelor. Această încadrare ne permite să evaluăm performanța sistemului pe capul vocabularului, precum și pe coada lungă, unde performanța sistemului scade. Folosim aceste metrici pentru a examina diversitatea propozițiilor generate de nouă sisteme de ultimă generație pe setul de date MS COCO. Considerăm că sistemele instruite cu obiective de maximă probabilitate produc rezultate mai puțin diverse decât cele instruite cu obiective adversare suplimentare. Cu toate acestea, modelele antrenate adversar produc doar mai multe tipuri din capul vocabularului și nu din coadă. Pe lângă metodele bazate pe vocabular, analizăm și capacitatea compozițională a sistemelor, în special capacitatea lor de a crea substantive compuse și fraze prepoziționale de diferite lungimi. Concluzionăm că există încă mult loc de îmbunătățire și oferim un set de instrumente pentru a măsura progresul în direcția obiectivului de a genera descrieri de imagini mai diverse.', 'sr': 'Automatski sistemi opisa slika obično proizvode generične rečenice koje koriste samo mali podsetnik rečnika koji im je dostupan. U ovom papiru smatramo proizvodnjom generalnih opisa kao nedostatak raznolikosti u izlazu, koju kvantificiramo korištenjem uspostavljene metrike i dve nove metrike koje okreću opis slike kao reč koja se sjeća zadatka. Ova okvira nam omogućava da procenimo sistemsku izvedbu na glavi rečenika, kao i na dugom repu, gde se dešava izvedba sistema. Koristimo ove metrike da pregledamo raznolikost rečenica koje su stvorile devet državnih umjetničkih sustava na kompetu podataka MS COCO-a. Nalazimo da sistemi obučeni sa maksimalnim ciljevima mogućnosti proizvode manje različitih proizvoda od onih koji su obučeni dodatnim adversarnim ciljevima. Međutim, neprijateljski obučeni modeli proizvode samo više tipa iz glave rečnika, a ne repa. Osim rečeničkih metoda, takođe pogledamo kompozicionalnu kapacitet sustava, posebno njihovu sposobnost stvaranja spojenih imena i prepoznativnih fraza različitih dužina. Zaključujemo da još uvek postoji mnogo mesta za poboljšanje i ponudimo instrument za mjerenje napredka ka cilju stvaranja raznolikog opisa slika.', 'so': 'Sida caadiga ah nidaamka sawirka is-sawir ah waxaa soo saara qeybo geneeral ah oo keliya isticmaalaya qeyb yar oo hadalka ay leeyihiin. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka fiirsanaynaa dhaqanka qoraalka geneeral ah sida aan u baahnayn kala duduwan midhaha soo baxa, taasoo aynu ku qiyaasaynaa isticmaalka metric la dhisay iyo laba metric oo cusub oo sawir ka soo bandhigaya sawirka sida shaqada xusuusta ah. Dhagaxan wuxuu inagu ogolaan karaa in aan qiimeyno sameynta nidaamka madaxa hadalka, sidoo kale dabada dhaadheer, meesha ay sameynayo sameynta nidaamka. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa qaababkan si aan u baarayno hadallada kala duduwan oo ay u soo dhashay sagaal xaaladood oo farshaxan ah oo ku qoran taariikhda MSCO. Waxaynu helnaa in nidaamka lagu tababariyey ay ugu dhaqdhaqaaqaan waxyaabaha ugu macquul ah ay soo bixiyaan wax ka yar midho kala duduwan kuwa la tababaray waxyaabo kale oo cadaawayaal ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qaababka cadaawayaasha ah waxay ka soo bandhigaan noocyo badan oo ka mid ah madaxa hadalka, mana aha dabada. Sidoo kale waxaynu fiirinnaa awoodda kooxaha nidaamka, si gaar ah awoodooda ay u sameyn karto cuntada iyo hadallada hore oo kala duwan. Waxaynu dhamaystirnaa in weli ay leedahay meel aad u bedeshaan, waxaana siinaynaa qalabka qalabka si loo qiyaaso horumarinta si ay u sameeyaan qoraal sawir kala duduwan.', 'si': '@ info මේ පැත්තේ, අපි හිතන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තරයේ ප්\u200dරවිස්තරයක් ප්\u200dරවිස්තරයක් ප්\u200dරවිස්තරයක් නැති කියලා, ඒක අපි ස්ථාපිත මෙට්\u200dරික්ස්  මේ ප්\u200dරකාරය අපිට පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරකාරයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා ශාචාරිකාවේ ඔළුවට, ලොකු ප්\u200dරකාරයක් වගේම,  අපි මේ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක පාවිච්චි කරනවා MS COCO දත්ත සැටේ නිර්මාණය කරපු වචනයේ විවිධය පරීක්ෂා කරන්න. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරධාන පද්ධතියක් විශේෂතාවක් වලින් විවිධ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන නමුත්, විරෝද්ධ විදියට පුහුණු විදියට පුහුණු විදියට වඩා ප්\u200dරකාරයක් විතරයි වචන විදියට විතරයි වච වාක්ය භාෂාවික විධානය අතර, අපි පද්ධතියේ සම්පූර්ණ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් බලන්න, විශේෂයෙන් ඔවුන්ග අපි අවස්ථාව කරනවා තවමත් වැඩි කාමරයක් තියෙනවා වැඩි පින්තූර විස්තර කරන්න, සහ උපකරණ කිට්ටුවක් අවස්ථාවක් අනුව', 'sv': 'Automatiska bildbeskrivningssystem producerar vanligtvis allmänna meningar som bara använder sig av en liten del av ordförrådet som finns tillgängligt för dem. I denna uppsats betraktar vi produktionen av generiska beskrivningar som en brist på mångfald i resultatet, som vi kvantifierar med etablerade mätvärden och två nya mätvärden som ramar in bildbeskrivning som en ordåterkallelseuppgift. Denna inramning gör det möjligt för oss att utvärdera systemets prestanda på huvudet av ordförrådet, liksom på den långa svansen, där systemets prestanda försämras. Vi använder dessa mätvärden för att undersöka mångfalden av meningar som genereras av nio toppmoderna system på MS COCO datauppsättningen. Vi konstaterar att de system som utbildats med maximala sannolikhetsmål producerar mindre varierande resultat än de som utbildats med ytterligare motstridiga mål. De motstridigt tränade modellerna producerar dock bara fler typer från ordförrådets huvud och inte svansen. Förutom vokabulärbaserade metoder tittar vi också på systemens sammansättningsförmåga, särskilt deras förmåga att skapa sammansatta substantiv och prepositionsfraser av olika längd. Vi drar slutsatsen att det fortfarande finns mycket utrymme för förbättringar och erbjuder en verktygslåda för att mäta framstegen mot målet att generera mer mångsidiga bildbeskrivningar.', 'ta': 'தானாகவே பிம்ப விவரிப்பு அமைப்புகள் வழக்கமாக கிடைக்கும் சொல்வளத்தின் சிறிய துணை மட்டுமே பயன்படுத்தும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வெளியீட்டில் பொது விவரங்கள் உருவாக்கத்தை வெளியீட்டில் வேறுபாடு குறையாக கருதுகிறோம், அதை நாம் நிறுவப்பட்ட மெட் இந்த வரைபடம் சொல்வளத்தின் தலைப்பில் அமைப்பு செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பீடு செய்ய அனுமதிக்கிறது, மற்றும் நீண்ட வால் முறைமை செயல்பா நாம் இந்த மெட்ரிக்களை பயன்படுத்தி MSCO தகவல் அமைப்பில் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட ஒன்பது நிலையில் கலை அமைப்புகள் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்கள நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் அதிகபட்ச ச சாத்தியமான பொருள்களுடன் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட அமைப்புகள் கூடுதல் எதிரிய காரணங்களு ஆனால், எதிரி பயிற்சி மாதிரிகள் மட்டும் சொல்வளத்தின் தலைவரில் இருந்து மேலும் வகைகளை உருவாக்குகின்றன, வால் அல்ல சொற்கோவை அடிப்படையான முறைகளை தவிர, நாம் அமைப்புகளின் சூழ்நிலையை பார்க்கிறோம், குறிப்பாக அவர்கள் கூட்டு நீளம் மற்றும் முன்னேற்ற சொ முன்னேற்றத்திற்கு இன்னும் அதிகமான இடத்தில் இருக்கிறது மற்றும் முன்னேற்றத்தை அளக்க ஒரு கருவிப்பெட்டியை கொடுக்கும் ம', 'ur': 'اپنا تصویر کا سپٹم معمولاً معمولاً جسمانی جماعت پیدا کرتا ہے جو صرف ان کے لئے موجود ہونے کے لئے ایک چھوٹی سپٹ سے استعمال کرتی ہیں. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اس عمومی توصیف کے پیدائش کو اپوٹوٹ کے اندر مختلف طریقے کی کمی کے طور پر سمجھ لیا ہے، جسے ہم مضبوط متریک اور دو نوی متریک کے مطابق مطابق کر رہے ہیں جو فرم تصویر کا توصیف ایک کلمہ یاد کرنے کے لئے یہ فرمینگ ہمیں سیسٹم کی فعالیت کا ارزش کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے کہ وہاں سیسٹم کی فعالیت کمزور ہوتی ہے۔ ہم ان متریک کو مکس کوکو ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق نو ایٹیٹ سیسٹم کے ذریعہ جوڑے ہوئے کلمات کی مختلف تحقیق کرنے کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ سیستموں کی تعلیم مزید احتمال کی موجودات سے کم مختلف آئٹ پیدا کرتی ہیں ان سے زیادہ مخالف موجودات کے ساتھ تعلیم کی جاتی ہیں۔ However, the adversarially trained models only produce more types from the head of the vocabulary rather than the tail. زبان بولی طریقے کے علاوہ، ہم نے بھی سیستموں کی جوڑ کی قابلیت دیکھی، مخصوصاً ان کی قابلیت مختلف درازوں کی جوڑ کے نام اور معلومات کی مثالیں بنانے کی۔ ہم نے تصمیم لیا ہے کہ ابھی بہت سی جگہ ہے، اور ایک تولید کیٹ کا پیشرفت مقرر کرنے کے لئے مختلف طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طر', 'uz': "Name Bu hujjatda, biz natijada o'zgarishni o'zgartirib turganini o'ylaymiz. Bu yerda biz tasavvur qilinadigan metrik va rasmni eslab qolish vazifasi deb o'ylaymiz. Bu rasmlar bizga tizimning boshqaruvi tizimning amalni qiymatga ruxsat beradi. Bu yerda tizimning tajribasini o'zgartiradi. Biz bu metriklardan foydalanamiz, MSCO maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi 9 holatdagi soʻzlarning tarkibini o'rganish uchun. Biz o'rganamiz, maktab obʼektlar bilan o'rganilgan tizimlar qoʻshimcha foydalanuvchi maqolalardan ko'p turli natijalarni chiqaradi. Ho'sh, diqqat o'rganilgan modellar faqat so'zning boshidan ko'proq turlarini yaratadi va quyidagi yo'l emas. Tilning asosiy usullari bilan biz bu tizimning kompyuterning qobiliyatini ko'rib turamiz, hususan ularning bir necha nuqta va prepositive so'zlarni o'zgartirish imkoniyatini ko'rib turamiz. Biz murakkab qilamiz, yaxshi ko'proq xona bor, va ko'proq rasm taʼriflarini yaratish maqsadiga harakat qilish uchun asboblar yordam beramiz.", 'vi': 'Hệ thống mô tả hình ảnh tự động sản xuất ra các câu chung mà chỉ sử dụng một nhóm nhỏ trong các từ điển sẵn sàng cho chúng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi coi việc sản xuất mô tả chung là sự thiếu đa dạng trong kết xuất, mà chúng tôi định lượng được dùng âm lượng đã xác định và hai âm lượng mới mô tả hình ảnh là một nhiệm vụ triệu tập từ. Cái khung này cho phép chúng ta đánh giá khả năng hệ thống trên đầu của các từ, cũng như trên đuôi dài, nơi các hiệu suất của hệ thống bị giảm. Chúng tôi dùng các âm lượng này để kiểm tra sự đa dạng các câu câu do chín hệ thống hiện đại trên bộ dữ liệu của xơ rải rác. Chúng tôi thấy rằng những hệ thống được huấn luyện với mức độ rủi ro tối đa sẽ tạo ra ít sản phẩm khác nhau hơn những người được huấn luyện với các mục tiêu khác nhau. Tuy nhiên, các mô hình được huấn luyện đối thủ chỉ tạo ra nhiều loại người đầu từ các từ điển, không phải từ đuôi. Bên cạnh các phương pháp dựa trên từ vựng, chúng ta cũng nhìn thấy khả năng phối hợp của hệ thống, đặc biệt khả năng tạo ra các danh từ liên hợp và các cụm từ lặt vặt khác nhau. Chúng tôi kết luận rằng vẫn còn nhiều chỗ để cải thiện, và cung cấp một bộ dụng cụ để đo lường tiến trình nhằm mục đích tạo mô tả ảnh khác nhau hơn.', 'bg': 'Автоматичните системи за описание на изображенията обикновено произвеждат общи изречения, които използват само малка подгрупа от речника, с който разполагат. В настоящата статия разглеждаме производството на общи описания като липса на разнообразие в изхода, което количествено измерваме с помощта на установени показатели и два нови показателя, които рамкират описанието на изображението като задача за припомняне на думи. Това рамкиране ни позволява да оценяваме ефективността на системата на главата на речника, както и на дългата опашка, където ефективността на системата се влошава. Използваме тези показатели, за да изследваме разнообразието на изреченията, генерирани от девет най-съвременни системи в набора от данни. Установяваме, че системите, обучени с максимална вероятност цели, произвеждат по-малко разнообразни резултати от тези, обучени с допълнителни противоречиви цели. Въпреки това, обучените по конкуренция модели произвеждат повече типове само от главата на речника, а не от опашката. Освен методите, базирани на лексика, разглеждаме и композиционния капацитет на системите, по-специално способността им да създават съставни съществителни и предпозиционни фрази с различна дължина. Ние заключаваме, че все още има много място за подобрение и предлагаме набор от инструменти за измерване на напредъка към целта за генериране на по-разнообразни описания на изображенията.', 'nl': 'Automatische beeldbeschrijvingssystemen produceren meestal generieke zinnen die slechts gebruik maken van een kleine subset van de woordenschat die beschikbaar is voor hen. In dit artikel beschouwen we de productie van generieke beschrijvingen als een gebrek aan diversiteit in de output, die we kwantificeren met behulp van gevestigde metrics en twee nieuwe metrics die afbeeldingsbeschrijving kaderen als een woord recall taak. Deze framing stelt ons in staat om systeemprestaties te evalueren op de kop van de woordenschat, evenals op de lange staart, waar systeemprestaties verslechteren. We gebruiken deze statistieken om de diversiteit van de zinnen te onderzoeken die worden gegenereerd door negen state-of-the-art systemen op de MS COCO dataset. We stellen vast dat de systemen die getraind zijn met maximale waarschijnlijkheid doelstellingen minder uiteenlopende output produceren dan die welke getraind zijn met aanvullende tegenstrijdige doelstellingen. De tegenstrijdig getrainde modellen produceren echter alleen meer typen uit het hoofd van de woordenschat en niet uit de staart. Naast op woordenschat gebaseerde methoden kijken we ook naar het samenstellingsvermogen van de systemen, in het bijzonder naar hun vermogen om samengestelde zelfstandige naamwoorden en voorzetsels van verschillende lengtes te creëren. We concluderen dat er nog veel ruimte is voor verbetering en bieden een toolkit aan om vooruitgang te meten in de richting van het genereren van diversere beeldbeschrijvingen.', 'hr': 'Automatski sustavi opisa slika obično proizvode generične rečenice koje koriste samo mali podsetnik rečenika koji im je dostupan. U ovom papiru smatramo proizvodnjom generalnih opisa kao nedostatak raznolikosti u izlazu, koji kvantificiramo korištenjem uspostavljenih metrika i dvije nove metrike koje okviruju opis slike kao riječ sjećanja zadataka. Ova okvira nam omogućava procijeniti učinkovitost sustava na glavi riječnika, kao i na dugom repu, gdje se smanjuje učinkovitost sustava. Koristimo ove metrike da pregledamo raznolikost rečenica proizvedenih od devet državnih umjetničkih sustava na sastavu podataka MS COCO-a. Nalazimo da sustavi obučeni maksimalnim ciljevima vjerojatnosti proizvode manje različitih proizvoda nego one obučene dodatnim adversarnim ciljevima. Međutim, protivno obučeni modeli proizvode više vrsta iz glave riječnika, a ne repa. Osim rečeničkih metoda, također pogledamo kompozicionalnu kapacitet sustava, posebno njihovu sposobnost stvaranja spojenih imena i prepoznativnih fraza različitih dužina. Zaključili smo da još uvijek postoji mnogo mjesta za poboljšanje, i ponudili instrument za mjerenje napretka ka cilju stvaranja raznolikosti opisa slika.', 'de': 'Automatische Bildbeschreibungssysteme erzeugen typischerweise generische Sätze, die nur einen kleinen Teil des ihnen zur Verfügung stehenden Vokabulars verwenden. In diesem Beitrag betrachten wir die Produktion generischer Beschreibungen als mangelnde Diversität in der Ausgabe, die wir mit etablierten Metriken und zwei neuen Metriken quantifizieren, die Bildbeschreibung als Wortrückrufaufgabe einrahmen. Dieses Framing ermöglicht es uns, die Systemleistung sowohl am Kopf des Vokabulars als auch am Long Tail zu bewerten, wo die Systemleistung nachlässt. Anhand dieser Metriken untersuchen wir die Vielfalt der Sätze, die von neun State-of-the-Art Systemen auf dem MS COCO Datensatz generiert werden. Wir stellen fest, dass die Systeme, die mit maximaler Wahrscheinlichkeit trainiert werden, weniger unterschiedliche Ergebnisse produzieren als diejenigen, die mit zusätzlichen gegensätzlichen Zielen trainiert wurden. Die gegensätzlich trainierten Modelle produzieren jedoch nur mehr Typen aus dem Kopf des Vokabulars und nicht aus dem Schwanz. Neben vokabularbasierten Methoden untersuchen wir auch die kompositorische Kapazität der Systeme, insbesondere ihre Fähigkeit, zusammengesetzte Substantive und Präpositionen unterschiedlicher Länge zu erstellen. Wir kommen zu dem Schluss, dass es noch viel Raum für Verbesserungen gibt und bieten ein Toolkit an, um Fortschritte auf dem Weg zum Ziel zu messen, vielfältigere Bildbeschreibungen zu generieren.', 'id': 'Sistem deskripsi gambar otomatis biasanya menghasilkan kalimat generik yang hanya menggunakan subset kecil dari vokabular yang tersedia untuk mereka. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempertimbangkan produksi deskripsi generik sebagai kekurangan diversitas dalam output, yang kami kuantifikasikan menggunakan metrik tertentu dan dua metrik baru yang menggambarkan gambar bingkai sebagai tugas ingatan kata. Bingkai ini memungkinkan kita untuk mengevaluasi prestasi sistem pada kepala vokabular, dan juga pada ekor panjang, di mana prestasi sistem merusak. Kami menggunakan metrik ini untuk memeriksa kebanyakan kalimat yang dihasilkan oleh sembilan sistem state-of-the-art pada set data MS COCO. Kami menemukan bahwa sistem yang dilatih dengan tujuan kemungkinan maksimal menghasilkan output yang kurang berbeda dari yang dilatih dengan tujuan musuh tambahan. Namun, model yang dilatih melawan hanya menghasilkan lebih banyak jenis dari kepala vokabular dan bukan ekor. Selain metode berdasarkan vokabular, kita juga melihat kapasitas komposisi sistem, khususnya kemampuan mereka untuk menciptakan nama komponen dan frasa preposisional dari panjang yang berbeda. Kami menyimpulkan bahwa masih banyak ruang untuk memperbaiki, dan menawarkan alat untuk mengukur kemajuan menuju tujuan untuk menghasilkan deskripsi gambar yang lebih berbeda.', 'ko': '자동 이미지 설명 시스템은 일반적으로 일반적인 문장을 만들기 위해 사용할 수 있는 단어의 일부분만 사용합니다.본고에서 우리는 일반적인 묘사가 발생한 것은 출력에 다양성이 부족하기 때문이라고 생각한다. 우리는 이미 만들어진 도량과 두 개의 새로운 도량을 사용하여 출력을 계량화한다. 이 두 도량은 이미지 묘사를 단어 리콜 임무로 한다.이런 구조는 우리가 어휘표의 시작과 시스템 성능이 떨어지는 긴 끝에서 시스템 성능을 평가할 수 있게 한다.MS COCO 데이터 세트에서 가장 진보된 9개 시스템에서 생성된 문장의 다양성을 확인하려면 이러한 지표를 사용합니다.우리는 최대 유사 목표 훈련을 사용하는 시스템이 추가 적대 목표 훈련을 사용하는 시스템보다 출력 차이가 적다는 것을 발견했다.그러나 역경 훈련을 거친 모델은 끝부분이 아닌 어휘량의 머리에서만 더 많은 유형을 생성할 수 있다.어휘를 바탕으로 하는 방법을 제외하고 우리는 체계적인 합성 능력, 특히 서로 다른 길이의 복합 명사와 개사 단어를 창조하는 능력을 연구했다.우리가 얻은 결론은 아직도 많은 개선 공간이 있고 더욱 다양한 이미지 묘사를 만드는 목표를 실현하는 데 얻은 진전을 평가하는 도구 패키지를 제공한다는 것이다.', 'fa': 'سیستم توصیف تصویر خودکار معمولاً جمله\u200cهای معمولی را تولید می\u200cکند که تنها از یک زیر زیر کوچک از جمله\u200cهای واژه برای آنها استفاده می\u200cکنند. در این کاغذ، ما تولید توصیف عمومی را به عنوان ناتوانی مختلفی در نتیجه می بینیم، که ما با استفاده از متریک ساخته شده و دو متریک جدید مقدار می کنیم که توصیف تصویر را به عنوان یک کلمه یادآوری است. این فرم به ما اجازه می دهد که عملکرد سیستم را روی سر کلمه کلمه، همچنین روی دمای طولانی ارزیابی کنیم، جایی که عملکرد سیستم نابود می شود. ما از این متریک استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا مختلف جمله\u200cهای نو سیستم\u200cهای هنری روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای COCO MS را تحقیق کنیم. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که سیستم\u200cها با هدف\u200cهای بالاترین احتمال آموزش یافته\u200cاند، نتیجه\u200cهای مختلف کمتر از هدف\u200cهای مخالف بیشتری را تولید می\u200cکنند. با این حال، مدل\u200cهای متخصص\u200cآموزش با دشمنی فقط نوع بیشتری از سر کلمه\u200cی کلمه\u200cای را تولید می\u200cکنند و نه پشت. غیر از روش\u200cهای بنیاد زبان، ما همچنین به توانایی ترکیب سیستم\u200cها نگاه می\u200cکنیم، مخصوصا توانایی آنها برای ایجاد نام\u200cهای ترکیب و عبارت\u200cهای متفاوتی از طول متفاوت. ما تصمیم می\u200cگیریم که هنوز جای زیادی برای بهبود وجود دارد، و یک کیت ابزار برای اندازه\u200cگیری پیشرفت به هدف توصیف\u200cهای تصویر مختلف\u200cتر وجود دارد.', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa maelezo ya picha binafsi huzalisha hukumu za kawaida ambazo hutumia kanuni ndogo ya lugha zinazopatikana. In this paper, we consider the production of generic descriptions as a lack of diversity in the output, which we quantify using established metrics and two new metrics that frame image description as a word recall task.  Uchaguzi huu unaturuhusu kutathmini utendaji wa mfumo juu ya kichwa cha lugha, na pia kwenye mfumo mrefu, ambapo utendaji wa mfumo unaongezeka. Tunatumia mbinu hizi ili kuchunguza tofauti ya hukumu zilizotengenezwa na mifumo tisa ya sanaa kwenye seti ya data ya MSCO. Tunapata kwamba mifumo inayofundishwa na malengo yenye uwezekano mkubwa yanatoa matunda tofauti zaidi ya wale waliofundishwa na malengo mengine yanayopingana. Hata hivyo, miundo mbinu inayojifunza upinzani yanatengeneza aina zaidi kutoka kichwa cha maneno na sio taifa. Zaidi ya mbinu za lugha, pia tunaangalia uwezo wa mkusanyiko wa mifumo, hususani uwezo wao wa kutengeneza chakula cha fedha na maneno mazuri ya mrefu tofauti. Tunahitimisha kuwa bado kuna nafasi kubwa ya kuboresha, na kutoa vifaa vya kupima maendeleo kwa lengo la kutengeneza maelezo mbalimbali ya picha.', 'tr': 'Resim Wasp sistemleri adat챌a s철zlerini흫 ki챌i bir topary 체챌in ullan첵an d철wletleri 체첵tged첵채r Bu kagyzda, 챌yky힊 i챌inde jeneral tasvir edilen 챌yky힊 hasaplamasyny 챌ykarmak 체챌in hasaplan첵arys. Bu 힊ekilde 챌yky힊 edilen metrik we iki t채ze metrik ullan첵arys. Bu framlar s철zlerin ba힊ynda sistemi흫 ba힊ynda performansyny de흫le힊tirmegimize m체mkin ed첵채r, 첵철ne uzak kuyru챌da, sistemi흫 performansyny흫 azalyp bar첵ar. Biz bu metrikleri MS COCO veri setinde d철redilen s철zleri흫 n채챌e 챌e힊itligini barlamak 체챌in ulan첵arys. Biz sistemalary흫 maksimal m체mkin챌ilik maksady maksady maksady maksady bilen e휓lenen 챌yky힊, a힊캇r캇 t채sirli maksady bilen e휓lenen maksady 체챌in azajyk 챌yky힊 edip bil첵채ris. 횦철ne, t채sirli-bilim nusgalar di흫e s철zlerin kellesinden k철p 힊ekiller 체ret첵채r, 첵철ne gu첵rukdan d채l. S철zlerden da힊ary 첵agda첵da sistemalary흫 kompozisyonal ukyplaryna seredip g철r첵채ris, 철zellikle olary흫 birle힊mi힊 isimleri we tansi첵etleri farkl캇 uzunluklary흫 첵erine 첵etirmekde ukyplaryna seredip otyr첵arys. Biz h채li 첵eti힊iklik geli힊meler 체챌in k철p 첵er bar we 첵eti힊iklik ta첵첵arlamak 체챌in 철n체mi d체zenlemek 체챌in bir ara챌 teklip ed첵채ris.', 'af': "Outomatiese beeldbeskrywing stelsels produseer generieke setings wat slegs gebruik maak van 'n klein subartikel van die woordeboek vir hulle beskikbaar. In hierdie papier, ons beskou die produksie van algemene beskrywings as 'n mislukking van verskeidigheid in die uitvoer, wat ons kvantifiseer deur gebruik van vasgestelde metries en twee nuwe metries wat raam beeldbeskrywing as 'n woord herhaal taak. Hierdie raam laat ons toe om stelsel prestasie op die kop van die woordeboek te evalueer, en ook op die lang stert, waar stelsel prestasie verdraai. Ons gebruik hierdie metries om die verskeidigheid van die setings wat genereer word deur nege staat van die kuns stelsels op die MS Koco data stel te ondersoek. Ons vind dat die stelsels met maksimale waarskynlikheid-objekte opgelei het, minder verskillende uitvoer as die wat opgelei het met addisionele teenstandaarie doels. Maar die teenstandaarlik opgelei modele produseer slegs meer tipes van die kop van die woordeboek en nie die stert nie. Ons kyk ook na die samenskaplike kapasiteit van die stelsels, spesifieke hulle kapasiteit om samenskaplike noume en preposeesiële frase van verskillende lengte te te skep. Ons sluit dat daar nog baie kamer is vir verbetering en 'n nutsbalk is om vordering te maak tot die doel van meer verskeie beeldebeskrywings te genereer.", 'da': 'Automatiske billedbeskrivelsessystemer producerer typisk generiske sætninger, der kun gør brug af en lille del af ordforrådet tilgængeligt for dem. I denne artikel betragter vi produktionen af generiske beskrivelser som en mangel på mangfoldighed i output, som vi kvantificerer ved hjælp af etablerede metrics og to nye metrics, der rammer billedbeskrivelse som en ordtilbagekaldelsesopgave. Denne indramning giver os mulighed for at vurdere systemets ydeevne på hovedet af ordforrådet, såvel som på den lange hale, hvor systemets ydeevne forringes. Vi bruger disse metrics til at undersøge mangfoldigheden af de sætninger, der genereres af ni state-of-the-art systemer på MS COCO datasættet. Vi konstaterer, at de systemer, der er uddannet med maksimal sandsynlighed mål, giver mindre forskelligartede resultater end dem, der er uddannet med yderligere modstridende mål. Men de modstandstrænede modeller producerer kun flere typer fra hovedet af ordforrådet og ikke halen. Udover ordforråd-baserede metoder ser vi også på systemernes kompositionsevne, specielt deres evne til at skabe sammensatte substantiver og præpositionssætninger af forskellige længder. Vi konkluderer, at der stadig er meget plads til forbedringer, og tilbyder et værktøjssæt til måling af fremskridt mod målet om at generere mere forskelligartede billedbeskrivelser.', 'am': 'ምስል ክፈት በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የgeneric ጽሑፎችን ውጤት የልዩ ልዩነት እንደሚጎድል እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ይህ ስብስብ የድምፅ አካባቢ ራስ ላይ እና ረጅም ጅማት ላይ ሲሆን የስርዓት ድጋፍ የሚያሳውቀውን ፍጥረት ይችላል፡፡ We use these metrics to examine the diversity of the sentences generated by nine state-of-the-art systems on the MS COCO data set.  በተጨማሪም በተቃዋሚ አቃውሞ ከሚያስተማሩት ይልቅ የተለየ የሥርዓት ተሟጋቾች ያሉትን ሲስተምሩ እናገኛለን፡፡ ነገር ግን ተቃዋሚ ተማሪዎች ሞዴላዎች በአብሪካዊው ራስ ብቻ ሳይሆን የበዛ ዓይነት ብቻ ያቀርባሉ፡፡ በአብሪካዊ ደረጃዎች በቀር፣ የስርዓቶችን አካባቢ ኃይል እናየዋለን፣ በተለየንም ልዩ ረጅም እና የተለየ ቃላትን መፍጠር እናስችላለን፡፡ ለጥቅማት የሚኖር ስፍራዎች ገና ብዙ ነው እና የልዩ ልዩ መልዕክቶችን ለመፍጠር ለመለካት የሀብት ዕቃ ማቅረብ እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Sistemet automatike të përshkrimit të imazhit tipikisht prodhojnë fraza gjenerale që përdorin vetëm një nëngrup të vogël të fjalorit në dispozicion për ta. Në këtë letër, ne konsiderojmë prodhimin e përshkrimeve gjenerale si një mungesë diversiteti në prodhimin, të cilin ne e kuantifikojmë duke përdorur metrika të vendosura dhe dy metrika të reja që përshkruajnë imazhin si një detyrë të kujtimit të fjalës. Ky kornizë na lejon të vlerësojmë performancën e sistemit në krye të fjalorin si dhe në bishtin e gjatë, ku performanca e sistemit degradon. Ne përdorim këto metrika për të shqyrtuar shumëllojshmërinë e fjalëve të gjeneruara nga nëntë sisteme state-of-the-art në sistemin e të dhënave MS COCO. We find that the systems trained with maximum likelihood objectives produce less diverse output than those trained with additional adversarial objectives.  Megjithatë, modelet e trajnuara kundërshtarë prodhojnë vetëm më shumë lloje nga koka e fjalorin dhe jo bishtin. Përveç metodave bazuar në fjalorë, ne gjithashtu shohim kapacitetin përbërës të sistemeve, veçanërisht aftësinë e tyre për të krijuar emra të përbashkëta dhe fraza parapozitive me gjatësi të ndryshme. Ne përfundojmë se ende ka shumë vend për përmirësim dhe ofrojmë një paketë mjete për të matur përparimin drejt qëllimit të krijimit të përshkrimeve më të ndryshme të imazhit.', 'hy': 'Ավտոմատիկ նկարների նկարագրման համակարգերը սովորաբար ստեղծում են ընդհանուր նախադասություններ, որոնք օգտագործում են բառարանի մի փոքրիկ ենթախումբ, որը նրանց հասանելի է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ընդհանուր նկարագրությունների արտադրումը համարում ենք արտադրության բազմազանության բացակայությունը, որը մենք չափեցնում ենք օգտագործելով հաստատուն մետրիկներ և երկու նոր մետրիկներ, որոնք պատկերի նկարագրությունը շրջանակում են որպես բառի վերա Այս կառուցվածքը մեզ հնարավորություն է տալիս գնահատել համակարգի արտադրողությունը բառարանի գլխում, ինչպես նաև երկար պոչյունում, որտեղ համակարգի արտադրողությունը պակասում է: Մենք օգտագործում ենք այս մետրիկները ուսումնասիրելու համար այն նախադասությունների բազմազանությունը, որոնք ստեղծվել են համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային տվյալների համակարգում: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ համակարգերը, որոնք վարժեցվել են առավելագույն հավանականությամբ նպատակներով, ավելի քիչ բազմազան արդյունք են ստանում, քան նրանք, որոնք վարժեցվել են ավելին հակառակորդական նպատակներով: Այնուամենայնիվ, հակառակորդ վարժեցված մոդելները բառարանի գլխից ավելի շատ տեսակներ են արտադրում, ոչ թե պոչը: Բացի բառարանի հիմնված մեթոդների, մենք նաև նայում ենք համակարգերի բաղադրական հնարավորություններին, հատկապես նրանց հնարավորությանը ստեղծել տարբեր երկարությամբ բաղադրված անուններ և նախադրական արտահայտություններ: Մենք եզրակացնում ենք, որ դեռևս շատ տեղ կա բարելավման համար, և ներկայացնում ենք գործիքներ, որոնք կչափեն առաջընթացը դեպի առավել բազմազան նկարագրություններ ստեղծելու նպատակը:', 'bs': 'Automatski sistemi opisa slika obično proizvode generične rečenice koje koriste samo mali podsetnik rečnika koji im je dostupan. U ovom papiru, smatramo proizvodnjom generalnih opisa kao nedostatak raznolikosti u izlazu, koju kvantificiramo koristeći uspostavljene metrike i dvije nove metrike koje okviruju opis slike kao reč sjećanja zadataka. Ova okvira nam omogućava da procijenimo sistemski učinkoviti na glavi riječnika, kao i na dugom repu, gdje se smanjuje učinkovitost sistema. Koristimo ove metrike da pregledamo raznolikost rečenica koje su stvorile devet državnih umjetničkih sustava na kompetu podataka MS COCO-a. Nalazimo da sustavi obučeni sa maksimalnim ciljevima vjerojatnosti proizvode manje različite proizvode nego one obučene dodatnim adversarnim ciljevima. Međutim, neprijateljski obučeni modeli proizvode samo više vrsta iz glave riječnika, a ne repa. Osim metoda na rečenici, također pogledamo kompozicionalnu kapacitet sustava, posebno njihovu sposobnost stvaranja spojenih imena i prepoznativnih fraza različitih dužina. Zaključujemo da još uvijek postoji mnogo mjesta za poboljšanje i ponudimo instrument za mjerenje napredka ka cilju stvaranja raznolikosti opisa slika.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ছবির বর্ণনা সিস্টেম সাধারণত সাধারণত বাক্য উৎপাদন করে যা শুধুমাত্র শব্দভাণ্ডারের একটি ছোট সাবট এই কাগজটিতে আমরা জেনারিক বর্ণনা উৎপাদনের বৈচিত্র্যের অভাব হিসেবে বিবেচনা করি, যা আমরা প্রতিষ্ঠিত মেট্রিক এবং দুই নতুন মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করে পরিমাণ করি  এই বিভ্রান্তি আমাদের সাহায্য করে শব্দভাণ্ডারের মাথার উপর সিস্টেমের কার্যক্রম মূল্যায়ন করতে পারে, আর দীর্ঘমাত্রাও, যেখানে  এমএস কোসো ডাটা সেটে তৈরি করা ৯ রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প সিস্টেমের বৈচিত্র্যের বৈচিত্র্যের বৈচিত্র্যের পরীক্ষা করার জন্ আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে সিস্টেমের প্রশিক্ষিত ব্যবস্থা সর্বোচ্চ সম্ভাবনার উদ্দেশ্যে বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ফলাফল তৈরি করে যারা  তবে বিরোধী প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল শুধুমাত্র শব্দভাণ্ডারের প্রধান থেকে আরো ধরনের উৎপাদন করে, কিন্তু টেইল নয়। শব্দভাণ্ডার ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি ছাড়াও আমরা সিস্টেমের সংগঠনের ক্ষমতার দিকে তাকিয়ে থাকি, বিশেষ করে তাদের ক্ষমতা বিভিন্ন দীর্ঘ বাক্য তৈর আমরা উপসংহার প্রদান করেছি যে উন্নতির জন্য এখনো অনেক জায়গা রয়েছে এবং আরো বিভিন্ন ছবির বর্ণনা তৈরি করার লক্ষ্যে অগ্রগতি প্রদান করার জন্য একট', 'ca': "Els sistemes automàtics de descripció d'imatges normalment produeixen frases genèriques que només utilitzen un petit subconjunt del vocabulari disponible. En aquest paper, considerem la producció de descripcions genèriques com una falta de diversitat en la producció, que quantifiquem utilitzant mètriques establertes i dues noves mètriques que defineixen la descripció de la imatge com una tasca de recuperació de paraules. Aquesta estructura ens permet avaluar el rendiment del sistema al cap del vocabulari, i a la llarga cua, on el rendiment del sistema es degrada. Utilitzem aquestes mètriques per examinar la diversitat de les frases generades per nou sistemes moderns del conjunt de dades MS COCO. Trobem que els sistemes entrenats amb objectius de màxima probabilitat produeixen una producció menys diversa que aquells entrenats amb objectius adversaris adicionals. No obstant això, els models entrenats adversaris només produeixen més tipus del cap del vocabulari i no de la cua. A més dels mètodes basats en vocabulari, també mirem la capacitat de composició dels sistemes, específicament la seva capacitat de crear noms composts i frases prepositives de diferents llargs. Conclouem que encara hi ha molt espai per millorar i oferim un conjunt d'eines per mesurar el progrés cap a l'objectiu de generar descripcions d'imatges més diverses.", 'az': 'Avtomatik şəkillərin tanımlama sistemlərinin generiki sözlərini özlərinə faydalanır ki, özlərinə faydalanır kiçik sözlərin altından istifadə edərlər. Bu kağızda, çoxlu tərzimlərin ürəklərini çıxartdığımız cürbəcür tərzimlərin olmadığını hesab edirik ki, biz qurulmuş metrikləri və iki yeni metrik vasitəsilə, fotoğraf tərzimlərini yada salmaq üçün hesab edirik. Bu fotoğraf bizə sistem performansını sözlərin başında, uzun kuyruğunda və sistem performansının dəhşətli olduğu yerə değerləşdirməyə imkan verir. Biz bu metrikləri MS COCO verilər qutusunda doqquz mövcud sistemi ilə yaratdığı cümlələrin müxtəlifliyini incidirik. Gördük ki, maksimum mümkünlük məqsədilə təhsil edilən sistemlər artıq düşmənçilik məqsədilə təhsil edilənlərdən daha az müxtəlif təhsil edirlər. Lakin, düşmənçilik təhsil edilmiş modellər yalnız sözlərin başından daha çox növlər ürəkləyir, kuyruğun deyil. Sözlük tabanlı metodların istisnasında, sistemlərin kompozisyonal kapasitəsini də baxarıq, özlərinə də müxtəlif uzunluğun birləşdirilməsi və məlumatları yaratmaq bacarıqlarına görərik. Biz hələ də təmizləmək üçün çox yer var və daha müxtəlif görüntü tanımlama məqsədilə ilerləşmək üçün bir araç kitabı təklif edirik.', 'et': 'Automaatsed pildikirjeldussüsteemid toodavad tavaliselt üldisi lauseid, mis kasutavad ainult väikest alamhulka neile kättesaadavat sõnavara. Käesolevas töös käsitleme üldiste kirjelduste tootmist kui mitmekesisuse puudumist väljundis, mida kvantifitseerime kasutades väljakujunenud mõõdikuid ja kahte uut mõõdikut, mis raamivad pildi kirjeldust sõna tagasikutsumise ülesandena. See raamimine võimaldab meil hinnata süsteemi jõudlust nii sõnavara peal kui ka pikal sabal, kus süsteemi jõudlus halveneb. Nende mõõdikute abil uurime MS COCO andmekogumi üheksa kaasaegse süsteemi loodud lausete mitmekesisust. Leiame, et maksimaalse tõenäosuse eesmärkidega koolitatud süsteemid toodavad vähem erinevaid tulemusi kui täiendavate vastaste eesmärkidega koolitatud süsteemid. Samas toodavad vastandlikult koolitatud mudelid rohkem tüüpe ainult sõnavara peast, mitte sabast. Lisaks sõnavara-põhistele meetoditele uurime ka süsteemide kompositsioonivõimet, täpsemalt nende võimet luua erineva pikkusega liitnimeid ja prepositsioonifraase. Järeldame, et veel on palju arenguruumi ja pakume tööriistakomplekti edusammude mõõtmiseks mitmekesisemate pildikirjelduste loomise eesmärgi suunas.', 'cs': 'Automatické systémy popisu obrázků obvykle produkují obecné věty, které využívají jen malé podmnožiny slovní zásoby, které mají k dispozici. V tomto článku považujeme tvorbu obecných popisů za nedostatek diverzity ve výstupu, který kvantifikujeme pomocí zavedených metrik a dvou nových metrik, které rámcují popis obrázku jako úlohu připomenutí slov. Toto rámování nám umožňuje hodnotit výkon systému na hlavě slovní zásoby, stejně jako na dlouhém ocasu, kde se výkon systému zhoršuje. Tyto metriky používáme k prozkoumání rozmanitosti vět generovaných devíti nejmodernějšími systémy v datové sadě MS COCO. Zjišťujeme, že systémy trénované s maximální pravděpodobností cílů produkují méně rozmanitý výstup než systémy trénované s dalšími protivními cíli. Nicméně, nepřátelsky trénované modely produkují více typů pouze z hlavy slovní zásoby a ne ocasu. Kromě metod založených na slovní zásobě se zabýváme také kompoziční schopností systémů, konkrétně jejich schopností vytvářet složená podstatná jména a předložkové fráze různých délek. Dospěli jsme k závěru, že je stále mnoho prostoru pro zlepšení a nabízíme sadu nástrojů pro měření pokroku směrem k cíli generování různorodějších popisů obrazů.', 'fi': 'Automaattiset kuvankuvausjärjestelmät tuottavat tyypillisesti yleisiä lauseita, jotka käyttävät vain pientä osaa käytettävissä olevasta sanastosta. Tässä artikkelissa tarkastelemme yleisten kuvausten tuottamista tuotoksen monimuotoisuuden puutteena, jonka kvantifioimme käyttämällä vakiintuneita mittareita ja kahta uutta mittaria, jotka kehystävät kuvan kuvauksen sanakutsuna. Tämän kehystyksen avulla voimme arvioida järjestelmän suorituskykyä sanaston kärjessä sekä pitkällä hännällä, jossa järjestelmän suorituskyky heikkenee. Näillä mittareilla tutkimme yhdeksän viimeisintä järjestelmää MS COCO -aineistossa tuottamien lauseiden moninaisuutta. Havaitsemme, että mahdollisimman todennäköisillä tavoitteilla koulutetut järjestelmät tuottavat vähemmän monipuolista tuotosta kuin ne, joilla on ylimääräisiä vastustajia koskevia tavoitteita. Konvertariaalisesti koulutetut mallit tuottavat kuitenkin vain enemmän tyyppejä sanaston päältä eikä hännästä. Sanastopohjaisten menetelmien lisäksi tarkastelemme järjestelmien koostumuskykyä, erityisesti niiden kykyä luoda eri pituisia substantiiveja ja prepositiivisia lauseita. Päätämme, että parantamisen varaa on vielä paljon, ja tarjoamme työkalupakin mittaamaan edistymistä kohti tavoitetta luoda monipuolisempia kuvakuvauksia.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Kita menehi, akeh nyong nggawe pancen ukuwatakan pangan kawula-tanggal kawula nggawe winih dhéwé kuwi kesempatan ngono nggawe sistem Metiks karo sistem sing gawe sistem alat iki dadi apik dhéwé, nambah nambah kebuturan pangan Display routing Awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem iki dadi kanggo bisa panggayatan kanggo ngerasar seneng kabèh dumadhi kapan-kalungsing sistem sing paling-perusahaan karo perangkat dhéwé perangkat dhéwé Awak dhéwé ngerasai sistem sing tuktukang karo ngono nggawe aksi kanggo ngilangno sistêm sing luwih apik dhéwé. Awak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé uga ngerasai winih sing liwih apik dhéwé. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), there is a change ("assertive politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih akeh pisan kanggo nggawe gerakan luwih, lan nyebuté nggawe barang kanggo meh bantuan kanggo nggolok nggawe akeh pisan penting sampeyan luwih apik.', 'he': 'מערכות תיאור תמונות אוטומטיות יוצרות בדרך כלל משפטים גנרליים שמשתמשים רק בסבוט קטן של המילים זמין להם. בעיתון הזה, אנו מחשיבים את הייצור של תיאורים גנרליים כחוסר מגוון בתוצאה, שאנחנו מכוונים בשימוש מטריות קבועות ושני מטריות חדשות שמסגרות תיאור תמונה כמשימה זיכרון מילים. המסגרת הזאת מאפשרת לנו להעריך ביצועי מערכת על ראש המילים, כמו גם על הזנב הארוך, שבו ביצועי מערכת מתdegrades. אנו משתמשים במטריקות האלה כדי לבדוק את מגוון המשפטים שנוצרו ע"י תשע מערכות חדשות במידע של MS COCO. אנו מוצאים שהמערכות מאומנות עם מטרות סבירות מקסימליות יוצרות תוצאה פחות מגוונת מאשר אלה שאומנות עם מטרות נוגדות נוספות. בכל אופן, הדוגמנים המאמנים לריב יוצרים רק יותר סוגים מראש המילים ולא הזנב. חוץ מהשיטות המבוססים על המילים, אנחנו גם מסתכלים על יכולת המרכיבה של המערכות, במיוחד היכולת שלהם ליצור שמות מורכבות ובטאות קדומות של אורך שונה. אנחנו מסתיימים שיש עדיין הרבה מקום לשיפור, ומציעים חבילת כלים למדוד התקדמות לכיוון המטרה ליצור תיאורים תמונות מגוונים יותר.', 'ha': "@ action: button Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙaddara manubuɗen misalin kima kamar wata ƙari na dabar-dabar a cikin Outaton, wanda Muke ƙaddara shi da za'a yi amfani da metric wanda aka tabbatar da shi, da metric biyu biyu masu motsi da zanen firam kamar wani aikin da za'a yi tunãni. Wannan zane na yarda mu canza tsarin na'ura a kan kicin maganar, da kuma a kan ƙarfe, inda tsarin na'ura ta fi girma. Yana amfani da waɗannan metrics, dõmin Mu jarraba masu yawa ga kalmõmi wanda aka ƙãga na-state-of-the-art-system kan data set na MICO. Muna gane cewa, na'urar waɗanda aka yi wa aikin na'urar da ko da aka so, yana fitar da matsayi masu ƙaranci dabam-dabam daga waɗanda aka yi wa takarda da abu masu ƙaranci. A lokacin da aka sanar da masu motsi na motsi kawai ke sami nau'i-nau'i daga kichin maganar, kuma bã ya zuwa ƙarfe. Babu hanyõyin maganar, ko kuma munã dũbi zuwa abincin da ke samun na'ura na'ura, da ƙayyade abincin su iya samu da sauri na daban-daban-daban. Tuna ƙare cẽwa there are bada wani wuri mai kyau, kuma za'a sami wata alama don ya iya ƙayyade kodi zuwa goan ya sami misãlai-zane-zane-daban.", 'sk': 'Sistemi samodejnega opisa slik običajno proizvajajo splošne stavke, ki uporabljajo le majhen podnabor besedišča, ki so jim na voljo. V prispevku obravnavamo proizvodnjo generičnih opisov kot pomanjkanje raznolikosti v izhodišču, ki jih kvantificiramo z uveljavljenimi metrikami in dvema novima metrikama, ki opis slike okvirjata kot nalogo odpoklica besed. Ta okvirjenost nam omogoča ocenjevanje učinkovitosti sistema na glavi besedišča, kot tudi na dolgem repu, kjer se zmogljivost sistema poslabša. Te meritve uporabljamo za preučitev raznolikosti stavkov, ki jih ustvari devet najsodobnejših sistemov v sklopu podatkov MS COCO. Ugotavljamo, da sistemi, usposobljeni s cilji največje verjetnosti, proizvajajo manj raznolike rezultate kot tisti, usposobljeni z dodatnimi konkurenčnimi cilji. Vendar pa nasprotno usposobljeni modeli proizvajajo samo več tipov iz glave besedišča in ne rep. Poleg metod, ki temeljijo na besedišču, obravnavamo tudi kompozicijsko sposobnost sistemov, zlasti njihovo sposobnost ustvarjanja sestavljenih samostalnikov in predpozicijskih stavkov različnih dolžin. Sklepamo, da je še veliko prostora za izboljšave in ponujamo orodje za merjenje napredka pri doseganju cilja ustvarjanja raznolikejših opisov slik.', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གཟུགས་རིས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་མ་ལག་ལེན་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཆ་ཁོ་ན་ཐོག་ཏུ་འཇུག་པ In this paper, we consider the production of generic descriptions as a lack of diversity in the output, which we quantify using established metrics and two new metrics that frame image description as a word recall task. བཀོད་རིས་འདིས་ང་ཚོར་མིང་གི་སྐད་རིགས་གྱི་མགོ་ཡི་གྲངས་ཀ་དང་རྩིས་འཁོར་ཐོག་གི་རིམ་པ་ལ་རིམ་ལྟར་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ལ་ ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་འདི་དག་སྤྱད་ནས་སྒྲུབ་པའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་པ་དེ་ཚོགས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་མཐོང་སྣེ་མང་ཤོས་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འགྱུར་བ་སྐྱེས་འདུག ཡིན་ནའང་། གཟུགས་རིག་གི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་མགོ་ཡིག་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་མང་ཙམ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་མིན་པར། ལམ་ལུགས་གཞི་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལས། ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་གུས་མཐུན་ཚད་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་ཁོང་ཚོའི་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དང་ཐོག་སྙད ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐོང་རྒྱས་གཏོང་མཁན་ལ་བར་སྟོང་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ཚད། རྒྱལ་ཁབ་སྔོན་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དེ་ལས་གཞན་དང་མི་འདྲ་བའི་འགྲེལ་བ'}
{'en': 'A Multi-Attention based Neural Network with External Knowledge for Story Ending Predicting Task', 'ar': 'شبكة عصبية متعددة الاهتمامات مع معرفة خارجية لمهمة توقع نهاية القصة', 'es': 'Una red neuronal basada en múltiples atenciones con conocimiento externo para la tarea de predicción del final de la historia', 'fr': "Un réseau de neurones multi-attention avec des connaissances externes pour une tâche de prédiction de fin d'histoire", 'pt': 'Uma rede neural baseada em atenção múltipla com conhecimento externo para tarefa de previsão de final de história', 'hi': 'कहानी समाप्ति पूर्वानुमान कार्य के लिए बाहरी ज्ञान के साथ एक बहु-ध्यान आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'zh': '一本于多神经网络,有外知,以终于事', 'ja': 'ストーリーエンディング予測タスクのための外部知識を備えたマルチアテンションベースのニューラルネットワーク', 'ru': 'Многоаспектная нейронная сеть с внешними знаниями для задачи предсказания конца истории', 'ga': 'Líonra Néarach Ilaird-bhunaithe le hEolas Seachtrach le haghaidh Tasc Tuartha a Chríochnaíonn Scéal', 'ka': 'მრავალური დაახლოების ნეიროლური ქსელი, გარეშე იცნობის გადასრულებელი საქაღალდე', 'el': 'Ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο βασισμένο σε πολλές προσοχές με εξωτερικές γνώσεις για την εργασία πρόβλεψης τέλους ιστορίας', 'hu': 'Többszörös figyelem alapú neurális hálózat külső tudással a történetvégződés előrejelzéséhez', 'it': 'Una rete neurale basata su multi-attenzione con conoscenze esterne per il compito di previsione della fine della storia', 'kk': 'Журналды аяқтау тапсырмасының сыртқы білім үшін көптеген назарлық желіName', 'lt': 'Daugiadėmesis pagrįstas neurologinis tinklas su išorinėmis žiniomis apie istorijų pabaigos prognozavimo užduotis', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റോറി അവസാനിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവുമുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റാള്\u200d ശൃംഖലം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ ഒര', 'mt': 'Netwerk Newrali bbażat fuq ħafna Attenzjonijiet b’Għarfien Estern għal Kompitu ta’ Tbassir tat-Tbassir tal-Story', 'mk': 'Name', 'mn': 'Олон-анхаарал суурилсан мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд түүх төгсгөлийн мэдлэг', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Sieć neuronowa oparta na wielu uwagach z zewnętrzną wiedzą do zakończenia historii', 'sr': 'Multi-Attention bazirana na Neuralnoj mreži sa vanjskim znanjem za zadatak koji završava predviđanje priče', 'ro': 'O rețea neurală bazată pe mai multe atenții cu cunoștințe externe pentru activitatea de predicție a sfârșitului poveștii', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Ett multiuppm채rksamhetsbaserat neuralt n채tverk med extern kunskap f철r att f철ruts채ga uppgiften f철r historieslut', 'ta': 'Comment', 'ms': 'Name', 'so': 'A Multi-Attention based Neural Network with External Knowledge for History Ending', 'ur': 'ایک بہت سی توجه کی بنیادی نیورل نیٹورک (نیورل نیٹورک) کی بیرونی علم کے ساتھ داستان پا رہے ہیں۔', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một mạng thần kinh dựa vào đa chú ý với kiến thức về truyện kết thúc công việc định trước', 'bg': 'Неврална мрежа, базирана на множество внимание, с външни знания за задача за предсказване на края на историята', 'da': 'Et multi-opmærksomhedsbaseret neuralt netværk med ekstern viden til historieslutning forudsigelse opgave', 'nl': 'Een Multi-Attention gebaseerd Neuraal Netwerk met Externe Kennis voor het voorspellen van Verhaal Eind Taak', 'hr': 'Multi-Attention bazirana na Neuralnoj mreži s vanjskim znanjem za zadatak koji završava predviđanje priče', 'de': 'Ein Multi-Attention basiertes neuronales Netzwerk mit externem Wissen für Story End Predicting Task', 'id': 'Jaringan Neural Berdasarkan Multi-Perhatian Dengan Pengetahuan Luar untuk Tugas Memprediksi Akhir Cerita', 'fa': 'Name', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Daşary Ahyrlamak üçin Daşary Bilim bilen Birnäçe-Attünt Taýýarlan', 'ko': '외부 지식을 바탕으로 하는 다주의 신경 네트워크가 이야기의 결말 예측에서의 응용', 'sq': 'Një rrjet nervor me bazë shumëvëmendjeje me njohuri të jashtme për detyrën e parashikimit të fundit të historisë', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Neural yenye ufahamu wa nje kwa ajili ya Kumaliza Hifadhi', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Բազմաուշադրություն ունեցող նյարդային ցանց, որն ունի պատմությունների ավարտին կանխատեսող գործի արտաքին գիտելիքներ', 'az': 'Daha çox-təhlükəsizlik təhlükəsizlik təhlükəsizlik etmək üçün Dışarı Bilən Nöral A ğı', 'bs': 'Mnogo pažnje bazirana na Neuralnoj mreži s vanjskim znanjem za zadatak koji završava predviđanje priče', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'Una xarxa neuronal basada en múltiples atencions amb coneixements externs per a la tasca de predicció final de la història', 'cs': 'Neuronová síť založená na více pozornosti s externími znalostmi pro predikci ukončení příběhu', 'et': 'Mitme tähelepanu põhinev neuraalne võrgustik, millel on välised teadmised lugu lõppemise ennustamise ülesandeks', 'fi': 'Monihuomiopohjainen hermoverkosto, jossa on ulkoista tietoa tarinan pﾃ､ﾃ､ttymistﾃ､ ennakoivaa tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､ varten', 'jv': 'Multi-Attention Bukake Bukake Neral Network nganggo Open knownMonitor kanggo Aku Ending prediking task', 'sk': 'Živčno omrežje, ki temelji na več pozornosti z zunanjim znanjem za predvidevanje konca zgodbe', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'A Multi-Attention based Neural Network with External Knowledge for Story Ending Predicting Task'}
{'en': 'Enabling a mechanism to understand a temporal story and predict its ending is an interesting issue that has attracted considerable attention, as in case of the ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). In this paper, we develop a multi-attention-based neural network (MANN) with well-designed optimizations, like Highway Network, and concatenated features with embedding representations into the hierarchical neural network model. Considering the particulars of the specific task, we thoughtfully extend MANN with external knowledge resources, exceeding state-of-the-art results obviously. Furthermore, we develop a thorough understanding of our model through a careful hand analysis on a subset of the stories. We identify what traits of MANN contribute to its outperformance and how external knowledge is obtained in such an ending prediction task.', 'ar': 'إن تمكين آلية لفهم قصة زمنية والتنبؤ بنهايتها هي قضية مثيرة للاهتمام اجتذبت اهتمامًا كبيرًا ، كما في حالة ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). في هذا البحث ، قمنا بتطوير شبكة عصبية متعددة الاهتمامات (MANN) مع تحسينات جيدة التصميم ، مثل شبكة الطريق السريع ، وميزات متسلسلة مع تمثيلات متضمنة في نموذج الشبكة العصبية الهرمي. بالنظر إلى تفاصيل المهمة المحددة ، قمنا بتوسيع MANN بشكل مدروس بمصادر المعرفة الخارجية ، متجاوزًا أحدث النتائج بشكل واضح. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بتطوير فهم شامل لنموذجنا من خلال تحليل يدوي دقيق لمجموعة فرعية من القصص. نحدد سمات MANN التي تساهم في تفوقها وكيفية الحصول على المعرفة الخارجية في مهمة التنبؤ النهائية هذه.', 'fr': "L'activation d'un mécanisme permettant de comprendre une histoire temporelle et de prédire sa fin est une question intéressante qui a beaucoup retenu l'attention, comme dans le cas de la ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). Dans cet article, nous développons un réseau de neurones multi-attentions (MANN) avec des optimisations bien conçues, comme Highway Network, et des entités concaténées avec des représentations intégrées dans le modèle de réseau neuronal hiérarchique. Compte tenu des particularités de la tâche spécifique, nous étendons soigneusement MANN avec des ressources de connaissances externes, dépassant évidemment les résultats les plus récents. De plus, nous développons une compréhension approfondie de notre modèle grâce à une analyse manuelle minutieuse d'un sous-ensemble d'histoires. Nous identifions les caractéristiques de MANN qui contribuent à sa surperformance et comment les connaissances externes sont obtenues dans le cadre d'une telle tâche de prédiction finale.", 'pt': 'Habilitar um mecanismo para entender uma história temporal e prever seu final é uma questão interessante que tem atraído considerável atenção, como no caso do ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). Neste artigo, desenvolvemos uma rede neural baseada em atenção múltipla (MANN) com otimizações bem projetadas, como Highway Network, e recursos concatenados com representações incorporadas no modelo de rede neural hierárquica. Considerando as particularidades da tarefa específica, estendemos cuidadosamente o MANN com recursos de conhecimento externos, excedendo obviamente os resultados de última geração. Além disso, desenvolvemos uma compreensão completa do nosso modelo por meio de uma análise cuidadosa da mão em um subconjunto das histórias. Identificamos quais características do MANN contribuem para seu desempenho superior e como o conhecimento externo é obtido em tal tarefa de previsão final.', 'es': 'Habilitar un mecanismo para comprender una historia temporal y predecir su final es un tema interesante que ha atraído considerable atención, como en el caso de la Tarea de cierre de historias (SCT) de ROC. En este artículo, desarrollamos una red neuronal basada en múltiples atenciones (MANN) con optimizaciones bien diseñadas, como la red de carreteras, y características concatenadas con representaciones incorporadas en el modelo de red neuronal jerárquica. Teniendo en cuenta los detalles de la tarea específica, ampliamos cuidadosamente MANN con recursos de conocimiento externos, superando obviamente los resultados más avanzados. Además, desarrollamos una comprensión profunda de nuestro modelo a través de un análisis manual cuidadoso de un subconjunto de las historias. Identificamos qué características de MANN contribuyen a su rendimiento superior y cómo se obtiene el conocimiento externo en una tarea de predicción final de este tipo.', 'ja': '時間的なストーリーを理解し、その結末を予測するメカニズムを可能にすることは、ROCストーリークローズタスク（ SCT ）の場合のように、かなりの注目を集めている興味深い問題です。本稿では，ハイウェイネットワークのようなよく設計された最適化と，階層的ニューラルネットワークモデルに表現を埋め込んだ連結された特徴を備えたマルチアテンションベースのニューラルネットワーク（ MANN ）を開発する．特定のタスクの詳細を考慮して、外部の知識リソースでマンを思い切って拡張し、明らかに最先端の結果を超えています。さらに、ストーリーのサブセットについて慎重な手分析を通じて、私たちのモデルの完全な理解を育みます。私たちは、マンのどのような特性がそのパフォーマンスを上回ることに貢献しているか、そしてそのような終了予測タスクで外部知識がどのように得られるかを特定します。', 'zh': '使一机解一时而测其结局为一趣,其大关注,犹ROC故事克洛兹务(SCT)也。 本文开一神经网络(MANN),当神经网络有精心设计之优化,如高速公路网络,及嵌神经网络之类。 念具体任务之细节,深思广MANN外知资源,明过先进。 此外细论故事子集,有以明之。 吾定MANN之所助,及其所终。', 'hi': 'एक अस्थायी कहानी को समझने और इसके अंत की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक तंत्र को सक्षम करना एक दिलचस्प मुद्दा है जिसने काफी ध्यान आकर्षित किया है, जैसा कि आरओसी स्टोरी क्लोज़ टास्क (एससीटी) के मामले में है। इस पेपर में, हम राजमार्ग नेटवर्क जैसे अच्छी तरह से डिज़ाइन किए गए ऑप्टिमाइज़ेशन के साथ एक बहु-ध्यान-आधारित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (MANN) विकसित करते हैं, और पदानुक्रमित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल में एम्बेडिंग अभ्यावेदन के साथ concatenated विशेषताएं। विशिष्ट कार्य के विवरण को ध्यान में रखते हुए, हम सोच-समझकर बाहरी ज्ञान संसाधनों के साथ MANN का विस्तार करते हैं, जो स्पष्ट रूप से अत्याधुनिक परिणामों से अधिक है। इसके अलावा, हम कहानियों के सबसेट पर सावधानीपूर्वक हाथ विश्लेषण के माध्यम से हमारे मॉडल की पूरी तरह से समझ विकसित करते हैं। हम पहचानते हैं कि MANN के कौन से लक्षण इसके आउटपरफॉर्मेंस में योगदान करते हैं और इस तरह के अंत में भविष्यवाणी कार्य में बाहरी ज्ञान कैसे प्राप्त किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Включение механизма для понимания временной истории и прогнозирования ее окончания является интересным вопросом, который привлек значительное внимание, как в случае задачи закрытия истории ROC (SCT). В этой статье мы разрабатываем нейронную сеть на основе множественного внимания (MANN) с хорошо разработанными оптимизациями, такими как Highway Network, и объединенными функциями с представлениями вложений в иерархическую модель нейронной сети. Учитывая особенности конкретной задачи, мы вдумчиво расширяем МАННА внешними ресурсами знаний, явно превосходя современные результаты. Кроме того, мы развиваем глубокое понимание нашей модели посредством тщательного ручного анализа подмножества историй. Мы определяем, какие черты МАННА способствуют его превосходству и как внешние знания получаются в такой конечной задаче прогнозирования.', 'ga': 'Is ceist spéisiúil é meicníocht a chumasú chun scéal ama a thuiscint agus deireadh a chur leis a thuar, rud a tharraing aird nach beag, mar a tharla i gcás Tasc Cloze Story ROC (SCT). Sa pháipéar seo, forbraímid líonra néarach il-aireach-bhunaithe (MANN) le leas iomlán a bhaint dea-dheartha, cosúil le Highway Network, agus gnéithe comhghaolaithe le huiríll a leabú isteach sa mhúnla gréasán néarach ordlathach. Agus sonraí an taisc shonraigh á gcur san áireamh, déanaimid MANN a leathnú go tuisceanach le hacmhainní eolais seachtracha, rud a sháraíonn na torthaí úrscothacha ar ndóigh. Ina theannta sin, forbraimid tuiscint críochnúil ar ár múnla trí anailís láimhe cúramach ar fho-thacar de na scéalta. Aithnímid cad iad na tréithe a bhaineann le MANN a chuireann lena sárfheidhmíocht agus conas a fhaightear eolas seachtrach i dtasc tuar deiridh dá leithéid.', 'ka': 'შესაძლებელია მაქანიზმის გაგრძნობა თავსოფლიო ისტორია და დასაწყება მისი დასასრულება ინტერესოფლიო პრობლემა, როგორც ROC ისტორიის დახურების მოქმედება (SCT). ამ წიგში ჩვენ მრავალური დაახლოებით ნეიროლური ქსელი (MANN) განვითარებთ, როგორც სამართო ქსელი, და სხვადასხვა ფუნქციები იერაქტიკალური ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელში ჩატვირთვალებით და განსაკუთრებული დავალების განსაკუთრებული განსაკუთრებით ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ, რომ MANN-ს გარეშე მეცნიერებით გავუქმედებით, უფრო უფრო მეცნიერების გარეშე. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენი მოდელის მუშაობას განვითარებთ მანძილური ანალიზაციის გამოყენებით ისტორიების სპესტი. ჩვენ განვიცნობით რომელიც MANN-ის განსხვავებები მინდა მისი გარემოქმედებისთვის და როგორ გარემოქმედებისთვის გარემოქმედებისთვის გარემოქმედებისთვის გარემოქმედების მი', 'el': 'Η δυνατότητα σε έναν μηχανισμό να κατανοήσει μια χρονική ιστορία και να προβλέψει το τέλος της είναι ένα ενδιαφέρον ζήτημα που έχει προσελκύσει σημαντική προσοχή, όπως στην περίπτωση της εργασίας Cloze Story (SCT). Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναπτύσσουμε ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο βασισμένο σε πολλαπλή προσοχή (ΜΑΝΝ) με καλά σχεδιασμένες βελτιστοποιήσεις, όπως το δίκτυο εθνικών οδών, και συνδεδεμένα χαρακτηριστικά με ενσωμάτωση αναπαραστάσεων στο ιεραρχικό μοντέλο νευρωνικού δικτύου. Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τις ιδιαιτερότητες του συγκεκριμένου έργου, επεκτείνουμε προσεκτικά το MANN με εξωτερικούς πόρους γνώσης, υπερβαίνοντας προφανώς τα αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας. Επιπλέον, αναπτύσσουμε μια εμπεριστατωμένη κατανόηση του μοντέλου μας μέσα από μια προσεκτική ανάλυση χεριών σε ένα υποσύνολο των ιστοριών. Αναγνωρίζουμε ποια χαρακτηριστικά του συμβάλλουν στην υπεραπόδοση του και πώς αποκτάται εξωτερική γνώση σε μια τέτοια τελική εργασία πρόβλεψης.', 'hu': 'Egy mechanizmus lehetővé tétele egy időbeli történet megértésére és megjósolására egy érdekes kérdés, amely jelentős figyelmet keltett, mint a ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT) esetében. Ebben a tanulmányban egy több figyelem alapú neurális hálózatot (MANN) fejlesztünk ki jól megtervezett optimalizálásokkal, mint például a Highway Network, és összekapcsolt funkciókkal a hierarchikus neurális hálózat modelljébe ágyazó reprezentációkkal. Az adott feladat sajátosságait figyelembe véve gondosan kiterjesztjük a MANN-t külső tudási erőforrásokkal, nyilvánvalóan meghaladva a korszerű eredményeket. Ezenkívül modellünk alapos megértését a történetek egy részhalmazának gondos kézi elemzésével fejlesztjük ki. Meghatározzuk, hogy a MANN milyen tulajdonságai járulnak hozzá a túlteljesítményéhez és hogyan szerezhetők meg külső ismeretek egy ilyen befejező előrejelzési feladat során.', 'it': "Abilitare un meccanismo per comprendere una storia temporale e prevederne la fine è un tema interessante che ha attirato notevole attenzione, come nel caso del ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). In questo articolo, sviluppiamo una rete neurale multi-attenzione-based (MANN) con ottimizzazioni ben progettate, come Highway Network, e funzionalità concatenate con rappresentazioni incorporate nel modello di rete neurale gerarchica. Considerando i particolari del compito specifico, estendiamo attentamente MANN con risorse di conoscenza esterne, superando ovviamente i risultati all'avanguardia. Inoltre, sviluppiamo una comprensione approfondita del nostro modello attraverso un'attenta analisi manuale su un sottoinsieme delle storie. Identifichiamo quali caratteristiche di MANN contribuiscono alla sua sovraperformance e come la conoscenza esterna viene ottenuta in un compito di previsione finale.", 'kk': 'Уақытша оқиғаны түсіну және соңғысын алдын алау механизмін рұқсат ету - ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT) сияқты қызықша мәселе. Бұл қағазда біз көп назарды негізделген невралды желі (MANN) жақсы құрылған оптимизациялармен, Highway Network секілді, және иерархикалық невралды желінің моделіне ендіру үлгілерімен біріктірілген мүмкіндіктерді жасап жаты Біз нақты тапсырманың бөлігін қарастырып, MANN-ді сыртқы білім ресурстарымен кеңейту үшін, өзгертілген жағдайдың нәтижелерінен артық. Қосымша, біз моделіміздің түсініктерін оқиғалардың бір бөлігінде тәжірибелі анализ арқылы түсінікті құрамыз. Біз МАНН қандай мүмкіндіктері оның шығармашылығына көмектесетін және оның сыртқы білім қандай болып табылады деп анықтаймыз.', 'ms': 'Membenarkan mekanisme untuk memahami cerita sementara dan meramalkan akhirnya adalah isu yang menarik perhatian yang besar, seperti dalam kes Tugas Tutup Cerita ROC (SCT). Dalam kertas ini, kami mengembangkan rangkaian saraf berasaskan perhatian berbilang (MANN) dengan optimasi yang direka dengan baik, seperti Rangkaian Jalan Jalan Jalan, dan ciri-ciri yang bersamaan dengan memasukkan perwakilan ke dalam model rangkaian saraf hierarkik. Mengingat perincian tugas khusus, kami dengan fikiran memperluas MANN dengan sumber pengetahuan luaran, melebihi keputusan-keputusan terbaik jelas. Furthermore, we develop a thorough understanding of our model through a careful hand analysis on a subset of the stories.  Kami mengenalpasti apa ciri-ciri MANN menyumbang kepada prestasinya dan bagaimana pengetahuan luar diperoleh dalam tugas ramalan akhir.', 'mk': 'Овозможувањето на механизмот за разбирање на температурната приказна и предвидување на нејзиниот крај е интересно прашање кое привлече значително внимание, како во случајот на ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). Во овој документ, развиваме нервна мрежа базирана на повеќето внимание (MANN) со добро дизајнирани оптимизации, како што е автопатската мрежа, и концентрирани карактеристики со вградување на претставувања во хиерархичниот нервен мрежен модел. Со оглед на деталите на специфичната задача, размислуваме да го продолжиме МАНН со надворешни ресурси на знаење, надминувајќи ги најсовремените резултати очигледно. Покрај тоа, развиваме темелно разбирање на нашиот модел преку внимателна рачна анализа на подгрупа приказни. We identify what traits of MANN contribute to its outperformance and how external knowledge is obtained in such an ending prediction task.', 'ml': 'ഒരു നേരിട്ട കഥ മനസ്സിലാക്കാനും അവസാനം പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കാനും ഒരു സാധ്യതയ്ക്ക് പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ആശ്ചര്യമായ കാര്യമാണ്. റോസി സ്റ്റോറി  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d നല്ല നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. ഹൈഹ്വേ നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d പ പ്രത്യേക പ്രത്യേക ജോലിയുടെ പ്രത്യേക വിധികളെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആലോചിച്ചു നോക്കുന്നു, പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവുകള്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട Furthermore, we develop a thorough understanding of our model through a careful hand analysis on a subset of the stories.  മനുഷ്യന്റെ പ്രകടനത്തില്\u200d എന്ത് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നുവെന്നും പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവ് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ലഭിക്കുന്നതെന്നും നമുക്', 'mn': 'Цагаан түүхийг ойлгох механизмийг ашиглаж, төгсгөлийг тодорхойлох нь үнэхээр сонирхолтой асуудал юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (MANN) бүтээж, Highway Network шиг сайн зохион байгуулагддаг. Мөн олон анхаарлын төвөгтэй мэдрэлийн сүлжээний загвар руу илэрхийллийг оруулж байдаг. Яг тодорхой ажлын тодорхой тодорхойлолтуудын тухай бодоход бид МАНН-г гадаад мэдлэгтэй баялаг нэмэгдүүлж, урлагийн үр дүнээс илүү тодорхой байдаг. Мөн бид өөрсдийн загварын тухай бодит ойлголтыг түүхийн хэсгүүд дээр анхаарлын гарын шинжилгээс ашиглаж байна. Бид МАННХ-ын чадваруудын үр дүнд хэрхэн нөлөөлдөг болон гадаад мэдлэг хэрхэн гарч ирдэг талаар мэднэ.', 'no': 'Slå på ein mekanisme for å forstå ein tidlegare historie og forventa at slutten er eit interessant problem som har attrakta mykje oppmerksomhet, som i tilfelle for ROC Story Close Task (SCT). I denne papiret utviklar vi eit fleire oppmerksomhetsbasert neuralnettverk (MANN) med godt utvikla optimizasjonar, som Highway Network, og samsvarte funksjonar med innbygging av representasjonar i hierarkisk neuralnettverksmodellen. I tillegg til detaljane til den spesifikke oppgåva, utvidar vi MANN med eksterne kunnskapsressursar, men det er tydelig oversikt av kunnskapsresultatet. I tillegg utviklar vi ein grunnleggjande forståelse av modellen vårt gjennom ein forstårlig håndanalyse på ein undertekst av historiane. Vi identifiserer kva egenskaper av MANN bidra til utviklinga sin og korleis eksterne kunnskap vert henta i slik ein sluttforhåndsvising oppgåve.', 'lt': 'Įgalinti mechanizmą suprasti laikiną istoriją ir prognozuoti jos pabaigą yra įdomus klausimas, kuris pritraukė didelį dėmesį, kaip ir ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). In this paper, we develop a multi-attention-based neural network (MANN) with well-designed optimizations, like Highway Network, and concatenated features with embedding representations into the hierarchical neural network model.  Atsižvelgdami į konkrečios užduoties detales, apgalvotai išplėsime MANN išorės žinių ištekliais, akivaizdžiai viršijant naujausius rezultatus. Be to, mes plėtojame išsamų mūsų modelio supratimą atlikdami kruopščią rankų analizę apie istorijų pogrupį. Nustatome, kokios MANN savybės prisideda prie jos veiklos rezultatų ir kaip išorės žinios gaunamos atliekant tokią galutinę prognozavimo užduotį.', 'pl': 'Umożliwienie mechanizmowi zrozumienia historii czasowej i przewidywania jej zakończenia jest interesującym zagadnieniem, które przyciągnęło dużą uwagę, jak w przypadku ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). W niniejszym artykule opracowujemy sieć neuronową opartą na wielu uwagach (MANN) z dobrze zaprojektowanymi optymalizacjami, takimi jak Highway Network, i połączonymi funkcjami z osadzeniem reprezentacji w hierarchicznym modelu sieci neuronowej. Biorąc pod uwagę szczegóły konkretnego zadania, przemyślanie poszerzamy MANN o zewnętrzne zasoby wiedzy, oczywiście przekraczając najnowocześniejsze wyniki. Ponadto rozwijamy dokładne zrozumienie naszego modelu poprzez dokładną analizę ręki na podzbiorze opowieści. Identyfikujemy, jakie cechy MANN przyczyniają się do jego wydajności i w jaki sposób uzyskuje się wiedzę zewnętrzną w tak końcowym zadaniu predykcyjnym.', 'sr': 'Uključujući mehanizam razumevanja privremene priče i predviđati njegov kraj je zanimljiv problem koji je privukao značajnu pažnju, kao u slučaju zadatka zatvaranja priče ROC (SCT). U ovom papiru razvijamo višestruku pažnju baziranu na neuralnoj mreži (MANN) sa dobro dizajniranim optimizacijama, poput Highway Network, i povezanim karakteristikama sa ugrađenim predstavljanjem u hijerarhički neuralnu mrežu. S obzirom na detalje posebnog zadatka, mislili smo da produžimo MANN sa vanjskim resursima znanja, očigledno preko rezultata umetnosti. Osim toga, razvijamo temeljno razumijevanje našeg model a kroz pažljivu analizu ruke na podskupu priče. Identificiramo kakve ličnosti MANN doprinose njenoj nesposobnosti i kako se eksterno znanje dobija u takvom krajnjem predviđanju zadatku.', 'ro': 'Permiterea unui mecanism de a înțelege o poveste temporală și de a prezice sfârșitul acesteia este o problemă interesantă care a atras atenție considerabilă, ca în cazul ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). În această lucrare, dezvoltăm o rețea neurală bazată pe mai multe atenții (MANN) cu optimizări bine proiectate, cum ar fi Highway Network, și caracteristici concatenate cu reprezentări încorporate în modelul de rețea neurală ierarhică. Având în vedere particularitățile sarcinii specifice, extindem atent MANN cu resurse externe de cunoaștere, depășind evident rezultatele de ultimă generație. În plus, dezvoltăm o înțelegere aprofundată a modelului nostru printr-o analiză atentă a mâinii pe un subset al poveștilor. Identificăm ce trăsături ale MANN contribuie la depășirea performanței sale și modul în care cunoștințele externe sunt obținute într-o astfel de sarcină de predicție finală.', 'si': 'කාලකාල කතාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න සැකසුම් සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න සහ ඒකේ අවසානය අවස්ථාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න, ROC කතාවක් වහ මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ගොඩක් අවධානයක් අධිකාරිත න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (MANN) විශේෂ කරනවා හොඳ විද්\u200dයාපිත විශ්වාස කරන්න, හරියට හායිවේය ජාලය වග විශේෂ වැඩක් ගැන විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වැඩක් ගැන බලන්න, අපි හිතන්නේ MANN විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ වි තවත්, අපි අපේ මොඩල් ගැන හොඳ තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් කතාවල් සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂනයක් විස්තර කරන්න. අපි MANN ගේ විශේෂතාවන් මොකක්ද ඒකේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් සහ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය', 'so': 'Qoriga awoodda mekaniisada in lagu fahamo sheeko waqti ah oo uu ka hor dhigo dhammaadkeeda waa arin xiiso leh oo aad u xiiseyso, sida xaalada shaqada ROC Story Cloze (SCT). Warqadan, waxaynu horumarinnaa shabakad neurada ah oo aad u fiirsan karto, sida Highway Network, iyo xariijiyo xuquuqyo ah oo ku qoran noocyada shabakadda neurada ee hierarchical neurada. Sidaan ka fiirsanayno khaas ahaan shaqada gaarka ah, waxaannu si wanaagsan ugu fiirsanaynaa MANDA, waxaan ku fidinaynaa macluumaad aqoonta dibadda ah, si bayaan ah ugu badnaan xaaladda farshaxanka. Furthermore, waxaynu horumarinaa waxgarasho aad u fiican tusaalkanaga, baaritaanka gacanta si taxadar ah oo ka kooban sheekooyinka. Waxaynu ogaanaynaa xumaatooyinka uu MANUMAN ku faa’iideynayo horumarinta iyo siduu aqoonta dibadda ugu helayo shaqada u dhamaadka ka hor dhigidda.', 'sv': 'Att möjliggöra en mekanism för att förstå en tidsberättelse och förutsäga dess slut är en intressant fråga som har väckt stor uppmärksamhet, som i fallet med ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). I denna uppsats utvecklar vi ett multi-uppmärksamhet-baserat neuralt nätverk (MANN) med väldesignade optimeringar, som Highway Network, och sammanlänkade funktioner med inbäddade representationer i den hierarkiska neurala nätverksmodellen. Med tanke på detaljerna i den specifika uppgiften utökar vi noggrant MANN med externa kunskapsresurser, vilket naturligtvis överskrider de senaste resultaten. Dessutom utvecklar vi en grundlig förståelse för vår modell genom en noggrann handanalys på en delmängd av berättelserna. Vi identifierar vilka egenskaper hos MANN bidrar till dess övertagande och hur extern kunskap erhålls i en sådan slutförutsägelseuppgift.', 'ur': 'ایک مکانیسم کو فعال کرنے اور اس کی پایان کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے ایک مکانیسم کا اختیار کرنا ایک جالب مسئلہ ہے جس نے بہت اچھی توجه کو اٹھایا ہے، جیسے ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT) کے مطابق۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک بہت سی توجه کی بنیادی نیورل نیٹورک (MANN) کو اچھی طرح طرح کیا گیا ہے، جیسے ہیوی نیٹورک، اور یورررشیک نیورل نیٹورک موڈل میں نمونٹ کے مطابق نمونٹ کے مطابق مشترک فائولوں کے ساتھ تخلیق کریں ہم نے انسان کو بیرون علم کے منبع سے پھیلایا ہے، صریح طریقے سے بہت زیادہ شرکت کے نتائج سے۔ اور ہم نے اپنی مدل کا ایک عمدہ سمجھ پیدا کیا ہے تاریخ کے ایک سپٹ کے ذریعے ایک دقت ہاتھ تحلیل کے ذریعے۔ ہم جانتے ہیں کہ انسان کی کس گواہی اس کے اعمال میں اضافہ کرتی ہے اور کس طرح خارج علم حاصل ہوتی ہے اس طرح کی انتظام کی کوشش میں۔', 'ta': 'ஒரு முறைமை செயல்படுத்துவது ஒரு தற்காலிக கதையை புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் மற்றும் அதன் முடிவு முடிவு என்பது ஒரு சுவாரஸ்யமான பிரச்சனையாகும், அது  இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் நன்றாக வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட முன்னேற்றங்களுடன் பல கவனத்திற்கு அடிப்படையான புதிய வலைப்பின்னலை உருவாக்குகிறோம், ஹைஹ்வே வலைப்பின்னல் போன்ற குறிப்பிட்ட பணியின் குறிப்பிட்ட சிறப்புகளை கருத்து, நாம் சிந்தித்து மனிதனை வெளிப்புற அறிவு மூலங்களுடன் விரிவாக்குகிறோ மேலும், கதைகளின் கழுத்தில் ஒரு கவனமான கையை ஆராய்ச்சி மூலம் நாம் எங்கள் மாதிரியை முழுமையான புரிந்து கொள்ளும நாம் மனிதனின் பிரச்சனைகள் அதன் வெளியீட்டிற்கு பங்கு செய்வது என்ன என்பதை கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் வெளிப்புற அறிவ', 'mt': 'Il-possibbiltà li mekkaniżmu jifhem storja temporali u jipprevedi t-tmiem tagħha hija kwistjoni interessanti li attirat attenzjoni konsiderevoli, bħal fil-każ tal-Ħidma ROC Story Cloze (SCT). In this paper, we develop a multi-attention-based neural network (MANN) with well-designed optimizations, like Highway Network, and concatenated features with embedding representations into the hierarchical neural network model.  Considering the particulars of the specific task, we thoughtfully extend MANN with external knowledge resources, exceeding state-of-the-art results obviously.  Barra minn hekk, a ħna niżviluppaw fehim bir-reqqa tal-mudell tagħna permezz ta’ analiżi bir-reqqa tal-idejn fuq sottosett tal-istoriji. Aħna nidentifikaw liema karatteristiċi ta’ MANN jikkontribwixxu għall-prestazzjoni eċċessiva tagħha u kif l-għarfien estern jinkiseb f’kompitu ta’ tbassir li jintemm bħal dan.', 'uz': "Vaqtincha tarixini o'rganish va uning oxirini taqdim qilish juda qiziqarli muammo, va ROC Story Vazifa (SCT) haqida juda qiziqarli muammo beradi. Bu qogʻozda, biz bir necha muhit nazar tarmoqni (MANN) yaratishmiz, huddi Highway Network kabi o'xshash o'ylangan optimiz bilan, va bir xil tarmoqni bir xil qo'llab tarmoqni o'rganamiz va bir xil tarmoq modelidagi xususiyatlarni birlashtiradi. Maxsus vazifaning xossalarini tasavvur qilib, biz MANH tashqi илм Resource bilan ko'paytirishni o'ylaymiz, o'sha shaxsiy narsalar natijada ko'proq. Ko'rsatganda, biz modelimizni juda muhimi tushunishni o'rganamiz va hikoyalarning tub qismlariga taqlab qo'llab analyzer bilan. Biz inson tashkilotlarini tashkilotga qanday qilishini anglatamiz va tashkilotni qanday kutilgan vazifa bilan qanday olib keladi.", 'vi': 'Cho phép một cơ chế hiểu một câu chuyện thời gian và đoán được kết thúc của nó là một vấn đề thú vị đã thu hút được sự chú ý đáng kể, như trong vụ quần áo ROC (SCT). Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi phát triển một mạng thần kinh đa tập trung với thiết kế cẩn thận, như mạng đường cao tốc, và các tính năng được gắn kết với sự tham chiếu vào mô hình mạng thần kinh phân cấp. Dựa theo các chi tiết của nhiệm vụ cụ thể, chúng ta đã nghĩ tới việc mở rộng Cơ quan Kiến thức bên ngoài, vượt quá giới hạn hiện đại. Chúng tôi phát triển một sự hiểu biết sâu sắc về mô hình của chúng tôi qua một cuộc phân tích cẩn thận trên một nhóm các câu chuyện. Chúng tôi xác định các đặc điểm của kênh WN để phát triển thành quả và cách thức thức mà những kiến thức bên ngoài có được trong nhiệm vụ dự đoán cuối cùng này.', 'bg': 'Разрешаването на механизъм за разбиране на времева история и предсказване на нейния край е интересен въпрос, който привлича значително внимание, както в случая със задачата за клозе на история на ROC (SCT). В тази статия разработваме невронна мрежа, базирана на множество внимание (МАНН), с добре проектирани оптимизации, като магистрална мрежа, и обединени функции с вграждане на представителства в йерархичния модел на невронна мрежа. Като се имат предвид особеностите на конкретната задача, ние внимателно разширяваме МАНН с външни ресурси на знания, надхвърляйки очевидно най-съвременните резултати. Освен това, ние развиваме задълбочено разбиране на нашия модел чрез внимателен ръчен анализ на поднабор от истории. Идентифицираме какви черти на МАНН допринасят за нейното превъзходство и как се получават външни знания при такава крайна задача за предсказване.', 'nl': "Een mechanisme in staat stellen om een temporeel verhaal te begrijpen en het einde ervan te voorspellen is een interessant onderwerp dat veel aandacht heeft getrokken, zoals in het geval van de ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). In dit artikel ontwikkelen we een multi-attention-based neural network (MANN) met goed ontworpen optimalisaties, zoals Highway Network, en aaneengesloten functies met inbedding representaties in het hiërarchische neurale netwerkmodel. Gezien de bijzonderheden van de specifieke taak breiden we MANN zorgvuldig uit met externe kennisbronnen, wat uiteraard de state-of-the-art resultaten overtreft. Verder ontwikkelen we een grondig begrip van ons model door een zorgvuldige hand analyse op een subset van de verhalen. We identificeren welke eigenschappen van MANN bijdragen aan zijn outperformance en hoe externe kennis wordt verkregen in zo'n eindigende voorspellingstak.", 'da': 'At muliggøre en mekanisme til at forstå en tidslig historie og forudsige dens slutning er et interessant spørgsmål, der har tiltrukket betydelig opmærksomhed, som i tilfælde af ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). I denne artikel udvikler vi et multi-opmærksomhedsbaseret neuralt netværk (MANN) med veldesignede optimeringer, som Highway Network, og sammenkoblede funktioner med integrering af repræsentationer i den hierarkiske neurale netværksmodel. I betragtning af de særlige forhold ved den specifikke opgave udvider vi eftertænkt MANN med eksterne videnressourcer, hvilket naturligvis overstiger state-of-the-art resultater. Desuden udvikler vi en grundig forståelse af vores model gennem en omhyggelig håndanalyse på en del af historierne. Vi identificerer, hvilke træk ved MANN bidrager til dets outperformance, og hvordan ekstern viden opnås i en sådan sluttende forudsigelsesopgave.', 'de': 'Ein Mechanismus zu ermöglichen, eine temporale Geschichte zu verstehen und ihr Ende vorherzusagen, ist ein interessantes Thema, das beachtliche Aufmerksamkeit erregt hat, wie im Falle der ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). In diesem Beitrag entwickeln wir ein Multi-Aufmerksamkeits-basiertes neuronales Netzwerk (MANN) mit gut gestalteten Optimierungen, wie Highway Network, und verketteten Features mit Einbettung von Repräsentationen in das hierarchische neuronale Netzwerkmodell. Unter Berücksichtigung der Besonderheiten der jeweiligen Aufgabe erweitern wir MANN mit Bedacht um externe Wissensressourcen und übertreffen dabei selbstverständlich die aktuellen Ergebnisse. Darüber hinaus entwickeln wir ein gründliches Verständnis unseres Modells durch eine sorgfältige Handanalyse einer Teilmenge der Geschichten. Wir identifizieren, welche Eigenschaften von MANN zu seiner Outperformance beitragen und wie externes Wissen in einer solchen abschließenden Vorhersageaufgabe gewonnen wird.', 'id': 'Membenarkan mekanisme untuk memahami cerita sementara dan memprediksi akhirnya adalah masalah yang menarik perhatian yang besar, seperti dalam kasus ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). Dalam kertas ini, kami mengembangkan jaringan saraf berbasis perhatian-berbeda (MANN) dengan optimisasi yang direncanakan dengan baik, seperti jaringan jalan raya, dan fitur yang terkait dengan memasukkan representati ke model jaringan saraf hierarkis. Mengingat rincian dari tugas spesifik, kami berpikir memperluas MANN dengan sumber pengetahuan luar, melebihi hasil terbaik jelas. Furthermore, we develop a thorough understanding of our model through a careful hand analysis on a subset of the stories.  Kami mengidentifikasi sifat-sifat MANN yang berkontribusi pada prestasinya dan bagaimana pengetahuan luar diperoleh dalam tugas prediksi akhir.', 'hr': 'Uključujući mehanizam razumijevanja privremene priče i predvidjeti kraj njega je zanimljiv problem koji je privukao značajnu pažnju, kao što je u slučaju zadatka zatvaranja priče ROC (SCT). U ovom papiru razvijamo višepozornu neuralnu mrežu (MANN) sa dobro dizajniranim optimizacijama, poput Highway Network, i potvrđenim karakteristikama sa uključenim predstavljanjem u hijerarhički model neuralne mreže. S obzirom na detalje određenog zadatka, razmišljamo produžavamo MANN s vanjskim resursima znanja, očigledno preko rezultata stanja umjetnosti. Osim toga, razvijamo temeljno razumijevanje našeg model a kroz pažljivu analizu ruke na podskupu priče. Identificiramo koje osobine MANN-a doprinose njenoj neisposobnosti i kako se vanjske znanje dobije u takvom krajnjem predviđanju zadatku.', 'fa': 'فعال کردن یک مکانیسم برای فهمیدن یک داستان موقتی و پیش بینی کردن پایان آن یک مسئله جالبی است که توجه بسیار زیادی را جذب کرده است، همانند در مورد مسئله قطع داستان ROC (SCT). در این کاغذ، ما یک شبکه عصبی (MANN) بسیار متمرکز توجه می\u200cکنیم با بهترین طراحی\u200cهای خوب، مانند شبکه بزرگراه، و ویژگی\u200cهای متمرکز با توجه نمایش\u200cهایی در مدل شبکه عصبی الکتریکی، توسعه می\u200cکنیم. با توجه به جزئیات این کار خاص، ما فکر می\u200cکردیم MANN را با منابع دانش خارجی گسترش دهیم، زیادی از نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری مشخص است. علاوه بر این، ما یک درک کامل از مدل خود را با یک تحلیل دستی دقت در یک زیر زیر داستان توسعه می کنیم. ما مشخص می\u200cکنیم که چگونه ویژه\u200cهای MANN به عملکرد خارجی و چگونه دانش خارجی در این کار پیش\u200cبینی پایان می\u200cیابد.', 'sw': 'Kuwezesha mfumo wa kuelewa hadithi ya muda na kutabiri mwisho wake ni suala la kuvutia lililovutia mtazamo mkubwa, kama inavyohusu kazi ya Story Cloze ya ROC (SCT). Katika karatasi hii, tunatengeneza mtandao wa neura yenye msingi wa kutangaza zaidi (MANN) wenye optimizi zilizoundwa vizuri, kama vile Mtandao wa Highway, na vipengele vilivyo pamoja na kuweka maonesho katika mitandao ya kijamii. Kuzingatia mahususi ya kazi hiyo, tunawaza kuongeza MANI kwa rasilimali za ufahamu wa nje, na kwa hakika utaratibu mkubwa wa matokeo ya sanaa. Zaidi ya hayo, tunajenga uelewa wa kina wa muundo wetu kwa kupitia uchambuzi wa kiganjani wa mkono wa habari. We identify what traits of MANN contribute to its outperformance and how external knowledge is obtained in such an ending prediction task.', 'sq': 'Aktivizimi i një mekanizmi për të kuptuar një histori të përkohshme dhe parashikuar përfundimin e saj është një çështje interesante që ka tërhequr vëmendje të konsiderueshme, si në rastin e Detyrës së mbylljes së tregimeve ROC (SCT). Në këtë letër, ne zhvillojmë një rrjet nervor të bazuar në shumë vëmendje (MANN) me optimizata të projektuara mirë, si rrjeti i autostradës, dhe karakteristika të përbashkëta me përfaqësime të përfshirjes në modelin hierarkik të rrjetit nervor. Duke konsideruar detajet e detyrës së veçantë, ne me mendje zgjerojmë MANN me burime të jashtme të njohurive, duke kapërcyer rezultatet më të larta të qarta. Furthermore, we develop a thorough understanding of our model through a careful hand analysis on a subset of the stories.  Ne identifikojmë se cilat llogari të MANN-it kontribuojnë në performancën e saj dhe se si arrihet njohuria e jashtme në një detyrë të tillë parashikimi përfundimtar.', 'tr': "Zaman hekaýany düşünmek we soňunyň üstüne düşürmek üçin mekanizmany etmäge mümkin edip, ROC Hikaya Cloze Task (SCT) ýaly. Bu kagyzda, biz birnäçe üns daşarylan näyral şebeke (MANN), gowy tassyklanan optimizasyyla, ýokaryk şebeke ýaly, we hijerarşik näyral şebeke düzümlenmeleri bilen birleşmiş özellikleri geliştirdik. Aýratyn takyk zadyň hasaplaryny düşünýän bolsa, biz MANN'i daşaryk bilgi çeşmeleri bilen uzatlaşdyryp bilýäris, möhüm sanat netijesinden has baglanyp ýok. Mundan hem, nusgymyzyň düýpüni hekaýalaryň bir bölegi bilen ünsli el analyzasyny ýüze çykarýarys. Biz MANN hasaplarynyň netijesine nähili ukyplaryny tanaýarýarys we daşarydaky bilim nähili ýüze çykyp bilen tanaýarýarys.", 'af': "Aktiveer 'n mekanisme om 'n tydelike storie te verstaan en voorskou sy einde is 'n interessante probleem wat aandagbaar aandag aantrek het, soos in geval van die ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). In hierdie papier ontwikkel ons 'n multi-aandag-gebaseerde neuralnetwerk (MANN) met goed-ontwerp optimalisasies, soos Highway Network, en samelekteerde funksies met inbêring van voorstellings in die hierarkies neuralnetwerk model. Om die gedeeltes van die spesifieke taak te besluit, het ons gedagtig MANN met eksterne kennis hulpbronne uitgebrei, oorvloedige status-of-kuns resultate duidelik. Ons ontwikkel ook 'n groot verstanding van ons model deur 'n versigtige hand analisie op 'n onderwerp van die stories. Ons identifiseer watter eienskappe van MANN bydra aan sy buitekantwerp en hoe eksterne kennis ontvang word in so 'n einde voorskou taak.", 'am': 'በጊዜው ታሪክ ለማስተዋል እና ፍጻሜውን ለመቀበል የሚያስፈልገው የአማረ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ እንደሀይሄዌ መረብ እና በተመሳሳይ የብዙዎችን የናውሬዎችን መረብ (MANN) እናደርጋለን፡፡ Considering the particulars of the specific task, we thoughtfully extend MANN with external knowledge resources, exceeding state-of-the-art results obviously.  በተጨማሪም፣ የዓይነታችንን ማስተዋል በታዋቂው ታሪክ አካባቢ ላይ አስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሰው ጉዳይ የውጭ እውቀት እንዴት እንዲያገኝ እናውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Ժամանակական պատմություն հասկանալու և դրա ավարտին կանխատեսելու մեխանիզմի հնարավորությունը հետաքրքիր խնդիր է, որը շատ ուշադրություն է դարձրել, ինչպիսին է ROC պատմություն Close-ի (ՍՔԹ) խնդիրը: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք զարգանում ենք բազմաուշադրության հիմնված նյարդային ցանց (MANN), որը լավ նախագծված է օպտիմացիաներով, ինչպիսիք են Հայթևեյի ցանցը, և համընդհանուր հատկություններ ներառելով հիերարխիկ նյարդային ցանցի մոդելը: Եթե հաշվի առնենք մասնավոր խնդրի մասնավորությունները, մենք մտածելով ընդլայնում ենք MAN-ը արտաքին գիտելիքների ռեսուրսներով, որոնք ակնհայտորեն գերազանցում են ամենաբարձր արդյունքները: Ավելին, մենք զարգացնում ենք մեր մոդելի հիմնական հասկացությունը՝ զգույշ ձեռքի վերլուծության միջոցով պատմությունների մի ենթախումբի մասին: We identify what traits of MANN contribute to its outperformance and how external knowledge is obtained in such an ending prediction task.', 'bs': 'Uključujući mehanizam razumijevanja privremene priče i predviđati da je kraj njega zanimljiv problem koji je privukao značajnu pažnju, kao i u slučaju zadatka zatvaranja priče ROC (SCT). U ovom papiru razvijamo višepažnju baziranu neuralnu mrežu (MANN) sa dobro dizajniranim optimizacijama, poput Highway Network, i povezanim karakteristikama sa ugrađenim predstavljanjem u hijerarhički neuralnu mrežu. S obzirom na detalje određenog zadatka, mislili smo da produžimo MANN sa vanjskim resursima znanja, očigledno preko stanja umjetnosti rezultata. Osim toga, razvijamo temeljno razumijevanje našeg model a kroz pažljivu analizu ruke na podskupu priče. Identificiramo kakve ličnosti MANN doprinose njenoj iznimnoj učinki i kako se eksterno znanje dobije u takvom zadatku za kraj predviđanja.', 'az': "Dərgahlı hekayəni anlamaq və sonunu öyrənmək üçün mehanizmini fəallaşdırmaq, ROC Hikayələri Cloze Taski (SCT) kimi çox maraqlı bir məsələdir. Bu kağıtda çoxlu təsirli nöral şəbəkəsi (MANN) yaratdıq. Highway Network kimi yaxşı təmizlənmiş optimizasiyalar və hiyerarşik nöral şəbəkə modelinin içində mövcuddur. Özünün məxluqatının qismətlərini düşündük ki, MANN'i dış bilgi kaynaqları ilə genişləyirik, sanat sonuçlarından çox açıq-aydın. Daha sonra, hekayələrin bir hissəsində dikkatli əl analizi vasitəsilə modelimizi tamamilə anlayışımızı təhsil edirik. Biz MANN özelliklərinin necə yaratdığını və böyük sonsuz tədbir işində necə aşkar bilgi alındığını tanıyırıq.", 'ko': '하나의 메커니즘이 하나의 시제 이야기를 이해하고 그 결말을 예측할 수 있도록 하는 것은 흥미로운 문제로 이미 상당히 많은 관심을 끌었다. 예를 들어 ROC 이야기 완형 빈칸 채우기 임무(SCT) 등이다.본고에서 우리는 다중 주의를 바탕으로 하는 신경 네트워크(MANN)를 개발했는데 이것은 정성스럽게 설계된 최적화 기능을 가진다. 예를 들어 고속도로 네트워크와 삽입된 표현을 가진 특징을 층신경 네트워크 모델에 연결시킨다.구체적인 임무의 구체적 상황을 고려하여 우리는 외부 지식자원을 심사숙고하여 MANN을 확장하여 최신 성과를 현저히 뛰어넘었다.그 밖에 우리는 이야기 서브집에 대한 세밀한 수공 분석을 통해 우리의 모델에 대해 투철하게 이해했다.우리는 MANN의 어떤 특징이 그 활약에 도움이 되는지, 그리고 이러한 최종 예측 임무에서 외부 지식을 어떻게 얻는지 확정했다.', 'cs': 'Umožnění mechanismu porozumět časovému příběhu a předpovědět jeho konci je zajímavým problémem, který zaujal značnou pozornost, jako v případě ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). V tomto článku vyvíjíme multi-pozornost-based neuronovou síť (MANN) s dobře navrženými optimalizacemi, jako je Highway Network, a řetězenými funkcemi s vložením reprezentací do hierarchického modelu neuronové sítě. S ohledem na specifika konkrétního úkolu rozšiřujeme MANN o externí znalostní zdroje, což samozřejmě překračuje nejmodernější výsledky. Dále rozvíjíme důkladné porozumění našemu modelu prostřednictvím pečlivé ruční analýzy na podmnožině příběhů. Identifikujeme, jaké vlastnosti MANN přispívají k jeho výkonu a jak jsou získány externí znalosti v takovém ukončení predikčního úkolu.', 'et': 'Mehhanismi võimaldamine mõista ajalugu ja ennustada selle lõppu on huvitav teema, mis on pälvinud märkimisväärset tähelepanu, nagu ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT) puhul. Käesolevas töös töötame välja mitme tähelepanu-põhise närvivõrgu (MANN), millel on hästi disainitud optimeerimised, nagu Highway Network, ja ühendatud funktsioonid, mis sisaldavad esitusi hierarhilisse närvivõrgu mudelisse. Võttes arvesse konkreetse ülesande eripärasid, laiendame MANNi mõtlevalt väliste teadmiste ressurssidega, ületades ilmselgelt kaasaegseid tulemusi. Lisaks arendame põhjalikku arusaamist oma mudelist läbi hoolika käsitsi analüüsi lugude alamhulgast. Me selgitame välja, millised MANNi tunnused aitavad kaasa selle tulemuslikkusele ja kuidas saadakse välised teadmised sellise lõppeva ennustamisülesande käigus.', 'ca': "Activar un mecanisme per entendre una història temporal i predir el seu final és un tema interessant que ha atragit molta atenció, com en el cas de la tasca ROC Story Cloze (SCT). En aquest paper, desenvolupem una xarxa neural basada en molta atenció (MANN) amb optimitzacions ben dissenyades, com la xarxa d'autopistes, i característiques concatenades amb l'incorporació de representacions al model jeràrquic de xarxa neural. Tenint en compte els detalls de la tasca específica, estendem pensadament MANN amb recursos externs de coneixement, superant obviament els resultats més avançats. A més, desenvolupem una comprensió detallada del nostre model a través d'una anàlisi cuidadosa de mà sobre un subconjunt de les històries. Identifiquem quins trets de MANN contribueixen al seu desempeny superior i com es obté el coneixement extern en una tasca de predicció tan final.", 'fi': 'Mekanismin mahdollistaminen ajallisen tarinan ymmärtämiseen ja sen päättymisen ennustamiseen on mielenkiintoinen asia, joka on herättänyt huomattavaa huomiota, kuten ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT) tapauksessa. Tässä työssä kehitämme monihuomiopohjaisen neuroverkon (MANN), jossa on hyvin suunniteltuja optimointeja, kuten Highway Network, ja yhdistettyjä ominaisuuksia, jotka upottavat representaatioita hierarkkiseen neuroverkkomalliin. Kun otetaan huomioon erityistehtävän erityispiirteet, laajennamme MANN:ää harkitusti ulkoisilla tietoresursseilla, ylittäen tietenkin huipputason tulokset. Lisäksi kehitämme perusteellisen ymmärryksen mallistamme tekemällä huolellisen käsianalyysin tarinoiden osajoukosta. Tunnistamme, mitkä MANN:n ominaisuudet vaikuttavat sen suorituskykyyn ja miten ulkoista tietoa saadaan tällaisessa loppuennustetehtävässä.', 'bn': 'Enabling a mechanism to understand a temporal story and predict its ending is an interesting issue that has attracted considerable attention, as in case of the ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT).  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি বহুভিত্তিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (MANN) উন্নয়ন করি, যেমন হাইওয়ে নেটওয়ার্ক এবং হিয়ারেরার্কিল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেলে প্রতিনিধিদের বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী প নির্দিষ্ট কাজের বিশেষ বিষয়টি বিবেচনা করে আমরা ভেবেছিলাম বাইরে জ্ঞানের সম্পদ দিয়ে মানুষকে বাইরের সম্পদ দিয়ে বিস্তারিত করেছি, যা  এছাড়াও, আমরা আমাদের মডেলের ব্যাপারে গভীর বুঝতে পারি গল্পের বিভিন্ন বিশ্লেষণের মাধ্যমে। আমরা চিহ্নিত করি মানুষের ক্ষেত্রে তার প্রদর্শনীতে কি অবদান প্রদান করে এবং কিভাবে বাইরে জ্ঞান পাওয়া যাচ্ছে তা এই প্রত্যেক ভব', 'jv': 'Digawe sistem kanggo ngerasakno dadi nggunakake tarjamahan lan ngerasakno iki kesalahan sing apik sing apik butakor nggawe barang-apik, nganggo kowe barang LOC Hikaya Close task (scT). Nanging kuwi iki, kita ditambah akeh basa gambar luwih operasi tambah (man N) karo akeh basa Optimisasi sing dibenalke, kaya gayut akéwé netek, lan akeh sampeyan operasi layar sampeyan karo embedding representations sing dumatene sak model nyebute nyebute isi diagram . Mangyalah kanggo ngerasai partikular sing nggawe task-njaluk, awake dhewe barang manut kanggo kelas barang nggawe barang kelas barang nggawe barang kelas-kelas-kelas-kelas barang nggawe. Daftar, awak dhéwé luwih-luwih dumadhi nganggo perusahaan ning model sing nganggo perusahaan manut kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno. Awak dhéwé ngerti piye cara-cara sing berarti MUSAN nganggep nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe kesempatan ora ono wektu nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan.', 'he': 'לאפשר מנגנון להבין סיפור זמני ולחזות את הסוף שלו הוא נושא מעניין שמשך תשומת לב משמעותית, כמו במקרה של משימה סיפור ROC (SCT). In this paper, we develop a multi-attention-based neural network (MANN) with well-designed optimizations, like Highway Network, and concatenated features with embedding representations into the hierarchical neural network model.  בהתחשב בפרטים של המשימה המיוחדת, אנו ממשיכים במחשבה את MANN עם משאבי ידע חיצוניים, מעבר לתוצאות מוקדמות ברור. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מפתחים הבנה יסודית של הדוגמא שלנו באמצעות ניתוח יד זהיר על חלק מהסיפורים. אנו מזהה אילו תכונות של MANN תורמות להופעה החוצה שלו ואיך ידע חיצוני מושג במשימת צפוי סופית כזו.', 'sk': 'Omogočanje mehanizma za razumevanje časovne zgodbe in napovedovanje njenega konca je zanimivo vprašanje, ki je pritegnilo veliko pozornosti, kot v primeru ROC Story Cloze Task (SCT). V tem prispevku smo razvili nevronsko omrežje, ki temelji na več pozornosti (MANN), z dobro zasnovanimi optimizacijami, kot je Highway Network, in povezanimi funkcijami z vdelavo reprezentacij v hierarhični model nevronskega omrežja. Glede na posebnosti posamezne naloge MANN premišljeno razširimo z zunanjimi viri znanja, kar seveda presega najsodobnejše rezultate. Poleg tega razvijamo temeljito razumevanje našega modela s skrbno ročno analizo podsklopa zgodb. Ugotavljamo, katere lastnosti MANN prispevajo k njegovi presežnosti in kako pridobimo zunanje znanje pri takšni končni napovedovalni nalogi.', 'ha': "Ina iya amfani da wani aminci dõmin ka fahimta wani historin mai lokaci kuma ka ƙayyade ƙarshensa yana da wani al'amari mai sha'awa wanda ya kiya wa muhimmi, kamar idan na aikata aikin Kifin Kilokaci na RoC (SAT). Daga wannan takardar, Munã developer wata tarayya na-multi-bincike na neural (MANN) wanda ke da wasu shiryoyin da aka ƙayyade shi mai kyãwo, kamar shirin Higway, da kuma masu haɗe feature with embedded attitullar zuwa a motel na jerin neural na hiararchical. Aka bincike masu kamfatan aikin da aka ƙayyade, sai muka yi tunãni game da MAMAN da sourcen saninta bakwai, yana ƙaranci-state-of-the-art mai bayyane. Furan haka, Munã ƙarfafa fahimci mai cikakken misalinmu a bayani ga wani ƙarfe na lãbãrin. We identify what traits of MANN contribute to its outperformance and how external knowledge is obtained in such an ending prediction task.", 'bo': 'གནས་སྐབས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ལྷན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་སྒྱུར་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་ནུས་ཡོད་ཚད་མཇུག་བསྡུ་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་སྐྱེན་ཚུལ་ལས་འཆར་བཅུག་ In this paper, we develop a multi-attention-based neural network (MANN) with well-designed optimizations, like Highway Network, and concatenated features with embedding representations into the hierarchical neural network model. Considering the particulars of the specific task, we thoughtfully extend MANN with external knowledge resources, exceeding state-of-the-art results obviously. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་ཆས་འདིར་སྨན་པའི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅི་གིས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་འགྲུལ་བ་དང་ཇི་ལྟར་ཕྱི་རིག་ཤེས་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་སྐྱེན'}
{'en': 'A Reinforcement Learning Framework for Natural Question Generation using Bi-discriminators', 'ar': 'إطار التعلم المعزز لتوليد الأسئلة الطبيعية باستخدام أدوات التمييز الثنائية', 'fr': "Un cadre d'apprentissage par renforcement pour la génération de questions naturelles à l'aide de bi-discriminateurs", 'es': 'Un marco de aprendizaje de refuerzo para la generación de preguntas naturales mediante bidiscriminadores', 'pt': 'Uma estrutura de aprendizado de reforço para geração de perguntas naturais usando bi-discriminadores', 'zh': '以双鉴别器自然之化学框架', 'ru': 'Основы обучения подкреплению для генерации естественных вопросов с использованием бидискриминаторов', 'ja': 'バイディスクリミネーターを用いた自然な質問生成のための強化学習フレームワーク', 'hi': 'द्वि-भेदभावियों का उपयोग करके प्राकृतिक प्रश्न पीढ़ी के लिए एक सुदृढीकरण सीखने की रूपरेखा', 'ga': 'Creat Foghlama Treisithe chun Ceisteanna Nádúrtha a Ghiniúint ag úsáid Dé-idirdhealaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A természetes kérdések előállítására vonatkozó tanulási keretrendszer megerősítése a kettős megkülönböztetők használatával', 'el': 'Ένα Πλαίσιο Ενίσχυσης Μάθησης για τη Φυσική Δημιουργία Ερωτήσεων χρησιμοποιώντας Διδιακρίσεις', 'it': 'Un quadro di apprendimento rafforzato per la generazione di domande naturali utilizzando i bi-discriminatori', 'kk': 'Бір дискриминаторды қолдану үшін натуралық сұрақтарды құру оқыту фрейміName', 'lt': 'Mokymosi gamtinių klausimų kartojimo stiprinimo sistema naudojant dvišalius diskriminatorius', 'mk': 'Рамка за зајакнување на учењето за генерација природни прашања со користење на бидискриминатори', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ചോദ്യത്തിനുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്രകാരം പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെമ്മെക്കോര്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': "Qafas ta' Tagħlim ta' Tisħiħ għall-Ġenerazzjoni ta' Mistoqsijiet Naturali bl-użu ta' Bidiskriminaturi", 'mn': 'Би-хувьсгалдагчдыг ашиглаж байгалийн асуулт бий болгон', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Wzmocnienie ram uczenia się dla naturalnego generowania pytań przy użyciu dwudyskryminatorów', 'ro': 'Un cadru de învățare consolidat pentru generarea problemelor naturale folosind bi-discriminatori', 'sr': 'Pojačanje učenja okvira generacije prirodnih pitanja koristeći dvodiskriminacije', 'sv': 'En förstärkt inlärningsram för generering av naturliga frågor med hjälp av tvådiskriminerare', 'ta': 'இயல்பான கேள்வி உருவாக்கத்திற்கான பின்னணி கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சட்டம்', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Reinforcement Learning Framework for Questions Natural Generation using Bi-discriminators', 'ur': 'دو جدا جدا کرنے والوں کے استعمال کے لئے نائرے سؤال کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک ہمیشہ استعمال کرنے کا فرم', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một bộ kiểm học giải quyết học họa tự nhiên dùng người phân tính xép', 'bg': 'Укрепваща учебна рамка за генериране на естествени въпроси с помощта на двудискриминатори', 'hr': 'Pojačanje okvira učenja prirodnog generacije pitanja koristeći bi-diskriminacije', 'da': 'En styrket læringsramme for generering af naturlige spørgsmål ved hjælp af bi-diskriminerende', 'nl': 'Een versterkend leerkader voor het genereren van natuurlijke vragen met behulp van Bi-discriminatoren', 'de': 'Ein Verstärkungs-Lernrahmen für die natürliche Fragestellung unter Verwendung von Bi-Diskriminierern', 'id': 'Sebuah Framework Pelajaran Penyukuran untuk Generasi Pertanyaan Alami menggunakan Bi-diskriminator', 'fa': 'یک فرم آموزش یادگیری برای نسل سوال طبیعی با استفاده از دو جدایی\u200cکنندگان', 'ko': '쌍감별기의 자연 문제에 기초하여 학습 구조를 강화하다', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa Kujifunza Uhamasishaji kwa ajili ya Uzalishaji wa maswali ya asili kwa kutumia wabaguzi', 'tr': 'Bi-diskriminatörler ulanýan Dogaty Sorag Jemi üçin Köwrenmek Framemi', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një kuadër mësimi i forcimit për gjenerimin e pyetjeve natyrore duke përdorur dy-diskriminatorët', 'am': 'የባሕላዊ ጥያቄ ትምህርት መምህርት ፍሬም በቢ-discriminators ተጠቃሚ', 'hy': 'Բնական հարցերի ստեղծման ուժեղացված ուսուցման շրջանակը, որը օգտագործում է երկու խտրականություններ,', 'bn': 'স্বাভাবিক প্রশ্নের জন্য পুনরায় শিক্ষা শিক্ষা ফ্রেমের কাজ বা বৈষম্য ব্যবহার করে', 'az': 'T톛bi톛tli sual n톛z톛riyy톛ti 칲칞칲n yenil톛nm톛 칬yr톛nm톛 Framework for Natural Question Generation using Two-discriminators', 'bs': 'Pojačanje okvira učenja prirodnog generacije pitanja koristeći dvodiskriminacije', 'ca': "Un marc d'aprenentatge de reforç per a la generació de preguntes naturals utilitzant bidiscriminadors", 'cs': 'Rámec posílení učení pro přirozené generování otázek s využitím bidiskriminačních látek', 'fi': 'Vahvistettu oppimiskehys luonnollisen kysymyksen muodostamiseen kaksijakoisia tekijöitä käyttäen', 'et': 'Tugevdatud õpperaamistik looduslike küsimuste tekitamiseks kahepoolsete diskrimineerijate abil', 'ha': 'A Rufuffurin Learnin Frame for Natural tambayation General by Bi-Disciminators', 'jv': 'A Backforcement Learning frame for Normal question Generation Using bi-disc', 'sk': 'Okrepitev učnega okvira za ustvarjanje naravnih vprašanj z uporabo dvojnih diskriminatorjev', 'he': 'מסגר לימוד חיבורי ליצירת שאלות טבעיות בשימוש בידיסקרטים', 'bo': 'Bi-discriminators བེད་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པའི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་གཞུང་གཞུང་ལ།'}
{'en': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) aims to ask natural questions about an image automatically. Existing research focus on training model to fit the annotated data set that makes it indifferent from other language generation tasks. We argue that natural questions need to have two specific attributes from the perspectives of content and linguistic respectively, namely, natural and human-written. Inspired by the setting of discriminator in adversarial learning, we propose two discriminators, one for each attribute, to enhance the training. We then use the reinforcement learning framework to incorporate scores from the two discriminators as the reward to guide the training of the question generator. Experimental results on a benchmark VQG dataset show the effectiveness and robustness of our model compared to some state-of-the-art models in terms of both automatic and human evaluation metrics.', 'ar': 'يهدف إنشاء الأسئلة المرئية (VQG) إلى طرح أسئلة طبيعية حول الصورة تلقائيًا. تركز الأبحاث الحالية على نموذج التدريب لتلائم مجموعة البيانات المشروحة التي تجعلها غير مبالية بمهام إنشاء اللغة الأخرى. نحن نجادل في أن الأسئلة الطبيعية تحتاج إلى سمتين محددتين من منظور المحتوى واللغوية على التوالي ، وهما الطبيعية والمكتوبة من قبل الإنسان. مستوحاة من وضع أداة التمييز في التعلم العدائي ، نقترح اثنين من التمييز ، واحد لكل سمة ، لتعزيز التدريب. ثم نستخدم إطار عمل التعلم المعزز لدمج الدرجات من المميِّزين كمكافأة لتوجيه تدريب منشئ الأسئلة. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعة بيانات VQG المعيارية فعالية ومتانة نموذجنا مقارنة ببعض النماذج الحديثة من حيث مقاييس التقييم التلقائية والبشرية.', 'es': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) tiene como objetivo hacer preguntas naturales sobre una imagen de forma automática. La investigación existente se centra en el modelo de capacitación para adaptarse al conjunto de datos anotados que lo hace indiferente de otras tareas de generación de idiomas. Sostenemos que las preguntas naturales deben tener dos atributos específicos desde las perspectivas del contenido y el lingüístico respectivamente, a saber, natural y escrita por humanos. Inspirados por la configuración de discriminador en el aprendizaje contradictorio, proponemos dos discriminadores, uno para cada atributo, para mejorar el entrenamiento. Luego utilizamos el marco de aprendizaje por refuerzo para incorporar las puntuaciones de los dos discriminadores como recompensa para guiar la capacitación del generador de preguntas. Los resultados experimentales en un conjunto de datos VQG de referencia muestran la eficacia y solidez de nuestro modelo en comparación con algunos modelos de última generación en términos de métricas de evaluación automática y humana.', 'pt': 'O Visual Question Generation (VQG) visa fazer perguntas naturais sobre uma imagem automaticamente. As pesquisas existentes focam no modelo de treinamento para ajustar o conjunto de dados anotado que o torna indiferente a outras tarefas de geração de linguagem. Argumentamos que as questões naturais precisam ter dois atributos específicos das perspectivas de conteúdo e linguística, respectivamente, a saber, natural e escrita humana. Inspirados na configuração do discriminador na aprendizagem adversarial, propomos dois discriminadores, um para cada atributo, para aprimorar o treinamento. Em seguida, usamos a estrutura de aprendizado por reforço para incorporar as pontuações dos dois discriminadores como recompensa para orientar o treinamento do gerador de perguntas. Os resultados experimentais em um conjunto de dados VQG de referência mostram a eficácia e a robustez do nosso modelo em comparação com alguns modelos de última geração em termos de métricas de avaliação automática e humana.', 'fr': "La génération de questions visuelles (VQG) vise à poser automatiquement des questions naturelles sur une image. Les recherches existantes se concentrent sur le modèle de formation pour s'adapter à l'ensemble de données annoté qui le rend indifférent des autres tâches de génération de langage. Nous soutenons que les questions naturelles doivent avoir deux attributs spécifiques du point de vue du contenu et de la langue respectivement, à savoir, naturel et écrit par l'homme. Inspirés par la définition du discriminateur dans l'apprentissage contradictoire, nous proposons deux discriminateurs, un pour chaque attribut, afin d'améliorer la formation. Nous utilisons ensuite le cadre d'apprentissage par renforcement pour intégrer les scores des deux discriminateurs comme récompense afin de guider la formation du générateur de questions. Les résultats expérimentaux sur un ensemble de données VQG de référence montrent l'efficacité et la robustesse de notre modèle par rapport à certains modèles de pointe en termes de métriques d'évaluation automatique et humaine.", 'ja': 'Visual Question Generation （ VQG ）は、画像に関する自然な質問を自動的に行うことを目的としています。既存の研究は、他の言語生成タスクと無関係になる注釈付きデータセットに適合するようにトレーニングモデルに焦点を当てている。私たちは、自然な質問には、コンテンツと言語学的な観点からそれぞれ2つの具体的な属性、すなわち自然なものと人間が書いたものが必要だと主張しています。対立学習における差別化要因の設定に触発されて、トレーニングを強化するために、各属性ごとに1人ずつの2人の差別化要因を提案します。次に、強化学習フレームワークを使用して、2人の識別者からのスコアを報酬として組み込み、質問生成者のトレーニングを導きます。ベンチマークVQGデータセットの実験結果は、自動評価指標と人間評価指標の両方の観点から、一部の最先端モデルと比較して、当社のモデルの有効性と堅牢性を示しています。', 'zh': '视听生成 (VQG) 旨在自问自然。 现在的研究集在训练模形上,以应注释的数据集,使与他言语生成的无异。 臣愚以为天理言语有二特定之性,自然与人书也。 对抗性学之歧视者启,建二歧视者,每属一,以增培训。 然后强学框架赏二鉴别器之分,以教生成器。 准VQG数集之实验结果表明,比诸先进,自与人工评指标有效性鲁棒性。', 'ru': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) стремится задавать естественные вопросы об изображении автоматически. Существующие исследования сосредоточены на модели обучения, чтобы соответствовать аннотированному набору данных, который делает его равнодушным к другим задачам генерации языка. Мы утверждаем, что естественные вопросы должны иметь два конкретных атрибута с точки зрения содержания и лингвистических соответственно, а именно: естественные и написанные человеком. Вдохновленные настройкой дискриминатора в состязательном обучении, мы предлагаем двух дискриминаторов, по одному для каждого атрибута, чтобы улучшить обучение. Затем мы используем систему обучения подкрепления для включения баллов от двух дискриминантов в качестве награды для руководства обучением генератора вопросов. Экспериментальные результаты по эталонному набору данных VQG показывают эффективность и устойчивость нашей модели по сравнению с некоторыми современными моделями с точки зрения как автоматических, так и человеческих оценочных метрик.', 'hi': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) का उद्देश्य स्वचालित रूप से एक छवि के बारे में प्राकृतिक प्रश्न पूछना है। मौजूदा शोध एनोटेटेड डेटा सेट को फिट करने के लिए प्रशिक्षण मॉडल पर ध्यान केंद्रित करता है जो इसे अन्य भाषा पीढ़ी के कार्यों से उदासीन बनाता है। हम तर्क देते हैं कि प्राकृतिक प्रश्नों में क्रमशः सामग्री और भाषाई के दृष्टिकोण से दो विशिष्ट विशेषताएं होनी चाहिए, अर्थात्, प्राकृतिक और मानव-लिखित। प्रतिकूल सीखने में भेदभावपूर्ण की स्थापना से प्रेरित होकर, हम प्रशिक्षण को बढ़ाने के लिए प्रत्येक विशेषता के लिए एक, दो भेदभावपूर्ण, प्रस्तावित करते हैं। फिर हम प्रश्न जनरेटर के प्रशिक्षण का मार्गदर्शन करने के लिए इनाम के रूप में दो भेदभावियों से स्कोर को शामिल करने के लिए सुदृढीकरण सीखने के ढांचे का उपयोग करते हैं। एक बेंचमार्क VQG डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन मीट्रिक दोनों के संदर्भ में कुछ अत्याधुनिक मॉडल की तुलना में हमारे मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता और मजबूती दिखाते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag Giniúint Cheisteanna Amhairc (VQG) ceisteanna nádúrtha a chur go huathoibríoch faoi íomhá. Díríonn an taighde atá ann faoi láthair ar mhúnla oiliúna chun an tacar sonraí anótáilte a oiriúnú a fhágann nach bhfuil difríocht idir é agus tascanna giniúna teanga eile. Áitímid go gcaithfidh dhá thréith shainiúla a bheith ag ceisteanna nádúrtha ó thaobh an ábhair agus na teangeolaíochta faoi seach, eadhon, nádúrtha agus daonna-scríofa. Arna spreagadh ag idirdhealú a dhéanamh i bhfoghlaim sháraíochta, molaimid beirt idirdhealaitheoir, ceann do gach tréith, chun an oiliúint a fheabhsú. Bainimid úsáid ansin as an gcreat foghlama treisithe chun scóir ón dá idirdhealú a ionchorprú mar luach saothair chun oiliúint an ghineadóir ceisteanna a threorú. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thacar sonraí tagarmhairc VQG éifeachtacht agus stóinseacht ár múnla i gcomparáid le roinnt samhlacha úrscothacha i dtéarmaí méadrachta uathoibríoch agus daonna.', 'hu': 'A Visual Question Generation (VQG) célja, hogy automatikusan természetes kérdéseket tegyen fel egy képpel kapcsolatban. A meglévő kutatások a képzési modellekre összpontosítanak, hogy illeszkedjenek a jegyzetelt adatkészlethez, amely közömbössé teszi az egyéb nyelvgenerálási feladatoktól. Azzal érvelünk, hogy a természetes kérdéseknek két sajátos tulajdonsággal kell rendelkezniük a tartalom és a nyelv szempontjából, nevezetesen a természetes és az emberi írás szempontjából. Az ellentétes tanulásban a diszkriminatív megkülönböztető beállításából inspirálva két diszkriminatív megkülönböztetőt javasolunk, minden tulajdonságra egyet, hogy fokozza a képzést. Ezután a megerősítő tanulási keretrendszert használjuk arra, hogy a két diszkriminatív pontszámokat beépítsük a jutalomként, hogy irányítsuk a kérdésgenerátor képzését. Egy benchmark VQG adatkészleten végzett kísérleti eredmények mutatják modellünk hatékonyságát és robusztusságát néhány korszerű modellhez képest mind az automatikus, mind az emberi értékelés szempontjából.', 'ka': 'Name მხოლოდ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ სწორედ მონაცემების მოდულიდან დაკავშირება, რომელიც სხვ ჩვენ არსებობთ, რომ ნაირადი კითხვები უნდა იყოს ორი განსაკუთრებული ატრიბუტები შესახებ მდგომარეობის და ლენგურისტიკის პეროვნტიკებიდან, ანუ, ნაირადი და ადამიანის წ ჩვენ განვითარებით ორი დისკრიმინატორი, ერთი ყოველ ატრიბუტისთვის, რომ განვითარებით. შემდეგ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სწავლების სწავლების ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ორი დისკრიმინატორიდან დავყენებთ, როგორც სამუშაო, რომ კითხვის генერатоრის სწავლებას გადავიყენებთ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები VQG მონაცემების კონფერიმენტიკზე ჩვენი მოდელის ეფექტიურობა და ძალიანობა ჩვენი მოდელის შემდგომარებით, რამდენიმე ხელსაწყისი მოდელების შემდგომარე', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία οπτικών ερωτήσεων (στοχεύει στην αυτόματη υποβολή φυσικών ερωτήσεων σχετικά με μια εικόνα. Η υπάρχουσα έρευνα επικεντρώνεται στο μοντέλο κατάρτισης ώστε να ταιριάζει στο σχολιασμένο σύνολο δεδομένων που το καθιστά αδιάφορο από άλλες εργασίες δημιουργίας γλωσσών. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι τα φυσικά ερωτήματα πρέπει να έχουν δύο συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά από την οπτική του περιεχομένου και της γλώσσας αντίστοιχα, δηλαδή, φυσικά και ανθρώπινα γραπτά. Εμπνευσμένοι από τη ρύθμιση των διακρίσεων στην αντικρουστική μάθηση, προτείνουμε δύο διακρίσεις, έναν για κάθε χαρακτηριστικό, για την ενίσχυση της εκπαίδευσης. Στη συνέχεια, χρησιμοποιούμε το πλαίσιο ενίσχυσης μάθησης για να ενσωματώσουμε βαθμολογίες από τους δύο διακρίσεις ως ανταμοιβή για να καθοδηγήσουμε την εκπαίδευση της γεννήτριας ερωτήσεων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς δείχνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα και την ανθεκτικότητα του μοντέλου μας σε σύγκριση με ορισμένα μοντέλα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας όσον αφορά τις μετρήσεις αυτόματης και ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης.', 'it': "Visual Question Generation (VQG) mira a porre domande naturali su un'immagine automaticamente. La ricerca esistente si concentra sul modello di formazione per adattarsi al set di dati annotati che lo rende indifferente da altre attività di generazione linguistica. Noi sosteniamo che le questioni naturali devono avere due attributi specifici dal punto di vista del contenuto e linguistico rispettivamente, vale a dire, naturale e umano-scritto. Ispirati all'impostazione del discriminatore nell'apprendimento avversario, proponiamo due discriminatori, uno per ogni attributo, per migliorare la formazione. Usiamo quindi il framework di apprendimento di rinforzo per incorporare i punteggi dei due discriminanti come ricompensa per guidare la formazione del generatore di domande. I risultati sperimentali su un set di dati VQG di riferimento mostrano l'efficacia e la robustezza del nostro modello rispetto ad alcuni modelli all'avanguardia in termini sia di metriche di valutazione automatica che umana.", 'kk': 'Name Басқа тілдерді құру тапсырмаларынан қатынасыз болатын деректер жиынына сәйкес келетін зерттеу үлгісіне назар ауыстыру үшін. Біз табиғи сұрақтардың мазмұның және лингвистикалық тәртіптерінен екі нақты атрибуттары болу керек деп айтып тұрмыз, мысалы, табиғи және адам жазылған. Дискриминаторды қарсы оқыту үшін дискриминаторды орнату үшін біз екі дискриминаторды, бір атрибуттары үшін, оқытуды көтеру үшін, біріншісін таңдаймыз. Содан кейін екі дискриминатордан сұрақ генераторының оқыту үшін оқыту бағдарламасын қолданамыз. VQG деректер жиынының эксперименталдық нәтижелері моделіміздің ең жақсы және құндылығын көрсетеді. Біреуі автоматты және адамдардың оқиға метрикалық қасиеттерінің кейбір орындау үлгілеріне салыст', 'lt': 'Vizualinių klausimų generavimo (VQG) tikslas – automatiškai užduoti natūralius klausimus apie vaizdą. Dabartiniai moksliniai tyrimai daugiausia dėmesio skiria mokymo modeliui, kuris atitinka anotuotą duomenų rinkinį, dėl kurio jis skiriasi nuo kitų kalbų kūrimo užduočių. Mes teigiame, kad natūralūs klausimai turi turėti du konkrečius požymius turinio ir kalbos požiūriu, būtent natūralų ir žmogaus rašytą. Įkvėptas diskriminatoriaus nustatymu priešiško mokymosi srityje, mes siūlome du diskriminatorius, vieną kiekvienam požymiui, tobulinti mokymą. We then use the reinforcement learning framework to incorporate scores from the two discriminators as the reward to guide the training of the question generator.  Eksperimentiniai VQG duomenų rinkinio rezultatai rodo mūsų modelio veiksmingumą ir patikimumą, palyginti su kai kuriais naujausiais modeliais tiek automatinio, tiek žmogaus vertinimo metriniais rodikliais.', 'mk': 'Генерацијата на визуелни прашања (VQG) има за цел автоматски да поставува природни прашања за слика. Постојачките истражувања се фокусираат на моделот на обука за да се вклопи на анотираниот набор на податоци кој го прави неразличен од другите задачи на генерација на јазици. Ние тврдиме дека природните прашања мора да имаат два специфични атрибути од перспективата на содржината и на јазикот, односно, природното и човечкото пишување. Инспирирано од поставувањето дискриминатор во противно учење, предложуваме двајца дискриминатори, еден за секој атрибут, за подобрување на обуката. Потоа ја користиме засилувачката рамка за учење за вклучување на резултати од двајцата дискриминатори како награда за водење на обуката на генераторот на прашања. Експерименталните резултати на базата на VQG податоци ја покажуваат ефикасноста и силноста на нашиот модел во споредба со некои најсовремени модели во однос на автоматска и човечка метрика на проценка.', 'ms': 'Penjanaan soalan Visual (VQG) bermaksud menanyakan soalan semulajadi mengenai imej secara automatik. Name Kami membantah bahawa soalan semulajadi perlu mempunyai dua atribut khusus dari perspektif kandungan dan bahasa berdasarkan, iaitu, semulajadi dan ditulis oleh manusia. Terinspirasi oleh tetapan diskriminator dalam pembelajaran lawan, kami melamar dua diskriminator, satu untuk setiap atribut, untuk meningkatkan latihan. Kemudian kita gunakan kerangka belajar kuasa untuk memasukkan skor dari dua diskriminator sebagai hadiah untuk membimbing latihan generator soalan. Keputusan eksperimental pada set data VQG tanda referensi menunjukkan keefektivitas dan ketepatan model kita dibandingkan dengan beberapa model-state-of-the-art dalam terma metrik penilaian automatik dan manusia.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഒരു ചിത്രത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് സ്വയം ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ചോദിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു Existing research focus on training model to fit the annotated data set that makes it indifferent from other language generation tasks.  സ്വാഭാവികമായ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രത്യേക പ്രത്യേക പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളേണ്ടതുണ്ടെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാദിക്ക എതിരാളിയായ പഠനത്തില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത്രീകരിക്കുന്ന വ്യത്യാസം നിര്\u200dബന്ധിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ട് വ്യത്യസ്താക്കളെ പ്ര പിന്നീട് നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ട് വിവേചകരില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്കോര്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിന ബെങ്ക്മാര്\u200dക്ക് വിക്യൂജി ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തനവും റോബ്സ്റ്റിസ്റ്റിവും സ്വതന്ത്രമായി മനുഷ്യന', 'mn': 'Виртуал асуулт төрүүлэх (VQG) нь автоматаар зургийн тухай байгалийн асуулт асуух зорилго юм. Шинэ судалгаанд сургалтын загвар дээр анхаарлаа хандуулж бусад хэлний үеийн үйлдвэрлэлээс хамааралтай өгөгдлийн хэлбэрээс хамааралтай болгодог. Бид байгалийн асуултууд бүтээгдэхүүний, хэл хэлний зөвхөн байгалийн, хүн төрөлхтний бичигдсэн хариултаас хоёр тодорхой хариулттай байх хэрэгтэй гэж хэлж байна. Эрэгтэй суралцахын тулд ялгаагүй хүмүүсийн тухай санал тавьсан. Бид хоёр ялгаагүй хүмүүс, нэг нь бүх хүмүүст суралцах боломжтой. Дараа нь бид асуулт гаргагчдын сургалтыг удирдах шагналын тулд хоёр ялгаагүй хүмүүсийн тоонуудыг нэгтгэхэд нэмэгдүүлэх сургалтын системийг ашиглаж байна. VQG өгөгдлийн сан дээрх туршилтын үр дүнг нь бидний загварын үр дүнтэй, хүчний оюутнуудын метрикийн харьцуулахад зарим урлагийн загвартай харьцуулдаг.', 'mt': 'Il-Ġenerazzjoni ta’ Mistoqsijiet Viżwali (VQG) għandha l-għan li tistaqsi mistoqsijiet naturali dwar immaġni awtomatikament. Ir-riċerka eżistenti tiffoka fuq mudell ta’ taħriġ biex jaqbel mas-sett ta’ dejta annotat li jagħmilha indifferenti minn kompiti oħra ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ lingwi. Aħna jargumentaw li mistoqsijiet naturali jeħtieġ li jkollhom żewġ attributi speċifiċi mill-perspettivi tal-kontenut u lingwistiċi rispettivament, jiġifieri, naturali u miktuba mill-bniedem. Inspired by the setting of discriminator in adversarial learning, we propose two discriminators, one for each attribute, to enhance the training.  Imbagħad nużaw il-qafas tat-tagħlim tar-rinfurzar biex inkorporaw punteġġi miż-żewġ diskriminaturi bħala l-premju biex niggwidaw it-taħriġ tal-ġeneratur tal-mistoqsijiet. Riżultati esperimentali fuq sett ta’ dejta VQG ta’ referenza juru l-effettività u s-robustezza tal-mudell tagħna meta mqabbel ma’ xi mudelli l-aktar avvanzati kemm f’termini ta’ metriċi ta’ evalwazzjoni awtomatiċi kif ukoll umani.', 'ro': 'Generarea de întrebări vizuale (VQG) își propune să pună automat întrebări naturale despre o imagine. Cercetările existente se concentrează pe modelul de formare pentru a se potrivi setului de date adnotate, care îl face indiferent față de alte sarcini de generare a limbilor străine. Susținem că întrebările naturale trebuie să aibă două atribute specifice din perspectiva conținutului și respectiv lingvistic, și anume, natural și uman-scris. Inspirat de setarea discriminatorului în învățarea adversară, propunem doi discriminatori, unul pentru fiecare atribut, pentru a îmbunătăți formarea. Apoi folosim cadrul de învățare de consolidare pentru a include scoruri de la cei doi discriminatori ca recompensă pentru a ghida formarea generatorului de întrebări. Rezultatele experimentale ale unui set de date VQG de referință arată eficacitatea și robustețea modelului nostru în comparație cu unele modele de ultimă generație atât în ceea ce privește măsurătorile de evaluare automată, cât și umane.', 'pl': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) ma na celu automatyczne zadawanie naturalnych pytań dotyczących obrazu. Dotychczasowe badania koncentrują się na modelu szkoleniowym dopasowanym do adnotacji zbioru danych, który sprawia, że jest obojętny w stosunku do innych zadań generowania języków. Twierdzimy, że pytania naturalne muszą mieć dwa specyficzne cechy odpowiednio z perspektywy treści i językowej, a mianowicie naturalne i pisane przez człowieka. Zainspirowani ustawieniem dyskryminatora w uczeniu przeciwnym proponujemy dwóch dyskryminatorów, jeden dla każdego atrybutu, aby usprawnić szkolenie. Następnie używamy ram uczenia się wzmacniającego, aby uwzględnić wyniki dwóch dyskryminatorów jako nagrodę, aby kierować szkoleniem generatora pytań. Wyniki eksperymentalne na zestawie danych referencyjnych VQG pokazują skuteczność i solidność naszego modelu w porównaniu z niektórymi najnowocześniejszymi modelami pod względem wskaźników oceny automatycznej i ludzkiej.', 'no': 'Name Det eksisterande forskningsfokus på opplæringsmodellen for å passa til den merkte datasettet som gjer det indifferent frå andre språk-oppgåver. Vi tvar at naturspørsmål må ha to spesifikke attributt frå perspektiva av innhaldet og språk, som er naturleg og menneskelig skriven. Inspirert av innstillinga av diskriminator i opponentlæring, fører vi to diskriminatorer, éin for kvar attributt, for å forbetra opplæringa. Vi bruker så stipringslæringsrammeverket for å inkludere poeng frå dei to diskriminatorene som rekninga for å hjelpa opplæringa av spørsmålsgeneratoren. Eksperimentale resultat på eit benchmarkdatasett for VQG viser effektiviteten og kraftighet av modellen vårt sammenlignet med nokre kunstmodeller i forhold til både automatiske og menneskelige evalueringsmetrikar.', 'sr': 'Generacija vizualnih pitanja (VQG) ima cilj da postavlja prirodna pitanja o sliki automatski. Postoje istraživanja fokusiraju se na model treninga kako bi se uklopila u komplekt annotiranih podataka koji ga čini neovisnim od drugih zadataka za generaciju jezika. Tvrdimo da prirodna pitanja moraju imati dva specifična atributa iz perspektiva sadržaja i lingvističkog odnosa, a to je prirodno i ljudsko pisano. Inspirirano postavljanjem diskriminacije u neprijateljskom učenju, predlažemo dva diskriminacija, jedan za svaku atributu, da poboljšamo obuku. Onda koristimo okvir učenja pojačanja kako bi uključili rezultate od dva diskriminacija kao nagradu da bi vodili obuku generatora pitanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na standardnom setu podataka VQG pokazuju efikasnost i robustnost našeg model a u usporedbi sa nekim modelima stanja umjetnosti u smislu automatske i ljudske procjene metrike.', 'so': "Muujinta su'aalaha aragtida (VQG) waxaa loogu talogalay in lagu weydiino su'aalo asalka ah oo ku saabsan sawir rasmi ah. Waxbarashada joogta ayaa ku hagaya sameynta waxbarashada si uu u habboon sawirida macluumaadka la caddeeyey, kaasoo ka dhigaya mid ka duwan shaqooyinka qarniga kale ee luuqada. Waxaynu ka doodaynaa in su'aalaha dabiicadda ah ay u baahan yihiin laba tusaale gaar ah oo ka mid ah aragtida waxyaabaha ku jira iyo luuqadda, tusaale ahaan dabiicadda iyo dadka qoran. Waxyaabaha lagu soo dejiyo takoorista iskuulka ka geesta ah, waxaan soo jeedinaynaa laba takoorista ah, mid kastaba takoorista, si loo kordhiyo waxbarashada. Markaas waxaynu u isticmaalnaa qalabka barashada si aan labada takoorsan uga dhigno iskuulka si aan u hagno waxbarashada arimaha suurtagalka. Imtixaanka ku saabsan baaritaanka qaramaanka VQG wuxuu muujiyaa waxyaabaha iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha modellkayaga, isbarbarbardhigna tusaalaha farshaxanka ah, si ay u jeedaan labada qaab oo automatic iyo jidh qiimeynta dadka.", 'sv': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) syftar till att ställa naturliga frågor om en bild automatiskt. Befintlig forskning fokuserar på utbildningsmodell för att passa den kommenterade datauppsättningen som gör den likgiltig från andra språkgenereringsuppgifter. Vi hävdar att naturliga frågor behöver ha två specifika attribut ur innehållsperspektiv respektive språkligt, nämligen naturliga och människoskrivna. Inspirerad av inställningen av diskriminerare i motstridigt lärande föreslår vi två diskriminerare, en för varje attribut, för att förbättra utbildningen. Vi använder sedan armering learning framework för att införliva poäng från de två diskriminerarna som belöning för att vägleda utbildningen av frågegeneratorn. Experimentella resultat på ett benchmark VQG-dataset visar effektiviteten och robustheten hos vår modell jämfört med vissa toppmoderna modeller när det gäller både automatiska och mänskliga utvärderingsmetoder.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අහන්න. ඉතින් ඉතින් පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරධානය මදුල්යෙන් පැහැදිලි වෙනුවෙන් අනිත් භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණා වැඩක් නැති ව අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න කරනවා ස්වභාවික ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් තියෙන්න ඕනේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ භාෂාවික විශේෂයෙන් ඉන්න, අන විරෝද්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්වාස කරනවා විරෝද්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා, අපි විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්වාස කරනවා දෙකක්, එක් අපි පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් VQG දත්ත සෙට් එකේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විදිහට පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් එක්ක ස්', 'ta': 'பார்வை கேள்வி உருவாக்கம் (VQG) பிம்பத்தை தானாகவே கேள்வி இயல்பான கேள்விகளை குறிக்கும். Existing research focus on training model to fit the annotated data set that makes it indifferent from other language generation tasks.  இயல்பான கேள்விகள் இரு குறிப்பிட்ட குணங்கள் இருக்க வேண்டும் என்று நாம் விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் மற்றும் மொழிக் எதிர்மறை கற்றத்தில் வித்தியாசமாக்குபவர் அமைப்பில், நாம் ஒவ்வொரு குணங்களுக்கும் ஒன்று, பயிற்சியை அதிகரிக்க நினைவூட்டு பிறகு நாம் கேள்வி உருவாக்குபவரின் பயிற்சியை நேர்வழி காட்ட வேண்டும் கூலி பிரிவினர்களில் இருந்து மதிப்பெண்களை சேர்க்க விகியுஜி தரவுத்தளத்தின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'Name موجود تحقیق موجود ترینس موڈل پر تمرکز کرتا ہے کہ انٹیٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق مطابق ہو جاتا ہے جو اس کو دوسری زبان پیدا کرنے کے کاموں سے غیر اہل بناتا ہے. ہم جھگڑتے ہیں کہ طبیعی سؤال کی ضرورت ہے کہ منزل اور زبان شناسی کی نظریں سے دو مخصوص خصوصے ملیں، یعنی طبیعی اور انسان کی لکھی ہوئی. مخالف تعلیم میں تقسیم کرنے والے کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ مشورہ کیا گیا ہے، ہم دو تقسیم کرنے والوں کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، ایک ہر شخص کے لئے، تعلیم کو بڑھنے کے لئے۔ اس کے بعد ہم نے سؤال جنراٹر کی تعلیم کی تعلیم کی سفارش کے لئے سفارش کے طور پر سؤال کے ذریعہ سے اسکور کو شامل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا ہے ایک بنچم مارک VQG ڈیٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارے مدل کی عمدگی اور ثابت قدم کی مقابلہ میں ایک دوسرے ایٹ آرت موڈل کے مقابلہ میں اتوماتیک اور انسان کی ارزش متریک کے مطابق۔', 'uz': "Name Name Biz o'ylaymiz, tabiiy savollar, tabiiy va inson yozib qo'llanilgan ikki xususiyatlar tarkibida bo'lishi kerak. Inspired by the setting of discriminator in adversarial learning, we propose two discriminators, one for each attribute, to enhance the training.  Keyin biz to'g'ri o'rganishni o'rganishni foydalanamiz, ikkita ta'minlovchi holatlarni qo'yish uchun soʻrov generatorning o'rganishni qo'shish uchun foydalanamiz. Comment", 'vi': 'Các câu hỏi hình ảnh (kiểu VG) muốn đặt câu hỏi tự nhiên về ảnh một cách tự động. Việc nghiên cứu hiện tại tập trung vào mô hình đào tạo phù hợp với bộ dữ liệu ghi chú làm nó không quan tâm đến các công việc sản sinh ngôn ngữ khác. Chúng tôi cho rằng câu hỏi tự nhiên cần phải có hai đặc điểm từ khía cạnh nội dung và ngôn ngữ, là, tự nhiên và chữ viết. Lấy cảm hứng từ sự phân biệt trong việc học ngược nhau, chúng tôi đề xuất hai người phân biệt, một cho mỗi tập tin, để nâng tập luyện. Chúng ta sử dụng cơ quan học tập củng cố để ghi điểm từ hai nhà phân biệt như phần thưởng để hướng dẫn việc huấn luyện máy tạo câu hỏi. Các kết quả thử nghiệm trên một bộ dữ liệu kiểu VG hiển thị hiệu quả và độ bền vững của mô hình của chúng ta so với một số mô hình hiện đại về mặt kỹ thuật, về mặt đo hồ sơ đánh giá tự động và con người.', 'bg': 'Създаването на визуални въпроси има за цел автоматично да задава естествени въпроси за изображението. Съществуващите изследвания се фокусират върху модела на обучение, който да отговаря на анотирания набор от данни, който го прави безразличен от други задачи за генериране на езика. Ние твърдим, че естествените въпроси трябва да имат два специфични атрибута съответно от гледна точка на съдържанието и езика, а именно естествените и човешките. Вдъхновени от поставянето на дискриминатор в състезателното обучение, предлагаме два дискриминатора, по един за всеки атрибут, за да подобрим обучението. След това използваме рамката за укрепване на обучението, за да включим оценките от двамата дискриминатори като награда, която да ръководи обучението на генератора на въпроси. Експерименталните резултати от сравнителен набор от данни показват ефективността и здравината на нашия модел в сравнение с някои най-съвременни модели по отношение както на автоматичните, така и на показателите за оценка на човека.', 'da': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) har til formål at stille naturlige spørgsmål om et billede automatisk. Eksisterende forskning fokuserer på træningsmodel, der passer til det annoterede datasæt, der gør det ligegyldigt fra andre sproggenereringsopgaver. Vi hævder, at naturlige spørgsmål skal have to specifikke egenskaber ud fra henholdsvis indholdsmæssigt og sprogligt perspektiv, nemlig naturlige og menneskeskrevne. Inspireret af indstillingen af diskriminerende i modstridende læring, foreslår vi to diskriminerende, en for hver attribut, for at forbedre træningen. Vi bruger derefter forstærkningslæringsrammen til at indarbejde scores fra de to diskriminerende personer som belønning til at lede uddannelsen af spørgsmålsgeneratoren. Eksperimentelle resultater på et benchmark VQG datasæt viser effektiviteten og robustheden af vores model sammenlignet med nogle state-of-the-art modeller med hensyn til både automatiske og menneskelige evalueringsmetrics.', 'nl': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) wil automatisch natuurlijke vragen stellen over een afbeelding. Bestaand onderzoek richt zich op trainingsmodel dat past bij de geannoteerde dataset die het onverschillig maakt van andere taalgeneratietaken. We stellen dat natuurlijke vragen vanuit inhoudelijk en taalkundig perspectief twee specifieke kenmerken moeten hebben, namelijk natuurlijk en menselijk geschreven. Geïnspireerd door de instelling van discriminator in tegenstrijdig leren, stellen we twee discriminatoren voor, één voor elk kenmerk, om de training te verbeteren. Vervolgens gebruiken we het versterkende leerkader om scores van de twee discriminatoren op te nemen als beloning voor de training van de vragengenerator. Experimentele resultaten op een benchmark VQG dataset tonen de effectiviteit en robuustheid van ons model in vergelijking met sommige state-of-the-art modellen in termen van zowel automatische als menselijke evaluatiestatistieken.', 'hr': 'Vizualna generacija pitanja (VQG) ima cilj postaviti prirodna pitanja o sliki automatski. Postoje istraživanja usredotočili se na model obuke kako bi se uklopili u komplet annotiranih podataka koji ga čini neovisnim od drugih zadataka za generaciju jezika. Tvrdimo da prirodna pitanja moraju imati dvije specifične atribute iz perspektive sadržaja i jezičkog odnosa, a to prirodnog i ljudskog pisanja. Inspirirano postavljanjem diskriminacije u neprijateljskom učenju, predlažemo dva diskriminacija, jedan za svaki atribut, da poboljšamo obuku. Onda koristimo okvir učenja pojačanja kako bi uključili rezultate od dvije diskriminacije kao nagradu kako bi vodili obuku generatora pitanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati u sklopu podataka VQG pokazuju učinkovitost i snažnost našeg model a u usporedbi s nekim modelima stanja umjetnosti u smislu automatske i ljudske procjene metrike.', 'id': 'Generasi Pertanyaan Visual (VQG) bermaksud menanyakan pertanyaan alami tentang gambar secara otomatis. Penelitian yang ada fokus pada model pelatihan untuk cocok dengan set data yang dicatat yang membuatnya tidak berbeda dari tugas generasi bahasa lain. Kami berdebat bahwa pertanyaan alami perlu memiliki dua atribut spesifik dari perspektif konten dan bahasa secara respektif, yaitu, alami dan tulisan manusia. Terinspirasi oleh pengaturan diskriminator dalam pembelajaran lawan, kami menyarankan dua diskriminator, satu untuk setiap atribut, untuk meningkatkan pelatihan. Kemudian kita menggunakan cadangan belajar penggantian untuk memasukkan skor dari dua diskriminator sebagai hadiah untuk memimpin pelatihan generator pertanyaan. Hasil eksperimental pada benchmark dataset VQG menunjukkan efektivitas dan ketepatan model kita dibandingkan dengan beberapa model state-of-the-art dalam terma metrik evaluasi otomatis dan manusia.', 'fa': 'نسل سؤال دیدگانی (VQG) هدف دارد سؤال طبیعی در مورد تصویر خودکار بپرسند. تحقیقات موجود روی مدل آموزش تمرکز می\u200cکند تا به مجموعه داده\u200cهای یادآوری که آن را به کار دیگر نسل زبان بی\u200cاثر می\u200cکند. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که سوالات طبیعی باید دو ویژه خاص از نظر محتویات و زبان\u200cشناسی داشته باشند، یعنی طبیعی و انسان نوشته شده است. توسط تنظیم تفریح کننده در یادگیری دشمنی، دو تفریح کننده پیشنهاد می کنیم، یکی برای هر ویژه، تا آموزش را بیشتر کند. سپس از چهارچوب یادگیری پشتیبانی استفاده می کنیم تا امتیاز از دو فرق کننده را به عنوان پاداش برای هدایت آموزش ژنراتور سوال شامل کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای VQG نشان می\u200cدهد که موثرت و استعداد مدل ما در مقایسه با برخی مدل\u200cهای موجود هنر در مورد متریک\u200cهای خودکار و انسان\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'ko': '시각적 문제 생성(VQG)은 이미지에 대한 자연스러운 문제를 자동으로 제기하도록 설계되었습니다.기존 연구는 주석 데이터 집합에 적응하기 위해 훈련 모델에 중심을 두고 다른 언어의 생성 임무와 무관하게 한다.우리는 내용과 언어의 측면에서 볼 때 자연 문제는 두 가지 특정한 속성, 즉 자연 속성과 인문 속성이 필요하다고 생각한다.대항적 학습에서 감별기 설정의 계발을 받아 우리는 두 개의 감별기, 각 속성을 하나씩 제시하여 훈련을 강화했다.그리고 우리는 강화 학습 프레임워크를 사용하여 두 감별기의 점수를 보상으로 합쳐서 문제 생성기의 교육을 지도한다.기준 VQG 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 일부 가장 선진적인 모델에 비해 우리의 모델은 자동과 인공 평가 지표에 있어 모두 효과적이고 노봉적이다.', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji wa swali la Visual (VQG) linalenga kuuliza maswali ya asili kuhusu picha moja kwa moja. Utafiti uliopo unajikita kwenye muundo wa mafunzo ili kupata takwimu zilizotajwa zinazofanya kuwa tofauti na kazi za vizazi vingine vya lugha. Tunahoji kuwa maswali ya asili yanahitaji kuwa na mifano miwili maalumu kutoka kwenye mtazamo wa maudhui na lugha kwa namna fulani, yaani, asilia na binadamu. Kuhamasishwa na kutengeneza ubaguzi katika kujifunza upinzani, tunapendekeza wabaguzi wawili, mmoja kwa kila namna, ili kuongeza mafunzo. Kisha tunatumia mfumo wa kujifunza kuunganisha score kutoka kwa wale wawili wa ubaguzi kama malipo ya kuongoza mafunzo ya mtengenezaji wa swali. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti ya taarifa za VQG yanaonyesha ufanisi na ubora wa muundo wetu ukilinganishwa na baadhi ya mifano ya sanaa kwa namna zote za upasuaji binadamu.', 'af': "Name Bestaande ondersoek fokus op onderwerp model om die aanmerkte data stel te pas wat dit onbelangrik maak van ander taal generasie taak. Ons argumenteer dat natuurlike vrae moet twee spesifieke eienskappe hê van die perspeksies van inhoud en lingwisiese respektief, naamlik natuurlike en mens-skryf. In die instelling van diskrimineerder in teëstandige leer, voorstel ons twee diskrimineerders, een vir elke eienskap om die onderwerp te verbeter. Ons gebruik dan die versterking leer raamwerk om scores van die twee diskrimineerders te inkorporeer as die loon om die onderwerp van die vraaggenereerder te lei. Eksperimentale resultate op 'n benchmark VQG-datastel vertoon die effektiviteit en kragtigheid van ons model vergelyk met sommige staat-van-kuns-modelle in terms van beide automatiese en menslike evalueringsmetries.", 'tr': 'Görnüş Sorag Jemi (VQG) surat barada tebigy soraglary otomatik bilen soramak maksady edýär. Öň bar ylmy modinde nähili diller döretmäge netijesi ýok etmek üçin bilim namaýyşlaryna gollanýar. Biz tebigy soraglary diýip pikir edip otyrýarys. Mazmunlaryň we lingwistikiň görnüşlerinden, tebigy we adamlaryň ýazylan perspektiden iki hasaplanyň bar. Düşman öwrenmelerinde diskriminatçy guruldygyndan, biz her bir sowgat üçin iki diskriminatçy, okuwçy bejermek üçin bir teklip berýäris. Soňra biz bu iki diskriminatçylaryň hatlaryny ýeterlik öwrenmesini guramak üçin ýeterlik sistemasyny ulanýarys. VQG veri setiginiň üstünde örän netijesi biziň modelimiziň etkinlik we güýçligini, otomatik we adamlaryň değerlendirmegi metriklerine degişli käbir sanat modellerine deňleýär.', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i Pyetjeve Vizuale (VQG) synon të bëjë pyetje natyrore rreth një imazhi automatikisht. Kërkimi ekzistues përqëndrohet në modelin e stërvitjes për të përshtatur grupin e të dhënave të anotuara që e bën të indiferent nga detyrat e tjera të gjenerimit të gjuhës. Ne argumentojmë se pyetjet natyrore duhet të kenë dy atribute specifike nga perspektiva e përmbajtjes dhe respektivisht gjuhësore, veçanërisht natyrore dhe të shkruara nga njerëzit. Inspiruar nga vendosja e diskriminuesit në mësimin kundërshtar, ne propozojmë dy diskriminues, një për çdo atributë, për të përmirësuar trajnimin. Pastaj përdorim kuadrin e mësimit të forcimit për të përfshirë rezultatet e dy diskriminuesve si shpërblim për të udhëzuar trajnimin e gjeneratorit të pyetjeve. Rezultatet eksperimentale në një bazë të dhënash VQG tregojnë efektshmërinë dhe fuqinë e modelit tonë krahasuar me disa modele më të moderne në lidhje me metrikat e vlerësimit automatik dhe njerëzor.', 'am': 'የvisual ጥያቄ አቀማመጥ የቋንቋ ትውልድ አድራጊዎች ከሌሎች ትውልድ ትውልድ አድራጊዎች የሚለየውን የዳታ ማሰሪያ ማቀናቀል የሚያስፈልገውን ትምህርት ማድረግ ሞዴል ላይ የሚያስፈልግ ነው፡፡ ባሕላዊ ጥያቄዎች፣ ፍጥረታዊ እና የሰው ጽሑፍ፣ ከጥያቄ እና ቋንቋዊ ጥያቄ ሁለት የተለየ ጥያቄ እንዲኖሩ እንከራከራለን፡፡ በተቃዋሚ ትምህርት ላይ የሚለዩትን አዋጅ በማስገድ እናስገልጣለን፤ አንዱ ለሁሉም ትምህርት እንዲያበዛ እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በኋላ የጥያቄውን አዋጅ ማስተማርን ፍሬም ለመቀበል የሁለት ተቃዋሚዎች ነጥቦችን ለመቀናቀል እናበረታለን፡፡ የህትመት ውጤቶች የVQG ዳታ ማተሚያ ላይ የሞዴል ውጤት እና ልብስነትን በተለየ ብሔራዊ እና የሰው አካል ማተሚያ ማተሚያ ይታያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) aims to ask natural questions about an image automatically.  Գոյություն ունի ուսումնասիրություններ, որոնք կենտրոնանում են ուսուցման մոդելի վրա, որպեսզի համապատասխանեն annoted տվյալների համակարգին, որը դարձնում է այն անտարբեր այլ լեզուների ստեղծման խնդիրներից: Մենք պնդում ենք, որ բնական հարցերը պետք է ունենան երկու հատուկ առանձնահատկություն պարունակության և լեզվաբանական տեսանկյունից, հատկապես բնական և մարդկային գրված: Հոգեշնչված հակառակորդ ուսումնասիրության մեջ խտրականների միջոցով, մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու խտրականներ, մեկը յուրաքանչյուր առանձնահատկության համար, որպեսզի բարելավենք ուսումնասիրությունը: Այնուհետև մենք օգտագործում ենք ուժեղացման ուսուցման շրջանակը, որպեսզի ներառենք երկու խտրականների գնահատականները որպես պարգև հարցի գեներատորի ուսուցման ուղղությամբ: ՎիԿԳ տվյալների համակարգի վերաբերյալ փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս մեր մոդելի արդյունավետությունը և կայունությունը, համեմատած որոշ նորագույն մոդելների հետ՝ ինչպես ավտոմատիկ, ինչպես նաև մարդկային գնահատման մետրիկների առումով:', 'de': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) zielt darauf ab, natürliche Fragen zu einem Bild automatisch zu stellen. Bestehende Forschung konzentriert sich auf Trainingsmodelle, um den annotierten Datensatz anzupassen, der ihn gegenüber anderen Sprachgenerierungsaufgaben gleichgültig macht. Wir argumentieren, dass natürliche Fragen aus inhaltlicher und sprachlicher Sicht zwei spezifische Attribute haben müssen, nämlich natürlich und menschlich geschrieben. Inspiriert von der Einstellung des Diskriminierers im kontradierenden Lernen schlagen wir zwei Diskriminierer vor, einer für jedes Attribut, um das Training zu verbessern. Wir verwenden dann das Enhancement Learning Framework, um die Ergebnisse der beiden Diskriminierer als Belohnung für das Training des Fragegenerators einzubeziehen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse auf einem Benchmark-VQG-Datensatz zeigen die Effektivität und Robustheit unseres Modells im Vergleich zu einigen State-of-the-Art-Modellen sowohl hinsichtlich automatischer als auch menschlicher Bewertungsmetriken.', 'az': 'Görünür sual nəzəriyyəti (VQG) şəkillər haqqında təbiətli sual soruşmaq istəyir. Əvvəlki təhsil modeli ilə təhsil edilən məlumatların qurğusuna uymaq üçün həmin təhsil məlumatlarını başqa dil nəzəriyyətlərindən ayırd edir. Biz təbiətli sualların məlumatların və dilində yazılmış perspektivlərindən iki məxluqat olması lazım olduğunu iddia edirik. Düşmənçilik öyrənməsində diskriminator qurulmasından təşkil edilmişik, hər bir təhsil üçün iki diskriminator təşkil edirik, təhsil artırmaq üçün. Sonra iki diskriminatçıdan mükafatları birləşdirmək üçün yenilənmək öyrənmə framework ünü istifadə edirik. VQG verilənlər qutusunda təcrübə sonuçları modelimizin ehtimallığını və güclüyünü göstərir, bəzi sanat modelləri də otomatik və insan değerlendirməsi metrikləri ilə müqayisədə.', 'bn': 'দৃশ্যমান প্রশ্ন প্রজন্ম (ভিকিউজি) এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি ছবির ব্যাপারে প্রাকৃতিক প্রশ্ন জিজ্ঞেস করা। বিদ্যমান গবেষণা প্রশিক্ষণ মডেলের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে যে তথ্যের সাথে যোগ দিতে পারে, যা অন্য ভাষা প্রজন্মের কাজ থেকে  আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে প্রাকৃতিক প্রশ্নের দুই বিশেষ দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং ভাষার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে দুটি বিশেষ বৈশিষ্ট্য আছ বিরোধী শিক্ষায় বৈষম্যের স্থাপনের প্রতি অনুপ্রার্থনা করে, আমরা প্রশিক্ষণ বৃদ্ধি করার জন্য দুই বৈষম্যের প্রস্তাব দিচ্ছি। তারপর আমরা ব্যবহার করি প্রশ্ন জেনারেটরের প্রশিক্ষণের প্রশিক্ষণ হিসেবে দুই বৈষম্যের স্কোর অন্তর্ভুক্ত করার জন্য শিক্ষা শিক্ষা কা ভিকিউজি ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং মানুষের মূল্যবোধ মেট্রিক উভয়ের তুলনায় আমাদের মডেলের কার্যকর এবং রোবশান্তি প্রদর্শন করে।', 'ca': "Visual Question Generation (VQG) aims to ask natural questions about an image automatically.  La recerca actual es centra en un model de formació que encaixi en el conjunt de dades anotats que la fa indiferent d'altres tasques de generació de llenguatges. Afirmem que les preguntes naturals han de tenir dos atributs específics des de la perspectiva del contingut i lingüístic respectivament, a saber, natural i escrit per humans. Inspirat per la configuració del discriminator en l'aprenentatge adversari, proposem dos discriminators, un per cada atribut, per millorar l'entrenament. Després utilitzem el marc d'aprenentatge de reforç per incorporar puntuacions dels dos discriminators com a recompensa per guiar l'entrenament del generador de preguntes. Experimental results on a benchmark VQG dataset show the effectiveness and robustness of our model compared to some state-of-the-art models in terms of both automatic and human evaluation metrics.", 'cs': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) si klade za cíl automaticky klást přirozené otázky týkající se obrázku. Stávající výzkum se zaměřuje na tréninkový model, který odpovídá anotované datové sadě, která ho činí lhostejným vůči ostatním úkolům generace jazyků. Tvrdíme, že přirozené otázky musí mít dva specifické atributy z hlediska obsahu a jazyka, a to přirozené a lidsky psané. Inspirováni nastavením diskriminačního prostředí v protivním učení navrhujeme dva diskriminační osoby, jeden pro každý atribut, pro zlepšení tréninku. Poté používáme rámec posilování učení k začlenění skóre od obou diskriminačních subjektů jako odměnu pro vedení výcviku generátoru otázek. Experimentální výsledky na benchmarkovém datovém souboru VQG ukazují efektivitu a robustnost našeho modelu ve srovnání s některými nejmodernějšími modely z hlediska metrik automatického i lidského hodnocení.', 'bs': 'Generacija vizuelnih pitanja (VQG) ima cilj da postavlja prirodna pitanja o sliki automatski. Postoje istraživanja fokusiraju se na model treninga kako bi se uklopila u nizam noteiranih podataka koji ga čini neovisnim od drugih zadataka generacije jezika. Tvrdimo da prirodna pitanja moraju imati dva specifična atributa iz perspektiva sadržaja i lingvističkog odnosa, a to je prirodno i ljudsko pisano. Inspirirano postavljanjem diskriminacije u neprijateljskom učenju, predlažemo dva diskriminacija, jedan za svaki atribut, da poboljšamo obuku. Onda koristimo okvir učenja pojačanja kako bi uključili rezultate od dvije diskriminacije kao nagradu da bi vodili obuku generatora pitanja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na standardnom setu podataka VQG pokazuju učinkovitost i robustnost našeg model a u usporedbi s nekim modelima stanja umjetnosti u smislu automatske i ljudske procjene metrike.', 'et': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) eesmärk on esitada pildi kohta loomulikke küsimusi automaatselt. Olemasolevad teadusuuringud keskenduvad koolitusmudelile, mis sobib märgitud andmekogumiga, mis muudab selle teiste keele genereerimise ülesannete suhtes ükskõikseks. Väidame, et loomulikel küsimustel peavad olema sisu ja keelelise vaatenurgast kaks konkreetset atribuuti, nimelt loomulik ja inimkirjutatud. Inspireerituna diskrimineerija seadmisest konkurentsiõppes, pakume välja kaks diskrimineerijat, üks iga atribuudi kohta, et parandada koolitust. Seejärel kasutame tugevdatud õpperaamistikku, et lisada kahelt diskrimineerijalt saadud tulemused tasuks, et suunata küsimuste generaatori koolitust. VQG võrdlusandmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad meie mudeli tõhusust ja tugevust võrreldes mõnede kaasaegsete mudelitega nii automaatse kui ka inimese hindamise mõõdikute osas.', 'fi': 'Visual Question Generation (VQG) pyrkii esittämään luonnollisia kysymyksiä kuvasta automaattisesti. Nykyisessä tutkimuksessa keskitytään koulutusmalliin, joka sopii muistiinpanoituun aineistoon, joka tekee siitä välinpitämättömän muista kielisukupolvien tehtävistä. Väitämme, että luonnollisilla kysymyksillä on oltava kaksi erityistä ominaisuutta sisällön ja kielellisen näkökulman näkökulmasta, eli luonnollinen ja ihmisen kirjoittama. Oppimisen diskriminaattorin asettamisen innoittamana ehdotamme kahta diskriminaattoria, yksi kutakin attribuuttia kohti, koulutuksen tehostamiseksi. Tämän jälkeen käytämme vahvistuksen oppimiskehystä sisällyttääksemme kahden syrjijän pisteet palkintona opastamaan kysymystekijän koulutusta. Kokeelliset tulokset VQG-vertailuaineistosta osoittavat mallimme tehokkuuden ja kestävyyden verrattuna uusimpiin malleihin sekä automaattisen että inhimillisen arvioinnin mittareiden osalta.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Ana tafiyar da shirin fitina masu hushi a kan misalin mafarin da za'a fito da tsarin data da aka sanar da shi wanda yana da buƙata daga aikin zayen wata harshe. Tuna jãyayya da cewa masu tambayar asiyya sun ƙayyade su da wasu misãlai biyu masu ƙayyade daga wurãren muhimmada da ke cikin linguistic, mainlin, da rubutun mutum. An Inspire wa'anar da mai rarrabi a cikin karanta mai motsi, za mu buɗa masu fasalin biyu, kuma ɗayansu ga kõwane halin, dõmin ya ƙara wa aikin. Sa'an nan kuma za Mu yi amfani da firam masu ƙaranci dõmin Mu haɗa nufi daga biyu masu fasalin, kamar sakamakon ya shirya wa mai matsayin mai tambayar. Experimental results on a benchmark VQG dataset show the effectiveness and robustness of our model compared to some state-of-the-art models in terms of both automatic and human evaluation metrics.", 'sk': 'Cilj ustvarjanja vizualnih vprašanj (VQG) je samodejno postaviti naravna vprašanja o sliki. Obstoječe raziskave se osredotočajo na model usposabljanja, ki ustreza naboru podatkov z oznakami, zaradi česar je brezbrižen od drugih nalog ustvarjanja jezikov. Trdimo, da morajo imeti naravna vprašanja z vidika vsebine oziroma jezikovnega vidika dva specifična atributa, in sicer naravna in človeško pisana. V navdihu z postavitvijo diskriminatorja v kontradiktorskem učenju predlagamo dva diskriminatorja, enega za vsak atribut, za izboljšanje usposabljanja. Nato uporabimo okrepitveni učni okvir za vključitev rezultatov obeh diskriminatorjev kot nagrado za usmerjanje usposabljanja generatorja vprašanj. Eksperimentalni rezultati referenčnega nabora podatkov VQG kažejo učinkovitost in robustnost našega modela v primerjavi z nekaterimi najsodobnejšimi modeli v smislu samodejnih in človeških meritev.', 'he': 'יצירת שאלות חזותיות (VQG) מתכוונת לשאול שאלות טבעיות על תמונה באופן אוטומטי. מחקר קיים מתמקד על מודל אימון כדי להתאים את קבוצת הנתונים המכתבות שעושה אותו לא שונה משימות יוצר שפות אחרות. אנחנו מתווכחים ששאלות טבעיות צריכות להיות שתי תכונות ספציפיות מהמבט של התוכן והשפתיים, במיוחד, טבעיות וכתבות אנושיות. השראה על ידי הסדרה של דיסקרמינג ללמוד יריבי, אנו מציעים שני דיסקרמינגים, אחד לכל תכונה, כדי לשפר את האימונים. ואז אנחנו משתמשים במסגרת הלימודים של התגבורה כדי להכיל נקודות משני המפרשים כפרס כדי להדריך את האימונים של גנרטור השאלות. תוצאות ניסיוניות על רמת נתונים VQG מראות את היעילות וחזקה של המודל שלנו בהשוואה למודלים חדשים במטריות הערכה אוטומטית וגם אנושית.', 'jv': 'Visual Resolution Saying Awak dhéwé weruh-weruh nganggo kesempatan dadi kudu ngejaraké durung sing nyimpen karo perspektan karo aléntuk karo jèn-jèn, nambah, dadi sak lan basa-jèn. Mbok saiki ono wektu nggawe Delimir sing wis ana ing nggawe lemari pakan, awak dhéwé suweke petani sing duwe, éwé kanggo sabên atiribute, ngéwé ngerayakno tresnaning. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem nggawe aturan awak dhéwé nggawe gerakan kelas mrogram iki, nik awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan dhéwé wis nguasai perusahaan winih dhéwé. Perintah sing paling-paling ngengambar VqG dataset kuwi nggawe efekat karo sistem sing gawe nguasai perusahaan karo model sing ditambahak perusahaan sistem dadi-perusahaan langgar sampeyan sistem dadi otomatik karo akeh lanjut menehi metika dadi.', 'bo': 'མཐོང་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་བཟོ་བྱ་དང་། VQG་གིས་གཟུགས་རིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གཟུགས་རིས་སྐོར་དུ་བསམ་དགོས། Existing research focus on training model to fit the annotated data set that makes it indifferent from other languages generation tasks. ང་ཚོས་རང་བཟོས་བའི་དྲི་བ་དག་ལ་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ནང་དོན་དང་སྐད་རིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་མཐོང འུ་ཅག་གི་ཁྱད་དོན་དབང་གི་ཤེས་ཚད་ལ་discriminatory་པོ་ཞིག་གི་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱས་པ་ལས། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྒྱ་ནག་ནང་དུ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་གཉ འོན་ཀྱང་། Experimental results on a benchmark VQG dataset show the effectiveness and robustness of our model compared to some state-of-the-art models in terms of both automatic and human evaluation metrics.'}
{'en': 'Enhancing Sentence Embedding with Generalized Pooling', 'ar': 'تعزيز تضمين الجملة مع التجميع المعمم', 'pt': 'Aprimorando a incorporação de sentenças com pooling generalizado', 'fr': "Améliorer l'intégration des phrases grâce à la mise en commun généralisée", 'es': 'Mejora de la incrustación de oraciones con la agrupación generalizada', 'ja': '一般化されたプーリングで文章の埋め込みを強化する', 'zh': '用广义池化增强句子嵌入', 'ru': 'Усиление внедрения предложения с помощью обобщенного объединения', 'hi': 'सामान्यीकृत पूलिंग के साथ वाक्य एम्बेडिंग बढ़ाना', 'ga': 'Feabhas a chur ar Phianbhreith a Leabú le Comhthiomsú Ginearálaithe', 'ka': 'გენერალიზებული პოლინგის სიტყვების დამატება', 'el': 'Ενίσχυση της ενσωμάτωσης των προτάσεων με τη γενικευμένη ομαδοποίηση', 'hu': 'Az ítéletek beágyazásának javítása általános összevonással', 'it': "Migliorare l'integrazione delle sentenze con il pooling generalizzato", 'kk': 'Жалпы Pooling- мен ендірілген сөз', 'mk': 'Зголемување на вклопувањето на реченици со генерализирано спојување', 'lt': 'Didinti nuosprendžių įtraukimą į bendrą susivienijimą', 'ms': 'Meningkatkan Penjelmaan Hukuman dengan Kumpulan Umum', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ പോളിങ്ങിനോടൊപ്പം വിധിക്കുന്ന ശിക്ഷയുടെ എംബെഡിങ് കൂടുതലാക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Titjib fl-inkorporazzjoni tas-Sentenzi permezz ta’ raggruppament Ġeneralizzat', 'mn': 'Үүнийг нэмэгдүүлэх', 'no': 'Forstørr innbygging av teikn med generellisert pooling', 'pl': 'Wzmocnienie osadzania zdań za pomocą ogólnego łączenia', 'ro': 'Îmbunătățirea încorporării sentințelor cu gruparea generalizată', 'sr': 'Повећавање приказа са генерализираним појављањем', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය පූලින් එක්ක වාර්තාව සඳහා වාර්තාව', 'so': 'Horumarinta qalabka daryeelka la xiriira booliska', 'sv': 'Förbättring av meningar med allmän pooling', 'ta': 'பொதுவாக்கப்பட்ட போலிங்குடன் வாக்குறிப்பை அதிகரிக்கிறது', 'ur': 'جنرالیزڈ پولینگ کے ساتھ سنٹنس ایمبڈینگ زیادہ کر رہی ہے', 'uz': 'Sensorning oĘ»lchamini kattalashtirish', 'vi': 'Tăng cường hình ảnh đơn giản', 'bg': 'Увеличаване на вграждането на изречения с общото обединяване', 'hr': 'Povećavajući integraciju izraza sa generaliziranim skupljanjem', 'da': 'Forbedring af dommens indlejring med generel pooling', 'nl': 'Verbetering van het insluiten van zinnen met algemene pooling', 'de': 'Verbesserte Einbettung von Sätzen durch generalisiertes Pooling', 'id': 'Meningkatkan Penciptaan Sentence dengan Pooling Umum', 'fa': 'افزایش سخنرانی با جمع\u200cسازی عمومی', 'ko': '광의지로 문장의 삽입을 강화하다', 'sw': 'Kuboresha Makosa ya Hukumu na Ujumbe', 'tr': 'Däpli Pooling bilen Sözler Girişinde', 'af': 'Verbeter Sense Inbêer met Generaliseer Pooling', 'am': 'Enhancing Sentence Embedding with Generalized Pooling', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi i përfshirjes së dënimeve me bashkimin e gjeneralizuar', 'hy': 'Մեծացնել նախադասությունների ներգրավումը ընդհանուր համախմբման միջոցով', 'az': 'SĆ¶zlĆ¼yĆ¼ Generalized Pooling ilÉ™ Ę¸lavÉ™ Et', 'bs': 'Povećavajući integraciju izraza sa generaliziranim skupljanjem', 'bn': 'সাধারণ পোলিং এর সাথে শাস্তি বেডিং বৃদ্ধি করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': "millorar l'integració de sentences amb una reunió generalitzada", 'fi': 'Lausekkeen upottamisen tehostaminen yleiseen yhdistämiseen', 'et': 'Lause põimimise suurendamine üldise koondamisega', 'cs': 'Zlepšení vložení vět pomocí obecného sdružení', 'jv': 'miter', 'he': 'שיפור השתלב של גזרות עם ריכוב כללי', 'sk': 'Povečanje vključevanja stavkov s splošnim združevanjem', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྒྲིག་ཚིག་རྣམ་པ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་གཏོང་དུ་གཏོང་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Pooling is an essential component of a wide variety of sentence representation and embedding models. This paper explores generalized pooling methods to enhance sentence embedding. We propose vector-based multi-head attention that includes the widely used max pooling, mean pooling, and scalar self-attention as special cases. The model benefits from properly designed penalization terms to reduce redundancy in multi-head attention. We evaluate the proposed model on three different tasks : natural language inference (NLI), author profiling, and sentiment classification. The experiments show that the proposed model achieves significant improvement over strong sentence-encoding-based methods, resulting in state-of-the-art performances on four datasets. The proposed approach can be easily implemented for more problems than we discuss in this paper.', 'es': 'La agrupación es un componente esencial de una amplia variedad de modelos de representación e incrustación de oraciones. Este artículo explora los métodos generalizados de agrupación para mejorar la incrustación de oraciones. Proponemos la atención multicabezal basada en vectores que incluye la ampliamente utilizada agrupación máxima, agrupación media y autoatención escalar como casos especiales. El modelo se beneficia de términos de penalización diseñados adecuadamente para reducir la redundancia en la atención multicabezal. Evaluamos el modelo propuesto en tres tareas diferentes: inferencia de lenguaje natural (NLI), elaboración de perfiles de autores y clasificación de sentimientos. Los experimentos muestran que el modelo propuesto logra una mejora significativa con respecto a los métodos basados en la codificación de oraciones sólidas, lo que resulta en rendimientos de última generación en cuatro conjuntos de datos. El enfoque propuesto se puede implementar fácilmente para más problemas de los que discutimos en este documento.', 'fr': "La mise en commun est une composante essentielle d'une grande variété de modèles de représentation et d'intégration de phrases. Cet article explore les méthodes de mise en commun généralisées pour améliorer l'intégration des phrases. Nous proposons une attention multi-têtes basée sur le vecteur qui inclut le regroupement maximal, le regroupement moyen et l'auto-attention scalaire largement utilisés comme cas spéciaux. Le modèle bénéficie de termes de pénalisation correctement conçus pour réduire la redondance dans l'attention multi-têtes. Nous évaluons le modèle proposé sur trois tâches différentes\xa0: l'inférence du langage naturel (NLI), le profilage de l'auteur et la classification des sentiments. Les expériences montrent que le modèle proposé obtient une amélioration significative par rapport aux méthodes fortes basées sur le codage de phrases, ce qui se traduit par des performances de pointe sur quatre ensembles de données. L'approche proposée peut être facilement mise en œuvre pour un plus grand nombre de problèmes que ce que nous discutons dans cet article", 'ar': 'يعتبر التجميع مكونًا أساسيًا لمجموعة متنوعة من نماذج تمثيل الجملة والتضمين. تستكشف هذه الورقة طرق التجميع المعممة لتعزيز تضمين الجملة. نقترح الانتباه متعدد الرؤوس المستند إلى المتجهات والذي يتضمن الحد الأقصى للتجميع المستخدم على نطاق واسع ، والتجميع المتوسط ، والاهتمام الذاتي القياسي كحالات خاصة. يستفيد النموذج من شروط العقوبات المصممة بشكل صحيح لتقليل التكرار في الاهتمام متعدد الرؤوس. نقوم بتقييم النموذج المقترح في ثلاث مهام مختلفة: الاستدلال اللغوي الطبيعي (NLI) ، وصف المؤلف ، وتصنيف المشاعر. تظهر التجارب أن النموذج المقترح يحقق تحسنًا كبيرًا على الأساليب القوية القائمة على ترميز الجملة ، مما أدى إلى أحدث العروض على أربع مجموعات بيانات. يمكن تنفيذ النهج المقترح بسهولة لمشاكل أكثر مما نناقشه في هذه الورقة.', 'pt': 'O agrupamento é um componente essencial de uma ampla variedade de modelos de representação e incorporação de sentenças. Este artigo explora métodos generalizados de agrupamento para aprimorar a incorporação de sentenças. Propomos atenção multi-cabeças baseada em vetores que inclui o pooling máximo, pooling médio e autoatenção escalar amplamente usados como casos especiais. O modelo se beneficia de termos de penalização projetados adequadamente para reduzir a redundância na atenção de várias cabeças. Avaliamos o modelo proposto em três tarefas diferentes: inferência de linguagem natural (NLI), perfil do autor e classificação de sentimentos. Os experimentos mostram que o modelo proposto alcança uma melhoria significativa em relação aos métodos baseados em codificação de sentenças fortes, resultando em desempenhos de última geração em quatro conjuntos de dados. A abordagem proposta pode ser facilmente implementada para mais problemas do que discutimos neste artigo.', 'ja': 'プーリングは、多種多様な文章表現と埋め込みモデルの必須コンポーネントです。文の埋め込みを強化するための一般化されたプーリング方法を探求する。特別なケースとして、広く使用されている最大プーリング、平均プーリング、スカラー自己注目を含むベクトルベースの多頭部注目を提案します。このモデルは、マルチヘッド注意の冗長性を減らすために適切に設計されたペナルティ用語の恩恵を受けています。提案されたモデルを、自然言語推論（ NLI ）、著者プロファイリング、感情分類の3つの異なるタスクで評価する。実験は、提案されたモデルが強力な文符号化ベースの方法よりも大幅な改善を達成し、４つのデータセット上で最先端のパフォーマンスをもたらすことを示している。提案されたアプローチは、本稿で説明するよりも多くの問題に対して容易に実装することができる。', 'zh': '池化者,诸句所以为嵌模之要组成部分。 本文讨增强句嵌广义池化法。 建矢量之多头,博用之大池化,均值池化标量自异。 其法益正计之罚,以省多头意之冗余。 参伍论形,自然语言理(NLI),析情类也。 实验明,比于强句编码之法,形成显改,以成四数集上最先进之性。 其于本文者,可以易成其术。', 'hi': 'पूलिंग वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व और एम्बेडिंग मॉडल की एक विस्तृत विविधता का एक आवश्यक घटक है। यह पेपर वाक्य एम्बेडिंग को बढ़ाने के लिए सामान्यीकृत पूलिंग विधियों की पड़ताल करता है। हम वेक्टर-आधारित बहु-सिर ध्यान का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जिसमें व्यापक रूप से उपयोग किए जाने वाले अधिकतम पूलिंग, मतलब पूलिंग और विशेष मामलों के रूप में अदिश आत्म-ध्यान शामिल हैं। मॉडल को बहु-सिर ध्यान में अतिरेक को कम करने के लिए ठीक से डिज़ाइन किए गए दंड शर्तों से लाभ होता है। हम तीन अलग-अलग कार्यों पर प्रस्तावित मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं: प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान (एनएलआई), लेखक प्रोफाइलिंग, और भावना वर्गीकरण। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल मजबूत वाक्य-एन्कोडिंग-आधारित तरीकों पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करता है, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप चार डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन होते हैं। प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण को इस पेपर में चर्चा की तुलना में अधिक समस्याओं के लिए आसानी से लागू किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'Объединение является важным компонентом широкого спектра моделей представления и встраивания предложений. В этой статье рассматриваются обобщенные методы объединения для улучшения встраивания предложений. Мы предлагаем векторное многоголовое внимание, которое включает широко используемое максимальное объединение, среднее объединение и скалярное самовнимание в качестве особых случаев. Модель извлекает выгоду из правильно разработанных условий штрафных санкций, чтобы уменьшить избыточность в многоголовом внимании. Мы оцениваем предлагаемую модель по трем различным задачам: естественный языковой вывод (NLI), профилирование авторов и классификация настроений. Эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемая модель достигает значительного улучшения по сравнению с сильными методами, основанными на кодировании предложений, что приводит к современным характеристикам на четырех наборах данных. Предлагаемый подход может быть легко реализован для решения большего числа проблем, чем мы обсуждаем в настоящем документе.', 'ga': 'Is comhpháirt riachtanach é comhthiomsú de raon leathan de léiriú abairtí agus de shamhlacha neadaithe. Scrúdaíonn an páipéar seo modhanna comhthiomsaithe ginearálaithe chun leabú abairtí a fheabhsú. Molaimid aird ilcheann veicteoir-bhunaithe a áiríonn an comhthiomsú uasta a úsáidtear go forleathan, comhthiomsú meánach, agus féinaird scálach mar chásanna speisialta. Baineann an tsamhail leas as téarmaí pionóis atá deartha i gceart chun iomarcaíocht aird ilcheann a laghdú. Déanaimid measúnú ar an tsamhail atá beartaithe ar thrí thasc éagsúla: tátal nádúrtha teanga (NLI), próifíliú údair, agus rangú meon. Léiríonn na turgnaimh go mbaineann an tsamhail atá beartaithe feabhas suntasach amach ar mhodhanna láidre ionchódú abairtí, rud a fhágann go bhfuil léirithe den scoth ar cheithre thacar sonraí. Is féidir an cur chuige atá beartaithe a chur i bhfeidhm go héasca le haghaidh níos mó fadhbanna ná mar a phléimid sa pháipéar seo.', 'el': 'Η ομαδοποίηση αποτελεί βασικό στοιχείο μιας ευρείας ποικιλίας μοντέλων αναπαράστασης και ενσωμάτωσης προτάσεων. Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά γενικευμένες μεθόδους συγκέντρωσης για την ενίσχυση της ενσωμάτωσης προτάσεων. Προτείνουμε τη διανυσματική πολλαπλή προσοχή που περιλαμβάνει τη ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενη μέγιστη συγκέντρωση, τη μέση συγκέντρωση και την κλιμακωτή αυτοπροσοχή ως ειδικές περιπτώσεις. Το μοντέλο επωφελείται από κατάλληλα σχεδιασμένους όρους ποινής για να μειώσει την πλεονάζουσα προσοχή σε πολλαπλές κεφαλές. Αξιολογούμε το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο σε τρία διαφορετικά καθήκοντα: συμπέρασμα φυσικής γλώσσας (NLI), προφίλ συγγραφέα και ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει σημαντική βελτίωση έναντι των ισχυρών μεθόδων κωδικοποίησης προτάσεων, με αποτέλεσμα τις επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε τέσσερα σύνολα δεδομένων. Η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση μπορεί εύκολα να εφαρμοστεί για περισσότερα προβλήματα από όσα συζητάμε στο παρόν έγγραφο.', 'hu': 'Az összevonás a mondatok széles választékának és beágyazási modelljeinek alapvető eleme. Ez a tanulmány általános összevonási módszereket vizsgál a mondatok beágyazásának javítására. Vektoralapú többfejű figyelmet ajánlunk, amely különleges esetekként magában foglalja a széles körben használt max pooling, az átlagos pooling és a skaláris önfigyelmet. A modell előnyös a megfelelően kialakított büntetési feltételekből, hogy csökkentse a többfejű figyelem redundanciáját. A javasolt modellt három különböző feladat alapján értékeljük: természetes nyelvi következtetés (NLI), szerzői profilozás és érzelmi osztályozás. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell jelentős javulást ér el az erős mondatkódoláson alapuló módszerekhez képest, ami négy adathalmaz korszerű teljesítményét eredményezi. A javasolt megközelítés könnyen végrehajtható több probléma esetén, mint amennyit ebben a dokumentumban megvitatunk.', 'ka': 'პროგრამის გამოსახულება უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი კომპონენტია, რომელიც მნიშვნელოვანია მნიშვნელოვანი მოდელების გამოსახულება. ეს წერტილის განსხვავება განსხვავებული სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა სხვადასხვა. ჩვენ გვეძლევთ ვიქტორის მრავალთან მნიშვნელოვანი აღმოჩენება, რომელიც საშუალოდ გამოყენებული მაქსი დაყენება, საშუალო დაყენება და სკალარის თავიდან აღმოჩენებ მოდელის გამოიყენება მარტივი განაზღვრებული პენალიზაციის განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომ მრავალთან გონიშვნელობის შემცირებით გამოიყენება. ჩვენ სამი განსხვავებული დავალების მოდელის შესაბამისი მოდელის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი მუშაობა: ნახვა ენის ინფრენცია (NLI), ავტორის პროფილეცია და სენტიმენტის კ ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ მოწყობილობული მოდელი ძალიან უფრო მეტი გააკეთებს ძალიან ძალიან სიტყვების კოდენქციის მეტისთვის, რომელიც წარმოიდგინეთ სამყარო პრობლემები უფრო მეტი პრობლემებისთვის ადვილედ შეიძლება გამოყენება, ვიდრე ჩვენ ამ დომენტში განვისაუბრებთ.', 'it': "Il pooling è una componente essenziale di un'ampia varietà di modelli di rappresentazione e incorporazione delle frasi. Questo articolo esplora i metodi di pooling generalizzati per migliorare l'embedding delle frasi. Proponiamo l'attenzione multi-testa basata su vettori che include il pool massimo ampiamente utilizzato, il pool medio e l'auto-attenzione scalare come casi speciali. Il modello beneficia di termini di penalizzazione correttamente progettati per ridurre la ridondanza nell'attenzione multi-testa. Valutiamo il modello proposto su tre diversi compiti: inferenza del linguaggio naturale (NLI), profilazione dell'autore e classificazione sentiment. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il modello proposto raggiunge un miglioramento significativo rispetto a metodi basati sulla codifica di frasi forti, con conseguente performance all'avanguardia su quattro set di dati. L'approccio proposto può essere facilmente applicato per più problemi di quelli discussi in questo documento.", 'mk': 'Здружувањето е суштински компонент на широка разлика на претставување на речениците и вградување на модели. Овој весник ги истражува генерализираните методи на спојување за подобрување на вградувањето на речениците. Предложуваме внимание со повеќето глави базирано на вектори, кое вклучува широко употребено максимално спојување, средно спојување и скаларно себеси внимание како специјални случаи. Моделот има корист од соодветно дизајнирани услови за казнување за намалување на отпуштањето на вниманието на повеќето глави. We evaluate the proposed model on three different tasks: natural language inference (NLI), author profiling, and sentiment classification.  Експериментите покажуваат дека предложениот модел постигнува значително подобрување во однос на силните методи базирани на кодирање на речениците, што резултира со најсовремени изведувања на четири податоци. Предложениот пристап може лесно да се спроведе за повеќе проблеми отколку што разговараме во овој документ.', 'lt': 'Sujungimas yra esminis įvairių sakinių aprašymo ir įtraukimo modelių komponentas. Šiame dokumente nagrinėjami bendrieji sutelkimo metodai siekiant pagerinti sakinių įtraukimą. Siūlome skirti daugiapakopį dėmesį vektoriams, kuris apima plačiai naudojamą maksimalų susijungimą, vidutinį susijungimą ir skalinį savarankišką dėmesį kaip specialius atvejus. Modeliui taikomos tinkamai sukurtos baudžiamosios sankcijos sąlygos, siekiant sumažinti atleidimą iš darbo daugiašaliu dėmesiu. Siūlomą model į vertiname trimis skirtingomis užduotimis: gamtinės kalbos išvados (NLI), autorių profiliavimas ir jausmų klasifikavimas. Eksperimentai rodo, kad siūlomas modelis gerokai pagerina griežtus sakinių kodavimo metodus, todėl keturių duomenų rinkinių rezultatai yra moderni. Siūlomas požiūris gali būti lengvai įgyvendinamas sprendžiant daugiau problemų nei aptariame šiame dokumente.', 'kk': 'Пулинг - көп түрлі мәліметтерді көрсету мен ендіру үлгілерінің негізгі компоненті. Бұл қағаз сөздерді ендіру үшін жалпы біріктіру әдістерін зерттейді. Біз вектордың негізінде көптеген көптеген бірнеше назарды ұсынып тастаймыз. Бұл көптеген максималды біріктіру, орташа біріктіру және өзінің максималды назарды арнаулы жағда Бұл үлгі бірнеше басып тұратын қайталау шарттарынан шығарылады. Біз келтірілген үш түрлі тапсырманың үлгісін бағалаймыз: табиғи тілдерінің бақылауы (NLI), автор профилизациясы және сезімдер классификациясы. Тәжірибелер таңдалған үлгісінің төрт деректер жиындарында күшті мәліметтер кодтамасынан негізделген әдістерді өзгертуге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл қағаздың көп мәселелері үшін оңай істеуге болады.', 'ms': 'Pengumpulan adalah komponen penting bagi pelbagai persembahan kalimat yang luas dan model embedding. Kertas ini mengeksplorasi kaedah pengumpulan secara umum untuk meningkatkan penyambungan kalimat. Kami cadangkan perhatian multi-kepala berasaskan vektor yang termasuk pengumpulan maksimum yang digunakan secara luas, pengumpulan rata-rata, dan perhatian skalar diri sebagai kes istimewa. Model bermanfaat dari terma penalisasi yang direka dengan betul untuk mengurangi kelebihan dalam perhatian berbilang-kepala. Kami menilai model yang diusulkan pada tiga tugas yang berbeza: kesimpulan bahasa alam (NLI), profil penulis, dan klasifikasi perasaan. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas kaedah berdasarkan pengekodan kalimat yang kuat, yang mengakibatkan penampilan state-of-the-art pada empat set data. Pendekatan yang diusulkan boleh mudah dilaksanakan untuk lebih banyak masalah daripada yang kita bincangkan dalam kertas ini.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയും പ്രദര്\u200dശിദ്ധമായ മോഡലുകളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഘടകം. ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d പൂലിങ്ങ് രീതികള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d വെക്ടര്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായിട്ടുള്ള പലിതലയുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വിശിഷ്ടമായ കേസുകളായി ഉപയോഗിക് പലതലയിലെ ശ്രദ്ധ കുറയ്ക്കുന്നതിനായി നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട ശിക്ഷയുടെ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും മോഡല്\u200d ഉപകാരമ മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത ജോലികളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിലയിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ അപകടത് പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d നാല് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ശക്തിയായ വാക്ക്-കോഡിങ് അടിസ The proposed approach can be easily implemented for more problems than we discuss in this paper.', 'mt': "Il-ġbir flimkien huwa komponent essenzjali ta’ varjetà wiesgħa ta’ rappreżentazzjoni tas-sentenzi u mudelli ta’ inkorporazzjoni. Dan id-dokument jesplora metodi ġeneralizzati ta’ raggruppament biex itejjeb l-inkorporazzjoni tas-sentenzi. Aħna nipproponu attenzjoni b'ħafna ras ibbażata fuq il-vetturi li tinkludi l-pooling massimu użat ħafna, il-pooling medju, u l-awtonomija skalari bħala każijiet speċjali. Il-mudell jibbenefika minn termini ta’ penalizzazzjoni mfassla kif suppost biex jitnaqqas is-sensja f’attenzjoni b’ħafna nies. Aħna jevalwaw il-mudell propost dwar tliet kompiti differenti: inferenza lingwistika naturali (NLI), profilar tal-awtur, u klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti. L-esperimenti juru li l-mudell propost jikseb titjib sinifikanti fuq metodi b’saħħithom ibbażati fuq l-ikkodifikar tas-sentenzi, li jirriżulta f’prestazzjonijiet l-aktar avvanzati fuq erba’ settijiet ta’ dejta. L-approċċ propost jista’ jiġi implimentat faċilment għal aktar problemi milli niddiskutu f’dan id-dokument.", 'no': 'Pooling er ein viktig komponent av ein brei variasjon setningssrepresentasjon og innbyggingsmodeller. Denne papiret utforskar generelle pooling- metodar for å forbetra setningar. Vi foreslår vektorbasert fleire hovudmerksomhet som inkluderer den breidde brukte maksimale pooling, gjennomsnittlige pooling og skalar selvmerksomhet som spesielle tilfeller. Modellen brukar frå rett utforma penaliseringsvilkåra for å redusera reduksjon i fleire hovud. Vi evaluerer den foreslåde modellen på tre ulike oppgåver: naturspråk-infeksjon (NLI), autoprofiling og sentimentklassifikasjon. Eksperimentane viser at den foreslåde modellen gjer signifikante forbedringar over sterke setningskodingsbaserte metodar, som fører til at kunsthandlingane er tilstand på fire datasett. Foreslått tilnærming kan lett implementerast for fleire problemer enn vi diskuterer i denne papiret.', 'mn': 'Бүлэг нь олон янз бүрийн өгүүлбэр илэрхийлэл болон загваруудын чухал хэсэг юм. Энэ цаас өгүүлбэрийг нэмэгдүүлэхэд ерөнхийлөгчийн нийлүүлэх аргыг судалдаг. Бид вектор суурилсан олон толгой анхаарлыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь хамгийн их хэрэглэгддэг хамгийн том нийлүүлэлт, дундаж нийлүүлэлт, өөрийгөө онцгой тохиолдол болгон өөртөө анхаарлын төвлөрөө Энэ загвар нь олон толгой анхаарлыг багасгах боломжтой төлөвлөгөөс зөв зохион байгуулсан шалтгааныг ашигладаг. Бид санал өгсөн загварыг 3 өөр ажил дээр үнэлэх: байгалийн хэл халдвар (NLI), зохиолчдын профилийн, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хуваалцаа. Тэдгээр туршилтууд санал өгсөн загвар нь хүчирхэг өгүүлбэрийн кодлогын үндсэн арга загвараас илүү сайжруулагддаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь 4 өгөгдлийн санд урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны төлөө байдаг. Үүний тухай санал өгсөн арга зам нь бидний энэ цаасан дээр ярилцдаг асуудлыг олон асуудлын тулд амархан үйлдвэрлэх боломжтой.', 'pl': 'Łączenie jest niezbędnym elementem szerokiej gamy modeli reprezentacji zdań i osadzania. Niniejszy artykuł bada uogólnione metody łączenia w celu poprawy osadzania zdań. Proponujemy wektorową uwagę wielu głów, która obejmuje szeroko stosowane maksymalne pooling, średnie pooling i skalarną uwagę na siebie jako specjalne przypadki. Model korzysta z odpowiednio zaprojektowanych terminów karnych, aby zmniejszyć redundancję w uwadze wielu głów. Oceniamy proponowany model na trzech różnych zadaniach: wnioskowania języka naturalnego (NLI), profilowania autora i klasyfikacji sentymentów. Eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowany model osiąga znaczącą poprawę w stosunku do silnych metod kodowania zdań, co powoduje najnowocześniejsze wydajności na czterech zbiorach danych. Proponowane podejście można łatwo wdrożyć w przypadku większej liczby problemów niż omawiamy w niniejszym artykule.', 'ro': 'Punerea în comun este o componentă esențială a unei game largi de modele de reprezentare a frazelor și încorporare. Această lucrare explorează metodele generalizate de punere în comun pentru a îmbunătăți încorporarea propozițiilor. Propunem atenția bazată pe vectori multi-cap, care include combinarea maximă utilizată pe scară largă, combinarea medie și auto-atenția scalară ca cazuri speciale. Modelul beneficiază de termeni de penalizare proiectați corespunzător pentru a reduce redundanța în atenția multi-cap. Evaluăm modelul propus pe trei sarcini diferite: inferența limbajului natural (NLI), profilarea autorului și clasificarea sentimentelor. Experimentele arată că modelul propus obține îmbunătățiri semnificative față de metodele puternice bazate pe codificarea frazelor, rezultând performanțe de ultimă oră pe patru seturi de date. Abordarea propusă poate fi implementată cu ușurință pentru mai multe probleme decât discutăm în acest document.', 'sr': 'Kupljanje je ključni komponent široke razne reprezentacije rečenica i uključujuće modele. Ovaj papir istražuje generalizirane metode okupljanja za unapređenje rečenica. Predlažemo vektorsku multiglavnu pažnju koja uključuje široko korišteno maksimalno okupljanje, srednje okupljanje i skalarnu pažnju na sebe kao posebne slučajeve. Model koristi od pravilno dizajniranih kaznenih uslova da smanji redundanciju u multiglavnoj pažnji. Procjenjujemo predloženi model na tri različita zadatka: prirodna infekcija jezika (NLI), profiliranje autora i klasifikacija sentimenta. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je predloženi model postigao značajno poboljšanje nad jakim metodama na osnovu kodiranja rečenica, što je rezultiralo izvedbi države umjetnosti na četiri seta podataka. Predloženi pristup se može lako provesti za više problema nego o kojima razgovaramo u ovom papiru.', 'so': 'Qiimeyntu waa qeyb muhiim ah oo ka mid ah noocyo kala duduwan oo ku saabsan qeybo kala duduwan oo kaliya. Qoraalkan ayaa baaraandegay hababka basaaska si uu u kordhiyo ciqaabka. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa daryeel badan oo ku saabsan wadooyinka lagu isticmaalay meelaha ugu badnaan ee la isticmaalayo baabuurta, baaritaanka, islamarkaasna si gaar ah u fiirsashada. Kaalmada modellka ayaa si hagaagsan loogu talagalay sharciga ciqaabka si uu u hoosaysiiyo daryeelka madaxa badan. We evaluate the proposed model on three different tasks: natural language inference (NLI), author profiling, and sentiment classification.  Imtixaanka waxaa muuqanaya in qaababka la soo jeeday ay uu soo kordhin karo mid aad u weyn oo ka sii kordhisan qaabab xoog leh oo ku qoran qoraalka codsiga, taasoo sababta sameynta farshaxanka oo ku qoran afar databases. Dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday waxaa si fudud looga soo dejin karaa dhibaatooyin badan oo aan warqaddan ka sheekayno.', 'sv': 'Pooling är en viktig komponent i en mängd olika meningsrepresentationer och inbäddade modeller. Denna uppsats undersöker generaliserade poolingsmetoder för att förbättra meningsinbäddning. Vi föreslår vektorbaserad multi-head uppmärksamhet som inkluderar den allmänt använda max pooling, medelpooling och skalar självuppmärksamhet som specialfall. Modellen drar nytta av korrekt utformade straffvillkor för att minska redundans i multi-head uppmärksamhet. Vi utvärderar den föreslagna modellen utifrån tre olika uppgifter: naturlig språkinferens (NLI), författarprofilering och sentimentklassificering. Experimenten visar att den föreslagna modellen uppnår betydande förbättringar jämfört med starka meningskodningsbaserade metoder, vilket resulterar i state-of-the-art prestanda på fyra dataset. Det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet kan enkelt genomföras för fler problem än vi diskuterar i detta dokument.', 'ta': 'வாக்கியத்தின் குறிப்பு மற்றும் உள்ளிடும் மாதிரிகளின் முக்கியமான பொருள். இந்த தாள் பொதுவாக்கும் முறைகளை மேம்படுத்த வாக்கியத்தை பொதுவாக்குகிறது. நாங்கள் வெக்டர் அடிப்படையில் பல தலைப்பு கவனத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் அது அதிகப்படியாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட உச்சரிக்கப்பட்ட உச்சரிக்க பல தலைப்புகளின் கவனத்தை குறைக்க முடியும் மாதிரி பயன்பாடு நாம் மூன்று வித்தியாசமான பணிகளில் முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம்: இயற்கையான மொழி புரியும் (NLI),  பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி நான்கு தரவு அமைப்புகளில் வலிமையான வாக்கு குறியீட்டு முறையில் முன்னேற்றத்தை பெறுகிறது என்பதை காட்ட இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் விவாதம் செய்வதை விட அதிக பிரச்சனைகளுக்கு சுலபமாக பயன்படுத்த முடியும்.', 'si': 'පුලින්ග් එක තමයි විශාල විදියට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් සහ සංවිධානයක් තියෙන්නේ. මේ පැත්තේ සාමාන්\u200dය පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා වාක්ය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න. අපි වෙක්ටර් අධාරිත විශේෂ විශේෂ අවධානය කරනවා විශේෂ අවධානයක් වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙනවා. මොඩල් එක හරියටම සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් හිත අවධා අපි වෙනස් වෙනස් වැඩක් තුනක් විදියට ප්\u200dරතියෝජනය කරනවා: ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය (NLI), ලේඛකය ප්\u200dරතියෝ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට බලාපොරොත්තු වාක්ය-සංකේතය-සංකේතයේ  අපි මේ පත්තරයේ කතා කරන්න වඩා වැඩි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලේසියෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළ', 'ur': 'پولینگ ایک بہت سی مختلف جماعت کی اجازت ہے اور موڈل میں داخل کرنا۔ یہ کاغذ جرائل پولینگ طریقوں کی تحقیق کرتا ہے کہ مجلس انڈینگ کو زیادہ کریں۔ ہم ویکتور کی بنیاد پر متعدد سر کی توجه پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو وسیع طور پر استعمال کیا جاتا ہے سب سے زیادہ پولینگ، متعدد پولینگ، اور مخصوص کیسوں کے طور پر اپنی توجه کا ذریعہ استعمال کرتا ہے. موڈل بہت سی سروں کی توجه میں بہت زیادتی کم کرنے کے لئے ٹھیک طراحی کے مجازات شرط سے فائدہ دیتا ہے. ہم نے تین مختلف کاموں پر پیشنهاد کی موڈل کا ارزش کیا ہے: طبیعی زبان نازل (NLI), لیکور پروفایل اور احساسات کلاسپیٹ. آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی موڈل مضبوط جماعت-اکنوڈینگ-بنیادی طریقے پر بہت اضافہ ہوتی ہے، اور چار ڈیٹ سٹ پر اضافہ کرتی ہے. پیشنهاد کی طریقہ ہم اس کاغذ میں بحث کرنے سے زیادہ مشکلات کے لئے آسان طریقے سے کامل کر سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Koʻrsatiladigan soʻzning ko'pchilik va koʻpaytirish modellarining muhim komponenti. Bu qogʻoz gapirishni oshirish uchun umumiy yordamlarni o'rganadi. Biz vektor asosida ko'plab boshqaruvchiga qarang. Bu juda ko'plab ishlatilgan maksimal soʻzni qo'yish, ma'lum suhbat, va o'zimni boshqa holatlarga o'zgartirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik boshqaruvchisini kamaytirish uchun model qoʻllaniladi. Biz uchta boshqa vazifalarda o'ylab topilgan modelni qiymatmiz: tabiiy tilning kasalliklari (NLI), mualliflar profiling, va hissiyotning darajasini. Name The proposed approach can be easily implemented for more problems than we discuss in this paper.", 'vi': 'Phân loại là một thành phần thiết yếu của nhiều cách đại diện và xếp hình khác nhau. Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu các phương pháp khuếch đại hợp pháp làm tăng khả năng: Chúng tôi đề xuất sự chú ý đa chiều các véc- tơ bao gồm cả tụ điểm tối đa phổ biến, tụ họp ý nghĩa, và tự giác vảy như những trường hợp đặc biệt. Mô hình này có lợi từ những từ phạt được thiết kế thích đáng để giảm bớt sự chú ý. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu đề xuất về ba nhiệm vụ khác nhau: ám chỉ ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLl), phân tích tác giả, và phân loại cảm xúc. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy kiểu mẫu này đạt đến một sự tiến bộ đáng kể hơn các phương pháp mã hóa bản án mạnh mẽ, dẫn đến các trình độ hiện đại trên bốn bộ dữ liệu. Cách tiếp cận đề xuất có thể dễ dàng được áp dụng cho nhiều vấn đề hơn là chúng ta thảo luận trong tờ giấy này.', 'da': 'Pooling er en væsentlig komponent i en lang række sætningsrepræsentations- og indlejringsmodeller. Denne artikel undersøger generaliserede pooling metoder til at forbedre sætningsindlejring. Vi foreslår vektorbaseret multi-head opmærksomhed, der omfatter den almindeligt anvendte max pooling, middel pooling og skalar selvopmærksomhed som særlige tilfælde. Modellen drager fordel af korrekt designede straffebetingelser for at reducere redundans i multi-head opmærksomhed. Vi evaluerer den foreslåede model på tre forskellige opgaver: naturlig sproginference (NLI), forfatterprofilering og sentiment klassificering. Eksperimenterne viser, at den foreslåede model opnår betydelige forbedringer i forhold til stærke sætningskoding-baserede metoder, hvilket resulterer i state-of-the-art performance på fire datasæt. Den foreslåede fremgangsmåde kan nemt gennemføres for flere problemer, end vi diskuterer i dette dokument.', 'de': 'Pooling ist ein wesentlicher Bestandteil einer Vielzahl von Satzdarstellungs- und Einbettungsmodellen. Diese Arbeit untersucht generalisierte Pooling-Methoden, um die Einbettung von Sätzen zu verbessern. Wir schlagen vektorbasierte Multi-Head-Aufmerksamkeit vor, die das weit verbreitete Max Pooling, Mean Pooling und skalare Selbstaufmerksamkeit als Sonderfälle umfasst. Das Modell profitiert von richtig gestalteten Strafbarkeitsbegriffen, um Redundanz in der Mehrköpfigkeit zu reduzieren. Wir evaluieren das vorgeschlagene Modell anhand von drei verschiedenen Aufgaben: Natural Language Inference (NLI), Autorenprofiling und Sentiment Classification. Die Experimente zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell signifikante Verbesserungen gegenüber starken satzkodierenden Methoden erzielt, was zu State-of-the-Art Performances auf vier Datensätzen führt. Der vorgeschlagene Ansatz kann für mehr Probleme leicht umgesetzt werden, als wir in diesem Papier diskutieren.', 'hr': 'Kupljanje je ključni komponent široke razne reprezentacije rečenica i uključujući modele. Ovaj papir istražuje generalizirane metode skupljanja kako bi poboljšala uključenje rečenica. Predlažemo višeglavnu pažnju na vektoru koja uključuje široko korišteno maksimalno okupljanje, srednje skupljanje i skupljanje samopouzdanja kao posebne slučajeve. Model koristi od pravilno dizajniranih kaznenih uvjeta kako bi smanjila redundanciju u multiglavnoj pažnji. Procjenjujemo predloženi model na tri različita zadatka: prirodna infekcija jezika (NLI), profiliranje autora i klasifikacija osjećaja. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je predloženi model postigao značajno poboljšanje nad jakim metodama na osnovu kodiranja rečenica, što je rezultiralo učinkovitosti stanja umjetnosti na četiri seta podataka. Predloženi pristup se može lako provesti za više problema nego o kojima razgovaramo u ovom papiru.', 'nl': 'Pooling is een essentieel onderdeel van een breed scala aan zinsrepresentatie- en inbeddingsmodellen. Dit artikel onderzoekt generaliseerde pooling methoden om het inbedden van zinnen te verbeteren. We stellen vector-based multi-head aandacht voor die de wijd gebruikte max pooling, gemiddelde pooling en scalaire zelfaandacht als speciale gevallen omvat. Het model profiteert van goed ontworpen straftermen om redundantie in meerkoppige aandacht te verminderen. We evalueren het voorgestelde model op drie verschillende taken: Natural Language Inference (NLI), auteursprofilering en sentiment classificatie. De experimenten tonen aan dat het voorgestelde model significante verbetering bereikt ten opzichte van sterke zinnencodering gebaseerde methoden, resulterend in state-of-the-art prestaties op vier datasets. De voorgestelde aanpak kan gemakkelijk worden geïmplementeerd voor meer problemen dan we in dit document bespreken.', 'bg': 'Обединяването е съществен компонент на голямо разнообразие от модели за представяне на изречения и вграждане. Тази статия изследва обобщените методи за обединяване за подобряване на вграждането на изречения. Предлагаме векторно базирано многоглаво внимание, което включва широко използваното максимално обединяване, средно обединяване и скаларно самовнимание като специални случаи. Моделът се възползва от правилно проектирани наказателни условия за намаляване на излишното внимание на няколко глави. Оценяваме предложения модел на три различни задачи: извод на естествения език (НЛИ), профилиране на авторите и класификация на сантименталните чувства. Експериментите показват, че предложеният модел постига значително подобрение в сравнение със силните методи на кодиране на изречения, което води до най-съвременни изпълнения върху четири набора от данни. Предложеният подход може лесно да се приложи при повече проблеми, отколкото обсъждаме в настоящата статия.', 'id': 'Berkumpulan adalah komponen penting dari berbagai macam persembahan kalimat dan model embedding. Kertas ini mengeksplorasi metode pooling generalisasi untuk meningkatkan penerbangan kalimat. Kami mengusulkan perhatian multi-kepala berbasis vektor yang termasuk pengumpulan maksimum yang luas digunakan, pengumpulan berarti, dan perhatian diri skalar sebagai kasus khusus. Model ini berguna dari istilah penalisasi yang direncanakan dengan benar untuk mengurangi redundansi dalam perhatian multi-kepala. Kami mengevaluasi model yang diusulkan pada tiga tugas yang berbeda: inferensi bahasa alam (NLI), profil penulis, dan klasifikasi sentimen. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas metode berdasarkan pengakuan kalimat yang kuat, yang menyebabkan prestasi terbaik pada empat set data. Pendekatan yang diusulkan dapat mudah dieksploitasi untuk lebih banyak masalah daripada yang kita bicarakan di kertas ini.', 'ko': '연못은 각종 문장의 표시와 삽입 모델의 중요한 구성 부분이다.본고는 문장의 삽입을 강화하는 광의지 방법을 탐구하였다.우리는 광범위하게 사용되는 최대 연못, 평균 연못, 표량 자기주의를 포함하여 벡터를 바탕으로 하는 다중 주의를 제시했다.이 모델은 다두부 주의 중의 군더더기를 줄이기 위해 적절하게 설계된 벌칙 조항 덕분이다.우리는 세 가지 다른 임무에서 이 모델, 즉 자연언어추리(NLI), 저자 묘사와 감정 분류를 평가했다.실험에 의하면 강한 문장 인코딩을 바탕으로 하는 방법에 비해 이 모델은 현저한 개선을 얻었고 네 개의 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻었다.제시한 방법은 본문에서 토론한 문제보다 더욱 실현하기 쉽다.', 'sw': 'Udanganyiko ni sehemu muhimu ya uwakilishi wa hukumu mbalimbali na kutengeneza mifano. Gazeti hili linatafuta njia za kupunguza kwa ujumla ili kuongeza hukumu inayoingizwa. We propose vector-based multi-head attention that includes the widely used max pooling, mean pooling, and scalar self-attention as special cases.  Utawala huo unanufaika kutoka kwenye vipindi vya adhabu vizuri ili kupunguza kiwango cha uchunguzi katika mitazamo ya watu wengi. Tunatathmini muundo wa pendekezo katika kazi tatu tofauti: Ugonjwa wa lugha asili (NLI), mwandishi anayetangaza na kutangaza hisia. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa muundo huo unapendekezwa unapata maboresho makubwa zaidi ya mbinu kali za kupanua hukumu, na kusababisha matumizi ya sanaa katika seti nne za takwimu. Mfumo huu unapendekezwa unaweza kutekelezwa kirahisi kwa matatizo mengi kuliko tunavyojadili katika gazeti hili.', 'fa': 'جمع کردن یک بخش اصلی از نمایش\u200cهای مختلف جمله و مدل\u200cهای جمع کردن است. این کاغذ روش\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری عمومی را برای افزایش جمله\u200cها تحقیق می\u200cکند. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم توجه بسیاری از سرهای ویکتوری که شامل جمع شدن بیشتری استفاده می\u200cشود، متوسط جمع کردن، و توجه خود را به عنوان پرونده\u200cهای ویژه استفاده می\u200cکند. این مدل از شرایط مجازات درست طراحی شده برای کاهش بیشتر توجه به سرهای زیادی سود می دهد. ما مدل پیشنهاد را بر سه کار متفاوت ارزیابی می کنیم: آلودگی زبان طبیعی (NLI), پروفایل نویسنده و گروه احساسات. آزمایش ها نشان می دهند که مدل پیشنهاد بر روی روش\u200cهای قوی بر اساس رمزبندی کردن جمله\u200cها بهتر شدنی می\u200cیابد، و به نتیجه\u200cی اجرای موقعیت هنری روی چهار مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها می\u200cرسد. این روش پیشنهاد برای مشکلات بیشتری از آنچه در این کاغذ بحث می\u200cکنیم، آسان است.', 'sq': 'Bashkimi është një komponent thelbësor i një varieteti të gjerë të përfaqësimit të fjalëve dhe përfshirjes së modeleve. Kjo letër eksploron metoda të gjeneralizuara të bashkimit për të përmirësuar përfshirjen e fjalëve. Ne propozojmë vëmendje me shumë koka të bazuar në vektor që përfshin bashkimin maksimum të përdorur gjerësisht, bashkimin mesatar dhe vetëvëmendjen skalare si raste të veçanta. Modeli përfiton nga kushtet penalizuese të projektuara siç duhet për të reduktuar redundancën në vëmendjen me shumë koka. Ne vlerësojmë modelin e propozuar në tre detyra të ndryshme: inferencën natyrore të gjuhës (NLI), profilimin e autorëve dhe klasifikimin e ndjenjave. The experiments show that the proposed model achieves significant improvement over strong sentence-encoding-based methods, resulting in state-of-the-art performances on four datasets.  Përqasja e propozuar mund të zbatohet lehtë për më shumë probleme sesa diskutojmë në këtë letër.', 'af': "Pooling is 'n nuwe komponent van 'n wyde verskillende setinge voorstelling en inbêring modele. Hierdie papier ondersoek generelliseerde pooling metodes om sentence inbetering te verbeter. Ons voorstel vektor-gebaseerde multikop aandag wat die vaste gebruikte maksimum pooling, bediende pooling en skalar self-aandag as spesiale gevalle. Die model is voordeel van goeie ontwerp sodanige bedrywe om redundansie in multikop aandag te verminder. Ons evalueer die voorgestelde model op drie verskillende taak: natuurlike taal inferensie (NLI), outeurprofielling en sentiment klasifikasie. Die eksperimente wys dat die voorgestelde model betaling verbetering oor sterke seting-enkodering-gebaseerde metodes bereik word, wat resultaat in staat-van-kuns-uitvoerings op vier datastelle. Die voorgestelde toegang kan maklik vir meer probleme implementeer word as ons in hierdie papier bespreek.", 'tr': 'Pooling is a wide variety of sentence representation and embedding models. Bu kagyz sözleriň içine gelişmek üçin döredilik pooling yöntemleri keşfedýär. Biz vektöre tabanlı çoklu başlı dikkati teklif ediyoruz ki büyük kullanılan max pooling, ortalama pooling ve özlerini özel durumlar gibi takarlar. Model köp kelläň ünsüni azaltmak üçin dogry tassyklanan syýallardan gowy gazanýar. Biz teklip eden nusgany üç dürli zada deňleýäris: tebigy dil alçakçylyk (NLI), awtorlary profil we duýgular klasifikasynda. Denminatlar teklip eden nusganyň güýçli sözlem kodlemesi döwletlerinde has gowurak gazandygyny görkezýär. Bu dört sanat düzümlerinde möhüm bir şekilde üýtgedýär. Mazmunlar guruldygy ýagdaýda gürrüň edenimizden köp kynçylyklar üçin aňsatlyk ýüze çykyp biler.', 'am': 'ፖሊስ በተለየ የቁጥጥር መልዕክት እና አካባቢ ሞዴላዎችን የሚያስፈልገው የግድ ክፍል ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የውይይት አካባቢ የውይይት አካባቢ አካባቢ መሆኑን ይፈልጋል፡፡ የሜክሮር አካባቢ፣ የመጠቀም ጉዳይ እና የተለየ የራሳቸውን ጉዳይ እና የተለየ ጉዳይ እንዲሆን የሚጠቀሙትን የብዙ ራስ አሳብ እናስባለን፡፡ የሞዴል ጥቃት በብዙ አነስተኛ አሳብ ለማሳነስ ከክፍለ ሥርዓት የተደረገ ነው፡፡ በሦስት ልዩ ስራ ላይ የተዘጋጀውን ሞዴል እናረጋግጣለን፤ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ድካም (NLI), የጸሐፊ ደብዳቤ እና የስሜት ክፍል ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎቹ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል በአራቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ በጽኑ የፊደል ክፍል-የድምፅ አካባቢ ሥርዓት እንዲደረግ ያሳያል፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ ከመነጋገር የበዛ ችግር ለመፈጸም ይቀላል፡፡', 'hy': "Միացումը բազմաթիվ նախադասությունների ներկայացման և ներառման մոդելների կարևոր բաղադրիչ է: Այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է ընդհանուր համախմբման մեթոդներ, որոնք օգնում են բարելավել նախադասությունների ներգրավումը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք վեկտորով հիմնված բազմագլխավոր ուշադրություն, որը ներառում է լայնորեն օգտագործված մաքսային հավաքածությունը, միջին հավաքածությունը և սկալար ինքնաուշադրությունը որպես հատուկ դեպքեր: The model benefits from properly designed penalization terms to reduce redundancy in multi-head attention.  Մենք գնահատում ենք նախագծված մոդելը երեք տարբեր խնդիրների վրա' բնական լեզվի հետևանքների (ՆԼԱ), հեղինակի պրոֆիլներ և զգացմունքների դասակարգում: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոդելը կարևոր բարելավում է նախադասությունների կոդավորման հիմնված ուժեղ մեթոդների մեջ, ինչը հանգեցնում է չորս տվյալների ամենաբարձր արդյունքների: The proposed approach can be easily implemented for more problems than we discuss in this paper.", 'bn': 'পলিং হচ্ছে বিশাল বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের রায় প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং বিভিন্ন মডেলের গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ। এই পত্রিকাটি জেনারেলিভাবে পুলিং পদ্ধতি বৃদ্ধি করতে পারে। আমরা ভেক্টর ভিত্তিক বহুমাত্রার মনোযোগ প্রস্তাব করছি যার মধ্যে ব্যাপক ব্যবহৃত সর্বোচ্চ পুলিং, মানে পুলিং এবং বিশেষ কেস হিসেব মাধ্যমের মনোযোগ কমানোর জন্য মডেলের সুবিধা সঠিকভাবে নির্ধারিত শাস্তির শর্ত থেকে সুবিধা প্রদান করে। আমরা প্রস্তাবিত মডেল তিনটি ভিন্ন কাজের উপর মূল্য দিচ্ছি: প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার আক্রান্ত (এনলিআই), লেখক প্রোফাইলিং এবং আবেগের ব এই পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল চারটি ডাটাসেটে শক্তিশালী বাক্য-এনকোডিং-ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতির উপর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নতি পায় এই প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি আমরা এই কাগজে আলোচনার চেয়ে বেশী সমস্যার জন্য সহজে প্রয়োগ করতে পারি।', 'bs': 'Kupljanje je ključni komponent široke razne reprezentacije rečenica i uključujući modele. Ovaj papir istražuje generalizirane metode skupljanja kako bi poboljšala uključenje rečenica. Predlažemo višeglavnu pažnju na vektoru koja uključuje široko korišteno maksimalno okupljanje, srednje okupljanje i skalarno samopouzdanje kao posebne slučajeve. Model koristi od pravilnog dizajniranog kaznenog uvjeta kako bi smanjila redundanciju u multiglavnoj pažnji. Procjenjujemo predloženi model na tri različita zadatka: prirodna infekcija jezika (NLI), profil autora i klasifikacija osjećaja. Eksperimenti pokazuju da je predloženi model postigao značajno poboljšanje nad jakim metodama na osnovu kodiranja rečenica, što je rezultiralo izvedbi države umjetnosti na četiri seta podataka. Predloženi pristup se može lako provesti za više problema nego o kojima razgovaramo u ovom papiru.', 'ca': "La combinació és un component essencial d'una gran varietat de models de representació de frases i incorporació. Aquest paper explora mètodes generalitzats de reunió per millorar l'integració de frases. Proposem una atenció multicapaça basada en vectors que inclou la combinació màxima generalitzada, la mitjana de combinació, i l'autoatenció escalària com a casos especials. The model benefits from properly designed penalization terms to reduce redundancy in multi-head attention.  Evaluam el model proposat en tres tasques diferents: inferència natural del llenguatge (NLI), perfil d'autors i classificació del sentiment. Els experiments demostren que el model proposat aconsegueix una millora significativa en relació amb mètodes forts basats en codificació de frases, resultant en actuacions actuals en quatre conjunts de dades. L'enfocament proposat pot ser implementat fàcilment per a més problemes del que parlem en aquest paper.", 'az': 'Pooling müxtəlif cümlələr göstəricisi və modellərin əsas komponenti. Bu kağıt cümlələri inkişaf etmək üçün genel pooling metodlarını keşfetir. Biz vektor-tabanlı çox başlıq təsiri təklif edirik ki, genişliyi istifadə edilən max pooling, orta pooling və özlərini özlərinə xüsusi məsələlər kimi skalar edir. Model çoxlu başlıqlarda azaltmaq üçün düzgün tasarlanmış cəzalandırma şartlarından faydalanır. Biz təklif etdiyimiz modeli üç müxtəlif işlərdə değerləşdiririk: təbiətli dil infeksiyonu (NLI), yazıcı profili və hisslər klasifikasyonu. Həyatlar göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş modellərin güclü cümlələr kodlama metodları üzərində möhkəm təmizlənməsini sağlar və dörd verilən qurbanlarda sanat performansları olaraq təmizlənir. Bu təklif metodları bu kağıtda danışdığımızdan daha çox problemlər üçün asanlıqla istifadə edilə bilər.', 'cs': 'Sdružení je základní součástí široké škály modelů reprezentace vět a vkládání vět. Tento článek zkoumá obecné metody sdružování pro zlepšení vkládání vět. Navrhujeme vektorovou pozornost založenou na více hlavách, která zahrnuje široce používané max pooling, střední pooling a skalární sebepozornost jako zvláštní případy. Model těží ze správně navržených penalizačních termínů, které snižují redundanci v pozornosti více hlav. Navržený model hodnotíme na třech různých úlohách: inference přirozeného jazyka (NLI), autorské profilování a klasifikaci sentimentů. Experimenty ukazují, že navržený model dosahuje významného zlepšení oproti silným metodám kódování vět, což vede k nejmodernějším výkonům na čtyřech datových sadách. Navrhovaný přístup lze snadno implementovat pro více problémů, než diskutujeme v tomto článku.', 'fi': 'Yhdistäminen on olennainen osa monia lauseiden esitys- ja upotusmalleja. Tässä artikkelissa tarkastellaan yleisiä yhdistämismenetelmiä lauseiden upottamisen parantamiseksi. Ehdotamme vektoripohjaista monipäistä huomiota, joka sisältää erikoistapauksina laajalti käytetyn max pooling, keskiarvopooling ja skalaarinen itsehuomio. Malli hyötyy asianmukaisesti suunnitelluista rangaistusehdoista, joilla vähennetään monipäisen huomion redundanssia. Arvioimme ehdotettua mallia kolmella eri tehtävällä: luonnollisen kielen päättelyllä (NLI), tekijän profiloinnilla ja tunteiden luokittelulla. Kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli saavuttaa huomattavan parannuksen vahvoihin lausekoodausmenetelmiin verrattuna, mikä johtaa viimeisimpään suorituskykyyn neljässä aineistossa. Ehdotettu lähestymistapa voidaan helposti toteuttaa useammissa ongelmissa kuin tässä asiakirjassa käsitellään.', 'et': 'Ühendamine on oluline osa lausete esitamise ja manustamise erinevatest mudelitest. Käesolevas artiklis uuritakse üldist koondamismeetodeid lausete manustamise parandamiseks. Pakume vektoripõhist mitmepealist tähelepanu, mis hõlmab laialdaselt kasutatavat maksimaalset koondamist, keskmist koondamist ja skalaarset enesetähelepanu erijuhtudena. Mudel saab kasu korralikult kavandatud karistustingimustest, et vähendada koondamist mitme peaga tähelepanu puhul. Hindame väljapakutud mudelit kolmel erineval ülesandel: looduskeele järeldus (NLI), autori profileerimine ja sentimentaalne klassifikatsioon. Katsed näitavad, et kavandatud mudel saavutab olulise paranemise võrreldes tugevate lausekodeerimisel põhinevate meetoditega, mille tulemuseks on nelja andmekogumi moodsad tulemused. Kavandatud lähenemisviisi on lihtne rakendada rohkemate probleemide puhul, kui me käesolevas dokumendis arutame.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness paper size We proposal vector-supported multi-head model Awak dhéwé éntuk model sing nggawe barang telu operasi luwih apa: kelangan anyar luwih (NLI), penulis profil lan kelangan seneng pisar. Where Nalika sing dipunêrung bisa ngejaraké luwih kanggo nggawe perusahaan sing luwih apik kanggo awakdhéwé iki.', 'sk': 'Združevanje je bistvena sestavina različnih modelov predstavitve stavkov in vključevanja stavkov. Ta prispevek raziskuje splošne metode združevanja za izboljšanje vdelave stavkov. Predlagamo vektorsko večglavno pozornost, ki vključuje široko uporabljeno maksimalno združevanje, povprečno združevanje in skalarno samopozornost kot posebne primere. Model ima koristi od ustrezno oblikovanih kazenskih pogojev za zmanjšanje odvečnosti pri večglavni pozornosti. Predlagani model ocenjujemo na treh različnih nalogah: sklepanje naravnega jezika (NLI), profiliranje avtorjev in klasifikacija sentimenta. Poskusi kažejo, da predlagani model doseže znatno izboljšanje v primerjavi z močnimi metodami kodiranja stavkov, kar ima za posledico najsodobnejše delovanje na štirih naborih podatkov. Predlagani pristop se lahko zlahka izvaja za več težav, kot smo razpravljali v tem dokumentu.', 'ha': "Poncin yana da kima mai muhimu wa wasu misãlai masu nuna kuma mai ƙunsa. Wannan takardan na fassara metoden basalin da za'a ƙara cewa da aka shigar da shi. We propose vector-based multi-head attention that includes the widely used max pooling, mean pooling, and scalar self-attention as special cases.  @ info: whatsthis Tuna ƙaddara misalin da aka buƙata a kan aikin uku daban-daban: mala'a cikin harshen asili (NLI), marubuci mai profilin, da fasalin hisani. Ana nuna cewa, misalin da aka buƙata, ya sami babban gyarata mai girma kan hanyoyin bayani na-kodi-baka, yana ƙara cikin mazaɓan-sanawa a kan tsarin dansi huɗu. Tsarako da aka yi niyyar a iya amfani da shi ga masu ƙaranci ko da mu yi magana a cikin wannan takardan.", 'he': 'הבריכה היא רכיבה חיונית של מגוון רחב של מייצג משפטים ומכניס דוגמנים. הנייר הזה חוקר שיטות ריכוב כלליות כדי לשפר את התכנית משפטים. אנו מציעים תשומת לב רב-ראשית מבוססת על ווקטורים שכלולה את האיחוד המקסימום השתמש רחב, האיחוד הממוצע, ואת תשומת לב עצמית סקאלית כמקרים מיוחדים. הדוגמנית תועלת מתנאי העונש המתוכנן כראוי כדי להפחית את השפעה בתשומת לב רב ראשים. אנו מעריכים את המודל המוצע על שלושה משימות שונות: תוצאת שפת טבעית (NLI), פרופיל סופר, וסימון רגשות. הניסויים מראים שהמודל המוצע משיג שיפור משמעותי מעל שיטות חזקות מבוססות על קידום משפטים, מה שהוביל בהופעות חדשות בארבעה קבוצות נתונים. הגישה המוצעת יכולה להפעיל בקלות עבור יותר בעיות מאשר אנחנו מדברים בעיתון הזה.', 'bo': 'ཕྱིར་བསྡུས་ནི་ཚིག་རྟགས་བཀོད་པ་དང་ནང་འདྲེན་པའི་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཆོས་ཤིག་རེད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཡིག་གེ་ལ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་མཐོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྟོགས་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་vector་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་སྣ་གཙོ་བ་ཡིན་པའི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་རྒྱ་ཆེ་ཤོས་སྤྱོད་པའི་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་པའི་མཐུན་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ནང མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་ཕན་ཚུལ་བྱིས་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱས་པའི་འཇུག་སྡུད་ནང་ལས། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་མི་འདྲ་བའི་མིག experiments show that the proposed model achieves significant improvement over strong sentence-encoding-based methods, resulting in state-of-the-art performances on four datasets. གྲོས་འཆར་བྱས་ཟིན་པའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་དེ་ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང'}
{'en': 'CASCADE : Contextual Sarcasm Detection in Online Discussion Forums', 'ar': 'CASCADE: الكشف عن السخرية السياقية في منتديات المناقشة عبر الإنترنت', 'es': 'CASCADE: Detección contextual de sarcasmo en foros de discusión en línea', 'pt': 'CASCADE: detecção contextual de sarcasmo em fóruns de discussão online', 'fr': 'CASCADE\xa0: Détection contextuelle du sarcasme dans les forums de discussion en ligne', 'ja': 'カスケード：オンラインディスカッションフォーラムでのコンテキスト皮肉検出', 'zh': 'CASCADE:在线论坛上下文刺', 'hi': 'कैस्केड: ऑनलाइन चर्चा मंचों में प्रासंगिक व्यंग्य का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'КАСКАД: Контекстное обнаружение сарказма в онлайн дискуссионных форумах', 'ga': 'CASCADE: Brath Sarcasm Comhthéacsúil i bhFóram Díospóireachta Ar Líne', 'ka': 'CASCADE: კონტექსტური საპკასმის განსახულება online diskusion forums', 'hu': 'CASCADE: Kontextuális szarkazmus felismerése az online vitafórumokban', 'el': 'CASCADE: Ανίχνευση Σαρκασμού στο Διαδίκτυο σε φόρουμ συζήτησης', 'it': 'CASCADE: Rilevazione del sarcasmo contestuale nei forum di discussione online', 'lt': 'CASCADE: Kontekstinis sarkazmo nustatymas internetiniuose diskusijų forumuose', 'kk': 'CASCADE: Онлайн дискуссия форумында контексті саркассм табуы', 'mk': 'Детектирање на контекстен сарказам во онлајн форуми за дискусија', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Sarkasma Konteksual dalam Forum Diskusi Online', 'mt': 'CASCADE: Sejbien Kuntest tas-Sarkazmu f’Forom ta’ Diskussjoni Online', 'mn': 'CASCADE: Online Discussion Forums-д Contextual Sarcasm Detection', 'no': 'CASCADE: Kontekstsarkasm-oppdaging i nettdiskusjonsformer', 'ml': 'CASCADE: ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഫോര്\u200dമുകളിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'pl': 'CASCADE: Kontekstowe wykrywanie sarkazmu na forach dyskusyjnych online', 'si': 'CASCADE: සම්බන්ධ සාර්කාස්ම් හොයාගන්න අන්ලයින් විස්තරණ පුරුම්වලට', 'ro': 'CASCADE: Detectarea sarcasmului contextual în forumurile de discuții online', 'sr': 'KASCADE: Kontekstualno detekcije sarkasma u online diskusijskim forumima', 'so': 'CASCADE: Contextual Sarcasm in Online Discussion Forums', 'sv': 'CASCADE: Contextual Sarkasm Detection i diskussionsforum online', 'ta': 'CASCADE: Online Discussion Forums in Contextual Sarcasm Detection', 'ur': 'CASCADE: Online Discussion Forums میں Contextual Sarcasm Detection', 'uz': 'CASCADE: Online disk qilish Forumlarida qidirish', 'vi': 'điểm sát hợp chiến sẽ được thấy ở hiệu chiến dịch tuyệt', 'bg': 'Откриване на контекстуален сарказъм в онлайн дискусионни форуми', 'da': 'CASCADE: Contextual Sarkasme Detection i online diskussionsfora', 'nl': 'CASCADE: Contextuele Sarcasme Detectie in Online Discussieforums', 'hr': 'CASCADE: Kontekstno otkrivanje sarkasma u online diskusijskim forumima', 'de': 'CASCADE: Kontextuelle Sarkasmus-Erkennung in Online-Diskussionsforen', 'ko': 'CASCADE: 온라인 포럼의 컨텍스트 풍자 감지', 'id': 'Deteksi Sarkasme Konteksual di Forum Diskusi Online', 'fa': 'CASCADE: آشنایی سرکسم متوسط در فورمه\u200cهای صحبت آنلاین', 'tr': 'ESADI: Çaltında Diskusiyonlar Forumlarında Kontekstsel Sarkasm Deteksi', 'af': 'CASCADE: Konteksual Sarcasm Deteksie in Online Discussion Forums', 'sw': 'CASCADE: Utafiti wa Masuala ya Kimataifa katika Jukwaa la Majadala ya Mtandaoni', 'sq': 'Detektimi kontekstual i sarkazmit në forumet e diskutimit online', 'am': 'CASCADE: Contextual Sarcasm Detection in Online Discussion Forums', 'az': 'CASCADE: Online Discussion Forums', 'hy': 'CASCADE: Contextual Sarcasm Detection in Online Discussion Forums', 'bn': 'ক্যাসিডে: অনলাইন আলোচনা ফোরামে বিষয়বস্তু সার্কাম ডিটেক্টরেশন', 'bs': 'CASCADE: Kontekstno detekcije sarkasma u online diskusijskim forumima', 'ca': 'CASCADE: Detecció Contextual del Sarcasme en Forus de Discussió Online', 'cs': 'CASCADE: Kontextová detekce sarkasmu v online diskuzních fórech', 'et': 'CASCADE: Kontekstuaalne sarkasmi tuvastamine online arutelufoorumites', 'fi': 'CASCADE: Contextual Sarcasm Detection Online Keskustelufoorumeilla', 'jv': 'C_ASDEE: Kontextual Sarkasm detection in online Diskusion Forward', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'גילוי סרקזם רקסטי בפורומים דיון באינטרנט', 'sk': 'CASCADE: Kontekstualno odkrivanje sarkazma v spletnih forumih za razpravo', 'bo': 'CASCADE: དྲ་ཐོག་གི་བསྟུན་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་མཐོང་བ'}
{'en': 'The literature in automated sarcasm detection has mainly focused on lexical-, syntactic- and semantic-level analysis of text. However, a sarcastic sentence can be expressed with contextual presumptions, background and commonsense knowledge. In this paper, we propose a ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), which adopts a hybrid approach of both content- and context-driven modeling for sarcasm detection in online social media discussions. For the latter, CASCADE aims at extracting contextual information from the discourse of a discussion thread. Also, since the sarcastic nature and form of expression can vary from person to person, CASCADE utilizes user embeddings that encode stylometric and personality features of users. When used along with content-based feature extractors such as convolutional neural networks, we see a significant boost in the classification performance on a large Reddit corpus.', 'ar': 'ركزت الأدبيات في الكشف الآلي عن السخرية بشكل أساسي على التحليل المعجمي والنحوي والدلالي للنص. ومع ذلك ، يمكن التعبير عن الجملة الساخرة بالافتراضات السياقية والخلفية والمعرفة المنطقية. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح أداة ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE) ، والتي تتبنى نهجًا هجينًا لكل من النمذجة القائمة على المحتوى والسياق لاكتشاف السخرية في مناقشات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي عبر الإنترنت. بالنسبة لهذا الأخير ، يهدف CASCADE إلى استخراج المعلومات السياقية من خطاب سلسلة المناقشة. أيضًا ، نظرًا لأن الطبيعة الساخرة وشكل التعبير يمكن أن يختلف من شخص لآخر ، تستخدم CASCADE حفلات الزفاف الخاصة بالمستخدمين التي تشفر سمات الأسلوب والشخصية للمستخدمين. عند استخدامها جنبًا إلى جنب مع مستخلصات الميزات المستندة إلى المحتوى مثل الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية ، نرى زيادة كبيرة في أداء التصنيف على مجموعة Reddit كبيرة.', 'pt': 'A literatura em detecção automatizada de sarcasmo tem focado principalmente na análise de texto em nível lexical, sintático e semântico. No entanto, uma frase sarcástica pode ser expressa com pressupostos contextuais, antecedentes e conhecimento do senso comum. Neste artigo, propomos um detector contextual de sarcasmo (CASCADE), que adota uma abordagem híbrida de modelagem orientada por conteúdo e contexto para detecção de sarcasmo em discussões de mídia social online. Para este último, CASCADE visa extrair informações contextuais do discurso de um fio de discussão. Além disso, como a natureza sarcástica e a forma de expressão podem variar de pessoa para pessoa, CASCADE utiliza incorporações de usuários que codificam características estilométricas e de personalidade dos usuários. Quando usado junto com extratores de recursos baseados em conteúdo, como redes neurais convolucionais, vemos um aumento significativo no desempenho de classificação em um grande corpus do Reddit.', 'es': 'La literatura sobre detección automática de sarcasmo se ha centrado principalmente en el análisis de texto a nivel léxico, sintáctico y semántico. Sin embargo, una oración sarcástica se puede expresar con presunciones contextuales, antecedentes y conocimiento de sentido común. En este artículo, proponemos un detector de sarcasmo contextual (CASCADE), que adopta un enfoque híbrido de modelado basado en el contenido y el contexto para la detección de sarcasmo en las discusiones en las redes sociales en línea. Para este último, CASCADE tiene como objetivo extraer información contextual del discurso de un hilo de discusión. Además, dado que la naturaleza sarcástica y la forma de expresión pueden variar de una persona a otra, CASCADE utiliza incrustaciones de usuario que codifican las características estilométricas y de personalidad de los usuarios. Cuando se utilizan junto con extractores de características basados en contenido, como las redes neuronales convolucionales, observamos un aumento significativo en el rendimiento de la clasificación en un gran corpus de Reddit.', 'fr': "La littérature sur la détection automatisée des sarcasmes s'est principalement concentrée sur l'analyse lexicale, syntaxique et sémantique du texte. Cependant, une phrase sarcastique peut être exprimée avec des présomptions contextuelles, des antécédents et des connaissances de bon sens. Dans cet article, nous proposons un détecteur de sarcasme contextuel (CASCADE), qui adopte une approche hybride de modélisation basée sur le contenu et le contexte pour la détection du sarcasme dans les discussions en ligne sur les réseaux sociaux. Pour ce dernier, CASCADE vise à extraire des informations contextuelles du discours d'un fil de discussion. De plus, étant donné que la nature et la forme d'expression sarcastiques peuvent varier d'une personne à l'autre, CASCADE utilise des intégrations utilisateur qui codent les caractéristiques stylométriques et de personnalité des utilisateurs. Lorsqu'ils sont utilisés avec des extracteurs de caractéristiques basés sur le contenu tels que les réseaux de neurones convolutifs, nous constatons une augmentation significative des performances de classification sur un grand corpus Reddit.", 'ja': '自動皮肉検出における文献は、主にテキストの語彙レベル、構文レベル、および意味レベルの分析に焦点を当てています。しかし、皮肉な文章は、文脈的な推測、背景、常識的な知識で表現することができます。本稿では、オンラインソーシャルメディアの議論における皮肉検出のためのコンテンツ駆動型モデリングとコンテキスト駆動型モデリングの両方のハイブリッドアプローチを採用したContextuAl SarCasm DEtector （カスケード）を提案する。後者については、カスケードはディスカッションスレッドの話題から文脈情報を抽出することを目的としている。また、表現の皮肉な性質と形式は人によって異なる可能性があるため、カスケードはユーザーのスタイルメトリックとパーソナリティの特徴をエンコードするユーザー埋め込みを利用します。畳み込みニューラルネットワークなどのコンテンツベースのフィーチャーエクストラクターと共に使用すると、大規模なRedditコーパスの分類パフォーマンスが大幅に向上します。', 'zh': '自刺检测之文,主集文本之词汇,句法与语义分析。 然刺句可以上下文假设,背景识以达之。 本文有ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector(CASCADE),取上下文驱建模混合,在线社交媒体论刺检。 其于后者,CASCADE旨在讨论线程语取上下文信息。 此外讽刺性表达形式,或因人而异,故CASCADE因用户嵌编码用户之风个性特征。 当与卷积神经网络等提取器同用之时,见大Reddit语料库上之类性显。', 'hi': 'स्वचालित व्यंग्य का पता लगाने में साहित्य ने मुख्य रूप से पाठ के लेक्सिकल-, वाक्यात्मक- और शब्दार्थ-स्तर के विश्लेषण पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया है। हालांकि, एक व्यंग्यात्मक वाक्य को प्रासंगिक अनुमानों, पृष्ठभूमि और सामान्य ज्ञान के साथ व्यक्त किया जा सकता है। इस पेपर में, हम एक ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो ऑनलाइन सोशल मीडिया चर्चाओं में व्यंग्य का पता लगाने के लिए सामग्री- और संदर्भ-संचालित मॉडलिंग दोनों के हाइब्रिड दृष्टिकोण को अपनाता है। उत्तरार्द्ध के लिए, कैस्केड का उद्देश्य चर्चा धागे के प्रवचन से प्रासंगिक जानकारी निकालना है। इसके अलावा, चूंकि व्यंग्यात्मक प्रकृति और अभिव्यक्ति का रूप व्यक्ति से दूसरे व्यक्ति में भिन्न हो सकता है, कैस्केड उपयोगकर्ता एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करता है जो उपयोगकर्ताओं की स्टाइलोमेट्रिक और व्यक्तित्व विशेषताओं को एन्कोड करते हैं। जब सामग्री-आधारित फीचर एक्सट्रैक्टर्स जैसे कि कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क के साथ उपयोग किया जाता है, तो हम एक बड़े रेडिट कॉर्पस पर वर्गीकरण प्रदर्शन में एक महत्वपूर्ण बढ़ावा देखते हैं।', 'ru': 'В литературе по автоматизированному обнаружению сарказма основное внимание уделяется лексическому, синтаксическому и семантическому анализу текста. Однако саркастическое предложение может быть выражено контекстуальными предположениями, фоновыми и здравомыслящими знаниями. В этой статье мы предлагаем ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (КАСКАД), который принимает гибридный подход как контентного, так и контекстно-ориентированного моделирования для обнаружения сарказма в онлайн-обсуждениях в социальных сетях. Для последнего КАСКАД направлен на извлечение контекстной информации из дискурса дискуссионной темы. Кроме того, поскольку саркастический характер и форма выражения могут варьироваться от человека к человеку, в КАСКАДЕ используются пользовательские вложения, кодирующие стилометрические и личностные особенности пользователей. При использовании вместе с контентными экстракторами признаков, такими как сверточные нейронные сети, мы видим значительное повышение эффективности классификации на большом корпусе Reddit.', 'ga': 'Dhírigh an litríocht maidir le braite searbhas uathoibrithe go príomha ar anailís ag leibhéal foclóireachta, comhréire agus shéimeantach ar théacs. Mar sin féin, is féidir abairt bhréagach a chur in iúl le toimhdí comhthéacsúla, cúlra agus eolas ciallmhar. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid Brathadóir Coimhthéacsúla SarCasm (CASCADE), a ghlacann cur chuige hibrideach maidir le samhaltú ábhar- agus comhthéacs-tiomáinte le haghaidh braite searbhas i bplé ar na meáin shóisialta ar líne. Maidir leis an dara ceann, tá sé mar aidhm ag CASCADE faisnéis chomhthéacsúil a bhaint as dioscúrsa snáithe plé. Chomh maith leis sin, ós rud é gur féidir le nádúr searbhasach agus foirm na cainte a bheith éagsúil ó dhuine go duine, úsáideann CASCADE leabú úsáideoirí a ionchódaíonn gnéithe stíle agus pearsantachta úsáideoirí. Nuair a úsáidtear iad in éineacht le sainfháiscirí bunaithe ar ábhar ar nós líonraí néarúla comhraonta, feicimid borradh suntasach i bhfeidhmíocht aicmithe ar chorpas mór Reddit.', 'el': 'Η βιβλιογραφία στην αυτοματοποιημένη ανίχνευση σαρκασμού έχει επικεντρωθεί κυρίως στην ανάλυση λεξικού, συντακτικού και σημασιολογικού επιπέδου κειμένου. Ωστόσο, μια σαρκαστική πρόταση μπορεί να εκφραστεί με υποθέσεις περιβάλλοντος, υπόβαθρο και γνώση κοινής λογικής. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε έναν ανιχνευτή που υιοθετεί μια υβριδική προσέγγιση τόσο της βασισμένης στο περιεχόμενο όσο και του περιβάλλοντος μοντελοποίησης για την ανίχνευση σαρκασμού σε διαδικτυακές συζητήσεις στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Για το τελευταίο, η CASCADE στοχεύει στην εξαγωγή πληροφοριών περιβάλλοντος από τον λόγο ενός νήματος συζήτησης. Επίσης, δεδομένου ότι η σαρκαστική φύση και η μορφή έκφρασης μπορεί να διαφέρουν από άτομο σε άτομο, το χρησιμοποιεί ενσωμάτωση χρηστών που κωδικοποιούν στυλομετρικά και χαρακτηριστικά προσωπικότητας των χρηστών. Όταν χρησιμοποιείται μαζί με εξαγωγείς χαρακτηριστικών που βασίζονται στο περιεχόμενο, όπως τα σύνθετα νευρωνικά δίκτυα, βλέπουμε μια σημαντική αύξηση στην απόδοση ταξινόμησης σε ένα μεγάλο σώμα Reddit.', 'ka': 'ავტომატიკური საპკასმის განახლებაში ლიტურატია ტექსტის ელექსიკალური, სინტაქტიური და სმენტიკური განახლებაზე დააყენება. მაგრამ, საპკასტიური სიტყვა შეიძლება გამოსახულება შესაძლებელია, როგორც შესაძლებელია, როგორც შესაძლებელია, როგორც შესაძლებელია. ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ შევძლებთ "ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector" (CASCADE), რომელიც ინტერნეტიური სამუშაო მედიაზე განვიხილეთ ჰიბრიტიური პროგორმა, რომელიც სამუშაო და კონტექსტიური მოდელეციის მოდელე შემდეგ, CASCADE მიზეზია, რომ კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია განაკექტირება დისუქციის დისუქტურის განსაკუთრებით. ასევე, რადგან საპკასტიული ნათობა და გამოსახულების ფორმა ადამიანიდან ადამიანიდან განსხვავებულია, CASCADE გამოიყენებს მომხმარებელი ინტებიზებები, რომლებიც მომხმარებელის სტილომე როდესაც გამოყენებულია შემდგომარებული ფუნქტურების ექსტრექტორებით, როგორც კონგულოციალური ნეიროლური ქსელებით, ჩვენ ხედავთ მნიშვნელოვანი გახსნა კლასიფიკა', 'hu': 'Az automatizált szarkazmusfelismerés irodalma elsősorban a szöveg lexikai, szintaktikai és szemantikai szintű elemzésére összpontosított. Egy szarkasztikus mondat azonban kontextuális feltételezésekkel, háttérrel és közértelmes ismeretekkel fejezhető ki. Jelen tanulmányban egy ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), amely hibrid megközelítést alkalmaz a tartalom- és kontextusvezérelt modellezésben az online közösségi média beszélgetésekben. Ez utóbbi esetében a CASCADE célja, hogy kontextuális információkat nyerjen ki egy vitaszál diskurzusából. Továbbá, mivel a szarkasztikus természet és a kifejezés formája személyenként változhat, a CASCADE felhasználói beágyazásokat használ, amelyek kódolják a felhasználók stylometriai és személyiségi jellemzőit. Amikor tartalom alapú funkciókivonókkal együtt használjuk, mint például a konvolúciós neurális hálózatok, jelentős növekedést látunk a Reddit korpusz osztályozási teljesítményében.', 'kk': 'Автоматты сарказмды анықтау литературасы негізінде лексикалық, синтактикалық және семантикалық деңгейі мәтіннің анализациясына көздейді. Бірақ саркастикалық сөйлеме мәтіні, аясы мен көпшілікті білім арқылы көрсетіледі. Бұл қағазға "ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector" (CASCADE) дегенді таңдаймыз. Бұл онлайн социаллық медиа дискуссияларында сарказмды анықтау үшін мазмұның және контексті модельдің гибридті қадағалауын қолданады. Кейінгі үшін CASCADE дискуссиялық ілеспелердің дискуссиясынан контексті мәліметті алып тастауға мақсат береді. Сонымен қатар, саркастикалық түрі мен өрнегінің пішімі адамдан адамға түрлене алады, CASCADE пайдаланушылардың стилометриялық және қасиеттік қасиеттерін кодтайтын пайдаланушылардың ендіру құралын қолд Мазмұның негіздеген қасиеттерді тарқатушылармен бірге қолданғанда, мысалы, көңіл невралдық желілер секілді, біз үлкен Реддит корпусының классификациясының қасиеттерін көтері', 'it': "La letteratura nel rilevamento automatico del sarcasmo si è concentrata principalmente sull'analisi lessicale, sintattica e semantica del testo. Tuttavia, una frase sarcastica può essere espressa con presunzioni contestuali, background e conoscenze di buon senso. In questo articolo, proponiamo un ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), che adotta un approccio ibrido di modellazione basata sui contenuti e sul contesto per il rilevamento del sarcasmo nelle discussioni sui social media online. Per quest'ultimo CASCADE mira ad estrarre informazioni contestuali dal discorso di un thread di discussione. Inoltre, poiché la natura sarcastica e la forma di espressione possono variare da persona a persona, CASCADE utilizza incorporazioni utente che codificano le caratteristiche stilometriche e della personalità degli utenti. Quando vengono utilizzati insieme agli estrattori di funzionalità basati sui contenuti come le reti neurali convoluzionali, vediamo un aumento significativo nelle prestazioni di classificazione su un corpus Reddit di grandi dimensioni.", 'lt': 'Automatizuoto sarkazmo aptikimo literatūra daugiausia buvo skirta teksto analizei lexišku, sintaktiniu ir semantiniu lygiu. Vis dėlto sarkastinis sakinys gali būti išreikštas kontekstinėmis prielaidomis, aplinkybėmis ir bendromis žiniomis. Šiame dokumente siūlome ContextuAl SarCasm detektorių (CASCADE), kuris internetinėse social in ės žiniasklaidos diskusijose taiko hibridinį požiūrį į turinio ir konteksto pagrįstą modeliavimą sarkazmui aptikti. Pastaruoju atveju CASCADE siekia iš diskusijos sričių kalbos gauti kontekstinę informaciją. Be to, kadangi sarkastinis pobūdis ir išraiškos forma gali skirtis nuo asmens į asmenį, CASCADE naudoja naudotojų įdėjinius, koduojančius naudotojų stilometrines ir asmeniškumo savybes. Kai naudojami kartu su turiniu pagrįstais savybių ekstraktoriais, pavyzdžiui, konvoliuciniais nerviniais tinklais, matome žymią klasifikavimo efektyvumo padidėjimą dideliame Reddit korpuse.', 'mk': 'Литературата за автоматизирано детекција на сарказам се фокусира главно на лексичка, синтактичка и семантична анализа на текстот. Сепак, саркастична реченица може да се изрази со контекстни претпоставки, позадина и заедничко знаење. Во овој весник предложуваме Детектор на Контекстуал Саркасм (CASCADE), кој усвои хибриден пристап на моделирање на содржина и контекст за детекција на сарказам во онлајн дискусии на социјалните медиуми. За последните, КАСКАДЕ има за цел извлекување контекстуални информации од дискурсот на дискусиската низа. Исто така, со оглед на тоа што саркастичната природа и формата на изразување можат да се разликуваат од личност до личност, CASCADE ги користи корисничките внатрешности кои ги кодираат стилометричките и карактеристичките карактеристики на корисниците. Кога се користат заедно со екстракторите на содржина, како што се конволуционалните нервни мрежи, гледаме значителен зголемување на резултатите на класификацијата на големиот Редит корпус.', 'ml': 'സ്വയം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിലെ സാഹിത്രം ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d -, സിനിട്ടാക്കിക്- സെമാന്റിക്ക് നില വിശ്വാസം മുഖേന ശ്രദ്ധിച എന്നിട്ടും ഒരു വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു, പിന്നിലുള്ള ഊഹം, പശ്ചാത്തലത്തിലുള്ള വിവരവ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റല്\u200d അല്\u200d സര്\u200dകാസം ഡെക്ടെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയാ ചര്\u200dച്ചകളില്\u200d നിന് അവസാനത്തേക്ക്, കാസ്കെഡിയുടെ ഉദ്ദേശം സംസാരിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കാ വ്യക്തിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യക്തിയില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്തമായിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, കാസ്കെഡി ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ സ്റ്റൈലോമീറ്ററിക്കും വ്യക്തിപരമ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ റെഡിഡിറ്റ് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസില്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമുക്ക് വലിയൊരു പ', 'ms': 'Literatur dalam pengesan sarkasma automatik telah fokus pada analisis aras-leksikal, sintaktik dan semantik teks. Namun, kalimat sarkastik boleh diungkapkan dengan anggapan kontekstual, latar belakang dan pengetahuan umum. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan ContextuAl SarCasm Detector (CASCADE), yang mengadopsi pendekatan hibrid dari kedua-dua model kandungan- dan konteks-dipandu untuk pengesan sarkasm dalam diskusi media sosial online. Untuk yang terakhir, CASCADE bertujuan untuk mengekstrak maklumat kontekstual dari diskors benang perbincangan. Juga, kerana sifat sarkastik dan bentuk ungkapan boleh berbeza dari orang ke orang, CASCADE menggunakan embedding pengguna yang mengekodkan ciri-ciri stilometrik dan personaliti pengguna. Apabila digunakan bersama dengan ekstraktor ciri-ciri berdasarkan kandungan seperti rangkaian saraf konvolusi, kita melihat peningkatan yang signifikan dalam prestasi klasifikasi pada Reddit corpus besar.', 'mt': 'Il-letteratura fid-detezzjoni awtomatizzata tas-sarkazmu ffokat prinċipalment fuq analiżi tat-test fuq livell lexiku, sintetiku u semantiku. However, a sarcastic sentence can be expressed with contextual presumptions, background and commonsense knowledge.  F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu Detettur tal-Kuntest SarCasm (CASCADE), li jadotta approċċ ibridu kemm tal-mudell immexxi mill-kontenut kif ukoll mill-kuntest għad-detezzjoni tas-sarkazmu fid-diskussjonijiet tal-midja soċjali onlajn. Għall-a ħħar, CASCADE għandha l-għan li testrezzjona informazzjoni kuntestwali mid-diskors ta’ ħajt ta’ diskussjoni. Barra minn hekk, peress li n-natura sarkastika u l-forma ta’ espressjoni jistgħu jvarjaw minn persuna għal persuna, CASCADE juża inkorporazzjonijiet tal-utent li jikkodifikaw karatteristiċi stilometriċi u personalità tal-utenti. Meta jintużaw flimkien ma’ estratturi tal-karatteristiċi bbażati fuq il-kontenut bħal netwerks newrali konvoluzzjonali, naraw spinta sinifikanti fil-prestazzjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni fuq korpus kbir ta’ Reddit.', 'mn': 'Автоматтын саркассмын нээлтийн уран зохиол нь ихэвчлэн текстийн лексик, синтактик, semantic-түвшин шинжилгээнд төвлөрсөн. Гэвч тэр үгийг ойлголт, түүний мэдрэмж, мэдлэгтэй мэдлэгтэй илэрхийлж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид "ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector" (CASCADE) гэсэн санал болгож байна. Энэ нь интернет нийгмийн мэдээллийн ярилцлагуудын хоёуланг болон нөхцөл сэтгэл хөдлөлийн загваруудын гибрид аргыг ашигладаг. Сүүлийн үед CASCADE нь ярилцлагын хэлбэрээс орчин үеийн мэдээллийг авах зорилго юм. Мөн хүн бүрт өөрчлөгдөж чадна. CASCADE хэрэглэгчийн стилометр болон хувьцааны өөрчлөлтийг ашиглаж чадна. Хэрэв тодорхойлолт суурилуулагчийн агуулагчтай хамтран ашиглах үед бид том Реддит Корпус-ын хуваариллагааны үйл ажиллагаанд маш чухал нэмэгдүүлэлт харагдаж байна.', 'no': 'Literaturen i automatisk oppdaging av sarkasm har hovudsakelig fokusert på leksiske, syntaktiske og semantiske analyser av tekst. Men ein sarkastisk setning kan uttrykkast med kontekstlege forslag, bakgrunn og vanleg kunnskap. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein kontekstuAl SarCasm-DEtector (CASCADE), som adopterer ein hybrid tilnærming av både innhaldet og kontekstdrivt modellering for å oppdaga sarkasm i internett sosiale mediediadiskusjonar. For dei siste målene CASCADE er å pakka ut kontekstinformasjon frå diskursen på ein diskusingstråd. Siden det sarkastiske naturen og uttrykket kan variera frå personen til personen, brukar CASCADE innbygging av brukarar som kodar stylometriske og personlegheitsfunksjonar for brukarar. Når det er brukt saman med innhaldsbaserte funksjonsekstraktorar som konvolusjonelle neiralnettverk, ser vi ein signifikant økning i klassifikasjonen på ein stor Reddit corpus.', 'pl': 'Literatura z zakresu automatycznego wykrywania sarkazmu koncentruje się głównie na analizie tekstu na poziomie leksykalnym, składniowym i semantycznym. Sarkastyczne zdanie może być jednak wyrażone kontekstowymi domniemaniami, tłem i wiedzą zdrowego rozsądku. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), który przyjmuje hybrydowe podejście modelowania zarówno treściowego, jak i kontekstowego do wykrywania sarkazmu w internetowych dyskusjach w mediach społecznościowych. Dla tych ostatnich CASCADE ma na celu wydobycie informacji kontekstowych z dyskursu wątku dyskusyjnego. Ponadto, ponieważ sarkastyczny charakter i forma wyrazu mogą się różnić w zależności od osoby, CASCADE wykorzystuje osadzenia użytkowników, które kodują cechy stylometriczne i osobowościowe użytkowników. Używane wraz z ekstraktorami funkcji opartymi na treści, takimi jak konwolucyjne sieci neuronowe, widzimy znaczący wzrost wydajności klasyfikacji dużego korpusu Reddita.', 'ro': 'Literatura de specialitate în detectarea automată a sarcasmului s-a axat în principal pe analiza lexicală, sintactică și semantică a textului. Cu toate acestea, o propoziție sarcastică poate fi exprimată prin prezumții contextuale, fundal și cunoștințe de bun sens. În această lucrare, propunem un ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), care adoptă o abordare hibridă a modelării bazate pe conținut și context pentru detectarea sarcasmului în discuțiile online de pe rețelele de socializare. Pentru aceasta din urmă, CASCADE urmărește extragerea informației contextuale din discursul unui fir de discuție. De asemenea, deoarece natura sarcastică și forma de expresie pot varia de la persoană la persoană, CASCADE utilizează încorporări de utilizatori care codează caracteristicile stilometrice și de personalitate ale utilizatorilor. Atunci când sunt utilizate împreună cu extractoare de caracteristici bazate pe conținut, cum ar fi rețelele neuronale convoluționale, vedem o creștere semnificativă a performanței de clasificare pe un corpus Reddit mare.', 'sr': 'Literatura u automatskom detektoru sarkazma uglavnom je fokusirana na leksičku, sintaktičku i semantičku analizu teksta. Međutim, sarkastična rečenica se može izraziti sa kontekstskim pretpostavkama, pozadinskim i običnim znanjem. U ovom papiru predlažemo detektor ContextuAl SarCasm (CASCADE), koji usvoji hibridni pristup modelima sadržaja i konteksta koji se vodi za detekciju sarkazma u internetskim diskusijama o društvenim medijima. Za poslednje, CASCADE ima cilj da izvuče kontekstualne informacije iz diskusije o diskusiji. Takođe, pošto sarkastična priroda i oblik izraza mogu da se razlikuju od osobe na osobu, CASCADE koristi ugrađenje korisnika koji kodiraju stilometrijske i lične karakteristike korisnika. Kada se koristi zajedno sa ekstraktorima na sadržaju kao što su konvolucionalne neuralne mreže, vidimo značajno povećanje klasifikacije na velikom Reddit korpusu.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය සර්කාස්ම් හොයාගන්නේ ලෙක්සිකල්, සංක්\u200dරීය- සහ සෙමැන්ටික් ස්ථාන විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයේ  නමුත්, සාර්කාසික වචනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස, පසුබිම සහ සාමාන්\u200dය දන්න. මේ පත්තරයේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් කරනවා සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයේ සංවිධානයේ සාමාජික පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමය සංවිධානයක් සඳහා ස අන්තිම වෙනුවෙන්, CASCADE අල්ලගන්නවා සංවේදනය තොරතුරු අරගෙන ඉල්ලගන්න. ඒවගේම, සාර්කාසික ස්වභාවය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය වෙනස් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, CASCADE ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශකයේ ස්ටිලෝ සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් සමඟ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු විශේෂතාවක් සමඟ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරපු වෙලාවට, අපිට ලොකු රෙඩ්ඩිට් කොර්පුස', 'so': 'The literature in automated sarcasm detection has mainly focused on lexical-, syntactic- and semantic-level analysis of text.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa loola muujin karaa eray sarkaal ah oo ku saabsan malaynaya, bakhtiga iyo aqoonta shirkadda. Qoraalkan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa qoraal ku qoran ContextuAl Sarcasm (CASCADE), kaas oo soo qaadaa qaab ay u sameynayso qoraal ku saabsan waxyaabaha ku jirta iyo sameynta, si aad u baaqan karto baaritaanka sarcasm oo ku qoran shabakada shabakadda bulshada. Marka ugu dambeeya, CASCADE wuxuu ku talo galay in macluumaad joogtada ah laga soo bixiyo hadalka kooxaha kala sheekeysiga. Sidoo kale, sababtoo ah dabiicadda sarcastiga iyo foomka expression ee qof u kala duwan karo, CASCADE wuxuu isticmaalaa isticmaalayaasha isticmaalka ku qoran qaab ahaan iyo shakhsiyeed. Marka lagu isticmaalo wax ka baxsada, sida shabakada neurada ee guud, waxaynu aragnaa boos aad u weyn oo fasax ah oo ku qoran koobas weyn oo Reddit.', 'sv': 'Litteraturen inom automatiserad sarkasm detektering har främst fokuserat på lexikal-, syntaktisk- och semantisk analys av text. En sarkastisk mening kan dock uttryckas med kontextuella presumtioner, bakgrund och allmänska kunskaper. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), som använder en hybrid ansats av både innehåll- och kontextdriven modellering för sarkasm detektering i sociala medier online. För det senare syftar CASCADE till att utvinna kontextuell information från diskursen i en diskussionstrå. Eftersom den sarkastiska naturen och uttrycksformen kan variera från person till person, använder CASCADE användarinbäddningar som kodar stylometriska och personlighetsfunktioner hos användare. När de används tillsammans med innehållsbaserade funktionsextraktorer som konvulutionella neurala nätverk ser vi en betydande ökning i klassificeringsprestandan på en stor Reddit-korpus.', 'ta': 'தன்னியக்கமாக ஆராய்ச்சி கண்டுபிடிப்பில் உள்ள எழுத்துரு முக்கியமாக உரையின் ஒத்திசைவு, ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் அரை நிலை ஆய்வு  However, a sarcastic sentence can be expressed with contextual presumptions, background and commonsense knowledge.  இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் ஒரு சூழல் அல் சார்காஸ் டெக்ஸ்டெக்டர் (CASCADE) முன்நிரூபிக்கிறோம். அது பொருள் மற்றும் சூழல் இயக்கி மாதிரியும் சூழல்  இறுதிக்கு, CASCADE பேச்சின் வார்த்தையிலிருந்து தற்போதைய தகவல்களை எடுத்துக் கொள்ள நோக்குகிறது. மேலும், வெற்றுப்பாடு இயற்கையும் மற்றும் வெளிப்பாட்டின் வடிவமும் தனித்தனியாக இருந்து வேறுபடும், CASCADE பயன்படுத்தும் பயனர் பாணியையும் மற பொதுவான புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்கள் போன்ற உள்ளடக்கத்திற்கு சேர்ந்து கொள்ளும் பொழுது பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட பொழுது, ஒரு பெரிய ரெடிட்', 'ur': 'آٹوٹی سارکاسم شناسایی میں لکسیکل، سینٹکتیک اور سیمنٹی سطح کی تحلیل پر تمرکز کیا گیا ہے. اگرچہ ایک سارکاسٹی فیصلہ متوجہ حدود، پچھلے اور عام علم کے ساتھ بیان کر سکتا ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک کنٹکسٹ آل SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE) کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو ان دونوں منصفات اور کنٹکسٹ ڈیلوٹ کی موڈلینگ کو آنلاین سوسیل میڈیا ڈیلوٹ میں سارکاسم ڈیٹیکٹر کے لئے موجود کرتا ہے۔ آخرین کے لئے CASCADE کا ارادہ ہے کہ ایک بحث طبقه کی صحبت سے متوسط معلومات نکالے۔ اور اس کے بعد کہ سارکاسٹی طبیعت اور منظور کی شکل شخص سے متفاوت ہو سکتی ہے، CASCADE استعمال کرتا ہے کہ کارساز کی استیلومتریک اور شخصیت کی خصوصیات کو متفاوت کرتا ہے. جب کائنات بنیادی فرصت اضافہ کرنے والوں کے ساتھ استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں جیسے کائنال نیورل نیورل نیٹورک، ہم ایک بڑے ریڈڈیٹ کورپوس پر کلاسپیٹ کی فعالیت میں ایک اضافہ دیکھتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Taʼriflar avtomatik sarkasm aniqlashni avtomatik o'zgartiradi, oddiy leksikal, syntactik va semantik darajasi matnning analyysiga foydalanadi. Lekin, sarkastik so'zlari доимо гумон, orqa fon ва консензиция илми билан кўрсатилади. Bu qogʻozda, biz KonextuAl Sarkasm DEktor (CASCADE) dasturini talab qilamiz. Online shaxsiy medyaya talabalarida sarkasm qidirish uchun hamma tarkib va muktadha modelni qo'yish imkoniyati qiladi. Keyingi davomida, CASCADE talab qilingan suhbat soʻzlaridan davomida maʼlumotni olishni istaysiz. Shunday qilib, sarkastik tabi va ifodalar shaklida odamdan boshqa bo'lishi mumkin, CASCADE foydalanuvchilarning uslumetrik va shaxsiy xususiyatlarini foydalanadi. Tashkilot tarmoqlaridan foydalanilganda, juda katta Reddit korpusida darajalashtirish imkoniyatini ko'rinamiz.", 'vi': 'The literature in Automated mỉa mai discover has mainly focused on lexical, cú pháp- và semantics-level phân tích văn bản. Tuy nhiên, một câu châm biếm có thể diễn tả bằng giả định ngữ cảnh, kiến thức nền tảng và tỉnh táo. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề xuất một ContxtuAl SarCasm DEO (CACADE), người sử dụng phương pháp lai của cả nội dung và ngữ cảnh để tìm ra mỉa mai trong cuộc thảo luận trên mạng về các phương tiện xã hội. Tóm lại, CACADE muốn trích xuất các thông tin ngữ cảnh trong buổi đàm thoại của chủ đề. Và bởi vì tính châm biếm và hình thức biểu đạt có thể thay đổi từ người này sang người khác, CASEde sử dụng sự nhúng tay của người dùng để mã hóa tính chất kiểu sexy và cá tính của người dùng. Khi được sử dụng cùng với các đặc trưng dẫn ra các loại như các mạng thần kinh kết nối, chúng ta thấy một tăng cường đáng kể trong hiệu ứng phân loại trên một tập thể lớn của Reddit.', 'bg': 'Литературата в автоматизираното откриване на сарказъм се фокусира основно върху лексикално, синтактично и семантично анализ на текста. Саркастичното изречение обаче може да бъде изразено с контекстуални презумпции, минало и разумно знание. В настоящата статия предлагаме детектор, който възприема хибриден подход както на съдържанието, така и на контекстното моделиране за откриване на сарказъм в дискусиите в социалните мрежи онлайн. За последното се стреми да извлече контекстуална информация от дискурса на дискусионна нишка. Също така, тъй като саркастичната природа и форма на изразяване могат да варират от човек на човек, използва потребителски вграждания, които кодират стилометрични и личностни характеристики на потребителите. Когато се използват заедно със съдържание-базирани екстрактори на функции като конволюционни невронни мрежи, виждаме значителен тласък в класификационната ефективност на голям корпус на Редит.', 'hr': 'Literatura u automatskom otkrivanju sarkazma uglavnom se fokusirala na leksičku, sintaktičku i semantičku analizu teksta nivoa. Međutim, sarkastična rečenica se može izraziti s kontekstskim pretpostavkama, pozadinskim i češćem znanjem. U ovom papiru predlažemo DETEKTOR ContextuAl SarCasm (CASCADE), koji usvoji hibridni pristup modelima sadržaja i konteksta upravljanog za otkrivanje sarkazama u internetskim diskusijama o društvenim medijima. Za sljedeće, CASCADE ima cilj izvlačiti kontekstne informacije iz diskusije o raspravnoj trci. Također, pošto sarkastična priroda i oblik izraza mogu se razlikujeti od osobe na osobu, CASCADE koristi ugrađenje korisnika koji kodiraju stilometrijske i osobne karakteristike korisnika. Kada se koristi zajedno s ekstraktorima na sadržaji kao što su konvolucionalne neurone mreže, vidimo značajno povećanje klasifikacije na velikom Reddit korpusu.', 'nl': 'De literatuur in geautomatiseerde sarcasmedetectie heeft zich voornamelijk gericht op lexicale, syntactische en semantische analyse van tekst. Een sarcastische zin kan echter worden uitgedrukt met contextuele veronderstellingen, achtergrond en gezond verstand kennis. In dit artikel stellen we een ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE) voor, die een hybride benadering hanteert van zowel content- als contextgedreven modellering voor sarcasmedetectie in online sociale media discussies. Voor de laatste wil CASCADE contextuele informatie uit het discours van een discussiethread halen. Aangezien het sarcastische karakter en de vorm van expressie van persoon tot persoon kunnen variëren, maakt CASCADE gebruik van gebruikersembeddings die stylometrische en persoonlijkheidskenmerken van gebruikers coderen. Wanneer we samen met content-based feature extractors zoals convolutionele neurale netwerken gebruiken, zien we een aanzienlijke verhoging van de classificatieprestaties op een groot Reddit corpus.', 'da': 'Litteraturen inden for automatiseret sarkasme detektion har primært fokuseret på leksikal-, syntaktisk- og semantisk analyse af tekst. Men en sarkastisk sætning kan udtrykkes med kontekstuelle formodninger, baggrund og almindelig viden. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), som anvender en hybrid tilgang til både indholds- og kontekstdrevet modellering til sarkasme detektion i online sociale medier diskussioner. For sidstnævnte sigter CASCADE mod at udtrække kontekstuel information fra diskursen i en diskussionstråde. Også, da den sarkastiske natur og form for udtryk kan variere fra person til person, CASCADE bruger brugerindlejringer, der koder stylometriske og personlighedsfunktioner hos brugerne. Når det anvendes sammen med indholdsbaserede feature extractors såsom konvulutionelle neurale netværk, ser vi en betydelig stigning i klassificeringsydelsen på et stort Reddit korpus.', 'de': 'Die Literatur zur automatisierten Sarkasmuserkennung konzentriert sich hauptsächlich auf lexikalische, syntaktische und semantische Textanalyse. Ein sarkastischer Satz kann jedoch mit kontextuellen Vermutungen, Hintergründen und gesundem Menschenverstand ausgedrückt werden. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE) vor, der einen hybriden Ansatz sowohl inhalts- als auch kontextgetriebener Modellierung zur Sarkasmus-Erkennung in Online-Diskussionen in sozialen Medien verfolgt. Für letztere zielt CASCADE darauf ab, aus dem Diskurs eines Diskussionsfadens Kontextinformationen zu extrahieren. Da die sarkastische Natur und Ausdrucksform von Person zu Person variieren können, verwendet CASCADE Benutzereinbettungen, die stylometrische und Persönlichkeitsmerkmale der Benutzer kodieren. In Verbindung mit inhaltsbasierten Feature Extractoren wie convolutionalen neuronalen Netzen sehen wir einen deutlichen Anstieg der Klassifizierungsleistung auf einem großen Reddit-Korpus.', 'id': 'Literatur dalam deteksi sarkasme otomatis terutama fokus pada analisis teks secara lexik, sintaktik dan semantis. Namun, kalimat sarkastik dapat diungkapkan dengan anggapan kontekstual, latar belakang dan pengetahuan umum. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan ContextuAl SarCasm Detector (CASCADE), yang mengadopsi pendekatan hibrid dari konten- dan konteks-driven modeling untuk deteksi sarkasme dalam diskusi media sosial online. Untuk yang terakhir, CASCADE bermaksud untuk mengekstraksi informasi kontekstual dari diskors benang diskusi. Juga, karena sifat sarkastik dan bentuk ekspresi dapat berbeda dari orang ke orang, CASCADE menggunakan embedding pengguna yang mengkode karakteristik stilometrik dan personalitas pengguna. When used along with content-based feature extractors such as convolutional neural networks, we see a significant boost in the classification performance on a large Reddit corpus.', 'ko': '자동 풍자 검측의 문헌은 주로 텍스트의 어휘, 문법과 의미 차원의 분석에 집중된다.그러나 풍자문은 언어 환경의 가설, 배경과 상식으로 표현할 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 상하문 풍자 검측기(CASCADE)를 제기했는데 내용과 상하문 구동 모델링의 혼합 방법을 채택하여 온라인 소셜 미디어 토론에서의 풍자 검측에 사용한다.후자에 대해 CASCADE는 토론의 단서가 되는 말에서 언어 환경 정보를 추출하기 위한 것이다.그 밖에 풍자의 성질과 표현 형식이 사람에 따라 다르기 때문에 CASCADE는 사용자의 삽입을 이용하여 사용자의 풍격과 개성 특징을 인코딩한다.볼륨 신경 네트워크 등 내용 기반 특징 추출기와 함께 사용할 때 대형 레딧 어료 라이브러리에서 분류 성능이 현저히 향상된 것을 볼 수 있다.', 'sw': 'fasihi katika uchunguzi wa kemikali umejikita zaidi kwenye uchambuzi wa kiwango cha sekunde cha viungo vya lexico Hata hivyo, hukumu ya kejeli inaweza kuonyeshwa kwa dhana za kisasa, historia na maarifa ya umma. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mtetezi wa ContextuAl SarCasm (CASCADE), ambayo hutumia mbinu za kutia huduma za mifano ya maudhui- na mazingira yanayoendeshwa kwa kejeli katika majadiliano ya mitandao ya kijamii ya mtandaoni. Kwa mwisho, CASCADE inakusudia kuchukua taarifa za wakati kutoka kwenye hotuba ya utangazaji wa mjadala. Pia, kwa kuwa asili ya kejeli na aina ya kujieleza inaweza kuwa tofauti na mtu hadi mtu, CASCADE inatumia vifaa vya watumiaji vinavyojumuisha mitindo na sifa za watumiaji. Wakati umetumiwa pamoja na wataalam wa maudhui kama vile mitandao ya kijamii ya kikatili, tunaona ongezeko kubwa katika utendaji wa usafirishaji katika makampuni makubwa ya Reddit.', 'af': "Die literateit in outomatiese sarkasme-opdekking het hoofsaaklik fokus op leksiese, sintaktieke en semantiese-vlak analisie van teks. Maar 'n sarkasiese seting kan uitgevoer word met kontekslike voorspoedings, agtergrond en gemeenskaplike kennis. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n ContextuAl SarCasm-dektor (CASCADE), wat aanvaar 'n hibride toegang van beide inhoud- en konteks-gedrywe modeling vir sarkasm-beskrywing in online sosiale media diskusies. Vir die laaste, CASCADE doel doen om contextual inligting te uittrek van die diskursie van 'n diskusie druk. Ook, omdat die sarkasiese natuur en vorm van uitdrukking kan verander van persoon na persoon, CASCADE gebruik gebruiker inbettings wat stylometriese en persoonlike funksies van gebruikers kodeer. Wanneer gebruik word saam met inhoud-gebaseerde funksie uitvoerders soos konvolusionele neuralnetwerke, sien ons 'n betekende booster in die klasifikasie-prestasie op 'n groot Reddit corpus.", 'tr': 'Otomatik sarkasm deteksiýasyndaky edebiýatyň esasy meksika, sintaktik we semantik derejesinde metin analyzasyna dikilýär. Yöne şartlaýyn sözleri duýdurmalar, arkaplan we duýgun bilgi bilen a ýdylabilir. Bu kağıtda "ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector" (CASCADE) teklif ediyoruz. Bu da internet sosyal medya tartışmalarynda hem içerikli hem de kontekstli modelleme üçin bir şekilde örnek alır. Soňky üçin, CASCADE diskusiýa sözleriniň görkezilişinden daşary informasiýany a çmaklygy amaçlaýar. Munuň üçin sarkastik tebigat we ifade biçimi kişiden kişiden üýtgeşip biler, CASCADE ullançylaryň stilometrik we şahsiyetliklerini ködleýän guramlaryny ulanýar. Haçanda maksadat daýanýan özellikler bilen birlikte, gönüllü näyral şebekeler ýaly, biz Reddit korpusynyň klasifikasynda örän köp baýramçylygy görýäris.', 'fa': 'ادبیات در کشف سارکاسم اتوماتیک بیشتر روی تحلیل سطح لیکسیک، سنتاکتیک و سیمانتیک متن تمرکز شده است. با این حال، یک sentence sarcastic can be expressed with contextual presumptions, background and common sense knowledge. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک کارآگاه ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE) که یک دستور hybrid از موجودات و موجودات راهنمایی برای شناسایی سارکاسم در بحث رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی آنلاین می\u200cکند. برای آخرین، CASCADE هدف دارد که اطلاعات متوسط را از صحبت یک طبقه بحث خارج کند. همچنین، از آنجایی که طبیعت و شکل عبارت تغییر می\u200cتواند از فرد به فرد تغییر دهد، CASCADE استفاده می\u200cکند که ویژه\u200cهای استیلومتریک و شخصیت کاربر را می\u200ckodاند. وقتی با استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای خارج کننده\u200cهای محتویات مانند شبکه\u200cهای عصبی معمولی استفاده می\u200cشود، افزایش بزرگی در عملکرد گروه\u200cگذاری روی یک کورپوس بزرگ Reddit می\u200cبینیم.', 'am': 'በተለየ ሳርካሲም ማግኘት የጽሑፉን ጸሐፊ በጽሑፍ ላይ አካባቢ፣ ስንታታዊ እና ስሜንቲካዊ ደረጃ ማተሚያ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የጣራሲ ፍርድ በአሁኑ ሁኔታ፣ የመደብ እና የድምፅ እውቀት ይናገራል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የካስCADE የኮንስቱኤል ሳርካሲም አካባቢ እና የኢንተርኔት ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያዎች ውይይት የሳርካሲን አካባቢ እና የግንኙነት አካባቢ ምሳሌ ለመግለጥ ጥያቄን እና መግለጫ መፍጠርን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ለኋለኛው፣ CASCADE የአሁኑን የውይይት መረጃ ከውይይት ውይይት ለማውጣት ነው፡፡ እናም፣ የስሕተት ጥረት እና የንግግር መልክ ከperson ወደ ሰው የሚለይ ከሆነ፣ CASCADE የተጠቃሚ እና የደብዳቤ ግንኙነት እና የግንኙነት ግንኙነት የሚቆጠሩትን ተጠቃሚዎችን ይጠቅማል፡፡ በተጨማሪው የነጥብ መረብ እንደተደረገ የውይይት አካባቢዎች በተጠቀሙ ጊዜ፣ በተለያዩ የሬድዲት ኮርፓስ ላይ የታላቅ ጉዳይ እድል ፈተና እናያለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Ավտոմատիկ սարկազմի հայտնաբերման գրականությունը հիմնականում կենտրոնացել է տեքստի լեքսիկական, սինտակտիկ և սեմանտիկ մակարդակի վերլուծության վրա: Սակայն, սարկաստական նախադասությունը կարող է արտահայտվել կոնտեքստալ ենթադրություններով, հետևանքով և ընդհանուր գիտելիքներով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք "Կոնտեքստուալ Սարկասմ Դեկտեկտոր" (ԿԱՍՔԱԴ), որն ընդունում է բովանդակության և կոնտեքստի հիբրիդ մոդելների հիբրիդ մոդելը, որն օգտագործում է սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների առցանց քննարկումն Վերջինների համար, CACADEի նպատակն է հանել կոնտեքստոնալ տեղեկատվությունը քննարկության թելի խոսակցությունից: Նաև, քանի որ արտահայտության սարկաստական բնույթը և ձևը կարող են տարբերվել մարդուց մեկի մյուսից, CADEօգտագործում է օգտագործողների ներդրումներ, որոնք կոդավորում են օգտագործողների ոճիլիմետրական և անհատականության առանձնահատկությունները: Երբ այն օգտագործվում է պարունակությամբ հիմնված հատկանիշների վերացուցիչների հետ, ինչպիսիք են կոնվոլյուցիոն նեյրոնային ցանցերը, մենք տեսնում ենք մեծ Reddit-ի կորպոսի դասակարգման արդյունքների նշանակալի աճ:', 'az': 'Avtomatik sarkasm keşfinin edebiyatı əsas olaraq leksik, sintaktik və semantik səviyyədə mətn analizi ilə odaqlandı. Lakin bir sarkastik sözlə müxtəlif təsirlər, arxa plan və sıradan bilgi ilə ifade edilə bilər. Bu kağızda, internette sosyal media müzakirələrində sarkasm keşfini tapmaq üçün həddi-bütün məlumatların və kontekst-tərəfindən istifadə edən bir məlumat Al SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE) təklif edirik. Sonrakılar üçün CASCADE müzakirə sürətindən müxtəlif məlumatları çıxartmaq istəyir. Həmçinin sarkastik təbiəti və ifadəsi kişilərdən kişilərdən və kişilərdən fərqli olaraq, CASCADE istifadəçilərin stylometrik və kişilik özelliklərini kodlayan istifadəçiləri istifadə edir. Konvolucional nöral a ğları kimi content-based özelliklərlə birlikdə istifadə edildiyi zaman, böyük Reddit korpusu ilə klasifikasiya performansının böyük bir artıqlığını görürük.', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিদ্রূপ সনাক্তির সাহিত্য মূলত লেক্সিকাল, সিন্ট্যাক্টিক- এবং সেম্যান্টিক-স্তরের বিশ্লেষণের উপর মনো তবে একটি বিদ্রোহীত বাক্য প্রকাশিত হতে পারে সাধারণ ধারণা, পটভূমিকা এবং কমিউনিসেন্সের জ্ঞান দিয়ে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি কন্টেক্সটুল আল সার্কাস্ম ডেটেক্টর (CASCADE) প্রস্তাব করি, যা অনলাইন সামাজিক মিডিয়া আলোচনায় বিদ্রোহের উদ্দেশ্যে বিদ্রোহী এবং প পরবর্তীতে ক্যাসিডি একটি আলোচনা থ্রাডের কথোপকথন থেকে সাধারণ তথ্য বের করার উদ্দেশ্য। এছাড়াও, যেহেতু বিদ্রোহী প্রকৃতি এবং প্রকাশের ফর্ম ব্যক্তি থেকে বিভিন্ন ব্যক্তি থেকে বিভিন্ন হতে পারে, ক্যাসিডি ব্যবহারকারীদের স্টাইলো যখন বিষয়বস্তু ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্য নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে ব্যবহার করা হয়, তখন আমরা একটি বিশাল রেডিট কোর্পাসে ক্লাসাফিকেশনের প্রদর্শনের বিশ', 'sq': 'Literatura në zbulimin e sarkazmit automatik është përqëndruar kryesisht në analizën lexike, sintaktike dhe semantike të nivelit të tekstit. Megjithatë, një dënim sarkastik mund të shprehet me supozime kontekstuale, sfond dhe njohuri të përbashkët. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një detektor ContextuAl SarCasm (CASCADE), i cili miraton një qasje hibride të modelimit të përmbajtjes dhe të kontekstit për zbulimin e sarkazmit në diskutimet e medias sociale online. Për të fundit, CASCADE synon të nxjerrë informacionin kontekstual nga diskursi i një fili diskutimi. Gjithashtu, pasi natyra sarkastike dhe forma e shprehjes mund të ndryshojnë nga person në person, CASCADE përdorë përfshirje të përdoruesve që kodojnë karakteristikat stilometrike dhe personaliteti të përdoruesve. Kur përdoret së bashku me nxjerrësit e vlerave bazuar në përmbajtje të tilla si rrjetet nervore konvolutive, shohim një rritje të rëndësishme në performancën e klasifikimit në një korpus të madh Reddit.', 'cs': 'Literatura v oblasti automatizované detekce sarkasmu se zaměřuje především na lexikální, syntaktickou a sémantickou analýzu textu. Sarkastickou větu však lze vyjádřit kontextovými domněnkami, pozadím a znalostmi zdravého rozumu. V tomto článku navrhujeme ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), který přijímá hybridní přístup obsahově i kontextově řízeného modelování pro detekci sarkasmu v online diskusích na sociálních médiích. Pro druhé se CASCADE snaží extrahovat kontextové informace z diskurzu diskusního vlákna. Také protože sarkastická povaha a forma výrazu se mohou lišit od člověka k člověku, CASCADE využívá uživatelské vložení, které kódují stylometrické a osobnostní vlastnosti uživatelů. Při použití spolu s obsahově založenými extraktory funkcí, jako jsou konvoluční neuronové sítě, vidíme výrazné zvýšení klasifikačního výkonu na velkém korpusu Redditu.', 'bs': 'Literatura u automatskom detektoru sarkazma uglavnom se fokusirala na leksičku, sintaktičku i semantičku analizu teksta. Međutim, sarkastična rečenica se može izraziti s kontekstskim pretpostavkama, pozadinskim i običnim znanjem. U ovom papiru predlažemo DETEKTOR ContextuAl SarCasm (CASCADE), koji usvoji hibridni pristup modelima sadržaja i konteksta na otkrivanju sarkazma u internetskim diskusijama o društvenim medijima. Za poslednje, CASCADE ima cilj izvlačiti kontekstualne informacije iz diskusije o diskusiji. Također, pošto se sarkastična priroda i oblik izraza mogu razlikovati od osobe na osobu, CASCADE koristi integracije korisnika koji kodiraju stilometrijske i lične karakteristike korisnika. Kada se koristi zajedno sa ekstraktorima na sadržaju, poput konvolucionalnih neuralnih mreža, vidimo značajno povećanje klasifikacije na velikom Reddit korpusu.', 'ca': "La literatura en la detecció automàtica del sarcasme s'ha centrat principalment en l'anàlisi del text a nivell lècsic, sinàctic i semàntic. Però una frase sarcàstica es pot expressar amb presuncions contextuals, fons i coneixements comuns. En aquest paper, proposem un ContextuAl SarCasm Detector (CASCADE), que adopta un enfocament híbrid de la modelació basada tant en continguts com en contextos per la detecció del sarcasme en debats de mitjans socials en línia. Per a aquesta última, CASCADE té l'objectiu d'extrair informació contextual del discurs d'un fil de discussió. També, com la naturalesa sarcàstica i la forma d'expressió poden variar de persona a persona, CASCADE utilitza incorporacions d'usuari que codifiquen característiques estilomètriques i personalitats dels usuaris. Quan s'utilitzen juntament amb extractors de característiques basats en continguts com les xarxes neurals convolutives, veiem un impuls significatiu en el rendiment de classificació d'un gran corpus Reddit.", 'et': 'Sarkasmi automatiseeritud avastamise kirjandus on keskendunud peamiselt teksti leksikaalsele, süntaktilisele ja semantilisele analüüsile. Sarkastilist lauset saab siiski väljendada konteksti eelduste, tausta ja mõistlike teadmistega. Käesolevas töös pakume välja ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), mis võtab kasutusele nii sisu- kui kontekstipõhise modelleerimise hübriidse lähenemisviisi sarkasmi tuvastamiseks sotsiaalmeedia aruteludes. Viimase puhul on CASCADE eesmärk saada kontekstilist informatsiooni arutelulõnga diskursusest. Kuna sarkastiline olemus ja väljendusvorm võivad inimeselt erineda, kasutab CASCADE kasutajate manustamist, mis kodeerivad kasutajate stilomeetrilisi ja isikupärasusi. Kui kasutatakse koos sisupõhiste funktsioonide ekstraktoritega, nagu konvolutsioonilised närvivõrgud, näeme suure Reddit korpuse klassifitseerimisjõudluse märkimisväärset tõusu.', 'fi': 'Automaattisen sarkasmin havaitsemisen kirjallisuus on keskittynyt pääasiassa tekstin sanalyysiin, syntaktiseen ja semanttiseen analyysiin. Sarkastinen lause voidaan kuitenkin ilmaista kontekstuaalisilla oletuksilla, taustalla ja järkevällä tiedolla. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme ContextuAl SarCasm DEtectoria (CASCADE), joka käyttää sekä sisällöllisen että kontekstipohjaisen mallinnuksen hybridiajattelua sarkasmin havaitsemiseen sosiaalisessa mediassa. Viimeksi mainitun osalta CASCADE pyrkii poimimaan kontekstuaalista tietoa keskusteluketjun diskurssista. Koska sarkastinen luonne ja ilmaisumuoto voivat vaihdella henkilöstä toiseen, CASCADE käyttää käyttäjäupotuksia, jotka koodaavat käyttäjien stylometrisia ja persoonallisuusominaisuuksia. Kun sitä käytetään yhdessä sisältöpohjaisten ominaisuuksien purkajien, kuten konvolutionaalisten neuroverkkojen, kanssa, näemme merkittävän parannuksen suuren Reddit-korpusen luokittelussa.', 'jv': 'Digetara neng akeh \'sarkasm\' sing dipun autor Nanging, sarkassing isa dianggo kelas kuwi nggo ngerasahan seneng pisan kelas, penonton karo kesempatan. Nang pentungé iki, kita supoyo nggawe "contextu Al SarKasm DEtektor (CascAdE"), dadi supoyo biasane tarjamahan nggawe barang-sistem sing wis dianggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno sistem sarkasm nggawe tarjamahan liyane Ndoleh sing bocah dumadhi, CKAS dumadhi kanggo ngilanggar informasi contextual ning rabi iki wektu nggawe tarjamahan. Mangkane, dadi ke sampeyan sarkastik lan akeh dumadhi iso ngubah mungkane sampeyan karo perbudhakan sampeyan, cascAdE iso ngubah batasan pengguna-sampeyan karo akeh perbudhakan sampeyan stylometir lan akeh dumadhi winih. Speaking', 'ha': "littãfin da ke gane sarcasm farat ɗaya, yana muhalli da aka yi wa analyn littãfi na littafin leksisi-, syntactic- da semantic-levels. A lokacin da, za'a iya nuna wata kalma na sarcasti da zato, bakin da sanin da bakwai. Ga wannan takardan, Munã bukãtar da wani mataimaki na Contcontext-Al Sarcasm (CASCADA), wanda ke karɓi wata hanyoyi na hanyoyi wa masu ciki-da wanda ke samu-samu-samu-sami zuwa misalin sarcasm da aka samu a cikin majadiyan mitandaci na ƙarami. Ga na ƙarshe, CASCADA yana aimar ka sami bayani daga bakin mazaɓa. Kayya, kamar da sarcastic natur da fomat na magana za'a canza daga mutum zuwa ga mutum, CASCADA yana amfani da masu amfani da embeddinga wanda ke kode mitlometric da shakka masu amfani da shi. Idan an yi amfani da sami da wasu masu amfani da ke cikin kayan ƙunsa kamar shirin neural na'ura, za'a gane wani marubuci mai girma a cikin fasalin mai girma a rubutun Rededit.", 'he': 'הספרות בזיהוי סרקזם אוטומטי התמקדו בעיקר בניתוח רמה לקסית, סינטקטית ורמה סמנטית של טקסט. עם זאת, משפט סארקסטי יכול להיות מבטא עם הניחושים הקונקסטיים, רקע וידע משותף. In this paper, we propose a ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), which adopts a hybrid approach of both content- and context-driven modeling for sarcasm detection in online social media discussions.  למקרה האחרון, CASCADE מתכוון להוציא מידע קונטקסטי מהדיבור של חוט דיון. בנוסף, מאחר שהטבע הסרקסטי והצורה של הביטוי יכולים להשתנות מאדם לאדם, CASCADE משתמש באמצעות משתמשים שיקודים אופיינים סטילומטריים ואישיות של משתמשים. כשמשתמשים יחד עם חולצי תכונות מבוססים בתוכן כמו רשתות עצביות משתנות, אנו רואים דחיפה משמעותית בתפקיד ההקלטה על גופוס רדיט גדול.', 'sk': 'Literatura na področju avtomatiziranega odkrivanja sarkazma se je osredotočila predvsem na leksikalno, sintaktično in semantično analizo besedila. Vendar pa je sarkastičen stavek mogoče izraziti z kontekstualnimi domnevami, ozadjem in splošnim znanjem. V prispevku predlagamo ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE), ki uporablja hibridni pristop vsebinsko in kontekstno usmerjenega modeliranja za odkrivanje sarkazma v spletnih družbenih medijih. Za slednje si CASCADE prizadeva izvleči kontekstualne informacije iz diskurza diskurzivne niti. Ker se lahko sarkastična narava in oblika izražanja razlikujeta od osebe do osebe, CASCADE uporablja uporabniške vdelave, ki kodirajo stilometrične in osebnostne značilnosti uporabnikov. Pri uporabi skupaj z vsebinskimi ekstraktorji funkcij, kot so konvolucijska nevronska omrežja, vidimo znatno povečanje klasifikacijske učinkovitosti velikega Reddit korpusa.', 'bo': 'The literature in automated sarcasm detection has mainly focused on lexical-, syntactic- and semantic-level analysis of text. ཡིན་ནའང་། ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ཚོར་བ་སྣང་ཚུར་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་། རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་མཚོན་གྱི་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ContextuAl SarCasm DEtector (CASCADE)ཞིག་བསམ་བློ་གཏད་པ་དང་། དྲ་རྒྱ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་ཁོངས་ འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྗེས་སུ་CASCADE་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚོར་ཡུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ཕྱིར་འཐེན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་ཡིན། མ་ཟད། sarcastic nature and form of expression can vary from person to person, CASCADE utilizes user embeddings that encode stylometric and personality features of users. When used along with content-based feature extractors such as convolutional neural networks, we see a significant boost in the classification performance on a large Reddit corpus.'}
{'en': 'Recognizing Humour using Word Associations and Humour Anchor Extraction', 'ar': 'التعرف على الفكاهة باستخدام جمع الكلمات واستخراج الفكاهة', 'pt': 'Reconhecendo o humor usando associações de palavras e extração de âncoras de humor', 'fr': "Reconnaître l'humour à l'aide d'associations de mots et d'extraction", 'es': 'Reconocimiento del humor mediante asociaciones de palabras y extracción de anclas de humor', 'ja': '単語の関連付けとユーモアアンカー抽出を使用したユーモアの認識', 'ru': 'Распознавание юмора с помощью ассоциаций слов и извлечения якоря юмора', 'hi': 'Word Associations और Humor Anchor Extraction का उपयोग करके हास्य को पहचानना', 'zh': '用单词关联及幽默锚提取识幽默', 'ga': 'Greann a Aithint ag úsáid Cumainn Focal agus Astarraingt Ancaire Greann', 'ka': 'სიტყვების დამატებით და ჰუმური ანფორის ექსტრაქციის გამოყენება', 'el': 'Αναγνώριση του χιούμορ χρησιμοποιώντας τις ενώσεις λέξεων και την εξαγωγή άγκυρας χιούμορ', 'hu': 'A humor felismerése a szótársítások és a humor horgony kivonása segítségével', 'it': "Riconoscere l'umorismo usando associazioni di parole e estrazione dell'ancora dell'umorismo", 'kk': 'Сөздерді қосымша және қамтамасызды түсіру', 'lt': 'Recognizing Humour using Word Associations and Humour Anchor Extraction', 'mk': 'Признавање на хуморот со користење на зборни асоцијации и екстракција на хуморот', 'ms': 'Mengenali Humor menggunakan Persatuan Kata dan Ekstraksi Anchor Humor', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണങ്ങളും ഹുമൂര്\u200d ആഞ്ചോര്\u200d എക്സ്ട്രേക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഹുമൂര്\u200d', 'mt': 'Ir-rikonoxximent tal-Humour bl-użu ta’ Assoċjazzjonijiet tal-Kliem u Estrazzjoni tal-Ankor tal-Humour', 'mn': 'Хөмбөлөг хамтын холбоотой болон Хөмбөлөг хамтдаа татах', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie humoru za pomocą skojarzeń słownych i ekstrakcji kotwicy humoru', 'ro': 'Recunoașterea umorului folosind asociații de cuvinte și extracția de ancoră umor', 'no': 'Kjenner Humor ved bruk av ord- tilknytingar og Humor Anchor- utpakking', 'sr': 'Prepoznajući Humor koristeći udruženje riječi i izvlačenje Humor Anchor', 'si': 'වචනය සම්බන්ධය සහ හුමුර් ඇන්කෝර් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා හුමුරු හුමුරු හුමුරු හුම', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada Humaantu', 'sv': 'Att känna igen humor med hjälp av ordassociationer och humor ankareextraktion', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'ہمور کو کلمات اتصال اور ہمور انچور اٹھانے کے مطابق پہچان لیتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thừa nhận sự khai quật bằng các chủng liên kết từ và thải Neo.', 'bg': 'Разпознаване на хумора чрез асоциации на думи и извличане на хумор', 'nl': 'Humor herkennen met behulp van woordassociaties en Humor Anker Extractie', 'da': 'Genkendelse af humor ved hjælp af Word Associations og Humour Anchor Extraction', 'hr': 'Prepoznajući Humor koristeći udruženje riječi i izvlačenje Humor Anchor', 'de': 'Erkennen von Humor mit Wortassoziationen und Humor Anchor Extraction', 'id': 'Mengenali Humor menggunakan Asosiasi Kata dan Ekstraksi Anchor Humor', 'ko': '단어 연상과 유머 닻을 사용하여 유머를 추출하여 식별하다', 'sw': 'Kutambua Binadamu kwa kutumia Chama cha Maneno na Kuondolewa kwa Kitendo cha Binadamu', 'sq': 'Duke njohur humorin duke përdorur asocimet e fjalëve dhe ekstraksionin e ankorit humor', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Հոմուրը ճանաչելը՝ օգտագործելով բառերի կապերը և հոմուրի անկորի արտահանումը', 'az': 'S√∂z ńįŇükil…ôri v…ô Humor Anchor Extraction', 'bn': 'শব্দ সংস্থা এবং হিউমার অ্যাঙ্কোর এক্সট্র্যাকশন ব্যবহার করে হিউমার চিনতে পারে', 'fa': 'با استفاده از ارتباطات کلمات و خارج کردن انگشت خطرناک', 'bs': 'Prepoznajući Humor koristeći udruženje riječi i izvlačenje Humor Anchor', 'ca': "Recognir l'humor utilitzant les associacions de paraules i l'extracció de l'ancora d'humor", 'tr': 'Humusyny söz birleşmeleri we Humusy Açmak ulanyp tanaýarlar', 'cs': 'Rozpoznání humoru pomocí slovních asociací a extrakce humoru kotvy', 'af': 'Herken Humor gebruik Woord Associations en Humor Anchor Extraction', 'et': 'Huumori äratundmine sõnaühenduste ja huumori ankru väljavõtmise abil', 'fi': 'Huumorin tunnistaminen sanayhdistysten ja huumorin ankkuroinnin avulla', 'jv': 'Geweke nggunggo Ngubah Munggang Word Associations lan Ngubah ancor', 'ha': 'Suna gane Huru da ke amfani da Shirin Aiki da Cikakken Bayani', 'he': 'מזהה הומור באמצעות חברות מילים ומוציאת הקשר הומור', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje humorja z besednimi združenji in ekstrakcijo humorja sidra', 'bo': 'Humour using Word Associations and Humour Anchor Extraction'}
{'en': 'This paper attempts to marry the interpretability of statistical machine learning approaches with the more robust models of joke structure and joke semantics capable of being learned by neural models. Specifically, we explore the use of semantic relatedness features based on word associations, rather than the more common Word2Vec similarity, on a binary humour identification task and identify several factors that make word associations a better fit for humour. We also explore the effects of using joke structure, in the form of humour anchors (Yang et al., 2015), for improving the performance of semantic features and show that, while an intriguing idea, humour anchors contain several pitfalls that can hurt performance.', 'ar': 'تحاول هذه الورقة التوفيق بين قابلية تفسير مناهج التعلم الآلي الإحصائي مع النماذج الأكثر قوة لهيكل النكتة ودلالات النكات القادرة على تعلمها من خلال النماذج العصبية. على وجه التحديد ، نستكشف استخدام ميزات الارتباط الدلالي استنادًا إلى اقترانات الكلمات ، بدلاً من تشابه Word2Vec الأكثر شيوعًا ، في مهمة تحديد الفكاهة الثنائية وتحديد العديد من العوامل التي تجعل ارتباطات الكلمات مناسبة بشكل أفضل للفكاهة. نستكشف أيضًا تأثيرات استخدام بنية الدعابة ، في شكل مراسي فكاهية (Yang et al. ، 2015) ، لتحسين أداء الميزات الدلالية وإظهار أنه ، في حين أن الفكرة المثيرة للفضول ، تحتوي المراسي الفكاهية على العديد من المزالق التي يمكن أن تضر بالأداء .', 'fr': "Cet article tente de combiner l'interprétabilité des approches statistiques d'apprentissage automatique avec les modèles plus robustes de structure et de sémantique des blagues pouvant être apprises par des modèles neuronaux. Plus précisément, nous explorons l'utilisation de caractéristiques de parenté sémantique basées sur des associations de mots, plutôt que sur la similitude plus courante de Word2Vec, dans le cadre d'une tâche d'identification d'humour binaire et nous identifions plusieurs facteurs qui font que les associations de mots conviennent mieux à l'humour. Nous explorons également les effets de l'utilisation de la structure des blagues, sous forme d'ancres d'humour (Yang et al., 2015), pour améliorer la performance des caractéristiques sémantiques et montrons que, bien qu'étant une idée intrigante, les ancres humoristiques contiennent plusieurs pièges qui peuvent nuire à la performance.", 'es': 'Este artículo intenta combinar la interpretabilidad de los enfoques de aprendizaje automático estadístico con los modelos más sólidos de estructura de broma y semántica de broma que pueden aprenderse mediante modelos neuronales. Específicamente, exploramos el uso de características de relación semántica basadas en asociaciones de palabras, en lugar de la similitud más común de Word2Vec, en una tarea de identificación de humor binario e identificamos varios factores que hacen que las asociaciones de palabras se adapten mejor al humor. También exploramos los efectos del uso de la estructura de broma, en forma de anclas de humor (Yang et al., 2015), para mejorar el rendimiento de las características semánticas y mostramos que, si bien es una idea intrigante, las anclas de humor contienen varios escollos que pueden perjudicar el rendimiento.', 'pt': 'Este artigo tenta casar a interpretabilidade de abordagens estatísticas de aprendizado de máquina com os modelos mais robustos de estrutura de piadas e semânticas de piadas capazes de serem aprendidas por modelos neurais. Especificamente, exploramos o uso de recursos de relacionamento semântico com base em associações de palavras, em vez da similaridade Word2Vec mais comum, em uma tarefa de identificação de humor binário e identificamos vários fatores que tornam as associações de palavras mais adequadas ao humor. Também exploramos os efeitos do uso da estrutura da piada, na forma de âncoras de humor (Yang et al., 2015), para melhorar o desempenho de recursos semânticos e mostramos que, embora seja uma ideia intrigante, as âncoras de humor contêm várias armadilhas que podem prejudicar o desempenho .', 'ja': '統計的機械学習アプローチの解釈可能性と、ニューラルモデルによって学習可能なジョーク構造とジョーク意味論のより堅牢なモデルを結びつけようと試みる。具体的には、より一般的なWord 2 Vecの類似性ではなく、単語の関連性に基づいたセマンティック関連性機能のバイナリユーモア識別タスクでの使用を探求し、単語の関連性をユーモアに適したものにするいくつかの要因を特定します。また、意味的特徴のパフォーマンスを向上させるために、ユーモアアンカーの形でジョーク構造を使用することの効果を探求し（ Yang et al., 2015 ）、興味深いアイデアでありながら、ユーモアアンカーにはパフォーマンスを損なう可能性のあるいくつかの落とし穴が含まれていることを示します。', 'ru': 'В данной работе предпринята попытка совместить интерпретируемость статистических подходов к машинному обучению с более надежными моделями структуры шуток и семантики шуток, которые могут быть изучены нейронными моделями. В частности, мы исследуем использование семантических признаков родства, основанных на ассоциациях слов, а не на более распространенном сходстве Word2Vec, на задаче идентификации бинарного юмора и выявляем несколько факторов, которые делают ассоциации слов более подходящими для юмора. Мы также исследуем эффекты использования шуточной структуры в виде якорей юмора (Yang et al., 2015) для улучшения производительности семантических особенностей и показываем, что, хотя интригующая идея, якоря юмора содержат несколько подводных камней, которые могут повредить производительности.', 'zh': '本图将计机器学术者可解释性与更健笑结语义合,可以神经学。 具体来说,探单词联之语义相关性,非常见之Word2Vec相似性,在二进制默识之中,定使单词关联更宜幽默之数也。 又讨幽默锚之文以笑结(Yang et al.,2015)以善语义特征之效,虽幽锚点一趣,而幽默锚包数可损之阱。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर मजाक संरचना और मजाक शब्दार्थ के अधिक मजबूत मॉडल के साथ सांख्यिकीय मशीन सीखने के दृष्टिकोण की व्याख्या से शादी करने का प्रयास करता है जो तंत्रिका मॉडल द्वारा सीखा जा सकता है। विशेष रूप से, हम एक द्विआधारी हास्य पहचान कार्य पर अधिक सामान्य Word2Vec समानता के बजाय शब्द संघों के आधार पर शब्दार्थ संबंधितता सुविधाओं के उपयोग का पता लगाते हैं और कई कारकों की पहचान करते हैं जो शब्द संघों को हास्य के लिए बेहतर फिट बनाते हैं। हम हास्य एंकर (यांग एट अल. 2015) के रूप में मजाक संरचना का उपयोग करने के प्रभावों का भी पता लगाते हैं, शब्दार्थ विशेषताओं के प्रदर्शन में सुधार के लिए और दिखाते हैं कि, जबकि एक पेचीदा विचार, हास्य एंकरों में कई नुकसान होते हैं जो प्रदर्शन को चोट पहुंचा सकते हैं।', 'ga': "Déanann an páipéar seo iarracht inléirmhíniú na gcur chuige meaisínfhoghlama staidrimh a chomhcheangal leis na samhlacha níos daingne de struchtúr magaidh agus de shéimeantaic ghreama is féidir a fhoghlaim trí shamhlacha néaracha. Go sonrach, déanaimid iniúchadh ar úsáid gnéithe gaolmhaireachta séimeantach atá bunaithe ar chomhcheangail focal, seachas ar chosúlacht níos coitianta Word2Vec, ar thasc aitheantais dhénártha greann agus sainaithnímid roinnt fachtóirí a chuireann cumainn focal in oiriúint níos fearr don ghreann. Déanaimid iniúchadh freisin ar na héifeachtaí a bhaineann le struchtúr joke a úsáid, i bhfoirm ancairí greann (Yang et al., 2015), chun feidhmíocht na ngnéithe séimeantaice a fheabhsú agus taispeánann muid, cé gur smaoineamh suimiúil é, go bhfuil roinnt gaistí in ancairí greann a d'fhéadfadh an fheidhmíocht a ghortú. .", 'hu': 'A tanulmány a statisztikai gépi tanulási megközelítések értelmezhetőségét kísérli összekapcsolni az idegi modellek által tanulható vicceszerkezet és vicceszemetika robusztusabb modelljeivel. Konkrétan a szóasszociációkon alapuló szemantikai kapcsolattartási funkciók használatát vizsgáljuk fel, nem pedig a gyakoribb Word2Vec hasonlóságot, egy bináris humor azonosítási feladaton keresztül, és számos olyan tényezőt azonosítunk, amelyek jobban illeszkednek a szóasszociációkhoz. Feltárjuk továbbá a humor horgonyok formájában (Yang et al., 2015) használt vicces struktúra hatásait a szemantikai jellemzők teljesítményének javítására, és megmutatjuk, hogy miközben egy érdekes ötlet, a humor horgonyok számos olyan buktatót tartalmaznak, amelyek árthatják a teljesítményt.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία επιχειρεί να συνδυάσει την ερμηνεία των προσεγγίσεων στατιστικής μηχανικής μάθησης με τα πιο ισχυρά μοντέλα δομής αστείων και σημασιολογίας αστείων ικανά να διδαχθούν από νευρωνικά μοντέλα. Συγκεκριμένα, διερευνούμε τη χρήση χαρακτηριστικών σημασιολογικής συγγένειας βασισμένων σε συσχετίσεις λέξεων, αντί της πιο συνηθισμένης ομοιότητας σε μια εργασία δυαδικής αναγνώρισης χιούμορ και εντοπίζουμε διάφορους παράγοντες που κάνουν τις ενώσεις λέξεων πιο κατάλληλες για το χιούμορ. Εξετάζουμε επίσης τις επιπτώσεις της χρήσης δομής αστείου, με τη μορφή αγκύρων χιούμορ (κ.α., 2015), για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης σημασιολογικών χαρακτηριστικών και δείχνουν ότι, ενώ μια ενδιαφέρουσα ιδέα, οι αγκυρώσεις χιούμορ περιέχουν αρκετές παγίδες που μπορούν να βλάψουν την απόδοση.', 'it': "Questo articolo cerca di coniugare l'interpretabilità degli approcci statistici di machine learning con i modelli più robusti di struttura di scherzo e semantica di scherzo capaci di essere appresi da modelli neurali. Nello specifico, esploriamo l'uso di caratteristiche di relazione semantica basate su associazioni di parole, piuttosto che sulla somiglianza Word2Vec più comune, su un compito di identificazione dell'umorismo binario e identifichiamo diversi fattori che rendono le associazioni di parole una migliore misura per l'umorismo. Esploriamo anche gli effetti dell'utilizzo della struttura dello scherzo, sotto forma di ancore dell'umorismo (Yang et al., 2015), per migliorare le prestazioni delle caratteristiche semantiche e mostriamo che, mentre un'idea intrigante, le ancore dell'umorismo contengono diverse insidie che possono danneggiare la performance.", 'lt': 'Šis dokumentas bando susituokti su statistinių mašinų mokymosi metodų aiškinamumu su patikimesniais juokų struktūros modeliais ir juokų semantikos modeliais, kurie gali būti mokomi iš nervinių modelių. Konkrečiai, mes tiriame semantinio ryšio savybių, grindžiamų žodžių asociacijomis, naudojimą, o ne labiau įprastą Word2Vec panašumą, dvigubo humoro identifikavimo užduotį ir nustatome keletą veiksnių, kurie pagerina žodžių asociacijas humorui. Taip pat tiriame juokingos struktūros naudojimo humoro ankrų forma (Yang et al., 2015 m.), siekiant pagerinti semantinių savybių veikimą, poveikį ir rodome, kad nors įdomi idėja, humoro ankrų sudėtyje yra kelių trūkumų, kurie gali pakenkti rezultatams.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз статистикалық машинаның оқыту мүмкіндігінің түсініктерін невралдық модельдермен оқытуға мүмкіндік беретін семантикалық үлгілерімен үйрену әрекетіне арналған. Ескертулікті, біз сөздерді байланыстыруға негізделген семантикалық қатынастық мүмкіндіктерін, Word2Vec- тың көбірек ұқсас емес, бинарлық хумор идентификациясының тапсырмасына қолданып, сөздерді байланыстыруға арналған бірнеше фа Біз сондай-ақ шек құрылғысын қолдану эффекттерін зерттейміз (Yang et al., 2015), семантикалық мүмкіндіктерді жақсарту үшін жұмыс құрылғысын жақсарту үшін жұмыс құрылғысын зерттейміз. Бірақ қызықты идея, хумор анкерлер', 'mk': 'Овој весник се обидува да се омажи за интерпретабилноста на пристапите на статистичко машинско учење со посилни модели на структура на шеги и семантика на шеги способни да се научи од нервни модели. Специфично, ние ја истражуваме употребата на семантични карактеристики на поврзаност базирани на зборни асоцијации, наместо пообичната сличност на Word2Vec, на бинарна задача за идентификација на хумор и идентификуваме неколку фактори кои ги прават зборните асоцијации подобро подгот Исто така, ги истражуваме ефектите од употребата на структурата на шеги, во форма на хуморски анкори (Јанг и г.', 'ms': 'This paper attempts to marry the interpretability of statistical machine learning approaches with the more robust models of joke structure and joke semantics capable of being learned by neural models.  Secara khusus, kami mengeksplorasi penggunaan ciri-ciri hubungan semantik berdasarkan persatuan perkataan, daripada persamaan Word2Vec yang lebih umum, pada tugas pengenalan humor binari dan mengenalpasti beberapa faktor yang membuat persatuan perkataan lebih sesuai untuk humor. Kami juga mengeksplorasi kesan menggunakan struktur lawak, dalam bentuk jangkar humor (Yang et al., 2015), untuk meningkatkan prestasi ciri-ciri semantik dan menunjukkan bahawa, sementara idea menarik, jangkar humor mengandungi beberapa pitfalls yang boleh menyakiti prestasi.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d പരിസ്ഥിതിക മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ വിവാഹവിവാഹം വിവാഹം കഴിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. പ്രവർത്തക മോഡലുകളാല്\u200d പഠിക്കാ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, വാര്\u200dഡ്2വേക്ക് സമീപത്തില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ ഉപയോഗം നമ്മള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ബൈനര്\u200d ഹുമൂര്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന ജോലിയി നമ്മള്\u200d തമാശയുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, ഹാസ്യൂര്\u200d ആങ്കോര്\u200dസിന്റെ (യാങ്ങ് എറ്റ്,2015) രൂപത്തില്\u200d, സെമാന്റിക്ക് വിശേഷങ്ങളുടെ പ്രകടനത്തിന് മു', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippruva jżewweġ l-interpretabbiltà tal-approċċi tat-tagħlim tal-magni statistiċi mal-mudelli aktar robusti tal-istruttura tal-vittmi u s-semantika tal-vittmi li kapaċi jitgħallmu minn mudelli newrali. Speċifikament, a ħna nesploraw l-użu ta’ karatteristiċi semantiċi ta’ rabta bbażati fuq assoċjazzjonijiet tal-kliem, aktar milli fuq similarità Word2Vec aktar komuni, fuq kompitu binarju ta’ identifikazzjoni tal-humour u nidentifikaw diversi fatturi li jagħmlu l-assoċjazzjonijiet tal-kliem aktar adattati għall-humour. Aħna nesploraw ukoll l-effetti tal-użu tal-istruttura tal-vittmi, fil-forma ta’ ankri tal-humour (Yang et al., 2015), għat-titjib tal-prestazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi semantiċi u nuru li, filwaqt li idea intriganti, ankri tal-humour fihom diversi pitfalls li jistgħu jagħmlu ħsara lill-prestazzjoni.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь статистикийн машин суралцах боломжтой ойлголтын тухай гэрлэж байгаа бөгөөд мэдрэлийн загвараар суралцах боломжтой тоглоом бүтээгдэхүүний илүү хүчтэй загваруудын загваруудтай холбоотой. Ялангуяа бид үгний холбоотой холбоотой semantic холбоотой харилцааны харилцааны хэрэглээ судалж, Word2Vec-ын илүү ихэвчлэн холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой ажил дээр, мөн үгний холбоотой холбоотой хэд хэдэн хүчин зүйл Бид мөн шүлэг бүтээгдэхүүний үр дүнг (Yang et al., 2015) хэлбэрээр шинэчлэх боломжийг судалж, харуулж байна. Гэхдээ сонирхолтой санаа бол хумор дагуулууд үр дүнг өвчинтэй болгодог олон дагуулуудыг агуулдаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret prøver å gifta med uttolkinga av statistiske maskinelæring tilnærmar med dei fleire sterke modelane av joke-strukturen og joke-semantikk som kan lærast av neuralmodeller. Spesielt utforskar vi bruken av semantiske relatede funksjonar basert på ordassosisjonar, i staden for det meir vanlege liknande Word2Vec, på eit binær humor-identifikasjonsprogrammet og identifiserer fleire faktorer som gjer ordassosisjonar ein betre passend for humor. Vi undersøker også effekten av å bruka joke-strukturen, i form av humørankorar (Yang et al., 2015), for å forbetra utviklinga av semantiske funksjonar og vise at, mens ein interessant idee, humørankorar inneheld fleire pikslar som kan skade utviklinga.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł próbuje połączyć interpretowalność statystycznych metod uczenia maszynowego z bardziej solidnymi modelami struktury żartów i semantyki dowcipów zdolnymi do nauki przez modele neuronowe. W szczególności badamy wykorzystanie cech semantycznego powiązania opartych na skojarzeniach słów, a nie na bardziej powszechnym podobieństwie Word2Vec, na zadaniu identyfikacji binarnego humoru i identyfikujemy kilka czynników, które sprawiają, że skojarzenia słów lepiej pasują do humoru. Badamy również efekty wykorzystania struktury żartów w postaci kotwic humoru (Yang et al., 2015), na poprawę wydajności cech semantycznych i pokazujemy, że choć intrygujący pomysł, kotwice humoru zawierają kilka pułapek, które mogą zaszkodzić wydajności.', 'ka': 'ეს დოკუმენტი მოცდილობა, რომ სტატისტიკური მაქანის სწავლების ინტერპუქტურაციის შესაძლებლობასთან გაყოფილი სტატისტიკური მაქანებისთვის უფრო ძალიან სტატისტრუქტურის მოდე განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ სემონტიკური დაკავშირების გამოყენება სიტყვების დაკავშირებული სიტყვების შესახებ, ვიდრე უფრო საერთო Word2Vec-ის განსხვავება, ორივე ჰუმორის განსხვავება და განსაკუთრება რამდენიმე ფაქ ჩვენ ასევე ვხედავთ ქონტურის სტრუქტურის გამოყენების ეფექტურების გამოყენება, ჰუმური კონფორების ფორმაში (Yang et al., 2015) სემონტიკური ფუნქტურების გამოსახულება და გამოჩვენება, რომ, როცა საინტერესო იდეა,', 'ro': 'Această lucrare încearcă să combine interpretabilitatea abordărilor statistice de învățare automată cu modelele mai robuste de structură a glumelor și semantică a glumelor capabile să fie învățate de modele neurale. În mod specific, explorăm utilizarea caracteristicilor de relație semantică bazate pe asociații de cuvinte, mai degrabă decât pe similaritatea mai comună Word2Vec, pe o sarcină de identificare a umorului binar și identificăm mai mulți factori care fac asociațiile de cuvinte o potrivire mai bună pentru umor. De asemenea, explorăm efectele utilizării structurii de glume, sub formă de ancore de umor (Yang et al., 2015), pentru îmbunătățirea performanței caracteristicilor semantice și arătăm că, deși o idee intrigantă, ancorele de umor conțin mai multe capcane care pot afecta performanța.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir pokušava da se udaje za interpretabilnost statističkog mašine pristupa najjačim modelima strukture šala i semantika šala koje mogu naučiti neuralnim modelima. Posebno, istražujemo korištenje semantičkih karakteristika veze na temelju udruženja rijeèi, a ne više uobièajene sliènosti Word2Vec, na zadatku za identifikaciju binarnog humora i identifikujemo nekoliko faktora koji čine udruženja rijeèi boljim za humor. Takođe istražujemo učinak korištenja strukture šala, u obliku humorskih sidra (Yang et al., 2015), za poboljšanje učinka semantičkih karakteristika i pokazujemo da, dok zanimljiva ideja, humorski sidri sadrže nekoliko sažaljenja koje mogu povrijediti učinku.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ ස්ථානික පණිවිඩයේ ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට බඳින්න පුළුවන් විහිළුවන් විහිළුවන් සං විශේෂයෙන්, අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ සෙමැන්ටික් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් භාවිතාවය, වචන සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක් විතරයි, වචන සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවක්  අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා විහිළු ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, හුමෝර් ඇන්කෝර්ස් වර්ගයෙන් (Yang et al., 2015), සෙමාන්ටික් විශේෂතාවක් වැඩ කරන්න සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා පෙ', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats försöker förena tolkningen av statistiska maskininlärningsmetoder med mer robusta modeller av skämtstruktur och skämtsemantik som kan läras av neurala modeller. Specifikt undersöker vi användningen av semantiska relationsfunktioner baserade på ordassociationer, snarare än den vanligare Word2Vec likheten, på en binär humor identifiering uppgift och identifierar flera faktorer som gör ordassociationer bättre lämpade för humor. Vi undersöker också effekterna av att använda skämtstruktur, i form av humor ankare (Yang et al., 2015), för att förbättra prestandan av semantiska funktioner och visar att humor ankare, medan en spännande idé, innehåller flera fallgropar som kan skada prestanda.', 'so': 'This paper attempts to marry the interpretability of statistical machine learning approaches with the more robust models of joke structure and joke semantics capable of being learned by neural models.  Si gaar ah, waxaynu baaraynaa isticmaalka xiriirka semantiga ee ku saleysan ururada hadalka, taas oo ka bedela isku mid ah Word2Vec, waxaynu ku qornaa shaqo aqoonsiga fudud oo labaad ah, waxaana sidoo kale ku garanaynaa waxyaabo badan oo ka dhigaya ururada hadalka oo ku habboon jimicsiga. Sidoo kale waxaynu u baaraynaa saameyaasha isticmaalka dhismaha jimicsiga (Yang et al., 2015) si loo hagaajiyo tababarka jimicsiga iyo in lagu muujiyo fikrada aad u xiisaysan karo waxay ku jirtaa tuur badan oo waxyeeleyn kara.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திரத்தின் விளக்கம் திருமணம் செய்ய முயற்சிக்கிறது மற்றும் மேலும் வேடிக்கை அமைப்பு மாதிரிகள் மற்றும் கே குறிப்பிட்டு, வார்த்தை இணைப்புகளை அடிப்படையில் பொதுவான வார்த்தை 2வெக்கு பதிலாக பொதுவான தொடர்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி இருமுறை துளையான அடையாளம் செய்யும் பல காரணிகள நாம் வேடிக்கையான அமைப்பை பயன்படுத்தும் விளைவுகளைப் பார்க்கிறோம் ( யாங் மற்றும் அல்., 2015) செயல்பாட்டை மேம்படுத்த முடியும் மற்றும் சுவாரசியமான யோசனையைக் காட', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ کی کوشش کرتی ہے کہ ایسٹیسٹیسی ماشین کی تعبیر کی تعبیر کی تعبیر کی زیادہ مضبوط موڈل کے ساتھ مسخرہ ساختاری اور مسخرہ سیمانٹیکوں سے سکھائی جاتی ہے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم ایک دوسری ہمور کی شناسایی کا کام پر استعمال کرتے ہیں اور بہت سے فاکتوروں کو پہچان دیتے ہیں جو کلمات کی تعلقات کو ہمور کے لئے بہتر ٹھیک بناتے ہیں۔ ہم نے بھی جوک ساختار کے استعمال کے اثرات کو دیکھا ہے، ہمور آنچروں کے شکل میں (Yang et al., 2015) کے لئے، سیمنٹی ویٹیوں کی عملکرد کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے اور دکھائے کہ، ایک اثر اثر، ہمور آنچروں میں بہت سی پتھروں کا موجود ہے جو عملکرد کو نقصان پہنچا سکتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "This paper attempts to marry the interpretability of statistical machine learning approaches with the more robust models of joke structure and joke semantics capable of being learned by neural models.  Ko'rinishimiz mumkin, so'zlar bir necha bogʻ'liq tashkilotlarini o'rganamiz va bir necha qancha narsalarni qo'shish imkoniyatini o'rganamiz va so'zlar bog'liqlariga juda yaxshi bo'lishi mumkin. Biz esa esa, keksiz tuzuvlar (Yang et, 2015) shaklga ishlab chiqaramiz va semantik xususiyatlarni oshirish uchun, va bu g'oyalarning qiziqarli fikr bilan bir necha suhbatlarni ko'rganamiz. Bu g'oyalarning tashkilotlarini bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này cố kết hôn với sự phân giải của các phương pháp học tạo máy tính thống kê với các mô hình hài cứng rắn hơn về cấu trúc trò đùa và ngữ pháp hài có khả năng được học từ các mô hình thần kinh. Đặc biệt, chúng ta khám phá cách sử dụng các tính năng liên quan theo ngữ nghĩa dựa trên cách liên kết từ, hơn là nét giống Word2Vec phổ biến, trên một nhiệm vụ nhận dạng tính hài hước nhị phân và xác định vài yếu tố khiến các từ liên kết trở nên phù hợp hơn với khôi hài. Chúng tôi cũng khám phá kết quả của việc sử dụng cấu trúc trò đùa, dưới dạng các nút đỡ buồn cười (Yang et al., tê tê), để tăng hiệu quả của các tính năng ngữ pháp và cho thấy rằng, trong khi một ý tưởng hấp dẫn, các nguyên tố hài hước có nhiều cạm bẫy có thể gây tổn hại đến hiệu suất.', 'bg': 'Тази статия се опитва да съчетае интерпретацията на статистическите подходи за машинно обучение с по-здравите модели на шега структура и шега семантика, способни да се научат от невронни модели. По-конкретно, изследваме използването на семантични характеристики на свързаност, базирани на асоциации на думи, а не на по-често срещаната сходство на задача за идентифициране на двоичен хумор и идентифицираме няколко фактора, които правят асоциациите на думи по-подходящи за хумора. Изследваме и ефектите от използването на шега структура под формата на хуморни котви (Янг и др., 2015), за подобряване на представянето на семантични характеристики и показваме, че макар и интригуваща идея, хуморните котви съдържат няколко капани, които могат да навредят на изпълнението.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel probeert de interpreteerbaarheid van statistische machine learning benaderingen te combineren met de robuustere modellen van grapstructuur en grapstructuur die kunnen worden geleerd door neurale modellen. In het bijzonder onderzoeken we het gebruik van semantische relatedness functies gebaseerd op woordassociaties, in plaats van de meer voorkomende Word2Vec gelijkenis, op een binaire humor identificatie taak en identificeren we verschillende factoren die woordassociaties beter geschikt maken voor humor. We onderzoeken ook de effecten van het gebruik van grapstructuur, in de vorm van humor ankers (Yang et al., 2015), voor het verbeteren van de prestaties van semantische kenmerken en laten zien dat humor ankers, hoewel een intrigerend idee, verschillende valkuilen bevatten die prestaties kunnen schaden.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit versucht, die Interpretierbarkeit statistischer Ansätze des maschinellen Lernens mit robusteren Modellen der Witzstruktur und Witzsameantik zu verbinden, die von neuronalen Modellen erlernt werden können. Insbesondere untersuchen wir die Verwendung von semantischen Verwandtschaftsmerkmalen basierend auf Wortassoziationen anstatt der häufigeren Word2Vec-Ähnlichkeit auf einer binären Humor-Identifikationsaufgabe und identifizieren mehrere Faktoren, die Wortassoziationen besser für Humor geeignet machen. Wir untersuchen auch die Auswirkungen der Verwendung von Witzstrukturen in Form von Humorankern (Yang et al., 2015), um die Leistung semantischer Merkmale zu verbessern und zeigen, dass Humoranker zwar eine faszinierende Idee sind, aber mehrere Fallstricke enthalten, die Performance beeinträchtigen können.', 'id': 'Kertas ini mencoba untuk menikah dengan interpretabilitas pendekatan mesin statistik belajar dengan model yang lebih kuat struktur lelucon dan semantik lelucon yang mampu dipelajari oleh model saraf. Specifically, we explore the use of semantic relatedness features based on word associations, rather than the more common Word2Vec similarity, on a binary humour identification task and identify several factors that make word associations a better fit for humour.  Kami juga mengeksplorasi efek dari menggunakan struktur lelucon, dalam bentuk jangkar humor (Yang et al., 2015), untuk meningkatkan prestasi karakteristik semantis dan menunjukkan bahwa, sementara ide yang menarik, jangkar humor mengandung beberapa pitfalls yang dapat menyakiti prestasi.', 'ko': '본고는 통계기계 학습 방법의 해석 가능성과 더욱 건장한 우스갯소리 구조와 우스갯소리 의미 모델을 결합시켜 이런 모델은 신경모델을 통해 학습할 수 있도록 하고자 한다.구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 이원 유머 식별 임무에서 더 흔히 볼 수 있는 단어보다 단어 연상을 바탕으로 하는 2VEC 유사성의 의미 관련성 특징의 사용을 탐색하고 단어 연상을 유머에 더욱 적합하게 하는 몇 가지 요소를 확정했다.우리는 또한 유머 앵커 형식의 우스갯소리 구조(Yang et al., 2015)를 사용하여 의미 특징의 표현 효과를 향상시켰고 유머 앵커는 흥미로운 생각이지만 표현에 영향을 미칠 수 있는 몇 가지 함정을 포함하고 있음을 나타냈다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ سعی می\u200cکند با تفسیر قابلیت یادگیری ماشین آماری با مدل\u200cهای قوی\u200cترین ساختار شوخی و سیمانتیک\u200cهای شوخی که قابل یادگیری توسط مدل\u200cهای عصبی هستند ازدواج کند. مخصوصاً ما استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای مربوط به مربوط به ارتباطات کلمات را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، به جای مشابه\u200cی مشابه\u200cتری Word2Vec، به کار شناسایی خنده\u200cهای دویینی و چندین فاکتور شناسایی می\u200cکنیم که ارتباطات کلمات را بهتر برای خنده می\u200cسازند. ما همچنین اثرات استفاده از ساختار جوک را در شکل لنگرهای شوخی (Yang et al., 2015) برای improving performance of semantic features و نشان می دهیم که در حالی که یک ایده جالبی، لنگرهای شوخی چندین آسیبی دارند که می توانند به عملکرد آسیب دهند.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linajaribu kuolea tafsiri ya ufundi wa mashine ya takwimu zinazoweza kujifunza zinazoingia na mitindo zaidi ya muundo wa kejeli na mitindo ya kejeli yanayoweza kujifunza na mifano ya kejeli. Kwa hakika, tunachunguza matumizi ya mahusiano ya kimapenzi yanayohusiana na vyama vya maneno, badala ya kile kinachofanana na Word2Vec, katika jukumu la utambulisho wa ucheshi binafsi na kutambua sababu kadhaa zinazofanya makundi ya maneno yanayofanana zaidi kwa ucheshi. Pia tunatafuta madhara ya kutumia muundo wa kejeli, kwa namna ya michoro ya ucheshi (Yang et, 2015), kwa ajili ya kuboresha utendaji wa tabia za kisiasa na kuonyesha kwamba, wakati wazo la kusisimua, vifaa vya ucheshi huwa na vifaa vingi vinavyoweza kusababisha utendaji.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz statistik maşynyň öwrenmegi ýagdaýynyň golaýlaşlygyna çalyşýar. Näyral modeller tarapyndan öwrenmegi mümkin edip biljek güýçli modelleri we şaka semantikleri bilen golaýlaşýar. Adatça, biz semantik gatnaşyk wajyplaryň ullanyşyny sözler baglaşyklaryna daýan edýän, iki süýtgelik tanyşyklaryň uzyny üstünde, we sözler baglaşyklaryň has gowy bir şekilde tapan birnäçe faktörleri keşfetýäris. Biz hem şaka yapyklaryny ulanmakyň etkisini (Yang et al., 2015.), semantik özellikleriniň etkinleşigini geliştirmek üçin gözden çykýarys we şonuň üçin, gyzykly bir ideýa bolsa, süýji gurdalyklaryň etkinleşigi ýaramak üçin birnäçe çykyş bar.', 'da': 'Denne artikel forsøger at forene fortolkningen af statistiske maskinlæringsmetoder med de mere robuste modeller af jokestruktur og jokesemantik, der kan læres af neurale modeller. Specielt undersøger vi brugen af semantiske relaterethedsfunktioner baseret på ordassociationer, snarere end den mere almindelige Word2Vec lighed, på en binær humor identifikationsopgave og identificerer flere faktorer, der gør ordassociationer til en bedre egnet til humor. Vi undersøger også virkningerne af at bruge jokestruktur i form af humor ankre (Yang et al., 2015) til at forbedre præstationen af semantiske træk og viser, at mens en spændende idé, indeholder humor ankre flere faldgruber, der kan skade præstation.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir pokušava oženiti interpretabilnost pristupa statističkim mašinama s jačim modelima strukture šala i semantika šala koje mogu naučiti neuralni modeli. Posebno, istražujemo korištenje semantičkih odnosa na temelju udruženja riječima, umjesto češće sličnosti Word2Vec, na zadatku za identifikaciju binarnog humora i identificiramo nekoliko faktora koji čine udruženja riječima boljom odgovarajućim za humor. Također istražujemo učinak korištenja strukture šala, u obliku humorskih čvorova (Yang et al., 2015), za poboljšanje učinka semantičkih karakteristika i pokazujemo da, dok zanimljiva ideja, humorski čvorovi sadrže nekoliko sažaljenja koje mogu povrijediti učinku.', 'sq': 'Kjo letër përpiqet të martohet me interpretueshmërinë e metodave të mësimit të makinave statistike me modelet më të forta të strukturës së shakave dhe semantikës së shakave të aftë të mësohen nga modelet neuronale. Veçanërisht, ne eksplorojmë përdorimin e karakteristikave të lidhjes semantike bazuar në shoqatat e fjalëve, në vend të ngjashmërisë më të zakonshme Word2Vec, në një detyrë identifikimi të humorit binar dhe identifikojmë disa faktorë që bëjnë shoqatat e fjalëve më të përshtatshme për humorin. Ne gjithashtu eksplorojmë efektet e përdorimit të strukturës së shakave, në form ën e ankorëve humor (Yang et al., 2015), për përmirësimin e paraqitjes së karakteristikave semantike dhe tregojmë se, ndërsa një ide intriguese, ankorët humor përmbajnë disa pika që mund të dëmtojnë paraqitjen.', 'af': "Hierdie papier probeer om die uitlegging van statistiese masjien leer te trou nader te gaan met die meer kragtige modele van joke struktuur en joke semantieke wat deur neurale modele geleer kan word. Spesifieke, ons ondersoek die gebruik van semantiese verwantighede funksies gebaseer op woord assosiasies, eerder as die meer gemeenskaplike Word2Vec gelykenis, op 'n binêre humor identifikasie taak en identifiseer verskeie faktore wat word assosiasies 'n beter pas vir humor maak. Ons ondersoek ook die effekte van die gebruik van joke-struktuur, in die vorm van humor-ankers (Yang et al., 2015), vir die verbetering van die prestasie van semantiese funksies en wys dat, terwyl 'n intriguerende idee, humor-ankers bevat verskeie trappe wat die prestasie kan skandeer.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ የstatistical machine ትምህርት ማግኘት ማግኘት ይሞክራል፤ በጠንካራዊ ሞዴላዎችን ለመማር የሚችሉትን የበዛ የሮቦት ዓይነቶች እና የሳቂቅ ስሜናሲ እና የቆጣጠር ምሳሌዎችን ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ በተለይም፣ የWord2Vec በተለየ ትምህርት ማኅበረሰብ ላይ የሚደረገውን የsemantic ግንኙነት ጥያቄዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የሳቅ አካባቢ (Yang al., 2015) በማድረግ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը փորձում է ամուսնանալ վիճակագրական մեքենայի ուսումնասիրության մեկնաբանելիության հետ կատակի կառուցվածքի և կատակի սեմանտիկայի ավելի ուժեղ մոդելների հետ, որոնք կարող են սովորվել նյարդային մոդելներով: Specifically, we explore the use of semantic relatedness features based on word associations, rather than the more common Word2Vec similarity, on a binary humour identification task and identify several factors that make word associations a better fit for humour.  Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք ծիծաղերի կառուցվածքի ազդեցությունները հումորի կառուցվածքի տեսքով (Յանգ և այլն., 2015 թ․-ը), սեմանտիկ հատկությունների արտադրողության բարելավման համար և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ, մինչ հետաքրքիր գաղափար է, հումորի կառուցվածքները պար', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt Statistik Makinel…ôrin √∂yr…ônm…ôsinin istifad…ô edilm…ôsini n…ôyral modell…ôrl…ô √∂yr…ôn…ô bil…ôc…ôk daha q√ľvv…ôtli modell…ôrl…ô evl…ônm…ôy…ô √ßalńĪŇüńĪr. √Ėzellikle, biz s√∂z bańülantńĪlarńĪna dayanan semantik bańülantńĪlńĪq √∂zellikl…ôrinin istifad…ôsini keŇüfetirik, daha yaygńĪn Word2Vec kimilińüinin yerin…ô, ikili humor tanńĪmasńĪ iŇüi il…ô v…ô s√∂z bańülantńĪlarńĪnńĪ daha yaxŇüńĪ hiss etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn daha yaxŇüńĪ ifad…ô ed…ôn √ßoxlu fakt√∂rl…ôri tanńĪyńĪrńĪq. Biz d…ô Ňüaka yapńĪsńĪnńĪ istifad…ô etm…ôk t…ôsirl…ôrini (Yang et al., 2015), semantik t…ôsirl…ôrinin performansńĪnńĪ yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq v…ô g√∂st…ôrm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn Ňüaka yapńĪsńĪnńĪ istifad…ô etm…ôk t…ôsirl…ôrini t…ôŇükil edirik.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি পরিসংখ্যান মেশিনের শিক্ষা বিয়ে করার চেষ্টা করছে এবং নিউরেল মডেল দ্বারা শিক্ষা প্রাপ্ত কৌতুক ক কাঠামোর আর মজা মডেলের মতো বেশ বিশেষ করে আমরা শব্দ সংস্থার উপর ভিত্তিক সেমেন্টিক সম্পর্কের ব্যবহার খুঁজে বের করি, বেশী সাধারণ ওয়ার্ড ২ভেকের মতো কাজের উপর, বাইনারি হামুর পরিচিহিত কাজের উপর এবং বেশ কিছু  We also explore the effects of using joke structure, in the form of humour anchors (Yang et al., 2015), for improving the performance of semantic features and show that, while an intriguing idea, humour anchors contain several pitfalls that can hurt performance.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir pokušava oženiti interpretabilnost učenja statističkih strojeva pristupa jačim modelima strukture šala i semantika šala koje mogu naučiti neuralnim modelima. Posebno, istražujemo upotrebu semantičkih karakteristika veze na temelju udruženja riječi, umjesto češće sličnosti Word2Vec, na zadatku za identifikaciju binarnog humora i identificiramo nekoliko faktora koji čine udruženja riječi boljim za humor. Također istražujemo učinak korištenja strukture šala, u obliku humorskih sidra (Yang et al., 2015), za poboljšanje učinka semantičkih karakteristika i pokazujemo da, dok zanimljiva ideja, humorski sidri sadrže nekoliko sažaljenja koje mogu povrijediti učinku.', 'cs': 'Tento článek se snaží propojit interpretovatelnost statistických přístupů strojového učení s robustnějšími modely struktury vtipů a sémantiky vtipů schopnými se naučit neuronovými modely. Konkrétně zkoumáme využití funkcí sémantické relatedness založených na asociacích slov, spíše než na běžnější podobnosti Word2Vec, na binární úloze identifikace humoru a identifikujeme několik faktorů, které činí asociace slov lépe vhodné pro humor. Dále zkoumáme vliv použití vtipné struktury ve formě humoru kotev (Yang et al., 2015) na zlepšení výkonnosti sémantických rysů a ukazujeme, že i když je to zajímavá myšlenka, humor kotvy obsahují několik nástrah, které mohou poškodit výkon.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö püüab siduda statistiliste masinõppe lähenemisviiside tõlgendatavuse tugevamate naljastruktuuri ja naljasemantika mudelitega, mida on võimalik õppida närvimudelite abil. Konkreetselt uurime sõnasuhtel põhinevate semantiliste seosfunktsioonide kasutamist, mitte Word2Vec sarnasuse asemel, binaarse huumori identifitseerimise ülesandel ning tuvastame mitmed tegurid, mis muudavad sõnasuhted huumorile paremini sobivaks. Samuti uurime naljastruktuuri (Yang jt., 2015) kasutamise mõju semantiliste funktsioonide toimimise parandamisel ning näitame, et kuigi huumoriankrud on intrigeeriv idee, sisaldavad huumoriankrud mitmeid lõksu, mis võivad esitust kahjustada.', 'ca': "Aquest article intenta casar-se amb l'interpretabilitat d'enfocaments d'aprenentatge estadística de màquines amb models més robustos d'estructura de bromes i senàntica de bromes capaços d'aprendre amb models neurals. Concretament, explorem l'ús de característiques de relació semàntica basades en associacions de paraules, en lloc de la similitud Word2Vec més comú, en una tasca d'identificació binaria d'humor i identificem varis factors que fan que les associacions de paraules siguin millor adaptades a l'humor. També explorem els efectes de l'ús de l'estructura de broma, en forma d'ancores d'humor (Yang et al., 2015), per millorar el rendiment de característiques semàntiques i demostrar que, mentre que una idea intrigant, les ancores d'humor contenen diverses pujades que poden perjudicar el rendiment.", 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa pyritään yhdistämään tilastollisten koneoppimismenetelmien tulkittavuus vankempiin vitsirakenteen ja vitsin semantiikan malleihin, jotka voidaan oppia neuromalleilla. Erityisesti tutkimme sanaassosiaatioihin perustuvien semanttisten relaatioominaisuuksien käyttöä Word2Vec-samankaltaisuuden sijaan binaarisessa huumorin tunnistustehtävässä ja tunnistamme useita tekijöitä, jotka tekevät sanaassosiaatioista paremman huumorin. Tutkimme myös vitsirakenteen käyttöä huumoriankkureiden muodossa (Yang et al., 2015) semanttisten ominaisuuksien suorituskyvyn parantamiseksi ja osoitamme, että huumoriankkureissa on kiehtova ajatus, mutta siinä on useita ansalankoja, jotka voivat vahingoittaa suorituskykyä.', 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé iki saiki nggawe aturan kanggo ngerasakno karo akeh sampek dadi, nik akeh basa sing gawe barang nggawe sistem sing gawe barang nggawe sistem sing gawe sawar karo semanti sing iso nggawe model alat. CURRENTCURRENTCURRENT Awak dhéwé énkedakaké efek nggambar aturan sawar nggawe sawar-sawar, ing sakjane perusahaan langgar-sawar iki ngono nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasakno perusahaan semanti iki ngono nggarap kuwi, sampek mbiyen nggalakno, langgar-langgar kuwi susahe perusahaan langgar sampeyan nganggo cara nggawe barang dumadhi.', 'ha': "Wannan takarda yana jarraba yin auri da fassarar fassarar masu karatun na ƙarami da zane-zane na ƙaranci da misãlai na zane-rayi da yin izgili na iya iya sanar da shi daga misãlai na neura. A ƙayyade, Munã yin amfani da wasu masu yin husũma na semantiki a kan asalin mutane da ke daidaita magana, a kan aikin shaidar nau'in rubutu da baka, kuma munã gane wasu fakta da ke sami mutane da maganar ta zama mafi daidai ga humori. Kayya, Muke yin amfani da matsayin izgili, kamar misãlin firgita mai raɗawa (Yang et al., 2015), kuma za mu nuna cewa, a lokacin da wani idãnar na yi na sha'awa, yana da sauri masu ƙaranci masu iya cũtar karatun.", 'sk': 'Prispevek skuša združiti interpretebilnost statističnih pristopov strojnega učenja z robustnejšimi modeli šalne strukture in šalne semantike, ki jih je mogoče naučiti z nevronskimi modeli. Natančneje raziskujemo uporabo semantičnih povezanosti, ki temeljijo na besednih asociacijah in ne na bolj pogosti podobnosti Word2Vec, na opravilu identifikacije binarnega humorja in ugotovimo več dejavnikov, zaradi katerih besedne asociacije bolje ustrezajo humorju. Raziskujemo tudi učinke uporabe šalne strukture v obliki humorskih sidr (Yang et al., 2015) za izboljšanje delovanja semantičnih značilnosti in pokažemo, da humorska sidra kljub zanimivi ideji vsebujejo več pasti, ki lahko škodijo nastopu.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מנסה להתחתן עם היכולת לפרשנות של גישות לימוד מכונות סטטיסטיקה עם דוגמנים חזקים יותר של מבנה בדיחות וסמנטיקה בדיחות מסוגלת ללמוד על ידי דוגמנים עצביים. Specifically, we explore the use of semantic relatedness features based on word associations, rather than the more common Word2Vec similarity, on a binary humour identification task and identify several factors that make word associations a better fit for humour.  We also explore the effects of using joke structure, in the form of humour anchors (Yang et al., 2015), for improving the performance of semantic features and show that, while an intriguing idea, humour anchors contain several pitfalls that can hurt performance.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཚད་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་སྐོར་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐབས་ཤིག་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དང་། ཆ་རྐྱེན་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དང་མཐུན་སྟངས་ལ་མང་ཙམ་བཟོ་བྱེད་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེ ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་གི་བཟོ་བརྒྱུད་ལ།'}
{'en': 'An Attribute Enhanced Domain Adaptive Model for Cold-Start Spam Review Detection', 'pt': 'Um modelo adaptável de domínio aprimorado de atributo para detecção de revisão de spam de inicialização a frio', 'fr': 'Modèle adaptatif de domaine amélioré par attributs pour la détection des avis de spam par démarrage à froid', 'es': 'Un modelo adaptativo de dominio mejorado por atributos para la detección de revisiones de spam en frío', 'ar': 'نموذج متكيف معزز للسمات لاكتشاف مراجعة البداية الباردة للبريد العشوائي', 'zh': '以冷启动垃圾邮件检性增强域自应模形', 'ja': 'コールドスタートスパムレビュー検出のための属性拡張ドメインアダプティブモデル', 'ru': 'Адаптивная модель расширенного домена атрибутов для обнаружения спама при холодном запуске', 'hi': 'कोल्ड-स्टार्ट स्पैम समीक्षा का पता लगाने के लिए एक विशेषता एन्हांस्ड डोमेन अनुकूली मॉडल', 'ga': 'Samhail Oiriúnaithe Fearainn Feabhsaithe Tréithe do Bhrath Athbhreithnithe Turscair Fuar-Thús', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα βελτιωμένο προσαρμοστικό μοντέλο τομέα χαρακτηριστικών για την ανίχνευση αναθεώρησης ανεπιθύμητων μηνυμάτων ψυχρής εκκίνησης', 'hu': 'Attribute Továbbfejlesztett tartomány adaptív modell hideg indítású spam-felülvizsgálat észleléséhez', 'it': "Un modello adattivo di dominio migliorato dell'attributo per il rilevamento della revisione dello spam a freddo", 'kk': 'Спам редакциясы үшін домен адаптификациялық модель артрибуттары', 'mk': 'An Attribute Enhanced Domain Adaptive Model for Cold-Start Spam Review Detection', 'lt': 'Atributų patobulintas domeno pritaikymo modelis šaltojo paleidimo spam peržiūrai aptikti', 'ml': 'തണുപ്പ്- ആരംഭിക്കുന്ന സ്പാമിന്റെ പരിശോധന കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ഗുണപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അഡാപ', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Хүйтэн-эхлэх Спам Шинэ Шинэ мэдээллийн Атрибут Өндөрсөн Домен Адаптив Загвар', 'mt': 'An Attribute Enhanced Domain Adaptive Model for Cold-Start Spam Review Detection', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Model adaptacyjny dla atrybutów rozszerzonej domeny do wykrywania przeglądu spamu na zimnym start', 'ro': 'Un model adaptiv de domeniu îmbunătățit de atribute pentru detectarea rece a revizuirii spam', 'sr': 'Attribut Enhanced Domain Adaptive Model for Cold-Start Spam Review Detection', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En attributförstärkt domänadaptiv modell för detektering av kallstart av skräppost', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha cod-Start Spam Review Detection', 'ur': 'Name', 'ta': 'Cold- Start Spam Review Detection', 'vi': 'Một điển hình thích ứng mái miền được hưởng thụ bởi giá trị giải mã Cold-start Spam', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Подобрен модел за адаптиране на домейна с атрибут за откриване на преглед на спам при студен старт', 'hr': 'Prilagoditeljski model proširenog domena za otkrivanje hladnog početnog spama', 'nl': 'Een attribuut verbeterd domein adaptief model voor Cold-Start spam review detectie', 'da': 'En attributforbedret domæneadaptiv model til registrering af Cold-Start Spam Review Detection', 'de': 'Ein Attribut Enhanced Domain Adaptive Model für Cold-Start Spam Review Erkennung', 'id': 'Name', 'ko': '속성 강화 필드 자동 적응 냉각 시작 스팸 메일 검사 모델', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Sowuk Başlangıç Gözlemleri üçin bir Atribut Bezirilmiş Aýratyn Mody', 'sw': 'Mtengenezaji wa Mtandao wa Kupitia Makambo kwa Kuchunguza Mazungumzo ya Kipande', 'sq': 'Një model i përmirësuar i atributit për zbulimin e shqyrtimit të spamit me fillim të ftohtë', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Name', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Soğuq-Başlanğıç İsmarış Gözləməsi üçün Əlavə Etdiyi Domena Adptif Modeli', 'bn': 'কলাড- শুরু করা স্প্যাম প্রার্থী পরিদর্শনের জন্য একটি বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী ডোমেইন এডেপিটিভ মডেল', 'bs': 'Attribut Enhanced Domain Adaptive Model for Cold-Start Spam Review Detection', 'ca': "Un model adaptatiu al domini millorat d'atributs per a la detecció d'un examen d'espai de començament fred", 'cs': 'Adaptivní model domény s vylepšeným atributem pro detekci recenze spamu za studena', 'et': 'Atribuudi täiustatud domeeni kohanduv mudel külmkäivituse rämpsposti ülevaate tuvastamiseks', 'fi': 'Attribute Enhanced Domain Adaptive Model for Cold-Start Spam Review Detection', 'jv': 'an Attribute ENhancemed domain modification model for ReadStart Spam Report detection', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Atribut izboljšan domenski prilagodljiv model za zaznavanje pregleda neželene pošte s hladnim zagonom', 'bo': 'An Attribute Enhanced Domain Adaptive Model for Cold-Start Spam Review Detection'}
{'en': 'Spam detection has long been a research topic in both academic and industry due to its wide applications. Previous studies are mainly focused on extracting linguistic or behavior features to distinguish the spam and legitimate reviews. Such features are either ineffective or take long time to collect and thus are hard to be applied to cold-start spam review detection tasks. Recent advance leveraged the neural network to encode the textual and behavior features for the cold-start problem. However, the abundant attribute information are largely neglected by the existing framework. In this paper, we propose a novel deep learning architecture for incorporating entities and their inherent attributes from various domains into a unified framework. Specifically, our model not only encodes the entities of reviewer, item, and review, but also their attributes such as location, date, price ranges. Furthermore, we present a domain classifier to adapt the knowledge from one domain to the other. With the abundant attributes in existing entities and knowledge in other domains, we successfully solve the problem of data scarcity in the cold-start settings. Experimental results on two Yelp datasets prove that our proposed framework significantly outperforms the state-of-the-art methods.', 'ar': 'لطالما كان اكتشاف البريد العشوائي موضوعًا بحثيًا في كل من الأكاديميين والصناعيين نظرًا لتطبيقاته الواسعة. تركز الدراسات السابقة بشكل أساسي على استخراج السمات اللغوية أو السلوكية لتمييز البريد العشوائي والمراجعات الشرعية. هذه الميزات إما غير فعالة أو تستغرق وقتًا طويلاً لجمعها ، وبالتالي يصعب تطبيقها على مهام اكتشاف مراجعة البريد العشوائي في البداية الباردة. استفاد التقدم الأخير من الشبكة العصبية لتشفير الميزات النصية والسلوكية لمشكلة البداية الباردة. ومع ذلك ، فإن معلومات السمات الوفيرة مهملة إلى حد كبير من قبل الإطار الحالي. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح بنية جديدة للتعلم العميق لدمج الكيانات والسمات المتأصلة في المجالات المختلفة في إطار موحد. على وجه التحديد ، لا يشفر نموذجنا كيانات المراجع والعنصر والمراجعة فحسب ، بل يشفر أيضًا سماتها مثل الموقع والتاريخ ونطاقات الأسعار. علاوة على ذلك ، نقدم مصنف المجال لتكييف المعرفة من مجال إلى آخر. من خلال السمات الوفيرة في الكيانات الحالية والمعرفة في المجالات الأخرى ، نجحنا في حل مشكلة ندرة البيانات في إعدادات البداية الباردة. تثبت النتائج التجريبية على مجموعتي بيانات من Yelp أن إطار العمل المقترح يتفوق بشكل كبير على أحدث الأساليب.', 'fr': "La détection du spam est depuis longtemps un sujet de recherche tant dans les universités que dans l'industrie en raison de ses nombreuses applications. Les études précédentes étaient principalement axées sur l'extraction de caractéristiques linguistiques ou comportementales afin de distinguer le spam des avis légitimes. Ces fonctionnalités sont soit inefficaces, soit longues à collecter et sont donc difficiles à appliquer aux tâches de détection de spam démarrées à froid. Des avancées récentes ont permis de tirer parti du réseau de neurones pour coder les caractéristiques textuelles et comportementales du problème de démarrage à froid. Cependant, les informations d'attributs abondantes sont largement négligées par le cadre existant. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle architecture d'apprentissage profond pour intégrer des entités et leurs attributs inhérents provenant de divers domaines dans un cadre unifié. Plus précisément, notre modèle code non seulement les entités de l'évaluateur, de l'article et de l'avis, mais également leurs attributs tels que le lieu, la date et les fourchettes de prix. De plus, nous présentons un classificateur de domaines permettant d'adapter les connaissances d'un domaine à l'autre. Grâce aux nombreux attributs des entités existantes et aux connaissances dans d'autres domaines, nous résolvons avec succès le problème de la rareté des données dans les environnements de démarrage à froid. Les résultats expérimentaux sur deux ensembles de données Yelp prouvent que le cadre proposé surpasse largement les méthodes de pointe.", 'pt': 'A detecção de spam tem sido um tópico de pesquisa na academia e na indústria devido às suas amplas aplicações. Os estudos anteriores estão focados principalmente na extração de características linguísticas ou comportamentais para distinguir o spam e as revisões legítimas. Esses recursos são ineficazes ou demoram muito para serem coletados e, portanto, são difíceis de serem aplicados a tarefas de detecção de revisão de spam de inicialização a frio. Um avanço recente alavancou a rede neural para codificar os recursos textuais e comportamentais para o problema de partida a frio. No entanto, as abundantes informações de atributos são amplamente negligenciadas pela estrutura existente. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova arquitetura de aprendizado profundo para incorporar entidades e seus atributos inerentes de vários domínios em uma estrutura unificada. Especificamente, nosso modelo não codifica apenas as entidades de revisor, item e revisão, mas também seus atributos, como local, data, faixas de preço. Além disso, apresentamos um classificador de domínio para adaptar o conhecimento de um domínio para o outro. Com atributos abundantes em entidades existentes e conhecimento em outros domínios, resolvemos com sucesso o problema de escassez de dados nas configurações de partida a frio. Resultados experimentais em dois conjuntos de dados do Yelp provam que nossa estrutura proposta supera significativamente os métodos de última geração.', 'es': 'La detección de spam ha sido durante mucho tiempo un tema de investigación tanto académico como industrial debido a sus amplias aplicaciones. Los estudios anteriores se centraron principalmente en extraer características lingüísticas o de comportamiento para distinguir el spam y las reseñas legítimas. Estas funciones son ineficaces o tardan mucho tiempo en recopilarse y, por lo tanto, son difíciles de aplicar a las tareas de detección de revisión de spam de inicio en frío. Los avances recientes aprovecharon la red neuronal para codificar las características textuales y de comportamiento para el problema del arranque en frío. Sin embargo, la abundante información de atributos es ignorada en gran medida por el marco existente. En este artículo, proponemos una arquitectura novedosa de aprendizaje profundo para incorporar entidades y sus atributos inherentes de varios dominios en un marco unificado. Específicamente, nuestro modelo no solo codifica las entidades del revisor, el artículo y la reseña, sino también sus atributos, como la ubicación, la fecha y los rangos de precios. Además, presentamos un clasificador de dominios para adaptar el conocimiento de un dominio al otro. Con los abundantes atributos de las entidades existentes y el conocimiento en otros dominios, resolvemos con éxito el problema de la escasez de datos en los entornos de arranque en frío. Los resultados experimentales en dos conjuntos de datos de Yelp demuestran que nuestro marco propuesto supera significativamente a los métodos más avanzados.', 'zh': '垃圾邮件检由广用,久为学术工业界研究课题。 前论主集言行,以别垃圾邮件法论。 此等功能要么无效,要么久须收拾,所以难用冷启动垃圾邮件审检。 近者进用神经网络冷启动文行编码。 然而,富厚的属性信息在很大,被现在框架所忽。 于本文中,设一新深度学架构,用于将异域之实体,固有属性整合一统之框架。 非特编码之于阅者、目、阅之实也,犹(其位、日、价)编码也。 此外,我们发出一个领域分类器,以将知识从一领调到另一个领域。 以实体之富,及他方之知,吾成功而决之冷启动设中之数稀缺。 二Yelp数集之实验结果表明,臣等所陈框架明优先进之法。', 'ja': 'スパム検出は、その幅広い応用により、学術的および業界の両方で長い間研究のトピックとなってきました。 以前の研究は、主にスパムと正当なレビューを区別するために、言語的または行動的特徴を抽出することに焦点を当てています。 このような機能は効果がないか、収集に時間がかかるため、コールドスタートのスパムレビュー検出タスクに適用することは困難です。 最近のAdvancedは、ニューラルネットワークを活用して、コールドスタート問題のテキスト機能と動作機能をエンコードしました。 しかし、豊富な属性情報は、既存のフレームワークによってほとんど無視されています。 本稿では，さまざまな領域からのエンティティとその固有の属性を統一された枠組みに組み込むための新しいディープラーニングアーキテクチャを提案する． 具体的には、当社のモデルは、レビュー担当者、アイテム、レビューのエンティティをエンコードするだけでなく、場所、日付、価格帯などの属性もエンコードします。 さらに、一方のドメインから他方のドメインに知識を適応させるためのドメイン分類子を提示します。 既存のエンティティの豊富な属性と他のドメインの知識により、コールドスタート設定でのデータ不足の問題をうまく解決します。 2つのYelpデータセットの実験結果は、当社が提案するフレームワークが最先端の方法を大幅に上回っていることを証明しています。', 'hi': 'स्पैम का पता लगाना लंबे समय से अपने व्यापक अनुप्रयोगों के कारण अकादमिक और उद्योग दोनों में एक शोध विषय रहा है। पिछले अध्ययन मुख्य रूप से स्पैम और वैध समीक्षाओं को अलग करने के लिए भाषाई या व्यवहार सुविधाओं को निकालने पर केंद्रित हैं। ऐसी विशेषताएं या तो अप्रभावी हैं या इकट्ठा करने में लंबा समय लेती हैं और इस प्रकार कोल्ड-स्टार्ट स्पैम समीक्षा का पता लगाने के कार्यों पर लागू होना मुश्किल है। हाल ही में अग्रिम ने ठंड-शुरू समस्या के लिए पाठ्य और व्यवहार सुविधाओं को एन्कोड करने के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का लाभ उठाया। हालांकि, प्रचुर मात्रा में विशेषता जानकारी काफी हद तक मौजूदा ढांचे द्वारा उपेक्षित कर रहे हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक एकीकृत ढांचे में विभिन्न डोमेन से संस्थाओं और उनकी अंतर्निहित विशेषताओं को शामिल करने के लिए एक उपन्यास गहरी सीखने की वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हमारा मॉडल न केवल समीक्षक, आइटम और समीक्षा की संस्थाओं को एन्कोड करता है, बल्कि उनकी विशेषताओं जैसे स्थान, दिनांक, मूल्य श्रेणियों को भी एन्कोड करता है। इसके अलावा, हम एक डोमेन से दूसरे डोमेन के लिए ज्ञान को अनुकूलित करने के लिए एक डोमेन क्लासिफायर प्रस्तुत करते हैं। मौजूदा संस्थाओं और अन्य डोमेन में ज्ञान में प्रचुर मात्रा में विशेषताओं के साथ, हम कोल्ड-स्टार्ट सेटिंग्स में डेटा की कमी की समस्या को सफलतापूर्वक हल करते हैं। दो येल्प डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम साबित करते हैं कि हमारा प्रस्तावित ढांचा अत्याधुनिक तरीकों से काफी बेहतर प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Обнаружение спама уже давно является темой исследований как в науке, так и в промышленности из-за его широкого применения. Предыдущие исследования в основном сосредоточены на извлечении лингвистических или поведенческих признаков, чтобы отличить спам от легитимных отзывов. Такие функции либо неэффективны, либо требуют длительного времени для сбора и, следовательно, с трудом применимы к задачам обнаружения спама холодного запуска. Недавнее продвижение использовало нейронную сеть для кодирования текстовых и поведенческих признаков для проблемы холодного запуска. Вместе с тем существующая система в значительной степени игнорирует обширную информацию об атрибутах. В этой статье мы предлагаем новую архитектуру глубокого обучения для включения сущностей и их неотъемлемых атрибутов из различных областей в единую структуру. В частности, наша модель кодирует не только объекты рецензента, но и их атрибуты, такие как местоположение, дата, ценовые диапазоны. Кроме того, мы представляем классификатор доменов, чтобы адаптировать знания из одной области в другую. Обладая обильными атрибутами в существующих сущностях и знаниями в других областях, мы успешно решаем проблему дефицита данных в условиях холодного запуска. Экспериментальные результаты по двум наборам данных Yelp доказывают, что предлагаемая нами структура значительно превосходит современные методы.', 'ga': 'Is ábhar taighde é braite turscair le fada an lá sa saol acadúil agus sa tionscal araon mar gheall ar a fheidhmchláir leathana. Tá staidéir roimhe seo dírithe go príomha ar ghnéithe teangeolaíochta nó iompair a bhaint chun idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir na hathbhreithnithe turscair agus dlisteanacha. Tá gnéithe den sórt sin neamhéifeachtach nó tógann sé go leor ama le bailiú agus mar sin is deacair iad a chur i bhfeidhm ar thascanna braite athbhreithnithe turscair ó thús fuar. Leis an dul chun cinn a rinneadh le déanaí, baineadh úsáid as an líonra néarúil chun na gnéithe téacsúla agus iompraíochta a ionchódú don fhadhb thús fuar. Mar sin féin, déanann an creat atá ann faoi láthair faillí ar an bhfaisnéis fhlúirseach faoi thréithe. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid ailtireacht dhomhainfhoghlama úrnua chun eintitis agus a dtréithe dúchasacha ó réimsí éagsúla a ionchorprú i gcreat aontaithe. Go sonrach, ní hamháin go n-ionchódaíonn ár múnla na heintitis athbhreithneora, míre, agus athbhreithnithe, ach freisin a dtréithe cosúil le suíomh, dáta, raonta praghsanna. Ina theannta sin, cuirimid aicmitheoir fearainn i láthair chun an t-eolas ó fhearann amháin go dtí an ceann eile a oiriúnú. Leis na tréithe flúirseacha atá sna haonáin atá ann cheana agus eolas i bhfearainn eile, d’éirigh linn fadhb an ghanntanas sonraí a réiteach sna socruithe fuarthosaithe. Cruthaíonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar dhá thacar sonraí Yelp go sáraíonn ár gcreat molta go mór na modhanna úrscothacha.', 'ka': 'სპომის განსახულება ძალიან განსხვავებული განსხვავება აკადემიკური და ინდუეციური განსხვავებაში იყო საშუალო პროგრამების შესახებ. წინა კვლევები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია ენგუმისტიკური ან ქცევის ფუნქციების ექსტრექტირებაზე, რომელიც სპომის და legitimური განახლებების განსხვავება. ასეთი განსაზღვრებები არაფექტიურია, ან ძალიან გრძნობა დაყენებას და ამიტომ ძალიან ძალიან გამოყენება სპომის განსაზღვრებისთვის სპომის განსაზღვრებაზე. მიმდინარე წინასწარმოდგენილი წინასწარმოდგენა ნეიროლური ქსელი, რომ ტექსტულური და ქცევის ფუნქციების კოდისტურაციას ჩამოწარმოდგენის მაგრამ, მნიშვნელოვანი ატრიბუტის ინფორმაცია ძალიან გადარჩენა მსგავსი პარამეტრებით. ამ დომენში, ჩვენ პრომენტის დიდი სწავლების აქტიქტურაციას, რომელსაც ინტერტიკები და ისინი ინტერტიკური ატრიბუტები განსხვავებული დომენეებიდან ერთადერთებული ფრამეტში გა განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენი მოდელი არა მხოლოდ რედანუმენტის, ელემენტის და რედანუმენტის ელემენტის კოდირება, მაგრამ ისინი ატრიბუტები, როგორც ადგილი, თარიღი, უ დამატებით, ჩვენ დიომინის კლასიფიკაციას ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გავაჩვენოთ, რომ ერთი დიომინიდან მეორე კლასიფიკაციას აეპორტირება. სხვა დომენტებში მნიშვნელოვანი ატრიბუტები და მეცნიერების შესახებ, ჩვენ წარმატებით გავაკეთებთ მონაცემების მუშაობის პრობლემას ჩვენ სხვა დომენტებში. ვკჟოვპთმვნრთფნთრვ პვჱსლრართ ნა ეგა£უა ეატარა ჟვრკჲრ ეჲკაჱგარ, ფვ ნაქთჲრ ოპველადან პამპაკ ვ მნჲდს ნაედჲლვმ ოჲ£აჟნჲჟრ ნა თჱკ', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση ανεπιθύμητων μηνυμάτων αποτελεί από καιρό ερευνητικό θέμα τόσο στην ακαδημαϊκή όσο και στη βιομηχανία λόγω των ευρέων εφαρμογών της. Οι προηγούμενες μελέτες επικεντρώνονται κυρίως στην εξαγωγή γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών ή χαρακτηριστικών συμπεριφοράς για να διακρίνουν τις ανεπιθύμητες και νόμιμες κριτικές. Τέτοια χαρακτηριστικά είναι είτε αναποτελεσματικά είτε χρειάζονται πολύ χρόνο για να συλλέξουν και ως εκ τούτου είναι δύσκολο να εφαρμοστούν σε εργασίες ανίχνευσης αναθεώρησης ανεπιθύμητων μηνυμάτων ψυχρής εκκίνησης. Η πρόσφατη πρόοδος χρησιμοποίησε το νευρωνικό δίκτυο για να κωδικοποιήσει τα χαρακτηριστικά κειμένου και συμπεριφοράς για το πρόβλημα ψυχρής εκκίνησης. Ωστόσο, οι άφθονες πληροφορίες χαρακτηριστικών παραμελούνται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από το υπάρχον πλαίσιο. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα αρχιτεκτονική βαθιάς μάθησης για την ενσωμάτωση οντοτήτων και των εγγενών χαρακτηριστικών τους από διάφορους τομείς σε ένα ενιαίο πλαίσιο. Συγκεκριμένα, το μοντέλο μας όχι μόνο κωδικοποιεί τις οντότητες του αναθεωρητή, του στοιχείου και της κριτικής, αλλά και τα χαρακτηριστικά τους όπως τοποθεσία, ημερομηνία, εύρος τιμών. Επιπλέον, παρουσιάζουμε έναν ταξινομητή τομέα για την προσαρμογή της γνώσης από το ένα τομέα στον άλλο. Με τις άφθονες ιδιότητες σε υπάρχουσες οντότητες και τη γνώση σε άλλους τομείς, επιλύουμε επιτυχώς το πρόβλημα της έλλειψης δεδομένων στις ρυθμίσεις ψυχρής εκκίνησης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων αποδεικνύουν ότι το προτεινόμενο πλαίσιο ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους.', 'hu': 'A spam felismerése régóta kutatási téma mind az akadémiai, mind az iparágban, széles körű alkalmazásainak köszönhetően. Korábbi tanulmányok elsősorban a nyelvi vagy viselkedési funkciók kinyerésére összpontosítanak, hogy megkülönböztessék a spam és a jogszerű értékelések. Az ilyen funkciók vagy hatástalanok, vagy hosszú időt vesznek igénybe, ezért nehéz alkalmazni a hideg indítású spam felülvizsgálati feladatokra. A közelmúltbeli fejlemények felhasználták az ideghálózatot, hogy kódolják a hidegindítási probléma szöveges és viselkedési funkcióit. A jelenlegi keretrendszer azonban nagymértékben elhanyagolja a bőséges attribútuminformációkat. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új mélytanulási architektúrát javasolunk, amely a különböző területek entitásainak és tulajdonságainak egységes keretrendszerbe történő beépítésére szolgál. Konkrétan modellünk nemcsak az értékelő, az elem és az értékelés entitásait kódolja, hanem azok attribútumait is, mint például a hely, a dátum, az ártartományok. Továbbá bemutatunk egy domain osztályozót, amely az egyik domain tudását a másikra igazítja. A meglévő entitások bőséges tulajdonságaival és más területek tudásával sikeresen megoldjuk az adathiány problémáját hidegindítási beállításokban. Két Yelp adathalmaz kísérleti eredményei azt bizonyítják, hogy javasolt keretrendszerünk jelentősen felülmúlja a korszerű módszereket.', 'it': "Il rilevamento dello spam è stato a lungo un argomento di ricerca sia in ambito accademico che industriale a causa delle sue ampie applicazioni. Gli studi precedenti si concentrano principalmente sull'estrazione di caratteristiche linguistiche o comportamentali per distinguere lo spam e le recensioni legittime. Tali funzionalità sono inefficaci o richiedono molto tempo per la raccolta e quindi sono difficili da applicare alle attività di rilevamento di revisioni spam a freddo. I recenti progressi hanno sfruttato la rete neurale per codificare le caratteristiche testuali e comportamentali per il problema dell'avviamento a freddo. Tuttavia, le abbondanti informazioni sugli attributi sono ampiamente trascurate dal quadro esistente. In questo articolo, proponiamo una nuova architettura di deep learning per incorporare entità e i loro attributi intrinseci da vari domini in un framework unificato. Nello specifico, il nostro modello codifica non solo le entità di revisore, articolo e recensione, ma anche i loro attributi come posizione, data, fasce di prezzo. Inoltre, presentiamo un classificatore di domini per adattare le conoscenze da un dominio all'altro. Con gli attributi abbondanti nelle entità esistenti e le conoscenze in altri domini, risolviamo con successo il problema della scarsità di dati nelle impostazioni di avvio a freddo. I risultati sperimentali su due dataset Yelp dimostrano che il framework proposto supera significativamente i metodi più avanzati.", 'lt': 'Spam aptikimas jau seniai yra mokslinių tyrimų tema tiek akademinėje, tiek pramonėje dėl plataus masto. Ankstesniuose tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio skiriama kalbinių ar elgesio požymių išgavimui, siekiant atskirti spam ą ir teisėtas peržiūras. Tokios savybės yra neveiksmingos arba ilgą laiką trunka surinkti, todėl sunku jas taikyti šaltojo paleidimo spamo peržiūros nustatymo užduotims. Neseniai išankstinis poveikis suteikė nervų tinklui svertą, kad būtų koduojamos šaltojo paleidimo problemos tekstinės ir elgesio savybės. Vis dėlto esama sistema iš esmės neatsižvelgia į gausią požymių informaciją. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują gilaus mokymosi architektūrą, kad subjektai ir jų savybės iš įvairių sričių būtų įtraukti į vieningą sistemą. Konkrečiai, mūsų modelis ne tik koduoja peržiūrėtojo, objekto ir peržiūros subjektus, bet ir jų požymius, pvz., vietą, datą, kainų intervalus. Be to, mes pristatome srities klasifikatorių, kad būtų galima pritaikyti žinias iš vienos srities į kitą. Atsižvelgdami į daugybę esamų subjektų požymių ir žinių kitose srityse, sėkmingai išspręsime duomenų trūkumo šaltojo paleidimo sąlygose problem ą. Dviejų Yelp duomenų rinkinių eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūloma sistema gerokai viršija naujausius metodus.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на спам долго време е истражувачка тема во академијата и индустријата поради широките апликации. Претходните студии се фокусирани главно на екстракција на јазични или однесувачки карактеристики за разлика на спамот и легитимни рецензии. Таквите карактеристики се или неефикасни или потребно е долго време за собирање и затоа се тешко да се применат на задачите за детекција на преглед на спам на ладен почеток. Неодамнешниот напредок ја искористи нервната мрежа за кодирање на текстуалните и однесувачките карактеристики за проблемот со ладниот старт. Сепак, достојните информации за атрибутите се во голема мера заборавени од постоечката рамка. Во овој весник, предложуваме нова архитектура за длабоко учење за вклучување на ентитетите и нивните природни атрибути од различни домени во единствена рамка. Специфично, нашиот модел не само ги кодира ентитетите на прегледувач, предмет и преглед, туку и нивните атрибути како што се локацијата, датумот, цените. Furthermore, we present a domain classifier to adapt the knowledge from one domain to the other.  Со огромните атрибути во постојните ентитети и знаење во други домени, успешно го решивме проблемот со недостатокот на податоци во поставувањата на ладен старт. Експерименталните резултати на двата Yelp податоци докажуваат дека нашата предложена рамка значително ги надминува најновите методи.', 'kk': 'Спам анықтауы көп қолданбаларының себебі, академиялық және индустриялық зерттеу нақышы болды. Алдыңғы зерттеулердің негізінде лингвистикалық не әрекеттердің қасиеттерін түрлендіру үшін, спамды және жариялық редакцияларды түрлендіру үшін көздеген. Бұл мүмкіндіктер немесе жинақтау үшін ұзын уақыт келтіріледі. Сондықтан сүйені бастау спама тексеру тапсырмаларына қолдану қиын. Жуырдағы көтерілген невралдық желіне тез бастау мәселесі үшін мәтін және қасиеттерді кодтау үшін кодтады. Бірақ көп атрибуттардың мәліметі барлық қоршау бағдарламасының көпшілігін елемейді. Бұл қағазда, біз бөліктерді және олардың әртүрлі атрибуттарын түрлі доменден біріктірілген фрейміне қосу үшін романдық оқыту архитектурасын ұсынамыз. Біздің үлгіміз тек қана қарау, нысандар мен қарау нысандарын кодтамыз, сондай-ақ олардың атрибуттарын, жерге, күні, бағалар аумағындарын кодтамыз. Сонымен қатар, бір доменден білімді бір-біріне өзгерту үшін домен классификаторын таңдаймыз. Басқа домендерде бар нысандар мен білімдердің көп атрибуттары бар, біз деректердің қажеттілігін тез бастау параметрлерінде сәтті шешіп тастадық. Екі Yelp деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері, қолданылатын қорларымыздың күй- жай әдістерін өзгертпейді.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan spam telah lama menjadi topik kajian dalam akademik dan industri kerana aplikasi luas. kajian terdahulu terutama fokus pada mengekstrak ciri-ciri bahasa atau perilaku untuk membezakan spam dan ulasan sah. Such features are either ineffective or take long time to collect and thus are hard to be applied to cold-start spam review detection tasks.  Lanjutan baru-baru ini menggunakan rangkaian saraf untuk mengekod ciri-ciri teks dan perilaku untuk masalah permulaan sejuk. Namun, maklumat atribut yang banyak telah dilupakan oleh kerangka yang wujud. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan arkitektur belajar dalam bahasa untuk menggabungkan entiti dan atribut-atribut mereka dari berbagai-bagai domain ke dalam kerangka bersatu. Secara khusus, model kami tidak hanya mengekodkan entiti peneliti, item, dan penelitian, tetapi juga atribut mereka seperti lokasi, tarikh, julat harga. Selain itu, kami mempersembahkan pengklasifikasi domain untuk menyesuaikan pengetahuan dari satu domain ke yang lain. Dengan atribut yang banyak dalam entiti yang ada dan pengetahuan dalam domain lain, kita berjaya selesaikan masalah kekurangan data dalam tetapan permulaan dingin. Keputusan percubaan pada dua set data Yelp membuktikan bahawa kerangka yang kami cadangkan jauh melebihi kaedah-kaedah terbaik.', 'ml': 'അതിന്റെ വിശാലമായ പ്രയോഗങ്ങളുടെ കാരണമായി സ്പാമ് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു പഠനത്തിന്റെ വിഷയത്തിലാണ്. മുമ്പുള്ള പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് ഭാഷകങ്ങളോ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളോ പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനായോ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. സ്പ ഇതുപോലുള്ള വിശേഷങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനരഹിതമാണോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d നീണ്ട സമയം സംഘടിപ്പിക്കാനോ എടുക്കുന്നതോ അതുകൊണ്ട് തണുത്തു തണുത്ത തുടങ്ങുന്ന പ്രശ്നത്തിനുള്ള ടെക്സ്ചുളിലും പെരുമാറ്റങ്ങളും കോഡിങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള അടുത്തുള്ള പ എന്നാലും നിലവിലുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഏറ്റവും വലിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടേഷന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നു.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പരിശോധന, വസ്തുക്കളുടെ വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d മാത്രമല്ല, സ്ഥലം, തീയതി, വില പരിധികള്\u200d എന്നിവയുടെ വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200d പോലെയു അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫയര്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ഒരു ഡൊമെയില്\u200d നിന്നും മറ്റൊരാള്\u200dക്കും അറിവ്  നിലവിലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളുടെയും അറിവുകളുടെയും അധികമായ വ്യവസ്ഥകളുടെയും കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വിജയിച്ചു തണുത്ത തുടങ്ങുന്ന സ രണ്ടു യെല്\u200dഫ് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d തെളിയിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഫ്രെയിമ്മെയില്\u200d', 'mt': 'Id-detezzjoni tal-ispam ilha suġġett ta’ riċerka kemm fl-akkademja kif ukoll fl-industrija minħabba l-applikazzjonijiet wiesgħa tagħha. L-istudji preċedenti huma ffukati prinċipalment fuq l-estrazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi lingwistiċi jew ta’ mġiba biex jiddistingwu l-ispam u r-reviżjonijiet leġittimi. Dawn il-karatteristiċi jew mhumiex effettivi jew jieħdu żmien twil biex jinġabru u għalhekk huma diffiċli li jiġu applikati għall-kompiti ta’ identifikazzjoni tar-reviżjoni tal-ispam bi startjar kiesaħ. L-avvanz reċenti ingrana n-netwerk newrali biex jikkodifika l-karatteristiċi testwali u ta’ mġiba għall-problema ta’ startjar kiesaħ. Madankollu, l-informazzjoni abbundanti dwar l-attributi hija fil-biċċa l-kbira injorata mill-qafas eżistenti. In this paper, we propose a novel deep learning architecture for incorporating entities and their inherent attributes from various domains into a unified framework.  Speċifikament, il-mudell tagħna mhux biss jikkodifika l-entitajiet tar-reviżur, il-partita, u r-reviżjoni, iżda wkoll l-attributi tagħhom bħall-post, id-data, il-firxiet tal-prezzijiet. Barra minn hekk, qed nippreżentaw klassifikatur tad-dominju biex jadatta l-għarfien minn dominju għal ieħor. With the abundant attributes in existing entities and knowledge in other domains, we successfully solve the problem of data scarcity in the cold-start settings.  Riżultati esperimentali fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta Yelp juru li l-qafas propost tagħna huwa sinifikattivament ogħla mill-metodi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Спам олох нь урт хугацаанд шинжлэх ухааны болон үйлдвэрлэлийн судалгааны сэдэв болсон. Өмнөх судалгаанууд ихэвчлэн хэлний, үйл ажиллагааны чадварыг нэмэгдүүлэхэд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Ийм үйл ажиллагаа нь үр дүнгүй, эсвэл цуглуулахын тулд удаан хугацаа зарцуулдаг. Иймээс хүйтэн эхэлсэн спамм шинжилгээний ажиллагаанд хэрэглэх нь хэцүү. Шинэ хугацааны урвалд тархины сүлжээнд хүйтэн эхлэл асуудлын текст болон үйл ажиллагааны шинж тэмдэглэгдсэн. Гэхдээ ихэнх атрибутын мэдээлэл суурилсан хэмжээсүүд нь ихэнх хэмжээсүүд дээр үгүй байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид бүтээлүүдийг бүрдүүлэхэд шинэ гүн гүнзгий суралцах архитектурыг санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа бидний загвар нь зөвхөн шүүгч, элемент, шинэчлэлийн нэгж биш, мөн тэдний байр суурь, дата, үнэ хэмжээсүүдийг коддог. Мөн бид холбоотой хуваалцагчийг нэг холбоотой мэдлэгийг нөгөө холбоотой зохицуулахын тулд үзүүлнэ. Өөр хэсэгт байгаа биетүүд болон мэдлэгтэй ихэвчлэн тодорхойлолтуудын асуудлуудыг бид амжилттай хүйтэн эхлэлтийн байгууллагуудын асуудлыг шийдэх болно. Хоёр Yelp өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүн нь бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн хэмжээсүүд урлагийн байр суурь арга замыг илүү үр дүнтэй болгодог.', 'no': 'Søppelpunksjonen har lang vært eit forskningsemne i både akademisk og industri på grunn av dei brede programmene. Førre studiar er hovudsakelig fokusert på å pakka ut språkstiske eller atferdsfunksjonar for å distisera søppelpost og legitimt gjennomsikt. Desse funksjonane er anten ikkje effektiv, eller tar lang tid for å samla samlinga, og derfor er vanskeleg å bruka på oppgåver for oppdaging av kald- start- søppelpost. Nyleg avansert nivået på neuralnettverket for å koda tekst- og atferdsfunksjonane for det kalde startproblemet. Det store attributtinformasjonen er imidlertid utgått av det eksisterande rammeverket. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt dyp læringsarkitektur for å inkludere einingar og sine innhaldne attributtar frå ulike domene til eit vienot rammeverk. Dette modellen koderer ikkje berre entiteten for gjennomsikter, element og gjennomsikt, men også attributtane sine som adresse, dato, prisområde. I tillegg presenterer vi eit domeneklassifiserer for å tilpassa kunnskapen frå ein domene til den andre. Med dei fleire attributtane i eksisterande einingar og kunnskap i andre domene, løyser vi opp problemet med feilsøking av data i kaldte startinnstillingane. Eksperimentale resultat på to Yelp-datasett viser at vår foreslått rammeverket utfører betydelig tilstanden av kunstmetodane.', 'ro': 'Detectarea spam a fost mult timp un subiect de cercetare atât în domeniul academic, cât și în industrie datorită aplicațiilor sale largi. Studiile anterioare se concentrează în principal pe extragerea caracteristicilor lingvistice sau comportamentale pentru a distinge spam-ul și recenziile legitime. Astfel de caracteristici sunt fie ineficiente, fie necesită mult timp pentru a colecta și, prin urmare, sunt greu de aplicat sarcinilor de detectare a revizuirii spam cu pornire rece. Avansarea recentă a folosit rețeaua neurală pentru a codifica caracteristicile textuale și comportamentale pentru problema de pornire la rece. Cu toate acestea, informațiile abundente privind atributele sunt în mare măsură neglijate de cadrul existent. În această lucrare, propunem o arhitectură nouă de învățare profundă pentru încorporarea entităților și atributele lor inerente din diferite domenii într-un cadru unificat. Mai exact, modelul nostru codează nu numai entitățile revizorului, articolului și revizuirii, ci și atributele acestora, cum ar fi locația, data, intervalele de preț. În plus, vă prezentăm un clasificator de domenii pentru a adapta cunoștințele de la un domeniu la altul. Cu atributele abundente în entitățile existente și cunoștințele din alte domenii, rezolvăm cu succes problema deficitului de date în setările de pornire la rece. Rezultatele experimentale pe două seturi de date Yelp demonstrează că cadrul nostru propus depășește semnificativ metodele de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje spama dugo je bila istraživačka tema u akademiji i industriji zbog širokih primjena. Prethodna ispitivanja su uglavnom fokusirana na izvlačenje jezičkih ili ponašanja karakteristika kako bi razlikovali spam i legitimne preglede. Takve karakteristike su ili neefektivne ili potrebno dugo vremena za sakupljanje, i tako je teško da se primjenjuju na zadatke otkrivanja hladnostart spama. Nedavno napredno je uticalo na neuralnu mrežu da kodira tekstualne i ponašanje karakteristike problema sa hladnom početkom. Međutim, ogromne informacije o atributu uglavnom zabranjuju postojeći okvir. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu arhitekturu dubokog učenja za uključenje entiteta i njihove inherente atribute iz različitih domena u ujedinjenu okvir. Posebno, naš model ne samo kodira entitete preglednika, predmeta i pregleda, nego i njihove atribute kao što su lokacija, datum, cene. Osim toga, predstavljamo klasifikatora domena da prilagodi znanje iz jednog domena drugom. Sa mnogim atributima u postojećim entitetima i znanjima u drugim domenama, uspešno rešimo problem nedostatka podataka u hladnim nastavama. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva seta podataka Yelp dokazuju da naš predloženi okvir značajno iznosi državne metode umjetnosti.', 'so': 'Sida waqti dheer waxaa la ogaanayay maadooyinka waxbarashada ee iskuul iyo ganacsi sababtoo ah codsigiisa ballaadhan. Waxbarashada hore waxaa ugu horeyn ku focus ah in la soo bixiyo qalabka luuqadaha ama tababarka si ay u kala soocaan baaritaanka iyo baaritaanka sharciga ah. Waxyaabaha caynkaas ah waa mid aan faa’iido lahayn ama wakhti dheer la soo ururiyo, sidaas darteed waa ku adag tahay in lagu codsado goobaha baaritaanka iskuulka ah. Recent advance leveraged the neural network to encode the textual and behavior features for the cold-start problem.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee macluumaadka faa’iidada ah waxaa si badan looga jeedaa qashinka joogta. Kanu warqaddan waxaan ka soo jeedaynaa dhismo aad u dheer oo waxbarasho ah, si loo soo geliyo alaabtooda iyo deegaankooda laga soo galo noocyo kala duduwan, oo aan u soo bandhignayno qalcado la xiriira. Si gaar ah, modellkayagu ma kooban waxyaabaha wax ka fiirsashada, waxyaabaha iyo wax ka fiirsashada, laakiin sidoo kale waxay leeyihiin meelo, taariikh, qiimaha. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu soo bandhignaa fasax deegaan si aan aqoonta looga dhigno gudaha ilaa tan kale. Marka aad leedahay waxyaabo badan oo ku jirta meelaha kale, iyo aqoonta, waxaynu ku liibaanaynaa dhibaatada dhibaatada xaflada xafiiska bilowga. Imtixaanka labada databaset ee Yelp waxay caddeysaa in firaaqadayada la soo jeeday ay ay si muhiim ah u muuqataa hababka farshaxanka.', 'si': 'ස්පෑම් හොයාගන්න හොයාගන්න හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා. මුලින් පරීක්ෂණ අධ්\u200dයානය අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා භාෂාව්\u200dයාත්මක නැත්තම් භාෂාව්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂය සහ නීතිමත එහෙම විශේෂතාවක් නිර්භාවිත වෙන්නේ නැහැ නැහැ නැහැ සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න වෙලාවක් වෙන්න, ඒ වගේම ස්පම් පටන්  ඉතින් ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් පස්සේ පටන් ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සංකේත නමුත්, විශේෂ විශේෂ තොරතුරු වැඩියෙන් වැඩියෙන් තියෙන්නේ තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිදේශ විශ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා අධ්\u200dයතාවක් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ අධ්\u200dයතාවක් සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සම්පූර්ණය සඳහා විවිධ විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපේ මොඩේල් කෝඩ් කරන්නේ පරීක්ෂකය, අයිති සහ පරීක්ෂකයේ අයිතිය නෙවෙයි, ඒත් ඔවුන්ගේ අයිතිය, තියෙන,  තවත්, අපි දේමින් විශේෂකයෙක් පෙන්වන්නම් එක ප්\u200dරදේශයෙන් අනිත් ප්\u200dරදේශකයෙන් දැනගන්න. අනිත් ඩෝමේන් වල තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් ගොඩක්  යෙල්ප් දත්ත සටහන් දෙකකින් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට', 'ur': 'Spam detection has long been a research topic in both academic and industry due to its wide applications. اگلے مطالعہ صرف زبان یا رفتاری کے علائم کو پھیرنے کے لئے تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے کہ اسپام اور قانون رسانیوں کو اختلاف کرنے کے لئے۔ یہ فرصت یا غیر فعال ہیں یا جمع کرنے کے لئے طویل مدت لیتے ہیں اور اسی طرح ٹھنڈ-شروع اسپام رسی شناسایی کے کاموں پر لازم کرنا مشکل ہے. اچھے سے اگلے آگے نئورل نیٹ ورک کو ٹھنڈ شروع مسئلہ کے لئے تفصیل اور رفتار کے فرصت کے ساتھ کوڈ کرنے کے لئے لگے۔ However, the abundant attribute information is largely ignored by the existing framework. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نئی عمیق سیکھنے کی معماری پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جن کے ذریعہ ایک متحدہ فرم میں ان کی مختلف دامنوں سے ان کے وارث خاصات شامل ہوتے ہیں۔ خاص طور پر، ہماری مدل صرف روانوٹر، اتم، اور روانوٹر کے اختیاروں کو کوڈ نہیں کرتا، بلکہ ان کے خصوصے بھی جیسے موقعیت، تاریخ، قیمت سیمے ہیں. اس کے علاوہ ہم ایک ڈومین کلاسیٹر کو پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک ڈومین سے ایک دوسرے سے علم کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے۔ اور دوسری دامنوں میں موجود موجود موجود موجود موجودات اور علم میں بہت زیادہ خصوصیات کے ساتھ، ہم نے سرد شروع کے سامنے ڈیٹا کمزوری کے مسئلہ کو موفق طور پر حل کیا۔ دو یلپ ڈاٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ ثابت کرتا ہے کہ ہمارے پیشنهاد فرمود کے لحاظ سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'வெள்ளை கண்டுபிடிப்பு நீண்ட நேரம் ஒரு ஆராய்ச்சி தலைப்பு இருந்தது கல்வியல் மற்றும் தொழில்நுட்பம் இருந்தது  முந்தைய ஆய்வுகள் முக்கியமாக மொழிமை அல்லது நடைமுறைகளை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு கவனம் பெறுகிறது ஸ்பாம் மற்றும் சரியான முன்னோட் இவ்வாறு குணங்கள் செயல்படவில்லை அல்லது நீண்ட நேரம் சேகரிக்க எடுத்துக் கொள்ளவும் அதனால் குளிர் ஆரம்பிக்கும் ஸ்பாம் மீள் தற்பொழுது முன்னேற்றம் குளிர் துவங்கும் பிரச்சனைக்கான நிரல் மற்றும் நடத்தைகளை குறியீட்டிடுவதற்கான புதிய அதிகமான குணங்களின் தகவல் தற்போதைய சட்டத்தால் புறக்கணிக்கப்பட்டது. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பொருள்களை மற்றும் அவரது குணங்களை பல களங்களிலிருந்து ஒரு unified சட்டத்தில்  குறிப்பிட்டு, எங்கள் மாதிரி முகவரி, பொருள், மற்றும் முன்னோட்டத்தின் பொருள்களை மட்டும் குறியீடு மட்டும் குறியீடு மட்டும் இல அதற்கு மேலும், நாம் ஒரு களம் வகுப்பாளரை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் ஒரு களம் இருந்து மற்றொரு வரை அறிவை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். மற்ற களங்களில் இருக்கும் பொருள் மற்றும் அறிவுகளில் உள்ள பல குணங்களுடன், நாம் வெற்றிகரமாக தரவு குறைப்பிட்ட பிரச்சனை இரண்டு யெல்ப் தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் தெரியும் நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட சட்டத்தை முக்கியமாக முடியும் என', 'sv': 'Spam detektering har länge varit ett forskningsämne i både akademisk och industri på grund av dess breda tillämpningar. Tidigare studier fokuserar främst på att extrahera språkliga eller beteendefunktioner för att skilja skräppost och legitima recensioner. Sådana funktioner är antingen ineffektiva eller tar lång tid att samla in och är därför svåra att tillämpa på kallstartsdetektering av skräppost. Den senaste utvecklingen utnyttjade det neurala nätverket för att koda text- och beteendefunktionerna för kallstartsproblemet. Den rikliga informationen om attribut försummas dock till stor del av den befintliga ramen. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny djupinlärningsarkitektur för att integrera entiteter och deras inneboende attribut från olika domäner i ett enhetligt ramverk. Specifikt kodar vår modell inte bara enheterna för granskare, objekt och granskning, utan också deras attribut som plats, datum, prisintervall. Dessutom presenterar vi en domänklassificerare för att anpassa kunskapen från en domän till en annan. Med de rikliga attributen i existerande entiteter och kunskap inom andra områden löser vi framgångsrikt problemet med databrist i kallstartsinställningarna. Experimentella resultat på två Yelp-datauppsättningar visar att vårt föreslagna ramverk avsevärt överträffar de senaste metoderna.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie spamu od dawna jest tematem badawczym zarówno w akademii, jak i przemyśle ze względu na szerokie zastosowania. Poprzednie badania koncentrują się głównie na wydobyciu cech językowych lub zachowań w celu rozróżnienia spamu i uzasadnionych recenzji. Takie funkcje są albo nieskuteczne, albo zajmują dużo czasu, aby zebrać i dlatego trudno są zastosować do zadań wykrywania przeglądów spamu na zimnym start. Ostatni postęp wykorzystał sieć neuronową do kodowania funkcji tekstowych i zachowań dla problemu zimnego startu. Jednak obfite informacje o atrybutach są w dużej mierze zaniedbane przez istniejące ramy. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową architekturę głębokiego uczenia, umożliwiającą włączenie podmiotów i ich nieodłącznych atrybutów z różnych dziedzin w jednolity framework. W szczególności nasz model koduje nie tylko jednostki recenzenta, pozycji i recenzji, ale także ich atrybuty, takie jak lokalizacja, data, przedziały cenowe. Ponadto przedstawiamy klasyfikator domen, aby dostosować wiedzę z jednej dziedziny do drugiej. Dzięki bogatym atrybutom istniejących podmiotów oraz wiedzy z innych dziedzin z powodzeniem rozwiązujemy problem niedoboru danych w ustawieniach zimnego startu. Wyniki eksperymentalne na dwóch zbiorach danych Yelp dowodzą, że proponowane ramy znacznie przewyższają najnowocześniejsze metody.', 'uz': "Name Oldingi o'rganishlar asosiy tilni yoki xususiyatlarni ajratish uchun foydalanuvchilarga foydalanadi. Bu moslamalar qoʻllanilmaydi yoki olib tashlash uchun uzun vaqt qabul qiladi va shunday qilib chiqishni boshlash vazifalar qoʻllaniladi. @ info Lekin, ko'pchilik xotira mavjud freym orqali eng muhim maʼlumot yoʻqoladi. Bu qogʻozda, biz quyidagi o'rganish mualliflarni va har xil domenadagi taxminan xossalarini bir birlashtirish frameiga qo'shish uchun qoʻllanmiz. @ info: whatsthis Ko'rsatganda, biz bir domen bilan maʼlumotni boshqa tomondan o'zgartirish uchun domen sinfga ega qilamiz. With the abundant attributes in existing entities and knowledge in other domains, we successfully solve the problem of data scarcity in the cold-start settings.  Ikki Yelp maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari bilan ishlatiladi, bizning ilova qilingan freymimizning holatning holati usulini muhim bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Phát hiện đồ hộp đã lâu là một chủ đề nghiên cứu trong cả ngành học và công nghiệp do nó được áp dụng rộng rãi. Những nghiên cứu trước chủ yếu được tập trung vào việc khai thác các tính chất ngôn ngữ hoặc hành vi để phân biệt thư rác và các bình luận chính đáng. Những tính năng này không hiệu quả hoặc mất nhiều thời gian để thu thập và do đó rất khó áp dụng cho việc khám phá thư rác rác bắt đầu lạnh. Mới đây, nhờ lực của mạng thần kinh để mã hóa các tính năng kết cấu và hành vi cho vấn đề bắt đầu lạnh. Tuy nhiên, những thông tin thừa thãi bị bỏ rơi bởi bộ khung hiện tại. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một kiến trúc cổ đại để lắp ghép các thực thể và các thuộc tính của các lĩnh vực khác nhau vào một bộ phận thống nhất. Cụ thể, mẫu của chúng ta không chỉ mã hóa các thực thể phê bình, hàng hóa, và đánh giá, mà còn tính chất của chúng như địa điểm, ngày, mức giá cả. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi đưa ra một người phân loại miền để thích nghi sự hiểu biết từ một lãnh vực với một lãnh vực khác. Với những thuộc tính dồi dào trong các thực thể tồn tại và kiến thức trong lĩnh vực khác, chúng ta giải quyết thành công vấn đề về sự khan hiếm dữ liệu trong thiết lập đầu lạnh. Kết quả thử nghiệm trên hai bộ dữ liệu trên Yelp chứng minh rằng trong những thông tin yêu cầu của chúng tôi vượt trội hơn phương pháp hiện đại.', 'nl': 'Spamdetectie is al lang een onderzoeksonderwerp in zowel de academische als de industrie vanwege de brede toepassingen. Eerdere studies zijn vooral gericht op het extraheren van taalkundige of gedragskenmerken om spam en legitieme reviews te onderscheiden. Dergelijke functies zijn ineffectief of duren lang om te verzamelen en zijn daarom moeilijk toe te passen op cold-start spam review detectie taken. Recente vooruitgang maakte gebruik van het neurale netwerk om de tekst- en gedragskenmerken voor het koude-start probleem te coderen. De overvloedige attributeninformatie wordt echter grotendeels verwaarloosd door het bestaande kader. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe deep learning architectuur voor voor het integreren van entiteiten en hun inherente attributen uit verschillende domeinen in een uniform framework. In het bijzonder codeert ons model niet alleen de entiteiten van reviewer, item en review, maar ook hun attributen zoals locatie, datum, prijsklassen. Daarnaast presenteren we een domeinclassificator om de kennis van het ene domein naar het andere aan te passen. Met de overvloedige attributen in bestaande entiteiten en kennis in andere domeinen lossen we succesvol het probleem van dataschaarste op in de cold-start settings. Experimentele resultaten op twee Yelp datasets bewijzen dat ons voorgestelde framework aanzienlijk beter presteert dan de state-of-the-art methoden.', 'bg': 'Откриването на спам отдавна е изследователска тема както в академичните, така и в индустрията поради широките си приложения. Предишните проучвания са фокусирани главно върху извличането на лингвистични или поведенчески характеристики, за да се разграничат спам и легитимни отзиви. Такива функции са или неефективни, или отнемат дълго време, за да се съберат и следователно са трудни за прилагане при задачи за откриване на спам преглед при студен старт. Скорошният напредък използва невронната мрежа, за да кодира текстовите и поведенческите функции за проблема със студения старт. Въпреки това, изобилната информация за атрибутите до голяма степен се пренебрегва от съществуващата рамка. В настоящата статия предлагаме нова архитектура за дълбоко обучение за включване на субекти и присъщи им атрибути от различни области в единна рамка. По-конкретно нашият модел не само кодира същностите на рецензент, елемент и преглед, но и техните атрибути като местоположение, дата, ценови диапазони. Освен това представяме домейн класификатор за адаптиране на знанията от един домейн към друг. С изобилието от атрибути в съществуващите обекти и знания в други области успешно решаваме проблема с недостига на данни в настройките за студен старт. Експерименталните резултати на два набора от данни доказват, че предложената ни рамка значително превъзхожда съвременните методи.', 'da': 'Spam detektion har længe været et forskningsemne i både akademisk og industri på grund af dens brede anvendelser. Tidligere undersøgelser er hovedsageligt fokuseret på at udtrække sproglige eller adfærdsmæssige funktioner for at skelne mellem spam og legitime anmeldelser. Sådanne funktioner er enten ineffektive eller tager lang tid at indsamle og er derfor svære at anvende på koldstart spam gennemgang detekteringsopgaver. Seneste fremskridt udnyttede det neurale netværk til at kode tekst- og adfærdsfunktioner til koldstartsproblemet. De rigelige egenskabsoplysninger er imidlertid i vid udstrækning forsømt af de eksisterende rammer. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny deep learning arkitektur til at indarbejde enheder og deres iboende egenskaber fra forskellige domæner i en samlet ramme. Specielt koder vores model ikke kun enhederne for anmelder, element og gennemgang, men også deres attributter såsom placering, dato, prisintervaller. Desuden præsenterer vi en domæneklassificator for at tilpasse viden fra det ene domæne til det andet. Med de rigelige egenskaber i eksisterende enheder og viden på andre områder løser vi med succes problemet med dataknaphed i koldstartsindstillingerne. Eksperimentelle resultater på to Yelp-datasæt viser, at vores foreslåede ramme overgår de nyeste metoder betydeligt.', 'de': 'Spam-Erkennung ist seit langem ein Forschungsthema in Wissenschaft und Industrie aufgrund seiner breiten Anwendung. Bisherige Studien konzentrieren sich hauptsächlich auf das Extrahieren sprachlicher oder verhaltensbezogener Merkmale, um Spam und legitime Bewertungen zu unterscheiden. Solche Funktionen sind entweder unwirksam oder benötigen lange Zeit, um sie zu sammeln und sind daher schwer auf Cold-Start-Spam-Review-Erkennungsaufgaben anzuwenden. Jüngste Fortschritte nutzten das neuronale Netzwerk, um die Text- und Verhaltensmerkmale für das Kaltstart-Problem zu kodieren. Allerdings werden die reichlich vorhandenen Attributinformationen vom bestehenden Framework weitgehend vernachlässigt. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neuartige Deep Learning Architektur vor, um Entitäten und ihre inhärenten Attribute aus verschiedenen Domänen in ein einheitliches Framework zu integrieren. Konkret kodiert unser Modell nicht nur die Entitäten von Prüfer, Artikel und Bewertung, sondern auch deren Attribute wie Standort, Datum, Preisspannen. Darüber hinaus stellen wir einen Domänenklassifikator vor, um das Wissen von einer Domäne in die andere anzupassen. Mit den zahlreichen Attributen in bestehenden Entitäten und dem Wissen in anderen Bereichen lösen wir erfolgreich das Problem der Datenknappheit in den Kaltstart-Einstellungen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an zwei Yelp-Datensätzen belegen, dass unser vorgeschlagenes Framework die neuesten Methoden deutlich übertrifft.', 'id': 'Deteksi spam sudah lama menjadi topik penelitian di akademi dan industri karena aplikasi yang luas. Studi sebelumnya terutama fokus pada ekstraksi karakteristik bahasa atau perilaku untuk membedakan spam dan ulasan yang sah. Karakteristik tersebut tidak efektif atau mengambil waktu yang lama untuk mengumpulkan dan oleh itu sulit untuk diaplikasikan untuk tugas deteksi ulasan spam awal dingin. Lanjutan baru-baru ini menggunakan jaringan saraf untuk mengkode fitur tekstual dan perilaku untuk masalah awal dingin. Namun, informasi atribut yang berlimpah kebanyakan diabaikan oleh kerangka yang ada. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan arsitektur belajar dalam bahasa novel untuk mengikorporasi entitas dan atribut asli mereka dari berbagai daerah ke dalam rangka yang bersatu. Secara spesifik, model kita tidak hanya mengkode entitas peneliti, item, dan penelitian, tetapi juga atribut mereka seperti lokasi, tanggal, jangkauan harga. Selain itu, kami mempersembahkan klasifikasi domain untuk mengadaptasi pengetahuan dari satu domain ke yang lain. Dengan atribut yang banyak dalam entitas dan pengetahuan yang ada di domain lain, kami berhasil memecahkan masalah kekurangan data dalam pengaturan awal dingin. Hasil percobaan pada dua set data Yelp membuktikan bahwa cadangan kami yang direncanakan jauh melebihi metode state-of-the-art.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje spama dugo je bila istraživačka tema u akademiji i industriji zbog širokih primjena. Prethodna ispitivanja se uglavnom fokusiraju na izvlačenje jezičkih ili ponašanja karakteristika kako bi se razlikovala spam i legitimne preglede. Takve karakteristike su ili neefektivne ili potrebno dugo vremena za sakupljanje i tako je teško primjenjivati na zadatke otkrivanja hladnopočetnog spama. Nedavno je napredovalo neuralnu mrežu za kodiranje tekstualnih i ponašanja problema s hladnom početkom. Međutim, ogromne informacije o atributu uglavnom zabranjuju postojeći okvir. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu arhitekturu dubokog učenja za uključenje entiteta i njihovih inherentnih atributa iz različitih domena u ujedinjeni okvir. Posebno, naš model ne samo kodira entitete preglednika, predmeta i pregleda, već i njihove atribute kao što su lokacija, datum, raspon cijena. Osim toga, predstavljamo klasifikatora domena da prilagodi znanje iz jednog domena drugoj. S mnogim atributima u postojećim entitetima i znanjima u drugim domenama uspješno riješimo problem nedostatka podataka u hladnopočetnim nastavama. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva seta podataka Yelp pokazuju da naš predloženi okvir značajno iznosi državne metode umjetnosti.', 'ko': '광범위한 응용으로 인해 스팸메일 검출은 학계와 공업계의 연구 과제가 되었다.이전의 연구는 주로 언어나 행위 특징을 추출하여 스팸메일과 합법적인 평론을 구분하는 데 집중되었다.이러한 기능은 무효이거나 수집하는 데 시간이 오래 걸리기 때문에 스팸메일 심사 검사 작업에 냉가동하기 어렵다.최근의 진전은 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 냉각 가동 문제의 텍스트와 행위 특징을 인코딩하는 것이다.그러나 기존 프레임워크는 풍부한 속성 정보를 어느 정도 무시했다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 심도 있는 학습 체계 구조를 제시하여 서로 다른 분야의 실체와 고유 속성을 통일된 틀에 통합시켰다.구체적으로 말하면 우리 모델은 심사자, 프로젝트와 심사하는 실체를 인코딩할 뿐만 아니라 위치, 날짜, 가격 범위와 같은 속성도 인코딩했다.그 밖에 우리는 지식이 한 분야에서 다른 분야로 이동하는 데 적응하는 분야 분류기를 제시했다.기존 실체의 풍부한 속성과 다른 분야의 지식을 이용하여 우리는 냉각 가동 환경에서의 데이터 희소 문제를 성공적으로 해결했다.두 개의 Yelp 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과는 우리가 제시한 틀이 기존의 방법보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Ugunduzi wa Spam kwa muda mrefu umekuwa mada ya utafiti katika sekondari na sekta kwa sababu ya matumizi mengi. Tafiti zilizopita zinajikita zaidi kwenye kutengeneza utambulisho wa lugha au tabia za kiutamaduni ili kutofautisha utafiti na utafiti wa halali. Tamko kama hizi hazina ufanisi au kuchukua muda mrefu ili kukusanya na hivyo ni vigumu kutumika katika kazi za kutambuliwa kwa umeme wa baridi. Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni yalijumuisha mtandao wa neura ili kuweka taarifa za msingi na tabia kwa ajili ya tatizo la mwanzo wa baridi. Hata hivyo, taarifa nyingi za utambulisho hupuuzwa sana na mfumo uliopo. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza ujenzi wa riwaya wa kujifunza kina ndani kwa ajili ya kuunganisha vifaa vyao na vifaa vyao vya ndani kutoka maeneo mbalimbali katika mfumo wa pamoja. Kwa hakika, mfano wetu siyo tu unajumuisha vitu vya mtazamaji, bidhaa, na utafiti, bali pia vifaa vyao kama vile nafasi, tarehe, kiwango cha bei. Furthermore, we present a domain classifier to adapt the knowledge from one domain to the other.  Kuhusu vifaa vingi katika vifaa vinavyopo na maarifa katika maeneo mengine, tunafanikiwa kutatua tatizo la ukosefu wa taarifa katika mazingira ya mwanzo ya baridi. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti mbili za data za Yelp yanaonyesha kuwa mfumo wetu wa pendekezo unaonyesha utaratibu wa sanaa.', 'fa': 'شناسایی اسپام خیلی وقته یک موضوع تحقیقات در دانشگاه و صنعت به دلیل کاربردهای وسیع آن است. مطالعات قبلی بیشتر بر اخراج ویژه\u200cهای زبان یا رفتاری تمرکز می\u200cشوند تا بررسی\u200cهای اسپام و قانونی را تشخیص دهند. این ویژگی\u200cها یا بی\u200cتاثیر هستند یا زمان طولانی برای جمع کردن و به همین دلیل برای کارهای شناسایی اسپام آغاز سرد سخت است. پیشرفت اخیرا شبکه عصبی را برای رمزگذاری ویژه\u200cهای متن و رفتاری برای مشکل شروع سرد تغییر داد. ولی اطلاعات زیادی از خصوصیت\u200cها بیشتر توسط چهارچوب موجود غافل می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ، ما یک معماری عمیق یادگیری را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم برای شامل شرکت\u200cها و ویژگی\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cهای مختلف از دامنه\u200cهای مختلف به یک چهارخه\u200cای متحد. مخصوصاً مدل ما نه تنها عنوان بازرسی، عنوان و بازرسی را رمز می\u200cکند، بلکه ویژگی\u200cهایشان مثل موقعیت، تاریخ، مقدار قیمت. علاوه بر این، ما یک راهنمایی دومین را برای تعمیر علم از یک دامین به دیگر نشان می دهیم. با ویژه های بسیار زیادی در موجودات موجود و دانش در دومین های دیگر، ما با موفقیت مشکل کمبود داده ها را در تنظیمات شروع سرد حل می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای یلپ ثابت می\u200cکند که چهارچوب پیشنهاد ما خیلی بیشتر از روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنری را انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Ispanýulary tanyşdyrma hem akademiýasy hem senagatda ýakyn uygulamalary üçin bir tema bolupdyr. Öňki araştyrmalar özellikle dillerini ýa-da tutuklary çykarmak üçin özlerine üns berilýär. Bütin özellikler ýa-da janlaşdyr ýada ýygnamak üçin uzun wagt alyp bilýär we bu üçin sowuk başlangyç resmi çaşyrymy üçin uygulamak kyn. Ýakyndaky öňki ýetişdirilip sowuk başlamak üçin metinň we hereketleriň ködlemelerini täzeden etmişdi. Ýagna görä, kän atribut maglumaty bolan çerçewçilikde ýok edilýär. Bu kagyzda, biz birnäçe sahypalardan üýtgetmek üçin gaty öwrenme arhitekturlygyny we olaryň içeri özlerini birleştirmek üçin bir roman teklip edip berýäris. Adatça, biziň modelimiz diňe çykyş, aýtem we Review barlygyny ködlenok ýöne olaryň atributlerini ýer, tarih we bahalary ýaly ködlenok. Ayrıca, bir domandan diğerine bilimi uygulamak üçin bir domeny klasifikatçysyny görkezdik. Başga sahypalarda bolan zatlaryň we bilgileriniň kän hasaplaryla, sowuk başlangyç düzümlerinde hasaplaryň ýetmegini başarmady. Iki Yelp veri sahypalaryndaky örän netijeleri biziň teklip eden çarpyşymyzyň öz taryhyň durumyny örän üstüne çykarýandygyny kanıtlaýar.', 'sq': 'Zbulimi i spamit ka qenë prej kohësh një temë kërkimi si në akademikë ashtu edhe në industri për shkak të aplikimeve të saj të gjera. Studimet e mëparshme janë përqëndruar kryesisht në nxjerrjen e karakteristikave gjuhësore apo sjelljeje për të dalluar spamin dhe shqyrtimet e ligjshme. Karakteristikat e tilla janë ose jo efektive ose marrin kohë të gjatë për të mbledhur dhe kështu janë të vështira të aplikohen në detyrat e zbulimit të shqyrtimit të spamit me fillim të ftohtë. Përparimi i kohëve të fundit nxori dorë nga rrjeti nervor për të koduar funksionet tekstuale dhe të sjelljes për problemin e fillimit të ftohtë. Megjithatë, informacioni i madh i atributeve është harruar kryesisht nga kuadri ekzistues. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një arkitekturë të re të mësimit të thellë për përfshirjen e njësive dhe atributeve të tyre të përbashkëta nga fusha të ndryshme në një kuadër të unifikuar. Specifikisht, modeli ynë jo vetëm kodon njësitë e shqyrtuesit, objektit dhe shqyrtimit, por gjithashtu atributet e tyre të tilla si vendndodhja, data, intervalet e çmimeve. Përveç kësaj, ne paraqesim një klasifikues domeni për të përshtatur njohuritë nga një domeni në tjetrin. Me atributet e shumta në njësitë ekzistuese dhe njohuritë në fusha të tjera, ne zgjidhim me sukses problem in e mungesës së të dhënave në rregullimet e fillimit të ftohtë. Rezultatet eksperimentale në dy grupe të dhënash Yelp provojnë se kuadri ynë i propozuar tejkalon ndjeshëm metodat më të larta.', 'am': 'በተለያዩ ፕሮግራሞች ምክንያት የጥምቀት ጉዳይ የረጅም ዘመን ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት በኩል የቋንቋዊ ወይም የሥርዓት ምርጫዎችን ለመለየት እና የተፈቀደ መልዕክቶችን ለመለየት የሚታየቁ ናቸው፡፡ እንደዚህ ያሉ ምርጫዎች ባይደነግጡ ወይም ረጅም ጊዜ ለመቀበል የሚወስዱበት እና ስለዚህም ለጥቁር ጀምሮ ጀምሮ የተጠቃሚ ስራዎችን ለመቀበል ይችላል፡፡ የጽሑፍ እና የሥርዓት ምርጫዎች ለቀላል ጀምሮ መጀመሪያ ችግር የጽሑፍ እና የሥርዓት ምርጫዎችን ለማክበር የቀድሞው መረብ ሰጥቷል፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ብዙው የአካባቢው መረጃ በአሁኑ ፍሬም ተሳሳትተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አካባቢዎችን እና የሚኖረውን የውይይት ፍሬማት ለመቀበል የጠልቅ ትምህርት መሠረት መሠረትን እናሳስባታለን፡፡ በተለያዩ፣ ሞዴላያችን እንደቦታ፣ ቀን፣ የዋጋው ግንኙነት ብቻ አይደለም፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ እውቀትን ከአንድ ዶሜን ወደ ሌላው ለማቀናበር የዶሜን መፋኛ እናቀርባለን፡፡ በአካባቢው አካባቢዎች እና እውቀት ውስጥ ባለው ብዙ ምርጫዎች በተደረገ ጊዜ በብርቱ መጀመሪያ አካል ውስጥ የዳታ ድህነትን ጉዳይ ፍላጎት እናቆማለን፡፡ በሁለቱ የኢኤልፍ ዳታተሮች ላይ የፈተናው ፍሬማችን የ-የ-የ-art ሥርዓት በሙሉ እንዲያሳየው ያረጋግጣል፡፡', 'af': "Spam-beskrywing is lank 'n ondersoek onderwerp in akademie en industrie gevolg van sy wyde toepassings. Vorige studie is hoofsaaklik gefokus op die uitpakking van lingwisiese of gedrag van funksies om die spam en regverdige reviewe te onderskei. Soos funksies is of oneffektief of neem lank tyd om te samel en dus is moeilik om toepassing te word na koue- begin spam omkyk opdragte. Onlangse vordering het die neuralnetwerk gekode om die teks en gedrag funksies vir die koue- begin probleme te kodeer. Maar die oorvloedige eienskap inligting is groot verwerp deur die bestaande raamwerk. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n roman diep leer arkitektuur vir inkorporeer van einhede en hul inherende eienskappe van verskeie domeine in 'n eenvoudige raamwerk. Spesifieke, ons model kodeer nie slegs die entiteite van hersieer, item en hersiening nie, maar ook hul eienskappe soos ligging, datum, prys omvangs nie. Verder, ons stel 'n domein klassifiseerder voor om die kennis van een domein na die ander te pas. Met die oorvloedige eienskappe in bestaande entiteite en kennis in ander domeine, ons suksesvol die probleem van data skuilheid in die koue- begin instellings oplos. Eksperimentale resultate op twee Yelp datastelle bevestig dat ons voorgestelde raamwerk betekenlik die staat-van-kunstensmetodes uitvoer.", 'hy': 'Spam detection has long been a research topic in both academic and industry due to its wide applications.  Նախորդ ուսումնասիրությունները հիմնականում կենտրոնանում են լեզվաբանական կամ վարքագծային առանձնահատկությունների վերացման վրա, որպեսզի տարբերակեն սպամը և օրինական վերլուծությունները: Այս առանձնահատկությունները կամ անարդյունավետ են, կամ երկար ժամանակ են պահանջում հավաքելու համար, և այսպիսով դժվար է կիրառել սպամ սառը սկսվող վերլուծության խնդիրների համար: Վերջերս նյարդային ցանցը օգտագործել է սառը սկսվող խնդրի տեքստալ և վարքագծային հատկությունները կոդավորելու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, գոյություն ունեցող շրջանակներում գոյություն ունեցող ինֆորմացիան բավականին անտեսվում է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք խորը ուսումնասիրության նոր ճարտարապետություն, որպեսզի միացնենք առանձնահատկությունները և դրանց բնորոշ առանձնահատկությունները տարբեր ոլորտներից միավոր շրջանակի մեջ: Հատկապես, մեր մոդելը ոչ միայն կոդավորում է վերանայողի, առարկաների և վերանայողի միավորները, այլ նաև նրանց առանձնահատկությունները, ինչպիսիք են տեղադրությունը, ժամը, գինների սահմանները: Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք տիեզերքի դասակարգիչ, որպեսզի հարմարեցնենք գիտելիքը մեկ տիեզերքից մյուսին: Գոյություն ունեցող առանձնահատկություններով և գիտելիքներով այլ ոլորտներում մենք հաջողությամբ լուծեցինք տվյալների բացակայության խնդիրը սառը սկսելու միջավայրում: Երկու YeIp տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկման արդյունքները ապացուցում են, որ մեր առաջարկած շրջանակը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ամենակարևոր մեթոդները:', 'az': 'İspanyol keşfetməsi uzun zamandır geniş uyğulamalarına görə akademik və industriyada araştırma məsəlinə idi. Əvvəlki təhsil dillərini və davranışların özlərini ayırmaq üçün dil və ya davranışların təhsil edilməsinə çox odaqlanır. Bütün bu xüsusiyyətlər ya təsir edilməz, ya da yığmaq üçün uzun zaman alır və buna görə də soğuq-başlatma spam gözləmə işlərinə istifadə edilmək zordur. Soğuk başlanğıç problemi üçün textual və davranış özelliklərini kodlamaq üçün nürol ağını çox yaxınlaşdırdı. Ancaq çox xüsusiyyətlər məlumatı, həmin qurğun vasitəsilə unudular. Bu kağızda, bir yeni dərin öyrənmə arhitektarını təklif edirik ki, insanları və onların varislər domenindən birləşdirilmiş bir çerçive içində yerləşdirsin. Şübhəsiz ki, modellərimiz yalnızca gözləyirci, məlumatın və gözləyircilərin məlumatını kodlayır, lakin onların məlumatını, tarihi, qiymət səviyyələrini də kodlayır. Daha sonra, bir domenin elmi digərinə uyğunlaşdırmaq üçün bir domenin klasifikatçısını göstəririk. Bütün məlumatlarda və elmdə olan çox qüvvətlər ilə, soğuq başlatma qurğularında verilən zəif problemlərini başa düşdük. İki Yelp verilənlərin təcrübələrinin təcrübə etdiyimiz frameworklərimizin sanat metodlarını çox üstün etdiyini kanıtlar.', 'bn': 'বিস্তৃত অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের কারণে স্প্যাম আবিষ্কার অনেক দিন ধরে এক গবেষণা বিষয় হয়েছে। পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণাগুলো মূলত ভাষার ভাষার বা আচরণ ব্যবহার বের করার প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে যাতে স্প্যাম এবং বৈধ পর্যায়ের বিভ এই ধরনের বৈশিষ্ট্য কার্যকর অথবা সংগ্রহের জন্য লম্বা সময় নেবে এবং তাই ঠাণ্ডা শুরু করা স্প্যাম পরিচালনা করার জন্য কঠিন। শীতল শুরু সমস্যার জন্য টেক্সচুয়াল এবং আচরণের বৈশিষ্ট্য এনকোড করার জন্য সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের প্ তবে বিভিন্ন বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী তথ্য বিদ্যমান ফ্রেমের দ্বারা বেশীরভাগ উপেক্ষা করা হয়েছে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষার গভীর শিক্ষা কাঠামোর প্রস্তাব করি যেটি বিভিন্ন ডোমেন থেকে তাদের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী বৈশিষ্ট্য বিশেষ করে, আমাদের মডেল শুধুমাত্র পরিদর্শক, বস্তু এবং পর্যবেক্ষণের বৈশিষ্ট্যের কোন এনকোড করে না, বরং তাদের বৈশিষ্ট্য, স্থান, তারিখ এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি ডোমেইন ক্লাসিফারের সামনে উপস্থাপন করি যাতে এক ডোমেইন থেকে অন্যদের কাছে জ্ঞান প্রবৃত্ত করা। অন্যান্য ডোমেইনের বিভিন্ন বস্তু এবং জ্ঞানের বিশাল বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে আমরা সফলভাবে তথ্যের দুর্দশা সমাধান করি শীতল শুর দুই ইয়েলফ ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রমাণ করে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত ফ্রেমের কাঠামো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ করে শিল্পের রাষ্ট', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje spama dugo je bila istraživačka tema u akademiji i industriji zbog širokih primjena. Prethodna ispitivanja su uglavnom fokusirana na izvlačenje jezičkih ili ponašanja karakteristika kako bi razlikovala spam i legitimne preglede. Takve karakteristike su ili neefektivne ili potrebno dugo vremena za sakupljanje, i tako je teško da se primjenjuju na zadatke otkrivanja hladnopočetnog spama. Nedavno napredno je uticalo na neuralnu mrežu da kodira tekstualne i ponašanje karakteristike problema sa hladnom početkom. Međutim, ogromne informacije o atributu u velikoj mjeri zabranjuju postojeći okvir. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu arhitekturu dubokog učenja za uključenje entiteta i njihovih inherentnih atributa iz različitih domena u ujedinjeni okvir. Posebno, naš model ne samo kodira entitete preglednika, predmeta i pregleda, već i njihove atribute kao što su lokacija, datum, procjene. Osim toga, predstavljamo klasifikatora domena da prilagodi znanje iz jednog domena drugom. Sa mnogim atributima u postojećim entitetima i znanjima u drugim domenama uspješno riješimo problem nedostatka podataka u hladnopočetnim nastavama. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva seta podataka Yelp pokazuju da naš predloženi okvir značajno iznosi državne metode umjetnosti.', 'cs': 'Detekce spamu je dlouhodobě výzkumným tématem v akademickém i průmyslu kvůli širokému použití. Předchozí studie jsou zaměřeny především na extrakci jazykových nebo chování vlastností pro rozlišení spamu a legitimních recenzí. Takové funkce jsou buď neúčinné, nebo trvají dlouhou dobu, a proto je obtížné použít na úkoly detekce spamu za studena. Nedávný pokrok využil neuronovou síť k kódování textových a chování pro problém se studeným startem. Bohaté informace o atributech jsou však ve stávajícím rámci do značné míry zanedbávány. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou architekturu hlubokého učení pro začlenění entit a jejich inherentních atributů z různých oblastí do jednotného rámce. Konkrétně náš model kóduje nejen entity recenzenta, položky a recenze, ale také jejich atributy, jako je umístění, datum, cenové rozpětí. Dále představujeme klasifikátor domény pro adaptaci znalostí z jedné domény do druhé. S bohatými atributy ve stávajících entitách a znalostmi v jiných oblastech úspěšně řešíme problém nedostatku dat v nastavení studeného startu. Experimentální výsledky na dvou datových sadách Yelp dokazují, že náš navržený rámec výrazně překonává nejmodernější metody.', 'ca': "La detecció del spam fa molt de temps un tema d'investigació tant acadèmica com indústria a causa de les seves amples aplicacions. Els estudis anteriors s'centren principalment en l'extracció de característiques lingüístices o comportamentals per distingir l'espam i les revisions legítimes. Aquestes característiques són ineficaces o tarden molt de temps per recollir-se i, per tant, són difícils d'aplicar a les tasques de detecció de revisió de spam a inici fred. L'avanç recent va aprofitar la xarxa neuronal per codificar les característiques textuals i comportamentals del problema de començament fred. Tot i així, l'abundant tipus d'informació dels atributs s'ignora en gran part pel marc existent. En aquest paper, proposem una nova arquitectura d'aprenentatge profund per incorporar entitats i els seus atributs inerents de diversos dominis en un marc unificat. Concretament, el nostre model codifica no només les entitats del revisor, l'article i la revisió, sinó també els seus atributs com la localització, data, intervals de preu. A més, presentem un classificador de dominis per adaptar el coneixement d'un domini a l'altre. Amb els atributs abundants de les entitats existents i el coneixement en altres dominis, resolem amb èxit el problema de l'escassetat de dades en les condicions de començament fred. Els resultats experimentals de dos conjunts de dades Yelp demostren que el nostre marc proposat supera significativament els mètodes més avançats.", 'et': 'Rämpsposti tuvastamine on pikka aega olnud uurimisteema nii akadeemilises kui ka tööstuses oma laialdaste rakenduste tõttu. Varasemad uuringud keskenduvad peamiselt keeleliste või käitumisfunktsioonide väljatöötamisele, et eristada rämpsposti ja õiguspäraseid ülevaateid. Sellised funktsioonid on kas ebatõhusad või võtavad kaua aega koguda ja seetõttu on neid raske rakendada külmkäivitusega rämpsposti läbivaatamise tuvastamise ülesannetele. Hiljutised edusammud kasutasid närvivõrku, et kodeerida külmkäivituse probleemi tekst- ja käitumisfunktsioone. Olemasolev raamistik jätab siiski suures osas tähelepanuta rikkaliku atribuuditeabe. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uudse sügavõppe arhitektuuri, et integreerida erinevate valdkondade üksused ja nende omadused ühtsesse raamistikku. Täpsemalt kodeerib meie mudel mitte ainult ülevaataja, üksuse ja ülevaate olemeid, vaid ka nende atribuute nagu asukoht, kuupäev, hinnavahemikud. Lisaks esitame domeeniklassifikaatori, et kohandada teadmisi ühest domeenist teise. Olemasolevate üksuste rikkalike atribuutide ja teiste valdkondade teadmistega lahendame edukalt andmepuuduse probleemi külmkäivitusseadetes. Kahe Yelpi andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused tõestavad, et meie pakutud raamistik ületab oluliselt kaasaegseid meetodeid.', 'fi': 'Roskapostin tunnistus on pitkään ollut tutkimusaihe sekä akateemisessa että teollisuudessa laajojen sovellustensa vuoksi. Aiemmat tutkimukset keskittyvät pääasiassa kielellisten tai käyttäytymisominaisuuksien poimimiseen roskapostin ja laillisten arvostelujen erottamiseksi. Tällaiset ominaisuudet ovat joko tehottomia tai niiden kerääminen kestää kauan, joten niitä on vaikea soveltaa kylmäkäynnistyksen roskapostin tarkistusten havaitsemiseen. Äskettäinen kehitys hyödynsi hermoverkkoa koodaamaan tekstin ja käyttäytymisen ominaisuuksia kylmäkäynnistyksen ongelmaan. Nykyisessä kehyksessä kuitenkin jätetään laajalti huomiotta ominaisuustiedot. Tässä artikkelissa ehdotamme uutta syväoppimisen arkkitehtuuria yhdistämään eri osa-alueilta peräisin olevia kokonaisuuksia ja niiden luontaisia ominaisuuksia yhtenäiseen viitekehykseen. Mallimme ei ainoastaan koodaa arvioijan, kohteen ja arvostelun kokonaisuuksia, vaan myös niiden määritteet, kuten sijainti, päivämäärä ja hintaluokat. Lisäksi esittelemme toimialueen luokittelijan, joka mukauttaa tietoa toimialueelta toiselle. Olemassa olevien kokonaisuuksien runsaiden attribuuttien ja muiden toimialojen tietämyksen ansiosta pystymme ratkaisemaan onnistuneesti datan niukkuuden ongelman kylmäkäynnistysasetuksissa. Kahden Yelpin aineiston kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu viitekehys ylittää merkittävästi uusimmat menetelmät.', 'jv': 'Rasané Spam sing dumadhi kapan resmi dadi neng académik lan senpangan kuwi aplikasi sing gawe barang. Wuraning sing wis diglok kudu ngomong nik nggawe ngubah tindahan apat karo pawaran kanggo nggawe tarjamahan karo perintah sing luwih dumadhi. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness text-editor-action buddy Nang kuwi iki, kita mudhaya nyumbang kelas akeh nggawe aturan khitas karo ingkang sampeyan karo atiribute sing ngedol nang sampeyan ing sampeyan sampeyan nganggo sistem sing berarti. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink additional, we present a domain CLASS to align the knowingfrom one domain to the second. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink Perintah sing paling dhéwé kuwi telas telas nang kelas telas telas nang ngerasahan punika dipunaanyi nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas-layang-layang.', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje neželene pošte je že dolgo raziskovalna tema v akademskem in industrijskem sektorju zaradi široke uporabe. Prejšnje študije se osredotočajo predvsem na izvlečevanje jezikovnih ali vedenjskih značilnosti za razlikovanje neželene pošte in legitimnih pregledov. Takšne funkcije so bodisi neučinkovite ali pa trajajo dolgo časa za zbiranje, zato jih je težko uporabiti za naloge odkrivanja neželene pošte s hladnim zagonom. Nedavni napredek je izkoristil nevronsko omrežje za kodiranje besedilnih in vedenjskih funkcij za težavo s hladnim zagonom. Vendar obstoječi okvir v veliki meri zanemarja obilne informacije o atributih. V prispevku predlagamo novo arhitekturo globokega učenja za vključevanje subjektov in njihovih lastnosti iz različnih področij v enoten okvir. Natančneje, naš model ne kodira le entitet pregledovalca, elementa in pregleda, temveč tudi njihove atribute, kot so lokacija, datum, cenovni razponi. Poleg tega predstavljamo domenski klasifikator za prilagajanje znanja iz ene domene v drugo. Z obilnimi atributi v obstoječih entitetah in znanjem na drugih področjih uspešno rešujemo problem pomanjkanja podatkov v nastavitvah hladnega zagona. Poskusni rezultati dveh naborov podatkov Yelp dokazujejo, da naš predlagani okvir znatno presega najsodobnejše metode.', 'he': 'Spam detection has long been a research topic in both academic and industry due to its wide applications.  מחקרים קודמים ממוקדים בעיקר על החולץ תכונות שפתיים או התנהגות כדי להבדיל את הספאם ובדיקות לגיטימיות. אופיינים כאלה הם או לא יעילים או לוקחים זמן רב לאסוף ולכן קשה להפעיל למשימות גילוי ספאם בהתחלה קרה. התקדמות האחרונה ניצלה את הרשת העצבית כדי לקוד את תכונות ההתנהגות והטקסטיות לבעיה של התחלה קרה. בכל אופן, המידע המפואר של התכונות מוזנח בעיקר על ידי המסגר הקיום. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורת למידה עמוקה רומנית לכילוי יחידות והתכונות הנכונות שלהם מתחומים שונים למסגרת מאוחדת. במיוחד, המודל שלנו לא רק קודם את היחידות של מבחן, פריט, ובמבחן, אלא גם את תכונותיהם כמו מיקום, תאריך, מגווני המחירים. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מציגים מסווג שטח כדי להסתגל את הידע ממשטח אחד לשני. עם התכונות המועדות באיחויות קיימות וידע בתחומים אחרים, אנחנו פותרים בהצלחה את הבעיה של חסר נתונים במסדרות התחלה קרה. תוצאות ניסויים על שני קבוצות מידע Yelp מוכיחות כי המסגרת המוצעת שלנו משפיעה באופן משמעותי את השיטות המיוחדות ביותר.', 'ha': "Zana gane spam har ya zama madaidaici a cikin akalim da shawara duk, sabo da shiryoyinsa masu shimfiɗa ɗãwa. Ana yi amfani da fassaran zamani, ana ƙayyade mafiya-fokus a nuna masu tsari na lugha'ar ko masu aikin aiki dõmin a rarrabe surori da masu halali. Waccan tayari ko kuma ba su ɗauki lokaci mai amfani ba ko kuma don su riƙe lokaci mai lokaci dõmin a haɗa shi, kuma don haka, yana da tsanani a lokacin da za'a amfani da aikin canza canza-canza za'a fara kalde-fara. Recent advance leveraged the neural network to encode the textual and behavior features for the cold-start problem.  A lokacin da, ma'anar bayani masu yawa za'a ƙayyade shi daga firam wanda ke gaba. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wani matsayin da aka sanar da littafin nan da ke ƙara wa masu tsari da masu cikin cikin su, da abũbuwan da ke guda daga duk-wurãre zuwa wani firam mai haɗa. A ƙayyade, shirin mu bã zai kode abun-bayani kawai, abun mai bincike, abun da ake nuna, kuma amma yana da halin su kamar wuri, kwanan, da danni, da zane-zane. Furan haka, Munã gaura wani dangani da aka samu ilmi daga guda zuwa guda. Haƙĩƙa, da masu yawa masu cikin masu halin da ilmi a cikin wasu wurãre guda, succen mu raba masu zartar da haske na data cikin tsarin farawa mai farawa. Matarin da aka jarraba kan data biyu na Yelf, yana bayan cewa, firam da aka buƙata, yana mai girma ga fassarar-the-art.", 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་རྟོགས་བཤེར་ནི་སློབ་གྲྭར་དང་ས industriས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་རེད། སྔོན་མ་ཡོད་པའི་བརྗོད་ཐོའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་བྱ་འགུལ་ཆ་རྣམས་མེད་པར་ཐད་ཀར་བ་བསྐྱེད་ཡོད། འདི་དག་ནི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཚོ་མི་ནུས་པ་དང་བསྡུར་ན་བརྟན་པར་ཆེད་དུ་འཇུག་རིང་འདུག འཕྲལ་མ་ཡོད་པའི་མཐོ་རིམ་དྲ་བ་གིས་ཡི་གེའི་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་འགྲོ་སྟངས་རྣམས་ཉར་འགོ་འཛུགས་པའི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེན་སྒྲིག་འགོ ཡིན་ནའང་། ཁྱད་ཆོས་མང་ཆེ་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དེ་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་གཞུང་ཐོག་གིས་མེད་པ་རེད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་དབང་ཆ་དང་ནང་འདྲེན་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཚུ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་ལུགས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཤིག་སྐྱེས་ཚུལ་དང་ནང་ དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱིས་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་དེ་ལྟ་ཀློག་པ། རྣམ་གྲངས་ ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་ཁོ་ན་མིན་པར་ཁོ་ན་དགོས་མིན་འདུག Furthermore, we present a domain classifier to adapt the knowledge from one domain to the other. གནས་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱིབས་དང་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞན་པའི་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་མང་པོ་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ང་ཚོས་ཁྱེར་གྱིས་འགོ་འཛུགས་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ནང་གི་བྱ་སྟ Yelp གནད་སྡུད་ཟུར་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་དག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'A Neural Question Answering Model Based on Semi-Structured Tables', 'ar': 'نموذج إجابة للأسئلة العصبية يعتمد على جداول شبه منظمة', 'pt': 'Um modelo neural de resposta a perguntas baseado em tabelas semiestruturadas', 'es': 'Un modelo de respuesta a preguntas neuronales basado en tablas semiestructuradas', 'fr': 'Un modèle neuronal de réponse aux questions basé sur des tableaux semi-structurés', 'ja': '半構造化表に基づく神経質問回答モデル', 'zh': '基于半结构化表之神经问答模形', 'hi': 'अर्ध-संरचित तालिकाओं के आधार पर एक तंत्रिका प्रश्न उत्तर मॉडल', 'ru': 'Модель ответов на нейронные вопросы на основе полуструктурированных таблиц', 'ga': 'Samhail Freagartha Ceist Néarach Bunaithe ar Táblaí Leathstruchtúrtha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα Νευρικό Μοντέλο Απάντησης Ερωτήσεων βασισμένο σε Ημιδομημένους Πίνακες', 'hu': 'Neurális kérdések megválaszolási modell félstrukturált táblázatok alapján', 'it': 'Un modello di risposta alle domande neurali basato su tabelle semistrutturate', 'kk': 'Жарты құрылған кестелерде негізделген нейрондық сұрақ жауап беру үлгісіName', 'lt': 'Neuralinio atsakymo į klausimus modelis, pagrįstas pusstruktūrinėmis lentelėmis', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Model Jawapan Pertanyaan Neural Berdasarkan Tab Semi-Struktur', 'mt': 'Mudell ta’ Tweġiba għal Mistoqsijiet Newrali bbażat fuq Tabelli Semi-Strutturati', 'ml': 'സെമി- സ്ട്രാക്ട്രിക്ട് ചെയ്ത ടേബുകളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ നെയൂറല്\u200d ചോദ്യം', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл асуулт хариултын загвар нь хагас бүтээгдэхүүн дээр үндсэн', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Model odpowiedzi na pytania neuronowe oparty na tabelach półstrukturalnych', 'ro': 'Un model de răspuns neural la întrebări bazat pe tabele semistructurate', 'sr': 'Model odgovora na neurone pitanja na osnovu polu strukturnih tablica', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Neural Question answers Model based on Semi-structured Tables', 'sv': 'En neutral frågesvarsmodell baserad på semistrukturerade tabeller', 'ta': 'பாதி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அட்டவணைகளை அடிப்படையில் அடிப்படையிலான ஒரு புதிய கேள்வி கேட்கை', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mô hình Trả lời câu hỏi thần kinh, dựa trên mô hình bán được cấu trúc', 'hr': 'Model odgovora na Neuralno pitanje temeljen na polu strukturnim tablicama', 'nl': 'Een neuronaal vragenbeantwoordingsmodel gebaseerd op semi-gestructureerde tabellen', 'bg': 'Модел за отговор на невронни въпроси въз основа на полуструктурирани таблици', 'da': 'En neural spørgsmål besvarelsesmodel baseret på halvstrukturerede tabeller', 'de': 'Ein Modell zur Beantwortung neuronaler Fragen basierend auf halbstrukturierten Tabellen', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Model Jawab Pertanyaan Neural Berdasarkan Tabel Semi-Struktur', 'ko': '반구조화표에 기초한 신경 문답 모형', 'tr': 'Neral sorag jogap nusgasy', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Swali la msingi la kujibu Model Based on Miundo Mijini Mijingo', 'sq': 'Një model i përgjigjes për pyetje neurone bazuar në tabela gjysmë-strukturuar', 'am': 'ጥያቄ', 'az': 'YarńĪ-YapńĪlmńĪŇü S…ôf…ôl…ôr…ô dayanan N√∂ral Soru Cevap Modeli', 'bn': 'Semi-constructed টেবিলের উপর ভিত্তিতে নিউরেল প্রশ্নের উত্তর মোডেল', 'hy': 'Նյարդային հարցերին պատասխանող մոդել, հիմնված կիսակառուցված աղյուսակների վրա', 'ca': 'Un model de resposta neuronal a preguntes basat en taules semiestructurats', 'bs': 'Model odgovora na Neuralno pitanje temeljen na polu strukturnim tablicama', 'cs': 'Model zodpovězení neurálních otázek založený na polostrukturovaných tabulkách', 'et': 'Neuraalne küsimustele vastamise mudel, mis põhineb poolstruktureeritud tabelitel', 'fi': 'Puolirakenteisiin taulukoihin perustuva hermovastausmalli', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Model odgovarjanja na živčna vprašanja, ki temelji na polostrukturiranih tabelah', 'ha': 'A Neural Question Answering Model Based on Semi-Structured Tables', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'ནུས་མཐུན་བཟོས་པའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་སྐྱེས་པའི་འདྲི་ཚུལ་ལན་གསལ་བའི་རྣམ་པ'}
{'en': 'Most question answering (QA) systems are based on raw text and structured knowledge graph. However, raw text corpora are hard for QA system to understand, and structured knowledge graph needs intensive manual work, while it is relatively easy to obtain semi-structured tables from many sources directly, or build them automatically. In this paper, we build an end-to-end system to answer multiple choice questions with semi-structured tables as its knowledge. Our system answers queries by two steps. First, it finds the most similar tables. Then the system measures the relevance between each question and candidate table cells, and choose the most related cell as the source of answer. The system is evaluated with TabMCQ dataset, and gets a huge improvement compared to the state of the art.', 'ar': 'تعتمد معظم أنظمة الإجابة على الأسئلة (QA) على النص الخام والرسم البياني المعرفي المنظم. ومع ذلك ، يصعب على نظام ضمان الجودة فهم النص الأساسي للمجموعة ، ويحتاج الرسم البياني للمعرفة المهيكلة إلى عمل يدوي مكثف ، في حين أنه من السهل نسبيًا الحصول على جداول شبه منظمة من العديد من المصادر مباشرة ، أو بناؤها تلقائيًا. في هذه الورقة ، نبني نظامًا شاملاً للإجابة على أسئلة الاختيار من متعدد باستخدام الجداول شبه المنظمة كمعرفتها. يجيب نظامنا على الاستفسارات بخطوتين. أولاً ، يجد الجداول الأكثر تشابهًا. ثم يقيس النظام مدى الصلة بين كل سؤال وخلايا جدول مرشح ، واختيار الخلية الأكثر ارتباطًا كمصدر للإجابة. يتم تقييم النظام باستخدام مجموعة بيانات TabMCQ ، ويحصل على تحسن كبير مقارنة بأحدث ما توصلت إليه التقنية.', 'fr': "La plupart des systèmes de réponse aux questions (AQ) sont basés sur du texte brut et un graphe de connaissances structuré. Cependant, les corpus de texte brut sont difficiles à comprendre pour le système d'assurance qualité, et les graphes de connaissances structurés nécessitent un travail manuel intensif, alors qu'il est relativement facile d'obtenir des tableaux semi-structurés directement à partir de nombreuses sources, ou de les créer automatiquement. Dans cet article, nous construisons un système de bout en bout pour répondre à des questions à choix multiples avec des tableaux semi-structurés comme connaissance. Notre système répond aux questions en deux étapes. Tout d'abord, il trouve les tables les plus similaires. Le système mesure ensuite la pertinence entre chaque question et les cellules du tableau candidat, et choisit la cellule la plus proche comme source de réponse. Le système est évalué avec l'ensemble de données TabMCQ et obtient une amélioration considérable par rapport à l'état de l'art.", 'es': 'La mayoría de los sistemas de respuesta a preguntas (QA) se basan en texto sin procesar y gráficos de conocimiento estructurados Sin embargo, los corpus de texto sin procesar son difíciles de entender para el sistema de control de calidad, y el gráfico de conocimiento estructurado requiere un trabajo manual intensivo, mientras que es relativamente fácil obtener tablas semiestructuradas de muchas fuentes directamente o crearlas automáticamente. En este artículo, creamos un sistema integral para responder preguntas de opción múltiple con tablas semiestructuradas como su conocimiento. Nuestro sistema responde a las consultas en dos pasos. En primer lugar, encuentra las tablas más similares. A continuación, el sistema mide la relevancia entre cada pregunta y las celdas de la tabla candidata, y elige la celda más relacionada como fuente de respuesta. El sistema se evalúa con el conjunto de datos TabMcq y obtiene una mejora enorme en comparación con el estado de la técnica.', 'pt': 'A maioria dos sistemas de resposta a perguntas (QA) são baseados em texto bruto e gráfico de conhecimento estruturado. No entanto, os corpora de texto bruto são difíceis de entender para o sistema de controle de qualidade, e o gráfico de conhecimento estruturado precisa de trabalho manual intensivo, enquanto é relativamente fácil obter tabelas semiestruturadas diretamente de muitas fontes ou construí-las automaticamente. Neste artigo, construímos um sistema de ponta a ponta para responder questões de múltipla escolha com tabelas semiestruturadas como seu conhecimento. Nosso sistema responde às consultas em duas etapas. Primeiro, ele encontra as tabelas mais semelhantes. Em seguida, o sistema mede a relevância entre cada pergunta e as células da tabela candidata e escolhe a célula mais relacionada como fonte de resposta. O sistema é avaliado com o conjunto de dados TabMCQ e obtém uma grande melhoria em relação ao estado da arte.', 'ja': 'ほとんどの質問回答（ QA ）システムは、生のテキストと構造化された知識グラフに基づいています。しかしながら、生テキストのコーパスはQAシステムにとってわかりにくく、構造化ナレッジグラフは手作業で集中的に作業する必要がある一方で、多くのソースから直接半構造化テーブルを入手したり、自動的に構築したりするのは比較的容易である。本稿では，半構造化表を知識として多肢選択問題に答えるためのエンドツーエンドのシステムを構築する．当社のシステムは、2つのステップでクエリに回答します。まず、最も類似した表が見つかります。次に、システムは各質問と候補テーブルセルの間の関連性を測定し、最も関連性の高いセルを回答元として選択します。システムは、TabMCQデータセットで評価され、最新技術と比較して大幅に改善されます。', 'zh': '多问答(QA)统皆本结构化知图谱。 然本语料库于QA统为难解,结构化知图谱须多工作,而径取半结构化表或自构之易。 于本文中,构一端到端系统,以半结构化表格为之对选择题。 我们的系统因两个步驿答问。 先得最相似之表。 然后统量表格单元格之相关性,择其最关者单元格以为对案之原。 当统用TabMCQ数集评估,与今术比得巨改。', 'hi': 'अधिकांश प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) सिस्टम कच्चे पाठ और संरचित ज्ञान ग्राफ पर आधारित हैं। हालांकि, क्यूए सिस्टम को समझने के लिए कच्चे पाठ निगम कठिन हैं, और संरचित ज्ञान ग्राफ को गहन मैनुअल काम की आवश्यकता होती है, जबकि कई स्रोतों से सीधे अर्ध-संरचित तालिकाओं को प्राप्त करना या उन्हें स्वचालित रूप से बनाना अपेक्षाकृत आसान है। इस पेपर में, हम अपने ज्ञान के रूप में अर्ध-संरचित तालिकाओं के साथ कई विकल्प प्रश्नों के उत्तर देने के लिए एक एंड-टू-एंड सिस्टम बनाते हैं। हमारा सिस्टम दो चरणों से प्रश्नों का उत्तर देता है। सबसे पहले, यह सबसे समान तालिकाओं को पाता है। फिर सिस्टम प्रत्येक प्रश्न और उम्मीदवार तालिका कोशिकाओं के बीच प्रासंगिकता को मापता है, और उत्तर के स्रोत के रूप में सबसे संबंधित सेल का चयन करता है। सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन TabMCQ डेटासेट के साथ किया जाता है, और कला की स्थिति की तुलना में एक बड़ा सुधार होता है।', 'ru': 'Большинство систем ответов на вопросы (QA) основаны на необработанном тексте и структурированном графике знаний. Тем не менее, необработанные текстовые корпуса трудно понять для системы QA, и структурированный граф знаний требует интенсивной ручной работы, в то время как относительно легко получить полуструктурированные таблицы из многих источников напрямую или построить их автоматически. В этой статье мы создаем комплексную систему для ответов на вопросы с множественным выбором, используя полуструктурированные таблицы в качестве своих знаний. Наша система отвечает на запросы в два шага. Во-первых, он находит самые похожие таблицы. Затем система измеряет релевантность между каждым вопросом и ячейками таблицы кандидатов и выбирает наиболее связанную ячейку в качестве источника ответа. Система оценивается с помощью набора данных TabMCQ и получает огромное улучшение по сравнению с современным уровнем техники.', 'ga': 'Tá formhór na gcóras freagartha ceisteanna (QA) bunaithe ar théacs amh agus graf eolais struchtúrtha. Mar sin féin, tá sé deacair do chóras QA a thuiscint go bhfuil corpas téacs amh, agus tá gá le hobair láimhe dian ar ghraf eolais struchtúrtha, cé go bhfuil sé sách éasca táblaí leath-struchtúrtha a fháil ó go leor foinsí go díreach, nó iad a thógáil go huathoibríoch. Sa pháipéar seo, tógaimid córas ceann go ceann chun ceisteanna ilroghnacha a fhreagairt le táblaí leath-struchtúrtha mar a chuid eolais. Freagraíonn ár gcóras fiosruithe trí dhá chéim. Ar dtús, aimsíonn sé na táblaí is cosúla. Ansin tomhaiseann an córas an ábharthacht idir gach ceist agus cealla tábla iarrthóra, agus roghnaíonn sé an chill is gaolmhaire mar fhoinse an fhreagra. Déantar an córas a mheas le tacar sonraí TabMCQ, agus faigheann sé feabhas ollmhór i gcomparáid leis an úrscothacht.', 'el': 'Τα περισσότερα συστήματα απάντησης ερωτήσεων (QA) βασίζονται σε ακατέργαστο κείμενο και δομημένο γράφημα γνώσης. Ωστόσο, τα σώματα ακατέργαστου κειμένου είναι δύσκολο να κατανοήσουν το σύστημα QA και το δομημένο γράφημα γνώσης απαιτεί εντατική χειρωνακτική εργασία, ενώ είναι σχετικά εύκολο να αποκτήσετε ημιδομημένους πίνακες από πολλές πηγές απευθείας, ή να τους δημιουργήσετε αυτόματα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, χτίζουμε ένα ολοκληρωμένο σύστημα για να απαντήσουμε σε ερωτήσεις πολλαπλής επιλογής με ημιδομημένους πίνακες ως γνώση του. Το σύστημά μας απαντά σε ερωτήματα με δύο βήματα. Πρώτον, βρίσκει τους πιο όμοιους πίνακες. Στη συνέχεια, το σύστημα μετρά τη συνάφεια μεταξύ κάθε ερωτήματος και κελιών υποψήφιου πίνακα και επιλέγει το πιο σχετικό κελί ως πηγή απάντησης. Το σύστημα αξιολογείται με το σύνολο δεδομένων και παίρνει μια τεράστια βελτίωση σε σύγκριση με την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας.', 'hu': 'A legtöbb kérdésre válaszoló rendszer nyers szövegen és strukturált tudásdiagramon alapul. A nyers szöveges korpuszokat azonban nehéz megérteni a minőségbiztosítási rendszer számára, és a strukturált tudásdiagramot intenzív manuális munkát igényel, míg viszonylag könnyű közvetlenül számos forrásból beszerezni félstrukturált táblákat, vagy automatikusan felépíteni őket. Ebben a tanulmányban egy end-to-end rendszert építünk ki, amely többválasztási kérdésekre válaszol, félstrukturált táblázatokkal, mint tudása. A rendszerünk két lépéssel válaszol a kérdésekre. Először is megtalálja a leghasonlóbb asztalokat. Ezután a rendszer méri az egyes kérdések és a jelölt táblázatcellák relevanciáját, és válaszforrásként válassza ki a legkapcsolódóbb cellát. A rendszert TabMCQ adatkészlettel értékeljük, és hatalmas javulást ér el a technika állapotához képest.', 'ka': 'უფრო მეტი კითხვების პასუხი (QA) სისტემები მხარე ტექსტის და სტრუქტურული ცნობილის გრაფიკზე დაბაზიან. თუმცა, QA სისტემისტის კოპორა ძალიან რთული იყო, და სტრუქტურაციული მეცნიერების გრაფიკაში ინტერნექტიური ხელსაწყოთა სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო ცნობილის სამუშაო მუშაო ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ შევქმნით ბოლოდან დასრულებული სისტემა, როგორც მისი ცნობიერება უფრო რაოდენობით გადასრულებული კითხვებით. ჩვენი სისტემის შესაძლებლობა ორი ნაგულისხმებით დაკითხვა. პირველად, ის აღმოიძებნა ყველაზე მსგავსი მაგილები. შემდეგ სისტემის შესახებ ყველა კითხვა და კანდიდენტის ცხოვრების შორის მნიშვნელობის შესახებ და აირჩიეთ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ცხოვრები, როგორც სა სისტემა TabMCQ მონაცემების შესახებ გაუმუშავება და იქნება დიდი გაუმუშავება ხელსაწყოთან.', 'lt': 'Dauguma klausimų atsakymo sistemų grindžiama žaliaviniu tekstu ir struktūrizuota žinių grafika. Vis dėlto QA sistemai sunku suprasti žaliavinio teksto korprą, o struktūruotai žinių grafikai reikia intensyvaus rankinio darbo, o iš daugelio šaltinių gana lengva tiesiogiai gauti pusstruktūruotas lenteles arba pastatyti jas automatiškai. Šiame dokumente mes sukuriame visą sistemą, kad atsakytume į kelis pasirinkimo klausimus pusstruktūrizuotomis lentelėmis kaip jos žinias. Mūsų sistema atsako į klausimus dviem žingsniais. Pirma, jame yra panašios lentelės. Tada sistema matuoja kiekvieno klausimo ir kandidatų lentelių langelių svarbą ir pasirinkia labiausiai susijusią langelę kaip atsakymo šaltinį. Sistema vertinama naudojant TabMCQ duomenų rinkinį ir ji gerokai pagerėja, palyginti su naujausia.', 'it': "La maggior parte dei sistemi di risposta alle domande (QA) si basano su testo grezzo e grafico strutturato della conoscenza. Tuttavia, i corpora di testo grezzo sono difficili da capire per il sistema QA, e il grafico della conoscenza strutturato richiede un intenso lavoro manuale, mentre è relativamente facile ottenere tabelle semi-strutturate direttamente da molte fonti, o costruirle automaticamente. In questo articolo, costruiamo un sistema end-to-end per rispondere a domande a risposta multipla con tabelle semi-strutturate come sua conoscenza. Il nostro sistema risponde alle domande in due fasi. In primo luogo, trova le tabelle più simili. Quindi il sistema misura la rilevanza tra ogni domanda e celle della tabella candidata e sceglie la cella più correlata come fonte di risposta. Il sistema viene valutato con il dataset TabMCQ e ottiene un enorme miglioramento rispetto allo stato dell'arte.", 'mk': 'Повеќето системи на одговори на прашања (QA) се базирани на суров текст и структуриран граф на знаење. Сепак, суровиот текст корпора е тешко за системот QA да го разбере, а структурираниот знање граф има потреба од интензивна рачна работа, додека е релативно лесно да се добијат поластруктурирани табели од многу извори директно, или да се изградат автоматски. In this paper, we build an end-to-end system to answer multiple choice questions with semi-structured tables as its knowledge.  Нашиот систем одговара на прашањата по два чекори. Прво, ги најде најсличните маси. Потоа системот ја мери релевантноста помеѓу секое прашање и клетките на кандидатската маса, и избере ја најповрзаната клетка како извор на одговор. The system is evaluated with TabMCQ dataset, and gets a huge improvement compared to the state of the art.', 'kk': 'Сұрақ жауап беру (QA) жүйелерінің көпшілігі мәтін мен құрылған білім графикасына негізделген. Бірақ QA жүйесіне түсіну үшін жұмыс мәтін корпорасы қиын, және құрылған білім графикасының көпшілікті көпшілікті көпшіліктен жарты құрылған кестелерді түсіну немесе автоматты түрде құру үшін Бұл қағазда білім ретінде бірнеше таңдау сұрақтарына жауап беру үшін аяқтау жүйесін құрамыз. Жүйеміз екі қадам сұрақтарды жауап береді. Біріншіден, ол ең ұқсас кестелерді табу. Содан кейін жүйе әрбір сұрақ мен кандидаты кесте ұяшықтарының маңыздылығын өзгертіп, ең жауап көзі ретінде бар ұяшықтарды таңдаңыз. Бұл жүйе TabMCQ деректер жиынымен бағалады, және суреттің күйіне салыстырылған үлкен жақсарту үшін.', 'ms': 'Most question answering (QA) systems are based on raw text and structured knowledge graph.  Namun, korpra teks mentah sukar untuk sistem QA untuk memahami, dan graf pengetahuan struktur memerlukan kerja manual yang intens, sementara ia relatif mudah untuk mendapatkan jadual setengah struktur dari banyak sumber secara langsung, atau membinanya secara automatik. Dalam kertas ini, kita membina sistem akhir-akhir untuk menjawab soalan pilihan berbilang dengan jadual setengah struktur sebagai pengetahuannya. Sistem kita menjawab pertanyaan dengan dua langkah. Pertama, ia mencari jadual yang paling serupa. Kemudian sistem mengukur relevansi antara setiap soalan dan sel jadual calon, dan pilih sel yang paling berkaitan sebagai sumber jawapan. Sistem diteliti dengan set data TabMCQ, dan mendapat peningkatan besar dibandingkan dengan keadaan seni.', 'ml': 'ഏറ്റവും പേരും ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നത് (ക്യൂഎ) സിസ്റ്റമുണ്ട് വൃത്തികെട്ട പദാവലിയിലും പരിജ്ഞാന ഗ എന്നാലും ക്യൂഎ സിസ്റ്റം മനസ്സിലാക്കാന്\u200d തകര്\u200dത്ത പദാവലിയുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുണ്ട്. ക്രമീകരിച്ച അറിവുകളുടെ ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് ആവശ്യമുള്ള ഉള്ള കൈ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു അവസാന സിസ്റ്റം പണിയുന്നു. ഒരുപാട് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d വേ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് രണ്ടു ചുവട്ടില്\u200d ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ആദ്യം, അത് ഏറ്റവും പോലുള്ള ടേബിളുകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തും. പിന്നെ ഓരോ ചോദ്യത്തിനും പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ടേബിള്\u200d സെല്ലുകള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധം സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് നിര്\u200dണയി ടാബ്എംസിക്യൂ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റുമായി സിസ്റ്റം വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, കലാകാര്യ സ്ഥിതിയോട് ത', 'mt': 'Il-biċċa l-kbira tas-sistemi li jwieġbu għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) huma bbażati fuq test mhux ipproċessat u grafika tal-għarfien strutturat. Madankollu, il-korpra tat-test mhux ipproċessat hija diffiċli biex is-sistema QA tifhem, u l-graff tal-għarfien strutturat jeħtieġ xogħol manwali intensiv, filwaqt li huwa relattivament faċli li jinkisbu tabelli semistrutturati minn ħafna sorsi direttament, jew jinbnewhom awtomatikament. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nibnu sistema minn tarf sa tarf biex nwieġbu mistoqsijiet ta’ għażla multipla b’tabelli semistrutturati bħala l-għarfien tagħha. Is-sistema tagħna twieġeb għal mistoqsijiet b’żewġ passi. L-ewwel nett, isib l-aktar tabelli simili. Then the system measures the relevance between each question and candidate table cells, and choose the most related cell as the source of answer.  Is-sistema hija evalwata b’sett ta’ dejta TabMCQ, u tikseb titjib enormi meta mqabbel mal-a ħħar avvanzati.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх асуултуудын хариулт (QA) систем нь цэвэр текст, бүтэц мэдлэг график дээр суурилсан. Гэхдээ QA системийг ойлгоход хэцүү мөн бүтээгдэхүүний график нь хүчирхэг гарын ажил хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ хагас бүтээгдэхүүний ширээ олон эх үүсвэрээс шууд автоматжуулахад, эсвэл автоматжуулахад маш амархан байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон сонголтын асуултуудыг хагас бүтээгдэхүүний мэдлэг гэж хариулах зорилготой системийг бүтээж байна. Бидний систем хоёр алхам дээр квадратуудыг хариулж байна. Эхлээд энэ нь хамгийн төстэй хүснэгт олж байна. Дараа нь систем асуулт болон хүснэгт эсийн хооронд хамгийн холбоотой эсийг хариултын эх үүсвэр гэж сонгож байна. Систем нь TabMCQ өгөгдлийн сангийн багтаагаар үнэлдэг. Урлагийн байдалтай харьцуулахад маш их сайжруулагддаг.', 'pl': 'Większość systemów odpowiedzi na pytania (QA) opiera się na surowym tekście i strukturalnym wykresie wiedzy. Jednak korpusy tekstu surowego są trudne do zrozumienia dla systemu QA, a ustrukturyzowany wykres wiedzy wymaga intensywnej pracy ręcznej, podczas gdy stosunkowo łatwo jest uzyskać półustrukturyzowane tabele bezpośrednio z wielu źródeł lub zbudować je automatycznie. W niniejszym artykule budujemy kompleksowy system odpowiedzi na pytania wielokrotnego wyboru z półstrukturalnymi tabelami jako wiedzą. Nasz system odpowiada na pytania w dwóch etapach. Po pierwsze, znajduje najbardziej podobne tabele. Następnie system mierzy znaczenie między każdym pytaniem a komórkami tabeli kandydatów i wybiera komórkę najbardziej powiązaną jako źródło odpowiedzi. System jest oceniany za pomocą zestawu danych TabMCQ i uzyskuje ogromną poprawę w porównaniu do stanu techniki.', 'ro': 'Majoritatea sistemelor de răspuns la întrebări (QA) se bazează pe text brut și grafic de cunoștințe structurate. Cu toate acestea, corpurile de text brut sunt greu de înțeles pentru sistemul QA, iar graficul cunoștințelor structurate necesită o muncă manuală intensivă, în timp ce este relativ ușor să obțineți tabele semi-structurate direct din multe surse sau să le construiți automat. În această lucrare, construim un sistem end-to-end pentru a răspunde la întrebări cu răspuns multiplu cu tabele semi-structurate ca cunoștințe. Sistemul nostru răspunde la întrebări prin doi pași. În primul rând, găsește cele mai similare tabele. Apoi, sistemul măsoară relevanța dintre fiecare întrebare și celulele tabelului candidat și alege celula cea mai asociată ca sursă de răspuns. Sistemul este evaluat cu setul de date TabMCQ și obține o îmbunătățire uriașă în comparație cu stadiul tehnologiei.', 'sr': 'Većina odgovora na pitanja (QA) su zasnovana na grafu sirovog teksta i strukturiranog znanja. Međutim, sirov tekst korpora je teško za QA sistem razumeti, a strukturirani grafik znanja treba intenzivni ručni rad, dok je relativno lako dobiti polu strukturirane stolove iz mnogih izvora direktno ili ih sagraditi automatski. U ovom papiru, izgradili smo sistem kraja do kraja da odgovorimo na više izbornih pitanja sa polu-strukturovanim stolovima kao njegovo znanje. Naš sistem odgovara na pitanja dva koraka. Prvo, naðe najsliènije stolove. Zatim sistem mjeri relevantnost između svakog pitanja i kandidatnih stolnih ćelija i izaberi najpovezaniju ćeliju kao izvor odgovora. Sistem se procjenjuje sa setom podataka TabMCQ-a i dobija ogromno poboljšanje u usporedbi sa stanjem umjetnosti.', 'no': 'Dei fleste spørsmålsystemene for svaring (QA) er basert på råtekst og strukturert kunnskapsgraf. Dette er imidlertid vanskeleg for QA-systemet å forstå, og strukturert kunnskapsgraf treng intensivt manuelarbeid, mens det er relativt lett å få halvstrukturerte tabeller frå mange kjelder direkte, eller bygge dei automatisk. I denne papiret bygger vi eit sluttsystem for å svara på fleire val spørsmål med halvstrukturerte tabeller som denne kunnskapen. Systemet vårt svarar på spørjingar med to steg. Først finn han dei mest liknande tabellene. Så målar systemet relevantet mellom kvar spørsmål og kandidattabeller, og velje den mest relaterte cellen som kjelden for svar. Systemet blir evaluert med tabMCQ- dataset, og får ein stor forbedring samanlikna med kunststanden.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර (QA) පද්ධතිය පිළිබඳ සහ සංවිධානය ග්\u200dරාෆ් වල අධාරණය කරනවා. නමුත්, QA පද්ධතිය තේරුම් ගන්න අමාරුයි, සහ සංවිධානය ග්\u200dරාෆ් විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත වැඩක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න, සමාන්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයා මේ පත්තරයේ අපි අවසාන පද්ධතියක් හදන්නේ වෙනස් තෝරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් විතරයි. මුලින්ම, ඒක හොයාගන්නවා තරම් වගේ මේස් වල. පද්ධතිය හැම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම සම්බන්ධතාවක් අතර විශේෂය අත පද්ධතිය ටැබ්ම්ක්කු දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒ වගේම විශාල ස්ථානය සමඟ විශාල විශාලනයක', 'so': "Isticmaalka jawaabta su'aalaha badankood (QA) waxay ku saleysan yihiin sawir bur ah iyo sawir aqoonta la dhisay. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shirkadda qoraalka ee qurxoon waa u adag tahay in ay ku fahanto nidaamka QA, oo ay sawiraadka aqoonta dhisan u baahan yihiin shaqo aad u badan, iyadoo ay u fudud tahay in looxyo sawir ah laga helo meelo laga dhisay si toos ah ama ay u dhisto si rasmi ah. Warqaddan waxaan ku dhisaynaa nidaam dhammaadka ugu dambaysta ah si aan ugu jawaabno su'aalo doorasho badan oo looxyo la qoray looxyo si aqoontiisa ah. nidaamkayagu wuxuu ugu jawaabaa su'aalaha laba tallaabo. Marka ugu horeysa, wuxuu helaa miisaska ugu mid ah Markaas nidaamka wuxuu qiyaasaa xiriirka u dhexeeya su'aal kasta iyo cellaha miiska oo kandida ah, wuxuuna doortaa cellaha ugu wada saabsan si ay ugu timaado jawaabta. nidaamka waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa qoraalka macluumaadka TabMCQ, wuxuuna helaa hagaajin aad u weyn oo la barbaranayo xaalada farshaxanka.", 'sv': 'De flesta frågeställningssystem är baserade på råtext och strukturerad kunskapsgraf. Men råtextkorpor är svåra för QA-systemet att förstå, och strukturerad kunskapsgraf kräver intensivt manuellt arbete, medan det är relativt lätt att få semistrukturerade tabeller från många källor direkt, eller bygga dem automatiskt. I denna uppsats bygger vi ett end-to-end system för att besvara flervalsfrågor med semistrukturerade tabeller som kunskap. Vårt system svarar på frågor i två steg. För det första hittar den de mest liknande tabellerna. Sedan mäter systemet relevansen mellan varje fråga och kandidattabellceller och väljer den mest relaterade cellen som svarskälla. Systemet utvärderas med TabMCQ dataset, och får en enorm förbättring jämfört med den senaste tekniken.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான கேள்வி பதில் (QA) அமைப்புகள் குறைந்த உரையை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளது மற்றும் அமைத்த அறிவு வரைபடம ஆனால், குறுக்கு உரை நிறுவனம் QA முறைமையை புரிந்து கொள்ள கடினமாக இருக்கிறது, உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அறிவு வரைப்படம் தேவைப்படுகிறது, மற்றும் அது பல மூலங்களிலிருந்த இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முடிவு முடிவு அமைப்பை உருவாக்கி பல தேர்வுகளின் கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் கொடுக்கிறோம்  Our system answers queries by two steps.  முதலில், அது போன்ற அட்டவணைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கும். பின்னர் ஒவ்வொரு கேள்வி மற்றும் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட அட்டவணை செல்களுக்கும் இடையில் தொடர்பை அமைப்பு எடுத்து விட Name', 'ur': 'اکثر سؤال جواب دینے والے (QA) سیستموں کو روئی ٹیکسٹ اور ساختہ علم گراف پر بنیاد ہے. However, raw text corpora is hard for QA system to understand, and structured knowledge graph needs intensive manual work, while it is relatively easy to get half-structured tables from many sources directly, or build them automatically. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک آخر-آخر سیستم بنایا ہے کہ اس کے علم کے ساتھ بہت سی انتخاب سوال جواب دیں۔ ہمارا سیستم دو قدم سے جواب دیتا ہے۔ پہلے یہ سب سے زیادہ مشابہ ٹیبل پاتا ہے۔ پھر سیسٹم ہر سوال اور کاندینڈیٹ ٹیبل سلول کے درمیان اضافہ کا اندازہ کرتا ہے اور سب سے زیادہ رابطہ دار سلول کو جواب کے منبع بنا کر انتخاب کرتا ہے. سیسٹم ٹاکمک کیو ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ ارزش کیا جاتا ہے، اور هنر کی حالت کے مقابلہ میں بہت بڑی سوداگری حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "@ info Lekin, qizil matn kompaniyasi QA tizimini tushunish uchun qiyin, va ta'minlovchi grafikni tasdiqlash uchun juda katta qoʻllanmalar kerak. Aks holda, ko'pchilik manbanlardan qayta qo'llangan jadvallarni to ʻgʻri olish yoki ularni avtomatik yaratish juda oson. Bu qogʻozda, biz bir necha tanlash savollariga javob beramiz. Qancha qancha qismi tuzilgan jadvallar bilan o'rganish uchun. Bizning tizimmiz ikki qadam soʻrovlariga javob beradi. Birinchi, u ko'proq bir xil jadvallarni topadi. Keyin tizim har bir savol va kandidan jadvalning orasidagi muhimlikni oʻzgartiradi, va eng bogʻ'liq katakni javob qilish uchun tanlang. Name", 'vi': 'Hầu hết các hệ thống trả lời câu hỏi (QA) được dựa trên văn bản thô và đồ thị kiến thức được cấu trúc. Tuy nhiên, cơ bản là khó hiểu đối với hệ thống QA, và đồ thị kiến thức được cấu trúc cần phải làm việc bằng tay, trong khi nó tương đối dễ dàng lấy trực tiếp bảng phân cấu trúc từ nhiều nguồn, hoặc tự động xây dựng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi xây dựng một hệ thống kết thúc để trả lời các câu hỏi lựa chọn đa số bằng các bàn Sắp xếp theo cách nó hiểu biết. Hệ thống của chúng tôi giải đáp các câu hỏi bằng hai bước. Đầu tiên, nó tìm thấy những chiếc bàn giống nhau nhất. Sau đó, hệ thống đo đạc sự liên quan giữa mỗi câu hỏi và các tế bào biểu đồ ứng cử viên, và chọn các tế bào liên quan nhất là nguồn trả lời. Hệ thống được đánh giá bằng bộ dữ liệu của TabMCQ, và nhận được một sự tiến bộ lớn so với trạng thái nghệ thuật.', 'da': 'De fleste spørgsmål besvarelse (QA) systemer er baseret på rå tekst og struktureret vidensgraf. Imidlertid er råtekstkorpora svære for QA-systemet at forstå, og struktureret vidensgraf kræver intensivt manuelt arbejde, mens det er relativt let at få semi-strukturerede tabeller direkte fra mange kilder, eller bygge dem automatisk. I denne artikel bygger vi et end-to-end system til at besvare spørgsmål med flere valgmuligheder med semi-strukturerede tabeller som viden. Vores system besvarer spørgsmål med to trin. For det første finder den de mest lignende tabeller. Derefter måler systemet relevansen mellem hvert spørgsmål og kandidattabelceller og vælger den mest relaterede celle som kilde til svaret. Systemet evalueres med TabMCQ datasæt, og får en enorm forbedring i forhold til den nyeste teknologi.', 'bg': 'Повечето системи за отговор на въпроси се основават на суров текст и структурирана графика на знанието. Въпреки това, суровите текстови корпуси са трудни за разбиране на системата за контрол на качеството, а структурираната графика на знанието изисква интензивна ръчна работа, докато е сравнително лесно да се получат полуструктурирани таблици директно от много източници или да се изградят автоматично. В настоящата статия ние изграждаме система от край до край за отговор на въпроси с многократен избор с полуструктурирани таблици като нейно знание. Нашата система отговаря на запитванията с две стъпки. Първо, тя намира най-подобни таблици. След това системата измерва релевантността между всеки въпрос и кандидат клетките на таблицата и изберете най-свързаната клетка като източник на отговор. Системата се оценява с набор от данни и получава огромно подобрение в сравнение със съвременните технологии.', 'hr': 'Većina sustava odgovora na pitanja (QA) temeljeni su na grafu sirovog teksta i strukturiranog znanja. Međutim, sirov tekst korpora je teško razumjeti sustav QA-a, a strukturirani grafik znanja treba intenzivni ručni rad, dok je relativno lako dobiti polu-strukturirane stolice iz mnogih izvora direktno ili ih sagraditi automatski. U ovom papiru izgradimo sustav kraja do kraja kako bi odgovorili na više pitanja izbora s polu-strukturovanim stolovima kao njegovo znanje. Naš sustav odgovara na pitanja dva koraka. Prvo pronalazi najsličnije stolove. Zatim sustav mjeri važnost između svakog pitanja i stanica kandidatnih stolica i izaberi najpovezanije stanice kao izvor odgovora. Sistem procjenjuje podatke TabMCQ-a i dobiva ogromno poboljšanje u usporedbi s stanjem umjetnosti.', 'nl': "De meeste vragen beantwoorden (QA) systemen zijn gebaseerd op ruwe tekst en gestructureerde kennisgrafiek. Echter, ruwe tekstcorpora's zijn moeilijk te begrijpen voor QA-systemen en gestructureerde kennisgrafieken vereisen intensief handmatig werk, terwijl het relatief eenvoudig is om semi-gestructureerde tabellen rechtstreeks uit vele bronnen te verkrijgen, of ze automatisch te bouwen. In deze paper bouwen we een end-to-end systeem om meerkeuzevragen te beantwoorden met semi-gestructureerde tabellen als kennis. Ons systeem beantwoordt vragen in twee stappen. Ten eerste vindt het de meest vergelijkbare tabellen. Vervolgens meet het systeem de relevantie tussen elke vraag- en kandidaattabel cellen en kiest de meest gerelateerde cel als bron van antwoord. Het systeem wordt geëvalueerd met TabMCQ dataset, en krijgt een enorme verbetering ten opzichte van de state of the art.", 'de': 'Die meisten Fragebeantworterungssysteme (QA) basieren auf Rohtext und strukturiertem Wissensdiagramm. Allerdings sind Rohtextkorpora für QA-Systeme schwer zu verstehen, und strukturierte Wissensgrafiken erfordern intensive manuelle Arbeit, während es relativ einfach ist, halbstrukturierte Tabellen aus vielen Quellen direkt zu erhalten oder automatisch zu erstellen. In diesem Beitrag bauen wir ein End-to-End-System auf, um Multiple-Choice-Fragen mit semistrukturierten Tabellen als Wissen zu beantworten. Unser System beantwortet Anfragen in zwei Schritten. Zunächst findet es die ähnlichsten Tabellen. Anschließend misst das System die Relevanz zwischen jeder Frage- und Kandidatentabelle und wählt die am häufigsten verwandte Zelle als Antwortquelle aus. Das System wird mit TabMCQ-Datensatz ausgewertet und erhält eine enorme Verbesserung gegenüber dem Stand der Technik.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan sistem menjawab pertanyaan (QA) berdasarkan teks mentah dan grafik pengetahuan strukturasi. Namun, corpora teks mentah sulit untuk sistem QA untuk memahami, dan grafik pengetahuan strukturasi membutuhkan pekerjaan manual yang intens, sementara relatif mudah untuk mendapatkan tabel semistrukturasi dari banyak sumber secara langsung, atau membangunnya secara otomatis. Dalam kertas ini, kami membangun sistem akhir-akhir untuk menjawab pertanyaan pilihan berbilang dengan tabel semi-struktur sebagai pengetahuannya. Sistem kita menjawab pertanyaan dengan dua langkah. First, it finds the most similar tables.  Kemudian sistem mengukur relevansi antara setiap pertanyaan dan sel meja kandidat, dan memilih sel yang paling terkait sebagai sumber jawaban. The system is evaluated with TabMCQ dataset, and gets a huge improvement compared to the state of the art.', 'fa': 'بیشترین سیستم\u200cهای پاسخ سوال (QA) بر اساس متن خالی و گراف علم ساخته شده\u200cاند. ولی شرکت متن خاصی برای فهمیدن سیستم QA سخت است، و گراف دانش ساخته شده به کار دستی زیادی نیاز دارد، در حالی که نسبتا راحت است که میز نیمه ساخته شده از بسیاری منابع مستقیم، یا خودکار ساخته شود. در این کاغذ، ما یک سیستم پایان و پایان ساختیم تا سوال چندین انتخاب را به عنوان دانش آن جواب دهیم. سیستم ما به دو قدم جواب می دهد. اول، میز\u200cهای مشابهی را پیدا می\u200cکند. سپس سیستم ارتباط بین هر سوال و سلول میز کاندیده را اندازه می دهد و سلول ارتباط ترین را به عنوان منبع جواب انتخاب می کند. سیستم با مجموعه داده\u200cهای TabMCQ ارزیابی می\u200cشود، و در مقایسه با وضعیت هنر بهبود بزرگی می\u200cگیرد.', 'tr': 'Iň köp soraglaryň jogaplary (QA) sistemalary setir metin we strukturly bilim grafisine daýanýar. Ýöne, çyz metin korporasy QA sistemasyna düşünmek üçin kyn, we strukturlary bilgi grafynyň ýokary el işi gerek, we ýarys-strukturlyk tabletleri birnäçe çeşmeden düzeden almak aňsat däldir, ýöne olary awtomatik taýýarlamak üçin ýeňil. Bu kagyzda, birnäçe saýlaw soraglary ýarym strukturly stollar bilen bilgi ýaly jogap bermek üçin soňunda bir sistema gurdyk. Sistemimiz iki adımda soraglary jogap berdi. Ilkinji gezek iň ýaly täzelikleri tapýar. Soňra sistem her soragy we kandidýa täblisaň hücreleriniň arasyndaky möhümliýeti öleýär we iň ýakynlaşyk hücresini cevabyň çeşmesi hökmünde saýlaýar. Sistem TabMCQ datawatlary bilen deňlendirilýär we sungatyň durumyna görä has uly gelişmeleri bar.', 'sw': 'Mifumo mingi ya majibu ya maswali (QA) inategemea maandishi mabaya na picha ya maarifa iliyotengenezwa. Hata hivyo, kampuni mbaya ya simu za mkononi ni vigumu kwa mfumo wa QA kuelewa, na ramani iliyotengenezwa ya ufahamu inahitaji kazi kubwa ya manufaa, wakati huo ni rahisi kupata meza zilizojengwa kwa sekondari kutoka vyanzo vingi vya moja kwa moja, au kujenga moja kwa moja. In this paper, we build an end-to-end system to answer multiple choice questions with semi-structured tables as its knowledge.  Mfumo wetu unajibu maswali kwa hatua mbili. Kwanza, inagundua meza zinazofanana zaidi. Kisha mfumo unachukua umuhimu kati ya kila swali na seli za mgombea, na kuchagua seli lenye uhusiano zaidi kama chanzo cha jibu. Mfumo unapitiwa na seti ya taarifa za TabMCQ, na unapata maendeleo makubwa ukilinganishwa na hali ya sanaa.', 'sq': 'Shumica e sistemeve që përgjigjen pyetjeve (QA) janë bazuar në tekst të papërpunuar dhe grafik të njohurive të strukturuar. Megjithatë, trupat e tekstit të papërpunuar janë të vështira për sistemin QA për të kuptuar, dhe grafiku i njohurive të strukturuara ka nevojë për punë intensive manuale, ndërsa është relativisht e lehtë të marrësh tabela gjysmë-strukturuara nga shumë burime drejtpërdrejt, ose të ndërtohen ato automatikisht. In this paper, we build an end-to-end system to answer multiple choice questions with semi-structured tables as its knowledge.  Sistemi ynë përgjigjet pyetjeve me dy hapa. Së pari, gjen tabelat më të ngjashme. Pastaj sistemi masa relevancën midis çdo pyetje dhe qelizave kandidate të tryezës, dhe zgjedh qeliza më të lidhura si burim përgjigje. Sistemi vlerësohet me tabMCQ dataset dhe merr një përmirësim të madh krahasuar me gjendjen e teknologjisë.', 'af': "Die meeste vraag antwoord (QA) stelsels is gebaseer op rooi teks en struktureerde kennis graf. Maar rooi teks korpora is moeilik vir QA stelsel om te verstaan, en struktureerde kennisgraaf het intensiewe handwerk nodig, terwyl dit is relativief maklik om semistruktureerde tabelle te kry van baie bronne direk, of dit automaties te bou. In hierdie papier bou ons 'n einde-na-einde stelsel om veelvuldige keuse vrae te antwoord met semistruktureerde tabelle as sy kennis. Ons stelsel antwoord vrae deur twee stappe. Eerste vind dit die mees gelykende tabelle. Dan maak die stelsel die relevansie tussen elke vraag en kandidate tabel selle, en kies die mees verwante sel as die bron van antwoord. Die stelsel is evalueer met TabMCQ datastel, en kry 'n groot verbetering vergelyk met die staat van die kuns.", 'am': 'ብዙ ጥያቄዎች መልስ (QA) ስርዓቶች ጥሩ ጽሑፎች እና እውቀት ቀለም በመሠረት ላይ ናቸው፡፡ ነገር ግን ጥሩ የጽሑፍ ኮፖርት የQA ስርዓት ለማስተዋል አካባቢ ነው፣ እውቀት ቀረፋ ለማስተዋል እና የተመሠረተ የጥልቅ ሥራ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የፍጻሜ መጨረሻ ሲስተም እናደርጋለን፡፡ የስርዓታችን ጥያቄዎችን በሁለት ደረጃዎች ይመልሳል፡፡ First, it finds the most similar tables.  ከዚያም በኋላ ሲስተምሩ በየጥያቄው እና የአካባቢው የሠንጠረዥ ክፍሎች መካከል ግንኙነትን ያስተካክላል፣ የተገኘውንም የክፍል ክፍል እንደ መልስ ምንጭ ምረጡ፡፡ ሲስተምሩን በTabMCQ ዳታ ማሰናከል እና በዓላማ ግንኙነት ትልቅ ማድረግ ያገኛል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հարցերին պատասխանելու համակարգերի մեծ մասը հիմնված է ոչ տեքստի և կառուցվածքային գիտելիքների գրաֆիկի վրա: However, raw text corpora are hard for QA system to understand, and structured knowledge graph needs intensive manual work, while it is relatively easy to obtain semi-structured tables from many sources directly, or build them automatically.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կառուցում ենք մի վերջ-վերջ համակարգ, որպեսզի պատասխանենք բազմաթիվ ընտրական հարցերին, կիսակառուցվածքային աղյուսակներով որպես գիտելիքներ: Մեր համակարգը պատասխանում է հարցերին երկու քայլերով: Նախ և առաջ, այն գտնում է ամենանման սեղանները: Հետո համակարգը չափում է յուրաքանչյուր հարց և թեկնածու աղյուսակի բջիջների կարևորությունը և ընտրում է ամենակապված բջիջը որպես պատասխանի աղբյուր: Համակարգը գնահատվում է TabMCQ տվյալների համակարգի միջոցով և ստանում է հսկայական զարգացում, համեմատած արվեստի վերաբերյալ:', 'az': 'Ən çox sual cavab verən (QA) sistemlərin səviyyə metinə və strukturlı bilgi grafına dayanılır. Lakin, QA sistemi anlamaq üçün çəkilmiş mətn korporası çətin və strukturlu bilgi grafının çox mənbələrdən yarı-strukturlı masalar almaq və ya onları avtomatik olaraq inşa etmək çox asandır. Bu kağızda, çoxlu seçim suallarını yarı-strukturlı masalar ilə bilgi olaraq cavab vermək üçün son-son sistemi inşa edirik. Sistemimiz iki adımla cavab verir. Əvvəlcə, bu ən bənzər masalar tapır. Sonra sistem hər sual ilə kandidát masa hücrelərinin arasındakı mövcudluğunu ölçür və ən yaxınlıq hücresini cevabın mənbəsi olaraq seçir. Sistem TabMCQ veri quruluğu ilə değerləşdirilir və sanatın durumu ilə qarşılaşdığı böyük bir xeyirləşdirilir.', 'bn': 'বেশীর ভাগ প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউএ) সিস্টেম ভিত্তিক টেক্সট এবং স্থাপনিত জ্ঞান গ্রাফের উপর ভিত্তিত। However, raw text corpora are hard for QA system to understand, and structured knowledge graph needs intensive manual work, while it is relatively easy to obtain semi-structured tables from many sources directly, or build them automatically.  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা শেষ পর্যন্ত একটি সিস্টেম তৈরি করি যাতে প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিতে পারি সেমি কাঠামো টেবিলের জ্ঞান হিসেবে  আমাদের সিস্টেম দুই পদক্ষেপে প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়। প্রথমত, এটা সবচেয়ে একই রকম টেবিল খুঁজে পায়। তারপর সিস্টেম প্রত্যেক প্রশ্ন এবং প্রার্থী টেবিল সেলের মধ্যে প্রার্থীতির প্রয়োজনীয়তা নির্ধারণ করে এবং উত্তরের উৎস হ ট্যাব এমসিকিউ ডাটাসেটের মাধ্যমে এই সিস্টেম মূল্য করা হয়েছে এবং শিল্পের অবস্থার তুলনায় বিশাল উন্নতি পেয়েছে।', 'bs': 'Većina odgovora na pitanja (QA) se temelja na grafu sirovog teksta i strukturiranog znanja. Međutim, sirov tekst korpora je teško za QA sistem razumjeti, a strukturirani grafik znanja treba intenzivni ručni rad, dok je relativno lako dobiti polu strukturirane stolice iz mnogih izvora direktno ili ih sagraditi automatski. U ovom papiru izgradimo sistem kraja do kraja kako bi odgovorili na više pitanja izbora sa polu-strukturovanim stolovima kao njegovo znanje. Naš sistem odgovara na pitanja dva koraka. Prvo, nađe najsličnije stolove. Zatim sistem mjeri važnost između svakog pitanja i ćelija kandidata za stol i izaberi najpovezaniju ćeliju kao izvor odgovora. Sistem se procjenjuje podacima TabMCQ-a i dobiva ogromno poboljšanje u usporedbi s stanjem umjetnosti.', 'ko': '대부분의 퀴즈 시스템은 원시 텍스트와 구조화된 지식도를 바탕으로 한다.그러나 원시 텍스트 자료 라이브러리는QA시스템에 있어 이해하기 어렵다. 구조화된 지식도는 대량의 수동적인 작업을 필요로 하고 여러 가지 출처에서 반구조화 표를 직접 얻거나 자동으로 반구조화 표를 구축하는 것은 상대적으로 쉽다.본고에서 우리는 반구조화된 표를 지식으로 삼아 여러 가지 선택 문제에 대답하는 시스템을 구축했다.우리 시스템은 두 단계로 나누어 문제에 대답한다.우선, 가장 비슷한 표를 찾을 것이다.그런 다음 각 질문과 후보 테이블 셀 간의 연관성을 측정하고 가장 연관된 셀을 답안 소스로 선택합니다.이 시스템은 TabMCQ 데이터 세트를 사용하여 평가를 진행하여 기존 기술에 비해 크게 개선되었다.', 'ca': "La majoria dels sistemes de resposta a preguntes (QA) es basen en text brut i gràfic de coneixement estructurat. Però els corpores de text brut són difícils d'entendre per al sistema QA, i el gràfic del coneixement estructurat necessita treball manual intensiv, mentre que és relativament fàcil obtindre taules semiestructurades de moltes fonts directament, o construir-les automàticament. En aquest article, construïm un sistema de final a final per respondre a preguntes múltiples d'elecció amb taules semiestructurats com el seu coneixement. Our system answers queries by two steps.  Primer, troba les taules més similars. Llavors el sistema mesura la pertinencia entre cada pregunta i cèl·lules de taula candidates, i escolli la cèl·lula més relacionada com a font de resposta. El sistema es valora amb el conjunt de dades TabMCQ, i obté una gran millora comparada amb l'última.", 'cs': 'Většina systémů odpovědi na otázky (QA) je založena na surovém textu a strukturovaném znalostním grafu. Nicméně surové textové korpusy jsou pro QA systém těžké porozumět a strukturovaný znalostní graf vyžaduje intenzivní ruční práci, zatímco je relativně snadné získat polostrukturované tabulky z mnoha zdrojů přímo nebo je sestavit automaticky. V tomto článku vytvoříme komplexní systém pro odpověď na otázky více výběru s polostrukturovanými tabulkami. Náš systém odpovídá na dotazy dvěma kroky. Za prvé, najde nejvíce podobné tabulky. Poté systém měří relevanci mezi jednotlivými buňkami otázky a kandidátskými buňkami tabulky a zvolí nejvíce související buňku jako zdroj odpovědi. Systém je hodnocen pomocí datové sady TabMCQ a dostává obrovské zlepšení ve srovnání se stavem techniky.', 'fi': 'Useimmat kysymyksenvastausjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､t perustuvat raakatekstiin ja strukturoituun tietokaavioon. Raakatekstikorporaatioita on kuitenkin vaikea ymmﾃ､rtﾃ､ﾃ､ laadunvarmistusjﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､llﾃ､, ja strukturoitu tietokaavio vaatii intensiivistﾃ､ manuaalista tyﾃｶtﾃ､, kun taas puolistrukturoidut taulukot on suhteellisen helppo hankkia suoraan monista lﾃ､hteistﾃ､ tai rakentaa ne automaattisesti. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ rakennamme end-to-end-jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､n monivalintakysymyksiin vastaamiseksi puolistrukturoiduilla taulukoilla. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､mme vastaa kyselyihin kahdessa vaiheessa. Ensin se lﾃｶytﾃ､ﾃ､ eniten samanlaisia taulukoita. Tﾃ､mﾃ､n jﾃ､lkeen jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ mittaa kunkin kysymyksen ja ehdokastaulukon solujen merkityksellisyyden ja valitsee vastauksen lﾃ､hteeksi eniten toisiinsa liittyvﾃ､ solu. Jﾃ､rjestelmﾃ､ﾃ､ arvioidaan TabMCQ-aineistolla, ja se saa valtavan parannuksen nykytekniikkaan verrattuna.', 'et': 'Enamik küsimustele vastamise süsteeme põhineb toortekstil ja struktureeritud teadmiste graafikul. Kuid toortekstkorporeid on kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemile raske mõista ja struktureeritud teadmiste graafik vajab intensiivset käsitsi tööd, samas kui poolstruktureeritud tabeleid on suhteliselt lihtne hankida paljudest allikatest otse või neid automaatselt ehitada. Käesolevas töös ehitame end-to-end süsteemi mitme valikuga küsimustele vastamiseks poolstruktureeritud tabelite abil. Meie süsteem vastab päringutele kahe sammu abil. Esiteks leiab ta kõige sarnasemad tabelid. Seejärel mõõdab süsteem iga küsimuse ja kandidaatriigi tabelilahtrite asjakohasust ning valib vastuse allikaks kõige seotud lahtri. Süsteemi hinnatakse TabMCQ andmekogumiga ja see saab võrreldes tehnika tasemega tohutult paremaks.', 'jv': 'Sugeng-suaraning sing pinggan (KA) sistem sing basa nang teks lan banjur structural navigation politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem end-to-end kanggo gantawak dhéwé sing nyimpen karo stampen sing wis ngerasakno. Sistem-sistem sing ngomong ujaran akèh iki bakal. Awak dhéwé, kabèh nèng ngomongke durung wektu. System Sistem kang dipatensi kanggo dataset TabXMq, lan padha akeh lanjut sing luwih apik karo perusahaan kanggo kaleh sans.', 'sk': 'Večina sistemov za odgovarjanje na vprašanja temelji na surovem besedilu in strukturiranem grafu znanja. Vendar pa je sistem za zagotavljanje kakovosti težko razumeti surove besedilne korpuse, strukturirani graf znanja pa zahteva intenzivno ročno delo, medtem ko je relativno enostavno pridobiti polstrukturirane tabele iz številnih virov neposredno ali jih samodejno graditi. V prispevku zgradimo celovit sistem za odgovore na vprašanja z več izbirami s polstrukturiranimi tabelami kot znanjem. Naš sistem odgovarja na vprašanja v dveh korakih. Najprej najde najbolj podobne tabele. Nato sistem meri ustreznost med vsakim vprašanjem in kandidatnimi celicami tabele in izbere najbolj povezano celico kot vir odgovora. Sistem je ocenjen z naborom podatkov TabMCQ in dobi veliko izboljšanje v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi.', 'ha': "Babu yawa masu karɓar wa masĩfa (QA) na'asar a kan matsayin raw da zane-zane da aka samar da. Amma, makampuni raw na matsayi sun yi nau'i ga ma'anar QA ya fahimta, kuma graphin da aka daidaita, yana da amfani da aikin aiki mai ƙaranci, kuma amma yana da sauƙi ga ka sami-saman da aka samar da shi daga manyan sourcen masu motsa ko ka gina su farat ɗaya. Ga wannan takardan, Munã samar da wata na'ura ta ƙara zuwa ƙarami dõmin Mu karɓa wa masu tambaya masu yawa da aka samar da zanen-sakan da aka samar da shi na ƙarami. Zuwa na'uranmu yana karɓa tambayar su sau biyu. Kayya, yana sãmu misalin misãlan. Sa'an nan, na tsari yana da muhimmada a tsakanin kowace tambaya da jama'a-zane-zane, kuma ya zãɓi mafi haɗi ga jama'a kamar manyan jabu. Ana ƙayyade system da aka daidaita database na TabMCQ, kuma ana sami wani gyare mai girma sami da halin kunyar.", 'he': 'Most question answering (QA) systems are based on raw text and structured knowledge graph.  בכל אופן, גופורה טקסט חום קשה למערכת QA להבין, וגרף הידע המבנה זקוק לעבודה ידנית אינטנסיבית, בעוד זה די קל להשיג שולחנות חצי מובנות ממקורים רבים ישירות, או לבנות אותן באופן אוטומטי. בעיתון הזה, אנו בונים מערכת סוף-סוף כדי לענות על שאלות בחירות רבות עם שולחנות חצי-מובנות כמו הידע שלה. המערכת שלנו עונה לשאלות בשני צעדים. ראשית, הוא מוצא את השולחנות הכי דומות. ואז המערכת ממדידה את הרלוונטיות בין כל שאלה לתאים שולחן מועמדים, ולבחר את התאים הקשורים ביותר בתור מקור התשובה. המערכת מוערכת באמצעות קבוצת מידע TabMCQ, ומקבלת שיפור עצום בהשוואה למצב האמנות.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཆ་གཤིས་ལན་གསལ་པ(QA)མ་ལག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་དང་བཟོ་བཀོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གི་དབྱིབས་གཞི་ཡོད་པ། ཡིན་ནའང་། རྩ་བ་ཡིག་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་QA རིམ་པ་དེ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཐག་ཡོད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཚོགས་ལ་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་གདམ་ཀ་ཡོད་པའི་དྲི་བ་ཚོར་མཇུག་ ང་ཚོའི་མ་ལག་གིས་རྨང་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དྲི་ཞིབ་ལ་ལན་པ། དང་པོ་དེ་ནི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཆེས་ཤོག་བྱང་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད། དེ་ནས་མ་ལག་གིས་རེ་འདྲི་བ་དང་རེ་བ་སྐྱེན་པའི་ཤོག་བྱང་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་ལ་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དང་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་སྐྱེན་ག མ་ལག་ནི་TabMCQ་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'LCQMC : A Large-scale Chinese Question Matching Corpus', 'ar': 'LCQMC: مجموعة مطابقة أسئلة صينية واسعة النطاق', 'es': 'LCQMC: Un corpus chino de correspondencia de preguntas a gran escala', 'pt': 'LCQMC: Um Corpus de Correspondência de Questões Chinesas em Grande Escala', 'fr': 'LCQMC\xa0: Corpus de correspondance des questions chinoises à grande échelle', 'ja': 'LCQMC ：大規模な中国人の質問マッチングコーパス', 'hi': 'LCQMC: एक बड़े पैमाने पर चीनी प्रश्न मिलान कॉर्पस', 'zh': '立法会:大中文,匹配语料库', 'ru': 'LCQMC:Масштабный китайский вопрос, соответствующий корпусу', 'ga': 'LCQMC: Corpas Meaitseála Ceisteanna Síneach ar Mhórscála', 'hu': 'LCQMC: Egy nagyszabású kínai kérdés, amely megfelel a Corpusnak', 'el': 'Ένα μεγάλης κλίμακας κινεζικό σώμα αντιστοίχισης ερωτήσεων', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'LCQMC: Китайдың үлкен масштабы сұрақ сәйкес келетін корпус', 'lt': 'LCQMC:A Large-scale Chinese Question Matching Corpus', 'it': 'LCQMC: Una domanda cinese su larga scala che corrisponde al corpo', 'mt': 'LCQMC:Korp Ċiniż għat-Tqabbil tal-Mistoqsijiet fuq skala kbira', 'mk': 'Name', 'mn': 'LCQMC:Хятадын том хэмжээний асуулт холбогдолтой', 'ms': 'LCQMC:A Large-scale Chinese Question Matching Corpus', 'ml': 'LCQMC: ഒരു വലിയ ചൈനീസ് ചോദ്യം പൊരുതുന്ന ചോദ്യം', 'no': 'LCQMC:A Large-scale Chinese Question Match Corpus', 'ro': 'LCQMC: O întrebare chinezească la scară largă care se potrivește corpului', 'sr': 'Velika kineska pitanja koja odgovara korpusu', 'pl': 'LCQMC: Wielkoskalowy chiński korpus dopasowania pytań', 'si': 'LCQMC:A Large-scaled China Query Matching Corpus', 'ur': 'LCQMC', 'sv': 'LCQMC: En storskalig kinesisk fråga matchande corpus', 'so': 'LCQMC:A Large-scale Chinese Question Matching Corpus', 'ta': 'LCQMC: A large- scale Chinese Query Matching Corpus', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'LCQMC:A A mông câu hỏi lớn của Trung Quốc.', 'bg': 'LCQMC: Голям китайски корпус, отговарящ на въпроси', 'nl': 'LCQMC: Een grootschalige Chinese Vraag Matching Corpus', 'da': 'LCQMC: Et stort kinesisk spørgsmål matchende Corpus', 'hr': 'LCQMC: Velika kineska pitanja odgovarajuća korpusa', 'id': 'LCQMC:A Large-scale Chinese Question Matching Corpus', 'de': 'LCQMC: Ein großes chinesisches Frage Matching Corpus', 'ko': 'LCQMC: 대규모 중국어 질문 일치 자료 라이브러리', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'LCQMC: Swali kubwa la Kichina linalofanana na Maswali', 'tr': 'GIMP', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'LCQMC: Një korpus i rëndësishëm kinez që përputhet me pyetjet', 'am': 'A Large-scale Chinese Question Matching Corpus', 'hy': 'LCQMC: A Large-Map CHINE QUALLS Match Corpus', 'az': 'LCQMC:Büyük-ölçülü Çin sualı İşdirilən Cənnətdə', 'bn': 'এলসিকিউএমসি: একটি বড় চীনা প্রশ্ন তৈরি কর্পুস', 'bs': 'Velika kineska pitanja odgovarajuća korpusa', 'ca': 'LCQMC: Un gran cos xinès que coincideix amb preguntes', 'cs': 'LCQMC: Velký čínský odpovídající sbor otázek', 'et': 'LCQMC: laiaulatuslik Hiina küsimuste vastavuse korpus', 'fi': 'LCQMC: Laajamittainen kiinalaisten kysymysten vastaaminen Corpus', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'LCQMC: קורפוס שיתוף שאלות סינית בקנה מידה גדולה', 'sk': 'LCQMC: Veliki kitajski korpus, ki se ujema z vprašanji', 'bo': 'LCQMC:རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དྲི་ཚིག་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་མཁན་ལ་ཆེ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ'}
{'en': 'The lack of large-scale question matching corpora greatly limits the development of matching methods in question answering (QA) system, especially for non-English languages. To ameliorate this situation, in this paper, we introduce a large-scale Chinese question matching corpus (named LCQMC), which is released to the public1. LCQMC is more general than paraphrase corpus as it focuses on intent matching rather than paraphrase. How to collect a large number of question pairs in variant linguistic forms, which may present the same intent, is the key point for such corpus construction. In this paper, we first use a search engine to collect large-scale question pairs related to high-frequency words from various domains, then filter irrelevant pairs by the Wasserstein distance, and finally recruit three annotators to manually check the left pairs. After this process, a question matching corpus that contains 260,068 question pairs is constructed. In order to verify the LCQMC corpus, we split it into three parts, i.e., a training set containing 238,766 question pairs, a development set with 8,802 question pairs, and a test set with 12,500 question pairs, and test several well-known sentence matching methods on it. The experimental results not only demonstrate the good quality of LCQMC but also provide solid baseline performance for further researches on this corpus.', 'ar': 'إن عدم وجود مجموعات مطابقة للأسئلة على نطاق واسع يحد بشكل كبير من تطوير طرق المطابقة في نظام الإجابة على السؤال (QA) ، خاصة بالنسبة للغات غير الإنجليزية. لتحسين هذا الموقف ، في هذه الورقة ، نقدم مجموعة مطابقة الأسئلة الصينية واسعة النطاق (تسمى LCQMC) ، والتي تم إصدارها للجمهور 1. يعد LCQMC أكثر عمومية من إعادة صياغة النص لأنه يركز على مطابقة النية بدلاً من إعادة الصياغة. إن كيفية جمع عدد كبير من أزواج الأسئلة في الأشكال اللغوية المتغيرة ، والتي قد تقدم نفس القصد ، هي النقطة الأساسية لبناء مثل هذه المجموعة. في هذه الورقة ، استخدمنا أولاً محرك بحث لتجميع أزواج الأسئلة واسعة النطاق المتعلقة بالكلمات عالية التردد من نطاقات مختلفة ، ثم نقوم بتصفية الأزواج غير ذات الصلة من خلال مسافة Wasserstein ، وأخيراً نوظف ثلاثة شروحات للتحقق يدويًا من الأزواج اليسرى. بعد هذه العملية ، يتم إنشاء مجموعة أسئلة مطابقة تحتوي على 260،068 زوجًا من الأسئلة. من أجل التحقق من مجموعة LCQMC ، قمنا بتقسيمها إلى ثلاثة أجزاء ، أي مجموعة تدريب تحتوي على 238.766 زوجًا من الأسئلة ، ومجموعة تطوير بها 8802 زوجًا من الأسئلة ، ومجموعة اختبار تضم 12500 زوجًا من الأسئلة ، واختبار العديد من مطابقة الجمل المعروفة. طرق عليه. لا تُظهر النتائج التجريبية الجودة الجيدة لـ LCQMC فحسب ، بل توفر أيضًا أداءًا أساسيًا قويًا لمزيد من الأبحاث حول هذه المجموعة.', 'es': 'La falta de corpus de correspondencia de preguntas a gran escala limita en gran medida el desarrollo de métodos de correspondencia en el sistema de respuesta a preguntas (QA), especialmente para idiomas distintos del inglés. Para mejorar esta situación, en este artículo presentamos un corpus chino de concordancia de preguntas a gran escala (denominado LCQMC), que se publica al público1. LCQMC es más general que el corpus de paráfrasis, ya que se centra en la coincidencia de intenciones en lugar de en la paráfrasis. Cómo recopilar un gran número de pares de preguntas en formas lingüísticas variantes, que pueden presentar la misma intención, es el punto clave para tal construcción de corpus. En este artículo, primero utilizamos un motor de búsqueda para recopilar pares de preguntas a gran escala relacionados con palabras de alta frecuencia de varios dominios, luego filtramos los pares irrelevantes por la distancia de Wasserstein y, finalmente, reclutamos tres anotadores para verificar manualmente los pares de la izquierda. Después de este proceso, se construye un corpus de correspondencia de preguntas que contiene 260.068 pares de preguntas. Para verificar el corpus de LCQMC, lo dividimos en tres partes, es decir, un conjunto de entrenamiento que contiene 238 766 pares de preguntas, un conjunto de desarrollo con 8 802 pares de preguntas y un conjunto de prueba con 12 500 pares de preguntas, y probamos varios métodos de coincidencia de oraciones bien conocidos. Los resultados experimentales no solo demuestran la buena calidad de LCQMC, sino que también proporcionan un sólido rendimiento de referencia para investigaciones posteriores en este corpus.', 'pt': 'A falta de corpora de correspondência de perguntas em larga escala limita muito o desenvolvimento de métodos de correspondência no sistema de resposta a perguntas (QA), especialmente para idiomas diferentes do inglês. Para melhorar essa situação, neste artigo, apresentamos um corpus de correspondência de perguntas chinesas em larga escala (chamado LCQMC), que é divulgado ao público1. O LCQMC é mais geral do que o corpus de paráfrase, pois se concentra na correspondência de intenção em vez da paráfrase. Como coletar um grande número de pares de perguntas em formas linguísticas variantes, que podem apresentar a mesma intenção, é o ponto-chave para a construção desse corpus. Neste artigo, primeiro usamos um mecanismo de pesquisa para coletar pares de perguntas em larga escala relacionadas a palavras de alta frequência de vários domínios, depois filtramos pares irrelevantes pela distância de Wasserstein e, finalmente, recrutamos três anotadores para verificar manualmente os pares esquerdos. Após esse processo, é construído um corpus de correspondência de perguntas que contém 260.068 pares de perguntas. Para verificar o corpus do LCQMC, dividimo-lo em três partes, ou seja, um conjunto de treinamento contendo 238.766 pares de perguntas, um conjunto de desenvolvimento com 8.802 pares de perguntas e um conjunto de teste com 12.500 pares de perguntas, e testamos várias correspondências de frases conhecidas métodos nele. Os resultados experimentais não apenas demonstram a boa qualidade do LCQMC, mas também fornecem um sólido desempenho de linha de base para futuras pesquisas neste corpus.', 'fr': "L'absence de corpus de correspondance de questions à grande échelle limite considérablement le développement de méthodes d'appariement dans le système de réponse aux questions (AQ), en particulier pour les langues autres que l'anglais. Pour améliorer cette situation, nous présentons dans cet article un corpus chinois de correspondance de questions à grande échelle (appelé LCQMC), qui est diffusé au public1. Le LCQMC est plus général que le corpus de paraphrase car il met l'accent sur la correspondance des intentions plutôt que sur la paraphrase. La collecte d'un grand nombre de paires de questions dans des formes linguistiques variables, qui peuvent présenter la même intention, est le point clé d'une telle construction de corpus. Dans cet article, nous utilisons d'abord un moteur de recherche pour collecter des paires de questions à grande échelle liées à des mots à haute fréquence provenant de divers domaines, puis filtrons les paires non pertinentes en fonction de la distance de Wasserstein et enfin recrutons trois annotateurs pour vérifier manuellement les paires de gauche. Après ce processus, un corpus de correspondance de questions contenant 260 068 paires de questions est construit. Afin de vérifier le corpus du LCQMC, nous l'avons scindé en trois parties, c'est-à-dire un ensemble de formation contenant 238 766 paires de questions, un ensemble de développement avec 8 802 paires de questions et un ensemble de tests avec 12 500 paires de questions, et nous testons plusieurs méthodes de correspondance de phrases bien connues. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent non seulement la bonne qualité du LCQMC, mais fournissent également des performances de base solides pour d'autres recherches sur ce corpus.", 'ja': '大規模な質問マッチングコーパスの欠如は、特に非英語の場合、質問回答（ QA ）システムにおけるマッチング方法の開発を大きく制限します。 この状況を改善するために、本稿では一般公開されている大規模な中国語の質問マッチングコーパス（ LCQMC ）を紹介する1。 LCQMCは、パラフレーズではなくインテントマッチングに焦点を当てているため、パラフレーズコーパスよりも一般的である。 そのようなコーパス構築のための重要なポイントは、同じ意図を提示する可能性のある変形言語形式で多数の質問ペアを収集する方法である。 本稿では、まず検索エンジンを用いて、様々なドメインから高頻度の単語に関連する大規模な質問ペアを収集し、ワッサーシュタイン距離で無関係なペアをフィルタリングし、最後に3人のアノテーターを募集して、左側のペアを手動で確認する。 このプロセスの後、260,068の質問ペアを含む質問マッチングコーパスが構築されます。 LCQMCコーパスを検証するために、238,766の質問ペアを含むトレーニングセット、8,802の質問ペアを含む開発セット、12,500の質問ペアを含むテストセットの3つに分割し、いくつかの有名な文マッチング方法をテストしました。 実験結果は、ＬＣＱＭＣの良好な品質を示すだけでなく、このコーパスに関するさらなる研究のための確かなベースライン性能を提供する。', 'hi': 'बड़े पैमाने पर प्रश्न मिलान निगम की कमी प्रश्न उत्तर (क्यूए) प्रणाली में मिलान विधियों के विकास को बहुत सीमित करती है, विशेष रूप से गैर-अंग्रेजी भाषाओं के लिए। इस स्थिति को सुधारने के लिए, इस पेपर में, हम एक बड़े पैमाने पर चीनी प्रश्न मिलान कॉर्पस (एलसीक्यूएमसी नाम) पेश करते हैं, जिसे जनता के लिए जारी किया जाता है। LCQMC व्याख्या कॉर्पस की तुलना में अधिक सामान्य है क्योंकि यह व्याख्या के बजाय इरादे मिलान पर केंद्रित है। भिन्न भाषाई रूपों में बड़ी संख्या में प्रश्न जोड़े कैसे एकत्र किए जाएं, जो एक ही इरादे को प्रस्तुत कर सकते हैं, इस तरह के कॉर्पस निर्माण के लिए महत्वपूर्ण बिंदु है। इस पेपर में, हम पहले विभिन्न डोमेन से उच्च-आवृत्ति वाले शब्दों से संबंधित बड़े पैमाने पर प्रश्न जोड़े एकत्र करने के लिए एक खोज इंजन का उपयोग करते हैं, फिर वासरस्टीन दूरी द्वारा अप्रासंगिक जोड़े को फ़िल्टर करते हैं, और अंत में बाएं जोड़े की मैन्युअल रूप से जांच करने के लिए तीन एनोटेटरों की भर्ती करते हैं। इस प्रक्रिया के बाद, एक प्रश्न मिलान कॉर्पस जिसमें 260,068 प्रश्न जोड़े होते हैं, का निर्माण किया जाता है। LCQMC कॉर्पस को सत्यापित करने के लिए, हमने इसे तीन भागों में विभाजित किया, यानी, एक प्रशिक्षण सेट जिसमें 238,766 प्रश्न जोड़े, 8,802 प्रश्न जोड़े के साथ एक विकास सेट, और 12,500 प्रश्न जोड़े के साथ एक परीक्षण सेट, और उस पर कई प्रसिद्ध वाक्य मिलान विधियों का परीक्षण किया गया। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम न केवल LCQMC की अच्छी गुणवत्ता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं, बल्कि इस कॉर्पस पर आगे के शोधों के लिए ठोस बेसलाइन प्रदर्शन भी प्रदान करते हैं।', 'zh': '乏大问答语料库大限问答(QA)统中匹配之渐,尤于非英语语。 本文引大中文匹配语料库(名为LCQMC),当语料库向众1。 LCQMC通用于释义语料库,以其侧重于意匹而非释义也。 何以变体言采大对,或有同意,此语料库构之关键点。 本文,先用搜索引擎从各域收高频词大对,然后以Wasserstein去漉不相关者对,最后募三注器来手动检左。 既成,将构一 260,068 一匹语料库。 为验LCQMC语料库,分为三分,即包238,766一对训练集,包8,802一对开发集,及包含12,500一对试集,并试众所周知句法。 实验不独征LCQMC之良质,又为语料库者究其坚基线。', 'ru': 'Отсутствие крупномасштабных корпусов, отвечающих на вопросы, в значительной степени ограничивает разработку соответствующих методов в системе ответов (QA), особенно для неанглоязычных языков. Чтобы исправить эту ситуацию, в этой статье мы вводим масштабный китайский вопрос, соответствующий корпусу (под названием LCQMC), который публикуется1. LCQMC является более общим, чем перефразирующий корпус, поскольку он фокусируется на сопоставлении намерений, а не на перефразировании. Как собрать большое количество пар вопросов в различных лингвистических формах, которые могут иметь такое же намерение, является ключевым моментом для такого корпусного построения. В этой статье мы сначала используем поисковую систему для сбора крупномасштабных пар вопросов, связанных с высокочастотными словами из различных доменов, затем фильтруем нерелевантные пары по расстоянию Вассерштейна и, наконец, нанимаем три аннотатора для ручной проверки левых пар. После этого процесса создается соответствующий вопрос корпус, который содержит 260 068 пар вопросов. Чтобы проверить корпус LCQMC, мы разделили его на три части, то есть, обучающий набор, содержащий 238 766 пар вопросов, набор разработок с 8802 парами вопросов и тестовый набор с 12 500 парами вопросов, и протестировали на нем несколько хорошо известных методов сопоставления предложений. Экспериментальные результаты не только демонстрируют хорошее качество LCQMC, но и обеспечивают солидную базовую производительность для дальнейших исследований на этом корпусе.', 'ga': 'Cuireann easpa corpora meaitseála ceisteanna ar mhórscála srian mór ar fhorbairt modhanna meaitseála sa chóras freagartha ceisteanna (QA), go háirithe i gcás teangacha nach Béarla iad. Chun an cás seo a fheabhsú, sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach corpas meaitseála ceisteanna Síneacha ar scála mór (ar a dtugtar LCQMC), a scaoiltear don phobal1. Tá LCQMC níos ginearálta ná athfhrása corpus mar go ndíríonn sé ar mheaitseáil intinne seachas ar athinsint. Is é an chaoi le líon mór péirí ceisteanna a bhailiú i bhfoirmeacha athraitheacha teangeolaíochta, a d’fhéadfadh an rún céanna a chur i láthair, an príomhphointe le haghaidh tógáil corpais dá leithéid. Sa pháipéar seo, bainimid úsáid as inneall cuardaigh ar dtús chun péirí ceisteanna ar scála mór a bhaineann le focail ard-minicíochta ó réimsí éagsúla a bhailiú, ansin péirí neamhábhartha a scagadh de réir fad Wasserstein, agus ar deireadh earcaítear trí anótálaithe chun na péirí clé a sheiceáil de láimh. Tar éis an phróisis seo, tógtar corpas meaitseála ceisteanna ina bhfuil 260,068 péire ceisteanna. D’fhonn corpas LCQMC a fhíorú, scoilteamar ina thrí chuid é, i.e., sraith oiliúna ina bhfuil 238,766 péire ceisteanna, sraith forbartha le 8,802 péire ceisteanna, agus sraith tástála le 12,500 péire ceisteanna, agus rinneamar tástáil ar roinnt meaitseáil abairtí aitheanta. modhanna ar sé. Ní hamháin go léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha dea-cháilíocht LCQMC ach cuireann siad feidhmíocht bonnlíne láidir ar fáil freisin le haghaidh taighde breise ar an gcorpas seo.', 'ka': 'დიდი მაგალითი კითხვების არსებობა, რომლებიც კოპორაში თავსებულია, ძალიან დაზრუნდება კითხვების გასაგების მეტოვების განვითარება, განსაკუთრებით ანგლისური ენათების არ ამ სიტაციაში, ჩვენ ჩინეთი კითხვა, რომელიც კოპუუსს (LCQMC) გადავიტანოთ, რომელიც პობლიკური 1-ზე გახსნა. @ info როგორ კითხვების რაოდენობა კითხვების ზოგი გარიანტიური ლენგურისტიკური ფორმებში, რომელიც შეიძლება იგივე საზოგადოება, არის ასეთი კორპუსის კონფიგურაციის გასაკველი ამ დომენში, ჩვენ პირველად გამოყენებთ ძიება მოწყობილობის ძიება, რომ გასერსტეინის განმავლობაში სამი ანტოტორიები შეიყენებთ მარცხენა მარცხენა ზოგის სიტყვებისთვის შესახებ დიდი სიტყვებისთვის, შემდეგ გასერსტეინის ამ პროცესის შემდეგ, კითხვა, რომელიც კოპპუუსს შემდეგ 260 068 კითხვის ზოგი შექმნა. LCQMC კორპუსს შემოწმებათ, ჩვენ გავყოფილიდით სამი ნაწილში, მაგალითად 238 766 კითხვის ზოგები, 8 802 კითხვის ზოგებით განვითარება და 12 500 კითხვის ზოგებით ტესტის ნაწილში და შევცვალოთ რამდენიმე მნიშვნელოვანი წესების შესაბამისად. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი არა მხოლოდ მხოლოდ LCQMC-ის კაalitეტი, მაგრამ მხოლოდ ექსპერიმენტიური მუშაობა ამ კორპუსს დასრულებელი შესახებ.', 'hu': 'A nagyszabású kérdésszabályozási korlátozások hiánya nagymértékben korlátozza a kérdésszabályozási (QA) rendszer fejlesztését, különösen a nem angol nyelvek esetében. A helyzet enyhítése érdekében ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy nagyszabású kínai kérdésekhez illeszkedő korpuszt (LCQMC néven), amely nyilvánosságra hozatal1. Az LCQMC általánosabb, mint a parafrázis corpus, mivel inkább a szándék egyeztetésére összpontosít, mint parafrázisra. Az ilyen korpuszkonstrukció kulcsfontosságú pontja, hogy hogyan lehet nagyszámú kérdéspárt gyűjteni variáns nyelvi formákban, amelyek ugyanazt a szándékot mutathatják be. Ebben a tanulmányban először egy keresőmotort használunk arra, hogy nagyszabású kérdéspárokat gyűjtsünk össze különböző tartományok nagy frekvenciájú szavaihoz kapcsolódóan, majd a lényegtelen párokat Wasserstein távolság szerint szűrjük, végül három kommentátort toborozunk a bal oldali párok manuális ellenőrzésére. Ezt követően egy 260 068 kérdéspárt tartalmazó kérdéssel egyező korpusz jön létre. Az LCQMC korpusz ellenőrzése érdekében három részre osztottuk, azaz egy 238 766 kérdéspárt tartalmazó edzőkészletet, egy 8 802 kérdéspárt tartalmazó fejlesztőkészletet és egy 12 500 kérdéspárt tartalmazó tesztkészletet, és több jól ismert mondatmegosztási módszert teszteltünk rajta. A kísérleti eredmények nemcsak az LCQMC jó minőségét mutatják be, hanem szilárd alapvető teljesítményt is biztosítanak a korpusz további kutatásaihoz.', 'el': 'Η έλλειψη μεγάλης κλίμακας σωμάτων αντιστοίχισης ερωτήσεων περιορίζει σημαντικά την ανάπτυξη μεθόδων αντιστοίχισης στο σύστημα απάντησης ερωτήσεων (QA), ειδικά για μη-αγγλικές γλώσσες. Για να βελτιωθεί αυτή η κατάσταση, στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε ένα μεγάλης κλίμακας κινεζικό σώμα αντιστοίχισης ερωτήσεων (που ονομάζεται LCQMC), το οποίο κυκλοφορεί στο κοινό. Το LCQMC είναι πιο γενικό από το σώμα παραφράσεων καθώς επικεντρώνεται στην αντιστοίχιση προθέσεων και όχι στην παραφράση. Ο τρόπος συλλογής μεγάλου αριθμού ερωτικών ζευγαριών σε παραλλαγές γλωσσικών μορφών, οι οποίες μπορεί να παρουσιάζουν την ίδια πρόθεση, είναι το βασικό σημείο για μια τέτοια κατασκευή σώματος. Σε αυτή την εργασία, χρησιμοποιούμε πρώτα μια μηχανή αναζήτησης για να συλλέξουμε μεγάλα ζεύγη ερωτήσεων που σχετίζονται με λέξεις υψηλής συχνότητας από διάφορους τομείς, στη συνέχεια φιλτράρουμε άσχετα ζεύγη με βάση την απόσταση και τελικά στρατολογούμε τρεις σχολιαστές για να ελέγξουμε χειροκίνητα τα αριστερά ζεύγη. Μετά από αυτή τη διαδικασία, δημιουργείται ένα σώμα αντιστοίχισης ερωτήσεων που περιέχει ζεύγη ερωτήσεων 260,068. Για να επαληθεύσουμε το σώμα του το χωρίζουμε σε τρία μέρη, δηλαδή ένα εκπαιδευτικό σύνολο που περιέχει ζεύγη ερωτήσεων 238,766, ένα σετ ανάπτυξης με ζεύγη ερωτήσεων 8,802 και ένα σετ δοκιμών με ζεύγη ερωτήσεων 12,500 και δοκιμάζουμε αρκετές γνωστές μεθόδους αντιστοίχισης προτάσεων σε αυτό. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα όχι μόνο καταδεικνύουν την καλή ποιότητα του αλλά και παρέχουν σταθερή απόδοση βάσης για περαιτέρω έρευνες σε αυτό το σώμα.', 'kk': 'Корпораға сәйкес келетін үлкен масштаб сұрақ жоқ сұрақ (QA) жүйесіне сәйкес келетін әдістерді жауап беру жүйесіне шектеп береді, әсіресе ағылшын тілдері емес. Бұл жағдайды осы қағаздың көмегімен өзгерту үшін біз көп өлшемді қытайша сұрақ (LCQMC деп аталатын) корпусты (көмегімен LCQMC деп аталатын) таңдаймыз. Бұл к LCQMC парафраз корпус арқылы, парафраз арқылы сәйкестіктеріне назар ауыстырылады. Бұл корпус құрылымының кілт нүктесі. Бұл қағазда біріншіден іздеу тетігін әртүрлі доменден көп жиілік сөздермен сәйкесті сұрақ жиілігін жинақтау үшін қолданып, содан кейін Wasserstein қашықтығынан қатынасыз жоқ екеуін сүзгіледі, сол жақтағы екеуін қолмен тексеру Бұл процестің соңында 260 068 сұрақ екісі бар корпус сұрақ құрылды. LCQMC корпус тексеру үшін оны үш бөлігіне бөліп, мысалы, 238 766 сұрақ екеуі бар, 8 802 сұрақ екеуі бар, 12 500 сұрақ екеуі бар сынақтар және оның бірнеше мәліметтерін тексереміз. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер тек LCQMC сапасының жақсы сапасын көрсетілмейді, сондай-ақ осы корпустың қосымша зерттеулері үшін қатты негізгі жұмыс істейді.', 'it': 'La mancanza di corpi di corrispondenza delle domande su larga scala limita notevolmente lo sviluppo di metodi di corrispondenza nel sistema di risposta alle domande (QA), specialmente per le lingue non inglesi. Per migliorare questa situazione, in questo articolo, introduciamo un corpus di corrispondenza delle domande cinesi su larga scala (chiamato LCQMC), che viene rilasciato al pubblico1. LCQMC è più generale del corpus di parafrasi in quanto si concentra sulla corrispondenza degli intenti piuttosto che sulla parafrasi. Come raccogliere un gran numero di coppie di domande in forme linguistiche variabili, che possono presentare lo stesso intento, è il punto chiave per tale costruzione di corpus. In questo articolo, usiamo prima un motore di ricerca per raccogliere coppie di domande su larga scala relative a parole ad alta frequenza da vari domini, quindi filtrare coppie irrilevanti per la distanza di Wasserstein, e infine reclutare tre annotatori per controllare manualmente le coppie di sinistra. Dopo questo processo, viene costruito un corpus di corrispondenza delle domande che contiene 260.068 coppie di domande. Per verificare il corpus LCQMC, lo dividiamo in tre parti, cioè un set di addestramento contenente 238.766 coppie di domande, un set di sviluppo con 8.802 coppie di domande, e un set di test con 12.500 coppie di domande, e testamo diversi metodi di corrispondenza delle frasi ben noti su di esso. I risultati sperimentali non solo dimostrano la buona qualità di LCQMC, ma forniscono anche solide prestazioni di base per ulteriori ricerche su questo corpus.', 'mk': 'Недостатокот на големо прашање кое се совпаѓа со корпората значително го ограничува развојот на методите на совпаѓање во прашање на системот на одговор на прашањето (QA), особено за неанглиските јазици. За подобрување на оваа ситуација, во овој весник, воведуваме големо кинеско прашање кое се совпаѓа со корпусот (наречен LCQMC), кое е објавено на јавности1. LCQMC е погенерален отколку парафрази тело бидејќи се фокусира на споредба на намерата наместо парафраза. How to collect a large number of question pairs in variant linguistic forms, which may present the same intent, is the key point for such corpus construction.  Во оваа хартија, прво користиме пребарувачки мотор за да собереме големи парови прашања поврзани со зборови со висока фреквенција од различни домени, потоа филтрираме нерелевантни парови од далечината на Вашерстејн, и конечно регрутираме три анотатори за рачно да ги проверат левите парови. После овој процес, се изградува прашање кое се совпаѓа со корпусот кој содржи 260.068 парови прашања. За да го потврдиме корпусот на ЛККМЦ, го поделивме во три дела, т.е., тренинг сет кој содржи 238.766 парови прашања, развој сет со 8.802 парови прашања, и тест сет со 12.500 парови прашања, и тестирање на неколку познати методи за одговарање на речениците на него. Експерименталните резултати не само што го демонстрираат добар квалитет на LCQMC, туку и обезбедуваат цврст основен резултат за понатамошните истражувања на овој корпус.', 'ms': 'Kekurangan soalan skala besar yang sepadan dengan korpra sangat membatasi pembangunan kaedah sepadan dalam sistem jawapan soalan (QA), terutama untuk bahasa bukan bahasa Inggeris. Untuk memperbaiki situasi ini, dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan soalan besar-skala Cina yang sepadan corpus (bernama LCQMC), yang dibebaskan kepada masyarakat1. LCQMC lebih umum daripada parafrasa mayat kerana ia fokus pada tujuan sepadan daripada parafrasa. Bagaimana untuk mengumpulkan sejumlah besar pasangan soalan dalam bentuk bahasa variasi, yang mungkin menunjukkan tujuan yang sama, adalah titik kunci untuk pembangunan corpus seperti itu. In this paper, we first use a search engine to collect large-scale question pairs related to high-frequency words from various domains, then filter irrelevant pairs by the Wasserstein distance, and finally recruit three annotators to manually check the left pairs.  Selepas proses ini, satu soalan yang sepadan dengan corpus yang mengandungi 260,068 pasangan soalan dibina. Untuk mengesahkan LCQMC corpus, kita membahagikannya kepada tiga bahagian, iaitu set latihan yang mengandungi 238,766 pasangan soalan, pembangunan yang mengandungi 8,802 pasangan soalan, dan set ujian dengan 12,500 pasangan soalan, dan uji beberapa kaedah yang sepadan kalimat yang diketahui. Hasil percubaan tidak hanya menunjukkan kualiti yang baik LCQMC tetapi juga menyediakan prestasi asas yang kuat untuk penyelidikan lanjut pada korpus ini.', 'mt': 'In-nuqqas ta’ mistoqsijiet fuq skala kbira li jaqblu mal-korpra jillimita ħafna l-iżvilupp ta’ metodi ta’ tqabbil fis-sistema ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet (QA), speċjalment għal-lingwi mhux Ingliżi. To ameliorate this situation, in this paper, we introduce a large-scale Chinese question matching corpus (named LCQMC), which is released to the public1.  LCQMC is more general than paraphrase corpus as it focuses on intent matching rather than paraphrase.  Kif jinġabru għadd kbir ta’ pari ta’ mistoqsijiet f’forom lingwistiċi varjanti, li jistgħu jippreżentaw l-istess intenzjoni, huwa l-punt ewlieni għal tali kostruzzjoni tal-korpus. F’din il-karta, l-ewwel a ħna nużaw magna tat-tiftix biex niġbru pari ta’ mistoqsijiet fuq skala kbira relatati ma’ kliem ta’ frekwenza għolja minn diversi dominji, imbagħad nifiltraw pari irrelevanti mid-distanza Wasserstein, u fl-aħħar nett nirreklutaw tliet annotaturi biex jiċċekkjaw manwalment il-pari tax-xellug. Wara dan il-proċess, tinbena mistoqsija li taqbel ma’ corpus li fiha 260,068 par ta’ mistoqsijiet. Sabiex tivverifika l-LCQMC corpus, a ħna nqasmuh fi tliet partijiet, jiġifieri sett ta’ taħriġ li fih 238,766 par ta’ mistoqsijiet, sett ta’ żvilupp b’8,802 par ta’ mistoqsijiet, u sett ta’ test b’12,500 par ta’ mistoqsijiet, u jittestjaw fuqu diversi metodi ta’ tqabbil ta’ sentenzi magħrufa sew. Ir-riżultati sperimentali mhux biss juru l-kwalità tajba tal-LCQMC iżda jipprovdu wkoll prestazzjoni bażi solida għal aktar riċerka fuq dan il-korpus.', 'lt': 'Dėl didelio masto klausimų, atitinkančių korporas, trūkumo labai ribojama atitinkamų atitikties metodų rengimas atsakymo į klausimus sistemai (QA), ypač ne anglų kalboms. Siekiant pagerinti šią padėtį šiame dokumente įvedamas didelio masto Kinijos klausimas, atitinkantis korpusą (vadinamą LCQMC), kuris skelbiamas visuomenei.1 LCQMC yra bendresnis nei parafrazės korpusas, nes jis daugiausia dėmesio skiria ketinimų atitikčiai, o ne parafrazei. Pagrindinis tokios korpuso konstrukcijos taškas yra tai, kaip surinkti daugybę klausimų porų įvairiomis kalbinėmis formomis, kurios gali turėti tą patį ketinimą. Šiame dokumente mes pirmiausia naudojame paieškos variklį surinkti didelio masto klausimų poras, susijusias su didelio dažnio žodžiais iš įvairių sričių, tada filtruoti nereikšmingas poras Wassersteino atstumu, ir galiausiai įdarbinti tris annotatorius rankiniu būdu patikrinti kairiąsias poras. Po šio proceso sukuriamas klausimas, atitinkantis corpus, kuriame yra 260 068 klausimų poros. In order to verify the LCQMC corpus, we split it into three parts, i.e., a training set containing 238,766 question pairs, a development set with 8,802 question pairs, and a test set with 12,500 question pairs, and test several well-known sentence matching methods on it.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai ne tik rodo gerą LCQMC kokybę, bet ir suteikia tvirtą bazinį rezultatą tolesniems šio korpuso tyrimams.', 'mn': 'Корпора хоорондоо холбогдох том хэмжээний асуулт нь асуулт хариулт (QA) системийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийг ихэвчлэн хязгаарладаг. Ялангуяа Англи хэл биш. Энэ нөхцөлийг сайжруулахын тулд, энэ цаасан дээр бид Хятадын нэг том асуултыг (LCQMC нэртэй) нийтлэгчдэд тайлбарлаж өгсөн корпус руу илэрхийлэх болно. LCQMC нь парафрейз корпус-аас илүү ерөнхий юм. Яагаад гэвэл энэ парафрейз-ээс илүү төвлөрөх зорилго дээр төвлөрөх юм. Яаж олон асуулт хоёрыг өөр хэл хэлбэрийн хэлбэрээр цуглуулах вэ гэвэл энэ нь ижил зорилго гаргаж чадна гэсэн үг юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эхлээд маш том асуулт хоёрыг олон хэсэгт авч, дараа нь Wasserstein зайны хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хайлтын маш чухал хоёрыг цуглуулахын тулд хэрэглэдэг. Энэ үйл явцын дараа 260 068 асуулт хоёрыг агуулсан корпус хоорондоо холбогдож байна. LCQMC корпус шалгахын тулд бид үүнийг гурван хэсэгт хувааж, яг л 238 766 асуулт хоёр суралцах сургалт, 8.802 асуулт хоёрын хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн тулд, 12.500 асуулт хоёрын туршилтыг шалгаж, олон сайн мэдэгдэх өгүүлбэрийг шалгаж үзье. Энэ туршилтын үр дүнд зөвхөн LCQMC-ийн сайн сайн чанарыг харуулж чадахгүй, мөн энэ корпус дээрх илүү олон судалгаануудын тулд хатуу үндсэн үйл ажиллагааг хангадаг.', 'ml': 'കോര്\u200dപ്പോറയോടൊപ്പം പൊരുതുന്ന വലിയ ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ കുറവില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ക ഈ സ്ഥിതിയെ വികസിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ ചൈനീസ് ചോദ്യം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. (LCQMC എന്ന് പേരിട്ട് LCQMC) എന് പാരാഫ്രേസിനെക്കാള്\u200d പൊരുതുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d LCQMC പാരാഫ്രേസിനെക്കാള്\u200d പൊതുവാണ്. ഒരേ ലക്ഷ്യത്തില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ജോട്ടുകള്\u200d എങ്ങനെ സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണ് ഇത്തരം കോര ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യം ഒരു തെരച്ചില്\u200d എഞ്ചിന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, വ്യത്യസ്ത ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് വാക്കുകളുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വലിയ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, പിന്ന ഈ പ്രക്രിയയ്ക്ക് ശേഷം 260,068 ചോദ്യ ജോട്ടികള്\u200d ഉള്ള ഒരു ചോദ്യം ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. LCQMC കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d അതിനെ മൂന്നു ഭാഗങ്ങളായി വിഭാഗിച്ചു, അതായത് 238,766 ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്ള ഒരു പരിശീല സെറ്റ്, 8,802 ചോദ്യ ജോട്ടികള്\u200d ഉള്ള ഒരു വിക The experimental results not only demonstrate the good quality of LCQMC but also provide solid baseline performance for further researches on this corpus.', 'pl': 'Brak dużej skali korpusów dopasowywania pytań znacznie ogranicza rozwój metod dopasowywania w systemie odpowiedzi na pytania (QA), zwłaszcza dla języków nieangielskich. Aby poprawić tę sytuację, w niniejszym artykule wprowadzamy wielkoskalowy chiński korpus dopasowania pytań (LCQMC), który jest publikowany publicznie1. LCQMC jest bardziej ogólny niż korpus parafrazy, ponieważ skupia się raczej na dopasowaniu intencji niż parafrazie. Kluczowym punktem dla takiej konstrukcji korpusu jest zebranie dużej liczby par pytań w wariantowych formach językowych, które mogą przedstawiać ten sam zamiar. W niniejszym artykule najpierw używamy wyszukiwarki do zbierania dużej skali par pytań związanych ze słowami o wysokiej częstotliwości z różnych domen, następnie filtrowania nieistotnych par według odległości Wassersteina, a na koniec rekrutujemy trzy adnotatory do ręcznego sprawdzania lewych par. Po tym procesie skonstruowany jest korpus dopasowania pytań, który zawiera para pytań 260,068. Aby zweryfikować korpus LCQMC, podzieliliśmy go na trzy części, tj. zestaw treningowy zawierający pary pytań 238,766, zestaw rozwojowy z parami pytań 8,802 oraz zestaw testowy z parami pytań 12,500 i testowaliśmy na nim kilka znanych metod dopasowywania zdań. Wyniki eksperymentalne nie tylko pokazują dobrą jakość LCQMC, ale także zapewniają solidną wydajność podstawową dla dalszych badań nad tym korpusem.', 'ro': 'Lipsa corpurilor de potrivire a întrebărilor la scară largă limitează foarte mult dezvoltarea metodelor de potrivire în sistemul de răspuns la întrebări (QA), în special pentru limbile non-engleze. Pentru a ameliora această situație, în această lucrare, introducem un corpus de potrivire a întrebărilor chineze la scară largă (denumit LCQMC), care este lansat publicului1. LCQMC este mai general decât corpul de parafrază, deoarece se concentrează pe potrivirea intenției mai degrabă decât parafrază. Modul de colectare a unui număr mare de perechi de întrebări în forme lingvistice variante, care pot prezenta aceeași intenție, este punctul cheie pentru o astfel de construcție de corpuri. În această lucrare, folosim mai întâi un motor de căutare pentru a colecta perechi de întrebări la scară largă legate de cuvinte de înaltă frecvență din diferite domenii, apoi filtram perechile irelevante după distanța Wasserstein și, în cele din urmă, recrutăm trei adnotatori pentru a verifica manual perechile din stânga. După acest proces, se construiește un corpus de potrivire a întrebărilor care conține 260.068 perechi de întrebări. Pentru a verifica corpusul LCQMC, îl împărțim în trei părți, adică un set de antrenament conținând 238.766 perechi de întrebări, un set de dezvoltare cu 8.802 perechi de întrebări și un set de test cu 12.500 perechi de întrebări și testarea mai multor metode bine cunoscute de potrivire a frazelor pe el. Rezultatele experimentale nu doar demonstrează calitatea bună a LCQMC, dar oferă, de asemenea, performanțe de bază solide pentru cercetările ulterioare pe acest corp.', 'no': 'Manglansen av stor spørsmål som passar med korpora avgrenserer stort utviklinga av passande metodar i spørsmålsystemet (QA), spesielt for ikkje-engelske språk. For å oppretta denne situasjonen, i denne papiret introduserer vi ein stor kinesisk spørsmål som passar med corpus (namnet LCQMC), som vert lagt til publikat1. @ info: whatsthis Korleis å samla eit stor tal spørsmålparar i variant lingviske formar, som kan gjere det same mening, er nøkkelpunktet for slike korpuskonstruksjon. I denne papiret bruker vi først eit søkjemotor for å samla store spørsmål som er relatert til høg frekvensord frå ulike domene, så filter a ulike par ved Wasserstein-avstanden, og til slutt rekruterer tre annotatorar for å kontrollera venstre par manuelt. Etter denne prosessen er eit spørsmål som passar med korpus som inneheld 260 068 spørsmålpar konstruert. For å kontrollere LCQMC-korpusen, deler vi det i tre deler, t.d. e it opplæring sett som inneheld 238.766 spørsmålparar, eit utvikling sett med 8.802 spørsmålparar, og eit test sett med 12.500 spørsmålparar, og tester fleire godt kjente setningar som passar på det. Eksperimentale resultatet viser ikkje berre den gode kvaliteten til LCQMC, men også tilbyr solide baseline utvikling for fleire forskningar på denne korpusen.', 'sr': 'Nedostatak velike pitanja koje odgovara korporama veoma ograničava razvoj odgovarajućih metoda u pitanju odgovarajućeg sustava (QA), posebno za non-engleske jezike. Da bi se ova situacija, u ovom papiru, predstavljamo veliko kinesko pitanje odgovarajuće korpusu (po imenu LCQMC), koje se objavljuje publici 1. LCQMC je općeniji od parafraze korpusa jer se fokusira na namjeru odgovaranja nego parafraze. Kako skupljati veliki broj parova pitanja u varijantnim lingvističkim oblicima, koji mogu predstaviti istu namjeru, je ključna tačka za takvu korpusnu konstrukciju. U ovom papiru, prvo koristimo pretraživač za skupljanje velikih pitanja vezanih za reči visoke frekvencije iz različitih domena, zatim filtriramo nevažne parove od udaljenosti Wasserstein a, i konačno regrutujemo tri annotatora da bi ručno proverio leve pare. Nakon ovog procesa, postavljeno je pitanje koje odgovara korpusu koja sadrži 260 068 pitanja par. Da bismo potvrdili korpus LCQMC-a, podelili smo ga na tri dijela, tj. obuku koja sadrži 238.766 parova pitanja, razvoj postavljen sa 8.802 parova pitanja, i test postavljen sa 12.500 parova pitanja, i testirali nekoliko poznatih metoda odgovarajućih rečenica na njemu. Eksperimentalni rezultati ne samo pokazuju dobru kvalitet LCQMC-a, nego takođe pružaju čvrstu osnovnu funkciju za daljnje istraživanje ovog korpusa.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතිය (QA) ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතියෙන්, විශේෂයෙන්ම ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාවක් නැති විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විදිහට ස මේ ස්ථිතිය සම්පූර්ණ කරන්න, මේ පත්තියේ අපි ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් චීනි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා (LCQMC නම්), ඒක ප්\u200dරජාත @ info: whatsthis කොහොමද ප්\u200dරශ්න සංකේතයක් වෙනස් භාෂාවික සංකේතයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ, ඒකෙන් එකම අදහසක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් මේ පත්තරයේ අපි පළමු පරීක්ෂණ එන්ජින් එක භාවිත කරන්න ලොකු ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න විවිධිය ස්ථානයක් වලින් සංවිධිත වචන වලින්, ඊට පස් මේ පරීක්ෂණය පස්සේ, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරුපස් එක්ක 260,068 ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හදන LCQMC කොර්පුස් විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ඒක තුනක් කොටස් වලින් වෙනස් කරනවා, ඉතින්, 238,766 ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්න දෙකක්  පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් LCQMC ගේ හොඳ සුභාවත් විතරයි නෙවෙයි නමුත් මේ කෝර්පුස් වල ඉතුරු පරීක්', 'so': "Lacagta su'aalaha aad u weyn ee shirkadda la isku mid yahay ayaa aad u xaday horumarinta qaababka isku mid ah ee ka jawaabta nidaamka QA, khusuusan afka ingiriisiga ee aan Ingiriiska ahayn. Si loo barbaariyo xaaladan, warqadan ayaannu ku soo bandhignaynaa su'aalo badan oo Shiino ah oo u eg korpus (magaca LCQMC), kaas oo loo sii daabacay public1. LCQMC waa mid ka caadi ah qofka ku qoran qoraalka lambarka ah, sababtoo ah waxay focus ugu leedahay intent ku habboon wax ka bedela fasaxa. Sida loo soo ururiyo noocyo badan oo ku qoran luuqado kala duduwan, taas oo ku imaan kara isku mid, waa goobta ugu horeeya dhismaha korpus. Qoraalkan waxaynu marka hore u isticmaalnaa mashiinka raadinta si aan ugu soo ururinno labada su'aalood oo la xiriira hadallada sare ee degmooyinka kala duduwan, kadibna waxaynu ku filtereynaa laba noocyo oo aan cilmi lahayn meesha ay Wasserstein ka leedahay, ugudambaystana waxaan u jareynaa saddex wax ka mid ah si ay u fiiriyaan labada bidix. Markaas kadib waxaa la dhisaa su'aalo u eg qofka wax ku saabsan 260,068 qof. Si aan u xaqiijinno luqada LCQMC, waxaan u kala qeybinaynaa saddex qayb, taas oo ah kooras ku qoran 238,766 labadood oo su'aal ah, horumarinta oo ay leedahay 8,802 labadood oo su'aalo ah, iyo imtixaanka ay leedahay 12,500 qof oo su'aal ah, waxaana imtixaannaa qaabab aad u yaqaan. Abaalka imtixaanka looma muujin karo tusaale ahaan fiican ee LCQMC oo keliya, laakiin waxaa sidoo kale lagu fidiyaa baaritaanka hoose ee baaritaanka sii socda.", 'sv': 'Bristen på storskalig frågematchning corpora begränsar kraftigt utvecklingen av matchningsmetoder i fråga svarssystem, särskilt för icke-engelska språk. För att förbättra denna situation introducerar vi i denna uppsats en storskalig kinesisk frågematchande korpus (kallad LCQMC), som släpps till publicit1. LCQMC är mer generellt än parafraskorpus eftersom det fokuserar på intent matchning snarare än parafrasering. Hur man samlar in ett stort antal frågepar i olika språkliga former, som kan uppvisa samma avsikt, är nyckelpunkten för en sådan korpuskonstruktion. I denna uppsats använder vi först en sökmotor för att samla in storskaliga frågepar relaterade till högfrekventa ord från olika domäner, sedan filtrera irrelevanta par efter Wasserstein avstånd, och slutligen rekrytera tre kommentatorer för att manuellt kontrollera vänster par. Efter denna process skapas en frågematchande korpus som innehåller 260 068 frågepar. För att verifiera LCQMC-korpusen delar vi upp den i tre delar, dvs. ett träningsset innehållande 238 766 frågepar, ett utvecklingsset med 8 802 frågepar och ett testset med 12 500 frågepar, och testar flera välkända meningsmatchningsmetoder på den. De experimentella resultaten visar inte bara den goda kvaliteten på LCQMC utan ger också solid baslinje prestanda för ytterligare forskning på denna korpus.', 'ta': 'நிறுவனத்துடன் பொருந்தும் பெரிய அளவு கேள்வியின் குறைப்பு குறிப்பிட்ட பொருத்தும் முறைகளின் உருவாக்கத்தை மிகவும் வரம இந்த நிலையை ஒப்பிடுவதற்கு, இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பெரிய அளவு சீனா கேள்வியை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம் (LCQMC பெயர் LCQMC) பொருத்தும Name மொழிமாறி வடிவங்களில் பெரிய கேள்வி ஜோடிகளை எப்படி சேகரிக்க வேண்டும், அதே இலக்கத்தை கொண்டுள்ளலாம், அது போன்ற கோர்புஸ் கட்டுதல இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் முதலில் ஒரு தேடு இயந்திரத்தை பயன்படுத்தி உயர்வெளியேற்ற வார்த்தைகளில் இருந்து சேர்க்கும் பெரிய கேள்வி ஜோடிகளை சேகரி இந்த செயல்பாட்டிற்குப் பிறகு, 260,068 கேள்வி ஜோடி உள்ளது ஒரு கேள்வி கட்டப்பட்டுள்ளது. LCQMC குறியீட்டை சரிபார்க்க, நாம் அதை மூன்று பகுதிகளாக பிரிக்க வேண்டும், அதாவது, 238,766 கேள்வி ஜோடிகள் உள்ள பயிற்சி அமைப்பு, 8,802 கேள்வி ஜோடிகள் உள்ள முன்னேற்றம் அமைப் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் LCQMC சிறந்த தரம் மட்டும் மட்டும் காட்டவில்லை ஆனால் இந்த கோர்ப்ஸில் மேலும் ஆராய்ச்சிகளுக்கு வலிம', 'ur': 'بہت بڑی سؤال کے کفار کے مطابق ملنے والی سؤال کے کفار سے زیادہ محدود ہے کہ سوال کے جواب (QA) سیسٹم کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق کے مطابق (غیر انگلیسی زبانوں کے لئے) م اس موقعیت کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے، اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ایک بڑی سنگین چینی سؤال کی معرفی کرتا ہے جس کا نام LCQMC ہے، جو پورک ۱ کے لئے آزاد کیا گیا ہے۔ LCQMC پارافریز کورپوس سے زیادہ عمومی ہے کیونکہ یہ پارافریز کے بغیر مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق ہے۔ کس طرح بہت سے سوال جوڑوں کو مختلف زبان شناسی فرموں میں جمع کرنا، جو ایک ہی قصد کے ساتھ پیش کرسکتے ہیں، یہ ایسی کورپوس بنانے کے لئے کلی نقطہ ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلے ایک تلاش انجین استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ بہت سی سؤال جوڑوں کو جمع کریں جو مختلف دامنوں سے بلند فرکانسی کلمات کے ساتھ مرتبہ ہیں، پھر واس رسٹین کے دور سے بے اثر جوڑوں کو فیلٹر کریں، اور آخر میں تین اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا ا اس پرسس کے بعد، ایک سوال جوڑا ہے جو 260 068 سوال جوڑے لگا رہا ہے۔ LCQMC کورپوس کی تصدیق کرنے کے لئے ہم نے اس کو تین قسموں میں تقسیم کیا ہے، یعنی 238 766 سوال جوڑوں کے ساتھ ایک تدریس سٹی ہے، 8 802 سوال جوڑوں کے ساتھ ایک تدریس سٹی ہے، اور 12 500 سوال جوڑوں کے ساتھ ایک تدریس سٹی ہے، اور اس پر بہت سے معلوم جماعت متفاوت کا امتحان کریں۔ آزمائش نتیجے صرف LCQMC کی اچھی کیفیت کو دکھاتے نہیں ہیں بلکہ اس کورپوس پر اضافہ تحقیقات کے لئے بھی مضبوط بنسطلین کی فعالیت ادا کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Bu holatni o'zgartirish uchun, bu qogʻozda, biz jamoatlar 1'ga bog'liq Xitoycha savol (LCQMC nomli LCQMC) kabi katta savollarni anglatamiz. Name Ko'pchilik tugmasi Bu qogʻozda biz birinchi marta qidirish vositasidan foydalanamiz, har xil frekven sonlaridan bog'liq so'zlarni ajratish uchun, keyin Wasserstein orasidan juda haqiqiqiy qo'llanmani filterlashmiz, va oxirida uchta taʼminlovchilarni qo'llab qo'llash uchun qo'llab-qoʻllash uchun. Bu jarayonning keyin 260,068 savol qoʻllangan savol yaratiladi. In order to verify the LCQMC corpus, we split it into three parts, i.e., a training set containing 238,766 question pairs, a development set with 8,802 question pairs, and a test set with 12,500 question pairs, and test several well-known sentence matching methods on it.  Tekshirish natijalari faqat LCQMC'ning yaxshi darajasini ko'rsatish mumkin, balki bu corpusdagi bir necha qidirishni bajarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự thiếu hụt các câu hỏi quy mô khớp với Hạ sĩ giới hạn rất lớn việc phát triển các phương pháp đáp ứng (QA) để trả lời, đặc biệt cho ngôn ngữ không tiếng Anh. Để cải thiện tình hình này, trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một câu hỏi lớn của Trung Quốc tương ứng với tập thể (LCQMC) được phát sóng ra công chúng. Kiểu biến dạng LCQMC còn phổ biến hơn lời giải cứu hữu hình vì nó tập trung vào ý chí khớp hơn là diễn giải. Cách thu thập một số lượng lớn các cặp câu hỏi theo dạng ngôn ngữ biến thể, mà có thể có cùng một mục đích, là mấu chốt cho việc xây dựng tập thể này. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta đầu tiên sử dụng một động cơ tìm kiếm để thu thập các câu hỏi lớn liên quan tới các từ tần số cao từ các miền khác nhau, sau đó lọc các cặp không liên quan theo khoảng cách Wasserstein, và cuối cùng tuyển ba chú thích để kiểm tra đôi bên trái. Sau quá trình này, một câu hỏi tương đương với tập thể chứa 26,068 các cặp câu hỏi được tạo ra. Để kiểm tra kết quả LCQMC Corpus, chúng tôi chia ra thành ba phần, là một bộ huấn luyện có nhóm 238, 126 câu hỏi, một bộ phát triển với cặp câu hỏi 8,802, và một bộ thử với cặp câu hỏi 12,500, và thử một vài phương pháp tương ứng với câu tương tự nổi tiếng. Các kết quả thử nghiệm không chỉ chứng minh chất lượng tốt của LCQMC, mà còn cung cấp khả năng cơ sở vững chắc để nghiên cứu thêm về tập thể này.', 'da': 'Manglen på store spørgsmål matching corpora begrænser i høj grad udviklingen af matching metoder i spørgsmål svar (QA) system, især for ikke-engelske sprog. For at forbedre denne situation præsenterer vi i denne artikel et omfattende kinesisk spørgsmålstegningskorpus (kaldet LCQMC), som udgives til offentligheden1. LCQMC er mere generel end parafrase corpus, da det fokuserer på intent matching snarere end parafrase. Hvordan man samler et stort antal spørgsmål par i variantsproglige former, som kan præsentere samme hensigt, er nøglepunktet for en sådan korpuskonstruktion. I denne artikel bruger vi først en søgemaskine til at indsamle store spørgsmål par relateret til højfrekvente ord fra forskellige domæner, derefter filtrere irrelevante par efter Wasserstein afstanden, og til sidst rekruttere tre kommentatorer til manuelt at kontrollere venstre par. Efter denne proces konstrueres et spørgsmålsmatchende korpus, der indeholder 260.068 spørgsmålspar. For at bekræfte LCQMC-korpusset opdeler vi det i tre dele, dvs. et træningssæt indeholdende 238.766 spørgsmål par, et udviklingssæt med 8.802 spørgsmål par og et testsæt med 12.500 spørgsmål par, og teste flere velkendte sætningsmateriel på det. De eksperimentelle resultater viser ikke kun den gode kvalitet af LCQMC, men giver også solid baseline ydeevne til yderligere undersøgelser af dette korpus.', 'nl': 'Het ontbreken van grootschalige vragen matching corpora beperkt de ontwikkeling van matching methodes in question responsing (QA) systeem, vooral voor niet-Engelse talen. Om deze situatie te verbeteren, introduceren we in dit artikel een grootschalig Chinees vragenmatching corpus (genaamd LCQMC), dat aan het publiek wordt vrijgegeven.1 LCQMC is meer algemeen dan parafrase corpus omdat het zich richt op intent matching in plaats van parafrase. Hoe een groot aantal vraagparen in verschillende taalvormen te verzamelen, die dezelfde intentie kunnen hebben, is het sleutelpunt voor een dergelijke corpusconstructie. In dit artikel gebruiken we eerst een zoekmachine om grootschalige vraagparen te verzamelen met betrekking tot hoogfrequente woorden uit verschillende domeinen, vervolgens irrelevante paren te filteren op de Wasserstein afstand, en ten slotte rekruteren we drie annotatoren om handmatig de linkerparen te controleren. Na dit proces wordt een vraagmatching corpus opgebouwd dat 260,068 vraagparen bevat. Om het LCQMC corpus te verifiëren, splitsen we het op in drie delen, namelijk een trainingsset met 238,766 vraagparen, een ontwikkelingsset met 8,802 vraagparen en een testset met 12,500 vraagparen, en testen we er verschillende bekende zinnenaanpassingsmethoden op. De experimentele resultaten tonen niet alleen de goede kwaliteit van LCQMC aan, maar bieden ook solide basisprestaties voor verder onderzoek naar dit corpus.', 'bg': 'Липсата на мащабни корпуси за съвпадение на въпроси значително ограничава разработването на методите за съвпадение в системата за отговор на въпроси, особено за езици, които не са английски. За да подобрим тази ситуация, в настоящата статия представяме мащабен китайски корпус за съвпадение на въпросите (наречен ЛККМС), който е публикуван на обществеността.1 LCQMC е по-общ от парафразовия корпус, тъй като се фокусира върху съвпадението на намеренията, а не върху парафразата. Как да съберем голям брой двойки въпроси в вариантни лингвистични форми, които могат да представят същото намерение, е ключова точка за такова корпусно изграждане. В тази статия първо използваме търсачка, за да съберем мащабни двойки въпроси, свързани с високочестотни думи от различни домейни, след това филтрираме нерелевантни двойки по разстоянието и накрая набираме три анотатора, за да проверим ръчно левите двойки. След този процес се конструира корпус, който съдържа 260 068 двойки въпроси. За да проверим корпуса, ние го разделихме на три части, т.е. тренировъчен комплект, съдържащ 238 766 двойки въпроси, разработен комплект с 8 802 двойки въпроси и тестен комплект с 12 500 двойки въпроси и тестваме няколко добре познати метода за съвпадение на изречения върху него. Експерименталните резултати не само демонстрират доброто качество на LCQMC, но и осигуряват солидни базови резултати за по-нататъшни изследвания на този корпус.', 'de': 'Das Fehlen von groß angelegten Fragen-Matching-Korpora schränkt die Entwicklung von Matching-Methoden im Frage-Antwortsystem (QA) stark ein, insbesondere für nicht-englische Sprachen. Um diese Situation zu verbessern, stellen wir in diesem Beitrag ein großes chinesisches Fragenkatalog-Korpus (LCQMC) vor, das der Öffentlichkeit veröffentlicht wird.1 LCQMC ist allgemeiner als Paraphrasenkorpus, da es sich auf Intent Matching anstatt auf Paraphrasen konzentriert. Wie man eine große Anzahl von Fragenpaaren in variierenden linguistischen Formen sammelt, die die gleiche Intention aufweisen können, ist der Schlüsselpunkt für eine solche Korpuskonstruktion. In dieser Arbeit verwenden wir zunächst eine Suchmaschine, um großformatige Fragenpaare zu sammeln, die sich auf hochfrequente Wörter aus verschiedenen Domänen beziehen, dann irrelevante Paare nach der Wasserstein-Entfernung zu filtern und schließlich drei Annotatoren zu rekrutieren, um die linken Paare manuell zu überprüfen. Nach diesem Prozess wird ein Frageabgleichskorpus konstruiert, der 260,068 Fragepaare enthält. Um das LCQMC-Korpus zu verifizieren, teilen wir es in drei Teile auf, d.h. ein Trainingsset mit 238,766 Fragenpaaren, ein Entwicklungsset mit 8,802 Fragenpaaren und ein Testset mit 12.500 Fragenpaaren, und testen mehrere bekannte Satzabgleich-Methoden darauf. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse belegen nicht nur die gute Qualität des LCQMC, sondern liefern auch eine solide Ausgangsleistung für weitere Untersuchungen an diesem Korpus.', 'hr': 'Nedostatak velike pitanja odgovarajućeg tijela veoma ograničava razvoj odgovarajućih metoda u pitanju odgovarajućeg sustava (QA), posebno za jezike koji ne odgovaraju engleskim jezicima. Da bi poboljšali ovu situaciju, u ovom papiru, predstavljamo veliko kinesko pitanje odgovarajuće korpusu (po imenu LCQMC), koje se objavljuje javnoš1. LCQMC je općeniji od parafraze korpusa jer se fokusira na namjeru poklapanja umjesto parafraze. Kako skupljati veliki broj pitanja par u varijantnim jezičkim oblicima, koji mogu predstaviti istu namjeru, je ključna tačka za takvu korpusnu konstrukciju. U ovom papiru, prvi put koristimo pretraživač za skupljanje velike skale pitanja vezane za riječi visoke frekvencije iz različitih domena, zatim filtriramo nevažne pare od udaljenosti Wasserstein a, i konačno regrutiramo tri annotatora kako bi ručno provjerili lijeve pare. Nakon ovog procesa, izgrađeno je pitanje odgovarajuće korpusu koja sadrži 260 068 pitanja par. Da bismo potvrdili korpus LCQMC-a, podelili smo ga na tri dijela, tj. obuku koja sadrži 238.766 parova pitanja, razvoj postavljen sa 8.802 parova pitanja, i test postavljen sa 12.500 parova pitanja, i testirali nekoliko poznatih metoda odgovarajućih rečenica na njemu. Eksperimentalni rezultati ne samo pokazuju dobru kvalitetu LCQMC-a, već također pružaju čvrstu početnu funkciju za daljnje istraživanje ovog korpusa.', 'id': 'Kekurangan pertanyaan skala besar yang cocok dengan corpora sangat membatasi perkembangan metode cocok dalam sistem jawaban pertanyaan (QA), terutama untuk bahasa bukan Inggris. Untuk memperbaiki situasi ini, dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan pertanyaan besar-skala Cina yang cocok corpus (bernama LCQMC), yang dibebaskan kepada publik1. LCQMC lebih umum daripada parafrasa mayat karena fokus pada tujuan sepadan daripada parafrasa. Bagaimana mengumpulkan jumlah besar pasangan pertanyaan dalam bentuk bahasa varian, yang mungkin menunjukkan tujuan yang sama, adalah titik kunci untuk konstruksi corpus seperti itu. Dalam kertas ini, kita pertama-tama menggunakan mesin pencarian untuk mengumpulkan pasangan pertanyaan skala besar yang berhubungan dengan kata-kata frekuensi tinggi dari berbagai domain, kemudian filter pasangan yang tidak relevan dengan jarak Wasserstein, dan akhirnya merekrut tiga annotator untuk memeriksa secara manual pasangan kiri. Setelah proses ini, pertanyaan yang cocok dengan corpus yang mengandung 260.068 pasangan pertanyaan dibangun. Untuk memverifikasi LCQMC corpus, kami membaginya menjadi tiga bagian, yaitu set latihan yang mengandung 238.766 pasangan pertanyaan, sebuah perkembangan yang mengandung 8.802 pasangan pertanyaan, dan sebuah set tes dengan 12.500 pasangan pertanyaan, dan menguji beberapa metode yang cocok kalimat yang dikenal di atasnya. Hasil percobaan tidak hanya menunjukkan kualitas yang baik dari LCQMC tetapi juga menyediakan prestasi dasar yang kuat untuk penelitian lanjut pada korpus ini.', 'ko': '대규모 문제 매칭 자료 라이브러리의 부족은 퀴즈 시스템에서 매칭 방법의 발전, 특히 비영어 언어의 발전을 크게 제한했다.이러한 상황을 개선하기 위해 본고는 대규모 중국어 문제 일치 자료 라이브러리(LCQMC)를 소개했는데 이 자료 라이브러리는 이미 대중에게 발표되었다.LCQMC는 뜻풀이 어료 라이브러리보다 더 통용된다. 뜻풀이가 아니라 의도적 일치에 주목하기 때문이다.어떻게 대량의 서로 다른 언어 형식의 문제를 수집하는가, 이런 문제들이 같은 의도를 나타낼 수 있는지가 이런 언어 자료 라이브러리를 구축하는 관건이다.본고에서 우리는 먼저 검색엔진을 이용하여 각 분야에서 고주파어와 관련된 대규모 문제 쌍을 수집한 다음에 Wasserstein 거리 필터에 따라 상관없는 문제 쌍을 필터하고 마지막으로 3명의 주석을 모집하여 나머지 문제 쌍을 수동으로 검사한다.이 과정 이후 260068개의 문제 쌍을 포함하는 질문 일치 자료 라이브러리를 구축했습니다.LCQMC 자료 라이브러리를 검증하기 위해 우리는 238766개의 문제 쌍을 포함하는 훈련집, 8802개의 문제 쌍을 포함하는 개발집과 12500개의 문제 쌍을 포함하는 테스트집으로 세 부분으로 나누어 몇 가지 유명한 문장 일치 방법을 테스트했다.실험 결과는 LCQMC의 양호한 품질을 증명할 뿐만 아니라 이 어료 라이브러리를 더욱 연구하기 위해 견고한 기선 성능을 제공하였다.', 'fa': 'ناتوانی سؤال مقیاس بزرگ با شرکت بسیار محدود می\u200cکند توسعه روش\u200cهای متفاوت در سیستم پاسخ (QA) سوال، مخصوصا برای زبانهای غیر انگلیسی. برای تغییر این وضعیت، در این کاغذ، یک سؤال چینی بزرگ با شرکت کورپوس (به نام LCQMC) معرفی می\u200cکنیم، که به جامعه ۱ آزاد می\u200cشود. LCQMC ژنرال بیشتری از کلمه\u200cای است که به جای کلمه\u200cای متمرکز می\u200cشود. چگونه جمع کردن چند جفت سوال را در فرم زبان\u200cشناسی متفاوت، که ممکن است یک هدف را نشان دهد، نقطه کلید برای ساختن چنین جسد است. در این کاغذ، اول از یک موتور جستجو استفاده می کنیم تا جفت سوال بسیار بزرگ را در ارتباط با کلمات فرانسوی بالا از دامنه های مختلف جمع کنیم، سپس جفت های بی ارتباطی را با فاصله واسرستین فیلتر دهیم، و بالاخره سه آشنا کننده را جمع کنیم تا جفت چپ را دستگیر کنیم. بعد از این فرایند، یک سوال با کورپوس مشابه دارد که شامل 260.068 جفت سوال ساخته می شود. برای تصدیق کردن کورپوس LCQMC، آن را به سه قسمت تقسیم کردیم، یعنی یک مجموعه آموزش شامل 238.766 جفت سوال، یک توسعه مجموعه با جفت 8.802 سوال، و یک مجموعه آزمایش با جفت 12.500 سوال، و چندین روش\u200cهای مشترک را امتحان کردیم. نتیجه آزمایشی نه تنها کیفیت خوب LCQMC را نشان می دهد، بلکه برای تحقیقات بیشتری در این کورپوس اجرا می کند.', 'sw': 'Ukosefu wa maswali makubwa yanayofanana na kampuni yanazuia maendeleo ya njia zinazofanana sana katika majibu ya mfumo wa QA, hasa kwa lugha isiyo ya Kiingereza. Kupambana na hali hii, katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha swali kubwa la Kichina linalofanana na makampuni haya (inayoitwa LCQMC), ambalo limetolewa kwa umma 1. LCQMC ni mkuu zaidi ya viungo vya upinzani kwa sababu inajikita kwenye lengo la kupambana na badala ya upinzani. Namna ya kukusanya wanandoa wengi wa maswali katika a in a mbalimbali za lugha, ambayo inaweza kuleta lengo hilo hilo, ni jambo muhimu kwa ujenzi wa makampuni haya. Katika karatasi hii, kwa mara ya kwanza tunatumia moto wa kutafuta kukusanya maswali makubwa yanayohusiana na maneno ya kiwango cha juu kutoka maeneo mbalimbali, kisha kuchuja viwili wasio na usawa na Wasserstein, na hatimaye tunarekodi matatizo matatu ili kuwachunguza viwili vya kushoto. Baada ya mchakato huu, swali linalofanana na makampuni yenye maswali 260,068 imejengwa. Ili kuthibitisha makampuni ya LCQMC, tuligawanya katika sehemu tatu, yaani, set i ya mafunzo yenye wanandoa 238,766, maendeleo yenye jozi 8,802 za maswali, na jaribio lililotengenezwa na wanandoa 12,500 za swali, na kujaribu njia kadhaa zinazofanana nayo. Matokeo ya majaribio siyo tu yanaonyesha ubora mzuri wa LCQMC bali pia inatoa ufanisi wa msingi wa utafiti wa zaidi kwenye mashindano haya.', 'am': 'ኮርፖርት በሚያስተካክሉ ታላቁ ጥያቄ ጎደለበት የQA (QA) ስርዓት፣ በተለየ እንግሊዘኛ ቋንቋዎች ለመቀበል የሚተካክለውን ሥርዓት መግለጫ እጅግ ግልፅ ያደርጋል፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለማስተካከል፣ በዚህ ገጽ፣ ለብሔራዊው ፕሬዝዳንት የተፈቀደ የቻይና ጥያቄን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በአካላት ማቀናቀል በመጠቀም ላይ ማስታወቂያ ነው፡፡ በተለየ ቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ ብዙ ጥያቄዎችን እንዴት ለመቀበል፣ ይህንን ጉዳይ እንዲያሳየው የቆርፓስ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አስቀድመን፣ የቁጥጥር ቁጥጥር የሚታያየውን የቁጥጥር ሁለቶችን ከመከታተል እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ከዚህም ፕሮግራም በኋላ 260,068 ጥያቄ እየያዘው የቆርፓስ ጥያቄ ይሠራል፡፡ LCQMC ኮርፓስ ለማረጋገጥ፣ 238,766 ጥያቄ ሁለት ያላቸው ተማሪ ማዕከል፣ 8,802 ጥያቄ ሁለት እና 12,500 ጥያቄ ዓይነቶች የሚታወቁ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት እና በርካታ የሚታወቁትን ሥርዓት ይሞክራለን፡፡ ፈተናው ውጤቶች የLCQMC ጥሩ ጥሩ ብዛት ብቻ አይደለም ነገር ግን በዚህ ኮርፓስ ላይ ጥላቅ የድምፅ ውጤት እንዲያሳያል ነው፡፡', 'tr': "Korpora ýerleşýän uly ölçekli soragyň ýok bolmagy soraglama sistemasynda (QA) ýerleşýän täzelikleri döredişi, iňlis dilleri ýok bolmazlar üçin kän bir limite edýär. Bu ýagdaýy düzeltmek üçin, şu kagyzda uluy ölçekli Çin çe soragy jemgyýetli korpusa (LCQMC adly) täze laýyk getirilýäris. _BAR_ Birnäçe soragy lingwistiki biçimlerde nähili ýygnamak, şol bir maksadyň şol korpusyň esasy nokady. Bu kagyzda ilkinji gezek uly ölçekli sorag çizgilerini götürmek üçin ullanýarys, soňra Wasserstein aralygyna görä garypsyz çizgileri süýtget we soňra sol çizgileri ellen barlamak üçin üç täsir eden çizgileri ulanýarys. Bu proses soňra 260,068 soragy çift guralýan corpus bilen meňzeşleýär. LCQMC korpusyny barlamak üçin, oňa üç bölüme böldik, ýaly 238,766 soragy çift bolan okuwçysy, 8.802 soragy çift bilen düzümlenme we 12.500 soragy çift bilen düzümlenme we munyň üstünde birnäçe tanyş sözlemi barlamak üçin. Deneymeli netijeler diňe LCQMC'iň gowy kalitesini görkezmez, ýöne bu korpusyň başga barlag üçin gaty baseline ukyplary saýlaýarlar.", 'af': "Die ontbreek van groot-skaal vraag wat ooreenstemmende korpora groot beperk die ontwikkeling van ooreenstemmende metodes in vraag antwoord (QA) stelsel, veral vir nie-Engels tale. Om hierdie situasie te amelioriseer, in hierdie papier, introduseer ons 'n groot-skaal Sjinese vraag wat ooreenstemmende corpus (genaamd LCQMC), wat aan die publiek 1 verlos is. LCQMC is meer algemeen as parafrase korpus omdat dit fokus op doel ooreenstemmende as parafrase. Hoe om 'n groot aantal vraagpaars in variante lingwisiese vorms te versamel, wat dalk dieselfde doel kan voorsien, is die sleutelpunt vir sodanige korpus konstruksie. In hierdie papier, ons gebruik eerste 'n soektog masjien om groot-skaal vraag paar te samel wat verwanter is met hoë-frekwensie woorde van verskeie domeine, dan filter onbelangrike paar deur die Wasserstein afstand, en eindelik recruit drie annotators om die linker paar te kontroleer. Na hierdie proses is 'n vraag ooreenstemmende korpus wat bevat 260 068 vraag paar is konstrukteer. Om die LCQMC corpus te bevestig, skei ons dit in drie dele, t.d. 'n onderwerking stel bevat 238 766 vraag paar, 'n ontwikkeling stel met 8,802 vraag paar, en 'n toets stel met 12,500 vraag paar, en toets verskeie goed bekende seting ooreenstemmende metodes daarop. Die eksperimentale resultate vertoon nie alleen die goeie kwaliteit van LCQMC nie, maar ook solide basisline prestasie vir verdere resekinge op hierdie korpus verskaf.", 'sq': 'Mungesa e pyetjeve në shkallë të madhe që përshtaten me korprën kufizon shumë zhvillimin e metodave të përshtatshme në sistemin e përgjigjes në pyetje (QA), veçanërisht për gjuhët jo-angleze. Për të përmirësuar këtë gjendje, në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një pyetje të madhe kineze të përshtatshme me corpus (të quajtur LCQMC), e cila është lëshuar në publik1. LCQMC është më e përgjithshme se parafraza corpus ndërsa përqëndrohet në përputhje me qëllim në vend të parafrazës. Si të mbledhim një numër të madh çiftesh pyetjesh në formë gjuhësore të ndryshme, që mund të paraqesin të njëjtin qëllim, është pika kyçe për ndërtimin e këtij korpusi. Në këtë letër, ne së pari përdorim një motor kërkimi për të mbledhur çifte pyetjesh në shkallë të madhe lidhur me fjalët me frekuencë të lartë nga fusha të ndryshme, pastaj filtrojmë çifte të panjohura nga distanca Wasserstein, dhe më në fund rekrutojmë tre anotatorë për të kontrolluar manualisht çiftet e majta. Pas këtij procesi, ndërtohet një pyetje që përputhet me korpusin që përmban 260,068 çifte pyetjeje. Me qëllim që të verifikojmë LCQMC corpus, e ndajmë në tre pjesë, pra, një grup trajnimi që përmban 238,766 çifte pyetjesh, një grup zhvillimi me 8,802 çifte pyetjesh dhe një grup testimi me 12,500 çifte pyetjesh, dhe të testojmë disa metoda të njohura që përputhen me fjalët. Rezultatet eksperimentale jo vetëm demonstrojnë cilësinë e mirë të LCQMC por ofrojnë gjithashtu rezultate të qëndrueshme bazë për kërkime të mëtejshme në këtë korpus.', 'hy': 'Կորպորան համապատասխանելու մեծ հարցերի բացակայությունը մեծապես սահմանափակում է հարկավոր մեթոդների զարգացումը հարկավոր պատասխանների համակարգի համար, հատկապես ոչ անգլերեն լեզուների համար: Այս իրավիճակը բարելավելու համար, այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մեծ չինական հարց, որը համապատասխանում է կորպոսին (որը կոչվում է LCQMC), որը հրապարակում է հանրային:1 LCQMC-ն ավելի ընդհանուր է, քան պարաֆրեզիայի մարմինը, քանի որ այն կենտրոնանում է նպատակի համապատասխանման վրա, քան պարաֆրեզիայի վրա: Ինչպե՞ս հավաքել բազմաթիվ հարցազույգեր տարբեր լեզվաբանական ձևերով, որոնք կարող են նույն մտադրությունը ներկայացնել, այս մարմնի կառուցվածքի հիմնական կետն է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք սկզբում օգտագործում ենք փնտրողի շարժիչ հավաքելու մեծ հարցերի զույգեր, որոնք կապված են բարձր հաճախականությամբ բառերի հետ տարբեր բնագավառներից, հետո ֆիլտրում ենք անկարևոր զույգեր Վասերշտեյնի հեռավորության վրա, և վերջապես հավաքելու երե Այս գործընթացի հետո կառուցվում է մի հարց, որը համապատասխանում է կորպուսին, որը պարունակում է 260,068 հարցազույգ: LCQMC կորպոսի ստուգելու համար մենք բաժանեցինք այն երեք մասերի, այսինքն՝ 238,766 հարցային զույգ, 8,802 հարցային զույգով զարգացման համակարգ, 12,500 հարցային զույգով փորձարկման համակարգ և փորձարկեցինք մի քանի հայտնի նախադասությունների համապատասխանման մեթոդներ դրա վրա: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ոչ միայն ցույց են տալիս LCQMC-ի լավ որակը, այլ նաև ապահովում են հաստատ հիմնական արդյունք այս մարմնի վերաբերյալ հետազոտությունների համար:', 'az': "Büyük ölçülü sual yoxdur ki, korpora ilə uyuşmaq məqsədilə cavab verən (QA) sistemini, özlərinə də İngilizə dili olmayan məqsədilə uyuşmaq məqsədilə müəyyən edir. Bu vəziyyəti düzəltmək üçün, bu kağıtda böyük ölçülü Çin soruşu ilə birlikdə CCQMC adlı corpus ilə təşkil edirik. Bu çox böyük qiymətli bir Cənnətdir. LCQMC parafraz korpusundan daha genel idi, çünki parafraz yerinə niyyətlə uyuşmaq niyyətinə odaqlanır. Bu korpus in şaatının anahtarı noktasıdır. Bu kağızda ilk dəfə çox yüksək frekans sözləri ilə birləşdirmək üçün bir arama maşınını istifadə edirik, sonra Wasserstein uzaqlarına bağlı cütləri filtreyirik, sonunda sol çiftəri əllə təşkil etmək üçün üç annotator toplayırıq. Bu prosesdən sonra 260.068 sual çift olan corpus ilə uyuşan bir sual inşa edilir. LCQMC korpusu təsdiqləmək üçün, onu üç parçaya böldük, yani 238.766 sual çift olan təhsil qurması, 8.802 sual çift olan təhsil qurması və 12.500 sual çift ilə təhsil qurması və bunun üstündə bir çox tanıdıqları cümlələr uyuşmaq üçün test edirik. Bu təcrübə sonuçları yalnız LCQMC'in yaxşı keyfiyyətini göstərmək deyildir, lakin bu korpus üstündə daha çox araştırmalar üçün də möhkəm təcrübə göstərir.", 'bs': 'Nedostatak velike pitanja odgovarajućeg tijela veoma ograničava razvoj odgovarajućih metoda u pitanju odgovarajućeg sustava (QA), posebno za non-engleske jezike. Da bi se ova situacija, u ovom papiru, predstavljamo veliko kinesko pitanje odgovarajuće korpusu (po imenu LCQMC), koje se objavljuje javnoš1. LCQMC je općeniji od parafraze korpusa jer se fokusira na namjeru poklapanja umjesto parafraze. Kako skupljati veliki broj parova pitanja u varijantnim lingvističkim oblicima, koji mogu predstaviti istu namjeru, je ključna tačka za takvu korpusnu konstrukciju. U ovom papiru, prvi put koristimo pretraživač za skupljanje velike skale pitanja vezane za riječi visoke frekvencije iz različitih domena, zatim filtriramo nevažne parove od udaljenosti Wasserstein, i konačno regrutiramo tri annotatora da bi manuelno provjerili lijeve pare. Nakon ovog procesa, izgrađeno je pitanje koje odgovara korpusu koja sadrži 260 068 pitanja par. Da bismo potvrdili korpus LCQMC-a, podelili smo ga na tri dijela, tj. obuku koja sadrži 238.766 parova pitanja, razvoj postavljen sa 8.802 parova pitanja, i test postavljen sa 12.500 parova pitanja, i testirali nekoliko poznatih metoda odgovarajućih rečenica na njemu. Eksperimentalni rezultati ne samo pokazuju dobru kvalitetu LCQMC-a, već također pružaju čvrstu osnovnu funkciju za daljnje istraživanje ovog korpusa.', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর (কিউএ) সিস্টেমের (বিশেষ করে ইংরেজি ভাষার জন্য) প্রশ্নের প্রশ্নের অভাব অনেক সীমাবদ্ধ করেছে। এই পরিস্থিতিকে তুলনা করার জন্য, এই পত্রিকায়, আমরা একটি বিশাল পরিমাণ চীনা প্রশ্নের সাথে উপস্থাপন করেছি (এলসিকিউএমসি) নামের একটি প্রশ্ন, যা  এলসিকিউএমসি প্যারাফ্রেস কোর্পাসের চেয়েও বেশী সাধারণ যেহেতু এটি প্যারাফ্রেসের চেয়ে মিলিয়ে দেয়ার দিকে  ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষায় বিভিন্ন ভাষায় বেশ কয়েকটি প্রশ্ন জোট সংগ্রহ করতে পারে, যা একই উদ্দেশ্যে উপস্থিত হতে পারে, এটি হল এই কোর্পাস নির্ম এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রথমে একটি সার্চ ইঞ্জিন ব্যবহার করি বিভিন্ন ডোমেন থেকে উচ্চ-ফ্রেন্সি শব্দের সাথে সম্পর্কিত বিশাল প্রশ্নের জোড়া সংগ্রহ করার জন্য, তারপর ওয়াসের্স এই প্রক্রিয়ার পরে একটি প্রশ্ন তৈরি করা হয়েছে যার মধ্যে ২৬০,০৬৮ প্রশ্নের জোড়া আছে। এলসিকিউএমসি কোর্পাস পরীক্ষা করার জন্য আমরা এটি তিন অংশে ভাগ করে দিয়েছি, যার মধ্যে ২৩৮,৭৬৬ প্রশ্নের জোড়া আছে একটি প্রশিক্ষণের সেট, একটি উন্নয়ন সেট যা ৮,৮০২ প্রশ্ন জোড়ায়, আর একটি পরী পরীক্ষার ফলাফল শুধুমাত্র এলসিকিউএমসির ভাল মান প্রদর্শন করে না, কিন্তু এই কোর্পাসে আরো গবেষণা প্রদান করার জন্য সোজা বেসাইলাইনের', 'ca': "The lack of large-scale question matching corpora greatly limits the development of matching methods in question answering (QA) system, especially for non-English languages.  To ameliorate this situation, in this paper, we introduce a large-scale Chinese question matching corpus (named LCQMC), which is released to the public1.  LCQMC és més general que parafrases corpus mentre es centra en comparar intencions en comptes de parafrases. Com recollir un gran nombre de parells de preguntes en formes lingüístices variants, que poden presentar la mateixa intenció, és el punt clau d'aquesta construcció de corpus. En aquest paper, primer fem servir un motor de cerca per recollir parells de preguntes a gran escala relacionats amb paraules d'alta freqüència de diversos dominis, després filtrem parells irrelevants per la distància de Wasserstein, i finalment reclutam tres anotators per verificar manualment els parells esquerrats. Després d'aquest procés, es construeix un corpus de preguntes que conté 260.068 parells de preguntes. Per verificar el corpus LCQMC, el dividim en tres parts, és a dir, un conjunt d'entrenament que contenia 238.766 parells de preguntes, un conjunt de desenvolupament amb 8.802 parells de preguntes, i un conjunt d'exàmens amb 12.500 parells de preguntes, i li examinem diversos mètodes coneguts d'ajustament de frases. Els resultats experimentals no només demostren la bona qualitat del LCQMC, sino que també proporcionen un rendiment de base sólid per a més investigacions sobre aquest cos.", 'cs': 'Nedostatek rozsáhlých korpusů pro porovnávání otázek výrazně omezuje vývoj metod porovnávání v systému odpovědí na otázky (QA), zejména pro neanglické jazyky. Abychom tuto situaci zlepšili, v tomto článku představujeme rozsáhlý korpus odpovídající čínským otázkám (LCQMC), který je zveřejněn veřejnosti.1 LCQMC je obecnější než parafrázový korpus, protože se zaměřuje spíše na odpovídání záměrů než na parafrázu. Klíčovým bodem pro takovou konstrukci korpusu je sbírat velké množství otázek v variantních jazykových formách, které mohou představovat stejný záměr. V tomto článku nejprve používáme vyhledávač k shromažďování rozsáhlých otázkových párů souvisejících s vysokofrekvenčními slovy z různých domén, následně filtrujeme irelevantní páry podle vzdálenosti Wassersteina a nakonec získáme tři anotátory, kteří ručně kontrolují levé páry. Po tomto procesu je vytvořen korpus odpovídající otázce obsahující páry 260,068 otázek. K ověření korpusu LCQMC jsme ho rozdělili na tři části, tj. tréninkovou sadu obsahující páry otázek 238,766, vývojovou sadu s páry otázek 8,802 a testovací sadu s páry otázek 12,500 a testovali na něm několik známých metod porovnávání vět. Experimentální výsledky nejen demonstrují dobrou kvalitu LCQMC, ale také poskytují solidní základní výkon pro další výzkum tohoto korpusu.', 'et': 'Suuremahuliste küsimustele vastamise korpuste puudumine piirab oluliselt küsimustele vastamise meetodite (QA) väljatöötamist, eriti mitte-inglise keelte puhul. Selle olukorra parandamiseks tutvustame käesolevas töös laiaulatuslikku Hiina küsimuste sobivuse korpust (LCQMC), mis avaldatakse avalikkusele1. LCQMC on üldisem kui parafraasikorpus, kuna see keskendub pigem kavatsuste sobitamisele kui parafraasile. Kuidas koguda suurt hulka küsimuspaare erinevates keelelistes vormides, mis võivad esitada sama kavatsust, on sellise korpuse konstruktsiooni võtmepunkt. Selles töös kasutame esmalt otsingumootorit, et koguda erinevatest domeenidest pärit kõrgsageduslike sõnadega seotud suuremahulisi küsimuspaare, seejärel filtreerida ebaolulisi paare Wassersteini kauguse järgi ja lõpuks värvata kolm annotaatorit vasakute paaride käsitsi kontrollimiseks. Pärast seda protsessi koostatakse 260 068 küsimuspaari sisaldav korpus. LCQMC korpuse kontrollimiseks jagame selle kolmeks osaks, st 238 766 küsimuspaari sisaldava treeningkomplekti, 8 802 küsimuspaari arenduskomplekti ja 12 500 küsimuspaari testikomplekti ning testime sellel mitmeid tuntud lausesobitamise meetodeid. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused mitte ainult ei näita LCQMC head kvaliteeti, vaid pakuvad ka tugevat algtaset tulemuslikkust selle korpuse edasisteks uuringuteks.', 'fi': 'Suuren mittakaavan kysymystenvaihtokorpusten puuttuminen rajoittaa suuresti kysymystenvaihtomenetelmien (QA) kehittämistä erityisesti muilla kuin englanninkielisillä kielillä. Tilanteen parantamiseksi esittelemme tässä artikkelissa laajan kiinalaisen kysymyksen vastaavuuskorpuksen (LCQMC), joka julkaistaan yleisölle.1 LCQMC on yleisempi kuin parafraasikorpus, koska se keskittyy aiesopimukseen eikä parafraasiin. Korpusen rakentamisessa keskeisenä tekijänä on se, miten kootaan suuri määrä kysymyspareja eri kielimuodoissa, joilla voi olla sama tarkoitus. Tässä artikkelissa käytämme ensin hakukonetta keräämään suuria kysymyspareja, jotka liittyvät eri toimialueiden suurtaajuuksiin, suodattamaan epäolennaisia pareja Wassersteinin etäisyyden mukaan ja lopulta rekrytoimaan kolme huomautusta tarkistamaan vasemmat parit manuaalisesti. Tämän prosessin jälkeen muodostetaan kysymys täsmäävä korpus, joka sisältää 260 068 kysymysparia. LCQMC-korpusen todentamiseksi jaoimme sen kolmeen osaan eli 238 766 kysymysparia sisältävään koulutussarjaan, 8 802 kysymysparia sisältävään kehityssarjaan ja 12 500 kysymysparia sisältävään testisarjaan ja testasimme siinä useita tunnettuja lauseiden täsmäytysmenetelmiä. Kokeelliset tulokset eivät ainoastaan osoita LCQMC:n hyvää laatua, vaan tarjoavat myös vankan lähtötason suorituskyvyn tätä korpusta koskeviin jatkotutkimuksiin.', 'jv': 'Mangkin kang panggayong ing resang diagonang langkung wigat, ora bisa nggawe gerakan kanggo nguasai perusahaan sing dibutuhke sing bisa dianggap sistem sing bisa dianggap (qA), ngomong karo perusahaan kanggo langkung ingkang. Ngawe nambah durung iki, ning alih iki, awake dhéwé ngejaraké perusahaan anyar-scale Chinese sing gawe ngupakan karo perusahaan (jeneng LCqXM), sing dipungot ngomong kebebasané Publik1. text Awak dhéwé ngébuté akeh pisan nganggo perusahaan langkung sampek, sing ngomong nik kabèh kudu nggawe kudu podho akeh nggawe In this paper, we first use a Search Nalika perusahaan iki, akeh langkung sampeyan karo perusahaan sing sumulakno Ngubah bisa nggawe bahsa bakal mrak, kita bocah-bocah sing karo telu pating, t.e.g. Rejalaké sing paling nggambar kuwi nggambar kanggo kaliwat luwih dumadhi LCqXM karo nganggo perusahaan sing wis ambang nggawe nguasakno kanggo nambah urip iki.', 'sk': 'Pomanjkanje obsežnih korpusov za ujemanje vprašanj močno omejuje razvoj sistemov ujemanja metod za odgovor na vprašanja (QA), zlasti za jezike, ki niso angleški. Za izboljšanje tega položaja smo v tem prispevku predstavili obsežen kitajski korpus za ujemanje vprašanj (imenovan LCQMC), ki je objavljen javnosti1. LCQMC je splošnejši od parafraznega korpusa, saj se osredotoča na ujemanje namenov namena in ne na parafrazo. Ključna točka za takšno konstrukcijo korpusa je zbiranje velikega števila parov vprašanj v različnih jezikovnih oblikah, ki lahko predstavljajo enak namen. V tem prispevku najprej uporabljamo iskalnik za zbiranje obsežnih parov vprašanj, povezanih z visokofrekvenčnimi besedami iz različnih domen, nato filtriramo nepomembne pare po Wassersteinovi razdalji in končno zaposlimo tri opombe za ročno preverjanje levih parov. Po tem procesu je sestavljen korpus ujemanja vprašanj, ki vsebuje 260.068 parov vprašanj. Za preverjanje korpusa LCQMC smo ga razdelili na tri dele, tj. komplet usposabljanja, ki vsebuje 238.766 parov vprašanj, komplet razvoja z 8.802 parov vprašanj in testni komplet z 12.500 parov vprašanj ter na njem testirali več znanih metod ujemanja stavkov. Eksperimentalni rezultati ne samo dokazujejo dobro kakovost LCQMC, ampak zagotavljajo tudi trdno osnovno uspešnost za nadaljnje raziskave tega korpusa.', 'he': 'חוסר שאלות גדולות מתאימות לגופרה מגבילה מאוד את התפתחות של שיטות מתאימות במערכת התשובה לשאלה, במיוחד לשפות לא אנגליות. כדי לשפר את המצב הזה, בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים שאלה סינית גדולה מתאימה לקורפוס (בשם LCQMC), אשר משוחרר לציבור.1 LCQMC הוא גנרלי יותר מאשר גוף פרפרייזיה כפי שהוא מתמקד בתאמה בכוונה במקום פרייזיה. איך לאסוף מספר גדול של זוגות שאלות בצורות שפתיות שונות, שיכולות להציג את אותה כוונה, היא נקודת המפתח לבנייה של קורפוס כזה. בעיתון הזה, אנו קודם משתמשים במנוע חיפוש לאסוף זוגות שאלות בקנה מידה גדולה שקשורות למילים בתדר גבוה ממשפחות שונות, ואז מסננים זוגות לא רלוונטיות על ידי מרחק ווסקרסטיין, ולבסוף גייסו שלושה ציונים כדי לבדוק באופן ידני את הזוגים השמאליים. After this process, a question matching corpus that contains 260,068 question pairs is constructed.  כדי לאמת את הקורפוס של LCQMC, אנחנו מחלקים אותו לשלושה חלקים, כלומר, קבוצת אימונים שמכילה 238,766 זוגות שאלות, קבוצת פיתוח עם 8,802 זוגות שאלות, ומקבוצת מבחן עם 12,500 זוגות שאלות, ולבדוק כמה שיטות התאמת משפטים ידועות היטב עליה. התוצאות הניסוייות לא רק מראות את איכות הטובה של LCQMC, אלא גם מספקות ביצועים בסיסיים מוצקים למחקרים נוספים על הקורפוס הזה.', 'ha': "Babu tambayi mai girma mai daidai da shirin koronara yana kange developen metode masu daidaita da matsayin mai tambaya a cikin jibar da na'ura (QA), da haske ga harshen Ingiriya. To, in ƙayyade wannan halin, a cikin wannan takarda, za mu introduce wani tambayi mai girma na China mai daidaita nau'in rubutu (sunan LCQMC), wanda aka saka zuwa ga umarnin 1. @ info: whatsthis Yãya sami nau'in masu yawa na tambayi nau'i biyu masu cikin fassaran linguistic, da za'a iya zo da shirin ayuka, shine maɓallin mazaɓa wa wannan maɓalli na rubutu. Ga wannan takardan, za mu yi amfani da mashin search don mu sami nau'i biyu masu girma masu haɗi da magana masu tsawo daga duk-sauri, sa'an nan kuma mu filteri nau'i biyu wanda ba'a zartar da haske ba daga tsakanin Wassarstanin, kuma don a ƙarami ka sami matalauta uku dõmin ka yi dũbi duk biyu na hagu. Bayan wannan aikin, an gina wani tambayi mai daidaita nau'in da ke ƙunsa da nau'in-tambayar 260,068. Dõmin ka tabbatar da nau'in LCQMC, sai mu raba shi cikin rabon nau'i uku, misali, wani tsari mai ƙunsa da nau'i 23 8,766, wani shirin gabatar da nau'i 8,82 masu tambayi, da jarrabi wanda aka daidaita nau'i 12,000 na tambayi, kuma ka jarraba wasu shiryoyin da aka sanar da shi masu daidaita. Matarin jarrabai ba ta nuna tsarin mai kyau na LCQMC kawai kuma yana iya samar da salon da za'a samar kwamfyuta ƙaranci a kan wannan nau'in.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་མ་དངུལ་སྒྲིག་མཐུན་པའི་འགའ་བ་ཆེ་ཆུང་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་གི་མ་མཐུན དེའི་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་ལ་དུས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དྲི་ཚིག་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག LCQMC is more general than paraphrase corpus as it focuses on intent matching than paraphrase. སྐད་རིགས་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ནང་གི་དྲི་ཚིག་མང་པོ་ཞིག་སྒྲིག་དགོས་པ་དེ་ཚོ་རྩ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གཅིག་ཀྱང་འདྲ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས། In this paper, we first use a search engine to collect large-scale question pairs related to high-frequency words from various domains, then filter irrelevant pairs by the Wasserstein distance, and finally recruit three annotators to manually check the left pairs. འོན་ཀྱང་ལས་སྦྱོར་འདི་གི་རྗེས་སུ་260,068 དྲི་ཚིག་གུང་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཀུན་ཅིག་བཟོ་བྱས་ཡོད། LCQMC་གི་མཐུང་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ཞིབ་བཟོ་དགོས་པ་ནི་ང་ཚོས་དེ་ཆ་ཚན་གསུམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་གྱིན་ཡོད། གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དེ་ལས་LCQMC འི་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྡན་མ་འཆར་བྱས་པར། མ་དངོས་འབྲེལ་འདིའི་ནང་ལྟ་ཀློག'}
{'en': 'Transfer Learning for Entity Recognition of Novel Classes', 'pt': 'Transferência de Aprendizagem para Reconhecimento de Entidade de Novas Classes', 'ar': 'نقل التعلم للتعرف على الكيانات لفئات الروايات', 'fr': "Apprentissage par transfert pour la reconnaissance d'entités de nouvelles classes", 'es': 'Transferencia de aprendizaje para el reconocimiento de clases novedosas por parte', 'ja': '小説クラスのエンティティ認識のための転送学習', 'zh': '以新类实体识者迁学', 'hi': 'उपन्यास कक्षाओं की इकाई मान्यता के लिए स्थानांतरण अधिगम', 'ru': 'Передача обучения для признания сущностей новых классов', 'ga': "Foghlaim a Aistriú d'Aonán Aitheantas do Ranganna Úrscéal", 'el': 'Μάθηση μεταφοράς για αναγνώριση οντοτήτων νέων τάξεων', 'it': 'Transfer Learning per il riconoscimento delle entità di classi nuove', 'kk': 'Жаңа классияларды анықтау нысандарының оқытуы', 'ka': 'ნოგელი კლასების განახლებისთვის განსწავლება', 'hu': 'Transzfertanulás az új osztályok szervezeti elismeréséhez', 'ms': 'Pemindahan Belajar untuk Pengenalan Entiti Kelas Baru', 'ml': 'നോവല്\u200d ക്ലാസുകളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനായി പഠനം മാറ്റുക', 'mt': 'Tagħlim ta’ Trasferiment għar-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entitajiet ta’ Klassijiet Ġodda', 'mk': 'Преносно учење за признавање на нови класи на ентитетите', 'lt': 'Naujų klasių subjektų pripažinimo perkėlimo mokymasis', 'no': 'Overføring av læring for gjenkjenning av novelsklasser', 'pl': 'Transfer Learning w celu uznawania przez podmioty nowych klas', 'sr': 'Prebacivanje učenja za priznanje pojedinaca novih klasa', 'so': 'Ka wareejinta barashada aqoonsashada fasalka xirfadaha', 'mn': 'Шинэ классийн нэгж танихын тулд суралцах', 'ro': 'Transfer de învățare pentru recunoașterea entităților de clase noi', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Transfer Learning för enhetserkännande av nya klasser', 'ta': 'நிலை வகுப்புகளின் உறுதிப்படுத்தலுக்கான கற்றத்தை மாற்று', 'ur': 'نوئل کلاس کی آنٹیٹی شناخت کے لئے سیکھنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền giáo truyền cho các đơn vị nhận dạng tiểu học', 'nl': 'Transferleren voor Entiteitsverkenning van nieuwe klassen', 'hr': 'Prebacivanje učenja za priznanje područja novih klasa', 'bg': 'Прехвърляне на обучение за признаване на субекти на нови класове', 'id': 'Transfer Learning for Entity Recognition of Novel Classes', 'de': 'Transfer Learning zur Entitätenanerkennung neuartiger Klassen', 'da': 'Overførsel af læring til enhedsanerkendelse af nye klasser', 'fa': 'انتقال یادگیری برای شناسایی اجتماعی کلاس نوئل', 'af': 'Oordrag Leer vir Entiteit Herken van Novel Klasse', 'ko': '이동 학습 기반의 새로운 유형의 실체 식별', 'sw': 'Kubadilisha Ufunzi kwa Kutambua Siasa ya Ujasiri', 'sq': 'Mësimi i transferimit për njohjen e njësisë të klasave të reja', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'tr': 'Saýlaw Renkleri üçin öwrenmek', 'hy': 'Նոր դասերի ճանաչելու համար', 'bs': 'Prebacivanje učenja za priznanje pojedinaca novih klasa', 'az': 'Novel S캼n캼flar캼n 칐yr톛nm톛si 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'bn': 'নোভেল ক্লাসের স্বীকৃতির জন্য শিক্ষা অনুসন্ধান করুন', 'ca': 'Transfer Learning for Entity Recognition of New Classes', 'et': 'Üleminekuõpe uute klasside tunnustamiseks', 'cs': 'Transfer Learning pro rozpoznávání nových tříd entit', 'fi': 'Siirto-oppiminen uusien luokkien yksikköjen tunnustamista varten', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Prenos učenja za priznavanje subjektov novih razredov', 'he': 'לימוד העברה לזיהוי יחידות של כיסות חדשות', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'གསར་གཏོད་ཀྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་ཤེས་པའི་སྐུལ་སྒྱུར་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'In this reproduction paper, we replicate and extend several past studies on transfer learning for entity recognition. In particular, we are interested in entity recognition problems where the class labels in the source and target domains are different. Our work is the first direct comparison of these previously published approaches in this problem setting. In addition, we perform experiments on seven new source / target corpus pairs, nearly doubling the total number of corpus pairs that have been studied in all past work combined. Our results empirically demonstrate when each of the published approaches tends to do well. In particular, simpler approaches often work best when there is very little labeled target data, while neural transfer approaches tend to do better when there is more labeled target data.', 'ar': 'في ورقة الاستنساخ هذه ، نقوم بتكرار وتوسيع العديد من الدراسات السابقة حول نقل التعلم للتعرف على الكيانات. على وجه الخصوص ، نحن مهتمون بمشاكل التعرف على الكيانات حيث تختلف تسميات الفئات في المجالات المصدر والهدف. عملنا هو أول مقارنة مباشرة لهذه الأساليب المنشورة سابقًا في إعداد المشكلة هذا. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نجري تجارب على سبعة أزواج جديدة من المصدر / الجسم المستهدف ، ما يقرب من ضعف العدد الإجمالي لأزواج الجسم التي تمت دراستها في جميع الأعمال السابقة مجتمعة. تظهر نتائجنا بشكل تجريبي عندما يميل كل من الأساليب المنشورة إلى العمل بشكل جيد. على وجه الخصوص ، غالبًا ما تعمل الأساليب الأبسط بشكل أفضل عندما يكون هناك القليل جدًا من بيانات الهدف المصنفة ، بينما تميل مناهج النقل العصبي إلى الأداء بشكل أفضل عندما يكون هناك المزيد من بيانات الهدف المصنفة.', 'es': 'En este artículo de reproducción, replicamos y ampliamos varios estudios anteriores sobre transferencia de aprendizaje para el reconocimiento de entidades. En particular, nos interesan los problemas de reconocimiento de entidades en los que las etiquetas de clase en los dominios de origen y destino son diferentes. Nuestro trabajo es la primera comparación directa de estos enfoques publicados anteriormente en este contexto de problemas. Además, realizamos experimentos en siete nuevos pares de cuerpos fuente/destino, casi duplicando el número total de pares de cuerpos que se han estudiado en todos los trabajos anteriores combinados. Nuestros resultados demuestran empíricamente cuando cada uno de los enfoques publicados tiende a funcionar bien. En particular, los enfoques más simples a menudo funcionan mejor cuando hay muy pocos datos de objetivos etiquetados, mientras que los enfoques de transferencia neuronal tienden a funcionar mejor cuando hay más datos de objetivos etiquetados.', 'fr': "Dans cet article de reproduction, nous reproduisons et étendons plusieurs études antérieures sur l'apprentissage par transfert pour la reconnaissance d'entités. Nous nous intéressons en particulier aux problèmes de reconnaissance d'entités lorsque les étiquettes de classe dans les domaines source et cible sont différentes. Notre travail est la première comparaison directe de ces approches publiées précédemment dans ce contexte de problème. De plus, nous réalisons des expériences sur sept nouvelles paires de corpus source/cible, doublant presque le nombre total de paires de corps étudiées dans tous les travaux antérieurs combinés. Nos résultats démontrent empiriquement que chacune des approches publiées a tendance à bien fonctionner. En particulier, les approches plus simples fonctionnent souvent mieux lorsqu'il y a très peu de données cibles étiquetées, tandis que les approches par transfert neuronal ont tendance à être plus efficaces lorsqu'il y a plus de données cibles étiquetées.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo de reprodução, replicamos e estendemos vários estudos anteriores sobre transferência de aprendizado para reconhecimento de entidades. Em particular, estamos interessados em problemas de reconhecimento de entidade onde os rótulos de classe nos domínios de origem e destino são diferentes. Nosso trabalho é a primeira comparação direta dessas abordagens publicadas anteriormente neste cenário de problema. Além disso, realizamos experimentos em sete novos pares de corpus fonte/alvo, quase dobrando o número total de pares de corpus que foram estudados em todos os trabalhos anteriores combinados. Nossos resultados demonstram empiricamente quando cada uma das abordagens publicadas tende a se sair bem. Em particular, abordagens mais simples geralmente funcionam melhor quando há muito poucos dados de destino rotulados, enquanto abordagens de transferência neural tendem a se sair melhor quando há mais dados de destino rotulados.', 'ja': 'この再現論文では、エンティティ認識のための転移学習に関する過去の研究を複製し、拡張します。特に、ソースドメインとターゲットドメインのクラスラベルが異なるエンティティ認識問題に関心があります。私たちの研究は、この問題設定におけるこれらの以前に発表されたアプローチの最初の直接的な比較です。さらに、7つの新しいソース/ターゲットコーパスペアの実験を行い、過去のすべての作業で研究されたコーパスペアの合計数をほぼ2倍に増やします。私たちの結果は、公開されているアプローチのそれぞれがうまくいく傾向があることを実証しています。特に、より単純なアプローチは、標識された標的データが非常に少ない場合に最も効果的であることが多く、一方、ニューラル転送アプローチは、標識された標的データがより多い場合により良く機能する傾向がある。', 'hi': 'इस प्रजनन पत्र में, हम इकाई मान्यता के लिए स्थानांतरण सीखने पर कई पिछले अध्ययनों को दोहराते हैं और उनका विस्तार करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम इकाई पहचान समस्याओं में रुचि रखते हैं जहां स्रोत और लक्ष्य डोमेन में वर्ग लेबल अलग-अलग होते हैं। हमारा काम इस समस्या सेटिंग में इन पहले प्रकाशित दृष्टिकोणों की पहली सीधी तुलना है। इसके अलावा, हम सात नए स्रोत / लक्ष्य कॉर्पस जोड़े पर प्रयोग करते हैं, जो पिछले सभी कार्यों में अध्ययन किए गए कॉर्पस जोड़े की कुल संख्या को लगभग दोगुना करते हैं। हमारे परिणाम अनुभवजन्य रूप से प्रदर्शित करते हैं जब प्रकाशित दृष्टिकोणों में से प्रत्येक अच्छी तरह से करता है। विशेष रूप से, सरल दृष्टिकोण अक्सर सबसे अच्छा काम करते हैं जब बहुत कम लेबल लक्ष्य डेटा होता है, जबकि तंत्रिका हस्तांतरण दृष्टिकोण बेहतर करते हैं जब अधिक लेबल किए गए लक्ष्य डेटा होते हैं।', 'zh': '此篇复制论文,复制广旧体识迁学之几项。 特是,我们对源域中的类标签不同的实体。 我们的事务是这种事,前此发表的方法初直较。 又于七新之源/语料库实验之,使向之凡事语料库几翻了一番。 我们果然从经验上证明了一种已发表的方法。 特为标数少,简法常效为上,而标数更多时,神经移法往往效尤善。', 'ru': 'В этом документе воспроизведения мы воспроизводим и расширяем несколько прошлых исследований по обучению переносу для признания сущностей. В частности, нас интересуют проблемы распознавания сущностей, где метки классов в исходном и целевом доменах различны. Наша работа - первое прямое сравнение этих ранее опубликованных подходов в данной постановке задачи. Кроме того, мы проводим эксперименты с семью новыми парами исходных/целевых тел, что почти вдвое увеличивает общее количество пар тел, которые были изучены во всех прошлых работах вместе взятых. Наши результаты эмпирически демонстрируют, когда каждый из опубликованных подходов имеет тенденцию к успеху. В частности, более простые подходы часто работают лучше всего, когда имеется очень мало помеченных целевых данных, в то время как подходы нейротрансфера, как правило, работают лучше, когда есть больше помеченных целевых данных.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar atáirgeadh seo, déanaimid roinnt staidéar ar an bhfoghlaim aistrithe a mhacasamhlú agus a leathnú chun aonán a aithint. Go háirithe, tá suim againn i bhfadhbanna aitheantais aonáin áit a bhfuil na lipéid ranga sna fearainn fhoinseacha agus sprice difriúil. Is í ár gcuid oibre an chéad chomparáid dhíreach idir na cineálacha cur chuige seo a foilsíodh roimhe seo sa socrú fadhbanna seo. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid turgnaimh ar sheacht bpéire corpais nua/foinse nua, beagnach dúbailt ar líon iomlán na bpéirí corpais a ndearnadh staidéar orthu san obair a rinneadh san am a chuaigh thart le chéile. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí go heimpíreach cén uair a éiríonn go maith le gach ceann de na cineálacha cur chuige foilsithe. Go háirithe, is minic a n-oibríonn cur chuige níos simplí is fearr nuair is fíorbheagán sonraí sprice lipéadaithe, agus is gnách go n-éiríonn níos fearr le cineálacha cur chuige aistrithe néaraigh nuair a bhíonn níos mó sonraí sprice lipéadaithe ann.', 'hu': 'Ebben a reprodukciós tanulmányban több korábbi tanulmányt replikálunk és kiterjesztünk a transzfertanulásról entitás felismerésére. Különösen olyan entitások felismerésével kapcsolatos problémák érdekelnek minket, amelyekben a forrás- és céltartományok osztálycímkéi eltérőek. Munkánk az első közvetlen összehasonlítás ezeknek a korábban publikált megközelítéseknek a problémakörnyezetben. Emellett hét új forrás/célkorpusz páron végzünk kísérleteket, majdnem megduplázva a korábbi munkák során tanulmányozott korpusz párok számát. Eredményeink empirikusan azt mutatják, hogy a publikált megközelítések mikor hajlamosak jól teljesíteni. Különösen az egyszerűbb megközelítések gyakran akkor működnek a legjobban, ha nagyon kevés céladat áll rendelkezésre, míg az idegi átviteli megközelítések hajlamosak jobban teljesíteni, ha több céladat áll rendelkezésre.', 'el': 'Σε αυτό το έγγραφο αναπαραγωγής, αναπαράγουμε και επεκτείνουμε αρκετές προηγούμενες μελέτες σχετικά με τη μάθηση μεταφοράς για την αναγνώριση οντοτήτων. Ειδικότερα, μας ενδιαφέρουν προβλήματα αναγνώρισης οντοτήτων όπου οι ετικέτες κλάσης στον τομέα προέλευσης και στόχου είναι διαφορετικές. Η εργασία μας είναι η πρώτη άμεση σύγκριση αυτών των προηγουμένως δημοσιευμένων προσεγγίσεων σε αυτό το προβληματικό περιβάλλον. Επιπλέον, διεξάγουμε πειράματα σε επτά νέα ζεύγη σώματος πηγής/στόχου, σχεδόν διπλασιάζοντας τον συνολικό αριθμό ζευγαριών σωμάτων που έχουν μελετηθεί σε όλες τις προηγούμενες εργασίες μαζί. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δείχνουν εμπειρικά πότε κάθε μία από τις δημοσιευμένες προσεγγίσεις τείνει να πάει καλά. Ειδικότερα, οι απλούστερες προσεγγίσεις συχνά λειτουργούν καλύτερα όταν υπάρχουν πολύ λίγα επισημασμένα δεδομένα στόχων, ενώ οι προσεγγίσεις νευρωνικής μεταφοράς τείνουν να είναι καλύτερες όταν υπάρχουν περισσότερα επισημασμένα δεδομένα στόχων.', 'kk': 'Бұл репродукциялау қағазында бірнеше өткен зерттеулерді көшірмелеу үшін оқыту үшін бірнеше өткен зерттеулерді көшірмелейміз. Әсіресе, біз көзі мен мақсатты домендердің класс жарлықтарын анықтау мәселелерін қалаймыз. Біздің жұмысымыз бұл мәселелердің алдында жарияларының бірінші салыстыруы. Қосымша, біз 7 жаңа көзі/мақсатты корпус екептеріне тәжірибе істейміз. Бірінші жұмыс ішінде оқылған корпус екептерінің жалпы санын көбейтіп жатқан. Біздің нәтижелеріміз ең басып шығарылған жағдайда жақсы жұмыс істейді. Есінікте, нақты мәлімет деректері бар кезде қарапайым жағдайларының жақсы жұмыс істейді, бірақ невралдық транспорттау жағдайларының жақсы жағдайларының белгісі бар кезде жақ', 'ka': 'ამ რეპოვკურაციის კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენ განვითარებთ და განვითარებთ რამდენიმე წინ სწავლების შესახებ ინტერნეტის განაცნობისთვის გასწავლების განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ ინტერესურებულია ინტერესტის განაცნობის პრობლემებზე, სადაც კლასის ნიშანები მსოფლიოში და მისაღების დიომენში განსხვავებული. ჩვენი სამუშაო არის პირველი პრობლემენტი შემდგომარება ამ პრობლემენტის წინასწორედ გამოუშვება. დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ექსპერიმენტები შვიდი ახალი ფოსტური/მიზემი კორპუსს ზოგი, დაბრუნებით ექსპერიმენტები, რომლებიც ყველა წინა სამუშაო მუ ჩვენი წარმოდგენები ემპერიკურად გამოჩვენება, როდესაც ყოველ პოვნიკურად გამოიყენება კარგი. განსაკუთრებულია, უფრო სახით უფრო მხოლოდ მუშაობს, როდესაც ძალიან ცოტა მინიშვნელოვანი მინიშვნელოვანი მონაცემები არიან, მაგრამ ნეიროლური გადატანსტრიქტის გა', 'mk': 'In this reproduction paper, we replicate and extend several past studies on transfer learning for entity recognition.  Особено, ние сме заинтересирани за проблемите со препознавањето на ентитетите каде што класните етикети во изворот и целните домени се различни. Нашата работа е првата директна споредба на овие претходно објавени пристапи во ова поставување на проблеми. Покрај тоа, спроведуваме експерименти на седум нови пари извор/цел корпус, речиси двојно зголемувајќи го вкупниот број на пари корпус кои беа проучени во сите минати работи заедно. Нашите резултати емпирички демонстрираат кога секој од објавените пристапи има тенденција да оди добро. Посебно, поедноставните пристапи честопати функционираат најдобро кога постојат многу мали означени метни податоци, додека пристапите на нервен трансфер имаат тенденција да бидат подобри кога постојат повеќе означени метни податоци.', 'it': "In questo documento di riproduzione, replichiamo ed estendiamo diversi studi passati sull'apprendimento di trasferimento per il riconoscimento delle entità. In particolare, siamo interessati a problemi di riconoscimento delle entità in cui le etichette di classe nei domini sorgente e target sono diverse. Il nostro lavoro è il primo confronto diretto di questi approcci precedentemente pubblicati in questo contesto problematico. Inoltre, eseguiamo esperimenti su sette nuove coppie di corpi sorgente/bersaglio, quasi raddoppiando il numero totale di coppie di corpi che sono stati studiati in tutti i lavori precedenti combinati. I nostri risultati dimostrano empiricamente quando ciascuno degli approcci pubblicati tende a fare bene. In particolare, gli approcci più semplici spesso funzionano meglio quando ci sono pochissimi dati target etichettati, mentre gli approcci di trasferimento neurale tendono a fare meglio quando ci sono più dati target etichettati.", 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument ta’ riproduzzjoni, irriplikaw u jestendu diversi studji tal-passat dwar it-tagħlim tat-trasferiment għar-rikonoxximent tal-entità. B’mod partikolari, aħna interessati fi problemi ta’ rikonoxximent ta’ entitajiet fejn it-tikketti tal-klassi fis-sors u d-dominji fil-mira huma differenti. Ix-xogħol tagħna huwa l-ewwel paragun dirett ta’ dawn l-approċċi ppubblikati qabel f’dan l-isfond ta’ problema. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu esperimenti fuq seba’ pari ġodda ta’ sors/korpus fil-mira, li kważi rduppjaw in-numru totali ta’ pari ta’ corpus li ġew studjati fix-xogħol kollu tal-passat flimkien. Ir-riżultati tagħna juru empirikament meta kull wieħed mill-approċċi ppubblikati għandu t-tendenza li jagħmel tajjeb. B’mod partikolari, approċċi aktar sempliċi ta’ spiss jaħdmu bl-aħjar mod meta jkun hemm ftit ħafna dejta fil-mira ttikkettata, filwaqt li approċċi ta’ trasferiment newrali għandhom it-tendenza li jagħmlu aħjar meta jkun hemm dejta fil-mira ttikkettata aktar.', 'lt': 'Šiame reprodukciniame dokumente pakartojame ir pratęsiame kelis ankstesnius mokymosi perdavimu tyrimus subjektų pripažinimui. Visų pirma mums rūpi subjektų pripažinimo problemos, kai šaltinio ir tikslinių sričių klasės etiketės skiriasi. Mūsų darbas yra pirmasis tiesioginis šių anksčiau paskelbtų metodų palyginimas šioje problem ų aplinkoje. Be to, mes atliekame eksperimentus su septyniomis naujomis šaltinio ir tikslinio korpuso poromis, beveik padvigubėdami bendrą corpus poros skaičių, kurie buvo ištirti visuose ankstesniuose darbuose kartu. Mūsų rezultatai empiriniu požiūriu rodo, kada kiekvienas paskelbtas metodas veikia gerai. Ypač paprastesni metodai dažnai geriausiai veikia, kai yra labai mažai pažymėtų tikslinių duomenų, o nervų perdavimo metodai paprastai geriau veikia, kai yra pažymėtų tikslinių duomenų.', 'no': 'I denne reproduksjonspapiret kopierer vi og utvider fleire siste studiar om overføringsling for gjenkjenning av einingar. I særskilt er vi interesserte på oppdagingsproblemar med entitet der klassemerkelappen i kjelde og måldområda er ulike. Arbeidet vårt er den første direkte sammenligninga av desse tidlegare publiserte tilnærmingane i dette probleminnstillinga. I tillegg utfører vi eksperimenter på sju nye kjelde/mål korpuspar, nesten dobbelt antall korpuspar som er studiert i alle siste arbeid kombinert. Resultatet våre er empirisk demonstrert når kvar av dei utgjevne tilnærmingane kjem til å gjøre godt. Sjølvsagt fungerer enklare tilnærmingar ofte beste når det finst svært lite merkelige måldatar, mens næringstilnærmingane når det finst meir merkelige måldatar.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas reproduksi ini, kami mereplikasikan dan memperluas beberapa kajian masa lalu mengenai pembelajaran pemindahan untuk pengenalan entiti. In particular, we are interested in entity recognition problems where the class labels in the source and target domains are different.  Kerja kami adalah perbandingan langsung pertama dari pendekatan yang telah diterbitkan sebelumnya dalam tetapan masalah ini. Selain itu, kami melakukan eksperimen pada tujuh pasangan sumber baru/sasaran corpus, hampir menggandakan jumlah pasangan corpus yang telah dipelajari dalam semua kerja masa lalu bersama-sama. Keputusan kita secara empirik menunjukkan apabila setiap pendekatan yang diterbitkan cenderung untuk melakukannya dengan baik. Secara khususnya, pendekatan yang lebih mudah sering berfungsi dengan baik apabila ada data sasaran yang ditabel sangat sedikit, sementara pendekatan pemindahan saraf cenderung untuk melakukan lebih baik apabila ada data sasaran yang ditabel lebih banyak.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule reprodukcyjnym replikujemy i rozszerzamy kilka wcześniejszych badań dotyczących uczenia się transferowego dla rozpoznawania podmiotów. W szczególności interesują nas problemy rozpoznawania jednostek, w których etykiety klas w domenie źródłowej i docelowej są różne. Nasza praca jest pierwszym bezpośrednim porównaniem tych wcześniej opublikowanych podejść w tym otoczeniu problemów. Ponadto przeprowadzamy eksperymenty na siedmiu nowych parach ciała źródłowego/docelowego, prawie podwojając całkowitą liczbę par ciała badanych we wszystkich poprzednich pracach łącznie. Nasze wyniki empirycznie pokazują, kiedy każde z opublikowanych podejść ma tendencję dobrze radzić sobie. W szczególności prostsze podejścia często działają najlepiej, gdy jest bardzo mało oznaczonych danych docelowych, podczas gdy podejścia transferu neuronowego mają tendencję do lepszego działania, gdy jest więcej oznaczonych danych docelowych.', 'ml': 'ഈ പ്രവർത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പേപ്പറിൽ, നമ്മൾ മുന്\u200dപ് പല പഠനങ്ങളും ശേഷിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ശരാര്യം തിരി പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമുക്ക് സാധാരണ തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d താല്പര്യമുണ്ട്. സ്രോതസ്സിലെ ക്ലാസ് ലേബ് നമ്മുടെ ജോലി മുമ്പ് പ്രസിദ്ധമായ ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളുടെ ആദ്യത്തെ നേരിട്ടുള്ള തുല്യമാണ്. കൂടാതെ, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഏഴു പുതിയ സ്രോതസ്സ്/ലക്ഷ്യം കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ജോടികളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, കഴിഞ്ഞുപോയ ജോലിയില നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കപ്പെടുന്നതില്\u200d എല്ലാവരും നന്നായി ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, എളുപ്പമുള്ള അടുത്തുകള്\u200d എപ്പോഴും ചെയ്യുന്നതാണ് ഏറ്റവും നല്ലത്, ലക്ഷ്യം ചെയ്തിട്ടുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ കുറച്ച് കുറച്ച്', 'si': 'මේ ප්\u200dරවර්තනය පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා සහ අන්තිම අධ්\u200dයානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවර්තනය අධ්\u200dයානය සඳහා අනු විශේෂයෙන්, අපිට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ. ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලේබි අපේ වැඩේ තමයි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න සැකසුමේදී පළමු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ප්\u200dර ඒ වගේම, අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරභාව/ඉලක්ක කොර්පුස් ජෝඩු 7ක් වල පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන සියළු කොර්පු අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරකාරයෙන් හැම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරකාරයක්ම හොඳ විශේෂයෙන්, විශේෂයෙන්, විශේෂයෙන්, විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් හොඳයි වැඩ කරන්නේ ඉලක්ෂ තොරතුරක් තියෙන්නේ වැඩියෙන්', 'mn': 'Эдгээр үржүүлэлтийн цаасан дээр бид бүтээгдэхүүний хүлээн зөвшөөрөл суралцах талаар олон өмнөх судалгаануудыг хуваалцдаг. Ялангуяа бид ангийнхээ тэмдэглэгдэх асуудлуудыг хүлээн зөвшөөрдөг. Бидний ажил бол энэ асуудлын тухай өмнө хэвлэгдсэн арга барилгын эхний шууд харьцуулалт юм. Үүнээс гадна бид 7 шинэ эх үүсвэр/зорилготой корпус хоёрын туршилтыг хийдэг. Өмнөх ажлын нийлбэр судалсан корпус хоёрын нийлбэр 2 дахин их хэмжээний туршилтыг хийдэг. Бидний үр дүнд хэвлэгдсэн баримтууд бүр сайн ажиллаж байгааг харуулдаг. Ялангуяа, илүү энгийн арга барилгууд ихэвчлэн загвар өгөгдлийн тоо байхад хамгийн бага зэрэг ажилладаг. Харин мэдрэлийн шилжүүлэлтийн арга барилгууд илүү загвар өгөгдлийн тоо байхад илүү сайн ажилладаг.', 'so': 'Kanu waa warqadan ka soo saarista, waxaynu ku bedelaynaa waxbarasho badan oo hore oo ku saabsan aqoonsiga bogga. Si gaar ah, waxaynu xiiseynaynaa dhibaatooyin aqoonsashada arimaha fasalka iyo meelaha ay ku qoran yihiin ay kala duwan yihiin. Shuqulkayagu waa isbarbardhigga ugu horreeya ee horay la soo daabacay hababkan dhibaatada. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu sameynaa imtixaamo ku saabsan todobada sourceed oo cusub/noocyo wado, waxaana ku dhowaad la labanlaabinayaa lambarka qoyska oo la baray shaqadii hore oo dhan. Midhahayaga ayaa si fiican u muujiya marka mid kasta oo la soo daabacay uu si wanaagsan u sameeyo. Dhaqdhaqaaqa fudud inta badan waxey ka shaqeeyaan si wanaagsan marka ay jirto macluumaad aad u yar oo ay ku shaqeeyaan, marka laga soo wareejiyo kooxaha galmada ayaa ka wanaagsan marka ay jirto macluumaad aad u baahan.', 'ta': 'இந்த புதுப்பித்தல் காகிதத்தில், நாம் முந்தைய பல படிப்பியல்களை மாற்றி உண்மையின் அடையாளத்திற்கு மாற்றுதல்  குறிப்பிட்டு, நாங்கள் உண்மையின் அறிவிப்பு பிரச்சனைகளில் ஆர்வம் இருக்கிறோம் மூலத்தில் வகுப்பு அட்டவணைகள் மற எங்கள் வேலை இந்த பிரச்சனை அமைப்பில் முதல் நேராக ஒப்பீடு என்பதாகும். மேலும், நாம் ஏழு புதிய மூலத்தில்/இலக்கு கோர்ப்ஸ் ஜோடிகளில் சோதனைகளை செய்கிறோம், முந்தைய வேலையில் படிக்கப்பட்ட மொத்த ஜோடி எங்கள் முடிவுகள் வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஒவ்வொரு நெருங்கும் போது குறிப்பிட்டு, எளிய நெருக்கங்கள் பெரும்பாலாகவே செயல்படும் சிறிய குறிப்பிட்ட சேர்க்கப்பட்ட இலக்கு தகவல் இருக்கும் போது, புதிய ம', 'sr': 'U ovom reprodukcijskom papiru, kopiramo i proširimo nekoliko prošlih studija o prevođenju učenja za priznanje entiteta. Posebno, zainteresovani smo za probleme priznanja entiteta u kojima su etikete klase u izvoru i ciljnim domenama različite. Naš rad je prvi direktni usporedba ovih ranije objavljenih pristupa u ovom problemu. Osim toga, izvršavamo eksperimente na sedam novih izvora/ciljnih korpusa par, skoro udvostručimo ukupni broj korpusnih par koji su proučeni u svim prošlim poslovima zajedno. Naši rezultati empirički pokazuju kada svaki od objavljenih pristupa čini dobro. Posebno, jednostavniji pristupi često najbolje funkcionišu kada postoje vrlo malo označenih ciljnih podataka, dok su pristupi neuralnog transfera često bolji kada postoje više označenih ciljnih podataka.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare de reproducere, reproducem și extindem mai multe studii anterioare privind învățarea transferului pentru recunoașterea entităților. În special, suntem interesați de problemele de recunoaștere a entităților în care etichetele claselor din domeniile sursă și țintă sunt diferite. Lucrarea noastră este prima comparație directă a acestor abordări publicate anterior în acest context de probleme. În plus, efectuăm experimente pe șapte perechi de corpuri sursă/țintă noi, aproape dublând numărul total de perechi de corpuri care au fost studiate în toate lucrările anterioare combinate. Rezultatele noastre demonstrează empiric când fiecare dintre abordările publicate tinde să meargă bine. În special, abordările mai simple funcționează adesea cel mai bine atunci când există foarte puține date țintă etichetate, în timp ce abordările de transfer neural tind să facă mai bine atunci când există mai multe date țintă etichetate.', 'ur': 'ہم نے اس پیدائش کاغذ میں ایک دوسری پیدائش کی اور چند اگلوں کی تحقیقات کے بارے میں انتقال کی تعلیم کے بارے میں پھیلایا ہے۔ مخصوصا، ہمیں ایک ایست کی شناسایی مشکلات کی علاقہ ہے جہاں کلاس لیبل سورس اور موقع دامنین میں مختلف ہیں. ہمارا کام یہ ہے کہ ان سے پہلے ظاہر ہونے والی مذہب کی پہلی سیدھی مقایسہ ہے۔ اور ہم سات نو سورج/موجود کورپوس جوڑوں پر آزمائش کرتے ہیں، تقریباً کل کورپوس جوڑوں کی تعداد کو دوگنا کر رہے ہیں جو تمام پہلے کاروں میں پڑھی گئی ہیں۔ ہمارے نتیجے مضبوط طور پر دکھائے جاتے ہیں جب ہر طریقے کے پاس آتے ہیں۔ مخصوصا، بہت ساده طریقے اچھے کام کرتے ہیں جب بہت کم لابلیٹ ڈیٹا ہوتا ہے، حالانکہ نیورال انتقال کے قریب بہتر کام کرتے ہیں جب ان میں زیادہ لابلیٹ ڈیٹا ہوتا ہے.', 'sv': 'I detta reproduktionsarbete replikerar och utökar vi flera tidigare studier om transferlärande för entitetsigenkänning. Vi är särskilt intresserade av problem med entitetsigenkänning där klassetiketterna i käll- och måldomänerna skiljer sig åt. Vårt arbete är den första direkta jämförelsen av dessa tidigare publicerade tillvägagångssätt i denna problematik. Dessutom utför vi experiment på sju nya källa/målkorpuspar, vilket nästan fördubblar det totala antalet korpuspar som studerats i allt tidigare arbete tillsammans. Våra resultat visar empiriskt när vart och ett av de publicerade tillvägagångssätten tenderar att gå bra. I synnerhet fungerar enklare tillvägagångssätt oftast bäst när det finns mycket lite märkta måldata, medan neurala överföringsmetoder tenderar att göra bättre när det finns mer märkta måldata.', 'uz': "In this reproduction paper, we replicate and extend several past studies on transfer learning for entity recognition.  Shunday qilib, biz qiziqarli narsalarni tasdiqlash uchun qiziqaramiz, bu yerda sinfning tugmalari va maqola domenening teglari turli. Bizning ishimiz bu muammolar moslamasidagi birinchi direktoriya o'xshash. Ko'pchilik, biz yetti yangi manba kopus ko'plab qo'llarini bajaramiz, hamma ish bilan o'rganilgan kopus sonini ko'paytirib ko'paydik. Bizning natijalarimiz hamma nashriyotga kelayotganda yaxshi bajarishimiz mumkin. Hullas, oddiy murakkablar ko'pincha chegara maʼlumot yordamida juda yaxshi ishlaydi. Va neyron transport usullari qachon chegara maʼlumot mavjud bo'lganda yaxshi bajariladi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy tái tạo này, chúng tôi tái tạo và tiếp tục nhiều nghiên cứu quá khứ về học chuyển nhượng để nhận diện thực thể. Chúng tôi đặc biệt quan tâm đến vấn đề nhận dạng thực thể nơi các nhãn lớp ở miền nguồn và đích khác nhau. Nhiệm vụ của chúng tôi là so sánh trực tiếp đầu tiên với các phương pháp được công bố trước đây trong trường hợp rắc rối. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi thực hiện thí nghiệm với bảy cặp cơ thể mới và đích đến, gần như đã nhân đôi toàn bộ các cặp cơ thể được nghiên cứu trong mọi công việc cũ cộng lại. Những kết quả của chúng tôi có kinh nghiệm chứng minh khi mỗi phương pháp được công bố đều có xu hướng tốt. Đặc biệt, các phương pháp đơn giản thường hoạt động tốt nhất khi có rất ít dữ liệu đích được ghi rõ, trong khi phương pháp truyền tải thần kinh có xu hướng tốt hơn khi có nhiều dữ liệu đích được ghi rõ hơn.', 'bg': 'В тази статия за възпроизвеждане репликираме и разширяваме няколко минали проучвания за трансферно обучение за разпознаване на субекти. По-специално, ние се интересуваме от проблеми с разпознаването на обекти, при които етикетите на класовете в източника и целевите домейни са различни. Нашата работа е първото пряко сравнение на тези публикувани подходи в тази проблемна обстановка. В допълнение, ние извършваме експерименти върху седем нови двойки източник/целеви корпуси, почти удвоявайки общия брой на двойките корпуси, които са били изследвани във всички предишни работи комбинирани. Нашите резултати емпирично демонстрират кога всеки от публикуваните подходи има тенденция да се справя добре. По-специално, по-простите подходи често работят най-добре, когато има много малко етикетирани целеви данни, докато подходите за невронен трансфер са склонни да се справят по-добре, когато има повече етикетирани целеви данни.', 'nl': 'In dit reproductiedocument repliceren en uitbreiden we verschillende eerdere studies over transferleren voor entiteitsherkenning. We zijn in het bijzonder geïnteresseerd in entiteitsherkenningsproblemen waarbij de classlabels in het bron- en doeldomein verschillend zijn. Ons werk is de eerste directe vergelijking van deze eerder gepubliceerde benaderingen in deze problematiek. Daarnaast voeren we experimenten uit op zeven nieuwe bron/doelcorpusparen, waardoor het totale aantal corpusparen dat in alle eerdere werken is bestudeerd bijna verdubbeld wordt. Onze resultaten tonen empirisch aan wanneer elk van de gepubliceerde benaderingen het goed doet. Met name eenvoudigere benaderingen werken vaak het beste wanneer er zeer weinig gelabelde doelgegevens zijn, terwijl neurale transferbenaderingen meestal beter doen als er meer gelabelde doelgegevens zijn.', 'da': 'I dette reproduktionspapir replikerer og udvider vi flere tidligere studier om transferlæring til enhedsanerkendelse. Vi er især interesserede i problemer med genkendelse af enheder, hvor klassemærkerne i kilde- og måldomænerne er forskellige. Vores arbejde er den første direkte sammenligning af disse tidligere offentliggjorte metoder i denne problemsituation. Derudover udfører vi eksperimenter på syv nye kilde/mål corpuspar, hvilket næsten fordobler det samlede antal corpuspar, der er blevet undersøgt i alt tidligere arbejde kombineret. Vores resultater viser empirisk, hvornår hver af de offentliggjorte metoder har tendens til at klare sig godt. I særdeleshed fungerer enklere tilgange ofte bedst, når der er meget lidt mærkede måldata, mens neurale overførselsmetoder har tendens til at gøre bedre, når der er mere mærkede måldata.', 'hr': 'U ovom reprodukcijskom papiru, kopiramo i proširimo nekoliko prošlih ispitivanja o učenju prijenosa za priznanje entiteta. Posebno, zainteresovani smo za probleme priznanja entiteta u kojima su etikete klase u izvoru i ciljnim domenama različite. Naš rad je prva direktna usporedba ovih ranije objavljenih pristupa u ovom stanju problema. Osim toga, izvodimo eksperimente na sedam novih izvora/ciljnih korpusa par, skoro udvostručiti ukupni broj korpusnih par koji su proučeni u svim prošlim poslovima zajedno. Naši rezultati empirički pokazuju kada svaki od objavljenih pristupa čini dobro. Posebno, jednostavniji pristupi često najbolje funkcioniraju kada postoje vrlo malo označenih ciljnih podataka, dok su pristupi neurološkog prijenosa često bolji kada postoje više označenih ciljnih podataka.', 'de': 'In diesem Reproduktionspapier replizieren und erweitern wir mehrere frühere Studien zum Transferlernen zur Entitätserkennung. Insbesondere interessieren wir uns für Entitätenerkennungsprobleme, bei denen die Klassenbezeichnungen in der Quell- und Zieldomäne unterschiedlich sind. Unsere Arbeit ist der erste direkte Vergleich dieser bisher veröffentlichten Ansätze in dieser Problemstellung. Darüber hinaus führen wir Experimente an sieben neuen Quell-/Ziel-Korpuspaaren durch, wodurch die Gesamtzahl der Korpuspaare, die in allen bisherigen Arbeiten zusammen untersucht wurden, nahezu verdoppelt wird. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen empirisch, wann jeder der veröffentlichten Ansätze gut abschneidet. Insbesondere einfachere Ansätze funktionieren oft am besten, wenn nur sehr wenig markierte Zieldaten vorhanden sind, während neuronale Übertragungsansätze tendenziell besser abschneiden, wenn es mehr markierte Zieldaten gibt.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas reproduksi ini, kami mereplikasikan dan memperluas beberapa studi masa lalu tentang transfer belajar untuk pengenalan entitas. Terutama, kita tertarik pada masalah pengenalan entitas dimana label kelas di sumber dan domain target berbeda. Pekerjaan kami adalah perbandingan langsung pertama dari pendekatan yang sebelumnya diterbitkan dalam pengaturan masalah ini. In addition, we perform experiments on seven new source/target corpus pairs, nearly doubling the total number of corpus pairs that have been studied in all past work combined.  Hasil kita secara empiris menunjukkan ketika setiap pendekatan yang diterbitkan cenderung untuk melakukannya dengan baik. Terutama, pendekatan sederhana sering bekerja dengan baik ketika ada data target yang sangat sedikit ditabel, sementara pendekatan transfer saraf cenderung untuk melakukan lebih baik ketika ada data target yang lebih ditabel.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 과거 실체 식별 이동 학습에 관한 연구를 복제하고 확장했다.특히 우리는 원역과 목표역의 클래스 라벨이 다른 실체 식별 문제에 흥미를 느낀다.우리의 업무는 이 문제 환경에서 처음으로 이런 것들을 직접 비교하기 전에 발표한 방법이다.그 밖에 우리는 7개의 새로운 원/목표 자료 라이브러리에 대해 실험을 진행했는데 거의 과거 모든 업무에서 연구한 자료 라이브러리의 총수의 두 배이다.우리의 결과는 모든 발표된 방법이 양호할 때 경험적으로 나타난다.특히 목표 데이터가 적을 때 더 간단한 방법이 가장 효과가 좋고, 목표 데이터가 많을 때 신경 전달 방법이 더 효과가 좋다.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii ya uzalishaji, tunabadilisha na kuongeza tafiti kadhaa zilizopita kuhusu kuhamisha kujifunza kwa ajili ya kutambua entity. Kwa hakika, tunavutiwa na matatizo ya kutambua entity ambapo alama za darasa katika chanzo na maeneo yanatofautiana. Kazi yetu ni kulinganisha moja kwa moja na mbinu hizi zilizochapishwa kabla katika mazingira haya ya tatizo. Zaidi ya hayo, tunafanya majaribio katika vyanzo saba mpya/viwili vya makampuni, karibu tunazidisha mara mbili idadi ya wanandoa wa makampuni yaliyosomwa katika kazi zote zilizopita pamoja. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha kwa makini pale kila mmoja wa waliochapishwa huenda kufanya vizuri. Kwa hakika, mbinu rahisi mara nyingi hufanya kazi vizuri pale ambapo kuna taarifa chache zinazoonyesha lengo, wakati mbinu za usafirishaji wa ujenzi huenda kufanya vizuri pale ambapo kuna takwimu zaidi za malengo.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ تکنولوژی، ما چندین مطالعه گذشته را در مورد تعلیم انتقال برای شناسایی اجتماعی تقسیم می کنیم. مخصوصا، ما به مشکلات شناسایی entities علاقه داریم که نقاشی کلاس در منبع و دامنهای هدف متفاوت هستند. کار ما اولین مقایسه مستقیم از این روش\u200cهای پیش در این تنظیم مشکل است. در addition, we perform experiments on seven source/target corpus pairs, almost doubling the total number of corpus pairs that have been studied in all the past combined. نتیجه\u200cهای ما به طور عمومی نشان می\u200cدهند زمانی که هر یک از نزدیک\u200cهای منتشر شده به خوبی انجام می\u200cدهد. مخصوصاً نزدیک های ساده تر اغلب بهتر کار می کنند وقتی داده های هدف بسیار کوچک هستند، در حالی که نزدیک انتقال عصبی ها به بهترین کار می کنند وقتی داده های هدف بیشتری وجود دارد.', 'tr': 'Bu reproducsi첵a kagyzynda birn채챌e 철흫ki 철wrenmeler 체챌in birn채챌e gezek 철wrenmeleri 체첵tged첵채ris we 체첵tged첵채ris. A첵ratyn bolsa, biz birn채챌e 체ns etiketlerini흫 챌e힊me we maksady doma첵lary흫 farklygy 첵erinde 체첵tge첵채n hasaplamagymyzda gyzyklan첵arys. Bizi흫 i힊imiz 철흫ki mesele 챌yky힊ynda 첵akynla힊ylary흫 ilkinji g철rn체힊imi. Hemm채챌e, biz yedi t채ze 챌e힊me/maksady kopus 챌ift 체zerinde experimentalary 첵erine 첵etirdik. Hemme ge챌en i힊de 철wrenmi힊 kopus 챌ift sanyny ikinji gezek 챌arparsak. netijelerimiz empiri첵a 챌aplandyrylan her 챌agalary흫 gowy 첵akynla힊ygyny g철rkez첵채r. A첵ratyn, esasy 첵agda첵da, esasy 첵agda첵 gola첵la힊yk ma힊gala maglumaty bar di흫e has gowy i힊le첵채r, we n채yral transferleri흫 gola첵la힊yklary gola첵la힊yk maglumaty bar di흫e has gowy i힊le첵채r.', 'am': 'በዚህ አካባቢ ፕሮጀክት፣ የአካባቢ ስህተት ማወቂያውን ለመለወጥ ብዙዎችን ትምህርት እናሰፋለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ የአካባቢው ማወቅ ጉዳይ ላይ እና የክፍለ ቋንቋው ምልክት በተለየ እና የግንኙነት አካባቢ ውስጥ ነው፡፡ ሥራችን ከዚህ አስቀድሞ የተዘጋጀው የዚህ ጉዳይ አካባቢዎች መጀመሪያ ትክክል ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ባለፈው ሥራ ሁሉ የተተማረቡትን የቆርፓስ ቁጥር በሰባት አዲስ ምንጭ/አዲስ ቆርፓስ ሁለት ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን እያንዳንዱ የተዘጋጀው ሲደርስ በመልካም ማድረግ ሲያሳያል፡፡ በተለይም፣ ቀላል መግቢያ ብዙ ጊዜ የተለየ አካላቢ ዳታ ሲኖር ይሻላል፡፡ የየነጥብ ስውተት ማቀናቀል በተጨማሪው የአካላቢ ዳታ ሲኖር ይሻላል፡፡', 'af': 'In hierdie reproduksie papier, ons kopieer en uitbrei verskeie verlede studies oor oordrag onderwerp vir entiteiterkenning. In spesifieke is ons geinteresseer in einditeite herken probleme waar die klas etikette in die bron en doel domeine anders is. Ons werk is die eerste direk vergelyking van hierdie voorheen gepubliseer toegang in hierdie probleem opstelling. In addition, we perform experiments on seven new source/target corpus pairs, nearly doubling the total number of corpus pairs that have been studied in all past work combined. Ons resultate wys empiriese wanneer elkeen van die publeekte toegang goed doen. Spesifieke, eenvoudiger toegang het dikwels goed werk wanneer daar baie klein etiketeerde doel data is, terwyl neuraloordrag toegang toegang tot beter doen wanneer daar meer etiketeerde doel data is.', 'hy': 'Այս վերարտադրողական թղթի մեջ մենք վերարտադրում և ընդլայնում ենք մի քանի անցյալ ուսումնասիրություններ, որոնք վերաբերում են ուսումնասիրությունների փոխանցման համար էության ճանաչման համար: Մենք հատկապես հետաքրքրված ենք էության ճանաչման խնդիրներով, երբ աղբյուրի և նպատակային բնագավառների դասարանների պիտակները տարբերվում են: Մեր աշխատանքը առաջին անմիջական համեմատությունն է այս նախկինում հրատարակված մոտեցումների այս խնդիրների ընթացքում: Ավելին, մենք փորձեր ենք կատարում 7 նոր աղբյուր-նպատակային մարմնի զույգերի վրա, գրեթե կրկնապատկելով մարմնի զույգերի համաշխարհային քանակը, որոնք ուսումնասիրել են անցյալ բոլոր աշխատանքներում միասին: Մեր արդյունքները էմպիրիկապես ցույց են տալիս, երբ հրատարակված մոտեցումներից յուրաքանչյուրը հակված է լավ աշխատել: In particular, simpler approaches often work best when there is very little labeled target data, while neural transfer approaches tend to do better when there is more labeled target data.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër riprodhimi, ne riprodhojmë dhe zgjerojmë disa studime të kaluara mbi transferimin e mësimit për njohjen e njësisë. Në veçanti, ne jemi të interesuar në problemet e njohjes së njësisë ku etiketat e klasës në burimin dhe fushat objektive janë të ndryshme. Puna jonë është krahasimi i parë i drejtpërdrejtë i këtyre qasjeve të botuara më parë në këtë vëzhgim problem. Përveç kësaj, ne bëjmë eksperimente në shtatë çifte të reja burimi/objektivi corpus, pothuajse duke dyfishuar numrin total të çifteve corpus që janë studiuar në të gjitha punët e kaluara të kombinuara. Rezultatet tona empirikisht demonstrojnë kur secila nga metodat e publikuara ka tendencë të shkojë mirë. Në veçanti, qasjet më të thjeshta shpesh funksionojnë më mirë kur ka shumë pak të dhëna objektive të etiketuara, ndërsa qasjet e transferimit nervor tenderojnë të bëjnë më mirë kur ka më shumë të dhëna objektive të etiketuara.', 'bn': 'এই প্রজন্ম কাগজে আমরা পূর্ববর্তী কিছু গবেষণা প্রদান করি এবং স্বীকৃতির জন্য স্বীকৃতি জানানোর জন্য কিছু শিক্ষা  বিশেষ করে, আমরা পৃথিবীর স্বীকারের সমস্যায় আগ্রহী যেখানে উৎসের শ্রেণীর লেবেল এবং লক্ষ্য ডোমেনের মধ্যে ভিন্ন। আমাদের কাজ হচ্ছে পূর্ববর্তী প্রকাশিত এই সমস্যার সম্পর্কে প্রথম সরাসরি তুলনায়। এছাড়াও, আমরা সাতটি নতুন উৎস/লক্ষ্য কর্পুস জোড়ায় পরীক্ষা করছি, যারা প্রায় বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে পুরোপুরি কোর্পাস জোড়ার সংখ্যা যা গত কাজ আমাদের ফলাফল প্রকাশ করে যখন প্রকাশিত প্রত্যেকেই ভালো কাজ করে। In particular, simpler approaches often work best when there is very little labeled target data, while neural transfer approaches tend to do better when there is more labeled target data.', 'bs': 'U ovom reprodukcijskom papiru, kopiramo i proširimo nekoliko prošlih studija o učenju prijenosa za priznanje entiteta. Posebno, zainteresovani smo za probleme priznanja entiteta u kojima su etikete klase u izvoru i ciljnim domenama različite. Naš rad je prvi direktni usporedba ovih ranije objavljenih pristupa u ovom stanju problema. Osim toga, izvodimo eksperimente na sedam novih izvora/ciljnih korpusa par, skoro udvostručiti ukupni broj korpusnih par koji su proučeni u svim prošlim poslovima zajedno. Naši rezultati empirički pokazuju kada svaki od objavljenih pristupa čini dobro. Posebno, jednostavniji pristupi često najbolje funkcionišu kada postoje vrlo malo označenih ciljnih podataka, dok su pristupi neurološkog prenošenja često čine bolje kada postoje više označenih ciljnih podataka.', 'az': 'Bu reproduktiv kağıdında bir neçə keçmiş təhsil öyrənmək haqqında təhsil öyrənmək haqqında çox öyrənirik. Özellikle, biz dəstə etiketlərinin mənbənin və məqsəd domenaların farklı olduğu yerlərin tanıması problemlərinə maraqlıq edirik. Bizim işlərimiz bu problemdə əvvəl yayınlanan tərzlərin ilk dərəcə salınmasıdır. Biz həmçin in yeddi yeni mənbə/məqsəd korpus çiftlərində təcrübə edirik. Bütün keçmiş işlərdə təcrübə edilmiş korpus çiftlərinin toplam sayını az qala ikiqat artırır. Sonuçlarımız müəyyən edilən hər birinin yaxınlıqlarına gəldiyi zaman müəyyən edir. Özellikle, çox az etiketli məlumatlar olduğu zaman daha basit tərzlərin yaxşılıqlarını işləyir. Nöral tərzlərinin yaxınlıqlarını daha çox etiketli məlumatlar olduğu zaman daha yaxşı işləyir.', 'ca': "En aquest paper de reproducció, repliquem i estendem varis estudis del passat sobre l'aprenentatge de transfer ència per al reconeixement d'entitats. En particular, estem interessats en problemes de reconeixement d'entitats on les etiquetes de classe dels dominis de font i d'alvo són diferents. La nostra feina és la primera comparació directa d'aquests enfocaments publicats abans en aquest entorn de problemes. A més, fem experiments en set parelles novas de còrpus fonts/alvos, quasi doblant el nombre total de parelles de còrpus que han estat estudiats en tota la feina passada combinada. Els nostres resultats demostren empíricament quan cada un dels enfocaments publicats tendeix a fer-se bé. En particular, els enfocaments més senzills sovint funcionen millor quan hi ha molt poca data d'objectiu etiquetada, mentre els enfocaments de transfer ència neuronal tendeixen a fer millor quan hi ha més dades d'objectiu etiquetades.", 'cs': 'V tomto reprodukčním článku replikujeme a rozšiřujeme několik minulých studií o transferovém učení pro rozpoznání entit. Zvláště nás zajímají problémy s rozpoznáváním entit, kde se popisky tříd ve zdrojové a cílové doméně liší. Naše práce je prvním přímým srovnáním těchto dříve publikovaných přístupů v tomto problémovém nastavení. Kromě toho provádíme experimenty na sedmi nových zdrojových a cílových korpusových párech, které téměř zdvojnásobují celkový počet korpusových párů, které byly studovány ve všech minulých pracích dohromady. Naše výsledky empiricky ukazují, kdy se každý z publikovaných přístupů daří dobře. Zejména jednodušší přístupy často fungují nejlépe, když je velmi málo označených cílových dat, zatímco přístupy neuronového přenosu mají tendenci lépe fungovat, když existuje více označených cílových dat.', 'et': 'Selles reprodutseerimisdokumendis kopeerime ja laiendame mitmeid varasemaid uuringuid siirdeõppe kohta üksuse tunnustamiseks. Eelkõige oleme huvitatud olemi tuvastamise probleemidest, kus klassimärgised lähte- ja sihtdomeenides on erinevad. Meie töö on nende eelnevalt avaldatud lähenemisviiside esimene otsene võrdlus selles probleemikeskkonnas. Lisaks teostame katseid seitsme uue allika/sihtkorpuse paariga, mis peaaegu kahekordistab kogu varasemates töödes uuritud korpuspaaride arvu. Meie tulemused näitavad empiiriliselt, kui iga avaldatud lähenemisviis kipub hästi tulema. Eelkõige toimivad lihtsamad lähenemisviisid sageli kõige paremini, kui märgistatud sihtandmeid on väga vähe, samas kui närviülekande lähenemisviisid kipuvad tulema paremini, kui märgistatud sihtandmeid on rohkem.', 'fi': 'Tässä jäljennöspaperissa toistamme ja laajennamme useita aiempia tutkimuksia siirtooppimisesta yhteisöjen tunnistamista varten. Erityisesti olemme kiinnostuneita entiteettitunnistusongelmista, joissa lähde- ja kohdetoimialueiden luokkatunnisteet ovat erilaisia. Työmme on ensimmäinen suora vertailu näihin aiemmin julkaistuihin lähestymistapoihin tässä ongelmatilanteessa. Lisäksi teemme kokeita seitsemällä uudella lähde/kohde-korpusparilla, jotka lähes kaksinkertaistavat kaikkien aikaisempien töiden yhteydessä tutkittujen korpusparien kokonaismäärän. Tuloksemme osoittavat empiirisesti, milloin jokaisella julkaistulla lähestymistavalla on taipumus menestyä hyvin. Erityisesti yksinkertaisemmat lähestymistavat toimivat usein parhaiten, kun kohdedataa on hyvin vähän, kun taas neuronsiirtomenetelmät toimivat yleensä paremmin, kun kohdedataa on enemmän.', 'sk': 'V tem reprodukcijskem prispevku ponovimo in razširimo več preteklih študij o transfernem učenju za prepoznavanje entitet. Zlasti nas zanimajo težave s prepoznavanjem entitet, kjer so oznake razredov v izvornih in ciljnih domenah različne. Naše delo je prva neposredna primerjava teh predhodno objavljenih pristopov v tej problematiki. Poleg tega izvajamo poskuse na sedmih novih virih/ciljnih korpusnih parov, s čimer skoraj podvojimo skupno število parov korpusov, ki smo jih preučevali v vseh preteklih delih skupaj. Naši rezultati empirično kažejo, kdaj je vsak od objavljenih pristopov nagnjen k uspehu. Zlasti preprostejši pristopi pogosto najbolje delujejo, kadar je zelo malo označenih ciljnih podatkov, medtem ko so pristopi nevronskega prenosa ponavadi boljši, kadar je več označenih ciljnih podatkov.', 'ha': "Ina cikin wannan takardan ɗabi'a, muna musanya kuma Muke cire wasu karatun masu shige da za'a iya sani masu gaskiyar. A cikin ƙayyade, munã fatan mu da matabbata masu sanin halin da sunayen cikin kwanan da ke cikin sunayen na daban-daban. Kayinmu yana farkon misalin madaidaici na farkon da aka nuna hanyõyin waɗannan a cikin wannan muhimmada. Ina ƙaranci, za mu yi jarraba kan nau'i bakwai yanzu/matsayin nau'i-nau'i, ko ƙara sau biyu na ƙidãyar nau'in rubutu wanda aka karanta shi a cikin duk aikin da suka shige. MatamayinMu na nuna faranta idan dukkan da ake kashẽwa ya fi zama alhẽri. Kuma a cikin ƙayyade, masu sauri masu amfani da sauri ko da za'a aikata mafi alhẽri idan an sami data da aka ƙayyade goan, kuma a lokacin da za'a iya amfani da transferenta neural, sai ya fi zama mafi alhẽri idan an sami wasu data na gabatar da amfani.", 'jv': 'Nang pempel iki, kita digambut lan uga bantayan kelas nang mulasar kelas telas nang ngerasar jadasar dumadhi kapan panganan ingkang sampek. Juara-Juara, awak dhéwé gewis ana perusahaan Entèni kanggo ngerasakno sing luwih basa gambaran karo perusahaan winih lan padha sing wis dipujahan. Awak dhéwé jajal iku, perusahaan kanggo nambah iki banget nggawe gerarané karo hal-hal nganggo perbudhakan kuwi. Nambah, kita ngomong nik saiki perbudhakan anyar sampeyan itépakan perbudhakan/cilik-perbudhakan Rejalaké awak dhéwé ngerasakno, soalé sakjane ben dino sing ngerasakno ngono nggawe barang apik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'bo': 'ཆ་འཕྲིན་གྱི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཕར་བསྐྱེད་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་པའི་ལྟ་སྟངས་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་གི་གནས་སོར དམིགས་བསལ་ནི། ང་ཚོས་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་དང་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཁུངས་ཁྱད་པར་དབུགས་རྩལ་རྟོགས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་བ་དག་ཚོད་དང་། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ནི་སྔོན་གྱི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དེ་ཚོ་དང་ཐད་ཀར་མཁན་མཐུན་པ་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་སུ་གླེང་འབུལ་འདུག ང་ཚོའི་འབྲས་བུའི་གྲས་འབྲས་ཀྱིས་པར་བསྐྲུན་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཡོངས་རེ་རེ་བ་དྲས་ཀྱི་སྐོར་དང་། In particular, simpler approaches often work best when there is very little labeled target data, while neural transfer approaches tend to do better when there is more labeled target data.', 'he': 'In this reproduction paper, we replicate and extend several past studies on transfer learning for entity recognition.  In particular, we are interested in entity recognition problems where the class labels in the source and target domains are different.  Our work is the first direct comparison of these previously published approaches in this problem setting.  In addition, we perform experiments on seven new source/target corpus pairs, nearly doubling the total number of corpus pairs that have been studied in all past work combined.  התוצאות שלנו מראות באמפריה כשכל אחד מהגישות המפורסמות נוטה לעשות טוב. במיוחד, גישות פשוטות לעתים קרובות עובדות הכי טוב כשיש מידע מטורף קטן מאוד, בעוד גישות העברה עצבית נוטים לעשות טוב יותר כשיש מידע מטורף מטורף יותר.'}
{'en': 'Location Name Extraction from Targeted Text Streams using Gazetteer-based Statistical Language Models', 'ar': 'استخراج اسم الموقع من التدفقات النصية المستهدفة باستخدام نماذج اللغة الإحصائية القائمة على المعجم', 'es': 'Extracción de nombres de ubicaciones de secuencias de texto dirigidas mediante modelos de lenguaje estadístico basados en nomenclátores', 'fr': "Extraction de noms de lieux à partir de flux de texte ciblés à l'aide de modèles de langage statistiques basés sur", 'pt': 'Extração de nome de local de fluxos de texto direcionados usando modelos de linguagem estatística baseados no Gazetteer', 'ja': '地名集ベースの統計言語モデルを使用したターゲットテキストストリームからの場所名抽出', 'zh': '用地名词典之数,取位于文本流中', 'ru': 'Извлечение названия местоположения из целевых текстовых потоков с использованием статистических языковых моделей на основе словаря географических названий', 'hi': 'गजेटियर-आधारित सांख्यिकीय भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग कर लक्षित पाठ धाराओं से स्थान नाम निष्कर्षण', 'ga': 'Ainm Suímh Eastóscadh ó Shruthanna Téacs Spriocdhírithe ag úsáid Múnlaí Teanga Staitistiúla Bunaithe ar an Gazetter', 'ka': 'მდებარეობის სახელის გამოყენება ტექსტის სტრიმიდან გამოყენებული დაზეტერის სტატისტიული ენის მოდელების გამოყენება', 'el': 'Εξαγωγή ονόματος τοποθεσίας από στοχευμένες ροές κειμένου χρησιμοποιώντας στατιστικά μοντέλα γλώσσας με βάση το Gazetteer', 'hu': 'Helynév Kivonás célzott szövegfolyamokból a Gazetteer-alapú statisztikai nyelvi modellek segítségével', 'it': 'Estrazione da flussi di testo mirati utilizzando modelli linguistici statistici basati su Gazetteer', 'kk': 'Орналасу атауы Мақсатты мәтін көздерінен тарқату', 'mk': 'Екстракција на името на локацијата од текстови со цел со користење на модели на статистички јазик базирани на Gazetteer', 'lt': 'Vietos pavadinimas', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Nama Lokasi dari Streams Teks Sasaran menggunakan Model Bahasa Statistik Berasas Gazet', 'ml': 'ഗാസ്റ്ററിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള സ്റ്റാറ്റിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d ഭാഷയുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ടാര്\u200dജെറ്റ് ടെ', 'mt': 'L-Isem tal-Post Estrazzjoni mill-Flussi tat-Test immirati bl-użu ta’ Mudelli tal-Lingwa Statistika bbażati fuq il-Gazetter', 'mn': 'Газетерийн үндсэн Статистикийн хэл загваруудыг ашиглан Цагалгаан Текст Streamуудын нэр', 'no': 'Adressenamn Utpakking frå måltekststrømmer med Statistiske språk- modeller basert på Gazetter', 'ro': 'Extragerea numelui locației din fluxurile de text vizate utilizând modele lingvistice statistice bazate pe Gazetteer', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja nazwy lokalizacji z ukierunkowanych strumieni tekstowych przy użyciu statystycznych modeli językowych opartych na Gazetteer', 'sr': 'Izvukanje imena lokacije iz ciljnih tekstnih struja koristeći statističke jezičke modele na Gazeteru', 'si': 'ස්ථානය නාමය නිර්මාණය ගැසීටර් ආධාරිත ස්ථානය භාෂාව මඩෝල් භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Magaca ka soo saarista qoraalka ee Targeted Text Streams using Gazetteer-based Statistical Language Models', 'sv': 'Utdrag av platsnamn från riktade textströmmar med hjälp av tidsskriftsbaserade statistiska språkmodeller', 'ta': 'செய்தி அடிப்படையில் உள்ள புள்ளிவிவரமான மொழி மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி சேர்க்கப்பட்ட உரை தெருவு', 'ur': 'جایزٹر کی بنیادی ایسٹیسٹیکل زبان موڈل کے استعمال کے مطابق موقع لکھے ہوئے متن استریم سے استخراج نام', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tên vị trí Chỉ ra từ luồng văn bản nhắm dùng các mẫu ngôn ngữ liên kết', 'bg': 'Извличане на име на местоположение от целеви текстови потоци с помощта на базирани на Газетър статистически езикови модели', 'nl': 'Extractie van locatienaam uit gerichte tekststromen met behulp van op Gazetteer gebaseerde statistische taalmodellen', 'da': 'Placeringsnavn Uddrag fra målrettede tekststrømme ved hjælp af Gazetteer-baserede statistiske sprogmodeller', 'de': 'Standortnamenextraktion aus zielgerichteten Textströmen mithilfe von Gazetteer-basierten statistischen Sprachmodellen', 'hr': 'Izvlačenje imena lokacije iz ciljnih tekstnih struja koristeći statističke jezičke modele na Gazeteru', 'id': 'Ekstraksi Nama Lokasi dari Aliran Teks Target menggunakan Model Bahasa Statistik Berdasarkan Gazetter', 'ko': '지명록 기반의 통계 언어 모델을 사용하여 목표 텍스트 흐름에서 위치 이름을 추출합니다', 'fa': 'Name of Location Extraction from Target Text Streams using Gazetter based Statistical Language Models', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Ýery Aç', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi i emrit të pozicionit nga rrjedhët e tekstit të synuar duke përdorur modelet e gjuhës statistike bazuar në gazetë', 'hy': 'Location Name Extraction from Targeted Text Streams using Gazetteer-based Statistical Language Models', 'am': 'ቦታ፦', 'bn': 'গ্যাজেটার ভিত্তিক পরিসংখ্যান ভাষার মডেল ব্যবহার করে টার্জেট টেক্সট স্ট্রীম থেকে অবস্থানের নাম এক্সট্', 'sw': 'Name', 'az': 'İsmarış Metin Streamlarından İsmarış İsmarış İsmarış Dili Modelləri', 'ca': 'Extracció del nom de lloc dels fluxos de text mirats utilitzant models de llenguatge estadística basats en periodistes', 'cs': 'Extrakce názvu lokality z cílených textových streamů pomocí statistických jazykových modelů založených na Gazetteer', 'bs': 'Izvukanje imena lokacije iz ciljnih tekstnih struja koristeći statističke jezičke modele na Gazeteru', 'fi': 'Sijainnin nimen poiminta kohdistetuista tekstivirroista Gazetteer-pohjaisten tilastollisten kielimallien avulla', 'et': 'Asukoha nime väljavõtmine sihitud tekstivoogudest Gazetteer-põhiste statistiliste keelemudelite abil', 'jv': 'Location, $date', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Name of Location Extraction from Targeted Text Streams using Gazetteer-based Statistical Language Models', 'sk': 'Izvleček imena lokacije iz ciljnih tokov besedila z uporabo statističnih jezikovnih modelov, ki temeljijo na Gazetteer', 'bo': 'Location name Extraction from Targeted Text Streams using Gazetteer-based Statistical Language Models'}
{'en': 'Extracting location names from informal and unstructured social media data requires the identification of referent boundaries and partitioning compound names. Variability, particularly systematic variability in location names (Carroll, 1983), challenges the identification task. Some of this variability can be anticipated as operations within a statistical language model, in this case drawn from gazetteers such as OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, and DBpedia. This permits evaluation of an observed n-gram in Twitter targeted text as a legitimate location name variant from the same location-context. Using n-gram statistics and location-related dictionaries, our Location Name Extraction tool (LNEx) handles abbreviations and automatically filters and augments the location names in gazetteers (handling name contractions and auxiliary contents) to help detect the boundaries of multi-word location names and thereby delimit them in texts. We evaluated our approach on 4,500 event-specific tweets from three targeted streams to compare the performance of LNEx against that of ten state-of-the-art taggers that rely on standard semantic, syntactic and/or orthographic features. LNEx improved the average F-Score by 33-179 %, outperforming all taggers. Further, LNEx is capable of stream processing.', 'ar': 'يتطلب استخراج أسماء المواقع من بيانات الوسائط الاجتماعية غير الرسمية وغير المهيكلة تحديد حدود الإحالة وتقسيم الأسماء المركبة. إن التباين ، وخاصة التباين المنهجي في أسماء المواقع (كارول ، 1983) ، يتحدى مهمة تحديد الهوية. يمكن توقع بعض هذا التباين كعمليات داخل نموذج لغة إحصائي ، وفي هذه الحالة مأخوذة من معاجم جغرافية مثل OpenStreetMap (OSM) و Geonames و DBpedia. يسمح هذا بتقييم n-gram الذي تمت ملاحظته في النص المستهدف على Twitter باعتباره متغيرًا شرعيًا لاسم الموقع من نفس سياق الموقع. باستخدام إحصائيات n-gram والقواميس المتعلقة بالموقع ، تتعامل أداة استخراج اسم الموقع (LNEx) الخاصة بنا مع الاختصارات وتقوم تلقائيًا بترشيح وزيادة أسماء المواقع في المعاجم (التعامل مع تقلصات الأسماء والمحتويات الإضافية) للمساعدة في اكتشاف حدود أسماء المواقع متعددة الكلمات وبالتالي تحديدها في النصوص. قمنا بتقييم نهجنا على 4500 تغريدة خاصة بالحدث من ثلاث تدفقات مستهدفة لمقارنة أداء LNEx مقابل أداء عشرة علامات مميزة تعتمد على ميزات دلالية و / أو نحوية و / أو إملائية قياسية. قام LNEx بتحسين متوسط درجة F بنسبة 33-179٪ ، متفوقًا على جميع العلامات. علاوة على ذلك ، LNEx قادر على معالجة التدفق.', 'es': 'La extracción de nombres de ubicaciones de datos de redes sociales informales y no estructurados requiere la identificación de los límites de referencia y la división de nombres de compuestos. La variabilidad, particularmente la variabilidad sistemática en los nombres de las ubicaciones (Carroll, 1983), desafía la tarea de identificación. Parte de esta variabilidad se puede anticipar como operaciones dentro de un modelo de lenguaje estadístico, en este caso extraído de diccionarios geográficos como OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames y DBpedia. Esto permite evaluar un n-grama observado en el texto dirigido de Twitter como una variante de nombre de ubicación legítima del mismo contexto de ubicación. Mediante el uso de estadísticas de n-gramas y diccionarios relacionados con la ubicación, nuestra herramienta de extracción de nombres de ubicaciones (LNeX) maneja las abreviaturas y filtra y aumenta automáticamente los nombres de las ubicaciones en los diccionarios geográficos (que maneja las contracciones de nombres y el contenido auxiliar) para ayudar a detectar los límites de los nombres de ubicaciones de varias palabras y delimitándolos así en textos. Evaluamos nuestro enfoque en 4.500 tuits específicos de eventos de tres transmisiones específicas para comparar el rendimiento de LNeX con el de diez etiquetadores de última generación que se basan en características semánticas, sintácticas u ortográficas estándar. LNeX mejoró el puntaje F promedio en un 33-179%, superando a todos los etiquetadores. Además, LNeX es capaz de procesar flujos.', 'fr': "L'extraction de noms de lieux à partir de données de réseaux sociaux informelles et non structurées nécessite l'identification des limites de référence et le partitionnement des noms composés. La variabilité, en particulier la variabilité systématique des noms de lieux (Carroll, 1983), met au défi la tâche d'identification. Une partie de cette variabilité peut être anticipée par des opérations au sein d'un modèle de langage statistique, dans ce cas tiré de nomenclatures telles que OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames et DBpedia. Cela permet d'évaluer un n-gramme observé dans un texte ciblé Twitter en tant que variante de nom de lieu légitime à partir du même contexte de localisation. À l'aide de statistiques de n-grammes et de dictionnaires liés à l'emplacement, notre outil d'extraction de noms de lieux (LNex) gère les abréviations et filtre et augmente automatiquement les noms de lieux dans les nomenclatures (gestion des contractions des noms et des contenus auxiliaires) pour aider à détecter les limites des noms de lieux à plusieurs mots et les délimitent ainsi dans des textes. Nous avons évalué notre approche sur 4 500 tweets spécifiques à des événements provenant de trois flux ciblés afin de comparer les performances de LNex à celles de dix taggers de pointe qui s'appuient sur des fonctionnalités sémantiques, syntaxiques et/ou orthographiques standard. LNex a amélioré le F-Score moyen de 33 à 179\xa0%, surpassant tous les marqueurs. En outre, LNex est capable de traiter des flux.", 'pt': 'A extração de nomes de locais de dados informais e não estruturados de mídia social requer a identificação de limites de referência e o particionamento de nomes compostos. A variabilidade, particularmente a variabilidade sistemática nos nomes dos locais (Carroll, 1983), desafia a tarefa de identificação. Parte dessa variabilidade pode ser antecipada como operações dentro de um modelo de linguagem estatística, neste caso extraído de dicionários geográficos como OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames e DBpedia. Isso permite a avaliação de um n-gram observado no texto direcionado do Twitter como uma variante de nome de local legítimo do mesmo contexto de local. Usando estatísticas de n-gram e dicionários relacionados à localização, nossa ferramenta de extração de nome de localização (LNEx) lida com abreviações e filtra e aumenta automaticamente os nomes de localização em dicionários geográficos (lidando com contrações de nomes e conteúdos auxiliares) para ajudar a detectar os limites de nomes de localização com várias palavras e, assim, delimitá-los em textos. Avaliamos nossa abordagem em 4.500 tweets específicos de eventos de três fluxos direcionados para comparar o desempenho do LNEx com o de dez marcadores de última geração que contam com recursos padrão semânticos, sintáticos e/ou ortográficos. O LNEx melhorou o F-Score médio em 33-179%, superando todos os taggers. Além disso, o LNEx é capaz de processar fluxo.', 'ja': '非公式および非構造化ソーシャルメディアデータから場所名を抽出するには、参照境界を特定し、化合物名を分割する必要があります。 変動性、特に場所名の系統的変動性（ Carroll, 1983 ）は、識別タスクに挑戦する。 この変動の一部は、統計言語モデル内の操作として予測できます。この場合、OpenStreetMap (OSM )、Geonames、DBpediaなどの地名集から抽出されます。 これにより、同じロケーション-コンテキストからの正当なロケーション名バリアントとして、Twitterターゲットテキスト内の観察されたn - gramの評価が可能になる。 ロケーション名抽出ツール(LNEx)は、n - gram統計およびロケーション関連辞書を使用して、略語を処理し、地名辞書(名前縮小および補助コンテンツの処理)のロケーション名を自動的にフィルタリングおよび拡張して、複数の単語のロケーション名の境界を検出し、テキストで区切るのに役立ちます。 私たちは、3つのターゲットストリームからの4,500件のイベント固有のツイートに対するアプローチを評価し、LNExのパフォーマンスを、標準的なセマンティック、構文、および/またはオルソグラフィ機能に依存する10の最先端のタグ付けのパフォーマンスと比較しました。 LNExは平均Fスコアを33 ～ 179 ％改善し、すべてのタガーを上回りました。 さらに、LNExはストリーム処理が可能である。', 'hi': 'अनौपचारिक और असंरचित सोशल मीडिया डेटा से स्थान नाम निकालने के लिए दिग्दर्शन सीमाओं की पहचान और यौगिक नामों को विभाजित करने की आवश्यकता होती है। परिवर्तनशीलता, विशेष रूप से स्थान नामों (कैरोल, 1983) में व्यवस्थित परिवर्तनशीलता, पहचान कार्य को चुनौती देती है। इस परिवर्तनशीलता में से कुछ को सांख्यिकीय भाषा मॉडल के भीतर संचालन के रूप में प्रत्याशित किया जा सकता है, इस मामले में गैजेटियर जैसे ओपनस्ट्रीटमैप (ओएसएम), जियोनाम और डीबीपीडिया से खींचा गया है। यह चहचहाना लक्षित पाठ में एक ही स्थान-संदर्भ से एक वैध स्थान नाम संस्करण के रूप में एक मनाया n-ग्राम के मूल्यांकन की अनुमति देता है। एन-ग्राम आँकड़ों और स्थान से संबंधित शब्दकोशों का उपयोग करते हुए, हमारा स्थान नाम निष्कर्षण उपकरण (LNEx) संक्षिप्त रूपों को संभालता है और स्वचालित रूप से फ़िल्टर करता है और बहु-शब्द स्थान नामों की सीमाओं का पता लगाने में मदद करने के लिए गजेटियर (नाम संकुचन और सहायक सामग्री को संभालने) में स्थान नामों को फ़िल्टर और बढ़ाता है और इस प्रकार उन्हें ग्रंथों में सीमित करता है। हमने तीन लक्षित धाराओं से 4,500 ईवेंट-विशिष्ट ट्वीट्स पर अपने दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन किया ताकि एलएनएक्स के प्रदर्शन की तुलना दस अत्याधुनिक टैगर्स के खिलाफ की जा सके जो मानक शब्दार्थ, वाक्यात्मक और / या ऑर्थोग्राफिक विशेषताओं पर भरोसा करते हैं। LNEx ने औसत एफ-स्कोर में 33-179% तक सुधार किया, जो सभी टैगर्स से आगे निकल गया। इसके अलावा, LNEx स्ट्रीम प्रसंस्करण में सक्षम है।', 'zh': '自非正非结构化社交媒体数,须识参界而分区。 可变性,特地名之统可变性(Carroll,1983年),挑战于知事。 其可变性可以为计语模形之操,可以取OpenStreetMap(OSM),Geonames与DBpedia名词典取之。 此许以 Twitter 向文本中观察 n-gram 估为同位上下文合法名变体。 用n-gram计信位相关词典,吾位名取具(LNEx)处缩写,而自漉充地名表之位名(处名缩略辅),以助检测多词名之界,而隔之于文本。 三流之4,500条特定于事推文,以比十LNEx之性,句法与/正字法先进之表。 LNEx将均F得分崇33-179%,优于诸器。 此外,LNEx得行流。', 'ru': 'Извлечение названий местоположений из неформальных и неструктурированных данных социальных сетей требует идентификации ссылочных границ и разделения названий компаундов. Изменчивость, особенно систематическая изменчивость географических названий (Кэрролл, 1983), затрудняет задачу идентификации. Некоторые из этих вариаций можно предвидеть как операции в рамках статистической языковой модели, в данном случае взятые из таких справочников, как OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames и DBpedia. Это позволяет оценить наблюдаемую n-грамму в целевом тексте Twitter как законный вариант названия местоположения из того же контекста местоположения. Используя n-граммовую статистику и словари, связанные с местоположением, наш инструмент извлечения имен местоположений (LNEx) обрабатывает аббревиатуры и автоматически фильтрует и увеличивает имена местоположений в справочниках (обрабатывая сокращения имен и вспомогательное содержимое), чтобы помочь обнаружить границы многословных названий местоположений и, таким образом, разграничить их в текстах. Мы оценили наш подход на основе 4500 событийно-специфичных твитов из трех целевых потоков, чтобы сравнить производительность LNEx с производительностью десяти современных тегеров, которые основаны на стандартных семантических, синтаксических и/или орфографических особенностях. LNEx улучшила средний показатель F-Score на 33-179%, опередив все таггеры. Кроме того, LNEx способен обрабатывать потоки.', 'ga': "Chun ainmneacha suíomhanna a bhaint as sonraí meán sóisialta neamhfhoirmiúla agus neamhstruchtúrtha, ní mór teorainneacha tagartha a shainaithint agus ainmneacha cumaisc a dheighilt. Tugann éagsúlacht, go háirithe inathraitheacht chórasach in ainmneacha suíomhanna (Carroll, 1983), dúshlán don tasc aitheantais. Is féidir cuid den inathraitheacht seo a réamh-mheas mar oibríochtaí laistigh de mhúnla teanga staidrimh, sa chás seo bunaithe ar ghairiséid mar OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, agus DBpedia. Ligeann sé seo luacháil ar n-gram breathnaithe i dtéacs spriocdhírithe Twitter mar mhalairt d’ainm suímh dlisteanach ón gcomhthéacs suímh chéanna. Trí úsáid a bhaint as staitisticí n-gram agus foclóirí a bhaineann le suíomhanna, láimhseálann ár n-uirlis Astarraingthe Ainm Suímh (LNEx) giorrúcháin agus déanann sé scagadh agus méadú go huathoibríoch ar na hainmneacha suímh sna gazettes (ag láimhseáil crapadh ainmneacha agus inneachar cúnta) chun cabhrú le teorainneacha ainmneacha suímh ilfhoclacha a bhrath. agus ar an gcaoi sin iad a theorannú i dtéacsanna. Rinneamar luacháil ar ár gcur chuige ar 4,500 tvuít a bhain go sonrach le hócáidí ó thrí shruth spriocdhírithe chun feidhmíocht LNEx a chur i gcomparáid le deich gclibálaí úrscothacha a bhíonn ag brath ar ghnáthghnéithe séimeantacha, comhréire agus/nó ortagrafacha. D'fheabhsaigh LNEx an meánscór-F 33-179%, rud a d'fheidhmigh níos fearr ná na clibeálaithe go léir. Ina theannta sin, tá LNEx in ann sruth a phróiseáil.", 'hu': 'A helyszínnevek informális és strukturálatlan közösségi média adatokból történő kivonásához referenciahatárok azonosítására és összetett nevek felosztására van szükség. A változások, különösen a helyszínnevek szisztematikus változásai (Carroll, 1983) kihívást jelentenek az azonosítási feladatnak. Ennek a változékonyságnak egy részét statisztikai nyelvi modell műveleteként lehet előre látni, ebben az esetben olyan lapozókból, mint az OpenStreetMap (OSM), a Geonames és a DBpedia. Ez lehetővé teszi egy megfigyelt n-gramm értékelését a Twitter célzott szövegében, mint egy azonos helyszín-kontextusból származó legitim helyszínnév variáns. Az n-gram statisztikák és a helyhez kapcsolódó szótárak segítségével a Helyszínnév kivonása eszközünk (LNEx) kezeli a rövidítéseket, és automatikusan szűri és bővíti a helyszínneveket a lapozókban (névösszehúzódások és kiegészítő tartalmak kezelése), hogy segítsen felismerni a többszós helyszínnevek határait, és így azokat szövegben határozza meg. Megközelítésünket három célzott adatfolyamból 4500 eseményspecifikus tweet alapján értékeltük, hogy összehasonlítsuk az LNEx teljesítményét a szabványos szemantikai, szintaktikai és/vagy ortográfiai funkciókra támaszkodó tíz korszerű címkéző teljesítményével. Az LNEx 33-179%-kal javította az átlagos F-pontszámot, ami minden címkézőt felülmúlt. Továbbá az LNEx képes áramlási feldolgozásra.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή ονομάτων τοποθεσιών από άτυπα και μη δομημένα δεδομένα κοινωνικών μέσων απαιτεί τον προσδιορισμό των ορίων αναφοράς και την κατανομή των σύνθετων ονομάτων. Η μεταβλητότητα, ιδιαίτερα η συστηματική μεταβλητότητα των ονομάτων τοποθεσιών (Κάρολ, 1983), προκαλεί την εργασία αναγνώρισης. Ορισμένες από αυτές τις μεταβλητότητες μπορούν να προβλεφθούν ως λειτουργίες μέσα σε ένα στατιστικό μοντέλο γλώσσας, στην περίπτωση αυτή αντλούνται από φυλλάδια όπως OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames και DBpedia. Αυτό επιτρέπει την αξιολόγηση ενός παρατηρηθέντος σε στοχευμένο κείμενο του Twitter ως νόμιμη παραλλαγή ονόματος τοποθεσίας από το ίδιο πλαίσιο τοποθεσίας. Με τη χρήση στατιστικών γραμμάτων και λεξικών που σχετίζονται με την τοποθεσία, το εργαλείο εξαγωγής ονόματος τοποθεσίας (διαχειρίζεται συντομεύσεις και φιλτράρει αυτόματα και διευρύνει τα ονόματα τοποθεσιών σε φυλλάδια (χειρισμός συστολής ονομάτων και βοηθητικών περιεχομένων) για να βοηθήσει στον εντοπισμό των ορίων των ονομάτων τοποθεσιών πολλών λέξεων και έτσι να τα οριοθετήσει σε κείμενα. Αξιολογήσαμε την προσέγγισή μας σε 4.500 ειδικά συμβάντα tweets από τρεις στοχευμένες ροές για να συγκρίνουμε την απόδοση του LNEx με εκείνη δέκα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας που βασίζονται σε τυπικά σημασιολογικά, συντακτικά ή/και ορθογραφικά χαρακτηριστικά. Το LNEx βελτίωσε τον μέσο δείκτη F κατά 33-179%, ξεπερνώντας όλες τις ετικέτες. Επιπλέον, το LNEx είναι ικανό να επεξεργαστεί ροή.', 'ka': 'სოციალური და არსტრუქტურული სოციალური მედიატის მონაცემების ადგილის სახელის გამოყენება უნდა რეფინტრენტის დრინეების და დაფართლების შეცემების სახელის განსაზღვ ცვლილება, განსაკუთრებით სისტემატიკური ცვლილება ადგილის სახელებში (Carroll, 1983), განსაკუთრებულია იდენტიფიკაციის დავალება. ამ განსხვავებულობაში ზოგიერთი შეიძლება იქნება, როგორც სტატისტიკური ენის მოდელში, ამ შემთხვევაში, როგორც OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames და DBpedia განსხვავებულია. ეს შესაძლებელია გავამუშაოთ n- გრამის შესახებ ტექსტის მისახებ ტექსტის როგორც ლეგიტიმეტური ადგილის სახელის სახელის გარიანტი იგივე ადგილის კონტექსტი Name ჩვენ გავუმუშავეთ ჩვენი პროგრამის 4,500 მოვლენების სპექტიფიკური ტივიტებზე, სამი მიყვარებული სტრიქონიდან, რომ LNEx-ის პროგრამის შესაბამისთვის, რომლებიც სტანდარტული, სინტაქტიული და/ან ორტოგრაფიკური ფ LNEx სწორედ სწორედ F-სკონტი 33-179%-ით გაუკეთებდა, ყველა ტეგერების გაუკეთება. დამატებით, LNEx შესაძლებელია სტრიმის პროცესი.', 'it': "L'estrazione dei nomi delle località dai dati informali e non strutturati dei social media richiede l'identificazione dei confini dei referenti e la suddivisione dei nomi composti. La variabilità, in particolare la variabilità sistematica dei nomi delle località (Carroll, 1983), sfida il compito di identificazione. Una parte di questa variabilità può essere anticipata come operazioni all'interno di un modello linguistico statistico, in questo caso tratto da gazetters come OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames e DBpedia. Ciò consente la valutazione di un n-gram osservato nel testo mirato di Twitter come variante legittima del nome della posizione dallo stesso contesto. Utilizzando statistiche n-gram e dizionari relativi alla posizione, il nostro strumento di estrazione del nome della località (LNEx) gestisce abbreviazioni e filtra automaticamente e aumenta i nomi delle località nei gazetter (gestione delle contrazioni dei nomi e dei contenuti ausiliari) per aiutare a rilevare i confini dei nomi delle località multi-parola e quindi delimitarli nei testi. Abbiamo valutato il nostro approccio su 4.500 tweet specifici per eventi provenienti da tre flussi mirati per confrontare le prestazioni di LNEx con quelle di dieci tagger all'avanguardia che si basano su funzionalità semantiche, sintattiche e/o ortografiche standard. LNEx ha migliorato il F-Score medio del 33-179%, superando tutti i tag. Inoltre, LNEx è in grado di elaborare flussi.", 'lt': 'Ištraukiant vietos pavadinimus iš neoficialių ir nesustruktūruotų socialinių žiniasklaidos duomenų reikia nustatyti referencines ribas ir paskirstyti sudėtinius pavadinimus. Variability, particularly systematic variability in location names (Carroll, 1983), challenges the identification task.  Kai kuriuos iš šių kintamųjų galima tikėtis kaip operacijas pagal statistinį kalbos model į, šiuo atveju paimtas iš laikraščių, pvz., OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames ir DBpedia. Tai leidžia įvertinti stebimą n-gram ą tiksliniame Twitter tekste kaip teisėtą vietos pavadinimo variant ą nuo tos pačios vietos konteksto. Naudojant n-gram ų statistiką ir su vieta susijusius žodynus, mūsų Vietos pavadinimo ekstrakcijos įrankis (LNEx) tvarko santrumpas ir automatiškai filtruoja ir papildo vietos pavadinimus gazetėse (tvarko pavadinimo kontrakcijas ir pagalbinį turinį), kad padėtų nustatyti kelių žodžių vietų pavadinimų ribas ir taip juos išbraukti tekstuose. Vertinome savo požiūrį 4 500 renginiams skirtų tweetų iš trijų tikslinių sričių, kad palygintume LNEx veiksmingumą su dešimties pažangiausių žymenų, kurie grindžiami standartinėmis semantinėmis, sintaktinėmis ir (arba) ortografinėmis savybėmis. LNEx pagerino vidutinį F rezultatą 33–179 %, palyginti su visais žymekliais. Be to, LNEx gali apdoroti srautus.', 'kk': 'Орналасу атауларын мәліметті және құрылмаған социалдық медиақтардың деректерінен тарқату керек сілтемелер шектерін мен бөлімдеу тіркемелерін анықтау керек. Айнымалы, әсіресе жерге атауларының жүйелік айнымалылығы (Carroll, 1983), идентификациялық тапсырманы өзгертеді. Бұл айнымалылығының кейбірі, OpenStreetMap (OSM), геоатаулар және DBpedia секілді, статистикалық тіл үлгісінде әрекеттер ретінде болуы мүмкін. Бұл Твиттердегі нақты мәтіннің n- грамманы бір жерге контекстінің жариялық орналасуының атауының айнымалысы ретінде бағалауға мүмкіндік береді. N- грамма статистикасы мен орналасқан сөздер қолданылады, біздің Орналасу атауын тарқату құралымыз (LNEx) қысқартуларды және автоматты түрде сүзгілерді және жергіліктердің атауын (атау сәйкестіктері мен көмектесу мазмұнын қалау үшін) көп сөздің атауларының ше Біз 4 500 оқиға арналған тәртіптерімізді үш мақсатты күйден салыстыру үшін LNEx әрекетін стандартты семантикалық, синтактикалық және/немесе ортографикалық қасиеттеріне тәуелді оның 10 күйінде салыстыру үшін оқиға арналған LNEx орташа F- нүктесін 33- 179% деп жақсартды, барлық тегжерлердің орташа жақсартып жатыр. Келесіден, LNEx көмегімен өңдеу мүмкін.', 'mk': 'Извадувањето на имињата на локацијата од неформалните и неструктурните податоци на социјалните медиуми бара идентификација на референтните граници и поделба на комплексните имиња. Различноста, особено систематска варијабилност во имињата на локацијата (Carroll, 1983), ја предизвикува идентификациската задача. Некои од овие варијабилности може да се очекуваат како операции во рамките на моделот на статистички јазик, во овој случај извлечени од новинари како OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames и DBpedia. This permits evaluation of an observed n-gram in Twitter targeted text as a legitimate location name variant from the same location-context.  Користејќи статистика на n-грам и речници поврзани со локацијата, нашата алатка за извлекување на името на локацијата (LNEx) се справува со кратенки и автоматски филтри и ги зголемува имињата на локацијата во газетниците (раководење со контракциите на името и помошната содржина) за да помогне во детектирањето на границите на името на локацијата со повеќе Го проценивме нашиот пристап на 4.500 твитови специфични за настани од три насочени потоки за да ја споредиме изведбата на ЛНЕКС со онаа на десет најнови ознаки кои се потпираат на стандардни семантични, синтактички и/или ортографски карактеристики. LNEx го подобри просечниот F-Score за 33-179 отсто, надминувајќи ги сите означувачи. Покрај тоа, LNEx е способен за процес на струм.', 'ms': 'Mengekstrak nama lokasi dari data media sosial tidak rasmi dan tidak terstruktur memerlukan pengenalan sempadan referen dan pengendahan nama komponen. Variabiliti, terutamanya variabiliti sistemik dalam nama lokasi (Carroll, 1983), menantang tugas pengenalan. Beberapa variabiliti ini boleh dijangka sebagai operasi dalam model bahasa statistik, dalam kes ini dilukis dari gazet seperti OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, dan DBpedia. Ini membenarkan penilaian n-gram yang dilihat dalam teks sasaran Twitter sebagai variasi nama lokasi sah dari lokasi-konteks yang sama. Mengguna statistik n-gram dan kamus berkaitan dengan lokasi, alat Ekstraksi Nama Lokasi (LNEx) kita mengendalikan penderaan dan penapis secara automatik dan menambah nama lokasi dalam gazet (mengendalikan kontraksi nama dan kandungan bantuan) untuk membantu mengesan sempadan nama lokasi berbilang perkataan dan dengan itu menghapuskannya dalam teks. Kami menilai pendekatan kami pada 4,500 tweet spesifik peristiwa dari tiga aliran sasaran untuk membandingkan prestasi LNEx dengan yang 10 tag state-of-the-art yang bergantung pada ciri-ciri semantik, sintaktik dan/atau ortografik piawai. LNEx memperbaiki skor F rata-rata dengan 33-179%, melebihi semua tag. Lagipun, LNEx mampu memproses aliran.', 'ml': 'അപരിചിതമായ സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്ന പേരുകള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്ക സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പേരുകളില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസവും, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് സിസ്റ്റമിക്ക് മാറ്റവിറ്റിവിളി (കാര്\u200dരോള്\u200d, 1983), തിര ഈ മാറ്റങ്ങളില്\u200d ചിലത് പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഭാഷ മോഡലിനുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളായി പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതാണ്, ഈ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d ഓപ്പെന്\u200dസ്ട് ടൂട്ടര്\u200d ലക്ഷ്യം ചെയ്യപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്റ്റില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന n-ഗ്രാമിന്റെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ഇത് അനുവദിക്കുന n-ഗ്രാമിന്റെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെയും സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെയും ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട നിഘണ്ടികങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച്, നമ്മുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തെ പേര് എക്സ്റ്റ്രാക്ഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d  സാധാരണ സെമാന്റിക്, സിനിട്ടാക്കിക്, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന ഏകാസ്റ്റിക്ക്/അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന 10 സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് ആര്\u200dട്ട് ടാഗ്രാജുകളുടെ പ് എല്\u200dനെക്സ് എല്ലാ ടാഗ്ഗറുകളെയും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d 33-179 ശതമാനം എഫ്-സ്കോര്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തി. അതുകൊണ്ട്, ലെനെക്സ് നദിയുടെ പ്രക്രിയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിവുണ്ട്.', 'mn': 'Шинэ мэдээлэл болон бүтээгдэхгүй нийгмийн мэдээллээс орон зайд нэрлэгддэг нь холбоотой хил хязгаарын тодорхойлолт, хуваагдах холбоотой нэрлүүдийн тодорхойлолт хэрэгтэй. Өөр өөрчлөлт, ялангуяа байр суурь нэртэй систематикийн өөрчлөлт (Carroll, 1983), тодорхойлолтын даалгаварыг шаарддаг. Энэ өөрчлөлтийн зарим нь статистикийн хэл загварын дотор үйл ажиллагаа гэж төсөөлж болно. Энэ тохиолдолд OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, DBpedia зэрэг газрын зурагтаас зурсан байдаг. Энэ нь Твиттерт ажиглагдсан n-граммын текст нь адил байрлал-агуулалтын хууль хэлбэрээс зөв байрлалтай байрлал гэх зөв байрлал болгох боломжтой. N-граммын статистик, байр суурь холбоотой үгийг ашиглан, бидний Орон-нуудын нэр хадгалах хэрэгсэл (LNEx) нь тодорхойлолт, автоматаар сүзгүүлж, газрын нэр (нэр хадгалалт, тусламжтай бүтээгдэхүүн) олон үгийн газрын нэр хил хязгаарыг олж, тэгээд тэдгээрийг текст руу ху Бид 4,500 үйл явдлын тодорхойлолтой tweets дээр 3 зорилготой урсгалын хөдөлгөөнийг харьцуулахын тулд ЛNEx-ын үйл явдлыг стандарт семантик, синтактик болон/эсвэл ортографик тодорхойлолтуудыг харьцуулахын тулд 4,500 үйл явдлын тодорхойло LNEx дундаж F-тоо 33-179%-аар сайжруулсан бөгөөд бүх тэмдэглэгчдээс илүү сайжруулсан. Дараа нь LNEx урсгал үйлдвэрлэх боломжтой.', 'no': 'Eksporterer plasseringsnamn frå informale og ikkje strukturerte sosiale media-data krev identifisering av referansgrenser og partisjonssamlingsnamn. Variabelen, spesielt systematisk variabel i namn på plasseringa (Carroll, 1983), utfordrer identifiseringsoppgåva. Noen av denne variabelen kan forventast som operasjonar i eit statistisk språk-modell, i dette tilfellet teikna frå gazetterar som OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames og DBpedia. Dette tillèt å evaluera en observert n-gram i Twitter-målteksten som eit rett plasseringsvariant frå samme plasseringskontekst. Bruk n-gram-statistikk og lokasjonsrelaterte ordbokstavar, handterar du forkortingar og automatisk filterar og auger plasseringsnamn i gazetterar (handterar namn-kontrakter og hjelpeinnhaldet) for å hjelpa å finna grensene på fleire ord-plasseringsnamn og derfor deler dei i tekstar. Vi evaluerte tilnærminga vårt på 4,500 hendingsspesifiske tweeter frå tre målte strømmer for å sammenligne utviklinga av LNEx mot den av ti kunstmerker som er på standardssemantiske, syntaktiske og/eller ortografiske funksjonar. LNEx forbetra gjennomsnittlig F- poeng med 33- 179%, som utfører alle merkelappar. Førre er LNEx i stand til å handsama straum.', 'pl': 'Wyodrębnianie nazw lokalizacji z nieformalnych i nieustrukturyzowanych danych mediów społecznościowych wymaga identyfikacji granic referencyjnych i partycjonowania nazw złożonych. Zmienność, w szczególności systematyczna zmienność nazw lokalizacji (Carroll, 1983), stanowi wyzwanie dla zadania identyfikacji. Część tej zmienności można przewidzieć jako operacje w ramach statystycznego modelu językowego, w tym przypadku pochodzącego z gazeterów takich jak OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames i DBpedia. Umożliwia to ocenę obserwowanego n-gramu w ukierunkowanym tekście Twittera jako uzasadnionego wariantu nazwy lokalizacji z tego samego kontekstu lokalizacji. Korzystając ze statystyk n-gramów i słowników związanych z lokalizacją, nasze narzędzie do ekstrakcji nazw lokalizacji (LNEx) obsługuje skróty i automatycznie filtruje i rozszerza nazwy lokalizacji w gazetkach (obsługuje skurcze nazw nazw i zawartości pomocnicze), aby pomóc wykryć granice wielowłownych nazw lokalizacji i tym samym wydzielić je w tekstach. Oceniliśmy nasze podejście na 4.500 tweetach specyficznych dla zdarzeń z trzech ukierunkowanych strumieni, aby porównać wydajność LNEx z dziesięciu najnowocześniejszych tagerów opartych na standardowych cechach semantycznych, składniowych i/lub ortograficznych. LNEx poprawił średni F-Score o 33-179%, przewyższając wszystkie tagery. Ponadto LNEx jest zdolny do przetwarzania strumieniowego.', 'ro': 'Extragerea numelor de locații din datele informale și nestructurate ale rețelelor sociale necesită identificarea limitelor referenților și partajarea numelor compuse. Variabilitatea, în special variabilitatea sistematică a denumirilor de locații (Carroll, 1983), provoacă sarcina de identificare. O parte din această variabilitate poate fi anticipată ca operațiuni în cadrul unui model de limbaj statistic, în acest caz extras din reviste precum OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames și DBpedia. Acest lucru permite evaluarea unui n-gram observat în textul țintit Twitter ca o variantă legitimă a numelui locației din același context locație. Utilizând statisticile n-gram și dicționarele legate de locație, instrumentul nostru de extragere a numelui locației (LNEx) gestionează abrevierile și filtrează automat și mărește numele locației în ziare (gestionând contracțiile numelui și conținutul auxiliar) pentru a ajuta la detectarea limitelor numelor locației cu mai multe cuvinte și, prin urmare, le delimitează în text. Am evaluat abordarea noastră pe 4.500 de tweet-uri specifice evenimentelor din trei fluxuri vizate pentru a compara performanța LNEx cu cea a zece etichete de ultimă generație care se bazează pe caracteristici semantice, sintactice și/sau ortografice standard. LNEx a îmbunătățit scorul mediu F cu 33-179%, depășind toate etichetele. În plus, LNEx este capabil de procesare a fluxului.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මිඩියාව නිර්මාණය කරන්න ස්ථානය නම් නිර්මාණය කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය සහ සාමාජික මිඩියාවේ තොරතුරු අවශ්\u200dය වි වෙනස්, විශේෂයෙන්ම ස්ථානය නාමයේ පද්ධතිය වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් (Carol, 1980), පද්ධතිය වැඩක් අවශ මේ වෙනස්තමාවක් සමහර විශේෂතාවක් පුළුවන් ස්ථාතික භාෂාවක් මොඩේලයක් ඇතුලේ ව්\u200dයාපෘතියක් වෙනුවෙන්, OpenStreetMap (OSM), geoname, and Name Using n-gram Statistics and location-link dictions, our Location Name Extraction ToolName අපි අපේ විධානය 4,500 සිද්ධ විශේෂ ට්විට් වලින් අරමුණු තුනක් වලින් ඉලක්කන් තියෙන්නේ LNEx ගැන විධානය සඳහා ස්ථානික සිමාන්ත්\u200dරික, සංකේෂි LNEx සාමාන්\u200dය F-Score එක 33-179%, සියළු ටැගර්ස් වලට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. ඊටපස්සේ, LNEx ස්ට්\u200dරීම් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'sr': 'Izvlačenje imena lokacije iz neformalnih i neostrukturnih podataka o društvenim medijima zahteva identifikaciju referentnih granica i imena kompleksa particije. Varijancija, posebno sistematska varijancija imena lokacije (Carroll, 1983), izaziva identifikacijski zadatak. Neke od tih različitih mogućnosti mogu se očekivati kao operacije unutar statističkog jezičkog model a, u ovom slučaju izvedene od novinara poput OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames i DBpedia. To omogućava procjenu posmatranog n-gram a na Twitter-u ciljanog teksta kao legitimni variant imena lokacije iz istog konteksta lokacije. Koristeći statistiku i rečenice vezane za lokaciju na n-gram, naš alat za izvlačenje imena lokacije (LNEx) obrađuje skrovišta i automatski filtriranje i povećava imena lokacije u novinarima (obrađivanje kontrakcija imena i pomoænog sadržaja) kako bi pomogli da otkrijemo granice imena lokacije višerečnih rečenica i tako ih deliliramo u tekstima. Procjenili smo naš pristup na 4.500 retova na konkretnim događajima iz tri ciljanih potoka da usporedimo učinkovitost LNEx-a s onim od deset državnih znakova umjetnosti koji se oslanjaju na standardne semantičke, sintaktičke i/ili ortografske karakteristike. LNEx je poboljšao prosječni F-bod za 33-179%, koji je nadmašio sve znakove. Dalje, LNEx je sposoban da obradi potok.', 'sv': 'För att extrahera platsnamn från informella och ostrukturerade sociala medier krävs identifiering av referensgränser och partitionering av sammansatta namn. Variabiliteten, särskilt systematisk variation i platsnamn (Carroll, 1983), utmanar identifieringsuppgiften. En del av denna variation kan förutses som operationer inom en statistisk språkmodell, i det här fallet hämtad från tidskrifter som OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames och DBpedia. Detta möjliggör utvärdering av ett observerat n-gram i Twitters riktade text som en legitim platsnamnsvariant från samma platskontext. Med hjälp av n-gramsstatistik och platsrelaterade ordböcker hanterar vårt verktyg för extraktion av platsnamn (LNEx) förkortningar och filtrerar och utökar automatiskt platsnamnen i tidningsartiklar (hantering av namnsammandragningar och hjälpinnehåll) för att hjälpa till att upptäcka gränserna för platsnamn med flera ord och därmed avgränsa dem i texter. Vi utvärderade vårt tillvägagångssätt på 4 500 händelsespecifika tweets från tre riktade strömmar för att jämföra LNEx-prestandan mot tio toppmoderna taggare som förlitar sig på standard semantiska, syntaktiska och/eller ortografiska funktioner. LNEx förbättrade den genomsnittliga F-Score med 33-179%, vilket överträffade alla taggare. LNEx kan dessutom bearbeta strömmar.', 'so': 'Magacyo ka soo bixista macluumaadyada shacabka ee macluumaadka bulshada ee aan rasmi lahayn iyo aan la dhisin waxay u baahan yihiin in la aqoonsado xuduudaha dadka iyo magacyada qeybinta qeybinta. Isbedelka, si gaar ah isbedelka nidaamka ah magaca degmada (Carroll, 1983), waxay dhibaataysaa shaqada aqoonsiga. Qaar ka mid ah waxyaabahan waxaa looga hor dhigi karaa wax qabad tusaale ahaan afka takhasuska ah, marka lagu soo jiidi karo jardiinada sida OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames iyo DBpedia. Tan waxaa lagu ogolaan karaa qiimeynta n-gram oo ku qoran qoraalka la hagaajiyey Twitterka oo ah magac sharci ah oo ka bedelan meesha aad ku leedahay. Isku isticmaalaya statistics n-gram iyo luqadaha ku saabsan meesha aad ku leedahay, xarunta magaca soo saarista (LNEx) wuxuu maamulaa baaritaanka iyo baaritaanka iyo si automatic ah oo uu u kordhiyo magaca meelaha lagu qoro jardiinada (handling heshiiska magaca iyo waxyaabaha ku qoran) si uu u caawiyo xuduudaha magacyada meelaha lagu magacaabo oo kala duduwan, markaasna uu ku jiidaa qoraalada. Waxaannu qiimeynay qaabilaadeenna 4,500 oo tweeteed oo cayiman ah oo ka yimid saddex durdur oo la jeeday si aan u dhigno tababarka LNEx, taasoo ka gees ah toban jardiinada farshaxanka ah oo ku talo gala cayiman, syntactic iyo/ama ortografi. LNEx wuxuu kordhiyey average F-score by 33-179%, outperforming all taggers. Further, LNEx is capable of stream processing.', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட எல்லைகளையும் பிரிப்பு கூட்டு பெயர்களையும் குறிப்பிடுதல் பெயரையும் தேவைப்படும். மாற்றம், குறிப்பாக அமைப்பு மாறுபாடு இடத்தின் பெயர்களில் (கார்ரோல், 1983), அடையாளம் பணியை சவால் செய்கிறது. இந்த மாறிகளில் சில செயல்பாடுகள் புள்ளிவிவரமான மொழி மாதிரியில் எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட முடியும், இந்த நிகழ்வில் ஓபன்ஸ்ட்ரீட்மாப்பிலிருந்த இது ஒரே இடத்திலிருந்து ஒரு சரியான இடத்தின் பெயர் மாறியில் இருந்து பார்க்கப்பட்ட n- gram உரையின் மதிப்பினை அனுமதிக்கிறது. n- gram புள்ளிவிவரங்கள் மற்றும் இடப்பெயர் தொடர்புடைய அகராதிகளை பயன்படுத்தி, எங்கள் இடத்தில் பெயர் பெயர் வெளியேறுதல் கருவியை கையாளும் மற்றும் தானாகவே வடிகட்டிகள் மற்றும் காசரிட்டரில் உள்ள இடத்தின் பெயர்களை கை நாங்கள் நிகழ்வு குறிப்பிட்ட மூன்று குறிப்பிட்ட ஆறுகளில் இருந்து 4,500 நிகழ்வு குறிப்பிட்ட துவக்குகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் LNEx செயல்பாட்டை ஒப்பிடுவதற்கு, நி LNEx சராசரி F- மதிப்பெண்களை 33- 179%, அனைத்து ஒட்டுக்களையும் வெளியேற்றினால் மேம்படுத்தினான். மேலும், LNEx தொடர்ந்து செயல்படுத்த முடியும்.', 'ur': 'غیر معمولی اور غیرساختہ سوسیلی میڈیا ڈیٹا سے جگہ نام اٹھانے کی ضرورت ہے کہ منظور مرزے اور پارٹیونٹ کی تعلق ناموں کی شناسایی کریں. تبدیلی، مخصوصاً جگہ موقعیت ناموں میں سیستمائی تغییر قابلیت (Carroll, 1983), پہچان کرنے کے کام کو چال دیتا ہے. اس متفاوت میں سے کچھ لوگ ایسے امداد کی زبان موڈل کے اندر عملیات کے طور پر انتظار کر سکتے ہیں جیسے OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames، اور DBpedia کے مطابق اس مطابق جہنم سے نکالا جاتا ہے۔ یہ توئیٹر میں ایک دیکھی n-گرم کا ارزش کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے کہ ایک سی موقعیت-کنٹنس سے ایک قانونی موقعیت نام کے طور پر لکھی جاتی ہے. ان-گرم آمار اور موقعیت کے ارتباط دار لکھنے کے استعمال کرتے ہیں، ہمارے موقعیت نام اخراج تولیل (LNEx) کوٹیاں اور اتمام فیلٹروں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے اور جگستر میں موقعیت ناموں کو اضافہ کرتا ہے (نام کنٹریزوں اور مددگار موقعیت) multi-word موقعیت ناموں کی حدیں پہچان سکنے کے لئے مدد کرتا ہے اور ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو 4,500 ایڈینٹ ویٹ کے مطابق تین مقررہ نہریں سے مطابق مقرر کیا ہے کہ LNEx کی عملکرد دس ایڈیٹ ٹاگروں کے مقابلہ میں مقرر کریں جو استاندارڈ سیمانٹیک، سینٹکتیک اور/یا اورٹوگرافیک ویٹ پر اعتماد رکھتے ہیں. LNEx نے متوسط F-Score کو 33-179% سے بہتر کر دیا، تمام ٹاگروں سے زیادہ اضافہ کیا۔ اس کے بعد، LNEx دریا پرسس کرنے کے قابل ہے.', 'mt': 'Extracting location names from informal and unstructured social media data requires the identification of referent boundaries and partitioning compound names.  Variability, particularly systematic variability in location names (Carroll, 1983), challenges the identification task.  Xi wħud minn din il-varjabilità jistgħu jiġu antiċipati bħala operazzjonijiet fi ħdan mudell ta’ lingwa statistika, f’dan il-każ miġbura minn gazzetti bħal OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, u DBpedia. Dan jippermetti l-evalwazzjoni ta’ n-gram osservat fit-test immirat fuq Twitter bħala varjant leġittimu tal-isem tal-post mill-istess kuntest tal-post. Bl-użu tal-istatistika n-gramma u d-dikjaraturi relatati mal-post, l-għodda tagħna għall-Estrazzjoni tal-Isem tal-Post (LNEx) timmaniġġja t-taqsiriet u tiffiltra awtomatikament u żżid l-ismijiet tal-post fil-gazzetti (l-immaniġġjar tal-kontrazzjonijiet tal-ismijiet u l-kontenut awżiljarju) biex tgħin biex tinstab il-konfini tal-ismijiet tal-post b’ħafna kliem u b’hekk tid Aħna evalwajna l-approċċ tagħna fuq 4,500 twitter speċifiċi għall-avvenimenti minn tliet flussi mmirati biex tqabblu l-prestazzjoni tal-LNEx ma’ dik ta’ għaxar taggers l-aktar avvanzati li jiddependu fuq karatteristiċi semantiċi, sintetiċi u/jew ortografiċi standard. L-LNEx tejbet il-punteġġ F medju bi 33-179%, u qabeż il-prestazzjoni tal-marki kollha. Barra minn hekk, LNEx huwa kapaċi jipproċessa l-fluss.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Oʻzgaruvchining, shaxsiy tizim nomining oʻzgarishlari (Carroll, 1983), identification vazifasini qidirish. Ushbu oʻzgarishlar statistical til modelida amallar ishlatiladi, shunday holatda OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames va DBpedia kabi gazetilardan chiqaradi. Name Name Biz oddiy semantik, syntactik va/yoki ortografik xususiyatlariga ishlatilgan 10 holat yordamning 10 holat yordamchi sohalar yordamida qo'llanmiz 4,500 hodisa xabarlardan foydalanamiz. Name Ko'rsatganda, LNEx stream tizimini boshqarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc lấy tên địa điểm từ dữ liệu mạng xã hội chưa được xây dựng không chính thức yêu cầu phải xác định giới hạn đối chiếu và cách phân chia tên hợp chất. Sự biến đổi, đặc biệt là sự biến đổi có hệ thống địa điểm (Carroll, 193) thách thức nhiệm vụ xác định. Một số thay đổi này có thể được dự đoán là hoạt động trong một mô hình ngôn ngữ thống kê, trong trường hợp này được lấy từ các tạp chí quan sát như OpenstreetMap (OSM), Geonames, và DBABdia. Việc n ày cho phép đánh giá một n-gram quan sát vào Twitter là một kiểu tên địa điểm hợp pháp từ cùng một địa điểm. Sử dụng thống kê n-gram và các từ điển liên quan đến địa điểm, công cụ tháo Vị trí của chúng ta (LEX) xử lý các loại viết tắt và tự động đầu lọc và tăng tên địa điểm trong các tạp chí quan sát (việc co lại tên và n ội dung phụ) để giúp phát hiện ranh giới của các tên vị trí đa từ và chia cách trong văn bản. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi trên tweet đặc biệt 4,500 từ ba dòng suối mục tiêu để so sánh các hiệu suất của LEX với với những khẩu phần thời đại tiên tiến liên tục dựa trên các tính năng theo ngữ pháp, cấu trúc, cấu trúc và/hay các tính chuẩn. LEX đã nâng mức F-Score trung bình bằng 33-179 Name, còn thua tất cả các tagers. Còn nữa, LEX có khả năng xử lý dòng chảy.', 'da': "Udtrækning af lokalitetsnavne fra uformelle og ustrukturerede sociale mediedata kræver identifikation af referentgrænser og partitionering af sammensatte navne. Variabilitet, især systematisk variabilitet i lokalitetsnavne (Carroll, 1983), udfordrer identifikationsopgaven. Nogle af denne variation kan forudses som operationer inden for en statistisk sprogmodel, i dette tilfælde trukket fra blade som OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames og DBpedia. Dette gør det muligt at evaluere et observeret n-gram i Twitter målrettet tekst som en legitim placeringsnavnvariant fra samme placering-kontekst. Ved hjælp af n-gram statistik og placeringsrelaterede ordbøger håndterer vores værktøj Location Name Extraction (LNEx) forkortelser og filtrerer automatisk og øger placeringsnavnene i blade (håndtering af navnesammensætninger og hjælpeindhold) for at hjælpe med at registrere grænserne for placeringsnavne med flere ord og dermed afgrænse dem i tekster. Vi evaluerede vores tilgang på 4.500 begivenhedsspecifikke tweets fra tre målrettede streams for at sammenligne LNEx's ydeevne med 10 state-of-the-art taggers, der er afhængige af standard semantiske, syntaktiske og/eller ortografiske funktioner. LNEx forbedrede den gennemsnitlige F-Score med 33-179%, hvilket overgik alle taggere. Desuden er LNEx i stand til strømbehandling.", 'nl': 'Het extraheren van locatienamen uit informele en ongestructureerde social media data vereist het identificeren van referentiegrenzen en het verdelen van samengestelde namen. Variabiliteit, met name systematische variabiliteit in locatienamen (Carroll, 1983), daagt de identificatietaak uit. Een deel van deze variabiliteit kan worden verwacht als bewerkingen binnen een statistisch taalmodel, in dit geval gebaseerd op gazetters zoals OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames en DBpedia. Dit maakt het mogelijk om een waargenomen n-gram in Twitter gerichte tekst te evalueren als een legitieme locatienaam variant uit dezelfde locatie-context. Met behulp van n-gram statistieken en locatiegerelateerde woordenboeken verwerkt ons Location Name Extraction tool (LNEx) afkortingen en filtert en voegt automatisch de locatienamen in gazetters toe (afhandeling van naamsamentrekkingen en hulpinhoud) om de grenzen van locatienamen met meerdere woorden te detecteren en deze zo in teksten af te bakenen. We hebben onze aanpak geëvalueerd op 4.500 event-specifieke tweets van drie gerichte streams om de prestaties van LNEx te vergelijken met die van tien state-of-the-art taggers die gebaseerd zijn op standaard semantische, syntactische en/of orthografische kenmerken. LNEx verbeterde de gemiddelde F-Score met 33-179%, beter dan alle taggers. Daarnaast is LNEx in staat om stroom te verwerken.', 'hr': 'Izvlačenje imena lokacije iz neformalnih i neostrukturnih podataka o društvenim medijima zahtijeva identifikaciju referentnih granica i imena složenih dijelovanja. Varijancija, posebno sistematska varijancija imena lokacije (Carroll, 1983), izaziva identifikacijski zadatak. Neke od tih različitih mogućnosti mogu se očekivati kao operacije unutar statističkog jezičkog model a, u ovom slučaju izvedene od novinara poput OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames i DBpedia. To omogućava procjenu posmatranog n-gram a na Twitteru ciljanog teksta kao legitimnog varianta imena lokacije iz istog konteksta lokacije. Koristeći statistiku i riječi o lokaciji na n-gramu, naš alat izvlačenja imena lokacije (LNEx) obrađuje skraćenja i automatski filtriranje i povećava imena lokacije u novinarima (obrađivanje ugovora imena i pomoćnog sadržaja) kako bi pomoglo otkriti granice imena lokacije više riječi i tako ih delitirali u tekstima. Procijenili smo naš pristup na 4.500 tweets za specifične događaje iz tri ciljanih potoka kako bi usporedili učinkovitost LNEx-a s onim od deset državnih znakova umjetnosti koji se oslanjaju na standardne semantičke, sintaktičke i/ili ortografske funkcije. LNEx je poboljšao prosječni F-bod za 33-179%, što je nadmašilo sve oznake. Dalje, LNEx je sposoban za obradu potoka.', 'de': 'Um Standortnamen aus informellen und unstrukturierten Social Media Daten zu extrahieren, müssen Referenzgrenzen identifiziert und zusammengesetzte Namen partitioniert werden. Variabilität, insbesondere die systematische Variabilität von Standortnamen (Carroll, 1983), stellt die Identifikationsaufgabe heraus. Ein Teil dieser Variabilität kann als Operationen innerhalb eines statistischen Sprachmodells erwartet werden, in diesem Fall aus Gazettern wie OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames und DBpedia. Dies ermöglicht die Auswertung eines beobachteten n-Gramm im Twitter-Zieltext als legitime Standortnamenvariante aus demselben Standortkontext. Mit Hilfe von n-Gramm-Statistiken und standortbezogenen Wörterbüchern verarbeitet unser Tool zur Standortnamenextraktion (LNEx) Abkürzungen und filtert und erweitert automatisch die Standortnamen in Gazetteern (Handhabung von Namenskontraktionen und Hilfsinhalten), um die Grenzen von mehrwortigen Standortnamen zu erkennen und so in Texten abzugrenzen. Wir haben unseren Ansatz anhand von 4.500 ereignisspezifischen Tweets aus drei gezielten Streams evaluiert, um die Leistung von LNEx mit der von zehn hochmodernen Taggern zu vergleichen, die auf semantischen, syntaktischen und/oder orthographischen Standardmerkmalen basieren. LNEx verbesserte den durchschnittlichen F-Score um 33-179%, übertraf alle Tagger. Darüber hinaus ist LNEx in der Lage, Strom zu verarbeiten.', 'bg': 'Извличането на имена на местоположения от неформални и неструктурирани данни в социалните медии изисква идентифициране на референтните граници и разделяне на съставните имена. Променливостта, особено систематичната променливост в имената на местоположенията (Карол, 1983), поставя под въпрос задачата за идентифициране. Част от тази вариабилност може да се очаква като операции в рамките на статистически езиков модел, в този случай извлечен от вестници като OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames и DBpedia. Това позволява оценка на наблюдаван н-грам в целевия текст като законен вариант на име на местоположение от същия контекст на местоположение. Използвайки статистически данни и речници, свързани с местоположението, нашият инструмент за извличане на имена на местоположение обработва съкращения и автоматично филтрира и увеличава имената на местоположенията в беседките (обработва контракциите на имената и спомагателното съдържание), за да помогне за откриването на границите на многословните имена на местоположенията и по този начин да ги разграничи в текстове. Оценихме подхода си върху 4500 специфични за събития туитъра от три целеви потока, за да сравним ефективността на LNEx с тази на десет най-съвременни маркери, които разчитат на стандартни семантични, синтактични и/или ортографски характеристики. LNEx подобри средния F-Score с 33-179%, надминавайки всички маркери. Освен това LNEx е в състояние да обработва поток.', 'ko': '비공식적이고 비구조화된 소셜 미디어 데이터에서 위치 이름을 추출하려면 인용 경계를 식별하고 복합 이름을 구분해야 한다.변이성, 특히 위치명칭의 시스템 변이성(Carroll, 1983)은 식별 임무에 도전했다.그 중 일부 가변성은 통계 언어 모델의 조작으로 예상할 수 있다. 이 예에서 이러한 조작은 OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, DBpedia 등지에서 나온 것이다.이것은 트위터 목표 텍스트에서 관찰된 n-gram을 같은 위치의 상하문에서 온 합법적인 위치 이름 변체로 평가할 수 있도록 합니다.n-gram 통계와 위치 관련 사전을 사용하여 Google의 위치 이름 추출 도구(LNEx)에서 줄임말을 처리하고, 다중 단어의 위치 이름의 경계를 측정하는 데 도움을 주며, 이 문서의 위치 이름을 자동으로 필터하고 추가합니다.우리는 세 가지 목표 흐름에서 나온 4500개의 특정한 이벤트의 트윗을 평가하고 LNEx의 성능과 표준어의, 문법과/또는 정교특징에 의존하는 10가지 가장 선진적인 표기기의 성능을 비교했다.LNEx는 평균 F 점수를 33~179% 올려 모든 입찰기자를 제쳤다.또한 LNEx는 스트리밍을 수행할 수 있습니다.', 'id': 'Mengekstrak nama lokasi dari data media sosial informal dan tidak strukturasi membutuhkan identifikasi batas referen dan partisi nama komponen. Variabilitas, terutama variabilitas sistematis dalam nama lokasi (Carroll, 1983), menantang tugas identifikasi. Beberapa variabilitas ini dapat diantisipasi sebagai operasi dalam model bahasa statistik, dalam kasus ini ditarik dari wartawan seperti OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, dan DBpedia. Ini memungkinkan evaluasi n-gram yang dilihat dalam teks sasaran Twitter sebagai variasi nama lokasi yang sah dari lokasi-konteks yang sama. Menggunakan statistik n-gram dan kamus berkaitan dengan lokasi, alat ekstraksi Nama Lokasi (LNEx) kami menangani singkat dan secara otomatis filter dan meningkatkan nama lokasi dalam gazet (menangani kontraksi nama dan isi bantuan) untuk membantu mendeteksi batas nama lokasi multi-kata dan dengan itu membatasinya dalam teks. We evaluated our approach on 4,500 event-specific tweets from three targeted streams to compare the performance of LNEx against that of ten state-of-the-art taggers that rely on standard semantic, syntactic and/or orthographic features.  LNEx memperbaiki F-Score rata-rata dengan 33-179%, melebihi semua tagger. Lagipula, LNEx mampu memproses aliran.', 'sw': 'Kutoa majina ya maeneo kutoka taarifa za mitandao ya kijamii zisizo rasmi na zisizo na ujenzi zinahitaji kutambua mipaka ya maoni na majina ya sehemu. Mabadiliko, hususani mabadiliko ya mfumo katika majina ya mahali (Carroll, 1983), yanachanganya kazi ya utambulisho. Baadhi ya mabadiliko haya yanaweza kutarajiwa kama shughuli katika mtindo wa lugha ya takwimu, katika tukio hili lililotolewa kutoka kwenye magazeti kama vile OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, na DBpedia. Hii inaruhusu kutathmini utafiti wa kituo hicho kinachotajwa kwenye mtandao wa Twita kama utambulisho wa jina halali kutoka kwenye eneo hilo n a muktadha huo. Kwa kutumia takwimu za gram na madikteta yanayohusiana na eneo hilo, zana letu la Jina la Utoa (LNEx) inatumia vibaya vibaya na vifaa vya fedha na kuongeza majina ya maeneo katika gazeti (kutekeleza mkataba wa jina na maudhui yanayohusiana) ili kusaidia kugundua mipaka ya majina ya maeneo mengi ya maneno na hivyo kuvifafanua kwa maandishi. Tulifuatilia hatua yetu kuhusu twiti maalumu za tukio 4,500 kutoka mito mitatu mitatu yenye lengo kulinganisha utendaji wa LNEx dhidi ya mabango 10 ya hali ya sanaa yanayotegemea semantic, syntactic na/au orthographic features. LNEx aliboresha kiwango cha wastani cha F-score kwa asilimia 33-179, kwa kutumia mabango yote. Zaidi, LNEx anaweza kuchukua mito.', 'fa': 'استخراج نام مکان از داده\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی غیرساخته و غیرساخته نیاز به شناسایی مرزهای مرزهای تفصیل و نام\u200cهای ترکیب جدایی است. تغییرات، مخصوصا تغییرات سیستم در نامهای موقعیت (Carroll, 1983) کار شناسایی را چالش می\u200cکند. بعضی از این تغییرات می\u200cتوانند به عنوان عملیات در یک مدل زبان آمار انتظار داشته باشند، در این صورت از بازرسان\u200cهای مانند OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames و DBpedia کشیده می\u200cشوند. این اجازه می\u200cدهد که ارزیابی یک n-گرم مشاهده شده در توئیتر متن هدف شده به عنوان یک متن نام جایگاهی قانونی از یک محیط جایگاهی باشد. استفاده از استفاده از آمار\u200cهای n-گرم و لغوی\u200cهای مربوط به جایگاهی، ابزار استخراج نام محل ما (LNEx) کوتاه\u200cها و فیلترها را به طور خودکار و افزایش نام جایگاهی در گزینه\u200cها (کنترل\u200cهای نام و محتوای کمک) برای کشف مرزهای نام\u200cهای جایگاهی چند کلمه\u200cها و بدین\u200cسان آنها را در متن\u200cها جد ما روش خودمان را روی ۲۰۰۰ تایتهای مخصوص رویداد از ۳ رودخانه هدف مقایسه کردیم تا عملکرد LNEx را با آن از ده تایگگرهای هنری که بر ویژه های سنتانسیک، سنتاکتیک و/یا orthographic استاندارد اعتماد دارند مقایسه کنیم. LNEx میانگین امتیاز F را با 33-179 درصد بهتر کرد، که بیشتر از تمام نقاشی\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهد. بعلاوه، LNEx قادر به پرداخت رودخانه است.', 'am': 'ከማስተካከል እና ከማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ዳታዎች ስሞች ማውጣት የሕዝብ ዳርቻ እና የአካባቢ ስም ማረጋገጥ ያስፈልጋል። ለውጥ፣ በተለየ ሲስተካከለኛ ስሞች (ካርሮል፣ 1983) የሚታወቀውን ስራ የሚያቃጥል፡፡ የዚህ ልውጤት አንዳንዶቹ በstatistical ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ውስጥ የተደረጉ ክፍተቶችን፣ ከOpenStreetMap (OSM), ጊዮናምስ እና DBpedia እንደተደረጉ ከጋዜጠኞች እንዲቆጠሩ ይቻላል፡፡ ይሄ የ-ግራም ጽሑፎችን በመጠቀም ላይ በሚያሳየው የn-gram ጽሑፍ እንደተፈቀደ ቦታ ስም ማተካክል ከsame ቦታ-context እንዲተካክሉ ይፈቅዳል። የn-gram statistics and location-related dictionaries using the Location Name Extraction tool (LNEx) handles abbreviations and automatically filters and augments the location names in gazetters (handling name contracts and auxiliary contents) to help find the boundary of multiple-word location names and thereby delimit them in text. አሥር የሀገር አርእስት፣ ሰንተርናሲክ እና/ወይም የኦሮግራፊክ ምርጫዎች በሚታመኑ የኢንተርኔክስ አሥር የሀገር-አርእስት ታግሮች ላይ የሚተካክሉትን የኢንተርኔክስ ትዊተሮችን 4,500 የተለየ ትዊተሮች ላይ አካሄድን፡፡ የLNEx ጥያቄ የF-score በ33-179 በመቶ ያሳድጋል፡፡ ከዚህም ጋር LNEx የውኃውን ማቀናቀል ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': "Ýer adlary informal we döredilmedik sosial medýdançalaryň maglumatyndan açylýän ýeri referent sahypalaryň we paýlaşmak üçin yadynyň belli edilmesi gerek. Ýerlerinde üýtgeşmeler, iň-görä sistematik üýtgeşmeler (Carroll, 1983), identifikaçy zady çykarýar. Bu üýtgeşikleriň käbirleri, OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames we DBpedia ýaly gazeteclerden, statistik dil nusgasynda işleri hökmünde gözlenebilir. Bu Twitter'da gözlenen n-gramyň deňlenmesine mümkin edýär. Meýdança ýerinden belli ýer adyny üýtgedir. N-gram Statistikleri we ýerleri baglanýan sözlerni ullanýar, biziň ýerleşdirim Ady Açmak esbaplarymyz Biziň ýaryşymyzy 4,500 öňe görkezilen üç hedefi akrymdan tapylan tweetlerde LNEx'in etkinleşigini standart semantik, syntaktik we/ýa ortografik özelliklerine döretmek üçin deňleştirdik. LNEx ortalama F merkezini 33-179% tarafından geliştirdi, bütün etiketlerden üstün çıktı. Edem, LNEx akrym işlemegini başaryp biler.", 'af': "Die uitpakking van ligging naams van onformele en onstruktureerde sosiale media data benodig die identifikasie van verwysing grense en partisieringsamelnaams. Veranderlike, veranderlike sistematiese veranderlike in ligging name (Carroll, 1983), uitdruk die identifikasie-taak. Sommige van hierdie veranderlikheid kan verwag word as operasies binne 'n statistiese taal model, in hierdie geval teken van gazetters soos OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames en DBpedia. Hierdie laat toe die evaluering van 'n aansigte n- gram in Twitter gemaakte teks as 'n regverdige ligging naam variant van dieselfde ligging- context. Die gebruik van n-gram statistieke en ligging-verwante woordeboeke, ons ligging Naam uitpakking hulpmiddel (LNEx) handteer kruiflings en automaties filters en vergroot die ligging naams in gazetters (behandeling van naam-kontraksies en hulpinhoud) om die grense van veelvuldige woorde ligging name te verkry en daarom hulle in teks te verdeleer. Ons het ons toegang op 4,500 gebeurtenis-spesifieke tweets van drie doelgemaakte strome evalueer om die prestasie van LNEx te vergelyk teen die tien staat-van-kuns-taggers wat op standaard semantiese, sintaktike en/of orthografiese funksies vertrou. LNEx het die gemiddelde F- Telling met 33- 179%, uitgevoer van alle merkers. Verder is LNEx in staat van stroom verwerking.", 'sq': 'Duke nxjerrë emrat e vendndodhjes nga të dhënat informale dhe të pastrukturuara të medias sociale kërkon identifikimin e kufijve referente dhe ndarjen e emrave të përbërë. Variabiliteti, veçanërisht variabiliteti sistematik në emrat e vendndodhjes (Carroll, 1983), sfidon detyrën e identifikimit. Disa nga këto ndryshime mund të parashikohen si operacione brenda një modeli gjuhësh statistike, në këtë rast të tërhequr nga gazetarë të tillë si OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames dhe DBpedia. Kjo lejon vlerësimin e një n-gram të vëzhguar n ë tekstin e shënuar në Twitter si një variant legjitim emri i vendit nga i njëjti kontekst-vendndodhje. Duke përdorur statistikat n-gram dhe fjalorët lidhur me vendndodhjen, mjeti ynë për nxjerrjen e emrit të vendndodhjes (LNEx) trajton shkurtimet dhe filtron automatikisht dhe shton emrat e vendndodhjes n ë gazetë (trajtimin e kontraksioneve të emrit dhe përmbajtjeve ndihmëse) për të ndihmuar në zbulimin e kufijve të emrave të vendndodhjes me shumë fjalë dhe kështu i deliminon ato në tekste. Ne vlerësuam qasjen tonë në 4,500 tweete specifike ngjarjeve nga tre rrjedha të synuara për të krahasuar performancën e LNEx me atë të dhjetë taggers më të lartë që mbështeten në karakteristika standarte semantike, sintaktike dhe/ose ortografike. LNEx përmirësoi rezultatin mesatar F me 33-179%, duke i kaluar të gjitha etiketat. Më tej, LNEx është në gjendje të përpunojë rrjedhën.', 'hy': 'Տեղադրության անունները հանելը ոչ տեղեկատվական և ոչ կառուցվածքային սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տվյալներից պահանջում է վերջնական սահմանների հայտնաբերման և բաժանելու համադրված անունները: Variability, particularly systematic variability in location names (Carroll, 1983), challenges the identification task.  Այս տարբերակությունից որոշ մասեր կարելի է ակնկալել որպես գործողություններ վիճակագրական լեզվի մոդելի մեջ, այս դեպքում նկարահանվել են օրինակ OpenStreet Map (ՕՍՄ), Ջեոնամեններ և DBpeda-ից: Սա թույլ է տալիս գնահատել n-գրամը Թվիթերի նպատակային տեքստում որպես իրավական վայրի անունների տարբերակ նույն վայրի-կոնտեքստից: Օգտագործելով n-գրամի վիճակագրությունը և տեղադրության հետ կապված բառարանները, մեր գործիքը Տեղադրության անունների արտադրման գործիքը (LNetx) վերահսկում է կարճումները, ինքնաբերաբար ֆիլտրում և աճում է տեղադրության անունները բառարաններում (վերահսկում է անունների հակադրությունները և օգնական պարունակությունը) օգնելու բազմաբառերի տեղադրության անունների Մենք գնահատեցինք մեր մոտեցումը 4,500 իրադարձությունների կոնկրետ թվիթերի վրա երեք նպատակային հոսանքներից, որպեսզի համեմատենք LNetx-ի արտադրողությունը և տասը բարձրագույն թեգտերների արտադրողությունը, որոնք հիմնված են ստանդարտ սեմանտիկ, սինտակտիկ և (կամ) օրտոգր LNx-ը բարելավեց F-Սկորը 33-179 տոկոսով, առավել քան բոլոր նշանները: Further, LNEx is capable of stream processing.', 'bn': 'সামাজিক যোগাযোগ মাধ্যমের তথ্য থেকে অফিসাল ও অকার্যকর অবস্থানের নাম বের করার প্রয়োজনীয় সীমানা এবং বিভিন্ন মাধ্যমের না বৈষম্য, বিশেষ করে অবস্থানের নামের সিস্টেমিক পরিবর্তন (ক্যারোল, ১৯৮৩), পরিচিতির কাজের চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে। এই বিভিন্ন কিছু পরিসংখ্যান ভাষার মডেলের মধ্যে অপারেশন হিসেবে প্রত্যাশা করা যায়, এই ক্ষেত্রে গ্যাগেটারের মতো ওপেন্স্ট্রিট ম্যাপ (ওএসএ এটি টুইটারে লক্ষ্য করা টেক্সটের একটি n-গ্রামের মূল্য প্রদান করার অনুমতি দেয় একই অবস্থান- কন্টেক্সট থেকে বৈধ অবস্থানের নাম ভ n-gram পরিসংখ্যান এবং অবস্থানের সংশ্লিষ্ট অভিধান ব্যবহার করে, আমাদের স্থানীয় নাম এক্সট্র্যাক্স টুল (LNEx) স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ফিল্টার ও স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ফিল্টার এবং গ্যাগেটিয়ারের (নাম চুক্তি এবং অন আমরা তিন নির্দিষ্ট নদীত থেকে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া ৪,৫০০ টুইটের উপর মূল্যায়ন করেছি যারা স্বাভাবিক সেমেন্টিক, সিন্ট্রাক্টিক এবং/অথবা orthografi বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর নির্ভ এলনেক্স সাধারণ F-স্কোর ৩৩-১৭৯ শতাংশের মাধ্যমে উন্নত করেছে, সকল ট্যাগার প্রদর্শন করছে। এছাড়াও, এলনেক্স নদীর প্রক্রিয়ার ক্ষমতা আছে।', 'az': "Yer adlarńĪnńĪ informal v…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilm…ômiŇü sosyal media m…ôlumatlarńĪndan √ßńĪxarńĪlan m…ôlumatlarńĪn m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôsi v…ô m…ôlumatlarńĪn m…ôlumatlarńĪnńĪn t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôsi lazńĪmdńĪr. Yer adlarńĪndakńĪ d…ôyiŇüiklik, √∂zl…ôrin…ô d…ô sistematik d…ôyiŇüiklik (Carroll, 1983), kimlik iŇüini t…ôŇükil edir. Bu d…ôyiŇüiklikd…ôn b…ôzil…ôri, OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames v…ô DBpedia kimi, Statistik dil modeli i√ßind…ô iŇül…ôri olaraq t…ômin edil…ô bil…ôr. Bu, T√∂vratdakńĪ nqramma m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilmiŇü m…ôtnin aynńĪ m…ôlumatlardan istifad…ô edil…ôn m…ôlumatńĪn adńĪ d…ôyiŇüikliyi olaraq t…ômin edir. N-gram statistika v…ô yer bańülńĪ s√∂zl…ôri istifad…ô etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, Location Name Extraction Tool (LNEx) √ßoxlu s√∂zl…ôrin adlarńĪn ńĪ tanńĪma yardńĪm etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn qńĪsqartmalarńĪ, avtomatik filtrl…ôri v…ô yerl…ôrin adlarńĪnńĪ √ßoxlu s√∂zl…ôrin adlarńĪnńĪ t…ôsdiql…ôm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn gazetterl…ôrd…ô artńĪrar. Biz 4.500 olaraq m√ľ…ôyy…ôn t…ôrzimizi √ľ√ß m…ôqs…ôd akńĪŇüńĪndan m√ľ…ôyy…ôn etdik ki, LNEx'in performansńĪnńĪ standart semantik, sintaktik v…ô/ya ortografik √∂zellikl…ôrin…ô dayanan on m√ľ…ôyy…ôn m√ľ…ôyy…ôn m√ľ…ôyy…ôn m√ľdd…ôti il…ô qarŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn 4.500 olaraq m√ľ…ôyy…ôn m√ľ…ôyy…ôn etdik. LNEx ortalama F-Score 33-179%-…ô q…ôd…ôr yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪ, b√ľt√ľn etiket√ßil…ôri √ľst√ľn etdi. Daha sonra, LNEx sudan iŇül…ôm…ôy…ô qadir.", 'bs': 'Izvlačenje imena lokacije iz neformalnih i neostrukturnih podataka o društvenim medijima zahtijeva identifikaciju referentnih granica i imena složenih dijelovanja. Varijancija, posebno sistematska varijancija imena lokacije (Carroll, 1983), izaziva identifikacijski zadatak. Neke od tih variabilnosti mogu očekivati kao operacije unutar statističkog jezičkog model a, u ovom slučaju izvedene od novinara poput OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames i DBpedia. To omogućava procjenu posmatranog n-gram a na Twitter-u ciljanog teksta kao legitimni variant imena lokacije iz istog konteksta lokacije. Koristeći statistiku i rečnike vezane za lokaciju na n-gram, naš alat izvlačenja imena lokacije (LNEx) vodi skraćenja i automatski filtriranje i povećava imena lokacije u novinarima (obrađivanje kontrakcija imena i pomoćnog sadržaja) kako bi pomogli otkriti granice imena lokacije multiriječi i tako ih delitirali u tekstima. Procijenili smo naš pristup na 4.500 retovima specifičnih događaja iz tri ciljanih potoka da usporedimo učinkovitost LNEx-a s onim od deset državnih znakova umjetnosti koji se oslanjaju na standardne semantičke, sintaktičke i/ili ortografske funkcije. LNEx je poboljšao prosječni F-bod za 33-179%, što je nadmašilo sve znakove. Dalje, LNEx je sposoban za obradu potoka.', 'ca': "L'extracció de noms de llocs de dades informals i no estructurats dels mitjans socials requereix la identificació de límits referents i la divisió de noms composts. La variabilitat, particularment la variabilitat sistemàtica dels noms de lloc (Carroll, 1983), desafia la tasca d'identificació. Una part d'aquesta variabilitat es pot preveure com operacions dins un model de llenguatge estadística, en aquest cas dibuixats de periodistes com OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames i DBpedia. Això permet l'evaluació d'un n-gram observat a Twitter com un nom de lloc legítim variant del mateix context-lloc. Utilitzant estadístiques n-gram i diccionaris relacionats amb la ubicació, la nostra eina d'extracció de nom de lloc (LNEx) gestiona abreviacions i filtra automàticament i augmenta els noms de lloc en els periodistes (manipulant contraccions de nom i continguts auxiliars) per ajudar a detectar les fronteres dels noms de lloc multiparaules i, així, delimitar-los en textos. Vam evaluar el nostre enfocament en 4.500 tweets específics per eventos de tres corrents mirats per comparar el rendiment de LNEx amb el de 10 etiquetadors d'última edat que confien en característiques semàntiques, sinàctiques i/o ortogràfiques estándar. LNEx va millorar la mitjana de puntuació F entre 33 i 179%, superant tots els etiquetadors. I més, LNEx és capaç de processar flux.", 'cs': 'Extrakce názvů lokalit z neformálních a nestrukturovaných dat sociálních médií vyžaduje identifikaci referenčních hranic a rozdělení složených názvů. Variabilita, zejména systematická variabilita názvů lokalit (Carroll, 1983), vyzývá identifikační úlohu. Část této variability lze očekávat jako operace v rámci statistického jazykového modelu, v tomto případě čerpané z gazetterů, jako jsou OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames a DBpedia. To umožňuje vyhodnocení pozorovaného n-gramu v cíleném textu Twitteru jako legitimní varianty názvu lokality ze stejného kontextu lokality. Pomocí n-gramových statistik a slovníků souvisejících s umístěním zpracovává náš nástroj pro extrakci názvu lokality (LNEx) zkratky a automaticky filtruje a rozšiřuje názvy lokalit v gazeterách (zpracovává kontrakce jmen a pomocný obsah), aby pomohl detekovat hranice víceslovných názvů lokality a tím je vymezit v textech. Hodnotili jsme náš přístup na 4.500 událostně specifických tweetech ze tří cílených streamů, abychom porovnali výkon LNEx s výkonem deseti nejmodernějších taggerů, které spoléhají na standardní sémantické, syntaktické a/nebo ortografické prvky. LNEx zlepšil průměrný F-Score o 33-179%, překonal všechny tagery. Kromě toho je LNEx schopen zpracování toku.', 'et': 'Asukohanimete väljavõtmine mitteametlikest ja struktureerimata sotsiaalmeedia andmetest nõuab viitepiiride tuvastamist ja liitnimete jagamist. Muutuvus, eelkõige asukohanimede süstemaatiline varieeruvus (Carroll, 1983), seab välja identifitseerimise ülesande. Osa sellest varieeruvusest võib eeldada statistilise keelemudeli operatsioonidena, antud juhul väljaannetest nagu OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames ja DBpedia. See võimaldab hinnata Twitteri sihitekstis täheldatud n-grammi õiguspärase asukohanime variandina samast asukoha kontekstist. Kasutades n-grammi statistikat ja asukohaga seotud sõnaraamatuid, käsitleb meie asukohanime ekstraheerimise tööriist (LNEx) lühendeid ning filtreerib ja täiendab automaatselt asukohanimeid väljaannetes (käsitleb nimekontraktsioone ja abisisu), et aidata tuvastada mitmesõnaliste asukohanimede piire ja seeläbi piiritleda need tekstides. Hindasime oma lähenemisviisi 4500 sündmuspõhise säutsu põhjal kolmest sihtvoost, et võrrelda LNExi jõudlust kümne kaasaegse sildistaja jõudlustega, mis tuginevad standardsetele semantilistele, süntaktilistele ja/või ortograafilistele omadustele. LNEx parandas keskmist F-skoori 33-179%, ületades kõiki märgistajaid. Lisaks on LNEx võimeline voogude töötlemiseks.', 'fi': 'Sijaintinnimien poimiminen epämuodollisesta ja jäsentämättömästä sosiaalisen median datasta edellyttää viiterajojen tunnistamista ja yhdistelmänimien jakamista. Muuttuvuus, erityisesti paikannimien systemaattinen vaihtelu (Carroll, 1983), haastaa tunnistamistehtävän. Osa tästä vaihtelusta voidaan ennakoida tilastollisen kielimallin mukaisina toimintoina, tässä tapauksessa ne on laadittu lehtien kuten OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames ja DBpedia avulla. Tämä mahdollistaa havainnoidun n-gramman arvioimisen Twitterissä kohdistetussa tekstissä laillisena sijaintinimen muunnoksena samasta sijaintikontekstista. Käyttämällä n-gram-tilastoja ja sijaintiin liittyviä sanakirjoja Location Name Extraction Tool (LNEx) käsittelee lyhenteitä ja suodattaa ja laajentaa automaattisesti sijaintinimiä lehdissä (käsittelemällä nimisupistuksia ja apusisältöä) auttaakseen havaitsemaan monisanaisten sijaintinimien rajat ja siten rajaamaan ne teksteihin. Arvioimme lähestymistapaamme 4 500 tapahtumakohtaisella twiitillä kolmesta kohdennetusta virrasta vertaillaksemme LNExin suorituskykyä kymmeneen huipputekniikkaan perustuvaan taggeriin, jotka perustuvat standardiin semanttisiin, syntaktisiin ja/tai ortografisiin ominaisuuksiin. LNEx paransi keskimääräistä F-Score-pistettä 33-179%, mikä ylitti kaikki taggerit. Lisäksi LNEx pystyy virtojen käsittelyyn.', 'jv': "deep (carol, trumpet, wae sistem) Gujaring Samsul Using n-gram data and location-Relative Dicationères, we Location Name Awakdhéwé éntukno dhéwé nggambar 4.500 eventlanga kuwi wis dipun wae dadi wis arep nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggeranggap kanggo ngerasahan kanggo sabên langgar sami pasar tentang-sami-sanga-karbot sing isinasakno semanti, sinaksi lan/o ortoggraphic sing dibutuhke maneh. LNOx lakune nggo deweke nggo oleh-oleh 'F-Ranger' (3-1) Lah-layang, LNex iso ngubah perusahaan uwis.", 'sk': 'Pridobivanje imen lokacij iz neformalnih in nestrukturiranih podatkov družbenih omrežij zahteva identifikacijo referenčnih meja in delitev sestavljenih imen. Spremenljivost, zlasti sistematična spremenljivost imen lokacij (Carroll, 1983), izziva nalogo identifikacije. Nekaj te variabilnosti je mogoče pričakovati kot operacije znotraj statističnega jezikovnega modela, v tem primeru iz listov, kot so OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames in DBpedia. To omogoča oceno opaženega n-grama v Twitterjevem ciljnem besedilu kot različice legitimnega imena lokacije iz istega konteksta lokacije. Z uporabo statistike n-gramov in slovarjev, povezanih z lokacijami, naše orodje za ekstrakcijo imen lokacij (LNEx) obravnava okrajšave ter samodejno filtrira in povečuje imena lokacij v listih (obdeluje krčenje imen in pomožne vsebine), da pomaga odkrivati meje večbesednih imen lokacij in jih s tem razmejiti v besedilih. Naš pristop smo ocenili na 4.500 tweetih, specifičnih za dogodek, iz treh ciljnih tokov, da bi primerjali zmogljivost LNEx z zmogljivostjo desetih najsodobnejših označevalcev, ki se zanašajo na standardne semantične, sintaktične in/ali ortografske značilnosti. LNEx je izboljšal povprečni F-Score za 33-179%, kar je preseglo vse označevalce. Poleg tega je LNEx sposoben obdelati tokove.', 'he': 'להוציא את שמות המיקום ממידע רשמי ולא מבושל של התקשורת החברתית דורש זיהוי של גבולות רפורנטיים ומחלקת שמות מורכבים. שינוי, במיוחד שינוי שיטתי בשמות המיקום (קרול, 1983), מאתגר במשימת הזהות. Some of this variability can be anticipated as operations within a statistical language model, in this case drawn from gazetteers such as OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, and DBpedia.  זה מאפשר הערכה של n-גרם נצפה בטוויטר טקסט המטרה כשונה לגיטימית של שם המיקום מאותו קונטקסט המיקום. בשימוש בסטטיסטיקה n-גרם ומילונים קשורים למיקום, כלי החזרה של שם המיקום שלנו (LNEx) מטפלים במקצרות ומסינים אוטומטיים ומגבירים את שמות המיקום בעיתונים (טיפל בתנגשות בשמות ותוכן עזרי) כדי לעזור לזהות את הגבולות של שמות מיקומות רבות ולכן להעביר אותם לטקסטים. הערכנו את הגישה שלנו על 4,500 טוויטים ספציפיים לאירועים משלושה זרמים מיועדים לשוות את ההופעה של LNEx עם ההופעה של עשר תוויטים מוקדמים שמסומכים על תכונות סמנטיות, סינטאקטיות ו/או אורטוגרפיות סטנדרטיות. LNEx שיפר את נקודת F הממוצעת ב-33-179%, מעל כל התגים. חוץ מזה, LNEx מסוגל לעבוד זרם.', 'ha': "Fitarwa sunayen wuri daga data na mitandai na jamii wanda ba'a rasmi ba da kuma ba'a shirya shi ba, yana da ƙayyade sunayen tsarin da ke yin takarda. @ action: button Babu wani daga wannan variable za'a iya ƙayyade aiki a cikin wata misalin harshen ƙaddarã, a cikin wannan case, an lokace daga gasetters kamar OSM, Geoname da DBpedi. Wannan yana yarda da a n ƙaddara wani n a-gram da aka gane cikin rubutun da aka yi amfani da shi na Twitter kamar wata sunan wurin da aka halatta da wanda aka canza daga wurin-context guda. Yi amfani da shiryoyin statistics na n-gram da dictionaries masu da aka yi danganta, zanen Cikakken Extracti (LNEx) na yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka na ƙayyade (na-gram) kuma yana amfani da sunayen filayer da ke cikin takardar gasketeeri (masu amfani da sunan sunan kuma da tsari da ke ƙaranci) dõmin ya ƙara ƙayyade tsarin sunayen wuri masu yawa kuma ya ƙayyade su cikin littafan. Mun ƙaddara hanyoyinmu a kan matar-wato 4,000 masu ƙayyadadde daga kõguna uku waɗanda aka yi goani dõmin ka sammeni aikin LNEx a kanan gabatar da turu 10-state-of-the-art taggeri waɗanda ke dõgara a kanan semantic, syntactic and/or orthographic feature. LNEx ya improve gwargwadon F-score by 33-179%, outperforming all taggers. Furan, LNEx yana iya iya iya samun aiki na ƙari.", 'bo': 'གནས་ཡུལ་མིང་དང་སྒྲིག་གཞུང་མེད་པའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གནས་ཚུལ་ཕྱིར་འདོན (Carroll, 1983)ནང་དུ་འགྱུར་ཅན་དང་ཁྱད་པར་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་ཡིན་གནས་ཡུལ་མིང་ཚོའི་ལས་འགུལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཀའ་འགྲུལ་བ། Some of this variability can be anticipated as operations within a statistical language model, in this case drawn from gazetteers such as OpenStreetMap (OSM), Geonames, and DBpedia. འདིས་ཌིས་ཐོག་ཏུ་ལྟ་ཀློག་ཡོད་པའི་n-རིགས་ཅིག་གི་ཚད་ལྟར་བཀོད་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག Using n-gram statistics and location-related dictionaries, our Location Name Extraction tool (LNEx) handles abbreviations and automatically filters and augments the location names in gazetteers (handling name contractions and auxiliary contents) to help detect the boundaries of multi-word location names and thereby delimit them in texts. ང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐབས་འགའ་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་འགྱུར་བ་གཞན་༥༠༠་གི་ནང་གི་གོ་སྐབས་གནད་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བའི་གྲལ་ཐེངས་གསུམ་ནས་LNEx་གི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་འབད་བ་ཡིན། LNEx ཡིས་གྲངས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བྱེད་ནུས་33-179%, ཤོག་བྱང་ཆ་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང ལ་ཡང་ན། LNEx ནི་ཤུགས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་ཆ་ལས་རིམ་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'The APVA-TURBO Approach To Question Answering in Knowledge Base', 'ar': 'نهج APVA-TURBO في الإجابة على الأسئلة في قاعدة المعرفة', 'es': 'El enfoque APVA-TURBO para responder a preguntas en la base de conocimientos', 'fr': "L'approche APVA-TURBO pour répondre aux questions dans la base de connaissances", 'pt': 'A abordagem APVA-TURBO para responder perguntas na base de conhecimento', 'ja': 'ナレッジベースでの質問へのAPVA - TURBOアプローチ', 'zh': 'APVA-TURBO 于知识库中对问之法', 'hi': 'APVA-टर्बो दृष्टिकोण नॉलेज बेस में उत्तर देने वाले प्रश्न के लिए', 'ru': 'Подход APVA-TURBO к ответам на вопросы в базе знаний', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige APVA-TURBO maidir le Freagairt Cheisteanna sa Bhonn Eolais', 'ka': 'APVA', 'hu': 'Az APVA-TURBO megközelítése a kérdések megválaszolására a tudásbázisban', 'el': 'Η προσέγγιση APVA-TURBO για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων στη Γνωσιακή Βάση', 'it': "L'approccio APVA-TURBO alla risposta alle domande nella Knowledge Base", 'lt': 'APVA-TURBO metodas atsakyti į klausimus žinių bazėje', 'mk': 'АПВА-ТУРБО пристап до одговорите на прашањата во базата на знаење', 'kk': 'APVA- TURBO білім негізіндегі сұрақ жауап беру', 'mt': 'L-Approċċ APVA-TURBO għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet fil-Bażi tal-Għarfien', 'mn': 'APVA-TURBO мэдлэг суурь дээр асуултын хариултын тулд', 'ms': 'APVA-TURBO mendekati jawapan soalan dalam Pangkalan pengetahuan', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്കുള്ള ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം APVA- TURBO', 'no': 'APVA-TURBO-tilnærming til spørsmålssvar i kjennebasen', 'pl': 'Podejście APVA-TURBO do odpowiedzi na pytania w bazie wiedzy', 'ro': 'Abordarea APVA-TURBO a răspunsurilor la întrebări în baza de cunoștințe', 'sr': 'APVA-TURBO pristup na odgovor na pitanja u bazi znanja', 'si': 'APVA-TURBO සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතිච්චා කරන්න', 'sv': 'APVA-TURBO-metoden för att besvara frågor i kunskapsbasen', 'so': "APVA-TURBO u Dhawaaqda su'aalaha ku jawaabta aqoonta aasaasiga", 'ta': 'APVA- TURBO அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையில் கேள்விக்கு பதில் செல்லவும்', 'ur': 'The APVA-TURBO Approach to Question Answering in Knowledge Base', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cách thức bố câu hỏi trả lời trong Nhà tri thức', 'nl': 'De APVA-TURBO aanpak voor het beantwoorden van vragen in Knowledge Base', 'da': 'APVA-TURBO tilgang til spørgsmål besvarelse i vidensbase', 'id': 'APVA-TURBO mendekati menjawab pertanyaan di dasar pengetahuan', 'de': 'Der APVA-TURBO Ansatz zur Beantwortung von Fragen in der Wissensdatenbank', 'bg': 'Подходът на АФВА-ТУРБО към отговора на въпроси в базата на знания', 'hr': 'APVA-TURBO pristup odgovoru na pitanja u bazi znanja', 'fa': 'نزدیک APVA-TURBO به سوال جواب در پایگاه دانش', 'sw': 'APVA-TURBO Inakaribia swali katika msingi wa maarifa', 'sq': 'APVA-TURBO Përqafohet për përgjigjen e pyetjeve në bazën e njohurive', 'tr': 'APVA-TURBO Bilim Basesinde soragy jogaplamak üçin ýakyn', 'af': 'Die APVA-TURBO-toegang tot vraag antwoord in kennis basis', 'az': 'APVA-TURBO Bilim Basesind…ô cavab ver…ôn suala yaxƒ±nla≈üƒ±r', 'hy': 'APva-Turbo մոտեցումը գիտելիքի հիմքում հարցերի պատասխանելուն', 'am': 'APVA-TURBO ወደ ጥያቄ መልስ በእውቀት መቀመጫው', 'bs': 'APVA-TURBO pristup odgovoru na pitanja u bazi znanja', 'ko': 'APVA-TURBO 기반 Knowledge Library Q&amp;A 방법', 'ca': "L'enfocament APVA-TURBO a la resposta a preguntes a la base de coneixements", 'fi': 'APVA-TURBO-lähestymistapa kysymyksiin vastaamiseen Knowledge Base -tietokannassa', 'cs': 'APVA-TURBO Přístup k odpovědi na otázky ve znalostní bázi', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিতে প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য APVA-TURBO', 'et': 'APVA-TURBO lähenemisviis küsimustele vastamisele teabebaasis', 'jv': 'Njupuk ApVHA-TIRBO yakonh kanggo Kejang Panjenengan Inggal barang kanggo ngerasahan barang', 'sk': 'Pristop APVA-TURBO k odgovarjanju na vprašanja v bazi znanja', 'he': 'הגישה APVA-TURBO לענות על שאלות בבסיס ידע', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'The APVA-TURBO Approach To Question Answering in Knowledge Base'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we study the problem of question answering over knowledge base. We identify that the primary bottleneck in this problem is the difficulty in accurately predicting the relations connecting the subject entity to the object entities. We advocate a new model architecture, APVA, which includes a verification mechanism responsible for checking the correctness of predicted relations. The APVA framework naturally supports a well-principled iterative training procedure, which we call turbo training. We demonstrate via experiments that the APVA-TUBRO approach drastically improves the question answering performance.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ندرس مشكلة الإجابة على الأسئلة على قاعدة المعرفة. نحدد أن العقبة الأساسية في هذه المشكلة هي صعوبة التنبؤ الدقيق بالعلاقات التي تربط الكيان الخاضع بالكيانات الكائن. نحن ندعو إلى بنية نموذجية جديدة ، APVA ، والتي تتضمن آلية تحقق مسؤولة عن التحقق من صحة العلاقات المتوقعة. يدعم إطار عمل APVA بشكل طبيعي إجراء تدريب تكراري جيد المبادئ ، والذي نسميه التدريب التوربيني. نوضح من خلال التجارب أن نهج APVA-TUBRO يحسن بشكل كبير أداء الإجابة على الأسئلة.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, estudamos o problema da resposta a perguntas sobre a base de conhecimento. Identificamos que o principal gargalo neste problema é a dificuldade em prever com precisão as relações que ligam a entidade sujeito às entidades objeto. Defendemos uma nova arquitetura de modelo, APVA, que inclui um mecanismo de verificação responsável por verificar a exatidão das relações previstas. A estrutura APVA suporta naturalmente um procedimento de treinamento iterativo bem fundamentado, que chamamos de treinamento turbo. Demonstramos por meio de experimentos que a abordagem APVA-TUBRO melhora drasticamente o desempenho de respostas a perguntas.', 'es': 'En este artículo, estudiamos el problema de la respuesta a preguntas sobre la base de conocimientos. Identificamos que el principal cuello de botella en este problema es la dificultad de predecir con precisión las relaciones que conectan la entidad sujeto con las entidades objeto. Abogamos por una nueva arquitectura modelo, APVA, que incluya un mecanismo de verificación responsable de comprobar la exactitud de las relaciones predichas. El marco APVA apoya naturalmente un procedimiento de entrenamiento iterativo basado en principios, que llamamos entrenamiento turbo. Demostramos mediante experimentos que el enfoque APVA-TUBRO mejora drásticamente el rendimiento de las respuestas a las preguntas.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous étudions le problème des réponses aux questions par rapport à la base de connaissances. Nous avons identifié que le principal goulot d'étranglement de ce problème est la difficulté de prédire avec précision les relations reliant l'entité sujet aux entités objet. Nous préconisons une nouvelle architecture de modèle, APVA, qui inclut un mécanisme de vérification chargé de vérifier l'exactitude des relations prédites. Le framework APVA prend naturellement en charge une procédure de formation itérative basée sur des principes, que nous appelons formation turbo. Nous démontrons par des expériences que l'approche APVA-TUBRO améliore considérablement les performances de réponse aux questions.", 'ja': '本稿では，知識ベースに対する質問回答の問題について研究する。この問題の主なボトルネックは、対象と対象とを結びつける関係を正確に予測することの困難さであると私たちは認識しています。予測される関係の正しさをチェックする検証メカニズムを含む新しいモデルアーキテクチャ、APVAを提唱しています。APVAフレームワークは、当然ながら、ターボトレーニングと呼ばれる、十分に原則的な反復トレーニング手順をサポートしています。我々は、APVA - TUBROアプローチが質問回答のパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させることを実験を通じて実証した。', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы изучаем проблему ответа на вопросы по сравнению с базой знаний. Мы определяем, что основным узким местом в этой задаче является трудность точного прогнозирования отношений, связывающих субъекта с объектными объектами. Мы выступаем за новую модель архитектуры, APVA, которая включает в себя механизм проверки, ответственный за проверку правильности прогнозируемых отношений. Фреймворк APVA, естественно, поддерживает хорошо принципиальную итеративную тренировочную процедуру, которую мы называем турбо-тренировкой. Мы демонстрируем с помощью экспериментов, что подход APVA-TUBRO резко улучшает эффективность ответов на вопросы.', 'zh': '本文之中,究知识库问答。 吾定大体瓶颈难测所系。 一架构 APVA,一主正确性之验也。 APVA框架自然之迭代训练程序,谓之涡轮增压教。 实验以验之,APVA-TUBRO大大提高问性能。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम नॉलेज बेस पर प्रश्न का उत्तर देने की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम पहचानते हैं कि इस समस्या में प्राथमिक बाधा विषय इकाई को ऑब्जेक्ट एंटिटी से जोड़ने वाले संबंधों की सटीक भविष्यवाणी करने में कठिनाई है। हम एक नए मॉडल आर्किटेक्चर, एपीवीए की वकालत करते हैं, जिसमें अनुमानित संबंधों की शुद्धता की जांच के लिए जिम्मेदार एक सत्यापन तंत्र शामिल है। एपीवीए फ्रेमवर्क स्वाभाविक रूप से एक अच्छी तरह से सैद्धांतिक पुनरावर्ती प्रशिक्षण प्रक्रिया का समर्थन करता है, जिसे हम टर्बो प्रशिक्षण कहते हैं। हम प्रयोगों के माध्यम से प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि APVA-TUBRO दृष्टिकोण काफी सवाल का जवाब प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar fhadhb na bhfreagraí ceisteanna thar an mbonn eolais. Aithnímid gurb é an bac is mó ar an bhfadhb seo ná an deacracht a bhaineann leis an gcaidreamh a nascann an t-eintiteas is ábhar leis na heintitis oibiachtúla a thuar go cruinn. Molaimid ailtireacht samhail nua, APVA, lena n-áirítear meicníocht fíoraithe atá freagrach as cruinneas an chaidrimh thuartha a sheiceáil. Tacaíonn creat APVA go nádúrtha le nós imeachta oiliúna atriallach dea-phrionsabail, ar a dtugaimid turbo-oiliúint. Léirímid trí thurgnaimh go gcuireann cur chuige APVA-TUBRO feabhas mór ar fheidhmíocht freagra na gceisteanna.', 'ka': 'ამ წიგნაში, ჩვენ კითხვის პრობლემა, რომელიც უცნობის ბაზაზე გადასწავლით. ჩვენ განვიცნობით, რომ ამ პრობლემაში პირველი ბრძნელი პრობლემა არის შესაძლებლობა წარმოდგინოთ პრობლემას შესახებ, რომლებიც მისახებ სახელსაწყოთა ინტერტიკის ჩვენ ახალი მოდელური არქტიქტურა, APVA, რომელიც შეიყვანეთ შემოწმება მექანსი, რომელიც უნდა გადაწყენოთ წარმოიდგინული შესახებ. APVA პარამეტრი ნახვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტებით გამოჩვენებთ, რომ APVA-TUBRO მოხმარება დირასტიკურად უფრო მეტადებს კითხვის შესაძლებლობა.', 'it': "In questo articolo, studiamo il problema della risposta alle domande sulla base di conoscenze. Identifichiamo che il collo di bottiglia primario in questo problema è la difficoltà di prevedere con precisione le relazioni che collegano l'entità oggetto alle entità oggetto. Noi sosteniamo una nuova architettura modello, APVA, che include un meccanismo di verifica responsabile del controllo della correttezza delle relazioni previste. Il framework APVA supporta naturalmente una procedura di allenamento iterativo ben definita, che chiamiamo turbo training. Dimostriamo attraverso esperimenti che l'approccio APVA-TUBRO migliora drasticamente le prestazioni di risposta alle domande.", 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετάμε το πρόβλημα της απάντησης των ερωτήσεων μέσω της βάσης γνώσης. Αναγνωρίζουμε ότι το κύριο εμπόδιο σε αυτό το πρόβλημα είναι η δυσκολία στην ακριβή πρόβλεψη των σχέσεων που συνδέουν το υποκείμενο με το αντικείμενο. Υποστηρίζουμε μια νέα αρχιτεκτονική μοντέλου, η οποία περιλαμβάνει έναν μηχανισμό επαλήθευσης υπεύθυνο για τον έλεγχο της ορθότητας των προβλεπόμενων σχέσεων. Το πλαίσιο υποστηρίζει φυσικά μια διαδικασία επαναλαμβανόμενης εκπαίδευσης με καλές αρχές, την οποία ονομάζουμε εκπαίδευση τουρμπο. Αποδεικνύουμε μέσω πειραμάτων ότι η προσέγγιση βελτιώνει δραστικά την απόδοση απάντησης στις ερωτήσεις.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban a tudásbázison felüli kérdések megválaszolásának problémáját tanulmányozzuk. Azt állapítjuk meg, hogy ebben a problémában az elsődleges szűk keresztmetszet az a nehézség, hogy pontosan megjósoljuk az alany entitást és az objektum entitásokat összekötő kapcsolatokat. Egy új modell architektúrát, az APVA-t javasoljuk, amely tartalmaz egy ellenőrzési mechanizmust, amely a várható kapcsolatok helyességének ellenőrzéséért felelős. Az APVA keretrendszer természetesen támogatja a jól elvi iteratív edzési eljárást, amit turbo edzésnek nevezünk. Kísérletekkel bizonyítjuk, hogy az APVA-TUBRO megközelítés drasztikusan javítja a kérdésre válaszoló teljesítményt.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente nagrinėjame klausimų atsakymo problem ą žinių bazėje. Nustatome, kad pagrindinė šios problemos kliūtis yra sunkumas tiksliai prognozuoti subjekto ryšius su objekto subjektais. Mes remiame naują modelio architektūrą, APVA, kuri apima tikrinimo mechanizmą, atsakingą už numatomų santykių teisingumo patikrinimą. APVA sistema, žinoma, remia gerai pagrįstą pakartotinio mokymo procedūrą, kurią vadiname turbo mokymu. We demonstrate via experiments that the APVA-TUBRO approach drastically improves the question answering performance.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, അറിവ് ബേസില്\u200d ഉത്തരം പറയുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ പ്രശ്നമാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത്. ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിലെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ബോട്ട്ലെങ്കില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടത് വസ്തുക്കളുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നത് ശരിയാ നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കേറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു, APVA, അതില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ ശരിയെടുക്കുവാനുള്ള ഒരു  APVA ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് സ്വാഭാവികമായി നല്ല പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്ന യെറ്റേറ്ററിവിന്റെ പരിശീലന പ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, അപ്പിവാ-ടുബ്രോ പ്രാധാന്യം ഉത്തരം പറയുന്ന ചോദ്യത്തിന്റ', 'ms': 'In this paper, we study the problem of question answering over knowledge base.  Kami mengenalpasti bahawa pengendalian utama dalam masalah ini adalah kesulitan dalam meramalkan dengan tepat hubungan yang menyambung entiti subjek dengan entiti objek. We advocate a new model architecture, APVA, which includes a verification mechanism responsible for checking the correctness of predicted relations.  kerangka APVA secara alami menyokong prosedur latihan iteratif yang berprinsip baik, yang kami panggil latihan turbo. Kami menunjukkan melalui eksperimen bahawa pendekatan APVA-TUBRO meningkatkan secara drastik prestasi menjawab soalan.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда білім негізінде жауап беру мәселесін зерттейміз. Біз бұл мәселедегі негізгі қарқыныш - нысандар нысандарына байланысты қатынастарды дұрыс таңдау қиындығын анықтаймыз. Біз жаңа архитектура, APVA үлгісін қолданамыз. Бұл таңдалған қатынастардың дұрыстығын тексеру үшін жауап беретін тексеру механизмі бар. APVA бағдарламасы тұлба оқыту деп аталатын қарапайым реттеративтік оқыту процедурын қолдайды. Біз тәжірибелер арқылы APVA-TUBRO тәжірибесінің сұрақ жауап беруді драстикалық түрде жасайтынын көрсетедік.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник го проучуваме проблемот со одговорот на прашањата преку базата на знаење. Ние идентификуваме дека примарното пречка во овој проблем е тешкотијата во прецизното предвидување на односите кои го поврзуваат субјектниот ентитет со субјектните ентитети. Ние застапуваме нова моделна архитектура, АПВА, која вклучува механизам за верификација одговорен за проверка на точноста на предвидените односи. АПВА рамката природно ја поддржува добро принципираната процедура на итеративна обука, која ја нарекуваме турбо обука. Ние демонстрираме преку експерименти дека пристапот АПВА-ТУБРО драстично ја подобрува резултатот на одговорот на прашањата.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw il-problema tat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet fuq il-bażi tal-għarfien. We identify that the primary bottleneck in this problem is the difficulty in accurately predicting the relations connecting the subject entity to the object entities.  Aħna nappoġġjaw arkitettura mudell ġdid, APVA, li tinkludi mekkaniżmu ta’ verifika responsabbli għall-verifika tal-korrettezza tar-relazzjonijiet imbassra. Naturalment, il-qafas APVA jappoġġja proċedura ta’ taħriġ iterattiv bi prinċipji tajbin, li jissejjaħ taħriġ turbo. Permezz ta’ esperimenti nippruvaw li l-approċċ APVA-TUBRO itejjeb drastikament il-prestazzjoni tat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet.', 'no': 'I denne papiret studerer vi problemet med spørsmål som svarar over kunnskapsbasen. Vi identifiserer at den primære botnene i dette problemet er vanskeligheten for å nøyaktig foregå forholdet som koplar emnene til objektentiteten. Vi advokerer ein ny modell-arkitektur, APVA, som inneheld ein verifikasjonsmekanismekanismen som er ansvarleg for å kontrollera korrektet av forventa forhold. APVA-rammeverket støttar naturleg ein godprinsippet iterativ treningsprosess, som vi kallar turbo-trening. Vi demonstrerer gjennom eksperimenter at APVA-TUBRO-tilnærminga drastisk forbedrar spørsmålet som svarar på utviklinga.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдлэгийн суурь дээр хариулах асуудлыг судалж байна. Бид энэ асуудал дээрх анхны давхар нь объектын биетүүдэд холбогдох харилцааны тодорхой таамаглах хэцүү гэдгийг мэднэ. Бид шинэ загварын архитектур, АПВА-г дэмждэг. Энэ нь таамагласан харилцааны зөв байдлыг шалгахын тулд зориулагдсан шалгах механизм юм. АПВА-ын систем нь байгалийн түвшингүй дасгал хөдөлгөөний процедурыг дэмжиж байна. Үүнийг бид Турбо дасгал хөдөлгөөн гэж нэрлэдэг. Бид туршилтуудын аргаар APVA-TUBRO арга зам нь асуултын хариултын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule badamy problem odpowiedzi na pytania za pomocą bazy wiedzy. Identyfikujemy, że głównym wąskim gardłem w tym problemie jest trudność w dokładnym przewidywaniu relacji łączących podmiot z jednostkami obiektowymi. Opowiadamy się za nową architekturą modelu APVA, która obejmuje mechanizm weryfikacji odpowiedzialny za sprawdzanie poprawności przewidywanych relacji. Framework APVA naturalnie wspiera dobrze zasadniczą procedurę iteracyjną, którą nazywamy szkoleniem turbo. Poprzez eksperymenty pokazujemy, że podejście APVA-TUBRO drastycznie poprawia wydajność odpowiedzi na pytania.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, studiem problema răspunsului la întrebări peste baza de cunoștințe. Identificăm că blocajul principal în această problemă este dificultatea de a prezice cu exactitate relațiile care leagă entitatea subiectului de entitățile obiect. Susţinem o nouă arhitectură model, APVA, care include un mecanism de verificare responsabil cu verificarea corectitudinii relaţiilor preconizate. Cadrul APVA sprijină în mod natural o procedură de instruire iterativă bine principiată, pe care o numim antrenament turbo. Demonstrăm prin experimente că abordarea APVA-TUBRO îmbunătățește drastic performanța de răspuns la întrebări.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo problem pitanja koji odgovara na bazu znanja. Identificiramo da je glavni problem u ovom problemu teško precizno predviđati odnose koje povezuju subjekt sa objektivnim entitetima. Zagovaramo novu modelsku arhitekturu, APVA, koja uključuje mehanizam provjere odgovoran za provjeru ispravnosti predviđenih odnosa. APVA okvir prirodno podržava dobro načeljenu iterativnu obuku, koju zovemo obuku turba. Prema eksperimentima pokazujemo da pristup APVA-TUBRO drastično poboljšava odgovornost na pitanje.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා දන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන. අපි හොයාගන්නවා මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ ප්\u200dරධාන බොත්තල් බොත්තල් බොත්තල් බොත්තල් බොත්තල් බොත්තල් බොත්තල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධය අපි අලුත් නිර්මාණය ස්ථාපනයක්, APVA, සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා  APVA ක්\u200dරියාමාර්ගයක් ස්වභාවිතයෙන් හොඳ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහය කරනවා, ඒක අපි ටුර්බෝ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් APVA-TUBRO ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරනවා කියලා.', 'so': "Warqadan, waxaynu ku baranaa dhibaatada su'aalaha ka jawaabta shabakadda aqoonta. Waxaynu garanaynaa in dhibaatadan ay tahay dhibaatada ugu horeeya inay si saxda ah u sii sheegto xiriirka la xiriira macluumaadka la xiriira alaabta. Waxaynu fidinaynaa dhismo cusub oo muusiko ah APVA, kaas oo ku jira meysi xaqiijinta oo ka mas’uul ah si aad u xaqiiqsato hagitaanka xiriirka la hor marsaday. Shirkadaha APVA wuxuu si dabiiqada ah u caawinayaa habka waxbarashada ee aad u hogaansan, kaas oo aannu ugu magacaabno tababar turbo. Waxaynu ku muujinnaa imtixaanka in qaababka APVA-TUBRO uu si aad u kordhiyo sameynta jawaabta su'aalka.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats studerar vi problemet med frågesvar över kunskapsbas. Vi identifierar att den primära flaskhalsen i detta problem är svårigheten att exakt förutsäga relationerna mellan subjektets entitet och objektets entiteter. Vi förespråkar en ny modellarkitektur, APVA, som inkluderar en verifieringsmekanism som ansvarar för att kontrollera korrektheten i förutspådda relationer. APVA-ramverket stöder naturligtvis en väl principiell iterativ träningsprocess, som vi kallar turboträning. Vi visar genom experiment att APVA-TUBRO-metoden drastiskt förbättrar frågeställningens prestanda.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையில் பதில் கேள்வியை படிக்க வேண்டும். இந்த பிரச்சினையில் முதன்மையான பாட்டின் குறியீடு என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் பொருள் பொருளுடன் இணைக்கும் தொடர்புகளை  நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரி உருவாக்கத்தை வழங்குகிறோம், APVA, அதில் ஒரு உறுதிப்படுத்தும் முன்னோடிருக்கும் தொடர்புகளின் சரியை  APVA சட்டத்தை இயல்பாக ஒரு நன்மை தலைப்பு உருவாக்கும் பயிற்சி செயல்பாட்டை ஆதரிக்கிறது, அதை நாம் டுர்போ பயிற்சி என We demonstrate via experiments that the APVA-TUBRO approach drastically improves the question answering performance.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں سوال کے مسئلہ کی تلاش کرتے ہیں جو علم بنسس پر جواب دیتے ہیں۔ ہم پہچان رہے ہیں کہ اس مسئلہ میں پہلی بٹولگرد ایک مسئلہ کے ساتھ موضوع کی تعلقات کو دقیق پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے مشکل ہے. ہم نے ایک نوی مدل معماری، APVA کی مدد کی ہے جس میں ایک تصدیق مکانیسم شامل ہوتی ہے جو پیش بینی کی نسبتوں کی سیدھی تحقیق کرتی ہے۔ APVA فرمیک طبیعی طور پر ایک اچھی پرنسیٹ کی تکلیف پردازش کی مدد کرتا ہے، جسے ہم تربو کی تعلیم کا نام رکھتے ہیں. ہم آزمائش کے ذریعے دکھاتے ہیں کہ APVA-TUBRO کی تقریبا بہت اچھی طرح سؤال کے جواب کے عمل کو بہتر کر دیتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề trả lời câu hỏi trên kiến thức cơ sở. Chúng tôi nhận ra rằng nguyên tắc nghẽn chính xác trong vấn đề này là khó khăn trong việc dự đoán chính xác các mối quan hệ nối đối tượng với các thực thể đối tượng. Chúng tôi ủng hộ một cấu trúc mô hình mới, APV, bao gồm một cơ chế kiểm tra sự sửa chữa những quan hệ dự đoán. Cơ chế Cơ quan Cựu chiến binh luôn ủng hộ một quy trình huấn luyện theo nguyên tắc, mà chúng tôi gọi là huấn luyện ốc sên. Bằng các thí nghiệm, chúng tôi chứng minh rằng phương pháp APVA-TURO tăng mạnh mẽ hiệu quả trả lời câu hỏi.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz ilmiy asosida javob beradigan savol muammosini o'rganamiz. Biz shu muammoladagi asosiy bogʻ'liq, obʼekt obʼektlariga bogʻ'langanni aniqlashni tayyorlash juda qiyin. Biz avtomatik tasdiqlangan huquqlarni tekshirish uchun yangi model arxituvchi APVA'ni tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlash mumkin. APVA freymi oddiy qo'llaniladi. Biz turbo trening deb ataymiz. Biz muammolar orqali APVA-TUBRO usulida murakkab javob berish natijasini o'zgartiradi.", 'nl': 'In dit artikel bestuderen we het probleem van het beantwoorden van vragen via kennisbasis. We identificeren dat de primaire knelpunt in dit probleem de moeilijkheid is om de relaties die de subject entiteit met de object entiteiten verbinden nauwkeurig te voorspellen. Wij pleiten voor een nieuwe modelarchitectuur, APVA, die een verificatiemechanisme omvat dat verantwoordelijk is voor het controleren van de juistheid van voorspelde relaties. Het APVA framework ondersteunt natuurlijk een principiële iteratieve trainingsprocedure, die we turbotraining noemen. We laten aan de hand van experimenten zien dat de APVA-TUBRO aanpak de antwoorden op vragen drastisch verbetert.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия изследваме проблема с отговора на въпроси над базата знания. Идентифицираме, че основната пречка в този проблем е трудността да се предвидят точно отношенията, свързващи субекта с обектните субекти. Ние се застъпваме за нова архитектура на модела, която включва механизъм за проверка, отговорен за проверка на точността на прогнозираните взаимоотношения. Рамката естествено поддържа добре принципна итеративна процедура на обучение, която наричаме турбо обучение. Чрез експерименти демонстрираме, че подходът АФВА-ТУБРО драстично подобрява ефективността на отговора на въпроси.', 'da': 'I denne artikel undersøger vi problemet med spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensbase. Vi identificerer, at den primære flaskehalse i dette problem er vanskeligheden med nøjagtigt at forudsige de relationer, der forbinder subjektentiteten til objektentiteterne. Vi går ind for en ny modelarkitektur, APVA, som indeholder en verifikationsmekanisme, der er ansvarlig for at kontrollere korrektheden af forudsigede relationer. APVA rammerne understøtter naturligvis en velprincipbaseret iterativ træningsprocedure, som vi kalder turbotræning. Vi demonstrerer gennem eksperimenter, at APVA-TUBRO-metoden drastisk forbedrer spørgsmålsbesvarelsesydelsen.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo problem pitanja koji odgovara na bazu znanja. Identificiramo da je glavni problem u ovom problemu teško precizno predvidjeti odnose koje povezuju subjekt sa objektivnim subjektima. Zagovaramo novu modelsku arhitekturu, APVA, koja uključuje mehanizam provjere odgovoran za provjeru ispravnosti predviđenih odnosa. APVA okvir prirodno podržava dobro načeljenu postupku iterativnog treninga, koju zovemo obuka turba. Prema eksperimentima pokazujemo da pristup APVA-TUBRO drastično poboljšava odgovarajuće učinke pitanja.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما مشکل سوال را درباره پایگاه دانش مطالعه می کنیم. ما مشخص می\u200cکنیم که بطری اصلی در این مشکل مشکلی است که در پیش بینی کردن رابطه\u200cهای دقیقاً با ارتباط موضوع با موضوع موضوع به موضوع موضوع ارتباط دارد. ما یک معماری مدل جدید، APVA را پشتیبانی می کنیم که شامل یک مکانیسم تحقیق مسئول تحقیق درستی رابطه پیش بینی است. چهارچوب APVA طبیعتاً یک روش آموزش دوباره قابل تحقیق می کند که ما به تمرین توربو می گوییم. ما از طریق آزمایشات نشان می دهیم که دسترسی APVA-TUBRO به طریق عملکرد جواب سوال را به شدت بهتر می کند.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir das Problem der Beantwortung von Fragen über Wissensbasis. Wir identifizieren, dass der primäre Engpass in diesem Problem die Schwierigkeit ist, die Beziehungen, die die Subjektentität mit den Objektentitäten verbinden, genau vorherzusagen. Wir plädieren für eine neue Modellarchitektur, APVA, die einen Verifikationsmechanismus beinhaltet, der für die Überprüfung der Korrektheit der vorhergesagten Beziehungen verantwortlich ist. Das APVA Framework unterstützt natürlich ein prinzipiell fundiertes iteratives Trainingsverfahren, das wir Turbotraining nennen. Wir zeigen anhand von Experimenten, dass der APVA-TUBRO-Ansatz die Antwortleistung drastisch verbessert.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunasoma tatizo la swali la kujibu kuhusu msingi wa maarifa. Tunagundua kuwa chupa cha msingi katika tatizo hili ni vigumu kutabiri kwa uhakika wa kutabiri mahusiano yanayounganisha maudhui hayo na vitu vya habari. Tunetetea ujenzi mpya wa mifano, APVA, ambalo linajumuisha mfumo wa kuthibitisha uliohusika kwa kutangaza uhakika wa mahusiano yanayotarajiwa. Mfumo wa APVA unaunga mkono mchakato wa mafunzo yenye msingi, ambao tunaita mafunzo ya turbo. Tunaonyesha kwa njia ya majaribio kwamba mbinu za APVA-TUBRO zinazidi kuboresha utaratibu wa kujibu swali.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari masalah menjawab pertanyaan melalui dasar pengetahuan. Kami mengidentifikasi bahwa keterangan utama dalam masalah ini adalah kesulitan dalam memprediksi secara akurat hubungan yang menghubungkan entitas subjek dengan entitas objek. Kami mendukung arsitektur model baru, APVA, yang termasuk mekanisme verifikasi yang bertanggung jawab untuk memeriksa persis hubungan yang diprediksi. Cadangan APVA secara alami mendukung prosedur latihan iteratif yang baik-prinsip, yang kita sebut latihan turbo. Kami menunjukkan melalui eksperimen bahwa pendekatan APVA-TUBRO meningkatkan secara drastis prestasi menjawab pertanyaan.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons die probleem van vraag wat antwoord oor kennis basis. Ons identifiseer dat die primêre botnek in hierdie probleem is die moeilikheid in die presies voorskou van die relasies wat die onderwerp entiteit verbind met die objekte entiteite. Ons beveilig 'n nuwe model arkitektuur, APVA, wat insluit 'n verifikasie mekanisme wat verantwoordelik is om die korrekheid van voorskoude relasies te kontroleer. Die APVA-raamwerk ondersteun natuurlik 'n goed vorderde iteratiewe onderwerking prosedure, wat ons noem turbo onderwerp. Ons wys deur eksperimente dat die APVA-TUBRO-toegang drastig die vraag wat antwoord is, die prestasie verbeter.", 'am': 'በዚህ ጋዜጠኛ ላይ እውቀት መሠረትን የምንመለስ ጥያቄን እናስተምራለን፡፡ በዚህ ጉዳዩ የመጀመሪያ አካል አካል አካባቢውን ለመቀጠል ግንኙነት በአካባቢው አካባቢ ላይ እንዲቀጠል መከራ እንደሆነ እናውቃለን፡፡ አዲስ የሞዴል መሠረት አካባቢ፣ APVA እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የAPVA ፍሬማርት በተለየ መልካም አካባቢ ትርቦ ትምህርት የሚባለውን የቴርቨርሲቲ ፕሮግራም ይደግዳል፡፡ የAPVA-TUBRO ሥርዓት የጥያቄውን መልስ በኃይል እንዲያበዛው እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda bilim üssünde jogap bermegiň meselesini öwrenýärdik. Biz bu meseläde esasy boýunçylyk üçin zadyň guramlaryny takyk etmek kynçylykdyr. Biz täze bir nusga arhitektura, APVA-ny gollaýarys. Bu nusga önlenen baglaýyşlaryň dogrylygyny barlamak üçin soraglany barlama mehanizminy dahil edýär. APVA çarpaky, dogruda prinsipli iteratiwny eğitim prosedüsini destekleýär we bu nusga turbo okuwçysyny diýip atlandyrýarys. Biz APVA-TUBRO ýaryşynyň soragynyň jogap etmäniň ukyplarynyň ýüze gowurap barýandygyny synanyşýarys.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքում մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք գիտելիքի հիմքի հարցերի պատասխանը: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ այս խնդրի հիմնական խոչընդոտը հեշտությամբ կանխատեսելու հարաբերությունները, որոնք կապում են թեմայի անհատականությունը օբյեկտի անհատականությունների հետ: Մենք պաշտպանում ենք նոր մոդել ճարտարապետական կառուցվածք, APV-ը, որը ներառում է ստուգելու մեխանիզմ, որը պատասխանատու է կանխատեսված հարաբերությունների ճշմարտության ստուգելու համար: APVԱ-ի շրջանակը բնականաբար աջակցում է լավ սկզբունքով կրկնվող ուսումնասիրության գործընթացը, որը մենք անվանում ենք թուրբո-ուսումնասիրություն: Մենք փորձարկումների միջոցով ցույց ենք տալիս, որ APva-Tubrao մոտեցումը խիստ բարելավում է հարցերին պատասխանելու արտադրությունը:', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne studiojmë problemin e përgjigjes së pyetjeve mbi bazën e njohurive. Ne identifikojmë se pengesa kryesore në këtë problem është vështirësia në parashikimin me saktësi të marrëdhënieve që lidhin njësinë e subjektit me njësitë e objektit. Ne mbrojmë një arkitekturë të re modeli, APVA, e cila përfshin një mekanizëm verifikimi përgjegjës për kontrollin e saktësisë së marrëdhënieve të parashikuara. Korniza APVA natyrisht mbështet një procedurë trainimi të përsëritur me parime të mira, të cilën ne e quajmë trajnim turbo. Ne demonstrojmë nëpërmjet eksperimenteve se qasja APVA-TUBRO përmirëson drastikisht paraqitjen e pyetjeve.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru proučavamo problem pitanja koji odgovara na bazu znanja. Identificiramo da je glavni problem u ovom problemu teško precizno predviđati odnose koje povezuju subjekt sa objektivnim subjektima. Zagovaramo novu modelsku arhitekturu, APVA, koja uključuje mehanizam provjere odgovoran za provjeru ispravnosti predviđenih odnosa. APVA okvir prirodno podržava dobro načeljenu iterativnu obuku, koju zovemo obuku turba. Prema eksperimentima pokazujemo da pristup APVA-TUBRO drastično poboljšava odgovarajuće učinke pitanja.', 'ca': "En aquest article estudiem el problema de respondre a preguntes sobre la base del coneixement. Identifiquem que el bloc d'ampolla principal d'aquest problema és la dificultat de predir exactament les relacions que connecten l'entitat subjecta amb les entitats objectes. Promuem una nova arquitectura model, APVA, que inclou un mecanisme de verificació responsable de verificar la correctesa de les relacions previstes. El marc APVA naturalment suporta un procediment iteratiu d'entrenament ben principiat, que anomenem turbo entrenament. A través d'experiments demostrem que l'enfocament APVA-TUBRO millora drasticament el rendiment de resposta a preguntes.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা জ্ঞানের বেসের উত্তরের প্রশ্নের সমস্যা পড়ি। আমরা চিহ্নিত করি যে এই সমস্যার প্রধান বোতলেন্সেক হচ্ছে যথাযথভাবে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা যে বিষয়ের বস্তুর সাথে যোগাযোগের সম্পর্কের আমরা একটি নতুন মডেল কাঠামো প্রতিষ্ঠান, এপিভিএ, যার মধ্যে একটি নিশ্চিত ব্যবস্থা আছে যার মধ্যে প্রত্যাশিত সম্পর্কের সঠিক পরীক্ষা কর এপিভিএ ফ্রেম কাঠামো স্বাভাবিকভাবে একটি ভালো নেতৃত্বের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রক্রিয়াকে সমর্থন করে, যাকে আমরা টার্বো প্রশ আমরা পরীক্ষার মাধ্যমে প্রদর্শন করছি যে APVA-TUBRO প্রতিক্রিয়ার প্রশ্নের উত্তর প্রদানের ক্ষেত্রে সাধারণ ভাবে উন্নত করে।', 'cs': 'V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou odpovědi na otázky přes znalostní bázi. Zjišťujeme, že primárním úzkým hrdlem v tomto problému je obtížnost přesně předpovídat vztahy spojující subjektovou entitu s objektovými entitami. Obhajujeme novou modelovou architekturu APVA, která obsahuje ověřovací mechanismus zodpovědný za kontrolu správnosti predikovaných vztahů. Framework APVA přirozeně podporuje dobře principovaný iterativní tréninkový postup, který nazýváme turbo trénink. Prostřednictvím experimentů demonstrujeme, že APVA-TUBRO přístup drasticky zlepšuje výkon zodpovězení otázek.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis uurime küsimustele vastamise probleemi üle teadmistebaasi. Me tuvastame, et selle probleemi peamine kitsaskoht on raskus täpselt prognoosida seoseid, mis ühendavad subjekti objektiüksustega. Me toetame uut mudeli arhitektuuri, APVA, mis sisaldab kontrollimehhanismi, mis vastutab prognoositavate suhete õigsuse kontrollimise eest. APVA raamistik toetab loomulikult hästi põhimõttelist iteratiivset treeningprotseduuri, mida nimetame turbo treeninguks. Eksperimentide kaudu näitame, et APVA-TUBRO lähenemine parandab oluliselt küsimustele vastamist.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tutkimme kysymystä kysymyksiin vastaamisesta tietopohjan yli. Havaitsemme, että ongelman ensisijainen pullonkaula on vaikeus ennustaa tarkasti subjektin ja objektientiteettien välisiä suhteita. Kannatamme uutta malliarkkitehtuuria, APVA, joka sisältää varmistusmekanismin, joka vastaa ennustettujen suhteiden oikeellisuuden tarkistamisesta. APVA-viitekehys tukee luonnollisesti hyvin periaatteellista iteratiivista harjoittelua, jota kutsumme turbokoulutukseksi. Kokeiden avulla osoitamme, että APVA-TUBRO-lähestymistapa parantaa merkittävästi kysymyksiin vastaamista.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, elm üssü üzərində cavab verən sual problemini öyrənirik. Biz bu problemdəki ilk şiddətli çətinliklərin məlumatı objektlər ilə birlikdə olan ilişkilerin düzgün təsdiqlənməsi çətinlikləridir. Biz yeni modeli arhitektura, APVA adlandırırıq, ki, tədbir edilmiş ilişkilerin doğruluğunu təsdiqləməsi üçün sorumlu olan təsdiqləmə mehānismi içərir. APVA qurğusu, doğal olaraq, türbo təhsil adlandırdığımız təhsil təhsil işlətməsini çox yaxşı dəstəkləyir. Biz təcrübələr vasitəsilə APVA-TUBRO tərəfindən soruşma təcrübəsini dəyişdiririk.', 'ko': '본고는 지식고의 문답 문제를 연구하였다.우리는 이 문제의 주요 병목은 주체 실체와 객체 실체 간의 관계를 정확하게 예측하기 어렵다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 예측 관계의 정확성을 검사하는 검증 메커니즘을 포함하는 새로운 모델 체계 구조, 즉 APVA를 제창한다.APVA 프레임워크는 원칙적으로 양호한 교체 훈련 과정을 지원하는데 이를 터보 훈련이라고 부른다.우리는 실험을 통해 APVA-TUBRO 방법이 문답 성능을 크게 향상시켰다는 것을 증명하였다.', 'jv': 'Nang mapang iki, kéné milih perkaran kanggo cecaturan pangan kuwi mau. Awak dhéwé éngari sing dibutuhke bote saiki iki ning acara iki sak dudu nggawe barang nggawe barang sampeyan karo Entèni object Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh urik dhéwé, KENGAN, sing nyebutaké mehanis nyong nggawe barang nggawe barang urik dhéwé. The ARVA frame naterably suports a wel-guided Itratiove Learning Procedure, olèhku nggawe cara-cara transform. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasai perbudhakan karo ngono diangkat apa-Tubro sing bisa nggawe barang nggambar barang.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã karãtun matsalar da za'a karɓa a kan basin ilmi. We identify that the primary bottleneck in this problem is the difficulty in accurately predicting the relations connecting the subject entity to the object entities.  Tuna ƙudura wani matsayin misalin ayuka, PAV, wanda ke ƙunsa da wani matsayi mai gaskatãwa wanda ya wajaba a kan jarraba gaskiyar haɗi na gaba. Firam ɗin PAvA na ƙarfafa a kanana da wani aikin mai amfani da mai kyau, wanda Muke kiran turbo mai tsaro. Tuna nuna da jarrabo cẽwa, hanyarsa na PAvA-TUBOR na ƙara ajin tambayar da ya kamata.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו לומדים את הבעיה של עניין שאלות על בסיס ידע. אנו מזהה שהבקבוק העיקרי בבעיה הזאת הוא הקשה לחזות מדויק את היחסים שקשורים את היחידה הנוגעת ליחידות האובייקט. We advocate a new model architecture, APVA, which includes a verification mechanism responsible for checking the correctness of predicted relations.  המסגרת של APVA תומכת באופן טבעי בתהליך אימון חוזר, אשר אנו קוראים אימון טורבו. אנו מראים באמצעות ניסויים שהגישה APVA-TUBRO משפר דרסטית את ההופעה של עניין השאלה.', 'sk': 'V prispevku preučujemo problem odgovarjanja na vprašanja preko baze znanja. Ugotavljamo, da je primarno ozko grlo pri tem problemu težava pri natančnem napovedovanju relacij, ki povezujejo subjektno entiteto s objektnimi entitetami. Zagovarjamo novo modelno arhitekturo APVA, ki vključuje mehanizem preverjanja, odgovoren za preverjanje pravilnosti napovedanih odnosov. Okvir APVA seveda podpira dobro načelno iterativno usposabljanje, ki ga imenujemo turbo trening. Z eksperimenti dokazujemo, da pristop APVA-TUBRO drastično izboljša zmogljivost odgovarjanja na vprašanja.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཚོའི་གྲངས་ལ་རྟེན་ཏུ་མཐུན་སྐྱོང་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ ང་ཚོས་དཀའ ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་ལྟ་བཟོ་བརྩིས་བཟོ་བཅོས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་ལ་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ནི་APVA འི་ནང་དུ་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཞ The APVA framework naturally supports a well-principled iterative training procedure, which we call turbo training. ང་ཚོས་APVA-TUBRO གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་བརྟག་ཞིག་ལས་མཐུན་འགྱུར་བ་ཅིན་གནང་བ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'An Interpretable Reasoning Network for Multi-Relation Question Answering', 'ar': 'شبكة تفكير قابلة للتفسير للإجابة على أسئلة العلاقات المتعددة', 'fr': 'Un réseau de raisonnement interprétable pour répondre à des questions multirelations', 'pt': 'Uma Rede de Raciocínio Interpretável para Respostas a Perguntas Multi-Relacionais', 'es': 'Una red de razonamiento interpretable para responder a preguntas de múltiples relaciones', 'ja': '多関連性の質問に答えるための解釈可能な推論ネットワーク', 'zh': '多关问答者,解释推理网络', 'hi': 'बहु-संबंध प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए एक व्याख्यात्मक तर्क नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Интерпретируемая сеть рассуждений для ответа на вопросы, связанные с множественными отношениями', 'ga': 'Líonra Réasúnaíochta Inléirithe le haghaidh Freagra ar Cheisteanna Ilghaolta', 'el': 'Ένα Δίκτυο Διερμηνείας Λόγου για την Απάντηση Ερωτήσεων Πολλαπλών Σχέσεων', 'hu': 'Egy értelmezhető indokolási hálózat a többkapcsolatú kérdések megválaszolására', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Una rete di ragionamento interpretabile per rispondere alle domande multi-relazione', 'kk': 'Көп қатынастар сұрақтарының жауап беру үшін интернетті себебі', 'lt': 'Daugiasantykių klausimų atsakymo aiškinamojo pagrįstumo tinklas', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'Multi- Relations ചോദ്യത്തിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Netwerk ta’ Raġunar Interpretabbli għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet b’relazzjonijiet multipli', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Олон харилцааны асуулт хариултын интернэтлэгчийн шалтгаан сүлжээ', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Sieć interpretowalnego uzasadnienia dla odpowiedzi na pytania wielu relacji', 'ro': 'O rețea de raționare interpretabilă pentru răspunsurile la întrebări multirelaționale', 'so': "Internetka dib u dhigista su'aalaha badan", 'sr': 'Interpretable Reasoning Network for Multi-Relations Question Answering', 'si': 'ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ', 'sv': 'Ett tolkningsbart förnuftsnätverk för svar på frågor med flera relationer', 'ta': 'Multi- Relations கேள்விக்கான ஒரு மொழிபெயர்ப்பான பிணையத்தை ஏற்றுதல்Name', 'ur': 'بہت سی رابطہ سوال جواب کے لئے انتشار قابل Reasoning Network', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một mạng lưới giải thích liên quan đến câu hỏi', 'nl': 'Een interpreteerbaar redeneringsnetwerk voor het beantwoorden van vragen met meerdere relaties', 'bg': 'Мрежа за тълкуване на разумни разсъждения за отговор на въпроси с множество взаимоотношения', 'hr': 'Interpretable Reasoning Network for Multi-Relations Question Response', 'da': 'Et fortolkbart begrundelsesnetværk til besvarelse af spørgsmål med flere relationer', 'id': 'Name', 'de': 'Ein interpretierbares Reasoning Network für die Beantwortung von Fragen mit mehreren Beziehungen', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '다관계 문답의 해석 가능한 추리 네트워크', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Kusoma Maswali ya Kuhusiana na Maswali mengi', 'tr': 'Çoklu-relasiýan soraglaryň jogapy üçin öňleşiklik sebäpler', 'sq': 'Një rrjet arsyetimi i përkthyeshëm për përgjigjet e pyetjeve me shumë marrëdhënie', 'am': 'Name', 'hy': 'Բազմահարաբերությունների հարցերի պատասխանների մեկնաբանելի ցանց', 'az': 'Çoxlu İlişkilər sualının cavab verməsi üçün Interpretable Reason Network', 'bn': 'Multi-Relation প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'bs': 'Interpretable Reasoning Network for Multi-Relations Question Response', 'ca': 'Una xarxa de raonament interpretable per respondre a preguntes de múltiples relacions', 'cs': 'Interpretovatelná síť pro odpovědi na více vztahů', 'et': 'Tõlgendatav põhjendusvõrgustik mitmesuguste suhete küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'Monisuhteisiin vastaamista koskeva tulkittava päättelyverkosto', 'he': 'Name', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'ha': "Wani Netki na Mawallafi da Farawa wa Jabu'a na Sãshin Fara-Kullum", 'sk': 'Razlagljiva mreža za odgovarjanje na vprašanja z več odnosi', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་ཁ་སྐོང་རྗེས་ལན་མཁན་གྱི་དྲ་བ་ལ་'}
{'en': 'Multi-relation Question Answering is a challenging task, due to the requirement of elaborated analysis on questions and reasoning over multiple fact triples in knowledge base. In this paper, we present a novel model called Interpretable Reasoning Network that employs an interpretable, hop-by-hop reasoning process for question answering. The model dynamically decides which part of an input question should be analyzed at each hop ; predicts a relation that corresponds to the current parsed results ; utilizes the predicted relation to update the question representation and the state of the reasoning process ; and then drives the next-hop reasoning. Experiments show that our model yields state-of-the-art results on two datasets. More interestingly, the model can offer traceable and observable intermediate predictions for reasoning analysis and failure diagnosis, thereby allowing manual manipulation in predicting the final answer.', 'ar': 'تعد الإجابة على الأسئلة متعددة العلاقات مهمة صعبة ، نظرًا لمتطلبات التحليل التفصيلي للأسئلة والاستدلال على عدة حقائق ثلاثية في قاعدة المعرفة. في هذا البحث ، نقدم نموذجًا جديدًا يسمى شبكة التفكير المنطقي التي تستخدم عملية تفكير قابلة للتفسير وقفزة للإجابة على الأسئلة. يقرر النموذج ديناميكيًا أي جزء من سؤال الإدخال يجب تحليله في كل قفزة ؛ يتنبأ بعلاقة تتوافق مع النتائج المحللة الحالية ؛ يستخدم العلاقة المتوقعة لتحديث تمثيل السؤال وحالة عملية التفكير ؛ ثم يقود تفكير القفزة التالية. تُظهر التجارب أن نموذجنا ينتج عنه نتائج متطورة على مجموعتي بيانات. والأكثر إثارة للاهتمام ، أن النموذج يمكن أن يقدم تنبؤات وسيطة يمكن تتبعها ويمكن ملاحظتها لتحليل التفكير وتشخيص الفشل ، مما يسمح بالتلاعب اليدوي في التنبؤ بالإجابة النهائية.', 'es': 'La respuesta a preguntas de múltiples relaciones es una tarea desafiante, debido al requisito de un análisis detallado de las preguntas y el razonamiento sobre múltiples triples de hechos en la base de conocimientos. En este artículo, presentamos un modelo novedoso llamado Interpretable Reasoning Network que emplea un proceso de razonamiento interpretable, salto por salto, para responder preguntas. El modelo decide dinámicamente qué parte de una pregunta de entrada debe analizarse en cada salto; predice una relación que corresponde a los resultados analizados actuales; utiliza la relación predicha para actualizar la representación de la pregunta y el estado del proceso de razonamiento; y luego impulsa el razonamiento del siguiente salto. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro modelo produce resultados de última generación en dos conjuntos de datos. Lo que es más interesante, el modelo puede ofrecer predicciones intermedias trazables y observables para el análisis de razonamiento y el diagnóstico de fallas, lo que permite la manipulación manual para predecir la respuesta final.', 'fr': "La réponse aux questions multi-relations est une tâche difficile, en raison de la nécessité d'une analyse approfondie des questions et d'un raisonnement sur plusieurs triples de faits dans la base de connaissances. Dans cet article, nous présentons un nouveau modèle appelé Interpretable Reasoning Network qui utilise un processus de raisonnement interprétable, saut par saut pour répondre aux questions. Le modèle décide dynamiquement quelle partie d'une question d'entrée doit être analysée à chaque saut\xa0; prédit une relation qui correspond aux résultats analysés actuels\xa0; utilise la relation prédite pour mettre à jour la représentation de la question et l'état du processus de raisonnement\xa0; puis commande le raisonnement du saut suivant. Les expériences montrent que notre modèle produit des résultats de pointe sur deux ensembles de données. Plus intéressant encore, le modèle peut offrir des prédictions intermédiaires traçables et observables pour l'analyse du raisonnement et le diagnostic des défaillances, permettant ainsi une manipulation manuelle pour prédire la réponse finale.", 'pt': 'Responder a Perguntas Multi-relação é uma tarefa desafiadora, devido à exigência de análise elaborada das perguntas e raciocínio sobre múltiplos triplos de fatos na base de conhecimento. Neste artigo, apresentamos um novo modelo chamado Interpretable Reasoning Network que emprega um processo de raciocínio hop-by-hop interpretável para responder a perguntas. O modelo decide dinamicamente qual parte de uma pergunta de entrada deve ser analisada em cada salto; prevê uma relação que corresponde aos resultados atuais analisados; utiliza a relação prevista para atualizar a representação da questão e o estado do processo de raciocínio; e, em seguida, conduz o raciocínio do próximo salto. Experimentos mostram que nosso modelo produz resultados de última geração em dois conjuntos de dados. Mais interessante, o modelo pode oferecer previsões intermediárias rastreáveis e observáveis para análise de raciocínio e diagnóstico de falhas, permitindo manipulação manual na previsão da resposta final.', 'ja': '多重関係の質問に対する回答は、知識ベースの複数の事実にわたる質問と推論についての詳細な分析が必要であるため、困難な課題です。この論文では、解釈可能なホップ・バイ・ホップ推論プロセスを用いて質問に答える、解釈可能推論ネットワークと呼ばれる新規モデルを提示する。モデルは、各ホップで分析すべき入力質問のどの部分を動的に決定し、現在の構文解析された結果に対応する関係を予測し、予測された関係を利用して質問表現と推論プロセスの状態を更新し、次のホップ推論を推進する。実験によると、当社のモデルは2つのデータセットで最先端の結果を生み出します。より興味深いことに、モデルは、推論分析および失敗診断のための追跡可能で観察可能な中間予測を提供することができ、それによって、最終答えを予測するための手動操作を可能にする。', 'zh': '多问一挑战性,详析知识库三元组也。 于本文中,有可解推理网络之新模,当模可解者,逐望推理问答。 凡模形动跃点各有所输; 占曰:解析时也; 因占以新之; 然后驱动下一个跳跃的推理。 实验明,两数集上生最先进也。 更有趣者,可推理析故障诊断可追溯、可观之间,许终对手动操作。', 'hi': 'बहु-संबंध प्रश्न उत्तर देना एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है, जो ज्ञान के आधार में कई तथ्यों पर प्रश्नों और तर्कों पर विस्तृत विश्लेषण की आवश्यकता के कारण है। इस पेपर में, हम एक उपन्यास मॉडल पेश करते हैं जिसे Interpretable Reasoning Network कहा जाता है जो प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए एक व्याख्यात्मक, हॉप-बाय-हॉप तर्क प्रक्रिया को नियोजित करता है। मॉडल गतिशील रूप से यह तय करता है कि प्रत्येक हॉप पर इनपुट प्रश्न के किस हिस्से का विश्लेषण किया जाना चाहिए; एक संबंध की भविष्यवाणी करता है जो वर्तमान पार्स किए गए परिणामों से मेल खाता है; प्रश्न प्रतिनिधित्व और तर्क प्रक्रिया की स्थिति को अद्यतन करने के लिए अनुमानित संबंध का उपयोग करता है; और फिर अगले हॉप तर्क ड्राइव करता है. प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल दो डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक परिणाम देता है। अधिक दिलचस्प बात यह है कि मॉडल तर्क विश्लेषण और विफलता निदान के लिए ट्रेस करने योग्य और अवलोकन योग्य मध्यवर्ती भविष्यवाणियों की पेशकश कर सकता है, जिससे अंतिम उत्तर की भविष्यवाणी करने में मैनुअल हेरफेर की अनुमति मिलती है।', 'ru': 'Многосторонний ответ на вопросы является сложной задачей в связи с требованием тщательного анализа вопросов и рассуждений по нескольким фактам в базе знаний. В этой статье мы представляем новую модель под названием «Интерпретируемая сеть рассуждений», которая использует интерпретируемый процесс «хоп-хоп» рассуждений для ответов на вопросы. Модель динамически решает, какая часть входного вопроса должна быть проанализирована при каждом прыжке; прогнозирует отношение, которое соответствует текущим проанализированным результатам; использует прогнозируемое отношение для обновления представления вопроса и состояния процесса рассуждения; а затем управляет следующим прыжком рассуждения. Эксперименты показывают, что наша модель дает самые современные результаты по двум наборам данных. Более интересно, что модель может предложить прослеживаемые и наблюдаемые промежуточные прогнозы для анализа рассуждений и диагностики отказов, тем самым позволяя вручную манипулировать при прогнозировании окончательного ответа.', 'ga': 'Is tasc dúshlánach é Freagra Ceisteanna Ilghaolmhara, mar gheall ar an ngá atá le hanailís mhionsaothraithe ar cheisteanna agus réasúnaíocht thar líon na bhfíricí iolracha sa bhonn eolais. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid múnla nua i láthair ar a dtugtar Interpretable Reasoning Network a úsáideann próiseas réasúnaíochta hop-ar-hop inmhínithe chun ceisteanna a fhreagairt. Socraíonn an tsamhail go dinimiciúil cén chuid de cheist ionchuir ar cheart anailís a dhéanamh uirthi ag gach leann; déanann sé gaol a fhreagraíonn do na torthaí parsáilte reatha a thuar; úsáideann an gaol tuartha chun léiriú na ceiste agus staid an phróisis réasúnaíochta a nuashonrú; agus ansin thiomáineann an réasúnaíocht eile-hop. Léiríonn turgnaimh go dtugann ár múnla torthaí den scoth ar dhá thacar sonraí. Níos suimiúla fós, is féidir leis an tsamhail réamh-mheastacháin idirmheánacha inrianaithe agus inbhraite a thairiscint le haghaidh anailís réasúnaíochta agus diagnóis teip, rud a cheadaíonn ionramháil láimhe chun an freagra deiridh a thuar.', 'it': "La risposta alle domande multi-relazione è un compito impegnativo, a causa del requisito di analisi elaborate su domande e ragionamenti su molteplici fatti triplicati nella base di conoscenza. In questo articolo, presentiamo un nuovo modello chiamato Interpretable Reasoning Network che utilizza un processo di ragionamento interpretabile hop-by-hop per rispondere alle domande. Il modello decide dinamicamente quale parte di una domanda di input deve essere analizzata ad ogni luppolo; predice una relazione che corrisponde ai risultati analizzati attuali; utilizza la relazione prevista per aggiornare la rappresentazione della domanda e lo stato del processo di ragionamento; e poi guida il ragionamento successivo. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro modello fornisce risultati all'avanguardia su due set di dati. Più interessante, il modello può offrire previsioni intermedie tracciabili e osservabili per l'analisi del ragionamento e la diagnosi di guasto, consentendo così la manipolazione manuale nella previsione della risposta finale.", 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი კითხვების პასუხი უფრო შესაძლებელია, რადგან განვითარებული ანალიზაციის შესაძლებლობა და განსაზღვრება მნიშვნელოვანი ფაქტის სამჯერ სამჯერ განსაზღვრებაზე. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აჩვენებთ პრომენტის მოდელს, რომელიც სახელსაწყისთვის გამოსაყენებელი მიზეზების ქსელი, რომელიც გამოყენებს ძალიან განსხვავებელი, ჰოპ-ბ-ჰო მოდელის დინამიკურად განსაზღვრება, რომელიც შეტყობინებული კითხვის ნაწილი უნდა ანალიზება ყოველ ჰოპში; მიმდინარე პარაზილის შესახებ შესახებ, რომელიც კონფიგურაცია მიმდინარე პარაზილის შესახებ; გამოიყენება კითხვის რესპეცენტაციის და პარამენტის პროცესის სტაციას; და შემდეგ შემდეგი ჰოპის პარამენტის გაკავშირება. ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი ექსპერიმენტის შედეგი ორი მონაცემენტის შედეგი. მეტი საინტერესოდ, მოდელის შესაძლებელია მონაცემებელი და დაახლოებისათვის განსაზღვრებელი განსაზღვრებისთვის ანალიზაციის და შეცდომის დიაგონიზაციის განსაზღვრებისთვის, რომელსაც მო', 'el': 'Η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις πολλαπλών σχέσεων είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο, λόγω της απαίτησης της αναλυτικής ανάλυσης των ερωτήσεων και της συλλογιστικής πάνω από πολλαπλά τριπλάσια γεγονότα στη βάση γνώσης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο που ονομάζεται Δίκτυο Διερμηνευτής Λογιστικής που χρησιμοποιεί μια ερμηνευτή διαδικασία συλλογισμού για την απάντηση των ερωτήσεων. Το μοντέλο αποφασίζει δυναμικά ποιο μέρος μιας ερώτησης εισόδου πρέπει να αναλυθεί σε κάθε άλμα. προβλέπει μια σχέση που αντιστοιχεί στα τρέχοντα αποτελέσματα ανάλυσης· χρησιμοποιεί την προβλεπόμενη σχέση για την ενημέρωση της αναπαράστασης του ερωτήματος και της κατάστασης της διαδικασίας συλλογισμού· Και μετά οδηγεί την επόμενη λογική. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας παράγει αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων. Πιο ενδιαφέρον, το μοντέλο μπορεί να προσφέρει ανιχνεύσιμες και παρατηρήσιμες ενδιάμεσες προβλέψεις για ανάλυση συλλογισμού και διάγνωση αποτυχίας, επιτρέποντας έτσι χειροκίνητο χειρισμό στην πρόβλεψη της τελικής απάντησης.', 'hu': 'A többkapcsolatos kérdések megválaszolása kihívást jelent, mivel a tudásbázis több tényháromszorosára vonatkozó részletes elemzést és érvelést igényel. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az Interpretable Reasoning Network nevű új modellt, amely egy értelmezhető, hop-by-hop érvelési folyamatot alkalmaz a kérdések megválaszolásához. A modell dinamikusan dönti el, hogy a bemeneti kérdés mely részét kell elemezni minden egyes ugróban; olyan kapcsolatot jelez, amely megfelel az aktuális értelmezett eredményeknek; a várható kapcsolatot használja a kérdésreformáció és az érvelési folyamat állapotának frissítésére; és aztán vezeti a következő ugrás érvelést. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy modellünk két adatkészleten a legkorszerűbb eredményeket eredményezi. Érdekesebb, hogy a modell nyomon követhető és megfigyelhető köztes előrejelzéseket kínál az érvelés elemzéséhez és a hiba diagnosztizálásához, ezáltal lehetővé teszi a kézi manipulációt a végső válasz előrejelzésében.', 'kk': 'Бірнеше қатынастық сұрақтардың жауап беру - білім негізінде бірнеше үш факт үшін талап ететін анализ қажетті тапсырмасы. Бұл қағазда, біз сұрақ жауап беру үшін толықтыру мүмкіндікті, хоп-хоп сезімінің түсініктеме желі деп аталатын романдық моделін таңдадық. Үлгі динамикалық түрде келтірілген сұрақтардың қай бөлігін әрбір хопта анализ етінін анықтайды. қазіргі талдау нәтижелеріне сәйкес қатынасын көрсетеді; сұрақ көрсетілімін және түсініктеу процесінің күйін жаңартуға арналған қатынасын қолданады; келесі хоп сезімін бастады. Тәжірибелер біздің үлгіміз екі деректер қорларының күй- жай нәтижесін береді. Ең қызықтығы, үлгі анализ және жаңылыс диагностикасы үшін қарайтын және қарайтын орташа бағдарламаларды қарай алады, сондықтан соңғы жауап алу үшін қолмен өзгертуге мүмкіндік береді.', 'ms': 'Jawapan soalan berbilang-hubungan adalah tugas yang mencabar, disebabkan keperluan analisis elaborasi soalan dan alasan atas fakta berbilang tiga kali dalam pangkalan pengetahuan. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan model novel yang dipanggil Rangkaian Perasaan Terinterpretabel yang menggunakan proses pemikiran yang boleh diterjemahkan, hop-by-hop untuk menjawab soalan. Model menentukan secara dinamik bahagian mana soalan input patut dianalisis pada setiap lompat; meramalkan hubungan yang sepadan dengan hasil hurai semasa; menggunakan hubungan dijangka untuk kemaskini perwakilan soalan dan keadaan proses alasan; dan kemudian memandu pemikiran-lompat berikutnya. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa model kita memberikan keputusan terbaik pada dua set data. Lebih menarik, model boleh menawarkan ramalan antarabangnya yang boleh dijejaki dan boleh dilihat untuk analisis alasan dan diagnosis kegagalan, dengan itu membolehkan manipulasi manual dalam meramalkan jawapan akhir.', 'lt': 'Daugiasantykinis atsakymas į klausimus yra sudėtinga užduotis, nes būtina išsamiai analizuoti klausimus ir pagrįsti žinių bazėje daugialypius trigubus faktus. Šiame dokumente pristatome naują model į, vadinamą aiškinamuoju pagrįstumo tinklu, kuriame naudojamas aiškinamasis, apmokestinamas apmokestinimo procesas atsakant į klausimus. Modelis dinamiškai nusprendžia, kuri įėjimo klausimo dalis turėtų būti analizuojama kiekviename apyniame; numato santykį, atitinkantį dabartinius išanalizuotus rezultatus; naudoja prognozuojamą santykį atnaujinant klausimų pateikimą ir motyvavimo proceso būklę; ir tuomet skatina kitą apklausą. Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų modelis duoda naujausius rezultatus dviejuose duomenų rinkiniuose. Įdomu, kad modelis gali pasiūlyti atsekamas ir pastebimas tarpines pagrįstumo analizės ir gedimų diagnozės prognozes, taip leidžiant rankiniu būdu manipuliuoti prognozuojant galutinį atsakymą.', 'mk': 'Одговорите на прашањата со повеќе односи претставуваат предизвикувачка задача, поради барањето на лабораторирана анализа за прашањата и размислувањето во врска со повеќе три факти во базата на знаење. Во овој весник, претставуваме нов модел наречен Интерпретабилна мрежа за размислување која вработува интерпретабилен процес на размислување за одговори на прашања. The model dynamically decides which part of an input question should be analyzed at each hop;  предвидува однос кој се совпаѓа со тековните анализирани резултати; го користи предвидениот однос за да го ажурира претставувањето на прашањата и состојбата на процесот на размислување; и потоа го води следното размислување. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот модел дава најдобри резултати на две податоци. More interestingly, the model can offer traceable and observable intermediate predictions for reasoning analysis and failure diagnosis, thereby allowing manual manipulation in predicting the final answer.', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet b’relazzjonijiet multipli hija kompitu ta’ sfida, minħabba r-rekwiżit ta’ analiżi elaborata dwar mistoqsijiet u raġunament fuq diversi tripli ta’ fatti fil-bażi tal-għarfien. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw mudell ġdid imsejjaħ Netwerk ta’ Raġunar Interpretabbli li jimpjega proċess ta’ raġunar interpretabbli, hop-by-hop għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet. The model dynamically decides which part of an input question should be analyzed at each hop;  predicts a relation that corresponds to the current parsed results;  juża r-relazzjoni mbassra biex taġġorna r-rappreżentanza tal-mistoqsijiet u l-istat tal-proċess ta’ raġunament; u mbagħad jixpruna r-raġunament tal-ħops li jmiss. L-esperimenti juru li l-mudell tagħna jagħti riżultati l-aktar avvanzati fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta. Aktar interessanti, il-mudell jista’ joffri tbassir intermedju traċċabbli u osservabbli għall-analiżi tar-raġunament u d-dijanjosi tal-falliment, u b’hekk jippermetti manipulazzjoni manwali fit-tbassir tat-tweġiba finali.', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യങ്ങളില്\u200d വിശദീകരിച്ച ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നതിനാലും, അറിവ് ബേസില്\u200d പല സത്യത്തിന്റെയും മൂന്ന് വിവരങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും വിവ In this paper, we present a novel model called Interpretable Reasoning Network that employs an interpretable, hop-by-hop reasoning process for question answering.  ഓരോ ആപ്പിലും ഒരു ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ചോദ്യത്തില്\u200d ഏത് ഭാഗമാണ് ചോദ്യം ചിന്തിക്കേണ്ടതെന്ന് മോഡല്\u200d ഡൈനാമിക്കല്\u200d തീ ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പാര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്ത ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പൊരുത്തുന്ന ബന്ധം പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു; പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയും കാരണ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ അവസ്ഥ പുതുക്കുവാനും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന പിന്നെ അടുത്ത ആശ്രയം കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d രണ്ടു ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്- ആര്\u200dട്ട് ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നല അതില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d രസകരമുള്ളതാണ്, മോഡല്\u200d തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതും കാണുന്നതും തമ്മിലുള്ള മദ്ധ്യ പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d കഴിയും, കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ വിശദീ', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări multirelaționale este o sarcină dificilă, datorită cerinței de analiză elaborată a întrebărilor și raționamentului pe mai multe fapte triple în baza de cunoștințe. În această lucrare, prezentăm un model nou numit Rețeaua de raționare interpretabilă, care utilizează un proces de raționament interpretabil, hop-by-hop pentru răspunsul la întrebări. Modelul decide dinamic ce parte a unei intrebari de intrare trebuie analizata la fiecare hop; prezice o relație care corespunde rezultatelor analizate curente; utilizează relația preconizată pentru a actualiza reprezentarea întrebării și starea procesului de raționament; Și apoi conduce raționamentul următor-hop. Experimentele arată că modelul nostru oferă rezultate de ultimă oră pe două seturi de date. Mai interesant, modelul poate oferi predicții intermediare trasabile și observabile pentru analiza raționamentului și diagnosticarea eșecului, permițând astfel manipularea manuală în predicția răspunsului final.', 'pl': 'Odpowiedź na pytania wielu relacji jest trudnym zadaniem, ze względu na wymaganie opracowanej analizy pytań i rozumowania nad wieloma potrójnymi faktami w bazie wiedzy. W artykule przedstawiamy nowatorski model o nazwie Interpretable Reasoning Network, który wykorzystuje interpretowalny proces rozumowania hop-by-hop do odpowiedzi na pytania. Model dynamicznie decyduje, którą część pytania wejściowego należy analizować na każdym skoku; przewiduje relację odpowiadającą bieżącym analizowanym wynikom; wykorzystuje przewidywaną relację do aktualizacji reprezentacji pytania i stanu procesu rozumowania; a potem prowadzi rozumowanie następnego skoku. Eksperymenty pokazują, że nasz model daje najnowocześniejsze wyniki na dwóch zbiorach danych. Co ciekawsze, model może oferować identyfikowalne i obserwowalne przewidywania pośrednie do analizy rozumowania i diagnozy awarii, umożliwiając tym samym ręczną manipulację w przewidywaniu ostatecznej odpowiedzi.', 'mn': 'Олон харилцааны асуулт хариулт нь мэдлэг суурь дээрх олон жинхэнэ гурав дахин талаар бодох шаардлагатай задалга юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид асуулт хариултын тулд илэрхийлж чадах боломжтой, хоп-хоп урьдлагын үйл явцыг ашигладаг шинэ загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ загвар нь хэн хэсэг нь суралцах асуултыг шалгах вэ гэдэгт шийддэг. одоогийн хуваалцагдсан үр дүнтэй холбоотой харилцаа таамагладаг. асуултын илэрхийлэл болон ойлголтын байдлыг шинэчлэхэд таамагласан харилцаа ашигладаг. дараагийн холбоотой ойлголтыг удирддаг. Түүнчлэл бидний загвар нь 2 өгөгдлийн сангийн хувьд урлагийн үр дүнг өгдөг. Хамгийн сонирхолтой нь, загвар нь урьдчилан шинжилгээ, буруу шинжилгээ, бүтэлгүйтлийн оношлолтын тухай судалж болох боломжтой орчин таамаглах боломжтой болно.', 'no': 'Fleirrelasjonssvar på spørsmål er eit vanskeleg oppgåve, på grunn av nødvendighet for utvikla analyse om spørsmål og rasjon over fleire faktiske trekantar i kunnskapsbasen. I denne papiret presenterer vi eit romanmodell kalla Interpretable Reasoning Network som brukar ein tolkbar, hopp-by-hop-reasoning prosess for spørsmål. Modellen bestemmer dynamisk kva del av ein inndata spørsmål skal analyserast på kvar hopp. forventar ein relasjon som tilsvarar gjeldande tolka resultat; brukar den foregåve relasjonen til oppdatering av spørsmålsrepresentasjonen og tilstanden til prosessen for rasjon; og så køyrer den neste håpsgrunnen. Eksperimentar viser at modellen vår gjev tilstanden til kunsten på to datasett. Med interessant måte kan modellen tilbygge sporbare og observarbare middeltidspunksjonar for rasjonanalyse og feildiagnose, slik at det gjer manuelt manipulering i forhåndsvising av sluttsvaret.', 'sr': 'Odgovor na višeodnosno pitanje je izazovan zadatak zbog zahteva razvijene analize o pitanjima i razmišljanja o višestrukim trostrukim činjenicama u bazi znanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi model koji se zove Interpretable Reasoning Network koja koristi interpretable, hop-by-hop reasoning process za odgovor na pitanje. Model dinamički odlučuje koji deo pitanja za ulazak treba analizirati na svakom koraku; predviđa vezu koja odgovara trenutnim analiziranim rezultatima; koristi predviđenu vezu s obnovivanjem predstavljanja pitanja i stanja razumnog procesa; i onda vozi sledeći razgovor. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model pruža rezultate umjetnosti na dva seta podataka. Zanimljivije je da model može ponuditi praćene i promatrajuće prosječne predviđenje za analizu i dijagnozu neuspjeha, tako omogućavajući manualnu manipulaciju u predviđanju konačnog odgovora.', 'so': "jawaabta su'aalaha xiriirka kala duduwan waa shaqo qallafsan, sababtoo ah baaritaanka lagu baahan yahay baaritaanka saqliga ah oo ku saabsan su'aalaha iyo sababta ku saabsan saddex marxaladood oo runta ah oo ku qoran basaaska aqoonta. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo qoraynaa model warqad ah oo la yidhaahdo Interpretable Readsashada Network, kaas oo u shaqaynaya koorasyada turjubaan, hop-hop-ka ka sababta jawaabta su'aalka. Tusaalada ayaa si dhaqdhaqaaqa ah u go’aaminaya su'aalka gudaha lagu qorayo, boosnada walba waa in lagu analysaa; wuxuu horay u sheegayaa xiriir ku habboon arimaha la soo saaray; wuxuu isticmaalaa xiriirka la doortay inuu cusboonaysiiyo wakiilka su'aalka iyo xaalada sababta; kadibna waxa uu kaxeeyaa sababta soo socda. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modellkayagu uu soo saaraa xaaladda farshaxanka labada sawir. Sida aad u xiiso badan, modelku wuxuu bixi karaa wax u sheegi karo oo la arki karo wax ku saabsan baaritaanka iyo baaritaanka baaritaanka sababta ah, taas darteed wuxuu u ogolaan karaa in dhaqdhaqaalaha qofka gacanta lagu baahan karo si uu uga hor tago jawaabta ugu dambeeya.", 'si': 'ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න උත්තර දෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වල මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා හැම හොප ප්\u200dරස්තූත විශ්ලේෂණ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිපත්ත ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ හ හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයේ ස්ථිතිය සම්බන්ධය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ වෙනු ඊට පස්සෙ ඊළඟ හොප් හොයාගන්න පුළුවන්. පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මෝඩේල් එකේ තාත්තාවක් තියෙනවා දත්ත සෙට් දෙකට. විශේෂයෙන්, මොඩල් එක පුළුවන් අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් හා බලන්න පුළුවන් අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අන', 'sv': 'Flerrelationsfrågesvar är en utmanande uppgift, på grund av kravet på utförlig analys av frågor och resonemang över flera faktaprobler i kunskapsbasen. I denna uppsats presenterar vi en ny modell som heter Interpretable Reasoning Network som använder en tolkningsbar, hop-by-hop resonemangsprocess för frågesvar. Modellen bestämmer dynamiskt vilken del av en inmatningsfråga som ska analyseras vid varje hop; förutspår en relation som motsvarar de aktuella tolkade resultaten; använder den förutsedda relationen för att uppdatera frågeställningen och resonemangets tillstånd, och sedan driver nästa hop resonemang. Experiment visar att vår modell ger toppmoderna resultat på två datauppsättningar. Mer intressant är att modellen kan erbjuda spårbara och observerbara mellanliggande förutsägelser för resonemang analys och feldiagnos, vilket möjliggör manuell manipulation vid förutsägelse av det slutliga svaret.', 'ta': 'பல தொடர்பு கேள்விக்கு பதில் ஒரு சவாலிக்கும் பணி இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரியை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் என்று பெயர் Interpretable Reading Network that uses an interpretable, hop-by-hop reasoning process for questioning answers. ஒவ்வொரு ஆப்பிலும் உள்ளீட்டு கேள்வியில் எந்த பகுதியில் ஒரு மாதிரி தீர்மானிக்கப்படுகிறது; தற்போதைய பிரித்த முடிவுகளுக்கு ஒப்புக் கொள்ளும் ஒரு தொடர்பை எதிர்பார்க்கிறது; முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்பை பயன்படுத்துகிறது கேள்வி குறிப்பிட்ட மற்றும் காரணங்களின் நிலையைப் புதுப் பின்னர் அடுத்த நம்பிக்கை காரணத்தை இயக்குகிறார்கள். இந்த மாதிரி இரண்டு தரவு அமைப்புகளில் உள்ள நிலையில் கலை முடிவுகளை கொடுக்கும் என்பதை காட்டுகிறது. மேலும் விருப்பமாக, இந்த மாதிரி தெரியும் மற்றும் பார்க்கக்கூடிய இடைவெளி முன்னோட்டங்களை வழங்க முடியும் காரணமான ஆய்வு மற்றும் தோல்', 'ur': 'بہت سی نسبت سوال جواب دینے کا ایک مشکل کام ہے، اس کے باعث سوال اور علم بنیاد میں بہت سی حقیقت تین فرق کے بارے میں مفصل کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک روانی موڈل پیش کرتے ہیں جن کا نام "Interpretable Reasoning Network" ہے جو سوال جواب کے لئے ایک تفسیر قابل، ہپ-by-hop منطقی پروسس استعمال کرتا ہے. موڈل ہدایت کے طور پر فیصلہ کرتا ہے کہ ہر ہپ میں کس چیز کا حصہ تحقیق کرنا چاہیے۔ ایک رابطہ کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے جو موجود پارسالہ کے نتائج کے مطابق ہے۔ سؤال کی نمایش اور منطقی پروسس کی موقعیت کے لئے پیش بینی ارتباط کا استعمال کرتا ہے۔ اور پھر اگلے ہپ کی بات چلاتا ہے۔ آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل دو ڈاٹ سٹ پر موجود ہے۔ اور زیادہ دلچسپ ہے، مدل قابل تعلیم تحقیقات اور غلطی کی تصدیق کے لئے پیچھے پھیر سکتا ہے اور دیکھ سکتا ہے، اس کے ذریعہ آخری جواب کی پیش بینی کے لئے manual manipulation کی اجازت دیتا ہے.', 'uz': "Multi- murakkab savol javob beruvchi muammolar, sababi savollar haqida aniqlash kerakligi va aqlli asosida ko'pgina uchta narsalar haqida murakkab qilish kerak. Bu hujjatda, biz Interpretable Reading Network (Interpretable Reading Network) deb nomli novel modelini hosil qilamiz. Bu savol javob berish uchun turib, hop-o-hop sabablar jarayoni ishlab chiqaradi. Name Joriy parlementering natijalariga mos keladigan munosabatlarni ko'rsatadi; so'zlar tashkilotlarini yangilash uchun ishlatiladi. va keyingi tug'ilgan sabablarni ishga tushunadi. Name Ko'proq qiziqarli bo'lgan, model cheksiz analyzer va muvaffaqiyatli diagnostidan foydalanish mumkin. Bunday qilib qoʻlbola boshqarish imkoniyatini oldin qoʻlbola boshqarish imkoniyatini beradi.", 'vi': 'Câu trả lời nhiều mối liên hệ là một nhiệm vụ khó khăn, nhờ vào yêu cầu phân tích đầy đủ các câu hỏi và lý lẽ về đa số các thực tế trong căn cứ kiến thức. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mới gọi là Dịch vụ Lý luận, mà sử dụng một phương pháp giải thích phân tích câu hỏi. Mô hình tự động quyết định phần nào của câu hỏi nhập cần được phân tích ở mỗi nhảy; dự đoán mối quan hệ tương ứng với kết quả đã phân tích hiện thời; sử dụng quan hệ dự đoán để cập nhật sự đại diện câu hỏi và tình trạng của quá trình lập luận; Và rồi điều khiển lập luận kế tiếp. Thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu này cung cấp kết quả hiện đại trên hai bộ dữ liệu. Thú vị hơn, mô hình này có thể cung cấp dự đoán phân tử theo dấu và sẵn sàng để phân tích lý luận và chẩn đoán thất bại, bằng cách đó có thể thao túng bằng tay để dự đoán câu trả lời cuối cùng.', 'bg': 'Отговарянето на въпроси е предизвикателна задача, поради изискването за задълбочен анализ на въпросите и разсъждения върху множество факти тройно в базата на знания. В настоящата статия представяме нов модел, наречен Тълкуваема мрежа за разсъждаване, който използва интерпретируем процес на разсъждаване hop-by-hop за отговор на въпроси. Моделът динамично решава коя част от входния въпрос трябва да се анализира при всеки скок; прогнозира връзка, която съответства на текущите анализирани резултати; използва прогнозираната връзка за актуализиране на представянето на въпросите и състоянието на процеса на разсъждаване; и след това кара следващия хоп разсъждения. Експериментите показват, че нашият модел дава най-съвременни резултати върху два набора от данни. По-интересното е, че моделът може да предложи проследими и наблюдавани междинни прогнози за анализ на разсъжденията и диагностика на неуспехите, като по този начин позволява ръчна манипулация при предвиждането на крайния отговор.', 'nl': 'Het beantwoorden van vragen met meerdere relaties is een uitdagende taak, vanwege de vereiste van uitgebreide analyse van vragen en redenering over meerdere fact triples in de kennisbank. In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuw model genaamd Interpretable Reasoning Network dat gebruik maakt van een interpreteerbaar, hop-by-hop redeneringsproces voor het beantwoorden van vragen. Het model bepaalt dynamisch welk deel van een invoervraag bij elke hop geanalyseerd moet worden; voorspelt een relatie die overeenkomt met de huidige geparste resultaten; gebruikt de voorspelde relatie om de vragenrepresentatie en de staat van het redeneringsproces bij te werken; En dan drijft de next-hop redenering. Uit experimenten blijkt dat ons model state-of-the-art resultaten oplevert op twee datasets. Interessanter is dat het model traceerbare en waarneembare tussentijdse voorspellingen kan bieden voor redeneeranalyse en mislukkingsdiagnose, waardoor handmatige manipulatie mogelijk is bij het voorspellen van het uiteindelijke antwoord.', 'hr': 'Odgovor na više odnosa pitanja je izazovan zadatak zbog zahtjeva razvijene analize o pitanjima i razmišljanja o višestrukim trostrukim činjenicama u bazi znanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi model nazvan Interpretable Reasoning Network koji koristi interpretable, hop-by-hop reasoning process za odgovor na pitanje. Model dinamički odlučuje koji dio ulaznog pitanja treba analizirati na svakom skoku; predviđa odnos koji odgovara trenutnim analiziranim rezultatima; koristi predviđenu vezu s obnovivanjem zastupanja pitanja i stanja razvodnog procesa; i onda vozi sljedeći razgovor. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model pruža rezultate umjetnosti na dva seta podataka. Zanimljivije je da model može ponuditi praćene i praćene prosječne predviđenje za razumnu analizu i dijagnozu neuspjeha, tako omogućavajući ručnu manipulaciju u predviđanju konačnog odgovora.', 'da': 'Multirelationsspørgsmål Besvarelse af spørgsmål er en udfordrende opgave på grund af kravet om uddybende analyse af spørgsmål og ræsonnement over flere fakta tredobles i vidensbasen. I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny model kaldet Interpretable Reasoning Network, der anvender en fortolkbar, hop-by-hop ræsonnement proces til spørgsmål besvarelse. Modellen afgør dynamisk, hvilken del af et inputspørgsmål der skal analyseres ved hver hop; forudsiger en relation, der svarer til de aktuelle fortolkede resultater; anvender den forventede relation til at ajourføre spørgsmålets repræsentation og tilstanden af ræsonnementsprocessen og så driver næste hop ræsonnement. Eksperimenter viser, at vores model giver state-of-the-art resultater på to datasæt. Mere interessant er, at modellen kan tilbyde sporbare og observerbare mellemliggende forudsigelser for ræsonnement analyse og fejldiagnose, hvilket giver mulighed for manuel manipulation i forudsigelse af det endelige svar.', 'de': 'Multi-Relation Question Beantwortung ist eine herausfordernde Aufgabe, da eine ausgearbeitete Analyse von Fragen und Argumentation über mehrere Faktendreifache in der Wissensdatenbank erforderlich ist. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein neuartiges Modell namens Interpretable Reasoning Network vor, das einen interpretierbaren Hop-by-Hop-Argumentationsprozess zur Beantwortung von Fragen verwendet. Das Modell entscheidet dynamisch, welcher Teil einer Eingabefrage bei jedem Hop analysiert werden soll; prognostiziert eine Beziehung, die den aktuellen Parsergebnissen entspricht; verwendet die vorhergesagte Beziehung, um die Fragedarstellung und den Zustand des Argumentationsprozesses zu aktualisieren; und dann treibt die nächste Hop-Argumentation. Experimente zeigen, dass unser Modell State-of-the-Art Ergebnisse auf zwei Datensätzen liefert. Interessanter ist, dass das Modell nachvollziehbare und beobachtbare Zwischenvorhersagen für die Argumentationsanalyse und Fehlerdiagnose bieten kann, wodurch manuelle Manipulation bei der Vorhersage der endgültigen Antwort ermöglicht wird.', 'id': 'Jawaban Pertanyaan Multi-hubungan adalah tugas yang menantang, karena keperluan analisis elaborasi tentang pertanyaan dan alasan atas fakta ganda ganda dalam dasar pengetahuan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan model novel bernama Interpretable Reasoning Network yang menggunakan proses reasoning yang dapat diterjemahkan, hop-by-hop untuk menjawab pertanyaan. Model secara dinamik memutuskan bagian mana dari pertanyaan input yang harus dianalisis pada setiap lompatan; memprediksi hubungan yang sesuai dengan hasil yang diuji saat ini; menggunakan hubungan yang diprediksi untuk memperbaharui perwakilan pertanyaan dan keadaan proses alasan; dan kemudian mendorong pemikiran selanjutnya. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita memberikan hasil terbaik pada dua set data. Yang lebih menarik, model dapat menawarkan prediksi intermedi yang dapat dilacak dan dapat diperhatikan untuk analisis alasan dan diagnosis kegagalan, sehingga memungkinkan manipulasi manual dalam prediksi jawaban akhir.', 'fa': 'پاسخ پرسش\u200cهای زیادی رابطه\u200cای یک کار سخت\u200cکننده است، به دلیل نیازی تحلیل\u200cهای توضیح\u200cشده در مورد سوال\u200cها و دلیل\u200cگیری در مورد سه\u200cگانه\u200cهای حقیقت در پایگاه علم. در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل رمانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم به نام شبکه دلایل تفسیر قابل تفسیر که یک فرآیند منطقی از هوپ برای جواب سوال استفاده می\u200cکند. مدل دینامیک تصمیم می\u200cگیرد کدام بخشی از سوال ورودی در هر Hop باید تحلیل شود; ارتباطی را پیش\u200cبینی می\u200cکند که با نتیجه\u200cهای تجزیه\u200cشده\u200cی جاری ارتباط دارد. رابطه پیش\u200cبینی را برای تبدیل کردن نمایش سوال و وضعیت فرایند منطقی استفاده می\u200cکند. و سپس دلیل\u200cهای بعدی را رانندگی می\u200cکند. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما نتیجه\u200cهای موقعیت هنر را در دو مجموعه داده می\u200cدهد. جالبتر از این، مدل می تواند پیش بینی\u200cهای متوسط قابل ردیابی و قابل توجه برای تحلیل و تشخیص شکست را پیشنهاد دهد، به وسیله آن اجازه دهد که تغییر دستی در پیش بینی پاسخ نهایی انجام دهد.', 'ko': '다관계 문답은 문제에 대해 상세한 분석을 하고 지식 라이브러리에서 여러 사실의 삼원조를 추리해야 하기 때문에 도전적인 임무이다.본고에서 우리는 해석 가능한 추리 네트워크라고 불리는 새로운 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 해석 가능한 점차적인 추리 과정을 이용하여 문제를 대답한다.이 모델은 매 점프에서 입력 문제의 어느 부분을 분석해야 하는지를 동태적으로 결정한다.현재 해석 결과와 상응하는 관계를 예측한다.예측 관계를 이용하여 문제의 표시와 추리 과정의 상태를 갱신한다.그리고 다음 추리를 구동합니다.실험에 의하면 우리의 모델은 두 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 결과를 얻었다.더욱 흥미로운 것은 이 모델은 추리 분석과 고장 진단에 추적 가능하고 관찰 가능한 중간 예측을 제공하여 최종 답안을 예측할 때 수동으로 조작할 수 있게 한다.', 'sw': 'Swali la mahusiano mengi ni jukumu la changamoto, kwa sababu ya mahitaji ya uchambuzi wa kina kuhusu maswali na kujadili kuhusu matatizo mengi ya ukweli katika msingi wa maarifa. Katika gazeti hili, tunaweka muundo wa riwaya unaoitwa Mtandao wa Kutafsiri inayotumia mchakato wa kutafsiri, tumaini kwa matumaini kwa kujibu maswali. Mfano huu unaamua ni sehemu gani ya swali la kuingia linapaswa kuchambuliwa kwa kila matumaini; kutabiri uhusiano unaohusiana na matokeo ya sasa yaliyofunguliwa; hutumia uhusiano unaotabiriwa upya uwakilishi wa swali na hali ya mchakato wa maana; na kisha huendesha sababu inayofuata ya matumaini. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unatoa matokeo ya hali ya sanaa kwenye seti mbili za data. Cha kushangaza zaidi, mfano huo unaweza kutoa utabiri wa kati unaoonekana na kuonekana kwa uchunguzi wa sababu na kushindwa, kwa hiyo inaruhusu kudhibiti manufaa katika kutabiri jibu la mwisho.', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve me shumë lidhje është një detyrë sfiduese, për shkak të kërkesës së analizës së përgatitur mbi pyetjet dhe arsyetimit mbi fakte të shumëfishta të trefishta në bazën e njohurive. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një model të ri të quajtur Rrjeti i Përpjekueshëm i arsyetimit që përdor një proces arsyetimi të interpretueshëm, hop-by-hop për përgjigjen e pyetjeve. Modeli vendos dinamikisht se cila pjesë e një pyetjeje të hyrjes duhet të analizohet në çdo hop; parashikon një lidhje që korrespondon me rezultatet aktuale të analizuara; përdor marrëdhënien e parashikuar për të përditësuar përfaqësimin e pyetjeve dhe gjendjen e procesit të arsyetimit; dhe pastaj drejton arsyetimin e hopit të ardhshëm. Experiments show that our model yields state-of-the-art results on two datasets.  Më interesante, modeli mund të ofrojë parashikime të gjurmueshme dhe të vëzhgueshme të ndërmjetësuara për analizën e arsyetimit dhe diagnostikën e dështimit, duke lejuar kështu manipulimin manual në parashikimin e përgjigjes përfundimtare.', 'am': 'የብዙ ግንኙነት ጥያቄ መልስ በአውቀት መቀመጫዎች ላይ የሚዘረጉት እና የመረጃ ውይይት በሚያሳዩበት የፍላጎት ትክክለኛ ስራ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የመረጃ ትርጉም፣ ለጥያቄ መልስ የሚጠይቅ፣ የሚተርጉም፣ በhop-በ-hop የጉዳይ ጉዳይ የሚባለውን የመረጃ ዘዴታ እናቀርባታለን፡፡ ሞዴል በየስፍራው ማንኛውን የጥያቄ ጥያቄ እንዲያስተምር ይፈርዳል፡ የአሁኑን የተፈጸመ ውጤቶች የሚደላቀውን ግንኙነት ይናገራል፡ የቀድሞው ግንኙነት የጥያቄውን መልዕክትና የውይይት ጉዳይ ማሻሻል ይጠቅማል፡ በኋላም የሚቀጥለውን ጉዳይ ይነዳል:: ፈተናዎች ሞዴሌዎቻችን የ-የ-የ-art ፍሬዎችን በሁለት ዳታ መስመር እንዲያሳየው ያሳያል፡፡ More interestingly, the model can offer traceable and observable intermediate predictions for reasoning analysis and failure diagnosis, thereby allowing manual manipulation in predicting the final answer.', 'af': "Veelvuldige verwanting Fraag Antwoord is 'n pragtige taak, vanweë die verwanting van verwante analisie oor vrae en redening oor veelvuldige fakte tripels in kennis basie. In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n roman model genoem Interpretable Reasoning Network wat gebruik 'n interpretable, hop-by-hop redering proses vir vraag antwoord. Die model dynamiese besluit watter deel van 'n invoer vraag by elke hoop moet analyseer word; voorskou 'n verhouding wat ooreenstem met die huidige verwerking resultate; gebruik die voorskoude verhouding na opdateer die vraag voorskyning en die staat van die redering proses; en dan draai die volgende-hoop redening. Eksperimente vertoon dat ons model die state-of-the-art resultate op twee datastel gee. Meir interessant kan die model agtervolg en aansigbare middelste voorskou aanbied vir redelike analisie en mislukking diagnose, sodat die handhandmanipulasie toelaat word in die voorskou van die eindelike antwoord.", 'hy': 'Multi-relation Question Answering is a challenging task, due to the requirement of elaborated analysis on questions and reasoning over multiple fact triples in knowledge base.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր մոդել, որը կոչվում է Թարգմանելի Պատճառման ցանց, որը օգտագործում է մեկնաբանելի, հոփ-հոփ մտածողական գործընթաց հարցերի պատասխանելու համար: Մոդելը դինամիկ կերպով որոշում է, թե ներմուծի հարցի ո՞ր մասը պետք է վերլուծվի յուրաքանչյուր հոսքի ժամանակ: կանխատեսում է հարաբերությունները, որոնք համապատասխանում են ներկայիս վերլուծված արդյունքներին: օգտագործում է նախատեսված հարաբերությունը հարցերի ներկայացման և մտածողական գործընթացի վիճակի վերականգնելու համար: և հետո շարժում է հաջորդ հույսի մտածողությունը: Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը տալիս է ամենակարևոր արդյունքներ երկու տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Ավելի հետաքրքիրն այն է, որ մոդելը կարող է առաջարկել հետևելի և հետևելի միջին կանխատեսումներ մտածողության վերլուծության և ձախողումների ախտորոշության համար, ինչը թույլ է տալիս ձեռքի մանիպուլյացիա վերջնական պատասխանի կանխա', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের বিস্তারিত বিশ্লেষণের প্রয়োজন এবং জ্ঞানের বেসে বেশ কয়েকটি বাস্তবতা নিয়ে বিতর্ক করার প্রয়োজনের কারণে বিস্তারিত প্রশ্নে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নোভেল মডেল উপস্থাপন করছি যার নামে অনুবাদ করা যাবে নেটওয়ার্ক যা প্রশ্নের উত্তরের জন্য একটি ব্যাখ্যাত, হোপ-বার-হোপ মডেলটি নানাভাবে সিদ্ধান্ত নেয় যে প্রতিটি আশায় ইনপুট প্রশ্নের কোন অংশ বিশ্লেষণ করা উচিত; predicts a relation that corresponds to the current parsed results;  প্রশ্নের প্রতিনিধিত্ব এবং যুক্তিক প্রক্রিয়ার অবস্থা আপডেট করার জন্য প্রাপ্ত সম্পর্ক ব্যবহার করে; তারপর পরবর্তী হোপের কারণে চালায়। পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল দুই ডাটাসেটে রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের ফলাফল প্রদান করে। আরো মডেলের কারণে ব্যাখ্যা এবং ব্যর্থ পরীক্ষার জন্য মাধ্যমের মধ্যেকার ভবিষ্যৎবাণী প্রদান করতে পারে, যার ফলে মানুষের চূড়ান্ত উত্তর ভবিষ্যতে', 'az': 'Həmçin in çoxlu ilişkili sual cavab vermək elmdə çoxlu üç dəfə haqqında müfəssəl analizi və müzakirə etmək lazımdır. Bu kağızda, sual cavab vermək üçün istifadə edə biləcək, hop-by-hop razılaşma prosesini istifadə edirik. Model dinamik olaraq girdi sualının hansı parçasını hər çöpdə analiz edilməsini karar verir; hökmən ayırılmış nəticələrə uyğun bir bağlantı təmin edir; sual göstəricisini və razılıq prosesinin durumunu güncelleştirmək üçün tədbir edilmiş ilişkisini istifadə edir; Sonra bir-birinin dəyişməsini sürükləyir. Təcrübələrimiz modellərimizin iki veri qurğularına müəyyən edilməsini göstərir. Daha maraqlı olaraq, model dəyişiklik analizi və başarısızlıq dijagnostiklərini təsdiqləyib edə bilər, bu olaraq son cavabı təsdiqləmək üçün əlli manipul edə bilər.', 'ca': "La resposta a preguntes multirellacionals és una tasca desafiadora, degut al requisit d'una anàlisi elaborada sobre preguntes i raonament sobre múltiples triples de fets en la base del coneixement. En aquest article presentem un nou model anomenat Interpretable Reasoning Network que utilitza un procés de raonament interpretable, hop-by-hop per respondre a preguntes. El model decideix dinàmicament quina part d'una pregunta d'entrada hauria de ser analitzada en cada salt; prediu una relació que correspondeix als resultats analitzats actuals; utilitza la relació prevista per actualitzar la representació de preguntes i l'estat del procés de raonament; i després impulsa el raonament del següent salt. Els experiments demostren que el nostre model produeix resultats més avançats en dos conjunts de dades. Més interessant, el model pot oferir prediccions intermedies traçables i observables per a l'anàlisi de raonament i el diagnòstic de fracàs, permetent així manipular manualment en predir la resposta final.", 'bs': 'Odgovor na više odnosa pitanja je izazovan zadatak zbog zahtjeva razvijene analize o pitanjima i razmišljanja o višestrukim trostrukim činjenicama u bazi znanja. U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi model koji se zove Interpretable Reasoning Network koja koristi interpretable, hop-by-hop reasoning process za odgovor na pitanje. Model dinamički odlučuje koji dio ulaznog pitanja treba analizirati na svakom skoku; predviđa vezu koja odgovara trenutnim analiziranim rezultatima; koristi predviđenu vezu s obnovivanjem zastupanja pitanja i stanja razumnog procesa; i onda vozi sljedeći razgovor. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš model daje rezultate umjetnosti na dva seta podataka. Zanimljivije je da model može ponuditi praćene i promatrajuće prosječne predviđenje za razumnu analizu i dijagnozu neuspjeha, tako omogućavajući manualnu manipulaciju u predviđanju konačnog odgovora.', 'cs': 'Vícevztahové odpovědi na otázky je náročný úkol, vzhledem k požadavku rozpracované analýzy otázek a uvažování nad několika trojnásobnými fakty ve znalostní bázi. V tomto článku představujeme nový model nazvaný Interpretable Reasoning Network, který využívá interpretovatelný proces hop-by-hop uvažování pro odpověď na otázky. Model dynamicky rozhoduje, která část vstupní otázky má být analyzována při každém skoku; předpovídá vztah, který odpovídá aktuálním analyzovaným výsledkům; využívá předpokládaný vztah k aktualizaci reprezentace otázky a stavu procesu uvažování; a pak řídí další-hop uvažování. Experimenty ukazují, že náš model přináší nejmodernější výsledky na dvou datových sadách. Zajímavější je, že model může nabídnout sledovatelné a pozorovatelné mezipředpovědi pro analýzu uvažování a diagnostiku selhání, čímž umožňuje manuální manipulaci při předpovědi konečné odpovědi.', 'fi': 'Monisuhdekysymysten vastaaminen on haastava tehtävä, koska kysymyksiä on analysoitava perusteellisesti ja pohdittava usean faktan kolminkertaiseksi tietopohjaksi. Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme uuden mallin nimeltä Interpretable Reasoning Network, joka käyttää tulkittavissa olevaa, hop-by-hop-päättelyprosessia kysymyksiin vastaamiseen. Malli päättää dynaamisesti, mikä osa syöttökysymyksestä tulisi analysoida kussakin hypyssä; ennustaa suhdetta, joka vastaa nykyisiä jäsennettyjä tuloksia; käyttää ennustettua suhdetta kysymyksen esittämisen ja päättelyprosessin tilan päivittämiseen; Ja sitten ajaa seuraavan hypyn päättelyä. Kokeet osoittavat, että mallimme tuottaa huippuluokan tuloksia kahdesta aineistosta. Mielenkiintoisempaa on, että malli voi tarjota jäljitettäviä ja havaittavissa olevia väliennusteita päättelyanalyysiin ja vikadiagnoosiin, mikä mahdollistaa manuaalisen manipuloinnin lopullisen vastauksen ennustamisessa.', 'et': 'Mitme seosega küsimustele vastamine on keeruline ülesanne, kuna nõutakse küsimuste põhjalikku analüüsi ja arutlust mitme fakti kolmekordse teadmistebaasi kohta. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uut mudelit nimega Tõlgendatav mõistmise võrgustik, mis kasutab tõlgendatavat, hop-by-hop arutlusprotsessi küsimustele vastamiseks. Mudel otsustab dünaamiliselt, millist osa sisendküsimusest tuleks analüüsida iga hüppe ajal; prognoosib seose, mis vastab praegustele parsitud tulemustele; kasutab prognoositud seost, et ajakohastada küsimuse esitust ja arutlusprotsessi seisundit; ja siis juhib järgmise hüppe arutlust. Eksperimentid näitavad, et meie mudel annab kaasaegseid tulemusi kahe andmekogumi kohta. Veelgi huvitavam on, et mudel võib pakkuda jälgitavaid ja jälgitavaid vahepealseid prognoose arutluse analüüsimiseks ja ebaõnnestumise diagnoosimiseks, mis võimaldab käsitsi manipuleerida lõpliku vastuse prognoosimisel.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe syýahat soragy jogap etmek kynçylyk uzmanydyr, bilim üýtgesinde birnäçe faktyň üç sanynyň üstünde düşünmesi we çözümlenme gereklidigi sebäbi. Bu kagyzda sorag jogap bermek üçin bir roman nusgasyny çykardyk Bu model dynamik bilen girdi soragynyň hansy bölegini her hopda analyz edilmelidigini karar berýär; häzirki analyz netijesine täsirli baglaýyşyny çaklaýar soral temsillerini ve razılaşma prosesinin durumunu güncellemek için tahmin edilen ilişkisini kullanır; we soňra indiki hoprak sebäbi sürýär. Synanyşanlar biziň nusgamyzyň 2 sany çykyşyň durumyny täsir edýändigini görkezýär. Gowy gyzykly bolsa, model ahyry analýusiýa we hata döküşiniň ahyry çaklamak üçin gözlemeli we gözlemeli arasy öngörümleri teklip edip biler, şonuň üçin soňky jogabyny çaklamak üçin el işlemene mümkin edip biler.', 'ha': "Jami'in masu husũma ya zama wani aikin mai hanzara, saba da buƙata an ƙayyade rabo-anayya a kan tambayar da kuma yana jãyayya a kan wasu misãlai masu yawa a cikin basin ilmi. Daga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wani misali na nowaya wanda ake kiran Harshen Mai Fassarwa da ake amfani da wata fassarar fassara da juma-jum da-jum wa jibin tambayi. Yin motsi ya hukunta wanne rabo wani tambayi na cikin shirin ayuka a lokacin; Yana gabanin wata danganta da ke daidai da matsalan da aka samar da shi yanzu; Yanã amfani da mazaunin da aka ƙayyade wajen sãɓa wa wakilishi mai tambaya da halin jarraban aiki; Sa'an nan na karɓi wani abu na dabam. Tajarakin na nuna cewa misalinmu yana fitar matsalar-state-of-the-art kan daidaita biyu. More interestingly, the model can offer traceable and observable intermediate predictions for reasoning analysis and failure diagnosis, thereby allowing manual manipulation in predicting the final answer.", 'jv': 'Multi-Relative question responses punika diangkamu nggunakake kapan kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo diangkamu dilairakno karo layang lan disinteksi banjure sak uga operasi layang kanggo torah-torah diangkamu Nanging kuwi iki, kita nyimpen modèl ding donge sembaran interretable Den model dinomik supoyo perusahaan kelompok ing watahan input question kudu dilanyisih saben nggo sep; perusahaan to politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive user maneh', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja z več odnosi je zahtevna naloga zaradi zahteve po natančni analizi vprašanj in razmišljanju o večkratnih dejstvih v bazi znanja. V prispevku predstavljamo nov model, imenovan Interpretable Reasoning Network, ki uporablja razložljiv postopek razmišljanja hop-by-hop za odgovarjanje na vprašanja. Model dinamično odloča, kateri del vhodnega vprašanja je treba analizirati pri vsakem skoku; napoveduje relacijo, ki ustreza trenutnim razčlenjenim rezultatom; uporablja predvideno razmerje za posodobitev predstavitve vprašanj in stanja postopka obrazložitve; In potem vozi naslednji hop razmišljanje. Eksperimenti kažejo, da naš model prinaša najsodobnejše rezultate na dveh naborih podatkov. Bolj zanimivo je, da lahko model ponudi sledljive in opazne vmesne napovedi za analizo razmišljanja in diagnozo neuspeha, kar omogoča ročno manipulacijo pri napovedovanju končnega odgovora.', 'he': 'תשובות על שאלות רבות מערכות יחסים היא משימה מאתגרת, בגלל הדרישה של ניתוח מפורסם על שאלות וההגיון על מספר עובדות שלישיות בבסיס ידע. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים מודל חדש שנקרא רשת ההיגיון המתוררת שמעסקת תהליך ההיגיון המתורר, הופ על הופ לענות על שאלות. הדימודל מחליט באופן דינמי איזה חלק משאלת כניסה צריך לנתח בכל תקופה; מחזות מערכת יחסים שמתאימה לתוצאות המחקרות הנוכחיות; utilizes the predicted relation to update the question representation and the state of the reasoning process;  ואז נוהג בהיגיון הבא. ניסויים מראים שהמודל שלנו מוביל תוצאות חדשות על שתי קבוצות נתונים. מעניין יותר, המודל יכול להציע ציפויים בינויים עקביים ומצפים לניתוח הגיוני ואבחנה כישלון, כך מאפשר מניפולציה ידנית בחזוי התשובה הסופית.', 'bo': 'ཧ་ཅང་གིས་གནས་ཚུལ་འདྲི་ཚིག་གནད་དོན་དག་སམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་བྱ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྐྱེན་པའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་སྟོན་པ་ཞིག The model dynamically decides which part of an input question should be analyzed at each hop; མིག་སྔར་འཛུགས་བྱས་པའི་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་དང་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ utilizes the predicted relation to update the question representation and the state of the reasoning process; and འོན་ཀྱང་ཁྱེད་མའི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་སྒུལ་གཏོང་ཐུབ། ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ང་ཚོའི་མིག་སྔར་སྒྲིག་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་ཐོག་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས འདི་ལྟ་བུ'}
{'en': 'Adaptive Learning of Local Semantic and Global Structure Representations for Text Classification', 'ar': 'التعلم التكيفي لتمثيلات البنية الدلالية المحلية والعالمية لتصنيف النص', 'es': 'Aprendizaje adaptativo de representaciones de estructuras globales y semánticas locales para la clasificación de textos', 'fr': 'Apprentissage adaptatif de représentations sémantiques locales et de structures globales pour la classification de texte', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem Adaptativa de Representações Semânticas Locais e Estruturas Globais para Classificação de Texto', 'ja': 'テキスト分類のためのローカルセマンティックおよびグローバル構造表現の適応学習', 'zh': '文本之类语义与全局结构者自宜', 'hi': 'पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए स्थानीय शब्दार्थ और वैश्विक संरचना अभ्यावेदन के अनुकूली सीखना', 'ru': 'Адаптивное обучение локальным семантическим представлениям и представлениям глобальной структуры для классификации текста', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Oiriúnaitheach Léirithe Struchtúr Shéimeantach Áitiúil agus Dhomhanda le haghaidh Aicmiú Téacs', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის ადაპტიგური სენმანტიკური და გლობალური სტრუქტურის გამოსახულების შესწავლება', 'el': 'Προσαρμοστική Μάθηση Τοπικών Σημαντικών και Παγκόσμιων Δομικών Αντιπροσωπειών για την ταξινόμηση Κειμένων', 'hu': 'A szövegosztályozás helyi szemantikai és globális struktúrájának adaptív tanulása', 'it': 'Apprendimento adattivo delle rappresentazioni semantiche locali e globali della struttura per la classificazione dei testi', 'lt': 'Prisitaikytas mokymasis apie vietos Semantų ir pasaulinės struktūros atstovavimus teksto klasifikacijai', 'mk': 'Адаптивно учење на локалните семантични и глобални структурни претставувања за класификација на текст', 'kk': 'Мәтін классификациясының жергілікті семантикалық және жалпы құрылғының таңбаларын оқыту', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Penyesuaian Semantik setempat dan Struktur Global untuk Klasifikasi Teks', 'mn': 'Орон нутгийн Semantic, Global Structure Representations for Text Classification', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Adattattiv tar-Rappreżentazzjonijiet Semantiċi Lokali u tal-Istruttura Globali għall-Klassifikazzjoni tat-Test', 'ml': 'ലോക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്കും ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d ഘടനയുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കും അഡാപ്റ്റീവ് പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'no': 'Adaptivt læring av lokale semantiske og globale strukturrepresentasjonar for tekstklassifikasjon', 'pl': 'Adaptywne uczenie się lokalnych reprezentacji semantycznych i globalnych struktur dla klasyfikacji tekstu', 'ro': 'Învăţarea adaptivă a reprezentărilor semantice locale şi globale ale structurii pentru clasificarea textelor', 'sr': 'Adaptivno učenje lokalnog semantičkog i globalnog predstavljanja strukture za klasifikaciju teksta', 'si': 'ස්ථානික සෙමාන්ටික් සහ ජාතික සංවිධානය පිළිගණනය සඳහා පෙළිගණනය', 'so': 'Adaptive Learning of Local Semantic and Global Structure Representations of Text Classification', 'sv': 'Adaptivt lärande av lokala semantiska och globala strukturrepresentationer för textklassificering', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'لیکن سیمنٹی اور گلوبل ساختار کی تعلیم کی اڈسٹی سیکھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học thích ứng về Trung học và cấu trúc cục bộ cục bộ', 'bg': 'Адаптивно обучение на местни семантични и глобални структурни представи за класификация на текста', 'hr': 'Adaptivno učenje lokalnog semantičkog i globalnog predstavljanja strukture za klasifikaciju teksta', 'da': 'Adaptive Learning of Local Semantic and Global Structure Representations for Text Classification', 'de': 'Adaptives Lernen lokaler semantischer und globaler StrukturreprĂ¤sentationen fĂ¼r die Textklassifizierung', 'nl': 'Adaptief leren van lokale semantische en globale structuren representaties voor tekstclassificatie', 'id': 'Pelajaran Adaptif dari Perwakilan Struktur Semantik Lokal dan Global untuk Klasifikasi Teks', 'ko': '텍스트 분류 중 국부적 의미와 전역 구조 표시의 적응 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری مناسبی از نمایش ساختار محلی و ساختار جهانی برای کلاس\u200cشناسی متن', 'sw': 'Adaptive Learning of Local Semantic and Global Structure Representations for Text Classification', 'tr': 'Ýerli Semantik we Ýerli struktur Görkezilmeleri', 'af': 'Adaptief Leer van Plaaslike Semantiese en Globale Struktuur voorstellings vir Teks Klassifikasie', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përshtatshëm i përfaqësimeve të strukturës lokale dhe lokale për klasifikimin e tekstit', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Yerli Semantik v…ô Qlobal Yapƒ±lar M…ôtn Sƒ±nƒ±flamasƒ±', 'am': 'Local Semantic and Global Structure Representations for Text Classification', 'bn': 'স্থানীয় সেমান্টিক এবং গ্লোবাল কাঠামোর প্রতিনিধির শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Adaptivno učenje lokalnog semantičkog i globalnog predstavljanja strukture za klasifikaciju teksta', 'ca': 'Adaptive Learning of Local Semantic and Global Structure Representations for Text Classification', 'cs': 'Adaptivní učení reprezentací lokální sémantické a globální struktury pro klasifikaci textů', 'fi': 'Paikallisten semanttisten ja globaalien rakenneesitysten mukautuva oppiminen tekstiluokittelussa', 'et': 'Kohalike semantiliste ja globaalsete struktuuride esinduste kohanduv õpe teksti klassifitseerimiseks', 'jv': 'Language', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Prilagodljivo učenje lokalnih semantičnih in globalnih strukturnih predstavitev za klasifikacijo besedila', 'he': 'Adaptive Learning of Local Semantic and Global Structure Representations for Text Classification', 'bo': 'Adaptive Learning of Local Semantic and Global Structure Representations for Text Classification'}
{'en': 'Representation learning is a key issue for most Natural Language Processing (NLP) tasks. Most existing representation models either learn little structure information or just rely on pre-defined structures, leading to degradation of performance and generalization capability. This paper focuses on learning both local semantic and global structure representations for text classification. In detail, we propose a novel Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) to learn semantic and structure representations automatically without relying on parsers. More importantly, semantic and structure information contribute unequally to the text representation at corpus and instance level. To solve the fusion problem, we propose two strategies : Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) and Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). The former learns the weights at corpus level, and the latter further combines attention mechanism to assign the weights at instance level. Experimental results demonstrate that our approach achieves competitive performance on several text classification tasks, including sentiment analysis, question type classification and subjectivity classification. Specifically, the accuracies are MR (82.1 %), SST-5 (50.4 %), TREC (96 %) and SUBJ (93.9 %).', 'ar': 'يعد تعلم التمثيل قضية أساسية لمعظم مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP). تتعلم معظم نماذج التمثيل الحالية القليل من معلومات الهيكل أو تعتمد فقط على هياكل محددة مسبقًا ، مما يؤدي إلى تدهور الأداء والقدرة على التعميم. تركز هذه الورقة على تعلم كل من تمثيلات البنية الدلالية المحلية والعالمية لتصنيف النص. بالتفصيل ، نقترح شبكة ساندويتش عصبية جديدة (SNN) لتعلم التمثيلات الدلالية والهيكلية تلقائيًا دون الاعتماد على المحللون. والأهم من ذلك ، أن المعلومات الدلالية والهيكلية تساهم بشكل غير متساو في تمثيل النص على مستوى الجسم والمثال. لحل مشكلة الاندماج ، نقترح استراتيجيتين: الشبكة العصبية لساندويتش التعلم التكيفي (AL-SNN) والشبكة العصبية ساندويتش الانتباه الذاتي (SA-SNN). يتعلم الأول الأوزان على مستوى الجسم ، والأخير يجمع أيضًا بين آلية الانتباه لتعيين الأوزان على مستوى المثيل. توضح النتائج التجريبية أن نهجنا يحقق أداءً تنافسيًا في العديد من مهام تصنيف النص ، بما في ذلك تحليل المشاعر وتصنيف نوع السؤال والتصنيف الذاتي. على وجه التحديد ، الدقة هي MR (82.1٪) و SST-5 (50.4٪) و TREC (96٪) و SUBJ (93.9٪).', 'pt': 'A aprendizagem de representação é uma questão chave para a maioria das tarefas de Processamento de Linguagem Natural (NLP). A maioria dos modelos de representação existentes aprende pouca informação de estrutura ou apenas confia em estruturas pré-definidas, levando à degradação do desempenho e capacidade de generalização. Este artigo se concentra em aprender representações de estrutura semântica local e global para classificação de texto. Em detalhes, propomos uma nova Rede Neural Sandwich (SNN) para aprender representações semânticas e de estrutura automaticamente sem depender de analisadores. Mais importante, as informações semânticas e de estrutura contribuem de forma desigual para a representação do texto em nível de corpus e instância. Para resolver o problema da fusão, propomos duas estratégias: Rede Neural Sanduíche de Aprendizagem Adaptativa (AL-SNN) e Rede Neural Sanduíche de Autoatenção (SA-SNN). O primeiro aprende os pesos no nível do corpus, e o último ainda combina o mecanismo de atenção para atribuir os pesos no nível da instância. Resultados experimentais demonstram que nossa abordagem alcança desempenho competitivo em várias tarefas de classificação de texto, incluindo análise de sentimento, classificação de tipo de pergunta e classificação de subjetividade. Especificamente, as precisões são MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) e SUBJ (93,9%).', 'es': 'El aprendizaje de representación es un tema clave para la mayoría de las tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP). La mayoría de los modelos de representación existentes aprenden poca información sobre la estructura o simplemente se basan en estructuras predefinidas, lo que lleva a la degradación del rendimiento y la capacidad de generalización. Este artículo se centra en el aprendizaje de representaciones de estructuras globales y semánticas locales para la clasificación de textos. En detalle, proponemos una novedosa Red Neural Sandwich (SNN) para aprender representaciones semánticas y de estructura automáticamente sin depender de analizadores. Más importante aún, la información semántica y estructural contribuye de manera desigual a la representación del texto a nivel de corpus e instancia. Para resolver el problema de la fusión, proponemos dos estrategias: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) y Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). El primero aprende los pesos a nivel del cuerpo, y el segundo combina aún más el mecanismo de atención para asignar los pesos a nivel de instancia. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro enfoque logra un rendimiento competitivo en varias tareas de clasificación de textos, incluidos el análisis de sentimientos, la clasificación de tipos de preguntas y la clasificación de subjetividad. En concreto, las precisiones son MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) y SUBJ (93,9%).', 'zh': '学者,多自然语言治(NLP)之关键问题也。 大抵模形或学少结,或依于定义,以致性泛化之降。 本文重点介学文本分类的局部语义和全局结构。 具言新三明治神经网络(SNN)可不恃解析器自学语义构。 重者,语义与构信语料库与文殊功也。 合而二策:自适学三明治神经网络(AL-SNN)自三明治神经网络(SA-SNN)。 前者学权重于语料库,后者合意于分配权重。 实验结果表明者,情之所分,主观性之所取竞争力也。 精为MR(82.1%),SST-5(50.4%)为TREC(96%),SUBJ(93.9%)为S。', 'ja': '表現学習は、ほとんどの自然言語処理（ NLP ）タスクにとって重要な課題です。 ほとんどの既存の表現モデルは、構造情報をほとんど学ばないか、事前に定義された構造に依存するだけで、パフォーマンスと一般化能力の低下につながります。 本稿では、テキスト分類のためのローカルな意味構造表現とグローバルな構造表現の両方を学習することに焦点を当てる。 詳細には、構文解析器に依存せずに自動的にセマンティック表現と構造表現を学習するための新たなSandwich Neural Network (SNN)を提案します。 さらに重要なことに、意味情報と構造情報は、コーパスとインスタンスレベルでのテキスト表現に不等に寄与します。 融合問題を解決するために、適応学習サンドイッチニューラルネットワーク（ AL - SNN ）と自己注意サンドイッチニューラルネットワーク（ SA - SNN ）の2つの戦略を提案します。 前者はコーパスレベルで重みを学習し、後者はさらに注意メカニズムを組み合わせてインスタンスレベルで重みを割り当てる。 実験結果は、私たちのアプローチが、感情分析、質問タイプ分類、主観性分類を含むいくつかのテキスト分類タスクで競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成することを示しています。 具体的には、MR (82.1%)、SST -5 (50.4%)、TREC (96%)、SUBJ (93.9%)である。', 'fr': "L'apprentissage de la représentation est un enjeu clé pour la plupart des tâches de traitement du langage naturel (NLP). La plupart des modèles de représentation existants apprennent peu d'informations sur la structure ou s'appuient simplement sur des structures prédéfinies, ce qui entraîne une dégradation des performances et des capacités de généralisation. Cet article se concentre sur l'apprentissage des représentations sémantiques locales et globales pour la classification de texte. En détail, nous proposons un nouveau réseau neuronal sandwich (SNN) pour apprendre automatiquement les représentations sémantiques et structurantes sans dépendre des analyseurs. Plus important encore, les informations sémantiques et structurales contribuent de manière inégale à la représentation du texte au niveau du corpus et de l'instance. Pour résoudre le problème de fusion, nous proposons deux stratégies\xa0: le réseau neuronal sandwich d'apprentissage adaptatif (AL-SNN) et le réseau de neurones sandwich auto-attention (SA-SNN). Le premier apprend les poids au niveau du corps, et le second combine le mécanisme d'attention pour attribuer les poids au niveau de l'instance. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que notre approche atteint des performances concurrentielles sur plusieurs tâches de classification de texte, y compris l'analyse des sentiments, la classification par type de question et la classification par subjectivité. Plus précisément, les précisions sont MR (82,1\xa0%), SST-5 (50,4\xa0%), TREC (96\xa0%) et SUBJ (93,9\xa0%).", 'ru': 'Репрезентативное обучение является ключевым вопросом для большинства задач по обработке естественного языка (NLP). Большинство существующих моделей представления либо изучают мало информации о структуре, либо просто полагаются на заранее определенные структуры, что приводит к ухудшению производительности и возможности обобщения. В настоящем документе основное внимание уделяется изучению как локальных семантических, так и глобальных структурных представлений для классификации текста. В деталях мы предлагаем новую сэндвич-нейронную сеть (SNN), чтобы изучать семантические и структурные представления автоматически, не полагаясь на парсеры. Что еще более важно, семантическая и структурная информация неравномерно влияет на представление текста на уровне корпуса и экземпляра. Для решения задачи слияния мы предлагаем две стратегии: адаптивное обучение сэндвич нейронной сети (AL-SNN) и самовосстановление сэндвич нейронной сети (SA-SNN). Первый изучает веса на уровне корпуса, а второй дополнительно объединяет механизм внимания для назначения весов на уровне экземпляра. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш подход достигает конкурентных результатов по нескольким задачам классификации текста, включая анализ настроений, классификацию типов вопросов и классификацию субъективности. В частности, точность составляет МР (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) и SUBJ (93,9%).', 'hi': 'अधिकांश प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) कार्यों के लिए प्रतिनिधित्व अधिगम एक महत्वपूर्ण मुद्दा है। अधिकांश मौजूदा प्रतिनिधित्व मॉडल या तो बहुत कम संरचना जानकारी सीखते हैं या केवल पूर्व-परिभाषित संरचनाओं पर भरोसा करते हैं, जिससे प्रदर्शन और सामान्यीकरण क्षमता में गिरावट आती है। यह पेपर पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए स्थानीय शब्दार्थ और वैश्विक संरचना दोनों प्रतिनिधित्वों को सीखने पर केंद्रित है। विस्तार से, हम पार्सर पर भरोसा किए बिना स्वचालित रूप से शब्दार्थ और संरचना प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक उपन्यास सैंडविच न्यूरल नेटवर्क (एसएनएन) का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इससे भी महत्वपूर्ण बात, शब्दार्थ और संरचना की जानकारी कॉर्पस और उदाहरण स्तर पर पाठ प्रतिनिधित्व में असमान रूप से योगदान करती है। संलयन समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम दो रणनीतियों का प्रस्ताव करते हैं: अनुकूली सीखने सैंडविच न्यूरल नेटवर्क (AL-SNN) और स्व-ध्यान सैंडविच न्यूरल नेटवर्क (SA-SNN)। पूर्व कॉर्पस स्तर पर वजन सीखता है, और उत्तरार्द्ध आगे उदाहरण स्तर पर वजन असाइन करने के लिए ध्यान तंत्र को जोड़ता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण कई पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, जिसमें भावना विश्लेषण, प्रश्न प्रकार वर्गीकरण और व्यक्तिपरकता वर्गीकरण शामिल हैं। विशेष रूप से, सटीकता एमआर (82.1%), एसएसटी -5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) और SUBJ (93.9%) हैं।', 'ga': 'Príomhcheist í foghlaim na hionadaíochta d’fhormhór na dtascanna Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha (NLP). Is beag eolas struchtúir a fhoghlaimíonn formhór na múnlaí ionadaíochta atá ann cheana féin nó braitheann siad ar struchtúir réamhshainithe, rud a fhágann díghrádú feidhmíochta agus cumas ginearálaithe. Díríonn an páipéar seo ar léiriú struchtúir shéimeantacha áitiúla agus dhomhanda a fhoghlaim le haghaidh rangú téacs. Go mion, molaimid Líonra Neural Sandwich úrscéal (SNN) chun léirithe shéimeantacha agus struchtúir a fhoghlaim go huathoibríoch gan a bheith ag brath ar pharsálaithe. Níos tábhachtaí fós, cuireann faisnéis shéimeantach agus struchtúrach go neamhchothrom le léiriú an téacs ar leibhéal an chorpais agus ar leibhéal na samplaí. Chun an fhadhb comhleá a réiteach, molaimid dhá straitéis: Líonra Néaránach Ceapaire Foghlama Oiriúnaitheach (AL-SNN) agus Líonra Neural Sandwich Self-Attention (SA-SNN). Foghlaimíonn an chéad cheann na meáchain ag leibhéal an chorpais, agus cuireann an dara ceann an mheicníocht aird le chéile tuilleadh chun na meáchain a shannadh ag leibhéal na samplaí. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go mbaineann ár gcur chuige feidhmíocht iomaíoch amach ar roinnt tascanna aicmithe téacs, lena n-áirítear anailís sentiment, aicmiú cineál ceisteanna agus aicmiú suibiachtúlachta. Go sonrach, is iad na beachtas ná MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) agus SUBJ (93.9%).', 'hu': 'A reprezentációs tanulás kulcsfontosságú kérdés a legtöbb természetes nyelvfeldolgozás (NLP) feladatában. A legtöbb meglévő reprezentációs modell vagy kevés szerkezeti információt tanul, vagy csak előre meghatározott struktúrákra támaszkodik, ami a teljesítmény romlásához és általánosítási képességhez vezet. Ez a tanulmány a szövegosztályozás helyi szemantikai és globális struktúra reprezentációinak tanulására összpontosít. Részletesen egy újszerű Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) hálózatot javasolunk, amely automatikusan megtanulja a szemantikai és strukturális reprezentációkat elemzők nélkül. Ami még fontosabb, a szemantikai és strukturális információk egyenlőtlenül járulnak hozzá a korpusz- és példányszinten történő szövegreprezentációhoz. A fúziós probléma megoldásához két stratégiát javasolunk: Adaptív Tanulási Szendvics Neurális Hálózat (AL-SNN) és Self-Attention Szendvics Neurális Hálózat (SA-SNN). Az előbbi korpusz szinten tanulja a súlyokat, az utóbbi pedig tovább kombinálja a figyelem mechanizmusát a súlyok példányszinten történő hozzárendeléséhez. Kísérleti eredmények bizonyítják, hogy megközelítésünk több szövegosztályozási feladatban is versenyképes teljesítményt ér el, beleértve az érzelmek elemzését, a kérdéstípus osztályozását és a szubjektivitás osztályozását. Pontosabban a pontosság MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) és SUBJ (93,9%).', 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση εκπροσώπησης είναι ένα βασικό ζήτημα για τις περισσότερες εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Τα περισσότερα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα αναπαράστασης είτε μαθαίνουν λίγες πληροφορίες δομής είτε απλώς βασίζονται σε προκαθορισμένες δομές, οδηγώντας σε υποβάθμιση της απόδοσης και της ικανότητας γενικοποίησης. Η παρούσα εργασία επικεντρώνεται στην εκμάθηση τόσο τοπικών σημασιολογικών όσο και παγκόσμιων αναπαραστάσεων δομής για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου. Αναλυτικά, προτείνουμε ένα νέο Νευρικό Δίκτυο Σάντουιτς (SNN) για την εκμάθηση σημασιολογικών αναπαραστάσεων και δομών αυτόματα χωρίς να βασίζεται σε αναλυτές. Πιο σημαντικό, οι σημασιολογικές και δομικές πληροφορίες συμβάλλουν άνισα στην αναπαράσταση κειμένου σε επίπεδο σώματος και παρουσίας. Για την επίλυση του προβλήματος σύντηξης, προτείνουμε δύο στρατηγικές: το Νευρικό Δίκτυο Προσαρμογής Μάθησης και το Νευρικό Δίκτυο Αυτοπροσοχής. Ο πρώτος μαθαίνει τα βάρη σε επίπεδο σώματος, και ο δεύτερος συνδυάζει περαιτέρω μηχανισμό προσοχής για να εκχωρήσει τα βάρη σε επίπεδο παρουσίας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστικές επιδόσεις σε διάφορες εργασίες ταξινόμησης κειμένου, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων, της ταξινόμησης τύπων ερωτήσεων και της ταξινόμησης υποκειμενικότητας. Συγκεκριμένα, οι ακρίβειες είναι MR (82.1%) SST-5 (50.4%) TREC (96%) και SUBJ (93.9%).', 'ka': 'Representation learning is a key issue for most Natural Language Processing (NLP) tasks. მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულების მოდელები იგივეა ცოტა სტრუქტურაციის ინფორმაცია, ან მხოლოდ განსახულებული სტრუქტურაციის შესაძლებლობად დააწყება, რომელიც გამ ეს დოკუნტი ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის მხოლოდ სიმენტიკური და გლობალური სტრუქტურის გამოსახულებების შესწავლებისთვის. განსაზღვრებით, ჩვენ პრომენტის სანეიროლური ქსელი (SNN) სწავლათ სმენტიკური და სტრუქტურის გამოსახულებები ავტომატიკურად დავიწყებთ, რომელიც არ დავიწყებთ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, სემონტიკური და სტრუქტურის ინფორმაცია ტექსტის გამოსახულებაში არასწორად დამატება. ფუზიციის პრობლემების გარეშე, ჩვენ გვეძლოთ ორი სტრატიგია: ადაპტიგური სწავლების სანეიროლური ქსელი (AL-SNN) და სანეიროლური ქსელი (SA-SNN). მხოლოდ კორპუსის დონეში გასწავლის სიმაღლე, და შემდეგ შემდეგ შემდეგ გასწავლის მექსინემის შესაძლებელად გასწავლის სიმაღლე. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა კონსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენება რამდენიმე ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის დავაკეთებულებაში, включая სენტიმენტის ანალი განსაკუთრებით, კოკრაციები არის MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) და SUBJ (93,9%).', 'it': "L'apprendimento della rappresentazione è un problema chiave per la maggior parte delle attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL). La maggior parte dei modelli di rappresentazione esistenti imparano poche informazioni sulla struttura o si basano semplicemente su strutture predefinite, portando al degrado delle prestazioni e della capacità di generalizzazione. Questo articolo si concentra sull'apprendimento sia della rappresentazione semantica locale che della struttura globale per la classificazione del testo. In dettaglio, proponiamo un nuovo Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) per imparare automaticamente le rappresentazioni semantiche e strutturali senza affidarsi ai parser. Ancora più importante, le informazioni semantiche e strutturali contribuiscono in modo disuguale alla rappresentazione del testo a livello di corpus e istanza. Per risolvere il problema della fusione, proponiamo due strategie: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) e Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Il primo impara i pesi a livello di corpo, e il secondo combina ulteriormente il meccanismo di attenzione per assegnare i pesi a livello di istanza. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro approccio raggiunge prestazioni competitive su diversi compiti di classificazione del testo, tra cui l'analisi del sentiment, la classificazione del tipo di domanda e la classificazione della soggettività. Nello specifico, le accuratezza sono MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) e SUBJ (93,9%).", 'lt': 'Mokymasis atstovauti yra pagrindinis daugumos gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo (NLP) užduočių klausimas. Dauguma esamų reprezentacinių modelių arba mokosi mažai informacijos apie struktūrą arba tik pasikliauja iš anksto apibrėžtomis struktūromis, dėl kurių sumažėja veiklos rezultatai ir atsiranda bendrųjų gebėjimų. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriama mokymuisi ir vietos semantines, ir pasaulines tekstų klasifikavimo struktūras. Išsamiai siūlome naują „Sandwich Neural Network“ (SNN), kuris automatiškai mokytųsi semantinių ir struktūrinių atstovybių, nepasitikius analizatoriais. Svarbiausia, semantinė ir struktūrinė informacija nelygiai prisideda prie teksto atstovavimo korpuso ir instancijos lygmeniu. Siekiant išspręsti branduolių sintezės problem ą, siūlome dvi strategijas: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) ir Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Pirmasis mokosi svorio korpuso lygiu, o antrasis derina dėmesio mechanizmą, skirtą svoriams priskirti instancijos lygiu. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris siekia konkurencinių rezultatų keliose teksto klasifikavimo užduotyse, įskaitant jausmų analizę, klausimų tipo klasifikaciją ir subjektyvumo klasifikaciją. Specifically, the accuracies are MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) and SUBJ (93.9%).', 'kk': 'Түзету оқытуы - Түзіндік тіл процессорының көпшілігі (NLP) тапсырмаларының негізгі мәселесі. Көпшілігі таңдау үлгілері немесе кішкентай құрылғы мәліметін үйреніп, немесе тек алдын- ала анықталған құрылғыларға тәуелді, әрекеттерді және жалпы түрлендіру Бұл қағаз мәтін классификациясы үшін жергілікті семантикалық және әлемді құрылғыларды оқытуға көмектеседі. Егжей- тегжейлі, біз сандвич невраллық желі (SNN) романы семантикалық және құрылғыларды талдаушыларға сенім бермей автоматты түрде үйрену үшін ұсынамыз. Ең маңызды, семантикалық және құрылғы мәліметі корпус және инстанциялық деңгейіндегі мәтінді көрсетуге тең көмектеседі. Біріктеу мәселесін шешу үшін екі стратегия ұсынамыз: Адаптивті оқыту сандвич нейралық желі (AL-SNN) және Self-Attention Sandwich нейралық желі (SA-SNN). Біріншісі корпус деңгейіндегі теглерді үйренеді. Соңғы теглердің деңгейінде қарау механизмін біріктіреді. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің тәсіліміздің бірнеше мәтін классификациялау тапсырмаларында, сезімдерді анализ, сұрақ түрін классификациялау және мақсаттық класси Сәйкес, дұрыстығы - MR (82, 1%), SST-5 (50, 4%), TREC (96%) және SUBJ (93, 9%).', 'mk': 'Претставно учење е клучно прашање за повеќето задачи на природното обработување јазик (NLP). Повеќето постоечки модели на претставување или научуваат малку структурни информации или само се потпираат на преддефинирани структури, што води до деградација на перформансите и генерализациските способности. Оваа вест се фокусира на учењето на локалните семантични и глобални структурни претставувања за класификација на текст. Во детали, предложуваме нова Сендвич Неурална мрежа (СНН) за автоматски да се научат семантични и структурни претставувања без да се потпираат на анализатори. Поважно е, семантичните и структурните информации нееднакво придонесуваат за претставувањето на текстот на ниво на корпус и инстанции. За да го решиме проблемот со фузијата, предложуваме две стратегии: Адаптивно учење сендвич неурална мрежа (AL-SNN) и Сендвич неурална мрежа (SA-SNN). Првиот ги научи теговите на ниво на корпус, а вториот понатаму го комбинира механизмот на внимание за доделување на теговите на ниво на инстанца. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот пристап постигнува конкурентна резултат на неколку задачи за класификација на текст, вклучително и анализа на чувствата, класификација на типот на прашања и класификација на субј Специфично, точноста е МР (82,1%), ССТ-5 (50,4%), ТРЕК (96%) и СУБЈ (93,9%).', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ (NLP) ജോലികള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കുറച്ചു അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുകയോ മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ലോക്കല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്കും ഗ്ലോബല്\u200d ഘടനയും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. വിശദീകരണത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d സാന്\u200dഡ്വിച്ച് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് (SNN) പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. പാര്\u200dസെര്\u200dസില്\u200d ആ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, സെമാന്റിക്കും ഘടനയിലുമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്റെയും ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്റെയും ലേഖന പ്രതിന ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രായോഗ്രാജ്യം നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു: ആഡാപ്റ്ററിവ് ലിന്\u200dഷന്\u200d സാന്\u200dഡ്വിച് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് നിലയിലെ തൂക്കങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നത് മുമ്പുള്ളവര്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കൂട്ടുന്ന Experimental results demonstrate that our approach achieves competitive performance on several text classification tasks, including sentiment analysis, question type classification and subjectivity classification.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, സത്യം MR (82. 1%), SST-5 (50. 4%), TREC (96%), SUBJ (93. 9%).', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran mewakili adalah isu kunci bagi kebanyakan tugas Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami (NLP). Kebanyakan model perwakilan yang wujud sama ada belajar sedikit maklumat struktur atau hanya bergantung pada struktur-struktur yang terdefinisikan dahulu, yang menyebabkan penghancuran prestasi dan kemampuan generalisasi. Kertas ini fokus pada belajar persembahan struktur semantik setempat dan global untuk klasifikasi teks. Secara terperinci, kami melamar Rangkaian Neural Sandwich (SNN) untuk belajar persembahan semantik dan struktur secara automatik tanpa bergantung pada penghurai. Yang lebih penting, maklumat semantik dan struktur menyumbangkan secara tidak sama kepada perwakilan teks pada aras corpus dan kejadian. Untuk menyelesaikan masalah fusi, kami cadangkan dua strategi: Jaringan Neural Sandwich Learning Adaptive (AL-SNN) dan Jaringan Neural Sandwich Self-Perhatian (SA-SNN). Yang pertama belajar berat badan pada aras korpus, dan yang terakhir bergabung lagi mekanisme perhatian untuk menetapkan berat pada aras kejadian. Experimental results demonstrate that our approach achieves competitive performance on several text classification tasks, including sentiment analysis, question type classification and subjectivity classification.  Secara khusus, akurat adalah MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) dan SUBJ (93.9%).', 'mt': 'It-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza huwa kwistjoni ewlenija għall-biċċa l-kbira tal-kompiti tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali (NLP). Il-biċċa l-kbira tal-mudelli ta’ rappreżentanza eżistenti jew jitgħallmu ftit informazzjoni dwar l-istruttura jew jiddependu biss fuq strutturi definiti minn qabel, li jwasslu għad-degradazzjoni tal-prestazzjoni u l-kapaċità ta’ ġeneralizzazzjoni. Dan id-dokument jiffoka fuq it-tagħlim kemm tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi lokali kif ukoll tal-istruttura globali għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test. Fid-dettall, qed nipproponu Netwerk Newrali Sandwich ġdid (SNN) biex jitgħallmu rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi u strutturali awtomatikament mingħajr ma wieħed jiddependi fuq il-parser. Aktar importanti minn hekk, l-informazzjoni semantika u strutturali tikkontribwixxi b’mod mhux ugwali għar-rappreżentanza tat-test fil-livell tal-korpus u l-istanza. Biex issolvi l-problema tal-fużjoni, qed nipproponu żewġ strateġiji: in-Netwerk Newrali tat-Tagħlim Adattiv Sandwich (AL-SNN) u n-Netwerk Newrali tat-Sandwich għall-Attenzjoni Awta (SA-SNN). Dan tal-ewwel jitgħallem il-piżijiet fil-livell tal-korpus, u dan tal-aħħar ikompli jikkombina mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni biex jassenja l-piżijiet fil-livell tal-istanza. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-approċċ tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni kompetittiva fuq diversi kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test, inklużi analiżi tas-sentimenti, klassifikazzjoni tat-tip ta’ mistoqsija u klassifikazzjoni tas-suġġettività. Speċifikament, il-preċiżjonijiet huma MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) u SUBJ (93.9%).', 'pl': 'Uczenie się reprezentacji jest kluczowym zagadnieniem dla większości zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP). Większość istniejących modeli reprezentacji albo uczy się niewielu informacji o strukturze, albo po prostu opiera się na wstępnie zdefiniowanych strukturach, co prowadzi do degradacji wydajności i zdolności uogólnienia. Niniejszy artykuł skupia się na nauce zarówno lokalnych reprezentacji semantycznych, jak i globalnych struktur klasyfikacji tekstu. Szczegółowo proponujemy nową sieć Sandwich Neural Network (SNN), która umożliwia automatyczne uczenie się semantycznych i strukturalnych reprezentacji bez polegania na parserach. Co ważniejsze, informacje semantyczne i strukturalne nierówno przyczyniają się do reprezentacji tekstu na poziomie korpusu i instancji. Aby rozwiązać problem fuzji, proponujemy dwie strategie: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) i Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Pierwszy uczy się wag na poziomie ciała, a drugi dodatkowo łączy mechanizm uwagi, aby przypisać wagi na poziomie instancji. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasze podejście osiąga konkurencyjność w kilku zadaniach klasyfikacji tekstów, w tym analizy sentymentów, klasyfikacji typu pytania i klasyfikacji podmiotowości. W szczególności dokładność to MR (82,1%) SST-5 (50,4%) TREC (96%) i SUBJ (93,9%).', 'no': 'Representasjonslæring er ein nøkkelproblem for dei fleste naturlege språkprosesseringar (NLP). Dei fleste eksisterande representasjonsmodular enten lærer lite strukturinformasjon eller bare rely på fordefinerte strukturar, som fører til degradasjon av funksjonen og generellisering. Denne papiret fokuserer på å læra både lokale semantiske og globale strukturrepresentasjonar for tekstklassifikasjon. I detalj foreslår vi ein novel Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) for å lære semantiske og strukturrepresentasjonar automatisk utan å tilbakekalla på tolkarar. Dette er viktigere at semantisk og strukturinformasjon bidrar ulik til tekstrepresentasjonen på korpus og instansnivå. For å løse fusjonsprobleten, foreslår vi to strategier: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) og Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Den tidlegare lærer vekten på korpusnivået, og den siste kombinerer oppmerksmekanismen for å tilordna vektene på eksempelnivå. Eksperimentale resultat viser at tilnærminga vårt gjer konkurentivt utvikling på fleire tekstklassifikasjonsprogrammer, inkludert sentimentanalyser, klassifikasjon av spørsmåltypen og subjektivklassifikasjon. Spesifikke er akkurasjonane MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) og SUBJ (93,9%).', 'ro': 'Învățarea reprezentării este o problemă cheie pentru majoritatea sarcinilor de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL). Majoritatea modelelor de reprezentare existente fie învață puține informații despre structură, fie se bazează doar pe structuri predefinite, ducând la degradarea performanței și capacității de generalizare. Această lucrare se concentrează pe învățarea atât a reprezentărilor semantice locale, cât și a structurii globale pentru clasificarea textelor. În detaliu, propunem o nouă rețea neurală Sandwich (SNN) pentru a învăța automat reprezentările semantice și structurale fără a se baza pe parsere. Mai important, informațiile semantice și structurale contribuie inegal la reprezentarea textului la nivel de corpus și instanță. Pentru a rezolva problema fuziunii, propunem doua strategii: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) si Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Primul învață greutățile la nivel de corp, iar cel de-al doilea combină în continuare mecanismul de atenție pentru a atribui greutățile la nivel de instanță. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că abordarea noastră atinge performanțe competitive în mai multe sarcini de clasificare a textelor, inclusiv analiza sentimentului, clasificarea tipului de întrebări și clasificarea subiectivității. Precizia este MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) și SUBJ (93,9%).', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл Процессорын (NLP) ажлын түлхүүр асуудал юм. Ихэнх оршиж байгаа загварууд нь бага бүтэц мэдээллийг сурах эсвэл зүгээр л анхны тодорхойлогдсон бүтэц дээр хамаарч, үйл ажиллагааны болон ерөнхийлөгч чадварыг унасан. Энэ цаас нь ертөнцийн семантик болон ертөнцийн бүтэц бүтээгдэхүүний хуваалтын тухай анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Тодорхой хэлбэрээр бид Сандвич сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (SNN) автоматаар суралцахын тулд шинэ сандвич сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээг судлах хэрэгтэй. Хамгийн чухал нь, семантик болон бүтэц мэдээлэл корпус болон жишээ хэмжээний текст илэрхийлэлтэй адилхан байдаг. Бид хоёр стратегийг шийдэхийн тулд адаптийн суралцах Сандвич сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (AL-SNN) болон Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN) суралцах боломжтой. Өмнөх нь корпус түвшинд жингийг суралцаж, дараагийн нь анхаарлын механизмийг жингийн түвшинд тайлбарлах. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь хэд хэдэн текст хуваалтын ажиллагаанд өрсөлдөг үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж чадна гэдгийг харуулдаг. Ялангуяа тодорхой нь MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) болон SUBJ (93.9%).', 'sr': 'Učenje predstavljanja je ključni problem za većinu zadataka prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP). Većina postojećih modela zastupanja ili nauči malu strukturnu informaciju ili se oslanjaju na preddefinirane strukture, što vodi do degradacije izvođenja i sposobnosti generalizacije. Ovaj papir se fokusira na učenje lokalnih semantičkih i globalnih predstavljanja strukture za klasifikaciju teksta. Detaljno predlažemo novu Sendvičnu Neuralnu mrežu (SNN) da nauči semantičke i strukturne predstave automatski bez oslanjanja na parsere. Više važnije, semantičke i strukturne informacije nepravedno doprinose zastupanju teksta na razini korpusa i primjera. Da bi riješili problem fuzije, predlažemo dve strategije: adaptivna sendvična nervna mreža (AL-SNN) i sendvična nervna mreža (SA-SNN). Bivši uče težinu na nivou korpusa, a poslednji dodatno kombinira mehanizam pažnje za dodavanje težine na primjer nivou. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postigne konkurentne funkcije na nekoliko zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta, uključujući analizu sentimenta, klasifikaciju tipa pitanja i klasifikaciju subjektivnosti. Posebno, preciznost su MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) i SUBJ (93,9%).', 'so': "Waxbarashada u baaraandegistu waa arrin muhiim ah oo u baaraandegista afka asalka ah (NLP). Tusaalada u jeedista ee aad u badan waxay baraan macluumaad yar oo dhismaha dhismaha ama waxay ku tiirsan yihiin dhismaha hore oo la yaqaan, taasoo sababto ku hoosaystirada sameynta iyo awoodda dhalashada. Warqaddaas waxay ku hageysaa barashada dhismaha caalamiga ah iyo noocyada qoraalka. In detail, we propose a novel Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) to learn semantic and structure representations automatically without relying on parsers.  Inta ugu muhiimsan, macluumaadka kooxaha iyo dhismaha waxaa si sinnaan looga dhigaa macluumaadka qoraalka ee korpuska iyo tusaale ahaan. Si aan u xallino dhibaatada fuulashada, waxaan soo jeedaynaa laba strategiyo: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) iyo Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Qofkii hore wuxuu baran karaa miisaanka heerka qoyska, markaasna waxaa kale oo la isku dari karaa meymisyada daryeelka si ay u qaybsato miisaanka. Mataarada imtixaanka waxay muujiyaan in qaabilaadeenna uu ku guulaysto waxqabadyo iskutar ah oo ku saabsan shaqooyin kala duduwan qoraal ah, kuwaas oo ah baaritaanka fikrada, fasaxa su'aalaha iyo fasaxa waxyaabaha ku saabsan. Si gaar ah, saxdaadu waa MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) iyo SUBJ (93.9%).", 'sv': 'Representationsinl채rning 채r en nyckelfr책ga f철r de flesta Natural Language Processing (NLP) uppgifter. De flesta befintliga representationsmodeller l채r sig antingen lite strukturinformation eller bara f철rlitar sig p책 f철rdefinierade strukturer, vilket leder till f철rs채mring av prestanda och generaliseringsf철rm책ga. Denna uppsats fokuserar p책 att l채ra sig b책de lokala semantiska och globala strukturrepresentationer f철r textklassificering. I detalj f철resl책r vi ett nytt Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) f철r att l채ra sig semantiska och strukturella representationer automatiskt utan att f철rlita sig p책 tolkare. 횆nnu viktigare 채r att semantisk och strukturell information bidrar oj채mnt till textrepresentationen p책 korpus- och instansniv책. F철r att l철sa fusionsproblemet f철resl책r vi tv책 strategier: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) och Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Den f철rstn채mnda l채r sig vikterna p책 corpusniv책, och den senare kombinerar ytterligare uppm채rksamhetsmekanism f철r att tilldela vikterna p책 instansniv책. Experimentella resultat visar att v책rt tillv채gag책ngss채tt uppn책r konkurrenskraftiga resultat inom flera textklassificeringsuppgifter, inklusive sentimentalanalys, fr책getypklassificering och subjektivitetsklassificering. Specifikt 채r noggrannheterna MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) och SUBJ (93,9%).', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுகள் (NLP) செயல்களுக்கு முக்கிய பிரச்சனையாகும். இருக்கும் பெரும்பாலான பாதிப்பு மாதிரிகள் சிறிய கட்டுப்பாட்டு தகவலை கற்றுக் கொள்ளவும் அல்லது முன் வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு இந்த காகிதத்தில் உள்ளார்ந்த அமைப்பு மற்றும் உலக அமைப்பு உரை வகைப்பிற்கான பகிர்ந்திரங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்வத விவரமாக, நாம் ஒரு புதிய சான்ட்விச் நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல் (SNN) பார்சர்கள் மீது நம்பிக்கை இல்லாமல் அமைப்புகளை தானாகவே கற்றுக் முக்கியமானது, அரைப்புள்ளி மற்றும் அமைப்பு தகவல்கள் கோர்புஸ் மற்றும் நிகழ்வு நிலையில் உரை பிரதிநிர்வாகத்திற்கு  வெளியேற்றும் பிரச்சனையை தீர்க்க, நாம் இரண்டு திட்டங்களை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம்: ஏப்பிடிவ் சான்ட்விச் நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல் (AL- SNN) மற்றும் ச முன்னாள் கோர்பாஸ் நிலையில் எடைகளை கற்றுக் கொண்டிருக்கிறது, பின்னர் மேலும் கவனத்தை கூட்டும் முறையில் எடைகளை எடு Experimental results demonstrate that our approach achieves competitive performance on several text classification tasks, including sentiment analysis, question type classification and subjectivity classification.  குறிப்பிட்டு, சரியான MR (82. 1%), SST-5 (50. 4%), TREC (96%) மற்றும் SUBJ (93. 9%).', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ප්\u200dරාකෘතික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (NLP) වැඩ කරන වැඩේ ව ගොඩක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය මොඩල් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුංචි ස්ථාපනය තොරතුරු නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සහ සාමා මේ පැත්තේ ස්ථානික සෙමැන්ටික් සහ ලෝකික සංවිධානය සඳහා පාළුවන් විවිධානය සඳහා ඉගෙන ග විස්තර වලින්, අපි සැන්ඩ්විච් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය (SNN) කියලා සැමැන්ටික් සහ සංස්ථාපනය ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විස්තරයක්  වැදගත් වැදගත්, සෙමාන්ටික් සහ සංවිධානය තොරතුරු අනුවෙන් පාළුවට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය සහ උදාහරණ ස්ථ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විසඳන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා: සැන්ඩ්විච් න්\u200dයූරල ජාලය (AL-SNN) සහ සෙල්ෆ් අත්සන්ධ සැන මුලින් කොර්පුස් ස්ථානයේ බර ප්\u200dරමාණය ඉගෙන ගන්නවා, ඒ වගේම අන්තිම අවස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණය විශේෂණය, ප්\u200dරශ විශේෂයෙන්ම, සම්පූර්ණයේ MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TRECC (96%) සහ SUBJ (93.9%).', 'ur': 'Representation learning is a key issue for most Natural Language Processing (NLP) tasks. بہت سے موجود نمونڈل یا تھوڑی ساختاری معلومات سیکھتے ہیں یا صرف پہلے مقرر کردہ ساختاروں پر اعتماد کرتے ہیں، جو عملکرد اور عمومی ساختاری قابلیت کے ذریعہ ذلیل کرتی ہیں. This paper focuses on learning both local semantic and global structure representations for text classification. ہم ایک نوم سنڈویچ نیورال نیٹورک (SNN) کی پیغام دیتے ہیں کہ سیمانٹیکی اور ساختاری نمایشگروں کو سیکھ سکیں بغیر پارس پر اعتماد نہ کریں۔ زیادہ اہم ہے، سیمانٹی اور ساختاری معلومات کی غیر برابری کے ساتھ کرپوس اور مثال سطح کے متعلق متعلق ہے. ہم دو استراتژیکوں کو حل کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں: اڈپٹیٹ سیکھنے سنڈویچ نیورال نیورال نیورک (AL-SNN) اور Self-Attention سنڈویچ نیورل نیورل نیورک (SA-SNN). پہلے لوگوں نے جسم کا وزن سکھایا ہے، اور آخر نے اپنا ذهن کا مکانیسم جمع کیا ہے کہ وزن کے ذریعہ برابر مقرر کریں. Experimental results demonstrate that our approach achieves competitive performance on several text classification tasks, including sentiment analysis, question type classification and subjectivity classification. خاص طور پر، دقیقات MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) اور SUBJ (93.9%) ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Ko'pchilik mavjud tashkilotlar modellari esa yaratilgan murakkablar maʼlumotini o'rganadi yoki faqat faqat aniqlangan structurlarga ishlatadi, bajarish va generaliz imkoniyatini kamaytirish mumkin. Ushbu qogʻoz lokal semantik va global tuzuvni matn darajasini o'rganish uchun foydalanadi. Tafsilotni tasavvur qilamiz, bir novel Sandwich Neural Tarmoq (SNN) davomida, semantik va strukturalar tashkilotlarini avtomatik o'rganish uchun o'rganamiz. @ info Қўнғиниш мушкилини ҳал этиш учун, биз икки strategiya: Adaptiv Sandwich Neural Tarmoq (AL-SNN) ва Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Tarmoq (SA-SNN). Keyingi avval qo'l darajadagi vektlarni o'rganadi, keyin yana boshqacha o'zgarish mekanikani birlashtirish mumkin. Tajriba natijalari ko'rsatadi, bizning usuli bir necha matn classification vazifalarda rivojlanish bajarishimizni ko'rsatadi. Aks holda, hissiyotni analyzer, savol turligi va taʼminlik darajasini bajaradi. Muddati, tasdiqlar MR (82. 1%), SST-5 (50. 4%), TREC (96%) ва SUBJ (93. 9%).", 'vi': 'Truyền trình là vấn đề then chốt cho phần lớn các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Hầu hết các mô hình đại diện hiện tại hoặc học ít thông tin cấu trúc hoặc chỉ dựa vào các cấu trúc được xác định sẵn, dẫn đến thoái hóa khả năng hiệu suất và quy mô. Tập trung vào việc học các biểu tượng về cấu trúc văn bản ở địa phương và toàn cầu. Trong chi tiết, chúng tôi đề xuất một tác phẩm làm quen của mạng thần kinh Sandwich (SNN) để học các biểu tượng về ngữ pháp và cấu trúc tự động mà không dựa vào các phân viên. Điều quan trọng hơn, thông tin về mặt ngữ nghĩa và cấu trúc không giống nhau đóng góp phần văn bản ở lĩnh vực tập thể và trường hợp. Để giải quyết vấn đề về nhiệt hạch, chúng tôi đề xuất hai chiến lược: Adhướng Học Sandwich Neural Network (al-SNN) và Self Chú ý Sandwich Neual Network (S-SNN). Đầu tiên học về tạ lượng ở mức tập thể, và sau đó kết hợp các cơ chế tập trung để xác định các tạ tạ ở mức thí dụ. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta đạt được hiệu quả cạnh tranh trong nhiều nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản, bao gồm phân tích cảm xúc, phân loại câu hỏi và phân tích tính người. Chính xác xác là RM (82.1=), SST-5 (50.4=), TREC (96=) và subJ (93.9=).', 'nl': 'Vertegenwoordiging leren is een belangrijk probleem voor de meeste Natural Language Processing (NLP)-taken. De meeste bestaande representatiemodellen leren weinig structuurinformatie of vertrouwen gewoon op vooraf gedefinieerde structuren, wat leidt tot aantasting van prestaties en generalisatiecapaciteit. Dit artikel richt zich op het leren van zowel lokale semantische als globale structuren representaties voor tekstclassificatie. In detail stellen we een nieuw Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) voor om semantische en structurele representaties automatisch te leren zonder te vertrouwen op parsers. Belangrijker nog is dat semantische en structurele informatie ongelijk bijdragen aan de tekstweergave op corpus- en instanceniveau. Om het fusieprobleem op te lossen, stellen we twee strategieën voor: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) en Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). De eerste leert de gewichten op corpusniveau, en de laatste combineert verder aandacht mechanisme om de gewichten toe te wijzen op instanceniveau. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak concurrerende prestaties behaalt bij verschillende tekstclassificatietaken, waaronder sentimentanalyse, vraagtype classificatie en subjectiviteitsclassificatie. In het bijzonder zijn de nauwkeurigheiden MR (82,1%) SST-5 (50,4%) TREC (96%) en SUBJ (93,9%).', 'da': 'Repræsentationslæring er et centralt spørgsmål for de fleste Natural Language Processing (NLP) opgaver. De fleste eksisterende repræsentationsmodeller lærer enten lidt strukturinformation eller bare er afhængige af prædefinerede strukturer, hvilket fører til nedbrydning af ydeevne og generaliseringsevne. Denne artikel fokuserer på at lære både lokale semantiske og globale strukturrepræsentationer for tekstklassifikation. I detaljer foreslår vi et nyt Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) til at lære semantiske og strukturelle repræsentationer automatisk uden at stole på parsere. Endnu vigtigere bidrager semantisk og strukturel information ulige til tekstrepræsentationen på korpus- og instansniveau. For at løse fusionsproblemet foreslår vi to strategier: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) og Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Førstnævnte lærer vægtene på korpusniveau, og sidstnævnte kombinerer yderligere opmærksomhedsmekanisme til at tildele vægtene på instansniveau. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater på flere tekstklassifikationsopgaver, herunder sentimentalanalyse, spørgsmålstypeklassifikation og subjektivitetsklassifikation. Specielt er nøjagtighederne MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) og SUBJ (93,9%).', 'hr': 'Učenje predstavljanja je ključni problem za većinu zadataka prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP). Većina postojećih modela zastupanja ili nauči malu strukturnu informaciju ili se oslanjaju na preddefinirane strukture, što vodi do degradacije učinkovitosti i sposobnosti generalizacije. Ovaj papir se fokusira na učenje lokalnih semantičkih i globalnih predstavljanja strukture za klasifikaciju teksta. Detaljno predlažemo novu Sendvičnu Neuralnu mrežu (SNN) naučiti semantičke i strukturne predstave automatski bez oslanjanja na parsere. Što je važnije, semantičke i strukturne informacije ne jednako doprinose zastupanju teksta na razini korpusa i primjera. Za rješavanje problema sa fuzijom predlažemo dvije strategije: adaptivno učenje sendviča Neuralne mreže (AL-SNN) i Neuralne mreže Sandviča (SA-SNN). Bivši uče težinu na razini korpusa, a posljednji dodatno kombinira mehanizam pažnje za određivanje težine na primjernoj razini. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postigne konkurentne funkcije na nekoliko zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta, uključujući analizu osjećaja, klasifikaciju tipa pitanja i klasifikaciju subjektivnosti. Posebno, preciznosti su MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) i SUBJ (93,9%).', 'bg': 'Ученето на представителство е ключов въпрос за повечето задачи по обработка на естествения език (НЛП). Повечето съществуващи модели на представяне или научават малко структурна информация или просто разчитат на предварително определени структури, което води до влошаване на производителността и обобщаване на способността. Тази статия се фокусира върху изучаването както на местни семантични, така и на глобални структурни представи за класификация на текста. В детайли предлагаме нова Сандвич неврална мрежа (СНН), за да научите семантични и структурни изображения автоматично, без да разчитате на анализатори. По-важното е, че семантичната и структурната информация допринасят неравномерно за представянето на текста на ниво корпус и инстанция. За решаване на проблема с синтез предлагаме две стратегии: Адаптивно учене Сандвич неврална мрежа (АЛ-СНН) и Себевнимание Сандвич неврална мрежа (АЗ-СНН). Първият научава тежестите на ниво корпус, а вторият допълнително комбинира механизъм за внимание, за да присвои тежестите на ниво инстанция. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият подход постига конкурентни резултати по няколко задачи за класификация на текста, включително анализ на сентименталността, класификация на типа въпроси и класификация на субективността. По-конкретно, точките са MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) и SUBJ (93.9%).', 'de': 'Repräsentationslernen ist ein Schlüsselthema für die meisten Aufgaben der Natural Language Processing (NLP). Die meisten vorhandenen Repräsentationsmodelle lernen entweder wenig Strukturinformationen oder verlassen sich einfach auf vordefinierte Strukturen, was zu einer Verschlechterung der Leistung und Generalisierungsfähigkeit führt. Dieser Beitrag konzentriert sich auf das Erlernen lokaler semantischer und globaler Strukturrepräsentationen für die Textklassifizierung. Im Detail schlagen wir ein neuartiges Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) vor, um semantische und strukturelle Repräsentationen automatisch zu erlernen, ohne auf Parser angewiesen zu sein. Noch wichtiger ist, dass semantische und strukturelle Informationen ungleich zur Textdarstellung auf Korpus- und Instanzebene beitragen. Um das Fusionsproblem zu lösen, schlagen wir zwei Strategien vor: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) und Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Ersteres lernt die Gewichte auf Korpusebene und letzteres kombiniert den Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus, um die Gewichte auf Instanzebene zuzuweisen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Ansatz bei mehreren Textklassifizierungsaufgaben wettbewerbsfähig ist, einschließlich Stimmungsanalyse, Fragetypklassifizierung und Subjektivitätsklassifizierung. Konkret sind die Genauigkeiten MR (82,1%) SST-5 (50,4%) TREC (96%) und SUBJ (93,9%).', 'id': 'Belajar mewakili adalah masalah kunci bagi kebanyakan tugas Proses Bahasa Alami (NLP). Kebanyakan model representation yang ada sama ada belajar sedikit informasi struktur atau hanya bergantung pada struktur predefinisi, yang menyebabkan degradasi prestasi dan kemampuan generalisasi. Kertas ini fokus pada belajar representation struktur semantis lokal dan global untuk klasifikasi teks. Dalam rincian, kami mengusulkan sebuah Novel Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) untuk belajar representation semantis dan struktur secara otomatis tanpa bergantung pada parser. Yang lebih penting, informasi semantis dan struktur berkontribusi secara tidak seimbang ke representation teks di tingkat corpus dan instans. Untuk memecahkan masalah fusi, kami mengusulkan dua strategi: Jaringan Neural Sandwich Belajar Adaptif (AL-SNN) dan Jaringan Neural Sandwich (SA-SNN). Yang pertama mempelajari berat badan pada tingkat korpus, dan yang terakhir bergabung lagi mekanisme perhatian untuk mengatur berat pada tingkat contoh. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita mencapai prestasi kompetitif pada beberapa tugas klasifikasi teks, termasuk analisis sentimen, klasifikasi tipe pertanyaan dan klasifikasi subjektif. Secara spesifik, akurasi adalah MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) dan SUBJ (93,9%).', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa maoni ni suala muhimu kwa kazi nyingi za Utafiti wa lugha za asili (NLP). Mifano mingi ya uwakilizaji yanayopo, ama hujifunza taarifa ndogo ya miundombinu au hutegemea miundombinu yaliyoelezwa kabla, na yanasababisha kupunguza uwezo wa utendaji na uzalishaji. This paper focuses on learning both local semantic and global structure representations for text classification.  Kwa kina, tunapendekeza mtandao wa kijeshi wa Sandwich Neural (SNN) kujifunza uwakilishi wa kimapenzi na miundombinu kwa wenyewe bila kutegemea mabunge. Kimuhimu zaidi, taarifa za kimapenzi na ujenzi zinachangia kwa uwakilishi wa maandishi katika ngazi za makampuni na matumizi. Ili kutatua tatizo la kukimbilia, tunapendekeza mbinu mbili: Mtandao wa Kielimu wa Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) na Mtandao wa Huduma wa Sandwich Neural (SA-SNN). Wazazi wa zamani wanajifunza mizigo katika ngazi ya makampuni, na mwisho wa pili wanaunganisha mfumo wa kutoa mizani kwa kiwango cha mfano. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu hupata ufanisi wa ushindani katika kazi kadhaa za kutangaza maandishi, ikiwa ni pamoja na uchambuzi wa hisia, usambazaji wa aina ya maswali na usambazaji wa madai. Kwa hakika, uhakika ni MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) na SUBJ (93.9%).', 'ko': '표징 학습은 대부분의 자연 언어 처리(NLP) 임무의 관건이다.기존의 대부분은 모델이 매우 적은 구조 정보를 배우거나 미리 정의된 구조에만 의존하여 성능과 범용 능력을 떨어뜨린다는 것을 나타낸다.본고는 주로 텍스트 분류 중의 국부적 의미와 전체적인 구조 표시를 연구한다.상세히 말하면 해석기에 의존하지 않고 의미와 구조적 표시를 자동으로 학습할 수 있는 새로운 샌드위치 신경망(SNN)을 제시했다.더욱 중요한 것은 의미와 구조 정보가 어료 라이브러리와 실례 차원에서 텍스트에 대한 기여가 불평등하다는 것이다.융합 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 학습 샌드위치 신경 네트워크(AL-SNN)와 샌드위치 신경 네트워크(SA-SNN)에 적응하는 두 가지 전략을 제시했다.전자는 어료 라이브러리급에서 학습권을 중시하고 후자는 주의 메커니즘을 결합시켜 실례급에서 분배권을 중시한다.실험 결과에 따르면 이 방법은 감정 분석, 문제 유형 분류와 주관적 분류 등 여러 텍스트 분류 임무에서 비교적 좋은 성능을 얻었다.구체적으로 정확도는 MR(82.1%), SST-5(50.4%), TREC(96%), SUBJ(93.9%)였다.', 'fa': 'یادگیری معرفی یک مسئله کلیدی برای بیشتر کارهای پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) است. بیشترین مدلهای نمایش موجود یا اطلاعات ساختار کوچک یاد می گیرند یا فقط بر ساختارهای پیش تعریف اعتماد می کنند که به نابود کردن توانایی عملکرد و عمومی تغییر می گیرند. این کاغذ تمرکز بر یادگیری از ساختاری محلی و ساختاری جهانی برای ترکیب متن است. در جزئیات، ما یک شبکه عصبی سندویچ (SNN) را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا نمایش\u200cهای سندویچ و ساختاری خود را بدون اعتماد به بازرسان یاد بگیرد. مهمتر از این، اطلاعات سیمانتیک و ساختاری به طور نابرابر به نمایش متن در سطح قالب و نمونه کمک می کنند. برای حل مشکل فشار، دو استراتژی پیشنهاد می کنیم: شبکه عصبی ساندویچ یادگیری adaptive Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) و شبکه عصبی سندویچ خودتوجه (SA-SNN). اولین وزن در سطح جسد یاد می\u200cگیرد و آخرین مکانیسم توجه را برای تعیین وزن در سطح مثال ترکیب می\u200cکند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که دسترسی ما اجرای مسابقه\u200cای را در چندین مسابقه\u200cهای مختصات متن می\u200cرساند، شامل تحلیل احساسات، مختصات نوع سوال و مختصات مسابقه\u200cای است. دقیقاً دقیقات MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) و SUBJ (93.9%) هستند.', 'tr': 'Taýdaly diller işlemek üçin esasy meseledir. Iň köp bar temsil nusgalary ýa kiçi struktur maglumaty öwrenip, ýöne diňe öň-belirlenen strukturlaryň üstine ynanýar, performans we umumy bejermek ukyplaryny azaltar. Bu kagyz hem ýerleri semantik hem dünýä gurşawyň metin klasifikasyýasy üçin öwrenmegi üçin üns berýär. Biz sendwich Neural Network (SNN) semantik we strukturalary parsçylara güýçlenýän bir romany öwrenmegi teklip edip görýäris. Daha önemlisi, semantik ve struktur bilgileri korpus we örnek seviyesindeki metin temsiline deňsiz kömekleşir. Birleşik problemini çözmek için, iki strateji teklif ediyoruz: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) ve Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Öňki köpüs derejesinde ağırlygy öwrenýär, iň soňki daşlyklary örnek derejesinde çykarmak üçin üns mekanizmasyny birleşýär. Deneysel neticeleri bizim yaklaşımız birnäçe metin klasifikasyonunda rekabetçi etkinlik etkinliğini gösteriyor.duygusal analizi, soru türleri klasifikasyon we suçluklar klasifikasyonu dahil. Adatça, dogry MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) we SUBJ (93.9%).', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች ብዙዎቹ የአካባቢው ምሳሌዎች የሥርዓት መረጃዎችን ማሩ ወይም በሙሉ ግንኙነት እና ማቀናቀል ኃይልን ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ This paper focuses on learning both local semantic and global structure representations for text classification.  በጠቅላላ፣ የሳንድዌክ ኔural መረብ (SNN) የፓርራር ሳትታመን የsemantic እና የመሠረት መልዕክቶች በራስነት ለመማር እናዘጋጅታለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የsemantic እና የመሠረተ መረጃዎች የጽሑፍ መልዕክት በቆርፓስ እና ለምሳሌ ደረጃዎች ላይ ያልተፈቀደ ነው፡፡ የመስጠት ጉዳይ ለመፍታት፣ ሁለት strategies: አዳaptive ትምህርት ሳንድዌክ ኔural መረብ (AL-SNN) እና የራሳቸውን ትዕዛዝ ሳንድዌክ ኔural መረብ (SA-SNN)፡ የቀድሞው ሚዛንን በቆርፓስ ደረጃዎች ይማራል፥ የኋለኛውም ሚዛንን በመስመር ላይ ያቆማል፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎች የጽሑፍ ክፍተቶችን፣ አስተያየት አስተያየት፣ ጥያቄ ዓይነት መግለጫ እና ታዋቂነትን እና ትክክለኛ ትክክል ማድረግ እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡ እርግጠኛውም MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) እና SUBJ (93.9%).', 'af': "Voorstelling leer is 'n sleutel probleem vir mees Natuurlike Taal Prosessering (NLP) taak. Die mees bestaande voorstelling modele leer of leer klein struktuur inligting of net vertrou op voorafgedefinieerde strukture, wat lei na verderering van prestasie en generellisering kapasiteit. Hierdie papier fokus op die leer van albei plaaslike semantiese en globale struktuur voorstellings vir teks klasifikasie. In detail, ons voorstel 'n roman Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) om semantiese en struktuur voorstellings outomaties te leer sonder om te vertrou op verwerkers. Nog belangrik, semantiese en struktuurlike inligting bydra ongelukkig aan die teks voorstelling by korpus en voorbeeld vlak. Om die fusion probleme te los, voorstel ons twee strategies: Adaptief Leer Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) en Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Die vorige leer die gewigte op korpusvlak, en die laaste verder kombinieer aandag mekanisme om die gewigte op voorbeeld vlak te toewys. Eksperimentele resultate bevestig dat ons toegang rekenaktiewe prestasie bereik op verskeie teks klassifikasie taak, insluitend sentimentanalisie, vraagtipe klassifikasie en subjektiviteit klassifikasie. Spesifieke is die akkurasies MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) en SubJ (93.9%).", 'sq': 'Përfaqësuesi mësimi është një çështje kyçe për shumicën e detyrave të Procesimit të Gjuhave Natyrore (NLP). Shumica e modeleve ekzistuese të përfaqësimit ose mësojnë pak informacion strukturore ose vetëm mbështeten në struktura të parapërcaktuara, që çojnë në degradim të performancës dhe aftësisë të gjeneralizimit. Ky dokument përqëndrohet në mësimin e përfaqësimeve të strukturës lokale dhe të strukturës globale për klasifikimin e tekstit. Në hollësi, propozojmë një rrjet të ri neurol sanduiç (SNN) për të mësuar përfaqësime semantike dhe strukturore automatikisht pa u mbështetur në analizuesit. Më e rëndësishme, informacioni semantik dhe strukturor kontribuon në mënyrë të pabarazishme në përfaqësimin e tekstit në nivelin e korpusit dhe instancave. Për të zgjidhur problemin e fuzionit, propozojmë dy strategji: Rrjeti Neural i Sendviçit të Mësimit Adaptiv (AL-SNN) dhe Rrjeti Neural i Sendviçit të Vetëvëmendjes (SA-SNN). E para mëson peshat në nivelin e korpusit dhe e fundit kombinon më tej mekanizmin e vëmendjes për të caktuar peshat në nivelin e rastit. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja jonë arrin performancë konkurruese në disa detyra klasifikuese teksti, duke përfshirë analizën e ndjenjave, klasifikimin e llojit të pyetjeve dhe klasifikimin e subjektivitetit. Specifikisht, saktësitë janë MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) dhe SUBJ (93.9%).', 'hy': "Պատասխանատվության ուսումնասիրությունը գլխավոր խնդիր է բնական լեզվի վերլուծության (ՆԼՊ) խնդիրների մեծամասնության համար: Գոյություն ունեցող ներկայացման մոդելների մեծամասնությունը կամ փոքր տեղեկատվություն է սովորում կառուցվածքի վրա, կամ պարզապես կախված է նախասահմանափակ կառուցվածքներից, ինչը հանգեցնում է արդյունքների դեգրադացիայի Այս աշխատանքը կենտրոնանում է տեքստի դասակարգման տեղական և գլոբալ կառուցվածքի ներկայացումների ուսումնասիրության վրա: Մասնավորապես, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր սենդվիչյան նյարդային ցանց (ՍՆՆ), որպեսզի ինքնաբերաբար սովորենք սեմանտիկ և կառուցվածքային ներկայացումներ առանց հույս տանելու վերլուծումներին: Ամենակարևորը, սեմանտիկ և կառուցվածքային ինֆորմացիան անհավասար ներդրում է կորպուսի և օրինակի տեքստի ներկայացումը: Որպեսզի լուծենք ֆուզիայի խնդիրը, մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու ռազմավարություն' Ադապտիվ սովորելու սենդվիչյան նյարդային ցանց (Ալ-ՍՆ) և ինքնաուշադրություն դարձնելու սենդվիչյան նյարդային ցանց (ՍԱ-ՍՆ). Առաջինը սովորում է մարմնի մակարդակի զանգվածները, իսկ վերջինը համադրում է ուշադրության մեխանիզմը, որպեսզի դասավորի զանգվածները օրինակի մակարդակի վրա: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը համընկնում է տեքստի դասակարգման որոշ խնդիրների հետ, ներառյալ զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը, հարցերի տիպի դասակարգման և ենթադրական դասակարգման: Մասնավորապես, ճշգրտությունը ՄՌ (82.1), ՍՍԹ-5 (50.4), ԹՌԵԿ (96) և ՍՈԲՋ (93.9)։", 'ca': "L'aprenentatge de representació és un tema clau per a la majoria de les tasques de processament de llenguatges naturals (NLP). La majoria dels models de representació existents o aprenen poca informació sobre l'estructura, o només confien en estructures predefinides, que porten a la degradació del rendiment i la capacitat de generalització. Aquest paper es centra en aprendre representacions semàntiques locals i globals per a classificar textos. En detall, proposem una nova Rede Neural Sandwich (SNN) per aprendre representacions semàntiques i estructurals automàticament sense confiar en els analistes. El més important és que la informació semàntica i estructural contribueix desigualment a la representació del text a nivell de corpus i instancies. Per resoldre el problema de la fusió, proposem dues estratègies: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) i Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). L'primer aprenen els pes a nivell del cos, i l'altre combina més el mecanisme d'atenció per assenyar els pes a nivell instantànic. Els resultats experimentals demostren que el nostre enfocament aconsegueix un rendiment competitiu en diverses tasques de classificació de textos, incloent l'anàlisi del sentiment, la classificació del tipus de qüestió i la classificació de subjectivitat. Concretament, les precisions són MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) i SUBJ (93,9%).", 'az': 'Təşkil öyrənməsi təbiətli dil işləməsi (NLP) işlərinin çoxu üçün anahtar meselesidir. Ən çox mövcuddur göstərici modellər ya az struktur məlumatlarını öyrənir, ya da ancaq əvvəlcə tanımlanmış yapılara təvəkkül edirlər, performans və generalizasyon qabiliyyətinin degradasyona yol açar. Bu kağıt yerli semantik və qlobal quruluş tərzlərini mətn klasifikasyonu öyrənməyə odaqlanır. Biz yeni Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) ilə semantik və struktur göstəricilərini analizacılara güvənilmədən avtomatik öyrənməyə təklif edirik. Daha çox mövcuddur, semantik və struktur məlumatları corpus və instal səviyyəsindəki mətn göstəricisinə eyni olaraq kömək edir. Fazyon problemini çəkmək üçün iki strateji təklif edirik: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) və Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Əvvəlkilər corpus seviyyətində ağırlıqları öyrənir, sonra da ağırlıqları nümunə seviyyətində təyin etmək üçün gözləmə mehānismini birləşdirir. Experimental sonuçlarımız təsirimiz bəzi metin klasifikasiyası işlərində müqayisədi performansı başa çatdığını göstərir, hiss analizi, sual növü klasifikasyonu və subjektiv klasifikasyonu da dahil edər. Şübhəsiz ki, doğruluqlar MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) və SUBJ (93.9%).', 'bn': 'প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা বেশীরভাগ স্বাভাবিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া (NLP) কাজের জন্য একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিষয়। Most existing representation models either learn little structure information or just rely on pre-defined structures, leading to degradation of performance and generalization capability.  এই পত্রিকাটি স্থানীয় সেমান্টিক এবং বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে মনোযোগ দিয় বিস্তারিত, আমরা একটি উপন্যাস স্যান্ডউইচ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (এসএনএন) প্রস্তাব করেছি যাতে পার্সারের উপর নির্ভর করা ছাড়া স্বয়ংক্রি আরো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, সেমান্টিক এবং কাঠামোর তথ্য কোর্পাস এবং ইনস্টেন্স স্তরে লেখা প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতি সমানভা ফ্লিশন সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য আমরা দুটি কৌশল প্রস্তাব করছি: এডিপেটিভ শিক্ষা স্যান্ডউইচ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (এল-এসএনএন) এবং স্বেচ্ছাস্থ্য মনোযোগ স্যান্ডউইচ প্রাক্তন কোর্পাস পর্যায়ের ওজন শিখতে পারে এবং পরের মাধ্যমে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গির মাধ্যমে দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দিতে পারে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা বেশ কয়েকটি টেক্সট গ্রাফিকেশন কাজের উপর প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদর্শন করা হয়, যার মধ্যে অনুভূতিবিশ্ বিশেষ করে, সঠিকভাবে MR (82. 1%), SST-5 (50. 4%), TREC (96%) এবং SUBJ (93.9%).', 'bs': 'Učenje predstavljanja je ključni problem za većinu zadataka prirodnog procesa jezika (NLP). Većina postojećih modela zastupanja ili nauči malu strukturnu informaciju ili se oslanjaju na predodređene strukture, što vodi do degradacije izvođenja i sposobnosti generalizacije. Ovaj papir se fokusira na učenje lokalnih semantičkih i globalnih predstavljanja strukture za klasifikaciju teksta. Detaljno predlažemo novu Sendvičnu Neuralnu mrežu (SNN) naučiti semantičke i strukturne predstave automatski bez oslanjanja na parsere. Što je važnije, semantičke i strukturne informacije ne jednako doprinose zastupanju teksta na razini korpusa i primjera. Da bi riješili problem fuzije, predlažemo dvije strategije: adaptivne naučenje sendviča Neuralne mreže (AL-SNN) i Neuralne mreže Sandviča (SA-SNN). Bivši uče težinu na nivou korpusa, a poslednji dodatno kombinira mehanizam pažnje za dodavanje težine na primjer nivou. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postigne konkurentne funkcije na nekoliko zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta, uključujući analizu osjećanja, klasifikaciju tipa pitanja i klasifikaciju subjektivnosti. Posebno, preciznosti su MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) i SUBJ (93,9%).', 'cs': 'Výuka reprezentace je klíčovým problémem pro většinu úkolů zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP). Většina existujících modelů reprezentace se buď naučí málo informací o struktuře, nebo se jen spoléhá na předem definované struktury, což vede ke snížení výkonnosti a zobecnění schopnosti. Tento článek se zaměřuje na poznání lokálních sémantických i globálních strukturních reprezentací pro klasifikaci textu. Podrobně navrhujeme novou Sandwich Neural Network (SNN), která se automaticky naučí sémantické a strukturní reprezentace bez spoléhání na parsery. Důležitější je, že sémantické a strukturní informace nerovnoměrně přispívají k reprezentaci textu na úrovni korpusu a instance. Pro řešení problému fúze navrhujeme dvě strategie: Adaptivní učební sendvičová neurální síť (AL-SNN) a Self-Attention Sandwich Neurální síť (SA-SNN). První se učí váhy na úrovni korpusu a druhý dále kombinuje mechanismus pozornosti, aby přiřadil váhy na úrovni instance. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš přístup dosahuje konkurenčního výkonu u několika úloh klasifikace textu, včetně analýzy sentimentu, klasifikace typu otázek a klasifikace subjektivity. Konkrétně jsou přesnosti MR (82,1%) SST-5 (50,4%) TREC (96%) a SUBJ (93,9%).', 'et': 'Representatsiooniõpe on enamiku looduskeele töötlemise (NLP) ülesannete võtmeküsimus. Enamik olemasolevaid esitusmudeleid kas õpib vähe struktuuri teavet või toetub lihtsalt eelnevalt määratletud struktuuridele, mis viib jõudluse halvenemiseni ja üldistamisvõimekuseni. Käesolev töö keskendub nii kohalike semantiliste kui ka globaalsete struktuuride esituste õppimisele teksti klassifitseerimiseks. Üksikasjalikult pakume välja uue Sandwich Neural Network (SNN), et õppida semantilisi ja struktuurilisi esitusi automaatselt ilma parseritele tuginemata. Veelgi olulisem on see, et semantiline ja struktuuriinformatsioon aitavad teksti esitamisele korpuse ja eksemplari tasandil ebavõrdselt kaasa. Fusiooni probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja kaks strateegiat: Adaptiivse õppimise sandwich neuraalne võrk (AL-SNN) ja enesetähelepanu sandwich neuraalne võrk (SA-SNN). Esimene õpib kaalusid korpuse tasandil ja viimane ühendab tähelepanumehhanismi kaalude määramiseks eksemplari tasandil. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemine saavutab konkurentsivõimelise tulemuse mitmes tekstiklassifitseerimisülesandes, sealhulgas sentimentaalüüsis, küsimuse tüübi klassifitseerimises ja subjektiivsuse klassifitseerimises. Täpsused on MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) ja SUBJ (93,9%).', 'fi': 'Edustamisen oppiminen on keskeinen kysymys useimmissa Natural Language Processing (NLP) -tehtävissä. Useimmat olemassa olevat esitysmallit joko oppivat vähän rakennetietoa tai luottavat vain ennalta määriteltyihin rakenteisiin, mikä johtaa suorituskyvyn heikkenemiseen ja yleistyskyvyn heikkenemiseen. Tässä artikkelissa keskitytään oppimaan sekä paikallisia semanttisia että globaaleja rakenneesityksiä tekstin luokittelussa. Yksityiskohtaisesti ehdotamme uutta Sandwich Neural Network (SNN) -verkostoa semanttisten ja rakenteellisten esitysten oppimiseen automaattisesti tukematta jäsentäjiin. Tärkeämpää on, että semanttinen ja rakenteellinen tieto myötävaikuttavat epätasaisesti tekstin esittämiseen korpus- ja instanssitasolla. Fuusioongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme kahta strategiaa: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) ja Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). Ensimmäinen oppii painot korpustasolla ja jälkimmäinen yhdistää huomiomekanismin painojen osoittamiseksi instanssitasolla. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme saavuttaa kilpailukyvyn useissa tekstiluokittelutehtävissä, kuten tunteiden analysoinnissa, kysymystyyppiluokituksessa ja subjektiivisuusluokituksessa. Tarkkuus on MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) ja SUBJ (93,9%).', 'ha': "Shirin da ake karanta mutane yana da wani matsayi wa aikin aiki na Kayan Jalaliya (NLP). Babbansu masu motsi da ke gaba, ko sai su sanar da information masu ƙaranci na rubutu ko sai su dõgara a kan bakin da aka bayyana shi a gaba-bayan, don ya kusa ya kunyatar da fassarar da awon gabanin. Wannan takardan na fokus a kan karanta duk masu motsi na semantic da mazaɓa wa layin rubutu. Babu buƙata, Munã buɗar da wani sauran sandwich Neural Netware (SNN) dõmin ya sanar da masu motsi na semantic da bakwai farat ɗaya, kuma bã da ƙayyade a kan parser. Ki muhimu, ma'anar mutane da tsari, ma'anar mutane na ƙaranci, yana ƙara zuwa ma'abũcin rubutu da sifatin misali. To solve the problemar fusion, Munã goyya da takwai biyu: Adoptive Learnin sandwich Neural Netware (AI-SNN) da Self-Attattach sandwich Neural Netware (SA-SNN). Ga ta zaman ya sanar ma'auni kan nauyi a daraja na korbas, kuma ta ƙarami yana haɗa matsayin muhimmada da za'a ƙayyade nauyi a cikin daraja. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana sami aikin mai gaura a kan wasu aikin mai rarraba matsayin, kamar misalin hisani, fasalin nau'in da kuma fasalin abun. A ƙayyade, gaskiyar gaske sune MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) da SUBJ (93.9%).", 'sk': 'Učenje predstavništva je ključno vprašanje za večino nalog obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP). Večina obstoječih modelov reprezentacije se bodisi nauči malo strukturnih informacij ali pa se zanaša le na vnaprej določene strukture, kar vodi v poslabšanje zmogljivosti in sposobnosti generalizacije. Prispevek se osredotoča na učenje lokalnih semantičnih in globalnih strukturnih predstavitev za klasifikacijo besedila. Podrobneje predlagamo novo sendvično nevronsko mrežo (SNN) za samodejno učenje semantičnih in strukturnih predstavitev brez zanašanja na razčlenjevalnike. Pomembneje je, da semantične in strukturne informacije neenakomerno prispevajo k predstavitvi besedila na ravni korpusa in primerka. Za rešitev problema fuzije predlagamo dve strategiji: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Nevral Network (AL-SNN) in Self-Attention Sandwich Nevral Network (SA-SNN). Prvi se uči uteži na ravni korpusa, drugi pa nadalje združuje mehanizem pozornosti za dodelitev uteži na ravni instance. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš pristop dosega konkurenčno uspešnost pri več nalogah klasifikacije besedil, vključno z analizo sentimenta, klasifikacijo vrste vprašanj in klasifikacijo subjektivnosti. Natančneje so MR (82,1%), SST-5 (50,4%), TREC (96%) in SUBJ (93,9%).', 'he': "לימוד מייצגה הוא נושא מפתח לרוב משימות תהליך שפת טבעית (NLP). רוב הדוגמנים הנוכחים או ללמוד מידע מעט מבנה או סתם לסמוך על מבנים מוגדרים מראש, מה שמוביל לפרעה של ביצועים ויכולת הגנרליזציה. העבודה הזו מתמקדת בללמד מייצגי מבנה סמנטי מקומיים וגלובליים עבור מסווג טקסט. בפרטים, אנחנו מציעים רשת נוירולית סנדוויץ' חדשה (SNN) ללמוד מייצגים סמנטיים ומבנים באופן אוטומטי בלי לסמוך על פרסמים. חשוב יותר, מידע סמנטי ומבנה תורם באופן לא שווה לייצג הטקסט ברמה של קורפוס ומקרה. To solve the fusion problem, we propose two strategies: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) and Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN).  הקודם לומד את המשקלים ברמה של הקורפוס, והמשקל האחרון משלב את מנגנון תשומת לב יותר כדי לקבוע את המשקלים ברמה של מקרה. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהגישה שלנו משיגה ביצועים תחרותיים על מספר משימות מסווגים טקסטים, כולל ניתוח רגשות, מסווגים מסוג שאלות וסווגיטציה סובייקטיבית. Specifically, the accuracies are MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) and SUBJ (93.9%).", 'jv': 'Where am I Tulung sistem representation Laptop" and "Desktop Manculining Detil, kita sijinuhke batir sandwich Neral Network (S NN) kanggo kelas semanti karo structural representations automatically sijine nguasai pater. Awak dhéwé, semanti karo structural informasi tambah mungkin gak bener kanggo teks representasi telas nang daftar sampek. Ngubah nambah perusahaan urip nggo mbarung usul, kita supoyo nggawe siji kabeh: Package Learning sandwich Neral Network (AL-S NN) lan Self-Attention sandwich Neral Network (S-S NN). Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan dipunanggé kanggo didasai nggawe lom, lan ngono hasik dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang seneng pisan. User Laptop" and "Desktop', 'bo': 'རྟོགས་འཛུགས་ནི་སློབ་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་གཅིག་གི་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་སྐད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་བློ་གཏོང་ཤིག གནས་ཡོད་པའི་མིག ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་སྔར་སྒྲིག་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་ཆ་རྣམས་ལག་ལེན་ཐབས་འཇུག ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ལ་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་པོ་(SNN)་་་ གསར་བརྗོད་ཞིག་གིས་སྐྱེས་ཆེན་དང་རྩིས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྟོགས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མ་འབྲི་པ་ ཧ་ཅང་གལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ས semantic་དང་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དེ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་དང་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཚད་གཞ To solve the fusion problem, we propose two strategies: Adaptive Learning Sandwich Neural Network (AL-SNN) and Self-Attention Sandwich Neural Network (SA-SNN). སྔོན་པ་གིས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཚད་གཞི་ཡོད་པ་ལ་བསླབས་པའི་ནང་ངོ་བོ་དག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཇེ་མང་དུ་བསྡད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Experimental results demonstrate that our approach achieves competitive performance on several text classification tasks, including sentiment analysis, question type classification and subjectivity classification. ཁྱད་པར་ན། བྱ་ཚུལ་དེ་MR (82.1%), SST-5 (50.4%), TREC (96%) དང SUBJ (93.9%) ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Lyrics Segmentation : Textual Macrostructure Detection using Convolutions', 'es': 'Segmentación de letras: detección de macroestructura textual mediante circunvoluciones', 'ar': 'تجزئة الكلمات: الكشف عن البنية الكلية النصية باستخدام التلافيف', 'fr': "Segmentation des paroles\xa0: détection de macrostructures textuelles à l'aide de convolu", 'pt': 'Segmentação de Letras: Detecção de Macroestrutura Textual usando Convoluções', 'ja': '歌詞のセグメンテーション：畳み込みを使用したテキストのマクロ構造の検出', 'ru': 'Тексты песен Segmentation: Textual Macrostructure Detection using Convolutions', 'zh': '歌词割:用卷积行文本宏观结构检测', 'hi': 'गीत विभाजन: Convolutions का उपयोग कर पाठ्य मैक्रोस्ट्रक्चर डिटेक्शन डिटेक्शन', 'ga': 'Lyrics Deighleog: Textual Macrastructure Detection using Convolutions', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Κατάτμηση στίχων: Ανίχνευση κειμενικής μακροδομής χρησιμοποιώντας τις καμπύλες', 'hu': 'Szövegszegmentáció: Textual Macrostructure Detection with Convolutions', 'it': 'Segmentazione del testo: Rilevamento della macrostruttura testuale utilizzando le convoluzioni', 'kk': 'Сөздер сегментациясы: Мәтіндік макроструктураларды табу', 'lt': 'Lyrics Segmentation: Textual Macrostructure Detection using Convolutions', 'mk': 'Сегментација на зборовите: Детектирање на текстуална макроструктура користејќи конволуции', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн хэсэг: Текст макросструктур тогтоох', 'ms': 'Lyrics Segmentation: Textual Macrostructure Detection using Convolutions', 'ml': 'ലൈറിക്കുകളുടെ വിഭാഗമേന്ദ്രം: പദാവലി മാക്രോസ്ക്രോക്ട്രൂക്ടര്\u200d ഡിറ്റീഷന്\u200d', 'mt': 'Segmentazzjoni tal-kliem: Sejbien tal-Makrostruttura Tekstiva bl-użu ta’ Konveoluzzjonijiet', 'pl': 'Segmentacja tekstów: Wykrywanie makrostruktury tekstowej przy użyciu zamachów', 'no': 'Segmentasjon av teksttekst: Tekstoppdaging av makrostruktur ved hjelp av konvolusjonar', 'ro': 'Segmentarea versurilor: Detectarea macrostructurii textuale folosind convoluții', 'sr': 'Segmentacija teksta: detekcija tekstualne makrostrukture koristeći konvolucije', 'sv': 'Textsegmentering: Textuell makrostruktur detektering med konvulutioner', 'so': 'Segmentation of luuqadaha: Textual Macrostructure Detection using Convolutions', 'ta': 'விளையாட்டுகள் பிரிப்பு', 'ur': 'لیریک سیگنٹمنٹ: ٹکسٹیول مکروسترکیٹ آشنائی Convolutions کے مطابق', 'si': 'ලියික් සෙග්මෙන්ටමන්: පාළුවන් මැක්\u200dරොස්ට්\u200dරුක්ටර් හොයාගන්න', 'uz': 'Tashkilot', 'vi': 'Đoạn theo chữ: Phát hiện cấu trúc tổng thể bằng thuyết trình', 'bg': 'Сегментация на текстове: откриване на текстови макроструктури с помощта на конвелуции', 'hr': 'Segmentacija teksta: otkrivanje tekstualne makrostrukture koristeći konvolucije', 'de': 'Textliche Makrostrukturerkennung mit Hilfe von Faltungen', 'nl': 'Songtekst Segmentatie: Tekstuele Macrostructuur Detectie met behulp van Convoluties', 'da': 'Lyrics Segmentering: Tekstuel makrostruktur detektion ved hjælp af konvulutioner', 'sw': 'Segmentation of Lyrics: Detection of Textual Macros using Convolutions', 'fa': 'جدا کردن شعار: شناسایی ماکروستروژی متن با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cها', 'ko': '가사 분할: 볼륨 기반 텍스트 거시적 구조 검출', 'af': 'Lyrikse Segmentasie: Teks Makrostruktuur Opdekking gebruik Konvolusies', 'sq': 'Segmentacioni i lirisë: zbulimi i makrostrukturës tekstuale duke përdorur konvolution', 'tr': 'Sözler Segmentation: Textual Macrostructure Detection using Convolutions', 'id': 'Segmentasi Lirik: Deteksi Makrostruktur Tekstul menggunakan Konvelusi', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'S√∂zl…ôr Segmentasyonu: Konvolusyon vasit…ôsil…ô Textual Macrostructure Detection', 'bs': 'Segmentacija teksta: detekcija tekstualne makrostrukture koristeći konvolucije', 'ca': 'Segmentació de lletres: Detecció de macroestructures textuals utilitzant Convolucions', 'cs': 'Segmentace textů: Detekce textové makrostruktury pomocí konvolucí', 'bn': 'Lyrics Segmentation: Textual Macrostructure Detection using Convolutions', 'hy': 'Լռիկների սեգմետացիան. տեքստոլային մակրոստուկտուրային հայտնաբերում հակադարձությունների միջոցով', 'et': 'Sõnade segmenteerimine: tekstilise makrostruktuuri tuvastamine konvolutsioonide abil', 'fi': 'Lyrics Segmentointi: Tekstuaalisen makrorakenteen tunnistus konvoluatioilla', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'Segmentation of lyrics: Textual Macrostructure Detection using Convolutions', 'sk': 'Segmentacija besedil: zaznavanje besedilne makrostrukture z uporabo konvolucij', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཚིག་དང་། ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་Macrostructure Detection using Convolutions', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'Lyrics contain repeated patterns that are correlated with the repetitions found in the music they accompany. Repetitions in song texts have been shown to enable lyrics segmentation   a fundamental prerequisite of automatically detecting the building blocks (e.g. chorus, verse) of a song text. In this article we improve on the state-of-the-art in lyrics segmentation by applying a convolutional neural network to the task, and experiment with novel features as a step towards deeper macrostructure detection of lyrics.', 'ar': 'تحتوي كلمات الأغاني على أنماط متكررة مرتبطة بالتكرار الموجود في الموسيقى المصاحبة لها. تم إثبات التكرار في نصوص الأغاني لتمكين تجزئة الكلمات - وهو شرط أساسي للكشف التلقائي عن اللبنات الأساسية (مثل الجوقة ، والشعر) لنص الأغنية. في هذه المقالة نقوم بتحسين أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم في تجزئة الكلمات من خلال تطبيق شبكة عصبية تلافيفية على المهمة ، وتجربة ميزات جديدة كخطوة نحو اكتشاف أعمق للبنية الكلية للكلمات.', 'pt': 'As letras contêm padrões repetidos que estão correlacionados com as repetições encontradas na música que acompanham. Repetições em textos de músicas demonstraram permitir a segmentação de letras - um pré-requisito fundamental para detectar automaticamente os blocos de construção (por exemplo, refrão, verso) de um texto de música. Neste artigo, aprimoramos o estado da arte na segmentação de letras, aplicando uma rede neural convolucional à tarefa, e experimentamos novos recursos como um passo para a detecção de macroestrutura mais profunda das letras.', 'es': 'Las letras contienen patrones repetidos que se correlacionan con las repeticiones que se encuentran en la música que acompañan. Se ha demostrado que las repeticiones en los textos de las canciones permiten la segmentación de las letras, un requisito previo fundamental para detectar automáticamente los componentes básicos (por ejemplo, coro, verso) del texto de una canción. En este artículo mejoramos el estado de la segmentación de letras mediante la aplicación de una red neuronal convolucional a la tarea, y experimentamos con características novedosas como un paso hacia una detección más profunda de la macroestructura de las letras.', 'fr': "Les paroles contiennent des motifs répétés qui sont corrélés avec les répétitions de la musique qu'ils accompagnent. Il a été démontré que les répétitions dans les textes de chansons permettent la segmentation des paroles, une condition préalable fondamentale à la détection automatique des éléments constitutifs (par exemple, refrain, couplet) d'un texte de chanson. Dans cet article, nous améliorons les dernières avancées en matière de segmentation des paroles en appliquant un réseau neuronal convolutif à la tâche, et en expérimentant de nouvelles fonctionnalités pour une détection plus approfondie de la macrostructure des paroles.", 'ja': '歌詞には、付随する音楽に見られる繰り返しと相関する繰り返しパターンが含まれています。歌のテキストにおける繰り返しは、歌詞のセグメンテーションを可能にすることが示されている。これは、歌のテキストの構築ブロック（例えば、コーラス、詩）を自動的に検出するための基本的な前提条件である。この記事では、タスクに畳み込みニューラルネットワークを適用することで、歌詞のセグメンテーションの最先端を向上させ、歌詞のマクロ構造のより深い検出への一歩として、斬新な機能の実験を行っています。', 'zh': '歌词含重式,此式系重声。 其文本重证可成 - 此自动检测曲本构块(如合唱,诗)之本先决也。 于本文,将卷积神经网络应用于事改进歌词分割之最新,并试用新特徵为向歌词深入宏观结构检测之一步。', 'hi': 'गीत में दोहराए गए पैटर्न होते हैं जो उनके साथ संगीत में पाए जाने वाले पुनरावृत्ति के साथ सहसंबद्ध होते हैं। गीत ग्रंथों में पुनरावृत्ति को गीत विभाजन को सक्षम करने के लिए दिखाया गया है - एक गीत पाठ के बिल्डिंग ब्लॉक (जैसे कोरस, कविता) का स्वचालित रूप से पता लगाने की एक मौलिक शर्त। इस लेख में हम कार्य के लिए एक convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क लागू करके गीत विभाजन में राज्य के कला पर सुधार करते हैं, और गीत के गहरे मैक्रोस्ट्रक्चर का पता लगाने की दिशा में एक कदम के रूप में उपन्यास सुविधाओं के साथ प्रयोग करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Тексты песен содержат повторяющиеся узоры, которые коррелируют с повторами, найденными в музыке, которую они сопровождают. Было показано, что повторения в текстах песен позволяют сегментировать текст песни – основополагающее условие автоматического обнаружения строительных блоков (например, хора, стиха) текста песни. В этой статье мы совершенствуем современную сегментацию текста, применяя к задаче сверточную нейронную сеть, и экспериментируем с новыми признаками как шаг к более глубокому обнаружению макроструктуры текста.', 'ga': 'Cuimsíonn liricí patrúin arís agus arís eile atá comhghaolmhar leis na hathrá a fhaightear sa cheol a ghabhann leo. Taispeánadh athrá i dtéacsanna amhrán chun deighilt liricí a chumasú – réamhriachtanas bunúsach chun bloic thógála (m.sh. curfá, véarsa) de théacs amhráin a bhrath go huathoibríoch. San Airteagal seo, cuirimid feabhas ar an úrscothacht i ndeighilt liricí trí líonra néarúil comhbheartaithe a chur i bhfeidhm ar an tasc, agus déanaimid tástáil ar ghnéithe núíosacha mar chéim i dtreo braite liricí níos doimhne ar mhacrastruchtúr.', 'hu': 'A dalszövegek ismétlődő mintákat tartalmaznak, amelyek összefüggésben vannak az általuk kísért zenében található ismétlésekkel. A dalszövegekben való ismétlések lehetővé teszik a dalszövegek szegmentálását, ami alapvető előfeltétele annak, hogy automatikusan felismerjük a dalszöveg építőelemeit (pl. kórus, vers). Ebben a cikkben javítjuk a dalszöveg szegmentációjának korszerű fejlesztését egy konvolúciós neurális hálózat alkalmazásával a feladathoz, és új funkciókkal kísérletezünk, amelyek lépésként a dalszövegek mélyebb makroszerkezetű felismeréséhez vezetnek.', 'el': 'Οι στίχοι περιέχουν επαναλαμβανόμενα μοτίβα που συσχετίζονται με τις επαναλήψεις που βρίσκονται στη μουσική που συνοδεύουν. Οι επαναλήψεις σε κείμενα τραγουδιών έχουν αποδειχθεί ώστε να επιτρέπουν την κατάτμηση στίχων, βασική προϋπόθεση για την αυτόματη ανίχνευση των δομικών στοιχείων (π.χ. χορωδία, στίχος) ενός κειμένου τραγουδιού. Σε αυτό το άρθρο βελτιώνουμε την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στην κατάτμηση στίχων εφαρμόζοντας ένα σύνθετο νευρωνικό δίκτυο στην εργασία, και πειραματιζόμαστε με νέα χαρακτηριστικά ως βήμα προς την βαθύτερη ανίχνευση μακροδομής των στίχων.', 'ka': 'სიტყვები აქვს განმეორებული მონაცემები, რომლებიც კოლექცირებულია მონაცემებით, რომლებიც მუსიკაში იქნება. სიტყვების ტექსტის განმეორება ჩვენებულია, რომ სიტყვების სექმენტის შესაძლებლობა - სიტყვების ფუნდამეტური უნდა ავტომატურად განახსნა ბლოკების (მაგალითად chorus, verse) ტექსტის ფუნდამე ამ ახალგაზრულში ჩვენ წარმოდგინეთ სიტყვების სექმენტაციაში კონგულოციალური ნეიროლური ქსელის დაყენებით, და პრომენტის ფუნქციებით ექსპერიმენტი როგორც ნაწილი სიტყვების უფრო დიდი მაკ', 'it': "I testi contengono schemi ripetuti che sono correlati con le ripetizioni presenti nella musica che accompagnano. Le ripetizioni nei testi delle canzoni sono state dimostrate per consentire la segmentazione dei testi - un prerequisito fondamentale per rilevare automaticamente i blocchi costitutivi (ad esempio coro, verso) di un testo di una canzone. In questo articolo miglioriamo lo stato dell'arte nella segmentazione dei testi applicando una rete neurale convoluzionale al compito, e sperimentiamo con nuove funzionalità come passo verso un rilevamento più profondo della macrostruttura dei testi.", 'lt': 'Lyrics contain repeated patterns that are correlated with the repetitions found in the music they accompany.  Repetitions in song texts have been shown to enable lyrics segmentation - a fundamental prerequisite of automatically detecting the building blocks (e.g. chorus, verse) of a song text.  Šiame straipsnyje pageriname tekstų segmentacijos pažangą taikant konvoliucinį nervų tinklą užduoties atžvilgiu ir eksperimentuojame su naujomis savybėmis kaip žingsnį siekiant gilesnio tekstų makrostruktūros nustatymo.', 'kk': 'Суреттерде олардың мұзықтағы қайталанатын қайталанатын үлгілер бар. Қайталау мәтіндерінің қайталануы сызықтар сегментациясын рұқсат ету үшін көрсетілді - құрылған блоктарды автоматты түрде анықтауға негізгі қажет болады (мысалы, хорус, нұсқасы). Бұл мақалада біз литр сегментациясының күйін жақсартып, тапсырмаға невралдық желі қолданатын және романдық мүмкіндіктерімен пішімдеуді литртердің түсіндіру үшін қадам болып тұрамыз.', 'ms': 'Lirik mengandungi corak berulang yang berkorrelasi dengan ulangan yang ditemui dalam muzik yang mereka ikut. Repetitions in song texts have been shown to enable lyrics segmentation - a fundamental prerequisite of automatically detecting the building blocks (e.g. chorus, verse) of a song text.  Dalam artikel ini kami meningkatkan keadaan-state-of-the-art dalam segmen lirik dengan melaksanakan rangkaian saraf konvolutional untuk tugas, dan eksperimen dengan ciri-ciri baru sebagai langkah ke pengesan makrostruktur makrostruktur lebih dalam lirik.', 'mk': 'Ликите содржат повторни шеми кои се поврзани со повторувањата кои се најдени во музиката што ја придружуваат. Повторувањата во текстот на песните се покажани за да се овозможи сегментацијата на текстот на песните - фундаментален предуслов за автоматско детектирање на градежните блокови (пр. хор, верс) на текстот на песните. Во оваа статија ја подобруваме техничката сегментација на текстовите со апликација на конволуционална нервна мрежа на задачата, и експериментираме со нови карактеристики како чекор кон подлабоко детекција на текстовите на макроструктурата.', 'ml': 'ലൈറ്റുകളില്\u200d ആവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന രീതികളുണ്ട്. അവയുടെ കൂടെയുള്ള സംഗീതത്തില്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിച് പാട്ടുകളുടെ പദാവലികളില്\u200d പ്രതികരിക്കുന്ന പാട്ടുകള്\u200d പാട്ടുകളുടെ പാട്ടുകളുടെ പാട്ടുകളുടെ വാചകം സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു  ഈ ലേഖനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പദ്ധതികളുടെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനാ', 'mn': 'Сургууль нь хөгжмийн давтамжтай холбогдож байгаа давтамжтай давтагдсан хэлбэрүүдийг агуулдаг. Дуугийн текстүүдийн давталт дуу загварыг автоматжуулахын тулд автоматжуулах суурь шаардлагатай болсон. Энэ баримт бид дуу хэлбэрийн урлагийн төвшин дээр сайжруулж, даалгаврын мэдрэлийн сүлжээг ажлын тулд хэрэглэж, мөн дуу хэлбэрийн гүн гүнзгий макроструктуруудыг олж мэдэх шаардлагатай шинэ зүйлсийг туршиж байна.', 'no': 'Teksttekstar inneheld gjentaande mønsterelement som er korrelatert med gjentakingane som finst i musikken dei saman med. Gjenopprettingar i songtekstar er vist for å slå på linjesegmentasjon - e in grunnleggjande førehandsvising for automatisk oppdaging av bygningsblokkar (f.eks. korus, versus) av ei song-tekst. I denne artikkelen forbedrar vi tilstanden av kunsten i tekstsegmentasjonen ved å bruka eit konvolusjonell neuralnettverk til oppgåva, og eksperimenter med romanske funksjonar som steg mot dypere makrostruktur for oppdaging av tekstar.', 'pl': 'Teksty zawierają powtarzające się wzorce, które są skorelowane z powtórzeniami znajdującymi się w muzyce, której towarzyszą. Powtarzania w tekstach utworów zostały wykazane, aby umożliwić segmentację tekstów tekstowych będących podstawowym warunkiem automatycznego wykrywania elementów budowlanych (np. refren, wers) tekstu utworu. W tym artykule poprawiamy najnowocześniejszy stan w segmentacji tekstów poprzez zastosowanie konwolucyjnej sieci neuronowej do zadania i eksperymentujemy z nowymi cechami jako krok w kierunku głębszego wykrywania makrostruktury tekstów.', 'ro': 'Versurile conțin modele repetate care sunt corelate cu repetițiile găsite în muzica pe care o însoțesc. Repetițiile în textele melodiilor au fost demonstrate pentru a permite segmentarea versurilor - o condiție fundamentală pentru detectarea automată a blocurilor de construcție (de exemplu corul, versetul) ale unui text melodic. În acest articol îmbunătățim stadiul de ultimă oră în segmentarea versurilor prin aplicarea unei rețele neuronale convoluționale la sarcină și experimentăm caracteristici noi ca un pas spre detectarea mai profundă a macrostructurii versurilor.', 'so': 'Luqadu waxaa ku yaala noocyo la soo jeedo oo la xiriira muusikada lagu soo bandhigay. Dhawaaqyada qoraalka gabayga waxaa lagu muujiyey dib u soo celinta si uu u awoodo qeybinta farshaxanka - taas oo ah baaritaanka aasaasiga ah oo aad si automatic ah u ogaato qoraalka dhismaha (tusaale ahaan korrus, verse) oo qoraalka gabayga ah. Maktabadan waxaynu ku hagaajinnaa xaalada farshaxanka ee farshaxanka ku qoran, si aan u dalbanno shabakadda neurada oo dhaqdhaqaaqa ah oo shaqada u soo diro, waxaana lagu baaraandegayaa marxalad warqad ah sida tallaabo xagga hoos u sii kordha macrostructurka la garto qoraalka.', 'sv': 'Texterna innehåller upprepade mönster som är korrelerade med repetitioner som finns i musiken de följer med. Repetitioner i låttexter har visat sig möjliggöra textsegmentering - en grundläggande förutsättning för att automatiskt upptäcka byggstenarna (t.ex. kör, vers) i en låttext. I den här artikeln förbättrar vi den senaste tekniken inom textsegmentering genom att tillämpa ett konvulutivt neuralt nätverk på uppgiften, och experimenterar med nya funktioner som ett steg mot djupare makrostrukturdetektering av texter.', 'ta': 'விளையாட்டுகளில் மீண்டும் திரும்பச் செய்யப்பட்ட வடிவங்கள் இருக்கிறது அது அவர்களுடன் கூடிய இசையில் காணப்பட பாடல் உரைகளில் திரும்பங்கள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது - ஒரு பாடல் உரையின் கட்டுப்பாடுகளை தானாகவே கண்டறியும் ஒரு முக்கியமான முன்வேண்டும். இந்த கட்டுரையில் நாம் விளக்கங்கள் பிரிவுகளின் நிலையில் மேம்படுத்துகிறோம் ஒரு சாதாரண புதிய பிணையத்தை பணிக்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், மற்றும் புதிய குறிப்ப', 'ur': 'زبان میں دفعہ پٹرنے والے پٹرنے لگتے ہیں جو ان کے ساتھ ملے ہوئے موسیقی میں پائی جاتی ہیں. سنگت کے متن میں دوبارہ دکھائی گئی ہے کہ آیتیں سپگٹ کرنے کو فعال کرے - ایک بنیادی بلوک (مثل chorus, verse) کو اپنا بنیادی آگاہ کرے۔ اس مقالہ میں ہم آیتیں سیگنٹ میں آیتیں کی موقعیت پر زیادہ اچھی طرح استعمال کر رہے ہیں، اور آیتیں کی عمیق مکروسترکٹر کی آشنائی کی طرف سے نئی ویرول نیٹورک کے ساتھ آزمائش کررہے ہیں.', 'si': 'සංගීතයෙන් හොයාගත්ත ප්\u200dරතිචාරය සමඟ සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරය තියෙනවා. සංගීතයේ පැත්තට ආපහු පෙන්වන්න පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සංගීතය සක්\u200dරීය කරන්න - ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය පැත්තක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විදිහට ප මේ ලේඛනයේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විදිහට සම්', 'mt': 'Lyrics contain repeated patterns that are correlated with the repetitions found in the music they accompany.  Repetitions in song texts have been shown to enable lyrics segmentation - a fundamental prerequisite of automatically detecting the building blocks (e.g. chorus, verse) of a song text.  F’dan l-artikolu a ħna ntejbu dwar l-aġġornament fis-segmentazzjoni tal-lirika billi napplikaw netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali għall-kompitu, u nagħmlu esperimenti b’karatteristiċi ġodda bħala pass lejn detezzjoni aktar profonda tal-makrostruttura tal-lirika.', 'sr': 'Rika sadrži ponavljane uzorke koje su povezani sa ponavljanjem nađenim u muzici koju prate. Pokazano je ponovljanje teksta pjesme kako bi omogućilo segmentaciju teksta - osnovno predviđenje automatskog otkrivanja blokova zgrade (npr. chorus, stih) teksta pjesme. U ovom članku poboljšavamo stanje umjetnosti u segmentaciji tekstova primjenjujući konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu na zadatak, i eksperimentiramo sa novim karakteristikama kao korak ka dubljoj otkrivanju tekstova.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Repetitions in song texts have been shown to enable lyrics segmentation - a fundamental prerequisite of automatically detecting the building blocks (e.g. chorus, verse) of a song text.  Bu maqolada, biz o'sha vazifani amalga oshirish uchun murakkab neyrol tarmoqni qo'llash va novel xususiyatlarini muvaffaqiyatli makrostruktur tizimini aniqlashga bir qadam qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Lời văn chứa mô hình lặp lại tương quan với các phiên bản lặp đi kèm trong âm nhạc. Những lần lặp lại trong văn bản bài hát đã được hiển thị để phân đoạn lời bài hát... một điều kiện cơ bản để tự động phát hiện các khối lập trình (v.d. điệp khúc, vũ trụ) của văn bản bài hát. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi cải tiến tiến tiến tiến tiến độ phân đoạn lời bằng cách áp dụng một mạng lưới thần kinh kết nối vào nhiệm vụ, và thử nghiệm với những tính năng mới như một bước tiến tới phát hiện cấu trúc vĩ đại sâu hơn lời bài hát.', 'bg': 'Текстовете съдържат повтарящи се модели, които са свързани с повторенията, намерени в музиката, която съпътстват. Показано е, че повторенията в текстовете на песните позволяват сегментиране на текстовете на текстовете - фундаментална предпоставка за автоматично откриване на градивните елементи (например хор, стих) на текста на песента. В тази статия подобряваме най-съвременните технологии в сегментацията на текстовете чрез прилагане на конволюционна невронна мрежа към задачата и експериментираме с нови функции като стъпка към по-дълбоко откриване на макроструктури на текстовете.', 'hr': 'Ličnice sadrže ponavljane uzorke koje su povezani s ponavljanjem nađenim u muzici koje su pratili. Pokazano je ponovljanje teksta pjesme kako bi omogućilo segmentaciju teksta - temeljno predviđenje automatskog otkrivanja blokova zgrade (npr. chorus, stih) teksta pjesme. U ovom članku poboljšavamo stanje umjetnosti u segmentaciji tekstova primjenjujući konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu na zadatak, i eksperimentirati s novim karakteristikama kao korak ka dubljoj otkrivanju tekstova makrostrukture.', 'nl': 'Lyrics bevatten herhaalde patronen die correleren met de herhalingen in de muziek die ze begeleiden. Herhalingen in songteksten zijn aangetoond om tekstsegmentatie mogelijk te maken, een fundamentele voorwaarde om automatisch de bouwstenen (bijvoorbeeld refrein, vers) van een songtekst te detecteren. In dit artikel verbeteren we de state-of-the-art in tekstsegmentatie door een convolutioneel neuraal netwerk toe te passen op de taak, en experimenteren we met nieuwe functies als een stap naar diepere macrostructuurdetectie van teksten.', 'da': 'Tekster indeholder gentagne mønstre, der er korreleret med de gentagelser, der findes i den musik, de ledsager. Gentagelser i sangtekster har vist sig at muliggøre segmentering af tekster - en grundlæggende forudsætning for automatisk at registrere byggesten (f.eks. kor, vers) i en sangtekst. I denne artikel forbedrer vi den nyeste tekstsegmentering ved at anvende et konvulutivt neuralt netværk til opgaven, og eksperimenterer med nye funktioner som et skridt mod dybere makrostruktur detektering af tekster.', 'de': 'Lyrics enthalten wiederholte Muster, die mit den Wiederholungen in der Musik korrelieren, die sie begleiten. Wiederholungen in Liedtexten ermöglichen eine Textsegmentierung, eine Grundvoraussetzung für die automatische Erkennung der Bausteine (z.B. Chor, Strophe) eines Liedtextes. In diesem Artikel verbessern wir den Stand der Technik in der Textsegmentierung, indem wir ein convolutionales neuronales Netzwerk auf die Aufgabe anwenden und experimentieren mit neuen Merkmalen als Schritt zur tieferen Makrostrukturerkennung von Texten.', 'id': 'Lyrics contain repeated patterns that are correlated with the repetitions found in the music they accompany.  Repetitions in song texts have been shown to enable lyrics segmentation - a fundamental prerequisite of automatically detecting the building blocks (e.g. chorus, verse) of a song text.  Dalam artikel ini kami memperbaiki segmen lirik yang terbaik dengan menggunakan jaringan saraf konvolusi untuk tugas ini, dan eksperimen dengan fitur baru sebagai langkah menuju deteksi makrostruktur lebih dalam lirik.', 'ko': '가사는 중복된 패턴을 포함하는데 이런 패턴은 그들이 반주한 음악에서 발견한 중복과 관련이 있다.노래 텍스트의 중복은 가사 분할을 실현할 수 있는데 이것은 노래 텍스트 구축 블록(예를 들어 합창, 운문)을 자동으로 검출하는 기본 전제이다.이 글에서 우리는 권적신경 네트워크를 가사분할 임무에 응용함으로써 가사분할의 최신 기술을 개선하고 새로운 특징을 실험하여 가사의 거시적 구조 검측에 깊이 들어가는 단계로 삼았다.', 'fa': 'زبان\u200cها از الگوهای تکرار می\u200cباشند که با تکرار\u200cها در موسیقی که همراه می\u200cشوند ارتباط دارند. تکرار در متن\u200cهای آهنگ نشان داده شده است تا بخش\u200cبندی\u200cهای آهنگ را فعال کند - یک پیش\u200cفرض بنیادی از شناسایی بلوک\u200cهای ساختمانی (مثال کوروس، آهنگ) متن آهنگ خود. در این مقاله ما در حالت هنری در بخش\u200cبندی\u200cهای زبان\u200cها با استفاده از شبکه عصبی\u200cهای مختلف به کار، و آزمایش با ویژه\u200cهای رمانی را به عنوان یک قدم به طریق شناسایی عمیق\u200cترین مکروسترک\u200cهای زبان\u200cها انجام می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Lugha zina mifano ya mara kwa mara yanayohusiana na matokeo yaliyopatikana kwenye muziki wanaoongoza. Miitikio katika maandishi ya nyimbo yameonyesha kuwezesha kuchaguliwa kwa mashairi - muhimu wa kutambua mabango ya jengo (kwa mfano chorusi, verse) ya ujumbe wa wimbo. Katika makala hii tunaboresha hali ya sanaa inayohusiana na elimu kwa kutumia mtandao wa kikatili wa neura katika kazi hiyo, na majaribio yanayohusu riwaya kama hatua ya kuelekea zaidi kutambua mistari.', 'tr': 'Sözler aýdymda ýene-täzelikleri bilen ewez edilen nusgalar bar. Metinlerde g a ýtalananlar hatlary segmentlemegini mümkin edip bilmek üçin g örkezildi - bina bloklaryny otomatik aňlamak üçin ullanýar. Bu makaleda sözler segmentasiýasynda gönüllü näyral şebeke üýtgeşirip, we novel özellikleri sözlerin derin makrostruktur tapylygynyň bir adım diýip synanyşýarys.', 'af': "Lirieke bevat herhaalde patrone wat korrelasieer word met die herhaalde herhaalde in die musiek wat hulle saam met. Herhaal in liedingstekste is vertoon om lyrike segmentasie te aktiveer - 'n fundamental e voorspoediging van automaties die boublokke (bv. chorus, verse) van 'n liedingstekst te beskry. In hierdie artikel is ons verbeter op die staat-van-die-kuns in lyrike segmentasie deur 'n konvolusionele neuralnetwerk na die taak te wend, en eksperiment met novele funksies as 'n stap na dieper makrostruktuur opdekking van lyrike.", 'sq': 'Liriket përmbajnë modele të përsëritura që janë të lidhura me përsëritjet e gjetura në muzikën që shoqërojnë. Repetitions in song texts have been shown to enable lyrics segmentation - a fundamental prerequisite of automatically detecting the building blocks (e.g. chorus, verse) of a song text.  In this article we improve on the state-of-the-art in lyrics segmentation by applying a convolutional neural network to the task, and experiment with novel features as a step towards deeper macrostructure detection of lyrics.', 'hy': 'Լռիկները պարունակում են կրկնօրինակ կաղապարներ, որոնք կապված են իրենց ուղեկցող երաժշտության մեջ գտնվող կրկնօրինակների հետ: Repetitions in song texts have been shown to enable lyrics segmentation - a fundamental prerequisite of automatically detecting the building blocks (e.g. chorus, verse) of a song text.  Այս հոդվածի մեջ մենք բարելավում ենք արտահայտության տեխնոլոգիաների սեգմետրացիայի վերաբերյալ՝ կիրառելով համընդհանուր նյարդային ցանց այս խնդրի համար, և փորձելով նոր հատկությունների հետ որպես քայլ դեպի ավելի խորը մարկառուցվածքային արտահայտություն:', 'am': 'በሙዚቃ ውስጥ በተገኘው በሙዚቃ ላይ በተደጋገመ የተደጋገመ ሥርዓቶች ይኖራል፡፡ የቅኔ ጽሑፎች መተላለፊያ - የቅድሚያ ጽሑፎች (ለምሳሌ ኮሮስ፣ verse) የቅኔ ጽሑፍ ማግኘት የዋና ጉዳይ ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ጽሑፍ ውስጥ የልዩ አርማዊ መረብ ወደ ስራቱ በመጠቀም እና የረኀብ ፈተና ወደ ጥልቅ የድምፅ ግንኙነት ለመግለጥ የሚደርስ ደረጃን እናሳድጋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Sözlərdə həmçin in birlikdə bulunan müziklərlə əlaqə edilən tekrarlı örtüklər barəsində. Şarkı metinlərində yenilənmələr sözlərin segmentasiyasını fəallaşdırmaq üçün g östərildi - bina bloklarını (məsələn, chorus, verse) avtomatik olaraq tanıtmaq üçün əsas tərzi. Bu məsələdə, sözlərin segmentasiyasındakı məsələlərdə mükəmməllik nöral şəbəkəsini bu işə uygulayaraq, və sözlərin daha derin makrostruktur keşfininə bir adım olaraq yeni məsələlər ilə imtahana çəkirik.', 'bs': 'Tekst sadrži ponavljane uzorke koje su povezani sa ponavljanjem nađenim u muzici koje prate. Pokazano je ponovljanje teksta pjesme kako bi omogućilo segmentaciju teksta - osnovno predviđenje automatskog otkrivanja blokova zgrade (npr. chorus, stih) teksta pjesme. U ovom članku poboljšavamo stanje umjetnosti u segmentaciji tekstova primjenjujući konvolucionalnu neuralnu mrežu na zadatak, i eksperimentiramo sa novim karakteristikama kao korak ka dubljoj otkrivanju tekstova makrostrukture.', 'bn': 'গানের মধ্যে পুনরাবার প্যাটার আছে যা তাদের সঙ্গে সঙ্গীতের পুনরাবৃত্তির সাথে যোগাযোগ রয়েছে। গানের টেক্সটে প্রতিক্রিয়া দেখা যাচ্ছে গানের বিভাগ সক্রিয় করার জন্য - একটি গান টেক্সটের বিল্ডিং ব্লক (উদাহরণস্বরূপ, কোরাস, ভাষায়) প্রথম প্রযো In this article we improve on the state-of-the-art in lyrics segmentation by applying a convolutional neural network to the task, and experiment with novel features as a step towards deeper macrostructure detection of lyrics.', 'ca': "Les lletres contén patrons repetits que correlacionen amb les repeticions que troben a la música que acompanyen. S'ha demostrat que les repeticions en els textos de cançó permeten la segmentació de les lletres - un precís fonamental per detectar automàticament els blocs de construcció (per exemple cor, versos) d'un text de cançó. En aquest article millorem la segmentació de la lletra en aplicant una xarxa neural convolutiva a la tasca, i experimentem amb noves característiques com un pas cap a una detecció més profunda de la lletra en macroestructura.", 'cs': 'Texty obsahují opakované vzory, které jsou korelovány s opakováními nalezenými v hudbě, kterou doprovázejí. Opakování v textech písní umožňuje segmentaci textů, což je základní předpoklad automatické detekce stavebních bloků (např. sbor, verš) textu písně. V tomto článku zlepšujeme stav v segmentaci textů aplikací konvoluční neuronové sítě na úlohu a experimentujeme s novými funkcemi jako krok k hlubší detekci makrostruktury textů.', 'et': 'Sõnad sisaldavad korduvaid mustreid, mis on seotud nendega kaasnevas muusikas leiduvate kordustega. On näidatud, et laulutekstide kordused võimaldavad sõnade segmenteerimist, mis on oluline eeldus lauluteksti koostisosade (nt koor, salm) automaatseks tuvastamiseks. Käesolevas artiklis täiustame sõnade segmenteerimise tipptasemel, rakendades ülesandele konvolutsioonilist närvivõrku ning katsetame uudseid funktsioone sammuna sõnade makrostruktuuri sügavama tuvastamise suunas.', 'fi': 'Lyrics sisältää toistuvia kuvioita, jotka korreloivat niiden mukana tulevassa musiikissa esiintyvien toistojen kanssa. Kappaletekstien toistojen on osoitettu mahdollistavan sanoitusten segmentoinnin, mikä on olennainen edellytys kappaleen tekstin rakennuspalikoiden (esim. kertosäkeen, säkeen) automaattiselle havaitsemiselle. Tässä artikkelissa parannamme sanoitusten segmentoinnin huipputasoa soveltamalla tehtävään konvolutionaalista neuroverkkoa ja kokeilemme uusia ominaisuuksia askeleena kohti syvempää sanoitusten makrorakenteen havaitsemista.', 'ha': "Lirar na ƙunsa da zaɓallin da aka sake koma da waɗanda aka girmama da dubu da aka gane cikin musiki da su sami da shi. An nuna Repositori cikin matsalan sunan dõmin a fara juyin-segment wa lyanni - wani muhimu na wajen gane block farat ɗaya (misali, korrus, versa) wa matsayin sunan. A cikin wannan makala, Munã ƙara kyauta kan halin-sanar cikin linsafi da za'a sami wata shirin neural zuwa aikin, kuma masu jarraba da littafin nan kamar wata hanyoyi zuwa inda ke iya ƙaranci ga ganin littafan.", 'he': 'המילים מכילים דפוסים חוזרים שקשורים לחזרות שמוצאות במוזיקה שהם לווהים. Repetitions in song texts have been shown to enable lyrics segmentation - a fundamental prerequisite of automatically detecting the building blocks (e.g. chorus, verse) of a song text.  במאמר הזה אנחנו משתפרים על המצב המאודם במחלקת מילים על ידי שימוש רשת עצבית משתנה למשימה, וניסוי עם תכונות חדשות כצעד לכיוון זיהוי מקרומבנה עמוק יותר של מילים.', 'sk': 'Besedila vsebujejo ponavljajoče se vzorce, ki so povezani s ponovitvami, ki jih najdemo v glasbi, ki jo spremljajo. Ponovitve besedil pesmi so pokazale, da omogočajo segmentacijo besedil - temeljni predpogoj za samodejno zaznavanje gradnikov (npr. zbor, verz) besedila pesmi. V tem članku bomo izboljšali najsodobnejšo segmentacijo besedil z uporabo konvolucijskega nevronskega omrežja za nalogo in eksperimentirali z novimi funkcijami kot korak k globljemu odkrivanju makrostrukture besedil.', 'bo': 'ཐིག་རིམ་ནང་དུ་འདི་དག་གི་རོལ་དབྱངས་ནང་དུ་མཉམ་དུ་བསྐྱར་མཐུན་ཡོད་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཙམ་ཡོད། གླེང་མོལ་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་གི་བསྐྱར་འཇུག་སྟངས་ལ་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་གཏོང་རིམ་སྟོན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདིའི་ནང་གི་གནས་སྟངས་གཙོ་རིམ་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་ལྟར་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ནང་དུ་འཇུག', 'jv': 'Genjer-genjer sing wis digawe nggo ngerasakno sing digawe karo pembalkanan sing dumateng neng musik sing berarti. Layout Nang artiklé iki kita luwih nglanggar stad-of-the-arts ning segregasi nggambar kelas kuwi nggawe netah corvoluksi sing dadi nggawe gerakan, lan surutan karo perusahaan kelas kuwi basa sing katêpakan karo akeh macrottruktur dumadhi kanggo nguasai nggambar kelas'}
{'en': 'Farewell Freebase : Migrating the SimpleQuestions Dataset to DBpedia', 'fr': 'Farewell Freebase\xa0: Migration du jeu de données SimpleQuestions vers DBpedia', 'pt': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrando o conjunto de dados SimpleQuestions para DBpedia', 'ar': 'Farewell Freebase: ترحيل مجموعة بيانات SimpleQuestions إلى DBpedia', 'es': 'Farewell Freebase: Migración del conjunto de datos SimpleQuestions a DBpedia', 'zh': 'åˆ«è‡ªç”±åŸºåœ°,ç§»SimpleQuestionsæ•°é›†DBpedia', 'ja': 'さらばフリーベース: SimpleQuestionsデータセットをDBpediaに移行する', 'hi': 'विदाई Freebase: DBpedia करने के लिए SimpleQuestions डेटासेट माइग्रेटिंग', 'ru': 'Прощай Freebase: Перенос набора данных SimpleQuestions в DBpedia', 'ga': 'Slán Freebase: An Tacar Sonraí Ceisteanna Simplí a Ascnamh go DBpedia', 'ka': 'მარტივი FreeBase: განსაზღვრებული კითხვების მონაცემების DBpedia- ში მიგრატირება', 'hu': 'Búcsú Freebase: A SimpleQuestions adatkészlet áttelepítése DBpedia-ra', 'el': 'Μετανάστευση του συνόλου δεδομένων SimpleQuestions στη DBpedia', 'it': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrazione del set di dati SimpleQuestions a DBpedia', 'lt': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrating the SimpleQuestions Dataset to DBpedia', 'ms': 'Pangkalan Bebas Selamat tinggal: Memindahkan Set Data soalan Mudah ke DBpedia', 'kk': 'Қарапайым Сұрақтар деректер қорын DBpedia ға көшірмелеу', 'ml': 'ഗുഡ് ഫ്രീബേസ്: എളുപ്പമായ ഡേറ്റാസറ്റ് ഡിബിപെഡിയായി മാറ്റുന്നുQuestions Dataset', 'no': 'Farleg Freebase: Flyttar enkelt spørsmål- databasen til DBpedia', 'pl': 'Farewell Freebase: Migracja zestawu danych SimpleQuestions do DBpedia', 'mk': 'Збогум слободна база: Миграција на датотеката за едноставни прашања во DBpedia', 'mt': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrating the SimpleQuestions Dataset to DBpedia', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්න දත්ත සැකසුම් DBpedia වෙනුවෙන්.', 'mn': 'Алга ташилтай Freebase: энгийн асуулт өгөгдлийг DBpedia руу шилжүүлж', 'sv': 'Farväl Freebase: Migrera SimpleQuestions dataset till DBpedia', 'ta': 'வணக்கமான இலவச வெளியீடு: எளிய கேள்விகளை DBpedia க்கு நகர்த்தல்Query Dataset', 'ur': 'Farewell Freebase: Simple Questions Dataset to DBpedia', 'sr': 'Zbogom, slobodna baza: Migriranje datoteka jednostavnih pitanja u DBpedia', 'ro': 'Adio Freebase: Migrarea setului de date SimpleQuestions la DBpedia', 'so': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrating the Simple Questions Dataset to DBpedia', 'vi': 'Vĩnh biệt miễn dịch: Chuyển qua các đơn giản Chạy ảnh (Đơn giản).', 'uz': 'Questions Dataset to DBpedia', 'da': 'Farvel Freebase: Migrere SimpleQuestions datasættet til DBpedia', 'bg': 'Сбогом Фрийбаза: Миграция на набор от данни от прости въпроси към DBpedia', 'de': 'Farewell Freebase: Migration des SimpleQuestions Datasets nach DBpedia', 'hr': 'Zbogom, slobodna baza: Migriranje datuma jednostavnih pitanja na DBpedia', 'id': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrating the SimpleQuestions Dataset to DBpedia', 'nl': 'Farewell Freebase: de SimpleQuestions Dataset migreren naar DBpedia', 'sw': 'Kusafiria Uhuru: Kuhamia Simu Questions Dataset to DBpedia', 'af': 'Verdere Freebase: Migreer die Eenvoudige Vrag Databasis na DBpedia', 'ko': 'Freebase 종료: SimpleQuestions 데이터 세트를 DBpedia로 마이그레이션', 'am': 'Questions Dataset to DBpedia', 'fa': 'پایگاه آزادی خداحافظ: تغییر داده\u200cهای سؤال ساده به DBpedia', 'tr': "Dereje Freebaz: Besitler Soraglaryň Maglumatyny DBpedia'a göçürip", 'sq': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrating the Simple Questions Dataset to DBpedia', 'bs': 'Zbogom, slobodna baza: Migriranje datuma jednostavnih pitanja u DBpedia', 'ca': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrar el conjunt de dades de preguntes senzilles a DBpedia', 'cs': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrace datové sady SimpleQuestions do DBpedie', 'hy': 'Farewell Freebase: Migrating the SimpleQuestions Dataset to DBpedia', 'az': 'Uzaqlıq Freebase: Basit Sorgular Verici DBpediaya göndərilir', 'bn': 'বিদায় ফ্রিবেস: সাধারণ প্রশ্নের ডাটা মাইগ্রেট করা হচ্ছে DBpedia', 'et': 'Hüvasti Freebase: SimpleQuestions andmekogumi migreerimine DBpediasse', 'fi': 'Hyvästi Freebase: SimpleQuestions Datasetin siirtäminen DBpediaan', 'sk': 'Zbogom Freebase: selitev nabora podatkov SimpleQuestions v DBpedia', 'ha': 'QFontDatabase', 'jv': 'text-tool-action', 'he': 'פרידה בסיס חופשי: להעביר את קבוצת נתונים של שאלות פשוטות לדי-בי-פדיה', 'bo': 'ཕྱིར་བསྐྱོད་མེད་པའི་རང་དབང་: DBpedia་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འཚོལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་སྐུར་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Question answering over knowledge graphs is an important problem of interest both commercially and academically. There is substantial interest in the class of natural language questions that can be answered via the lookup of a single fact, driven by the availability of the popular SimpleQuestions dataset. The problem with this dataset, however, is that answer triples are provided from Freebase, which has been defunct for several years. As a result, it is difficult to build real-world question answering systems that are operationally deployable. Furthermore, a defunct knowledge graph means that much of the infrastructure for querying, browsing, and manipulating triples no longer exists. To address this problem, we present SimpleDBpediaQA, a new benchmark dataset for simple question answering over knowledge graphs that was created by mapping SimpleQuestions entities and predicates from Freebase to DBpedia. Although this mapping is conceptually straightforward, there are a number of nuances that make the task non-trivial, owing to the different conceptual organizations of the two knowledge graphs. To lay the foundation for future research using this dataset, we leverage recent work to provide simple yet strong baselines with and without neural networks.', 'ar': 'تعد الإجابة عن الأسئلة على الرسوم البيانية المعرفية مشكلة مهمة ذات أهمية تجارية وأكاديمية. هناك اهتمام كبير بفئة أسئلة اللغة الطبيعية التي يمكن الإجابة عليها من خلال البحث عن حقيقة واحدة ، مدفوعًا بتوافر مجموعة بيانات SimpleQuestions الشائعة. ومع ذلك ، تكمن مشكلة مجموعة البيانات هذه في أن ثلاثيات الإجابات متوفرة من Freebase ، والتي توقفت منذ عدة سنوات. نتيجة لذلك ، من الصعب بناء أنظمة للإجابة على الأسئلة في "العالم الحقيقي" تكون قابلة للنشر تشغيليًا. علاوة على ذلك ، يعني الرسم البياني المعرفي البائد أن الكثير من البنية التحتية للاستعلام والتصفح والتعامل مع الثلاثيات لم يعد موجودًا. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقدم SimpleDBpediaQA ، مجموعة بيانات معيارية جديدة لسؤال بسيط يجيب على الرسوم البيانية المعرفية التي تم إنشاؤها عن طريق تعيين كيانات SimpleQuestions والمسندات من Freebase إلى DBpedia. على الرغم من أن هذا التعيين واضح من الناحية المفاهيمية ، إلا أن هناك عددًا من الفروق الدقيقة التي تجعل المهمة غير تافهة ، بسبب المنظمات المفاهيمية المختلفة للرسمين البيانيين المعرفيين. لوضع الأساس للبحث المستقبلي باستخدام مجموعة البيانات هذه ، نستفيد من العمل الأخير لتوفير خطوط أساس بسيطة لكنها قوية مع وبدون شبكات عصبية.', 'pt': 'A resposta a perguntas sobre gráficos de conhecimento é um importante problema de interesse comercial e acadêmico. Há um interesse substancial na classe de perguntas de linguagem natural que podem ser respondidas por meio da pesquisa de um único fato, impulsionado pela disponibilidade do popular conjunto de dados SimpleQuestions. O problema com esse conjunto de dados, no entanto, é que as triplas de resposta são fornecidas pelo Freebase, que está desativado há vários anos. Como resultado, é difícil construir sistemas de resposta a perguntas do “mundo real” que sejam operacionalmente implantáveis. Além disso, um gráfico de conhecimento extinto significa que grande parte da infraestrutura para consulta, navegação e manipulação de triplos não existe mais. Para resolver esse problema, apresentamos o SimpleDBpediaQA, um novo conjunto de dados de referência para respostas a perguntas simples sobre gráficos de conhecimento que foi criado pelo mapeamento de entidades e predicados SimpleQuestions do Freebase para o DBpedia. Embora esse mapeamento seja conceitualmente direto, há uma série de nuances que tornam a tarefa não trivial, devido às diferentes organizações conceituais dos dois grafos de conhecimento. Para estabelecer as bases para pesquisas futuras usando esse conjunto de dados, aproveitamos o trabalho recente para fornecer linhas de base simples, mas fortes, com e sem redes neurais.', 'es': 'La respuesta a preguntas sobre gráficos de conocimiento es un problema importante de interés tanto comercial como académico. Existe un interés sustancial en la clase de preguntas de lenguaje natural que pueden responderse mediante la búsqueda de un solo hecho, impulsado por la disponibilidad del popular conjunto de datos SimpleQuestions. El problema con este conjunto de datos, sin embargo, es que Freebase proporciona respuestas triples, que ha estado inactivo durante varios años. Como resultado, es difícil construir sistemas de respuesta a preguntas del «mundo real» que se puedan implementar operativamente. Además, un gráfico de conocimiento desaparecido significa que gran parte de la infraestructura para consultar, navegar y manipular triples ya no existe. Para abordar este problema, presentamos SimpleDBPediaqa, un nuevo conjunto de datos de referencia para responder preguntas simples sobre gráficos de conocimiento que se creó mapeando entidades y predicados de SimpleQuestions de Freebase a DBpedia. Aunque este mapeo es conceptualmente sencillo, hay una serie de matices que hacen que la tarea no sea trivial, debido a las diferentes organizaciones conceptuales de los dos gráficos de conocimiento. Para sentar las bases para futuras investigaciones que utilicen este conjunto de datos, aprovechamos el trabajo reciente para proporcionar líneas de base simples pero sólidas con y sin redes neuronales.', 'fr': "La réponse aux questions sur les graphiques de connaissances est un problème important d'intérêt tant sur le plan commercial que académique. La classe de questions en langage naturel auxquelles il est possible de répondre via la recherche d'un seul fait suscite un intérêt considérable, grâce à la disponibilité du jeu de données populaire SimpleQuestions. Le problème avec ce jeu de données, cependant, est que les triplets de réponses sont fournis par Freebase, qui n'existe plus depuis plusieurs années. Par conséquent, il est difficile de créer des systèmes de réponse aux questions «\xa0réels\xa0» qui soient déployables de manière opérationnelle. De plus, un graphe de connaissances obsolète signifie qu'une grande partie de l'infrastructure d'interrogation, de navigation et de manipulation des triplets n'existe plus. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous présentons SimpleDBPediaQA, un nouveau jeu de données de référence pour répondre à des questions simples sur des graphes de connaissances qui a été créé en mappant des entités et des prédicats SimpleQuestions de Freebase à DBpedia. Bien que ce mappage soit simple sur le plan conceptuel, il existe un certain nombre de nuances qui rendent la tâche non triviale, en raison des organisations conceptuelles différentes des deux graphes de connaissances. Pour jeter les bases de recherches futures à l'aide de cet ensemble de données, nous nous appuyons sur des travaux récents pour fournir des bases de référence simples mais solides avec et sans réseaux de neurones.", 'ja': '知識グラフを用いて質問に答えることは、商業的にも学術的にも重要な問題です。 人気のあるSimpleQuestionsデータセットの利用可能性によって、単一の事実を調べることで回答できる自然言語の質問のクラスには大きな関心があります。 しかし、このデータセットの問題は、数年前に廃止されたFreebaseから3つの回答が提供されていることです。 その結果、運用上展開可能な「現実世界」の質問回答システムを構築することは困難である。 さらに、廃止されたナレッジグラフは、クエリ、閲覧、およびトリプルの操作のためのインフラストラクチャの多くがもはや存在しないことを意味します。 この問題に対処するために、SimpleQuestionsエンティティと述語をFreebaseからDBpediaにマッピングして作成された、ナレッジグラフ上の単純な質問に答えるための新しいベンチマークデータセットであるSimpleDBpediaQAを提示します。 このマッピングは概念的には単純であるが、2つの知識グラフの異なる概念組織のために、タスクを軽微ではないものにするいくつかのニュアンスがある。 このデータセットを使用した将来の研究の基礎を築くために、私たちは最近の研究を活用して、ニューラルネットワークの有無にかかわらず、単純だが強力なベースラインを提供しています。', 'hi': 'ज्ञान रेखांकन पर प्रश्न का उत्तर देना व्यावसायिक और अकादमिक रूप से ब्याज की एक महत्वपूर्ण समस्या है। प्राकृतिक भाषा के प्रश्नों के वर्ग में पर्याप्त रुचि है जिसका उत्तर एक तथ्य के लुकअप के माध्यम से दिया जा सकता है, जो लोकप्रिय SimpleQuestions डेटासेट की उपलब्धता से प्रेरित है। हालांकि, इस डेटासेट के साथ समस्या यह है कि उत्तर ट्रिपल फ्रीबेस से प्रदान किए जाते हैं, जो कई वर्षों से निष्क्रिय है। नतीजतन, "वास्तविक दुनिया" प्रश्न का उत्तर देने वाली प्रणालियों का निर्माण करना मुश्किल है जो परिचालन रूप से तैनाती योग्य हैं। इसके अलावा, एक निष्क्रिय ज्ञान ग्राफ का मतलब है कि क्वेरी, ब्राउज़िंग और ट्रिपल में हेरफेर करने के लिए अधिकांश बुनियादी ढांचे अब मौजूद नहीं हैं। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम SimpleDBpediaQA, ज्ञान रेखांकन पर सरल प्रश्न का उत्तर देने के लिए एक नया बेंचमार्क डेटासेट प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो Freebase से DBpedia तक SimpleQuestions संस्थाओं और predicates को मैप करके बनाया गया था। यद्यपि यह मानचित्रण वैचारिक रूप से सीधा है, लेकिन कई बारीकियां हैं जो दो ज्ञान रेखांकन के विभिन्न वैचारिक संगठनों के कारण कार्य को गैर-तुच्छ बनाती हैं। इस डेटासेट का उपयोग करके भविष्य के शोध के लिए नींव रखने के लिए, हम तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ और बिना सरल अभी तक मजबूत बेसलाइन प्रदान करने के लिए हाल के काम का लाभ उठाते हैं।', 'zh': '图谱问者,商学之要也。 人有大兴于自然语言类者,以求其实对,此流行之SimpleQuestions数集之可用性驱也。 然此数集之问,三元组是由Freebase供,Freebase停业数年矣。 故难为部署真实世界问答系统。 此外失效之知图谱意在询览操作三元组之大体,结构将不复存。 为此问者,发其SimpleDBpediaQA,此一新之基准数集也,以图谱问对,将SimpleQuestions实体与谓词Freebase映DBpedia而创也。 虽在二者,二图谱不同,故多细微差别不凡。 为未来用此数集之论定基本,吾因近事以资简强之基线,有和无神经网络。', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы по графикам знаний представляют собой важную проблему, представляющую интерес как с коммерческой, так и с академической точек зрения. Существует значительный интерес к классу вопросов естественного языка, на которые можно ответить с помощью поиска одного факта, обусловленного наличием популярного набора данных SimpleQuestions. Проблема с этим набором данных, однако, заключается в том, что тройные ответы предоставляются из Freebase, которая не существует в течение нескольких лет. В результате трудно построить системы ответов на вопросы "реального мира", которые можно было бы оперативно развернуть. Кроме того, несуществующий граф знаний означает, что большая часть инфраструктуры для запроса, просмотра и манипулирования тройками больше не существует. Чтобы решить эту проблему, мы представляем SimpleDBpediaQA, новый набор контрольных данных для ответа на простой вопрос по графам знаний, который был создан путем сопоставления сущностей и предикатов SimpleQuestions из Freebase в DBpedia. Хотя это отображение концептуально простое, существует ряд нюансов, которые делают задачу нетривиальной из-за различий в концептуальных структурах двух графиков знаний. Чтобы заложить основу для будущих исследований с использованием этого набора данных, мы используем недавнюю работу, чтобы обеспечить простые, но сильные базовые линии с нейронными сетями и без них.', 'ga': 'Is fadhb spéise tráchtála agus acadúil araon é ceisteanna a fhreagairt thar ghraif eolais. Tá suim shuntasach sa rang ceisteanna teanga nádúrtha is féidir a fhreagairt trí fhíric amháin a chuardach, á thiomáint ag infhaighteacht an tacair sonraí coitianta SimpleQuestions. Is í an fhadhb leis an tacar sonraí seo, áfach, ná go soláthraítear triarach freagraí ó Freebase, atá as feidhm le roinnt blianta anuas. Mar thoradh air sin, tá sé deacair córais freagartha ceisteanna “dáiríre” a thógáil atá in-imscartha go hoibríochtúil. Ina theannta sin, ciallaíonn graf eolais atá easnamhach nach bhfuil go leor den bhonneagar chun fiosrú, brabhsáil agus ionramháil triples ann a thuilleadh. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an bhfadhb seo, cuirimid i láthair SimpleDBpediaQA, tacar sonraí tagarmharcála nua le haghaidh freagraí ceisteanna simplí thar ghraif eolais a cruthaíodh trí aonáin agus réamh-mheastacháin SimpleQuestions a mhapáil ó Freebase go DBpedia. Cé go bhfuil an léarscáiliú seo simplí ó thaobh coincheapa de, tá roinnt nuances ann a fhágann nach fánach an tasc, mar gheall ar na heagraíochtaí coincheapúla éagsúla atá sa dá ghraf eolais. Chun an bonn a leagan síos do thaighde amach anseo ag baint úsáide as an tacar sonraí seo, bainimid úsáid as obair le déanaí chun bonnlínte simplí ach láidir a sholáthar le líonraí néaracha agus gan iad.', 'el': 'Η απάντηση ερωτήσεων πάνω από γραφήματα γνώσης είναι ένα σημαντικό πρόβλημα ενδιαφέροντος τόσο εμπορικά όσο και ακαδημαϊκά. Υπάρχει ουσιαστικό ενδιαφέρον για την κατηγορία των ερωτήσεων φυσικής γλώσσας που μπορούν να απαντηθούν μέσω της αναζήτησης ενός μοναδικού γεγονότος, οδηγημένος από τη διαθεσιμότητα του δημοφιλούς συνόλου δεδομένων SimpleQuestions. Το πρόβλημα με αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων, ωστόσο, είναι ότι παρέχονται τριπλή απαντήσεις από το Freebase, το οποίο έχει καταργηθεί εδώ και αρκετά χρόνια. Ως αποτέλεσμα, είναι δύσκολο να κατασκευαστούν συστήματα απαντήσεων σε ερωτήσεις "πραγματικού κόσμου" που είναι λειτουργικά εφαρμόσιμα. Επιπλέον, ένα γράφημα που έχει καταργηθεί σημαίνει ότι μεγάλο μέρος της υποδομής για την αναζήτηση, την περιήγηση και τον χειρισμό τριπλών δεν υπάρχει πλέον. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το πρόβλημα, παρουσιάζουμε το ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων αναφοράς για την απλή απάντηση ερωτήσεων μέσω γραφικών γνώσεων που δημιουργήθηκε με τη χαρτογράφηση οντοτήτων και predicats SimpleQuestions από τη Freebase στη DBpedia. Αν και αυτή η χαρτογράφηση είναι εννοιολογικά απλή, υπάρχουν αρκετές αποχρώσεις που καθιστούν το έργο μη-ασήμαντο, λόγω των διαφορετικών εννοιολογικών οργανώσεων των δύο γραφημάτων γνώσης. Για να θέσουμε τα θεμέλια για μελλοντική έρευνα χρησιμοποιώντας αυτό το σύνολο δεδομένων, αξιοποιούμε πρόσφατες εργασίες για να παρέχουμε απλές αλλά ισχυρές βάσεις βάσης με και χωρίς νευρωνικά δίκτυα.', 'it': 'La risposta alle domande sui grafici della conoscenza è un importante problema di interesse sia commerciale che accademico. C\'è un notevole interesse per la classe di domande di linguaggio naturale a cui è possibile rispondere tramite la ricerca di un singolo fatto, guidato dalla disponibilità del popolare set di dati SimpleQuestions. Il problema con questo set di dati, tuttavia, è che le risposte triple sono fornite da Freebase, che è stato spento per diversi anni. Di conseguenza, è difficile costruire sistemi di risposta alle domande "reali" che siano implementati operativamente. Inoltre, un grafico della conoscenza defunto significa che gran parte dell\'infrastruttura per interrogare, navigare e manipolare i tripli non esiste più. Per risolvere questo problema, presentiamo SimpleDBpediaQA, un nuovo set di dati di benchmark per la semplice risposta alle domande su grafici di conoscenza creato mappando entità SimpleQuestions e predicati da Freebase a DBpedia. Anche se questa mappatura è concettualmente semplice, ci sono una serie di sfumature che rendono il compito non banale, a causa delle diverse organizzazioni concettuali dei due grafici della conoscenza. Per gettare le basi per la ricerca futura utilizzando questo set di dati, sfruttiamo il lavoro recente per fornire linee di base semplici ma forti con e senza reti neurali.', 'kk': 'Білім графиктерінің жауап беру сұрақ - коммерциялық және академикалық қызықтың маңызды мәселесі. Табиғи тілдер сұрақтарының класында жауап беруге мүмкін, бір факты іздеу арқылы, көпшілікті Қарапайым Сұрақтар деректер жиынының мүмкіндігі арқылы жауап беруге болады. Бұл деректер қорларының мәселесі - бірнеше жылдар бойынша бұл Freebase- дан үш жауап берілген жұмыс. Сонымен, \'шын әлем\' сұрақтар жүйелерін жауап беру қиын. Сонымен қатар, білім график көп инфраструктурасы сұрау, шолу және үш рет өзгерту үшін болмайды дегенді анықтайды. Бұл мәселеге қатынау үшін, SimpleDBpediaQA дегенді таңдаймыз. Бұл мәселеге қарапайым мәлімет графиктеріне жауап беру үшін жаңа белгі деректер жиыны, құрылған "Қарапайым Сұрақтар нысандары" және "Freebase" де Бұл картасының көмегімен қарапайым болса да, екі білім графикасының әртүрлі концептуалдық бағдарламаларының түрлі бағдарламаларына көмегімен тапсырманы үлкен емес жасайтын көптеген көптеген Бұл деректер жиынын қолдану үшін келесі зерттеулердің негізін орнату үшін, жаңа жұмыстарды невралды желілерден жұмыс істеу үшін қарапайым, бірақ күшті негізгі сызы', 'mk': 'Одговорите на прашањата во врска со графиките на знаење претставуваат важен проблем на интерес, како комерцијално, така и академски. Постои значителен интерес за класата на природни прашања на јазик кои може да се одговори преку барање на еден факт, поттикнат од достапноста на популарниот компјутер податоци за SimpleQuestions. Проблемот со овој компјутер на податоци, сепак, е дека одговорите трипати се обезбедени од Freebase, која е дефункционирана неколку години. Како резултат на тоа, тешко е да се изградат системи за одговори на прашањата на „реалниот свет“ кои се оперативно распоредливи. Покрај тоа, дефункционираниот граф на знаење значи дека голем дел од инфраструктурата за испрашување, прелистување и манипулирање на трипати повеќе не постои. За да го решиме овој проблем, го претставуваме SimpleDBpediaQA, нов набор на податоци за benchmark за едноставно одговорување на прашања во врска со графиките на знаење кои беа создадени со мапирање на ентитетите на SimpleQuestions и predicates од Freebase до DBpedia. Иако оваа мапа е концептуално едноставна, постојат неколку нијанси кои ја прават задачата непривијална, поради различните концептуални организации на двата знања графики. За да поставиме основа за идното истражување користејќи го овој податок, ние ја искористуваме неодамнешната работа за да обезбедиме едноставни, но силни основни линии со и без неурални мрежи.', 'lt': 'Question answering over knowledge graphs is an important problem of interest both commercially and academically.  There is substantial interest in the class of natural language questions that can be answered via the lookup of a single fact, driven by the availability of the popular SimpleQuestions dataset.  The problem with this dataset, however, is that answer triples are provided from Freebase, which has been defunct for several years.  Todėl sunku sukurti "realaus pasaulio" klausimų atsakymo sistemas, kurios būtų eksploatuojamos. Be to, nepakankama žinių grafika reiškia, kad dauguma infrastruktūros, skirtos užklausoms, naršymui ir trijų rūšių manipuliavimui, nebeegzistuoja. Siekdami išspręsti šią problem ą, pristatysime SimpleDBpediaQA, naują lyginamąjį duomenų rinkinį, skirtą paprastam klausimui atsakyti dėl žinių grafikų, sukurtų mapuojant SimpleQuestions subjektus ir predikatus nuo Freebase iki DBpedia. Although this mapping is conceptually straightforward, there are a number of nuances that make the task non-trivial, owing to the different conceptual organizations of the two knowledge graphs.  To lay the foundation for future research using this dataset, we leverage recent work to provide simple yet strong baselines with and without neural networks.', 'ml': 'അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യം കച്ചവടത്തിലും അകാക്കിഡിമിക്കലിലും താല്\u200dപര്യമുള്ള സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ക്ലാസ്സില്\u200d വലിയ താല്\u200dപര്യമുണ്ട്. ഒരു സത്യത്തെ തിരയുന്നതിലൂടെ ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നു. പ്ര എന്നാലും ഈ ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം ഫ്രെയ്ബാസില്\u200d നിന്നും മറുപടി മൂന്നിരട്ടി നല്\u200dകപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത അതിന്റെ ഫലമായി, "യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്ത്" ചോദ്യം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് വളരെ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാണ്. പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപരമായി വിട്ടുപ അതിനുശേഷം, ഒരു വിവരമില്ലാത്ത അറിവുകളുടെ ഗ്രാഫ് എന്നാണ് ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത്, അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത്, ബ്രൌസ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനും മൂന് ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d എളുപ്പമുള്ള ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ഡേറ്റായി സൃഷ്ടിച്ച ജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ ഗ്രാഫുകള്\u200dക്ക് മറുപടി നല്\u200dകുന ഈ മാപ്പിങ്ങ് നേരെയാണെങ്കിലും നേരെയാണെങ്കിലും, രണ്ട് അറിവുള്ള ഗ്രാഫുകളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ആശയങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് കാരണം ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന് ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഭാവിയുടെ പരിശോധനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിനായി അടിസ്ഥാനം വെക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള ജോ', 'mt': 'It-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet dwar il-grafiċi tal-għarfien hija problema importanti ta’ interess kemm kummerċjalment kif ukoll akkademikament. Hemm interess sostanzjali fil-klassi ta’ mistoqsijiet lingwistiċi naturali li jistgħu jitwieġbu permezz tat-tfittxija ta’ fatt wieħed, xprunat mid-disponibbiltà tad-dataset popolari ta’ Mistoqsijiet Simpli. Il-problema b’dan is-sett ta’ dejta, madankollu, hija li t-tliet tweġibiet huma pprovduti minn Freebase, li ilha ma taħdimx għal bosta snin. B’riżultat ta’ dan, huwa diffiċli li jinbnew sistemi ta’ tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet “dinja reali” li jistgħu jintużaw b’mod operazzjonali. Furthermore, a defunct knowledge graph means that much of the infrastructure for querying, browsing, and manipulating triples no longer exists.  To address this problem, we present SimpleDBpediaQA, a new benchmark dataset for simple question answering over knowledge graphs that was created by mapping SimpleQuestions entities and predicates from Freebase to DBpedia.  Although this mapping is conceptually straightforward, there are a number of nuances that make the task non-trivial, owing to the different conceptual organizations of the two knowledge graphs.  Biex nibqgħu l-pedamenti għar-riċerka futura permezz ta’ dan is-sett ta’ dejta, aħna nħeġġu l-ħidma reċenti biex nipprovdu linji bażi sempliċi iżda b’saħħithom ma’ u mingħajr netwerks newrali.', 'ms': "Jawapan soalan mengenai graf pengetahuan adalah masalah penting yang berminat secara komersial dan akademik. Terdapat kepentingan yang besar dalam kelas soalan bahasa semulajadi yang boleh dijawab melalui mencari fakta tunggal, dipandu oleh kemampuan set data SimpleQuestions populer. Masalah dengan set data ini, bagaimanapun, adalah jawapan tiga kali disediakan dari Freebase, yang telah dilumpuhkan selama beberapa tahun. Sebagai hasilnya, sukar untuk membina sistem jawapan soalan 'dunia-nyata' yang boleh digunakan secara operasional. Lagipun, graf pengetahuan tidak berfungsi bermakna sebahagian besar infrastruktur untuk menanyai, melayar, dan memanipulasi tiga kali tidak lagi wujud. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami perkenalkan SimpleDBpediaQA, set data benchmark baru untuk pertanyaan mudah yang menjawab atas graf pengetahuan yang dicipta dengan memetakan entiti SimpleQuestions dan predikat dari Freebase ke DBpedia. Although this mapping is conceptually straightforward, there are a number of nuances that make the task non-trivial, owing to the different conceptual organizations of the two knowledge graphs.  Untuk meletakkan dasar untuk kajian masa depan menggunakan set data ini, kami menggunakan kerja baru-baru ini untuk menyediakan garis dasar mudah tetapi kuat dengan dan tanpa rangkaian saraf.", 'hu': 'A tudásdiagramokkal kapcsolatos kérdések megválaszolása mind kereskedelmi, mind akadémiai szempontból fontos probléma. Jelentős érdeklődés mutatkozik a természetes nyelvi kérdések osztálya iránt, amelyekre egyetlen tény keresésével lehet válaszolni, a népszerű SimpleQuestions adatkészlet elérhetősége következtében. A probléma ezzel az adatkészlettel azonban az, hogy a válaszok háromszorosát a Freebase-tól adja, amely már évek óta leállt. Ennek eredményeképpen nehéz olyan "valós" kérdésrendszereket építeni, amelyek működési szempontból telepíthetők. Továbbá egy lejárt tudásgraf azt jelenti, hogy a háromszoros lekérdezésre, böngészésre és manipulálásra szolgáló infrastruktúra nagy része már nem létezik. A probléma megoldása érdekében bemutatjuk a SimpleDBpediaQA-t, egy új referenciaadatkészletet, amely a SimpleQuestions entitások és predikátumok feltérképezésével készült a Freebase-tól a DBpedia-ig. Bár ez a feltérképezés fogalmilag egyszerű, számos olyan árnyalat van, amely a feladatot nem triviálissá teszi, a két tudásgraf különböző fogalmi szervezetei miatt. Ahhoz, hogy ezt az adatkészletet felhasználó jövőbeli kutatások alapjait lefektessük, kihasználjuk a közelmúltbeli munkákat, hogy egyszerű, mégis erős alapvonalakat biztosítsunk neurális hálózatokkal és anélkül.', 'pl': 'Odpowiedź na pytania za pomocą wykresów wiedzy jest ważnym zainteresowaniem zarówno komercyjnym, jak i akademickim. Istnieje duże zainteresowanie klasą pytań językowych naturalnych, na które można odpowiedzieć za pomocą wyszukiwania pojedynczego faktu, napędzanego dostępnością popularnego zestawu danych SimpleQuestions. Problem z tym zbiorem danych polega jednak na tym, że odpowiedzi trójkrotnie dostarczane są z Freebase, który nie istnieje od kilku lat. W rezultacie trudno jest zbudować "rzeczywiste" systemy odpowiedzi na pytania, które są operacyjnie wdrożone. Co więcej, nieaktualny wykres wiedzy oznacza, że duża część infrastruktury służącej do wyszukiwania pytań, przeglądania i manipulowania trójkątami już nie istnieje. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, przedstawiamy SimpleDBpediQA, nowy zestaw danych odniesienia do prostej odpowiedzi na pytania za pomocą wykresów wiedzy, który został stworzony przez mapowanie jednostek SimpleQuestions i predykatów z Freebase do DBpedia. Chociaż mapowanie to jest koncepcyjnie proste, istnieje szereg niuansów, które sprawiają, że zadanie nie jest trywialne, ze względu na różne organizacje koncepcyjne dwóch wykresów wiedzy. Aby położyć fundament dla przyszłych badań z wykorzystaniem tego zbioru danych, wykorzystujemy ostatnie prace, aby zapewnić proste, ale silne linie bazowe z sieciami neuronowymi i bez nich.', 'ka': 'კითხვა, რომელიც ცნობიერების გრაფიკების შესახებ იყოს მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა, რომელიც კომპორციალურად და აკადემიურად იყოს. ნაირთი ენის კითხვების კლასის მნიშვნელოვანი ინტერესტი აქვს, რომელიც ერთი ფაქტის მონახვა შესაძლებელია, რომელიც პოლიოლური Simple Questions მონაცემების მისამართლობა გამოიყენება. მაგრამ ამ მონაცემების პრობლემა არის ის, რომ სამჯერ პასუხი Freebase-დან დაეხმარებული, რომელიც რამდენიმე წლის განმავლობაში გადატანა. როგორც შედეგი, ძალიან რთულია "რეალური მსოფლიო" კითხვის გასაგების სისტემი, რომლებიც პერაციალურად გამოყენებელია. დამატებით, განსხვავებული მეცნიერების გრაფიკი ნიშნავს, რომ ინფრაქტურაციას კითხვა, ბრაუზების და მანიპულაციის უფრო მეტი არსებობს. ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტილებისთვის, ჩვენ განვითარებთ SimpleDBpediaQA, ახალი ბანქმერის მონაცემების საკითხვების გარეშე, რომელიც განვითარებულია ცნობიერი გრაფიკების შესახებ, რომელიც განვითარებულია მარტი თუმცა ეს კაპრაფიკაცია კონცექტურად უკეთესი, არსებობს რამდენიმე ნუანციები, რომლებიც საქმედება არ გავაკეთებენ, რომლებიც ორი ცნობიერების განსხვავებული კონცექტური ორ თუ მომავალეთ შესაძლებლობისთვის შესაძლებლობისთვის ამ მონაცემების სექტის გამოყენება, ჩვენ მივიღეთ ახალი სამუშაო დავამუშავებთ, რომ უფრო ძალიან მა', 'sr': 'Pitanje za odgovor na znanja grafike je važan problem interesa komercijalno i akademički. Postoji značajan interes u klasi prirodnih pitanja jezika koji se mogu odgovoriti kroz potragu jednog činjenica, koji je vodio dostupnost popularnog seta podataka jednostavnih pitanja. Problem sa tim setom podataka je, međutim, da su trostruki odgovori pruženi iz Freebase-a, koji je odbačen već nekoliko godina. Kao rezultat toga, teško je izgraditi sisteme odgovora na realno-svetsko pitanje koje su operativno raspoređene. Osim toga, defunktivni grafik znanja znači da većina infrastrukture za ispitivanje, pregledanje i manipulaciju trostruka više ne postoji. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, predstavljamo jednostavnu DBpediaQA, novu standardnu podatku za jednostavno pitanje odgovarajući na znanja grafike koje je stvoreno mapiranjem jednostavnih pitanja entiteta i predikata iz Freebase do DBpedia. Iako je ova mapa konceptualno jednostavna, postoji broj nuanca koji čine zadatak nevidljivim, zbog različitih konceptualnih organizacija dva znanja grafika. Da bi stavili temelj za buduće istraživanje koristeći ovaj set podataka, iskorištavali smo nedavni rad kako bi osigurali jednostavne, ali jake osnovne linije i bez neuralnih mreža.', 'si': "දැනගන්න විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ව්\u200dයාපාරික සහ ශික්ෂාවික ව ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක් ඒත් මේ දත්ත සැට් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි ඒ උත්තර තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ෆ්\u200dරීබේස් වලින් දෙන්නේ, ඒක අවුරුදු  ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන්, ඒක අමාරුයි 'ඇත්ත ලෝකය' ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න පද්ධතියක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, ඒක වැ ඉතින්, දැනගත්තා ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් තේරෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නය, බ්\u200dරාව්ජ් කරන්න, හා තුන්ගුන්ගුන්ගුන්ගුන් විසින් වි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය කරන්න, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය DBpediaQA වෙනුවෙන්, අළුත් බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් තොරතුරු සඳහා සරල ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dර නමුත් මේ සැකසුම් සිද්ධියෙන් සිද්ධියෙන් සිද්ධ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ, දැනගැනීම් දෙකක් ග්\u200dරාෆ් වල වෙනස් සංස්ථානයක් නො අනාගතයේ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා මේ දත්ත සැට භාවිත කරන්න, අපි අනාගතයේ වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒත් ශක්තිමත් ප්\u200dරධ", 'so': "su'aalaha ka jawaabta fasaxa aqoontu waa dhibaato muhiim ah oo xiiseha ganacsiga iyo iskuulka. Shaqooyin badan waxaa ku jirta fasalka su'aalaha afka dabiiciga ah oo lagu jawaabi karo raadinta suurtagalka hal dhab ah, kaas oo laga heli karo macluumaadka dawlada ee guud. Si kastaba ha ahaatee dhibaatada la xiriira sawiradan waa in jawaabta sadex jir ah laga soo bixiyaa Freebase, taas oo ay mudo badan ka baabba'day. Sababtaas darteed waa adag tahay in la dhiso su'aalaha ay ka jawaabaan nidaamka ay si shuqul ah u isticmaali karto. Furthermore, a defunct knowledge graph means that much of the infrastructure for querying, browsing, and manipulating triples no longer exists.  Si aan u qabsado dhibaatadan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa SimpleDBpediaQA, taariikhda cusub ee warqada sahlan oo ka jawaabaya sawir ku saabsan sawirada aqoonta oo lagu abuuray kartemidda sawirada ee Simple Questions and predicts from Freebase to DBpedia. In kastoo ay sawirkan si toos ah u tahay, waxaa jira nuug badan oo shaqada ka dhigaya mid aan suurtagal ahayn, sababtoo ah ururada fikrada kala duduwan ee labada sawir ee aqoonta. Si aan u dhigno aasaaska baaritaanka mustaqbalka ah ee isticmaalka taariikhdan, waxaynu u sameynaa shaqada ugu dhowaad si aan u siino shabakado fudud oo aan u lahayn shabakado caqliga ah.", 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări privind graficele de cunoaștere este o problemă importantă de interes atât din punct de vedere comercial, cât și academic. Există un interes substanțial pentru clasa de întrebări de limbaj natural care pot fi răspunse prin căutarea unui singur fapt, condus de disponibilitatea popularului set de date SimpleQuestions. Problema cu acest set de date, totuși, este că răspunsurile triple sunt furnizate de Freebase, care a fost defunct de mai mulți ani. Prin urmare, este dificil să se construiască sisteme de răspuns la întrebări "din lumea reală", care să fie implementate operațional. Mai mult decât atât, un grafic de cunoștințe defunct înseamnă că o mare parte din infrastructura pentru interogarea, navigarea și manipularea triplelor nu mai există. Pentru a rezolva această problemă, vă prezentăm SimpleDBpediaQA, un nou set de date de referință pentru răspunsul simplu la întrebări peste grafice de cunoștințe care a fost creat prin maparea entităților SimpleQuestions și predică de la Freebase la DBpedia. Deși această cartografiere este conceptual simplă, există o serie de nuanțe care fac sarcina non-trivială, datorită organizărilor conceptuale diferite ale celor două grafice de cunoaștere. Pentru a pune bazele cercetărilor viitoare folosind acest set de date, valorificăm munca recentă pentru a oferi linii de bază simple, dar puternice, cu și fără rețele neurale.', 'ta': "Question answering over knowledge graphs is an important problem of interest both commercially and academically.  இயல்பான மொழி கேள்விகளின் வகுப்பில் மிகப்பெரிய வட்டிப்பு இருக்கிறது அது ஒரே உண்மையை தேடுதலால் பதில் அளிக்க முடியும், பிரபரிய பொது இந்த தரவுத்தளத்தில் பிரச்சனை என்னவென்றால், விடை மூன்று முறை கொடுக்கப்படுகிறது, அது பல ஆண்டுகளாக குறைந்துள்ளது. முடிவில், உண்மையான 'உலக' கேள்வியை உருவாக்க கடினமானது செயல்படுத்தக்கூடிய முறைமைகளின் பதில். மேலும், ஒரு முடிவில்லாத அறிவு வரைப்படம் என்றால் கேட்க, உலாவி, மற்றும் மூன்று முயற்சிகளை செயல்படுத்துவதற்கான அடிப்படையில்  இந்த பிரச்சனையை முடிக்க, நாம் எளிதான DBpediaQA, ஒரு புதிய பெங்குரு தகவல் அமைப்பை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அறிவு வரைபடம் மூலம் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அறிவு வரைபடம் மூலம இந்த வரைப்படம் நேராக இருக்கும் என்றாலும், வேலை செய்ய முடியாத எண்ணிக்கை இந்த தரவுத்தளத்தை பயன்படுத்தி எதிர்கால ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு அடித்தளத்தை அமைக்க, நாம் சமீபத்தில் வேலை செயல்படுத்துகிறோம்", 'ur': 'علم گراف کے بارے میں جواب دینے کا سوال معاملہ ہے کہ سوداگری اور علمی سے علاقہ کا ایک اہم مسئلہ ہے۔ طبیعی زبان سؤال کے کلاس میں بہت اچھا علاقہ ہے جو ایک حقیقت کی تلاش کے ذریعہ جواب دیئے جاتے ہیں، جو جمعی سائل سوال ڈیٹ سٹ کے موجود ہیں. However, this data set with problem is that answer triples are provided from Freebase, which has been defuncted for several years. اس کے نتیجے میں "حقیقی دنیا" سؤال جواب دینے کے لئے مشکل ہے جو عملی طور پر قابل استعمال کرنے والے ہیں. اور اس کے علاوہ ایک غلط علم گراف کا مطلب یہ ہے کہ بہت سی زیادہ ساختار سوال, برائینگ اور تین سی طرح کی تدبیر نہیں ہے۔ اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم ساده DBpediaQA کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک نئی بنچمبارک ڈاٹ سٹ جو علم گراف کے بارے میں جواب دینے کے لئے ساده سؤال کے لئے ہے، جو ساده سوال کے متعلق مخلوقات کے ذریعہ پیدا کیا گیا ہے اور فریبنس سے DBpedia تک پیدا کیا گیا ہے۔ اگرچہ یہ نقشه مضبوط سادھی ہے، بہت سے نائنس ہیں جو ان دونوں علم گراف کے مختلف نظریہ سازمانوں کے باعث کام ناغیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر اس ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق مستقبل تحقیقات کے لئے بنیاد بنانے کے لئے، ہم نے اچھے کاموں کو نئورل نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ اور بغیر ساده اور قوی بنیاس لینٹوں کے ساتھ دینے کے لئے استعمال کیا۔', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн графикийн хариултын асуулт бол худалдааны болон академикийн сонирхолтой асуудал юм. Байгалийн хэл асуултуудын хичээлд маш чухал сонирхолтой байдаг. Энэ нь нэг зүйлийг хайж, олон нийтлэг Энгийн асуулт өгөгдлийн сангийн хэрэглээ болох боломжтой. Гэхдээ энэ өгөгдлийн сангийн асуудал бол хариултын гурав дахин хэдэн жилийн турш Freebase-ээс гаргасан байна. Үүний үр дүнд бодит ертөнцийн асуулт хариултын системүүд бүтээх нь хэцүү. Үүнээс ч буруу мэдлэг график нь гурав дахин ч байхгүй гэсэн үг. Энэ асуудлыг бодохын тулд бид SimpleDBpediaQA-г харуулж байна. Энэ асуудлыг мэдлэг графикийн хувьд хариултын шинэ салбар өгөгдлийн санг Freebase-ээс DBpedia руу зохион бүтээсэн энгийн асуулт графикийг харуулж байна. Энэ газрын зураг ойлголттой энгийн хэдий ч, хоёр мэдлэг графикийн өөр төрлийн байгууллагуудын шалтгаан ажлыг багасгаж буй олон нуанс байдаг. Дараагийн судалгааны суурь үүсгэхэд, бид саяхан ажиллагааг мэдрэлийн сүлжээгээр энгийн боловч хүчтэй суурь шугам хангах боломжтой болгодог.', 'no': 'Spørsmål om svar over kunnskap grafikk er eit viktig problem med interesse både komercialt og akademisk. Det er stor interesse i klassen av naturspråksspørsmål som kan svarast gjennom å finna ei enkelt faktor, som styrer av tilgjengeligheten av den populære enkelte spørsmålsettet. Problemet med denne datasetten er imidlertid at svartrekantar vert tilgjengelege frå Freebase, som er avslutta i fleire år. Som resultat er det vanskeleg å bygge spørsmålsystemet for « verkeleg » som er operationalt utviklare. I tillegg betyr det at mykje av infrastrukturen for spørjing, nettlesing og manipulering av tredjegradar ikkje finst lenger. For å setja opp dette problemet, presenterer vi ein ny benchmark dataset for enkelt spørsmål som svarar over kunnskapsgrafene som er oppretta ved å kartera enkelt spørsmål- einingar og predikar frå Freebase til DBpedia. Selv om denne kartet er konseptelt enkelt fram, er det mange nuanser som gjør oppgåva ikkje-trivial, på grunn av dei ulike konseptuelle organisasjonane av dei to kunnskapsgrafene. For å lage fundamentet for framtidige forskning med denne dataset, bruker vi nyleg arbeidet for å gje enkle, men sterke baselinjer med og utan neuralnettverk.', 'sv': 'Frågeställning över kunskapsgrafer är ett viktigt problem av intresse både kommersiellt och akademiskt intresse. Det finns ett stort intresse för klassen av naturspråksfrågor som kan besvaras genom att slå upp ett enda faktum, drivet av tillgängligheten av den populära SimpleQuestions datauppsättningen. Problemet med den här datauppsättningen är dock att svar trippel tillhandahålls från Freebase, som har varit nedlagd i flera år. Som ett resultat är det svårt att bygga "verkliga" frågesvarssystem som är driftskompatibla. Dessutom innebär en nedlagd kunskapsgraf att mycket av infrastrukturen för att fråga, surfa och manipulera trippel inte längre existerar. För att lösa detta problem presenterar vi SimpleDBpediaQA, en ny benchmark datauppsättning för enkel frågesvar över kunskapsgrafer som skapades genom att kartlägga SimpleQuestions entiteter och predikater från Freebase till DBpedia. Även om denna kartläggning är konceptuellt okomplicerad finns det ett antal nyanser som gör uppgiften icke-trivial, på grund av de olika konceptuella organisationerna i de två kunskapsgraferna. För att lägga grunden för framtida forskning med hjälp av denna datauppsättning utnyttjar vi det senaste arbetet för att tillhandahålla enkla men starka baslinjer med och utan neurala nätverk.', 'vi': 'Câu hỏi trả lời về biểu đồ kiến thức là một vấn đề quan trọng cả về mặt kinh tế và lí lịch. Có một sự quan tâm lớn đến hạng các câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự nhiên có thể được trả lời bằng cách tìm kiếm một thực tế, được điều khiển bởi nguồn cung cấp dữ liệu của Đơn giản Câu hỏi nổi tiếng. Vấn đề với bộ dữ liệu này, tuy nhiên, là câu trả lời đã được cung cấp gấp ba từ Freebase, which has been Defunct for several years. Kết quả là rất khó để xây dựng những hệ thống đáp trả những câu hỏi "thế giới thực" có thể sử dụng được. Hơn nữa, một đồ thị hiểu biết đã mất tích có nghĩa là rất nhiều cơ sở để tra hỏi, duyệt Mạng và điều khiển máy móc không còn tồn tại. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi giới thiệu SimpceddddBpediatQA, một tập tin tiêu chuẩn mới cho các câu hỏi đơn giản để trả lời các đồ thị về kiến thức được tạo ra bằng cách sơ đồ các thực thể Simple-Câu hỏi và gập cơ sở dữ liệu từ Freebase sang nhồi. Mặc dù bản đồ này khái niệm đơn giản, nhưng có một số sắc thái khiến nhiệm vụ không tầm thường, nhờ vào các tổ chức thiết kế khác nhau của hai biểu đồ kiến thức. Để đặt nền tảng cho nghiên cứu tương lai sử dụng bộ dữ liệu này, chúng tôi dùng những công việc gần đây để cung cấp các căn cứ đơn giản nhưng mạnh với và không có mạng thần kinh.', 'uz': 'Ogohlantirish grafikga javob beradigan savol, biznesiy va akademikda ham muhim muammolar. Query data set The problem with this dataset, however, is that answer triples are provided from Freebase, which has been defunct for several years.  Va natijada "real-world" savol yaratish juda qiyin. Bu amalga ishlab chiqaradigan tizimlarning javob berishi qiyin. Koʻrsatilgan, hech qanday ilmiy grafik emas, soʻrov, koʻrish va boshqarish uchun ko\'p tuzuvlar mavjud emas. @ info Agar bu харита oddiy emas, bir necha nuqta shu vazifani trivial qiladi, bu ikkita ilmiy grafikning turli bir xil g\'oyalar sababi. Bu maʼlumotlar sohasini ishlatish uchun kelajakdagi o\'rganish asosini yaratish uchun, biz yaqinda ishni bajaramiz, oddiy va yaxshi tarmoq tarmoq bilan ishlayotgan oddiy asosiy asboblarni yaratish uchun ishlayapmiz.', 'bg': 'Отговарянето на въпроси чрез знание графики е важен проблем от интерес както в търговски, така и в академичен план. Съществува значителен интерес към класа въпроси с естествен език, на които може да се отговори чрез търсене на един факт, задвижен от наличието на популярния набор от данни "Прости въпроси". Проблемът с този набор от данни обаче е, че три отговора са предоставени от Фрийбаза, която не съществува от няколко години. В резултат на това е трудно да се изградят системи за отговор на въпроси от "реалния свят", които могат да се използват оперативно. Освен това, изчезналата графика на знанието означава, че голяма част от инфраструктурата за запитване, сърфиране и манипулиране на тройки вече не съществува. За да се справим с този проблем, представяме нов сравнителен набор от данни за прости отговори на въпроси върху знание графики, създаден чрез картографиране на единици и предикати от Freebase към DBpedia. Въпреки че това картографиране е концептуално ясно, има редица нюанси, които правят задачата нетривиална, поради различните концептуални организации на двете графики на знанието. За да положим основите за бъдещи изследвания, използвайки този набор от данни, ние използваме последните работи, за да осигурим прости, но силни базови линии с и без невронни мрежи.', 'nl': "Vragen beantwoorden via kennisgrafieken is een belangrijk probleem van belang zowel commercieel als academisch belang. Er is grote interesse in de klasse van natuurlijke taalvragen die kunnen worden beantwoord via het opzoeken van een enkel feit, gedreven door de beschikbaarheid van de populaire SimpleQuestions dataset. Het probleem met deze dataset is echter dat antwoordtriples worden verstrekt vanuit Freebase, dat al enkele jaren niet meer bestaat. Hierdoor is het moeilijk om 'real-world' vragenantwoordsystemen te bouwen die operationeel inzetbaar zijn. Bovendien betekent een verouderde kennisgrafiek dat veel van de infrastructuur voor het opvragen, browsen en manipuleren van triples niet meer bestaat. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, presenteren we SimpleDBpediQA, een nieuwe benchmark dataset voor eenvoudige vragen beantwoorden via kennisgrafieken die is gemaakt door SimpleQuestions entiteiten en predicaten in kaart te brengen van Freebase naar DBpedia. Hoewel deze mapping conceptueel eenvoudig is, zijn er een aantal nuances die de taak niet-triviaal maken, vanwege de verschillende conceptuele organisaties van de twee kennisgrafieken. Om de basis te leggen voor toekomstig onderzoek met behulp van deze dataset, maken we gebruik van recent werk om eenvoudige maar sterke baselines te bieden met en zonder neurale netwerken.", 'de': 'Die Beantwortung von Fragen über Wissensgraphen ist ein wichtiges Problem von Interesse sowohl kommerziell als auch akademisch. Es besteht großes Interesse an der Klasse natürlicher Sprachfragen, die durch das Nachschlagen einer einzelnen Tatsache beantwortet werden können, angetrieben durch die Verfügbarkeit des beliebten SimpleQuestions-Datensatzes. Das Problem mit diesem Datensatz ist jedoch, dass Antwortdreifache von Freebase bereitgestellt werden, das seit einigen Jahren nicht mehr existiert. Infolgedessen ist es schwierig, "reale" Fragebeantworungssysteme zu bauen, die operativ einsetzbar sind. Darüber hinaus bedeutet ein nicht mehr funktionierender Wissensgraph, dass ein Großteil der Infrastruktur zum Abfragen, Durchsuchen und Manipulieren von Triples nicht mehr existiert. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, stellen wir SimpleDBpediQA vor, einen neuen Benchmark-Datensatz zur einfachen Beantwortung von Fragen über Wissensdiagramme, der durch Zuordnung von SimpleQuestions-Entitäten und Prädikaten von Freebase zu DBpedia erstellt wurde. Obwohl diese Abbildung konzeptionell einfach ist, gibt es eine Reihe von Nuancen, die die Aufgabe aufgrund der unterschiedlichen konzeptionellen Organisationen der beiden Wissensgraphen nicht trivial machen. Um den Grundstein für die zukünftige Forschung mit diesem Datensatz zu legen, nutzen wir aktuelle Arbeiten, um einfache, aber starke Baselines mit und ohne neuronale Netze bereitzustellen.', 'hr': 'Pitanje odgovora na grafike znanja je važan problem interesa komercijalno i akademički. Postoji značajan interes za klasu prirodnih jezika pitanja koje se mogu odgovoriti kroz potragu jednog činjenica, koja je vodila dostupnost popularnog seta podataka jednostavnih pitanja. Problem s tim setom podataka je, međutim, da su trostruki odgovori pruženi iz Freebase-a, koji je već nekoliko godina odbačen. Kao rezultat toga je teško izgraditi odgovorne sustave realnog svijeta koji su operativno raspoređeni. Osim toga, defunktivni znanstveni grafik znači da većina infrastrukture za ispitivanje, pregledanje i manipulaciju trostruka više ne postoji. Za rješavanje ovog problem a, predstavljamo jednostavnu DBpediaQA, novu standardnu podatku za jednostavno pitanje odgovarajući na znanja grafike koje je stvoreno mapiranjem jednostavnih pitanja entiteta i predikata iz Freebase do DBpedia. Iako je ova mapa konceptualno jednostavna, postoji broj nuanca koji čine zadatak neprivičnim, zbog različitih konceptualnih organizacija dva znanja grafika. Da bi stavili temelj za buduće istraživanje koristeći ovaj set podataka, iskorištavali smo nedavni rad kako bi osigurali jednostavne, ali snažne osnovne linije i bez neuralnih mreža.', 'da': 'Spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensgrafer er et vigtigt problem af interesse både kommercielt og akademisk art. Der er stor interesse for klassen af natursproglige spørgsmål, der kan besvares via opslag af et enkelt faktum, drevet af tilgængeligheden af det populære SimpleQuestions datasæt. Problemet med dette datasæt er imidlertid, at svar tripler leveres fra Freebase, som har været nede i flere år. Som følge heraf er det vanskeligt at opbygge "virkelige" spørgsmål besvarelsessystemer, der kan implementeres operationelt. Desuden betyder en nedlagt vidensgraf, at meget af infrastrukturen til forespørgsler, browsing og manipulation af tredobbler ikke længere eksisterer. For at løse dette problem præsenterer vi SimpleBpediaQA, et nyt benchmark datasæt til enkel spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensgrafer, der blev oprettet ved at kortlægge SimpleQuestions enheder og prædikater fra Freebase til DBpedia. Selvom denne kortlægning er begrebsmæssigt ligetil, er der en række nuancer, der gør opgaven ikke-triviel på grund af de forskellige konceptuelle organiseringer af de to vidensgrafer. For at lægge fundamentet for fremtidig forskning ved hjælp af dette datasæt, udnytter vi det seneste arbejde til at levere enkle, men stærke baselines med og uden neurale netværk.', 'fa': 'سوال جواب دادن بر گرافیک دانش یک مشکل مهم از علاقه های تجاری و دانش آموزشی است. علاقه\u200cای بزرگی در کلاس سوال زبان طبیعی وجود دارد که می\u200cتواند با جستجوی یک حقیقت جواب داده شود، که توسط دسترسی مجموعه داده\u200cهای ساده\u200cسوال محبوب است. ولی مشکل این مجموعه داده ها این است که سه تا پاسخ از Freebase، که برای چند سال نابود شده است. به نتیجه، ساختن سیستم\u200cهای پاسخ\u200cجواب سوال «دنیای واقعی» سخت است که در عملیات قابل تغییر قابل تغییر است. علاوه بر این، یک گراف دانش ناپذیر معنی دارد که بیشتر زیرزمینی برای پرسیدن, بررسی و تغییر کردن سه گانه دیگر وجود ندارد. برای حل این مشکل، ما ساده DBpediaQA را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک مجموعه\u200cی داده\u200cهای نقشه\u200cبندی جدید برای جواب سوال ساده بر گرافهای علمی که توسط نقشه\u200cبندی شرکت\u200cهای ساده سوال\u200cها و نقشه\u200cبندی\u200cها از بنیاد Freebase به DBpedia ایجاد شده است. اگرچه این نقشه\u200cسازی به طور کاملاً مستقیم است، تعدادی از نقشه\u200cها وجود دارد که کار را غیر مستقیم می\u200cسازند، به دلیل سازمان\u200cهای متفاوتی از دو گراف دانش\u200cها. برای اینکه بنیادی برای تحقیقات آینده با استفاده از این مجموعه داده ها، کارهای اخیر را برای تهیه کردن خطوط بنیادی ساده و قوی با و بدون شبکه های عصبی تهیه کنیم.', 'tr': "Bilim grafiklerinden jogap bermek hem komersiýaly hem akademiýaly gyzyklanmagyň möhüm meselesidir. Doýal dil soraglarynyň klasynda ýeke bir fakt gözlemegi bilen jogap berilebilir, olaryň meşhur Besitler Soraglary setiriniň ulaşylygy tarapyndan örän gyzyklanýar. Ýöne bu maglumat setiriniň mesele Freebase-dan üç gezek jogabat berilýär. Bu ýagdaýda birnäçe ýyl öň bellenmedi. Netijäniň sebäbi 'hakyky dünýä' soragy sistemalary guramak kyn. Daha-da ýeterli bilim grafisi bir köp infrastrukturyň soragy, gözlemek we üç gezek işlemek üçin bolup ýok diýip a ňladýar. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin Basit DBpediaQA'y görkezip, bir ýeňil sorag üçin birnäçe sahypa grafiklerine jogap bermek üçin, Basit Sorag guramlaryny we Freebase-dan DBpedia çerçewletiň suratyny suratlandyrmak üçin täze bir benchmark verigi tassyklandyrýarys. Bu haritalar düzgün bir şekilde düzgün bolsa bolsa, iki bilim grafikleriniň farklı düşünjeli guramalaryna sebäbi täzeliklerde birnäçe nuwasat bar. Geljekki araştyrmalar üçin bu datasyny ulanmak üçin, oňki işlerimizi näbelli we güýçli bir nuýral şebekeleri saýlamak üçin ýüze çykarmak üçin ýüze çykarýarys.", 'id': "Pertanyaan menjawab tentang grafik pengetahuan adalah masalah penting yang menarik secara komersial dan akademis. Ada minat yang besar dalam kelas pertanyaan bahasa alam yang dapat dijawab melalui pencarian fakta tunggal, didorong oleh disponibilitas dataset SimpleQuestions populer. Masalahnya dengan set data ini, bagaimanapun, adalah bahwa jawaban tiga kali disediakan dari Freebase, yang telah dihapuskan selama beberapa tahun. As a result, it is difficult to build 'real-world' question answering systems that are operationally deployable.  Selain itu, grafik pengetahuan yang tidak berfungsi berarti bahwa sebagian besar infrastruktur untuk menanyai, melayar, dan memanipulasi tiga kali tidak lagi ada. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mempersembahkan SimpleDBpediaQA, set data benchmark baru untuk pertanyaan sederhana menjawab atas grafik pengetahuan yang diciptakan dengan memetakan entitas SimpleQuestions dan predikasi dari Freebase ke DBpedia. Meskipun peta ini secara konsep sederhana, ada beberapa nuansi yang membuat tugas itu tidak trivial, karena organisasi konsep yang berbeda dari dua grafik pengetahuan. Untuk menempatkan dasar untuk penelitian masa depan menggunakan set data ini, kami menggunakan pekerjaan baru-baru ini untuk menyediakan garis dasar sederhana namun kuat dengan dan tanpa jaringan saraf.", 'sq': "Përgjigja e pyetjeve lidhur me grafikët e njohurive është një problem i rëndësishëm interesi si komercialisht ashtu edhe akademikisht. Ka interes thelbësor në klasën e pyetjeve të gjuhës natyrore që mund të përgjigjen nëpërmjet kërkimit të një fakti të vetëm, të nxitur nga disponueshmëria e grupit popullor të të dhënave SimpleQuestions. The problem with this dataset, however, is that answer triples are provided from Freebase, which has been defunct for several years.  Si rezultat, është e vështirë të ndërtohen sisteme përgjigjesh për pyetjet 'bota reale' që janë të përdorueshme në mënyrë operacionale. Përveç kësaj, një grafik i njohurive të prishur do të thotë se shumica e infrastrukturës për pyetjen, shfletimin dhe manipulimin e trefishtë nuk ekziston më. Për të trajtuar këtë problem, ne paraqesim SimpleDBpediaQA, një grup të ri të dhënash referenciale për pyetje të thjeshta që përgjigjen rreth grafikave të njohurive që u krijua duke hartuar njësitë e SimpleQuestions dhe predikuan nga Freebase në DBpedia. Megjithëse kjo hartë është konceptualisht e thjeshtë, ka një numër nuancash që e bëjnë detyrën jo-trivial, për shkak të organizatave konceptuale të ndryshme të dy grafikave të njohurive. Për të vendosur themelet për kërkimet e ardhshme duke përdorur këtë grup të dhënash, ne përdorim punën e fundit për të ofruar linja bazë të thjeshta por të forta me dhe pa rrjete nervore.", 'ko': "지식도에서 문제를 대답하는 것은 상업과 학술적으로 모두 흥미를 느끼는 중요한 문제이다.유행하는 SimpleQuestions 데이터 세트의 가용성 때문에 단일 사실을 찾아서 대답할 수 있는 자연 언어 문제에 관심이 높아지고 있다.그러나 이 데이터 집합의 문제는 답안 3원조가 Freebase에서 제공된 것이고 Freebase는 이미 몇 년 동안 정지되었다는 것이다.이 때문에 운용 배치가 가능한'리얼 월드'질의응답 시스템을 구축하기는 어렵다.그 밖에 존재하지 않는 지식도는 삼원조를 조회, 조회, 조작하는 데 사용되는 많은 인프라 시설이 더 이상 존재하지 않는다는 것을 의미한다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해, 우리는SimpledBeDiaqa를 제기했다. 이것은 지식도에서 간단한 질문에 대한 대답을 위한 새로운 기준 데이터 집합이다. 이것은SimpleQuestions 실체와 술어를 Freebase에서 DBpedia에 비추어 만든 것이다.비록 이런 비주얼은 개념적으로 매우 간단하지만 두 지식도의 개념 조직이 다르기 때문에 많은 미세한 차이로 인해 임무가 평범하지 않게 되었다.이 데이터 집합을 사용하는 미래 연구에 기반을 다지기 위해 우리는 최근의 업무를 이용하여 간단하고 강력한 기선을 제공했다. 유무신경 네트워크를 포함한다.", 'am': "እውቀት ካርፎች ላይ የመመልስ ጥያቄ የንግድ ንግድ እና አስተማሪክ የጉዳይ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ There is substantial interest in the class of natural language questions that can be answered via the lookup of a single fact, driven by the availability of the popular SimpleQuestions dataset.  ምንም እንኳን የዚህ ዳታ-ሰርቨር ጉዳይ ግን ለጥቂት ዓመታት የፍሬባስ ድጋፍ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህ የ'እውነተኛ ዓለም' ጥያቄን መግለጽ በሥርዓት የሚችሉትን ስርዓቶች መግለጫ በጣም ችግር ነው፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የውቀት ቀረፋ፣ የመጠየቅ፣ የመቃኛ እና የመግለጽ የመሠረተ መሠረቶች ከእንግዲህ ወዲህ አይገኙም፡፡ የዚህን ጉዳይ ለመቀበል አዲስ የbenchmark ዳታዎችን አቀረብን፡፡ ምንም እንኳን ይህ ማረፊያ አቅራቢያ ቢሆን፣ ከሁለቱ እውቀት ቀለበቶች የተለያዩ አካባቢ ድርጅቶች ምክንያት ስራውን የማይፈወስ ብዙዎች አሉ፡፡ ይህንን ዳታ ሳጥን ለመጠቀም የመጨረሻይቱን መርምር መሠረት ለመሥራት፣ በቅርብ ጊዜ ግን የጠንካራ መረብ ሳይኖር ጥሩ መሠረት እናደርጋለን፡፡", 'sw': "Swali la kujibu juu ya takwimu za maarifa ni tatizo muhimu la maslahi ya kibiashara na kisomo. Kuna maswali makubwa katika darasa la maswali ya lugha ya asili yanayoweza kujibu kwa kupitia kutazama ukweli mmoja, yanaendeshwa na upatikanaji wa taarifa za maswali maarufu. The problem with this dataset, however, is that answer triples are provided from Freebase, which has been defunct for several years.  Matokeo yake, ni vigumu kujenga maswali ya 'dunia halisi' yanayojibu mfumo unaotumika kwa upasuaji. Zaidi ya hayo, picha ya maarifa isiyo na ujuzi inamaanisha kuwa miundombinu mengi ya kutafuta, kutazama, na kudhibiti majaribio ya tatu hazipo tena. Ili kukabiliana na tatizo hili, tunaleta taarifa mpya ya bendera ya simulizi ya simu za mkononi kwa ajili ya maswali rahisi ya kujibu juu ya picha za maarifa zilizotengenezwa kwa ajili ya ramani za maswali rahisi na utabiri kutoka Freebase hadi DBpedia. Ingawa ramani hii imekuwa moja kwa moja, kuna maeneo kadhaa yanayoweza kufanya kazi isiyo na tatizo, kwa sababu ya mashirika tofauti ya dhana ya picha hizo mbili za maarifa. To lay the foundation for future research using this dataset, we leverage recent work to provide simple yet strong baselines with and without neural networks.", 'az': 'Bilim grafikləri haqqında cavab verən sual ticarət və akademik olaraq maraqlı bir problemdir. Təbiətli dil suallarının səviyyəsinə çox maraq gəlir ki, bir həqiqəti araşdırmaq vasitəsilə cavab verə bilər, məşhur Simple Questions veri qutusu vasitəsilə istifadə edilir. Ancaq bu verilən quruluğun problemi, üç dəfə cavab verilən Freebase tərəfindən verilən, bu da birkaç il boyunca azaldılmışdır. Növbəti olaraq "real-world" sual cavab sistemlərini qurmaq çətin. Daha sonra, dəyişiklik elm grafı bir çox infrastruktur soruşmaq, gözləmək və üç dəyişiklik etmək üçün daha çox olmadığını anlamına gelir. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, SimpleDBpediaQA\'yi, Freebase-dan DBpedia-ya yaratdığı elm grafiklərindən soruşmaq üçün yeni bir benchmark verilən verilənlər təyin edirik. Bu xəritə düzgün gəlməsə də, iki elm grafının müxtəlif fikirlərin müxtəlif organizasiyalarına görə işləri kiçik olmayan bir neçə nuans var. Geləcək araştırmalar üçün bu verilən qurğunu istifadə etmək üçün, biz yeni işləri, hətta çox qüvvətli, nürol ağları ilə və heç kəsə istifadə etmək üçün çox asan, çox qüvvətli sətirlər təmin edirik.', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের গ্রাফের ব্যাপারে প্রশ্নের উত্তর হচ্ছে বাণিজ্যিক এবং শিক্ষামীকভাবে উভয়েই একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রশ্নের ক্লাসে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ আগ্রহ রয়েছে যা একটি বাস্তবতা অনুসন্ধানের মাধ্যমে উত্তর দিতে পারে, যা জনপ্রিয় সাইমপে তবে এই ডাটাসেটের সমস্যা হচ্ছে ফ্রেবাস থেকে ত্রিবিগুণ উত্তর প্রদান করা হয়েছে, যা কয়েক বছর ধরে বিচ্ছিন্ন হয়েছে। এর ফলে প্রশ্ন তৈরি করা কঠিন যা কার্যকরিকভাবে প্রস্তুতি প্রদান করতে পারে। Furthermore, a defunct knowledge graph means that much of the infrastructure for querying, browsing, and manipulating triples no longer exists.  এই সমস্যাটিকে ঠিক করার জন্য আমরা সাইপলিডিবিপেডিয়াকে উপস্থাপন করি, একটি নতুন বেনম্যার্ক ডাটাসেট, যা জ্ঞানের গ্রাফের ব্যাপারে সাধারণ প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়া  যদিও এই মানচিত্র সঠিকভাবে পরিচিত, তবুও অনেক বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন জ্ঞান গ্রাফের বিভিন্ন ধারণা সংগঠনের কারণে কাজ করে ত্রিবিশেষ করে। এই ডাটাসেট ব্যবহার করে ভবিষ্যত গবেষণার জন্য ভিত্তিক স্থাপন করার জন্য আমরা সাম্প্রতিক কাজের সাথে সাধারণ কিছু ক্ষমতাশালী কা', 'bs': 'Pitanje za odgovor na znanja grafike je važan problem interesa komercijalno i akademički. Postoji značajan interes u klasi prirodnih pitanja jezika koji se mogu odgovoriti kroz potragu jednog činjenica, koji je vodio dostupnost popularnog seta podataka jednostavnih pitanja. Problem s tim setom podataka je, međutim, da su trostruki odgovori pruženi iz Freebase-a, koji je već nekoliko godina odbačen. Kao rezultat toga, teško je izgraditi sisteme odgovora realnog svijeta koji su operativno raspoređeni. Osim toga, defunktivni grafik znanja znači da većina infrastrukture za ispitivanje, pregledanje i manipulaciju trostruka više ne postoji. Za rješavanje ovog problem a predstavljamo jednostavnu DBpediaQA, novu standardnu podatku za jednostavno pitanje odgovarajući na znanja grafike koje je stvoreno mapiranjem jednostavnih pitanja entiteta i predikata iz Freebase do DBpedia. Iako je ovo mapiranje konceptualno jednostavno, postoji broj nuanca koji čine zadatak nevoljnim, zbog različitih konceptualnih organizacija dva znanja grafika. Da bi stavili temelj za buduće istraživanje koristeći ovaj set podataka, iskorištavali smo nedavni rad kako bi omogućili jednostavne, ali jake osnovne linije i bez neuralnih mreža.', 'hy': 'Գիտելու գրաֆիկների վերաբերյալ հարցերի պատասխանը առևտրային և գիտական առումով հետաքրքրության կարևոր խնդիր է: Բնական լեզվային հարցերի դասարանը մեծ հետաքրքրություն ունի, որոնք կարող են պատասխանվել մեկ փաստի փնտրման միջոցով, որը հիմնված է հանրահայտ պարզ հարցերի տվյալների համակարգի հասանելիության վրա: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս տվյալների համակարգի խնդիրն այն է, որ պատասխանը երեք անգամ տրամադրվում է Ֆրիբասից, որը մի քանի տարի անջատված է: Արդյունքում դժվար է կառուցել «իրական աշխարհի» հարցերին պատասխանող համակարգեր, որոնք օպերացիոնալ կերպով կիրառելի են: Furthermore, a defunct knowledge graph means that much of the infrastructure for querying, browsing, and manipulating triples no longer exists.  Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՊարզաDBpedaQA-ը, նոր համեմատային տվյալների համակարգ պարզ հարցերի համար, որոնք պատասխանում են գիտելիքի գրաֆիկների վրա, որոնք ստեղծվել են ՊարզաDBpedaQA-ի անհատների քարտեզագրման միջոցով և նախաձեռնությունների միջ Although this mapping is conceptually straightforward, there are a number of nuances that make the task non-trivial, owing to the different conceptual organizations of the two knowledge graphs.  Այս տվյալների համակարգի օգտագործման ապագայի ուսումնասիրության հիմքերը ստեղծելու համար մենք օգտագործում ենք վերջին աշխատանքը պարզ, բայց ուժեղ հիմքեր ապահովել նեյրոնային ցանցերով և առանց դրանց:', 'ca': 'La resposta a preguntes sobre els gràfics del coneixement és un problema important d\'interès tant comercialment com acadèmicament. Hi ha un interès substancial en la classe de preguntes de llenguatge natural que es poden respondre a través de la cerca d\'un únic fet, motivat per la disponibilitat del popular conjunt de dades SimpleQuestions. Però el problema d\'aquest conjunt de dades és que les respostes triples es proporcionen de Freebase, que ha estat desactivada durant molts anys. Com a resultat, és difícil construir sistemes de resposta a preguntes "del món real" operativament desplegables. A més, un gràfic de coneixement desfet significa que gran part de la infraestructura de consulta, navegació i manipulació de triples ja no existeix. To address this problem, we present SimpleDBpediaQA, a new benchmark dataset for simple question answering over knowledge graphs that was created by mapping SimpleQuestions entities and predicates from Freebase to DBpedia.  Encara que aquest mapatge és conceptualment senzill, hi ha una sèrie de nuances que fan que la tasca no sigui trivial, degut a les diferents organitzacions conceptuals dels dos gràfics de coneixement. Per posar les bases per a la recerca futura utilitzant aquest conjunt de dades, aprofitem la feina recent per proporcionar línies de base senzilles però fortes amb i sense xarxes neurals.', 'et': "Küsimustele vastamine teadmiste graafikute kaudu on oluline huvi pakkuv probleem nii äriliselt kui ka akadeemiliselt. On märkimisväärne huvi looduskeele küsimuste klassi vastu, millele on võimalik vastata ühe fakti otsimise kaudu, mida juhib populaarse SimpleQuestions andmekogumi kättesaadavus. Probleem selle andmekogumiga on aga see, et vastused kolmekordselt on antud Freebase, mis on olnud mitu aastat kadunud. Seetõttu on raske ehitada reaalseid küsimustele vastamise süsteeme, mis on operatiivselt kasutusele võetavad. Lisaks tähendab kadunud teadmiste graafik, et enam ei ole enam olemas suurt osa päringute, sirvimise ja kolmekordsete käsitlemise infrastruktuurist. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks esitame SimpleDBpediaQA, uut võrdlusandmekogumit lihtsaks küsimustele vastamiseks teadmisgraafikute kaudu, mis loodi SimpleQuestions olemite kaardistamise ja prognooside abil Freebase'ist DBpediasse. Kuigi see kaardistamine on kontseptuaalselt lihtne, on mitmeid nüansse, mis muudavad ülesande mittetribiaalseks, kuna kahe teadmiste graafiku erinevad kontseptuaalsed organisatsioonid. Selleks, et luua alus edasistele uuringutele, kasutades seda andmekogumit, kasutame hiljutist tööd, et pakkuda lihtsaid, kuid tugevaid lähtejooni koos närvivõrkudega ja ilma.", 'fi': 'Kysymyksiin vastaaminen tietokaavioiden avulla on tärkeä ongelma, joka kiinnostaa sekä kaupallisesti että akateemisesti. Luonnonkielen kysymyksiä kohtaan on suurta kiinnostusta, johon voidaan vastata yhden ainoan faktan avulla, mikä johtuu suositun SimpleQuestions-aineiston saatavuudesta. Ongelmana tässä aineistossa on kuitenkin se, että vastauskolminkertaiset saadaan Freebaselta, joka on ollut käytössä useita vuosia. Tämän vuoksi on vaikea rakentaa "reaalimaailman" kysymyksenvastausjärjestelmiä, jotka ovat operatiivisesti toteutettavissa. Lisäksi vanhentunut tietokaavio tarkoittaa, että suuri osa infrastruktuurista kyselyyn, selaamiseen ja kolminkertaisten manipulointiin ei ole enää olemassa. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi esittelemme SimpleDBpediaQA:n, uuden vertailuaineiston yksinkertaisille kysymyksille tietokaavioille, jotka luotiin kartoittamalla SimpleQuestions-kokonaisuuksia ja predikaatteja Freebasesta DBpediaan. Vaikka tämä kartoitus on käsitteellisesti suoraviivainen, on olemassa useita vivahteita, jotka tekevät tehtävästä ei-triviaalisen, johtuen eri käsitteellisistä organisaatioista kahden tietokaavion. Luodaksemme perustan tätä aineistoa hyödyntävälle tulevalle tutkimukselle hyödynnämme viimeaikaista työtä tarjotaksemme yksinkertaisia mutta vahvoja lähtölinjoja neuroverkoilla ja ilman niitä.', 'af': "Vrag antwoord oor kennis grafieke is 'n belangrike probleem van belang beide komerciale en akademiese. Daar is groot belang in die klas van natuurlike taal vrae wat kan geantwoord word deur die opsyking van 'n enkele feit, wat deur die beskikbaarheid van die populêre Eenvoudige Vrag datastel gedryf word. Die probleem met hierdie datastel is egter dat die antwoord tripels verskaf word van Freebase, wat vir veelvuldige jaar afgewys is. As 'n resultaat is dit moeilik om 'reël-wêreld' vraagstelsels te bou wat operationale ontvangbare is. Daarom beteken 'n afgestrekte kennis graaf dat baie van die infrastruktuur vir navraag, blaai en manipulering van drieëls nie meer bestaan nie. Om hierdie probleem te adres, laat ons eenvoudige DBpediaQA voorsien, 'n nuwe benchmark datastel vir eenvoudige vraag antwoord oor kennis grafieke wat geskep is deur eenvoudige vraag entiteite en predikaat van Freebase tot DBpedia te karteer. Alhoewel hierdie kaart is konseptieële eenvoudig, is daar 'n aantal nuans wat die taak nie-triviaal maak, omdat die verskillende konseptieële organisasies van die twee kennis grafieke is. Om die fondasie vir toekomstige ondersoek te lê deur hierdie datastel te gebruik, laat ons nuutste werk voorsien om eenvoudige nog sterke basisline te verskaf met en sonder neurale netwerke.", 'cs': 'Odpověď na otázky přes znalostní grafy je důležitým problémem zájmu jak komerčně, tak akademicky. Existuje značný zájem o třídu otázek přirozeného jazyka, které lze zodpovědět prostřednictvím vyhledávání jediného faktu, poháněné dostupností populární sady SimpleQuestions. Problém s tímto datovým souborem je však, že odpověď trojnásobně poskytuje Freebase, která již několik let nefunguje. V důsledku toho je obtížné vytvořit systémy "reálného světa", které jsou operačně nasazitelné. Kromě toho, nefungující graf znalostí znamená, že velká část infrastruktury pro dotazování, procházení a manipulaci s trojčaty již neexistuje. Pro řešení tohoto problému představujeme SimpleDBpediQA, novou referenční sadu dat pro jednoduché odpovědi na otázky pomocí znalostních grafů, která byla vytvořena mapováním entit a predikátů SimpleQuestions z Freebase do DBpedia. Ačkoli je toto mapování koncepčně jednoduché, existuje řada nuancí, které činí úkol netriviální, vzhledem k různým koncepčním organizacím obou znalostních grafů. Abychom položili základy pro budoucí výzkum s využitím tohoto datového souboru, využíváme nedávné práce k poskytnutí jednoduchých, ale silných základních linek s neuronovými sítěmi i bez nich.', 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja prek grafikonov znanja je pomemben problem, ki ga zanima tako komercialno kot akademsko. Obstaja veliko zanimanje za razred vprašanj v naravnem jeziku, na katera je mogoče odgovoriti z iskanjem enega samega dejstva, ki ga vodi razpoložljivost priljubljenega nabora podatkov SimpleQuestions. Težava s tem naborom podatkov pa je, da so trojniki odgovorov zagotovljeni iz Freebase, ki je že več let prenehala delovati. Posledično je težko graditi "realne" sisteme za odgovarjanje na vprašanja, ki so operativno uporabni. Poleg tega neuspešen graf znanja pomeni, da večina infrastrukture za poizvedbe, brskanje in manipulacijo trojk ne obstaja več. Za reševanje te težave predstavljamo SimpleDBpediaQA, nov referenčni nabor podatkov za enostavno odgovarjanje na vprašanja prek grafikonov znanja, ki je bil ustvarjen s kartiranjem enot SimpleQuestions in predikatov iz Freebase v DBpedia. Čeprav je to kartiranje konceptualno enostavno, obstaja številne nianse, zaradi različnih konceptualnih organizacij obeh grafov znanja, zaradi katerih naloga ni trivialna. Da bi postavili temelje za prihodnje raziskave, ki uporabljajo ta nabor podatkov, uporabljamo nedavno delo za zagotavljanje preprostih, a močnih osnovnih linij z nevronskimi omrežji in brez njih.', 'ha': "Da tambayi ya karɓa a kan graphi na ilmi yana da muhimu matsalar masu amfani da kibiyi da akada. QFontDatabase QDialogButtonBox Kayya, ya zama mai nauyi wa ka sami tambayar 'duniya halinsa' da ake karɓa na'urar da za'a iya aikin da shi. Furan, graphin da ba'a sani ba yana madaidaita, ko da yawa na bincike na kure, biraw, kuma ya yi amfani da jarrabori masu buƙata, ba za'a buƙata ba. QA Ingawa da wannan ramani ya zama mai daidaita, ko da wasu nunufi masu samun aikin da bã ya yin taƙaita, saboda haka da danne masu haɗi na fassarar fassarar biyu na ilmi. To, za mu sami bango wa research masu yiwuwa da ke amfani da wannan dataset, za'a sami aikin a yanzu zuwa ga ya bãyar da kayan aiki masu sauƙi ko kuma bã da zanen neura.", 'he': 'Question answering over knowledge graphs is an important problem of interest both commercially and academically.  יש עניין משמעותי בכיתה של שאלות שפות טבעיות שאפשר לענות על ידי חיפוש של עובדה אחת, מונעת על ידי זמינות של קבוצת נתונים של שאלות פשוטות פופולרית. הבעיה עם קבוצת הנתונים הזו, בכל אופן, היא ששלושת תשובות מוספקות מבסיס חופשי, אשר הופעלה במשך כמה שנים. כתוצאה מכך, קשה לבנות מערכות תשובות על שאלות "עולם אמיתי" שאפשר להפעיל מבחינה מבצעית. חוץ מזה, גראפ ידע מופרד אומר שרוב התשתית לבדוק, לחפש, ומניפול שלושת אינה קיימת יותר. To address this problem, we present SimpleDBpediaQA, a new benchmark dataset for simple question answering over knowledge graphs that was created by mapping SimpleQuestions entities and predicates from Freebase to DBpedia.  למרות שהמפה הזאת פשוטה מבחינה מושפטית, יש מספר ניאונסים שעושים את המשימה לא טריוויאלית, בגלל ארגונים מושפטיים שונים של שני גרפי הידע. כדי לשים את הבסיס למחקר העתיד באמצעות קבוצת נתונים זו, אנו משתמשים בעבודה האחרונה כדי לספק קווי בסיס פשוט אבל חזקים עם ולא רשתות עצביות.', 'bo': "དབྱིན་ཡིག་རིས་སྐོར་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག་ཡིན། སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་གནད་དོན་དག་ལ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་ཐ་སྙམ་ཐུབ་པའི་དོན་དག་ཞིག་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ཐབས་ཤིག ཡིན་ནའང་། ཆ་འཕྲིན་སྒྲིག་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་ལ་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་རང་དབང་གི་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བྱུང་། གནད་དོན་འབྲས་བ་དེ་ 'འཛམ་གླིང་དངོས་ཡོད་པའི་'འཛམ་གླིང་'དྲི་ཚིག་ལྟ་བུའི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་བཏང་བ་ཡོད དེ་བས། སྔོན་འཛིན་གྱི་ཤེས་པའི་གྲངས་སུ་དྲི་ཞིབ་དང་། ལྟ་བཤེར་དང་། མཐའ་སྐོར་བཟོ་བྱེད་པར་གཞུང་སྒྲིག་ཆ་ཡང་གནས་མི་འདུག དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ན་ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་པ་(Simple DBpediaQA)ཡིས་སྔོན་གྱི་འཛིན་སྐྱོང་གླེང་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྟབས་བདེ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་འཛུལ་བ་དང་སྔོ ས་ཁྲ་འདི་གིས་ཕལ་ཆེར་སླ་བོ་རེད་ནའང་མི་འདྲ་བའི་རྐྱེན་ལ་ཁག་ཅིག་ཡོད་ཀྱང་། བྱ་ཚིག་ལས་གནད་མེད་པའི་གྲངས་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ཚོགས་མ་ ང་ཚོས་མ་འོངས་བའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པར་གཞི་རྟེན་འདི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་རྒྱུ་ཡིན་ན། ང་ཚོས་ཉེ་ཆར་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་ལ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག", 'jv': "Gales mengko sawar nggo ngerasara graf sing dikarepaké sing dikarepaké ning larang komersial karo akadémik. Ana gambar penting ing ing pancene dumadhing ing sak luwih dumadhi sing bisa ngomong nik nggawe gerakan ning nyimpen winih sing bakal, dadi iki bakal terus akeh perusahaan dataset SimpleResolution Wurung iki lak data set kuwi, dadi, njuk tenan iki bakal terus-terus mbutuhake sak mulai freebaz, iki wis dianggawe akeh blok. Yo wis dipoleh, sak susah kanggo nggawe 'Mungkin-perusahaan' sistem sing ngomong nik nguasai operasi sing ditambah. Lakin, nggo ngerasakno diagram sing dikarepaké akeh operaturan kanggo ngilanggar, njujuran lan ijol-ijolan sing ora bisa pasar. Rasane iki, gabung nggambar perkoro SimpleDBPedPediya Mangkin yèng maping iki dadi sak ngerasakno, gak bakal anpilian akèh sing bakal nggawe barang nggawe ora tribalé, dadi sak sampek akeh sistem sampeyan sampeyan iki diagram alam iki. Angkaten ngilanggar sampeyan kanggo ngilanggar sampeyan dataset iki, awak dhéwé ngejaraké awak dhéwé kuwi tindakan ngewehke kuwi tindakan siji-siji sing susah lan tambah-siji sing berarti."}
{'en': 'Investigating the Working of Text Classifiers', 'ar': 'التحقيق في عمل مصنفات النص', 'es': 'Investigación del funcionamiento de los clasificadores de texto', 'fr': 'Étude du fonctionnement des classificateurs de texte', 'pt': 'Investigando o funcionamento dos classificadores de texto', 'ja': 'テキスト分類子の動作の調査', 'zh': '勘文本分类器事原理', 'hi': 'पाठ क्लासिफायरके कामकाज की जांच करना', 'ru': 'Изучение работы классификаторов текста', 'ga': 'Imscrúdú ar Obair Aicmitheoirí Téacs', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კლასიფირების მუშაობის ინსტექტირება', 'hu': 'A szövegminősítők működésének vizsgálata', 'it': 'Indagine sul funzionamento degli annunci di testo', 'lt': 'Teksto klasifikatorių veikimo tyrimas', 'el': 'Διερεύνηση της λειτουργίας των ταξινομητών κειμένου', 'mk': 'Истражување на работењето на класификаторите на текст', 'kk': 'Мәтін классификаторларының жұмысын зерттеу', 'ms': 'Menyelidiki Kerja Pengeklasifikasi Teks', 'ml': 'പദാവലി ക്ലാസിഫയരുടെ ജോലി അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Текст классификаторын ажиллах судалгаа', 'no': 'Søkjer på arbeid av tekstklassifikatorar', 'mt': 'Investigazzjoni tal-Ħidma tal-Klassifikaturi tat-Test', 'ro': 'Investigarea funcționării clasificatorilor de text', 'pl': 'Badanie działania klasyfikatorów tekstowych', 'si': 'ලිපින් ක්\u200dලාසිෆාර්ස් වැඩ කරන්න පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න', 'sr': 'Istraživanje radnog klasifikatora teksta', 'so': 'Baaritaanka shaqada', 'sv': 'Undersökning av hur textklassificerare fungerar', 'ur': 'Text Classifiers کے کام کی تحقیق کی جاتی ہے', 'ta': 'Investigating the Working of Text Classifiers', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Điều tra việc làm việc của điển hình', 'bg': 'Проучване на работата на текстови класификатори', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af tekstklassificeringers arbejde', 'hr': 'Istraživanje radnog klasifikatora teksta', 'de': 'Untersuchung der Funktionsweise von Textklassifizierern', 'nl': 'Onderzoek naar de werking van tekstclassificatoren', 'id': 'Investigating the Working of Text Classifiers', 'ko': '텍스트 분류기의 작업 원리를 연구하다', 'fa': 'تحقیق کار کلاس\u200cهای متن\u200c', 'sw': 'Kuchunguza kazi ya Waandishi wa Maandishi', 'tr': 'Metin Sözlüklerniň Işlemegini barlamak', 'af': 'Voorskou die werk van teks klassifiseerders', 'sq': 'Hetimi i funksionimit të klasifikuesve të tekstit', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'hy': 'Տեքստի դասակարգիչների աշխատանքի հետազոտությունը', 'az': 'Metin Sınıfçıları İşləməsi', 'bn': 'টেক্সট ব্যবহারকারীদের কাজ অনুসন্ধান করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Istraživanje radnog klasifikatora teksta', 'ca': 'Investigar el treball dels classificadors de text', 'cs': 'Vyšetřování fungování textových klasifikátorů', 'et': 'Tekstiklassifikaatorite töö uurimine', 'fi': 'Tekstiluokittajien toiminnan tutkiminen', 'jv': 'bookmarks', 'sk': 'Preiskava delovanja razvrščevalcev besedila', 'he': 'לחקור את העבודה של מסמכי טקסט', 'ha': 'Ana ƙidãya aikin Mai Classifier Match', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་སྡེར་མིག་དཔྱད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Text classification is one of the most widely studied tasks in natural language processing. Motivated by the principle of compositionality, large multilayer neural network models have been employed for this task in an attempt to effectively utilize the constituent expressions. Almost all of the reported work train large networks using discriminative approaches, which come with a caveat of no proper capacity control, as they tend to latch on to any signal that may not generalize. Using various recent state-of-the-art approaches for text classification, we explore whether these models actually learn to compose the meaning of the sentences or still just focus on some keywords or lexicons for classifying the document. To test our hypothesis, we carefully construct datasets where the training and test splits have no direct overlap of such lexicons, but overall language structure would be similar. We study various text classifiers and observe that there is a big performance drop on these datasets. Finally, we show that even simple models with our proposed regularization techniques, which disincentivize focusing on key lexicons, can substantially improve classification accuracy.', 'ar': 'يعد تصنيف النص أحد أكثر المهام التي تمت دراستها على نطاق واسع في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. بدافع من مبدأ التكوين ، تم استخدام نماذج كبيرة للشبكات العصبية متعددة الطبقات لهذه المهمة في محاولة للاستفادة الفعالة من التعبيرات المكونة. تقوم جميع الأعمال المُبلغ عنها تقريبًا بتدريب شبكات كبيرة باستخدام مناهج تمييزية ، والتي تأتي مع تحذير بعدم وجود تحكم مناسب في السعة ، لأنها تميل إلى الالتصاق بأي إشارة قد لا تكون معممة. باستخدام العديد من الأساليب الحديثة الحديثة لتصنيف النص ، نستكشف ما إذا كانت هذه النماذج تتعلم بالفعل تكوين معنى الجمل أو لا تزال تركز فقط على بعض الكلمات الرئيسية أو المعاجم لتصنيف المستند. لاختبار فرضيتنا ، نقوم ببناء مجموعات البيانات بعناية حيث لا يوجد تداخل مباشر بين أقسام التدريب والاختبار لمثل هذه المعاجم ، ولكن بنية اللغة العامة ستكون متشابهة. ندرس مصنّفات نصوص مختلفة ونلاحظ أن هناك انخفاضًا كبيرًا في أداء مجموعات البيانات هذه. أخيرًا ، نوضح أنه حتى النماذج البسيطة باستخدام تقنيات التنظيم المقترحة لدينا ، والتي تثبط التركيز على المعاجم الرئيسية ، يمكنها تحسين دقة التصنيف بشكل كبير.', 'fr': "La classification de texte est l'une des tâches les plus étudiées dans le traitement du langage naturel. Motivés par le principe de la compositionalité, de grands modèles de réseaux neuronaux multicouches ont été utilisés pour cette tâche afin d'essayer d'utiliser efficacement les expressions constitutives. Presque tous les travaux signalés entraînent de grands réseaux en utilisant des approches discriminantes, qui s'accompagnent d'une mise en garde concernant l'absence de contrôle de capacité approprié, car ils ont tendance à s'accrocher à tout signal qui ne se généraliserait pas. À l'aide de diverses approches récentes de pointe pour la classification de texte, nous explorons si ces modèles apprennent réellement à composer le sens des phrases ou s'ils se concentrent simplement sur certains mots-clés ou lexiques pour classer le document. Pour tester notre hypothèse, nous construisons soigneusement des ensembles de données dans lesquels les divisions de formation et de test ne se chevauchent pas directement avec de tels lexiques, mais où la structure linguistique globale serait similaire. Nous étudions divers classificateurs de texte et observons une baisse importante des performances de ces ensembles de données. Enfin, nous montrons que même des modèles simples avec les techniques de régularisation que nous proposons, qui n'incitent pas à se concentrer sur les lexiques clés, peuvent considérablement améliorer la précision de la classification.", 'pt': 'A classificação de texto é uma das tarefas mais estudadas no processamento de linguagem natural. Motivados pelo princípio da composicionalidade, grandes modelos de redes neurais multicamadas têm sido empregados para esta tarefa na tentativa de utilizar efetivamente as expressões constituintes. Quase todos os trabalhos relatados treinam grandes redes usando abordagens discriminativas, que vêm com uma ressalva de que não há controle de capacidade adequado, pois tendem a se prender a qualquer sinal que não possa generalizar. Utilizando várias abordagens recentes de última geração para classificação de texto, exploramos se esses modelos realmente aprendem a compor o significado das frases ou ainda se concentram apenas em algumas palavras-chave ou léxicos para classificar o documento. Para testar nossa hipótese, construímos cuidadosamente conjuntos de dados onde as divisões de treinamento e teste não têm sobreposição direta de tais léxicos, mas a estrutura geral da linguagem seria semelhante. Estudamos vários classificadores de texto e observamos que há uma grande queda de desempenho nesses conjuntos de dados. Por fim, mostramos que mesmo modelos simples com nossas técnicas de regularização propostas, que desincentivam o foco em léxicos-chave, podem melhorar substancialmente a precisão da classificação.', 'es': 'La clasificación de textos es una de las tareas más estudiadas en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Motivados por el principio de composicionalidad, se han empleado grandes modelos de redes neuronales multicapa para esta tarea en un intento de utilizar eficazmente las expresiones constituyentes. Casi todo el trabajo reportado capacita a grandes redes utilizando enfoques discriminatorios, que vienen con la advertencia de que no hay un control de capacidad adecuado, ya que tienden a aferrarse a cualquier señal que no se generalice. Utilizando varios enfoques recientes de última generación para la clasificación de textos, exploramos si estos modelos realmente aprenden a componer el significado de las oraciones o si solo se centran en algunas palabras clave o léxicos para clasificar el documento. Para probar nuestra hipótesis, construimos cuidadosamente conjuntos de datos en los que las divisiones de entrenamiento y prueba no tienen una superposición directa de dichos léxicos, pero la estructura general del lenguaje sería similar. Estudiamos varios clasificadores de texto y observamos que hay una gran caída en el rendimiento de estos conjuntos de datos. Finalmente, mostramos que incluso los modelos simples con nuestras técnicas de regularización propuestas, que desincentivan el enfoque en léxicos clave, pueden mejorar sustancialmente la precisión de la clasificación.', 'ja': 'テキスト分類は、自然言語処理で最も広く研究されているタスクの1つです。 構成主義の原理に動機づけられて、構成表現を効果的に利用しようとするために、大規模な多層ニューラルネットワークモデルがこのタスクに採用されている。 報告された作業のほとんどは、差別的なアプローチを使用して大規模なネットワークを訓練します。これには、一般化しない可能性のある信号にラッチする傾向があるため、適切な容量制御がないという注意が付いています。 テキスト分類のためのさまざまな最新のアプローチを使用して、これらのモデルが実際に文章の意味を構成することを学ぶのか、それとも文書を分類するためのいくつかのキーワードまたは辞書に焦点を当てるのかを探ります。 私たちの仮説をテストするために、トレーニングとテストの分割がそのような辞書の直接的な重複を持たないデータセットを慎重に構築しますが、全体的な言語構造は類似しています。 さまざまなテキスト分類子を研究し、これらのデータセットに大きなパフォーマンス低下があることを観察します。 最後に、主要な辞書に焦点を当てることを抑止する、提案された正規化技術を用いた単純なモデルでさえ、分類の精度を実質的に向上させることができることを示します。', 'zh': '文本分类,自然语言理之最博者也。 合性之推,已为用大神经网络,试用其分表达式。 凡诸告事,皆用判别性教习大网络,有不可量之戒者,以其向锁定不可泛化之号也。 用诸近先进文本分类之法,寻其真学句义,或仍关关键字词典以分文档。 验我伪设,细构数集,其训试拆分与此类词典无径叠,而整言相似。 考诸文本分类器,观此数集大幅降。 虽用吾正则化术之简模,可抑关键词典之关注,以大大提高类准确性。', 'hi': 'पाठ वर्गीकरण प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में सबसे व्यापक रूप से अध्ययन किए गए कार्यों में से एक है। compositionality के सिद्धांत से प्रेरित, बड़े multilayer तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल प्रभावी ढंग से घटक अभिव्यक्तियों का उपयोग करने के प्रयास में इस कार्य के लिए नियोजित किया गया है। रिपोर्ट किए गए लगभग सभी काम भेदभावपूर्ण दृष्टिकोणों का उपयोग करके बड़े नेटवर्क को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं, जो बिना किसी उचित क्षमता नियंत्रण की चेतावनी के साथ आते हैं, क्योंकि वे किसी भी संकेत पर कुंडी लगाते हैं जो सामान्यीकरण नहीं कर सकते हैं। पाठ वर्गीकरण के लिए विभिन्न हालिया अत्याधुनिक दृष्टिकोणों का उपयोग करते हुए, हम यह पता लगाते हैं कि क्या ये मॉडल वास्तव में वाक्यों के अर्थ की रचना करना सीखते हैं या फिर भी दस्तावेज़ को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए कुछ कीवर्ड या शब्दकोशों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हमारी परिकल्पना का परीक्षण करने के लिए, हम सावधानीपूर्वक डेटासेट का निर्माण करते हैं जहां प्रशिक्षण और परीक्षण विभाजन में इस तरह के शब्दकोशों का कोई प्रत्यक्ष ओवरलैप नहीं होता है, लेकिन समग्र भाषा संरचना समान होगी। हम विभिन्न पाठ क्लासिफायरों का अध्ययन करते हैं और देखते हैं कि इन डेटासेट पर एक बड़ी प्रदर्शन ड्रॉप है। अंत में, हम दिखाते हैं कि हमारे प्रस्तावित नियमितीकरण तकनीकों के साथ भी सरल मॉडल, जो प्रमुख शब्दकोशों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने से अलग हो जाते हैं, वर्गीकरण सटीकता में काफी सुधार कर सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Классификация текста - одна из наиболее широко изученных задач в обработке естественного языка. Мотивированные принципом композиционности, для этой задачи были использованы модели большой многослойной нейронной сети в попытке эффективно использовать составляющие выражения. Почти все из сообщенных работ обучают крупные сети, используя дискриминационные подходы, которые приходят с предостережением об отсутствии надлежащего управления пропускной способностью, поскольку они, как правило, фиксируют любой сигнал, который может не быть обобщенным. Используя различные современные подходы к классификации текста, мы исследуем, действительно ли эти модели учатся составлению смысла предложений или все еще фокусируются на некоторых ключевых словах или лексиконах для классификации документа. Чтобы проверить нашу гипотезу, мы тщательно конструируем наборы данных там, где разделение обучения и тестирования не имеет прямого перекрытия таких лексиконов, но общая структура языка будет аналогичной. Мы изучаем различные классификаторы текста и наблюдаем, что на этих наборах данных наблюдается значительное падение производительности. Наконец, мы показываем, что даже простые модели с предлагаемыми нами методами регуляризации, которые дестимулируют фокусирование на ключевых лексиконах, могут существенно повысить точность классификации.', 'ga': 'Tá aicmiú téacs ar cheann de na tascanna is forleithne a ndéantar staidéar air i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha. Arna spreagadh ag prionsabal na comhdhéanaimh, baineadh úsáid as samhlacha móra líonra néaracha ilchiseal don tasc seo chun iarracht a dhéanamh úsáid éifeachtach a bhaint as na habairtí comhábhair. Déanann beagnach gach ceann den obair a thuairiscítear oiliúint ar líonraí móra trí úsáid a bhaint as cineálacha cur chuige idirdhealaitheacha, rud a thagann le caveat nach bhfuil aon rialú cuí acmhainne ann, toisc go mbíonn claonadh acu dul i bhfeidhm ar chomhartha ar bith nach ginearálú. Ag baint úsáide as cineálacha cur chuige úrscothacha éagsúla le haghaidh rangú téacs, déanaimid iniúchadh ar cé acu a fhoghlaimíonn na samhlacha seo chun brí na n-abairtí a chumadh nó nach ndírímid fós ar eochairfhocail nó foclóir chun an doiciméad a rangú. Chun ár hipitéis a thástáil, déanaimid tacair shonraí a thógáil go cúramach nach bhfuil aon fhorluí díreach ag scoilteanna oiliúna agus tástála ar fhoclóirí dá leithéid, ach bheadh struchtúr foriomlán na teanga cosúil leis. Déanaimid staidéar ar aicmitheoirí éagsúla téacs agus tugaimid faoi deara go bhfuil titim mhór feidhmíochta ar na tacair sonraí seo. Ar deireadh, léirímid gur féidir le fiú samhlacha simplí lenár dteicnící rialtaithe molta, a dhídhreasaíonn díriú ar phríomhfhoclóirí, cruinneas aicmithe a fheabhsú go suntasach.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის კლასიფიკაცია არის ერთი ნაირთი ენის პროცესის ყველაზე დიდი განსწავლებული დავალების. კომპოზიციალობის პრინციპით მოტივირული, დიდი მრავალური ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელები ამ დავალებისთვის გამოყენებულია, რომელიც ძალიან ეფექტიურად გამოყენება კომპოზიცი ოჲფრთ გჟთფკთ ჲრდჲგჲპთლთ პაბჲრარა ნა დჲლვმთ ჟვრპაუთ, კჲთრჲ ოჲლსზეარ ეთჟკპთმთნართგნთ ოპთჟლვეგაŒა, კჲთრჲ თმაარ ოპაგთლნა კჲნრპჲლ ნა ოჲეჲბპთრვ კაოანრთრთ, ჱარჲა ქრჲ ჟვ ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციისთვის განსხვავებული განსხვავებული სახელსაწყისი გამოყენება, ჩვენ განსხვავებთ თუ ეს მოდელები ფაქტიურად ვისწავლოთ წარმოდგენების სანიშვნელობას შექმნა, ან უკვე კლასიფიკაციისთვის კ ჩვენი ჰიპოტეზეზის ტესტისთვის, ჩვენ ყველაფერი ენატურის სტრუქტურაციას შევცვალობთ, სადაც განსწავლება და ტესტის სტრუქტურაციას არ აქვს პირადი ლექსიკონ ჩვენ განსხვავებული ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციების შესწავლით და დაახლოებით, რომ ამ მონაცემების კონფიკაცია დიდი გამოსახულება აქვს. საბოლოოდ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგრამის რეგილარიზაციის ტექნოგიებით, რომლებიც გადავიწყენებთ კლავისკონზე, შეგვიძლია ძალიან უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ', 'el': 'Η ταξινόμηση κειμένου είναι ένα από τα πιο ευρέως μελετημένα καθήκοντα στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Με κίνητρο την αρχή της σύνθεσης, έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί μεγάλα πολυεπίπεδα μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων για την εργασία αυτή σε μια προσπάθεια αποτελεσματικής αξιοποίησης των συστατικών εκφράσεων. Σχεδόν όλες οι αναφερθείσες εργασίες εκπαιδεύουν μεγάλα δίκτυα χρησιμοποιώντας διακριτικές προσεγγίσεις, οι οποίες έρχονται με την επιφύλαξη ότι δεν υπάρχει κατάλληλος έλεγχος δυναμικότητας, καθώς τείνουν να προσκολλώνται σε οποιοδήποτε σήμα που δεν μπορεί να γενικεύσει. Χρησιμοποιώντας διάφορες σύγχρονες προσεγγίσεις για την ταξινόμηση κειμένου, διερευνούμε αν αυτά τα μοντέλα μαθαίνουν πραγματικά να συνθέτουν το νόημα των προτάσεων ή ακόμα εστιάζουν σε ορισμένες λέξεις-κλειδιά ή λεξικά για την ταξινόμηση του εγγράφου. Για να δοκιμάσουμε την υπόθεσή μας, κατασκευάζουμε προσεκτικά σύνολα δεδομένων όπου οι διαιρέσεις εκπαίδευσης και δοκιμών δεν έχουν άμεση επικάλυψη τέτοιων λεξικών, αλλά η συνολική γλωσσική δομή θα ήταν παρόμοια. Μελετάμε διάφορους ταξινομητές κειμένου και παρατηρούμε ότι υπάρχει μεγάλη πτώση απόδοσης σε αυτά τα σύνολα δεδομένων. Τέλος, καταδεικνύουμε ότι ακόμη και απλά μοντέλα με τις προτεινόμενες τεχνικές κανονικοποίησης, που αποθαρρύνουν την εστίαση στα βασικά λεξικά, μπορούν να βελτιώσουν σημαντικά την ακρίβεια ταξινόμησης.', 'hu': 'A szövegosztályozás a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás egyik legszélesebb körben tanulmányozott feladata. A kompozicionalitás elve által motivált nagy többrétegű neurális hálózati modelleket alkalmaztunk ehhez a feladathoz, hogy hatékonyan hasznosítsuk az alkotó kifejezéseket. A jelentett munkahelyek szinte mindegyike diszkriminatív megközelítéseket alkalmaz nagy hálózatokat, amelyek nem rendelkeznek megfelelő kapacitásszabályozással, mivel hajlamosak minden olyan jelhez kapcsolódni, amely nem általánosítható. A szövegosztályozás különböző korszerű megközelítéseit használva megvizsgáljuk, hogy ezek a modellek megtanulják-e összeállítani a mondatok jelentését, vagy csak néhány kulcsszóra vagy lexikonra összpontosítanak a dokumentum osztályozásához. Hipotézisünk teszteléséhez gondosan olyan adatkészleteket építünk, amelyekben a képzés és a tesztfelosztások nincsenek közvetlen átfedések az ilyen lexikonokkal, de az általános nyelvi struktúra hasonló lenne. Különböző szövegosztályozókat tanulmányozunk, és megfigyeljük, hogy ezeknek az adatkészleteknek nagy teljesítménycsökkenése van. Végül megmutatjuk, hogy még a javasolt regularizációs technikáinkkal alkalmazott egyszerű modellek is jelentősen javíthatják az osztályozás pontosságát, amelyek a kulcsfontosságú lexikonokra összpontosítanak.', 'it': "La classificazione del testo è uno dei compiti più studiati nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Motivati dal principio di compositività, per questo compito sono stati impiegati modelli di rete neurale multistrato di grandi dimensioni nel tentativo di utilizzare efficacemente le espressioni costituenti. Quasi tutte le reti di lavoro riportate formano grandi reti utilizzando approcci discriminatori, che vengono con un avvertimento di non controllo adeguato della capacità, in quanto tendono ad agganciarsi a qualsiasi segnale che non può generalizzare. Utilizzando vari approcci recenti allo stato dell'arte per la classificazione del testo, esploriamo se questi modelli imparano effettivamente a comporre il significato delle frasi o ancora si concentrano su alcune parole chiave o lessici per classificare il documento. Per testare la nostra ipotesi, costruiamo attentamente set di dati in cui le divisioni di formazione e test non hanno sovrapposizioni dirette di tali lessici, ma la struttura linguistica complessiva sarebbe simile. Studiamo vari classificatori di testo e osserviamo che c'è un grande calo delle prestazioni su questi set di dati. Infine, mostriamo che anche i modelli semplici con le nostre tecniche di regolarizzazione proposte, che disincentivano la focalizzazione sui lessici chiave, possono migliorare notevolmente l'accuratezza della classificazione.", 'lt': 'Teksto klasifikacija yra viena iš plačiausiai išnagrinėtų gamtos kalbų apdorojimo užduočių. Ši užduotis grindžiama sudėtingumo principu, siekiant veiksmingai naudoti sudedamųjų dalių išraiškas, buvo naudojami dideli daugiasluoksniai nervų tinklo modeliai. Beveik visi pranešti darbo tinklai traukia didelius tinklus taikant diskriminacinius metodus, kurie neturi tinkamos pajėgumų kontrolės, nes jie dažniausiai prisijungia prie bet kokio signalo, kuris gali nesuplisti. Naudodamiesi įvairiais naujausiais metodais teksto klasifikacijai, tiriame, ar šie modeliai iš tikrųjų išmoko sudaryti sakinių reikšmę, ar vis dar daugiausia dėmesio skiria tam tikriems raktiniams žodžiams ar leksikonams dokumentui klasifikuoti. To test our hypothesis, we carefully construct datasets where the training and test splits have no direct overlap of such lexicons, but overall language structure would be similar.  Mes tiriame įvairius tekstų klasifikatorius ir pastebime, kad šių duomenų rinkinių rezultatai labai mažėja. Galiausiai parodome, kad net paprasti modeliai su mūsų siūlomais reguliavimo metodais, kurie neleidžia sutelkti dėmesio į pagrindinius leksikonus, gali gerokai pagerinti klasifikacijos tikslumą.', 'mk': 'Класификацијата на текстот е една од најшироките проучени задачи во природното обработување јазик. Мотивирани од принципот на композицијалност, за оваа задача се употребени големи мултислоевни модели на нервната мрежа во обид за ефикасно искористување на конститутивните изрази. Скоро сите известени работни мрежи ги обучуваат големите мрежи користејќи дискриминативни пристапи, кои доаѓаат со пештера без соодветна контрола на капацитетот, бидејќи тие се приклучуваат на било кој сигнал кој можеби не се генерализира. Користејќи различни неодамнешни најнови пристапи за класификација на текст, истражуваме дали овие модели навистина научија да го композираат значењето на речениците или сепак се фокусираат на некои клучни зборови или лексикони за класификација на документот. За да ја тестираме нашата хипотеза, внимателно конструираме датотеки каде што обуката и тестовите делови немаат директно прекривање на таквите лексикони, но целокупната јазичка структура би била слична. Ги проучуваме различните класификатори на текст и набљудуваме дека постои голем пад на резултатите на овие податоци. Конечно, покажуваме дека дури и едноставните модели со нашите предложени техники на регуларизација, кои го дезинтивизираат фокусирањето на клучните лексикони, може значително да ја подобрат прецизноста на класификацијата.', 'kk': 'Мәтін бағалау - табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін ең көп оқылған тапсырмалардың бірі. Бұл тапсырма үшін бірнеше қабатты невраллық желінің принципі бойынша жылжытылады. Бұл тапсырма үшін көп қабатты невраллық желінің үлгілері тұрақты өрнектерді пайдалану әрекетін Барлық хабарлаған жұмыс жерлері дискриминациялық жағдайларды қолдануға арналған үлкен желілерді көмектеседі. Олар жалпы көмектеспейтін сигналарды көмектеседі. Бұл үлгілер сөздердің мазмұнын құру немесе құжатты классификациялау үшін кейбір кілт сөздер немесе лексикондарға көздейтінін зерттейміз. Гипотезиямызды тексеру үшін, біз деректер жиындарын құрамыз, бұл лектикондардың тәртіпсіздігі жоқ, бірақ әрқашанда тіл құрылымы ұқсас болады. Біз әртүрлі мәтін классификацияларын зерттеп, бұл деректер қорларында үлкен әрекеттер жоғалтылып тұрғанын көреміз. Соңғы сәтте, біз басқа лекцияларға назар ауыстыру үлгілеріміздің қарапайым үлгілерімізді көрсету мүмкін болады.', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയുടെ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും വിശാലമായി പഠിച്ച ജോലികളില സജ്ജീകരണത്തിന്റെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്ക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പ്രഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമ പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കപ്പെട്ട എല്ലാ പണിയിടത്തിലും വ്യത്യസ്തമായ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് വലിയ നെറ്റുകള്\u200d ട്രെയിന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ശരിയായ കഴിവുകളുടെ  വാക്കുകളുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം സങ്കല്\u200dപിക്കാന്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഹൈപ്പിറ്റസിസ്സിനെ പരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d, പരിശീലനത്തിനും പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനും നേരിട്ടുള്ള ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200dമാരുടെ സ്ഥാനത് നമ്മള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു ഈ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d വലിയ പ്രദര്\u200dശിദ്ധത്തിന്റെ പ്രകടന അവസാനം, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട നിയന്ത്രണത്തിന്റെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകളുടെ കൂടെ എളുപ്പമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പോല', 'mt': 'Il-klassifikazzjoni tat-test hija waħda mill-kompiti l-aktar studjati fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Motivated by the principle of compositionality, large multilayer neural network models have been employed for this task in an attempt to effectively utilize the constituent expressions.  Kważi n-netwerks kbar tat-taħriġ tax-xogħol kollha rrappurtati jużaw approċċi diskriminatorji, li ġejjin b’qabża mingħajr kontroll xieraq tal-kapaċità, peress li għandhom it-tendenza li jilqgħu ma’ kwalunkwe sinjal li jista’ ma jiġġeneralizzax. Bl-użu ta’ diversi approċċi moderni reċenti għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-test, nistudjaw jekk dawn il-mudelli jitgħallmux fil-fatt jikkomponu t-tifsira tas-sentenzi jew xorta jiffokawx biss fuq xi kliem ewlieni jew lexicons għall-klassifikazzjoni tad-dokument. Biex tittestja l-ipoteżi tagħna, aħna nibnu b’attenzjoni settijiet ta’ dejta fejn it-taħriġ u l-qsim tat-test ma għandhom l-ebda sovrappożizzjoni diretta ta’ dawn il-lexicons, iżda l-istruttura ġenerali tal-lingwa tkun simili. Aħna nistudjaw diversi klassifikaturi tat-testi u ninservaw li hemm tnaqqis kbir fil-prestazzjoni fuq dawn is-settijiet tad-dejta. Fl-aħħar nett, nuru li anke mudelli sempliċi bit-tekniki ta’ regolarizzazzjoni proposti tagħna, li jiddiżinċentivaw l-iffukar fuq il-lexikoni ewlenin, jistgħu jtejbu b’mod sostanzjali l-preċiżjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni.', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi teks adalah salah satu tugas yang paling dipelajari dalam pemprosesan bahasa alami. Motivated by the principle of compositionality, large multilayer neural network models have been employed for this task in an attempt to effectively use the constituent expressions. Hampir semua kerja dilaporkan melatih rangkaian besar menggunakan pendekatan diskriminatif, yang datang dengan caveat tanpa kawalan kapasitas yang betul, kerana mereka cenderung untuk menyambung pada mana-mana isyarat yang mungkin tidak menyebarkan. Mengguna pelbagai pendekatan state-of-the-art baru-baru ini untuk klasifikasi teks, kita mengeksplorasi sama ada model ini benar-benar belajar untuk komponen makna kalimat atau masih fokus pada beberapa kata kunci atau leksikon untuk klasifikasi dokumen. Untuk menguji hipotesis kita, kita berhati-hati membina set data di mana latihan dan pembahagian ujian tidak mempunyai meliputi langsung leksikon seperti itu, tetapi struktur bahasa keseluruhan akan sama. Kami mempelajari pelbagai klasifikasi teks dan mengamati bahawa terdapat turun prestasi besar pada set data ini. Akhirnya, kita menunjukkan bahawa walaupun model sederhana dengan teknik pengaturan yang kami cadangkan, yang mengecewakan fokus pada leksikon kunci, boleh meningkatkan ketepatan kellasan secara mendasar.', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja tekstu jest jednym z najczęściej badanych zadań w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego. Motywowane zasadą kompozycyjności, do tego zadania zastosowano duże wielowarstwowe modele sieci neuronowych w celu skutecznego wykorzystania wyrażeń składowych. Prawie wszystkie zgłoszone prace wykorzystują duże sieci przy użyciu podejść dyskryminacyjnych, które wiążą się z zastrzeżeniem braku właściwej kontroli pojemności, ponieważ mają tendencję do przychwytywania się do każdego sygnału, który nie może się uogólniać. Korzystając z różnych najnowocześniejszych podejść do klasyfikacji tekstu, badamy, czy modele te rzeczywiście uczą się komponować znaczenie zdań, czy nadal skupiają się na niektórych słowach kluczowych lub leksykonach do klasyfikacji dokumentu. Aby sprawdzić naszą hipotezę, starannie konstruujemy zbiory danych, w których podziały treningowe i testowe nie mają bezpośredniego nakładania się takich leksykonów, ale ogólna struktura językowa byłaby podobna. Badamy różne klasyfikatory tekstowe i obserwujemy, że w tych zbiorach danych występuje duży spadek wydajności. Wreszcie pokazujemy, że nawet proste modele z proponowanymi przez nas technikami regularyzacji, które zniechęcają skupienie się na kluczowych leksykonach, mogą znacznie poprawić dokładność klasyfikacji.', 'mn': 'Текст хуваалтын нэг нь байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн хамгийн өргөн судалсан ажил юм. Бүтээлч байдлын үндсэнээр хөдөлгөөн, олон давхар тархины сэтгэл сүлжээний загвар нь энэ үйл ажилд хэрэглэгдсэн бөгөөд хэмжээний илэрхийллийг эффективно ашиглах хичээлд ашиглаж байна. Харин бараг бүх тайлбарласан ажлын том сүлжээний хөдөлгөөн ашиглан ялгаагүй арга барилгыг ашиглаж байдаг. Тэд ерөнхийлөгч байж болохгүй ямар ч мэдээлэл дээр нэвтрүүлдэг. Сүүлийн үеийн урлагийн арга баримтуудыг хэрэглэхэд бид эдгээр загварууд баримтуудын утгыг бий болгож сурах эсвэл баримтуудыг ангилах зарим түлхүүр үг эсвэл лексиконууд дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг эсэхийг судалж байна. Хувь санааг шалгахын тулд бид өгөгдлийн сангуудыг анхааралтай бүтээж байдаг. Сургууль болон шалгалтын хэсэгт ийм лексиконуудыг шууд ихэсгэдэггүй. Гэхдээ ерөнхий хэл бүтэц ижилхэн байх болно. Бид өөр хэлбэрийн текст хуваарилагчид судалж, эдгээр өгөгдлийн санд том үйл ажиллагаа буурч байна гэдгийг анзаарлаа. Эцэст нь бид энгийн загварууд хүртэл бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн шударга хэмжээний техникуудын тухай ихэвчлэн ангилалд ангилалд төвлөрүүлэх арга загварууд нь хуваалцааны зөв байдлыг сайжруулж чадна.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea textului este una dintre cele mai studiate sarcini în procesarea limbajului natural. Motivate de principiul compoziționalității, modele mari de rețele neurale multistrat au fost utilizate pentru această sarcină în încercarea de a utiliza eficient expresiile constitutive. Aproape toate lucrările raportate formează rețele mari folosind abordări discriminatorii, care vin cu un avertisment de lipsă de control adecvat al capacității, deoarece tind să se conecteze la orice semnal care nu poate generaliza. Folosind diferite abordări recente de ultimă generație pentru clasificarea textelor, explorăm dacă aceste modele învață de fapt să compună sensul propozițiilor sau încă doar să se concentreze asupra unor cuvinte cheie sau lexicoane pentru clasificarea documentului. Pentru a testa ipoteza noastră, construim cu atenție seturi de date în care fracțiunile de formare și test nu au o suprapunere directă a unor astfel de lexicoane, dar structura lingvistică globală ar fi similară. Studiem diferite clasificatoare de text și observăm că există o scădere mare a performanțelor acestor seturi de date. În cele din urmă, arătăm că chiar și modelele simple cu tehnicile noastre de regularizare propuse, care descurajează concentrarea pe lexicoanele cheie, pot îmbunătăți substanțial acuratețea clasificării.', 'no': 'Tekstklassifikasjon er ein av dei mest studerte oppgåva i naturspråkshandtering. For denne oppgåva er det aktiverte med prinsippet av komposisjonalitet, og det er brukt stor fleire lag- nøyralnettverksmodeller for dette oppgåvet i eit forsøk å bruka konstituentuttrykket effektivt. Nærmest alle rapporterte arbeidstasjonen har stor nettverk med diskriminasjonsbruk, som kommer med ein høgd av ingen rett kapasitetskontroll, sidan dei tenderer å slå på nokon signal som kanskje ikkje generelliserer. Bruk ulike nyleg tilnærmingar av kunsten til tekstklassifikasjon, så utforskar vi om desse modelane faktisk lærer å lage betydninga på setningane eller berre fokuserer på nokre nøkkelord eller leksikon for å klassifisera dokumentet. For å testa hypotesien vårt, konstruerer vi datasett forsiktig der opplæringa og testsplittingar ikkje har direkte overlapping av slike leksikon, men overalt språkstuktur vil vera liknande. Vi studerer forskjellige tekstklassifikatorar og observerer at det er ein stor effektslepp på desse datasettene. I slutt viser vi at sjølv enkle modeller med våre foreslått regulariseringsteknikk, som disinsentifiserer fokusering på nøkkelleksikon, kan forbetra klassifikasjons nøyaktighet.', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija teksta je jedna od najširokih proučavanijih zadataka u procesu prirodnog jezika. Motivirani od načela kompozicionalnosti, veliki multislojni neuralni mrežni modeli su zaposleni za ovaj zadatak u pokušaju efektivnog korištenja konstitucionih izraza. Skoro svi prijavljeni radni rad treniraju velike mreže koristeći diskriminativne pristupe, koje dolaze sa prigovorom bez odgovarajuće kontrole kapaciteta, jer se navode da se uključe na bilo koji signal koji ne može generalizirati. Koristeći različite nedavne pristupe umetnosti za klasifikaciju teksta, istražujemo da li ovi modeli zapravo naučimo da sastave smisao rečenica ili se još uvek fokusiramo na neke ključne reči ili leksione za klasifikaciju dokumenta. Da bismo testirali našu hipotezu, pažljivo konstruirali podatke gde trening i test spliti nemaju direktno preklapanje takvih leksiona, ali ukupna jezička struktura bi bila slična. Proučavamo razne klasifikatore teksta i posmatramo da postoji veliki pad izvedbe na ovim podacima. Konačno, pokazujemo da čak i jednostavni modeli sa našim predloženim tehnikama regularizacije, koje disincentiviraju fokusiranje na ključne leksione, značajno mogu poboljšati tačnost klasifikacije.', 'si': 'පාළුවන් විශේෂණය තමයි ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනයේ සියළුම විශේෂ කරපු කාර්ය සංවිධානයේ ප්\u200dරධානයෙන්, ලොකු විශාල විශාල විශාල විධානයෙන්, ලොකු විශාල විශාල විධානය සඳහා මේ වැඩ සඳහා පරික විශේෂ විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් හැම වැරැද්ධ වැඩක් ලොකු ජාලය ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම හොඳ විවිදිහට අලුත් ස්ථිතිය-of-the-art approach භාවිත කරන්න, අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා මේ මොඩේල් ඇත්තටම වාර්තාවේ අදහසක් සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න ඉගෙන ගන්නේ නැත්නම්  අපේ විශ්වාස පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අපි පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා දත්ත සටහන් සිද්ධ කරනවා කියලා, ඒ වගේ ලෙක්සිකොන්ස් වල ප්\u200dරත අපි විවිදිහට පාළුවක් විශේෂකය අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා සහ බලන්නේ මේ දත්ත සේට් වල ලොකු ප්\u200dරභාවිත වැඩ අන්තිමේදී, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ විධානය සමග සාමාන්\u200dය මොඩේල්ස් වලින් අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ විධානය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිචාර', 'so': 'Fasaxa qoraalku waa mid ka mid ah shaqooyinka lagu baray oo ugu badnaan baaraandegista afka asalka ah. Motivated by the principle of compositionality, large multilayer neural network models have been employed for this task in an attempt to effectively utilize the constituent expressions.  Inta badan shabakado shaqo ee la soo sheegay oo dhan waxaa lagu isticmaalaa qaabab takoorista ah, taasoo la yimaada godad aan awoodda ku habboon, sidaa darteed waxay u baaraandegaan calaamad kasta oo aan soo saari karin. Isku isticmaalaya qaabilaada farshaxanka kala duduwan ee qoraalka, waxaynu baarinaynaa in tusaalahanu ay u bartaan inay sameyn karto maanka hadallada ama weliba kaloo ku kalsoonaan hadal furan ama leksis si ay u fasaxaan qoraalka. Si aan u imtixaano fikirkeena, si taxadar ah ayaannu u sameynaa sawirada macluumaadka, meesha waxbarashada iyo imtixaanka aan toos u lahayn dhibaatooyinka leksisiyada, laakiin waxaa la mid ah dhismaha luuqadda oo dhan. Waxaynu baranaynaa fasaxyo kala duduwan oo qoraal ah, waxaynu fiirinaynaa in sameynta waxyaabaha lagu sameynayo aad u weyn. Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu tusnaynaa in xittaa tusaalooyin fudud oo ay leeyihiin qalabka la soo jeedo oo la soo saaray, taas oo aad u fududaysan karo si saxda fasaxa.', 'sv': 'Textklassificering är en av de mest studerade uppgifterna inom naturlig språkbehandling. Motiverade av kompositionsprincipen har stora flerlagers neurala nätverksmodeller använts för denna uppgift i ett försök att effektivt utnyttja de konstituerande uttrycken. Nästan alla rapporterade arbetsgrupper tränar stora nätverk med diskriminerande metoder, som kommer med en varning om ingen ordentlig kapacitetskontroll, eftersom de tenderar att låsa på någon signal som kanske inte generaliserar. Med hjälp av olika senaste state-of-the-art tillvägagångssätt för textklassificering undersöker vi om dessa modeller faktiskt lär sig att komponera meningarna eller fortfarande bara fokusera på några nyckelord eller lexikon för att klassificera dokumentet. För att testa vår hypotes konstruerar vi noggrant datauppsättningar där utbildnings- och testdelningarna inte har någon direkt överlappning av sådana lexikon, men den övergripande språkstrukturen skulle vara likartad. Vi studerar olika textklassificerare och observerar att det finns en stor prestandafunktion på dessa dataset. Slutligen visar vi att även enkla modeller med våra föreslagna regulariseringstekniker, som avskräcker fokus på nyckellexikon, avsevärt kan förbättra klassificeringens noggrannhet.', 'ta': 'உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் அதிகப்படியாக படிக்கப்பட்ட பணிகளில் ஒன்றாகும். Motivated by the principle of compositionality, large multilayer neural network models have been employed for this task in an attempt to effectively utilize the constituent expressions.  கிட்டத்தட்ட அனைத்து அறிக்கப்பட்ட பணி வலைப்பின்னல்களுக்கும் வித்தியாசமான முறைகளை பயன்படுத்தி பெரிய வலைப்பின்னல்கள் பயிற்சி செய்யும், அது  உரை வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கு அண்மைகளை பயன்படுத்தி, இந்த மாதிரிகள் உண்மையில் வாக்கியங்களின் அர்த்தத்தை உருவாக்க கற்றுக் கொள்வதா அல்லது ஆவணத்தை வகைப்படுத்துவதற்கு  எங்கள் hypothesis சோதிக்க, பயிற்சி மற்றும் பரிசோதனை பிரிவுகள் இத்தகைய நேரடி மேல் மூடுதல் இல்லை, ஆனால் மொத்த மொழி உருவமைப்பு சமமாகும். நாம் பல்வேறு உரை வகுப்பாளர்களை படிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் இந்த தரவுத்தளங்களில் ஒரு பெரிய செயல்பாடு குறைவு உள இறுதியில், நாம் கூட எளிய மாதிரிகளை காண்பிக்கிறோம் நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட கட்டுப்பாட்டு தொழில்நுட்பத்துடன் கூட, அது விசை லெக்ச', 'ur': 'پاکستان کلاسپیٹ کی تعلیم طبیعی زبان پرسس میں سب سے زیادہ پڑھی ہوئی کاموں میں سے ایک ہے. اس کام کے لئے بہت سی لائر نیورل نیٹ ورک موڈل کے ذریعہ سے چلنے کی کوشش کی گئی ہے کہ اس کام کے لئے مصنوعیت کے مطابق استعمال کرنے کی کوشش کریں۔ تقریباً تمام گزارش کے کام بڑے نیٹ ورک کو ٹرین کر رہے ہیں، جو تقریباً تقریباً طریقے کے مطابق آتے ہیں، جو کوئی مطابق قابلیت کنٹرول کے مطابق کوئی غار لے کر آتے ہیں، جیسے وہ کسی سیگنالہ پر لپٹ رہے ہیں جو کسی طرح سے زیادہ نہیں آ مختلف اچھی موقعیت کی آرتی کے مطابق تفصیل کے لئے پہنچ جاتے ہیں، ہم اسے دیکھتے ہیں کہ یہ موڈل واقعی سنتے ہیں کہ کلیزوں کا معنی لکھ سکتے ہیں یا اب بھی کچھ کلیزوں یا لکسونز پر منتظر رہتے ہیں. ہماری فرضی کی آزمائش کے لئے، ہم ڈیٹ سٹ بناتے ہیں جہاں تدریس اور آزمائش ٹکڑے ایسی لکسونز کی سیدھی اورلپ نہیں ہیں، لیکن کل زبان کی ساختار برابر ہوتی ہے۔ ہم مختلف ٹیکسٹ کلیسٹر کو پڑھتے ہیں اور دیکھتے ہیں کہ ان ڈیٹ سٹوں پر ایک بڑی پرورش ڈوب ہے۔ بالآخر، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ ہمارے پیشنهاد قانونی تکنیک کے ساتھ بھی ساده موڈل بھی، جو کلیسی لکسونز پر تمرکز کرتی ہیں، بہت زیادہ کلیسی دقیق کو بہتر کر سکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Matn classifikasi asl tilni boshqarish uchun eng katta oʻqilgan vazifalar. Bu vazifa uchun katta muloqonlar tarmoq modellari ishlatadi. Tanlangan ifodalarni effektiv foydalanish uchun. Ko'pchilik haqida hisoblangan hamma ish tarmoqlarini taʼminlov qilish uchun katta tarmoq tarmoqni tahlil qiladi. Bu sohalar juda yetarli qobiliyat boshqaruvchiga ega bo'lgan qo'llanmagan holatda ishlab chiqaradi. Yaqinda ishlatilgan bir necha xil holatda matn darajasini ishlatish mumkin, biz bu modellar aslida so'zlarning ma'nosini yaratishni o'rganamiz yoki bu hujjatni classifash uchun bir necha tugmalar yoki leksikanlarni foydalanamiz. Biz hypotesiyasimizni tekshirish uchun taʼminlovchi va sinov splittiyatlarni tahrirlash kerak, lekin butunlay tillar tuzilishi bir xil bo'lishi mumkin. Biz har xil matn turlarini o'rganamiz va bu maʼlumotlar tarkibidagi katta ishlashni ko'rganamiz. Keyingi esa biz ko'rsatganimiz, davomiy qilingan boshqarish tugmalarimiz bilan oddiy modellarni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin. Bu tugmalar leksikanlarni foydalanishga qiziqarishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Đoạn phân loại là một trong những công việc được nghiên cứu nhiều nhất trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Dựa trên nguyên tắc về độ hợp tác, các mô hình mạng thần kinh lớn trên nhiều lớp được áp dụng cho nhiệm vụ này trong nỗ lực sử dụng các biểu thức liên tục. Hầu hết các công trình báo cáo về các mạng lưới lớn nhờ vào các phương pháp phân biệt, đến với sự sụp đổ của sự thiếu khả năng kiểm soát, vì chúng có xu hướng dựa vào bất kỳ tín hiệu nào không tổng hợp. Sử dụng các phương pháp hiện đại mới nhất cho việc phân loại văn bản, chúng tôi tìm hiểu liệu các mô hình này có thật sự học được cách cấu thành ý nghĩa của các câu, hay chỉ tập trung vào vài từ khoá hoặc từ ngữ để phân loại tài liệu. Để kiểm tra giả thuyết của chúng tôi, chúng tôi cẩn thận xây dựng các tập tin nơi các tách ra huấn luyện và thử nghiệm không có sự chồng chéo trực tiếp với các từ này, nhưng cấu trúc ngôn ngữ tổng hợp sẽ giống nhau. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu các phân loại văn bản khác nhau và quan sát rằng có một sự giảm sút lớn trong các tập tin này. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng thậm chí các mô hình đơn giản với các kỹ thuật hoá học đã đề xuất, khiến khuynh hướng tập trung vào ngôn ngữ chìa khóa, có thể cải thiện độ chính xác phân loại.', 'bg': 'Класификацията на текста е една от най-широко изучаваните задачи в обработката на естествения език. Мотивирани от принципа на композицията, за тази задача са използвани големи многослойни модели на невронна мрежа в опит ефективно да се използват съставните изрази. Почти цялата докладвана работа обучава големи мрежи, използвайки дискриминационни подходи, които идват с предупреждение за липса на подходящ контрол на капацитета, тъй като те са склонни да се прихващат към всеки сигнал, който може да не се обобщава. Използвайки различни съвременни подходи за класификация на текста, ние изследваме дали тези модели действително се научават да композират смисъла на изреченията или все още се фокусират върху някои ключови думи или лексикони за класификация на документа. За да тестваме хипотезата си, внимателно конструираме набори от данни, където обучението и тестовите разделения нямат пряко припокриване на такива лексикони, но цялостната езикова структура би била сходна. Изследваме различни текстови класификатори и наблюдаваме, че има голям спад на производителността на тези набори от данни. И накрая, показваме, че дори простите модели с предложените от нас техники за регулиране, които дезинцентивизират фокуса върху ключовите лексикони, могат значително да подобрят точността на класификацията.', 'da': 'Tekstklassifikation er en af de mest undersøgte opgaver i naturlig sprogbehandling. Motiveret af kompositionsprincippet er store flerlags neurale netværksmodeller blevet anvendt til denne opgave i et forsøg på effektivt at udnytte de konstituerende udtryk. Næsten alle de rapporterede arbejdsgrupper uddanner store netværk ved hjælp af diskriminerende tilgange, som kommer med en advarsel om ingen ordentlig kapacitetskontrol, da de har tendens til at låse sig fast på ethvert signal, der måske ikke generaliserer. Ved hjælp af forskellige nyeste state-of-the-art tilgange til tekstklassificering undersøger vi, om disse modeller rent faktisk lærer at komponere betydningen af sætningerne eller stadig bare fokusere på nogle søgeord eller leksikoner til klassificering af dokumentet. For at teste vores hypotese konstruerer vi omhyggeligt datasæt, hvor trænings- og testopdelingen ikke har nogen direkte overlapning af sådanne leksikoner, men den overordnede sprogstruktur ville være ens. Vi studerer forskellige tekstklassificeringer og observerer, at der er et stort performance fald på disse datasæt. Endelig viser vi, at selv enkle modeller med vores foreslåede reguleringsteknikker, som afskrækker fokus på vigtige leksikoner, kan forbedre klassificeringsnøjagtigheden væsentligt.', 'nl': 'Tekstklassificatie is een van de meest bestudeerde taken in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal. Gemotiveerd door het principe van compositionaliteit, zijn grote meerlaagse neurale netwerkmodellen gebruikt voor deze taak in een poging om effectief gebruik te maken van de constitutionele expressies. Bijna alle gerapporteerde werken trainen grote netwerken met behulp van discriminerende benaderingen, die met een voorbehoud komen van geen goede capaciteitscontrole, omdat ze neigen om zich vast te houden aan elk signaal dat niet generaliseert. Met behulp van verschillende recente state-of-the-art benaderingen voor tekstclassificatie onderzoeken we of deze modellen daadwerkelijk leren de betekenis van de zinnen te componeren of zich nog steeds richten op enkele trefwoorden of lexicons voor het classificeren van het document. Om onze hypothese te testen, construeren we zorgvuldig datasets waarbij de training- en testsplits geen directe overlap van dergelijke lexicons hebben, maar de algehele taalstructuur vergelijkbaar zou zijn. We bestuderen verschillende tekstclassificatoren en constateren dat er een grote prestatiedaling is op deze datasets. Tot slot laten we zien dat zelfs eenvoudige modellen met onze voorgestelde regularisatietechnieken, die de focus op belangrijke lexicons ontmoedigen, de nauwkeurigheid van de classificatie aanzienlijk kunnen verbeteren.', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija teksta je jedna od najširokih ispitivanih zadataka prirodnog obrazovanja jezika. Pokušavajući učinkovito iskoristiti sastavne izraze, za taj zadatak je zaposleno velikim modelima multislojnih neuralnih mreža. Skoro svi prijavljeni radni rad treniraju velike mreže koristeći diskriminacijske pristupe, koje dolaze s prigovorom bez odgovarajuće kontrole kapaciteta, jer se navode na bilo koji signal koji ne može generalizirati. Koristeći različite nedavne pristupe stanja umjetnosti za klasifikaciju teksta, istražujemo da li ovi modeli zapravo naučimo da sastave smisao rečenica ili se i dalje fokusiramo na neke ključne riječi ili leksije za klasifikaciju dokumenta. Da bismo testirali našu hipotezu, pažljivo konstruirali podatke gdje trening i test splits nemaju direktno preklapanje takvih leksiona, ali cjelokupna jezička struktura bi bila slična. Proučavamo različite klasifikatore teksta i posmatramo da postoji veliki pad učinka na ovim podacima. Konačno, pokazujemo da čak i jednostavni modeli sa našim predloženim tehnikama regularizacije, koje disincentiviraju fokusiranje na ključne leksione, značajno mogu poboljšati točnost klasifikacije.', 'de': 'Die Textklassifizierung ist eine der am weitesten erforschten Aufgaben in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. Motiviert durch das Prinzip der Compositionalität wurden für diese Aufgabe große mehrschichtige neuronale Netzwerkmodelle eingesetzt, um die konstituierenden Ausdrücke effektiv zu nutzen. Fast alle gemeldeten Arbeiten trainieren große Netzwerke mit diskriminierenden Ansätzen, die mit einem Vorbehalt an einer ordnungsgemäßen Kapazitätskontrolle einhergehen, da sie dazu neigen, sich an jedes Signal zu binden, das möglicherweise nicht verallgemeinert wird. Anhand verschiedener aktueller Ansätze zur Textklassifizierung untersuchen wir, ob diese Modelle tatsächlich lernen, die Bedeutung der Sätze zu komponieren oder ob sie sich noch auf einige Schlüsselwörter oder Lexikone zur Klassifizierung des Dokuments konzentrieren. Um unsere Hypothese zu testen, konstruieren wir sorgfältig Datensätze, bei denen die Trainings- und Testsplits keine direkte Überschneidung solcher Lexikone aufweisen, aber die allgemeine Sprachstruktur ähnlich wäre. Wir untersuchen verschiedene Textklassifikatoren und beobachten, dass es einen großen Leistungsabfall dieser Datensätze gibt. Schließlich zeigen wir, dass selbst einfache Modelle mit unseren vorgeschlagenen Regularisierungstechniken, die die Fokussierung auf Schlüssellexikon ablehnen, die Klassifikationsgenauigkeit erheblich verbessern können.', 'ko': '텍스트 분류는 자연 언어 처리에서 가장 광범위하게 연구하는 임무 중의 하나이다.조합성 원리의 계발을 받아 대형 다층 신경 네트워크 모델은 이 임무에 사용되어 구성 표현식을 효과적으로 이용하려고 한다.거의 모든 보도된 작업은 대형 네트워크를 훈련시키는 데 차별화된 방법을 사용하지만, 요약할 수 없는 신호를 잠그기 때문에 적당한 용량 제어가 없다는 경고도 있다.각종 최신 텍스트 분류 방법을 사용하여 우리는 이러한 모델들이 문장 조합의 의미를 진정으로 배웠는지, 아니면 여전히 일부 키워드나 어휘에만 관심을 가지고 문서를 분류했는지 탐색했다.우리의 가설을 검증하기 위해 우리는 이러한 데이터 집합을 꼼꼼히 구축했다. 그 중에서 훈련과 테스트 분할은 이런 어휘의 직접적인 중첩이 없지만 전체적인 언어 구조는 비슷하다.우리는 각종 텍스트 분류기를 연구하였는데, 이러한 데이터 집합의 성능이 매우 크게 떨어지는 것을 발견하였다.마지막으로 우리는 우리가 제시한 정규화 기술의 간단한 모델을 사용해도 분류 정밀도를 현저히 높일 수 있고 관건적인 어휘에 대한 관심을 억제할 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.', 'fa': 'گرانش متن یکی از مهمترین کارهای مطالعه در پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. توسط اصل ترکیب، مدلهای شبکه عصبی بیشتر طبقه\u200cای برای این کار در تلاش برای فعالیت استفاده از واژه\u200cهای معادل استفاده شده است. تقریباً تمام گزارش\u200cهای کار بزرگ را با استفاده از نزدیک\u200cهای جدایی آموزش می\u200cدهند، که با یک غار از کنترل توانایی مناسب نیست، در حالی که به هر سیگنال که ممکن است ژنرال\u200cسازی نمی\u200cکند، می\u200cرسند. استفاده از طریق\u200cهای جدیدی موقعیت هنر برای کلیسازی متن، ما تحقیق می\u200cکنیم آیا این مدل\u200cها واقعاً معنی جمله\u200cها را می\u200cیابند یا هنوز فقط روی بعضی کلید\u200cها یا کلیسازی\u200cها برای کلیسازی سند تمرکز می\u200cکنیم. برای آزمایش فرضیه\u200cهای ما، ما با دقت مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها را ساختیم که قطعه\u200cهای آموزش و آزمایش\u200cها هیچ تغییر مستقیم از چنین کلکسیون ندارند، ولی عمومی ساختار زبان\u200cها مشابه خواهد بود. ما کلانتر متن\u200cهای مختلف را مطالعه می\u200cکنیم و مشاهده می\u200cکنیم که روی این مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها یک کاهش بزرگی وجود دارد. بالاخره، ما نشان می دهیم که حتی مدل ساده با تکنیک\u200cهای پیشنهاد قانونی ما، که تمرکز روی کلیدی\u200cهای کلیدی را ناتوان می\u200cکند، می\u200cتواند دقیقات گروهی را بسیار بهتر کند.', 'id': 'Klasifikasi teks adalah salah satu tugas yang paling dipelajari dalam proses bahasa alam. Motivated by the principle of compositionality, large multilayer neural network models have been employed for this task in an attempt to effectively utilize the constituent expressions. Hampir semua laporan kerja melatih jaringan besar menggunakan pendekatan diskriminatif, yang datang dengan caveat tanpa kendali kapasitas yang tepat, karena mereka cenderung untuk menyambung pada setiap sinyal yang mungkin tidak generalisasi. Menggunakan berbagai pendekatan terbaru baru-baru ini untuk klasifikasi teks, kami mengeksplorasi apakah model ini benar-benar belajar untuk menyatukan arti kalimat atau masih fokus pada beberapa kata kunci atau leksikon untuk klasifikasi dokumen. Untuk menguji hipotesis kita, kita berhati-hati membangun dataset di mana latihan dan ujian splits tidak memiliki overlap langsung dari leksikon seperti itu, tetapi keseluruhan struktur bahasa akan sama. Kami mempelajari berbagai klasifikasi teks dan mengamati bahwa ada titik prestasi besar pada set data ini. Akhirnya, kami menunjukkan bahwa bahkan model sederhana dengan teknik regularisasi kami yang diusulkan, yang menghentikan fokus pada leksikon kunci, dapat meningkatkan akurasi klasifikasi secara konsideratif.', 'sw': 'Kugawanyika kwa maandishi ni moja ya kazi zilizosomwa zaidi katika upasuaji wa lugha asili. Kutokana na kanuni ya ushirikiano, mitindo makubwa ya mtandao wa neura wa wateja wengi imetumiwa kwa ajili ya kazi hii ili kutumia ufanisi wa maoni ya wapiga kura. Karibu yote yaliyoripotiwa inafunza mitandao makubwa kwa kutumia mbinu za kibaguzi, ambazo zinakuja na pango ambalo hazina udhibiti wa uwezo sahihi, kwa sababu wanajifunza alama yoyote ambayo haiwezekani kuzalisha. Kwa kutumia njia mbalimbali za hali ya sanaa za hivi karibuni kwa ajili ya kutangaza usambazaji wa maandishi, tunagundua kama mifano hizi kwa kweli wanajifunza kuunda maana ya sentensi au bado tunajikita kwenye baadhi ya maneno au lexico kwa kutangaza nyaraka. Ili kujaribu nadharia yetu, tunajenga seti za taarifa kwa makini ambapo mafunzo na maeneo ya kujaribu hayana uzito wa moja kwa moja kwa moja kwa kiasi hiki cha lexico, lakini muundo wa lugha jumla utakuwa sawa. Tunawasoma wataalamu wa maandishi kadhaa na tunaona kuwa kuna kiwango kikubwa cha utendaji katika seti hizi za taarifa. Mwisho, tunaonyesha kwamba hata mifano rahisi yenye mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa kudhibiti, ambazo zinasisitiza lengo la kuonyesha lexico muhimu, inaweza kuboresha uhakika wa usawa wa usawa.', 'af': "Teks klasifikasie is een van die mees vaste studieerde taak in natuurlike taal verwerking. Gebeweging deur die prinsipe van komposiasionaliteit, groot multilaag neurale netwerk modele is gebruik vir hierdie taak in 'n probeer om die konstituent uitdrukkings effektief te gebruik. Omtrent al die raporteerde werk trein groot netwerke deur diskriminasiewe toegang te gebruik, wat met 'n speletjie van geen regte kapasiteit beheer kom nie, omdat hulle tendens om op enige sein te slaan wat dalk nie genereliseer nie. Gebruik ons verskeie onlangse staat-van-kuns toegang vir teks klasifikasie, ondersoek of hierdie modele eintlik leer om die betekening van die setings te stel of nog steeds net fokus op sommige sleutelwoorde of leksies vir die klasifikasie van die dokument. Om ons hipotees te toets, ons maak datastelle versigtig op waar die onderwerp en toets splitte geen direk oorvloediging van sodanige leksikone het nie, maar die hele taal struktuur sou gelyk wees. Ons studeer verskeie teks klassifiseerders en observer dat daar 'n groot prestasie op hierdie datastelle is. Eindelik, ons wys dat selfs eenvoudige modele met ons voorgestelde regularisasie-teknike, wat die fokus van sleutel-leksikone ondersoek, kan beteken klasifikasie-presies.", 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i tekstit është një nga detyrat më të studiuara në procesimin natyror të gjuhës. Motivuar nga parimi i kompozitivitetit, modelet e mëdha të rrjetit nervor të shumënivelit janë përdorur për këtë detyrë në një përpjekje për të përdorur efektivisht shprehjet përbërëse. Pothuajse të gjithë punët e njoftuara trajnojnë rrjete të mëdha duke përdorur qasje diskriminuese, të cilat vijnë me një shpellë pa kontroll të duhur të kapacitetit, pasi a to tenderojnë të lidhen me çdo sinjal që nuk mund të gjeneralizohet. Duke përdorur metoda të ndryshme më të fundit për klasifikimin e tekstit, ne eksplorojmë nëse këto modele mësojnë në fakt të kompozojnë kuptimin e fjalëve apo ende përqëndrohen në disa fjalë kyçe apo leksikone për klasifikimin e dokumentit. Për të testuar hipotezën tonë, ne ndërtojmë me kujdes grupe të dhënash ku stërvitja dhe ndarjet e testit nuk kanë mbishtypje të drejtpërdrejtë të këtyre lexikonëve, por struktura e përgjithshme e gjuhës do të ishte e ngjashme. Ne studiojmë klasifikuesit e ndryshëm të tekstit dhe vëzhgojmë se ka një rënie të madhe paraqitjesh në këto të dhëna. Më në fund, ne tregojmë se edhe modelet e thjeshta me teknikat tona të propozuara të rregullimit, të cilat disincentivizojnë përqëndrimin në lexikonet kyçe, mund të përmirësojnë thelbësisht saktësinë e klasifikimit.', 'tr': 'Metin klasifikasyýasy tebigy diller işleýän iň uly okuwçylan zadlaryň biri. Syýasatçylyk prinsipi tarapyndan süýtgedildi, uly gaty gaty nusgala nusgala modelleri bu zady üçin işledildi. constituent ifadeleri täsirleýä ulanmak üçin synanyşdyr. Diňe hemme rapor eden işiň ählisi diskriminat ýalaşyklary ulanan uly şebekeleri otlaýar. Bu ýerde hiç hili gowy ukyplaryň kontrolüniň ýüzüne düşýär, hem bu sygnal generalizasyz bolmaz sygnal ýaly çarpýarlar. Ýakyndaky sanat klasifikasyýasy üçin ullanýarys. Bu modelleriň aslynda sözleriň hoysyny ýazmagy öwrenip bilmeýändigini gözləýäris ýa-da senediň klasifikasyýa üçin birnäçe keywords ýa-da leksiýanlara üns berip bilmeýändigini gözləýäris Biziň hipotesiýamyzy barlamak üçin, bilim we test bölümleriniň derrew bir leksiýanyň üstünde hiç hili däldir, ýöne ähli dil strukturlarynyň meňzeş bolar. Biz dürli metin klassifikatçilerini öwrenýär we şol berüş setirlerinde uly hereket etmäge meňzeýäris. Iň soňunda, biz esasy nusgalarymyz düzgün taýýarlama tekniklerimizde hem basit nusgalarymyz açyk leksiýalaryň derejesini gowy görkezip biler.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ መግለጫ በአዳማዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ ውስጥ በተመረጠው ሥራ አንዱ ነው፡፡ በጥያቄ አካባቢ፣ ትልቁ ብዙዎችን የነጥብ መረብ ሞዴላዎች ለዚህ ስራ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ በተዘጋጁት ሁሉ የሥራ ወንበሮች ትልቅ ጥያቄዎችን በመጠቀም ይሞክራሉ፡፡ አዲስ የጽሑፍ ክፍተቶችን በመጠቀም፣ እነዚህ ዓይነቶች የቃላትን አካባቢ ማሳየት ወይም ሰነዱን ለመግለጽ የሚችሉትን የቁልፎች ቃላት ወይም የዝርዝር ቃላት ማሳየትን እናምናለን፡፡ hypothesis ለመፈተን፣ ትምህርት እና መፍጠር እንደነዚህ የሜክሲኮን አቅራቢያ መክፈቻ የለበትም፣ ነገር ግን የቋንቋው አካባቢ ይመስላል፡፡ የጽሑፍ ክፍተቶችን እናስተምራለን እነዚህንም ዳታተሮች ላይ ትልቅ የውጤት ክፍል እንዳለ እናይ፡፡ በመጨረሻውም፣ በተዘጋጀው የሥርዓት ሥርዓት ስልጣናዎች ያሉትን ቀላል ሞዴላዎችን እናሳየዋለን፤ በቁልፎች ላይ የሚያስደነግፍ የክፍለ ግንኙነትን ማሻሻል፡፡', 'az': 'Mətn klasifikasiyası təbiətli dil işləməsində ən çox çalışan işlərdən biridir. Kompozisyonlığın prinsipi ilə hərəkət edilmiş, böyük çoxlu katlı nöral ağ modelləri bu işin üçün istifadə edilmişdir. Yaklaşık bütün bildirilmiş iş işlər böyük a ğları təhsil edir ki, bu müəyyən edilməyən hər hansı bir sinyalə istifadə edə bilməyəcək hər hansı bir qüvvət kontroli ilə istifadə edilir. Mətn klasifikasyonu üçün müxtəlif müxtəlif məlumatların məlumatlarına yaxınlaşmalarını istifadə edərək, bu modellərin əslində sözlərin məlumatını yazmaq öyrənməsini öyrənməsini və ya hələ də belə bir nöcür sözlərin və ya leksiklərin məlumatını dəstəkləməsini öyrənirik Bizim hipotezimizi sınamaq üçün, təhsil və sınamaq bölümlərinin doğru-düzgün təhsil edilməsi üçün verilən quruları təhsil edirik, amma bütün dil quruluşu eyni ola bilər. Biz müxtəlif metin klasifikatorlarını təhsil edirik və bu verilən qurğuların üstündə böyük performans düşüşür. Nihayət, biz göstəririk ki, hətta bizim təbliğ etdiyimiz düzgünlük tekniklərimizlə basit modellər, ki anahtar leksiklərə odaklanmasını dəyişdirir, klasifikasiya doğruluğunu çox yaxşılaşdırır.', 'hy': "Տեքստի դասակարգման ամենալայն ուսումնասիրված խնդիրներից մեկն է բնական լեզվի վերաբերյալ: Այս խնդրի համար օգտագործվել են մեծ բազմաշերտ նյարդային ցանցի մոդելներ' փորձելով արդյունավետ օգտագործել բաղադրիչ արտահայտությունները: Գրեթե բոլոր հայտարարված աշխատանքները մեծ ցանցեր են սովորեցնում, օգտագործելով խտրականության մոտեցումներ, որոնք առաջացնում են առանց ճշգրիտ կարողությունների վերահսկողության քանդակի, քանի որ նրանք հակված են կապվել ցանկացած ազդանշանի վրա, որը կարող է ընդհանուր Օգտագործելով տեքստի դասակարգման համար տարբեր վերջին տարբերակներ, մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք, արդյոք այս մոդելները իրականում սովորում են կազմել նախադասությունների իմաստը, կամ միայն կենտրոնացնում են որոշ բառերի կամ լեքսիկոնների վրա փաստաթղթի դասակարգման համար: Հիպոթեզի փորձարկելու համար մենք ուշադիր կառուցում ենք տվյալների համակարգեր, որտեղ փորձարկումների և փորձարկումների բաժանումները չունեն այդպիսի լեքսիկոնների ուղղակի կապված, բայց լեզվի ընդհանուր կառուցվա Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տարբեր տեքստի դասակարգեր և նկատում ենք, որ այս տվյալների համակարգերի վրա մեծ նվազում է: Վերջապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ նույնիսկ պարզ մոդելները մեր առաջարկված ռեգուլարիզացիայի մեթոդներով, որոնք չեն դրդում կենտրոնանալ հիմնական լեքսիկոնների վրա, կարող են նշանակալի բարելավել դասակարգումների ճշգրտությունը:", 'bs': 'Klasifikacija teksta je jedna od najširokih ispitivanih zadataka u procesu prirodnog jezika. Pokušavajući učinkovito iskoristiti sastavne izraze, za taj zadatak je zaposleno velikim modelima neuralne mreže multislojnih slojeva. Skoro svi prijavljeni radni rad obučavaju velike mreže koristeći diskriminacijske pristupe, koje dolaze sa prigovorom bez odgovarajuće kontrole kapaciteta, jer se navode na bilo koji signal koji ne može generalizirati. Koristeći različite nedavne pristupe stanja umjetnosti za klasifikaciju teksta, istražujemo da li ovi modeli zapravo naučimo da sastave smisao rečenica ili se još uvek fokusiramo na neke ključne riječi ili leksije za klasifikaciju dokumenta. Da bismo testirali našu hipotezu, pažljivo konstruirali podatke gdje trening i test spliti nemaju direktno preklapanje takvih leksiona, ali cjelokupna jezička struktura bi bila slična. Proučavamo različite klasifikatore teksta i posmatramo da postoji veliki pad izvedbe na ovim podacima. Napokon, pokazujemo da čak i jednostavni modeli sa našim predloženim tehnikama regularizacije, koje disincentiviraju fokusiranje na ključne leksione, značajno mogu poboljšati tačnost klasifikacije.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় টেক্সট ব্যবহার করা সবচেয়ে ব্যাপকভাবে পড়া কাজ। এই কাজের জন্য বিশাল মাল্টিলেয়ার নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক মডেল ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে সংবিধান প্রকাশের প্রচেষ্টার জন্য। প্রায় সকল সংবাদ প্রতিবেদন করা হয়েছে কাজের ট্রেন বিশাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করে বৈষম্যের উপায় ব্যবহার করে, যা কোন সঠিক ক ক্ষমতার নিয়ন্ত্রণের গুহায় এসেছ সাম্প্রতিক শিল্পের বিভিন্ন রাষ্ট্র ব্যবহার করে লেখা শ্রেণীবিভাগের প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যবহার করে, আমরা খুঁজে বের করি এই মডেলগুলো এই বাক্যের মানে তৈরি করতে শি আমাদের হাইপিথিসিস পরীক্ষা করার জন্য আমরা সাবধানে তথ্য নির্মাণ করি যেখানে প্রশিক্ষণ এবং পরীক্ষা বিভিন্ন ভাষার প্রশিক্ষণ এবং পরীক্ষ আমরা বিভিন্ন টেক্সট বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন লেখা শিক্ষার্থীদের গবেষণা করি এবং দেখি যে এই ডাটাসেটগুলোতে একট শেষ পর্যন্ত আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এমনকি আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত নিয়ন্ত্রণের প্রযুক্তি নিয়ন্ত্রণের কৌশলের সাথে সাধারণ মডেল, যা মূল ল লেক্সিকোন দ', 'ca': "La classificació del text és una de les tasques més estudiadas en el processament natural de llenguatges. Motivat pel principi de composicionalitat, grans models de xarxa neural multicapa han estat utilitzats per aquesta tasca en un intent d'utilitzar efectivament les expressions constitutives. Gairebé totes les xarxes de treball que es reporten forman grans xarxes fent servir enfocaments discriminatius, que venen amb una caveta sense control adequat de capacitat, com tendeixen a connectar-se a qualsevol senyal que no s'generalitze. Utilitzant diversos enfocaments moderns recents per a classificar textos, explorem si aquests models aprenen a composir el significat de les frases o encara es concentren en algunes paraules clau o lexicòns per classificar el document. Per provar la nostra hipòtesi, construïm cuidadosament conjunts de dades on les divisions d'entrenament i de prova no tenen cap sobreposició directa d'aquests lexicòns, però l'estructura general del llenguatge seria similar. Estudem diversos classificadors de textos i observem que hi ha una gran baixa de rendiment en aquests conjunts de dades. Finalment, demostram que fins i tot models senzills amb les nostres tècniques de regularizació proposades, que desincentiven centrar-se en els lexicons clau, poden millorar substancialment la precisió de la classificació.", 'fi': 'Tekstin luokittelu on yksi yleisimmin tutkittuja tehtäviä luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä. Kompositionalismin periaatteella motivoituneita laajoja monikerroksisia neuroverkkomalleja on käytetty tähän tehtävään pyrkien hyödyntämään niitä tehokkaasti. Lähes kaikki raportoidut työt kouluttavat suuria verkkoja käyttäen diskriminatiivisia lähestymistapoja, joissa on varoitus siitä, että kapasiteettia ei säädetä asianmukaisesti, koska ne yleensä tarttuvat kaikkiin signaaleihin, jotka eivät välttämättä yleisty. Käyttämällä viimeisintä tekniikkaa tekstiluokitteluun liittyviä lähestymistapoja tutkimme, oppivatko nämä mallit todella säveltämään lauseiden merkityksen vai keskittyvätkö ne edelleen vain joihinkin avainsanoihin tai sanastoihin asiakirjan luokittelussa. Testataksemme hypoteesiamme rakennamme huolellisesti aineistoja, joissa koulutus- ja testijakaumat eivät ole suorassa päällekkäisyydessä tällaisten sanastojen kanssa, mutta yleinen kielirakenne olisi samanlainen. Tutkimme erilaisia tekstiluokittelijoita ja havaitsemme, että näiden aineistojen suorituskyky on laskenut huomattavasti. Lopuksi osoitamme, että jopa yksinkertaiset mallit ehdotetuilla säännöstelytekniikoilla, jotka eivät kannusta keskittymään avainsanastoon, voivat merkittävästi parantaa luokitustarkkuutta.', 'et': 'Teksti klassifitseerimine on üks kõige laiemalt uuritud ülesandeid looduskeele töötlemisel. Kompositsionaalsuse põhimõttel motiveeritud on selleks ülesandeks kasutatud suuri mitmekihilisi närvivõrgumudeleid, püüdes tõhusalt kasutada koostisosade väljendeid. Peaaegu kõik teatatud tööd koolitavad suuri võrke diskrimineerivate lähenemisviiside abil, millega kaasneb nõuetekohane võimsuse kontroll, kuna nad kipuvad kinni haarama mis tahes signaali, mis ei pruugi üldistada. Kasutades mitmeid hiljutisi tipptasemel lähenemisviise teksti klassifitseerimiseks, uurime, kas need mudelid õpivad tegelikult koostama lausete tähendust või keskenduvad ikkagi mõnele märksõnale või leksikonile dokumendi klassifitseerimiseks. Oma hüpoteesi testimiseks ehitame hoolikalt andmekogumid, kus koolitus- ja testijaotustel ei ole selliste leksikonide otsest kattumist, kuid üldine keelestruktuur oleks sarnane. Uurime erinevaid tekstiklassifitseerijaid ja täheldame, et nende andmekogumite jõudluse langus on suur. Lõpuks näitame, et isegi lihtsad mudelid meie väljapakutud regulatsioonimeetoditega, mis takistavad keskendumist võtmeleksikoonidele, võivad oluliselt parandada klassifitseerimise täpsust.', 'cs': 'Klasifikace textu je jednou z nejrozšířenějších úkolů ve zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Motivované principem kompozicionality byly pro tento úkol použity velké vícevrstvé modely neuronových sítí ve snaze efektivně využít konstituční výrazy. Téměř všechny nahlášené práce trénují velké sítě pomocí diskriminačních přístupů, které přicházejí s výhradou žádné správné kontroly kapacity, protože mají tendenci přicházet na jakýkoli signál, který nemusí zobecnit. S využitím různých nejnovějších přístupů pro klasifikaci textů zkoumáme, zda se tyto modely skutečně naučí složit význam vět, nebo se stále zaměřujeme na některá klíčová slova či lexikony pro klasifikaci dokumentu. Abychom otestovali naši hypotézu, pečlivě konstruujeme datové sady, kde tréninkové a testovací rozdělení nemají žádný přímý překrývání těchto slovníků, ale celková jazyková struktura by byla podobná. Studujeme různé klasifikátory textu a pozorujeme, že u těchto datových sad dochází k velkému poklesu výkonu. Nakonec ukazujeme, že i jednoduché modely s našimi navrhovanými regularizačními technikami, které odrazují zaměření na klíčové lexikony, mohou výrazně zlepšit přesnost klasifikace.', 'sk': 'Klasifikacija besedila je ena najbolj raziskanih nalog v obdelavi naravnega jezika. Motivirani po principu kompozicionalnosti, so bili za to nalogo uporabljeni večplastni modeli nevronskih omrežij, da bi učinkovito izkoristili sestavne izraze. Skoraj vsa poročana dela usposabljajo velika omrežja z uporabo diskriminativnih pristopov, ki prihajajo z opozorilom, da ni ustreznega nadzora zmogljivosti, saj se nagibajo k vsakemu signalu, ki se morda ne posploši. Z uporabo različnih najsodobnejših pristopov za klasifikacijo besedila raziskujemo, ali se ti modeli dejansko naučijo sestavljati pomen stavkov ali se še vedno osredotočajo na nekatere ključne besede ali leksikone za klasifikacijo dokumenta. Da bi preizkusili našo hipotezo, skrbno gradimo nabore podatkov, kjer treningi in preskusni deli nimajo neposrednega prekrivanja takih leksikonov, vendar bi bila celotna struktura jezika podobna. Preučujemo različne klasifikatorje besedil in opazujemo, da je pri teh naborih podatkov velik padec učinkovitosti. Nazadnje pokažemo, da lahko tudi preprosti modeli z našimi predlaganimi tehnikami regulacije, ki odvračajo osredotočenost na ključne leksikone, bistveno izboljšajo natančnost klasifikacije.', 'ha': "Classification Motivated by the principle of compositionality, large multilayer neural network models have been employed for this task in an attempt to effectively utilize the constituent expressions.  Taki duk abu da aka yi masa ana tafiyar aikin aiki na ƙarami masu girma, sunã yi amfani da hanyoyin gaura masu yin gaura, wanda ya zo da wani kõgon da bã ya da wani awon mai daidai, kamar yadda sunã sami zuwa duk alama wanda ba ya iya gabatar da shi ba. Yi amfani da masu motsi masu cikin halin-sanar na farko wa tsari matsayin, za'a yi amfani da waɗannan misalin za'a sanar da su zama ma'anar maganar maganar, ko kuma sai ka yi zura zura kan wasu kalmõmi ko leksisions dõmin su bayyana takardar. Dõmin ka jarrabi zaurenmu, za mu sami tsarin danatattu wajen taƙaitãwa da jarrabãwa a wurin da bã ya da dukkan rufe ko-nau'in wannan leksisi, kuma amma dukkan harshen za'a sami kamar shi. Munã karatun wasu fassarai na matsayi kuma munã ganin wani abu mai girma na samun wannan danasãri. Gani, za mu nũna, ko da misãlai masu sauƙi da kunnuwanmu da aka buɗa'a, masu kwaɗayi zuwa ma'abũcin leksisi, za'a ƙara tsakanin taƙaita.", 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Sampeyan nguasai perusahaan Sampeyan kabèh wong liyane wis nguasakno hukum gak wigat politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Ngawe ngerti seneng supotes, kita ngomong nik wektu nggawe dataset sing kudu kudu tindahan karo sapa nyong nik wektu nggawe layang seneng pisan Manuk, iso nggawe barang kelangan sampeyan luwih apik. section Tulung, awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono akeh model sing sampeyan karo awak dhéwé kuwi tékno sing beraksi ngono kuwi tindakan layakno sing wis dipun', 'he': 'מסגרת טקסט היא אחת מהמשימות המלמדות ביותר בעבודת שפת טבעית. מוטיבציה על ידי עקרון המרכיבות, דוגמני רשת עצבית רבות שכבות גדולים השתמשו במשימה זו בניסיון להשתמש באופן יעיל בבטאות המרכיבות. כמעט כל העבודה המדווחת מאמן רשתות גדולות באמצעות גישות דיסקרטיביות, שבאות עם ערה ללא שליטת יכולת נכונה, כיוון שהם נוטים להתחבר לכל אות שאולי לא יתרחש. באמצעות גישות חדשות לאחרונה למסגרת טקסט, אנו חוקרים אם דוגמנים אלה למעשה לומדים להכין את המשמעות של המשפטים או עדיין מתמקדים רק בכמה מילים מפתחות או לקסיקונים להקלאס את המסמך. כדי לבדוק את היפותזיה שלנו, אנו בונים בזהירות קבוצות נתונים שבו האימונים והמחלקות הבדיקות אין התקפות ישירה של לקסיקונים כאלה, אבל מבנה שפה כללי יהיה דומה. אנחנו לומדים מסגרים טקסטים שונים ומציפים שיש טיפה גדולה של ביצועים על קבוצות המידע האלה. סוף סוף, אנו מראים שאפילו דוגמנים פשוטים עם טכניקות ההצגה המוצעות שלנו, אשר מפסיקים להתמקד בלקסיקונים מפתחים, יכולים לשפר את מדויקת ההסגרה באופן משמעותי.', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ནི་རང་བཞིན་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལས་ཀ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་གཅིག་རེད། སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་བསྟུན་ནས་མཐུད་སྣེ་མང་ཆེ་མཐོང་གི་མིང་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འདིའི་དོན་ལ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཡོད་པ་ཡིན། Almost all the reported work train large networks using discriminative approaches, which come with a caveat of no proper capacity control, as they tend to latch on to any signal that may not generalize. Using various recent state-of-the-art approaches for text classification, we explore whether these models actually learn to compose the meaning of the sentence or still just focus on some keywords or lexicons for classifying the document. To test our hypothesis, we carefully construct datasets where the training and test splits have no direct overlap of such lexicons, but overall language structure would be similar. ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་བལྟ་སྟངས་བྱེད་ན་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་འདུག མཐའ་མར་དུ། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་མཐོང་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ཏུ་མཐོང'}
{'en': 'A Review on Deep Learning Techniques Applied to Answer Selection', 'fr': "Une revue des techniques d'apprentissage profond appliquées à la sélection de réponses", 'ar': 'مراجعة لتقنيات التعلم العميق المطبقة على الإجابة المختارة', 'es': 'Revisión de las técnicas de aprendizaje profundo aplicadas a la selección de respuestas', 'ja': '解答者の選択に応用された深層学習テクニックのレビュー', 'zh': '深度学术,宜于答案所择综述', 'hi': 'चयन का जवाब देने के लिए लागू गहरी सीखने की तकनीकों पर एक समीक्षा', 'pt': 'Uma revisão sobre técnicas de aprendizado profundo aplicadas à seleção de respostas', 'ru': 'Обзор методов глубокого обучения, применяемых при выборе ответов', 'ga': 'Léirmheas ar Theicnící Deepfhoghlama a Cuireadh i bhFeidhm ar Roghnú Freagraí', 'ka': 'განახლებისთვის გადასწავლების ტექნოგიების შესახებ', 'hu': 'Áttekintés a válaszok kiválasztására alkalmazott mélytanulási technikákról', 'el': 'Μια επισκόπηση των τεχνικών βαθιάς μάθησης που εφαρμόζονται στην επιλογή απαντήσεων', 'it': 'Una recensione sulle tecniche di deep learning applicate alla selezione delle risposte', 'lt': 'A Review on Deep Learning Techniques Applied to Answer Selection', 'kk': 'Жауап таңдау үшін қолданылатын тереңдік оқыту техникаларын қарау', 'ms': 'Name', 'mk': 'Преглед на техниките за длабоко учење применети за избор на одговори', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന ടെക്നിക്കുകളില്\u200d ഒരു നിരീക്ഷിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Reviżjoni dwar it-Tekniki ta’ Tagħlim Profond Applikati għall-Għażla tat-Tweġibiet', 'mn': 'Хариулт сонголтын тулд гүн суралцах техникийн талаар шинжилгээ хийх', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'O revizuire a tehnicilor de învățare profundă aplicate la selectarea răspunsurilor', 'pl': 'Przegląd technik głębokiego uczenia stosowanych do wyboru odpowiedzi', 'sr': 'Pregled o tehnikama dubokog učenja primjenjen na odabiru odgovora', 'so': 'A Review on Deep Learnings Techniques Applied to Answer Selection', 'si': 'උත්තර තෝරණය සඳහා ගොඩක් ඉගෙනීම් තාක්ෂණික විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය', 'sv': 'En genomgång av djupinlärningstekniker som tillämpas vid val av svar', 'ur': 'جگہ سیکھنے کی تخنیک کے بارے میں ایک ریویٹ', 'ta': 'ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொண்ட தொழில்நுட்பத்தில் ஒரு முன்காட்சி பதில் தேர்வு செய்யப்பட்டது', 'vi': 'Một bản thảo về kỹ thuật học sâu được áp dụng để chọn đáp án', 'uz': 'Name', 'da': 'En gennemgang af deep learning teknikker anvendt til at vælge svar', 'nl': 'Een overzicht van deep learning technieken toegepast om antwoorden te selecteren', 'bg': 'Преглед на техниките за дълбоко обучение, приложени при избора на отговори', 'ko': '심도 있는 학습 기술이 답안 선택에서의 응용에 대한 종합 서술', 'hr': 'Pregled o tehnikama dubokog učenja primjenjen na odabiru odgovora', 'fa': 'بازرسی درباره تکنیک یادگیری عمیق برای انتخاب پاسخ استفاده می\u200cشود', 'de': 'Ein Überblick über Deep Learning Techniken, die bei der Auswahl von Antworten angewendet werden', 'id': 'Sebuah Review tentang Teknik Belajar Dalam Terapkan untuk Pemilihan Jawab', 'sw': 'Tafiti la Kufunza Teknolojia za Kusini', 'tr': '_Saýlawy Bejermek üçin Ullanmış', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'ምርጫ', 'hy': 'Խաղր սովորելու տեխնիկական վերլուծություն, որը կիրառվում է ընտրության պատասխանների համար', 'sq': 'Një përmbledhje mbi teknikat e mësimit të thellë të aplikuara për zgjedhjen e përgjigjeve', 'az': 'Qeyd Se칞imi 칲칞칲n istifad톛 edil톛n Deep Learning Techniques', 'bn': 'গভীর শিক্ষা প্রযুক্তি নির্বাচনে একটি রিভিউ প্রয়োগ করা হয়েছে', 'bs': 'Pregled o tehnikama dubokog učenja primjenjen na odgovor na izbor', 'ca': "Un examen de les tècniques d'aprenentatge profund aplicades a la selecció de respostes", 'fi': 'Katsaus Syväoppimisen tekniikoista, joita sovelletaan vastauksen valintaan', 'et': 'Ülevaade sügavõppe tehnikatest, mida rakendatakse valikule vastamiseks', 'cs': 'Přehled o technikách hlubokého učení aplikovaných při výběru odpovědí', 'jv': 'Language', 'sk': 'Pregled tehnik globokega učenja, ki se uporabljajo pri izbiri odgovorov', 'ha': 'A Review on Deep Learning Techniques Applied to Answer Selection', 'bo': 'ནག་པོའི་སློབ་བརྩོན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་ནས་གདམ་པ་གདམ་པར་མཐུན་པ', 'he': 'מבחן על טכניקות למידה עמוקה שמשתמשות לבחירת תשובה'}
{'en': 'Given a question and a set of candidate answers, answer selection is the task of identifying which of the candidates answers the question correctly. It is an important problem in natural language processing, with applications in many areas. Recently, many deep learning based methods have been proposed for the task. They produce impressive performance without relying on any feature engineering or expensive external resources. In this paper, we aim to provide a comprehensive review on deep learning methods applied to answer selection.', 'ar': 'بالنظر إلى سؤال ومجموعة من إجابات المرشحين ، فإن اختيار الإجابة هو مهمة تحديد أي من المرشحين يجيب على السؤال بشكل صحيح. إنها مشكلة مهمة في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية ، مع تطبيقات في العديد من المجالات. في الآونة الأخيرة ، تم اقتراح العديد من الأساليب القائمة على التعلم العميق لهذه المهمة. إنها تنتج أداءً رائعًا دون الاعتماد على أي هندسة مميزة أو موارد خارجية باهظة الثمن. في هذه الورقة ، نهدف إلى تقديم مراجعة شاملة لأساليب التعلم العميق المطبقة لاختيار الإجابة.', 'fr': "À partir d'une question et d'un ensemble de réponses des candidats, la sélection des réponses consiste à identifier lequel des candidats répond correctement à la question. Il s'agit d'un problème important dans le traitement du langage naturel, avec des applications dans de nombreux domaines. Récemment, de nombreuses méthodes basées sur le deep learning ont été proposées pour cette tâche. Ils produisent des performances impressionnantes sans dépendre de l'ingénierie des fonctionnalités ou de ressources externes coûteuses. Dans cet article, nous visons à fournir une revue complète des méthodes d'apprentissage profond appliquées à la sélection des réponses.", 'pt': 'Dada uma pergunta e um conjunto de respostas dos candidatos, a seleção de respostas é a tarefa de identificar qual dos candidatos responde à pergunta corretamente. É um problema importante no processamento de linguagem natural, com aplicações em diversas áreas. Recentemente, muitos métodos baseados em aprendizado profundo foram propostos para a tarefa. Eles produzem um desempenho impressionante sem depender de nenhuma engenharia de recursos ou recursos externos caros. Neste artigo, nosso objetivo é fornecer uma revisão abrangente sobre os métodos de aprendizado profundo aplicados à seleção de respostas.', 'es': 'Dada una pregunta y un conjunto de respuestas de los candidatos, la selección de respuestas es la tarea de identificar cuál de los candidatos responde correctamente a la pregunta. Es un problema importante en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural, con aplicaciones en muchas áreas. Recientemente, se han propuesto muchos métodos basados en el aprendizaje profundo para la tarea. Producen un rendimiento impresionante sin depender de la ingeniería de funciones ni de los costosos recursos externos. En este artículo, nuestro objetivo es proporcionar una revisión exhaustiva de los métodos de aprendizaje profundo aplicados a la selección de respuestas.', 'zh': '给定一问与选人对案,所择定孰是。 此自然语言处一要,多有应用。 近者,已为此务,多取深学之法。 可以生深性能,而无恃于外资。 于本文中,吾旨在应对深度学法周综述。', 'ja': '質問と候補者の答えのセットを考えると、答えの選択は、どの候補者が質問に正しく答えているかを特定する作業です。自然言語処理において重要な問題であり、多くの分野で応用がある。最近では、課題に対してディープラーニングに基づく方法が多く提案されている。機能エンジニアリングや高価な外部リソースに依存することなく、印象的なパフォーマンスを生み出します。本稿では，答えの選択に適用されるディープラーニング手法について包括的なレビューを行うことを目指す．', 'hi': 'एक प्रश्न और उम्मीदवार के उत्तरों के एक सेट को देखते हुए, उत्तर चयन यह पहचानने का कार्य है कि कौन सा उम्मीदवार प्रश्न का सही उत्तर देता है। यह प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में एक महत्वपूर्ण समस्या है, जिसमें कई क्षेत्रों में अनुप्रयोग हैं। हाल ही में, कार्य के लिए कई गहरी सीखने आधारित विधियों का प्रस्ताव किया गया है। वे किसी भी सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग या महंगे बाहरी संसाधनों पर भरोसा किए बिना प्रभावशाली प्रदर्शन का उत्पादन करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम चयन का जवाब देने के लिए लागू गहरी सीखने के तरीकों पर एक व्यापक समीक्षा प्रदान करने का लक्ष्य रखते हैं।', 'ru': 'Учитывая вопрос и набор ответов-кандидатов, выбор ответа - это задача определения того, кто из кандидатов правильно отвечает на вопрос. Это важная проблема в обработке естественного языка, с приложениями во многих областях. В последнее время для выполнения этой задачи было предложено много методов, основанных на глубоком обучении. Они обеспечивают впечатляющую производительность, не полагаясь на какую-либо функциональную инженерию или дорогостоящие внешние ресурсы. В этом документе мы стремимся предоставить всеобъемлющий обзор методов глубокого обучения, применяемых для отбора ответов.', 'ga': 'Má chuirtear ceist agus sraith freagraí iarrthóra san áireamh, is é an tasc a bhaineann le roghnú freagraí ná cé acu de na hiarrthóirí a fhreagraíonn an cheist i gceart a shainaithint. Is fadhb thábhachtach é i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha, le hiarratais i go leor réimsí. Le déanaí, moladh go leor modhanna domhainfhoghlama don tasc. Táirgeann siad feidhmíocht iontach gan a bheith ag brath ar aon innealtóireacht gné nó acmhainní seachtracha costasach. Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé mar aidhm againn athbhreithniú cuimsitheach a sholáthar ar na modhanna domhainfhoghlama a chuirtear i bhfeidhm ar roghnú freagraí.', 'hu': 'Egy kérdés és egy sor jelölt válasz alapján a válaszok kiválasztása az a feladat, hogy a jelöltek közül melyik válaszol helyesen a kérdésre. Fontos probléma a természetes nyelvi feldolgozásban, sok területen alkalmazásokkal. A közelmúltban számos mélytanuláson alapuló módszert javasoltak erre a feladatra. Lenyűgöző teljesítményt nyújtanak anélkül, hogy bármilyen funkciótervezésre vagy drága külső erőforrásra támaszkodnának. Jelen tanulmány célja, hogy átfogó áttekintést nyújtsunk a válaszok kiválasztására alkalmazott mélytanulási módszerekről.', 'el': 'Δεδομένου μιας ερώτησης και ενός συνόλου υποψηφίων απαντήσεων, η επιλογή απάντησης είναι το καθήκον να προσδιορίσει ποιος από τους υποψηφίους απαντά σωστά στην ερώτηση. Πρόκειται για ένα σημαντικό πρόβλημα στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας, με εφαρμογές σε πολλούς τομείς. Πρόσφατα, έχουν προταθεί πολλές μέθοδοι βαθιάς μάθησης για το έργο αυτό. Παράγουν εντυπωσιακή απόδοση χωρίς να βασίζονται σε οποιαδήποτε μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών ή ακριβούς εξωτερικούς πόρους. Στην παρούσα εργασία, στόχος μας είναι να παρέχουμε μια ολοκληρωμένη επισκόπηση των μεθόδων βαθιάς μάθησης που εφαρμόζονται στην επιλογή απαντήσεων.', 'ka': 'კითხვა და კონდიდენტის პასუხების შესახებ, პასუხი არჩევა, რომელიც კონდიდენტის კითხვაში მარტივი პასუხს. ეს ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა, რომელიც ბევრი ადგილებში იყო. მხოლოდ ბევრი ძალიან სწავლებელი მეტოვები იყენება რაოდენობისთვის. ისინი გამოვიყენებენ ინტერნექციური გამოსახულება, რომელიც არაფერი ინტერნექციური ან ძალიან გარეშე რესურსების შესახებ. ამ დოკუნში ჩვენ მინდა გავაკეთოთ ყველაფერი განსხვავების შესახებ ძალიან სწავლებელი მეტოვების შესახებ.', 'it': "Data una domanda e una serie di risposte dei candidati, la selezione delle risposte è il compito di identificare quale dei candidati risponde correttamente alla domanda. Si tratta di un problema importante nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, con applicazioni in molti settori. Recentemente, molti metodi basati sul deep learning sono stati proposti per questo compito. Producono prestazioni impressionanti senza contare su alcuna funzionalità ingegneristica o costose risorse esterne. In questo articolo, miriamo a fornire una rassegna completa sui metodi di deep learning applicati per la selezione delle risposte.", 'kk': 'Бір сұрақ мен кандидаттардың жауаптарын бірнеше жауап беру тапсырмасы - кандидаттардың қайсының сұраққа дұрыс жауап беретінін анықтау тапсырмасы. Бұл табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін маңызды мәселе, көптеген аумақтарда қолданбалар бар. Жуырда, тапсырма үшін көп түсінікті оқыту әдістері ұсынылды. Олар ешқандай мүмкіндік инженерлік немесе бағатты сыртқы ресурстарына сенімсіз әсер етеді. Бұл қағазда, таңдауды жауап беру үшін қолданылатын терең оқыту әдістерін толық қарау керек.', 'mk': 'Со оглед на прашањето и множина одговори на кандидатите, изборот на одговорите е задачата да се идентификува кој од кандидатите правилно одговара на прашањето. Тоа е важен проблем во природното обработување јазик, со апликации во многу области. Неодамна, за оваа задача се предложени многу методи базирани на длабоко учење. Тие произведуваат импресивни резултати без да се потпираат на инженерство или скапи надворешни ресурси. Во овој документ, ние имаме за цел да обезбедиме сеопфатен преглед за методите на длабоко учење применети за одговор на изборот.', 'ms': 'Berdasarkan soalan dan set jawapan calon, pemilihan jawapan adalah tugas untuk mengenalpasti calon yang menjawab soalan dengan betul. Ia adalah masalah penting dalam pemprosesan bahasa alam, dengan aplikasi di banyak kawasan. Baru-baru ini, banyak kaedah pembelajaran mendalam telah diusulkan untuk tugas ini. Mereka menghasilkan prestasi yang menakjubkan tanpa bergantung pada mana-mana teknik ciri atau sumber luaran mahal. Dalam kertas ini, kami bertujuan untuk menyediakan ulasan komprensif tentang kaedah belajar dalam yang dilaksanakan untuk menjawab pemilihan.', 'mt': 'Minħabba mistoqsija u sett ta’ tweġibiet kandidati, l-għa żla tat-tweġibiet hija l-kompitu li jiġi identifikat liema mill-kandidati jwieġeb il-mistoqsija b’mod korrett. It is an important problem in natural language processing, with applications in many areas.  Dan l-aħħar, ħafna metodi bbażati fuq tagħlim profond ġew proposti għall-kompitu. Huma jipproduċu prestazzjoni impressjonanti mingħajr ma jiddependu fuq l-inġinerija ta’ karatteristiċi jew riżorsi esterni għaljin. F’dan id-dokument, għandna l-għan li nipprovdu reviżjoni komprensiva dwar metodi ta’ tagħlim profond applikati biex iwieġbu għall-għa żla.', 'ml': 'ഒരു ചോദ്യം കൊണ്ടും ഒരു കൂടി പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന ഉത്തരം കൊണ്ടും ഉത്തരം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് ആരില്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥികന്\u200dമാര സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പ്രശ്നമാണിത്. പല പ്രയോഗങ്ങളില അടുത്തുതന്നെ, വളരെ ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാഭിഷ്ഠ രീതികള്\u200d ജോലിക്കുവേണ്ടി പ്രായശ്ചിത് പുറമെന്തെങ്കിലും വിലയേറെ പുറത്തുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളിലോ ആശ്രയിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാതെ അവര്\u200d അത്യുഗ്രഹപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരിശീലിക്കാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന രീതികളില്\u200d ഉത്തരം', 'mn': 'Хариулт сонголт нь аль нь асуултыг зөв хариулт өгсөн юм. Энэ бол байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн нэг чухал асуудал, олон хэсэгт хэрэглэмжтэй. Сүүлийн үед маш олон суралцах сургалтын сургалтын арга замыг тавьсан. Тэд ямар ч хувьд инженерийн болон үнэтэй гадаад нөөц боловсруулахгүй гайхалтай үйл ажиллагааг бий болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нар сонголтыг хариулах боломжтой гүн гүнзгий суралцах аргын тухай бүрэн шинжилгээ хандуулахыг хүсч байна.', 'pl': 'Biorąc pod uwagę pytanie i zestaw odpowiedzi kandydatów, selekcja odpowiedzi to zadanie określenia, który z kandydatów odpowiada na pytanie poprawnie. Jest to ważny problem w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego, z aplikacjami w wielu obszarach. Ostatnio do tego zadania zaproponowano wiele metod opartych na głębokim uczeniu. Zapewniają imponującą wydajność bez polegania na jakiejkolwiek inżynierii funkcji lub kosztownych zasobach zewnętrznych. Celem niniejszego artykułu jest przedstawienie kompleksowego przeglądu metod głębokiego uczenia stosowanych w selekcji odpowiedzi.', 'lt': 'Atsižvelgiant į klausimą ir kelis kandidatų atsakymus, atsakymų atranka yra užduotis nustatyti, kuris iš kandidatų atsako teisingai į klausimą. Tai svarbi gamtos kalbų apdorojimo problema, kai taikomos daugelyje sričių. Recently, many deep learning based methods have been proposed for the task.  Jie sukuria įspūdingų rezultatų, nesikliaudami jokiomis techninėmis savybėmis ar brangiais išor ės ištekliais. Šiame dokumente siekiame pateikti išsamią išsamaus mokymosi metodų, taikomų atsakymui į atranką, apžvalgą.', 'ro': 'Având în vedere o întrebare și un set de răspunsuri candidate, selectarea răspunsurilor este sarcina de a identifica care dintre candidați răspunde corect la întrebare. Este o problemă importantă în procesarea limbajului natural, cu aplicații în multe domenii. Recent, multe metode bazate pe învățare profundă au fost propuse pentru această sarcină. Ele produc performanțe impresionante fără a se baza pe nicio inginerie de caracteristici sau resurse externe costisitoare. În această lucrare, ne propunem să oferim o revizuire cuprinzătoare a metodelor de învățare profundă aplicate pentru selecția răspunsurilor.', 'no': 'Gjennomsikt eit spørsmål og eit set av kandidatsvar, er svarveljinga på å identifisera kva av kandidatane svarar på spørsmålet rett. Det er eit viktig problem i naturspråkshandsaming, med program i mange område. Nyleg har mange dype læringsbaserte metodar foreslått for oppgåva. Dei produserer uttrykkelige utviklingar utan å pålite på ingen funksjonsengineering eller dykka eksterne ressursar. I denne papiret må vi gjere eit komplett oversikt om dype læringsmetodar som er brukt for å svara på utvalet.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිච්චියක් තියෙනවා, ප්\u200dරතිච්චිත තෝරණය තමයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හරිය ඒක ස්වාභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණයේ වැදගත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. අලුත් වෙලාවේ, ගොඩක් ගොඩක් අධික ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට මේ වැඩේ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ් ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා කිසිම විශේෂ ඉංජිනේරියාවක් නැති විශේෂ විශේ මේ පත්තරේ අපි අදහස් කරනවා ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරන්න.', 'sv': 'Med en fråga och en uppsättning kandidatsvar är urvalet av svar uppgiften att identifiera vilken av kandidaterna som svarar på frågan korrekt. Det är ett viktigt problem i naturlig språkbehandling, med applikationer inom många områden. Nyligen har många djupinlärningsbaserade metoder föreslagits för uppgiften. De ger imponerande prestanda utan att förlita sig på någon funktionsteknik eller dyra externa resurser. I den här uppsatsen syftar vi till att ge en omfattande genomgång av djupinlärningsmetoder som tillämpas för svarsutval.', 'so': "Sida lagu siiyo wax su'aal ah iyo jawaabo koox ka mid ah oo mushaar ah, doorashada waxaa ah shuqulka aqoonsashada qofka kandida ah oo u jawaabaya su'aalka si saxda ah. Waa dhibaato muhiim ah oo ka baaraandegista luqada dabiiciga ah iyo codsiyada meelo badan. Recently, many deep learning based methods have been proposed for the task.  Waxay soo saaraan tababar wanaagsan iyadoon ku kalsoonaan wax qalabka tayada ah ama maal dibada ah oo qaali ah. Qoraalkan waxaan ku talo galaynaa baaritaanka aasaasiga ah oo ku saabsan qaababka waxbarashada mool dheer ee loo codsaday in loo jawaabo doorasho.", 'ta': 'ஒரு கேள்வி மற்றும் ஒரு சில தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட விடை இது இயல்பான மொழி செயல்படுத்தலில் முக்கியமான பிரச்சனையாகும், பல பிரிவுகளில் பயன்பாடுகளுடன். சமீபத்தில், பல ஆழமான கற்றல் அடிப்படையான முறைகள் பணிக்கு பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டது. அவர்கள் எந்த குணங்கள் பொறியியல் அல்லது விலையான வெளி வளங்களை நம்பாமல் செயல்படுத்துகிறார்கள். In this paper, we aim to provide a comprehensive review on deep learning methods applied to answer selection.', 'ur': 'ایک سوال اور ایک مجموعہ کے جواب دینے کے باعث، جواب انتخاب کرنے کا کام یہ ہے کہ کدوم کاندینڈیٹوں کا سؤال ٹھیک جواب دیتا ہے. یہ طبیعی زبان پردازش میں ایک اہم مسئلہ ہے، بہت سی منطقه میں کاروباروں کے ساتھ۔ اچھا، بہت سی سیکھنے کی بنیادی طریقے اس کام کے لئے پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں. وہ اثر انجینری یا گران بیرونی سراسروں پر اعتماد نہیں کرتے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم نے انتخاب کی جواب دینے کے لئے استعمال کئے ہوئے عمیق سیکھنے کے طریقے کے بارے میں ایک تحقیق کا ارادہ کرنا چاہا ہے.', 'sr': 'S obzirom na pitanje i skup odgovora kandidata, odabranje odgovora je zadatak identifikacije koji od kandidata odgovara na pitanje ispravno. To je važan problem u procesu prirodnog jezika, sa aplikacijom u mnogim područjima. Nedavno je predloženo mnoge metode na temelju dubokog učenja za taj zadatak. Oni proizvode impresivne izvedbe bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve funkcije inženjeringa ili skupe vanjske resurse. U ovom papiru imamo cilj da obezbedimo sveobuhvatnu pregledu o metodama dubokog učenja koje se primjenjuju za odgovor na izbor.', 'uz': "Javob berilganda, bu javob beradi, bu javob berilgan vazifani qo'shish uchun savol toʻgʻri javob beradi. Bu tabiiy tilni boshqarish uchun muhim muammo, ko'p joydagi dasturlar bilan. Yaqinda, vazifa uchun ko'pchilik o'rganish asosiy metodlari Ular tashkilotni tasavvur qiladi, hech qanday tashkilot muhandiya yoki qiziqarli tashkilotlar bilan ishlatmaydi. Bu qogʻozda, biz qiyin o'rganish usullarini o'rganish uchun javob berishga qoʻllanmoqchimiz.", 'vi': 'Với một câu hỏi và một loạt câu trả lời, việc chọn câu trả lời là nhiệm vụ xác định ai trong những ứng viên trả lời câu hỏi đúng. Nó là một vấn đề quan trọng trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, với nhiều ứng dụng trong nhiều lĩnh vực. Gần đây, nhiều phương pháp dựa trên học sâu đã được đề xuất cho nhiệm vụ này. Chúng tạo ra hiệu ứng ấn tượng mà không cần phải dựa vào kỹ thuật đặc trưng hay tài nguyên bên ngoài đắt tiền. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi muốn đưa ra một bài kiểm tra to àn diện về các phương pháp học sâu được áp dụng để đáp ứng lựa chọn.', 'nl': 'Bij een vraag en een reeks antwoorden van kandidaten is antwoordselectie de taak om te bepalen welke van de kandidaten de vraag correct beantwoordt. Het is een belangrijk probleem in de verwerking van natuurlijke talen, met toepassingen op veel gebieden. Onlangs zijn er veel op deep learning gebaseerde methoden voorgesteld voor deze taak. Ze produceren indrukwekkende prestaties zonder te vertrouwen op enige feature engineering of dure externe bronnen. In dit artikel willen we een uitgebreid overzicht geven van deep learning methoden die worden toegepast bij de selectie van antwoorden.', 'bg': 'При даден въпрос и набор от отговори на кандидатите, изборът на отговор е задачата да се определи кой от кандидатите отговаря на въпроса правилно. Това е важен проблем в обработката на естествения език, с приложения в много области. Напоследък за задачата бяха предложени много методи, базирани на дълбоко обучение. Те произвеждат впечатляваща производителност, без да разчитат на никакви функции инженеринг или скъпи външни ресурси. В настоящата статия се стремим да предоставим изчерпателен преглед на методите за дълбоко обучение, прилагани за подбор на отговори.', 'hr': 'S obzirom na pitanje i skup odgovora kandidata, odabranje odgovora je zadatak identifikacije kojeg od kandidata odgovara na pitanje ispravno. To je važan problem u procesu prirodnog jezika, s prijavama u mnogim područjima. Nedavno je predloženo mnoge metode na temelju dubokog učenja za taj zadatak. Proizvode impresivne funkcije bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve funkcije inženjerstva ili skupe vanjske resurse. U ovom papiru imamo cilj da pružimo sveobuhvatnu pregledu o dubokim metodama učenja primjenjenom za odgovor na izbor.', 'da': 'I betragtning af et spørgsmål og et sæt ansøgersvar er udvælgelsen af svar opgaven at identificere, hvilken af ansøgerne der besvarer spørgsmålet korrekt. Det er et vigtigt problem i naturlig sprogbehandling, med applikationer på mange områder. For nylig er der blevet foreslået mange metoder baseret på dyb læring til opgaven. De producerer imponerende ydeevne uden at være afhængige af feature engineering eller dyre eksterne ressourcer. I denne artikel har vi til formål at give en omfattende gennemgang af deep learning metoder anvendt til at besvare udvælgelse.', 'fa': 'با توجه به یک سوال و مجموعه جواب کاندیدا، انتخاب جواب این است که مشخص کردن کدامین از کاندیدا به درستی جواب می دهند. این یک مشکل مهم در پردازش زبان طبیعی است، با کاربرد در بسیاری از منطقه\u200cها. اخیرا، روش\u200cهای عمیق یادگیری برای این کار پیشنهاد شده است. آنها اجرای تاثیرگذاری را بدون توجه به مهندسی ویژه یا منابع خارجی گران تولید می کنند. در این کاغذ، ما هدف داریم که یک تحقیق کامل در مورد روش یادگیری عمیق را برای پاسخ انتخاب انجام دهیم.', 'de': 'Angesichts einer Frage und einer Reihe von Kandidaten Antworten ist die Antwortauswahl die Aufgabe zu identifizieren, welcher der Kandidaten die Frage richtig beantwortet. Es ist ein wichtiges Problem in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache, mit Anwendungen in vielen Bereichen. In letzter Zeit wurden viele Deep Learning basierte Methoden für diese Aufgabe vorgeschlagen. Sie produzieren beeindruckende Leistung, ohne auf Feature Engineering oder teure externe Ressourcen angewiesen zu sein. In diesem Beitrag wollen wir einen umfassenden Überblick über Deep Learning Methoden geben, die bei der Antwortauswahl angewendet werden.', 'id': 'Berdasarkan pertanyaan dan set jawaban kandidat, seleksi jawaban adalah tugas untuk mengidentifikasi salah satu kandidat yang menjawab pertanyaan dengan benar. Ini adalah masalah penting dalam proses bahasa alam, dengan aplikasi di banyak daerah. Baru-baru ini, banyak metode pembelajaran mendalam telah diusulkan untuk tugas ini. Mereka menghasilkan prestasi yang mengesankan tanpa bergantung pada teknik fitur apapun atau sumber daya luar mahal. Dalam kertas ini, kami bertujuan untuk menyediakan penelitian komprensif tentang metode belajar dalam yang diterapkan untuk menjawab seleksi.', 'ko': '한 문제와 한 그룹의 후보 답안을 정하고 답안을 선택하는 임무는 어떤 후보 답안이 정확한지 확인하는 것이다.이것은 자연 언어 처리의 중요한 문제로 많은 분야에서 응용되고 있다.최근에는 깊이 있는 학습에 기초한 많은 방법이 제기되고 있다.그것들은 어떤 기능 공학이나 비싼 외부 자원에 의존하지 않는 상황에서 인상적인 성능을 낸다.이 논문에서 우리의 목적은 전면적인 심사 심도 있는 학습 방법을 제공하여 답안 선택에 응용하는 것이다.', 'sw': 'Kutokana na swali na kikundi cha majibu ya wagombea, jibu ni jukumu la kutambua wagombea wapi anajibu swali lililo sahihi. Ni tatizo muhimu katika upasuaji wa lugha za asili, na matumizi katika maeneo mengi. Hivi karibuni, mbinu nyingi za kujifunza za ndani zimependekezwa kwa ajili ya kazi hiyo. Wanaleta maoni mazuri bila kutegemea ubandisi wowote au rasilimali ghali za nje. Katika karatasi hii, tunalenga kutoa tafiti ya kina kuhusu njia za kujifunza za za kina zinazotumika kujibu uchaguzi.', 'sq': 'Duke pasur parasysh një pyetje dhe një sërë përgjigjesh kandidate, zgjedhja e përgjigjeve është detyra e identifikimit të cilit nga kandidatët përgjigjet korrekt në pyetje. Është një problem i rëndësishëm në procesimin natyror të gjuhës, me aplikime në shumë fusha. Kohët e fundit, janë propozuar shumë metoda bazuar në mësim të thellë për këtë detyrë. Ato prodhojnë shfaqje mbresëlënëse pa u mbështetur në ndonjë inxhinieri apo burime të shtrenjta të jashtme. Në këtë letër, ne synojmë të ofrojmë një përmbledhje tërësore mbi metodat e mësimit të thellë të aplikuara për të përgjigjur zgjedhjes.', 'tr': 'Bir sorag we kandidatyň jogabyny görä, jogap saýlamak üçin kandidatlaryň haýsy jogabyny dogry tanamak üçin zady. Tebiýal dil işlemeginde, köp böleklerde uygulamalar bilen wajyp mesele. Soňky wagtlarda köp derin öwrenmek taýýarlanan yöntemler bu zada üçin teklip edildi. Olar hiç hili möhüm enjiniýetçilige ýa-da wagt daşary çeşmelere ynanmadan täsirli zady üretýärler. Bu kagyzda, saýlawy jogap bermek üçin golaý öwrenme yöntemlerini üýtgetmek üçin daýal bir gözlem bermek amaçladyk.', 'am': 'ጥያቄ እና የጭማሪ መልስ በተደረገ ጊዜ የመረጠት መልስ የትኛቸው አማካሪዎች ጥያቄን በቅንነት የሚመልስ ስራ ነው፡፡ በአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል፣ በብዙ ቦታዎች ውስጥ ፕሮግራሞች የተደረጉ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በቅርብ ጊዜ ብዙ ጥልቅ ትምህርት መሠረት ሥርዓቶች ለስራ ተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ ምንም የፊደል ኢንጂንጂንጂን ወይም ውጭ ሀብት ሳይታመኑ የሚታመኑ የድምፅ አካባቢዎችን የሚያደርጋሉ፡፡ In this paper, we aim to provide a comprehensive review on deep learning methods applied to answer selection.', 'af': "As 'n vraag en 'n stel van kandidate antwoorde gegee word, antwoord keuse is die taak van identifiseer wat van die kandidate die vraag reg antwoord. Dit is 'n belangrike probleem in natuurlike taal verwerking, met toepassings in baie gebiede. Onlangs is baie diep leer gebaseerde metodes voorgestel vir die taak. Hulle produce impressive performance without relying on any feature engineering or expensive external resources. In hierdie papier, doen ons doel om 'n kompleksitele oorskou te verskaf op diep leer metodes wat toegepas word om keuse te antwoord.", 'az': 'Bir sual və bir dəstə kandidat cevaplarını təsdiqləyib, cavab seçmək haqqında kimin kandidatların soruşuna doğru cavab verməkdir. Bu təbiətli dil işləməsində, çoxlu bölgedə uyğulamalar ilə möhüm bir problemdir. Son zamanlarda çox çətin öyrənmə metodları bu işin üçün təbliğ edilmişdir. Onlar hər hansı bir özellik inženjeri və ya mal dış resurslara güvənmədən təsirli performans ürəkləyirlər. Bu kağızda seçmək üçün istifadə edilən derin öyrənmə metodlarını müfəssəl tərzdə təmin etmək istəyirik.', 'bn': 'একটি প্রশ্ন এবং কিছু প্রার্থীর উত্তর দিয়ে উত্তর নির্বাচনের কাজ হচ্ছে প্রার্থীরা সঠিকভাবে প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয়। এটা প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ায় গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সমস্যা, অনেক এলাকায় অ্যাপ্লিকেশন। সম্প্রতি কাজের জন্য অনেক গভীর শিক্ষার ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে। তারা কোন বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রকৌশল বা বাইরের সম্পদের উপর নির্ভর করে তাদের চমৎকার কর্মকাণ্ড তৈরি করে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষা পদ্ধতি সম্পর্কে সম্পূর্ণ পর্যবেক্ষণ প্রদান করার উদ্দেশ্য ছিলাম যেটা নির্বাচনের', 'hy': 'Հարցը և թեկնածու պատասխանները հաշվի առնելով, պատասխանների ընտրությունը նպատակն է պարզել, թե թեկնածուներից ո՞րն է ճիշտ պատասխանում հարցին: Սա կարևոր խնդիր է բնական լեզվի վերամշակում, որտեղ ծրագրերը կան շատ տարածքներում: Վերջերս շատ խորը ուսումնասիրության հիմնված մեթոդներ են առաջարկվել այս խնդրի համար: Նրանք արտադրում են տպավորիչ արդյունք առանց հիմնվելու որևէ հնարավորության ճարտարագիտության կամ թանկ արտաքին ռեսուրսների վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նպատակում ենք ապահովել ընդհանուր վերլուծություն խորը սովորելու մեթոդների մասին, որոնք կիրառվում են ընտրության պատասխանների համար:', 'ca': "Given a question and a set of candidate answers, answer selection is the task of identifying which of the candidates answers the question correctly.  És un problema important en el processament natural de llengües, amb aplicacions en moltes àrees. Recentment, s'han proposat molts mètodes basats en l'aprenentatge profund per a la tasca. Produeixen desempenys impressionants sense confiar en cap característica enginyeria o recursos externs cars. En aquest paper, volem proporcionar una revisió completa dels mètodes d'aprenentatge profund aplicats per respondre a la selecció.", 'bs': 'S obzirom na pitanje i skup odgovora kandidata, izbor odgovora je zadatak identifikacije kojeg od kandidata odgovara na pitanje ispravno. To je važan problem u procesu prirodnog jezika, s aplikacijom u mnogim područjima. Nedavno je predloženo mnoge metode na temelju dubokog učenja za taj zadatak. Oni proizvode impresivne funkcije bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve funkcije inženjeringa ili skupe vanjske resurse. U ovom papiru imamo cilj da pružimo sveobuhvatnu pregledu o dubokim metodama učenja primjenjenom za odgovor na izbor.', 'cs': 'Vzhledem k otázce a souboru odpovědí kandidáta je výběr odpovědi úkolem určit, který z kandidátů na otázku odpoví správně. Je to důležitý problém při zpracování přirozeného jazyka, s aplikacemi v mnoha oblastech. V poslední době bylo pro tento úkol navrženo mnoho metod založených na hlubokém učení. Vytvářejí působivý výkon bez spoléhání na jakékoliv funkční inženýrství nebo drahé externí zdroje. Cílem tohoto článku je poskytnout komplexní přehled o metodách hlubokého učení aplikovaných při výběru odpovědí.', 'et': 'Arvestades küsimust ja kandidaatide vastuste kogumit, on vastuse valik ülesanne määrata kindlaks, milline kandidaat vastab küsimusele õigesti. See on oluline probleem loodusliku keele töötlemisel, mille rakendused on paljudes valdkondades. Hiljuti on selle ülesande jaoks välja pakutud palju sügavõppel põhinevaid meetodeid. Nad toodavad muljetavaldavat jõudlust, toetumata ühelegi funktsioonide insenerile või kallitele välisressurssidele. Käesolevas dokumendis soovime anda põhjaliku ülevaate sügavõppe meetoditest, mida kasutatakse vastuste valimisel.', 'fi': 'Kun otetaan huomioon kysymys ja joukko ehdokkaiden vastauksia, vastausten valinta on tehtävä selvittää, kumpi ehdokkaista vastaa kysymykseen oikein. Se on tärkeä ongelma luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä, ja sovelluksia on monilla aloilla. Viime aikoina tehtävään on ehdotettu monia syvälliseen oppimiseen perustuvia menetelmiä. Ne tuottavat vaikuttavaa suorituskykyä luottamatta ominaisuuksien suunnitteluun tai kalliisiin ulkoisiin resursseihin. Tässä artikkelissa pyrimme tarjoamaan kattavan katsauksen vastausten valintaan sovellettavista syväoppimisen menetelmistä.', 'jv': 'Ingka nganggo question karo setung mbubati sing apik, gambar nggap Ere sakjane seneng pisan nêmêg ning arep Perusahaan anyar, karo aplikasi ning akeh sing apik. Sumangka, akeh akeh sistem sing paling nggunakno sistem sing bisa supoyo nggawe nggawe gerakan. offoff Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nyulung kanggo nyenggawe ngubah cara-cara sing luwih apik kanggo ngilanggar nggawe layar.', 'ha': "Gida wani tambayi da wani matsayi daga kanada, sai zaɓi zaɓen su zama aikin ka gane wanne daga kandidan su karɓa da tambayin da gaske. Babu wani matsayi mai muhimu a cikin jarraba harshe na asali, da shiryoyin ayuka masu cikin wurãre masu yawa. A yanzu, an ƙayyade wasu shiryoyin da aka sanar da su a kan aikin. They produce impressive performance without relying on any feature engineering or expensive external resources.  Ga wannan takardan, Munã nufin mu bãyar da wata matsayi mai kamfata a kan hanyõyin da aka sani na ƙari da za'a karɓa wa zãɓen.", 'sk': 'Glede na vprašanje in nabor odgovorov kandidatov je izbira odgovorov naloga ugotavljanja, kateri kandidat pravilno odgovori na vprašanje. To je pomemben problem pri obdelavi naravnega jezika, z aplikacijami na številnih področjih. V zadnjem času so za nalogo predlagali številne metode globokega učenja. Ustvarjajo impresivno zmogljivost, ne da bi se zanašali na kakršenkoli inženiring funkcij ali drage zunanje vire. V tem prispevku želimo zagotoviti celovit pregled metod globokega učenja, ki se uporabljajo za izbiro odgovorov.', 'he': 'בהתחשב בשאלה ובקבוצה של תשובות מועמדות, בחירת תשובות היא המשימה לזהות מי מהמועמדים עונה על השאלה נכון. זו בעיה חשובה בעבודת שפת טבעית, עם היישומים באזורים רבים. לאחרונה הציעו שיטות רבות על בסיס למידה עמוקה למשימה. הם יוצרים ביצועים מרשים בלי לסמוך על כל תכונות הנדסה או משאבים חיצוניים יקרים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתכוונים לספק ביקורת כללית על שיטות למידה עמוקה שמשתמשות כדי לענות לבחירה.', 'bo': 'འདྲི་ཚིག་ཞིག་དང་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཅིག རང་བཟོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་བྱ་རིམ་ནང་དུ་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་ཤིག་རེད། འཕྲལ་ཁམས་དེ་ལྟར་སློབ་ནུས་པར་གཞི་རྩལ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ནི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་སྤྲོད་བྱས་ཡོད། They produce impressive performance without relying on any feature engineering or expensive external resources. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་སྐྱིད་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡོངས་བསྡུར་ཞིབ་'}
{'en': 'A Survey on Recent Advances in Named Entity Recognition from Deep Learning models', 'ar': 'مسح حول التطورات الحديثة في التعرف على الكيانات المسماة من نماذج التعلم العميق', 'pt': 'Uma pesquisa sobre avanços recentes no reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas a partir de modelos de Deep Learning', 'es': 'Encuesta sobre los avances recientes en el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas a partir de modelos de aprendizaje profundo', 'fr': "Une enquête sur les avancées récentes en matière de reconnaissance d'entités nommées à partir de modèles de Deep Learning", 'ja': 'ディープラーニングモデルからの名前付きエンティティ認識の最近の進歩に関する調査', 'zh': '深度学模名实体识者最新进展勘', 'hi': 'डीप लर्निंग मॉडल से नामित एंटिटी मान्यता में हाल ही में प्रगति पर एक सर्वेक्षण', 'ru': 'Опрос о последних достижениях в признании именованных организаций на основе моделей глубокого обучения', 'ga': 'Suirbhé ar Dul chun Cinn le Déanaí in Aithint Aonáin Ainmnithe ó mhúnlaí Deep Learning', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια έρευνα σχετικά με τις πρόσφατες προόδους στην αναγνώριση ονομαστικών οντοτήτων από μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης', 'hu': 'A nevezett entitások elismerésében a mélytanulási modellekből származó legutóbbi előrehaladásokról szóló felmérés', 'it': 'Un sondaggio sui recenti progressi nel riconoscimento delle entità nominate dai modelli di Deep Learning', 'lt': 'A Survey on Recent Advances in Named Entity Recognition from Deep Learning models', 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды түсініктіру үлгілерінен жаңа жаңа аудару туралы зерттеу', 'mk': 'Истражување за неодамнешните напредоци во препознавањето на именувани ентитети од моделите на длабоко учење', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തെ പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്റെ അടുത്തുള്ള', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үеийн нэрлэгдсэн бүтэц танилцуулалтын судалгаа', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Badanie dotyczące ostatnich postępów w rozpoznawaniu nazwanych podmiotów z modeli Deep Learning', 'mt': 'Stħarriġ dwar l-Avvanzi Reċenti fir-Rikonoxximent ta’ Entità Ismija minn mudelli ta’ Tagħlim Profond', 'ms': 'A Survey on Recent Advances in Named Entity Recognition from Deep Learning models', 'ro': 'Un sondaj privind progresele recente în recunoașterea entităților denumite din modelele de învățare profundă', 'sr': 'Istraživanje o nedavnim napredama u priznanju imenovanih područja iz modela dubokog učenja', 'so': 'Ka baaritaanka horumarinta ee la magacaabay Aqoonsiga ganacsiga', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'En undersökning om de senaste framstegen inom identifiering av namngivna enheter från djupinlärningsmodeller', 'ta': 'A Survey on Recent Advances in Named Entity Recognition from Deep Learning models', 'ur': 'ایک تحقیق جو اگلے اضافہ کے بارے میں نام لیا گیا انٹیٹی پتپذیرش کے ذریعہ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Survey on recent advents in Named Entity recognition from Deep Learning models', 'bg': 'Проучване на последните напредъци в разпознаването на наименовани субекти от модели на задълбочено обучение', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje o nedavnim napredama u priznanju imenovanih područja iz modela dubokog učenja', 'da': 'En undersøgelse af de seneste fremskridt i anerkendelse af navngivne enheder fra Deep Learning modeller', 'nl': 'Een enquête naar recente vooruitgang in naamsbekendheid van Deep Learning modellen', 'de': 'Eine Umfrage zu den jüngsten Fortschritten bei der Erkennung benannter Entitäten aus Deep Learning-Modellen', 'id': 'Survey on Recent Advances in Named Entity Recognition from Deep Learning models', 'ko': '심도 있는 학습 모델을 바탕으로 하는 명명 실체 식별 연구의 진전을 종합하여 서술하다.', 'fa': 'یک تحقیق در مورد پیشرفتهای اخیر در شناسایی عنوان واحد از مدل یادگیری عمیق', 'tr': 'name', 'sq': 'Një sondazh mbi përparimet e fundit në njohjen e njësisë me emër nga modelet e mësimit të thellë', 'sw': 'Tafiti la Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika Tambulisho la Ujumbe la Jinai kutoka mifano ya Kufundisha', 'af': 'Name', 'bn': 'গভীর শিক্ষা শিক্ষা মডেল থেকে নামের এন্টিটি পরিচিতি নামের সাম্প্রতিক অগ্রগতির উপর একটি তদন্ত', 'az': 'Adlı Entity Recognition', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Սովորաբար սովորելու մոդելների վերջին հաջողությունների ուսումնասիրությունը', 'bs': 'Istraživanje o nedavnim napredama u priznanju imenovanih područja iz modela dubokog učenja', 'ca': "Un estudi sobre els avanços recents en el reconeixement d'entitats anomenades a partir de models d'aprenentatge profund", 'et': 'Uuring nimega üksuste tunnustamise hiljutiste edusammude kohta sügavõppe mudelite alusel', 'cs': 'Průzkum o nedávných pokrocích v rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit z modelů hlubokého učení', 'fi': 'Kysely nimettyjen yhteisöjen tunnistamisen viimeaikaisista edistysaskelista syväoppimisen malleista', 'jv': '1', 'sk': 'Raziskava o nedavnih napredkih pri prepoznavanju imenovanih subjektov iz modelov globokega učenja', 'he': 'חקירה על התקדמות האחרונות בהכרה של איכות בשם ממודלים של למידה עמוקה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'A Survey on Recent Advances in Named Entity Recognition from Deep Learning models'}
{'en': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) is a key component in NLP systems for question answering, information retrieval, relation extraction, etc. NER systems have been studied and developed widely for decades, but accurate systems using deep neural networks (NN) have only been introduced in the last few years. We present a comprehensive survey of deep neural network architectures for NER, and contrast them with previous approaches to NER based on feature engineering and other supervised or semi-supervised learning algorithms. Our results highlight the improvements achieved by neural networks, and show how incorporating some of the lessons learned from past work on feature-based NER systems can yield further improvements.', 'ar': 'يعد التعرف على الكيانات المسماة (NER) مكونًا رئيسيًا في أنظمة البرمجة اللغوية العصبية للإجابة على الأسئلة واسترجاع المعلومات واستخراج العلاقة وما إلى ذلك. تمت دراسة أنظمة NER وتطويرها على نطاق واسع لعقود من الزمن ، ولكن الأنظمة الدقيقة التي تستخدم الشبكات العصبية العميقة (NN) تم تقديمها فقط في السنوات القليلة الماضية. نقدم مسحًا شاملاً لهياكل الشبكات العصبية العميقة لـ NER ، ونقارنها مع الأساليب السابقة لـ NER استنادًا إلى هندسة الميزات وخوارزميات التعلم الأخرى الخاضعة للإشراف أو شبه الخاضعة للإشراف. تسلط نتائجنا الضوء على التحسينات التي حققتها الشبكات العصبية ، وتوضح كيف أن دمج بعض الدروس المستفادة من العمل السابق على أنظمة NER القائمة على الميزات يمكن أن يؤدي إلى مزيد من التحسينات.', 'fr': "La reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) est un composant clé des systèmes de PNL pour la réponse aux questions, la récupération d'informations, l'extraction de relations, etc. Les systèmes NER ont été largement étudiés et développés depuis des décennies, mais des systèmes précis utilisant des réseaux neuronaux profonds (NN) n'ont été introduits que ces dernières années. Nous présentons une étude complète des architectures de réseaux de neurones profonds pour NER, et les comparons avec les approches précédentes de NER basées sur l'ingénierie des fonctionnalités et d'autres algorithmes d'apprentissage supervisés ou semi-supervisés. Nos résultats mettent en évidence les améliorations apportées par les réseaux de neurones et montrent comment l'intégration de certaines des leçons apprises lors de travaux antérieurs sur les systèmes NER basés sur des caractéristiques peut apporter de nouvelles améliorations.", 'es': 'El reconocimiento de entidades denominadas (NER) es un componente clave en los sistemas de PNL para la respuesta a preguntas, la recuperación de información, la extracción de relaciones, etc. Los sistemas NER se han estudiado y desarrollado ampliamente durante décadas, pero los sistemas precisos que utilizan redes neuronales profundas (NN) solo se han introducido en los últimos años. Presentamos un estudio completo de las arquitecturas de redes neuronales profundas para NER y las comparamos con los enfoques anteriores de NER basados en la ingeniería de características y otros algoritmos de aprendizaje supervisados o semisupervisados. Nuestros resultados destacan las mejoras logradas por las redes neuronales y muestran cómo la incorporación de algunas de las lecciones aprendidas del trabajo anterior en los sistemas NER basados en funciones puede generar mejoras adicionales.', 'pt': 'O Reconhecimento de Entidade Nomeada (NER) é um componente chave em sistemas de PNL para resposta a perguntas, recuperação de informações, extração de relações, etc. nos últimos anos. Apresentamos uma pesquisa abrangente de arquiteturas de redes neurais profundas para NER e as comparamos com abordagens anteriores de NER baseadas em engenharia de recursos e outros algoritmos de aprendizado supervisionado ou semisupervisionado. Nossos resultados destacam as melhorias alcançadas pelas redes neurais e mostram como incorporar algumas das lições aprendidas em trabalhos anteriores em sistemas NER baseados em recursos pode gerar melhorias adicionais.', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）は、質問の回答、情報の取得、関係の抽出などのためのNLPシステムの重要なコンポーネントです。NERシステムは数十年にわたって幅広く研究開発されてきたが、ディープニューラルネットワーク（ NN ）を用いた正確なシステムはここ数年しか導入されていない。我々は、NERのための深層ニューラルネットワークアーキテクチャの包括的な調査を提示し、特徴工学および他の監督または半監督学習アルゴリズムに基づくNERへの以前のアプローチと比較します。私たちの結果は、ニューラルネットワークによって達成された改善を強調し、特徴ベースのNERシステムに関する過去の研究から得られた教訓のいくつかを組み込むことで、さらなる改善をもたらすことができることを示しています。', 'zh': '名实体识(NER)NLP统中以问答,信息检索,提取之要组件。 数十年间,NER统博究开发,然用深神经网络(NN)之精,至近数年始引入。 遍察NER之深神经网络架构,比前功于特徵及他监督半NER算法。 显神经网络改进,示合往昔NER统之工作中学,以生改进。', 'ru': 'Именованное распознавание сущностей (NER) является ключевым компонентом в системах NLP для ответов на вопросы, извлечения информации, извлечения отношений и т. д. Системы NER изучались и развивались широко на протяжении десятилетий, но точные системы, использующие глубокие нейронные сети (NN), были введены только в последние несколько лет. Мы представляем комплексный обзор архитектур глубоких нейронных сетей для NER и сравниваем их с предыдущими подходами к NER, основанными на функциональной инженерии и других контролируемых или полуконтролируемых алгоритмах обучения. Наши результаты подчеркивают улучшения, достигнутые нейронными сетями, и показывают, как включение некоторых уроков, извлеченных из прошлой работы над функциональными системами NER, может привести к дальнейшим улучшениям.', 'hi': 'नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन (एनईआर) एनएलपी प्रणालियों में प्रश्न उत्तर, सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति, संबंध निष्कर्षण, आदि के लिए एक प्रमुख घटक है। एनईआर प्रणालियों का दशकों से व्यापक रूप से अध्ययन और विकास किया गया है, लेकिन गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (एनएन) का उपयोग करके सटीक प्रणालियों को केवल पिछले कुछ वर्षों में पेश किया गया है। हम एनईआर के लिए गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर का एक व्यापक सर्वेक्षण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, और फीचर इंजीनियरिंग और अन्य पर्यवेक्षित या अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित सीखने के एल्गोरिदम के आधार पर एनईआर के पिछले दृष्टिकोणों के साथ उन्हें विपरीत करते हैं। हमारे परिणाम तंत्रिका नेटवर्क द्वारा प्राप्त किए गए सुधारों को उजागर करते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि फीचर-आधारित एनईआर सिस्टम पर पिछले काम से सीखे गए कुछ पाठों को कैसे शामिल करने से आगे सुधार हो सकता है।', 'ga': 'Tá Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe (NER) ina phríomhchuid de chórais NLP maidir le freagra ceisteanna, aisghabháil faisnéise, eastóscadh gaol, etc. Tá staidéar agus forbairt déanta go forleathan ar chórais NER le blianta fada anuas, ach níor tugadh isteach ach córais chruinne a úsáideann líonraí néaracha domhain (NN). le cúpla bliain anuas. Cuirimid suirbhé cuimsitheach i láthair ar ailtireachtaí líonraí néaracha doimhin do NER, agus cuirimid i gcodarsnacht iad le cineálacha cur chuige a bhí ann roimhe seo maidir le NER bunaithe ar ghné-innealtóireacht agus algartaim foghlama eile faoi mhaoirseacht nó leath-mhaoirseacht. Aibhsíonn ár dtorthaí na feabhsuithe atá bainte amach ag líonraí néaracha, agus taispeánann siad conas is féidir tuilleadh feabhsuithe a dhéanamh trí roinnt de na ceachtanna a foghlaimíodh ó obair san am atá caite ar chórais NER atá bunaithe ar ghnéithe a ionchorprú.', 'el': 'Η αναγνώριση ονομάτων οντοτήτων (είναι ένα βασικό συστατικό στα συστήματα για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων, την ανάκτηση πληροφοριών, την εξαγωγή σχέσεων κλπ. Τα συστήματα έχουν μελετηθεί και αναπτυχθεί ευρέως εδώ και δεκαετίες, αλλά ακριβή συστήματα που χρησιμοποιούν βαθιά νευρωνικά δίκτυα (έχουν εισαχθεί μόνο τα τελευταία χρόνια. Παρουσιάζουμε μια ολοκληρωμένη έρευνα των αρχιτεκτονικών βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων για το ΝΕΡ, και τις αντιπαραβάλλουμε με προηγούμενες προσεγγίσεις για το ΝΕΡ με βάση τη μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών και άλλους εποπτευόμενους ή ημι-εποπτευόμενους αλγόριθμους μάθησης. Τα αποτελέσματά μας αναδεικνύουν τις βελτιώσεις που επιτεύχθηκαν από τα νευρωνικά δίκτυα και δείχνουν πώς η ενσωμάτωση ορισμένων από τα διδάγματα που αντλήθηκαν από προηγούμενες εργασίες σε συστήματα με βάση χαρακτηριστικά μπορεί να επιφέρει περαιτέρω βελτιώσεις.', 'hu': 'Az elnevezett entitás felismerés (NER) kulcsfontosságú összetevője a NLP rendszereknek a kérdések megválaszolásához, információk lekérdezéséhez, kapcsolatok kivonásához stb. A NER rendszereket évtizedek óta tanulmányozták és fejlesztették ki, de a mély neurális hálózatokat (NN) használó pontos rendszereket csak az elmúlt néhány évben vezették be. Átfogó felmérést mutatunk be a NER mélyneurális hálózati architektúráinak átfogó felméréséről, és ellentétben állítjuk azokat a NER korábbi megközelítéseivel, amelyek funkciómérnöki és egyéb felügyelt vagy félig felügyelt tanulási algoritmusokon alapulnak. Eredményeink kiemelik a neurális hálózatok által elért fejlesztéseket, és megmutatják, hogy a funkcióalapú NER rendszerekkel végzett korábbi munkákból levont tanulságok hogyan tudnak további fejlesztéseket eredményezni.', 'ka': 'NLP სისტემაში კითხვების გასაღებისთვის, ინფორმაციის გასაღებისთვის, შესაბამისთვის გასაღებისთვის, ანუ. NER სისტემები ათეულების წლის განვითარებულია და განვითარებულია, მაგრამ მარტივი სისტემები, რომელიც გამოყენებული დიდი ნეიროლ ჩვენ აღმოჩნეთ ყველაფერი ინეზინერიო და სხვა ნამდვილი ან ნამდვილად ნამდვილად ნამდვილად სწავლების ალდორიტების შესახებ ნეიროლური ქსელის აქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიკების შესახებ და ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესაბამისი ნეიროლური ქსელებით დაახლოებით, და ჩვენი წარმოდგენების შესაბამისი წარმოდგენების შესაბამისი ნეიროლური ქსელების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი წარმოდ', 'it': "Il Named Entity Recognition (NER) è un componente chiave nei sistemi NLP per la risposta alle domande, il recupero delle informazioni, l'estrazione delle relazioni, ecc. I sistemi NER sono stati studiati e sviluppati ampiamente per decenni, ma sistemi accurati che utilizzano reti neurali profonde (NN) sono stati introdotti solo negli ultimi anni. Presentiamo un'indagine completa delle architetture di rete neurale profonda per NER, e li confrontiamo con i precedenti approcci al NER basati su feature engineering e altri algoritmi di apprendimento supervisionati o semi-supervisionati. I nostri risultati evidenziano i miglioramenti raggiunti dalle reti neurali e mostrano come incorporare alcune delle lezioni apprese dal lavoro passato sui sistemi NER basati sulle funzionalità possa produrre ulteriori miglioramenti.", 'kk': 'Аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) NLP жүйелерінде сұрақ беру, мәліметті алу, қатынау жүйесі және т. б. жүйелері ондық жылдар бойы зерттеулі және жасалған, бірақ оның соңғы жылдар ғана түсінікті невралдық желілерді (NN) қолдану үшін д Біз NER үшін терең невраллық желінің архитектураларын толық зерттеу және олардың алдыңғы NER инженериясына негізделген және басқа басқа бақылау немесе жарты бақылау алгоритмдеріне негізделген түрде қарсы жасап көрді Біздің нәтижелеріміз невралдық желілердің жақсартуларын таңдап, өткен жұмыс істеген кейбір зерттеулердің негізінде NER жүйелерді қалай жақсарту мүмкіндігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Pavadintojo subjekto pripažinimas (NER) yra pagrindinis NLP sistemų komponentas atsakymui į klausimus, informacijos gavimui, ryšių gavimui ir t. t. NER sistemos buvo ištirtos ir plačiai plėtojamos dešimtmečius, tačiau per pastaruosius kelerius metus buvo įdiegtos tikslios sistemos, naudojančios gilius nervinius tinklus (NN). Mes pateikiame išsamų giliųjų nervų tinklų architektūrų tyrimą NER srityje ir lyginame juos su ankstesniais NER metodais, pagrįstais savybių inžinerija ir kitais prižiūrimais arba pusiau prižiūrimais mokymosi algoritmais. Our results highlight the improvements achieved by neural networks, and show how incorporating some of the lessons learned from past work on feature-based NER systems can yield further improvements.', 'mk': 'Именото препознавање на ентитетите (NER) е клучен компонент во NLP системите за одговори на прашања, преземање информации, извлекување на односи итн. NER системите се проучени и развиени широко со децении, но прецизните системи со користење на длабоките нервни мрежи (NN) се воведени само во последните неколку години. Презентираме сеопфатно истражување на архитектурите на длабоката неурална мрежа за НЕР, и ги контрастираме со претходните пристапи кон НЕР базирани на инженерство на карактеристики и други надгледувани или полунадгледувани алгоритми за учење. Нашите резултати ги истакнуваат подобрувањата постигнати од неуралните мрежи и покажуваат како вклучувањето на некои од лекциите научени од минатата работа на системите НЕР базирани на карактеристики може да донесе понатамошни подобрувања.', 'ml': 'പേര് എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നത് (NER) എന്\u200dഎല്\u200dപി സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുവാനും, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കുവാനും, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുവാനും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള പ്രധാനപ നമ്മള്\u200d നെറാര്\u200dക്കുള്ള ആഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റല്\u200d സ്ഥാനങ്ങളുടെ ആഴത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു പരിശോധനം കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരിശോധിക്കുന്ന പ്രവൃത്തിക്കും  നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d നേടിയ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് പഠിച്ച ചിട്ടുള്ള ചില പഠനങ', 'mn': 'Нэр нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition (NER) нь асуулт хариулт, мэдээллийг авах, хамааралтай гаргах, т.д. NLP системийн чухал компонент юм. NER системүүд олон жилийн турш судалж, шинжлэх ухаан болон хөгжүүлсэн байна. Гэхдээ эдгээр мэдрэлийн гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээ (NN) ашиглах зө Бид NER-ийн гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээний архитектуруудыг судалж, тэднийг NER-ийн өмнөх архитектуруудын тухай харьцуулж, өөр өөр инженерийн, бусад удирдагдсан, эсвэл хагас удирдагдсан суралцах алгоритмын тухай харьцуул Бидний үр дүнд мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд гарсан сайжруулалтыг тайлбарлаж, өнгөрсөн ажил дээр сурсан зарим хичээл хэрхэн нэмэгдүүлж болох вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'mt': 'L-Isem tar-Rikonoxximent tal-Entità (NER) huwa komponent ewlieni fis-sistemi NLP għat-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet, għall-ġbir tal-informazzjoni, għall-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet, eċċ. Is-sistemi NER ġew studjati u żviluppati b’mod wiesa’ għal għexieren ta’ snin, iżda sistemi preċiżi li jużaw netwerks newrali profondi (NN) ġew introdotti biss f’dawn l-a ħħar snin. Aħna nippreżentaw stħarriġ komprensiv ta’ arkitetturi tan-netwerks newrali profondi għan-NER, u nikkuntrastawhom ma’ approċċi preċedenti għan-NER ibbażati fuq inġinerija tal-karatteristiċi u algoritmi oħra ta’ tagħlim sorveljati jew semisorveljati. Ir-riżultati tagħna jenfasizzaw it-titjib miksub min-netwerks newrali, u juru kif l-inkorporazzjoni ta’ wħud mit-tagħlimiet li ttieħdu mill-ħidma tal-passat dwar sistemi NER ibbażati fuq karatteristiċi tista’ twassal għal aktar titjib.', 'pl': 'Rozpoznawanie nazwy Entity Recognition (NER) jest kluczowym elementem systemów NLP do odpowiedzi na pytania, pozyskiwania informacji, ekstrakcji relacji itp. Systemy NER są szeroko badane i rozwijane od dziesięcioleci, ale dokładne systemy wykorzystujące głębokie sieci neuronowe (NN) zostały wprowadzone dopiero w ostatnich latach. Przedstawiamy kompleksowe badanie architektur głębokich sieci neuronowych dla NER i porównujemy je z wcześniejszymi podejściami do NER opartymi na inżynierii funkcji i innych nadzorowanych lub pół-nadzorowanych algorytmach uczenia się. Nasze wyniki podkreślają ulepszenia osiągnięte przez sieci neuronowe i pokazują, w jaki sposób włączenie niektórych doświadczeń wyciągniętych z poprzednich prac nad systemami NER opartymi na funkcjach może przynieść dalsze ulepszenia.', 'ro': 'Numit Entity Recognition (NER) este o componentă cheie în sistemele PNL pentru răspunsul la întrebări, extragerea informațiilor, extragerea relațiilor etc. Sistemele NER au fost studiate și dezvoltate pe scară largă timp de decenii, dar sistemele precise care utilizează rețele neurale profunde (NN) au fost introduse doar în ultimii ani. Vă prezentăm un studiu cuprinzător al arhitecturilor de rețele neuronale profunde pentru NER și le contrastăm cu abordările anterioare ale NER bazate pe inginerie de caracteristici și alți algoritmi de învățare supravegheați sau semi-supravegheați. Rezultatele noastre evidențiază îmbunătățirile obținute de rețelele neurale și arată cum încorporarea unora dintre lecțiile învățate din activitatea anterioară asupra sistemelor NER bazate pe caracteristici poate genera îmbunătățiri suplimentare.', 'ms': 'Pengenalan Entiti bernama (NER) adalah komponen kunci dalam sistem NLP untuk menjawab soalan, pemulihan maklumat, ekstraksi hubungan, dll. Sistem NER telah dipelajari dan dikembangkan secara luas selama dekade, tetapi sistem yang tepat menggunakan rangkaian saraf dalam (NN) hanya diperkenalkan dalam beberapa tahun terakhir. Kami memperkenalkan penyelidikan meliputi arkitektur rangkaian saraf dalam untuk NER, dan mengembangkannya dengan pendekatan terdahulu kepada NER berdasarkan teknik ciri-ciri dan algoritma pembelajaran yang dikendalikan atau semi-dikendalikan lainnya. Keputusan kami menekankan peningkatan yang dicapai oleh rangkaian saraf, dan menunjukkan bagaimana menggabungkan beberapa pelajaran yang dipelajari dari kerja masa lalu pada sistem NER berdasarkan ciri-ciri boleh memberikan peningkatan lanjut.', 'sr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) je ključni komponent u NLP-ovim sistemima za odgovor na pitanje, prikupljanje informacija, izvlačenje odnosa itd. sistemi NER proučavaju i razvijaju se široko decenijama, ali precizni sistemi koristeći duboke neuralne mreže (NN) su uvedeni samo u poslednjih nekoliko godina. Predstavljamo sveobuhvatljivo istraživanje dubokih neuralnih mreža arhitektura za NER, i suprotstavljamo ih sa prethodnim pristupima NER-u baziranim na funkcionalnom inženjerstvu i drugim nadzirenim ili polu-nadzornim algoritmima učenja. Naši rezultati naglašavaju poboljšanje koje su postigle neuralne mreže, i pokazuju kako uključujući neke lekcije koje su naučile iz prošlog rada na sistemima NER-a koji su osnovani na funkcijama mogu donijeti daljnje poboljšanje.', 'si': 'Name අපි NER වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලය සංවිධානයක් ගැන සම්පූර්ණ පරීක්ෂණයක් පෙන්වන්න, ඒ වගේම එයාලට පසුගින් අවස්ථාවක් NER වෙන අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අති', 'no': 'Namnet Entity Recognition (NER) er ein nøkkelkomponent i NLP-systemet for spørsmål, informasjonshenting, utpakking av relasjon osv. NER-systemet er studiert og utviklet breidde i tiåra, men akkurat systemar som brukar dype neuralnettverk (NN) er berre innført i siste par år. Vi presenterer eit komplett undersøking av dype neuralnettverksarkitekturar for NER, og kontrast dei med førre tilnærmingar til NER basert på funksjonsingeniøring og andre oversikte eller semioversikte læringsalgoritme. Resultatet våre markerer forbetringane som er oppretta av neuralnettverk, og viser korleis det inkorporarer nokre av læringane som er lært frå tidlegare arbeid på funksjonsbaserte NER-systemer kan gje fram fram forbetringar.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada Entity (NER) waa qayb muhiim ah oo ku jira nidaamka NLP si ay wax u jawaabaan, helitaanka macluumaadka, soo saarista xiriirka, etc. waxaa la baray oo loo hormariyey nidaamka NER oo ballaadhan sanado badan, laakiin nidaamka saxda ah oo isticmaalaya shabakada neurada ee mool dheer (NN) waxaa la soo bandhigay sanadkii ugu dambeeyey oo kaliya. Waxaannu sameynaa baaritaan hoos u dhexaysa oo ah xarunta internetka neurada ee NER, waxaana kala duwanaynaa qaabab hore oo NER ku saleysan injiilka tayada ah iyo qoraalka waxbarashada oo kale oo la ilaaliyey ama la ilaaliyey. Abaalkayaga waxaa tusaya horumarinta shabakada neurada ah, waxaana tusaya sida la soo geliyo waxbarashada qaarkood oo laga baray shuqulka hore ee lagu bartay nidaamka NER ee gaarka ah ku saleyn karo horumar dheeraad ah.', 'ta': 'Name நாம் NER க்கான ஆழமான புதிய பிணையத்தின் பிணையத்திற்கான ஒரு முழுமையான பரிசோதனையை ஏற்படுத்துகிறோம், மற்றும் சிறப்பு பொறியியல் மற்றும் பாதுகாப்பா நம்முடைய முடிவுகள் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் முன்னேற்றத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, மற்றும் முந்தைய சில பயிற்சிகளை எவ்வாறு சேர்த்து கொள்வத', 'sv': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) är en nyckelkomponent i NLP-system för frågesvar, informationssökning, relationsextraktion etc. NER-system har studerats och utvecklats brett i årtionden, men korrekta system som använder djupa neurala nätverk (NN) har bara introducerats under de senaste åren. Vi presenterar en omfattande kartläggning av djupa neurala nätverksarkitekturer för NER, och kontrasterar dem med tidigare tillvägagångssätt för NER baserat på funktionsteknik och andra övervakade eller halvövervakade inlärningsalgoritmer. Våra resultat belyser de förbättringar som uppnåtts av neurala nätverk, och visar hur införlivande av några av de lärdomar som dragits från tidigare arbete med funktionsbaserade NER-system kan ge ytterligare förbättringar.', 'ur': 'نیر سیسٹم کے لئے سوال جواب دینے کے لئے NLP سیسٹم میں ایک کلی کامپیوتر ہے، اطلاعات اٹھانے کے لئے، ارتباط اٹھانے کے لئے، اور اضافہ کرنے کے لئے، نیر سیسٹم کے لئے دس سال تک مطالعہ اور پھیلائے گئے ہیں، لیکن سیسٹم کے مطالعہ بالکل نیرورول نیٹورک (NN) کے استعمال کے مطا ہم نیر کے لئے عمیق نیورل نیٹ ورک معماروں کا ایک تحقیق پیش کرتے ہیں، اور ان سے پہلے نیر کے لئے نیر کی طریقے سے مخالفت کرتے ہیں، ان کے لئے وینری انجینری اور دوسری تحقیق یافتہ یا نصف تحقیق یافتہ الگوریتم پر بنیاد ہے. ہمارے نتیجے نئورل نیٹورک کے ذریعے پہنچے ہوئے بہترین ترکیب کو تفصیل دیتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ اگلوں کے کاموں سے علم کی تعلیم کس طرح اضافہ کرسکتی ہے', 'uz': "Name We present a comprehensive survey of deep neural network architectures for NER, and contrast them with previous approaches to NER based on feature engineering and other supervised or semi-supervised learning algorithms.  Mana natijalarimiz neyrol tarmovlari orqali o'zgarishlarni ko'rsatadi, va bir necha o'rganishlar tashkilotdan foydalanilgan NER tizimlariga qanday o'rganishni qanday o'rganishni ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Tênd Entity recognition (NER) là một yếu tố then chốt trong lập trình NLP for question answer, Information search, relationship trích, v. NER hệ thống đã được nghiên cứu và phát triển rộng rãi trong nhiều thập kỷ, nhưng chính xác hệ thống sử dụng mạng thần kinh sâu (NNn) chỉ được nhập vào vài năm gần đây. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một cuộc khảo sát kiến trúc mạng thần kinh sâu rộng cho người máy, và tương phản chúng với các phương pháp trước với người máy dựa trên tính năng và các thuật to án học được giám sát hoặc giám sát. Kết quả của chúng tôi nhấn mạnh những cải tiến tiến được tạo bởi các mạng thần kinh, và cho thấy việc áp dụng một số bài học từ công việc trước đây trên các hệ thống tụ điện.......có thể cải tiến thêm.', 'hr': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih podataka (NER) je ključna komponenta u sustavima NLP-a za odgovor na pitanje, prikupljanje informacija, izvlačenje odnosa itd. sustavi NER-a su proučeni i razvijeni široko već desetljećima, ali precizni sustavi koristeći duboke neuralne mreže (NN) uvedeni su samo u posljednjih nekoliko godina. Predstavljamo sveobuhvatljivo istraživanje dubokih neuralnih mreža arhitektura za NER, i suprotstavljamo ih sa prethodnim pristupima NER-u temeljnim na funkcionalnom inženjerstvu i drugim nadziranim ili polu nadziranim algoritmima učenja. Naši rezultati naglašavaju poboljšanje postignuto nervnim mrežama i pokazuju kako uključujući neke lekcije naučene iz prošlog rada na sustavima NER-a koji se temelji na funkcijama mogu donijeti daljnje poboljšanje.', 'nl': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) is een belangrijke component in NLP systemen voor vragen beantwoorden, informatie ophalen, relatieonderzoek, enz. NER systemen zijn al decennia lang op grote schaal bestudeerd en ontwikkeld, maar nauwkeurige systemen met behulp van diepe neurale netwerken (NN) zijn pas de laatste jaren geïntroduceerd. We presenteren een uitgebreid overzicht van diepe neurale netwerkarchitecturen voor NER, en contrasteren deze met eerdere benaderingen van NER gebaseerd op feature engineering en andere begeleide of semi-supervised leeralgoritmes. Onze resultaten benadrukken de verbeteringen die worden bereikt door neurale netwerken en laten zien hoe het integreren van enkele van de lessen die zijn geleerd uit het verleden met feature-based NER-systemen verdere verbeteringen kan opleveren.', 'da': 'Navngivet Entity Recognition (NER) er en nøglekomponent i NLP-systemer til spørgsmål besvarelse, information hentning, relation ekstraktion osv. NER-systemer er blevet undersøgt og udviklet bredt i årtier, men præcise systemer ved hjælp af dybe neurale netværk (NN) er først blevet introduceret i de sidste par år. Vi præsenterer en omfattende undersøgelse af dybe neurale netværksarkitekturer for NER og kontrasterer dem med tidligere tilgange til NER baseret på feature engineering og andre overvågede eller halvovervågede læringsalgoritmer. Vores resultater fremhæver de forbedringer, der er opnået af neurale netværk, og viser, hvordan indarbejdelse af nogle af de erfaringer, der er lært fra tidligere arbejde med funktionsbaserede NER-systemer kan give yderligere forbedringer.', 'bg': 'Наименуваното разпознаване на обекти (НЕР) е ключов компонент в системите за НЛП за отговор на въпроси, извличане на информация, извличане на релации и др. Системите са широко изследвани и разработени в продължение на десетилетия, но точни системи, използващи дълбоки невронни мрежи (НН), са въведени едва през последните няколко години. Представяме изчерпателно проучване на дълбоките нервни мрежови архитектури за нервни мрежи и ги сравняваме с предишни подходи към нервни мрежи въз основа на инженеринг на функции и други контролирани или полунадзорни учебни алгоритми. Нашите резултати подчертават подобренията, постигнати от невронните мрежи, и показват как включването на някои от поуките, извлечени от миналата работа по функционално базирани системи може да доведе до допълнителни подобрения.', 'id': 'Entity Recognition (NER) adalah komponen kunci dalam sistem NLP untuk menjawab pertanyaan, retrieval informasi, ekstraksi hubungan, dll. Sistem NER telah dipelajari dan dikembangkan secara luas selama dekade, tetapi sistem akurat menggunakan jaringan saraf dalam (NN) hanya diperkenalkan dalam beberapa tahun terakhir. Kami mempersembahkan penyelidikan komprensif arsitektur jaringan saraf dalam untuk NER, dan mengembangkan mereka dengan pendekatan sebelumnya ke NER berdasarkan teknik fitur dan algoritma belajar yang diawasi atau semi-diawasi lainnya. Hasil kami menunjukkan peningkatan yang dicapai oleh jaringan saraf, dan menunjukkan bagaimana menggabungkan beberapa pelajaran yang dipelajari dari pekerjaan masa lalu pada sistem NER berbasis fitur dapat memberikan peningkatan lebih lanjut.', 'de': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) ist eine Schlüsselkomponente in NLP-Systemen zur Beantwortung von Fragen, Information Retrieval, Beziehungsextraktion usw. NER-Systeme wurden seit Jahrzehnten umfassend untersucht und entwickelt, aber genaue Systeme mit tiefen neuronalen Netzen (NN) wurden erst in den letzten Jahren eingeführt. Wir präsentieren eine umfassende Übersicht tiefer neuronaler Netzwerkarchitekturen für NER und stellen diese mit früheren Ansätzen für NER, basierend auf Feature Engineering und anderen überwachten oder semi-überwachten Lernalgorithmen, verglichen. Unsere Ergebnisse verdeutlichen die durch neuronale Netze erzielten Verbesserungen und zeigen, wie die Einbeziehung einiger Erkenntnisse aus früheren Arbeiten an funktionsbasierten NER-Systemen zu weiteren Verbesserungen führen kann.', 'ko': '명명실체식별(NER)은 자연언어처리(NLP) 시스템의 관건적인 구성 부분으로 문답, 정보 검색, 관계 추출 등에 사용된다. 최근 몇 십 년 동안 NER 시스템은 광범위한 연구와 발전을 얻었지만 심층신경망(NN)을 사용하는 정확한 시스템은 최근 몇 년 사이에 도입되었다.본고는 신경 네트워크의 심층 구조를 종합적으로 서술하고 기존의 특징 공학과 다른 감독 또는 반감독 학습 알고리즘이 있는 신경 네트워크와 비교했다.우리의 연구 결과는 신경 네트워크가 얻은 개선을 강조하고 특징을 바탕으로 하는 신경 네트워크 시스템의 과거 업무에서 얻은 경험과 교훈을 어떻게 결합시켜 진일보한 개선을 이룰 수 있는지를 보여 주었다.', 'sw': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) is a key component in NLP systems for question answering, information retrieval, relation extraction, etc. NER systems have been studied and developed widely for decades, but accurate systems using deep neural networks (NN) have only been introduced in the last few years.  Tunajaribu utafiti wa kina wa majengo makubwa ya mtandao wa neurali kwa ajili ya NER, na kuwalinganisha na mbinu zilizopita kwenda kwenye mtandao wa intaneti kwa msingi wa uhandisi na vipengenezaji vingine vinavyofuatiliwa au vinavyofuatiliwa na masuala ya kujifunza. Matokeo yetu yanaonyesha maendeleo yaliyotokana na mitandao ya kijamii, na kuonyesha jinsi ya kuhamasisha baadhi ya masomo yaliyojifunza kutokana na kazi za zamani kuhusu mfumo wa NER unaotumika unaweza kusababisha maboresho zaidi.', 'fa': 'شناسایی واحد نامیده (NER) یک بخش کلید در سیستم\u200cهای NLP برای جواب سوال، بازیابی اطلاعات، اخراج ارتباط و غیر از آن است. سیستم NER برای دهه\u200cها تحقیق و توسعه گسترده شده است، ولی سیستم\u200cهای دقیق با استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق (NN) تنها در چند سال گذشته معرفی شده\u200cاند. ما یک تحقیقات کامل عمیق از معماری شبکه عصبی عمیق برای NER را پیشنهاد می کنیم، و آنها را با دسترسی قبلی به NER بر اساس مهندسی خصوصی و دیگر الگوریتم یادگیری های تحت نظر یا نیمه تحت نظر قرار می دهیم. نتیجه\u200cهایمان بهترین توسط شبکه\u200cهای عصبی\u200cها را مشخص می\u200cکند و نشان می\u200cدهد که چگونه تعریف بعضی از درس\u200cهایی که از کار گذشته یاد گرفته\u200cاند بر سیستم\u200cهای نیروی\u200cهای ویژه\u200cها بر اساس ویژه\u200cها می\u200cتوانند بهترین', 'tr': 'Adly Maksad Tanamak (NER) NLP sistemalarda soragy jogaplamak, maglumat almak, gaýd etmek üçin wajyp komponentdir. NER sistemleri on ýyldan bäri okalýar we döwletlendirilýär ýöne takyk sistemalar (NN) ýöne soňky ýylda diňe tanyş edildi. Biz NER üçin derin näral a ýry arhitektarlarynyň dolu maslahaty çykarp edýäris we olary NER üçin öňki golaýlaryny we beýleki gözlemýän we semi-gözlemýän öwrenme algoritmalaryna daýaryp ýöredik. Sonuçlarımız, nöral ağları tarafından ulaşan gelişmeleri ve geçmiş çalışmalardan öğrenilen bazı ders nasıl oluşturabileceğini gösterir.', 'af': "Genaamde Entiteit herkenning (NER) is 'n sleutel komponent in NLP stelsels vir vraag antwoord, inligting ontvang, verbinding uittrekking, ensfh. NER stelsels is gestudieer en uitgewikkel vaste vir dekades, maar presies stelsels gebruik diep neuralnetwerke (NN) het slegs in die laaste paar jaar ingevoer. Ons stel 'n kompleks ondersoek van diep neuralnetwerk arkitektuur vir NER, en kontras hulle met vorige toegang tot NER gebaseer op funksie inženiering en ander ondersoekte of semi-ondersoekte leer algoritme. Ons resultate verlig die verbeteringe wat deur neurale netwerke bereik is, en wys hoe sommige van die geleenthede wat van verlede werk geleer het op funksie-gebaseerde NER stelsels verdere verbeteringe kan gee.", 'sq': 'Njohja e emëruar e njësisë (NER) është një komponent kyç në sistemet NLP për përgjigjen e pyetjeve, marrjen e informacionit, nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve, etj. Sistemet NER janë studiuar dhe zhvilluar gjerësisht për dekada, por sistemet e sakta që përdorin rrjetet e thella nervore (NN) janë futur vetëm në vitet e fundit. Ne paraqesim një sondazh tërësor të arkitekturave të rrjetit nervor të thellë për NER dhe i kontrastojmë a to me qasjet e mëparshme për NER bazuar në inxhinierinë e funksioneve dhe algoritme të tjera të mbikqyrura apo gjysmë-mbikqyrura të mësimit. Rezultatet tona theksojnë përmirësimet e arritura nga rrjetet neuronale dhe tregojnë se përfshirja e disa nga mësimet e mësuara nga puna e kaluar mbi sistemet e NER-ve bazuar në funksione mund të sjellë përmirësime të mëtejshme.', 'am': 'የስሜ የውጤት ማውቀት (NER) የNLP ስርዓቶች መልስ፣ መረጃ ማግኘት፣ የግንኙነት ማውጣት እና የNER ስርዓቶች ተማርክቷል እና በተሰፋነ ስፋት ነው፤ ግን ጥልቅ የናውሬል መረብ (NN) የተጠቃሚ ስርዓት ብቻ ነው፡፡ We present a comprehensive survey of deep neural network architectures for NER, and contrast them with previous approaches to NER based on feature engineering and other supervised or semi-supervised learning algorithms.  ፍሬዎቻችን በናውራዊ መረብ የተደረገውን ትክክል ማድረግ ያስታውሳሉ፤ የቀድሞው ትምህርት እንዴት እንደተማሩ በጥንታዊ NER ስርዓቶች ላይ የተማሩትን እንዲያሳዩ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রশ্নের উত্তর, তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধার, সম্পর্ক ব্যবহার, ইত্যাদি নামের এন্টিটি স্বীকৃতির (NER) একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ অংশ। গত কয়েক বছরে নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করা নির্ধারিত ব্যবস্থা গবেষণা এবং ব্য আমরা নেরার জন্য গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো সম্পর্কে গভীর তদন্ত উপস্থাপন করেছি এবং তাদের পূর্ববর্তী উপায়ের সাথে নেনারের সাথে যুক্ত করেছি বিশেষ প্রকৌশ আমাদের ফলাফল নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক দ্বারা অর্জনের উন্নতি তুলে ধরেছে এবং দেখাচ্ছে কিভাবে বিশেষ ভিত্তিক নিউ আর সিস্টেমের উপর কিছু কিছু শিক্ষা', 'hy': 'Ներված Համականատեսությունը (ՆԵՌ) հարցերի պատասխանելու, տեղեկատվության վերադարձման, հարաբերությունների վերացման և այլն գլխավոր բաղադրիչ է ՆԵՌ համակարգերում: ՆԵՌ համակարգերը ուսումնասիրում են և զարգանում են տարիներ շարունակ, բայց ճշգրիտ համակարգերը, որոնք օգտագործում են խորը նյարդային ցանցեր ( Մենք ներկայացնում ենք խորը նյարդային ցանցի ճարտարապետությունների ընդհանուր հետազոտություն ՆԵՌ-ի համար և հակադրում ենք դրանք ՆԵՌ-ի նախկին մոտեցումների հետ, հիմնված հատկանիշների ճարտարագիտության և այլ վերահսկված կամ կիսավերահսկված ուսուցման ալգորիթ Մեր արդյունքները ներկայացնում են նյարդային ցանցերի միջոցով հաստատված բարելավումները և ցույց են տալիս, թե ինչպես ներառելով անցյալ աշխատանքի արդյունքում սովորված որոշ դասեր հատկանիշներով հիմնված ՆԵՌ համակարգերի վրա կարող է ապագա բարելավում', 'az': 'İsmim Entity Recognition (NER) sual cavab vermək, məlumat almaq, əlaqələr çıxartmaq və bu cür NLP sistemlərində anahtar komponentdir. NER sistemləri on il ərzində təhsil edilmişdir və böyük təhsil edilmişdir, amma çox qədər neyral a ğları (NN) ilə istifadə edən düzgün sistemlər ancaq son neçə il içində təşkil edilmişdir. Biz NER üçün dərin nöral a ğ arhitektarlarının bütün incəsənətini göstərdik və onlara əvvəlki NER mühendisliyinə və digər gözləyirli və ya yarı-gözləyirli öyrənmə algoritmalarına dayandırırıq. Bizim sonuçlarımız nöral ağları ilə nəticə edilən yaxşılıqları aydınlaşdırır və əvvəlki işlərdən öyrənmiş bazı dərsələrin necə təşkil edildiyini göstərər ki, nöral sistemlərin təşkil edilmiş NER sistemlərinin daha yaxşılıqlarını nəzərdə edə bil', 'bs': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih podataka (NER) je ključni komponent u NLP sustavima za odgovor na pitanje, prikupljanje informacija, izvlačenje odnosa itd. sistemi NER-a su proučeni i razvijeni široko već desetljećima, ali precizni sustavi koristeći duboke neuralne mreže (NN) su uvedeni samo u posljednjih nekoliko godina. Predstavljamo sveobuhvatljivo istraživanje dubokih neuralnih mreža arhitektura za NER, i suprotstavljamo ih sa prethodnim pristupima NER-u baziranim na funkcionalnom inženjerstvu i drugim nadziranim ili polu-nadzornim algoritmima učenja. Naši rezultati naglašavaju poboljšanje postignute neuralnim mrežama i pokazuju kako uključujući neke lekcije koje su naučile iz prošlog rada na sistemima NER-a koji se temelji na funkcijama, mogu donijeti daljnje poboljšanje.', 'cs': 'Rozpoznávání pojmenovaných entit (NER) je klíčovou součástí NLP systémů pro zodpovězení otázek, vyhledávání informací, extrakci vztahů apod. NER systémy jsou studovány a rozvíjeny široce po desetiletí, ale přesné systémy využívající hluboké neuronové sítě (NN) byly zavedeny teprve v posledních letech. Představujeme komplexní průzkum architektur hlubokých neuronových sítí pro NER a porovnáváme je s předchozími přístupy k NER založenými na funkčním inženýrství a dalších algoritmech supervizorovaného nebo polovičně supervizorovaného učení. Naše výsledky zdůrazňují zlepšení dosažená neuronovými sítěmi a ukazují, jak začlenění některých poznatků získaných z minulé práce na NER systémech založených na funkcích může přinést další zlepšení.', 'ca': "El Nomé Entity Recognition (NER) és un component clau en els sistemes NLP per respondre a preguntes, recuperar informació, extrair relacions, etc. Els sistemes NER han estat estudiats i desenvolupats en gran medida durant dècades, però sistemes precisos que utilitzen xarxes neuronales profundes (NN) només han estat introduïts en els darrers anys. Presentam un estudi global d'arquitectures de xarxa neural profunda per a NER, i les contrastem amb enfocaments anteriors a NER basats en enginyeria de característiques i altres algoritmes d'aprenentatge supervisats o semisupervisats. Els nostres resultats destaquen les millors aconseguides per les xarxes neurals, i mostran com incorporar algunes de les lliçons aprengutes de la feina passada en sistemes NER basats en característiques pot produir millors adicionals.", 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste tuvastamine (NER) on NLP-süsteemide võtmekomponent küsimustele vastamiseks, teabe hankimiseks, seoste ekstraheerimiseks jne. NER-süsteeme on aastakümneid laialdaselt uuritud ja arendatud, kuid täpseid sügavate närvivõrkude (NN) kasutavaid süsteeme on kasutusele võetud alles viimastel aastatel. Esitame põhjaliku ülevaate NER-i sügavatest neuraalvõrgu arhitektuuridest ja võrdleme neid varasemate NER-i lähenemisviisidega, mis põhinevad funktsioonide inseneril ja muudel juhendatud või pooljuhitatud õppealgoritmidel. Meie tulemused rõhutavad närvivõrkudega saavutatud parandusi ja näitavad, kuidas mõnede varasemate funktsioonipõhiste NER-süsteemide tööst saadud õppetundide kasutamine võib anda täiendavaid parandusi.', 'fi': 'Nimetty entity recognition (NER) on keskeinen osa NLP-järjestelmiä kysymyksissä vastaamisessa, tiedonhaussa, suhdeuuttamisessa jne. NER-järjestelmiä on tutkittu ja kehitetty laajasti vuosikymmenten ajan, mutta tarkkoja järjestelmiä syvähermoverkkoja (NN) hyödyntäviä järjestelmiä on otettu käyttöön vasta muutaman viime vuoden aikana. Esitämme kattavan selvityksen NER:n syvähermoverkkoarkkitehtuurista ja vertaamme niitä aikaisempiin NER:n lähestymistapoihin, jotka perustuvat ominaisuuksien suunnitteluun ja muihin valvottuihin tai puolivalvottuihin oppimisalgoritmeihin. Tuloksemme korostavat neuroverkkojen aikaansaamia parannuksia ja osoittavat, miten osa aiemmista ominaisuuksiin perustuvista NER-järjestelmistä saaduista kokemuksista voi tuottaa lisäparannuksia.', 'ha': "Ana sunan Entity Recognition (NER) wani abu ne mai key cikin na'urar NLP-na'urar masĩfa wa mai tambaya, mai riƙon lãbãri, mai cire shirin haɗi da masallaci, etc. an karanta na'urar na NER kuma aka develope widen, daidai a ƙidãyayyuta, amma, an fara tsarin tsari da ke amfani da zanayenaire masu ƙari na neural (NN) kawai a cikin shekara guda kaɗan. Tuna sami ƙidãya masu tsarin tarakiki na neural na NER, kuma Muke sambata su da hanyoyin zaman zuwa NER, a kan karatun masu tsari da masu inganci masu da aka tsare ko kuma wasu algoritori masu da aka tsare ta. MatamayinMu na ƙayyade improvements da aka samar da mitandao na neura, kuma ka nũna yadda ya shigar da wasu wa'anar da aka sanar daga aikin da aka riga a a kan masu tsari na NER, zai iya ƙara ƙari.", 'he': 'זיהוי איכות בשם NER הוא רכיב מפתח במערכות NLP לענות על שאלות, להשיג מידע, חולץ מערכות יחסים, וכו"כ. מערכות NER למדו ופתחו באופן רחב במשך עשורים, אך מערכות מדויקות בשימוש רשתות עצביות עמוקות (NN) הוציאו רק בשנים האחרונות. אנחנו מציגים חקירה מיוחדת של ארכיטקטורות רשת עצבית עמוקות עבור NER, ולהשוות אותם עם גישות קודמות ל NER בהתבסס על הנדסה של תכונות ואלגוריתמים למידה אחרים ששולטים או שמשולטים בחצי. התוצאות שלנו מזכירות את השיפורים שנעשו על ידי רשתות עצביות, ולהראות כיצד הכילוי חלק מהשיעורים שנלמדו מהעבודה שעברה על מערכות NER מבוססות על תכונות יכול להביא שיפורים נוספים.', 'sk': 'Prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet (NER) je ključna komponenta sistemov NLP za odgovarjanje na vprašanja, pridobivanje informacij, ekstrakcijo relacij itd. NER sistemi so bili široko raziskani in razviti že desetletja, vendar so bili natančni sistemi z uporabo globokih nevronskih omrežij (NN) uvedeni šele v zadnjih nekaj letih. Predstavljamo celovito raziskavo arhitektur globokih nevronskih omrežij za NER in jih primerjamo s prejšnjimi pristopi k NER na podlagi funkcijskega inženiringa in drugih nadzorovanih ali polnadzorovanih algoritmov učenja. Naši rezultati poudarjajo izboljšave, dosežene z nevronskimi omrežji, in kažejo, kako lahko vključitev nekaterih izkušenj, pridobljenih iz preteklega dela na sistemih NER, temelječih na funkcijah, prinese nadaljnje izboljšave.', 'jv': 'Nompok EntityTang (NeR) iku kompon sing dibutuhke nLP sistem kanggo ngomong respon, informasi ngengatining, hakene nggambar obang-obang, njb. sistem NR sediramu diputara sak akeh akeh akeh akeh lano, nguasai sistem sing wis diputara sak onkno (NN) dumadhi kapan tau sing dibutuhke ditambah akeh dumadhi. We present a comprcomprcomprcomprcompromise Rejalekan dhéwé nglanggar ngertuk kanggo ngerasah seneng pisan tambah, lan nganggep kuwi tindakan pirsak nggawe layarané pirsak aturan sing paling nggawe barang kelangan karo sistem sing diangkat sabên lan aturan NR sing bisa dianggap oleh dumadhi.', 'bo': 'Named Entity Recognition (NER) is a key component in NLP systems for question answering, information retrieval, relation extraction, etc. NER systems have been studied and developed widely for decades, but accurate systems using deep neural networks (NN) have only been introduced in the last few years. We present a comprehensive survey of deep neural network architectures for NER, and contrast them with previous approaches to NER based on feature engineering and other supervised or semi-supervised learning algorithms. Our results highlight the improvements achieved by neural networks, and show how incorporating some of the lessons learned from past work on feature-based NER systems can yield further improvements.'}
{'en': 'Distantly Supervised NER with Partial Annotation Learning and Reinforcement Learning', 'fr': 'NER supervisé à distance avec apprentissage par annotation partielle et apprentissage par renforcement', 'pt': 'NER Supervisionado à Distância com Aprendizagem de Anotação Parcial e Aprendizagem por Reforço', 'ar': 'NER تحت الإشراف عن بعد مع تعلم الشرح الجزئي والتعلم المعزز', 'es': 'NER supervisada a distancia con aprendizaje de anotación parcial y aprendizaje por refuerzo', 'ja': '部分的な注釈学習と強化学習を伴う遠隔監督NER', 'zh': '有注学、强化学者远程监 NER', 'ru': 'Дистанционно контролируемый NER с частичным обучением аннотациям и обучением подкреплению', 'hi': 'आंशिक एनोटेशन सीखने और सुदृढीकरण सीखने के साथ दूर से पर्यवेक्षित एनईआर', 'ga': 'NER faoi Mhaoirseacht i gCéin le Foghlaim Pháirt-Anótála agus Foghlaim Neartaithe', 'ka': 'განმავლობით დანახვა NER-ს სწავლების და სწავლების ნაწავლებით დანახვა', 'el': 'Απομακρυσμένη Επίβλεψη με Μερική Μάθηση σχολίων και Μάθηση Ενίσχυσης', 'hu': 'Távolról felügyelt NER részleges megjegyzések tanulásával és megerősítésével', 'it': 'NER supervisionato a distanza con apprendimento parziale delle annotazioni e apprendimento di rinforzo', 'kk': 'Бөлек жазбаларды оқыту және қайталау оқыту', 'lt': 'Iš toli prižiūrima NER su dalinio anotacinio mokymosi ir sustiprinimo mokymosi priemonėmis', 'mk': 'Distantly Supervised NER with Partial Annotation Learning and Reinforcement Learning', 'ms': 'NER Dipengawasi Jauh dengan Pelajaran Annotasi Sebahagian dan Pelajaran Pengesahan', 'ml': 'പങ്കുചേര്\u200dന്ന പഠനം പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും പുനര്\u200dത്ഥിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും പഠിച്ചുകൊണ്ട് പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ നെയി', 'mt': 'NER Sorveljat mill-bogħod b’Tagħlim ta’ Annotazzjoni Partiali u Tagħlim ta’ tisħiħ', 'mn': 'НЕР-г холын харьцангуй удирдлагаар суралцаж, нэмэгдүүлэх суралцаж', 'no': 'Avstand oversikt NER med delvis læring av notasjon og styrke', 'ro': 'NER supravegheat la distanță cu învățare parțială de adnotare și învățare de consolidare', 'pl': 'NER nadzorowany na odległość z częściowym uczeniem się anotacji i uczeniem się wzmacniającym', 'sr': 'Daljinski nadzorni NER sa učenjem delovih annotacija i pojačanjem učenja', 'si': 'දුරස්ථානයෙන් පරීක්ෂා කරපු NER සමග අංශික කිරීමක් ඉගෙනගන්න සහ ආපහු බලන්න ඉගෙනගන්න', 'sv': 'Fjärrstyrd NER med Delvis Annotation Learning och Förstärkning Learning', 'so': 'Sharciga degenaanshaha NER with Partial Annotation Learning and Reinforcement Learning', 'ta': 'பகுதி அறிவிப்பு கற்றுக் கொண்டும் மற்றும் விரிவாக்கம் கற்றுக் கொண்டு', 'ur': 'حصہ انٹرنیٹ سیکھنے اور نیٹرنیٹ سیکھنے کے ساتھ دور نظارت کی NER', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giám sát người máy lâu dài với tiết mục học và học tập tăng cường', 'bg': 'Далечно контролиран нерв с частично анотация учене и подсилване учене', 'hr': 'Daljinski nadzirani NER sa učenjem učenja i pojačavanjem djelomičnih annotacija', 'da': 'Fjernstilsynet NER med Delvis Annotationslæring og Forstærkelseslæring', 'nl': 'NER met gedeeltelijke annotatie leren en versterking leren op afstand begeleid', 'de': 'Fernüberwachter NER mit partiellem Annotationslernen und Reinforcement Learning', 'id': 'Distant Supervised NER dengan Partial Annotation Learning dan Reinforcement Learning', 'ko': '부분 주석 학습 및 학습 강화를 바탕으로 하는 원격 감독 신경 네트워크', 'fa': 'با یادگیری یادگیری و تأثیر یادگیری پاره\u200cای از NER تحت نظر دور', 'sw': 'Ikiwa na NNE yenye mafunzo ya Kufundisha na Kufundisha', 'tr': 'Öğrenme ve Güçleme Öğrenme ile uzaktan gözetlenmiş NER', 'af': 'Afstand ondersoek NER met gedeeltelike Annotasie Leer en Versterking Leer', 'sq': 'NER i mbikqyrur nga larg me mësimin e anotacionit të pjesshëm dhe forcimin e mësimit', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Հեռու վերահսկված ՆԵՌ-ը մասամբ նշումների սովորելով և ուժեղացնելով սովորելով', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛k v톛 g칲cl칲 칬yr톛nm톛k', 'bn': 'পার্টিশিল্প শিক্ষা এবং পুনরায় শিক্ষা শিক্ষা দিয়ে বিদ্যমান NER সুপার্স করা হয়েছে', 'bs': 'Daljinski nadgledan NER sa učenjem učenja i pojačavanjem Annotacije', 'ca': "NER remotament supervisada amb aprenentatge parcial d'anotació i reforç", 'cs': 'NER s dálkovým dohledem s částečným anotací a posilovacím učením', 'et': 'Kaugjuhitav NER osalise annotatsiooni õppimise ja tugevdamise õppega', 'fi': 'Kaukana ohjattu NER osittaisella muistiinpanolla oppimisella ja vahvistuksella oppimisella', 'jv': 'Distant super Vised NUR with partial Text Learning and rebucement Learning', 'ha': 'Distantly Supervised NER with Partial Annotation Learning and Reinforcement Learning', 'he': 'NER משגיח מרחוק עם הלימודים בהעטפות חלקיות ולמדות חיבור', 'sk': 'Daljno nadzorovan NER z delnim opombalnim učenjem in okrepitvenim učenjem', 'bo': 'Distantly Supervised NER with Partial Annotation Learning and Reinforcement Learning'}
{'en': 'A bottleneck problem with Chinese named entity recognition (NER) in new domains is the lack of annotated data. One solution is to utilize the method of distant supervision, which has been widely used in relation extraction, to automatically populate annotated training data without humancost. The distant supervision assumption here is that if a string in text is included in a predefined dictionary of entities, the string might be an entity. However, this kind of auto-generated data suffers from two main problems : incomplete and noisy annotations, which affect the performance of NER models. In this paper, we propose a novel approach which can partially solve the above problems of distant supervision for NER. In our approach, to handle the incomplete problem, we apply partial annotation learning to reduce the effect of unknown labels of characters. As for noisy annotation, we design an instance selector based on reinforcement learning to distinguish positive sentences from auto-generated annotations. In experiments, we create two datasets for Chinese named entity recognition in two domains with the help of distant supervision. The experimental results show that the proposed approach obtains better performance than the comparison systems on both two datasets.', 'es': 'Un problema de cuello de botella con el reconocimiento de entidades con nombre chino (NER) en los nuevos dominios es la falta de datos anotados. Una solución es utilizar el método de supervisión a distancia, que se ha utilizado ampliamente en la extracción de relaciones, para completar automáticamente los datos de entrenamiento anotados sin costo humano. La suposición de la supervisión a distancia en este caso es que si se incluye una cadena en el texto en un diccionario de entidades predefinido, la cadena podría ser una entidad. Sin embargo, este tipo de datos autogenerados adolece de dos problemas principales: anotaciones incompletas y ruidosas, que afectan el rendimiento de los modelos NER. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque novedoso que puede resolver parcialmente los problemas anteriores de la supervisión a distancia de la NER. En nuestro enfoque, para resolver el problema incompleto, aplicamos el aprendizaje de anotación parcial para reducir el efecto de las etiquetas de caracteres desconocidas. En cuanto a las anotaciones ruidosas, diseñamos un selector de instancias basado en el aprendizaje por refuerzo para distinguir frases positivas de anotaciones autogeneradas. En experimentos, creamos dos conjuntos de datos para el reconocimiento de entidades con nombre chino en dos dominios con la ayuda de la supervisión a distancia. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el enfoque propuesto obtiene un mejor rendimiento que los sistemas de comparación en ambos conjuntos de datos.', 'ar': 'مشكلة الاختناق في التعرف على الكيان الصيني المسمى (NER) في المجالات الجديدة هي نقص البيانات المشروحة. يتمثل أحد الحلول في استخدام طريقة الإشراف عن بُعد ، والتي تم استخدامها على نطاق واسع في الاستخراج المتعلق بالعلاقة ، لتعبئة بيانات التدريب المشروحة تلقائيًا بدون الإنسان. افتراض الإشراف البعيد هنا هو أنه إذا تم تضمين سلسلة في النص في قاموس كيانات محدد مسبقًا ، فقد تكون السلسلة كيانًا. ومع ذلك ، يعاني هذا النوع من البيانات التي يتم إنشاؤها تلقائيًا من مشكلتين رئيسيتين: التعليقات التوضيحية غير المكتملة والصاخبة ، والتي تؤثر على أداء نماذج NER. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح نهجًا جديدًا يمكن أن يحل جزئيًا المشكلات المذكورة أعلاه للإشراف عن بعد لـ NER. في نهجنا ، للتعامل مع المشكلة غير المكتملة ، نطبق تعلم التعليقات التوضيحية الجزئية لتقليل تأثير التسميات غير المعروفة للأحرف. بالنسبة إلى التعليقات التوضيحية الصاخبة ، فإننا نصمم محدد مثيل بناءً على التعلم المعزز لتمييز الجمل الإيجابية عن التعليقات التوضيحية التي يتم إنشاؤها تلقائيًا. في التجارب ، قمنا بإنشاء مجموعتي بيانات للتعرف على الكيان الصيني المسمى في مجالين بمساعدة الإشراف عن بعد. أظهرت النتائج التجريبية أن النهج المقترح يحصل على أداء أفضل من أنظمة المقارنة في مجموعتي البيانات.', 'fr': "Un problème de goulot d'étranglement avec la reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) en chinois dans les nouveaux domaines est le manque de données annotées. Une solution consiste à utiliser la méthode de supervision à distance, qui a été largement utilisée dans l'extraction de relations, pour remplir automatiquement les données d'entraînement annotées sans frais humains. L'hypothèse de supervision distante ici est que si une chaîne de texte est incluse dans un dictionnaire prédéfini d'entités, la chaîne peut être une entité. Cependant, ce type de données générées automatiquement souffre de deux problèmes principaux\xa0: les annotations incomplètes et bruyantes, qui affectent les performances des modèles NER. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle approche qui peut résoudre en partie les problèmes ci-dessus de surveillance à distance pour le NER. Dans notre approche, pour gérer le problème incomplet, nous appliquons un apprentissage partiel des annotations afin de réduire l'effet des étiquettes de caractères inconnues. En ce qui concerne les annotations bruyantes, nous concevons un sélecteur d'instance basé sur l'apprentissage par renforcement afin de distinguer les phrases positives des annotations générées automatiquement. Dans le cadre d'expériences, nous créons deux ensembles de données pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées en chinois dans deux domaines à l'aide d'une supervision à distance. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que l'approche proposée obtient de meilleures performances que les systèmes de comparaison sur les deux ensembles de données.", 'pt': 'Um problema de gargalo com o reconhecimento de entidade nomeada em chinês (NER) em novos domínios é a falta de dados anotados. Uma solução é utilizar o método de supervisão à distância, que tem sido amplamente utilizado na extração de relações, para preencher automaticamente dados de treinamento anotados sem custo humano. A suposição de supervisão distante aqui é que, se uma string no texto for incluída em um dicionário predefinido de entidades, a string pode ser uma entidade. No entanto, esse tipo de dado gerado automaticamente sofre de dois problemas principais: anotações incompletas e ruidosas, que afetam o desempenho dos modelos NER. Neste artigo, propomos uma nova abordagem que pode resolver parcialmente os problemas acima de supervisão à distância para NER. Em nossa abordagem, para lidar com o problema incompleto, aplicamos o aprendizado de anotação parcial para reduzir o efeito de rótulos desconhecidos de caracteres. Quanto à anotação ruidosa, projetamos um seletor de instância baseado no aprendizado por reforço para distinguir frases positivas de anotações geradas automaticamente. Em experimentos, criamos dois conjuntos de dados para reconhecimento de entidades nomeadas em chinês em dois domínios com a ajuda de supervisão à distância. Os resultados experimentais mostram que a abordagem proposta obtém melhor desempenho do que os sistemas de comparação nos dois conjuntos de dados.', 'ja': '新しいドメインにおける中国の名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）のボトルネックの問題は、注釈付きデータの欠如です。 1つの解決策は、関連抽出で広く使用されている遠隔監視の方法を利用して、注釈付きトレーニングデータを人件費なしで自動的に入力することです。 ここでの遠隔監督の仮定は、テキスト内の文字列がエンティティの事前定義された辞書に含まれている場合、文字列がエンティティである可能性があるということです。 しかし、この種の自動生成データは、不完全でノイズの多い注釈がNERモデルのパフォーマンスに影響を与えるという2つの主な問題を抱えています。 本稿では， NERに対する遠隔監督の上記課題を部分的に解決できる新たなアプローチを提案する． 私たちのアプローチでは、不完全な問題を処理するために、部分的な注釈学習を適用して、未知のラベルの文字の影響を減らします。 ノイズの多いアノテーションについては、強化学習に基づいてインスタンスセレクタを設計し、ポジティブな文章と自動生成されたアノテーションを区別します。 実験では、遠隔監督の助けを借りて、2つのドメインで中国の名前付きエンティティ認識のための2つのデータセットを作成します。 実験結果は、提案されたアプローチが、両方の2つのデータセットの比較システムよりも優れたパフォーマンスを得ることを示している。', 'zh': '新域之中,中文实体识 (NER) 者瓶颈阙注数也。 一解决方案者,因博用之远程,自填其注数也。 此处远程监设,若文本中字符串包在定义之实体字典中,则当字符串或为实体。 然此数存二要:不全嘈杂之注,NER模形之性也。 本文建一新法,可分NER远程督之。 于我法中,为理不全,宜用注学减未知字符。 至于嘈杂之注,设一实选择器,以别句自生之注。 实验中借远程监,两域中名实体。 实验结果表明,所提法在两数集上皆有优于较统之性。', 'hi': 'नए डोमेन में चीनी नामित एंटिटी पहचान (एनईआर) के साथ एक बाधा समस्या एनोटेट डेटा की कमी है। एक समाधान दूर के पर्यवेक्षण की विधि का उपयोग करना है, जिसका व्यापक रूप से संबंध निष्कर्षण में उपयोग किया गया है, मानव लागत के बिना स्वचालित रूप से एनोटेट प्रशिक्षण डेटा को पॉप्युलेट करने के लिए। यहां दूर की पर्यवेक्षण धारणा यह है कि यदि पाठ में एक स्ट्रिंग संस्थाओं के पूर्वनिर्धारित शब्दकोश में शामिल है, तो स्ट्रिंग एक इकाई हो सकती है। हालांकि, इस तरह का ऑटो-जनरेटेड डेटा दो मुख्य समस्याओं से ग्रस्त है: अपूर्ण और शोर एनोटेशन, जो एनईआर मॉडल के प्रदर्शन को प्रभावित करते हैं। इस पेपर में, हम एक उपन्यास दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो आंशिक रूप से एनईआर के लिए दूर के पर्यवेक्षण की उपरोक्त समस्याओं को हल कर सकता है। हमारे दृष्टिकोण में, अधूरी समस्या को संभालने के लिए, हम वर्णों के अज्ञात लेबल के प्रभाव को कम करने के लिए आंशिक एनोटेशन सीखने को लागू करते हैं। शोर एनोटेशन के लिए, हम ऑटो-जनित एनोटेशन से सकारात्मक वाक्यों को अलग करने के लिए सुदृढीकरण सीखने के आधार पर एक उदाहरण चयनकर्ता डिजाइन करते हैं। प्रयोगों में, हम दूर के पर्यवेक्षण की मदद से दो डोमेन में नामित इकाई मान्यता के लिए दो डेटासेट बनाते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण दोनों डेटासेट पर तुलना प्रणालियों की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'Проблема узкого места с распознаванием китайских сущностей (NER) в новых доменах заключается в отсутствии аннотированных данных. Одним из решений является использование метода дистанционного наблюдения, который широко используется при извлечении отношений, для автоматического заполнения аннотированных данных обучения без человеческих затрат. В данном случае предполагается, что если строка в тексте включена в предопределенный словарь сущностей, то строка может быть сущностью. Однако этот вид автоматически генерируемых данных страдает от двух основных проблем: неполных и шумных аннотаций, которые влияют на производительность моделей NER. В данной работе мы предлагаем новый подход, который может частично решить вышеперечисленные задачи дистанционного наблюдения для NER. В нашем подходе для решения неполной задачи мы применяем частичное изучение аннотаций для уменьшения эффекта неизвестных меток символов. Что касается шумной аннотации, мы создаем селектор экземпляров, основанный на обучении подкреплению, чтобы отличать положительные предложения от автоматически сгенерированных аннотаций. В экспериментах мы создаем два набора данных для распознавания сущностей с китайским именем в двух доменах с помощью дистанционного наблюдения. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый подход обеспечивает лучшую производительность, чем системы сравнения в обоих наборах данных.', 'ga': "Fadhb baic le haitheantas aonán ainmnithe sa tSín (NER) i réimsí nua is ea an easpa sonraí anótáilte. Is é réiteach amháin ná úsáid a bhaint as an modh maoirseachta i bhfad i gcéin, a úsáideadh go forleathan maidir le heastóscadh, chun sonraí oiliúna anótáilte a líonadh go huathoibríoch gan costas daonna. Is é an toimhde maoirseachta i bhfad i gcéin anseo, má tá teaghrán i téacs san áireamh i bhfoclóir réamhshainithe eintiteas, d'fhéadfadh an téad a bheith ina aonán. Mar sin féin, tá dhá phríomhfhadhb ag baint leis an gcineál seo sonraí uathghinte: nótaí neamhiomlána agus torannacha, a chuireann isteach ar fheidhmíocht samhlacha NER. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige nua a d’fhéadfadh réiteach páirteach a dhéanamh ar na fadhbanna thuas a bhaineann le cian-mhaoirseacht do NER. Inár gcur chuige, chun an fhadhb neamhiomlán a láimhseáil, cuirimid foghlaim anótála pháirtigh i bhfeidhm chun éifeacht lipéid anaithnid carachtair a laghdú. Maidir le anótáil fhuaimiúil, dearadh againn roghnóir ásc bunaithe ar fhoghlaim athneartaithe chun abairtí dearfacha a idirdhealú ó nótaí uathghinte. I dturgnaimh, cruthaímid dhá thacar sonraí le haghaidh aitheantais aonáin ainmnithe na Síne i dhá réimse le cabhair ó chianmhaoirseacht. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfaigheann an cur chuige atá beartaithe feidhmíocht níos fearr ná na córais chomparáide ar an dá thacar sonraí.", 'hu': 'Az új tartományokban a kínai nevezett entitások felismerésével (NER) kapcsolatos szűk keresztmetszeti probléma a jegyzetelt adatok hiánya. Az egyik megoldás a távoli felügyelet módszerének alkalmazása, amelyet széles körben használtak a kapcsolatkivonás során, a jegyzetelt képzési adatok humánköltség nélküli automatikus feltöltésére. A távoli felügyelet feltételezése itt az, hogy ha a szövegben egy karakterlánc szerepel az entitások előre definiált szótárában, akkor a karakterlánc egy entitás lehet. Azonban az ilyen fajta automatikusan generált adatok két fő problémával szenvednek: hiányos és zajos jegyzetek, amelyek befolyásolják a NER modellek teljesítményét. Jelen tanulmányban olyan új megközelítést javasolunk, amely részben megoldhatja a NER távoli felügyeletének fenti problémáit. Megközelítésünkben a hiányos probléma kezelésére részleges jegyzetelési tanulást alkalmazunk, hogy csökkentsük a karakterek ismeretlen címkéinek hatását. Ami a zajos megjegyzéseket illeti, a megerősítési tanuláson alapuló példányválasztót tervezünk, hogy megkülönböztessük a pozitív mondatokat az automatikusan generált megjegyzésektől. Kísérletekben két adatkészletet hozunk létre a kínai elnevezésű entitás felismeréséhez két területen távoli felügyelet segítségével. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt megközelítés mindkét adatkészleten jobb teljesítményt ér el, mint az összehasonlító rendszerek.', 'el': 'Ένα πρόβλημα συμφόρησης με την αναγνώριση των κινεζικών ονομάτων οντοτήτων σε νέους τομείς είναι η έλλειψη σχολιασμένων δεδομένων. Μια λύση είναι να χρησιμοποιηθεί η μέθοδος της μακρινής επίβλεψης, η οποία έχει χρησιμοποιηθεί ευρέως σε σχέση με την εξαγωγή, για να συμπληρώσει αυτόματα σχολιασμένα δεδομένα κατάρτισης χωρίς ανθρώπινο κόστος. Η υπόθεση μακρινής εποπτείας εδώ είναι ότι αν μια συμβολοσειρά στο κείμενο περιλαμβάνεται σε ένα προκαθορισμένο λεξικό οντοτήτων, η συμβολοσειρά μπορεί να είναι μια οντότητα. Ωστόσο, αυτό το είδος των αυτόματα παραγόμενων δεδομένων πάσχει από δύο κύρια προβλήματα: ελλιπείς και θορυβώδεις σχολιασμούς, οι οποίες επηρεάζουν την απόδοση των μοντέλων. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση η οποία μπορεί εν μέρει να λύσει τα παραπάνω προβλήματα της μακρινής εποπτείας για την ΝΕΡ. Στην προσέγγισή μας, για να χειριστούμε το ελλιπές πρόβλημα, εφαρμόζουμε μερική εκμάθηση σχολιασμού για να μειώσουμε την επίδραση άγνωστων ετικετών χαρακτήρων. Όσον αφορά τις θορυβώδεις σημειώσεις, σχεδιάζουμε έναν επιλογέα παρουσίας βασισμένο στην εκμάθηση ενίσχυσης για να διακρίνουμε θετικές προτάσεις από τις αυτόματα δημιουργημένες σημειώσεις. Σε πειράματα, δημιουργούμε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων για την αναγνώριση κινεζικών ονομαστικών οντοτήτων σε δύο τομείς με τη βοήθεια μακρινής εποπτείας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση επιτυγχάνει καλύτερη απόδοση από τα συστήματα σύγκρισης και στα δύο σύνολα δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'ჩინეთის სახელი ინტერტის განაცნობის (NER) პრობლემა ახალი დიომენში არის მონიშნული მონაცემები არსებობა. ერთი პასუხი არის გამოყენება განსხვავებული მონაცემების მეთოდის გამოყენება, რომელიც ძალიან გამოყენებულია გამოყენებული ექსტრაქციაში, რომ ავტომატურად მომოწმებული მონაცემების მარტივი ნახვა აქ არის, რომ თუ ტექსტის სტრიქონტის წინ განსაზღვრებული ელექტიკონტის სიტყვაში შეიძლება იყოს ელექტიკი. მაგრამ, ეს სახელ ავტომატურად შექმნილი მონაცემები ორი მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემებისგან იქნება: უკეთესი და ბუნური მონაცემები, რომელიც აღმოჩენა NER მოდელ ჩვენ ამ დომენში პრომენტის მიღება, რომელიც ნაწილად შეუძლია გადაწყენოთ მეორე პრობლემების გარეშე NER-ის განმავლობაში. ჩვენი მიღებაში, უკეთესი პრობლემების გარეშე, ჩვენ დავყენებთ ფართო ანტორაციის სწავლებას, რომ უცნობი სიმბოლოების ეფექტის შემცირება. როგორც სიტყვი ანოტაციაზე, ჩვენ განაზღვრებთ ინსტაციის მონიშნელი, რომელიც სწავლად სწავლას, რომ ავტომატურად შექმნილი ანოტაციებიდან პოტიფიკაციული სიტყვილების ექსპერიმენტებში ჩვენ ჩინეთის სახელ ინტერტიკის განახლებისთვის ორი მონაცემების დახმარებით. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენებენ, რომ პროგენტირებული პროგენტი მიიღებს უკეთესი გამოსახულება, ვიდრე ორივე მონაცემების შემდ', 'it': "Un problema di strozzatura con il riconoscimento cinese delle entità denominate (NER) nei nuovi domini è la mancanza di dati annotati. Una soluzione consiste nell'utilizzare il metodo di supervisione a distanza, ampiamente utilizzato nell'estrazione delle relazioni, per popolare automaticamente i dati di formazione annotati senza costi umani. L'ipotesi di supervisione a distanza qui è che se una stringa nel testo è inclusa in un dizionario predefinito di entità, la stringa potrebbe essere un'entità. Tuttavia, questo tipo di dati generati automaticamente soffre di due problemi principali: annotazioni incomplete e rumorose, che influenzano le prestazioni dei modelli NER. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo approccio che può parzialmente risolvere i problemi di supervisione a distanza di cui sopra per NER. Nel nostro approccio, per gestire il problema incompleto, applichiamo l'apprendimento parziale delle annotazioni per ridurre l'effetto di etichette sconosciute dei caratteri. Per quanto riguarda le annotazioni rumorose, progettiamo un selettore di istanze basato sull'apprendimento di rinforzo per distinguere le frasi positive dalle annotazioni generate automaticamente. In esperimenti, creiamo due set di dati per il riconoscimento di entità con nome cinese in due domini con l'aiuto di supervisione a distanza. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che l'approccio proposto ottiene prestazioni migliori rispetto ai sistemi di confronto su entrambi i set di dati.", 'lt': 'Problema, susijusi su Kinijos vardu pavadinto subjekto pripažinimu (NER) naujose srityse, yra anotuotų duomenų trūkumas. Vienas iš sprendimų – naudoti nuotolinės priežiūros metodą, kuris buvo plačiai naudojamas ekstrahavimo srityje, automatiškai populiuoti anotuotus mokymo duomenis be žmogiškųjų išlaidų. Atstuminė prielaida yra ta, kad jei teksto eilutė yra įtraukta į iš anksto apibrėžtą subjektų žodyną, eilutė gali būti subjektas. Tačiau tokio pobūdžio automatiškai gauti duomenys susiduria su dviem pagrindinėmis problemomis: neišsamiomis ir triukšmingomis anotacijomis, kurios turi įtakos NER modelių veikimui. Šiame dokumente siūlome naują požiūrį, kuris iš dalies galėtų išspręsti pirmiau minėtas nuotolinės NER priežiūros problemas. Mūsų požiūriu, norint išspręsti neišsamią problem ą, mes taikome dalinį anotacijos mokymąsi siekiant sumažinti nežinomų ženklų poveikį. Kalbant apie triukšmingą anotaciją, mes projektuojame pavyzdžių rinkiklį, pagrįstą stiprinimo mokymu, siekiant atskirti teigiamus sakinius nuo automatinių anotacijų. In experiments, we create two datasets for Chinese named entity recognition in two domains with the help of distant supervision.  The experimental results show that the proposed approach obtains better performance than the comparison systems on both two datasets.', 'kk': 'Жаңа домендерде қытайша нысанды анықтау (NER) деп аталатын қытайша мәселесі - белгіленген деректер жоқ. Бір шешім - адамзаттық емес қашықтағы қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау әдісін автоматты түрде қолдану үшін қолданылатын қашықтағы бақылау әдісін қолдану. Мұнда қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау үшін, егер мәтіндегі жол алдында анықталған нысандардың сөздігіне ендірілсе, жол нысаны болуы мүмкін. Бірақ бұл автоматты түрде құрылған деректер екі негізгі мәселелерден тұрады: толық және дыбыс белгілер, бұл NER үлгілерінің істеуіне әсер етеді. Бұл қағазда, біз NER үшін жоғары қашықтағы қашықтағы мәселелерді бөлек шешуге болады. Біздің тәсілімізде, толық мәселеді шешу үшін біз беймәлім таңбалардың эффектін азайту үшін бөлек жазбаларды үйренеміз. Дыбыс белгілер үшін, автоматты түрде құрылған белгілерден оқыту үшін оқытуға негізделген инстанция таңдағышын құрамыз. Тәжірибелерде, Қытайша аталған нысандарды екі доменде анықтау үшін екі деректер жиынын құрамыз. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер қолданылатын тәжірибе екі деректер қорларының салыстыру жүйелерінен жақсы жұмыс істейтінін көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Проблемот со пречката со признавањето на кинески ентитети (NER) во новите домени е недостатокот на анотирани податоци. Едно решение е да се користи методот на далечен надзор, кој е широко употребен во врска со извлекувањето, за автоматски да се популацираат анотирани податоци за обука без човечки трошоци. Оддалечената претпоставка за надзор овде е дека ако низа во текст е вклучена во преддефиниран речник на ентитети, низата може да биде ентитет. Сепак, ваков вид автоматски генерирани податоци страдаат од два главни проблеми: нецелосни и бучни анотации, кои влијаат на резултатите на НЕР моделите. Во овој весник предложуваме нов пристап кој делумно може да ги реши повисоките проблеми на далечен надзор за НЕР. Во нашиот пристап, за да се справиме со нецелосниот проблем, применуваме делумно научување на анотација за да го намалиме ефектот на непознатите етикети на знаци. Што се однесува до гласната анотација, ние дизајнираме избирач на пример базиран на зајакнување учење за да се разликуваат позитивни реченици од автоматски генерирани анотации. In experiments, we create two datasets for Chinese named entity recognition in two domains with the help of distant supervision.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложениот пристап добива подобра резултатност од системите за споредба на двете податоци.', 'ms': 'Masalah pengenalan botol dengan pengenalan entiti bernama Cina (NER) dalam domain baru adalah kekurangan data yang dicatat. Satu penyelesaian adalah untuk menggunakan kaedah pengawasan jauh, yang telah digunakan secara luas dalam ekstraksi hubungan, untuk secara automatik populasikan data latihan anotasi tanpa biaya manusia. Anggapan pengawasan jauh di sini ialah jika rentetan dalam teks termasuk dalam kamus entiti terdefinisi, rentetan mungkin entiti. Namun, data jenis ini yang dijana secara automatik menderita dari dua masalah utama: anotasi tidak lengkap dan bunyi, yang mempengaruhi prestasi model NER. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan baru yang boleh menyelesaikan sebahagian masalah di atas pengawasan jauh untuk NER. Dalam pendekatan kita, untuk mengendalikan masalah yang tidak lengkap, kita melaksanakan pembelajaran annotasi sebahagian untuk mengurangkan kesan label aksara yang tidak diketahui. Adapun anotasi bunyi, kami merancang pemilih contoh berdasarkan pembelajaran kuasa untuk membedakan kalimat positif dari anotasi yang dijana secara automatik. Dalam percubaan, kami mencipta dua set data untuk pengenalan entiti bernama Cina dalam dua domain dengan bantuan pengawasan jauh. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang direncanakan mendapatkan prestasi yang lebih baik daripada sistem perbandingan pada kedua-dua set data.', 'mt': 'Problema ta’ ostaklu fir-rikonoxximent ta’ entitajiet imsejħa Ċiniżi (NER) f’oqsma ġodda hija n-nuqqas ta’ dejta annotata. Soluzzjoni waħda hija li jiġi utilizzat il-metodu ta’ superviżjoni mill-bogħod, li ntuża b’mod wiesa’ fir-rigward tal-estrazzjoni, biex awtomatikament tiġi popolata dejta ta’ taħriġ annotata mingħajr spejjeż umani. Is-suppożizzjoni ta’ superviżjoni distanti hawnhekk hija li jekk string fit-test ikun inkluż f’dikjararju predefinit ta’ entitajiet, string jista’ jkun entità. Madankollu, din it-tip ta’ dejta ġġenerata awtomatikament tbati minn żewġ problemi ewlenin: annotazzjonijiet mhux kompluti u storbjużi, li jaffettwaw il-prestazzjoni tal-mudelli NER. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ ġdid li jista’ jsolvi parzjalment il-problemi ta’ superviżjoni distanti ta’ hawn fuq għan-NER. In our approach, to handle the incomplete problem, we apply partial annotation learning to reduce the effect of unknown labels of characters.  As for noisy annotation, we design an instance selector based on reinforcement learning to distinguish positive sentences from auto-generated annotations.  Fl-esperimenti, aħna nħolqu żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta għar-rikonoxximent ta’ entitajiet imsejħa Ċiniżi f’żewġ oqsma bl-għajnuna ta’ superviżjoni mill-bogħod. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-approċċ propost jikseb prestazzjoni aħjar mis-sistemi ta’ paragun fuq iż-żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta.', 'ml': 'A bottleneck problem with Chinese named entity recognition (NER) in new domains is the lack of annotated data.  ഒരു തീരുമാനം മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലയില്ലാതെ പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന പരിശീല വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ദൂരെ നിരീക ദൂരത്തെ നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ അഭിപ്രായത്തില്\u200d പദാവലിയില്\u200d ഒരു സ്ട്രിങ്ങ് മുമ്പേ നിര്\u200dണിതമായി വസ്തുക്കളുടെ നിഘണ്ട എന്നാലും ഈ തരം സ്വയം സൃഷ്ടിച്ച വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു പ്രധാന പ്രശ്നങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വേദനിപ്പിക്കുന്നു; പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും ശബ്ദവും പ്രശ് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പ്രായോഗ്യം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ഭാഗമായി നെയിന്\u200dറെ മുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന്  അപരിചിതമായ പ്രശ്നത്തെ കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പാര്\u200dട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, അപരിചിതമായ ചിഹ്നങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവം ക ശബ്ദത്തെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള ശബ്ദത്തെക്കുറിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്റെ തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് സ്വയം പ്രവർത്തിച്ച വികാരങ്ങള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. രണ്ട് ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d ശേഷം സ്ഥിരസ്ഥാനം തിരിച്ചറിയ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഉത്തമമായ സിസ്റ്റത്തെക്കാളും പ്രോദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പ', 'pl': 'Problemem wąskiego gardła z rozpoznawaniem chińskich nazwanych entit (NER) w nowych domenach jest brak adnotacji danych. Jednym z rozwiązań jest wykorzystanie metody nadzoru na odległość, która jest szeroko stosowana w ekstrakcji relacji, do automatycznego wypełniania adnotacji danych treningowych bez kosztów ludzkich. Założenie odległego nadzoru polega na tym, że jeśli łańcuch w tekście jest zawarty w predefiniowanym słowniku podmiotów, łańcuch może być jednostką. Ten rodzaj automatycznie generowanych danych cierpi jednak na dwa główne problemy: niekompletne i hałaśliwe adnotacje, które wpływają na wydajność modeli NER. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowatorskie podejście, które może częściowo rozwiązać powyższe problemy nadzoru na odległość dla NER. W naszym podejściu, aby rozwiązać problem niekompletny, stosujemy częściową naukę adnotacji, aby zmniejszyć efekt nieznanych etykiet znaków. Jeśli chodzi o hałaśliwą adnotację, projektujemy selektor instancji oparty na uczeniu się wzmocnienia, aby odróżnić zdania pozytywne od automatycznie generowanych adnotacji. W eksperymentach tworzymy dwa zbiory danych do rozpoznawania chińskich nazwanych jednostek w dwóch domenach za pomocą odległego nadzoru. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowane podejście uzyskuje lepszą wydajność niż systemy porównywania na obu zbiorach danych.', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэсэгт Хятад нэрлэгдсэн entity recognition (NER) гэдэг асуудал бол сэтгэл өгөгдлийн алдагдалгүй. Нэг шийдэл бол хүн төрөлхтөн байхгүйгээр автоматжуулсан дасгал өгөгдлийг автоматжуулахын тулд шинээр ашигласан хол хол дасгал харуулах аргыг ашиглах юм. Энд хол байрлал хийх тодорхойлолт бол хэрвээ текст дээрх стринг биетүүдийн алдын тодорхойлогдсон үгийг бий болгох юм бол стринг нь биет байж болно. Гэвч энэ төрлийн автоматаар гаргасан өгөгдлийн санаа нь хоёр чухал асуудалтай болж байна: бүтэлгүйтгүй, чимээгүй сэтгэл хөдлөл, НЭР загварын үйлдвэрлэлд нөлөөлдөг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид NER-ийн хоорондын харилцааны асуудлыг хэсэг хэсэг нь шийдэх шинэ арга зам санал өгдөг. Бидний арга хэмжээнд, бүтэлгүйтгүй асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд бие биетүүдийн нөлөөлөлийг багасгах хэсэг анзаарал суралцах хэрэгтэй. Үнэндээ чимээгүй сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тухай бид автоматаар гаргасан сэтгэл хөдлөлээс эерэг өгүүлбэрийг ялгаад тогтоохын тулд нэг жишээ сонгогч загвар бүтээж байна. Эдгээр туршилтуудын тулд Хятадын нэртэй бүтээлүүдийг хоёр хэсэгт хүлээн зөвшөөрөх хоёр өгөгдлийн санг бий болгодог. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн арга нь хоёр өгөгдлийн сангийн харьцуулах системээс илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Eit problem med kinesisk gjenkjenning av entitet med namnet (NER) i nye domene er manglende data. Ein løsning er å bruka metoden for distant oversikt, som er breidd brukt i forhold til utpakking, for å automatisk populere oppmerkingsdata utan menneskeheten. Den eksterne overvåkinga her er at dersom ein streng i tekst er inkludert i eit føredefinert ordbok av einingar, kan strengen vera ein eining. Dette typen automatisk genererte data er imidlertid med to hovudproblemer: ukomplete og støy-notasjonar, som påvirkar utviklinga av NER-modeller. I denne papiren foreslår vi ein novel tilnærming som delvis kan løyse dei øvste problemene for distant oversikt for NER. I tilnærminga vårt, for å handtera det ufullstende problemet, bruker vi delvis oppmerkingsling for å redusera effekten av ukjende teikn. I tillegg til støy- notasjon designerer vi eit instanseveljar basert på styrkelæring for å forskjere positiv setningar frå automatisk laga notasjonar. I eksperimenter lager vi to datasett for kinesisk gjenkjenning av entitet med namn på to domene med hjelp til ekstern oversikt. Eksperimentale resultatet viser at den foreslåde tilnærminga får bedre utvikling enn sammenlikningssystemet på begge to datasett.', 'ro': 'O problemă de blocaj cu recunoașterea entităților denumite chinezești (NER) în domenii noi este lipsa datelor adnotate. O soluție este utilizarea metodei de supraveghere la distanță, care a fost utilizată pe scară largă în extragerea relațiilor, pentru a popula automat date de formare adnotate fără costuri umane. Presupunerea de supraveghere la distanță este că dacă un șir din text este inclus într-un dicționar predefinit de entități, șirul ar putea fi o entitate. Cu toate acestea, acest tip de date generate automat suferă de două probleme principale: adnotările incomplete și zgomotoase, care afectează performanța modelelor NER. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare nouă care poate rezolva parțial problemele de supraveghere la distanță pentru NER. În abordarea noastră, pentru a rezolva problema incompletă, aplicăm învățarea parțială de adnotare pentru a reduce efectul etichetelor necunoscute ale caracterelor. În ceea ce privește adnotările zgomotoase, proiectăm un selector de instanțe bazat pe învățarea de armare pentru a distinge propozițiile pozitive de adnotările generate automat. În experimente, creăm două seturi de date pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite chinezești în două domenii cu ajutorul supravegherii la distanță. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea propusă obține performanțe mai bune decât sistemele de comparație pe ambele două seturi de date.', 'sr': 'Problem sa kineskim imenom priznanjem entiteta (NER) u novim domenama je nedostatak annotiranih podataka. Jedno rešenje je iskoristiti metodu dalekog nadzora, koja je široko korišćena u odnosu na ekstrakciju, kako bi automatski populirala annotirane podatke o obuci bez humanosti. Daljina pretpostavka nadzora je da ako se string u tekstu uključuje u predodređeni rečnik entiteta, string može biti entitet. Međutim, ovakvi automatski proizvedeni podaci pate od dva glavnog problema: nepotpune i bukne annotacije, koje utiču na učinkovitost modela NER-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup koji djelomično može rešiti iznad problema dalekog nadzora za NER. U našem pristupu, da riješimo nepotpuni problem, primjenjujemo djelomično naučenje annotacije da smanjimo učinak nepoznatih etiketa znakova. Što se tiče bučne annotacije, dizajniramo selektora instancije na osnovu učenja pojačanja da odvojimo pozitivne rečenice od automatskih proizvodnjih annotacija. U eksperimentima, stvorili smo dve podatke za kinesku priznanje entiteta u dva domena pomoći dalekog nadzora. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup dobija bolju provedbu od usporedbenih sustava na oba podataka.', 'sv': 'Ett flaskhalsproblem med kinesisk namngiven entitetsigenkänning (NER) i nya domäner är bristen på kommenterade data. En lösning är att använda metoden för fjärrövervakning, som har använts i stor utsträckning i samband med utvinning, för att automatiskt fylla kommenterade träningsdata utan humankostnad. Antagandet om fjärrövervakning här är att om en sträng i text ingår i en fördefinierad ordlista med entiteter, kan strängen vara en entitet. Denna typ av automatiskt genererade data lider dock av två huvudproblem: ofullständiga och bullriga anteckningar, som påverkar prestandan hos NER-modeller. I denna uppsats föreslår vi ett nytt tillvägagångssätt som delvis kan lösa ovanstående problem med fjärrövervakning för NER. I vårt tillvägagångssätt, för att hantera det ofullständiga problemet, tillämpar vi partiell anteckningsinlärning för att minska effekten av okända tecken etiketter. När det gäller bullriga anteckningar utformar vi en instansväljare baserad på förstärkningsinlärning för att skilja positiva meningar från automatiskt genererade anteckningar. I experiment skapar vi två datauppsättningar för kinesisk namngiven entitetsigenkänning i två domäner med hjälp av fjärrövervakning. De experimentella resultaten visar att den föreslagna metoden ger bättre prestanda än jämförelsesystemen på båda datauppsättningarna.', 'si': 'අළුත් ඩෝමේන්ස් වලදි චීනියානු නම් තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් (NER) තියෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ අලුත් ඩෝමේ එක ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය තමයි දුරස්ථ ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණයේ විධානය භාවිත කරන්න, ඒක සම්බන්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ  මෙතන දුරස්ථ බලන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි පාළිබලයේ ස්ට්\u200dරින්ට් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා නම් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක නමුත්, මේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මුලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න: අන මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් NER වෙනුවෙන් දුර අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයේදී, අසම්පූර්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නය ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න, අපි අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් අනතුරු ලේබල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩුවන් ශබ්ද කිරීමක් ගැන, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විද්\u200dයාපයක් නිර්මාණය පරීක්ෂණාවට, අපි දුරස්ථාන බලන්න උදව්වයෙන් දුරස්ථානයක් දෙකක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා චීනියාගේ නම් අයිති පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් දත්ත සේට් දෙකක් වල', 'so': 'Dhibaato badan oo ku saabsan aqoonsiga qoyska Shiino ee lagu magacaabay Aqoonsiga (NER) waa baahida macluumaadka la caddeeyey. Mid xal ah waa in loo isticmaalo qaabka ilaalinta fog, kaas oo si ballaadhan loogu isticmaalay soo bixinta, si loo maamulo macluumaadka waxbarashada oo aan kharashka dadka u lahayn. Halkan waxaa laga yaabaa in xad ku qoran karo luqada macluumaadka ee horay loo qoray, xadigu wuxuu noqon karaa mid dhab ah. Si kastaba ha ahaatee macluumaadkan iskaa-abuurtay waxay ka dhibaataysaa laba dhibaatooyin oo muhiim ah: dhibaatooyin dhamaan iyo qaylo oo saameyn ku yeelanaya sameynta modellada NER. In this paper, we propose a novel approach which can partially solve the above problems of distant supervision for NER.  Xaruntanada, si aan u xambaarano dhibaatada aan dhamayn, waxaynu u dalbannaa waxbarashada qeybta ah si aan u hoosaysiinno saamaynta alaabta aqoonta ah. Dhawaaqa qaylada, waxaynu qoraynaa tusaale ahaan doorasha barashada oo ku saleysan furitaanka waxbarashada suurtagalka ah si ay uga kala soocaan dhibaatooyin dhaqdhaqaaqa ah. Imtixaanka waxaa lagu sameeyaa laba koob oo macluumaad ah oo Shiino lagu magacaabaa aqoonsashada entity labada meelood oo lagu caawinayo ilaalinta fog. resultinta imtixaanka waxay muuqataa in qaababka la soo jeeday uu helo wax ka wanaagsan sameynta labada nidaam ee is-barbardhigga labada kooban.', 'ta': 'Name ஒரு தீர்வு என்னவென்றால் தொலைதூர கண்காணிப்பு முறையை பயன்படுத்துவதற்கு, அது தொடர்பு பிரித்து பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது, மனித செலவு இல்லாமல் தான தொலைதூர கண்காணிப்பு எண்ணிக்கை ஆனால், இந்த வகையான தானே உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் இரண்டு முக்கிய பிரச்சனைகளிலிருந்து பாதிக்கும்: முழுமையான மற்றும் சப்தமான விள இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது பாகமாக தூரத்தை கண்காணிக்க முடியும். எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டில், முழுமையான பிரச்சனையை கையாள, நாம் பாகமான அறிவிப்பு அறிவில்லாத சிட்டைகளின் விளைவை குறைக் சப்தம் அறிவிப்பு பற்றி நாம் ஒரு உதாரணத்தை தேர்ந்தெடுப்பாளரை வடிவமைக்கிறோம் தானாகவே உருவாக்கப்பட்ட அறிவிப்பில் இருந்து நேர் சோதனைகளில், நாம் இரண்டு தரவு அமைப்புகளை உண்டாக்குகிறோம் தூரத்தை கண்காணிப்பதற்கு உதவி சீனிய பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் அடை பரிசோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'نو ڈومین میں چین کے نام سے ایک بٹلہرک مسئلہ ہے جو نئی ڈومین میں پہچان لیا گیا ہے۔ ایک حل یہ ہے کہ دور کی نظارت کا طریقہ استعمال کرنا، جو انسانی کے بغیر اٹھانے کے معاملہ میں وسیع طور پر استعمال کیا گیا ہے۔ یہاں دور نظر کی فرض یہ ہے کہ اگر متن میں ایک استرینگ ایک پہلے مقرر کردہ واحد میں شامل ہوتی ہے، استرینگ ایک واحد ہو سکتی ہے. لیکن، اس طرح اپنے ساتھ پیدا کیے ہوئے ڈیٹا دو اصلی مشکلات سے دردناک ہے: غلطی اور غلطی اظہارات، جو NER نمڈلوں کے کامل پر اثر دیتے ہیں۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کریں گے جو NER کے لئے دور نظر کے مسئلہ کو پاک سمجھ سکتا ہے۔ ہمارے تقریبا میں، غیرپوری مسئلہ کا تحمل کرنے کے لئے، ہم حصۂ اظہار سکھانے کے لئے اظہار کرتے ہیں کہ شخصیٹوں کے ناشناختہ لابلوں کے اثر کم کر دیں۔ آواز کی آواز کے معاملہ میں، ہم نے ایک مثال انتخاب کرنے والا ڈیزائن کر لیا ہے جو استعمال کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ مثبت جماعتوں کو اپنے ساتھ پیدا کیے ہوئے آواز سے جدا کرنا ہے. آزمائش میں، ہم چین کے لئے دو ڈیٹ سٹ بناتے ہیں جن کا نام ایک ٹیٹ کی پہچان دو ڈیمین میں دور نظر کے مدد کے ساتھ۔ آزمائش نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی تقریبا دو ڈیٹ سٹ کے مقایسہ سیستموں سے بہتر عمل حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bir muammolar shunday qilib, bir muammolarni inson qiymatlari bilan bog'liq qo'shish uchun juda katta boshqarish usulidan foydalanish. Masofadagi taʼminlovchi tasavvur bu yerda, agar matnning matnning satri oldingi koʻrsatilgan mavzu lugʻida kiritilgan boʻlsa, satr toʻgʻri boʻlishi mumkin. However, this kind of auto-generated data suffers from two main problems: incomplete and noisy annotations, which affect the performance of NER models.  Bu qogʻozda, biz NER uchun eng yuqori muammolarni qismdan o'zgartirish mumkin. Bizning usulida, muvaffaqiyatli muammolani boshqarish uchun biz qismni tajriba qilamiz va nomaʼlum belgilarning effektini kamaytirish uchun o'rganimiz. Tovush taqdimoti haqida, biz avtomatik yaratilgan annotatlardan yaxshi so'zlarni o'rganish asosida yordam beramiz. Tajribalarda, biz ikki xitoycha taʼminlovchi toʻgʻri tomondan tasdiqlash uchun ikkita maʼlumot setini yaratib turamiz. Masofadan taʼminlovchi yordam bilan Tekshirish natijalari ikkita maʼlumotlar tizimdagi ikkita tizimdagi o'xshash bajarishini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Một vấn đề với việc nhận dạng thực thể tên người Trung Quốc (NER) trong lãnh vực mới là sự thiếu dữ liệu ghi chú. Một giải pháp là sử dụng phương pháp giám sát xa xôi, đã được sử dụng rộng rãi trong các vụ khai thác liên quan, để tự động phát tán dữ liệu huấn luyện ghi chú mà không có chi phí. Ở đây giả định giám sát xa xôi là nếu một chuỗi trong văn bản nằm trong một từ điển xác định trước của các thực thể, chuỗi có thể là một thực thể. Tuy nhiên, loại dữ liệu tự tạo ra này có hai vấn đề chính: ghi chú đầy đủ và ồn ào, tác động đến hiệu suất của các mô hình nằm trong góc. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mới có thể giải quyết được những vấn đề trên trên về việc giám sát lâu dài cho cái máy. Trong phương pháp của chúng tôi, để xử lý vấn đề chưa hoàn thiện, chúng tôi áp dụng một đoạn học ghi chú để giảm hiệu quả của các ký tự chưa xác định. Về phần chú thích ồn ào, chúng tôi thiết kế một trình chọn trường hợp dựa trên việc củng cố học phân biệt câu nói tích cực với chú thích tự tạo ra. Trong các thí nghiệm, chúng tôi tạo ra hai bộ dữ liệu cho công ty tên Trung Quốc nhận dạng bằng hai miền với sự trợ giúp của sự giám sát xa xôi. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp được đề nghị đạt hiệu quả tốt hơn hệ thống so sánh trên cả hai bộ dữ liệu.', 'bg': 'Проблемът с разпознаването на китайски наименовани субекти (НЕР) в новите домейни е липсата на анотирани данни. Едно решение е да се използва методът на отдалечен надзор, който е широко използван във връзка с извличането, за автоматично попълване на анотирани данни за обучение без човешки разходи. Предположението за отдалечен надзор тук е, че ако даден низ в текста е включен в предварително определен речник на единици, низът може да бъде единица. Този вид автоматично генерирани данни обаче страда от два основни проблема: непълни и шумни анотации, които оказват влияние върху производителността на моделите. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов подход, който може частично да реши горепосочените проблеми на дистанционния надзор за НЕР. В нашия подход, за да се справим с непълния проблем, прилагаме частично анотация обучение, за да намалим ефекта от неизвестни етикети на знаците. Що се отнася до шумната анотация, ние проектираме селектор на инстанции въз основа на обучение за подсилване, за да разграничаваме положителните изречения от автоматично генерираните анотации. В експериментите създаваме два набора от данни за разпознаване на китайски имена на обекти в две области с помощта на дистанционен надзор. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният подход постига по-добри резултати от системите за сравняване и на двата набора данни.', 'nl': 'Een knelpunt bij Chinese named entity recognition (NER) in nieuwe domeinen is het ontbreken van geannoteerde gegevens. Een oplossing is om gebruik te maken van de methode van toezicht op afstand, die veel is gebruikt bij relatieonderzoek, om geannoteerde trainingsgegevens automatisch in te vullen zonder menselijke kosten. De verre supervisie veronderstelling hier is dat als een tekenreeks in tekst is opgenomen in een vooraf gedefinieerd woordenboek van entiteiten, de tekenreeks een entiteit kan zijn. Dit soort automatisch gegenereerde gegevens heeft echter twee hoofdproblemen: onvolledige en luidruchtige annotaties, die de prestaties van NER-modellen beïnvloeden. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe aanpak voor die de bovenstaande problemen van toezicht op afstand voor NER gedeeltelijk kan oplossen. In onze aanpak, om het onvolledige probleem aan te pakken, passen we gedeeltelijke annotatie leren toe om het effect van onbekende labels van tekens te verminderen. Wat lawaaierige annotatie betreft, ontwerpen we een instanceselector gebaseerd op versterking learning om positieve zinnen te onderscheiden van automatisch gegenereerde annotaties. In experimenten creëren we twee datasets voor Chinese naamloze entiteiten herkenning in twee domeinen met behulp van toezicht op afstand. Uit de experimentele resultaten blijkt dat de voorgestelde aanpak betere prestaties levert dan de vergelijkingssystemen op beide datasets.', 'hr': 'Problem sa kineskim imenom priznanjem entiteta (NER) u novim domenama je nedostatak annotiranih podataka. Jedno rješenje je korištenje metode dalekog nadzora, koja je široko korišćena u odnosu na ekstrakciju, kako bi automatski populirala annotirane podatke o obuci bez humanosti. Daljina pretpostavka nadzora ovdje je da ako se string u tekstu uključuje u predodređeni rečnik entiteta, string može biti entitet. Međutim, ovakvi automatski proizvedeni podaci pate od dva glavnog problema: nepotpune i bukne annotacije, koje utječu na učinkovitost modela NER-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup koji djelomično može riješiti iznad problema dalekog nadzora za NER. U našem pristupu, kako bismo riješili nepotpuni problem, primjenjivali smo djelomično naučenje annotacije kako bismo smanjili učinak nepoznatih etiketa znakova. Što se tiče bučne annotacije, dizajniramo selektora primjere na osnovu učenja pojačanja kako bi odvojili pozitivne rečenice od automatskih proizvodnjih annotacija. U eksperimentima stvorimo dvije podatke za kinesku priznanje entiteta u dva domena pomoći dalekog nadzora. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup dobija bolju učinku od usporedbenih sustava na obje podatke.', 'da': 'Et flaskehalsproblem med kinesisk navngivet entitetsgenkendelse (NER) i nye domæner er manglen på annoterede data. En løsning er at anvende metoden med fjerntilsyn, som er blevet anvendt i vid udstrækning i relation udtrækning, til automatisk at udfylde annoterede træningsdata uden humanomkostninger. Den fjernovervågning antagelse her er, at hvis en streng i tekst er inkluderet i en foruddefineret ordbog med entiteter, kan strengen være en entitet. Men denne form for auto-genererede data lider af to hovedproblemer: ufuldstændige og støjende noteringer, som påvirker ydeevnen af NER modeller. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny tilgang, der delvist kan løse ovennævnte problemer med fjerntilsyn for NER. I vores tilgang, for at håndtere det ufuldstændige problem, anvender vi delvis annotation læring for at reducere effekten af ukendte etiketter af tegn. Med hensyn til støjende noteringer designer vi en instansvælger baseret på forstærkningslæring for at skelne mellem positive sætninger og autogenererede noteringer. I eksperimenter skaber vi to datasæt til kinesisk navngivet enhedsgenkendelse i to domæner ved hjælp af fjerntilsyn. De forsøgsresultater viser, at den foreslåede fremgangsmåde opnår bedre ydeevne end sammenligningssystemerne på begge to datasæt.', 'de': 'Ein Engpass-Problem bei der Erkennung von chinesischen benannten Entitäten (NER) in neuen Domänen ist der Mangel an annotierten Daten. Eine Lösung besteht darin, die Methode der Fernüberwachung zu nutzen, die bei der Beziehungsextraktion weit verbreitet ist, um annotierte Trainingsdaten ohne menschliche Kosten automatisch auszufüllen. Die entfernte Supervision-Annahme hier ist, dass, wenn ein String im Text in einem vordefinierten Wörterbuch von Entitäten enthalten ist, der String eine Entität sein könnte. Diese Art von automatisch generierten Daten leidet jedoch an zwei Hauptproblemen: unvollständige und laute Anmerkungen, die die Leistung von NER-Modellen beeinträchtigen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen neuartigen Ansatz vor, der die oben genannten Probleme der Fernüberwachung für NER teilweise lösen kann. In unserem Ansatz, um das unvollständige Problem zu lösen, wenden wir partielle Annotationslernen an, um den Effekt unbekannter Beschriftungen von Zeichen zu reduzieren. Für laute Anmerkungen entwerfen wir einen Instanzselektor basierend auf Verstärkungslernen, um positive Sätze von automatisch generierten Anmerkungen zu unterscheiden. In Experimenten erstellen wir mit Hilfe von Fernüberwachung zwei Datensätze zur Erkennung chinesischer benannter Entitäten in zwei Domänen. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene Ansatz eine bessere Leistung erzielt als die Vergleichssysteme auf beiden Datensätzen.', 'ko': '중국어 명명 실체 식별(NER)의 새로운 영역에서 병목 문제는 주석 데이터가 부족하다는 것이다.일종의 해결 방안은 원격 모니터링 방법을 이용하는 것이다. 이 방법은 이미 관계 추출에 광범위하게 응용되어 주석이 달린 훈련 데이터를 자동으로 채우고 인력 비용이 필요하지 않다.이 원격 모니터링 가설은 텍스트의 문자열이 미리 정의된 실체 사전에 포함되면 이 문자열은 실체일 수 있습니다.그러나 이러한 자동 생성 데이터에는 두 가지 주요 문제가 존재한다. 주석이 불완전하고 소음이 있는데 이것은 NER 모델의 성능에 영향을 줄 것이다.본고에서 우리는 상술한 문제를 부분적으로 해결할 수 있는 원격 감독 네트워크를 새로운 방법을 제시했다.우리의 방법에서 불완전한 문제를 처리하기 위해 우리는 일부 주석 학습을 응용하여 알 수 없는 문자 라벨의 영향을 줄인다.소음이 있는 표시에 대해 우리는 학습 강화를 바탕으로 하는 실례 선택기를 설계하여 적극적인 문장과 자동으로 생성된 표시를 구분했다.실험에서 우리는 원격 모니터링의 도움을 받아 두 분야에서 두 개의 중국어 명칭 실체 식별 데이터 집합을 만들었다.실험 결과 두 데이터 집합에서 이 방법은 모두 비교 시스템보다 더 좋은 성능을 가진 것으로 나타났다.', 'id': 'Sebuah masalah bottleneck dengan pengenalan entitas bernama Cina (NER) dalam domain baru adalah kekurangan data anotasi. One solution is to utilize the method of distant supervision, which has been widely used in relation extraction, to automatically populate annotated training data without humancost.  Suposisi pengawasan jauh di sini adalah bahwa jika string dalam teks termasuk dalam kamus entitas yang terdefinisikan sebelumnya, string mungkin sebuah entitas. Namun, data semacam ini secara otomatis menderita dari dua masalah utama: anotasi yang tidak lengkap dan berisik, yang mempengaruhi prestasi model NER. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan baru yang dapat menyelesaikan sebagian masalah di atas pengawasan jauh untuk NER. Dalam pendekatan kita, untuk menangani masalah yang tidak lengkap, kita menerapkan annotasi parsial belajar untuk mengurangi efek label karakter yang tidak diketahui. Adapun anotasi bising, kami merancang pemilih contoh berdasarkan pengakuan belajar untuk membedakan kalimat positif dari anotasi yang dibuat secara otomatis. Dalam percobaan, kami menciptakan dua set data untuk pengenalan entitas bernama Cina dalam dua domain dengan bantuan pengawasan jauh. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang diusulkan mendapatkan prestasi yang lebih baik dari sistem perbandingan pada kedua set data.', 'fa': 'یک مشکل بطری با چینی که به نام شناسایی entity (NER) در دامنهای جدید نامیده می\u200cشود، ناتوانی داده\u200cهای مشخص شده است. یک راه حل این است که از روش بررسی دور استفاده شود که در ارتباط استخراج به وسیله استفاده شده است، تا داده های آموزش\u200cهای آگاهی را بدون انسانی به طور خودکار جمع کند. فرض نظارت دور اینجا این است که اگر یک string در متن در یک لغوی پیش\u200cفرض تعریف شده\u200cاند، string ممکن است یک entity باشد. ولی این نوع داده های تولید شده خودکار از دو مشکل اصلی رنج می دهد: اخطار غیر کامل و صدا، که تأثیر عملکرد مدل NER است. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش نویسی که می\u200cتواند قسمتی مشکلات بالاتر supervision دور برای NER را حل کند. در دسترسی ما، برای حل مشکل غیر کامل، ما برای کاهش تاثیر نقاشی ناشناخته از شخصیت\u200cها را دریافت می\u200cکنیم. در مورد اخطار صدا، ما یک انتخاب مثال را طراحی می کنیم که بر اساس یادگیری افزایش برای جدا کردن جمله مثبت از اخطار تولید شده خودکار است. در آزمایشات، ما دو مجموعه داده برای شناسایی شرکت چینی در دو منطقه با کمک نظارت دور ایجاد می کنیم. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که این دستور پیشنهاد بهتر از سیستم مقایسه در هر دو مجموعه داده را دریافت می کند.', 'tr': 'Täze sahypalarda Çin çe adly zat tanamagy (NER) bilen boşluşyk mesele täze sahypalar ýok. Birinji çözüm, uzak supervisiýanyň yöntemini ulanmak, adamsyzlyk ýüzünde seretmäge ulanylýan, adamsyz üçin näsazlanýan eğitim maglumatyny otomatik bejermek üçin ullanýar. Uzakça nadiriň pikirimi şu ýerde, eger metin içinde bir string öň bellenen zadyň sözlüginde dahyl edilse, string bir hedef bolup biler. Ýöne bu şekilde otomatik üretilen veriler iki esasy meselden çykýar: incomplet we sesli hasaplar, bu şekilde NER modellerinin etkinleşigine täsirleýär. Bu kagyzda, biz NER üçin ýokarydaky üstünlikleriniň kynçylyklaryny parça çözebilir bir roman approach teklip edýäris. Bizim yaklaşımyzda, tamamlanmamış meseleyi çözmek üçin, bilinmeyen karakterler etiketlerinin etkisini azaltmak üçin parça duyglama öwrenmesini uygulayız. Sesli ýazgyrlamak üçin, awtomatik döredilen sözleriň sözlerini taýýarlamak üçin bir örnek saýlawçysyny tasarlýarys. Deneylerde, hytaý üçin iki sany bejermek üçin ady taýýarlanmasy üçin iki sahada bir hereket bejerýäris. Deneysel netijeler teklip eden metodlaryň iki veri setirinde kelişe sistemalarynyň has gowy etkinlik gazanýandygyny görkezýär.', 'sw': 'Tatizo la chupa linaloitwa China kutambuliwa kwa entity (NER) katika maeneo mapya ni ukosefu wa taarifa zilizotajwa. suluhisho moja ni kutumia mbinu za ufuatiliaji wa mbali, ambazo zimetumika sana katika utoaji wa mahusiano, kwa kutumia data maarufu za mafunzo bila gharama za binadamu. Kuna dhana ya ufuatiliaji wa mbali hapa ni kwamba kama mstari wa maandishi unajumuishwa katika lugha iliyotanguliwa, mstari unaweza kuwa entity. Hata hivyo, aina hii ya takwimu zilizotengenezwa kwa kujitegemea inapata matatizo mawili makubwa: matatizo yasiyo kamili na kelele, ambayo yanaathiri utendaji wa mifano ya NER. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mbinu za riwaya ambazo zinaweza kusitua matatizo yaliyopo juu ya ufuatiliaji wa nchi hiyo. Katika hatua yetu, ili kukabiliana na tatizo lisilo kamili, tunatumia sehemu ya kujifunza kwa ajili ya kupunguza madhara ya alama za wahusika. As for noisy annotation, we design an instance selector based on reinforcement learning to distinguish positive sentences from auto-generated annotations.  Katika majaribio, tunatengeneza seti mbili za taarifa kwa ajili ya China inayoitwa kutambuliwa kwa entity katika maeneo mawili kwa msaada wa ufuatiliaji wa mbali. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa zinapata ufanisi bora kuliko mifumo inayolinganisha kwenye seti mbili za data.', 'af': "Name Een oplossing is om die metode van afgeleë onderskyning te gebruik, wat vaste gebruik is in verwanting van uittrekking, om outomaties opmerkte onderskyning data sonder menslike onderskyning te populeer. Die afgeleë supervisie aanvaardig hier is dat as 'n string in teks ingesluit is in' n voorafgedefinieerde woordeboek van entiteite, die string dalk mag 'n entiteit wees. Maar hierdie soort outomaties genereerde data lyf van twee hoofde probleme: onvolledige en geluidige annotasies, wat effekteer die prestasie van NER-modelles. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n roman toegang wat deel die bo probleme van afgeleë supervisie vir NER kan oplos. In ons toegang, om die onvolledige probleem te hanteer, ons aanwend gedeeltelike annotasie leer om die effek van onbekende etikette van karakters te verminder. As vir geluidige annotasie, ontwerp ons 'n voorbeeld kieser gebaseer op versterking leer om positiewe teikene van outomatiese genereerde annotasie te skiedenis. In eksperimente skep ons twee datastelle vir Sjinese genoem entiteit herken in twee domeine met die hulp van afgeleë supervisie. Die eksperimentale resultate wys dat die voorgestelde toegang beter effektuur kry as die vergelykingsstelsels op beide datastelle.", 'am': 'በአዲስ አካል ውስጥ የቻይና አካባቢ ማውቀት (NER) በተባለው አዲስ አካባቢ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ አንድ ማህጆ የሰው ክፍል ሳይኖር የተጠቃሚ የራቀ ጉዳይ ላይ የተጠቀመውን የራቀ ጉዳይ ማድረግ ለመጠቀም ነው፡፡ የሩቅ ማያየት ግንኙነት በጽሑፍ ውስጥ ጉዳይ በተወሰነ የሥልጣን መዝገብ ውስጥ ቢገቡ፣ ሥርዓቱ አካባቢ ሊሆን ይችላል፡፡ However, this kind of auto-generated data suffers from two main problems: incomplete and noisy annotations, which affect the performance of NER models.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የሩቅ ጉዳይ የራቀ ጉዳይ ላይ የሚችሉትን የረቂቅ ጉዳይ ለመፍታት የሚችሉትን የመረጃ አቃውሞ እናስባለን፡፡ የሙሉ መከራን ለመቀበል በአካባቢው መምህርት እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ የድምፅ ማስታወቂያ፣ የምሳሌ ምርጫ ከauto-generated ማስታወቂያውን ለመለየት በማድረግ ላይ እናቆጣለን፡፡ በተፈተና ውስጥ የቻይና አካል ማውቀትን በተባለው በሁለት ዳውታዎች ውስጥ የቻይና ሁለት ዳውታዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሞከሩ ውጤቶች በሁለቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ ከመተካከል የሚሻለውን ሥርዓት እንዲያገኙ ያሳያል፡፡', 'sq': 'Një problem me njohjen kineze të njësisë (NER) në fusha të reja është mungesa e të dhënave të anotuara. Një zgjidhje është përdorimi i metodës së mbikqyrjes së largët, e cila është përdorur gjerësisht në lidhje me nxjerrjen, për të populluar automatikisht të dhënat e trajnimit të anotuar pa kosto njerëzore. Supozimi i mbikqyrjes së largët këtu është se në qoftë se një string në tekst është përfshirë në një fjalor të paracaktuar të njësive, string mund të jetë një njësi. However, this kind of auto-generated data suffers from two main problems: incomplete and noisy annotations, which affect the performance of NER models.  In this paper, we propose a novel approach which can partially solve the above problems of distant supervision for NER.  Në qasjen tonë, për të trajtuar problemin e pakompletuar, ne aplikojmë mësimin e anotacionit të pjesshëm për të reduktuar efektin e etiketave të panjohura të karakterëve. Sa për anotacionin zhurmues, ne dizajnojmë një shembull zgjedhës bazuar në mësimin e forcimit për të dalluar fjalët pozitive nga anotacionet e gjeneruara automatikisht. Në eksperimente, krijojmë dy grupe të dhënash për njohjen kineze të njësisë në dy fusha me ndihmën e mbikqyrjes së largët. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda e propozuar fiton performancë më të mirë se sistemet e krahasimit në të dy grupet e të dhënave.', 'az': 'Yeni domenlərdə Çin adlı entity tanıması (NER) olan şiddətli problemi məlumatların yoxdur. Bir çətinlik is ə uzaq gözətçilik metodlarını istifadə etmək, insanlıq olmadan təhsil edilmiş təhsil məlumatlarını otomatik olaraq istifadə etməkdir. Buradaki uzaq gözləmə zənnəsi, əgər metin içində yazılmış mətn sözlüyünün əvvəlcə belə yazılmış sözlüyünə daxil olsa, mətn mətn olar. Ancaq bu tür avtomatik təşkil edilmiş verilər iki ana problemdən baş çəkir: tamamlanmış və gürültülü danışmalar, ki NER modellərin performansını etkilər. Bu kağızda, NER üçün uzaq gözləmə problemlərini parça çəkə biləcək yeni bir approach təklif edirik. Bizim yaxınlığımızda, tamamlanmış problemi başa düşmək üçün, əlamətlərin təsirlərinin etkisini azaltmaq üçün parçacıq işaret öyrənməsini istifadə edirik. Süslü məlumatlar barəsində, otomatik təşkil edilmiş məlumatlardan pozitif sözləri təşkil etmək üçün istifadə etmə öyrənməsinə dayanan bir məsəl seçici tasarlayırıq. Həyatlarda, Çinlə adlı entitə tanıması üçün iki dəstədə uzaq supervizyonun yardımıyla iki dəstədə verilən verilən quruluş yaratdıq. Müxtəlif sonuçlar göstərir ki, təbliğ edilmiş metodların iki veri qutusu ilə qarşılaşdırma sistemindən daha yaxşı performans alır.', 'ca': "Un problema amb el reconeixement d'entitats xineses (NER) en nous dominis és la falta de dades anotates. Una solució és utilitzar el mètode de supervisió remota, que s'ha utilitzat ampliament en relació amb l'extracció, per a poblar automàticament dades d'entrenament anotats sense costos humans. La suposició de supervisió remota aquí és que si una cadena en text està inclosa en un diccionari predefinit d'entitats, la cadena podria ser una entitat. Però aquest tipus de dades generades automàticament pateix dos problemes principals: anotacions incompletes i sorolloses, que afecten el rendiment dels models NER. En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament nou que pot resoldre parcialment els problemes de supervisió remota de NER. En el nostre enfocament, per gestionar el problema incomplet, aplicam l'aprenentatge d'anotació parcial per reduir l'efecte d'etiquetes desconeguts de caràcters. Quant a l'anotació ruidosa, dissenyem un selector d'exemple basat en l'aprenentatge de reforç per distingir frases positives de les anotacions generades automàticament. In experiments, we create two datasets for Chinese named entity recognition in two domains with the help of distant supervision.  Els resultats experimentals mostren que l'enfocament proposat obté millor rendiment que els sistemes de comparació dels dos conjunts de dades.", 'hy': "Նոր ոլորտներում Չինաստանի անվանումների ճանաչման խնդիրը annoted տվյալների բացակայությունն է: One solution is to utilize the method of distant supervision, which has been widely used in relation extraction, to automatically populate annotated training data without humancost.  Այստեղ հեռավոր վերահսկողության ենթադրությունն այն է, որ եթե տեքստում գտնվող լարերը ներառվում են առանձնահատուկ բառարանում, լարերը կարող են լինել առանձնահատուկ: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս տեսակի ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծված տվյալները տառապում են երկու հիմնական խնդիրներից' անկատարյալ և աղմկոտ նոտացիաներից, որոնք ազդում են ՆԵՌ մոդելների արտադրողության վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մոտեցում, որը կարող է մասամբ լուծել ՆԵՌ-ի հեռավոր վերահսկման վերևի խնդիրները: Մեր մոտեցումը, որպեսզի լուծենք անկատարյալ խնդիրը, մենք կիրառում ենք նշումների ուսումնասիրությունը, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք անհայտ նշանների ազդեցությունը: Ինչ վերաբերում է աղմկոտ նոտացիաներին, մենք ստեղծում ենք օրինակ ընտրողը, որը հիմնված է ուժեղացված սովորելու վրա, որպեսզի բացատրենք դրական նախադասությունները ինքնաբերաբար ստեղծված նոտացիաներից: In experiments, we create two datasets for Chinese named entity recognition in two domains with the help of distant supervision.  Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոտեցումը ավելի լավ արդյունք է ստանում, քան երկու տվյալների համակարգերը համեմատական համակարգերը:", 'bs': 'Problem sa kineskim imenom priznanjem entiteta (NER) u novim domenama je nedostatak annotiranih podataka. Jedno rješenje je iskoristiti metodu dalekog nadzora, koja je široko korišćena u odnosu na ekstrakciju, kako bi automatski populirala annotirane podatke o obuci bez humanosti. Daljina pretpostavka nadzora ovdje je da ako se string u tekstu uključuje u predodređeni rečnik entiteta, string može biti entitet. Međutim, ovakvi automatski proizvedeni podaci pate od dva glavnog problema: nepotpune i bukne annotacije, koje utiču na učinkovitost modela NER-a. U ovom papiru predlažemo novi pristup koji djelomično može riješiti iznad problema dalekog nadzora za NER. U našem pristupu, da riješimo nepotpuni problem, primjenjujemo djelomično naučenje annotacije da smanjimo učinak nepoznatih etiketa znakova. Što se tiče bučne annotacije, dizajniramo selektora instancije baziranog na pojačavanju učenja da razlikuje pozitivne rečenice od automatskih izrađenih annotacija. U eksperimentima, stvorili smo dvije podatke za kinesku priznanje entiteta u dva domena pomoći dalekog nadzora. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi pristup dobija bolju učinku od usporedbenih sustava na oba dva dataseta.', 'cs': 'Úzkým problémem s rozpoznáváním čínských jmenovaných entit (NER) v nových doménách je nedostatek anotovaných dat. Jedním z řešení je využití metody vzdáleného dohledu, která byla široce používána při extrakci vztahů, k automatickému vyplňování anotovaných tréninkových dat bez lidských nákladů. Předpokladem vzdáleného dohledu je, že pokud je řetězec v textu zahrnut do předdefinovaného slovníku entit, řetězec může být entitou. Tento druh automaticky generovaných dat však trpí dvěma hlavními problémy: neúplnými a hlučnými anotacemi, které ovlivňují výkon NER modelů. V tomto článku navrhujeme nový přístup, který může částečně řešit výše uvedené problémy vzdáleného dohledu pro NER. V našem přístupu k řešení neúplného problému používáme částečné anotace učení, abychom snížili efekt neznámých popisků znaků. Pokud jde o hlučnou anotaci, navrhujeme selektor instancí založený na posilovacím učení, abychom rozlišili pozitivní věty od automaticky generovaných anotací. V experimentech vytváříme dva datové sady pro rozpoznávání čínských pojmenovaných entit ve dvou doménách pomocí vzdáleného dohledu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navržený přístup dosahuje lepšího výkonu než srovnávací systémy na obou datových sadách.', 'et': 'Hiina nimega üksuste tuvastamise (NER) kitsaskohaks uutes domeenides on märgitud andmete puudumine. Üks lahendus on kasutada kaugjärelevalve meetodit, mida on laialdaselt kasutatud seoses ekstraheerimisega, et automaatselt täita märgitud koolitusandmed ilma inimkuludeta. Kaugjärelevalve eeldus siin on, et kui tekstis sisalduv string on eelnevalt määratletud olemite sõnastikus, võib string olla olem. Sellisel automaatselt genereeritud andmetel on aga kaks peamist probleemi: mittetäielikud ja mürakad märkused, mis mõjutavad NER mudelite jõudlust. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja uudse lähenemisviisi, mis võib osaliselt lahendada eespool nimetatud probleeme kaugjärelevalve NER. Meie lähenemisviisis rakendame mittetäieliku probleemi lahendamiseks osalist annotatsiooniõpet, et vähendada märkide tundmatute siltide mõju. Müraka annotatsiooni puhul projekteerime tugevdamisõppel põhineva eksemplaride valija, et eristada positiivseid lauseid automaatselt genereeritud annotatsioonidest. Eksperimentides loome kaugjärelevalve abil kahes valdkonnas kaks andmekogumit hiina nimega üksuste tuvastamiseks. Katsetulemused näitavad, et kavandatud lähenemisviis saavutab mõlema andmekogumi võrdlussüsteemidest parema tulemuse.', 'bn': 'A bottleneck problem with Chinese named entity recognition (NER) in new domains is the lack of annotated data.  একটি সমাধান হচ্ছে দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণের পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করার জন্য, যা সম্পর্কে ব্যাপক ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে, যাতে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে জনপ্রিয় প্রশিক এখানে দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণ ধারণা হচ্ছে যে যদি টেক্সটের একটি স্ট্রিঙ্কের পূর্বে নির্ধারিত বিষয়বস্তুর অভিধানে লিখে থাকে, স্ট তবে এই ধরনের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তৈরি করা তথ্য দুই প্রধান সমস্যা থেকে কষ্ট পেয়েছে: সম্পূর্ণ এবং শব্দ বিক্ষোভ, যা নিউ আর মডেলের প্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি উপন্যাস প্রস্তাব করি যেটি অংশের মধ্যে দূরবর্তী নিয়ন্ত্রণের সমস্যা সমাধান করতে পারে। আমাদের প্রযুক্তিতে অসম্পূর্ণ সমস্যার মুখোমুখি হওয়ার জন্য, আমরা অংশের বিষয়টি শিক্ষা প্রয়োগ করি অজানা লেবেলের প্রভাব কম আওয়াজের ব্যাপারে আমরা একটি উদাহরণ নির্বাচনের নকশা করি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে উৎপাদন করা বিষয়বস্তু থেকে ইতিবাচক বাক্য বিচ্ছিন্ন করার জন্য পরীক্ষায় আমরা চীনাদের জন্য দুটি তথ্য সৃষ্টি করি যার নাম দুটি ডোমেনের সাহায্যে দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণের সাহায্য পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি দুই তথ্য সিস্টেমের তুলনার চেয়ে ভালো কাজ পাবে।', 'fi': 'Kiinalaisen nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistuksen (NER) pullonkaula uusilla toimialueilla on huomautusten puuttuminen. Yksi ratkaisu on hyödyntää etävalvonnan menetelmää, jota on käytetty laajalti suhteessa uuttamiseen, jotta muistiinpanotetut koulutustiedot täytetään automaattisesti ilman ihmiskustannuksia. Kaukana valvonnan oletuksena tässä on, että jos tekstissä oleva merkkijono sisällytetään ennalta määritettyyn entiteettisanakirjaan, merkkijono saattaa olla entiteetti. Tällaisella automaattisesti tuotetulla datalla on kuitenkin kaksi pääongelmaa: epätäydelliset ja meluisat merkinnät, jotka vaikuttavat NER-mallien suorituskykyyn. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta lähestymistapaa, joka voi osittain ratkaista edellä mainitut ongelmat etävalvonnasta NER. Lähestymistapamme epätäydellisen ongelman käsittelemiseksi soveltamalla osittaista annotointioppia vähentämään tuntemattomien merkkien vaikutusta. Meluisan annotoinnin osalta suunnittelemme vahvistuksen oppimiseen perustuvan instanssivalitsimen erottamaan positiiviset lauseet automaattisesti luoduista annotoineista. Kokeissa luomme etävalvonnan avulla kaksi datajoukkoa kiinalaisten nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamista varten kahdella alueella. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu lähestymistapa saavuttaa paremman suorituskyvyn kuin vertailujärjestelmät molemmissa aineistoissa.', 'ha': "QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Wata suluya shine a yi amfani da metoden tsari masu nĩsa, wanda aka yi amfani da shi widely cikin masu cire, dõmin a umarin data masu yin shirin da aka haramta farat ɗaya. Ana yi zato da mai nĩsa a nan ni cewa idan an shigar da wata string cikin matsayi cikin wata dictionar abun da aka riga ya ƙayyade, linje ɗin zai kasance wani abu. A lokacin da, wannan aina data wanda aka haife farat ɗaya yana cũtar da su daga matabbata biyu masu ƙaranci: tsarin da aka cika da kuma sauran, wanda yana yi musamman da aikin misãlai na NER. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata matsayi na nowaya wanda zai iya yin rabo da rabo masu solar masĩfun masu rufe masu tsari na NER. Ga hanyinmu, dõmin mu yi amfani da ma'abun da ba'a koma ba, za mu yi amfani da rabon zane sanar da in yi ƙaranci matsayin ayuka da ba'a sani ba. Amma kan kunyarwa na sauri, za mu ƙayyade wani misali wanda za'a iya ƙara wa learning a rarraba magana masu yiwuwa daga taƙaitori-zaɓe farat ɗaya. Aka cikin jarrabai, munã sami kodi biyu na zaɓa wa sunan abuni na China, cikin duk biyu, da taimakon misalin mai nĩsa. Matarin da aka jarraba yana nũna cewa, hanyarwa da aka buƙata yana da mafiya alhẽri ga gyarata daga tsarinta na biyu.", 'he': 'בעיה בקבוקים עם זיהוי ישויות בשם סיני (NER) בתחומים חדשים היא חוסר נתונים מצוינים. One solution is to utilize the method of distant supervision, which has been widely used in relation extraction, to automatically populate annotated training data without humancost.  הניחוש על הפיקוח הרחוק כאן הוא שאם רשת בטקסט מוכללת במילון של יחידות מוגדר מראש, הרשת עשויה להיות יחידה. עם זאת, סוג זה של נתונים יוצרים אוטומטיים סובל משני בעיות ראשיות: הערות בלתי מלאות ורעשיות, אשר משפיעות על ביצועים של דוגמנים NER. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה חדשה שיכולה לפתור חלקית את הבעיות העליונות של פיקוח רחוק עבור NER. בגישה שלנו, כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה הלא מושלמת, אנו משתמשים בהערכה חלקית ללמוד כדי להפחית את ההשפעה של תוויות לא ידועות של דמויות. בנוגע להציעות רעשות, אנחנו מעצבים בוחר דוגמא מבוסס על לימוד תגבורה כדי להבדיל משפטים חיוביים מהציעות שנוצרות באוטומטית. בניסויים, אנו יוצרים שני קבוצות נתונים לזיהוי ישויות בשם סיני בשני תחומות עם עזרת פיקוח רחוק. התוצאות הניסוייות מראות שהגישה המוצעת מקבלת ביצועים טובים יותר משמעות השוואה בשני קבוצות נתונים.', 'sk': 'Problem ozkih grl pri prepoznavanju kitajskega imenovanega subjekta (NER) v novih domenah je pomanjkanje označenih podatkov. Ena od rešitev je uporaba metode daljnega nadzora, ki se pogosto uporablja v zvezi z ekstrakcijo, za samodejno popolnjevanje označenih podatkov o usposabljanju brez človeških stroškov. Predpostavka oddaljenega nadzora tukaj je, da če je niz v besedilu vključen v vnaprej določen slovar entitet, je niz morda entiteta. Vendar pa ta vrsta samodejno generiranih podatkov trpi zaradi dveh glavnih težav: nepopolnih in hrupnih opomb, ki vplivajo na zmogljivost modelov NER. V prispevku predlagamo nov pristop, ki lahko delno reši zgoraj navedene probleme nadzora na daljavo za NER. Pri našem pristopu, da bi rešili nepopolno težavo, uporabljamo delno učenje označevanja, da zmanjšamo učinek neznanih oznak znakov. Kar zadeva hrupne opombe, oblikujemo izbirnik primerkov, ki temelji na učenju ojačitve, da razlikuje pozitivne stavke od samodejno ustvarjenih opomb. V poskusih s pomočjo daljnega nadzora ustvarimo dva nabora podatkov za prepoznavanje kitajskih imenovanih entitet v dveh domenah. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da predlagani pristop doseže boljšo učinkovitost od primerjalnih sistemov obeh naborov podatkov.', 'jv': 'bot Sing sampeyan wis nguasai nggo ngerasai winih apakno, iki dadi kapan tanggal nggawe nguasai winih Awas KDE politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang mapun iki, kéné gunakake dadi aturan kanggo ngubah partisi dipunangé perbudhakan kanggo ngilangno NeR. Nanging diandelah kita, nggo ngerasai perbudhakan sing gak bener, kita ngubah tanggal perbudhakan kanggo ngerasai efek layanan caratar sing gak bener Tanggal kanggo taulang nggawe Nang ujaran, kéné sampeyan sampek durung dataset kanggo Kemerdekaan pangan pangan pangan anyar iki dadi nang sampek durung. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'bo': 'ས་ཁོངས་གསར་པའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་མིང་ཁང་གི་དབང་ཆ་ལ་དཀའ་བ་ཀྱི་དཀའ་བ་ཞིག་ནི་དམིགས་གསལ ཐབས་ཤེས་གཅིག་ནི་བར་ཐག་རིང་ལྟ་བུའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་དགོས་པ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བའི་ཐོག་ལས་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟེ། The distant supervision assumption here is that if a string in text is included in a predefined dictionary of entities, the string might be an entity. ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་རྩ་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བརྟེན་ནས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གསར་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བཤད་པ་དེ་ནི་NER ་ལྟ་སྟངས་གཤམ་གྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཚོར་མོས་མཐུ In our approach, to handle the incomplete problem, we apply partial annotation learning to reduce the effect of unknown labels of characters. འུ་ཚོས་བརྡ་སྟོད་པའི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ལ། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཁྱད་པར་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དབང་ཆ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཚན་གཉིས་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས། གྲུབ་ཕྱོགས་གྱི་གནད་སྡུད་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བཟོ་བཅོས་བ་མ་ལག་ལས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཚད་ལྡན་མང་ཙམ་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Joint Neural Entity Disambiguation with Output Space Search', 'ar': 'توضيح الكيان العصبي المشترك مع بحث مساحة الإخراج', 'fr': "Désambiguïsation conjointe des entités neuronales avec recherche d'espace", 'es': 'Desambiguación de entidades neuronales conjuntas con búsqueda en el espacio de salida', 'pt': 'Desambiguação de Entidade Neural Conjunta com Pesquisa de Espaço de Saída', 'zh': '用输空搜合神经实体消歧义', 'ja': '出力空間検索との共同ニューラルエンティティの曖昧さ解消', 'hi': 'आउटपुट स्पेस खोज के साथ संयुक्त तंत्रिका इकाई disambiguation', 'ru': 'Совместная раздвоение нейронной сущности с поиском выходного пространства', 'ga': 'Dí-athbhrí ar Aonán Néarach Comhpháirteach le Cuardach Spáis Aschuir', 'ka': 'ჩვენებული ნეიროლური ელემენტის გამოყენება გადასვლა სამყარო ძებნა', 'hu': 'Közös idegi entitás szétbontása a kimeneti térrel Keresés', 'el': 'Κοινή Νευρική Οντότητα Αποσαφήνιση με Διαστημική Εξόδου Αναζήτηση', 'it': "Disambiguazione congiunta dell'entità neurale con lo spazio di uscita", 'lt': 'Jungtinis neurologinis subjektas nedviprasmiškas su išėjimo erdvės paieška', 'kk': 'Шығыс орын іздеу арқылы нейрондық нысандарды бұғаттау', 'mk': 'Joint Neural Entity Disambiguation with Output Space Search', 'ms': 'Entiti Neural Berkongsi Nyahambiguasi dengan Carian Ruang Output', 'ml': 'പുറത്തുള്ള സ്പെയിസ് തെരച്ചിലൂടെ നെയുറല്\u200d എന്റിറ്റിയുടെ ഡിസ്പിഗഷന്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുക', 'pl': 'Zdejmowanie jednostek neuronowych ze wspólną przestrzenią wyjściową', 'mn': 'Шинэ сансрын агуулга хайртай мэдрэлийн нэгж', 'ro': 'Deambiguizarea entității neurale comune cu spațiul de ieșire Căutare', 'no': 'Slå saman med utdata- mellomromsøk i utgangspunktet', 'sr': 'Свједан неврални инцитет демобигација са поиском пространства изхода', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සමඟ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක අසම්බන්ධය', 'so': 'Disambition with Output Space Search', 'sv': 'Gemensam Neural Entity Disambiguation with Output Space Sök', 'ur': 'آئٹپوٹ جگہ جگہ کے ساتھ نیورال انٹیٹی ڈاممبیوٹ کے ساتھ ملے', 'ta': 'வெளியீட்டு வெளியீட்டு தேடு', 'mt': 'Id-Disambiguation Joint Neural Entity with Output Space Search', 'uz': 'Query', 'vi': 'Phân tích thần kinh hỗn hợp với tìm kiếm không gian xuất', 'bg': 'Диамбигиране на съединената неврална същност с търсене на изходно пространство', 'da': 'Fælles Neural Entity Disambiguation med Output Space Search', 'hr': 'Zajednička disambiguacija neuronskih podataka s pretraživanjem prostora za izlaz', 'nl': 'Joint Neural Entity Disambiguation with Output Space Search', 'de': 'Joint Neural Entity Disambiguation mit Output Space Suche', 'fa': 'با جستجوی فضای خروجی جستجوی عناصر عصبی', 'id': 'Entitas Neural Bergabung dengan Pencarian Ruang Keluaran', 'ko': '출력 공간 검색 기반의 결합 신경 실체 변조', 'sw': 'Kuzungumzia Ujumbe wa Neural pamoja na Search for Output', 'af': 'Aangesluit Neurale Eenheid Ontbreking met Uitset Spasie Soektog', 'sq': 'Njësia e përbashkët e njësisë nervore e çambiguar me kërkimin e hapësirës së daljes', 'tr': 'Çikgi Gaýd Edilmesi bilen Taýtget', 'am': 'Disambition with Output Space Search', 'az': 'Çıqtı Boşluq Araması ilə Nöral Entity İşləməsi', 'hy': 'Joint Neural Entity Disambiguation with Output Space Search', 'bn': 'আউটপুট স্পেস অনুসন্ধানের সাথে নিউরেল এন্টিটি বিভ্রান্ত', 'bs': 'Zajednička dezambiguacija neuronskih jedinica sa pretraživanjem svemira u izlazu', 'ca': "Desambiguació conjunta de l'entitat neuronal amb la recerca espacial de sortida", 'cs': 'Disambiguace kloubní neuronové entity s výstupním prostorem Hledání', 'et': 'Ühenduse neuraalse olemi disambiguatsioon väljundruumi otsinguga', 'fi': 'Joint Neural Entity Disambiguation with Output Space Search', 'ha': 'Disambition with Outer Space Search', 'he': 'יחידה נוירולית משותפת עם חיפוש חלל יציאה', 'sk': 'Razdvojitev skupne nevronske entitete z iskanjem izhodnega prostora', 'jv': 'Join', 'bo': 'ཕྱིར་ཐོན་གྱི་བར་སྟོང་འཚོལ་བཤེར་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a novel model for entity disambiguation that combines both local contextual information and global evidences through Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS). Given an input document, we start from a complete solution constructed by a local model and conduct a search in the space of possible corrections to improve the local solution from a global view point. Our search utilizes a heuristic function to focus more on the least confident local decisions and a pruning function to score the global solutions based on their local fitness and the global coherences among the predicted entities. Experimental results on CoNLL 2003 and TAC 2010 benchmarks verify the effectiveness of our model.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نموذجًا جديدًا لإزالة الغموض عن الكيان الذي يجمع بين المعلومات السياقية المحلية والأدلة العالمية من خلال البحث المحدود التناقض (LDS). بالنظر إلى مستند الإدخال ، نبدأ من حل كامل تم إنشاؤه بواسطة نموذج محلي وإجراء بحث في مساحة التصحيحات الممكنة لتحسين الحل المحلي من وجهة نظر عالمية. يستخدم بحثنا وظيفة الكشف عن مجريات الأمور للتركيز أكثر على القرارات المحلية الأقل ثقة ووظيفة التقليم لتسجيل الحلول العالمية بناءً على ملاءمتها المحلية والتماسك العالمي بين الكيانات المتوقعة. النتائج التجريبية على معايير CoNLL 2003 و TAC 2010 تتحقق من فعالية نموذجنا.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons un nouveau modèle de désambiguïsation des entités qui combine à la fois des informations contextuelles locales et des preuves globales par le biais de la recherche d'écarts limités (LDS). À partir d'un document d'entrée, nous partons d'une solution complète construite par un modèle local et effectuons une recherche dans l'espace des corrections possibles afin d'améliorer la solution locale d'un point de vue global. Notre recherche utilise une fonction heuristique pour se concentrer davantage sur les décisions locales les moins sûres et une fonction d'élagage pour noter les solutions globales en fonction de leur adéquation locale et des cohérences globales entre les entités prédites. Les résultats expérimentaux des points de référence ConLL 2003 et TAC 2010 confirment l'efficacité de notre modèle.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um novo modelo para desambiguação de entidades que combina informações contextuais locais e evidências globais por meio de pesquisa de discrepância limitada (LDS). Dado um documento de entrada, partimos de uma solução completa construída por um modelo local e realizamos uma busca no espaço de possíveis correções para melhorar a solução local do ponto de vista global. Nossa busca utiliza uma função heurística para focar mais nas decisões locais menos confiáveis e uma função de poda para pontuar as soluções globais com base em sua aptidão local e nas coerências globais entre as entidades previstas. Resultados experimentais nos benchmarks CoNLL 2003 e TAC 2010 comprovam a eficácia do nosso modelo.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un modelo novedoso para la desambiguación de entidades que combina información contextual local y evidencias globales a través de la Búsqueda de Discrepancia Limitada (LDS). Dado un documento de entrada, partimos de una solución completa construida por un modelo local y realizamos una búsqueda en el espacio de posibles correcciones para mejorar la solución local desde un punto de vista global. Nuestra búsqueda utiliza una función heurística para centrarse más en las decisiones locales menos seguras y una función de poda para calificar las soluciones globales en función de su aptitud local y las coherencias globales entre las entidades previstas. Los resultados experimentales sobre los puntos de referencia de ConLL 2003 y TAC 2010 verifican la eficacia de nuestro modelo.', 'ja': '本稿では、限定的相違検索（ LDS ）を通じて、ローカルな文脈情報とグローバルなエビデンスの両方を組み合わせた、エンティティの曖昧さ解消のための新規モデルを提示する。入力ドキュメントを考慮すると、ローカルモデルによって構築された完全なソリューションから開始し、グローバルな視点からローカルソリューションを改善するために可能な修正のスペースで検索を行います。当社の検索では、ヒューリスティック関数を使用して、最も信頼性の低いローカル意思決定に焦点を当て、枝刈り関数を使用して、ローカル適合性と予測されるエンティティ間のグローバルな一貫性に基づいてグローバルソリューションをスコアリングします。CoNLL 2003およびTAC 2010ベンチマークの実験結果は、モデルの有効性を検証します。', 'zh': '于本文中,发一种用实体消歧义新模,该模形因有限差索(LDS)将局部上下文信息与全局证据相合。 给定一输文档,自局模形完解决方案,或正空搜索,以从全局改进局解决方案。 臣等搜用启发式函数以多关注最不自信之局,并用剪函数据全局解决方案局适应性、测实体之全局一致性评分于全局解决方案。 CoNLL 2003与TAC 2010准试实验验模形之有效性。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम इकाई बहुविकल्पी के लिए एक उपन्यास मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो सीमित विसंगति खोज (एलडीएस) के माध्यम से स्थानीय प्रासंगिक जानकारी और वैश्विक साक्ष्य दोनों को जोड़ता है। एक इनपुट दस्तावेज़ को देखते हुए, हम एक स्थानीय मॉडल द्वारा निर्मित एक पूर्ण समाधान से शुरू करते हैं और वैश्विक दृष्टिकोण से स्थानीय समाधान को बेहतर बनाने के लिए संभावित सुधारों के स्थान में एक खोज करते हैं। हमारी खोज कम से कम आत्मविश्वास वाले स्थानीय निर्णयों पर अधिक ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए एक हेरिस्टिक फ़ंक्शन का उपयोग करती है और उनकी स्थानीय फिटनेस और अनुमानित संस्थाओं के बीच वैश्विक सामंजस्य के आधार पर वैश्विक समाधानों को स्कोर करने के लिए एक छंटाई फ़ंक्शन का उपयोग करती है। CoNLL 2003 और TAC 2010 बेंचमार्क पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम हमारे मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता को सत्यापित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем новую модель дезагрегирования сущностей, которая объединяет как локальную контекстную информацию, так и глобальные доказательства с помощью ограниченного поиска расхождений (LDS). Учитывая исходный документ, мы начинаем с полного решения, построенного локальной моделью, и проводим поиск в пространстве возможных исправлений для улучшения локального решения с глобальной точки зрения. Наш поиск использует эвристическую функцию, чтобы сосредоточиться на наименее уверенных местных решениях, и функцию обрезки, чтобы оценить глобальные решения на основе их локальной пригодности и глобальных когерентностей среди прогнозируемых сущностей. Экспериментальные результаты по критериям CoNLL 2003 и TAC 2010 подтверждают эффективность нашей модели.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid múnla nua i láthair le haghaidh dí-athbhrí aonáin a chomhcheanglaíonn faisnéis chomhthéacsúil áitiúil agus fianaise dhomhanda trí Chuardach Neamhréiteach Teoranta (LDS). I bhfianaise doiciméad ionchuir, cuirimid tús le réiteach iomlán a tógadh le múnla áitiúil agus déanaimid cuardach sa spás ar cheartúcháin fhéideartha chun an réiteach áitiúil a fheabhsú ó thaobh domhanda. Úsáideann ár gcuardach feidhm heorastúil chun díriú níos mó ar na cinntí áitiúla is lú muiníne agus feidhm bearrtha chun na réitigh dhomhanda a scóráil bunaithe ar a n-oiriúnacht áitiúil agus na comhleanúnachas domhanda i measc na n-eintiteas tuartha. Deimhníonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar thagarmharcanna CoNLL 2003 agus TAC 2010 éifeachtacht ár múnla.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ახალგაზრდებით ინტერტიკური განამბიგუაციისთვის ნომალური მოდელი, რომელიც ლოკალური კონტექსტური ინფორმაციას და გლობალური წარმოდგენების გამოყენება ჩვენ მივიღეთ შესაძლებელი კომპორტირების სივრცეში დავიწყებთ ლოკალური მოდელიდან შექმნილი დაწყება და მხოლოდ კომპორტირების სივრცეში დავიწყებთ ლოკალური გახსნა მხო ჩვენი ძებნა იყენებს ჰეურისტიკური ფუნქცია, რომელიც უფრო დარწმუნებული ლოკალური განსაზღვრებისთვის და სურათის ფუნქციისთვის, რომელიც გლობალური განსაზღვრებისთვის დაბათებული ლოკალური დამა ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები CoNLL 2003 და TAC 2010 ბენქმიმაპკების შემოწმება ჩვენი მოდელის ეფექტიურობა.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο αποσαφήνισης οντοτήτων που συνδυάζει τόσο τοπικές πληροφορίες περιβάλλοντος όσο και παγκόσμιες αποδείξεις μέσω της Περιορισμένης Αναζήτησης Διακριτικότητας (LDS). Λαμβάνοντας υπόψη ένα έγγραφο εισόδου, ξεκινάμε από μια ολοκληρωμένη λύση κατασκευασμένη από ένα τοπικό μοντέλο και διεξάγουμε μια αναζήτηση στο χώρο των πιθανών διορθώσεων για τη βελτίωση της τοπικής λύσης από παγκόσμια άποψη. Η αναζήτησή μας χρησιμοποιεί μια heuristική λειτουργία για να επικεντρωθεί περισσότερο στις λιγότερο σίγουρες τοπικές αποφάσεις και μια λειτουργία κλαδέματος για να βαθμολογήσει τις παγκόσμιες λύσεις με βάση την τοπική τους καταλληλότητα και την παγκόσμια συνοχή μεταξύ των προβλεπόμενων οντοτήτων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα των κριτηρίων αναφοράς CoNLL 2003 και TAC 2010 επιβεβαιώνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του μοντέλου μας.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az entitások egyértelműsítésének új modelljét, amely a helyi kontextuális információkat és a globális bizonyítékokat egyesíti a korlátozott diszkriminációs kereséssel (LDS). Egy beviteli dokumentum alapján egy helyi modell alapján kialakított teljes megoldásból indulunk, és keresést végezünk a lehetséges korrekciók területén, hogy globális szempontból javítsuk a helyi megoldást. Keresésünk heurisztikus funkciót használ arra, hogy jobban a legkevésbé magabiztos helyi döntésekre összpontosítsunk, és egy metszési funkciót használunk arra, hogy a globális megoldásokat helyi alkalmasságuk és az előrejelzett entitások közötti globális koherencia alapján értékeljük. A CoNLL 2003 és TAC 2010 referenciaértékek kísérleti eredményei igazolják modellünk hatékonyságát.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatysime naują subjektų nedviprasmiškumo model į, kuris derina tiek vietos kontekstinę informaciją, tiek visuotinius įrodymus naudojant riboto diskrepancijos paiešką. Atsižvelgdami į įvestą dokumentą, pradedame iš visiško vietos modelio sukurto sprendimo ir ieškome galimų pataisymų siekiant pagerinti vietos sprendimą pasauliniu požiūriu. Mūsų paieška naudoja heuristinę funkciją, kad labiau sutelktume dėmesį į mažiausiai pasitikėjusius vietos sprendimus ir atsargią funkciją, kad įvertintume visuotinius sprendimus, pagrįstus jų vietiniu tinkamumu ir pasauliniu numatomų subjektų nuoseklumu. Eksperimentiniai CoNLL 2003 ir BLSK 2010 lyginamųjų rodiklių rezultatai tikrina mūsų modelio veiksmingumą.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo un nuovo modello di disambiguazione delle entità che combina sia le informazioni contestuali locali che le evidenze globali attraverso la ricerca di discrepanza limitata (LDS). Dato un documento di input, partiamo da una soluzione completa costruita su un modello locale e conduciamo una ricerca nello spazio di possibili correzioni per migliorare la soluzione locale da un punto di vista globale. La nostra ricerca utilizza una funzione euristica per concentrarsi maggiormente sulle decisioni locali meno sicure e una funzione di potatura per valutare le soluzioni globali in base alla loro idoneità locale e alla coerenza globale tra le entità previste. I risultati sperimentali sui benchmark CoNLL 2003 e TAC 2010 verificano l'efficacia del nostro modello.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме нов модел за раздвојување на ентитетите кој ги комбинира локалните контекстни информации и глобалните докази преку Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS). Со оглед на влезниот документ, почнуваме од целосно решение изградено од локален модел и пребаруваме во просторот на можни корекции за подобрување на локалното решение од глобална точка на поглед. Нашата потрага користи хеористичка функција за да се фокусира повеќе на најмалку доверливите локални одлуки и тешка функција за да ги постигне глобалните решенија базирани на нивната локална способност и глобалната кохеренција меѓу предвидените ентитети. Експерименталните резултати на резултатите CoNLL 2003 и TAC 2010 ја потврдуваат ефикасноста на нашиот модел.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, жергілікті контексті мәлімет мен жалпы мәліметтерді Limited дискрепциялық іздеу (LDS) арқылы біріктіру үшін жаңа моделі көрсетеді. Кіріс құжатты көрсету үшін, жергілікті моделі бойынша құрылған толық шешімінен бастап, жүйелік көрініс нүктесінен жергілікті шешімін жақсарту үшін іздеу орындарында орындайм Біздің іздеудіміз жергілікті жергілікті шешімдерге жұмыс шешімдерге негізделген жүйелік шешімдерге негізделген жалпы шешімдерге және бағдарламалық мәселелердің арасындағы жалпы согластығын CoNLL 2003 және TAC 2010 бағдарламаларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері үлгіміздің ефективнігін тексереді.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хоёр нутгийн орчин үеийн мэдээлэл болон дэлхийн тодорхойлолтуудыг Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS) аргаар холбогдож байгаа бүтээгдэхүүний зохиолын шинэ загварыг тайлбарлаж байна. Бид орон нутгийн загвараас бүтээгдэхүүний шийдвэрийг дэлхийн үзэл цэгээс сайжруулах боломжтой зөв зайд хайж эхэлсэн. Бидний хайх нь хамгийн бага итгэлтэй орон нутгийн шийдвэрлэлүүд, дэлхийн шийдвэрлэлүүдийг тэдний орон нутгийн сайн байдлын тулд, дэлхийн төлөвлөгөөтэй байдлын хоорондын нийгмийн холбоотой байдлыг илүү төвлөрүүлэх хэмж CoNLL 2003 болон TAC 2010 оны туршилтын үр дүнг бидний загварын үр дүнг шалгаж байна.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. അത് ലിഡിറ്റ് ഡിസിക്കെന്\u200dസി തെരച്ചിലൂടെ ലോക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളും ഗ്ലോക്കല്\u200d തെളിവു ഒരു ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് രേഖയില്\u200d നിന്ന്, ഒരു ലോക്കല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ തീരുമാനം തുടങ്ങുകയും, സാധ്യതകള്\u200d പരിശോധനങ്ങളുടെ സ നമ്മുടെ തെരച്ചില്\u200d ഒരു ഹിയൂരിസ്റ്റിക്ക് ഫാങ്ഷന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ഏറ്റവും കുറഞ്ഞത് വിശ്വസ്തനായ ലോക്കല്\u200d തീരുമാനങ്ങളിലും കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നത പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കോണ്\u200dഎല്\u200d 2003, ടാസി 2010 ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ പ്രാവൃത്തിയെ ഉറപ്പ് വരു', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan model baru untuk penyelesaian entiti yang menggabungkan kedua-dua maklumat kontekstual setempat dan bukti global melalui Carian Kegagalan Had (LDS). Berikan dokumen input, kita mula dari penyelesaian lengkap yang dibina oleh model setempat dan melakukan pencarian dalam ruang pembetulan yang mungkin untuk meningkatkan penyelesaian setempat dari titik pandangan global. Pencarian kami menggunakan fungsi heuristik untuk fokus lebih pada keputusan setempat yang paling kurang percaya diri dan fungsi pemacu untuk mencetak penyelesaian global berdasarkan kesesuaian setempat mereka dan kesesuaian global dianggap entiti. Keputusan percubaan pada nilai referensi CoNLL 2003 dan TAC 2010 mengesahkan kegunaan model kita.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi eit nytt modell for å undersøke entitet som kombinerer både lokale kontekstinformasjon og globale dokument gjennom Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS). Gjennomsikt eit inndatadokument, startar vi frå ein fullstendig løysing som er konstruert av ein lokal modell og gjer eit søk i rommet til moglege korrigeringar for å forbetra lokal løysing frå eit globalt visningspunkt. Søket vårt bruker ein heuristisk funksjon for å fokusera meir på dei minste tiltrudde lokale avgjøringane og ein trykk funksjon for å scorera globale løysingane basert på dei lokale tilpassende og globale samsvar mellom dei foregåande entitetene. Eksperimentale resultat på CoNLL 2003 og TAC 2010-benchmarker sjekkar at modellen vår er effektivt.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm un nou model de dezambiguizare a entităților care combină atât informațiile contextuale locale, cât și evidențele globale prin Căutarea Discrepanței Limitate (LDS). Având în vedere un document de intrare, pornim de la o soluție completă construită după un model local și efectuăm o căutare în spațiul posibilelor corecții pentru a îmbunătăți soluția locală din punct de vedere global. Căutarea noastră utilizează o funcție euristică pentru a se concentra mai mult pe cele mai puțin încrezătoare decizii locale și o funcție de tăiere pentru a puncta soluțiile globale bazate pe calitatea lor locală și coerența globală dintre entitățile preconizate. Rezultatele experimentale privind criteriile CoNLL 2003 și TAC 2010 verifică eficacitatea modelului nostru.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy nowatorski model dyskryminacji podmiotów, który łączy zarówno lokalne informacje kontekstowe, jak i globalne dowody poprzez ograniczone wyszukiwanie dyskryminacji (LDS). Biorąc pod uwagę dokument wejściowy, zaczynamy od kompletnego rozwiązania zbudowanego według modelu lokalnego i przeprowadzamy poszukiwania w przestrzeni ewentualnych korekt w celu ulepszenia lokalnego rozwiązania z globalnego punktu widzenia. Nasze poszukiwania wykorzystują funkcję heurystyczną, aby skupić się bardziej na najmniej pewnych decyzjach lokalnych oraz funkcję przycinania, aby ocenić globalne rozwiązania w oparciu o ich lokalną sprawność i globalną spójność między przewidywanymi podmiotami. Wyniki eksperymentalne dotyczące benchmarków CoNLL 2003 i TAC 2010 weryfikują skuteczność naszego modelu.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi model disambiguacije entiteta koji kombinuje lokalne kontekstske informacije i globalne dokaze kroz ograničenu pretragu za diskrepanziju (LDS). S obzirom na ulazni dokument, počinjemo od kompletnog rješenja koje je konstruirao lokalni model i provodimo potragu u prostoru mogućih korekcija da poboljšamo lokalno rješenje iz globalnog pogleda. Naša pretraživanja koristi heurističku funkciju da se fokusira više na najmanje samouverene lokalne odluke i pružanje funkcije kako bi postigla globalne rešenja na temelju njihove lokalne pristojnosti i globalne saskašnosti između predviđenih entitata. Eksperimentalni rezultati na referencijama CoNLL 2003 i TAC 2010 proveravaju učinkovitost našeg modela.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa muusiko warqad ah oo ku qoran baaritaanka, kaas oo ku soo ururiya macluumaadka joogtada ah iyo muuqashada caalamiga ah ee ku qoran baahida qasabka (LDS). Dukummada input, waxaynu ka bilaabaynaa xal kamid ah oo sameynaya model deegaan, waxaana sameynaynaa raadinta hagitaanka suurtagalka ah si a an u hagaajinno xafiiska deegaanka looga jeedo goobta caalamiga ah. Our search utilizes a heuristic function to focus more on the least confident local decisions and a pruning function to score the global solutions based on their local fitness and the global coherences among the predicted entities.  Imtixaanka ku saabsan CoNLL 2003 iyo TAC 2010 waxay xaqiijiyaan waxyaabaha sameynta modellkayaga.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය සඳහා ස්ථානික පත්තර තොරතුරු සහ ජාතික ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් ලිපිත විශ්වාස සො ඇතුළුම් ලිපිණියක් නිර්මාණය කරලා, අපි ස්ථානික මොඩේල් එකක් නිර්මාණය කරපු සම්පූර්ණ විසරණයෙන් පටන් ගත්තා, සමහ අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පාවිච්චි විශ්වාස කරන්න අඩුම විශ්වාසිත ස්ථානික තීරණය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විශ්වාසිත විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්ණ විස්තරයක CoNLL 2003 සහ TAC 2010 බෙන්ච්මාර්ක්ස් එකේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් අපේ මොඩේල් එකේ පරීක්ෂණත්වය', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi en ny modell för entitetsdisambiguation som kombinerar både lokal kontextuell information och globala bevis genom Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS). Med ett inmatningsdokument utgår vi från en komplett lösning konstruerad av en lokal modell och genomför en sökning i utrymmet för eventuella korrigeringar för att förbättra den lokala lösningen ur en global synvinkel. Vår sökning använder en heuristisk funktion för att fokusera mer på de minst säkra lokala besluten och en beskärningsfunktion för att poängtera de globala lösningarna baserat på deras lokala kondition och den globala samstämmigheten mellan de förutspådda enheterna. Experimentella resultat på riktmärkena CoNLL 2003 och TAC 2010 bekräftar effektiviteten hos vår modell.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم نے ایک نوی موڈل پیش کیے کہ ایک ایستی نامبوغی کے لئے ایک نئی موڈل ہے جو محلی موقعیت معلومات اور گلوبی دلیلیاں لیمیٹ ڈیسپرپانسی تلاش (LDS) کے ذریعے جمع کرتا ہے۔ ایک اینپیٹ ڈکومکٹم سے، ہم ایک محلی موڈل کے ذریعہ بنائے ہوئے کامل حل سے شروع کرتے ہیں اور ممکن اصلاح کے جگہ میں جہاد کریں گے کہ ایک گروئیل نظر پوینٹ سے محلی حل کو بہتر کریں۔ ہماری جگہ ایک ہوریستی فنقش کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ بہت کم یقین رکھنے والی محلی فیصلے اور ایک پرینگ فنقش کے ذریعے مضبوط فنقش کا ذریعہ دکھائے گا کہ ان کے محلی مضبوطی پر مستقل حل کریں اور ان کی پیش آنے والی موجود موجود مو CoNLL 2003 اور TAC 2010 بنچم مارک کے تجربے کے نتائج ہمارے موڈل کے مطابق ثابت قدم رکھتے ہیں.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw mudell ġdid għad-diżambiguazzjoni tal-entitajiet li jgħaqqad kemm l-informazzjoni kuntestwali lokali kif ukoll l-evidenzi globali permezz tat-Tfittxija ta’ Diskrepanza Limitata (LDS). Minħabba dokument ta’ input, a ħna nibdew minn soluzzjoni kompleta mibnija minn mudell lokali u nagħmlu tiftix fl-ispazju ta’ korrezzjonijiet possibbli biex itejbu s-soluzzjoni lokali minn perspettiva globali. It-tfittxija tagħna tuża funzjoni ewristika biex tiffoka aktar fuq id-deċiżjonijiet lokali l-inqas kunfidenti u funzjoni pruning biex tagħmel punteġġ tas-soluzzjonijiet globali bbażati fuq l-idoneità lokali tagħhom u l-koerenzi globali fost l-entitajiet imbassra. Experimental results on CoNLL 2003 and TAC 2010 benchmarks verify the effectiveness of our model.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரியை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். அது உள்ளார்ந்த தகவல் மற்றும் உலகளாவிய தெளிவுகளை எல்லாம் வரிசைப்படுத்த ஒரு உள்ளீட்டு ஆவணம் கொடுத்தால், நாம் ஒரு உள்ளமைப்பு மாதிரி உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தீர்விலிருந்து துவங்கி சாத்தியமான திருத்தங்களின் இடத்த நம்முடைய தேடுதல் ஒரு ஹிரிஸ்டிக் செயல்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்துகிறது மிகவும் குறைந்தது நம்பிக்கை உள்ளார்ந்த முடிவுகள் மீது கவனம் செலுத்துவதற்காகவும் ஒரு  கோன்எல் 2003 மற்றும் TAC 2010 பென்கார்க்கள் முடிவுகளை சரிபார்க்கவும்.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz lokal taʼminlovchi maʼlumot va global hujjatlarni qidirish (LDS) bilan birlashtirish uchun novel modeli koʻrinamiz. Name Bizning qidirish natijadagi muammolarni qo'llash uchun eng kamida ishonch qiladi, lokal xususiyatlarni eng qanchalik muammolar va eng yuqori funksiyatlarni qo'yish uchun dunyo yo yo'nalarni lokal suhbatda va kutilgan tizimlar orasidagi dunyo bo'ylab narsalarni qidirish uchun. KoNLL 2003 va TAC 2010 parametrlarida tajriba natijalari modelmizning effektligini bekor qiladi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một mô hình mới về phân biến thực thể, nó kết hợp cả các thông tin ngữ cảnh địa phương và các bằng chứng trên toàn cầu thông qua Tìm kiếm kín. Với một tài liệu nhập, chúng ta bắt đầu từ một giải pháp hoàn chỉnh được xây dựng bởi một mô hình địa phương và tìm kiếm trong không gian các sửa chữa có thể cải thiện giải pháp địa phương từ một quan điểm to àn cầu. Cuộc tìm kiếm của chúng ta sử dụng chức năng thần kinh để tập trung vào những quyết định địa phương ít tự tin nhất và một chức năng cắt tỉa để ghi điểm các giải pháp to àn cầu dựa trên thể trạng thái của họ và các liên quan toàn cầu giữa các thực thể dự đoán. Kết quả thử nghiệm về giá trị CO2 và bố trí cho thấy giá trị của mô hình này.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме нов модел за разграничаване на субектите, който съчетава както локална контекстуална информация, така и глобални доказателства чрез Ограничено търсене на дискриминация. Предвид входящ документ, ние започваме от цялостно решение, изградено по местен модел и провеждаме търсене в пространството на възможни корекции за подобряване на локалното решение от глобална гледна точка. Нашето търсене използва евристична функция, за да се съсредоточи повече върху най-малко уверените местни решения и функция за подрязване, за да оцени глобалните решения въз основа на тяхната локална годност и глобалната съгласуваност между прогнозираните субекти. Експерименталните резултати по референтните показатели на CoNLL 2003 и TAC 2010 потвърждават ефективността на нашия модел.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi model disambiguacije entiteta koji kombinira lokalne kontekstske informacije i globalne dokaze kroz ograničenu pretragu za diskrepanziju (LDS). S obzirom na ulazni dokument, počinjemo od potpunog rješenja izgrađenog lokalnim modelom i provodimo potragu u prostoru mogućih isprava kako bi poboljšali lokalno rješenje iz globalnog pogleda. Naša potraga koristi heurističku funkciju kako bi se fokusirala na najmanje samouvjerene lokalne odluke i funkciju pružanja kako bi postigala globalne rješenje na temelju njihove lokalne pristojnosti i globalne saskašnosti između predviđenih entitata. Eksperimentalni rezultati na referencijama CoNLL 2003 i TAC 2010 potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg modela.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi en ny model for enhedsforståelse, der kombinerer både lokale kontekstuelle oplysninger og globale beviser gennem Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS). Med et inputdokument starter vi ud fra en komplet løsning konstrueret af en lokal model og foretager en søgning i rummet for mulige rettelser for at forbedre den lokale løsning fra et globalt synspunkt. Vores søgning bruger en heuristisk funktion til at fokusere mere på de mindst sikre lokale beslutninger og en beskæringsfunktion til at score de globale løsninger baseret på deres lokale kondition og den globale sammenhæng mellem de forudsigede enheder. Eksperimentelle resultater på CoNLL 2003 og TAC 2010 benchmarks bekræfter effektiviteten af vores model.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een nieuw model voor entiteitsverduidelijking dat zowel lokale contextuele informatie als wereldwijde bewijzen combineert via Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS). Op basis van een invoerdocument starten we vanuit een complete oplossing die is opgebouwd volgens een lokaal model en voeren we een zoektocht uit in de ruimte van mogelijke correcties om de lokale oplossing vanuit een globaal gezichtspunt te verbeteren. Onze zoektocht maakt gebruik van een heuristische functie om meer te focussen op de minst betrouwbare lokale beslissingen en een snoeifunctie om de globale oplossingen te scoren op basis van hun lokale geschiktheid en de wereldwijde samenhang tussen de voorspelde entiteiten. Experimentele resultaten op CoNLL 2003 en TAC 2010 benchmarks bevestigen de effectiviteit van ons model.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein neuartiges Modell für Entitätsdisambiguation vor, das sowohl lokale Kontextinformationen als auch globale Beweise durch Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS) kombiniert. Ausgehend von einem Eingabedokument beginnen wir mit einer Komplettlösung, die nach einem lokalen Modell konstruiert wurde und führen eine Suche im Raum möglicher Korrekturen durch, um die lokale Lösung aus globaler Sicht zu verbessern. Unsere Suche nutzt eine heuristische Funktion, um sich mehr auf die am wenigsten vertrauenswürdigen lokalen Entscheidungen zu konzentrieren und eine Beschneidungsfunktion, um die globalen Lösungen basierend auf ihrer lokalen Fitness und den globalen Kohärenzen zwischen den vorhergesagten Einheiten zu bewerten. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zu CoNLL 2003 und TAC 2010 Benchmarks bestätigen die Wirksamkeit unseres Modells.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan model baru untuk penyelesaian entitas yang menggabungkan informasi kontekstual lokal dan bukti global melalui Pencarian Kebatasan (LDS). Dengan memberikan dokumen masukan, kita mulai dari solusi lengkap yang dibuat oleh model lokal dan melakukan pencarian di ruang mungkin koreksi untuk meningkatkan solusi lokal dari titik pandangan global. Pencarian kami menggunakan fungsi heuristik untuk fokus lebih pada keputusan setempat yang paling tidak percaya diri dan fungsi pemilik untuk mencetak solusi global berdasarkan kecepatan setempat mereka dan koherensi global diantara entitas yang diprediksi. Experimental results on CoNLL 2003 and TAC 2010 benchmarks verify the effectiveness of our model.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 유한한 차이 검색(LDS)을 통해 국부 상하문 정보와 전역 증거를 결합시키는 새로운 실체 소멸 모델을 제시했다.입력 문서를 지정하면 국부 모델로 구성된 완전한 해로부터 시작하여 가능한 수정 공간에서 검색을 진행하여 전체적인 측면에서 국부 해를 개선합니다.우리의 검색은 계발식 함수를 이용하여 가장 자신감이 없는 국부 결정에 더 많은 관심을 기울이고 가지치기 함수를 이용하여 실체 간의 국부 적응도와 전역 일치성에 따라 전역 해를 평가한다.CoNLL 2003 및 TAC 2010 기준의 실험 결과는 우리 모델의 유효성을 검증했습니다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک مدل جدید برای ناپدید کردن entities را نشان می دهیم که اطلاعات محلی و نشانه\u200cهای جهانی را از طریق جستجوی ناپدید شدن محلی (LDS) ترکیب می\u200cکند. با توجه به یک سند ورودی، ما از یک راه حل کامل که توسط یک مدل محلی ساخته شده شروع می\u200cکنیم و یک جستجو در فضای اصلاح امکان انجام می\u200cدهیم تا راه حل محلی را از نقطه\u200cی دید جهانی بهتر کنیم. جستجوی ما یک عملکرد حوریست را استفاده می کند تا بیشتر روی حداقل تصمیم\u200cهای محلی مطمئن باشد و یک عملکرد حوریتی را برای امتیاز حل\u200cهای جهانی بر اساس تعلق محلی آنها و هماهنگی جهانی بین موجودات پیش\u200cبینی کنند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cی CONLL ۲۰۰۳ و TAC ۲۰۰۱ تأثیر قابلیت مدل ما را ثابت می\u200cکنند.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunaweka mfano wa riwaya kwa ajili ya ubaguzi wa entity unaohamasisha taarifa za kimataifa na ushahidi wa kimataifa kupitia Tafuta ya Udhibiti Limited (LDS). Kutokana na nyaraka ya input, tunaanza kutoka suluhisho kamili lililotengenezwa na muundo wa ndani na kutekeleza kutafuta maendeleo yanayoweza kuboresha suluhisho la ndani kutoka kwenye mtazamo wa dunia. Utafiti wetu unatumia kazi ya kimataifa ili kuhusiana zaidi kwenye maamuzi ya chini yenye imani na kazi yenye akili ya kutambua suluhisho la kimataifa kwa msingi wa uhakika wao na ushirikiano wa kimataifa miongoni mwa vifaa vinavyotarajiwa. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye bendera ya CoNLL 2003 na TAC 2010 yanathibitisha ufanisi wa modeli yetu.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda birn채챌e g철챌체rmek 체챌in bir nusga 철r채n 챌yk첵arys. Bu h채zirki 첵erleri durum maglumaty we d체n첵채d채ki ta첵첵arlar Limited Diskrepansy Arama (LDS) bilen birle힊tiril첵채r. Girdi senedi흫 g철r채, biz 첵erli bir nusga tarapyndan in 힊a edilen t체m 챌철z체mlerden ba힊la첵arys we m체mkin d체zeltilmelerden 첵erli 챌철z체mleri d체n첵채 g철rn체힊 noktalaryndan geli힊tirmek 체챌in bir g철zlemek 체챌in barla첵arys. Aramyzda i흫 azyndan ynamly 첵erli kararlar we 첵체zerli 챌철z체mleri 첵erle힊첵채n 철zlerini흫 첵erli 첵erliklerine we d체n첵채d채ki guramlary흫 arasynda gurnalamak 체챌in heuristik fonksi첵any ulan첵ar. CoNLL 2003 we TAC 2010 d체zmekleri흫 nusgalaryny흫 nusgasyny barla첵ar.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një model të ri për çambiguacionin e njësisë që kombinon si informacionin kontekstual lokal dhe provat globale nëpërmjet Kërkimit të Pakënaqësisë së Limituar (LDS). Duke dhënë një dokument të hyrjes, ne fillojmë nga një zgjidhje e plotë e ndërtuar nga një model lokal dhe kryejmë një kërkim në hapësirën e korrigjimeve të mundshme për të përmirësuar zgjidhjen lokale nga një pikë pamje globale. Kërkimi ynë përdorë një funksion heuristik për të përqëndruar më shumë në vendimet më të pakufishme lokale dhe një funksion pruning për të shënuar zgjidhjet globale bazuar në aftësinë e tyre lokale dhe koherencën globale midis njësive të parashikuara. Rezultatet eksperimentale mbi standartet CoNLL 2003 dhe TAC 2010 verifikojnë efektshmërinë e modelit tonë.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የአካባቢ መረጃዎችን እና የዓለምአቀፍ ማስረጃዎችን በመቀላቀል የተሰናከለ ጥያቄ ፈልግ (LDS) የሚጠቅመውን አካባቢ አዲስ ሞዴል እናቀርባለን፡፡ የጥያቄ ሰነዱን በመጠቀም፣ የአገር ሞዴል ካደረገ ሙሉ ማስረጃ ጀምረናል እና የአገር ማቀናጃ ማሻሻል ከዓለምአቀፍ እይታ ክፍል ማሻሻል በሚችል መልዕክቶች ውስጥ ፈተናን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍለጋችን የሚታመን የአገር ፍጥረት እና በተቀጠሩት አካባቢዎች መካከል የዓለማዊ ፍጥረት ማቀናቀል እና የዓለማዊ ፍጥረት ማቀናቀል እና የዓለምአቀፍ ማቀናቀል በመጠቀም የሚጠይቅ ነው፡፡ የኮንLL 2003 እና TAC 2010 benchmark ውጤቶች የሞዴልናችን ውጤት ያረጋግጣሉ፡፡', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorsien ons 'n nuwe model vir entiteit-ontsammings wat beide plaaslike kontekslike inligting en globaal getuienisse kombinieer deur Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS). Gien 'n invoer dokument, begin ons van 'n volledige oplossing wat deur 'n plaaslike model gebruik is en loop 'n soektog in die spasie van moontlike korreksies om die plaaslike oplossing van 'n globale besigtigpunt te verbeter. Ons soektog gebruik 'n heuristiese funksie om meer te fokus op die minste vertroude plaaslike besluite en 'n pruning funksie om die globale oplossing te tel op hulle plaaslike toepassing en die globale koherens onder die voorskoude entiteite te tel. Eksperimentale resultate op CoNLL 2003 en TAC 2010 benchmarke bevestig die effektiviteit van ons model.", 'az': 'Bu kağızda, Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS) vasitəsilə yerli müxtəlif məlumatları və küresel dəlilləri birləşdirən yeni bir modeli göstəririk. Bir girdi dökümündən, yerli modellə in şa edilmiş tamamlanmış çətinlikdən başlayırıq və mümkün düzəltmələr arasında yerli çətinlikləri küresel görünüş nöqtəsindən daha yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün araştırmaq üçün başlayırıq. Bizim araştırmamız küresel çətinliklərini yerel uyğunluğuna və tədbir edilənlər arasındakı küresel çətinliklərə dəyişmək üçün ən az güvenilir yerli hökmlərə və dəyişiklik funksiyasına daha çox təsirlənmək üçün heuristik funksiyasını istifadə edir. CoNLL 2003 və TAC 2010 benchmarkləri modelimizin etkinliğini təsdiqləyir.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի նոր մոդել էության բացատրության համար, որը միավորում է տեղական կոնտեքստալ տեղեկատվությունը և գլոբալ ապացույցները՝ սահմանափակ բացակայության որոնման միջոցով: Տեսած ներմուծի փաստաթղթին, մենք սկսում ենք տեղական մոդելի կողմից կառուցված ամբողջական լուծումից և կատարում ենք որոնումներ հնարավոր ուղղումների տարածքում, որպեսզի բարելավենք տեղական լուծումը գլոբալ տեսանկյունից: Մեր որոնումը օգտագործում է հյուրիստիկ ֆունկցիա, որպեսզի կենտրոնանանք ավելի քիչ վստահ տեղական որոշումների վրա և խիստ ֆունկցիայի, որպեսզի գլոբալ լուծումները գնահատենք, հիմնված նրանց տեղական համապատասխանատվության և գլոբալ համապատասխան ԿոՆԼ 2003-ի և ԹԱԿ 2010-ի հարաբերականների փորձարկման արդյունքները ստուգում են մեր մոդելի արդյունավետությունը:', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem un nou model de desambiguació d'entitats que combina tant la informació contextual local com les evidències globals a través de la Busca Limitada de Discrepancies (LDS). Dant un document d'entrada, comencem d'una solució completa construïda per un model local i fem una recerca en l'espai de possible correccions per millorar la solució local d'un punt de vista global. La nostra recerca utilitza una funció heurística per centrar-se més en les decisions locals menys segures i una funció prudenta per puntuar les solucions globals basades en la seva aptitud local i la coherencia global entre les entitats previstes. Els resultats experimentals dels punts de referència CoNLL 2003 i TAC 2010 verifiquen l'eficacia del nostre model.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo novi model disambiguacije entiteta koji kombinira lokalne kontekstske informacije i globalne dokaze kroz ograničenu potragu za diskrepanzijom (LDS). S obzirom na ulazni dokument, počinjemo od potpunog rješenja izgrađenog lokalnim modelom i provodimo pretragu u prostoru mogućih korekcija kako bi poboljšali lokalno rješenje iz globalnog pogleda. Naša pretraživanja koristi heurističku funkciju da se fokusira više na najmanje samouvjerene lokalne odluke i pružanje funkcije kako bi postigla globalne rješenje na temelju njihove lokalne pristojnosti i globalne saskašnosti između predviđenih entitata. Eksperimentalni rezultati na referencijama CoNLL 2003 i TAC 2010 potvrđuju učinkovitost našeg modela.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme nový model pro rozcestnění entit, který kombinuje lokální kontextové informace a globální důkazy prostřednictvím limitovaného vyhledávání diskrepancy (LDS). Na základě vstupního dokumentu vycházíme z kompletního řešení sestaveného lokálním modelem a provádíme vyhledávání v prostoru možných oprav pro zlepšení lokálního řešení z globálního hlediska. Naše vyhledávání využívá heuristickou funkci k zaměření se více na nejméně sebevědomá lokální rozhodnutí a funkci prořezávání pro hodnocení globálních řešení na základě jejich lokální kondice a globální soudržnosti mezi předpokládanými entitami. Experimentální výsledky referenčních hodnot CoNLL 2003 a TAC 2010 ověřují efektivitu našeho modelu.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি উপন্যাসের মডেল উপস্থাপন করি যা স্থানীয় তথ্য এবং বিশ্ব প্রমাণ সীমিত ডিসিকেন্সি সার্চ (এলডিএস) দ্বারা স্থানীয় একটি ইনপুট নথি দিয়ে আমরা একটি স্থানীয় মডেল দ্বারা নির্মাণ করা সম্পূর্ণ সমাধান থেকে শুরু করি এবং বিশ্বের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি থেকে স্থানীয় সম আমাদের অনুসন্ধান স্থানীয় সিদ্ধান্তের উপর নির্ভর করে আরো বেশী দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি করে বিশ্বের সমাধানের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে তাদের স্থানীয় সুবিধা এবং ভবিষ্যত কএনএল ২০০৩ এবং টাসি ২০১০ বেনমার্ক নিয়ে পরীক্ষার ফলাফল আমাদের মডেলের কার্যক্রম নিশ্চিত করেছে।', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme uuden mallin kokonaisuuden erotteluun, joka yhdistää sekä paikalliset kontekstitiedot että globaalit todisteet rajoitetun erotteluhaun (LDS) avulla. Lähtödokumentin perusteella lähdemme paikallisella mallilla rakennetusta kokonaisratkaisusta ja etsimme mahdollisia korjauksia paikallisen ratkaisun parantamiseksi globaalista näkökulmasta. Hakumme hyödyntää heuristista funktiota keskittymään enemmän vähiten luottavaisiin paikallisiin päätöksiin ja karsintafunktiota, jolla saadaan globaaleja ratkaisuja paikallisen kuntonsa ja ennustettujen kokonaisuuksien maailmanlaajuisen johdonmukaisuuden perusteella. Kokeelliset tulokset CoNLL 2003- ja TAC 2010 -vertailuarvoista vahvistavat mallimme tehokkuuden.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame uudset mudelit üksuste eristamiseks, mis ühendab nii kohaliku kontekstiteabe kui ka globaalseid tõendeid piiratud lahknevuse otsingu (LDS) kaudu. Sisenddokumendi alusel alustame kohaliku mudeli järgi ehitatud terviklahendusest ja otsime võimalike paranduste ruumi, et parandada kohalikku lahendust globaalsest vaatenurgast. Meie otsing kasutab heuristilist funktsiooni, et keskenduda rohkem vähem kindlatele kohalikele otsustele, ja pügamisfunktsiooni, et hinnata globaalseid lahendusi, lähtudes nende kohalikust sobivusest ja prognoositavate üksuste globaalsest sidususest. Katsetulemused CoNLL 2003 ja TAC 2010 võrdlusnäitajate kohta kinnitavad meie mudeli tõhusust.', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku predstavljamo nov model za razjasnitev entitet, ki združuje lokalne kontekstualne informacije in globalne dokaze prek omejenega iskanja diskrepcije (LDS). Ob upoštevanju vhodnega dokumenta začnemo iz celotne rešitve, zgrajene po lokalnem modelu, in izvajamo iskanje v prostoru možnih popravkov za izboljšanje lokalne rešitve z globalnega vidika. Naše iskanje uporablja heuristično funkcijo, ki se bolj osredotoča na najmanj samozavestne lokalne odločitve, in funkcijo obrezovanja za ocenjevanje globalnih rešitev na podlagi njihove lokalne pripravljenosti in globalne skladnosti med predvidenimi entitetami. Poskusni rezultati referenčnih vrednosti CoNLL 2003 in TAC 2010 potrjujejo učinkovitost našega modela.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים מודל חדש לניתוח בידיות שמשולב גם מידע קונטקסטי מקומי וגלובלי ראיות דרך חיפוש חוסר סבלנות מוגבל (LDS). Given an input document, we start from a complete solution constructed by a local model and conduct a search in the space of possible corrections to improve the local solution from a global view point.  Our search utilizes a heuristic function to focus more on the least confident local decisions and a pruning function to score the global solutions based on their local fitness and the global coherences among the predicted entities.  תוצאות ניסויים על נקודות רמז CoNLL 2003 ו TAC 2010 מאשרים את היעילות של הדוגמא שלנו.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, munã gabatar da wani motel na node wa abun da ke haɗa duk takardan information da abũbuwan da ke cikin lokacin da za'a iya haɗa duk bayani na lokaci da kuma duk ayukan duniya da Search na Limited Disc na (LDS). Gida wani takardar inputi, za'a fara daga wata suluya cikakken wanda aka gina na wani motsi na lokal kuma mu aiki search in fili masu iya canza shiryoyin ayuka da ke iya amfani da shi daga point na duniya. Zana amfani da amfani da aikin heuristic don ya yi makini a kan masu ƙara masu da aminci na lokal da aiki mai hankali dõmin ya score masu fassarar dũniya a kan asalinta da mazaunin da dukkan mazaɓa daga abubuwa da ake yi wa gabani. Matarin jarrabon CoNLL 2003 da TAC 2010", 'bo': 'In this paper, we present a novel model for entity disambiguation that combines both local contextual information and global evidences through Limited Discrepancy Search (LDS). འུ་ཅག་གིས་ནང་འཇུག་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་བཤད་པ་ལས་རང་ཁུལ་གྱི་མ་དཔེ་གཞི་གཅིག་གིས་གསར་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་འགོ་བཙུགས་དུ་ཡ ང་ཚོའི་འཚོལ་བཤེར CoNLL 2003དང་ཤོག་བྱང་(TAC)2010ཡི་ཟླ་བ་ཕྱོགས་གྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་མངོན་གསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'jv': "Nang peurén iki, kita nambah model kanggo nggawe Ngubah Entèni iki luwih dumateng informasi kontèxtual lan global Where's the input document Rasané dhéwé nggunakake sistem heuristik kanggo ingkang dipunangé luwih dumadhi kanggo nik nggawe barang kanggo ngilangno sistem sing beraksi perusahaan anyar Rasalih sing paling kelas CoNLL 2003 lan TIC 10 nggawe rata-rata sing nyimpen nggawe model sing apik dadi."}
{'en': 'Learning to Progressively Recognize New Named Entities with Sequence to Sequence Models', 'ar': 'تعلم التعرف تدريجيًا على الكيانات المسماة الجديدة باستخدام نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل', 'pt': 'Aprendendo a reconhecer progressivamente novas entidades nomeadas com modelos de sequência a sequência', 'es': 'Aprender a reconocer progresivamente nuevas entidades nombradas con modelos de secuencia a secuencia', 'fr': 'Apprendre à reconnaître progressivement de nouvelles entités nommées avec des modèles séquence à séquence', 'ja': 'シーケンスモデルへのシーケンスで新しい名前付きエンティティを漸進的に認識することを学ぶ', 'zh': '学用序至序列,渐识新名实体', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम मॉडल के लिए अनुक्रम के साथ उत्तरोत्तर नए नामित निकायों को पहचानना सीखना', 'ru': 'Обучение прогрессивному распознаванию новых именованных сущностей с последовательностью к моделям последовательности', 'ga': 'Foghlaim chun Aonáin Nua Ainmnithe a Aithint de réir a chéile le Múnlaí Seicheamh go Seicheamh', 'ka': 'პროგრესიგურად განახსნა ახალი სახელი ელემენტების შემდეგ მოდელების შემდეგ', 'el': 'Μάθετε να αναγνωρίζετε προοδευτικά νέες Οντότητες με μοντέλα ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία', 'it': 'Imparare a riconoscere progressivamente le nuove entità nominate con modelli di sequenza a sequenza', 'hu': 'Az új elnevezett entitások fokozatos felismerésének tanulása sorozatos modellekkel', 'lt': 'Mokymasis laipsniškai pripažinti naujus pavadintus subjektus, kurie seka sekos modelius', 'kk': 'Жаңа аталған нысандарды таңдау', 'ms': 'Belajar untuk mengakui secara progresif Entiti Nama Baru dengan Kelajuan ke Model Kelajuan', 'mk': 'Научи прогресивно да ги признае новите именувани ентитети со секвентни модели', 'mt': 'Tagħlim biex jiġu Rikonoxxuti b’mod Progressiv Entitajiet Ismija Ġodda b’Mudelli ta’ Sekwenza', 'ml': 'Learning to Progressively Recognize New Named Entities with Sequence to Sequence Models', 'pl': 'Uczenie się stopniowego rozpoznawania nowych nazwanych podmiotów za pomocą modeli sekwencji do sekwencji', 'mn': 'Прогрессивнээр шинэ нэрлэгдсэн элементүүдийг дараагийн загвартай танилцуулах', 'no': 'Læring til å gjenkjenne nye namne einingar med sekvens til sekvensmodeller', 'ro': 'Învățarea de a recunoaște progresiv noi entități numite cu modele secvență la secvență', 'sr': 'Naučenje za progresivno prepoznavanje novih imenovanih podataka sa sekvencijom do sekvencijskih modela', 'ta': 'புதிய பெயர் உள்ளீடு', 'sv': 'Att lära sig att gradvis känna igen nya namngivna enheter med sekvens till sekvensmodeller', 'ur': 'پروگرسٹیول کے لئے نئی نامہ ریخت انٹیٹیوں کو سیکونس موڈل کے ساتھ پہچان سکتے ہیں', 'so': 'Learning to Progressively Recognise New Named Entities with Sequence to Sequence Models', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරධානයික විදියට අනුවත් නම් අනුවත් අනුවත් අනුවත් අනුවත් අනුව අනුවත් අනුවත් අනුවත් අනුව අන', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Học cách nhận diện dần các đơn vị có tên mới với chuỗi thành chuỗi các mô hình lặp', 'bg': 'Научаване на прогресивно разпознаване на нови имена лица с модели от последователност към последователност', 'hr': 'Naučenje za progresivno prepoznavanje novih imenovanih podataka sa sekvencijom do sekvencijskih modela', 'de': 'Lernen, schrittweise neue benannte Entitäten mit Sequence to Sequence Modellen zu erkennen', 'da': 'Lære gradvist at genkende nye navngivne enheder med sekvens til sekvens modeller', 'nl': 'Leren om geleidelijk nieuwe benoemde entiteiten te herkennen met Sequence to Sequence Modellen', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن برای شناختن شرکت\u200cهای نو نامیده شده به پیشرفت با مدل\u200cهای سطح', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kuendelea Kutambua Hifadhi mpya zilizoitwa na Mifumo ya Kufuatilia', 'id': 'Learning to Progressively Recognize New Named Entities with Sequence to Sequence Models', 'ko': '시퀀스에서 시퀀스 모델로 새 명명 실체를 점차적으로 식별하는 것을 배우다', 'af': 'Leer na progresief herken nuwe naamde eenhede met volgorde na volgorde model', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Learning to Progressively Recognize New Named Entities with Sequence to Sequence Models', 'tr': 'Taze Adlanylan Mazmunlar', 'hy': 'Սովորել առաջընթացիկ ճանաչել նոր անվանված միավորներ, որոնք հաջորդականության մոդելների հաջորդականությամբ են', 'bn': 'সেকেন্সের মোডেলের সাথে নতুন নামের এন্টিটি পরিচিতি শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'az': '칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n Yeni 캻simli Entit톛l톛ri Sequence Modell톛ri il톛', 'cs': 'Naučit se postupně rozpoznávat nové jmenované entity s modely sekvence na sekvenci', 'ca': 'Aprendre a reconèixer progresivament noves entitats anomenades amb seqüència a models de seqüència', 'fi': 'Oppiminen tunnistamaan asteittain uusia nimettyjä kokonaisuuksia sekvenssimallien avulla', 'et': 'Õppimine järkjärguliselt ära tundma uusi nimelisi üksusi järjestusmudelitega', 'bs': 'Naučenje progresivno prepoznavanje novih imenovanih podataka sa sekvencijom do modela sekvencije', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'ללמוד להכיר באופן מתקדם יחידות בשמות חדשות עם רצף לדוגמאות רצף', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje postopnega prepoznavanja novih imenovanih subjektov z modeli zaporedja do zaporedja', 'bo': 'འཕེལ་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བརྟན་གྱི་སྔོན་ལྟར་མིང་ཡོད་པའི་སྒེར་གྱི་གསར་དུས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ།'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose to use a sequence to sequence model for Named Entity Recognition (NER) and we explore the effectiveness of such model in a progressive NER setting   a Transfer Learning (TL) setting. We train an initial model on source data and transfer it to a model that can recognize new NE categories in the target data during a subsequent step, when the source data is no longer available. Our solution consists in : (i) to reshape and re-parametrize the output layer of the first learned model to enable the recognition of new NEs ; (ii) to leave the rest of the architecture unchanged, such that it is initialized with parameters transferred from the initial model ; and (iii) to fine tune the network on the target data. Most importantly, we design a new NER approach based on sequence to sequence (Seq2Seq) models, which can intuitively work better in our progressive setting. We compare our approach with a Bidirectional LSTM, which is a strong neural NER model. Our experiments show that the Seq2Seq model performs very well on the standard NER setting and it is more robust in the progressive setting. Our approach can recognize previously unseen NE categories while preserving the knowledge of the seen data.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح استخدام تسلسل إلى نموذج تسلسلي للتعرف على الكيان المسماة (NER) ونستكشف فعالية هذا النموذج في إعداد NER التدريجي - إعداد نقل التعلم (TL). نقوم بتدريب نموذج أولي على بيانات المصدر ونقله إلى نموذج يمكنه التعرف على فئات NE الجديدة في البيانات الهدف أثناء خطوة لاحقة ، عندما لا تكون بيانات المصدر متاحة. يتكون حلنا من: (1) إعادة تشكيل وإعادة تحديد طبقة المخرجات للنموذج الأول الذي تم تعلمه لتمكين التعرف على NEs الجديدة ؛ (2) ترك باقي الهيكل دون تغيير ، بحيث يتم تهيئته باستخدام معلمات تم نقلها من النموذج الأولي ؛ و (3) لضبط الشبكة على البيانات الهدف. الأهم من ذلك ، أننا نصمم نهجًا جديدًا لـ NER استنادًا إلى نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل (Seq2Seq) ، والتي يمكن أن تعمل بشكل حدسي بشكل أفضل في إعدادنا التدريجي. نقارن نهجنا مع LSTM ثنائي الاتجاه ، وهو نموذج NER عصبي قوي. تُظهر تجاربنا أن نموذج Seq2Seq يؤدي أداءً جيدًا للغاية على إعداد NER القياسي وهو أكثر قوة في الإعداد التدريجي. يمكن أن يتعرف نهجنا على فئات NE غير المرئية سابقًا مع الحفاظ على معرفة البيانات المرئية.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons d'utiliser un modèle de séquence à séquence pour la reconnaissance d'entités nommées (NER) et nous explorons l'efficacité d'un tel modèle dans un environnement NER progressif — un paramètre d'apprentissage par transfert (TL). Nous entraînons un modèle initial sur des données sources et le transférons vers un modèle capable de reconnaître de nouvelles catégories NE dans les données cibles au cours d'une étape suivante, lorsque les données sources ne sont plus disponibles. Notre solution consiste à\xa0: (i) remodeler et re-paramétrer la couche de sortie du premier modèle appris pour permettre la reconnaissance de nouveaux NE\xa0; (ii) laisser le reste de l'architecture inchangé, de sorte qu'elle soit initialisée avec des paramètres transférés depuis le modèle initial\xa0; et (iii) affiner le réseau sur les données cibles. Plus important encore, nous concevons une nouvelle approche NER basée sur des modèles séquence à séquence (Seq2Seq), qui peut fonctionner intuitivement mieux dans notre environnement progressif. Nous comparons notre approche avec un LSTM bidirectionnel, qui est un modèle NER neuronal puissant. Nos expériences montrent que le modèle Seq2Seq fonctionne très bien sur le réglage NER standard et qu'il est plus robuste dans le réglage progressif. Notre approche permet de reconnaître des catégories NE inédites tout en préservant la connaissance des données vues.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos usar um modelo sequencial para sequenciar para Reconhecimento de Entidades Nomeadas (NER) e exploramos a eficácia de tal modelo em uma configuração de NER progressiva – uma configuração de Transferência de Aprendizagem (TL). Treinamos um modelo inicial nos dados de origem e o transferimos para um modelo que possa reconhecer novas categorias de NE nos dados de destino durante uma etapa subsequente, quando os dados de origem não estiverem mais disponíveis. Nossa solução consiste em: (i) remodelar e re-parametrizar a camada de saída do primeiro modelo aprendido para permitir o reconhecimento de novas NEs; (ii) deixar o restante da arquitetura inalterada, de modo que seja inicializada com parâmetros transferidos do modelo inicial; e (iii) ajustar a rede nos dados de destino. Mais importante ainda, projetamos uma nova abordagem de NER baseada em modelos de sequência a sequência (Seq2Seq), que pode funcionar intuitivamente melhor em nossa configuração progressiva. Comparamos nossa abordagem com um LSTM bidirecional, que é um modelo NER neural forte. Nossos experimentos mostram que o modelo Seq2Seq funciona muito bem na configuração NER padrão e é mais robusto na configuração progressiva. Nossa abordagem pode reconhecer categorias de NE não vistas anteriormente, preservando o conhecimento dos dados vistos.', 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos utilizar un modelo de secuencia a secuencia para el reconocimiento de entidades nombradas (NER) y exploramos la eficacia de dicho modelo en un entorno de NER progresiva, un entorno de aprendizaje por transferencia (TL). Entrenamos un modelo inicial sobre datos de origen y lo transferimos a un modelo que puede reconocer nuevas categorías de NE en los datos de destino durante un paso posterior, cuando los datos de origen ya no están disponibles. Nuestra solución consiste en: (i) remodelar y volver a parametrizar la capa de salida del primer modelo aprendido para permitir el reconocimiento de nuevos NE; (ii) dejar el resto de la arquitectura sin cambios, de modo que se inicialice con los parámetros transferidos desde el modelo inicial; y (iii) ajustar la red en los datos objetivo. Lo más importante es que diseñamos un nuevo enfoque de NER basado en modelos de secuencia a secuencia (Seq2Seq), que puede funcionar mejor intuitivamente en nuestro entorno progresivo. Comparamos nuestro enfoque con un LSTM bidireccional, que es un modelo de NER neuronal fuerte. Nuestros experimentos muestran que el modelo Seq2Seq funciona muy bien en la configuración NER estándar y es más robusto en la configuración progresiva. Nuestro enfoque puede reconocer categorías de NE nunca antes vistas y preservar el conocimiento de los datos vistos.', 'ja': 'この論文では、名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）のシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルを使用することを提案し、そのようなモデルのプログレッシブNER設定–転送学習（ TL ）設定での有効性を探る。 ソースデータが利用できなくなった場合に、ソースデータの初期モデルをトレーニングし、次のステップでターゲットデータの新しいNEカテゴリを認識できるモデルに転送します。 当社のソリューションは、(i)新しいNEの認識を可能にするために、最初に学習したモデルの出力層を再形成し、パラメータ化すること、(ii)アーキテクチャの残りの部分を変更せずに、最初のモデルから転送されたパラメータで初期化すること、および(iii)ターゲットデータ上のネットワークを微調整することで構成されています。 最も重要なことは、私たちは、シーケンスツーシーケンス（ Seq 2 Seq ）モデルに基づいて新しいNERアプローチを設計し、これは私たちのプログレッシブ設定で直感的により良く働くことができる。 我々のアプローチを、強力な神経ＮＥＲモデルである双方向ＬＳＴＭと比較する。 当社の実験では、Seq 2 Seqモデルは標準NER設定で非常に優れた性能を発揮し、プログレッシブ設定ではより堅牢であることが示されています。 私たちのアプローチは、見たデータの知識を維持しながら、以前は見えていなかったNEカテゴリを認識することができます。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम नामित एंटिटी रिकग्निशन (एनईआर) के लिए अनुक्रम मॉडल के लिए एक अनुक्रम का उपयोग करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और हम एक प्रगतिशील एनईआर सेटिंग में इस तरह के मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता का पता लगाते हैं - एक ट्रांसफर लर्निंग (टीएल) सेटिंग। हम स्रोत डेटा पर एक प्रारंभिक मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं और इसे एक ऐसे मॉडल में स्थानांतरित करते हैं जो बाद के चरण के दौरान लक्ष्य डेटा में नई एनई श्रेणियों को पहचान सकता है, जब स्रोत डेटा अब उपलब्ध नहीं होता है। हमारे समाधान में शामिल हैं: (i) नए एनई की मान्यता को सक्षम करने के लिए पहले सीखे गए मॉडल की आउटपुट परत को फिर से आकार देने और फिर से पैरामेट्रिज़ करने के लिए; (ii) शेष आर्किटेक्चर को अपरिवर्तित छोड़ने के लिए, जैसे कि इसे प्रारंभिक मॉडल से स्थानांतरित मापदंडों के साथ शुरू किया जाता है; और (iii) लक्ष्य डेटा पर नेटवर्क को ठीक करने के लिए। सबसे महत्वपूर्ण बात, हम अनुक्रम (Seq2Seq) मॉडल के अनुक्रम के आधार पर एक नया एनईआर दृष्टिकोण डिजाइन करते हैं, जो सहजता से हमारी प्रगतिशील सेटिंग में बेहतर काम कर सकता है। हम एक द्विदिश एलएसटीएम के साथ अपने दृष्टिकोण की तुलना करते हैं, जो एक मजबूत तंत्रिका एनईआर मॉडल है। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि Seq2Seq मॉडल मानक एनईआर सेटिंग पर बहुत अच्छा प्रदर्शन करता है और यह प्रगतिशील सेटिंग में अधिक मजबूत है। हमारा दृष्टिकोण पहले से अनदेखी एनई श्रेणियों को पहचान सकता है, जबकि देखे गए डेटा के ज्ञान को संरक्षित कर सकता है।', 'zh': '于本文,臣等议以序名实识(NER),并求渐进式NER置(迁学(TL)置)中有效性。 数以训初,传输以续步(当源数不以时)识数以新 NE 。 吾解决方案:(i)重塑、复参数化,以识新净资产。 (ii) 守架构之余,以从初传输者参数初始化之。 与(iii)微调之数网络。 莫大于序(Seq2Seq)惟新NER,惟渐进式是直观。 以吾道比双向LSTM,后者强神经NER形也。 臣等实验明,Seq2Seq形于准NER设之甚善,于渐进式置中更健。 吾法识前不见之NE,兼存所见之数。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы предлагаем использовать модель последовательности для распознавания именованных сущностей (NER) и исследуем эффективность такой модели в прогрессивной настройке NER – настройке обучения передаче (TL). Мы обучаем начальную модель исходным данным и переносим ее в модель, которая может распознавать новые категории NE в целевых данных на последующем этапе, когда исходные данные больше не доступны. Наше решение состоит в следующем: (i) изменить форму и повторно параметризировать выходной слой первой изученной модели, чтобы обеспечить распознавание новых NE; (ii) оставить остальную архитектуру неизменной, таким образом, чтобы она инициализировалась параметрами, перенесенными из исходной модели; и (iii) точно настроить сеть на целевые данные. Самое главное, мы разрабатываем новый подход NER, основанный на моделях последовательности к последовательности (Seq2Seq), которые могут интуитивно работать лучше в нашей прогрессивной среде. Мы сравниваем наш подход с двунаправленной LSTM, которая является сильной нейронной моделью NER. Наши эксперименты показывают, что модель Seq2Seq очень хорошо работает на стандартной настройке NER, и она более надежна в прогрессивной настройке. Наш подход может распознавать ранее невидимые категории NE, сохраняя при этом знания наблюдаемых данных.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, tá sé beartaithe againn samhail seicheamh a úsáid le haghaidh Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe (NER) agus déanaimid iniúchadh ar éifeachtacht a leithéid de mhúnla i suíomh forásach NER – suíomh Foghlama Aistrithe (TL). Déanaimid oiliúint ar mhúnla tosaigh ar shonraí foinse agus aistrímid é go múnla a fhéadfaidh catagóirí nua NE a aithint sna sonraí sprice le linn céim ina dhiaidh sin, nuair nach bhfuil na sonraí foinseacha ar fáil a thuilleadh. Is é atá sa réiteach atá againn ná: (i) ciseal aschuir na chéad mhúnla foghlamtha a athmhúnlú agus a athpharaiméadracht chun aitheantas a thabhairt do NEanna nua; (ii) an chuid eile den ailtireacht a fhágáil gan athrú, ionas go gcuirfear tús léi le paraiméadair a aistríodh ón tsamhail tosaigh; agus (iii) mionchoigeartú a dhéanamh ar an líonra ar na sonraí sprice. Níos tábhachtaí fós, déanaimid dearadh ar chur chuige nua NER bunaithe ar mhúnlaí seicheamh go seicheamh (Seq2Seq), ar féidir leo oibriú níos fearr go hintuigthe inár suíomh forásach. Déanaimid ár gcur chuige a chur i gcomparáid le LSTM Déthreo, atá ina shamhail láidir néaraíoch NER. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go bhfeidhmíonn an tsamhail Seq2Seq go han-mhaith ar an socrú caighdeánach NER agus go bhfuil sé níos láidre sa suíomh forásach. Is féidir lenár gcur chuige catagóirí NE nach bhfacthas cheana a aithint agus an t-eolas ar na sonraí a fheictear a chaomhnú.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε ένα μοντέλο ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία για την αναγνώριση ονομαστών οντοτήτων (και να διερευνήσουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα αυτού του μοντέλου σε μια προοδευτική ρύθμιση μάθησης μεταφοράς (Τλ). Εκπαιδεύουμε ένα αρχικό μοντέλο σε δεδομένα προέλευσης και το μεταφέρουμε σε ένα μοντέλο που μπορεί να αναγνωρίσει νέες κατηγορίες ΒΔ στα δεδομένα προορισμού κατά τη διάρκεια ενός επόμενου βήματος, όταν τα δεδομένα προέλευσης δεν είναι πλέον διαθέσιμα. Η λύση μας συνίσταται στην αναδιάταξη και επαναπαραμετροποίηση του στρώματος εξόδου του πρώτου μαθημένου μοντέλου ώστε να καταστεί δυνατή η αναγνώριση νέων ΝΕ. (ii) να παραμείνει αμετάβλητη η υπόλοιπη αρχιτεκτονική, έτσι ώστε να αρχικοποιείται με παραμέτρους που μεταφέρονται από το αρχικό μοντέλο· και iii) να συντονίσει το δίκτυο με βάση τα δεδομένα προορισμού. Το πιο σημαντικό, σχεδιάζουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε μοντέλα ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία (τα οποία μπορούν διαισθητικά να λειτουργήσουν καλύτερα στο προοδευτικό περιβάλλον μας. Συγκρίνουμε την προσέγγισή μας με ένα αμφίδρομο μοντέλο που είναι ένα ισχυρό νευρωνικό μοντέλο. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο αποδίδει πολύ καλά στην τυπική ρύθμιση και είναι πιο ανθεκτικό στην προοδευτική ρύθμιση. Η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να αναγνωρίσει προηγουμένως αθέωτες κατηγορίες ΒΔ διατηρώντας παράλληλα τη γνώση των ορατών δεδομένων.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ გვეძლევა გამოყენოთ სეკუნეტის მოდელი სახელი ინტერტიტის განახლებისთვის (NER) და ჩვენ ამას მოდელის ეფექტიურობას პროგრესიგური NER-ის განახლებაში - Transfer Learning (TL) განახლებაში. ჩვენ მივიღეთ სამყარო მოდელი, რომელიც შეგვიძლია ახალი NE კატეგორიების მონაცემების შემდეგ მონაცემების შემდეგ მონაცემების შემდეგ მონაცემების შემდეგ, როდესაც სამყარო მო ჩვენი პარამეტრები იქნება: i) პირველი სწავლილი მოდელის გამოყენება და გადაპარამეტრიზება, რომ ახალი NES-ის განაცნობის შესაძლებელად დაახლოებით; ii) არქტიქტურის დასრულების შეცვლად გადატოვება, როგორც იგი პრამეტრებით, რომლებიც დასრულებული მოდელიდან გადატანიზაცია; და iii) მისაღების მონაცემების ქსელის შენახვა. ყველაზე მნიშვნელოვანია, ჩვენ ახალი NER პროგრესის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც ჩვენი პროგრესიგურ შესაძლებლობაში უფრო მუშაობს მოდელების შესაძლებლობა (Seq2Seq) მოდელების შესაძ ჩვენ ჩვენი პროგორმაციას ორედირექციონალური LSTM-ით შემდგენებთ, რომელიც ძალიან ნეიროლური NER მოდელია. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებს, რომ Seq2Seq მოდელი ძალიან კარგი მუშაობს სტანდარტული NER-ის დანაწილებაში და ეს უფრო ძალიან პროგრესიგური დანაწილებაში ჩვენი პროგორმა შეიძლება წინასწარმოიცნო NE კატეგორიები, როცა შენახვა ხედავთ მონაცნობების ცოდნა.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban javasoljuk, hogy egy szekvencia-szekvencia modellt használjunk a Nevezett entitások felismeréséhez (NER), és feltárjuk ennek a modell hatékonyságát progresszív NER beállításban - a Transzfer Learning (TL) beállításban. Egy kezdeti modellt képzünk a forrásadatokra és továbbítunk egy olyan modellre, amely képes felismerni az új NE kategóriákat a céladatokban egy következő lépésben, amikor a forrásadatok már nem állnak rendelkezésre. Megoldásunk a következőkből áll: (i) az első tanult modell kimeneti rétegének átalakítása és paraméterezése, hogy lehetővé tegyük az új NE-k felismerését; (ii) az architektúra többi részét változatlanul hagyja, úgy, hogy az inicializálódik az eredeti modellből átvitt paraméterekkel; és iii. a hálózat finomhangolása a céladatokra. A legfontosabb, hogy egy új NER megközelítést tervezünk, amely sorozat-sorozat (Seq2Seq) modelleken alapul, amelyek intuitív módon jobban működnek progresszív környezetünkben. Megközelítésünket egy kétirányú LSTM-vel hasonlítjuk össze, amely egy erős neurális NER modell. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a Seq2Seq modell nagyon jól teljesít a standard NER beállításon és robusztusabb progresszív beállításban. Megközelítésünk felismeri a korábban nem látott NE kategóriákat, miközben megőrzi a látott adatok ismeretét.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome naudoti seką Pavadintų subjektų pripažinimo (NER) modeliui sekti ir ištiriame tokio modelio veiksmingumą laipsniškoje NER aplinkoje – mokymosi perkėlimu (TL). Mokome pradinį šaltinio duomenų model į ir perduodame jį modeliui, kuris gali nustatyti naujas NE kategorijas tiksliniuose duomenise vėlesniame etape, kai šaltinio duomenų nebeturima. Mūsų sprendimą sudaro: i) pertvarkyti ir i š naujo parametrizuoti pirmojo išmokto modelio išėjimo sluoksnį, kad būtų galima pripažinti naujas NEs; ii) palikti likusią architektūros dalį nepakitusią, kad ji būtų inicijuota parametrais, perduodamais iš pradinio modelio; and (iii) to fine tune the network on the target data.  Most importantly, we design a new NER approach based on sequence to sequence (Seq2Seq) models, which can intuitively work better in our progressive setting.  We compare our approach with a Bidirectional LSTM, which is a strong neural NER model.  Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad Seq2Seq model is veikia labai gerai standartiniu NER nustatymu ir yra tvirtesnis laipsniškai. Mūsų požiūris gali pripažinti anksčiau nepastebimas NE kategorijas, kartu išsaugodamas matomų duomenų žinias.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo di utilizzare un modello sequenza-sequenza per il riconoscimento delle entità nominate (NER) ed esploriamo l'efficacia di tale modello in un'impostazione NER progressiva - un'impostazione TL (Transfer Learning). Alleniamo un modello iniziale sui dati di origine e lo trasferiamo a un modello in grado di riconoscere nuove categorie NE nei dati di destinazione durante una fase successiva, quando i dati di origine non sono più disponibili. La nostra soluzione consiste in: (i) rimodellare e ri-parametrizzare il livello di output del primo modello appreso per consentire il riconoscimento di nuove NE; (ii) lasciare inalterato il resto dell'architettura, in modo che sia inizializzato con parametri trasferiti dal modello iniziale; e iii) ottimizzare la rete sui dati di destinazione. Soprattutto, progettiamo un nuovo approccio NER basato su modelli sequenza a sequenza (Seq2Seq), che possono funzionare intuitivamente meglio nel nostro ambiente progressivo. Confrontiamo il nostro approccio con un LSTM bidirezionale, che è un modello NER neurale forte. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che il modello Seq2Seq funziona molto bene sull'impostazione NER standard ed è più robusto nell'impostazione progressiva. Il nostro approccio è in grado di riconoscere categorie NE precedentemente invisibili preservando la conoscenza dei dati visti.", 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan untuk menggunakan urutan untuk model urutan untuk Pengenalan Entiti bernama (NER) dan kami mengeksplorasi keefektivitas model tersebut dalam tetapan NER progresif - tetapan Pelajaran Pemindahan (TL). Kami melatih model awal pada data sumber dan memindahkannya ke model yang boleh mengenali kategori NE baru dalam data sasaran semasa langkah berikutnya, apabila data sumber tidak lagi tersedia. Solusi kita terdiri dalam: (i) untuk membentuk semula dan semula parametri lapisan output model pertama yang belajar untuk memungkinkan pengenalan NEs baru; (ii) to leave the rest of the architecture unchanged, such that it is initialized with parameters transferred from the initial model;  dan (iii) untuk menyesuaikan rangkaian pada data sasaran. Yang paling penting, kita merancang pendekatan NER baru berdasarkan jujukan ke model jujukan (Seq2Seq), yang boleh berfungsi secara intuitif lebih baik dalam seting progresif kita. We compare our approach with a Bidirectional LSTM, which is a strong neural NER model.  Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa model Seq2Seq berjalan dengan baik pada tetapan NER piawai dan ia lebih kuat dalam tetapan progresif. pendekatan kita boleh mengenali kategori NE yang belum terlihat sebelumnya sambil menyimpan pengetahuan data yang terlihat.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, പേരിട്ട എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. ഇത്തരം മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രോഗ്രേവികമാ സോര്\u200dസ് ഡേറ്റായിട്ടുള്ള ഒരു ആദ്യമായ മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുകയും അതിനെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിലെ പുതിയ NE വിഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുകയും ചെയ്യുന് നമ്മുടെ പരിഹാരം ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു: (i) പുതിയ നെബുകളുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കാന്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ പഠിച്ച മോഡലിന്റെ  (ii) ബാക്കിയുള്ള ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കേറ്റ് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, അത് തുടങ്ങിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യമായ മോ (iii) ലക്ഷ്യ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും നെറ്റര്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ നെആര്\u200d പ്രാധാന്യം നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. സെക്ക്സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡലുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ നടപടിയെ ഒരു ബൈഡഡിയല്\u200d എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിംഗിനോടൊപ്പം തുല്യമാക്കുന്നു. അതൊരു ശക്തമായ നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്\u200d  Our experiments show that the Seq2Seq model performs very well on the standard NER setting and it is more robust in the progressive setting.  നമ്മുടെ സമ്പാദം മുമ്പ് അദൃശ്യമായ NE വിഭാഗങ്ങളെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d കഴിയും, കാണുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ അറിവ് സൂക', 'mt': "F'dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu li nużaw sekwenza għall-mudell ta' sekwenza għar-Rikonoxximent tal-Entità Ismija (NER) u nesploraw l-effettività ta' mudell bħal dan f'ambjent progressiv tal-NER - sett ta' Tagħlim ta' Trasferiment (TL). Aħna nħarrġu mudell inizjali dwar id-dejta tas-sors u nittrasferilha għal mudell li jista’ jirrikonoxxi kategoriji ġodda ta’ NE fid-dejta fil-mira matul pass sussegwenti, meta d-dejta tas-sors ma tkunx aktar disponibbli. Our solution consists in: (i) to reshape and re-parametrize the output layer of the first learned model to enable the recognition of new NEs;  (ii) li l-bqija tal-arkitettura ma tinbidilx, b'tali mod li tiġi inizjalizzata b'parametri trasferiti mill-mudell inizjali; u (iii) l-irfinar tan-netwerk fuq id-dejta fil-mira. L-aktar importanti huwa li niddisinjaw approċċ ġdid ta’ NER ibbażat fuq mudelli ta’ sekwenza għal sekwenza (Seq2Seq), li jistgħu jaħdmu intwittivament a ħjar fl-ambjent progressiv tagħna. Aħna nqabblu l-approċċ tagħna ma’ LSTM Bidirezzjonali, li huwa mudell NER newrali b’saħħtu. L-esperimenti tagħna juru li l-mudell Seq2Seq jaħdem tajjeb ħafna fl-istabbiliment standard NER u huwa aktar robust fl-istabbiliment progressiv. L-approċċ tagħna jista’ jirrikonoxxi kategoriji ta’ NE li ma dehrux qabel filwaqt li jippreserva l-għarfien tad-dejta li dehret.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда аталған нысандарды таңдау (NER) үшін реттеу үлгісін қолданатын және бұл үлгінің ең жақтығын NER баптауында - Transfer Learning (TL) баптауында зерттейміз. Біз көзінің деректерінің бастапқы үлгісін оқып, оны мақсатты деректерінің жаңа NE санаттарын келесі қадамда таңдай алатын үлгіге аударып, көзінің деректері қол жеткізбегенде. Біздің шешіміміз: i) жаңа NES- ді анықтау үшін бірінші оқылған үлгісінің шығыс қабатын қайта жасау және қайта параметрлеу үшін. ii) архитектураның қалдығын өзгерту үшін, ол бастапқы үлгіден аударылған параметрлермен инициализациялады; бұл параметрлер және iii) желін мақсатты деректерге түзету үшін. Ең маңызды, біз жаңа NER жағдайын реттеу (Seq2Seq) моделдеріне негізделген реттеу (Seq2Seq) моделдеріне құрамыз. Бұл өзіміздің жақсы жұмыс істеуге болады. Біз өзіміздің тәсілімізді екі бағытты LSTM- мен салыстырып, бұл күшті невралдық NER моделі. Біздің тәжірибеміздің Seq2Seq моделі стандартты NER параметрлерінде жақсы жұмыс істейді, және бұл бағдарламалық параметрлерінде жақсы жұмыс істейді. Біздің тәсіліміз көрінетін деректердің білімін сақтау үшін алдында көрсетілмеген NE санаттарын тануға болады.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник предлагаме да се користи секвенца за секвенција на моделот за препознавање на именувани ентитети (NER) и да се истражува ефикасноста на ваков модел во прогресивно поставување NER - поставување на префрлање научување (TL). Тренираме почетен модел на изворни податоци и ги пренесуваме во модел кој може да ги препознае новите категории на НЕ во металните податоци за време на следниот чекор, кога изворните податоци повеќе не се достапни. Нашето решение се: i) да го преформираме и репараметризираме слојот на излезот на првиот научен модел за да се овозможи препознавањето на новите НЕ; (ii) to leave the rest of the architecture unchanged, such that it is initialized with parameters transferred from the initial model;  и (iii) да ја пофинира мрежата на метните податоци. Најважно е да дизајнираме нов пристап на НЕР базиран на секвенца на секвенца (Seq2Seq) модели, кои интуитивно можат да работат подобро во нашето прогресивно поставување. Ние го споредуваме нашиот пристап со Бидирекционален ЛСТМ, кој е силен нервен НЕР модел. Нашите експерименти покажуваат дека моделот Seq2Seq функционира многу добро во стандардното поставување НЕР и дека е појак во прогресивното поставување. Нашиот пристап може да ги препознае претходно невидени НЕ категории и да го зачуваме знаењето на видените податоци.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэрлэгдсэн Entity Recognition (NER) загварын дарааллын загварыг ашиглах боломжтой болно. Ийм загварын үр дүнг хөгжүүлэх NER хэмжээнд судлах боломжтой болно. Бид эхний загварыг эхлээд эхний загвар өгөгдлийн талаар суралцаж, үүнийг зорилготой өгөгдлийн дараагийн алхам үед шинэ НЭ категорийг танилцуулж чадна. Бидний шийдэл нь: i) анхны сурсан загварын гаралтыг дахин шинэчлэх боломжтой, шинэ НЭС-г таних боломжтой болгох боломжтой болно. ii) бусад архитектуруудыг эхний загвараас шилжүүлсэн параметрлүүдтэй эхлээд өөрчлөгдсөн гэсэн үг. (iii) зорилготой өгөгдлийн сүлжээг сайжруулахын тулд. Хамгийн чухал нь, бид дарааллын (Seq2Seq) загварын үндсэн NER шинэ арга загварыг бүтээж чадна. Энэ нь бидний хөгжүүлэх хэмжээнд илүү сайн ажиллаж чадна. Бид өөрсдийн аргыг хоёр шугам LSTM-тэй харьцуулж байна. Энэ бол хүчтэй мэдрэлийн NER загвар. Бидний туршилтууд Seq2Seq загвар нь NER стандарт дээр маш сайн ажиллаж байгааг харуулж байна. Энэ нь хөгжүүлэх хэмжээнд илүү хүчтэй. Бидний арга зам нь өмнө нь харагдаж байгаа мэдээллийн мэдлэгийг хадгалах үед НЭ хэлбэрүүдийг харж чадна.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy zastosowanie modelu sekwencji do sekwencji dla rozpoznawania nazwanych podmiotów (NER) i zbadamy skuteczność tego modelu w ustawieniach progresywnych NER z ustawieniami Transfer Learning (TL). Szkolimy wstępny model na danych źródłowych i przekazujemy go do modelu, który może rozpoznawać nowe kategorie NE w danych docelowych w kolejnym kroku, gdy dane źródłowe nie są już dostępne. Nasze rozwiązanie polega na: (i) przekształceniu i ponownej parametryzacji warstwy wyjściowej pierwszego nauczonego modelu, aby umożliwić rozpoznanie nowych NE; (ii) pozostawić resztę architektury niezmienioną, tak aby była inicjowana z parametrami przeniesionymi z początkowego modelu; oraz (iii) dostrojenie sieci na danych docelowych. Co najważniejsze, projektujemy nowe podejście NER oparte na modelach sekwencji do sekwencji (Seq2Seq), które intuicyjnie mogą działać lepiej w naszym progresywnym ustawieniu. Porównujemy nasze podejście z dwukierunkowym LSTM, który jest silnym neuronowym modelem NER. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że model Seq2Seq sprawdza się bardzo dobrze w standardowym ustawieniu NER i jest bardziej wytrzymały w ustawieniach progresywnych. Nasze podejście może rozpoznawać wcześniej niewidziane kategorie NE przy jednoczesnym zachowaniu wiedzy o widzianych danych.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi å bruka ei rekkjefølgje for å rekna modellen for namnet entitetskjenning (NER) og vi utforskar effektiviteten av slike modellen i ein progressiv NER- innstilling – ein innstilling for overføringslæring (TL). Vi treng ein startmodell på kjeldedata og overfører det til eit modell som kan gjenkjenne nye NE- kategoriar i måldatane under ein følgjande steg når kjeldedata er ikkje lenger tilgjengeleg. Løysing vårt inneheld i: i) for å gjenoppretta og parametrira utlaget i det første lærte modellet for å slå på gjenkjenning av nye NES. ii) å la resten av arkitekturen ikkje endra, slik at han er starta med parametrar overført frå opphavsmodulet; og og iii) for å finne oppsettet på nettverket på måldata. Det viktigste er at vi design ein ny NER-tilnærming basert på sekvens til sekvensmodeller (Seq2Seq), som kan intuitivt arbeide betre i vårt progressivt innstilling. Vi sammenliknar tilnærminga vårt med ein divretning LSTM, som er ein sterk neural NER-modell. Eksperimentane våre viser at Seq2Seq-modellen utfører veldig godt på standardinnstillingane for NER, og det er mer sterkt i den progressive innstillinga. Tilnærminga vårt kan gjenkjenne førre ukjende NE- kategoriar mens det er lagra kunnskap om dei synde data.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo da koristimo sekvenciju za sekvenciju model a priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER) i istražujemo efikasnost takvog modela u progresivnom postavku NER-a - postavku prijenosnog učenja (TL). Treniramo početni model podataka izvora i prebacimo ga na model koji može prepoznati nove kategorije NE u ciljnim podacima tokom sljedećeg koraka, kada podaci izvora više nisu dostupni. Naše rješenje se sastoji u: i) da ponovno ispravimo i preparametriramo sloj izlaza prvog naučenog modela kako bi omogućilo prepoznavanje novih NES-a; ii) ostaviti ostatak arhitekture bez promjene, tako da se inicijalizuje sa parametrama prebačenim iz početnog modela; i iii) kako bi dobro sredilo mrežu na ciljnim podacima. Najvažnije, mi dizajniramo novi pristup NER-a baziran na sekvenci modela sekvence (Seq2Seq), koji može intuitivno bolje raditi u našem progresivnom stanju. Uspoređujemo naš pristup sa dvosmjernicalnim LSTM-om, što je jak neuralni model NER-a. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da se model Seq2Seq vrlo dobro izvršava na standardnom postavljanju NER-a i jača je u progresivnom postavljanju. Naš pristup može prepoznati prethodno nevidljive kategorije NH dok čuva znanje viđenih podataka.', 'so': 'In this paper, we propose to use a sequence to sequence model for Named Entity Recognition (NER) and we explore the effectiveness of such model in a progressive NER setting - a Transfer Learning (TL) setting.  Tusaale bilowga ah ayaannu ku tababarinnaa macluumaadka sourceeda waxaana u beddelinaynaa model, kaas oo ku garan kara kooxo cusub oo ku qoran macluumaadka goalka, marka aysan mar dambe helin macluumaadka sourceeda. Xaruntayadu waxay ku jirtaa: (i) si aan u cusboonaysiiyo oo u bedelayo darajada midowga hore ee lagu baray si uu u awoodo aqoonsashada Internetka cusub; (ii) inuu ka tago dhismaha kale oo aan beddelmin, taas oo uu bilowday parameters lagaga wareejiyo modelkii hore; iii) si aad u hagaajisid shabakadda macluumaadka goalka. Inta ugu muhiimsan, waxaynu qoraynaa qaab cusub ee NER oo ku saleysan qaababka soo socoshada (Seq2Seq), kaas oo si fiican uga shaqeyn kara qaabka horumarinta. Waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qaabkeenna LSTM oo ah model neurada NER oo xoog badan. Imtixaanadayada waxay muuqataa in modelka Seq2Seq si wanaagsan u sameeyo habka korsocodka NER ee caadiga ah, waana mid ka sii qalbi jaban koritaanka. Dhaqdhaheenna waxay aqoonsan kartaa kooxo aan horay u maqan NE, iyadoo la ilaalinayo aqoonta macluumaadka la arkay.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නම් ඉන්තිත් ප්\u200dරශ්නය (NER) වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න, ඒ වගේ අපි මුළු දත්තේ පටන් ගන්න පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් නිර්මාණයක් සහ ඒක අළුත් NE වර්ගයක් පටන් ගන්න පුළුවන් පටන් ගන්න, පටන් ගන අපේ විශේෂය තියෙන්නේ: (i) අළුත් NES අඳුරණය සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න සඳහා පළමුවෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්ත මොඩේලයේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය ආපහු පරාමා (i) ඉතිරිම ස්ථාපනය වෙනස් වෙන්න බැරි වෙන්න, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පටන් ගත්තා පටන් ගත්තා පටන් ගත්තා පටන් ග සහ (Ii) ලක්ෂණ දත්තේ තියෙන ජාලය සුදුසුම් කරන්න. ගොඩක් වැදගත්, අපි අළුත් NER ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් වින්යාස කරනවා, අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සැකසුම් වලින් පරීක්ෂණය (Seq2Seq) මොඩේල් වලින් අධ අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනය දුර්වත් LSTM එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, ඒක තමයි ශක්තිමත් න්\u200dයූරාල් NER මොඩේල්. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ Seq2Seq මොඩේල් හොඳට ප්\u200dරමාණය NER සැකසුම් වලින් හොඳයි කියලා, ඒක තරම් ප්\u200dරමාණය වැඩි සැකස අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පුළුවන් විදිහට පුළුවන් පුළුවන් විදිහට පුළුවන් NE වර්ගයක් දැනගන්න, දැක්ක ද', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் பெயரிடப்பட்ட விருப்பத்தை அறிதலுக்கு (NER) மற்றும் நாம் இந்த மாதிரியின் விளைவை முன்னேற நாம் மூல தரவில் ஒரு முதல் மாதிரியை பயிற்சி செய்து அதை ஒரு மாதிரியில் மாற்றுகிறோம். இது புதிய NE வகைகளை அடுத்த படியில் தெரியும், மூல தரவ எங்கள் தீர்வு உள்ளது: (i) புதிய NE புதிய புதிய அறிவை செயல்படுத்த முதல் கற்றப்பட்ட மாதிரியின் வெளியீட்டு அடுக்கை மறுஅளவாக்க (ii) to leave the rest of the architecture unchanged, such that it is initialized with parameters transferred from the initial model;  (i) இலக்கு தரவுகளின் பிணையத்தை நன்றாக ஒழுங்குவதற்கு. மிகவும் முக்கியமானது, நாம் புதிய NER முறைமையை வடிவமைக்கிறோம் தொடர்ச்சிக்கு அடிப்படையில் வரிசையில் (Seq2Seq) மாதிரிகளின் மாதிர நாங்கள் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் ஒரு Bidirectional LSTM, அது ஒரு வலிமையான நெருக்கு மாதிரி உள்ளது. நிலையான NER அமைப்பில் செக்2செக் மாதிரி நன்றாக செயல்படுகிறது மற்றும் அது முன்னேற்ற அமைப்பில் மிகவும் ஆட்டமாகும். எங்கள் அணுக்கம் முன்னால் மறைந்த NE வகுப்புகளை தெரிய முடியும்', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi att använda en sekvens till sekvensmodell för Named Entity Recognition (NER) och vi undersöker effektiviteten av en sådan modell i en progressiv NER inställning - en Transfer Learning (TL) inställning. Vi tränar en första modell på källdata och överför den till en modell som kan känna igen nya NE-kategorier i måldata under ett efterföljande steg, när källdata inte längre är tillgängliga. Vår lösning består i: (i) att omforma och parametrisera utgångslaget för den första lärda modellen för att möjliggöra erkännande av nya NE; ii) lämna resten av arkitekturen oförändrad, så att den initieras med parametrar som överförts från den ursprungliga modellen. iii) att finjustera nätverket på måldata. Viktigast av allt är att vi designar ett nytt NER-tillvägagångssätt baserat på sekvens till sekvens (Seq2Seq) modeller, som intuitivt kan fungera bättre i vår progressiva miljö. Vi jämför vårt tillvägagångssätt med en dubbelriktad LSTM, som är en stark neural NER-modell. Våra experiment visar att Seq2Seq-modellen presterar mycket bra på standard NER inställning och är mer robust i progressiv inställning. Vårt tillvägagångssätt kan känna igen tidigare osynliga NE-kategorier samtidigt som vi bevarar kunskapen om de sedda data.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem să utilizăm un model secvență la secvență pentru recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) și să explorăm eficacitatea unui astfel de model într-un cadru NER progresiv - o setare de Transfer Learning (TL). Instruim un model inițial pe datele sursă și îl transferăm către un model care poate recunoaște noi categorii NE în datele țintă în timpul unui pas ulterior, atunci când datele sursă nu mai sunt disponibile. Soluția noastră constă în: (i) remodelarea și re-parametrizarea stratului de ieșire al primului model învățat pentru a permite recunoașterea noilor EN; (ii) să lase restul arhitecturii neschimbate, astfel încât aceasta să fie inițializată cu parametrii transferați de la modelul inițial; și (iii) reglarea fină a rețelei pe datele țintă. Cel mai important, proiectăm o nouă abordare NER bazată pe modele secvență la secvență (Seq2Seq), care pot funcționa intuitiv mai bine în cadrul nostru progresiv. Comparăm abordarea noastră cu un LSTM bidirecțional, care este un model NER neural puternic. Experimentele noastre arată că modelul Seq2Seq performează foarte bine la setarea NER standard și este mai robust în setarea progresivă. Abordarea noastră poate recunoaște categoriile NE nevăzute anterior, păstrând în același timp cunoștințele datelor văzute.', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایک سفارش کا استعمال کرنا چاہتے ہیں نام دار انٹیٹی پتچانی (NER) کے لئے نمونڈل کے لئے اور ہم اس مدل کے اثبات کا تحقیق کرتے ہیں ایک progressive NER سٹینٹ میں - ایک Transfer Learning (TL) سٹینٹ میں. ہم نے سورج ڈیٹا پر پہلی موڈل کو ترینس کر لیا اور اسے ایک موڈل پر ترینس کر لیا ہے جو تالکٹ ڈیٹا میں نئی NE کاٹی پہچان سکتا ہے، جب سورج ڈیٹا اب موجود نہیں ہوتا۔ ہمارا حل یہ ہے: i) نئی NES کی پہلی سیکھی موڈل کے اپوٹٹ لائر کو دوبارہ شاپ کرنے اور دوبارہ پارامتریز کرنے کے لئے۔ (ii) باقی معماری کو بدل نہیں دینے کے لئے چھوڑ دینا، اسی طرح اس کو پہلی موڈل سے منتقل ہوئے پارامتروں سے پیدا کیا جاتا ہے۔ اور (iii) ہدایت ڈیٹ پر نیٹ ورک کو ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹھیک ٹھیک کر دینا۔ سب سے اہم بات ہے کہ ہم ایک نوی NER طراحی طراحی کریں جو سq2Seq (Seq2Seq) نمڈلوں پر بنیاد ہے، جو ہمارے پیشرفت کی تنظیم میں بہتر کام کرسکتا ہے۔ ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو ایک دودہرانی LSTM کے ساتھ مقایسہ کیا ہے، جو ایک قوی نیورل NER مدل ہے۔ ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ Seq2Seq موڈل استاندارڈ NER سٹینڈ پر بہت اچھی طرح عمل کرتا ہے اور اس سے زیادہ مضبوط ہے جو پیشرفت کی سٹینٹ میں ہے. ہمارا طریقہ پہلے غیب کی نو کائٹیوں کو پہچان سکتا ہے جب کہ دیکھے ہوئے ڈاٹیوں کے علم کو حفاظت کرتے ہیں.', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị sử dụng một dãy để tạo mô hình cho Người máy nhận dạng mang tên (NER) và chúng tôi khám phá hiệu quả của mô hình này trong một chế độ ấp phát triển của cái NER... một cài đặt truyền học (TLS). Chúng tôi đào tạo một mô hình đầu tiên về dữ liệu nguồn và chuyển nó sang một mô hình có thể nhận diện các phân loại E mới trong dữ liệu đích trong một bước sau, khi dữ liệu nguồn không còn tồn tại nữa. Giải pháp của chúng ta là: i) tái tạo lại và tái thiết hoá lớp xuất của mẫu học đầu tiên để có thể nhận dạng N mới; Một phần còn lại của kiến trúc vẫn chưa thay đổi, sẽ được khởi tạo bằng các thông số được chuyển từ mẫu ban đầu. và(III) chỉnh sửa mạng lưới vào dữ liệu đích. Quan trọng nhất, chúng tôi thiết kế một phương pháp tối tân dựa trên các mô hình lặp lại (Seq2Seq) thứ hai, mà trực tiếp có thể hoạt động tốt hơn trong môi trường tiến bộ của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi so sánh phương pháp này với kết cấu camera giao tiếp hai hướng, một mô hình thần kinh bền vững. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy mô hình Seq2Seq tiến triển rất tốt với chế độ chuẩn tối cao và nó mạnh mẽ hơn trong chế độ tiến bộ. Cách tiếp cận của chúng ta có thể nhận ra những phân loại đông cứng chưa từng thấy trong khi bảo vệ kiến thức về dữ liệu đã thấy.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz nomli narsalarni aniqlash (NER) uchun seksiyatli modeldan foydalanishni talab qilamiz va bu modelning effektligini tez qilamiz - Transfer Learning (TL) moslamalari. Biz manba maʼlumotlari haqida birinchi modelni o'rganamiz va uni qanday maʼlumot mavjud boʻlmaganda yangi NE turlarini qidirish mumkin. (i) Yangi NES ni aniqlash uchun birinchi o'rganilgan modelning natijasining darajasini qayta parametrlash va qayta parametrlash mumkin; (ii) Бошқа архивдаги ўзгаришларни ташлаш учун, чунки у аввалги усулдан ўзгартирилган параметрлар қўлланади; (iii) ma'lumot haqida tarmoqni yaxshi ko'rsatish uchun. Ko'pchilik muhim, biz sequence (Seq2Seq) modellari asosida yangi NER usulni yaratib, bu juda yaxshi ishlaydi. Biz bir xil LSTM bilan birlashtiramiz, bu juda katta neyron modeli. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz Seq2Seq modeli andoza NER moslamalarida juda yaxshi bajaradi va bu davom etishdir. Bizning qismimiz oldin maqsad NE guruhlarini aniqlash mumkin va ko'rinadigan maʼlumotni saqlash mumkin.", 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме да се използва модел последователност към последователност за разпознаване на наименовани субекти (НР) и да се изследва ефективността на този модел в прогресивна настройка на НР - настройка за трансферно обучение (ТЛ). Обучаваме първоначален модел на изходните данни и го прехвърляме към модел, който може да разпознае нови категории НЕ в целевите данни по време на следваща стъпка, когато изходните данни вече не са налични. Решението ни се състои в: (и) да преобразуваме и препараметризираме изходния слой на първия научен модел, за да позволим разпознаването на нови НЕ; да остави останалата част от архитектурата непроменена, така че да бъде инициализирана с параметри, прехвърлени от първоначалния модел; и iii) фина настройка на мрежата на целевите данни. Най-важното е, че проектираме нов подход, базиран на модели последователност към последователност (който може интуитивно да работи по-добре в нашата прогресивна настройка. Сравняваме подхода си с двупосочен ЛСТМ, който е силен невронен модел. Нашите експерименти показват, че моделът работи много добре при стандартната настройка и е по-здрав при прогресивна настройка. Нашият подход може да разпознае досега невиждани категории, като същевременно запазва познанието за наблюдаваните данни.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo da koristimo sekvenciju za sekvenciju model a priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER) i istražimo učinkovitost takvog modela u progresivnom postavku NER-a - postavku prijenosnog učenja (TL). Treniramo početni model podataka izvora i prebacimo ga na model koji može prepoznati nove kategorije NE u ciljnim podacima tijekom sljedećeg koraka, kada podaci izvora više nisu dostupni. Naša rješenje se sastoji u: i) za ponovno ispravljanje i ponovno parametriranje izlaznog sloja prvog učenog modela kako bi omogućilo prepoznavanje novih NES-a; ii) ostatak arhitekture ostaviti bez promjene, tako da se inicijalizira s parametrama prebačenim iz početnog modela; i iii) kako bi ispravili mrežu na ciljnim podacima. Najvažnije, dizajniramo novi pristup NER-a baziran na sekvenciji modela sekvencije (Seq2Seq), koji može intuitivno bolje raditi u našem progresivnom postavljanju. Uspoređujemo naš pristup s dvosmjernicalnim LSTM-om, što je jak neuronski model NER-a. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da se model Seq2Seq vrlo dobro izvršava na standardnom postavljanju NER-a i jača je u progresivnom postavljanju. Naš pristup može prepoznati previše nevidljive kategorije NE dok čuva znanje viđenih podataka.', 'da': "I denne artikel foreslår vi at bruge en sekvens til sekvens model for Navngivet Entity Recognition (NER) og vi undersøger effektiviteten af en sådan model i en progressiv NER indstilling - en Transfer Learning (TL) indstilling. Vi træner en indledende model på kildedata og overfører den til en model, der kan genkende nye NE kategorier i måldataene i et efterfølgende trin, når kildedata ikke længere er tilgængelige. Vores løsning består i: (i) at omforme og re-parametrisere outputlaget i den første lærte model for at muliggøre anerkendelse af nye NE'er; ii) at lade resten af arkitekturen være uændret, således at den initialiseres med parametre overført fra den oprindelige model og iii) at finjustere nettet på måldataene. Vigtigst af alt designer vi en ny NER tilgang baseret på sekvens til sekvens (Seq2Seq) modeller, som intuitivt kan fungere bedre i vores progressive omgivelser. Vi sammenligner vores tilgang med en Bidirectional LSTM, som er en stærk neural NER model. Vores eksperimenter viser, at Seq2Seq modellen fungerer meget godt på standard NER indstilling og er mere robust i progressive indstillinger. Vores tilgang kan genkende tidligere ukendte NE kategorier samtidig med at viden om de set data bevares.", 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we voor om een sequence to sequence model te gebruiken voor Named Entity Recognition (NER) en we onderzoeken de effectiviteit van een dergelijk model in een progressieve NER setting ten opzichte van een Transfer Learning (TL) setting. We trainen een initieel model op brongegevens en zetten deze over naar een model dat nieuwe NE-categorieën in de doeldata kan herkennen tijdens een volgende stap, wanneer de brongegevens niet meer beschikbaar zijn. Onze oplossing bestaat uit: (i) de outputlaag van het eerste geleerde model opnieuw vorm te geven en te parametriseren om nieuwe NEs te herkennen; (ii) de rest van de architectuur ongewijzigd te laten, zodat deze wordt geïnitialiseerd met parameters die uit het oorspronkelijke model worden overgedragen; en iii) het netwerk op de doelgegevens finetunen. Het belangrijkste is dat we een nieuwe NER aanpak ontwerpen gebaseerd op sequence to sequence (Seq2Seq) modellen, die intuïtief beter kunnen werken in onze progressieve setting. We vergelijken onze aanpak met een Bidirectioneel LSTM, een sterk neuraal NER model. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat het Seq2Seq model zeer goed presteert op de standaard NER instelling en het robuuster is in de progressieve setting. Onze aanpak kan voorheen ongeziene NE-categorieën herkennen met behoud van de kennis van de zichtbare gegevens.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم از یک رده برای رده\u200cگیری مدل برای شناسایی عنوان واحد نامیده (NER) استفاده کنیم و ما فعالیت این مدل را در یک تنظیم NER پیشرفته تحقیق می\u200cکنیم - یک تنظیم یادگیری انتقال (TL). ما مدل اولیه را روی داده\u200cهای منبع آموزش می\u200cدهیم و آن را به یک مدل انتقال می\u200cدهیم که می\u200cتواند کلاس\u200cهای NE ی جدید را در داده\u200cهای هدف در یک قدم بعدی شناسایی کند، زمانی که داده\u200cهای منبع دیگر دسترسی ندارد. راه حل ما در: i) برای بازسازی و دوباره پارامتریزی لایه خروجی اولین مدل یاد گرفته برای توان شناسایی NES جدید است. (ii) بقیه معماری را بدون تغییر تغییر می\u200cگذارد، که با پارامترانی که از مدل اول انتقال می\u200cشود، آغاز می\u200cشود; و و iii) تا شبکه را به اطلاعات هدف درست کند. مهمترین است، ما یک روش جدید NER را طراحی می کنیم که بر اساس ترکیب مدل\u200cهای Seq2Seq، که می\u200cتواند به طور مستقل در تنظیم پیشرفت ما بهتر کار کند. ما روش خودمان را با LSTM دو مسیر مقایسه می کنیم که یک مدل عصبی NER قوی است. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که مدل Seq2Seq در تنظیم NER استاندارد بسیار خوب انجام می دهد و در تنظیم پیشرفت قوی تر است. دستور ما می تواند قبلاً گونه\u200cهای نابینا را شناسایی کند در حالی که دانش داده\u200cهای دیده\u200cاند را حفظ می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 서열에서 서열까지의 명칭 실체 식별(NER) 모델을 사용하고 이러한 모델이 점진적 NER 설정(TL) 설정)에서의 유효성을 탐구하고자 한다.우리는 원본 데이터에서 초기 모델을 훈련하고 원본 데이터가 더 이상 사용할 수 없을 때 다음 단계에서 목표 데이터 중의 새로운 NE 유형을 식별할 수 있는 모델로 전송한다.우리의 해결 방안은 (i) 새로운 네트워크를 식별하기 위해 첫 번째 학습 모델의 출력층을 재구성하고 다시 매개 변수화하는 것을 포함한다.(ii) 초기 모델에서 전송된 파라미터를 사용하여 초기화하기 위해 체계 구조의 나머지 부분을 변하지 않는다.그리고 (iii) 목표 데이터에 따라 네트워크를 미세하게 조정합니다.무엇보다 우리는 서열부터 서열(Seq2Seq) 모델을 바탕으로 새로운 NER 방법을 설계했는데 이것은 우리의 점진적인 환경에서 더욱 잘 일할 수 있도록 직관적으로 할 수 있다.우리는 강력한 신경 네트워크 모델인 양방향 LSTM과 우리의 방법을 비교할 것이다.우리의 실험은 Seq2Seq 모델이 표준 NER 설정에서 양호하고 점진적인 설정에서 더욱 안정적임을 나타냈다.우리의 방법은 이전에 보이지 않았던 종류를 식별하고 보이는 데이터에 대한 지식을 보존할 수 있다.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir vor, ein Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modell für Named Entity Recognition (NER) zu verwenden und die Effektivität eines solchen Modells in einer progressiven NER-Einstellung gegenüber einer Transfer Learning (TL) zu untersuchen. Wir trainieren ein erstes Modell auf Quelldaten und übertragen es in ein Modell, das in einem weiteren Schritt, wenn die Quelldaten nicht mehr verfügbar sind, neue NE-Kategorien in den Zieldaten erkennen kann. Unsere Lösung besteht darin: (i) die Ausgabeschicht des ersten erlernten Modells umzuformen und neu zu parametrisieren, um die Erkennung neuer NEs zu ermöglichen; (ii) den Rest der Architektur unverändert zu lassen, so dass sie mit Parametern initialisiert wird, die vom ursprünglichen Modell übertragen wurden; und iii) Feinabstimmung des Netzes auf den Zieldaten. Vor allem entwerfen wir einen neuen NER-Ansatz basierend auf Sequenz-to-Sequenz (Seq2Seq)-Modellen, der in unserem progressiven Setting intuitiv besser funktionieren kann. Wir vergleichen unseren Ansatz mit einem bidirektionalen LSTM, einem starken neuronalen NER-Modell. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass das Seq2Seq-Modell auf der Standard-NER-Einstellung sehr gut abschneidet und im progressiven Setting robuster ist. Unser Ansatz kann bisher nicht gesehene NE-Kategorien erkennen und dabei das Wissen der gesehenen Daten bewahren.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, Ady Entity Recognition (NER) üçin bir terjime nusgasyny ulanmagy teklip edýäris we biz bu nusganyň etkinliýetini progressiýa NER düzeninde - bir Transfer öwrenme (TL) düzenini tapylýarys. Biz çeşme maglumatynda başlangyç nusgasyny öwredýäris we muny nusgasynda täze NE kategoriýalary tanap bilen nusgasyna geçirip bilýäris Bizim çözümüz şu: -i) yeniden öğrenmiş nusgaların çıkış katmanı tekrar düzenlemek ve yeniden parametrelemek üçin; (ii) Diňe arhitektura geçirilip başga bir nusga çykarmak üçin, şol sebäbi başlangıç nusgadan göçürülen parametrler bilen başlandyrylýar; we (iii) maksad maglumaty üstine aňlamak üçin. Iň wajyp bolsa, biz NER nusgasyny sequence (Seq2Seq) nusgalaryna daýanýar, bu nusgasymyzyň progressiýa düzeninde has gowy işleýär. Biziň ýaryşymyzy iki görnüş LSTM bilen karşılaştyrýarys. Bu nuýral NER nuýuly nuýuly. Biziň deneylerimiz Seq2Seq nusgasynyň standart NER düzümlerinde örän gowy işleýändigini görkezýär we ol progressiýa düzümlerde has ýigrendir. Biziň ýaryşymyz öňki görmän NE kategoriýalaryny tanap bilýär.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons voorstel om 'n reenkombinasie te gebruik om sekwensiemodel vir genoem Entiteit herkenning (NER) te gebruik en ons ondersoek die effektiviteit van sodanige model in 'n progresiewe NER instelling - 'n Oordrag Leer (TL) instelling. Ons trein 'n aanvanklike model op bron data en oordra dit na 'n model wat nuwe ne kategories in die doel data kan herken tydens' n volgende stap wanneer die bron data nie meer beskikbaar is nie. Ons oplossing bestaan in: (i) om die uitset laag van die eerste leer model te herhaal en herparametriseer om die herkening van nuwe NES te aktiveer; (ii) om die res van die arkitektuur onverander te laat word, sodat dit geïnisialiseer word met parameters wat van die aanvanklike model oordra word; en (iii) om die netwerk op die doel data te fyn. Mees belangrik, ons ontwerp 'n nuwe NER toegang gebaseer op sekwensies na sekwensies (Seq2Seq) modele, wat intuitief kan werk beter in ons progresiewe opstelling. Ons vergelyk ons toegang met 'n Bidireksionale LSTM, wat is 'n sterk neurale NER model. Ons eksperimente vertoon dat die Seq2Seq model baie goed uitvoer op die standaard NER instelling en dit is meer sterk in die progresiewe instelling. Ons toegang kan voorheen ongesien ne kategories herken terwyl die kennis van die gesien data behoort.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kutumia mfululizo wa mfululizo wa utambulisho wa Intanity (NER) na tunachunguza ufanisi wa muundo huo katika mazingira ya NER - Mfumo wa Uhamiaji (TL). We train an initial model on source data and transfer it to a model that can recognize new NE categories in the target data during a subsequent step, when the source data is no longer available.  Our solution consists in: (i) to reshape and re-parametrize the output layer of the first learned model to enable the recognition of new NEs;  (ii) kuacha ujenzi mwingine ambao haubadiliki, kwa hiyo imeanzishwa na parameters kuhamishwa kutoka kwa mtindo wa mwanzo; na iii) kuboresha mtandao wa taarifa za malengo. Kimuhimu zaidi, tunaunda mbinu mpya ya NER inayohusiana na mfumo wa mfululizo wa mfululizo (Seq2Seq), ambayo inaweza kufanya kazi vizuri katika mazingira yetu ya kuendelea. Tunaunganisha mbinu yetu na LSTM kwa njia ya moja kwa moja, ambayo ni modeli yenye nguvu ya NER. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa Mradi wa Seq2Seq unafanya kazi vizuri katika hali ya kawaida ya NER na inavutiwa zaidi katika mazingira yanayoendelea. Hatua yetu inaweza kutambua makundi yasiyofahamika yaliyopita wakati wa kulinda ufahamu wa taarifa zinazoonekana.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել հաջորդականություն անվանումների ճանաչման (ՆԵՌ) մոդելի հաջորդականության համար, և մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք նման մոդելի արդյունավետությունը առաջընթացիկ ՆԵՌ-ի միջոցով՝ հաջորդականության սովորելու (ՏԼ) միջոցով: Մենք վարժեցնում ենք սկզբնական մոդելը աղբյուրի տվյալների վրա և փոխանցում այն մոդելի վրա, որը կարող է ճանաչել նոր ՆԵ-կատեգորիաներ նպատակային տվյալների մեջ հետագա քայլի ընթացքում, երբ աղբյուրի տվյալները այ Մեր լուծումը նշանակում է i) վերաձևավորել և վերաչափել առաջին սովորված մոդելի արտադրյալ շերտը, որպեսզի հնարավոր լինի նոր ՆԵ-ների ճանաչելը: (II) ճարտարապետության մնացած մասը անփոխված թողնել, այնպես որ այն սկզբնական մոդելից փոխանցվող պարամետրերով լինի: և (ի) լավագույնել ցանցը նպատակային տվյալների վրա: Most importantly, we design a new NER approach based on sequence to sequence (Seq2Seq) models, which can intuitively work better in our progressive setting.  Մենք համեմատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը Երկու ուղղությամբ LSMT-ի հետ, որը ուժեղ նյարդային ՆԵՌ մոդել է: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ SeQ2SeQ մոդելը շատ լավ աշխատում է ստանդարտ ՆԵՌ-ի միջոցով և ավելի ուժեղ է առաջընթացիկ միջոցով: Մեր մոտեցումը կարող է ճանաչել նախկինում անտեսված ՆԵ կատեգորիաները, մինչ պահպանում է տեսանելի տվյալների գիտելիքը:', 'sq': 'In this paper, we propose to use a sequence to sequence model for Named Entity Recognition (NER) and we explore the effectiveness of such model in a progressive NER setting - a Transfer Learning (TL) setting.  We train an initial model on source data and transfer it to a model that can recognize new NE categories in the target data during a subsequent step, when the source data is no longer available.  Zgjidhja jonë përbëhet në: (i) të rindërtojmë dhe të rindërtojmë nivelin e daljes të modelit të parë të mësuar për të mundësuar njohjen e NEs të reja; (ii) to leave the rest of the architecture unchanged, such that it is initialized with parameters transferred from the initial model;  and (iii) to fine tune the network on the target data.  Most importantly, we design a new NER approach based on sequence to sequence (Seq2Seq) models, which can intuitively work better in our progressive setting.  Ne krahasojmë qasjen tonë me një LSTM dydrejtues, i cili është një model nervor NER i fortë. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se modeli Seq2Seq funksionon shumë mirë në përcaktimin standard NER dhe është më i fortë në përcaktimin progresiv. Përqasja jonë mund të njohë kategori të padukshme të NE-së përpara duke ruajtur njohurinë e të dhënave të parë.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি নামের এন্টিটি চিহ্নিত মডেল ব্যবহারের জন্য সেকেন্সের মোডেল ব্যবহার করার জন্য এবং আমরা এরকম মডেলের কার্যকর কার্যক্রম বিশেষভাবে নির্ধারণ We train an initial model on source data and transfer it to a model that can recognize new NE categories in the target data during a subsequent step, when the source data is no longer available.  Our solution consists in: (i) to reshape and re-parametrize the output layer of the first learned model to enable the recognition of new NEs;  (ii) আর্কিস্টেক্টারের বাকি পরিবর্তন ছেড়ে দেওয়ার জন্য, যেমন প্রাথমিক মডেল থেকে প্যারামিটার পরিবর্তন করা হয়েছে; আর (আই) লক্ষ্যবস্তুর তথ্যে নেটওয়ার্ক সুন্দর করার জন্য। সবচেয়ে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, আমরা একটি নতুন নতুন নতুন পদ্ধতি ডিজাইন করি সেকেন্সের (সেক্স২সেক) মডেলের উপর ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক, যা আমাদের অগ্রগতি আমরা বাইডেডিয়াল এলস্টিএম এর সাথে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ তুলনা করি, যা একটি শক্তিশালী নিউরেল মডেল। আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে সেক২সেক মডেল স্ট্যান্ডার্ডেন্ড নেআর সেটির ব্যাপারে খুব ভালো কাজ করে এবং এটা অগ্র আমাদের পদক্ষেপ পূর্বে অদৃশ্য NE বিভাগের স্বীকার করতে পারে যখন দেখা হয়েছিল তথ্যের জ্ঞান রক্ষা করে।', 'am': 'In this paper, we propose to use a sequence to sequence model for Named Entity Recognition (NER) and we explore the effectiveness of such model in a progressive NER setting - a Transfer Learning (TL) setting.  የመጀመሪያውን ምሳሌ በኩነቶች ዳታ ላይ እናስተምረዋለን እና አዲስ የNE ክፍተቶችን በአካላዊው ዳታ በሚያስታውቀው ምሳሌ እናስወግዳታለን፡፡ (i) አዲስ NES ማውቀትን ለማስችል የመጀመሪያውን ተማረ model ውጤቱን ለመመለስ እና ለመተካከል ነው፡፡ (ii) የቀረውን የመዝገብ ቤት ለዋጭ ለመውጣት፣ እንደዚህ በመጀመሪያ ሞዴል በተለወጠ parameters ለመጀመሪያ ነው፤ (iii) መረቡን በጉዳዩ ዳታዎች ለመጠቀም Most importantly, we design a new NER approach based on sequence to sequence (Seq2Seq) models, which can intuitively work better in our progressive setting.  አካሄዳችንን ከBidirectional LSTM ጋር እናሳያታለን፤ ይህም ብርቱ የNER model ነው። ፈተናዎቻችን የSeq2Seq ሞዴል በተቃውሞ የNER ማዘጋጀት ላይ እጅግ መልካም እንዲሠራ ያሳያል፡፡ የቀድሞው ያልታወቀው የአሜሪካ ክፍሎች የታየውን ዳታ እውቀት በመጠበቅ ይችላል፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, İsimli Entity Recognition (NER) modeli seçmək üçün seçmək üçün bir seçməyi təklif edirik və bu modeli progresiv NER ayarlamasında təşkil edirik - Transfer Learning (TL) qurulması. Biz mənbə məlumatının başlangıç modelini təhsil edirik və bu modelini məlumat məlumatının sonrakı adımda yeni NE kategoriyalarını tanıyabilir. Bizim çətinliyimiz: i) yeni NES-lərin tanınmasını qabilleştirmək üçün ilk öyrənmiş modellərin çıxış düzümünü yenidən yaratmaq və yenidən parametrilənməkdir. ii) qalan arhitektura dəyişiklik etmək üçün, böyük ki, ilk modelden daşınmış parametrlərlə başlanğıçlandırılır; və iii, məqsəd verilənlərə şəbəkə düzəltmək üçün. Ən vacib olanı, Seq2Seq modellərinə dayanan yeni NER metodlarını tasarlayırıq, bu bizim progresiv tərzdə daha yaxşı işləyə bilər. Biz yaxınlığımızı iki tərəfli LSTM ilə qarşılaşdırırıq ki, bu çox qüvvətli nöral NER modeli. Bizim eksperimentlərimiz Seq2Seq model in in standart NER ayarlarında çox yaxşı işlədiyini göstərir və bu, progresiv ayarlarında daha qüvvətlidir. Bizim yaxınlığımız əvvəl görmədiyimiz Nə kategoriyalarını tanıyabilir, gördüyünüz məlumatların bilgisini qoruyarkən.', 'ca': "In this paper, we propose to use a sequence to sequence model for Named Entity Recognition (NER) and we explore the effectiveness of such model in a progressive NER setting - a Transfer Learning (TL) setting.  Ensenyem un model inicial sobre les dades de fonts i la transfirim a un model que pot reconèixer noves categories de NE en les dades alvo durant un pas posterior, quan les dades de fonts ja no estan disponibles. Our solution consists in: (i) to reshape and re-parametrize the output layer of the first learned model to enable the recognition of new NEs;  (ii) to leave the rest of the architecture unchanged, such that it is initialized with parameters transferred from the initial model;  i iii) ajustar la xarxa a les dades d'objectiu. El més important és que dissenyem un nou enfocament NER basat en models de seqüència a seqüència (Seq2Seq), que poden funcionar intuïtivament millor en el nostre entorn progressiv. Comparem el nostre enfocament amb un LSTM bidireccional, que és un model neural NER fort. Els nostres experiments demostren que el model Seq2Seq funciona molt bé en el contexte normal NER i és més robust en el contexte progressiv. El nostre enfocament pot reconèixer categories de NE previament invisibles mentre preserva el coneixement de les dades vistes.", 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan untuk menggunakan urutan untuk model urutan untuk Pengenalan Entitas bernama (NER) dan kami mengeksplorasi efektivitas model tersebut dalam setting NER progresif - setting Transfer Learning (TL). Kami melatih model awal pada data sumber dan memindahkannya ke model yang dapat mengenali kategori NE baru dalam data target selama langkah berikutnya, ketika data sumber tidak lagi tersedia. Solusi kami terdiri dari: (i) untuk membentuk ulang dan parameterisasi lapisan output dari model pertama yang belajar untuk memungkinkan pengenal NEs baru; (ii) untuk meninggalkan sisa arsitektur tidak berubah, sehingga inisialisasi dengan parameter yang dipindahkan dari model awal; and (iii) to fine tune the network on the target data.  Yang paling penting, kita merancang pendekatan NER baru berdasarkan urutan ke urutan (Seq2Seq) model, yang dapat secara intuitif bekerja lebih baik dalam setting progresif kita. We compare our approach with a Bidirectional LSTM, which is a strong neural NER model.  Our experiments show that the Seq2Seq model performs very well on the standard NER setting and it is more robust in the progressive setting.  Our approach can recognize previously unseen NE categories while preserving the knowledge of the seen data.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku kasutada nimelise üksuse tuvastamise (NER) jada-jada mudelit ja uurime sellise mudeli efektiivsust progressiivses NER seadistuses - siirdeõppe (TL) seadistuses. Koolitame lähteandmete esialgse mudeli ja edastame selle mudelile, mis suudab sihtandmetes tuvastada uusi NE kategooriaid järgmise etapi jooksul, kui lähteandmed enam ei ole kättesaadavad. Meie lahendus seisneb: (i) esimese õppitud mudeli väljundkihi ümberkujundamises ja ümberkujundamises, et võimaldada uute NEde tuvastamist; ii) jätta ülejäänud arhitektuur muutmata, nii et see algatatakse algsest mudelist ülekantud parameetritega; ja iii) võrgu täpsustamine sihtandmetele. Kõige tähtsam on see, et kujundame uue NER-lähenemisviisi, mis põhineb järjestusest järjestuseni (Seq2Seq) mudelitel, mis suudavad intuitiivselt paremini töötada meie progressiivses seadmes. Võrdleme oma lähenemisviisi kahesuunalise LSTM-iga, mis on tugev neuraalne NER-mudel. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et Seq2Seq mudel toimib väga hästi standardsetel NER seadistustel ja on progressiivsetel seadistustel tugevam. Meie lähenemisviis suudab ära tunda varem nähtamatuid NE kategooriaid, säilitades samas teadmised nähtud andmetest.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo da koristimo sekvenciju za sekvenciju model a priznanja imenovanih entiteta (NER) i istražimo učinkovitost takvog modela u progresivnom postavku NER-a - postavku prijenosa (TL). Treniramo početni model podataka izvora i prebacimo ga na model koji može prepoznati nove kategorije NE u ciljnim podacima tokom sljedećeg koraka, kada podaci izvora više nisu dostupni. Naša rješenje se sastoji u: i) da ponovno ispravimo i ponovno parametriramo sloj izlaza prvog naučenog modela kako bi omogućilo prepoznavanje novih NES-a; ii) ostaviti ostatak arhitekture bez promjene, tako da se inicijalizira sa parametrama prebacenih iz početnog modela; i iii) kako bi dobro sredilo mrežu na ciljnim podacima. Najvažnije, mi dizajniramo novi pristup NER-a baziran na sekvenciji modela sekvencije (Seq2Seq), koji može intuitivno bolje raditi u našem progresivnom stanju. Uspoređujemo naš pristup sa dvosmjernicalnim LSTM-om, što je jak neuronski model NER-a. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da se model Seq2Seq vrlo dobro izvršava na standardnom postavljanju NER-a i da je jači u progresivnom postavljanju. Naš pristup može prepoznati prethodno nevidljive kategorije NE dok čuva znanje viđenih podataka.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme, että käytetään sekvenssimallia nimettyjen entiteettien tunnistamiselle (NER) ja tutkimme tällaisen mallin tehokkuutta progressiivisessa NER-ympäristössä - siirtooppimisessa (TL). Koulutamme lähdedatan alustavan mallin ja siirrämme sen malliin, joka tunnistaa kohdedatassa uusia NE-luokkia myöhemmässä vaiheessa, kun lähdetietoa ei enää ole saatavilla. Ratkaisumme koostuu: (i) ensimmäisen opitun mallin tuloskerroksen muokkaamisesta ja parametrisoinnista uusien NE:ien tunnistamiseksi; ii) jättää muu arkkitehtuuri muuttumatta siten, että se alustetaan alkuperäisestä mallista siirretyillä parametreilla; ja iii) verkon hienosäätäminen kohdetietojen perusteella. Mikä tärkeintä, suunnittelemme uuden NER-lähestymistavan, joka perustuu sekvenssi-sekvenssimalleihin (Seq2Seq), joka voi intuitiivisesti toimia paremmin progressiivisessa ympäristössä. Vertaamme lähestymistapaamme kaksisuuntaiseen LSTM-malliin, joka on vahva neuroneuron NER-malli. Kokeemme osoittavat, että Seq2Seq-malli toimii erittäin hyvin NER-vakioasetuksissa ja on vankempi progressiivisissa asetuksissa. Lähestymistapamme tunnistaa aiemmin näkemättömät NE-luokat säilyttäen samalla tiedon nähtävistä tiedoista.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme použít model sekvence na sekvenci pro rozpoznávání jmenovaných entit (NER) a zkoumat efektivitu tohoto modelu v progresivním nastavení NER oproti nastavení Transfer Learning (TL). Počáteční model na zdrojových datech trénujeme a převedeme ho do modelu, který dokáže rozpoznat nové NE kategorie v cílových datech během následného kroku, kdy již zdrojová data nejsou k dispozici. Naše řešení spočívá v: (i) přepracování a přepracování parametrizace výstupní vrstvy prvního učeného modelu tak, aby bylo možné rozpoznat nové NEs; ii) ponechat zbytek architektury beze změny, aby byl inicializován s parametry přenášenými z původního modelu; a iii) vyladit síť na cílových datech. Nejdůležitější je, že navrhujeme nový NER přístup založený na sekvenčních modelech (Seq2Seq), který může intuitivně fungovat lépe v našem progresivním nastavení. Náš přístup porovnáváme s obousměrným LSTM, což je silný neuronový NER model. Naše experimenty ukazují, že model Seq2Seq funguje velmi dobře na standardním nastavení NER a je robustnější v progresivním nastavení. Náš přístup dokáže rozpoznat dříve neviděné NE kategorie a zároveň zachovat znalost viděných dat.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo uporabo modela zaporedja v zaporedju za prepoznavanje imenovanih entitet (NER) in raziskujemo učinkovitost takega modela v napredni nastavitvi NER - nastavitvi prenosnega učenja (TL). Izobražujemo začetni model o izvornih podatkih in ga prenesemo v model, ki lahko prepozna nove kategorije NE v ciljnih podatkih v naslednjem koraku, ko izvorni podatki niso več na voljo. Naša rešitev obsega: (i) preoblikovanje in preparametrizacijo izhodne plasti prvega znanega modela, da se omogoči prepoznavanje novih NE; (ii) ostanek arhitekture ostane nespremenjen, tako da se inicializira s parametri, prenesenimi iz začetnega modela; in (iii) natančno nastavitev omrežja glede na ciljne podatke. Najpomembnejše je, da oblikujemo nov pristop NER, ki temelji na modelih zaporedja do zaporedja (Seq2Seq), ki lahko intuitivno deluje bolje v našem progresivnem okolju. Naš pristop primerjamo z dvosmernim LSTM, ki je močan nevronski model NER. Naši poskusi kažejo, da je model Seq2Seq zelo dober pri standardnih NER nastavitvah in da je robustnejši pri progresivnih nastavitvah. Naš pristop lahko prepozna prej nevidne kategorije NE, hkrati pa ohrani poznavanje videnih podatkov.', 'bo': 'In this paper, we propose to use a sequence model for Named Entity Recognition (NER) and explore the effectiveness of such model in a progressive NER setting - a Transfer Learning (TL) setting. ང་ཚོས་འབྱུང་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་འགོ་འཛུགས་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས Our solution consists in: (i) to reshape and re-parametrize the output layer of the first learned model to enable the recognition of new NEs;  (ii) to leave the rest of the architecture unchanged, such that it is initialized with parameters transferred from the initial model;  and (iii) to fine tune the network on the target data. དབྱེ་རིམ་གཙོ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོའི་སྔོན་གྲངས་ཀ་གི་མཐུན་རིམ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་གཉིས་གཡུལ་གྱི་LSTM་དང་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་Seq2Seq མ་དཔེ་གཞི་སྒྲིག་NER་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་བདེ་སྟབས་བདེ་ཞིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱིས་སྔོན་མེད་པའི་རིགས་སྔོན་མེད་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་རྟོགས་ཐུབ།', 'ha': "Ga wannan takarda, Munã buɗa mu yi amfani da wani misali da aka yi amfani da kwamfyuta masu ƙarani da aka ambaci sunan Aɗaitarwa na Entity (NER) kuma mu sami aikin wannan motel a cikin wani muhimma mai gabatar da kai-tsarin NAR - Shirin Cire Motsarwa (TL). Tuna kõre wata motsi na farko kan data na source kuma Muke shige shi zuwa wata motel wanda ke iya iya gane nau'i na NE cikin data na goan a lokacin da aka ƙara, idan ba za'a iya samar da data na source ba. Cikakcinmu na ƙunsa da: (i) don a sake sake sake fara shi, kuma ta ƙayyade ƙanshi na ƙarani na farkon da aka sanar da shi dõmin ya fara ganin masu tsarin NES; To, za'a bar masu gaba na matsayin an canza ba, kamar an fara shi da parameters wanda aka shige daga misali na farko; kuma ya sami shirin taran da ke kan data na gaba. Ga mafi muhimu, za mu ƙayyade wata rayo na NER a kan karatun misalin mutane zuwa seq2Seq (Seq2Seq), wanda yana iya amfani da aikin mafiya kyakkyawan aiki a kanan hanyoyinmu. Tuna samfane mataimakanmu da wani LTRM na Bidiridaidal, wannan misali ne mai ƙarfi na NER. Kayan jarrabayanmu sun nuna cewa misalin Seq2Seq yana tafiyar da shi mai kyauta a kan daidaita na NER na daidaita, kuma yana ƙaranci cikin shirin kewayi. MataimakinMu yana iya sanin gaibin na farkon ƙungiyõyi na NE kuma yana tsari sanin da ake fake.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים להשתמש ברצף לרצף דוגמא לזיהוי Entity בשם (NER) ואנחנו חוקרים את היעילות של דוגמא כזו בסדרה NER מתקדמת - הסדרה ללמוד העברה (TL). אנחנו מאמן מודל ראשון על מידע מקור ומעבירים אותו למודל שיכול לזהות קטגוריות NE חדשות במידע המטרה במהלך צעד אחר כך, כאשר מידע מקור כבר לא זמין. הפתרון שלנו כולל: i) להחליף מחדש ולהפרמטריז את שכבת ההוצאה של המודל הראשון ללמוד כדי לאפשר זיהוי של NEs חדשים; (ii) to leave the rest of the architecture unchanged, such that it is initialized with parameters transferred from the initial model;  ולiii) לתקן את הרשת במידע המטרה. הכי חשוב, אנחנו מעצבים גישה NER חדשה מבוססת על רצף לרצף (Seq2Seq) דוגמנים, שיכולים אינטואיטיבית לעבוד טוב יותר בסביבה התקדמות שלנו. אנחנו משווה את הגישה שלנו עם LSTM ביכיווני, שהוא מודל NER עצבי חזק. הניסויים שלנו מראים שהמודל Seq2Seq מתבצע היטב ביותר בסטנדרט NER והוא חזק יותר בסטנדרט התקדמי. Our approach can recognize previously unseen NE categories while preserving the knowledge of the seen data.', 'jv': 'Nang pebuk iki, kita mudhaya ngejaraké sistem sing berarti dadi model sing sekondirne kanggo nggawe Named EntityAtinment (NeR) lan kita ngubah efek dadi model sing apik nyeneng in modèl Progressative NeR iso nggawe aturan operasi Trasfer Learning (T L). Awak dhéwé luwih model sing sampek ing dadi nggunggo lan mbukak dadi nggawe model sing bisa dianteksi kategori NO sing dianggo kejahatan dhéwé Relative (ii) ngebah berkas maritura sing paling apik dadi bisa ngubah, dadi iki dadi wis ditumpa karo parameter sing dadi model tualke; cilik deep Daerah sing dikarepaké, kita disenyongno sistem anyar, sing basa dadi sekondirne dadi sekondirne (Seq2Seq) model, sing bisa diangkat dhéwé, kuwi diangkat dhéwé basa sing luwih nêmên. Awak dhéwé nggawe gerarungu karo Bidirectiontal LTT M , iki dadi model nyerane isi nular Awak dhéwé éntuk sing ngomong nik model Seq2Seq gak bener neng ngerasahan NR iki dadi, nik lak wis nggawe barang seneng nggawe gerakan. Ndheke awak dhéwé iso ngerasakno karo kategori Néh gak dhéwé ngerasakno perkara awak dhéwé.'}
{'en': 'Aspect-based summarization of pros and cons in unstructured product reviews', 'ar': 'تلخيص إيجابيات وسلبيات على أساس الجوانب في مراجعات المنتجات غير المنظمة', 'fr': 'Synthèse basée sur les aspects des avantages et des inconvénients dans les évaluations de produits non structurées', 'es': 'Resumen basado en aspectos de los pros y los contras de las revisiones de productos no estructuradas', 'pt': 'Resumo baseado em aspectos de prós e contras em análises de produtos não estruturadas', 'ja': '非構造化製品レビューにおける長所と短所のアスペクトベースの要約', 'zh': '盖非结构化产论中优劣总结也', 'ru': 'Аспектное обобщение «за» и «против» в неструктурированных обзорах продукции', 'hi': 'असंरचित उत्पाद समीक्षाओं में पेशेवरों और विपक्षों के पहलू-आधारित सारांशीकरण', 'ga': 'Achoimriú gné-bhunaithe ar na buntáistí agus na míbhuntáistí a bhaineann le hathbhreithnithe táirgí neamhstruchtúrtha', 'ka': 'პროცესების და კონსების სიმბოლობა არსტრუქტურაციული პროცესების რედაქტირებში', 'el': 'Περίληψη των πλεονεκτημάτων και των μειονεκτημάτων σε ανασκοπήσεις μη δομημένων προϊόντων', 'hu': 'Az előnyök és hátrányok aspektusalapú összefoglalása strukturálatlan termék értékelésekben', 'it': 'Sintesi su aspetti di pro e contro nelle recensioni di prodotti non strutturati', 'kk': 'Құрастырылмаған продукттарды қарау үшін протоколдар мен консульдердің тәртіпке негізделген тәртіпке жинақтау', 'ms': 'Ringkasan pros dan cons berdasarkan aspek dalam ulasan produk tidak terstruktur', 'ml': 'സ്ഥാപിക്കാത്ത പ്രൊജക്റ്റ് പരിശോധനങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രോസിന്റെയും കോണ്\u200dസിന്റെയും അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള സംസാ', 'lt': 'Aspektais pagrįsta naudos ir neigiamų rezultatų santrauka atliekant restruktūrizuotų produktų peržiūras', 'mk': 'Резервизација на про и непријатности во неструктурираните прегледи на производите базирана на аспекти', 'pl': 'Aspektowe podsumowanie zalet i wad w niestrukturalnych recenzjach produktów', 'mn': 'Байгуулагдсан бүтээгдэхүүний шалгалтын хувилбаруудыг харуулах', 'mt': 'Sommarju bbażat fuq l-aspetti tal-vantaġġi u l-iżvantaġġi fir-reviżjonijiet tal-prodotti mhux strutturati', 'no': 'Samandringa av prosjekt og konsoller på aspektbasert måte i utstrukturerte produktoversiktar', 'si': 'ස්ථාපනයක් නැති උපකරණ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරොක්සි සහ කොන්ස් සුරකුණු පරීක්ෂණය', 'sv': 'Aspektbaserad sammanfattning av för- och nackdelar i ostrukturerade produktrecensioner', 'ro': 'Rezumatul aspectelor pro și contra în recenziile nestructurate ale produselor', 'sr': 'Sažetanje profesora i konja na osnovu aspekta u neostrukturnim pregledima proizvoda', 'ur': 'غیر ساختہ محصولات رسانیوں میں پروس اور کانس کی نسبت پر بنیاد رکھی', 'so': 'Qiimeynta horumarinta iyo xirfadaha aan la dhisay', 'ta': 'உருவாக்கப்படாத பொருள் முடிவுகளில் பார்வையிலான சுருக்கம்', 'uz': 'Aspect-based summarization of pros and cons in unstructured product reviews', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Aspectgebaseerde samenvatting van voor- en nadelen in ongestructureerde productbeoordelingen', 'da': 'Aspektbaseret sammenfatning af fordele og ulemper i ustrukturerede produktanmeldelser', 'bg': 'Обобщение въз основа на аспекти на плюсовете и минусите в неструктурираните прегледи на продуктите', 'hr': 'Sažetak proroka i konja na osnovu aspekta u neostrukturnim pregledima proizvoda', 'ko': '방면의 비구조화된 제품 평론의 장단점을 토대로 총결하다', 'de': 'Aspektbasierte Zusammenfassung von Vor- und Nachteilen in unstrukturierten Produktbewertungen', 'fa': 'جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای پیشوایان و کنسول بر اساس نظر در تحقیقات محصولات غیرساخته', 'id': 'Penyesuaian berbasis aspek dari pros dan cons dalam penelitian produk tidak struktur', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa muhtasari wa maarufu na wataalamu katika tathmini za bidhaa zilizojengwa', 'tr': 'Döredilmez önümler we konsunlaryň ýygnamasynda görkezilişi', 'af': 'Aspekte-gebaseerde opsomming van proes en kons in onstruktureerde produktoorskou', 'sq': 'Përmbledhja bazuar në aspekte e favoreve dhe dëmeve në shqyrtimet e papërstrukturuara të prodhimeve', 'am': 'የፕሮጀክት እና አካባቢዎች የግንኙነት ጉዳይ', 'az': 'YapńĪlmadńĪńüńĪ pros v…ô cons t…ôrzl…ôrinin t…ôrzin…ô dayanńĪlmasńĪ', 'hy': 'Արժեքների և արգելքների առավելությունների և արգելքների անկառուցվածքային վերլուծություններում', 'bn': 'অক্ষুনির্মিত প্রজেক্ট পরিদর্শনে প্রোসেস এবং কন্সের সংক্ষেপের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক সংক্ষেপ', 'bs': 'Sažetak profesora i konja na osnovu aspekta u neostrukturnim pregledima proizvoda', 'ca': 'Resumen basat en aspectes dels beneficis i negatius en revisions no estructuradas de productes', 'et': 'Struktureerimata tooteülevaatete plusside ja miinuste aspektipõhine kokkuvõte', 'cs': 'Aspektové shrnutí kladů a nevýhod v nestrukturovaných recenzích produktů', 'fi': 'Aspektipohjainen yhteenveto eduista ja haitoista strukturoimattomissa tuotearvioinneissa', 'jv': 'Aspect-basic', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'סכם מבוסס על האפקטים של תועדות וקונסולים בבדיקות מוצרים לא מבוססות', 'sk': 'Povzetek prednosti in slabosti v nestrukturiranih pregledih izdelkov na podlagi vidikov', 'bo': 'དཀའ་ངལ་མེད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་ཚད་དང་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་མཛོད་བསྡུས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་'}
{'en': 'We developed three systems for generating pros and cons summaries of product reviews. Automating this task eases the writing of product reviews, and offers readers quick access to the most important information. We compared SynPat, a system based on syntactic phrases selected on the basis of valence scores, against a neural-network-based system trained to map bag-of-words representations of reviews directly to pros and cons, and the same neural system trained on clusters of word-embedding encodings of similar pros and cons. We evaluated the systems in two ways : first on held-out reviews with gold-standard pros and cons, and second by asking human annotators to rate the systems’ output on relevance and completeness. In the second evaluation, the gold-standard pros and cons were assessed along with the system output. We find that the human-generated summaries are not deemed as significantly more relevant or complete than the SynPat systems ; the latter are scored higher than the human-generated summaries on a precision metric. The neural approaches yield a lower performance in the human assessment, and are outperformed by the baseline.', 'ar': 'لقد طورنا ثلاثة أنظمة لإنشاء ملخصات إيجابيات وسلبيات لمراجعات المنتج. تعمل أتمتة هذه المهمة على تسهيل كتابة مراجعات المنتجات ، وتوفر للقراء وصولاً سريعًا إلى المعلومات الأكثر أهمية. قارنا SynPat ، وهو نظام يعتمد على عبارات نحوية تم اختيارها على أساس درجات التكافؤ ، مع نظام قائم على الشبكة العصبية تم تدريبه على تعيين تمثيلات كيس من الكلمات للمراجعات مباشرة مع الإيجابيات والسلبيات ، ونفس النظام العصبي المدرب على مجموعات من ترميزات تضمين الكلمات من إيجابيات وسلبيات مماثلة. قمنا بتقييم الأنظمة بطريقتين: أولاً عن طريق المراجعات المستمرة مع إيجابيات وسلبيات المعيار الذهبي ، وثانيًا عن طريق مطالبة المعلقين بتقييم مخرجات الأنظمة وفقًا لمدى ملاءمتها واكتمالها. في التقييم الثاني ، تم تقييم إيجابيات وسلبيات المعيار الذهبي جنبًا إلى جنب مع مخرجات النظام. نجد أن الملخصات التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة الإنسان لا تعتبر أكثر صلة أو اكتمالًا بشكل ملحوظ من أنظمة SynPat ؛ يتم تسجيل الأخير أعلى من الملخصات التي أنشأها الإنسان على مقياس الدقة. تؤدي الأساليب العصبية إلى أداء أقل في التقييم البشري ، ويتفوق عليها خط الأساس.', 'pt': 'Desenvolvemos três sistemas para gerar resumos de prós e contras de análises de produtos. Automatizar essa tarefa facilita a redação de análises de produtos e oferece aos leitores acesso rápido às informações mais importantes. Comparamos o SynPat, um sistema baseado em frases sintáticas selecionadas com base em pontuações de valência, com um sistema baseado em rede neural treinado para mapear representações de pacotes de palavras de avaliações diretamente para prós e contras, e o mesmo sistema neural treinado em grupos de codificações de incorporação de palavras de prós e contras semelhantes. Avaliamos os sistemas de duas maneiras: primeiro em revisões prolongadas com prós e contras padrão-ouro, e segundo pedindo a anotadores humanos para avaliar a saída dos sistemas quanto à relevância e integridade. Na segunda avaliação, os prós e contras do padrão-ouro foram avaliados juntamente com a saída do sistema. Achamos que os resumos gerados por humanos não são considerados significativamente mais relevantes ou completos do que os sistemas SynPat; os últimos são pontuados mais alto do que os resumos gerados por humanos em uma métrica de precisão. As abordagens neurais apresentam um desempenho inferior na avaliação humana e são superadas pela linha de base.', 'es': 'Desarrollamos tres sistemas para generar resúmenes de los pros y los contras de las reseñas de productos. La automatización de esta tarea facilita la redacción de reseñas de productos y ofrece a los lectores un acceso rápido a la información más importante. Comparamos SynPat, un sistema basado en frases sintácticas seleccionadas en función de las puntuaciones de valencia, con un sistema basado en redes neuronales entrenado para mapear las representaciones de la bolsa de palabras de las reseñas directamente a los pros y los contras, y el mismo sistema neuronal entrenado en grupos de codificaciones que incorporan palabras de pros y contras similares contras. Evaluamos los sistemas de dos maneras: primero en las revisiones realizadas con los pros y los contras del estándar de oro, y en segundo lugar, pidiendo a los anotadores humanos que calificaran la producción de los sistemas según su relevancia e integridad. En la segunda evaluación, se evaluaron los pros y los contras del patrón oro junto con la producción del sistema. Encontramos que los resúmenes generados por humanos no se consideran significativamente más relevantes o completos que los sistemas SynPat; estos últimos tienen una puntuación más alta que los resúmenes generados por humanos en una métrica de precisión. Los enfoques neuronales producen un rendimiento inferior en la evaluación humana y son superados por la línea de base.', 'fr': "Nous avons développé trois systèmes pour générer des résumés des avantages et des inconvénients des évaluations de produits. L'automatisation de cette tâche facilite la rédaction des avis produits et permet aux lecteurs d'accéder rapidement aux informations les plus importantes. Nous avons comparé SynPat, un système basé sur des phrases syntaxiques sélectionnées sur la base de scores de valence, à un système basé sur un réseau de neurones formé pour mapper les représentations de sacs de commentaires directement aux avantages et aux inconvénients, et le même système neuronal formé sur des grappes de codages d'intégration de mots de pros et contre. Nous avons évalué les systèmes de deux manières\xa0: d'abord sur des revues tenues avec des avantages et des inconvénients de référence, et ensuite en demandant à des annotateurs humains d'évaluer les résultats des systèmes en fonction de leur pertinence et de leur exhaustivité. Dans la deuxième évaluation, les avantages et les inconvénients de l'étalon-or ont été évalués ainsi que les résultats du système. Nous constatons que les résumés générés par l'homme ne sont pas considérés comme significativement plus pertinents ou complets que les systèmes SynPat\xa0; ces derniers sont mieux notés que les résumés générés par l'homme sur une métrique de précision. Les approches neuronales produisent des performances inférieures dans l'évaluation humaine et sont surpassées par la référence.", 'ja': '製品レビューの長所と短所の要約を生成するための3つのシステムを開発しました。 このタスクを自動化することで、製品レビューの書き込みが容易になり、読者が最も重要な情報にすばやくアクセスできるようになります。 私たちは、価値スコアに基づいて選択された構文フレーズに基づくシステムであるSynPatを、レビューの単語のバッグ表現を利点と欠点に直接マッピングするようにトレーニングされたニューラルネットワークベースのシステムと比較しました。同じニューラルネットワークシステムは、同様の利点と欠点の単語埋め込みエンコードのクラスタでトレーニングされました。 私たちは、2つの方法でシステムを評価しました。1つ目は、ゴールドスタンダードの長所と短所を持つホールドアウトのレビューで、2つ目は、人間の注釈者にシステムの出力を関連性と完全性で評価するように依頼しました。 2回目の評価では、システム出力とともにゴールドスタンダードの長所と短所を評価した。 ヒトが生成したサマリーは、SynPatシステムよりも有意に関連性が高い、または完全であるとは見なされていないことがわかります。SynPatシステムは、精度メトリックのヒトが生成したサマリーよりも高いスコアです。 神経アプローチは、ヒト評価においてより低いパフォーマンスをもたらし、ベースラインよりも優れている。', 'zh': '开三统,成品论摘要。 自行简物论编次,且使读者速访最。 以SynPat(一本于效价分数之句法短语)比之于神经网络,当以训练,可将论单词袋直映优劣,同神经系统相似优劣之词嵌编码集群上。 以两法质之:一曰黄金之论,次曰人伦之相关性,次曰完整性之评分。 于再评估中,估黄金之优劣及系统输出。 吾见生成之摘要,不关SynPat统; 后之精量得分高于人摘要。 神经法生于人,而优于基线。', 'hi': 'हमने उत्पाद समीक्षाओं के पेशेवरों और विपक्षों के सारांश उत्पन्न करने के लिए तीन प्रणालियां विकसित कीं। इस कार्य को स्वचालित करना उत्पाद समीक्षाओं के लेखन को आसान बनाता है, और पाठकों को सबसे महत्वपूर्ण जानकारी तक त्वरित पहुंच प्रदान करता है। हमने SynPat की तुलना की, जो वैलेंस स्कोर के आधार पर चुने गए वाक्यात्मक वाक्यांशों पर आधारित एक प्रणाली है, एक तंत्रिका-नेटवर्क-आधारित प्रणाली के खिलाफ जो सीधे पेशेवरों और विपक्षों के लिए समीक्षाओं के बैग-ऑफ-वर्ड्स प्रतिनिधित्व को मैप करने के लिए प्रशिक्षित है, और समान पेशेवरों और विपक्षों के शब्द-एम्बेडिंग एन्कोडिंग के समूहों पर प्रशिक्षित एक ही तंत्रिका प्रणाली है। हमने दो तरीकों से सिस्टम का मूल्यांकन किया: पहला सोने के मानक पेशेवरों और विपक्षों के साथ आयोजित-आउट समीक्षाओं पर, और दूसरा मानव एनोटेटरों को प्रासंगिकता और पूर्णता पर सिस्टम के आउटपुट को रेट करने के लिए कहकर। दूसरे मूल्यांकन में, सिस्टम आउटपुट के साथ-साथ सोने के मानक पेशेवरों और विपक्षों का मूल्यांकन किया गया था। हम पाते हैं कि मानव-जनित सारांश को SynPat सिस्टम की तुलना में काफी अधिक प्रासंगिक या पूर्ण नहीं माना जाता है; उत्तरार्द्ध एक परिशुद्धता मीट्रिक पर मानव-जनित सारांश की तुलना में अधिक स्कोर किए जाते हैं। तंत्रिका दृष्टिकोण मानव मूल्यांकन में कम प्रदर्शन करते हैं, और बेसलाइन द्वारा बेहतर प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы разработали три системы для генерирования обзоров продуктов в категориях «за» и «против». Автоматизация этой задачи облегчает написание отзывов о продуктах и предлагает читателям быстрый доступ к самой важной информации. Мы сравнили SynPat, систему, основанную на синтаксических фразах, выбранных на основе валентных баллов, с нейросетевой системой, обученной отображать мешочно-слововые представления отзывов непосредственно плюсам и минусам, и той же нейронной системой, обученной на кластерах словосочетаний кодировок схожих плюсов и минусов. Мы оценивали системы двумя способами: во-первых, по невыполненным отзывам с «за» и «против» золотого стандарта, и, во-вторых, попросив людей-аннотаторов оценить результаты систем по релевантности и полноте. Во второй оценке наряду с выходом системы были оценены плюсы и минусы золотого стандарта. Мы обнаружили, что составленные человеком сводки не считаются значительно более релевантными или полными, чем системы SynPat; последние оцениваются выше, чем составленные человеком сводки по прецизионной метрике. Нейронные подходы дают более низкую производительность в оценке человека и превосходят базовые показатели.', 'ga': "D'fhorbraíomar trí chóras chun achoimrí buntáistí agus míbhuntáistí a ghiniúint ar athbhreithnithe táirgí. Má dhéantar an tasc seo a uathoibriú, éascaítear scríobh léirmheasanna ar tháirgí, agus tairgeann sé rochtain thapa do léitheoirí ar an bhfaisnéis is tábhachtaí. Rinneamar comparáid idir SynPat, córas atá bunaithe ar fhrásaí comhréire a roghnaíodh ar bhonn scóir valence, i gcoinne córais néar-bhunaithe atá bunaithe ar líonra atá oilte chun léiriúcháin mhála focal na n-athbhreithnithe a mhapáil go díreach chuig buntáistí agus míbhuntáistí, agus cuireadh oiliúint ar an gcóras néarúil céanna ar. cnuasaigh ionchóduithe leabú focal ar buntáistí agus míbhuntáistí comhchosúla. Rinneamar measúnú ar na córais ar dhá bhealach: ar dtús ar athbhreithnithe a cuireadh i gcrích a raibh buntáistí agus míbhuntáistí ag baint leo ar chaighdeán ór, agus ar an dara dul síos, trí iarraidh ar anótálaithe daonna aschur na gcóras a rátáil ar ábharthacht agus iomláine. Sa dara meastóireacht, rinneadh measúnú ar na buntáistí agus na míbhuntáistí órchaighdeán mar aon le haschur an chórais. Faighimid amach nach meastar na hachoimrí a ghintear ag an duine a bheith i bhfad níos ábhartha nó níos iomláine ná na córais SynPat; faightear scór níos airde ar na cinn deiridh ná na hachoimrí a ghintear ag an duine ar bheachtmhéadrach. Cruthaíonn na cineálacha cur chuige néaracha feidhmíocht níos ísle sa mheasúnú daonna, agus sáraítear iad ag an mbunlíne.", 'el': 'Αναπτύξαμε τρία συστήματα για τη δημιουργία συμπερασμάτων υπέρ και κατά των αξιολογήσεων προϊόντων. Η αυτοματοποίηση αυτής της εργασίας διευκολύνει τη συγγραφή αξιολογήσεων προϊόντων και προσφέρει στους αναγνώστες γρήγορη πρόσβαση στις πιο σημαντικές πληροφορίες. Συγκρίναμε το SynPat, ένα σύστημα βασισμένο σε συντακτικές φράσεις που επιλέγονται με βάση τις βαθμολογίες valence, με ένα σύστημα βασισμένο σε νευρωνικό δίκτυο εκπαιδευμένο να χαρτογραφεί τις αναπαραστάσεις των κριτικών απευθείας σε υπέρ και κατά, και το ίδιο νευρωνικό σύστημα εκπαιδευμένο σε ομάδες κωδικοποιήσεων ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων παρόμοιων υπέρ και κατά. Αξιολογήσαμε τα συστήματα με δύο τρόπους: πρώτον σε καθυστερημένες αξιολογήσεις με πλεονεκτήματα και μειονεκτήματα χρυσού προτύπου και δεύτερον ζητώντας από τους ανθρώπινους σχολιαστές να αξιολογήσουν την παραγωγή των συστημάτων ως προς τη συνάφεια και την πληρότητα. Στη δεύτερη αξιολόγηση, αξιολογήθηκαν τα πλεονεκτήματα και τα μειονεκτήματα των χρυσών προτύπων μαζί με την παραγωγή του συστήματος. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι οι περιλήψεις που παράγονται από τον άνθρωπο δεν θεωρούνται σημαντικά πιο σχετικές ή πλήρεις από τα συστήματα SynPat. οι τελευταίες βαθμολογούνται υψηλότερες από τις περιλήψεις που παράγονται από τον άνθρωπο σε μετρική ακρίβεια. Οι νευρωνικές προσεγγίσεις αποδίδουν χαμηλότερη απόδοση στην ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση, και ξεπερνούν από τη βάση.', 'hu': 'Három rendszert fejlesztettünk ki a termék értékelések előnyeinek és hátrányainak összefoglalására. A feladat automatizálása megkönnyíti a termék értékelések írását, és gyors hozzáférést biztosít az olvasóknak a legfontosabb információkhoz. Összehasonlítottuk a SynPat rendszert, amely a valencia pontszámok alapján kiválasztott szintaktikus kifejezéseken alapul, egy olyan neurális hálózat alapú rendszerrel, amely arra képzett, hogy közvetlenül feltérképezze a vélemények zsák-of-word reprezentációit előnyökkel és hátrányokkal, és ugyanazzal az idegrendszerrel, amelyet hasonló előnyökkel és hátrányokkal rendelkező szóbeágyazó kódolások klasztereire képzettek. A rendszereket kétféleképpen értékeltük: először az aranyszabású előnyökkel és hátrányokkal rendelkező tartós értékelések alapján, másodszor pedig arra kértük az emberi kommentátorokat, hogy értékeljék a rendszer kimenetét relevanciája és teljessége alapján. A második értékelés során a rendszer teljesítményével együtt értékeltük az aranyszabású előnyöket és hátrányokat. Megállapítjuk, hogy az ember által generált összefoglalók nem tekinthetők lényegesen relevánsabbnak vagy teljesebbnek, mint a SynPat rendszerek; az utóbbiak pontszáma nagyobb, mint az ember által készített összefoglalók pontossági mutatója. A neurális megközelítések alacsonyabb teljesítményt eredményeznek az emberi értékelésben, és a kiindulási érték túlteljesíti őket.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ სამი სისტემის განვითარება პროექტის რესუმენტების პროექტის და კონსების რესუმენტების შექმნა. ამ დავალების ავტომატიკურად გამოყენება პროდისტის განახლების დაწერა და კითხველებს ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაციისთვის გახსნა. ჩვენ SynPat, სინტექტიკური ფრაზების ბაზაზე, რომლებიც გავალენციის წერტილებების ბაზაზე მონიშნული სისტემის შემდეგ, ნეიროლური ქსელის ბაზატიული სისტემის შემდეგ, რომლებიც გამოკითხვა სიტყვების გამოსახულებების გამოსახულება პროსი და კონსზე, და იგივე ნ ჩვენ სისტემებს ორი გზით გავუმუშაოთ: პირველად საკუთარი განსხვავებაში, საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი და საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი საკუთარი და დასრულებაზე მეორე განსაზღვრებით, სისტემის გამოყენებას დააწყებული gold-standard pros და cons. ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ ადამიანის შექმნა რეზიუმენტები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია ან დასრულებულია სინპოტის სისტემაზე; შემდეგ უფრო მეტრიკის შექმნა ადამიანის შექმნილი რეზიუმენტები. ნეიროლური მიღება ადამიანის განსაზღვრებით უფრო კეთესია და უფრო კეთესია.', 'it': "Abbiamo sviluppato tre sistemi per generare riassunti pro e contro delle recensioni dei prodotti. L'automazione di questo compito facilita la scrittura delle recensioni dei prodotti e offre ai lettori un rapido accesso alle informazioni più importanti. Abbiamo confrontato SynPat, un sistema basato su frasi sintattiche selezionate sulla base dei punteggi di valenza, con un sistema basato su reti neurali addestrato a mappare le rappresentazioni bag-of-words delle recensioni direttamente a pro e contro, e lo stesso sistema neurale addestrato su cluster di codifica word-embedding di pro e contro simili. Abbiamo valutato i sistemi in due modi: in primo luogo su revisioni durate con pro e contro gold-standard, e in secondo luogo chiedendo agli annotatori umani di valutare l'output dei sistemi in base alla pertinenza e completezza. Nella seconda valutazione sono stati valutati i pro e i contro gold-standard insieme all'output del sistema. Riteniamo che i riassunti generati dall'uomo non siano ritenuti significativamente più pertinenti o completi dei sistemi SynPat; questi ultimi hanno un punteggio superiore ai riassunti generati dall'uomo su una metrica di precisione. Gli approcci neurali producono una performance inferiore nella valutazione umana e sono superati dal basale.", 'kk': 'Біз үш жүйе продукттарды қарау және консульттердің тұжырымдамасын құру үшін жасадық. Бұл тапсырма автоматты түрде продуктты қарау жазуды жасап, оқушыларға ең маңызды мәліметтерге тез қатынау мүмкіндігін ұсынады. Біз SynPat- ті, көзгертілген синтактикалық сөздерге негізінде таңдалған синтактикалық сөздер жүйесіне салыстырып, көзгертілген сөздер тізбекті про мен cons- ге салыстырылған неврал желінің негізінде салыстырылған жүйесіне салыстырып, ұқсас про мен cons- тің сөздерді ендір Біз жүйелерді екі түрде бағаладық: біріншіден алтын- стандартты пропро мен консульттермен, екіншіден адамдардың жаңартушыларының жүйелердің шығысын маңызды және толықтығында тең етуін сұрақтар. Екінші оқиғанда алтын стандартты протоколдар мен консульдер жүйелік шығысының бірге оқиғалады. Біз адам құрылған тұжырымдамалар SynPat жүйелерінен артық немесе толық деп ойламайды. соңғылар адамдардың құрылған тұжырымдамасынан артық. Невралдық жағдайлары адамды бағалау үшін төменгі жұмыс істейді, және негізгі жолдар бойынша жұмыс істейді.', 'mk': 'Развивме три системи за генерирање професионални и негативни резултати на прегледот на производите. Автоматизацијата на оваа задача го олеснува пишувањето на рецензиите на производите и им нуди на читателите брз пристап до најважните информации. Ние го споредивме СинПат, систем базиран на синтактички фрази избрани врз основа на валенциските резултати, со систем базиран на неврална мрежа трениран за да ги мапира резултатите на рецензиите директно на про и противници, и истиот неврален систем трениран на групи на кодирање на зборови со слични про и противници. Ги проценивме системите на два начини: прво на одржаните рецензии со златни стандардни про и противници, и второ барајќи од човечките анотатори да го оценат излезот на системите на релевантност и комплетност. Во втората оценка, златните стандардни про и противности беа оценети заедно со системскиот излез. Најдовме дека резултатите генерирани од човекот не се сметаат за значително поврзани или комплетни од системите SynPat; Последните се оценети повисоки од резултатите генерирани од човекот на прецизна метрика. The neural approaches yield a lower performance in the human assessment, and are outperformed by the baseline.', 'lt': 'Sukūrėme tris sistemas gaminant produktų apžvalgų naudos ir neigiamų rezultatų santraukas. Automatizuoti šią užduotį palengvina produktų peržiūrų rašymą ir suteikia skaitytojams greitą prieigą prie svarbiausios informacijos. Mes palyginome SynPat, sistemą, pagrįstą sintaktinėmis frazėmis, pasirinktomis remiantis valencijos rezultatais, su sistemą, pagrįstą nerviniu tinklu, apmokytą žemėlapiuoti persvarstymų maišelius su žodžiais, tiesiogiai su pros ir cons, ir tą pačią nervinę sistemą, apmokytą panašių pros ir cons žodžių įdėjimo kodų klasteriais. Mes vertinome sistemas dviem būdais: pirma, atliekant išlaikytas peržiūras su aukso standartais atitinkančiais pranašumais ir neigiamais pranašumais, antra, prašydami žmogaus anotatorių įvertinti sistemų rezultatus pagal svarbą ir išsamumą. Antrajame vertinime buvo įvertintos aukso standartinės naudos ir neigiamos vertės kartu su sistemos išėjimu. Manome, kad žmonių sukeltos santraukos nėra laikomos reikšmingesnėmis ar išsamesnėmis nei SynPat sistemos; pastarųjų rezultatai yra didesni už žmogaus sukeltas santraukas tikslia metrine verte. Žmogaus vertinimo rezultatai yra mažesni dėl nervinių metodų ir yra didesni už pradinį.', 'ms': 'Kami mengembangkan tiga sistem untuk menghasilkan ringkasan pros dan cons dari ulasan produk. Automatikan tugas ini memudahkan penulisan ulasan produk, dan menawarkan pembaca akses cepat kepada maklumat yang paling penting. Kami membandingkan SynPat, sistem berdasarkan frasa sintaktik yang dipilih berdasarkan skor valensi, melawan sistem berdasarkan rangkaian-saraf dilatih untuk memetakan persembahan beg-perkataan ulasan secara langsung kepada pros dan cons, dan sistem saraf yang sama dilatih pada kumpulan pengekodan perkataan-embedding pros dan cons yang sama. Kami menilai sistem dalam dua cara: pertama pada penilaian yang ditahan-keluar dengan pros dan kons piawai emas, dan kedua dengan meminta penganotator manusia untuk menilai output sistem pada relevan dan keseluruhan. Dalam penilaian kedua, pros dan cons piawai emas telah diuji bersama dengan output sistem. We find that the human-generated summaries are not deemed as significantly more relevant or complete than the SynPat systems;  nilai yang terakhir lebih tinggi daripada ringkasan yang dihasilkan oleh manusia pada metrik ketepatan. Pendekatan saraf memberikan prestasi yang lebih rendah dalam penilaian manusia, dan dilakukan oleh dasar asas.', 'ml': 'We developed three systems for generating pros and cons summaries of product reviews.  ഈ ജോലി സ്വയം പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളിലേക്ക് എഴുതുന്നത് എളുപ്പമാക്കുന്നു. വായിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് വേഗം വിവരങ വാലന്\u200dസ് സ്കോര്\u200dസ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200d സിന്\u200dപാറ്റിനെ നമ്മള്\u200d തുല്യമാക്കിയ ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് സജ്ജീകരിച്ചത്, ഒരു ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കും വാക്കുകളുടെയും പ്രോസിന്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു വഴിയില്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമുകളെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തി: ആദ്യം സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്ഥാന പ്രോസിന്റെയും കോണ്\u200dസുകളുമായി പുറത്ത് നില്\u200dക്കുന്ന പരിശോധനങ് രണ്ടാമത്തെ വിലയില്\u200d, സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണസ്ഥാനമായ പ്രോസിന്\u200dറെയും കോണ്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെയും സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്\u200dറെ ഫലത്തിന്\u200dറെയും കൂ മനുഷ്യരുടെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സിന്\u200dപാറ്റ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഏറ്റവും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d  മനുഷ്യരുടെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ട വേളകങ്ങളെക്കാള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ന്യൂറല്\u200d അടുത്തുവരുന്നത് മനുഷ്യരുടെ അഭിപ്രായത്തില്\u200d കുറച്ച് പ്രകടനം കൊണ്ട് വരുന്നു. പിന്നെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില', 'pl': 'Opracowaliśmy trzy systemy do generowania podsumowań za i przeciw recenzji produktów. Automatyzacja tego zadania ułatwia pisanie recenzji produktów i oferuje czytelnikom szybki dostęp do najważniejszych informacji. Porównaliśmy SynPat, system oparty na frazach składniowych wybranych na podstawie wyników walencyjnych, z systemem opartym na sieci neuronowej przeszkolonym do mapowania bag-of-words reprezentacji recenzji bezpośrednio na plusy i minusy, a także ten sam układ neuronowy przeszkolony na klastrach kodowań osadzających słowa o podobnych plusach i minusach. Oceniliśmy systemy na dwa sposoby: po pierwsze na wstrzymanych recenzjach ze złotym standardem zaletami i wadami, a po drugie poprzez poproszenie ludzkich adnotatorów o ocenę wyników systemów pod kątem adekwatności i kompletności. W drugiej ocenie oceniono zalety i wady standardowe złota wraz z wydajnością systemu. Uważamy, że streszczenia generowane przez człowieka nie są uważane za znacznie bardziej istotne lub kompletne niż systemy SynPat; te ostatnie są oceniane wyżej niż podsumowania generowane przez człowieka na wskaźniku precyzyjnym. Podejścia neuronowe dają niższą wydajność w ocenie człowieka i są przewyższone przez bazę wyjściową.', 'ro': 'Am dezvoltat trei sisteme pentru generarea rezumatelor pro și contra ale recenziilor produselor. Automatizarea acestei sarcini facilitează scrierea recenziilor produselor și oferă cititorilor acces rapid la cele mai importante informații. Am comparat SynPat, un sistem bazat pe fraze sintactice selectate pe baza scorurilor de valență, cu un sistem bazat pe rețea neurală instruit să cartografieze reprezentările sac de cuvinte ale recenziilor direct la argumente pro și contra, și același sistem neural instruit pe clustere de codări de cuvinte de încorporare a unor argumente pro și contra similare. Am evaluat sistemele în două moduri: în primul rând pe recenzii susținute cu argumente pro și contra de aur standard, și în al doilea rând prin solicitarea adnotatorilor umani să evalueze rezultatele sistemelor în funcție de relevanță și completitudine. În cea de-a doua evaluare au fost evaluate avantajele și contra standard aur, împreună cu rezultatele sistemului. Considerăm că rezumatele generate de om nu sunt considerate semnificativ mai relevante sau complete decât sistemele SynPat; acestea din urmă au un scor mai mare decât rezumatele generate de om pe o metrică de precizie. Abordările neuronale produc o performanță mai scăzută în evaluarea umană și sunt depășite de valoarea inițială.', 'mt': "Żviluppajna tliet sistemi biex niġġeneraw sommarji tal-pros u l-konsegwenzi tar-reviżjonijiet tal-prodotti. L-awtomatizzazzjoni ta’ dan il-kompitu tiffaċilita l-kitba tar-reviżjonijiet tal-prodotti, u toffri lill-qarrejja aċċess rapidu għall-aktar informazzjoni importanti. Qabbelna SynPat, sistema bbażata fuq frażijiet sintattiċi magħżula fuq il-bażi tal-punteġġi tal-valenza, ma’ sistema bbażata fuq netwerk newrali mħarrġa biex timmappa r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-borża tal-kliem ta’ reviżjonijiet direttament għal pros u cons, u l-istess sistema newrali mħarrġa fuq raggruppamenti ta’ kodiċijiet tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem ta’ pros u cons simili. Aħna evalwajna s-sistemi b'żewġ modi: l-ewwel fuq reviżjonijiet miżmuma b'pros u cons standard tad-deheb, u t-tieni billi talbu lill-annotaturi umani biex jirrappreżentaw ir-riżultati tas-sistemi fuq ir-rilevanza u l-kompletezza. Fit-tieni evalwazzjoni, il-pros u l-konsegwenzi standard tad-deheb ġew ivvalutati flimkien mal-output tas-sistema. Issibu li s-sommarji ġġenerati mill-bniedem mhumiex meqjusa bħala sinifikanti aktar rilevanti jew kompleti mis-sistemi SynPat; the latter are scored higher than the human-generated summaries on a precision metric.  L-approċċi newrali jagħtu prestazzjoni aktar baxxa fil-valutazzjoni tal-bniedem, u jitwettqu aktar mil-linja bażi.", 'mn': 'Бид бүтээгдэхүүний шинжлэх ухааныг бүтээхэд гурван системийг бүтээсэн. Энэ үйл ажиллагааг автоматжуулах нь бүтээгдэхүүний шинжилгээ бичиж, уншигчид хамгийн чухал мэдээлэл дээр хурдан хүрэх боломжтой болгодог. Бид SynPat-г харьцуулсан синтактик хэлбэрүүдийн үндсэн системийг харьцуулсан юм. Яг ижил про, cons хоёр хэлбэрүүдийн шинжлэх ухааны хэлбэрүүдийн хэлбэрээр сонгогдсон хэлбэрүүдийн үндсэн системээс харьцуулсан. Бид системийг хоёр аргаар үнэлгээд үзсэн: эхлээд алт-стандарт пропро, конус, хоёр дахь нь хүмүүсийн анзаарагчид системийн үр дүнг хамаарах болон бүрэлдүүлэхийг хүсэж байлаа. Хоёр дахь дүгнэлт, алтын стандарт профис, конус нь системийн гаралтай хамт дүгнэсэн. Бид хүн төрөлхтний бий болсон жишээлүүдийг SynPat системээс илүү чухал эсвэл бүрэн гэж үздэггүй. Эдгээр нь хүн төрөлхтний бий болсон жишээнээс илүү өндөр тоо. Тархи мэдрэлийн ойлголт нь хүн төрөлхтний үнэлгээнд бага үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, үндсэн шугам нь үр дүнтэй.', 'sr': 'Razvili smo tri sistema za proizvodnju sažetaka proizvodnja i konzulata. Automatizacija ovog zadatka olakšava pisanje pregleda proizvoda i nudi čitačima brz pristup najvažnijim informacijama. Usporedili smo SynPat, sistem baziran na sintaktičkim rečenicama odabranim na temelju rezultata valencije, protiv sistema na neuromreži obučenog za mapiranje reprezentacija reèi direktno prema prosidima i konjima, i isti neuralni sistem obučen na skupinu reèi uključenih kodiranja sličnih prosida i konjima. Procjenjivali smo sisteme na dva načina: prvo na održanim pregledima sa zlatnim standardnim proročanstvima i konjima, a drugo tražeći ljudske annotatore da procene izlaz sistema na relevantnost i kompletnost. U drugoj procjeni, zlatni standardni profesionalci i konji su procenili zajedno sa output sistema. Smatramo da sažetke proizvedene ljudima ne smatraju značajno važnijim ili kompletnijim od sistema SynPat-a; Posljednji su rezultati veći od sažetaka proizvedenih ljudima na preciznoj metrici. Neuralni pristupi pružaju manju učinku u ljudskoj procjeni, a to je iznad početne linije.', 'no': 'Vi utvikla tre systemer for å laga pros- og kons- sammendragar av produktoversiktar. Dette oppgåva gjer automatisk skriving av produktoversyningar, og tilbyr lesarar raskt tilgang til den viktigste informasjonen. Vi samanlikna SynPat, eit systemet basert på syntaktiske frasar som er valde på grunnlag av val- poeng, mot eit neiralnettverksbasert system som er trent til å kartera bagen av ord- representasjonar av reviewar direkte til pros og cons, og det same neuralsystemet som er trent på grupper av ord- innebygging- koding av liknande pros og cons. Vi evaluerte systemet på to måtar: første ved haldne utrekningar med gullstandard pros og kons, og andre ved å spørja at menneske annotatorar skal vurdere systemutdata på relevant og fullstendighet. I den andre evalueringa ble gullstandard pros og kons evaluert saman med systemutdata. Vi finn at menneskelige samandrag ikkje vert kalla som mykje meir relevante eller fullførte enn SynPat-systema. dei siste blir poeng høgare enn dei menneske genererte samandringane på eit nøyaktig metrisk. Neuralnærmingane gjer ein mindre utvikling i menneskelige vurdering, og er utført av baseline.', 'sv': 'Vi utvecklade tre system för att generera för- och nackdelar sammanfattningar av produktrecensioner. Genom att automatisera denna uppgift blir det lättare att skriva produktrecensioner och ger läsarna snabb tillgång till den viktigaste informationen. Vi jämförde SynPat, ett system baserat på syntaktiska fraser som valts ut utifrån valenspoäng, mot ett neuralt nätverksbaserat system som tränat för att kartlägga säck-of-word representationer av recensioner direkt till för och nackdelar, och samma neurala system tränat på kluster av ordinbäddning kodningar av liknande för och nackdelar. Vi utvärderade systemen på två sätt: först på utdragna recensioner med guldstandard för och nackdelar, och för det andra genom att be mänskliga kommentatorer att betygsätta systemens resultat på relevans och fullständighet. I den andra utvärderingen bedömdes för- och nackdelarna med guldstandard tillsammans med systemresultatet. Vi finner att de mänskliga sammanfattningarna inte anses vara signifikant mer relevanta eller fullständiga än SynPat-systemen; De senare får högre poäng än de sammanfattningar som genereras av människor på ett precisionsmått. De neurala tillvägagångssätten ger en lägre prestanda i den mänskliga bedömningen, och överträffas av baseline.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் மூன்று அமைப்புகளை உருவாக்கினோம் பொருள் முன்னோக்கு மற்றும் தொகுதிகளின் சுருக்கம் உருவாக @ info நாங்கள் சின்பாட், ஒத்திசைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட ஒத்திசைவு சொற்றொடர்களை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம், வாய்ப்பு மதிப்புகளை அடிப்படையில் தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ள ஒரு அமைப்பு, புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையில், ப நாம் முறைமைகளை இரண்டு வழிகளில் மதிப்பிடித்தோம்: முதலில் தொடர்பு மற்றும் செயல்பாடுகள் மூலம் தங்க- நிலையான முனையத்துடன் மற்றும் தொடர்பு மற்றும இரண்டாவது மதிப்பில், முறைமை வெளியீட்டுடன் தங்க- நிலையான முன்னிருப்பு மற்றும் சான்றுகள் மதிப்பிடப்பட் மனித உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சுருக்கங்கள் சின்பாட் அமைப்புகளை விட முக்கியமானது அல்லது முழுமையாக எண்ணப்படவில்லை; தெளிவான மெட்ரிக்கில் மனித உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சுருக்கத்தை விட அதிக மதிப்பெண்கள் ஆகும். புதிய அணுகும் நெருங்குகள் மனித மதிப்பில் குறைந்த செயல்பாட்டை கொண்டு வருகிறது, மற்றும் அடிப்படைக்கோட்டி', 'ur': 'ہم نے تین سیسٹم پیدا کیے ہیں کہ محصولات کی رسانیوں کے پیدا کرنے کے لئے pros اور cons summaries. یہ کام آٹوٹی کرنا محصولات کی روشنی کے لکھنے کو آسان کر دیتا ہے اور پڑھنے والوں کو بہت اہم معلومات کے لئے تیز دسترسی پیش کرتا ہے. ہم نے سینپٹ (SynPat)، ایک سینٹاکتیک فریزوں پر بنیاد گزاری ہوئی سیسٹم کی مقایسہ کی، ایک نئورل-نیٹورک-بنیاد سیسٹم کے مقابلہ میں، ایک نئورل-نیٹورک-بنیاد سیسٹم کے مقابلہ میں جو ریویزوں کی بغل-of-words representations مستقیماً پروس اور کونس کے مقابلہ میں ہے، اور ایک نئورل سیسٹم ہم نے سیستموں کو دو طریقے سے مطالبہ کیا: پہلے سونے کے استاندارڈ پرس اور کنسو کے ساتھ ذخیره کرنے کے لئے، اور دوسرے طریقے سے انسان کے اظہار کرنے والوں سے درخواست کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ سیستموں کا اضافہ اضافہ اضافہ اضافہ کریں۔ دوسری ارزیابی میں سونے کے استاندارڈ پرس اور کنسوں کو سیسٹم اٹوٹ کے ساتھ ارزیابی کیا گیا۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ انسان کی پیدائش کی تعداد سینپٹ سیستموں سے زیادہ معاملہ یا کامل نہیں کی جاتی۔ آخرین کو ایک دقیق متریک پر انسان کے پیدا کیا گیا ہے۔ نئورل کے نزدیک انسان کی قدر میں کم کامیابی پیدا کرتا ہے اور بنیادی لین سے زیادہ کامیابی کی جاتی ہے.', 'so': 'We developed three systems for generating pros and cons summaries of product reviews.  Shaqoolkan si gaar ah loo isticmaalo wuxuu u fududeeyaa qoritaanka warbixinta dhaqaalaha, wuxuuna siiyaa kuwa akhriya si dhaqso ah u isticmaalka macluumaadka ugu muhiimsan. Waxaan isbarbardhignay SynPat, nidaam ah oo ku saleysan hadal syntactic ah oo lagu doortay heerarka cayimanta, koob ka gees ah nidaamka neurada ee shabakadda ku saleysan, oo lagu baray karta koob-bag-hadal oo ka mid ah aragtida horumarinta oo si toos u jeeda horumarinta iyo masruufka, iyo isku nidaam neurada ah oo lagu baray koorasyada codsiga oo isku mid ah oo la mid ah horumarinta iyo midiidinnada. nidaamka waxaan ku qiimeynay laba qaab: marka hore baaritaanka qoriga ah oo dahab-standard ah iyo xirfadaha, labaadna waxaan ku weyddiinaynaa macaamilooyinka dadka inay soo baxaan nidaamka oo ku saabsan faa’iidada iyo dhibaatada. Qiimeynta labaad waxaa lagu qiimeeyay horumarinta dahabka iyo waxyaabaha caadiga ah oo la soo baxay nidaamka. Waxaynu ognahay in heerarka dadka soo dhashay loogama tiriyo mid aad uga muhiimsan ama dhamaan nidaamka SynPat; qofka dambe waa ka sarreeyaan xagaaga dadka la soo abuuray oo ku qoran qoraalka saxda ah. Dhaqdhaqaaqa neurada ayaa ka soo saara qiimeynta dadka hoos u yar, waxaana lagu sameeyaa saldhigga hoose.', 'si': 'අපි පද්ධතිය තුනක් විස්තර කළා ප්\u200dරොක්ස් සහ කොන්ස් සංවිධානයක් පරීක්ෂණයේ සංවිධානය කරන මේ වැඩේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තිය පරීක්ෂණය ගැන ලියවන්න සහ කියවන්නේ කියවන්නේ ඉක්මනින් වැදග අපි SynPat වෙනුවෙන්, සංකේතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් තෝරාගත්ත සංකේත ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, සංකේතික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා  අපි පද්ධතියේ පද්ධතිය දෙකක් විදිහට අවශ්\u200dය කරනවා: පළමු සුන්ද්\u200dරව්\u200dය ප්\u200dරොස්ටැන්ඩ් සහ කොන්ස් සඳහා සුන්ද්\u200dරව්\u200dය ප්\u200dරොස්ටැන්ඩ් සඳහ දෙවෙනි විශ්ලේෂණයේදී, රත්තර ප්\u200dරොස්ටැන්ඩ් සහ කොන්ස් එක්ක පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය සමඟ විශ්ලේෂණය අපි හොයාගන්නවා මිනිස්සු නිර්මාණය කරපු සංවිධානයක් SynPat පද්ධතියට වඩා ගොඩක් සම්පූර්ණය නැහැ කිය මිනිස්සු නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ මිනිස්සුන්ගේ සාමාව ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වඩා වඩා වඩා වඩා විශේෂ ව මිනිස්සුන් විශ්වාසයේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම මුළු විශ්වාස කරනවා.', 'uz': "Biz produktlarni tahrirlash uchun uch tizimni yaratdik. @ info Biz SynPatga bir tizimga birlashtirilgan syntactik so'zlarini taʼminlov qildik, balki taʼminlovchi nazar tarmoq asosida ishlatilgan tizimga taʼminlovchi bo'lgan narsalar va taʼminlovchilarga qo'llangan suhbat soʻzlarning taʼminlovchilarini boshqarishga ruxsat berdik, va bu bir necha tizim shunday bir suhbat taʼminlovlagan bir so'zlar va fanlarning bir Biz tizimlarni ikki usul bilan qiymatimiz: birinchi narsalar davomida gold-standard pros va kons bilan ishlab chiqarishni boshladik, ikkinchi marta inson taʼminlovchilar tizimning natijasini muhit va murakkablik darajada soʻradi. Ikkinchi qiymatda, tizim natijasi bilan qiymati kiritildi. Biz o'ylaymiz, odamlar yaratilgan qisqartmalar SynPat tizimlaridan juda muhim yoki butunlay deb hisoblanmaydi; keyin inson yaratilgan qismlardan ko'p ko'p qismlar mukammal metrikda. Hujjatning atrofidagi neyronlar odamning qiymatlarida kamaytirish va asosiy tarkibi bilan bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đã phát triển ba hệ thống để tạo dựng nên tóm tắt về sản phẩm. Việc tự động tác vụ này giúp việc viết bài phê bình sản phẩm, và giúp độc giả dễ dàng truy cập vào những thông tin quan trọng nhất. Chúng tôi đã so sánh SynPat, một hệ thống dựa trên các cụm từ từ cấu tạo dựa trên điểm chia sẻ, với một hệ thống mạng thần kinh được huấn luyện để vẽ lại các biến trình của các từ trực tiếp cho giá trị và âm nghịch, và cùng một hệ thần kinh được huấn luyện về các cụm số các lời chứa đựng tương tự. Chúng tôi đánh giá hệ thống theo hai cách: đầu tiên là đánh giá các bài bình luận dự phòng với giá trị và khuyết điểm bằng vàng, thứ hai là nhờ nhà biên niên hoá người đánh giá kết quả của hệ thống về độ liên quan và hoàn thiện. Trong lần đánh giá thứ hai, giá cao và khuyết điểm bằng vàng được đánh giá cùng với sản xuất hệ thống. Chúng tôi thấy rằng các bản kê khai sinh con người không được xem là quan trọng hay đầy đủ hơn hệ thống SynPat; những cái này được đánh dấu cao hơn những dãy dạng sinh ra trên một thước đo chính xác. Các phương pháp thần kinh cung cấp năng lượng thấp hơn trong đánh giá con người, và được thực hiện bởi cơ sở cơ bản.', 'nl': 'We ontwikkelden drie systemen voor het genereren van voor- en nadelsamenvattingen van productbeoordelingen. Het automatiseren van deze taak vergemakkelijkt het schrijven van productbeoordelingen en biedt lezers snelle toegang tot de belangrijkste informatie. We vergeleken SynPat, een systeem gebaseerd op syntactische zinnen geselecteerd op basis van valentiescores, met een systeem op basis van neuraal netwerk dat getraind is om bag-of-words representaties van beoordelingen direct in kaart te brengen aan voor en tegens, en hetzelfde neuraal systeem dat getraind is op clusters van woord-embeding coderingen van vergelijkbare voor en tegens. We hebben de systemen op twee manieren geëvalueerd: ten eerste op uitgestelde beoordelingen met gouden voor- en nadelen, en ten tweede door menselijke annotatoren te vragen de output van de systemen te beoordelen op relevantie en volledigheid. In de tweede evaluatie werden de voor- en nadelen van de goudstandaard samen met de systeemoutput beoordeeld. Wij vinden dat de door mensen gegenereerde samenvattingen niet als significant relevanter of completer worden beschouwd dan de SynPat-systemen; de laatste worden hoger gescoord dan de door mensen gegenereerde samenvattingen op een precisiemetriek. De neurale benaderingen leveren een lagere prestatie op in de menselijke beoordeling, en worden beter uitgevoerd door de baseline.', 'da': 'Vi udviklede tre systemer til generering af fordele og ulemper resuméer af produktanmeldelser. Automatisering af denne opgave gør det lettere at skrive produktanmeldelser og giver læserne hurtig adgang til de vigtigste oplysninger. Vi sammenlignede SynPat, et system baseret på syntaktiske sætninger udvalgt på baggrund af valens scores, med et neuralt netværk-baseret system uddannet til at kortlægge taske-of-word repræsentationer af anmeldelser direkte til fordele og ulemper, og det samme neurale system uddannet på klynger af ord-indlejring kodninger af lignende fordele og ulemper. Vi evaluerede systemerne på to måder: for det første på holdt-out anmeldelser med guld-standard fordele og ulemper, og for det andet ved at bede menneskelige kommentatorer om at vurdere systemernes output på relevans og fuldstændighed. I den anden evaluering blev gold-standard fordele og ulemper vurderet sammen med systemets output. Vi finder, at de menneskeskabte resuméer ikke betragtes som væsentligt mere relevante eller komplette end SynPat-systemerne; sidstnævnte scores højere end de menneskeskabte resuméer på en præcisionsmetric. De neurale tilgange giver en lavere præstation i den menneskelige vurdering, og er udført af baseline.', 'bg': 'Разработихме три системи за генериране на резюмета за плюсове и минуси на продуктовите ревюта. Автоматизирането на тази задача улеснява писането на отзиви за продукти и предлага на читателите бърз достъп до най-важната информация. Сравнихме система, базирана на синтактични фрази, подбрани въз основа на валентни оценки, с система, базирана на невронна мрежа, обучена да картографира репрезентациите на отзивите директно към плюсовете и минусите, и същата невронна система, обучена върху клъстери от кодиране на думи с подобни плюсове и минуси. Оценихме системите по два начина: първо на проведени прегледи със златни стандарти плюсове и минуси, и второ, като помолихме хората анотатори да оценят резултатите на системите по уместност и пълнота. Във втората оценка бяха оценени плюсовете и минусите на златния стандарт заедно с изхода на системата. Установяваме, че генерираните от човека резюмета не се считат за значително по-подходящи или пълни от системите SynPat; последните имат по-висока оценка от генерираните от човека резюмета по прецизни метрици. Неврологичните подходи водят до по-ниска производителност при човешката оценка и са надминати от изходните стойности.', 'hr': 'Razvili smo tri sustava za proizvodnju sažetka proizvodnja i konzulata. Automatiziranje ovog zadatka olakšava pisanje pregledi proizvoda i nudi čitačima brz pristup najvažnijim informacijama. Usporedili smo SynPat, sustav koji je baziran na sintaktičkim frazama odabranim na temelju rezultata valencije, protiv sustava koji je osnovan na neuromreži obučen za mapiranje reprezentacija riječi o pregledima direktno prema pros i konjima, te isti neuronski sustav koji je obučen na skupinu kodiranja sličnih pros i konjima. Procjenjivali smo sustave na dva načina: prvo na održanim ispitivanjima s zlatnom standardnom proročanstvom i konjima, a drugo tražeći ljudske annotatore da procjenjuju izlaz sustava na relevantnost i kompletnost. U drugoj procjeni, zlatni standardni proizvođači i konji su procijenjeni zajedno s output sustava. smatramo da sažetke proizvedene ljudima ne smatraju značajno važnijim ili kompletnijim od sustava SynPat-a; Posljednji su rezultati viši od sažetka proizvedenih ljudima na preciznoj metrici. Neuralni pristupi donose manje učinkovitosti u ljudskoj procjeni i iznosi se početna linija.', 'id': 'Kami mengembangkan tiga sistem untuk menghasilkan perhitungan pros dan kons dari penelitian produk. Automatisasi tugas ini memudahkan menulis reviews produk, dan menawarkan pembaca akses cepat ke informasi yang paling penting. Kami membandingkan SynPat, sistem berdasarkan frasa sintaksi yang dipilih berdasarkan skor valensi, melawan sistem berdasarkan jaringan saraf dilatih untuk memetakan persembahan tas kata-kata dari penelitian langsung ke pros dan cons, dan sistem saraf yang sama dilatih pada kumpulan kode kata-embedding kata-pros dan cons yang sama. Kami mengevaluasi sistem dalam dua cara: pertama pada pemeriksaan-keluar dengan standar emas pros dan kons, dan kedua dengan meminta anotator manusia untuk menilai hasil sistem pada relevansi dan keseluruhan. Dalam evaluasi kedua, pros dan kons standar emas diperiksa bersama dengan keluaran sistem. Kami menemukan bahwa ringkasan yang dihasilkan oleh manusia tidak dianggap lebih relevan atau lengkap dari sistem SynPat; yang terakhir dicatat lebih tinggi dari ringkasan yang dihasilkan manusia pada metrik presisi. The neural approaches yield a lower performance in the human assessment, and are outperformed by the baseline.', 'de': 'Wir haben drei Systeme entwickelt, um Vor- und Nachteile von Produktbewertungen zu generieren. Die Automatisierung dieser Aufgabe erleichtert das Verfassen von Produktbewertungen und bietet Lesern schnellen Zugriff auf die wichtigsten Informationen. Wir verglichen SynPat, ein System, das auf syntaktischen Phrasen basiert, die auf der Grundlage von Valenz-Scores ausgewählt wurden, mit einem neuronalen Netzwerk-basierten System, das darauf trainiert ist, Bag-of-Words-Darstellungen von Reviews direkt auf Vor- und Nachteile abzubilden, und dasselbe neuronale System, das auf Clustern von Wort-Embedded-Kodierungen ähnlicher Vor- und Nachteile trainiert wurde. Wir haben die Systeme auf zwei Arten bewertet: erstens auf abgehaltene Reviews mit Gold-Standard-Vor- und Nachteilen und zweitens indem wir menschliche Annotatoren aufforderten, die Ergebnisse der Systeme auf Relevanz und Vollständigkeit zu bewerten. In der zweiten Bewertung wurden die Gold-Standard-Vor- und Nachteile zusammen mit der Systemleistung bewertet. Wir stellen fest, dass die vom Menschen generierten Zusammenfassungen nicht als wesentlich relevanter oder vollständiger angesehen werden als die SynPat-Systeme; Letztere werden höher bewertet als die vom Menschen generierten Zusammenfassungen auf einer Präzisionsmetrik. Die neuronalen Ansätze liefern eine geringere Leistung in der menschlichen Beurteilung und werden von der Baseline übertroffen.', 'sw': 'Tumeunda mifumo mitatu kwa ajili ya kutengeneza muhtasari wa utafiti wa bidhaa na mashabiki. Kujitoleza kazi hii inarahisisha kuandika matokeo ya bidhaa, na kutoa wasomaji upatikanaji wa haraka wa taarifa muhimu zaidi. Tulifananisha SynPat, mfumo uliofanywa na misemo ya ushirikiano ulioandikwa kwa msingi wa vipindi vya upigaji kura, dhidi ya mfumo wa mtandao wa neural ulioelekezwa kupata ramani ya uwakilizaji wa maneno moja kwa moja kwa ajili ya wataalamu na mashabiki, na mfumo huo wa neurali uliojifundishwa kwenye makundi ya maendeleo yanayojumuisha maneno yanayofanana na wataalamu. Tulitathmini mifumo kwa njia mbili: kwanza kwa utafiti uliofanyika na miradi ya dhahabu na mashabiki, na pili kwa kuwaomba matangazo ya binadamu kuongeza matokeo ya mfumo kuhusu umuhimu na utata. Katika tathmini ya pili, wataalamu na maarufu wa dhahabu ulivutiwa pamoja na matokeo ya mfumo. Tunafikiri kuwa muhtasari wa uzalishaji wa binadamu hauonekani kuwa ni muhimu zaidi au kamili zaidi ya mfumo wa SynPat; ya mwisho huchukuliwa zaidi ya kipindi cha kiangazi kilichozaliwa na binadamu kwa kiwango cha sahihi. Matokeo ya neura yanatoa ufanisi wa chini katika tathmini za binadamu, na yanaendeshwa na msingi.', 'tr': "Üç sistemi öngörümler we konsunlar hasaplamak üçin döredik. Bu zady otomatik etmek üçin ön namaýyşlaryň ýazmasyny aňsat edýär we okuwçylaryň iň wajyp maglumatyna çalt berişi teklip edýär. SynPat'i, faýllaryň üstünde saýlanan syntaktik frazlerine daýanýan bir sisteme karşılaşdyrdyk. Nural a ňla daýanýan sisteme üýtgedilen çykyşlaryň pres we kons'a görkezilýän pres we kons'a görkezilýän pres we kons'a görkezilýän çykyşlaryň klasterlerine görkezilýän Biz sistemleri iki şekilde değerlendirdik: ilk defa altın standart pros ve kons ile ilgili çözümlerde, ikincisi de insan tanımlayıcıları sistemlerin çizgisini değerlendirmelerini ve tamamlanmalarını sorarak çözdük. Ikinji çözümlerde altyn standart pros we kons sistem çykyşyny bilen deňlendirildi. İnsan döredilen toparlaryň synPat sistemlerinden has baglanmasy ýa-da incompleşmeýändigini düşünýäris; soňky metriýada adam tarapyndan ýokary hasaplanýar. Nöral ýakynlaşyklar ynsan çykyşynda azajyk etmänlik etýär we esasy çykyşynda etmänler.", 'ko': '우리는 세 가지 시스템을 개발하여 제품 평론의 이해득실을 총결하였다.자동화 작업은 제품 평론의 작성을 간소화하고 독자들이 가장 중요한 정보를 신속하게 접근할 수 있도록 한다.우리는 배가점수를 바탕으로 선택한 문법 단어를 기반으로 한 SynPat 시스템을 비교했다. 신경 네트워크를 기반으로 한 시스템과 비교했다. 이 시스템은 훈련을 통해 논평에 있는 단어 한 포대를 장점과 단점을 직접적으로 나타낼 수 있고 같은 신경 시스템은 훈련을 통해 비슷한 장점과 단점을 가진 단어를 인코딩에 삽입할 수 있다.우리는 두 가지 방식으로 시스템에 대해 평가를 실시했다. 첫 번째는 황금 기준의 이해득실을 평가하고 두 번째는 인공 주석원이 관련성과 완전성에 따라 시스템의 수출에 대해 평가를 하도록 하는 것이다.두 번째 평가에서는 금 기준의 이해득실과 시스템 수출을 평가했다.우리는 SynPat 시스템에 비해 인공적으로 생성된 요약이 더 관련되거나 완전한 것으로 간주되지 않는다는 것을 발견했다.후자의 정확도 지표에서의 득점은 인공 생성의 요약보다 높다.신경 방법은 인류 평가에서 비교적 낮고 기선보다 우수하다.', 'fa': 'ما سه سیستم برای تولید تحقیقات محصولات و تحقیقات محصولات را توسعه دادیم. این کار به طور خودکار نوشتن تحقیقات محصولات آسان می\u200cشود و به خوانندگان سریع دسترسی به مهمترین اطلاعات پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. ما سینپات را مقایسه کردیم، یک سیستم بر اساس عبارت\u200cهای سنتاکتیک که بر اساس امتیاز\u200cهای ویلنس انتخاب شده است، علیه سیستم\u200cهای شبکه\u200cهای عصبی که آموزش داده شده است تا نمایش\u200cهای کیف\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای تحقیقات مستقیماً به پیش\u200cبینی\u200cها و کنسون\u200cها نقشه بگیرد، و همان سیستم عصبی که روی کلاس\u200cهای رمز\u200cهای تح ما سیستم ها را به دو راه ارزیابی کردیم: اولین بار در تحقیقات بازداشته شده با پیشنهاد طلایی استاندارد و کنسول، و دومین بار با خواستن آشنا کنندگان انسان تا نتیجه سیستم ها را بر اضافه و کامل ارزیابی دهند. در ارزیابی دوم، پروژه\u200cهای استاندارد طلا و کنسول با نتیجه سیستم ارزیابی شدند. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای پیدا شده\u200cی انسان به عنوان معنی بیشتر یا کامل از سیستم\u200cهای SynPat به نظر نمی\u200cآیند. آخرین امتیاز بالاتر از جمع\u200cآوری\u200cهای تولید شده\u200cی انسان در یک متریک دقیق است. نزدیک\u200cهای عصبی\u200cها اجرای کمتری در ارزیابی انسان می\u200cدهند و توسط پایین اجرای پایین می\u200cشوند.', 'sq': 'Kemi zhvilluar tre sisteme për të krijuar përmbledhje pro dhe negative të shqyrtimeve të prodhimeve. Automatizimi i kësaj detyre lehtëson shkrimin e shqyrtimeve të produkteve dhe ofron lexuesve akses të shpejtë në informacionin më të rëndësishëm. Ne krahasuam SynPat, një sistem bazuar në frazat sintaktike të zgjedhura në bazë të rezultateve të valencës, me një sistem të bazuar në rrjetin nervor të trajnuar për të hartuar përfaqësimet e çantës së fjalëve të kritikave drejtpërdrejt për pro dhe kundërshtarë, dhe të njëjtin sistem nervor të trajnuar në grupe të kodifikimeve me fjalë-përfshirje të të ngjashme pro dhe kundërshtarë. Ne vlerësuam sistemet në dy mënyra: së pari në shqyrtimet e mbajtura-jashtë me pros dhe kundërshtarë të standartit të artë, dhe së dyti duke i kërkuar anotatorëve njerëzorë të vlerësojnë daljen e sistemit në rëndësi dhe kompletezë. Në vlerësimin e dytë, avantazhet dhe dëmet e standartit të artë u vlerësuan së bashku me rezultatin e sistemit. Ne zbulojmë se përmbledhjet e gjeneruara nga njerëzit nuk konsiderohen si më të rëndësishme apo më të plota se sistemi SynPat; të fundit janë më të lartë se përmbledhjet e prodhuara nga njerëzit në një metrik të saktë. Përqafimet neuronale japin një performancë më të ulët në vlerësimin njerëzor dhe janë më të lartë nga baza.', 'af': "Ons het drie stelsels ontwikkel vir die genereer van proes en kons opsommings van produktoorskoue. Hierdie taak maak outomaties die skryfing van produkt hersiening verlos, en gee lesers vinnig toegang tot die mees belangrike inligting aan. Ons vergelyk SynPat, 'n stelsel gebaseer op sintaktieke frase wat gekies is op die basis van valens telling, teen 'n neuralnetwerk-gebaseerde stelsel wat opgelei is om te kaart pak van woorde-voorstellings van hersienings direk na pros en cons, en die selfde neurale stelsel wat opgelei is op klasters van woord-inbêerde kodering van soortgelyke pros en cons. Ons het die stelsels in twee maniere evalueer: eerste op die gehou-uitrekening met goud-standaard pros en kons, en tweede deur menslike annotators te vra om die stelsels uitvoer te rate op relevansie en volledigheid. In die tweede evaluasie is die goud-standaard pros en kons ondersoek saam met die stelsel uitvoer. Ons vind dat die mensgenereerde opsommings nie as betekenlik meer relevant of volledige as die SynPat stelsels aangestel word nie; Die laaste is hoogheid as die mens genereer opsommings op 'n presisie metriek. Die neurale toegang gee 'n minder prestasie in die menslike evaluering en word uitgevoer deur die basisline.", 'hy': 'Մենք զարգացրեցինք երեք համակարգ, որպեսզի ստեղծենք արտադրյալների վերլուծությունների հաջողություններ և հակամարտություններ: Այս խնդիրը ավտոմատիացնելը հեշտացնում է արտադրանքի վերանայման գրությունը և հնարավորություն է տալիս կարդացողներին արագ հնարավորություն ստանալ ամենակարևոր տեղեկատվությունը: Մենք համեմատեցինք Սինպեթը, համակարգը, որը հիմնված է սինտակտիկ արտահայտությունների վրա, որոնք ընտրված են վալենցիայի արդյունքների հիմնականությամբ, և նյարդային ցանցի հիմնականությամբ համակարգը, որը պատրաստված է արտահայտությունների արտահայտություններ քարտեզագրելու համար անմիջապես հակառակ և հակառակ, և նույն նյարդային համակարգը Մենք երկու ձևով գնահատեցինք համակարգերը: Առաջինը ոսկու ստանդարտ առավելությունների և արձագանքների վերլուծությունների ժամանակ, և երկրորդը մարդկային նոտոտորներին խնդրելով գնահատել համակարգերի արդյունքը համապատասխանատվության և ամբողջության վրա: Երկրորդ գնահատման ժամանակ ոսկու ստանդարտ առավելությունները և արգելքները գնահատվեցին համակարգի արդյունքի հետ միասին: We find that the human-generated summaries are not deemed as significantly more relevant or complete than the SynPat systems;  վերջինները ավելի բարձր են, քան մարդու կողմից ստեղծված համառոտագրությունները ճշգրիտ չափով: Նյարդային մոտեցումները մարդկային գնահատման մեջ ավելի ցածր արդյունք են ստանում, և դրանք արտադրվում են հիմնական հիմքում:', 'am': 'የፕሮጀክት እና የኮንቨርስቲ ጉዳይ መፍጠር ሦስት ስርዓቶች አደረግን፡፡ ይህ ስራ በራሱ ላይ የፍሬት መልዕክት ጽሑፉን ያቀናልላል፡፡ SynPat፣ በተመረጠው የድምፅ ቃላት በተመሳሳይ ቋንቋዎች ላይ፣ የናውራዊ መረብ-የቃላትን የፖስታ-የቃላት መልዕክቶች ለመቀናቀል በተደረገ ስርዓት ላይ እና የፕሮጀክቶች እና የኮንዶዎች መልዕክቶች ለመቀላቀል እና በአንድ ደብዳቤ ስርዓት በንግግር እና የኮንዶዎች ክፍሎች ላይ ተማርተናል፡፡ ስብተቶችን በሁለት መንገዶች ላይ አረጋገጥን፤ መጀመሪያ የወርቅ-standard ፕሮጀክቶች እና ኮንዶዎች እና ሁለተኛውም የሰው አዋቂዎች የስርዓቱን ውጤት በግንኙነት እና ፍላጎት እንዲያሳድሩ ለመጠየቅ ነው፡፡ በሁለተኛውም ማስታወሻ የወርቅ-standard ፕሮጀክቶች እና አገልጋዮች የሲስተም ውጤት ሲሰሙ ተረጋገጠ፡፡ የሰው ትውልድ ጉዳይ ከሲንፓታ ስርዓቶች ይልቅ የተጠቃሚ ወይም የተፈጸመ እንደሆነ እናገኛለን፡፡ የኋለኛይቱ ከሰው ተወለደው ጉዳይ በጥሩ ማተሚያ ላይ የበለጠ ነው፡፡ የደዌብ መቃረቢያ የሰው ድምፅ አዋጅ ያሳርፋል፣ በመሠረትም ላይ ይደረጋል፡፡', 'az': 'Üç sistemi pros və kons nəzəriyyətlərini təhsil etmək üçün yaratdıq. Bu işləri avtomatik olaraq proqramların yazılmasını asanlaşdırır və oxuyanlara ən möhüm məlumatlara hızlı erişimi təklif edir. Biz Sintaktik sözlərin istifadəsi ilə seçilmiş sintaktik sözlərinə dayanan bir sistemi SynPat ilə, bənzər pros və kons sözlərin çubuğu-çubuğu göstərilməsi üçün təhsil edilmiş nöral a ğ sistemi ilə birlikdə təhsil edilmişik. Biz sistemləri iki yolla değerləşdirdik: birincisi altın standart pros və kons ilə müəyyən edilmiş görünüşündə, ikincisi də insan annotatorlarından sistemlərin müəyyən edilməsini və tamamlanmasını istəyirik. İkinci değerlendirmədə altın standart pros və kons sistem çıxışı ilə birlikdə değerlendirildi. İnsan yaratdığı toplamlar SynPat sistemindən daha çox və ya tamamlanmadıqlarını görürük. Sonrakılar insan yaratdığı toplamlardan yüksək dəyişdirilir. Nöral yaxınlıqları insan değerlendirməsində daha düşük performansı verir və bu səhifələrin dəyişdirilməsi lazımdır.', 'bs': 'Razvili smo tri sustava za proizvodnju sažetka proizvodnja i konzulata. Automatizacija ovog zadatka olakšava pisanje pregleda proizvoda i nudi čitačima brz pristup najvažnijim informacijama. Usporedili smo SynPat, sistem baziran na sintaktičkim frazama odabranim na temelju valencijskih rezultata, protiv sustava na neuralnoj mreži obučenog za mapiranje reprezentacija torbe riječi direktno prema prosidnicima i konjima, i isti neuralni sistem obučen na skupinu kodiranja sličnih prosidnika i konjima. Procjenjivali smo sisteme na dva načina: prvo na održanim pregledima sa zlatnom standardnom proročanstvom i konzom, a drugo tražeći ljudske annotatore da procjenjuju izlaz sustava na relevantnosti i kompletnosti. U drugoj procjeni, zlatni standardni profesionalci i konji su procijenjeni zajedno s output sistema. Smatramo da sažetke proizvedene ljudima ne smatraju značajno važnijim ili kompletnijim od sustava SynPat-a; Posljednji su rezultati veći od sažetaka proizvedenih ljudima na preciznoj metrici. Neuralni pristupi donose manje učinkovitosti u ljudskoj procjeni, a to je iznad početne linije.', 'ca': "Vam desenvolupar tres sistemes per generar resumes favorables i negatius de les revisions de productes. L'automatització d'aquesta tasca facilita l'escriptura de revisions de productes i ofereix als lectors accés ràpid a la informació més important. We compared SynPat, a system based on syntactic phrases selected on the basis of valence scores, against a neural-network-based system trained to map bag-of-words representations of reviews directly to pros and cons, and the same neural system trained on clusters of word-embedding encodings of similar pros and cons.  Vam evaluar els sistemes de dues maneres: primer en les revisions que van tenir a terme amb avantatges i negatius d'or, i segon demanant als anotators humans que valorin la producció del sistema en la pertinencia i completesa. In the second evaluation, the gold-standard pros and cons were assessed along with the system output.  Trobem que els resums generats per humans no es consideren significativament més rellevants o complets que els sistemes SynPat; aquests són puntuats més alts que els resums generats per humans en una mètrica de precisió. Els enfocaments neuronals produeixen un rendiment més baix en la valoració human a, i són superiors a la basa.", 'cs': 'Vyvinuli jsme tři systémy pro generování pro a proti shrnutí hodnocení produktů. Automatizace tohoto úkolu usnadňuje psaní recenzí produktů a nabízí čtenářům rychlý přístup k nejdůležitějším informacím. Porovnali jsme SynPat, systém založený na syntaktických frázích vybraných na základě valenčního skóre, se systémem založeným na neuronové síti vycvičeným na mapování sáčků recenzí přímo na klady a zápory a stejným neuronovým systémem trénovaným na shlukech kódování slov s podobnými klady a proti. Hodnotili jsme systémy dvěma způsoby: první na prodlevných recenzích se zlatými standardy klady a zápory a druhé požádáním lidských anotátorů, aby hodnotili výstup systémů podle relevance a úplnosti. Ve druhém hodnocení byly posouzeny výhody a nevýhody zlatého standardu spolu s výstupem systému. Zjišťujeme, že souhrny generované člověkem nejsou považovány za výrazně relevantnější nebo úplnější než systémy SynPat; poslední hodnocení jsou vyšší než souhrny generované člověkem na přesné metrice. Neuronové přístupy přinášejí nižší výkon v hodnocení lidí a jsou překonány výchozí hodnotou.', 'bn': 'আমরা তিনটি সিস্টেম তৈরি করেছি প্রজেক্ট এবং কনসের সারসংক্ষেপের জন্য। এই কাজ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রযুক্তির প্রতিবেদনের লেখা সহজ করে এবং পাঠকদের দ্রুত তথ্য প্রবেশ করা আমরা সিন্পাতের তুলনা করেছি ভ্যালেন্স স্কোরের ভিত্তিতে নিউরুল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক ব্যবস্থার বিরুদ্ধে একটি ব্যাগ-অফ-শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের বিরুদ্ধে সিন্পাট, যা সিন্ট আমরা এই সিস্টেম দুই ভাবে মূল্যায়ন করেছি: প্রথমে সোনার-স্ট্যান্ডার্ড প্রোস এবং কনস্টের সাথে স্বর্ণ-স্ট্যান্ডার প্রোজ এবং দ্বিতীয় পরিদর্ দ্বিতীয় মূল্যের মধ্যে, স্বর্ণ-স্ট্যান্ডার্ড প্রোসার এবং কনসের মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে সিস্টেম আউটপুটের আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে মানবজাতির সংক্ষেপ সিন্প্যাট সিস্টেমের চেয়ে বেশী গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বা সম্পূর্ণ বিষয় হিসেব পরের সংখ্যাগুলো মানুষের জন্মের সারিগুলোর চেয়েও বেশি সংখ্যা বেড়ে গেছে। নিউরেলের প্রতিক্রিয়া মানুষের মানুষের মূল্যের ক্ষেত্রে কম প্রদর্শন করে এবং তারা বেসেলাইনের মাধ্যমে প্রদর্শন কর', 'et': "Töötasime välja kolm süsteemi tooteülevaate plusside ja miinuste kokkuvõtete koostamiseks. Selle ülesande automatiseerimine lihtsustab tootearuannete kirjutamist ja pakub lugejatele kiiret juurdepääsu kõige olulisemale teabele. Me võrdlesime süntaktilistel fraasidel põhinevat süsteemi SynPat'i valentsusskooride alusel valitud süntaktilistel fraasidel, närvivõrgul põhineva süsteemiga, mis on koolitatud kaardistama sõnakoti esitusi ülevaatetest otse plussidele ja miinustele, ning sama närvisüsteemiga, mis on koolitatud sarnaste plusside ja miinuste kodeeringute klastritega. Hindasime süsteeme kahel viisil: esiteks kuldstandardi plusside ja miinustega läbiviidud ülevaadete põhjal ning teiseks palusime inimmärkidel hinnata süsteemide väljundit asjakohasuse ja terviklikkuse järgi. Teises hindamises hinnati kuldstandardi plusse ja miinuseid koos süsteemi väljundiga. Leiame, et inimese loodud kokkuvõtteid ei peeta oluliselt asjakohasemaks ega täielikumaks kui SynPat süsteeme; viimastel on täppismõõdikutel kõrgem hinne kui inimese loodud kokkuvõtetel. Närvilähenemisviisid annavad inimese hindamisel madalama tulemuslikkuse ja on algtasemega ületatud.", 'fi': 'Kehitimme kolme järjestelmää tuottamaan hyviä ja huonoja yhteenvetoja tuotearvosteluista. Tämän tehtävän automatisointi helpottaa tuotearvostelujen kirjoittamista ja tarjoaa lukijoille nopean pääsyn tärkeimpiin tietoihin. Vertasimme syntaktisiin lauseisiin perustuvaa SynPat-järjestelmää, joka perustui valenssipisteiden perusteella valittuihin syntaktisiin lauseisiin, neuroverkostoon perustuvaan järjestelmään, joka oli koulutettu kartoittamaan sanapussin representaatioita arvosteluista suoraan plusseihin ja miinuksiin, ja samaan neurojärjestelmään, joka oli koulutettu yhdistämään sanoja sisältäviä koodauksia samankaltaisista plusseista ja plusseista. Arvioimme järjestelmiä kahdella tavalla: ensinnäkin suoritetuissa arvioinneissa, joissa oli kultaisia etuja ja haittoja, ja toiseksi pyytämällä inhimillisiä huomautuksia arvioimaan järjestelmien tuotoksia relevanssin ja täydellisyyden perusteella. Toisessa arvioinnissa arvioitiin kultaisen standardin hyvät ja huonot puolet sekä järjestelmän tuotos. Mielestämme ihmisten tuottamia yhteenvetoja ei pidetä merkittävästi merkityksellisempinä tai täydellisinä kuin SynPat-järjestelmiä. jälkimmäisten pisteet ovat korkeammat kuin ihmisten tuottamat tiivistelmät tarkkuusmittarilla. Hermolliset lähestymistavat tuottavat vähemmän suorituskykyä ihmisen arvioinnissa, ja ne suoriutuvat lähtötasoon verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé wis luwih sistem kanggo nggawe "pros" lan "cones" sesuk dadi resumen prelimun. Layout We komparadone Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem iki dadi: perusahaan ono hal-perusahaan karo perusahaan sing katêpakan karo "pros" sing berarti, lan ciptaaken tanggal sistem sing bisa dianggap sistem sing dadi iki bakal terus tambah nggawe geranggap sistem sing berarti gawe nguasai sistèm sing berarti Ngawe Perintah sing wis duwé, nggo-utek wih (pros) lan "kono" sing wis dipoleh karo sistem sing ditambah. Awak dhéwé luwih karo hal-hal nganggo perbudhakan yakuné ora bisa luwih barang nggawe barang sing dikarolan tambahan lan kompleter seng Sistem Senpati; Perintah dhéwé sami kelompok kelompok Amarok tambah penting nggo kuwi nggambar obahan kanggo kuwi nggawe uwis, lan kuwi nggawe barang sing nyimpen uwis.', 'he': 'פיתחנו שלושה מערכות לייצור תוצאות טובות וקונסולים של ביקורות מוצרים. האוטומטיקה של המשימה הזאת מקלה את כתיבת ביקורות המוצרים, ומציעה לקוראים גישה מהירה למידע החשוב ביותר. השוונו את סינפט, מערכת שמבוססת על ביטויים סינטקטיים שנבחרה על בסיס נקודות אוולנציה, נגד מערכת מבוססת רשת עצבית מאומנת למפות תיק של מילים מייצגים של ביטויים ישירות למועדונים וקונסולים, ואותה מערכת עצבית מאומנת על קבוצות של קודינג מילים של מקונסולים דומים. We evaluated the systems in two ways: first on held-out reviews with gold-standard pros and cons, and second by asking human annotators to rate the systems\' output on relevance and completeness.  בהערכה השנייה, העובדים והרשעים של סטנדרט זהב הוערכו יחד עם יציאת המערכת. אנו מוצאים שהסדרות שנוצרו ע"י האדם לא נחשבות יותר רלוונטיות או מושלמות משמעותית מערכות סינפאט; האחרונים נקודים גבוהים יותר מהסדרות שנgenerו ע"י האדם על מטריקה מדויקה. הגישויים העצביים נותנים ביצועים נמוכים יותר בהערכה האנושית, והם מוצפים על ידי הבסיס.', 'sk': 'Razvili smo tri sisteme za ustvarjanje povzetkov prednosti in slabosti pregledov izdelkov. Avtomatizacija tega opravila olajša pisanje ocen izdelkov in omogoča bralcem hiter dostop do najpomembnejših informacij. Primerjali smo SynPat, sistem, ki temelji na sintaktičnih frazah, izbranih na podlagi valenčnih ocen, s sistemom, ki temelji na nevronskem omrežju, usposobljenim za mapiranje predstavitev vreče besed pregledov neposredno na prednosti in slabosti, in enakim nevronskim sistemom, usposobljenim na grozdih kodiranja besed podobnih prednosti in slabosti. Sistemi smo ocenili na dva načina: prvič na pregledih z zlatimi standardi prednosti in slabosti, drugič pa smo prosili človeške opotatorje, naj ocenijo rezultate sistema glede na ustreznost in popolnost. V drugi oceni so bili ocenjeni prednosti in slabosti zlatih standardov skupaj z rezultati sistema. Ugotavljamo, da povzetki iz človeka niso bistveno pomembnejši ali popolnejši od sistemov SynPat; slednje so ocenjene višje od povzetkov, ki jih ustvari človek, na natančni metri. Nevronski pristopi prinašajo manjšo učinkovitost pri ocenjevanju ljudi in so preseženi za izhodiščno vrednost.', 'ha': "Mun buɗe mafarinta uku na'ura da za'a samun mafarinta na manunufi. Yana sauƙaƙara rubutun takardar manuni, kuma yana bãyar da amfani da karatun masu sauri zuwa maɓallin muhimu. Mun samfani SinPas, wani na'urar da ya daidaita maganar syntactic wanda aka zãɓe a kan kwamfyutan fancy, a kan wani na'urar-tarayya na neural wanda aka yi wa shirin karta-zane-zane masu tsari ga masu maganar-masu basketa da takarda zuwa masu basa da bayani na bayani na masu basu'a da, da kuma na yi wa'anar aikin neura wanda aka sanar da shi a cikin komai na kodi-kodi na daidaita na masu bashi da fanin faniki Mun ƙaddara masu tsari biyu: farkon na samun matsayi na shiryuwar zĩnãriya da taƙaita, da kuma sau na tambayi mutane su zartar da matsayin na'urar da na'urar. In the second evaluation, the gold-standard pros and cons were assessed along with the system output.  Muna gane cewa, ƙararin wanda aka ƙãga mutum ba su ƙaddara shi mai muhimmi ko kuma ba su cika shi ba bisa na'urar Sinpaths; na ƙarshen suna da mafi girma daga wanda aka haife wa mutum a kan tashi na madaidaici. neura wanda yake kusantar zuwa ga shi yana fitar da rabo mafi ƙasƙanci a kan mutane, kuma yana tafiyar da shi a bakwai.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་བྱ་རིམ་དང་མཛོད་ཁུངས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་པའི་རིམ་ལུགས་གསུམ་ཀྱི་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ལས་འགུལ་འདིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐེངས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་གྱི་འབྲི་བ་སླ་གཏོང་བྱེད་པ། དེ་ནི་ཀློག་འཇུག We compared SynPat, a system based on syntactic phrases selected on the basis of valence scores, against a neural-network-based system trained to map bag-of-words representations of reviews directly to pros and cons, and the same neural system trained on clusters of word-embedding encodings of similar pros and cons. ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་པ་བརྗོད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། སྔོན་གྱིས་རྩ་བསྐྲད་ལས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་པ་དང་cons་ཚིས་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུག་པ་ལྟར་མ འདིའི་རྩིས་འབྲས་གཉིས་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་རིགས་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མི་ལག་སྟར་བཟོ་བྱས་པའི་བཅུད་སྡུད་དེ་SynPat་མ་ལག་གི་ཚད་ལ་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་མིན་འདུག The latter are scored higher than the human-generated summaries on a precision metric. ནུས་པ་གཟུགས་འགྱུར་བ་དེ་ནི་མིའི་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་ལ་ཉུང་བའི་གྲངས་འབོར་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages : A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'ar': 'التمثيلات والبنى في تحليل المشاعر العصبية للغات الغنية شكليًا: دراسة حالة من العبرية الحديثة', 'es': 'Representaciones y arquitecturas en el análisis de sentimientos neuronales para lenguajes morfológicamente ricos: un estudio de caso del hebreo moderno', 'fr': "Représentations et architectures dans l'analyse des sentiments neuronaux pour les langues morphologiquement riches\xa0: une étude de cas de l'hébreu moderne", 'pt': 'Representações e arquiteturas na análise de sentimentos neurais para linguagens morfologicamente ricas: um estudo de caso do hebraico moderno', 'ja': '形態的に豊かな言語のための神経感情分析における表現とアーキテクチャ：現代ヘブライ語からのケーススタディ', 'zh': '形言神经情析架构:自今希伯来语例究之', 'hi': 'रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं के लिए तंत्रिका भावना विश्लेषण में प्रतिनिधित्व और आर्किटेक्चर: आधुनिक हिब्रू से एक केस स्टडी', 'ru': 'Представления и архитектуры в анализе нейронных настроений для морфологически богатых языков: тематическое исследование с современного иврита', 'ga': 'Léirithe agus Ailtireacht in Anailís Mothúcháin Néarrach do Theangacha ar Saibhreas Moirfeolaíoch: Cás-staidéar ón Nua-Eabhrais', 'el': 'Αντιπροσωπείες και Αρχιτεκτονικές στην Ανάλυση Νευρικών Συναισθημάτων για Μορφολογικά Πλούσιες Γλώσσες: Μελέτη περίπτωσης από τη Σύγχρονη Εβραϊκή', 'hu': 'Reprezentációk és építészetek az idegi érzés elemzésében morfológiailag gazdag nyelvek esettanulmánya modern héberről', 'ka': 'მორფოლოგიურად ღარიბული ენებისთვის გამოსახულებები და აქტიქტურები ნეირალური სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციაში: მოდინარე ჰეიროლის კოსტაცია', 'it': "Rappresentazioni e architetture nell'analisi dei sentimenti neurali per lingue morfologicamente ricche: un caso di studio dall'ebraico moderno", 'kk': 'Мерофологикалық бағатты тілдер үшін негізгі синтиментті анализ түрінде таңбалар мен архитектуралар', 'lt': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'mt': 'Rappreżentazzjonijiet u Arkitetturi fl-Analiżi tas-Sentiment Newrali għal Lingwi Morfoloġikament Riki: Studju ta’ Każ minn Ebrej Modern', 'mk': 'Претставувања и архитектури во анализа на неуралните чувства за морфолошки богати јазици: Примерна студија од модерниот евреј', 'ml': 'മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നരായ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് അന്യായിസ്സില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളും ആര്\u200dക്കിറ്റേച്ചറുകളും: ആദ്', 'no': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'ms': 'Perwakilan dan Arkitektur dalam Analisi Sentimen Neural untuk Bahasa yang Kaya Morfologik: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'mn': 'Үзэгчид болон архитектурууд мэдрэлийн сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'sr': 'Predstavnici i arhitekture u Neuralnoj sentimentnoj analizi za morfološki bogate jezike: Proučavanje slučaja modernog hebrejskog', 'so': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'pl': 'Reprezentacje i architektury w analizie sentymentów neuronowych dla języków bogatych morfologicznie: studium przypadku ze współczesnego hebrajskiego', 'sv': 'Representationer och arkitekturer i neural känselanalys för morfologiskt rika språk: En fallstudie från modern hebreiska', 'ur': 'نورول سنٹیمینٹ تحلیل کے ذریعے نمائش اور آرکیٹورز: ایک کیس تحصیل مدرنی یہودی سے', 'ro': 'Reprezentări și arhitecturi în analiza sentimentelor neurale pentru limbi bogate morfologic: un studiu de caz din ebraică modernă', 'si': 'මොර්ෆෝලෝජික විශේෂණය සහ විද්\u200dයාපිත විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා නිර්මාණය සහ විද්\u200dයාපිත විශේෂණය: A case study from Modern hebre', 'ta': 'Morphologically Rich Languages for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Diễn xuất và kiến trúc sư trong phân tích thần kinh cho ngôn ngữ Morphological Rich: A Case study of Modern Hebrew', 'hr': 'Predstavnici i arhitekture u Neuralnoj sentimentnoj analizi morfološki bogatih jezika: Ispitivanje slučajeva modernog hebrejskog', 'da': 'Repræsentationer og arkitekturer i neural følelsesanalyse for morfologisk rige sprog: Et casestudie fra moderne hebraisk', 'nl': 'Representaties en architecturen in neuronale sentimentanalyse voor morfologisch rijke talen: een casestudy uit het moderne Hebreeuws', 'de': 'Repräsentationen und Architekturen in der neuronalen Stimmungsanalyse für morphologisch reiche Sprachen: Eine Fallstudie aus dem modernen Hebräisch', 'bg': 'Представления и архитектури в невралния анализ на чувствата за морфологично богати езици: казус от съвременния иврит', 'id': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'fa': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'tr': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'af': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuese dhe arkitektura në Analizën e Sentimenteve Neurale për gjuhët e pasura morfologikisht: Një studim rastesh nga Hebreja moderne', 'hy': 'Նեյրոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուների նյարդային զգացմունքների վերլուծության ներկայացումներ և արխիկտություններ: Մոդերական եբրայից ստացված մի օրինակ ուսումնասիրություն', 'am': 'በኔural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich ቋንቋዎች: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'ko': '형태가 풍부한 언어 신경 감정 분석에서의 표징과 구조: 현대 히브리어에서 온 사례 연구', 'sw': 'Wawakilishi na Washitimu katika Uchambuzi wa Seneti ya Kifaransa kwa lugha Tajiri za Kimorphologically: Utafiti wa kesi kutoka KiHebrew wa Modern', 'az': 'Neyral Sentiment Analizi Morphologically Rich Dillər üçün Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'ca': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'cs': 'Reprezentace a architektura v analýze nervových sentimentů pro morfologicky bohaté jazyky: případová studie z moderní hebrejštiny', 'et': 'Representatsioonid ja arhitektuurid neurotunnete analüüsis morfoloogiliselt rikkatele keeltele: juhtumiuuring kaasaegsest heebrea keelest', 'bn': 'মরোফোলজিক্যালি সমৃদ্ধ ভাষার জন্য নিউরাল সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের প্রতিনিধি এবং আর্কিটেক্টর: আধুনিক হিব্রু থেকে একটি কেস', 'bs': 'Predstavnici i arhitekture u Neuralnoj sentimentnoj analizi morfološki bogatih jezika: Istraživanje slučaja modernog hebrejskog', 'fi': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morfological Rich Languages: Tapaustutkimus modernista hepreasta', 'jv': 'representations and architectures in Neral Sentiment Test for Marphologically Relative Languages: A Case Learning from Moderno Hebrew', 'ha': 'Repntations and Architects in Neural centimint Analyis for morfologically rich languages: A case Research from Modern Hebrew', 'sk': 'Reprezentacije in arhitekture v analizi živčnih sentimentov za morfološko bogate jezike: študija primera iz sodobne hebrejščine', 'bo': 'Representations and Architectures in Neural Sentiment Analysis for Morphologically Rich Languages: A Case Study from Modern Hebrew', 'he': 'מייצגים וארכיטקטורים בניתוח רגשות נוירואלים לשפות מורפולוגית עשירות: מחקר מקרים מהיהודי המודרני'}
{'en': 'This paper empirically studies the effects of representation choices on neural sentiment analysis for Modern Hebrew, a morphologically rich language (MRL) for which no sentiment analyzer currently exists. We study two dimensions of representational choices : (i) the granularity of the input signal (token-based vs. morpheme-based), and (ii) the level of encoding of vocabulary items (string-based vs. character-based). We hypothesise that for MRLs, languages where multiple meaning-bearing elements may be carried by a single space-delimited token, these choices will have measurable effects on task perfromance, and that these effects may vary for different architectural designs   fully-connected, convolutional or recurrent. Specifically, we hypothesize that morpheme-based representations will have advantages in terms of their generalization capacity and task accuracy, due to their better OOV coverage. To empirically study these effects, we develop a new sentiment analysis benchmark for Hebrew, based on 12 K social media comments, and provide two instances of these data : in token-based and morpheme-based settings. Our experiments show that representation choices empirical effects vary with architecture type. While fully-connected and convolutional networks slightly prefer token-based settings, RNNs benefit from a morpheme-based representation, in accord with the hypothesis that explicit morphological information may help generalize. Our endeavour also delivers the first state-of-the-art broad-coverage sentiment analyzer for Hebrew, with over 89 % accuracy, alongside an established benchmark to further study the effects of linguistic representation choices on neural networks’ task performance.', 'ar': 'تدرس هذه الورقة بشكل تجريبي تأثيرات خيارات التمثيل على تحليل المشاعر العصبية للغة العبرية الحديثة ، وهي لغة غنية شكليًا (MRL) والتي لا يوجد لها محلل للمشاعر حاليًا. ندرس بعدين من الخيارات التمثيلية: (1) دقة إشارة الإدخال (القائمة على الرمز المميز مقابل المستندة إلى الشكل) ، و (2) مستوى ترميز عناصر المفردات (القائمة على السلسلة مقابل القائمة على الأحرف). نفترض أنه بالنسبة لـ MRLs ، اللغات التي يمكن فيها حمل عناصر متعددة تحمل المعنى بواسطة رمز واحد محدد بمسافة ، سيكون لهذه الاختيارات تأثيرات قابلة للقياس على أداء المهام ، وأن هذه التأثيرات قد تختلف باختلاف التصميمات المعمارية - متصلة بالكامل ، تلافيفية أو متكرر. على وجه التحديد ، نفترض أن التمثيلات القائمة على الشكل سيكون لها مزايا من حيث سعة التعميم ودقة المهام ، نظرًا لتغطيتها OOV الأفضل. لدراسة هذه التأثيرات بشكل تجريبي ، قمنا بتطوير معيار جديد لتحليل المشاعر للغة العبرية ، استنادًا إلى 12 ألف تعليق على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي ، ونقدم حالتين من هذه البيانات: في الإعدادات القائمة على الرمز المميز والقائمة على الشكل. تظهر تجاربنا أن خيارات التمثيل التأثيرات التجريبية تختلف باختلاف نوع العمارة. بينما تفضل الشبكات المتصلة والتلافيفية بشكل طفيف الإعدادات القائمة على الرمز المميز ، تستفيد RNN من التمثيل المستند إلى الشكل ، وفقًا للفرضية القائلة بأن المعلومات الصرفية الصريحة قد تساعد في التعميم. مسعانا يسلم أيضا الأول\nمحلل المشاعر المتطور ذو التغطية الواسعة للغة العبرية ، بدقة تزيد عن 89٪ ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع معيار راسخ لمزيد من دراسة تأثيرات خيارات التمثيل اللغوي على أداء مهام الشبكات العصبية.', 'pt': 'Este artigo estuda empiricamente os efeitos das escolhas de representação na análise de sentimentos neurais para o hebraico moderno, uma linguagem morfologicamente rica (MRL) para a qual nenhum analisador de sentimentos existe atualmente. Estudamos duas dimensões de escolhas representacionais: (i) a granularidade do sinal de entrada (baseado em token versus baseado em morfema) e (ii) o nível de codificação de itens de vocabulário (baseado em string versus baseado em caractere). Nossa hipótese é que, para MRLs, linguagens em que vários elementos portadores de significado podem ser transportados por um único token delimitado por espaço, essas escolhas terão efeitos mensuráveis no desempenho da tarefa e que esses efeitos podem variar para diferentes projetos arquitetônicos - totalmente conectados, convolucionais ou recorrente. Especificamente, hipotetizamos que representações baseadas em morfemas terão vantagens em termos de capacidade de generalização e precisão da tarefa, devido à sua melhor cobertura OOV. Para estudar empiricamente esses efeitos, desenvolvemos um novo benchmark de análise de sentimentos para hebraico, com base em 12 mil comentários de mídia social, e fornecemos duas instâncias desses dados: em configurações baseadas em tokens e baseadas em morfemas. Nossos experimentos mostram que os efeitos empíricos das escolhas de representação variam com o tipo de arquitetura. Enquanto as redes totalmente conectadas e convolucionais preferem configurações baseadas em tokens, as RNNs se beneficiam de uma representação baseada em morfemas, de acordo com a hipótese de que informações morfológicas explícitas podem ajudar a generalizar. Nosso esforço também entrega o primeiro\nanalisador de sentimento de ampla cobertura de última geração para hebraico, com mais de 89% de precisão, juntamente com um benchmark estabelecido para estudar ainda mais os efeitos das escolhas de representação linguística no desempenho das tarefas das redes neurais.', 'es': 'Este artículo estudia empíricamente los efectos de las elecciones de representación en el análisis de sentimientos neuronales para el hebreo moderno, un lenguaje rico en morfología (MRL) para el que actualmente no existe un analizador de sentimientos. Estudiamos dos dimensiones de las elecciones de representación: (i) la granularidad de la señal de entrada (basada en tokens frente a basada en morfema), y (ii) el nivel de codificación de los elementos de vocabulario (basada en cadenas frente a basada en caracteres). Presumimos que para los LMR, lenguajes en los que un solo token delimitado por espacios puede contener múltiples elementos que contienen significado, estas elecciones tendrán efectos mensurables en el desempeño de las tareas, y que estos efectos pueden variar según los diferentes diseños arquitectónicos: totalmente conectados, convolucionales o recurrentes. Específicamente, planteamos la hipótesis de que las representaciones basadas en morfemas tendrán ventajas en términos de su capacidad de generalización y precisión de tareas, debido a su mejor cobertura de OOV. Para estudiar empíricamente estos efectos, desarrollamos un nuevo punto de referencia de análisis de sentimientos para el hebreo, basado en 12 000 comentarios en las redes sociales, y proporcionamos dos ejemplos de estos datos: en entornos basados en tokens y basados en morfemas. Nuestros experimentos muestran que los efectos empíricos de las elecciones de representación varían según el tipo de arquitectura. Mientras que las redes totalmente conectadas y convolucionales prefieren ligeramente las configuraciones basadas en tokens, las RNN se benefician de una representación basada en morfemas, de acuerdo con la hipótesis de que la información morfológica explícita puede ayudar a generalizar. Nuestro esfuerzo también ofrece la primera\nAnalizador de sentimientos de amplia cobertura de última generación para hebreo, con una precisión de más del 89%, junto con un punto de referencia establecido para estudiar más a fondo los efectos de las elecciones de representación lingüística en el desempeño de las tareas de las', 'ja': '現代ヘブライ語は、現在センチメントアナライザが存在しない形態豊富な言語（ MRL ）であり、表現選択が神経センチメント分析に及ぼす影響を実証的に研究している。 表現選択の2つの次元を研究します。（ i ）入力信号の粒度（トークンベースとモルフェームベース）、および（ ii ）語彙アイテムのエンコードレベル（文字列ベースと文字ベース）。 複数の意味を持つ要素が単一のスペースで区切られたトークンによって運ばれ得る言語であるMRLについて、これらの選択はタスクの性能に測定可能な効果をもたらし、これらの効果は完全に接続された、畳み込み的、または繰り返しの異なるアーキテクチャ設計に対して異なる可能性があると仮定します。 具体的には、モルフェムベースの表現は、より優れたOOVカバレッジのために、一般化能力とタスク精度の点で利点があると仮定する。 これらの効果を実証的に検討するために、12,000のソーシャルメディアのコメントに基づいて、ヘブライ語の新しいセンチメント分析ベンチマークを開発し、これらのデータの2つのインスタンスを提供します。トークンベースの設定とモルフェームベースの設定です。 我々の実験は、表現選択がアーキテクチャの種類によって経験的効果が異なることを示している。 完全に接続された畳み込みネットワークは、トークンベースの設定をわずかに好むが、明示的な形態情報が一般化に役立ち得るという仮説に従って、RNNは、モルフェムベースの表現から利益を得る。 私たちの努力はまた、最初の\nヘブライ語のための最先端の広範囲センチメントアナライザ。89 ％以上の精度で、言語表現の選択がニューラルネットワークのタスクパフォーマンスに与える影響をさらに研究するための確立されたベンチマークと共に。', 'fr': "Cet article étudie de manière empirique les effets des choix de représentation sur l'analyse des sentiments neuronaux pour l'hébreu moderne, un langage morphologiquement riche (LMR) pour lequel aucun analyseur de sentiment n'existe actuellement. Nous étudions deux dimensions des choix de représentation\xa0: (i) la granularité du signal d'entrée (basé sur des jetons ou basé sur un morphème), et (ii) le niveau d'encodage des éléments de vocabulaire (basé sur des chaînes de caractères ou basé sur des caractères). Nous émettons l'hypothèse que pour les LMR, langues dans lesquelles plusieurs éléments porteurs de sens peuvent être portés par un seul jeton délimité par un espace, ces choix auront des effets mesurables sur la performance des tâches, et que ces effets peuvent varier selon les conceptions architecturales — totalement connectées, convolutives ou récurrentes. Plus précisément, nous émettons l'hypothèse que les représentations basées sur des morphèmes présenteront des avantages en termes de capacité de généralisation et de précision des tâches, en raison de leur meilleure couverture OOV. Pour étudier ces effets de manière empirique, nous développons un nouveau point de référence d'analyse des sentiments pour l'hébreu, basé sur 12 000 commentaires sur les réseaux sociaux, et fournissons deux exemples de ces données\xa0: dans des contextes basés sur des jetons et des morphèmes. Nos expériences montrent que les effets empiriques des choix de représentation varient selon le type d'architecture. Alors que les réseaux entièrement connectés et convolutifs préfèrent légèrement les paramètres basés sur des jetons, les RNN bénéficient d'une représentation basée sur un morphème, conformément à l'hypothèse selon laquelle des informations morphologiques explicites peuvent aider à généraliser. Notre entreprise fournit également le premier\nUn analyseur de sentiments ultramoderne à couverture étendue pour l'hébreu, avec une précision de plus de 89\xa0%, ainsi qu'une référence établie pour étudier plus en détail les effets des choix de représentation linguistique sur la performance des tâches des réseaux de neurones.", 'zh': '实论今希伯来语神经情析,今希伯来语富言(MRL),未有情分析器。 臣等考表徵所择二维度:(i)输信号者粒度(标记与基于语素),及(ii)词汇项之编码水平(基于字符串与字符)。 设之于MRL,则数义元素,或空格隔言,择其能为之权衡,或异架构设计而异 - 之,卷积或循环。 具体来说者,设于语素者,以泛化力任准确性优者,善OOV覆盖率也。 以12K社交媒体论为希伯来语发一新情析准,给其二例:基于令牌、语素之设。 吾实验明,随架构而变也。 虽全接卷积网络稍好令牌设,而RNN受益于语素,此与显式形信息或有助于泛化者也。 我们努力还给了一首\n先进之希伯来语,博覆情分析器,准确率过89%,立基准,以究言语之神经网络。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अनुभवजन्य रूप से आधुनिक हिब्रू के लिए तंत्रिका भावना विश्लेषण पर प्रतिनिधित्व विकल्पों के प्रभावों का अध्ययन करता है, एक रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषा (एमआरएल) जिसके लिए वर्तमान में कोई भावना विश्लेषक मौजूद नहीं है। हम प्रतिनिधित्वात्मक विकल्पों के दो आयामों का अध्ययन करते हैं: (i) इनपुट सिग्नल की ग्रैन्युलैरिटी (टोकन-आधारित बनाम मॉर्फीम-आधारित), और (ii) शब्दावली वस्तुओं के एन्कोडिंग का स्तर (स्ट्रिंग-आधारित बनाम चरित्र-आधारित)। हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि एमआरएल के लिए, ऐसी भाषाएं जहां कई अर्थ-असर वाले तत्वों को एक एकल अंतरिक्ष-सीमांकित टोकन द्वारा ले जाया जा सकता है, इन विकल्पों का कार्य पर्फ्रोफैंस पर औसत दर्जे का प्रभाव होगा, और ये प्रभाव विभिन्न वास्तुशिल्प डिजाइनों के लिए भिन्न हो सकते हैं - पूरी तरह से जुड़े, कनवल्शनल या आवर्तक। विशेष रूप से, हम परिकल्पना करते हैं कि मॉर्फीम-आधारित अभ्यावेदन में उनकी सामान्यीकरण क्षमता और कार्य सटीकता के संदर्भ में लाभ होंगे, क्योंकि उनके बेहतर ओओवी कवरेज के कारण। इन प्रभावों का अनुभवजन्य रूप से अध्ययन करने के लिए, हम हिब्रू के लिए एक नया भावना विश्लेषण बेंचमार्क विकसित करते हैं, जो 12K सोशल मीडिया टिप्पणियों के आधार पर है, और इन डेटा के दो उदाहरण प्रदान करते हैं: टोकन-आधारित और मॉर्फेम-आधारित सेटिंग्स में। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रतिनिधित्व विकल्प अनुभवजन्य प्रभाव वास्तुकला प्रकार के साथ भिन्न होते हैं। जबकि पूरी तरह से जुड़े और convolutional नेटवर्क थोड़ा टोकन-आधारित सेटिंग्स पसंद करते हैं, RNNs एक morpheme-आधारित प्रतिनिधित्व से लाभ, परिकल्पना के अनुरूप है कि स्पष्ट रूपात्मक जानकारी सामान्यीकरण में मदद कर सकते हैं के साथ समझौते में। हमारा प्रयास भी पहले उद्धार करता है\nहिब्रू के लिए अत्याधुनिक व्यापक कवरेज भावना विश्लेषक, 89% से अधिक सटीकता के साथ, तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के कार्य प्रदर्शन पर भाषाई प्रतिनिधित्व विकल्पों के प्रभावों का आगे अध्ययन करने के लिए एक स्थापित बेंचमार्क के साथ।', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo staidéar eimpíreach ar éifeachtaí roghanna ionadaíochta ar anailís meon néarúil don Nua-Eabhrais, teanga atá saibhir ó thaobh moirfeolaíochta de (MRL) nach bhfuil aon anailísí meon ann ina leith faoi láthair. Déanaimid staidéar ar dhá ghné de roghanna ionadaíochta: (i) gráinneacht an chomhartha ionchuir (bunaithe ar chomharthaí vs. bunaithe ar mhoirféim), agus (ii) leibhéal ionchódaithe míreanna foclóra (bunaithe ar shraitheanna vs. bunaithe ar charachtair). Déanaimid hipitéis, maidir le MRLanna, ar theangacha ina bhféadfar gnéithe iolracha a bhfuil brí acu a iompar trí chomhartha aonair spás-theoranta, go mbeidh éifeachtaí intomhaiste ag na roghanna seo ar fheidhmíocht tascanna, agus go bhféadfadh na héifeachtaí seo a bheith éagsúil do dhearaí ailtireachta éagsúla — lán-nasctha, réititheach. nó athfhillteach. Go sonrach, tugaimid hipitéis go mbeidh buntáistí ag léiriúcháin atá bunaithe ar mhoirféim i dtéarmaí a gcumas ginearálaithe agus cruinneas tascanna, mar gheall ar a gclúdach OOV níos fearr. Chun staidéar eimpíreach a dhéanamh ar na héifeachtaí seo, forbraímid tagarmharc nua anailíse meon don Eabhrais, bunaithe ar thuairimí 12K ar na meáin shóisialta, agus soláthraímid dhá chás de na sonraí seo: i suíomhanna atá bunaithe ar chomharthaí agus bunaithe ar mhoirféim. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh go n-athraíonn roghanna ionadaíochta éifeachtaí eimpíreacha de réir an chineáil ailtireachta. Cé gur fearr le líonraí lán-nasctha agus réaltbhuíonta socruithe atá bunaithe ar chomharthaí, baineann RNNanna leas as léiriú atá bunaithe ar mhoirféim, i gcomhréir leis an hipitéis go bhféadfadh eolas moirfeolaíoch follasach cuidiú le ginearálú. Déanann ár n-iarracht an chéad cheann a sheachadadh freisin\nanailísí sentiment clúdach leathan úrscothach don Eabhrais, le cruinneas níos mó ná 89%, mar aon le tagarmharc bunaithe chun staidéar breise a dhéanamh ar éifeachtaí roghanna ionadaíochta teanga ar fheidhmíocht tascanna líonraí néaracha.', 'ru': 'Эта статья эмпирически изучает влияние выбора представления на анализ нейронных настроений для современного иврита, морфологически богатого языка (MRL), для которого в настоящее время не существует анализатора настроений. Мы изучаем два измерения репрезентативных вариантов: (i) зернистость входного сигнала (на основе токенов или на основе морфем) и (ii) уровень кодирования элементов словарного запаса (на основе строк или на основе символов). Мы предполагаем, что для MRL, языков, где несколько смысловых элементов могут быть перенесены одним разделительным маркером, эти варианты будут иметь измеримые эффекты на выполнение задачи, и что эти эффекты могут варьироваться для различных архитектурных конструкций — полностью связанных, сверточных или повторяющихся. В частности, мы предполагаем, что представления на основе морфем будут иметь преимущества с точки зрения их обобщающей способности и точности задач, благодаря их лучшему охвату OOV. Чтобы эмпирически изучить эти эффекты, мы разрабатываем новый эталон анализа настроений для иврита, основанный на 12K комментариях в социальных сетях, и предоставляем два экземпляра этих данных: на основе токенов и на основе морфем. Наши эксперименты показывают, что выбор представления эмпирических эффектов варьируется в зависимости от типа архитектуры. В то время как полностью подключенные и сверточные сети немного предпочитают настройки на основе токенов, RNN извлекают выгоду из представления на основе морфем, в соответствии с гипотезой, что явная морфологическая информация может помочь обобщить. Наши усилия также приносят первые\nсовременный широкополосный анализатор настроений для иврита, с точностью более 89%, наряду с установленным эталоном для дальнейшего изучения влияния вариантов лингвистического представления на выполнение задач нейронными сетями.', 'el': 'προηγμένος αναλυτής συναισθημάτων ευρείας κάλυψης για εβραϊκά, με ακρίβεια πάνω από 89% μαζί με ένα καθιερωμένο σημείο αναφοράς για περαιτέρω μελέτη των επιπτώσεων των γλωσσικών επιλογών αναπαράστασης στην απόδοση εργασιών των νευρωνικών δικτύων.', 'it': "Analizzatore di sentiment all'avanguardia per l'ebraico, con una precisione superiore all'89%, insieme a un benchmark consolidato per studiare ulteriormente gli effetti delle scelte di rappresentazione linguistica sulle prestazioni delle reti neurali.", 'hu': 'korszerű, széles körű lefedettségű hangulatelemző héber számára, több mint 89%-os pontossággal, valamint a nyelvi reprezentációs választások hatásainak további tanulmányozására a neurális hálózatok feladatteljesítményére.', 'ka': 'წარმოდგენის უფრო ფართობით წარმოდგენის ანალიზატორი ჰებრიუში, 89% უფრო ფართობით დამატებული ბენქმარკის დამატებით, რომელიც უფრო ფართობით წარმოდგენა ლენგისტიკური გამოსახულების შესაძლებლო', 'lt': 'naujausias hebrajų plačiojo aprėpties jausmų analizatorius, kurio tikslumas didesnis kaip 89 %, kartu su nustatytu lyginamuoju rodikliu, kuriuo siekiama toliau tirti kalbos atstovavimo pasirinkimo poveikį nervinių tinklų užduočių rezultatams.', 'kk': 'Иврит үшін көпшілік жұмыс жазылу көпшілігін анализ көпшілігін жасау үшін 89% дегеннен артық, неврал желінің тапсырмаларының жұмыс істеу үшін лингвистикалық таңдау таңдауларының эффекттерін жалғастыр', 'ml': 'ഹെബ്രീബ്യര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി വിശാലമായ സ്റ്റേറ്റ്-സ്റ്റേറ്റ് പ്രവർത്തിക്കുന്ന അനുഭവങ്ങളുടെ അനുഭവപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. 89% കൂടുതല്\u200d കൃത്യമായി', 'mk': 'најсовремениот анализатор на сентименти за широко покривање за Еврејците, со над 89 отсто точност, заедно со воспоставен референциски параметр за понатамошна студија на ефектите на изборите за лингвистичка претстава на извршувањето на задачите на невровните мрежи.', 'ms': 'peneliti perasaan penutup lebar yang terbaik untuk Hebrew, dengan lebih dari 89% ketepatan, bersama tanda referensi yang ditetapkan untuk mempelajari lebih lanjut kesan pilihan perwakilan bahasa pada prestasi tugas rangkaian saraf.', 'mn': 'Хеврийн хувьд хэлэлцээний шинжлэх ухааны талаар хэлний үзүүлэлтийн нөлөөг илүү судлах хэлбэрийн сонголтын нөлөөлөл нь 89%-аас илүү зөв байдаг.', 'mt': 'l-aktar analizzatur avvanzat tas-sentimenti ta’ kopertura wiesgħa għall-Ebrej, b’aktar minn 89 % preċiżjoni, flimkien ma’ punt ta’ riferiment stabbilit biex jiġu studjati aktar l-effetti tal-għażliet ta’ rappreżentanza lingwistika fuq il-prestazzjoni tal-kompiti tan-netwerks newrali.', 'no': "state-of-the-art broad-coverage sentiment analyser for Hebrew, with over 89% accuracy, along with an established benchmark to further study the effects of linguistic representation choices on neural networks' task performance.", 'sr': 'Analizirač osjećaja širokog pokrivanja za hebrejski, sa preko 89% tačnosti, zajedno sa utvrđenim kriterijom za daljnje proučavanje efekta izbora jezičkog predstavljanja na zadatak neuronskih mreža.', 'ro': 'Analizor de sentimente de ultimă generație pentru ebraică, cu o precizie de peste 89%, alături de un benchmark stabilit pentru a studia în continuare efectele alegerilor de reprezentare lingvistică asupra performanței de sarcină a rețelelor neurale.', 'pl': 'Najnowocześniejszy analizator sentymentów o szerokim zasięgu dla języka hebrajskiego, z dokładnością ponad 89% oraz ustalonym standardem odniesienia do dalszego badania wpływu wyborów reprezentacji językowej na wydajność zadań sieci neuronowych.', 'ta': 'புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவுகளின் விளைவுகளை மேலும் படிக்க முடியும்', 'ur': 'ہبری کے لئے ایٹیٹ-آرت کے پھیلانے والی احساسات تحقیق کرنے والے، 89% سے زیادہ دقیق، ایک مقرر بنچم مارک کے ساتھ نیورل نیٹ نیٹ ورک کے کام پر زبان کی تصویر کے اثرات کے مطابق پڑھنے کے لئے۔', 'so': 'Hebraaniyadana waxaa loo baaraandegay xaalad farshaxan oo ballaadhan, wuxuuna ku qoran 89% sax ah, waxaana kaloo lagu qoray bannaan si aad ugu sii barato saamaynta doorashada wakiilka luuqadda ee shaqada shabakadda neurada.', 'si': 'state-of-the-art width-Cover-sensation විශ්ලේෂකයෙන් හිබ්\u200dරු වෙනුවෙන් විශ්ලේෂකයෙන්, 89% විතරයි, ස්ථාපිත බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් එක්ක, භාෂාවික විශ්ලේෂකයේ ත', 'sv': 'state-of-the-art bred täckning sentiment analysator för hebreiska, med över 89% noggrannhet, tillsammans med ett etablerat riktmärke för att ytterligare studera effekterna av språkliga representationsval på neurala nätverkens uppgiftsförmåga.', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ phân tích đa cảm phổ biến tiên tiến nhất cho người Do Thái, với độ chính xác hơn 897, cùng với một tiêu chuẩn đã được xác định để nghiên cứu thêm tác động của các khả năng phân biệt ngôn ngữ học trên khả năng nhiệm vụ của mạng thần kinh.', 'bg': 'Съвременен широкообхватен сентиментален анализатор за иврит с над 89% точност, наред с установен референтен показател за допълнително проучване на ефектите от избора на лингвистично представяне върху изпълнението на задачите на невронните мрежи.', 'nl': 'Een state-of-the-art brede-dekking sentiment analyzer voor Hebreeuws, met meer dan 89% nauwkeurigheid, naast een gevestigde benchmark om de effecten van taalkundige representatie keuzes op de taakprestaties van neurale netwerken verder te bestuderen.', 'de': 'Ein hochmoderner Sentiment-Analysator f羹r Hebr瓣isch mit mehr als 89% Genauigkeit sowie ein etablierter Benchmark zur weiteren Untersuchung der Auswirkungen sprachlicher Repr瓣sentationsentscheidungen auf die Aufgabenleistung neuronaler Netze.', 'da': 'state-of-the-art bredækkende sentiment analysator til hebraisk, med over 89% nøjagtighed, sammen med et etableret benchmark til yderligere undersøgelse af virkningerne af sproglige repræsentationsvalg på neurale netværks opgaver ydeevne.', 'ko': '가장 선진적인 히브리어는 정서분석기를 광범위하게 커버하고 정확도가 89%를 초과하며 언어 표징 선택이 신경 네트워크 임무 성능에 미치는 영향을 더욱 연구하는 기준이다.', 'id': 'peneliti sentimen yang paling terbaik untuk bahasa Hebrew, dengan lebih dari 89% akurasi, bersama benchmark yang ditetapkan untuk mempelajari lebih lanjut efek dari pilihan representation bahasa pada prestasi tugas jaringan saraf.', 'sw': 'Anachambua hisia za habari za sanaa kwa Kibraania, kwa zaidi ya asilimia 89 ya uhalisia, pamoja na bendera iliyoanzishwa ili kuendelea kutafiti athari za uchaguzi wa uwakilishi wa lugha juu ya kazi za mitandao ya neurali.', 'af': "state-of-the-art broad-coverage sentiment analyseer vir Hebreeus, met meer as 89% waarskynlik, saam met 'n geïnstalleerde benchmark om die effekte van lingwisiese verteenwoordingskeuses te verder ondersoek op die opdrag van neuralnetwerke.", 'hr': 'analiziranje osjećaja širokog pokrivanja za hebrejski, s preko 89% tačnosti, zajedno s utvrđenim kriterijom za daljnje proučavanje učinka izbora jezičkog predstavljanja na djelovanje neuronskih mreža.', 'tr': 'Ýähüd dili üçin halkara golaýlaşyk duýgulary çözümleyicisi 89% degişli, näyral şebekeleriň täsirinde lingwistiki temsilleme saýlawlaryň täsirlerini öňlemek üçin guruldy etiketçi.', 'sq': 'analizuesi i ndjenjave me mbulim të gjerë më të lartë për hebrenjtë, me më tepër se 89% saktësi, së bashku me një normë të vendosur për të studiuar më tej efektet e zgjedhjeve të përfaqësimit gjuhësor në performancën e detyrave të rrjeteve nervore.', 'hy': 'Հեբրայի համար լայն տարածության զգացմունքների վերլուծողը, 89 տոկոսի ճշգրիտությամբ, կազմակերպված համեմատական արտահայտության կողմից, որպեսզի հետագայում ուսումնասիրեն լեզվաբանական ներկայացման ընտրությունների ազդեցությունը նյարդային ցանցերի գործողությունների վրա:', 'az': 'İbrahim üçün çox geniş pərdəli hisslər analizatçısı, 89% daha doğruluğu ilə, nöral şebekələrin işlətməsi üzərində dil göstəricisi seçimlərin etkisini daha çox öyrənmək üçün qurulmuş bir benchmarklə birlikdə.', 'bn': 'হিব্রুদের জন্য শিল্প-শিল্পের ব্যাপক কাভারেজের অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষক, যার সাথে ৮৯ শতাংশেরও বেশি সঠিকভাবে নির্ধারিত বেনম্যার্ক, যাতে ভাষাগত প্রতিনি', 'fa': 'تحلیل احساسات وسیع حفاظت هنری برای ابریشم، با بیش از ۹۸ درصد دقیق، کنار یک مقدار مقرر شده برای further تحقیق اثرات انتخاب نمایش زبان\u200cشناسی روی عملکرد شبکه\u200cهای عصبی.', 'et': 'Üle 89% täpsusega tipptasemel heebrea keele tundeanalüsaator koos väljakujunenud võrdlusalusega, et täiendavalt uurida keelelise esinduse valikute mõju närvivõrkude ülesannete täitmisele.', 'fi': 'Nykyaikainen hepreankielinen laajalle levinneisyysanalysaattori, jonka tarkkuus on yli 89%, sekä vakiintunut vertailuarvo, jonka avulla voidaan tutkia edelleen kielellisten esitysvalintojen vaikutuksia neuroverkkojen tehtävien suorituskykyyn.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የመስመር ምርጫዎች በናውራዊ መረብ ስራ ማድረግ ላይ የሚያስተምር የቋንቋ ምርጫዎችን ለመጨመር የዕብራይስጥ አካባቢ አካላቢ፣ 89 በመቶ አካላቢ እና 89 በመቶ ያህል ማስረጃ ላይ የተመዘጋጀ የክፍል ማረፊያ ነው፡፡', 'bs': 'Analiziranje osjećaja širokog pokrivanja za hebrejski, sa preko 89% tačnosti, zajedno s utvrđenim kriterijom za daljnje proučavanje učinka izbora jezičke predstave na djelovanje neuronskih mreža.', 'cs': 'Nejmodernější široce pokrytý analyzátor sentimentu pro hebrejštinu s přesností více než 89% spolu se zavedeným referenčním standardem pro další studium vlivů jazykových reprezentací na výkon úloh neuronových sítí.', 'ca': "l'analitzador de sentiments de gran cobertura última per a l'hebreu, amb més del 89% de precisió, juntament amb un punt de referència estabelect per estudiar més endavant els efectes de les eleccions de representació lingüística en el desempeny de les tasques de les xarxes neurals.", 'jv': 'state-of-the-arts online', 'he': 'מנתח רגשות ברחבי כיסוי חדש ביותר עבור היברים, עם מדויקת מעל 89 אחוזים, לצד נקודת רמז קבועה כדי לחקור יותר את השפעות של בחירות מייצג שפתי על ביצועי המשימה של רשתות עצביות.', 'sk': 'Najsodobnejši analizator občutkov široke pokritosti za hebrejščino z več kot 89-odstotno natančnostjo, poleg uveljavljenega merila za nadaljnje preučevanje učinkov izbire jezikovne reprezentacije na uspešnost nalog nevronskih omrežij.', 'bo': "state-of-the-art broad-coverage sentiment analyzer for Hebrew, with over 89% accuracy, along with an established benchmark to further study the effects of linguistic representation choices on neural networks' task performance.", 'ha': 'Analyser na-halin-rufe-faɗi mai shimfiɗa wa Hebrew, da akan 89% na daidaita, sami da wani bangon da aka daidaita zuwa ƙara karanta fassarar shiryoyin ayuka na tsarin linguistic kan aikin aikin neural.'}
{'en': 'Scoring and Classifying Implicit Positive Interpretations : A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'ar': 'تصنيف وتصنيف التفسيرات الإيجابية الضمنية: تحدي عدم التوازن الطبقي', 'fr': 'Noter et classifier les interprétations positives implicites\xa0: le défi du déséquilibre des classes', 'pt': 'Pontuando e Classificando Interpretações Positivas Implícitas: Um Desafio de Desequilíbrio de Classe', 'es': 'Calificar y clasificar interpretaciones positivas implícitas: un desafío del desequilibrio de clases', 'ja': '暗黙の肯定的解釈の採点と分類：クラスの不均衡の課題', 'zh': '隐性积解评分类:阶级失衡挑战', 'hi': 'स्कोरिंग और वर्गीकृत अंतर्निहित सकारात्मक व्याख्याएं: वर्ग असंतुलन की एक चुनौती', 'ru': 'Оценка и классификация неявных положительных интерпретаций: проблема классового дисбаланса', 'ga': 'Léirmhínithe Dearfacha intuigthe a Scóráil agus a Rangú: Dúshlán Éagothroime Ranga', 'hu': 'Pontszámozás és osztályozás Implicit Positive Interpretations: A Challenge of Class Unbalance', 'it': 'Puntare e classificare interpretazioni implicite positive: una sfida di squilibrio di classe', 'el': 'Αξιολόγηση και ταξινόμηση των έμμεσων θετικών ερμηνείων: Μια πρόκληση της ταξικής ανισορροπίας', 'ka': 'პარამეტრები და კლასიფიკაცია იმპლიტიკური პოციტიური ინტერპექტირები: კლასის თმბალანესის გარეშე', 'lt': 'Įvertinimas ir netiesioginių teigiamų aiškinimų klasifikavimas: klasės disbalanso uždavinys', 'ml': 'സ്കോരിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതും ക്ലാസിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതും സ്ഥിരമായ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d: ഒരു ക്ലാസ് ഇമാലാന്\u200dസല്\u200d', 'kk': 'Нәтижелер мен классификациялау имбалансы', 'mk': 'Позначување и класификација на имплицитни позитивни интерпретации: предизвик на нерамнотежа на класата', 'ms': 'Nilai dan Penaklasifikasi Interpretasi Positif Implik: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'no': 'Poeng og klassifisering', 'mt': 'Punteġġ u Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Interpretazzjonijiet Pożittivi Impliċiti: Sfida ta’ Żbilanċ tal-Klassi', 'sr': 'Pogodak i klasifikacija Implicitnih pozitivnih interpretacija: izazov klase nepravednosti', 'mn': 'Нээлт болон Classifying Implicit Positive Interpretations: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'so': 'Turjumaadda farsamada iyo fasalka Implicit Positive: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'pl': 'Ocena i klasyfikacja implicytnych interpretacji pozytywnych: wyzwanie dla nierównowagi klasy', 'ro': 'Scorul și clasificarea interpretărilor pozitive implicite: o provocare a dezechilibrului de clasă', 'ur': 'Scoring and Classifying Implicit Positive Interpretations: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ක්ලාසිෆික්ට් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂය: A challenge of classification Imalance', 'sv': 'Poängsättning och klassificering Implicit Positive Interpretations: En utmaning av klassobalans', 'ta': 'Scoring and Classifying Implicit Positive Interpretations: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Đánh dấu và phân tích tích tích tích tích tích âm thầm:', 'nl': 'Scoring en classificatie van impliciete positieve interpretaties: een uitdaging van klasse onevenwicht', 'da': 'Scoring og klassificering Implicit Positive Tolkninger: En udfordring af klasse ubalance', 'bg': 'Оценяване и класифициране на имплицитните положителни интерпретации: предизвикателство на класовия дисбаланс', 'hr': 'Rezultat i klasifikacija Implicitnih pozitivnih razumijevanja: izazov nepravednosti klase', 'id': 'Puncakan dan Klasifikasi Interpretasi Positif Implik: Sebuah Tanda Keimbangan Kelas', 'de': 'Bewertung und Klassifizierung impliziter positiver Interpretationen: Eine Herausforderung für Klassenungleichgewichte', 'ko': '내은 적극 해석의 평점과 분류: 계급 불균형의 도전', 'sw': 'Scoring and Classifying Implicit Positive Interpretations: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'fa': 'تفسیر مثبت\u200cهای مثبت را تحریک می\u200cکند و تقسیم می\u200cکند: یک چالش نابرابری کلاس', 'tr': 'Görüntüle ve Sınıflandırma', 'af': 'Telling en klassifisering Implicite Positive Interpretations: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'sq': 'Scoring and Classifying Implicit Positive Interpretations: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'am': 'balance', 'az': 'G칬z톛ltm톛 v톛 Klasifikl톛m톛 캻pliktif Pozitiv T톛rcl톛m톛l톛r: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'hy': 'A Chachallenge of the IQ', 'bn': 'স্কোরিং এবং স্ক্রাইজিং ইম্পিকিট পজিটিভ ব্যাখ্যা: একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ অফ ক্লাস ইমান্যালেঞ্জ', 'ca': "Puntuació i classificació d'interpretacions positives implícites: Un repte de desequilibri de classe", 'cs': 'Skórování a klasifikace implicitních pozitivních interpretací: výzva třídní nerovnováhy', 'et': 'Kaudsete positiivsete tõlgenduste hindamine ja klassifitseerimine: klasside tasakaalustamatuse väljakutse', 'bs': 'Pogled i klasifikacija Implicitnih pozitivnih interpretacija: izazov klase nepravednosti', 'fi': 'Implisiittisten positiivisten tulkintojen pisteytys ja luokittelu: luokkaepätasapainon haaste', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'he': 'Scoring and Classifying Implicit Positive Interpretations: A Challenge of Class Imbalance', 'sk': 'Ocenjevanje in razvrščanje implicitnih pozitivnih interpretacij: izziv neravnovesja razredov', 'bo': 'སྐུད་ཚད་དང་འཛིན་གྱིས་དམིགས་འབེལ་གྱི་དབྱིབས་ཚུལ་བཙུགས་པ། A Challenge of Class Imbalance'}
{'en': 'This paper reports on a reimplementation of a system on detecting implicit positive meaning from negated statements. In the original regression experiment, different positive interpretations per negation are scored according to their likelihood. We convert the scores to classes and report our results on both the regression and classification tasks. We show that a baseline taking the mean score or most frequent class is hard to beat because of class imbalance in the dataset. Our error analysis indicates that an approach that takes the information structure into account (i.e. which information is new or contrastive) may be promising, which requires looking beyond the syntactic and semantic characteristics of negated statements.', 'ar': 'تتناول هذه الورقة إعادة تنفيذ نظام للكشف عن المعنى الإيجابي الضمني من العبارات المنفية. في تجربة الانحدار الأصلية ، تم تسجيل تفسيرات إيجابية مختلفة لكل نفي وفقًا لاحتمالية حدوثها. نقوم بتحويل الدرجات إلى فئات والإبلاغ عن نتائجنا في كل من مهام الانحدار والتصنيف. نوضح أنه من الصعب التغلب على خط الأساس الذي يأخذ متوسط الدرجة أو الفصل الأكثر شيوعًا بسبب عدم توازن الفئة في مجموعة البيانات. يشير تحليل الخطأ الخاص بنا إلى أن النهج الذي يأخذ بنية المعلومات في الاعتبار (أي المعلومات الجديدة أو المتناقضة) قد يكون واعدًا ، الأمر الذي يتطلب النظر إلى ما وراء الخصائص النحوية والدلالية للبيانات المنفية.', 'fr': "Cet article rend compte de la réimplémentation d'un système de détection du sens positif implicite à partir d'énoncés négatifs. Dans l'expérience de régression originale, différentes interprétations positives par négation sont notées en fonction de leur probabilité. Nous convertissons les scores en classes et communiquons nos résultats pour les tâches de régression et de classification. Nous montrons qu'une base prenant le score moyen ou la classe la plus fréquente est difficile à battre en raison du déséquilibre des classes dans l'ensemble de données. Notre analyse des erreurs indique qu'une approche qui prend en compte la structure de l'information (c'est-à-dire quelles informations sont nouvelles ou contrastives) peut être prometteuse, ce qui nécessite de regarder au-delà des caractéristiques syntaxiques et sémantiques des déclarations annulées.", 'pt': 'Este artigo relata a reimplementação de um sistema de detecção de significado positivo implícito de declarações negadas. No experimento de regressão original, diferentes interpretações positivas por negação são pontuadas de acordo com sua probabilidade. Convertemos as pontuações em classes e relatamos nossos resultados nas tarefas de regressão e classificação. Mostramos que uma linha de base que toma a pontuação média ou a classe mais frequente é difícil de superar devido ao desequilíbrio de classe no conjunto de dados. Nossa análise de erros indica que uma abordagem que leva em consideração a estrutura da informação (ou seja, qual informação é nova ou contrastante) pode ser promissora, o que requer olhar além das características sintáticas e semânticas das declarações negadas.', 'es': 'Este artículo informa sobre una reimplementación de un sistema para detectar el significado positivo implícito de las declaraciones negadas. En el experimento de regresión original, las diferentes interpretaciones positivas por negación se puntúan de acuerdo con su probabilidad. Convertimos las puntuaciones en clases e informamos nuestros resultados tanto en las tareas de regresión como de clasificación. Mostramos que una línea de base que toma la puntuación media o la clase más frecuente es difícil de superar debido al desequilibrio de clases en el conjunto de datos. Nuestro análisis de errores indica que un enfoque que tenga en cuenta la estructura de la información (es decir, qué información es nueva o contrastiva) puede ser prometedor, lo que requiere mirar más allá de las características sintácticas y semánticas de las declaraciones negadas.', 'ja': '本稿では、否定された記述から暗黙の肯定的意味を検出するためのシステムの再実装について報告する。元の回帰実験では、否定ごとに異なる正の解釈が、その可能性に応じてスコア付けされる。スコアをクラスに変換し、回帰と分類の両方のタスクの結果を報告します。平均スコアまたは最も頻度の高いクラスを取るベースラインは、データセットのクラスの不均衡のために負けにくいことが示されています。我々のエラー分析は、情報構造を考慮に入れたアプローチ（すなわち、どの情報が新しいか、または対照的か）が有望である可能性があることを示しており、これは否定された記述の構文的および意味的特徴を超えて見る必要がある。', 'zh': '本文报从否定语句中检测隐含积极意义的系统重成。 原始归实验,各以其性评分。 我们将分数转换为类,并告诉我们在归和分类上。 明以数聚不平,取均分、常见之基线难败也。 臣等谬分析表明,思信息结构(所信新比)其法或可冀,须越非句法语义。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर नकारे गए बयानों से निहित सकारात्मक अर्थ का पता लगाने पर एक प्रणाली के पुन: कार्यान्वयन पर रिपोर्ट करता है। मूल प्रतिगमन प्रयोग में, प्रति निषेध विभिन्न सकारात्मक व्याख्याओं को उनकी संभावना के अनुसार स्कोर किया जाता है। हम स्कोर को कक्षाओं में परिवर्तित करते हैं और प्रतिगमन और वर्गीकरण कार्यों दोनों पर अपने परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि डेटासेट में वर्ग असंतुलन के कारण औसत स्कोर या सबसे लगातार कक्षा लेने वाली एक बेसलाइन को हराना मुश्किल है। हमारा त्रुटि विश्लेषण इंगित करता है कि एक दृष्टिकोण जो जानकारी संरचना को ध्यान में रखता है (यानी कौन सी जानकारी नई या विरोधाभासी है) आशाजनक हो सकती है, जिसके लिए नकारे गए बयानों की वाक्यात्मक और शब्दार्थ विशेषताओं से परे देखने की आवश्यकता होती है।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе сообщается о повторном внедрении системы обнаружения имплицитного положительного значения из опровергнутых заявлений. В первоначальном эксперименте с регрессией различные положительные интерпретации на отрицание оцениваются в соответствии с их вероятностью. Мы переводим баллы в классы и сообщаем наши результаты как по регрессии, так и по классификации задач. Мы показываем, что базовую линию, принимающую средний балл или наиболее частый класс, трудно обойти из-за классового дисбаланса в наборе данных. Наш анализ ошибок показывает, что перспективным может быть подход, учитывающий информационную структуру (т.е. какая информация является новой или контрастной), что требует выхода за пределы синтаксических и семантических характеристик отрицаемых утверждений.', 'ga': 'Tuairiscíonn an páipéar seo ar athchur i bhfeidhm ar chóras chun brí dhearfach intuigthe a bhrath ó ráitis dhiúltaithe. Sa bhunturgnamh cúlchéimnithe, scóráiltear léirmhínithe dearfacha difriúla in aghaidh an tsiúltaithe de réir a dóchúlachta. Tiontaíonn muid na scóir go ranganna agus tuairiscímid ár dtorthaí ar na tascanna aischéimnithe agus rangaithe araon. Léirímid go bhfuil sé deacair bunlíne a thógann an meánscór nó an rang is minice a bhualadh mar gheall ar éagothroime ranga sa tacar sonraí. Léiríonn ár n-anailís earráide go bhféadfadh cur chuige a chuireann an struchtúr faisnéise san áireamh (i.e. an fhaisnéis atá nua nó codarsnach) a bheith geallta, a éilíonn breathnú níos faide ná tréithe comhréire agus séimeantaice na ráiteas diúltach.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία αναφέρεται στην επανεγκατάσταση ενός συστήματος ανίχνευσης έμμεσης θετικής σημασίας από αρνητικές δηλώσεις. Στο αρχικό πείραμα παλινδρόμησης βαθμολογούνται διαφορετικές θετικές ερμηνείες ανά άρνηση ανάλογα με την πιθανότητα τους. Μετατρέπουμε τις βαθμολογίες σε τάξεις και αναφέρουμε τα αποτελέσματά μας τόσο για τις εργασίες παλινδρόμησης όσο και για τις εργασίες ταξινόμησης. Δείχνουμε ότι μια γραμμή βάσης που λαμβάνει τη μέση βαθμολογία ή την πιο συχνή τάξη είναι δύσκολο να νικηθεί λόγω της ταξικής ανισορροπίας στο σύνολο δεδομένων. Η ανάλυση σφαλμάτων μας δείχνει ότι μια προσέγγιση που λαμβάνει υπόψη τη δομή των πληροφοριών (δηλαδή ποιες πληροφορίες είναι νέες ή αντιφατικές) μπορεί να είναι ελπιδοφόρα, η οποία απαιτεί να κοιτάξουμε πέρα από τα συντακτικά και σημασιολογικά χαρακτηριστικά των αρνητικών δηλώσεων.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy negatív állításokból származó implicit pozitív jelentés kimutatására irányuló rendszer újratelepítéséről számol be. Az eredeti regressziós kísérletben negatív különböző pozitív értelmezéseket értékelünk a valószínűség szerint. A pontszámokat osztályokká alakítjuk, és jelentjük eredményeinket a regressziós és osztályozási feladatokról. Megmutatjuk, hogy az átlagos pontszámot vagy a leggyakoribb osztályt meghatározó alapképzés nehéz legyőzni az adatkészletben lévő osztályok egyensúlytalansága miatt. Hibaelemzésünk azt mutatja, hogy egy olyan megközelítés, amely figyelembe veszi az információs struktúrát (azaz melyik információ új vagy kontrasztos) ígéretes lehet, ami megköveteli, hogy a negatív állítások szintaktikai és szemantikai jellemzőit túllépjük.', 'ka': 'ეს დაახლოები სისტემის გადაყენება შესახებ ინფლიციტური პოტიფიკაციური ნიშნავს განახლოებით განახლოებით. ორიგინალური რეგრესი ექსპერიმენტში განსხვავებული პოტიფიკაციური ინტერპექციები ყოველ ნექციაში იქნება მათი შესაძლებლობაზე. ჩვენ წერტილების კლასში გადავცვლეთ და ჩვენი წერტილების შესახებ რეგრესის და კლასიფიკაციის დავალების შესახებ. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ საშუალო წერტილი ან საშუალო კლასი ძალიან ძალიან გადავიწყება კლასის განბალიზების შემთხვევაში. ჩვენი შეცდომა ანალიზია, რომ ინფორმაციის სტრუქტურაციას ახალი ან კონტრასტიური შესაძლებელია, რომელიც უნდა იყვანოთ სინტაქტიური და სიმენტიური პროგრაციების გარეშე.', 'it': "Questo articolo riporta una reimplementazione di un sistema sul rilevamento di significato positivo implicito da dichiarazioni negate. Nell'esperimento di regressione originale, diverse interpretazioni positive per negazione vengono valutate in base alla loro probabilità. Convertiamo i punteggi in classi e riportiamo i nostri risultati sia sulle attività di regressione che di classificazione. Mostriamo che una base di riferimento che prende il punteggio medio o la classe più frequente è difficile da battere a causa dello squilibrio delle classi nel set di dati. La nostra analisi degli errori indica che un approccio che tenga conto della struttura dell'informazione (cioè quale informazione è nuova o contrastante) può essere promettente, che richiede di guardare oltre le caratteristiche sintattiche e semantiche delle dichiarazioni negate.", 'lt': 'This paper reports on a reimplementation of a system on detecting implicit positive meaning from negated statements.  Atliekant pradinį regresijos eksperimentą, pagal jų tikimybę įvertinami skirtingi teigiami aiškinimai vienam neigiamam poveikiui. Mes perskaičiuojame rezultatus į klases ir pranešame apie rezultatus regresijos ir klasifikacijos užduotyse. Mes rodome, kad dėl klasės disbalanso duomenų rinkinyje sunku įveikti pradinį tašką, kurio vidutinis rezultatas arba dažniausia klasė. Mūsų klaidų analizė rodo, kad poži ūris, į kurį atsižvelgiama į informacinę struktūrą (t. y. kuri informacija yra nauja arba prieštaringa), gali būti perspektyvus, todėl reikia pažvelgti ne tik į neigiamų teiginių sintaktines ir semantines savybes.', 'mk': 'Овој весник известува за реимплементација на системот за детектирање имплицитно позитивно значење од негираните изјави. Во оригиналниот експеримент за регресија, различни позитивни интерпретации по негативност се оценуваат според нивната веројатност. Ги претвориме резултатите во класи и ги известуваме резултатите за регресијата и класификацијата. Ние покажуваме дека основната оценка која ја зема средната оценка или најчестота класа е тешко да се победи поради дебалансот на класата во податоците. Нашата анализа на грешки покажува дека пристапот кој ја зема во предвид информациската структура (т.е. која информација е нова или контрастивна) може да биде ветувачки, што бара поглед надвор од синтактичките и семантичните карактеристики на негираните изјави.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз келтірілген мәліметтерден негізделген оң маңызды анықтау үшін жүйені қайта орындау туралы хабарлады. Бастапқы регрессия тәжірибесінде, әрбір нәтижесінде әртүрлі нәтижесінде нәтижесінің мүмкіндігіне сәйкес келеді. Нәтижелерді сыныптарға аударып, нәтижелерімізді регрессия және классификация тапсырмаларына хабарлаймыз. Біз деректер жиынындағы класс дисбалансы үшін негізгі сызық немесе ең көптеген класс көптеген класс бағалауы қиын деп көрсетедік. Қате анализиясыз мәлімет құрылғысын (мәліметі жаңа немесе контрастырлық) сәйкестігін есептеп беретін тәртібін көрсетеді. Бұл сөйлемелердің синтактикалық және semantiкалық қасиеттерінен артық қарау керек', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jirrapporta dwar implimentazzjoni mill-ġdid ta’ sistema dwar l-iskoperta ta’ tifsira impliċita pożittiva minn dikjarazzjonijiet negati. In the original regression experiment, different positive interpretations per negation are scored according to their likelihood.  Aħna nibdlu l-punteġġi għal klassijiet u nirrappurtaw ir-riżultati tagħna kemm dwar il-kompiti ta’ rigressjoni kif ukoll dwar il-klassifikazzjoni. Aħna nuru li linja bażi li tieħu l-punteġġ medju jew il-klassi l-aktar frekwenti hija diffiċli biex tingħeleb minħabba l-iżbilanċ tal-klassi fis-sett tad-dejta. L-analiżi tagħna tal-i żbalji tindika li approċċ li jqis l-istruttura tal-informazzjoni (jiġifieri liema informazzjoni hija ġdida jew kontrastanti) jista’ jkun promettenti, li jeħtieġ li wieħed iħares lil hinn mill-karatteristiċi sintattiċi u semantiċi ta’ dikjarazzjonijiet negati.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini melaporkan mengenai pelaksanaan semula sistem untuk mengesan makna positif implicit dari pernyataan negasi. Dalam percubaan regresi asal, interpretasi positif berbeza setiap negatif dicatat mengikut kemungkinan mereka. We convert the scores to classes and report our results on both the regression and classification tasks.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa asas mengambil skor purata atau kelas paling sering sukar untuk mengalahkan kerana ketidakseimbangan kelas dalam set data. Analisis ralat kami menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan yang mengambil struktur maklumat ke dalam akaun (iaitu maklumat yang baru atau bertentangan) mungkin berjanji, yang memerlukan melihat melampaui ciri-ciri sintaktik dan semantik pernyataan negasi.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നത് നേരിട്ട വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നതിനെപ് ആദ്യത്തെ റിക്രഷന്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d, നേഗനേഷനില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അവരുടെ സാധ്യതകള്\u200dക്ക് അനുസരിച്ച് വ്യത്യ നമ്മള്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200dസിനെ ക്ലാസിലേക്ക് മാറ്റി റിപ്രിക്ഷനും ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലികളിലേക്കും നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d  നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റില്\u200d ക്ലാസിന്റെ അസാധാരണമില്ലാത്തതിനാല്\u200d ഒരു ബെസ്റ്റ് ലൈന നമ്മുടെ പിശക് വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അക്കൌണ്ടിലേക്ക് എടുക്കുന്ന ഒരു വഴിയാണെന്ന് തെളിയിക്കുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുതിയ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d എതിര്\u200dപ്', 'no': 'Denne papiret rapporterer om ein gjenoppretting av eit systemet på å finna implisitt positivt mening frå negativte uttrykk. I den opprinnelige regresjonsperimenten blir forskjellige positiv tolkingar per negasjon rekna ut etter sannsynligheten. Vi konverterer poeng til klasser og rapporterer resultatet våre om både regresjonar og klassifikasjonar. Vi viser at ein grunnlinje som tar gjennomsnittpunktet eller mest ofte klasse er vanskeleg å slå på grunn av klassisk ulikhet i datasettet. Feilanalysen vårt viser at ein tilnærming som tar informasjonstrukturen i konto (t.d. kva informasjon er ny eller kontrastiv) kan vera promessant, som krev å sjå etter syntaktiske og semantiske karakteristikk av negativte uttrykk.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас нь системийн дахин нэмэгдүүлэх тухай мэдээллийг эсрэг хэлэлцээсээс хамааралтай эерэг утгыг олж мэдэх тухай харуулдаг. Эхний регрессийн туршилтанд сөрөг тохиолдолд өөр өөр эерэг тодорхойлолт нь тэдний магадлал дээр тооцоолж байна. Бид тоонуудыг хичээл рүү шилжүүлж, үр дүнг нь хоёр дахин сэтгэл хөдлөл болон хуваалцах үйлдлийн тухай мэдээлэл өгдөг. Бид дундаж оноо эсвэл ихэвчлэн хичээлийн суурь шугам нь өгөгдлийн санд хичээлийн тэгшитгэл байдлын тулд ялагдах хэцүү гэдгийг харуулж байна. Бидний алдааны шинжилгээний талаар мэдээллийн бүтэц (яг л шинэ эсвэл эсрэг мэдээллийг) тооцоолж авах арга зам нь амлалтай байж болно. Энэ нь сөрөг утгын синтактик болон semantic чанарыг харах хэрэгтэй.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł przedstawia ponowne wdrożenie systemu wykrywania ukrytego pozytywnego znaczenia z negowanych stwierdzeń. W pierwotnym eksperymencie regresyjnym oceniane są różne pozytywne interpretacje na negację według ich prawdopodobieństwa. Konwertujemy wyniki na klasy i raportujemy nasze wyniki zarówno na temat zadań regresji, jak i klasyfikacji. Pokazujemy, że baza bazowa przyjmująca średni wynik lub najczęstszą klasę jest trudna do pokonania ze względu na brak równowagi klasowej w zbiorze danych. Nasza analiza błędów wskazuje, że podejście uwzględniające strukturę informacji (tj. która informacja jest nowa lub kontrastywna) może być obiecujące, co wymaga spojrzenia poza składnię i semantyczną cechę negowanych stwierdzeń.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă o reimplementare a unui sistem de detectare a semnificațiilor pozitive implicite din declarațiile negate. În experimentul de regresie inițial, diferite interpretări pozitive per negație sunt marcate în funcție de probabilitatea lor. Transformăm scorurile în clase și raportăm rezultatele noastre atât pe sarcinile de regresie, cât și pe cele de clasificare. Aratăm că o bază de referință care ia scorul mediu sau clasa cea mai frecventă este greu de depășit din cauza dezechilibrului clasei în setul de date. Analiza erorilor noastre indică faptul că o abordare care ia în considerare structura informațională (adică care informație este nouă sau contrastantă) poate fi promițătoare, ceea ce necesită o privire dincolo de caracteristicile sintactice și semantice ale declarațiilor negate.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir izvještava o ponovnom provedbi sistema o otkrivanju implicitnog pozitivnog znaèaja iz negativnih izjava. U originalnom eksperimentu regresije, različite pozitivne interpretacije po negaciji rezultuju prema njihovoj verovatnosti. Preobraćamo rezultate na časove i prijavimo rezultate o regresiji i klasifikaciji. Pokazujemo da je početna linija koja uzima srednji rezultat ili najčešće klase teško pobijediti zbog neslaganja klase u podacima. Naša analiza greške ukazuje na to da je pristup koji uzima u obzir informativnu strukturu (t.i. koju informaciju je nova ili kontrastivna), možda obećava, koji zahteva gledanje izvan sintaktičnih i semantičnih karakteristika negativnih izjava.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats redovisar en återimplementering av ett system för att upptäcka implicit positiv mening från negata uttalanden. I det ursprungliga regressionsexperimentet görs olika positiva tolkningar per negation beroende på sannolikheten. Vi omvandlar poängen till klasser och rapporterar våra resultat på både regressions- och klassificeringsuppgifter. Vi visar att en baslinje som tar medelpoängen eller den vanligaste klassen är svår att slå på grund av klassobalans i datauppsättningen. Vår felanalys visar att ett tillvägagångssätt som tar hänsyn till informationsstrukturen (dvs vilken information som är ny eller kontrastiv) kan vara lovande, vilket kräver att man tittar bortom de syntaktiska och semantiska egenskaperna hos negativa uttalanden.', 'so': 'Warqaddan warqadda ah ayaa ku qoran in lagu soo boorriyo nidaamka ku saabsan in lagu ogaado macnaheedu waxyaabaha suurtagal ah oo laga soo jeedo hadallada la nacay. Imtixaanka asalka ah ee dib u celinta waxaa lagu qiyaasaa turjubaano suurtagal ah oo kala duduwan, sida suurtagal ah. Iskuulaadka waxaynu u beddelinaynaa fasalka, waxaana wargelinaynaa resultiyada ku saabsan shaqooyinka dib u dhigista iyo fasaxa. Waxaynu tusnahay in fasalka aasaasiga ah oo qaadanaya fasalka waxey ku adag tahay in la garaaco, sababtoo ah fasalka aan la qiimo karin. Analyska qaladkayaga waxaa loola jeedaa in qaab macluumaadka lagu xisaabinayo (tusaale ahaan macluumaadku waa cusub ama is-bedelan) oo looga baahan yahay mid ka sii kordha takhasuska iyo takhasuska hadallada diidmada ah.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ පද්ධතියක් ආපහු ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ගැන වාර්තා කරනවා ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් නැවත ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dර මූලික ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණයෙන්, වෙනස් විශේෂ සාධාරණික අභිවිධානය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ඔවුන්ගේ  අපි පරික්ෂණාව පරික්ෂණාවට වෙනස් කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අධාරණ ස්කෝර් එකක් නැත්තම් ස්කෝර් එකක් ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පටන් ගන්න අමාරුයි කියලා ද අපේ වැරදි විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නයි තොරතුරු සංවිධානයක් ගණනයට ගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා (ඉතින්, මොකද තොරතුරු අලුත් නැත්නම් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂ', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் அறிக்கைகள் எதிர்பார்க்கப்பட்ட கூற்றுகளில் இருந்து தேவையான அர்த்தம் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் மீண்டும் ஒர In the original regression experiment, different positive interpretations per negation are scored according to their likelihood.  நாம் மதிப்பெண்களை வகுப்புகளுக்கு மாற்றி மற்றும் திரும்ப மறும் வகுப்பு பணிகளுக்கும் முடிவுகளை அறிவிக்க நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் ஒரு அடிப்படைக்கோடு சராசரி மதிப்பெண்ணை எடுத்து அல்லது அதிகப்பெரும்பாலாக வகுப்பு தர எங்கள் பிழை ஆய்வு குறிப்பிடுகிறது தகவல் அமைப்பை கணக்கில் எடுக்கும் (அதாவது புதிய தகவல் அல்லது எதிர்மறையாக இருக்கும்) ஒரு வழிமுறையாக இருக்கலாம், அது எதிர்மறை க', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ ایک سیسٹم کی دوبارہ تغییر کے بارے میں راپورت کرتا ہے کہ منفی سٹیٹمنٹ سے منفی مثبت معنی تلاش کرے۔ اصلی تجربہ میں مختلف مثبت تفسیر ہر منفی کے مطابق اسکور کی جاتی ہیں۔ ہم اسکوروں کو کلاس میں تبدیل کرتے ہیں اور ہمارے نتائج کو روپورٹ کر دیتے ہیں اور کلاسپیٹ کے کاموں پر۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک بنیس لین جو متوسط اسکور یا بہت اکثر کلاس کے ذریعہ کلاس کی نابرابری کے سبب غالب ہونے کا مشکل ہے. ہماری غلطی تحلیل کی نشانیاں دیتی ہیں کہ ایک طریقہ جس نے معلومات کی ساختاری کو حساب لیا ہے (یعنی جو معلومات نئی ہے یا مخالف ہے) اس کا وعدہ کرنا چاہتا ہے، جس کے لئے منع کی باتوں کی سینٹکتیک اور سیمنٹیکی اثرات کے غیر نظر کی ضرورت ہے.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz yordamchidan tashkilotni aniqlash uchun tizimni qayta qo'yish haqida xabar beradi. Aslida qayta tajriba tajribada, har bir negativ ta'siri o'zgarishlar o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi. We convert the scores to classes and report our results on both the regression and classification tasks.  Biz maʼlumotlar sahifadagi sinfning imkoniyatini ko'p ko'proq darajaga ko'rib chiqish qiyin. Bizning xato analyzerimizni anglatadi, maʼlumot tuzuvlarini hisoblash (yangi yoki boshqaruvchi maʼlumot) yordamida qo'yish mumkin. Bu yolg'on soʻzlarning syntactik va semantik xususiyatlaridan foydalanish kerak.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này báo cáo về việc tái hoàn chỉnh một hệ thống để tìm ra ý nghĩa tích cực ngầm từ những lời từ chối. Trong thử nghiệm hồi quy ban đầu, tỉ lệ âm dương khác nhau được đánh dấu dựa vào khả năng của họ. Chúng tôi chuyển điểm thành hạng và báo cáo kết quả về các công việc quy phục và phân loại. Chúng tôi cho thấy một đường cơ bản lấy điểm số trung hoặc là lớp thường xuyên khó đánh bại vì thiếu cân bằng lớp trong bộ dữ liệu. Phân tích lỗi của chúng tôi cho thấy một phương pháp có thể nắm giữ cấu trúc thông tin (tức là thông tin mới hay tương phản) có thể có triển vọng, cần phải nhìn xa hơn các tính năng cú pháp và ngữ pháp của những phát biểu âm âm âm sai.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия докладва за повторно внедряване на система за откриване на имплицитно положително значение от отрицателни твърдения. В първоначалния регресионен експеримент различните положителни интерпретации на отрицание се оценяват според тяхната вероятност. Конвертираме резултатите в класове и отчитаме резултатите си както по регресионните, така и по класификационните задачи. Показваме, че изходната база, която взема средния резултат или най-честия клас, е трудна за преодоляване поради дисбаланс в класа в набора от данни. Нашият анализ на грешките показва, че подход, който взема предвид информационната структура (т.е. коя информация е нова или контрастивна), може да бъде обещаващ, което изисква да се погледне отвъд синтактичните и семантичните характеристики на отрицателните твърдения.', 'nl': 'Deze paper rapporteert over een herimplementatie van een systeem voor het detecteren van impliciete positieve betekenis van ontkende uitspraken. In het oorspronkelijke regressie experiment worden verschillende positieve interpretaties per negatie beoordeeld op basis van hun waarschijnlijkheid. We zetten de scores om naar klassen en rapporteren onze resultaten over zowel de regressie- als classificatietaken. We laten zien dat een baseline die de gemiddelde score of meest frequente klasse neemt, moeilijk te verslaan is vanwege de onevenwichtigheid van de klassen in de dataset. Onze foutanalyse geeft aan dat een benadering die rekening houdt met de informatiestructuur (d.w.z. welke informatie nieuw of contrastief is) veelbelovend kan zijn, waarbij verder moet worden gekeken dan de syntactische en semantische kenmerken van ontkende uitspraken.', 'da': 'Denne artikel rapporterer om en genimplementering af et system til detektering af implicit positiv betydning fra negated statements. I det oprindelige regressionseksperiment scores forskellige positive fortolkninger pr. negation efter deres sandsynlighed. Vi konverterer scorerne til klasser og rapporterer vores resultater på både regressions- og klassifikationsopgaver. Vi viser, at en baseline, der tager gennemsnitsscoren eller den hyppigste klasse, er svær at slå på grund af klasse ubalance i datasættet. Vores fejlanalyse viser, at en tilgang, der tager højde for informationsstrukturen (dvs. hvilke oplysninger der er nye eller kontrastive), kan være lovende, hvilket kræver at se ud over de syntaktiske og semantiske egenskaber ved negated statements.', 'de': 'Dieser Beitrag berichtet über eine Neuimplementierung eines Systems zur Erkennung impliziter positiver Bedeutung von negierten Aussagen. Im ursprünglichen Regressionsexperiment werden je nach Wahrscheinlichkeit unterschiedliche positive Interpretationen pro Negation bewertet. Wir wandeln die Scores in Klassen um und berichten unsere Ergebnisse sowohl über Regressions- als auch Klassifizierungsaufgaben. Wir zeigen, dass eine Baseline, die den Mittelwert oder die häufigste Klasse nimmt, aufgrund von Klassenungleichgewichten im Datensatz schwer zu schlagen ist. Unsere Fehleranalyse zeigt, dass ein Ansatz, der die Informationsstruktur berücksichtigt (d.h. welche Informationen neu oder kontrastiv sind), vielversprechend sein kann, der einen Blick über die syntaktischen und semantischen Eigenschaften negierter Aussagen erfordert.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir izvještava o ponovnom provedbi sustava o otkrivanju implicitnog pozitivnog značenja iz negativnih izjava. U originalnom eksperimentu regresije, različite pozitivne interpretacije po negaciji rezultiraju prema njihovoj vjerojatnosti. Preobraćamo rezultate na klase i izvještavamo rezultate o regresiji i klasifikaciji. Pokazujemo da je početna linija koja uzima srednji rezultat ili najčešće klase teško pobijediti zbog neslaganja klase u podacima. Naša analiza greške ukazuje na to da je moguće obećati pristup koji uzima u obzir strukturu informacija (tj. koja je nova ili kontrastivna informacija), koji zahtijeva gledati izvan sintaktičkih i semantičkih karakteristika negativnih izjava.', 'id': 'Kertas ini melaporkan tentang implementasi ulang sistem untuk mendeteksi makna positif implicit dari pernyataan negasi. Dalam percobaan regresi asli, interpretasi positif berbeda per negatif dicatat menurut kemungkinan mereka. Kita mengubah skor ke kelas dan melaporkan hasil kita pada tugas regresi dan klasifikasi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa garis dasar mengambil skor rata atau kelas paling sering sulit untuk mengalahkan karena ketidakseimbangan kelas di dataset. Analisis kesalahan kami menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan yang mengambil struktur informasi mempertimbangkan (i.e. informasi mana yang baru atau kontras) mungkin berjanji, yang membutuhkan melihat di luar karakteristik sintaktik dan semantis dari pernyataan negasi.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaripoti juu ya upya wa mfumo wa kutambua maana chanya kutoka kwenye matamko yasiyotokana. Katika jaribio la awali la ukandamizaji, tafsiri mbalimbali kwa upinzani huchukuliwa kwa mujibu wa uwezekano wao. Tunawabadilisha vipindi vya darasa na kuripoti matokeo yetu kuhusu kazi za kudhibitiwa na kutangaza. Tunaonyesha kuwa mstari wa msingi unaotumia score za wastani au darasa la mara nyingi ni vigumu kuishinda kwa sababu ya usawa wa darasa katika seti ya data. Uchambuzi wetu wa makosa unaonyesha kuwa mbinu inayochukua muundo wa taarifa (yaani taarifa mpya au kinyume) inaweza kuwa na ahadi, ambazo zinahitaji kutazama zaidi ya tabia za ushirikiano na sekunde za kauli zilizoharibika.', 'ko': '본고는 부정적인 진술에서 긍정적인 의미를 검출하는 시스템의 재실현을 보고한다.최초의 회귀 실험에서 부정마다 다른 긍정적인 해석은 가능성에 따라 점수를 매긴다.우리는 점수를 반으로 전환하고 회귀와 분류 임무의 결과를 보고할 것이다.우리는 데이터가 집중된 유형이 불균형하기 때문에 평균 점수나 가장 빈번한 유형을 기준으로 하는 기선이 무너지기 어렵다는 것을 발견했다.우리의 잘못된 분석에 의하면 정보 구조(즉 어떤 정보가 새롭거나 대비되는)를 고려하는 방법은 전도가 유망할 수 있다. 이것은 부정 진술의 문법과 의미 특징을 초월해야 한다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ در مورد بازسازی یک سیستم گزارش می\u200cدهد که معنی مثبت مثبت را از گزارش\u200cهای منفی شناسایی می\u200cکند. در آزمایش آزمایش اصلی، تعبیر مثبت مختلف به عنوان احتمال آنها ثبت می\u200cشوند. ما امتياز ها رو به کلاس تبديل مي کنيم و نتيجه هامون رو در مورد وظيفه\u200cهاي تجاوز و کلاس گزارش مي\u200cکنيم ما نشان می دهیم که یک خط بنیادی که می گیرد امتیاز متوسط یا بیشتر کلاس معمولی به خاطر نابرابری کلاس در مجموعه داده ها سخت است. تحلیل خطای ما نشان می\u200cدهد که روش\u200cای که ساختار اطلاعات را به حساب می\u200cگیرد (که اطلاعات جدید یا تفاوتی است) ممکن است وعده\u200cدهنده باشد، که نیاز به تحقیق بیشتر از ویژه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک و سیماناتیک از واژه\u200cهای منفی است.', 'af': "Hierdie papier rapporteer op 'n herbetaling van 'n stelsel op die ontdekking van inplisite positiewe betekening van negatiewe uitdrukkings. In die oorspronklike regresie eksperiment word verskillende positiewe uitleggings per negasie gegee volgens hulle waarskynlik. Ons omskakel die punte na klasse en rapporteer ons resultate op beide die regresie en klasifikasie opdragte. Ons wys dat 'n basislien wat die gemiddelde telling of mees dikwels klas neem is moeilik om te slaan vanweë klas onbalanse in die datastel. Ons fout analisie wys dat 'n toegang wat die inligting struktuur in rekening neem (i.e. wat inligting nuwe of kontrastiewe is) kan belofte wees, wat vereis om te kyk buite die sintaktike en semantiese karakteristieke van negatiewe uitdrukkings.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument raporton mbi një rindërtim të sistemit për zbulimin e kuptimit pozitiv implicit nga deklaratat e refuzuara. Në eksperimentin origjinal të regresionit, interpretimet pozitive të ndryshme për çdo negativ janë shënuar sipas mundësisë së tyre. Ne i konvertojmë rezultatet në klasa dhe raportojmë rezultatet tona në detyrat e regresionit dhe klasifikimit. We show that a baseline taking the mean score or most frequent class is hard to beat because of class imbalance in the dataset.  Analiza jonë e gabimeve tregon se një qasje që merr në konsideratë strukturën e informacionit (që do të thotë se cila informacion është e re apo kontraste) mund të jetë premtuese, e cila kërkon shikimin përtej karakteristikave sintaktike dhe semantike të deklaratave të rreshtuara.', 'am': 'ይህ የሕዝባብ ጉዳይ የሲስተም አካባቢ ግንኙነትን ለማግኘት የሚችል ስህተት ነው፡፡ በመጀመሪያው የሥርዓት ፈተና፣ ለጥያቄው የተለየ የፖለቲካ ትርጓሜዎች እንደ ምናልባት መጠን ይቆጠራሉ፡፡ ሁኔታዎቹን ወደ ክፍለ ዘመቻ እናስወግዳለን፥ ፍሬዎቻችንም በማሰናከል እና በተለያይነት ስራዎችን እናስታውሳለን፡፡ የመድረክ ክፍተት የክፍል ውጤት ምክንያት መደምደሚያ ወይም የክፍለ ዘመን የሚወስድ መደምደሚያ እንደሆነ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ የስህተታችንን ትምህርት የሚያሳየው የመረጃ ሥርዓት ቁጥጥር (አዲስ ወይም ተቃዋሚ) የሚወስደው መግለጫ፣ የክፍለ ጉዳይ እና ምናልባዊ ግንኙነት ማሳየት የሚፈልገው መሆኑን ያስፈልጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը պատմում է մի համակարգի վերարտադրման մասին, որտեղ հայտնաբերվում է բացարձակված հայտարարությունների ենթադրական դրական իմաստը: Առաջին ռեգրեսիայի փորձարկում բազմաթիվ դրական մեկնաբանությունները գնահատվում են ըստ իրենց հավանականության: We convert the scores to classes and report our results on both the regression and classification tasks.  Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ սկզբնական արդյունքները, որոնք ընդունում են միջին գնահատականը կամ ամենահաճախ դասարանը, դժվար է հաղթահարել դասարանի անհավասարակշռության պատճառով տվյալների համակարգում: Մեր սխալների վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ մոտեցումը, որը հաշվի առնում է տեղեկատվական կառուցվածքը (այսինքն, որն է տեղեկատվությունը նոր կամ հակադրական) կարող է խոստացնող լինել, ինչը պահանջում է նայել բացարձակված հայտարարությունների սինտակտիկ և սե', 'az': 'Bu kağıt müəyyən edilmiş ifadələrdən implicit pozitif anlamı keşfetmək haqqında bir sistemin yenilənməsini xəbər verir. Əvvəlki regresiya təcrübəsində, hər negasyonda müxtəlif pozitif təcrübələr müəyyən edilməsi olaraq mümkün olur. Nöqtələri dəstələrə çeviririk və sonuçlarımızı regresiya və klasifikasiya görevlərə xəbər veririk. Biz göstəririk ki, orta nöqtəsi və ya çox sıxıntılı sınıf verilənlərin dəyişdirilməsi üzündən dəyişdirilmək çətindir. Bizim xəta analizimiz belə göstərir ki, məlumatların strukturlarını hesablayan bir tərzim (məsələn, hansı məlumat yeni və ya müxtəlif məlumatların məlumatlarının məlumatlarının sintaktik və semantik xüsusiyyətlərinin üstündə baxması lazımdır).', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি নেতিবাচক বিবৃতি থেকে প্রাপ্ত ইতিবাচক অর্থ সনাক্ত করার ব্যাপারে একটি সিস্টেমের পুনরুত্থানের ব প্রাথমিক প্রতিরোধের পরীক্ষায় তাদের সম্ভাবনা অনুযায়ী ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাবে ব্যাখ্যা করা হয়। আমরা ক্লাসে স্কোর পরিবর্তন করি এবং পুনরাবৃত্তি এবং শ্রেণীকরণ কাজের উপর আমাদের ফলাফল রিপোর্ট করি। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে মানে স্কোর নেয়া বা বেশীরভাগ ক্লাস হারানো কঠিন কারণ ডাটাসেটের বৈষম্যের কারণে। Our error analysis indicates that an approach that takes the information structure into account (i.e. which information is new or contrastive) may be promising, which requires looking beyond the syntactic and semantic characteristics of negated statements.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir izvještava o ponovnom provedbi sustava o otkrivanju implicitnog pozitivnog značenja iz negativnih izjava. U originalnom eksperimentu regresije, različite pozitivne interpretacije po negaciji rezultuju se prema njihovoj vjerojatnosti. Preobraćamo rezultate na časove i prijavimo rezultate o regresiji i klasifikaciji. Pokazujemo da je početna linija koja uzima srednji rezultat ili najčešće klase teško pobijediti zbog neslaganja klase u podacima. Naša analiza greške ukazuje na to da je pristup koji uzima u obzir strukturu informacija (tj. koja je informacija nova ili kontrastivna), možda obećava, koji zahtijeva gledanje izvan sintaktičnih i semantičnih karakteristika negativnih izjava.', 'cs': 'Tento článek pojednává o reinmplementaci systému detekce implicitního pozitivního významu negovaných výroků. V původním regresním experimentu jsou hodnoceny různé pozitivní interpretace na jednu negaci podle jejich pravděpodobnosti. Převádíme skóre na třídy a vykazujeme naše výsledky jak na regresní, tak klasifikační úlohy. Ukazujeme, že základní linie, která bere průměrné skóre nebo nejčastější třídu, je těžké porazit kvůli nerovnováze třídy v datové sadě. Naše chybová analýza naznačuje, že přístup, který zohlední informační strukturu (tj. která informace je nová nebo kontrastní), může být slibný, což vyžaduje pohled nad rámec syntaktických a sémantických charakteristik negovaných výroků.', 'tr': 'Bu käbir sistemiň täze bir janlaşdyrylygyny negatif a ýdymlardan takyklaşdyrmak üçin rapor edýär. Öňki regressiýa synanymda, negasiýa başga möhüm terjimeleri olaryň mümkinçiligine görä berilýär. Notlarymyzy synplara üýtgedip, netijelerimizi regressiýa we klasifikasyýa görevleri barada bildirip göndeririz. Biz esasy çyzgylyň orta sany ýa-da köplenç synpdaky synpdaky synpdaky döwürmek kyn däldigini görkeýäris. Biziň hata analyzamyz maglumat strukturyny hasaplanjak üçin bir ýagdaýynyň (diýi ýagdaýynyň täze ýa-da kontrast) söz bermegi mümkin edýär. Bu ýagdaýyň syntaktik we semantik hasaplarynyň öňünden gaýtmagyny gerek.', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis käsitletakse süsteemi uuesti rakendamist negatiivsete avalduste kaudse positiivse tähenduse tuvastamiseks. Algses regressioonikatses hinnatakse erinevaid positiivseid tõlgendusi negatsiooni kohta vastavalt nende tõenäosusele. Konverteerime tulemused klassideks ja esitame tulemused nii regressiooni kui klassifikatsiooni ülesannete kohta. Näitame, et keskmise skoori või kõige sagedasema klassi võtmise algväärtust on raske ületada klasside tasakaalustamatuse tõttu andmekogumis. Meie veaanalüüs näitab, et infostruktuuri arvestav lähenemisviis (st milline informatsioon on uus või kontrastiivne) võib olla paljutõotav, mis nõuab vaadata kaugemale negatiivsete avalduste süntaktilistest ja semantilistest omadustest.', 'ca': "Aquest paper relata una reinmplementació d'un sistema de detecció de significat implícit positiu de declaracions negades. En l'experiment de regressió original, diferents interpretacions positives per negació es puntueixen segons la seva probabilitat. Convertem les puntuacions en classes i informem dels nostres resultats tant sobre les tasques de regressió com de classificació. Ens mostra que una base de referencia que agafa la puntuació mitjana o la classe més freqüent és difícil de superar a causa del desequilibri de classe en el conjunt de dades. La nostra an àlisi d'errors indica que un enfocament que tenia en compte l'estructura d'informació (i.e. quina informació és nova o contrastiva) pot ser prometedor, que requereix mirar més enllà de les característiques sinàctiques i semàntiques de les declaracions negades.", 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli raportoi järjestelmän uudelleentoteutuksesta, joka havaitsee epäsuoran positiivisen merkityksen negatiivisista lausumista. Alkuperäisessä regressiokokeessa eri positiivisia tulkintoja negatiivista kohden pistetään todennäköisyyden mukaan. Muunnamme pisteet luokkiin ja raportoimme tulokset sekä regressio- että luokittelutehtävissä. Osoitamme, että keskiarvon tai yleisimmän luokan ottamista lähtötilanteesta on vaikea voittaa tietoaineiston luokkaepätasapainon vuoksi. Virheanalyysimme osoittaa, että tietorakenteen huomioiva lähestymistapa (eli mikä tieto on uutta tai kontrastiivista) voi olla lupaava, mikä edellyttää negatiivisten lauseiden syntaktisten ja semanttisten ominaisuuksien tarkastelua.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Anyone Learn Mode Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono kuwi basa sing ditawakdaké perusahaan nêmên karo klas sing titik dhéwé kuwi nggawe barang seneng dataset kuwi. Awakdhéwé énalih urip nglanggar sampeyan bener tentang kanggo ngerasakno informasi sistem sing isiné aku', 'ha': "Wannan takardar ɗin na bãyar da lãbãri a kansa da ya ƙãra wata na'ura a kan gane ma'anar da mataimaki mai kyau daga ayukan haske. A cikin jarrabi na farko na regression, za'a karatun fassarar masu son zũciya ko nega, kamar sifar da yiwunsu. Muna musanya score zuwa darafõfi kuma mu sanar da matsalanmu a kan aikin da za'a kanana harama da kuma taƙaita. Tuna nuna cewa wani linje mai ɗauki nau'in matsayi ko kuma mafi sauri, ya yi nau'i a karya kwanan da ba'a daidaita daraja ba cikin tsarin da aka tsare shi. AnalyyinMu ga ɓata yana nũna cewa wata hanyarwa wanda ya ɗauki tsarin da aka lissafa (misali, wannan information ne yanzu ko da mai motsi) ya kasance mai yi wa'adi, wanda yana nufin ya yi dũbi bayan sifatida masu haske da kuma takis.", 'he': 'העיתון הזה דווח על שימוש מחדש של מערכת על גילוי משמעות חיובית משמעותית משכחשות. בניסיון הגדרה המקורי, פירושות חיוביות שונות לכל שלילה נקודות בהתאם לסבירות שלהם. אנחנו משנים את התוצאות לשיעורים ולדווח על התוצאות שלנו על משימות הקריסה והקליזציה. אנו מראים שבסיפון לקחת את התוצאה הממוצעת או הכיתה הכי תדירות קשה לנצח בגלל אי-איזון בכיתה בסט המידע. ניתוח השגיאות שלנו מצביע כי גישה ששוקלת את מבנה המידע (כלומר איזה מידע חדש או נוגד) עשויה להיות מבטיחה, שדורשת להסתכל מעבר לתחומים הסינטקטיים והסמנטיים של הצהרות המסרות.', 'sk': 'Prispevek poroča o ponovni implementaciji sistema za odkrivanje implicitnega pozitivnega pomena iz zanikanih izjav. V prvotnem regresijskem poskusu so ocenjene različne pozitivne interpretacije na zanikanje glede na njihovo verjetnost. Rezultate pretvorimo v razrede in poročamo o rezultatih regresijskih in klasifikacijskih nalogah. Pokazali smo, da je izhodiščno vrednost, ki uporablja povprečni rezultat ali najpogostejši razred, težko premagati zaradi neravnovesja razredov v naboru podatkov. Naša analiza napak kaže, da je pristop, ki upošteva informacijsko strukturo (tj. katere informacije so nove ali kontrastne), obetaven, kar zahteva pogled preko sintaktičnih in semantičnih značilnosti negativnih izjav.', 'bo': 'ཚོར་བ་འདིས་མ་ལག་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཞུང་ཞིག་གི་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་འཛིན་སྐྱོང་བའི་གནད་དོན་དག་རྙེད་སྙམ་པ ཐོག་མའི་སྙུགས་སྡུད་ཀྱི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ནང་དུ་བྱེད་རུང་བའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་འདི་རེ་བ་དང་བསྟུན་ནས འུ་ཚོས་ཨང་གྲངས་འདི་ཚོ་རྣམས་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་དང་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་ལས་སྙན་ཞུ་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོས་གཞི་རྩིས་འཁོར་ཞིག་གིས་མཚམས་འཇོག་པའི་ཨང་གྲངས་དང་། ཡང་ན་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྲངས ང་ཚོའི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་གྲངས་སུ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་ཐོག་ཏེ་(དཔེར་ན། གསལ་བཤད་གསར་པ་དང་ཁྱད་པར་ལྡན་དགོས་པ་དེ་གསལ་བཤད'}
{'en': 'Exploratory Neural Relation Classification for Domain Knowledge Acquisition', 'ar': 'تصنيف العلاقات العصبية الاستكشافية لاكتساب معرفة المجال', 'fr': "Classification exploratoire des relations neuronales pour l'acquisition de connaissances dans", 'es': 'Clasificación exploratoria de relaciones neuronales para la adquisición de conocimiento de dominio', 'pt': 'Classificação Exploratória de Relações Neurais para Aquisição de Conhecimento de Domínio', 'ja': 'ドメインナレッジアクイジションのための探索的神経関係分類', 'zh': '所以领探索性神经分类也', 'hi': 'डोमेन ज्ञान अधिग्रहण के लिए अन्वेषक तंत्रिका संबंध वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'Поисковая классификация нейронной связи для получения знаний о предметной области', 'ga': 'Aicmiú Taiscéalaíoch Caidrimh Néaraigh le haghaidh Fáil Eolais Fearainn', 'el': 'Ταξινόμηση διερευνητικών νευρωνικών σχέσεων για την απόκτηση γνώσης τομέα', 'ka': 'კლასიფიკაცია ნეირალური შესახებ კომპონაციის მიღება', 'hu': 'Feltáró neurális viszonyok osztályozása a tartományi ismeretek megszerzéséhez', 'it': "Classificazione esplorativa delle relazioni neurali per l'acquisizione di conoscenze di dominio", 'mk': 'Класификација на истражувачките нервни односи за набавување на знаење на доменот', 'kk': 'Домен білім алу үшін зерттеулердің нейралық қатынасын классификациясы', 'lt': 'Tiriamųjų neurologinių ryšių klasifikacija, skirta žinių srities įgijimui', 'ms': 'Klasifikasi Perhubungan Neural Penjelasan untuk Penerimaan Pengetahuan Domain', 'ml': 'ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അറിവുകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി നെയുറല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള പരിശോധന', 'mt': 'Klassifikazzjoni Esploratorja tar-Relazzjoni Newrali għall-Akkwist tal-Għarfien Domeniku', 'mn': 'Доминийн мэдлэг хүлээж авах судалгааны сэтгэл зүйн холбоотой классификация', 'no': 'Eksplorasjonsklassifisering av nøyralrelasjonar for domenekjenning', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja związków eksploracyjnych dla nabywania wiedzy domenowej', 'ro': 'Clasificarea relațiilor neurale exploratorii pentru dobândirea cunoștințelor de domeniu', 'sr': 'Klasifikacija istraživačkih neuroloških odnosa za prihvatanje znanja domena', 'so': 'Tilmaamaha aqoonta Domain', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්බන්ධ ක්\u200dරියාසිකරණය', 'sv': 'Exploratory Neural Relation Classification for Domain Knowledge Acquisition', 'ta': 'களம் அறிவு பெறுவதற்கான புதிய தொடர்பு வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'ur': 'ڈومین علم حاصل کے لئے تحقیقات نائرل رابطہ کا کلاسیف', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Класификация на проучвателната неврална връзка за придобиване на домейн знания', 'da': 'Exploratory Neural Relation Classification for Domain Knowledge Acquisition', 'nl': 'Exploratieve Neurale Relatie Classificatie voor Domein Kennisverwerving', 'hr': 'Klasifikacija istraživačkih neuroloških odnosa za primjenu znanja domena', 'de': 'Klassifikation der explorativen neuronalen Beziehungen für den Erwerb von Domänenwissen', 'id': 'Klasifikasi Hubungan Neural Exploratory untuk Acquisition Pengetahuan Domain', 'fa': 'شناسایی رابطه\u200cهای عصبی تحقیق برای دریافت دانش دامنی', 'ko': '영역 지식 획득의 탐색적 신경 관계 분류', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Kuhusiana na Neural kwa ajili ya kupata ufahamu wa Domain', 'af': 'Uitspraak Neurale Relasie Klassifikasie vir Domein kennis aanvang', 'tr': 'Bilgi almak üçin söhbetçilik nädogry ilişkileri klasifikasyon', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi eksplorues i marrëdhënieve neuronale për fitimin e njohurive në domeni', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Domain Bilgi Qazanması üçün Sənin Nöral İlişkisi Klasifikası', 'hy': 'Տեղեկության գիտելիքի ձեռք բերելու նյարդային հարաբերությունների ուսումնասիրությունը', 'bn': 'ডোমেইন জ্ঞান প্রাপ্তির জন্য এক্সপ্লোরেটরি নিউরেল সম্পর্ক ক্লাসিফেশন', 'ca': "Classificació exploratoria de relacions neuronals per l'adquisició de coneixements de domini", 'cs': 'Klasifikace průzkumných neuronových vztahů pro získávání znalostí domény', 'bs': 'Klasifikacija istraživačkih neuroloških odnosa za prihvatanje znanja domena', 'et': 'Domeeniteadmiste omandamise uurimisliku neuraalse seose klassifikatsioon', 'fi': 'Exploratory Neural Relation Classification for Domain Knowledge Acquisition', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מסווג מערכת יחסים נוירוליות חוקרית להשיג ידע בתחום', 'sk': 'Raziskovalna klasifikacija nevronskih odnosov za pridobivanje domenskega znanja', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཁྱིམ་ཤེས་པའི་ལེགས་སྐོར་དང་སླེབས་པའི་དཔེ་གཏོང་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་རྐྱེན་གྱིས།'}
{'en': 'The state-of-the-art methods for relation classification are primarily based on deep neural net- works. This kind of supervised learning method suffers from not only limited training data, but also the large number of low-frequency relations in specific domains. In this paper, we propose the task of exploratory relation classification for domain knowledge harvesting. The goal is to learn a classifier on pre-defined relations and discover new relations expressed in texts. A dynamically structured neural network is introduced to classify entity pairs to a continuously expanded relation set. We further propose the similarity sensitive Chinese restaurant process to discover new relations. Experiments conducted on a large corpus show the effectiveness of our neural network, while new relations are discovered with high precision and recall.', 'ar': 'تعتمد أحدث الأساليب لتصنيف العلاقات بشكل أساسي على الشبكات العصبية العميقة. لا يعاني هذا النوع من أسلوب التعلم الخاضع للإشراف من بيانات التدريب المحدودة فحسب ، بل يعاني أيضًا من عدد كبير من العلاقات منخفضة التردد في مجالات محددة. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح مهمة تصنيف العلاقات الاستكشافية لحصاد معرفة المجال. الهدف هو تعلم المصنف على العلاقات المحددة مسبقًا واكتشاف علاقات جديدة يتم التعبير عنها في النصوص. يتم تقديم شبكة عصبية منظمة ديناميكيًا لتصنيف أزواج الكيانات إلى مجموعة علاقات موسعة باستمرار. نقترح كذلك عملية المطاعم الصينية الحساسة للتشابه لاكتشاف علاقات جديدة. التجارب التي أجريت على مجموعة كبيرة تظهر فعالية شبكتنا العصبية ، في حين يتم اكتشاف العلاقات الجديدة بدقة عالية والتذكر.', 'fr': "Les méthodes de pointe pour la classification des relations sont principalement basées sur des réseaux neuronaux profonds. Ce type de méthode d'apprentissage supervisé souffre non seulement de données d'entraînement limitées, mais également du grand nombre de relations basses fréquences dans des domaines spécifiques. Dans cet article, nous proposons la tâche de classification exploratoire des relations pour la collecte de connaissances dans un domaine. L'objectif est d'apprendre un classificateur sur des relations prédéfinies et de découvrir de nouvelles relations exprimées dans des textes. Un réseau neuronal structuré dynamiquement est introduit pour classer des paires d'entités dans un ensemble de relations étendu en continu. Nous proposons également le processus de restauration chinois sensible à la similitude pour découvrir de nouvelles relations. Les expériences menées sur un vaste corpus montrent l'efficacité de notre réseau de neurones, tandis que de nouvelles relations sont découvertes avec une grande précision et un grand rappel.", 'es': 'Los métodos más avanzados para la clasificación de relaciones se basan principalmente en redes neuronales profundas. Este tipo de método de aprendizaje supervisado adolece no solo de datos de entrenamiento limitados, sino también del gran número de relaciones de baja frecuencia en dominios específicos. En este artículo, proponemos la tarea de clasificación de relaciones exploratorias para la recolección de conocimiento de dominio. El objetivo es aprender un clasificador de relaciones predefinidas y descubrir nuevas relaciones expresadas en textos. Se introduce una red neuronal estructurada dinámicamente para clasificar los pares de entidades en un conjunto de relaciones continuamente expandido. Proponemos además el proceso de restaurante chino sensible a la similitud para descubrir nuevas relaciones. Los experimentos realizados en un corpus grande muestran la eficacia de nuestra red neuronal, mientras que las nuevas relaciones se descubren con gran precisión y recuerdo.', 'pt': 'Os métodos de última geração para classificação de relações são baseados principalmente em redes neurais profundas. Esse tipo de método de aprendizado supervisionado sofre não apenas com dados de treinamento limitados, mas também com o grande número de relações de baixa frequência em domínios específicos. Neste artigo, propomos a tarefa de classificação exploratória de relações para coleta de conhecimento de domínio. O objetivo é aprender um classificador sobre relações pré-definidas e descobrir novas relações expressas em textos. Uma rede neural estruturada dinamicamente é introduzida para classificar pares de entidades para um conjunto de relações continuamente expandido. Propomos ainda o processo de restaurante chinês sensível à semelhança para descobrir novas relações. Experimentos realizados em um grande corpus mostram a eficácia de nossa rede neural, enquanto novas relações são descobertas com alta precisão e revocação.', 'ja': '関係分類のための最先端の方法は、主に深層ニューラルネットワークの研究に基づいている。この種の監修学習法は、限られたトレーニングデータだけでなく、特定の領域における多数の低周波関係にも影響を及ぼす。本稿では、領域知識収穫のための探索的関係分類の課題を提案する。事前定義された関係に関する分類子を学習し、テキストで表現された新しい関係を発見することを目標とする。動的に構造化されたニューラルネットワークは、継続的に拡張された関係セットへのエンティティペアを分類するために導入される。新たな関係を発見するために、類似性に敏感な中華料理店のプロセスをさらに提案します。大規模なコーパスで行われた実験は、私たちのニューラルネットワークの有効性を示し、新しい関係は高精度でリコールされて発見されます。', 'zh': '先进之类,本于深神经网络。 此督学之法,非徒练数有限,又特定域中多低频也。 本文举领域探索性关系类。 学者,学定义之分器,而见文本之新也。 引入动结构化神经网络,以类相续。 更言相似性敏中餐厅,以见新相关。 大语料库之实验见神经网络之有效性,而以高精度召率见新。', 'hi': 'संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए अत्याधुनिक तरीके मुख्य रूप से गहरे तंत्रिका नेट-वर्क्स पर आधारित हैं। इस तरह की पर्यवेक्षित सीखने की विधि न केवल सीमित प्रशिक्षण डेटा से ग्रस्त है, बल्कि विशिष्ट डोमेन में बड़ी संख्या में कम आवृत्ति वाले संबंधों से भी पीड़ित है। इस पेपर में, हम डोमेन ज्ञान संचयन के लिए अन्वेषणात्मक संबंध वर्गीकरण के कार्य का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। लक्ष्य पूर्व-परिभाषित संबंधों पर एक क्लासिफायर सीखना और ग्रंथों में व्यक्त नए संबंधों की खोज करना है। एक गतिशील रूप से संरचित तंत्रिका नेटवर्क को इकाई जोड़े को लगातार विस्तारित संबंध सेट में वर्गीकृत करने के लिए पेश किया जाता है। हम आगे नए संबंधों की खोज करने के लिए समानता संवेदनशील चीनी रेस्तरां प्रक्रिया का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। एक बड़े कॉर्पस पर किए गए प्रयोग हमारे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क की प्रभावशीलता को दिखाते हैं, जबकि नए संबंधों को उच्च परिशुद्धता और याद के साथ खोजा जाता है।', 'ru': 'Современные методы классификации отношений в основном основаны на глубоких нейронных сетях. Такой метод контролируемого обучения страдает не только ограниченными данными обучения, но и большим количеством низкочастотных отношений в конкретных областях. В данной работе мы предлагаем задачу поисковой классификации отношений для сбора знаний о предметной области. Цель состоит в том, чтобы выучить классификатор заранее определенных отношений и обнаружить новые отношения, выраженные в текстах. Вводят динамически структурированную нейронную сеть для классификации пар сущностей в постоянно расширенный набор отношений. Мы также предлагаем процесс китайского ресторана, учитывающий сходство, чтобы открыть для себя новые отношения. Эксперименты, проведенные на большом корпусе, показывают эффективность нашей нейронной сети, в то время как новые отношения открываются с высокой точностью и отзывом.', 'ga': 'Tá na modhanna úrscothacha maidir le haicmiú gaol bunaithe go príomha ar líonraí néaracha doimhne. Ní hamháin go mbíonn sonraí teoranta oiliúna ag baint le modh foghlama maoirsithe den chineál seo, ach baineann líon mór caidrimh íseal-minicíochta i réimsí sonracha freisin. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid an tasc a bhaineann le haicmiú gaol taiscéalaíoch chun eolas fearainn a bhailiú. Is é an sprioc aicmitheora a fhoghlaim ar chaidreamh réamhshainithe agus caidreamh nua a léirítear i dtéacsanna a fháil amach. Tugtar isteach gréasán néaraíoch atá struchtúrtha go dinimiciúil chun péirí aonáin a aicmiú go tacar caidrimh a leathnaítear go leanúnach. Molaimid freisin próiseas na mbialann Síneach íogair ó thaobh cosúlachta de chun caidreamh nua a aimsiú. Léiríonn turgnaimh a dhéantar ar chorpas mór éifeachtacht ár ngréasán néarúil, agus aimsítear caidreamh nua le cruinneas ard agus le hathghairm.', 'ka': 'კლასიფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციის შესახებ სურათის შესახებ ძირითად ნეიროლური მქონელი მქონელებზე დაბაზიან. ასეთი სახელმწავლობული სწავლების მეტი არა მხოლოდ დასახელმწავლობული სწავლების მონაცემებით, მაგრამ უფრო დიდი რაოდენობა კონფიკური დემონიში. ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ დავიწყებთ საკუთარი კლასიფიკაციის კონფიკაციას, რომელიც დიომინის მეცნიერების შემოწყვებისთვის. მიზეზი არის წინ განსაზღვრებული პრობლემების კლასიფიკაცია და აღმოჩენა ახალი პრობლემები ტექსტში. Name ჩვენ დავიწყვებთ ჩინეთი რესტოპანტის პროცესი, რომელსაც ახალი შესახებ იქნება. ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც დიდი კორპუსში გავაკეთებულია, ჩვენი ნეიროლური ქსელის ეფექტიურობა, როცა ახალი შესახებ აღმოჩენა, როცა უფრო მართლად', 'el': 'Οι σύγχρονες μέθοδοι ταξινόμησης σχέσεων βασίζονται κυρίως σε βαθιά νευρικά δίκτυα. Αυτό το είδος της εποπτευόμενης μεθόδου μάθησης πάσχει όχι μόνο από περιορισμένα δεδομένα κατάρτισης, αλλά και από τον μεγάλο αριθμό σχέσεων χαμηλής συχνότητας σε συγκεκριμένους τομείς. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε το έργο της ταξινόμησης διερευνητικών σχέσεων για τη συλλογή γνώσεων στον τομέα. Στόχος είναι η εκμάθηση ενός ταξινομητή για προκαθορισμένες σχέσεις και η ανακάλυψη νέων σχέσεων που εκφράζονται σε κείμενα. Ένα δυναμικά δομημένο νευρωνικό δίκτυο εισάγεται για να ταξινομήσει ζεύγη οντοτήτων σε ένα συνεχώς διευρυμένο σύνολο σχέσεων. Προτείνουμε περαιτέρω την ομοιότητα ευαίσθητη κινεζική διαδικασία εστιατορίων για να ανακαλύψουμε νέες σχέσεις. Τα πειράματα που διεξάγονται σε μεγάλο σώμα δείχνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του νευρικού μας δικτύου, ενώ νέες σχέσεις ανακαλύπτονται με υψηλή ακρίβεια και ανάκληση.', 'hu': 'A kapcsolatosztályozás korszerű módszerei elsősorban mélyneurális hálózatokon alapulnak. Ez a fajta felügyelt tanulási módszer nemcsak a korlátozott képzési adatoktól, hanem az alacsony frekvenciájú kapcsolatok nagy számától is szenved konkrét területeken. Jelen tanulmányban javasoljuk a domain tudás-gyűjtés feltáró kapcsolatosztályozásának feladatát. A cél egy osztályozó megtanulása az előre meghatározott kapcsolatokról és a szövegekben kifejezett új kapcsolatok felfedezése. Dinamikusan strukturált neurális hálózatot vezetünk be, hogy az entitáspárokat folyamatosan bővített kapcsolathalmazba soroljuk. Továbbá javasoljuk a hasonlóság érzékeny kínai éttermi folyamatot, hogy felfedezzük az új kapcsolatokat. Egy nagy korpuszon végzett kísérletek kimutatják neurális hálózatunk hatékonyságát, miközben új kapcsolatokat fedeznek fel nagy pontossággal és visszahívással.', 'it': "I metodi all'avanguardia per la classificazione delle relazioni si basano principalmente su reti neurali profonde. Questo tipo di metodo di apprendimento supervisionato soffre non solo di dati di formazione limitati, ma anche del gran numero di relazioni a bassa frequenza in settori specifici. In questo articolo, proponiamo il compito di classificazione esplorativa delle relazioni per il dominio knowledge harvesting. L'obiettivo è quello di imparare un classificatore sulle relazioni predefinite e scoprire nuove relazioni espresse nei testi. Viene introdotta una rete neurale strutturata dinamicamente per classificare coppie di entità in un insieme di relazioni continuamente espanse. Proponiamo inoltre il processo di ristorazione cinese sensibile alla somiglianza per scoprire nuove relazioni. Esperimenti condotti su un grande corpus mostrano l'efficacia della nostra rete neurale, mentre nuove relazioni vengono scoperte con alta precisione e richiamo.", 'kk': 'Қатысушылық классификациясының күй- жай әдістері негізінде невралдық желі жұмыстарына негізделген. Бұл бақылау әдісі тек шектелген оқыту деректерінен емес, сондай-ақ керек домендердің көп жиілік қатынасының саны. Бұл қағазда, доменмен білім беру үшін зерттеу қатынасын шектеу тапсырмасын таңдаймыз. Мақсат - алдын- ала анықталған қатынастардың классификаторын үйрену және мәтінде көрсетілген жаңа қатынастарды табу. Динамикалық құрылған невралдық желі бірлікті бірлікті қатынас жиынына кеңейту үшін анықталды. Біз жаңа қатынастарды табу үшін Қытай ресторантың ұқсас сезімдігін таңдаймыз. Үлкен корпустың тәжірибелері біздің невралдық желіміздің эффективнігін көрсетеді, жаңа қатынастар жоғары дұрыс және еске салумен табылады.', 'lt': 'Naujausi santykių klasifikavimo metodai daugiausia grindžiami giliais nervų tinklais. This kind of supervised learning method suffers from not only limited training data, but also the large number of low-frequency relations in specific domains.  In this paper, we propose the task of exploratory relation classification for domain knowledge harvesting.  Tikslas – išmokti iš anksto apibrėžtų santykių klasifikatorių ir rasti naujus tekstuose išreikštus santykius. Įdiegtas dinamiškai struktūrizuotas neurologinis tinklas, kad subjektų poros būtų klasifikuojamos į nuolat išplėstų santykių rinkinį. Be to, siūlome panašiai jautrią Kinijos restoranų procesą, kad būtų rasti nauji santykiai. Su dideliu korpusu atlikti eksperimentai rodo mūsų nervų tinklo veiksmingumą, o nauji santykiai nustatomi labai tiksliai ir prisiminti.', 'mk': 'Најсовремените методи за класификација на односите се основани на длабоките нервни мрежи. Овој вид на надгледуван метод на учење страдаат не само од ограничени податоци за обука, туку и од големиот број на односи со ниска фреквенција во специфични домени. Во овој весник, предложуваме задача за експлоаторна класификација на односите за собирање на знаење на домените. Целта е да се научи класификатор за преддефинираните односи и да се откријат нови односи изразени во текстите. Динамички структурирана нервна мрежа е воведена за класификување на парови на ентитети на постојано проширена врска. Понатаму предложуваме сличност чувствителен процес на кинески ресторан за откривање на нови односи. Експериментите спроведени на голем корпус ја покажуваат ефикасноста на нашата нервна мрежа, додека новите односи се откриени со висока прецизност и потсетност.', 'ms': 'Kaedah state-of-the-art untuk klasifikasi hubungan adalah utama berdasarkan jaringan saraf dalam. Kaedah belajar yang diawasi ini menderita bukan hanya data latihan terbatas, tetapi juga bilangan besar hubungan frekuensi rendah dalam domain tertentu. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan tugas kelasukan hubungan esploratori untuk mengumpulkan pengetahuan domain. Tujuan adalah untuk belajar pengklasifikasi hubungan terdefinisikan dan menemukan hubungan baru yang diungkapkan dalam teks. Rangkaian saraf struktur dinamik diperkenalkan untuk mengklasifikasikan pasangan entiti ke set hubungan yang terus-menerus dikembangkan. Kami juga melamar proses restoran China yang sensitif untuk menemukan hubungan baru. Eksperimen yang dilakukan pada korpus besar menunjukkan keefektivitas rangkaian saraf kita, sementara hubungan baru ditemui dengan ketepatan tinggi dan ingatan.', 'mt': 'The state-of-the-art methods for relation classification are primarily based on deep neural net- works.  Dan it-tip ta’ metodu ta’ tagħlim sorveljat ibati mhux biss minn dejta limitata ta’ taħriġ, iżda wkoll minn għadd kbir ta’ relazzjonijiet ta’ frekwenza baxxa f’oqsma speċifiċi. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu l-kompitu tal-klassifikazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet esploratorji għall-ħsad tal-għarfien fid-dominju. L-għan huwa li jitgħallem klassifikatur dwar relazzjonijiet definiti minn qabel u jiġu skoperti relazzjonijiet ġodda espressi fit-testi. Ġie introdott netwerk newrali strutturat dinamikament biex jikklassifika pari ta’ entitajiet għal sett ta’ relazzjonijiet kontinwament estiż. Aħna nipproponu wkoll il-proċess ta’ ristoranti Ċiniżi sensittiv għas-similarità biex jinstabu relazzjonijiet ġodda. L-esperimenti mwettqa fuq korpus kbir juru l-effettività tan-netwerk newrali tagħna, filwaqt li r-relazzjonijiet ġodda jiġu skoperti bi preċiżjoni għolja u b’riferiment.', 'ml': 'ബന്ധത്തിന്റെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കലിന്റെ സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ്- കലാര്\u200dട്ട് രീതികള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ് ജോ This kind of supervised learning method suffers from not only limited training data, but also the large number of low-frequency relations in specific domains.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d അറിവ് കൊടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പരിശോധന ബന്ധവിഭാഗത്തിന്\u200dറെ ജോലി പ്രാദോഷിപ്പി മുമ്പ് നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബന്ധങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫീലര്\u200d പഠിക്കുകയും പദാവലികളില്\u200d പുതിയ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്ത ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d ശൃംഖലം ക്ലാസിഫിക്കല്\u200d വസ്തുവിന്റെ ജോടികള്\u200dക്ക് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നതിലേക്കാണ പുതിയ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ചൈനീസ് റെസ്റ്റോറന്റ് പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഒരുപോലെയുള്ള സെന്\u200dസിറ്റീ ഒരു വലിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പസില്\u200d നടത്തിയ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിക്കുന്നു. പുതിയ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d', 'no': 'Dette metodane for relasjonsklassifikasjonen er hovudsakelig basert på dype neuralnettverk. Denne typen oversikte læringsmetoden har ikkje bare begrenset opplæringsdata, men også stor antall låg frekvensrelasjonar i spesifikke domene. I denne papiret foreslår vi oppgåva for utforskingsrovsningsklassifikasjon for domenekunnskap. Målet er å læra ein klassifiserer på føredefinerte forhold og oppdaga nye forhold uttrykt i tekstar. Ein dynamisk strukturert neuralnettverk vert introdusert til å klassifisera einingspar til eit kontinuerleg utvida relasjonssett. Vi foreslår meir tilsvarende kinesiske restaurantprosessen for å oppdaga nye forhold. Eksperimentar gjennomført på ein stor korpus viser effektiviteten av vårt neuralnettverk, mens nye forholdar er oppdaga med høg nøyaktig og rekkelig.', 'pl': 'Najnowocześniejsze metody klasyfikacji relacji opierają się przede wszystkim na głębokich sieciach neuronowych. Tego rodzaju metoda nadzorowanego uczenia się cierpi nie tylko z powodu ograniczonych danych szkoleniowych, ale także z powodu dużej liczby relacji o niskiej częstotliwości w konkretnych dziedzinach. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy zadanie klasyfikacji relacji eksploracyjnych dla zbierania wiedzy domenowej. Celem jest poznanie klasyfikatora wstępnie zdefiniowanych relacji i odkrycie nowych relacji wyrażonych w tekstach. Wprowadzana jest dynamicznie ustrukturyzowana sieć neuronowa, aby klasyfikować pary jednostek do ciągle rozszerzonego zbioru relacji. Ponadto proponujemy wrażliwy na podobieństwo proces restauracji chińskiej, aby odkryć nowe relacje. Eksperymenty przeprowadzone na dużym korpusie pokazują skuteczność naszej sieci neuronowej, natomiast nowe relacje są odkrywane z wysoką precyzją i przypominają.', 'ro': 'Metodele de ultimă generaţie pentru clasificarea relaţiilor se bazează în principal pe reţele neuronale profunde. Acest tip de metodă de învățare supravegheată suferă nu numai de date limitate de formare, ci și de numărul mare de relații de joasă frecvență în domenii specifice. În această lucrare, propunem sarcina clasificării relațiilor exploratorii pentru recoltarea cunoștințelor de domeniu. Scopul este de a învăța un clasificator asupra relațiilor predefinite și de a descoperi noi relații exprimate în texte. O rețea neurală structurată dinamic este introdusă pentru a clasifica perechile de entități într-un set de relații extins continuu. De asemenea, propunem procesul restaurantului chinezesc sensibil de asemănare pentru a descoperi noi relații. Experimentele efectuate pe un corp mare arată eficacitatea rețelei noastre neuronale, în timp ce noi relații sunt descoperite cu mare precizie și amintire.', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය සඳහා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විධානය ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලය- වැඩවල් අධාරි මේ විදියට පරීක්ෂා විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න විදියට පරීක්ෂා විදියට පරීක්ෂා විදියට තියෙන්නේ නැහැ, ඒත් විශේෂ ව මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාසය සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නය ඉලක්කය තමයි ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණිත සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධ සඳහා විශේෂකයෙක් ඉගෙන ගන්න සහ ලිපිත සම Name අපි තවත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා අලුත් සම්බන්ධතාවක් හොයාගන්න. ලොකු කෝර්පුස් එකේ පරීක්ෂණා කරලා තියෙන්නේ අපේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය පෙන්වන්න, අළුත් සම්බන්', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka farshaxanka waxaa ugu horeysa lagu saleeyaa shabakada naafada. Midabkan waxbarashada oo la ilaaliyey waxey ka xanuunsadaan macluumaadka waxbarashada oo kaliya, laakiin sidoo kale xiriirka dhaqdhaqaaqa ee gaarka ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa shaqo baaritaanka xiriirka ee la soo saaray aqoonta deegaanka. Ujeedadu waa in la barto fasax ku saabsan xiriir hore oo la qoray iyo in la ogaado xiriir cusub oo qoraalka lagu qoray. Shabakadda neurada waxaa loo soo bandhigaa noocyo fasax ah oo loo yaqaan labada noocyo ah oo ku qoran qoraal xiriir oo sii ballaadhan. Sidoo kale waxaan horumarinaynaa inaad hesho xiriir cusub oo la mid ah. Experiments conducted on a large corpus show the effectiveness of our neural network, while new relations are discovered with high precision and recall.', 'sr': 'Metode umetnosti za klasifikaciju odnosa su uglavnom temeljene na dubokim neuralnim mrežama. Ova vrsta nadzorne metode učenja pati ne samo od ograničenih podataka obuke, nego i velikog broja niskofrekvencijskih odnosa u specifičnim domenama. U ovom papiru predlažemo zadatak istraživačkog povezanja klasifikacije za prikupljanje znanja domena. Cilj je naučiti klasifikatora o preddefiniranim odnosima i otkrivati nove odnose izražene u tekstima. Dinamički strukturirana neuralna mreža je uvedena kako bi klasifikovala pare entiteta na stalno širenu vezu. Dalje predlažemo proces osjetljivosti kineskog restorana da otkrijemo nove odnose. Eksperimenti provedeni na velikom korpusu pokazuju učinkovitost naše neuralne mreže, dok su novi odnosi otkriveni sa visokom preciznošću i sećanjem.', 'sv': 'De senaste metoderna för relationsklassificering baseras främst på djupa neurala nät. Denna typ av övervakad inlärningsmetod lider inte bara av begränsade utbildningsdata, utan också av det stora antalet lågfrekventa relationer inom specifika områden. I denna uppsats föreslår vi uppgiften med explorativ relationsklassificering för domänkunskapsskörd. Målet är att lära sig en klassificerare om fördefinierade relationer och upptäcka nya relationer uttryckta i texter. Ett dynamiskt strukturerat neuralt nätverk introduceras för att klassificera entitetspar till en kontinuerligt expanderad relationsuppgift. Vi föreslår vidare den likhetskänsliga kinesiska restaurangprocessen för att upptäcka nya relationer. Experiment utförda på en stor korpus visar effektiviteten i vårt neurala nätverk, medan nya relationer upptäcks med hög precision och återkallelse.', 'ta': 'தொடர்பு வகைப்படுத்தலுக்கான நிலைமை- கலை முறைமைகள் முதன்மையாக ஆழமான புதிய நெட்- செயல்களை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளன. இந்த முறையில் கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட படிக்க முறைமையை மட்டும் வரம்பு பயிற்சி தரவிலிருந்து பாதுகாக்கும், குறிப்பிட்ட கூட இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் கண்டறியும் தொடர்பு வகைப்படுத்தல் பணியை நினைவூட்டுகிறோம். இலக்கு முன் வரையறுக்கப்பட்ட தொடர்புகளில் ஒரு வகுப்பாளரை கற்று புதிய தொடர்புகளை கண்டுபிடிக்கவும். Name We further propose the similarity sensitive Chinese restaurant process to discover new relations.  ஒரு பெரிய கார்புஸ் மீது செய்யப்பட்ட முயற்சிகள் எங்கள் புதிய பிணையத்தின் விளைவை காட்டுகிறது, புதிய தொடர்புகள் உயர்ந்த த த', 'mn': 'Хувьсалын хуваалтын төвшин урлагийн арга зам нь ихэвчлэн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан. Энэ төрлийн удирдлагатай суралцах арга нь зөвхөн хязгаарлагдсан суралцах өгөгдлийн мэдээлэл биш, мөн тодорхой хэсэгт бага хэмжээний харилцааны ихэнх тоо байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид судалгааны холбоотой мэдлэг цэвэрлэхийн тулд хамааралтай холбоотой ажлыг санал болгож байна. Гол зорилго нь өмнө тодорхойлсон харилцааны хуваалцагчийг суралцаж, мөн бичсэн шинэ харилцааныг олж мэдэх юм. Динамикийн бүтээгдэхүүнтэй мэдрэлийн сүлжээг бүтээгдэхүүний хоорондоо үргэлж өргөн харилцааны хэлбэрээр ангилалдаг. Бид хоорондоо шинэ харилцаа олохын тулд Хятадын ресторантай адилхан мэдрэмжтэй үйл явцыг санал болгож байна. Маш том корпус дээр хийсэн туршилтууд бидний мэдрэлийн сүлжээний үр дүнтэй байдлыг харуулдаг. Шинэ харилцаа өндөр тодорхой болон санамжлалтай нээлттэй.', 'ur': 'ارتباط کلاسپیٹ کے لئے ارتباط طریقے عمدہ نیورال نیٹ کارک پر بنیاد ہیں. یہ سیکھنے کا طریقہ نہیں صرف محدود ترینس ڈیٹا سے ہے بلکہ بہت سے کم فرکانسی رابطہ مقرر ڈیمین میں ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے ڈومین علم حاصل کے لئے تحقیقات کے ارتباط کا کام پیش کرتا ہے۔ مقصد یہ ہے کہ پہلے معلوم ہونے والی رابطہ کے بارے میں ایک کلاسپیر کو سیکھنا اور نو رابطہ تلاش کرنا ہے ایک ہمیشہ ساختہ نیورل نیٹ ورک کو ایک ہمیشہ پھیلا ہوا ارتباط سٹ کے لئے کلاسیٹ کے جوڑوں کو پیش کیا جاتا ہے. ہم اس سے زیادہ مشابہ کریں گے کہ نئی رابطہ لکھنے کے لئے سینچی رستورن پرسس کا حساس ہے۔ ایک بڑے کورپوس پر چلنے والی تجربے ہمارے نئورل نیٹورک کی عمدگی دکھاتے ہیں، حالانکہ نئی رابطہ بالا دقیق اور یاد آتی ہیں۔', 'uz': "Name Bu turdagi o'rganish usuli faqat taʼminlovchi maʼlumotdan qo'shimcha maʼlumot emas, balki foydalanuvchi davlatdagi katta frekvens huquqlari. In this paper, we propose the task of exploratory relation classification for domain knowledge harvesting.  Maqola, oldin aniqlangan aloqalarni o'rganish va matnlarning yangi aloqalarni aniqlash. Name Biz yangi aloqalarni aniqlash uchun xitoycha restaurant jarayonini boshqarishimiz. Bu katta kompyuterda bajarilgan jarayonlar neyron tarmoqning effektligini ko'rsatadi, va yangi aloqalarni ko'proq aniqlangan va eslab qoladi.", 'vi': 'Phương pháp tiên tiến nhất cho phân loại liên quan dựa trên các công trình mạng thần kinh sâu. Đây là một phương pháp học được giám sát không chỉ có giới hạn, mà còn có rất nhiều mối quan hệ với tần số thấp trong những lĩnh vực cụ thể. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị nhiệm vụ phân loại quan hệ thăm dò cho việc thu hoạch tri thức miền. Mục tiêu là học một chuyên gia phân loại các mối quan hệ được xác định trước và khám phá các mối quan hệ mới diễn ra trong văn bản. Một mạng lưới thần kinh có cấu trúc động động được đưa vào để phân loại nhóm thực thể thành một nhóm liên quan mở liên tục. Chúng tôi còn đề nghị tiến trình ăn hàng Trung Quốc tương đồng cảm biến mới. Thí nghiệm trên một cơ thể lớn cho thấy hiệu quả của mạng thần kinh của chúng ta, trong khi các mối quan hệ mới được khám phá với độ chính xác và triệu hồi cao.', 'hr': 'Metode stanja umjetnosti za klasifikaciju odnosa primarno su temeljene na dubokim nervnim mrežama. Ova vrsta nadzornog metoda učenja pati ne samo od ograničenih podataka obuke, već i velikog broja niskofrekvencijskih odnosa u specifičnim domenama. U ovom papiru predlažemo zadatak istraživačkog povezanja klasifikacije za prikupljanje znanja domena. Cilj je naučiti klasifikatora o preddefiniranim odnosima i otkriti nove odnose izražene u tekstima. Dinamički strukturirana neuralna mreža se uvodi kako bi klasifikirali pare entiteta na stalno širenu vezu. Dalje predlažemo proces osjetljivosti kineskog restorana kako bi otkrili nove odnose. Eksperimenti provedeni na velikom korpusu pokazuju učinkovitost naše neuralne mreže, dok se otkrivaju novi odnosi sa visokom preciznošću i sjećanjem.', 'nl': 'De state-of-the-art methoden voor relatieklassificatie zijn voornamelijk gebaseerd op diepe neurale netwerken. Dit soort begeleide leermethode lijdt niet alleen aan beperkte opleidingsgegevens, maar ook aan het grote aantal laagfrequente relaties in specifieke domeinen. In dit artikel stellen we de taak voor van verkennende relatieklassificatie voor domeinkennisoogst. Het doel is om een classificator te leren over vooraf gedefinieerde relaties en nieuwe relaties te ontdekken die tot uitdrukking komen in teksten. Een dynamisch gestructureerd neuraal netwerk wordt geïntroduceerd om entiteitsparen te classificeren tot een continu uitgebreide relatieset. We stellen verder het gelijkenisgevoelige Chinese restaurantproces voor om nieuwe relaties te ontdekken. Experimenten uitgevoerd op een groot corpus tonen de effectiviteit van ons neurale netwerk aan, terwijl nieuwe relaties met hoge precisie en herinnering worden ontdekt.', 'da': 'De avancerede metoder til relationsklassificering er primært baseret på dybe neurale netværk. Denne form for overvåget læringsmetode lider ikke blot af begrænsede uddannelsesdata, men også af det store antal lavfrekvensrelationer inden for specifikke områder. I denne artikel foreslår vi opgaven med sonderende relationsklassificering til domæne videnshøstning. Målet er at lære en klassificerer om foruddefinerede relationer og opdage nye relationer udtrykt i tekster. Et dynamisk struktureret neuralt netværk introduceres til at klassificere entitetspar til et kontinuerligt udvidet relationssæt. Vi foreslår yderligere den lighedsfølsomme kinesiske restaurant proces for at opdage nye relationer. Eksperimenter udført på et stort korpus viser effektiviteten af vores neurale netværk, mens nye relationer opdages med høj præcision og tilbagekaldelse.', 'bg': 'Съвременните методи за класификация на отношенията се основават предимно на дълбоки невронни мрежи. Този вид метод на контролирано обучение страда не само от ограничени данни за обучение, но и от големия брой нискочестотни отношения в конкретни области. В настоящата статия предлагаме задачата за класификация на изследователските взаимоотношения за събиране на домейни знания. Целта е да научим класификатор на предварително дефинирани отношения и да открием нови отношения, изразени в текстове. Въвежда се динамично структурирана невронна мрежа, за да се класифицират двойки обекти към непрекъснато разширен набор от релации. Освен това предлагаме чувствителния китайски ресторант процес за откриване на нови отношения. Експериментите, проведени върху голям корпус, показват ефективността на нашата невронна мрежа, докато нови взаимоотношения се откриват с висока точност и припомняне.', 'de': 'Die modernen Methoden zur Beziehungsklassifikation basieren primär auf tiefen neuronalen Netzen. Diese Art der überwachten Lernmethode leidet nicht nur unter begrenzten Trainingsdaten, sondern auch an der Vielzahl von niederfrequenten Beziehungen in bestimmten Bereichen. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir die Aufgabe der explorativen Beziehungsklassifikation für das Domain Knowledge Harvesting vor. Ziel ist es, einen Klassifikator für vordefinierte Beziehungen zu erlernen und neue Beziehungen zu entdecken, die in Texten ausgedrückt werden. Ein dynamisch strukturiertes neuronales Netzwerk wird eingeführt, um Entitätspaare zu einem kontinuierlich erweiterten Beziehungssatz zu klassifizieren. Wir schlagen weiter den Ähnlichkeitssensitiven chinesischen Restaurantprozess vor, um neue Beziehungen zu entdecken. Experimente an einem großen Korpus zeigen die Wirksamkeit unseres neuronalen Netzwerks, während neue Beziehungen mit hoher Präzision und Erinnerung entdeckt werden.', 'ko': '가장 선진적인 관계 분류 방법은 주로 심층 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 한다.이런 감독 학습 방법은 훈련 데이터에 한계가 있을 뿐만 아니라 특정 분야에 대량의 저주파 관계가 존재한다.본고에서 우리는 분야 지식을 얻는 탐색적 관계의 분류 임무를 제시했다.목표는 미리 정의된 관계를 바탕으로 하는 분류기를 배우고 텍스트에 표현된 새로운 관계를 발견하는 것이다.동적 구조의 신경 네트워크를 도입하여 실체를 끊임없이 확장되는 관계 집합으로 분류한다.우리는 유사성이 민감한 중식당 과정을 한층 더 제시해 새로운 관계를 발견했다.대형 어료 라이브러리에서 진행된 실험은 우리의 신경 네트워크의 유효성을 나타냈고, 동시에 높은 정확도와 리콜율을 가진 새로운 관계를 발견했다.', 'fa': 'روش\u200cهای وضعیت هنری برای برقراری رابطه\u200cها در اصل بر روی شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق است. این نوع روش یادگیری که تحت نظر قرار گرفته است، نه تنها از داده های آموزش محدودیت، بلکه همچنین تعداد زیادی از رابطه های فرکانس کم در محدودیت خاص رنج می دهد. در این کاغذ، ما وظیفه\u200cی رابطه\u200cهای تحقیقاتی برای جمع کردن علم دامنی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. هدف این است که رابطه\u200cکننده\u200cای از رابطه\u200cهای پیش\u200cتعریف یاد بگیریم و رابطه\u200cهای جدید را در متن\u200cها نشان داده شود. Name ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم فرآیند رستوران چینی حساس شباهت را برای کشف رابطه\u200cهای جدید. تجربه\u200cهایی که روی یک کورپوس بزرگ انجام می\u200cشود نشان می\u200cدهند فعالیت شبکه عصبی ما، در حالی که رابطه\u200cهای جدید با دقیق و یادآوری بالا کشف می\u200cشوند.', 'id': 'Metode state-of-the-art untuk klasifikasi hubungan utama berdasarkan jaringan saraf dalam. Metode belajar yang diawasi ini menderita bukan hanya dari data pelatihan terbatas, tapi juga jumlah besar hubungan frekuensi rendah dalam domain spesifik. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan tugas dari klasifikasi hubungan eksplorator untuk pemilihan pengetahuan domain. Tujuannya adalah untuk belajar klasifikasi hubungan yang terdefinisikan dan menemukan hubungan baru yang diungkapkan dalam teks. Rangkaian saraf yang dinamik strukturasi diperkenalkan untuk mengklasifikasi pasangan entitas ke set hubungan yang terus-menerus berkembang. Kami melaporkan proses restoran Cina yang sensitif untuk menemukan hubungan baru. Eksperimen yang dilakukan pada tubuh besar menunjukkan efektivitas jaringan saraf kita, sementara hubungan baru ditemukan dengan presisi tinggi dan ingatan.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa sanaa wa usambazaji wa mahusiano ni wa msingi unaofanywa na mtandao wa neura. aina hii ya ufundi unaothibitishwa inaumia kutokana na takwimu zenye mafunzo pekee, bali pia idadi kubwa ya mahusiano ya kiwango kidogo katika maeneo maalum. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza jukumu la ufafanuzi wa mahusiano ya uchunguzi kwa ajili ya kuvuna maarifa ya ndani. The goal is to learn a classifier on pre-defined relations and discover new relations expressed in texts.  Mtandao wa neura uliotengenezwa kidini unaonyeshwa kwa ajili ya viwili vinavyotengenezwa kwa mfumo wa mahusiano unaoendelea kuendelea. Tunazipendekeza zaidi mchakato wa mgahawa wa China unaofanana na vizuri ili kugundua mahusiano mapya. Majaribio yaliyofanywa katika makundi makubwa yanaonyesha ufanisi wa mtandao wetu wa neura, wakati mahusiano mapya yanagunduliwa kwa urahisi na kukumbuka.', 'af': "Die staat- of- die- kuns metodes vir verwanting klassifikasie is voorstel gebaseer op diep neural net- werke. Hierdie soort van ondersoekte onderwerp metode lyf nie alleen beperkte onderwerp data nie, maar ook die groot aantal lae frekwensierelasies in spesifieke domeine. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons die taak van uitsoek verwanting klasifikasie vir domein kennis oepmaak. Die doel is om 'n klassifiseerder op voorafgedefinieerde relasies te leer en nuwe relasies te ontdek wat in teks uitgevoer word. Name Ons beveel verder die gelykheidssensitiewe Sjinese restaurant proses om nuwe relasies te ontdek. Eksperimente wat op 'n groot korpus gedoen is, vertoon die effektiviteit van ons neuralnetwerk, terwyl nuwe verwantings ontdek word met hoë presisie en herhaal.", 'tr': 'Sınıflandırmak üçin resim tarzı yöntemleri ilkinji şekilde nöral net çalışmalarına dayanan. Bu şekilde gözleýän öwrenme yöntemi diňe çykarýan okuwçylyk maglumatyndan däl, ýöne belli alanlarda iň azalyk derejesi bar. Bu kagyzda bolup bilgi hasaplamak üçin exploratory baglaşma işini teklip edýäris. Maksady öň-belirlenýän baglaýyşlarda klasifikatçy öwrenmek we tekstlerde ifade edilen täze baglaýyşlary tapmak. Dinamik düzümlenmiş neural şebekesi (entitet çiftleri) sürekli genişletilýän bir baglaýyşy klasifike edildi. Biz indi Hytaý restoranyň täze baglaýyşyny açmak üçin meňzeşli bir restoranyny teklip berýäris. Uly korpusda işlenýän deneyler neural şebekerimiziň etkinliýetimizi görkezýär, täze baglaşyklar ýokary derejesi bilen we hatyrlamak bilen tapylýarlar.', 'sq': 'Metodat më të larta për klasifikimin e marrëdhënieve janë kryesisht bazuar në rrjetet e thella nervore. Ky lloj metode mësimi mbikqyrur vuan jo vetëm nga të dhënat e kufizuara të trainimit, por gjithashtu nga numri i madh i marrëdhënieve me frekuencë të ulët në fusha specifike. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë detyrën e klasifikimit të marrëdhënieve eksploruese për mbledhjen e njohurive në domeni. Qëllimi është të mësosh një klasifikues mbi marrëdhëniet e përcaktuara para dhe të zbulosh marrëdhënie të reja të shprehura në tekste. Një rrjet neural dinamikisht i strukturuar futet për të klasifikuar njësinë e çifteve me një set lidhjesh të zgjeruar vazhdimisht. Ne propozojmë më tej procesin e ngjashëm të restaurantit kinez për të zbuluar marrëdhënie të reja. Eksperimentet e kryera në një trup të madh tregojnë efektshmërinë e rrjetit tonë nervor, ndërsa marrëdhëniet e reja zbulohen me preçizion të lartë dhe kujtim.', 'am': 'የግንኙነት ግንኙነት የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት በጥልቅ መረብ-ሥራ በመሠረት ነው፡፡ This kind of supervised learning method suffers from not only limited training data, but also the large number of low-frequency relations in specific domains.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የውይይት እውቀት ለማገኘት የግንኙነት ክፍል ማድረጉን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ጉዳዩ አስቀድሞ ግንኙነትን ለመማር እና በጽሑፎች የተናገረውን አዲስ ግንኙነት ማግኘት ነው፡፡ በጥያቄ የተመሠረተች የነዌብ መረብ በተለያዩ አካባቢው ዓይነቶች በዘወትር በተለየ ግንኙነት ማሰናከል ያስታወቃል። አዲስ ግንኙነት ለማግኘት የቻይና ሰራሲት ፕሮጀክት ደግሞ ብጤ መስሎትን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በታላቅ ቆርፓስ ላይ የተደረገውን ፈተናዎች የናቡር መረብ ጥያቄን ጥቅም ያሳያል፤ አዲስ ግንኙነት ከፍተኛ ውስጥና ማስታወስ ይገኛል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հաբերության դասակարգման ամենաբարձր մեթոդները հիմնված են հիմնականում խորը նյարդային ցանցերի վրա: Այսպիսի վերահսկված ուսուցման մեթոդ ոչ միայն սահմանափակ ուսուցման տվյալներ է տառապում, այլ նաև հատուկ ոլորտներում ցածր հաճախականության հարաբերությունների մեծ քանակը: In this paper, we propose the task of exploratory relation classification for domain knowledge harvesting.  Նպատակն է սովորել նախասահմանափակ հարաբերությունների դասակարգիչ և հայտնաբերել նոր հարաբերություններ, որոնք արտահայտվում են տեքստներում: Դինանիկապես կառուցվածված նյարդային ցանց է ներկայացվում, որպեսզի դասակարգել էության զույգերը անընդհատ ընդլայնված հարաբերությունների համակարգին: Մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք նման զգալի չինական ռեստորանների գործընթացը նոր հարաբերությունների հայտնաբերելու համար: Մեծ մարմնի վրա կատարված փորձերը ցույց են տալիս մեր նյարդային ցանցի արդյունավետությունը, մինչդեռ նոր հարաբերությունները բացահայտվում են բարձր ճշգրտությամբ և հիշողությամբ:', 'az': 'İlişkisi klasifikasiyası üçün sanat metodları ilk dəyişik nöral ağ işlərinə dayanılır. Bu növ gözləyirli öyrənmə metodları yalnız sınırlı təhsil məlumatlarından, həmçin in də müəyyən alanlarda çox düşük frekans ilişkilerinin sayısı vardır. Bu kağızda, domena elm toplaması üçün keşif ilişkisi klasifikasyonu təklif edirik. Məqsəd, əvvəlcə təyin edilmiş ilişkiler barəsindəki klasifikatoru öyrənmək və məktəblərdə ifadə edilən yeni ilişkileri keçmək. Dinamik strukturlı nöral a ğ, hərəkətli genişlənmiş bir bağlantı qutusuna entitə çiftlərini klasifik etmək üçün təşkil edilir. Biz də yeni əlaqələri keşfetmək üçün bənzər hissətli Çin restoran prosesini təklif edirik. Büyük bir korpus təcrübələrində işlədilən təcrübələrdə nöral a ğımızın etkinliğini göstərir, yeni ilişkiler yüksək dəqiqliyyatla keçirilir və yada salırlar.', 'bn': 'সম্পর্ক বিভাগের রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের পদ্ধতি প্রথমত গভীর নিউরেল নেট-কাজের উপর ভিত্তিক। এই ধরনের পর্যবেক্ষণ করা শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি শুধুমাত্র সীমিত প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য থেকে কষ্ট পায় না, বরং নির্দিষ্ট ডোমেনের বিশাল সংখ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ডোমেইন জ্ঞানের কাজের জন্য তদন্তের সম্পর্ক বিভাগের কাজ প্রস্তাব করি। লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে পূর্ববর্তী সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্কের বিষয়টি শিক্ষা এবং লেখায় প্রকাশিত নতুন সম্পর্ক আবিষ্কার করা। একটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ক্লাসিফিকেটের জোড়ার জন্য চিহ্নিত করা হয়েছে যে সংশ্লিষ্ট সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্ক বিস্তৃত সেটে আমরা আরো চীনা রেস্টুরেন্ট প্রক্রিয়াকে নতুন সম্পর্ক আবিষ্কার করার প্রস্তাব করছি। বিশাল কোর্পাসে অনুষ্ঠিত পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে আমাদের নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্কের কার্যকর কার্যক্রম, যখন নতুন সম্পর্ক উচ্চপরিসূচক এবং স', 'bs': 'Metode umjetnosti za klasifikaciju odnosa osnovane su primarno na dubokim neuralnim mrežama. Ova vrsta nadzorne metode učenja pati ne samo od ograničenih podataka obuke, već i velikog broja niskofrekvencijskih odnosa u specifičnim domenama. U ovom papiru predlažemo zadatak istraživačke veze klasifikacije za prikupljanje znanja domena. Cilj je naučiti klasifikatora o preddefiniranim odnosima i otkriti nove odnose izražene u tekstima. Dinamički strukturirana neuralna mreža se uvede kako bi klasifikovala pare entiteta na stalno širenu vezu. Dalje predlažemo proces osjetljivosti kineskog restorana da otkrijemo nove odnose. Eksperimenti provedeni na velikom korpusu pokazuju učinkovitost naše neuralne mreže, dok su novi odnosi otkriveni sa visokom preciznošću i sjećanjem.', 'ca': "The state-of-the-art methods for relation classification are primarily based on deep neural net- works.  Aquest tipus de mètode d'aprenentatge supervisat pateix no només dades limitades de capacitació, sinó també el gran nombre de relacions de baixa freqüència en dominis específics. En aquest paper, proposem la tasca de classificació de relacions exploratories per a la col·lecció de coneixements de domini. L'objectiu és aprendre un classificador de relacions predefinides i descobrir noves relacions expresses en textos. S'introdueix una xarxa neural dinàmicament estructurada per classificar parelles d'entitats a un conjunt de relacions constantment expandides. Proposem també el procés de restaurants xinesos sensibles a la similitud per descobrir noves relacions. Els experiments fets en un gran corpus mostren l'eficacia de la nostra xarxa neuronal, mentre les noves relacions es descobrin amb alta precisió i recordació.", 'cs': 'Nejmodernější metody klasifikace vztahů jsou primárně založeny na hlubokých neuronových sítích. Tento druh metody supervizovaného učení trpí nejen omezenými údaji o školení, ale také velkým počtem nízkofrekvenčních vztahů v konkrétních oblastech. V tomto článku navrhujeme úkol klasifikace zkoumání vztahů pro sběr doménových znalostí. Cílem je naučit se klasifikátor předem definovaných vztahů a objevit nové vztahy vyjádřené v textech. Je zavedena dynamicky strukturovaná neuronová síť pro klasifikaci párů entit do kontinuálně rozšiřované sady relací. Dále navrhujeme podobnostně citlivý čínský restaurační proces k objevování nových vztahů. Experimenty provedené na velkém korpusu ukazují efektivitu naší neuronové sítě, zatímco nové vztahy jsou objevovány s vysokou přesností a vzpomínkou.', 'et': 'Seoste klassifitseerimise kaasaegsed meetodid põhinevad peamiselt sügavatel närvivõrkudel. Selline juhendatud õppemeetod ei kannata mitte ainult piiratud koolitusandmete, vaid ka suure hulga madala sagedusega seoste tõttu konkreetsetes valdkondades. Käesolevas töös pakume välja ülesande uurivate suhete klassifitseerimiseks domeeniteadmiste kogumiseks. Eesmärk on õppida klassifitseerijat eelnevalt määratletud suhetest ja avastada tekstides väljendatud uusi suhteid. Dünaamiliselt struktureeritud närvivõrk on kasutusele võetud, et klassifitseerida olemipaare pidevalt laienenud suhtekogumile. Lisaks pakume välja sarnasuse tundliku Hiina restorani protsessi uute suhete avastamiseks. Suure korpusega läbi viidud eksperimendid näitavad meie närvivõrgu efektiivsust, samas kui uued suhted avastatakse väga täpselt ja meeldetuletusega.', 'fi': 'Nykyaikaiset suhdeluokittelumenetelmﾃ､t perustuvat ensisijaisesti syvﾃ､hermoverkkoihin. Tﾃ､llainen ohjattu oppimismenetelmﾃ､ kﾃ､rsii paitsi rajallisesta koulutustiedosta, myﾃｶs suuresta mﾃ､ﾃ､rﾃ､stﾃ､ matalataajuussuhteita tietyillﾃ､ aloilla. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ ehdotamme tutkimussuhdeluokittelun tehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､ verkkotunnuksen kerﾃ､ﾃ､miseen. Tavoitteena on oppia ennalta mﾃ､ﾃ､riteltyjen suhteiden luokittelija ja lﾃｶytﾃ､ﾃ､ teksteissﾃ､ ilmaistuja uusia suhteita. Dynaamisesti jﾃ､sennelty neuroverkko esitellﾃ､ﾃ､n luokittelemaan entiteettipareja jatkuvasti laajenevaan suhdejoukkoon. Lisﾃ､ksi ehdotamme samankaltaisuuden herkkﾃ､ﾃ､ kiinalaista ravintolaprosessia uusien suhteiden lﾃｶytﾃ､miseksi. Suurella korpusella tehdyt kokeet osoittavat neuroverkkomme tehokkuuden, kun taas uusia suhteita lﾃｶydetﾃ､ﾃ､n erittﾃ､in tarkasti ja muistetaan.', 'sk': 'Najsodobnejše metode razvrščanja relacij temeljijo predvsem na globokih nevronskih mrežah. Takšna metoda nadzorovanega učenja trpi ne le zaradi omejenih podatkov o usposabljanju, temveč tudi zaradi velikega števila nizko frekvenčnih odnosov na določenih področjih. V prispevku predlagamo nalogo klasifikacije raziskovalnih relacij za pridobivanje domenskega znanja. Cilj je učenje klasifikatorja vnaprej določenih odnosov in odkrivanje novih odnosov, izraženih v besedilih. Dinamično strukturirano nevronsko omrežje je uvedeno za klasifikacijo parov entitet v stalno razširjeni nabor relacij. Nadalje predlagamo proces podobnosti občutljive kitajske restavracije za odkrivanje novih odnosov. Eksperimenti, izvedeni na velikem korpusu, kažejo učinkovitost našega živčnega omrežja, medtem ko se nove odnose odkrivajo z visoko natančnostjo in odpoklicem.', 'ha': "@ action @ info: whatsthis Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa aikin da za'a samu da fassarar abin da ke tsirarwa na ilmi guda. Haƙin ya zama ya sanar wani mai fassara a kan mazaɓa na gaba-defined kuma ka gane haɗi na sãbuwa da aka bayyana cikin littafan. An introduce wani jerin neural wanda aka samar da shi wanda aka ƙayyade zuwa wani tsarin mazaɓa mai daɗi. Kayya, Munã goyya da jararin restaurant na China da sauri, don ka gane dangani-wata sãbuwa. Tajararin da aka aikata a kan wani umarni mai girma, yana nuna nufi'ar 'yan'uwanmu na neura, kuma a sami, an gane danganta masu tsari da kuma a tuna.", 'he': 'השיטות המאודמות לסיפור יחסים מבוססות בעיקר על רשת עצבית עמוקה. סוג זה של שיטת לימוד מושגת סובלת לא רק ממידע אימון מוגבל, אלא גם ממספר גדול של יחסי תדר נמוך בתחומים מסוימים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים את המשימה של מסווג יחסי חקירה לקצירת ידע שטח. המטרה היא ללמוד מסווג על יחסים מוגדרים מראש ולגלות יחסים חדשים מבטחים בטקסטים. רשת עצבית מובנת דינמית מוצגת כדי להקליף זוגות יחידות לקבוצה מערכת יחסים מתרחבת כל הזמן. אנחנו גם מציעים את תהליך המסעדה הסינית הרגישה לדמיין כדי לגלות מערכות יחסים חדשות. ניסויים שעושים על קורפוס גדול מראים את היעילות של הרשת העצבית שלנו, בעוד מערכות יחסים חדשות מתגלות עם מדויקה גבוהה ותזכורת.', 'jv': 'email-custom-header-Security Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem punika dipunangé kuwi, dadi tanggal ngregani kuwi, dadi apik dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo awak dhéwé kesempatan kanggo awak dhéwé. In this paper, we proposal the task of istraistrator Relative Relative to domain knowingharbouring. goal Kernel Awak dhéwé nggunaké ngerasakno perusahaan restoran Chinese sampeyan kanggo nggawe perusahaan anyar. Gebudhakan winih sing beraksi karo akeh dumadhi wong liyane efekan ning netahan miner, awak dhéwé kaya perusahaan anyar iki dadi apik dhéwé, ngono hal kedahké awak dhéwé sing bakal terus apik dhéwé.', 'bo': 'The state-of-the-art methods for relation to classification are primarily based on deep neural net-works. འདིའི་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་སྡུད་མེད་པར་ཐག་འཛིན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་དང་། དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་ཐིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་གསལ་བཤད་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་གསར་བ་རྙེད་དགོས། དབྱིབས་བཟོས་ཅན་གྱི་སྐྱེས་འབྲེལ་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་ནི་དབྱིབས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་མཐུད་དང་ཆ་རྐྱེན་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་འཛུགས་སྐྱེས་པ། འོན་ཀྱང་ཁྱེད་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་དུས་ཆེན་དང་བློ་གཏོང་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་ལ་མཐོ་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་བྱ་བ་དེ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ནུས་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་གི་ལྟ་བུ་དང་མཐུན་ཚད་མཐོ་པོ་ཞིག་རྙེད'}
{'en': 'Who is Killed by Police : Introducing Supervised Attention for Hierarchical LSTMs', 'ar': 'من قتله الشرطة: تقديم الاهتمام الخاضع للإشراف لـ LSTMs الهرمية', 'pt': 'Quem é morto pela polícia: introduzindo atenção supervisionada para LSTMs hierárquicos', 'es': 'Quién es asesinado por la policía: Introducción de la atención supervisada para los LSTM jerárquicos', 'fr': "Qui est tué par la police\xa0: introduction de l'attention supervisée pour les LSTM hiérarchiques", 'ja': '警察に殺された人：階層型LSTMの監督下での注意喚起の紹介', 'ru': 'Кто убит полицией: введение контролируемого внимания для иерархических LSTM', 'zh': '谁为警察所杀,分LSTM入监关', 'hi': 'पुलिस द्वारा कौन मारा जाता है: पदानुक्रमित LSTMs के लिए पर्यवेक्षित ध्यान पेश करना', 'ga': 'C챕 at찼 Maraithe ag P처il챠n챠: Tabhairt Isteach Aird Mhaoirseachta do LSTM Ordlathach', 'hu': 'Kiket öl meg a rendőrség: Bemutatjuk a hierarchikus LSTMs felügyeleti figyelmet', 'el': 'Ποιος σκοτώνεται από την αστυνομία: Παρουσιάζει επιτηρημένη προσοχή για ιεραρχικές LSTMs', 'ka': 'რომელიც პოლიციაში სბთლია: მონაცემული დაახლოებით ჰიერარიქული LSTMs', 'kk': 'Полиция өлтірілген кім: Hierarchical LSTMs үшін бақылау үшін', 'it': "Chi viene ucciso dalla polizia: ecco l'attenzione supervisionata per i LSTMs gerarchici", 'lt': 'Kas nužudytas policijos: įdiegti prižiūrėtą dėmesį į hierarchinius LSTM', 'mk': 'Кој е убиен од страна на полицијата: претставување на надгледувано внимание за хиерархичните ЛСТМ', 'ms': 'Siapa yang dibunuh oleh Polis: Memperkenalkan Perhatian Diperhatikan untuk LSTM Hierarkikal', 'mt': 'Min jinqatlu mill-Pulizija: Introduzzjoni ta’ Attenzjoni Superviża għal LSTMs Erarkiċi', 'ml': 'പോലീസുകാര്\u200d കൊല്ലപ്പെട്ടവന്\u200d: ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d എസ്റ്റിമിസിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിച്ചു', 'mn': 'Хэн улс төрөлхтөн алдсан бөгөөд Хэрэглэгчийн LSTMs-г', 'no': 'Hvem er drept av politikk: Introducing Supervised Attention for Hierarchical LSTMs', 'pl': 'Kto został zabity przez policję: wprowadzenie nadzorowanej uwagi na hierarchiczne LSTMs', 'ro': 'Cine este ucis de poliție: Introducerea atenției supravegheate pentru LSTMs ierarhici', 'sr': 'Koga je ubila policija: uključujući nadzornu pažnju za hijerarhičke LSTMs', 'si': 'කවුද පොලිසියෙන් මරලා තියෙන්නේ: හියාර්චිකල් LSTMs ගැන බලන්න', 'so': 'Who is killed by Police: Introducing Supervised Attention for Hierarchical LSTMs', 'sv': 'Vem dödas av polisen: introducerar övervakad uppmärksamhet för hierarkiska LSTMs', 'ta': 'போலீஸ் யார் கொல்லப்படுகிறார்: உயர்நிலை LSTMs க்கான கவனத்தை அறிவிக்கும்', 'ur': 'جو پولیس کے ذریعہ قتل کیا گیا ہے: حیرارشیکل LSTMs کے لئے تحقیر کی توجه کرنا', 'uz': "Polish orqali o'ldiradi: Hierarchical LSTMs'ning eng muhimi taʼminlovchi", 'vi': 'Ai bị sát hại bởi cảnh sát: Giới thiệu giám sát chú ý đến HIerarchal LSTM', 'bg': 'Кой е убит от полицията: Въвеждане на надзорно внимание за йерархичните ЛТМ', 'hr': 'Koga je ubila policija: uvođenje nadzorne pažnje za hijerarhičke LSTMs', 'da': 'Hvem bliver dræbt af politiet: introducerer overvåget opmærksomhed på hierarkiske LSTMs', 'nl': 'Wie wordt gedood door politie: Introductie van supervised aandacht voor hiërarchische LSTMs', 'de': 'Wer von der Polizei getötet wird: Einführung überwachter Aufmerksamkeit für hierarchische LSTMs', 'id': 'Siapa yang dibunuh oleh Polisi: memperkenalkan Perhatian Diperhatikan untuk LSTM Hierarkis', 'ko': '누가 경찰에 살해당했는지: 등급별 LSTM 감독 관심 도입', 'sw': 'Anayeuawa na Polisi: Kufahamisha Tamko la Tamko kwa ajili ya LSTMs.', 'fa': 'که توسط پلیس کشته می شود: توجه به مراقبت مسئولیت برای LSTMs', 'tr': 'Polisiýa tarapyndan öldürilen kişi: Hierarchical LSTMs üçin gözetli', 'af': 'Wie is gedood deur polisie: Introducing Supervised Attention for Hierarchical LSTMs', 'sq': 'I cili është vrarë nga policia: Duke paraqitur vëmendjen e mbikqyrur për LSTM Hierarkike', 'hy': 'Ով սպանվում է ոստիկանության կողմից. Հիերարքիկական LSMT-ների վերահսկված ուշադրության ներկայացումը', 'am': 'በፖሊስ ውስጥ የተገደለ ነው:: ለHierarchical LSTMs', 'az': 'Polisin öldürüldüyü şəxs: Hierarchical LSTMs üçün gözləyirlənmiş', 'bn': 'পুলিশের দ্বারা মারা গেছে: হিয়ারার্কিল এলস্টিমিসের জন্য সুপার্ভিডের মনোযোগ প্রদান করা হয়েছে', 'bs': 'Koga je ubila policija: Uključujući nadzornu pažnju za hijerarhičke LSTMs', 'ca': 'Qui és assassinat per la policia: Introducir atenció supervisada pels LSTM hieràrquics', 'et': 'Kes on politsei poolt tapetud: Hierarhiliste LSTMde järelevalve alla suunatud tähelepanu tutvustamine', 'fi': 'Kuka on poliisin tappama: Valvottu huomio hierarkisille LSTMille', 'cs': 'Kdo je zabit policií: představení dohledu na hierarchické LSTMs', 'jv': 'Olèhku wis mrobah karo pulisi', 'ha': 'Wanda aka kashe na Police: Intintrucing Supered Attitory for Hierrrchical Lsts', 'he': 'מי נהרג על ידי המשטרה: להציג תשומת לב משומרת עבור LSTM הייררכיים', 'sk': 'Kdo je ubil policija: uvajanje nadzorovane pozornosti za hierarhične LSTMs', 'bo': 'གང་འདྲ་ཞིག་གིས་བཙུགས་པ་ཡིན་པ། Hierarchical LSTMs་ལ་རྟོགས་པ་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་སྟོན་བཞག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Finding names of people killed by police has become increasingly important as police shootings get more and more public attention (police killing detection). Unfortunately, there has been not much work in the literature addressing this problem. The early work in this field (Keith etal., 2017) proposed a distant supervision framework based on Expectation Maximization (EM) to deal with the multiple appearances of the names in documents. However, such EM-based framework can not take full advantages of deep learning models, necessitating the use of handdesigned features to improve the detection performance. In this work, we present a novel deep learning method to solve the problem of police killing recognition. The proposed method relies on hierarchical LSTMs to model the multiple sentences that contain the person names of interests, and introduce supervised attention mechanisms based on semantical word lists and dependency trees to upweight the important contextual words. Our experiments demonstrate the benefits of the proposed model and yield the state-of-the-art performance for police killing detection.', 'ar': 'أصبح العثور على أسماء الأشخاص الذين قتلتهم الشرطة أمرًا مهمًا بشكل متزايد حيث تحظى عمليات إطلاق النار التي تقوم بها الشرطة باهتمام الرأي العام أكثر فأكثر (اكتشاف عمليات القتل التي تقوم بها الشرطة). لسوء الحظ ، لم يكن هناك الكثير من العمل في الأدبيات التي تتناول هذه المشكلة. اقترح العمل المبكر في هذا المجال (Keith etal. ، 2017) إطارًا إشرافيًا بعيدًا يعتمد على تعظيم التوقعات (EM) للتعامل مع المظاهر المتعددة للأسماء في المستندات. ومع ذلك ، لا يمكن لهذا الإطار المستند إلى EM الاستفادة الكاملة من نماذج التعلم العميق ، مما يستلزم استخدام الميزات المصممة يدويًا لتحسين أداء الكشف. في هذا العمل ، نقدم طريقة جديدة للتعلم العميق لحل مشكلة التعرف على القتل من قبل الشرطة. تعتمد الطريقة المقترحة على نماذج LSTM الهرمية لنمذجة الجمل المتعددة التي تحتوي على أسماء الأشخاص ذوي الاهتمامات ، وإدخال آليات الانتباه الخاضعة للإشراف بناءً على قوائم الكلمات الدلالية وأشجار التبعية لزيادة أهمية الكلمات السياقية المهمة. توضح تجاربنا فوائد النموذج المقترح وتحقق أحدث أداء لاكتشاف القتل على يد الشرطة.', 'fr': "Trouver les noms des personnes tuées par la police est devenu de plus en plus important à mesure que les fusillades policières retiennent de plus en plus l'attention du public (détection des meurtres par Malheureusement, il n'y a pas beaucoup de travail dans la littérature traitant de ce problème. Les premiers travaux dans ce domaine (Keith etal., 2017) ont proposé un cadre de supervision à distance basé sur la maximisation des attentes (EM) pour traiter les apparitions multiples des noms dans les documents. Cependant, un tel framework basé sur EM ne peut pas tirer pleinement parti des modèles d'apprentissage profond, ce qui nécessite l'utilisation de fonctionnalités conçues à la main pour améliorer les performances de détection. Dans cet ouvrage, nous présentons une nouvelle méthode d'apprentissage profond pour résoudre le problème de la reconnaissance des meurtres commis par la police. La méthode proposée repose sur des LSTM hiérarchiques pour modéliser les phrases multiples qui contiennent les noms des personnes d'intérêt, et introduire des mécanismes d'attention supervisée basés sur des listes de mots sémantiques et des arbres de dépendance pour surpondérer les mots contextuels importants. Nos expériences démontrent les avantages du modèle proposé et fournissent des performances de pointe pour la détection des meurtres par la police.", 'es': 'Encontrar los nombres de las personas asesinadas por la policía se ha vuelto cada vez más importante a medida que los tiroteos policiales reciben cada vez más atención del público (detección de asesinatos policiales). Desafortunadamente, no se ha trabajado mucho en la literatura para abordar este problema. Los primeros trabajos en este campo (Keith et al., 2017) propusieron un marco de supervisión a distancia basado en la maximización de expectativas (EM) para tratar las múltiples apariciones de los nombres en los documentos. Sin embargo, este marco basado en EM no puede aprovechar al máximo los modelos de aprendizaje profundo, lo que requiere el uso de funciones diseñadas a mano para mejorar el rendimiento de la detección. En este trabajo, presentamos un novedoso método de aprendizaje profundo para resolver el problema del reconocimiento de asesinatos policiales. El método propuesto se basa en LSTM jerárquicas para modelar las múltiples oraciones que contienen los nombres de las personas de interés, e introducir mecanismos de atención supervisada basados en listas semánticas de palabras y árboles de dependencias para aumentar el peso de las palabras contextuales importantes. Nuestros experimentos demuestran los beneficios del modelo propuesto y ofrecen un rendimiento de vanguardia para la detección de asesinatos policiales.', 'pt': 'Encontrar nomes de pessoas mortas pela polícia tornou-se cada vez mais importante à medida que os tiroteios da polícia recebem cada vez mais atenção do público (detecção de assassinatos policiais). Infelizmente, não há muitos trabalhos na literatura abordando esse problema. Os primeiros trabalhos neste campo (Keith et al., 2017) propunham uma estrutura de supervisão à distância baseada na Maximização de Expectativas (EM) para lidar com as múltiplas aparições dos nomes em documentos. No entanto, essa estrutura baseada em EM não pode aproveitar todas as vantagens dos modelos de aprendizado profundo, exigindo o uso de recursos projetados à mão para melhorar o desempenho da detecção. Neste trabalho, apresentamos um novo método de aprendizado profundo para resolver o problema de reconhecimento de mortes policiais. O método proposto baseia-se em LSTMs hierárquicos para modelar as várias frases que contêm os nomes de pessoas de interesse e introduzir mecanismos de atenção supervisionada baseados em listas de palavras semânticas e árvores de dependência para aumentar o peso das palavras contextuais importantes. Nossos experimentos demonstram os benefícios do modelo proposto e produzem o desempenho de última geração para detecção de homicídios policiais.', 'ja': '警察による銃撃がますます世間の注目を集めるにつれて、警察によって殺害された人物の名前を見つけることがますます重要になっています（警察による殺害検出）。 残念ながら、この問題に取り組むための文献にはあまり取り組んでいない。 この分野の初期の研究（ Keith ettal., 2017 ）は、文書内の名前の複数の出現に対処するために、期待最大化（ EM ）に基づく遠隔監督の枠組みを提案した。 しかしながら、このようなEMベースのフレームワークは、ディープラーニングモデルの利点を十分に利用することはできず、検出性能を向上させるために手動設計の機能を使用する必要がある。 本作では、警察殺傷認識の問題を解決するための斬新な深層学習法を提示している。 提案された方法は、階層的なLSTMに依存して、関心のある人物の名前を含む複数の文をモデル化し、重要な文脈的な単語を重み付けするために、意味的な単語リストと依存関係ツリーに基づいて監視された注意メカニズムを導入する。 私たちの実験は、提案されたモデルの利点を実証し、警察殺害検出のための最先端のパフォーマンスを生み出します。', 'zh': '随警察枪击案益注(警察杀人检),求警察杀者名益重。 不幸者,文献无此事。 先期(Keith etal.事,2017)建一基于期最大化(EM)远程督框架,以理名者数矣。 然而EM之框架,不可以深学,故使工巧之性,以崇检性能。 于此之事,建一新学以决警察杀戮之知。 其法恃分层LSTM建模兴趣人名诸句,引入语义词列表及恃树监制,以重上下文词之权。 吾实验验其形势之利,而有警察杀检测之最新。', 'hi': 'पुलिस द्वारा मारे गए लोगों के नाम खोजना तेजी से महत्वपूर्ण हो गया है क्योंकि पुलिस की गोलीबारी अधिक से अधिक सार्वजनिक ध्यान (पुलिस हत्या का पता लगाने) प्राप्त करती है। दुर्भाग्य से, इस समस्या को संबोधित करने वाले साहित्य में बहुत अधिक काम नहीं किया गया है। इस क्षेत्र में शुरुआती काम (कीथ एटल., 2017) ने दस्तावेजों में नामों के कई दिखावे से निपटने के लिए अपेक्षा अधिकतमकरण (ईएम) के आधार पर एक दूर के पर्यवेक्षण ढांचे का प्रस्ताव दिया। हालांकि, इस तरह के ईएम-आधारित ढांचे को डीप लर्निंग मॉडल का पूरा लाभ नहीं मिल सकता है, जिससे पता लगाने के प्रदर्शन में सुधार के लिए हैंडडीज़ किए गए सुविधाओं के उपयोग की आवश्यकता होती है। इस काम में, हम पुलिस की हत्या की मान्यता की समस्या को हल करने के लिए एक उपन्यास गहरी सीखने की विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं। प्रस्तावित विधि पदानुक्रमित एलएसटीएम पर निर्भर करती है ताकि कई वाक्यों को मॉडल किया जा सके जिसमें हितों के व्यक्ति के नाम होते हैं, और महत्वपूर्ण प्रासंगिक शब्दों को बढ़ाने के लिए शब्दार्थ शब्द सूचियों और निर्भरता पेड़ों के आधार पर पर्यवेक्षित ध्यान तंत्र पेश करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगप्रस्तावित मॉडल के लाभों को प्रदर्शित करते हैं और पुलिस की हत्या का पता लगाने के लिए अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Поиск имен людей, убитых полицией, становится все более важным по мере того, как полицейские стрельбы привлекают все большее внимание общественности (обнаружение убийств полицией). К сожалению, в литературе, посвященной этой проблеме, не было проведено большого объема работы. Ранние работы в этой области (Keith et al., 2017) предложили систему дистанционного наблюдения, основанную на максимизации ожиданий (EM), чтобы справиться с множественным появлением имен в документах. Однако такая структура на основе ЭМ не может в полной мере использовать преимущества моделей глубокого обучения, что требует использования функций, разработанных вручную, для повышения производительности обнаружения. В этой работе мы представляем новый метод глубокого обучения для решения проблемы распознавания убийств в полиции. Предложенный метод опирается на иерархические LSTM для моделирования множества предложений, которые содержат имена заинтересованных лиц, и внедрения механизмов контролируемого внимания на основе семантических списков слов и деревьев зависимостей для взвешивания важных контекстных слов. Наши эксперименты демонстрируют преимущества предлагаемой модели и дают самые современные результаты для обнаружения убийств в полиции.', 'ga': 'Tá níos mó tábhachta ag baint le hainmneacha na ndaoine a mharaigh póilíní a aimsiú de réir mar a fhaigheann lámhach póilíní níos mó agus níos mó aird an phobail (brath marú póilíní). Ar an drochuair, níl mórán oibre déanta sa litríocht chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb seo. Mhol an obair luath sa réimse seo (Keith etal., 2017) creat maoirseachta i bhfad i gcéin bunaithe ar Uasmhéadú Ionchais (EM) chun déileáil leis na hainmneacha iolracha i ndoiciméid. Mar sin féin, ní féidir le creat den sórt sin bunaithe ar EM buntáistí iomlána a bhaint as samhlacha domhainfhoghlama, rud a fhágann gur gá gnéithe lámhdheartha a úsáid chun an fheidhmíocht braite a fheabhsú. San obair seo, cuirimid i láthair modh foghlama domhain úrscéal chun an fhadhb a aithint marú póilíní a réiteach. Braitheann an modh atá beartaithe ar LSTM ordlathach chun na habairtí iolracha a shamhaltú ina bhfuil ainmneacha na ndaoine ar leasanna iad, agus chun meicníochtaí aire maoirsithe a thabhairt isteach bunaithe ar liostaí focal séimeantacha agus ar chrainn spleáchais chun na focail thábhachtacha chomhthéacsúla a ardú. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh na buntáistí a bhaineann leis an tsamhail atá beartaithe agus tugann siad an fheidhmíocht úrscothach maidir le marú póilíní a bhrath.', 'el': 'Η εύρεση ονομάτων ανθρώπων που σκοτώθηκαν από την αστυνομία έχει γίνει όλο και πιο σημαντική καθώς οι πυροβολισμοί της αστυνομίας λαμβάνουν όλο και περισσότερη προσοχή του κοινού (ανίχνευση δολοφονιών της αστυνομίας). Δυστυχώς, δεν έχει γίνει πολλή δουλειά στη βιβλιογραφία για την αντιμετώπιση αυτού του προβλήματος. Η πρώιμη εργασία σε αυτό το πεδίο (Κιθ Εντλ., 2017) πρότεινε ένα πλαίσιο μακρινής εποπτείας βασισμένο στη Μεγιστοποίηση Αναμονής (ΕΜ) για να αντιμετωπίσει τις πολλαπλές εμφανίσεις των ονομάτων σε έγγραφα. Ωστόσο, ένα τέτοιο πλαίσιο βασισμένο σε ΕΜ δεν μπορεί να εκμεταλλευτεί πλήρως τα πλεονεκτήματα των μοντέλων βαθιάς μάθησης, απαιτώντας τη χρήση χειροποίητων χαρακτηριστικών για τη βελτίωση της απόδοσης ανίχνευσης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα μέθοδο βαθιάς μάθησης για την επίλυση του προβλήματος της αναγνώρισης δολοφονιών αστυνομικών. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος βασίζεται σε ιεραρχικά για να μοντελοποιήσει τις πολλαπλές προτάσεις που περιέχουν τα ονόματα προσώπων που ενδιαφέρουν, και να εισαγάγει εποπτευόμενους μηχανισμούς προσοχής βασισμένους σε σημασιολογικές λίστες λέξεων και δέντρα εξάρτησης για να αυξήσει τις σημαντικές λέξεις που σχετίζονται με το περιβάλλον. Τα πειράματά μας καταδεικνύουν τα οφέλη του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου και αποδίδουν την υπερσύγχρονη απόδοση για την ανίχνευση δολοφονιών από την αστυνομία.', 'hu': 'A rendőrség által megölt emberek nevének megtalálása egyre fontosabbá vált, mivel a rendőrségi lövöldözések egyre nagyobb figyelmet kapnak (rendőrségi gyilkosság felderítése). Sajnos nem sok munka történt a problémával foglalkozó irodalomban. Az ezen a területen végzett korai munka (Keith etal., 2017) egy távoli felügyeleti keretrendszert javasolt az Expectation Maximization (EM) alapján, hogy foglalkozzon a nevek többszörös megjelenésével a dokumentumokban. Az ilyen EM-alapú keretrendszer azonban nem használhatja ki teljes mértékben a mélytanulási modellek előnyeit, ezért kézzel tervezett funkciók használatát igényli az észlelési teljesítmény javítása érdekében. Ebben a munkában egy új mélytanulási módszert mutatunk be a rendőrségi gyilkosság felismerésének problémájának megoldására. A javasolt módszer hierarchikus LSTMs-eken alapul, hogy modellezzék az érdeklődési személyek nevét tartalmazó többszörös mondatot, és felügyelt figyelemmel kísérő mechanizmusokat vezessenek be szemantikus szólistákon és függőségfákon alapuló, a fontos kontextuális szavak kiemelésére. Kísérleteink bemutatják a javasolt modell előnyeit és a rendőrségi gyilkosságok felderítéséhez szükséges korszerű teljesítményt eredményeznek.', 'ka': 'ოჲლთუთწრა ნამვპთ ნა ჳჲპარა, კჲთრჲ ჟა სბთრთ, ჟრანა ოჲ-გაზნთ, კჲდარჲ ოჲლთუთწრა ჟრპვლწრ ოჲგვფვ თ ოჲგვფვ გნთმაგარ ნა ოსბლთკარა. მართლად, ლიტერატურაში ამ პრობლემას მისაღებისთვის არ არის მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო. პირველი სამუშაო პირველი სამუშაო (Keith etal., 2017) პირველი სამუშაო პროგრამეტში გააჩვენება განსხვავებული ნახვა ფრამეტრი, რომელიც დოკუმენტებში გამოიყენება მაქსიმმიზაცი მაგრამ ამ EM-ის დაბათი ფრამეტრი არ შეიძლება ყველაფერი გამოიყენება ძალიან სწავლებელი მოდელების, რომლებიც ხელსაწყობინებული ფრამეტრების გამოყენება უნდა გამოყ ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ პრომენტის ძალიან ძალიან სწავლების მეტი, რომელიც პოლისტის პრობლემის გადაწყვეტილების პრობლემის შეცდომა. პროგრამის შესაძლებელი მეტი იერაქტიკური LSTMs-ის მოდელისთვის, რომელიც ინტერესტის ადამიანის სახელის მოდელისთვის, და დააყენება მონაცემულებული ინტერესტიკური სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების და დასარდამ ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები გამოიყენება მოდელეში, რომელიც მინდომარებული მოდელეში და მინდომარებულია სახელსაწყისი გამოყენება პოლიციის სბთილზე.', 'it': "Trovare i nomi delle persone uccise dalla polizia è diventato sempre più importante poiché le sparatorie della polizia ricevono sempre più attenzione pubblica (rilevamento degli omicidi della polizia). Purtroppo, non c'è stato molto lavoro nella letteratura per affrontare questo problema. I primi lavori in questo campo (Keith etal., 2017) hanno proposto un quadro di supervisione a distanza basato su Expectation Maximization (EM) per affrontare le molteplici apparizioni dei nomi nei documenti. Tuttavia, tale framework basato su EM non può trarre tutti i vantaggi dei modelli di deep learning, richiedendo l'uso di funzionalità progettate a mano per migliorare le prestazioni di rilevamento. In questo lavoro, presentiamo un nuovo metodo di deep learning per risolvere il problema del riconoscimento degli omicidi di polizia. Il metodo proposto si basa su LSTMs gerarchici per modellare le frasi multiple che contengono i nomi delle persone degli interessi, e introdurre meccanismi di attenzione supervisionati basati su elenchi semantici di parole e alberi di dipendenza per aumentare le parole contestuali importanti. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano i benefici del modello proposto e forniscono prestazioni all'avanguardia per la rilevazione degli omicidi di polizia.", 'kk': 'Полицияның өлтірілген адамдардың атауын табу көп маңызды болып, полицияның шешімдері көбірек болып тұрғанда (полицияның өлтіруін анықтау). Кешіріңіз, әдебиетте бұл мәселеге көп жұмыс жоқ. Бұл өрістің бастағы жұмыс (Keith etal., 2017) құжаттардың бірнеше атауларын қарастыру үшін көбірек максимализациялау (EM) негізінде қашықтағы қашықтағы бақылау қоршауын ұсынды. Бірақ EM-негіздегі қоршау бағдарламасы түсінікті оқыту үлгілерінің толық артықшылығын пайдалануға болмайды. Қалта құрылған мүмкіндіктерді анықтау үшін қолдану керек Бұл жұмыс ішінде, полицияны анықтау мәселесін шешу үшін романдық оқыту әдісін таңдаймыз. Келтірілген әдіс иерархиялық LSTMs дегенді бірнеше сөздердің атауын үлгілеу үшін тәуелді, және бірнеше сөздердің бірнеше сөздеріне қатынау механизмтерін, semantiкалық сөз тізіміне негізделген және тәуелдік ағаштард Біздің тәжірибеміз келтірілген моделінің артықшылығын көрсетеді және полицияны өлтіру үшін әртүрлі жағдайды көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Policijos nužudytų žmonių vardų nustatymas tapo vis svarbesnis, nes policijos šaudymai vis labiau atkreipia visuomenės dėmesį (policijos nužudymo nustatymas). Deja, literatūroje nebuvo daug darbo sprendžiant šią problem ą. Ankstesniame šioje srityje atliktame darbe (Keith etal., 2017 m.) pasiūlyta nuotolinė priežiūros sistema, pagrįsta tikimasis maksimalumas (EM), kad būtų galima spręsti kelis dokumentuose nurodytus pavadinimus. Tačiau tokia EM grindžiama sistema negali pasinaudoti visais gilaus mokymosi modelių privalumais, todėl reikia naudoti rankinius požymius, kad būtų pagerintas aptikimo veiksmingumas. Šiame darbe pristatome naują gilaus mokymosi metodą, skirtą išspręsti policijos žudymo pripažinimo problem ą. Siūlomas metodas grindžiamas hierarchiniais LSTM, kuriais modeliuojami keli sakiniai, kuriuose nurodomi asmens interesų vardai, ir nustatomi kontroliuojami dėmesio mechanizmai, grindžiami semantiniais žodžių sąrašais ir priklausomybės medžiais, siekiant padidinti svarbius kontekstinius žodžius. Mūsų eksperimentai rodo siūlomo modelio naudą ir duoda pažangiausių rezultatų policijos žudymo aptikimui.', 'mk': 'Finding names of people killed by police has become increasingly important as police shootings get more and more public attention (police killing detection).  За жал, немаше многу работа во литературата за решавање на овој проблем. Ранешната работа на ова поле (Кит етал., 2017) предложи далечна рамка за надзор базирана на Максимизацијата на очекувањата (ЕМ) за да се справи со многуте појавувања на имињата во документите. Сепак, ваквата рамка базирана на ЕМ не може да ги искористи целосните предности од моделите на длабоко учење, што бара употреба на рачно дизајнирани карактеристики за подобрување на резултатите на детекцијата. Во оваа работа претставуваме нов метод на длабоко учење за решавање на проблемот со признавањето на убиството на полицијата. Предложениот метод се потпира на хиерархичните ЛСТМ за моделирање на многуте реченици кои ги содржат имињата на личноста на интереси, и воведување надгледувани механизми на внимание базирани на семантичките листи на зборови и дрвјата на зависност за да ги зголеми важ Нашите експерименти ги демонстрираат бенефициите од предложениот модел и даваат најсовремена изведба за детективирање на убиствата на полицијата.', 'ms': 'Mencari nama orang yang dibunuh oleh polis telah menjadi semakin penting kerana penembakan polis mendapatkan semakin banyak perhatian awam (pengesan pembunuhan polis). Malangnya, tidak banyak kerja dalam literatur yang mengatasi masalah ini. Kerja awal dalam bidang ini (Keith etal., 2017) melamar kerangka pengawasan jauh berdasarkan Maksimumkan jangkaan (EM) untuk menangani penampilan berbilang nama dalam dokumen. Namun, kerangka berasaskan EM tidak boleh mengambil keuntungan penuh dari model belajar dalam, memerlukan penggunaan ciri-ciri direka tangan untuk meningkatkan prestasi pengesan. Dalam kerja ini, kami memperkenalkan kaedah belajar dalam novel untuk menyelesaikan masalah pembunuhan polis pengenalan. Kaedah yang diusulkan bergantung pada LSTM hierarkik untuk model kalimat berbilang yang mengandungi nama orang kepentingan, dan memperkenalkan mekanisme perhatian yang diawasi berdasarkan senarai perkataan semantik dan pokok dependensi untuk meningkatkan berat perkataan kontekstual yang penting. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan keuntungan modelnya dan memberikan prestasi terbaik untuk pengesan pembunuhan polis.', 'mn': 'Цэцгийн алдсан хүмүүсийн нэрийг олох нь цагдааны шүдэлтүүд илүү олон нийтийн анхаарлыг олох үед илүү чухал болж байна. Харамсалтай нь, уран зохиолд энэ асуудлын тухай олон ажил байхгүй. Энэ салбарын эхний ажил (Keith etal., 2017) нь баримтын нэр олон тохиолдлуудыг тодорхойлдох боломжтой Хэрэглэгдэх (EM) дээр суурилсан хол дагуулын хандлага санал болгосон. Гэхдээ эдгээр EM-д суурь суралцах загваруудын бүрэн ашиг ашиглаж чадахгүй, гар бүтээгдэхүүнийг ашиглах хэрэгтэй. Энэ ажлын тулд бид цагдааны алдаа хүлээн зөвшөөрөх асуудлыг шийдэх шинэ гүн гүнзгий суралцах арга замыг тайлбарлаж байна. Өөрчлөлтийн арга нь олон сонирхолтой хүмүүсийн нэр дүрслэх олон өгүүлбэрүүдийг загварчлахын тулд төлөвлөгөөтэй LSTMs-ээс хамаарна. Тэгээд хүмүүсийн анхаарлын төлөвлөгөөний механизмуудыг семantical үг жагсаалт болон хамааралтай мод нь чуха Бидний туршилтууд санал өгсөн загварын үр дагаварыг харуулж, цагдааны хохиролын нээлттэй улс төрийн урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'ml': 'പോലീസ് കൊല്ലപ്പെട്ടവരുടെ പേരുകള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. പോലീസ് വെടിവെടിവെക്കു നിര്\u200dഭാഗ്യവശാല്\u200d, ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ജോലി ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നില്ല. ഈ പ്രദേശത്തിലെ ആദ്യ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം (കീത്ത് തെല്ലാം, 2017) പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പേരുകളുടെ പല പേരുകളും രേഖകളില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു ദൂരെ നിരീക However, such EM-based framework cannot take full advantages of deep learning models, necessitating the use of handdesigned features to improve the detection performance.  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, പോലീസിനെ കൊല്ലുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നത്തിന് തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ആഴത്തെ പഠിക് പ്രൊദേശിച്ച രീതി നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രോദേശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്\u200dറെ ഉപകാരങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. പോലീസിന്\u200dറെ കൊലപാതകം കണ്ടു', 'mt': 'Is-sejba ta’ ismijiet ta’ nies maqtula mill-pulizija saret dejjem aktar importanti hekk kif il-qtil tal-pulizija jikseb aktar u aktar attenzjoni pubblika (detezzjoni tal-qtil tal-pulizija). Unfortunately, there has been not much work in the literature addressing this problem.  Il-ħidma bikrija f’dan il-qasam (Keith etal., 2017) ipproponiet qafas ta’ superviżjoni distanti bbażat fuq il-Massimizzazzjoni tal-Espetta (EM) biex jittratta d-dehra multipla tal-ismijiet fid-dokumenti. Madankollu, qafas ibbażat fuq l-EM bħal dan ma jistax jieħu vantaġġi sħaħ ta’ mudelli ta’ tagħlim profond, li jeħtieġu l-użu ta’ karatteristiċi ddisinjati bl-idejn biex itejbu l-prestazzjoni tal-individwazzjoni. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nippreżentaw metodu ġdid ta’ tagħlim profond biex issolvi l-problem a tar-rikonoxximent tal-qtil tal-pulizija. Il-metodu propost jiddependi fuq l-LSTMs ġerarkiċi biex jimmudellaw is-sentenzi multipli li fihom l-ismijiet tal-persuni tal-interessi, u jintroduċi mekkaniżmi ta’ attenzjoni sorveljati bbażati fuq listi semantiċi ta’ kliem u siġar ta’ dipendenza biex jiżnu l-kliem kuntestwali importanti. L-esperimenti tagħna juru l-benefiċċji tal-mudell propost u jagħtu l-prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata għas-sejba tal-qtil tal-pulizija.', 'sr': 'Pronaći imena ljudi koji su ubili policija postalo je sve važnije dok su policijski pucnjavi dobili sve više javne pažnje (detektiv ubijanja policije). Nažalost, u književnosti nije bilo puno posla u rješavanju ovog problema. Rani rad na ovom polju (Keith etal., 2017) predložio je daleki okvir nadzora baziran na Maksimalizaciji očekivanja (EM) da se suoči sa višestrukim pojavljivanjem imena u dokumentima. Međutim, takvi okvir na EM-u ne može iskoristiti pune prednosti dubokih modela učenja, što je potrebno upotrebu rukopisa dizajniranih karakteristika kako bi poboljšao učinkovitost otkrivanja. U ovom poslu predstavljamo novu metodu dubokog učenja kako bi rešili problem policije ubijanja priznanja. Predložena metoda se oslanja na hijerarhijske LSTMs-e da modeluje višestruke rečenice koje sadrže imena osoba interesa i uvede nadzorne pažnje mehanizme na temelju semantičkih listova riječi i drveća zavisnosti kako bi povećali važne kontekstske reči. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju koristi predloženog modela i pružaju državu umjetnosti za detekciju ubistva policije.', 'no': 'Finn namn på folk som er drept av politikk har blitt større viktig når politiske skjultingar får meir og meir offentlige oppmerksomhet (policiske dødspunkt). Dessverre har det ikkje vært mye arbeid i literaturen som handler dette problemet. Den tidlegare arbeidet i dette feltet (Keith etal., 2017) foreslåde eit ekstern overvåking-rammeverket basert på Forventingar Maksimalisering (EM) for å handtera fleire utsjånadar av namnet i dokument. Desse EM-baserte rammeverktøya kan imidlertid ikkje bruka fulle fordel av dype læringsmodeller, som treng bruk av handlagte funksjonar for å forbetra oppdagingsfunksjonen. I denne arbeiden presenterer vi ein roman dyp læringsmetode for å løyse problemet med å dømme gjenkjennelsen av politikk. Dette første metoden er avhengig av hierarkiske LSTMs til å modellere fleire setningar som inneheld personnamnet på interessar, og introdusere kontrollerte oppmerkingsmekanismar basert på semantiske ordlister og avhengighetstrøk for å styra dei viktige kontekstlege ord. Eksperimentane våre demonstrerer fordelene av den foreslåde modellen og gjer kunstendige utviklinga for policiske dødelingsoppdaging.', 'ro': 'Găsirea numelor persoanelor ucise de poliție a devenit din ce în ce mai importantă pe măsură ce împușcăturile poliției obțin din ce în ce mai multă atenție publică (detectarea uciderilor poliției). Din păcate, nu s-a lucrat prea mult în literatura de specialitate pentru a aborda această problemă. Lucrările timpurii din acest domeniu (Keith etal., 2017) au propus un cadru de supraveghere la distanță bazat pe Expectation Maximization (EM) pentru a aborda aparițiile multiple ale numelor în documente. Cu toate acestea, un astfel de cadru bazat pe EM nu poate profita pe deplin de modelele de învățare profundă, necesitând utilizarea de caracteristici proiectate manual pentru a îmbunătăți performanța de detecție. În această lucrare, prezentăm o nouă metodă de învățare profundă pentru a rezolva problema recunoașterii uciderilor poliției. Metoda propusă se bazează pe LSTMs ierarhice pentru a modela propozițiile multiple care conțin numele persoanelor interesate și pentru a introduce mecanisme de atenție supravegheate bazate pe liste de cuvinte semantice și arbori de dependență pentru a crește cuvintele contextuale importante. Experimentele noastre demonstrează beneficiile modelului propus și oferă performanțe de ultimă oră pentru detectarea uciderilor poliției.', 'pl': 'Znalezienie nazwisk osób zabitych przez policję staje się coraz ważniejsze, ponieważ strzelaniny policyjne zyskują coraz większą uwagę publiczną (policyjne wykrywanie zabójstw). Niestety w literaturze nie było zbyt wiele pracy nad tym problemem. Wczesne prace w tej dziedzinie (Keith etal., 2017) zaproponowały odległe ramy nadzoru oparte na maksymalizacji oczekiwań (EM), aby poradzić sobie z wielokrotnym pojawieniem się nazw w dokumentach. Jednak takie ramy oparte na EM nie mogą w pełni korzystać z modeli głębokiego uczenia, co wymaga użycia ręcznie zaprojektowanych funkcji w celu poprawy wydajności wykrywania. W niniejszej pracy przedstawiamy nowatorską metodę głębokiego uczenia, która pozwala rozwiązać problem rozpoznawania zabójstw policyjnych. Proponowana metoda opiera się na hierarchicznych LSTMach w celu modelowania wielu zdań zawierających nazwy osób zainteresowanych, a także wprowadzenia nadzorowanych mechanizmów uwagi opartych na semantycznych listach słów i drzewach zależności w celu podwyższenia ważnych słów kontekstowych. Nasze eksperymenty demonstrują korzyści proponowanego modelu i dają najnowocześniejszą wydajność wykrywania zabójstw policyjnych.', 'si': 'පොලිසියෙන් මැරුණ මිනිස්සුන්ගේ නම හොයාගන්න තරම් වැදගත් වෙනවා පොලිසියෙන් වෙඩි වෙඩි තියෙන්නේ පොලිස අවාසනාවට, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන ලේඛනයේ ගොඩක් වැඩක් නෑ. මේ ක්ෂේත්රයේ පළවෙනි වැඩ (Keith etal., 2017) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලිපින්තුවේ නම් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරදේශයක් සඳහා බලන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන නමුත්, එහෙම වෙනුවෙන් EM-ආධාරිත ප්\u200dරකාරයක් ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න බැරි වෙන්නේ නෑ, අත්පර්ණය විශේ මේ වැඩේ අපි පොලිසියාගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න පොලිසියාගේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පුළුවන් විස්තර කරනවා. ප්\u200dරශ්න විධාන විධානය විශේෂය LSTMs විශ්වාස කරනවා විශේෂයේ නම් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්න විධාන වචන වචන ලැයිස්තුවක් සහ විශේෂතා ව අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් මොඩල් එකේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒ වගේම පොලිසියා මරණයේ', 'so': "Magacyada qofka booliska la dilay waxaa si aad u muhiim ah, sababtoo ah ganacsiga boolisku aad iyo aad u sii dareemeysan karo daryeelka dadweynaha (booliska dilidda). Nasiib la’aanta, shaqo badan oo warqada ah looma baahna in dhibaatadan looga macaamiloodo. Shaqo hore ee duurkan (Keith etal., 2017) ayaa soo jeeday shirkad aad u fog oo ku saleysan Expectation Maximization (EM) inuu kala macaamiloodo muuqashada magacyada ee warqadaha lagu qoray. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qoraalkaas ee EM-ku saleysan ma qaadan karo noocyada waxbarashada ee mool dheer, si loo baahdo isticmaalka faa'iidada lagu qoray si uu u hagaajiyo sameynta aqoonsiga. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu keenaynaa qaab waxbarasho aad u dheer si aan u xallino dhibaatada aqoonsashada booliska. Midabka la soo jeeday wuxuu ku xiran yahay qoraalka qoraalka LSTMs ee hierarchical si uu u sameyno hadallada kala duduwan oo ku jira qofka magaca danaha, wuxuuna soo bandhigayaa meymisyo ilaalinaysan oo ku saleysan qoraalka hadalka semantika ah iyo geedaha ku xiran si ay u kor qaadaan erayada muhiimka ah ee soo socda. Imtixaankayada waxay muujiyaan faa'iidada modellka la soo jeeday, waxaana soo saaraa sameynta farshaxanta xaaladda farshaxanka ee baaritaanka gowrashada booliska.", 'sv': 'Att hitta namn på personer som dödats av polisen har blivit allt viktigare i takt med att polisskjutningar får mer och mer uppmärksamhet (polisdödande upptäckt). Tyvärr har det inte gjorts mycket arbete i litteraturen med att ta itu med detta problem. I det tidiga arbetet inom detta område (Keith etal., 2017) föreslogs ett fjärrövervakningsram baserat på Expectation Maximization (EM) för att hantera namnens mångfaldiga framträdanden i dokument. Ett sådant EM-baserat ramverk kan dock inte dra full nytta av djupinlärningsmodeller, vilket kräver användning av handdesignade funktioner för att förbättra detekteringsprestandan. I detta arbete presenterar vi en ny djupinlärningsmetod för att lösa problemet med polisdödande erkännande. Den föreslagna metoden bygger på hierarkiska LSTMs för att modellera de flera meningar som innehåller personnamnen på intressen, och introducera övervakade uppmärksamhetsmekanismer baserade på semantiska ordlistor och beroendeträd för att höja de viktiga kontextuella orden. Våra experiment demonstrerar fördelarna med den föreslagna modellen och ger den senaste prestandan för detektering av polisdödande.', 'ta': 'போலீஸ் கொலை செய்யப்பட்ட மக்களின் பெயர்கள் கண்டுபிடிக்கும் போலீஸ் சுட்டுகள் அதிகமாக முக்கியமாகி விட்டது போலீ துரதிர்ஷ்டவசமாக, இந்த பிரச்சனையை குறித்து இந்த எழுத்தில் அதிகமான வேலை இல்லை. இந்த புலத்தில் உள்ள ஆரம்ப வேலை (கீத் etal., 2017) ஆவணங்களில் பல பெயர்களின் பெயர்களை பார்க்க தூரத்தில் ஒரு கண்காணிப்பு சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறது. However, such EM- அடிப்படையிலான சட்டம் ஆழமான கற்ற மாதிரிகளின் முழுமையான பயன்பாடுகளை எடு இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ள முறையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் போலீஸ் கொலை கொலை பிரச்ச பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையான முறைமையில் உள்ள பல வார்த்தைகளை மாதிரிக்க முடியும் Our experiments demonstrate the benefits of the proposed model and yield the state-of-the-art performance for police killing detection.', 'ur': 'پولیس کے ذریعہ مارے ہوئے لوگوں کا نام تلاش کرنا زیادہ اہم ہو گیا ہے جب پولیس شلیٹ میں اضافہ اور زیادہ اضافہ ہوتا ہے بدبختی، اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ادبیات میں بہت زیادہ کار نہیں ہے۔ اس کھیل میں پہلے کام (Keith etal., 2017) نے ایک دور نظر فرمود پیش کیا تھا جو انتظار Maximization (EM) پر بنیاد رکھی تھی کہ دفتروں میں ناموں کی بہت سی ظاہر کرنے کے لئے۔ لیکن ایسی EM بنیادی فرمود کی عمیق تعلیم مدل کے کامل فائدہ نہیں پہنچا سکتی ہے، ہاتھ طراحی فرمود کے استعمال کی ضرورت ہے کہ آشنا کے کامیابی کو بہتر کرنے کے لئے۔ اس کام میں، ہم ایک نئی عمیق سیکھنے کا طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں پولیس کی پہچان جانے کے مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے۔ پیغمبر کی طریقہ اس طریقہ پر زیادہ مشکلات کی مدل کرتی ہے جو شخص کے نام ہیں اور سیمانٹیکل لکھ لیستوں پر بنیاد رکھتی ہیں اور اہل مشکلات کی باتوں پر زیادہ اضافہ کرتی ہیں۔ ہماری آزمائش پیشنهاد کی موڈل کے فائدے دکھاتی ہیں اور پولیس کے قتل جانے کے لئے موجود آزمائش کے لئے موجود رہی ہے.', 'uz': "Polish qo'llanmalarning nomini topish juda muhim edi, chunki polish shotuvchilari ko'proq va ko'proq public attention (polish kishini aniqlash). Afsuski, bu muammolarni boshqarish uchun hech narsa yo'q. Bu maydondagi birinchi ishni (Keith etal., 2017) hujjatdagi ko'pchilik nomlarini boshqarish uchun uzoq supervissiya freymini talab qiladi. Lekin, bu EM asosida yaratilgan freym o'rganish modellarini butunlay foydalanib boʻlmaydi, deb o'rganish imkoniyatini bajarish uchun qo'llanmalar foydalanishi kerak. Bu vazifanda biz polish qo'llanmalarni tasdiqlash muammolari haqida o'rganish usulini ko'rsamiz. The proposed method relies on hierarchical LSTMs to model the multiple sentences that contain the person names of interests, and introduce supervised attention mechanisms based on semantical word lists and dependency trees to upweight the important contextual words.  Bizning imtiyozlarimiz taʼminlovchi modelning foydalanishini ko'rsatadi va polish o'lchamini aniqlash holati holatini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Việc tìm ra tên của những người bị cảnh sát giết ngày càng quan trọng khi các vụ xả súng cảnh sát ngày càng nổi tiếng. Không may là trong văn chương không có nhiều việc để giải quyết vấn đề này. The early work in this field (Keith ethal, 2007) proposed a distant giám sát based on Expemation Maximation (EM) to handle the multiple appearance of the names in documents. Tuy nhiên, một cơ sở trường EM không thể có được những lợi thế của những mô hình học sâu sắc, cần phải sử dụng các tính năng thiết kế tay để nâng cao khả năng phát hiện. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi có một phương pháp học sâu mới để giải quyết vấn đề giết người của cảnh sát. Phương pháp đề nghị dựa trên các cử chỉ phân cấp hàm để mô hình các câu chữ đa dạng chứa tên riêng của các quyền lợi, và áp dụng các cơ quan chú ý giám sát dựa trên các từ ngữ và các cây độ phụ thuộc để nâng cấp các từ ngữ quan trọng. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi chứng minh lợi ích của mô hình đã đề nghị và mang lại hiệu quả hiện đại nhất cho việc khám phá giết người cảnh sát.', 'bg': 'Намирането на имена на убити от полицията хора става все по-важно, тъй като полицейските стрелби получават все повече обществено внимание (откриване на убийства от полицията). За съжаление в литературата няма много работа по този проблем. В ранната работа в тази област (Кийт ет., 2017) се предлага рамка за далечен надзор, базирана на Максимизация на Очакванията (ЕМ), за да се справи с многобройните появявания на имената в документи. Въпреки това, такава базирана на ЕМ рамка не може да се възползва изцяло от моделите на дълбоко обучение, което налага използването на ръчно проектирани функции за подобряване на ефективността на откриването. В тази работа представяме нов метод за дълбоко обучение за решаване на проблема с разпознаването на убийства от полицията. Предложеният метод разчита на йерархични ЛТМ, за да моделира множеството изречения, съдържащи имената на лица на интереси, и да въведе механизми за надзорно внимание, базирани на семантични списъци с думи и дървета за зависимост, за да надвиши важните контекстни думи. Нашите експерименти демонстрират ползите от предлагания модел и дават най-съвременни резултати за откриване на убийства в полицията.', 'da': 'At finde navne på mennesker, der er dræbt af politiet, er blevet stadig vigtigere, efterhånden som politiskyderier får mere og mere offentlig opmærksomhed (detektering af politidrab). Desværre har der ikke været meget arbejde i litteraturen om dette problem. Det tidlige arbejde på dette område (Keith etal., 2017) foreslog en fjerntilsynsramme baseret på Expectation Maximization (EM) for at håndtere de mange fremtrædende navne i dokumenter. Sådanne EM-baserede rammer kan dog ikke drage fulde fordele af deep learning modeller, hvilket kræver brug af hånddesignede funktioner til at forbedre detektionsydeevnen. I dette arbejde præsenterer vi en ny deep learning metode til at løse problemet med politidrabsanerkendelse. Den foreslåede metode bygger på hierarkiske LSTMs til at modellere de flere sætninger, der indeholder personnavne på interesser, og indføre overvågede opmærksomhedsmekanismer baseret på semantiske ordlister og afhængighedstræer for at opveje de vigtige kontekstuelle ord. Vores eksperimenter demonstrerer fordelene ved den foreslåede model og giver den state-of-the-art præstation til detektering af politidrab.', 'nl': 'Het vinden van namen van door de politie gedoode mensen wordt steeds belangrijker naarmate politieschoten steeds meer publieke aandacht krijgen (detectie van politiemoorden). Helaas is er in de literatuur niet veel werk geweest om dit probleem aan te pakken. Het vroege werk op dit gebied (Keith etal., 2017) stelde een extern supervisie kader voor gebaseerd op Expectation Maximization (EM) om te gaan met de veelvuldige verschijning van namen in documenten. Een dergelijk EM-gebaseerd framework kan echter niet volledig profiteren van deep learning modellen, waardoor het gebruik van handmatig ontworpen functies nodig is om de detectieprestaties te verbeteren. In dit werk presenteren we een nieuwe deep learning methode om het probleem van politie moordherkenning op te lossen. De voorgestelde methode baseert zich op hiërarchische LSTMs om de meerdere zinnen te modelleren die de namen van personen bevatten, en begeleide aandachtsmechanismen te introduceren gebaseerd op semantische woordenlijsten en afhankelijkheidsbomen om de belangrijke contextuele woorden op te heffen. Onze experimenten tonen de voordelen van het voorgestelde model aan en leveren de state-of-the-art prestaties op voor detectie van moorden door politie.', 'de': 'Das Auffinden von Namen von Menschen, die von der Polizei getötet wurden, gewinnt zunehmend an Bedeutung, da Polizeieinschießungen immer mehr öffentliche Aufmerksamkeit erhalten (policy killing detection). Leider gibt es in der Literatur nicht viel Arbeit zu diesem Problem. Die frühen Arbeiten in diesem Bereich (Keith etal., 2017) schlugen einen Fernüberwachungsrahmen vor, der auf der Erwartungsmaximierung (EM) basiert, um die mehrfachen Erscheinungen der Namen in Dokumenten zu behandeln. Ein solches EM-basiertes Framework kann jedoch nicht die vollen Vorteile von Deep Learning-Modellen ausnutzen und erfordert die Verwendung von handgefertigten Funktionen, um die Erkennungsleistung zu verbessern. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir eine neuartige Deep Learning Methode vor, um das Problem der Erkennung von Polizisten zu lösen. Die vorgeschlagene Methode stützt sich auf hierarchische LSTMs, um die multiplen Sätze zu modellieren, die die Personennamen der Interessen enthalten, und führt überwachte Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismen ein, die auf semantischen Wortlisten und Abhängigkeitsbäumen basieren, um die wichtigen kontextuellen Wörter aufzuheben. Unsere Experimente demonstrieren die Vorteile des vorgeschlagenen Modells und liefern die State-of-the-Art-Leistung für die Detektion von Polizisten Tötungen.', 'hr': 'Pronaći imena ljudi ubijenih od strane policije postalo je sve važnije dok su policijski pucnjevi dobili sve više javne pažnje (otkrivanje ubijanja policije). Nažalost, u književnosti nije bilo puno posla u rješavanju ovog problema. Rani rad na ovom polju (Keith etal., 2017) predložio je udaljeni okvir nadzora na temelju maksimalizacije očekivanja (EM) kako bi se suočio sa višestrukim pojavljivanjem imena u dokumentima. Međutim, takvi okvir na EM-u ne može iskoristiti pune koristi dubokih modela učenja, što je potrebno upotrebu rukovnih dizajniranih karakteristika kako bi poboljšao učinkovitost otkrivanja. U ovom poslu predstavljamo novu metodu dubokog učenja kako bi riješili problem policije ubijanja priznanja. Predložena metoda se oslanja na hijerarhijske LSTMs-e kako bi modelili višestruke rečenice koje sadrže imena osoba interesa i uvodili nadzorne mehanizme pažnje na temelju semantičkih popisa riječi i drveća zavisnosti kako bi povećali važne contextualne riječi. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju koristi predloženog modela i pružaju državu umjetnosti za otkrivanje ubistva policije.', 'id': 'Mencari nama orang yang dibunuh oleh polisi telah menjadi semakin penting karena penembakan polisi mendapatkan semakin banyak perhatian publik (deteksi pembunuhan polisi). Sayangnya, tidak banyak pekerjaan dalam literatur yang mengatasi masalah ini. Pekerjaan awal di bidang ini (Keith etal., 2017) mengusulkan rangka pengawasan jauh berdasarkan Maximisasi Pengharapan (EM) untuk menangani penampilan berbilang nama dalam dokumen. Namun, kerangka yang berdasarkan EM tidak dapat mengambil keuntungan penuh dari model belajar dalam, membutuhkan penggunaan karakteristik desain tangan untuk meningkatkan prestasi deteksi. In this work, we present a novel deep learning method to solve the problem of police killing recognition.  Metode yang diusulkan bergantung pada LSTM hierarkis untuk model kalimat berbilang yang mengandung nama orang yang berminat, dan memperkenalkan mekanisme perhatian yang diawasi berdasarkan daftar kata semantis dan pohon dependensi untuk meningkatkan kalimat kontekstual yang penting. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan keuntungan dari model yang diusulkan dan memberikan prestasi terbaik untuk deteksi pembunuhan polisi.', 'ko': '경찰의 총격 사건이 점점 더 많은 대중의 관심을 받게 되면서 경찰에 살해된 사람의 이름을 찾는 것이 점점 중요해지고 있다.불행히도 문헌에는 이 문제를 해결하기 위한 일이 많지 않다.이 분야의 초기 작업(Keith 등·2017년)은 문서의 명칭이 여러 차례 등장하는 것을 처리하기 위해 기대 최대화(EM)에 기반한 원격 감독 틀을 제시했다.그러나 이런 EM 기반 프레임워크는 딥러닝 모델을 충분히 활용하지 못하기 때문에 수동으로 디자인한 기능을 사용하여 검측 성능을 향상시켜야 한다.이 업무에서 우리는 새로운 심도 있는 학습 방법을 제시하여 경찰의 살인 식별 문제를 해결하였다.이 방법은 관심 있는 사람의 이름을 포함하는 여러 문장을 모델링하는 차원 LSTM을 바탕으로 하고 의미 어휘표와 트리에 의존하는 감독 주의 메커니즘을 도입하여 중요한 상하문어의 중요성을 높인다.우리의 실험은 이 모델의 장점을 증명했고 경찰의 살인 검측에 가장 선진적인 성능을 제공했다.', 'sw': 'Kupata majina ya watu waliouawa na polisi yamekuwa muhimu zaidi kwani risasi za polisi zinazidi kuongezeka zaidi na zaidi za umma (kutambua mauaji ya polisi). Kwa bahati mbaya, hakuna kazi nyingi katika fasihi kuhusiana na tatizo hili. Kazi ya mwanzo katika uwanja huu (Keith etal, 2017) ilipendekeza mfumo wa ufuatiliaji wa mbali kwa kutumia Matumaini Kukuza (EM) ili kupambana na matukio mengi ya majina katika nyaraka. Hata hivyo, mfumo wa aina hiyo wa EM hauwezi kutumia faida kamili za mifano ya kujifunza za ndani, unahitaji matumizi ya vipengele vilivyopangwa kwa mkono ili kuboresha ufanisi wa uchunguzi. In this work, we present a novel deep learning method to solve the problem of police killing recognition.  Utawala huu unapendekezwa unategemea LSTMs wa kike ili kuonyesha sentensi mbalimbali zinazohusu majina ya mtu wa maslahi, na kutengeneza mfumo wa ufuatiliaji unaoangaliwa kwa kutumia orodha ya maneno ya kimapenzi na miti ya kutegemea kuvumilia maneno muhimu yanayotokea. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha faida ya muundo huu wa pendekezo na kusababisha utendaji wa hali ya sanaa kwa ajili ya kutambua mauaji ya polisi.', 'fa': 'در حالی که شلیک\u200cهای پلیس بیشتر و بیشتر توجه عمومی می\u200cشود (کشتن کشتن پلیس) نام\u200cهای مردم که توسط پلیس کشته شده\u200cاند، بیشتر مهم می\u200cشوند. متاسفانه، کار زیادی در ادبیات در مورد این مشکل وجود ندارد. اولین کار در این زمینه (Keith etal., 2017) یک چهارچوب نظارت دور بر اساس انتظار Maximization (EM) پیشنهاد داد تا با چندین نمایش نام در سند برخورد کند. ولی این چهارچوب بر اساس EM نمی تواند از مدل یادگیری عمیق کامل استفاده کند، که نیازمند استفاده از ویژه های دستی طراحی شده تا عملکرد شناسایی را بهتر کند. در این کار، ما یک روش یادگیری عمیق روانی را برای حل مشکل کشتن شناسایی پلیس پیشنهاد می کنیم. این روش پیشنهاد بر اساس LSTMs متحدی بستگی دارد تا کلمه\u200cهای متعدد را مدل کند که نام\u200cهای شخص سودمندی را دارند، و مکانیسم\u200cهای توجه نظارت را بر اساس لیست\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای متحدی و درختان بستگی را معرفی کند تا کلمه\u200cهای متحدی مهم را بالا ببرند آزمايشات ما سودهايي از مدل پيشنهاد رو نشون ميدن و اجراي ايالت هنري رو براي کشتن کشتن پليس پيشنهاد ميدن', 'tr': 'Polisiýa tarapyndan öldürilen adamlaryň adlaryny tapmak Polisiýanyň atygyndan has hem üns berip barýandy (polisiýa öldürmegi tanyşy) hem has möhüm bolup başlady. Gynansakda, edebiýatda bu mesele çözmekde kän iş ýok. Bu sahyda ilkinji gezek Ýöne, EM tabanly çerçevesi derin öwrenmek modellerinin tam bir faydaly ulanamıyor. Bu şekilde el tasarlanmış özellikleri tanımlamak üçin janlaşma eserlerini geliştirmek üçin gerekli. Bu işde polisiýanyň tanyşyny öldürmek üçin ýüzüniň çözmesini çözmek üçin bir roman alçak öwrenmek yöntemi görkeýäris. Önerlenen yöntem hem iýerarhiýa LSTMsine gyzyklanýar sözleriň içine gyzyklanýan adamlaryň adyny görkezmek üçin daşary edýär we semantik söz listlerine daşary we möhüm senediň sözlerini azaltmak üçin gözetli üns meýdançalaryny daşary edýär. Biziň deneylerimiz teklip eden nusganyň faydalyny görkezýär we polisiýa öldürmek detectasy üçin durumumyzyň üstünligini berýär.', 'sq': 'Gjetja e emrave të njerëzve të vrarë nga policia është bërë gjithnjë e më e rëndësishme pasi gjuajtjet policore marrin gjithnjë e më shumë vëmendje publike (zbulimi i vrasjes policore). Fatkeqësisht, nuk ka pasur shumë punë në letërsinë që trajtojnë këtë problem. Puna e parë në këtë fushë (Keith etal., 2017) propozoi një kuadër mbikqyrjeje të largët bazuar në Maksimizimin e Pritjes (EM) për të trajtuar shfaqjen e shumëfishtë të emrave në dokumente. Megjithatë, një kuadër i tillë bazuar në EM nuk mund të marrë avantazhe të plota të modeleve të mësimit të thellë, duke i nevojshëm përdorimi i karakteristikave të dizajnuara me dorë për të përmirësuar shfaqjen e zbulimit. In this work, we present a novel deep learning method to solve the problem of police killing recognition.  Metoda e propozuar mbështetet në LSTMs hierarkike për të modeluar fjalët e shumta që përmbajnë emrat e personit të interesave dhe për të futur mekanizma të vëmendjes së mbikqyrur bazuar në listat semantike të fjalëve dhe pemët e varësisë për të përmirësuar fjalët kontekstuale të rëndësishme. Eksperimentet tona demonstrojnë përfitimet e modelit të propozuar dhe japin shfaqjen më të lartë për zbulimin e vrasjes policore.', 'af': "Op die vinding van die name van mense wat deur polisie gedood is, word nog belangriker as polisiesskottelings meer en meer openbare aandag kry (polisie doodslag opkenning). Ongelukkig is daar nie baie werk in die literateer om hierdie probleem te raak nie. Die vroeëre werk in hierdie veld (Keith etal., 2017) het 'n afgeleë supervisie raamwerk voorgestel wat op verwagting Maksimalisering (EM) gebaseer is om met die veelvuldige verskynings van die name in dokumente te behandel. Maar sodanige EM-gebaseerde raamwerk kan nie volle voordeel van diep leer modele neem nie, wat die gebruik van handontwerp funksies nodig om die opdekking-prestasie te verbeter nie. In hierdie werk is ons 'n roman diep leer metode voorsien om die probleem van polisie om herkening te los. Die voorgestelde metode verlig op hierarchiese LSTMs om die veelvuldige setings te model wat die persoonnaams van interesse bevat, en introduseer ondersoekte aandag mekanisme gebaseer op semantiese woorde lyste en afhanklikheidsbome om die belangrike konteksual woorde te groei. Ons eksperimente vertoon die voordekende van die voorgestelde model en gee die staat van die kunstens-prestasie vir polisie doodskap.", 'am': 'በፖሊስ የሞቱት ሰዎች ስሞች በመግኘት የፖሊስ ወጥመድ መጋረጃዎች የበዛ እና የበለጠ የህዝብ ትኩረት ማግኘት (የፖሊስ መግደል አግኝቷል) ሆኖአል፡፡ በተከፋች፣ ይህ ጉዳይ በመጠቀም በመጽሐፍ ብዙ ሥራ አልደረሰም፡፡ የዚህ መጀመሪያ ሥራ (Keith etal., 2017) በሰነድ ሰነድ ውስጥ ብዙ ስሞች በመቀበል የተደረገውን የራቅ የጉዳይ ክፍል አቀረበ፡፡ ነገር ግን እንደዚህ የኢሜይል መሠረት የጥልቅ ትምህርት ሞዴላዎችን ለመጠቀም አይችልም፣ ማስታወቂያውን ለማሻል እጆቹ የተዘጋጀውን ምርጫዎች ለመጠቀም ያስፈልጋል፡፡ In this work, we present a novel deep learning method to solve the problem of police killing recognition.  የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የፍላጎቶችን ስም የሚያስፈልገውን የአየር ቃላት እና የተጠቃሚ ቃላት ዝርዝሮች በሚያሳድጉ እና የተጠቃሚ ቃላትን በመጠቀም የሚታመሙ ዛፎችን በመጠቀም የሚታመሙ የሥርዓት ሥርዓቶች በማስተካከል ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የተዘጋጀውን የሞዴል ጥቅማችን እና የፖሊስ ግዳት መግደል የሀገርን የዓላማ ድረ ገጽ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Ոստիկանության կողմից սպանված մարդկանց անուններ գտնելը դարձավ ավելի կարևոր, քանի որ ոստիկանության սպանությունները ավելի ու ավելի շատ հանրային ուշադրություն են դարձնում (ոստիկանության սպանության հայտնաբերում): Դժբախտաբար, գրականության մեջ շատ աշխատանք չկա այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար: Այս ոլորտում սկզբնական աշխատանքները (Քիթ Էտալ., 2017) առաջարկեցին հեռավոր վերահսկողական կառուցվածք, որը հիմնված է Արևակայելի Մաքսիմիզացիայի (ԷՄ) վրա, որպեսզի վերաբերվեն փաստաթղթերում գտնվո Այնուամենայնիվ, այսպիսի էլեկտրոնային համակարգով հիմնված շրջանակը չի կարող օգտագործել խորը ուսումնասիրության մոդելների ամբողջ առավելությունները, որոնք անհրաժեշտ են ձեռքով կազմված հատկությունների օգտագործման համար Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր խորը սովորելու մեթոդ ոստիկանության սպանության ճանաչման խնդիրը լուծելու համար: Առաջարկված մեթոդը հիմնված է հիերարխիկ LSMT-ների վրա, որպեսզի մոդելավորի բազմաթիվ նախադասությունները, որոնք պարունակում են մարդկանց հետաքրքրությունների անունները, և ներդրի հետաքրքրված ուշադրության մեխանիզմներ, որոնք հիմնված են սեմանտիկ բառերի ցուցակնե Our experiments demonstrate the benefits of the proposed model and yield the state-of-the-art performance for police killing detection.', 'bn': 'পুলিশের নাম খুন করা মানুষের নাম খুঁজে বের করে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ হয়ে গেছে যখন পুলিশের গুলি আরো জনগণের মনোযোগ পায় (পুলি দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, সাহিত্যের সাহিত্যে এই সমস্যা সম্পর্কে বেশী কাজ করা হয়নি। এই ক্ষেত্রের প্রথম কাজ (কিথেটাল ২০১৭) একটি দূরবর্তী পর্যবেক্ষণ কার্যক্রমের প্রস্তাব করেছে যাতে নথিপত্রে নামের বেশ কয়েকটি প্রকাশ করার জন্য। However, such EM-based framework cannot take full advantages of deep learning models, necessitating the use of handdesigned features to improve the detection performance.  এই কাজে আমরা একটি গভীর শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করছি পুলিশের খুনের সমস্যা সমাধানের জন্য। এই প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি হিয়ারার্কিল এলস্টিমিসের উপর নির্ভর করে যে ব্যক্তির কাছে স্বার্থের নাম রয়েছে তাদের মডেল করার জন্য বিভিন্ন বাক্যের মাধ্যমে নির্ভর করে এবং সে আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো প্রস্তাবিত মডেলের সুবিধা প্রদর্শন করে পুলিশের খুনের জন্য রাষ্ট্রের শিল্পের প্রদর্শন করে।', 'ca': "Trobar noms de persones mortes per la policia s'ha tornat cada cop més important a mesura que els tiroteigs policials reben cada cop més atenció pública (detecció de morts policials). Malauradament, no hi ha hagut gaire feina a la literatura tractant aquest problema. La primera feina en aquest camp (Keith etal., 2017) va proposar un marc de supervisió remot basat en la Maximització de l'Espectació (EM) per tractar amb les múltiples aparicions dels noms en els documents. No obstant això, aquest marc basat en EM no pot aprofitar plens avantatges dels models d'aprenentatge profund, necessitant l'ús de característiques dissenyades a mà per millorar el rendiment de la detecció. En aquesta feina, presentem un nou mètode d'aprenentatge profund per resoldre el problem a del reconeixement de la policia. El mètode proposat es basa en LSTMs jeràrquics per modelar les múltiples frases que contenen els noms d'interessos de la persona, i introduir mecanismes d'atenció supervisades basats en llistes de paraules semàntiques i arbres de dependencia per superar les paraules contextuals importants. Els nostres experiments demostren els beneficis del model proposat i donen l'actuació més avançada per la detecció de morts policials.", 'az': "Polisdən öldürülmüş insanların adlarını tapmaq polis atışları daha çox və daha çox paylaşır (polis öldürülmüş təşkil edilir). Necə olaraq, bu problemi çəkmək üçün kitabda çox iş yoxdur. Bu sahədə ilk işi (Keith etal., 2017) təmin etdi ki, təsdiqlənmək Maksimalizasyonu (EM) vasitələrində çoxlu adların görünüşünü çəkmək üçün uzaq bir gözləmə quruluşu. Ancaq, bu EM-dən qurulmuş frameworklər dərin öyrənmə modellərinin tamamilə faydalarını verə bilməz, əl dizaynlı fəaliyyətlərin istifadəsini keşfetmək üçün istifadə edilməsi lazımdır. Bu işdə, polis ölümünün problemini çəkmək üçün yeni dərin öyrənmə yolunu göstəririk. Bu təbliğ metodu hiyerarşik LSTMs'lərə təvəkkül edir ki, insanların mənfəətlərinin adlarını daxil edən çoxlu cümlələr modelləyir və semantik söz listelərinə və təvəkküllük ağaclarına möhkəm müxtəlif sözləri yüksəltmək üçün gözləyirli məlumatlar təyin edir. Bizim təcrübələrimiz modelinin faydalarını göstərir və polisin öldürülməsi haqqında təcrübə göstərir.", 'cs': 'Hledání jmen lidí zabitých policií se stává stále důležitějším, protože policejní střílení získává stále větší pozornost veřejnosti (detekce policejních vražd). Bohužel v literatuře nebylo mnoho práce řešení tohoto problému. V rané práci v této oblasti (Keith etal., 2017) byl navržen rámec vzdáleného dohledu založený na maximalizaci očekávání (EM), který by se zabýval mnohočetným výskytem jmen v dokumentech. Tento rámec založený na EM však nemůže plně využít modelů hlubokého učení, což vyžaduje použití ručně navržených funkcí ke zlepšení detekčního výkonu. V této práci představujeme novou metodu hlubokého učení k řešení problému rozpoznávání policejních vražd. Navržená metoda využívá hierarchických LSTMů k modelování více vět obsahujících jména osob, které mají zájem, a zavádí kontrolované mechanismy pozornosti založené na sémantických seznamech slov a stromech závislostí, aby zvýšila významná kontextová slova. Naše experimenty demonstrují výhody navrženého modelu a přinášejí nejmodernější výkon pro detekci policejních vražd.', 'bs': 'Pronađivanje imena ljudi koje su ubili policija postalo je sve važnije dok su policijska pucnjava dobila sve više javne pažnje (otkrivanje ubijanja policije). Nažalost, u književnosti nije bilo puno posla u rješavanju ovog problema. Rani rad na ovom polju (Keith etal., 2017) predložio je daleki okvir nadzora baziran na Maksimalizaciji očekivanja (EM) kako bi se suočio sa višestrukim pojavljivanjem imena u dokumentima. Međutim, takvi okvir na EM-u ne može iskoristiti pune prednosti dubokih modela učenja, što je potrebno iskoristiti rukopisane funkcije kako bi poboljšao učinkovitost otkrivanja. U ovom poslu predstavljamo novu metodu dubokog učenja kako bi riješili problem policije ubijanja priznanja. Predložena metoda se oslanja na hijerarhijske LSTMs-e da modeluje višestruke rečenice koje sadrže imena osoba interesa i uvede nadzorne mehanizme pažnje na temelju semantičkih listova riječi i drveća zavisnosti kako bi povećala važne kontekstske riječi. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju koristi predloženog modela i pružaju državu umjetnosti za otkrivanje ubistva policije.', 'fi': 'Poliisin tappamien henkilöiden nimien löytäminen on tullut yhä tärkeämmäksi, kun poliisin ampuminen saa yhä enemmän yleisön huomiota (poliisin tappamien havaitseminen). Valitettavasti tätä ongelmaa ei ole juurikaan tutkittu kirjallisuudessa. Alan varhaisessa työssä (Keith etal., 2017) ehdotettiin Expectation Maximization (EM) pohjautuvaa etävalvontakehystä, jolla käsiteltäisiin nimien moninaisia esiintymisiä asiakirjoissa. Tällaiset EM-pohjaiset puitteet eivät kuitenkaan voi hyödyntää syväoppimismalleja täysimääräisesti, mikä edellyttää käsin suunniteltujen ominaisuuksien käyttöä tunnistustehokkuuden parantamiseksi. Tässä työssä esitellään uusi syväoppimismenetelmä poliisin tappamisen tunnistamisen ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Ehdotettu menetelmä perustuu hierarkkisiin LSTMs-menetelmiin mallintaakseen useita lauseita, jotka sisältävät kiinnostuksen kohteiden henkilöiden nimet, sekä ottaakseen käyttöön semanttisiin sanalistoihin ja riippuvuuspuutiin perustuvia valvottuja huomiomekanismeja tärkeiden asiayhteydellisten sanojen painottamiseksi. Kokeemme osoittavat ehdotetun mallin edut ja tuottavat huippuluokan suorituskyvyn poliisin tappojen havaitsemisessa.', 'et': 'Politsei poolt tapetud inimeste nimede leidmine on muutunud üha olulisemaks, sest politsei tulistamised saavad üha enam avalikku tähelepanu (politsei tapmise avastamine). Kahjuks ei ole kirjanduses selle probleemi käsitlemiseks palju tööd tehtud. Varases töös selles valdkonnas (Keith etal., 2017) pakuti välja kauge järelevalveraamistik, mis põhineb ootuste maksimeerimisel (EM), et käsitleda nimede mitmekordset ilmumist dokumentides. Ent selline elektromagnetiline raamistik ei saa sügavõppe mudelitest täielikult kasu saada, mistõttu on tuvastamise jõudluse parandamiseks vaja käsitsi projekteeritud funktsioone. Käesolevas töös tutvustame uut sügavõppe meetodit politsei tapmise tuvastamise probleemi lahendamiseks. Kavandatud meetod tugineb hierarhilistele LSTMdele, et modelleerida mitmeid lauseid, mis sisaldavad huvide inimeste nimesid, ning võtta kasutusele semantilistel sõnaloenditel ja sõltuvuspuudel põhinevad järelevalvemehhanismid oluliste kontekstisõnade kaalumiseks. Meie katsed näitavad väljapakutud mudeli eeliseid ja annavad kaasaegse jõudluse politseitapmiste avastamiseks.', 'he': 'מציאת שמות של אנשים שנהרגו על ידי המשטרה הפכה חשובה יותר ויותר כשירי משטרה מקבלים יותר ויותר תשומת לב ציבורית (גילוי רצח משטרה). למרבה הצער, לא היה הרבה עבודה בספרות מתמודדת עם הבעיה הזאת. העבודה המוקדמת בשטח הזה (Keith etal., 2017) הציעה מסגרת פיקוח רחוקה מבוססת על מקסימיזציה ציפית (EM) כדי להתמודד עם הופעות רבות של השמות במסמכים. עם זאת, המסגרת המבוססת EM כזו לא יכולה לקחת יתרונות מלאות של דוגמני למידה עמוקה, שדורשת השימוש של תכונות מעצבים יד כדי לשפר את ביצועי הבדיקה. בעבודה הזו, אנחנו מציגים שיטת לימוד עמוקה רומנית לפתור את הבעיה של זיהוי רצח המשטרה. השיטה המוצעת תלויה על LSTMs היררכיים כדי לדוגמא את המשפטים המספרים שמכילים את שמות האדם של אינטרסים, ולהציג מכונות תשומת לב מבוססים על רשימות מילים סמנטיות ועצי תלויות כדי לשקול את המילים הקונטקטיות החשובות. הניסויים שלנו מראים את היתרונות של המודל המוצע והוציאו את ההופעה המאודמנית לגילוי רצח המשטרה.', 'ha': "Fanjini sunan mutane da aka kashe su na Police ya yi ƙara muhimu kwanan da firgita na Police za'a ƙara sauti da sauti da jama'a (wanan kashe Police). Unfortunately, there has been not much work in the literature addressing this problem.  Fara farkon aikin wannan field (Keith etal., 2017) ya fara wani firam mai nĩsa a kan ƙayyade Expectation Maximization (EM) dõmin ya yi aiki da wasu sunayen sunayen cikin takardar. A lokacin da, firam ɗin EM-based ba za'a iya amfani da cikakken amfani da misãlai masu soma masu ƙari ba, kuma ana buƙata yin amfani da misãlai na hannayen da aka ƙayyade dõmin ya kyautata performance. Daga wannan aikin, munã gabatar da wani hanyoyi mai karãtun da aka sani wajen su sola matsayin mutane na Police. @ info: whatsthis Kayan jarrabõnmu sun nuna amfani da misalin da aka buƙata, kuma ya sami muhimmin-halin-sanawa wa kashẽwa na Police.", 'sk': 'Iskanje imen ljudi, ki jih je ubila policija, postaja vse pomembnejše, saj so policijski streljanji vedno bolj pozorni javnosti (odkrivanje umorov policije). Žal v literaturi ni bilo veliko dela, ki bi obravnavala ta problem. V zgodnjem delu na tem področju (Keith etal., 2017) je predlagal daljni nadzorni okvir, ki temelji na Maximizaciji pričakovanj (EM), za obravnavanje večkratnih pojavov imen v dokumentih. Vendar takšen okvir, ki temelji na elektromagnetnem elektromagnetnem sistemu, ne more v celoti izkoristiti prednosti modelov globokega učenja, zato je potrebna uporaba ročno zasnovanih funkcij za izboljšanje učinkovitosti zaznavanja. V tem delu predstavljamo novo metodo globokega učenja za reševanje problema prepoznavanja umorov policije. Predlagana metoda temelji na hierarhičnih LSTMs za modeliranje večkratnih stavkov, ki vsebujejo imena oseb interesov, in uvedbo mehanizmov nadzorovane pozornosti, ki temeljijo na semantičnih seznamih besed in drevesih odvisnosti, da bi nadgradili pomembne kontekstualne besede. Naši poskusi dokazujejo koristi predlaganega modela in zagotavljajo najsodobnejšo zmogljivost pri odkrivanju umorov policije.', 'jv': 'Fingat anake sing nganggep wong liya sing mesthi batayan ning pulis, isih jenis neng as êpakan bakal terus nggawe barang pulis ngono uga sing luwih apik batasané perusahaan (dolang-dolang poliis). Ngjalaké-nespa, ora ono vewé nggawé luwih nèng basa sing mengko perusahaan iki. Awak dhéwé éntuk ing parang iki Nanging, kuwi diangkat-diangkat EM sing ora bisa diangkat liyane kabeh nguasai model sing apik tur nguasai, kang ngerasai perusahaan manut kanggo ngubah bisa kebutaan efekat. Nang lan iki, kita mengko nganggep kuwi nyumbang kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngilangno sak cara nggawe gerakan kanggo kowé kuwi mau ning acara sing nguasakno. Perintah sing dipunanggunian kuwi kalulukno ning kelas telu nggawe jadasar tentang kanggo nguasai winih sing dumadhi winih dhéwé, lan nggawe ngubah manungsa perbudhakan langkung sampek kang dipunangé awak dhéwé, lan akeh iso nggawe persilangan kapungot sistem sing apik dhéwé, lan akeh nyong langkung weruh bantuan Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntukno nggawe bener tentang karo model sing pawaran karo perusahaan langkung arah dumadhi kuwi mau.', 'bo': 'ཉེན་རྟོག་གྱིས་མིང་བཙུགས་པ་དང་། མི་མང་གི་མིང་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་མིང་མི་མང་གི་བརྡ་སྟོན་རྐྱེན་དུ་གཏོང་གཏོང་དང་། ལས་ཀར་ངལ་ཐུབ་པ། གཞུང་རྩལ་གྱི་ནང་དོན་དག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་ལ་བློ་གཏོང་བ་མང་པོ་མེད་པ་རེད། སྒེའུ་ཁུང་འདིའི་ནང་གི་སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་ལྟ་བ་ཞིག་དག་གིས་ཡིག་ཆའི་མིང་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་རྣམས་དང་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་རྒྱུ་དངོས However, such EM-based framework cannot take full advantages of deep learning models, necessitating the use of handdesigned features to improve the detection performance. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གནད་དོན་ཉེན་ཁ་ཡོད་པ་དེ་གྲ་ས The proposed method relies on hierarchical LSTMs to model the multiple sentences that contain the person names of interests, and introduce supervised attention mechanisms based on semantical word lists and dependency trees to upweight the important contextual words. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས་གྱི་ལས་འཚོ་བ་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Open Information Extraction from Conjunctive Sentences', 'ar': 'افتح استخراج المعلومات من الجمل المترابطة', 'pt': 'Extração de informações abertas de sentenças conjuntivas', 'es': 'Extracción abierta de información de oraciones conjuntivas', 'fr': "Extraction d'informations ouvertes à partir de phrases conjonctives", 'ja': '結合文からのオープン情報抽出', 'hi': 'Conjunctive वाक्यों से खुली जानकारी निष्कर्षण', 'zh': '从连词句取开信息', 'ru': 'Открытое извлечение информации из конъюнктивных предложений', 'ga': 'Sliocht Faisnéise Oscailte ó Phianbhreitheanna Comhchuingeacha', 'ka': 'ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის გახსნა', 'hu': 'Nyílt információk kivonása együttes ítéletekből', 'el': 'Ανοικτή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών από συνεκτικές προτάσεις', 'lt': 'Atviros informacijos ekstrahavimas iš jungtinių sakinių', 'it': 'Estrazione di informazioni aperte dalle frasi congiunte', 'ml': 'സജ്ജീവമായ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തുറക്കുക', 'kk': 'Қосымша сөздерден мәліметті тарқату', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл хамтын үгийг нээх', 'no': 'Opna utpakking av informasjon frå konjunktive teikn', 'pl': 'Otwarta ekstrakcja informacji ze zdań konjunkcyjnych', 'ro': 'Extragerea informațiilor deschise din sentințele conjunctive', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa minn Sentenzi Konġunti', 'sr': 'Otvori izvlačenje informacija iz konjunktivnih rečenica', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ වාර්තාවෙන් තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය කරන්න', 'so': 'Wixii macluumaad la xiriira daryeelka', 'sv': 'Extraktion av öppen information från konjunktiva meningar', 'mk': 'Отвори извлекување на информации од конјуктивните реченици', 'ms': 'Buka Ekstraksi Maklumat dari Hukuman Konjunktif', 'ta': 'செயல்படுத்தும் வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து தகவல் வெளியீட்டை திற', 'ur': 'Conjunctive Sentences', 'uz': 'Kontact uchun maĘĽlumotni ajratish', 'vi': 'Mở thông tin ra từ câu kết án', 'bg': 'Отворена информация извличане от съединителни изречения', 'da': 'Uddrag af åben information fra konjunktive sætninger', 'nl': 'Open informatie extractie uit samenhangende zinnen', 'hr': 'Otvaranje informacija iz konjunktivnih izraza', 'de': 'Offene Informationsextraktion aus konjunktiven Sätzen', 'sw': 'Open Information Extraction from Conjunctive Sentences', 'ko': '연결문의 개방 정보 추출', 'id': 'Buka Ekstraksi Informasi dari Hukuman Konjunktif', 'fa': 'باز کردن اطلاعات از جمله\u200cهای کنترل', 'sq': 'Open Information Extraction from Conjunctive Sentences', 'am': 'Open Information Extraction from Conjunctive Sentences', 'hy': 'Բացել տեղեկատվությունը հաղորդակցված նախադասություններից', 'az': 'Konjunktiv S칬z칲nd톛n Mal칲mat캼 A칞', 'bs': 'Otvori izvlačenje informacija iz konjunktivnih izraza', 'bn': 'সংযুক্ত সেন্টেন্স থেকে তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাকশন খোলো', 'ca': "Extracció d'informació oberta de les frases conjunctives", 'cs': 'Otevřená extrakce informací z konjunktivních vět', 'af': 'Open Informasie Uitpakking van Konjunktive Utdrukkings', 'fi': 'Avoimen tiedon poiminta yhdyslauseista', 'et': 'Avatud teabe väljavõte seoslausetest', 'tr': '%s Senedlerden Maglumat Aç', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'תוציא מידע פתוח משפטים מחוברים', 'sk': 'Odpri izvleček informacij iz vezanih stavkov', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'bo': 'མཐུན་འབྲེལ་ཚིག་གི་ཐོག་ནས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཕྱིར་འདོན་ཁ་ཕྱེ་བ'}
{'en': 'We develop CALM, a coordination analyzer that improves upon the conjuncts identified from dependency parses. It uses a language model based scoring and several linguistic constraints to search over hierarchical conjunct boundaries (for nested coordination). By splitting a conjunctive sentence around these conjuncts, CALM outputs several simple sentences. We demonstrate the value of our coordination analyzer in the end task of Open Information Extraction (Open IE). State-of-the-art Open IE systems lose substantial yield due to ineffective processing of conjunctive sentences. Our Open IE system, CALMIE, performs extraction over the simple sentences identified by CALM to obtain up to 1.8x yield with a moderate increase in precision compared to extractions from original sentences.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتطوير CALM ، وهو محلل تنسيق يعمل على تحسين الروابط المحددة من تحليل التبعية. ويستخدم نموذجًا قائمًا على نموذج اللغة والعديد من القيود اللغوية للبحث في حدود اقتران هرمية (للتنسيق المتداخل). من خلال تقسيم جملة ربط حول هذه الروابط ، ينتج CALM عدة جمل بسيطة. نوضح قيمة محلل التنسيق الخاص بنا في المهمة النهائية لاستخراج المعلومات المفتوحة (Open IE). تفقد أنظمة Open IE الحديثة عائدًا كبيرًا بسبب المعالجة غير الفعالة للجمل المرتبطة. يقوم نظام Open IE الخاص بنا ، CALMIE ، بإجراء الاستخراج على الجمل البسيطة المحددة بواسطة CALM للحصول على ما يصل إلى 1.8x عائد مع زيادة معتدلة في الدقة مقارنة بالاستخراج من الجمل الأصلية.', 'fr': "Nous développons CALM, un analyseur de coordination qui améliore les conjonctions identifiées à partir des analyses de dépendance. Il utilise une notation basée sur un modèle linguistique et plusieurs contraintes linguistiques pour effectuer des recherches sur des limites de conjonction hiérarchiques (pour une coordination imbriquée). En divisant une phrase conjonctive autour de ces conjonctions, CALM génère plusieurs phrases simples. Nous démontrons la valeur de notre analyseur de coordination dans la tâche finale d'Open Information Extraction (Open IE). Les systèmes Open IE de pointe perdent un rendement substantiel en raison de l'inefficacité du traitement des phrases conjonctives. Notre système Open IE, CALMIE, effectue une extraction sur les phrases simples identifiées par CALM pour obtenir un rendement jusqu'à 1,8 fois plus élevé avec une augmentation modérée de la précision par rapport aux extractions des phrases originales.", 'es': 'Desarrollamos CALM, un analizador de coordinación que mejora las conjunciones identificadas a partir de los análisis de dependencias. Utiliza una puntuación basada en un modelo de lenguaje y varias restricciones lingüísticas para buscar más allá de los límites conjuntos jerárquicos (para la coordinación anidada). Al dividir una oración conjuntiva alrededor de estas conjunciones, CALM produce varias oraciones simples. Demostramos el valor de nuestro analizador de coordinación en la tarea final de Open Information Extraction (Open IE). Los sistemas Open IE de última generación pierden un rendimiento sustancial debido al procesamiento ineficaz de las oraciones conjuntivas. Nuestro sistema Open IE, CALMIE, realiza extracciones sobre las oraciones simples identificadas por CALM para obtener un rendimiento de hasta 1,8 veces con un aumento moderado de la precisión en comparación con las extracciones de oraciones originales.', 'pt': 'Desenvolvemos o CALM, um analisador de coordenação que melhora os conjuntos identificados a partir de análises de dependência. Ele usa uma pontuação baseada em modelo de linguagem e várias restrições linguísticas para pesquisar sobre os limites do conjunto hierárquico (para coordenação aninhada). Ao dividir uma sentença conjuntiva em torno desses conjuntos, o CALM gera várias sentenças simples. Demonstramos o valor do nosso analisador de coordenação na tarefa final de Extração de Informação Aberta (Open IE). Os sistemas Open IE de última geração perdem rendimento substancial devido ao processamento ineficaz de sentenças conjuntivas. Nosso sistema Open IE, CALMIE, realiza extração sobre as sentenças simples identificadas pelo CALM para obter até 1,8x de rendimento com um aumento moderado na precisão em comparação com extrações de sentenças originais.', 'ja': '依存関係解析から識別された結合を改善するコーディネートアナライザであるCALMMを開発します。スコアリングに基づく言語モデルといくつかの言語的制約を使用して、階層的な結合境界を検索します（ネストされた協調のため）。これらの接続詞を中心に接続詞句を分割することで、CALMはいくつかの単純な句を出力します。オープン情報抽出（ Open IE ）のエンドタスクでコーディネートアナライザの価値を実証します。最先端のオープンIEシステムは、結合文の処理が効果的でないため、実質的な利回りを失います。当社のオープンIEシステムであるCALMIEは、CALMIEによって識別された単純な文に対して抽出を行い、元の文からの抽出と比較して精度を適度に上げて最大1.8倍の収率を得ます。', 'hi': 'हम CALM, एक समन्वय विश्लेषक विकसित करते हैं जो निर्भरता पार्स से पहचाने गए conjuncts पर सुधार करता है। यह पदानुक्रमित कंजंक्ट सीमाओं (नेस्टेड समन्वय के लिए) पर खोज करने के लिए एक भाषा मॉडल आधारित स्कोरिंग और कई भाषाई बाधाओं का उपयोग करता है। इन conjuncts के चारों ओर एक conjunctive वाक्य विभाजित करके, CALM कई सरल वाक्यों outputs. हम ओपन इन्फॉर्मेशन एक्सट्रैक्शन (ओपन आईई) के अंतिम कार्य में हमारे समन्वय विश्लेषक के मूल्य का प्रदर्शन करते हैं। अत्याधुनिक ओपन आईई सिस्टम संयुग्मक वाक्यों के अप्रभावी प्रसंस्करण के कारण पर्याप्त उपज खो देते हैं। हमारी ओपन आईई प्रणाली, CALMIE, मूल वाक्यों से निष्कर्षण की तुलना में परिशुद्धता में मध्यम वृद्धि के साथ 1.8x उपज प्राप्त करने के लिए CALM द्वारा पहचाने गए सरल वाक्यों पर निष्कर्षण करता है।', 'zh': '开 CALM,一调分析器,可改从解析识连词。 其用言语模样评分与言语约束搜索分层合界(施于嵌套调)。 环连词拆分一连词句,CALM 输数简句。 展我调分析器开信息取(Open IE)终当价。 最先进者开放式IE系统由于连词句处理效率下而多所损益。 吾开放式IE之系统CALMIE取CALM之简句,比之原始句,倍于高1.8,精度益高。', 'ru': 'Мы развиваем СПОКОЙСТВИЕ, координационный анализатор, который улучшает конъюнктивы, выявленные в результате анализа зависимостей. Он использует оценку на основе языковой модели и несколько лингвистических ограничений для поиска по иерархическим конъюнктивным границам (для вложенной координации). Разбивая конъюнктивное предложение вокруг этих конъюнктив, СПОКОЙСТВИЕ приводит к нескольким простым предложениям. Мы демонстрируем ценность нашего координационного анализатора в конечной задаче Open Information Extraction (Open IE). Современные открытые ИС-системы теряют значительный выход из-за неэффективной обработки конъюнктивных предложений. Наша система Open IE, CALMIE, выполняет извлечение по простым предложениям, идентифицированным с помощью CALM, чтобы получить выход до 1,8x с умеренным увеличением точности по сравнению с извлечениями из оригинальных предложений.', 'ga': 'Forbróimid CALM, anailísí comhordaithe a fheabhsaíonn na comhcheangail a shainaithnítear ó pharsanna spleáchais. Úsáideann sé scóráil bunaithe ar mhúnla teanga agus roinnt srianta teanga chun cuardach a dhéanamh thar theorainneacha comhcheangail ordlathacha (le haghaidh comhordaithe neadaithe). Trí phianbhreith chomhchuingeach a roinnt timpeall ar na comhchuingeacha seo, aschuireann CALM roinnt abairtí simplí. Léirímid luach ár n-anailísí comhordaithe sa tasc deiridh maidir le Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte (Open IE). Cailleann córais Oscailte IE den scoth toradh suntasach mar gheall ar phróiseáil neamhéifeachtúil ar phianbhreitheanna comhchuingeacha. Déanann ár gcóras Open IE, CALMIE, eastóscadh thar na habairtí simplí arna sainaithint ag CALM chun toradh suas le 1.8x a fháil le méadú measartha ar chruinneas i gcomparáid le eastóscáin ó bhun-abairtí.', 'hu': 'Kifejlesztjük a CALM koordinációs elemzőt, amely javítja a függőségi elemzésekből azonosított konjunktusokat. Nyelvmodell alapú pontszámozást és számos nyelvi korlátot használ a hierarchikus összefüggő határokon (beágyazott koordináció). A kötőhárító mondatok felosztásával a CALM több egyszerű mondatot ad ki. A koordinációs elemzőnk értékét bemutatjuk az Open Information Extraction (Open IE) végső feladatában. A legkorszerűbb Open IE rendszerek jelentős hozamot veszítenek a kötőhárító mondatok hatástalan feldolgozása miatt. Nyílt IE rendszerünk, a CALMIE a CALM által azonosított egyszerű mondatok fölötti extrakciót végez, hogy akár 1,8-szoros hozamot érjen el, mérsékelt pontossággal az eredeti mondatok extrakcióihoz képest.', 'el': 'Αναπτύσσουμε έναν αναλυτή συντονισμού που βελτιώνει τις συνδέσεις που εντοπίζονται από αναλύσεις εξάρτησης. Χρησιμοποιεί μια βαθμολογία βασισμένη σε γλωσσικό μοντέλο και αρκετούς γλωσσικούς περιορισμούς για να αναζητήσει πάνω από ιεραρχικά σύνορα σύνδεσης (για ένθετο συντονισμό). Χωρίζοντας μια επιπεφυκτική πρόταση γύρω από αυτές τις συνδέσεις, το CALM παράγει αρκετές απλές προτάσεις. Αποδεικνύουμε την αξία του αναλυτή συντονισμού μας στο τελικό έργο της Ανοικτής Εκχύλισης Πληροφοριών (Ανοικτή Εκχύλιση Πληροφοριών). Τα σύγχρονα ανοικτά συστήματα χάνουν σημαντική απόδοση λόγω της αναποτελεσματικής επεξεργασίας των επιπεφυκτικών προτάσεων. Το ανοικτό σύστημα μας, εκτελεί εξαγωγή πάνω από τις απλές προτάσεις που προσδιορίζονται από το CALM για να επιτύχει έως 1,8απόδοση με μέτρια αύξηση της ακρίβειας σε σύγκριση με τις εξαγωγές από τις αρχικές προτάσεις.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ CALM-ს განვითარებთ, კოორდინაციის ანალიზატორი, რომელიც განვითარებულია განსაზღვრებულობის პარასებიდან განსაზღვრებული კონჯუნქტებზე. ის გამოყენება ენის მოდელის მოდელის გარეშე სკორტირება და რამდენიმე ენგურისტიკური ზომის შესაძლებლობად იერაქტიკური კონძნექტიკური ზომის შესაძლებლობა (დანა ამ კონჯუნქტურების გაყოფილი კონჯუნქტური სიტყვა, CALM გამოიყენება რამდენიმე მარტივი სიტყვა. ჩვენ ჩვენი კოორდინაციის ანალიზატორის მნიშვნელობას გახსნა ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის ბოლო დავაკეთებთ. IE-ის გახსნა სისტემების სახელსაწყოთა სისტემები გადარჩენა ძალიან გამოიყენება კონჯუნქტური სიტყვების გამოყენება. ჩვენი გახსნილი IE სისტემა, CALMIE, გამოყენებს გამოყენებას CALM-ის განსაზღვრებული სიტყვების განსაზღვრებით, რომ მიიღებთ 1,8x-ზე მედირატური გაზრდილებას, როგორც გამოყენებას ორიგინალური სიტ', 'kk': 'Біз CALM, тәуелдік талдауынан анықталған контакттарды жақсартып, координациялау анализерін жасаймыз. Бұл тіл үлгісін сұрау мен бірнеше лингвистикалық шектерін иерархиялық қосымша шектерін іздеу үшін қолданады (координация үшін). Бұл бірліктерге бірлікті сөзді бөлу арқылы CALM бірнеше қарапайым сөздерді жасайды. Біз Open Information Extraction (Open IE) тапсырмасының соңғы тапсырмасында координациялау анализеріміздің мәнін көрсетедік. Ашылған IE жүйелерінің күй- жайы біріктірілген сөздердің эффективні өңдеу үшін көпшілігін жоғалтып қалды. CALMIE ашық IE жүйесіміз CALM белгілеген қарапайым сөйлемелерді 1,8x дегенге дейінгі дұрыстығын өзгерту үшін, бастапқы сөйлемелерден тарқату үшін қарапайым сөйлемелерді өзгертеді.', 'it': "Sviluppiamo CALM, un analizzatore di coordinamento che migliora le congiunte identificate dai parsi di dipendenza. Utilizza un punteggio basato su un modello linguistico e diversi vincoli linguistici per cercare oltre i confini congiunti gerarchici (per coordinamento annidato). Dividendo una frase congiuntiva intorno a queste congiunte, CALM emette diverse frasi semplici. Dimostriamo il valore del nostro analizzatore di coordinamento nel compito finale di Open Information Extraction (Open IE). I sistemi Open IE all'avanguardia perdono notevole rendimento a causa dell'elaborazione inefficace delle frasi congiuntive. Il nostro sistema Open IE, CALMIE, esegue l'estrazione sulle frasi semplici identificate da CALM per ottenere fino a 1,8x rendimento con un moderato aumento di precisione rispetto alle estrazioni da frasi originali.", 'lt': 'We develop CALM, a coordination analyzer that improves upon the conjuncts identified from dependency parses.  Ji naudoja kalbiniu modeliu pagrįstą vertinimą ir kelis kalbinius apribojimus, kad galėtų ieškoti virš hierarchinių junginių ribų (nested coordination). Skiriant jungtinį sakinį aplink šiuos junginius, CALM pateikia keletą paprastų sakinių. Mes parodome koordinavimo analizatoriaus vertę galutinėje atviros informacijos ekstrakcijos užduotyje. Naujausios atvirosios IE sistemos praranda didelį pajamą dėl neveiksmingo jungtinių sakinių apdorojimo. Mūsų atvira IE sistema CALMIE ekstrahuoja CALM nustatytus paprastus sakinius, kad būtų gautas ne daugiau kaip 1,8x derlius, o tikslumas šiek tiek padidėtų, palyginti su ištraukomis iš pradinių sakinių.', 'mk': 'Развиваме CALM, анализатор на координација кој ги подобрува конекциите идентификувани од анализите на зависност. Истиот користи рангирање базирано на јазичкиот модел и неколку јазички ограничувања за пребарување над хиерархичните граници на заедниците (за заградена координација). Со поделба на заедничка реченица околу овие заедници, CALM излегува со неколку едноставни реченици. Ја демонстрираме вредноста на нашиот анализатор на координација на крајната задача на Отворена информација екстракција (Отворена ИЕ). Новините отворени ИЕ системи губат значителен приход поради неефикасното обработување на заедничките казни. Нашиот отворен ИЕ систем, КАЛМИЕ, изведува екстракција преку едноставните реченици идентификувани од КАЛМ за да добие до 1,8x принос со умерено зголемување на прецизноста во споредба со екстракциите од оригиналните реченици.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d കെഎല്\u200dഎമിനെ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു കൂട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ അന്വേഷണ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ആശ്രയിച്ച പാര്\u200dസില്\u200d നിന് അത് ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു സ്കോരിങ്ങ് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്നതും കുറച്ചു ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ നിര്\u200dബന്ധങ്ങളും ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ക ഈ കൂട്ടത്തിന്റെ ചുറ്റുമുള്ള വാക്ക് വേര്\u200dപെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, CALM കുറച്ചു എളുപ്പമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പുറത്ത്  തുറന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ അവസാന ജോലിയില്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ മൂല്യം കാണിക്കുന്നു. സ്റ്റേറ്റ്- ഓഫ്- ആര്\u200dട്ട് തുറക്കുന്ന IE സിസ്റ്റമുകള്\u200d സജ്ജീവമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d വലിയ ഫല നമ്മുടെ തുറന്ന IE സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കാല്\u200dമൈയില്\u200d കാല്\u200dഎമില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി എടുത്തുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യശി', 'mn': 'Бид CALM-г, хамааралтай ажиллагаанаас гаргасан холбоонуудыг сайжруулдаг координацийн шинжилгээ хийдэг. Энэ нь хэл загварын загварыг суурилуулах, хэл хэлний хязгаарлалт ашигладаг. Иерархик холбоотой хязгаарлыг хайж (холбоотой координацийн төлөө). Энэ холбоотой холбоотой нэг өгүүлбэрийг хувааж, CALM нь олон энгийн өгүүлбэрийг гаргадаг. Бид координацийн шинжилгээгчийн үнэ цэнийг ашиглах мэдээллийн хайлтын төгсгөлд үзүүлдэг. Урлагийн нээлттэй IE системүүд холбоотой өгүүлбэрүүдийн үр дүнгүй үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнг алдаж байна. CALMIE бидний нээлттэй IE систем нь CALM-ын тодорхойлогдсон энгийн өгүүлбэрүүдийг 1.8x хүртэл нэмэгдүүлдэг нь эхний өгүүлбэрээс харьцуулахад дундаж нарийвчлалтай нэмэгдүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Vi utviklar CALM, ein koordinasjonanalyser som forbetrar samanhengane som er identifiserte frå avhengighetstolkingar. Det brukar eit språk- modell basert skoring og fleire språk- begrensningar for å søkja over hierarkiske samband- grenser (for nestert koordinasjon). Ved å dele eit samanlikn setning rundt desse samanlikna, vil CALM utføra fleire enkle setningar. Vi viser verdien til koordinasjonanaliseren vår i sluttoppgåva av opna informasjon-ekstrahering (Opna IE). Opna IE-systemet mistar stor tilstand på grunn av ikkje-effektivt handsaming av konjunktive setningar. Vårt open IE-system, CALMIE, utfører ekstraksjon over dei enkle setningane identifiserte av CALM for å få opp til 1,8x-verdiar med moderat økning i nøyaktighet sammenlignet med ekstraksjonar frå originale setningar.', 'pl': 'Opracowujemy CALM, analizator koordynacji, który poprawia spojrzenia zidentyfikowane z analiz zależności. Wykorzystuje ocenę opartą na modelu językowym i kilka ograniczeń językowych do wyszukiwania ponad hierarchicznymi granicami konjunktowymi (dla zagnieżdżonej koordynacji). Dzieląc zdanie spojówkowe wokół tych spojówek, CALM wydaje kilka prostych zdań. Wykazujemy wartość naszego analizatora koordynacyjnego w końcowym zadaniu Open Information Extraction (Open IE). Nowoczesne systemy Open IE tracą znaczną wydajność z powodu nieefektywnego przetwarzania zdań spojówkowych. Nasz system Open IE, CALMIE, wykonuje ekstrakcję nad prostymi zdaniami zidentyfikowanymi przez CALM, aby uzyskać do 1,8x wydajność z umiarkowanym wzrostem precyzji w porównaniu do ekstrakcji z oryginalnych zdań.', 'ro': 'Dezvoltăm CALM, un analizor de coordonare care îmbunătățește conjunctele identificate din analizele de dependență. Utilizează un scoring bazat pe modelul lingvistic și mai multe constrângeri lingvistice pentru a căuta peste granițele conjuncte ierarhice (pentru coordonarea cuibărită). Prin împărțirea unei propoziții conjunctive în jurul acestor conjuncte, CALM emite mai multe propoziții simple. Demonstrăm valoarea analizorului nostru de coordonare în sarcina finală a Extracției Informațiilor Deschise (Open IE). Sistemele Open IE de ultimă generație pierd un randament substanțial datorită procesării ineficiente a propozițiilor conjunctive. Sistemul nostru Open IE, CALMIE, efectuează extracția peste propozițiile simple identificate de CALM pentru a obține un randament de până la 1,8x cu o creștere moderată a preciziei în comparație cu extracțiile din propozițiile originale.', 'si': 'අපි CALM විශ්වාස කරනවා, සංවිධානය විශ්ලේෂකයෙක් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒ සංවිධානය විශ්වාසකයෙක් ව ඒක භාෂාව මොඩල් අධාරිත ස්කෝරින්ග් සහ භාෂාවික සීමාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න භාෂාවික සීමාවක් භාවිත කරනවා. මේ සම්බන්ධ වාක්ෂාවක් වලින් සම්බන්ධ වාක්ෂාවක් විතරයි, CALM සාමාන්\u200dය වාක්ෂාවක් විතරයි. අපි ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරනවා අපේ සංවිධානය විශ්ලේෂකයේ අවසාන වැඩේ තියෙනවා තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය (IE විවෘත කරන සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය සම්බන්ධ වාක්ය නිර්භාවිත විදියට විශාල පද්ධතියක් නැති වෙනවා. අපේ විවෘත IE පද්ධතිය, CALMIE, CALM වලින් පරික්ෂා කරපු සාමාන්\u200dය වචන වචන වලට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරනවා මුලින් වචන වචන වලින් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ව', 'sr': 'Razvijamo CALM, koordinacijski analizator koji poboljšava konjunkcije identifikovane iz analize zavisnosti. Koristi jezički model osnovan na osnovu izvlačenja i nekoliko jezičkih ograničenja za pretraživanje hijerarhijskih zajedničkih granica (za sklonište koordinacije). Razdvajanjem konjunktivne rečenice oko tih konjunktiva, CALM iznosi nekoliko jednostavnih rečenica. Pokazujemo vrijednost našeg koordinacijskog analizatora na kraju zadatka otvorenog izvlačenja informacija (otvorena IE). Državni otvoreni IE sistemi gube značajan zarad zbog neefikasnog procesa konjunktivnih rečenica. Naš otvoreni IE sistem, CALMIE, izvodi ekstrakciju nad jednostavnim rečenicama koje je identifikovala CALM kako bi dobila do 1,8x računa sa umjerenim povećanjem preciznosti u usporedbi s ekstrakcijama iz originalnih rečenica.', 'so': 'Waxaynu horumarinnaa CALM, baaritaan koorsiinta, kaas oo horumarinaya wadajirka laga aqoonsaday baarlamaha ku xiran. Waxay isticmaaleysaa muusikada luuqada oo ku saleysan wax lagu qiimeeyo iyo qasabo badan oo luqad ah si ay u raadinto xuduudaha hierarchical isku xiran (si loo heshiiyo qoraal). Qaybininta xukunka ku wareegsan wadankan, CALM wuxuu soo saaraa erayo badan oo fudud. Waxaynu muujinnaa qiimaha koordinate analyzerkeenna dhamaadka shaqada la soo saaro macluumaadka furan (Open IE). State-of-the-art Open IE systems lose substantial yield due to ineffective processing of conjunctive sentences.  nidaamka furan ee IE, CALMIE wuxuu sameeyaa qalabka fudud ee CALM u yaqaan in uu soo koro ilaa 1.8x, waxaana kordhaa koritaanka kordhinta si saxda ah oo la bardhigay in la soo bixiyo xarumaha asalka ah.', 'sv': 'Vi utvecklar CALM, en koordinationsanalysator som förbättrar de konjunkter som identifierats från beroendetolkningar. Den använder en språkmodell baserad scoring och flera språkliga begränsningar för att söka över hierarkiska konjunkta gränser (för kapslad samordning). Genom att dela upp en konjunktiv mening runt dessa konjunkter, CALM ger flera enkla meningar. Vi visar värdet av vår samordningsanalysator i slutuppgiften Open Information Extraction (Open IE). State-of-the-art öppna IE-system förlorar betydande avkastning på grund av ineffektiv behandling av konjunktiva meningar. Vårt Open IE-system, CALMIE, utför extraktion över enkla meningar identifierade av CALM för att få upp till 1,8x avkastning med en måttlig ökning av precision jämfört med extraktion från ursprungliga meningar.', 'ur': 'ہم CALM کو تخلیق کریں گے، ایک منظم تحلیل کرنے والے جو نیکوکاری پارس سے پہچان ہوئے کنجینٹوں پر بہتر ہوتا ہے. یہ ایک زبان موڈل کا استعمال کرتا ہے جو اسکورینگ بنیاد رکھتا ہے اور بہت سی زبان کی محدودیت کرتا ہے کہ اسکوریرکیل کنڈیٹ حدوں پر تلاش کریں ان کنجونٹوں کے گرد ایک جوڑی جماعت تقسیم کرنے کے ذریعہ CALM چند ساده جماعتیں نکالتا ہے. ہم کھولنے کی اطلاعات اضافہ کے (Open IE) آخر کام میں ہمارے منظم تحلیل کرنے والے کے مقدار کو دکھاتے ہیں۔ شرکت آئ سیستموں کی حالت میں بہت اثر گھاٹ رہی ہے جبکہ مشترک جماعتوں کی پردازی کے باعث غیر اثر سے کام لینے کی وجہ سے۔ ہماری کھولی IE سیستم، CALMIE، CALM کے ذریعہ پہچان ہوئے سادھے کلمات پر اخراج کرتا ہے کہ 1.8x تک مضبوطی کے ساتھ مضبوطی کے ساتھ مضبوطی کے ساتھ اضافہ کرتا ہے اور اصلی کلمات سے اخراج کرنے کے مقابلہ میں۔', 'ta': 'நாம் CALM, ஒரு ஒரு ஒரு ஆய்வு ஆய்வு ஆராய்ச்சியாளர், அது சார்ந்த பார்ச்சில் இருந்து காண்பிக்கப்பட்ட கூட்டத்திற்க இது மொழி மாதிரி மதிப்பெண்ணை அடிப்படையில் உள்ள மதிப்பெண் மற்றும் பல மொழி கட்டுப்பாடுகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது மூலப்பட்ட எல்லைகளை  இந்த இணைப்புகளை சுற்றி ஒரு கூட்டு வாக்கியத்தை பிரித்து, CALM சில எளிய வாக்கியங்களை வெளியிடுகிறது. திறந்த தகவல் வெளியீட்டின் முடிவில் எங்கள் ஒருங்கிணைப்பு ஆராய்வின் மதிப்பை காட்டுகிறோம். திறந்த IE அமைப்புகளின் மாநிலையில் செயல்படாத வாக்கியங்களை செயல்படுத்துவதால் பெரிய விளைவுகளை இழக்கும். எங்கள் திறந்த IE அமைப்பு, CALMIE, CALM கண்டுபிடிக்கப்பட்ட எளிய வாக்கியங்களின் மீது பிரித்தலை செய்கிறது மூல வாக்கியங்களிலிருந்து பெறுவதற்கு 1.', 'ms': 'We develop CALM, a coordination analyzer that improves upon the conjuncts identified from dependency parses.  Ia menggunakan skor berdasarkan model bahasa dan beberapa keterangan bahasa untuk mencari di atas sempadan kongsi hierarkis (untuk koordinasi tersarang). Dengan membahagi kalimat konjunktif di sekitar konjunktif ini, CALM mengeluarkan beberapa kalimat sederhana. Kami menunjukkan nilai penganalisa koordinasi kami dalam tugas akhir Ekstraksi Maklumat Buka (Open IE). Sistem IE terbuka state-of-the-art kehilangan keuntungan yang besar disebabkan proses tidak efektif kalimat konjunktif. Sistem IE terbuka kami, CALMIE, melakukan ekstraksi atas kalimat sederhana yang dikenalpasti oleh CALM untuk mendapatkan sehingga 1.8x hasil dengan meningkat ketepatan yang sederhana dibandingkan dengan ekstraksi dari kalimat asal.', 'mt': 'Aħna niżviluppaw CALM, analizzatur ta’ koordinazzjoni li jtejjeb fuq il-konġunti identifikati mill-analiżijiet tad-dipendenza. Tuża punteġġ ibbażat fuq mudell lingwistiku u bosta restrizzjonijiet lingwistiċi biex tfittex fuq il-fruntieri ġerarkiċi tal-konġunt (għal koordinazzjoni mibnija). Billi taqsam sentenza konġuntiva madwar dawn il-konġunti, CALM toħroġ diversi sentenzi sempliċi. We demonstrate the value of our coordination analyzer in the end task of Open Information Extraction (Open IE).  Is-sistemi tal-IE miftuħa l-aktar avvanzati jitilfu rendiment sostanzjali minħabba l-ipproċessar ineffettiv tas-sentenzi konġuntivi. Is-sistema IE Miftuħa tagħna, CALMIE, tagħmel estrazzjoni fuq is-sentenzi sempliċi identifikati minn CALM biex tikseb rendiment sa 1.8x b’żieda moderata fil-preċiżjoni meta mqabbla ma’ estrazzjonijiet minn sentenzi oriġinali.', 'uz': "Biz CALM, tashqari analyzerni tahlil qilamiz, tashkilotni tasdiqlashga aniqlangan aloqalarni yaxshi ko'ra olamiz. Bu tilning asosida qiymatni yaratish va bir necha lingʻlik tartiblarini ishlatadi, hierarchik birlashtirish chegaralarini qidirish uchun. Name Biz tashqari tashqimizni ochiq maʼlumot ajratish (IE) vazifasi oxiridagi qiymatni koʻrsatimiz. State-of-the-art Open IE systems lose substantial yield due to ineffective processing of conjunctive sentences.  Ochiq IE tizimimiz CALMIE asl so'zlaridan bir qismlardan foydalanish uchun CALM'ning koʻrsatilgan oddiy so'zlaridan foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi phát triển CAM, một phân tích phối hợp giúp cải thiện kết quả xác định từ các phân tích phụ thuộc. Nó sử dụng một kiểu cách ghi điểm dựa trên ngôn ngữ và một số giới hạn ngôn ngữ học để tìm kiếm giới hạn ràng buộc xã hội (để phối hợp ấp). Bằng cách chia ra một câu đồng ý xung quanh cơ thể này, CAM tiết ra vài câu đơn giản. Chúng tôi chứng minh giá trị của bộ phân tích phối hợp trong việc kết thúc công việc khai thác thông tin (Open Iễ). Hệ thống Open Iễ đang mất đi sản lượng lớn vì xử lý các câu đồng động không hiệu quả. The Open Iễ system, CAMIE, thực hiện trích vượt qua những câu đơn giản được CAM xác định để có tới 1.8x cave với một sự tăng độ chính xác vừa phải so với trích từ câu đầu tiên.', 'da': 'Vi udvikler CALM, en koordinationsanalysator, der forbedrer konjunkter identificeret fra afhængighedsfortolkninger. Den bruger en sprogmodel baseret scoring og flere sproglige begrænsninger til at søge over hierarkiske konjunktgrænser (for indlejret koordinering). Ved at opdele en konjunktiv sætning omkring disse konjunkter udgiver CALM flere enkle sætninger. Vi demonstrerer værdien af vores koordinationsanalysator i slutopgaven med Open Information Extraction (Open IE). State-of-the-art Open IE-systemer mister betydeligt udbytte på grund af ineffektiv behandling af konjunktive sætninger. Vores Open IE system, CALMIE, udfører ekstraktion over de enkle sætninger identificeret af CALM for at opnå op til 1,8x udbytte med en moderat stigning i præcision sammenlignet med ekstraktioner fra originale sætninger.', 'nl': 'We ontwikkelen CALM, een coördinatieanalysator die de conjuncten die zijn geïdentificeerd uit afhankelijkheidsparsen verbetert. Het maakt gebruik van een taalmodel gebaseerd scoren en verschillende taalbeperkingen om te zoeken over hiërarchische conjunctuurgrenzen (voor geneste coördinatie). Door een conjunctieve zin rond deze conjuncten te splitsen, geeft CALM verschillende eenvoudige zinnen uit. We tonen de waarde van onze coördinatie analyzer aan in de eindtaak van Open Information Extraction (Open IE). State-of-the-art Open IE systemen verliezen aanzienlijke opbrengst door ineffectieve verwerking van conjunctieve zinnen. Ons Open IE systeem, CALMIE, voert extractie uit over de eenvoudige zinnen geïdentificeerd door CALM om tot 1,8x opbrengst te verkrijgen met een matige toename in nauwkeurigheid in vergelijking met extracties uit originele zinnen.', 'de': 'Wir entwickeln CALM, einen Koordinationsanalysator, der die aus Abhängigkeitsparsen identifizierten Konjunkte verbessert. Es verwendet ein sprachmodellbasiertes Scoring und mehrere linguistische Einschränkungen, um über hierarchische konjunkte Grenzen zu suchen (für verschachtelte Koordination). Durch Aufteilen eines konjunktiven Satzes um diese Konjunkte gibt CALM mehrere einfache Sätze aus. Wir demonstrieren den Wert unseres Koordinationsanalysators in der Endaufgabe Open Information Extraction (Open IE). Modernste Open IE-Systeme verlieren durch ineffiziente Verarbeitung konjunktiver Sätze an Ertrag. Unser Open IE System, CALMIE, führt Extraktion über die einfachen Sätze durch, die von CALM identifiziert wurden, um bis zu 1,8x Ertrag mit einer moderaten Erhöhung der Präzision im Vergleich zu Extraktionen aus Originalsätzen zu erhalten.', 'hr': 'Razvijamo CALM, koordinacijski analitičar koji poboljšava konjunkcije identificirane iz analize zavisnosti. Koristi jezički model osnovan na osnovu izvlačenja i nekoliko jezičkih ograničenja za pretraživanje preko hijerarhijskih zajedničkih granica (za sklonište koordinacije). Razdvajanjem konjunktivne rečenice oko tih konjunktiva, CALM iznosi nekoliko jednostavnih rečenica. Pokazujemo vrijednost našeg koordinacijskog analizatora na kraju zadatka otvorenog izvlačenja informacija (otvorena IE). Državni sustavi otvorenih IE-a gube značajan zarad zbog neučinkovitosti obrade konjunktivnih kazni. Naš sustav otvorenog IE-a, CALMIE, izvršava izvlačenje nad jednostavnim rečenicama koje je identificirala CALM kako bi dobila do 1,8x računa s umjerenim povećanjem preciznosti u usporedbi s izvlačenjem iz originalnih rečenica.', 'id': 'Kami mengembangkan CALM, analisis koordinasi yang memperbaiki koneksi yang dikenal dari analisis dependensi. Ia menggunakan skor berdasarkan model bahasa dan beberapa keterangan bahasa untuk mencari di atas batas konjunksi hierarkis (untuk koordinasi sarang). Dengan membagi kalimat konjunktif di sekitar konjunktif ini, CALM mengeluarkan beberapa kalimat sederhana. Kami menunjukkan nilai dari analisis koordinasi kami dalam tugas akhir dari Ekstraksi Informasi Buka (Open IE). Sistem IE terbuka yang terbaik kehilangan keuntungan yang besar karena proses tidak efektif kalimat konjunktif. Sistem IE terbuka kita, CALMIE, melakukan ekstraksi atas kalimat sederhana yang dikenal oleh CALM untuk mendapatkan hingga 1,8x hasil dengan meningkat penepatan sederhana dibandingkan ekstraksi dari kalimat asli.', 'bg': 'Разработваме координационен анализатор, който подобрява конюнктите, идентифицирани от анализите на зависимостта. Той използва езиков модел базиран на оценка и няколко езикови ограничения за търсене над йерархични конюнктни граници (за вложена координация). Чрез разделяне на конюнктивно изречение около тези конюнкти, CALM извежда няколко прости изречения. Ние демонстрираме стойността на нашия координационен анализатор в крайната задача на Отворено извличане на информация (Отворено ИЕ). Съвременните системи за отворено ИЕ губят значително добив поради неефективна обработка на конюнктивни изречения. Нашата система извършва извличане върху простите изречения, идентифицирани от КАЛМ, за да се получи до 1,8х добив с умерено увеличение на точността в сравнение с извличането от оригиналните изречения.', 'fa': 'ما CALM را توسعه می\u200cکنیم، یک تحلیل\u200cکننده\u200cی هماهنگی که روی هماهنگ\u200cها شناسایی شده از تحلیل بستگی بهتر می\u200cشود. این از یک مدل زبانی استفاده می\u200cکند که از آهنگ بنیاد دارد و بسیاری از محدودیت زبان\u200cشناسی برای جستجو بر محدودیت\u200cهای متحد\u200cسازی (برای هماهنگ\u200cسازی\u200cسازی\u200cسازی) استفاده می\u200cکند. با تقسیم یک جمله با هم اطراف این جمله، CALM چند جمله ساده را اجرا می کند. ما ارزش تحلیل\u200cکننده\u200cی مرکزی خود را در پایان کار اخراج اطلاعات باز (IE) نشان می\u200cدهیم. سیستم\u200cهای IE باز\u200cشده\u200cی ایالت هنری به دلیل پردازش\u200cهای بی\u200cتاثیر جمله\u200cای از دست می\u200cدهند. سیستم IE باز، CALMIE، در مقایسه با استخراج از جمله\u200cهای اصلی از جمله\u200cهای ساده\u200cای که CALM تشخیص داده شده، استخراج می\u200cکند تا ۱.8x به ارائه می\u200cرسد.', 'ko': '우리는 CALM을 개발했는데 이것은 조율 분석기로서 의존 관계 분석에서 식별하는 연결을 개선했다.그것은 언어 모델에 기반한 평점과 몇 개의 언어 제약을 사용하여 차원 연결 경계를 검색한다.CALM은 이러한 연어 주위에서 하나의 연어 문장을 분할하여 몇 개의 간단한 문장을 출력할 수 있다.Open IE(Open IE)의 최종 임무에서 EMC의 Analyment Analyzer의 가치를 보여줍니다.가장 선진적인 개방식 IE 시스템은 연결문에 대한 무효 처리로 인해 커다란 수익을 잃었다.우리의 개방식 IE 시스템인 CALMIE는 CALM이 식별하는 간단한 문장을 추출하여 원시 문장에서 추출한 문장에 비해 1.8배의 생산율을 얻을 수 있고 정밀도가 약간 높아졌다.', 'sw': 'Tunaendeleza CALM, mchambuzi wa ushirikiano unaoendelea kwenye mahusiano yaliyotambuliwa na bunge la kutegemea. Inatumia muundo wa lugha yenye hisia na vizuizi kadhaa vya lugha kutafuta mipaka ya ushirikiano (kwa ajili ya uratibu wa umeme). Kwa kugawanya hukumu ya ushirikiano katika maeneo haya, CALM anatoa hukumu kadhaa rahisi. Tunaonyesha thamani ya mchambuzi wetu wa ushirikiano katika mwisho wa kazi ya utoaji habari Huru (Open IE). State-of-the-art Open IE systems lose substantial yield due to ineffective processing of conjunctive sentences.  Mfumo wetu wa wazi wa Umoja wa Mataifa, CALMIE, unafanya utekelezaji dhidi ya hukumu rahisi zilizotambuliwa na CALM ili kupata matunda ya kufikia 1.8x yenye kuongezeka kwa urahisi ukilinganishwa na uteuzi kutoka kwenye hukumu za awali.', 'tr': "Biz CALM'i, bağlılık parslaryndan tanınan toplantlaryň üstüne gelişýäris. Bu dili bir nusga görnöşi we bir näçe lingwistiki baglaýyşlary iýerarhiýa baglaýyşlary üstünde gözlemek üçin ullanýar. Bu bileliklerde birleşik bir sözli bölerek, CALM birnäçe basit sözleri çykar. Biz Aç Maglumaty Açmak(IE Aç) täblisasynyň soňunda koordinasiýasynyň deňini görkez. Çaltylyk Aç IE sistemleri näaktif sözleri işlemek üçin gaty bir arzuw ýitir. CALMIE, Açık IE sistemimiz, CALM tarapyndan tanınan basit sözleriň üstünde 1,8x-a çenli döwürülmesi üçin döwürülen hasaplamak bilen, başlangyç sözleriň sözleriyle deňil artmagy mümkin edýär.", 'af': "Ons ontwikkel CALM, 'n koordinasie analiseerder wat op die konjunkte geïdentifiseer word van afhanklikheidverwerking. Dit gebruik 'n taal model gebaseerde skaring en verskeie lingwisiese beheinings om oor hierarkies konjunkte grense te soek (vir gebaseerde koordinasie). Deur 'n konjunktiewe seting rondom hierdie konjunkte te deel, sal CALM verskeie eenvoudige setings uitvoer. Ons wys die waarde van ons koordinasie analiseerder in die einde taak van Open Information Extraction (Open IE). State-of-the-art Open IE-stelsels verloor substantiele ooreenkoms vanweë oneffektief verwerking van konjunktive setinge. Ons Open IE stelsel, CALMIE, uitvoer uitvoering oor die eenvoudige setings wat deur CALM identifiseer is om tot 1.8x uitvoer te kry met 'n moderate verhoog in presisie vergelyk met uitvoering van oorspronklike setings.", 'sq': 'Ne zhvillojmë CALM, një analizues koordinator që përmirëson lidhjet e identifikuara nga analizat e varësisë. Ajo përdor një pikëpamje bazuar në modelin gjuhësor dhe disa kufizime gjuhësore për të kërkuar mbi kufijtë hierarkikë të bashkëpunimit (për koordinatën e varrosur). Duke ndarë një dënim konjugues rreth këtyre konjugues, CALM nxjerr disa fjalime të thjeshta. Ne demonstrojmë vlerën e analizuesit tonë të koordinimit në detyrën përfundimtare të nxjerrjes së informacionit të hapur (Open IE). Sistemet e hapura të IE-së së tanishëm humbin renditje thelbësore për shkak të përdorimit të paefektshëm të dënimeve bashkuese. Sistemi ynë i hapur IE, CALMIE, kryen nxjerrje mbi fjalët e thjeshta të identifikuara nga CALM për të marrë deri në 1.8x rezultat me një rritje të moderuar në saktësi krahasuar me nxjerrjet nga fjalët origjinale.', 'az': "Biz CALM'i, bağımlılıq analizindən tanınmış bağlantıların üstündə daha yaxşılaşdırır. Bu, hiyerarşik birləşdirilmiş sınırları aramaq üçün bir çox dil modeli istifadə edir. Bu birliklərin ətrafında birləşdirilmiş cümləyi bölüşdürərək CALM bir neçə basit cümlələri çıxarır. Açıq Malümatı Açırmasının (Açıq IE) sonunda koordinasiya analizacımızın qiymətini göstəririk. Müəllif Açıq IE sistemləri birlikdə cümlələrin istifadə edilməsi səbəbi böyük ürəkləri itirər. Açıq IE sistemimiz, CALMIE, CALM tarafından tanıdıqları basit cümlələr üzərində 1,8x-ə qədər dördüncülük yükselməsi ilə başlangıç cümlələrdən əlavə edilən təkrarları ilə orta artırmaq üçün istifadə edir.", 'am': 'በተመሳሳይ ፓርቲዎች ላይ በሚታወቀው ግንኙነቶች ላይ የሚሻለውን የካሌም አስተያየት የሚያሳውቃትን እናደርጋለን፡፡ የቋንቋ ሞዴል መቆጣጠር እና የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ግንኙነትን ለዳርቻ ማሰናከል (ለመቀነስ ማሰናከል) ይጠቅማል፡፡ በአካባቢዎች ዙሪያ የተሰራጨውን ፍርድ በመለስ CALM ብዙ ቀላል ፍርድ አወጣል፡፡ የመክፈት መረጃ ማውጣት (IE) ክፈት በሚሆነው ስራ የኩነታችንን ማስታወቂያውን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የ-የአሁኑ የክፈት የIE ሲስተም ክፈት ክፍተቶችን በመጠቀም ምክንያት አካባቢ ፍሬ ይጠፋል። ከክፈት IE ስርዓታችን ካLMIE ከመጀመሪያው ክፍሎች ጋር ካLM በሚታወቀው ቀላል ቃላት ላይ አርእስቷል፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা কেএলএম তৈরি করি, এক সমন্বয় বিশ্লেষক, যা নির্ভরশীল পার্স থেকে চিহ্নিত কঙ্কের উপর উন্নতি পায়। It uses a language model based scoring and several linguistic constraints to search over hierarchical conjunct boundaries (for nested coordination).  কনজান্টেক্টদের চারপাশে একটি সংযুক্ত শাস্তি বিভক্ত করার মাধ্যমে CALM বেশ কিছু সাধারণ বাক্য প্রদান করেছে। খোলা তথ্য বিনিময়ের শেষ কাজের মাধ্যমে আমরা আমাদের সমন্বয় বিশ্লেষকের মূল্য প্রদর্শন করি। স্টেট-অফ-শিল্প খোলা আই.ই. সিস্টেমের কারণে কার্যকর বাক্যের প্রক্রিয়ার কারণে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ফল হারায়। আমাদের খোলা আইE সিস্টেম, কালমিই, মূল বাক্য থেকে বেরিয়ে যাওয়ার তুলনায় সাধারণ বাক্য চিহ্নিত কালেমের কাছ থেকে ১.', 'hy': 'Մենք զարգանում ենք CALM-ը, կոորդինացիոն վերլուծում, որը բարելավում է կախվածության վերլուծումներից բացահայտված կապերը: Այն օգտագործում է լեզվի մոդել, որը հիմնված է գնահատման և լեզվի բազմաթիվ սահմանափակումների վրա, որպեսզի փնտրի հիերարխիկ կոնկրոնացիայի սահմանները: Այս կապերի շուրջը բաժանելով կոնգյուտիվ նախադասությունը, CALM-ն արտադրում է մի քանի պարզ նախադասություններ: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս մեր կոորդինացիոն վերլուծողի արժեքը բաց տեղեկատվության վերջնական գործում: Վերջին տեխնոլոգիական բաց ինտերնետային համակարգերը կորցնում են նշանակալի արդյունք համախմբական նախադասությունների ոչ արդյունավետ վերլուծության պատճառով: Մեր բաց «Ի»-համակարգը, CALMIE, արտադրում է CALM-ի կողմից հայտնաբերված պարզ նախադասությունների վերաբերյալ, որպեսզի ստանանք մինչև 1.8x արդյունք, ընդհամեմատ ճշգրտության աճով համեմատ սկզբնական նախադասությունների վերաբերյա', 'bs': 'Razvijamo CALM, koordinacijski analizator koji poboljšava konjunkcije identificirane iz analize zavisnosti. Koristi jezički model osnovan na osnovu izvlačenja i nekoliko jezičkih ograničenja za pretraživanje hijerarhijskih zajedničkih granica (za sklonište koordinacije). Razdvajanjem konjunktivne rečenice oko tih konjunktiva, CALM iznosi nekoliko jednostavnih rečenica. Pokazujemo vrijednost našeg koordinacijskog analizatora na kraju zadatka otvorenog izvlačenja informacija (otvorena IE). Sistemi otvorenih IE-a iz države umjetnosti gube značajan zarad zbog neiffektivnog procesa konjunktivnih rečenica. Naš otvoreni IE sistem, CALMIE, izvršava ekstrakciju nad jednostavnim rečenicama koje je identifikovala CALM kako bi dobila do 1,8x dobijanja s umjerenim povećanjem preciznosti u usporedbi s ekstrakcijama iz originalnih rečenica.', 'et': 'Tﾃｶﾃｶtame vﾃ､lja CALM, koordinatsioonianalﾃｼsaatori, mis tﾃ､iustab sﾃｵltuvuse parsimisel tuvastatud konjunkte. See kasutab keelemudelil pﾃｵhinevat skoorimist ja mitmeid keelelisi piiranguid, et otsida ﾃｼle hierarhiliste konjunktipiiride (pesastatud koordinatsiooni). Jagades konjunktiivse lause nende konjunktide ﾃｼmber, CALM vﾃ､ljastab mitu lihtsat lauset. Nﾃ､itame oma koordineerimisanalﾃｼsaatori vﾃ､ﾃ､rtust avatud informatsiooni vﾃ､ljavﾃｵtmise (Open IE) lﾃｵppﾃｼlesandes. Kaasaegsed avatud IE sﾃｼsteemid kaotavad mﾃ､rkimisvﾃ､ﾃ､rse tootlikkuse konjunktiivsete lausete ebaefektiivse tﾃｶﾃｶtlemise tﾃｵttu. Meie avatud IE sﾃｼsteem CALMIE teeb ekstraheerimise CALMi poolt tuvastatud lihtsate lausete ﾃｼle, et saavutada kuni 1,8-kordne tootlikkus mﾃｵﾃｵduka tﾃ､psuse suurenemisega vﾃｵrreldes algsete lausete ekstraheerimisega.', 'ca': "Desenvolvem CALM, un analitzador de coordinació que millora les connexions identificades a partir d'analitzadors de dependencies. It uses a language model based scoring and several linguistic constraints to search over hierarchical conjunct boundaries (for nested coordination).  Separtant una frase conjuntiva al voltant d'aquestes conjuntes, CALM produeix diverses frases senzilles. Demonstrem el valor del nostre analitzador de coordinació a la tasca final de l'Open Information Extraction (Open IE). Els sistemes d'IE oberts d'última generació perden rendiment substancial a causa del processament ineficat de frases conjuntives. El nostre sistema Open IE, CALMIE, fa extracció sobre les senzilles frases identificades per CALM per obtenir fins a 1,8x rendiment amb un augment moderat de precisió comparat amb les extraccions de les frases originals.", 'fi': 'Kehitämme CALM:n, koordinaatioanalysaattorin, joka parantaa riippuvuuden parsauksista tunnistettuja konjunkteja. Se käyttää kielimalliin perustuvaa pisteytystä ja useita kielellisiä rajoituksia hierarkkisten konjunktirajojen yli (sisäkkäistä koordinaatiota varten). Jakamalla sidekalvolauseen näiden sidekalvojen ympärille CALM tuottaa useita yksinkertaisia lauseita. Osoitamme koordinaatioanalysaattorimme arvon Open Information Extraction (Open IE) lopputehtävässä. Viimeisimmät avoimet IE-järjestelmät menettävät huomattavan tuoton sidekalvolauseiden tehottoman käsittelyn vuoksi. Avoin IE-järjestelmämme CALMIE suorittaa poiston CALM:n yksilöimien yksinkertaisten lauseiden yli saadakseen jopa 1,8-kertaisen tuoton ja kohtuullisen tarkkuuden verrattuna alkuperäisten lauseiden poistoihin.', 'cs': 'Vyvíjíme CALM, koordinační analyzátor, který zlepšuje konjunkty identifikované z analýzy závislostí. Používá hodnocení založené na jazykovém modelu a několik jazykových omezení k vyhledávání přes hierarchické konjunktní hranice (pro vnořenou koordinaci). Rozdělením konjunktivní věty kolem těchto konjunktů CALM vydává několik jednoduchých vět. V závěrečném úkolu Open Information Extraction (Open IE) demonstrujeme hodnotu našeho koordinačního analyzátoru. Moderní systémy Open IE ztrácejí značný výnos díky neúčinnému zpracování spojivých vět. Náš Open IE systém CALMIE provádí extrakci nad jednoduchými větami identifikovanými CALMem, aby získal až 1,8x výnos s mírným zvýšením přesnosti ve srovnání s extrakcemi z původních vět.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe KALM, nggawe luwih basa gambar ditambah juter perusahaan karo sapa keamanan Rasane politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepolite"), when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngomongke nggawe barang tanggal nggo nggawe Open Info extract (Open SE). deep Sistem Open SE , KALMY, kang disenyarno kalong kapan seneng dadi kapan kelangan kelas nggawe barang kelangan tanggal 1.8 x padha gantawak dhéwé dadi nambah dhéwé kesempatan kanggo nambah sing paling dhéwé', 'sk': 'Razvijamo CALM, koordinacijski analizator, ki izboljšuje konjunkte, ugotovljene iz analiziranja odvisnosti. Uporablja ocenjevanje jezikovnega modela in več jezikovnih omejitev za iskanje čez hierarhične konjunktne meje (za gnezdeno koordinacijo). Z razdelitvijo veznega stavka okoli teh veznikov CALM izda več preprostih stavkov. Vrednost našega koordinacijskega analizatorja dokazujemo pri končni nalogi odprtega pridobivanja informacij (Open IE). Najsodobnejši sistemi odprtega IE zaradi neučinkovite obdelave vezniških stavkov izgubijo znaten donos. Naš Open IE sistem CALMIE izvaja ekstrakcijo preko preprostih stavkov, ki jih določa CALM, da doseže do 1,8-kratni donos z zmerno večjo natančnostjo v primerjavi z ekstrakcijami iz izvirnih stavkov.', 'ha': 'Tuna developer CALM, wani analymai da ke samar da dukkan haɗunan da aka gane daga parse masu inganci. Yana amfani da wata misalin harshe wanda aka bingeda kwamfyutan kwanan karatun, da kuma tsari masu cikin lingui masu yawa, dõmin ya nẽmi baka sararin haɗi na hierrchical (dõmin tunkuɗa). Ga ku raba wata kalma na haɗinacce a kẽwayen wannan haɗinactan, CALM na fitar da wasu cire masu sauƙi. Mu nuna kimar shirin shirinmu da ke yi analyni a ƙarshen aikin da ake nuna Shiryarwa na Babbata Agahiyan Aiki (Buɗe IU). @ action: button Ubuntu na Shirin IU, CALMIU, yana tafiyar da ƙananan da aka gane na CALM don ya iya ƙara zuwa 1.8x, kuma yana da ƙari mai tsakiya da tsakanin da sami da kuma da cire masu cire daga cire-kwance.', 'he': 'אנחנו מפתחים את CALM, מנתח התאמה שמשתפר על הקונקציות שזוהה ממבחנים התלויות. היא משתמשת במודל שפה מבוסס על נקודה ומספר מחסומים שפותיים כדי לחפש מעבר לגבולות היררכיים של הקונקציונט. על ידי לחלק משפט קונגינקטיבי סביב הקונקטיבים האלה, CALM תוציא כמה משפטים פשוטים. אנחנו מראים את הערך של מנתח התאמה שלנו במשימה הסופית של חיפוש מידע פתוח (IE פתוח). מערכות IE פתוחות המאודמנות מאבדות תועלת משמעותית בגלל עיבוד לא יעיל של משפטים קונגינקטיביים. Our Open IE system, CALMIE, performs extraction over the simple sentences identified by CALM to obtain up to 1.8x yield with a moderate increase in precision compared to extractions from original sentences.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་CALM་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་མཐུད་དེ་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་མིས་དཔྱད་ཞིབ དེ་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་གཞི་སྒྲིག་མཁན་དང་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་གཞི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད། ཆ་ཚོད་འདི་ཚོ་མཉམ་དུ་ཚོར་ཆུང་བའི་ཚིག་རྐང་བརྗོད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་CALM་དེ་ཚིག་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་། ང་ཚོས་ཕྱིར་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དབྱེ་བཟོའི་བྱ་སྟངས་མཇུག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རིན་ཐང་ངོས་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཚོགས་སྡུད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་IE་རིམ་ལ་ཚུལ་མཉམ་དུ་ཕན་ཚུར་ཕན་ཐུབ་རྒྱུ་རེད། ང་ཚོའི་Open IE མ་ལག་གི་CALMIE་གིས་CALM་གིས་ངོས་འཛིན་པའི་ཚིག་རྐང་བསྡུར་ན་ཕར་ཚུན་ཕྱིར་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་ཡར་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'An Exploration of Three Lightly-supervised Representation Learning Approaches for Named Entity Classification', 'ar': 'استكشاف ثلاثة مناهج تعلم التمثيل الخاضعة للإشراف الخفيف لتصنيف الكيان المحدد', 'fr': "Exploration de trois approches d'apprentissage des représentations légèrement supervisées pour la classification des entités nommées", 'pt': 'Uma Exploração de Três Abordagens de Aprendizagem de Representação Ligeiramente Supervisionada para Classificação de Entidade Nomeada', 'es': 'Una exploración de tres enfoques de aprendizaje de representación ligeramente supervisados para la clasificación de entidades nombradas', 'ja': '名前付きエンティティ分類のための3つの軽く監督された表現学習アプローチの探求', 'zh': '〔三〕轻督学法名实分类探索', 'hi': 'नामित इकाई वर्गीकरण के लिए तीन हल्के-पर्यवेक्षित प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के दृष्टिकोण की खोज', 'ru': 'Изучение трех слегка контролируемых подходов к обучению представлению для классификации именованных объектов', 'ga': "Taiscéaladh ar Trí Chur Chuige Foghlama le Léiriú Éadrom-mhaoirsithe d'Aicmiú Aonán Ainmnithe", 'el': 'Μια εξερεύνηση τριών ελαφρώς εποπτευόμενων προσεγγίσεων μάθησης αναπαράστασης για την ταξινόμηση ονομαστών οντοτήτων', 'ka': 'სამი სინამდვილედ დანარწმუნებული რესპეცენტაციის სწავლების პროგრაცია სახელი ინტერტიკის კლასიფიკაციისთვის', 'hu': 'Három könnyen felügyelt reprezentációs tanulási megközelítés feltárása a nevezett entitások osztályozásához', 'it': "Un'esplorazione di tre approcci di apprendimento della rappresentazione leggermente supervisionati per la classificazione delle entità nominate", 'mk': 'Истражување на три лесно надгледувани пристапи на учење на претставништво за класификација на именуван ентитет', 'kk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Trijų lengvai prižiūrimų atstovavimo mokymosi metodų, taikomų vardinio subjekto klasifikacijai, tyrimas', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mt': 'Esplorazzjoni ta’ Tliet Approċċi ta’ Tagħlim ta’ Rappreżentanza Sorveljati ħafifa għall-Klassifikazzjoni ta’ Entità Ismija', 'pl': 'Badanie trzech lekko nadzorowanych metod uczenia się reprezentacji dla klasyfikacji podmiotów o nazwie', 'mn': 'Гурван гэрэлтэй удирдагч Зөвлөлтийн суралцах ойлголтын судалгаа', 'ro': 'Explorarea a trei abordări ușor supravegheate de învățare a reprezentării pentru clasificarea entităților numite', 'no': 'Name', 'sr': 'Istraživanje tri pristupa učenja za klasifikaciju imenovanih područja', 'sv': 'En utforskning av tre l채tt철vervakade representationsinl채rningsmetoder f철r klassificering av namngivna enheter', 'so': 'A Exploration of Three Lightly-supervised Representation Learning Approaches for Named Entity Classification', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'An Exploration of Three Lightly-supervised Representation Learning Approaches for Named Entity Classification', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khám phá về Ba phương pháp giáo dục gần gũi giám sát người đại diện cho hạng người có tên.', 'da': 'En undersøgelse af tre let overvågede repræsentationslæringsmetoder for klassificering af navngivne enheder', 'bg': 'Изследване на три леко контролирани подхода за обучение на представителство за класификация на наименовани субекти', 'hr': 'Istraživanje tri pristupa učenja predstavnika koji se slabo nadziru za klasifikaciju imenovanih subjekta', 'nl': 'Een verkenning van drie licht begeleide representatie leerbenaderingen voor benoemde entiteitenclassificatie', 'de': 'Eine Untersuchung von drei leicht ﾃｼberwachten Reprﾃ､sentationslernansﾃ､tzen fﾃｼr die Klassifizierung benannter Entitﾃ､ten', 'id': 'Sebuah Penjelasan Tiga Pendekatan Belajar Perwakilan Yang Tersupervisi Mudah untuk Klasifikasi Entitas bernama', 'ko': '명명 실체 분류의 세 가지 경감독 표시 학습 방법 연구', 'sw': 'Tamko la Mafunzo ya Umoja wa Matatu yanayofuatiliwa na mwangaza wa Tatu', 'fa': 'یک تحقیق از سه دسترسی یادگیری از نماینده\u200cهای روشن تحقیق شده برای کلاس\u200cشناسی شرکت نامیده شده', 'tr': 'name', 'af': 'Name', 'az': 'Üç Haflı Gözləşdirilmiş Temsil Öyrənmə Növü Klasifikası üçün Öyrənmə Növləri Exploration of Three Lightly-Supervised Representative Learning Approaches for Named Entity Classification', 'am': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një zbulim i tre metodave të mësimit të përfaqësimit të mbikqyrur lehtë për klasifikimin e njësisë së quajtur', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': "Una exploració de tres enfocaments d'aprenentatge de representació lliurement supervisats per la classificació d'entitats anomenades", 'hy': 'Երեք թեթև վերահսկվող ներկայացման ուսումնասիրությունների ուսումնասիրությունը կոչված անհատականության դասակարգման համար', 'cs': 'Průzkum tří lehce pod dohledem reprezentačních učebních přístupů pro klasifikaci jmenovaných entit', 'bs': 'Istraživanja tri pristupa učenja predstavnika koji se slabo nadzire za klasifikaciju imenovanih entiteta', 'et': 'Nimetatud üksuste klassifikatsiooni kolme kergelt juhitava esindamise õppe lähenemisviisi uurimine', 'fi': 'Kolmen kevyesti valvotun edustuksen oppimismenetelmän tutkiminen nimettyjen yksiköiden luokittelussa', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'sk': 'Raziskava treh lahko nadzorovanih pristopov učenja predstavništva za klasifikacijo imenovanih subjektov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'חקירה של שלושה גישות לימוד לימודים על פיקוח קל עבור שיעור איכות בשם', 'bo': 'འོད་དོན་ལྟ་བུའི་རྩོམ་པ་ཁག་གསུམ་ཀྱི་དཔྱད་ཞིག་ནི་མིང་ཡོད་པའི་དབུལ་སྡེར་གྱི་སྐོར་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Several semi-supervised representation learning methods have been proposed recently that mitigate the drawbacks of traditional bootstrapping : they reduce the amount of semantic drift introduced by iterative approaches through one-shot learning ; others address the sparsity of data through the learning of custom, dense representation for the information modeled. In this work, we are the first to adapt three of these methods, most of which have been originally proposed for image processing, to an information extraction task, specifically, named entity classification. Further, we perform a rigorous comparative analysis on two distinct datasets. Our analysis yields several important observations. First, all representation learning methods outperform state-of-the-art semi-supervised methods that do not rely on representation learning. To the best of our knowledge, we report the latest state-of-the-art results on the semi-supervised named entity classification task. Second, one-shot learning methods clearly outperform iterative representation learning approaches. Lastly, one of the best performers relies on the mean teacher framework (Tarvainen and Valpola, 2017), a simple teacher / student approach that is independent of the underlying task-specific model.', 'fr': "Plusieurs méthodes d'apprentissage des représentations semi-supervisées ont été proposées récemment pour pallier les inconvénients du bootstrapping traditionnel\xa0: elles réduisent la quantité de dérive sémantique introduite par les approches itératives par le biais d'un apprentissage ponctuel\xa0; d'autres s'attaquent à la rareté des données grâce à l'apprentissage de représentation dense pour les informations modélisées. Dans ce travail, nous sommes les premiers à adapter trois de ces méthodes, dont la plupart ont été initialement proposées pour le traitement d'images, à une tâche d'extraction d'informations, en particulier la classification des entités nommées. De plus, nous effectuons une analyse comparative rigoureuse sur deux ensembles de données distincts. Notre analyse fournit plusieurs observations importantes. Tout d'abord, toutes les méthodes d'apprentissage des représentations surpassent les méthodes semi-supervisées de pointe qui ne reposent pas sur l'apprentissage par représentation. À notre connaissance, nous présentons les derniers résultats de pointe concernant la tâche de classification semi-supervisée des entités nommées. Deuxièmement, les méthodes d'apprentissage ponctuelles surpassent clairement les approches itératives d'apprentissage par représentation. Enfin, l'un des meilleurs résultats repose sur le cadre moyen de l'enseignant (Tarvainen et Valpola, 2017), une approche enseignant/étudiant simple qui est indépendante du modèle sous-jacent spécifique à la tâche.", 'es': 'Recientemente se han propuesto varios métodos de aprendizaje de representación semisupervisada que mitigan los inconvenientes del bootstrapping tradicional: reducen la cantidad de deriva semántica introducida por los enfoques iterativos a través del aprendizaje único; otros abordan la escasez de datos a través del aprendizaje de representación densa de la información modelada. En este trabajo, somos los primeros en adaptar tres de estos métodos, la mayoría de los cuales se han propuesto originalmente para el procesamiento de imágenes, a una tarea de extracción de información, específicamente, denominada clasificación de entidades. Además, realizamos un riguroso análisis comparativo en dos conjuntos de datos distintos. Nuestro análisis arroja varias observaciones importantes. En primer lugar, todos los métodos de aprendizaje de representación superan a los métodos semisupervisados de última generación que no se basan en el aprendizaje de representación. Según nuestro leal saber y entender, informamos de los últimos resultados de vanguardia sobre la tarea de clasificación de entidades nombradas semisupervisada. En segundo lugar, los métodos de aprendizaje único superan claramente a los enfoques de aprendizaje de representación iterativa. Por último, uno de los que mejor desempeño se basa en el marco del maestro medio (Tarvainen y Valpola, 2017), un enfoque simple de maestro/alumno que es independiente del modelo subyacente específico de la tarea.', 'ar': 'تم اقتراح العديد من طرق التعلم التمثيلي شبه الخاضع للإشراف مؤخرًا والتي تخفف من عيوب التمهيد التقليدي: فهي تقلل من مقدار الانجراف الدلالي الذي تقدمه الأساليب التكرارية من خلال التعلم دفعة واحدة ؛ يتعامل البعض الآخر مع تباين البيانات من خلال تعلم التمثيل المخصص والكثيف للمعلومات المنمذجة. في هذا العمل ، نحن أول من قام بتكييف ثلاث من هذه الطرق ، والتي تم اقتراح معظمها في الأصل لمعالجة الصور ، لمهمة استخراج المعلومات ، على وجه التحديد ، تصنيف الكيان المسمى. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بإجراء تحليل مقارن صارم على مجموعتي بيانات متميزتين. ينتج عن تحليلنا عدة ملاحظات مهمة. أولاً ، تتفوق جميع طرق التعلم التمثيلي على أحدث الأساليب شبه الخاضعة للإشراف التي لا تعتمد على التعلم التمثيلي. على حد علمنا ، نقوم بالإبلاغ عن أحدث النتائج في مهمة تصنيف الكيان المسماة شبه الخاضعة للإشراف. ثانيًا ، تتفوق أساليب التعلم ذات الطلقة الواحدة بوضوح على مناهج تعلم التمثيل التكراري. أخيرًا ، يعتمد أحد أفضل الموظفين أداءً على إطار عمل المعلم المتوسط (Tarvainen and Valpola ، 2017) ، وهو نهج مدرس / طالب بسيط مستقل عن النموذج الأساسي الخاص بالمهمة المحددة.', 'pt': 'Vários métodos de aprendizagem de representação semi-supervisionada foram propostos recentemente para atenuar as desvantagens do bootstrapping tradicional: eles reduzem a quantidade de desvio semântico introduzido por abordagens iterativas por meio de aprendizado one-shot; outros abordam a escassez de dados por meio do aprendizado de uma representação densa e personalizada para as informações modeladas. Neste trabalho, somos os primeiros a adaptar três desses métodos, a maioria dos quais foram originalmente propostos para processamento de imagens, para uma tarefa de extração de informações, especificamente, denominada classificação de entidades. Além disso, realizamos uma análise comparativa rigorosa em dois conjuntos de dados distintos. Nossa análise produz várias observações importantes. Primeiro, todos os métodos de aprendizado de representação superam os métodos semissupervisionados de última geração que não dependem do aprendizado de representação. Até onde sabemos, relatamos os resultados mais recentes do estado da arte na tarefa de classificação de entidade nomeada semissupervisionada. Em segundo lugar, os métodos de aprendizagem one-shot claramente superam as abordagens de aprendizagem de representação iterativa. Por último, um dos melhores desempenhos depende da estrutura média do professor (Tarvainen e Valpola, 2017), uma abordagem simples do professor/aluno que é independente do modelo subjacente específico da tarefa.', 'ru': 'Недавно было предложено несколько полуконтролируемых методов обучения представлению, которые смягчают недостатки традиционного бутстреппинга: они уменьшают количество семантического дрейфа, вводимого итеративными подходами посредством однократного обучения; другие решают проблему редкости данных посредством изучения пользовательского, плотного представления для моделируемой информации. В этой работе мы первыми адаптируем три из этих методов, большинство из которых были первоначально предложены для обработки изображений, к задаче извлечения информации, в частности, именованной классификации сущностей. Кроме того, мы проводим тщательный сравнительный анализ двух отдельных наборов данных. Наш анализ дает несколько важных наблюдений. Во-первых, все методы репрезентативного обучения превосходят современные полуконтролируемые методы, которые не зависят от репрезентативного обучения. Насколько нам известно, мы сообщаем о последних современных результатах по полунадзорной именованной задаче классификации сущностей. Во-вторых, одноразовые методы обучения явно превосходят итеративные подходы к обучению. Наконец, один из лучших исполнителей полагается на структуру среднего учителя (Tarvainen and Valpola, 2017), простой подход учителя/учащегося, который не зависит от базовой модели конкретной задачи.', 'ja': '従来のブートストラッピングの欠点を軽減するいくつかの半監督下の表現学習方法が最近提案されている。それらは、単発学習を通じて反復的アプローチによって導入されるセマンティックドリフトの量を減らす。他の方法は、モデル化された情報のカスタムで濃密な表現の学習を通じてデータの希少性に対処する。 この研究では、画像処理のために最初に提案されたこれらの方法のほとんどの3つを、情報抽出タスク、具体的には名前付きエンティティ分類に適合させます。 さらに、２つの異なるデータセットについて厳密な比較分析を行う。 私たちの分析は、いくつかの重要な観察結果をもたらします。 まず、すべての表現学習方法は、表現学習に依存しない最先端の半監修方法を上回る。 私たちの知る限りでは、半監督下の名前付きエンティティ分類タスクに関する最新の結果を報告します。 第二に、単発学習法は、反復表現学習アプローチを明らかに上回る。 最後に、最高のパフォーマーの1人は、平均的な教師フレームワーク（ Tarvainen and Valpola, 2017 ）に依存している。これは、基礎となるタスク固有のモデルとは独立した単純な教師/学習者アプローチである。', 'zh': '近建督课之数,以轻旧章自举之短:一次性学损迭代引语义移量。 其余则学建模息之自定义,密示以决数疏。 首取其三法(其初施于图像处理),特名实体之法。 此外,我们对两个不同的数据集行了比较。 我们的说得出了几个观察。 先学者,皆优于不依于先进之半也。 以吾所知,告其半监命之最新最新。 其次,一次性学明优迭代示学也。 至人之一,赖于均师框架(TarvainenValpola,2017),此独立于任特定而师/弟子之道也。', 'hi': 'हाल ही में कई अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के तरीकों का प्रस्ताव किया गया है जो पारंपरिक बूटस्ट्रैपिंग की कमियों को कम करते हैं: वे एक-शॉट सीखने के माध्यम से पुनरावर्ती दृष्टिकोण द्वारा पेश किए गए शब्दार्थ बहाव की मात्रा को कम करते हैं; दूसरों को कस्टम के सीखने के माध्यम से डेटा की sparsity को संबोधित, जानकारी modeled के लिए घने प्रतिनिधित्व. इस काम में, हम इन विधियों में से तीन को अनुकूलित करने वाले पहले व्यक्ति हैं, जिनमें से अधिकांश को मूल रूप से छवि प्रसंस्करण के लिए प्रस्तावित किया गया है, एक सूचना निष्कर्षण कार्य के लिए, विशेष रूप से, इकाई वर्गीकरण का नाम दिया गया है। इसके अलावा, हम दो अलग-अलग डेटासेट पर एक कठोर तुलनात्मक विश्लेषण करते हैं। हमारे विश्लेषण में कई महत्वपूर्ण टिप्पणियां प्राप्त होती हैं। सबसे पहले, सभी प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के तरीके अत्याधुनिक अर्ध-पर्यवेक्षित तरीकों से आगे निकलते हैं जो प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने पर भरोसा नहीं करते हैं। हमारे ज्ञान का सबसे अच्छा करने के लिए, हम अर्ध पर्यवेक्षित नामित इकाई वर्गीकरण कार्य पर नवीनतम अत्याधुनिक परिणामों की रिपोर्ट करते हैं। दूसरा, एक-शॉट सीखने के तरीके स्पष्ट रूप से पुनरावर्ती प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के दृष्टिकोण को बेहतर बनाते हैं। अंत में, सबसे अच्छे कलाकारों में से एक माध्य शिक्षक ढांचे (Tarvainen और Valpola, 2017) पर निर्भर करता है, एक सरल शिक्षक / छात्र दृष्टिकोण जो अंतर्निहित कार्य-विशिष्ट मॉडल से स्वतंत्र है।', 'ga': 'Moladh roinnt modhanna foghlama ionadaíochta leath-mhaoirsithe le déanaí a mhaolaíonn na míbhuntáistí a bhaineann le stríocadh tosaithe traidisiúnta: laghdaíonn siad méid an tsrutha shéimeantaigh a thugtar isteach trí chur chuige atriallach trí fhoghlaim aon-shot; tugann daoine eile aghaidh ar ghanntanas na sonraí trí léiriú saincheaptha, dlúth a fhoghlaim don fhaisnéis arna múnlú. San obair seo, is muidne an chéad dream a chuir in oiriúint trí cinn de na modhanna seo, ar moladh an chuid is mó díobh ar dtús le haghaidh próiseála íomhá, do thasc asbhainte faisnéise, go sonrach, aicmiú eintiteas ainmnithe. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid diananailís chomparáideach ar dhá thacar sonraí ar leith. Tugann ár n-anailís roinnt tuairimí tábhachtacha. Ar an gcéad dul síos, sáraíonn gach modh foghlama ionadaíochta na modhanna leath-mhaoirseachta úrscothacha nach bhfuil ag brath ar fhoghlaim ionadaíochta. Chomh fada agus is eol dúinn, tuairiscímid na torthaí úrscothacha is déanaí ar an tasc aicmithe aonáin ainmnithe leath-mhaoirsithe. Ar an dara dul síos, is léir go sáraíonn modhanna foghlama aon seat cur chuige foghlama ionadaíochta atriallach. Ar deireadh, braitheann duine de na taibheoirí is fearr ar an meánchreat múinteora (Tarvainen agus Valpola, 2017), cur chuige simplí múinteora/mac léinn atá neamhspleách ar an múnla bunúsach tasc-shonrach.', 'hu': 'A közelmúltban számos félig felügyelt reprezentációs tanulási módszert javasoltak, amelyek enyhítik a hagyományos bootstraping hátrányait: csökkentik az iteratív megközelítések által bevezetett szemantikai eltolódás mennyiségét az egyszeres tanulás révén; mások a modellezett információk egyéni, sűrű ábrázolásának tanulásával foglalkoznak az adatok ritkaságával. Ebben a munkában elsőként alkalmaztunk három ilyen módszert, amelyek többségét eredetileg képfeldolgozásra javasolták, egy információkinyerési feladathoz, konkrétan a nevezett entitás osztályozáshoz. Továbbá szigorú összehasonlító elemzést végzünk két különböző adatkészleten. Az elemzésünk számos fontos megfigyelést eredményez. Először is, minden reprezentációs tanulási módszer felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb, félig felügyelt módszereket, amelyek nem a reprezentációs tanulásra támaszkodnak. Legjobb tudásunk szerint a félig felügyelt elnevezett entitás osztályozási feladat legkorszerűbb eredményeit számoljuk be. Másodszor, az egyszeri tanulási módszerek egyértelműen felülmúlják az iteratív reprezentációs tanulási megközelítéseket. Végül az egyik legjobb teljesítmény az átlagos tanári keretrendszerre támaszkodik (Tarvainen és Valpola, 2017), egy egyszerű tanár/diák megközelítésre, amely független a mögöttes feladatspecifikus modelltől.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατα έχουν προταθεί αρκετές μέθοδοι εκμάθησης ημι-εποπτευμένης αναπαράστασης που μετριάζουν τα μειονεκτήματα του παραδοσιακού bootstrapping: μειώνουν το ποσό της σημασιολογικής μετατόπισης που εισάγονται από επαναληπτικές προσεγγίσεις μέσω της μάθησης μίας βολής. άλλοι ασχολούνται με τη σπανιότητα των δεδομένων μέσω της εκμάθησης προσαρμοσμένης, πυκνής αναπαράστασης για τις πληροφορίες που μοντελοποιούνται. Σε αυτή την εργασία, είμαστε οι πρώτοι που προσαρμόζουμε τρεις από αυτές τις μεθόδους, οι περισσότερες από τις οποίες έχουν προταθεί αρχικά για επεξεργασία εικόνας, σε μια εργασία εξαγωγής πληροφοριών, συγκεκριμένα, την ονομαζόμενη ταξινόμηση οντοτήτων. Επιπλέον, διεξάγουμε μια αυστηρή συγκριτική ανάλυση σε δύο διαφορετικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Η ανάλυση μας δίνει αρκετές σημαντικές παρατηρήσεις. Πρώτον, όλες οι μέθοδοι εκμάθησης αναπαράστασης ξεπερνούν τις σύγχρονες ημι-εποπτικές μεθόδους που δεν βασίζονται στην εκμάθηση αναπαράστασης. Σύμφωνα με τις καλύτερες γνώσεις μας, αναφέρουμε τα τελευταία αποτελέσματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας σχετικά με την εργασία ταξινόμησης ονομασίας οντότητας υπό ημιεπιτήρηση. Δεύτερον, οι μαθησιακές μέθοδοι μίας βολής ξεπερνούν σαφώς τις μεθόδους επαναληπτικής αναπαράστασης μάθησης. Τέλος, ένας από τους καλύτερους αποδέκτες βασίζεται στο μέσο πλαίσιο δασκάλων (Tarvainen και Valpola, 2017), μια απλή προσέγγιση δασκάλου/μαθητή που είναι ανεξάρτητη από το υποκείμενο μοντέλο συγκεκριμένης εργασίας.', 'ka': 'რამდენიმე ნახევარწმუნებული გამოსწავლების მეტისები აღმოჩენა, რომლებიც აღმოჩენა ტრადიციონალური ბუტუტუტურების დაკავშირება: ისინი ერთ-სტუტური სწავლების გამოყენებული სიმენტიკური ბუტურის ზ სხვა ინფორმაციის მოდელური ინფორმაციის მასწავლისთვის გადასწავლისთვის მონაცემების დასაწყება. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ ვართ პირველი, რომელიც ამ მეტიდან სამუშაო აეპორტირებულია, რომელიც უფრო მეტიდან გამოყენებული გამოყენებაში, ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის დავალებაში, განსაკუთრებ დამატებით, ჩვენ ორი განსხვავებული მონაცემების კომპორტიური ანალიზაციას გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენი ანალიზია უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი აჩვენებს. პირველად, ყველა გამოსახულება სწავლების მეტი გავაკეთებენ სახელის ნახელის მონახულებული მეტი, რომლებიც არ დარწმუნდებენ გამოსახულებული სწავლებისზე. ჩვენი უკეთესი მეცნიერებისთვის, ჩვენ აღწერეთ უკეთესი წარმოდგენების წარმოდგენების ნახევალ დანახვედნენი ინტერტიკის კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობაზე. მეორე, ერთი სწავლების მეტი წარმოდგენიან უფრო უფრო გავაკეთებთ თეტრატიური გამოსწავლების მიღება. საბოლოოდ, ერთი საუკეთესო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაო მუშაო ფრამეტრებზე (Tarvainen და Valpola, 2017), საუკეთესო მუშაო მუშაო/სტუდენტი', 'kk': 'Кейбір жарты бақылау тәртібін бақылау әдістерін жуырдағы жүктеу әдістерін көшірмелеу үшін ұсынылды: олар бір түрлі оқыту арқылы қайталанатын семантикалық жүктеу тәртібін көшірмеледі. Басқалар өзгертілген мәлімет үшін өзгертілген, жиілік көрсетілетін деректердің кеңістігін көрсетеді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде бірінші бұл әдістердің үш әдістерін адаптау үшін біріншісіміз, олардың көпшілігі кескінді өзгерту үшін, мәліметті тарқату тапсырмасына, осылай қатар Қосымша, біз екі бөлек деректер жиынында тұрақты салыстырмалы анализ істейміз. Біздің анализиямыз бірнеше маңызды байқауларды береді. Біріншіден, барлық таңдау үйрену әдістері таңдау оқыту әдістерінен сенбейтін жарты бақылау әдістерінен шығарылады. Біздің біліміздің ең жақсы мәліметімізге, біз оның соңғы күйінің нәтижесін жарты бақылап тұрған нысандарды шектеу тапсырмасына хабарлаймыз. Екіншіден, бір түрлі оқыту әдістері қайталанушының көмегімен қарай болады. Соңында, ең жақсы оқушылардың бірі орташа мұғалім бағдарламасының (Tarvainen және Valpola, 2017) бағдарламасына тұрады. Бұл қарапайым мұғалім/студенттердің бағдарламасының негізгі үлг', 'it': "Recentemente sono stati proposti diversi metodi di apprendimento della rappresentazione semi-supervisionati che mitigano gli svantaggi del bootstrapping tradizionale: riducono la quantità di deriva semantica introdotta da approcci iterativi attraverso l'apprendimento one-shot; altri affrontano la scarsità dei dati attraverso l'apprendimento di una rappresentazione personalizzata e densa per le informazioni modellate. In questo lavoro, siamo i primi ad adattare tre di questi metodi, la maggior parte dei quali sono stati originariamente proposti per l'elaborazione delle immagini, ad un compito di estrazione delle informazioni, nello specifico, denominato classificazione delle entità. Inoltre, eseguiamo una rigorosa analisi comparativa su due insiemi di dati distinti. La nostra analisi fornisce diverse osservazioni importanti. In primo luogo, tutti i metodi di apprendimento della rappresentazione superano i metodi semi-supervisionati all'avanguardia che non si basano sull'apprendimento della rappresentazione. Al meglio delle nostre conoscenze, riportiamo i risultati più recenti sull'attività di classificazione delle entità nominate semi-supervisionata. In secondo luogo, i metodi di apprendimento one-shot superano chiaramente gli approcci iterativi di apprendimento della rappresentazione. Infine, uno dei migliori performer si basa sul framework medio degli insegnanti (Tarvainen e Valpola, 2017), un approccio semplice insegnante/studente indipendente dal modello specifico del compito sottostante.", 'mk': 'Неодамна се предложени неколку полунадгледувани методи на учење на претставништво кои ги намалуваат недостатоците од традиционалните шифри: тие го намалуваат количината на семантични движења воведени со итеративни пристапи преку еднострелно учење; другите се обраќаат на реткоста на податоците преку учењето на сопственото, густо претставување на информациите моделирани. In this work, we are the first to adapt three of these methods, most of which have been originally proposed for image processing, to an information extraction task, specifically, named entity classification.  Покрај тоа, спроведуваме строга споредлива анализа на два различни податоци. Нашата анализа дава неколку важни набљудувања. Прво, сите методи на учење за претставување ги надминуваат најсовремените полунадгледувани методи кои не се зависат од учење за претставување. Според нашето знаење, ги пријавуваме најновите најдобри резултати на полунадгледуваната задача за класификација на ентитетите. Второ, единствените методи на учење јасно ги надминуваат итеративните пристапи на учење. На крајот, еден од најдобрите изведувачи се потпира на средната рамка на наставниците (Тарвавиен и Валпола, 2017 година), едноставен наставник/студент пристап кој е независен од основниот модел специфичен за задачите.', 'ms': 'Beberapa kaedah pembelajaran perwakilan setengah diawasi telah diusulkan akhir-akhir ini yang mengurangkan kelemahan dari pengaruh bot tradisional: mereka mengurangkan jumlah pengaruh semantik yang diperkenalkan oleh pendekatan iteratif melalui pembelajaran satu-shot; yang lain mengatasi kecepatan data melalui pembelajaran perwakilan tebal dan suai untuk maklumat yang dipodelkan. Dalam kerja ini, kita adalah yang pertama untuk menyesuaikan tiga kaedah ini, yang sebahagian besar telah diusulkan untuk pemprosesan imej, kepada tugas ekstraksi maklumat, secara khusus, klasifikasi entiti bernama. Selain itu, kami melakukan analisis perbandingan yang ketat pada dua set data yang berbeza. Analisis kami memberikan beberapa pengamatan penting. First, all representation learning methods outperform state-of-the-art semi-supervised methods that do not rely on representation learning.  Menurut pengetahuan terbaik kami, kami melaporkan hasil terbaru pada tugas klasifikasi entiti bernama setengah diawasi. Kedua, kaedah pembelajaran satu tembakan jelas melebihi pendekatan pembelajaran pengulangan. Akhirnya, salah satu pelakon terbaik bergantung pada kerangka guru rata-rata (Tarvainen dan Valpola, 2017), pendekatan guru/pelajar sederhana yang bebas dari model khusus tugas.', 'lt': 'Neseniai pasiūlyta keletas pusiau prižiūrimų reprezentacinio mokymosi metodų, kuriais sušvelninami tradicinio įjungimo trūkumai: jie mažina semantinio judėjimo kiekį, nustatytą pakartotiniais metodais, pasitelkiant vienkartinį mokymąsi; others address the sparsity of data through the learning of custom, dense representation for the information modeled.  In this work, we are the first to adapt three of these methods, most of which have been originally proposed for image processing, to an information extraction task, specifically, named entity classification.  Be to, atliekame griežtą lyginamąją dviejų atskirų duomenų rinkinių analizę. Mūsų analizė rodo keletą svarbių pastabų. Pirma, visi reprezentacinio mokymosi metodai viršija moderniausius pusiau prižiūrimus metodus, kurie nesikliauja reprezentacinio mokymosi metodais. Mes, kiek žinome, pranešame apie naujausius naujausius rezultatus, susijusius su pusprižiūrima pavadinta subjekto klasifikavimo užduotimi. Antra, vienkartiniai mokymosi metodai akivaizdžiai viršija pakartotinius reprezentacinius mokymosi metodus. Galiausiai vienas geriausių rezultatų atlikėjų remiasi vidutiniu mokytojų pagrindu (Tarvainen ir Valpola, 2017 m.), paprastu mokytojų ir (arba) student ų požiūriu, kuris nepriklauso nuo konkrečiai užduotims skirto modelio.', 'ml': 'സാമ്പത്തികമായ ബൂട്ട്സ്ട്രാപ്പിങ്ങിന്റെ പിന്നിലുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d കുറച്ചുകൂടി പ്രോദ്യം ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്നു; ഒരു വെടി വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയാക്കിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പഠനത്തിലൂടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ സ്പെസിസിറ്റി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്ന് രീതികളെ മാറ്റാന്\u200d ആദ്യമാണ്, അതില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും ചിത്രം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പ്രാദേശിപ്പിച്ചത്, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് വ്യത്യസ്ത ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d ഒരു ഗുരുതരമായ പരിശോധന നടത്തുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ അന്വേഷണം കുറച്ച് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ട് വരുന്നു. ആദ്യം, പഠിക്കുന്ന എല്ലാ പ്രതിനിധികളും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കുന്ന തരത്തിന്റെ സെമി-സൂക്ഷ്മമാ നമ്മുടെ അറിവിന്റെ ഏറ്റവും മികച്ചത്തിലേക്ക്, നമ്മള്\u200d അവസാനത്തെ കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ അവസാന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു... .. Second, one-shot learning methods clearly outperform iterative representation learning approaches.  അവസാനം, ഏറ്റവും നല്ല പ്രവര്\u200dത്തകന്മാരില്\u200d ഒരാള്\u200d മാത്രം ടീച്ചര്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200d ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു (ടാര്\u200dവായിനും വാല്\u200dപോള, 2017), അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ പ്രത', 'mt': 'Dan l-aħħar ġew proposti diversi metodi ta’ tagħlim ta’ rappreżentanza semisupervizzata li jtaffu l-iżvantaġġi tal-bootstrapping tradizzjonali: inaqqsu l-ammont ta’ drift semantiku introdott permezz ta’ approċċi iterattivi permezz ta’ tagħlim b’darba waħda; oħrajn jindirizzaw l-iskarsezza tad-dejta permezz tat-tagħlim ta’ rappreżentanza personalizzata u densa għall-informazzjoni mmudellata. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna l-ewwel li nadattaw tliet minn dawn il-metodi, li l-biċċa l-kbira tagħhom oriġinarjament ġew proposti għall-ipproċessar tal-immaġni, għal kompitu ta’ estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni, speċifikament, imsejjaħ klassifikazzjoni tal-entità. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu analiżi komparattiva rigoruża fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta distinti. L-analiżi tagħna tagħna tagħti diversi osservazzjonijiet importanti. L-ewwel nett, il-metodi kollha tat-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza jaqbżu l-metodi semisuperviżi l-aktar avvanzati li ma jiddependux fuq it-tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza. Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, aħna nirrappurtaw l-aħħar riżultati l-aktar avvanzati dwar il-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni msemmi bħala entità semisuperviż. It-tieni nett, il-metodi ta’ tagħlim b’darba jaqbżu b’mod ċar l-approċċi ta’ tagħlim tar-rappreżentanza iterattiva. Lastly, one of the best performers relies on the mean teacher framework (Tarvainen and Valpola, 2017), a simple teacher/student approach that is independent of the underlying task-specific model.', 'no': 'Fleire semioversikte måtar for å lære representasjonar er nyleg foreslått å redusere uttrykk av tradisjonelle oppstartspunkt. Dei reduserer mengden av semantiske drift introduced av iterative tilnærmingar gjennom ein fotolæring. andre adresser sparsiteten av data gjennom læring av eigne, tett representasjon for informasjonen som er modelte. I denne arbeida er vi den første som tilpassar tre av desse metodane. Dei fleste av dei har første første for å handterane bilete, til eit informasjonspakking-oppgåve, spesielt entitetsklassifikasjon. I tillegg utfører vi ein streng sammenligning på to ulike datasett. Analysen vårt gjev fleire viktige observasjonar. Først utfører alle læringsmetodane for representasjon ut av halvoversikte metodane for kunsten som ikkje har tilgang til å lære representasjonar. I det beste veit vårt kunnskap rapporterer vi den siste tilstanden av kunsten på det semioversikte oppgåva med namnet entitetsklassifikasjon. Andre, læringsmetodar for ein foto er klart å utføra tilnærmingar for å lære gjentaktive representasjonar. Etter slutt, ein av dei beste utføringane er avhengig av gjennomsnittlige læringsrammeverket (Tarvainen og Valpola, 2017), ein enkel læringstilnærming/studenttilnærming som er uavhengig av den underliggende oppgåvespesifikke modellen.', 'pl': 'W ostatnim czasie zaproponowano kilka pół-nadzorowanych metod uczenia się reprezentacji, które łagodzą wady tradycyjnego bootstrappingu: zmniejszają ilość driftu semantycznego wprowadzanego przez iteracyjne podejścia poprzez uczenie się jednorazowe; Inne odnoszą się do słabości danych poprzez uczenie się niestandardowej, gęstej reprezentacji modelowanych informacji. W niniejszej pracy jako pierwsi dostosowaliśmy trzy z tych metod, z których większość została pierwotnie zaproponowana do przetwarzania obrazu, do zadania ekstrakcji informacji, a konkretnie klasyfikacji podmiotów. Ponadto przeprowadzamy rygorystyczną analizę porównawczą na dwóch odrębnych zbiorach danych. Nasza analiza daje kilka ważnych obserwacji. Po pierwsze, wszystkie metody uczenia się reprezentacji przewyższają najnowocześniejsze metody pół-nadzorowane, które nie opierają się na uczeniu się reprezentacji. Zgodnie z naszą najlepszą wiedzą raportujemy najnowsze wyniki dotyczące klasyfikacji podmiotów półnadzorowanych. Po drugie, jednorazowe metody uczenia się wyraźnie przewyższają iteracyjne metody uczenia się reprezentacji. Wreszcie jeden z najlepszych wyników opiera się na średnim ramie nauczyciela (Tarvainen i Valpola, 2017), prostym podejściu nauczyciela/ucznia, niezależnym od podstawowego modelu konkretnego zadania.', 'mn': 'Зарим төрлийн удирдлагатай үзүүлэлт суралцах аргыг саяхан санал болгосон нь уламжлалтын багасгал багасгах аргыг багасгаж байна: тэд нэг шалтгаан суралцах аргын давтагдсан хэмжээний хэмжээг багасгаж байна. бусад нь өгөгдлийн жинхэнэ хэмжээсүүдийг загварчлагдсан мэдээллийн загварын суралцах, жинхэнэ хэмжээсүүдийг дамжуулдаг. Энэ ажлын хувьд бид анхны гурван арга загвар зохион байгуулах хэрэгтэй. Ихэнх нь зураг үйлдвэрлэхэд анхны санал болсон. Ихэнх нь мэдээлэл татах ажил, ялангуяа биетийн хэлбэрээр нэрлэгддэг. Дараа нь бид хоёр ялгаатай өгөгдлийн сангийн тухай хатуу харьцуулсан шинжилгээ хийдэг. Бидний шинжилгээнд олон чухал ажиглалтуудыг гаргадаг. Эхлээд, бүх суралцах арга нь урлагийн хагас удирдах арга зэрэг илэрхийлэл суралцах сургуульд итгэдэггүй. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь бид бүтээгдэхүүний нэр төрлийн хуваалтын ажил дээр шинэ урлагийн үр дүнг тайлбарлаж байна. Хоёрт, нэг удаа суралцах арга нь ойлголт суралцах арга замыг илэрхийлж чадна. Эцэст нь, хамгийн сайн үйлдвэрлэгчдийн нэг нь багш нарын дундаж хэлбэрээр (Тарванен болон Валпола, 2017 г.), багш/оюутнуудын хандлагатай энгийн багш нарын арга загвараас хамааралтай.', 'sr': 'Nedavno je predloženo nekoliko metoda učenja predstavljanja polu-nadzornog zastupanja koji smanjuju neuspjeh tradicionalnih štampanja: smanjuju količinu semantičkog propasti uvedenog iterativnim pristupima kroz jednostavno učenje; Drugi se obrađuju rezervitetu podataka kroz učenje običnog, gustog predstavljanja za modeliranu informaciju. U ovom poslu, mi smo prvi koji prilagodimo tri metode, većina njih je prvo predložena za obradu slika, na zadatak izvlačenja informacija, posebno, klasifikaciju entiteta. Nadalje, izvršavamo tešku usporedbenu analizu na dva različita seta podataka. Naša analiza pruža nekoliko važnih promatranja. Prvo, sve metode učenja predstavljanja iznose metode polu nadzora umjetnosti koje se ne oslanjaju na učenje predstavljanja. Najbolje od našeg znanja, prijavljujemo najnovije rezultate umetnosti o polu nadzornom zadatku klasifikacije entiteta. Drugo, metode učenja jednostruke jasno iznosi iterativne pristupe učenja. Na kraju, jedan od najboljih izvođa ča se oslanja na srednji okvir učitelja (Tarvainen i Valpola, 2017), jednostavan pristup učitelja/studentima koji je nezavisan od temeljnog modela specifičnog zadatka.', 'ro': 'Recent au fost propuse mai multe metode de învățare a reprezentării semi-supravegheate care atenuează dezavantajele bootstrapping-ului tradițional: acestea reduc cantitatea de derivă semantică introdusă de abordări iterative prin învățare one-shot; Altele abordează cantitatea limitată a datelor prin învățarea unei reprezentări personalizate, dense pentru informațiile modelate. În această lucrare, suntem primii care adaptează trei dintre aceste metode, dintre care majoritatea au fost inițial propuse pentru procesarea imaginilor, la o sarcină de extragere a informațiilor, în special, clasificarea entităților denumite. Mai mult, efectuăm o analiză comparativă riguroasă pe două seturi de date distincte. Analiza noastră face câteva observaţii importante. În primul rând, toate metodele de învățare a reprezentării depășesc metodele semi-supravegheate de ultimă oră care nu se bazează pe învățarea reprezentării. Din câte știm, raportăm cele mai recente rezultate de ultimă oră privind sarcina de clasificare a entităților numite semi-supravegheată. În al doilea rând, metodele de învățare unică depășesc în mod clar abordările de învățare iterativă a reprezentării. În cele din urmă, unul dintre cei mai buni performanți se bazează pe cadrul mediu al profesorilor (Tarvainen și Valpola, 2017), o abordare simplă profesor/elev, independentă de modelul specific sarcinii subiacente.', 'sv': 'Flera halvﾃｶvervakade metoder fﾃｶr representationsinlﾃ､rning har nyligen fﾃｶreslagits fﾃｶr att mildra nackdelarna med traditionell bootstrapping: de minskar mﾃ､ngden semantisk drift som introduceras genom iterativa metoder genom one-shot lﾃ､rande. Andra behandlar sparheten i data genom att lﾃ､ra sig anpassade, tﾃ､ta representationer fﾃｶr den information som modelleras. I detta arbete ﾃ､r vi fﾃｶrst med att anpassa tre av dessa metoder, varav de flesta ursprungligen fﾃｶreslagits fﾃｶr bildbehandling, till en informationsutvinningsuppgift, specifikt kallad entitetsklassificering. Vidare utfﾃｶr vi en rigorﾃｶs jﾃ､mfﾃｶrande analys pﾃ･ tvﾃ･ olika datauppsﾃ､ttningar. Vﾃ･r analys ger flera viktiga observationer. Fﾃｶr det fﾃｶrsta ﾃｶvertrﾃ､ffar alla representationsinlﾃ､rningsmetoder de senaste halvﾃｶvervakade metoderna som inte ﾃ､r beroende av representationsinlﾃ､rning. Sﾃ･ vitt vi vet rapporterar vi de senaste resultaten av den halvﾃｶvervakade klassificeringsuppgiften fﾃｶr namngivna enheter. Fﾃｶr det andra ﾃｶvertrﾃ､ffar engﾃ･ngsinlﾃ､rningsmetoder tydligt iterativa representationsinlﾃ､rningsmetoder. Slutligen fﾃｶrlitar sig en av de bﾃ､st presterande pﾃ･ medellﾃ､rarramverket (Tarvainen och Valpola, 2017), ett enkelt lﾃ､rare/studentfﾃｶrhﾃ･llningssﾃ､tt som ﾃ､r oberoende av den underliggande uppgiftsspecifika modellen.', 'si': 'කිහිපයක් සාමාන්\u200dය බලාපොරොත්තු ප්\u200dරධානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙනවා කියලා සාමාන්\u200dය බුට්ස්ට්\u200dරැප්ප් එක අනිත් අනිත් අනිත් දත්තේ ප්\u200dරතික්ෂිතත්වය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක, ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන මේ වැඩේ අපි මුලින්ම මේ විධානයක් තුන්දෙනෙක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන්, ඒ වගේම ගොඩක් පින්තූර පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පින්තූර පරී තවත්, අපි විශේෂ දත්ත සෙට් දෙකක් ගැන සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරනවා. අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය වැදගත් වැදගත් බලන්න පුළුවන්. මුලින්ම, හැම ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක්ම ඉගෙන ගන්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිනිධාන විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක අපේ දැනගන්න හොඳම දේවල් වලට, අපි අලුත් ස්ථානයේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති දෙවෙනි විදියට, එක විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න විදියට පැහැදිලි විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්  අන්තිමේදී, හොඳම කරුණාකරුවරුන්ගේ එක්කෙනෙක් අමාරු ගුරුණු ප්\u200dරවේශකය (Tarvanien සහ Valpola, 2017), සාමාන්\u200dය ගුරුණු ගුරුණු සහ විද්\u200d', 'so': 'Dhab ahaan waxaa loo soo jeeday qaabab waxbarasho oo la ilaaliyey qaar ka mid ah oo loo soo jeeday, si uu ugu dhaqdhaqaaqo dib u dhigo dib u dhigista boosaska asalka ah: waxay hoosaysiiyaan tirada qalabka semantika ah oo lagu soo bandhigay barashada hal ganacsi ah; Qaar kale waxay macluumaadka ku sheekeystaan dhamaantooda waxbarashada caafimaadka, noocyada macluumaadka oo la sameynayo. In this work, we are the first to adapt three of these methods, most of which have been originally proposed for image processing, to an information extraction task, specifically, named entity classification.  Furthermore, waxaynu sameynaa baaritaan siman oo si adag ah oo ku qoran labada kooban oo macluumaad kala duduwan. Analyadeenna wuxuu keenaa aragti badan oo muhiim ah. Marka ugu horeysa, dhammaan qaababta waxbarashada lagu barto waxay soo saaraan hababka lagu ilaaliyo oo aan ku xirnayn waxbarashada wakiilka ah. Tan ugu wanaagsan aqoonteenna, waxaynu u wargelinaynaa arimaha ugu dambeeya ee arimaha farshaxanka ee la ilaaliyey shaqada fasaxa ee jaamacadda. Second, qaababka waxbarashada hal suurad ah ayaa si cad u muujiya qaababka barbaarinta waxyaabaha leh. Ugu dambaysta, mid ka mid ah kuwa ugu fiican shaqeeya ayaa ku xiran kara nooca macallinka dhexe (Tarvainen iyo Valpola, 2017), waa qaab fudud oo macallin/arday oo ku xor ah sameynta shuqulka hoose u qoran.', 'ta': 'பல பாதி கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட படிப்பு முறைமைகள் சமீபத்தில் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மரபார்ந்த துவக்கத்தின் பின்பக்கத்தை குறைக்கவும்: உருவாக்கும் முறைய மற்றவர்கள் வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட தகவல்களுக்கான தனிப்பயன் கற்றத்தை மூலம் தரவின் தனிப்படுத்தலை மூலம் குறிப்பிடுகிறது. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் முதலில் இந்த மூன்று முறைகளை ஒப்புக்கொள்ள முடியும், அதில் பெரும்பாலானவர்கள் பிம்பத்தை செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு, தகவல் பெ மேலும், நாம் இரண்டு வித்தியாசமான தரவுத்தளங்களில் ஒரு சரியான ஒப்பீட்டு ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். எங்கள் ஆய்வு பல முக்கியமான பார்வைகளை கொடுக்கிறது. முதலில், அனைத்து குறிப்பிடும் கற்றல் முறைகளையும் கலை நிலையில் இருந்து அரை கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட முறைகளையும் செயல்படுத்து எங்கள் அறிவின் சிறந்த முடிவுக்கு, நாங்கள் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் வகைப்படுத்தல் செயல்களின் சமீபத்திய நிலையில் - கலை முடிவுகளை அற இரண்டாவது, Lastly, one of the best performers relies on the mean teacher framework (Tarvainen and Valpola, 2017), a simple teacher/student approach that is independent of the underlying task-specific model.', 'ur': 'بہت سی نصف نظارت کی تعلیم کی طریقے اخیر سے پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں کہ سنتی بوٹ سٹرپٹ کے پچھلوں کو کم کر دیتے ہیں: وہ ایک شٹ کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ ایک دھوپ کے ذریعہ ایک دھوپ کے ذریعہ معلوم کیے گئے سیمنٹی ڈریفوٹ کی مقدار اور دوسرے لوگ ایسے معلومات کے مطابق ڈیٹوں کی سستی کی تعلیم کے ذریعہ مطابق کرتے ہیں، نمودار معلومات کے لئے گہرے معلومات کے مطابق۔ اس کام میں ہم سب سے پہلے ان تین طریقوں کو اضافہ کرنے والے ہیں، ان میں سے اکثر کو تصویر پردازی کے لئے پیشنهاد کی گئی ہے، ایک معلومات اضافہ کا کام، مخصوصاً ایک entity classification کے لئے۔ اور ہم دو مختلف ڈاٹ سٹ پر ایک سخت مقایسہ تحلیل کریں گے۔ ہمارا تحلیل بہت اہم نظر آتا ہے۔ پہلے، تمام نمونات کی تعلیم کی طریقوں کی استیٹ کی نصف نظارت کی طریقے سے کام لیتے ہیں جو نمونات کی تعلیم پر اعتماد نہیں رکھتے۔ ہمارے سب سے بہترین علم کے لئے، ہم نے اچھی حالت کی تصویر کے نتیجے کو نصف نظارت کے نام کے ذریعے ایک ٹیٹی کلاسپیٹ کے کام پر گزارے ہیں. دوسرا، ایک شیٹ سیکھنے کی طریقے واضح طور پر دوبارہ سیکھنے کی طریقے سے زیادہ پائیں گے۔ بالآخر، سب سے بہترین عمل کرنے والوں میں سے ایک متوسط استاد فرم پر اعتماد ہے (Tarvainen اور Valpola, 2017), ایک ساده استاد/طالب طریقہ ہے جو زیادہ مشخص کام سے بے نیاز ہے.', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'pchilik taʼminlovchi o'rganish usullarini o'rganish uchun o'rganish usullarini o'zgartirish talab qilindi. Ular bir marta o'rganish orqali o'rganish orqali o'zgartiradigan semantik jarayonlarini kamaytirish mumkin; Boshqa maʼlumot modelidagi foydalanuvchi, chegara taʼminlovchi maʼlumotni o'rganishdan foydalanish mumkin. Bu ishda biz uchta usullarni o'zgartirish uchun birinchi bo'lgan, ularning ko'pchiligi rasmni boshqarish uchun, ma'lumotni ajratish vazifasiga, hususiyat to ʻgʻri tizimga nomlangan. Further, we perform a rigorous comparative analysis on two distinct datasets.  Analyzeriz bir necha muhim ko'rinishga ega. Birinchisi, hamma ta'lim o'rganish usullarini o'rganish holatini saqlash, semi-supervised usullarini bajaradi. Ular o'rganishga ishonchini ishlatmaydi. Biz haqida eng yaxshi taʼminlovchi bo'lsa, biz haqida taʼminlovchi narsalar natijasi haqida taʼminlovchi narsa haqida xabar beramiz. Ikkinchi marta, bitta o'rganish usullari o'rganishni tajriba qilish usullarini o'rganishni o'rganishga tayyorlaydi. Ya'ni, eng eng eng yaxshi ishlatuvchidan biri o'qituvchi o'quvchiga (Tarvainen va Valpola, 2017) o'qituvchi o'qituvchi/o'qituvchi o'qituvchi asosiy vazifa modeli muhit emas.", 'vi': 'Gần đây đã có nhiều phương pháp giáo dục gần giống như giám sát để giảm bớt sự cản trở của việc khởi động truyền thống: chúng giảm mức độ di chuyển theo ngữ pháp theo cách lặp lại qua việc học một phát bắn; Những người khác xử lý sơ suất của dữ liệu qua việc học về các mô tả đặc biệt, mật độ theo mẫu thông tin. Trong công việc này, chúng ta là những người đầu tiên thích ứng ba trong số những phương pháp này, hầu hết đều được đề xuất ban đầu cho việc xử lý hình ảnh, với một nhiệm vụ khai thác thông tin, đặc biệt là phân loại thực thể có tên. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi thực hiện một phân tích tỉ mỉ về hai bộ dữ liệu khác nhau. Phân tích của chúng tôi đưa ra nhiều quan điểm. Thứ nhất, mọi phương pháp dạy đại diện vượt xa các phương pháp bán giám sát hàng đầu tiên mà không dựa vào học đại diện. Theo những gì chúng tôi biết, chúng tôi báo cáo kết quả hiện đại nhất về nhiệm vụ phân hạng đơn vị được giám sát gần nhất. Thứ hai, phương pháp học một phát rõ ràng diễn ra ngoài các phương pháp học phân tích. Một trong những diễn viên giỏi nhất dựa vào giới hạn giáo viên trung bình (Tarvai và Valpola, Ngực Ngực Ngực), một cách thức đơn giản là giáo viên/sinh viên độc lập với mô hình đặc trưng cho nhiệm.', 'bg': 'Наскоро бяха предложени няколко метода на полунадзорно обучение за представяне, които смекчават недостатъците на традиционното зареждане: те намаляват количеството семантичен дрифт, въведен от итеративните подходи чрез еднократно обучение; други разглеждат оскъдността на данните чрез изучаване на персонализирано, плътно представяне за моделираната информация. В тази работа ние сме първите, адаптирали три от тези методи, повечето от които са първоначално предложени за обработка на изображения, към задача за извличане на информация, по-конкретно наименувана класификация на обекти. Освен това извършваме строг сравнителен анализ на два отделни набора от данни. Анализът ни дава няколко важни наблюдения. Първо, всички методи за представително обучение надминават най-съвременните полу-надзорни методи, които не разчитат на представително обучение. Доколкото знаем, ние отчитаме най-новите резултати по полунадзорната задача за класификация на наименованите субекти. Второ, методите за обучение с един изстрел ясно превъзхождат итеративните подходи за обучение с представяне. И накрая, един от най-добрите участници разчита на средната рамка на учителите (Тарвайнен и Валпола, 2017), прост подход учител/студент, който е независим от основния модел, специфичен за задачата.', 'nl': 'Verschillende semi-supervised representation learning methodes zijn onlangs voorgesteld die de nadelen van traditionele bootstrapping verminderen: ze verminderen de hoeveelheid semantische drift die wordt geïntroduceerd door iteratieve benaderingen via one-shot learning; Anderen behandelen de schaarse hoeveelheid gegevens door het leren van aangepaste, dichte representatie voor de gemodelleerde informatie. In dit werk zijn we de eerste die drie van deze methoden, waarvan de meeste oorspronkelijk zijn voorgesteld voor beeldverwerking, aanpassen aan een informatieextractietaak, met name de benaming entiteitsclassificatie. Verder voeren we een rigoureuze vergelijkende analyse uit op twee verschillende datasets. Onze analyse levert een aantal belangrijke observaties op. Ten eerste presteren alle representatie leermethoden beter dan state-of-the-art semi-supervised methoden die niet afhankelijk zijn van representatie learning. Voor zover wij weten, rapporteren wij de laatste state-of-the-art resultaten over de semi-supervisored named entity classification taak. Ten tweede presteren one-shot leermethoden duidelijk beter dan iteratieve representatie leerbenaderingen. Tot slot vertrouwt een van de beste performers op het gemiddelde lerarenkader (Tarvainen en Valpola, 2017), een eenvoudige leraar/student benadering die onafhankelijk is van het onderliggende taakspecifieke model.', 'da': 'Flere semi-overvågede repræsentationslæringsmetoder er blevet foreslået for nylig, der mindsker ulemperne ved traditionel bootstrapping: de reducerer mængden af semantisk drift introduceret af iterative tilgange gennem one-shot læring; Andre behandler sparsommeligheden af data gennem læring af brugerdefinerede, tætte repræsentationer for de oplysninger, der modelleres. I dette arbejde er vi de første til at tilpasse tre af disse metoder, hvoraf de fleste oprindeligt er blevet foreslået til billedbehandling, til en informationsudvindingsopgave, specifikt navngivet entitetsklassificering. Derudover udfører vi en streng sammenlignende analyse på to forskellige datasæt. Vores analyse giver adskillige vigtige observationer. For det første er alle repræsentationslæringsmetoder bedre end state-of-the-art semi-supervised metoder, der ikke er afhængige af repræsentationslæring. Så vidt vi ved, rapporterer vi de seneste state-of-the-art resultater på den halvovervågede navngivne enhedsklassifikationsopgave. For det andet overgår one-shot læringsmetoder tydeligt iterative repræsentationslæringsmetoder. Endelig er en af de bedste resultater afhængig af den gennemsnitlige lærerramme (Tarvainen og Valpola, 2017), en enkel lærer/studerende tilgang, der er uafhængig af den underliggende opgavespecifikke model.', 'de': 'In letzter Zeit wurden mehrere semi-ﾃｼberwachte Reprﾃ､sentationslernmethoden vorgeschlagen, die die Nachteile des traditionellen Bootstrapping mindern: Sie reduzieren die Menge der semantischen Drift, die durch iterative Ansﾃ､tze durch One-Shot-Lernen eingefﾃｼhrt wird; Andere befassen sich mit der Knappheit von Daten durch das Erlernen einer benutzerdefinierten, dichten Darstellung der modellierten Informationen. In dieser Arbeit sind wir die ersten, die drei dieser Methoden, von denen die meisten ursprﾃｼnglich fﾃｼr die Bildverarbeitung vorgeschlagen wurden, an eine Informationsextraktionsaufgabe anpassen, insbesondere die benannte Entitﾃ､tsklassifizierung. Darﾃｼber hinaus fﾃｼhren wir eine rigorose vergleichende Analyse zweier unterschiedlicher Datensﾃ､tze durch. Unsere Analyse liefert einige wichtige Beobachtungen. Erstens ﾃｼbertreffen alle Reprﾃ､sentationslernmethoden modernste semi-ﾃｼberwachte Methoden, die nicht auf Reprﾃ､sentationslernen angewiesen sind. Nach bestem Wissen berichten wir ﾃｼber den neuesten Stand der Technik ﾃｼber die semi-beaufsichtigte Klassifikationsaufgabe benannter Entitﾃ､ten. Zweitens ﾃｼbertreffen One-Shot-Lernmethoden deutlich iterative Reprﾃ､sentation-Lernansﾃ､tze. Schlieﾃ殕ich stﾃｼtzt sich einer der leistungsfﾃ､higsten Lehrer auf das mittlere Lehrer-Framework (Tarvainen und Valpola, 2017), ein einfacher Lehrer/Schﾃｼler-Ansatz, der unabhﾃ､ngig vom zugrunde liegenden aufgabenspezifischen Modell ist.', 'id': 'Beberapa metode pembelajaran yang semi-diawasi telah diusulkan akhir-akhir ini untuk mengurangi kelemahan dari bootstrapping tradisional: mereka mengurangi jumlah drift semantis yang diperkenalkan oleh pendekatan iteratif melalui pembelajaran satu-shot; yang lainnya mengatasi kecepatan data melalui pembelajaran waktunya, representation padat untuk informasi yang dipodelkan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kita adalah yang pertama untuk mengadaptasi tiga dari metode ini, yang sebagian besar telah diusulkan untuk proses gambar, untuk tugas ekstraksi informasi, secara khusus, klasifikasi entitas bernama. Selain itu, kami melakukan analisis perbandingan yang ketat pada dua set data yang berbeda. Analisi kami memberikan beberapa pengamatan penting. Pertama, semua metode pembelajaran perwakilan melebihi metode semi-mengawasi state-of-the-art yang tidak bergantung pada pembelajaran perwakilan. Untuk yang terbaik dari pengetahuan kita, kita melaporkan hasil terbaru pada tugas klasifikasi entitas bernama setengah diawasi. Kedua, satu-shot metode pembelajaran jelas melebihi pendekatan pembelajaran repetitif. Akhirnya, salah satu penampilan terbaik bergantung pada cadangan guru rata-rata (Tarvainen dan Valpola, 2017), pendekatan guru/siswa sederhana yang bebas dari model tugas-spesifik yang didasarkan.', 'sw': 'Hivi karibuni, mbinu za kujifunza zinazofuatiliwa na mamlaka za sekondari zimependekezwa kuwa kupunguza upande wa vifaa vya kitamaduni: wanapunguza kiwango cha mbinu za sekondari zilizoanzishwa na njia za vifaa vya vifaa kwa njia ya kujifunza kwa picha moja; Wengine wanazungumzia ukosefu wa taarifa kupitia kujifunza utamaduni, uwakilishi wa kina kwa taarifa zilizotengenezwa. Katika kazi hii, sisi ni wa kwanza kubadilisha mbinu hizi tatu, ambazo wengi wao wamependekezwa kwa ajili ya kuchukua picha, kwa juhudi la utoaji habari, hususani kwa jina la kutangaza sifa. Zaidi ya hayo, tunafanya uchambuzi wa kulinganisha katika seti mbili tofauti za data. Uchambuzi wetu unatoa maoni kadhaa muhimu. Kwanza, mbinu zote za kujifunza zinazotumia mbinu za aina za aina ya aina ya sanaa zinazofuatiliwa na watu ambao hawategemea kujifunza. Kwa ufahamu mzuri zaidi, tunaripoti matokeo ya hivi karibuni ya hali ya sanaa juu ya jukumu la usambazaji wa entity. Pili, mbinu za kujifunza zilizopigwa moja kwa moja zinaonyesha namna ambazo uwakilishaji wa vifaa vya kujifunza vizuri. Mwisho, mmoja wa watendaji bora wanategemea mfumo wa msingi wa mwalimu (Tarvainen na Valpola, 2017), mbinu rahisi za mwalimu/wanafunzi ambao hujitegemea na mtindo wa msingi wa kazi.', 'ko': '최근에 사람들은 몇 가지 반감독 표시 학습 방법으로 전통적인 자진의 단점을 완화시켰다. 그들은 일회성 학습을 통해 교체 방법이 도입한 의미 표이량을 감소시킨다.다른 사람들은 모델링 정보에 대한 맞춤형, 밀집 표시에 대한 학습을 통해 데이터의 희소성을 해결한다.이 작업에서 우리는 그 중 세 가지 방법(그중 대부분이 최초로 이미지 처리를 위해 제기된)을 정보 추출 임무에 응용한 첫 번째 사람이다. 구체적으로 말하면 이 세 가지 방법을 실체 분류라고 부른다.그 밖에 우리는 두 개의 서로 다른 데이터 집합에 대해 엄격한 비교 분석을 진행하였다.우리의 분석은 몇 가지 중요한 관찰 결과를 얻어냈다.우선, 모든 표징 학습 방법은 표징 학습에 의존하지 않는 최신 반감독 방법보다 우수하다.우리가 아는 바에 의하면, 우리는 반감독 명명 실체 분류 임무의 최신 연구 결과를 보고했다.그 다음으로 일회성 학습 방법은 반복적으로 학습 방법을 나타내는 것보다 현저히 낫다.마지막으로 가장 잘 표현된 교사 중 하나는 평균 교사 구조(Tarvainen과Valpola, 2017)에 의존한다. 이것은 간단한 교사/학생 방법으로 잠재적인 임무 특정 모델에 독립한다.', 'fa': 'اخیراً چند روش یادگیری نماینده\u200cهای نیمه\u200cنظارت را پیشنهاد داده می\u200cشود که کم\u200cسازی کم\u200cسازی دستگاه\u200cهای سنتی را کاهش می\u200cدهد: آنها مقدار دستگاه\u200cهای semantic را با دستگاه\u200cهای تکراری با یادگیری یک شات معرفی می\u200cکنند. بقیه\u200cها از طریق یادگیری سفارشی، نمایش محکمی برای مدل\u200cشده اطلاعات را دریافت می\u200cکنند. در این کار، ما اولین نفر هستیم که سه تا از این روش را تغییر دهیم، بیشتر از آن برای پرداخت تصویر پیشنهاد شده\u200cاند، به یک کار خارج کردن اطلاعات، مخصوصاً به عنوان کلیسازی entity. بعلاوه، ما یک تحلیل مقایسه سخت در دو مجموعه داده متفاوت انجام می دهیم. تحلیل ما چندتا مشاهده مهم را می دهد. اول، همه روش\u200cهای یادگیری نمایش\u200cدهنده\u200cها از روش\u200cهای نیمه\u200cنظارت هنری که به یادگیری نمایش\u200cدهنده اعتماد نمی\u200cکنند. به بهترین اطلاعات ما، آخرین نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت هنری را بر روی وضعیت شناسایی شرکت\u200cهای نیمه\u200cبررسی\u200cشده گزارش می\u200cدهیم. دوم، روش\u200cهای یادگیری یک بار مشخصا بیشتر از نزدیک یادگیری\u200cهای تکراری را انجام می\u200cدهد. بالاخره، یکی از بهترین نمایش\u200cکنندگان بر چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها', 'tr': 'Ýakynda birnäçe semi-gözlemli temsiller öwrenmek taryşlaryny çalyşyrylýar. Däpli göçüp atmagynyň çekilmesini azaltýarlar: birer atly öwrenmek bilen tanyş edilen semantik drift şeklinde iteratif öwrenmek üçin azaltýarlar. Başgalar şahsy öwrenmek üçin maglumatyň ýagtylygyny çykarýarlar. Bu işde biz ilkinji gezek üçi nusgala geçirmek üçin birinjisi, olaryň köpüsi surat işlemek üçin teklip edildi. Munuň köpüsi surat işlemek üçin, olaryň daşyny açmak täblisasyna ad berildi. Mundan soňra, biz iki üýtgeşik veri setirlerinde ýok bir karşılaştyrma çözümleri çykarýarys. Biziň analýusymyz birnäçe wajyp dyşyklary täsir edýär. Öncelikle, bütün temsiller öğrenme yöntemlerini temsil öğrenmesine ynanmayan tarzdan üstün edýärler. Bilgimiziň iň gowy görä, biz esasy taryhyň netijesini ýa-glam taýýarlama işine görkeýäris. Ikinjisi, bir taýdan öwrenmek yöntemleri tekrarly öwrenmek üçin ýakynlaşykdan başarmaýar. Iň soňunda, iň gowy çykyşçylardan biri ýagdaý mugallymyň çerçevesinden (Tarvainen we Valpola, 2017), taýýarlanan taýýarlama/okuwçylardan dowam edýän basit mugallym/okuwçylardan daşary.', 'sq': 'Disa metoda të mësimit të përfaqësimit gjysmë-mbikqyrur janë propozuar kohët e fundit që lehtësojnë dëmtimet e kërcimeve tradicionale: ato reduktojnë sasinë e kërcimeve semantike të futura nga qasjet iterative nëpërmjet mësimit me një gjuajtje; të tjerët trajtojnë pakësinë e të dhënave nëpërmjet mësimit të përfaqësimit të zakonshëm dhe të dendur për informacionin e modeluar. Në këtë punë, ne jemi të parët që përshtatemi tre nga këto metoda, shumica e të cilave janë propozuar fillimisht për përpunimin e imazheve, ndaj një detyre të nxjerrjes së informacionit, veçan ërisht, klasifikimit të njësisë së quajtur. Për më tepër, ne bëjmë një analizë rigoroze krahasuese në dy grupe të dhënash të veçanta. Analiza jonë sjell disa vëzhgime të rëndësishme. Së pari, të gjitha metodat e përfaqësimit të mësimit kalojnë metodat gjysmë-mbikqyrura më të larta që nuk mbështeten në mësimin e përfaqësimit. Për më të mirën nga njohuritë tona, ne raportojmë rezultatet më të fundit të state-of-the-art në detyrën gjysmë-mbikqyrur e klasifikimit të njësisë së quajtur. Së dyti, metodat e mësimit me një mundësi jashtëzakonisht kalojnë qasjet e përfaqësimit iterativ të mësimit. Lastly, one of the best performers relies on the mean teacher framework (Tarvainen and Valpola, 2017), a simple teacher/student approach that is independent of the underlying task-specific model.', 'am': 'በአሁኑ ዘመን የባሕላዊ የቡት ምርጫዎች ጀርባ እንዲያጎድል የተዘጋጀ ብዙዎች ተማሪዎች ሥርዓቶችን በመቀናቀል ተዘጋጅተዋል፤ በአንድ ተማሪ የተደረገውን የsemantic ደረጃ ያጎድልበታል፡፡ ሌሎችም የዳታ ቁጥጥር ለመማር፣ የመረጃ መረጃዎችን ለመጠቀም ጥልቅ መልዕክት ይናገራሉ፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ ሦስት ዓይነቶች ለመቀላቀል መጀመሪያ ነን፣ አብዛኞቻቸው ለመጀመሪያ የምስል ማቀናቀል ተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ ከዚህም ጋር ሁለት በተለየ ዳታተሮች ላይ አካባቢ አስተያየትን እናደርጋለን፡፡ ትምህርታችን ብዙ አስፈላጊ ጦማሪያዎች ነው፡፡ First, all representation learning methods outperform state-of-the-art semi-supervised methods that do not rely on representation learning.  ወደምናውቀው ወደሚሻለው ነገር፣ የአሁኑን የዐርብ ፍሬዎች የግንኙነት አካል መግለጫ ስራትን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በሁለተኛው፣ አንዲት ደረጃ ትምህርት ሥርዓት ትምህርት ትምህርት መግለጫ ይደረጋል፡፡ በመጨረሻው ከዋነኛው ተሟጋቾች አንዱ ጥሩ አስተማሪው ፍሬም (ታርዋinen እና valpola, 2017), ዋነኛ አስተማሪ/ተማሪ ጥያቄ ከዋናው ስራ-ቁጥጥር ምሳሌ የተለየ ቀላል ነው፡፡', 'af': "Verskeie semi-ondersoekte verteenwoordigheidsverdighede is onlangs voorgestel dat die onttrekkings van tradisionele boot-strapping verklein word: hulle verklein die hoeveelheid semantiese dryf wat deur iteratiewe toegange deur een-skoot leer ingestel word; hulle het 'n verskeie semi-ondersoekte ondersoek geword deu ander adres die sparsiteit van data deur die leer van pasmaak, dens voorsiening vir die inligting modeleer. In hierdie werk is ons die eerste om drie van hierdie metode te pas, waarvan die meeste van hulle oorspronklik voorgestel is vir beeldverwerking, na 'n inligting uittrek taak, spesifieke, genoem entiteitklasifikasie. Verder, ons doen 'n rige vergelykbare analisie op twee eienskaplike datastelle. Ons analisie gee verskeie belangrike observasies. Eerste, alle voorstelling leer metodes uitvoer staat-van-die-kuns semi-ondersoekte metodes wat nie op voorstelling leer vertrou nie. Op die beste van ons kennis, rapporteer ons die nuutste state-of-the-art resultate op die semi-superviseerde entiteitklassifikasie taak. Tweede, een-skoot leer metodes duidelik uitvoer iteratiewe voorstelling onderstelling toegang. Eindelik, een van die beste uitvoerders lig op die gemiddelde onderwyser raamwerk (Tarvainen en Valpola, 2017), â\x80\x99n eenvoudige onderwyser/studente toegang wat onafhanklik is van die onderwysende taak-spesifieke model.", 'hr': 'Nedavno je predloženo nekoliko metoda učenja predstavljanja polu nadzora kako bi smanjilo neuspjeh tradicionalnih štampanja: smanjili su količinu semantičkog štampanja uvođenu iterativnim pristupima jednosnim učenjem; Drugi rješavaju rezervnost podataka kroz učenje običnog, gustog predstavljanja za modelirane informacije. U ovom poslu, mi smo prvi koji prilagodimo tri od tih metoda, od kojih je većina prvo predložena za obradu slika, na zadatak izvlačenja informacija, posebno klasifikaciju entitata. Nadalje, izvršavamo tešku usporedbenu analizu na dva različita podataka. Naša analiza donosi nekoliko važnih promatranja. Prvo, sva metoda učenja predstavljanja iznosi polu nadzorne metode države umjetnosti koje se ne oslanjaju na učenje predstavljanja. Najbolje od naših znanja, prijavljamo najnovije rezultate umjetnosti o polu nadzornom zadatku klasifikacije entiteta. Drugo, metode jednosnijeg učenja očigledno iznose pristupe učenja iterativnog predstavljanja. Na kraju, jedan od najboljih izvođa ča se oslanja na srednji okvir učitelja (Tarvainen i Valpola, 2017), jednostavan pristup učitelja/učitelja koji je nezavisan od temeljnog modela specifičnog zadatka.', 'hy': 'Վերջերս առաջարկվել են մի քանի կիսակառավարվող ուսումնասիրության մեթոդներ, որոնք նվազեցնում են ավանդական կոճակների բացակայությունները. նրանք նվազեցնում են սեմանտիկ փոփոխությունները, որոնք ներդրվում են կրկնվող մոտեցումների միջոցով մեկ անգամ սովորելու others address the sparsity of data through the learning of custom, dense representation for the information modeled.  Այս աշխատանքի մեջ մենք առաջիններն ենք, ովքեր հարմարեցնում են այս երեք մեթոդները, որոնցից շատերը սկզբնական առաջարկում են պատկերների վերամշակման համար, տեղեկատվության վերացման խնդիրներին, հատկապես, անվանված էության դասակարգման: Ավելին, մենք կատարում ենք խիստ համեմատական վերլուծություն երկու տարբեր տվյալների համակարգերի վրա: Մեր վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս մի քանի կարևոր հետազոտություններ: First, all representation learning methods outperform state-of-the-art semi-supervised methods that do not rely on representation learning.  Մեր լավագույն գիտելիքներից, մենք զեկուցում ենք ամենավերջին արդյունքները կես-վերահսկված անհատականության դասակարգման խնդրի մասին: Երկրորդ, մեկ անգամ ուսուցման մեթոդները պարզապես գերազանցում են կրկնվող ներկայացման ուսուցման մոտեցումները: Վերջապես, լավագույն ներկայացուցիչներից մեկը հիմնված է ուսուցիչների միջին շրջանակի վրա (Թարվայնենը և Վալպոլան 2017 թվականին), մի պարզ ուսուցիչ-ուսանողի մոտեցում, որը անկախ է խնդիրներից յուրաքանչյուրից:', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি বেশ কয়েকটি প্রতিনিধিত্ব প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রস্তাব প্রদান করা হয়েছে যে ঐতিহ্যবাহী বুটস্ট্র্যাপিং পিছনের পশ্চাদগুলোকে কমিয়ে দেয়া: এক গুলি শি অন্যরা স্বনির্বাচিত তথ্যের মোডেলের জন্য তথ্য শিখার মাধ্যমে তথ্যের স্প্রিস্টিসিটি ব্যবহার করে। এই কাজে আমরা প্রথমে এই ধরনের তিনটি পদ্ধতিকে মেনে নিতে পারি, যাদের বেশীরভাগ ছবি প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, তথ্য বের করার জন্য, বিশেষ করে য এছাড়াও, আমরা দুই বিভিন্ন ডাটাসেটের উপর একটি কঠিন তুলনামূলক বিশ্লেষণ করি। আমাদের বিশ্লেষণ বেশ কয়েকটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পর্যবেক্ষণ প্রদান করে। প্রথমত, সকল প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি শিক্ষা শিক্ষা প্রক্রিয়ার রাষ্ট্রের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের ক্ আমাদের জ্ঞানের সবচেয়ে ভালোর জন্য, আমরা সাম্প্রতিক পরিস্থিতি সম্পর্কে সংবাদ প্রদান করি যে সেমি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হয়েছে সেই বস্তুর Second, one-shot learning methods clearly outperform iterative representation learning approaches.  অবশেষে, সবচেয়ে ভালো কর্মকর্তার মধ্যে একজন মানুষের শিক্ষক ফ্রেমের উপর নির্ভর করে (তারভাইন এবং ভ্যালোপোলা, ২০১৭), একটি সাধারণ শিক্ষক/ছাত্রের ক্ষেত্র', 'bs': 'Nedavno je predloženo nekoliko metoda učenja predstavljanja polu-nadzornog zastupanja koji smanjuju nedostatke tradicionalnog štampanja: smanjuju količinu semantičkog štampanja uvođenog iterativnim pristupima kroz jednostavno učenje; Drugi se bave rezervitetom podataka kroz učenje običnog, gustog predstavljanja za modeliranu informaciju. U ovom poslu, mi smo prvi koji prilagodimo tri od tih metoda, većina njih je prvo predložena za obradu slika, na zadatak izvlačenja informacija, posebno, klasifikaciju entiteta. Dalje, izvršimo strogu usporedbenu analizu na dva različita dataseta. Naša analiza donosi nekoliko važnih promatranja. Prvo, sve metode učenja predstavljanja iznose metode polu nadzora umjetnosti koje se ne oslanjaju na učenje predstavljanja. Najbolje od našeg znanja, prijavljamo najnovije rezultate umjetnosti o polu nadzornom zadatku klasifikacije entiteta. Drugo, metode učenja jednostruke očigledno iznose pristupe učenja iterativnog predstavljanja. Na kraju, jedan od najboljih izvođa ča se oslanja na srednji okvir učitelja (Tarvainen i Valpola, 2017), jednostavan pristup učitelja/učitelja koji je nezavisan od temeljnog modela specifičnog zadatka.', 'az': 'Birçox yarı-gözləyirli təhsil öyrənmə metodları yenidən təklif edilmişdir ki, tradisyonal bootstrapping tərəfindən çəkilməsini zəifləyir: onlar bir dəfə öyrənmək vasitəsilə iterativ tərəfindən təhrif edilmiş semantik drift sayısını azaldırlar. digərləri məlumatların tərzi öyrənməsi ilə, modellərin yoxluq göstərilməsi ilə məlumatların küçük səviyyətini çəkirlər. Bu işdə, biz bu üç metodlardan ilk uyğunlaşdırılacağıq, onların çoxu ilk dəfə görüntü işləməsi üçün təklif edilmişdir, məlumatları çıxartma işinə, özlərinə də adı entitə klasifikasyonuna. Daha sonra, iki müxtəlif verilən qurğular barəsində möhkəm salışdırma analizi gerçəkləşdiririk. Bizim analizimiz bir neçə möhüm nəzəriyyət verir. İlk dəfə, bütün temsil öyrənmə metodlarını temsil öyrənməyən öyrənməyə təvəkkül etməyən şəkildə yarı-gözləmə metodlarından istifadə edirlər. Bizim elmimizin ən yaxşısına gəldikdə, biz yeni müəllif sonuçlarını yarı-gözləyir entity klasifikasiya görevi ilə bildiririk. İkincisi, təkrar öyrənmə metodları təkrar təkrar öyrənmə yaxınlıqlarını təkrar edər. Sonunda, ən yaxşı müəllimlərdən biri orta müəllimin çerçevesinə (Tarvainen və Valpola, 2017-ci ildə) təvəkkül edir, sadəcə müəllimin/öğrencinin tərzindən bağımsız olan təhsil modeli.', 'ca': "Recentment s'han proposat diversos mètodes d'aprenentatge de representació semisupervisades que mitiguen els inconvenients de l'arranque tradicional: redueixen la quantitat de desviació semàntica introduïda per abords iteratius a través d'aprenentatge d'un cop; altres aborden la escassetat de les dades a través de l'aprenentatge de representació personalitzada i densa de la informació modelada. En aquest treball, som els primers a adaptar tres d'aquests mètodes, la majoria dels quals s'han proposat originalment per al processament d'imatges, a una tasca d'extracció d'informació, específicament, anomenada classificació d'entitats. També fem una anàlisi comparativa rigorosa en dos conjunts de dades distints. La nostra anàlisi produeix diverses observacions importants. First, all representation learning methods outperform state-of-the-art semi-supervised methods that do not rely on representation learning.  Segons el nostre coneixement, informem dels últims resultats més avançats sobre la tasca de classificació d'entitats només semisupervisada. Segon, els mètodes d'aprenentatge d'una sola oportunitatsuperen clarament els enfocaments d'aprenentatge de representació iterativa. Finalment, un dels millors artistes es basa en el marc mitjà de professors (Tarvainen i Valpola, 2017), un enfocament senzill professor/estudiant que és independent del model subjacent específic de les tasques.", 'cs': 'V poslední době bylo navrženo několik metod semi-supervised reprezentation learning, které zmírňují nevýhody tradičního bootstrappingu: snižují množství sémantického driftu zavedeného iterativními přístupy prostřednictvím jednorázového učení; Jiní se zabývají řídkostí dat prostřednictvím učení vlastní, husté reprezentace pro modelované informace. V této práci jsme první, kdo adaptuje tři z těchto metod, z nichž většina byla původně navržena pro zpracování obrazu, na úlohu extrakce informací, konkrétně klasifikaci entit. Dále provádíme důkladnou srovnávací analýzu na dvou odlišných datových sadách. Naše analýza přináší několik důležitých pozorování. Za prvé, všechny metody reprezentačního učení překonávají nejmodernější metody semi-supervisované, které nejsou spoléhány na reprezentační učení. Podle našich nejlepších znalostí informujeme o nejnovějších výsledcích týkajících se klasifikace jmenovaných entit pod částečným dohledem. Za druhé, jednorázové učební metody jasně překonávají iterativní reprezentační učební přístupy. A konečně jeden z nejlepších výkonných pracovníků spoléhá na průměrný rámec učitelů (Tarvainen a Valpola, 2017), jednoduchý přístup učitelů/studentů, který je nezávislý na základním modelu konkrétního úkolu.', 'et': 'Hiljuti on välja pakutud mitmeid pooljuhitatud representatsiooniõppe meetodeid, mis leevendavad traditsioonilise bootstrapping puudusi: need vähendavad semantilise triivi hulka, mida iteratiivsed lähenemisviisid tekitavad ühekordse õppe kaudu; teised käsitlevad andmete vähesust, õppides modelleeritud teabe jaoks kohandatud tihedat esitust. Käesolevas töös oleme esimesed, kes kohandavad kolme neist meetoditest, millest enamik on algselt välja pakutud pilditöötluseks, informatsiooni kaevandamise ülesandele, täpsemalt nimetatud üksuste klassifitseerimisele. Lisaks teostame range võrdleva analüüsi kahel erineval andmekogumil. Meie analüüs annab mitmeid olulisi tähelepanekuid. Esiteks, kõik esindusõppe meetodid ületavad kaasaegseid pooljuhitatud meetodeid, mis ei sõltu esindusõppest. Parimate teadmiste kohaselt anname aru pooljärelevalve alla kuuluva nimetatud üksuse klassifitseerimisülesande uusimad kaasaegsed tulemused. Teiseks, ühekordsed õppemeetodid ületavad selgelt iteratiivse esitusõppe lähenemisviise. Lõpuks tugineb üks parimaid tulemusi pakkuvatest õpetajatest keskmisele raamistikule (Tarvainen ja Valpola, 2017), lihtsale õpetaja/õpilase lähenemisviisile, mis ei sõltu aluseks olevast ülesandepõhisest mudelist.', 'fi': 'ﾃгkettﾃ､in on ehdotettu useita puolivalvottuja representaatiooppimismenetelmiﾃ､, joilla lievennetﾃ､ﾃ､n perinteisen kﾃ､ynnistyksen haittoja: ne vﾃ､hentﾃ､vﾃ､t iteratiivisten lﾃ､hestymistapojen aiheuttamaa semanttista driftaa yhden laukauksen avulla. Toiset kﾃ､sittelevﾃ､t datan niukkuutta oppimalla rﾃ､ﾃ､tﾃ､lﾃｶityﾃ､, tiheﾃ､ﾃ､ esitystﾃ､ mallinnettuun informaatioon. Tﾃ､ssﾃ､ tyﾃｶssﾃ､ olemme ensimmﾃ､isinﾃ､ mukauttaneet kolme nﾃ､istﾃ､ menetelmistﾃ､, joista suurin osa on alun perin ehdotettu kuvankﾃ､sittelyyn, tiedonkeruutehtﾃ､vﾃ､ﾃ､n, erityisesti nimettyyn kokonaisuusluokitukseen. Lisﾃ､ksi teemme tiukan vertailevan analyysin kahdesta erillisestﾃ､ aineistosta. Analyysimme tuottaa useita tﾃ､rkeitﾃ､ havaintoja. Ensinnﾃ､kin kaikki representaatiooppimismenetelmﾃ､t ovat parempia kuin uusimmat puoliohjatut menetelmﾃ､t, jotka eivﾃ､t perustu representaatiooppimiseen. Tietojemme mukaan raportoimme viimeisimmﾃ､t tulokset puolivalvotusta nimettyjen yksikkﾃｶjen luokittelutehtﾃ､vﾃ､stﾃ､. Toiseksi yhden laukauksen oppimismenetelmﾃ､t ylittﾃ､vﾃ､t selvﾃ､sti iteratiivisen representaatiooppimisen lﾃ､hestymistavat. Lopuksi yksi parhaiten suoriutuvista perustuu keskimﾃ､ﾃ､rﾃ､iseen opettajakehykseen (Tarvainen ja Valpola, 2017), yksinkertaiseen opettaja/oppilas-lﾃ､hestymistapaan, joka on riippumaton taustalla olevasta tehtﾃ､vﾃ､kohtaisesta mallista.', 'he': 'לאחרונה הציעו כמה שיטות לימוד מייצגות חצי-מפקחות שמקלות את חסרי המגבלות של צילום מסורתיים: הן מפחידות את כמות ההתנהגות הסמנטית המוצגת על ידי גישות איטראטיביות דרך לימוד אחד; אחרים מתייחסים לנדירות של נתונים דרך הלימוד של מייצג מתאים, צפוף למידע מודל. בעבודה הזאת, אנחנו הראשונים להסתגל לשלושה מהשיטות האלה, רובם הציעו במקור לעבודת תמונות, למשימה להוציא מידע, במיוחד, מסווג היחידות בשם. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מבצעים ניתוח משוואי rigorous על שני קבוצות נתונים ברורים. הניתוח שלנו מציג כמה תצפיות חשובות. ראשית, כל שיטות לימוד מייצגה מעליפות שיטות חצי-מפקחות מצוינות שלא תלויות על לימוד מייצגה. למיטב הידע שלנו, אנחנו מדווחים על התוצאות האחרונות של המצב האמנתי על משימה מסווג היחידות בשם חצי שולט. שנית, שיטות לימוד חד-זריקות בהחלט מעליות גישות לימוד מייצגות איטראטיבית. בסופו של דבר, אחד מהמופעים הטובים ביותר סומך על סגרת המורה הממוצעת (Tarvainen and Valpola, 2017), גישה מומחה/סטודנטית פשוטה שנמצאה עצמאית מהמודל המסוכן למשימה.', 'sk': 'Pred kratkim je bilo predlaganih več polnadzorovanih metod učenja reprezentacije, ki ublažijo pomanjkljivosti tradicionalnega bootstrapping: zmanjšujejo količino semantičnega premika, ki ga uvajajo iterativni pristopi z enkratnim učenjem; Drugi obravnavajo redkost podatkov skozi učenje po meri, gosto reprezentacijo informacij modeliranih. V tem delu smo prvi, ki smo tri od teh metod, od katerih je bila večina prvotno predlaganih za obdelavo slik, prilagodili nalogi pridobivanja informacij, zlasti imenovani klasifikaciji entitet. Poleg tega izvajamo strogo primerjalno analizo na dveh različnih naborih podatkov. Naša analiza prinaša več pomembnih opažanj. Prvič, vse metode reprezentativnega učenja presegajo najsodobnejše polnadzorovane metode, ki se ne zanašajo na reprezentativno učenje. Po našem najboljšem znanju poročamo o najnovejših najsodobnejših rezultatih naloge polnadzorovane klasifikacije imenovanih subjektov. Drugič, enostrelne metode učenja jasno presegajo iterativne pristope učenja predstavitve. Nazadnje se eden izmed najboljših učiteljev opira na povprečni učiteljski okvir (Tarvainen in Valpola, 2017), preprost pristop učitelja/študenta, ki je neodvisen od osnovnega modela posameznih nalog.', 'ha': "An buƙata wasu shiryoyin ayuka da aka tsare wa masu karanta na semi-na-semi, a yanzu, yin mitada bakin bayani na dangiya na dangiya na dangiya na dangiya ya ci-danganta: suna ƙarantar girgije na semantic wanda aka introduce na masu motsi da za'a yi amfani da kwamfyuta; Wasu sunan faɗin haske na data a sami'ar da aka sanar da ɗabi'a, mai nuna kwance wa shirin ayuka da aka samu. Daga wannan aikin, mũ ne na farkon ka adadi taki uku daga waɗannan hanyõyin, masu yawa daga cikinsu an buƙata wajen aiki da sura-zane, zuwa wani aikin zartarwa masu amfani da information, kuma don a ƙayyade sunan sigarin abun. Furan, za'a sami wani analai mai inganci a kan danne biyu masu bayyani. AnalyyinMu ya zo da kalmõmi masu muhimu. Babban, kowane shiryoyin ayuka da aka sanar da su outdo state-of-the-art-controlled metodes that do not dõgara a kan learning wakilishi. Ga mafi kyaun sanyinmu, Munã sanar da fassarar-na-sanar ta ƙarshen al'amarin da aka sura shi na zama mai classified wa mazaɓa. Second, one-shot learning methods clearly outperform iterative representation learning approaches.  Lallai, ɗayan mafarin mafarinta yana dõgara a kan firam mai macallin (Tarvarinen da dalPola, 2017), wata macallin/ardayani mai sauƙi wanda ke kamfata kan misali na ƙayyade aikin.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive gambar Awak dhéwé wis nambah iki, kita sampeyan perusahaan tanggal karo perusahaan karo perusahaan karo hal-hal sing dibutuhke dadi nguasakno Lakok, kita gunakake sistem karo pak perusahaan sampeyan karo dataset duwe barang ulih Ndeleksé awak dhéwé éntuk akeh akeh sing dikarepaké. Samsul, gak Cocok-Yusuf ngerti manut kuwi nggawe mesthi iso nguasai tarjamahan karo hal-karo seni nggawe barang. Awakdhéwé, ngéwé ngertuk dhéwé, éntuk dhéwé ngertualké state-of-the-arts barang dhéwé kuwi padha-obligator barang kelas dhéwé. Pawit, sira wis ngerasai yöwo ngerti apakno Tulung, wong sing paling langgar nganggo cara-cara sing paling kelas telu nggawe barang kelas (Tarfalen karo Valpola, 1997), dadi sing sampek guru kelas/umur-cadan sing wis dipun sakjane sampek karo model sing paling nggawe kudu.', 'bo': 'semi-supervised learning methods have been proposed to mitigate the drawbacks of traditional bootstrapping: they reduce the amount of semantic drift introduced by iterative approaches through one-shot learning; others address the sparsity of data through the learning of custom, dense representation for the information modeled. In this work, we are the first to adapt three of these methods, most of which have been originally proposed for image processing, to an information extraction task, specifically, named entity classification. འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཕྱོགས་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་གལ་ཆོས་ཤིག་ཏུ་བཅུག་པ་ཡིན། དང་པོར་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྟོན་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་ཕྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྟོགས་པ་ཡིན་པས། ང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལས་ཕལ་ཆེན་ཤོས་ཚད་ལ། ང་ཚོས་མིང་ཁང་གི་ཕྱོགས་སྣང་ཚུལ་མང་ཤོས་ཀྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གཙོ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་དབུས་ གཉིས་པ། རྩོམ་པ་གཅིག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བསྟན་ན་གྱིས་སྐྱེན་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གནང་བ་ཏེ། མཐའ་མར་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་བྱེད་མཁན་གྱི་ནང་གི་མི་གཅིག་ནི་སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་མཁན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་གཞི་བཞག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Multimodal Grounding for Language Processing', 'ar': 'التأريض متعدد الوسائط لمعالجة اللغة', 'fr': 'Mise à la terre multimodale pour le traitement linguistique', 'es': 'Conexión a tierra multimodal para el procesamiento del lenguaje', 'pt': 'Aterramento multimodal para processamento de linguagem', 'ja': '言語処理のためのマルチモーダルグラウンディング', 'hi': 'भाषा प्रसंस्करण के लिए मल्टीमॉडल ग्राउंडिंग', 'zh': '言语多模态接地', 'ru': 'Мультимодальное заземление для языковой обработки', 'ga': 'Bunús Ilmhódach do Phróiseáil Teanga', 'ka': 'ენის პროცესისთვის მრავალური ფუნქცია', 'el': 'Πολυmodale γείωση γλωσσικής επεξεργασίας', 'hu': 'Multimodális nyelvi feldolgozás alapozása', 'it': "Messa a terra multimodale per l'elaborazione linguistica", 'kk': 'Тілді өңдеу үшін көптеген негізі', 'mk': 'Мултимодилно основање за обработување јазик', 'lt': 'Daugiarūšis kalbų apdorojimo pagrindas', 'ms': 'Pemprosesan Bahasa Multimodal', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള മള്\u200dമോഡല്\u200d ഗ്രൂണ്ടിങ്', 'mt': 'Multimodal Grounding for Language Processing', 'mn': 'Холбоо процессийн олон модуль суурь', 'no': 'Multimodal grunnlegging for språkprosessering', 'ro': 'Împământare multimodală pentru procesarea limbilor străine', 'pl': 'Multimodalne uziemienie przetwarzania języka', 'sr': 'Multimodalno podizanje za proces jezika', 'sv': 'Multimodal jordning för språkbehandling', 'so': 'Koox kala duduwan ee la shaqeynayo luuqada', 'ta': 'மொழி செயல்படுத்தலுக்கான பல்முறை குழுவு', 'si': 'භාෂා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ගොඩක් මෝඩාල් විශාල', 'ur': 'زبان پرسس کے لئے Multimodal Grounding', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nền đa truyền cho Thủ tục Ngôn ngữ', 'hr': 'Multimodalno podizanje jezika', 'da': 'Multimodal jordbundning til sprogbehandling', 'bg': 'Мултимодално основание за езикова обработка', 'nl': 'Multimodale grondslag voor taalverwerking', 'ko': '언어 처리의 다중모드적 기초', 'de': 'Multimodale Erdung für Sprachverarbeitung', 'id': 'Multimodal Grounding for Language Processing', 'fa': 'پایه\u200cهای زیادی برای پرداخت زبان', 'sw': 'Kikundi kikubwa kwa ajili ya mchakato wa lugha', 'tr': 'Diller işlemek üçin köp modal köpellemek', 'af': 'Multimodale Grounding vir Taal Verwerking', 'sq': 'Multimodal Grounding for Language Processing', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Լեզվային գործընթացը', 'az': 'Dil işləməsi üçün çoxlu modal dəyişiklik', 'bn': 'ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য মাল্টিমোডাল গ্রুডিং', 'cs': 'Multimodální uzemnění pro zpracování jazyků', 'bs': 'Multimodalno podizanje za proces jezika', 'ca': 'Multimodal Grounding for Language Processing', 'et': 'Keeletöötluse mitmeliigiline alus', 'fi': 'Monimuotoiset perusteet kieltenkäsittelylle', 'jv': 'Ngubung Mulai', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'קרקע רב מודלית לעבודת שפות', 'sk': 'Multimodalna podlaga za jezikovno obdelavo', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་སྣ་ཆེ་མཐོང་ཚད'}
{'en': 'This survey discusses how recent developments in multimodal processing facilitate conceptual grounding of language. We categorize the information flow in multimodal processing with respect to cognitive models of human information processing and analyze different methods for combining multimodal representations. Based on this methodological inventory, we discuss the benefit of multimodal grounding for a variety of language processing tasks and the challenges that arise. We particularly focus on multimodal grounding of verbs which play a crucial role for the compositional power of language.', 'ar': 'يناقش هذا الاستطلاع كيف تسهل التطورات الأخيرة في المعالجة متعددة الوسائط التأسيس المفاهيمي للغة. نصنف تدفق المعلومات في المعالجة متعددة الوسائط فيما يتعلق بالنماذج المعرفية لمعالجة المعلومات البشرية ونحلل الطرق المختلفة للجمع بين التمثيلات متعددة الوسائط. بناءً على هذا الجرد المنهجي ، نناقش فائدة التأريض متعدد الوسائط لمجموعة متنوعة من مهام معالجة اللغة والتحديات التي تنشأ. نحن نركز بشكل خاص على التأريض متعدد الوسائط للأفعال التي تلعب دورًا مهمًا في القوة التركيبية للغة.', 'fr': "Cette enquête examine comment les récents développements en matière de traitement multimodal facilitent l'ancrage conceptuel du langage. Nous catégorisons le flux d'informations dans le traitement multimodal par rapport aux modèles cognitifs du traitement de l'information humaine et analysons différentes méthodes pour combiner des représentations multimodales. Sur la base de cet inventaire méthodologique, nous discutons des avantages de la mise à la terre multimodale pour diverses tâches de traitement linguistique et des défis qui en découlent. Nous nous concentrons particulièrement sur l'ancrage multimodal des verbes qui jouent un rôle crucial pour la puissance de composition du langage.", 'es': 'Esta encuesta analiza cómo los desarrollos recientes en el procesamiento multimodal facilitan la base conceptual del lenguaje. Categorizamos el flujo de información en el procesamiento multimodal con respecto a los modelos cognitivos de procesamiento de información humana y analizamos diferentes métodos para combinar representaciones multimodales. Sobre la base de este inventario metodológico, discutimos el beneficio de la base multimodal para una variedad de tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje y los desafíos que surgen. Nos centramos particularmente en la base multimodal de los verbos que desempeñan un papel crucial para el poder compositivo del lenguaje.', 'pt': 'Esta pesquisa discute como os desenvolvimentos recentes no processamento multimodal facilitam a fundamentação conceitual da linguagem. Categorizamos o fluxo de informação no processamento multimodal em relação aos modelos cognitivos de processamento de informação humana e analisamos diferentes métodos para combinar representações multimodais. Com base neste inventário metodológico, discutimos o benefício da fundamentação multimodal para uma variedade de tarefas de processamento de linguagem e os desafios que surgem. Nós nos concentramos particularmente na fundamentação multimodal de verbos que desempenham um papel crucial para o poder composicional da linguagem.', 'ja': 'この調査では、マルチモーダルプロセッシングの最近の発展が言語の概念的基礎付けをどのように促進するかについて説明します。人間の情報処理の認知モデルに関して、マルチモーダル処理における情報フローを分類し、マルチモーダル表現を組み合わせるためのさまざまな方法を分析する。この方法論的目録に基づいて、多様な言語処理タスクのためのマルチモーダルグラウンディングの利点と、発生する課題について考察する。私たちは特に、言語の構成力に重要な役割を果たす動詞のマルチモーダルアースに焦点を当てています。', 'zh': '本考论多模样最新所以趣言语之本也。 以人信息处理之知模态众信息流之类,而论多模态之法。 此法清单,论多模样接地诸言语处分之利,及挑战。 特关动词之多模态,言语之力起着至重之用也。', 'hi': 'यह सर्वेक्षण चर्चा करता है कि मल्टीमॉडल प्रसंस्करण में हाल के विकास भाषा के वैचारिक ग्राउंडिंग की सुविधा कैसे प्रदान करते हैं। हम मानव सूचना प्रसंस्करण के संज्ञानात्मक मॉडल के संबंध में मल्टीमॉडल प्रसंस्करण में सूचना प्रवाह को वर्गीकृत करते हैं और मल्टीमॉडल प्रतिनिधित्व के संयोजन के लिए विभिन्न तरीकों का विश्लेषण करते हैं। इस methodological इन्वेंट्री के आधार पर, हम भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों की एक किस्म के लिए बहुआयामी ग्राउंडिंग के लाभ और उत्पन्न होने वाली चुनौतियों पर चर्चा करते हैं। हम विशेष रूप से क्रियाओं के बहुआयामी ग्राउंडिंग पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं जो भाषा की रचनात्मक शक्ति के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण भूमिका निभाते हैं।', 'ru': 'В настоящем обзоре обсуждается вопрос о том, каким образом последние изменения в области мультимодальной обработки облегчают концептуальное обоснование языка. Мы классифицируем информационный поток в мультимодальной обработке по когнитивным моделям обработки информации человека и анализируем различные методы объединения мультимодальных представлений. На основе этого методологического перечня мы обсуждаем преимущества мультимодального заземления для различных задач языковой обработки и возникающие проблемы. Мы уделяем особое внимание мультимодальному заземлению глаголов, которые играют решающую роль для композиционной силы языка.', 'ga': 'Pléann an suirbhé seo mar a éascaíonn forbairtí le déanaí sa phróiseáil ilmhódach bunús coincheapúil teanga. Déanaimid rangú ar an sreabhadh faisnéise i bpróiseáil ilmhódach maidir le samhlacha cognaíocha de phróiseáil faisnéise daonna agus déanaimid anailís ar mhodhanna éagsúla chun léirithe ilmhódacha a chomhcheangal. Bunaithe ar an bhfardal modheolaíochta seo, pléimid an tairbhe a bhaineann le bunús ilmhódach d’éagsúlacht tascanna próiseála teanga agus na dúshláin a thagann chun cinn. Dírímid go háirithe ar bhunús ilmhódach na mbriathra a bhfuil ról ríthábhachtach acu do chumhacht cumadóireachta na teanga.', 'ka': 'ამ შემოწმებაში განსხვავებულია თუ რამდენიმე მულტიმოდიალური პროცესის განვითარებაში კონცექტური ენის ფონტურაციას. ჩვენ მლიტიმოდიალური პროცესის ინფორმაციის გავაკეთებთ და განსხვავებული მეტოვების გავაკეთებთ მლიტიმოდიალური გამოსახულებებისთვის კონციგური მოდელების შესახებ. ამ მეტოდოლოგიური ინტერუქტორიის ბაზაზე, ჩვენ მრავალური ინტერუქტორიების გამოსახულება მრავალური ინტერუქტორიის გამოსახულებას, რამდენიმე ენის პროცესის დასახულებაში ჩვენ განსაკუთრებულად მულტიმოდიალური გერბების ფონსტურება, რომლებიც მნიშვნელოვანი პროლია ენის კომპოზიციონალური ძალიან.', 'hu': 'Ez a felmérés azt vizsgálja, hogy a multimodális feldolgozás legutóbbi fejleményei hogyan segítik elő a nyelv fogalmi alapozását. Kategorizáljuk a multimodális feldolgozás információáramlását az emberi információfeldolgozás kognitív modelljei alapján, és elemezzük a multimodális reprezentációk kombinációjának különböző módszereit. Ezen módszertani leltár alapján megvitatjuk a multimodális alapozás előnyeit a különböző nyelvfeldolgozási feladatokhoz és a felmerülő kihívásokat. Különösen az igék multimodális alapozására összpontosítunk, amelyek döntő szerepet játszanak a nyelv kompozíciós erejében.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα έρευνα εξετάζει πώς οι πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στην πολυμορφική επεξεργασία διευκολύνουν την εννοιολογική θεμελίωση της γλώσσας. Κατηγοριοποιούμε τη ροή πληροφοριών στην πολυμορφική επεξεργασία σε σχέση με γνωστικά μοντέλα επεξεργασίας ανθρώπινων πληροφοριών και αναλύουμε διαφορετικές μεθόδους συνδυασμού πολυμορφικών αναπαραστάσεων. Με βάση αυτή τη μεθοδολογική απογραφή, συζητάμε το όφελος της πολυμορφικής γείωσης για ποικίλες εργασίες επεξεργασίας γλωσσών και τις προκλήσεις που προκύπτουν. Εστιάζουμε ιδιαίτερα στην πολυμορφική θεμελίωση των ρήμων που διαδραματίζουν καθοριστικό ρόλο για τη σύνθεση της γλώσσας.', 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеу көптеген процесстердің жаңа жағдайларының тілдерді бағыттауға көмектесетінін түсіндіреді. Біз көп модель процессінде мәлімет жұмысын адамдардың мәлімет процессінің көбірек үлгілеріне қатынасыз және көбірек мәліметтерді біріктіру үшін әртүрлі әдістерді анализира Бұл методологиялық инвентариясының негізінде біз көптеген тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларын және өткен мәселелерді көптеген көптеген көптеген жұмыс істеу үшін талқыладық. Біз өзгеше тілдің құрылғысы үшін бірнеше модельді түрлендіру үшін көптеген вербалардың негізгі рөлін орындаймыз.', 'lt': 'This survey discusses how recent developments in multimodal processing facilitate conceptual grounding of language.  Įvertiname informacijos srautą daugiarūšio apdorojimo srityje atsižvelgiant į žmogaus informacijos apdorojimo pažintinius modelius ir analizuojame įvairius daugiarūšio apdorojimo būdus. Remiantis šiuo metodiniu aprašu, diskutuojame apie daugiarūšio naudojimo pagrindų naudą įvairioms kalbų apdorojimo užduotims ir kylančius iššūkius. Ypač daug dėmesio skiriame daugiarūšio naudojimo žodžiams, kurie atlieka svarbų vaidmenį kalbos sudėtinei galiai.', 'mk': 'Оваа истрага дискутира како неодамнешните настани во мултимодилното обработување го олеснуваат концептуалното основање на јазикот. We categorize the information flow in multimodal processing with respect to cognitive models of human information processing and analyze different methods for combining multimodal representations.  На основа на овој методолошки инвенториум, разговараме за користта од мултимодилните основи за различни задачи за обработување на јазиците и предизвиците кои се појавуваат. Ние особено се фокусираме на мултимоделното основање на јазиците кои играат клучна улога за композициската моќ на јазикот.', 'mt': "Dan l-istħarriġ jiddiskuti kif l-iżviluppi reċenti fl-ipproċessar multimodali jiffaċilitaw il-bażi kunċettwali tal-lingwa. Aħna nikkategorizzaw il-fluss tal-informazzjoni fl-ipproċessar multimodali fir-rigward ta’ mudelli konjittivi tal-ipproċessar tal-informazzjoni umana u nagħmlu analiżi ta’ metodi differenti għall-kombinazzjoni tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet multimodali. Based on this methodological inventory, we discuss the benefit of multimodal grounding for a variety of language processing tasks and the challenges that arise.  Aħna niffokaw b'mod partikolari fuq il-bażi multimodali tal-verbs li għandhom rwol kruċjali għall-qawwa kompożittiva tal-lingwa.", 'it': "Questa indagine esamina come i recenti sviluppi nell'elaborazione multimodale facilitino la messa a terra concettuale del linguaggio. Classifichiamo il flusso di informazioni nell'elaborazione multimodale rispetto ai modelli cognitivi dell'elaborazione delle informazioni umane e analizziamo diversi metodi per combinare rappresentazioni multimodali. Sulla base di questo inventario metodologico, discutiamo i vantaggi della messa a terra multimodale per una varietà di compiti di elaborazione linguistica e le sfide che si presentano. Ci concentriamo in particolare sulla messa a terra multimodale di verbi che svolgono un ruolo cruciale per il potere compositivo del linguaggio.", 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаанд олон загварын үйлдвэрлэлийн саяхан хөгжлийн хөгжлийн тухай хэлний ойлголтыг хэрхэн дэмжих тухай ярьдаг. Бид хүн төрөлхтний мэдээллийн үйлдвэрлэлийн мэдээллийн загваруудыг олон загварын үйлдвэрлэлийн мэдээллийн урсгалыг хуваалцаж, олон загварын үзүүлэлтийг нэгтгэх өөр арга загваруудыг шинжилгээд үзүүлнэ. Энэ методологик зохиолын үндсэн учраас бид олон хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн даалгаварын тулд олон загварын шалтгааныг харуулж байна. Бид ялангуяа хэлний зохиолын эрх мэдлийн чухал үүрэг тоглодог хэлний олон загварын түвшинд анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг.', 'ms': 'Survey ini membahas bagaimana perkembangan baru-baru ini dalam pemprosesan multimodal memudahkan pendaratan konseptual bahasa. Kami kategori aliran maklumat dalam pemprosesan multimodal berkaitan dengan model kognitif pemprosesan maklumat manusia dan menganalisis kaedah berbeza untuk menggabungkan perwakilan multimodal. Based on this methodological inventory, we discuss the benefit of multimodal grounding for a variety of language processing tasks and the challenges that arise.  Kami terutama fokus pada dasar berbilang modal verb yang bermain peran penting untuk kuasa komposisi bahasa.', 'no': 'Dette undersøket diskuterer korleis nyleg utviklingar i multimodal prosessering gjer enkelt konseptuelt grunnlegging av språk. Vi kategoriserer informasjonsflyten i multimodal handsaming med hensyn til kognitiv modeller for handsaming av menneskelig informasjon og analyserer ulike metodar for kombinasjon av multimodal representasjonar. Basert på denne metodologiske inventoren, diskuterer vi fordel av multimodal grunnlegging for ulike språkshandsamar oppgåver og utfordringane som skjer. Vi spesielt fokuserer på multimodal grunnlegging av verbar som speler ein viktig rolle for den sammensatte styrken på språk.', 'ml': 'ഈ പരിശോധനം സംസാരിക്കുന്നു പല്ലിമോഡല്\u200d പ്രക്രിയയിലെ അടുത്ത പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളെങ്ങനെയെന്ന്. മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d വിവിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിഭാഗങ്ങളാക്കുന്നു. പല്ലിമോ ഈ മെഡിടോട്ടോളജിക്കല്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മാണത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പല ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും സംഭവിക്കു നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് മുള്\u200dട്ടിമോഡല്\u200d ഗ്രൂണിങ്ങിനെ ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഭാഷയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള ശക്തിയുടെ പ', 'ro': 'Acest studiu discută modul în care evoluțiile recente în procesarea multimodală facilitează fundamentarea conceptuală a limbajului. Clasificăm fluxul de informații în procesarea multimodală în raport cu modelele cognitive de procesare a informațiilor umane și analizăm diferite metode de combinare a reprezentărilor multimodale. Pe baza acestui inventar metodologic, discutăm beneficiile fundamentării multimodale pentru o varietate de sarcini de procesare a limbii și provocările care apar. Ne concentrăm în special pe împământarea multimodală a verbelor care joacă un rol crucial pentru puterea compozițională a limbajului.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කතා කරනවා කොහොමද අලුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් මොඩිමෝඩාල් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භා අපි මිනිස්සු තොරතුරු පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා මානස් තොරතුරු පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා විවිධ විදිහට පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න සඳහා මානස් තොරතුරු ප මේ විද්\u200dයාවික සංවිධානයේ අධිකරණය, අපි විවිධ භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් විවිධ භාෂාවික ප්\u200dර අපි විශේෂයෙන්ම විශේෂයෙන් විශේෂයෙන් භාෂාවේ සංවිධානය ශක්තිය සඳහා විශේෂ පාලනයක් ගන්න බ', 'pl': 'W niniejszym badaniu omówiono, w jaki sposób ostatnie zmiany w przetwarzaniu multimodalnym ułatwiają koncepcyjne uziemienie języka. Kategoryzujemy przepływ informacji w przetwarzaniu multimodalnym w odniesieniu do modeli poznawczych przetwarzania informacji człowieka oraz analizujemy różne metody łączenia reprezentacji multimodalnych. Na podstawie tego wykazu metodologicznego omawiamy korzyści płynące z multimodalnego uziemienia dla różnych zadań przetwarzania języków oraz wyzwania, które pojawiają się. Szczególnie skupiamy się na multimodalnym uziemieniu czasowników, które odgrywają kluczową rolę dla kompozycyjnej mocy języka.', 'sr': 'U ovom istraživanju razgovara o tome kako nedavni razvoji u multimodalnom procesu olakšavaju konceptualno osnovanje jezika. Kategoriziramo tok informacija u multimodalnom procesu u odnosu na kognitivne modele obrade ljudskih informacija i analiziramo različite metode kombinacije multimodalnih predstavljanja. Na temelju ovog metodološkog inventara, razgovaramo o koristi multimodalnog osnova za različite zadatke obrađivanja jezika i izazove koje se pojavljuju. Posebno se fokusiramo na multimodalno osnovanje verba koji imaju ključnu ulogu za kompozicionalnu moć jezika.', 'so': 'Baaritaankaas ayaa ka sheekaynaya sida horumarinta u soo dhowaaday ee baaraandegista kala duduwan uu u caawinayo koorasyada luuqada. Waxaannu kala qeybinaynaa macluumaadka baaritaanka kala duduwan oo ku saabsan noocyada aqoonta macluumaadka dadka, waana baariteynaa qaabab kala duduwan oo lagu soo bandhijiyo noocyo kala duduwan. Qoraalkan qaabilsan ah oo lagu saleynayo, waxaynu kala sheekeysanaynaa waxyaabaha lagu baaraandegayo qasnadaha kala duduwan iyo dhibaatooyinka soo socda. Si gaar ah waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa kooxo kala duduwan oo hadallada ah, taasoo qayb muhiim ah u ciyaaraya xoogga hoose ee luqada.', 'sv': 'Denna undersökning diskuterar hur den senaste utvecklingen inom multimodal bearbetning underlättar begreppsmässig förankring av språk. Vi kategoriserar informationsflödet i multimodal bearbetning med avseende på kognitiva modeller för mänsklig informationsbehandling och analyserar olika metoder för att kombinera multimodala representationer. Utifrån denna metodinventering diskuterar vi fördelarna med multimodal jordning för en mängd olika språkbehandlingsuppgifter och de utmaningar som uppstår. Vi fokuserar särskilt på multimodal jordning av verb som spelar en avgörande roll för språkets kompositionskraft.', 'ta': 'This survey discusses how recent developments in multimodal processing facilitate conceptual grounding of language.  மனித தகவல் செயல்படுத்தல் மாதிரிகளைப் பற்றி தகவல் ஊடகத்தை பிரிவாக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் பல்முறை பிரிவுகளை ஒன்று சேர்க்க வேறு முறைகளை ஆர இந்த முறைமையான கண்டுபிடிப்பு அடிப்படையில், நாம் பல்வேறு மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் பணிகளுக்கு நன்மையை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் மற்றும்  மொழியின் தொகுப்பு சக்திக்கு முக்கியமான ஒரு பங்கை விளையாடுகிறது.', 'ur': 'یہ تحقیقات کی بحث کرتی ہے کہ بہت سی موڈال پرسس میں اچھی اگلوں کی تغییرات کی زبان کی اصلی بنیاد آسانی کرتی ہیں۔ ہم انسان کی معلومات پرسس کے مطابق مطابق کے مطابق مختلف طریقے کا انتظام کریں اور مختلف طریقے کا تحلیل کریں multimodal representations کے ساتھ. اس طریقے کی اختیار پر، ہم نے مختلف زبان کی پردازی کے کاموں اور مشکلات کے لئے مختلف طریقے کے مطابق مختلف طریقے کے مطابق مشورہ کیا ہے. ہم مخصوصاً کلمات کے متعدد بنیاد پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں جو زبان کی پیدا کرنے کی طاقت کے لئے ایک ضروری رول ہے.', 'uz': "Bu qidirish multimodalar jarayonlarida qanday yaqin taʼminlovchi tajribalarni o'zgartiradi va bir tilni tasavvur qilish imkoniyatini foydalanadi. Biz bir necha multimodal jarayonlarida maʼlumot bajariladigan narsalarni kattalashtiramiz va ko'plab-multimodal tashkilotlarini birlashtirish uchun boshqa usullarni analyzeriz. Bu metodologik muvaffaqiyatlariga asosida, biz bir necha tillar boshqaruvchi vazifalar uchun multimodal guruhlarning foydalanishini va kichkina ishlab chiqarishga ega murakkab qilamiz. Ko'pchilik, biz bir necha so'zlar guruhini foydalanamiz. Bu tilning bir muhim kuchi uchun muhim rollen.", 'vi': 'Cuộc họp này bảo về cách mà chúng ta đã biết cách tìm hiện hết ngôn ngựa. Chúng tôi phân loại dòng thông tin trong việc xử lý đa phương với các mô hình nhận thức của việc xử lý thông tin người và phân tích các phương pháp khác nhau để kết hợp các biểu tượng đa phương. Dựa trên phương pháp này, chúng ta thảo luận về lợi ích của việc tạo ra đa phương cách cho nhiều công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ và những thử thách sắp xảy ra. Chúng tôi đặc biệt tập trung vào động cơ đa chiều của các động từ, vai trò quan trọng cho sự hợp tác của ngôn ngữ.', 'hr': 'U ovom istraživanju razgovara o tome kako nedavni razvoji u multimodalnom obrazovanju olakšavaju konceptualno osnovanje jezika. Kategoriziramo tok informacija u multimodalnom obrazovanju u pogledu kognitivnih modela obrazovanja ljudskih informacija i analiziramo različite metode kombinacije multimodalnih predstavljanja. Na temelju ovog metodološkog inventara, razgovaramo o koristi multimodalnog osnova za različite zadatke obrađivanja jezika i izazove koje dolaze. Posebno se fokusiramo na multimodalno osnovanje verba koji imaju ključnu ulogu za kompozicionalnu moć jezika.', 'bg': 'Това проучване обсъжда как последните развития в мултимодалната обработка улесняват концептуалното обосноване на езика. Категоризираме информационния поток в мултимодалната обработка по отношение на когнитивните модели на обработка на човешката информация и анализираме различни методи за комбиниране на мултимодални представи. Въз основа на този методологически опис обсъждаме ползите от мултимодалното заземяване за различни задачи по обработка на езика и предизвикателствата, които възникват. Специално се фокусираме върху мултимодалното обосноване на глаголите, които играят решаваща роля за композиционната сила на езика.', 'nl': 'Deze enquête bespreekt hoe recente ontwikkelingen in multimodale verwerking conceptuele gronding van taal vergemakkelijken. We categoriseren de informatiestroom in multimodale verwerking met betrekking tot cognitieve modellen van menselijke informatieverwerking en analyseren verschillende methoden voor het combineren van multimodale representaties. Op basis van deze methodologische inventaris bespreken we het voordeel van multimodale gronding voor een verscheidenheid aan taalverwerkingstaken en de uitdagingen die zich voordoen. We richten ons vooral op multimodale gronding van werkwoorden die een cruciale rol spelen voor de compositieve kracht van taal.', 'da': 'Denne undersøgelse diskuterer, hvordan den seneste udvikling inden for multimodal behandling letter begrebsmæssig grundlægning af sprog. Vi kategoriserer informationsstrømmen i multimodal behandling med hensyn til kognitive modeller for menneskelig informationsbehandling og analyserer forskellige metoder til at kombinere multimodale repræsentationer. På baggrund af denne metodologiske opgørelse diskuterer vi fordelene ved multimodal grounding til en række sprogbehandlingsopgaver og de udfordringer, der opstår. Vi fokuserer især på multimodal jordbundning af verber, som spiller en afgørende rolle for sprogets kompositionskraft.', 'de': 'In dieser Studie wird diskutiert, wie aktuelle Entwicklungen in der multimodalen Verarbeitung die konzeptionelle Verankerung von Sprache erleichtern. Wir kategorisieren den Informationsfluss in der multimodalen Verarbeitung in Bezug auf kognitive Modelle der menschlichen Informationsverarbeitung und analysieren verschiedene Methoden zur Kombination multimodaler Repräsentationen. Basierend auf diesem methodischen Inventar diskutieren wir den Nutzen multimodaler Erdung für eine Vielzahl von Sprachverarbeitungsaufgaben und die damit verbundenen Herausforderungen. Wir konzentrieren uns insbesondere auf die multimodale Begründung von Verben, die eine entscheidende Rolle für die kompositorische Kraft der Sprache spielen.', 'id': 'Survei ini mendiskusikan bagaimana perkembangan baru-baru ini dalam proses multimodal memudahkan dasar konseptual bahasa. Kami mengkategorisasi aliran informasi dalam proses multimodal mengenai model kognitif dari proses informasi manusia dan menganalisis metode berbeda untuk menggabungkan representation multimodal. Berdasarkan inventaris metodologi ini, kita mendiskusikan keuntungan dari dasar multimodal untuk berbagai tugas proyeksi bahasa dan tantangan yang muncul. Kami terutama fokus pada dasar multimodal verb yang bermain peran penting untuk kuasa komposisi bahasa.', 'ko': '이 조사는 다중모드적 처리의 최신 발전이 언어의 개념적 기반을 어떻게 추진하는지를 토론했다.우리는 인류 정보 처리의 인지 모델에 따라 다중모드 처리 중의 정보 흐름을 분류하고 다중모드 표시를 조합하는 서로 다른 방법을 분석했다.이 방법 목록을 바탕으로 우리는 다중모드적 접지가 각종 언어 처리 임무에 대한 장점과 이로 인해 발생하는 도전에 대해 토론했다.우리는 특히 동사의 다중모드적 기초를 주목하는데, 이것은 언어의 합성 능력에 매우 중요한 역할을 한다.', 'fa': 'این تحقیقات در مورد توسعه های اخیر در پردازش چندین مدل چگونه بر اساس اصلی زبان آسان می شود. ما جریان اطلاعات را در پردازش چندین مدل با احترام مدل شناخته\u200cای از پردازش اطلاعات انسان برگزینیم و روش\u200cهای مختلف را برای ترکیب نمایش\u200cهای چندین مدل تحلیل می\u200cکنیم. بر اساس این اختراع روش\u200cشناسی، ما در مورد منافع\u200cهای زیر مدل\u200cهای مختلف کار\u200cهای پرداخت زبان و چالش\u200cهای پیدا می\u200cکنند، بحث می\u200cکنیم. ما مخصوصاً روی پایه\u200cهای چندین مدال کلمات تمرکز می\u200cکنیم که نقش مهم برای قدرت ترکیب زبان بازی می\u200cکنند.', 'sw': 'Utafiti huu unajadili namna maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika michakato mengi yanavyowezesha kutangazwa kwa lugha. Tunagawanyia mafanikio ya taarifa katika upasuaji wa utaratibu wa miundo maarufu ya upasuaji wa habari za binadamu na kuchambua njia tofauti za kuwaunganisha wakilishi wengi. Kutokana na uzalishaji huu wa mbinu, tunajadili manufaa ya makundi ya watu wengi kwa ajili ya kazi mbalimbali za utaratibu wa lugha na changamoto zinazotokea. Tunakatiza hasa kwenye makundi mengi ya maneno ambayo yanacheza jukumu la muhimu kwa nguvu ya umuhimu wa lugha.', 'tr': 'Bu soragy multimodal i힊lemlerde 첵akynda 철흫ki geli힊meleri흫 dili d체힊체nj채ni흫i a흫sat첵andygyny g체rr체흫le첵채r. Biz insan bilgi i힊lemesi ile ilgili bilgi ak캇힊캇n캇 챌omodal i힊lemde kategori첵a ederis we 챌omodal temsilleri birle힊tirmek 체챌in farkl캇 y철ntemleri 챌철z체mler. Bu metodolyk inventaralyga da첵an첵an bolsa, bir n채챌e dil i힊le첵채n zadlary we netijeleri 체챌in multimodal toparlary흫 faydasyny we g체rr체흫 ed첵채n kyn챌ylyklary 체챌in g체rr체흫 ed첵채ris. Biz esasy 챌yky힊 dillerin a 첵ratyny흫 g체첵ji 체챌in 철r채n m철h체m roli o첵nap kitaplary흫 multimodal esaslaryna 체ns ber첵채ris.', 'af': "Hierdie ondersoek bespreek hoe onlangse ontwikkelinge in multimodaale verwerking geïnvoudig konseptieële grond van taal. Ons kategoriseer die inligting vloei in multimodaal verwerking met betrekking na kognitiewe modele van menslike inligting verwerking en analiseer verskillende metodes vir kombinasie van multimodaale voorstellings. Ons bespreek op hierdie metodologiese inventorie die voordeel van multimodaal grond vir 'n verskeie taal verwerking opdragte en die uitdagings wat opkom. Ons spesifieke fokus op multimodaal grond van verbe wat 'n cruciaal rol speel vir die samenstellende krag van taal.", 'sq': 'Ky sondazh diskuton se si zhvillimet e fundit në procesimin multimodal lehtësojnë bazimin konceptual të gjuhës. Ne kategorizojmë rrjedhën e informacionit në procesimin multimodal lidhur me modelet kognitive të procesimit të informacionit njerëzor dhe analizojmë metoda të ndryshme për kombinimin e përfaqësimeve multimodale. Bazuar në këtë inventar metodologjik, diskutojmë përfitimin e bazimit multimodal për një shumëllojshmëri detyrash të përdorimit të gjuhës dhe sfidave që ngrihen. Ne përqëndrohemi veçanërisht në bazimin multimodal të verbëve që luajnë një rol vendimtar për fuqinë përbërëse të gjuhës.', 'am': 'ይህ ምርመራ የበለጠ የቋንቋ አካባቢ ጉዳይ የቋንቋን መፍጠር እንዴት ያበረታታል፡፡ የሰው መረጃ ማቀናጃ ማቀናቀል እና የተለየ ልዩ ሥርዓቶችን ለመቀላቀል እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ Based on this methodological inventory, we discuss the benefit of multimodal grounding for a variety of language processing tasks and the challenges that arise.  በተለየንም የቋንቋ አካባቢ ኃይል የሚጠያየቁ የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች አካባቢ ሚዛን ላይ እናስማራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հետազոտությունը քննարկում է, թե ինչպես են վերջին զարգացումները բազմամոդալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ վերաբերյալ ձևավորումներում խթանում լեզվի հասկացական հիմքերը: Մենք դասակարգում ենք տեղեկատվության հոսքը բազմամոդալ վերաբերյալ մարդկային տեղեկատվության վերաբերյալ ճանաչողական մոդելներին և վերլուծում ենք բազմամոդալ ներկայացումների համադրման տարբեր մեթոդներ: Հաշվի առնելով այս մեթոդոլոգիական հայտարարության վրա, մենք քննարկում ենք լեզվի վերամշակման բազմաթիվ խնդիրների և առաջացած մարտահրավերի առավելությունը: Մենք հատկապես կենտրոնանում ենք բայերի բազմաբնական հիմքի վրա, որոնք լեզվի կառուցվածքային ուժի կարևոր դեր են խաղում:', 'az': 'Bu araştırma çoxlu modal işləmə tədbirlərinin çoxlu tədbirlərinin dillərin təsəvvürlərini nəyə asanlaşdırdığını görür. Biz insanların bilgi işləməsinin kognitiv modellərini çoxlu modal işləməsində məlumat akışını kategoriyalaşdırırıq və çoxlu modal göstəriciləri birləşdirmək üçün müxtəlif metodları analiz edirik. Bu metodolojik inşallarına baxmayaraq, biz çoxlu modal inşallarının faydalarını və baş verən çətinliklərə görə müxtəlif dil işlətməsi üçün mübahisə edirik. Biz çoxlu modal tərzdə dilin kompozisyonal gücü üçün çoxlu fərqli tərzdə oynayırıq.', 'bn': 'এই জরিপ নিয়ে আলোচনা করেছে কিভাবে মাল্টিমোডাল প্রক্রিয়ার সাম্প্রতিক উন্নয়নগুলো ভাষার ধারণার সুযোগ সুবিধা  আমরা মানব তথ্য প্রক্রিয়ার ক্ষেত্রে তথ্য প্রবাহের বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতি বিভিন্ন বিশ্লেষণ করি মানব তথ্য প্রক্রিয়ার মাধ্যমে। এই পদ্ধতিগত তথ্যের ভিত্তিতে আমরা বিভিন্ন ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার কাজ এবং চ্যালেঞ্জের জন্য মাল্টিমোডাল গ্রুউন্ডের সুবিধা নিয়ে আলো We particularly focus on multimodal grounding of verbs which play a crucial role for the compositional power of language.', 'ca': "This survey discusses how recent developments in multimodal processing facilitate conceptual grounding of language.  Categoriem el flux d'informació en el processament multimodal en relació amb models cognitius de processament d'informació humana i analitzem diferents mètodes per combinar representacions multimodals. Sobre la base d'aquest inventari metodològic, discutem el benefici de la fundació multimodal per una varietat de tasques de processament de llenguatges i els reptes que surten. Ens centrem especialment en el fonament multimodal dels verbs que juguen un paper crucial per al poder compositiu del llenguatge.", 'bs': 'U ovom istraživanju razgovara o tome kako nedavni razvoji u multimodalnom procesu olakšavaju konceptualno osnovanje jezika. Kategoriziramo tok informacija u multimodalnom obradi u odnosu na kognitivne modele obradivanja ljudskih informacija i analiziramo različite metode kombinacije multimodalnih predstavljanja. Na temelju ovog metodološkog inventara, razgovaramo o koristi multimodalnog osnova za različite zadatke obrade jezika i izazove koje se pojavljuju. Posebno se fokusiramo na multimodalno osnovanje verba koji imaju ključnu ulogu za kompozicionalnu moć jezika.', 'cs': 'Tento průzkum diskutuje, jak nedávný vývoj multimodálního zpracování usnadňuje koncepční uzemnění jazyka. Kategorizujeme tok informací v multimodálním zpracování s ohledem na kognitivní modely zpracování lidských informací a analyzujeme různé metody kombinování multimodálních reprezentací. Na základě tohoto metodického inventáře diskutujeme výhody multimodálního zázemí pro různé úkoly zpracování jazyků a výzvy, které vznikají. Zaměřujeme se zejména na multimodální uzemnění slovesa, která hrají klíčovou roli pro kompoziční sílu jazyka.', 'et': 'Uuringus käsitletakse, kuidas hiljutised arengud multimodaalses töötlemises hõlbustavad keele kontseptuaalset alust. Klassifitseerime multimodaalse töötlemise infovoogu seoses inimese infotöötlemise kognitiivsete mudelitega ning analüüsime erinevaid multimodaalsete esituste kombineerimise meetodeid. Selle metodoloogilise inventuuri põhjal arutleme mitmeliigilise aluse kasulikkust erinevate keeletöötlusülesannete jaoks ja tekkivaid väljakutseid. Eelkõige keskendume keele kompositsioonijõu seisukohalt otsustava rolli mängivate tegusõnade multimodaalsele alusele.', 'fi': 'Tässä tutkimuksessa tarkastellaan, miten multimodaalisen käsittelyn viimeaikainen kehitys helpottaa kielen käsitteellistä pohjautumista. Luokittelemme multimodaalisen prosessoinnin tiedonkulkua suhteessa ihmisen tiedonkäsittelyn kognitiivisiin malleihin ja analysoimme erilaisia menetelmiä multimodaalisten esitysten yhdistämiseksi. Tämän metodologisen inventaarion pohjalta keskustelemme multimodaalisen pohjautumisen hyödystä erilaisissa kielenkäsittelytehtävissä ja niihin liittyvistä haasteista. Keskitymme erityisesti verbien multimodaaliseen pohjautumiseen, joilla on ratkaiseva rooli kielen sävellysvoiman kannalta.', 'sk': 'Raziskava obravnava, kako nedavni razvoj multimodalne obdelave olajšuje konceptualno utemeljitev jezika. Kategoriziramo pretok informacij v multimodalni obdelavi glede na kognitivne modele obdelave človeških informacij in analiziramo različne metode kombiniranja multimodalnih reprezentacij. Na podlagi metodološkega inventarja razpravljamo o prednostih multimodalnega ozemljanja za različne naloge obdelave jezikov in izzivih, ki se pojavljajo. Posebej se osredotočamo na multimodalno utemeljevanje glagolov, ki imajo ključno vlogo za kompozicijsko moč jezika.', 'ha': "Wannan suriyar yana jãyayya a yanzu masu motsi a cikin jarrabar aiki masu ƙara da multi-mutane, ko kuma yana da amfani da sunan fasalin harshe. Tuna rarraba shirin information cikin aikin multi-mutane da misãlai na kognitive wa masu aikin mutane da kuma Muke rarraba hanyõyi daban-daban dõmin ka haɗa masu wakin multi-multi. Basan da wannan jerin mafariki, muna jãyayya da amfani na multi-mutane wa aikin aiki mãsu aiki da harshe da musamman da masu ƙaranci. Kayyai masu muhimmi zuwa ga jama'ar multi'a da ke yi musamman na musamman da muhimu wa muhimmin ƙarfin tamkar harshen.", 'jv': 'Awakdhéwé iki resmi banjuré pirsak-perusahaan yakéwé nggawe barang multimodal karo perusahaan kelangan winih apakno. Awak dhéwé kategorisi nggawe informasi akèh lan akeh multimodal karo perusahaan karo ingkang model sing perusahaan karo informasi uwong Ngawe kang basa sing nggoleki perbudhakan iki, kita ngubah perbudhakan kanggo ngerasar anyar tentang kanggo ngerasar winih lan akeh bantuan ingkang sampek Awak dhéwé hakan langkung wigatining kanggo ngerasakno sistem plurmodal', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་ཞིབ་འདིས་བརྗོད་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནུས་མེད་འདི་གིས་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་བསྐྱེད་པའི་སྐོར་ལས། We categorize the information flow in multimodal processing with respect to cognitive models of human information processing and analyze different methods for combining multimodal representations. ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་རྩ་བརྗོད་འདི་ལ་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་སྣ་མཐུན་གྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་ཐོག་ལས་སྦྱོར་བ་དང་མཐུན་པའི་དཀའ ང་ཚོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་རག་པར་ཆེས་ཁག་ཅིག་བྱེད་པའི་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་རྒྱབ་གཞི་མང་ཆོས་ལ་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།', 'he': 'הסקר הזה מדבר על איך התפתחות האחרונות בעבודה מולטומודלית מקדימות קישור מושג של שפה. אנו מארגנים את זרימת המידע בעבודה multimodal בנוגע לדוגמניות קוגניטיביות של עיבוד מידע אנושי ונבחנים שיטות שונות לשילוב מייצגים multimodal. בהתבסס על המלאי המתודלי הזה, אנחנו מדברים על היתרון של הקרקע multimodal למגוון של משימות עיבוד שפות והאתגרים שנוצאים. אנחנו מתמקדים במיוחד בקרקע רב-מודיאלי של אלברים שמשחקים תפקיד קריטי לכוח המרכיב של השפה.'}
{'en': 'Grounded Textual Entailment', 'ar': 'تأريض النص', 'es': 'Implicación textual fundamentada', 'pt': 'Implicação textual fundamentada', 'fr': 'Entailment textuel ancré', 'ja': 'グラウンディングされたテキストエンターテインメント', 'zh': '劄根文本蕴涵', 'hi': 'आधारपरक पाठ्य अनिवार्यता', 'ru': 'Обоснованное текстовое влечение', 'ga': 'Teistíocht Téacs Bunúsach', 'ka': 'ტექსტულის გარეშე', 'el': 'αιτιολογημένη επεξεργασία κειμένου', 'hu': 'Alapozott szövegbővítés', 'kk': 'Төменгі мәтінді біріктіру', 'mk': 'Започнат текстуален проблем', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയുടെ മെന്\u200dറ്', 'ms': 'Grounded Textual Entailment', 'mn': 'Гурван текст бүтээгдэхүүн', 'mt': 'Tagħmir Tekstulari Raġunat', 'it': 'Entailment testuale fondato', 'lt': 'Pagrindinis tekstinis sutrikimas', 'pl': 'Uzasadnione zmiany tekstowe', 'ro': 'Extindere textuală întemeiată', 'so': 'Heeganka qoraalka', 'si': 'මුළු පාළුවන් අවසානය', 'ta': 'உரை முகவரி', 'sv': 'Begränsad textintegration', 'ur': 'گروڈ ڈیکسٹیل ٹیکسٹیل', 'no': 'Grunnert tekstinnstilling', 'sr': 'Zakljuèena tekstualna kompleta', 'uz': 'Xabarlar roĘ»yxati', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'da': 'Begrundet tekstudvidelse', 'nl': 'Grondige tekstuele aanpassing', 'bg': 'Заземен текстов текст', 'hr': 'Zaključeno tekstualno uključenje', 'de': 'Begründete Textbeschneidung', 'fa': 'پایین متن', 'id': 'Grounded Textual Entailment', 'ko': '문장의 함축성에 뿌리를 내리다.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa Kiteknolojia', 'tr': 'Metin Dolamak', 'sq': 'Grounded Textual Entailment', 'af': 'Grounded Textual Entailment', 'am': 'Grounded Textual Entailment', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'গ্রেস করা টেক্সটেক্সট ইমেন্ট', 'bs': 'Zaključena tekstualna kompleta', 'cs': 'Odůvodněné textové odstranění', 'az': 'Üstünlü Metin Bölümü', 'fi': 'Perustettu teksti', 'ca': 'La malaltia textual fundamentada', 'et': 'Põhjatud tekstiline ühendus', 'he': 'מחלה טקסטולית מבוססת', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'sk': 'Ozemljena besedilna razporeditev', 'jv': 'text-box-mode', 'bo': 'རྒུད་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཆ་ཚང'}
{'en': 'Capturing semantic relations between sentences, such as entailment, is a long-standing challenge for computational semantics. Logic-based models analyse entailment in terms of possible worlds (interpretations, or situations) where a premise P entails a hypothesis H iff in all worlds where P is true, H is also true. Statistical models view this relationship probabilistically, addressing it in terms of whether a human would likely infer H from P. In this paper, we wish to bridge these two perspectives, by arguing for a visually-grounded version of the Textual Entailment task. Specifically, we ask whether models can perform better if, in addition to P and H, there is also an image (corresponding to the relevant world or situation). We use a multimodal version of the SNLI dataset (Bowman et al., 2015) and we compare blind and visually-augmented models of textual entailment. We show that visual information is beneficial, but we also conduct an in-depth error analysis that reveals that current multimodal models are not performing grounding in an optimal fashion.', 'es': 'Capturar las relaciones semánticas entre oraciones, como la implicación, es un desafío de larga data para la semántica computacional. Los modelos basados en la lógica analizan la implicación en términos de mundos posibles (interpretaciones o situaciones) donde una premisa P implica una hipótesis H si en todos los mundos donde P es verdadera, H también es verdadera. Los modelos estadísticos ven esta relación de manera probabilística, abordándola en términos de si un humano probablemente deduciría H de P. En este artículo, queremos unir estas dos perspectivas, argumentando a favor de una versión visualmente fundamentada de la tarea de Implicación Textual. En concreto, nos preguntamos si los modelos pueden funcionar mejor si, además de P y H, también hay una imagen (correspondiente al «mundo» o «situación» relevante). Utilizamos una versión multimodal del conjunto de datos SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) y comparamos modelos «ciegos» y aumentados visualmente de implicación textual. Demostramos que la información visual es beneficiosa, pero también realizamos un análisis de errores en profundidad que revela que los modelos multimodales actuales no están realizando una «conexión a tierra» de manera óptima.', 'ar': 'يعد التقاط العلاقات الدلالية بين الجمل ، مثل الاستنتاج ، تحديًا طويل الأمد للدلالات الحسابية. النماذج المستندة إلى المنطق تحلل الاستنتاج من حيث العوالم الممكنة (التفسيرات ، أو المواقف) حيث تستلزم الفرضية P فرضية H iff في جميع العوالم حيث P صحيحة ، H أيضًا صحيحة. تنظر النماذج الإحصائية إلى هذه العلاقة من منظور احتمالي ، وتتناولها من حيث ما إذا كان من المحتمل أن يستنتج الإنسان H من P. في هذه الورقة ، نرغب في تجسير هذين المنظورين ، من خلال مناقشة نسخة ذات أساس مرئي من مهمة الاستنتاج النصي. على وجه التحديد ، نسأل عما إذا كان يمكن للنماذج أن تعمل بشكل أفضل إذا كانت هناك أيضًا صورة (تتوافق مع "العالم" أو "الموقف" ذي الصلة ، بالإضافة إلى P و H). نحن نستخدم نسخة متعددة الوسائط من مجموعة بيانات SNLI (Bowman et al. ، 2015) ونقارن بين النماذج "العمياء" والنماذج المعززة بصريًا للاستدلال النصي. نظهر أن المعلومات المرئية مفيدة ، ولكننا نجري أيضًا تحليلًا متعمقًا للخطأ يكشف أن النماذج متعددة الوسائط الحالية لا تؤدي "التأريض" بالطريقة المثلى.', 'fr': "Capturer les relations sémantiques entre les phrases, comme l'implication, est un défi de longue date pour la sémantique computationnelle. Les modèles basés sur la logique analysent l'implication en termes de mondes possibles (interprétations ou situations) où une prémisse P implique une hypothèse H si dans tous les mondes où P est vrai, H est également vrai. Les modèles statistiques considèrent cette relation de façon probabiliste, en l'abordant en termes de question de savoir si un humain déduirait probablement H de P. Dans cet article, nous souhaitons établir un pont entre ces deux perspectives, en plaidant pour une version visuellement ancrée de la tâche d'implication textuelle. Plus précisément, nous demandons si les modèles peuvent être plus performants si, en plus de P et H, il existe également une image (correspondant au «\xa0monde\xa0» ou à la «\xa0situation\xa0» pertinent). Nous utilisons une version multimodale de l'ensemble de données SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) et nous comparons des modèles «\xa0aveugles\xa0» et visuellement augmentés d'implication textuelle. Nous montrons que les informations visuelles sont bénéfiques, mais nous menons également une analyse d'erreur approfondie qui révèle que les modèles multimodaux actuels ne réalisent pas une «\xa0mise à la terre\xa0» optimale.", 'pt': 'Capturar relações semânticas entre sentenças, como a vinculação, é um desafio de longa data para a semântica computacional. Modelos baseados em lógica analisam a implicação em termos de mundos possíveis (interpretações ou situações) onde uma premissa P implica uma hipótese H sse em todos os mundos onde P é verdadeiro, H também é verdadeiro. Modelos estatísticos veem essa relação de forma probabilística, abordando-a em termos de se um humano provavelmente inferiria H de P. Neste artigo, desejamos unir essas duas perspectivas, argumentando por uma versão visualmente fundamentada da tarefa Textual Entailment. Especificamente, perguntamos se os modelos podem ter melhor desempenho se, além de P e H, houver também uma imagem (correspondente ao “mundo” ou “situação” relevante). Usamos uma versão multimodal do conjunto de dados SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) e comparamos modelos “cegos” e visualmente aumentados de vinculação textual. Mostramos que a informação visual é benéfica, mas também realizamos uma análise de erro aprofundada que revela que os modelos multimodais atuais não estão realizando o “aterramento” da maneira ideal.', 'zh': '得句之语义,如蕴涵,计语义学之长战也。 盖逻者以世界(说)析蕴涵,其前P在诸P为真,H亦为真世界中皆有假H iff。 计模以概率视之,人以P推断出H解之。 于本文中,愿因论证本蕴涵视本以弥合之。 具体来说问P、H之外,有一图像(应相关世界、),其形可见。 吾用SNLI数集多模态版本(Bowman等,2015),吾校文本蕴涵盲视增模形。 明视息有益,然亦深入之差,揭示多模,未有以至接地也。', 'ja': '文の間の意味関係、例えば帰結を捉えることは、計算意味論にとって長年の課題である。 論理ベースのモデルは、Pが真であるすべての世界において、前提Pが仮説Hを伴う可能性のある世界（解釈、または状況）の観点から帰結を分析する。 統計モデルは、この関係を確率的に捉え、人間がPからHを推論する可能性があるかどうかという観点からそれに対処する。この論文では、テキストエンテイメントタスクの視覚的にアースされたバージョンを主張することによって、これら2つの視点を橋渡ししたい。 具体的には、PとHに加えて、イメージ（関連する「世界」または「状況」に対応する）がある場合、モデルがより良いパフォーマンスを発揮できるかどうかを尋ねます。 私たちは、SNLIデータセットのマルチモーダルバージョンを使用し（ Bowman et al., 2015 ）、テキストエンテイメントの「ブラインド」モデルと視覚的に拡張されたモデルを比較します。 視覚情報が有益であることを示していますが、現在のマルチモーダルモデルが最適な方法で「接地」を行っていないことを明らかにする深い誤差分析も行います。', 'ru': 'Захват семантических отношений между предложениями, таких как влечение, является давней проблемой для вычислительной семантики. Логические модели анализируют влечение с точки зрения возможных миров (интерпретаций или ситуаций), где предпосылка P влечет за собой гипотезу H iff во всех мирах, где P истинно, H также истинно. Статистические модели рассматривают эту связь вероятностно, рассматривая ее с точки зрения того, может ли человек вывести H из P. В этой статье мы хотим объединить эти две перспективы, аргументируя визуально обоснованную версию задачи «Текстовое влечение». В частности, мы спрашиваем, могут ли модели работать лучше, если, помимо P и H, существует также изображение (соответствующее соответствующему «миру» или «ситуации»). Мы используем мультимодальную версию набора данных SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) и сравниваем «слепую» и визуально дополненную модели текстового влечения. Мы показываем, что визуальная информация полезна, но мы также проводим углубленный анализ ошибок, который показывает, что текущие мультимодальные модели не выполняют «заземление» оптимальным образом.', 'hi': 'वाक्यों के बीच शब्दार्थ संबंधों को कैप्चर करना, जैसे कि अनिवार्यता, कम्प्यूटेशनल शब्दार्थ के लिए एक लंबे समय से चली आ रही चुनौती है। तर्क-आधारित मॉडल संभावित दुनिया (व्याख्याओं, या स्थितियों) के संदर्भ में विश्लेषण करते हैं जहां एक आधार पी सभी दुनिया में एक परिकल्पना एच आईएफएफ पर जोर देता है जहां पी सच है, एच भी सच है। सांख्यिकीय मॉडल इस संबंध को संभाव्य रूप से देखते हैं, इसे इस संदर्भ में संबोधित करते हैं कि क्या कोई मानव संभवतः पी से एच का अनुमान लगाएगा। इस पेपर में, हम इन दो दृष्टिकोणों को पुल करना चाहते हैं, पाठ्य अनिवार्यता कार्य के नेत्रहीन-आधारित संस्करण के लिए बहस करके। विशेष रूप से, हम पूछते हैं कि क्या मॉडल बेहतर प्रदर्शन कर सकते हैं यदि, पी और एच के अलावा, एक छवि भी है (प्रासंगिक "दुनिया" या "स्थिति" के अनुरूप)। हम SNLI डेटासेट (Bowman et al., 2015) के एक बहुआयामी संस्करण का उपयोग करते हैं और हम "अंधा" और पाठ्य तात्पर्य के नेत्रहीन-संवर्धित मॉडल की तुलना करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि दृश्य जानकारी फायदेमंद है, लेकिन हम एक गहन त्रुटि विश्लेषण भी करते हैं जो बताता है कि वर्तमान मल्टीमॉडल मॉडल इष्टतम फैशन में "ग्राउंडिंग" नहीं कर रहे हैं।', 'ga': 'Is dúshlán le fada an lá do shéimeantaic ríomhaireachtúil caidreamh shéimeantach a ghabháil idir abairtí, mar thabhaíocht. Déanann samhlacha atá bunaithe ar an loighic anailís ar shamhlú i dtéarmaí saolta féideartha (léirmhínithe, nó cásanna) nuair a bhíonn hipitéis H iff i gceist le premise P i ngach saol ina bhfuil P fíor, tá H fíor freisin. Féachann samhlacha staitisticiúla ar an ngaol seo go dóchasach, ag tabhairt aghaidh air i dtéarmaí cé acu an dócha go mbainfeadh duine le H ó P. Sa pháipéar seo, is mian linn an dá pheirspictíocht seo a líonadh, trí argóint a dhéanamh ar son leagan radharc-bhunaithe den tasc um Theagmháil Téacsúil. Go sonrach, fiafraíonn muid an féidir le samhlacha feidhmiú níos fearr más rud é, i dteannta P agus H, go bhfuil íomhá ann freisin (a fhreagraíonn don “domhan” nó don “staidéar”) ábhartha. Bainimid úsáid as leagan ilmhódach de thacar sonraí SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) agus déanaimid comparáid idir samhlacha “dall” agus samhlacha méadaithe amhairc de shamhlú téacsúil. Léirímid go bhfuil tairbhe ag baint le faisnéis amhairc, ach déanaimid anailís dhomhain earráide a thaispeánann nach bhfuil na samhlacha ilmhódacha reatha ag feidhmiú “bunús” ar an mbealach is fearr is féidir.', 'ka': "ჟვმანრთფნთ გპყჱკთ ჲრ ჟყჱეყლზვნთწრა, კარჲ თნრვპვჟნჲჟრ, ვ ეყლდჲეყლნთ ოპვეგთე ჱა კჲმოძრაუთჲნალნთწ ჟვმანრთკ. ლოგიკური მოდელების ანალიზაცია შესაძლებელი მსოფლიოების (ან სიტუაციების) შესახებ, სადაც პრემიზაცია P იყენებს ჰიპოტეზა H iff ყველა მსოფლიოში, სადაც P არის მართლა, H იგივეა მართ Statistical models view this relationship probabilistically, addressing it in terms of whether a human would likely infer H from P. In this paper, we want to bridge these two perspectives, by arguing for a visually-grounded version of the Textual Entailment task. განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ კითხვით, თუ მოდელები უკეთესი შეუძლია გავაკეთოთ თუ P და H-ს დამატებით, არსებობს სურათი (შესაბამისი 'მსოფლიო' ან 'სიტაციაცი ჩვენ გამოყენებთ SNLI მონაცემების მულტიმოდიალური ვერსია (Bowman et al., 2015) და ჩვენ შემწყენებთ 'blind' და ვიზუალურად აზრუმენტირებული ტექსტულური მოდელების მოდულები. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ვიზუალური ინფორმაცია უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, მაგრამ ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთებთ განსხვავებული შეცდომის ანალიზი, რომელიც აჩვენებს, რომ მიმდინარე მულტიმოდელური მოდელები", 'kk': 'Сөйлемелер арасындағы семантикалық қатынастарды түсіру, мысалы, компьютерлік семантикалық қатынастар үшін ұзындық мәселе. Логикалық негіздеген үлгілерді анализ мүмкін әлемдерді (толықтар, немесе мәзірлерді) қарағанда P-нің гипотезасы барлық әлемдерде P-нің шынында, H-нің де шынында болады. Статистикалық үлгілер бұл қатынасы ықтималдығымен қарап, адамдар P-ден H-нің қатынасын шешу мүмкіндігін түсіндіреді. Бұл қағазда, біз бұл екі қатынасын көшірмек деп, мәтін толтыру тапсырмасының көрінісін негіздеген нұ Ескерілікті, P және H дегенге қосымша, үлгілер жақсы істеуге болады деп сұраймыз (әлем немесе \'жағдай\' дегенге сәйкес келеді). Біз SNLI деректер жинағының көп модель нұсқасын (Bowman et al., 2015) қолданатын және мәтіндік жинақтау үлгілерін \'blind\' және visually-augmented моделдерді салыстырып көрдік. Көрініс мәліметі пайдалы екенін көрсетедік, бірақ біз сондай-ақ қатенің тереңдігін анализ етіп, қазіргі көптеген моделдердің оптимал түрде "зерттеу" дегенді көрсетеді.', 'el': 'Η καταγραφή σημασιολογικών σχέσεων μεταξύ προτάσεων, όπως η συμπερίληψη, αποτελεί μακροχρόνια πρόκληση για την υπολογιστική σημασιολογία. Τα λογικά μοντέλα αναλύουν την εμπλοκή με όρους πιθανών κόσμων (ερμηνείες, ή καταστάσεις) όπου μια υπόθεση Ρ συνεπάγεται μια υπόθεση Η if σε όλους τους κόσμους όπου το Ρ είναι αληθινό, η είναι επίσης αλήθεια. Τα στατιστικά μοντέλα βλέπουν αυτή τη σχέση πιθανά, αντιμετωπίζοντας την ως προς το κατά πόσον ένας άνθρωπος θα μπορούσε πιθανώς να συναγάγει την Ε από το Π. Σε αυτή την εργασία, επιθυμούμε να γεφυρώσουμε αυτές τις δύο προοπτικές, υποστηρίζοντας μια οπτικά τεκμηριωμένη έκδοση του έργου κειμένου. Συγκεκριμένα, ρωτάμε αν τα μοντέλα μπορούν να αποδώσουν καλύτερα εάν, εκτός από το Π και το Χ, υπάρχει και μια εικόνα (που αντιστοιχεί στον σχετικό "κόσμο" ή "κατάσταση"). Χρησιμοποιούμε μια πολυμορφική έκδοση του συνόλου δεδομένων και συγκρίνουμε "τυφλά" και οπτικά ενισχυμένα μοντέλα κειμένου. Δείχνουμε ότι η οπτική πληροφορία είναι ευεργετική, αλλά διεξάγουμε επίσης μια σε βάθος ανάλυση σφαλμάτων που αποκαλύπτει ότι τα σημερινά πολυμορφικά μοντέλα δεν αποδίδουν "γείωση" με τον βέλτιστο τρόπο.', 'lt': 'Capturing semantic relations between sentences, such as entailment, is a long-standing challenge for computational semantics.  Logiškai pagrįsti modeliai analizuoja susijusius klausimus galimų pasaulių atžvilgiu (aiškinimai arba situacijos), kai P prielaida apima H tarifo hipotezę visuose pasauliuose, kur P yra tiesa, H taip pat yra tiesa. Statistiniai modeliai tikimybėmis vertina šį santykį, sprendžiant jį, ar žmogus tikriausiai inferuoja H iš P. Šiame dokumente mes norime prisijungti prie šių dviejų perspektyvų, argumentuodami dėl vizualiai pagrįstos Tekstualinės ligos užduoties versijos. Konkrečiai klausiame, ar modeliai gali geriau veikti, jei, be P ir H, yra ir vaizdas (atitinkantis atitinkamą "pasaulį" arba "padėtį"). Naudojame daugiarūšį SNLI duomenų rinkinio versiją (Bowman et al., 2015 m.) ir palyginame "aklus" ir vizualiai padidintus teksto įtraukimo modelius. Mes rodome, kad vaizdinė informacija yra naudinga, tačiau taip pat atliekame nuodugnią klaidų analizę, kuri atskleidžia, kad dabartiniai daugiarūšio transporto modeliai nėra optimaliai grindžiami.', 'ms': "Menangkap hubungan semantik antara kalimat, seperti penyelesaian, adalah cabaran yang lama untuk semantik pengiraan. Model berdasarkan logik menganalisis penyelesaian dalam terma dunia yang mungkin (interpretasi, atau situasi) dimana premis P mengandungi hipotesis H iff di semua dunia dimana P adalah benar, H juga benar. Model statistik memandang hubungan ini secara probabilistik, mengatasinya dalam terma sama ada manusia mungkin akan menyimpulkan H dari P. Dalam kertas ini, kita ingin menyambungkan kedua-dua perspektif ini, dengan argumen untuk versi secara visual-grounded tugas penyakit Teks. Secara khusus, kita bertanya sama ada model boleh melakukan lebih baik jika, selain P dan H, terdapat juga imej (yang sepadan dengan 'dunia' atau 'situasi' yang relevan'). Kami menggunakan versi multimodal set data SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) dan kita membandingkan 'buta' dan model penggunaan teks yang meningkat secara visual. Kami menunjukkan bahawa maklumat visual berguna, tetapi kami juga melakukan analisis ralat dalam yang mengungkapkan bahawa model multimodal semasa tidak melakukan 'grounding' dengan cara yang optimal.", 'ml': "വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന്നത്, വിവരമില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d, കണക്കൂട്ടിക ലോജിക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുക സാധ്യമായ ലോകത്തിന്\u200dറെ (വിശദീകരണങ്ങളോ സാഹചര്യങ്ങളോ എന്നാല്\u200d) പരിശോധിക്കുക. പി സത്യമാണെങ്കില്\u200d  സ്റ്റേറ്റിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഈ ബന്ധത്തെ കാണാന്\u200d സാധ്യമായിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു മനുഷ്യന്\u200d H-ല്\u200d നിന്നും താല്\u200dപര്യമുണ്ടോ എന്ന് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പേപ്പറി പിന്നെയും H കൂടാതെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുമോ എന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ചോദിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു ചിത്രം ഉണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d ('ലോകം' അല ഞങ്ങള്\u200d SNLI ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റിന്റെ (ബോവ്മാന്\u200d എറ്റ് അല്\u200d., 2015) ഒരു മുള്\u200dട്ടിമോഡല്\u200d പതിപ്പ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 'അന്ധത്തില്\u200d' കാണുന കാഴ്ചയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപകാരമാണെന്ന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ആഴത്തിലുള്ള പിശക് അന്യായം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പലിമോഡ", 'mt': "Capturing semantic relations between sentences, such as entailment, is a long-standing challenge for computational semantics.  Logic-based models analyse entailment in terms of possible worlds (interpretations, or situations) where a premise P entails a hypothesis H iff in all worlds where P is true, H is also true.  Il-mudelli statistiċi jaraw din ir-relazzjoni b’mod probabilistiku, billi jindirizzawha f’termini ta’ jekk bniedem x’aktarx inferix H minn P. F’dan id-dokument, nixtiequ ngħaqdu dawn iż-żewġ perspettivi, billi jargumentaw għal verżjoni viżwalment ibbażata fuq il-kompitu ta’ Entailment Testwali. Specifically, we ask whether models can perform better if, in addition to P and H, there is also an image (corresponding to the relevant 'world' or 'situation').  Aħna nużaw verżjoni multimodali tas-sett tad-dejta SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) u nqabblu mudelli ta' involviment testwali 'għomja' u miżjuda viżwalment. Aħna nuru li l-informazzjoni viżiva hija ta’ benefiċċju, iżda nagħmlu wkoll analiżi ta’ żbalji fil-fond li turi li l-mudelli multimodali attwali mhumiex qed iwettqu 'bażi' bl-aħjar mod.", 'hu': 'A mondatok közötti szemantikai kapcsolatok rögzítése, mint például a vonatkozás, régóta fennálló kihívás a számítástechnikai szemantika számára. A logikai alapú modellek olyan lehetséges világokban (értelmezések vagy helyzetek) vizsgálják a vonatkozást, ahol a P előfeltétel H iff-et tartalmaz minden olyan világban, ahol P igaz, H is igaz. A statisztikai modellek valószínűleg vizsgálják ezt a kapcsolatot, és azzal foglalkoznak, hogy egy ember valószínűleg H-t következtet-e P-től. Ebben a tanulmányban ezt a két perspektívát kívánjuk áthidalni, a Textual Entailment feladat vizuálisan megalapozott változata mellett érvelve. Konkrétan azt kérdezzük, hogy a modellek jobban teljesíthetnek-e, ha a P és H mellett van egy kép is (amely megfelel az adott "világnak" vagy "helyzetnek"). Az SNLI adatkészlet multimodális változatát használjuk (Bowman et al., 2015), és összehasonlítjuk a "vak" és vizuálisan kiterjesztett szövegmodelleket. Megmutatjuk, hogy a vizuális információ előnyös, de mélyreható hibaelemzést is végzünk, amely feltárja, hogy a jelenlegi multimodális modellek nem teljesítenek optimális "földelést".', 'mk': 'Capturing semantic relations between sentences, such as entailment, is a long-standing challenge for computational semantics.  Логичките модели анализираат вмешаност во поглед на можните светови (интерпретации, или ситуации) каде претпоставка П предизвикува хипотеза Хиф во сите светови каде што П е вистина, Х е исто така вистина. Статистичките модели веројатно ја гледаат оваа врска, обраќајќи ја во поглед на тоа дали човекот веројатно ќе инферира H од P. Во овој весник, сакаме да ги преместиме овие две перспективи, со аргумент за визуелно основана верзија на задачата Текстуална болест. Специфично, прашуваме дали моделите можат да бидат подобри ако, покрај П и Х, постои и слика (која одговара на релевантната „светска“ или „ситуација“). Користиме мултимодилна верзија на СНЛИ податоците (Bowman et al., 2015) и ги споредуваме „слепите“ и визуелно зголемените модели на текстуално вмешање. Покажуваме дека визуелните информации се корисни, но исто така спроведуваме длабока анализа на грешки која открива дека актуелните мултимодилни модели не вршат „основа“ на оптимален начин.', 'it': "Catturare le relazioni semantiche tra frasi, come il coinvolgimento, è una sfida di lunga data per la semantica computazionale. I modelli basati sulla logica analizzano il coinvolgimento in termini di mondi possibili (interpretazioni o situazioni) in cui una premessa P implica un'ipotesi H iff in tutti i mondi in cui P è vero, H è anche vero. I modelli statistici vedono questa relazione probabilisticamente, affrontando in termini di probabilità se un essere umano potrebbe dedurre H da P. In questo articolo, desideriamo collegare queste due prospettive, sostenendo una versione visivamente fondata del compito Textual Entailment. Nello specifico, ci chiediamo se i modelli possano funzionare meglio se, oltre a P e H, esiste anche un'immagine (corrispondente al relativo 'mondo' o 'situazione'). Utilizziamo una versione multimodale del dataset SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) e confrontiamo modelli 'ciechi' e visivamente aumentati di implicazione testuale. Dimostriamo che le informazioni visive sono utili, ma conduciamo anche un'analisi approfondita degli errori che rivela che gli attuali modelli multimodali non stanno eseguendo 'ground' in modo ottimale.", 'pl': 'Uchwytywanie relacji semantycznych między zdaniami, takich jak implikacja, jest długotrwałym wyzwaniem dla semantyki obliczeniowej. Modele oparte na logice analizują zaangażowanie pod kątem możliwych światów (interpretacji lub sytuacji), w których założenie P pociąga za sobą hipotezę H iff we wszystkich światach, w których P jest prawdziwe, H również jest prawdziwe. Modele statystyczne postrzegają tę relację prawdopodobnie, odnosząc się do niej pod kątem tego, czy człowiek prawdopodobnie wywnioskowałby H z P. W niniejszym artykule chcemy połączyć te dwie perspektywy, argumentując za wizualnie uziemioną wersją zadania Textual Entailment. W szczególności pytamy, czy modele mogą działać lepiej, jeśli oprócz P i H istnieje także obraz (odpowiadający odpowiedniemu "światu" lub "sytuacji"). Wykorzystujemy multimodalną wersję zbioru danych SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) i porównujemy "ślepe" i wizualnie rozszerzone modele implikacji tekstowej. Pokazujemy, że informacje wizualne są korzystne, ale przeprowadzamy również dogłębną analizę błędów, która ujawnia, że obecne modele multimodalne nie wykonują "uziemienia" w optymalny sposób.', 'ro': 'Capturarea relațiilor semantice dintre propoziții, cum ar fi implicarea, este o provocare de lungă durată pentru semantica computațională. Modelele bazate pe logică analizează implicarea în termeni de lumi posibile (interpretări sau situații) în care o premisă P implică o ipoteză H iff în toate lumile în care P este adevărat, H este de asemenea adevărat. Modelele statistice vizualizează această relație probabil, abordându-o în termeni de faptul că un om ar deduce probabil H de la P. În această lucrare, dorim să facem o punte între aceste două perspective, argumentând pentru o versiune vizuală bazată pe sarcina Entailment Textual. Mai exact, ne întrebăm dacă modelele pot performa mai bine dacă, pe lângă P și H, există și o imagine (corespunzătoare "lumii" sau "situației") relevante. Folosim o versiune multimodală a setului de date SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) și comparăm modele "orb" și cu mărirea vizuală a implicării textuale. Aratăm că informațiile vizuale sunt benefice, dar efectuăm, de asemenea, o analiză aprofundată a erorilor care dezvăluie că modelele multimodale actuale nu efectuează "împământare" într-un mod optim.', 'sr': 'Uhvaćanje semantičkih odnosa između rečenica, poput želje, je dugogodišnji izazov za računalne semantike. Logički modeli analiziraju zadovoljstvo u smislu mogućih sveta (interpretacija, ili situacija) gde premisa P uključuje hipotezu H ako je u svim svijetima gde je P istina, H je takođe istina. Statistički modeli gledaju ovu vezu verovatno, rješavajući se s obzirom da li bi čovek vjerojatno inficirao H iz P. U ovom papiru, želeli bismo predstaviti te dve perspektive, svađajući se za vizualno osnovanu verziju zadatka tekstualne kompletnosti. Posebno pitamo da li modeli mogu bolje izvesti ako, uz P i H, postoji i slika (odgovara relevantnoj \'svet\' ili \'situaciji\'). Koristimo multimodalnu verziju seta podataka SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) i uspoređujemo \'slijepe\' i vizualno povećane modele tekstualne tvrdnje. Pokazujemo da je vizualna informacija korisna, ali takođe provodimo analizu dubokih greška koja pokazuje da trenutni multimodalni modeli ne izvode "osnova" optimalno.', 'si': "වාක්ය අතර සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධතාවක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, හරියට සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන්, පරිගණනය සම්බන්ධ වි පුළුවන් ලෝකය (අභිවාදය, නැත්නම්) ප්\u200dරධාන P අභිවාදය H iff හැම ලෝකයේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා කියලා. ස්ථානික මොඩල් බලන්නේ මේ සම්බන්ධය ප්\u200dරශ්නත්වයෙන්, මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරශ්නත්වයෙන් H ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නැද්ද කියලා කිය විශේෂයෙන්, අපි අහන්නේ මොඩල් හොඳින් කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, P සහ H සමඟ, පින්තූරයක් තියෙනවා නම් (සම්බන්ධ 'ලෝක'  අපි SNLI දත්ත සැට (බෝමාන් ට් ල්., 2015) ගැන වඩා මොඩාල් මොඩාල් වර්ගයක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා ඒ වගේම අපි පාවිච්චිත විදිහට 'අන්ධි අපි පෙන්වන්නේ දර්ශණ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරයෝජනයි, නමුත් අපි ගොඩක් ගොඩක් විශ්ලේෂණයක් කරනවා ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ පුළුවන් විදිහට ව", 'so': "Isku qabsashada xiriirka semantika ee u dhexeeya xukunka, tusaale ahaan aqoonta, waa dhibaato dheer oo la xiriira xisaabinta. Tilmaamaha asalka nolojiga ee uu ku qoran karo daruuraha suurtagalka ah (turjubaan ama xaaladaha) oo uu horumarinta P ku sameeyo hypothesis H iff oo ku yaala dunida oo dhan oo P uu run yahay, H waa run. Tusaaladaha takhasuska ah waxay ka muuqataa xiriirkan, waxaana loola macaamiloonayaa in qof u suurtowdo inuu H ka baahan karo warqaddan P. Si gaar ah, waxaynu weydiinnaa in modellada ay u sameyn karaan in ka wanaagsan, in ka sokow P iyo H, ay jiraan sawir (taas oo u eg ‘dunida’ ama ‘xaaladda’). Waxaynu isticmaalnaa warqad badan oo SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) waxaana isbarbardhignaa tusaalaha dhaqaalaha iyo aragga la kordhiyey. Waxaynu muujinnaa in macluumaadka aragtidu ay faa'iido leedahay, laakiin waxaynu sameynaa baaritaanka khaladda hoos u dheer, taasoo muuqata in modelalka dhaqdhaqaaqa ah aysan ku sameyn qaab aad u wanaagsan.", 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн хоорондох хэмжээсүүдийн semantic холбоотой байдлыг тооцоолох нь маш урт зорилго юм. Логик суурилсан загварууд магадгүй ертөнцийн (ярилцлага, эсвэл нөхцөл байдал) талаар шинжилгээ хийдэг бөгөөд P-г бүх дэлхий дээр P үнэн байдаг, H мөн үнэн байдаг. Статистикийн загварууд энэ харилцааныг магадгүй харуулж, хүн P-ээс H-г халдварлах эсэхийг тодорхойлж байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид эдгээр хоёр харилцааны талаар тулгармаар байна. Тухайлбал, бид загварууд P болон H дээр нэмэгдэхэд илүү сайн хийж чадах эсэхийг асуудаг. Бид SNLI өгөгдлийн сангийн олон моделийн хувилбарыг ашиглаж, мөн бид "хараагүй" болон "хараагүй" хэмжээсүүдийг харьцуулж байна. Бид харагдаж байгаа мэдээлэл ашигтай гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ бид мөн гүн гүнзгий алдаа асуудлын шинжилгээ хийдэг. Энэ нь одоогийн олон моделийн загварууд эерэг аргаар "суурь" хийдэггүй гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'ta': "தெரியாத வாக்கியங்களுக்கு இடையே இருக்கும் இடையே பெம்பென்டிக் தொடர்புகளை பிடித்துக் கொள்வது, கணக்கீட்டு அரைப்ப பி உண்மையாக இருக்கும் உலகத்தில் ஒரு முன்னோக்கு P ஒரு ஹைப்ப் கொண்டு இருக்கும் அனைத்து உலகங்களிலும் ஒரு முன்னோட்டு P என்று இருக்கும் போதும் ஒர புள்ளிவிவரமான மாதிரிகள் இந்த தொடர்பை பார்க்க வேண்டும். ஒரு மனிதன் பியிலிருந்து H-ஐ குறைக்க வேண்டுமா என்று கூறுகிறார்கள். இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் இந்த இரண்டு கா குறிப்பிட்டு, மாதிரிகள் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்த முடியுமா என்று நாம் கேட்கிறோம், P மற்றும் H கூடுதலாக ஒரு பிம்பம் இருக்கிறதா (தொடர் நாம் SNLI தரவுத்தளத்தின் பல்முறையான பதிப்பு (Bowman et al., 2015) பயன்படுத்தி நாம் 'குருட்டு' மற்றும் பார்வையான மாதிரிகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம். நாங்கள் பார்வை தகவல் பயனுள்ளது என்று காட்டுகிறோம், ஆனால் நாம் ஆழமான பிழை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். தற்போதைய பல மாதிரிகள் தெரிவிக்கிறது 'grounding' வ", 'ur': "جماعتوں کے درمیان سیمنٹی رابطہ کاپیٹ کرنا، جیسے ارادہ کرنا، کمپیوٹیونٹی سیمانٹیکس کے لئے ایک طولانی چال ہے. موجود دنیا (تعبیر، یا موقعیت) کے مطابق منطقی مدلکوں کی تحقیق کرتی ہیں جہاں ایک نمایس پی نے تمام دنیا میں ایک فرضی اچ کی ہے، جہاں پی سچ ہے، اچ بھی سچ ہے. ایستٹیسٹیکل موڈلز یہ رابطہ احتمالی طور پر دیکھ رہے ہیں، اس کے بارے میں اس کا اظہار کرنا چاہتے ہیں کہ کوئی انسان P سے اظہار کرے یا نہ کرے، اس کاغذ میں ہم چاہتے ہیں کہ یہ دو منظور پوری کریں، اس کے ذریعہ سے ایک دکھانے والی نسخہ کے لئے بحث کریں. مخصوص طور پر، ہم پوچھتے ہیں کہ موڈل اچھی طرح کر سکتے ہیں، اگر P اور H کے علاوہ بھی ایک تصویر بھی ہوتی ہے (موجود 'دنیا' یا 'وضعیت' کے ساتھ مطابق ہے)۔ ہم SNLI ڈاٹ سٹ (Bowman et al., 2015) کی ایک multimodal نسخہ استعمال کرتے ہیں اور ہم نے 'اندھا' اور 'visually-augmented' نمونڈلوں کو تفریق دیتے ہیں۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ visual information is useful, but we also conduct a depth error analysis that reveals that current multimodal models are not performing 'grounding' in an optimal fashion.", 'no': 'Det er ein langtidig utfordring for datasemantikk for å henta semantiske forholdet mellom setningar, slik som innstilling. Logisk baserte modeller analyserar innstillingar i uttrykk av moglege verda (tolkingar, eller situasjonar) der ein premise P inneheld ein hypotese H iff i alle verda der P er sann, er H også sann. Statistiske modeller viser denne forholdet sannsynligvis, og adresserer det i uttrykk av om ein menneske vil sannsynligvis inferer H frå P. I denne papiret ønskjer vi å bryta desse to perspektiva ved å argumentera for ein visuelt bakgrunnsfarga versjon av tekstfullføringsoppgåva. Spesielt spør vi om modeller kan utføre bedre dersom, i tillegg til P og H, er det også eit bilete (som tilsvarar den relevante «verden» eller «situasjonen»). Vi bruker ein multimodal versjon av SNLI-datasettet (Bowman et al., 2015) og vi sammenliknar «blind» og «visual-augmentert modeller av tekstinnhaldet. Vi viser at visualinformasjon er nyttig, men vi gjer også ein feilanalyse i dybde som viser at gjeldande multimodal modeller ikkje utfører «grunnlegging» i ein optimal måte.', 'sv': 'Att fånga semantiska relationer mellan meningar, såsom involvering, är en långvarig utmaning för beräkningsemantik. Logikbaserade modeller analyserar innebörden i termer av möjliga världar (tolkningar eller situationer) där en premiss P innebär en hypotes H iff i alla världar där P är sant, H är också sant. Statistiska modeller ser detta förhållande sannolikt, och behandlar det i termer av huruvida en människa sannolikt skulle härleda H från P. I denna uppsats vill vi överbrygga dessa två perspektiv, genom att argumentera för en visuellt grundad version av uppgiften Textual Entailment. Specifikt frågar vi oss om modellerna kan prestera bättre om det förutom P och H även finns en bild (motsvarande relevant "värld" eller "situation"). Vi använder en multimodal version av SNLI-datauppsättningen (Bowman et al., 2015) och jämför "blinda" och visuellt förstärkta modeller av textinnehåll. Vi visar att visuell information är fördelaktig, men vi genomför också en djupgående felanalys som visar att nuvarande multimodala modeller inte utför "jordning" på ett optimalt sätt.', 'vi': 'Bắt giữ quan hệ ngữ pháp giữa các câu, như Thuyết trình, là một thách thức dài với ngữ pháp tính toán. Các mô hình dựa vào logic phân tích kết cấu theo dạng của các thế giới có thể (cách giải thích, hay tình huống) khi một tiêu đề P dẫn đến một giả thuyết H trong tất cả các thế giới nơi P là thật, H cũng đúng. Các mô hình thống kê xem mối quan hệ này có thể xác định được nếu con người có khả năng ngụ ý H từ P. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi muốn kết nối hai quan điểm này bằng cách tranh luận về một phiên bản theo hình thức của nhiệm vụ cấu trúc. Cụ thể, chúng tôi hỏi liệu mô hình có thể làm tốt hơn không nếu, ngoài P và H, còn có ảnh (tương ứng với "thế giới" hay "tình huống" liên quan). Chúng tôi sử dụng một phiên bản đa phương của bộ dữ liệu SNCC (Bowman et al., 205) và chúng tôi so sánh các mô hình "mù" và hình thức tăng thêm về kết cấu. Chúng tôi cho thấy thông tin thị giác là có ích, nhưng chúng tôi cũng tiến hành một phân tích lỗi sâu dẫn cho thấy những mô hình đa phương không chuẩn bị theo cách tối ưu.', 'uz': "Tasdiqlik bilan so'zlar orasidagi semantik aloqalarni qabul qilish, kompyuterning semantika uchun uzun qismi. Name Statistik modellari bu aloqalarni ko'rsatish mumkin, inson P'dan H'ni ko'rsatish mumkin deb aytish mumkin. Bu hujjatda biz bu ikkita xususiyatlarni birlashtirishni xohlashni xohlamamiz. Koʻrsatilgan, biz modellar P va H bilan bajarishini bajarishi mumkin deb сўраймиз, agar rasm ham (muhim 'dunyo' yoki 'holat' kabi boʻlishi mumkin). @ info: status Ko'rinadigan maʼlumot foydalanishini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, lekin biz muvaffaqiyatli xato analysini bajaramiz. Joriy ko'plamda modellarni optik usulda bajarmayapti.", 'bg': 'Заснемането на семантични връзки между изреченията, като например обвързване, е дългогодишно предизвикателство за изчислителната семантика. Логически базирани модели анализират обвързването от гледна точка на възможни светове (интерпретации или ситуации), където дадена предпоставка Р предполага хипотеза H iff във всички светове, където Р е вярно, Х също е вярно. Статистическите модели разглеждат тази връзка вероятностно, като я разглеждат по отношение на това дали човек вероятно би извел Н от П. В тази статия искаме да свържем тези две перспективи, като се аргументираме за визуално обоснована версия на задачата Текстово разгръщане. По-конкретно питаме дали моделите могат да се представят по-добре, ако освен П и Н има и изображение (съответстващо на съответния "свят" или "ситуация"). Използваме мултимодална версия на набора от данни и сравняваме "слепи" и визуално разширени модели на текстово обвързване. Показваме, че визуалната информация е полезна, но също така провеждаме задълбочен анализ на грешките, който разкрива, че настоящите мултимодални модели не изпълняват оптимално "заземяване".', 'da': 'At fange semantiske relationer mellem sætninger, såsom involvering, er en langvarig udfordring for beregningsmæssig semantik. Logikbaserede modeller analyserer involvering i form af mulige verdener (fortolkninger eller situationer), hvor en præmis P indebærer en hypotese H iff i alle verdener, hvor P er sandt, H er også sandt. Statistiske modeller betragter dette forhold sandsynligt og behandler det med hensyn til, om et menneske sandsynligvis ville udlede H fra P. I denne artikel ønsker vi at bygge bro over disse to perspektiver ved at argumentere for en visuelt grundlagt version af opgaven Textual Entailment. Vi spørger specifikt, om modeller kan klare sig bedre, hvis der ud over P og H også er et billede (svarende til den relevante "verden" eller "situation"). Vi bruger en multimodal version af SNLI datasættet (Bowman et al., 2015) og sammenligner \'blinde\' og visuelt forstærkede modeller af tekstinvolvering. Vi viser, at visuel information er gavnlig, men vi gennemfører også en dybdegående fejlanalyse, der afslører, at nuværende multimodale modeller ikke udfører \'jording\' optimalt.', 'hr': 'Uhvaćanje semantičkih odnosa između rečenica, poput želje, je dugogodišnji izazov za računalne semantike. Logički modeli analiziraju zahtjev mogućih svijeta (interpretacija ili situacija) gdje premisa P sadrži hipotezu H iff u svim svijetima gdje je P istina, H je također istina. Statistički modeli gledaju ovu vezu vjerojatno, rješavajući se s obzirom da li će čovjek vjerojatno inferirati H iz P. U ovom papiru, želimo premostiti te dvije perspektive, svađajući se za vizualno temeljenu verziju zadatka tekstualnog kompleta. Posebno pitamo da li se modeli mogu bolje izvršiti ako, uz P i H, postoji i slika (odgovara relevantnoj \'svijetu\' ili \'situaciji\'). Koristimo multimodalnu verziju seta podataka SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) i uspoređujemo "slijepe" i vizualno povećane modele tekstualne tvrdnje. Pokazujemo da je vizualna informacija korisna, ali također provodimo analizu dubokih greška koja pokazuje da trenutni multimodalni modeli ne izvode "osnova" optimalno.', 'nl': "Het vastleggen van semantische relaties tussen zinnen, zoals implicatie, is een langdurige uitdaging voor computationele semantiek. Logische modellen analyseren implicatie in termen van mogelijke werelden (interpretaties of situaties) waarbij een premise P een hypothese H iff impliceert in alle werelden waar P waar is, H ook waar is. Statistische modellen zien deze relatie waarschijnlijk en behandelen het in termen van de vraag of een mens waarschijnlijk H uit P zou afleiden. In dit artikel willen we deze twee perspectieven overbruggen, door te pleiten voor een visueel gegronde versie van de Textual Entailment taak. Specifiek vragen we of modellen beter kunnen presteren als er naast P en H ook een beeld is (corresponderend met de relevante 'wereld' of 'situatie'). We gebruiken een multimodale versie van de SNLI dataset (Bowman et al., 2015) en vergelijken 'blinde' en visueel augmented modellen van tekstuele implicatie. We laten zien dat visuele informatie gunstig is, maar we voeren ook een diepgaande foutanalyse uit waaruit blijkt dat huidige multimodale modellen niet optimaal 'aarding' uitvoeren.", 'id': "Menangkap hubungan semantis antara kalimat, seperti entailment, adalah tantangan lama untuk semantis komputasi. Model berbasis logis menganalisis keterlibatan dalam terma dunia kemungkinan (interpretasi, atau situasi) dimana premis P mengandung hipotesis H iff di semua dunia dimana P adalah benar, H juga benar. Model statistik melihat hubungan ini secara probabilis, mengatasinya dalam terma apakah manusia mungkin akan menyimpulkan H dari P. Dalam kertas ini, kita ingin menyembunyikan kedua perspektif ini, dengan argumen untuk versi visual-grounded dari tugas Textual Entailment. Secara spesifik, kita bertanya apakah model dapat melakukan lebih baik jika, selain P dan H, ada juga gambar (yang cocok dengan 'dunia' atau 'situasi'). Kami menggunakan versi multimodal dari set data SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) dan kami membandingkan 'buta' dan model penggunaan tekstual yang meningkat secara visual. We show that visual information is beneficial, but we also conduct an in-depth error analysis that reveals that current multimodal models are not performing 'grounding' in an optimal fashion.", 'de': 'Die Erfassung semantischer Zusammenhänge zwischen Sätzen, wie z.B. Implementation, ist eine langjährige Herausforderung für die computergestützte Semantik. Logikbasierte Modelle analysieren die Einbeziehung im Sinne möglicher Welten (Interpretationen oder Situationen), wobei eine Prämisse P eine Hypothese H iff in allen Welten mit sich bringt, in denen P wahr ist, H auch wahr ist. Statistische Modelle betrachten diese Beziehung wahrscheinlich und gehen darauf ein, ob ein Mensch wahrscheinlich H aus P ableiten würde. In diesem Beitrag wollen wir diese beiden Perspektiven überbrücken, indem wir für eine visuell fundierte Version der Textual Entailment-Aufgabe argumentieren. Konkret fragen wir, ob Modelle besser funktionieren können, wenn es neben P und H auch ein Bild gibt (entsprechend der jeweiligen \'Welt\' oder \'Situation\'). Wir verwenden eine multimodale Version des SNLI-Datensatzes (Bowman et al., 2015) und vergleichen "blinde" und visuell erweiterte Modelle textueller Einbeziehung. Wir zeigen, dass visuelle Informationen vorteilhaft sind, aber wir führen auch eine eingehende Fehleranalyse durch, die zeigt, dass aktuelle multimodale Modelle nicht optimal "geerdet" werden.', 'fa': 'تعلیم رابطه\u200cهای طبیعی بین جمله\u200cها، مثل اراده\u200cگیری، یک چالش طولانی برای طبیعی\u200cهای محاسباتی است. مدل\u200cهای منطقی بر اساس منطقی تحلیل کردن ارائه\u200cی جهان\u200cهای ممکن (تعبیر، یا موقعیت\u200cها) جایی که یک نقطه P در تمام جهانیان یک فرضیه H را می\u200cگیرد که اگر P حقیقت است، H هم حقیقت است. مدل های آماری این رابطه را به احتمال می بینند، با توجه به آن به نظر می رسد که آیا یک انسان ممکن است H را از P آلوده کند. در این کاغذ، ما می خواهیم این دو نگاهی را برابر کنیم، با توجه به یک نسخهٔ بنیاد دیده\u200cای از وظیفه تخلیق Textual. به طور خاص، ما می پرسیم که آیا مدل\u200cها می\u200cتوانند بهتر انجام دهند، در اضافه به P و H، یک تصویر هم وجود دارد (که مربوط به موقعیت جهان یا موقعیت مربوط است). ما از یک نسخه چندین مدال از مجموعه داده\u200cهای SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) استفاده می\u200cکنیم و ما مدل\u200cهای کور و افزایش دیده\u200cای از مجموعه\u200cهای متن را مقایسه می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که اطلاعات بینایی سودمند است، ولی ما هم یک تحلیل خطای عمیق را انجام می دهیم که نشان می دهد که مدل های چندین مدل فعلی در یک حالت optimal انجام نمی دهند.', 'ko': "문장 간의 의미 관계, 예를 들어 함축을 포착하는 것은 계산어의학이 장기적으로 직면한 도전이다.논리에 기초한 모델은 가능한 세계(해석 또는 상황)의 측면에서 내포를 분석하는데 그 중에서 전제 P 내포는 H가 모든 세계에서 P가 진실이면 H도 진실이라고 가정한다.통계모델은 이 관계를 확률적으로 바라보고 인류가 P에서 H를 추정하는 측면에서 이 문제를 해결할 수 있는지의 여부를 보여준다. 본고에서 우리는 논증텍스트에 포함된 임무의 시각적 기초 버전을 통해 이 두 가지 측면을 연결시키고자 한다.구체적으로 우리는 P와 H 외에 이미지(관련'세계'나'상황'에 대응)가 있다면 모델이 더 잘 표현될 수 있는지 물었다.SNLI 데이터 세트의 다중 모드 버전(Bowman et al., 2015)을 사용하고 텍스트에 포함된'블라인드'모델과 시각 강화 모델을 비교했습니다.우리는 시각적 정보가 유익하다는 것을 나타냈지만 깊이 있는 오류 분석을 실시하여 현재의 다중모드 모델이 가장 좋은 방식으로'접지'를 집행하지 않았다는 것을 나타냈다.", 'af': "Die opvang van semantiese verhouding tussen setnings, soos bedryf, is 'n lang stadige uitdrukking vir rekenasielike semantieke. Logika-gebaseerde modele analyseer aanhouding in terms of possible worlds (interpretations, of situations) waar 'n premise P bevat 'n hipotese H iff in alle wêreld waar P waar is, H is ook waar. Statistiese modeller sien hierdie verhouding waarskynlik, met die onderwerp van die ingevolge van of 'n mens waarskynlik H van P sal infer. In hierdie papier, wil ons hierdie twee perspektiewe brui deur te argumenteer vir 'n visuele-agtergrond weergawe van die Tekstuele Verhouding taak. Spesifieke, ons vra of models beter kan uitvoer as, bygevoeg by P en H, daar is ook 'n beeld (ooreenstemmende met die relevante 'wêreld' of 'situasie'). Ons gebruik 'n multimodaal weergawe van die SNLI datastel (Bowman et al., 2015) en ons vergelyk 'blind' en visually- augmenteerde modele van tekstuele aanhouding. Ons wys dat visuale inligting is nuttig, maar ons doen ook 'n in-diepte fout analiseer wat vertoon dat huidige multimodale modele nie 'grondmodus' in' n optimale modus uitvoer nie.", 'sw': "Kuchukua mahusiano ya kimapenzi kati ya hukumu kama vile mjuzi, ni changamoto ndefu kwa ajili ya semantika za kompyuta. Logic-based models analyse entailment in terms of possible worlds (interpretations, or situations) where a premise P entails a hypothesis H iff in all worlds where P is true, H is also true.  Mifano ya takwimu inaonekana kwa uwezekano wa uhusiano huu, kwa kuzungumzia kama binadamu angeweza kuwa na uwezekano wa kuambukiza H kutoka P. Kwa hakika, tunauliza kama mifano inaweza kufanya vizuri kama, pamoja na P na H, kuna picha (inayolinganisha na ‘dunia’ au ‘hali’). Tunatumia toleo la mfululizo wa taarifa za SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) na tunalinganisha 'vipofu' na mifano inayoongezeka kwa kuona ya maambukizi ya msingi. Tunaonyesha kuwa taarifa za kuona zinafaa, lakini pia tunafanya uchambuzi wa makosa ya kina kinachoonyesha kuwa mifano ya sasa ya watu wengi hawafanyi 'makundi' kwa njia nzuri.", 'sq': "Kapja e marrëdhënieve semantike midis fjalëve, të tilla si përfshirja, është një sfidë e gjatë për semantikën llogaritare. Modelet me bazë logjike analizojnë përfshirjen në termat e botave të mundshme (interpretime, apo situata) ku një premtesë P përfshin një hipotezë H iff në të gjitha botat ku P është e vërtetë, H është gjithashtu e vërtetë. Modelet statistike e shohin këtë marrëdhënie probabilistikisht, duke e trajtuar atë në lidhje me nëse një njeri ka gjasa të përfundojë H nga P. Në këtë letër, ne duam të kalojmë këto dy perspektiva, duke argumentuar për një version vizual të detyrës Textual Entailment. Veçan ërisht, ne pyesim nëse modelet mund të bëjnë më mirë nëse, përveç P dhe H, ekziston gjithashtu një imazh (që korrespondon me 'botën' ose 'situatën' e duhur'). Ne përdorim një version multimodal të të dhënave SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) dhe krahasojmë modelet 'të verbër' dhe të rritur vizualisht të përfshirjes tekstuale. Ne tregojmë se informacioni vizual është i dobishëm, por ne gjithashtu kryejmë një analizë të thellë gabimi që zbulon se modelet multimodale aktuale nuk po kryejnë 'bazimin' në mënyrë optimale.", 'am': "እንደምሳሌ ባለማወቅ የቁጥጥር የረጅም ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የሎጂ መሠረት ምሳሌዎች በቻለ ዓለማት (ትርጓሜ ወይም ጉዳይ) ማስተካከል ነው፡፡ P እውነተኛ ባለበት በዓለማት ሁሉ ውስጥ ሐፍረት የሆኑት H iff ደግሞ እውነተኛ ነው፡፡ Statistical models ይህንን ግንኙነት በአስቸጋሪነት እና ሰው ከP ከ. Specifically, we ask whether models can perform better if, in addition to P and H, there is also an image (corresponding to the relevant 'world' or 'situation').  We use a multimodal version of the SNLI dataset (Bowman et al., 2015) and we compare 'blind' and visually-augmented models of textual entailment.  የራእይ መረጃዎች ይጠቅማል ብለን እናሳያቸዋለን፤ ነገር ግን የጥልቅ ስህተት Analysis እናደርጋለን፡፡", 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների բռնելը նախադասությունների միջև, ինչպիսիք են ներգրավումը, երկար մարտահրավեր է համակարգչային սեմանտիկայի համար: Logic-based models analyse entailment in terms of possible worlds (interpretations, or situations) where a premise P entails a hypothesis H iff in all worlds where P is true, H is also true.  Ստատիկական մոդելները հավանականությամբ դիտարկում են այս հարաբերությունը, դիտարկում են այն այն տեսանկյունից, թե արդյոք մարդը հավանաբար կհանի H-ը P-ից։ Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ցանկանում ենք կապել այս երկու տեսանկյունները, բանավեճելով տեքստոլային հիվանդության խնդրի տեսանկյունաբար հի Հատկապես, մենք հարցնում ենք, թե արդյոք մոդելները կարող են ավելի լավ աշխատել, եթե P-ի և H-ի բացի նաև պատկեր կա (որը համապատասխանում է հարկավոր "աշխարհին" կամ "իրավիճակին"): Մենք օգտագործում ենք ՍՆԼի տվյալների բազմամոդալ տարբերակը (Bowman et al., 2015), և համեմատում ենք "կոյր" և տեսողական բարձրացված տեքստային ներգրավման մոդելները: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ տեսողական ինֆորմացիան օգտակար է, բայց մենք նաև կատարում ենք խորը սխալների վերլուծություն, որը ցույց է տալիս, որ ներկայիս բազմամոդելային մոդելները լավագույն ձևով չեն կատարում "հիմքերը":', 'bn': "বিজ্ঞানী যেমন বাক্যের মধ্যে সেমান্টিক সম্পর্কের গ্রেফতার করা হচ্ছে গণতান্ত্রিক সেমান্টিক্সের জন্য দীর্ঘ দী সম্ভাব্য বিশ্বের (ব্যাখ্যা অথবা পরিস্থিতি) ভিত্তিক মডেল বিশ্লেষণ করে যেখানে পি সত্য যেখানে প্রাপ্ত বিশ্বব্যাপী প্রেসিডেন্ট হিসেবে  পরিসংখ্যান মডেল সম্ভবত এই সম্পর্কের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দেখতে পাচ্ছে, যেখানে এই কাগজে একজন মানুষ পি থেকে হিসেবে আক্রান্ত হতে পারে কিনা, আমরা এই দুটি দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি ব্রিজ করে দেখতে চা বিশেষ করে, আমরা জিজ্ঞেস করছি মডেল কি ভালো কাজ করতে পারে যদি পি এবং এইচ ছাড়াও একটি ছবি আছে (পৃথিবীর সাথে 'পৃথিবী' অথবা 'পরিস্থিতি' এর সাথে)। We use a multimodal version of the SNLI dataset (Bowman et al., 2015) and we compare 'blind' and visually-augmented models of textual entailment.  We show that visual information is beneficial, but we also conduct an in-depth error analysis that reveals that current multimodal models are not performing 'grounding' in an optimal fashion.", 'tr': "Sözler arasyndaky semantik ilişkileri taýýarlamak, mysal ýaly, kalýularyň semantikleri üçin uzak duran kynçylykdyr. Mantık tabanlı modeller mümkin dünýäler(yorumlar, ýa-da ýagdaýlar) yönünde çözümlenmesi gereken çözümleri çözümlendir. Bu ýerde bir premise P bütün dünýäde P doğru bolan bir hypotedi çözümlendir. Bu da doğru. Statistik modeller bu baglaýyşyny mümkin edip görýärler, adamyň P-den H'i çarpmagyny mümkin edip bilýändigini düşünýärler. Bu kagyzda biz bu iki perspektyny köpräk etmek isleýäris, we Textual Tamamlama göreviniň görnüsüni terk eden wersiýasy üçin tartışarak. Adatça, biz bu nusgalaryň P we H bilen birlikte bir surat bolsa, nusgalaryň gowy edip bilmegi mümkin edýändigini soraýarız. SNLI veri setiniň (Bowman et al., 2015) multimodal versiyonunu ulanýarys we görnüş-önüne görkezilýän çözümlerin örneklerini karşılaştırıyoruz. Görsel maglumatyň faydalydygyny görkezýäris ýöne biz hem garaňkyn hata analyzasyny çykarýarys. Şu wagt multimodal modelleriň optimal şeklinde 'grounding' etmändigini görkezýäris.", 'ca': 'Captar relacions semàntiques entre frases, com l\'involucració, és un repte de llarg temps per a la semàntica computacional. Els models lògics analitzen l\'implicació en termes de munds possibles (interpretacions, o situacions) on una premisa P implica una hipòtesi H iff en tots els munds on P és veritat, H també és veritat. Els models estadístics veuen aquesta relació de manera probabilitzada, abordant-la en termes de si un humà podria inferir H de P. En aquest article, volem ajustar aquestes dues perspectives, argumentant per una versió visualment basada de la tasca de malaltia textual. Concretament, preguntem si els models poden millor funcionar si, a més de P i H, també hi ha una imatge (que correspond a la \'situació\' del món\' o \'del món\'). Utilitzem una versió multimodal del conjunt de dades SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) i comparem models de formació textual "cecs" i augmentats visualment. We show that visual information is beneficial, but we also conduct an in-depth error analysis that reveals that current multimodal models are not performing \'grounding\' in an optimal fashion.', 'cs': 'Zachycení sémantických vztahů mezi větami, jako je implikace, je dlouholetou výzvou pro výpočetní sémantiku. Logické modely analyzují implikaci z hlediska možných světů (interpretací nebo situací), kdy předpoklad P obsahuje hypotézu H iff ve všech světech, kde P je pravda, H je také pravda. Statistické modely pohlížejí na tento vztah pravděpodobně a řeší ho z hlediska toho, zda by člověk pravděpodobně odvodil H od P. V tomto článku chceme tyto dvě perspektivy spojit argumentem pro vizuálně zakotvenou verzi úlohy Textuální vylepšení. Konkrétně se ptáme, zda modely mohou vykonávat lépe, pokud kromě P a H existuje i obraz (odpovídající relevantnímu "světu" nebo "situaci"). Používáme multimodální verzi datové sady SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) a porovnáváme "slepé" a vizuálně rozšířené modely textové implikace. Ukazujeme, že vizuální informace jsou přínosné, ale také provádíme hloubkovou analýzu chyb, která odhalí, že současné multimodální modely neprovádí "uzemnění" optimálním způsobem.', 'az': 'Sözümlər arasındakı semantik ilişkiləri qəbul etmək, məsələlər kimi, hesablama semantik üçün uzun-uzun müddətli dövrüdür. Lojik modellər mümkün dünyalar (yoxsullar, ya da mövzular) ilə çəkilirlər ki, P-nin bütün dünyalarda P-nin doğru olduğu halda, P-nin həqiqəti olduğu halda, P-nin hipotesi yaratdı. Statistik modellər bu ilişkisini mümkün olaraq görür, bir insan P-dən H-ni a şağılaşdırmaq mümkün mümkün mümkün müddəti ilə çəkir. Bu kağızda, biz bu iki perspektivi körpüşdürmək istəyirik, Textual Entailment işin in görsel-yerli versiyonu üçün mübahisə edərək. Özellikle, modellər daha yaxşı işlədə biləcəyini soruşuruq, əgər P və H ilə birlikdə bir şəkil də var (mövcud olan \'dünya\' və ya \'şəkil\' ilə uyğunlaşacaq). SNLI veri qutusu (Bowman et al., 2015) ilə çoxlu modal versiyonu istifadə edirik. Biz \'kor\' və görsel-yükselmiş məlumatların modellərini qarşılaşdırırıq. Görünüş məlumatların faydalı olduğunu göstəririk, amma biz də özümüzə çox modal modellərin optimal modunda "yerləşdirmək" deyildiyini göstərir.', 'et': 'Lausete semantiliste suhete jäädvustamine, näiteks kaasamine, on arvutussemantika jaoks pikaajaline väljakutse. Loogikapõhised mudelid analüüsivad kaasamist võimalike maailmade (tõlgenduste või olukordade) mõistes, kus eeldus P sisaldab hüpoteesi H iff kõigis maailmades, kus P on tõsi, H on ka tõsi. Statistilised mudelid näevad seda seost tõenäoliselt, käsitledes seda selles mõttes, kas inimene tõenäoliselt järeldab H-d P-st. Käesolevas raamatus soovime neid kahte vaatenurka ületada, väites visuaalselt põhjendatud versiooni Textual Entailment ülesandest. Täpsemalt küsime, kas mudelid suudavad paremini toimida, kui lisaks P ja H-le on olemas ka pilt (mis vastab asjaomasele "maailmale" või "olukorrale"). Kasutame SNLI andmekogumi multimodaalset versiooni (Bowman et al., 2015) ning võrdleme "pime" ja visuaalselt täiendatud tekstilise kaasamise mudeleid. Näitame, et visuaalne teave on kasulik, kuid teeme ka põhjaliku veaanalüüsi, mis näitab, et praegused mitmeliigilised mudelid ei suuda optimaalselt maandada.', 'fi': 'Lausekkeiden, kuten implementin, semanttisten suhteiden kuvaaminen on laskennalliselle semantiikalle pitkäaikainen haaste. Logiikkaan perustuvat mallit analysoivat osallisuutta mahdollisten maailmojen (tulkintojen tai tilanteiden) kannalta, joissa ennakkoon P liittyy hypoteesi H iff kaikissa maailmoissa, joissa P on totta, H on myös totta. Tilastomallit tarkastelevat tätä suhdetta todennäköisesti ja tarkastelevat sitä sen suhteen, olisiko ihminen todennäköisesti päätellyt H:n P:stä. Tässä artikkelissa haluamme yhdistää nämä kaksi näkökulmaa väittämällä visuaalisesti perusteltua versiota Textual Entailment -tehtävästä. Kysymme erityisesti, pystyvätkö mallit suoriutumaan paremmin, jos P:n ja H:n lisäksi on myös kuva (joka vastaa asiaankuuluvaa \'maailmaa\' tai \'tilannetta\'). Käytämme SNLI-aineiston multimodaalista versiota (Bowman et al., 2015) ja vertaamme "sokeita" ja visuaalisesti lisättyjä tekstuaalisen implementin malleja. Osoitamme visuaalisen tiedon olevan hyödyllistä, mutta teemme myös perusteellisen virheanalyysin, joka paljastaa, että nykyiset multimodaaliset mallit eivät suorita maadoitusta optimaalisella tavalla.', 'bs': 'Uhvaćanje semantičkih odnosa između rečenica, poput želje, je dugogodišnji izazov za računalne semantike. Logički modeli analiziraju uključenje mogućih svijeta (interpretacija ili situacija) gdje premisa P uključuje hipotezu H iff u svim svijetima gdje je P istina, H je također istina. Statistički modeli gledaju ovu vezu vjerojatno, rješavajući se s obzirom da li bi čovjek vjerojatno inficirao H iz P. U ovom papiru, želimo premestiti te dvije perspektive, svađajući se za vizualno osnovanu verziju zadatka tekstualnog kompleta. Posebno pitamo da li modeli mogu bolje izvesti ako, uz P i H, postoji i slika (odgovara relevantnoj \'svijetu\' ili \'situaciji\'). Koristimo multimodalnu verziju seta podataka SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) i uspoređujemo \'slijepe\' i vizualno povećane modele tekstualne tvrdnje. Pokazujemo da je vizualna informacija korisna, ali također provodimo analizu dubine greške koja pokazuje da trenutni multimodalni modeli ne izvode "osnova" optimalno.', 'ha': "Ina kãma dangani na semanti a tsakanin ayuka kamar da aka sani, yana da wata tsoho mai tsawo wa matsayin mutane. Ana shawarar motsalan da aka ƙayyade mutane da aka sani a cikin wasu duniya masu yiwuwa (fassarar fassarar, ko da halin) inda wani premisa P na ƙunsa da wata hiftori H iff a cikin duk duniya inda P gaske, H na gaske. Ana nuna wannan mazaɓa mai yiwuwa, ana faɗa shi, a cikin maganar da mutum zai iya iya ƙaranci da H daga P. A cikin wannan takardan, za mu yi nufin mu samar da waɗannan surori biyu, da kuma mu yi jãyayya ga wani version na fassarar aikin Textical Entailment. Specifically, we ask whether models can perform better if, in addition to P and H, there is also an image (corresponding to the relevant 'world' or 'situation').  Tuna amfani da wasu version na SNLI na tsarin database (Bowman et al., 2015) kuma muna daidaita misãlai na 'makanta' da aka samu'a da gane da masu sami'awa na masu sami'a da aka sani na rubutun. Tuna nũna cewa information na gane yana da amfani, kuma amma munã sami wani analyi mai ɓata guda, wanda ke bayyana cewa, misãlai masu amfani da yanzu bã za su yi amfani da 'groundi' cikin wani zafi.", 'sk': 'Zajemanje semantičnih odnosov med stavki, kot je posledica, je dolgoletni izziv za računalniško semantiko. Logično osnovani modeli analizirajo vključenost v smislu možnih svetov (interpretacij ali situacij), kjer predpostavka P vključuje hipotezo H iff v vseh svetovih, kjer je P resničen, je H tudi resničen. Statistični modeli gledajo na to razmerje verjetno in ga obravnavajo v smislu tega, ali bi človek verjetno sklepal H iz P. V tem prispevku želimo premostiti ti dve perspektivi, tako da zagovarjamo vizualno utemeljeno različico naloge Textual Entailment. Natančneje se sprašujemo, ali so modeli lahko boljši, če obstaja poleg P in H tudi slika (ki ustreza ustreznemu "svetu" ali "situaciji"). Uporabljamo multimodalno različico podatkovnega nabora SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) in primerjamo \'slepe\' in vizualno povečane modele besedilnega vključevanja. Pokažemo, da so vizualne informacije koristne, izvajamo pa tudi poglobljeno analizo napak, ki razkriva, da sedanji multimodalni modeli ne delujejo optimalno.', 'he': 'לתפוס יחסים סמנטיים בין משפטים, כמו התערבות, הוא אתגר ארוך עבור סמנטיקה מחשבית. מודלים מבוססים בלוגית ניתוח התערבות במונחים של עולמות אפשריים (פרשנות, או מצבים) שבו הנושא P מכוון היפותזיה H iff בכל עולמות שבו P הוא נכון, H הוא גם נכון. דוגמנים סטטיסטיים רואים את מערכת היחסים הזו באופן סביר, מתייחסים אליה במונחים של אם אדם היה סביר להניח להוציא H מ P. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו רוצים לגשר את שני הנקודות האלה, על ידי טוען על גרסה מבוססת ראייה של משימה המחלה טקסטולית. במיוחד, אנו שואלים אם דוגמנים יכולים להפעיל טוב יותר אם, בנוסף ל-P ו-H, יש גם תמונה (מתאימה ל"עולם" או "מצב" רלוונטי). אנו משתמשים בגרסה multimodal של קבוצת נתונים SNLI (Bowman et al., 2015) ואנחנו משוותים "עיוור" ודוגמנים של התערבות טקסטולית מועדפים באופן חזותי. אנו מראים שמידע חזותי מועיל, אך אנחנו גם מבצעים ניתוח שגיאות עמוק שמגלה שמודלים multimodal הנוכחים לא מבצעים "קרקע" באופן אופטימלי.', 'bo': "དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་སྔོན་རྟགས་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་ཚོར་བརྗོད་པར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཚོགས་རྐྱེན་དུ་རྩིས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྐྱེས་རིམ་ལ་ཆས་ Logic-based models analyse entailment in terms of possible worlds (interpretations, or situations) where a premise P entails a hypothesis H iff in all worlds where P is true, H is also true. Statistical models view this relationship probabilistically, addressing it in terms of whether a human would likely infer H from P. In this paper, we wish to bridge these two perspectives, by arguing for a visually-grounded version of the Textual Entailment task. ང་ཚོས་དམིགས་འབེབས་བྱས་ན། མིག་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་སྐྱོང་དང་ཆེ་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་དགོས་མིན་འདུག We use a multimodal version of the SNLI dataset (Bowman et al., 2015) and we compare 'blind' and visually-augmented models of textual entailment. We show that visual information is beneficial, but we also conduct an in-depth error analysis that reveals that current multimodal models are not performing 'grounding' in an optimal fashion.", 'jv': "Ngubah sematik penting nggo ngerasai winih, kaya ngono nggo ngerasai luwih dumadhi kanggo sematik kompatis logic-basa model testing entailment in terms of available worlds Statatistik model sing bisa perusahaan iki, iso disebarke nglakoni uwong ing, iso disebarke cara sing kelas nêmêr terêmêr iki, kita kepengin dhéwé ngerasakno perspekhaan iki, dadi sing bisa ngejarasakno uwong sing berarti wis ngerasakno versi Text Entayment task. user-test-mode Awak dhéwé nggunakake plurmodal versi dhen NNLI dataset (BOman et al, 2013) lan kéné ngregani 'Bling' lan video-agemented modelan sing textual entailment. Text-tool Awak dhéwé éntuk ngerasakno ngono akeh akeh operasi kanggo ngerasakno, dadi awak dhéwé ngerasakno akeh barang nggambar barang multimodal kuwi model sing ora iso nggawe 'grunting' ning titil maneh."}
{'en': 'Hybrid Attention based Multimodal Network for Spoken Language Classification', 'ar': 'شبكة متعددة الوسائط تعتمد على الاهتمام المختلط لتصنيف اللغة المنطوقة', 'pt': 'Rede Multimodal baseada em Atenção Híbrida para Classificação de Línguas Faladas', 'es': 'Red multimodal híbrida basada en la atención para la clasificación del lenguaje hablado', 'fr': "Réseau multimodal hybride basé sur l'attention pour la classification de la langue parlée", 'ja': '口語分類のためのハイブリッドアテンションベースのマルチモーダルネットワーク', 'zh': '盖混合注意之口语分类多模样网络', 'hi': 'बोली जाने वाली भाषा वर्गीकरण के लिए हाइब्रिड ध्यान आधारित मल्टीमॉडल नेटवर्क', 'ga': "Líonra Ilmhódúil Hibrid-Bhunaithe d'Aicmiú Teanga Labhartha", 'ru': 'Мультимодальная сеть на основе гибридного внимания для классификации разговорного языка', 'hu': 'Hibrid figyelem alapú multimodális hálózat a beszélt nyelvek osztályozására', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Υβριδικό Πολυμεταφορικό Δίκτυο Προσοχής για την Ταξινόμηση της Μιλημένης Γλώσσας', 'lt': 'Daugiarūšis kalbos klasifikavimo tinklas, pagrįstas hibridiniu dėmesiu', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Multimodal berdasarkan Perhatian Hybrid untuk Klasifikasi Bahasa Bercakap', 'it': "Rete multimodale ibrida basata sull'attenzione per la classificazione delle lingue parlate", 'mt': 'Netwerk Multimodali bbażat fuq l-Attenzjoni Ibrida għall-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Lingwi Spoken', 'kk': 'Тілді классификациялау үшін гибридтік назар негіздеген көптеген желіName', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ ക്ലാസിഷനുവേണ്ടിയുള്ള മള്\u200dമോഡല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് ഹൈബ്രിഡ് ശ്രദ്ധ', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Rețeaua multimodală hibridă bazată pe atenție pentru clasificarea limbilor vorbite', 'sr': 'Hibridna pažnja bazirana na multimodalnoj mreži za klasifikaciju govornih jezika', 'mn': 'Хибрид анхаарлын үндсэн олон загварын сүлжээний хэлний классификацийн төлөө', 'si': 'Name', 'pl': 'Hybrydowa sieć multimodalna oparta na uwadze dla klasyfikacji języka mówionego', 'ta': 'Hybrid Attention based Multimodal Network for Spoken Language Classification', 'so': 'Isticmaalka luuqadaha ee ku saleysan Hybrid', 'sv': 'Hybrid uppmärksamhetsbaserat multimodalt nätverk för språkklassificering', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Хибридна мултимодална мрежа, базирана на вниманието, за класификация на говоримия език', 'nl': 'Hybride aandacht gebaseerd multimodaal netwerk voor gesproken taal classificatie', 'da': 'Hybrid opmærksomhedsbaseret multimodalt netværk til klassificering af talesprog', 'ko': '혼합 주의 기반의 다중모드 구어 분류 네트워크', 'de': 'Hybrides aufmerksamkeitsbasiertes multimodales Netzwerk zur Klassifizierung gesprochener Sprachen', 'fa': 'Name', 'id': 'Rangkaian Multimodal Berdasarkan Perhatian Hybrid untuk Klasifikasi Bahasa Berbicara', 'sw': 'Tatizo la Hybrid linalohusiana na Mtandao wa Multimodal kwa ajili ya Kuhusisha Lugha', 'hr': 'Hibridna pažnja bazirana na multimodalnoj mreži za klasifikaciju govornih jezika', 'sq': 'Rrjeti multimodal për klasifikimin e gjuhës së folur bazuar në vëmendjen hibride', 'am': 'Language Classification', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Sözlü dil klasifikasiyası üçün çoxlu modal Ağ', 'tr': 'Sözgüli dil klasifikasiýasy üçin Hybrid Attention tabanly Multimodal Network', 'af': 'Hybrid Aangaande gebaseer Multimodale Netwerk vir Spoken Taal Klassifikasie', 'bs': 'Hibridna pažnja bazirana na multimodalnoj mreži za klasifikaciju govornog jezika', 'ca': 'Rede multimodal basada en atenció híbrida per la classificació del llenguatge parlat', 'et': 'Hübriidne tähelepanu põhinev mitmeliigiline võrgustik räägitava keele klassifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'Hybridi Attention based Multimodal Network for Spoken Language Classification', 'bn': 'ভাষার বিভিন্ন মাল্টিমোডাল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক মনোযোগ', 'cs': 'Hybridní multimodální síť založená na pozornosti pro klasifikaci mluveného jazyka', 'jv': 'HyBridge Attention Bukak Multimodal Network kanggo Kemerdekaan Language', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Multimodalno omrežje hibridne pozornosti za klasifikacijo govorjenega jezika', 'he': 'Name', 'bo': 'Hybrid Attention based Multimodal Network for Spoken Language Classification'}
{'en': 'We examine the utility of linguistic content and vocal characteristics for multimodal deep learning in human spoken language understanding. We present a deep multimodal network with both feature attention and modality attention to classify utterance-level speech data. The proposed hybrid attention architecture helps the system focus on learning informative representations for both modality-specific feature extraction and model fusion. The experimental results show that our system achieves state-of-the-art or competitive results on three published multimodal datasets. We also demonstrated the effectiveness and generalization of our system on a medical speech dataset from an actual trauma scenario. Furthermore, we provided a detailed comparison and analysis of traditional approaches and deep learning methods on both feature extraction and fusion.', 'ar': 'ندرس فائدة المحتوى اللغوي والخصائص الصوتية للتعلم العميق متعدد الوسائط في فهم اللغة المنطوقة لدى الإنسان. نقدم شبكة عميقة متعددة الوسائط مع كل من الاهتمام بالميزات واهتمام الأسلوب لتصنيف بيانات الكلام على مستوى الكلام. تساعد بنية الانتباه الهجين المقترحة النظام على التركيز على تعلم التمثيلات الإعلامية لكل من استخراج الميزات الخاصة بالطريقة ودمج النموذج. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نظامنا يحقق نتائج متطورة أو تنافسية على ثلاث مجموعات بيانات منشورة متعددة الوسائط. أظهرنا أيضًا فعالية نظامنا وتعميمه على مجموعة بيانات الكلام الطبي من سيناريو صدمة فعلية. علاوة على ذلك ، قدمنا مقارنة وتحليلاً مفصلاً للنهج التقليدية وطرق التعلم العميق في كل من استخراج الميزات ودمجها.', 'pt': 'Examinamos a utilidade do conteúdo linguístico e das características vocais para o aprendizado profundo multimodal na compreensão da linguagem falada humana. Apresentamos uma rede multimodal profunda com atenção de característica e atenção de modalidade para classificar dados de fala em nível de enunciado. A arquitetura de atenção híbrida proposta ajuda o sistema a se concentrar no aprendizado de representações informativas para extração de recursos específicos da modalidade e fusão de modelos. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso sistema alcança resultados competitivos ou de última geração em três conjuntos de dados multimodais publicados. Também demonstramos a eficácia e generalização do nosso sistema em um conjunto de dados de fala médica de um cenário real de trauma. Além disso, fornecemos uma comparação e análise detalhadas de abordagens tradicionais e métodos de aprendizado profundo na extração e fusão de recursos.', 'fr': "Nous examinons l'utilité du contenu linguistique et des caractéristiques vocales pour l'apprentissage profond multimodal dans la compréhension du langage parlé humain. Nous présentons un réseau multimodal approfondi avec attention à la fois aux fonctionnalités et à la modalité pour classer les données vocales au niveau de l'énoncé. L'architecture d'attention hybride proposée aide le système à se concentrer sur l'apprentissage de représentations informatives pour l'extraction de caractéristiques spécifiques à la modalité et la fusion de modèles. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre système atteint des résultats de pointe ou compétitifs sur trois ensembles de données multimodales publiés. Nous avons également démontré l'efficacité et la généralisation de notre système sur un ensemble de données vocales médicales à partir d'un scénario de traumatisme réel. De plus, nous avons fourni une comparaison et une analyse détaillées des approches traditionnelles et des méthodes d'apprentissage profond sur l'extraction et la fusion de caractéristiques.", 'es': 'Examinamos la utilidad del contenido lingüístico y las características vocales para el aprendizaje profundo multimodal en la comprensión del lenguaje hablado humano. Presentamos una red multimodal profunda con atención de características y atención de modalidad para clasificar los datos de voz a nivel de enunciado. La arquitectura de atención híbrida propuesta ayuda al sistema a centrarse en el aprendizaje de representaciones informativas tanto para la extracción de características específicas de la modalidad como para la fusión de modelos. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro sistema logra resultados competitivos o de vanguardia en tres conjuntos de datos multimodales publicados. También demostramos la eficacia y la generalización de nuestro sistema en un conjunto de datos de habla médica de un escenario de trauma real. Además, proporcionamos una comparación y un análisis detallados de los enfoques tradicionales y los métodos de aprendizaje profundo tanto en la extracción como en la fusión de características.', 'ja': '私たちは、人間の口語理解における多元的深層学習のための言語的内容と発声特性の有用性を検討します。発話レベルの音声データを分類するために、機能とモダリティの両方に注意を払った深いマルチモーダルネットワークを提示します。提案されたハイブリッド注意アーキテクチャは、システムがモダリティ固有の機能抽出とモデル融合の両方のための情報的な表現を学習することに焦点を当てるのに役立ちます。実験結果は、当社のシステムが3つの公開されたマルチモーダルデータセットで最先端または競合的な結果を達成していることを示しています。また、実際の外傷シナリオからの医療スピーチデータセットで、システムの有効性と一般化を実証しました。さらに、特徴抽出と融合の両方に関する伝統的なアプローチと深層学習方法の詳細な比較と分析を提供しました。', 'hi': 'हम मानव बोली जाने वाली भाषा की समझ में बहुआयामी गहरी शिक्षा के लिए भाषाई सामग्री और मुखर विशेषताओं की उपयोगिता की जांच करते हैं। हम उच्चारण-स्तर के भाषण डेटा को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए सुविधा ध्यान और रूपरेखा ध्यान दोनों के साथ एक गहरा मल्टीमॉडल नेटवर्क प्रस्तुत करते हैं। प्रस्तावित हाइब्रिड ध्यान वास्तुकला प्रणाली को साधन-विशिष्ट सुविधा निष्कर्षण और मॉडल संलयन दोनों के लिए जानकारीपूर्ण प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने में मदद करती है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा सिस्टम तीन प्रकाशित मल्टीमॉडल डेटासेट पर अत्याधुनिक या प्रतिस्पर्धी परिणाम प्राप्त करता है। हमने एक वास्तविक आघात परिदृश्य से चिकित्सा भाषण डेटासेट पर हमारे सिस्टम की प्रभावशीलता और सामान्यीकरण का भी प्रदर्शन किया। इसके अलावा, हमने सुविधा निष्कर्षण और संलयन दोनों पर पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोण और गहरी सीखने के तरीकों की एक विस्तृत तुलना और विश्लेषण प्रदान किया।', 'zh': '论言语之声,在人口语模态深学之效也。 立一特意模态深多模样网络,以语级语音数类之。 所谓混合注意架构有助于系统专于学特定于模态者,取其融合之信也。 实验结果表明者,三已发之多模态数集上得先进之竞争力也。 示以创痍之中,系统于医集上之有效性概括性。 此外,我们还对古代法和深度学术在特征提取和融合方面详细较析。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем полезность лингвистического контента и голосовых характеристик для мультимодального глубокого обучения в понимании разговорного языка человека. Мы представляем глубокую мультимодальную сеть с вниманием как к функциям, так и к модальности для классификации речевых данных на уровне высказываний. Предлагаемая гибридная архитектура внимания помогает системе сосредоточиться на изучении информативных представлений как для извлечения признаков, специфичных для модальности, так и для слияния моделей. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша система достигает самых современных или конкурентных результатов по трем опубликованным мультимодальным наборам данных. Мы также продемонстрировали эффективность и обобщение нашей системы на наборе данных медицинской речи из фактического сценария травмы. Кроме того, мы предоставили подробное сравнение и анализ традиционных подходов и методов глубокого обучения как по извлечению признаков, так и по слиянию.', 'ga': 'Scrúdaímid úsáid an ábhair theangeolaíoch agus tréithe gutha don fhoghlaim dhomhain ilmhódach i dtuiscint teanga labhartha an duine. Cuirimid líonra ilmhódach domhain i láthair a bhfuil aird ar ghné agus ar mhodhúlacht ann chun sonraí cainte ag leibhéal cainte a rangú. Cuidíonn an ailtireacht aird hibrideach atá beartaithe leis an gcóras díriú ar léiriú faisnéiseach a fhoghlaim le haghaidh eastóscadh sainghnéithe módúlachta agus comhleá samhlacha. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go mbaineann ár gcóras torthaí den scoth nó iomaíoch amach ar thrí thacar sonraí ilmhódacha foilsithe. Léiríomar freisin éifeachtacht agus ginearálú ár gcóras ar thacar sonraí cainte leighis ó chás tráma iarbhír. Ina theannta sin, chuireamar comparáid agus anailís mhionsonraithe ar fáil ar chuir chuige traidisiúnta agus ar mhodhanna domhainfhoghlama ar eastóscadh gnéithe agus comhleá araon.', 'el': 'Εξετάζουμε τη χρησιμότητα του γλωσσικού περιεχομένου και των φωνητικών χαρακτηριστικών για την πολυμορφική βαθιά μάθηση στην κατανόηση της ανθρώπινης προφορικής γλώσσας. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα βαθύ πολυπροπικό δίκτυο με προσοχή τόσο σε χαρακτηριστικά όσο και σε τρόπους για την ταξινόμηση των δεδομένων ομιλίας σε επίπεδο ομιλίας. Η προτεινόμενη υβριδική αρχιτεκτονική προσοχής βοηθά το σύστημα να επικεντρωθεί στην εκμάθηση ενημερωτικών αναπαραστάσεων τόσο για την εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών ειδικά για την τροπικότητα όσο και για τη συγχώνευση μοντέλων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει υπερσύγχρονα ή ανταγωνιστικά αποτελέσματα σε τρία δημοσιευμένα πολυμορφικά σύνολα δεδομένων. Αποδείξαμε επίσης την αποτελεσματικότητα και τη γενίκευση του συστήματός μας σε ένα ιατρικό σύνολο δεδομένων ομιλίας από ένα πραγματικό σενάριο τραυματισμού. Επιπλέον, παρείχαμε μια λεπτομερή σύγκριση και ανάλυση παραδοσιακών προσεγγίσεων και μεθόδων βαθιάς μάθησης τόσο στην εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών όσο και στη σύντηξη.', 'hu': 'Vizsgáljuk a nyelvi tartalom és a vokális jellemzők hasznosságát a multimodális mélytanulás szempontjából az emberi beszélt nyelv megértésében. Egy mély multimodális hálózatot mutatunk be, amely figyelmet és modális figyelmet kínál a beszédadatok besorolására. A javasolt hibrid figyelem architektúra segítségével a rendszer információs reprezentációk tanulására összpontosít mind a modalitás-specifikus jellemzők extrakciójához, mind a modellfúzióhoz. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy rendszerünk három publikált multimodális adatkészleten a legkorszerűbb vagy versenyképes eredményeket ér el. Rendszerünk hatékonyságát és általánosítását egy orvosi beszédadatkészleten is bemutattuk egy tényleges trauma forgatókönyvből. Továbbá részletes összehasonlítást és elemzést nyújtottunk a hagyományos megközelítésekről és a mélytanulási módszerekről mind a funkciókitermelésről, mind a fúzióról.', 'it': "Esaminiamo l'utilità dei contenuti linguistici e delle caratteristiche vocali per il deep learning multimodale nella comprensione della lingua parlata umana. Presentiamo una profonda rete multimodale con attenzione sia alle caratteristiche che alle modalità per classificare i dati vocali a livello di pronuncia. L'architettura ibrida di attenzione proposta aiuta il sistema a concentrarsi sull'apprendimento delle rappresentazioni informative sia per l'estrazione delle caratteristiche specifiche della modalità che per la fusione dei modelli. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro sistema raggiunge risultati all'avanguardia o competitivi su tre set di dati multimodali pubblicati. Abbiamo anche dimostrato l'efficacia e la generalizzazione del nostro sistema su un set di dati vocali medici da uno scenario di trauma reale. Inoltre, abbiamo fornito un confronto dettagliato e un'analisi degli approcci tradizionali e dei metodi di deep learning sia sull'estrazione di funzionalità che sulla fusione.", 'lt': 'We examine the utility of linguistic content and vocal characteristics for multimodal deep learning in human spoken language understanding.  Mes pristatome gilų daugiarūšio transporto tinklą, kuriame skiriamas dėmesys ir būdinis dėmesys kalbos duomenų klasifikavimui. Siūloma hibridinio dėmesio architektūra padeda sistemai sutelkti dėmesį į mokymąsi informaciniais atstovais, susijusiais tiek su konkrečiam režimui būdingų savybių gavyba, tiek su modelio branduolių sinteze. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų sistema pasiekia naujausius arba konkurencinius rezultatus trijuose paskelbtuose daugiarūšio transporto duomenų rinkiniuose. Taip pat parodėme mūsų sistemos veiksmingumą ir generalizaciją medicininės kalbos duomenų rinkinyje iš tikro traumos scenarijaus. Be to, pateikėme išsamų tradicinių metodų ir gilaus mokymosi metodų palyginimą ir analizę dėl savybių gavybos ir branduolių sintezės.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ინგლისტიკური შემდგომარების და სიტყვების პროგრამეტრების ძალიან ძალიან დიდი სწავლებისთვის ადამიანის სიტყვების შესახებ. ჩვენ მლიტიმოდიალური ქსელის აღმოჩვენებთ, რომელიც უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია და მოდიალური აღმოჩენება, რომელიც კლასიფიკაცია სიტყვების დონეზე მონაც პროგრამებული ჰიბრიტური ახალგაზრულება სისტემის ინფორმატიური გამოსახულებაზე დახმარებს სისტემის ინფორმატიური გამოსახულებებისთვის ორივე მოდიალობის განსახულებ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ჩვენი სისტემა შეიძლება სამი განახლებული მულტიმოდიალური მონაცემების შედეგების შედეგება. ჩვენ ასევე ჩვენი სისტემის ეფექტიურობა და გენერალიზაცია მედიციური საუბრის მონაცემების შესახებ რეალური ტრავამის სინარიოდან. დამატებით, ჩვენ განვითარებეთ განსაზღვრებული შესაბამისი და ანალიზაციის ტრადიციონალური გადასწავლების მეტოვების შესაბამისი გამოყენება და ფუზაცია.', 'kk': 'Біз лингвистикалық мазмұнын және көпшілік сөздердің көпшілік түсініктерінің көпшілік оқытуының утилитасын тексереміз. Біз сөйлеу деңгейіндегі деректерді классификациялау үшін көптеген көптеген желімізді таңдаймыз. Бұл гибрид архитектурасы жүйеңізге мәліметтік мәліметтерді оқытуға көмектеседі. Бұл күй- жай архитектурасының түрлі мәліметтік мәліметтері мен үлгіле Тәжірибелі нәтижелер біздің жүйеміз үш жарияланған көптеген көптеген деректер жиындарының күй- жайы немесе конкурентті нәтижелерін жеткізеді. Біз жүйеміздің эффективнігін және жалпы түрде медицина сөйлеу деректерін шындық травма сценариясынан көрсеттік. Сонымен қатар, біз әдеттегі қатынау және қатынау әдістерінің тегжейлі салыстыру және анализ бердік.', 'ms': 'Kami memeriksa utiliti kandungan bahasa dan ciri-ciri suara untuk belajar dalam multimodal dalam pemahaman bahasa bercakap manusia. Kami perkenalkan rangkaian multimodal yang dalam dengan kedua-dua perhatian ciri dan perhatian modaliti untuk mengklasifikasi data ucapan aras-ucapan. Arkitektur perhatian hibrid yang diusulkan membantu sistem fokus pada pembelajaran perwakilan maklumat untuk kedua-dua ekstraksi ciri-ciri spesifik modaliti dan fusi model. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa sistem kita mencapai keputusan terbaik atau kompetitif pada tiga set data multimodal yang diterbitkan. Kami juga menunjukkan efektivitas dan generalisasi sistem kami pada set data ucapan perubatan dari skenario trauma sebenar. Selain itu, kami menyediakan perbandingan terperinci dan analisis pendekatan tradisional dan kaedah belajar dalam kedua-dua ekstraksi fitur dan fusi.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയിലെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെയും ശബ്ദവിശേഷതകളുടെയും ഉപയോഗ്യങ് വാക്ക്-നില വാക്കുകളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളെ ക്ലാസിഫിക്കുന്നതിന് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ആഴത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു ശൃംഖല നെറ്റ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഹൈബ്രിഡ് ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന സിസ്റ്റത്തിന് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കു പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d മൂന്നു പ്രസിദ്ധമായ പലിമോഡാല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d സ്റ്റേ നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തനവും സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തനവും കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വ്യ അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d പാരമ്പര്യമായ മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളെയും ആഴത്തെ പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതികളെയും വിശദീകരിച്ചുകൊടുത്തു.', 'mk': 'Ние ја испитуваме корисноста на јазичката содржина и гласните карактеристики за мултимодилно длабоко учење во разбирањето на човековиот говорен јазик. Презентираме длабока мултимодилна мрежа со внимание и модијално внимание за класификување на говорни податоци на ниво на изразување. The proposed hybrid attention architecture helps the system focus on learning informative representations for both modality-specific feature extraction and model fusion.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот систем постигнува најдобри или конкурентни резултати на три објавени мултимодилни податоци. Исто така ја демонстриравме ефикасноста и генерализацијата на нашиот систем на медицинскиот говор податоци од вистински сценарио за траума. Покрај тоа, обезбедивме детална споредба и анализа на традиционалните пристапи и методите на длабоко учење за екстракција и фузија на карактеристики.', 'mt': 'Aħna teżamina l-utilità tal-kontenut lingwistiku u l-karatteristiċi vokali għat-tagħlim profond multimodali fil-fehim tal-lingwa mitkellma mill-bniedem. Aħna nippreżentaw netwerk multimodali profond bl-attenzjoni kemm tal-karatteristiċi kif ukoll tal-modalità biex tiġi kklassifikata d-dejta tad-diskors fil-livell tal-espressjoni. The proposed hybrid attention architecture helps the system focus on learning informative representations for both modality-specific feature extraction and model fusion.  Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li s-sistema tagħna tikseb riżultati moderni jew kompetittivi fuq tliet settijiet ta’ dejta multimodali ppubblikati. Intwera wkoll l-effettività u l-ġeneralizzazzjoni tas-sistema tagħna fuq sett ta’ dejta tad-diskors mediku minn xenarju ta’ trawma reali. Barra minn hekk, ipprovdejna paragun u analiżi dettaljati ta’ approċċi tradizzjonali u metodi ta’ tagħlim profond kemm dwar l-estrazzjoni tal-karatteristiċi kif ukoll dwar il-fużjoni.', 'mn': 'Бид хэлний хэлний ойлголтын үндсэн сургалтын тулд хэлний тодорхойлолт болон дуу хэлний хэрэгцээг шалгаж байна. Бид илтгэлийн хэмжээний өгөгдлийг хичээлд анхаарлаа хандуулахын тулд олон загварын сүлжээнд анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Хибрид анхаарлын баримтууд нь системийг мэдээллийн үзүүлэлтийг сурах боломжтой болгодог. Ингээд туршилтын үр дүнд бидний систем 3 хэвлэгдсэн олон моделийн өгөгдлийн сангийн уламжлалт эсвэл өрсөлдөөний үр дүнг гаргадаг. Мөн бид системийн эмнэлгийн ярианы өгөгдлийн санааг үнэндээ зовлонгийн хувилбараас харуулсан. Дараа нь бид уламжлалтын арга барилгыг, гүн гүнзгий суралцах арга барилгыг харьцуулж, анализ өгсөн.', 'pl': 'Badamy przydatność treści językowych i cech głosowych dla multimodalnego głębokiego uczenia się w rozumieniu języka mówionego człowieka. Przedstawiamy głęboką sieć multimodalną z uwagą zarówno funkcjonalną, jak i modalną, aby klasyfikować dane mowy na poziomie wypowiedzi. Proponowana hybrydowa architektura uwagi pomaga systemowi skupić się na uczeniu się informacyjnych reprezentacji zarówno dla ekstrakcji cech specyficznych dla modalności, jak i fuzji modelu. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz system osiąga najnowocześniejsze lub konkurencyjne wyniki na trzech opublikowanych multimodalnych zbiorach danych. Wykazaliśmy również skuteczność i uogólnienie naszego systemu na zbiorze danych mowy medycznej z rzeczywistego scenariusza urazu. Ponadto przeprowadziliśmy szczegółowe porównanie i analizę tradycyjnych podejść i metod głębokiego uczenia się zarówno w zakresie ekstrakcji cech, jak i fuzji.', 'ro': 'Examinăm utilitatea conținutului lingvistic și caracteristicile vocale pentru învățarea profundă multimodală în înțelegerea limbii vorbite umane. Vă prezentăm o rețea multimodală profundă cu atenție deopotrivă și atenție modală pentru clasificarea datelor de vorbire la nivel de rostire. Arhitectura hibridă de atenție propusă ajută sistemul să se concentreze pe învățarea reprezentărilor informative atât pentru extragerea caracteristicilor specifice modalității, cât și pentru fuziunea modelului. Rezultatele experimentale arată că sistemul nostru obține rezultate de ultimă oră sau competitive pe trei seturi de date multimodale publicate. De asemenea, am demonstrat eficiența și generalizarea sistemului nostru pe un set de date de vorbire medicală dintr-un scenariu real de traumă. În plus, am oferit o comparație și o analiză detaliată a abordărilor tradiționale și a metodelor de învățare profundă atât privind extracția caracteristicilor, cât și fuziunea.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker verktøyet for linguistiske innhald og vokalskarakteristikk for multimodal dyp læring i menneskelig snakkeleg språk forståelse. Vi presenterer ein dyp multimodal nettverk med både funksjonsoppmerksomheten og modalitetsoppmerksomheten til å klassifisera taledata for uttalenivå. Den foreslåde hybridarkitekturen hjelper systemfokus på læring av informativ representasjonar for både utpakking av funksjonar som er spesifisert for modalitet og modelfusing. Eksperimentale resultatet viser at systemet vår når det gjer tilstanden av kunsten eller konkurentære resultat på tre utgjevne multimodale datasett. Vi demonstrerte også effektiviteten og generelliseringen av systemet vårt på ein medisinsk taledatasett frå ein faktisk trauma-scenario. I tillegg har vi tilgjengeleg ein detaljert sammenligning og analyse av tradisjonelle tilnærmingar og dype læringsmetodar på både utpakking av funksjonar og fusjon.', 'so': 'Waxaannu baaraynaa isticmaalka waxyaabaha ku qoran luuqadaha iyo aqoonta afka luuqada, waxbarashada aad u dheer oo ku qoran waxgarashada afka dadka. Waxaan keenaynaa shabakad aad u dheer oo kala duduwan, waxayna leedahay taxadar iyo qaabilnaan, si aan u qorno macluumaadka heerka hadalka. Tirada la soo jeedo ee la soo jeedo qalabka isbitaalka wuxuu caawinayaa in nidaamka ku kalsoonaadaa in lagu barto noocyada macluumaadka, in la soo bixiyo qaab gaar ah iyo fudud tusaale ahaan. arimaha imtixaanka waxay muuqataa in nidaamkayagu uu helo xaaladda farshaxanka ama tartanka ku saabsan saddexda kooxa macluumaad kala duduwan. Sidoo kale waxaan muujinnay tayada iyo dhaqashada nidaamka oo ku saabsan macluumaadka hadalka caafimaadka ee arimaha halista ah. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu soo bandhignay tusaale ahaan iyo baaritaanka caadooyinka ah iyo qaababka waxbarashada ee mool dheer oo ku saabsan soo bixinta iyo fududaanka.', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker användbarheten av språkligt innehåll och vokala egenskaper för multimodalt djuplärande i mänskligt talat språk förståelse. Vi presenterar ett djupt multimodalt nätverk med både uppmärksamhet och modalitet uppmärksamhet för att klassificera taldata på uttalsnivå. Den föreslagna hybridpunktsarkitekturen hjälper systemet att fokusera på att lära sig informativa representationer för både modalitetsspecifik funktionsutvinning och modellfusion. De experimentella resultaten visar att vårt system uppnår toppmoderna eller konkurrenskraftiga resultat på tre publicerade multimodala datauppsättningar. Vi visade också effektiviteten och generaliseringen av vårt system på ett medicinskt taldataset från ett verkligt trauma scenario. Dessutom gav vi en detaljerad jämförelse och analys av traditionella tillvägagångssätt och djupinlärningsmetoder på både funktionsutvinning och fusion.', 'sr': 'Ispitujemo korisnost jezičkog sadržaja i glasnih karakteristika za multimodalno duboko učenje u razumijevanju jezika koji govore ljudima. Predstavljamo duboku multimodalnu mrežu sa pažnjom i modalnom pažnjom na klasifikaciju podataka govora na nivou govora. Predložena hibridna arhitektura pažnje pomaže sistemu da se fokusira na učenje informativnih predstavljanja za izvlačenje posebnih modaliteta i fuziju modela. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš sistem postiže state-of-the-art ili konkurentni rezultati na tri objavljena multimodalna dataseta. Takoðe smo pokazali efikasnost i generalizaciju našeg sistema na medicinskom setu podataka govora iz scenarija stvarne traume. Osim toga, pružili smo detaljnu usporedbu i analizu tradicionalnih pristupa i metoda dubokog učenja o izvlačenju i fuziji karakteristika.', 'ta': 'நாம் மொழி உள்ளடக்கத்தின் பயன்பாட்டை மற்றும் சொல்லும் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்புகளை பரிசோதிக்கிறோம். மொழியில் ப We present a deep multimodal network with both feature attention and modality attention to classify utterance-level speech data.  பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்டுள்ள ஹைப்ரிட் கவனத்தை உருவாக்குதல் கணினியின் தகவல் குறிப்பிட்ட குணங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்ள உதவுகிறது முறைமை சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கிறது நம் அமைப்பு மூன்று வெளிப்படையான பல்வேறு தரவு அமைப்பு ஒரு உண்மையில் இருந்து ஒரு துன்பத்திற்கு இருந்து மருத்துவ பேச்சு தகவல் அமைப்பின் விளைவுகள் மற்றும் பொதுவாக்கத்த அதற்கும், நாம் ஒரு விவரமான ஒப்பிடுதல் மற்றும் ஆய்வு மரபார்ந்த முறைகள் மற்றும் ஆழமான கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் முறையில் இருந்', 'si': 'අපි භාෂාවික සම්පූර්ණය සහ භාෂාවික විශේෂතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා මිනිස්සු කතා කරපු භාෂාව තේරු අපි ගොඩක් විශේෂ ජාලයෙක් පෙන්වන්නේ අවධානය සහ අවධානය අවධානය සඳහා අවධානය අවධානය සඳහා කිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ හිබ්\u200dරිඩ් අවධානය ස්ථාපනය සඳහා පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සහ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය තත්වයක් හෝ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට ප අපි තමයි අපේ පද්ධතියේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදියට වෛද්\u200dය කතා දත්ත සැටුම්  තවත්, අපි විස්තර සංවේදනය සහ විශ්ලේෂණයක් දුන්නා පාරමාන්\u200dය අවස්ථාවක් සහ ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ', 'ur': 'ہم زبان کی موجود اور آواز کی تعلیم کے مطابق انسان کی زبان کی سمجھ میں بہت سی سیکھ کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک عمیق multimodal نیٹ ورک کو دکھاتے ہیں کہ کلاس-سطح کی سخنرانی ڈیٹا کو کلاس کرے۔ پیشنهاد کی ہیبراڈ توجه معماری سیسٹم کو معلومات کی تعلیمات کے ذریعے مطالبہ کرنا اور موڈل فوجین کے لئے مطالبہ کرنا مدد کرتا ہے. آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری سیستم تین پیدا کئے ہوئے multimodal ڈیٹ سٹ پر موجود ہے ہم نے بھی اپنے سیستم کی عملکرد اور عمومی تدبیر کو دکھایا کہ ایک حقیقی trauma scenario سے ایک پزشکی بات ڈیٹ سٹ پر ہے۔ اور اس کے بعد ہم نے سنتی طریقے اور عمیق سیکھنے کی طریقے کے مطابق ایک تفصیل اور تحلیل دی۔', 'uz': "Biz inson tilda o'rganish uchun multimodal juda o'rganish o'rganish uchun tillar tarkibi va tovush xususiyatlarning foydalanishini tekshirimiz. Biz bir multimodal tarmoqni taqdim qilamiz, gapir-so'zning taqdimotini tahrirlash mumkin. Aniqlanadigan hybrid taqdimot yaratuvchisi tizimni foydalanishiga foydalanadi. Tasavvur natijalari esa bizning tizimmiz turli kunlar holatiga amal rivojlanish natijalarini uchta ta ta'minlovchi multimodal maʼlumotlar tarkibida amalga oshadi. We also demonstrated the effectiveness and generalization of our system on a medical speech dataset from an actual trauma scenario.  Ko'rsatganda, biz tabiiy usullar va muvaffaqiyatli o'rganish usullarini o'rganish va muvaffaqiyatlarni o'rganish usullarini taqlil qildik.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xem xét sự hữu ích của ngôn ngữ và tính chất giọng điệu cho việc học sâu đa phương trong hiểu biết ngôn ngữ. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một mạng lưới đa phương tiện sâu rộng với sự chú ý và cách thức để phân loại dữ liệu ngôn ngữ cấp phát. The proposed hybrid attention kiến trúc helps the system focuses on leaving informative representative for both modality Đặc Đặc trưng trích and model ghép. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy hệ thống đạt được kết quả hiện đại hoặc cạnh tranh trên ba bộ dữ liệu đa phương đã công bố. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh hiệu quả và tổng hợp hệ thống của chúng tôi trên một bộ dữ liệu ngôn ngữ y học từ một trường hợp chấn thương. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cung cấp một so sánh và phân tích chi tiết về các phương pháp truyền thống và các phương pháp học sâu về nhiệt hạch và nhiệt hạch.', 'bg': 'Изследваме полезността на езиковото съдържание и вокалните характеристики за мултимодалното дълбоко обучение в разбирането на говоримия език. Представяме дълбока мултимодална мрежа с внимание и внимание на модалността за класифициране на речните данни на ниво изказване. Предложената хибридна архитектура на вниманието помага на системата да се фокусира върху изучаването на информативни изображения както за извличане на специфични за модала характеристики, така и за сливане на моделите. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашата система постига най-съвременни или конкурентни резултати върху три публикувани мултимодални набора данни. Също така демонстрирахме ефективността и обобщаването на нашата система върху медицински речен набор от данни от реални травматични сценарии. Освен това предоставихме подробно сравнение и анализ на традиционните подходи и методите за дълбоко обучение както за извличане на функции, така и за синтез.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken het nut van linguïstische inhoud en vocale kenmerken voor multimodaal deep learning in het menselijk gesproken taalbegrip. We presenteren een diep multimodaal netwerk met zowel feature attention als modality attention om spraakgegevens op uitgesproken niveau te classificeren. De voorgestelde hybride aandachtsarchitectuur helpt het systeem zich te concentreren op het leren van informatieve representaties voor zowel modaliteitsspecifieke kenmerkextractie als modellfusie. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons systeem state-of-the-art of concurrerende resultaten behaalt op drie gepubliceerde multimodale datasets. We demonstreerden ook de effectiviteit en generalisatie van ons systeem op een medische spraakdataset van een daadwerkelijk trauma scenario. Verder hebben we een gedetailleerde vergelijking en analyse gegeven van traditionele benaderingen en deep learning methoden op zowel feature extraction als fusie.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger nytten af sprogligt indhold og vokale karakteristika for multimodal dyb læring i menneskelig talesprogforståelse. Vi præsenterer et dybt multimodalt netværk med både opmærksomhed og modalitet opmærksomhed til at klassificere taledata på taleniveau. Den foreslåede hybride opmærksomhedsarkitektur hjælper systemet med at fokusere på at lære informative repræsentationer for både modalitetsspecifikke feature extraction og model fusion. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores system opnår state-of-the-art eller konkurrencedygtige resultater på tre offentliggjorte multimodale datasæt. Vi demonstrerede også effektiviteten og generaliseringen af vores system på et medicinsk taledatasæt fra et faktisk traume scenarie. Desuden leverede vi en detaljeret sammenligning og analyse af traditionelle tilgange og deep learning metoder på både feature extraction og fusion.', 'hr': 'Ispitujemo korisnost jezičkog sadržaja i glasnih karakteristika za multimodalno duboko učenje u razumijevanju jezika koji govore ljudima. Predstavljamo duboku multimodalnu mrežu s obzirom na pažnju i modalnu pažnju na klasifikaciju podataka o razini govora. Predložena hibridna arhitektura pozornosti pomaže sustavu usredotočiti se na informativne predstave za izvlačenje i model fuzije specifičnih modaliteta. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš sustav postigne stanje umjetnosti ili konkurentne rezultate na tri objavljena multimodalna dataseta. Također smo pokazali učinkovitost i generalizaciju našeg sustava na sastavu podataka o medicinskom govoru iz scenarija stvarne traume. Osim toga, pružili smo detaljnu usporedbu i analizu tradicionalnih pristupa i metoda dubokog učenja o izvlačenju i fuziji.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen den Nutzen sprachlicher Inhalte und vokaler Eigenschaften für multimodales Deep Learning im menschlichen Sprachverständnis. Wir präsentieren ein tiefes multimodales Netzwerk mit Aufmerksamkeit und Modalität, um Sprachdaten auf Äußerungsebene zu klassifizieren. Die vorgeschlagene hybride Aufmerksamkeitsarchitektur hilft dem System, sich auf das Erlernen informativer Repräsentationen sowohl für modalitätsspezifische Merkmalsextraktion als auch für Modellfusion zu konzentrieren. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser System aktuelle oder wettbewerbsfähige Ergebnisse auf drei veröffentlichten multimodalen Datensätzen erzielt. Wir demonstrierten auch die Wirksamkeit und Verallgemeinerung unseres Systems auf einem medizinischen Sprachdatensatz aus einem tatsächlichen Trauma-Szenario. Darüber hinaus haben wir einen detaillierten Vergleich und Analyse traditioneller Ansätze und Deep Learning Methoden sowohl zur Merkmalsextraktion als auch zur Fusion durchgeführt.', 'fa': 'ما استفاده از محتوای زبان\u200cشناسی و ویژگی\u200cهای صوتی برای یادگیری عمیق بسیار مدال در درک زبان\u200cشناسی انسان را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما یک شبکه عمیق چند مدال را با توجه و توجه موادی برای کلاس کردن داده\u200cهای سخنرانی را نشان می\u200cدهیم. ساختار توجه هیbrid پیشنهاد به سیستم کمک می\u200cکند که روی یادگیری نمایش\u200cهای اطلاعاتی برای استخراج ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای و ترکیب مدل تمرکز کند. نتیجه آزمایشی نشان می دهد که سیستم ما نتیجه\u200cهای موجود هنر یا رقابت در سه مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای متعدد منتشر شده به دست می\u200cآید. ما همچنین موثرت و عمومی سیستم ما را در یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای سخنرانی پزشکی از یک سناریو واقعی آسیب\u200cآسیب نشان دادیم. علاوه بر این، ما یک مقایسه و تحلیل جزئیح از دسترسی های سنتی و روش یادگیری عمیق در مورد استخراج و ترکیب ویژه\u200cهای ویژه را پیشنهاد کردیم.', 'id': 'Kami memeriksa utilitas isi bahasa dan karakteristik suara untuk belajar dalam multimodal dalam pemahaman bahasa berbicara manusia. Kami mempersembahkan jaringan multimodal yang dalam dengan perhatian karakteristik dan perhatian modalitas untuk mengklasifikasi data pidato tingkat utterance. Arkitektur perhatian hibrid yang diusulkan membantu sistem fokus pada belajar representation informatif untuk ekstraksi fitur spesifik modalitas dan fusi model. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa sistem kita mencapai hasil terbaik atau kompetitif pada tiga dataset multimodal yang diterbitkan. We also demonstrated the effectiveness and generalization of our system on a medical speech dataset from an actual trauma scenario.  Selain itu, kami menyediakan perbandingan dan analisis terperinci dari pendekatan tradisional dan metode belajar dalam kedua fitur ekstraksi dan fusi.', 'sw': 'Tunajaribu matumizi ya maudhui ya lugha na sifa za sauti kwa ajili ya kujifunza vizuri kwa ufahamu wa lugha ya binadamu. Tunaweza kutengeneza mtandao mkubwa wa lugha mbalimbali yenye mwangalizi na uangalifu wa taarifa za hotuba za usawa. Kijengo hicho kilichopendekezwa cha kutangaza huduma za viwanda vinasaidia mfumo wa kujifunza wakilisha taarifa kwa ajili ya utekelezaji wa utamaduni na msongamano wa model. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mfumo wetu unafanikiwa matokeo ya aina ya sanaa au mashindano ya kushindwa kwenye seti tatu zilizochapishwa. Pia tulionyesha ufanisi na uzalishaji wa mfumo wetu kwenye taarifa za hotuba za afya kutoka kwenye eneo halisi la maafa. Zaidi ya hayo, tulitoa ulinganisho na uchambuzi wa mbinu za kitamaduni na mbinu za kujifunza za kina kuhusu utoaji na mlipuko.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek die nutsprogram van lingwisiese inhoud en stem karakteristieke vir multimodale diep leer in menslike praat taal verstanding. Ons stel 'n diep multimodale netwerk met beide funksie aandag en modaliteit aandag na klassifiseer uitspraak vlak-sprekking data. Die voorgestelde hybrid aandag-arkitektuur help die stelsel fokus op die leer informatiewe voorstellings vir beide modaliteit-spesifieke eienskappe uittrekking en model fusie. Die eksperimentele resultate wys dat ons stelsel bereik staat of konkurentelike resultate op drie gepubliseer multimodale datastelle. Ons het ook die effektiviteit en generellisering van ons stelsel op 'n mediese spraak datastel van 'n werklike trauma scenario bevestig. Ons het ook 'n gedetale vergelyking en analisie van tradisionele toegang en diep leer metodes verskaf op beide funksie uittrekking en fusie.", 'tr': 'Biz dil dilinde g체rle첵채n dilinde 챌ykyp bilmek 체챌in lingwistiki me첵dan챌alary흫 we sesli 철zelliklerini흫 ullany힊yny bar첵arys. Biz 챌yky힊 d체zeden 챌yky힊 maglumatlary klasifikasynda 철r채n gaty bir multimodal 힊ebek bilen 체ns ber첵채ris. Hibrid 체ns arhitektegi sistemany흫 muny modalitet h채si첵etleri 챌ykarmak we modal birle힊megi 체챌in 체ns bermek 체챌in k철mekle첵채r. Synani첵an netijeleri bizi흫 sistemamyzy흫 체챌 챌apjykly multimodal veri setirlerinde m체mkin d철redigini 첵etip biljekdigini g철rkez첵채r. Biz hem sistemamyzy흫 t채sirli we generalizasyny lukman챌ylyk 챌yky힊 senary첵any흫 체st체nde bir trawma sahypasynda g철rkezildik. Munu흫 체챌in d채pli geleneksel 첵agda첵lary흫 we 챌yky힊 철wrenmek y철ntemlerini hem 챌yky힊 we 챌yky힊 hakynda detaylar bir kar힊캇la힊dyrma we 챌yky힊 etdik.', 'ko': '우리는 언어 내용과 음성 특징이 인류 구어 이해의 다중모드적 깊이 학습에서의 작용을 연구했다.우리는 특징 주의와 모드 주의를 포함하는 깊이 있는 다중모드 네트워크를 제시하여 언어급 음성 데이터를 분류했다.제시된 혼합 주의 구조는 시스템이 학습 정보 표시에 전념하고 특정한 모델의 특징 추출과 모델 융합에 사용된다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리 시스템은 이미 발표된 세 개의 다중모드 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적이거나 경쟁력 있는 결과를 얻었다.우리는 또한 우리의 시스템이 실제 상처 장면의 의료 음성 데이터 집합에서의 유효성과 통용성을 보여 주었다.그 밖에 우리는 전통적인 방법과 깊이 있는 학습 방법이 특징 추출과 융합에 있어 상세한 비교와 분석을 실시했다.', 'am': 'በሰው ቋንቋ ማስተዋል የቋንቋዊ ጥልቅ ትምህርት እና የድምፅ አካባቢዎችን ለመጠቀም እናፈትናለን፡፡ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን ለመግለጥ ጥልቅ የብልሃት መረብ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው የኬብሪድ አካባቢ የመዝገብ ግንኙነት የስርዓቱን መረጃዎችን ለመማር ይረዳል፡፡ የሞከሩ ውጤቶች ሲያሳየው የ-የ-የ-ዐርድ ሥርዓት ወይም ተቃዋሚ ፍሬዎችን በሦስት የተዘጋጁ የዳታ ጥያቄዎች ላይ እንዲያገኝ ነው፡፡ አካባቢ ንግግር ዳታዎችን በጥያቄ እና የስርምነታችንን ፍሬታዊ እና ሙቀት አሳየን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የባሕላዊ ደረጃዎች እና የጥልቅ ትምህርት ሥርዓት ማሳየት እና መፍጠርን አቀረብን፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা ভাষার বিষয়বস্তু এবং ভাষার বিষয়বস্তুর ব্যবহার পরীক্ষা করি মানুষের ভাষায় ভাষায় গভীর শিক্ষার জন্য। আমরা একটি গভীর মাল্টিমোডাল নেটওয়ার্ক উপস্থাপন করছি যেখানে বৈশিষ্ট্যের মনোযোগ এবং মৌলিক মনোযোগ প্রদান করা হয়েছে বাক প্রস্তাবিত হাইব্রিদের মনোযোগ প্রদান করা কাঠামো সিস্টেমের তথ্য প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে সাহায্য করে মোডেল ফিশনের জন্য তথ্য প্রত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সিস্টেমের রাষ্ট্র-শিল্প বা প্রতিযোগিতার ফলাফল তিনটি প্রকাশিত মাল্টিমোডাল ডাট আমরা আমাদের সিস্টেমের কার্যকর এবং জেনারেলিং প্রদর্শন করেছি প্রকৃত ব্যবস্থা থেকে একটি বাস্তবতা ভাষণের তথ্যের উপর। তাছাড়াও, আমরা ঐতিহ্যবাহী পদক্ষেপ এবং গভীর শিক্ষার পদ্ধতি দুই বিশেষ করে তুলনা এবং বিশ্লেষণ দিয়েছি।', 'sq': 'Ne shqyrtojmë përdorimin e përmbajtjes gjuhësore dhe karakteristikave zërore për mësimin e thellë multimodal në kuptimin e gjuhës së folur njerëzore. Ne paraqesim një rrjet të thellë multimodal me të dy vëmendje dhe modalitet vëmendje për të klasifikuar të dhënat e fjalimit në nivelin e shprehjes. Arkitektura e propozuar e vëmendjes hibride ndihmon sistemin të përqëndrohet në mësimin e përfaqësimeve informative si për nxjerrjen e karakteristikave specifike modalitetit, ashtu edhe për fuzionin e modelit. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se sistemi ynë arrin rezultate moderne apo konkurruese në tre grupe të dhënash multimodale të botuara. Ne treguam gjithashtu efektshmërinë dhe gjeneralizimin e sistemit tonë në një set të dhënash mjekësore të fjalimit nga një skenar traumatik aktual. Përveç kësaj, ne ofruam një krahasim të hollësishëm dhe analizë të qasjeve tradicionale dhe metodave të mësimit të thellë si mbi nxjerrjen dhe fuzionin e elementeve.', 'az': 'Biz dil məlumatının və dillərin çoxlu modal derin öyrənməsinin istifadəsini çəkirik. Biz sözlərin səviyyəsini dəyişdirmək üçün çoxlu modal a ğı ilə hər ikisinin fərqli dikkatini və modal dikkatini göstəririk. Bu təbliğ edilmiş hibrid təsiri arhitektürü sistemə informativ tərzlərini öyrənməyə kömək edir, hər ikisinin modalitə təsiri tərzlərinin və modellərin fəsasiyasını öyrənməsinə kömək edir. Müxtəlif sonuçlar sistemimizin üç münafiq çoxlu modal veri qurularında müəllif və müəllif sonuçlarını başa çatdığını göstərir. Biz də sistemimizin etkinlik və generalizasyonu həqiqətən travma scenariyasından təhsil etdik. Daha sonra, hər ikisinin fəaliyyəti çıxartma və fəaliyyəti barəsində ehtiyyətli tərzlərin və derin öyrənmə metodlarının detaylı bir karşılaşdırma və analizi təmin etdik.', 'bs': 'Ispitujemo korisnost jezičkog sadržaja i glasnih karakteristika za multimodalno duboko učenje u razumijevanju jezika koji govore ljudima. Predstavljamo duboku multimodalnu mrežu sa objektivnom pažnjom i modalnom pažnjom na klasifikaciju podataka o razini govora. Predložena hibridna arhitektura pažnje pomaže sistemu da se fokusira na učenje informativnih predstavljanja za ekstrakciju posebnih modaliteta i fuziju modela. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš sistem postigne state-of-the-art ili konkurentne rezultate na tri objavljena multimodalna dataseta. Također smo pokazali učinkovitost i generalizaciju našeg sustava na sastavu podataka o medicinskom govoru iz scenarija stvarne traume. Osim toga, pružili smo detaljnu usporedbu i analizu tradicionalnih pristupa i metoda dubokog učenja o izvlačenju i fuziji karakteristika.', 'ca': "Examinem l'utilitat del contingut lingüístic i les característiques vocals per a l'aprenentatge profund multimodal en la comprensió del llenguatge parlat humà. Presentam una xarxa multimodal profunda amb atenció característica i atenció de modalitat per classificar les dades de parla a nivell d'expressió. L'arquitectura d'atenció híbrida proposada ajuda al sistema a centrar-se en aprendre representacions informatives tant per l'extracció de característiques específices de la modalitat com per la fusió model. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre sistema aconsegueix resultats moderns o competitius en tres conjunts de dades multimodals publicats. També vam demostrar l'eficacia i la generalització del nostre sistema en un conjunt de dades de discurs mèdics d'un escenari real de trauma. A més, vam proporcionar una comparació i anàlisi detallats d'abords tradicionals i mètodes d'aprenentatge profund tant en l'extracció de característiques com en la fusió.", 'hy': 'Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք լեզվաբանական պարունակության և ձայնային հատկությունների օգտակարությունը մարդկային խոսում լեզվի հասկացության մեջ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի խորը բազմամոդալ ցանց, որն ունի և ուշադրություն, ինչպես նաև խոսքի մակարդակի տվյալների դասակարգում: Հիբրիդ ուշադրության նախագծված ճարտարապետությունը օգնում է համակարգին կենտրոնանալ ինֆորմատիվ ներկայացումների ուսումնասիրության վրա, ինչպես տրամաբանական հատկանիշների վերացման, ինչպես նաև ֆունկցիայի մոդել: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր համակարգը հասնում է ամենահետագա կամ մրցակցության արդյունքներ երեք հրատարակված բազմամոդալ տվյալների համակարգում: Մենք նաև ցույց տվեցինք մեր համակարգի արդյունավետությունը և ընդհանուր տարածումը բժշկական խոսքի տվյալների համակարգի վրա իրական տրավմայի սցենարից: Ավելին, մենք տրամադրեցինք ավանդական մոտեցումների և խորը ուսումնասիրության մեթոդների մանրամասն համեմատություն և վերլուծություն առանձնահատկությունների վերացման և միավորման համար:', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme užitečnost jazykového obsahu a vokálních charakteristik pro multimodální hluboké učení v porozumění lidskému mluvenému jazyce. Představujeme hlubokou multimodální síť s pozorností funkcí i modality pro klasifikaci řečových dat na úrovni výroku. Navržená hybridní architektura pozornosti pomáhá systému zaměřit se na učení informativních reprezentací pro extrakci prvků specifických pro modalitu a fúzi modelů. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš systém dosahuje nejmodernějších nebo konkurenčních výsledků na třech publikovaných multimodálních datových sadách. Dále jsme demonstrovali efektivitu a zobecnění našeho systému na databázi lékařské řeči ze skutečného traumatického scénáře. Dále jsme poskytli detailní srovnání a analýzu tradičních přístupů a metod hlubokého učení na extrakci vlastností i fúzi.', 'et': 'Uurime keelelise sisu ja hääleliste omaduste kasulikkust multimodaalsel sügavõppel inimese räägitava keele mõistmisel. Esitame sügavat multimodaalset võrgustikku, millel on nii tähelepanu kui ka modaalsuse tähelepanu kõneandmete klassifitseerimiseks. Kavandatud hübriidtähelepanu arhitektuur aitab süsteemil keskenduda informatiivsete esituste õppimisele nii modaalsuse spetsiifiliste funktsioonide ekstraheerimiseks kui ka mudeli fusiooniks. Katsetulemused näitavad, et meie süsteem saavutab kolme avaldatud multimodaalse andmekogumi puhul kaasaegseid või konkurentsivõimelisi tulemusi. Samuti demonstreerisime oma süsteemi efektiivsust ja üldistust meditsiinilise kõne andmekogumil reaalsest traumastsenaariumist. Lisaks pakkusime traditsiooniliste lähenemisviiside ja sügavõppe meetodite üksikasjalikku võrdlust ja analüüsi nii funktsioonide ekstraheerimise kui ka fusiooni kohta.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme kielellisen sisällön ja ääniominaisuuksien hyödyllisyyttä multimodaalisessa syväoppimisessa puhuttujen kielten ymmärtämisessä. Esitämme syvän multimodaalisen verkoston, jossa on sekä ominaisuus- että modaalisuushuomiota lausetason puhetietojen luokittelussa. Ehdotettu hybridiajatteluarkkitehtuuri auttaa systeemiä keskittymään informatiivisten representaatioiden oppimiseen sekä modaalisiin ominaisuuksien poimintaan että mallifuusioon. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että järjestelmämme saavuttaa viimeisimpiä tai kilpailukykyisiä tuloksia kolmesta julkaistusta multimodaalisesta aineistosta. Osoitimme myös järjestelmämme tehokkuuden ja yleistymisen lääketieteellisessä puheaineistossa todellisesta traumaskenaariosta. Lisäksi suoritimme yksityiskohtaisen vertailun ja analyysin perinteisistä lähestymistavoista ja syväoppimismenetelmistä sekä ominaisuuksien uuttamisesta että fuusiosta.', 'ha': "Kana jarraba amfani da masu cikin harshen da ke cikin tsarin sauri wa masu amfani da masu ƙaranci cikin fahimtar harshen mutum. We present a deep multimodal network with both feature attention and modality attention to classify utterance-level speech data.  An buƙata muhallin aikin kybri da aka buƙata, yana taimako da muhalli na'urar-na'urar, yana da fomat a kan karatun masu tsari ga masu tsari da tsarin-tayari da misalin motsi. Matarin jarrabai ke nuna cewa, na'asarmu yana samun matsalar-na'ar-sanar ko masu motsãfi a sakan da aka yi bayani da wasu mutane. Kayya, mun nuna mafiya aikin da ake samun na'urar kasarsa a kan mutane na bakin bayani daga wani halin wata shida. Furan haka, Mun sami, da fassarar da kuma aka yi anayya ga hanyoyin zaman hanyoyi da zane masu ƙari da za'a sami misalin da fusarci.", 'sk': 'Preučujemo uporabnost jezikovne vsebine in glasovnih značilnosti za multimodalno globoko učenje pri razumevanju govorjenega jezika. Predstavljamo globoko multimodalno omrežje s pozornostjo značilnosti in modalnostjo za klasifikacijo govornih podatkov na ravni izgovora. Predlagana hibridna arhitektura pozornosti pomaga sistemu osredotočiti na učenje informativnih predstavitev tako za modalno specifično ekstrakcijo značilnosti kot za fuzijo modelov. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da naš sistem dosega najsodobnejše ali konkurenčne rezultate na treh objavljenih multimodalnih naborih podatkov. Dokazali smo tudi učinkovitost in generalizacijo našega sistema na zbirki podatkov o medicinskem govoru iz dejanskega scenarija travme. Poleg tega smo zagotovili podrobno primerjavo in analizo tradicionalnih pristopov in metod globokega učenja na področju ekstrakcije značilnosti in fuzije.', 'he': 'אנו בודקים את שימושי התוכן הלשוני והאופיינים הקוליים ללימודים עמוקים רבים בהבנה של שפה מדברת אנושית. We present a deep multimodal network with both feature attention and modality attention to classify utterance-level speech data.  ארכיטקטורת תשומת לב היברידית המוצעת עוזרת למערכת להתמקד על לימוד מייצגים מידעיים עבור גם חיפוש תכונות מסויימות למודל וגם מיזוג מודל. התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שהמערכת שלנו משיגה תוצאות חדשות או תחרותיות בשלושה קבוצות נתונים multimodal מופרסמות. הוכחנו גם את היעילות והכללה של המערכת שלנו על קבוצת נתוני נאום רפואי מתרחש טראומה אמיתי. בנוסף, סיפקנו השוואה ומדירה פרטית של גישות מסורתיות ושיטות למידה עמוקה על חיפוש וגם מיזוג תכונות.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo nggambar barang langgar lan cara-cara sing nggawe barang langgar bantuan. We present a deep multimodal network Laptop" and "Desktop Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé éntuk pisan nganggo efek karo hal sistèm dhéwé nganggo dataset sing nyimpen karo scénerol sing dadi nggawe jane. Label, we nyebute nggawe ndherengkuyung karo nggawe gerarampun karo hal-hal dadi, ngono nggambar barang nggambar kuwi tindakan layakno ngono nggambar cara nggawe', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་སྐད་རིགས་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We present a deep multimodal network with both features attention and modality attention to classify utterance-level speech data. The proposed hybrid attention architecture helps the system focus on learning informative representations for both modality-specific feature extraction and model fusion. experimental results show that our system achieves state-of-the-art or competitive results in three published multimodal datasets. ང་ཚོས་ཟེར་བ་ཅིག་གི་སྨན་གཞུང་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལུས་འབྲེལ་བ་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ཡོད། Furthermore, we provided a detailed comparison and analysis of traditional approaches and deep learning methods on both feature extraction and fusion.'}
{'en': 'Exploring the Influence of Spelling Errors on Lexical Variation Measures', 'ar': 'استكشاف تأثير الأخطاء الإملائية على مقاييس التغيير المعجمي', 'fr': "Exploration de l'influence des fautes d'orthographe sur les mesures de variation lexicale", 'pt': 'Explorando a influência dos erros ortográficos nas medidas de variação lexical', 'es': 'Análisis de la influencia de los errores ortográficos en las medidas de variación léxica', 'ja': 'スペルミスが語彙バリエーション対策に及ぼす影響を探る', 'zh': '原拼写错误词法变体度量', 'hi': 'लेक्सिकल भिन्नता उपायों पर वर्तनी त्रुटियों के प्रभाव की खोज', 'ru': 'Изучение влияния орфографических ошибок на показатели лексических вариаций', 'ga': 'Iniúchadh ar Thionchar Earráidí Litrithe ar Bhearta Athraitheacha Foclaíochta', 'ka': 'ლექსიკური განრავლების შეცდომების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'A helyesírási hibák hatásának feltárása a lexikai változási mérésekre', 'it': "Esplorare l'influenza degli errori ortografici sulle misure di variazione lessicale", 'kk': 'Емлеу қатесін лексикалық айнымалы өлшемдерінде зерттеу', 'el': 'Εξερεύνηση της επίδρασης των ορθογραφικών σφαλμάτων στα μέτρα λεξικής παραλλαγής', 'ml': 'ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങളില്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെ പിശകുകള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'lt': 'Ortografijos klaidų įtakos Lexical Variation Measures tyrimas', 'mn': 'Лексиксикийн өөрчлөлтийн хэмжээсүүд дээр зөвлөгөөний алдаа нөлөөг судлах', 'no': 'Utforskar effekten av stavefeil på leksiske variasjonsverdiar', 'mk': 'Истражување на влијанието на грешките на правописот на лексикалните варијации', 'pl': 'Badanie wpływu błędów pisowni na środki zmian leksykalnych', 'ro': 'Explorarea influenței erorilor ortografice asupra măsurilor de variație lexicală', 'mt': 'L-esplorazzjoni tal-influwenza tal-iżbalji tal-ortografija fuq il-Miżuri ta’ Varjazzjoni Lessika', 'ms': 'Menjelaskan Influence of Spelling Error on Lexical Variation Measures', 'si': 'ලෙක්සිකල් වෙනස් මාර්ගයක් විදියට සාක්ෂණික වැරදි විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'sr': 'Ispitivanje utjecaja grešaka pisanja na mjere leksičke varijacije', 'sv': 'Undersökning av påverkan av stavningsfel på Lexical Variation Measures', 'ta': 'எழுத்துரு பிழைகளின் பிரச்சனையை அறிவிப்பது லெக்சிக்சியல் மாறி அளவுகளில்', 'ur': 'Lexical Variation Measures پر spelling errors کا اثر تحقیق کرتا ہے', 'so': 'Muujinta Influence of Errors of Spelling on Measures of Six Iswidish', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Khám phá tác động của lỗi chính tả về các biện pháp thay đổi ngôn ngữ.', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af indflydelsen af stavefejl på Lexical Variation Measures', 'de': 'Untersuchung des Einflusses von Rechtschreibfehlern auf Lexikal Variation Measures', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje utjecaja grešaka pisma na mjere leksičke varijacije', 'nl': 'Onderzoek naar de invloed van spelfouten op Lexical Variation Measures', 'bg': 'Изследване на влиянието на правописните грешки върху мерките за лексикални вариации', 'id': 'Menjelaskan Influensi Kesalahan Ejaan pada Ukuran Variasi Lexik', 'ko': '맞춤법 오류가 어휘 변이 도량에 미치는 영향 탐색', 'fa': 'تحقیق اثر خطاهای Spelling در مقدار تغییرات لکسیکی', 'sw': 'Kuelezea Tamko la Matukio ya Uelezaji Kuhusu Miundo ya Mabadiliko ya Lexico', 'tr': 'Leksik üýtgeşik ölçülerinde Ymlany Hatalaryň etkinligini barlaýar', 'af': 'Ondersoek die vloeienheid van stavering foute op Leksiese Verandering Pasmaak', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Shqyrtimi i ndikimit të gabimeve të ortografikës në masat e variacionit leksikal', 'az': 'Leksik dəyişiklik ölçüləri barəsində İmlər Hatalarının Etkinliğini Exploring the Effects of Spelling Errors', 'bn': 'লেক্সিকাল পরিবর্তনের মাপে বানান সমস্যার প্রভাব বিশ্লেষণ করা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Zkoumání vlivu pravopisových chyb na měření Lexických variací', 'bs': 'Ispitivanje utjecaja grešaka pisma na mjere leksičke varijacije', 'hy': 'Գծագրության սխալների ազդեցության ուսումնասիրելը լեքսիկական տարբերակների չափումների վրա', 'et': 'Õigekirjavigade mõju uurimine lexikaalsetele muutustele', 'fi': 'Oikeinkirjoitusvirheiden vaikutuksen tutkiminen Lexical Variation Measures', 'ca': "Explorar l'influència dels errors ortogràfics en les mesures de variació lexical", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'he': 'לחקור את השפעה של שגיאות הכתיבה על אמצעי שינוי לקסי', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje vpliva črkovalnih napak na ukrepe leksičnih sprememb', 'bo': 'Lexical Variation Measures ཐོག་ཏུ་དག་ཆ་དག་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ཀྱི་གནོད་དྲན་ཤིག་དང་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'This paper explores the influence of spelling errors on lexical variation measures. Lexical richness measures such as Type-Token Ration (TTR) and Yule’s K are often used for learner English analysis and assessment. When applied to learner English, however, they can be unreliable because of the spelling errors appearing in it. Namely, they are, directly or indirectly, based on the counts of distinct word types, and spelling errors undesirably increase the number of distinct words. This paper introduces and examines the hypothesis that lexical richness measures become unstable in learner English because of spelling errors. Specifically, it tests the hypothesis on English learner corpora of three groups (middle school, high school, and college students). To be precise, it estimates the difference in TTR and Yule’s K caused by spelling errors, by calculating their values before and after spelling errors are manually corrected. Furthermore, it examines the results theoretically and empirically to deepen the understanding of the influence of spelling errors on them.', 'ar': "تستكشف هذه الورقة تأثير الأخطاء الإملائية على مقاييس التباين المعجمي. غالبًا ما تُستخدم مقاييس الثراء المعجمي مثل Type-Token Ration (TTR) و Yule's K لتحليل وتقييم اللغة الإنجليزية للمتعلم. ومع ذلك ، عند تطبيقها على متعلم اللغة الإنجليزية ، يمكن أن تكون غير موثوقة بسبب الأخطاء الإملائية التي تظهر فيها. أي أنها تستند ، بشكل مباشر أو غير مباشر ، إلى عدد أنواع الكلمات المميزة ، وتزيد الأخطاء الإملائية بشكل غير مرغوب فيه من عدد الكلمات المميزة. يقدم هذا البحث ويدرس الفرضية القائلة بأن مقاييس الثراء المعجمي تصبح غير مستقرة في متعلم اللغة الإنجليزية بسبب الأخطاء الإملائية. على وجه التحديد ، تختبر الفرضية الخاصة بمجموعة متعلمي اللغة الإنجليزية من ثلاث مجموعات (المدرسة الإعدادية ، والمدرسة الثانوية ، وطلاب الكلية). لكي تكون دقيقًا ، فإنها تقدر الفرق في TTR و Yule's K الناجم عن الأخطاء الإملائية ، من خلال حساب قيمها قبل وبعد تصحيح الأخطاء الإملائية يدويًا. علاوة على ذلك ، فإنه يفحص النتائج نظريًا وتجريبيًا لتعميق فهم تأثير الأخطاء الإملائية عليها.", 'es': 'Este artículo explora la influencia de los errores ortográficos en las medidas de variación léxica. Las medidas de riqueza léxica, como Type-Token Ration (TTR) y la K de Yule, se utilizan a menudo para el análisis y la evaluación del inglés de los estudiantes. Sin embargo, cuando se aplican al inglés de los estudiantes, pueden ser poco fiables debido a los errores ortográficos que aparecen en él. Es decir, se basan, directa o indirectamente, en el recuento de distintos tipos de palabras, y los errores ortográficos aumentan indeseablemente el número de palabras distintas. Este artículo presenta y examina la hipótesis de que las medidas de riqueza léxica se vuelven inestables en el inglés de los estudiantes debido a errores ortográficos. Específicamente, pone a prueba la hipótesis sobre los corpus de estudiantes de inglés de tres grupos (estudiantes de secundaria, preparatoria y universitaria). Para ser precisos, estima la diferencia entre TTR y K de Yule causada por errores ortográficos, calculando sus valores antes y después de que los errores ortográficos se corrijan manualmente. Además, examina los resultados teórica y empíricamente para profundizar en la comprensión de la influencia de los errores ortográficos en ellos.', 'pt': "Este artigo explora a influência dos erros ortográficos nas medidas de variação lexical. Medidas de riqueza lexical, como Type-Token Ration (TTR) e Yule's K, são frequentemente usadas para análise e avaliação de inglês do aluno. Quando aplicados ao inglês do aluno, no entanto, eles podem não ser confiáveis devido aos erros de ortografia que aparecem nele. Ou seja, eles são, direta ou indiretamente, baseados na contagem de tipos distintos de palavras, e erros de ortografia aumentam indesejavelmente o número de palavras distintas. Este artigo apresenta e examina a hipótese de que as medidas de riqueza lexical se tornam instáveis em alunos de inglês por causa de erros de ortografia. Especificamente, ele testa a hipótese em corpora de aprendizes de inglês de três grupos (ensino médio, ensino médio e estudantes universitários). Para ser mais preciso, estima a diferença de TTR e Yule's K causada por erros ortográficos, calculando seus valores antes e depois da correção manual dos erros ortográficos. Além disso, examina os resultados teórica e empiricamente para aprofundar a compreensão da influência dos erros ortográficos sobre eles.", 'fr': "Cet article explore l'influence des fautes d'orthographe sur les mesures de variation lexicale. Les mesures de richesse lexicale telles que le Type-Token Ration (TTR) et le K de Yule sont souvent utilisées pour l'analyse et l'évaluation de l'anglais des apprenants. Cependant, lorsqu'ils sont appliqués à l'anglais de l'apprenant, ils peuvent ne pas être fiables en raison des fautes d'orthographe qui y figurent. C'est-à-dire qu'ils sont, directement ou indirectement, basés sur le décompte de types de mots distincts, et les fautes d'orthographe augmentent de façon indésirable le nombre de mots distincts. Cet article introduit et examine l'hypothèse selon laquelle les mesures de richesse lexicale deviennent instables dans l'anglais des apprenants en raison de fautes d'orthographe. Plus précisément, il teste l'hypothèse sur des corpus d'apprenants en anglais de trois groupes (collégiens, lycées et collégiens). Pour être précis, il estime la différence entre le TTR et le K de Yule causé par des fautes d'orthographe, en calculant leurs valeurs avant et après la correction manuelle des fautes d'orthographe. En outre, il examine les résultats théoriquement et empiriquement afin d'approfondir la compréhension de l'influence des fautes d'orthographe sur ceux-ci.", 'zh': "本文讨论拼写错误词法变体度量。 词汇丰度量,如令牌配(TTR)、Yule's K常用于学者英语析评。 然当用于学者之英语,其见拼写错误,可不恃也。 亦谓直间接异单词之数,拼写错误不时增单词之数也。 本文言因拼写错误而在学者英语中词汇丰度转不定之伪。 具体来说试三组(初中,高中大学生)英语学者语料库假设。 确言计拼写错误之前与后之拼写错误,与后之TTR与Yules K之异,以度其异。 检校经验,以深拼写错误解。", 'hi': 'यह पेपर लेक्सिकल भिन्नता उपायों पर वर्तनी त्रुटियों के प्रभाव की पड़ताल करता है। टाइप-टोकन राशन (टीटीआर) और यूल के के जैसे लेक्सिकल समृद्धि उपायों का उपयोग अक्सर शिक्षार्थी अंग्रेजी विश्लेषण और मूल्यांकन के लिए किया जाता है। जब शिक्षार्थी अंग्रेजी पर लागू किया जाता है, हालांकि, वे इसमें दिखाई देने वाली वर्तनी त्रुटियों के कारण अविश्वसनीय हो सकते हैं। अर्थात्, वे प्रत्यक्ष या अप्रत्यक्ष रूप से, अलग-अलग शब्द प्रकारों की गिनती के आधार पर हैं, और वर्तनी त्रुटियां अवांछित रूप से अलग-अलग शब्दों की संख्या में वृद्धि करती हैं। यह पेपर इस परिकल्पना का परिचय और जांच करता है कि वर्तनी त्रुटियों के कारण शिक्षार्थी अंग्रेजी में लेक्सिकल समृद्धि उपाय अस्थिर हो जाते हैं। विशेष रूप से, यह तीन समूहों (मध्य विद्यालय, हाई स्कूल और कॉलेज के छात्रों) के अंग्रेजी शिक्षार्थी कॉर्पोरेट पर परिकल्पना का परीक्षण करता है। सटीक होने के लिए, यह वर्तनी त्रुटियों के कारण TTR और Yule के K में अंतर का अनुमान लगाता है, वर्तनी त्रुटियों को मैन्युअल रूप से ठीक करने से पहले और बाद में उनके मानों की गणना करके। इसके अलावा, यह उन पर वर्तनी त्रुटियों के प्रभाव की समझ को गहरा करने के लिए सैद्धांतिक और अनुभवजन्य रूप से परिणामों की जांच करता है।', 'ja': "本稿では、スペルミスが語彙バリエーション尺度に及ぼす影響について考察する。 Type - Token Ration （ TTR ）やYule 's Kなどの単語の豊かさの尺度は、学習者の英語の分析と評価によく使用されます。 しかし、学習者の英語に適用すると、スペルミスが表示されるため、信頼性が低くなる可能性があります。 すなわち、それらは、直接的または間接的に、異なる単語タイプの数に基づいており、スペルミスは、異なる単語の数を望ましくなく増加させる。 この論文では、スペルミスのために英語学習者の言葉の豊かさが不安定になるという仮説を紹介し検討した。 具体的には、3つのグループ（中学生、高校生、大学生）の英語学習者コーパスに関する仮説をテストします。 正確には、スペルエラーが手動で修正される前後の値を計算することにより、スペルエラーによって引き起こされるTTRとYuleのKの差を推定します。 さらに、スペルミスの影響について理解を深めるために、理論的にも経験的にも結果を検討している。", 'ru': 'В настоящем документе изучается влияние орфографических ошибок на лексические показатели вариации. Показатели лексического богатства, такие как паек типа "токен" (TTR) и "K" Юле, часто используются для анализа и оценки английского языка учащихся. Однако при применении к изучаемому английскому языку они могут быть ненадежными из-за появляющихся в нем орфографических ошибок. А именно, они прямо или косвенно основаны на подсчете различных типов слов, а орфографические ошибки нежелательно увеличивают количество отдельных слов. В этой статье представлена и рассмотрена гипотеза о том, что лексические показатели богатства становятся нестабильными в изучаемом английском языке из-за орфографических ошибок. В частности, он проверяет гипотезу о том, что англоязычные студенты состоят из трех групп (средняя школа, средняя школа и студенты колледжа). Если быть точным, он оценивает разницу в TTR и K Yule, вызванную орфографическими ошибками, путем расчета их значений до и после исправления орфографических ошибок вручную. Кроме того, он изучает результаты теоретически и эмпирически, чтобы углубить понимание влияния на них орфографических ошибок.', 'ga': "Scrúdaíonn an páipéar seo tionchar earráidí litrithe ar bhearta éagsúlachta foclóireachta. Is minic a úsáidtear bearta saibhris foclóireachta ar nós Type-Token Ration (TTR) agus Yule's K chun anailís agus measúnú a dhéanamh ar Bhéarla na bhfoghlaimeoirí. Nuair a chuirtear i bhfeidhm iad ar Bhéarla na bhfoghlaimeoirí, áfach, féadann siad a bheith neamhiontaofa mar gheall ar na hearráidí litrithe atá ann. Is é sin, tá siad, go díreach nó go hindíreach, bunaithe ar chomhaireamh na gcineálacha focal ar leith, agus is neamh-inmhianaithe go méadaíonn earráidí litrithe líon na bhfocal ar leith. Tugann an páipéar seo isteach agus scrúdaítear an hipitéis go n-éiríonn bearta saibhreas foclóireachta éagobhsaí i mBéarla an fhoghlaimeora de bharr earráidí litrithe. Go sonrach, déanann sé tástáil ar an hipitéis ar chorpora foghlaimeoirí Béarla de thrí ghrúpa (meánscoil, ardscoil, agus mic léinn an choláiste). Le bheith beacht, déanann sé meastachán ar an difríocht idir TTR agus K Yule de bharr earráidí litrithe, trína luachanna a ríomh roimh agus tar éis earráidí litrithe a cheartú de láimh. Ina theannta sin, scrúdaíonn sé na torthaí go teoiriciúil agus go heimpíreach chun an tuiscint ar thionchar earráidí litrithe orthu a dhoimhniú.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά την επίδραση των ορθογραφικών σφαλμάτων στα μέτρα λεξικής παραλλαγής. Λεξικά μέτρα πλούτου, όπως η αναλογία τύπου-σήματος (ΤΡ) και το Κ του Γιούλ χρησιμοποιούνται συχνά για την ανάλυση και αξιολόγηση των αγγλικών των μαθητών. Όταν εφαρμόζονται στα Αγγλικά που μαθαίνουν, ωστόσο, μπορεί να είναι αναξιόπιστα λόγω των ορθογραφικών σφαλμάτων που εμφανίζονται σε αυτό. Δηλαδή, βασίζονται, άμεσα ή έμμεσα, στον αριθμό των διακριτών τύπων λέξεων, και ορθογραφικά λάθη αυξάνουν ανεπιθύμητα τον αριθμό των διακριτών λέξεων. Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει και εξετάζει την υπόθεση ότι τα μέτρα λεξικού πλούτου γίνονται ασταθή στα αγγλικά που μαθαίνουν λόγω ορθογραφικών σφαλμάτων. Συγκεκριμένα, εξετάζει την υπόθεση για σώματα μαθητών αγγλικών τριών ομάδων (γυμνασίου, λύκειου και φοιτητών κολεγίου). Για να είμαστε ακριβείς, εκτιμά τη διαφορά σε ΤΡ και Γιούλε Κ που προκαλείται από ορθογραφικά λάθη, υπολογίζοντας τις τιμές τους πριν και μετά τη διόρθωση ορθογραφικών σφαλμάτων με μη αυτόματο τρόπο. Επιπλέον, εξετάζει τα αποτελέσματα θεωρητικά και εμπειρικά για να εμβαθύνει την κατανόηση της επιρροής των ορθογραφικών σφαλμάτων σε αυτά.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány a helyesírási hibák lexikai variációs mérésekre gyakorolt hatását vizsgálja. A Lexikai gazdagság méréseit, mint például a Type-Token Ration (TTR) és a Yule K-t gyakran használják a tanulók angol elemzéséhez és értékeléséhez. Ha azonban angol nyelvtanulókra alkalmazzák, megbízhatatlanok lehetnek a benne megjelenő helyesírási hibák miatt. Vagyis közvetlenül vagy közvetve a különböző szótípusok számán alapulnak, és a helyesírási hibák nemkívánatosan növelik az egyedi szavak számát. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja és vizsgálja azt a hipotézist, miszerint a lexikai gazdagság mérései a helyesírási hibák miatt instabillá válnak az angol nyelvtanulóban. Konkrétan teszteli az angol tanuló korosztályok hipotézisét három csoportból (középiskolai, középiskolai és főiskolai hallgatók). Pontosabban becsüli meg a TTR és Yule K közötti különbséget a helyesírási hibák okozta értékek kiszámításával a helyesírási hibák kézi javítása előtt és után. Továbbá elméletileg és empirikusan vizsgálja az eredményeket, hogy elmélyítse a helyesírási hibák hatásának megértését.', 'ka': "ეს დოკუმენტი განსხვავებს მართლის შეცდომის შეცდომების შესახებ ლექსიკალური განსხვავების მეტრებზე. Lexical richness measures such as Type-Token Ration (TTR) and Yule's K are often used for learning English analysis and assessment. თუმცა, როდესაც ანგლისური სწავლის შესახებ, ისინი შეიძლება შეიძლება იყოს შეუძლებელი მართლური შეცდომის გამოსახებ. ისინი განსხვავებული სიტყვის ტიპების რაოდენობაზე დაბაზიან და სიტყვის შეცდომები არსწორად განსხვავებული სიტყვის რაოდენობაზე უფრო მეტია. ეს წიგნის შესახებ და შევხებ ჰიპოტეზას, რომ ლექსიკალური ბედნიერების მიზეზები ინგლისური სწავლის შეცდომის შეცდომის გამოსახულება. განსაკუთრებულია, ეს სამი ჯგუფის ინგლისური სწავლის კოპორაციის ჰიპოტეზაციის შეცვლა (შუდის სკოლა, შუდის სკოლა და კოლეჯის სტუდენტე მართლად, ის განსაზღვრება TTR და Yule's K-ის განსაზღვრება, რომელიც შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შემდეგ, მათი მნიშვნელობების წინ და მართლად შეცდომის შემდეგ. დამატებით, ის შემოწმება ტეორეტიკურად და ემპერიკურად, რომ უფრო სხვადასხვა შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შესახებ მათზე.", 'kk': "Бұл қағаз лексикалық өзгерістер үшін емлер қатесін тексереді. Type-Token Ration (TTR) және Yule's K секілді лексикалық бағаттық мерзімдері ағылшын анализ және оқу үшін қолданылады. Бірақ ағылшынша оқытуға қолданған кезде, олар оның істеу қатесінің себебі дұрыс емес болуы мүмкін. Атауында, олар тікелей не тікелей сөз түрлерінің санына негізделген және емлер қатесі өзгертілген сөздер санын көтеріп береді. Бұл қағаз лексикалық бағаттық өлшемдері ағылшын тілінде оқыту қатесінің себебінде дұрыс емес болатынын және тексереді. Ол үш топтың ағылшын оқытушыларының гипотезасын тексереді (ортасындағы мектеп, жоғары мектеп және колледж студенттері). Емле қатесін есептеп, TTR және Yule K- тың айырмашылығын есептеп, олардың мәндерін алдында және оның қатесін қолмен түзегеннен кейін есептеп береді. Қосымша, ол теоретикалық және империялық нәтижелерді олардың емлер қателерінің түсініктерін түсініп тұрады.", 'it': "Questo articolo esplora l'influenza degli errori di ortografia sulle misure di variazione lessicale. Le misure di ricchezza lessicale come Type-Token Ration (TTR) e Yule's K sono spesso utilizzate per l'analisi e la valutazione dell'inglese. Se applicati all'inglese che discende, tuttavia, possono essere inaffidabili a causa degli errori di ortografia che appaiono in esso. Vale a dire, sono, direttamente o indirettamente, basati sul conteggio di diversi tipi di parole, e gli errori di ortografia aumentano indesiderabilmente il numero di parole distinte. Questo articolo introduce ed esamina l'ipotesi che le misure di ricchezza lessicale diventino instabili nello studente inglese a causa di errori di ortografia. Nello specifico, mette alla prova l'ipotesi sui corpi di studenti inglesi di tre gruppi (scuole medie, superiori e universitari). Per essere precisi, stima la differenza tra TTR e K di Yule causata da errori di ortografia, calcolando i loro valori prima e dopo errori di ortografia vengono corretti manualmente. Inoltre, esamina i risultati teoricamente ed empiricamente per approfondire la comprensione dell'influenza degli errori ortografici su di essi.", 'lt': "Šiame dokumente nagrinėjama rašybos klaidų įtaka leksiniams skirtumams. Leksinio turtingumo priemonės, pavyzdžiui, Token Ration (TTR) ir Yule's K, dažnai naudojamos studentų anglų kalbos analizei ir vertinimui. Tačiau jei jie taikomi anglų kalbos mokytojams, jie gali būti nepatikimi dėl rašymo klaidų, atsiradusių joje. Tiksliau, jos tiesiogiai arba netiesiogiai grindžiamos skirtingų žodžių tipų skaičiavimu, o rašybos klaidos nepageidaujamai padidina skirtingų žodžių skaičių. Šiame dokumente pateikiama ir nagrinėjama hipotezė, kad dėl rašymo klaidų tekstinio turtingumo priemonės tampa nestabilios mokslo anglų kalba. Konkrečiai ji išbando hipotezę dėl trijų grupių (vidurinės mokyklos, vidurinės mokyklos ir koledžo studentų) anglų kalbos mokytojo korporo. Tiksliau sakant, jame apskaičiuojamas TTR ir Yule K skirtumas dėl rašymo klaidų, apskaičiuojant jų vertes prieš ir po rašymo klaidų ištaisant rankiniu būdu. Be to, ji tiria rezultatus teoriškai ir empiriškai, siekdama giliau suprasti rašybos klaidų poveikį joms.", 'ms': 'Kertas ini mengeksplorasi pengaruh ralat ejaan pada ukuran variasi leksikal. Ukuran kekayaan leksikal seperti Nisbah Token Jenis (TTR) dan K Yule sering digunakan untuk analisis dan penilaian bahasa Inggeris pelajar. Apabila dilaksanakan untuk pelajar bahasa Inggeris, bagaimanapun, mereka boleh tidak dipercayai kerana ralat ejaan yang muncul di dalamnya. Namanya, mereka, secara langsung atau tidak langsung, berdasarkan kiraan jenis perkataan yang berbeza, dan ralat ejaan tidak ingin meningkatkan bilangan perkataan yang berbeza. This paper introduces and examines the hypothesis that lexical richness measures become unstable in learner English because of spelling errors.  Secara khusus, ia menguji hipotesis pada corpora pelajar Inggeris dari tiga kumpulan (sekolah menengah, sekolah menengah, dan pelajar kolej). Secara tepat, ia menghargai perbezaan dalam TTR dan K Yule disebabkan oleh ralat ejaan, dengan menghitung nilai mereka sebelum dan selepas ralat ejaan diperbaiki secara manual. Selain itu, ia memeriksa hasil secara teori dan empirik untuk mendalam pemahaman pengaruh ralat ejaan pada mereka.', 'ml': 'ഈ കടലാസ് ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. ടൈപ്പ്-ടോക്കെന്\u200d റേഷനും യൂലിന്റെ കെയും പോലുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കൽ സമ്പന്നതയുടെ അളവുകളും പഠിക്കുന്ന ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് അന്വേഷണവും വി ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് പ്രയോഗിച്ചപ്പോള്\u200d, അതിലെ അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിപ്പിന്റെ പിശകുകള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുന വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ എണ്ണം അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലാണ്, നേരിട്ടോ നേരിട്ടോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ എണ്ണത്തിന്റെ  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതും ലെക്സിക്കൽ സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പഠിക്ക പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, അത് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പഠിക്കുന്ന കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയിലെ ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റസിനെ പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു (മദ്ധ്യൂള്\u200d, ഹൈസ് കൃത്യമായിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, ടിടിആരിലും യൂയിലിന്റെയും വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നതിനാലും അവയുടെ മൂല്യങ്ങള്\u200d എണ്ണുന്നതിനു മുമ്പും അക അതിനുശേഷം, അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, സ്പെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d പിശകുകളുടെ പ്രഭാവം അവര്\u200dക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d തി', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jesplora l-influwenza ta’ żbalji fl-ortografija fuq il-miżuri ta’ varjazzjoni lexika. Miżuri ta’ rikkezza lexika bħall-Proporzjoni tat-Tip-Token (TTR) u l-K ta’ Yule ta’ spiss jintużaw għall-analiżi u l-valutazzjoni tal-Ingliż għall-istudenti. Meta applikati għall-Ingliż li jitgħallem, madankollu, dawn jistgħu ma jkunux affidabbli minħabba l-iżbalji fl-ortografija li jidhru fih. Isem, huma, direttament jew indirettament, ibbażati fuq l-għadd ta’ tipi ta’ kliem distinti, u żbalji fl-ortografija mhux mixtieqa jżidu n-numru ta’ kliem distinti. Dan id-dokument jintroduċi u jeżamina l-ipoteżi li l-miżuri ta’ rikkezza lexika jsiru instabbli fl-Ingliż li jitgħallem minħabba żbalji fl-ortografija. B’mod speċifiku, ittestja l-ipoteżi dwar il-korpura tal-istudenti Ingliżi ta’ tliet gruppi (l-iskola medja, l-iskola medja, u l-istudenti tal-kulleġġ). Biex ikun preċiż, huwa jistma d-differenza fit-TTR u l-K ta’ Yule kkawżata minn żbalji fl-ortografija, billi jikkalkula l-valuri tagħhom qabel u wara żbalji fl-ortografija huma kkoreġuti manwalment. Barra minn hekk, jeżamina r-riżultati teoretikament u empirikament biex japprofondixxi l-fehim tal-influwenza tal-iżbalji fl-ortografija fuqhom.', 'mk': "Овој весник го истражува влијанието на грешките во правописот на лексичките варијации. Мерките за лексикално богатство, како што се Type-Token Ration (TTR) и Yule's K, честопати се користат за анализа и проценка на англискиот ученик. When applied to learner English, however, they can be unreliable because of the spelling errors appearing in it.  Имено, тие се, директно или индиректно, базирани на бројот на различни типови на зборови, и грешките во правописот нежелно го зголемуваат бројот на различни зборови. Овој весник ја претставува и ја испитува хипотезата дека мерките на лексикално богатство стануваат нестабилни на учениот англиски поради грешките во правописот. Специфично, истата ја тестира хипотезата на англискиот ученик корпора од три групи (средно училиште, средно училиште и студенти од колеџ). Да бидам прецизен, ја проценува разликата во ТТР и К на Јуле предизвикана од грешки во правописот, со пресметувањето на нивните вредности пред и по правописот рачно се коригираат. Покрај тоа, истиот ги испитува резултатите теоретски и емпирички за длабоко разбирање на влијанието на грешките во правописот врз нив.", 'no': "Denne papiret utforskar effekten av stavefeil på leksiske variasjonar. Leksiske røydsmålar som Type-Token Ration (TTR) og Yule's K vert ofte brukt for å lære engelsk analyse og vurdering. Når det er tilgjengeleg til å læra engelsk, kan dei likevel vera ukjengeleg på grunn av stavefeilane som dukkar inn i det. Desse er direkte eller indirekte basert på talet på ulike ordtypar, og stavefeilar øk talet på ulike ord uavhengig. Denne papiret introduserer og undersøker hypotesien at leksiske røydsmålingar blir ikkje stabil i læringsengelsk på grunn av stavefeil. Det tester hypotesien om engelsk læringskorpora av tre grupper (midtskole, høgskole og college students). For å vera nøyaktig, vurderer det forskjellen i TTR og Yule s K som følgjer av stavefeil, ved å rekna ut verdiane sine før og etter stavefeil vert retta manuelt. Det undersøker også resultatet teoretisk og empirisk for å dyppa forståelse av effekten av stavefeil på dei.", 'mn': "Энэ цаас хэлний өөрчлөлтийн хэмжээсүүд дээр бичлэгийн алдааны нөлөөг судалдаг. Тип-Токен Рейтинг (TTR) болон Юлийн K зэрэг лексикийн баялаг хэмжээсүүд Англи хэлний шинжилгээ болон үнэлгээ сурагчдад ихэвчлэн хэрэглэгддэг. Гэхдээ Англи хэлний сурагч дээр хэрэглэгдэхэд тэд бичил алдаа гарч ирсэн учраас итгэлтэй байж болно. Яг л тэд шууд эсвэл буруу хэлбэрээр ялгаатай үг төрлийн тоонуудыг үндсэн бөгөөд бичилгээний алдаа ялгаатай үг тоонуудыг нэмэгдүүлдэг. Энэ цаас хэвлэлийн баялаг хэмжээсүүд англи хэлний сурагч дээр сурагчид алдаа болохоор байдаг гэдгийг харуулж, шалгана. Ялангуяа, энэ нь англи хэлний сурагчийн корпора (дундаж сургууль, ахлах сургууль, сургууль сурагчид) талаар шинжилгээ хийдэг. Тодорхой хэлэхэд, TTR болон Yule's K-ийн ялгааг зөвшөөрсөн алдаа гаргасан, өмнө нь зөвшөөрсөн дараа нь тэдний утгыг тооцоолж, зөвшөөрсөн алдаа гаргасан дараа нь тооцоолж байна. Үүний үр дүн нь теоретик болон эзэмшигтэй байдал дээр бичилгээний алдааны нөлөөг гүнзгий болгохын тулд шалгаж байна.", 'ro': 'Această lucrare explorează influența erorilor de ortografie asupra măsurilor de variație lexicală. Măsurile bogăției Lexicale, cum ar fi Tip-Token Ration (TTR) și Yule K sunt adesea folosite pentru analiza și evaluarea limbii engleze. Cu toate acestea, atunci când sunt aplicate la cursanții englezi, acestea pot fi nesigure din cauza erorilor de ortografie care apar în ea. Și anume, ele se bazează, direct sau indirect, pe numărul de tipuri de cuvinte distincte, iar erorile de ortografie cresc nedorit numărul de cuvinte distincte. Această lucrare introduce și examinează ipoteza că măsurile bogăției lexicale devin instabile în limba engleză cursantă din cauza erorilor de ortografie. În mod specific, testează ipoteza cu privire la corpurile de studenți în limba engleză din trei grupuri (gimnaziu, liceu și colegiu). Pentru a fi exact, se estimează diferența dintre TTR și K lui Yule cauzată de erorile de ortografie, calculând valorile acestora înainte și după ce erorile de ortografie sunt corectate manual. În plus, examinează rezultatele teoretic și empiric pentru a aprofunda înțelegerea influenței erorilor de ortografie asupra lor.', 'pl': "W artykule badano wpływ błędów pisowni na miary zmienności leksykalnej. Leksykalne pomiary bogactwa, takie jak typ-token ration (TTR) i Yule's K są często używane do analizy i oceny języka angielskiego uczących się. Jeśli jednak są one stosowane do uczącego się angielskiego, mogą być niewiarygodne z powodu pojawiających się w nim błędów pisowni. Mianowicie, są one, bezpośrednio lub pośrednio, oparte na liczbie różnych typów słów, a błędy pisowni niepożądanie zwiększają liczbę odrębnych słów. Niniejszy artykuł wprowadza i analizuje hipotezę, że pomiary bogactwa leksykalnego stają się niestabilne u uczących się języka angielskiego z powodu błędów pisowni. W szczególności testuje hipotezę dotyczącą korpusów uczących się angielskiego z trzech grup (gimnazjum, liceum i studentów). Dokładnie mówiąc, szacuje różnicę w TTR i Yule's K spowodowaną błędami pisowniowymi, obliczając ich wartości przed i po ręcznej korektie błędów pisowni. Ponadto analizuje wyniki teoretycznie i empirycznie w celu pogłębienia zrozumienia wpływu błędów pisowni na nie.", 'si': "මේ පත්තර පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ ලෙක්සිකල් වෙනස් මාර්ගයක් ගැන බලන වැරදි ප්\u200dරශ්නය. ලෙක්සිකිසිකල් ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සහ යූල් ගේ K වලින් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි විශ්ලේෂණය සහ අවශ්\u200dයාවය සඳහා  ඒත් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වලින් ඉගෙනගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, ඔවුන්ට පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ඒ නියමයි, ඔවුන්, විශේෂ වචන වර්තන වගේ ගණනය සහ විශේෂ වර්තන වර්තනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකෘත වර්තන වර්තනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකෘත ව මේ පත්තුව ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා කියලා ලෙක්සිකල් ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවක් මාර්ගය ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ ඉන්ග්\u200dරීසිය විශේෂයෙන්ම, ඒක ඉංග්\u200dරීසියේ ඉගෙන්ග්\u200dරීසියේ ඉගෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් කණ්ඩායම් තුන් කණ්ඩායම් ග විශ්වාස කරන්න, ඒක TTR සහ Yule's K වල වෙනස් අනුමාන කරනවා විශාල වැරදි වලින්, ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂ විශේෂය කලින් පටන් ගණන් කරනවා සහ ඒ වගේම, ඒක ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂා කරනවා සාධාර්ථික විද්\u200dයාවක් සහ සාධාර්ථික විද්\u200dයාවක් ඔවුන්ගේ විද්\u200dයා", 'so': "Qoraalkan ayaa saamayn ku yeelan kara khaladaha ku qoran waxyaabaha kala duwan ee lexicka. Qorshaha taajirka ah ee Leksikal, sida Type-Token Ration (TTR) iyo Yule's K inta badan waxaa loo isticmaalaa baaritaanka ingiriisiga iyo qiimeynta barashada. Si kastaba ha ahaatee marka lagu codsado barashada ingiriiska, waxay suurtogal u noqon karaan sababtoo ah qaladyada ku qoran. Namely, they are, directly or indirectly, based on the counts of distinct word types, and spelling errors undesirably increase the number of distinct words.  Qoraalkan wuxuu soo bandhigayaa oo baaritaan labawejiileyda, in waxyaabaha la xiriira ay afka Ingiriiska wax ku baran karo qaladyo ku qoran darteed. Si gaar ah waxaa loo tijaabiyaa labada kooxood oo ka mid ah shirkadda barashada Ingiriiska (dugsiga dhexe, dugsiga sare iyo ardayda iskuulka). Si loo xaqiijiyo, waxay ku qiimeeyaa kala duwanaanta TTR iyo Yule's K ee sababtay khaladda fasaxa, waxayna ku xisaabtaa qiimahooda horay iyo kadib in khaladda hadalka lagu hagaajiyo. Intaas waxaa kaloo ka baarayaa arimaha cilmiga iyo waxyaabaha la kordhiyo waxyaabaha ay saameyn ku leedahay qalabka hadalka.", 'sr': "Ovaj papir istražuje uticaj grešaka pisanja na leksičke mjere varijacije. Mjere leksičkog bogatstva poput Ration Tipa Tokena (TTR) i Julovog K često se koriste za analizu i procjenu engleskog učenja. Međutim, kad se primjenjuje na učenje engleskog jezika, mogu biti nepouzdani zbog grešaka na pisanju. Naravno, direktno ili indirektno, zasnovani su na broju različitih tipova reči, i greške pisanja nepotrebno povećavaju broj različitih reči. Ovaj papir predstavlja i pregleda hipotezu da leksičke mjere bogatstva postaju nestabilne na učenju engleskog jezika zbog grešaka pisanja. Posebno, to testira hipotezu o korporaciji engleskog učenika tri grupe (srednja škola, srednja škola i studenti fakulteta). Da budem precizno, procjenjuje razliku TTR i Yule's K uzrokovanu greškama pisanja, raèunajuæi njihove vrijednosti prije i nakon što su pogreške pisanja manualno ispravljene. Osim toga, ona istražuje rezultate teoretički i empirički da bi dublje razumeo uticaj grešaka na pisanje na njih.", 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதம் எழுத்து பிழைகளின் விளைவை தெரிந்து கொள்கிறது லெக்சிக்சியல் மாறுதல் அளவுகளில். Name @ info: whatsthis வேறு வார்த்தை வகைகளின் எண்ணிக்கையை அடிப்படையில், நேரடியாக அல்லது நேரடியாக, மற்றும் எழுத்து பிழைகளை வேறு வார்த்தைகளின் எண் இந்த காகிதத்தை குறிப்பிடுகிறது மற்றும் சரிபார்க்கும் தொழில் சொல்லும் பிழைகள் காரணத்தால் லெக்சிக்சியல் பணக குறிப்பிட்டு, அது மூன்று குழுக்களின் ஆங்கிலத்தில் படிப்பவர் நிறுவனத்தின் குறிப்பை சோதிக்கிறது (நடு பள்ளிக்கு, உயர இது சரியாக இருக்கும், இது TTR மற்றும் Yule கேயின் வேறுபாட்டை கணக்கிடும், எழுத்து பிழைகள் கைமுன் மற்றும் எழுத்து பிழைகள் கைமுறையாக திரு அதற்கு மேலும், அது தியூரியலாக முடிவுகளைப் பரிசோதிக்கிறது மற்றும் வெறுத்து பிழைகளின் புரிவு அவர்கள் மீது குறைக்கும் ப', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ لکسیکل تغییر اندازے پر سپے کی تغییر کی تغییر کی تغییر کی تاثیر پکڑتا ہے. لکسیکل ثروت کے اندازے جیسے تایپ-ٹوکین رایٹون (TTR) اور یول کی K اکثر انگلیسی تحلیل اور ارزیابی کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں. لیکن جب انگلیسی کی تعلیم کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے تو یہ اس میں ظاہر ہونے والی غلطی کے سبب غلطی ہوسکتے ہیں. یعنی، یہ سیدھے یا غلط باتوں کی تعداد پر بنیاد ہیں، اور فصیح باتوں کی تعداد پر اور فصیح باتوں کی تعداد کو غلط طریقہ سے زیادہ کر رہے ہیں. یہ کاغذ اسے معلوم کرتا ہے اور مطمئن کرتا ہے کہ لکسیکل ثروت کے اندازے انگلیسی کی تعلیم میں غیر قابل ہو جاتے ہیں اس کے مطابق، یہ تین گروہوں کے اندر انگلیسی سکونٹنے والے کورپورا کے فرضے کی آزمائش کرتا ہے۔ دقیق ہونے کے لئے یہ TTR اور یول کے K میں تفاوت کا مطالبہ کرتا ہے کہ اسے اس سے پہلے اور اس کے بعد ان کے مطالب کا شمار کرتا ہے کہ اسے سمجھنے کی خطائیں سمجھی جاتی ہیں۔ اس کے علاوہ، یہ نتائج تئوریٹی طور پر اور مضبوط طور پر تحقیق کرتا ہے کہ ان پر اشارے کی غلطی کا اثر عمیق کرے۔', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats undersöker hur stavfel påverkar lexikala variationer. Lexical rikedom mått som Type-Token Ration (TTR) och Yules K används ofta för elevers engelska analys och bedömning. När de tillämpas på elever engelska kan de dock vara opålitliga på grund av stavfel som visas i den. Det vill säga, de är, direkt eller indirekt, baserade på antalet distinkta ordtyper, och stavfel ökar oönskat antalet distinkta ord. Denna uppsats introducerar och undersöker hypotesen att lexikala rikedomsmått blir instabila i eleven engelska på grund av stavfel. Specifikt testar den hypotesen på engelska elevkorpora av tre grupper (mellanstadium, gymnasie och college studenter). För att vara exakt uppskattas skillnaden i TTR och Yules K orsakad av stavfel, genom att beräkna deras värden före och efter stavfel manuellt korrigeras. Vidare undersöks resultaten teoretiskt och empiriskt för att fördjupa förståelsen av stavfel på dem.', 'uz': "Ushbu qogʻoz leksikal oʻzgaruvchining o'zgarishlariga imkoniyatlarni ko'rsatadi. Name Ingliz tilini o'rganishga qoʻllanilganda, bu yerda imkoniyatlarning xatolari koʻrsatilganligi sabab u oʻqib boʻlmaydi. Nomida, ular aloqa soʻzning turlari asosida ko'paytirilgan soʻzlar soni ko'rsatadi va imkoniyatlarni notoʻgʻri oʻzgartirish xatolarini ajratuvchi sonlarni oshirish mumkin. Bu qogʻoz eng ingliz tilida o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarini o'rganish muvaffaqiyatsiz sababini o'rganish muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatadi. Ko'rsatilgan, bu ingliz tili o'rganish kompaniyasi uchta guruhga (maktab, maktab, maktab va maktab o'quvchilarini sinov qiladi). @ info: whatsthis Ko'rsatganda, bu ularning imkoniyatlarining o'zgartirish xatolarini oshirish uchun o'z natijalarini tasavvur qiladi.", 'vi': "Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu sức ảnh hưởng của lỗi chính tả trên các biện pháp biến đổi từ. Công nghệ phát triển ngôn ngữ pháp như tỉ lệ kiểu Token (TTP) và'Yule K'thường được dùng để phân tích và đánh giá ngôn ngữ học giả. Tuy nhiên, khi áp dụng cho học giả tiếng Anh, họ không đáng tin cậy vì có lỗi chính tả trong đó. Có nghĩa là, trực tiếp hay gián tiếp, chúng dựa trên số lượng của các loại từ khác nhau, và lỗi chính tả không đáng mong muốn tăng số từ khác nhau. Tờ giấy này đưa ra và kiểm tra giả thuyết rằng thước đo độ giàu có ngôn ngữ trở nên bất ổn khi học tiếng Anh do lỗi chính tả. Cụ thể, nó thử nghiệm giả thuyết về đệ tử tiếng Anh gồm ba nhóm (trung học, trung học, và sinh viên cao đẳng). Chính xác hơn, nó ước tính s ự khác biệt trong TTP và Yule K do lỗi chính tả, bằng cách tính giá trị trước và sau khi lỗi chính tả được sửa tự tay. Hơn nữa, nó kiểm tra kết quả theo lý thuyết và kinh nghiệm để hiểu sâu hơn về ảnh hưởng của sai lầm phát âm lên chúng.", 'bg': 'Настоящата статия изследва влиянието на правописните грешки върху мерките за лексикална вариация. Мерки за лексикално богатство като съотношение тип-токен (ТТР) и К на Юле често се използват за анализ и оценка на английски език. Когато се прилагат към обучаващия се английски, обаче, те могат да бъдат ненадеждни поради правописните грешки, които се появяват в него. А именно, те се основават пряко или косвено на броя на различните типове думи, а правописните грешки нежелано увеличават броя на отделните думи. Настоящата статия представя и изследва хипотезата, че мерките за лексикално богатство стават нестабилни при обучаващия се английски поради правописни грешки. По-конкретно, тя тества хипотезата за корпоративни ученици на английски език от три групи (средно училище, гимназия и колежани). За да бъдем точни, той изчислява разликата в ТТР и К на Юле, причинена от правописни грешки, като изчислява техните стойности преди и след правописните грешки се коригират ръчно. Освен това изследва резултатите теоретично и емпирично, за да задълбочи разбирането за влиянието на правописните грешки върху тях.', 'da': 'Denne artikel undersøger indflydelsen af stavefejl på leksikalske variationsmålinger. Lexical rigdom målinger såsom Type-Token Ration (TTR) og Yules K bruges ofte til elev engelsk analyse og vurdering. Når de anvendes på elev engelsk, kan de dog være upålidelige på grund af stavefejlene, der vises i det. De er nemlig direkte eller indirekte baseret på antallet af forskellige ordtyper, og stavefejl øger uønsket antallet af forskellige ord. Denne artikel introducerer og undersøger hypotesen om, at leksikalske rigdom målinger bliver ustabile i elev engelsk på grund af stavefejl. Specielt tester den hypotesen om engelsk elevkorpora af tre grupper (mellemskole, high school og college studerende). For at være præcis vurderer den forskellen i TTR og Yules K forårsaget af stavefejl ved at beregne deres værdier før og efter stavefejl manuelt rettes. Desuden undersøger den resultaterne teoretisk og empirisk for at uddybe forståelsen af stavefejls indflydelse på dem.', 'nl': "Dit artikel onderzoekt de invloed van spelfouten op lexicale variatiematen. Lexicale rijkdom metingen zoals Type-Token Ration (TTR) en Yule's K worden vaak gebruikt voor de analyse en beoordeling van het Engels van leerlingen. Wanneer toegepast op leerling Engels, kunnen ze echter onbetrouwbaar zijn vanwege de spellingsfouten die erin voorkomen. Ze zijn namelijk direct of indirect gebaseerd op het aantal verschillende woordtypen, en spelfouten verhogen ongewenst het aantal afzonderlijke woorden. Dit artikel introduceert en onderzoekt de hypothese dat lexicale rijkdom metingen instabiel worden in leerling Engels vanwege spelfouten. In het bijzonder test het de hypothese op Engels lerende corpora van drie groepen (middelbare school, middelbare school en hogeschool studenten). Om precies te zijn, schat het verschil in TTR en Yule's K veroorzaakt door spellingsfouten, door hun waarden te berekenen voordat en nadat spellingsfouten handmatig worden gecorrigeerd. Verder onderzoekt het de resultaten theoretisch en empirisch om het begrip van de invloed van spelfouten op hen te verdiepen.", 'hr': "Ovaj papir istražuje utjecaj grešaka pisanja na mjere leksičke varijacije. Mjere leksičkog bogatstva poput Ration Type-Token (TTR) i Yule's K često se koriste za analizu i procjenu učenika engleskog jezika. Međutim, kad se primjenjuju na učenje engleskog jezika, mogu biti neuvjerljivi zbog grešaka pisanja u njemu. To je direktno ili indirektno, zasnovano na broju različitih tipova riječi, a greške pisanja nepotrebno povećavaju broj različitih riječi. Ovaj papir predstavlja i pregleda hipotezu da mjere leksičkog bogatstva postaju nestabilne na učenju engleskog jezika zbog grešaka pisanja. Posebno, ona testira hipotezu o korporaciji učenika engleskog jezika iz tri grupe (srednje škole, srednje škole i studenti fakulteta). Da bude precizno, procjenjuje razliku TTR i Yule's K uzrokovanu greškama pisanja, proračunajući njihove vrijednosti prije i nakon što su pogreške pisanja manualno ispravljene. Osim toga, ona istražuje rezultate teoretički i empirički da bi dublje razumijelo utjecaj grešaka pisanja na njih.", 'de': "Dieser Beitrag untersucht den Einfluss von Rechtschreibfehlern auf lexikalische Variationsmessungen. Lexikale Reichtumsmessungen wie Type-Token Ration (TTR) und Yule's K werden häufig für die Analyse und Bewertung von Englisch verwendet. Wenn sie jedoch auf Englisch-Lernende angewendet werden, können sie aufgrund der darin enthaltenen Rechtschreibfehler unzuverlässig sein. Sie basieren nämlich direkt oder indirekt auf der Anzahl der verschiedenen Worttypen, und Rechtschreibfehler erhöhen die Anzahl der einzelnen Wörter unerwünscht. Dieser Beitrag stellt die Hypothese vor und untersucht, dass lexikalische Reichtumsmessungen im Englischlernenden aufgrund von Rechtschreibfehlern instabil werden. Konkret wird die Hypothese auf Englisch Lernende Korpora von drei Gruppen (Mittelschule, High School und College Studenten) getestet. Um genau zu sein, schätzt es die Differenz zwischen TTR und Yule's K, die durch Rechtschreibfehler verursacht wird, durch Berechnung ihrer Werte vor und nach der manuellen Korrektur von Rechtschreibfehlern. Darüber hinaus werden die Ergebnisse theoretisch und empirisch untersucht, um das Verständnis des Einflusses von Rechtschreibfehlern auf sie zu vertiefen.", 'ko': "본고는 맞춤법 오류가 어휘의 변이 도량에 미치는 영향을 탐구하였다.어휘 풍부도 지표, 예를 들어 유형 표기율(TTR)과 Yule'sK 등은 영어 학습자의 분석과 평가에 자주 사용된다.그러나 영어 학습자에게 적용될 때 맞춤법 오류가 발생할 수 있기 때문에 믿을 수 없을 수도 있다.즉, 서로 다른 단어 유형의 계수를 직접 또는 간접적으로 바탕으로 맞춤법 오류가 서로 다른 단어의 수를 불필요하게 증가시킬 수 있다는 것이다.본고는 맞춤법 오류로 인해 어휘의 풍부도가 영어 학습자들에게 불안정해졌다는 가설을 소개하고 검증했다.구체적으로 말하면 3조(중학생, 고등학생, 대학생)의 영어 학습자 어료고를 검증했다.정확히 말하면 맞춤법 오류 수정 전후의 TTR과 Yule's K 값을 수동으로 계산해 맞춤법 오류로 인한 TTR과 Yule's K의 차이를 추정한다.그 밖에 본고는 이론과 실증 두 가지 측면에서 연구 결과를 검증하여 맞춤법 오류가 그 영향에 대한 이해를 깊이 있게 했다.", 'fa': "این کاغذ تأثیر اشتباه\u200cهای نوشتن در مورد اندازه\u200cهای تغییرات زبانی تحقیق می\u200cکند. اندازه\u200cهای ثروتمندی Lexical measures such as Type-Token Ration (TTR) and Yule's K are often used for learning English analysis and assessment. ولی هنگامی که برای یادگیری انگلیسی درخواست می\u200cکند، آنها می\u200cتوانند به دلیل اشتباهی\u200cهای نوشتن که در آن ظاهر می\u200cشوند غیرقابل اعتماد باشند. به نام، آنها مستقیما یا غلطی بر اساس شماره نوع کلمه مختلف هستند، و اشتباه\u200cهای نوشتن به ناخوشایند تعداد کلمه\u200cهای مختلف را افزایش می\u200cدهند. این کاغذ فرضیه\u200cای را معرفی می\u200cکند و تحقیق می\u200cکند که اندازه\u200cهای ثروت زبانی در انگلیسی یاد بگیرند، به دلیل اشتباهی\u200cهای نوشتن. دقیقاً این فرضیه در مورد شرکت دانش آموزان انگلیسی سه گروه (مدرسه مرکزی، دبیرستان و دانش آموزان دانش آموزان دانش آموزان) را آزمایش می\u200cکند. دقیقاً تفاوت TTR و K یول را به سبب اشتباه\u200cهای نوشتن، با محاسبه ارزش\u200cهایشان قبل و بعد از اشتباه\u200cهای نوشتن به دست درست می\u200cشود. علاوه بر این، نتیجه\u200cهای تئوریتی و عمومی را تحقیق می\u200cکند تا درک تأثیر اشتباهی نوشتن بر آنها عمیق کند.", 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linagundua athari ya makosa ya kujieleza kuhusu hatua za mabadiliko ya lexico. Hatua za utajiri wa Lexico kama vile Mfuko wa Taifa (TTR) na Ki-Yule mara nyingi hutumika kwa ajili ya kujifunza Kiingereza uchambuzi na tathmini. Hata hivyo, wanapotumika kujifunza Kiingereza, wanaweza kutokuamini kwa sababu ya makosa ya uvunjifu yanavyoonekana. Kwa jina la hilo, ni, moja kwa moja au moja kwa moja, kwa kutumia idadi ya aina tofauti za maneno, na makosa ya kujieleza bila kuongeza idadi ya maneno tofauti. Gazeti hili linaonyesha na kutafiti dhana hiyo kwamba hatua za utajiri za lexico zinazidi kuwa imara kwa lugha ya kujifunza Kiingereza kwa sababu ya makosa ya kusoma. Kwa ujumla, inajaribu nadhani kuhusu kampuni ya wanafunzi wa Kiingereza ya makundi matatu (shule ya sekondari, shule ya sekondari na wanafunzi wa vyuo vikuu). Ili kuwa sahihi, inakadiria tofauti katika TTR na Yule K yaliyosababishwa na makosa ya kujieleza, kwa kuhesabu thamani zao kabla na baada ya makosa ya kujieleza yamekwisha sahihi kwa mkono. Furthermore, it examines the results theoretically and empirically to deepen the understanding of the influence of spelling errors on them.', 'tr': "Bu kagyz lektik üýtgeşmeler barada ymla hatalaryň täsirini keşfedýär. Token Taýpi (TTR) we Yulynyň K ýaly luksuz baýramçylyk ölçüleri iňlis dilini öwrenmek we çözümlenmek üçin ulanýarlar. Iňlisçe öwrenmek üçin yada edilen bolsa ymlanyň ýalňyşyna sebäbi ynanyp bilenoklar. Adatça, olar düzgün ýa-da düzgün söz hillerine dayanýarlar we ymla hatalarynyň sayyny bozmaýarlar. Bu kagyz iňlisçe öwrenmek üçin leksiýa baýramlyklaryň iňlis dilinde durmadyklaryny tanyşdyrýar we synanyşdyrýar. Adatça, iňlisler üç toparyň (orta mekdep, ýokary mekdep we kolleks okuwçylaryň) hypotesiýasyny bardyr. Dyggat bolsak, ol TTR we Yulyň K'iň ymlanyň hatalaryndan dolandygyny tassyklaýar, iň öň we ymlanyň hatalaryny ellen düzeldiler. Munuň üstine, netijeleri teoriýa we empiriýa ýüzüniň ymlanyň hatalaryň täsirini düşürmek üçin synanyşýar.", 'sq': 'Kjo letër eksploron ndikimin e gabimeve të ortografikës në masat e variacionit lexik. Masat e pasurisë leksike të tilla si Rationi i Tip-Token (TTR) dhe K e Jule shpesh përdoren për analizën dhe vlerësimin e anglisht të mësuesve. Kur aplikohen për mësuesin anglez, megjithatë, ato mund të jenë të pamjaftueshme për shkak të gabimeve të ortografikës që shfaqen në të. Me të vërtetë, ato janë, drejtpërdrejt apo indirekt, bazuar në numërimin e llojeve të fjalëve të veçanta, dhe gabimet e ortografikës në mënyrë të padëshirueshme rritin numrin e fjalëve të veçanta. This paper introduces and examines the hypothesis that lexical richness measures become unstable in learner English because of spelling errors.  Veçanërisht, teston hipotezën mbi korporen e mësuesve angleze të tre grupeve (shkolla e mesme, shkolla e mesme dhe studentët e kolegjit). Për të qenë saktë, vlerëson ndryshimin në TTR dhe K të Yule të shkaktuar nga gabimet e ortografikës, duke llogaritur vlerat e tyre përpara dhe pas gabimeve të ortografikës janë korrektuar manualisht. Përveç kësaj, ajo shqyrton rezultatet teorikisht dhe empirikisht për të thelluar kuptimin e ndikimit të gabimeve të ortografikës mbi ta.', 'af': 'Hierdie papier ondersoek die influens van speletjie foute op leksiese verandering maat. Leksiese rykdom maatskappe soos Tipe-Token Ration (TTR) en Yule se K word dikwels gebruik vir leerder Engelske analisie en evaluering. Wanneer toegewend word na leer Engels, kan hulle egter onvertroubaar wees vanweë die spelling foute wat daarin verskyn word. Dit is, direk of indirekte, gebaseer op die tel van uitsonderde woord tipes, en speletjie foute wat onwillig die aantal uitsonderde woorde vermeerder is. Hierdie papier introduseer en ondersoek die hipotees dat leksiese rykdom maat unstable word in leer Engels vanweë speletjies foute. Spesifieke, dit testeer die hipotesis op Engelske leerneerder korpora van drie groepe (middelskool, hoë skool en kolleksiestudente). Om presies te wees, dit estimateer die verskil in TTR en Yule se K veroorsaak deur speletjie foute, deur hulle waardes voor en na speletjie foute bereken word Hand korrigeer. Ook, dit ondersoek die resultate teorieese en empiriese om die verstanding van die influens van spelfoute op hulle te diep.', 'am': "ይህም ገጽ የጽሑፍ ስህተት በሌክሲካዊ ልዩ ልዩነት መጠቀሚያ ላይ ጥቅም ያስተውላል፡፡ እንደዓይነት-Token Ration (TTR) እና Yule's K በመጠቀም እንግሊዘኛ ትምህርት እና ማስታወቂያ ለመጠቀም ይጠቅማሉ፡፡ እንግሊዝኛ ለመማር በተጠቀም ጊዜ ግን በአንጀራው ስህተት ሲገልጸው አይችሉም፡፡ በተለያዩ ቃላት ቁጥር በመሠረት፣ ቀጥተኛ ወይም አስተዳይ፣ የልዩ ቃላት ቁጥር እና የጽሑፍ ስህተት በተለያዩ ቃላት ቁጥር ያበዛሉ፡፡ ይህ ገጽ በንግግሊዝኛ ተማሪ ስህተት ስህተት ምክንያት የሌክሲካዊ ሀብት ሥርዓት በንግግሊዝኛ ተማሪ ስህተት የማይጸና መሆኑን ያስታውቃል፡፡ በተለይም፣ የኢንግሊዝኛ አስተማሪ ኮርፖር የሦስት ቡድን (መካከለኛ ትምህርት ቤት፣ የሁለተኛ ትምህርት እና ኮሌጅ ተማሪዎች) እርግጠኛ ሆኖ የTTR እና የዩኑ ክፍል በጽሑፍ ስህተት በመቁጠር እና በጽሑፍ ስህተት በተቀድሞና በኋላ በመቆጣጠር ይቆጥራል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ፍሬዎቹን በሐሳብ እና በአሳማሚ ማስተዋል የንግግር ስህተት ማሳየት ይሞክራል፡፡", 'hy': 'Այս թղթին ուսումնասիրում է ուղղագրության սխալների ազդեցությունը լեքսիկական տարբերակային չափումների վրա: Լեքսիկական հարստության չափումները, ինչպիսիք են Տիպ-Թոկին հարաբերակցությունը (ՏՏՌ) և Յուլի K-ը հաճախ օգտագործվում են անգլերենի ուսանողների վերլուծության և գնահատման համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, երբ նրանք կիրառվում են անգլերեն սովորողների համար, դրանք կարող են անվստահելի լինել դրա մեջ հայտնվող ուղղագրության սխալների պատճառով: Ահա, դրանք անմիջապես կամ անմիջապես հիմնված են տարբեր բառերի տեսակների հաշվարկի վրա, և ուղղագրության սխալները անցանկանալիորեն ավելացնում են տարբեր բառերի թիվը: This paper introduces and examines the hypothesis that lexical richness measures become unstable in learner English because of spelling errors.  Հատկապես, այն ստուգում է անգլերեն սովորող երեք խմբի (միջին դպրոց, ավագ դպրոց և քոլեջի ուսանողների) հիպոթեզը: Ճշմարիտ ասած, այն գնահատում է ԹԹՌ-ի և Յուլի K-ի տարբերությունը, որը պատճառ է կառավարման սխալների պատճառով, կառավարման սխալների առաջ և հետո իրենց արժեքները հաշվարկելով՝ կառավարվում են ձեռքով: Ավելին, այն ուսումնասիրում է արդյունքները տեսականորեն և էմպիրիկապես, որպեսզի խորացնենք դրանց վրա գրելու սխալների ազդեցության հասկացությունը:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি লেক্সিক্যাল পরিবর্তনের মাধ্যমে বানান ভুলের প্রভাব বিস্ফোরণ করে। টাইপ টোকেন রেশন (টিটিআর) এবং ইয়ুলের কে- এর মত লেক্সিক্সিকাল সমৃদ্ধ পদক্ষেপ প প্রায়শই ই ইংরেজি বিশ্লেষণ এবং মূল্যায়নের জন্য ব কিন্তু যখন ইংরেজি শিক্ষার জন্য প্রয়োগ করা হয়, তখন তারা বানান ভুলের কারণে বানানোর কারণে অসম্ভব হতে পারে। নামে, তারা সরাসরি বা পরিচালিত শব্দের ধরনের সংখ্যা ভিত্তিতে এবং বানান ভুল বিভিন্ন শব্দের সংখ্যা বৃদ্ধি করে। এই পত্রিকাটি উপস্থাপন করেছে এবং হিসেবে পরীক্ষা করেছে যে লেক্সিকাল সমৃদ্ধ পদক্ষেপগুলো ইংরেজি ভাষায় শিক্ষার কারণে অ বিশেষ করে এটি ইংরেজী শিক্ষার্থী কোর্পোরায় তিন গ্রুপ (মধ্যস্কুল, হাই স্কুল এবং কলেজের ছাত্রী) হাইপিসেস পরীক্ষা কর বানান ভুলের কারণে টিটিআর আর ইউলের কে- এর পার্থক্য হিসেবে হিসেব করে, তাদের মান হিসেবে হিসেব করে তাদের বানান ভুলের মান হিসেবে হিসেব এছাড়াও, এটি তাদের উপর বানান ভুলের প্রভাব বুঝতে থাকার ফলাফলের পরীক্ষা করেছে।', 'bs': "Ovaj papir istražuje utjecaj grešaka na pisanje na mjere leksičke varijacije. Mjere leksičkog bogatstva poput Ration Type-Token (TTR) i Yule's K često se koriste za analizu i procjenu učenika engleskog jezika. Međutim, kad se primjenjuje na učenje engleskog jezika, oni mogu biti nepouzdani zbog grešaka pisanja u njemu. To je direktno ili indirektno, zasnovano na broju različitih tipova riječi, i greške pisanja nepotrebno povećavaju broj različitih riječi. Ovaj papir predstavlja i pregleda hipotezu da mjere leksičkog bogatstva postaju nestabilne na učenju engleskog jezika zbog grešaka pisanja. Posebno, ona testira hipotezu o korporaciji engleskog učenja iz tri grupe (srednja škola, srednja škola i studenti fakulteta). Da bude precizno, procjenjuje razliku TTR i Yule's K uzrokovanu greškama pisanja, računati njihove vrijednosti prije i nakon što su pogreške pisanja manualno ispravljene. Osim toga, ona istražuje rezultate teoretički i empirički da bi dublje razumijelo uticaj grešaka pisanja na njih.", 'az': "Bu kağıt leksik dəyişiklik ölçüləri barəsində imzalama hatalarının təsirini keşfetir. Tip-Token Ration (TTR) və Yule's K kimi, İngilizə analizi və qiyməti öyrənmək üçün çox s ıralar istifadə edilir. İngilizce öyrənmək üçün istifadə edildikdə isə, içində görünən yazılım hatalarına görə onlar inanılmaz olarlar. Əslində, onlar müxtəlif söz növlərinin saylarına dayanılır və yazılım xətalarının sayını istəməz fərqli sözlərin sayını artırar. Bu kağıt yazmaq xətalarından öyrənən İngilizce öyrənmək üçün leksik zənginlik ölçülərinin istifadə edilməsini təsdiq edir və təsdiq edir. Üç grup İngilizə öyrənən korporası haqqında hipotezi sınayır. Tam olaraq, o, TTR və Yule's K'nin fərqliyini, yazmaq xətalarından əvvəl və yazmaq xətalarından sonra onların qiymətlərini hesablayır. Daha sonra, bu nəticələri teoriki və empiriki olaraq onların üzərində yazmaq hatalarının təsirini daha çox dəyişdirmək.", 'id': "Kertas ini mengeksplorasi pengaruh dari kesalahan ejaan pada ukuran variasi lexik. Ukuran kekayaan Lexik seperti Ratio Token Tip (TTR) dan K Yule sering digunakan untuk analisis dan penilaian bahasa Inggris pelajar. Ketika diterapkan untuk pelajar bahasa Inggris, bagaimanapun, mereka dapat tidak dipercaya karena kesalahan ejaan yang muncul di dalamnya. Namely, they are, directly or indirectly, based on the counts of distinct word types, and spelling errors undesirably increase the number of distinct words.  Kertas ini memperkenalkan dan memeriksa hipotesis bahwa tindakan kekayaan leksik menjadi tidak stabil dalam bahasa Inggris pelajar karena kesalahan ejaan. Secara spesifik, ia menguji hipotesis pada korpora pelajar Inggris dari tiga kelompok (sekolah menengah, sekolah menengah, dan siswa kuliah). To be precise, it estimates the difference in TTR and Yule's K caused by spelling errors, by calculating their values before and after spelling errors are manually corrected.  Selain itu, ia memeriksa hasil secara teori dan empiris untuk mendalam pemahaman pengaruh dari kesalahan ejaan pada mereka.", 'cs': "Tento článek zkoumá vliv pravopisných chyb na lexikální variační měřítka. Pro analýzu a hodnocení angličtiny se často používají Lexikální hodnoty, jako je typ-token ration (TTR) a Yule's K. Pokud se však používají pro studenty angličtiny, mohou být nespolehlivé kvůli pravopisným chybám, které se v ní objevují. Konkrétně jsou založeny přímo či nepřímo na počtech různých typů slov a pravopisné chyby nežádoucím způsobem zvyšují počet různých slov. Tento článek představuje a zkoumá hypotézu, že lexikální měření bohatosti se u studentů angličtiny stává nestabilní kvůli pravopisným chybám. Konkrétně testuje hypotézu na korpusech studentů angličtiny tří skupin (střední, střední a vysokoškolské). Přesněji řečeno, odhaduje rozdíl v TTR a Yulově K způsobený pravopisnými chybami, výpočtem jejich hodnot před a po ruční opravě pravopisných chyb. Dále zkoumá výsledky teoreticky a empiricky s cílem prohloubit pochopení vlivu pravopisných chyb na ně.", 'ca': "Aquest article explora l'influència dels errors d'ortografia en les mesures de variació lèxica. Lexical richness measures such as Type-Token Ration (TTR) and Yule's K are often used for learner English analysis and assessment.  Però quan s'aplica a l'aprenent anglès, poden ser poc fiables a causa dels errors d'ortografia que hi apareixen. En concret, estan, directament o indirectament, basats en el nombre de tipus de paraules distints, i els errors d'ortografia no volen augmentar el nombre de paraules distints. Aquest article introdueix i examina l'hipòtesi de que les mesures de riquesa lècsica es converteixen en instables en anglès per errors d'ortografia. En concret, testa la hipòtesi sobre el corpore d'aprenent anglès de tres grups (escola mitjana, institut i estudiants universitaris). Per ser precis, estima la diferència en TTR i en Yule's K causada per errors d'ortografia, calculant els seus valors abans i després dels errors d'ortografia es corregeixen manualment. A més, examina els resultats teòricament i empíricament per aprofundar la comprensió de l'influència dels errors d'ortografia sobre ells.", 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis uuritakse õigekirjavigade mõju leksikaalsele variatsioonile. Õppija inglise keele analüüsimiseks ja hindamiseks kasutatakse sageli lexikaalseid rikkuse mõõtmeid, nagu Tüübi Token Ration (TTR) ja Yule K. Kui rakendatakse õppija inglise keele, võivad need siiski olla ebausaldusväärsed, sest selles ilmuvad õigekirjavead. Nimelt põhinevad need otseselt või kaudselt erinevate sõnatüüpide arvul ja õigekirjavead suurendavad soovimatult erinevate sõnade arvu. Käesolev töö tutvustab ja uurib hüpoteesi, et leksikaalse rikkuse mõõtmised muutuvad inglise keele õppija õigekirjavigade tõttu ebastabiilseks. Konkreetselt testitakse hüpoteesi inglise keele õppijate korpustest kolmes rühmas (keskkooli, keskkooli ja kolledži õpilased). Täpsemalt hinnatakse õigekirjavigadest põhjustatud TTR ja Yule K erinevust, arvutades nende väärtused enne ja pärast õigekirjavigade käsitsi parandamist. Lisaks uuritakse tulemusi teoreetiliselt ja empiiriliselt, et süvendada arusaamist õigekirjavigade mõjust neile.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tarkastellaan kirjoitusvirheiden vaikutusta sanaston variaatiomittareihin. Lexical Richness Mittareita, kuten Type-Token Ration (TTR) ja Yulen K, käytetään usein oppijan englannin analyysiin ja arviointiin. Kun niitä sovelletaan englannin oppijaan, ne voivat kuitenkin olla epäluotettavia kirjoitusvirheiden vuoksi. Nimenomaan ne perustuvat suoraan tai epäsuorasti eri sanatyyppien laskentaan, ja oikeinkirjoitusvirheet lisäävät epäsuorasti erillisten sanojen määrää. Tässä työssä esitellään ja tarkastellaan hypoteesia, jonka mukaan sanaston rikkauden mittarit muuttuvat epästabiiliksi englannin oppijan kirjoitusvirheiden vuoksi. Erityisesti se testaa hypoteesia englannin oppijakorpusista kolmessa ryhmässä (ylä-, lukio- ja korkeakouluopiskelijat). Tarkemmin sanottuna se arvioi oikeinkirjoitusvirheiden aiheuttaman TTR:n ja Yulen K:n eron laskemalla niiden arvot ennen ja jälkeen oikeinkirjoitusvirheet korjataan manuaalisesti. Lisäksi siinä tarkastellaan tuloksia teoreettisesti ja empiirisesti syventääkseen ymmärrystä kirjoitusvirheiden vaikutuksesta niihin.', 'sk': "V prispevku raziskujemo vpliv črkovalnih napak na merila leksikalne variacije. Merila leksičnega bogastva, kot sta razmerje vrste žetonov (TTR) in Yule's K, se pogosto uporabljajo za analizo in oceno angleščine učencev. Če se uporabljajo za učence angleščine, pa so lahko nezanesljivi zaradi črkovalnih napak, ki se pojavljajo v njem. Namreč, neposredno ali posredno temeljijo na štetju različnih vrst besed, črkovalne napake pa neželeno povečujejo število različnih besed. Ta prispevek uvaja in preučuje hipotezo, da merila leksikalnega bogastva postanejo nestabilna pri učencih angleščine zaradi črkovalnih napak. Natančneje testira hipotezo o korpusih učencev angleščine v treh skupinah (srednješolskih, srednješolskih in študentskih dijakih). Če smo natančni, ocenjuje razliko v TTR in Yulovi K, ki jo povzročajo črkovalne napake, z izračunom njihovih vrednosti pred in po tem, ko so črkovalne napake ročno popravljene. Poleg tega preučuje rezultate teoretično in empirično, da bi poglobil razumevanje vpliva črkovalnih napak na njih.", 'ha': "Wannan takardan na jarraba fassarar littãfi a kan shiryoyin ayukan littãfi. KCharselect unicode block name Idan an applied dõmin a sanar da Ingiriya, to, za'a iya yin amfani da su sabo da makorari na fassarar da za'a fito a cikinsa. Ina sunan, su, a kan ƙidãyar nau'in magana masu iya daidaita ko a guda, kuma suna da ƙidãyar ayuka na rubũtãwa, suna ƙara launin da aka ƙayyade. Wannan takardan na ƙara shi kuma yana jarraba nadãma da cewa ma'anar leksisi sun zama ustawi cikin harshen Ingiriya don a sami kuskure ga littãfin. A kan ƙayyade, Yana jarraba misalin mutane na karatun ta zama na karatun Ingiriya na ƙungiya uku (matsayin tsakanin, da iskooli na tsakanin da karãtun labarai). Tsar da gaske, yana ƙaddara s ãɓãni cikin tsattR da Yule's K wanda aka sabata da ɓallin littãfi, yana ƙidãya kimar a gaba da kuma a bayan kuskure na gyare manun. Furan haka, Yanã jarraba matsala ta wajen aikin da ke iya ƙara fahimtar ma'anar fassarar magana a kansu.", 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Mejer Leksik bagasai sing koyo Tipe-Token ration (TTR) lan K Yule kuwi digawe kanggo langgar tarjamahan Inggris lan ujian. Na kesempatan kanggo langgar Inggris, tho, dheke iso nggawe gerak-aran mergane kelas barang langgar. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak iki nggunakake lan ujaran ngerti suposipun sing paling keliksel kuwi nggawe basa Inggris kuwi mau. Kowé kudu, kuwi nyong ngerasakno karo perusahaan kelas telu ngrusa (sekolah tanggal, sekolah, lan kelas). buddy politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྐད་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་སྟངས་པར་འགྱུར་བ་ཀྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ལ་རྟོགས་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་འཇའ་མིའི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཚད་ལྟར་དཔེར་ན། Typ-Token Ration (TTR)དང་ཡུ་ལོའི་K་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཞིབ་དང་བསམ་བློ་ ཡིན་ནའང་ཡིག་གཟུགས་སྐབས་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ན་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁ་ཤས་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན། མིན་པར། དེ་ཚོ་ནི་གསལ་པོ་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཨང་གྲངས་དང་ཁྱད་པར་མེད་པ་བར་གཞི་ཡོད་པ། ཡིག་སྣོད་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བ་དང་དག་ཆ་གི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གསལ་བ་དང་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟངས་ལ་གཏོང་གི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དབྱིན་ཡིག ཁྱད་པར་ན། དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཁང་གསུམ་ཀྱི་གོ་སྐབས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཏག་ཏག་ཞིབ་ཡིན་ན TTR དང་ཡུ་ལ་གྱི་K་ནང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བྱུང་ཡོད་པ དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། གྲུབ་འབྲས་གཞུང་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་གྱི་གནོད་འཚོ་བ་མང་ཙམ་ཞིབ་ཏུ་གཏོང་གི་ཡོད།', 'he': "העיתון הזה חוקר את השפעה של שגיאות תיאום על מדידי ויריאציה לקסית. אמצעי עשירות לקסיים כמו שיעור טוקן (TTR) ו K של יול משתמשים לעתים קרובות לניתוח ולהערכה אנגלית למלמלמד. בכל אופן, כשהם מועמדים ללמוד אנגלית, הם יכולים להיות לא אמינים בגלל שטעויות האיתוי שמופיעות בה. Namely, they are, directly or indirectly, based on the counts of distinct word types, and spelling errors undesirably increase the number of distinct words.  העיתון הזה מציג ומבחן את ההיפתוזיה שמדידי עשירה לקסית הופכים לאיציביים בללמד אנגלית בגלל טעויות באיית. במיוחד, הוא מבחן את ההיפתוזיה על גופורה למלמידה אנגלית של שלושה קבוצות (בית הספר התיכון, תיכון, ותלמידי קולג). To be precise, it estimates the difference in TTR and Yule's K caused by spelling errors, by calculating their values before and after spelling errors are manually corrected.  חוץ מזה, הוא בודק את התוצאות באופן תיאורטי ואמפרי כדי לעמוק את ההבנה של השפעה של שגיאות תיאום עליהם."}
{'en': 'Stance Detection with Hierarchical Attention Network', 'ar': 'كشف الموقف مع شبكة الاهتمام الهرمي', 'fr': "Détection de position avec réseau d'attention hiérarchique", 'pt': 'Detecção de Postura com Rede de Atenção Hierárquica', 'es': 'Detección de posturas con red de atención jerárquica', 'ja': '階層的アテンションネットワークを使用したスタンス検出', 'zh': '用分层注意网络为姿势检测', 'hi': 'पदानुक्रमित ध्यान नेटवर्क के साथ रुख का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Обнаружение положения с помощью иерархической сети внимания', 'ga': 'Brath Seasaimh le Líonra Airde Ordlathach', 'ka': 'სტანსის განსახულება ჰიერარიქულ დაახლოების ქსელით', 'hu': 'Állásérzékelés hierarchikus figyelemhálózattal', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση θέσης με δίκτυο ιεραρχικής προσοχής', 'it': 'Rilevamento di posizione con rete di attenzione gerarchica', 'lt': 'Stebėsenos nustatymas Hierarchinio dėmesio tinklu', 'kk': 'Hierarchical Attention Network- мен Stance анықтау', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Halaman dengan Rangkaian Perhatian Hierarkikal', 'ml': 'Stance Detection with Hierarchical Attention Network', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгчийн анхаарлын сүлжээний Stance Detection with Hierarchical Attention Network', 'no': 'Comment', 'mt': 'Detezzjoni ta’ Stanza b’Netwerk ta’ Attenzjoni Erarkika', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie stanu za pomocą hierarchicznej sieci uwagi', 'ro': 'Detectarea stării cu rețeaua de atenție ierarhică', 'sr': 'Detekcija stanica sa hijerarhičkom mrežom pažnje', 'si': 'ස්ටැන්ස් හොයාගන්න හියාර්චිකල් අවධානය ජාලය සමග', 'so': 'Stance Detection with Hierarchical Attention Network', 'sv': 'Stansdetektering med hierarkiskt uppmärksamhetsnätverk', 'ta': 'நிலை கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'ur': 'سٹنس ڈیٹ کیل ڈیٹنس نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ phát hiện kết nối với mạng lưới chú ý', 'hr': 'Detekcija stanica sa hijerarskom mrežom pažnje', 'da': 'Stance detektion med hierarkisk opmærksomhedsnetværk', 'bg': 'Откриване на позиции с йерархична мрежа за внимание', 'nl': 'Positiedetectie met hiërarchisch attentienetwerk', 'id': 'Deteksi Stance dengan Rangkaian Perhatian Hierarkis', 'ko': '차원 기반 주의 네트워크 자세 검측', 'de': 'Positionserkennung mit hierarchischem Aufmerksamkeitsnetz', 'tr': 'Hiýerarhiýal hyýasy Aýry bilen tapylmak', 'fa': 'بازرسی استنس با شبکه توجه حفاظت حفاظتی', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa kituo na Mtandao wa Uchunguzi', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Stensil Opdekking met Hierarchical Attention Netwerk', 'sq': 'Ndaloni detektimin me rrjetin e vëmendjes hierarkike', 'hy': 'Հիերարքիկական ուշադրության ցանցի օգնությամբ', 'bn': 'স্ট্যান্স ডিটেকশন হিরার্কিক্যাল মনোযোগ নেটওয়ার্ক দিয়ে', 'bs': 'Detekcija stanica sa hijerarskom mrežom pažnje', 'az': 'Hierarchical Attention Network ilə Stance Detection', 'ca': "Detecció de posts amb una xarxa d'atenció hieràrquica", 'cs': 'Detekce postojů pomocí hierarchické pozornostní sítě', 'et': 'Stantsi tuvastamine hierarhilise tähelepanu võrguga', 'fi': 'Asennon tunnistus hierarkisen huomioverkon avulla', 'jv': 'Clear', 'he': 'זיהוי עמדה עם רשת תשומת לב הייררכית', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'bo': 'Stance Detection with Hierarchical Attention Network', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje stanja s hierarhičnim omrežjem pozornosti'}
{'en': 'Stance detection aims to assign a stance label (for or against) to a post toward a specific target. Recently, there is a growing interest in using neural models to detect stance of documents. Most of these works model the sequence of words to learn document representation. However, much linguistic information, such as polarity and arguments of the document, is correlated with the stance of the document, and can inspire us to explore the stance. Hence, we present a neural model to fully employ various linguistic information to construct the document representation. In addition, since the influences of different linguistic information are different, we propose a hierarchical attention network to weigh the importance of various linguistic information, and learn the mutual attention between the document and the linguistic information. The experimental results on two datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed hierarchical attention neural model.', 'ar': 'يهدف اكتشاف الموقف إلى تعيين ملصق موقف (مع أو ضد) منشور تجاه هدف معين. في الآونة الأخيرة ، هناك اهتمام متزايد باستخدام النماذج العصبية لاكتشاف موقف المستندات. تمثل معظم هذه الأعمال نموذجًا لتسلسل الكلمات لتعلم تمثيل المستندات. ومع ذلك ، فإن الكثير من المعلومات اللغوية ، مثل قطبية الوثيقة وحججها ، ترتبط بموقف الوثيقة ، ويمكن أن تلهمنا لاستكشاف الموقف. ومن ثم ، فإننا نقدم نموذجًا عصبيًا لتوظيف المعلومات اللغوية المختلفة بشكل كامل لبناء تمثيل المستند. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نظرًا لاختلاف تأثيرات المعلومات اللغوية المختلفة ، فإننا نقترح شبكة اهتمام هرمية لتقييم أهمية المعلومات اللغوية المختلفة ، ومعرفة الاهتمام المتبادل بين المستند والمعلومات اللغوية. توضح النتائج التجريبية على مجموعتي بيانات فعالية النموذج العصبي الانتباه الهرمي المقترح.', 'pt': 'A detecção de postura visa atribuir um rótulo de postura (a favor ou contra) a uma postagem em direção a um alvo específico. Recentemente, há um interesse crescente em usar modelos neurais para detectar a postura de documentos. A maioria desses trabalhos modela a sequência de palavras para aprender a representação de documentos. No entanto, muitas informações linguísticas, como polaridade e argumentos do documento, estão correlacionadas com a postura do documento, e podem nos inspirar a explorar a postura. Assim, apresentamos um modelo neural para empregar completamente várias informações linguísticas para construir a representação do documento. Além disso, como as influências das diferentes informações linguísticas são diferentes, propomos uma rede de atenção hierárquica para ponderar a importância das várias informações linguísticas e aprender a atenção mútua entre o documento e a informação linguística. Os resultados experimentais em dois conjuntos de dados demonstram a eficácia do modelo neural de atenção hierárquica proposto.', 'es': 'La detección de postura tiene como objetivo asignar una etiqueta de postura (a favor o en contra) a un poste hacia un objetivo específico. Recientemente, hay un interés creciente en el uso de modelos neuronales para detectar la postura de los documentos. La mayoría de estos trabajos modelan la secuencia de palabras para aprender la representación de documentos. Sin embargo, gran parte de la información lingüística, como la polaridad y los argumentos del documento, está correlacionada con la postura del documento y puede inspirarnos a explorar la postura. Por lo tanto, presentamos un modelo neuronal para emplear toda la información lingüística para construir la representación del documento. Además, dado que las influencias de la información lingüística diferente son diferentes, proponemos una red de atención jerárquica para sopesar la importancia de la información lingüística diversa y aprender la atención mutua entre el documento y la información lingüística. Los resultados experimentales en dos conjuntos de datos demuestran la eficacia del modelo neuronal de atención jerárquico propuesto.', 'fr': "La détection de position vise à attribuer une étiquette de posture (pour ou contre) à un message vers une cible spécifique. Récemment, on s'intéresse de plus en plus à l'utilisation de modèles neuronaux pour détecter la position des documents. La plupart de ces œuvres modélisent la séquence de mots pour apprendre la représentation de documents. Cependant, de nombreuses informations linguistiques, telles que la polarité et les arguments du document, sont corrélées avec la position du document et peuvent nous inciter à explorer cette position. Par conséquent, nous présentons un modèle neuronal qui utilise pleinement diverses informations linguistiques pour construire la représentation du document. En outre, étant donné que les influences des différentes informations linguistiques sont différentes, nous proposons un réseau d'attention hiérarchique pour peser l'importance des différentes informations linguistiques et apprendre l'attention mutuelle entre le document et les informations linguistiques. Les résultats expérimentaux sur deux ensembles de données démontrent l'efficacité du modèle neuronal hiérarchique de l'attention proposé.", 'ja': 'スタンス検出は、特定のターゲットに向かってポストにスタンスラベル（賛否）を割り当てることを目的としています。最近、ニューラルモデルを使用して文書のスタンスを検出することへの関心が高まっています。これらの作品のほとんどは、文書表現を学ぶために単語の配列をモデル化しています。しかし、文書の極性や議論などの多くの言語情報は、文書のスタンスと相関しており、スタンスを探求するきっかけになる可能性があります。したがって、文書表現を構築するために様々な言語情報を完全に利用するためのニューラルモデルを提示する。また、さまざまな言語情報の影響が異なることから、様々な言語情報の重要性を重視し、文書と言語情報の相互注意を学ぶための階層的注意喚起ネットワークを提案している。2つのデータセットの実験結果は、提案された階層的注意ニューラルモデルの有効性を示している。', 'zh': '姿势检指为特定帖分标(持非)。 近者,人益注用神经模形以检文档势。 其文多建模单词序,以学文档。 然多言语信息,如极性论点,与立场相关,且可激劝探索。 故设一神经之形,以尽言语之文档。 异言异息者,各举其分网络以权其要,而习文档语言信息之相关。 二集实验验所上层次注意神经模形之有效性。', 'hi': 'रुख का पता लगाने का उद्देश्य एक विशिष्ट लक्ष्य की ओर एक पोस्ट के लिए एक रुख लेबल (के लिए या उसके खिलाफ) असाइन करना है। हाल ही में, दस्तावेजों के रुख का पता लगाने के लिए तंत्रिका मॉडल का उपयोग करने में बढ़ती रुचि है। इनमें से अधिकांश कार्य दस्तावेज़ प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए शब्दों के अनुक्रम को मॉडल करते हैं। हालांकि, बहुत अधिक भाषाई जानकारी, जैसे कि ध्रुवीयता और दस्तावेज़ के तर्क, दस्तावेज़ के रुख के साथ सहसंबद्ध है, और हमें रुख का पता लगाने के लिए प्रेरित कर सकते हैं। इसलिए, हम दस्तावेज़ प्रतिनिधित्व के निर्माण के लिए विभिन्न भाषाई जानकारी को पूरी तरह से नियोजित करने के लिए एक तंत्रिका मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं। इसके अलावा, चूंकि विभिन्न भाषाई जानकारी के प्रभाव अलग-अलग हैं, इसलिए हम विभिन्न भाषाई जानकारी के महत्व को तौलने के लिए एक पदानुक्रमित ध्यान नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और दस्तावेज़ और भाषाई जानकारी के बीच पारस्परिक ध्यान सीखते हैं। दो डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम प्रस्तावित पदानुक्रमित ध्यान तंत्रिका मॉडल की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Обнаружение положения направлено на присвоение метки положения (за или против) посту по отношению к конкретной цели. В последнее время растет интерес к использованию нейронных моделей для обнаружения положения документов. Большинство из этих работ моделируют последовательность слов для изучения представления документов. Однако большая часть лингвистической информации, такой как полярность и аргументы документа, коррелирует с позицией документа и может вдохновить нас на изучение позиции. Следовательно, мы представляем нейронную модель, чтобы в полной мере использовать различную лингвистическую информацию для построения представления документа. Кроме того, поскольку влияния различной лингвистической информации различны, мы предлагаем иерархическую сеть внимания, чтобы взвесить важность различной лингвистической информации, и узнать взаимное внимание между документом и лингвистической информацией. Экспериментальные результаты по двум наборам данных демонстрируют эффективность предлагаемой иерархической нейронной модели внимания.', 'ga': 'Tá sé mar aidhm ag braite seasaimh lipéad seasaimh (ar son nó in aghaidh) a shannadh do phostáil i dtreo sprice sonrach. Le déanaí, tá suim ag méadú i múnlaí néaracha a úsáid chun seasamh na ndoiciméad a bhrath. Múnlaíonn an chuid is mó de na saothair seo seicheamh na bhfocal chun léiriú doiciméad a fhoghlaim. Mar sin féin, tá go leor eolais teangeolaíoch, cosúil le polaraíocht agus argóintí an doiciméid, comhghaolmhar le seasamh an doiciméid, agus is féidir leis sinn a spreagadh chun an seasamh a iniúchadh. Mar sin, cuirimid múnla néarúil i láthair chun eolas teanga éagsúil a úsáid go hiomlán chun léiriú an doiciméid a chruthú. Ina theannta sin, ós rud é go bhfuil tionchair na faisnéise teangeolaíochta éagsúla difriúil, molaimid gréasán ordlathach airde chun an tábhacht a bhaineann le faisnéis theangeolaíoch éagsúla a mheas, agus chun an aird frithpháirteach idir an doiciméad agus an fhaisnéis theangeolaíoch a fhoghlaim. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha ar dhá thacar sonraí éifeachtacht an mhúnla ordlathach aire néarúil atá beartaithe.', 'hu': 'Az álláspont felismerése célja, hogy egy álláspont címkét (mellette vagy ellene) rendeljen hozzá egy adott célponthoz. A közelmúltban egyre nagyobb az érdeklődés iránt, hogy neurális modelleket használjanak a dokumentumok álláspontjának felismerésére. A legtöbb mű modellezi a szavak sorrendjét, hogy megtanulják a dokumentumok ábrázolását. Azonban sok nyelvi információ, mint például a dokumentum polaritása és érvei, korrelálódik a dokumentum álláspontjával, és inspirálhat bennünket az álláspont feltárására. Ezért bemutatunk egy neurális modellt, amely teljes mértékben felhasználja a különböző nyelvi információkat a dokumentumok ábrázolásához. Ezenkívül, mivel a különböző nyelvi információk hatásai eltérőek, hierarchikus figyelemhálózatot javasolunk a különböző nyelvi információk fontosságának mérlegelésére, valamint a dokumentum és a nyelvi információ közötti kölcsönös figyelem megismerésére. Két adathalmaz kísérleti eredményei a javasolt hierarchikus figyelem neurális modell hatékonyságát mutatják.', 'ka': 'სტანსის განსახულება მიზეზიან, რომ სტანსიის ლებლის (განსახულებლად ან განსახულებლად) პოსტის სპექტიკური მიზეზით. მიმდინარე დოკუმენტების სტაციაციისთვის ნეიროლური მოდელების გამოყენება უფრო დიდი ინტერესტია. ეს მნიშვნელობა მუშაობს მოდელის სიტყვების წერტილი, რომელიც დოკუმენტის გამოსახულებას ვისწავლოთ. მაგრამ, ბევრი ლენდუმენტიკური ინფორმაცია, როგორც დოკუმენტის პოლარიტი და არგორმენტები, კომპუმენტის სტანციაციისთვის დაკავშირებულია, და შეგვიძლია ჩვენ გავიგ ამიტომ, ჩვენ მივიღეთ ნეიროლური მოდელი, რომელიც ყველაფერად გამოყენებს განსხვავებული ენგუმისტიკური ინფორმაციას, რომელიც კონფიგურაციას და დამატებით, რადგან განსხვავებული ინფორმაციის გავლენები განსხვავებულია, ჩვენ თერაქტიკალური ინფორმაციის ქსელის წინასწორება, რომ განსხვავებული ინფორმაციის მნიშვნელობას გავამუშავოთ და დოკუმენტის და ინ ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ორი მონაცემების შესახებ ექსპერიმენტიური მოდულის ეფექტიურობა.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση στάσεων στοχεύει στην εκχώρηση μιας ετικέτας στάσης (υπέρ ή κατά) σε μια θέση προς έναν συγκεκριμένο στόχο. Πρόσφατα, υπάρχει ένα αυξανόμενο ενδιαφέρον για τη χρήση νευρωνικών μοντέλων για τον εντοπισμό της στάσης των εγγράφων. Τα περισσότερα από αυτά τα έργα μοντελούν την ακολουθία λέξεων για να μάθουν αναπαράσταση εγγράφων. Ωστόσο, πολλές γλωσσικές πληροφορίες, όπως η πολικότητα και τα επιχειρήματα του εγγράφου, συσχετίζονται με τη στάση του εγγράφου και μπορούν να μας εμπνεύσουν να εξερευνήσουμε τη στάση του. Ως εκ τούτου, παρουσιάζουμε ένα νευρωνικό μοντέλο που χρησιμοποιεί πλήρως διάφορες γλωσσικές πληροφορίες για την κατασκευή της αναπαράστασης του εγγράφου. Επιπλέον, δεδομένου ότι οι επιρροές των διαφορετικών γλωσσικών πληροφοριών είναι διαφορετικές, προτείνουμε ένα ιεραρχικό δίκτυο προσοχής για να σταθμίσει τη σημασία των διαφόρων γλωσσικών πληροφοριών και να μάθει την αμοιβαία προσοχή μεταξύ του εγγράφου και των γλωσσικών πληροφοριών. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα του προτεινόμενου ιεραρχικού νευρικού μοντέλου προσοχής.', 'it': "Il rilevamento della posizione mira ad assegnare un'etichetta di posizione (a favore o contro) a un post verso un target specifico. Recentemente, c'è un crescente interesse nell'utilizzare modelli neurali per rilevare la posizione dei documenti. La maggior parte di queste opere modella la sequenza delle parole per imparare la rappresentazione del documento. Tuttavia, molte informazioni linguistiche, come la polarità e gli argomenti del documento, sono correlate con la posizione del documento, e possono ispirarci ad esplorare la posizione. Quindi, presentiamo un modello neurale per utilizzare pienamente varie informazioni linguistiche per costruire la rappresentazione del documento. Inoltre, poiché le influenze delle diverse informazioni linguistiche sono diverse, proponiamo una rete di attenzione gerarchica per valutare l'importanza delle varie informazioni linguistiche e imparare l'attenzione reciproca tra il documento e l'informazione linguistica. I risultati sperimentali su due dataset dimostrano l'efficacia del modello neurale di attenzione gerarchica proposto.", 'kk': 'Станс анықтау мақсатында, нақты мақсаттың жарлығына (қарсы не қарсы) жарлығын таңдау үшін. Жуырда, құжаттардың орналасуын анықтау үшін невралдық моделдерді қолдану үшін көптеген қызық бар. Олардың көпшілігі құжатты көрсетуді оқыту үшін сөздер ретін үлгілейді. Бірақ, құжаттың поляриялығы мен аргументтері секілді лингвистикалық мәліметі құжаттың қасиетіне сәйкес келеді және қасиетті зерттеу үшін бізге көмектесе алады. Сондықтан біз құжатты түсіндіру үшін түрлі лингвистикалық мәліметті толық қолдану үшін невралдық моделін таңдаймыз. Қосымша, әртүрлі лингвистикалық мәліметтердің нәрселері әртүрлі емес себебі, біз әртүрлі лингвистикалық мәліметтердің маңыздылығын тең ету және құжаттың мен лингвистикалық мәліметтерінің арасындағы Екі деректер қорларының тәжірибелі нәтижелері келтірілген иерархикалық нақышты невралдық моделінің ефективнігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Stebėsenos nustatymo tikslas – skirti pozicijos ženklą (už arba prieš) pareigūnui tam tikro tikslo link. Pastaruoju metu vis labiau suinteresuota naudoti nervinius modelius dokumentų pozicijai nustatyti. Dauguma šių darbų modeliuoja žodžių seką, kad būtų išmokta pateikti dokumentus. Tačiau daug kalbinės informacijos, pvz., dokumento poliarumo ir argumentų, yra susijusių su dokumento pozicija ir gali įkvėpti mus išnagrinėti poziciją. Taigi mes pristatysime nervinį model į, kuris visiškai naudoja įvairią kalbinę informaciją dokumentų atstovavimui sukurti. Be to, kadangi skirtingos kalbinės informacijos įtaka skiriasi, siūlome hierarchinį dėmesio tinklą, kuris pasveria įvairios kalbinės informacijos svarbą ir mokytųsi abipusio dokumento ir kalbinės informacijos dėmesio. Dviejų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo siūlomo hierarchinio dėmesio neurologinio modelio veiksmingumą.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на статусот има за цел да додели ознака на статусот (за или против) на пост кон специфична мета. Неодамна, постои растечки интерес за употреба на нервни модели за детектирање на ставот на документите. Повеќето од овие дела ја моделираат секвенцијата на зборови за да се научи претставување на документите. Сепак, многу јазични информации, како што се поларитетот и аргументите на документот, се поврзани со ставот на документот и може да не инспирира да го истражуваме ставот. Затоа претставуваме нервен модел за целосно употребување на различни јазички информации за конструкција на претставувањето на документот. Покрај тоа, бидејќи влијанијата на различните јазички информации се различни, предложуваме хиерархиска мрежа на внимание за тежина на важноста на различните јазички информации и за научување на взаемното внимание помеѓу документот и јазичките информации. Експерименталните резултати на двата податоци ја покажуваат ефикасноста на предложениот хиерархички модел на нервно внимание.', 'ml': 'സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുവാന്\u200d ഉദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ നേരെ സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d ലേബറ്റ് ന അടുത്തിടെ രേഖകളുടെ സ്ഥിതി കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വളരെ താല്പര്യമുണ്ട്. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മിക്കവും രേഖയുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d പഠിക്കാനുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ സ്ഥ എന്നാലും, രേഖയുടെ അശുദ്ധീകരണവും വാദ്യാഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പോലെയാണ്, രേഖയുടെ സ്ഥിതിയുമായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നത്, ഈ സ്ഥിതിയെ  അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d രേഖയുടെ പ്രതിനിധി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷയിലെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും പണിയാന്\u200d ഒരു പു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായിരിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷക വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d തൂക്കുവാന്\u200d വേറൊരു  രണ്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളിലെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഹിയറാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധയുടെ പ്രഭാവം പ്രദര', 'mt': 'L-iskoperta tal-pożizzjoni għandha l-għan li tassenja tikketta tal-pożizzjoni (għal jew kontra) lil post lejn mira speċifika. Dan l-a ħħar, hemm interess dejjem jikber fl-użu ta’ mudelli newrali biex jinstabu l-pożizzjoni tad-dokumenti. Ħafna minn dawn ix-xogħlijiet jimmudellaw is-sekwenza ta’ kliem biex jitgħallmu r-rappreżentazzjoni tad-dokumenti. Madankollu, ħafna informazzjoni lingwistika, bħall-polarità u l-argumenti tad-dokument, hija korrelata mal-pożizzjoni tad-dokument, u tista’ tispiralna biex nesploraw il-pożizzjoni. Għalhekk, qed nippreżentaw mudell newrali biex nimpjegaw bis-sħiħ informazzjoni lingwistika varja biex nibnu r-rappreżentanza tad-dokument. Barra minn hekk, peress li l-influwenzi ta’ informazzjoni lingwistika differenti huma differenti, qed nipproponu netwerk ta’ attenzjoni ġerarkika li jiżen l-importanza ta’ informazzjoni lingwistika varja, u jitgħallmu l-attenzjoni reċiproka bejn id-dokument u l-informazzjoni lingwistika. Ir-riżultati sperimentali fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta juru l-effettività tal-mudell newrali ta’ attenzjoni ġerarkika propost.', 'mn': 'Станс нээлтийн зорилго нь тодорхой зорилго руу (эсвэл эсрэг) байр суурь жагсаалтыг тавих зорилго юм. Сүүлийн үед сэтгэл зүйн загварыг ашиглан баримтын байр суурь байдлыг олж мэдэхэд их сонирхолтой байна. Үүний ихэнх нь баримт дүрслэлийг сурах үг дарааллын дарааллыг загвар өгдөг. Гэхдээ хэлний мэдээлэл, баримтын загвар, аргументууд, баримтын нөхцөл байдалтай холбогдож, бидэнд нөхцөл байдлыг судлах боломжтой болгодог. Тиймээс бид мэдрэлийн загварыг баримтын үзүүлэлтийг бүрэн ашиглах төрлийн хэлний мэдээллийг ашиглаж байна. Түүнчлэн, өөр хэлний мэдээллийн нөлөөлөл өөр болохоор бид хэлний мэдээллийн чухал ач холбогдолтой, баримт болон хэлний мэдээллийн хоорондын харилцааны анхаарлыг суралцахын тулд хичээл анхаарлын сүлжээ суралцдаг. Хоёр өгөгдлийн сан дээрх туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн дүрсийн мэдрэлийн сэтгэл зүйн загварын үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie stanu ma na celu przypisanie etykiety pozycji (za lub przeciwko) do postu w kierunku określonego celu. Ostatnio wzrasta zainteresowanie wykorzystaniem modeli neuronowych do wykrywania stanowiska dokumentów. Większość z tych prac modeluje sekwencję słów do nauki reprezentacji dokumentu. Jednak wiele informacji językowych, takich jak polaryzacja i argumenty dokumentu, jest skorelowana ze stanowiskiem dokumentu i może zainspirować nas do badania tego stanowiska. W związku z tym przedstawiamy model neuronowy, który w pełni wykorzystuje różne informacje językowe do konstruowania reprezentacji dokumentu. Ponadto, ponieważ wpływy różnych informacji językowych są różne, proponujemy hierarchiczną sieć uwagi, aby zważyć znaczenie różnych informacji językowych i uczyć się wzajemnej uwagi między dokumentem a informacją językową. Wyniki eksperymentalne na dwóch zbiorach danych pokazują skuteczność proponowanego hierarchicznego modelu neuronowego uwagi.', 'ro': 'Detectarea stării își propune să atribuie o etichetă de poziție (pentru sau împotriva) unui post către o anumită țintă. Recent, există un interes tot mai mare în utilizarea modelelor neuronale pentru a detecta poziția documentelor. Cele mai multe dintre aceste lucrări modelează secvența de cuvinte pentru a învăța reprezentarea documentelor. Cu toate acestea, multe informații lingvistice, cum ar fi polaritatea și argumentele documentului, sunt corelate cu poziția documentului și ne pot inspira să explorăm poziția. Prin urmare, prezentăm un model neural pentru a utiliza pe deplin diferite informații lingvistice pentru a construi reprezentarea documentului. În plus, deoarece influențele diferitelor informații lingvistice sunt diferite, propunem o rețea de atenție ierarhică pentru a cântări importanța diferitelor informații lingvistice și pentru a învăța atenția reciprocă dintre document și informația lingvistică. Rezultatele experimentale pe două seturi de date demonstrează eficacitatea modelului neural de atenție ierarhică propus.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av ståande mål er å tilgje ein stasjonsmerkelapp (for eller mot) til ei post mot eit spesifikke mål. Nyleg er det eit økende interesse på å bruka neuralmodeller for å finna stasjon på dokument. Dei fleste av desse funksjonane arbeider på sekvensen av ord som skal lærast dokumentrepresentasjonen. Men mykje lingviske informasjon, som polaritet og argumenter i dokumentet, er korrelatert med stasjonen til dokumentet, og kan inspirere oss til å utforske stasjonen. Derfor presenterer vi eit neuralmodell for å fullstendig bruka ulike lingviske informasjon for å konstruere dokumentrepresentasjonen. I tillegg, sidan påvirkninga av ulike lingviske informasjon er ulike, foreslår vi eit hierarkisk oppmerksnettverk for å vekke viktigheten av ulike lingviske informasjon, og lære den samme oppmerksomheten mellom dokumentet og den lingviske informasjonen. Eksperimentale resultatene på to datasett viser effektiviteten av den foreslåde hierarkiske oppmerksområdet i neuralmodellen.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje stanice ima cilj da dodaje etiketu stanja (za ili protiv) na postu ka određenoj meti. Nedavno postoji veći interes za upotrebu neuralnih modela kako bi otkrili stav dokumenta. Većina ovih rada modeluje sekvencu reèi da nauèi zastupanje dokumenta. Međutim, mnogo jezičkih informacija, poput polarnosti i argumentacija dokumenta, povezuje se sa stavom dokumenta, i može nas inspirirati da istražimo stav. Stoga predstavljamo neuralni model da potpuno upotrebi različite jezičke informacije kako bi izgradili predstavu dokumenta. Osim toga, pošto su uticaji različitih jezičkih informacija različitih, predlažemo hijerarhičku pažnju mrežu da teži važnost različitih jezičkih informacija i naučimo zajedničku pažnju između dokumenta i jezičkih informacija. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva podataka pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog hijerarhičkog neuralnog modela pažnje.', 'ms': 'Pengesanan kedudukan bermaksud untuk menyerahkan label kedudukan (untuk atau menentang) ke pos menuju sasaran tertentu. Baru-baru ini, ada kepentingan semakin besar dalam menggunakan model saraf untuk mengesan kedudukan dokumen. Kebanyakan kerja ini memmodelkan urutan perkataan untuk belajar mewakili dokumen. Namun, banyak maklumat bahasa, seperti polariti dan argumen dokumen, berkorrelasi dengan kedudukan dokumen, dan boleh menginspirasi kita untuk mengeksplorasi kedudukan. Oleh itu, kita memperkenalkan model saraf untuk menggunakan pelbagai maklumat bahasa untuk membina perwakilan dokumen. Selain itu, kerana pengaruh maklumat bahasa yang berbeza berbeza, kami cadangkan rangkaian perhatian hierarkis untuk menimbang kepentingan maklumat bahasa berbeza, dan belajar perhatian antara dokumen dan maklumat bahasa. Keputusan percubaan pada dua set data menunjukkan keefektivitas model saraf perhatian hierarkis yang diusulkan.', 'so': 'Baaritaanka shaqaalaha waxaa loola jeedaa in boostada lagu sameeyo calaamada joogista (ama ka geesta) oo loogu jeedo goal gaar ah. Hadii u dhowaad waxaa jirta danaha korsocota isticmaalka modelalka neurada si uu u ogaado xaaladda dukumentiyada. Inta badan waxey sameynayaan tusaale ahaan hadalka loo barto muuqashada dukumentiga. Si kastaba ha ahaatee macluumaad badan oo luuqadaha ah, tusaale ahaan baaritaanta iyo dooda dukumentiga, waxay la xiriiran yihiin xaalada dukumentiga, waxayna noogu waxyoon kartaa inaan baaraano xaaladda. Sidaas darteed waxaynu soo bandhignaa model neurada ah si aan u sameyno macluumaad luuqad kala duduwan si aan u dhisno muuqashada dukumentiga. Sida darteed saamaynta macluumaadka luuqadaha kala duwan ee ay saameyn ku yeelan yihiin, waxaynu talo bixinaynaa shabakad la talin ah si aan u miisaaminayno muhiimka macluumaadka luuqadaha kala duduwan, waxaana baranaynaa iskuulka labaad ee u dhexeeya dukumentiga iyo macluumaadka luuqadaha. Midhaha tijaabada ee labada takhasuska lagu sameeyo waxay muujiyaan effektada sameynta daryeelka neurada ee la soo jeeday.', 'si': 'ස්ටෑන්ස් හොයාගන්න අදහස් කරනවා විශේෂ ලක්ෂණයක් වෙනුවෙන් පොස්ට් එකක් ලබාගන්න. අලුත් වෙලාවට, විශේෂ විශ්වාසයක් තියෙන්නේ න්\u200dයූරල් මොඩේල් එක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න. මේ ගොඩක් වැඩේ වැඩ කරනවා වචන පරීක්ෂණය විසින් විසින් විසින් විසින් ලබාගන්න. නමුත්, ගොඩක් භාෂාවික තොරතුරු හරියට, ලිපිණියේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය සහ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය, ලිපිණියේ ස්ථානය සමග සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා, ඒ ඉතින්, අපි විවිධ භාෂාත්මක තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණයෙන් විවිධ භාෂාත්මක තොරතුරු සිද්ධානය කරන්න ඒ වගේම, වෙනස් භාෂාවික තොරතුරු ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් විදියට, අපි භාෂාවික තොරතුරු ගැන විවිධ භාෂාවික තොරතුරු ගැන අවශ්\u200dයතා දත්ත සෙට් දෙකක් තියෙන පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ අවධානයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ක', 'sv': 'Stance Detection syftar till att tilldela en ståndetikett (för eller emot) till ett inlägg mot ett specifikt mål. Nyligen finns det ett växande intresse för att använda neurala modeller för att upptäcka inställning av dokument. De flesta av dessa verk modellerar ordsekvensen för att lära sig dokumentrepresentation. Men mycket språklig information, såsom polaritet och argument i dokumentet, korreleras med ståndpunkten i dokumentet, och kan inspirera oss att utforska ståndpunkten. Därför presenterar vi en neural modell för att fullt ut använda olika språklig information för att konstruera dokumentrepresentationen. Eftersom influenserna av olika språkliga uppgifter är olika föreslår vi dessutom ett hierarkiskt uppmärksamhetsnätverk för att väga vikten av olika språkliga uppgifter och lära sig den ömsesidiga uppmärksamheten mellan dokumentet och den språkliga informationen. De experimentella resultaten på två datauppsättningar visar effektiviteten hos den föreslagna hierarkiska uppmärksamhetsnerala modellen.', 'ta': 'நிலை கண்டுபிடி சமீபத்தில், ஆவணங்களின் நிலையை கண்டறிவதற்கு நெய்யூரி மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்தி அதிகரிக்க ஆர்வம் உள்ளது. இவ்விரண்டில் பெரும்பாலான வார்த்தைகளின் வரிசையில் ஆவண பிரதிநிதியை கற்றுக் கொள்ள முடியும ஆயினும், அதிகமான மொழி தகவல், அதாவது தீவிரம் மற்றும் ஆவணத்தின் வார்ப்புகள், ஆவணத்தின் நிலையில் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, மற்றும் நிலையை தேடு அதனால், நாம் ஒரு புதிய மாதிரியை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் முழுமையாக வேலை செய்ய வேண்டிய மொழிமொழியில் தகவலை உருவாக்க மேலும், வேறு மொழி தகவலின் விளைவுகள் மாறுபட்டிருக்கும் போது, நாம் மொழிமாற்றம் தகவலின் முக்கியமைப்பை எடுக்க முன்னோடுகிறோம், மற்றும் ஆவணத்தின் மொ இரண்டு தரவுத்தளங்களின் சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'Stance detection aims to assign a stance label (for or against) to a post to a specific target. اچھے سے، دلیلیوں کی موقعیت کو پہچان کرنے کے لئے نیورال موڈل استعمال کرنے کے لئے بہت زیادہ علاقہ ہے. ان میں سے اکثر کلمات کی سفارش کے مطابق مدل کر رہے ہیں اگرچہ بہت سی زبان کی معلومات، جیسے دفتر کی قسمت اور بحث، دفتر کی موقعیت سے تعلق ہے، اور ہمیں اس موقعیت کا تحقیق کرنے کے لئے الزام دے سکتا ہے. لہٰذا ہم نے ایک نئورل موڈل کو دکھایا کہ مختلف زبان کی معلومات کو کامل استعمال کرے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، جس طرح مختلف زبان شناسی معلومات کے اثرات مختلف ہیں، ہم ایک حکومت توجہ نیٹورک کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ مختلف زبان شناسی معلومات کی اثرات توجہ کریں، اور دفتر اور زبان شناسی معلومات کے درمیان ایک دوسرے کی توجہ سیکھیں. دو ڈاٹ سٹ پر آزمائش کا نتیجہ نشان دیتا ہے کہ پیش کیا گیا ہوا حیراتیکل توجه کی نیورال موڈل کی اثبات ہے.', 'uz': "Name Yaqinda, hujjatning holatini aniqlash uchun neyrol modellari yordamida foydalanadi. Buning ko'pchiligi hujjatning representini o'rganish uchun so'zlarning chegarasi modeli. Lekin, ko'p tillar haqida, huddi hujjatning polarilik va argumentlari, hujjatning stansiyasi bilan bog'liq, va bizga holatni qidirish imkoniyatini imkoniyat beradi. Shunday qilib, biz hujjatning representini yaratish uchun har xil tilni butunlay ishlab chiqarish uchun neyrol modelini hosil qilamiz. In addition, since the influences of different linguistic information are different, we propose a hierarchical attention network to weigh the importance of various linguistic information, and learn the mutual attention between the document and the linguistic information.  Ikki maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajriba natijalari taʼminlov qilingan hierarchik foydalanuvchi neyrol modelini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Bộ phát hiện Stance định gán một nhãn lập (cho hay chống) vào một cột về một mục tiêu cụ thể. Gần đây, có một mối quan tâm lớn đến việc sử dụng các mô hình thần kinh để phát hiện lập trường tài liệu. Hầu hết các công trình này thiết lập các từ để học cách đại diện tài liệu. Tuy nhiên, rất nhiều thông tin ngôn ngữ, như các quan điểm khác nhau trong tài liệu, được liên kết với quan điểm của tài liệu, và có thể thúc đẩy chúng ta khám phá quan điểm. Do đó, chúng tôi đưa ra một mô hình thần kinh để sử dụng đầy đủ các thông tin ngôn ngữ để xây dựng văn bản đại diện. Hơn nữa, bởi vì ảnh hưởng của các thông tin ngôn ngữ khác nhau khác nhau, chúng tôi đề nghị một mạng lưới chú ý cấp bậc để cân nhắc tầm quan trọng của các thông tin ngôn ngữ khác nhau, và học được sự quan tâm lẫn nhau giữa tài liệu và thông tin ngôn ngữ. Các kết quả thử nghiệm trên hai tập tin cho thấy hiệu quả của mô hình thần kinh chú phổ biến phân cấp trên.', 'bg': 'Откриването на позиции цели да присвои етикет на позицията (за или против) на пост към конкретна цел. Напоследък нараства интересът към използването на невронни модели за откриване на позицията на документите. Повечето от тези работи моделират последователността от думи, за да научат представяне на документи. Въпреки това, много езикова информация, като полярност и аргументи на документа, е свързана с позицията на документа и може да ни вдъхнови да проучим позицията. Ето защо представяме невронен модел, който да използва напълно различна лингвистична информация за изграждането на документалното представяне. Освен това, тъй като влиянието на различната езикова информация е различно, предлагаме йерархична мрежа за внимание, която да претегля значението на различната езикова информация и да научи взаимното внимание между документа и езиковата информация. Експерименталните резултати върху два набора от данни демонстрират ефективността на предложения йерархичен неврален модел на вниманието.', 'nl': 'Standdetectie heeft als doel een standetiket (voor of tegen) toe te wijzen aan een post richting een specifiek doel. De laatste tijd is er een groeiende interesse in het gebruik van neurale modellen om standpunten van documenten te detecteren. De meeste van deze werken modelleren de volgorde van woorden om document representatie te leren. Veel taalkundige informatie, zoals polariteit en argumenten van het document, is echter gecorreleerd met de houding van het document, en kan ons inspireren om het standpunt te verkennen. Daarom presenteren we een neuraal model om verschillende linguïstische informatie volledig te gebruiken om de documentrepresentatie te construeren. Bovendien, omdat de invloeden van verschillende taalkundige informatie verschillend zijn, stellen we een hiërarchisch aandachtsnetwerk voor om het belang van verschillende taalkundige informatie te wegen en de wederzijdse aandacht tussen het document en de taalkundige informatie te leren. De experimentele resultaten op twee datasets tonen de effectiviteit van het voorgestelde hiërarchische aandachtsneuroel model aan.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje stanice cilja je dodijeliti etiketu stanja (za ili protiv) na mjesto ka određenoj cilji. Nedavno postoji veći interes za upotrebu neuralnih modela kako bi otkrili stav dokumenta. Većina ovih rada modelira sekvencu riječi za učenje zastupanja dokumenta. Međutim, mnogo jezičkih informacija, poput polarnosti i argumenata dokumenta, povezuje se s stavom dokumenta i može nas inspirirati da istražimo stav. Stoga predstavljamo neuralni model da potpuno upotrebi različite jezičke informacije kako bi izgradili zastupanje dokumenta. Osim toga, pošto su utjecaje različitih jezičkih informacija različitih, predlažemo hijerarhičku pažnju mrežu kako bi težili važnost različitih jezičkih informacija i naučili zajedničku pažnju između dokumenta i jezičkih informacija. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva podataka pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog hijerarhičkog neuronskog modela pažnje.', 'da': 'Stance detektion har til formål at tildele en stilling etiket (for eller imod) til et indlæg mod et bestemt mål. For nylig er der en stigende interesse i at bruge neurale modeller til at detektere stilling af dokumenter. De fleste af disse værker modellerer ordsekvensen for at lære dokumentrepræsentation. Imidlertid er meget sproglig information, såsom polaritet og argumenter i dokumentet, korreleret med dokumentets holdning, og kan inspirere os til at undersøge holdningen. Derfor præsenterer vi en neural model til fuldt ud at anvende forskellige sproglige oplysninger til at konstruere dokumentrepræsentationen. Da påvirkningerne af forskellige sproglige oplysninger er forskellige, foreslår vi desuden et hierarkisk opmærksomhedsnetværk for at afveje vigtigheden af forskellige sproglige oplysninger og lære den gensidige opmærksomhed mellem dokumentet og de sproglige oplysninger. De eksperimentelle resultater på to datasæt viser effektiviteten af den foreslåede hierarkiske opmærksomheds neurale model.', 'de': 'Die Positionserkennung zielt darauf ab, einem Post gegenüber einem bestimmten Ziel eine Positionsbezeichnung (für oder gegen) zuzuweisen. In letzter Zeit wächst das Interesse an neuronalen Modellen, um die Position von Dokumenten zu erkennen. Die meisten dieser Arbeiten modellieren die Reihenfolge von Wörtern, um Dokumentdarstellung zu lernen. Viele sprachliche Informationen, wie Polarität und Argumente des Dokuments, korrelieren jedoch mit der Haltung des Dokuments und können uns dazu inspirieren, diese Haltung zu erforschen. Daher stellen wir ein neuronales Modell vor, mit dem verschiedene linguistische Informationen vollständig verwendet werden können, um die Dokumentdarstellung zu konstruieren. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir ein hierarchisches Aufmerksamkeitsnetzwerk vor, um die Bedeutung verschiedener sprachlicher Informationen abzuwägen und die gegenseitige Aufmerksamkeit zwischen Dokument und sprachlicher Information zu erlernen. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse an zwei Datensätzen zeigen die Wirksamkeit des vorgeschlagenen hierarchischen Aufmerksamkeitsneuronalen Modells.', 'id': 'Deteksi posisi bermaksud untuk menyerahkan label posisi (untuk atau melawan) ke pos menuju target khusus. Baru-baru ini, ada kepentingan semakin besar dalam menggunakan model saraf untuk mendeteksi posisi dokumen. Kebanyakan dari pekerjaan ini model urutan kata untuk belajar representation dokumen. Namun, banyak informasi bahasa, seperti polaritas dan argumen dokumen, terkait dengan posisi dokumen, dan dapat menginspirasi kita untuk mengeksplorasi posisi. Oleh karena itu, kami mempersembahkan model saraf untuk menggunakan sepenuhnya berbagai informasi bahasa untuk membangun representation dokumen. Selain itu, karena pengaruh dari informasi bahasa berbeda berbeda, kami mengusulkan jaringan perhatian hierarkis untuk menimbang penting dari berbagai informasi bahasa, dan belajar perhatian antara dokumen dan informasi bahasa. The experimental results on two datasets demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed hierarchical attention neural model.', 'fa': 'شناسایی استنس هدف دارد که یک نقاشی موقعیت (برای یا مقابل) را به یک نقاشی به سمت هدف خاص واگذارد. اخیراً علاقه\u200cای به استفاده از مدل\u200cهای عصبی برای شناسایی وضعیت مدارک وجود دارد. بیشتر این کار را مدل کلمات برای یاد گرفتن نمایش سند می\u200cکند. با این حال، اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی زیادی مثل قطعیت و ارائه\u200cهای سند، با وضعیت سند ارتباط دارد، و می\u200cتواند به ما الهام دهد تا این وضعیت را تحقیق کنیم. بنابراین، ما یک مدل عصبی را برای کامل استفاده از اطلاعات زبان\u200cشناسی برای ساختن نمایش سند پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. در addition, since the effects of different linguistic information are different, we propose a hierarchical attention network to weigh the importance of various linguistic information, and learn the mutual attention between the document and the linguistic information. نتایج آزمایشی در دو مجموعه داده نشان می دهد که موثرت مدل عصبی پیشنهاد توجه قانونی را نشان می دهد.', 'sw': 'Ugunduzi wa msimamo unalenga kuweka alama ya msimamo (kwa au dhidi) kwenye makala inayoelekea lengo fulani. Hivi karibuni, kuna maslahi yanayoendelea kutumia mifano ya ubongo ili kutambua hali ya nyaraka. Wengi wa hawa wanafanya kazi ni mtindo wa maneno ya kujifunza uwakilishi wa nyaraka. Hata hivyo, taarifa nyingi za lugha, kama vile uchafuzi na hoja za nyaraka, inaunganishwa na msimamo wa nyaraka, na inaweza kutuhamasisha kutafuta msimamo huo. Kwa hiyo, tunaweka mfano wa ubongo wa kutumia taarifa mbalimbali za lugha ili kutengeneza uwakilishi wa waraka. Zaidi ya hayo, kwa kuwa madhara ya taarifa tofauti za lugha tofauti ni tofauti, tunapendekeza mtandao wa uangalizi wa ufuatiliaji wa habari za lugha mbalimbali, na kujifunza hisia za moja kwa moja kati ya nyaraka na taarifa za lugha. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti mbili za takwimu yanaonyesha ufanisi wa muundo wa ufuatiliaji wa ubongo wa ubongo wa ubunifu unaopendekezwa.', 'af': "Stance-opdekking doel om 'n staatsetiket (vir of teen) aan' n pos na' n spesifieke doel te toewys. Onlangs is daar 'n groei belang in die gebruik van neurale modele om die staanse van dokumente te beskry. Die meeste van hierdie werk model die volgorde van woorde om dokument voorstelling te leer. Maar baie lingwisiese inligting, soos polariteit en argumente van die dokument, is vergelyk met die staanse van die dokument, en kan ons inspireer om die staanse te uitvoer. Daarom stel ons 'n neurale model om verskillende lingwisiese inligting te gebruik om die dokument voorstelling te konstrukteer. In addition, since the influences of different linguistic information are different, we propose a hierarchical attention network to weigh the importance of various linguistic information, and learn the mutual attention between the document and the linguistic information. Die eksperimentale resultate op twee datastelle vertoon die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde hierarkies aandag neurale model.", 'sq': 'Zbulimi i qëndrimeve synon të caktojë një etiketë qëndrimi (për apo kundër) në një post drejt një objektivi të caktuar. Kohët e fundit, ka një interes në rritje në përdorimin e modeleve neuronale për të zbuluar qëndrimin e dokumenteve. Shumica e këtyre punëve modelojnë sekuencën e fjalëve për të mësuar përfaqësimin e dokumenteve. Megjithatë, shumë informacione gjuhësore, të tilla si polariteti dhe argumentet e dokumentit, janë të lidhura me qëndrimin e dokumentit dhe mund të na frymëzojë të eksplorojmë qëndrimin. Kështu, ne paraqesim një model neural për të përdorur plotësisht informacione të ndryshme gjuhësore për të ndërtuar përfaqësimin e dokumentit. Përveç kësaj, pasi ndikimet e informacionit të ndryshëm gjuhësor janë të ndryshme, ne propozojmë një rrjet të vëmendjes hierarkike për të peshuar rëndësinë e informacionit të ndryshëm gjuhësor dhe për të mësuar vëmendjen e ndërsjelltë midis dokumentit dhe informacionit gjuhësor. Rezultatet eksperimentale në dy grupe të dhënash tregojnë efektshmërinë e modelit nervor të vëmendjes hierarkike të propozuar.', 'hy': 'Ստենցիայի հայտնաբերումը նպատակն է նվիրել դիրքի պիտակ (հավասար կամ հակառակ) տեղադրելու տեղադրությանը հատուկ նպատակի ուղղությամբ: Վերջերս, ավելի շատ հետաքրքրություն կա նյարդային մոդելների օգտագործման փաստաթղթերի դիրքը հայտնաբերելու համար: Այս աշխատանքներից շատերը մոդել են բառերի հաջորդականությունը փաստաթղթերի ներկայացման սովորելու համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, շատ լեզվաբանական տեղեկատվություն, ինչպիսիք են փաստաթղթի հյուսիսականությունը և բանավեճները, կապված է փաստաթղթի դիրքի հետ և կարող է ոգեշնչել մեզ ուսումնասիրել դիրքը: Այսպիսով, մենք ներկայացնում ենք նյարդային մոդել, որպեսզի ամբողջովին օգտագործենք տարբեր լեզվաբանական տեղեկատվություն փաստաթղթի ներկայացման կառուցման համար: Ավելին, քանի որ տարբեր լեզվաբանական ինֆորմացիայի ազդեցությունները տարբեր են, մենք առաջարկում ենք հիերարխիկ ուշադրության ցանց, որպեսզի հաշվի առնենք տարբեր լեզվաբանական ինֆորմացիայի կարևորությունը և սովորենք փաստաթղթի և լեզվաբանական ինֆորմացի Երկու տվյալների համակարգի փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս առաջարկված հիերարխիկ ուշադրության նյարդային մոդելի արդյունավետությունը:', 'am': 'የስቴኖስ ማግኘት የቆመ ምልክት (ለመሆን ወይም ለመቃወም) ወደ ታወቀ ዕቅድን ለመስጠት ነው፡፡ በአሁኑ ጊዜ የሰነጃዎች ውጤት ማግኘት የናቡር ሞዴል በመጠቀም የሚጨምረው ውጤት አለ፡፡ ከእነዚህ አብዛኞቹ ሰዎች የሰነድ መልዕክት ለመማር ቃላትን ምሳሌ ያደርጋሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን የቋንቋው መረጃዎች፣ እንደ ሰነዱ ርኵሰት እና ክርክሮች ከሰነዱ ቁጥር ጋር ተደጋግሞአል፣ ስርዓቱን ለመፈለግ ይችላል፡፡ ስለዚህም ሰነዱን መልዕክት ለመሥራት የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች መረጃዎችን ለመሙላት አቀረብን፡፡ In addition, since the influences of different linguistic information are different, we propose a hierarchical attention network to weigh the importance of various linguistic information, and learn the mutual attention between the document and the linguistic information.  በሁለቱ ዳታተሮች ላይ የፈተናው ፍሬዎች የዳርተርክሲ የነጥብ ጥያቄ ሞዴል ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Stance keşfetməsi məqsədilə bir məsafə tərəfindən bir mövzu etiketini (tərəfindən və ya əleyhinə) təyin etmək istəyir. Son zamanlarda nöral modelləri istifadə etmək üçün belələrin durumunu keşfetmək üçün artırmaq istəyir. Bu sözlərin əksəriyyəti dəstə göstəricisini öyrənmək üçün sözlərin sıralamasını modelləyir. Lakin belə ki, belədinin polarlığı və argumentləri kimi çox dil məlumatları belədir, belədinin durumu ilə bağlanır və bizi bu durumu keşfetmək üçün ilham edə bilər. Beləliklə, biz bir nöral modeli təşkil edirik ki, bəzi dil məlumatlarını təşkil etmək üçün müxtəlif dil məlumatlarını istifadə etmək üçün. Əksinə, fərqli dil məlumatının təsirlərinin təsirləri fərqli olduğuna görə, biz müxtəlif dil məlumatının təsirini çəkmək üçün hiyerarşik məlumatı təklif edirik və belə məlumatın və dil məlumatının arasında bir-birinin təsirini öyrənirik. İki verilən qurğuların eksperimental sonuçları təklif edilmiş hiyerarşik təsiri nöral modelinin etkinliğini göstərir.', 'bn': 'স্ট্যান্স সনাক্তির লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি নির্দিষ্ট লক্ষ্যের দিকে একটি স্টেশন লেবেল (জন্য অথবা বিরুদ্ধে) নির্ধার সম্প্রতি নথিপত্রের অবস্থা খুঁজে বের করার জন্য নিউরেল মডেল ব্যবহার করার আগ্রহ বৃদ্ধি পেয়েছে। এগুলোর অধিকাংশই নথির প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখার জন্য শব্দের সীমানার মডেল করে। তবে অনেক ভাষাগত তথ্য, যেমন নথির দূষণ এবং যুক্তিগুলো নথির অবস্থানের সাথে যুক্ত, তার সাথে সম্পর্ক রয়েছে এবং তারা আমাদের এই অবস্থা খুঁজে বে তাই আমরা নথির প্রতিনিধিত্ব নির্মাণের জন্য বিভিন্ন ভাষার তথ্য পুরোপুরি কাজ করার জন্য নিউরেল মডেল উপস্থাপন করি। এছাড়াও, যেহেতু ভাষাগত তথ্যের প্রভাব ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভাষার প্রভাব বিভিন্ন, আমরা একটি হায়েরার্কিলিক্যাল মনোযোগ নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করি বিভিন্ন ভাষাগত দুটি ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রস্তাবিত হীরার্কিক্যাল মনোযোগ মডেলের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে।', 'tr': 'Stans deteksiýasy takyk etiketini (üçin ýa-da) bir ýere belli maksada taýýarlamak amasyna edýär. Soňky wagtlar, senediň durumyny a ňlamak üçin näral nusgalary ulanmakda gyzyklanýar. Bu işleýän köpüsi sened namaýyşyny öwrenmek üçin sözlerin dizini nusgala. Ýöne, senediň polaritet we taryşmalary ýaly köp lingwistiki maglumatlary, senediň durumyna meňzeşlik we biziň durumyny gözlemegimize rugsat berebilir. Şol sebäpli, biz senediň temsilini düzenlemek üçin dürli dil maglumatyny tamamlamak üçin bir neural modelini görkeýäris. Munuň üstünde, dürli lingwistiki maglumatyň etkileri üýtgeşik bolansoň, biz dürli lingwistiki maglumatyň wajyplygyny çykarmak üçin bir iýerarhiýa üns bermegi teklip edýäris we senediň we lingwistiki maglumatyň aralygynda bir üns öwrenip bileris. Iki veri setirlerinde synanyş netijesi teklip eden hijerarşik üns nural nusganyň täsirini görkezýär.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje stanice ima cilj da odredi etiketu stanja (za ili protiv) na mjesto ka određenoj cilji. Nedavno postoji sve veći interes za upotrebu neuralnih modela za otkrivanje stava dokumenta. Većina ovih rada modeluje sekvencu riječi da nauče zastupanje dokumenta. Međutim, mnogo jezičkih informacija, poput polarnosti i argumentacija dokumenta, povezuje se sa stavom dokumenta, i može nas inspirirati da istražimo stav. Stoga predstavljamo neuralni model da potpuno upotrebi različite jezičke informacije kako bi izgradili predstavu dokumenta. Osim toga, pošto su uticaji različitih jezičkih informacija različitih, predlažemo hijerarhičku pažnju mrežu da teži važnost različitih jezičkih informacija i naučimo zajedničku pažnju između dokumenta i jezičkih informacija. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dva podataka pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog hijerarhičkog neuronskog modela pažnje.', 'ca': "La detecció de posicions intenta assenyar una etiqueta de posició (per o contra) a un post cap a un objectiu específic. Recentment, hi ha un interès creixent en utilitzar models neuronals per detectar la posició dels documents. La majoria d'aquestes obres modelen la seqüència de paraules per aprendre a representar els documents. Però molta informació lingüística, com la polaritat i els arguments del document, està correlacionada amb la posició del document i ens pot inspirar a explorar la posició. Hence, we present a neural model to fully employ various linguistic information to construct the document representation.  A més, com les influències de les diferents informacions lingüístices són diferents, proposem una xarxa d'atenció jeràrquica per pesar l'importància de diverses informacions lingüístices i aprendre l'atenció mutua entre el document i la informació lingüística. Els resultats experimentals de dos conjunts de dades demostren l'eficacia del model neuronal d'atenció jeràrquica proposat.", 'cs': 'Detekce postoje má za cíl přiřadit popisk postoje (pro nebo proti) k příspěvku vůči konkrétnímu cíli. V poslední době roste zájem o využití neuronových modelů k detekci postoje dokumentů. Většina z těchto prací modeluje posloupnost slov pro naučení se reprezentace dokumentů. Nicméně mnoho jazykových informací, jako například polarita a argumenty dokumentu, je korelováno s postojem dokumentu a může nás inspirovat k prozkoumání tohoto postoje. Proto představujeme neuronový model, který plně využívá různé jazykové informace k konstrukci reprezentace dokumentu. Navíc, protože vlivy různých jazykových informací jsou odlišné, navrhujeme hierarchickou síť pozornosti, která zváží význam různých jazykových informací a naučí se vzájemnou pozornost mezi dokumentem a jazykovými informacemi. Experimentální výsledky na dvou datových sadách demonstrují efektivitu navrženého hierarchického neuronového modelu pozornosti.', 'et': 'Stantsi tuvastamise eesmärk on määrata positsiooni silt (poolt või vastu) postile konkreetse sihtmärgi suunas. Hiljuti on kasvanud huvi neuromudelite kasutamise vastu dokumentide seisundi tuvastamiseks. Enamik neist töödest modelleerib sõnade jada dokumendi esitamise õppimiseks. Kuid palju keelelist teavet, nagu dokumendi polaarsus ja argumendid, on seotud dokumendi seisukohaga ja võib inspireerida meid seda seisukohta uurima. Seetõttu esitame närvimudeli, mis võimaldab täielikult kasutada erinevat keelelist informatsiooni dokumendi kujundamiseks. Kuna erineva keelelise informatsiooni mõjud on erinevad, pakume välja hierarhilise tähelepanuvõrgu, et kaaluda erineva keelelise informatsiooni tähtsust ning õppida dokumendi ja keelelise informatsiooni vastastikust tähelepanu. Kahe andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad väljapakutud hierarhilise tähelepanu neuromudeli efektiivsust.', 'fi': 'Asennontunnistuksen tavoitteena on määrittää asennon tunniste (puolesta tai vastaan) viestille tiettyä kohdetta kohti. Viime aikoina on lisääntynyt kiinnostus neuromallien käyttämiseen dokumenttien asennon havaitsemiseen. Useimmat näistä teoksista mallintavat sanojen järjestystä dokumenttien esittämisen oppimiseksi. Kuitenkin monet kielelliset tiedot, kuten asiakirjan polariteetti ja perustelut, korreloivat asiakirjan kantaan ja voivat innostaa meitä tutkimaan kantaa. Tämän vuoksi esitämme neuromallin, joka hyödyntää täysin erilaisia kielellisiä tietoja dokumenttien esittämisen rakentamisessa. Lisäksi, koska eri kielitiedon vaikutukset ovat erilaiset, ehdotamme hierarkkista huomioverkostoa eri kielitiedon merkityksen punnitsemiseksi ja asiakirjan ja kielitiedon keskinäisen huomion oppimiseksi. Kahden aineiston kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat ehdotetun hierarkkisen huomioneuromallin tehokkuuden.', 'ko': '자세 검측의 목적은 특정한 목표를 가리키는 게시물에 자세 라벨(지지 또는 반대)을 분배하는 것이다.최근 신경 모형을 이용해 문서를 검사하는 자세에 관심이 높아지고 있다.이 작품들 대부분은 문서의 표시를 배우기 위해 단어 서열을 모델링한다.그러나 많은 언어 정보, 예를 들어 문서의 극성과 파라미터는 모두 문서의 입장과 관련되어 우리가 입장을 탐색하도록 계발할 수 있다.따라서 우리는 각종 언어 정보를 충분히 이용하여 문서 표시를 구성하는 신경 모델을 제시했다.그 밖에 서로 다른 언어 정보의 영향이 다르기 때문에 우리는 층별 주의 네트워크를 통해 각종 언어 정보의 중요성을 평가하고 문서와 언어 정보 간의 상호 주의를 학습한다.두 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과는 제시된 분층 주의 신경 모델의 유효성을 증명했다.', 'jv': 'amarok Kowé kudu, ana sing paling nggambar penggunaké model sing nêrung bisa nggarap kuwi duluran dokumen. Banyak hal yang gunakake model sing terjadi pawaran kanggo kelalam basa dokumen. Nanging, akeh informasi ingkang (langgar), kaya sampeyan ingkang dipolerané lan sawang nggunaké dokumen, kudu piye cara nggambar kapan kuwi kesempatan karo dokumen, lan iso nggunakake awak dhéwé nggawe gerakan sampeyan ingkang. Kaya, awak dhéwé nambah model sing nêrung kuwi nggawe informasi ingkang sampeyan kanggo nggawe basa gambar nggawe basa seneng pisan. Nambah, sedhaya mengko perusahaan karo informasi bangkat gak bener, kéné supoyo sistem butakon ingkang karo nggawe informasi bangkat gak bener, lan uga sampek kapan langkat kuwi nggawe informasi bangkat lan informasi bangkat. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'זיהוי המיקום מתכוון להסגיר תווית עמדה (עבור או נגד) לתפקיד לכיוון מטרה מסוימת. לאחרונה, יש עניין גדול בשימוש בדוגמנים עצביים כדי לגלות עמדה של מסמכים. רוב העבודות האלה דוגמנים את רצף המילים כדי ללמוד מייצג מסמכים. עם זאת, הרבה מידע שפתי, כמו קוטביות וטיעונים של המסמך, קשור לעמדה של המסמך, ויכול לעורר אותנו לחקור את העמדה. לכן, אנחנו מציגים מודל עצבי כדי להשתמש במלוא במידע שפתי שונה לבנות את מייצג המסמך. בנוסף, מאחר שההשפעות של מידע שפתי שונה שונות, אנו מציעים רשת תשומת לב הייררכית כדי לשקול את חשיבות מידע שפתי שונה וללמד את תשומת לב הדדית בין המסמך למידע השפתי. תוצאות הניסויים על שני קבוצות נתונים מראות את היעילות של מודל העצבי של תשומת לב הייררכית המוצעת.', 'ha': "Zagnore Stalin yana aimar ya bãyar da wata alama na tsaye (wa ko don haka) zuwa wani bango zuwa wani ajali na ƙayyade. Recently, there is a growing interest in using neural models to detect stance of documents.  Babu mafi yawan wannan masu aikin motsi da ke son mutane da za'a sanar da wakin takardar. Amma, ko da yawa ma'abũcin harshen, kamar takardar da jãyayyen dukkan takardar, yana da muhalli da wurin takardar, kuma yana iya yin amfani da mu kan gane halin. Kayya, ko kuma, munã samun wani misali na'ura dõmin mu yi aiki cikakken takardar cikin lingui ko da za'a sami tsarin takardar. Da wannan, sabõda an buƙata masu amfani da fassarar lãbãri masu cikin lingui daban-daban, muna buƙata, zuwa wani shirin muhimmi wa muhimmi a nau'in, ma'anar mutane, kuma ka sami muhimmi a tsakanin takardan da information na linguistic. Matarin jarrabai a kan daidaita biyu na dangane sun nuna aikin muhimmanci na motel ɗin aikin muhimmanci na buƙata.", 'sk': 'Namen zaznavanja stanja je dodeliti oznako stanja (za ali proti) postavki proti določenemu cilju. V zadnjem času je vse večje zanimanje za uporabo nevronskih modelov za odkrivanje položaja dokumentov. Večina teh del modelira zaporedje besed za učenje predstavitve dokumentov. Vendar pa je veliko jezikovnih informacij, kot so polarnost in argumenti dokumenta, povezanih s stališčem dokumenta in nas lahko navdihnejo k raziskovanju stališča. Zato predstavljamo nevronski model, ki v celoti uporablja različne jezikovne informacije za konstrukcijo predstavitve dokumentov. Ker so vplivi različnih jezikovnih informacij različni, predlagamo hierarhično mrežo pozornosti za tehtanje pomena različnih jezikovnih informacij in učenje medsebojne pozornosti med dokumentom in jezikovnimi informacijami. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dveh naborih podatkov kažejo učinkovitost predlaganega hierarhičnega nevronskega modela pozornosti.', 'bo': 'Stance རྟོགས་ནི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་གནས་སྟངས་ཤོག་བྱང་ཞིག་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པ། ཉེ་ཆར་བར་དུ། ཡིག་ཆ་རའི་གནས་སྟངས་བཤད་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་པའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་རིས་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་དགའ་བའི་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིག་ཡ ཡིག་གེའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མང་ཆེ་བ་དེ་ལ་ཡིག་ཆ་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་གོ་རིམ་དཔེ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་ཡོད། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་ཡིག དེ་ལས། སྐད་རིགས་གནས་ཚུལ་མི་འདྲ་བའི་གནོད་འགྱུར་བ་ནི་འདྲ་མ་འདྲ་ཡིན་ལས། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེན་གྱི་གལ་ཆ་གལ་ཆེན་ཡོད་པ་དང་། ཡིག ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་སྤྲོད་ཡོད་པའི་སྒྲིག་ཡིག'}
{'en': 'Retrofitting Distributional Embeddings to Knowledge Graphs with Functional Relations', 'ar': 'تعديل التعديلات التوزيعية للرسوم البيانية المعرفية بالعلاقات الوظيفية', 'pt': 'Retrofitting de Embeddings Distribucionais para Gráficos de Conhecimento com Relações Funcionais', 'fr': 'Adaptation des intégrations distributionnelles aux graphes de connaissances avec des relations fonctionnelles', 'es': 'Adaptación de incrustaciones distribucionales a gráficos de conocimiento con relaciones funcionales', 'ja': '機能関係を持つナレッジグラフへの分散埋め込みの改造', 'ru': 'Модернизация распределительных вложений в графики знаний с функциональными отношениями', 'hi': 'कार्यात्मक संबंधों के साथ ज्ञान रेखांकन के लिए वितरण एम्बेडिंग retrofitting', 'zh': '以分布嵌改造为功能图谱', 'ga': 'Leabú Dáilte a Iarfheistiú ar Ghraif Eolais le Caidreamh Feidhmiúil', 'hu': 'Az elosztási beágyazások utólagos beépítése a tudásgrafokhoz funkcionális kapcsolatokkal', 'it': 'Retrofit di incorporazioni distributive ai grafici della conoscenza con relazioni funzionali', 'el': 'Αναβάθμιση των κατανεμητικών ενσωματώσεων σε γραφήματα γνώσης με λειτουργικές σχέσεις', 'mk': 'Ретрофитирање на дистрибуционалните вградувања на графичките знања со функционални односи', 'kk': 'Функциялық қатынастармен білім графикасына тарату үлестірімді ендіру', 'ml': 'പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ ഗ്രാഫ്സിലേക്കുള്ള വിതരണ എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d വീണ്ടും ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mt': 'Ir-Riprofittazzjoni tal-Embeddings Distribuzzjonali għall-Grafiki tal-Għarfien b’Relazzjonijiet Funzjonali', 'mn': 'Функцийн харилцааны мэдлэг графикийн хуваарилалтын нэвтрүүлэлт', 'no': 'Name', 'ms': 'Retrofitting Distributional Embeddings to Knowledge Graphs with Functional Relations', 'ro': 'Retromontarea încorporărilor distribuționale în graficele de cunoștințe cu relații funcționale', 'pl': 'Modernizacja osadzeń dystrybucyjnych do wykresów wiedzy z relacjami funkcjonalnymi', 'lt': 'Pasiskirstymo įrangos perkėlimas į žinių grafikus su funkciniais ryšiais', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Retrofitting Distributional Embeddings to Knowledge Graphs with Functional Relations', 'sv': 'Efteranpassning av distributionsinlägg till kunskapsgrafer med funktionella relationer', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'ka': 'Name', 'sr': 'Povraæanje distribucijskih integracija za znanje grafika sa funkcionalnim odnosima', 'vi': 'Sắp sửa lại hoạt động chia sẻ với đồ vật tri thức với các quan hệ hàm', 'uz': 'Name', 'bg': 'Ремонтиране на дистрибуционни вграждания към графики на знанието с функционални отношения', 'hr': 'Povraćanje distribucijskih uključenja znanstvenih grafika s funkcionalnim odnosima', 'nl': 'Het retrofitten van Distributionele Embeddings naar Kennisgrafieken met Functionele Relaties', 'da': 'Eftermontering af fordelingsindlejringer til vidensgrafer med funktionelle relationer', 'de': 'Nachrüsten von Distributionseinbettungen in Wissensgrafiken mit funktionalen Beziehungen', 'ko': '함수 관계 지식도 분포 삽입 개선', 'id': 'Mengembalikan Embeddings Distributional ke Graf Pengetahuan dengan Hubungan Fungsi', 'fa': 'تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر تغییر دادن به گرافهای دانش با ارتباطات عملی', 'sw': 'Kupitia Mazungumzo ya Ujuzi kwa Kuhusiana na Functional', 'tr': 'Funksiýal Görnüşler bilen grafiklere daýlamak', 'af': 'Verspreidionale Inbeeldings na kennis Grafies met Funksionale Relasies', 'sq': 'Ripërfitimi i përfshirjeve shpërndarëse në grafikët e njohurive me marrëdhënie funksionale', 'am': 'ምስሉን በሌላ ስም አስቀምጥ', 'hy': 'Վերադարձնել տարածական ներգրավումները գիտելիքի գրաֆիկներին ֆունկցիոնալ հարաբերություններով', 'az': 'Funksiyonal İlişkiləri ilə Bilən Grafiklərin Bütünlüyünü Yenidən Başqalaştırmaq', 'bn': 'ফাংশনারিক সম্পর্কের সাথে জ্ঞান গ্রাফের সাথে বিভাগ বিতরণের বিভাগ পুনরায় প্রবেশ করা হচ্ছে', 'cs': 'Dodatečné vybavení distribučních vložení do znalostních grafů s funkčními vztahy', 'ca': 'Retrofitir les integracions distribucionals als gràfics del coneixement amb relacions funcionals', 'bs': 'Povraćanje distribucijskih integracija za znanje grafika sa funkcionalnim odnosima', 'et': 'Funktsionaalsete suhetega teadmisgraafikute jaotuse kaasajastamine', 'fi': 'Jakelullisten upotusten jälkiasentaminen tietokaavioihin toiminnallisten suhteiden avulla', 'sk': 'Posodobitev distribucijskih vdelav grafikom znanja s funkcionalnimi odnosi', 'jv': 'Ngucap Ngucap Layarang Distribution', 'he': 'Retrofitting Distributional Embeddings to Knowledge Graphs with Functional Relations', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Retrofitting Distributional Embeddings to Knowledge Graphs with Functional Relations'}
{'en': 'Knowledge graphs are a versatile framework to encode richly structured data relationships, but it can be challenging to combine these graphs with unstructured data. Methods for retrofitting pre-trained entity representations to the structure of a knowledge graph typically assume that entities are embedded in a connected space and that relations imply similarity. However, useful knowledge graphs often contain diverse entities and relations (with potentially disjoint underlying corpora) which do not accord with these assumptions. To overcome these limitations, we present Functional Retrofitting, a framework that generalizes current retrofitting methods by explicitly modeling pairwise relations. Our framework can directly incorporate a variety of pairwise penalty functions previously developed for knowledge graph completion. Further, it allows users to encode, learn, and extract information about relation semantics. We present both linear and neural instantiations of the framework. Functional Retrofitting significantly outperforms existing retrofitting methods on complex knowledge graphs and loses no accuracy on simpler graphs (in which relations do imply similarity). Finally, we demonstrate the utility of the framework by predicting new drugdisease treatment pairs in a large, complex health knowledge graph.', 'ar': 'الرسوم البيانية المعرفية هي إطار عمل متعدد الاستخدامات لتشفير علاقات البيانات شديدة التنظيم ، ولكن قد يكون من الصعب دمج هذه الرسوم البيانية مع البيانات غير المنظمة. تفترض طرق تعديل تمثيلات الكيانات المدربة مسبقًا على هيكل الرسم البياني للمعرفة أن الكيانات مضمنة في مساحة متصلة وأن العلاقات تنطوي على تشابه. ومع ذلك ، غالبًا ما تحتوي الرسوم البيانية المعرفية المفيدة على كيانات وعلاقات متنوعة (مع مجموعات أساسية محتملة منفصلة) والتي لا تتوافق مع هذه الافتراضات. للتغلب على هذه القيود ، نقدم التعديل التحديثي الوظيفي ، وهو إطار عمل يعمم طرق التعديل التحديثي الحالية من خلال نمذجة العلاقات الزوجية بشكل صريح. يمكن أن يشتمل إطار العمل الخاص بنا بشكل مباشر على مجموعة متنوعة من وظائف العقوبة الزوجية التي تم تطويرها مسبقًا لإكمال الرسم البياني المعرفي. علاوة على ذلك ، يسمح للمستخدمين بتشفير وتعلم واستخراج المعلومات حول دلالات العلاقة. نقدم كل من إنشاءات الخطية والعصبية للإطار. يتفوق التعديل التحديثي الوظيفي بشكل كبير على طرق التعديل التحديثي الحالية على الرسوم البيانية المعرفية المعقدة ولا يفقد الدقة في الرسوم البيانية الأبسط (حيث تشير العلاقات إلى التشابه). أخيرًا ، نوضح فائدة إطار العمل من خلال التنبؤ بأزواج علاجات دوائية ومرض جديدة في رسم بياني كبير ومعقد للمعرفة الصحية.', 'pt': 'Os gráficos de conhecimento são uma estrutura versátil para codificar relacionamentos de dados altamente estruturados, mas pode ser um desafio combinar esses gráficos com dados não estruturados. Os métodos para adaptar representações de entidades pré-treinadas à estrutura de um grafo de conhecimento normalmente assumem que as entidades estão inseridas em um espaço conectado e que as relações implicam em similaridade. No entanto, gráficos de conhecimento úteis geralmente contêm diversas entidades e relações (com corpora subjacentes potencialmente disjuntos) que não estão de acordo com essas suposições. Para superar essas limitações, apresentamos o Functional Retrofitting, uma estrutura que generaliza os métodos atuais de retrofitting modelando explicitamente as relações de pares. Nossa estrutura pode incorporar diretamente uma variedade de funções de penalidade de pares desenvolvidas anteriormente para a conclusão do gráfico de conhecimento. Além disso, permite que os usuários codifiquem, aprendam e extraiam informações sobre a semântica das relações. Apresentamos instanciações lineares e neurais do framework. O Retroajuste Funcional supera significativamente os métodos de retroajuste existentes em gráficos de conhecimento complexos e não perde a precisão em gráficos mais simples (nos quais as relações implicam similaridade). Por fim, demonstramos a utilidade da estrutura ao prever novos pares de tratamento droga-doença em um gráfico de conhecimento de saúde grande e complexo.', 'fr': "Les graphes de connaissances constituent un cadre polyvalent permettant de coder des relations de données richement structurées, mais il peut être difficile de combiner ces graphiques avec des données non structurées. Les procédés de mise à niveau des représentations d'entités pré-entraînées à la structure d'un graphe de connaissances supposent généralement que les entités sont intégrées dans un espace connecté et que les relations impliquent une similitude. Cependant, les graphes de connaissances utiles contiennent souvent diverses entités et relations (avec des corpus sous-jacents potentiellement disjoints) qui ne correspondent pas à ces hypothèses. Pour surmonter ces limites, nous présentons Functional Retrofitting, un cadre qui généralise les méthodes de mise à niveau actuelles en modélisant explicitement des relations par paire. Notre framework peut intégrer directement une variété de fonctions de pénalité par paires précédemment développées pour la complétion de graphes de connaissances. En outre, il permet aux utilisateurs d'encoder, d'apprendre et d'extraire des informations sur la sémantique des relations. Nous présentons des instanciations linéaires et neuronales du framework. Le rétrofit fonctionnel surpasse de manière significative les méthodes de mise à niveau existantes sur des graphes de connaissances complexes et ne perd aucune précision sur les graphiques plus simples (dans lesquels les relations impliquent une similitude). Enfin, nous démontrons l'utilité du cadre en prédisant de nouvelles paires médicament-traitement dans un graphique de connaissances en santé vaste et complexe.", 'es': 'Los gráficos de conocimiento son un marco versátil para codificar relaciones de datos estructuradas de manera rica, pero combinar estos gráficos con datos no estructurados puede resultar difícil. Los métodos para adaptar representaciones de entidades previamente entrenadas a la estructura de un gráfico de conocimiento normalmente suponen que las entidades están incrustadas en un espacio conectado y que las relaciones implican similitud. Sin embargo, los gráficos de conocimiento útiles a menudo contienen entidades y relaciones diversas (con cuerpos subyacentes potencialmente inconexos) que no están de acuerdo con estos supuestos. Para superar estas limitaciones, presentamos Functional Retrofitting, un marco que generaliza los métodos de retroadaptación actuales mediante el modelado explícito de relaciones por parejas. Nuestro marco puede incorporar directamente una variedad de funciones de penalización por pares desarrolladas previamente para completar el gráfico de conocimiento. Además, permite a los usuarios codificar, aprender y extraer información sobre la semántica de las relaciones. Presentamos instancias lineales y neuronales del marco. La retroadaptación funcional supera significativamente a los métodos de adaptación existentes en gráficos de conocimiento complejos y no pierde precisión en gráficos más simples (en los que las relaciones sí implican similitud). Por último, demostramos la utilidad del marco mediante la predicción de nuevos pares de tratamientos entre fármacos y enfermedades en un gráfico de conocimientos de salud grande y complejo.', 'ja': 'ナレッジグラフは、豊富に構造化されたデータ関係をエンコードするための多用途のフレームワークですが、これらのグラフを非構造化データと組み合わせることは困難な場合があります。 事前に訓練されたエンティティ表現をナレッジグラフの構造に改造する方法は、典型的には、エンティティが接続された空間に埋め込まれ、関係が類似性を暗示すると仮定する。 しかし、有用な知識グラフには、しばしば、これらの仮定と一致しない多様なエンティティと関係（潜在的に不連続な基礎となる組織）が含まれています。 これらの制限を克服するために、現在の改造方法を明示的にペア関係をモデリングすることによって一般化するフレームワークである機能改造を提示します。 私たちのフレームワークは、ナレッジグラフの完了のために以前に開発されたさまざまなペアペナルティ関数を直接組み込むことができます。 さらに、ユーザーは関係セマンティクスに関する情報をエンコード、学習、抽出することができます。 フレームワークの線形インスタンス化と神経インスタンス化の両方を提示します。 機能的改造は、複雑な知識グラフの既存の改造方法を大幅に上回り、より単純なグラフでは正確さを失わない（関係が類似性を意味する）。 最後に、大規模で複雑な健康知識グラフで新しい薬物疾患治療ペアを予測することによって、フレームワークの有用性を実証します。', 'zh': '知图谱者,多功能框架也,所以编码数也,合图与非结构化数者挑战性。 以豫练之实体改造为知识图谱结构之法常假嵌连空,而意味相似性。 然有用之知图谱常含异体(有不交之基语料库),非设之也。 所以克此者,吾言功能改造,此所以广显式建模成对之框架也。 吾框架直整合前知图谱成者众罚函数。 此外许用户编码,学取语义息。 举框架线性、神经实例化。 功能改造于杂知图谱显优于今,而于更简之图(其实相似性)不失准确性。 终于大形,杂以图谱新 - 病以验框架实用性。', 'hi': 'ज्ञान रेखांकन समृद्ध रूप से संरचित डेटा संबंधों को एन्कोड करने के लिए एक बहुमुखी ढांचा है, लेकिन इन ग्राफों को असंरचित डेटा के साथ संयोजित करना चुनौतीपूर्ण हो सकता है। एक ज्ञान ग्राफ की संरचना के लिए पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित इकाई अभ्यावेदन को रेट्रोफिट करने के तरीके आमतौर पर मानते हैं कि संस्थाएं एक जुड़े हुए स्थान में एम्बेडेड हैं और संबंध समानता का संकेत देते हैं। हालांकि, उपयोगी ज्ञान रेखांकन में अक्सर विविध संस्थाएं और संबंध होते हैं (संभावित रूप से असंयुक्त अंतर्निहित निगम के साथ) जो इन मान्यताओं के अनुरूप नहीं हैं। इन सीमाओं को दूर करने के लिए, हम कार्यात्मक रेट्रोफिटिंग प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक ढांचा जो स्पष्ट रूप से मॉडलिंग पेयरवाइज संबंधों द्वारा वर्तमान रेट्रोफिटिंग विधियों को सामान्य ीकृत करता है। हमारा ढांचा सीधे ज्ञान ग्राफ पूरा होने के लिए पहले से विकसित किए गए विभिन्न प्रकार के पेयरवाइज दंड कार्यों को शामिल कर सकता है। इसके अलावा, यह उपयोगकर्ताओं को संबंध शब्दार्थ के बारे में जानकारी को एन्कोड करने, सीखने और निकालने की अनुमति देता है। हम दोनों रैखिक और तंत्रिका instantiations ढांचे के प्रस्तुत करते हैं। कार्यात्मक रेट्रोफिटिंग जटिल ज्ञान रेखांकन पर मौजूदा रेट्रोफिटिंग विधियों को काफी बेहतर बनाता है और सरल ग्राफपर कोई सटीकता नहीं खोता है (जिसमें संबंध समानता का संकेत देते हैं)। अंत में, हम एक बड़े, जटिल स्वास्थ्य ज्ञान ग्राफ में नई दवा-रोग उपचार जोड़े की भविष्यवाणी करके ढांचे की उपयोगिता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Графики знаний представляют собой универсальную структуру для кодирования широко структурированных взаимосвязей данных, но может быть сложно объединить эти графики с неструктурированными данными. Методы переоснащения предварительно обученных представлений сущностей в структуру графа знаний обычно предполагают, что сущности встроены в связанное пространство и что отношения подразумевают сходство. Однако полезные графики знаний часто содержат различные объекты и отношения (с потенциально несвязанными основными телами), которые не согласуются с этими предположениями. Чтобы преодолеть эти ограничения, мы представляем Функциональное Переоснащение, фреймворк, который обобщает текущие методы переоснащения, явно моделируя попарные отношения. Наш фреймворк может напрямую включать в себя множество парных штрафных функций, ранее разработанных для заполнения графа знаний. Кроме того, он позволяет пользователям кодировать, изучать и извлекать информацию о семантике отношений. Представляем как линейные, так и нейронные инстанцировки каркаса. Функциональное переоснащение значительно превосходит существующие методы переоснащения на сложных графах знаний и не теряет точности на более простых графах (в которых отношения действительно подразумевают сходство). Наконец, мы демонстрируем полезность этой системы, прогнозируя новые пары лекарств и болезней на большом, сложном графике знаний о здоровье.', 'ga': 'Is creat ilúsáideach iad graif eolais chun caidrimh sonraí atá struchtúrtha go saibhir a ionchódú, ach féadann sé a bheith dúshlánach na graif seo a chomhcheangal le sonraí neamhstruchtúrtha. Glactar leis go hiondúil i modhanna chun léiriúcháin aonáin réamhoilte a iarfheistiú ar struchtúr ghraif eolais go bhfuil eintitis leabaithe i spás nasctha agus go dtugann caidrimh le tuiscint go bhfuil cosúlacht ann. Mar sin féin, is minic a bhíonn aonáin agus caidrimh ilghnéitheacha i graif eolais úsáideacha (le bunchorparáid a d’fhéadfadh a bheith neamh-chomhcheangailte) nach dtagann leis na boinn tuisceana seo. Chun na teorainneacha seo a shárú, cuirimid i láthair Aisfheisteas Feidhme, creat a ghineannearrann modhanna iarfheistithe reatha trí chaidreamh beirte a shamhaltú go sainráite. Is féidir lenár gcreat a ionchorprú go díreach ar éagsúlacht na bhfeidhmeanna pionóis pairwise a forbraíodh roimhe seo chun graf eolais a chomhlánú. Ina theannta sin, cuireann sé ar chumas úsáideoirí faisnéis a ionchódú, a fhoghlaim agus a bhaint faoi shéimeantaic an chaidrimh. Cuirimid láithreachtaí líneacha agus néaracha araon den chreat i láthair. Feidhmíonn Iarfheistiú Feidhmeach go mór níos fearr ná na modhanna iarfheistithe atá ann cheana ar ghraif eolais casta agus ní chailleann sé aon chruinneas ar ghraif níos simplí (ina dtugann caidreamh le tuiscint cosúlacht). Ar deireadh, léirímid áisiúlacht an chreata trí phéirí nua cóireála drugaí-galar a thuar i ngraf mór casta ar eolas sláinte.', 'ka': 'მეცნიერების გრაფიკები არის სხვადასხვა ფრამეტრი, რომელიც დიდი სტრუქტურული მონაცემების შესახებ, მაგრამ შეიძლება შესაძლებელია, რომ ეს გრაფიკები არსტრუქტურული მონაცემებით შე პროცემები, რომელიც წინ განსწავლა ინტერტიკის გამოსახულებების სტრუქტურაციას ცნობიერების გრაფიკის სტრუქტურაციისთვის აღმოჩენა, რომ ინტერტიკები დაკავშირებული ადგილში და მაგრამ საჭირო ცნობილის გრაფიკები ზოგიერთად აქვს განსხვავებული ინტერტიკები და შესახებები (პროცენტურად განსხვავებული კოპორაზე) რომლებიც ამ წარმოდგენების შესახებ ჩვენ ტუნქციონალური რეტროფიტირება, რომელიც მიმდინარე რეტროფიტირების მეცემების გენერალიზაცია გამოყენებით გამოყენებული ორივე შესახებით. ჩვენი პარამეტრი შეიძლება პირდაპირად შეიყვანოთ პარამეტრები პროგრამის დასრულებაში წინ განვითარებული კონფიქცია. დამატებით, ეს მომხმარებელი შეუძლია კოდირება, ნასწავლა და ექსტრაქტირება ინფორმაციის შესახებ სიმენტიკების შესახებ. ჩვენ კონტაქტის ლეინერი და ნეიროლური ინსტანციაციები ჩვენ აჩვენებთ. ფუნქციალური რეტროფიტირება მნიშვნელოვანად გავაკეთებს კომპლექსი ცნობიერების რეტროფიტირების მეტოვები და უფრო მხოლოდ გრაფიკაში არაფერი წარმოდგენა წარმოდგენა (რომელი საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ სტრუმენტის სუტილიტება, რომელიც ახალი პროგრამის დაკავშირებაში ახალი პროგრამის დაკავშირებაში დიდი, კომპლექსი სი', 'el': 'Τα γραφήματα γνώσης είναι ένα ευέλικτο πλαίσιο για την κωδικοποίηση πλούσιων δομημένων σχέσεων δεδομένων, αλλά μπορεί να είναι δύσκολο να συνδυάσετε αυτά τα γραφήματα με μη δομημένα δεδομένα. Οι μέθοδοι για την αναπροσαρμογή προ-εκπαιδευμένων αναπαραστάσεων οντότητας στη δομή ενός γραφήματος γνώσης συνήθως υποθέτουν ότι οι οντότητες είναι ενσωματωμένες σε έναν συνδεδεμένο χώρο και ότι οι σχέσεις υποδηλώνουν ομοιότητα. Ωστόσο, χρήσιμα γραφήματα γνώσης συχνά περιέχουν διαφορετικές οντότητες και σχέσεις (με δυνητικά διμερή υποκείμενα σώματα) που δεν συμφωνούν με αυτές τις υποθέσεις. Για να ξεπεραστούν αυτοί οι περιορισμοί, παρουσιάζουμε τη λειτουργική αναδόμηση, ένα πλαίσιο που γενικεύει τις τρέχουσες μεθόδους αναδόμησης μοντελοποιώντας ρητά σχέσεις ζευγαριών. Το πλαίσιο μας μπορεί να ενσωματώσει άμεσα μια ποικιλία λειτουργιών ποινής ζεύγους που αναπτύχθηκαν προηγουμένως για την ολοκλήρωση γραφήματος γνώσης. Επιπλέον, επιτρέπει στους χρήστες να κωδικοποιήσουν, να μάθουν και να εξάγουν πληροφορίες σχετικά με τη σημασιολογία σχέσεων. Παρουσιάζουμε τόσο γραμμικές όσο και νευρικές στιγμιότητες του πλαισίου. Η λειτουργική αναδόμηση ξεπερνά σημαντικά τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους αναδόμησης σε σύνθετα γραφήματα γνώσης και δεν χάνει καμία ακρίβεια σε απλούστερα γραφήματα (στα οποία οι σχέσεις υποδηλώνουν ομοιότητα). Τέλος, καταδεικνύουμε τη χρησιμότητα του πλαισίου προβλέποντας νέα ζεύγη θεραπείας φαρμάκων-ασθενειών σε ένα μεγάλο, σύνθετο γράφημα γνώσεων υγείας.', 'hu': 'A tudásdiagramok sokoldalú keretrendszer a gazdagon strukturált adatkapcsolatok kódolására, de kihívást jelenthet ezeknek a grafikonoknak a strukturálatlan adatokkal való kombinációja. Az előre képzett entitások átalakítására szolgáló módszerek a tudásgraf struktúrájához általában azt feltételezik, hogy entitások egy kapcsolódó térbe vannak ágyazva, és hogy a kapcsolatok hasonlóságot jelentenek. Azonban a hasznos tudási grafikonok gyakran különböző entitásokat és kapcsolatokat tartalmaznak (potenciálisan eltérő alapvető testekkel), amelyek nem felelnek meg ezeknek a feltételezéseknek. E korlátozások leküzdése érdekében bemutatjuk a Functional Retrofitting keretet, amely általánosítja a jelenlegi retrofitting módszereket a páros viszonyok explicit modellezésével. Keretrendszerünk közvetlenül többféle páros büntetési funkciót is magába foglalhat, amelyeket korábban a tudásgráf kiegészítésére fejlesztettek ki. Továbbá lehetővé teszi a felhasználók számára, hogy kódoljanak, tanuljanak és kinyerjék a kapcsolat szemantikájáról szóló információkat. A keretrendszer lineáris és neurális instanciáit egyaránt bemutatjuk. A funkcionális utólagos felszerelés jelentősen felülmúlja a meglévő utólagos felszerelési módszereket komplex tudásgrafokon, és nem veszít pontosságot az egyszerűbb grafikonokon (amelyekben a kapcsolatok hasonlóságot jelentenek). Végül bemutatjuk a keretrendszer hasznosságát új gyógyszer-betegség kezelési párok előrejelzésével egy nagy, komplex egészségügyi ismeretgrafikonban.', 'kk': 'Білім графиктері құрылған деректер қатынасын кодтау үшін әртүрлі бағдарламасы, бірақ бұл графиктерді құрылмаған деректермен біріктіру қиын болуы мүмкін. Алдын- ала оқылған нысандарды білім графикасының құрылымына қайта құру әдістері бірлікті орында ендірілген нысандар және қатынастар ұқсас деп ойлайды. Бірақ пайдалы білім графикаларында көбінде әртүрлі бірліктер мен қатынастар бар (мүмкіндігі көмектесетін корпора) бұл қатынастармен қатынастар бар. Бұл шектеулерді көтеру үшін, біз Функциялық қайта келтіру үшін, қазіргі қайта келтіру әдістерін жалпы түрде моделдеп, жалпы түрде қайта келтіру әдістерін жалпы Біздің фрейміміз білім графикалық толықтыру үшін алдында құрылған бірнеше тәртіпсіздік тәртіпсіздік функцияларын біріктіре алады. Келесіден бұл пайдаланушыларды semantics қатынасы туралы мәліметті кодтау, үйрену және тарқатуға мүмкіндік береді. Біз сызық және невралдық инстанцияларын көрсеткіздік. Функциялық қайта келтіру әдістері комплекс білім графиктерінде қайта келтіру әдістерін өзгертеді, және қарапайым графиктерінде дұрыс жоқ (қатынастар ұқсас болып тұрады). Соңғы сәтте, біз жаңа дәрігер-аурулардың лекциясын көп, комплекс саулық білім графикасында көрсету үшін бағдарламаның утилитасын көрсетедік.', 'it': "I grafici della conoscenza sono un framework versatile per codificare relazioni di dati riccamente strutturate, ma può essere difficile combinare questi grafici con dati non strutturati. I metodi per adattare le rappresentazioni di entità pre-addestrate alla struttura di un grafico della conoscenza presuppongono tipicamente che le entità siano incorporate in uno spazio connesso e che le relazioni implichino somiglianza. Tuttavia, i grafici utili della conoscenza spesso contengono entità e relazioni diverse (con corpi sottostanti potenzialmente disgiunti) che non sono in accordo con queste ipotesi. Per superare queste limitazioni, presentiamo Functional Retrofitting, un framework che generalizza gli attuali metodi di retrofitting modellando esplicitamente le relazioni pairwise. Il nostro framework può incorporare direttamente una varietà di funzioni di penalità a coppie precedentemente sviluppate per il completamento del grafico della conoscenza. Inoltre, consente agli utenti di codificare, imparare ed estrarre informazioni sulla semantica delle relazioni. Presentiamo sia istanze lineari che neurali del framework. Il retrofitting funzionale supera significativamente i metodi di retrofitting esistenti su grafici di conoscenza complessi e non perde accuratezza su grafici più semplici (in cui le relazioni implicano somiglianze). Infine, dimostriamo l'utilità del framework predicendo nuove coppie di trattamento farmaco-malattia in un ampio e complesso grafico delle conoscenze sanitarie.", 'ml': 'പരിജ്ഞാന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സമ്പത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഡേറ്റാ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d കോഡ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഒരു ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് ആണ്, പക്ഷെ ഈ ഗ് പഠിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട ഒരു അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫിന്റെ സ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്കുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളെ വീണ്ടും എടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി വിചാരിക്ക എന്നാലും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ഗ്രാഫ് പലപ്പോഴും വ്യത്യസ്ത വസ്തുക്കളുടെയും ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെയും ഉള്ളിലാകുന്നു. ഈ ഊഹികങ്ങളോട ഈ പരിധികളെ പരിജയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഫാങ്ക്ഷന്\u200d റിട്രോഫിറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നത്, ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ പുനര്\u200dത്ഥിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d പ്ര Our framework can directly incorporate a variety of pairwise penalty functions previously developed for knowledge graph completion.  അതിനുശേഷം, അത് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് സെമാന്റിക്സിനെപ്പറ്റിയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കോഡോഡ് ചെയ്യാനും, പഠിക്ക ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dക്കിന്റെ നിരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടുപേരും നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതാണ്.  അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ ഫ്രെയിമെക്കിന്റെ ഉപയോഗം കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. പുതിയ മയക്കുമരുന്ന് രോഗിയുടെ ചികിത്സ ജോട്ടു', 'mt': 'Il-grafiċi tal-għarfien huma qafas versatili biex jikkodifikaw relazzjonijiet ta’ dejta strutturati b’mod rikk, iżda jista’ jkun ta’ sfida li dawn il-grafiċi jiġu kkombinati ma’ dejta mhux strutturata. Il-metodi għar-retrofitting ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ entitajiet imħarrġa minn qabel għall-istruttura ta’ grafika tal-għarfien tipikament jassumu li entitajiet huma inkorporati fi spazju konness u li r-relazzjonijiet jimplikaw similarità. Madankollu, grafiċi ta’ għarfien utli ta’ spiss jinkludu entitajiet u relazzjonijiet varji (b’korporazzjoni sottostanti potenzjalment diskonġunta) li ma jaqblux ma’ dawn is-suppożizzjonijiet. Biex jingħelbu dawn il-limitazzjonijiet, nippreżentaw ir-Riprofitt Funzjonali, qafas li jiġġeneralizza l-metodi attwali tar-retrofitting billi nimmudellaw b’mod espliċitu r-relazzjonijiet bejn il-pari. Il-qafas tagħna jista’ jinkorpora direttament varjetà ta’ funzjonijiet ta’ penali b’żewġ pari żviluppati qabel għat-tlestija tal-grafika tal-għarfien. Further, it allows users to encode, learn, and extract information about relation semantics.  Aħna nippreżentaw kemm istanzjazzjonijiet lineari kif ukoll newrali tal-qafas. Ir-Riprofittazzjoni Funzjonali taqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-metodi ta’ retrofitting eżistenti fuq grafiki kumplessi ta’ għarfien u ma titlef l-ebda preċiżjoni fuq grafiki aktar sempliċi (li fihom ir-relazzjonijiet jimplikaw similarità). Finally, we demonstrate the utility of the framework by predicting new drug-disease treatment pairs in a large, complex health knowledge graph.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэг график нь баян бүтээгдэхүүнтэй өгөгдлийн харилцааны шинжлэх хэмжээний хэлбэрүүд юм. Гэхдээ эдгээр графиктуудыг бүтээгдэхүүнгүй өгөгдлийг нэгтгэхэд хэцүү болно. Өмнөх сургалтын нэгжүүдийн хэмжээсүүдийг мэдлэг графикийн бүтээгдэхүүнд дахин сэргээх арга нь нэгжүүдийг холбоотой орон зайд оруулж, харилцаа нь тэнцүү гэдгийг ойлгож байна. Гэхдээ хэрэгтэй мэдлэгтэй график ихэвчлэн эдгээр тодорхойлолтуудыг зөвшөөрөхгүй олон төрлийн байгууллагууд болон харилцаа байдаг. Эдгээр хязгаарлалуудыг дутагдахын тулд бид функцийн дахин сэргээх үйл ажиллагааг харуулж байна. Одоогийн дахин сэргээх арга замыг тодорхой хоорондын харилцааны загварын арга загварын тулд ерөнхий Бидний үйл ажиллагаа мэдлэг график дуусахын тулд өмнө нь хөгжсөн олон төрлийн шийтгэл функцийг шууд бүрдүүлж болно. Дараа нь хэрэглэгчиддээ семантикийн харилцааны тухай мэдээллийг кодлох, сурах, гаргах боломжтой. Бид шулуун болон мэдрэлийн түвшин хоёуланг харуулж байна. Функцийн эргүүлэх нь комплекс мэдлэг график дээр суурилсан эргүүлэх аргыг үнэхээр үр дүнтэй үр дүнтэй болгодог. Харин илүү энгийн график дээр ямар ч зөв байдлыг алдахгүй. Эцэст нь бид нарийн өвчний эмчилгээний шинэ хоорондоо том, комплекс эрүүл мэндийн мэдлэгийн график дээр шинэ эмчилгээ эмчилгээний хэрэгцээг үзүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Kvitningsgrafikk er eit versatibel rammeverk for å koda riktig strukturerte dataforhold, men det kan vera vanskeleg å kombinere desse grafene med ikkje strukturerte data. Metodar for å gjenoppretta føretrainerte entitetsrepresentasjonar til strukturen av eit kunnskapsgraf gjennomfører vanlegvis at einingar er innebygd i eit tilkopla mellomrom og at relasjonar betyr liknande. Men nyttige kunnskapsgrafene inneheld ofte ulike entiteter og relasjonar (med potensielt disjoint underlying corporate), som ikkje passar med desse assumpsjonane. For å overføra desse grensene, presenterer vi funksjonell retrofitting, eit rammeverk som genereliserer gjeldande retrofiseringsmetodar ved å eksplisisere pare forhold. Vårt rammeverk kan direkte inkludere fleire påstraumfunksjonar som tidlegare utvikla for fullføring av kunnskapsgrafen. Det tillater brukarar å koda, læra og ekstrahera informasjon om relasjonssemantikk. Vi presenterer både lineære og neurale instansasjonar på rammeverket. Funksjonal gjenoppretting utfører dei eksisterande gjenopprettingsmetode på komplekse kunnskapsgrafen og mistar ingen nøyaktig på enklare grafen (som forandringar betyr liknande). Til slutt, viser vi verktøyet for rammeverktøyet ved å foregå nye narkotikarelateksjonsbehandlingsprogrammer i eit stor, kompleks helseprogram.', 'ms': 'Knowledge graphs are a versatile framework to encode richly structured data relationships, but it can be challenging to combine these graphs with unstructured data.  Methods for retrofitting pre-trained entity representations to the structure of a knowledge graph typically assume that entities are embedded in a connected space and that relations imply similarity.  However, useful knowledge graphs often contain diverse entities and relations (with potentially disjoint underlying corpora) which do not accord with these assumptions.  To overcome these limitations, we present Functional Retrofitting, a framework that generalizes current retrofitting methods by explicitly modeling pairwise relations.  kerangka kami boleh secara langsung memasukkan berbagai fungsi hukuman sepasang yang telah dikembangkan sebelum ini untuk pelengkapan graf pengetahuan. Further, it allows users to encode, learn, and extract information about relation semantics.  Kami memperkenalkan kedua-dua instansi linear dan saraf kerangka. Functional Retrofitting significantly outperforms existing retrofitting methods on complex knowledge graphs and loses no accuracy on simpler graphs (in which relations do imply similarity).  Akhirnya, kami menunjukkan utiliti kerangka dengan meramalkan pasangan rawatan penyakit ubat baru dalam graf pengetahuan kesehatan yang besar dan kompleks.', 'pl': 'Wykresy wiedzy są wszechstronnym frameworkiem do kodowania bogato ustrukturyzowanych relacji danych, ale łączenie tych wykresów z danymi nieustrukturyzowanymi może być trudne. Metody modernizacji wstępnie przeszkolonych reprezentacji jednostek do struktury wykresu wiedzy zazwyczaj zakładają, że jednostki są osadzone w połączonej przestrzeni i że relacje implikują podobieństwo. Jednak użyteczne wykresy wiedzy często zawierają różne podmioty i relacje (z potencjalnie rozłączonymi korpusami bazowymi), które nie są zgodne z tymi założeniami. Aby przezwyciężyć te ograniczenia, przedstawiamy funkcjonalne modernizacje, framework, który uogólnia obecne metody modernizacji poprzez wyraźne modelowanie relacji parowych. Nasz framework może bezpośrednio zawierać różne funkcje karne parowe opracowane wcześniej do uzupełniania wykresu wiedzy. Ponadto pozwala użytkownikom kodować, uczyć się i wydobywać informacje o semantyce relacji. Przedstawiamy zarówno liniowe, jak i neuronowe instancje ramy. Funkcjonalne Retrofitting znacznie przewyższa istniejące metody modernizacji na złożonych wykresach wiedzy i nie traci dokładności na prostszych wykresach (w których relacje implikują podobieństwo). Wreszcie demonstrujemy użyteczność ram poprzez przewidywanie nowych par leczenia lekami i chorobami w dużym, złożonym wykresie wiedzy o zdrowiu.', 'mk': 'Графите за знаење се универзална рамка за кодирање на богато структурирани податочни односи, но може да биде тешко да се комбинираат овие графики со неструктурирани податоци. Methods for retrofitting pre-trained entity representations to the structure of a knowledge graph typically assume that entities are embedded in a connected space and that relations imply similarity.  Сепак, корисните графики на знаење честопати содржат различни ентитети и односи (со потенцијално незаеднички основни корпора) кои не се согласуваат со овие претпоставки. За да ги надминеме овие ограничувања, ги претставуваме Функционалните ретрофитации, рамка која ги генерализира актуелните методи на ретрофитација со експлицитно моделирање на односите помеѓу парите. Our framework can directly incorporate a variety of pairwise penalty functions previously developed for knowledge graph completion.  Further, it allows users to encode, learn, and extract information about relation semantics.  Презентираме линијарни и нервни инстанции на рамката. Functional Retrofitting significantly outperforms existing retrofitting methods on complex knowledge graphs and loses no accuracy on simpler graphs (in which relations do imply similarity).  Finally, we demonstrate the utility of the framework by predicting new drug-disease treatment pairs in a large, complex health knowledge graph.', 'ro': 'Graficele cunoștințelor reprezintă un cadru versatil pentru codificarea relațiilor de date bogat structurate, dar poate fi dificil să combini aceste grafice cu date nestructurate. Metodele de adaptare a reprezentărilor entităților pre-instruite la structura unui grafic de cunoaștere presupun, de obicei, că entitățile sunt încorporate într-un spațiu conectat și că relațiile implică similaritate. Cu toate acestea, graficele de cunoștințe utile conțin adesea entități și relații diverse (cu corpore subiacente potențial disgiunte) care nu sunt în acord cu aceste ipoteze. Pentru a depăși aceste limitări, prezentăm Retrofit Funcțional, un cadru care generalizează metodele actuale de retrofit prin modelarea explicită a relațiilor perechi. Cadrul nostru poate încorpora direct o varietate de funcții de penalizare pereche dezvoltate anterior pentru completarea graficului cunoștințelor. Mai mult, permite utilizatorilor să codeze, să învețe și să extragă informații despre semantica relației. Prezentăm atât instanțiile liniare, cât și neurale ale cadrului. Retromontarea funcțională depășește în mod semnificativ metodele existente de retromontare pe grafice complexe de cunoștințe și nu pierde nicio precizie pe grafice mai simple (în care relațiile implică similaritate). În cele din urmă, demonstrăm utilitatea cadrului prin prezicerea noilor perechi de tratament medicament-boli într-un grafic complex de cunoștințe medicale.', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka aqoontu waa sawir la mid ah oo aad u kooban karo xiriirka data-dhismaha, laakiin waxaa laga yaabaa in la isku daro sawiradan oo aan la dhisin. Qaadooyinka dib u soo qaadashada dhamaanka horay loo tababaray waxay u jeedaan dhismaha maamulka aqoonta sida caadiga ah in alaabta lagu xiriirayo ay isku mid yihiin. Si kastaba ha ahaatee kaararka aqoonta ee faa’iido leh waxaa inta badan ku jira waxyaabo kala duduwan iyo xiriir (kuwaas oo ku jira shirkadaha hoose-dhexe si suurtagal ah) taasoo aan la xiriirin malaha. Si aan uga adkaado xaduudahaas, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa shaqaalaha cusboonaysiinta, kaas oo ah qalabka soo celinta ee haatan ah si cad u sameynaya xiriirka labada xil leh. Midhahayaga waxaa si toos ah u sameyn kara shaqooyin labada xil oo ciqaab ah oo horay loo hormariyey si uu u dhamaado fasaxa aqoonta. Sidoo kale isticmaalayaasha waxay isticmaali karaan codsiga, barashada iyo soo bixinta macluumaad ku saabsan semantiyada xiriirka. We present both linear and neural instantiations of the framework.  Waxqabadka la soo celinayo si muhiim ah ayuu u soo saaraa qaababka ku jira oo ku saabsan sawirada aqoonta complex ah, mana lumino saxda sahlan graphicyada fudud (taas oo xiriirku ay isku mid tahay). Ugu dambaysta, waxaynu muujinnaa isticmaalka qashinka, waxaynu ku sii sheegaynaa labada noocyo oo daryeelka cudurada cusub oo ku qoran xarunta aqoonta caafimaadka oo adag.', 'lt': 'Knowledge graphs are a versatile framework to encode richly structured data relationships, but it can be challenging to combine these graphs with unstructured data.  Iš anksto apmokytų subjektų atstovavimų pritaikymo prie žinių grafikos struktūros metodai paprastai reiškia, kad subjektai yra įtraukti į prijungtą erdvę ir kad santykiai reiškia panašumą. Tačiau naudingose žinių grafikose dažnai yra įvairūs subjektai ir santykiai (su potencialiai nesujungta pagrindine korporacija), kurie neatitinka šių prielaidų. Siekiant įveikti šiuos apribojimus, pristatome funkcinį atgaivinimą, sistemą, kuria bendrinami dabartiniai atgaivinimo metodai aiškiai modeliuojant poros santykius. Mūsų sistemoje gali būti tiesiogiai įtrauktos įvairios poros sankcijų funkcijos, anksčiau sukurtos siekiant užbaigti žinių grafiką. Be to, ji leidžia naudotojams koduoti, mokytis ir išgauti informaciją apie santykių semantiką. Mes pristatome linijines ir nervines sistemos instancijas. Functional Retrofitting significantly outperforms existing retrofitting methods on complex knowledge graphs and loses no accuracy on simpler graphs (in which relations do imply similarity).  Finally, we demonstrate the utility of the framework by predicting new drug-disease treatment pairs in a large, complex health knowledge graph.', 'sv': 'Kunskapsgrafer är ett mångsidigt ramverk för att koda rikt strukturerade datarelationer, men det kan vara svårt att kombinera dessa grafer med ostrukturerade data. Metoder för att anpassa färdigutbildade entitetsrepresentationer till strukturen i en kunskapsgraf förutsätter vanligtvis att entiteter är inbäddade i ett sammankopplat utrymme och att relationer innebär likhet. Men användbara kunskapsgrafer innehåller ofta olika entiteter och relationer (med potentiellt splittrade underliggande corpora) som inte överensstämmer med dessa antaganden. För att övervinna dessa begränsningar presenterar vi Functional Retrofitting, ett ramverk som generaliserar nuvarande eftermonteringsmetoder genom att uttryckligen modellera parvisa relationer. Vårt ramverk kan direkt inkorporera en mängd olika parvisa strafffunktioner som tidigare utvecklats för kunskapsgrafkomplettering. Dessutom tillåter det användare att koda, lära sig och extrahera information om relationsemantik. Vi presenterar både linjära och neurala instantier av ramverket. Funktionell eftermontering överträffar avsevärt befintliga eftermonteringsmetoder på komplexa kunskapsgrafer och förlorar ingen noggrannhet på enklare grafer (där relationerna innebär likhet). Slutligen visar vi nyttan av ramverket genom att förutsäga nya behandlingspar för läkemedelssjukdomar i en stor, komplex hälsokunskapsgraf.', 'ta': 'அறிவு வரைபடங்கள் பழுப்பான உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தரவு தொடர்புகளை குறியீட்டு செய்ய ஒரு சார்ந்த சட்டமாகும், ஆனால் இது வரைபடங்களை உருவாக்காத Methods for retrofitting pre-trained entity representations to the structure of a knowledge graph typically assume that entities are embedded in a connected space and that relations imply similarity.  ஆனால், பயனுள்ள அறிவு வரைபடங்கள் பெரும்பாலும் பல்வேறு பொருள்கள் மற்றும் தொடர்புகள் உள்ளன (சாத்தியமாக குறிக்கப்பட்ட கூடிய கூட்ட இந்த எல்லைகளை வெற்றி பெற, நாம் செயல்பாடு மீட்டெடுக்கும் சட்டத்தை காண்பிக்கிறோம், இது தற்போதைய முறைமைகளை பொதுவாக்கும் ம எங்கள் சட்டத்தை நேரடியாக சேர்க்கலாம் அறிவு வரைபடம் முடிப்பதற்கு முன்பு உருவாக்கப்பட்ட ஜோடி வேதனை செயல்பாடுகளை ச அதற்கும், அது உபயோகிப்பவர்களை குறிமுறையாக்க, கற்று, மற்றும் தொடர்பு பெம்மென்டிக்கு பற்றிய தகவலை வெளியே நாம் சட்டத்தின் கோடு மற்றும் புதிய நிகழ்வுகளையும் காண்பிக்கிறோம். செயல்பாடு மீண்டும் பொருத்தமாக இருக்கும் சிக்கல் அறிவிப்பு வரைபடங்களில் இருந்து மறுபெறும் முறைகளை வெளியேற்றும் மற்றும் சுலபமான வரைபட Finally, we demonstrate the utility of the framework by predicting new drug-disease treatment pairs in a large, complex health knowledge graph.', 'sr': 'Grafiji znanja su versativni okvir za kodiranje bogatski strukturovanih odnosa podataka, ali može biti izazovno kombinirati ove grafike sa neostrukturovanim podacima. Metode za obnovu predobučenih predstavljanja entiteta strukturi grafika znanja obično pretpostavljaju da su entiteti uključeni u povezan prostor i da odnosi znače sličnost. Međutim, korisni grafici znanja često sadrže različite entitate i odnose (sa potencijalno nesavršenim korporama) koji se ne slažu sa ovim pretpostavkama. Za prevladanje tih ograničenja, predstavljamo funkcionalnu retroficiranje, okvir koji generalizuje trenutne metode retroficiranja, izrazito modelirajući pare odnose. Naš okvir može izravno uključiti razne kazne funkcije koje su prethodno razvijene za završetak grafika znanja. Dalje, omogućava korisnicima da kodiraju, nauče i izvuku informacije o semanticima veze. Predstavljamo i linearne i neuralne instancije okvira. Funkcionalno retroficiranje značajno iznosi postojeće metode retroficiranja kompleksnih grafika znanja i ne gubi preciznost na jednostavnijim graficima (u kojima odnosi znači sličnost). Konačno, pokazujemo korisnost okvira predviđanjem novih par liječenja bolestima droge u velikom, kompleksnom grafiku znanja zdravlja.', 'si': 'දැනගැනීම් ග්\u200dරාෆික්ස් තමයි විශේෂ සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධතාවක් සංවිධානය කරන්න, ඒත් ඒක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් මේ ග්\u200d ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානයක් ආපහු ප්\u200dරධානයක් පිළිගන්න විදිහාවක් දැනගන්නේ දන්න ග්\u200dරාෆ් ග්\u200dරාෆ් ගැන සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට ප්\u200dරධාන නමුත්, ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ දන්නවත් විවිධ අයිති සහ සම්බන්ධතාවක් තියෙනවා (සමහර විශ්වාසයෙන් අනිත් අයිත මේ සීමාවල් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරධානයක් ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න, ප්\u200dරධානයක් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරධානයක අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්පූර්ණයෙන් දැනගන්න පුළුවන්  ඊට පස්සේ, ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ට සෙමාන්ටික් ගැන සංවේදනය ගැන සංවේදනය සඳහා සංවේදනය කරන්න, ඉගෙන ගන් අපි ක්\u200dරියාමාර්ගයේ ලේනියර් සහ න්\u200dයූරල් ස්ථානය දෙන්නම් පෙන්වන්නේ. Comment අන්තිමේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා විශාල, සංකෘතිය ස්වාස්ත්වය දන්න අලුත් වෛද්\u200dය ව්\u200dයාපාරයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්', 'ur': 'علم graphs are a versatile framework to encode richly structured data relationships, but it can be challenging to combine these graphs with unstructured data. ایک علم گراف کی ساختاری کے لئے پیش آموزش یافتہ ایٹنی کی روشنی کے مطابق طریقے معلوم ہوتے ہیں کہ ایٹنی ایک جگہ میں پیدا کیے جاتے ہیں اور یہ رابطہ برابر ہے. اگرچہ مفید علم گراف کبھی مختلف فرقے اور رشتہ دار ہیں جو ان گمانوں کے خلاف نہیں ہیں۔ یہ محدودیتوں پر غالب ہونے کے لئے، ہم فرقشن ریٹروفیٹ ڈال دیتے ہیں، ایک فرقم جرائل کرتا ہے جو ایک جوڑی رابطہ کے مطابق مشخص طریقے سے موجود کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے فرمیٹ سیدھی طرح سے پہلے علم گراف کامل کے لئے طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے مجازات کا فعالیت شامل کر سکتا ہے. اس کے بعد، یہ کارساز کو سیمانٹیکس کے بارے میں سیکھنے، سیکھنے اور اضافہ کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے. ہم چوکاٹ کی linear اور neural instantiations دونوں کو پیش کرتے ہیں۔ فنقشلیک پھیر پھیر پھیر نے بہت زیادہ مشکل علم گراف کے بارے میں موجود پھیر پھیر دینے کے طریقے ہیں اور اس سے زیادہ ساده گراف کے بارے میں کوئی دقیق ضائع نہیں کرتا (جہاں رابطہ برابر ہے). آخر میں، ہم نے فرمیک کا فائدہ دکھایا ہے، ایک بڑے، پیچیدہ سلامتی علم گراف میں نو ڈراگ بیماری کے درمانی کے جوڑوں کی پیش بینی کے ذریعہ۔', 'uz': "Maʼlumot grafiklari o'rtacha tuzilgan maʼlumot bogʻlamalarini kodlash mumkin, lekin bu grafiklarni yaratilmagan maʼlumotlar bilan birlashtirish qiymati mumkin. Name Lekin foydalanuvchi taʼrif grafiklarida ko'pincha turli narsalar va bog'liqlar bor. Bu g'oyalar bilan birlashmaydi. Ushbu chegaralarni oshirish uchun, biz joriy qayta olish usullarini aniqlashni foydalanishimiz mumkin. Bizning freymimiz ilmiy grafik toʻldirish uchun oldin bir necha xil ciqaab funksiyalarini boshqarishi mumkin. Koʻrsatganda, bu foydalanuvchilarga bogʻ'liq semantika haqida maʼlumotni kodlash, o'rganish va olish imkoniyatlariga ruxsat beradi. Biz chegara va neyrolik holatlarini ko'rsamiz. Comment Oxirida, biz yangi narsalar kasalliklarning qo'llarini ko'rsatganimizni ko'rsatdik, katta murakkab, murakkab bog'liq tibbiy taʼminot grafikda.", 'vi': 'Kiến thức biểu đồ là một cơ sở đa dạng để mã hóa các mối quan hệ dữ liệu giàu có cấu trúc, nhưng có thể thách thức khi kết hợp các biểu đồ với các dữ liệu không xây dựng. Những phương pháp chỉnh sửa lại các đơn vị được huấn luyện trước cấu trúc của một đồ thị tri thức thường cho rằng các thực thể bị nhúng vào một không gian kết nối và rằng quan hệ có vẻ giống nhau. Tuy nhiên, biểu đồ kiến thức hữu ích thường chứa các thực thể và quan hệ khác nhau (với các tập đoàn tiềm ẩn) mà không phù hợp với các giả thiết này. Để vượt qua những giới hạn này, chúng tôi giới thiệu bộ cấu trúc Ứng dụng, một bộ khung tổng hợp hoá phương pháp sửa đổi hiện thời bằng cách hiển thị kết hợp mối quan hệ. Cơ chế của chúng tôi có thể trực tiếp kết hợp các chức năng hình phạt khác nhau được phát triển để hoàn thành đồ thị kiến thức. Nó cho phép người dùng mã hóa, học hỏi và trích dẫn thông tin về ngữ pháp liên quan. Chúng tôi giới thiệu sự lập tức tuyến tính và thần kinh của khung hình. Bộ sửa chữa hàm lượng còn siêu tiến bộ hơn các phương pháp sửa chữa bằng các biểu đồ kiến thức phức tạp và không có sự chính xác trên các biểu đồ đơn giản (trong đó mối quan hệ có liên hệ giống nhau). Cuối cùng, chúng tôi chứng minh hữu ích của khung cảnh bằng cách dự đoán các cặp điều trị chống ma túy mới trong một đồ thị kiến thức sức khỏe phức tạp, rộng lớn.', 'bg': 'Графите на знанието са гъвкава рамка за кодиране на богато структурирани връзки с данни, но може да бъде трудно да се комбинират тези графики с неструктурирани данни. Методите за модернизиране на предварително обучените представи на субектите към структурата на графиката на знанието обикновено предполагат, че субектите са вградени в свързано пространство и че отношенията предполагат сходство. Въпреки това, полезните графики на знанието често съдържат различни субекти и взаимоотношения (с потенциално разединени базови корпуси), които не съответстват на тези предположения. За да преодолеем тези ограничения, представяме рамка, която обобщава настоящите методи за модернизиране чрез изрично моделиране на двойки отношения. Нашата рамка може директно да включва различни функции за дузпа по двойки, разработени преди това за завършване на знанието графика. Освен това, тя позволява на потребителите да кодират, научават и извличат информация за семантиката на отношенията. Представяме както линейни, така и невронни инстанции на рамката. Функционалното модернизиране значително превъзхожда съществуващите методи за модернизиране на сложни графики на знанието и не губи точност при по-прости графики (при които отношенията предполагат сходство). И накрая, демонстрираме полезността на рамката чрез прогнозиране на нови двойки лечение лекарство-болест в голяма, сложна графика за здравни знания.', 'hr': 'Grafikovi znanja su versativni okvir za kodiranje bogatski strukturiranih odnosa podataka, ali može biti izazovno kombinirati ove grafike s neostrukturiranim podacima. Metode za obnovu predobučenih predstavljanja subjekta strukturi grafika znanja obično pretpostavljaju da su subjekti ugrađeni u povezanom prostoru i da su odnosi slični. Međutim, korisni znanstveni grafici često sadrže različite entitate i odnose (sa potencijalno rastavljenim tijelom) koji se ne slažu s tim pretpostavkama. Za prevladanje tih ograničenja, predstavljamo funkcionalnu retroficiranje, okvir koji generalizira trenutne metode retroficiranja izrazito modelirajući pare odnose. Naš okvir može izravno uključiti razne kazne funkcije koje su prethodno razvijene za završavanje grafika znanja. Dalje omogućava korisnicima kodirati, naučiti i izvući informacije o semanticima veze. Predstavljamo i linearne i neuralne instancije okvira. Funkcionalno retroficiranje značajno iznosi postojeće metode retroficiranja kompleksnih grafika znanja i ne gubi točnost na jednostavnijim graficima (u kojima se odnosi čine sličnost). Konačno, pokazujemo korisnost okvira predviđanjem novih par liječenja bolestima lijekova u velikom, složenom grafiku znanja zdravlja.', 'nl': 'Kennisdiagrammen zijn een veelzijdig framework om rijk gestructureerde gegevensrelaties te coderen, maar het kan een uitdaging zijn om deze grafieken te combineren met ongestructureerde gegevens. Methoden voor het retrofitten van vooraf getrainde entiteitsrepresentaties aan de structuur van een kennisgrafiek gaan meestal ervan uit dat entiteiten zijn ingebed in een verbonden ruimte en dat relaties overeenkomsten impliceren. Nuttige kennisgrafieken bevatten echter vaak diverse entiteiten en relaties (met mogelijk disjoint onderliggende corpora) die niet overeenkomen met deze veronderstellingen. Om deze beperkingen te overwinnen presenteren we Functional Retrofitting, een framework dat huidige retrofittingmethoden generaliseert door expliciet parerwise relaties te modelleren. Ons framework kan direct een verscheidenheid aan pairwise penalty functies integreren die eerder ontwikkeld zijn voor het voltooien van kennisgrafieken. Bovendien kunnen gebruikers informatie over relatiesemantiek coderen, leren en extraheren. We presenteren zowel lineaire als neurale instanties van het framework. Functional Retrofitting overtreft significant bestaande retrofittingmethoden op complexe kennisgrafieken en verliest geen nauwkeurigheid op eenvoudigere grafieken (waarbij relaties wel overeenkomsten impliceren). Ten slotte demonstreren we het nut van het raamwerk door nieuwe geneesmiddelen-ziekte behandelingsparen te voorspellen in een grote, complexe gezondheidskennisgrafiek.', 'da': 'Vidensgrafer er en alsidig ramme til at kode rigt strukturerede datarelationer, men det kan være udfordrende at kombinere disse grafer med ustrukturerede data. Metoder til eftermontering af præuddannede enhedsrepræsentationer til strukturen i en vidensgraf antager typisk, at enheder er indlejret i et forbundet rum, og at relationer indebærer lighed. Men nyttige vidensgrafer indeholder ofte forskellige enheder og relationer (med potentielt splittede underliggende corpora), som ikke er i overensstemmelse med disse antagelser. For at overvinde disse begrænsninger præsenterer vi Functional Retrofitting, en ramme, der generaliserer nuværende eftermonteringsmetoder ved eksplicit at modellere parvise relationer. Vores ramme kan direkte indarbejde en række parvise straffunktioner, der tidligere er udviklet til vidensgraffærdiggørelse. Desuden giver det brugerne mulighed for at kode, lære og udtrække oplysninger om relation semantik. Vi præsenterer både lineære og neurale instantier af rammen. Funktionel eftermontering overgår betydeligt eksisterende eftermonteringsmetoder på komplekse vidensgrafer og mister ingen nøjagtighed på enklere grafer (hvor relationerne indebærer lighed). Endelig demonstrerer vi nytten af rammen ved at forudsige nye lægemiddelbehandlingspar i en stor, kompleks sundhedsvidensgraf.', 'fa': 'گرافیک دانش یک چهارچوب متفاوتی برای رمز رابطه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای بسیار ساخته شده است، ولی می\u200cتواند این گرافیک\u200cها را با داده\u200cهای ساخته\u200cای ترکیب کند سخت\u200cتر باشد. روش\u200cهایی برای بازسازی نمایش\u200cهایی پیش آموزش\u200cشده به ساختار یک گراف دانش معمولاً می\u200cتوانند شرکت\u200cها در فضای متصل قرار گرفته\u200cاند و این رابطه\u200cها شبیه است. ولی گرافهای دانش مفید اغلب دارند متفاوت و رابطه\u200cهای متفاوت (با احتمالا متفاوت شرکت\u200cهای زیر شرکت) که با این فرضیات موافقت نمی\u200cکنند. برای تغییر این محدودیت، ما یک چهارچوبی را برای تغییر دادن این محدودیت، با مدل مشخص رابطه\u200cهای جفتی را نشان می\u200cدهیم. چهارچوب ما می تواند مستقیماً کارهای مختلف مجازات دو طرح را برای کامل گراف دانش توسعه کرد. در ضمن، به کاربران اجازه می دهد که اطلاعات رابطه به سمانتیکی\u200cها را رمز، یاد بگیرند و اخراج کنند. ما هر دو موقعیت خطی و عصبی از چهارچوب را نشان می دهیم. بازسازی عملی به طور معنی از روش بازسازی موجود در گراف دانش پیچیده\u200cها بیشتر از آن انجام می\u200cدهد و هیچ دقیقیتی در گراف\u200cهای ساده\u200cتری از دست نمی\u200cدهد (در آن رابطه\u200cها معنی شباهت می\u200cباشد). بالاخره، ما استفاده از چهارچوب را با پیش بینی جفت درمان بیماری جدید در یک گراف دانش سلامتی بزرگ و پیچیده نشان می دهیم.', 'id': 'Graf pengetahuan merupakan rangka versatil untuk mengkode hubungan data yang sangat struktur, tetapi dapat menjadi tantangan untuk menggabungkan grafik ini dengan data yang tidak struktur. Metode untuk mengatur kembali representation entitas yang terlatih sebelumnya ke struktur grafik pengetahuan biasanya berasumsi bahwa entitas terlibat dalam ruang terhubung dan bahwa hubungan berarti persamaan. Namun, grafik pengetahuan berguna sering mengandung entitas dan hubungan yang berbeda (dengan corpora yang berpotensi tidak bersatu) yang tidak sesuai dengan asumsi-asumsi ini. To overcome these limitations, we present Functional Retrofitting, a framework that generalizes current retrofitting methods by explicitly modeling pairwise relations.  Bingkai kita dapat secara langsung mengangkut berbagai fungsi hukuman pasangan yang sebelumnya dikembangkan untuk menyelesaikan grafik pengetahuan. Lagipula, itu memungkinkan pengguna untuk mengkode, belajar, dan mengekstrak informasi tentang hubungan semantik. Kami memperkenalkan kedua instansi linear dan saraf dari kerangka. Fungsi Retrofitting secara signifikan melebihi metode retrofitting yang ada pada grafik pengetahuan kompleks dan tidak kehilangan akurasi pada grafik yang lebih sederhana (di mana hubungan berarti persamaan). Akhirnya, kami menunjukkan utilitas dari kerangka dengan memprediksi pasangan pengobatan penyakit obat baru dalam grafik pengetahuan kesehatan yang besar dan kompleks.', 'ko': '지식 도면은 통용되는 구조로 풍부한 구조화된 데이터 관계를 인코딩할 수 있지만 이런 도면을 비구조화된 데이터와 결합하기는 어려울 수 있다.미리 훈련된 실체 표현법을 지식도 구조로 바꾸는 방법은 일반적으로 실체가 연결 공간에 박혀 있다고 가정하고 관계는 유사성을 암시한다.그러나 유용한 지식도는 일반적으로 서로 다른 실체와 관계(잠재적으로 교차하지 않는 기초 자료 라이브러리)를 포함하는데 이런 실체와 관계는 이런 가설에 부합되지 않는다.이러한 한계성을 극복하기 위해 우리는 기능성 개조를 제기했다. 이것은 현식 모델링을 통해 관계를 형성하여 현재의 개조 방법을 요약하는 틀이다.우리의 프레임워크는 이전에 지식도를 완성하기 위해 개발된 각종 쌍벌칙 함수를 직접 포함할 수 있다.그 밖에 사용자가 관계의 의미에 대한 정보를 인코딩하고 학습하며 추출할 수 있도록 한다.우리는 이 틀의 선형과 신경 실례화를 제시했다.복잡한 지식 도면에서 기능성 개조는 기존의 개조 방법보다 현저히 우수하고 간단한 도면(관계는 확실히 유사성을 의미한다)에서 정확성을 잃지 않는다.마지막으로 우리는 대형, 복잡한 건강지식도에서 신약-질병-치료 쌍을 예측함으로써 이 틀의 실용성을 증명한다.', 'de': 'Wissensgraphen sind ein vielseitiges Framework, um reich strukturierte Datenbeziehungen zu kodieren, aber es kann schwierig sein, diese Diagramme mit unstrukturierten Daten zu kombinieren. Methoden zur Nachrüstung vortrainierter Entitätsrepräsentationen an die Struktur eines Wissensgraphen gehen typischerweise davon aus, dass Entitäten in einem verbundenen Raum eingebettet sind und dass Beziehungen Ähnlichkeit implizieren. Nützliche Wissensgraphen enthalten jedoch oft verschiedene Entitäten und Beziehungen (mit potenziell disjunkten zugrunde liegenden Korpora), die diesen Annahmen nicht entsprechen. Um diese Einschränkungen zu überwinden, stellen wir Functional Retrofitting vor, ein Framework, das aktuelle Retrofitting-Methoden durch explizite Modellierung paarweiter Beziehungen verallgemeinert. Unser Framework kann eine Vielzahl von paarweisen Straffunktionen direkt integrieren, die zuvor für die Vervollständigung von Wissensdiagrammen entwickelt wurden. Darüber hinaus ermöglicht es Benutzern, Informationen über Beziehungssemantik zu kodieren, zu lernen und zu extrahieren. Wir präsentieren sowohl lineare als auch neuronale Instanziierungen des Frameworks. Functional Retrofitting übertrifft die bestehenden Retrofitting-Methoden auf komplexen Wissensgraphen deutlich und verliert bei einfacheren Graphen (bei denen Zusammenhänge Ähnlichkeit implizieren) keine Genauigkeit. Abschließend demonstrieren wir die Nützlichkeit des Frameworks, indem wir neue Medikamente-Krankheiten-Behandlungspaare in einem großen, komplexen Gesundheitswissensgraph vorhersagen.', 'af': "Kenning grafieke is 'n verskillende raamwerk om richtig struktureerde data verhouding te kodeer, maar dit kan wees vanskeilig om hierdie grafieke met onstruktureerde data te kombinerer. Metode vir herverrafting van vooraf-onderwerpende entiteite voorstellings na die struktuur van 'n kennis graaf tipies aanvaar dat entiteite in 'n verbind spasie ingesluit word en dat verwante beteken gelykenis. Maar gebruiklike kennis grafieke bevat dikwels verskillende entiteite en relasies (met potensieel afgesluit ondersteunde korpora) wat nie met hierdie aanvaardes ooreenkomstig nie. Om hierdie beperkings te oorwin, laat ons voorsien Funksie Herverrafting, 'n raamwerk wat die huidige herverrafting metodes genereliseer deur eksplisiese modeling van parewyse relasies. Ons raamwerk kan direk 'n verskillende parewyse straf funksies voorheen ontwikkel vir kennis graf voltooiing. Verder, dit laat gebruikers toe om inligting oor verwanting semantieke te kodeer, leer en uitpak. Ons stel beide lineêre en neurale instansies van die raamwerk voor. Funksie Herstelling betekeurig uitvoer bestaande herstelling metodes op komplekse kennis grafieke en verloor geen presisie op eenvoudige grafieke (waarin relasies beteken gelykheid). Eindelik vertoon ons die nuttigheid van die raamwerk deur die voorskou van nuwe narkotika-sykdom-behandeling paar in 'n groot, kompleks gesondige kennis grafiek.", 'sq': "Grafiket e njohurive janë një kuadër versatil për të koduar marrëdhënie të dhënave të strukturuara të pasura, por mund të jetë sfidë për të kombinuar këto grafikë me të dhëna të paistrukturuara. Metodat për përsëritjen e përfaqësimeve të njësive të paratrajnuara në strukturën e një grafiku të njohurive zakonisht supozojnë se njësitë janë të përfshira në një hapësirë të lidhur dhe se marrëdhëniet nënkuptojnë ngjashmëri. Megjithatë, grafikët e njohurive të dobishme shpesh përmbajnë njësi të ndryshme dhe marrëdhënie (me corpora të përbashkëta të mundshme) që nuk janë në përputhje me këto supozime. Për t'i kapërcyer këto kufizime, ne paraqesim Rendërtimin Funksional, një kuadër që gjeneralizon metodat e tanishme të rindërtimit duke modeluar eksplicitisht marrëdhëniet e njëri-tjetrit. Korniza jonë mund të përfshijë drejtpërdrejt një shumëllojshmëri të funksioneve penale të palëvizshme të zhvilluara më parë për përfundimin e grafikut të njohurive. Më tej, lejon përdoruesit të kodojnë, të mësojnë dhe të nxjerrin informacion rreth lidhjeve semantike. Ne prezantojmë si instanca lineare ashtu edhe neuronale të kuadrit. Përkthimi funksional ekziston në mënyrë të konsiderueshme më tepër se metodat ekzistuese të përshtatjes në grafikat e njohurive komplekse dhe nuk humb saktësi në grafikat më të thjeshta (në të cilat marrëdhëniet nënkuptojnë ngjashmëri). Më në fund, ne demonstrojmë dobinë e kuadrit duke parashikuar çifte të reja trajtimi të sëmundjeve të drogës në një grafik të madh dhe kompleks të njohurive shëndetësore.", 'sw': 'Takwimu za maarifa ni mfumo mzuri wa kutangaza mahusiano ya taarifa zilizotengenezwa kwa kiasi kikubwa, lakini inaweza kuwa changamoto ya kuunganisha picha hizi kwa taarifa zisizo na ujenzi. Njia za kupeleka vitu vya vifaa vya awali vya mafunzo kwa muundo wa ramani ya maarifa kwa kawaida zinadhani kuwa vitu vinavyowekwa katika nafasi inayohusiana na hilo mahusiano yanaonyesha usawa. Hata hivyo, picha za maarifa zinazofaa mara nyingi zina vitu mbalimbali na mahusiano (kwa uwezekano wa kuvunja kampuni ya msingi) ambazo hazijubaliana na dhana hizi. To overcome these limitations, we present Functional Retrofitting, a framework that generalizes current retrofitting methods by explicitly modeling pairwise relations.  Mfumo wetu unaweza kuingiza moja kwa moja kazi mbalimbali za adhabu mbili zilizotengenezwa kwa ajili ya kuumiza picha za maarifa. Zaidi ya hayo, inaruhusu watumiaji kutangaza, kujifunza, na kutoa taarifa kuhusu mifumo ya mahusiano. Tunaonyesha vifo vya mistari na taratibu za ubongo. Kifungu cha kurejesha kwa kiasi kikubwa kinaonyesha njia za kurejesha kuwepo kwenye picha tata za maarifa na hakuna uhakika juu ya picha rahisi (ambazo mahusiano yanamaanisha usawa). Finally, we demonstrate the utility of the framework by predicting new drug-disease treatment pairs in a large, complex health knowledge graph.', 'tr': 'Bilim grafikleri düýbünden düzümlenmiş maglumat baglaýyşyny kodlamak üçin bir düýbünden bir çerçewdir, ýöne bu grafikleri düzümlenmedik maglumatlar bilen birleşdirmek kynçylyk edip biler. Öňki bilim grafynyň strukturyny gaýd etmek üçin ullanýan zatlaryň yöntemleri bilim grafynyň strukturyna golaýlaýar. Ýöne ýöne gowy bilim grafiklerinde köplenç dürli bir zatlar we baglaşyklar bar (köpüräk köpüräk köpüräk bolan korpora bilen meňzeşdirmek üçin) bu pikirlere meňzeýär. Bu çykyşlary üstine geçirmek üçin, biz Funksiýaly gaýşartma üçin, häzirki ýene-gaýşartma yöntemlerini belli bir şekilde çift baglaýyşlary modellendirir. Biziň çerýämiz bilim grafümi tamamlamak üçin öňünden öňünden gelişmiş bir näçe çift sanat funksiýasyny düzenleyebilir. Ullançylar semantik baglaýyşy barada ködlemeler, öwrenmeler we açmaklaryna rugsat berýär. Çaklyň hatlarynyň hem çyzgyly we neural instansiýasyny görkeýäris. Funksiýal gaýşartma işlemler kompleks bilgi grafiklerinde bolan ýene-täk taýýarlama yöntemleri çykar we munuň esasy grafiklerde hiç hili dogrylygyny ýitir. Soňunda, biz täze näme-näme hastalık tedavi etmegi täze uly, sarpsyz saglyk bilgi grafisinde üýtgetmek üçin çarpyşyrdyk.', 'am': 'እውቀት ግንኙነት ሀብት የዳታ ግንኙነትን ለማቀናቀል የሚደረግ የክፍተት ነው፤ ግን እነዚህን ካርፎች በተመሠረቱ ዳታዎች ለመቀላቀል ይችላል፡፡ ምርጫዎች ነገር ግን የጠቃሚ እውቀት ቀፎች ብዙ ጊዜ ብዙዎችን አካባቢዎች እና ግንኙነትን (በቻልነት ከኮርፖራ በታች የሚቆርጡ) ይኖራሉ፡፡ እነዚህን ግንኙነት ለማሸንፋት፣ የሥርዓት ፍሬማት፣ ሁኔታ የሚቀበልን ሥርዓት በመግለጥ ሁለትን አስተያየት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሥርዓታችን ፍሬማችን አስቀድሞ ለእውቀት ቀፍ ፍላጎችን ለመጨመር የሚችል ሁለት ዓይነቶች የጥበብ ስርዓት ሥርዓት ማቀናቀል ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም የተጠቃሚ የግንኙነት ስሜቲካ ማድረግ፣ ማሩ እና መረጃዎችን ለማውጣት ይፈቅዳል፡፡ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት እና የውሃዊ ግንኙነት እናቀርባለን፡፡ ቦታ Finally, we demonstrate the utility of the framework by predicting new drug-disease treatment pairs in a large, complex health knowledge graph.', 'hy': "Գիտելու գրաֆիկները բազմազան շրջանակներ են հարուստ կառուցվածքավորված տվյալների հարաբերությունների կոդավորման համար, բայց կարող է դժվար լինել համադրել այս գրաֆիկները անկառուցվածքավորված տվյալների հետ: Methods for retrofitting pre-trained entity representations to the structure of a knowledge graph typically assume that entities are embedded in a connected space and that relations imply similarity.  Այնուամենայնիվ, օգտակար գիտելիքների գրաֆիկները հաճախ պարունակում են բազմազան հաստատություններ և հարաբերություններ (պոտենցիալ բաժանված հիմնական կորպորա հետ), որոնք չեն համապատասխանում այս ենթադրություններին: Այս սահմանափակումներին հաղթահարելու համար մենք ներկայացնում ենք Ֆունկցիոնալ վերաբերյալ արտադրողականությունը, մի շրջանակ, որը ընդհանուր է ընդհանուր առկա վերափոխյալ մեթոդներ' բացատրաբար մոդելավորելով զու Մեր շրջանակը կարող է անմիջապես ներառել մի շարք զույգչափ պատիժի գործառույթներ, որոնք նախկինում զարգացել են գիտելիքների գրաֆիկի ավարտին: Further, it allows users to encode, learn, and extract information about relation semantics.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նաև գծային և նյարդային հատվածները: Functional Retrofitting significantly outperforms existing retrofitting methods on complex knowledge graphs and loses no accuracy on simpler graphs (in which relations do imply similarity).  Վերջապես, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս շրջանակի օգտակարությունը, կանխատեսելով նոր թմրադեղերի հիվանդությունների բուժման զույգեր մի մեծ, բարդ առողջապահության գիտելիքների գրաֆիկի մեջ:", 'bn': 'জ্ঞান গ্রাফ সমৃদ্ধ তথ্য সম্পর্ক এনকোড করার জন্য একটি বিভিন্ন ফ্রেম, কিন্তু এই গ্রাফ্রাফ অক্ষরিত তথ্য সহযোগিতা করার চ্যালেঞ্জ। পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত বস্তুর প্রতিনিধিত্ব পুনরায় প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার পদ্ধতি সাধারণত একটি জ্ঞান গ্রাফের কাঠামোর কারণে ধারণা করে যে বস্তুগুলো একটি সং তবে কার্যকর জ্ঞানের গ্রাফ প্রায়শই বিভিন্ন বস্তু এবং সম্পর্ক রয়েছে (সম্ভাব্য কোর্পোরা ভিতরে যুক্ত করে) যা এই ধারণার সাথে একমত নয়। এই সীমাবদ্ধ করার জন্য আমরা কার্যকলাপ পুনর্গঠন উপস্থাপন করি, একটি ফ্রেম যা স্পষ্টভাবে জুড়ে জোড়া সম্পর্কের মাধ্যমে বর্তমান পুনর্বিতরণ পদ্ধ আমাদের ফ্রেমের কাঠামো সরাসরি জ্ঞান গ্রাফ সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য পূর্বে উন্নয়নের বিভিন্ন ধরনের জোড়া শাস্তি ফাংশনের মধ এছাড়াও এটি ব্যবহারকারীদের এনকোড, শিক্ষা এবং সম্পর্কের সেমেন্টিক্স সম্পর্কে তথ্য বের করার অনুমতি দেয়। আমরা এই ফ্রেমের দুটোই লাইনিয়ার এবং নিরাউরিয়াল অবস্থান উপস্থাপন করি। কার্যকলাপ পুনর্গঠনের বিশেষ করে বিভিন্ন জ্ঞানের গ্রাফের উপর বিদ্যমান পুনরায় ফিরিয়ে নেওয়ার পদ্ধতি প্রদর্শন করে এবং সাধারণ গ্রাফের কোন সঠিক ক শেষ পর্যন্ত, আমরা এই ফ্রেমের ব্যবহার প্রদর্শন করি নতুন মাদক-রোগের চিকিৎসা জোড়ার প্রতি প্রত্যাখ্যান করে একটি বিশাল, জটিল স্বা', 'az': "Bilim grafikləri çox müxtəlif məlumat bağlantılarını kodlamaq üçün versatil bir framewordur, amma bu grafikləri müxtəlif məlumatlarla birləşdirmək çətin olar. Əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş entitlərin məsələlərini elm grafının qurulması üçün yenidən yenidən təhsil etmə metodları genellik olaraq entitələrin bağlı bir yer içində daxil edildiklərini və bu ilişkiler kimi deyirlər. Lakin mənfəətli elm grafiklərində çox müxtəlif məxluqat və əlaqələr vardır ki, bu zənnlərə uyğun deyillər. Bu sınırları üstün etmək üçün, biz Funksiyal Retrofitting'i göstəririk, həmin şəkildə yenilənmək metodlarını a çıq-aydın modelləşdirən bir çerçivi. Bizim qurğumuz bilgi grafik tamamlama üçün əvvəlcə təhsil edilmiş cüt cüt cəzas funksiyalarını düzgün bir-birinə qatır. Daha sonra, istifadəçilər semantik haqqında məlumatları kodlamağa, öyrənməyə və çıxarmağa imkan verir. Biz həmçinin çizgi və nöral istiqamətlərini göstəririk. Funksiyonal Retrofitting kompleks bilgi grafikləri barəsində mövcud olaraq yenidən yenidən yenidən yenidən yenidən yenilənmək metodlarını aşkar edir və daha basit grafiklər barəsində heç bir dəqiqliyi yox edir. Sonunda, çox, kompleks sağlıq elmi grafından yeni ilaç hastalığı təhsil etməklə, qurğunun istifadəsini göstəririk.", 'ca': "Els gràfics del coneixement són un marc versàtil per codificar relacions de dades ricament estructuradas, però pot ser difícil combinar aquests gràfics amb dades no estructuradas. Métodes per retrofittar representacions d'entitats pré-capacitades a l'estructura d'un gràfic de coneixement normalment suposen que les entitats estan incorporades en un espai connectat i que les relacions impliquen similitud. No obstant això, els gràfics útils de coneixement sovint contenen diverses entitats i relacions (amb corpores subjacents potencialment descomponents) que no estan d'acord amb aquestes suposicions. Per superar aquestes limitacions, presentem una estructura que generalitza els mètodes actuals de retrofitting modelant explícitament relacions parelles. El nostre marc pot incorporar directament una varietat de funcions de penalitat parelles desenvolupades anteriorment per a completar el gràfic del coneixement. També permet als usuaris codificar, aprendre i extrair informació sobre les relacions semàntiques. Presentam instanciacions linears i neuronals del marc. La retrofitació funcional supera significativament els mètodes de retrofitació existents en gràfics complexes de coneixement i no perd precisió en gràfics més simples (en què les relacions impliquen similitud). Finalment, demostrem l'utilitat del marc predint noves parelles de tractament contra les malalties medicamentoses en un gràfic de coneixement sanitari gran i complexe.", 'cs': 'Znalostní grafy jsou univerzální rámec pro kódování bohatě strukturovaných datových vztahů, ale kombinovat tyto grafy s nestrukturovanými daty může být náročné. Metody pro modernizaci předškolených reprezentací entit do struktury znalostního grafu obvykle předpokládají, že entity jsou vloženy do propojeného prostoru a že vztahy implikují podobnost. Nicméně užitečné znalostní grafy často obsahují různé entity a vztahy (s potenciálně rozdělenými podkladovými korpusy), které s těmito předpoklady nesouhlasí. Abychom tyto omezení překonali, představujeme funkční retrofitting, rámec, který zobecňuje současné metody retrofitting explicitním modelováním vztahů párových. Náš framework může přímo zahrnovat různé funkce párových penaltů, které byly dříve vyvinuty pro dokončení znalostního grafu. Dále umožňuje uživatelům kódovat, učit se a extrahovat informace o sémantice vztahů. Představujeme lineární i nervové instancie rámce. Funkční Retrofitting výrazně překonává stávající metody modernizace na složitých znalostních grafech a neztrácí žádnou přesnost na jednodušších grafech (v nichž vztahy naznačují podobnost). Nakonec demonstrujeme užitečnost tohoto rámce predikcí nových léčebných párů v rozsáhlém, komplexním grafu znalostí o zdraví.', 'et': 'Teadmisgraafikud on mitmekülgne raamistik rikkalikult struktureeritud andmesuhete kodeerimiseks, kuid nende graafikute kombineerimine struktureerimata andmetega võib olla keeruline. Meetodid eelnevalt koolitatud üksuste esituste moderniseerimiseks teadmisgraafiku struktuurile eeldavad tavaliselt, et üksused on ühendatud ruumi ja et seosed tähendavad sarnasust. Kuid kasulikud teadmiste graafikud sisaldavad sageli erinevaid üksusi ja suhteid (potentsiaalselt lahutatud aluskorpustega), mis ei vasta nendele eeldustele. Nende piirangute ületamiseks tutvustame funktsionaalset moderniseerimist, raamistikku, mis üldistab praeguseid moderniseerimismeetodeid, modelleerides selgesõnaliselt paariühiseid suhteid. Meie raamistik võib otseselt hõlmata mitmesuguseid paari karistusfunktsioone, mis on varem välja töötatud teadmiste graafiku lõpetamiseks. Lisaks võimaldab see kasutajatel kodeerida, õppida ja ekstraheerida teavet seossemantika kohta. Esitleme raamistiku nii lineaarseid kui ka neuraalseid instantiatsioone. Funktsionaalne moderniseerimine ületab oluliselt olemasolevaid moderniseerimismeetodeid keerukatel teadmiste graafikutel ja ei kaota täpsust lihtsamatel graafikutel (milles seosed tähendavad sarnasust). Lõpuks näitame raamistiku kasulikkust, prognoosides uusi ravimite ja haiguste ravipaare suures, keerukas tervisealaste teadmiste graafikus.', 'fi': 'Tietograafit ovat monipuolinen kehys rikkaasti jäsenneltyjen datasuhteiden koodaamiseen, mutta näiden graafien yhdistäminen strukturoimattomaan dataan voi olla haastavaa. Menetelmät esikoulutettujen entiteettiesitysten jälkiasentamiseksi tietokaavion rakenteeseen olettavat tyypillisesti, että entiteetit ovat sulautuneet toisiinsa liittyvään tilaan ja että suhteet merkitsevät samankaltaisuutta. Hyödylliset tietokaaviot sisältävät kuitenkin usein erilaisia kokonaisuuksia ja suhteita (mahdollisesti hajanaisia taustalla olevia korpusia), jotka eivät ole näiden oletusten mukaisia. Näiden rajoitusten voittamiseksi esittelemme Functional Retrofitting -kehyksen, joka yleistää nykyiset jälkiasennusmenetelmät mallintamalla yksiselitteisesti pareittain suhteita. Kehyksemme voi sisältää suoraan erilaisia parikohtaisia rangaistustoimintoja, jotka on aiemmin kehitetty tietograafien suorittamiseen. Lisäksi sen avulla käyttäjät voivat koodata, oppia ja poimia tietoja relaatiosemantiikasta. Esitämme sekä lineaarisia että neuraalisia instantiaatioita kehyksestä. Funktionaalinen jälkiasennus on huomattavasti parempi kuin olemassa olevat jälkiasennusmenetelmät monimutkaisilla tietografiikoilla, eikä se menetä tarkkuutta yksinkertaisissa kaavioissa (joissa suhteet merkitsevät samankaltaisuutta). Lopuksi osoitamme viitekehyksen hyödyllisyyden ennustamalla uusia lääke-sairauksien hoitopareja suuressa, monimutkaisessa terveystietokaaviossa.', 'bs': 'Grafiji znanja su versativni okvir za kodiranje bogatski strukturovanih odnosa podataka, ali može biti izazovno kombinirati ove grafike sa neostrukturovanim podacima. Metode za obnovu predobučenih predstavljanja entiteta strukturi grafika znanja obično pretpostavljaju da su entiteti ugrađeni u povezanom prostoru i da odnosi znače sličnost. Međutim, korisni znanstveni grafici često sadrže različite entitate i odnose (sa potencijalno rastavljenim tijelom) koji se ne slažu s tim pretpostavkama. Za prevladanje tih ograničenja, predstavljamo funkcionalnu retroficiranje, okvir koji generalizuje trenutne metode retroficiranja izrazito modelirajući pare odnose. Naš okvir može izravno uključiti razne kazne funkcije koje su prethodno razvijene za završetak grafika znanja. Dalje, omogućava korisnicima da kodiraju, nauče i izvuku informacije o semanticima veze. Predstavljamo i linearne i neuralne instancije okvira. Funkcionalno retroficiranje značajno iznosi postojeće metode retroficiranja kompleksnih grafika znanja i ne gubi preciznost na jednostavnijim graficima (u kojima odnosi znače sličnost). Konačno, pokazujemo korisnost okvira predviđanjem novih par liječenja bolestima lijekova u velikom, kompleksnom grafiku znanja zdravlja.', 'sk': 'Grafi znanja so vsestranski okvir za kodiranje bogato strukturiranih podatkovnih relacij, vendar je lahko težko kombinirati te grafe z nestrukturiranimi podatki. Metode za naknadno prilagajanje predhodno usposobljenih predstavitev entitet strukturi grafa znanja običajno predpostavljajo, da so entitete vgrajene v povezan prostor in da odnosi pomenijo podobnost. Vendar pa uporabni grafi znanja pogosto vsebujejo različne subjekte in odnose (s potencialno ločenimi osnovnimi korpusi), ki niso v skladu s temi predpostavkami. Za premagovanje teh omejitev predstavljamo funkcionalno naknadno opremljanje, okvir, ki posplošuje trenutne metode naknadnega opremljanja z eksplicitnim modeliranjem parih relacij. Naš okvir lahko neposredno vključuje različne funkcije parne kazni, ki so bile predhodno razvite za dokončanje grafov znanja. Poleg tega uporabnikom omogoča kodiranje, učenje in pridobivanje informacij o semantiki relacij. Predstavljamo tako linearne kot nevronske instanciacije okvira. Funkcionalno naknadno opremljanje znatno presega obstoječe metode naknadnega opremljanja na kompleksnih grafih znanja in ne izgubi natančnosti pri preprostejših grafih (pri katerih relacije pomenijo podobnost). Na koncu dokazujemo uporabnost okvira z napovedovanjem novih parov zdravljenja zdravil-bolezni v velikem, kompleksnem grafu zdravstvenega znanja.', 'jv': 'graphs Metdadi kanggo kelas alih dumateng resmi preranisar Nanging, akeh liyo sing dipun diangkat dipun ajeng-ajeng saiki, nik akeh sampeyan karo perusahaan (karo perusahaan dumadho koyo ngono perusahaan sugih) sing ora nganggo perusahaan iki. kanggo ngilanggar limiting iki, kita nguasai nggo rerampungan Foksyon Atomat, kita sembarang nggawe sistem dadi aturan kelas nggawe ngupakan kelas Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem iso nguasai akeh akeh operasi sing dibutuhke karo akeh barang nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe kesempatan. Lahor, iso supoyo pengguna ngkode, liane lan ijol-ijol informasi babagan semanti Awak dhéwé éntuk karo sistem linear lan ajer-ajer iki dadi. Attribute Terus, awak dhéwé éntukne usakno kanggo ngerasakno perbudhakan nganggep kuwi nggawe barang langgar-alam sing gawe kudu, kuwi nggawe barang seneng pisan sing ngerasakno.', 'ha': "Grafyutan ilmi yana wani firam mai daidaita wa kodi da danganta da aka samar da shi kiɗari, kuma amma yana iya zama mai yiwuwa a haɗa wannan grafyutan da data ba'an saje ba. Methodiya da za'a motsa masu tsari wa abun da aka haramta wa zaman-tsari zuwa tsarin graphi na ilmi, yana da ɗabi'a, ana yi zaton an shigar da abubuwa a cikin wani fili da aka haɗa shi kuma wannan mazaɓa yana da daidai. Ko da yaushe, grafyuta mai amfani na da shi yana da manyan abubuwan dabam da mazauni (da mai yiwuwa sunã sãɓa da jama'a a ƙarƙashinta), da ba su yarda da wannan zato ba. To domin ta rinjãye wannan tsari, muna halatar da Shirin Harakar da Akwai Mai Gabatar da Akwai, wata firam wadda ke ƙara hanyoyin ku yanzu da kuma ke sami tsarin mutane biyu bayana. Firammananmu yana iya iya shigar da wasu functionin azãba biyu biyu wanda aka buɗe wa cikakken fassarar fassarar da ilmi. Furan wannan, yana yarda da masu amfani da su kodi, yin amfani da, kuma su sami information about mutane na sami. Muna halatar da duk masu ƙari da neura na firam. Fara mai amfani da shi mai girma yana fitar da hanyoyin retrofitting masu jira kan graphogi masu adadi kuma bã ya tapar da taƙaitacce a kan graphogi masu sauƙi (da mazaɓa suke tambayar daidai). Haƙĩƙa, za mu nuna amfani da firam ko kuma mu yi bayani ga mutane biyu na zama ma'abucin narkoki cikin grafi mai girma, mai kamfata na sanin da za'a sani.", 'he': 'Knowledge graphs are a versatile framework to encode richly structured data relationships, but it can be challenging to combine these graphs with unstructured data.  שיטות שימוש מחדש מייצגים של יחידות מאומנות מראש למבנה של גרף ידע בדרך כלל מניחים כי יחידות מוקמות בחלל מחובר ושיחסים מרמזים על דמיון. עם זאת, גרפי ידע שימושיים לעתים קרובות מכילים יחסים ומגוונים מגוונים (עם גופורה פוטנציאלית פוטנציאלית בסיסית) שלא מתאימים להניחות הללו. כדי להתגבר על ההגבלות האלה, אנו מציגים מחדש פונקציונלי, מסגרת שמגנרליזת שיטות מחדש הנוכחיות על ידי דוגמנים באופן ברור יחסים זוגות. המסגרת שלנו יכולה להכיל באופן ישיר מגוון של תפקידים עונשים זוגות שפותחים קודם כדי להשלים גרף ידע. חוץ מזה, זה מאפשר למשתמשים לקוד, ללמוד ולוציא מידע על מערכת יחסים סמנטיקה. אנחנו מציגים גם תקופות לינריות וגם עצביות של המסגרת. הפונקציונלית מחדש פונקציונלית יוצאת משמעות יותר משיטות מחדש קיימות על גרפי ידע מורכבים ולא מאבדת מדויקה על גרפים פשוטים יותר (שבהם מערכות יחסים מרמזות על דמיון). סוף סוף, אנחנו מראים את היעילות של המסגרת על ידי חיזוי זוגות טיפול חדשים למחלות תרופות בגרף ידע בריאות גדול וממורכב.', 'bo': 'དབྱིན་ཡིག་རིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་གྲངས་སུ་གཞི་རྩལ་བའི་སྒྲིག་བཀོད་པའི་འབྲེལ་བ་དག་གི་སྔོན་ནས་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཐབས་བ་ཡིན། ཐབས་ལམ་གཙོ་བོ་དང་སྔོན་གྱིས་འཛུགས་པའི་དབུགས་ཆ་ཚོའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་བཟོ་བརྩིས་ལ་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྟོབས་ཅན་གྱི་དབྱིབས་འབྲི་ཚིག་རྣམས་ལས་དབྱིབས་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཡོད། To overcome these limitations, we present Functional Retrofitting, a framework that generalizes the current retrofitting methods by explicitly modeling pairwise relations. by explicitly modeling pairs. ང་ཚོའི་གཞུང་ཚབ་གྱིས་གནད་དོན་དམ་ཟབ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ལས་རྩིས་ཕྱོགས་སྣ་ཚོ་ཡང་ཆགས་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། དེ་ལས་ཀྱང་། ལག་ལེན་པ་ཚོས་semantics་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྐོར་གྱི་གསལ་བཤད་དང་བསྒྲགས་བྱེད་ན་ཆོག་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་གཞུང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུ་དང་འགྱུར་བ་གཉིས་པོ་སྟོན་ཡོད། Functional Retrofitting significantly outperforms existing retrofitting methods on complex knowledge graphs and loses no accuracy on simpler graphs (in which relations do imply similarity). མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐྱེས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་ལག་ཁྱེར་གྱི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་སྟོན་བྱས་ན།'}
{'en': 'Context-Sensitive Generation of Open-Domain Conversational Responses', 'es': 'Generación sensible al contexto de respuestas conversacionales de dominio abierto', 'ar': 'الجيل الحساس للسياق لاستجابات المحادثة المفتوحة المجال', 'pt': 'Geração Sensível ao Contexto de Respostas Conversacionais de Domínio Aberto', 'fr': 'Génération contextuelle de réponses conversationnelles dans le domaine ouvert', 'ja': 'オープンドメイン会話レスポンスのコンテキスト依存の生成', 'zh': '上下文相关开放域应之', 'hi': 'ओपन-डोमेन संवादात्मक प्रतिक्रियाओं की संदर्भ-संवेदनशील पीढ़ी', 'ru': 'Контекстно-чувствительная генерация разговорных ответов открытого домена', 'ga': 'Freagraí Comhráite Fearainn Oscailte a Ghiniúint atá íogair ó thaobh Comhthéacs', 'ka': 'კონტექსტის სინტექსტიური გახსნა დიომენის პარამეტრების შექმნა', 'hu': 'Nyílt tartományú beszélgetési válaszok kontextusérzékeny generálása', 'el': 'Δημιουργία απαντήσεων συνομιλίας ανοιχτού τομέα με ευαισθησία στο πλαίσιο', 'kk': 'Ашық доменге қатынау жауаптарының контекст- сезімді жасау', 'it': 'Generazione sensibile al contesto di risposte di conversazione a dominio aperto', 'lt': 'Atviro domeno konversacinių atsakų kūrimas, jautrus kontekstui', 'mk': 'Генерација на контекстно чувствителни одговори на отворен домен', 'ml': 'Context-Sensitive Generation of Open-Domain Conversational Responses', 'ms': 'Jenerasi Konteks-Sensitif Balasan Perbualan Domain Buka', 'mt': 'Ġenerazzjoni Sensitiva għall-Kuntest ta’ Risponsi Konversazzjonali f’Dominju Miftuħ', 'mn': 'Хариулт-сэтгэл мэдрэмжтэй нээлттэй холбоотой хариулт үүсгэх', 'no': 'Generering av samtale mottakar med opna domene', 'pl': 'Generowanie wrażliwych na kontekst odpowiedzi konwersacyjnych w otwartej domenie', 'ro': 'Generarea sensibilă la context de răspunsuri conversaționale în domeniu deschis', 'sr': 'Kontekst-osetljiva generacija otvorenih domena odgovora', 'si': 'සංවේදනය- සංවේදනය නිර්මාණය', 'sv': 'Kontextkänslig generering av konversationssvar med öppna domäner', 'so': 'Generation of open Domain response', 'ta': 'Context-Sensitive Generation of Open-Domain Conversational Responses', 'ur': 'اوپن-ڈومین کی مخالفت کی کنٹکسٹ-سنسیٹیو پیدائش', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Miền tương phản tần tần nhạy', 'da': 'Kontekstfølsom generering af åbne domæner samtaler', 'bg': 'Контекст-чувствително генериране на разговорни отговори с отворен домейн', 'hr': 'Kontekst-osjetljiva generacija otvorenih domena razgovornih odgovora', 'de': 'Kontextsensitive Generierung von Open-Domain Conversational Responses', 'id': 'Generasi Konteks-Sensitif Jawaban Konversasi Domain Buka', 'nl': 'Contextgevoelige generatie van open-domein gespreksreacties', 'ko': '개방역 세션 응답의 상하문 민감성 생성', 'fa': 'نسخه\u200cهای محیط-حساس پاسخ\u200cهای گفتگوی دامنه باز', 'sw': 'Uzalishaji wa Mitandao wa Mazungumzo ya Uwazi', 'tr': 'Aç-Aç Soňlaşma Cevaplar', 'af': 'Konteks- Sensitiewe Generasie van Open- Domein Gespraakte Antwoordes', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i përgjigjeve konversacionale të domenit të hapur i ndjeshëm për kontekstin', 'am': 'የውይይት መድረክ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'খোলা ডোমেইন আলোচনার প্রতিক্রিয়া', 'az': 'Açıq-Domain Konuşuşuş cavablarının Kontext-Sensitiv Ünvanı', 'bs': 'Kontekst-osjetljiva generacija razgovora otvorenih domena', 'ca': 'La generació de respostes conversacionals de domini obert sensibles al context', 'cs': 'Generování konverzačních odpovědí s otevřenou doménou citlivé na kontext', 'et': 'Avatud domeeniga vestlusvastuste kontekstitundlik loomine', 'fi': 'Kontekstiherkkä avoimen verkkotunnuksen keskusteluvastausten luominen', 'jv': 'context-Sensitive Generation of Open-domain conversations responses', 'he': 'יצירת תשובות משיחות בתחום פתוח רגישות לקונקסט', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Oblikovanje odprtih domenskih pogovornih odgovorov, občutljivih na kontekst', 'bo': 'ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དྲ་ཁོངས་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་རྗེས་སྐྱེས་ཚོར'}
{'en': 'Despite the success of existing works on single-turn conversation generation, taking the coherence in consideration, human conversing is actually a context-sensitive process. Inspired by the existing studies, this paper proposed the static and dynamic attention based approaches for context-sensitive generation of open-domain conversational responses. Experimental results on two public datasets show that the proposed static attention based approach outperforms all the baselines on automatic and human evaluation.', 'ar': 'على الرغم من نجاح الأعمال الحالية في إنشاء محادثة أحادية الدور ، مع مراعاة التماسك ، فإن المحادثة البشرية هي في الواقع عملية حساسة للسياق. مستوحاة من الدراسات الحالية ، اقترحت هذه الورقة النهج المستندة إلى الاهتمام الثابت والديناميكي لتوليد ردود محادثة المجال المفتوح الحساسة للسياق. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على مجموعتي بيانات عامتين أن النهج القائم على الاهتمام الثابت المقترح يتفوق على جميع خطوط الأساس في التقييم التلقائي والبشري.', 'pt': 'Apesar do sucesso dos trabalhos existentes sobre geração de conversação de turno único, levando em consideração a coerência, a conversação humana é, na verdade, um processo sensível ao contexto. Inspirado pelos estudos existentes, este artigo propôs as abordagens estáticas e dinâmicas baseadas em atenção para geração sensível ao contexto de respostas conversacionais de domínio aberto. Resultados experimentais em dois conjuntos de dados públicos mostram que a abordagem baseada em atenção estática proposta supera todas as linhas de base na avaliação automática e humana.', 'fr': "Malgré le succès des travaux existants sur la génération de conversations à tour unique, en tenant compte de la cohérence, la conversation humaine est en fait un processus sensible au contexte. Inspiré par les études existantes, cet article propose des approches statiques et dynamiques basées sur l'attention pour la génération contextuelle de réponses conversationnelles dans le domaine ouvert. Les résultats expérimentaux sur deux ensembles de données publics montrent que l'approche basée sur l'attention statique proposée surpasse toutes les valeurs de base de l'évaluation automatique et humaine.", 'es': 'A pesar del éxito de los trabajos existentes sobre la generación de conversaciones de un solo turno, teniendo en cuenta la coherencia, la conversación humana es en realidad un proceso sensible al contexto. Inspirado en los estudios existentes, este artículo propuso los enfoques estáticos y dinámicos basados en la atención para la generación sensible al contexto de respuestas conversacionales de dominio abierto. Los resultados experimentales en dos conjuntos de datos públicos muestran que el enfoque propuesto basado en la atención estática supera todas las líneas de base de la evaluación automática y humana.', 'ja': '一転した会話生成に関する既存の研究が成功しているにもかかわらず、一貫性を考慮すると、人間の会話は実際には文脈に応じたプロセスです。既存の研究に触発されて、この論文は、文脈に応じたオープンドメインの会話応答の生成のための静的および動的な注意に基づくアプローチを提案した。2つの公開データセットの実験結果は、提案された静的注意に基づくアプローチが、自動評価と人間評価のすべてのベースラインを上回ることを示しています。', 'zh': '今单轮成功于事,而虑及连贯性,人实上下文敏也。 受现之发,本出于静动之意,施于上下文敏之开放域。 二公集实验结果表明,静意之法,优于所有基线。', 'hi': 'एकल-बारी वार्तालाप पीढ़ी पर मौजूदा कार्यों की सफलता के बावजूद, विचार में सुसंगतता लेते हुए, मानव बातचीत वास्तव में एक संदर्भ-संवेदनशील प्रक्रिया है। मौजूदा अध्ययनों से प्रेरित होकर, इस पेपर ने खुले-डोमेन संवादात्मक प्रतिक्रियाओं की संदर्भ-संवेदनशील पीढ़ी के लिए स्थिर और गतिशील ध्यान आधारित दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तावित किया। दो सार्वजनिक डेटासेट पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि प्रस्तावित स्थैतिक ध्यान आधारित दृष्टिकोण स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन पर सभी आधार रेखाओं को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Несмотря на успех существующих работ по генерации одноповоротного разговора, принимая во внимание согласованность, человеческий разговор на самом деле является контекстно-зависимым процессом. В этом документе, вдохновленном существующими исследованиями, были предложены статические и динамические подходы, основанные на внимании, для контекстно-зависимой генерации разговорных ответов с открытым доменом. Экспериментальные результаты по двум общедоступным наборам данных показывают, что предлагаемый подход, основанный на статическом внимании, превосходит все исходные данные по автоматической оценке и оценке человеком.', 'ga': 'In ainneoin gur éirigh go maith le saothair reatha ar ghiniúint chomhrá aon-uaine, agus an comhleanúnachas á cur san áireamh, is próiseas atá íogair ó thaobh comhthéacs é an comhrá daonna. Arna spreagadh ag na staidéir atá ann cheana féin, mhol an páipéar seo na cineálacha cur chuige statacha agus dinimiciúla bunaithe ar aird chun freagairtí comhrá oscailte a ghiniúint atá íogair ó thaobh comhthéacs. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar dhá thacar sonraí poiblí go sáraíonn an cur chuige statach atá bunaithe ar aird na bonnlínte go léir maidir le meastóireacht uathoibríoch agus daonna.', 'hu': 'Az egyfordulós beszélgetés generálásáról szóló művek sikere ellenére, a koherencia figyelembevételével, az emberi beszélgetés valójában kontextusérzékeny folyamat. A tanulmány a meglévő tanulmányokból inspirálva a nyílt domain beszélgetési válaszok kontextusérzékeny generálásának statikus és dinamikus figyelem alapú megközelítéseit javasolta. Két nyilvános adathalmaz kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt statikus figyelem alapú megközelítés felülmúlja az automatikus és humán értékelés összes alapját.', 'ka': 'მსგავსი სამუშაო მუშაობის წარმატებით, რომელიც ერთ-ერთი სამუშაო წარმატების შემდეგ, სამუშაო სამუშაო შესახებ, ადამიანის სამუშაო შესახე მიმდინარე სწავლებების შემდეგ, ეს დოკუმენტი გამოყენებულია სტატიკური და დინამიკური აღმოჩენება, რომლებიც კონტექსტური განახლებების კონტექსტური განახლების შე ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები ორი საზოგადო მონაცემების შესახებ გამოჩვენება, რომ საზოგადომის სტატიკური მონაცემების გარეშე ყველა საზოგადო მხარ', 'el': 'Παρά την επιτυχία των υφιστάμενων έργων για τη δημιουργία μιας συζήτησης, λαμβάνοντας υπόψη τη συνοχή, η ανθρώπινη συνομιλία είναι στην πραγματικότητα μια διαδικασία ευαίσθητη στο πλαίσιο. Εμπνευσμένη από τις υπάρχουσες μελέτες, η παρούσα εργασία πρότεινε τις στατικές και δυναμικές προσεγγίσεις που βασίζονται στην προσοχή για την ευαίσθητη στο περιβάλλον παραγωγή ανοικτών συνομιλιών. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε δύο δημόσια σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση στατικής προσοχής ξεπερνά όλες τις βασικές γραμμές της αυτόματης και ανθρώπινης αξιολόγησης.', 'it': "Nonostante il successo dei lavori esistenti sulla generazione di conversazioni a singolo turno, prendendo in considerazione la coerenza, la conversazione umana è in realtà un processo sensibile al contesto. Ispirato dagli studi esistenti, questo articolo propone approcci statici e dinamici basati sull'attenzione per la generazione sensibile al contesto di risposte conversazionali a dominio aperto. I risultati sperimentali su due set di dati pubblici mostrano che l'approccio basato sull'attenzione statica proposto supera tutte le linee di base sulla valutazione automatica e umana.", 'lt': 'Nepaisant sėkmingų darbų, susijusių su vienkartine pokalbių karta, atsižvelgiant į nuoseklumą, žmogaus konversija iš tikrųjų yra aplinkybėms jautrus procesas. Remiantis esamais tyrimais, šiame dokumente siūlomi statiniai ir dinamiški požiūriai, grindžiami dėmesiu, atsižvelgiant į aplinkybes, susijusias su atviros srities konversacijos būdais. Dviejų viešųjų duomenų rinkinių eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas statiniu požiūriu grindžiamas metodas viršija visas automatinio ir žmogaus vertinimo bazes.', 'kk': 'Жұмыс істеген жұмыс істеуіне қарамастан, бір түрлі сұрақ құрылғанда, адамдардың айналысуы - контексті сезімді процес. Бар зерттеулері бойынша, бұл қағаз ашылған доменге қатынау жауаптарын жасау үшін, контексті сезімді жағдайлардың статикалық және динамикалық түсініктерді негіздеген арқылы қолданып Екі жалпы деректер қорларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері қолданылған статикалық нақты тәртібі автоматты және адамның оқиғаларының негізгі сызықтарын өзгертеді.', 'mk': 'И покрај успехот на постоечките дела за генерација на разговори на едно место, со оглед на кохеренцијата, човечкиот разговор всушност е контекстно чувствителен процес. Инспирирано од постојните студии, овој документ предложи статички и динамички пристапи базирани на внимание за генерација на контекстно чувствителни разговори на отворен домен. Експерименталните резултати на двата јавни податоци покажуваат дека предложениот пристап базиран на статичко внимание ги надминува сите бази на автоматска и човечка проценка.', 'ms': 'Walaupun kejayaan kerja yang ada pada generasi perbualan berturut-turut, mengambil konsiderasi dalam pertimbangan, perbualan manusia sebenarnya adalah proses sensitif-konteks. DiInspirasikan oleh kajian yang wujud, kertas ini mengusulkan pendekatan berdasarkan perhatian statik dan dinamik untuk generasi konteks-sensitif respon perbualan domain terbuka. Experimental results on two public datasets show that the proposed static attention based approach outperforms all the baselines on automatic and human evaluation.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള സംസാരത്തിന്റെ തലമുറയില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള വിജയത്തിന്റെ വിജയകരമാണെങ്കിലും ആലോചിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ സഹപ്രവർ നിലവിലുള്ള പഠനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും അഭിപ്രായപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു, ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സ്റ്റാറ്റിക്കും ഡൈനാമിക്ക്  രണ്ടു പൊതുവിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച സ്റ്റാറ്റിക് ശ്', 'mt': 'Minkejja s-suċċess tax-xogħlijiet eżistenti dwar il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ konverżjoni f’daqqa waħda, filwaqt li titqies il-koerenza, il-konverżjoni umana fil-fatt hija proċess sensittiv għall-kuntest. Inspirat mill-istudji eżistenti, dan id-dokument ippropona approċċi statiċi u dinamiċi bbażati fuq l-attenzjoni għall-ġenerazzjoni sensittiva għall-kuntest ta’ reazzjonijiet ta’ konverżjoni f’dominju miftuħ. Riżultati esperimentali fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta pubbliċi juru li l-approċċ propost ibbażat fuq l-attenzjoni statika jaqbeż il-linji bażi kollha fuq evalwazzjoni awtomatika u umana.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүсийн ярианы нэг эргэлтийн үеийн амжилтын үр дүнд хүрэхэд хүн төрөлхтний яриа үнэндээ мэдрэмжтэй үйл явц юм. Шинэ судалгаанаас гайхалтай байлаа. Энэ цаас хариултын хариултыг нээлттэй холбогдолтой үеийн хариултын тухай хариултын төлөө байдал дээр тогтмол болон динамик анхаарлыг санал болгосон. Хоёр олон нийтийн өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилтын үр дүн нь автоматжуулалт болон хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын суурь шулуунуудыг автоматжуулалт гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулдаг.', 'pl': 'Pomimo sukcesu istniejących prac dotyczących generowania rozmów jednokrotnych, biorąc pod uwagę spójność, rozmowa człowieka jest w rzeczywistości procesem wrażliwym na kontekst. Zainspirowany istniejącymi badaniami, artykuł zaproponował statyczne i dynamiczne podejścia oparte na uwadze do kontekstowo wrażliwego generowania odpowiedzi konwersacyjnych w otwartej domenie. Wyniki eksperymentalne na dwóch publicznych zbiorach danych pokazują, że proponowane podejście statyczne oparte na uwadze przewyższa wszystkie linie podstawowe dla automatycznej i ludzkiej oceny.', 'no': 'Til tross av suksessen på det eksisterande arbeidet ved samtalegenerering av enkelt omvendt, med å ta sammenhengen i uttrykk, er menneskelige konvertering faktisk ein kontekstsensitiv prosess. På dei eksisterande studiane har denne papiret foreslått den statiske og dynamiske oppmerksomhetsbaserte tilnærmingane for kontekstsensitiv generering av omtale av opna domene. Eksperimentale resultat på to offentlige dataset viser at den foreslåde statistiske oppmerksomheten basert på tilnærming utfører alle baselinjene på automatisk og menneskelig evaluering.', 'ro': 'În ciuda succesului lucrărilor existente privind generarea conversațiilor cu un singur rând, luând în considerare coerența, conversația umană este de fapt un proces sensibil la context. Inspirată de studiile existente, această lucrare a propus abordări statice și dinamice bazate pe atenție pentru generarea sensibilă la context de răspunsuri conversaționale în domeniu deschis. Rezultatele experimentale pe două seturi de date publice arată că abordarea statică bazată pe atenție propusă depășește toate liniile de referință privind evaluarea automată și umană.', 'sr': 'Uprkos uspjehu postojećih radova na generaciji razgovora, uzimajući u obzir koherenciju, ljudski razgovor je zapravo osjetljiv proces konteksta. Pod inspiracijom postojećih ispitivanja, ovaj papir predložio je statičnu i dinamičnu pažnju bazirane pristupe na kontekstskoj generaciji razgovornih odgovora na otvorenom domenu. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dve javne podatke pokazuju da predloženi pristup na temelju statičke pažnje iznosi sve osnovne linije na automatskoj i ljudskoj procjeni.', 'so': 'Inta kastoo uu guulaysto shuqullada joogta ee ku saabsan qarniga hadalka hal-jeex ah, marka la fiirsado iskaashatada, hadalka biniaadamka waa danbiyada hoose-xiisaysan. Waxbarashada joogta ah ayaa warqaddan soo saaray qaababka lagu soo jeedi karo static iyo dynamic oo lagu saleeyo qalabka hoos-fudud qarniga hadalka oo furan ee domain. Experimental results on two public datasets show that the proposed static attention based approach outperforms all the baselines on automatic and human evaluation.', 'si': 'සිද්ධ වැඩේ සාමර්ථක වැඩේ සාමර්ථක විදියට තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ නැත්නම්, මිනිස්සු වාර්තාව ඇත්තටම සංවේදනය කරනව ස්ථානයින් ඉගෙනගන්න අධ්\u200dයානය වලින්, මේ පත්තුව ස්ථානය සහ හ හැකියාවික අවධානය අධ්\u200dයානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සංවේ සාමාජික දත්ත සටහන් දෙකක් පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදිහට පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් සහ ම', 'sv': 'Trots framgångarna med befintliga verk om generering av konversationer i en vändning, med hänsyn till samstämmigheten, är mänsklig konversation faktiskt en kontextkänslig process. Inspirerad av de befintliga studierna föreslog denna uppsats statiska och dynamiska uppmärksamhetsbaserade tillvägagångssätt för kontextkänslig generering av konversationssvar med öppen domän. Experimentella resultat på två offentliga datauppsättningar visar att den föreslagna statiska uppmärksamhetsbaserade metoden överträffar alla baslinjer för automatisk och mänsklig utvärdering.', 'ta': 'இருக்கும் வெற்றியாக இருக்கும் போதும் ஒற்றைத் திரும்ப உரையாடல் உருவாக்கத்தின் வெற்றியாக இருந்தாலும், கருத்து ஒருங தற்போதைய ஆய்வுகளால் வழங்கப்பட்டது, இந்த காகிதம் திறந்த தொடர்பு பேசும் பதில்களின் சூழல் உணர்வுடைய உருவாக்கத்திற்கான நிலையான மற இரண்டு பொது தரவுத்தளங்களில் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது தானாகவே மற்றும் மனித மதிப்புகளில் அனைத்து அடிப்பட', 'ur': 'ایک بار کی بات کی نسل پر موجود عمل کے موفقیت کے بغیر، انسان کی بات بغیر جانے کے ایک کنٹنس حساس طریقہ ہے. موجود تحقیقات کے ذریعے یہ کاغذ نے استٹیکس اور ڈینامیک توجه کی روشنی کی نسل کے کنٹنسیٹ-سینسیٹ کی نسل کے لئے روشنی کی طریقے کی پیشنهاد کی۔ دو عمومی ڈیٹ سٹ پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی سٹیٹ ڈیٹ سیٹ ڈیٹ سیٹ ڈیٹ سیٹ ڈیٹ سیٹ ڈیٹ سیٹ ڈیٹ سیٹ ڈیٹ سیٹ ڈ', 'uz': "Muvaffaqiyatli bo'lgan vazifalar bir necha xil talab qarshi uchun muvaffaqiyatli bo'lsa va bir xil muvaffaqiyatlarni tasavvur qilish mumkin, inson talab qilish aslida juda muhim sezgiruvchi jarayoni. Mavjud o'qituvchilar tomonidan imzolangan. Bu hujjat ochiq domen bilan muloqon javoblar uchun statik va dynamik ravishda asoslangan usullarning asosiy usullarini beradi. Икки жамият маълумотларида имтиҳон natijalari кўрсатилади, proposed static attention asosida asoslangan usulning hamma asosini avtomatik va инсон qiymatida bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù các tác phẩm đang có thành công trong việc trò chuyện một lần, dựa trên sự đồng thuận, đối thoại con người thực sự là một tiến trình nhạy cảm với ngữ cảnh. Dựa trên các nghiên cứu hiện tại, bài báo này đề xuất phương pháp tập trung tĩnh động và động tĩnh cho việc tạo ra các phản ứng thoại mở miền. Kết quả thí nghiệm trên hai bộ dữ liệu công cộng cho thấy phương pháp tập trung tĩnh được đề nghị hoàn thành tất cả các nền tảng về đánh giá tự động và con người.', 'nl': 'Ondanks het succes van bestaande werken aan single-turn conversation generation, is menselijke conversatie eigenlijk een contextgevoelig proces. Geïnspireerd door de bestaande studies, stelde deze paper de statische en dynamische aandacht gebaseerde benaderingen voor voor contextgevoelige generatie van open-domein conversationele reacties. Experimentele resultaten op twee publieke datasets tonen aan dat de voorgestelde statische aandachtsgebaseerde benadering alle basislijnen van automatische en menselijke evaluatie overtreft.', 'bg': 'Въпреки успеха на съществуващите творби за генериране на разговор с един завой, като се има предвид съгласуваността, човешкият разговор всъщност е чувствителен за контекста процес. Вдъхновена от съществуващите проучвания, тази статия предлага статични и динамични подходи, базирани на вниманието, за генериране на чувствителни към контекста разговорни отговори с отворен домейн. Експерименталните резултати на два обществени набора от данни показват, че предложеният подход, основан на статично внимание, превъзхожда всички базови линии при автоматична и човешка оценка.', 'da': 'På trods af succesen med eksisterende værker om single-turn samtale generation er menneskelig samtale faktisk en kontekstfølsom proces, når man tager hensyn til sammenhængen i betragtning. Inspireret af de eksisterende undersøgelser foreslog denne artikel de statiske og dynamiske opmærksomhedsbaserede tilgange til kontekstfølsom generering af åbne domæner konversationsmæssige svar. Eksperimentelle resultater på to offentlige datasæt viser, at den foreslåede statiske opmærksomhedsbaserede fremgangsmåde overstiger alle basislinjerne for automatisk og menneskelig evaluering.', 'hr': 'Uprkos uspjehu postojećih radova na generaciji razgovora u jednom okviru, uzimajući u obzir sasvim pristojnost, ljudski razgovor je zapravo osjetljiv proces konteksta. Uhvaćeni postojećim ispitivanjima, ovaj papir predložio je statičnu i dinamičnu pažnju na temelju pristupa na kontekstskoj generaciji razgovornih odgovora otvorenih domena. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dvije javne podatke pokazuju da predloženi pristup na temelju statičke pažnje iznosi sve osnovne linije na automatskoj i ljudskoj procjeni.', 'fa': 'با وجود موفقیت کارهای موجود در نسل صحبت با یک تبدیل، با توجه به هماهنگی در نظر گرفتن، گفتگو انسان در حقیقت یک فرآیند حساس محیط است. توسط مطالعه\u200cهای موجود، این کاغذ توجه\u200cی توجه\u200cی ثابت و دینامیک را پیشنهاد داد که برای نسل\u200cهای احساسات محیط و محیط پاسخ\u200cهای گفتگوی دامنه\u200cای باز باشد. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای عمومی نشان می\u200cدهند که توجه\u200cهای مقرر شده\u200cای که بر اساس توجه ثابت شده\u200cاند، تمام خطوط\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cها را بر ارزیابی خودکار و انسان انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'de': 'Trotz des Erfolgs bestehender Arbeiten zur Generierung von Single-Turn-Gesprächen ist menschliches Gespräch unter Berücksichtigung der Kohärenz tatsächlich ein kontextsensitiver Prozess. Inspiriert von den bestehenden Studien wurden in diesem Beitrag statische und dynamische aufmerksamkeitsbasierte Ansätze zur kontextsensitiven Generierung offener Konversationsantworten vorgeschlagen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse an zwei öffentlichen Datensätzen zeigen, dass der vorgeschlagene statische Aufmerksamkeitsbasierte Ansatz alle Basislinien der automatischen und menschlichen Auswertung übertrifft.', 'id': 'Meskipun sukses dari pekerjaan yang ada pada generasi percakapan satu kali, mempertimbangkan koerensi, percakapan manusia sebenarnya adalah proses sensitif konteks. Terinspirasi oleh studi yang ada, kertas ini mengusulkan pendekatan berdasarkan perhatian statis dan dinamik untuk generasi konteks sensitif dari respons konversasi domain terbuka. Hasil percobaan pada dua set data publik menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan statis yang diusulkan berdasarkan perhatian melebihi semua garis dasar pada evaluasi otomatis dan manusia.', 'sw': 'Pamoja na mafanikio ya kazi zilizopo kwenye kizazi cha mazungumzo moja kwa moja, kwa kuchukua mshikamano katika kutafakari, mazungumzo ya binadamu ni mchakato wa muktadha wenye msingi mkali. Kuhamishwa na utafiti uliopo, gazeti hili lilipendekeza hatua za takwimu na yenye msimamo mkali kwa ajili ya kizazi kinachojishughulika na majadiliano ya wazi ya ndani. Matokeo ya majaribio kwenye seti mbili za taarifa za umma yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa za kutangaza takwimu zinaonyesha misingi yote ya msingi juu ya uchunguzi wa binadamu.', 'sq': 'Despite the success of existing works on single-turn conversation generation, taking the coherence in consideration, human conversing is actually a context-sensitive process.  Inspiruar nga studimet ekzistuese, ky dokument propozoi metodat statike dhe dinamike të bazuara në vëmendje për gjeneratën e ndjeshme në kontekst të përgjigjeve bisedimore në domini të hapur. Rezultatet eksperimentale në dy grupe të dhënash publike tregojnë se metoda e propozuar bazuar në vëmendje statike kalon të gjitha linjat bazë mbi vlerësimin automatik dhe njerëzor.', 'tr': 'Bir gezek gürrüň döwletlerinde bolan işleriň üstünlikleri ýöne, adamlaryň gürrüňlemesi aslynda bir kontekst hasaplanýan prosesidir. Öň bar işleriň tarapyndan nähili möhüm bolan ýagdaýda, bu kagyz aç-domenyň sözleşişi jogaplary üçin statistik we dinamik ünsüne daýanýan ýagdaýlary teklip etdi. Iki jemgyýet dataýasynda örän netijesi ukyply bolan ýagdaýda statik üns daýanýan ýagdaýyň otomatik we adamlaryň değerlendirmegi üçin ähli baseýolaryny çykarýar.', 'af': "Onthou die sukses van bestaande werke op enkel-draai gesprek generasie, neem die koherens in aandag, is menslike omskakeling eintlik 'n konteks-sensitief proses. Die bestaande studie het hierdie papier voorgestel die statiese en dinamiese aandag gebaseerde toegang vir konteks-sensitiewe generasie van open-domein gesprekslyke antwoordes. Eksperimentale resultate op twee openbare datastel wys dat die voorgestelde statiese aandag gebaseerde toegang uitvoer al die basisline op outomatiese en menslike evaluering.", 'hy': 'Չնայած գոյություն ունեցող աշխատանքների հաջողությանը մեկ անգամ հաղորդակցվող սերունդների վրա, հաշվի առնելով կոնտեքստը, մարդկային հաղորդակցման գործընթացը իրականում կոնտեքստի զգայուն գործընթա Հոգեշնչված գոյություն ունեցող ուսումնասիրություններով, այս հոդվածը առաջարկեց կարևոր և դինամիկ ուշադրության վրա հիմնված մոտեցումներ բաց բնագավառի հաղորդակցման արձագանքների կոնտեքստին զգալի սերունդի համար: Երկու հանրային տվյալների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված վիճակական ուշադրության հիմնված մոտեցումը գերազանցում է ավտոմատիկ և մարդկային գնահատման բոլոր հիմնական գծերը:', 'am': 'ምንም እንኳን የአሁኑ የንግግር ትውልድ ላይ የሚደረገውን ስኬት ምንም እንኳ፣ የሰው ማነጋገር በአካባቢ ተቃውሞ የሚስማማማዊ ፕሮግራም ነው፡፡ በተገኘው ትምህርት፣ ይህ ጽሑፍ የክፍት ዶሜን የሚናገሩ መልዕክቶች ለመሠረት የስታሪክ እና የdynamic ጥያቄዎችን ለመሠረት አቀረበ፡፡ በሁለት የህዝብ ዳታተሮች ላይ የፈተናው ፍሬዎች፣ የተዘጋጀው የስቴት ትኩረት ሥርዓት በሐሳብ እና በሰው ማስታወቂያ ላይ የመሠረቱትን መሠረት ሁሉ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'Yalnız dönüş müzakirə nəsilində olan işlərin başarısına rağmen, insanların müzakirə etməsi həqiqətən də kontekst-sensitiv prosesidir. Mevcut çalışmalar tarafından təşkil edilmişdir, bu kağıt açıq domena mühürlü cavab verməklərinin dəyişiklik və dinamik təsirlərinin təşkil etdiyi təsirlərin təşkil etdi. İki halkı verilənlərin təcrübəsi sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif edilən statik təcrübə təcrübəsinin automatik və insan değerlendirməsi barəsindəki bütün temel xətirlərin üstünə çıxarır.', 'ko': '기존의 단일 대화 생성 연구가 성공을 거두었지만 일관성을 감안하면 인류의 대화는 사실상 언어 환경이 민감한 과정이다.기존 연구의 계발을 받아 본고는 정태와 동태적 주의를 바탕으로 하는 개방역 회화 반응 상하문 민감한 생성 방법을 제시했다.두 개의 공공 데이터 집합에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 제시된 정적 주의를 바탕으로 하는 방법은 자동과 인공 평가에서 모든 기선보다 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.', 'bn': 'বিবেচনা করার জন্য বিদ্যমান আলোচনা প্রজন্মের বিভিন্ন সাফল্যের সাফল্য সত্ত্বেও মানুষের কথোপকথন আসলে একটি প্রেক্ষিত-সংবেদন বর্তমান গবেষণা দ্বারা অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে, এই পত্রিকা প্রস্তাব করেছে যে পরিস্থিতিক এবং ধারাবাহিক মনোযোগ প্রদান করা হয়েছে প্রতিক্রিয়া প দুই জনগণের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত স্টেটিক মনোযোগের ভিত্তিক প্রতিক্রিয়া স্বয়ংক্রিয় এব', 'ca': "Malgrat l'èxit de les obres existents sobre la generació de converses a un voltant únic, tenint en compte la coherencia, la conversa humana és realment un procés sensible al contexte. Inspirat pels estudis existents, aquest paper va proposar els enfocaments estatics i dinàmics basats en l'atenció per a generar respostes conversacionals de domini obert sensibles al context. Els resultats experimentals de dos conjunts de dades públices mostren que l'enfocament proposat basat en l'atenció estática supera totes les línies de base de l'evaluació automàtica i humana.", 'bs': 'Uprkos uspjehu postojećih radova o generaciji razgovora u jednom okrenutku, uzimajući u obzir sasvim pristojnost, ljudski razgovor je zapravo osjetljiv proces konteksta. Pod inspiracijom postojećih ispitivanja, ovaj papir predložio je statičnu i dinamičnu pažnju na temelju pristupa na kontekstskoj generaciji razgovornih odgovora na otvorenom domenu. Eksperimentalni rezultati na dvije javne podatke pokazuju da predloženi pristup na temelju statičke pažnje iznosi sve osnovne linije na automatskoj i ljudskoj procjeni.', 'cs': 'Navzdory úspěchu existujících prací na generování konverzací s jedním otočením je lidské konverzace ve skutečnosti kontextově citlivým procesem. Tento článek, inspirován existujícími studiemi, navrhl statické a dynamické přístupy založené na pozornosti pro kontextově citlivé generování konverzačních reakcí v otevřené doméně. Experimentální výsledky na dvou veřejných datových sadách ukazují, že navržený statický přístup založený na pozornosti předčí všechny základní linie automatického a lidského hodnocení.', 'et': 'Hoolimata olemasolevate ühekordse vestluse loomise tööde edukust on inimvestlus tegelikult kontekstitundlik protsess, võttes arvesse sidusust. Olemasolevatest uuringutest inspireerituna pakuti käesolevas dokumendis välja staatilised ja dünaamilised tähelepanu põhinevad lähenemisviisid kontekstitundlike avatud domeeniliste vestlusvastuste genereerimiseks. Kahe avaliku andmekogumi eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud staatilisel tähelepanul põhinev lähenemisviis ületab automaatse ja inimhindamise kõiki lähtejooni.', 'fi': 'Vaikka olemassa olevat yhden vuoron keskustelun tuottamista koskevat työt ovat onnistuneet, johdonmukaisuus huomioon ottaen ihmisten keskustelu on itse asiassa kontekstin herkkä prosessi. Olemassa olevien tutkimusten innoittamana tämä artikkeli ehdotti staattisia ja dynaamisia huomiopohjaisia lähestymistapoja kontekstiin herkän avoimen verkkotunnuksen keskusteluvasteiden luomiseen. Kahden julkisen aineiston kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu staattinen huomiopohjainen lähestymistapa ylittää kaikki automaattisen ja inhimillisen arvioinnin lähtökohdat.', 'jv': 'Ingon nganggo perbudhakan nganggo cah-suaraning nggawe gerapakan sampek Generasi sing berartikan, nggawe gerakan kanggo sabên gerakan, ngconversasi perusahaan iku kelangan sampek-sampek. YUHSVART CURRENTCURRENT CURRENTCURRENT PASSMERKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKARKA Rejalaké sing beraksi barêng-barêng kuwi akèh wong kuwi nggawe nguasai perusahaan langkung pawaran kuwi tindakan kuwi nggawe barang pancen kuwi mesthi nang otomatik lan ujaran uwong.', 'sk': 'Kljub uspehu obstoječih del na področju generiranja pogovorov z enim obratom in ob upoštevanju skladnosti je človeško pogovarjanje dejansko kontekstno občutljiv proces. Ta prispevek, ki temelji na obstoječih študijah, je predlagal statične in dinamične pristope, ki temeljijo na pozornosti, za ustvarjanje odprtih pogovornih odzivov na kontekst. Poskusni rezultati na dveh javnih zbirkah podatkov kažejo, da predlagani pristop, ki temelji na statični pozornosti, presega vse izhodiščne vrednosti za avtomatsko in človeško vrednotenje.', 'he': 'למרות הצלחתו של עבודות קיימות על דור שיחה אחת, בהתחשב בתקשורת, שיחה אנושית היא למעשה תהליך רגיש לקונקסט. בהשראה על ידי המחקרים הקיומים, העיתון הזה הציע גישות סטטיות ודינמיקליות מבוססות על תשומת לב סטטית לדור רגיש לקונקסט של תגובות שיחה בתחום פתוח. תוצאות ניסיוניות על שני קבוצות נתונים ציבוריים מראות שהגישה המבוססת על תשומת לב סטטית המוצעת מתגברת על כל קווי הבסיס על הערכה אוטומטית ואנושית.', 'ha': "Despite the success of existing works on single-turn conversation generation, taking the coherence in consideration, human conversing is actually a context-sensitive process.  An Inspire da takardar da ke jira, wannan takardar ta buƙata masu aikin static da za'a ƙayyade muhimmada masu bin aikin muhimman-sensitive wa dangin da za'a danne masu yin magana da ke buɗe-Domen. Mataimakin jarrabo a kan danne biyu na ɗabi'a yana nuna cewa muhallin muhalli wanda aka bukatar da wa'ura wa static na raye duk salon a kan ƙaddara farat ɗaya da mutum.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྐབས་འཕགས་རིས་གནས་ཚུལ་གཅིག་པ་གི་གཏམ་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ལ། མི་ཚོའི་གཏམ་གླེང་མོལ དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལས་ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྤྲོད་པའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་འགྱུར་བའི་གནད་སྡུད་གྱི་གནད་སྤེལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྐྱོང་བའི་གོ་སྐབས མི་མང་གི་གནད་སྡུད་གཞུང་ཚབ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ'}
{'en': 'A LSTM Approach with Sub-Word Embeddings for Mongolian Phrase Break Prediction', 'ar': 'نهج LSTM مع تضمين الكلمات الفرعية للتنبؤ بقطع العبارة المنغولية', 'es': 'Un enfoque LSTM con incrustaciones de subpalabras para la predicción de saltos de frase en mongol', 'fr': 'Une approche LSTM avec intégration de sous-mots pour la prédiction des sauts de phrase en mongol', 'pt': 'Uma abordagem LSTM com incorporação de subpalavras para previsão de quebra de frase mongol', 'ja': 'モンゴル語のフレーズブレイク予測のためのサブワード埋め込みを備えたLSTMアプローチ', 'zh': '一有子词嵌 LSTM 法,用蒙古语短语中断占', 'hi': 'मंगोलियाई वाक्यांश विराम भविष्यवाणी के लिए उप-वर्ड एम्बेडिंग के साथ एक LSTM दृष्टिकोण', 'ru': 'Подход LSTM с субсловом Embeddings для прогнозирования разрыва монгольских фраз', 'ga': 'Cur Chuige LSTM le Leabú Fo-Fhocail do Thuar Briseadh Frása Mongóilis', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μια προσέγγιση με ενσωμάτωση υπολέξεων για την πρόβλεψη διακοπής φράσεων στη Μογγολία', 'it': 'Un approccio LSTM con incorporazioni di sotto-parole per la previsione mongolo di rottura delle frasi', 'lt': 'Name', 'hu': 'LSTM megközelítés a mongol kifejezések megszakításának előrejelzésével', 'kk': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'mn': 'Монгол хэлэлцээний хэлэлцээний суб-үг нэвтрүүлэх LSTM ойлголт', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Approċċ LSTM b’Embeddings Sub-Words għall-Predizzjoni tal-Qbil tal-Frażi Mongoljana', 'ro': 'O abordare LSTM cu încorporări sub-cuvânt pentru predicția ruperii frazelor mongole', 'sr': 'LSTM pristup sa podrečnim integracijama za predviđanje mongolske fraze prekida', 'no': 'Name', 'so': 'A LSTM Approach with Sub-word Emails for Mongolian Phrase Break Prediction', 'sv': 'En LSTM-strategi med inbäddade underord för mongolsk frasbrytning förutsägelse', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'pl': 'Podejście LSTM z osadzeniami podsłów dla mongolskich przewidywań złamania fraz', 'si': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một phương pháp LSTM với nhúng nhúng chữ phụ cho đoán đoán hạn chế của ngôn ngữ Mông Cổ.', 'bg': 'Подход с вграждания на поддуми за прогнозиране на прекъсване на фразата на монголския език', 'nl': 'Een LSTM aanpak met sub-woord embeddings voor Mongoolse frase break voorspelling', 'da': 'En LSTM tilgang med underords indlejringer til mongolsk sætning break forudsigelse', 'hr': 'Pristup LSTM sa podriječjim integracijama za predviđanje mongolske fraze prekida', 'de': 'Ein LSTM-Ansatz mit Sub-Word-Einbettungen für die Vorhersage von Phrase Break in der Mongolei', 'id': 'A LSTM Approach with Sub-Word Embeddings for Mongolian Phrase Break Prediction', 'ko': '몽골어 어구 중단 예측의 하위 단어 삽입 LSTM 방법', 'sw': 'Ndani ya LSTM yenye Mazungumzo ya Ujumbe wa Habari kwa ajili ya Uvunjifu wa Tamko la Tamko la Mongolia', 'tr': 'Mongoliýa Fraz Taýbatması üçin Sub-Word Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'Name', 'hy': 'Մոնգոլացի արտահայտության փրկում կանխատեսված ենթաբառերով LSMT մոտեցում', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'sq': 'Një metodë LSTM me përfshirje nënfjalësh për parashikimin e thyerjes së frazës mongoleze', 'az': 'Mongolian Fraz Break Prediction üçün Sub-Word İfadələri ilə LSTM Yaxınlığı', 'bn': 'Name', 'bs': 'Pristup LSTM sa podriječjim integracijama za predviđanje mongolske fraze prekida', 'ca': 'Un enfocament LSTM amb incorporacions subterràniques per a prediccionar el trencament de frases mongolíes', 'et': 'LSTM lähenemine koos alamsõna manustamisega Mongoolia fraasikatkestuse prognoosimiseks', 'cs': 'LSTM přístup s podslovními vloženími pro předpověď zlomu mongolských frází', 'fi': 'LSTM-lähestymistapa ja alasanojen upotukset mongolialaiselle fraasikatkoennusteelle', 'jv': 'A LTT Method with Sub-Word embedings for Mongolian Frarase break predikion', 'he': 'A LSTM Approach with Sub-Word Embeddings for Mongolian Phrase Break Prediction', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'LSTM pristop z vdelavami podbesed za napoved prelomov mongolskih fraz', 'bo': 'A LSTM Approach with Sub-Word Embeddings for Mongolian Phrase Break Prediction'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we first utilize the word embedding that focuses on sub-word units to the Mongolian Phrase Break (PB) prediction task by using Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM) model. Mongolian is an agglutinative language. Each root can be followed by several suffixes to form probably millions of words, but the existing Mongolian corpus is not enough to build a robust entire word embedding, thus it suffers a serious data sparse problem and brings a great difficulty for Mongolian PB prediction. To solve this problem, we look at sub-word units in Mongolian word, and encode their information to a meaningful representation, then fed it to LSTM to decode the best corresponding PB label. Experimental results show that the proposed model significantly outperforms traditional CRF model using manually features and obtains 7.49 % F-Measure gain.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، استخدمنا أولاً كلمة التضمين التي تركز على وحدات الكلمات الفرعية لمهمة التنبؤ المنغولية فاصل العبارة (PB) باستخدام نموذج الذاكرة طويلة المدى (LSTM). المنغولية لغة تراصية. يمكن أن يتبع كل جذر عدة لواحق لتكوين ملايين الكلمات على الأرجح ، لكن المجموعة المنغولية الحالية لا تكفي لبناء تضمين قوي للكلمات ، وبالتالي فهي تعاني من مشكلة خطيرة في البيانات المتناثرة وتجلب صعوبة كبيرة للتنبؤ المنغولي PB. لحل هذه المشكلة ، ننظر إلى وحدات الكلمات الفرعية في الكلمة المنغولية ، ونقوم بترميز معلوماتها إلى تمثيل ذي مغزى ، ثم تغذيتها إلى LSTM لفك تشفير أفضل تسمية PB مقابلة. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن النموذج المقترح يتفوق بشكل كبير على نموذج CRF التقليدي باستخدام ميزات يدويًا ويحصل على نسبة 7.49٪ من قياس F.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, primeiro utilizamos a incorporação de palavras que se concentra em unidades de subpalavras para a tarefa de previsão Mongolian Phrase Break (PB) usando o modelo Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM). O mongol é uma língua aglutinativa. Cada raiz pode ser seguida por vários sufixos para formar provavelmente milhões de palavras, mas o corpus mongol existente não é suficiente para construir uma incorporação robusta de palavras inteiras, portanto, sofre um sério problema de escassez de dados e traz uma grande dificuldade para a previsão do PB mongol. Para resolver esse problema, examinamos as unidades de subpalavras na palavra mongol e codificamos suas informações para uma representação significativa, depois alimentamos o LSTM para decodificar o melhor rótulo PB correspondente. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o modelo proposto supera significativamente o modelo CRF tradicional usando recursos manuais e obtém um ganho F-Measure de 7,49%.', 'es': 'En este artículo, primero utilizamos la incrustación de palabras que se centra en las unidades de subpalabras para la tarea de predicción de ruptura de frase (PB) en Mongolia mediante el uso del modelo de memoria a corto plazo (LSTM). El mongol es una lengua aglutinante. Cada raíz puede ir seguida de varios sufijos para formar probablemente millones de palabras, pero el corpus mongol existente no es suficiente para construir una incrustación robusta de palabras completas, por lo que sufre un grave problema de escasez de datos y trae una gran dificultad para la predicción del PB mongol. Para resolver este problema, observamos las unidades de subpalabras en la palabra mongol y codificamos su información en una representación significativa, luego la enviamos a LSTM para decodificar la mejor etiqueta PB correspondiente. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el modelo propuesto supera significativamente al modelo CRF tradicional utilizando funciones manuales y obtiene una ganancia del 7.49% de F-Measure.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous utilisons d'abord l'incorporation de mots qui se concentre sur les unités de sous-mots pour la tâche de prédiction des ruptures de phrase mongoles (PB) en utilisant le modèle LSTM (Long-Short-Term-Memory). Le mongol est une langue agglutinante. Chaque racine peut être suivie de plusieurs suffixes pour former probablement des millions de mots, mais le corpus mongol existant n'est pas suffisant pour construire une intégration solide de mots entiers, il souffre donc d'un sérieux problème de pénurie de données et apporte une grande difficulté à la prédiction du PB mongol. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous examinons les unités de sous-mots dans le mot mongol, et nous encodons leurs informations en une représentation significative, puis nous les transmettons à LSTM pour décoder la meilleure étiquette PB correspondante. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le modèle proposé surpasse de manière significative le modèle CRF traditionnel utilisant des fonctions manuelles et obtient un gain de 7,49\xa0% F-Measure.", 'ja': '本稿では，まず長期記憶（ LSTM ）モデルを用いて，モンゴル語のPhrase Break （ PB ）予測タスクに対するサブワード単位に着目した単語埋め込みを利用する．モンゴル語はアグル語派の言語である。各ルートには、おそらく数百万の単語を形成するためのいくつかのサフィックスが付けられることがありますが、既存のモンゴル語のコーパスは、単語全体の埋め込みを構築するのに十分ではないため、深刻なデータまばらな問題を抱え、モンゴル語のPB予測に大きな困難をもたらします。この問題を解決するために、モンゴル語のサブワード単位を見て、それらの情報を意味のある表現にエンコードし、それをLSTMに送り、対応する最良のPBラベルをデコードします。実験結果は、提案されたモデルが、手動機能を使用して従来のCRFモデルを大幅に上回り、7.49 ％のF - Measureゲインを得ていることを示しています。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम पहले एम्बेडिंग शब्द का उपयोग करते हैं जो दीर्घकालिक अल्पकालिक-मेमोरी (एलएसटीएम) मॉडल का उपयोग करके मंगोलियाई वाक्यांश ब्रेक (पीबी) पूर्वानुमान कार्य के लिए उप-शब्द इकाइयों पर केंद्रित है। मंगोलियाई एक एग्लूटीनेटिव भाषा है। प्रत्येक रूट को संभवतः लाखों शब्दों को बनाने के लिए कई प्रत्ययों द्वारा पीछा किया जा सकता है, लेकिन मौजूदा मंगोलियाई कॉर्पस एक मजबूत पूरे शब्द एम्बेडिंग का निर्माण करने के लिए पर्याप्त नहीं है, इस प्रकार यह एक गंभीर डेटा विरल समस्या से ग्रस्त है और मंगोलियाई पीबी भविष्यवाणी के लिए एक बड़ी कठिनाई लाता है। इस समस्या को हल करने के लिए, हम मंगोलियाई शब्द में उप-शब्द इकाइयों को देखते हैं, और उनकी जानकारी को एक सार्थक प्रतिनिधित्व में एन्कोड करते हैं, फिर इसे एलएसटीएम को खिलाते हैं ताकि सबसे अच्छा संबंधित पीबी लेबल को डीकोड किया जा सके। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल मैन्युअल रूप से सुविधाओं का उपयोग करके पारंपरिक सीआरएफ मॉडल को काफी बेहतर बनाता है और 7.49% एफ-माप लाभ प्राप्त करता है।', 'zh': '本文,先用长短期记(LSTM)模形,以重点置子词单元词嵌入蒙古语短语中断(PB)占候。 蒙古语,凝集性语也。 每根后可随数后缀,大率数百万单词,而蒙古语语料库不足以为壮词嵌之,故其大疏,为蒙古PB测甚难。 观蒙古语单词中子单词单元,编码其息为义,然后给LSTM以解码上PB。 实验结果表明,手动特征,明优旧CRF,F-Measure益为7.49%。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы сначала используем слово встраивание, которое фокусируется на единицах подслова для задачи прогнозирования монгольского фразобрыва (PB), используя модель Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM). Монгольский - это агглютинативный язык. За каждым корнем может следовать несколько суффиксов, чтобы сформировать, вероятно, миллионы слов, но существующего монгольского корпуса недостаточно, чтобы построить надежное встраивание всего слова, поэтому он страдает от серьезной проблемы скудности данных и приносит большую трудность для монгольского предсказания PB. Чтобы решить эту проблему, мы рассматриваем подслова в монгольском слове и кодируем их информацию в значимое представление, а затем подаем его в LSTM для декодирования лучшей соответствующей метки PB. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемая модель значительно превосходит традиционную модель ИРК с использованием функций, выполняемых вручную, и получает 7,49% прироста F-измерений.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, bainimid úsáid den chéad uair as an leabú focal a dhíríonn ar aonaid fo-focail don tasc tuar Briseadh Frása Mongóilis (PB) trí úsáid a bhaint as samhail Cuimhne Fada Gearrthéarmach (LSTM). Is teanga agglutinative í an Mhongóil. Is féidir roinnt iarmhíreanna a leanúint le gach fréamh chun na milliúin focal a dhéanamh, is dócha, ach ní leor an corpas Mongóilis atá ann faoi láthair chun leabú iomlán láidir focal a thógáil, mar sin fulaingíonn sé fadhb thromchúiseach gann ar shonraí agus cruthaíonn sé deacracht mhór do thuar Mongóilis PB. Chun an fhadhb seo a réiteach, féachaimid ar aonaid fo-focal i bhfocal Mongóilis, agus a gcuid faisnéise a ionchódú go dtí léiriú brí, ansin é a chothú chuig LSTM chun an lipéad PB comhfhreagrach is fearr a dhíchódú. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go sáraíonn an tsamhail mholta an tsamhail traidisiúnta CRF go mór ag baint úsáide as gnéithe de láimh agus go bhfaigheann sé gnóthachan F-Bearta 7.49%.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, χρησιμοποιούμε πρώτα την ενσωμάτωση λέξεων που εστιάζει σε μονάδες υπολέξεων στο έργο πρόβλεψης διάλειμμα φράσεων της Μογγολίας χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλο Μακροπρόθεσμης μνήμης (Μακροπρόθεσμης μνήμης). Τα Μογγολικά είναι μια συγκολλητική γλώσσα. Κάθε ρίζα μπορεί να ακολουθηθεί από πολλά επιθήματα για να σχηματίσει πιθανώς εκατομμύρια λέξεις, αλλά το υπάρχον μογγολικό σώμα δεν είναι αρκετό για να χτίσει μια ισχυρή ενσωμάτωση ολόκληρης λέξης, έτσι αντιμετωπίζει ένα σοβαρό πρόβλημα σπανιών δεδομένων και φέρνει μια μεγάλη δυσκολία για την πρόβλεψη της μογγολικής PB. Για να επιλύσουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα, εξετάζουμε τις μονάδες υπολέξεων στη μογγολική λέξη, και κωδικοποιούμε τις πληροφορίες τους σε μια ουσιαστική αναπαράσταση, έπειτα τις τροφοδοτούμε στο LSTM για να αποκωδικοποιήσουμε την καλύτερη αντίστοιχη ετικέτα PB. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά σημαντικά το παραδοσιακό μοντέλο χρησιμοποιώντας χειροκίνητα χαρακτηριστικά και επιτυγχάνει 7.49% κέρδος μέτρησης Φ.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პირველ გამოყენებთ სიტყვას, რომელიც მონდოლიური ფრასის წაშლად (PB) წარმოდგენის მოდგენების მოდელეში დავყენებთ სიტყვას, რომელიც დავყენება სიტყვას, რომელიც მონდოლიური ფრასის წაშ მონდოლური ადგლუტინატიური ენაა. ყოველ ფესვის შეიძლება შეიძლება შეიძლება მრავალთან სიტყვების ფორმაცია, მაგრამ მონდოლური კოპუსი არ არის მსგავსი, რომ უფრო ძალიან სიტყვების შექმნა, რადგან ის ძალიან სერიო მონაცემების გარეშე პრობლე ამ პრობლემას გადახსნა, ჩვენ მონდოლიური სიტყვის სუბსიტყვის ერთეულებს ხედავთ და იმ ინფორმაციას მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულებელად კოდირება, და შემდეგ LSTM-ში გადავკეთეთეთ ყველაზე საკ ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები ჩვენებს, რომ მოწყობინებული მოდელი მნიშვნელოვანია ტრადიციური CRF მოდელის გამოყენებაში პირადი ფუნქციების გამოყენებაში და მიღებს', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban először azt a szót használjuk fel, amely a mongol kifejezésszakítás (PB) előrejelzési feladatához fókuszál, hosszú-rövid távú memória (LSTM) modell segítségével. A mongol egy agglutináns nyelv. Minden egyes gyökeret több utótag követhet, amely valószínűleg több millió szót alkot, de a meglévő mongol korpusz nem elég ahhoz, hogy robusztus egész szóbeágyazást építsen, így komoly adatszűrő problémával szenved, és nagy nehézséget okoz a mongol PB jóslat számára. A probléma megoldásához mongol szóval megnézzük az alszóegységeket, és az információkat egy értelmes ábrázolásra kódoljuk, majd az LSTM-be adjuk, hogy dekódoljuk a megfelelő PB címkét. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell jelentősen felülmúlja a hagyományos CRF modellt manuális funkciókkal és 7,49%-os F-Measure nyereséget ér el.', 'it': "In questo articolo, utilizziamo per prima cosa la parola embedding che si concentra sulle unità di sottoparola al compito di previsione Mongolian Phrase Break (PB) utilizzando il modello Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM). Il mongolo è una lingua agglutinativa. Ogni radice può essere seguita da diversi suffissi per formare probabilmente milioni di parole, ma il corpus mongolo esistente non è sufficiente per costruire un solido intero embedding di parole, quindi soffre di un grave problema di dati scarsi e porta una grande difficoltà per la previsione mongolo PB. Per risolvere questo problema, guardiamo le unità di sotto-parola in mongolo, e codifichiamo le loro informazioni in una rappresentazione significativa, poi l'abbiamo alimentata a LSTM per decodificare la migliore etichetta PB corrispondente. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il modello proposto supera significativamente il modello CRF tradizionale utilizzando funzionalità manuali e ottiene un guadagno F-Measure del 7,49%.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біріншіден бірінші үлкен- қысқарт- жады (LSTM) үлгісін қолдану үшін монголық фраз бөлігіне (PB) бақылау тапсырмасына көмектесетін сөзді ендіру үшін қолданамыз. Монгол - аглуттивті тіл. Әрбір түбір мәліметтің бірнеше сәйкестіктері мәліметті мәліметті құру үшін бірнеше сәйкестіктері келеді, бірақ бар Монголдық корпус толық сөзді құру үшін жеткілікті емес, сондықтан ол маңызды деректердің көмегі Бұл мәселеді шешу үшін біз монголлық сөздің ішкі сөздер бірлігін қарап, олардың мәліметін маңызды мәліметіне кодтамыз, содан кейін оларды LSTM-ге сәйкес келетін PB жарлығын декодтамыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері келтірілген үлгі әдеттегі CRF үлгісін қолмен өзгертіп, 7,49% F- өлшемі жетілдіру үлгісін өзгертеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pirmą kartą naudojame žodžio įterpimą, kuris daugiausia dėmesio skiria Mongolijos frazės pertraukos (PB) prognozės padaliniams naudojant ilgalaikį trumpalaikį atminties (LSTM) model į. Mongolų kalba yra aglutinacinė kalba. Each root can be followed by several suffixes to form probably millions of words, but the existing Mongolian corpus is not enough to build a robust entire word embedding, thus it suffers a serious data sparse problem and brings a great difficulty for Mongolian PB prediction.  Siekdami išspręsti šią problem ą, mes pažvelgiame į Mongolijos žodžiu esančius žodžius ir koduojame jų informaciją į prasmingą atstovavimą, o vėliau pasodiname ją LSTM dekoduoti geriausią atitinkamą PB etiketę. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas modelis gerokai viršija tradicinį KRF model į, naudojant rankinius požymius, ir gauna 7,49 % F-Measure gain.', 'mk': 'Во оваа хартија, прво го користиме зборот вградување кој се фокусира на подзборни единици на монголската задача за предвидување на фраза прекин (PB) со користење на моделот на долг- краткорочен меморија (LSTM). Mongolian is an agglutinative language.  Each root can be followed by several suffixes to form probably millions of words, but the existing Mongolian corpus is not enough to build a robust entire word embedding, thus it suffers a serious data sparse problem and brings a great difficulty for Mongolian PB prediction.  За да го решиме овој проблем, ги гледаме подзборовите единици во монголски збор, и ги кодираме нивните информации на значајна претстава, а потоа ги нахранивме на ЛСТМ за да ја декодираме најдобрата соодветна ПБ етикета. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложениот модел значително го надминува традиционалниот модел на ЦРФ користејќи рачно карактеристики и добива 7,49 отсто добивка од Ф-мерка.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita pertama-tama menggunakan perkataan penyembedding yang fokus pada unit sub-perkataan ke tugas ramalan Putusan Frasa Mongolia (PB) dengan menggunakan model ingatan jangka pendek panjang (LSTM). Mongolia adalah bahasa agglutinative. Setiap root boleh diikuti oleh beberapa suffix untuk membentuk mungkin jutaan perkataan, tetapi mayat Mongolia yang ada tidak cukup untuk membina keseluruhan perkataan yang kuat, sehingga ia menderita masalah ringan data serius dan membawa kesulitan besar untuk ramalan PB Mongolia. Untuk menyelesaikan masalah ini, kita melihat unit sub-perkataan dalam perkataan Mongolia, dan mengekodkan maklumat mereka kepada perwakilan bermakna, kemudian memberi makan kepada LSTM untuk menyahkod label PB yang sepadan dengan yang terbaik. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model yang direncanakan melampaui cara yang signifikan model CRF tradisional menggunakan ciri-ciri secara manual dan mendapatkan 7.49% keuntungan F-Measure.', 'ml': 'In this paper, we first utilize the word embedding that focuses on sub-word units to the Mongolian Phrase Break (PB) prediction task by using Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM) model.  മോങ്ഗോളിയന്\u200d ഒരു ഗ്ലൂട്ടിനേറ്റീവ് ഭാഷ ആണ്. കോടികണക്കിന് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കാന്\u200d എല്ലാ വേരും പിന്തുടരാന്\u200d കഴിയും, പക്ഷെ നിലവിലുള്ള മോങ്ഗോളിയന്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് മുഴുവന്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d ഇടിച്ചുകൊണ്ടുവരാ ഈ പ്രശ്നം തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മോങ്ഗോളിയന്\u200d വാക്കിലെ സബ്\u200cവോര്\u200dഡ് യൂണിറ്റുകള്\u200d നോക്കി അവരുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d അര്\u200dഥ്യമായ ഒരു പ്രതിനിധിയിലേക്ക് ക പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന സാധാരണമായ സിഎഫ് മോഡല്\u200d പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, l-ewwel aħna nużaw il-kelma inkorporazzjoni li tiffoka fuq unitajiet ta’ subkelma għall-kompitu ta’ tbassir tal-Ħruġ tal-Frażi Mongola (PB) billi nużaw il-mudell tal-Memorja fuq terminu twil u qasir (LSTM). Il-Mongol huwa lingwa agglutinattiva. Kull għeruq jista’ jiġi segwit minn bosta suffissi biex probabbilment jiffurmaw miljuni ta’ kliem, iżda l-korpus Mongoljan eżistenti mhuwiex biżżejjed biex jibni kliem sħiħ b’saħħtu inkorporat, u b’hekk iġarrab problem a serja ta’ dejta baxxa u jġib diffikultà kbira għat-tbassir tal-PB Mongoljan. Biex issolvi din il-problem a, a ħna nħarsu lejn l-unitajiet ta’ subkelma bil-kelma Mongola, u nkodifikaw l-informazzjoni tagħhom għal rappreżentanza sinifikanti, imbagħad ingħatawha lil LSTM biex tiddekodifika l-aħjar tikketta tal-PB korrispondenti. Riżultati esperimentali juru li l-mudell propost jaqbeż b’mod sinifikanti l-mudell tradizzjonali tas-CRF bl-użu ta’ karatteristiċi manwali u jikseb qligħ ta’ 7.49% F-Miżura.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид анхны дараа монголын фраз Break (PB) таамаглалын нэгжүүд дээр төвлөрүүлсэн үгийг ашиглаж, урт-богино-Term-Memory (LSTM) загварыг ашиглаж байна. Монгол бол аглуутайн хэл. Сүүн бүр сая сая үг үүсгэхийн тулд олон хандлагатай байж болно. Гэхдээ оршиж байгаа Монголын корпус бүх үг бүтээхэд хангалттай биш. Тиймээс энэ нь маш чухал өгөгдлийн асуудал болж, Монголын ПБ хувьд маш хэцүү байдаг. Энэ асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд бид Монголын үгийн суб үгийн нэгжүүдийг харж, мэдээллийг үнэ цэнэтэй төлөвлөгөөнд кодлож, дараа нь LSTM-д хамгийн сайн харьцуулагдах ПБ үлгэр шилжүүлэх хэрэгтэй. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн загвар нь уламжлалтын КРФ загварыг гар чадварыг ашиглан 7.49% F-Measure нэмэгдүүлдэг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule wykorzystujemy najpierw osadzenie słów, które koncentruje się na jednostkach podsłów do zadania predykcyjnego przełamania fraz mongolskich (PB) przy użyciu modelu Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM). Mongolski jest językiem aglutynatywnym. Każdy korzeń może być następny kilkoma przyrostkami tworzącymi prawdopodobnie miliony słów, ale istniejący mongolski korpus nie wystarczy, aby zbudować solidne osadzenie całego słowa, dlatego cierpi na poważny problem rzadkich danych i przynosi duże trudności dla mongolskiej prognozy PB. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, przyjrzymy się jednostkom podsłów w słowie mongolskim i zakodowujemy ich informacje do znaczącej reprezentacji, a następnie podamy ją LSTM, aby dekodować najlepiej odpowiadającą etykietę PB. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowany model znacznie przewyższa tradycyjny model CRF wykorzystujący ręczne funkcje i uzyskuje 7,49% F-Measure zysk.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, folosim mai întâi cuvântul încorporare care se concentrează pe unitățile subcuvintelor la sarcina de predicție a frazelor mongole Break (PB) utilizând modelul Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM). Mongola este o limbă aglutinativă. Fiecare rădăcină poate fi urmată de mai multe sufixe pentru a forma probabil milioane de cuvinte, dar corpul mongol existent nu este suficient pentru a construi o încorporare solidă de cuvânt întreg, astfel suferă o problemă serioasă de date rare și aduce o mare dificultate pentru predicția mongolă PB. Pentru a rezolva această problemă, ne uităm la unitățile subcuvintelor în cuvânt mongol, și codăm informațiile lor într-o reprezentare semnificativă, apoi le-am dat la LSTM pentru a decoda cea mai bună etichetă PB corespunzătoare. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul propus depășește semnificativ modelul tradițional CRF folosind caracteristici manuale și obține un câștig de 7,49% F-Measure.', 'no': 'I denne papiret bruker vi først ordinnbygginga som fokuserer på underordeiningar til forhåndsvising av Mongoliske frasbruk (PB) ved å bruka lang- kort- minne (LSTM) modellen. Mongolsk er ein agglutiv språk. Kvar rot kan følgjast av fleire suffiksar for å laga sannsynlegvis millioner ord, men den eksisterande Mongolske korpusen er ikkje nok for å bygge eit robust heile ord innebygging, slik at det følgjer ein seriøsk problem med data-sparse og fører ein stor vanskelighet for Mongolske PB-forhåndsvising. For å løyse dette problemet ser vi på underordeiningar i Mongolsk ord, og koder informasjonen sine til ein betydelig representasjon, og så får vi det til LSTM for å dekode den beste tilsvarande PB-merkelappen. Eksperimentale resultat viser at den foreslåde modellen utfører tradisjonelle CRF-modellen ved hjelp av manuelt funksjonar og får 7,49 % fjerning av F-målingar.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru, prvi put koristimo reč koja se fokusira na podrečne jedinice za predviđanje mongolske fraze Break (PB) koristeći model dugoročne uspomene (LSTM). Mongolski je agresivan jezik. Svakom korijenu može pratiti nekoliko sufiksa za formiranje vjerojatno milijuna reči, ali postojeći Mongolski korpus nije dovoljan da izgradi jaku cijelu reč, tako da pati ozbiljan problem rezerviranog podataka i donosi veliku teškoću za predviđanje Mongolijske PB. Da bi rešili ovaj problem, pogledali smo podrečne jedinice u Mongolskoj reči, i kodirali njihove informacije značajnom predstavljanju, a onda ga hranili LSTM da dekodira najbolje odgovarajuće etikete PB. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi model značajno iznosi tradicionalni model CRF koristeći rukovne funkcije i dobija dobitak od 7,49% F-mjere.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පළමු ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා මොන්ගෝලියාන් ප්\u200dරේස් බ්\u200dරේක් (PB) විශ්වාස විශ්වාස කරනවා මොන්ගෝලියාන් ප්\u200dරමාණය (LSTM) මතකය සඳහා ප මොන්ගෝලියාන් තමයි ග්\u200dරස්තාවික භාෂාවක්. හැම මූලෙක්ම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්ම පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වචන මිලියන් වචනයක් හදන්න, නමුත් තියෙන්නේ මොන්ගෝලියාන් කොර්පස් මුළු වචනයක් හදන්න පුළුව මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විසඳන්න, අපි මොන්ගෝලියාන් වචනයේ සබ් වචනය යුනිට බලන්න, ඔවුන්ගේ තොරතුරු අදහස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයකට කෝඩ් කරන්න, ඊට පස්සේ ඒක පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විශේෂයෙන් පරීක්ෂාත්මක CRF මොඩල් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනව', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ugu horraynaa isticmaalnaa hadalka ku habboon ee kooxaha hoos-hadalka ee u jeeda shaqada la sii sheegayo (PB) ee Mongolian ku isticmaalayo modelka Long-Short-Term-memory (LSTM). Mongolian waa luqad af hooyo. Halkaas waxaa la soo daba socon karaa xidid badan oo ay u sameyn karaan milyan hadal, laakiin qofka mugoliya ah ee uu joogo ma filna in uu dhiso hadal la dhacay oo dhan, sidaas darteed dhibaato badan oo macluumaad ku nool yahay oo ay dhibaato badan u timaadaa wax ku saabsan soo sheegidda Mongolian PB. Si aan u xallino dhibaatadan, waxaynu fiirinaynaa qaybaha afka Mongoliya, macluumaadkoodana waxaan ugu qoraynaa mid u jeeda macluumaad faa’iido ah, kadibna waxaan u siinnay LSTM si aan u deyminno alaabta ugu fiican ee u dhigno PB. Imtixaanka waxaa laga muujiyaa in qaababka lagu soo jeedo uu si muhiim ah u sameeyo qaababka caadiga ah ee CRF oo lagu isticmaalayo qalabka caadiga ah, wuxuuna heli karaa faa'iidada 7.49% F-miisaanka.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats använder vi först ordet inbäddning som fokuserar på underordenheter till den mongoliska frasbrytningen (PB) prediktionsuppgiften genom att använda Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM). Mongoliska är ett agglutinant språk. Varje rot kan följas av flera suffix för att bilda förmodligen miljontals ord, men den existerande mongoliska korpusen räcker inte för att bygga en robust hel ordinbäddning, därför lider den av ett allvarligt problem med gles data och medför en stor svårighet för mongoliska PB förutsägelse. För att lösa detta problem tittar vi på underordsenheter i mongoliska ord, och kodar deras information till en meningsfull representation, sedan matade vi den till LSTM för att avkoda den bästa motsvarande PB etiketten. Experimentella resultat visar att den föreslagna modellen avsevärt överträffar traditionell CRF-modell med manuella funktioner och erhåller 7,49% F-Measure-vinst.', 'ta': 'In this paper, we first utilize the word embedding that focuses on sub-word units to the Mongolian Phrase Break (PB) prediction task by using Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM) model.  மொங்கோலியன் ஒரு குறிப்புச் சார்ந்த மொழி. ஒவ்வொரு மூலமும் மில்லியன் வார்த்தைகளை உருவாக்க பல பின்னங்களால் பின்பற்றி இருக்கலாம். ஆனால் தற்போதைய மாங்கோலியன் கோர்ப்ஸ் முழு வார்த்தையும் உருவாக்க போதும இந்த பிரச்சனையை தீர்வு செய்ய, நாம் மொங்கோலியன் சொல்லில் துணை அலகுகளை பார்க்கிறோம், மற்றும் அவர்களின் தகவலை ஒரு அர்த்தமான குறியீட்டிற்கு க பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி கைமுறையாக CRF மாதிரியை செயல்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் 7. 49% F- அளவு பெருக்', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلی بار اس بات کو استعمال کرتے ہیں جو مونگولی فریس برک (PB) کی پیش بینی کا موڈل (LSTM) کے مطابق سوب-ورڈ یونیٹوں پر تمرکز کرتی ہے۔ مونگولی ایک بڑی زبان ہے۔ ہر ریٹ کے پیچھے چند ملیون کلمات بنانے کے لئے تعداد کی تعداد کی جاتی ہے، لیکن موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود کورپوس کو ایک مضبوط کلمات بنانے کے لئے کافی نہیں ہے، اسی طرح اس کے لئے ایک سخت ڈیٹ کے مضبوط مشکل ہے اور Mongolian PB پیش بینی کے لئے بہت بڑی مشکل اس مسئلہ کو حل کرنے کے لئے، ہم مونgolian لفظ میں سوب لفظ یونیٹوں کو دیکھتے ہیں، اور ان کی معلومات ایک معنی نمونی کے ساتھ کوڈ کرتے ہیں، پھر اسے LSTM کے لئے کھانا دیتے ہیں کہ سب سے بہترین مسئلہ PB لابل کو دکوڈ کرے۔ تجربہ نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی موڈل مثبت سے سنتی CRF موڈل کو ہاتھی سے فائدے کے مطابق کامل کرتا ہے اور 7.49% F-Measure gain حاصل کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz birinchi marta birinchi so'zni boshqarish mumkin, bu so'zning tub so'zlar birikmasiga foydalanuvchimiz. Boshqa uzun xotira (LSTM) modeldan foydalanish mumkin. Mongoliya - agglutinat tili. Har bir root qo'shish mumkin millionlab so'zlarni yaratish mumkin, lekin mavjud mongoliy korpus butun so'zni yaratishga yetarli emas, shunday qilib u juda katta maʼlumotni kichiklashtirish muammolari va Mongoliy PB kutilgan odamlar uchun juda qiyin qiladi. Bu muammolani solish uchun Mongoliya so'zdagi tub so'zlarni ko'rib turamiz va ularning ma'lumotlarini ma'lumotga kodlash mumkin, keyin buni LSTM'ga yetkazib beramiz. Name", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta lần đầu tiên sử dụng từ nhúng tập trung vào các đơn vị dưới từ để dự đoán ngôn ngữ Mông Cổ (PB) bằng cách sử dụng mô hình Thời kỳ ngắn (LSTM). Mông Cổ là một ngôn ngữ đậm dội. Mỗi gốc có thể được tiếp theo bởi vài động tố đủ để hình thành có thể hàng triệu từ, nhưng tập đoàn Mông Cổ hiện tại không đủ để xây dựng một sự nhúng đầu từ to àn diện mạnh mẽ, do đó nó phải chịu một vấn đề dữ liệu mỏng manh nghiêm trọng và gây ra một khó khăn lớn cho dự đoán PBlian. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi xem các đơn vị dưới từ Mông Cổ, và mã hóa thông tin của họ thành một đại diện có ý nghĩa, rồi chuyển nó cho LSTM để giải mã nhãn PB tương ứng tốt nhất. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu đã được đề xuất khả năng cao hơn mẫu CRF truyền thống sử dụng các tính năng bằng tay và đạt được lợi thế 7.42.oh.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel gebruiken we eerst het woord embedding dat zich richt op subwoordeenheden voor de Mongoolse Phrase Break (PB) voorspellingstak door gebruik te maken van Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM) model. Mongools is een agglutinatieve taal. Elke wortel kan worden gevolgd door meerdere achtervoegsels om waarschijnlijk miljoenen woorden te vormen, maar het bestaande Mongoolse corpus is niet genoeg om een robuust geheel woord embedding te bouwen, dus het lijdt aan een serieus dataschaars probleem en brengt een grote moeilijkheid voor Mongoolse PB voorspelling. Om dit probleem op te lossen, kijken we naar sub-woord eenheden in Mongools woord, en coderen hun informatie naar een betekenisvolle representatie, vervolgens voeren we het naar LSTM om het best corresponderende PB label te decoderen. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat het voorgestelde model aanzienlijk beter presteert dan het traditionele CRF-model met handmatige functies en 7,49% F-Measure winst verkrijgt.', 'bg': 'В тази статия първо използваме думата вграждане, която се фокусира върху подсловните единици към задачата за прогнозиране на монголски фрази чрез използване на модел за дългосрочна краткосрочна памет. Монголският е аглутинационен език. Всеки корен може да бъде последван от няколко суфикса, за да се образуват вероятно милиони думи, но съществуващият монголски корпус не е достатъчен, за да се изгради здрава цяла дума вграждане, поради което той страда от сериозен проблем с оскъдните данни и носи голяма трудност за прогнозирането на монголския PB. За да решим този проблем, разглеждаме подсловните единици в монголската дума и кодираме тяхната информация в смислено представяне, след което я подаваме на LSTM, за да декодираме най-добрия съответстващ етикет PB. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният модел значително превъзхожда традиционния модел използвайки ръчни функции и получава 7,49% печалба от мярката.', 'da': 'I denne artikel bruger vi først ordet embedding, der fokuserer på underordenheder til Mongolian Phrase Break (PB) forudsigelsesopgave ved hjælp af Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM) modellen. Mongolsk er et agglutinant sprog. Hver rod kan efterfølges af flere suffikser til at danne sandsynligvis millioner af ord, men det eksisterende mongolske korpus er ikke nok til at bygge en robust hel ordindlejring, så det lider af et alvorligt datasparsomt problem og bringer en stor vanskelighed for mongolsk PB forudsigelse. For at løse dette problem ser vi på underordsenheder i mongolsk ord, og koder deres oplysninger til en meningsfuld repræsentation, derefter fodret det til LSTM for at afkode den bedste tilsvarende PB etiket. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede model betydeligt overgår traditionel CRF model ved hjælp af manuelt funktioner og opnår 7,49% F-Measure gevinst.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru, prvo koristimo riječ ugrađenu koja se fokusira na podriječne jedinice za predviđanje Mongolske fraze Break (PB) s uzorkom dugoročne uspomene (LSTM). Mongolski je agglutinativni jezik. Svaki korijen može pratiti nekoliko sufiksa za formiranje vjerojatno milijuna riječi, ali postojeći Mongolski korijen nije dovoljan da izgradi robu cijelu riječ uključujući, stoga pati ozbiljan problem rezerviranog podataka i donosi veliku teškoću za predviđanje Mongolijske PB. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, pogledali smo podriječne jedinice u Mongolskoj riječi, i kodirali njihove informacije značajnom zastupanju, zatim ga nahranili LSTM-u kako bi dekodirali najbolje odgovarajuće etikete PB. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi model značajno iznosi tradicionalni model CRF koristeći ručne funkcije i dobija dobitak od 7,49% F-mjere.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kita pertama-tama menggunakan kata embedding yang fokus pada unit sub-kata untuk tugas prediksi Frasa Break Mongolia (PB) dengan menggunakan model Memori Panjang-Panjang-Term (LSTM). Mongolia adalah bahasa agglutinatif. Setiap akar dapat diikuti oleh beberapa suffix untuk membentuk mungkin jutaan kata, tetapi mayat Mongolia yang ada tidak cukup untuk membangun sebuah penutup kata yang kuat, sehingga ia menderita masalah data yang sedikit serius dan membawa kesulitan besar untuk prediksi PB Mongolia. Untuk memecahkan masalah ini, kita melihat unit sub-kata dalam kata Mongolia, dan mengkode informasi mereka ke sebuah representation yang berarti, kemudian memberi makan kepada LSTM untuk mendekode label PB yang paling cocok. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan jauh lebih berharga dari model CRF tradisional menggunakan fitur manual dan mendapatkan 7,49% keuntungan F-Measure.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag verwenden wir zunächst das Wort Einbettung, das sich auf Unterworteinheiten konzentriert, für die Vorhersageaufgabe Mongolian Phrase Break (PB) mithilfe des Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM)-Modells. Mongolisch ist eine agglutinative Sprache. Jede Wurzel kann von mehreren Suffixen gefolgt werden, um wahrscheinlich Millionen von Wörtern zu bilden, aber der bestehende mongolische Korpus reicht nicht aus, um eine robuste gesamte Worteinbettung aufzubauen, daher leidet er unter einem ernsthaften datenspärlichen Problem und bringt eine große Schwierigkeit für die mongolische PB Vorhersage. Um dieses Problem zu lösen, schauen wir uns Unterworteinheiten im mongolischen Wort an, und codieren ihre Informationen zu einer sinnvollen Darstellung, dann speisen wir sie an LSTM, um das beste entsprechende PB-Label zu decodieren. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell das traditionelle CRF-Modell mit manuellen Funktionen deutlich übertrifft und 7,49% F-Measure-Gewinn erzielt.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 먼저 장단시간기억(LSTM)모델을 이용하여 자사 단원에 주목하는 단어를 몽골어 단어 중단(PB) 예측 임무에 삽입한다.몽골어는 끈적끈적한 언어의 일종이다.모든 어근 뒤에 몇 개의 접미사가 있을 수 있어 수백만 개의 단어가 형성될 수 있지만 기존의 몽골어 어료 라이브러리는 건장한 완전한 단어 삽입을 구축하기에 부족하기 때문에 심각한 데이터 희소 문제가 존재하여 몽골어 PB 예측에 큰 어려움을 가져왔다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 몽골어 단어 중의 하위 단어 단원을 연구하고 그들의 정보를 의미 있는 표시로 인코딩한 다음에 LSTM에 입력하여 대응하는 가장 좋은 PB 라벨을 디코딩한다.실험 결과 이 모델은 기존의 인공적 특징에 기반한 CRF 모델보다 현저히 우수해 7.49%의 F-측정 이득을 얻었다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، اولین بار کلمه را استفاده می کنیم که روی واحدهای زیر کلمه برای پیش\u200cبینی کلمه\u200cهای مانgolی (PB) تمرکز می\u200cکند با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای مدل\u200cهای کوتاه\u200cTerm-Memory (LSTM) استفاده می\u200cکنیم. مانgolی یک زبان گرانگیز است. هر ریشه می\u200cتواند با چند تاثیر برای ساختن میلیون\u200cها کلمه پیروی شود، ولی جسد مانgolی موجود به اندازه کافی نیست که کلمه کلمه\u200cای استوار ساخته شود، بنابراین مشکل جدی داده\u200cها را به دست می\u200cآورد و مشکل بزرگی برای پیش\u200cبینی PB مانgolی می\u200cآورد. برای حل این مشکل، ما به واحدهای زیر کلمه در کلمه مانgolی نگاه می کنیم، و اطلاعات آنها را به یک نمایش معنی Encode می کنیم، سپس آن را به LSTM تغذیه می کنیم تا بهترین نقاشی PB متصل شود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل پیشنهاد با استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای دستی از مدل CRF سنتی با استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای خود بیشتر از حدود 7.49% F-Measure می\u200cیابد.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, kwanza tunatumia neno la kuingiza ambalo linalenga vifaa vya maneno sub-maneno kwa kazi ya kutabiri maneno ya Kimongolia (PB) kwa kutumia modeli ya Kumbukumbu ya muda mfupi (LSTM). Kimongolia ni lugha ya asili. Kila mizizi inaweza kufuatiliwa na matatizo kadhaa ya kuandaa mamilioni ya maneno, lakini makampuni ya sasa ya Mongolia haitoshi kujenga neno lililopangwa, kwa hiyo inakabiliwa na tatizo kubwa la kuangalia takwimu na kusababisha matatizo makubwa kwa utabiri wa PB wa Mongolia. Ili kutatua tatizo hili, tunaangalia viungo vya maneno vidogo kwa maneno ya Kimongolia, na kuingiza taarifa zao kwa uwakilishi wa maana, na kisha kuipa LSTM ili kupunguza alama bora inayofanana na PB. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba muundo huo unapendekezwa kwa kiasi kikubwa unafanya mtindo wa kitamaduni wa CRF kwa kutumia vipengele vya mikononi na kupata mafanikio ya 7.49% F-Mimea.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda ilkinji gezek Mongoliýa Fraz Paýdançasynda üns-söz birimlerine fokus eden sözleri ulanýarys Mongolça gaharlandyran dildir. Her kök tarapyndan bir näçe golaý söz biçirmek üçin golaý ýerleşdirilip biler, emma bar Mongoliýanyň korpusy bolan bütin söz biçirmek üçin ýeterli däl, şonuň üçin ol möhüm maglumatlar boýunça hasaplanýar we Mongoliýa PB öňünde örän kynçylyk bar. Bu meseleni çözmek üçin Mongoliýanyň sözlerinde sub-söz birimlerini seredip, olaryň malümatyny möhüm bir temsile kodlamak üçin LSTM'a süýtgedik we iň gowy metini PB etiketine kodlamak üçin saýladyk. Aramanyň netijeleri görkezilýän nusgasyň düzenli CRF nusgasyny eliden üýtgedip 7.49% F-Ölçüsi gazanýandygyny görkezýär.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne së pari përdorim fjalën përfshirje që përqëndrohet në njësitë e nënfjalëve në detyrën parashikuese të frymëzimit mongol (PB) duke përdorur modelin Long-Short-Term Memory (LSTM). Mongolian is an agglutinative language.  Çdo rrënjë mund të pasohet nga disa sufikse për të formuar ndoshta miliona fjalë, por trupi ekzistues mongol nuk është i mjaftueshëm për të ndërtuar një fjalë të fortë të tërë të përfshirë, kështu që ai vuan nga një problem serioz të dhënash të paktën dhe sjell një vështirësi të madhe për parashikimin e PB mongol. Për të zgjidhur këtë problem, ne shikojmë njësitë e nënfjalëve në fjalën mongolike, dhe kodojmë informacionin e tyre në një përfaqësim të kuptueshëm, pastaj e ushqejmë në LSTM për të dekodifikuar etiketën më të mirë korrespondente PB. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli i propozuar tejkalon ndjeshëm modelin tradicional CRF duke përdorur karakteristikat manuale dhe fiton 7.49% fitim F-Measure.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons gebruik eerste die woord inbêring wat fokus op sub- woord eenhede na die Mongoliese Frase Break (PB) voorskou taak deur die gebruik van Lang- Kort- Term- Geheue (LSTM) model te gebruik. Mongoliese is 'n agglutinatiewe taal. Elke wortel kan volg word deur verskeie volgorde om waarskynlik miljoene woorde te vorm, maar die bestaande Mongoliese korpus is nie genoeg om 'n sterk hele woord te bou, sodat dit lyf 'n seriese data sparse probleem en bring 'n groot moeilikheid vir Mongoliese PB voorskou. Om hierdie probleem te los, kyk ons na subwoord eenhede in Mongolie woord, en kodeer hul inligting na 'n betekende voorstelling, dan verskaf ons dit na LSTM om die beste ooreenstemmende PB etiket te dekode. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat die voorgestelde model betekeurig uitvoer tradisionele CRF-model met hand funksies en kry 7.49% F-Measure verskaf.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ፣ አስቀድመን የቆራጭ-የረዘመ-ማስታወሻ (LSTM) ሞዴል በመጠቀም የሞንጎላዊ የፊደል ቋንቋ አቋራጭ (PB) ትምህርት ስራ ላይ የሚያስከትለውን ቃላትን በመጠቀም እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ሞንጎላዊ ቋንቋ ነው፡፡ የሥር ሁሉ ምናልባት ሚሊዮን ቃላትን ለመፍጠር የሚችል ብዙዎች ተጨማሪ ይችላል፤ ነገር ግን የአሁኑ ሞንጎላዊ ኮፓስ የሙሉ ቃልን መሥራት አይበቃም፤ ስለዚህም ለሞንጎላዊ PB ትንቢት ትክክል የዳታ መቆጣጠር ችግር አግኝቷል፡፡ ይህንን ጉዳይ ለመፍታት፣ በሞንጎላዊ ቃላት አካላትን እናየዋለን እናስታውቃቸውንም ለአስተያያየት መልዕክት እናስቀድዳለን፡፡ Experimental results show that the proposed model significantly outperforms traditional CRF model using manually features and obtains 7.49% F-Measure gain.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রথম শব্দ ব্যবহার করি যা সাবওয়ার্ড ইউনিটের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছে মঙ্গোলিয়ান ফ্রেস ব্রেক (পিবি) ভবিষ্যৎবাণী কাজের মাধ্যমে লম্বা-শর্ট-টার ম মোঙ্গোলিয়ান একটি ভাষা। কিন্তু বর্তমান মোঙ্গোলিয়ান কোর্পাস পুরো শব্দ বানানোর জন্য যথেষ্ট নয়, যার ফলে এটি একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ তথ্যের সংক্রান্ত সমস্যা আর মঙ্গোলিয়ার পিবি ভবিষ্যতের জন্য এই সমস্যার সমাধানের জন্য আমরা মঙ্গোলিয়ান শব্দের সাব-ওয়ার্ড ইউনিটের দিকে তাকাই এবং তাদের তথ্য অর্থহীন প্রতিনিধিত্বের কাছে এনকোড করি, তারপর এলএসএম পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল অনেক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সাধারণ বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার করে এবং ৭.৪৯% এফ-মাপ অর্জন পায়।', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջին անգամ օգտագործում ենք ներգրավման բառը, որը կենտրոնանում է Մոնգոլացի արտահայտության փնտրի (PB) կանխատեսման ենթաբառերի վրա, օգտագործելով երկար-կարճ-տերմին-հիշողության (LSMT) մոդելը: Մոնգոլին ագլուտիվ լեզու է: Յուրաքանչյուր արմատ կարող է հետևել բազմաթիվ բառերով, որպեսզի հավանաբար միլիոնավոր բառեր ստեղծվի, բայց գոյություն ունեցող մոնգոլական մարմինը բավարար չէ, որպեսզի ստեղծվի ամբողջ բառը ներգրավված լինելու համար, այնպես որ այն տառապում է լուրջ տվյալների փո Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք նայում ենք մոնգոլական բառի ենթաբառերի միավորներին, կոդավորում ենք իրենց տեղեկատվությունը իմաստալից ներկայացում, հետո կերակրում ենք այն LSMT-ին, որպեսզի կոդավորենք լավագույն համապատասխան PB պիտակը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոդելը նշանակալիորեն գերազանցում է ավանդական ԿՌՖ մոդելը՝ օգտագործելով ձեռքով հատկություններ և ստանում է 7.49 տոկոս F-Միտումների շահու', 'ca': "En aquest paper, primer utilitzem la paraula incorporadora que es centra en unitats de subcord a la tasca de predicció de Pausa de Frases Mongòlica (PB) utilitzant el model de Memoria a llarg termini curt (LSTM). El mongol és un llenguatge aglutinatiu. Cada raíz pot ser seguida de diversos sufixxos per formar probablement milions de paraules, però el cos mongol existent no és suficient per construir una paraula completa robust a incorporada, així que pateix un problema seriós d'escassetat de dades i porta una gran dificultat per a la predicció de la PB mongol. Per resoldre aquest problem a, mirem les unitats sub-paraules en paraula mongol, codifiquem la seva informació a una representació significativa, i després l'alimentam a LSTM per descodificar la millor etiqueta PB correspondent. Experimental results show that the proposed model significantly outperforms traditional CRF model using manually features and obtains 7.49% F-Measure gain.", 'az': "Bu kağızda ilk dəfə Mongoliyan Fraz Break (PB) tədbir törətməsini, uzun-qısqa-Term-Memory (LSTM) modelini istifadə edərək içərisində olan sözü istifadə edirik. Mongol təşkil dilidir. Hər kök mümkün olaraq milyonlarca söz yaratmaq üçün bir neçə qədər yetişdirə bilər, amma mevcut Mongol körpüsü bütün söz inşa etmək üçün yeterli deyildir, buna görə də ciddi məlumatlar çəkilməsi problemi var və Mongol PB tədbirlərinə böyük çətinlik gətirir. Bu problemi çəkmək üçün, Mongoliyalı sözlərin altı sözlərin birincilərinə baxıb, onların məlumatlarını anlamlı bir göstəriməyə kodlayıb, sonra da LSTM'ə ən yaxşı növbənöv PB etiketini kodlamaq üçün verdik. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş modellərin dəyişiklik CRF modelini əl fəaliyyətlərlə istifadə edərək 7,49% F-Ölçüsi qəbul edər.", 'bs': 'U ovom papiru, prvo koristimo riječ ugrađenu koja se fokusira na podriječne jedinice za predviđanje Mongolske fraze Break (PB) koristeći model Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM). Mongolski je agresivan jezik. Svaki korijen može pratiti nekoliko sufiksa za formiranje vjerojatno milijuna riječi, ali postojeći Mongolski korpus nije dovoljan da izgradi robu cijelu riječ, tako da pati ozbiljan problem rezerviranog podataka i donosi veliku teškoću za predviđanje Mongolijske PB. Da bi riješili ovaj problem, pogledali smo podriječne jedinice u Mongolskoj riječi, i kodirali njihove informacije značajnom zastupanju, a onda ga hranili LSTM da dekodira najbolje odgovarajuće etikete PB. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predloženi model značajno iznosi tradicionalni model CRF koristeći rukovne funkcije i dobija dobitak od 7,49% F-mjere.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku nejprve využíváme vkládání slov, které se zaměřuje na podslovní jednotky do predikční úlohy mongolského přerušení fráze (PB) pomocí LSTM modelu. Mongolština je aglutinativní jazyk. Každý kořen může být následován několika příponami, aby tvořil pravděpodobně miliony slov, ale stávající mongolský korpus nestačí na vytvoření robustního celého vložení slov, takže trpí vážným problémem řídkých dat a přináší velké obtíže pro mongolskou PB predikci. Abychom tento problém vyřešili, podíváme se na jednotky podslov v mongolském slově a zakódujeme jejich informace do smysluplné reprezentace, pak je předáme LSTM, abychom dekódovali nejlepší odpovídající PB štítek. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navržený model výrazně překonává tradiční CRF model pomocí ručních funkcí a získává zisk 7,49% F-Measure.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kasutame esmalt sõna manustamist, mis keskendub Mongoolia fraasimurre (PB) ennustamisülesande alamsõnaühikutele, kasutades pikaajalist lühiajalist mälu (LSTM) mudelit. Mongoolia keel on aglutinaatne keel. Igale juurele võib järgneda mitu sufiksi, mis moodustavad ilmselt miljoneid sõnu, kuid olemasolevast Mongoolia korpusest ei piisa, et ehitada tugev terve sõna manustamine, mistõttu kannatab see tõsise andmete hõreda probleemi ja toob Mongoolia PB ennustamisele suure raskuse. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks vaatame mongooli sõna alamsõnaühikuid ja kodeerime nende teabe tähenduslikuks esituseks, seejärel söötsime selle LSTM-ile, et dekodeerida parim vastav PB-silt. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kavandatud mudel ületab märkimisväärselt traditsioonilist CRF mudelit käsitsi funktsioone kasutades ja saavutab 7,49% F-Measure kasu.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa käytämme ensin sanaa upottamista, joka keskittyy Mongolian Phrase Break (PB) -ennustetehtävään käyttämällä Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM) -mallia. Mongolia on agglutinaatti kieli. Jokaista juuria voi seurata useita sufixejä muodostaakseen todennäköisesti miljoonia sanoja, mutta olemassa oleva mongolialainen korpus ei riitä rakentamaan vankkaa kokonaista sanaa upottamalla, joten se kärsii vakavasta datan niukkuudesta ja tuo suuria vaikeuksia mongolian PB ennustamiseen. Ongelman ratkaisemiseksi katsomme mongolian sanan alasanayksiköitä ja koodaamme niiden tiedot merkitykselliseen esitykseen, syötämme sen LSTM:lle, jotta voimme purkaa parhaan vastaavan PB-merkinnän. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu malli suoriutuu merkittävästi perinteisestä CRF-mallista käsin käsin ja saa 7,49% F-Measure-vahvistuksen.', 'jv': 'In this paper, we first use the word embedding that centers on the Sub-word unit to the Mongolian Frase break (PB) preview task by use long-shortTerminal-mem (SLT M) model. Mongolian kuwi akeh buanget. Selah Ngawe ngubah perbudhakan iki, kita gadoh sampeyan podho kelas nang kelas Mongolian, lan kode informasi nggawe lan tambah sing dikareparasi ingkang, sane nambah dhéwé, sak ngetokaké LTT M lan kode etiket PB sing apik dhéwé. Refirment', 'sk': 'V tem prispevku najprej uporabimo besedno vdelavo, ki se osredotoča na podbesedne enote za napoved mongolskega preloma fraze (PB) z uporabo modela Long-Short-Memory (LSTM). Mongolščina je aglutinacijski jezik. Vsakemu korenu lahko sledi več pripon, ki tvorijo verjetno milijone besed, vendar obstoječi mongolski korpus ni dovolj za zgraditev robustne celotne besede, zato trpi resen problem z redkimi podatki in prinaša veliko težav za napoved mongolskega PB. Da bi rešili ta problem, pogledamo podbesedne enote v mongolski besedi in kodiramo njihove informacije v smiselno predstavitev, nato jih podamo LSTM, da dekodiramo najboljšo ustrezno PB oznako. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da predlagani model bistveno presega tradicionalni model CRF z ročnimi funkcijami in doseže 7,49% dobička F-Measure.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardar, za mu yi amfani da maganar da ke fitarwa wanda ke yin fokus a kan ƙanƙan-magana guda zuwa aikin bayani'ura na fassarar magana (PB) na Mongolia da kuma za'a yi amfani da motsi na Long-Short-Cire-Lommar (LTRM). @ item Spelling dictionary Ana iya biyar kowace rasa ko da waɗansu iskõki masu yiwuwa na ƙididdige misãlin magana, kuma amma nauyin Mongoliya wanda ke gaba ba ya is a ya zama mai ƙiƙiro wani zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-bakin, don haka yana da matsayin maɓallin data mai girma kuma ya zo da wata masĩfa mai girma wa birnin PB na Mongolia. Dõmin mu bayyana wannan muammãni, Muna dũba kayan cikin maganar Mongoliya masu ƙaranci, kuma munã kodi agarantarsu zuwa wani mai muhimmi, sa'an nan kuma muka bai shi zuwa LSSM dõmin ka yi kodi da mafi kyaun mai daidaita label na PB. Matarin da aka jarraba shi ya nuna cewa, shirin da aka buɗe shi yana mai girma ga cikakken motel na CRF da amfani da tsaro na hannayen kuma yana sami amfani da amfani da 7.49% F-Tsarin.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו קודם משתמשים במילה קיבלת שמתמקדת על יחידות תת-מילים למשימת החזוי של הפרזיה המונגולית (PB) על ידי השימוש במודל זיכרון לטווח קצר ארוך (LSTM). Mongolian is an agglutinative language.  לכל שורש ניתן לעקוב על ידי מספר סביבות כדי ליצור כנראה מיליוני מילים, אבל הגופה המונגולית הנוכחית אינה מספיק כדי לבנות מילה שלמה מוצקה, כך היא סובלת בעיה רצינית של נתונים חסרים ומביאה קשה גדולה לחזוי PB מונגולי. כדי לפתור את הבעיה הזאת, אנו מסתכלים על יחידות מתחת מילים במילה מונגולית, וקודים את המידע שלהם למציגה משמעותית, ואז האכילו אותו ל-LSTM כדי לפענח את תווית PB המתאימה הטובה ביותר. Experimental results show that the proposed model significantly outperforms traditional CRF model using manually features and obtains 7.49% F-Measure gain.', 'bo': 'In this paper, we first utilize the word embedding that focuses on sub-word units to the Mongolian Phrase Break (PB) prediction task by using Long-Short-Term-Memory (LSTM) model. མོང་གོ་ལི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་འགྲེལ་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཞིག་རེད། Each root can be followed by several suffixes to form probably millions of words, but the existing Mongolian corpus is not enough to build a robust entire word embedding, thus it suffers a serious data sparse problem and brings a great difficulty for Mongolian PB prediction. To solve this problem, we look at sub-word units in Mongolian word, and encode their information to a meaningful representation, then fed it to LSTM to decode the best corresponding PB label. Experimental results show that the proposed model significantly outperforms traditional CRF model using manual features and obtains 7.49% F-Measure gain.'}
{'en': 'Synonymy in Bilingual Context : The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'ar': 'مرادف في سياق ثنائي اللغة: معجم CzEngClass', 'fr': 'Synonymie dans un contexte bilingue\xa0: le lexique de la classe CZENG', 'es': 'Sinonimia en contexto bilingüe: El léxico de la clase checa', 'pt': 'Sinonímia em Contexto Bilíngue: O Léxico CzEngClass', 'zh': '双语语境中同义词:CzEngClass 词典', 'ja': 'バイリンガルコンテキストでの同義語: The ----EngClass Lexicon', 'hi': 'द्विभाषी संदर्भ में समानार्थी शब्द: CzEngClass शब्दकोश', 'ru': 'Синонимия в двуязычном контексте: лексикон CzEngClass', 'ga': 'Comhchiallaigh sa Chomhthéacs Dátheangach: An Foclóir CzEngClass', 'el': 'Συνώνυμο σε δίγλωσσο πλαίσιο: Το Λεξικό της CzEngClass', 'hu': 'Szinonimia kétnyelvű kontextusban: A CzEngClass Lexikon', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Қосымша контексті синонимия: Ченгкласс лексикасы', 'mk': 'Синонимија во двогласен контекст: Лексиконот Ченгкласа', 'lt': 'Sinonimija dvikalbiu kontekstu: CzEngClass leksikonas', 'ml': 'ബിലിങ്കുള്\u200d ഉള്ളടക്കം: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'it': 'Sinonimia nel contesto bilingue: La Lexicon CzEngClass', 'ms': 'Sinonimi dalam Konteks Bahasa: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'mt': 'Sinonimija fil-Kuntest Bilingwu: Il-Lexicon CzEngClass', 'no': 'Synonym i bilenguelt kontekst: Leksjonen av CzEngClass', 'mn': 'Хоёрдугаар нөхцөл байдлын хувьд зэрэгцээ: Ченгкласс лексикон', 'pl': 'Synonim w kontekście dwujęzycznym: Leksykon CzEngClass', 'ro': 'Sinonimie în context bilingv: Lexiconul CzEngClass', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Sinonymy in Bilingual Content: The CzEng Class Lexicon', 'sr': 'Sinonija u Bilingualnom kontekstu: Leksion iz Čengleske klase', 'ta': 'பில்லிங்குல் உள்ள ஒத்திசைவு: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'sv': 'Synonymi i tvåspråkigt sammanhang: CzEngClass Lexikon', 'ur': 'بیلینگ کنٹکسٹ میں سینونیمی: چینگ کلاس لکسیسون', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Biểu ngữ ngôn ngữ: Lexicon Name', 'bg': 'Синоним в двуезичен контекст: Лексиконът', 'nl': 'Synoniem in tweetalige context: Het CzEngClass Lexicon', 'hr': 'Synonymy u Bilingualnom kontekstu: Leksion Čengklase', 'da': 'Synonymi i tosproget sammenhæng: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'de': 'Synonym im zweisprachigen Kontext: Das CzEngClass Lexikon', 'ko': '이중 언어 환경의 동의어:CzEngClass 어휘', 'id': 'Sinonimi dalam Konteks Bahasa: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'fa': 'Synonymy in Bilingual Context: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'tr': 'Ikinji sany kontekstda synonymy: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'sw': 'Synonymy in Bilingual Context: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'sq': 'Sinonimi në kontekstin dygjuhës: Lexikoni CzEngClass', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'Synonymy in Bilingual Context: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'az': 'İkinci Kontekstdə Sinonimi: CzEngClass Lexicon', 'bs': 'Sinonim u Bilingualnom kontekstu: Leksion Čengleske klase', 'bn': 'বিলিঙ্গুয়েল বিষয়বস্তুতে সিনোমি', 'ca': 'Synonymy in Bilingual Context: The CzEngClass Lexicon', 'cs': 'Synonymie v dvojjazyčném kontextu: Lexikon CzEngClass', 'et': 'Sünonüüm kahekeelses kontekstis: CzEngClass leksikon', 'fi': 'Synonyymi kaksikielisessä kontekstissa: CzEngClass Lexicon', 'hy': 'The Cenglass Lexicone', 'jv': 'I', 'he': 'סינונימיה בקשר לשולשי: The CzengClass Lexicon', 'sk': 'Sinonim v dvojezičnem kontekstu: Leksikon CzEngClass', 'ha': '@ item license (short name)', 'bo': 'འཛམ་གླིང་གི་སྒྲ་ཚུལ་ནང་ལ་མཐུན་ཚོགས：The CzEngClass Lexicon'}
{'en': 'This paper describes CzEngClass, a bilingual lexical resource being built to investigate verbal synonymy in bilingual context and to relate semantic roles common to one synonym class to verb arguments (verb valency). In addition, the resource is linked to existing resources with the same of a similar aim : English and Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), and valency lexicons for Czech and English (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, and EngVallex). There are several goals of this work and resource : (a) to provide gold standard data for automatic experiments in the future (such as automatic discovery of synonym classes, word sense disambiguation, assignment of classes to occurrences of verbs in text, coreferential linking of verb and event arguments in text, etc.), (b) to build a core (bilingual) lexicon linked to existing resources, for comparative studies and possibly for training automatic tools, and (c) to enrich the annotation of a parallel treebank, the Prague Czech English Dependency Treebank, which so far contained valency annotation but has not linked synonymous senses of verbs together. The method used for extracting the synonym classes is a semi-automatic process with a substantial amount of manual work during filtering, role assignment to classes and individual Class members’ arguments, and linking to the external lexical resources. We present the first version with 200 classes (about 1800 verbs) and evaluate interannotator agreement using several metrics.', 'ar': 'تصف هذه الورقة CzEngClass ، وهو مورد معجم ثنائي اللغة يتم بناؤه للتحقيق في المرادفات اللفظية في سياق ثنائي اللغة وربط الأدوار الدلالية المشتركة لفئة مرادفات واحدة بحجج الفعل (تكافؤ الفعل). بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، فإن المورد مرتبط بالموارد الحالية التي لها نفس الهدف: الإنجليزية والتشيكية WordNet و FrameNet و PropBank و VerbNet (SemLink) وقواميس التكافؤ للغة التشيكية والإنجليزية (PDT-Vallex و Vallex و EngVallex). هناك عدة أهداف لهذا العمل والمورد: (أ) توفير بيانات قياسية ذهبية للتجارب الآلية في المستقبل (مثل الاكتشاف التلقائي لفئات المرادفات ، وإلغاء غموض معنى الكلمة ، وتخصيص الفئات لوقوع الأفعال في النص ، والربط المرجعي لـ حجج الفعل والحدث في النص ، وما إلى ذلك) ، (ب) لبناء معجم أساسي (ثنائي اللغة) مرتبط بالموارد الحالية ، للدراسات المقارنة وربما لتدريب الأدوات الآلية ، و (ج) لإثراء شرح بنك الشجرة الموازي ، بنك تبعية اللغة الإنجليزية في براغ ، والذي احتوى حتى الآن على شرح تكافؤ ولكنه لم يربط بين الحواس المترادفة للأفعال معًا. الطريقة المستخدمة لاستخراج فئات المرادفات هي عملية شبه آلية مع قدر كبير من العمل اليدوي أثناء التصفية وتعيين الدور للفئات وحجج أعضاء الفصل الفردي والربط بالموارد المعجمية الخارجية. نقدم الإصدار الأول مع 200 فئة (حوالي 1800 فعل) وتقييم اتفاق interannotator باستخدام عدة مقاييس.', 'fr': "Cet article décrit CzengClass, une ressource lexicale bilingue conçue pour étudier la synonymie verbale dans un contexte bilingue et pour relier les rôles sémantiques communs à une classe de synonymes aux arguments verbaux (valence des verbes). En outre, la ressource est liée à des ressources existantes ayant le même objectif ou un objectif similaire\xa0: WordNet anglais et tchèque, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SEMLink), et des lexiques de valence pour le tchèque et l'anglais (PDT-Vallex, Vallex et EngVallex). Ce travail et cette ressource ont plusieurs objectifs\xa0: (a) fournir des données de référence pour les expériences automatiques futures (telles que la découverte automatique des classes de synonymes, la désambiguïsation des sens des mots, l'affectation de classes aux occurrences de verbes dans le texte, la liaison coréférentielle d'arguments de verbes et d'événements dans le texte, etc.), b) de construire un lexique de base (bilingue) lié aux ressources existantes, pour des études comparatives et éventuellement pour la formation d'outils automatiques, et (c) d'enrichir l'annotation d'une banque d'arbres parallèle, la Prague Czech English Dependency Treebank, qui contenait jusqu'à présent une annotation de valence mais n'a pas lié sens synonymes des verbes ensemble. La méthode utilisée pour extraire les classes de synonymes est un processus semi-automatique avec une quantité importante de travail manuel pendant le filtrage, l'attribution de rôles aux classes et aux arguments des membres de la classe individuels, et la liaison avec les ressources lexicales externes. Nous présentons la première version avec 200 classes (environ 1800 verbes) et évaluons l'accord entre les annotateurs à l'aide de plusieurs métriques.", 'pt': 'Este artigo descreve CzEngClass, um recurso lexical bilíngue que está sendo construído para investigar sinonímia verbal em contexto bilíngue e relacionar papéis semânticos comuns a uma classe de sinônimos com argumentos verbais (valência do verbo). Além disso, o recurso está vinculado a recursos existentes com o mesmo objetivo semelhante: inglês e tcheco WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) e léxicos de valência para tcheco e inglês (PDT-Vallex, Vallex e EngVallex). Existem vários objetivos deste trabalho e recurso: (a) fornecer dados padrão-ouro para experimentos automáticos no futuro (como descoberta automática de classes de sinônimos, desambiguação de sentido de palavras, atribuição de classes a ocorrências de verbos no texto, ligação correferencial de argumentos de verbos e eventos em texto, etc.), (b) construir um léxico central (bilíngue) vinculado a recursos existentes, para estudos comparativos e possivelmente para treinamento de ferramentas automáticas, e (c) enriquecer a anotação de um treebank paralelo, o Prague Czech English Dependency Treebank, que até agora continha anotação de valência, mas não vinculou sentidos sinônimos de verbos. O método usado para extrair as classes de sinônimos é um processo semiautomático com uma quantidade substancial de trabalho manual durante a filtragem, atribuição de função a classes e argumentos de membros de classe individuais e vinculação aos recursos léxicos externos. Apresentamos a primeira versão com 200 classes (cerca de 1800 verbos) e avaliamos a concordância entre os anotadores usando diversas métricas.', 'es': 'Este artículo describe CzengClass, un recurso léxico bilingüe que se construye para investigar la sinonimia verbal en un contexto bilingüe y para relacionar los roles semánticos comunes a una clase de sinónimos con los argumentos verbales (valencia verbal). Además, el recurso está vinculado a los recursos existentes con el mismo objetivo similar: WordNet en inglés y checo, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SEMLink) y léxicos de valencia para checo e inglés (PDT-Vallex, Vallex y EngVallex). Este trabajo y este recurso tienen varios objetivos: a) proporcionar datos de referencia para experimentos automáticos en el futuro (como el descubrimiento automático de clases de sinónimos, la desambiguación del sentido de las palabras, la asignación de clases a ocurrencias de verbos en el texto, la vinculación correferencial de argumentos de verbos y eventos en el texto, etc.), b) crear un léxico básico (bilingüe) vinculado a los recursos existentes, para estudios comparativos y posiblemente para el entrenamiento de herramientas automáticas, y c) enriquecer la anotación de un banco de árboles paralelo, el Prague Czech English Dependency Treebank, que hasta ahora contenía anotaciones de valencia pero no ha vinculado sinónimos de verbos juntos. El método utilizado para extraer las clases de sinónimos es un proceso semiautomático con una cantidad sustancial de trabajo manual durante el filtrado, la asignación de roles a las clases y los argumentos de los miembros individuales de la clase, y la vinculación a los recursos léxicos externos. Presentamos la primera versión con 200 clases (alrededor de 1800 verbos) y evaluamos la concordancia entre anotadores utilizando varias métricas.', 'ja': 'この論文では、バイリンガル文脈における動詞の同義語を調査し、1つの同義語クラスに共通する意味的役割を動詞の引数（動詞の価値）に関連付けるために構築されたバイリンガルの語彙リソースである、「EngClass」について説明する。 さらに、このリソースは、同様の目的で既存のリソースにリンクされています。英語とチェコ語のWordNet、FrameNet、PropBank、VerbNet （ SemLink ）、チェコ語と英語のValency lexicons （ PDT - Vallex、Vallex、EngVallex ）です。 この研究とリソースにはいくつかの目標があります： （ a ）将来の自動実験のためのゴールドスタンダードデータを提供する（同義語クラスの自動発見、単語感覚の曖昧さ解消、テキスト内の動詞の出現へのクラスの割り当て、テキスト内の動詞とイベント引数のコアライエンシャルリンクなど）、（ b ）既存のリソースにリンクされたコア（バイリンガル）辞書を構築する、比較研究のため、そしておそらく自動ツールのトレーニングのため、および（ c ）並列ツリーバンク、プラハチェコ英語依存ツリーバンクの注釈を充実させるため、これまで価値注釈を含んでいたが、動詞の同義語感覚を一緒にリンクしていなかった。 類義語クラスを抽出するために使用される方法は、フィルタリング中の大量の手動作業、クラスおよび個々のクラスメンバーの引数への役割の割り当て、および外部の辞書リソースへのリンクを伴う半自動プロセスです。 最初のバージョンは200クラス（約1800動詞）で、いくつかの指標を使用して注釈者間の合意を評価します。', 'hi': 'यह पत्र CzEngClass का वर्णन करता है, एक द्विभाषी लेक्सिकल संसाधन द्विभाषी संदर्भ में मौखिक पर्यायवाची की जांच करने के लिए बनाया जा रहा है और क्रिया तर्कों (क्रिया संयोजकता) के लिए एक समानार्थी वर्ग के लिए सामान्य शब्दार्थ भूमिकाओं से संबंधित है। इसके अलावा, संसाधन एक समान उद्देश्य के समान के साथ मौजूदा संसाधनों से जुड़ा हुआ है: अंग्रेजी और चेक वर्डनेट, फ्रेमनेट, प्रोपबैंक, वर्बनेट (सेमलिंक), और चेक और अंग्रेजी के लिए वैलेंसी लेक्सिकॉन (पीडीटी-वैलेक्स, वैलेक्स और इंगवैलेक्स)। इस काम और संसाधन के कई लक्ष्य हैं: (ए) भविष्य में स्वचालित प्रयोगों के लिए सोने के मानक डेटा प्रदान करने के लिए (जैसे पर्यायवाची वर्गों की स्वचालित खोज, शब्द भावना बहुविकल्पी, पाठ में क्रियाओं की घटनाओं के लिए कक्षाओं का असाइनमेंट, पाठ में क्रिया और घटना तर्कों को सह-संबंधित लिंक करना, आदि), (बी) मौजूदा संसाधनों से जुड़े कोर (द्विभाषी) शब्दकोश का निर्माण करने के लिए,  तुलनात्मक अध्ययन के लिए और संभवतः स्वचालित उपकरणों के प्रशिक्षण के लिए, और (सी) एक समानांतर ट्रीबैंक के एनोटेशन को समृद्ध करने के लिए, प्राग चेक अंग्रेजी निर्भरता ट्रीबैंक, जिसमें अब तक वैलेंसी एनोटेशन शामिल है, लेकिन क्रियाओं के पर्यायवाची इंद्रियों को एक साथ नहीं जोड़ा गया है। समानार्थक वर्गों को निकालने के लिए उपयोग की जाने वाली विधि एक अर्ध-स्वचालित प्रक्रिया है जिसमें फ़िल्टरिंग के दौरान मैन्युअल काम की पर्याप्त मात्रा होती है, कक्षाओं और व्यक्तिगत वर्ग के सदस्यों के तर्कों के लिए भूमिका असाइनमेंट, और बाहरी लेक्सिकल संसाधनों से लिंक करना। हम 200 वर्गों (लगभग 1800 क्रियाओं) के साथ पहला संस्करण प्रस्तुत करते हैं और कई मीट्रिक का उपयोग करके इंटरएनॉटेटर समझौते का मूल्यांकन करते हैं।', 'zh': '本文述CzEngClass,此一双语词汇之资,所以究双语上下文之动词同义词,系一同义词之常见语义角色动词参数(动词价)也。 链接有类者:英语、捷克WordNet、FrameNet、PropBank、VerbNet(SemLink)、捷克语、英语之valency词典(PDT-Vallex、Vallex、EngVallex)。 其事与资源有数:(a)为将来自实验黄金准数(如自见同义词类,词义消歧义,分类于文本之动词,动词文本之事参数核心链接等),(b)立见资链接之核(双语)词典。  校之以训练,及(c)丰并行树库注,布拉格捷克英语赖于树库,迄今为止包价注,而未连动词之同义词。 取同义词类之法,一个半自动事也,多手动事,分角色给类参数,链接外词法资。 供 200 个类(大约 1800 动词),并用数指标评注器间协议。', 'ru': 'В этой статье описывается CzEngClass, двуязычный лексический ресурс, создаваемый для исследования словесной синонимии в двуязычном контексте и для увязки семантических ролей, общих для одного класса синонимов, с аргументами глагола (валентностью глагола). Кроме того, ресурс связан с существующими ресурсами с аналогичной целью: английским и чешским WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) и валентными лексиконами для чешского и английского языков (PDT-Vallex, Vallex и EngVallex). Существует несколько целей этой работы и ресурса: (a) предоставить данные золотого стандарта для автоматических экспериментов в будущем (таких как автоматическое открытие классов синонимов, расплывчатость смысла слов, присвоение классов вхождениям глаголов в тексте, кореференциальное связывание аргументов глаголов и событий в тексте и т. д.), (b) построить базовый (двуязычный) лексикон, связанный с существующими ресурсами, для сравнительных исследований и, возможно, для обучения автоматическим инструментам, и (c) обогатить аннотацию параллельного берега деревьев, Пражского чешского английского зависимого банка, который до сих пор содержал аннотацию валентности, но не связывал синонимичные чувства глаголов вместе. Метод, используемый для извлечения классов синонимов, представляет собой полуавтоматический процесс со значительным объемом ручной работы при фильтрации, назначении ролей классам и аргументам отдельных членов класса, и привязке к внешним лексическим ресурсам. Мы представляем первую версию с 200 классами (около 1800 глаголов) и оцениваем соглашение между аннотаторами, используя несколько метрик.', 'ga': 'Déanann an páipéar seo cur síos ar CzEngClass, acmhainn fhoclóra dhátheangach atá á tógáil chun comhchiall briathartha a fhiosrú i gcomhthéacs dátheangach agus chun róil shéimeantacha a bhaineann le haicme comhchiallach amháin a cheangal le hargóintí briathar (valencys briathar). Ina theannta sin, tá an acmhainn nasctha le hacmhainní atá ann cheana a bhfuil an aidhm chéanna acu: Béarla agus Seicis WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), agus foclóir valency le haghaidh Seicis agus Béarla (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, agus EngVallex). Tá roinnt spriocanna ag an obair agus ag an acmhainn seo: (a) sonraí caighdeánacha óir a sholáthar do thurgnaimh uathoibríocha amach anseo (amhail aimsiú uathoibríoch ar ranganna comhchiallacha, dí-athbhrí ar chiall na bhfocal, sannadh ranganna ar imeachtaí na mbriathra i dtéacs, nascadh croídheighilteach na bhfocal. argóintí briathar agus imeachta i dtéacs, etc.), (b) foclóir lárnach (dátheangach) a chruthú a bheidh nasctha le hacmhainní atá ann cheana féin, le haghaidh staidéir chomparáideacha agus b’fhéidir chun uirlisí uathoibríocha a oiliúint, agus (c) chun anótáil ar chrann crann comhthreomhar a shaibhriú, an Prág Czech English Dependency Treebank, ina raibh anótáil valency go dtí seo ach nár nasc céadfaí comhchiallacha na mbriathra le chéile. Is próiseas leath-uathoibríoch é an modh a úsáidtear chun na ranganna comhchiallacha a bhaint as a bhfuil méid suntasach d’obair láimhe le linn an scagtha, sannadh róil do ranganna agus argóintí na mball ranga aonair, agus ag nascadh leis na hacmhainní foclóireachta seachtracha. Cuirimid an chéad leagan i láthair le 200 rang (thart ar 1800 briathra) agus déanaimid measúnú ar chomhaontú idirnótaire ag baint úsáide as roinnt méadrachta.', 'hu': 'A tanulmány bemutatja a CzEngClass kétnyelvű lexikai forrást, amely a verbális szinonimák kétnyelvű kontextusban történő vizsgálatára épül fel, és az egy szinonimaosztályhoz közös szemantikai szerepek összekapcsolására igék argumentumaival (verb valency). Ezenkívül az erőforrás a meglévő erőforrásokhoz kapcsolódik, amelyek hasonló céllal rendelkeznek: angol és cseh WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), valamint a cseh és angol értékelési lexikonok (PDT-Vallex, Vallex és EngVallex). Ennek a munkának és erőforrásnak számos célja van: (a) aranyszabású adatok biztosítása a jövőbeli automatikus kísérletekhez (mint például a szinonimaosztályok automatikus felfedezése, a szóérzékek egyértelműsítése, osztályok hozzárendelése a szövegben lévő igék előfordulásához, az ige és az eseményargumentumok coreferenciális összekapcsolása a szövegben stb.), (b) a meglévő erőforrásokhoz kapcsolódó mag (kétnyelvű) lexikon létrehozása, összehasonlító tanulmányok és esetleg automatikus eszközök képzése céljából, valamint c) egy párhuzamos fából származó jegyzet gazdagítása céljából a prágai cseh angol függőségi fából származó jegyzet, amely eddig értékelési jegyzetet tartalmazott, de nem kapcsolta össze az igék szinonimáját. A szinonimaosztályok kinyerésére használt módszer egy félautomata folyamat, amely jelentős mennyiségű manuális munkát végez a szűrés során, a szerepkör osztályokhoz és az osztálytagok argumentumaihoz való hozzárendelése, valamint a külső lexikai erőforrásokhoz való kapcsolódás során. Bemutatjuk az első változatot 200 osztályból (kb. 1800 igével), és több mutató segítségével értékeljük az interannotátor megállapodást.', 'ka': 'ეს გვერდის გამოსახულება CzEngClass, ორიენგური ლექსიკალური რესურსი, რომელიც განახულებულია გერბალური სინონიმის შესახებ ორიენგური კონტექსტში და ერთი სინონიმური კლასის ერთი სინონიმური პროლის შესახებ დამატებით, რესურსი არსებობს რესურსისთან ერთადერთი მიზეზით: ანგლისური და ფექური WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) და ფაქური და ანგლისური ელექსიკონისთან დაკავშირებულია (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, და EngVallex). ამ სამუშაო და რესურსის რამდენიმე მიზეზი არიან: a) მომავალში ავტომატური ექსპერიმენტების მონაცემებისთვის მონაცემების მონაცემებისთვის (მაგალითად სინონიმის კლასის ავტომატურად აღმოჩენა, სიტყვის განსხვავება, კლასის განსხვავება ტექსტში ვერბის მონაცემებისთვის, გერ (c) პარალელი ტრებენტის ანტორაციას, პრაგი ფექი ანგლისური განსაცემებელობის Treebank, რომელიც ახლა განსაცემებელობის ანტორაციას, მაგრამ არ ერთად დაკავშირებულია სინონიმური სინონიმური სინონიმური სინონიმური სინონიმურ სინონიმური კლასების გამოყენებაში გამოყენებული მეტი არის პროცესი- ავტომატიკური პროცესი, რომელიც ფილტრირების შემთხვევაში ძალიან პროცესი სამუშაო მუშაო პარამეტრების, პროლის დააყენება კლასები ჩვენ პირველი ვერსია 200 კლასებით (1800 გერბა) და ინტერენოტორის შედგომარების გამოყენებით გავამუშავოთ, რამდენიმე მეტრიკის გამოყენებით.', 'it': "Questo articolo descrive CzEngClass, una risorsa lessicale bilingue costruita per indagare la sinonimia verbale in un contesto bilingue e per mettere in relazione ruoli semantici comuni a una classe di sinonimi con argomenti verbali (valenza verbale). Inoltre, la risorsa è collegata a risorse esistenti con lo stesso scopo: inglese e ceco WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), e lessici di valenza per ceco e inglese (PDT-Vallex, Vallex e EngVallex). Ci sono diversi obiettivi di questo lavoro e risorsa: (a) fornire dati gold standard per esperimenti automatici in futuro (come la scoperta automatica di classi sinonime, la disambiguazione del senso delle parole, l'assegnazione di classi alle occorrenze di verbi nel testo, il collegamento coreferenziale di verbi ed argomenti di evento nel testo, ecc.), (b) costruire un lessico di base (bilingue) collegato alle risorse esistenti, per studi comparativi e possibilmente per la formazione di strumenti automatici, e (c) per arricchire l'annotazione di un albero parallelo, il Prague Czech English Dependency Treebank, che finora conteneva annotazioni di valenza ma non ha collegato i sensi sinonimi dei verbi insieme. Il metodo utilizzato per estrarre le classi sinonimi è un processo semi-automatico con una notevole quantità di lavoro manuale durante il filtraggio, l'assegnazione dei ruoli alle classi e agli argomenti dei singoli membri della classe e il collegamento alle risorse lessicali esterne. Presentiamo la prima versione con 200 classi (circa 1800 verbi) e valutiamo l'accordo interannotatore utilizzando diverse metriche.", 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία περιγράφει το CzEngClass, έναν δίγλωσσο λεξικό πόρο που κατασκευάζεται για να διερευνήσει τη λεκτική συνώνυμη σε δίγλωσσο πλαίσιο και να συσχετίσει σημασιολογικούς ρόλους κοινούς σε μια συνώνυμη τάξη με ρήματα (ρήμα valency). Επιπλέον, ο πόρος συνδέεται με υφιστάμενους πόρους με τον ίδιο στόχο: αγγλικά και τσεχικά λεξικά για τσεχικά και αγγλικά (PDT-Vallex, Vallex και EngVallex). Υπάρχουν διάφοροι στόχοι αυτής της εργασίας και πόρου: (α) η παροχή δεδομένων χρυσού προτύπου για αυτόματα πειράματα στο μέλλον (όπως η αυτόματη ανακάλυψη των τάξεων συνώνυμων, η αποσαφήνιση της έννοιας λέξεων, η ανάθεση τάξεων σε εμφανίσεις ρήμων στο κείμενο, η ουσιαστική σύνδεση των ορίθμων ρήματος και συμβάντος στο κείμενο, κ.λπ.), (β) η δημιουργία ενός πυρήνα (δίγλωσσου) λεξικού που συνδέεται με υπάρχοντες πόρους, για συγκριτικές μελέτες και ενδεχομένως για την εκπαίδευση αυτόματων εργαλείων, και γ) για τον εμπλουτισμό της επισήμανσης μιας παράλληλης τράπεζας δέντρων, της τράπεζας τσεχικής αγγλικής εξάρτησης της Πράγας, η οποία μέχρι στιγμής περιείχε σχολιασμό valency αλλά δεν έχει συνδέσει συνώνυμες αισθήσεις των ρήμων μαζί. Η μέθοδος που χρησιμοποιείται για την εξαγωγή των κλάσεων συνώνυμων είναι μια ημιαυτόματη διαδικασία με σημαντικό ποσό χειρωνακτικής εργασίας κατά τη διάρκεια του φιλτραρίσματος, της ανάθεσης ρόλων σε τάξεις και των ορίων μεμονωμένων μελών κλάσης, και της σύνδεσης με τους εξωτερικούς λεξικούς πόρους. Παρουσιάζουμε την πρώτη έκδοση με 200 τάξεις (περίπου 1800 ρήματα) και αξιολογούμε τη συμφωνία σχολιαστών χρησιμοποιώντας αρκετές μετρήσεις.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente aprašomas CzEngClass, dvikalbis lexinis išteklius, kuriame tiriama žodinė sinonimija dvikalbiu kontekstu ir siejamas semantinis vaidmuo, būdingas vienai sinonimų klasei, su žodžių argumentais (žodžių valencija). Be to, ištekliai yra susiję su esamais ištekliais, kurių tikslas yra panašus: anglų ir čekų WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) ir anglų ir čekų valencijos leksikonai (PDT-Vallex, Vallex ir EngVallex). Šiuo darbu ir ištekliais siekiama kelių tikslų: a) ateityje teikti aukso standartinius duomenis automatiniams eksperimentams (pvz., automatiškai aptikti sinonimų klases, išaiškinti žodžių supratimą, priskirti klases žodžių pasikartojimui tekste, koreferenciniam žodžių ir įvykių argumentų susiejimui tekste ir t. t.), b) sukurti pagrindinį (dvikalbį) leksikoną, susijusį su esamais ištekliais, - palyginamiesiems tyrimams ir, galbūt, automatiniams įrankiams mokymui, ir c) paralelinio medžio banko anotacijai praturtinti – Prahos Čekijos anglų priklausomybės medžio bankui, kuris iki šiol apima valencijos anotaciją, bet nesusijęs su sinoniminiais žodžių jausmais. Sinonimų klasėms ištraukti naudojamas metodas yra pusiau automatinis procesas, kurio metu filtruojama daug rankinių darbų, priskiriamas vaidmuo klasėms ir atskirų klasės narių argumentams ir susietas su išoriniais leksiniais ištekliais. We present the first version with 200 classes (about 1800 verbs) and evaluate interannotator agreement using several metrics.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз CzEngClass- ды, екі тіліндегі вербалды синонимияны зерттеу үшін, бір синоним класына бір синоним класына келтірілген семантикалық рольдерді Верб аргументтеріне (верб валензиясына) қатынау үшін құрылған екі тілін Қосымша, ресурс бар ресурстарымен ұқсас мақсатты: ағылшын және Чех WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) және Чех және ағылшын тілінің (PDT-Vallex, Vallex және EngVallex) көмегімен бірдей сілтемелері бар. Бұл жұмыс мен ресурстардың бірнеше мақсаттары бар: a) болашақтағы автоматты эксперименттердің алтын стандартты деректерін беру (мысалы, синоним классын автоматты түрде табу, сөздердің сезімі өзгертілмеу, мәтіндегі вербаларды таңдау, мәтіндегі деректерді және оқиғалардың аргументтерінің қатынау, т. б.)  Сәйкестік зерттеулерге және автоматты құрылғыларды оқыту үшін және (c) параллель требанктың жазбаларын бағалау үшін, Прага Чех ағылшын тілінің тәуелсіздік Бұтабанктың жазбалары бар, бұл жерде көмектесілік жазбалары бар Синоним классын тарқату үшін қолданылатын әдіс - сүзгілеу кезінде, класс және әрбір класс мүшелерінің аргументтеріне рөл беру және сыртқы лексикалық ресурстарды сілтемелеу үшін көп автоматты түрде жұмыс істеу процесі. Біз бірінші нұсқасын 200 класса (1800 верб) келтіріп, бірнеше метрикалық көмегімен мектептердің бірінші нұсқасын бағалаймыз.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സിസ്എങ്ക്ലാസിനെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു രണ്ടു ഭാഷക്കുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു ഭാഷക്കുറിച ഇതുപോലെ നിലവിലുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങളുമായി വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷും ചെക്ക് വാര്\u200dഡ് നെറ്റ്, ഫ്രെമെനെറ്റ്, പ്രൊപ്ബാങ്ക്, വെര്\u200dബ്നെറ്റ് (സെമ്ലിങ്ക്), ചെക് ഈ ജോലിയുടെയും വിഭവങ്ങളുടെയും പല ലക്ഷ്യങ്ങളുണ്ട്: (a) ഭാവിയിലെ സ്വന്തം പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സ്വന്തം സ്വർണ്ണാന്ത്രീയ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഡേറ്റാ നല്\u200dകുക (ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി സിനോനിമം ക്ലാസുകളുടെ സ്വഭാവം കണ്ടെത്തുന തുല്യമായ പഠനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും സാധ്യമായിരിക്കാം (c) ഒരു പാരാളില്\u200d ട്രീബാങ്കിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഗ്ഗ് ചെച്ച് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ആന്\u200dഡിപ്പെന്\u200dസി ട്രീ സിനോനിമം ക്ലാസിനെ പുറത്തെടുക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രീതിയാണ് ഫില്\u200dട്രിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d, ക്ലാസുകള്\u200dക്കും വ്യക്തിപരമായ ക്ലാസുകളുടെ വാദികള്\u200dക്കും പുറത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ പതിപ്പിനെ 200 ക്ലാസുകളുമായി കാണിക്കുന്നു. ചില മെട്രിക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഇന്റര്\u200dനാന്റേറ്ററോര', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jiddeskrivi CzEngClass, riżorsa lexikali bilingwi li qed tinbena biex tinvestiga s-sinonimja verbali fil-kuntest bilingwi u biex tirrelata rwoli semantiċi komuni għal klassi sinonimika waħda ma’ argumenti verbali (valenza tal-verb). Barra minn hekk, ir-riżorsa hija marbuta ma’ riżorsi eżistenti bl-istess għan: WordNet Ingliż u Ċek, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), u lexicons ta’ valenza għa ċ-Ċek u l-Ingliż (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, u EngVallex). Hemm diversi għanijiet ta’ dan ix-xogħol u r-riżorsa: (a) li tiġi pprovduta dejta standard tad-deheb għal esperimenti awtomatiċi fil-futur (b ħall-iskoperta awtomatika ta’ klassijiet ta’ sinonimu, diżambigwazzjoni tas-sens tal-kelma, assenjazzjoni ta’ klassijiet għal okkorrenzi ta’ verbi fit-test, rabta koreferenzjali ta’ verbi u argumenti ta’ avvenimenti fit-test, eċċ.), (b) li tinbena lexicon ċentrali (bilngwi) marbut mar-riżorsi eżistenti, • għal studji komparattivi u possibbilment għat-taħriġ ta’ għodod awtomatiċi, u (c) biex tiġi arrikkita l-annotazzjoni ta’ treebank parallel, il-Praga Czech Dependence Treebank Ingliż, li s’issa kien fih annotazzjoni ta’ valenza iżda ma rabtatx sensi sinonimi ta’ verbi flimkien. Il-metodu użat għall-estrazzjoni tal-klassijiet sinonimiċi huwa proċess semiawtomatiku b’ammont sostanzjali ta’ xogħol manwali waqt il-filtrazzjoni, l-assenjazzjoni tar-rwol lill-klassijiet u l-argumenti tal-membri individwali tal-Klassi, u r-rabta mar-riżorsi lexiċi esterni. Aħna nippreżentaw l-ewwel verżjoni b’200 klassi (madwar 1800 verb) u nivvalutaw il-ftehim bejn in-notitaturi bl-użu ta’ diversi metriċi.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас ЧEngClass-г хоёр хэл хэл хэлний зэрэгцээ шинжлэх ухааны тулд хоёр хэл хэл хэлний зэрэгцээ судлах, нэг синоним хичээлд хоёр хэл хэлний зэрэгцээ харьцуулахын тулд хоёр хэл хэл хэлний зэрэгцээ бий болгон бүтэ Үүнээс хамааралтай нөөц нь төстэй зорилготой: Англи, Чех WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) болон Чех, Англи хэлний (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, болон EngVallex) төстэй баялаг эх үүсвэртэй холбоотой. Ирээдүйд автоматически туршилтуудын алтын стандарт өгөгдлийг хангах олон зорилго байдаг: a) ирээдүйд автоматически туршилтуудын алтын стандарт өгөгдлийг (жишээ нь синоним хичээлийн автоматически олж мэдэх, үг мэдрэмжгүй байдал, хэлний хэлний үйл явдал, үг болон үйл явдлын аргументуудын тухай холбогдол, мөн бөгөөд b) суурь Хэрэв харьцуулсан судалгаанд, автоматик хэрэгсэл хөгжүүлэх боломжтой болох боломжтой болох бөгөөд (c) параллел дагуулын хөгжүүлэлтийг багасгах боломжтой. Праг Чекийн Англи хамааралтай модны банк гэх мэт. Энэ нь одоо хүртэл илэрхийлэл байдаг, гэхдээ Синоним хичээлийг гаргах арга бол шинжилгээний үед маш олон гар ажил, хичээлийн, хэн нэгэн класс гишүүдийн аргументууд болон гадаад лексикийн баялагуудыг холбож байдаг. Бид анхны хувилбарыг 200 хичээл (ойролцоогоор 1800-н үг) болон хэдэн метрик ашиглан интернотаторын зөвлөлтийг үнэлэх болно.', 'mk': 'Овој весник ја опишува Ченгкласа, двојјазичен лексикален ресурс кој се изградува за истрага на вербалната синонимија во двојјазичен контекст и за поврзување со семантичните улоги заеднички со една класа на синоними со вербалните аргументи (вербалност на вербалите). In addition, the resource is linked to existing resources with the same of a similar aim: English and Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), and valency lexicons for Czech and English (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, and EngVallex).  Постојат неколку цели на оваа работа и ресурс: (a) да се обезбедат златни стандардни податоци за автоматски експерименти во иднина (како што е автоматското откривање на класи на синоними, раздвоумување на зборовите чувства, приложување на класи на појавата на гласници во текст, кореферентно поврзување на гласниците и аргументите на настаните во текст итн.), (b) да се изгради јадрото (двојно) ле За споредливи студии и веројатно за обука на автоматски алатки, и (c) за обогатување на анотацијата на паралелната дрвена банка, Прашката чешка англиска дрвена банка за зависност, која досега содржеше валентна анотација, но не ги поврзуваше синонимите чувства на проverbи заедно. Методот кој се користи за извлекување на класите на синоними е полуавтоматски процес со значителна количина рачна работа за време на филтрирањето, доделување на улога на класите и аргументи на индивидуалните членови на класата и поврзување со надворешните лексички ресурси. Ја претставуваме првата верзија со 200 класи (околу 1800 јазици) и го оценуваме договорот меѓу нотаторите со користење на неколку метрики.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan CzEngClass, sumber leksikal bilingual yang dibina untuk menyelidiki sinonimi verbal dalam konteks bilingual dan untuk menghubungkan peranan semantik yang biasa kepada satu kelas sinonimu kepada argumen verb (valensi verb). Selain itu, sumber tersebut terhubung dengan sumber sedia ada dengan tujuan yang sama: English and Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), dan leksikon valensi untuk Czech and English (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, and EngVallex). Terdapat beberapa tujuan kerja dan sumber ini: (a) untuk menyediakan data piawai emas untuk eksperimen automatik di masa depan (seperti penemuan automatik kelas sinonim, penyelesaian perasaan perkataan, pengaturan kelas kepada kejadian verb dalam teks, sambungan coreferential verb dan argumen peristiwa dalam teks, dll.), (b) untuk membina leksikon inti (bilingual) yang terhubung dengan sumber sedia ada, - untuk kajian perbandingan dan kemungkinan untuk latihan alat automatik, dan (c) untuk memperkaya anotasi pangkalan pokok paralel, Pangkalan Pergantian Bahasa Inggeris Czech Prague, yang sejauh ini mengandungi anotasi valensi tetapi tidak terhubung sens sinonimum verb bersama-sama. Kaedah yang digunakan untuk mengekstrak kelas sinonim adalah proses semi-automatik dengan jumlah besar kerja manual semasa penapisan, tugasan peran ke kelas dan argumen ahli kelas individu, dan menghubungkan kepada sumber leksikal luaran. Kami memperkenalkan versi pertama dengan 200 kelas (kira-kira 1800 verb) dan menilai perjanjian interannotator menggunakan beberapa metrik.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea descrie CzEngClass, o resursă lexicală bilingvă construită pentru a investiga sinonimia verbală în context bilingv și pentru a relaționa rolurile semantice comune unei clase de sinonime cu argumentele verbelor (valența verbelor). În plus, resursa este legată de resursele existente cu același scop similar: WordNet engleză și cehă, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) și lexicoane de valență pentru cehă și engleză (PDT-Vallex, Vallex și EngVallex). Există mai multe obiective ale acestei lucrări și resurse: (a) furnizarea de date gold standard pentru experimentele automate în viitor (cum ar fi descoperirea automată a claselor sinonime, dezambiguizarea sensului cuvintelor, atribuirea claselor la apariția verbelor în text, legătura corefențială a argumentelor verbelor și evenimentelor în text, etc.), (b) construirea unui lexicon de bază (bilingv) legat de resursele existente, pentru studii comparative și, eventual, pentru instruirea instrumentelor automate, și (c) pentru a îmbogăți adnotările unei brațe paralele, Praga Cehă Dependency Treebank, care până în prezent conținea adnotări de valență, dar nu a conectat simțurile sinonime ale verbelor împreună. Metoda folosită pentru extragerea claselor sinonime este un proces semi-automat cu o cantitate substanțială de muncă manuală în timpul filtrării, atribuirea rolurilor claselor și argumentele individuale ale membrilor clasei și conectarea la resursele lexicale externe. Prezentăm prima versiune cu 200 de clase (aproximativ 1800 de verbe) și evaluăm acordul interadnotator folosind mai multe metrici.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł opisuje CzEngClass, dwujęzyczny zasób leksykaliczny budowany w celu zbadania synonii werbalnej w kontekście dwujęzycznym oraz relacji ról semantycznych wspólnych dla jednej klasy synonimów z argumentami czasownika (walency czasownika). Ponadto zasób jest powiązany z istniejącymi zasobami o tym samym celu: angielskim i czeskim WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) oraz leksykonami walencyjnymi dla czeskiego i angielskiego (PDT-Vallex, Vallex i EngVallex). Istnieje kilka celów tej pracy i zasobów: (a) dostarczenie złotych standardów danych dla automatycznych eksperymentów w przyszłości (takich jak automatyczne wykrywanie klas synonimów, rozdzielanie sensu słowa, przypisywanie klas do występowania czasowników w tekście, współzależne łączenie argumentów czasownika i zdarzenia w tekście itp.), (b) zbudowanie rdzennego (dwujęzycznego) leksykonu powiązanego z istniejącymi zasobami, do badań porównawczych i ewentualnie do szkolenia narzędzi automatycznych oraz c) do wzbogacenia adnotacji równoległego banku drzewa, Prague Czech English Dependency Treebank, który do tej pory zawierał adnotację walencyjną, ale nie łączył ze sobą synonimów czasowników. Metoda wyodrębniania klas synonimów jest półautomatycznym procesem z dużą ilością pracy ręcznej podczas filtrowania, przypisywania roli do klas i argumentów poszczególnych członków klasy oraz łączenia z zewnętrznymi zasobami leksykalnymi. Prezentujemy pierwszą wersję z 200 klasami (około 1800 czasowników) i oceniamy porozumienie międzynarodowe przy użyciu kilku metryk.', 'no': 'Denne papiret beskriver CzEngClass, eit bilinguelt leksisk ressurs som vert bygd for å undersøke verbalet synonym i bilinguelt kontekst og å relatere semantiske rolar som er felles til ein synonymsk klasse til verbargument (verb valency). I tillegg er ressursen lenke til eksisterande ressursar med same mål: engelsk og tsjekkisk WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), og valency lexicons for tsjekkisk og engelsk (PDT-Vallex, Vallex og EngVallex). Det finst fleire mål på denne arbeidet og ressursen: a) å gi gull standard data for automatiske eksperimenter i framtida (som automatisk oppdaging av synonymsklassar, disambiguasjon av ordsentralen, tillegg av klassar til oppgåver av verbar i tekst, koreferensielle lenkje av verb og hendingar i tekst osv.), (b) for å bygge ein kjerneleksikon (bilinguelt) knytt til eksisterande ressursar, For sammenliggende studiar og kanskje for å opplæra automatiske verktøy, og c) for å rykke oppmerkinga av ein parallell treebank, Prag- engelsk avhengighetstråbanken, som så langt inneheld vallige annotasjon, men har ikkje lenka synonyme sentar av verbar sammen. Metoden som vert brukt for å pakka ut synonymsklassene er ein halvautomatisk prosess med ein stor mengd manuelarbeid under filtrering, rolvedlegg til klassene og argument for individuelle klassesmedlemmer og lenkjer til eksterne leksiske ressursar. Vi presenterer den første versjonen med 200 klasser (omtrent 1800 verb) og evaluerer interannotatorsavtalen med fleire metrikar.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje CzEngClass, izgrađen je dvojezički leksički resurs za istraživanje verbalne sinonije u dvojezičkom kontekstu i odnošenje semantičkih uloga zajedničkog sa jednim klasom sinonima na verbalne argumente (verbalna valencija). Osim toga, resurs je povezan sa postojećim resursima sa istim sličnim ciljem: engleski i češki WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), i leksionima za češki i engleski (PDT-Vallex, Vallex i EngVallex). Postoji nekoliko ciljeva ovog rada i resursa: a) pružanje zlatnih standardnih podataka za automatske eksperimente u budućnosti (poput automatskog otkrivanja klasa sinonima, disambiguacija riječi, dodavanje klasa na događaje verba u tekstu, koreferencijalno povezanje verba i događaja u tekstu, itd.); b) izgradnje jezgra (dvojezičkog) leksiona povezanog sa postojećim resursima, Za usporedbne studije i moguće za obuku automatskih alata, i c) za obogatavanje annotacije paralelnog treebana, Praškog češke engleske zavisnosti Treebank, koja je do sada sadržala annotaciju o valenciji ali nije povezala sinonimske osećaje verba zajedno. Metod koji se koristi za izvlačenje klasa sinonima je polu-automatski proces sa značajnom količinom ručnog rada tijekom filtrovanja, dodeljenja uloge klasama i argumentima članova individualne klase i povezanja sa vanjskim leksičkim resursima. Predstavljamo prvu verziju sa 200 klasa (oko 1800 verba) i procjenjujemo interannotatorski sporazum koristeći nekoliko metrika.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaa qoraya CzEngClass, taas oo loo dhisay resource labo luqadood oo la mid ah in la baaraandegayo hal qalabka iyo in la xiriiro qaybaha semantika oo u dhexeeya fasalka hal sinoniimada oo la xiriira wadajirka qoraalka (verb valeity). In addition, the resource is linked to existing resources with the same of a similar aim: English and Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), and valency lexicons for Czech and English (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, and EngVallex).  Waxaa jira marxalado badan oo ku qoran shuqulkan iyo resourceydan: (a) in la siiyo data standard oo dahab ah oo loo baaraandegay jirrabaadka iskumar ah ee mustaqbalka (tusaale ahaan fasalka sinoonimada, iskala qaybsada hadalka, qaybsada fasalka ku dhaca qoraalka, xiriirka warqadda iyo argumentada dhacdooyinka ee qoraalka, etc.), (b) in la dhiso xarunta lexicon (laba luqadood) oo ku xiran resources exist, Waxbarashada isbarbardhigga iyo suurtowda in lagu barto qalabka faraha ah, iyo (c) in la kordhiyo calaamada qoraalka lambarka ah, Prague Czech ku xiran Treebank, taasoo ilaa waqti ka horeysa ku jirta calaamadda shaqo, laakiin aan la xiriirin sanqadaha la xiriira. Midabka lagu isticmaalayo in lagu soo bixiyo fasalka sinonimada waa jardiinada saxda ah oo ay ka shaqeeyaan shaqada dhaqaalaha ah marka lagu baaraandejiyo, qayb u yeelashada fasalka iyo argumentada xubnaha ee gaarka ah, islamarkaasna la xiriira rasmiga dibadda ah. Tusaalada ugu horeeyay waxaan keenaynaa 200 fasalka (qiyaastii 1800 samooyin) waxaana qiimeynaynaa heshiiska dhexdhexdhexe ee isticmaalaya mid badan.', 'si': "Name ඒ වගේම, සම්බන්ධයෙන් තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන්න තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණය සමඟ සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයි: ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ චෙක් වර්ඩනෙට්, ෆ්\u200dරේම මේ වැඩ සහ සම්බන්ධතාවයෙන් වෙනස් ලක්ෂණයක් තියෙනවා: (a) ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරයෝගයක් සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරයෝගයක් සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරයෝගයක් සඳ ප්\u200dරාග් චෙක් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි විශ්වාස ක්\u200dරීයාත්මක ක්\u200dරීයාත්මක සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීයාත්මක උපකරණය සඳහා සමාන්\u200dය උපකරණය සඳහා සමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්න, ප්\u200dරාග් චෙක The way to extract the synonicm classifies is a Half-Auto process with a vast sum of handbook working in the processing, role Assignment to Classes and individual Classes Memes' args, and linching to the outside lexic source. අපි පළමු වාර්තාව 200 ක්ලාස් එක්ක පෙන්වන්නම් (1800 වර්ගයක් ගැන) සහ ප්\u200dරධානය සම්බන්ධ කරනවා මෙට්\u200dරික් වලින", 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தை CzEngClass குறிப்பிடுகிறது, ஒரு இரு மொழி லெக்சிக்சியல் மூலம் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, இரு மொழியில் ஒத்திசைவு செய்ய மற்றும் ஒரு ஒத்திசைவு வகுப் In addition, the resource is linked to existing resources with the same of a similar aim: English and Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), and valency lexicons for Czech and English (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, and EngVallex).  இந்த வேலையையும் மூலத்திற்கும் பல இலக்குகள் உள்ளன: (a) எதிர்காலத்தில் தானாகவே சோதனைகளுக்கான தங்க இயல்பான தரவுகளை வழங்குவதற்கு (அதாவது தானாகவே கண்டுபிடிப்பு, சொல்லாத உணர்வு குழப்பம், உரையில் வார்த்தைகளின் நிகழ்வுகளை ஒப் ஒப்பிடும் படிப்புகளுக்கும் சாத்தியமாக தானியங்கி கருவிகளுக்கும் பயிற்சி செய்ய வேண்டுமானாலும் (c) இணைப்பு மரத்தின் விளக்கம், ப்ராக் செக் ஆங்கிலத்தின் சார்ந்த சார்பு  ஒத்திசைவு வகுப்பு நாம் முதல் பதிப்பை 200 வகுப்புகளுடன் கொண்டு வருகிறோம் (குறைந்த 1800 விவர்ப்பங்கள்) மற்றும் பல மெட்ரிக்களை பயன்படுத்தி இட', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats beskriver CzEngClass, en tvåspråkig lexikal resurs som byggs för att undersöka verbal synonym i tvåspråkig kontext och för att relatera semantiska roller gemensamma för en synonymklass till verbargument (verbvalens). Dessutom är resursen kopplad till befintliga resurser med samma syfte: engelska och tjeckiska WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) och valenslexikon för tjeckiska och engelska (PDT-Vallex, Vallex och EngVallex). Det finns flera mål med detta arbete och resurs: (a) att tillhandahålla guldstandard data för automatiska experiment i framtiden (såsom automatisk upptäckt av synonymklasser, ordförnimmelse, tilldelning av klasser till förekomster av verb i text, coreferenzial länkning av verb och händelseargument i text, etc.), (b) att bygga en kärna (tvåspråkig) lexikon kopplad till befintliga resurser, för jämförande studier och eventuellt för utbildning av automatiska verktyg, och (c) för att berika kommenteringen av en parallell trädbank, Prag tjeckiska engelska Dependency Treebank, som hittills innehöll valens annotation men inte har kopplat synonyma sinnen av verb samman. Metoden som används för att extrahera synonymklasserna är en halvautomatisk process med en betydande mängd manuellt arbete under filtrering, rolltilldelning till klasser och enskilda klassmedlemmars argument och länkar till externa lexikala resurser. Vi presenterar den första versionen med 200 klasser (ca 1800 verb) och utvärderar interannotator avtal med flera mätvärden.', 'ur': 'This paper describes CzEngClass, a bilingual lexical resource that is built to investigate verbal synonymy in two languages context and to relate semantic roles common to one synonym class to verb arguments (verb valency). اور اس کے علاوہ، موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود موجود کے ساتھ ایک جیسے موجود موجود ہے: انگلیسی اور چک ویرڈنیٹ، فرمینٹ، پروبنک، وربنٹ (سیم لینکس) اور چک اور انگلیسی (PDT-Vallex, والکس اور انگلیکس) کے واسطے والنسی لکسیونز۔ اس کام اور منبع کے بہت سے موقع ہیں: a) آیندہ میں اپنی آزمائش کے لئے سونے کی استاندارڈ ڈاٹ دینے کے لئے (جیسے سینونیم کلاس کی آگاہ کرنا، کلاس کی آزمائش، کلاس کی آزمائش، کلاس کی آگاہ کرنا، کلاس کی آگاہ کرنا، کلاس کی آگاہ کرنا اور اتفاق کی آگاہ کرنا، اور اگلوں کی آگاہ کرنا، اس کے لئے (b) ایک کور (دوزبانی) لکسون بنانا، مثالی مطالعہ کے لئے اور امید ہے کہ آٹوٹی ابزار کی تعلیم کے لئے، اور (c) برابر تریب بانک کی مثالی کے لئے، پراگ چک انگلیسی اعتباری درخت بانک کے لئے، جس میں یہاں تک والنسی مطالعہ ہے لیکن اس نے کلمات کی سینونیم حس کے ساتھ متصل نہیں کی ہے. سینونیم کلاس کو اٹھانے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، فیلٹرینگ کے موقع، کلاس اور فرق کلاس جماعتوں کے اردومنٹوں کے لئے رول کا مقرر کیا جاتا ہے، اور بیرون لکسیکل رسسوسوں سے متصل کیا جاتا ہے. ہم پہلی نسخہ کو 200 کلاس (حدود 1800 کلاس) کے ساتھ پیش کرتے ہیں اور بہت سی متریک کے مطابق انٹرانوٹور معاملہ کا ارزش کرتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻoz CzEng Class, ikkita tillar xil tarkibida verbal synonymini qidirish uchun yaratiladi va bir synonym sinosim sinfga umumiy narsalarni verb qiymatga bog'lang. Qoʻshimcha, bu yerda mavjud Resource bilan bir xil maqola bilan bogʻliq: Inglizcha va Chekscha WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), va Xitoy va Inglizcha (PDT-Vallex, Vallex va Eng Vallex). Bu ish va Resource uchun bir nechta maqola bor: (a) kelajada avtomatik tajribalarni avtomatik o'rganish uchun daha стандарт maʼlumot yaratish (masalan synonym sinoslarini aniqlash, soʻzni ajratish mumkin, matn soʻzlarning tuzuvlarini tasdiqlash, matn soʻzlariga bog'langan verb va hodisalar bilan bogʻlanishi va va va va va va va o'zgarishlar bilan bogʻlash mumkin) (b) mavjud Resourtlarni bogʻliq boʻlgan bir Taʼminlovchi taʼminotlar uchun va oddiy avtomatik vositalarni o'rganish mumkin, va (c) parallel treebankning tajribasini o'rganish uchun Prague Ingliz tilida ishlatuvchi Treebank (Prague Czech Ingliz tilida taʼminlovchi Treebank) ga ega bo'lishi mumkin. Bu paytda taʼminlovchi taʼminlovchilar bor, lekin bir xizmatlarning bir bir xi Name Biz birinchi versiyasi 200 sinf (1800 verbs) bilan ko'pchilik metrikdan foydalanuvchi interannotator heshimini qiymatimiz.", 'vi': 'Tờ này mô tả CzEngClass, một tài nguyên ngôn ngữ văn học được xây dựng để điều tra đồng nghĩa lời trong ngữ cảnh hai nước và để liên kết các vai thì ngữ văn theo ngữ nghĩa với từ ngữ đối với từ Tài nguyên được liên kết với nguồn tài nguyên có cùng một mục đích tương tự: Anh quốc và Tiệp WordNet, phngngNet, PropBank, Verbit (SemLink), và valence lexixicÁn cho Séc và Anh (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, và Engx Vallex). Có nhiều mục tiêu của công trình này: a) cung cấp dữ liệu tiêu chuẩn vàng cho các thí nghiệm tự động trong tương lai (như phát hiện tự động các lớp đồng nghĩa, phân dạng từ ngữ, phân dạng chữ, việc phân b ổ các lớp cho các từ tồn tại trong văn bản, hợp tác có khả năng liên kết các động từ ngữ và các đối tượng trong văn bản, v. v.) b) xây dựng một căn bản (hai phát ngôn ngữ) từ có liên quan đến các nguồn đã có, Đối với c ác nghiên cứu so sánh và có thể để đào tạo các công cụ tự động, và (c) để làm giàu chú ý của bản ghi chú song song song, ngân hàng năm phụ thuộc Tiếng Anh của Praha, nơi cho đến nay có ghi chú về độ quan trọng nhưng chưa kết hợp các từ âm đồng nghĩa với nhau. Phương pháp được dùng để khai thác các lớp đồng nghĩa là một quá trình bán tự động với một lượng lớn lao lao lao động trong suốt bộ lọc, phân bổ các lớp học và các đối tượng của các thành viên lớp, và kết nối với nguồn ngôn ngữ văn học bên ngoài. Chúng tôi giới thiệu phiên bản đầu tiên với hạng 2O (động từ khoảng 1800) và đánh giá hợp đồng giải phẫu bằng nhiều âm tiết.', 'da': 'Denne artikel beskriver CzEngClass, en tosproget leksikalsk ressource, der er bygget til at undersøge verbal synonym i tosproget kontekst og til at relatere semantiske roller fælles for én synonymklasse til verb argumenter (verb valens). Desuden er ressourcen knyttet til eksisterende ressourcer med samme formål: engelsk og tjekkisk WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) og valens leksikoner for tjekkisk og engelsk (PDT-Vallex, Vallex og EngVallex). Der er flere mål med dette arbejde og ressource: (a) at levere guld standard data til automatiske eksperimenter i fremtiden (såsom automatisk opdagelse af synonymklasser, ordsans adskillelse, tildeling af klasser til forekomster af verber i tekst, coreferencial linking af verber og begivenhedsargumenter i tekst osv.), (b) at opbygge en kerne (tosproget) leksikon knyttet til eksisterende ressourcer, til sammenlignende undersøgelser og muligvis til træning af automatiske værktøjer, og c) til at berige anmærkningen af en parallel træbank, Prag tjekkisk engelsk afhængighed træbank, som indtil videre indeholdt anmærkning om valens, men som ikke har knyttet synonyme sanser af verber sammen. Den metode, der anvendes til at udtrække synonymklasserne, er en halvautomatisk proces med en betydelig mængde manuelt arbejde under filtrering, rolletildeling til klasser og individuelle klassemedlemmers argumenter og linking til eksterne leksikalske ressourcer. Vi præsenterer den første version med 200 klasser (omkring 1800 verber) og evaluerer interannotator aftale ved hjælp af flere metrics.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel beschrijft CzEngClass, een tweetalige lexicale bron die wordt gebouwd om verbale synoniem in tweetalige context te onderzoeken en semantische rollen die gemeenschappelijk zijn voor één synoniemklasse te relateren aan werkwoordveranties (werkwoordverantie). Daarnaast is de bron gekoppeld aan bestaande bronnen met hetzelfde doel: Engels en Tsjechisch WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) en valency lexicons voor Tsjechisch en Engels (PDT-Vallex, Vallex en EngVallex). Er zijn verschillende doelen van dit werk en de bron: (a) het verstrekken van gouden standaardgegevens voor automatische experimenten in de toekomst (zoals automatische ontdekking van synoniemklassen, woordbetekenis disambiguatie, toewijzing van klassen aan voorvallen van werkwoorden in tekst, coreferentiële koppeling van werkwoorden en gebeurtenisargumenten in tekst, enz.), (b) het bouwen van een kern (tweetalig) lexicon gekoppeld aan bestaande bronnen, Voor vergelijkende studies en eventueel voor het trainen van automatische hulpmiddelen, en c) om de annotatie van een parallelle boombank te verrijken, de Prague Tsjechisch English Dependency Treebank, die tot dusver valency annotatie bevatte, maar geen synonieme zintuigen van werkwoorden met elkaar heeft verbonden. De methode die wordt gebruikt voor het extraheren van de synoniemklassen is een semi-automatisch proces met een aanzienlijke hoeveelheid handmatig werk tijdens het filteren, roltoewijzing aan klassen en argumenten van individuele klasleden, en het koppelen aan de externe lexicale bronnen. We presenteren de eerste versie met 200 klassen (ongeveer 1800 werkwoorden) en evalueren interannotator overeenkomst met behulp van verschillende metrics.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit beschreibt CzEngClass, eine zweisprachige lexikalische Ressource, die entwickelt wird, um verbale Synonyme im bilingualen Kontext zu untersuchen und semantische Rollen, die einer Synonymklasse gemeinsam sind, mit Verbargumenten (Verbvalenz) in Beziehung zu setzen. Darüber hinaus ist die Ressource mit bestehenden Ressourcen mit dem gleichen Ziel verknüpft: Englisch und Tschechisch WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) und Valenzlexicons für Tschechisch und Englisch (PDT-Vallex, Vallex und EngVallex). Es gibt mehrere Ziele dieser Arbeit und Ressource: (a) Goldstandarddaten für automatische Experimente in der Zukunft bereitzustellen (z.B. automatische Entdeckung von Synonymklassen, Wortsinn-Disambiguation, Zuordnung von Klassen zu Vorkommen von Verben im Text, coreferenzielle Verknüpfung von Verben und Ereignisargumenten im Text, etc.), (b) ein Kernlexikon zu bauen, das mit vorhandenen Ressourcen verknüpft ist, Für vergleichende Studien und möglicherweise für das Training von automatischen Werkzeugen und (c) zur Anreicherung der Annotation einer parallelen Baumbank, der Prague Czech English Dependency Treebank, die bisher Valenzanotation enthielt, aber keine synonymen Sinne von Verben miteinander verknüpft hat. Die Methode, die zum Extrahieren der Synonymklassen verwendet wird, ist ein halbautomatischer Prozess mit erheblichem manuellem Aufwand beim Filtern, Rollenzuweisungen zu Klassen und den Argumenten einzelner Klassenmitglieder und Verknüpfungen zu den externen lexikalischen Ressourcen. Wir präsentieren die erste Version mit 200-Klassen (ca. 1800-Verben) und evaluieren Interannotator-Übereinstimmung anhand mehrerer Metriken.', 'bg': 'Тази статия описва двуезичен лексичен ресурс, който се изгражда за изследване на вербалната синонимия в двуезичен контекст и за свързване на семантичните роли, общи за един клас синоними, с аргументите на глагола (валентност на глагола). Освен това ресурсът е свързан със съществуващи ресурси със същата цел: английски и чешки WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) и валентни лексикони за чешки и английски език (PDT-Vallex, Vallex и EngVallex). Съществуват няколко цели на тази работа и ресурс: (а) да се предоставят златни стандартни данни за автоматични експерименти в бъдеще (като автоматично откриване на класове синоними, разграничаване на смисъла на думата, възлагане на класове на появата на глаголи в текста, съпроводено свързване на глаголи и събития аргументи в текста и др.), (б) да се изгради основен (двуезичен) лексикон, свързан със съществуващи ресурси, за сравнителни изследвания и евентуално за обучение на автоматични инструменти, и в) за обогатяване на анотацията на паралелна дървесина, Пражката чешка английска дървесина за зависимост, която досега съдържа анотация на валентност, но не свързва синонимните сетива на глаголите. Методът, използван за извличане на класовете синоними, е полуавтоматичен процес със значително количество ръчна работа по време на филтриране, присвояване на роли на класове и аргументи на отделните членове на класа и свързване с външните лексикални ресурси. Представяме първата версия с 200 класа (около 1800 глагола) и оценяваме съгласието на интеранотаторите, използвайки няколко показателя.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir opisuje ČEngClass, izgrađen je dvojezički leksički resurs za istraživanje verbalne sinonije u dvojezičkom kontekstu i odnošenje semantičkih uloga često jednoj klasi sinonima na verbalne argumente (verbalna valencija). Osim toga, resurs je povezan s postojećim resursima s istim sličnim ciljem: engleski i češki WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) i leksionima za češki i engleski (PDT-Vallex, Vallex i EngVallex). Postoji nekoliko ciljeva ovog rada i resursa: a) pružati zlatni standardni podaci za automatske eksperimente u budućnosti (poput automatskog otkrivanja klasa sinonima, disambiguacija riječi, dodavanje klasa na događaje verba u tekstu, koreferencijalno povezanje verba i događaja u tekstu itd.); b) izgradnju jezgra (dvojezičkog) leksikona povezanog sa postojećim resursima, U usporedbnim ispitivanjima i vjerojatno za obuku automatskih alata, i c) za obogatavanje annotacije paralelnog treebanca, Praškog češke engleske zavisnosti Treebank, koja je do sada sadržala annotaciju o valenciji ali nije povezana sinonim osjećajima verba zajedno. Metod koji se koristi za izvlačenje klasa sinonima je polu-automatski proces s značajnom količinom ručnog rada tijekom filtreranja, dodjele uloge klasama i argumentima članova pojedinačne klase te povezanje s vanjskim leksičkim resursima. Predstavljamo prvu verziju sa 200 klasa (oko 1800 verba) i procjenjujemo interannotatorski sporazum koristeći nekoliko metrika.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menggambarkan CzEngClass, sumber daya lexik bilingual yang dibangun untuk menyelidiki sinonimi verbal dalam konteks bilingual dan untuk menghubungkan peran semantis yang umum untuk satu kelas sinonimu dengan argumen verb (valensi verb). Selain itu, sumber daya terhubung dengan sumber daya yang ada dengan tujuan yang sama: English and Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), dan leksikon valensi untuk Czech and English (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, dan EngVallex). Ada beberapa tujuan dari pekerjaan dan sumber daya ini: (a) untuk menyediakan data standar emas untuk eksperimen otomatis di masa depan (seperti penemuan otomatis kelas sinonim, ketidakambiguasi perasaan kata, pengaturan kelas ke kejadian verb dalam teks, sambungan coreferential dari verb dan argumen peristiwa dalam teks, dll.), (b) untuk membangun sebuah leksikon inti (bilingual) yang terhubung dengan sumber daya yang ada, - untuk studi perbandingan dan kemungkinan untuk pelatihan alat otomatis, dan (c) untuk memperkaya anotasi dari batang pohon paralel, Praha Czech Dependency Treebank Inggris, yang sejauh ini mengandung anotasi valensi tetapi tidak berhubungan sens sinonimus dari verb bersama-sama. Metode yang digunakan untuk mengekstrak kelas sinonim adalah proses semi-otomatis dengan jumlah besar pekerjaan manual selama penapisan, tugas peran ke kelas dan argumen anggota kelas individu, dan menghubungkan dengan sumber daya eksternal leksik. Kami mempersembahkan versi pertama dengan 200 kelas (sekitar 1800 verb) dan mengevaluasi kesepakatan interannotator menggunakan beberapa metrik.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک منبع زبان دو زبان برای تحقیق سنونمی زبان دو زبان و ارتباط نقش\u200cهای semantic با یک کلاس سنونیم با ارتباط\u200cهای verb (ارتباط کلمه\u200cای) را توصیف می\u200cکند. در addition, the resource is linked to existing resources with the same aim: English and Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), and valency lexicons for Czech and English (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, and EngVallex). چند هدف از این کار و منابع وجود دارد: a) برای تهیه داده استاندارد طلا برای آزمایشات اتوماتیک در آینده (مثل کشف اتوماتیک کلاس\u200cهای سنونیم، نامبوغگویی حس کلاس، تهیه دادن کلاس\u200cها به اتفاق کلاس\u200cها در متن، ارتباطات اصلی و اتفاق\u200cها در متن، و غیر از آن) برای ساختن یک زبان (زبان) مرتبط به منابع موجود است، برای تحقیقات مقایسه و احتمالا برای آموزش ابزار اتوماتیک و (c) برای افزایش نویسندگی یک درخت پارالیل، درخت بستگی انگلیسی پراگ چک، که تا حالا نویسندگی ارتباطی دارد ولی حس\u200cهای سنونیم کلمات را با هم ارتباط نداشته است. روش استفاده برای اخراج کلاس\u200cهای سینونیم یک فرایند نیمه\u200cاتوماتیک با تعداد زیادی از کارهای دستی در زمان فیلتر، وکیل نقش به کلاس\u200cها و اراده\u200cهای اعضای گروهی کلاس\u200cها و ارتباط به منابع زبان خارجی است. ما اولین نسخه را با ۲۰۰ کلاس (حدود ۱۸۰۰ کلاس) معرفی می\u200cکنیم و با استفاده از چندین متریک با توافق بین\u200cآشنا\u200cکنندگان ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz 횉eng챌e klasy, iki dilli sanat synonymyny bilim dilinde barlamak 체챌in guruldy we semantik synonym synonym synonym synonymy bilen verb argumentlere (verb valency) baglan첵ar. Munu흫 첵ene-de, 챌e힊i흫 WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) we 횉ek we I흫lis챌e (PDT-Vallex, Vallex we EngVallex) me흫ze힊 resurslar bilen me흫ze힊 maksady bar. Bu i힊i흫 we 챌e힊meleri흫 birn채챌e maksady bar: a) gelejekde awtomatik deneyler 체챌in altyn standart maglumatlary berilmek (synonym klaslaryny흫 otomatik tapylmasy 첵aly, s철z du첵gyny bozmak isle첵채r, s철zleri흫 s철zlerini흫 tertiblemesi, verb we 챌yky힊 dillerini흫 s철흫lemesi we meslekleri흫 s철흫lemesi 첵aly, we b 철l체mleri흫 s철흫lemesi 첵aly, we b철l체mleri흫 s철흫lemesi 첵aly) 첵erle힊dirilmek 체챌 =Kar힊캇la힊yk 철wrenmeler 체챌in we olary흫 awtomatik enjamlary 체챌in, we (c) parallel 챌철rek bagyny흫 du힊u힊ygyny bagla힊dyrmak 체챌in, Prag i흫lis챌e baglany힊yk baglany힊yk baglanmasyny흫 bardyr. 힇u wagt hem 철z du힊u힊ygy bardyr, 첵철ne synonym du힊u힊ygyny bilelikde bagla힊dyrmady. Synonym synonymlary a 챌mak 체챌in ullan첵an y철ntem, filtrelemek 체챌in gaty awtomatik i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊le첵채n i힊l Biz ilkinji wersi첵any 200 sany derejesi bilen (1800 sany verb 첵agda첵ynda) 챌ykaryp, bir n채챌e metrik ulanarak 챌ykaryp 챌ykaryp bererik.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaelezea CzEngClass, rasilimali mbili za lexico zinazojengwa ili kuchunguza muungano wa kikabila katika muktadha wa lugha mbili na kuhusiana na jukumu la semantic linalofanana na darasa moja la ushirikiano na majadiliano (vizuri). Zaidi ya hayo, rasilimali zinaunganishwa na rasilimali zilizopo na lengo hilo sawa na hilo: Kiingereza na Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), na lexico za usawa kwa ajili ya Czech na Kiingereza (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, na EngVallex). Kuna malengo kadhaa ya kazi hii na rasilimali: (a) kutoa taarifa za kiwango cha dhahabu kwa ajili ya majaribio ya kujitegemea mbeleni (kama vile kutambua vyuo vya kujitegemea, uvumbuzi wa maneno, kutekeleza darasa kwa matukio ya maneno katika ujumbe wa maneno, kiunganisha muhtasari wa maneno na mazungumzo ya matukio kwa maandishi, etc.), (b) kutengeneza lexico lililohusiana na rasilimali zilizopo, Kwa tafiti zinazolinganisha na pengine kwa ajili ya mafunzo nyenzo za kujitegemea, na (c) kutajirisha matangazo ya mitaani yanayofanana, Prague Czech Kiingereza ya Kutegemea Treebank, ambayo mpaka sasa yalikuwa na matangazo ya kuchangaza machafuko, lakini haijaunganisha hisia za wazi za maneno pamoja. Utawala uliotumiwa kwa ajili ya kutengeneza darasa la ushirikiano ni mchakato wa sekunde-automatika wenye kiwango kikubwa cha kazi za mikononi wakati wa kuchuja, jukumu la darasa na hoja za wanachama binafsi, na kuunganisha na rasilimali za nje za lexico. Tunaonyesha toleo la kwanza la darasa 200 (takriban vifaa 1800) na kutathmini makubaliano ya kutangaza kwa kutumia mbili kadhaa.', 'ko': '본고는CzEngClass를 묘사하는데 이것은 이중 언어 환경에서의 동사 동의어를 연구하고 하나의 동의어 유형의 공통된 의미 역할과 동사 파라미터(동사 배가)를 연결시키는 데 목적을 둔다.그 밖에 이 자원은 영어와 체코어WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet(SemLink), 체코어와 영어의 배가 어휘(PDT Vallex, Vallex, EngVallex)와 같은 기존 자원 링크와 목적이 있다.이 작업과 자원에는 몇 가지 목표가 있다. (a) 미래의 자동 실험을 위해 황금 표준 데이터(예를 들어 의미 단어의 자동 발견, 의미 분리, 텍스트에서 동사가 나오는 클래스의 분배, 텍스트에서 동사와 이벤트 파라미터의 관련 등)를 제공하고 (b) 기존 자원 링크와 핵심 사전을 구축한다.비교 연구에 사용되며, 자동 도구를 교육하고 (c)의 풍부한 평행 트리 라이브러리에 대한 주석, 프라하-체코 영어 의존 트리 라이브러리에 사용될 수 있습니다. 이 트리 라이브러리는 지금까지 배가 주석을 포함하고 있지만 동사의 동일한 의미를 연결하지 않았습니다.동의어 클래스를 추출하는 방법은 반자동적인 과정으로 클래스와 단일 클래스 구성원의 매개 변수에 역할을 분배하고 외부 어휘 자원에 연결하는 과정에서 대량의 수동 작업이 필요하다.우리는 200개의 종류(약 1800개의 동사)를 포함하고 몇 가지 지표를 사용하여 주석 간의 일치성을 평가하는 첫 번째 버전을 보여 주었다.', 'sq': 'Ky artikull përshkruan CzEngClass, një burim dy-gjuhës lexik që po ndërtohet për të hetuar sinoniminë verbale në kontekstin dy-gjuhës dhe për të lidhur rolin semantik të përbashkët me një klasë sinonimi me argumentet e verbeve (valencën e verbeve). Përveç kësaj, burimi është i lidhur me burimet ekzistuese me të njëjtin qëllim të ngjashëm: English and Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) dhe leksikone valence për çekun dhe anglishtin (PDT-Vallex, Vallex dhe EngVallex). Ka disa qëllime të këtij pune dhe burimi: (a) të ofrohen të dhëna standarte të artë për eksperimentet automatike në të ardhmen (të tilla si zbulimi automatik i klasave të sinonimit, çambiguacioni i kuptimit të fjalës, caktimi i klasave në ngjarjet e verb ëve në tekst, lidhje koreferenciale e verbeve dhe argumenteve të ngjarjeve në tekst, etj.), (b) të ndërtohet një lexikon thelbësor (dygjuhës) i lidhur me burimet ekzistuese, Për studime krahasuese dhe ndoshta për trajnimin e mjeteve automatike, dhe (c) për të pasur anotacionin e një baze peme paralele, Banka e Varësisë Angleze Çeke e Pragës, e cila deri tani përmban anotacionin e valencës por nuk ka lidhur ndjenjat sinonimike të verbëve së bashku. Metoda e përdorur për nxjerrjen e klasave të sinonimit është një proces gjysmë-automatik me një sasi thelbësore pune manuale gjatë filtrimit, caktimin e rolit në klasa dhe argumentet e anëtarëve të klasës individual ë dhe lidhjen me burimet e jashtme lexike. Ne paraqesim versionin e parë me 200 klasa (rreth 1800 verbë) dhe vlerësojmë marrëveshjen ndërvëzhguese duke përdorur disa metrika.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը նկարագրում է Չենգլասը, երկլեզու լեքսիկական ռեսուրսը, որը կառուցվում է երկլեզու կոնտեքստում արտահայտված բերբալ սինոնիմիայի ուսումնասիրելու համար, և որպեսզի կապված լինի սեմանտիկ դերերը, որոնք ընդհանուր են մեկ սինոնիմային դասի Ավելին, ռեսուրսը կապված է գոյություն ունեցող ռեսուրսների հետ, որոնք նույն նպատակով ունեն: Անգլերեն և Չեխարեն WordNet, Ֆրամենեթ, Պրոպանկ, Վերբերբնեթ (ՍեմԼիք) և վալենցիայի լեքսիկոններ Չեխարեն և անգլերեն (PDT-Vallex, Vallex Այս աշխատանքի և ռեսուրսների բազմաթիվ նպատակներ կան. a) ապագայում ավտոմատիկ փորձարկումների համար ոսկու ստանդարտ տվյալներ տրամադրելու (ինչպիսիք են սինոնիմների դասերի ավտոմատիկ հայտնաբերումը, բառերի զգացողության բառերի բառերի բառերի բառերի բառերի բառերը, բառերի և իրադարձությունների բանավեճերի կորեֆերանցիալ կապերը տեքստում, և այլն), b) գոյու  for comparative studies and possibly for training automatic tools, and (c) to enrich the annotation of a parallel treebank, the Prague Czech English Dependency Treebank, which so far contained valency annotation but has not linked synonymous senses of verbs together.  Սինոնիմների դասերի հանելու մեթոդը կիսաավտոմատիկ գործընթաց է, որտեղ ֆիլտրելու ընթացքում մեծ քանակությամբ ձեռքի գործ է կատարվում, դասերի և անհատական դասարանի անդամների բանավեճերի դեր են վերագրվում և կապված են արտաքին լեքսիկական ռեսուրսների հետ: Մենք առաջին տարբերակը ներկայացնում ենք 200 դասերով (մոտ 1800 բայով) և գնահատում ենք ինտերնտոտորային համաձայնությունը օգտագործելով մի քանի մետրիկ:', 'af': "Hierdie papier beskryf CzEngClass, 'n twee tale leksiehulpbron wat gebou word om verbale sinoniem in twee tale konteks te ondersoek en om semantiese roles gemeenskap te verhou aan een sinoniem klas na verb argumente (verb valency). In addition, the resource is linked to existing resources with the same of a similar aim: English and Czech WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), and valency lexicons for Czech and English (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, and EngVallex). Daar is verskeie doels van hierdie werk en hulpbron: (a) om goud standaard data te verskaf vir outomatiese eksperimente in die toekoms (soos outomatiese opdecking van sinonime klasse, woord sens ontsamminging, toewysing van klasse na voorkoms van verbe in teks, koreferensiele verbinding van verb en gebeurtenis argumente in teks, ensfh.), (b) om 'n kerne (bilinguele) leksikoon te bou met bestaande hulpbronne, Vir vergelykbare studie en moontlik vir outomatiese nutsprogramme te onderwerp, en (c) om die annotasie van 'n parallele treebank te ryk, die Prag Tsjechse Engelske afhanklikheid Boom bank, wat so langs gevoer het valentiewe annotasie, maar het nie verbind sinonime senses van verbe saam nie. Die metode wat gebruik word vir uitpakking van die sinonime klasse is 'n semi-automatiese proses met 'n groot hoeveelheid handwerk tydens filtering, rol toewysing tot klasse en individuele klas lede se argumente, en verbind tot die eksterne leksiese hulpbronne. Ons stel die eerste weergawe met 200 klasse (omtrent 1800 verbe) en evalueer interannotator ooreenkoms met verskeie metries.", 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ CzEngClass፣ በሁለት ቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ የቋንቋ ሲኒኖሲን ለመመርመር እና በአንድ Synonym ክፍል ጋር በአንድ ሲንናኒም ክፍል ላይ የሚቀያየውን (verb valency) ክፍል ለመጠየቅ የሚል የልዩ ልዩክሲ ክፍተት ይናገራል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ይህ resource በተገኘው ሀብት ጋር በመስጠት በተለያዩ አቀማመጥ: እንግሊዝኛ እና ቻክክ ቃላት Net፣ FrameNet፣ ፕሮፓክበር፣ VerbNet (SemLink) እና የኬክክ እና እንግሊዝኛ (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, እና እንግሊዝኛ ዋሊክ). ይህ ሥራ እና ዕድሜ ብዙዎች አቃላዮች አሉ:(a) በሚመጣው ለራሳቸው ፈተናዎች የወርቅ የአድራሻ ዳታ (ምሳሌ የሲኒኒም ክፍሎች ማግኘት፣ የቃላት አስተያየት፣ በጽሑፍ የንግግር ክፍተቶችን ማቀናቀል፣ የverb እና በጽሑፍ ግንኙነትን ማቀናቀል እና እና የአንድራሻ ግንኙነት እና እና እና እና እና etc)፣ (b) በተገኘው ሀብት ላይ የሚታያያየውን አውሬት (በሁለት ቋንቋል) ሊክ ለመተካከል ትምህርት እና ለራስቴት መሣሪያዎች ማቅረብ እና (c) የተለየ ትርጓሜዎችን ለማግኘት፣ የፓርጉም የቻይክ እንግሊዘኛ ደጋፊነት ቴርብባን፣ ለዚህ ጊዜም የተለየ ድጋፍ ማስታወቂያ ግን በአንድነት ሳይታወቀው የቃላትን ስህተት ለማግኘት ያስችላል፡፡ የሲንኒም ደረጃዎች ለመውጣት የሚጠቀሙት ሥርዓት፣ ማጣራት፣ ክፍለ ክፍሎች እና የክፍለ ክፍል አባላት አጋራጆች እና ውጭ የሊክሲካዊ ሀብት ጋር በመግኘት ጊዜ የረኀብ ክፍል የሚያስፈልገው የስርዓት ክፍል ነው፡፡ የመጀመሪያውን ክፍል በ200 ደረጃዎች (1800 verbs) እናቀርበዋለን እና በብዙ ሜትሪክ በመጠቀም የኢንተርኔተር ቃል እናስተውላለን፡፡', 'az': 'Bu kańüńĪt, iki dild…ô verbal sinonimi incidir v…ô bir sinonim sńĪnńĪfńĪna verb argumentl…ôri (verb valency) il…ô m√ľxt…ôlif semantik roll…ôri il…ô m√ľxt…ôlif bir sinonim s…ôviyy…ôsin…ô bańülanńĪr. Buna g√∂r…ô d…ô, √ßoxlu mevcut kaynaqlara b…ônz…ôr bir m…ôqs…ôd il…ô bańülanmńĪŇüdńĪr: ńįngilizce v…ô √áehir WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) v…ô √áehir v…ô ńįngilizce (PDT-Vallex, Vallex v…ô EngVallex) layih…ôl…ôri. Bu iŇüin v…ô m…ônb…ônin bir ne√ß…ô n…ôtic…ôsi var: a) g…ôl…ôc…ôkd…ô avtomatik t…ôminatlar √ľ√ß√ľn altńĪn standart veril…ôn m…ôlumatlar t…ôyin etm…ôk (sinonim sńĪnńĪflarńĪn otomatik keŇüfini, s√∂zl…ôrin hiss edilm…ôsi, s√∂zl…ôrin t…ôminatńĪ, metinl…ôrin verbl…ôrin b a ŇüńĪna g…ôlm…ôsi, verbl…ôrin v…ô v…ôziyy…ôtl…ôrin …ôlaq…ôl…ôrini m…ôtnd…ô bańülamaq, etc.); b) m√∂vcuddur m…ônb…ôl…ôrin…ô bańülńĪ (iki dil) leksiyonu in Ňüa etm…ôk, M√ľxt…ôlif √ßalńĪŇümalar √ľ√ß√ľn v…ô m√ľmk√ľn olaraq avtomatik vasit…ôl…ôr t…ôhsil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn, v…ô c) parallel treebank, Prag √áehir ńįngiliz…ô bańüńĪmlńĪlńĪńüńĪ a ńüa c ńĪ bankasńĪ il…ô birlikd…ô sinonim hissl…ôri il…ô bańülńĪ olmamńĪŇüdńĪr. Sinonim sńĪnńĪflarńĪnńĪ √ßńĪxartmaq √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edil…ôn metod filtrl…ôm…ô sńĪrasńĪnda √ßox asanlńĪq iŇül…ôri il…ô yarńĪ-avtomatik prosesidir, sńĪnńĪf v…ô t…ôkrar s…ôviyy…ôl…ôrinin argumentl…ôrin…ô rol bańülanmasńĪ v…ô dńĪŇü leksik kaynaqlarńĪna bańülanmasńĪ. Biz ilk versiyonu 200 sńĪnńĪf il…ô g√∂st…ôririk v…ô bir ne√ß…ô metrik vasit…ôsil…ô interannotator anlaŇümasńĪnńĪ deńüerl…ôŇüdiririk.', 'ca': "Aquest article descriu CzEngClass, un recurso lexical bilingue construït per investigar la sinonimia verbal en contexte bilingue i relacionar rols semàntics comuns a una classe de sinonims amb arguments de verbs (valencia del verb). A més, el recurso està vinculat amb recursos existents amb el mateix objectiu: anglès i cec WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) i lexicones de valencia en cec i anglès (PDT-Vallex, Vallex i EngVallex). Hi ha molts objectius d'aquesta feina i recurso: a) proporcionar dades d'or standard per experiments automàtics en el futur (com el descobriment automàtic de classes de sinonims, desambiguació del sentit de paraules, atribuir classes a ocorrències de verbs en text, enllaç coreferential de verbs i arguments d'eventos en text, etc.), b) construir un lexicó central (bilingue) enllaçat amb recursos existents, - per estudis comparatius i possiblement per treinar eines automàtiques, i c) per enriquecer l'anotació d'un banc d'arbres paral·lel, el banc d'arbres de Dependencia de l'anglès de Praga, que fins ara conté anotació de valencia però no ha vinculat sentits sinònims de verbs junts. El mètode utilitzat per extraure les classes de sinònims és un procés semi-automàtic amb una quantitat substancial de treball manual durant la filtració, l'asignació de paper a les classes i els arguments dels membres individuals de la classe, i l'enllaç amb els recursos lèxics externs. Presentam la primera versió amb 200 classes (uns 1800 verbs) i evaluem l'acord entre anotators fent servir diverses mètriques.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি সিজইংক্লাসের ব্যাখ্যা করছে, যা দুই ভাষায় লেক্সিক্যাল সম্পদ নির্মাণ করা হচ্ছে দুই ভাষায় ভাষায় সিনোনিয়োমি তদন্ত করার জন্য এবং একটি সিনোনিম ক্ল এছাড়াও, এই সম্পদ বিদ্যমান সম্পদের সাথে যুক্ত হয়েছে একই উদ্দেশ্যের সাথে: ইংরেজি এবং চেক ওয়ার্ডনেট, ফ্রেমেনেট, প্রোপব্যাংক, ভার্ব্যাঙ্ক (সেমলিঙ্ক), এবং চেক এবং ইংরেজী ভ্যালেক্ এই কাজ এবং সম্পদের বেশ কয়েকটি লক্ষ্য রয়েছে: (a) ভবিষ্যতে স্বয়ংক্রিয় পরীক্ষার জন্য স্বর্ণের স্থানীয় তথ্য প্রদান করার জন্য (যেমন স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সিনোনিম ক্লাসের আবিষ্কার, শব্দ মানসিক বিভ্রান্ত, লেখায় ক্লাসের সংঘ তুলনামূলক গবেষণার জন্য এবং সম্ভবত স্বয়ংক্রিয় টুল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য এবং (c) প্রাগ চেক ইংরেজি নির্ভরিত ট্রিবাঙ্কের বিষয়টিকে সমৃদ্ধ করার জন্য, যা এখন পর্যন্ত ভ্যালেন্সি বিবেচনা রয়েছে ক সিনোনিম ক্লাস বের করার জন্য ব্যবহৃত পদ্ধতি হচ্ছে সেমি-স্বয়ংক্রিয় প্রক্রিয়া, ফিল্টারিং, ক্লাস এবং ব্যক্তিগত ক্লাসের সদস্যদের যুক্তি এবং বাইরের লেক্সিক্যাল সম আমরা প্রথম সংস্করণ ২০০ শ্রেণীর (প্রায় ১৮০০ ভার্ব) উপস্থাপন করি এবং বেশ কয়েকটি মেট্রিক ব্যবহার করে ইন্টারনেটেটর চুক্ত', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir opisuje ČEngClass, izgrađen je dvojezički leksički resurs za istraživanje verbalne sinonije u dvojezičkom kontekstu i odnošenje semantičkih uloga zajedničkog sa jednim klasom sinonima na verbalne argumente (verbalna valencija). Osim toga, resurs je povezan sa postojećim resursima sa istim sličnim ciljem: engleski i češki WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), i leksionima za češki i engleski (PDT-Vallex, Vallex i EngVallex). Postoji nekoliko ciljeva ovog rada i resursa: a) pružati zlatni standardni podaci za automatske eksperimente u budućnosti (poput automatskog otkrivanja klasa sinonima, disambiguacija riječi, dodavanje klasa na događaje verba u tekstu, koreferencijalno povezanje verba i događaja u tekstu, itd.); b) izgraditi jezgra (dvojezički) leksikon povezan sa postojećim resursima, Za usporedbne studije i moguće za obuku automatskih alata, i c) za obogatavanje annotacije paralelnog treebanca, Prag češke engleske zavisnosti Treebank, koja je do sada sadržala annotaciju o valenciji ali nije povezana sinonim osjećajima verba zajedno. Metod koji se koristi za izvlačenje klasa sinonima je polu-automatski proces sa značajnom količinom ručnog rada tijekom filtrovanja, dodavanja uloge klasama i argumentima članova pojedinačne klase i povezanja sa vanjskim leksičkim resursima. Predstavljamo prvu verziju sa 200 klasa (oko 1800 verba) i procjenjujemo interannotatorski sporazum koristeći nekoliko metrika.', 'cs': 'Tento článek popisuje CzEngClass, dvojjazyčný lexikální zdroj, který je vytvořen pro zkoumání verbální synonymie ve dvojjazyčném kontextu a pro propojení sémantických rolí společných pro jednu synonymickou třídu s argumenty slovesa (slovesa valence). Kromě toho je zdroj propojen se stávajícími zdroji se stejným cílem: anglickým a českým WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) a valenčními slovníky pro češtinu a angličtinu (PDT-Vallex, Vallex a EngVallex). Existuje několik cílů této práce a zdrojů: (a) poskytnout data zlatého standardu pro automatické experimenty v budoucnu (jako je automatické nalezení tříd synonymů, rozšiřování smyslu slova, přiřazení tříd k výskytu slovesa v textu, koreferenciální propojení argumentů slovesa a události v textu atd.), (b) vytvořit jádro (bilijazyčný) lexikon propojený se stávajícími zdroji, pro srovnávací studie a případně pro výcvik automatických nástrojů, a c) pro obohacení anotace paralelní stromové banky, Pražské české anglické závislosti Treebank, která dosud obsahovala valenční anotaci, ale nespojuje synonymní smysly slovesa dohromady. Metoda použitá pro extrakci tříd synonymů je poloautomatický proces s velkým množstvím manuální práce při filtrování, přiřazování rolí třídám a argumentům jednotlivých členů třídy a propojení s externími lexikálními zdroji. Představujeme první verzi s 200 třídami (asi 1800 slovesa) a vyhodnocujeme interanotátorovou shodu pomocí několika metrik.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö kirjeldab CzEngClass, kakskeelset leksikaalset ressurssi, mis on loodud sõnalise sünonüümia uurimiseks kakskeelses kontekstis ja ühe sünonüümi klassi semantiliste rollide seostamiseks tegusõnaliste argumentidega (verbivalentsus). Lisaks on ressurss seotud olemasolevate ressurssidega samasuguse eesmärgiga: inglise ja tšehhi WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) ning tšehhi ja inglise keele valentsusleksikonid (PDT-Vallex, Vallex ja EngVallex). Selle töö ja ressursi eesmärgid on mitmed: (a) pakkuda kuldstandardinandmeid automaatseteks eksperimentideks tulevikus (näiteks sünonüümiklasside automaatne avastamine, sõnatähenduse eristamine, klasside määramine tegusõnade esinemisele tekstis, tegusõnade ja sündmuste argumentide sidumine tekstis jne); b) ehitada olemasolevate ressurssidega seotud põhiline (kakskeelne) leksikon, võrdlevate uuringute ja võimaluse korral automaatsete tööriistade koolitamiseks ning c) paralleelse puupanga annoteerimise rikastamiseks Prague Tšehhi inglise sõltuvuspunkt, mis seni sisaldas valentsusannoteerimist, kuid ei ole seonud tegusõnade sünonüümseid meeli. Sünonüümklasside ekstraheerimiseks kasutatav meetod on poolautomaatne protsess, kus filtreerimise ajal tehtakse märkimisväärselt käsitsi tööd, määratakse klassidele rollid ja klassiliikmete argumendid ning linkitakse väliseid leksikaalseid ressursse. Esitleme esimese versiooni 200 klassiga (umbes 1800 tegusõna) ja hindame interannotatorite kokkulepet mitmete mõõdikute abil.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa kuvataan CzEngClass, kaksikielinen sanastoresurssi, jota rakennetaan tutkimaan sanallisia synonyymejä kaksikielisessä kontekstissa ja yhdistämään yhden synonyymiluokan semanttisia rooleja verbiaargumentteihin (verbivalenssi). Lisäksi resurssi linkitetään olemassa oleviin resursseihin, joilla on sama tavoite: englanninkielinen ja tšekki WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) sekä tšekki- ja englanninkieliset valenssisanastot (PDT-Vallex, Vallex ja EngVallex). Tässä työssä ja resurssissa on useita tavoitteita: (a) tarjota kultaisia tietoja automaattisia kokeiluja varten tulevaisuudessa (kuten synonyymiluokkien automaattinen löytäminen, sanaaistin erottelu, luokkien määrittäminen verbien esiintymiselle tekstissä, verbi- ja tapahtumaargumenttien rinnakkaislinkitys tekstissä jne.), (b) rakentaa ydin (kaksikielinen) sanasto, joka on linkitetty olemassa oleviin resursseihin, vertailevia tutkimuksia ja mahdollisesti automaattisten työkalujen koulutusta varten ja (c) rinnakkaisen puupankin merkintöjen rikastamiseksi Prague Czech English Dependency Treebank, joka tähän mennessä sisälsi valenssimerkinnän, mutta ei ole yhdistänyt verbien synonyymejä toisiinsa. Synonyymiluokkien erottamiseen käytetty menetelmä on puoliautomaattinen prosessi, jossa suodatuksen aikana tehdään paljon manuaalista työtä, annetaan luokkille tehtäviä ja yksittäisten luokan jäsenten argumentteja sekä linkitetään ulkoisiin sanastoresursseihin. Esittelemme ensimmäisen version 200 luokalla (noin 1800 verbiä) ja arvioimme huomautusten välistä sopivuutta useilla mittareilla.', 'jv': 'Pajilan iki rambarang CeengCloseName politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness section 2. Genjer-tool Awak dhéwé éntuk versi perusahaan karo 200 kelas (about 180 verbs) lan nggawe dolanan inter-annot kuwi nggawe barang meta.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek opisuje CzEngClass, dvojezični leksikalni vir, ki se gradi za raziskovanje verbalnih sinonimov v dvojezičnem kontekstu in povezovanje semantičnih vlog, ki so skupne enemu razredu sinonimov, z argumenti glagolov (vrednost glagola). Poleg tega je vir povezan z obstoječimi viri s podobnim ciljem: angleški in češki WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink) ter valency leksikons za češčino in angleščino (PDT-Vallex, Vallex in EngVallex). Obstaja več ciljev tega dela in vira: (a) zagotoviti zlati standard podatkov za avtomatske eksperimente v prihodnosti (kot so avtomatsko odkrivanje razredov sinonimov, razločitev besednega pomena, dodelitev razredov pojavljanju glagolov v besedilu, povezovanje glagolnih in dogodkovnih argumentov v besedilu itd.), (b) zgraditi jedrni (dvojezični) leksikon, povezan z obstoječimi viri, za primerjalne študije in po možnosti za usposabljanje avtomatskih orodij ter (c) za obogatitev označevanja vzporedne drevesne plošče, praška češka angleška odvisnostna plošča, ki je do zdaj vsebovala označevanje valentnosti, vendar ni povezala sinonimov glagolov. Metoda, ki se uporablja za ekstrakcijo razredov sinonimov, je polavtomatski proces z veliko ročnega dela med filtriranjem, dodeljevanjem vlog razredom in argumenti posameznih članov razreda ter povezovanjem z zunanjimi leksikalnimi viri. Predstavljamo prvo različico z 200 razredi (približno 1800 glagoli) in ocenimo soglasje med anotatorji z več metrikami.', 'ha': "Wannan takardan na faɗa CzEngClas, an gina wani resource na leksisi sau biyu, dõmin ya yi tambaya matsayin fanati a cikin muhalli biyu na harshen, kuma ya yi husũma ga aikin semantic mai amfani da daraja guda na synonim zuwa argument (verb fancy). In addition, the resource is linked to existing sources with the same aim: English and Czech words Net, FrameNet, profBank, VerbNet (SemLink), and calendar lex for Czech and English (PDT-Wallex, Wallex, and EngWallex). Kuna da wasu goal daga wannan aikin da kuma ma'anar:(a) za'a samar da data na takardar dahari wa jarrabi masu iya farat ɗaya a gaba (kamar misãlani na gane fassarar synonim, rarraba masu hankali da magana, mai gaura wa kure zuwa masu cikin matsayin, da muhallin maganar verb da muhimmanci masu cikin matsayi, da etc.) @ action: button @ action: button Muna halatar da version na farko da darajõji 200 (taki 18000 verbs) kuma munã qiimar agrarin mai tsakanin da za'a yi amfani da wasu metrici.", 'he': "העיתון הזה מתאר את צ'אנגלאס, משאב מלקסי שתיים-לשוני שנבנה כדי לחקור סינונימיה מילולית בקשר שתיים-לשוני ולהקשר תפקידים סמנטיים נפוצים לכיתה סינונימית אחת לטעונים מילוליים (וולטנציה מילולית). בנוסף, המשאב מקושר למשאבים קיימים עם אותו מטרה דומה: אנגלית וצ'צ'קית WordNet, FrameNet, PropBank, VerbNet (SemLink), ולקסיקונים ואלטיות לצ'ק ואנגלית (PDT-Vallex, Vallex, EngVallex). ישנם מספר מטרות של העבודה והמשאב הזה: (a) לספק נתונים סטנדרטיים זהב לניסויים אוטומטיים בעתיד (כמו גילוי אוטומטי של שיעורי סינונים, ניתוח חוש מילים, שימוש של שיעורים לאירועים של פעולים בטקסט, קישור מיוחד של פעולים וירוצים של אירועים בטקסט, וכו.), (b) לבנות ליבת (שתיים) לקסיקון מקושר למשאבים קיימים, למחקרים שווים ואולי לאימונים כלים אוטומטיים, וכן (c) כדי לעשיר את ההערכה של גבת עץ מקבילה, גבת עץ תלויות אנגלית צ'ק פראג, אשר עד כה מכילה ציונים אולטימיים אבל לא הקשר חושים סינומיים של פעולים יחד. השיטה שמשתמשת כדי לחלץ את שיעורי הסינונים היא תהליך חצי אוטומטי עם כמות משמעותית של עבודה ידנית במהלך הסנן, משימת תפקידים לכיתות ותווכחים של חברי הכיתה בודדים, וקשורת למשאבים הלקסיים החיצוניים. אנו מציגים את הגרסה הראשונה עם 200 שיעורים (בערך 1800 פעמים) ולעריך הסכם בין הבחנות באמצעות מספר מטריות.", 'bo': "This paper describes CzEngClass, a bilingual lexical resource being built to investigate verbal synonymy in bilingual context and to relate semantic roles common to one synonym class to verb arguments (verb valency). འོན་ཀྱང་། རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ཁུངས་འདི་དག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གཅིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན། There are several goals of this work and resource: (a) to provide gold standard data for automatic experiments in the future (such as automatic discovery of synonym classes, word sense disambiguation, assignment of classes to occurrences of verbs in text, coreferential linking of verb and event arguments in text, etc.), (b) to build a core (bilingual) lexicon linked to existing resources, ) འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚུན་མཐུན་གྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་དང་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་ལག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ཡོད། The method used for extracting the synonym classes is a semi-automatic process with a substantial amount of manual work during filtering, role assignment to classes and individual Class members' arguments, and linking to the external lexical resources. We present the first version with 200 classes (about 1800 verbs) and evaluate interannotator agreement using several metrics."}
{'en': 'Rich Character-Level Information for Korean Morphological Analysis and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'ar': 'معلومات غنية على مستوى الأحرف للتحليل الصرفي الكوري وعلامات جزء من الكلام', 'fr': "Informations détaillées au niveau des caractères pour l'analyse morphologique coréenne et le marquage des parties du discours", 'pt': 'Informações ricas em nível de caractere para análise morfológica coreana e marcação de parte da fala', 'es': 'Información enriquecida a nivel de caracteres para el análisis morfológico coreano y el etiquetado de partes del habla', 'ja': '韓国語の形態解析と音声タグ付けのための豊富な文字レベルの情報', 'zh': '丰字符息,以韩语形析词性', 'ru': 'Богатая информация уровня символов для корейского морфологического анализа и маркировки части речи', 'hi': 'कोरियाई रूपात्मक विश्लेषण और पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैगिंग के लिए रिच कैरेक्टर-लेवल की जानकारी', 'ga': 'Eolas Saibhir ar Leibhéal Carachtair le haghaidh Anailís Mhirfeolaíoch agus Chlibeáil Pháirt-de-Caint na Cóiré', 'ka': 'კორეული მოპოლოგიური ანალიზაციისთვის მეტი სიმბოლობის მეტად ინფორმაცია', 'el': 'Πλούσιες πληροφορίες σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων για κορεατική μορφολογική ανάλυση και σήμανση μέρους λόγου', 'hu': 'Gazdag karakterszintű információk koreai morfológiai elemzéshez és beszédrész-címkézéshez', 'it': "Informazioni ricche a livello di carattere per l'analisi morfologica coreana e l'etichettatura part-of-speech", 'kk': 'Корея морфологикалық анализ және сөйлеу бөлігінің таңбалар деңгейі мәліметі', 'mk': 'Богата информација на ниво на знаци за корејска морфолошка анализа и дел од говорот', 'ms': 'Maklumat Aras-Aksara Kaya untuk Analisi Morfologi Korea dan Tagging Bahagian-Perkataan', 'lt': 'Rimta informacija apie Korėjos morfologinę analizę ir kalbos dalį', 'ml': 'കൊറിയയിലെ മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d വിശേഷവും സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഗം', 'mn': 'Солонгосын морфологик шинжилгээ болон хэсэг хэсэг хэлбэрийн тагжингийн баян хэмжээний түвшин мэдээлэл', 'no': 'Rik teikn- nivå- informasjon for koreansk morfologisk analyse og del- av talemerking', 'ro': 'Informații bogate la nivel de caractere pentru analiza morfologică coreeană și etichetarea parțial de vorbire', 'sr': 'Bogata informacija o nivou karaktera za korejsku morfološku analizu i dijelu govora', 'pl': 'Bogate informacje na poziomie znaków dla koreańskiej analizy morfologicznej i tagowania części mowy', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Rik teckeninformation för koreansk morfologisk analys och märkning av del av tal', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'کوریا مورفولوژیک تحلیل اور بات ٹاگ کے پارٹ', 'so': 'Macluumaad taajir ah ee ku saabsan baaritaanka Morphological ee Korea iyo qeyb-of-Speech Tagging', 'mt': 'Informazzjoni Rich-Character-Level for Korean Morphological Analysis and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Báo cáo đại diện Sự phân tích tử học Hàn Quốc và Đánh dấu phần văn học', 'bg': 'Богата информация на ниво знаци за корейски морфологичен анализ и маркиране на част от речта', 'nl': 'Uitgebreide informatie op karakterniveau voor Koreaanse morfologische analyse en part-of-speech tagging', 'de': 'Umfangreiche Informationen auf Zeichenebene für koreanische morphologische Analysen und Part-of-Speech-Tagging', 'id': 'Rich Character-Level Information for Korean Morphological Analysis and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'da': 'Rig tegn-niveau oplysninger til koreansk morfologisk analyse og del-af-tale Tagging', 'hr': 'Bogata informacija o nivou znakova za korejsku morfološku analizu i dio govora', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Kimorphological wa Korea na Ujumbe wa Kizungumzo', 'ko': '풍부한 문자급 정보, 한국어 형태 분석 및 어성 표기', 'tr': 'Koreýan Morfolojik Analizi we Sözleriniň Bölümi Maglumaty', 'fa': 'اطلاعات سطح شخصیت\u200cهای ثروتمند برای تحلیل مورفولوژیک و پاره\u200cی برچسب سخنرانی کره', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ መረጃ', 'hy': 'Rich Character-Level Information for Korean Morphological Analysis and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'af': 'Rich Karakter- Vlak Informasie vir Koreaanse Morphological Analisie en Deel- van- Spraak Merking', 'bs': 'Bogata informacija o nivou karaktera za korejsku morfološku analizu i dijelu govora', 'az': 'Kore칞톛 Morfoloql캼 Analizi v톛 S칬zl톛rin B칬l칲m칲n칲n Etiketini 칲칞칲n Zengin Karakter-Seviye Mal칲mat캼', 'sq': 'Informacion i pasur në nivelin e karaktereve për analizën morfologjike koreane dhe etiketën pjesë e fjalës', 'cs': 'Bohaté informace na úrovni znaků pro korejskou morfologickou analýzu a značení části řeči', 'ca': 'Rich Character-Level Information for Korean Morphological Analysis and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'fi': 'Rich Character-Level Information for Korean Morfologinen Analysis and Part-of-Speech Tagging', 'bn': 'কোরিয়ার মরোফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষণ এবং পার্ট- অফ ভাষার ট্যাগিং এর জন্য সম্পদ অক্ষর- স্তর তথ্য', 'et': 'Rikas märgitaseme teave Korea morfoloogilise analüüsi ja kõneosa märgistamise jaoks', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Bogate informacije na ravni znakov za korejsko morfološko analizo in označevanje dela govora', 'he': 'מידע עשיר ברמה של אופיינים לניתוח מורפולוגי קוריאני', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྩིས་བ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་Korean Morphological Analysis and Part-of-Speech Tagging'}
{'en': 'Due to the fact that Korean is a highly agglutinative, character-rich language, previous work on Korean morphological analysis typically employs the use of sub-character features known as graphemes or otherwise utilizes comprehensive prior linguistic knowledge (i.e., a dictionary of known morphological transformation forms, or actions). These models have been created with the assumption that character-level, dictionary-less morphological analysis was intractable due to the number of actions required. We present, in this study, a multi-stage action-based model that can perform morphological transformation and part-of-speech tagging using arbitrary units of input and apply it to the case of character-level Korean morphological analysis. Among models that do not employ prior linguistic knowledge, we achieve state-of-the-art word and sentence-level tagging accuracy with the Sejong Korean corpus using our proposed data-driven Bi-LSTM model.', 'ar': 'نظرًا لحقيقة أن اللغة الكورية لغة تراصية للغاية وغنية بالشخصيات ، فإن العمل السابق في التحليل الصرفي الكوري يستخدم عادةً استخدام ميزات الأحرف الفرعية المعروفة باسم graphemes أو يستخدم بطريقة أخرى معرفة لغوية شاملة سابقة (أي قاموس للتحول الصرفي المعروف الأشكال أو الإجراءات). تم إنشاء هذه النماذج بافتراض أن التحليل الصرفي على مستوى الشخصية وبدون القاموس كان مستعصيًا على الحل بسبب عدد الإجراءات المطلوبة. نقدم ، في هذه الدراسة ، نموذجًا قائمًا على الإجراءات متعدد المراحل يمكنه إجراء تحويل مورفولوجي وعلامات جزء من الكلام باستخدام وحدات إدخال تعسفية وتطبيقه على حالة التحليل الصرفي الكوري على مستوى الشخصية. من بين النماذج التي لا تستخدم المعرفة اللغوية السابقة ، نحقق دقة عالية في وضع العلامات على مستوى الكلمات والجمل باستخدام مجموعة Sejong الكورية باستخدام نموذج Bi-LSTM المقترح القائم على البيانات.', 'es': 'Debido al hecho de que el coreano es un idioma altamente aglutinante y rico en caracteres, el trabajo anterior sobre el análisis morfológico coreano generalmente emplea el uso de características de subcaracteres conocidas como grafemas o utiliza de otro modo un conocimiento lingüístico previo exhaustivo (es decir, un diccionario de conocimientos morfológicos conocidos formas o acciones de transformación). Estos modelos se han creado con la suposición de que el análisis morfológico a nivel de caracteres y sin diccionario era intratable debido al número de acciones necesarias. Presentamos, en este estudio, un modelo basado en acciones de múltiples etapas que puede realizar la transformación morfológica y el etiquetado de parte del habla utilizando unidades arbitrarias de entrada y aplicarlo al caso del análisis morfológico coreano a nivel de caracteres. Entre los modelos que no emplean conocimientos lingüísticos previos, logramos una precisión de etiquetado de palabras y oraciones de última generación con el corpus coreano de Sejong utilizando nuestro modelo Bi-LSTM basado en datos propuesto.', 'fr': "Étant donné que le coréen est une langue hautement agglutinante et riche en caractères, les travaux antérieurs sur l'analyse morphologique du coréen utilisent généralement des caractéristiques de sous-caractères appelées graphèmes ou utilisent d'une autre manière des connaissances linguistiques préalables complètes (c'est-à-dire un dictionnaire de caractères morphologiques connus des formes de transformation ou des actions). Ces modèles ont été créés en partant de l'hypothèse que l'analyse morphologique au niveau des caractères, sans dictionnaire, était insoluble en raison du nombre d'actions requises. Nous présentons, dans cette étude, un modèle basé sur l'action en plusieurs étapes qui peut effectuer une transformation morphologique et un marquage de partie du discours en utilisant des unités d'entrée arbitraires et l'appliquer au cas d'une analyse morphologique coréenne au niveau du caractère. Parmi les modèles qui n'utilisent pas de connaissances linguistiques préalables, nous obtenons une précision de balisage de pointe au niveau des mots et des phrases avec le corpus coréen Sejong en utilisant notre modèle Bi-LSTM basé sur les données proposé.", 'pt': 'Devido ao fato de que o coreano é uma língua altamente aglutinativa e rica em caracteres, trabalhos anteriores sobre análise morfológica coreana normalmente empregam o uso de recursos de subcaracteres conhecidos como grafemas ou utiliza conhecimento linguístico prévio abrangente (ou seja, um dicionário de transformação morfológica conhecida formas ou ações). Esses modelos foram criados com a suposição de que a análise morfológica em nível de caractere e sem dicionário era intratável devido ao número de ações necessárias. Apresentamos, neste estudo, um modelo baseado em ação de vários estágios que pode realizar transformação morfológica e marcação de parte da fala usando unidades arbitrárias de entrada e aplicá-lo ao caso de análise morfológica coreana em nível de caractere. Entre os modelos que não empregam conhecimento linguístico prévio, alcançamos precisão de tagging em nível de palavra e sentença de última geração com o corpus coreano de Sejong usando nosso modelo Bi-LSTM orientado a dados proposto.', 'ja': '韓国語は高度に凝集性があり、文字が豊富な言語であるという事実から、韓国語の形態素解析に関する以前の研究は、典型的には、文法として知られているサブ文字の特徴を使用するか、または包括的な事前の言語学的知識（すなわち、既知の形態素変換形態または行動の辞書）を利用する。これらのモデルは、必要なアクションの数により、文字レベルの辞書なしの形態解析が難解であったことを前提に作成されています。本研究では、任意の入力単位を用いて形態変換と音声タグ付けを行い、文字レベルの韓国語形態解析の場合に適用できる多段階作用に基づくモデルを提示する。既存の言語知識を採用していないモデルの中で、データ駆動型のBi - LSTMモデルを使用して、世宗韓国語コーパスで最先端の単語と文章レベルのタグ付け精度を実現しています。', 'zh': '韩语高凝集性,字符富言,前此韩语形态学析事,常用子字素符,或以他方备用先验言语知识(即,已知形容转易动作之字典)。 创此模样,假令操作,字符级无字典形析难以解决也。 凡立动作之多端,可以任情输入单位,转易词性表,而施于字符韩语形势之分也。 不用先验言知识,用我数驱之Bi-LSTM,用世宗韩语语料库先进之单词句准确性。', 'hi': 'इस तथ्य के कारण कि कोरियाई एक अत्यधिक एग्लूटिनेटिव, चरित्र-समृद्ध भाषा है, कोरियाई रूपात्मक विश्लेषण पर पिछला काम आमतौर पर उप-चरित्र विशेषताओं के उपयोग को नियोजित करता है जिसे ग्राफेम्स के रूप में जाना जाता है या अन्यथा व्यापक पूर्व भाषाई ज्ञान का उपयोग करता है (यानी, ज्ञात रूपात्मक परिवर्तन रूपों, या कार्यों का एक शब्दकोश)। इन मॉडलों को इस धारणा के साथ बनाया गया है कि आवश्यक कार्यों की संख्या के कारण चरित्र-स्तर, शब्दकोश-कम रूपात्मक विश्लेषण असभ्य था। हम इस अध्ययन में, एक बहु-चरण कार्रवाई-आधारित मॉडल प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो इनपुट की मनमानी इकाइयों का उपयोग करके रूपात्मक परिवर्तन और भाग-भाषण टैगिंग कर सकता है और इसे चरित्र-स्तर के कोरियाई रूपात्मक विश्लेषण के मामले में लागू कर सकता है। उन मॉडलों में से जो पूर्व भाषाई ज्ञान को नियोजित नहीं करते हैं, हम अपने प्रस्तावित डेटा-संचालित द्वि-एलएसटीएम मॉडल का उपयोग करके सेजोंग कोरियाई कॉर्पस के साथ अत्याधुनिक शब्द और वाक्य-स्तरीय टैगिंग सटीकता प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В связи с тем, что корейский язык является сильно агглютинативным, богатым символами языком, в предыдущей работе по корейскому морфологическому анализу обычно используется подсимвольный признак, известный как графемы, или иным образом используются исчерпывающие предварительные лингвистические знания (т.е. словарь известных морфологических форм трансформации или действий). Эти модели были созданы с предположением, что морфологический анализ без словаря на уровне символов был трудноразрешимым из-за количества требуемых действий. В этом исследовании мы представляем многоступенчатую модель, основанную на действии, которая может выполнять морфологическое преобразование и маркировку части речи с использованием произвольных единиц ввода и применять ее к случаю корейского морфологического анализа на уровне символов. Среди моделей, которые не используют предварительные лингвистические знания, мы достигаем самой современной точности маркировки слов и предложений с корейским корпусом Sejong, используя нашу предлагаемую модель Bi-LSTM, основанную на данных.', 'ga': 'Toisc gur teanga thar a bheith glutinative, carachtar-saibhir í an Chóiréis, is gnách go n-úsáideann obair roimhe seo ar anailís mhoirfeolaíoch na Cóiré úsáid a bhaint as gnéithe fo-charachtar ar a dtugtar graphemes nó baintear leas as eolas cuimsitheach teanga roimhe seo (i.e., foclóir de chlaochlú moirfeolaíoch aitheanta. foirmeacha, nó gníomhartha). Cruthaíodh na samhlacha seo leis an mbonn tuisceana go raibh anailís mhoirfeolaíoch ar leibhéal carachtar, nach lú ná foclóir dosháraithe mar gheall ar líon na ngníomhartha a bhí riachtanach. Cuirimid i láthair, sa staidéar seo, samhail ilchéime bunaithe ar ghníomh ar féidir léi claochlú moirfeolaíoch agus clibeáil pháirteach cainte a dhéanamh ag baint úsáide as aonaid ionchuir treallach agus é a chur i bhfeidhm i gcás anailíse moirfeolaíoch na Cóiré ar leibhéal carachtar. I measc na múnlaí nach n-úsáideann réamheolas teangeolaíoch, bainimid amach cruinneas den scoth maidir le clibeáil focal agus abairtí le corpas na Cóiré Sejong ag baint úsáide as ár múnla dé-LSTM atá tiomáinte ag sonraí.', 'ka': 'რადგან კორეული არის ძალიან ადლუტინატიური, სიმბოლოგიური ენერგია, წინა მუშაობა კორეული მოპოლოგიური ანალიზაციაზე, რომელიც საკუთარი სიმბოლოგიების გამოყენება, რომელიც გრაფიმები ან სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა ლ ეს მოდელები შექმნილია, რომელიც საჭირო მოქმედებების რაოდენობით გამოიყენებულია, რომ სიტყვების უკეთესი მოპოროლოგიური ანალიზია. ჩვენ ამ კვლევაში მრავალტაციის მოდელს, რომელიც შეგვიძლია მოპოროლოგიური ტრანფიგურაცია და საუბრის ნაწილად გავაკეთოთ, რომელიც შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ არბრიტური ერთეულების გამოყენება და დააყენებ მოდელების შორის, რომლებიც არ გამოყენებენ წინასწარმოდგენით ლენგურისტიკური ცნობილება, ჩვენ მივიღეთ წინასწარმოდგენით სიტყვის და სიტყვის დონეზე სიტყვის სიტყვის, რომელიც კორპუსს სეჯონ', 'el': 'Λόγω του γεγονότος ότι τα κορεάτικα είναι μια εξαιρετικά κολλητική, πλούσια σε χαρακτήρες γλώσσα, η προηγούμενη εργασία σχετικά με την κορεάτικη μορφολογική ανάλυση συνήθως χρησιμοποιεί τη χρήση χαρακτηριστικών υποχαρακτήρων γνωστών ως γραφήματα ή με άλλο τρόπο χρησιμοποιεί περιεκτική προηγούμενη γλωσσική γνώση (δηλ., ένα λεξικό γνωστών μορφών μορφολογικού μετασχηματισμού ή ενεργειών). Τα μοντέλα αυτά έχουν δημιουργηθεί με την υπόθεση ότι η μορφολογική ανάλυση σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων, χωρίς λεξικό, ήταν αδιάλυτη λόγω του αριθμού των απαιτούμενων ενεργειών. Παρουσιάζουμε, στην παρούσα μελέτη, ένα πολυεπίπεδο μοντέλο δράσης που μπορεί να εκτελέσει μορφολογικό μετασχηματισμό και σήμανση μέρους του λόγου χρησιμοποιώντας αυθαίρετες μονάδες εισόδου και να το εφαρμόσει στην περίπτωση της κορεατικής μορφολογικής ανάλυσης σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων. Μεταξύ των μοντέλων που δεν χρησιμοποιούν προηγούμενες γλωσσικές γνώσεις, επιτυγχάνουμε την υπερσύγχρονη ακρίβεια ετικετών σε επίπεδο λέξεων και προτάσεων με το κορεατικό σώμα χρησιμοποιώντας το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο που βασίζεται στα δεδομένα.', 'it': "A causa del fatto che il coreano è una lingua altamente agglutinativa e ricca di caratteri, i precedenti lavori sull'analisi morfologica coreana utilizzano tipicamente l'uso di caratteristiche sotto-caratteri note come grafemi o utilizzano altrimenti conoscenze linguistiche precedenti complete (ad esempio, un dizionario di forme di trasformazione morfologica note, o azioni). Questi modelli sono stati creati con l'ipotesi che l'analisi morfologica a livello di carattere, senza dizionario, fosse intrattabile a causa del numero di azioni richieste. Presentiamo, in questo studio, un modello multi-stage action-based in grado di eseguire trasformazione morfologica e tag part-of-speech utilizzando unità arbitrarie di input e applicarlo al caso di analisi morfologica coreana a livello di carattere. Tra i modelli che non utilizzano conoscenze linguistiche precedenti, otteniamo una precisione di tagging a livello di parole e frasi all'avanguardia con il corpus coreano Sejong utilizzando il nostro modello Bi-LSTM basato sui dati proposto.", 'kk': 'Корея - абсолюттивті, таңбалардың баяны тілі болғанын себебі, корея морфологиялық анализиясындағы алдыңғы жұмыс кәдімгі графикалық деп белгіленген ішкі таңбалардың пайдалануын жұмыс істейді немесе басқа да, алдыңғы лингвистикалық білімдер Бұл үлгілер таңбалардың деңгейі, сөздік артық морфологиялық анализ қажетті әрекеттер санынан себебі интерактивті болды. Бұл зерттеулерде морфологиялық түрлендіру және сөйлеу бөлігін арнайы бірліктерді қолдану үшін көптеген әрекеттер негізделген морфологиялық түрлендіру және сөйлеу бөлігін қолдануға болады. Алдыңғы лингвистикалық білім жұмыс істемейтін үлгілердің арасында, біз Сейонг Корея корпус үлгілеріміздің "Би-LSTM" үлгісін қолдану үлгісін қолдану үлгісін қолданады.', 'hu': 'Mivel a koreai rendkívül agglutinatív, karakterben gazdag nyelv, a koreai morfológiai elemzés korábbi munkája jellemzően grafikáknak nevezett altípusok használatát alkalmazza, vagy más módon átfogó korábbi nyelvtudást használ (azaz ismert morfológiai transzformációs formák vagy akciók szótára). Ezeket a modelleket azzal a feltételezéssel hoztuk létre, hogy a karakterszintű, szótár nélküli morfológiai elemzés a szükséges műveletek száma miatt nem volt megfelelő. Jelen tanulmányban bemutatunk egy olyan többlépcsős akcióalapú modellt, amely tetszőleges bemeneti egységekkel képes morfológiai transzformációt és beszédrészes címkézést végezni és alkalmazni azt karakterszintű koreai morfológiai analízisre. Azok a modellek közül, amelyek nem alkalmaznak korábbi nyelvtudást, a javasolt adatvezérelt Bi-LSTM modell segítségével elérjük a legkorszerűbb szó- és mondatszintű címkézési pontosságot a Sejong koreai korpusz segítségével.', 'lt': 'Kadangi koreanų kalba yra labai aglutinuojanti, turinti daug charakterių, ankstesniame Korėjos morfologinės analizės darbe paprastai naudojami požymiai, vadinami grafemais, arba kitaip naudojami i šsamūs ankstesni kalbiniai žiniai (t. y. žinomų morfologinių transformacijų formų žodynas arba veiksmai). Šie modeliai buvo sukurti darant prielaidą, kad dėl reikiamų veiksmų skaičiaus nebuvo įmanoma nustatyti požymių lygio, be žodyno morfologinės analizės. Šiame tyrime pristatome daugiapakopį veiksmų pagrindu pagrįstą model į, kuris gali atlikti morfologinį transformavimą ir kalbos dalį žymėti naudojant savavališkus įvedimo vienetus ir jį taikyti simbolio lygio Korėjos morfologinės analizės atveju. Iš modelių, kurie nenaudoja ankstesnių kalbinių žinių, mes pasiekiame naujausią žodžio ir sakinių lygio ženklinimo tikslumą Sejong Korean corpus naudojant mūsų siūlomą duomenų pagrįstą Bi-LSTM model į.', 'ms': 'Kerana bahasa Korea adalah bahasa yang sangat agglutinatif, kaya dengan aksara, kerja sebelumnya pada analisis morfologi Korea biasanya menggunakan penggunaan ciri-ciri sub yang dikenali sebagai grafem atau lain-lain menggunakan pengetahuan bahasa sebelumnya yang meliputi (iaitu kamus bentuk transformasi morfologi yang diketahui, atau tindakan). Model ini telah dicipta dengan anggapan bahawa analisis morfologi karakter-level, kamus-kurang boleh dicatat kerana bilangan tindakan yang diperlukan. Kami memperkenalkan, dalam kajian ini, model berdasarkan tindakan-tahap berbilang yang boleh melakukan transformasi morfologik dan tag-bahagian-ucapan menggunakan unit input arbitrari dan melaksanakannya pada kes analisis morfologik aras-aksara Korea. Di antara model yang tidak menggunakan pengetahuan bahasa terdahulu, kita mencapai ketepatan perintah dan perintah-perintah dengan korpus Korea Sejong menggunakan model Bi-LSTM dipandu data kami.', 'ml': 'കൊറിയയുടെ ഭാഷയില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി കൊറിയയിലെ മൊര്\u200dഫോലോഗിക്കല്\u200d വിശ്വാസത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് സാധാരണ ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റമോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള ഭാഷ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതാണ് (ഉദാഹരണമായ മൊര്\u200dഫോള ഈ മോഡലുകള്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ നില, നിഘണ്ട- കുറഞ്ഞ മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായം ആവശ്യമുള്ള പ്രവര്\u200dത ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പല സ്റ്റേജ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ മോഡല്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. അത് മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങളും സംസാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഭാഗങ്ങളും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ് ഭാഷ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിനു മുമ്പ് ഉപയോഗിക്കാത്ത മോഡലുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച വാക്ക് ബി-എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിം മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സെയിംഗ് കൊറിയയിലെ ക', 'no': 'På grunn av det faktum at Koreanske er ein svært agglutivt, teiknrykk språk, førre arbeid på koreanske morfologiske analyse brukar vanlegvis underkarakterfunksjonar kjent som grafen eller anna brukar komplett førre lingvisk kunnskap (t.d. eit ordbok med kjente morfologiske transformasjonsformer eller handlingar). Desse modelane er oppretta med assumpsjonen at mellom antall handlingar som krevst er innrykkbart med teiknsnivå, ordbok utan morfologisk analyse. I denne studien presenterer vi eit fleirstadig handlingsbasert modell som kan utføre morfologisk transformering og ein del av tale med tilfeldige einingar av inndata og bruke det i tilfelle til koreanske morfologiske analyser. Mellom modeller som ikkje brukar førre lingviske kunnskap, oppnår vi ordet for kunsten og setningsnivå nøyaktig med Sijong-Koreansk korpus med vår foreslått data-drivt Bi-LSTM-modell.', 'mt': 'Minħabba l-fatt li l-Korean huwa lingwa agglutinattiva ħafna u rikka fil-karattri, ix-xogħol preċedenti fuq l-analiżi morfoloġika Korean a tipikament juża l-użu ta’ karatteristiċi sottokaratteristiċi magħrufa bħala grafemi jew inkella juża għarfien lingwistiku preċedenti komprensiv (jiġifieri, dikjararju ta’ forom jew azzjonijiet ta’ trasformazzjoni morfoloġika magħrufa). Dawn il-mudelli nħolqu bil-preżunzjoni li l-analiżi morfoloġika tal-livell tal-karattru, mingħajr dikjaratorju, ma setgħetx tittieħed minħabba n-numru ta’ azzjonijiet meħtieġa. F’dan l-istudju qed nippreżentaw mudell ibbażat fuq azzjoni f’diversi stadji li jista’ jwettaq trasformazzjoni morfoloġika u tikkettar ta’ parti mid-diskors bl-użu ta’ unitajiet arbitrarji ta’ input u japplikah għall-każ ta’ analiżi morfoloġika Korean a fuq livell ta’ karattru. Fost il-mudelli li ma jużawx għarfien lingwistiku minn qabel, inkisbu l-preċiżjoni ta’ l-aħħar kliem u sentenza bil-korpus Korean Sejong bl-użu tal-mudell Bi-LSTM mibni mid-dejta propost tagħna.', 'mn': 'Солонгосын хэл нь маш аглуктив, баян хэл болсон учраас Солонгосын морфологик шинжилгээний өмнөх ажил нь график гэж нэрлэгдсэн суб-дүрсийг ашигладаг эсвэл бусад нь өмнөх хэлний мэдлэгийг ашигладаг. Эдгээр загварууд нь харьцаа-түвшинд, үгүйлтийн бус морфологик шинжилгээ хэрэгтэй үйл явдлын тоо учраас интроктик байдаг гэсэн үг юм. Бид энэ судалгаанд морфологик өөрчлөлт болон хэсэг хэсэг ярианы нэгжүүдийг ашиглан өөрчлөлт хийж чадах олон этапын үйл ажиллагааны загвар гаргаж, Солонгосын хэмжээний морфологик шинжилгээнд ашиглаж чадна. Өмнөх хэлний мэдлэг ашиглахгүй загваруудын дунд бид урлагийн үг болон өгүүлбэрийн хэмжээтэй Sejong Солонгосын корпус бидний санал өгөгдлийн биЛСТМ загварыг ашиглаж чаддаг.', 'pl': 'Ze względu na fakt, że koreański jest językiem wysoce aglutynatywnym, bogatym w znaki, poprzednie prace nad koreańską analizą morfologiczną zazwyczaj wykorzystują cechy podznaków znanych jako grafemy lub w inny sposób wykorzystują kompleksową wcześniejszą wiedzę językową (tj. słownik znanych form transformacji morfologicznej lub działań). Modele te zostały stworzone z założeniem, że analiza morfologiczna pozbawiona słownika na poziomie znaków była trudna ze względu na liczbę wymaganych działań. W niniejszym opracowaniu przedstawiamy wieloetapowy model oparty na działaniu, który może przeprowadzać transformację morfologiczną i tagowanie części mowy przy użyciu dowolnych jednostek wejścia i zastosować go w przypadku koreańskiej analizy morfologicznej na poziomie znaków. Wśród modeli, które nie wykorzystują wcześniejszej wiedzy językowej, osiągamy najnowocześniejszą dokładność tagowania słów i zdań za pomocą korpusu koreańskiego Sejong za pomocą naszego proponowanego modelu Bi-LSTM opartego na danych.', 'mk': 'Поради фактот дека корејскиот јазик е високо аглутинативен, богат со карактери, претходната работа на корејската морфолошка анализа обично ја користи употребата на карактеристичките карактеристики познати како графими или на друго начин користи сеопфатно претходно јазичко знаење (т.е., речник со познати морфолошки трансформации или акции). These models have been created with the assumption that character-level, dictionary-less morphological analysis was intractable due to the number of actions required.  Во оваа студија претставуваме мултифазичен модел базиран на акција кој може да изврши морфолошка трансформација и дел од говорот со користење на арбитрални единици на внесување и да го примени на случајот на корејска морфолошка анализа на ниво на карактер. Меѓу моделите кои не користат претходно јазичко знаење, постигнуваме најсовремена точност на означувањето на зборот и речениците со корпусот на Сејонг Кореја користејќи го нашиот предложен модел Би-ЛСТМ кој се води од податоци.', 'ro': 'Datorită faptului că limba coreeană este o limbă foarte aglutinativă, bogată în caractere, lucrările anterioare privind analiza morfologică coreeană utilizează de obicei caracteristici sub-caractere cunoscute sub numele de grafeme sau utilizează în alt mod cunoștințe lingvistice anterioare cuprinzătoare (de exemplu, un dicționar de forme sau acțiuni cunoscute de transformare morfologică). Aceste modele au fost create cu presupunerea că analiza morfologică la nivel de caracter, fără dicționar, a fost imposibilă datorită numărului de acțiuni necesare. Prezentăm, în acest studiu, un model bazat pe acțiune în mai multe etape care poate efectua transformarea morfologică și etichetarea parțială a vorbirii folosind unități arbitrare de intrare și aplicarea acestuia în cazul analizei morfologice coreene la nivel de caracter. Printre modelele care nu utilizează cunoștințe lingvistice anterioare, obținem acuratețe de etichetare la nivel de cuvânt și propoziții de ultimă oră cu corpul coreean Sejong folosind modelul Bi-LSTM propus.', 'sr': 'Zbog činjenice da je Korejka veoma agresivan, bogat jezik karaktera, prethodni rad na korejskoj morfološkoj analizi obično koristi upotrebu podkarakterskih karakteristika poznatih kao grafeji ili inače koristi sveobuhvatljivo priorno jezičko znanje (tj. rečnik poznatih morfoloških oblika transformacije ili akcija). Ovi modeli su stvoreni sa pretpostavkom da je nivo karaktera, morfološka analiza bez rečnika intraktivna zbog broja potrebnih akcija. U ovom ispitivanju predstavljamo model koji može izvršiti morfološku transformaciju i dio govora koji koristi arbitrarne jedinice ulaska i primjenjuje ga na slučaj morfološke analize na nivou karaktera Koreje. Među modelima koji ne koriste ranije jezičke znanje, postigli smo tačnost reči i reči na razini kazne sa korpusom Sejong Koreja koristeći naš predloženi model bi-LSTM podataka.', 'so': 'Sababta ugu horraysa in Korean uu yahay luqad aad u yaqaan, oo aad u taajir, shaqo hore oo ku saabsan baaritaanka morfologiga Korean wuxuu si caadiga ah u isticmaalaa isticmaalka xarafka hoose e e loo yaqaan ama si kale wuxuu isticmaalaa aqoonta hoose ee luuqada (waa dictionary of forms of morfological transformation or actions). Tusaalooyinkan waxaa la abuuray malaynaya in lagu sameynayo sawir-heer, baaritaanka qof-ka yar ee dictionary-ka-hoos ah lagu sameyn karo tirada falimaha loo baahan yahay darteed. Waxbarashadan waxaynu joognaa tusaale ahaan shaqo badan oo ku saleysan kara bedelka morphologiga iyo qeyb ka mid ah hadalka waxaynu isticmaali karnaa noocyada qalabka arbitaalka ah oo ku dalban karnaa baaritaanka shahaadada saxda koreanka. Tusaalooyinka aan aqoonta afka hore ku shaqayn, waxaynu sameynaa saxda xaaladda farshaxanka iyo saxda qoraalka ah ee xiliga qoyska kooriga ah ee Sejong Korea, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa modelkeen la soo jeeday arimaha Bi-LSTM.', 'si': 'Due to the true that Korean is a high agglutinative, character-rich language, preceding job on Korean Morfologic විශ්ලේෂණය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් භාවිත කරන්නේ Sub-character Featuries Known as Graphems or Otherwise Uses comprehersive pre-language Known (i.e., a dictionary of Known Morfologic Transfer form, or action). මේ මොඩේල් සිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ අක්ෂර-ස්ථානය, භාෂකාරිකාරික විශ්ලේෂණය නැති විශ්ලේෂණය අවශ්\u200dය වි අපි මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, බොහොම ස්ටේජ් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් මාර්පොලොගික වෙනස් සහ කොටස් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් ව පස්සේ භාෂාවික දැනගන්නේ නැති මොඩේල් එක්ක, අපි සිජන්ග් කෝරියානු කෝරියානු කෝරියානු කෝරියානුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය', 'sv': 'På grund av det faktum att koreanska är ett mycket agglutinant, karaktärsrikt språk, tidigare arbete med koreansk morfologisk analys vanligtvis använder sig av subteckenfunktioner som kallas grafem eller på annat sätt använder omfattande tidigare språkkunskaper (dvs. en ordlista över kända morfologiska transformationsformer, eller åtgärder). Dessa modeller har skapats med antagandet att karaktärsnivå, ordlista-mindre morfologisk analys var svårhanterlig på grund av antalet åtgärder som krävdes. Vi presenterar, i denna studie, en flerstegs handlingsbaserad modell som kan utföra morfologisk transformation och del-of-speech taggning med godtyckliga inmatningsenheter och tillämpa den på fall av tecken-nivå koreansk morfologisk analys. Bland modeller som inte använder sig av tidigare språkkunskaper uppnår vi toppmodern ord- och meningsnivåmärkningsnoggrannhet med Sejong koreanska korpus med hjälp av vår föreslagna datadrivna Bi-LSTM-modell.', 'ta': 'கொரிய மொழியில் மிகவும் குறிப்புணர்வான, எழுத்துரு- வளர்ந்த மொழியாக இருக்கிறது, முந்தைய வேலை கொரிய மரோபோலியல் ஆய்வு வழங்கப்பட்டுள்ளது பொதுவாக வரைபடங்களை பயன்படுத்தும் அல்லது இல்லையென்றால் முழு  இந்த மாதிரிகள் தேவைப்பட்ட செயல்களின் எண்ணிக்கையால் எழுத்து- மட்டத்தால், அகராதி- குறைந்த மாதிரி ஆராய்ச்சியால் உள்ளிடு இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், பல நிலையில் செயல்பாடு அடிப்படையில் உள்ளீட்டின் அலகு மாற்றம் மற்றும் பேச்சின் பகுதி குறிப்பை பயன்படுத்தி எழுத்து நிலையில் கொரிய மாற்றம மொழி அறிவை முன்னால் வேலை செய்யாத மாதிரிகளில், நாம் செங்க் கொரிய கூட்டத்திற்கு முன்னோட்டப்பட்ட தகவல் இயக்கப்பட்ட பி LSTM மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி செய்யும்', 'ur': 'اس وجہ سے کہ کوریا بہت اگلوٹینٹ کی زبان ہے، اگلی کوریا مورفولوژیکی تحلیل کے بارے میں اگلے کام کرتا ہے جو اگلوں سے گرافیموں کے نام معلوم ہوتے ہیں یا اگلوں سے پہلے کل زبان علم کا استعمال کرتا ہے (یعنی معلوم ہوا مورفولوژیکی تغییر فرموں کے لکھنے کا لکھنے کا لکھ یہ موڈلے اس حدس سے پیدا کئے گئے ہیں کہ شخص-سطح، لفظ-بغیر مساوی تحقیقات کی تعداد کے باعث ضرورت کی عمل کی تعداد کے باعث غیر اثبات کرنے والا تھا. ہم اس مطالعہ میں ایک متعدد مرحلہ کے اقدام پر بنیاد رکھنے والی موڈل کو پیش کریں جو مورپولوژیکی تبدیل کرسکتا ہے اور ایک حصہ کلام کے ٹاگ کرسکتا ہے اور اسے کریٹر-سطح کے مورپولوژیکی تحلیل کے مطالعہ سے استعمال کرسکتا ہے. نمڈلوں میں جو پہلے زبان علم کا استعمال نہیں کرتے، ہم نے سنگ کوریا کی کورپوس کے ساتھ سجینگ لفظ کی دقیقیت کو پہنچ لیا ہے، ہمارے پیشنهادہ دیے ہوئے دوئیٹ یس ٹم مدل کے مطابق.', 'uz': "Koreysiya juda g'alati, belgilangan tili sababi, oldingi Koreysiya morfologik analyysidagi ishlayotlar odatda grafiklar deb nomlanadigan sub-character xususiyatlarini ishlatiladi yoki boshqa, oldingi tillardan murakkab tizimni foydalanadi (balki Morfologik ўзгартириш форматлар, yoki amallar kabi xil). Ushbu modellar qoʻllanmalar soni sababda qoʻllanmalarning cheksiz, lugʻatdagi morfologik analyzeri bilan yaratiladi. Biz shu tadqida, bir necha darajadagi amalning asosida o'zgarish va gapiruvchi qismni kiritish bir arbitrary birikmalarni ishlatish mumkin va uni Koriya morfological analyysiga qo'llash mumkin mumkin. Bu tildan oldin ilmiy tizimni ishlatmaydigan modellardan iboratmiz, so'zlar soʻzni va sentence darajasi haqida qo'shish imkoniyatlarini Sejong Koreysiya Korpusi bilan ishlaydigan maʼlumot bajarilgan Bi-LSTM modeli yordamida ishlayapmiz.", 'vi': 'Bởi vì Hàn Quốc là một ngôn ngữ đậm đậm đậm dội, giàu tính cách, công việc trước đây về phân tích lịch sử của Hàn Quốc thường dùng các tính năng đặc trưng được biết đến là các hình tượng hoặc sử dụng các kỹ năng ngoại lệ tối đa về ngôn ngữ (tức là từ đi ển của các dạng chuyển đổi lịch sự hay hành động morphology). Những mô hình này được tạo ra với giả thuyết rằng trình phân tích lịch sử không có từ điển không thể kiểm soát do số hành động cần thiết. Chúng tôi có thể trình bày, trong nghiên cứu này, một mô hình hành động đa giai đoạn có thể thực hiện biến đổi và mô phỏng giọng nói bằng các đơn vị nhập ngẫu nhiên và áp dụng nó vào trường hợp phân tích lịch học của người Triều Tiên. Trong số những mẫu không sử dụng kiến thức ngôn ngữ trước, chúng ta đạt được độ chính xác cao nhất của từ và mức độ bản án với tập đoàn Hàn Quốc Sejong bằng cách sử dụng phương pháp Bi-LSTM dựa trên dữ liệu.', 'da': 'På grund af det faktum, at koreansk er et meget agglutinant, tegnrigt sprog, tidligere arbejde med koreansk morfologisk analyse typisk anvender brugen af undertegn kendt som grafemer eller på anden måde bruger omfattende tidligere sproglig viden (dvs. en ordbog over kendte morfologiske transformationsformer eller handlinger). Disse modeller er blevet skabt med den antagelse, at karakter-niveau, ordbog-mindre morfologisk analyse var uønskelig på grund af antallet af handlinger, der kræves. Vi præsenterer i denne undersøgelse en multi-trins handlingsbaseret model, der kan udføre morfologisk transformation og del-of-tale tagging ved hjælp af vilkårlige enheder af input og anvende den til tilfælde af tegn-niveau koreansk morfologisk analyse. Blandt modeller, der ikke anvender tidligere sproglig viden, opnår vi avanceret ord- og sætningsniveau tagging nøjagtighed med Sejong koreansk korpus ved hjælp af vores foreslåede datadrevne Bi-LSTM model.', 'bg': 'Поради факта, че корейският е силно аглутинативен, богат на знаци език, предишната работа по корейския морфологичен анализ обикновено използва използването на подзнаци известни като графеми или по друг начин използва изчерпателни предишни езикови познания (т.е. речник с известни форми на морфологична трансформация или действия). Тези модели са създадени с предположението, че морфологичният анализ на ниво символи, без речник, е неразрешим поради броя на необходимите действия. Представяме, в това изследване, многоетапен модел, базиран на действие, който може да извърши морфологична трансформация и маркиране на част от речта, използвайки произволни единици на вход и да го приложи в случая на корейски морфологичен анализ на ниво символ. Сред моделите, които не използват предишни езикови познания, ние постигаме най-съвременна точност на маркиране на думи и изречения с корейския корпус на Седжонг, използвайки нашия предложен модел, задвижван от данни.', 'de': 'Aufgrund der Tatsache, dass Koreanisch eine hochagglutinative, charakterreiche Sprache ist, verwenden frühere Arbeiten zur koreanischen morphologischen Analyse typischerweise die Verwendung von Unterzeichenmerkmalen, die als Grapheme bekannt sind, oder nutzen auf andere Weise umfassende sprachliche Vorkenntnisse (d.h. ein Wörterbuch bekannter morphologischer Transformationsformen oder Aktionen). Diese Modelle wurden mit der Annahme erstellt, dass eine charakterliche, wörterbuchlose morphologische Analyse aufgrund der Anzahl der erforderlichen Aktionen nicht möglich ist. In dieser Arbeit stellen wir ein mehrstufiges aktionsbasiertes Modell vor, das morphologische Transformation und Sprachteiltagging mittels beliebiger Eingabeeinheiten durchführen und auf den Fall der koreanischen morphologischen Analyse auf Zeichenebene anwenden kann. Unter den Modellen, die keine linguistischen Vorkenntnisse verwenden, erreichen wir mit dem koreanischen Sejong Korpus modernste Wort- und Satzebene-Tagging-Genauigkeit mit unserem vorgeschlagenen datengetriebenen Bi-LSTM-Modell.', 'id': 'Karena fakta bahwa bahasa Korea adalah bahasa yang sangat agglutinatif, kaya karakter, pekerjaan sebelumnya pada analisis morfologi Korea biasanya menggunakan penggunaan karakter subkarakter yang dikenal sebagai grafem atau lain-lain menggunakan pengetahuan bahasa sebelumnya komprensif (i.e., kamus bentuk transformasi morfologi yang dikenal, atau tindakan). Model-model ini telah diciptakan dengan asumsi bahwa analisis morfologi karakter-level, kamus-kurang tidak dapat diterima karena jumlah aksi yang diperlukan. Kami mempersembahkan, dalam penelitian ini, sebuah model berbasis tindakan berbaris tahap yang dapat melakukan transformasi morfologi dan bagian-dari-pidato tag menggunakan unit input arbitrari dan menerapkannya pada kasus analisis morfologi karakter-tahap Korea. Di antara model yang tidak menggunakan pengetahuan bahasa sebelumnya, kami mencapai akurasi kata dan tingkat kalimat yang terbaik dengan Korpus Sejong menggunakan model Bi-LSTM yang diusulkan oleh data.', 'nl': 'Vanwege het feit dat Koreaans een zeer agglutinatieve, karakterrijke taal is, maakt eerdere werk over Koreaanse morfologische analyse meestal gebruik van subkarakterkenmerken bekend als grafemen of maakt anderszins gebruik van uitgebreide voorafgaande taalkennis (d.w.z., een woordenboek van bekende morfologische transformatievormen, of acties). Deze modellen zijn gemaakt met de veronderstelling dat karakterniveau, woordenboek-loze morfologische analyse onuitvoerbaar was vanwege het aantal vereiste acties. In deze studie presenteren we een multi-stage actie-based model dat morfologische transformatie en part-of-speech tagging kan uitvoeren met behulp van willekeurige eenheden van input en dit kan toepassen op het geval van Koreaanse morfologische analyse op karakterniveau. Onder modellen die geen taalkundige kennis gebruiken, bereiken we state-of-the-art woord- en zinnenniveau tagging nauwkeurigheid met het Sejong Koreaanse corpus met behulp van ons voorgestelde data-gedreven Bi-LSTM model.', 'fa': 'به دلیل این حقیقت که کره\u200cها زبان بسیار آلوده\u200cکننده و ثروتمند شخصیت است، کار قبلی در تحلیل مورفولوژیکی کره معمولاً استفاده از ویژه\u200cهای زیر شخصیت\u200cهایی که به عنوان گرافم\u200cها شناخته می\u200cشوند استفاده می\u200cکند یا در غیر این صورت، علم زبان\u200cشناسی پیش از آن را استفاده می\u200cکند (یعنی کل این مدلها با فرضیه\u200cای که سطح شخصیت، تحلیل مورفیک بی\u200cالگوی بی\u200cالگوی به دلیل تعداد عملیات لازم غیرقابل تحلیل قابل تحقیق قرار گرفته\u200cاند. ما در این مطالعه، یک مدل اقدام بسیاری از مرحله\u200cها را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند تغییر مورفلوژیکی و قسمتی از سخنرانی را با استفاده از واحدهای داخل تصادفی انجام دهد و آن را به پرونده تحلیل مورفلوژیکی سطح شخصیت و سطح کره انجام ده بین مدل\u200cهایی که از دانش زبان\u200cشناسی قبل استفاده نمی\u200cکنند، ما به کلمه\u200cهای هنری و سطح\u200cهای مجازات دقیقاتی با قالب کوریه\u200cی سیجانگ با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای دو-LSTM پیشنهاد داده\u200cمان رسیده\u200cایم.', 'hr': 'Zbog činjenice da je Korejka veoma agresivan, bogat jezik karaktera, prethodni rad na korejskoj morfološkoj analizi obično koristi upotrebu podkarakterskih karakteristika poznatih kao grafeji ili inače koristi sveobuhvatljivo priorno jezičko znanje (tj. rečnik poznatih morfoloških oblika transformacije ili akcija). Ovi modeli su stvoreni s pretpostavkom da je razina karaktera, morfološka analiza bez rečnika intraktivna zbog broja potrebnih akcija. U ovom ispitivanju predstavljamo model koji može izvršiti morfološku transformaciju i dio govora, koristeći proizvodne jedinice ulaska i primjenjivati ga na slučaj morfološke analize na razini karaktera Koreje. Među modelima koji ne koriste ranije jezičke znanje, postigli smo tačnost riječi o umjetnosti i razini kazne s korpusom Sejong Koreja koristeći naš predloženi model bi-LSTM podataka.', 'sw': 'Kutokana na ukweli kwamba Korea ni lugha yenye msisimu, yenye tajiri, kazi iliyopita kwenye uchambuzi wa morphological nchini Korea kwa kawaida hutumia matumizi ya tabia za ubunifu zinazojulikana kama picha au vinginevyo hutumia maarifa makubwa ya lugha (yaani dictionary of form of morphological change, or actions). Mifano hii imetengenezwa kwa dhana ya kwamba uchambuzi wa kidigitali wa kidemolojia haukuwa wa kawaida unaohitajika kutokana na idadi ya vitendo vinavyohitajika. We present, in this study, a multi-stage action-based model that can perform morphological transformation and part-of-speech tagging using arbitrary units of input and apply it to the case of character-level Korean morphological analysis.  Miongoni mwa mifano ambayo haitumii maarifa ya lugha kabla, tunafanikiwa hali ya maneno ya sanaa na usahihi wa kiwango cha sentenca na makampuni ya Sejong Korea kwa kutumia mifano yetu ya data inayoendeshwa na Bi-LSTM.', 'ko': '한국어는 고도로 접착되고 문자가 풍부한 언어이기 때문에 이전의 한국어 형태 분석 작업은 보통 하위 문자의 특징을 사용했는데 이를 자형이라고 하거나 종합적인 선험 언어 지식(즉 이미 알고 있는 형태 전환 형식이나 동작의 사전)을 다른 방식으로 이용했다.이러한 모델을 만드는 전제는 필요한 조작 수량 때문에 문자급, 사전이 없는 형태학 분석이 어렵다는 것이다.이 연구에서 우리는 다단계 동작을 바탕으로 하는 모델을 제시했다. 이 모델은 임의의 입력 단원을 사용하여 형태 전환과 어성 표시를 집행하고 이를 문자급 한국어 형태 분석에 응용할 수 있다.선험적 언어 지식을 사용하지 않는 모델에서 우리는 우리가 제시한 데이터로 구동되는 Bi-LSTM 모델을 사용하여 세종 조선어 어료 라이브러리에서 가장 선진적인 단어와 문장급 표기의 정확성을 실현했다.', 'tr': 'Koreýanyň gaty aglutlaýan, karakterleriň baý dili bolan sebäbi öňki i şi Koreýanyň morfolojik analýusisinde degişli karakterleriň ullanyşyny ulanýar ýa-da munyň öňki dil bilgisini ulanýar Bu nusgalar karakter-derejesi, sözlüksiz morfolojik analizi gerekli işlerin sayyna sebäpli intraklatabilir diýip kabul edildi. Bu aramda, multi-stadijal aksiyon tabanly bir nusga çykaryp morfolojik üýtgedişi we çykyş bölegi özüniň arbitrary birimlerini ullanýan we bu nusga Koreýa-derejesi morfolojik analýşine uygulanabilir. Öňki dil bilgilerini ulanmaýan nusgalaryň arasynda biz sanat sözleriniň durumyna we sözleriniň dogrylygyny Sejong Koreýa korpüsi bilen teklip eden Bi-LSTM nusgasyny ulanýarys.', 'am': 'ይህ ምክንያት ቆሬያዊ አካባቢ፣ ሀብታም ቋንቋ፣ የቀድሞው የኮሪያ ሞሮፎሎጂ Analysis ላይ የሚደረገውን ሥራ በመጠቀም የሚጠቅመውን የፊደል አካላት ወይም በተደረገው ቀድሞ የቋንቋዊ እውቀት (ምናልባት የሚታወቀው የሞሮፎሎጂ ለውጥ ፎርማቶች ወይም ሥርዓቶች የሚታወቀውን የደብዳቤ ፊደል አካላት) ይጠቅማል፡፡ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች በሥርዓት-ደረጃ፣ የመዝገበ ቋንቋ-አነስተኛ ምርጫዎች በሚያስፈልጉት ቁጥር የተጠቃሚ ሆኖ ይኖራል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ፣ የብዙ ደረጃዎች የሥርዓት ተሟጋቾች እና የንግግር ክፍል ማተላለፊያ እና የክፍለ ክፍል ማተሚያ እና የቆሬና ሞሮፎሎጂ ክፍል ማተሚያ እና በክፍለ ክፍል እና በክፍለ ክፍል ማተሚያ እና በክራትራርት ክፍል ላይ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከቋንቋዊ ቋንቋ እውቀት በፊት የማይጠቀም ሞዴላዎች መካከል፣ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ቃላትን እና የሥርዓት ደረጃ ማውቀት እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'af': "Dus die feit dat Koreaans 'n baie aglutinatiewe, karakterryk taal is, die vorige werk op Koreaanse morfologiese analisie tipies gebruik die gebruik van subkarakter funksies bekend as grafies of anders gebruik kompleksitiewe voorheede lingwisiese kennis (bv. 'n woordeboek van bekende morfologiese transformasie vorms of aksies). Hierdie modele is geskep met die aanvaar dat karaktervlak, woordeboek-minder morfologiese analisie was intrakbaar vanweë die aantal benodig aksies. Ons voorsien in hierdie studie 'n multistadige aksie-gebaseerde model wat morfologiese transformasie en deel-van-spreek-etiket kan uitvoer deur arbitrêre eenhede van invoer en dit toewend na die geval van karakter-vlak Koreaanse morfologiese analisie. onder modele wat nie vooraf lingwisiese kennis gebruik nie, het ons die staat van die kunste woord en sentence-vlak waarskynlik met die Sejong Koreaanse korpus bereik met ons voorgestelde data-driefde Bi-LSTM model.", 'sq': 'Për shkak të faktit se koreanë është një gjuhë shumë aglutinative, e pasur me karakter, puna e mëparshme mbi analizën morfologjike koreane tipikisht përdorë përdorimin e karakteristikave të nënkarakterit të njohur si grafime ose përdorë ndryshe njohuri të përgjithshme gjuhësore të mëparshme (pra, një fjalor me forme të njohura transformimi morfologjik apo veprime). Këto modele janë krijuar me supozimin se niveli i karakterit, analiza morfologjike pa fjalor ishte e pamundur për shkak të numrit të veprimeve të kërkuara. Ne paraqesim, në këtë studim, një model multi-fazor bazuar në veprim që mund të kryejë transformimin morfologjik dhe shënimin pjesë-të-fjalimit duke përdorur njësitë arbitrare të hyrjes dhe të aplikojë atë në rastin e analizës morfologjike koreane të nivelit të karakterit. Midis modeleve që nuk përdorin njohuri gjuhësore të mëparshme, ne arrijmë saktësinë e shkrimit të fjalës më të moderne dhe të nivelit të fjalës me korpusin korean Sejong duke përdorur modelin tonë të propozuar Bi-LSTM.', 'hy': 'Due to the fact that Korean is a highly agglutinative, character-rich language, previous work on Korean morphological analysis typically employs the use of sub-character features known as graphemes or otherwise utilizes comprehensive prior linguistic knowledge (i.e., a dictionary of known morphological transformation forms, or actions).  Այս մոդելները ստեղծվել են ենթադրելով, որ բնավորության մակարդակի, բառարանի առանց մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծությունը անընդհատ կարելի է հասկանալ անհրաժեշտ գործողությունների քանակի պատճառով: Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի բազմաաստիճանի գործողության հիմնված մոդել, որը կարող է կատարել մորֆոլոգիական վերափոխություն և խոսքի մի մաս նշաններ օգտագործելով կամավոր մուտքի միավորներ և կիրառել այն կորեացի մորֆոլոգիական վերլուծության դեպքում: Մոդելների մեջ, որոնք նախկին լեզվաբանական գիտելիքներ չեն օգտագործում, մենք հասնում ենք ամենաբարձր բառերի և նախադասությունների մակարդակի ճշմարտությունը Սեյոնգ Կորեայի կորպուսի հետ օգտագործելով մեր առաջարկված տվյալների հիմնված երկու-ԼՍԹՄ մոդելը:', 'az': 'KoreyanńĪn √ßox agglutinativ, karakter-zengin dili olduńüuna g√∂r…ô, KoreyanńĪn morfolojik analizi bar…ôsind…ôki …ôvv…ôlki i Ňül…ôri grafik kimi tanńĪnmńĪŇü apa karakterl…ôrin istifad…ôsini istifad…ô edir ya da baŇüqasńĪ il…ô …ôvv…ôlki dil bilgisini istifad…ô edir (m…ôs…ôl…ôn, m…ôs…ôl…ôn, m…ôs…ôl…ôn, morfolojik transformasiya formlarńĪn s√∂zl√ľy√ľ). Bu modell…ôr t…ôl…ôb edil…ôn …ôm…ôll…ôrin sayńĪsńĪna g√∂r…ô karakter-s…ôviyy…ôsi, s√∂zl√ľk-olmayan morfolojik analizi intraktif olaraq yaradńĪlmńĪŇüdńĪr. Biz bu t…ôcr√ľb…ôd…ô √ßoxlu-f…ôrqi eyni modeli g√∂st…ôrdik ki, morfolojik transformasiya v…ô s√∂zl…ôrin bir par√ßasńĪnńĪ imkansńĪz bir qismini istifad…ô ed…ôr v…ô onu koriyalńĪ morfolojik analizi olaraq istifad…ô ed…ôr. ∆Źvv…ôlki dil bilgisini istifad…ô etm…ôy…ôn modell…ôrd…ôn biri, Sejong Kore korpusu il…ô t…ôklif etdiyimiz m…ôlumatlarńĪn biLSTM modelini istifad…ô etdiyimiz m…ôlumatlardan istifad…ô edir.', 'bn': 'Due to the fact that Korean is a highly agglutinative, character-rich language, previous work on Korean morphological analysis typically employs the use of sub-character features known as graphemes or otherwise utilizes comprehensive prior linguistic knowledge (i.e., a dictionary of known morphological transformation forms, or actions).  এই মডেল তৈরি করা হয়েছে যে অক্ষর-স্তর, অভিধান- কম মরোফোলিক্যাল বিশ্লেষণ প্রয়োজনীয় কাজের সংখ্যার কারণে। আমরা এই গবেষণায় একটি বহুমাত্রিক কাজের ভিত্তিক মডেলে উপস্থাপন করেছি যা নির্বাচিত ইনপুটের ব্যবহার করে মরোফোলিকাল পরিবর্তন এবং বক্তৃতার অংশ ব্যবহার করতে পারে এবং কোরিয়ার যে মডেলের মধ্যে ভাষাগত জ্ঞানের আগে কাজ করে না তার মধ্যে আমরা প্রস্তাবিত তথ্য-চালানো বি এলএসএমএস মডেল ব্যবহার করে সেজাং কোরিয়ার কোরিয়ার কোর্পাসের সাথে সেন', 'bs': 'Zbog činjenice da je Korejka veoma agresivan, bogat jezik karaktera, prethodni rad na korejskoj morfološkoj analizi obično koristi upotrebu podkarakterskih karakteristika poznatih kao grafeji ili inače koristi sveobuhvatljivo priorno jezičko znanje (tj. rečnik poznatih morfoloških oblika transformacije ili akcija). Ovi modeli su stvoreni sa pretpostavkom da je nivo karaktera, morfološka analiza bez rečnika intraktivna zbog broja potrebnih akcija. U ovom ispitivanju predstavljamo model koji može izvršiti morfološku transformaciju i dio govora koji koristi arbitrarne jedinice ulaska i primjenjuje ga na slučaj morfološke analize na nivou karaktera Koreje. Među modelima koji ne koriste ranije jezičke znanje, postigli smo tačnost riječi o umjetnosti i razini kazne sa korpusom Sejong Koreja koristeći naš predloženi model bi-LSTM-a podataka.', 'cs': 'Vzhledem k tomu, že korejština je vysoce aglutinativní jazyk bohatý na znaky, předchozí práce na korejské morfologické analýze obvykle využívá podznaků známých jako grafémy nebo jinak využívá komplexní předchozí jazykové znalosti (tj. slovník známých morfologických transformačních forem nebo akcí). Tyto modely byly vytvořeny s předpokladem, že morfologická analýza bez slovníku na úrovni znaků byla kvůli množství potřebných akcí neobtěžitelná. V této práci představujeme vícestupňový akčně založený model, který dokáže provádět morfologickou transformaci a tagování části řeči pomocí libovolných vstupních jednotek a aplikovat ji na případ korejské morfologické analýzy na úrovni znaků. Mezi modely, které nevyužívají předchozí jazykové znalosti, dosahujeme nejmodernější přesnosti tagování na úrovni slov a vět pomocí korejského korpusu Sejong pomocí našeho navrženého datově řízeného modelu Bi-LSTM.', 'et': 'Kuna korea keel on väga aglutinaatne, märgirikas keel, kasutatakse Korea morfoloogilise analüüsi varasemates töödes tavaliselt alammärgifunktsioone, mida tuntakse grafeemidena, või muul viisil kasutatakse põhjalikke eelnevaid keeleoskusi (st teadaolevate morfoloogiliste muundumisvormide või toimingute sõnastikku). Need mudelid on loodud eeldusega, et märgitasemel, sõnastikuta morfoloogiline analüüs oli vajalike toimingute arvu tõttu lahendamatu. Käesolevas uuringus on esitatud mitmeastmeline tegevuspõhine mudel, mis suudab sooritada morfoloogilist transformatsiooni ja kõneosa märgistamist meelevaldsete sisendiühikute abil ning rakendada seda Korea morfoloogilise analüüsi puhul. Mudelite hulgas, mis ei kasuta eelnevaid keeleoskusi, saavutame Sejongi korpusega kaasaegse sõna- ja lausetaseme sildistamise täpsuse, kasutades meie pakutud andmepõhist Bi-LSTM mudelit.', 'ca': "A causa del fet que el coreà és un llenguatge molt aglutinatiu i rica en caràcters, el treball anterior sobre l'anàlisi morfològica coreà normalment utilitza l'ús de característiques sub-caràcters conegudes com gràfems o d'altres maneres utilitza coneixements lingüístics anteriors complets (és a dir, un diccionari de formes de transformació morfològica conegudes o accions). Aquests models han estat creats suposant que l'anàlisi morfològica de caràcter i de diccionari sense diccionari era intractable pel nombre d'accions requerides. En aquest estudi presentem un model basat en acció en moltes etapes que pot fer transformació morfològica i etiquetar part-of-speech fent servir unitats arbitraries d'entrada i aplicar-lo al cas d'anàlisi morfològica coreana a nivell de caràcter. Among models that do not employ prior linguistic knowledge, we achieve state-of-the-art word and sentence-level tagging accuracy with the Sejong Korean corpus using our proposed data-driven Bi-LSTM model.", 'fi': 'Koska korea on erittäin agglutinaattinen, luonteeltaan rikas kieli, aikaisemmassa korealaisessa morfologisessa analyysissä käytetään tyypillisesti grafeemeina tunnettuja alimerkkiominaisuuksia tai muutoin hyödynnetään kattavaa aikaisempaa kielitaitoa (eli tunnettujen morfologisten muunnosmuotojen sanakirjaa tai toimintoja). Nämä mallit on luotu olettamalla, että merkkitason, sanakirjaton morfologinen analyysi oli vaikeasti ratkaistavissa tarvittavien toimien määrän vuoksi. Tässä työssä esitellään monivaiheinen toimintopohjainen malli, joka pystyy suorittamaan morfologisen muunnoksen ja puheen osan merkitsemisen mielivaltaisilla syöttöyksiköillä ja soveltamaan sitä merkkitason korealaiseen morfologiseen analyysiin. Niistä malleista, joissa ei käytetä aikaisempaa kielitaitoa, saavutamme Sejong Korean korpusella huippuluokan sana- ja lausetason tunnisteiden tarkkuuden ehdotetulla datavetoisella Bi-LSTM-mallillamme.', 'jv': 'Taning ngomong ke Korea saiki akeh basa yang sumulatan, akeh-akeh cara-teka, nambah mungkin karo hal-akeh cara-tekan anyar tentang nggawe ngubah apa-cara sing ngerasakno karo perangkat dhéwé nggunaken liyane or a bisa nguasakno perspek awak dhéwé (i.e. sakjane diketekno karo hal nggawe tarjamahan karo aksi nyong). Name We present, in this test, a multi-phase action-supported model that can make modal transformation and Jejaring model sing ora nggunakake ngerasakno tindog, awake awake dhéwé iso nggawe barang-karang kanggo kelas kuwi tindog nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng ketahan karo Côngé (Sejog) koyok Korea nambah dhéwé nambah data nambah bisa model BI-LA-M', 'he': "בגלל העובדה שקוריאנית היא שפה גבוהה בצורה גבוהה באופים, העבודה הקודמת על ניתוח מורפולוגי קוריאני משתמשת בדרך כלל בשימוש של תכונות תת-אופים ידועות כגראפים או אחרת משתמשת בידע שפתי קודם כולל (כלומר מילון של צורות שינוי מורפולוגי ידועות, או פעולות). These models have been created with the assumption that character-level, dictionary-less morphological analysis was intractable due to the number of actions required.  אנו מציגים, במחקר הזה, מודל מבוסס על פעולה במרבה שלבים שיכול לבצע שינוי מורפולוגי וחלק מהדיבור תווים בשימוש יחידות רציניות של הכניסה ולהפעיל אותו למקרה של ניתוח מורפולוגי קוריאני ברמה האופים. בין דוגמנים שלא משתמשים בידע לשוני קודם, אנו משיגים מדויקת מילה חדשה ורמת המשפטים עם הקורפוס הקוריאני סיג'ונג בשימוש מודל הבי-לסTM הנוהל על ידי הנתונים שלנו.", 'sk': 'Ker je korejščina zelo aglutinativen jezik, bogat z znaki, predhodno delo na korejski morfološki analizi običajno uporablja uporabo značilnosti podznakov, znanih kot grafemi, ali drugače uporablja celovito predhodno jezikovno znanje (tj. slovar znanih morfoloških transformacijskih oblik ali dejanj). Ti modeli so bili ustvarjeni s predpostavko, da je morfološka analiza na ravni znakov, brez slovarja, zaradi števila potrebnih dejanj neustavljiva. V tej študiji predstavljamo večstopenjski akcijski model, ki lahko izvede morfološko transformacijo in označevanje dela govora z uporabo poljubnih enot vnosa in ga uporabi za primer korejske morfološke analize na ravni znakov. Med modeli, ki ne uporabljajo predhodnega jezikovnega znanja, dosegamo vrhunsko natančnost označevanja besed in stavkov na ravni Sejong korpusa z uporabo našega predlaganega podatkovno usmerjenega modela Bi-LSTM.', 'ha': "Ga da gaske, Koriya yana da wata lugha mai girma, mai taƙaita, kuma yana da aikin gaba a kan analyn morfologi na Korea, yana amfani da amfani da misalin abun-rubutu wanda aka sani kamar grammati ko kuma idan ba ya yi amfani da fassarar ko kuma zai yi amfani da fassara ga fassarar kunyar linguistic (misali, wata dictionary of an sanar fofological transformation, ko aikin aiki). An halitta waɗannan misãlai da ana yi zato da za'a iya ƙayyade tsari-daraja, mai ƙaranci-difologi na da amfani da ƙidãyar aikin da ke buƙata. Munã kai yanzu, a cikin wannan karanta, wata misãlin aiki mai baka multi-daraja wanda ke iya iya samun canza mutfologi da rabon magana da zai yi amfani da arbitati sunayen inputi kuma munã amfani da shi zuwa halin-daraja na fassarar-koriya. Among models that do not employ prior linguistic knowledge, we achieve state-of-the-art word and sentence-level tagging accuracy with the Sejong Korean corpus using our proposed data-driven Bi-LSTM model.", 'bo': 'Due to the fact that Korean is a highly agglutinative, character-rich language, previous work on Korean morphological analysis typically employs the use of sub-character features known as graphemes or otherwise utilizes comprehensive prior linguistic knowledge (i.e. a dictionary of known morphological transformation forms, or actions). These models have been created with the assumption that character-level, dictionary-less morphological analysis was intractable due to the number of actions required. We present, in this study, a multi-stage action-based model that can perform morphological transformation and part-of-speech tagging using arbitrary units of input and apply it to the case of character-level Korean morphological analysis. Among models that do not employ prior linguistic knowledge, we achieve state-of-the-art word and sentence-level tagging accuracy with the Sejong Korean corpus using our proposed data-driven Bi-LSTM model.'}
{'en': 'Real-time Change Point Detection using On-line Topic Models', 'ar': 'اكتشاف نقطة التغيير في الوقت الحقيقي باستخدام نماذج الموضوعات عبر الإنترنت', 'es': 'Detección de puntos de cambio en tiempo real mediante modelos de temas', 'pt': 'Detecção de ponto de mudança em tempo real usando modelos de tópicos on-line', 'fr': "Détection des points de changement en temps réel à l'aide de modèles", 'ja': 'オンライントピックモデルを使用したリアルタイムの変化点検出', 'zh': '用在线主题模实时变化检测', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन विषय मॉडल का उपयोग कर रीयल-टाइम परिवर्तन बिंदु का पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Обнаружение точек изменения в реальном времени с использованием онлайновых тематических моделей', 'ga': 'Brath Pointe Athraithe Fíor-ama ag úsáid Samhlacha Topaicí Ar Líne', 'ka': 'რეალური დროის ცვლილების წიგნის განახლება ხაზის ტემების მოდელების გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Valós idejű változáspont észlelés on-line téma modellekkel', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση σημείου αλλαγής σε πραγματικό χρόνο χρησιμοποιώντας μοντέλα θεμάτων', 'it': 'Rilevamento dei punti di cambiamento in tempo reale utilizzando modelli di argomenti on-line', 'kk': 'Жолсызық нақыштар үлгілерімен шын- уақытты өзгерту нүктесін анықтау', 'lt': 'Realaus laiko keitimo taško nustatymas naudojant internetinius teminius modelius', 'mk': 'Детектирање на точки за промена во реално време користејќи онлајн темски модели', 'ms': 'Pengesanan Titik Ubah Masa-Sebenar menggunakan Model Topik Dalam Talian', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈനിലെ പ്രമേയ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചു് യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ സമയം മാറ്റുന്ന പോയിന്റ് ഡിറ്ററിറ്റീഷന', 'mt': 'Detezzjoni tal-Punt ta’ Bidla f’ħin reali bl-użu ta’ Mudelli Topiċi On line', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ цаг хугацааны өөрчлөлт цэгийг олох', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie punktów zmiany w czasie rzeczywistym za pomocą modeli tematów on-line', 'no': 'Oppdaging av verktøytips- endringspunkt ved hjelp av online emnemodular', 'sr': 'Реалновременна промена точка откривања користећи онлайн теми модели', 'ro': 'Detectarea punctelor de schimbare în timp real utilizând modele de subiecte on-line', 'si': 'ඇත්ත වෙලාව වෙනස් පින්තුව හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න', 'ta': 'நேரம் மாற்றும் புள்ளியை கண்டுபிடிப்பு இணைய தலைப்பு மாதிரிகளை பயன்படுத்து', 'ur': 'اون لین ٹیموٹ موڈل کے استعمال سے ریل-ٹائم تغییر پوینٹ کی آشنائی', 'sv': 'Identifiering av ändringspunkter i realtid med hjälp av ämnesmodeller online', 'so': 'Midabka Internetka', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện điểm thay đổi thời gian thực dùng các mẫu nội dung', 'da': 'Registrering af ændringspunkt i realtid ved hjælp af emnemodeller online', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje točke promjene stvarnog vremena koristeći online modele teme', 'nl': 'Realtime detectie van veranderpunten met behulp van on-line topic modellen', 'bg': 'Откриване на точката на промяна в реално време с помощта на онлайн тематични модели', 'ko': '온라인 테마 모델 기반의 실시간 변화점 검출', 'id': 'Real-time Change Point Detection using On-line Topic Models', 'de': 'Echtzeit-Erkennung von Änderungspunkten mithilfe von Online-Themenmodellen', 'sw': 'Kugundua Point kwa wakati halisi kwa kutumia Modala za Mitandao', 'af': 'Redigeer Tyd Verander Punt Opdekking gebruik Oplyn Tema Modelle', 'tr': 'Hat Mazmunlary Ullanylan Hat Wagtlaýyn Aňlamak', 'sq': 'Detektimi i pikës së ndryshimit në kohë reale duke përdorur modele tematike online', 'az': 'S톛tir m톛s톛l톛l톛ri istifad톛 ed톛r톛k Real-time Change Point Detection', 'hy': 'Իրական ժամանակում փոփոխության կետի հայտնաբերումը օգտագործելով առցանց թեմային մոդելներ', 'am': 'undo-type', 'bn': 'অনলাইন বিষয় মোডেল ব্যবহার করে বাস্তব সময় পরিবর্তন করা পয়েন্ট পরিবর্তনের সনাক্তি', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن نقطه تغییر زمان واقعی با استفاده از مدل\u200cهای موضوع روی خط', 'ca': 'Detecció de punts de canvi en temps real utilitzant models de tema on-line', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje točke za promjenu realnog vremena koristeći online modele teme', 'cs': 'Detekce bodu změny v reálném čase pomocí on-line tématických modelů', 'et': 'Reaalajas muutuspunkti tuvastamine on-line teemamudelite abil', 'fi': 'Reaaliaikainen muutospisteen tunnistus käyttämällä online-teemamalleja', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje točke spremembe v realnem času z uporabo spletnih tematskih modelov', 'he': 'זיהוי נקודת שינוי בזמן אמיתי באמצעות מודלים נושאים ברשת', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'དྲ་བ་དང་ཁོར་ཡུག་གི་གནད་དོན་མ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱོད་པའི་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་བསྒྱུར་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་རྟོགས'}
{'en': 'Detecting changes within an unfolding event in real time from news articles or social media enables to react promptly to serious issues in public safety, public health or natural disasters. In this study, we use on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to model shifts in topics, and apply on-line change point detection (CPD) algorithms to detect when significant changes happen. We describe an on-line Bayesian change point detection algorithm that we use to detect topic changes from on-line LDA output. Extensive experiments on social media data and news articles show the benefits of on-line LDA versus standard LDA, and of on-line change point detection compared to off-line algorithms. This yields F-scores up to 52 % on the detection of significant real-life changes from these document streams.', 'ar': 'يتيح اكتشاف التغييرات داخل حدث ما في الوقت الفعلي من المقالات الإخبارية أو وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي الاستجابة السريعة للقضايا الخطيرة في السلامة العامة أو الصحة العامة أو الكوارث الطبيعية. في هذه الدراسة ، نستخدم تخصيص Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) عبر الإنترنت لنمذجة التحولات في الموضوعات ، وتطبيق خوارزميات اكتشاف نقطة التغيير (CPD) عبر الإنترنت لاكتشاف وقت حدوث تغييرات كبيرة. وصفنا خوارزمية بايزي للكشف عن نقطة التغيير عبر الإنترنت والتي نستخدمها لاكتشاف تغييرات الموضوع من إخراج LDA عبر الإنترنت. تُظهر التجارب المكثفة على بيانات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي والمقالات الإخبارية فوائد LDA عبر الإنترنت مقابل LDA القياسي ، واكتشاف نقطة التغيير عبر الإنترنت مقارنة بالخوارزميات غير المتصلة بالإنترنت. ينتج عن ذلك درجات F تصل إلى 52٪ عند اكتشاف تغييرات كبيرة في الحياة الواقعية من تدفقات المستندات هذه.', 'pt': 'Detectar mudanças dentro de um evento em tempo real a partir de artigos de notícias ou mídias sociais permite reagir prontamente a problemas sérios de segurança pública, saúde pública ou desastres naturais. Neste estudo, usamos a Alocação de Dirichlet Latente (LDA) on-line para modelar mudanças em tópicos e aplicamos algoritmos de detecção de ponto de mudança (CPD) on-line para detectar quando ocorrem mudanças significativas. Descrevemos um algoritmo de detecção de ponto de mudança Bayesiano on-line que usamos para detectar mudanças de tópico da saída LDA on-line. Extensos experimentos em dados de mídia social e artigos de notícias mostram os benefícios do LDA on-line em relação ao LDA padrão e da detecção de pontos de mudança on-line em comparação com algoritmos off-line. Isso gera F-scores de até 52% na detecção de alterações significativas na vida real desses fluxos de documentos.', 'es': 'La detección de cambios dentro de un evento que se desarrolla en tiempo real a partir de artículos de noticias o redes sociales permite reaccionar rápidamente ante problemas graves de seguridad pública, salud pública o desastres naturales. En este estudio, utilizamos la Asignación de Dirichlet Latente (LDA) en línea para modelar los cambios en los temas y aplicamos algoritmos de detección de puntos de cambio (CPD) en línea para detectar cuándo ocurren cambios significativos. Describimos un algoritmo de detección de punto de cambio bayesiano en línea que utilizamos para detectar cambios de tema a partir de la salida LDA en línea. Amplios experimentos con datos de redes sociales y artículos de noticias muestran los beneficios de la LDA en línea frente a la LDA estándar, y de la detección de puntos de cambio en línea en comparación con los algoritmos fuera de línea. Esto produce puntuaciones F de hasta el 52% en la detección de cambios significativos en la vida real de estos flujos de documentos.', 'fr': "La détection des changements au sein d'un événement en cours en temps réel à partir d'articles de presse ou de médias sociaux permet de réagir rapidement aux problèmes graves de sécurité publique, de santé publique ou de catastrophes naturelles. Dans cette étude, nous utilisons l'allocation de Dirichlet latente (LDA) en ligne pour modéliser les changements dans les sujets, et nous appliquons des algorithmes de détection de points de changement (DPC) en ligne pour détecter les changements importants. Nous décrivons un algorithme de détection de point de changement bayésien en ligne que nous utilisons pour détecter les changements de sujet à partir de la sortie LDA en ligne. Des expériences approfondies sur les données des réseaux sociaux et des articles de presse montrent les avantages de l'analyse LDA en ligne par rapport à la LDA standard, et de la détection des points de changement en ligne par rapport aux algorithmes hors ligne. Cela permet d'obtenir des scores F allant jusqu'à 52\xa0% lors de la détection de changements significatifs dans la vie réelle de ces flux de documents.", 'ja': 'ニュース記事やソーシャルメディアから展開中のイベント内の変化をリアルタイムで検出することで、公共の安全、公衆衛生、または自然災害における重大な問題に迅速に対応することができます。この研究では、オンライン潜伏ディリクレ割り当て（ LDA ）を使用してトピックのシフトをモデル化し、オンライン変化点検出（ CPD ）アルゴリズムを適用して、重大な変化が発生した場合を検出します。オンラインLDA出力からのトピック変化を検出するために使用するオンラインベイズ変化点検出アルゴリズムについて説明します。ソーシャルメディアデータおよびニュース記事に関する広範な実験は、オンラインLDAと標準LDAの利点、およびオフラインアルゴリズムと比較したオンライン変更点検出の利点を示しています。これにより、これらのドキュメントストリームからの著しい実際の変化の検出で最大52 ％のFスコアが得られます。', 'zh': '新闻文社交媒体实时检之变,能速应于公共安全、公共卫生、天灾之甚者。 以在线潜于狄利克雷分(LDA)建模于大端,以在线检之(CPD)算法以检之。 我们述述了一种在线贝叶斯变化点检测算法,该算法用于检测在线 LDA 输出的主题变化。 社交媒体数与新闻文之博实验明,在线LDA比准LDA,与在线变检比离线算法之胜势也。 使检自斯文档流之大现实生活变化之时,F得分达52%。', 'ru': 'Обнаружение изменений в рамках разворачивающегося события в режиме реального времени из новостных статей или социальных сетей позволяет оперативно реагировать на серьезные проблемы в области общественной безопасности, общественного здравоохранения или стихийных бедствий. В этом исследовании мы используем онлайн-распределение латентного дирихле (LDA) для моделирования сдвигов в темах и применяем алгоритмы онлайн-детекции точек изменения (CPD) для обнаружения, когда происходят значительные изменения. Мы описываем онлайновый алгоритм обнаружения байесовских точек изменения, который мы используем для обнаружения изменений темы из онлайнового выхода LDA. Обширные эксперименты с данными и новостными статьями в социальных сетях показывают преимущества онлайн LDA по сравнению со стандартным LDA и онлайн обнаружения точек изменения по сравнению с автономными алгоритмами. Это дает F-показатели до 52% при обнаружении значительных изменений в реальной жизни из этих потоков документов.', 'hi': 'समाचार लेखों या सोशल मीडिया से वास्तविक समय में एक खुलासा घटना के भीतर परिवर्तनों का पता लगाना सार्वजनिक सुरक्षा, सार्वजनिक स्वास्थ्य या प्राकृतिक आपदाओं में गंभीर मुद्दों पर तुरंत प्रतिक्रिया करने में सक्षम बनाता है। इस अध्ययन में, हम विषयों में बदलाव को मॉडल करने के लिए ऑन-लाइन अव्यक्त डिरिचलेट आवंटन (एलडीए) का उपयोग करते हैं, और महत्वपूर्ण परिवर्तन होने पर पता लगाने के लिए ऑन-लाइन चेंज पॉइंट डिटेक्शन (सीपीडी) एल्गोरिदम लागू करते हैं। हम एक ऑन-लाइन बायेसियन परिवर्तन बिंदु का पता लगाने वाले एल्गोरिथ्म का वर्णन करते हैं जिसका उपयोग हम ऑन-लाइन एलडीए आउटपुट से विषय परिवर्तनों का पता लगाने के लिए करते हैं। सोशल मीडिया डेटा और समाचार लेखों पर व्यापक प्रयोगऑन-लाइन एलडीए बनाम मानक एलडीए के लाभों को दिखाते हैं, और ऑफ-लाइन एल्गोरिदम की तुलना में ऑनलाइन परिवर्तन बिंदु का पता लगाने के। यह इन दस्तावेज़ धाराओं से महत्वपूर्ण वास्तविक जीवन परिवर्तनों का पता लगाने पर 52% तक एफ-स्कोर प्राप्त करता है।', 'ga': 'Má aimsítear athruithe laistigh d’imeacht atá ag tarlú i bhfíor-am ó ailt nuachta nó ó na meáin shóisialta is féidir freagairt go pras ar shaincheisteanna tromchúiseacha maidir le sábháilteacht an phobail, sláinte an phobail nó tubaistí nádúrtha. Sa staidéar seo, úsáidimid Leithdháileadh Dirichlet Folaigh (LDA) ar líne chun athruithe topaicí a shamhaltú, agus cuirimid i bhfeidhm algartaim braite pointe athraithe (CPD) ar líne chun a bhrath nuair a tharlaíonn athruithe suntasacha. Déanaimid cur síos ar algartam braite pointe athraithe Bayesian ar líne a úsáidimid chun athruithe topaicí a bhrath ó aschur LDA ar líne. Léiríonn turgnaimh fhairsing ar shonraí meán sóisialta agus ailt nuachta na buntáistí a bhaineann le LDA ar líne i gcomparáid le LDA caighdeánach, agus le brath pointe athraithe ar líne i gcomparáid le halgartaim as líne. Cruthaíonn sé seo scóir F suas le 52% ar athruithe suntasacha fíorshaoil a bhrath ó na sruthanna doiciméad seo.', 'hu': 'A kibontakozó eseményen belüli változások valós időben történő felismerése hírekből vagy közösségi médiából lehetővé teszi, hogy azonnal reagáljon a közbiztonság, a közegészségügy vagy a természeti katasztrófák súlyos problémáira. Ebben a tanulmányban az on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) segítségével modellezzük a témák eltolódását, és az on-line változáspont detektálását (CPD) algoritmusokat alkalmazzuk a jelentős változások észlelésére. Leírunk egy on-line bayesiai változáspont detektálási algoritmust, amelyet az on-line LDA kimenetből eredő témaváltozások észlelésére használunk. A közösségi média adataival és hírekkel kapcsolatos kiterjedt kísérletek kimutatják az online LDA és a standard LDA, valamint az online változáspont detektálás előnyeit az offline algoritmusokhoz képest. Ez akár 52%-os F pontszámot eredményez, amikor jelentős valós változásokat észlel ezekből a dokumentumfolyamokból.', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση αλλαγών εντός ενός γεγονότος που εκτυλίσσεται σε πραγματικό χρόνο από άρθρα ειδήσεων ή μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης επιτρέπει την άμεση αντίδραση σε σοβαρά ζητήματα δημόσιας ασφάλειας, δημόσιας υγείας ή φυσικών καταστροφών. Σε αυτή τη μελέτη, χρησιμοποιούμε την κατανομή σε απευθείας σύνδεση για να μοντελοποιήσουμε μετατοπίσεις σε θέματα και εφαρμόζουμε αλγόριθμους ανίχνευσης σημείου αλλαγής για να ανιχνεύσουμε πότε συμβαίνουν σημαντικές αλλαγές. Περιγράφουμε έναν αλγόριθμο ανίχνευσης σημείων αλλαγής που χρησιμοποιούμε για να ανιχνεύσουμε αλλαγές θεμάτων από την παραγωγή σε απευθείας σύνδεση. Εκτεταμένα πειράματα σε δεδομένα κοινωνικών δικτύων και άρθρα ειδήσεων δείχνουν τα οφέλη της σε απευθείας σύνδεση έναντι των τυπικών και της ανίχνευσης σημείων αλλαγής σε σύγκριση με τους αλγόριθμους εκτός σύνδεσης. Αυτό δίνει βαθμολογίες έως 52% για την ανίχνευση σημαντικών πραγματικών αλλαγών από αυτές τις ροές εγγράφων.', 'ka': 'აღმოჩენა ცვლილებების შეცვლების რეალურად გახსენებული მოვლენისთვის ახალგაზომის ან სოციალური მედიაზე შესაძლებელია გარექტირება ძალიან სერიო პრობლემებზე საზოგადოებო ამ კვლევაში ჩვენ დავყენებთ Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) ტემებში მოდელური შეცვლების მოდულისთვის და დავყენებთ ხაზის შეცვლების (CPD) ალგორიტმი, როდესაც იქნება მნიშვნელოვანი ცვლილებები. ჩვენ დავწერეთ ბეიზიანის ცვლილების ალგორიტიმი, რომელიც ჩვენ გამოყენებთ LDA-ის გადასვლის ტემების ცვლილების განვიხსნა. სოციალური მონაცემების და ახალგაზომის მონაცემების გარეშე ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენებს LDA-ს გარეშე სტანდარტური LDA-ს და ხანხის ცვლილების მონაცემების გარეშე ალგორიტების გარეშე ეს იქნება F-scores-ს 52% დამატებით ამ დოკუმენტის სტრიმენტების შეცვლების განახსნა.', 'lt': 'Realaus laiko naujienų straipsnių ar social in ės žiniasklaidos pokyčių nustatymas leidžia greitai reaguoti į rimtus visuomenės saugos, visuomenės sveikatos ar stichinių nelaimių klausimus. In this study, we use on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to model shifts in topics, and apply on-line change point detection (CPD) algorithms to detect when significant changes happen.  Mes apibūdiname Bayesiano keitimo taškų nustatymo algoritmą, kurį naudojame aptikti teminius pokyčius iš interneto LDA išėjimo. Išsamūs socialinių žiniasklaidos duomenų ir naujienų straipsnių eksperimentai rodo, kad interneto LDA nauda palyginti su standartiniu LDA ir interneto pokyčių taškų nustatymas palyginti su neteisėtais algoritmais. Tai rodo, kad iš šių dokumentų srautų pastebimi reikšmingi realiojo gyvenimo pokyčiai sudaro iki 52 proc. F rezultatų.', 'it': "Rilevare i cambiamenti all'interno di un evento in corso in tempo reale da articoli di notizie o social media consente di reagire tempestivamente a gravi problemi di sicurezza pubblica, salute pubblica o calamità naturali. In questo studio, utilizziamo on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) per modellare i cambiamenti negli argomenti e applichiamo algoritmi on-line Change Point Detection (CPD) per rilevare quando si verificano cambiamenti significativi. Descriviamo un algoritmo di rilevamento dei punti di cambiamento Bayesiano on-line che utilizziamo per rilevare i cambiamenti degli argomenti dall'output LDA on-line. Esperimenti approfonditi sui dati dei social media e articoli di notizie mostrano i vantaggi dell'LDA on-line rispetto agli LDA standard e del rilevamento dei punti di cambiamento on-line rispetto agli algoritmi off-line. Questo consente di ottenere punteggi F fino al 52% sulla rilevazione di cambiamenti significativi nella vita reale da questi flussi di documenti.", 'kk': 'Жаңалық мақалалардан немесе социаллық мақалалардан шын уақытта өзгерістерді табу көбірек қауіпсіздіктеріне, көбірек қауіпсіздіктерінде, қауіпсіздік саулық немесе табиғи бедс Бұл зерттеулерде, тақырыптардың өзгерістерін түзету үлгісіне (LDA) кейінгі дириклеттің алгоритмдерін жұмыс ішінде қолданып, жолдағы өзгерту нүктерін (CPD) анықтау алгоритмдерін қолданамыз. Біз байезиялық өзгерістер нүктесін анықтау алгоритмін LDA сызықтағы нақыштың өзгерістерін анықтау үшін қолданып тұрмыз. Жаңалық мақалаларының социалдық медиа деректері мен жаңалық мақалаларының кеңейтілген тәжірибелері LDA және стандартты LDA және онлайн өзгерту нүктелерін жол алгоритмдермен салыстырып көрсетеді. Бұл құжаттың көзінен маңызды өмірлерін табу үшін F- нөмірлерін 52% деп береді.', 'ml': 'സംഭവിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സംഭവത്തിന്റെ ഉള്ളില്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുന്നത് പൊതുസുരക്ഷിതത്തില്\u200d, പൊതുസാധാരണ സുരക്ഷിതം, സ്വാഭാ ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ലാറ്റെന്റ് ഡിറിച്ചില്ലെറ്റ് ആലോചിക്കേഷന്\u200d (LDA) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മാറ്റം സംഭവിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d മാത ലൈന്\u200d ലൈനില്\u200d നിന്നും LDA പുറത്തുള്ള മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ലൈന്\u200d ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d മാറ്റുന്ന സാമൂഹ്യ മാധ്യമങ്ങളുടെയും വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെയും വിവരങ്ങളുടെയും വിശേഷപരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ലൈന്\u200d ലൈനിലെ LDA സാധാരണ LDA-നെതിരായി ഉപകാരം കാണിക്കുന് This yields F-scores up to 52% on the detection of significant real-life changes from these document streams.', 'mk': 'Детектирањето на промени во текот на настанот кој се развива во реално време од вестите или социјалните медиуми овозможува брзо да реагира на сериозните прашања во јавната безбедност, јавното здравје или природните катастрофи. Во оваа студија, користиме онлајн алгоритми за поделба на Latent Dirichlet (LDA) за модел на смени во теми, и аплицираме онлајн детекција на точки на промена (CPD) за да откриеме кога ќе се случат значителни промени. We describe an on-line Bayesian change point detection algorithm that we use to detect topic changes from on-line LDA output.  Експериментите на социјалните медиуми и новинските статии покажуваат бенефиции од онлајн ЛДА во споредба со стандардниот ЛДА, и од онлајн детекција на точки на промена во споредба со онлајн алгоритмите. Ова предизвика F-оценки до 52 отсто за откривање значителни промени во реалниот живот од овие текови на документи.', 'ms': 'Mengesan perubahan dalam peristiwa yang berkembang dalam masa nyata dari artikel berita atau media sosial membolehkan untuk bereaksi dengan segera kepada isu-isu serius dalam keselamatan awam, kesehatan awam atau bencana alam. Dalam kajian ini, kami gunakan Allokasi Dirichlet Latin dalam talian (LDA) untuk mengubah model dalam topik, dan laksanakan algoritma pengesan titik perubahan dalam talian (CPD) untuk mengesan apabila perubahan yang signifikan berlaku. Kami menggambarkan algoritma pengesan titik perubahan Bayesian dalam talian yang kami gunakan untuk mengesan perubahan topik dari output LDA dalam talian. Eksperimen luas pada data media sosial dan artikel berita menunjukkan keuntungan LDA dalam talian melawan LDA piawai, dan pengesan titik perubahan dalam talian dibandingkan dengan algoritma luar talian. Ini memberikan skor-F sehingga 52% pada pengesan perubahan nyata yang signifikan dari aliran dokumen ini.', 'mt': "Is-sejba ta’ bidliet f’avveniment li qed jiżviluppa f’ħin reali minn artikoli tal-aħbarijiet jew midja soċjali tippermetti li tirreaġixxi minnufih għal kwistjonijiet serji fis-sikurezza pubblika, is-saħħa pubblika jew id-diżastri naturali. F’dan l-istudju, aħna nużaw Allokazzjoni ta’ Diriklet Latent onlajn (LDA) biex nimmudellaw bidliet f’suġġetti, u napplikaw algoritmi ta’ detezzjoni ta’ punti ta’ bidla onlajn (CPD) biex niżżlu meta jseħħu bidliet sinifikanti. Aħna niddeskrivu algoritmu ta' detezzjoni tal-punti ta' bidla Bayesian onlajn li aħna nużaw biex niddeskrivu bidliet tematiċi mill-output tal-LDA onlajn. Extensive experiments on social media data and news articles show the benefits of on-line LDA versus standard LDA, and of on-line change point detection compared to off-line algorithms.  Dan iwassal għal punteġġi F sa 52% fuq id-detezzjoni ta’ bidliet sinifikanti fil-ħajja reali minn dawn il-flussi ta’ dokumenti.", 'mn': 'Шинэ мэдээлэл, нийгмийн хэвлэлээс эсвэл нийгмийн хэвлэлээс өөрчлөлтийг бодит хугацаанд нээлттэй үйл явцын дотор олон нийгмийн аюулгүй байдал, нийгмийн эрүүл мэндийн эсвэл байгалийн гамшгуудын ту Энэ судалгаанд бид дараагийн Дириклетийн алгоритмыг (LDA) сурагчийн өөрчлөлт загварын хувьд ашиглаж, шулууны өөрчлөлт цэгүүдийг (CPD) олох алгоритмыг хэрэглэдэг. Бид Bayesian өөрчлөлтийн цэгийг олох алгоритмыг шулууны LDA шулууны гаралтаас өөрчлөлтийг олохын тулд ашигладаг. Нийгмийн мэдээллийн өгөгдлийн болон мэдээллийн баримтуудын маш олон туршилтууд LDA шулууны эсвэл стандарт LDA болон шулууны өөрчлөлтийн цэгүүдийн ашиг харуулж байна. Энэ нь эдгээр баримт урсгалын чухал жинхэнэ амьдралын өөрчлөлтийг олж мэдэхэд F-тоо 52%-аар нэмэгдүүлдэг.', 'ro': 'Detectarea schimbărilor în cadrul unui eveniment care se desfășoară în timp real din articole de știri sau social media permite reacționarea promptă la probleme grave legate de siguranța publică, sănătatea publică sau dezastrele naturale. În acest studiu, folosim on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) pentru a modela schimbările în subiecte și aplicăm algoritmi on-line de detectare a punctelor de schimbare (CPD) pentru a detecta atunci când se întâmplă schimbări semnificative. Descriem un algoritm on-line Bayesian de detectare a punctelor de schimbare pe care îl folosim pentru a detecta modificările subiectului de la ieșirea LDA on-line. Experimente ample pe datele rețelelor sociale și articole de știri arată beneficiile LDA on-line față de LDA standard și detectarea punctelor de schimbare on-line comparativ cu algoritmii off-line. Acest lucru generează scoruri F de până la 52% la detectarea modificărilor semnificative din viața reală din aceste fluxuri de documente.', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje promjena u stvarnom vremenu od novinskih članaka ili društvenih medija omogućava brzo reagirati na ozbiljne probleme u javnoj sigurnosti, javnom zdravlju ili prirodnim katastrofama. U ovom ispitivanju koristimo na liniji Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) za modele smjene u temama, i primjenjujemo algoritme za detekciju tačke promjene na liniji (CPD) da otkrijemo kada se dogodi značajne promjene. Opišemo algoritam detekcije tačke promjene Bayesijskog stanja na liniji koji koristimo da otkrijemo promjene teme iz izlaza LDA na liniji. Eksperimenti o podacima društvenih medija i novinskim člancima pokazuju koristi od on line LDA i standardnog LDA-a, i otkrivanje tačke promjene na internetu u usporedbi s off-line algoritmima. To daje F-rezultate do 52% otkrivanja značajnih promjena stvarnog života iz ovih struja dokumenta.', 'no': 'Oppdaging av endringar i eit utgående hending i verkeleg tid frå nytt-artikler eller sosiale media kan strauje reagere til seriøske problemar i offentlige trygge, offentlige helse eller naturkatastrof. I denne studien bruker vi på nettverket latent direktetilbygging (LDA) for å modellere forskyvingar i tema, og bruker algoritme for å finna forskyvingspunkt på nettverk (CPD) for å finna når signifikante endringar skjer. Vi skildrar ein algoritme for å finna endringar av emne frå LDA- utdata frå nettlese Bayesian- endringspunkt. Eksperimentar på sosiale media- data og nyhetsgiverke viser fordel av LDA på linje mot standard LDA og av oppdaging av punktet for endringar på linje samanlikna med off line algoritme. Dette gjev F- poeng opp til 52% ved oppdaging av signifikante verkeleg livstidsendringar frå disse dokumentstrømmene.', 'so': "Si dhaqso ah ugu jawaabi karo arimaha guud ee nabadgelyada dadweynaha, caafimaadka dadweynaha ama dhibaatooyinka dabiicadda ah. Waxbarashadan waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa wadanka Latent Dirichlet (LDA) si aan u sameyno isbedelka mada, waxaana ku codsanaynaa algorityada ku beddelasha shabakadda, si aan u ogaano marka ay dhacdo beddelmo muhiim ah. Waxaynu sawirannaa algorithm ku qoran baaritaanka beddelka ee Bayesian ee aan u isticmaalno si aan u ogaano isbedelka ka soo baxa shabakadda LDA. Imtixaano dheeraad ah oo ku saabsan macluumaadyada sooshalka iyo qoraalaha warbixinta ah waxay muujiyaan faa'iidada LDA ee shabakadda ah ka hor jeeda standardka LDA, iyo baaritaanka beddelashada shabakadda, iyadoo la barbarbarta qoraalka shabakadda ah. Taas waxay soo bixisaa qiimaha F-score ugu badnaan 52% oo ku saabsan aqoonsashada beddelaadka nolosha ee muhiimka ah ee durdurradan wargeyska.", 'sv': 'Att upptäcka förändringar i en pågående händelse i realtid från nyhetsartiklar eller sociala medier gör det möjligt att reagera snabbt på allvarliga frågor som rör allmän säkerhet, folkhälsa eller naturkatastrofer. I denna studie använder vi on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) för att modellera skift i ämnen, och tillämpar on-line change point detection (CPD) algoritmer för att upptäcka när betydande förändringar sker. Vi beskriver en Bayesian förändringspunktdetekteringsalgoritm som vi använder för att upptäcka ämnesförändringar från LDA-utgång online. Omfattande experiment på sociala medier data och nyhetsartiklar visar fördelarna med on-line LDA jämfört med standard LDA, och med on-line förändringspunktdetektering jämfört med off-line algoritmer. Detta ger F-poäng upp till 52% vid upptäckt av betydande verkliga förändringar från dessa dokumentflöden.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie zmian w obrębie rozwijającego się zdarzenia w czasie rzeczywistym z artykułów wiadomościowych lub mediów społecznościowych pozwala szybko reagować na poważne problemy związane z bezpieczeństwem publicznym, zdrowiem publicznym lub klęskami żywiołowymi. W niniejszym opracowaniu wykorzystujemy on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) do modelowania zmian w tematach i stosujemy algorytmy wykrywania punktów zmian on-line (CPD) w celu wykrywania istotnych zmian. Opisujemy on-line Bayesowski algorytm wykrywania punktów zmian, który używamy do wykrywania zmian tematycznych z wyjścia LDA on-line. Obszerne eksperymenty na danych mediów społecznościowych i artykułach wiadomościowych pokazują korzyści płynące z LDA on-line w porównaniu ze standardową LDA oraz z wykrywania punktów zmiany on-line w porównaniu z algorytmami offline. Daje to wyniki F do 52% na wykrycie istotnych rzeczywistych zmian w tych strumieniach dokumentów.', 'ta': 'செய்தி கட்டுரைகள் அல்லது சமூக ஊடகங்களில் இருந்து உண்மையான நிகழ்வில் உள்ள மாற்றங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் பொது பாதுகாப்பு,  இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் முக்கியமான மாற்றங்களை தலைப்புகளில் மாற்ற பயன்படுத்தி வரி மாற்றம் புள்ளியை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் போது கண்டுபிடிப்பு (CPD LDA வெளியீட்டிலிருந்து தலைப்பு மாற்றங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்க பயன்படுத்துகிறது என்று நாம் ஒரு கோட்டில் உள்ள மாற்று பேயி சமூக ஊடக தரவுகள் மற்றும் செய்தி கட்டுரைகளின் விரிவான பரிசோதனைகள் LDA வரிசையில் உள்ள LDA விருப்பங்களை காட்டுகிறது, மற்றும் இணைய மாற்று புள் இந்த ஆவண தொடர்களிலிருந்து முக்கியமான வாழ்க்கை மாற்றங்களை கண்டுபிடிக்கும் போது F- மதிப்பெண்கள் 52% வரை கொ', 'ur': 'اخباروں یا سوسیل میڈیاں کے معاملات کے ذریعے ایک کھولتا ہوا اتفاق میں تغییرات کی تلاش کرنا ضرورت دیتا ہے کہ اہل امنیت، عمومی سلامتی یا طبیعی مصیبت میں اہل مصیبت میں اہل مصیبت پر اہل مصیب اس تحقیقات میں، ہم ٹوپیٹوں میں موڈل شیفٹ کے لئے لیٹ ڈریچلٹ آلوکاٹ (LDA) کو لائن لین کے لئے استعمال کرتے ہیں، اور ان لائن تغییر پوینٹ (CPD) الگوریٹم کو لائق کریں کہ جب معتبر تغییر اتر جاتے ہیں پتچائیں۔ ہم ایک ایسی بیسین تغییر پوینٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ الگوریٹم کو روشن کرتے ہیں جس کا ہم استعمال کرتے ہیں موضوع تغییرات لین الڈا آئٹ سے لکھنے کے لئے۔ سوسیل میڈیا ڈیٹا اور نیویس لاکھوں پر اضافہ کی آزمائش ان لائن الڈا اور استاندارڈ الڈا کے فائدہ دکھاتی ہے اور ان لائن کی تغییر پوینٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ کی آزمائش ناف لائن الگوریتموں کے مقابلہ میں. یہ دکھانے کے سیاروں سے بہت اچھی حقیقی زندگی بدلوں کی تشخیص پر F-scores 52% تک اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'si': 'සමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් හෝ සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සාමාජික ආරක්ෂාව, සාමාජික ආරක්ෂ මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයේදී ප්\u200dරශ්නයේදී පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරශ්නය (LDA) ප්\u200dරශ්නයේදී පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයේදී වෙනස් වෙනුවෙ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න බේසියාන් වෙනස් පින්තුවක් හොයාගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් විස්තර කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා LDA පින්තු සමාජික මිඩියාව දත්ත සහ වාර්තාව පිළිබඳ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය පෙන්වන්න LDA වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය LDA වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය LDA ව මේක F- ස්කෝර් 52% වෙනුවෙන් මේ ලිපින් ස්ට්\u200dරිම් වලින් විශේෂ ජීවිත වෙනස් වෙනුව හොයාගන්න.', 'uz': "Bu vaqtda ko'rinadigan vaqtda o'zgarishlarni aniqlash, xavfsizlik, public health yoki tabiiy katakda juda katta muammolarni javob beradi. Bu taʼminotda, biz Lokal Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) mavzularga oʻzgarishlarni foydalanamiz va muhim oʻzgarishlarni koʻrsatish uchun tarmoq oʻzgarishni qoʻllamiz. We describe an on-line Bayesian change point detection algorithm that we use to detect topic changes from on-line LDA output.  Name Bu hujjatlar roʻyxatidagi juda muhim hayot oʻzgarishlarni aniqlash uchun F qiymatga 52% uzadi.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện thay đổi trong một sự kiện đang diễn ra trong thời gian thực sự từ các bài báo hay truyền thông xã hội cho phép hành động nhanh chóng đối phó với những vấn đề nghiêm trọng trong vấn đề an ninh, an ninh xã hội hay thảm họa tự nhiên. Trong nghiên cứu này, chúng tôi sử dụng thuật to án trực tuyến Latet DirIChlet Allocation (LDAP) để mô tả các thay đổi trong các chủ đề, và áp dụng thuật toán phát hiện điểm thay đổi (CPD) để phát hiện khi có thay đổi lớn xảy ra. Chúng tôi mô tả thuật to án phát hiện điểm thay đổi trên mạng tại khu vực Bayisian, chúng tôi sử dụng để phát hiện các biến đổi về chủ đề từ kết xuất LDAP on line. Những thí nghiệm đầy đủ về dữ liệu truyền thông xã hội và các bài báo cho thấy lợi ích của kdeA trên mạng so với LDAP chuẩn, và của phát hiện điểm biến đổi trên mạng so với thuật to án ngoài dòng. Nó sẽ cung cấp điểm F cho đến 22=)) khi phát hiện ra sự thay đổi đời thực lớn từ những dòng tài liệu này.', 'nl': 'Door veranderingen binnen een zich ontvouwende gebeurtenis in realtime te detecteren vanuit nieuwsberichten of sociale media, kan snel worden gereageerd op ernstige problemen op het gebied van openbare veiligheid, volksgezondheid of natuurrampen. In dit onderzoek gebruiken we online Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) om verschuivingen in onderwerpen te modelleren en passen we online change point detection (CPD) algoritmes toe om te detecteren wanneer significante veranderingen plaatsvinden. We beschrijven een online Bayesian change point detection algoritme dat we gebruiken om topic veranderingen van online LDA output te detecteren. Uitgebreide experimenten met social media data en nieuwsberichten laten de voordelen zien van online LDA ten opzichte van standaard LDA, en van online veranderpuntdetectie in vergelijking met offline algoritmen. Dit levert F-scores tot 52% op op de detectie van significante real-life veranderingen van deze documentstromen.', 'bg': 'Откриването на промени в рамките на разгръщащо се събитие в реално време от новинарски статии или социални медии позволява бърза реакция на сериозни проблеми в обществената безопасност, общественото здраве или природни бедствия. В това проучване използваме онлайн латентно разпределение на дириклета (ЛДА), за да моделираме промените в темите и прилагаме онлайн алгоритми за откриване на точката на промяна (КПД), за да откриваме, когато настъпят значителни промени. Описваме онлайн алгоритъм за откриване на точката на промяна, който използваме за откриване на промените в темата от изхода. Обширни експерименти с данни от социалните медии и новинарски статии показват ползите от онлайн ЛД спрямо стандартните ЛД, както и от онлайн откриването на точките на промяна в сравнение с офлайн алгоритмите. Това дава резултати до 52% при откриването на значителни промени в реалния живот от тези потоци документи.', 'da': 'Opdagelse af ændringer i en udfoldende begivenhed i realtid fra nyhedsartikler eller sociale medier gør det muligt at reagere hurtigt på alvorlige problemer i forbindelse med offentlig sikkerhed, folkesundhed eller naturkatastrofer. I denne undersøgelse bruger vi on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) til at modellere skift i emner, og anvender on-line change point detection (CPD) algoritmer til at registrere, når betydelige ændringer sker. Vi beskriver en on-line Bayesian ændringspunkt detekteringsalgoritme, som vi bruger til at registrere emneændringer fra on-line LDA output. Omfattende eksperimenter med data fra sociale medier og nyhedsartikler viser fordelene ved on-line LDA i forhold til standard LDA og ved on-line ændringspunkt detektion i forhold til off-line algoritmer. Dette giver F-scorer op til 52% ved detektering af betydelige ændringer i virkeligheden fra disse dokumentstrømme.', 'de': 'Das Erkennen von Veränderungen innerhalb eines sich entfaltenden Ereignisses in Echtzeit aus Nachrichtenartikeln oder sozialen Medien ermöglicht es, schnell auf schwerwiegende Probleme der öffentlichen Sicherheit, der öffentlichen Gesundheit oder Naturkatastrophen zu reagieren. In dieser Studie verwenden wir Online-Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA), um Verschiebungen in Themen zu modellieren und verwenden Online-Change Point Detection (CPD)-Algorithmen, um zu erkennen, wann signifikante Änderungen auftreten. Wir beschreiben einen Bayesischen Algorithmus zur Erkennung von Themenänderungen aus der Online-LDA-Ausgabe. Umfangreiche Experimente mit Social-Media-Daten und Nachrichtenartikeln zeigen die Vorteile von Online-LDA gegenüber Standard-LDA und von Online-Änderungspunkterkennung im Vergleich zu Offline-Algorithmen. Dies liefert F-Scores bis zu 52% bei der Erkennung signifikanter realer Veränderungen aus diesen Dokumentenströmen.', 'ko': '뉴스 기사나 소셜미디어를 통해 전개되고 있는 사건의 변화를 실시간으로 감지하면 공공안전, 공공위생 또는 자연재해의 심각한 문제에 신속하게 반응할 수 있다.본 연구에서는 온라인 잠재적 Dirichlet 할당(LDA)을 사용하여 주제의 변화를 모델링하고 온라인 변화점 감지(CPD) 알고리즘을 적용해 중대한 변화가 언제 발생하는지 감지한다.온라인 LDA 출력에서 주제 변화를 감지하는 데 사용되는 온라인 베일스 변화점 검출 알고리즘을 설명합니다.소셜 미디어 데이터와 뉴스 기사에 대한 대량의 실험은 온라인 LDA가 표준 LDA에 비해 온라인 변화점 검측이 오프라인 알고리즘에 대한 장점을 나타낸다.이 문서의 흐름에서 중대한 현실 변화가 발견되면 52%에 달하는 F 점수가 나온다.', 'id': 'Mengeteksi perubahan dalam peristiwa yang berkembang dalam waktu nyata dari artikel berita atau media sosial memungkinkan untuk bereaksi secepat mungkin pada masalah serius dalam keselamatan masyarakat, kesehatan masyarakat atau bencana alam. In this study, we use on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to model shifts in topics, and apply on-line change point detection (CPD) algorithms to detect when significant changes happen.  Kami menggambarkan algoritma deteksi titik perubahan Bayesian on line yang kami gunakan untuk mendeteksi perubahan topik dari output LDA online. Eksperimen ekstensif pada data media sosial dan artikel berita menunjukkan keuntungan LDA on line melawan LDA standar, dan deteksi titik perubahan online dibandingkan dengan algoritma off-line. Ini memberikan skor F sampai 52% pada deteksi perubahan signifikan kehidupan nyata dari aliran dokumen ini.', 'sw': 'Detecting changes within an unfolding event in real time from news articles or social media enables to react promptly to serious issues in public safety, public health or natural disasters.  Katika utafiti huu, tunatumia Umoja wa Dirichlet wa Kusini (LDA) ili kutengeneza mabadiliko katika mada, na kutengeneza vipengele vya mabadiliko kwenye mitandao (CPD) ili kutambua wakati mabadiliko makubwa yanapotokea. Tunaelezea algorithi ya mabadiliko ya Bayesia kwenye mtandao ambao tunatumia kugundua mabadiliko ya mada kutoka kwenye matokeo ya LDA. Majaribio mengi kwenye taarifa za mitandao ya kijamii na makala za habari zinaonyesha faida za LDA kwenye mtandao wa intaneti dhidi ya kiwango cha LDA, na uchunguzi wa mabadiliko ya mtandaoni ukilinganishwa na vipengele vya nje. Hii inaleta score za F hadi asilimia 52 juu ya kutambua mabadiliko makubwa ya maisha halisi kutoka kwenye mitandao haya ya nyaraka.', 'fa': 'تشخیص تغییرات در یک اتفاق پراکنده در زمان واقعی از مقاله های اخبار یا رسانه های اجتماعی ممکن است سریع به مسائل جدی در امنیت عمومی، سلامت عمومی یا فاجعه های طبیعی واکنش کند. در این مطالعه، ما از الگوریتم\u200cهای تغییر نقطه\u200cی تغییر (LDA) به عنوان مدل تغییر\u200cها در موضوع استفاده می\u200cکنیم، و کاربرد الگوریتم\u200cهای تغییر نقطه\u200cهای on line change (CPD) برای شناسایی زمانی که تغییر\u200cهای معنی اتفا ما یک الگوریتم شناسایی نقطه تغییر بیزیان را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که برای شناسایی تغییرات موضوع از نتیجه LDA روی خط استفاده می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش\u200cهای گسترده روی داده\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی و مقاله\u200cهای خبری سودهایی LDA در خط با LDA استاندارد و کشف نقطه تغییر خط در مقایسه با الگوریتم\u200cهای خارج خط نشان می\u200cدهند. این تغییرات واقعی از این رودخانه\u200cهای سند به ۲۵ درصد افزایش می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Täzelikler ýa sosial medýýatlaryň haýsy wagtda aýratyn üýtgewlerini gözlemek hem halk goragynda, halk saglygynda ýa-da tebigilerde gaty meselelere täsirleşer. Bu aramda, temalarda hat laryny gaýd etmek üçin ahyrlamak üçin Soňky Dirichlet Taýdalygyny (LDA) sözlerimizi ýüze ullanyrys we bellenen üýtgewler üçin line ň üýtgewleri (CPD) algoritmalaryny tapylýarys. Biz bu tema netijesinden LDA çizginden üýtgewleri aňlamak üçin baýezi düzümlerni aňlamak üçin ullanýarys. Sosyal medýat maglumaty we täzelikler barada örän köpräk deneyler LDA-yň on line we standart LDA-yň faydalaryny görkezýär, we offline algoritmalaryna görä ýüklenen çykyş noktalary tanyşdyrylýar. Bu senediň önümlerinde möhüm durmuşy üýtgedeniň tanamasynda F अंश 52 % artdyr.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje promjena u stvarnom trenutku u razvijanju događaja iz novinskih članaka ili društvenih medija omogućava brzo reagirati na ozbiljne probleme u javnoj sigurnosti, javnom zdravlju ili prirodnim katastrofama. U ovom ispitivanju koristimo na liniji Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) za modele smjene u temama, i primjenjujemo algoritme otkrivanja mjesta promjene na liniji (CPD) za otkrivanje kada se dogodi značajne promjene. Opišemo algoritam detekcije tačke promjene Bayesiana na liniji koji koristimo za otkrivanje promjena teme iz izlaza LDA na liniji. Eksperimenti o podacima društvenih medija i novinskim člancima pokazuju koristi od on line LDA protiv standardnog LDA-a i otkrivanja online promjene tačke u usporedbi s off-line algoritmima. To daje F-rezultate do 52% otkrivanja značajnih promjena stvarnog života iz ovih struja dokumenta.', 'sq': 'Gjetja e ndryshimeve brenda një ngjarje që zhvillohet në kohë reale nga artikujt e lajmeve apo media sociale lejon të reagojë menjëherë ndaj çështjeve serioze në sigurinë publike, shëndetin publik apo fatkeqësitë natyrore. Në këtë studim, ne përdorim alokimin e Dirikletës së Latent ë (LDA) në internet për të modeluar ndryshimet në temë dhe të aplikojmë algoritmet e detektimit të pikave të ndryshimeve në internet (CPD) për të zbuluar kur ndodhin ndryshime të rëndësishme. Ne përshkruajmë një algoritëm në linjë për zbulimin e pikave të ndryshimeve Bayesian që përdorim për të zbuluar ndryshimet tematike nga dalja në linjë LDA. Eksperimentet e zgjeruara në të dhënat e medias sociale dhe artikujt e lajmeve tregojnë përfitimet e LDA në linjë në krahasim me LDA standartin dhe të zbulimit të pikave të ndryshimit në linjë krahasuar me algoritmet e jashtme. This yields F-scores up to 52% on the detection of significant real-life changes from these document streams.', 'af': "Besluit veranderinge binne 'n ongevuldige gebeurtenis in reël tyd van nuusartikels of sosiale media kan dadelik reageer na ernstige probleme in openbare veiligheid, openbare gesondheid of natuurlike katastrofe. In hierdie studie gebruik ons op-lyn Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) na model skakels in onderwerpe, en toewend ons op-lyn verander punt beskrywing (CPD) algoritme om te beskry wanneer betekende veranderinge gebeur word. Ons beskryf 'n op-lyn Bayesian verander punt beskrywing algoritme wat ons gebruik om onderwerp veranderinge te beskry van op-lyn LDA uitset. Name Hierdie gee F- scores tot 52% op die opdekking van betekende reël- lewe veranderinge van hierdie dokumentstrome.", 'az': 'Haqq məktullarından və sosyal mediyalarından dəyişiklik keçirmək halkı təhlükəsizlik, cəmiyyət sağlığı və təbiətli fəlakətlərdə ciddi məsələlərə tələb edə bilər. Bu təcrübədə, məsələlərin dəyişiklikləri modellərə göndərmək üçün Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) səhifələrində istifadə edirik və möhkəm dəyişikliklərin başına gələndə tanıtmaq üçün səhifələrdə dəyişiklik nöqtələri (CPD) algoritmini istifadə edirik. Biz bayezi dəyişiklik nöqtəsini tanıma algoritmini təsdiqləyirik ki, LDA səhifələrindən istifadə edirik. Sosyal media məlumatlarında və xəbərlər məlumatlarında çox geniş təcrübələr LDA-nin və standart LDA-nin faydalarını göstərər, və səhifədə dəyişiklik nöqtəsi təşkil edilməsini çizgi algoritmlərlə qarşılaşdırır. Bu səhifələrin dəyişiklik dəyişikliklərinin keşfetməsində F-scores 52%-ini verir.', 'am': 'ከዜና ቃላት ወይም የማኅበራዊ አውታር ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ውጤቶችን በመስጠት፣ የህዝብ ጤና ወይም የባሕላዊ ጉዳይ ጉዳይ ላይ ፈጥኖ ለመመልስ ይችላል፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ውስጥ የLatent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) በመስመር ላይ የተለወጠውን ለውጦች እናደርጋለን፣ የደረጃ ለውጥ ነጥብ ማግኘት (CPD) መግለጫ ሲሆን ማግኘት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የባይስያ ለውጥ ነጥብ ማግኘት መግለጫ አሌጎርቲምን በመስመር ላይ ከLDA ውጤት የተለወጠውን ለመግለጽ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ዳታዎችን እና የዜና ቃላት ላይ የበረታች ፈተናዎች የLDA ድጋሜውን ከሚቃወም LDA ጥቅሞችን እና የመስመር ለውጥ ነጥቦችን ከመስመር ጋር ይታያል፡፡ ይህም የሰነዱ ፈሳሾች ከዚህች ሰነድ ፈሳሾች ውስጥ የታላቅ የሕይወት ለውጦችን ማግኘት የF-scores እስከ 52% ያቆማል።', 'hy': 'Իրական ժամանակում զարգացող իրադարձությունների ընթացքում փոփոխությունների հայտնաբերումը լրատվական հոդվածներից կամ սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցներից հնարավորություն է տալիս արագ արձագանքել հանրային անվտանգության, հանրային առողջության կամ բնական աղետների Այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում մենք օգտագործում ենք լայն դիրիկլետի (լայն դիրիկլետի) պատվիրատվությունը թեմաների մեջ տեղափոխությունների մոդելների համար, և կիրառում ենք առցանց փոփոխությունների կետի հայտնաբերման (CPD) ալգորիթմներ, որոնք հայտնաբերում են, թե երբ են տեղի ունենում նշանակ Մենք նկարագրում ենք Բեյզիայի առցանց փոփոխության կետի հայտնաբերման ալգորիթմ, որը մենք օգտագործում ենք տեսակի փոփոխությունների հայտնաբերման համար առցանց ԼԴԱ-ի արդյունքից: Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների և նորությունների մասին ընդլայնված փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս առցանց ԼԴԱ-ի առավելությունները, համեմատած ստանդարտ ԼԴԱ-ին, և առցանց փոփոխության կետի հայտնաբերման առավելությունները, համեմատած առցանց ալգորիթ Սա F-գնահատում է մինչև 52 տոկոսը այս փաստաթղթերի հոսքերից նշանակալի իրական կյանքի փոփոխությունների հայտնաբերման վրա:', 'bn': 'সংবাদ প্রবন্ধ অথবা সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের প্রতিক্রিয়া দ্রুত জনগণের নিরাপত্তা, জনস্বাস্থ্য বা প্রাকৃতিক বিপর্যয়ের প্রতিক্র এই গবেষণায় আমরা ল্যাটেন্ট ডিরিচেলেট অ্যালোগারেশন (এলডিএ) ব্যবহার করি বিষয়বস্তুতে পরিবর্তন মডেল করার জন্য এবং লাইন পরিবর্তনের বিন্দুর সনাক্ত করার (সিপিডিও) অ্ আমরা লাইনে বেয়েসিয়ান পরিবর্তনের বিন্দুর পরিবর্তনের অ্যালগরিদম বর্ণনা করি যে বিষয়টি লাইনের LDA আউটপুট থেকে পরিবর্তনের জন্য আমরা  সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের তথ্য এবং সংবাদ প্রবন্ধের বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করে লাইনে এলডিএ স্ট্যান্ডার্ড এলডিএ বিরুদ্ধে সুবিধা প্রদর এগুলো এই নথিপত্রের প্রস্রবণ থেকে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বাস্তব জীবন পরিবর্তন সনাক্ত করার জন্য এফ-স্কোর পর্যন্ত ৫২% পর্যন্', 'ca': "La detecció de canvis en temps real a partir d'articles de notícies o mitjans socials permet reaccionar ràpidament a problemes graves en la seguretat pública, la salut pública o els desastres naturals. En aquest estudi, utilitzem l'Allocació Latent Dirichlet (LDA) en línia per modelar canvis en temes, i aplicam algoritmes de detecció de punts de canvi en línia (CPD) per detectar quan succeeixen canvis significatius. Descrivem un algoritme de detecció de punts de canvi bayèsius en línia que utilitzem per detectar canvis de tema a partir de la producció de LDA en línia. Els extensos experiments en dades dels mitjans socials i articles de notícies mostran els beneficis de LDA on-line en comparació amb LDA standard, i de la detecció de punts de canvi on-line en comparació amb algoritmes off-line. Això dona puntuacions F fins al 52% en la detecció de canvis significatius en la vida real d'aquests fluxos de documentos.", 'bs': 'Otkrivanje promjena u stvarnom trenutku od novinskih članaka ili socijalnih medija omogućava brzo reagirati na ozbiljne probleme u javnoj sigurnosti, javnom zdravlju ili prirodnim katastrofama. U ovom ispitivanju koristimo na liniji Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) za modele smjena u temama, i primjenjujemo algoritme za detekciju bodova promjene na liniji (CPD) za otkrivanje kada se dogodi značajne promjene. Opišemo algoritam detekcije tačke promjene Bayesiana na liniji koji koristimo da otkrijemo promjene teme iz izlaza LDA na liniji. Eksperimenti o podacima društvenih medija i novinskim člancima pokazuju koristi od on line LDA protiv standardnog LDA-a i otkrivanja online promjene tačke u usporedbi s off-line algoritmima. To daje F-rezultate do 52% otkrivanja značajnih promjena stvarnog života iz ovih struja dokumenta.', 'et': 'Muutuste tuvastamine toimuval sündmusel reaalajas uudisteartiklitest või sotsiaalmeediast võimaldab kiiresti reageerida tõsistele avaliku ohutuse, rahvatervise või loodusõnnetuste probleemidele. Selles uuringus kasutame on-line latent dirichlet allocation (LDA) teemade nihkete modelleerimiseks ja on-line muutuspunktide tuvastamiseks (CPD) algoritme, et tuvastada olulisi muutusi. Kirjeldame bayesia muutuspunkti tuvastamise algoritmi, mida kasutame teemamuutuste tuvastamiseks on-line LDA väljundist. Laiaulatuslikud eksperimendid sotsiaalmeedia andmete ja uudisteartiklitega näitavad, kuidas on-line LDA võrreldes standardne LDA ja on-line muutuspunkti tuvastamine võrreldes off-line algoritmidega on-line LDA eelised. See annab F-skoori kuni 52% nende dokumentide voogude oluliste reaalsete muutuste tuvastamisel.', 'cs': 'Detekce změn v rámci rozvíjející se události v reálném čase ze zpravodajských článků nebo sociálních médií umožňuje okamžitě reagovat na závažné problémy v oblasti veřejné bezpečnosti, veřejného zdraví nebo přírodních katastrof. V této studii používáme on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) k modelování posunu v tématech a používáme on-line algoritmy detekce bodů změny (CPD) k detekci významných změn. Popisujeme on-line Bayesovský algoritmus detekce bodů změny, který používáme k detekci změn témat z on-line LDA výstupu. Rozsáhlé experimenty s daty sociálních médií a zpravodajskými články ukazují výhody on-line LDA oproti standardnímu LDA a on-line detekce bodů změny ve srovnání s offline algoritmy. To přináší F-skóre až 52% při detekci významných změn v reálném životě z těchto toků dokumentů.', 'fi': 'Tapahtuman muutosten havaitseminen reaaliajassa uutisartikkeleista tai sosiaalisesta mediasta mahdollistaa nopean reagoinnin vakaviin yleiseen turvallisuuteen, kansanterveyteen tai luonnonkatastrofeihin. Tässä tutkimuksessa käytetään on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) -algoritmeja aiheiden muutosten mallintamiseen ja on-line change point detection (CPD) -algoritmeja merkittävien muutosten havaitsemiseen. Kuvaamme bayesilaisen muutospisteen tunnistusalgoritmin, jonka avulla havaitsemme aihemuutoksia LDA-tuotoksesta. Laajat kokeilut sosiaalisen median datasta ja uutisartikkeleista osoittavat, että on-line LDA:n edut verrattuna standardiin LDA:hen ja on-line-muutospisteiden havaitsemiseen verrattuna off-line algoritmeihin. Tämä tuottaa F-pisteet jopa 52%, kun havaitaan merkittäviä tosielämän muutoksia näistä asiakirjavirroista.', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngubah urip sing nganggo perusahaan ning acara sing gak bakal dumadhan anyar tentang kanggo Artik sing perusahaan o media sotiki iki iso nggawe perusahaan sugutan kanggo kebebasan pangan ning ora keamanan ning ora keamanan ning salamat, sing paling dhuwur kaé katêwan Nyong-on line Algorithm Name Digawe iki bakal dumadhi F-dumateng sing sampeyan sampeyan sampeyan nang sampeyan perusahaan dumadhi sing nyimpen tur angel.', 'ha': "Ina gane musanyi a cikin wani birnin da ke cikin bayani da gaskiyar daga makala na lãbãri da mitandai da jamii, yana iya amfani da su karɓi musamman masu girma a cikin aminci, da afya ga umma ko wata masĩfa ta halinsa. Daga wannan lõkaci, Munã yi amfani da Allocation na Latin Dirikla (LDA) zuwa motsi masu shida cikin madaidaita, kuma munã shirya algoritori masu canza musamman point na ƙarƙashin linje (CPD) dõmin ka gane idan an sake musanya masu muhimmi. Munã bayyana algoritm na canza mai canza point na Bayesian a kan-line, wanda Muke amfani da shi dõmin mu gane canza za'a cikin duk LDA na ƙarƙashin-line. Cire masu ƙaranci a kan data na mitanda na jamii da sunayen lãbãri sun nuna amfani da LDA kan shirin-line versus na daidaita LDA, da kuma na canza musamman point a kan line sami da algoritori na-line. Wannan yana ƙara F-score up to 52% kan gane canza masu girma cikin masu halin rãyuwa daga wannan kõguna na takardar.", 'he': 'Detecting changes within an unfolding event in real time from news articles or social media enables to react promptly to serious issues in public safety, public health or natural disasters.  במחקר הזה, אנו משתמשים באלגוריתם לאנט דיריקלט (Latent Dirichlet Allocation, LDA) על מנת לשנות מודל בנושאים, ולהשתמש באלגוריתם של זיהוי נקודת שינוי באינטרנט (CPD) כדי לגלות מתי שינויים משמעותיים קורים. אנחנו מתארים אלגוריתם באייזי של זיהוי נקודת שינוי באינטרנט שאנחנו משתמשים כדי לזהות שינויים נושאיים מהיציאה LDA באינטרנט. ניסויים רחבים על נתוני התקשורת החברתית ומאמרי חדשות מראים את היתרונות של LDA באינטרנט נגד LDA סטנדרטי, ולגילוי נקודת שינוי באינטרנט בהשוואה לאלגוריתמים מחוץ לאינטרנט. זה נותן נקודות F עד 52% על גילוי שינויים משמעותיים בחיים אמיתיים מהזרמים המסמכים האלה.', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje sprememb znotraj dogodka v realnem času iz novinarskih člankov ali družbenih medijev omogoča hitro odzivanje na resna vprašanja javne varnosti, javnega zdravja ali naravne nesreče. V tej študiji uporabljamo on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) za modeliranje premikov v temah in uporabljamo on-line algoritme za zaznavanje točk sprememb (CPD) za zaznavanje pomembnih sprememb. Opisujemo bayesijski algoritem za zaznavanje sprememb, ki ga uporabljamo za zaznavanje tematskih sprememb iz spletnega LDA izhoda. Obsežni eksperimenti s podatki o družbenih omrežjih in novicami kažejo prednosti spletnega LDA v primerjavi s standardnim LDA in spletnega zaznavanja točk sprememb v primerjavi z off-line algoritmi. To prinaša F-rezultate do 52% pri zaznavanju pomembnih sprememb v realnem življenju teh tokov dokumentov.', 'bo': 'གསར་འགོད་ཐོག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལས་འགྱུར་བ་ཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་འགྱུར་བ་རྟོགས་པ་དེ་ནི་ In this study, we use on-line Latent Dirichlet Allocation (LDA) to model shifts in topics, and apply on-line change point detection (CPD) algorithms to detect when significant changes happen. We describe an on-line Bayesian change point detection algorithm that we use to detect topic changes from on-line LDA output. Extensive experiments on social media data and news articles show the benefits of on-line LDA versus standard LDA, and of on-line change point detection compared to off-line algorithms. འདིས་ཡིག་ཆ་འདི་འགྲུལ་བཞུད་པའི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་རྟོགས་བཤེར་དང་ཐོག་ལས་F་ཨང་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་52%'}
{'en': 'Automatically Creating a Lexicon of Verbal Polarity Shifters : Mono- and Cross-lingual Methods for German', 'ar': 'إنشاء معجم محولات القطبية اللفظية تلقائيًا: طرق أحادية ومتعددة اللغات للغة الألمانية', 'fr': "Création automatique d'un lexique de décaleurs de polarité verbale\xa0: méthodes mono et multilingues pour l'allemand", 'es': 'Creación automática de un léxico de cambiadores de polaridad verbal: métodos monolingües y multilingües para el alemán', 'pt': 'Criando Automaticamente um Léxico de Deslocadores de Polaridade Verbal: Métodos Mono e Cross-lingual para Alemão', 'ja': '言葉の極性シフターの辞書を自動的に作成する：ドイツ語のための単語とクロスリンガルの方法', 'zh': '自创动词极性移器词典:德语之单语、跨语之法', 'hi': 'स्वचालित रूप से मौखिक ध्रुवीयता शिफ्टर्स का एक शब्दकोश बनाना: जर्मन के लिए मोनो- और क्रॉस-लिंगुअल तरीके', 'ru': 'Автоматическое создание лексикона оборотней вербальной полярности: моно- и кросс-лингвистические методы для немецкого языка', 'ga': 'Foclóir Aistrithe Polainneachta Briathartha a Chruthú go hUathoibríoch: Modhanna Mona- agus Trasteangacha don Ghearmáinis', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Αυτόματη δημιουργία λεξικού λεκτικών μεταβολών πολικότητας: μονογλωσσικές και διαγώνιες μέθοδοι για τα γερμανικά', 'hu': 'A szóbeli polaritás-váltók Lexikonjának automatikus létrehozása: egy- és többnyelvű módszerek németül', 'it': 'Creazione automatica di un lessico di commutatori di polarità verbale: metodi mono e cross-lingual per il tedesco', 'lt': 'Automatiškai sukurti žodinio poliariškumo perjungiklių leksikoną: vienkalbiai ir tarpkalbiai vokiečių kalbos metodai', 'kk': 'Автоматты түрде Вербал Польшалық Шифтерлердің лексикалығын құру: Неміс үшін моно- және көптеген тілдер әдістері', 'mk': 'Автоматски создавање на лексикона на променувачи на вербална поларитет: монојазични и крстојазични методи за германски', 'ms': 'Automatically Creating a Lexicon of Verbal Polarity Shifters: Mono- and Cross-lingual Methods for German', 'mt': 'Il-ħolqien awtomatiku ta’ Lexicon of Verbal Polarity Shifters: Mono- and Cross-lingual Methods for German', 'ml': 'വെര്\u200dബല്\u200d പോളരിറ്റി ഷിഫ്റ്റര്\u200dസുകളുടെ ലെക്സിക്കന്\u200d സ്വയം സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു: ജെര്\u200dമ്മനിനുള്ള മോണോ- ക്രോസ്- ലിങ', 'no': 'Automatisk oppretting av ein leksjon av verbelpolaritetsskifter: Mono- og krysspråk- metodar for tysk', 'pl': 'Automatyczne tworzenie leksykonu słownych zmienników polarności: metody mono- i cross-języczne dla niemieckiego', 'sr': 'Automatski kreiranje leksije verbalnih poljoprivrednika: Mono- i krstojezičkih metoda za njemačke', 'mn': 'Автоматик Хэрэглээний Хэрэглээний Лексийг Автоматик бүтээх: Германы Моно-болон Хэрэглээний Хэрэглээний Загвар', 'so': 'Automatically Creating a Lexicon of Verbal Polarity Shifters: Mono- and Cross-language Methods for German', 'ta': 'Name', 'ro': 'Crearea automată a unui Lexicon de schimbătoare de polaritate verbală: metode mono- și cross-lingve pentru germană', 'sv': 'Skapa automatiskt en Lexikon av verbala polaritetsskiftare: Mono- och tvärspråkiga metoder för tyska', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tự động tạo ra ngôn ngữ ngôn ngữ của các nhân vật Verbi Polarity Shifu: Mono- và Cross-lingal Methods for German', 'da': 'Automatisk oprettelse af en Lexikon af Verbal Polarity Shifters: Mono- og tværsprogede metoder til tysk', 'nl': 'Automatisch een woordenboek maken van verbale polariteitsverschuivers: Mono- en Cross-lingual methodes voor Duits', 'id': 'Membuat secara otomatis sebuah Lexicon dari Pemindah Polaritas Berkata: Metode Mono- dan Cross-bahasa untuk Jerman', 'hr': 'Automatično stvorenje leksičkog poljoprivrednika Verbalne poljoprivrednosti: Mono- i krstojezičke metode za njemačke', 'bg': 'Автоматично създаване на лексикон на устните изместващи полярността: моно- и междуезични методи за немски език', 'fa': 'توسط خودکار ساختن Lexicon of Verbal Polarity Shifters: Mono- and Cross-lingual Methods for German', 'tr': 'Automatically Creating a Lexicon of Verbal Polarity Shifters: Mono- and Cross-lingual Methods for German', 'sw': 'Kuanzisha Lexico kwa kujitegemea mabadiliko ya Ufilipino wa Kimataifa: njia za Mono-and-Cross-language kwa ajili ya Ujerumani', 'de': 'Automatisches Erstellen eines Lexikons verbaler Polarit瓣tsverschiebungen: Ein- und Cross-linguale Methoden f羹r Deutsch', 'sq': 'Krijimi automatik i një leksikoni të ndryshuesve të poliaritetit verbal: Metoda mono- dhe ndërgjuhësore për gjermanisht', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Avtomatik olaraq Vərbal Polyarlıq Gedişçilərinin Lexicon yaratması: Almanca üçün Mono- və Xərcli Dil Metodoları', 'ko': '언어 극성 전이어 사전 자동 만들기: 독일어의 단일 언어와 다중 언어 방법', 'bs': 'Automatično stvorenje leksičkog poljoprivrednika Verbalne poljoprivrednosti: monojezičke metode za njemačke', 'af': 'Name', 'cs': 'Automatické vytváření Lexikonu slovních změn polarity: mono- a cross-jazyčné metody pro němčinu', 'et': 'Sõnalise polaarsuse vahetajate leksikoni automaatne loomine: saksa keele ühe- ja keeleülesed meetodid', 'fi': 'Sanallisten polaarisuusmuuttajien sanaston automaattinen luominen: saksan kielen mono- ja monikieliset menetelmät', 'hy': 'Գերմանիայի համար միալեզվային և խաչլեզվային մեթոդներ', 'bn': 'ভার্বাল পোলারিটি শিফটার্সের একটি লেক্সিকোন স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তৈরি করা হচ্ছে: জার্মানের জন্য মোনো- আর ক্রস-ভাষার', 'ca': 'Crear automàticament un Lexicon of Verbal Polarity Shifters: Mono- and Cross-lingual Methods for German', 'he': 'יצירת אוטומטית לקסיקון של משמרות פוליריות מילותיות: שיטות מונו- וצלב- שפתיים לגרמניות', 'jv': 'Automatically Creating a Leksion of Verbal polarity Shift fters: Mono- and Kr-language Methods for German', 'sk': 'Samodejno ustvarjanje leksikona besednih spreminjalcev polarnosti: enojezične in medjezične metode za nemščino', 'bo': 'Automatically Creating a Lexicon of Verbal Polarity Shifters: Mono- and Cross-lingual Methods for German', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'In this paper we use methods for creating a large lexicon of verbal polarity shifters and apply them to German. Polarity shifters are content words that can move the polarity of a phrase towards its opposite, such as the verb abandon in abandon all hope. This is similar to how negation words like not can influence polarity. Both shifters and negation are required for high precision sentiment analysis. Lists of negation words are available for many languages, but the only language for which a sizable lexicon of verbal polarity shifters exists is English. This lexicon was created by bootstrapping a sample of annotated verbs with a supervised classifier that uses a set of data- and resource-driven features. We reproduce and adapt this approach to create a German lexicon of verbal polarity shifters. Thereby, we confirm that the approach works for multiple languages. We further improve classification by leveraging cross-lingual information from the English shifter lexicon. Using this improved approach, we bootstrap a large number of German verbal polarity shifters, reducing the annotation effort drastically. The resulting German lexicon of verbal polarity shifters is made publicly available.', 'es': 'En este artículo utilizamos métodos para crear un gran léxico de cambiadores de polaridad verbal y los aplicamos al alemán. Los cambiadores de polaridad son palabras de contenido que pueden mover la polaridad de una frase hacia su contraria, como el verbo «abandonar» en «abandonar toda esperanza». Esto es similar a cómo las palabras de negación como «no» pueden influir en la polaridad. Tanto los cambiadores como la negación son necesarios para un análisis de sentimiento de alta precisión. Hay listas de palabras de negación disponibles para muchos idiomas, pero el único idioma para el que existe un léxico considerable de cambiadores de polaridad verbal es el inglés. Este léxico se creó iniciando una muestra de verbos anotados con un clasificador supervisado que utiliza un conjunto de funciones basadas en datos y recursos. Reproducimos y adaptamos este enfoque para crear un léxico alemán de cambiadores de polaridad verbal. Por lo tanto, confirmamos que el enfoque funciona para varios idiomas. Mejoramos aún más la clasificación al aprovechar la información multilingüe del léxico cambiante del inglés. Con este enfoque mejorado, iniciamos un gran número de cambiadores de polaridad verbal en alemán, reduciendo drásticamente el esfuerzo de anotación. El léxico alemán resultante de los cambiadores de polaridad verbal se pone a disposición del público.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نستخدم طرقًا لإنشاء معجم كبير لمحولات القطبية اللفظية وتطبيقها على اللغة الألمانية. محولات القطبية هي كلمات مضمون يمكنها تحريك قطبية العبارة نحو نقيضها ، مثل فعل "التخلي" في "التخلي عن كل أمل". هذا مشابه لكيفية تأثير كلمات النفي مثل "لا" على القطبية. كل من المحولات والنفي مطلوبان لتحليل المشاعر بدقة عالية. تتوفر قوائم كلمات النفي للعديد من اللغات ، ولكن اللغة الوحيدة التي يوجد لها معجم كبير لمحولات القطبية اللفظية هي اللغة الإنجليزية. تم إنشاء هذا المعجم عن طريق تمهيد عينة من الأفعال المشروحة بمصنف خاضع للإشراف يستخدم مجموعة من الميزات المعتمدة على البيانات والموارد. نقوم بإعادة إنتاج هذا النهج وتكييفه لإنشاء معجم ألماني لمغيرات القطبية اللفظية. وبالتالي ، فإننا نؤكد أن النهج يعمل مع لغات متعددة. نقوم بتحسين التصنيف بشكل أكبر من خلال الاستفادة من المعلومات عبر اللغات من قاموس ناقل الحركة باللغة الإنجليزية. باستخدام هذا النهج المحسّن ، قمنا بتمهيد عدد كبير من محولات القطبية اللفظية الألمانية ، مما قلل من جهد التعليقات التوضيحية بشكل كبير. أصبح المعجم الألماني الناتج عن محولات القطبية اللفظية متاحًا للجمهور.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, usamos métodos para criar um grande léxico de trocadores de polaridade verbal e os aplicamos ao alemão. Deslocadores de polaridade são palavras de conteúdo que podem mover a polaridade de uma frase em direção ao seu oposto, como o verbo “abandonar” em “abandonar toda esperança”. Isso é semelhante a como palavras de negação como “não” podem influenciar a polaridade. Ambos os shifters e negação são necessários para análise de sentimento de alta precisão. Listas de palavras de negação estão disponíveis para muitos idiomas, mas o único idioma para o qual existe um léxico considerável de trocadores de polaridade verbal é o inglês. Esse léxico foi criado ao inicializar uma amostra de verbos anotados com um classificador supervisionado que usa um conjunto de recursos orientados a dados e recursos. Reproduzimos e adaptamos essa abordagem para criar um léxico alemão de trocadores de polaridade verbal. Assim, confirmamos que a abordagem funciona para vários idiomas. Melhoramos ainda mais a classificação aproveitando as informações em vários idiomas do léxico do shifter em inglês. Usando essa abordagem aprimorada, inicializamos um grande número de shifters de polaridade verbal alemães, reduzindo drasticamente o esforço de anotação. O léxico alemão resultante de shifters de polaridade verbal é disponibilizado publicamente.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous utilisons des méthodes pour créer un large lexique de décaleurs de polarité verbale et les appliquer à l'allemand. Les décaleurs de polarité sont des mots de contenu qui peuvent déplacer la polarité d'une phrase vers son opposé, comme le verbe «\xa0abandonner\xa0» dans «\xa0abandonner tout espoir\xa0». Cela est similaire à la façon dont les mots de négation tels que «\xa0non\xa0» peuvent influencer la polarité. Les décalages et la négation sont nécessaires pour une analyse de sentiment de haute précision. Des listes de mots de négation sont disponibles pour de nombreuses langues, mais la seule langue pour laquelle il existe un lexique important de décaleurs de polarité verbale est l'anglais. Ce lexique a été créé en démarrant un échantillon de verbes annotés avec un classificateur supervisé qui utilise un ensemble de fonctionnalités pilotées par les données et les ressources. Nous reproduisons et adaptons cette approche pour créer un lexique allemand des décaleurs de polarité verbaux. Nous confirmons ainsi que l'approche fonctionne pour plusieurs langues. Nous améliorons encore la classification en tirant parti des informations multilingues issues du lexique anglais des décaleurs de vitesses. Grâce à cette approche améliorée, nous amorçons un grand nombre de décaleurs de polarité verbaux allemands, réduisant ainsi considérablement l'effort d'annotation. Le lexique allemand des décaleurs de polarité verbaux qui en résulte est rendu public.", 'zh': '于本文中,用法创立一大动词极性移器词典,而施于德语。 极性移器者,理也,可以反短语极性,如"舍所欲"动词"弃之"。 此类于"不"者否定词何以加极性。 高精度情析须移器否。 否定词列表可施于众言,而唯一存动词极性移器词典其语英语。 此词典因用数、资源驱动之监分器引注谓词示例而创之也。 重调此法,以创一德语词汇之动词极性移器。 故宜用多种语言。 因英语移器词典中跨语更进分类。 用此改进之法,多引德语动词极性移器,大大减少注事。 由此生动词极性移器者德语词典明矣。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम मौखिक ध्रुवीयता शिफ्टर्स का एक बड़ा शब्दकोश बनाने के लिए तरीकों का उपयोग करते हैं और उन्हें जर्मन पर लागू करते हैं। Polarity shifters सामग्री शब्द हैं जो एक वाक्यांश की ध्रुवीयता को इसके विपरीत की ओर ले जा सकते हैं, जैसे कि क्रिया "सभी आशाओं को छोड़ दें" में "परित्याग"। यह "नहीं" जैसे नकारात्मक शब्द ध्रुवीयता को कैसे प्रभावित कर सकते हैं, इसके समान है। उच्च परिशुद्धता भावना विश्लेषण के लिए शिफ्टर्स और नकार दोनों की आवश्यकता होती है। नकार शब्दों की सूचियां कई भाषाओं के लिए उपलब्ध हैं, लेकिन एकमात्र भाषा जिसके लिए मौखिक ध्रुवीयता शिफ्टर्स का एक बड़ा शब्दकोश मौजूद है, वह अंग्रेजी है। यह शब्दकोश एक पर्यवेक्षित क्लासिफायर के साथ एनोटेट क्रियाओं के एक नमूने को बूटस्ट्रैप करके बनाया गया था जो डेटा- और संसाधन-संचालित सुविधाओं के एक सेट का उपयोग करता है। हम इस दृष्टिकोण को पुन: पेश करते हैं और मौखिक ध्रुवीयता शिफ्टर्स के जर्मन शब्दकोश बनाने के लिए अनुकूलित करते हैं। इस प्रकार, हम पुष्टि करते हैं कि दृष्टिकोण कई भाषाओं के लिए काम करता है। हम अंग्रेजी शिफ्टर शब्दकोश से क्रॉस-लिंगुअल जानकारी का लाभ उठाकर वर्गीकरण में और सुधार करते हैं। इस बेहतर दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करते हुए, हम बड़ी संख्या में जर्मन मौखिक ध्रुवीयता शिफ्टर्स को बूटस्ट्रैप करते हैं, जिससे एनोटेशन प्रयास काफी कम हो जाता है। मौखिक ध्रुवीयता शिफ्टर्स के परिणामी जर्मन शब्दकोश को सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कराया जाता है।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы используем методы для создания большого лексикона оборотней словесной полярности и применяем их к немецкому языку. Перевертыши полярности - это содержательные слова, которые могут сдвинуть полярность фразы к ее противоположности, такие как глагол «отказаться» в «отказаться от всякой надежды». Это похоже на то, как слова отрицания, такие как «не», могут влиять на полярность. Для высокоточного анализа настроений требуются как переключатели, так и отрицание. Списки отрицательных слов доступны для многих языков, но единственным языком, для которого существует значительный лексикон оборотней словесной полярности, является английский. Этот лексикон был создан путем загрузки выборки аннотированных глаголов с контролируемым классификатором, который использует набор функций, основанных на данных и ресурсах. Мы воспроизводим и адаптируем этот подход, чтобы создать немецкий лексикон оборотней словесной полярности. Таким образом, мы подтверждаем, что подход работает для нескольких языков. Мы продолжаем совершенствовать классификацию, используя кросс-лингвистическую информацию из английского лексикона оборотней. Используя этот улучшенный подход, мы загружаем большое количество немецких вербальных переключателей полярности, резко уменьшая усилия аннотации. Полученный в результате немецкий лексикон оборотней вербальной полярности становится общедоступным.', 'ja': '本稿では、言語極性シフターの大規模な辞書を作成し、ドイツ語に適用する方法を用いる。 極性シフターは、「すべての希望を捨てる」の動詞「捨てる」のように、フレーズの極性をその反対方向に移動させることができるコンテンツワードです。 これは、“not”のような否定の単語が極性にどのように影響を与えるかに似ています。 高精度のセンチメント分析には、シフターとネガティブの両方が必要です。 否定の単語のリストは多くの言語で利用可能ですが、言語極性シフターの大きな語彙が存在する唯一の言語は英語です。 この辞書は、注釈付き動詞のサンプルをブートストラップして作成されたもので、データとリソース駆動の機能のセットを使用する監視された分類子を備えています。 私たちはこのアプローチを再現して適応させ、言葉の極性シフターのドイツ語辞典を作成します。 これにより、このアプローチが複数の言語で機能することを確認します。 英語のシフター辞書からのクロスリンガル情報を活用して、さらに分類を改善しました。 この改善されたアプローチを使用して、私たちは多数のドイツ語の言葉による極性シフターをブートストラップし、アノテーションの労力を大幅に削減します。 その結果生まれた言語極性シフトのドイツ語辞典は一般に公開されている。', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo bainimid úsáid as modhanna chun foclóir mór de ghluaiseoirí polaraíochta briathartha a chruthú agus cuirimid i bhfeidhm ar an nGearmáinis iad. Is focail ábharacha iad trasfhoirmeoirí Polarachta ar féidir leo polaraíocht frása a bhogadh i dtreo a mhalairt, mar an briathar “tréigean” in “tréigean gach dóchas”. Tá sé seo cosúil leis an gcaoi a dtig le focail diúltacha mar “ní” tionchar a imirt ar pholaracht. Teastaíonn aistrithe agus diúltú araon le haghaidh anailíse meoin ardchruinneas. Tá liostaí de na focail shéanta ar fáil do go leor teangacha, ach is é an Béarla an t-aon teanga amháin a bhfuil foclóir suntasach de aistrithe polaraíocht briathartha ann. Cruthaíodh an foclóir seo trí bootstrapping a dhéanamh ar shampla de bhriathar anótáilte le haicmitheoir maoirsithe a úsáideann sraith de ghnéithe sonraí- agus acmhainní-tiomáinte. Déanaimid an cur chuige seo a atáirgeadh agus a oiriúnú chun foclóir Gearmánach d'aistritheoirí polaraíocht briathartha a chruthú. Mar sin, deimhnímid go n-oibríonn an cur chuige le haghaidh teangacha iolracha. Déanaimid tuilleadh feabhais ar an rangú trí fhaisnéis thrastheangach a ghiaráil ón bhfoclóir aistrithe Béarla. Ag baint úsáide as an gcur chuige feabhsaithe seo, déanaimid brú ar líon mór aistrithe polaraíocht bhriathartha Gearmánach, rud a laghdóidh go mór an iarracht nótaí. Cuirtear foclóir Gearmánach na n-aistrithe polaraíocht briathartha ar fáil go poiblí dá bharr.", 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban módszereket alkalmazunk a verbális polaritás-váltók nagy lexikonjának létrehozására és alkalmazására németül. A polaritás-váltók olyan elégedett szavak, amelyek egy kifejezés polaritását az ellentéte felé mozgathatják, mint például az "elhagyás" igét "minden remény elhagyása". Ez hasonlít ahhoz, hogy az olyan negatív szavak, mint a "nem", befolyásolhatják a polaritást. A nagy pontosságú érzelmek elemzéséhez mind a váltók, mind a negatív elváltók szükségesek. A negatív szavak listája számos nyelven elérhető, de az egyetlen nyelv, ahol a verbális polaritásváltók jelentős szókincse létezik, az angol. Ezt a lexikont úgy hozták létre, hogy a jegyzetelt igék mintáját egy felügyelt osztályozóval indították létre, amely adat- és erőforrás-vezérelt funkciókat használ. Ezt a megközelítést reprodukáljuk és adaptáljuk, hogy létrehozzuk a verbális polaritásváltók német lexikonját. Ezáltal megerősítjük, hogy a megközelítés több nyelven működik. Tovább javítjuk az osztályozást az angol váltó lexikonból származó többnyelvű információk felhasználásával. Ezzel a továbbfejlesztett megközelítéssel nagyszámú német verbális polaritásváltót indítunk be, ami drasztikusan csökkenti a jegyzetelési erőfeszítést. A verbális polaritás-váltók német lexikonja nyilvánosan hozzáférhetővé válik.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία χρησιμοποιούμε μεθόδους για τη δημιουργία ενός μεγάλου λεξικού λεκτικών μεταβολέων πολικότητας και τις εφαρμόζουμε στα γερμανικά. Οι αλλαγές πολικότητας είναι λέξεις περιεχομένου που μπορούν να κινήσουν την πολικότητα μιας φράσης προς το αντίθετο της, όπως το ρήμα "εγκατέλειψε" στο "εγκατέλειψε κάθε ελπίδα". Αυτό είναι παρόμοιο με το πώς οι λέξεις άρνησης όπως το "όχι" μπορούν να επηρεάσουν την πολικότητα. Για την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων υψηλής ακρίβειας απαιτούνται και οι αλλαγές και η άρνηση. Οι λίστες λέξεων άρνησης είναι διαθέσιμες για πολλές γλώσσες, αλλά η μόνη γλώσσα για την οποία υπάρχει ένα σημαντικό λεξικό λεκτικών μεταβολών πολικότητας είναι τα αγγλικά. Αυτό το λεξικό δημιουργήθηκε με την εκκίνηση ενός δείγματος σχολιασμένων ρήμων με έναν εποπτευμένο ταξινομητή που χρησιμοποιεί ένα σύνολο χαρακτηριστικών που βασίζονται σε δεδομένα και πόρους. Αναπαράγουμε και προσαρμόζουμε αυτή την προσέγγιση για να δημιουργήσουμε ένα γερμανικό λεξικό λεκτικών μεταβολών πολικότητας. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο επιβεβαιώνουμε ότι η προσέγγιση λειτουργεί για πολλές γλώσσες. Βελτιώνουμε περαιτέρω την ταξινόμηση αξιοποιώντας τις γλωσσικές πληροφορίες από το αγγλικό λεξικό αλλαγής. Χρησιμοποιώντας αυτή τη βελτιωμένη προσέγγιση, ενεργοποιούμε έναν μεγάλο αριθμό γερμανικών λεκτικών αλλαγών πολικότητας, μειώνοντας δραστικά την προσπάθεια σχολιασμού. Το προκύπτον γερμανικό λεξικό των λεκτικών μεταβολέων πολικότητας καθίσταται διαθέσιμο στο κοινό.', 'ka': "ჩვენ ამ დოგომაში გამოყენებთ მეტებები, რომლებიც გვერბალური პოლარიტის შეცვლელების დიდი ლექსიკონის შექმნა და გერმანეთისთვის გამოყენებთ. პოლიციის შეცვლელები შესახებ სიტყვები, რომელიც შეუძლია ფრაზის პოლიციალურობას გადატანა, როგორც ვერბი 'გადატოვება' ყველა მედიანობაში. ეს იგივეა, როგორ 'არა' შეუძლია მოვლენოთ პოლარიტი. ორივე შეცვლელები და ნეგიაცია უნდა იყოს მარტივი სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციისთვის. ნედაციის სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვები ძალიან ბევრი ენათებისთვის, მაგრამ ერთადერთი ენათი, რომელიც გვერბალური პოლარიტიის შეცვლელების სიტყვების ზომა ლე ამ ლექსიკონის შექმნა მონაცემების მონაცემების გამოყენებით, რომელიც მონაცემებული კლასიფიკაცია გამოყენებს მონაცემების და რესურსების მონაცემების ნაცემებით. ჩვენ ეს პროგრამის გადავიწყებთ და აეპორტირებით გერმანული ლექსიკონის გერბალური პოლარიტის შეცვლელების შექმნა. ამიტომ, ჩვენ დარწმუნებით, რომ პროგრამა მრავალ ენებისთვის მუშაობს. ჩვენ უფრო მეტი კლასიფიკაციაციას უფრო მეტად უფრო მეტად კლასიფიკაციაციას ინფორმაციას ინგლისური გადატანა ლექსიკონიდან. ამ უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტად გამოყენება, ჩვენ გერმანეთის გერბალური პოლარიტის შეცვლელების დიდი რაოდენობას გადავწყენებთ, რომლებიც აღწერების ძალ შემდეგ გერმანული ლექსიკონი გერბალური პოლარიტის შეცვლელების გარეშე ადამიანურად გახსნა.", 'it': 'In questo articolo utilizziamo metodi per creare un ampio lessico di variatori di polarità verbali e applicarli al tedesco. I cambiamenti di polarità sono parole contente che possono spostare la polarità di una frase verso il suo opposto, come il verbo \'abbandonare\' in \'abbandonare ogni speranza\'. Questo è simile a come parole di negazione come "non" possono influenzare la polarità. Sia i cambi che la negazione sono necessari per l\'analisi del sentiment di alta precisione. Elenchi di parole di negazione sono disponibili per molte lingue, ma l\'unica lingua per la quale esiste un lessico considerevole di variazioni di polarità verbale è l\'inglese. Questo lessico è stato creato avviando un campione di verbi annotati con un classificatore supervisionato che utilizza un insieme di funzioni basate su dati e risorse. Riproduciamo e adattiamo questo approccio per creare un lessico tedesco dei cambi di polarità verbali. In tal modo, confermiamo che l\'approccio funziona per più lingue. Miglioriamo ulteriormente la classificazione sfruttando le informazioni cross-lingual dal lessico inglese del cambio. Utilizzando questo approccio migliorato, abbiamo avviato un gran numero di variatori di polarità verbali tedeschi, riducendo drasticamente lo sforzo di annotazione. Il lessico tedesco risultante dei cambi di polarità verbali è reso pubblico.', 'mk': "Во оваа хартија користиме методи за создавање голем лексикон на вербалните поларитетски промени и ги применуваме на германски. Променувачите на поларитетот се зборови со содржина кои можат да ја движат поларитетата на фразата кон спротивното, како што е резултатот „напушти“ во „напушти ја целата надеж“. Ова е слично на тоа како негативните зборови како 'не' можат да влијаат на поларитетот. Двајцата променувачи и негативности се потребни за анализа на висока прецизност на чувствата. Списоците на негативни зборови се достапни за многу јазици, но единствениот јазик за кој постои значителен лексикон на променувачи на вербалната поларитет е англиски. Овој лексикон беше создаден со префрлање на примерок на анотирани резултати со надгледуван класификатор кој користи сет на карактеристики управувани со податоци и ресурси. Ние го репродуктираме и адаптираме овој пристап за да создадеме германски лексикон на вербалните поларитетски променувачи. Со тоа потврдиме дека пристапот функционира за повеќе јазици. Понатаму ја подобруваме класификацијата со користење на меѓујазичните информации од англискиот лексикон на менувач. Користејќи го овој подобрен пристап, го намалуваме големиот број германски променувачи на вербалната поларитет, драстично намалувајќи го напорите за анотација. Резултатот на германскиот лексикон на променувачите на вербалната поларитет е објавен.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente naudojame metodus, kad sukurtume didelį žodinio poliarumo keitiklių lexikoną ir juos taikyti vokiečiams. Poliarumo keitikliai yra turinio žodžiai, kurie gali judėti frazės poliarumą priešingai kryptimi, pvz., žodis "atsisakyti" žodžiu "atsisakyti visų vilčių". Tai panašu į tai, kaip neigiami žodžiai kaip "ne" gali daryti įtaką poliarumui. Both shifters and negation are required for high precision sentiment analysis.  Lists of negation words are available for many languages, but the only language for which a sizable lexicon of verbal polarity shifters exists is English.  Šis leksikonas buvo sukurtas įjungiant anotuotų žodžių mėginį su prižiūrimu klasifikatoriumi, kuris naudoja duomenų ir išteklių valdymo funkcijas. Mes atkuriame ir pritaikome šį metodą, kad sukurtume vokiečių žodinio poliarumo keitiklių leksikoną. Taigi patvirtiname, kad metodas veikia daugelyje kalbų. Toliau geriname klasifikaciją naudodami tarpkalbinę informaciją iš anglų skaitiklio. Taikant šį patobulintą požiūrį, mes įjungiame daugelį Vokietijos žodinio poliarumo pokyčių, drastiškai mažindami pastangas anotuoti. Iš to gautas vokiečių žodinio poliarumo keitiklių lexikonas skelbiamas viešai.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз вербалды полярлық түрлендірушілердің үлкен лексиканын құру үшін әдістерді қолданамыз және оларды немістанға қолданамыз. Польшалық түрлендірушілер мазмұның сөздері, бұл сөздің полярлығын өзінің қарсы жағына жылжытуға болады, мысалы "қалдыру" версиясы "бүкіл үмітті қалдыру" дегенде. Бұл \'емес\' секілді негативті сөздердің поляриялықты қалай әсер етеді. Шығыстырушылар мен негативтер екеуі дәл дәл дәл символды анализ үшін керек. Бірнеше тілдер үшін негизациялық сөздер тізімі бар, бірақ тек тіл үшін вербалдық поляриялық түрлендірушілердің өлшемі үлкен лексикалық - ағылшынша. Бұл лексикан деректер мен ресурстарды басқару мүмкіндіктерін қолданатын басқару классификациясының үлгісін жүктеп құрылды. Біз бұл тәсілді ербалдық поляриялық түрлендірушілердің неміс лексиконын құру үшін қайталап, адаптациялаймыз. Сондықтан біз бірнеше тілдер үшін ұқсас істейтінін құптаймыз. Біз ағылшын жылжытушы лексиканың бірнеше тілді мәліметті қолдану арқылы классификацияны жақсартық. Бұл жақсы жақсы тәсілдерді қолдану арқылы, біз неміс вербалды полярлық түрлендірушілерін көп жүктеп, мәліметтерді драстикалық түрлендіру арқылы көмектесеміз Вербалды поляриялық түрлендірушілердің неміс лекциясы көпшілікті қол жеткізіледі.', 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini kami gunakan kaedah untuk mencipta leksikon besar dari pemindah polariti verbal dan melaksanakannya kepada Jerman. Polarity shifters are content words that can move the polarity of a phrase towards its opposite, such as the verb 'abandon' in 'abandon all hope'.  Ini sama dengan bagaimana kata negatif seperti 'tidak' boleh mempengaruhi polariti. Kedua-dua pemindah dan negatif diperlukan untuk analisis sentimen ketepatan tinggi. Senarai perkataan negatif tersedia untuk berbagai bahasa, tetapi satu-satunya bahasa yang mempunyai leksikon yang besar bagi pemindah polariti verbal adalah bahasa Inggeris. Leksikon ini dicipta dengan menggosok sampel verb yang dicatat dengan pengklasifikasi yang diawasi yang menggunakan set ciri-ciri pemacu data dan sumber. We reproduce and adapt this approach to create a German lexicon of verbal polarity shifters.  Dengan itu, kami mengesahkan bahawa pendekatan berfungsi untuk berbagai bahasa. Kami lebih meningkatkan klasifikasi dengan menggunakan maklumat saling bahasa dari leksikon shifter Inggeris. Dengan pendekatan yang diperbaiki ini, kita menggunakan banyak pengubah polariti verbal Jerman, mengurangi usaha anotasi secara drastik. Leksikon Jerman yang berasal dari pemindah polariti verbal dibuat tersedia secara umum.", 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument a ħna nużaw metodi għall-ħolqien ta’ lexicon kbir ta’ bidliet fil-polarità verbali u nagħmluhom fil-Ġermaniż. Polarity shifters are content words that can move the polarity of a phrase towards its opposite, such as the verb 'abandon' in 'abandon all hope'.  Dan huwa simili għal kif kliem ta' negazzjoni bħal 'mhux' jistgħu jinfluwenzaw il-polarità. Kemm il-bidliet kif ukoll in-negazzjoni huma meħtieġa għal analiżi ta’ sensazzjoni ta’ preċiżjoni għolja. Listi ta’ kliem ta’ negazzjoni huma disponibbli għal ħafna lingwi, iżda l-unika lingwa li għaliha jeżisti lexicon daqstant ta’ bidliet fil-polarità verbali hija l-Ingliż. Dan il-lexicon inħoloq permezz ta’ bootstrapping kampjun ta’ verbs annotati b’klassifikatur superviż li juża sett ta’ karatteristiċi mmexxija mid-dejta u mir-riżorsi. Aħna nirreproduċu u nadattaw dan l-approċċ biex noħolqu lexicon Ġermaniż ta’ bidliet fil-polarità verbali. B’hekk, nikkonfermaw li l-approċċ jaħdem għal diversi lingwi. We further improve classification by leveraging cross-lingual information from the English shifter lexicon.  Bl-użu ta’ dan l-approċċ imtejjeb, a ħna nibdew għadd kbir ta’ bidliet fil-polarità verbali Ġermaniża, li jnaqqsu drastikament l-isforz ta’ annotazzjoni. Il-lexicon Ġermaniż li jirriżulta ta’ bidliet fil-polarità verbali huwa disponibbli għall-pubbliku.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний уламжлалтын шилжүүлэгчдийн том хэлбэрийг бий болгох арга хэрэглэдэг. Польшарийн шилжүүлэгчид хэлбэрийг эсрэг хэлбэрээр хөдөлж чадна. Жишээ нь "үлдээх" хэлбэрийг "бүх найдварыг үлдээх" хэлбэрээр хөдөлж чадна. Энэ нь "биш" гэх мэт сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг сөрөг Хоёр шилжүүлэгч болон сөрөг байдал нь үнэхээр тодорхой мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээнд шаардлагатай. Хүсэглэх үгнүүдийн жагсаалт олон хэл дээр байдаг. Гэхдээ хэл нь хэлэх хэлбэрийн хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээнд хэмжээтэй хэлбэрүүдийн хувьд англи хэл юм. Энэ лексикон нь өгөгдлийн болон нөөц боловсруулагдсан өөрчлөлтийг ашигладаг удирдлагатай классификаторын жишээг бүтээсэн. Бид энэ арга замыг Германы хэлний уламжлалын шилжүүлэгчдийг бий болгоход үржүүлж, адаптын зохицуулж байна. Иймээс бид олон хэл дээр арга барилга хэрэгтэй гэдгийг тодорхойлдог. Бид Англи хэл шилжүүлэгч лексиконоос олон хэлний мэдээллийг ашиглаж хуваалцах хэрэгтэй. Энэ сайжруулсан арга барилгыг ашиглан, Германы хэдэн хэдэн хэмжээний уламжлалтын шилжүүлэгчдийг багасгаж, тэмдэглэх хүч чадлыг багасгаж байна. Үүний үр дүнд Германы хэл хэлбэрийн хэлбэрүүдийн уламжлалтын шилжүүлэгчид олон нийтэд ашиглагддаг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret bruker vi metodar for å laga ein stor leksikon av verbale polaritetsforskyver og bruka dei til tysk. Politiske forskyvingar er innhaldsord som kan flytta polariteten til eit frase motsatt, slik som verben «forlate» i «forlate alle håp». Dette er lik korleis negasjonsord som « ikkje » kan påvirka polaritet. Begge forskyvingar og negasjon er nødvendig for høg nøyaktig sentimentanalyse. Liste over negasjonsord er tilgjengelege for mange språk, men det einaste språket som ein storleikbar leksikon av verbale polaritetsforskyver finst er engelsk. Denne leksikona vart oppretta ved å starta eit prøve av notata verbar med ein oversikt klassifiserer som brukar eit sett av data- og ressursdrivte funksjonar. Vi gjenoppretter og tilpassar denne tilnærminga for å laga eit tysk leksikon med verbale polaritetsforskyver. Derfor bekrefter vi at tilnærminga fungerer for fleire språk. Vi forbetrar klassifikasjon lenger ved å levera krysspråk-informasjon frå anglesforskyvingsleksikonet. Når vi bruker denne forbetra tilnærminga, startar vi ein stor tal tyske verbale polaritetsforskyver, og reduserer merknaden drastisk. Det resulterte tysk leksikon av verbale polaritetsforskyvingar er tilgjengeleg offentlig.', 'pl': 'W artykule wykorzystujemy metody tworzenia dużego leksykonu słownych zmienników polaryzacji i stosujemy je do niemieckiego. Zmieniacze polarności są zadowolonymi słowami, które mogą przenieść biegunowość frazy w kierunku jego przeciwieństwa, takimi jak czasownik "porzucić" w "porzucić wszelką nadzieję". Jest to podobne do tego, jak słowa negacji, takie jak "nie", mogą wpływać na polaryzację. Zarówno zmienniki, jak i negacja są wymagane do wysokiej precyzji analizy sentymentów. Listy słów negacji są dostępne dla wielu języków, ale jedynym językiem, dla którego istnieje znaczny leksykon słownych zmienników polaryzacji jest angielski. Ten leksykon został stworzony przez bootstrapping próbki adnotacji czasowników za pomocą nadzorowanego klasyfikatora, który wykorzystuje zestaw funkcji opartych na danych i zasobach. Odtwarzamy i dostosowujemy to podejście do stworzenia niemieckiego leksykonu słownych zmienników polaryzacji. W ten sposób potwierdzamy, że podejście działa w wielu językach. Jeszcze bardziej ulepszamy klasyfikację poprzez wykorzystanie wielojęzycznych informacji z angielskiego leksykonu zmiennokształtnika. Korzystając z tego ulepszonego podejścia, załadujemy dużą liczbę niemieckich słownych zmienników polaryzacji, drastycznie zmniejszając wysiłek adnotacyjny. Powstały niemiecki leksykon słownych zmienników polaryzacji jest udostępniany publicznie.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare folosim metode pentru crearea unui lexicon mare de schimbători de polaritate verbală și aplicarea lor în limba germană. Schimbătorii polarității sunt cuvinte conținute care pot muta polaritatea unei fraze spre opusul său, cum ar fi verbul "abandon" în "abandon orice speranță". Acest lucru este similar cu modul în care cuvintele de negare precum "nu" pot influența polaritatea. Atât schimbătoarele, cât și negația sunt necesare pentru analiza sentimentului de înaltă precizie. Liste de cuvinte de negare sunt disponibile pentru multe limbi, dar singura limbă pentru care există un lexicon considerabil de schimbători de polaritate verbală este engleza. Acest lexicon a fost creat prin pornirea unui eșantion de verbe adnotate cu un clasificator supravegheat care utilizează un set de caracteristici bazate pe date și resurse. Reproducem și adaptăm această abordare pentru a crea un lexicon german al schimbătorilor de polaritate verbală. Prin urmare, confirmăm că abordarea funcționează pentru mai multe limbi. Îmbunătățim în continuare clasificarea prin utilizarea informațiilor translingve din lexiconul shifter englez. Folosind această abordare îmbunătățită, pornim un număr mare de schimbătoare de polaritate verbale germane, reducând drastic efortul de adnotare. Lexiconul german rezultat al schimbătorilor de polaritate verbală este făcut public.', 'sr': "U ovom papiru koristimo metode za stvaranje velikog leksikona verbalnih poljoprivrednika i primjenjivanje na njemačke. Poljoprivrednici su sadržajne reči koje mogu pomaknuti polarnost fraze prema suprotnom, kao što je verb 'napustiti' u 'napustiti svu nadu'. Ovo je slično tome kako negativne reči poput 'ne' mogu uticati na polarnost. Oboje promjene i negacije su potrebne za analizu visoke preciznosti sentimenta. Liste negativnih reèi su dostupne za mnoge jezike, ali jedini jezik za koji postoji velièanstveni leksikon verbalnih poljoprivrednika je engleski. Ovaj leksikon je stvoren putem pokretanja uzoraka notacionih verba sa nadzornim klasifikatorom koji koristi setu podataka i resursa. Mi reprodukujemo i prilagodimo ovaj pristup da stvorimo njemačku leksikonu verbalnih poljoprivrednika. Zato potvrđujemo da pristup radi za višestruke jezike. Dalje poboljšavamo klasifikaciju uključujući preko jezika informacije iz leksikona premještaja engleskog jezika. Koristeći ovaj poboljšani pristup, prebacujemo veliki broj njemačkih verbalnih poljoprivrednika, drastično smanjujući napore za annotaciju. Rezultat njemačkog leksiona verbalnih poljoprivrednika javno je dostupan.", 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വലിയ ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലേക്ക് പ "പ്രതീക്ഷ ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുക" എന്ന വാക്കുകളിലേക്ക് നീക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള വാക്കുകളാണ് പോളരിറ്റി മാറ്റുന്നത്. \'ഇല്ല\' പോലുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് അധികാരം ബാധിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ്. ഉയര്\u200dന്ന ശൂന്യമായ അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും നേരിഷന്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കും ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. പല ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും നേരിട്ട വാക്കുകളുടെ ലിസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു, പക്ഷെ അതിനുള്ള ഒരേയൊരു വലിയ ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d നിലവിലുള് ഈ ലെക്സിക്ഷന്\u200d സൃഷ്ടിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വാര്\u200dപ്പുകളുടെ ഒരു മാതൃക്കം കാണിക്കുന് We reproduce and adapt this approach to create a German lexicon of verbal polarity shifters.  അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഉറപ്പ് വരുത്തുന്നത് പല ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു. ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് മാറ്റങ്ങളുടെ ലെക്സിക്കോണില്\u200d നിന്നും ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d കൊടുക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവരങ ഈ മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരുപാട് ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d വാര്\u200dബല്\u200d പോലീസിറ്റി മാറ്റുന്നവരെ ബൂട്ട്സ്ട്രാ The resulting German lexicon of verbal polarity shifters is made publicly available.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa qaabab aad u weyn oo ah kuwa beddelaya qalabka kalebta, waxaana ku codsanaynaa Jarmalka. Isbedelka barashada ah waa erayo ku qoran oo ku habboon kara hadalka ku saabsan hadalka ka ka soo jeeda si ka geesta ah, tusaale ahaan xarafka 'ka tag' rajada oo dhan. Sida oo kale hadallada ceebta ah sida 'aan ahayn' saameyn ku yeelan karo baaritaanta. Both shifters and negation are required for high precision sentiment analysis.  Luqado badan waxaa laga helaa liiska hadalka diidmada ah, laakiin luqada kaliya oo ay ku jiraan kuwa beddelaya isbedelka caadiga ah waa Ingiriis. Leksikankan waxaa lagu abuuray boostada samool la isticmaalay warqado la xumeeyey oo la ilaaliyey fasax, oo isticmaalaya koob ka mid ah macluumaad-iyo rasuul-wado. Waxaynu soo celinaynaa oo u bedelaynaa qaababkan si aan u abuurno lexico Jarmal oo ah kuwa beddelaya wasakhda. Taas darteed waxaynu xaqiijinnaa in dhaqdhaqaaqa ay u shaqeeyaan luuqado badan. Waxbarashada kaleba horumarinaa marka lagu soo diro macluumaadka luuqadaha kala duwan ee afka Ingiriiska la beddelayo leksis. Sida lagu isticmaalo habkan horumarinta ah, waxaynu dhaqdhaqaaqnaa isbedelka afka Jarmalka ah oo badan, si aad u hoosaystira hawlaha dhibaatada. Jarmalka waxaa si bayaan ah looga heli karaa kuwa beddelaya sharciga caadiga ah.", 'sv': 'I denna uppsats använder vi metoder för att skapa ett stort lexikon av verbala polaritetsskiftare och tillämpa dem på tyska. Polaritetsskiftare är nöjda ord som kan flytta polariteten i en fras mot dess motsatta, till exempel verbet "överge" i "överge allt hopp". Detta liknar hur negationsord som "inte" kan påverka polariteten. Både skiftare och negation krävs för hög precision sentimental analys. Listor över negationsord finns tillgängliga för många språk, men det enda språk för vilket ett betydande lexikon av verbala polaritetsskiftare finns är engelska. Detta lexikon skapades genom att starta upp ett urval av kommenterade verb med en övervakad klassificerare som använder en uppsättning data- och resursdrivna funktioner. Vi reproducerar och anpassar detta tillvägagångssätt för att skapa ett tyskt lexikon av verbala polaritetsskiftare. Därmed bekräftar vi att tillvägagångssättet fungerar för flera språk. Vi förbättrar klassificeringen ytterligare genom att utnyttja korspråkig information från det engelska skiftlexikonet. Med hjälp av detta förbättrade tillvägagångssätt bootstrap ett stort antal tyska verbala polaritetsskiftare, vilket minskar annotationsansträngningen drastiskt. Det resulterande tyska lexikonet av verbala polaritetsskiftare görs offentligt tillgängligt.', 'si': "මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් භාවිතා කරනවා වාර්තාවික ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ලොකු ලෙක්සිකන් වි පෝලියාර්ටි වෙනස් කරුණු වචන් විතරයි, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් යන්න පුළුවන්, වච මේක 'නැහැ' වගේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක වචන වචන වගේ වගේ. වෙනස් කරුණාකරණය සහ නැතිකරණය අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා. බොහොම භාෂාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය වචන ලැයිස්තුවක් තියෙනවා, නමුත් භාෂාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීය ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරීයාවක්  Name අපි මේ විදියට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න සහ සැකසුම් කරන්න ජර්මන් ලෙක්සිකන් හදන්න. ඉතින්, අපි තහවුරු කරනවා මේ විදියට භාෂාවට වැඩ කරනවා කියලා. අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි ශිෆ්ටර් ලෙක්සිකන් වලින් ක්\u200dරිස් භාෂාවක් තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. මේ වැඩි වැඩි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් භාවිතා කරනවා, අපි ජර්මන් වර්ගලික ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ලොකු සංඛ්යාවක් බුට්ට්\u200dරැප් කරනවා,  ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ජර්මන් ලෙක්සිකෝන් වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදිය", 'ta': "இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் முறைகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் ஒரு பெரிய லெக்சிகோனை உருவாக்குவதற்கு மற்றும் அதை ஜெர்மனிக்கு பயன பல்வேறு மாற்றங்கள் உள்ளடக்கமான வார்த்தைகள் உள்ளடக்கமாகும் அது எதிர்மறையான வாக்கியத்தின் தூய்மையை நகர்த்த முடியும், அதாவது 'அனை 'இல்லை' போன்ற எதிர்மறை வார்த்தைகள் தீவிரத்தை பாதிக்க முடியும். அதிக துல்லியமான உணர்வு ஆய்வுக்கு மாற்றங்கள் மற்றும் எதிர்மறைகளும் தேவைப்படுகின்றன. எதிர்மறை வார்த்தைகளின் பட்டியல் பல மொழிகளுக்கு கிடைக்கும், ஆனால் இதில் ஒரே மொழியில் உள்ள அளவான மாற்றங்கள் உள்ளது ஆங்கிலம். Name நாம் இந்த முறையை மீண்டும் ஏற்றுக்கொள்கிறோம் சொல்லாத மாற்றங்களின் ஒரு ஜெர்மன் லெக்சியனை உருவாக்குவதற இதனால், நாம் பல மொழிகளுக்கு செயல்படும் என உறுதிப்படுத்துகிறோம். ஆங்கிலத்திலிருந்து மாற்றி லெக்சிக்சனிலிருந்து மிக மேலும் வகுப்பை மேம்படுத்துகிறோம். இந்த மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்தி, நாம் ஒரு பெரிய ஜெர்மன் சொல்லாத மாற்றங்களை துவங்குகிறோம், அறிவிப்பு முயற முடிவு ஜெர்மன் லெக்சிக்சியன் வார்த்தை தீவிரமான மாற்றங்கள் பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.", 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں ایسے طریقے استعمال کرتے ہیں کہ ایک بڑی لکسون بنائیں اور اسے جرمن پر لازم کریں۔ پالئونٹی تغییر کرنے والے کلمات محبوب ہیں جو ایک کلمات کی قطعیت کو اس کے مخالف سمت تک پہنچا سکتے ہیں، جیسے کلمات "چھوڑ دو" کو "ہر امید کو چھوڑ دو". یہ ایسا ہے کہ "نہیں" کی طرح منفی کلمات کس طرح اثر سکتی ہیں۔ دونوں شیفٹر اور منفی کے لئے بلند دقیق احساس تحلیل کے لئے ضرورت ہے. کئی زبانوں کے لئے منفی کلمات کی لکھیں موجود ہیں، لیکن صرف زبان جس کے لئے ویربال سلیٹی تغییر کرنے والوں کا سازو لکھنا موجود ہے انگلیسی ہے. یہ لکسیون ایک نظارت والی کلاسیر کے ساتھ ایک نمونہ بنانے کے ذریعہ بوٹ ڈال دیا گیا ہے جو ایک ڈیٹ- اور سراسر ڈیلور ڈیلوں کی خصوصی کے ساتھ استعمال کرتا ہے. ہم اس طریقہ کو دوبارہ پیدا کریں اور اضافہ کریں کہ ایک جرمانی لکسیون بنائیں جرمانی لکسیون کی جرمی لکسیون ہے۔ اس لئے ہم تصدیق کرتے ہیں کہ تقریبا بہت سی زبانوں کے لئے کامل ہے۔ ہم اس سے زیادہ کلاسپیٹ کرسی زبان کی معلومات کو انگلیسی شیفٹر لکسون سے استعمال کر رہے ہیں۔ ہم اس طریقے سے بہت زیادہ جرمن کی کلمات پالنے والی شیفٹر کو پھینک رہے ہیں، اس طرح ہم نے اظہار کی کوشش کو اچھی طرح کم کر رہے ہیں. نتیجہ جرمن کی لکسیون ویربل پولٹریٹی شیفٹر کو ظاہر طور پر موجود بنایا گیا ہے.', 'uz': 'Bu qogʻozda biz bir katta leksisini o\'zgartirish uchun qo\'llanmalarni ishlatamiz va ularni Olmonchaga qo\'llab turamiz. Ko\'pchilik o\'zgarishlar bir so\'zlarni bir xil tomoniga koʻchirish mumkin. Masalan "hamma rajada qolish" tugmasini bir marta ko\'paytirish mumkin. Bu esa "yo\'q" degan so\'zlarni o\'zgartirish mumkin. Both shifters and negation are required for high precision sentiment analysis.  Koʻp tillar uchun yoʻq so\'zlar roʻyxati mavjud, lekin eng bir tillar uchun eng katta leksision o\'zgarishlarning eng ingliz tili. Name Biz bu usulni qaytadan o\'zgartirib chiqaramiz va o\'zgarishlarni o\'zgartirish uchun Olmon leksini o\'zgartiradik. Bu bilan biz bir necha tillar uchun ishlab chiqaramiz. Biz ingliz tilidan o\'zgarilgan leksisidan bir necha tillar haqida o\'rganish uchun darajalashni bajaramiz. Bu yaxshi usulni ishlatish bilan, biz ko\'p ko\'pchilik Olmon tili polarini o\'zgartirib chiqaramiz, taxminan harakat qilishni o\'zgartiradik. Name', 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi dùng phương pháp tạo ra chữ viết lớn của những kẻ biến hình lời và áp dụng chúng cho người Đức. Người biến hình Cực là những từ ngữ nội dung có thể chuyển những từ cực của một cụm từ về hướng ngược lại, như động từ\'bỏ\'trong\'bỏ hết hy vọng\'. Giống như việc từ chối như "không" có thể ảnh hưởng đến các quan điểm. Cả hai người biến hình và âm bản cần thiết để phân tích tỉ cảm cao độ. Danh sách từ chối được liệt kê cho nhiều ngôn ngữ, nhưng ngôn ngữ duy nhất mà có thể viết văn bản đáng kể của những người biến hình bằng Giọng nói là tiếng Anh. Cuốn sổ này được tạo ra bằng cách khởi động một mẫu các động từ được ghi chú với một mật khẩu giám sát dùng một bộ tính năng dựa vào dữ liệu và tài nguyên. Chúng tôi mô phỏng và thích nghi phương pháp này để tạo ra ngôn ngữ văn bản Đức của những kẻ biến hình lời. Chúng tôi xác nhận phương pháp này có tác dụng với nhiều ngôn ngữ. Chúng ta cải tiến phân loại bằng cách sử dụng thông tin ngôn ngữ khác nhau từ ngôn ngữ Anh. Sử dụng phương pháp cải thiện này, chúng tôi khởi động một số lượng lớn những kẻ chuyển hóa ngôn ngữ Đức, giảm mạnh độ chú ý. Kết quả ngôn ngữ của những kẻ biến đổi cực phát ra từ Đức được công khai.', 'nl': "In dit artikel gebruiken we methoden om een groot lexicon van verbale polariteitsverschuivers te creëren en deze toe te passen op het Duits. Polariteitsverschuivers zijn inhoudelijke woorden die de polariteit van een zin naar het tegenovergestelde kunnen verplaatsen, zoals het werkwoord 'verlaten' in 'verlaten alle hoop'. Dit is vergelijkbaar met hoe ontkenningswoorden als 'niet' polariteit kunnen beïnvloeden. Zowel shifters als negatie zijn vereist voor een zeer nauwkeurige sentimentanalyse. Lijsten van ontkenningswoorden zijn beschikbaar voor vele talen, maar de enige taal waarvoor een aanzienlijk lexicon van verbale polariteitsverschuivers bestaat is Engels. Dit lexicon is gemaakt door een voorbeeld van geannoteerde werkwoorden te bootstrappen met een begeleide classificator die gebruik maakt van een set data- en resourcegestuurde functies. We reproduceren en passen deze aanpak aan om een Duits lexicon van verbale polariteitsverschuivers te creëren. Hiermee bevestigen we dat de aanpak werkt voor meerdere talen. We verbeteren de classificatie verder door gebruik te maken van meertalige informatie uit het Engelse shifter lexicon. Met behulp van deze verbeterde aanpak bootstrappen we een groot aantal Duitse verbale polariteitsverschuivers, waardoor de annotatie-inspanning drastisch wordt verminderd. Het resulterende Duitse lexicon van verbale polariteitsverschuivers wordt openbaar gemaakt.", 'da': "I denne artikel bruger vi metoder til at skabe et stort leksikon af verbale polaritetsskiftere og anvende dem på tysk. Polaritetsskiftere er tilfredse ord, der kan flytte polariteten af en sætning mod dets modsatte, såsom verbet 'opgive' i 'opgive alt håb'. Dette svarer til, hvordan negationsord som 'ikke' kan påvirke polariteten. Både skiftere og negation er nødvendige for høj præcision sentiment analyse. Lister over negationsord er tilgængelige for mange sprog, men det eneste sprog, hvor der findes et stort leksikon af verbale polaritetsskiftere, er engelsk. Dette leksikon blev oprettet ved at starte et eksempel af kommenterede verber med en overvåget klassificering, der bruger et sæt data- og ressourcedrevne funktioner. Vi gengiver og tilpasser denne tilgang til at skabe et tysk leksikon af verbale polaritetsskiftere. Dermed bekræfter vi, at tilgangen fungerer for flere sprog. Vi forbedrer klassificeringen yderligere ved at udnytte tværsprogede oplysninger fra det engelske skiftleksikon. Ved hjælp af denne forbedrede tilgang bootstrap vi et stort antal tyske verbale polaritetsskiftere, hvilket reducerer annoteringsindsatsen drastisk. Det resulterende tyske leksikon af verbale polaritetsskiftere gøres offentligt tilgængeligt.", 'bg': 'В тази статия използваме методи за създаване на голям лексикон на словесните измествания на полярността и ги прилагаме на немски език. Променчиците на полярността са думи, които могат да придвижат полярността на фразата към нейната противоположност, като глагола "изостави" в "изостави всяка надежда". Това е подобно на това как отрицателни думи като "не" могат да повлияят на полярността. Както шифтърите, така и отрицанието са необходими за прецизен анализ на сентимента. Списъци с отрицателни думи са налични за много езици, но единственият език, за който съществува значителен лексикон на словесните изместващи полярността, е английският. Този лексикон е създаден чрез стартиране на извадка от анотирани глаголи с контролиран класификатор, който използва набор от функции, задвижвани от данни и ресурси. Ние възпроизвеждаме и адаптираме този подход, за да създадем немски лексикон на словесните изместващи полярността. По този начин потвърждаваме, че подходът работи за множество езици. Ние допълнително подобряваме класификацията чрез използване на междуезична информация от английския шифтър лексикон. Използвайки този подобрен подход, ние стартираме голям брой германски словесни шифтери на полярността, намалявайки драстично усилията за анотация. Полученият немски лексикон на словесните променливи на полярността е публично достъпен.', 'ko': "본고에서 우리가 사용하는 방법은 대형 어휘 라이브러리의 동사 극성 이동을 만들고 이를 독일어에 응용하는 것이다.극성 전이어는 단어의 극성을 반대 방향으로 이동시킬 수 있는 내용어이다. 예를 들어'모든 희망을 포기한다'는 동사인'포기'다.이것은 부정어 'not' 가 극성에 미치는 영향과 유사하다.고정밀 정서 분석은 위치 이동과 부정이 필요하다.많은 언어들이 부정어 목록을 가지고 있지만, 유일하게 대량의 어휘가 존재하는 언어는 영어다.이 사전은 데이터와 자원 구동 특징을 사용하는 감독 분류기를 사용하여 주석이 있는 동사 견본을 안내하여 만든 것이다.우리는 이런 방법을 복제하고 조정하여 언어의 극성 이동에 관한 독일어 어휘를 창조했다.그래서 우리는 이 방법이 여러 언어에 적용되는지 확인했다.우리는 영어 이동기 어휘 중의 다중 언어 정보를 이용하여 분류를 더욱 개선했다.이런 개선 방법을 사용하여 우리는 대량의 독일어 동사의 극성 이동을 유도하여 주석 작업량을 크게 감소시켰다.이로 인해 발생한 독일어 어휘인'언어의 극성 이동자'가 이미 공개되었다.", 'hr': "U ovom papiru koristimo metode za stvaranje velikog leksikona verbalnih poljoprivrednika i primjenjivanje na njemačke. Poljoprivrednici su sadržajne riječi koje mogu pomaknuti polarnost fraze prema suprotnom, poput verb a 'napustiti' u 'napustiti svu nadu'. Liči na to kako negativne riječi poput 'ne' mogu utjecati na polarnost. Za analizu osjećaja visoke preciznosti potrebne su i smjene i negacije. Liste negativnih riječi dostupne su za mnoge jezike, ali jedini jezik za koji postoji veličanstveni leksikon verbalnih poljoprivrednika je engleski. Ovaj leksikon je stvoren čišćenjem uzoraka annotiranih verba s nadzornim klasifikatorom koji koristi skup podataka i resursa. Mi reproduktiramo i prilagodimo ovaj pristup stvaranju njemačkog leksikona verbalnih poljoprivrednika. Zato potvrđujemo da pristup radi za višestruke jezike. Nadalje ćemo poboljšati klasifikaciju uključujući prekogranične informacije iz leksikona premještaja engleskog jezika. Koristeći ovaj poboljšani pristup, prebacimo veliki broj njemačkih verbalnih poljoprivrednika, drastično smanjujući napore za annotaciju. Rezultativni njemački leksikon verbalnih poljoprivrednika javno je dostupan.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما از روش استفاده می کنیم برای ایجاد یک لکسیون بزرگ از تغییردهندگان قطعی کلمات و تغییردهندگان آلمانی استفاده می کنیم. تغییر دهندگان لهستانی کلمات محتوی هستند که می توانند قطعیت یک کلمات را به سمت مخالف آن حرکت کنند، مثل کلمات "تغییر دهید" در "همه امید را رها کنید". این شبیه این است که کلمات منفی مثل "نه" می تواند قطعیت را تأثیر دهد. هر دو تغییر دهنده و منفی برای تحلیل احساسات بالا نیاز دارند. فهرست کلمات منفی برای بسیاری از زبانها موجود است، اما تنها زبانی که برای آن یک زبان قابل اندازه\u200cگیری از تغییردهندگان قطعی کلمات وجود دارد، انگلیسی است. این کلکسیون توسط برچسب کردن نمونه\u200cای از کلمه\u200cهای نوشته شده با یک کلکسیون تحت نظر استفاده از مجموعه ویژه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و منبع\u200cها ساخته شده است. ما این روش را برای ایجاد یک لکسیون آلمانی از تغییردهندگان قطعیت حرفه ای تغییر می دهیم و تغییر می دهیم. بنابراین، ما تایید می\u200cکنیم که این دستور برای زبانهای متعدد کار می\u200cکند. ما با استفاده از اطلاعات متفاوت زبان\u200cها از لکسیون تغییر انگلیسی بیشتری راهنمایی را بهتر می\u200cکنیم. با استفاده از این روش بهتر شده، ما تعداد زیادی از تغییردهندگان قطبی آلمانی را می\u200cگیریم، و تلاش\u200cهای اخطار را به شدت کاهش می\u200cدهیم. نتیجه\u200cی زبان آلمانی از تغییر\u200cدهندگان قطعیت کلمات به طور عمومی دسترسی می\u200cشود.', 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii tunatumia mbinu za kutengeneza lexico kubwa ya mabadiliko ya uchaguzi wa kimapenzi na kuitumia Ujerumani. Mabadiliko ya uchaguzi ni maneno yanayoweza kuhamisha uchafuzi wa neno linalopinga kinyume chake, kama vile neno 'kuacha' katika 'kuacha matumaini yote'... Hii ni sawa na jinsi maneno mabaya kama 'sio' yanavyoathiri uchaguzi. Mabadiliko na mabadiliko yanahitajika kwa uchambuzi wa hisia sahihi. Orodha ya maneno mabaya yanapatikana kwa lugha nyingi, lakini lugha pekee ambazo mabadiliko makubwa ya uchafuzi yanapatikana ni Kiingereza. Leksiko hili lilitengenezwa kwa kuanzisha sampuli ya maneno yaliyochapishwa na mwangalizi unaotumia seti ya taarifa- na vipengele vya rasilimali. Tunaweza kurudisha na kubadilisha mbinu hii ili kutengeneza lexico la Ujerumani kwa mabadiliko ya uchafuzi. Kwa hiyo, tunathibitisha kwamba mbinu hizo zinafanya kazi kwa lugha mbalimbali. We further improve classification by leveraging cross-lingual information from the English shifter lexicon.  Kwa kutumia mbinu hii ya kuboresha, tunaanzisha mabadiliko mengi ya ubaguzi wa rangi ya Ujerumani, kupunguza juhudi za uchunguzi kwa kiasi kikubwa. Matokeo yake ya lexico ya mabadiliko ya ubaguzi wa rangi ya Ujerumani yanapatikana hadharani.", 'af': 'In hierdie papier gebruik ons metodes vir skep van \'n groot leksikon van verbale polarisie verskuiwers en toewend hulle na Duits. Polirisiteit verskuif word inhoud woorde wat die polarisiteit van \'n frase na sy teenwoordig skuif kan word, soos die verb "verlaat" in "verlaat alle hoop". Hierdie is gelyk aan hoe negasie woorde soos \'nie\' kan influens polariteit. Beide verskuiwers en negasie word benodig vir hoë presisie sentimentanalisie. Lyste van negasie woorde is beskikbaar vir baie tale, maar die enigste taal waarvan \'n groottebaar leksikoon van verbale polarisie verskuiwers bestaan is Engels. Hierdie leksikoon is geskep deur \'n voorbeeld van notateerde verbe te stel met \'n superviseerde klassifiseerder wat gebruik \'n stel van data- en hulpbron- gedrywe funksies. Ons reproduseer en aanpasseer hierdie toegang om \'n Duitse leksikoon van verbale polarisie verskuiwers te skep. Daarom, ons bevestig dat die toegang vir veelvuldige tale werk. Ons verder klasifikasie verbeter deur kruistale inligting van die Engels verskuif lexikon te verwyder. Deur hierdie verbeterde toegang te gebruik, laat ons \'n groot aantal Duitse verbale polariteit verskuif, die annotasie verskaffing drastig verduur. Die resulteerde Duitse leksikon van verbale polarisie verskuiwers is openlik beskikbaar gemaak.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag verwenden wir Methoden, um ein großes Lexikon verbaler Polaritätswandler zu erstellen und auf Deutsch anzuwenden. Polaritätswandler sind zufriedene Wörter, die die Polarität einer Phrase in ihr Gegenteil verschieben können, wie das Verb "aufgeben" in "aufgeben alle Hoffnung". Das ist ähnlich, wie Negationswörter wie "nicht" die Polarität beeinflussen können. Sowohl Schalthebel als auch Negation werden für eine hochpräzise Stimmungsanalyse benötigt. Listen von Negationswörtern sind für viele Sprachen verfügbar, aber die einzige Sprache, für die ein beträchtliches Lexikon verbaler Polaritätswandler existiert, ist Englisch. Dieses Lexikon wurde durch Bootstrapping einer Stichprobe annotierter Verben mit einem überwachten Klassifikator erstellt, der eine Reihe von Daten- und ressourcengesteuerten Funktionen verwendet. Wir reproduzieren und adaptieren diesen Ansatz, um ein deutsches Lexikon verbaler Polaritätswandler zu erstellen. Damit bestätigen wir, dass der Ansatz für mehrere Sprachen funktioniert. Wir verbessern die Klassifizierung weiter, indem wir sprachübergreifende Informationen aus dem englischen Shifter Lexikon nutzen. Mit diesem verbesserten Ansatz bootstrappen wir eine große Anzahl deutscher verbaler Polaritätswandler, was den Annotationsaufwand drastisch reduziert. Das daraus resultierende deutsche Lexikon verbaler Polaritätswandler wird öffentlich zugänglich gemacht.', 'id': "Dalam kertas ini kami menggunakan metode untuk membuat leksikon besar dari pemindah polaritas verbal dan menerapkannya ke Jerman. Pemindah polaritas adalah kata-kata konten yang dapat memindahkan polaritas frasa ke arah yang bertentangan, seperti verb 'meninggalkan' dalam 'meninggalkan semua harapan'. Ini mirip dengan bagaimana kata negatif seperti 'tidak' dapat mempengaruhi polaritas. Both shifters and negation are required for high precision sentiment analysis.  Lists of negation words are available for many languages, but the only language for which a sizable lexicon of verbal polarity shifters exists is English.  Leksikon ini diciptakan dengan bootstrapping sampel verb anotasi dengan klasifikasi yang diawasi yang menggunakan set karakteristik yang didorong data dan sumber daya. Kami mereproduksi dan menyesuaikan pendekatan ini untuk menciptakan leksikon Jerman dari pemindah polaritas verbal. Dengan itu, kami mengkonfirmasi bahwa pendekatan bekerja untuk berbagai bahasa. We further improve classification by leveraging cross-lingual information from the English shifter lexicon.  Using this improved approach, we bootstrap a large number of German verbal polarity shifters, reducing the annotation effort drastically.  Leksikon Jerman yang berasal dari pemindah polaritas verbal dibuat publik tersedia.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz wersal polaritet çykyşlygyny bejermek üçin wajyplary ulanýarys we olary nemesçe olara uygulaýarys. Poltýanlyk üýtgewçileri sözleriniň polarityny tersine çykaryp biljek sözleridir, şol ýaly sözleriniň "terk etmek"-den hemme umytdan çykar. Bu \'däl\' ýaly täsirli sözleriň polatyklyga mümkin edip biljek ýaly. Hem değerlendirici hem negasyon yüksek duygusal analizi için gerekli. Mazmunlar sözleriniň listleri birnäçe diller üçin bar, ýöne sözleriň ululyk terjimeleriniň iňlisçe bar. Bu leşik, titizlikli hatlar bilen nähilli hasaplanýan verblerniň örneklerini başlatmak üçin bejer edildi. Bu leşik sistemi data- we resop-driven özelliklerini ullanýar Biz bu ýalaýyşy wirbal polaritet çykyşlygyny bejermek üçin ýene-täzeden we üýtgederis. Şol sebäpli, biz bu ýagdaýyň köp diller üçin işleýändigini tassyklaýarys. Iňlisçe çykyş dilinden gurşamly maglumatlary iňlis dilinden üýtgederek Bu gelişmiş taslaýyşy ulanarak, Biz nemesçe verbal polaritet çarpyşçylaryny köpräk taýýarlap, duýdurma çarpyşlygyny derejesini azaltýarys. Näme üçin, olaryň netijeli nemesçe çykyşlyklaryň sözbaşy publika ulagany bar.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ ብዙ ልኬክሲን ለመፍጠር እና ወደ ጀርመን እናደርጋታለን፡፡ የፖለቲካ ነጻዎች የቃላትን ርኵሰት ወደ ተቃራኒው የሚነቅስ ቃላት ናቸው፤ እንደዚህም ‘ተዉ’ በተስፋ ሁሉ ትተዋል፡፡ እንደዚህ ነው ‹አለመሆኑን› የሚለውን ቃላት በመጥፎ ላይ እንደሚያስቀምጥ፡፡ ሁለትም ለውጦች እና ጉዳይ ለከፍተኛ ስሜት አስተያየት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ለብዙ ቋንቋዎች የተጠቃሚ ቃላት ዝርዝር ይቻላል፤ ነገር ግን የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ብቻውን የቋንቋ ክፍተት የሚለወጡ ብቻውን ቋንቋ እንግሊዘኛ ነው፡፡ This lexicon was created by bootstrapping a sample of annotated verbs with a supervised classifier that uses a set of data- and resource-driven features.  የጀርመን ሊክሲን የግልፅ ውርደት ለውጦችን ለመፍጠር እናስገድዳለን፡፡ ስለዚህ መግለጫ በብዙ ቋንቋዎች እንዲሠራ እናረጋግጣለን። የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ መረጃዎችን ከመልከል እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ይህንን የተሻለውን ቀውስ በመጠቀም፣ ብዙ የጀርመን ቋንቋ የፖለቲካዊ ስርዓት ለውጦችን እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የጀርመን ብሔራዊ ርኵሰት ለውጪዎች በህዝብ የተገኘ ነው፡፡', 'bn': "এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ব্যবহার করি বিশাল লেক্সিকোর মাধ্যমে ভার্বাল দূর্নীতি পরিবর্তনের জন্য এবং জার্মানে তাদের প্রয়োগ করি। বৈশিষ্ট্য পরিবর্তনকারীরা বিষয়বস্তু শব্দ যা তাদের বিরোধীতার দিকে একটি বাক্যের দূষণীয়তা সরিয়ে নিতে পারে, যেমন 'সকল আশা ছেড়ে যাওয়া'  এই ধরনের নেতিবাচক শব্দ কিভাবে 'না' নির্বাচনের প্রভাব ফেলতে পারে। বিশ্লেষণের জন্য উভয় পরিবর্তনকারী এবং নেতিবাচক দরকার। Lists of negation words are available for many languages, but the only language for which a sizable lexicon of verbal polarity shifters exists is English.  এই লেক্সিকোনটি বুটস্ট্র্যাপ করা হয়েছে একটি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা শব্দের নমুনা দিয়ে একটি পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হয়েছে যা তথ্য- এবং সম্পদ চালানো বৈশিষ্ট্য আমরা একটি জার্মান লেক্সিকোর পুনরুদ্ধার করি এবং পুনরুদ্ধার করতে পারি ভার্বালিক দূর্নীতি পরিবর্তনের জন্য। তাই আমরা নিশ্চিত করি যে এই প্রতিযোগিতা বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষার জন্য কাজ করে। ইংরেজি পরিবর্তনকারী লেক্সিকোর তথ্য প্রদান করার মাধ্যমে আমরা আরো ক্লাসফিকেশন উন্নত করি। এই উন্নত পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করে আমরা বিশাল সংখ্যা জার্মানের ভার্বাল দুর্নীতির পরিবর্তনের সংখ্যা বুটস্ট্র্যাক করে দিচ্ছি, যার জার্মানের ফলে ভার্বাল দুর্নীতির পরিবর্তনকারীদের লেক্সিকোর প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যায়।", 'bs': "U ovom papiru koristimo metode za stvaranje velikog leksikona verbalnih poljoprivrednika i primjenjivanje na njemačke. Poljoprivrednici su sadržajne riječi koje mogu pomjeriti polarnost fraze prema suprotnom, poput verb a 'napustiti' u 'napustiti svu nadu'. Liči na to kako negativne riječi poput 'ne' mogu utjecati na polarnost. Oboje smjene i negacije su potrebne za analizu visoke preciznosti sentimenta. Liste negativnih riječi dostupne su za mnoge jezike, ali jedini jezik za koji postoji veličanstven leksikon verbalnih poljoprivrednika je engleski. Ovaj leksikon je stvoren čišćenjem uzoraka annotiranih verba sa nadzornim klasifikatorom koji koristi skup karakteristika podataka i resursa. Mi reprodukujemo i prilagodimo ovaj pristup da stvorimo njemačku leksikonu verbalnih poljoprivrednika. Zato potvrđujemo da pristup radi za višestruke jezike. Dalje ćemo poboljšati klasifikaciju uključivanjem transjezičkih informacija iz leksikona premještaja engleskog jezika. Koristeći ovaj poboljšani pristup, prebacujemo veliki broj njemačkih verbalnih poljoprivrednika, drastično smanjujući napore annotacije. Rezultativni njemački leksikon verbalnih poljoprivrednika javno je dostupan.", 'ca': 'En aquest paper utilitzem mètodes per crear un gran lexicó de canvis de polaritat verbal i aplicar-los en alemany. Els canviadors de polaritat són paraules de contingut que poden mover la polaritat d\'una frase cap al contrari, com el verb "abandonar" en "abandonar tota esperança". Això és similar a com les paraules de negatió com "no" poden influir en la polaritat. Ambdós canviadors i negatius són necessàries per a l\'anàlisi de sentiments d\'alta precisió. Llistes de paraules negatives estan disponibles per a moltes llengües, però l\'única llengüe per a la qual existeix un lexicó important de canvis de polaritat verbal és l\'anglès. Aquest lexicó va ser creat arrancant una mostra de verbs anotats amb un classificador supervisat que utilitza un conjunt de característiques basats en dades i recursos. Reproduim i adaptem aquest enfocament per crear un lexicó alemany de canvis de polaritat verbal. Per això, confirmam que l\'enfocament funciona per a múltiples llengües. millorem més la classificació utilitzant la informació translingüística del lexicó anglès del canvi. Utilitzant aquest enfocament millorat, arranquem un gran nombre de canvis de polaritat verbal alemanya, reduint drasticament l\'esforç d\'anotació. El lexicó alemanya resultant dels canviadors de polaritat verbal es publica.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku používáme metody pro vytvoření velkého lexikonu slovních měničů polarity a aplikujeme je na němčinu. Polarity shifters jsou spokojená slova, která mohou posunout polaritu fráze směrem k opaku, jako je sloveso "opustit" v "opustit veškerou naději". To je podobné tomu, jak negativní slova jako "ne" mohou ovlivnit polaritu. Pro vysoce přesnou analýzu sentimentů jsou vyžadovány jak měniče, tak negace. Seznamy negačních slov jsou k dispozici pro mnoho jazyků, ale jediný jazyk, pro který existuje velký slovník slovních posunů polarity, je angličtina. Tento lexikon byl vytvořen bootstrapping vzorku anotovaných slovesa s dohledem klasifikátorem, který používá sadu funkcí řízených daty a zdroji. Tento přístup reprodukujeme a upravujeme tak, abychom vytvořili německý lexikon slovních měničů polarity. Tím potvrzujeme, že tento přístup funguje pro více jazyků. Klasifikaci dále zlepšujeme využitím vícejazyčných informací z anglického slovníku shifter. S využitím tohoto vylepšeného přístupu zavádíme velké množství německých slovních měničů polarity, což drasticky snižuje úsilí o anotaci. Výsledný německý lexikon slovních měničů polarity je zpřístupněn veřejně.', 'sq': "Në këtë letër ne përdorim metoda për krijimin e një lexikoni të madh të ndryshuesve të polaritetit verbal dhe i aplikojmë në gjerman. Ndryshuesit e poliaritetit janë fjalë të përmbajtura që mund të lëvizin polaritetin e një fraze drejt të kundërtës së saj, të tilla si verbi 'braktis' në 'braktis të gjitha shpresat'. Kjo është e ngjashme me atë se si fjalët negative si 'jo' mund të ndikojnë në polaritetin. Both shifters and negation are required for high precision sentiment analysis.  Lists of negation words are available for many languages, but the only language for which a sizable lexicon of verbal polarity shifters exists is English.  Ky lexikon u krijua duke nxjerrë një moshë verbësh të anotuar me një klasifikues të mbikqyrur që përdor një sërë elementesh të dhënave dhe të burimeve. We reproduce and adapt this approach to create a German lexicon of verbal polarity shifters.  Kështu, ne konfirmojmë se metoda funksionon për gjuhë të shumta. Ne përmirësojmë më tej klasifikimin duke përdorur informacionin ndërgjuhësor nga lexikoni anglez shifter. Using this improved approach, we bootstrap a large number of German verbal polarity shifters, reducing the annotation effort drastically.  Lexikoni gjerman që rezulton i ndryshuesve të polaritetit verbal është bërë publikisht i disponueshëm.", 'hy': 'In this paper we use methods for creating a large lexicon of verbal polarity shifters and apply them to German.  Բոլորտության փոփոխիչները պարունակության բառեր են, որոնք կարող են շարժել արտահայտության բոլորտությունը հակառակ կողմում, ինչպիսիք են բայը «թողնել» բոլոր հույսերը: Սա նման է այն բանին, թե ինչպես «ոչ» նման բառերը կարող են ազդել կողմնականության վրա: Առավել ճշգրիտ զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար անհրաժեշտ են շարժիչներ և բացասականություն: Բացասական բառերի ցուցակները տարբեր լեզուների համար հասանելի են, բայց միակ լեզուն, որի համար գոյություն ունի խոսքային հյուսիսականության փոփոխիչների մեծ լեքսիկոն, անգլերեն է: Այս լեքսիկոնն ստեղծվել է նշումնավորված բայերի նմուշը վերահսկված դասակարգչի հետ, որը օգտագործում է տվյալների և ռեսուրսների հիմնված հատկություններ: We reproduce and adapt this approach to create a German lexicon of verbal polarity shifters.  Thereby, we confirm that the approach works for multiple languages.  We further improve classification by leveraging cross-lingual information from the English shifter lexicon.  Օգտագործելով այս բարելավված մոտեցումը, մենք հիմնադրում ենք գերմանացի խոսքային հյուսիսականության մեծ քանակությամբ տեղափոխողներ, խիստ նվազեցնելով annoտացիոն ջանքերը: Արդյունքում գերմանացի լեքսիկոնն արտահայտվում է լեռալ հյուսիսականության փոփոխիչների համար:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, verbal polaritet dəyişənlərinin böyük leksikini yaratmaq üçün metodları istifadə edirik və onları Almanca istifadə edirik. Polşalıq dəyişdiriciləri bir sözlərin polyarlığını tərəfə sürükləyə biləcək sözlərdir, bəlkə "tərk et" sözləri "ümidini tərk et". Bu "deyil" kimi negatif sözlər polaritə təsir edə biləcəyi kimi bənzəyir. Hər ikisi də dəyişiklik və negasyon yüksək dəyişiklik duyguları analizi üçün lazımdır. Nöqsanlıq sözlərinin listesi çox dillərə faydalanır, amma sözlərin çox böyüklük polyarlıq dəyişənlərin dili İngilizdir. Bu leksikon məlumatları və resursu sürüklənmiş özellikləri istifadə edən nəzarət edilmiş fərqlərdən nümunə çəkib yaradıldı. Biz bu metodları sözlü polaritə dəyişənlərin Almanca leksiyonu yaratmaq və uyğunlaşdırırıq. Buna görə də biz təsdiqləyirik ki, bu approach çoxlu dillər üçün çalışır. İngilizə dəyişdirici leksikindən çox dilli məlumatları istifadə edərək klasifikasyonu daha yaxşılaşdırırıq. Bu yaxşılaşdırılmış tərzimə istifadə edərək çox Alman verbal polarity dəyişdiricilərini düzəltdik. Növbəti olaraq Alman sözlü polaritə dəyişdiricilərin sözləri açıq-aşkar faydalanır.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kasutame meetodeid, et luua suur sõnalise polaarsuse muudajate leksikon ja rakendada neid saksa keeles. Polaarsuse muudajad on rahuldavad sõnad, mis võivad liigutada fraasi polaarsust vastupidise suunas, näiteks tegusõna "hüljata" lauses "hüljata kogu lootus". See on sarnane sellele, kuidas negatsioonisõnad nagu "ei" võivad polaarsust mõjutada. Nii vahetajad kui ka negatsioon on vajalikud suure täpsuse sentimentaalüüsi jaoks. Negatsioonisõnade nimekirjad on saadaval paljudes keeltes, kuid ainus keel, mille puhul on olemas märkimisväärne sõnalise polaarsuse muudajate leksikon, on inglise keel. See leksikon loodi annoteeritud tegusõnade näidise alglaadimisel järelevalve all oleva klassifitseerijaga, mis kasutab andmete- ja ressursipõhiseid funktsioone. Me taasesitame ja kohandame seda lähenemisviisi, et luua saksa keele sõnaliste polaarsusmuutjate leksikon. Seega kinnitame, et lähenemisviis toimib mitmes keeles. Täiendame klassifikatsiooni veelgi, kasutades inglise keelevahetuse leksikoni keeleülest teavet. Selle täiustatud lähenemisviisi abil käivitame suure hulga saksa verbaalse polaarsuse vahetajaid, vähendades märgistamise pingutust drastiliselt. Sellest tulenev saksakeelne polaarsusmuutjate leksikon on avalikult kättesaadav.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä käytämme menetelmiä luodaksemme suuren sanaston sanallisista polaarisuusmuuttajista ja soveltaaksemme niitä saksaksi. Polaarisuuden muuttajat ovat tyytyväisiä sanoja, jotka voivat siirtää lauseen polariteettia vastakkaiseen suuntaan, kuten verbi "hylkää" lauseessa "hylkää kaikki toivo". Tämä on samanlainen kuin se, miten kieltämissanat, kuten "ei", voivat vaikuttaa napaisuuteen. Sekä vaihtajia että kieltämistä tarvitaan tarkkaan tunteiden analysointiin. Kieltosanaluetteloita on saatavilla monille kielille, mutta ainoa kieli, jolle on olemassa huomattava sanasto sanallisista polaarisuusmuuttajista, on englanti. Tämä sanasto luotiin käynnistämällä näyte annotoiduista verbeistä valvotulla luokittelijalla, joka käyttää joukko data- ja resurssipohjaisia ominaisuuksia. Toistamme ja muokkaamme tätä lähestymistapaa luodaksemme saksankielisen sanaston sanallisista polaarisuusmuuttajista. Näin vahvistamme, että lähestymistapa toimii useilla kielillä. Parannamme luokitusta entisestään hyödyntämällä englanninkielisen shifter-sanaston monikielistä tietoa. Käyttämällä tätä parannettua lähestymistapaa käynnistämme suuren määrän saksankielisiä polaarisuusmuuttajia, mikä vähentää merkintöjä huomattavasti. Tuloksena oleva saksankielinen sanasto sanallisista polaarisuusmuuttajista on julkisesti saatavilla.', 'ha': "In this paper we use methods for creating a large lexicon of verbal polarity shifters and apply them to German.  Sauɗe-saurin da aka canza tsari na cikin magana wanda ke iya motsa zuwa motsa, kamar misali'in ka bar 'ka' cikin 'ka bar duk matumaini'. Kamar wancan ne maganar haske kamar 'na'a' bã zai iya shagala ga haske. Ana ƙayyade musanyi da kwanan kwanan sauri biyu. Ana iya ƙayyade jerin haske cikin wasu harshe mãsu yawa, kuma amma da harshe guda kawai, wanda ke ƙunsa da mai girma wa musanyawa masu sauya na rubutu, Ingiriya ne. @ info Munã mayar da wannan hanyarwa dõmin mu halitta wani mai giza ga jerumani. Daga wannan, Munã gaskata cewa hanyarsu ke aiki cikin wasu harshe. Ko ƙara ƙari, Muke ƙara fassarar-fasalin da za'a sende ma'anar fassarar-harshe daga littafin Ingiriya mai musanya. Yin amfani da wannan fikanci mai kyãwo, sai mu fara kashi masu yawa na shige sauri na'urar jerumani, kuma mu ƙara aikin da za'a yi taƙaita. Ana iya fassarar aljerumani na kabarar musanyi-mutane.", 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו משתמשים בשיטות לייצור לקסיקון גדול של משתנים קוטביות מילולית ולהפעיל אותם לגרמנים. משתני קוטב הם מילים תוכניות שיכולות להזיז את הקוטב של ביטוי לכיוון ההפך שלו, כמו המילה "נטוש" ב"נטוש את כל תקווה". זה דומה לאיך מילים שליליות כמו \'לא\' יכולות להשפיע על הקוטב. שני משתנים ושליטה נדרשים לניתוח רגשות מדויק גבוה. רשימות מילים שליליות זמינות לשפות רבות, אך השפה היחידה שבה קיימת לקסיקון גדול של משתני קוטביות מילולית היא אנגלית. הלקסיקון הזה נוצר על ידי קישור דגימה של verbs מצוינים עם מסגר מושג שמשתמש בסט של תכונות מונעות מידע ומשאבים. We reproduce and adapt this approach to create a German lexicon of verbal polarity shifters.  כך, אנו מאשרים שהגישה עובדת עבור שפות רבות. אנחנו משתפרים יותר את ההקליטה על ידי השימוש מידע שפתי-צלב מהלקסיקון המחליף האנגלי. Using this improved approach, we bootstrap a large number of German verbal polarity shifters, reducing the annotation effort drastically.  הלקסיקון הגרמני הנוצא ממחלקי קוטביות מילוליות הופך לפומבי.', 'sk': 'V prispevku uporabljamo metode za ustvarjanje velikega leksikona verbalnih spreminjalcev polarnosti in jih uporabljamo v nemščini. Spreminjalci polarnosti so vsebinske besede, ki lahko premaknejo polarnost fraze proti njenemu nasprotju, kot je glagol "opusti" v "opusti vse upanje". To je podobno, kako lahko negativne besede, kot je "ne", vplivajo na polarnost. Za natančno analizo sentimentalnih občutkov so potrebni menjalniki in zanikanje. Seznami negativnih besed so na voljo za številne jezike, vendar je edini jezik, za katerega obstaja velik leksikon verbalnih spreminjalcev polarnosti, angleščina. Ta leksikon je bil ustvarjen z zagonom vzorca označenih glagolov z nadzorovanim klasifikatorjem, ki uporablja niz podatkov in virov usmerjenih funkcij. Ta pristop reproduciramo in prilagodimo tako, da ustvarimo nemški leksikon verbalnih spreminjalcev polarnosti. S tem potrjujemo, da pristop deluje za več jezikov. Dodatno izboljšujemo klasifikacijo z izkoriščanjem medjezičnih informacij iz angleškega besedila menjalnika. S tem izboljšanim pristopom zaženemo veliko število nemških verbalnih menjalnikov polarnosti, kar drastično zmanjšuje napor pri označevanju. Nastali nemški leksikon verbalnih spreminjalcev polarnosti je javno dostopen.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki ning gambar kelas kuwi nggawe sistem kanggo nggawe langkung banjur luwih voi, nik nggawe barang kelas kuwi basa ning jerman. Ngubah Ketok Text shift structural navigation Language Awak dhéwé baguré karo ngono adhil iki kanggo nggawe Leksi Geman iki ning kelas polarity shifter. Kaya, awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono hal-hal dadi iki banget. Awak dhéwé nggawe luwih banter winih kanggo nggawe informasi luwih-luwih banter Ngawe ngubah sistem iki sing luwih apik, kita sampeyan akeh banter pek populer polarity alam kuwi, nik sembarang nggawe barang nggawe barang apik dadi. Wuhjaratan Gambar kelas kuwi "polarity" nggawe barang gambar.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྱ་ཚིག་ཕྱེད་སྤྲོད་པའི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་པར་སྤྱོད་ཐབས་ རྣམ་པ་ལྡོག་འགྲོས་པ་དེ་ཚོའི་ནང་དོན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚིག་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་ཚིག་རྟགས་པར་དབྱིབས་འགྲོས་བྱེད་མི་ཐུབ་པ། མཐའ་འཁོར་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་མཐོ་རིམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། སྐད་རིགས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་མིང་པར་ཡིག་ཚིག་ཐོ་བཀོད་འདུག། ཡིན་ནའང་སྐད་ཡིག དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་སྒོ་འབྱེད་ཀྱིས་དུས་མཐུན་པའི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཉམ་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཅན་གྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་རིས་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱས་ཚར་བ ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་འདི་གསར་བསྐྲུན་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཚོད་མཁན་མཐུན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་གཅིག་ལས་གཟུགས་འགྲོ་བ་ནི་འགྲོ་བ་འདི་དག་གི་ཡིན་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ལས་སྐད་ཆ་མཐོང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ལས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐོར་ལས། ང་ཚོས་Aleman་གི་བྱ་ཚིག དེའི་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་མངོན་གསལ་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་དམིགས་བསལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཆོས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ།'}
{'en': 'One vs. Many QA Matching with both Word-level and Sentence-level Attention Network', 'ar': 'واحد مقابل العديد من مطابقة ضمان الجودة مع كل من شبكة الانتباه على مستوى الكلمة والجمل', 'es': 'Coincidencia de control de calidad uno contra muchos con la red de atención a nivel de palabra y de oración', 'fr': "Correspondance AQ un contre plusieurs avec le réseau d'attention au niveau du mot et au niveau de la phrase", 'pt': 'Um contra muitos Correspondência de controle de qualidade com rede de atenção em nível de palavra e em nível de frase', 'ja': 'ワードレベルと文章レベルの両方のアテンションネットワークとの1対多くのQAマッチング', 'zh': '一与多 QA 匹单词级句意网络', 'hi': 'एक बनाम कई क्यूए दोनों Word-स्तर और वाक्य-स्तर ध्यान नेटवर्क के साथ मिलान', 'ru': 'Один или многие QA соответствуют как на уровне слов, так и на уровне предложений', 'ga': 'A hAon vs Go leor QA Meaitseáil le Líonra Airde Leibhéal Focal agus Pianbhreithe', 'ka': 'ერთი vs. ბევრი QA შესაბამისი სიტყვების სიტყვების და სიტყვების სიტყვების შესაბამისი ქსელი', 'hu': 'Egy vs. Sok kérdéses megállapodás, amely megfelel mind a szószintű, mind a mondatszintű Figyelem Hálózatnak', 'el': 'Ένας εναντίον πολλών ερωτήσεων που ταιριάζουν τόσο σε επίπεδο λέξης όσο και σε επίπεδο φράσεων Δίκτυο προσοχής', 'it': 'Uno contro molti QA Corrispondenza sia a livello di parole che a livello di frase', 'kk': 'Бірінші QA көп сөз деңгейінде және сөз деңгейінде ескерту желісімен сәйкес келеді', 'mk': 'Еден против многу QA се совпаѓа со мрежата на внимание на ниво на зборови и на ниво на реченици', 'lt': 'Vienas palyginti su daugeliu QA, atitinkančiu tiek žodžių, tiek sakinių dėmesio tinklą', 'ms': 'Satu vs. Banyak QA yang padan dengan kedua-dua Rangkaian Perhatian Aras-Kata dan Aras-Perhatian', 'ml': 'വാക്ക്- നിലം, ശിക്ഷ- നില ശ്രദ്ധയുടെ നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കും കൊണ്ട് ഒരു വിനിമിത്തം ക്യൂഎയുടെ കൂടെ', 'no': 'Ein mot mange QA-samsvar med både ordnivå og setningsnivåtvaringsnettverk', 'mn': 'Нэг эсрэг олон QA-ын хоёр үгийн түвшинд, өгүүлбэр-түвшинд анхаарлаа хоёулантай холбоотой', 'pl': 'Jedna kontra wiele QA dopasowanie zarówno na poziomie słowa, jak i zdań Sieć uwagi', 'ro': 'Unu vs. Multe QA Potrivire atât cu nivel de cuvânt, cât și cu nivel de sentință Atenție Network', 'sr': 'Jedna protiv mnogih QA odgovara i razini reči i mreža pažnje na razini reči', 'si': 'එක විරුද්ධ QA ගොඩක් විරුද්ධ විරුද්ධ වචනය සහ වාර්තාවක් සම්බන්ධ ජාලය', 'sv': 'En mot många QA Matchning med både ordnivå och meningsnivå Attention Network', 'so': 'One vs. many QA Matching with both word-level and Sentence-level Attention Network', 'ta': 'One vs. Many QA matching both words- level and sentence- level Attention Network', 'ur': 'ایک vs. بہت سی QA متفاوت Word-Level اور Sentence-Level Attention NetworkName', 'mt': 'Waħda kontra ħafna QA li jaqblu kemm mal-livell tal-kliem kif ukoll mal-livell tal-attenzjoni tas-sentenza', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một đấu với nhiều điểm QA khớp với cả mạng lưới chú ý từ cấp và cấp bản án', 'bg': 'Едно срещу много съвпадение с мрежата за внимание на ниво дума и на ниво изречение', 'nl': 'Eén vs. Veel QA Matching met zowel woord- als zinnenniveau Attentie Network', 'da': 'En vs. mange QA Matching med både ordniveau og sætningsniveau Attention Network', 'de': 'One vs. Many QA Matching mit Wort- und Satzebene Attention Network', 'id': 'Satu vs. Banyak QA yang cocok dengan jaringan perhatian tingkat kata dan tingkat kalimat', 'fa': 'یکی علیه بسیاری از QA که هماهنگ با سطح کلمات و شبکه توجه سطح کلمات', 'sw': 'Mmoja dhidi ya. Wengi wa QA wakilinganishwa na kiwango cha maneno na Mtandao wa Uchunguzi', 'tr': 'Birinji we K철p QA s철z derejesi we s철z derejesi bilen e힊le첵채r', 'hr': 'Jedna protiv mnogih QA odgovara i razini riječi i mreža pozornosti na razini kazne', 'af': 'Een teen baie QA ooreenstemmende met beide Woord- vlak en Sentence- vlak Aangaande Netwerk', 'am': 'አንድ vs. ብዙ QA Match with both Word- level and Sentence-level Attention Network', 'sq': 'Një kundër shumë QA që përputhen me nivelin e fjalës dhe nivelin e vëmendjes', 'hy': 'Առաջինը հակառակ շատ QA-ների համապատասխանությունը բառի և նախադասության մակարդակի ուշադրության ցանցի հետ', 'ko': '단어급과 문장급 네트워크의 일대다 QA 일치 주의', 'az': 'Bir ne칞톛 QA il톛 birlikd톛 h톛r s칬z s톛viyy톛si v톛 s칬zl톛r s톛viyy톛si Attention Network il톛 eyni ola bil톛r', 'bn': 'একটি বিরোধী, অনেক কিউএ শব্দ-স্তর এবং শাস্তি স্তরের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে মিলিয়েছে', 'bs': 'Jedna protiv mnogih QA odgovara i razini riječi i mreža pažnje na razini kazne', 'ca': "Un contra molts QA que coincideixen tant amb la xarxa d'atenció a nivell de paraules com a nivell de frases", 'cs': 'Jedna vs. mnoho QA shody s úrovní slova i věty Pozornost Síť', 'et': 'Üks võrreldes paljude kvaliteedi tagamisega, mis sobivad nii sõna- kui ka lausetasemelise tähelepanuvõrguga', 'fi': 'Yksi vastaan monia laadunvarmistuksen vastaavuus sekä sana- että lausetason huomioverkon kanssa', 'jv': 'Sing Karo Kemerdekaan sing mlaku, nggo Kemerdekaan Gambar lan Kemerdekaan Atentis Network', 'sk': 'Ena v primerjavi s številnimi vprašanji, ki se ujemajo z mrežo pozornosti na ravni besede in stavka', 'ha': 'QA Match with both words- levels and Pence- levels Attachment NetworkManager', 'he': 'אחד נגד רבים QA מתאים לרשת תשומת לב רמת מילים וגם רמת גזרה', 'bo': 'One vs. Many QA Match with both Word-level and Sentence-level Attention Network'}
{'en': 'Question-Answer (QA) matching is a fundamental task in the Natural Language Processing community. In this paper, we first build a novel QA matching corpus with informal text which is collected from a product reviewing website. Then, we propose a novel QA matching approach, namely One vs. Many Matching, which aims to address the novel scenario where one question sentence often has an answer with multiple sentences. Furthermore, we improve our matching approach by employing both word-level and sentence-level attentions for solving the noisy problem in the informal text. Empirical studies demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach to question-answer matching.', 'ar': 'مطابقة السؤال والجواب (QA) هي مهمة أساسية في مجتمع معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا أولاً ببناء مجموعة جديدة مطابقة لضمان الجودة مع نص غير رسمي تم جمعه من موقع ويب لمراجعة المنتج. بعد ذلك ، نقترح نهجًا جديدًا لمطابقة ضمان الجودة ، أي واحد مقابل العديد من المطابقة ، والذي يهدف إلى معالجة السيناريو الجديد حيث غالبًا ما تحتوي جملة سؤال واحدة على إجابة بجمل متعددة. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بتحسين نهج المطابقة لدينا من خلال توظيف الانتباه على مستوى الكلمة والجمل لحل المشكلة الصاخبة في النص غير الرسمي. تظهر الدراسات التجريبية فعالية النهج المقترح لمطابقة الأسئلة والأجوبة.', 'pt': 'A correspondência pergunta-resposta (QA) é uma tarefa fundamental na comunidade de processamento de linguagem natural. Neste artigo, primeiro construímos um novo corpus de correspondência de controle de qualidade com texto informal que é coletado de um site de revisão de produtos. Em seguida, propomos uma nova abordagem de correspondência de QA, ou seja, One vs. Many Matching, que visa abordar o novo cenário em que uma frase de pergunta geralmente tem uma resposta com várias frases. Além disso, melhoramos nossa abordagem de correspondência empregando atenções tanto no nível da palavra quanto no nível da frase para resolver o problema do ruído no texto informal. Estudos empíricos demonstram a eficácia da abordagem proposta para a correspondência pergunta-resposta.', 'es': 'La correspondencia de preguntas y respuestas (QA) es una tarea fundamental en la comunidad de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. En este artículo, primero creamos un nuevo corpus de comparación de control de calidad con texto informal que se recopila de un sitio web de revisión de productos. Luego, proponemos un enfoque novedoso de emparejamiento de control de calidad, a saber, One vs Many Matching, que tiene como objetivo abordar el escenario novedoso en el que una oración de pregunta a menudo tiene una respuesta con varias oraciones. Además, mejoramos nuestro enfoque de correspondencia mediante el empleo de atenciones tanto a nivel de palabra como de oración para resolver el problema ruidoso en el texto informal. Los estudios empíricos demuestran la eficacia del enfoque propuesto para la correspondencia de preguntas y respuestas.', 'fr': "L'appariement question-réponse (AQ) est une tâche fondamentale dans la communauté du traitement du langage naturel. Dans cet article, nous créons d'abord un nouveau corpus de correspondance d'assurance qualité avec du texte informel qui est collecté à partir d'un site Web d'évaluation de produits. Ensuite, nous proposons une nouvelle approche de correspondance d'assurance qualité, à savoir une correspondance unique contre plusieurs, qui vise à aborder le scénario novateur où une phrase de question a souvent une réponse avec plusieurs phrases. En outre, nous améliorons notre approche de correspondance en utilisant des attentions au niveau des mots et des phrases pour résoudre le problème bruyant du texte informel. Des études empiriques démontrent l'efficacité de l'approche proposée pour l'appariement question-réponse.", 'ja': '質疑応答（ QA ）マッチングは、自然言語処理コミュニティの基本的なタスクです。この論文では、まず製品レビューのウェブサイトから収集された非公式なテキストと新規のQAマッチングコーパスを構築します。次に、1つの質問文に複数の文があることが多い新規のシナリオに対処することを目的とした、新規のQAマッチングアプローチ、すなわちOne vs Many Matchingを提案します。さらに、非公式テキストの騒音問題を解決するために、単語レベルと文レベルの両方のアテンションを採用することで、マッチングアプローチを改善します。実証研究は、質問応答マッチングへの提案されたアプローチの有効性を示している。', 'zh': '问(QA)匹者,自然语言理社区之大务也。 本文首构新QA,将语料库与产品论网站收拾非正文本相匹。 然后立新QA匹配之法,即一双多匹配,决定一个句子常有数句答案的新场。 此外用单词级句级注意,以决非文本之嘈杂,以改匹配之法。 实证所问匹配之有效性。', 'hi': 'प्रश्न-उत्तर (क्यूए) मिलान प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण समुदाय में एक मौलिक कार्य है। इस पेपर में, हम पहले अनौपचारिक पाठ के साथ एक उपन्यास क्यूए मिलान कॉर्पस का निर्माण करते हैं जो एक उत्पाद समीक्षा वेबसाइट से एकत्र किया जाता है। फिर, हम एक उपन्यास क्यूए मिलान दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, अर्थात् एक बनाम कई मिलान, जिसका उद्देश्य उपन्यास परिदृश्य को संबोधित करना है जहां एक प्रश्न वाक्य में अक्सर कई वाक्यों के साथ एक उत्तर होता है। इसके अलावा, हम अनौपचारिक पाठ में शोर की समस्या को हल करने के लिए शब्द-स्तर और वाक्य-स्तर दोनों ध्यानों को नियोजित करके अपने मिलान दृष्टिकोण में सुधार करते हैं। अनुभवजन्य अध्ययन प्रश्न-उत्तर मिलान के लिए प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता को प्रदर्शित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Согласование вопросов и ответов (QA) является фундаментальной задачей в сообществе по обработке естественного языка. В этой статье мы сначала создаем новый корпус QA, соответствующий неофициальному тексту, который собирается с веб-сайта обзора продукта. Затем мы предлагаем новый подход QA, а именно One vs. Many Matching, который направлен на рассмотрение нового сценария, когда одно предложение вопроса часто имеет ответ с несколькими предложениями. Кроме того, мы улучшаем наш подход к сопоставлению, используя внимание как на уровне слов, так и на уровне предложений для решения шумной проблемы в неофициальном тексте. Эмпирические исследования демонстрируют эффективность предлагаемого подхода к сопоставлению вопросов и ответов.', 'ga': 'Is tasc bunúsach é meaitseáil Ceist-Freagra (QA) sa phobal Próiseála Teanga Nádúrtha. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid le chéile ar dtús corpas nua QA a mheaitseálann le téacs neamhfhoirmiúil a bhailítear ó shuíomh Gréasáin athbhreithnithe táirge. Ansin, molaimid cur chuige meaitseála QA úrnua, is é sin One vs. Many Matching, a bhfuil sé mar aidhm aige aghaidh a thabhairt ar an scéal úrnua nuair is minic a bhíonn freagra ag abairt ceiste amháin agus abairtí iolracha. Ina theannta sin, cuirimid feabhas ar ár gcur chuige meaitseála trí aird ar leibhéal na bhfocal agus ar leibhéal na habairte a úsáid chun fadhb fhuaimiúil an téacs neamhfhoirmiúil a réiteach. Léiríonn staidéir eimpíreacha éifeachtacht an chur chuige atá beartaithe maidir le meaitseáil ceisteanna-freagra.', 'hu': 'A kérdés-válasz (QA) egyeztetés alapvető feladat a Natural Language Processing közösségben. Ebben a tanulmányban először egy újszerű, informális szöveggel rendelkező minőségi megfelelő korpuszt építünk, amelyet egy termék értékelő weboldalról gyűjtünk össze. Ezt követően egy új minőségbiztosítási megközelítést javasolunk, nevezetesen az Egy vs. Sok Matching megközelítést, amelynek célja, hogy foglalkozzon az új forgatókönyvvel, ahol egy kérdéses mondat gyakran több mondattal válaszol. Továbbá javítjuk a megfelelő megközelítést azzal, hogy mind szó szintű, mind mondatszintű figyelmet alkalmazunk a zajos probléma megoldására az informális szövegben. Empirikus tanulmányok bizonyítják a javasolt megközelítés hatékonyságát a kérdés-válasz egyeztetésére.', 'el': 'Η αντιστοίχιση ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων (QA) είναι ένα θεμελιώδες έργο στην κοινότητα επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Σε αυτή την εργασία, χτίζουμε πρώτα ένα νέο σώμα αντιστοίχισης QA με άτυπο κείμενο το οποίο συλλέγεται από έναν ιστότοπο αξιολόγησης προϊόντων. Στη συνέχεια, προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση αντιστοίχισης QA, δηλαδή ένα έναντι πολλών αντιστοιχίσεων, η οποία στοχεύει στην αντιμετώπιση του νέου σεναρίου όπου μια πρόταση ερωτήματος συχνά έχει μια απάντηση με πολλαπλές προτάσεις. Επιπλέον, βελτιώνουμε την προσέγγιση αντιστοίχισης χρησιμοποιώντας προσοχή τόσο σε επίπεδο λέξεων όσο και σε επίπεδο προτάσεων για την επίλυση του θορυβώδη προβλήματος στο άτυπο κείμενο. Εμπειριακές μελέτες καταδεικνύουν την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισης για την αντιστοίχιση ερωτήσεων-απαντήσεων.', 'ka': 'Name ჩვენ პირველად პროგრამის გარეშე საბეჭიდან შევქმნით კოპორსს, რომელიც იყოს ინფორმალური ტექსტი. შემდეგ ჩვენ პრომენტის QA-ის შესაბამისი პრომენტის მიღება, ანუ ერთი-ერთი შესაბამისი მსგავსი, რომელიც მინდომა პრომენტის სენარიოს გადაწყვება, სადაც ერთი კითხვის სიმბოლოს დამატებით, ჩვენ უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო დამატებული პრობლემები ინფორმალური ტექსტის სიტყვების დონეზე და სიტყვების დონეზე აღმოჩენით. იმპერიკალური სწავლებები გამოჩვენებენ წარმოიდგინეთ პროგრამის ეფექტიურობა კითხვების შესაბამისათვის შესაბამისათვის.', 'it': "Il matching Domanda-Risposta (QA) è un compito fondamentale nella comunità di Natural Language Processing. In questo articolo, per prima cosa, costruiamo un nuovo corpus di corrispondenza QA con testo informale che viene raccolto da un sito web di recensione dei prodotti. Quindi, proponiamo un nuovo approccio QA matching, vale a dire One vs Many Matching, che mira ad affrontare lo scenario nuovo in cui una frase domanda ha spesso una risposta con frasi multiple. Inoltre, miglioriamo il nostro approccio di matching impiegando attenzioni sia a livello di parola che di frase per risolvere il problema rumoroso nel testo informale. Studi empirici dimostrano l'efficacia dell'approccio proposto al matching domanda-risposta.", 'kk': 'Сұрақ- жауап (QA) сәйкес келетін тапсырма - Natural Language Processing Community- де негізгі тапсырма. Бұл қағазда біріншіден біріншіден QA-мен сәйкес келетін корпус жасадық. Бұл құрылғыны тексеру вебсайтынан жинақталған мәтін. Содан кейін, біз романдық QA сәйкес келетін жағдайды, мысалы "One vs. Көп сәйкес келетін" деп ұсынамыз. Бұл романдық сәйкес сәйкес сөздерінің бірнеше сұрақ сөздерінің жауабын бірнеше Сонымен қатар, біз сәйкестік тәсілдерімізді, сөздер деңгейінде және сөздер деңгейіндегі мәселелерді шешу үшін қолдануға болады. Империялық зерттеулері сұрақ жауаптарының сәйкестігінің эффектілігін көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Klausimų ir atsakymų derinimas yra pagrindinė užduotis gamtos kalbų apdorojimo bendruomenėje. Šiame dokumente pirmiausia sukuriame naują QA koreguojantį korpusą su neoficialiu tekstu, kuris surinktas iš produktų peržiūros interneto svetainės. Tuomet siūlome naują QA derinimo metodą, būtent vieną prieš daugelį derinimų, kuriuo siekiama spręsti naują scenarijų, kai vienas klausimo sakinys dažnai turi atsakymą su keliais sakiniais. Be to, geriname savo suderinamąjį požiūrį, naudodami žodžių ir sakinių lygmens dėmesį sprendžiant triukšmingą problem ą neoficialiame tekste. Empiriniai tyrimai rodo siūlomo požiūrio į klausimų ir atsakymų derinimą veiksmingumą.', 'mk': 'Одговарањето на одговорите на прашањата (QA) е фундаментална задача во заедницата за процес на природен јазик. Во овој весник, прво изградивме роман QA кој се совпаѓа со корпус со неформален текст кој е собран од веб-страница за преглед на производите. Потоа, предложуваме нов пристап за одговарање на QA, имено Еден против Многу одговарања, кој има за цел решавање на новиот сценарио каде што една реченица за прашање често има одговор со повеќе реченици. Покрај тоа, го подобруваме нашиот пристап на совпаѓање со употреба на внимание на ниво на зборови и на ниво на реченици за решавање на бучниот проблем во неформалниот текст. Империските студии ја покажуваат ефикасноста на предложениот пристап кон одговарање на прашањата и одговорите.', 'ml': 'ചോദ്യം - ഉത്തരം (ക്യൂഎ) പൊരുത്തുന്നത് സ്വാഭാവ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന സമൂഹത്തില്\u200d ഒരു അടിസ്ഥാന ജോലി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ക്യൂഎ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനോട് പൊരുതുന്ന ഒരു നോവല്\u200d പണിയുന്നു. അത് അനുയായമായ വാചകത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒര പിന്നെ നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ക്യൂഎയില്\u200d പൊരുത്തുന്ന പ്രായോഗ്യം പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു വാക്ക് പല വാക്കുകളുമായി മറുപടിയുണ്ട്. Furthermore, we improve our matching approach by employing both word-level and sentence-level attentions for solving the noisy problem in the informal text.  ചോദ്യം ചോദിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ഉത്തരം പൊരുതുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രാധാന്യം പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള സ', 'mt': "It-tqabbil bejn it-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet (QA) huwa kompitu fundamentali fil-komunità tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. F’dan id-dokument, l-ewwel a ħna nibnu korpus ġdid QA li jaqbel ma’ test informali li jinġabar minn websajt ta’ reviżjoni tal-prodott. Imbagħad, nipproponu approċċ ġdid ta’ tqabbil tal-QA, jiġifieri wieħed kontra ħafna tqabbil, li għandu l-għan li jindirizza x-xenarju ġdid fejn sentenza waħda ta’ mistoqsija spiss ikollha tweġiba b’sentenzi multipli. Barra minn hekk, aħna ntejbu l-approċċ tagħna ta' tqabbil billi nużaw kemm attenzjoni fil-livell tal-kliem kif ukoll attenzjoni fil-livell tas-sentenza biex issolvi l-problema storbjuża fit-test informali. Studji empiriċi juru l-effettività tal-approċċ propost għat-tqabbil bejn mistoqsijiet u tweġibiet.", 'mn': 'Хариулт-хариулт (QA) нь Байгалийн хэл Процессорын нийгмийн үндсэн ажил юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид анх QA-тэй холбоотой корпус зохиол бий болгож, бүтээгдэхүүний судалгааны вебсайтаас цуглуулагдсан. Дараа нь бид QA-тэй холбогдох шинэ зохиолын арга зам санал болгож байна. Энэ нь нэг асуулт өгүүлбэртэй ихэвчлэн олон өгүүлбэртэй хариулттай. Үүнээс гадна бид үг түвшинд, өгүүлбэрийн түвшинд сонсогдож байгаа асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд хэрэглэх боломжтой ойлголтыг сайжруулж байна. Эзэмшигийн судалгаанууд асуулт хариултын нэгтгэл дээр санал өгсөн арга замын үр дүнг харуулдаг.', 'no': 'Name I denne papiret bygger vi først eit roman QA-tilsvarande korpus med informalt tekst som vert samla frå eit produktovervakingsnettstad. Så foreslår vi eit novel QA-tilnærming, som er 1 vs. mange tilnærmingar, som mål å adressera novelscenarioen der ein spørsmålssetjing ofte har ein svar med fleire setningar. I tillegg er vi forbetra samsvarende tilnærming vårt ved å bruka både ordnivå og setningsnivå oppmerking for å løysa støy problemet i den informale teksten. Empiriske studiar viser effektiviteten av den foreslåde tilnærminga til å passa med spørsmål.', 'pl': 'Dopasowanie pytań do odpowiedzi (QA) jest podstawowym zadaniem w społeczności przetwarzania języka naturalnego. W niniejszym artykule budujemy najpierw nowy korpus dopasowujący QA z nieformalnym tekstem, który jest zebrany ze strony internetowej recenzji produktów. Następnie proponujemy nowe podejście do dopasowania jakości, a mianowicie One vs. Many Matching, którego celem jest rozwiązanie nowego scenariusza, w którym jedno zdanie pytania często ma odpowiedź z wieloma zdaniami. Ponadto poprawiamy nasze podejście do dopasowania, wykorzystując uwagę zarówno na poziomie słów, jak i zdań do rozwiązywania hałaśliwego problemu w nieformalnym tekście. Badania empiryczne pokazują skuteczność proponowanego podejścia do dopasowywania pytań do odpowiedzi.', 'ms': 'Perpadanan Pertanyaan-Jawapan (QA) adalah tugas asas dalam komuniti Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami. Dalam kertas ini, kita pertama-tama membina sebuah novel QA yang sepadan corpus dengan teks informal yang dikumpulkan dari laman web penelitian produk. Kemudian, kami cadangkan pendekatan QA novel, iaitu One vs. Many Matching, yang bertujuan untuk mengatasi skenario novel di mana satu kalimat soalan sering mempunyai jawapan dengan kalimat berbilang. Selain itu, kami memperbaiki pendekatan persamaan kami dengan menggunakan kedua-dua perhatian aras perkataan dan kalimat untuk memecahkan masalah bunyi dalam teks tidak rasmi. Empirical studies demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach to question-answer matching.', 'ro': 'Potrivirea întrebări-răspuns (QA) este o sarcină fundamentală în comunitatea Natural Language Processing. În această lucrare, vom construi mai întâi un corpus nou QA potrivit cu text informal, care este colectat de pe un site de revizuire a produselor. Apoi, propunem o nouă abordare de potrivire a QA, și anume One vs. Many Matching, care își propune să abordeze scenariul nou în care o propoziție de întrebare are adesea un răspuns cu mai multe propoziții. În plus, îmbunătățim abordarea noastră de potrivire prin utilizarea atenției atât la nivel de cuvânt, cât și la nivel de propoziție pentru rezolvarea problemei zgomotoase din textul informal. Studiile empirice demonstrează eficacitatea abordării propuse pentru corelarea întrebărilor-răspunsurilor.', 'sr': 'Odgovor na pitanje (QA) odgovara je osnovni zadatak u prirodnoj zajednici za procesiranje jezika. U ovom papiru, prvi put smo izgradili roman QA odgovarajući korpusu sa neformalnim tekstom koji je skupljen iz web stranice pregledanja proizvoda. Onda predlažemo roman QA odgovarajući pristup, a to je jedan protiv mnogih odgovarajućih, koji je cilj da se obratimo novom scenariju gde jedna rečenica pitanja često ima odgovor sa višestrukim rečenicama. Nadalje, poboljšavamo naš odgovarajući pristup koristeći i pažnju na nivou riječi i na nivou rečenja rešenja buknog problema u neformalnom tekstu. Empiričke studije pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog pristupa odgovoru na pitanje.', 'si': 'Name මේ පත්තරේ අපි මුලින්ම QA සම්බන්ධ කර්පස් එක්ක නිර්මාණයක් හදන්නේ නිර්මාණ පාළුවක් තියෙනවා, ඒක ප්\u200dරදේශ ඊට පස්සේ, අපි කාලිකාවක් QA සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරය කරනවා, එක විරුද්ධ විදියට ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ විදියට, ඒක තවත්, අපි අපේ සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ වචන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා.', 'so': "Question-Answer (QA) matching is a fundamental task in the Natural Language Processing community.  Warqaddan marka ugu horeysa waxaynu dhisnaa warqad QA oo ku habboon qoraal rasmi ah, kaas oo laga soo ururiyey bogagga baaritaanka dhaqaalaha. Markaas waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qoraal QA oo u eg qaab, kaas oo ah mid ka gees ah qaar badan Matching, kaas oo ku talo gala qaababka warqada ah, meesha aad ku leedahay jawaab badan oo ku qoran hadallo badan. Furthermore, waxaynu horumarinnaa qaababka isku mid ah si aynu u sameyno daryeelka heerka hadalka iyo heerka maxkamada si aad u xallisid dhibaatada qaylada ee macluumaadka rasmiga ah. Waxbarashada jimicsiga ah waxay muujiyaan saameyn ku yeelashada qaababka la soo jeeday inay u eg yihiin jawaabta su'aalaha.", 'sv': 'Fråga-svar (QA) matchning är en grundläggande uppgift i Natural Language Processing community. I denna uppsats bygger vi först en ny QA matchande korpus med informell text som samlas in från en produktgranskningssida. Sedan föreslår vi en ny QA matchning metod, nämligen One vs Many Matching, som syftar till att adressera det nya scenariot där en frågemening ofta har ett svar med flera meningar. Dessutom förbättrar vi vårt matchande tillvägagångssätt genom att använda både ordnivå och meningsnivå uppmärksamhet för att lösa bullriga problem i den informella texten. Empiriska studier visar hur effektivt det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet för matchning av frågor och svar är.', 'ta': 'கேள்வி- விடை (QA) பொருத்தம் என்பது இயல்பான மொழி செயல் சமூகத்தில் ஒரு முதன்மையான பணியாகும். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் முதலில் QA பொருந்தும் குறியீட்டை உருவாக்குகிறோம். அது ஒரு பொருள் முன்னோக்கு வலைதளத்தில்  பின்னர், நாம் ஒரு புதிய QA பொருத்தமான செயல்பாட்டை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது பொருத்தம் பல வாக்கியங்களுடன் ஒரு கேள்வி வாக்கியத்திற்கு பதில்  அதற்கும், நாம் எங்கள் பொருத்தமான வழியை மேம்படுத்துகிறோம் சரியான உரையில் ஒலி மட்டத்தையும் வாக்கு மட்டத்தையும் கண்காணிக்கு விடைக்கும் விடையில் பொருந்தும் திட்டமிடப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை காண்பிக்கிறது.', 'ur': 'سوال-جواب (QA) مطابق ملنے کی تعبیر طبیعی زبان پرسس کی کمونٹی میں ایک بنیادی کام ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم پہلی بار ایک کاغذ QA مطابق کورپوس بناتے ہیں جو غیر معمولی ٹیکسٹ سے جمع کئے جاتے ہیں۔ پھر ہم ایک نوم QA مطابق طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، یعنی ایک مقابلہ بہت سے مطابق، جس کا مطابق یہ ہے کہ ایک سوال جماعت بہت سے جماعتوں کے ساتھ ایک جواب ہے۔ اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم کلمات سطح اور کلمات سطح کی توجه کے مطابق اپنے مطابق طریقہ کو بہتر کر رہے ہیں، جو غیر معمول متن میں صحیح مشکل کو حل کرنے کے لئے ہے. امپراتیکی تحقیقات سؤال جواب کے مطابق پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کے مثبت کو دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻozda biz birinchi koʻk QA bilan mos keladigan qoʻllanmalar yaramiz. Bu produkt tahrirlash veb- saytdan qo'yiladi. Keyin biz bir so'zni ko'p so'zlar bilan bir xil so'zlar bilan javob bo'ladi. Ko'rsatganda, biz murakkab matnning toʻgʻri muammolarni tozalash uchun so'z darajada va sentence darajada yetish imkoniyatlarimizni bajaramiz. Empirik taʼminotlar taʼminlovchisi soʻrov javob berishga qoʻllaniladi.", 'vi': 'Đối đáp câu hỏi là một nhiệm vụ cơ bản trong cộng đồng xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta đầu tiên xây dựng một bản dịch cá nhân liên kết với tập đoàn bằng văn bản không chính thức được thu thập từ một trang web xem xét sản phẩm. Sau đó, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp khớp cá nhân mới, nhất là một đấu với nhiều khớp, nhằm giải quyết một kịch bản mới mà câu hỏi thường có câu trả lời với nhiều câu. Hơn nữa, chúng ta cải thiện phương pháp phù hợp bằng cách chú ý cả từ cấp và mức án để giải quyết vấn đề ồn ào trong văn bản không chính thức. Các nghiên cứu đầy kinh nghiệm cho thấy hiệu quả của phương pháp phù hợp với câu hỏi.', 'hr': 'Odgovor na pitanje (QA) odgovara je osnovni zadatak u prirodnoj zajednici za procesiranje jezika. U ovom papiru, prvi put smo izgradili roman QA odgovarajući korpus s neformalnim tekstom koji je skupljen iz stranice pregledanja proizvoda. Onda predlažemo novi QA odgovarajući pristup, a to je jedan protiv mnogih odgovarajućih, koji je cilj riješiti novi scenario gdje jedna rečenica pitanja često ima odgovor sa višestrukim rečenicama. Nadalje, poboljšavamo naš odgovarajući pristup koristeći pažnju na razini riječi i razini kazne za rješavanje bukovnog problema u neoficialnom tekstu. Empirička ispitivanja pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog pristupa odgovoru na pitanje.', 'bg': 'Съвпадението между въпроси и отговори е основна задача в общността за обработка на естествени езици. В тази статия първо изграждаме нов корпус, съответстващ на качеството, с неформален текст, който се събира от уебсайт за преглед на продукти. След това предлагаме нов подход за съвпадение на качеството, а именно едно срещу много съвпадение, който има за цел да отговори на новаторския сценарий, при който едно изречение с въпроси често има отговор с множество изречения. Освен това подобряваме подхода си за съвпадение, като използваме вниманието както на ниво дума, така и на ниво изречение за решаване на шумния проблем в неформалния текст. Емпирични проучвания демонстрират ефективността на предложения подход за съвпадение между въпроси и отговори.', 'da': 'Matching af spørgsmål og svar (QA) er en grundlæggende opgave i Natural Language Processing community. I denne artikel bygger vi først et nyt QA matchende korpus med uformel tekst, som er samlet fra en produktanmeldelse hjemmeside. Derefter foreslår vi en ny QA matchende tilgang, nemlig One vs. Many Matching, som har til formål at adressere det nye scenario, hvor én spørgsmålssætning ofte har et svar med flere sætninger. Desuden forbedrer vi vores matching tilgang ved at bruge både ord- og sætningsniveau opmærksomhed til at løse det støjende problem i den uformelle tekst. Empiriske undersøgelser viser effektiviteten af den foreslåede tilgang til spørgsmål-svar matching.', 'nl': 'Vraag-antwoord (QA) matching is een fundamentele taak in de Natural Language Processing gemeenschap. In deze paper bouwen we eerst een nieuw QA matching corpus met informele tekst die is verzameld op een product review website. Vervolgens stellen we een nieuwe QA matching benadering voor, namelijk One vs. Many Matching, die gericht is op het nieuwe scenario waarbij één vragenszin vaak een antwoord heeft met meerdere zinnen. Verder verbeteren we onze matching aanpak door zowel woord- als zinnenniveau aandacht te gebruiken voor het oplossen van het lawaaierige probleem in de informele tekst. Empirische studies tonen de effectiviteit van de voorgestelde aanpak van vraag-antwoord matching aan.', 'de': 'Frage-Antwort-Matching (QA) ist eine grundlegende Aufgabe in der Natural Language Processing Community. In dieser Arbeit bauen wir zunächst ein neuartiges QA Matching Korpus mit informellem Text auf, der von einer Produkt-Review-Website gesammelt wird. Dann schlagen wir einen neuartigen QA-Matching-Ansatz vor, nämlich One vs. Many Matching, der darauf abzielt, das neuartige Szenario anzugehen, in dem ein Fragesatz oft eine Antwort mit mehreren Sätzen hat. Darüber hinaus verbessern wir unseren Matching-Ansatz, indem wir sowohl auf Wort- als auch auf Satzebene Aufmerksamkeit zur Lösung des lauten Problems im informellen Text einsetzen. Empirische Studien belegen die Wirksamkeit des vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes zum Frage-Antwort-Matching.', 'ko': '문답 일치는 자연 언어 처리 분야의 기본적인 임무이다.본고에서 우리는 먼저 제품 평론 사이트에서 비공식 텍스트를 수집하여 새로운 QA 매칭 자료 라이브러리를 구축한다.그리고 우리는 한 쌍의 다중 매칭 방법, 즉 한 문제 문장에 여러 문장의 답안이 있는 새로운 상황을 해결하기 위한 새로운 문답 매칭 방법을 제시했다.그 밖에 비공식 텍스트의 소음 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 일치하는 방법을 개선하고 단어급과 문장급의 주의를 채택했다.실증 연구는 이 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다.', 'id': 'Pertandingan Pertanyaan-Jawaban (QA) adalah tugas dasar dalam komunitas Proses Bahasa Alami. Dalam kertas ini, kami pertama-tama membangun sebuah novel QA yang cocok corpus dengan teks informal yang dikumpulkan dari situs penelitian produk. Kemudian, kami mengusulkan pendekatan QA novel, yaitu One vs. Many Matching, yang bertujuan untuk mengatasi skenario novel di mana satu kalimat pertanyaan sering memiliki jawaban dengan beberapa kalimat. Selain itu, kita meningkatkan pendekatan persamaan kita dengan menggunakan perhatian tingkat kata dan tingkat kalimat untuk memecahkan masalah bising dalam teks informal. Studi kerajaan menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan yang diusulkan untuk persamaan pertanyaan-jawaban.', 'sw': 'Question-Answer (QA) matching is a fundamental task in the Natural Language Processing community.  Katika karatasi hii, kwanza tunajenga riwaya ya QA inayofanana na maandishi yasiyo rasmi ambayo yanakusanywa kutoka tovuti ya kurekebisha bidhaa. Kisha, tunapendekeza njia inayofanana na riwaya ya QA, yaani Mmoja vs. Wengi wa Matukio, inayokusudia kukabiliana na mtazamo wa riwaya ambapo hukumu moja mara nyingi huwa na majibu yenye hukumu kadhaa. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaboresha mbinu zetu za kibinafsi kwa kutumia hatua za kiwango cha maneno na kiwango cha hukumu kwa kutatua tatizo la kelele katika maandishi yasiyo rasmi. Tafiti za kipekee zinaonyesha ufanisi wa mbinu zilizopendekezwa kupambana na majibu ya maswali.', 'tr': 'Sorag-jogabat (QA) eşleşmek dogal dil işleýän jemgyýetiň esasy zady. Bu kagyzda ilkinji gezek biz QA romany bejerdik we muny informal metin bilen birleştirilýäris. Soňra biz QA täsirli bir roman teklip edip görýäris, diýip-de "One vs. Many Matching", bir soragyň köplenç sözleri bilen bir jogaby bar. Munuň üçin, eşleşen ýagdaýymyzy hem sözler derejesi hem sözler derejesi diňleýän meseläni resmi metinde çözmek üçin gowylaşdyrýarys. Wagtlaýyn öwrenmeler sorag-jogaby täsirlenmegi üçin teklip eden ýagdaýyň täsirini görkezýär.', 'fa': 'مسابقه سوال-پاسخ (QA) یک کار بنیادی در جامعه پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. در این کاغذ، ما اول یک رمان QA با متن غیر معمولی ساختیم که از وبسایت تحقیقات محصولات جمع شده است. سپس، ما یک روش مشابه QA رمانی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یعنی یک vs. بسیاری از مشابه\u200cها، که هدف می\u200cدهد به صحنه\u200cهای رمانی بررسی کند که یک جمله سوال اغلب یک جواب با جمله\u200cهای زیادی دارد. ما با استفاده از توجه به سطح کلمه و سطح مجوز برای حل مشکل صوتی در متن غیر معمولی، روش هماهنگی خود را بهتر می کنیم. مطالعات امپراطوری موثرت روش پیشنهاد برای مسابقه جواب سوال را نشان می دهد.', 'sq': 'QA është një detyrë thelbësore në komunitetin e procesimit të gjuhës natyrore. Në këtë letër, ne së pari ndërtojmë një roman QA që përputhet me një korpus me tekst jozyrtar i cili është mbledhur nga një faqe e shqyrtimit të produkteve. Pastaj, ne propozojmë një metodë të re të përshtatshme QA, veçan ërisht Një kundër Shumë Matching, që synon të trajtojë skenarin e ri ku një fjalë pyetjeje shpesh ka një përgjigje me shumë fjalë. Furthermore, we improve our matching approach by employing both word-level and sentence-level attentions for solving the noisy problem in the informal text.  Studimet perandore tregojnë efektshmërinë e qasjes së propozuar për përputhjen pyetje-përgjigje.', 'af': "Name In hierdie papier bou ons eerste 'n roman QA ooreenstemmende korpus met onformele teks wat versamel word van 'n produkt hersiening webwerp. Dan, ons voorstel 'n roman QA ooreenstemmende toegang, naamlik een teen baie ooreenstemmende, wat doel om die roman scenario te adres waar een vraag seting dikwels 'n antwoord met veelvuldige setnings het. Ons verbeter ons ooreenstemmende toegang deur word-vlak en sentence-vlak aandag te gebruik vir die oplossing van die geluide probleem in die onformele teks. Enige studie wys die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde toegang tot vraag-antwoord ooreenstemmende.", 'az': 'Question-Answer (QA) eşitməsi təbiətli Dil İşləmə cəmiyyətində əsas bir iş. Bu kağızda ilk dəfə QA-lə eşidən korpus yeni bir məktub inşa edirik ki, ürək mühakimə websitəsindən toplanılır. Sonra, biz yeni QA eşitmə metodlarını təbliğ edirik ki, bir neçə sözlə cavab verir. Daha sonra, söz seviyyəti və cümlələr seviyyətini çəkmək üçün səsl problemlərini çəkmək üçün istifadə edərək uyğunlaşdırmağımızı daha yaxşılaşdırırıq. İmparikalı təhsil etmələr sual-cavab eşitməsi üçün təklif edilən təhsil təsirinin etkinliğini göstərir.', 'hy': 'Հարցերի-պատասխանների համապատասխանը բնական լեզվի մշակույթի հիմնական խնդիր է: Այս թղթի մեջ առաջին անգամ մենք կառուցում ենք QA-ի նորարար կորպուս, որը համապատասխանում է ոչ տեղեկատվական տեքստին, որը հավաքվում է արտադրանքների վերանայման վեբ կայքից: Հետո մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր QA համապատասխանման մոտեցում, հատկապես Մեկը հակառակ Շատ համապատասխանում, որը նպատակում է լուծել նոր սցենարիան, որտեղ հարցի նախադասությունը հաճախ ունի բազմաթիվ նախադասություններով պատասխան: Ավելին, մենք բարելավում ենք մեր համապատասխանող մոտեցումը՝ օգտագործելով բառերի և նախադասությունների մակարդակի ուշադրություն ոչ տեղեկատվական տեքստում աղմկոտ խնդիրը լուծելու համար: Իմպրիկական ուսումնասիրությունները ցույց են տալիս հարցերի և պատասխանների համապատասխանման առաջարկած մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը:', 'bs': 'Odgovor na pitanje (QA) odgovara je osnovni zadatak u zajednici procesiranja prirodnog jezika. U ovom papiru, prvi put smo izgradili roman QA odgovarajući korpusu sa neformalnim tekstom koji je skupljen iz stranice pregledanja proizvoda. Onda predlažemo roman QA odgovarajući pristup, a to je jedan protiv mnogih odgovarajućih, koji je cilj da se obratimo novom scenariju gdje jedna rečenica pitanja često ima odgovor sa višestrukim rečenicama. Osim toga, poboljšavamo naš odgovarajući pristup koristeći i pažnju na nivou riječi i na nivou kazne za rješavanje bukovnog problema u neformalnom tekstu. Empiričke studije pokazuju učinkovitost predloženog pristupa odgovoru na pitanje.', 'ca': "La combinació de respostes a preguntes és una tasca fonamental a la comunitat de processament de llenguatges naturals. En aquest article, primer construïm un corpus QA novel que coincidi amb un text informal recollit d'una pàgina web de revisió de productes. Llavors, proposem un nou enfocament d'ajustament QA, és a dir, One vs. Many Matching, que té l'objectiu d'abordar l'escenari nou on una frase de pregunta sovint té una resposta amb múltiples frases. A més, millorem el nostre enfocament d'ajustament emplegant atenció de nivell de paraules i de frases per resoldre el problema sorollós del text informal. Empirical studies demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach to question-answer matching.", 'bn': 'প্রশ্ন- উত্তর (কিউএ) মিলিয়ে ন্যাশনাল ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া সম্প্রদায়ের একটি মৌলিক কাজ। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রথমে কিয়া কোর্পাসের সাথে মিলিত একটি উপন্যাস তৈরি করি যা অফিসাল ল টেক্সটের সাথে সংগ্রহ করা হয়েছে একটি প তারপর আমরা একটি উপন্যাস প্রস্তাব করি যেখানে প্রশ্নের প্রায়শই বেশ কয়েকটি শাস্তি দিয়ে প্রশ্নের উত্তর আছে। তাছাড়াও, আমরা আমাদের মিলিয়া পদক্ষেপ উন্নত করি অফিসাল লেখার মধ্যে আওয়াজ এবং শাস্তি স্তরের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি কাজ করার মাধ্যমে। সামাজিক গবেষণা প্রস্তাবিত প্রশ্নের উত্তর মিলিয়ে প্রশ্নের কার্যক্রমের কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করে।', 'cs': 'Porovnání otázek a odpovědí (QA) je základním úkolem komunity zpracování přirozeného jazyka. V tomto článku nejprve vytvoříme nový korespondenční korpus QA s neformálním textem, který je shromážděn z webových stránek recenze produktů. Následně navrhujeme nový přístup QA matching, konkrétně One vs. Many Matching, jehož cílem je řešit nový scénář, kdy jedna otázková věta má často odpověď s více větami. Dále zlepšujeme náš přístup k ladění tím, že využíváme pozornost na úrovni slova i věty pro řešení hlučného problému v neformálním textu. Empirické studie ukazují účinnost navrženého přístupu k porovnávání otázek a odpovědí.', 'et': 'Küsimus-vastus (QA) sobitamine on loodusliku keele töötlemise kogukonna põhiülesanne. Selles töös ehitame esmalt uudse kvaliteedi tagamise korpuse mitteametliku tekstiga, mis kogutakse tooteülevaate veebisaidilt. Seejärel pakume välja uudse kvaliteedi tagamise lähenemisviisi, nimelt üks vs. paljud sobitamine, mille eesmärk on käsitleda uudset stsenaariumi, kus ühel küsimuslausel on sageli vastus mitme lausega. Lisaks parandame oma lähenemisviisi, kasutades mitteametlikus tekstis müraka probleemi lahendamiseks nii sõna- kui lausetasemelist tähelepanu. Empiirilised uuringud näitavad küsimuste ja vastuste sobitamise kavandatud lähenemisviisi tõhusust.', 'am': 'ጥያቄ-መልስ (QA) በአዳባዊ ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክት ማህበረሰብ መጀመሪያ ስራ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ በመጀመሪያ የካርፓስ አካባቢ ጽሑፍ የተሰብሰብን የሀብት መልዕክት ድረ ገጽ የተሰበሰቡትን የQA የመረጃ ጉዳይ እንሠራለን፡፡ የዚያን ጊዜም አንድ ጥያቄ መልስ በብዙ ደንዳቤዎች መልስ በሚኖርበት የረኀብ እውቀት ለማቀናቀል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የድምፅ ጉዳይ በአካላቢው ጽሑፍ ውስጥ እና የቃላት ደረጃ እና የፍርድ ደረጃ ስብሰባዎችን በመቀጠል እናሳድጋለን፡፡ የውይይት ትምህርት የጥያቄውን መልስ ለመቀበል ጥያቄን የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡', 'fi': 'Kysymys-vastaus (QA) vastaaminen on perustavanlaatuinen tehtävä luonnollisen kielen prosessointiyhteisössä. Tässä artikkelissa rakennamme ensin uuden laadunvarmistuskorpuksen, jossa on epämuodollinen teksti, joka kerätään tuotearviointisivustolta. Tämän jälkeen ehdotamme uutta laadunvarmistusmenetelmää, nimittäin One vs. Many Matching, jonka tavoitteena on käsitellä uutta skenaariota, jossa yksi kysymyslause usein vastaa useilla lauseilla. Lisäksi parannamme vastaavuutta käyttämällä sekä sana- että lausetason huomiota epävirallisen tekstin meluisan ongelman ratkaisemiseksi. Empiiriset tutkimukset osoittavat ehdotetun lähestymistavan tehokkuuden kysymys-vastaus-vastaavuuteen.', 'jv': 'Name Nang pemilih iki, awak dhéwé nggawe perusahaan batir Nanging, kéné gunakake perusahaan kelompok, sampeyan Nom karo. Siji Sampeyan sing apik, sing mau nggawe barang keleyané perusahaan seneng pisan sing apik dhéwé sapa kesempatan sing ngomong karo kapan Jung. Lah tambah, awak dhéwé luwih-luwih akeh sampeyan nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe barang langgar sampeyan kuwi nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe gerakan salamat seneng ketahan ora oleh. Workspace', 'ha': "QA Daga wannan takardan, muna samar da wani matsayi QA mai daidai da matsayin da ba'a rasmi ba da kuma aka sama daga wani bangon mafarinta. Sa'an nan kuma, muna goyyar da wani matsayin QA mai daidaita matsayin, kamar ɗabi'a, masu motsa masu yawa masu Matching, wanda ke yi nufin su yi magana ga fassaran nowaya a inda cewa guda ta ƙara wani matsayi yana da jibi masu yawa. Furan haka, za mu gyãra hanyarmu mai daidai game da kutumia sauri-daraja da alama-zuwa ga cewa dõmin sola matabbata ta sauti cikin matsayin da ba'a rasa ba. Ana karatun Empirical sun nuna fassarar shiryarwa da aka buƙata wa masu sami da tambayar.", 'he': 'התאמה של תשובות לשאלות (QA) היא משימה בסיסית בקהילת תהליך השפה הטבעית. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו קודם בונים רומן QA מתאים קורפוס עם טקסט לא רשמי שנאסף מאתר ביקורת מוצרים. ואז, אנו מציעים גישה מתאימה לרומן QA, כלומר אחד נגד רבים מתאימים, שמתכוון להתמודד עם התרחיש הרומני שבו משפט שאלה אחד לעתים קרובות יש תשובה עם משפטים רבים. בנוסף, אנחנו משתפרים את הגישה התאמה שלנו על ידי השימוש תשומת לב רמת מילים ורמת המשפט לפתור את הבעיה הרעשנית בטקסט לא רשמי. מחקרים אימפריים מראים את היעילות של הגישה המוצעת לתאמת תשובות-שאלות.', 'sk': 'Ujemanje vprašanj in odgovorov (QA) je temeljna naloga v skupnosti za obdelavo naravnega jezika. V tem prispevku smo najprej zgradili nov korpus za ugotavljanje kakovosti z neformalnim besedilom, ki je zbran na spletni strani za pregled izdelkov. Nato predlagamo nov pristop ujemanja kakovosti, in sicer ena proti mnogim ujemanjem, katerega cilj je obravnavati nov scenarij, kjer ima en vprašalni stavek pogosto odgovor z več stavki. Poleg tega izboljšujemo naš pristop usklajevanja z uporabo besedne in stavkovne pozornosti za reševanje hrupnega problema v neformalnem besedilu. Empirične študije kažejo učinkovitost predlaganega pristopa k usklajevanju vprašanj in odgovorov.', 'bo': 'Question-Answer (QA)མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ནི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་མཐུན་ནུས་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་གཙོ་རིམ་ཞིག་ཡིན། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཐོག་མའི་རྩོམ་པ་ཞིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། དེ་ནས་འུ་ཚོས་ཀྱིས་རྩིས་གཏོང་ཐོག་ལས་QA་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་མི་འདྲ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་འཇུག་སྐྱོ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་ཚིག་གི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེས་པའི་དཀའ་རི གཟུགས་རིས་གྱི་ལས་སྦྱོར་བ་དེ་ནི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཟིན་བྲིས་བ་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གི་གོ་སྐབས་དཔལ་འབྱོར་བ་ཡི'}
{'en': 'ReSyf : a French lexicon with ranked synonyms', 'ar': 'ReSyf: معجم فرنسي مع المرادفات المرتبة', 'pt': 'ReSyf: um léxico francês com sinônimos classificados', 'fr': 'ReSyF\xa0: un lexique français avec des synonymes classés', 'es': 'ReSYF: un léxico francés con sinónimos clasificados', 'ja': 'ReSyf:ランク付けされた代名詞を持つフランス語の辞書', 'zh': 'ReSyf:同义词法语词典', 'ru': 'ReSyf: французский лексикон с ранжированными синонимами', 'hi': 'ReSyf: रैंक किए गए पर्यायवाची के साथ एक फ्रांसीसी शब्दकोश', 'ga': 'ReSyf: foclóir Fraincise a bhfuil comhchiallaigh rangaithe aige', 'ka': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'hu': 'ReSyf: francia lexikon rangsorolt szinonimákkal', 'el': 'ReSyf: ένα γαλλικό λεξικό με ταξινομημένα συνώνυμα', 'it': 'ReSyf: un lessico francese con sinonimi classificati', 'kk': 'Ресиф: реттік синонимдермен французша лексикасыQuery', 'mk': 'ReSyf: a French lexicon with ranked synonyms', 'lt': 'ReSyf: a French lexicon with ranked synonyms', 'mt': 'ReSyf: lexicon Franċiż b’sinonimi kklassifikati', 'ms': 'ReSyf: a French lexicon with ranked synonyms', 'pl': 'ReSyf: francuski leksykon z synonimami rankingowymi', 'ml': 'റെസിഫ്: ഒരു ഫ്രെഞ്ച് ലെക്സിക്കോണ്\u200d റാങ്ങ് സിനോണിമുകളുള്ള', 'mn': 'Ресиф: хэмжээтэй Француз хэл', 'ro': 'ReSyf: un lexicon francez cu sinonime clasate', 'si': 'Description', 'no': 'ReSyf: ein fransk leksikon med rankert synonym', 'sv': 'ReSyf: ett franskt lexikon med rangordnade synonymer', 'sr': 'ReSyf: francuski leksikon sa redovnim sinonima', 'ur': 'ReSyf: ایک فرانسوی لکسیون جس کا رنگ سینونیم ہے', 'so': 'ReSyf: French lexicon with ranked synonyms', 'ta': 'ReSyf: ஒரு பிரெஞ்சு லெக்சிகோன்', 'vi': 'ReSyf: một ngôn ngữ Pháp với đồng nghĩa thứ hạng', 'uz': 'ReSyf: Name', 'bg': 'Френски лексикон с класирани синоними', 'nl': 'ReSyf: een Frans lexicon met gerangschikte synoniemen', 'da': 'ReSyf: et fransk leksikon med rangerede synonymer', 'hr': 'ReSyf: francuski leksikon s rangiranim sinonima', 'de': 'ReSyf: ein französisches Lexikon mit gerankten Synonymen', 'id': 'ReSyf: a French lexicon with ranked synonyms', 'ko': 'ReSyf: 동의어의 순서가 있는 프랑스어 단어', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'ReSyf: Leksisi ya Kifaransa yenye ushirikiano wa rangi', 'tr': 'Resif: synonymlary bilen fransuzça dilinde', 'af': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sq': 'ReSyf: a French lexicon with ranked synonyms', 'am': 'ReSyf: French Lexicon with ranked synonyms', 'az': 'ReSyf: d…ôr…ôc…ôli sinoniml…ôr olan Fransƒ±z dili', 'bn': 'রিসিফ: র\u200d্যান্ড সিনোনিমের সাথে ফ্রেঞ্চ লেক্সিকোন', 'hy': 'Re', 'ca': 'ReSyf: un lexicó francès amb sinònims classificats', 'cs': 'ReSyf: francouzský lexikon s hodnocenými synonymi', 'bs': 'ReSyf: francuski leksikon sa redovnim sinonima', 'et': 'ReSyf: prantsuse leksikon järjestatud sünonüümidega', 'fi': 'ReSyf: ranskan sanasto, jossa on luokiteltuja synonyymejä', 'jv': 'Language', 'sk': 'ReSyf: francoski leksikon z uvrščenimi sinonimi', 'he': 'ReSyf: a French lexicon with ranked synonyms', 'bo': 'ReSyf: སྐར་ཡིག་གི་མཚོན་རྟགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཤིག་དང་།', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name'}
{'en': 'In this article, we present ReSyf, a lexical resource of monolingual synonyms ranked according to their difficulty to be read and understood by native learners of French. The synonyms come from an existing lexical network and they have been semantically disambiguated and refined. A ranking algorithm, based on a wide range of linguistic features and validated through an evaluation campaign with human annotators, automatically sorts the synonyms corresponding to a given word sense by reading difficulty. ReSyf is freely available and will be integrated into a web platform for reading assistance. It can also be applied to perform lexical simplification of French texts.', 'ar': 'في هذه المقالة ، نقدم ReSyf ، وهو مورد معجمي من المرادفات أحادية اللغة مرتبة وفقًا لصعوبة قراءتها وفهمها من قبل متعلمي اللغة الفرنسية الأصليين. تأتي المرادفات من شبكة معجمية موجودة وقد تم توضيحها وتنقيحها لغويًا. تقوم خوارزمية التصنيف ، التي تستند إلى مجموعة واسعة من الميزات اللغوية والتي تم التحقق من صحتها من خلال حملة تقييم مع المعلقين البشريين ، بفرز المرادفات المقابلة لمعنى كلمة معين تلقائيًا عن طريق صعوبة القراءة. ReSyf متاح مجانًا وسيتم دمجه في منصة ويب للمساعدة في القراءة. يمكن أيضًا تطبيقه لإجراء تبسيط معجمي للنصوص الفرنسية.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos o ReSyf, um recurso lexical de sinônimos monolíngues classificados de acordo com sua dificuldade de leitura e compreensão por aprendizes nativos de francês. Os sinônimos vêm de uma rede lexical existente e foram semanticamente desambiguados e refinados. Um algoritmo de classificação, baseado em uma ampla gama de recursos linguísticos e validado por meio de uma campanha de avaliação com anotadores humanos, classifica automaticamente os sinônimos correspondentes a um determinado sentido de palavra por dificuldade de leitura. O ReSyf está disponível gratuitamente e será integrado a uma plataforma web para auxílio à leitura. Também pode ser aplicado para realizar a simplificação lexical de textos em francês.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos ReSYF, un recurso léxico de sinónimos monolingües clasificados según su dificultad para ser leídos y entendidos por los estudiantes nativos de francés. Los sinónimos provienen de una red léxica existente y han sido desambiguados y refinados semánticamente. Un algoritmo de clasificación, basado en una amplia gama de características lingüísticas y validado a través de una campaña de evaluación con anotadores humanos, clasifica automáticamente los sinónimos correspondientes a un sentido de palabra dado por dificultad de lectura. ReSYF está disponible gratuitamente y se integrará en una plataforma web para la asistencia de lectura. También se puede aplicar para realizar simplificaciones léxicas de textos franceses.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons ReSyF, une ressource lexicale de synonymes monolingues classés en fonction de leur difficulté à être lus et compris par les apprenants natifs du français. Les synonymes proviennent d'un réseau lexical existant et ont été désambiguïsés et affinés du point de vue sémantique. Un algorithme de classement, basé sur un large éventail de caractéristiques linguistiques et validé par une campagne d'évaluation avec des annotateurs humains, trie automatiquement les synonymes correspondant à un sens de mot donné en fonction de la difficulté de lecture. ReSyF est disponible gratuitement et sera intégré à une plateforme Web d'aide à la lecture. Il peut également être appliqué pour effectuer une simplification lexicale de textes français.", 'ja': 'この記事では、フランス語のネイティブ学習者が読み理解することの難しさに応じてランク付けされた単一言語の代名詞の語彙リソースであるReSyfを紹介します。同義語は既存の語彙ネットワークから来ており、意味的に曖昧さを取り除き、洗練されています。幅広い言語的特徴に基づいて、人間の注釈者との評価キャンペーンを通じて検証されたランキングアルゴリズムは、難易度を読み取ることによって、与えられた単語センスに対応する同義語を自動的に並べ替えます。ReSyfは無料で利用でき、読書支援のためのWebプラットフォームに統合されます。また、フランス語のテキストの単純化を行うためにも適用することができる。', 'zh': '本文中,将介ReSyf,此单语同义词之词汇资,因其法语母语学者读解之难而名之也。 同义词自见词汇网络,语义消歧义善。 名算法者,广言特征,以人伦注器之评验之,可据读难度自对给定词义之同义词序之。 ReSyf者,免费供也,集为网络平台中,以供读助。 其亦可以法语文本词法简。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем ReSyf, лексический ресурс одноязычных синонимов, ранжированных по их сложности для чтения и понимания носителями французского языка. Синонимы происходят из существующей лексической сети и были семантически разобщены и уточнены. Алгоритм ранжирования, основанный на широком диапазоне лингвистических особенностей и проверенный с помощью кампании оценки с человеческими аннотаторами, автоматически сортирует синонимы, соответствующие данному значению слова, по сложности чтения. ReSyf доступен в свободном доступе и будет интегрирован в веб-платформу для помощи в чтении. Он также может быть применен для выполнения лексического упрощения французских текстов.', 'hi': 'इस लेख में, हम ReSyf प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो फ्रांसीसी के मूल शिक्षार्थियों द्वारा पढ़ने और समझने में उनकी कठिनाई के अनुसार रैंक किए गए मोनोलिंगुअल पर्यायवाची का एक लेक्सिकल संसाधन है। समानार्थक शब्द एक मौजूदा लेक्सिकल नेटवर्क से आते हैं और उन्हें शब्दार्थ रूप से विभाजित और परिष्कृत किया गया है। एक रैंकिंग एल्गोरिथ्म, भाषाई विशेषताओं की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला पर आधारित है और मानव एनोटेटर के साथ एक मूल्यांकन अभियान के माध्यम से मान्य है, स्वचालित रूप से कठिनाई को पढ़कर किसी दिए गए शब्द अर्थ के अनुरूप समानार्थक शब्द ों को सॉर्ट करता है। ReSyf स्वतंत्र रूप से उपलब्ध है और पढ़ने की सहायता के लिए एक वेब प्लेटफ़ॉर्म में एकीकृत किया जाएगा। इसे फ्रांसीसी ग्रंथों के लेक्सिकल सरलीकरण के लिए भी लागू किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'San alt seo, cuirimid i láthair ReSyf, acmhainn fhoclóra de chomhchiallacha aonteangacha atá rangaithe de réir a ndeacrachtaí le léamh agus le tuiscint ag foghlaimeoirí dúchais na Fraincise. Tagann na comhchiallaigh ó líonra foclóireachta atá ann cheana féin agus rinneadh iad a dhídhébhriú agus a scagadh go semantach. Déanann algartam rangú, atá bunaithe ar raon leathan de ghnéithe teangeolaíochta agus arna bhailíochtú trí fheachtas meastóireachta le anótálaithe daonna, na comhchiallaigh a fhreagraíonn do chiall focal ar leith a shórtáil go huathoibríoch de réir deacrachta léitheoireachta. Tá fáil saor in aisce ar ReSyf agus déanfar é a chomhtháthú in ardán gréasáin le haghaidh cúnamh léitheoireachta. Is féidir é a chur i bhfeidhm freisin chun simpliú foclóireachta a dhéanamh ar théacsanna Fraincise.', 'el': 'Σε αυτό το άρθρο, παρουσιάζουμε το ReSyf, έναν λεξικό πόρο μονογλωσσών συνώνυμων που ταξινομούνται ανάλογα με τη δυσκολία ανάγνωσης και κατανόησής τους από τους ιθαγενείς μαθητές των γαλλικών. Τα συνώνυμα προέρχονται από ένα υπάρχον λεξικό δίκτυο και έχουν διασαφηνιστεί και εξευγενιστεί σημασιολογικά. Ένας αλγόριθμος κατάταξης, βασισμένος σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών και επικυρωμένος μέσω μιας εκστρατείας αξιολόγησης με ανθρώπινους σχολιαστές, ταξινομεί αυτόματα τα συνώνυμα που αντιστοιχούν σε μια δεδομένη έννοια λέξης με δυσκολία ανάγνωσης. Το ReSyf είναι ελεύθερα διαθέσιμο και θα ενσωματωθεί σε μια διαδικτυακή πλατφόρμα για βοήθεια ανάγνωσης. Μπορεί επίσης να εφαρμοστεί για την εκτέλεση λεξικής απλούστευσης γαλλικών κειμένων.', 'hu': 'Ebben a cikkben bemutatjuk a ReSyf-et, az egynyelvű szinonimák lexikális forrását, amely a francia anyanyelvű tanulók által olvasható és megérthető nehézségek szerint rendezett. A szinonimák egy meglévő lexikai hálózatból származnak, és szemantikailag egyértelműen egyértelműek és finomítottak. A nyelvi jellemzők széles skáláján alapuló rangsorolási algoritmus, amelyet emberi kommentátorokkal végzett értékelő kampány segítségével validáltak, automatikusan rendezi az adott szóérzéknek megfelelő szinonimákat olvasási nehézségek alapján. A ReSyf ingyenesen elérhető és beépíthető egy webes platformba az olvasási segítségnyújtás céljából. Alkalmazható a francia szövegek lexikai egyszerűsítésére is.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo ReSyf, una risorsa lessicale di sinonimi monolingue classificati in base alla loro difficoltà di essere letti e compresi dagli studenti madrelingua del francese. I sinonimi provengono da una rete lessicale esistente e sono stati semanticamente disambiguati e raffinati. Un algoritmo di ranking, basato su una vasta gamma di caratteristiche linguistiche e convalidato attraverso una campagna di valutazione con annotatori umani, ordina automaticamente i sinonimi corrispondenti a un dato senso di parola per difficoltà di lettura. ReSyf è liberamente disponibile e sarà integrato in una piattaforma web per l'assistenza alla lettura. Può anche essere applicato per eseguire la semplificazione lessicale dei testi francesi.", 'kk': 'Бұл мақалада, біз РеSyf-ді, французша негізгі оқыту және түсініктіру қиындығына сәйкес келген монолингі синонимдердің лексикалық ресурсын көрсетедік. Синонимдер бар лексикалық желінен келеді және олар semantically бұғатталған және түзетілді. Лингистикалық мүмкіндіктердің көпшілігіне негізделген және адамдардың жаңалықтарды бағалау кампаниясы арқылы бағалау алгоритмі автоматты түрде келтірілген сөздердің сезіміне сәйкес келетін синонимдерді ретте ReSyf жеткізілген және оқу көмегімен веб- платформасына ендіріледі. Француз мәтіндерін лексикалық қарапайымдастыру үшін қолдануға болады.', 'ka': 'ამ წილაკში ჩვენ რესიფის ლექსიკალური რესუნომის მონოლენგური სინონიმის რეგისური, რომელიც მათი განრთულებების შესახებ დავწერა და გავიგეთ ფრანგური მასწავლებელი. სინონიმები არსებობს ლექსიკალური ქსელიდან და ისინი სენმანტიკურად განსხვავებულია და გარეფიქრებულია. რენგურაციის ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც სინონიმების უფრო დიდი რეგიზიმისტიკური ფუნქციების განსაზღვრებით და რომელიც ადამიანის ანტოტორიების განსაზღვრებით გადაწყენებულია, ავტომატურად სინონიმები,  ReSyf არის თავისუფალურად ხელმისაწყებელი და იქნება ინტერგურაცია ვებ პლატატატიში სახელსაწყისთვის. ეს შეიძლება ასევე გამოყენება ტრანუსის ტექსტის ლექსიკალური განსხვავება.', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje pristatome ReSyf, vienakalbių sinonimų, klasifikuojamų pagal jų sunkumus, kuriuos skaito ir supranta vietiniai prancūzų mokytojai. Sinonimai gaunami iš esamo leksinio tinklo ir buvo semantiškai išaiškinti ir patobulinti. Klasifikavimo algoritmas, pagrįstas įvairiomis kalbinėmis savybėmis ir patvirtintas atliekant vertinimo kampaniją su žmogaus anotatoriais, automatiškai suskirsto sinonimus, atitinkančius tam tikrą žodžio prasmę, skaitydamas sunkumus. ReSyf yra laisvai prieinamas ir bus integruotas į skaitymo pagalbos interneto platform ą. Jis taip pat gali būti taikomas prancūzų tekstų tekstams supaprastinti.', 'mk': 'In this article, we present ReSyf, a lexical resource of monolingual synonyms ranked according to their difficulty to be read and understood by native learners of French.  Синонимите доаѓаат од постојана лексикална мрежа и се семантично дебабигирани и рафинирани. Алгоритм за рангирање, базиран на широк опсег на јазички карактеристики и валидиран преку проценка кампања со човечки анотатори, автоматски ги сортира синонимите кои одговараат на одредено зборно чувство со читање на тешкотии. ReSyf е слободно достапен и ќе биде интегриран во веб платформа за читање помош. Исто така, може да се примени и за спроведување на лексикално поедноставување на француските тексти.', 'ms': 'Dalam artikel ini, kami memperkenalkan ReSyf, sumber leksikal dari sinonim monobahasa yang dipilih mengikut kesulitan mereka untuk dibaca dan dipahami oleh pelajar asli Perancis. Sinonim berasal dari rangkaian leksikal yang wujud dan ia telah disambiguasi secara semantik dan ditetapkan. Algoritma peringkat, berdasarkan julat luas ciri-ciri bahasa dan disahkan melalui kampanye penilaian dengan pengantar manusia, secara automatik isih sinonim yang sepadan dengan sensasi perkataan yang diberi dengan kesulitan membaca. ReSyf tersedia secara bebas dan akan disertai ke dalam platform web untuk pembacaan bantuan. Ia juga boleh dilaksanakan untuk melakukan pemudahan leksikal teks Perancis.', 'mt': 'F’dan l-artikolu, nippreżentaw ReSyf, riżorsa lexika ta’ sinonimi monolingwi kklassifikati skont id-diffikultà tagħhom li jinqraw u jinftiehmu minn studenti nattivi tal-Franċiż. Is-sinonimi ġejjin minn netwerk lexiku eżistenti u ġew disambigwati u raffinati semantikament. Algoritmu ta’ klassifikazzjoni, ibbażat fuq firxa wiesgħa ta’ karatteristiċi lingwistiċi u vvalidat permezz ta’ kampanja ta’ evalwazzjoni ma’ annotaturi umani, awtomatikament jorganizza s-sinonimi li jikkorrispondu għal sens ta’ kelma partikolari billi jaqra diffikultà. ReSyf huwa disponibbli b’mod ħieles u se jiġi integrat f’pjattaforma tal-internet għall-assistenza fil-qari. Jista’ jiġi applikat ukoll biex isir semplifikazzjoni lexika tat-testi Franċiżi.', 'mn': 'Энэ бичлэгт бид Ресиф-г Французын сурагчид уншиж, ойлгох хэцүү хэцүү хэмжээний нэг хэлний хэлбэрээр илэрхийлж байна. Үүнийг суурилсан хэлний сүлжээгээс гарч ирсэн бөгөөд тэд үр дүнтэй холбоотой, сэргээгдсэн. Хүмүүсийн нэр дэвшүүлэгчтэй дүгнэх кампанийг ашиглан олон хэлний мэдрэмжтэй холбогдсон алгоритм нь автоматаар хэцүү зүйлсийг уншиж өгсөн үгний мэдрэмжтэй холбогдож байдаг. ReSyf чөлөөтэй болон унших тусламжтайгаар веб-платформад нэгтгэгдэж байна. Мөн Французын текстүүдийг илүү хялбарчлах үед ашиглаж болно.', 'ml': 'ഈ ലേഖനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d റെസിഫിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഫ്രെഞ്ചിന്\u200dറെ നാട്ടിലെ പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d വായിക്കുകയും മനസ്സിലാക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന ഒര നിലവിലുള്ള ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200dവര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള സിനോണികള്\u200d വന്നിരിക്കുന്നു. അവയെ സെമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d വി ഒരു റാങ്ങിംഗ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം, വിശാലമായ ഭാഷ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിലാസപ്രകാരം മുഖേന നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്യാമം മ റെസിഫ് സ്വതന്ത്ര്യമായി ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു. സഹായം വായിക്കുന്നതിനായി വെബ് പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമിലേക്ക് ഒരുമിച It can also be applied to perform lexical simplification of French texts.', 'ro': 'În acest articol, vă prezentăm ReSyf, o resursă lexicală de sinonime monolingve clasificate în funcție de dificultatea lor de a fi citite și înțelese de către cursanții nativi de franceză. Sinonimele provin dintr-o rețea lexicală existentă și au fost dezambiguizate și rafinate semantic. Un algoritm de clasificare, bazat pe o gamă largă de caracteristici lingvistice și validat printr-o campanie de evaluare cu adnotatori umani, sortează automat sinonimele corespunzătoare unui anumit sens de cuvânt în funcție de dificultatea de citire. ReSyf este disponibil gratuit și va fi integrat într-o platformă web pentru asistență la citire. Acesta poate fi, de asemenea, aplicat pentru a efectua simplificarea lexicală a textelor franceze.', 'sr': 'U ovom članku predstavljamo ReSyf a, leksički resurs monojezičkih sinonima koji je postavljen prema njihovim teškoćima da se čitaju i razumeju rodni učenici francuskog. Sinonimi dolaze iz postojeće leksičke mreže i semantički su dezambiguirani i ispravljeni. Ranjeni algoritam, zasnovan na širokom nizu lingvističkih karakteristika i potvrđen kroz procjenu kampanje sa ljudskim annotatorima, automatski sortira sinonime koji odgovaraju određenom smislu reči èitanjem teškoće. ReSyf je slobodno dostupan i bit će integrisan u web platformu za čitanje pomoći. Može se primjenjivati i za provedbu leksičkog pojednostavljanja francuskih tekstova.', 'no': 'I denne artikkelen presenterer vi ReSyf ein leksisk ressurs med monolinguiske synonym som er rankert etter deres vanskelegheten å lesast og forstårast av dei lokale lærarar av fransk. Synonymsane kommer frå eit eksisterande leksisk nettverk og dei er semantisk skildra og refinerte. Ein rankeringsalgoritme, basert på eit brett område linguistiske funksjonar og validert gjennom ein evalueringskampanje med menneske annotatorar, sorterer automatisk synonymmene som passar til eit gitt ordfølelse ved å lesa vanskelegheten. ReSyf er fritt tilgjengeleg og vert integrert i eit nettplattform for lesing av hjelp. Det kan også brukast for å utføra leksisk forenkling av fransk tekst.', 'pl': 'W tym artykule przedstawiamy ReSyf, leksykalne źródło synonimów jednojęzycznych klasyfikowane według ich trudności do odczytania i zrozumienia przez rodzimych uczących się języka francuskiego. Synonymy pochodzą z istniejącej sieci leksykalicznej i zostały one semantycznie rozproszone i dopracowane. Algorytm rankingowy, oparty na szerokim zakresie cech językowych i zweryfikowany poprzez kampanię ewaluacyjną z użyciem anotatorów ludzkich, automatycznie sortuje synonimy odpowiadające danemu sensowi słowa według trudności czytania. ReSyf jest darmowo dostępny i zostanie zintegrowany z platformą internetową pomocy w czytaniu. Może być również stosowany do wykonywania leksykalnego uproszczenia tekstów francuskich.', 'sv': 'I den här artikeln presenterar vi ReSyf, en lexikal resurs av enspråkiga synonymer rangordnade efter deras svårighet att läsas och förstås av infödda elever i franska. Synonymerna kommer från ett existerande lexikalt nätverk och de har semantiskt ogiltigförklarats och förfinats. En rankningsalgoritm, baserad på ett brett spektrum av språkliga egenskaper och validerad genom en utvärderingskampanj med mänskliga kommentatorer, sorterar automatiskt synonymer som motsvarar ett givet ordsinne efter lässvårigheter. ReSyf är fritt tillgängligt och kommer att integreras i en webbplattform för läshjälp. Det kan också tillämpas för att utföra lexikal förenkling av franska texter.', 'so': 'Maktabadan waxaynu keenaynaa ReSyf, taas oo ah qalabka qofka afka ah oo ay leeyihiin dhibaatooyinkoodu ay tahay in la akhriyo oo la garto barashada afkiisa hooyo. Sixiriintu waxay ka yimaadaan shabakadda joogta oo leksikal ah, waana la kala beddelay oo la cusboonaysiiyey. Algoritm, oo ku saleysan tayooyin luuqadeed oo kala duduwan oo lagu xaqiijiyey baaritaanka qiimeynta dadka, wuxuu si automati ah u kala soocaa synonyamka oo u eg waxyaabaha la qoray oo ku haboon karo dhibaatada akhriska. ReSyf wuxuu si xor ah u heli karaa, waxaana lagu qabsan karaa shabakadda caawimaadda akhrinta. Sidoo kale waxaa lagu codsan karaa fududeynta qoraalka Faraansiinta.', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනයේදී, අපි ReSyf වෙනුවෙන්, එක භාෂාවක් සිනෝනිමයේ ලෙක්සිකල් සම්පූර්ණයක් තියෙන්නේ ඔවුන්ගේ අමාරුවන්ගෙන් ක සිනෝනිමය් තියෙන්නේ ලෙක්සිකාල් ජාලයෙන් ඉන්නවා ඒ වගේම ඔවුන් සාමාන්තික විශේෂයෙන් නැති වෙලා  රැජින් ඇල්ගෝරිතම්, භාෂාවික විශේෂතාවක් සඳහා විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් සඳහා විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාපනය සඳහා විශේෂ කරලා තියෙන්නේ මි @ info ඒක ප්\u200dරේන්ස් පාළුවන්ගේ ලෙක්සිකල් සංවේදනය කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'ta': 'இந்த கட்டுரையில், நாங்கள் ரெசிஃப் காண்பிக்கிறோம், ஒரு மோனோலிசியல் ஒத்திசைப்புகளின் மூலத்தை அவர்கள் பிரெஞ்சு கற்பவர்களால் படிக்கப்பட இருக்கும் லெக்சிக்சியல் வலைப்பின்னலிலிருந்து ஒத்திசைவுகள் வருகின்றன மற்றும் அவர்கள் அரைமுறையாக பிரித்த A ranking algorithm, based on a wide range of linguistic features and validated through an evaluation campaign with human annotators, automatically sorts the synonyms corresponding to a given word sense by reading difficulty.  ReSyf இலவச கிடைக்கும் மற்றும் படிக்க உதவியை படிக்க ஒரு வலைத்தளத்தில் ஒன்றாக்கப்படும். பிரெஞ்சு உரைகளின் லெக்சிக்சியல் எளிதாக்கத்தை செயல்படுத்த முடியும்.', 'ur': 'اس مقالہ میں ہم نے ریسیف کو ایک زبان کی سینونیم کے ایک لکھی منبع مقرر کیا ہے جو ان کی سختی کے مطابق پڑھنے اور سمجھنے کی کوشش ہے۔ سینونیم ایک موجود لکسیکل نیٹ ورک سے آتے ہیں اور وہ سیمانٹی طور پر غلط اور پاکیزہ کیے گئے ہیں۔ ایک رینگ الگوریتم، زبان شناسی ویژہ پر بنیاد ہے اور انسان کے ذریعہ مطابق کے ذریعہ مطابق مطابق کیا گیا ہے، سئنومیوں کو اپنا ذریعہ دکھاتا ہے جو مشکل پڑھنے کے ذریعہ ایک لفظ سمجھ کے مطابق ملتے ہیں. ReSyf freely available and will be integrated into a web platform for reading assistance. اس کو بھی فرانسوی پیغام کے لکھنے کے لئے لازم کر سکتا ہے.', 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi giới thiệu ReSyf, một tài nguyên từ vựng với đồng nghĩa ngôn ngữ chung xếp hạng theo độ khó đọc và hiểu của họ bởi người học tiếng Pháp bẩm sinh. Từ đồng nghĩa đến từ một mạng lưới ngôn ngữ có tồn tại và chúng theo ngữ nghĩa thì bị biến đổi và phức tạp. Một thuật to án xếp hạng, dựa trên một loạt các tính năng ngôn ngữ rộng và được xác định qua một chiến dịch đánh giá với người ghi chú, tự động khắc âm tương đương với một từ có nghĩa bằng cách đọc khó khăn. ReSyf có thể tự do có sẵn và sẽ được hòa nhập vào một tổ chức chuyên đọc hỗ trợ. Nó cũng có thể được áp dụng cho việc đơn giản ngôn ngữ Pháp.', 'uz': 'In this article, we present ReSyf, a lexical resource of monolingual synonyms ranked according to their difficulty to be read and understood by native learners of French.  Name Name ReSyf buyruq mavjud, va yordam oʻqish uchun veb- platformga birlashtiriladi. Bu esa Fransuz matnlarining leksikal soddalashni bajarish uchun qoʻllaniladi.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we ReSyf, een lexicale bron van eentalige synoniemen gerangschikt op basis van hun moeilijkheid om gelezen en begrepen te worden door native cursisten van het Frans. De synoniemen komen uit een bestaand lexicaal netwerk en zijn semantisch verduidelijkt en verfijnd. Een rankingsalgoritme, gebaseerd op een breed scala aan taalkundige kenmerken en gevalideerd door middel van een evaluatiecampagne met menselijke annotatoren, sorteert automatisch de synoniemen die overeenkomen met een bepaalde woordzin op leesmoeilijkheid. ReSyf is gratis beschikbaar en zal worden geïntegreerd in een webplatform voor leeshulp. Het kan ook worden toegepast om lexicale vereenvoudiging van Franse teksten uit te voeren.', 'bg': 'В тази статия представяме лексикален ресурс от едноезични синоними, класирани според трудността им за четене и разбиране от местните ученици на френски език. Синонимите идват от съществуваща лексикална мрежа и са семантично недвусмислени и усъвършенствани. Алгоритъм за класиране, базиран на широк спектър от езикови характеристики и валидиран чрез кампания за оценка с човешки анотатори, автоматично сортира синонимите, съответстващи на даден смисъл на думата, чрез трудност при четене. Резиф е свободно достъпен и ще бъде интегриран в уеб платформа за подпомагане на четенето. Тя може да се прилага и за извършване на лексикално опростяване на френски текстове.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi ReSyf, en leksikalsk ressource af ensprogede synonymer rangeret efter deres vanskeligheder at blive læst og forstået af indfødte elever i fransk. Synonymerne stammer fra et eksisterende leksikalsk netværk, og de er semantisk forstået og raffineret. En rangeringsalgoritme, der er baseret på en lang række sproglige funktioner og valideret gennem en evalueringskampagne med menneskelige kommentatorer, sorterer automatisk synonymerne svarende til en given ordsans efter læsesvanskeligheder. ReSyf er frit tilgængelig og vil blive integreret i en webplatform til læsehjælp. Det kan også anvendes til at udføre leksiksk forenkling af franske tekster.', 'hr': 'U ovom članku predstavljamo ReSyf, leksički resurs monojezičkih sinonima koji je postavljen prema njihovim teškoćima da se čitaju i razumiju rodni učenici francuskog. Sinonimi dolaze iz postojeće leksičke mreže i semantički su dezambiguirani i ispravljeni. Postavljajući algoritam, temeljen na širokom rasponu jezičkih karakteristika i potvrđen kroz procjenu kampanje s ljudskim annotatorima, automatski sortira sinonime koji odgovaraju određenom smislu riječi čitanjem teškoće. ReSyf je slobodno dostupan i bit će integriran u web platformu za čitanje pomoći. Može se primjenjivati i za provedbu leksičkog pojednostavljanja francuskih tekstova.', 'id': 'Dalam artikel ini, kami memperkenalkan ReSyf, sumber daya leksik dari sinonim monobahasa yang dipilih berdasarkan kesulitan mereka untuk dibaca dan dipahami oleh pelajar asli bahasa Perancis. Sinonima-sinonyma berasal dari jaringan lexik yang ada dan mereka telah semantis disambiguated dan refined. Algoritma peringkat, berdasarkan jangkauan lebar dari ciri-ciri bahasa dan dipvalidasi melalui kampanye evaluasi dengan anotator manusia, secara otomatis mengurus sinonim yang cocok dengan sensasi kata tertentu dengan kesulitan membaca. ReSyf tersedia secara bebas dan akan terintegrasi ke platform web untuk pembacaan bantuan. Hal ini juga dapat diterapkan untuk melakukan penyimplifikasi lexik teks Perancis.', 'ko': '이 글에서 우리는 ReSyf, 한 단어의 동의어의 어휘 자원을 소개했고 모국어를 프랑스어로 하는 학습자들이 이 동의어를 읽고 이해하는 난이도에 따라 순서를 정했다.동의어는 기존의 어휘 네트워크에서 유래한 것으로, 그것들은 의미에서 이미 잘못된 의미와 정련된 의미를 제거했다.정렬 알고리즘은 광범위한 언어 특징을 바탕으로 인류 주석자와의 평가 활동을 통해 검증하고 읽기 난이도에 따라 주어진 의미에 대응하는 동의어를 자동으로 정렬한다.ReSyf는 무료로 제공되며 웹 플랫폼에 통합되어 도움말을 읽을 수 있습니다.그것은 프랑스어 텍스트의 어휘를 간소화하는 데도 쓸 수 있다.', 'fa': 'در این مقاله، ما ریسیف را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک منابع زبان\u200cشناسی از یک زبان\u200cشناسی که بر اساس مشکل\u200cهایشان برای خواندن و درک کردن توسط دانش\u200cآموزان بومی فرانسوی است. سنونیم ها از یک شبکه زبانی موجود می\u200cآیند و آنها به semantically ناتوان و پاکیزه شده\u200cاند. الگوریتم رشته\u200cگیری، بر اساس مجموعه\u200cای از ویژه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و با یک کمپین ارزیابی با آشنا\u200cکنندگان انسان، به طور خودکار سینونیم\u200cهایی را که با خواندن مشکلات با یک حس کلمه\u200cای ارزیابی دارند، ترتیب می\u200cدهد. ReSyf آزاد در دسترسی است و در یک پلاتافر وب برای خواندن کمک متصل می شود. همچنین می\u200cتواند برای ساده\u200cسازی زبانی از متن فرانسوی کاربرد شود.', 'de': 'In diesem Artikel stellen wir ReSyf vor, eine lexikalische Ressource von einsprachigen Synonymen, sortiert nach ihrer Schwierigkeit, von Muttersprachlern Französisch gelesen und verstanden zu werden. Die Synonyme stammen aus einem bestehenden lexikalischen Netzwerk und wurden semantisch entzweigt und verfeinert. Ein Ranking-Algorithmus, der auf einer Vielzahl sprachlicher Merkmale basiert und durch eine Evaluierungskampagne mit menschlichen Annotatoren validiert wurde, sortiert automatisch die Synonyme, die einem bestimmten Wortsinn entsprechen, nach Leseschwierigkeiten. ReSyf ist frei verfügbar und wird in eine Webplattform zur Lesehilfe integriert. Es kann auch zur lexikalischen Vereinfachung französischer Texte angewendet werden.', 'sw': 'Katika makala hii, tunaionyesha ReSyf, rasilimali ya msisimko wa lugha za kiutamaduni zilizopangwa kwa mujibu wa vigumu vyao kusoma na kuelewa na wanafunzi wazawa wa Kifaransa. Sambamba hizo zimetoka kwenye mtandao uliopo wa lexico na zimepunguzwa na kubadilishwa kwa kiasi kikubwa. Ualgorithi wa rangi, unaoanzishwa na aina mbalimbali za lugha na imethibitishwa kupitia kampeni ya uchunguzi na wataalamu wa binadamu, unajipanga kwa uhusiano unaohusiana na maana yaliyotolewa kwa kusoma ngumu. ReSyf anapatikana kwa uhuru na ataunganishwa kwenye jukwaa la mtandaoni kwa ajili ya kusoma msaada. Pia inaweza kutumika kufanya urahisi wa simu za viwanda vya Kifaransa.', 'am': 'በዚህ ጽሑፍ ውስጥ የፈረንሳይ ተማሪዎች የአገራቸው ተማሪዎች ለመነበብ እና ለማስተዋል በሚደረገው ችግር የረሲካዊ ቋንቋ ሲኒኖኖችን አቀረብናለን፡፡ ሲኒናሞዎቹም ከአገኘው ሌክሲካዊ መረብ መጥተዋል እናም በክፍል ተለይተዋል፡፡ በቋንቋዊ ጥበቃ ላይ የተመሳሳይ እና በሰው ማስታወቂያው ዘመቻ የተመሳሳይ እና የተመሳሳይ አሌጎርቲም፣ በተሰጠው ቃላት ድህነትን በማንበብ ድካም በሚያሳየው ድምፅ በተለየ ድምፅ የሚያስፈልገውን ሲንጎርማኒምን በራስነት ያስተካክላል፡፡ ReSyf በፈቃድ ተገኝቷል እና ለመነበብ እርዳታ ለመጠቀም ወደ ድረ ገጽ መድረክ ይጋጠማሉ፡፡ የፈረንሳይ ጽሑፎች የሜክሲካዊ ቀላልነት ለመፈጸም ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': "Bu maksada biz ReSyf'i, fransuzça öwrenenleriň ene dilleriniň okamak we düşünmegi kyn düzümliklerine görýäris. Synonymlar bar bir leksiýalyň aňundan gelip, olar semantiýaly çalyşyrlybdyr we taze edildi. Adamlar täzelikleri bilen deňlenmek kampanyasyndan daýan ýar, lingwistiki üpjüňlere dayanan we çykyş kampanyasyndan, synonymlary awtomatik görkez kynçylyk okamak üçin berilen söz duýgularyna tertibleýär. ReSyf boş bolmady we kömek okamak üçin web plataforma girişinde. Bu ýerde Fransuz metinleriniň leksiýaly ýeňlemesi üçin uygulanabilir.", 'af': "In hierdie artikel het ons ReSyf voorgeskryf, 'n leksiese hulpbron van monolinglike sinonime wat rangeer is volgens hul moeilikheid om te lees en verstaan deur natuurlike leerers van Fransies. Die sinonime kom van 'n bestaande leksienetwerk en hulle is semantiese ontkoppel en opgewerp. 'n Ranking algoritme, gebaseer op 'n wyse reek van lingwisiese funksies en geldiseer deur 'n evalueringskampanie met menslike annotators, sorteer automaties die sinonime wat ooreenstemmend tot 'n gegewe woord sin deur die lees van moeilikheid. ReSyf is vry beskikbaar en sal integreer word in 'n web platform vir lees hulp. Dit kan ook gebruik word om leksiese eenvoudiging van Franse teks te doen.", 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধটিতে আমরা রেসিফ উপস্থাপন করছি, যিনি একটি লেক্সিকাল ভাষার সিনোনিমের সম্পদ, যা তাদের স্থানীয় ভাষার শিক্ষকদের পড়তে এবং বুঝতে পা বিদ্যমান লেক্সিক্যাল নেটওয়ার্ক থেকে সিনোনিমগুলো এসেছে এবং তাদেরকে সামান্যিক ভাবে বিচ্ছিন্ন করা হয়েছে এবং  একটি রেঙ্কিং অ্যালগরিদম, বিশাল ভাষাগত বৈশিষ্ট্যের উপর ভিত্তিক এবং মানুষের বিভিন্ন মূল্য প্রচারণার মাধ্যমে বৈধ এবং স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে পাঠানোর কঠিন বিষয় রেসিফ স্বাধীনতা পাওয়া যাচ্ছে এবং সাহায্য পড়ার জন্য একটি ওয়েব প্ল্যাটফর্মে একত্রিত হবে। ফ্রেঞ্চ টেক্সটের লেক্সিকাল সুস্পষ্ট করার জন্য এটি প্রয়োগ করা যাবে।', 'sq': 'Në këtë artikull, ne paraqesim ReSyf, një burim lexik të sinonimeve monogjuhësore renditur sipas vështirësisë së tyre për të lexuar dhe kuptuar nga mësuesit vendas të francezës. Sinonimet vijnë nga një rrjet lexik ekzistues dhe janë zhdukur dhe rafinuar semantikisht. Një algoritëm renditjeje, bazuar në një gamë të gjerë të karakteristikave gjuhësore dhe validuar nëpërmjet një fushate vlerësimi me anotatorët njerëzorë, automatikisht rendit sinonimet që korrespondonin me një kuptim të caktuar fjalësh duke lexuar vështirësi. ReSyf është lirisht në dispozicion dhe do të integrohet në një platform ë interneti për ndihmë leximi. Ajo mund të aplikohet gjithashtu për të kryer thjeshtësimin lexik të teksteve franceze.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ReSif-ը, մեկլեզու սինոնիմների լեքսիկական ռեսուրսը, որը համապատասխան է նրանց դժվարությանը կարդալ և հասկանալ ֆրանսիացի բնիկ սովորողների կողմից: Սինոնիմները գոյություն ունեցող լեքսիկական ցանցից են, և դրանք սեմանտիկ կերպով բացատրված են և բարելավված են: Ալգորիթմ, որը հիմնված է լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկությունների լայն տարբերակի վրա և ստուգում է մարդկային նոտոտորատորների հետ գնահատման քարոզարշավի միջոցով, ինքնաբերաբար բառի զգացմունքին համապատասխանող սինոնիմները բառի դժվարության ընթե ReSf-ը ազատ հասանելի է և կինտեգրվի կարդալու օգնության վեբ հարթակի մեջ: Այն կարող է նաև օգտագործվել ֆրանսիացի տեքստների լեքսիկական պարզաբանման համար:', 'az': "Bu m…ôs…ôl…ôd…ô, biz ReSyf'i, FransńĪzca dill…ôrin oxunmasńĪ v…ô anlamasńĪ √ß…ôtinlikl…ôrin…ô g√∂r…ô, monodil sinoniml…ôrin leksifik bir kaynańüńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôrdik. Sinoniml…ôr mevcut bir leksik ańüńĪdan g…ôlir v…ô onlar semantik olaraq d…ôyiŇüdirilmiŇü v…ô t…ômizl…ônmiŇüdir. ńįnsan annotatorlarńĪ il…ô deńüerlendirm…ô kampanyasńĪ il…ô m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edilmiŇü dil …ôlam…ôtl…ôrinin √ßoxluńüuna dayanan bir s…ôviyy…ô algoritimi avtomatik olaraq veril…ôn s√∂z anlayńĪŇüńĪna uyńüun sinoniml…ôri se√ßir. ReSyf √∂zg√ľr olaraq faydalanńĪr v…ô k√∂m…ôk oxumaq √ľ√ß√ľn web platform ńĪna integrl…ônir. Bu da FransńĪz metinl…ôrin leksik basitl…ôŇüdirm…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edil…ô bil…ôr.", 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem ReSyf, un recurso lècsic de sinònims monolingües classificat segons la seva dificultat de ser llegit i entendut pels alumnes natius del francès. Els sinònims provenen d'una xarxa lèxica existent i s'han desambiguat i refinat semànticament. Un algoritme de classement, basat en una gran varietat de característiques lingüístices i validat a través d'una campanya d'evaluació amb anotators humans, ordena automàticament els sinonims que corresponden a un sentit de paraula determinat llegint dificultats. ReSyf està lliurament disponible i s'integrarà en una plataforma web per ajudar a llegir. També es pot aplicar a la simplificació lèxica dels textos francès.", 'bs': 'U ovom članku predstavljamo ReSyf a, leksički resurs monojezičkih sinonima koji je postavljen prema njihovim teškoćima da se čitaju i razumiju rodni učenici francuskog. Sinonimi dolaze iz postojeće leksičke mreže, a oni su semantički disambiguvani i ispravljeni. Ranjenički algoritam, zasnovan na širokom nizu jezičkih karakteristika i potvrđen kroz procjenu kampanje sa ljudskim annotatorima, automatski sortira sinonime koji odgovaraju određenom smislu riječi čitanjem teškoća. ReSyf je slobodno dostupan i bit će integrisan u web platformu za čitanje pomoći. Može se primjenjivati i za provedbu leksičkog pojednostavljanja francuskih tekstova.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme ReSyf, lexikální zdroj monojazyčných synonymů řazených podle obtížnosti čtení a porozumění rodilými studenty francouzštiny. Synonyma pocházejí z existující lexikální sítě a byla sémanticky rozjasněna a upřesněna. Algoritmus hodnocení, založený na široké škále jazykových vlastností a ověřený prostřednictvím hodnotící kampaně s lidskými anotátory, automaticky třídí synonyma odpovídající danému slovnímu smyslu podle obtížnosti čtení. ReSyf je volně dostupný a bude integrován do webové platformy pro asistenci čtení. Lze ji také použít k lexikálnímu zjednodušení francouzských textů.', 'et': 'Selles artiklis tutvustame ReSyf-i, ühekeelsete sünonüümide leksikaalset ressurssi, mis on järjestatud vastavalt nende raskustele lugeda ja aru saada emakeelsete prantsuse õppijate poolt. Sünonüümid pärinevad olemasolevast leksikaalsest võrgustikust ning neid on semantiliselt selgitatud ja täpsustatud. Hindamisalgoritm, mis põhineb paljudel keelelistel omadustel ja mida valideeritakse inimmärkidega hindamiskampaania kaudu, sorteerib automaatselt antud sõnatähendusele vastavad sünonüümid lugemisprobleemide alusel. ReSyf on vabalt kättesaadav ja integreeritakse lugemisabi veebiplatvormi. Seda saab kasutada ka prantsuse tekstide leksikaalse lihtsustamise teostamiseks.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme ReSyf-sanastoa, joka koostuu monikielisistä synonyymeistä, jotka on luokiteltu niiden vaikeuden mukaan, joita ranskan äidinkielen oppijat voivat lukea ja ymmärtää. Synonyymit tulevat olemassa olevasta sanastosta ja niitä on semanttisesti eritelty ja jalostettu. Lajittelualgoritmi, joka perustuu moniin kielellisiin ominaisuuksiin ja validoidaan inhimillisten huomautusten avulla, lajittelee automaattisesti tietyn sanamerkityksen synonyymit lukuvaikeuden perusteella. ReSyf on vapaasti saatavilla, ja se integroidaan lukuavusteiseen verkkoalustaan. Sitä voidaan soveltaa myös ranskankielisten tekstien sanaston yksinkertaistamiseen.', 'jv': 'Nanging artikle iki, kéné nyimpen ReSif, awak dhéwé bakal keliksu karo perancis lan sampeyan ingkang sekang Kerolah sing dipunanggé uwong sing dikarolan liwih dumadhi lan padha dipunanggé semana karo pakem nggawe gerakan. AllProgressBar ReSimf kuwi ngebas bas karo akeh dikenalke nyeneng sistem web kanggo basa luwih Punika dipunangé kanggo sampeyan luwih-sampeyan Teks Perancis.', 'he': 'במאמר הזה, אנו מציגים את ReSyf, משאב לקסי של סינונימות מונושפות מודרגות לפי הקשה שלהם לקרוא ולהבין על ידי לומדים מקומיים צרפתיים. הסינונימות מגיעות מרשת לקסיקה קיימת והן הופרדו באופן סמנטי ומעדכנות. אלגוריתם מדרגה, מבוסס על מגוון רחב של תכונות שפתיות ומאושרת באמצעות קמפיין עריכה עם ציונים אנושיים, אוטומטית מארגן את הסינונימים שמתאימים לחוש מילה מסוים על ידי קשות קריאה. ReSyf זמין בחינם ויהיה מושלם לתוך פלטפורמת אינטרנט לסיוע קריאה. אפשר גם להשתמש בו כדי לבצע הפשטות לקסית של טקסטים צרפתיים.', 'ha': "A cikin wannan makala, Munã halatar da reSyf, wani marãyi na littafa na saurari na monoli-harshen da aka ranar da su da kuma ma'abũta su karãtun da aka fahimtar da su a fassarar Faransa. Sunonim za'a zo daga wata shirin mai zaman leksisi kuma an kange su semantically and refine. Wata algoritm na danganta, a kan karatun wasu masu cikin linguistic da aka gaskata kuma an gaskata game da shirin evaluation na mutane, yana daidaita synonim farat ɗaya da ya daidaita zuwa wani ma'anar maganar da aka ba su karanta nau'i. ReSyf is freely available and will be integrated into a web platform for reading assistance.  Ana iya amfani da shi dõmin a sami mutane na rubutun faransa.", 'sk': 'V tem članku predstavljamo ReSyf, leksikalni vir enojezičnih sinonimov, ki so razvrščeni glede na njihovo težavnost branja in razumevanja avtohtonih učencev francoščine. Sinonimi prihajajo iz obstoječe leksikalne mreže in so semantično razjasnjeni in izpopolnjeni. Razvrščanje algoritma, ki temelji na širokem naboru jezikovnih značilnosti in potrjuje ocenjevalno kampanjo s človeškimi opombatorji, samodejno razvrsti sinonime, ki ustrezajo določenemu besednemu pomenu, s težavami branja. ReSyf je prosto dostopen in bo integriran v spletno platformo za pomoč pri branju. Uporablja se lahko tudi za izvajanje leksikalne poenostavitve francoskih besedil.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ReSyf ལ་མཚོན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་ཡིན། དབྱེ་རིམ་དེ་ཚོ་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་འབྲེལ་ཞིག་ལས་ནང་དུ་འདི་ལྟ་ཀློག་པས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་ཕལ་མེད་སྒྲིག་དང་ལྟ་ཀློ སྐད་རིགས་ཁྱད་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཚད་རྒྱ་འཕགས་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པའི་མིང་རྟགས་ལྟར་ཞིབ ReSyf འདི་སྟོང་པར་བྱིན་ནུས་མེད་པ་ལས་དྲ་རྒྱའི་གླེང་སྟེང་ཞིག་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་དགོས་པ འདི་ཡང་སྙིང་རིས་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སླ་གཏོང་ཐབས་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཆོག་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'If you’ve seen some, you’ve seen them all : Identifying variants of multiword expressions', 'ar': 'إذا رأيت بعضها ، فقد شاهدتها جميعًا: تحديد متغيرات التعبيرات متعددة الكلمات', 'fr': "Si vous en avez vu quelques-uns, vous les avez tous vus\xa0: Identifier des variantes d'expressions multimots", 'pt': 'Se você já viu algumas, já viu todas: Identificando variantes de expressões com várias palavras', 'es': 'Si has visto algunas, las has visto todas: Identificar variantes de expresiones multipalabra', 'ja': 'いくつか見たことがある場合は、すべて見たことがあります。複数の単語表現のバリアントを識別する', 'zh': '你若看过些,你已经看过了,识多词表达式的变体', 'ru': 'Если вы видели некоторые из них, вы видели их все: Идентификация вариантов многословных выражений', 'hi': 'यदि आपने कुछ देखा है, तो आपने उन सभी को देखा है: मल्टीवर्ड एक्सप्रेशन के वेरिएंट की पहचान करना', 'ga': 'Má tá roinnt feicthe agat, tá siad go léir feicthe agat: Leaganacha de nathanna ilfhocail a aithint', 'ka': 'თუ ხედავთ, ყველას ხედავთ: მრავალი სიტყვის გამოსახულებების განსახულება', 'el': 'Αν έχετε δει κάποιες, τις έχετε δει όλες: Αναγνώριση παραλλαγών πολυλέξεων εκφράσεων', 'hu': 'Ha láttál néhányat, akkor mindet láttál: Többszós kifejezések változatainak azonosítása', 'it': 'Se ne hai viste alcune, le hai viste tutte:', 'lt': 'Jei matėte, matėte juos visus: Identifying variants of multiword expressions', 'kk': 'Егер бірнеше мәліметті көрсетілсіз, оларды көрсетілсіз: көп сөздің өрнектерін анықтау', 'mk': 'Ако сте виделе некои, сте ги виделе сите: Идентификување варијанти на мултизборни изрази', 'ms': 'Jika anda telah melihat beberapa, anda telah melihat mereka semua: Identifying variants of multiword expressions', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് കണ്ടിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d, നിങ്ങള്\u200d എല്ലാവരെയും കണ്ടിട്ടുണ്ട്: പലവാക്ക് വാക്കുകളുടെ വ്യത', 'mt': 'Jekk tara xi wħud, tarahom kollha: Identifikazzjoni ta’ varjanti ta’ espressjonijiet b’ħafna kliem', 'mn': 'Хэрвээ та нар зарим зүйлсийг харвал, бүгдийг харсан: олон үгийн илэрхийллийн өөрчлөлтийг тайлбарлах', 'no': 'Dersom du har sett nokre, har du sett dei alle: Identifiserer variantar av fleire ord uttrykk', 'ro': 'Dacă ați văzut unele, le-ați văzut pe toate: Identificarea variantelor expresiilor multicuvânt', 'pl': 'Jeśli widziałeś jakieś, widziałeś je wszystkie: Identyfikowanie wariantów wyrażeń wielowłowych', 'sr': 'Ako ste vidjeli neke, sve ste ih vidjeli: identifikacija varianta višeriječnih izraza', 'si': 'ඔබට පොඩ්ඩක් දැක්කොත්, ඔබට ඔවුන්ව දැක්කොත්: වඩා වචන ප්\u200dරවේශනය අඳුන්න', 'sv': 'Om du har sett några, har du sett dem alla: Identifiera varianter av flerordsuttryk', 'so': 'Hadii aad aragtay qaar, waad aragtay dhammaantood: inaad aqoonsatay hadal kala duduwan', 'ta': 'நீங்கள் சில பார்த்தால், நீங்கள் எல்லாவற்றையும் பார்த்துள்ளீர்கள்: பல வார்த்தைகளின் மாறுபாடுகளை அட', 'ur': 'اگر آپ نے کچھ دیکھا ہے تو آپ نے ان سب کو دیکھا ہے: بہت سی کلمات کی تعریفیں شناسایی کرنا', 'uz': "Agar bir necha ko'rib tursangiz, hammasini ko'rib turganingiz: ko'proq so'zlarning turlarini aniqlash", 'vi': 'Nếu bạn thấy một số, bạn đã thấy tất cả: xác định biến thể của biểu hiện đa từ.', 'bg': 'Ако сте виждали някои, сте виждали всички: Идентифициране на варианти на многословни изрази', 'nl': 'Als je er een hebt gezien, heb je ze allemaal gezien: Varianten van meerwoorduitdrukkingen identificeren', 'da': 'Hvis du har set nogle, har du set dem alle: Identificering af varianter af flere ord udtryk', 'de': 'Wenn Sie einige gesehen haben, haben Sie sie alle gesehen: Varianten von Mehrwortausdrücken identifizieren', 'id': 'Jika Anda telah melihat beberapa, Anda telah melihat mereka semua: Identifikasi varian dari ekspresi multikata', 'ko': '만약 네가 조금 보았다면, 너는 이미 이 모든 것을 보았을 것이다. 다사 표현식의 변체를 식별하는 것이다', 'hr': 'Ako ste vidjeli neke, vidjeli ste ih sve: Identificiranje varianta višeriječnih izraza', 'fa': 'اگر بعضی از آنها را دیدید، همه آنها را دیدید: متغیر تعریف چند کلمه را شناسایی می کنید', 'tr': 'Eğer birkaç tane gördüyseniz, bunların hepsini gördünüz:Çoklu kelime ifadesinin wariantlarını tanımlayıcı', 'af': "As jy 'n paar gesien het, het jy hulle almal gesien: Identifikasie variante van multiword uitdrukkings", 'sw': "If you've seen some, you've seen them all: Identifying variants of multiword expressions", 'sq': 'Nëse keni parë disa, i keni parë të gjitha: Identifikimi i varianteve të shprehjeve të shumëfjalëshme', 'am': 'አንዳንዶችን ባየችሁ ሁሉን አይታችኋል፤ የብዙ ቃላት ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ አነጋገር', 'hy': 'Եթե տեսել եք դրանք, տեսել եք դրանք բոլորը.', 'az': 'Əgər bir qismini gördünüzsə, bunların hamısını gördünüz: çoxlu söz ifadələrinin dəyişikliklərini tanıyır', 'bs': 'Ako ste vidjeli neke, sve ste ih vidjeli: identificiranje varijanta višeriječnih izraza', 'cs': 'Pokud jste některé viděli, viděli jste je všechny: Identifikace variant víceslovných výrazů', 'fi': 'Jos olet nähnyt joitakin, olet nähnyt ne kaikki: Monisanaisten lausekkeiden muunnelmien tunnistaminen', 'ca': "Si en heu vist alguns, els heu vist tots: Identificar variants d'expressions multiparaules", 'bn': 'আপনি যদি কিছু দেখেন, তাহলে আপনি তাদের সবাইকে দেখেছেন: মাল্টিশবার্তার বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন কথা পরি', 'et': 'Kui olete näinud mõnda, olete näinud neid kõiki: Mitmesõnaliste avaldiste variantide tuvastamine', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'he': 'אם ראיתם כמה, ראיתם את כולם: זיהוי שונים של ביטוי מילים רבות', 'sk': 'Če ste jih že videli, ste videli vse: Prepoznavanje različic večbesednih izrazov', 'ha': 'Idan ka ga wasu, ka gan su dukansu: kana gane wasu kalmõmi masu yawa', 'bo': 'ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་ལ་ཤས་ཀྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་ན། ཁྱོད་ཀྱིས་དེ་ཚོ་ཚང་མར་མཐོང་ཡོད་པ། སྣ་ཚོགས་གསལ་བརྗོད'}
{'en': 'Multiword expressions, especially verbal ones (VMWEs), show idiosyncratic variability, which is challenging for NLP applications, hence the need for VMWE identification. We focus on the task of variant identification, i.e. identifying variants of previously seen VMWEs, whatever their surface form. We model the problem as a classification task. Syntactic subtrees with previously seen combinations of lemmas are first extracted, and then classified on the basis of features relevant to morpho-syntactic variation of VMWEs. Feature values are both absolute, i.e. hold for a particular VMWE candidate, and relative, i.e. based on comparing a candidate with previously seen VMWEs. This approach outperforms a baseline by 4 percent points of F-measure on a French corpus.', 'ar': 'تُظهر التعبيرات متعددة الكلمات ، وخاصة التعبيرات اللفظية (VMWEs) ، تقلبًا خاصًا ، وهو ما يمثل تحديًا لتطبيقات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، ومن ثم الحاجة إلى تحديد VMWE. نحن نركز على مهمة تحديد المتغير ، أي تحديد المتغيرات من VMWEs التي سبق رؤيتها ، بغض النظر عن شكل سطحها. نصمم المشكلة كمهمة تصنيف. يتم أولاً استخراج الأشجار الفرعية النحوية ذات التركيبات التي تم رؤيتها سابقًا من الليمماس ، ثم يتم تصنيفها على أساس الميزات ذات الصلة بالاختلاف الصرفي النحوي لـ VMWEs. قيم الميزة مطلقة على حد سواء ، أي الاحتفاظ بمرشح VMWE معين ، ونسبي ، أي استنادًا إلى مقارنة مرشح مع VMWEs التي سبق رؤيتها. يتفوق هذا النهج على خط الأساس بنسبة 4 في المائة من مقياس F على مجموعة الفرنسية.', 'pt': 'Expressões multipalavras, especialmente verbais (VMWEs), apresentam variabilidade idiossincrática, o que é um desafio para aplicações de PNL, daí a necessidade de identificação de VMWEs. Nós nos concentramos na tarefa de identificação de variantes, ou seja, identificar variantes de VMWEs vistas anteriormente, qualquer que seja sua forma de superfície. Modelamos o problema como uma tarefa de classificação. Subárvores sintáticas com combinações de lemas vistas anteriormente são primeiro extraídas e então classificadas com base em características relevantes para a variação morfossintática de VMWEs. Os valores dos recursos são absolutos, ou seja, mantidos para um determinado candidato VMWE, e relativos, ou seja, baseados na comparação de um candidato com VMWEs vistos anteriormente. Essa abordagem supera uma linha de base em 4 pontos por cento da medida F em um corpus francês.', 'es': 'Las expresiones multipalabra, especialmente las verbales (VMWE), muestran una variabilidad idiosincrásica, que es un desafío para las aplicaciones de PNL, de ahí la necesidad de identificación de VMWE. Nos centramos en la tarea de la identificación de variantes, es decir, la identificación de variantes de los VMWs previamente vistos, sea cual sea su forma superficial. Modelamos el problema como una tarea de clasificación. Los subárboles sintácticos con combinaciones de lemas previamente vistas se extraen primero y luego se clasifican en función de las características relevantes para la variación morfosintáctica de los VMWs. Los valores de las características son absolutos, es decir, se mantienen para un candidato de VMWE en particular, y relativos, es decir, se basan en la comparación de un candidato con VMWE vistos anteriormente. Este enfoque supera a una línea de base en 4 puntos porcentuales de medida F en un corpus francés.', 'ja': '多言語表現、特に言語表現（ VMWE ）は、NLPアプリケーションにとって困難な特異性を示し、したがって、VMWE識別の必要性を示します。私たちは、変異型識別のタスクに焦点を当てます。すなわち、表面形態に関わらず、以前に見たVMWEの変異型を識別します。問題を分類タスクとしてモデル化します。これまでに見られたレマの組み合わせを有する構文サブツリーを最初に抽出し、次いでＶＭＷＥの形態構文変動に関連する特徴に基づいて分類する。特徴値は、絶対値、すなわち特定のVMWE候補者のために保持する値、および相対値の両方であり、すなわち、候補者を以前に見たVMWEと比較することに基づいています。このアプローチは、フランスのコーパスのFメジャーのベースラインを4パーセント上回っています。', 'fr': "Les expressions multimots, en particulier les expressions verbales (VMWE), montrent une variabilité idiosyncratique, ce qui est difficile pour les applications de PNL, d'où la nécessité d'une identification VMWE. Nous nous concentrons sur la tâche d'identification des variants, c'est-à-dire l'identification des variants des VMWE précédemment vus, quelle que soit leur forme de surface. Nous modélisons le problème comme une tâche de classification. Les sous-arbres syntaxiques avec des combinaisons de lemmes déjà observées sont d'abord extraits, puis classés sur la base de caractéristiques pertinentes à la variation morpho-syntaxique des EMVM. Les valeurs des entités sont à la fois absolues, c'est-à-dire maintenues pour un candidat VMWE particulier, et relatives, c'est-à-dire basées sur la comparaison d'un candidat avec des VMWE précédemment vus. Cette approche surpasse une valeur de référence de 4 points de pourcentage de la mesure F sur un corpus français.", 'zh': '多词表达式,尤动词表达式(VMWEs),示殊可变性,于NLP宜一挑战,故须VMWE识。 专于变体知之务,即识前所见VMWE之变体,无论其形文如何。 吾将建模为分类。 先取前所见句法子树,然后以VMWE形句法变异之类。 特征值既绝对值(特定 VMWE 候选项之留直),亦相对值(基于将候选项与前所见 VMWE 较)。 其法在法国语料库上比基线高4%之F测量点。', 'hi': 'Multiword अभिव्यक्तियों, विशेष रूप से मौखिक लोगों (VMWEs), विशेष रूप से परिवर्तनशीलता दिखाते हैं, जो एनएलपी अनुप्रयोगों के लिए चुनौतीपूर्ण है, इसलिए VMWE पहचान की आवश्यकता है। हम वेरिएंट पहचान के कार्य पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं, यानी पहले से देखे गए वीएमडब्ल्यूई के वेरिएंट की पहचान करना, जो भी उनकी सतह का रूप है। हम एक वर्गीकरण कार्य के रूप में समस्या मॉडल. लेमा के पहले देखे गए संयोजनों के साथ वाक्यात्मक उप-वृक्षों को पहले निकाला जाता है, और फिर वीएमडब्ल्यूई के मोर्फो-वाक्यात्मक भिन्नता के लिए प्रासंगिक सुविधाओं के आधार पर वर्गीकृत किया जाता है। फीचर मान दोनों निरपेक्ष हैं, यानी एक विशेष VMWE उम्मीदवार के लिए पकड़, और सापेक्ष, यानी पहले से देखे गए VMWEs के साथ एक उम्मीदवार की तुलना करने पर आधारित है। यह दृष्टिकोण एक फ्रांसीसी कॉर्पस पर एफ-माप के 4 प्रतिशत अंकों से एक आधार रेखा को मात देता है।', 'ru': 'Многословные выражения, особенно словесные (VMWE), демонстрируют специфическую изменчивость, что является сложной задачей для приложений NLP, отсюда необходимость идентификации VMWE. Мы фокусируемся на задаче идентификации вариантов, т.е. идентификации вариантов ранее видимых VMWE, независимо от их формы поверхности. Мы моделируем задачу как классификационную задачу. Синтаксические поддерева с ранее замеченными комбинациями леммы сначала извлекаются, а затем классифицируются на основе признаков, относящихся к морфо-синтаксической вариации VMWE. Значения характеристик являются как абсолютными, то есть удерживаются для конкретного кандидата VMWE, так и относительными, то есть основаны на сравнении кандидата с ранее увиденными VMWE. Этот подход на 4% превосходит базовый показатель F-измерения на французском теле.', 'ga': 'Léiríonn nathanna cainte ilfhocail, go háirithe na cinn briathartha (VMWEanna), éagsúlacht neamhghnách, rud atá dúshlánach d’fheidhmchláir NLP, agus mar sin tá gá le sainaithint VMWE. Dírímid ar an tasc a bhaineann le malairtí a shainaithint, i.e. malairtí de VMWEanna a chonacthas cheana a aithint, is cuma cén cruth dromchla atá orthu. Múnlaímid an fhadhb mar thasc aicmithe. Baintear ar dtús fochrainn chomhréire le meascáin leamaí a chonacthas roimhe seo, agus ansin aicmítear iad ar bhonn gnéithe a bhaineann le hathrú morpho-chomhréir na VMWEanna. Tá luachanna gné araon absalóideach, i.e. seilbh d’iarrthóir VMWE ar leith, agus coibhneasta, i.e. bunaithe ar iarrthóir a chur i gcomparáid le VMWEanna a chonacthas roimhe seo. Is fearr an cur chuige seo ná bonnlíne 4 phointe faoin gcéad de bheart F ar chorpas Francach.', 'ka': 'Multiword expressions, especially verbal ones (VMWEs), show idiosyncratic variability, which is challenging for NLP applications, thus the need for VMWE identification. ჩვენ გარიანტების ინდიდინტიფიკაციის დავაკეთებთ, მაგალითად პირველი VMWEs-ის განცემების განცემების განცემების დავაკეთებთ, რაც უნდა იყოს მათი გვერდის ფორმაზე. ჩვენ პრობლემას კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობაში მოდელურებთ. სინტექტიკური სტრიქტრები, რომლებიც წინა ხედავთ ლემების კომბიზაციები პირველი ექსტრაქტირებულია, და შემდეგ კლასიფიკაცია VMWEs-ის მოპრო-სინტაქტიკური განცვლებისთ ფუნქტური მნიშვნელობები ორივე აბსოლუტურია, რადგან განსაკუთრებული VMWE კანდიდეტისთვის და შესაბამისი, რადგან, კანდიდეტის შესაბამისთვის, რომელიც წინ ხედავთ VMWEs. ეს პროგრამა ფრანგური კორპუსში 4 პროცენტის ფუნქტური ფუნქტური ფუნქტური ფუნქტურის გასაკეთება.', 'hu': 'A többszós kifejezések, különösen a verbális kifejezések (VMWE) idioszinkratikus változékonyságot mutatnak, ami kihívást jelent az NLP alkalmazások számára, ezért van szükség VMWE azonosításra. A változatok azonosításának feladatára összpontosítunk, azaz a korábban látott VMWE-k változatainak azonosítására, függetlenül attól, hogy azok felületi formája. A problémát osztályozási feladatként modellezzük. Először a korábban látott lemmák kombinációjával rendelkező szintaktikus részecskéket kivonjuk, majd a VMWE morfo-szintaktikus variációjára vonatkozó jellemzők alapján osztályozzák. A funkcióértékek abszolútak, azaz egy adott VMWE-jelölt esetében érvényesek, és relatívak, azaz egy jelölt korábban látott VMWE-kkel való összehasonlításán alapulnak. Ez a megközelítés 4 százalékponttal felülmúlja a kiindulási értéket egy francia korpuszon.', 'el': 'Οι πολυλεκτικές εκφράσεις, ιδιαίτερα οι λεκτικές (VMWE), παρουσιάζουν ιδιοσυγκρατική μεταβλητότητα, η οποία αποτελεί πρόκληση για τις εφαρμογές NLP, εξ ου και η ανάγκη αναγνώρισης VMWE. Εστιάζουμε στο καθήκον της αναγνώρισης παραλλαγών, δηλαδή στον προσδιορισμό παραλλαγών προηγουμένως παρατηρούμενων VMWE, ανεξάρτητα από την επιφανειακή τους μορφή. μοντελοποιούμε το πρόβλημα ως καθήκον ταξινόμησης. Τα συντακτικά υποτόμματα με παλαιότερους συνδυασμούς λεμμάτων εξάγονται πρώτα και στη συνέχεια ταξινομούνται με βάση χαρακτηριστικά σχετικά με τη μορφοσυντακτική διακύμανση των VMWE. Οι τιμές χαρακτηριστικών είναι τόσο απόλυτες, δηλαδή κρατήστε για έναν συγκεκριμένο υποψήφιο VMWE, όσο και σχετικές, δηλαδή βασισμένες στη σύγκριση ενός υποψηφίου με προηγούμενα εμφανιζόμενα VMWE. Αυτή η προσέγγιση ξεπερνά τη γραμμή βάσης κατά τέσσερα εκατοστά του μέτρου F σε ένα γαλλικό σώμα.', 'it': 'Le espressioni multiword, specialmente quelle verbali (VMWE), mostrano variabilità idiosincratica, che è difficile per le applicazioni NLP, da qui la necessità di identificare VMWE. Ci concentriamo sul compito di identificare le varianti, cioè identificare le varianti di VMWE precedentemente viste, indipendentemente dalla loro forma superficiale. Modelliamo il problema come compito di classificazione. I substrati sintattici con combinazioni di lemmi precedentemente viste vengono dapprima estratti, e poi classificati in base alle caratteristiche rilevanti per la variazione morfo-sintattica dei VMWE. I valori delle caratteristiche sono sia assoluti, vale a dire validi per un determinato candidato VMWE, sia relativi, vale a dire basati sul confronto di un candidato con VMWE precedentemente visti. Questo approccio supera una linea di base del 4 punti percentuali di F-misura su un corpus francese.', 'lt': 'Multiword expressions, especially verbal ones (VMWEs), show idiosyncratic variability, which is challenging for NLP applications, hence the need for VMWE identification.  Mes daugiausia dėmesio skiriame variant ų identifikavimo uždaviniui, t. y. anksčiau matytų VMWEs variantų identifikavimui, nepriklausomai nuo jų paviršiaus formos. Mes šią problem ą modeliuojame kaip klasifikavimo užduotį. Sintaktiniai subtraipai su anksčiau pastebėtais citrinų deriniais pirmiausia ekstrahuojami, o vėliau klasifikuojami pagal savybes, susijusias su VMWEs morfosintaktiniu kintamumu. Feature values are both absolute, i.e. hold for a particular VMWE candidate, and relative, i.e. based on comparing candidate with previously seen VMWEs. Šis metodas viršija pradinį rodiklį 4 procentiniais punktais pagal F priemonę Prancūzijos korpusui.', 'mk': 'Мултизборни изрази, особено вербалните (VMWEs), покажуваат идиосинкратична варијабилност, која е предизвикувачка за апликациите на NLP, оттука потребата за идентификација на VMWE. Ние се фокусираме на задачата за идентификација на варијантите, т.е. идентификација на варијантите на претходно видени VMWEs, без оглед на нивната површина форма. Го моделираме проблемот како класификациска задача. Синтактичките подтри со претходно видени комбинации на лимаси се прво извадени, а потоа класификувани врз основа на карактеристиките релевантни за морфосинтактичката варијација на VMWEs. Функционалните вредности се апсолутни, т.е. одржуваат за одреден кандидат на ВМВЕ, и релативни, т.е. базирани на споредба на кандидат со претходно видени ВМВЕ. Овој пристап го надминува основното значење за 4 процентни поени од F-мерката на францускиот корпус.', 'kk': 'Көптеген сөздер өрнектері, осылайша вербалды (VMWEs), Идиосинкратиялық айнымалылығын көрсету, NLP қолданбаларының үшін бұл қиын, сондықтан VMWE идентификациясы керек. Біз айнымалы идентификациялау тапсырмасына, яғни алдыңғы көрінетін VMWE- дердің айнымаларды анықтау тапсырмасына көздейміз. Біз мәселеді классификациялық тапсырма ретінде үлгіледік. Алдыңғы көрінген лимма комбинацияларының синтактикалық субтриялары алдыңғы тарқатылады, содан кейін VMWEs морфосинтактикалық айнымалылығына сәйкес келетін мүмкіндіктерінің негізінде бөлінген. Қасиеттердің мәндері екеуінде абсолютті, т.е. VMWE кандидаты және қатынасыз, т.е. бұрын көрінген VMWE кандидатты салыстыру негізінде тұрады. Бұл тәсілі француз корпустағы F-өлшемінің негізгі 4 пайызына жеткізеді.', 'ml': 'പല വാക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നത്, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് വാര്\u200dബല്\u200d പ്രസ്താനങ്ങള്\u200d (VMWEs), വിഡിയോസിനോസിന്റിക്റ്റിക്റ്റിക്റ്റിക്റ് നമ്മള്\u200d മുമ്പ് കണ്ട വിഎംഡബ്ലിയുഎസിന്റെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന ജോലിയിലേക്ക് ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. അവരുടെ മ നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രശ്നം ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ജോലിയായി മാതൃകയാക്കുന്നു. മുമ്പ് കാണുന്ന ലെമ്മാസുകളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d സിന്റാക്കിക് സബ്ഗ്രീകള്\u200d ആദ്യം പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. പിന്നീട് മോര്\u200dഫോ- സിനിട്ടാ പ്രത്യേക വിഎംഡ്യൂ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിയ്ക്കുവേണ്ടി പ്രത്യേകിച്ചുള്ള വില മൂല്ല്യങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടുപേരും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വിഎംഡബ്യൂഎസിനെ തുല്യമാ ഫ്രെഞ്ച് കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിന്\u200dറെ മേല്\u200d 4% ഫോണ്\u200dട്ട് എഫ് മെയിന്\u200dറിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നു.', 'ms': 'Ungkapan berbilang perkataan, terutama perkataan (VMWEs), menunjukkan variabiliti idiosinkratik, yang menantang untuk aplikasi NLP, oleh itu perlukan pengenalan VMWE. We focus on the task of variant identification, i.e. identifying variants of previously seen VMWEs, whatever their surface form.  Kita model masalah ini sebagai tugas klasifikasi. Subrees sintaktik dengan kombinasi lemma yang pernah dilihat dahulu pertama dikekstrak, dan kemudian diklasifikasikan berdasarkan ciri-ciri yang berkaitan dengan variasi sintaktik-morfo VMWEs. Nilai fitur kedua-dua mutlak, iaitu memegang untuk calon VMWE tertentu, dan relatif, iaitu berdasarkan membandingkan calon dengan VMWEs yang telah dilihat sebelumnya. Pendekatan ini melebihi garis dasar dengan 4 peratus titik F-ukuran pada korpus Perancis.', 'mt': 'L-espressjonijiet b’ħafna kliem, speċjalment dawk verbali (VMWEs), juru varjabilità idjosinkratika, li hija sfida għall-applikazzjonijiet NLP, u għalhekk il-ħtieġa għall-identifikazzjoni VMWE. Aħna niffokaw fuq il-kompitu tal-identifikazzjoni tal-varjanti, jiġifieri l-identifikazzjoni tal-varjanti tal-VMWEs li dehru qabel, irrispettivament mill-forma tal-wiċċ tagħhom. Aħna nimmudellaw il-problem a bħala kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni. Sottotratti sintattiċi b’kombinazzjonijiet ta’ limmi li dehru qabel huma l-ewwel estratti, u mbagħad ikklassifikati fuq il-bażi ta’ karatteristiċi rilevanti għal varjazzjoni morfosintattika ta’ VMWEs. Il-valuri karatteristiċi huma kemm assoluti, jiġifieri miżmuma għal kandidat partikolari għal VMWE, kif ukoll relattivi, jiġifieri bbażati fuq it-tqabbil ta’ kandidat ma’ VMWEs li dehru qabel. Dan l-approċċ jaqbeż il-linja bażi b’4 punti fil-mija tal-miżura F fuq korpus Franċiż.', 'no': 'Multiorduttrykk, spesielt verbale (VMWEs), viser idiosynkratiske variabel, som er vanskeleg for NLP- program, derfor trengen for VMWE- identifikasjon. Vi fokuserer på oppgåva for variantidentifikasjon, t.d. identifikasjon av variantar av førre sett VMWEs, uansett overflata sine. Vi modeller problemet som eit klassifikasjonsprogram. Syntaktiske understrekar med førre synlege kombinasjonar av limmer vert først pakka ut, og deretter klassifisert på grunnlag av funksjonar som er relevante for morpho- syntaktiske variasjonar av VMWEs. Funksjonsverdiane er både absolutte, t.d. holdt for ein bestemt VMWE-kandidat, og relativt, t.d. basert på samanlikning av ein kandidat med tidlegare sett VMWEs. Denne tilnærminga utfører ein grunnlinje med 4 prosent punkt av F-målet på eit fransk korpus.', 'pl': 'Wyrażenia wielosłowne, zwłaszcza te werbalne (VMWE), wykazują zmienność osobistą, która stanowi wyzwanie dla aplikacji NLP, stąd konieczność identyfikacji VMWE. Skupiamy się na zadaniu identyfikacji wariantów, czyli identyfikacji wariantów wcześniej widzianych VMWE, niezależnie od ich formy powierzchni. Modelujemy ten problem jako zadanie klasyfikacyjne. Podkreślenia syntaktyczne z wcześniej widzianymi kombinacjami lemmas są najpierw ekstraktowane, a następnie klasyfikowane na podstawie cech istotnych dla zmian morfoskładni VMWE. Wartości funkcji są zarówno bezwzględne, tj. hold dla konkretnego kandydata VMWE, jak i względne, tj. oparte na porównaniu kandydata z wcześniej widzianymi VMWE. Podejście to przewyższa wartość wyjściową o 4 procentowe punkty miary F na francuskim korpusie.', 'ro': 'Expresiile cuvintelor multiple, în special cele verbale (VMWE), prezintă variabilitate idiosincratică, ceea ce reprezintă o provocare pentru aplicațiile PNL, de aici necesitatea identificării VMWE. Ne concentrăm pe sarcina identificării variantelor, adică identificarea variantelor VMWE văzute anterior, indiferent de forma lor de suprafață. Modelăm problema ca o sarcină de clasificare. Substraturile sintactice cu combinații de lemme văzute anterior sunt mai întâi extrase și apoi clasificate pe baza caracteristicilor relevante pentru variația morfo-sintactică a VMWE. Valorile caracteristicilor sunt atât absolute, adică valabile pentru un anumit candidat VMWE, cât și relative, adică bazate pe compararea unui candidat cu VMWE văzute anterior. Această abordare depășește o valoare de referință cu 4 puncte la sută de măsură F pe un corpus francez.', 'mn': 'Ихэнх үгийн илэрхийллүүд, ялангуяа үгийн илэрхийллүүд (VMWEs), идиосинкратик өөрчлөлтийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь NLP хэрэглээнд шаардлагатай. Иймээс VMWE-г тодорхойлох хэрэгтэй. Бид өөрчлөлтийн тодорхойлолтын даалгаврыг анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг, яг өмнө нь харсан VMWEs-ийн хувилбаруудыг тодорхойлдог. Бид асуудлыг хуваалцах үйлдэл гэж загварлаж байна. Өмнө нь харагдаж байсан синтактик зурагтай лиммас хамтдаа эхлээд хадгалагдаж, дараа нь VMWEs-ын морфо-синтактик өөрчлөлтийн төвөгтэй өөрчлөлт дээр хуваалцагдаж байна. Хэрэглэгчийн утга нь хоёуланг нь абсолюттай, т.е. VMWE-ын удирдагч, харьцангуй, т.е. өмнө нь VMWEs-тэй харьцуулахад үндсэн. Энэ арга нь Францын корпус дээр F-хэмжээний 4 хувиар суурь шугам гаргадаг.', 'so': 'Ereymo badan, khusuusan waxyaabo kala duduwan (VMWEs), waxay muujiyaan isbedelka idiosyncratic, taas oo dhibaato u ah codsiga NLP, sidaas darteed u baahan tahay aqoonsiga VMWE. We focus on the task of variant identification, i.e. identifying variants of previously seen VMWEs, whatever their surface form.  Dhibaatada sida shaqada fasaxa Sida ugu horraysa waxaa la soo saaraa xariijiyo jimicsiga ah oo la arkay lammaanka, markaasna lagu qoraa xarumaha ay ku xiran yihiin isbedelka morpho-syntactic ee VMWEs. Qiimaha qaaliga ah labadoodaba waa mid absiim ah, waa mid u haysta kandidada gaarka ah e e VMWE iyo qaraabada, taas oo ku saleysan isbarbardhigta kandida horay looga arkay VMWEs. Tan soo socoshada ayaa ka soo saara 4 boqolkiiba oo F-measure ku yaal korpus faransiis.', 'sv': 'Flera orduttryck, särskilt verbala, visar idiosynkratisk variabilitet, vilket är utmanande för NLP-applikationer, därav behovet av VMWE-identifiering. Vi fokuserar på uppgiften att identifiera varianter av tidigare sedda VMWE, oavsett ytform. Vi modellerar problemet som en klassificeringsuppgift. Syntaktiska subtrakter med tidigare sedda kombinationer av lemmer extraheras först och klassificeras sedan utifrån egenskaper som är relevanta för morfosyntaktisk variation av VMWE. Funktionsvärdena är både absoluta, dvs. giltiga för en viss VMWE-kandidat, och relativa, dvs. baserade på att jämföra en kandidat med tidigare sett VMWE. Detta tillvägagångssätt överträffar en baslinje med 4 procentenheter F-mått på en fransk korpus.', 'sr': 'Višeriječne izraze, posebno verbalne (VMWEs), pokazuju idiosynkratsku variabilnost, koja je izazovna za NLP aplikacije, zato je potrebna identifikacija VMWE. Fokusiramo se na zadatak identifikacije varijanta, tj. identifikacija varijanta prethodno viđenih VMWEs-a, bez obzira na njihovu površinu. Mi modeliramo problem kao klasifikacijski zadatak. Sintaktički supstraži sa prethodno viđenim kombinacijom lime su prvi put izvučeni, a zatim su klasifikovani na osnovu karakteristika relevantne morfosintaktičkoj varijaciji VMWE-a. Vrijednosti funkcije su obje apsolutne, tj. održavanje određenog kandidata VMWE-a i rođaka, tj. na osnovu usporedbe kandidata sa prethodno viđenim VMWE-ima. Ovaj pristup iznosi početnu liniju za 4 posto bodova F-mjere na francuskom korpusu.', 'si': 'ගොඩක් වචන ප්\u200dරවේශනය, විශේෂයෙන්ම වචන ප්\u200dරවේශනය (VMWE), මෝඩියෝසින්ක්\u200dරේටික වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවේශනය පෙන්වන්න, ඒක NLP යෝජනය සඳහ අපි වෙනස් පරීක්ෂණය ගැන අවධානය කරනවා කියලා, ඉතින්, පස්සේ දැක්ක වෙනස් විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා VMWE, ඔවුන්ගේ ප අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශේෂ වැඩක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. ලිම්මාස් සම්බන්ධය සමඟ සංකේතික සංකේතික සංකේතය පිළිගත්ත ලිම්මාස් සම්බන්ධයක් පළමුවෙන් පිළිගත්ත, ඊට පස්සේ VMW විශේෂතාවක් දෙන්නම අවස්ථාවක්, ඉතින් විශේෂ VMWE නියෝජිතයෙක් සඳහා සම්බන්ධයෙක්, ඉතින්, කලින් දැක්කා VMWE සඳහා අ මේ විදියට ප්\u200dරතිශේෂයෙන් ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ස් කොර්පුස් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ 4 ප්\u200dරතිශේෂ', 'ta': 'பல வார்த்தைகள், குறிப்பாக வார்த்தைகள் (VMWEs), முட்டாள்வியல் மாறுபாட்டை காட்டு, அது NLP பயன்பாடுகளுக்கு சவாலாகும், அதனால் VMWE அடைய நாம் மாறி அடையாளத்தின் செயல்பாட்டின் மீது கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம், அதாவது, முன்னோடு பார்க்கப்பட்ட VMWEs ன் மாறுபாடுகள நாம் பிரச்சனையை வகுப்பு பணியாக மாதிரியும். முன்பு பார்க்கப்பட்ட லெம்மாஸ் கூட்டுகளுடன் துணை மரங்கள் முதலில் பிரிக்கப்படுகின்றன, பின்னர் மோர்போக- ஒத்திசைவு மாற்றத்திற்கு தொடர Feature values are both absolute, i.e. hold for a particular VMWE candidate, and relative, i.e. based on comparing a candidate with previously seen VMWEs.  இந்த வழிமுறை ஒரு பிரெஞ்சு கோர்பாஸ் மீது 4% F-அளவின் புள்ளிகளை வெளியே செயல்படுத்துகிறது.', 'ur': 'Multiword expressions, especially verbal ones (VMWEs), show idiosyncratic variability, which is challenging for NLP applications, thus the need for VMWE identification. ہم متفاوت شناساتی کے کام پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں، یعنی پہلے دیکھے ہوئے VMWEs کے متفاوت شناساتے ہیں، ان کے سطح کی شکل، جو بھی ان کے سطح کی شکل ہے. ہم مشکل کو ایک کلاسپیٹ کام کے طور پر مدل کرتے ہیں۔ پہلے دیکھے ہوئے لیمز کی کمینٹیوں کے ساتھ سینٹکتیک زیب ریز پہلی بار نکالے جاتے ہیں اور پھر VMWEs کی morpho-syntactic تغییرات کے متعلق تغییرات کے بنیاد پر classified. Feature values are both absolute, i.e. held for a particular VMWE candidate, and relative, i.e. based on comparing a candidate with previously seen VMWEs. یہ طریقہ ایک فرانسوی کورپوس پر 4 فیصد پوینٹ کے ذریعہ بنیادی لین کو اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'uz': "Ko\xa0ªp so'zlar, hususan so\xa0ªzlar (VMWEs), idiosyncrat variabiliyatni ko\xa0ªrsatish, bu NLP dasturlari uchun qiymatga ega, shuning uchun VMWE identifikatsiya kerak. Biz oldingi ko\xa0ªrilgan VMWEsning varianlarini aniqlashga qaramamiz, ularning surface formatidagi varianlarni ko'rsamiz. Biz muammolarni sinf vazifasi sifatida modellaymiz. Name Parametrlar qiymatlari, balki avval ko\xa0ªrilgan VMWE kandidasiga murojaat qilish mumkin. Bu usulni Fransuz Korpusda 4 foiz qismlari bilan boshlaydi.", 'vi': 'Biểu thức đa từ, đặc biệt là ngôn ngữ (VMWEs), cho thấy sự biến đổi đặc biệt, thách thức cho ứng dụng NLP, do đó cần phải xác định VHWE. Chúng tôi tập trung vào nhiệm vụ nhận diện biến thể, tức là xác định các biến thể của các VMWEs đã từng thấy, bất kể bề mặt. Chúng tôi mô tả vấn đề như một nhiệm vụ phân loại. Những loại từ pháp thuật cộng với các kết hợp các loại lemma đã nhìn thấy trước được chiết xuất, rồi phân loại dựa vào các tính năng liên quan tới biến dạng morphine-sync của VHS. Các giá trị đặc trưng đều là tuyệt đối, tức là vị trí của ứng viên VMWE nào đó, và tương đối, tức là dựa trên so sánh một ứng cử viên với kiểu VMWEs đã thấy trước đây. Cách tiếp cận này thực hiện một cơ sở dựa trên 4 phần trăm điểm F-thước đo trên một tập đoàn Pháp.', 'bg': 'Многословните изрази, особено вербалните, показват идиосинкратична вариабилност, което е предизвикателство за приложенията на НЛП, поради което и необходимостта от идентификация на НЛУ. Фокусираме се върху задачата за идентификация на вариантите, т.е. идентифициране на варианти на предварително виждани ВМВЕ, независимо от тяхната повърхностна форма. Ние моделираме проблема като задача за класификация. Първо се извличат синтактичните субтреи с наблюдавани преди това комбинации от леми и след това се класифицират въз основа на характеристиките, свързани с морфосинтактичната вариация на VMWE. Стойностите на характеристиките са както абсолютни, т.е. валидни за конкретен кандидат за VMWE, така и относителни, т.е. въз основа на сравняване на кандидат с предварително виждани VMWE. Този подход надминава базовата база с 4 процентни пункта от мярката на френския корпус.', 'da': "Flere ord udtryk, især verbale (VMWE'er), viser idiosynkratisk variabilitet, hvilket er udfordrende for NLP-applikationer, derfor behovet for VMWE identifikation. Vi fokuserer på opgaven med variantidentifikation, dvs. identificering af varianter af tidligere set VMWE'er, uanset deres overfladeform. Vi modellerer problemet som en klassifikationsopgave. Syntaktiske subtræer med tidligere set kombinationer af lemmer ekstraheres først og klassificeres derefter på grundlag af egenskaber, der er relevante for morfosyntaktisk variation af VMWE'er. Feature værdier er både absolutte, dvs. gældende for en bestemt VMWE kandidat, og relative, dvs. baseret på at sammenligne en kandidat med tidligere set VMWE'er. Denne fremgangsmåde overgår en baseline med 4 procentpoint F-måling på et fransk korpus.", 'nl': "Multiword uitdrukkingen, vooral verbale uitdrukkingen (VMWE's), vertonen eigenzinnige variabiliteit, wat een uitdaging is voor NLP-toepassingen, vandaar de noodzaak van VMWE-identificatie. We richten ons op de taak van variantidentificatie, dat wil zeggen het identificeren van varianten van eerder gezien VMWE's, ongeacht hun oppervlaktevorm. We modelleren het probleem als een classificatietaak. Syntactische subtrees met eerder gezien combinaties van lemma's worden eerst geëxtraheerd en vervolgens geclassificeerd op basis van kenmerken die relevant zijn voor morfosyntactische variatie van VMWE's. Functiewaarden zijn zowel absoluut, d.w.z. hold voor een bepaalde VMWE-kandidaat, als relatief, d.w.z. gebaseerd op het vergelijken van een kandidaat met eerder gezien VMWE's. Deze benadering overtreft een baseline met vier procent punten van F-maat op een Frans corpus.", 'id': 'Ekspresi berbilang kata, terutama yang verbal (VMWEs), menunjukkan variabilitas idiosinkratis, yang menantang untuk aplikasi NLP, sehingga membutuhkan identifikasi VMWE. Kami fokus pada tugas identifikasi varian, i.e. identifikasi varian dari VMWEs yang sebelumnya terlihat, apapun bentuk permukaan mereka. Kita model masalah sebagai tugas klasifikasi. Subrees sintaktik dengan kombinasi lemma yang sebelumnya terlihat pertama dikekstraksi, dan kemudian diklasifikasikan berdasarkan ciri-ciri yang relevan untuk variasi morfo-sintaktik VMWEs. Nilai fitur adalah sama-sama mutlak, i.e. memegang untuk kandidat VMWE tertentu, dan relatif, i.e. berdasarkan membandingkan kandidat dengan VMWEs yang sebelumnya terlihat. pendekatan ini melebihi garis dasar dengan 4 persen poin F-ukuran pada korpus Perancis.', 'de': 'Mehrwortausdrücke, insbesondere verbale Ausdrücke (VMWEs), weisen eine idiosynkratische Variabilität auf, die für NLP-Anwendungen eine Herausforderung darstellt, weshalb VMWE-Identifikation erforderlich ist. Wir konzentrieren uns auf die Aufgabe der Variantenidentifikation, d.h. die Identifizierung von Varianten bisher gesehener VMWE unabhängig von ihrer Oberflächenform. Wir modellieren das Problem als Klassifizierungsaufgabe. Syntaktische Subtrakte mit zuvor gesehenen Kombinationen von Lemmen werden zunächst extrahiert und dann anhand von Merkmalen klassifiziert, die für morphosyntaktische Variation von VMWEs relevant sind. Feature-Werte sind sowohl absolut, d.h. für einen bestimmten VMWE-Kandidaten halten, als auch relativ, d.h. basierend auf dem Vergleich eines Kandidaten mit zuvor gesehenen VMWEs. Dieser Ansatz übertrifft eine Grundlinie um vier Prozent des F-Maßes auf einem französischen Korpus.', 'hr': 'Višeriječne izraze, posebno verbalne (VMWEs), pokazuju idiosynkratsku variabilnost, koja je izazovna za primjene NLP-a, zbog čega je potrebna identifikacija VMWE-a. Fokusiramo se na zadatak identifikacije varijanta, tj. identifikacija varijanta prethodno viđenih VMWEs-a, bez obzira na njihovu površinu. Modeliramo problem kao klasifikacijski zadatak. Sintaktički supstraži s prethodno viđenim kombinacijom lime su prvi put izvučeni, a zatim su klasifikirani na temelju karakteristika relevantne morfosintaktičkoj varijaciji VMWE-a. Vrijednosti mogućnosti obje su apsolutne, tj. održavanje određenog kandidata VMWE-a i rođaka, tj. na osnovu usporedbe kandidata s prethodno viđenim VMWE-ima. Ovaj pristup iznosi početnu liniju za 4 posto bodova F-mjere na francuskom korpusu.', 'sw': 'Hotuba nyingi za maneno, hususani zile za kawaida (VMWEs), zinaonyesha mabadiliko ya kijinga, ambayo ni changamoto kwa matumizi ya NLP, na hivyo hitaji la kutambulisha VMWE. Tunashikilia jukumu la kutambua tofauti, yaani kutambua mabadiliko ya yaliyotazama VMWEs, chochote kinachofanana na sura yao. Tunaweza kutengeneza tatizo kama kazi ya usambazaji. Mfumo wa viungo vya ushirikiano na viungo vya viungo vilivyoonekana viliondolewa kwa mara ya kwanza, na kisha vilisambazwa kwa msingi wa vipengele vinavyohusiana na mabadiliko ya simu za mkononi ya VMWEs. Takwimu zenye thamani zote ni muhimu, yaani kwa ajili ya mgombea maalum wa VMWE, na ndugu, yaani kwa kulinganisha mgombea na aliyewahi kuonekana na VMWEs. Hatua hii inaonyesha mitazamo ya msingi kwa asilimia 4 ya kipimo cha F kwenye mashindano ya Kifaransa.', 'fa': 'واژه\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای زیادی، مخصوصاً واژه\u200cهای زبانی (VMWEs), تغییرات احمقانه\u200cای را نشان می\u200cدهند که برای کاربردهای NLP مشکل است، بنابراین نیاز به شناسایی VMWE است. ما روی کار شناسایی تغییرات تمرکز می کنیم، یعنی شناسایی تغییرات VMWEs که قبلاً دیده بودند، هر شکل سطح آنها. ما مشکل را به عنوان یک کار جدید مدل می\u200cکنیم. پایین\u200cهای سنتاکتیک با ترکیب\u200cهای لیما پیش\u200cبینی شده\u200cاند، اول اخراج می\u200cشوند، و سپس بر اساس ویژگی\u200cهای مربوط به تغییرات مرفو-سنتاکتیک VMWEs، مختصر می\u200cشوند. ارزشهای ویژه هر دو مطلق هستند، یعنی برای یک کاندیدای ویژه ویژه و نسبتی، یعنی بر مقایسه یک کاندیدای با VMWEs پیش دیده شده است. این روش با 4 درصد نقطه\u200cای از اندازه\u200cهای F در یک کورپوس فرانسوی بیشتر از یک خط پایین انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'K철p s철z ifadeleri, 철zellikle verbal olary (VMWEs), samsyk g철rn체힊liklerini g철rkez, NLP programleri 체챌in kyn챌ylyk edip, 힊onu흫 체챌in VMWE identifikaci첵asyny흫 gerekli bolmagyny g철rkez. Biz wariant identifika첵asyny흫 i 힊ine 체ns berip g철r첵채ris, di첵mek 체챌in 철흫 g철ren VMWEs-i흫 체첵tgewlerini tany첵arys. Biz mesel채ni klasifikasi첵a t채blisasy 첵aly nusgala ed첵채ris. 횜흫ki g철rd체kleri limmalar kombinatsiyalary bilen sentaktik atmalar ilkinji gezek 챌ekil첵채r we so흫ra VMWEs-i흫 morpho-sintaktik 체첵tge힊igine degi힊li 철zelliklere 체첵tgedil첵채r. Farklyk Mykdarlaryny흫 ikisi Absolut, i 흫. 횜흫ki VMWE 체첵tgewleri bilen me흫ze힊 duran Bu 첵ala첵y힊 fransuz korpusynda F 철l챌체si 4 prosent p체nt챌esine 체첵tged첵채r.', 'sq': 'Shprehjet shumëfjalore, veçanërisht ato verbale (VMWEs), tregojnë variabilitet idiosinkratike, e cila është sfida për aplikimet NLP, kështu që nevoja për identifikimin VMWE. We focus on the task of variant identification, i.e. identifying variants of previously seen VMWEs, whatever their surface form.  Ne e modelojmë problemin si një detyrë klasifikimi. Njerëzit sintaktikë me kombinimet e pamura më parë të limës nxirren së pari dhe pastaj klasifikohen në bazë të karakteristikave të rëndësishme për variacionin morfosintaktik të VMWEs. Vlerat e funksionimit janë të dyja absolute, pra të mbajnë për një kandidat të veçantë VMWE dhe të afërm, pra të bazuar në krahasimin e një kandidati me VMWEs të parë më parë. Ky qasje kalon një bazë me 4 përqind pikë të masës F në një korpus francez.', 'am': 'ብዙ ቃላት፣ በተለየ የዌብ መቃኛ (VMWEs), የዶዶሴኒካር መለወጥ ያሳያል፤ ይህም የNLP ፕሮግራሞች መከራ ነው፤ ስለዚህ VMWE ማረጋገጫ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ የVMWEs መልዕክት ማንኛውንም ዓይነት ቢሆን የሚለየውን መልዕክት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ጉዳዩን ለመለያየት ስራ እናሳውቃለን ። አስቀድሞ የተመለከቱት ልማሶች ጉዳዮች በመጀመሪያ ይነጥቃሉ፣ ከዚያም በኋላ በኦሮፎ-Syntactic ለVMWEs የተጠቃሚ ክፍሎች ላይ በተለየ፡፡ የፊደል ዋጋዎች ሁለቱም ተሟጋቾች ናቸው፤ ያይደንጋሉ የVMWE ምናዳሪ እና የአባላዊ የVMWEs አስቀድሞ በተመለከተው ምናዳሪ በመተካከል ነው፡፡ ይህ ሥርዓት ፈረንሳይኛ ኮርፓስ ላይ 4 በመቶ ነጥቦች የF-መስመር መስመር የሚደረገውን የቤዜሊን መስመር ነው፡፡', 'af': "Veelvuldige woorde uitdrukkings, veral verbale een (VMWEs), vertoon idiosynkratiese veranderlikheid, wat is vanskelig vir NLP toepassings, daarom die benodig vir VMWE identifikasie. Ons fokus op die taak van veranderlike identifikasie, i.e. identifiseer veranderinge van voorheen gesien VMWEs, enige oorspronklike vorm. Ons model die probleem as 'n klassifikasie taak. Sintaktieke onderstreekte met voorheen gesien kombinasies van lemmas word eerste uitgevoer, en dan klassifiseer op die basis van funksies wat relevante vir morpho- sintaktieke variasie van VMWEs is. Funksie waardes is beide absoluut, bv. hou vir 'n bepaalde VMWE kandidate en relatief, bv. gebaseer op vergelyking van 'n kandidate met voorheen gesien VMWE. Hierdie toegang uitvoer 'n basislien met 4 persent punte van F-maat op 'n Frans korpus.", 'hy': "Բազբառային արտահայտությունները, հատկապես լեբալ արտահայտությունները (VMWEs), ցույց են տալիս իդոսինկրատիկ տարբերականությունը, ինչը մարտահրավեր է տալիս ՆԼՊ ծրագրերի համար, այսինքն՝ VMWE-ի ինքնության կարիքը: Մենք կենտրոնանում ենք տարբերակների հայտնաբերման խնդրի վրա, այսինքն' նախկինում տեսած VMWE-ների տարբերակների հայտնաբերման վրա, անկախ իրենց մակերեսի ձևից: Մենք այս խնդիրը մոդելավորում ենք որպես դասակարգման խնդիր: Սինտակտիկ նշանները, որոնք նախկինում տեսել են լիմմայի համակցություններ, առաջին անգամ դուրս են գալիս և հետո դասակարգում են ըստ VMWE-ների մորֆոսինտակտիկ տարբերակների նշանների: Երևակայական արժեքները բացարձակ են, այսինքն՝ պահել որոշակի VMWE թեկնածու համար, և հարաբերական, այսինքն՝ հիմնված թեկնածու և նախկինում տեսած VMWEs-ների համեմատության վրա: Այս մոտեցումը գերազանցում է ֆրանսիական կորպոսի F-չափման 4 տոկոսով:", 'az': "Çoxlu söz ifadələri, özlərinə də verbal ifadələr (VMWEs), idiosinkratlı dəyişiklik göstər, NLP uyğulamaları üçün çətin olmuş, buna görə də VMWE identifikasına ihtiyacı var. Biz, əvvəlcə gördüyünüz VMWE-lərin dəyişikliklərini təsdiqləmək üçün dəyişiklik təsdiqlənmək i şinə odaqlanırıq. Biz problemi klasifikasiya görevi kimi modelləyirik. Daha öncə gördüyünüz limmas kombinatsiyaları ilə sintaktik süslər ilk dəfə çıxarılır və sonra VMWEs'in morpho-sintaktik dəyişikliklərinə bağlı özelliklərin dəyişikliklərinə görə sıralanırlar. Mümkün qiymətlər hər ikisi də absolut, məsələn VMWE kandidātı və qohumluq, məsələn, əvvəlcə gördüyü VMWE-lərlə qarşılaşdırmağa dayanan bir kandidātı. Bu tərzim Fransız korpusu üçün F ölçüsünün 4%-dən əsas çəkilməsini başa düşər.", 'bn': 'অনেক শব্দের প্রকাশ, বিশেষ করে ভিএমডিউইএস, বিদ্রোহীত বৈষম্য প্রদর্শন করুন, যা এনএলপি অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের জন্য চ্যালেঞ্জ করছে, যার ফলে ভিএমউই আমরা ভেরিয়েন্ট পরিচয়ের কাজের উপর মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি, যেমন পূর্ববর্তী ভিএমওয়াইএস-এর ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ আমরা সমস্যাকে ক্লাসাফিকেশনের কাজ হিসেবে মডেল করি। পূর্বে দেখা যাচ্ছে লেম্মাসের সাবট্যাক্টিক সাবট্রীগুলো প্রথমে বের করা হয়েছে এবং তারপর ভিএমওয়াইসের মোর্ফোর সিন্ট্যাকটিক বিভাগের স বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী মান উভয়ই সম্পূর্ণ, যেমন একটি বিশেষ ভিএমওয়াই প্রার্থীর জন্য অপেক্ষা করা এবং আত্মীয়, যেমন প্রার্থীর তুলনায় পূর্বে ভিএমওয়াইএস এই প্রতিযোগিতা ফ্রেঞ্চ কোর্পাসের উপর ৪ শতাংশের বেস্ট লাইনের মাধ্যমে প্রকাশ করে।', 'bs': 'Višeriječne izraze, posebno verbalne (VMWEs), pokazuju idiosynkratsku variabilnost, koja je izazovna za NLP aplikacije, zato je potrebna identifikacija VMWE. Fokusiramo se na zadatak identifikacije varijanta, tj. identifikacija varijanta prethodno viđenih VMWEs-a, bez obzira na njihovu površinu. Mi modeliramo problem kao klasifikacijski zadatak. Sintaktički supstraži sa prethodno viđenim kombinacijom lime su prvi put izvučeni, a zatim su klasifikovani na temelju karakteristika relevantne morfosintaktičkoj varijaciji VMWE-a. Vrijednosti mogućnosti su obje apsolutne, tj. održavanje određenog kandidata VMWE-a i rođaka, tj. na osnovu usporedbe kandidata sa prethodno viđenim VMWE-ima. Ovaj pristup iznosi početnu liniju za 4 posto bodova F-mjere na francuskom korpusu.', 'ca': "Les expressions multiparaules, especialment les verbals (VMWEs), mostren variabilitat idiosincràtica, que és un repte per les aplicacions NLP, per tant la necessitat d'identificar VMWE. We focus on the task of variant identification, i.e. identifying variants of previously seen VMWEs, whatever their surface form.  Modelem el problem a com a tasca de classificació. Les subtrees sintàtiques amb combinacions previament vistes de limos s'extrauen primer, i després es classifiquen segons característiques rellevants a la variació morfosintàtica de VMWEs. Els valors característics són ambdós absoluts, és a dir, esperar per un candidat en particular VMWE, i relativs, és a dir, basats en comparar un candidat amb VMWEs previament vists. Aquest enfocament supera un 4% de punts de mesura F en un cos francès.", 'cs': 'Víceslovné výrazy, zejména verbální (VMWE), vykazují idiosynkratickou variabilitu, což je pro aplikace NLP náročné, a proto potřebu identifikace VMWE. Zaměřujeme se na úkol identifikace variant, tedy identifikace variant dříve viděných VMWE bez ohledu na jejich povrchovou formu. Problém modelujeme jako klasifikační úkol. Syntaktické subtrée s dříve viděnými kombinacemi lemmů jsou nejprve extrahovány a poté klasifikovány na základě vlastností relevantních pro morfosyntaktickou variaci VMWE. Hodnoty funkcí jsou jak absolutní, tj. hold pro konkrétní kandidáta VMWE, tak relativní, tj. na základě porovnání kandidáta s dříve viděnými VMWE. Tento přístup předčí základní hodnotu o čtyři procentní body F-měření na francouzském korpusu.', 'et': 'Mitmesõnalised väljendid, eriti verbaalsed väljendid (VMWE), näitavad idiosünkraatilist varieeruvust, mis on NLP rakenduste jaoks keeruline, mistõttu on vaja VMWE identifitseerimist. Keskendume variantide identifitseerimise ülesandele ehk varem nähtud VMWE variantide identifitseerimisele olenemata nende pinnavormist. Me modelleerime probleemi kui klassifitseerimisülesande. Kõigepealt ekstraheeritakse süntaktilised subtraadid varem nähtud lemmade kombinatsioonidega ja seejärel klassifitseeritakse VMWE morfosüntaktilise variatsiooni omaduste alusel. Funktsiooniväärtused on nii absoluutsed, st kindla VMWE kandidaadi puhul, kui ka suhtelised, st põhinevad kandidaadi võrdlemisel varem nähtud VMWEga. See lähenemisviis ületab lähtetaseme 4 protsendipunkti F-meetmest Prantsuse korpuse puhul.', 'fi': 'Monisanalausekkeet, erityisesti verbaaliset (VMWE), osoittavat idiosynkraattista vaihtelua, mikä on haastavaa NLP-sovelluksille, minkä vuoksi VMWE-tunnistuksen tarve on tarpeen. Keskitymme varianttien tunnistamiseen eli aiemmin havaittujen VMWE-laitteiden varianttien tunnistamiseen niiden pintamuodosta riippumatta. Mallistamme ongelman luokittelutehtäväksi. Syntaktiset subtraeet, joissa on aiemmin havaittuja lemmojen yhdistelmiä, erotetaan ensin ja luokitellaan VMWE:ien morfosyntaktiseen vaihteluun liittyvien ominaisuuksien perusteella. Ominaisuusarvot ovat sekä absoluuttisia eli tietyn VMWE-ehdokkaan osalta että suhteellisia eli ne perustuvat ehdokkaan vertailuun aiemmin havaittuihin VMWE-ehdokkaisiin. Tämä lähestymistapa ylittää lähtötilanteen 4 prosenttiyksiköllä F-mittarin ranskalaisessa korpusessa.', 'ko': '다사 표현식, 특히 동사 표현식(VMWE)은 특수한 가변성을 나타내는데 이것은 NLP 응용에 도전이기 때문에 VMWE를 식별해야 한다.우리는 표면적인 형태와 관계없이 이전에 본 VMWE의 변형을 식별하는 작업에 전념하고 있습니다.우리는 문제를 하나의 분류 임무로 모델링할 것이다.먼저 이전에 보지 못했던 인용 조합을 가진 문법 서브트리를 추출한 다음에 VMWE의 형태-문법 변이와 관련된 특징에 따라 분류한다.피쳐 값은 특정 VMWE 후보를 변경하지 않고 후보를 이전에 본 VMWE와 비교하는 데 따른 절대값입니다.프랑스어 어료고에서 이런 방법의 F-측도는 기선보다 4퍼센트 높다.', 'jv': 'Spanish string" in "context_BAR_stringLink tasklist politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness structural navigation Awakdhéwé iki nggawe barang kanggo 4 perusahaan punika F-suku kanggo nganggo cara Perancis.', 'sk': 'Večbesedni izrazi, zlasti verbalni izrazi (VMWE), kažejo idiosinkratsko variabilnost, kar je izziv za aplikacije NLP, zato je potrebna identifikacija VMWE. Osredotočamo se na nalogo identifikacije variant, tj. identifikacijo variant predhodno videnih VMWE, ne glede na njihovo površinsko obliko. Težavo modeliramo kot klasifikacijsko nalogo. Sintaksični subtreji s predhodno opaženimi kombinacijami lem se najprej ekstrahirajo in nato razvrstijo na podlagi značilnosti, pomembnih za morfo-sintaktično variacijo VMWE. Vrednosti lastnosti so absolutne, tj. veljajo za določenega kandidata VMWE, in relativne, tj. temeljijo na primerjavi kandidata s predhodno videnimi VMWE. Ta pristop presega osnovno vrednost za 4 odstotne točke F-merila na francoskem korpusu.', 'ha': 'Bayan magana masu yawa, hususan masu inganci (vMWEs), ka nuna variance na dioskinta, wanda ke tsõratar wa shiryoyin ayuka na NLP, don haka kuma ana buƙata bayani na WMWU. Munã fokus cikin aikin shaidar daban-daban, misali, yana gane variants masu da aka gan a gabãni na vMWEs, ko duk tsarin su. Tuna bayyana mataimaki kamar wani aikin fassarar. @ info: whatsthis Kima kyauta biyu suna cikakken, misali, ka yi tsari ga mai ƙayyade wa WMWU, kuma da danganta, misali, a sami da wani kanan da aka gan a gabãni na WMWEs. Wannan hanyarwa na ƙarfafa wani basalin salon na 4% point of F-meter kan wata faransa.', 'he': 'ביטויים רבים מילים, במיוחד מילים (VMWEs), מראים שינוי אידיוסינקרטי, שזה מאתגר לתוכניות NLP, ולכן הצורך לזהות VMWE. אנחנו מתמקדים במשימה של זיהוי שונים, כלומר זיהוי שונים של VMWEs ראויים קודם, לא משנה צורת השטח שלהם. אנחנו דוגמנים את הבעיה כמשימה מסווג. מתחתונים סינטקטיים עם שילובים של לימה ראויים קודם הווצאים לראשונה, ואז מסווגים על בסיס תכונות רלוונטיות למורפו-סינטקטיים של VMWEs. ערכים אופייניים הם גם מוחלטים, כלומר מחזיקים עבור מועמד VMWE מסוים, וגם יחסים, כלומר מבוססים על השוואה מועמד עם VMWEs ראויים קודם לכן. הגישה הזאת עולה על רמז של 4 נקודות אחוזות של F-מדידה על קורפוס צרפתי.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཆ་མང་ཙམ་གྱི་གསལ་བརྗོད་དག་ལ་ཁྱད་པར་བྱ་ཚིག་དག (VMWEs)idiosyncratic variability་སྟོན་པ། དེ་ནི་NLP ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ལ་དཀའ ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་འགྱུར་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་དམིགས་ཟད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་རྩིས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Syntactic subtrees with previously seen combinations of lemmas are first extracted, and then classified on the basis of features relevant to morpho-syntactic variation of VMWEs. ཆེད་འཛིན་གྱི་རིན་ཐང་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་ཐད་སྡོམ་བ་དང་དཔེར་ན། VMWE རེ་བ་སྐྱེས་པ་ཞིག་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་མཚོན་ན། ཡང་ན་ཆ་རྐྱེན་པ་ཞིག་ལ་སྔོ འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཡིན་མཁའ་དབུགས་ཞིག་ལས་F(F)རྒྱ་ཚད་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྐྱེལ་བཞིན་ཐལ་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Using Word Embeddings for Unsupervised Acronym Disambiguation', 'ar': 'استخدام Word Embeddings لتوضيح الاختصار غير الخاضع للإشراف', 'pt': 'Usando Word Embeddings para Desambiguação de Acrônimos Não Supervisionados', 'fr': 'Utilisation des intégrations de mots pour la désambiguïsation non supervisée des acronymes', 'es': 'Uso de incrustaciones de palabras para la desambiguación de acrónimos sin supervisión', 'ja': '監督されていない頭字語の曖昧さ解消のための単語埋め込みの使用', 'zh': '用词嵌无监督首字母缩略词消歧义', 'hi': 'Unsupervised Acronym Disambiguation के लिए Word Embeddings का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Использование встраивания слов для неконтролируемого снятия двусмысленности с сокращений', 'ga': 'Leabú Focal a Úsáid le haghaidh Dídhébhríocht Acrainm Gan Mhaoirseacht', 'ka': 'სიტყვების შებეჭდვის გამოყენება', 'el': 'Χρήση ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων για αποσαφήνιση ακρωνύμων χωρίς επιτήρηση', 'hu': 'Szóbeágyazások használata a felügyelet nélküli akronymentesítéshez', 'lt': 'Naudojant žodžių įdėjimus nekontroliuojamiems akronimams išaiškinti', 'it': 'Utilizzo di incorporazioni di parole per la disambiguazione di acronimi non sorvegliati', 'mk': 'Користење вградувања на зборови за ненадгледувана дејамбигуација на акронимите', 'kk': 'Акронимді өшіру үшін сөздерді ендіру қолданылады', 'ms': 'Mengguna Pencampuran Kata untuk Pemindahan Akronim Tidak Dikawal', 'mt': 'L-użu ta’ inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem għad-Disambiguation tal-Akronimi Mhux Sorveljati', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത ആക്രോണിമിന്റെ വാക്ക് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു', 'pl': 'Używanie osadzeń programu Word dla nienadzorowanego rozproszenia akronimu', 'sr': 'Koristeći uključenje reèi za neodržavanu akronimu dezambiguaciju', 'si': 'සුරක්ෂා නැති අක්\u200dරෝනිම් අවස්ථාවය සඳහා වචන සම්බන්ධය භාවිත කරන්න', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгдэхгүй хүрээлэн бууруулах үг нэмж хэрэглэх', 'no': 'Bruk ord- innbygging for usikkerte akronym- avslutting', 'ro': 'Utilizarea încorporărilor Word pentru dezambiguizarea acronimelor nesupravegheate', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத Acronym வடிவமைப்பிற்கான வார்த்தை உட்பொதிகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'ur': 'غیرقابل غیرقابل اعتراض کے لئے Word Embeddings استعمال کیا جاتا ہے', 'so': 'Isticmaalka qalabka afka ee Unsupervised Acronym Disambiguay', 'sv': 'Använda Word-inbäddningar för oövervakad Acronym Disambiguation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sử dụng môi trường từ cho Ám ngữ', 'bg': 'Използване на вграждания на думи за неконтролирано разграничаване на акронимите', 'hr': 'Koristeći uključenje riječi za nepotrebnu akronimnu disambiguaciju', 'da': 'Brug af Word Embeddings til ukontrolleret akronym Disambiguation', 'nl': 'Word-insluitingen gebruiken voor niet-beheerde acroniemdisambiguatie', 'id': 'Menggunakan Embedding Word untuk Disambiguation Akronym Tidak Disupervise', 'ko': '단어 삽입을 사용하여 무감독의 알파벳 줄임말 변조', 'de': 'Verwenden von Word-Einbettungen für nicht überwachte Akronym-Disambiguation', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia Mazungumzo ya Neno kwa Kuzungumzwa na Uchunguzi Wasiofuatiwa', 'fa': 'استفاده از ابتدایی\u200cهای کلمه برای ناپذیرش اکرونیم غیرقابل حفاظت', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar Akronym Çykarmak üçin Sözler Ullanylýar', 'af': 'Gebruik Woord Inbetering vir Ononderwerpende Akronym Ontbreking', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i përfshirjes së fjalëve për zhdukjen e akronimit pa mbikqyrje', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով բառերի ներգրավումներ անվերահսկված աքրոնիմների անբացատրության համար', 'az': 'Qeyd edilməmiş Akronim Səhifləməsi üçün Kelimi İfadələri qullanılır', 'bn': 'অনভারওয়ার্ড অ্যাক্রোনিম ডিসামিগুয়েশনের জন্য শব্দের ইমেডিং ব্যবহার করে', 'bs': 'Koristeći uključenje riječi za neodređenu akronimnu disambiguaciju', 'ca': "Utilitzant integracions de paraules per desambiguació d'acronimes sense supervisió", 'cs': 'Používání vložení slova pro nedohlížené rozjasnění akronymů', 'fi': 'Wordin upotusten käyttäminen valvomattomassa lyhenteessä', 'et': 'Wordi manustamine järelevalveta lühendite disambiguatsiooni korral', 'ha': 'dictionary variant', 'he': 'Using Word Embeddings for Unsupervised Acronym Disambiguation', 'sk': 'Uporaba besednih vdelav za nenadzorovano kratico Razjasnitev', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'bo': 'སྲུང་མེད་པའི་གདོང་རིས་ལ་མཚོན་རྟགས་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་སྟངས་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Scientific papers from all disciplines contain many abbreviations and acronyms. In many cases these acronyms are ambiguous. We present a method to choose the contextual correct definition of an acronym that does not require training for each acronym and thus can be applied to a large number of different acronyms with only few instances. We constructed a set of 19,954 examples of 4,365 ambiguous acronyms from image captions in scientific papers along with their contextually correct definition from different domains. We learn word embeddings for all words in the corpus and compare the averaged context vector of the words in the expansion of an acronym with the weighted average vector of the words in the context of the acronym. We show that this method clearly outperforms (classical) cosine similarity. Furthermore, we show that word embeddings learned from a 1 billion word corpus of scientific texts outperform word embeddings learned on much large general corpora.', 'pt': 'Os artigos científicos de todas as disciplinas contêm muitas abreviaturas e siglas. Em muitos casos, essas siglas são ambíguas. Apresentamos um método para escolher a definição contextual correta de um acrônimo que não requer treinamento para cada acrônimo e, portanto, pode ser aplicado a um grande número de acrônimos diferentes com apenas algumas instâncias. Construímos um conjunto de 19.954 exemplos de 4.365 siglas ambíguas a partir de legendas de imagens em artigos científicos juntamente com sua definição contextualmente correta de diferentes domínios. Aprendemos as incorporações de palavras para todas as palavras do corpus e comparamos o vetor de contexto médio das palavras na expansão de um acrônimo com o vetor de média ponderada das palavras no contexto do acrônimo. Mostramos que este método supera claramente a similaridade de cosseno (clássica). Além disso, mostramos que as incorporações de palavras aprendidas em um corpus de 1 bilhão de palavras de textos científicos superam as incorporações de palavras aprendidas em corpora gerais muito grandes.', 'fr': "Les articles scientifiques de toutes les disciplines contiennent de nombreuses abréviations et acronymes. Dans de nombreux cas, ces acronymes sont ambigus. Nous présentons une méthode pour choisir la définition contextuelle correcte d'un acronyme qui ne nécessite pas de formation pour chaque acronyme et qui peut donc être appliquée à un grand nombre d'acronymes différents avec seulement quelques instances. Nous avons construit un ensemble de 19 954 exemples de 4 365 acronymes ambigus à partir de légendes d'images dans des articles scientifiques, ainsi que leur définition contextuellement correcte dans différents domaines. Nous apprenons les intégrations de mots pour tous les mots du corpus et comparons le vecteur de contexte moyen des mots dans le développement d'un acronyme avec le vecteur de moyenne pondérée des mots dans le contexte de l'acronyme. Nous montrons que cette méthode surpasse nettement la similitude cosinus (classique). En outre, nous montrons que les intégrations de mots apprises à partir d'un corpus de 1 milliard de mots de textes scientifiques surpassent les intégrations de mots apprises sur de nombreux grands corpus généraux.", 'ar': 'تحتوي الأوراق العلمية من جميع التخصصات على العديد من الاختصارات والمختصرات. في كثير من الحالات ، تكون هذه الاختصارات غامضة. نقدم طريقة لاختيار التعريف الصحيح السياقي للاختصار الذي لا يتطلب تدريبًا لكل اختصار ، وبالتالي يمكن تطبيقه على عدد كبير من الاختصارات المختلفة مع حالات قليلة فقط. أنشأنا مجموعة من 19954 مثالًا لـ 4365 اختصارًا غامضًا من تسميات توضيحية للصور في الأوراق العلمية جنبًا إلى جنب مع تعريفها الصحيح للسياق من مجالات مختلفة. نتعلم تضمين الكلمات لجميع الكلمات في المجموعة ونقارن متجه السياق المتوسط للكلمات في توسيع اختصار مع متجه المتوسط المرجح للكلمات في سياق الاختصار. نوضح أن هذه الطريقة تتفوق بوضوح على تشابه جيب التمام (الكلاسيكي). علاوة على ذلك ، نظهر أن حفلات الزفاف بالكلمات المستفادة من مجموعة من مليار كلمة من النصوص العلمية تتفوق في الأداء على زخرفة الكلمات المكتسبة في الكثير من المجموعات العامة الكبيرة.', 'es': 'Los artículos científicos de todas las disciplinas contienen muchas abreviaturas y acrónimos. En muchos casos, estas siglas son ambiguas. Presentamos un método para elegir la definición contextual correcta de un acrónimo que no requiere entrenamiento para cada acrónimo y, por lo tanto, se puede aplicar a un gran número de acrónimos diferentes con solo unos pocos casos. Construimos un conjunto de 19.954 ejemplos de 4.365 acrónimos ambiguos a partir de leyendas de imágenes en artículos científicos junto con su definición contextualmente correcta de diferentes dominios. Aprendemos incrustaciones de palabras para todas las palabras del corpus y comparamos el vector de contexto promediado de las palabras en la expansión de un acrónimo con el vector de promedio ponderado de las palabras en el contexto del acrónimo. Demostramos que este método supera claramente la similitud de coseno (clásica). Además, mostramos que las incrustaciones de palabras aprendidas de un corpus de textos científicos de mil millones de palabras superan a las incrustaciones de palabras aprendidas en muchos cuerpos generales grandes.', 'hi': 'सभी विषयों के वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में कई संक्षिप्त रूप और संक्षिप्त शब्द होते हैं। कई मामलों में ये संक्षिप्त शब्द अस्पष्ट हैं। हम एक संक्षिप्त नाम की प्रासंगिक सही परिभाषा चुनने के लिए एक विधि प्रस्तुत करते हैं जिसे प्रत्येक संक्षिप्त शब्द के लिए प्रशिक्षण की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है और इस प्रकार केवल कुछ उदाहरणों के साथ बड़ी संख्या में विभिन्न संक्षिप्त शब्दों पर लागू किया जा सकता है। हमने वैज्ञानिक पत्रों में छवि कैप्शन से 4,365 अस्पष्ट संक्षिप्त शब्दों के 19,954 उदाहरणों के एक सेट का निर्माण किया, साथ ही विभिन्न डोमेन से उनकी प्रासंगिक रूप से सही परिभाषा के साथ। हम कॉर्पस में सभी शब्दों के लिए शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखते हैं और संक्षिप्त शब्द के संदर्भ में शब्दों के भारित औसत वेक्टर के साथ एक संक्षिप्त शब्द के विस्तार में शब्दों के औसत संदर्भ वेक्टर की तुलना करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि यह विधि स्पष्ट रूप से (शास्त्रीय) कोसाइन समानता को मात देती है। इसके अलावा, हम दिखाते हैं कि वैज्ञानिक ग्रंथों के 1 बिलियन शब्द कॉर्पस से सीखे गए शब्द एम्बेडिंग्स बहुत बड़े सामान्य कॉर्पोरेट पर सीखे गए शब्द एम्बेडिंग को मात देते हैं।', 'ja': 'すべての学問分野からの科学論文には多くの略語や頭文字が含まれている。多くの場合、これらの頭文字は曖昧である。頭字語の文脈上の正しい定義を選択する方法を提示します。これは、各頭字語のトレーニングを必要とせず、したがって、わずかなインスタンスで多数の異なる頭字語に適用することができます。私たちは、科学論文の画像キャプションからの4,365の曖昧な頭字語の19,954の例と、異なるドメインからの文脈上正しい定義のセットを構築しました。私たちはコーパス内のすべての単語の単語埋め込みを学び、頭字語の拡張における単語の平均化されたコンテキストベクトルと、頭字語のコンテキストにおける単語の加重平均ベクトルを比較します。この方法は明らかに（古典的な）余弦類似性を上回ることを示しています。さらに、10億語の科学的テキストから学んだ単語埋め込みは、多くの大規模な一般的なコーパスで学んだ単語埋め込みよりも優れていることを示しています。', 'zh': '凡诸学科科学论文多含缩写首字母缩略词。 凡此诸事,字母缩略词依违可也。 臣等建一法以择首字母缩略词之上下文正义,义不须为每字母缩略词培训,故罕用多端之首字母缩略词。 余于科学论文中图题中构一组19,954一示例,其中包4,365一模棱首字母缩略词,及异域上下文正定义。 凡学语料库中单词词嵌入,并以首字母缩略词广中单词之均上下文向量与首字母缩略词上下文中单词者加权均向量较之。 明于(经)余弦相似性。 此外明从10亿个单词科学文本语料库中学到的词嵌优于大通用语料库中学习的词嵌。', 'ru': 'Научные работы по всем дисциплинам содержат множество сокращений и аббревиатур. Во многих случаях эти сокращения являются двусмысленными. Предложен метод выбора контекстуального правильного определения акронима, который не требует обучения для каждого акронима и, таким образом, может быть применен к большому количеству различных акронимов с небольшим количеством экземпляров. Мы построили набор из 19 954 примеров 4365 неоднозначных сокращений из подписей к изображениям в научных работах вместе с их контекстуально правильным определением из различных областей. Мы изучаем вложения слов для всех слов в корпусе и сравниваем усредненный вектор контекста слов в расширении аббревиатуры со средневзвешенным вектором слов в контексте аббревиатуры. Показано, что этот метод явно превосходит (классическое) сходство косинусов. Кроме того, мы показываем, что вложения слов, выученные из 1 миллиарда словарных корпусов научных текстов, превосходят вложения слов, выученные на многих больших общих телах.', 'ga': 'Tá go leor giorrúchán agus acrainmneacha i bpáipéir eolaíocha ó gach disciplín. I go leor cásanna tá na hacrainmneacha seo débhríoch. Cuirimid i láthair modh chun an sainmhíniú ceart comhthéacsúil ar acrainm a roghnú nach bhfuil oiliúint ag teastáil do gach acrainm agus mar sin is féidir é a chur i bhfeidhm ar líon mór acrainmneacha éagsúla gan ach roinnt cásanna. Thógamar sraith de 19,954 sampla de 4,365 acrainm débhríoch ó fhotheidil íomhá i bpáipéir eolaíocha mar aon lena sainmhíniú ceart ó thaobh comhthéacs ó réimsí éagsúla. Foghlaimimid leabú focal do gach focal sa chorpas agus déanaimid comparáid idir veicteoir comhthéacs meánach na bhfocal i leathnú acrainm le meánveicteoir ualaithe na bhfocal i gcomhthéacs an acrainm. Léirímid go sáraíonn an modh seo go soiléir cosúlacht (clasaiceach) comhshínis. Ina theannta sin, léirímid go sáraíonn leabaithe focal a foghlaimíodh ó chorpas 1 billiún focal de théacsanna eolaíocha ná leabú focal a foghlaimíodh ar chorpas ginearálta mór.', 'hu': 'Minden tudományág tudományos tanulmányai számos rövidítést és rövidítést tartalmaznak. Sok esetben ezek a rövidítések kétértelműek. Bemutatunk egy olyan módszert, amellyel kiválaszthatjuk egy rövidítés kontextuális megfelelő definícióját, amely nem igényel képzést minden rövidítéshez, így nagyszámú különböző rövidítésre alkalmazható, csak néhány példánnyal. 19 954 példát hoztunk létre 4 365 kétértelmű rövidítésből a tudományos dolgozatokban szereplő képfeliratokból, valamint kontextuálisan helyes definíciójukból a különböző területeken. Megtanuljuk a korpuszban lévő összes szó beágyazását és összehasonlítjuk a rövidítés kiterjesztésében lévő szavak átlagos kontextusvektorát a rövidítés kontextusában lévő szavak súlyozott átlagvektorával. Megmutatjuk, hogy ez a módszer egyértelműen felülmúlja a (klasszikus) koszinusz hasonlóságot. Továbbá azt is megmutatjuk, hogy a tudományos szövegek 1 milliárd szókorpuszából tanult szóbeágyazások felülmúlják a sok nagy általános korpuszon tanult szóbeágyazásokat.', 'el': 'Επιστημονικές εργασίες από όλους τους κλάδους περιέχουν πολλές συντομεύσεις και ακρωνύμια. Σε πολλές περιπτώσεις τα ακρωνύμια αυτά είναι διφορούμενα. Παρουσιάζουμε μια μέθοδο επιλογής του πλαισίου σωστού ορισμού ενός ακρωνύμου που δεν απαιτεί εκπαίδευση για κάθε ακρωνύμιο και έτσι μπορεί να εφαρμοστεί σε μεγάλο αριθμό διαφορετικών ακρωνύμων με λίγες μόνο περιπτώσεις. Κατασκευάσαμε ένα σύνολο 19,954 παραδειγμάτων 4,365 διφορούμενων ακρωνύμων από λεζάντες εικόνων σε επιστημονικές εργασίες μαζί με τον ορθό ορισμό τους από διαφορετικούς τομείς. Μαθαίνουμε ενσωμάτωση λέξεων για όλες τις λέξεις στο σώμα και συγκρίνουμε το μέσο διάνυσμα περιβάλλοντος των λέξεων στην επέκταση ενός ακρωνύμου με το σταθμισμένο μέσο διάνυσμα των λέξεων στο πλαίσιο του ακρωνύμου. Δείχνουμε ότι αυτή η μέθοδος σαφώς ξεπερνά την (κλασική) ομοιότητα του συνημίου. Επιπλέον, καταδεικνύουμε ότι οι ενσωματώσεις λέξεων που μαθαίνονται από ένα σωρό επιστημονικών κειμένων ξεπερνούν τις ενσωματώσεις λέξεων που μαθαίνονται σε πολλά μεγάλα γενικά σώματα.', 'ka': 'ყველა დისპლინტების მეცნიერო კომპორნიმები და აკრონიმები აქვს. ბევრი შემთხვევაში ეს აკრონიმები არსებულია. ჩვენ აკრონიმის კონტექსტური მარტივი განსაზღვრებას მეტი, რომელიც არ უნდა ყოველ აკრონიმისთვის განსწავლობა, და ამიტომ შეიძლება აკრონიმისთვის დიდი რაოდენობით განსხვავებული აკ ჩვენ შევქმნა 19 954 მაგალითან 4 365 ამბიგური აკრონიმების კონფიგურაციებიდან მეცნიერო კონფიგურაციისთვის, რომელიც განსხვავებული დიომენტების განსაზღვრული განსაზღვრულება. ჩვენ ვისწავლეთ სიტყვას ყველა სიტყვას კორპუსში და აკრონიმის განსაზღვრებით სიტყვას საშუალო კონტექსტური გვეკტორის განსაზღვრებით აკრონიმის განსაზღვრებით სიტყვას საშუალო გვეკტორი ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ეს პროცემი წარმოადგენა (კლასიკური) კოსინური განსხვავებას. დამატებით, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სიტყვები, რომელიც 1 მილიარდი სიტყვების კოპპუსი მეცნიერო ტექსტიდან, გავაკეთებთ სიტყვები, რომელიც უფრო დიდი', 'lt': 'Visų disciplinų moksliniuose dokumentuose yra daug santrumpų ir akronimų. Daugeliu atvejų šie akronimai yra dviprasmiški. Pateikiame metodą pasirinkti kontekstinę teisingą akronimo apibrėžimą, kuris nereikalauja mokymo kiekvienam akronimui ir todėl gali būti taikomas daugeliui skirtingų akronimų su tik keletu atvejų. Mes sukūrėme 19 954 pavyzdžių iš 4 365 dviprasmiškų akronimų iš vaizdo pavadinimų moksliniuose dokumentuose kartu su jų kontekste teisinga apibrėžtimi iš įvairių sričių. Mes mokome žodžių įdėjimus visiems žodžiams korpuse ir palyginame vidutinį žodžių konteksto vektorių akronimo plėtroje su svertiniu vidutiniu žodžių vektoriumi akronimo kontekste. Mes rodome, kad šis metodas aiškiai viršija (klasikinį) kosino panašumą. Be to, mes rodome, kad žodžių įterpimas, išmokytas iš milijardo žodžių mokslinių tekstų korpuso, viršija žodžių įterpimą, išmokytą iš daugelio didelių bendrojo korpuso.', 'it': "Gli articoli scientifici di tutte le discipline contengono molte abbreviazioni e acronimi. In molti casi questi acronimi sono ambigui. Presentiamo un metodo per scegliere la corretta definizione contestuale di un acronimo che non richiede formazione per ogni acronimo e quindi può essere applicato ad un gran numero di acronimi diversi con poche istanze. Abbiamo costruito un insieme di 19.954 esempi di 4.365 acronimi ambigui partendo da didascalie di immagini in articoli scientifici insieme alla loro definizione contestualmente corretta da diversi domini. Impariamo le incorporazioni di parole per tutte le parole nel corpus e confrontiamo il vettore di contesto medio delle parole nell'espansione di un acronimo con il vettore medio ponderato delle parole nel contesto dell'acronimo. Mostriamo che questo metodo supera chiaramente la somiglianza (classica) coseno. Inoltre, mostriamo che le incorporazioni di parole apprese da un corpus di 1 miliardo di parole di testi scientifici superano le incorporazioni di parole apprese su grandi corpora generali.", 'kk': 'Барлық дисциплиналардың ғылыми қағаздарында көп қысқарту мен акронимдер бар. Көп жағдайда бұл акронимдер білмейді. Біз әрбір аккроним үшін оқыту керек емес аккронимдің контексті дұрыс анықтамасын таңдау әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл әдіс бірнеше акронимдерге тек бірнеше нәрселерден қолдануға болады. Біз 19 954 мысалдар жасадық. 4 365 көмегінен кескіндердің айдарынан ғылыми қағаздардың айдарынан, олардың әртүрлі домендерден дұрыс анықтамасын жасадық. Біз корпустың барлық сөздер үшін сөздерді ендіру үшін үйренеміз және акронимдің орташа контексті векторын есептеп, сөздердің орташа тең векторы акронимдің контексті. Бұл әдіс (классикалық) косинус ұқсастығын көрсетеді. Сонымен қатар, біз 1 миллиарда сөздің корпус сөздерінен үйренген сөздердің ендіру сөздері үлкен жалпы корпораға үйренген сөздердің ендіріміне арналған сөздердің ендіріміне ар', 'mk': 'Научните документи од сите дисциплини содржат многу кратенија и акроними. Во многу случаи овие акроними се двогледни. Презентираме метод за избор на контекстна точна дефиниција на акроним кој не бара обука за секој акроним и со тоа може да се примени на голем број различни акроними со само неколку примери. Конструиравме сет од 19.954 примери од 4.365 двогледни акроними од сликите во научните весници заедно со нивната контекстно коректна дефиниција од различни домени. Научиме вложување на зборови за сите зборови во корпусот и го споредуваме просечниот контекстен вектор на зборовите во проширувањето на акронимот со тежираниот просечен вектор на зборовите во контекст на акронимот. Ние покажуваме дека овој метод јасно ја надминува (класичната) косинска сличност. Покрај тоа, покажуваме дека зборовите вградени научени од 1 милијарда зборови корпус научни тексти ги надминуваат зборовите вградени научени на многу големи генерални корпуси.', 'ms': 'Kertas saintifik dari semua disiplin mengandungi banyak singkat dan akronim. Dalam banyak kes akronim ini adalah ambiguh. Kami memperkenalkan kaedah untuk memilih definisi kontekstual yang betul bagi akronim yang tidak memerlukan latihan untuk setiap akronim dan oleh itu boleh dilaksanakan kepada bilangan besar akronim yang berbeza dengan hanya beberapa contoh. Kami membina set 19,954 contoh 4,365 akronim yang ambiguh dari tajuk imej dalam kertas saintifik bersama dengan definisi yang betul secara konteks dari domain yang berbeza. Kita belajar pelengkapan perkataan untuk semua perkataan dalam korpus dan membandingkan vektor konteks rata-rata perkataan dalam pengembangan akronim dengan vektor rata-rata berat perkataan dalam konteks akronim. Kita tunjukkan bahawa kaedah ini jelas melebihi kesamaan kosinus (klasik). Selain itu, kita menunjukkan bahawa pembenaman perkataan belajar dari 1 bilion perkataan corpus teks saintifik melebihi pembenaman perkataan belajar pada banyak korpra umum besar.', 'mt': 'Id-dokumenti xjentifiċi mid-dixxiplini kollha fihom ħafna taqsiriet u akronimi. F’ħafna każijiet dawn l-akronimi huma ambigwi. Aħna nippreżentaw metodu biex nagħżlu d-definizzjoni kuntestwali korretta ta’ akronimu li ma jeħtieġx taħriġ għal kull akronimu u għalhekk jista’ jiġi applikat għal għadd kbir ta’ akronimi differenti b’ftit każijiet biss. We constructed a set of 19,954 examples of 4,365 ambiguous acronyms from image captions in scientific papers along with their contextually correct definition from different domains.  Natgħallmu l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem għall-kliem kollu fil-korpus u nqabblu l-vettur medju tal-kuntest tal-kliem fl-espansjoni ta’ akronimu mal-vettur medju peżat tal-kliem fil-kuntest tal-akronimu. Aħna nuru li dan il-metodu joħroġ b’mod ċar minn similarità (klassika) kożina. Barra minn hekk, naraw li l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kelma li ttieħdu minn biljun kelma korpus ta’ testi xjentifiċi jaqbżu l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kelma li ttieħdu fuq korpura ġenerali kbira ħafna.', 'pl': 'Prace naukowe ze wszystkich dyscyplin zawierają wiele skrótów i akronimów. W wielu przypadkach akronimy te są niejednoznaczne. Przedstawiamy metodę doboru kontekstowej poprawnej definicji akronimu, która nie wymaga szkolenia dla każdego akronimu i tym samym może być stosowana do dużej liczby różnych akronimów w zaledwie kilku przypadkach. Zbudowaliśmy zestaw 19,954 przykładów 4,365 niejednoznacznych akronimów z podpisów obrazów w pracach naukowych wraz z ich kontekstowo poprawną definicją z różnych dziedzin. Uczymy się osadzeń słów dla wszystkich słów w korpusie i porównujemy średni wektor kontekstowy słów w rozszerzeniu akronimu z średnim ważonym wektorem słów w kontekście akronimu. Pokazujemy, że metoda ta wyraźnie przewyższa (klasyczne) podobieństwo cosinusu. Ponadto, pokazujemy, że osadzenia słów naukowych nauczonych z miliarda korpusów słów przewyższają osadzenia słów nauczane na dużych ogólnych korpusach.', 'ro': 'Lucrările științifice din toate disciplinele conțin multe abrevieri și acronime. În multe cazuri, aceste acronime sunt ambigue. Vă prezentăm o metodă de alegere a definiției corecte contextuale a unui acronim care nu necesită instruire pentru fiecare acronim și astfel poate fi aplicată unui număr mare de acronime diferite cu doar câteva cazuri. Am construit un set de 19.954 exemple de 4.365 acronime ambigue din subtitrările imaginilor din lucrări științifice împreună cu definiția lor contextuală corectă din diferite domenii. Învățăm încorporarea cuvintelor pentru toate cuvintele din corpus și comparăm vectorul contextual mediu al cuvintelor în expansiunea unui acronim cu vectorul mediu ponderat al cuvintelor în contextul acronimului. Noi arătăm că această metodă depășește în mod clar similaritatea cosinus (clasică). Mai mult, arătăm că încorporările de cuvinte învățate dintr-un corpus de 1 miliard de cuvinte de texte științifice depășesc încorporările de cuvinte învățate pe corpore generale mult mai mari.', 'ml': 'എല്ലാ ഡിസ്കിപ്ലൈനുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ധാരാളം അബ്രിവേഷനുകളും അക്രോണിമുകളും ഉണ്ട പല കാര്യങ്ങളിലും ഈ അഖ്രോമികള്\u200d അസാധാരണമാണ്. We present a method to choose the contextual correct definition of an acronym that does not require training for each acronym and thus can be applied to a large number of different acronyms with only few instances.  ശാസ്ത്ര പത്രങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ചിത്രത്തിന്റെ പേപ്പറുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും നാം 19,954 ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളുടെ ഒരു സെറ്റ് ഉണ്ടാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിലെ എല്ലാ വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വാക്കുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു. അക്രോണിമിന്റെ വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d വചനങ്ങളുടെ ശരാവിധ വെക്റ്റര നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d വ്യക്തമായി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു (ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d) കോസിന്\u200d ഒരു അതിനുശേഷം, ഒരു ബില്യൺ വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിച്ച വാക്കുകള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. ശാസ്ത്ര വാക്കുകളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുകളില്\u200d', 'mn': 'Бүх засгийн шинжлэх ухааны сонинууд маш олон тодорхойлолт, акроним байдаг. Ихэнх тохиолдолд эдгээр акронимууд маш чухал. Бид акроним бүр сургалтыг хэрэгжүүлэхгүй акронимын тодорхойлолтыг сонгохын тулд олон янз бүрийн акронимд хэрэгжүүлж болно. Бид 19.954 жишээ бүтээсэн 4.365 гайхалтай акронимуудыг шинжлэх ухааны бичиг баримтуудаас хамт өөр хэсэгт зөв тодорхойлолт хийсэн. Бид корпус дахь бүх үгнүүдийн дундаж үгнүүдийг суралцаж, акроним дахь үгнүүдийн дундаж жингийн вектортай харьцуулж байна. Бид энэ арга нь (классик) косинус төстэй байдлыг илүүтэй харуулж байна. Мөн бид нэг тэрбум үгээр шинжлэх ухааны текстүүдийн корпус сурсан үгийг маш том нийтийн корпора дээр сурсан үгийг нэмэгдүүлдэг.', 'no': 'Vitskapelige papir frå alle discipliner inneheld mange forkortingar og akronymar. I mange tilfeller er desse akronymane avgjengelege. Vi presenterer ein metode for å velja kontekstisk rett definisjon av ein akronim som ikkje krev trening for kvar akronim, og derfor kan brukast på eit stor tal ulike akronym med berre få instansar. Vi konstruerte eit sett av 19,954 eksemplar med 4,365 avgjengelege akronim frå biletet i vitenskaplege papir saman med dei samtidig rette definisjonane frå ulike domene. Vi lærer ordinnbygging for alle ord i korpusen og samanliknar den gjennomsnittlege kontekstvektoren av ord i utvidinga av eit akronym med den vekte gjennomsnittlege vektoren av ord i konteksten av akronym. Vi viser at denne metoden tydelig utfører (klassisk) kosinusliteten. I tillegg viser vi at ordinnbygging lært frå 1 milliarder ord korpus av vitenskapelige tekstar utfører ordinnbygging lært på mykje stor generell korpora.', 'so': 'Dhammaan warqadaha cilmiga leh oo cilmiga lagu qoro waxay ku jiraan baaritaano badan iyo akroneem. In many cases these acronyms are ambiguous.  Waxaynu soo bandhignaa qaab a an dooranno saxda ee joogtada ah oo aan u baahnayn waxbarasho u baahan calaamad kasta, sidaas darteed waxaa lagu codsan karaa calaamado badan oo kala duduwan islamarkaasna waxaa lagu codsan karaa marar yar oo keliya. Waxaan dhisnay tusaalooyin 19,954 ah oo ka mid ah 4,365 sawir aad u qalloocan oo ka mid ah warqadaha sayniska iyo qoraalkooda saxda ah ee meelaha kala duduwan. Waxaynu barnaa hadal ku qoran hadalka oo dhan ee ku qoran qoran, waxaynu isbarbarbarnaa qalabka hoose ee erayada oo ku qoran barashada kordhinta qoraalka, waxaana la barwaaqaynaa vector qiyaas ah oo erayada ku qoran qoran. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qaabkan bayaan u muuqata (klassical) isku mid ah. Furthermore, waxaynu muujinnaa in ereyga lagu barto hal billion oo hadal ah oo qoraal cilmi ah oo ka mid ah qoraal warqad ku qoran oo lagu barto shirkado aad u weyn.', 'si': 'සියළු විද්\u200dයාපාරයෙන් විද්\u200dයාන්ත විද්\u200dයාපාරය සහ අක්රෝනිම් වලින් තියෙනවා. ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවට මේ ඇක්රෝනිම්ස් අවශ්\u200dයයි. අපි ප්\u200dරදේශයක් තෝරාගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරන්න සඳහා සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස නිර්දේශනයක් තෝරාගන්න, ඒ වගේම හ අපි 19,954 උදාහරණයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක පිළිබඳ පිළිබඳ අක්රෝනිම් 4,365 වලින් සිද්ධ විද්\u200dයාත්මක පිළ අපි කොර්පුස් වල සියළු වචනය සඳහා වචනය ඉගෙන ගන්නවා වචනය සඳහා කොර්නිම් වලින් වචනය සඳහා වචනය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය වෙක්ටර් සඳහා වචනය සඳහා වචනය සඳ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ විධානය පැහැදිලි විදිහට (ක්ලාසික්) කෝසින් වගේ සාමාන්\u200dය විදිහට ප්\u200dරති තවත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක වචනයක් ඉගෙන ගත්තා වචනයක් විද්\u200dයාත්මක වචනයක් වලින් විද්\u200dයාත්මක වචනයක් වගේ වචන', 'sv': 'Vetenskapliga artiklar från alla discipliner innehåller många förkortningar och akronymer. I många fall är dessa akronymer tvetydiga. Vi presenterar en metod för att välja den kontextuella korrekta definitionen av en akronym som inte kräver utbildning för varje akronym och därmed kan tillämpas på ett stort antal olika akronymer med endast få instanser. Vi konstruerade en uppsättning av 19 954 exempel på 4 365 tvetydiga akronymer från bildtexter i vetenskapliga artiklar tillsammans med deras kontextuellt korrekta definition från olika domäner. Vi lär oss ordinbäddningar för alla ord i korpusen och jämför den genomsnittliga kontextvektorn för orden i expansionen av en akronym med den vägda genomsnittliga vektorn för orden i samband med akronymen. Vi visar att denna metod tydligt överträffar (klassisk) cosinus likhet. Dessutom visar vi att ordinbäddningar som lärts från en miljard ord korpus av vetenskapliga texter överträffar ord inbäddningar som lärts på mycket stora allmänna corpora.', 'sr': 'Nauèni papiri iz svih disciplina sadrže mnogo kratkosti i akronima. U mnogim slučajevima, ovi akronimi su dvosmisleni. Predstavljamo metodu da izaberemo kontekstualnu ispravnu definiciju akronima koja ne zahteva obuku za svaki akronim i tako se može primjenjivati na veliki broj različitih akronima sa samo nekoliko slučajeva. Napravili smo set od 19.954 primjera 4.365 dvosmislenih akronima iz imidžerskih kapacija u naučnim novinama zajedno sa njihovom kontekstno ispravnom definicijom iz različitih domena. Naučimo reč ugrađenja za sve reči u korpusu i uspoređujemo srednji kontekstski vektor reči u proširenju akronima sa težinom prosječnim vektorom reči u kontekstu akronima. Pokazujemo da ovaj metod jasno iznosi (klasičnu) kosinu sličnost. Osim toga, pokazujemo da su riječi uključene iz 1 milijarde riječi korpusa znanstvenih tekstova iznosile riječi koje su naučile na mnogo velikoj generalnoj korpori.', 'ta': 'அனைத்து வடிவமைப்புகளிலிருந்தும் அறிவியல் தாள்கள் பல குறிப்புகள் மற்றும் குறிப்புகள் உள்ளன. பல நிகழ்ச்சிகளில் இந்த அசைவூட்டத்திற்கு மிகவும் விரும்புகிறது. நாம் ஒவ்வொரு குறியீட்டுக்கும் பயிற்சி தேவைப்படாத ஒரு தற்போதைய சரியான வரையறையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க ஒரு முறைமையை கொண்டு வருகிறோம். அதனால் மிகவும்  நாம் 19,954 உதாரணங்களை உருவாக்கி அறிவியல் காகிதங்களில் இருந்து பிம்பத்தின் தலைப்புகளில் இருந்து பிம்பத்தில் இருந்து ஒரு சேர்க்கையை உர நாம் ஒரு குறும்படத்தின் விரிவாக்கத்தில் சராசரியான சொற்களின் வார்த்தைகளை ஒப்பிடுகிறோம் சராசரியான சராசரி வார்த்தைகளின் வெக்டர் சொல்லின் சொற்களி நாம் இந்த முறையை தெளிவாக காட்டுகிறோம் (classic) கோசைன் ஒப்பிடும். மேலும், நாங்கள் அந்த வார்த்தை உள்ளீடுகளை காட்டுகிறோம் ஒரு பில்லியன் வார்த்தைகளிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொண்டிருந்தது அறிவியல் உரை', 'ur': 'سارے صحیفوں میں سے علمی کاغذوں میں بہت سی کوٹیاں اور اکرونیم ہیں۔ بہت سی مواقع میں یہ آکرونیموں کا مشکل ہے۔ ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ایک اکرونیم کے متوسط درست تعریف کو انتخاب کریں جو ہر اکرونیم کے لئے تعریف نہیں کی ضرورت ہے اور اسی طرح بہت سے مختلف اکرونیم پر صرف تھوڑے مواقع کے ساتھ لازم کر سکتے ہیں. ہم نے 19,954 مثالیں بنائیں جن میں 4,365 غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ ہم کلمات کے مطابق تمام کلمات کے لئے پیدا کرنے کی تعبیر کرتے ہیں اور کلمات کے متوسط متوسط ویکتور کے مطابق کلمات کے متوسط متوسط ویکتور کے مطابق مطابق کرتے ہیں. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ طریقہ صریح (کلاسیک) کاسین برابری کرتا ہے۔ اور ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ ایک میلیارڈ کلمات کی کورپوس سے سیکھا گیا ہے کہ کلمات میں بہت بڑے عمومی کورپور پر سیکھا گیا ہے۔', 'uz': "Ilmiy qoʻllar hamma disiplar uchun ko'p avbreviation va acronymlar mavjud. Ko'pchilik holatda, bu akronymlar eng g'oyalar. Biz har bir acronym uchun o'rganish kerak emas, har bir ko'plab ko'pchilik akronymga qo'llaniladik. Biz ilmiy karataslardagi rasm tashkilotlaridan 19,954 misollarini yaratdik va ularning har doim bir xil dometlardan ham haqiqiqiy taʼminotni yaratdik. Biz bir so'zlarning hamma so'zlari uchun tuzuvchi so'zlarni o'rganamiz va acronymning kengayishida o'zgarishga o'xshash so'zlarning o'rtacha qisqa vektor va acronymning tarkibida gapiradigan so'zlarning qisqa qisqa vektoriga kamaytirish. Biz bu usulni ko'rsatganimiz mumkin (klassik) ko'sini ko'rsatadi. Ko'rsatganda, biz bu so'zlar bir milliard so'zlar qo'shilgan so'zlar bilan o'rganishni ko'p katta umumiy kompaniyada o'rganishni o'rganishni anglatamiz.", 'vi': 'Sách khoa học của tất cả các lĩnh vực chứa nhiều loại viết tắt và viết tắt. Trong nhiều trường hợp các chữ viết tắt này là mơ hồ. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp để chọn định nghĩa đúng ngữ cảnh của các chữ cấu tạo không cần phải đào tạo cho mỗi các dạng cấu tạo và do đó có thể áp dụng cho một số lượng lớn các chữ ký khác nhau chỉ với vài trường hợp. Chúng tôi đã xây dựng một bộ phim 19,954 dẫn điển hình không rõ ràng từ các chữ viết trên các tác phẩm khoa học cùng với định nghĩa tương đối đúng từ các miền khác nhau. Chúng tôi học sự nhúng từ cho mọi từ trong tập đoàn và so sánh véc- tơ ngữ cảnh trung bình của các từ trong việc mở rộng các chữ viết cấu tạo với véc- tơ cân bằng trung bình của các từ trong ngữ cảnh cấu tạo chữ. Chúng tôi cho thấy phương pháp này rõ ràng ngoài khả năng so sánh. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi cho thấy những từ ngữ ngữ được học từ một tỷ tập các văn bản khoa học thực hiện những từ ngữ tham nhũng được học trên nhiều đại hạ sĩ.', 'bg': 'Научните статии от всички дисциплини съдържат много съкращения и акроними. В много случаи тези съкращения са двусмислени. Представяме метод за избор на контекстуално правилно определение на акроним, който не изисква обучение за всеки акроним и по този начин може да бъде приложен към голям брой различни акроними само с няколко примера. Създадохме набор от 19 954 примера на 4 365 неясни акроними от надписи на изображения в научни статии заедно с контекстуално правилната им дефиниция от различни области. Научаваме вграждането на думи за всички думи в корпуса и сравняваме средния контекстен вектор на думите в разширяването на акроним с среднопретегления вектор на думите в контекста на акронима. Показваме, че този метод ясно превъзхожда (класическата) косинусова прилика. Освен това показваме, че вграждането на думи, научено от 1 милиард думи корпус от научни текстове, превъзхожда вграждането на думи, научено в много големи общи корпуси.', 'nl': 'Wetenschappelijke artikelen uit alle disciplines bevatten veel afkortingen en acroniemen. In veel gevallen zijn deze acroniemen dubbelzinnig. We presenteren een methode om de contextueel correcte definitie van een acroniem te kiezen die geen training vereist voor elk acroniem en dus kan worden toegepast op een groot aantal verschillende acroniemen met slechts enkele gevallen. We construeerden een set 19,954 voorbeelden van 4,365 dubbelzinnige acroniemen uit beeldbijschriften in wetenschappelijke artikelen samen met hun contextueel correcte definitie uit verschillende domeinen. We leren woordinbeddingen voor alle woorden in het corpus en vergelijken de gemiddelde contextvector van de woorden in de expansie van een acroniem met de gewogen gemiddelde vector van de woorden in de context van het acroniem. We laten zien dat deze methode duidelijk beter presteert dan (klassieke) cosinusvergelijkenis. Verder laten we zien dat woord embeddings geleerd uit een miljard woordcorpus wetenschappelijke teksten beter presteren dan woord embeddings geleerd op veel grote algemene corpora.', 'da': 'Videnskabelige papirer fra alle discipliner indeholder mange forkortelser og akronymer. I mange tilfælde er disse akronymer tvetydige. Vi præsenterer en metode til at vælge den kontekstuelle korrekte definition af et akronym, der ikke kræver træning for hvert akronym og dermed kan anvendes på et stort antal forskellige akronymer med kun få tilfælde. Vi konstruerede et sæt af 19.954 eksempler på 4.365 tvetydige akronymer fra billedtekster i videnskabelige artikler sammen med deres kontekstuelt korrekte definition fra forskellige domæner. Vi lærer ordindlejringer for alle ord i korpuset og sammenligner den gennemsnitlige kontekstvektor af ordene i udvidelsen af et akronym med den vægtede gennemsnitsvektor af ordene i forbindelse med akronymet. Vi viser, at denne metode klart overgår (klassisk) cosinus lighed. Desuden viser vi, at ordindlejringer lært fra en 1 milliard ord korpus af videnskabelige tekster overstiger ordindlejringer lært på meget store generelle corpora.', 'hr': 'Znanstveni papiri iz svih disciplina sadrže mnogo skraćenja i akronima. U mnogim slučajevima, ovi akronimi su dvosmisleni. Predstavljamo metodu da izaberemo kontekstualnu ispravnu definiciju akronima koja ne zahtijeva obuku za svaki akronim i tako se može primjenjivati na veliki broj različitih akronima sa samo nekoliko slučajeva. Napravili smo niz 19.954 primjera 4.365 dvosmislenih akronima iz imidža u znanstvenim papirima zajedno s njihovom kontekstno ispravnom definicijom iz različitih domena. Naučimo riječ ugrađenja za sve riječi u korpusu i uspoređujemo srednji kontekstski vektor riječi u proširenju akronima s težinom prosječnim vektorom riječi u kontekstu akronima. Pokazujemo da ovaj metod jasno iznosi (klasičnu) kosinu sličnost. Osim toga, pokazujemo da su riječi uključene iz 1 milijarde riječi korpusa znanstvenih tekstova iznosile riječi uključene u veliku opću korporu.', 'de': 'Wissenschaftliche Arbeiten aus allen Disziplinen enthalten viele Abkürzungen und Akronyme. In vielen Fällen sind diese Akronyme mehrdeutig. Wir präsentieren eine Methode zur Auswahl der kontextuell korrekten Definition eines Akronyms, die keine Schulung für jedes Akronym erfordert und somit mit wenigen Instanzen auf eine Vielzahl von verschiedenen Akronymen angewendet werden kann. Wir konstruierten eine Reihe von 19,954 Beispielen für 4,365 mehrdeutige Akronyme aus Bildunterschriften in wissenschaftlichen Aufsätzen zusammen mit ihrer kontextuell korrekten Definition aus verschiedenen Bereichen. Wir lernen Worteinbettungen für alle Wörter im Korpus und vergleichen den durchschnittlichen Kontextvektor der Wörter in der Erweiterung eines Akronyms mit dem gewichteten Mittelwertvektor der Wörter im Kontext des Akronyms. Wir zeigen, dass diese Methode die (klassische) Cosinus-Ähnlichkeit deutlich übertrifft. Darüber hinaus zeigen wir, dass Worteinbettungen, die aus einem Milliarden Wortkorpus wissenschaftlicher Texte gelernt werden, besser sind als Worteinbettungen, die auf vielen großen allgemeinen Korpora gelernt wurden.', 'id': 'Kertas ilmiah dari semua disiplin mengandung banyak singkat dan akronim. Dalam banyak kasus akronima ini ambigu. Kami mempersembahkan metode untuk memilih definisi kontekstual yang benar dari akronim yang tidak membutuhkan latihan untuk setiap akronim dan sehingga dapat diaplikasikan pada sejumlah besar akronim yang berbeda dengan hanya beberapa contoh. Kami membangun set 19.954 contoh dari 4.365 akronim ambigu dari gambar captions di kertas ilmiah bersama dengan definisi kontekstual yang benar dari domain yang berbeda. Kita belajar pembangunan kata untuk semua kata-kata dalam korpus dan membandingkan vektor konteks rata-rata dari kata-kata dalam ekspansi akronim dengan vektor rata-rata berat dari kata-kata dalam konteks akronim. Kita menunjukkan bahwa metode ini jelas melebihi kesamaan kosinus (klasik). Selain itu, kami menunjukkan bahwa kata embedding belajar dari 1 miliar kata corpus teks ilmiah melampaui kata embedding belajar pada banyak besar corpora umum.', 'fa': 'کاغذهای علمی از همه دستورات شامل تعداد زیادی کوتاهی و اکرونیم است. در بسیاری مواقع این اکرونیم\u200cها بی\u200cنظیر هستند. ما یک روش برای انتخاب تعریف درست موضوع یک اکرونیم را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که نیاز به آموزش برای هر اکرونیم نیست و به این نتیجه می\u200cتواند به تعداد زیادی از اکرونیم متفاوت با فقط چند موضوع کاربرد شود. ما یک مجموعه از 19.954 مثال از ۴.365 اکرونیم غیرقابل توجه به عنوان عنوان تصویر در کاغذهای علمی با تعریف مستقیم آنها از دامنهای مختلف ساختیم. ما کلمات را برای همه کلمات در کورپوس یاد می گیریم و ویکتور محیط متوسط کلمات را در گسترش یک اکرونیم با ویکتور متوسط وزن کلمات در محیط اکرونیم مقایسه می کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که این روش مشخصا شبیه کاسین (کلاسیک) را بیشتر انجام می دهد. به علاوه، ما نشان می دهیم که ابتدایی کلمه\u200cای از یک میلیارد کلمه\u200cای از متن علمی یاد گرفته\u200cاند که ابتدایی کلمه\u200cهای ابتدایی\u200cهای بزرگ در شرکت ژنرال یاد گرفته\u200cاند.', 'ko': '모든 학과의 과학 논문에는 많은 줄임말과 알파벳 줄임말이 포함되어 있다.많은 경우에, 이 알파벳의 줄임말들은 애매모호하다.우리는 위아래 문장의 정확한 알파벳 줄임말 정의를 선택하는 방법을 제시했다. 이것은 모든 알파벳 줄임말에 대한 교육을 필요로 하지 않기 때문에 대량의 서로 다른 알파벳 줄임말에 응용할 수 있다. 아주 적은 실례만 있으면 된다.우리는 19954개의 예를 구축했는데 그 중에서 4365개의 애매모호한 알파벳 줄임말은 과학 논문의 이미지 제목과 서로 다른 분야의 상하문에서 정확하게 정의된 것이다.우리는 자료 라이브러리에 있는 모든 단어의 단어를 삽입하는 것을 배우고, 알파벳 줄임말 확장 중의 단어의 평균 상하문 벡터와 알파벳 줄임말 상하문 중의 단어의 가중 평균 벡터를 비교한다.우리는 이런 방법이 여현의 유사성보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 표명한다.그 밖에 10억 단어의 과학 텍스트 자료 라이브러리에서 배운 단어의 삽입 효과가 대형 통용 자료 라이브러리에서 배운 단어의 삽입 효과보다 우수하다는 것을 발견했다.', 'tr': 'Hemme disiplinden bilim kagytlar köp kısýatlyk we akronymlar bar. Köp wagtda bu akronymlar ýüregi ýok. Biz her akronym üçin eğitim gerek däl akronymy saýlamak üçin bir täze görkeýäris we şonuň üçin diňe birnäçe a ýratyn akronyma uygulanabilir. Biz 19,954 mysal çykardyk görnüş käpşenlerden surat käpşenlerden 4,365 ýagdaý akronymyň daşynda bilim kagytlarynda görnüşdük. Korpusdaki bütün kelimeler için yatılan kelimeler öğreniyoruz ve kelimelerin ortalama kontekst vektörünü, akronim açılışında, kelimelerin ortalama ölçülü vektörü ile karşılaştırıyoruz. Biz bu yöntemiň kosinisiň meňzeşliklerini kesinlikle çykarýandygyny görkeýäris. Ayrıca bilim metinlerin 1 milyar kelimeden öğrendiği kelime kapsamı büyük bir askeri korporada öğrendiği kelime kapsamı daha fazla gösteriyoruz.', 'sw': 'Scientific papers from all disciplines contain many abbreviations and acronyms.  Katika matukio mengi haya matangazo yanakuwa na hamasa. Tunaweza kuweka mbinu ya kuchagua ufafanuzi wa sahihi wa sasa wa alama inayohitaji mafunzo kwa kila shambulio na kwa hiyo inaweza kutumika kwa idadi kubwa ya mitazamo tofauti yenye matukio machache tu. Tumejenga seti ya mifano 19,954 ya mitazamo 4,365 yenye msimamo mkali kutoka kwenye picha za kisayansi pamoja na maelezo yao ya sahihi kutoka maeneo mbalimbali. Tunajifunza maneno yanayoingia kwa maneno yote katika makampuni hayo na kulinganisha vector ya wastani wa muktadha wa maneno katika kuongezeka kwa ujumbe wa wastani na vector wa wastani wa maneno katika muktadha wa utambulisho. Tunaonyesha kuwa mbinu hii inaonyesha kwa uwazi (klassic) kosa liko sawa. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha kuwa maneno yaliyojifunza kutoka makampuni ya maneno bilioni 1 ya mabilioni yaliyotumwa na maneno ya kisayansi yaliyojifunza katika makampuni makubwa.', 'am': 'የሳይንቀሳዊ ገጾች ከሁሉም ደብዳቤዎች ብዙዎችን አቀማመጥ እና አክሮኒም አላቸው፡፡ በብዙ ጉዳይ እነዚህ አካውሮማዎች የጠየቁ ናቸው፡፡ ለሁሉም የኢኮርመን ትምህርት የማይፈልገውን የቅርብ ጥሩ ግለጻውን ለመምረጥ እናስቀራለን፡፡ 19,954 ምሳሌዎች 4,365 የኢንተርኔት ወረቀቶች ውስጥ ያሉትን የምስል አፍሪካዎች በጥያቄ የተደረጉትን እና በተለየ ውይይት የተለየውን ግለጽ አቆርጠናል፡፡ በቆርፓስ ውስጥ ቃላት ሁሉ የሚደረገውን ቃል እናስተማራለን፣ የቃሎቹንም በክሮንቲም መዘርጋት በሚዛን ጥሩ የቃላትን ጠቅላላ ጠቅላላ እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ ይህ ሥርዓት ግልፅ (ክላሲካ) ኮሲን እንደሚመስል እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ በብዙ ጠንካራ ኮርፖርት የተማሩት ቃላት ከ1 ቢልዮን ቃላት የሳይንቀሳዊ ጽሑፎች የሆኑት ቃላት አካባቢዎች እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Dokumentet shkencore nga të gjitha disiplinat përmbajnë shumë shkurtime dhe akronime. Në shumë raste këto akronime janë të qarta. Ne paraqesim një metodë për të zgjedhur përcaktimin e saktë kontekstual të një akronimi që nuk kërkon trajnim për çdo akronim dhe kështu mund të aplikohet në një numër të madh akronimesh të ndryshme me vetëm pak raste. Ne ndërtuam një sërë prej 19,954 shembujve të 4,365 akronimeve të qarta nga titujt e imazhit në letrat shkencore së bashku me përcaktimin e tyre kontekstualisht të saktë nga fusha të ndryshme. Ne mësojmë përfshirje fjalësh për të gjitha fjalët në korpus dhe krahasojmë vektorin mesatar të kontekstit të fjalëve në zgjerimin e një akronimi me vektorin mesatar të peshuar të fjalëve në kontekstin e akronimit. Ne tregojmë se ky metodë ekziston qartë mbi ngjashmërinë (klasike) kozine. Përveç kësaj, ne tregojmë se fjalët përfshirje mësuar nga një miliard fjalë korpus tekstesh shkencore mbivlerësojnë fjalët përfshirje mësuar në korpra shumë të madhe të përgjithshme.', 'hy': 'Բոլոր ոլորտների գիտական թղթերը պարունակում են բազմաթիվ կարճումներ և ակրոնիմներ: Շատ դեպքերում այս ակրոնիմները երկիմաստ են: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մեթոդ, որպեսզի ընտրենք կոնտեքստային ճիշտ բառի սահմանումը, որը չի պահանջում յուրաքանչյուր բառի համար վարժեցման և այսպես կարող է կիրառվել տարբեր բազմաթիվ բառերի հետ միայն մի քանի օրինակների հետ: Մենք կառուցեցինք 19.954 օրինակ՝ 4,365 անորոշակի ակրոնիմի մի շարք գիտական թղթերում պատկերված վերնագրություններից միասին իրենց կոնտեքստային ճիշտ սահմանումների հետ տարբեր ոլորտներից: Մենք սովորում ենք բառերի ներգրավումներ մարմնի բոլոր բառերի համար և համեմատում ենք բառերի միջին կոնտեքստի վեկտորը ակրոնիմի ընդլայնման մեջ բառերի միջին կշռված վեկտորի հետ ակրոնիմի կոնտեքստում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս մեթոդը ակնհայտորեն գերազանցում է (դասական) կոսինային նմանությունը: Ավելին, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ բառերը, որոնք սովորել են գիտական տեքստների 1 միլիարդ բառի կորպոսից, գերազանցում են բառերը, որոնք սովորել են շատ մեծ ընդհանուր կորպոսից:', 'af': "Wetenskaplike papier van alle dissipels bevat baie kruifbreidings en akronime. In baie gevalle is hierdie akronims onbesonderheid. Ons stel 'n metode om die kontekstuele korrekte definisie van 'n akronim te kies wat nie benodig onderwerp vir elke akronim nie en dit kan aanwend word na 'n groot aantal verskillende akronime met slegs paar voorbeelde. Ons het 'n stel van 19,954 voorbeelde van 4,365 onbepaalde akronyme gebou van beeldkapsies in wetenskappe saam met hulle kontekstlike korrekte definisie van verskillende domeine. Ons leer woord inbêding vir alle woorde in die korpus en vergelyk die gemiddelde konteksvektor van die woorde in die uitbreiding van 'n akronim met die gewigte gemiddelde vektor van die woorde in die konteks van die akronim. Ons wys dat hierdie metode duidelik uitvoer (klassieke) kosinus gelykenis. Ons wys daardie woord inbêdings geleer van 'n 1 biljoen woord korpus van wetenskaplike teks uitvoer woord inbêdings wat geleer het op baie groot algemene korpora.", 'az': 'Bütün disciplinin bilim kağıtları çox qısqartmalar və akronimlər barəsindədir. Bu akronimlər çox münasibdir. Biz hər akronim üçün təhsil edilməyən bir akronim müxtəlif tərzini seçmək üçün bir yolu göstəririk və buna görə də çox müxtəlif akronimlərə yalnız az bir hissə istifadə edilə bilər. Biz 19.954 məsəl çəkdik, müxtəlif domenalardan müəyyən edilmiş məsəllərlə birlikdə görüntü yazılarından 4.365 acronymların imzalarını təşkil etdik. Biz bütün sözlərin körpüsü üçün in şa edilməsini öyrənirik və acronim vasitəsində sözlərin orta çəkilən orta vektörünü akronim vasitəsində çəkirik. Biz bu metod (klasik) kosinun bənzərini aşkar göstəririk. Daha sonra, biz bir milyard dilindən öyrəndiyi sözlərin körpüsündən öyrəndiyini göstərdik ki, çox böyük genel korpora öyrəndiyi sözlərin körpüsündən öyrənmişdir.', 'bn': 'Scientific papers from all disciplines contain many abbreviations and acronyms.  অনেক ক্ষেত্রে এই প্রত্যুত্তগুলো বিবেচনায়। আমরা একটি পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি যে এক্রোনিমের সাথে সঠিক সংবাদ বেছে নিতে পারি যা প্রত্যেক এক্রোনিমের জন্য প্রশিক্ষণ প্রয়োজন নেই এবং তাই কেবল কয়েকটি সংখ্যার বৈজ্ঞানিক কাগজের ছবির শিরোনাম থেকে আমরা ১৯,৯৫৪ উদাহরণ নির্মাণ করেছি বিভিন্ন ডোমেন থেকে তাদের সাথে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন দেশের সং আমরা কোর্পাসের সকল শব্দের জন্য শব্দ প্রবেশ শিখি এবং এক্রোনিম বিস্তারিত ভেক্টরের মধ্যে শব্দের সর্বোচ্চ কন্টেক্স ভেক্টরের তুলনা করি। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই পদ্ধতিটি পরিষ্কার করে (ক্লাসিক্যাল) কোসিন একই রকম। এছাড়াও, আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে শব্দের বিভিন্ন বিজ্ঞানিক টেক্সটের ১ বিলিয়ন শব্দ কোর্পাস থেকে শিখেছে বিজ্ঞানী লেখাগুলো বিশা', 'bs': 'Naučni papiri iz svih disciplina sadrže mnoge skraćenja i akronima. U mnogim slučajevima, ovi akronimi su dvosmisleni. Predstavljamo metodu da izaberemo kontekstualnu ispravnu definiciju akronima koja ne zahtijeva obuku za svaki akronim i tako se može primjenjivati na veliki broj različitih akronima sa samo nekoliko slučajeva. Napravili smo set od 19.954 primjera 4.365 ambigutnih akronima iz kapcija slika u naučnim novinama zajedno s njihovim kontekstno ispravnim definicijom iz različitih domena. Naučimo riječ ugrađenja za sve riječi u korpusu i uspoređujemo srednji kontekstski vektor riječi u proširenju akronima sa težinom prosječnim vektorom riječi u kontekstu akronima. Pokazujemo da ovaj metod jasno iznosi (klasičnu) kosinu sličnost. Osim toga, pokazujemo da su riječi uključene iz 1 milijarde riječi korpusa znanstvenih tekstova iznosile riječi uključene na mnogo veliku generalnu korporu.', 'ca': "Els papers científics de totes les disciplines contenen moltes abreviacions i acronimes. En molts casos aquests acronimes són ambiguos. Presentam un mètode per escollir la definició contextual correct a d'un acronym que no necessita formació per cada acronym i, per tant, pot ser aplicat a un gran nombre d'acronymes diferents amb només pocs casos. Vam construir un conjunt de 19.954 exemples de 4.365 acronimes ambiguos des de títulos d'imatge en articles científics juntament amb la seva definició contextualment correct a de dominis diferents. Aprenem incorporacions de paraules per totes les paraules al corpus i comparem el vector de contexte mitjà de les paraules en l'expansió d'un acronym amb el vector mitjà ponderat de les paraules en el context d'un acronym. Mostrem que aquest mètode supera clarament la similitud cosina (clàssica). A més, demostram que les paraules incorporades aprenguts d'un mil milions de paraules corpus de textos científics superen les paraules incorporades aprenguts en molt grans corpores generals.", 'cs': 'Vědecké články ze všech oborů obsahují mnoho zkratek a zkratek. V mnoha případech jsou tyto zkratky nejednoznačné. Představujeme metodu pro výběr kontextově správné definice zkratky, která nevyžaduje školení pro každou zkratku a může být tak aplikována na velký počet různých zkratek s několika případy. Vytvořili jsme soubor 19,954 příkladů 4,365 nejednoznačných zkratek z obrazových titulků ve vědeckých článcích spolu s jejich kontextově správnou definicí z různých oblastí. Naučíme se vkládání slov pro všechna slova v korpusu a porovnáváme průměrný kontextový vektor slov v rozšíření zkratky s váženým průměrným vektorem slov v kontextu zkratky. Ukazujeme, že tato metoda jasně překonává (klasickou) podobnost kosinusu. Dále ukazujeme, že slovní vložení naučené z miliardy slovních korpusů vědeckých textů překonávají slovní vložení naučené na mnoha velkých obecných korpusech.', 'et': 'Teaduslikud tööd kõikidest erialadest sisaldavad palju lühendeid ja lühendeid. Paljudel juhtudel on need lühendid ebaselged. Esitame meetodi akronüümi kontekstiõige määratluse valimiseks, mis ei nõua iga akronüümi jaoks koolitust ja seega saab seda rakendada paljudele erinevatele akronüümidele vaid mõne juhtumiga. Koostasime 19 954 näidet 4265 ebamäärasest lühendist teaduslikes artiklites olevatest piltide pealkirjadest koos nende kontekstipõhiselt õige definitsiooniga erinevatest valdkondadest. Õpime sõnade manustamist kõigile korpuses olevatele sõnadele ja võrdleme sõnade keskmist kontekstivektorit akronüümi laiendamisel sõnade kaalutud keskmise vektoriga akronüümi kontekstis. Näitame, et see meetod ületab selgelt (klassikalist) koosinuse sarnasust. Lisaks näitame, et miljardist teaduslikust tekstist õppitud sõnade manustamine ületab paljudes suurtes üldkorpustes õppitud sõnade manustamist.', 'fi': 'Tieteelliset artikkelit kaikilta tieteenaloilta sisältävät monia lyhenteitä ja lyhenteitä. Monissa tapauksissa nämä lyhenteet ovat epäselviä. Esitämme menetelmän valita kontekstuaalisesti oikea määritelmä akronyymille, joka ei vaadi koulutusta jokaiselle akronyymille ja jota voidaan siten soveltaa suureen määrään erilaisia akronyymejä vain muutamalla esimerkillä. Rakensimme 19 954 esimerkkiä 4 365 epäselvästä lyhenteestä tieteellisten julkaisujen kuvateksteistä ja niiden asiayhteydellisesti oikeasta määritelmästä eri toimialoilta. Opimme sanaupotuksia kaikille korpusen sanoille ja vertaamme sanojen keskimääräistä kontekstivektoria lyhenteen laajennuksessa sanojen painotettuun keskiarvovektoriin lyhenteen kontekstissa. Osoitamme, että tämä menetelmä selvästi ylittää (klassisen) koosinuksen samankaltaisuuden. Lisäksi osoitamme, että miljardista sanakorpusesta opitut sanaupotukset ylittävät paljon suurissa korpusissa opitut sanaupotukset.', 'jv': 'Awak-awak Siyah karo kabeh disiplin kuwi akronim karo akeh basa Dino akeh-akeh durung, akuronim kuwi duluran. Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem kanggo ngerasai akeh sampek dadi nggawe akuronim sing bisa butakon nggawe akuronim lan dadi bisa aplikasi kanggo awak dhéwé ketahanan akeh sampek, lan akeh iso ngubah akeh akeh akeh sampek dadi. Awak dhéwé nggawe aturan 19,584 balikat kanggo Kemerdekaan karo hal-hal kanggo didasakno Anyone Awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono kuwi ngerasakno dadi seneng kyasai. Sak, awak dhéwé ngerasakno ngono kuwi akeh-akeh lan sampeyan 1 miliard sing kelas kotak tentang kanggo teks saiki untarané awak dhéwé ngerasakno', 'ha': "Kayan takardar da aka sani daga duk disiplin na ƙunsa da wasu abubuwan da akronymi. A cikin mãsu yawa, waɗannan akronymi ne mai sauti. Tuna gabatar da wata hanyoyi wa zaɓi fassarar gaskiyar da ke cikin akronym, wanda bã ya buƙata yin lazimta wa kowace akronym, kuma don haka za'a iya amfani da wasu akronymi masu yawa da misãlai kaɗan. Mun samun wasu misãlai 19,954 na 4,365 masu saukarwa daga zane-zane cikin takardar da ke cikin littafan sayansi sami da fassararsu a lokacin da aka sayar da su daga guda dabam. Tuna sanar da maganar da aka shigar da duk maganar a cikin kowaci kuma muna sambata mai tsakanin matsayin cikin faɗi da akronym da mai nauyi wa matsayin cikin muhimmin akronym. Tuna nũna wannan metode yana bayyana a kan kosin. Furan haka, Munã nũna wa maganar da aka sanar daga karbon 1 billion na maganar littafan da aka saɓa da maganar da aka sanar da shi a kan makampuni mai girma.", 'sk': 'Znanstveni prispevki iz vseh disciplin vsebujejo številne okrajšave in okrajšave. V mnogih primerih so te kratice dvoumne. Predstavljamo metodo za izbiro kontekstualne pravilne definicije kratica, ki ne zahteva usposabljanja za vsako kratico in se tako lahko uporablja za veliko število različnih kratic z le nekaj primeri. Izdelali smo nabor 19.954 primerov 4.365 dvoumnih kratic iz podnapisov slik v znanstvenih člankih skupaj z njihovo kontekstualno pravilno definicijo iz različnih področij. Učimo se vgradnje besed za vse besede v korpusu in primerjamo povprečni kontekstni vektor besed v razširitvi kratice s tehtanim povprečnim vektorjem besed v kontekstu kratice. Pokazali smo, da ta metoda jasno presega (klasično) podobnost kosinusa. Poleg tega pokažemo, da so vgradnje besed, pridobljene iz 1 milijarde besednih korpusov znanstvenih besedil, boljše od vgradnje besed, pridobljenih v veliko večjih splošnih korpusih.', 'he': 'מסמכים מדעיים מכל המשמעות מכילים הרבה קיצורים ואקרונימים. במקרים רבים האקרונימים האלה הם ספורים. אנחנו מציגים שיטה לבחור את ההגדרה הנכונה של אקרונימה הקונקסטוקלית שלא דורשת אימון לכל אקרונימה וכך אפשר להשתמש במספר גדול של אקרונימות שונות עם רק כמה מקרים. בנינו קבוצה של 19,954 דוגמאות של 4,365 אקרונימות סביבות מתכונות תמונות בעיתונים מדעיים יחד עם הגדרה המתאימה שלהם מתחומים שונים. אנו לומדים מכתבי מילים לכל המילים בקורפוס ושווה את ווקטור הקשר הממוצע של המילים בהרחבות של אקרונים עם ווקטור הממוצע המשקל של המילים בקונקסט של האקרונים. We show that this method clearly outperforms (classical) cosine similarity.  חוץ מזה, אנו מראים שמילים נלמדות ממילה 1 מיליארד קופוס של טקסטים מדעיים מתגברים על מילים נלמדות על גופרה גנרלית גדולה רבה.', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཆེན་ཡོངས་ནང་གི་ཚན་རིག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་ཚོར་མཛུབ་དང་acronyms་མང་པོ་ཡོད། ཕལ་ཆེར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་acronyms་འདི་དག་ཁྱད་མཁས་པོ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་acronym་རེ་རེར་སྔོན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་འགྱུར་བ་ཞིག་བདམས་འཇུག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོས་ཚང་ཡིག་ཚང་ནང་གི་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་༡༩,954དཔེར་བརྗོད་དག་ཞིག་བཟོ་བ་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་པའི་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་གི་ཡི་གེ་ཚོགས་རྣམས་མཐུན་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཐབས་ལམ་འདི་གསལ་པོ་ཞིག་ལས་སྡོམ་རིམ་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན་པ་ཡིན་པས། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་ཚན་རིག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་ལས་སྦྱངས་པའི་གཞན་ཞིག་གི་འབྲེལ་ས་༡་བར་ཤིག་བྱས་ཏེ།'}
{'en': 'Indigenous language technologies in Canada : Assessment, challenges, and successes', 'ar': 'تقنيات اللغة الأصلية في كندا: التقييم والتحديات والنجاحات', 'pt': 'Tecnologias de línguas indígenas no Canadá: avaliação, desafios e sucessos', 'fr': 'Technologies des langues autochtones au Canada\xa0: évaluation, défis et réussites', 'es': 'Tecnologías de lenguas indígenas en Canadá: evaluación, desafíos y éxitos', 'ja': 'カナダの先住民言語技術：評価、課題、成功', 'ru': 'Языковые технологии коренных народов в Канаде: оценка, проблемы и успехи', 'zh': '加拿大土著语术:评估、挑战、成功', 'hi': 'कनाडा में स्वदेशी भाषा प्रौद्योगिकियां: मूल्यांकन, चुनौतियां और सफलताएं', 'ga': 'Teicneolaíochtaí teanga dúchasacha i gCeanada: Measúnú, dúshláin agus rathúlachtaí', 'el': 'Τεχνολογίες αυτόχθονων γλωσσών στον Καναδά: Αξιολόγηση, προκλήσεις και επιτυχίες', 'ka': 'კანადიაში ინდიგენური ენის ტექნოლოგიები: შეცდომა, გამოცდილება და წარმატები', 'hu': 'Őshonos nyelvi technológiák Kanadában: Értékelés, kihívások és sikerek', 'it': 'Tecnologie linguistiche indigene in Canada: valutazione, sfide e successi', 'lt': 'Kanados vietos kalbų technologijos: vertinimas, iššūkiai ir sėkmės', 'mk': 'Индигенските јазички технологии во Канада: проценка, предизвици и успеси', 'kk': 'Канададағы тіл технологиялары: оценка, өзгерістер және сәтті', 'ms': 'Teknologi bahasa asli di Kanada: penilaian, cabaran, dan kejayaan', 'ml': 'കാനഡയിലെ നാട്ടിലെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d: വിശ്വാസവും, വിജയികളും', 'mt': 'Teknoloġiji lingwistiċi indiġeni fil-Kanada: Valutazzjoni, sfidi u suċċessi', 'no': 'Indigenous språk-teknologiar i Canada: Assessment, challenges, and successes', 'mn': 'Канадад бусад хэл технологи: оценка, сорилт, амжилт', 'pl': 'Technologie językowe rdzenne w Kanadzie: ocena, wyzwania i sukcesy', 'ro': 'Tehnologiile lingvistice indigene în Canada: Evaluare, provocări și succese', 'sr': 'Indijanske jezičke tehnologije u Kanadi: procjena, izazovi i uspjeha', 'si': 'කැනාඩාවේ භාෂාත්මක තාක්ෂණය: අවශ්\u200dය, අවශ්\u200dය, සහ සමහරවිට', 'so': 'Teknojiyada afka hooyo ee Kanada: Qiimeynta, challengada iyo guulaysashada', 'sv': 'Individuell språkteknik i Kanada: Bedömning, utmaningar och framgångar', 'ta': 'காண்டாவில் உள்ள மொழி தொழில்நுட்ப தொழில்நுட்பம்:', 'ur': 'کاناڈا میں زبان تکنولوژی: آزمائش, چالوں اور موفقیت', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chính sách ngôn ngữ bản xứ ở Canada: đánh giá, thử thách và thành công', 'bg': 'Технологии за местни езици в Канада: оценка, предизвикателства и успехи', 'da': 'Individuelle sprogteknologier i Canada: Vurdering, udfordringer og succeser', 'nl': 'Inheemse taaltechnologieën in Canada: beoordeling, uitdagingen en successen', 'hr': 'Indijanske jezičke tehnologije u Kanadi: procjena, izazovi i uspjeha', 'de': 'Indigene Sprachtechnologien in Kanada: Bewertung, Herausforderungen und Erfolge', 'id': 'Teknologi bahasa asli di Kanada: penilaian, tantangan, dan sukses', 'ko': '캐나다 본토 언어 기술: 평가, 도전과 성공', 'fa': 'تکنولوژی زبان Indigenous in Canada: Assessment, challenges, and successes', 'sw': 'Teknolojia za lugha za wenyeji nchini Canada: Utafiti, changamoto, na mafanikio', 'af': 'Indigenoese taal teknologies in Kanada: Assensie, uitdagings en suksesighede', 'sq': 'Teknologjitë e gjuhës indígene në Kanada: Vlerësim, sfida dhe sukses', 'tr': 'Kanada indiki dil teknolojileri: Görniş, kynçylyklar we üstünlikler', 'am': 'የአገሩ ቋንቋ ቴክኖጂ በካናዳ:: ማስታወቂያ፣ ውጤት እና ፍላጎት', 'hy': 'Քանադայում տեղաբնիկ լեզվի տեխնոլոգիաները. գնահատում, մարտահրավերներ և հաջողություններ', 'bn': 'কানাডায় আদিবাসী ভাষার প্রযুক্তি: মূল্য, চ্যালেঞ্জ এবং সফল', 'bs': 'Tehnologije Indijinskih jezika u Kanadi: procjena, izazovi i uspjeha', 'az': 'Kanadadakı indijin dil teknolojiləri: Assessment, challenges and successes', 'ca': 'Tecnologies de llenguatges indígenes al Canadà: Evaluació, reptes i èxits', 'et': 'Põliskeelte tehnoloogiad Kanadas: hindamine, väljakutsed ja edusammud', 'cs': 'Původní jazykové technologie v Kanadě: Hodnocení, výzvy a úspěchy', 'fi': 'Kanadan alkuperĂ¤iskieliteknologiat: arviointi, haasteet ja menestys', 'jv': 'Jejaring', 'ha': "Technical na'ura na Madyana a cikin Kanada: Taimako, Changamoyin da kuma succeki", 'sk': 'Avtohtone jezikovne tehnologije v Kanadi: ocena, izzivi in uspeh', 'he': 'טכנולוגיות שפת מקומיות בקנדה: הערכה, אתגרים וההצלחות', 'bo': 'རེ་ན་ཌུའི་ནང་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་འཕེལ་རིགས།དཔྱད་ཞིབ་དང་གདོང་ལེན་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'In this article, we discuss which text, speech, and image technologies have been developed, and would be feasible to develop, for the approximately 60 Indigenous languages spoken in Canada. In particular, we concentrate on technologies that may be feasible to develop for most or all of these languages, not just those that may be feasible for the few most-resourced of these. We assess past achievements and consider future horizons for Indigenous language transliteration, text prediction, spell-checking, approximate search, machine translation, speech recognition, speaker diarization, speech synthesis, optical character recognition, and computer-aided language learning.', 'ar': 'في هذه المقالة ، نناقش تقنيات النص والكلام والصور التي تم تطويرها ، والتي سيكون من الممكن تطويرها ، لما يقرب من 60 لغة أصلية يتم التحدث بها في كندا. على وجه الخصوص ، نحن نركز على التقنيات التي قد يكون من الممكن تطويرها لمعظم أو كل هذه اللغات ، وليس فقط تلك التي قد تكون مجدية لعدد قليل من هذه اللغات الأكثر موارد. نقوم بتقييم الإنجازات السابقة والنظر في الآفاق المستقبلية للترجمة الصوتية للغات السكان الأصليين ، والتنبؤ النصي ، والتدقيق الإملائي ، والبحث التقريبي ، والترجمة الآلية ، والتعرف على الكلام ، وتسجيل المتحدث ، وتوليف الكلام ، والتعرف البصري على الأحرف ، وتعلم اللغة بمساعدة الكمبيوتر.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous discutons des technologies de texte, de parole et d'image qui ont été développées, et qu'il serait possible de développer, pour les quelque 60 langues autochtones parlées au Canada. En particulier, nous nous concentrons sur les technologies qu'il est possible de développer pour la plupart ou la totalité de ces langues, et pas seulement celles qui peuvent être réalisables pour les quelques langues les plus dotées de ressources. Nous évaluons les réalisations passées et envisageons les perspectives futures pour la translittération des langues autochtones, la prédiction de texte, la vérification orthographique, la recherche approximative, la traduction automatique, la reconnaissance vocale, la diarisation du locuteur, la synthèse vocale, la reconnaissance optique des caractères et l'apprentissage des langues assisté par ordinateur.", 'es': 'En este artículo, discutimos qué tecnologías de texto, habla e imagen se han desarrollado, y serían factibles de desarrollar, para las aproximadamente 60 lenguas indígenas que se hablan en Canadá. En particular, nos concentramos en tecnologías que pueden ser factibles de desarrollar para la mayoría o todos estos lenguajes, no solo aquellos que pueden ser factibles para los pocos que cuentan con más recursos. Evaluamos los logros pasados y consideramos los horizontes futuros para la transliteración de lenguas indígenas, la predicción de textos, la corrección ortográfica, la búsqueda aproximada, la traducción automática, el reconocimiento de voz, la diarización de hablantes, la síntesis del habla, el reconocimiento óptico de caracteres y el aprendizaje de idiomas asistido por computadora.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, discutimos quais tecnologias de texto, fala e imagem foram desenvolvidas, e seriam viáveis, para as cerca de 60 línguas indígenas faladas no Canadá. Em particular, nos concentramos em tecnologias que podem ser viáveis para desenvolver para a maioria ou todas essas linguagens, não apenas aquelas que podem ser viáveis para algumas delas com mais recursos. Avaliamos realizações passadas e consideramos horizontes futuros para transliteração de língua indígena, previsão de texto, verificação ortográfica, busca aproximada, tradução automática, reconhecimento de fala, diarização de locutor, síntese de fala, reconhecimento óptico de caracteres e aprendizado de idiomas auxiliado por computador.', 'ja': 'この記事では、カナダで話されている約60の先住民言語について、どのテキスト、音声、画像技術が開発されており、どのような技術が開発可能であるかについて説明します。特に、私たちは、これらの言語のほとんどまたはすべてに対して実現可能なテクノロジーに焦点を当てています。これらの中で最も資源のある少数の言語に対して実現可能なテクノロジーだけではありません。私たちは過去の成果を評価し、先住民言語の音訳、テキスト予測、スペルチェック、おおよその検索、機械翻訳、音声認識、話者のダイアライズ、音声合成、光学文字認識、およびコンピュータ支援言語学習のための将来の視野を検討します。', 'zh': '本文中,将议已为加拿大用者约60种土言语开何本,语音图像,发此术可也。 吾之所注者多矣,或可以可行之术,非徒少资之富,而可以可行之术也。 评评旧成,并思土著语言音译,文本测拼写,近似搜索,机器翻译语音识别,语人二分,语音合成,光学字符识计算机助语学未来前景。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы обсуждаем, какие текстовые, речевые и графические технологии были разработаны и могли бы быть разработаны для приблизительно 60 языков коренных народов, на которых говорят в Канаде. В частности, мы концентрируемся на технологиях, которые, возможно, целесообразно разработать для большинства или всех этих языков, а не только на тех, которые, возможно, целесообразно разработать для тех немногих из них, которые обеспечены наиболее значительными ресурсами. Мы оцениваем прошлые достижения и рассматриваем будущие горизонты для транслитерации языка коренных народов, предсказания текста, проверки орфографии, приблизительного поиска, машинного перевода, распознавания речи, диариализации диктора, синтеза речи, оптического распознавания символов и компьютерного изучения языка.', 'hi': 'इस लेख में, हम चर्चा करते हैं कि कनाडा में बोली जाने वाली लगभग 60 स्वदेशी भाषाओं के लिए कौन से पाठ, भाषण और छवि प्रौद्योगिकियों को विकसित किया गया है, और विकसित करना संभव होगा। विशेष रूप से, हम उन प्रौद्योगिकियों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं जो इनमें से अधिकांश या सभी भाषाओं के लिए विकसित करने के लिए संभव हो सकती हैं, न कि केवल उन लोगों के लिए जो इनमें से कुछ सबसे अधिक संसाधनों के लिए संभव हो सकते हैं। हम पिछली उपलब्धियों का आकलन करते हैं और स्वदेशी भाषा लिप्यंतरण, पाठ भविष्यवाणी, वर्तनी-जांच, अनुमानित खोज, मशीन अनुवाद, भाषण मान्यता, स्पीकर डायराइजेशन, भाषण संश्लेषण, ऑप्टिकल चरित्र मान्यता और कंप्यूटर-सहायता प्राप्त भाषा सीखने के लिए भविष्य के क्षितिज पर विचार करते हैं।', 'ga': 'San alt seo, pléimid cé na teicneolaíochtaí téacs, urlabhra agus íomhá a forbraíodh, agus a d’fhéadfaí a fhorbairt, do thart ar 60 teanga dhúchasach a labhraítear i gCeanada. Dírímid go háirithe ar theicneolaíochtaí a d’fhéadfaí a fhorbairt don chuid is mó de na teangacha seo nó do na teangacha ar fad, ní hamháin na cinn a d’fhéadfadh a bheith indéanta don bheagán is mó acmhainní. Déanaimid measúnú ar ghnóthachtálacha san am a chuaigh thart agus breithnímid ar dhearcadh na todhchaí maidir le traslitriú teangacha Dúchasacha, tuar téacs, seiceáil litrithe, neaschuardach, aistriúchán meaisín, aithint cainte, dialannú cainteoir, sintéis urlabhra, aithint optúil carachtar, agus foghlaim teanga ríomhchuidithe.', 'hu': 'Ebben a cikkben megvitatjuk, hogy a Kanadában beszélt mintegy 60 őslakos nyelv számára milyen szöveg-, beszéd- és képtechnológiákat fejlesztettek ki és fejleszthetők ki. Különösen azokra a technológiákra összpontosítunk, amelyeket e nyelvek többségére vagy mindegyikére kifejleszthetünk, nem csak azokra, amelyek a legkevésbé forrásokkal rendelkezők számára lehetnek megvalósíthatók. Felértékeljük a múltbeli eredményeket és figyelembe vesszük az őslakos nyelvű transzliterációt, a szövegelőrejelzést, a helyesírás-ellenőrzést, a hozzávetőleges keresést, a gépi fordítást, a beszédfelismerést, a beszédnaplót, a beszédszintézist, az optikai karakterfelismerést és a számítógéppel segített nyelvtanulást.', 'el': 'Σε αυτό το άρθρο, συζητάμε ποιες τεχνολογίες κειμένου, ομιλίας και εικόνας έχουν αναπτυχθεί, και θα ήταν εφικτό να αναπτυχθούν, για τις περίπου 60 αυτόχθονες γλώσσες που ομιλούνται στον Καναδά. Ειδικότερα, επικεντρωνόμαστε σε τεχνολογίες που μπορεί να είναι εφικτές να αναπτυχθούν για τις περισσότερες ή όλες αυτές τις γλώσσες, όχι μόνο σε εκείνες που μπορεί να είναι εφικτές για τις λίγες από αυτές τις γλώσσες με τους περισσότερους πόρους. Αξιολογούμε τα επιτεύγματα του παρελθόντος και εξετάζουμε τους μελλοντικούς ορίζοντες για τη μεταγραφή αυτόχθονων γλωσσών, την πρόβλεψη κειμένου, τον ορθογραφικό έλεγχο, την κατά προσέγγιση αναζήτηση, τη μηχανική μετάφραση, την αναγνώριση ομιλίας, τη διάρθρωση ομιλητών, τη σύνθεση ομιλίας, την οπτική αναγνώριση χαρακτήρων και την εκμάθηση γλωσσών με υπολογιστή.', 'it': "In questo articolo, discutiamo quali tecnologie di testo, discorso e immagine sono state sviluppate, e sarebbero fattibili da sviluppare, per le circa 60 lingue indigene parlate in Canada. In particolare, ci concentriamo sulle tecnologie che possono essere sviluppate per la maggior parte o per tutte queste lingue, e non solo su quelle che potrebbero essere fattibili per i pochi di questi più dotati di risorse. Valutiamo i risultati passati e consideriamo gli orizzonti futuri per la traslitterazione delle lingue indigene, la previsione del testo, il controllo ortografico, la ricerca approssimativa, la traduzione automatica, il riconoscimento vocale, la diarizzazione degli oratori, la sintesi vocale, il riconoscimento ottico dei caratteri e l'apprendimento delle lingue assistito dal computer.", 'ka': 'ამ პექტიკში ჩვენ განვითარებით, რომელიც ტექსტი, სიტყვა და გამოსახულების ტექნოლოგიები განვითარებულია და იქნება შესაძლებელია განვითარება, რომელიც კანადიაში საუკეთესო 60 ინ განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ კონტექნექცირებით ტექნოლოგიებზე, რომელიც შეიძლება უფრო მეტი ან ყველა ეს ენებისთვის განვითარება, არა მხოლოდ ისინი, რომელიც შეიძლება შეიძლება შეი ჩვენ შემდეგი წარმოდგენების განსაზღვრება და მომავალე ჰორიზონები ინდიგენური ენის ტრანსლიტაციისთვის, ტექსტის წარმოდგენების განსაზღვრება, წარმოდგენების შემოწმება, ძიება, მანქანის წარმოწმება, სიტყვა გან', 'kk': 'Бұл мақаланың қай мәтін, сөйлеу және кескінді технологиялар жасалған екенін жұмыс істеп, Канадада сөйлейтін 60 тілдер үшін жасауға мүмкін болады. Әрине бұл тілдердің көпшілігіне не барлық тілдеріне жасауға мүмкіндік болатын технологияларға назар аударып тұрамыз. Бұлардың көпшілігінің көпшілігін жасауға мүмкін емес. Біз өткен жеткіздіктерді анықтап, Түрлі тілдерді транслитерациялау, мәтін таңдау, емле тексеру, іздеу, машина аудару, сөздерді таңдау, сөздерді диаризациялау, сөздерді синтезикалық, оптикалық таңдау, және компьютерді қолдау тілд', 'lt': 'Šiame straipsnyje diskutuojame apie teksto, kalbos ir vaizdo technologijų kūrimą maždaug 60 Kanadoje kalbamų vietinių kalbų, o tai būtų įmanoma plėtoti. Visų pirma daugiausia dėmesio skiriame technologijoms, kurios gali būti įmanomos plėtoti daugumai ar visoms šioms kalboms, ne tik toms, kurios gali būti įmanomos mažiausiai iš jų išteklių turintiems asmenims. Vertiname ankstesnius pasiekimus ir svarstome būsimus vietinės kalbos transliteracijos, teksto prognozės, raštiško tikrinimo, apytikrio paieškos, mašininio vertimo, kalbos pripažinimo, kalbėtojų dienoraščio, kalbos sintezės, optinio ženklo pripažinimo ir kompiuteriu remiamo kalbos mokymosi horizontus.', 'ms': 'Dalam artikel ini, kita membincangkan teks, ucapan, dan teknologi imej yang telah dikembangkan, dan boleh dikembangkan, untuk sekitar 60 bahasa Indigenous yang bercakap di Kanada. Terutama, kita tumpukan pada teknologi yang mungkin boleh dikembangkan untuk kebanyakan atau semua bahasa-bahasa ini, bukan hanya bahasa-bahasa yang mungkin boleh dikembangkan untuk beberapa bahasa-bahasa yang paling berkuasa. Kami menilai kejayaan masa lalu dan mempertimbangkan horizon masa depan untuk transliterasi bahasa Indigenous, prediksi teks, pemeriksaan ejaan, gelintar kira-kira, terjemahan mesin, pengenalan pidato, diarisasi pembicara, sintesis pidato, pengenalan aksara optik, dan pembelajaran bahasa yang membantu komputer.', 'ml': 'ഈ ലേഖനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു, ഏത് പദാവലി, സംസാരം, ചിത്ര സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു എന്ന്, കാനഡയ In particular, we concentrate on technologies that may be feasible to develop for most or all of these languages, not just those that may be feasible for the few most-resourced of these.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാവിയുടെ ഭാവിയുടെ ഭാവിയുടെ പരിഭാഗത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിചാരിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ലേഖന പ്രവചനങ്ങള്\u200d, അക്ഷരസഞ്ചരിക്കുന്നത്, അടുത്ത ത തെരച്ചില്\u200d, മെഷീന്\u200d പരിശോധന, സ', 'mk': 'Во оваа статија, разговараме за текстот, говорот и сличните технологии кои се развиени, и би биле можни да се развијат, за околу 60 индигени јазици кои се зборуваат во Канада. Особено, се концентрираме на технологиите кои може да бидат остварливи за развој на повеќето или сите овие јазици, не само на оние кои може да бидат остварливи за неколку од овие најресурсирани јазици. Ги проценуваме минатите достигнувања и разгледуваме идните хоризонти за транслитерација на индигенскиот јазик, предвидување на текст, проверка на правопис, приближно пребарување, машински превод, препознавање на говорот, дијаризација на говорникот, синтетиза на говорот, оптичко препознавање на карактеристичките зна', 'mt': 'F’dan l-artikolu, niddiskutu liema testi, diskors u teknoloġiji tal-immaġni ġew żviluppati, u jkunu fattibbli li jiġu żviluppati, għal madwar 60 lingwa Indiġena mitkellma fil-Kanada. B’mod partikolari, aħna nikkonċentraw fuq teknoloġiji li jistgħu jkunu fattibbli li jiġu żviluppati għall-biċċa l-kbira jew għal dawn il-lingwi kollha, mhux biss dawk li jistgħu jkunu fattibbli għall-ftit li huma l-aktar riżorsi. Aħna jivvalutaw il-kisbiet tal-passat u nikkunsidraw orizzonti futuri għat-traslitterazzjoni tal-lingwa indiġena, it-tbassir tat-test, il-verifika tal-ortografija, it-tiftix approssimattiv, it-traduzzjoni tal-magna, ir-rikonoxximent tad-diskors, id-dijalizzazzjoni tal-kelliema, is-sinteżi tad-diskors, ir-rikonoxximent otti', 'mn': 'Энэ бичлэгт бид Канадад хэн бичлэг, яриа, зураг технологиудыг хөгжүүлсэн бөгөөд ойролцоогоор 60 хэл дээр хөгжүүлэх боломжтой болно. Ялангуяа бид эдгээр хэлний ихэнх эсвэл бүх хэлний төлөө хөгжүүлэх боломжтой технологи дээр анхаарлаа анхаарлаа төвлөрүүлдэг. Эдгээрийн хамгийн хэмжээний асуудал боломжтой технологиуд биш. Бид өнгөрсөн амжилтыг тодорхойлдог, ирээдүйн хэл дамжуулах, текст тодорхойлолт, шинжлэх ухаан, хайх, машин дамжуулах, ярианы танилцлага, ярианы шинжлэх ухаан, ярианы шинжлэх ухаан, харин компьютерийн тусламжтай хэл суралцах боломж', 'no': 'I denne artikkelen diskuterer vi kva tekst, språk og bileteknologi er utvikla, og vil vera i stand til å utvikla for omtrent 60 indigenous språk som er snakket i Canada. I særskilt fokuserer vi på teknologi som kan vera feilig å utvikle for dei fleste eller alle desse språka, ikkje bare dei som kan vera feilige for dei få dei mest ressurserte av desse. Vi vurderer siste oppgåver og vurderer framtidige horisontane for transliterasjon av Indigenous language, tekstforhåndsvising, stavekontroll, omtrent søk, maskineomsetjing, tale-gjenkjenning, tale-gjenkjenning, optisk teiknkonkjenning og språk-læring med datahjelp.', 'pl': 'W tym artykule omówimy, które technologie tekstu, mowy i obrazu zostały opracowane i byłyby możliwe do opracowania dla około 60-tych języków rdzennych używanych w Kanadzie. W szczególności koncentrujemy się na technologiach, które mogą być możliwe do opracowania dla większości lub wszystkich tych języków, a nie tylko tych, które mogą być wykonalne dla nielicznych z nich najbardziej zasobów. Oceniamy dotychczasowe osiągnięcia i rozważamy przyszłe horyzonty transliteracji języków rdzennych, przewidywania tekstu, sprawdzania pisowni, przybliżonego wyszukiwania, tłumaczenia maszynowego, rozpoznawania mowy, diaryzacji mówców, syntezy mowy, optycznego rozpoznawania znaków i wspomaganego komputerowego uczenia się języków.', 'ro': 'În acest articol, discutăm ce tehnologii de text, vorbire și imagine au fost dezvoltate și ar fi fezabile de dezvoltat pentru cele aproximativ 60 de limbi indigene vorbite în Canada. În special, ne concentrăm asupra tehnologiilor care ar putea fi fezabile de dezvoltat pentru majoritatea sau toate aceste limbi, nu doar pe cele care ar putea fi fezabile pentru câteva dintre aceste limbi. Evaluăm realizările trecute și luăm în considerare orizonturile viitoare pentru transliterarea limbilor indigene, predicția textului, verificarea ortografică, căutarea aproximativă, traducerea automată, recunoașterea vorbirii, diarizarea vorbitorilor, sinteza vorbirii, recunoașterea optică a caracterelor și învățarea limbilor asistată de calculator.', 'sv': 'I den här artikeln diskuterar vi vilken text-, tal- och bildteknik som har utvecklats, och som skulle vara möjlig att utveckla, för de cirka 60 inhemska språk som talas i Kanada. Vi koncentrerar oss särskilt på teknik som kan vara genomförbar att utveckla för de flesta eller alla dessa språk, inte bara sådana som kan vara genomförbara för de få som har mest resurser. Vi bedömer tidigare prestationer och beaktar framtida horisonter för translitteration av ursprungsspråk, textförutsägelse, stavningskontroll, ungefärlig sökning, maskinöversättning, taligenkänning, taldiarisering, talsyntes, optisk teckenkänning och datorstödd språkinlärning.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan ayaannu ka sheekaynaa teknolojiyada qoraalka, hadalka, iyo sawirka, waxaana suurtagal in la horumariyo, sababtoo ah qiyaastii 60 luuqadaha indigenous ee Kanada lagu hadlo. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa teknolojiyo suurtagal ah in aan u horumarino kuwa badan ama dhammaan luqadahan, mana aha kuwa suurtagal u ah in ay u suurtoobaan kuwa ugu yaraan kuwan. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa wixii horumarinta ah ee hore, waxaana ka fiirsanaynaa horumarinta ugu dambeeya qoraalka, warqadda qoraalka, baaritaanka sawiraadka, raadinta gaadiidka, turjumidda mashiinka, aqoonsashada hadalka, sawirida hadalka, heshiiska hadalka, aqoonta sawirida qofka, aqoonsashada kaamilka ah iyo barashada luuqada ee kambiyuutarka.', 'ur': 'اس مقالہ میں ہم نے کس پیغام، کلام اور تصویر تکنولوژی کو توسعہ کیا ہے اور کاناڈا میں حدود ۶۰ زبان کی باتیں بتائی جاتی ہیں۔ مخصوصاً ہم تکنولوژی پر تمرکز کر رہے ہیں جو ان میں سے بہت سے یا تمام زبانوں کے لئے بڑھنے کے قابل ہو سکتے ہیں، نہیں صرف ان لوگوں کے لئے جو ان میں سے بہت کم سارے مناسب ہیں۔ ہم نے اگلوں کامیابی کا امتحان کرتا ہے اور اگلوں کی زبان کی ترنسلیٹ، متن کی پیش بینی، spell-checking، تقریباً تلاش، ماشین ترجمہ، سخنرانی کی شناسایی، سخنرانی سینٹیز، اوپٹیکل شخصت کی شناسایی اور کمپیوٹر کی مدد کی زبان کی تعلیم کے لئے آگے کے افقی', 'sr': 'U ovom članku razgovaramo o kojem su tekstu, govoru i tehnologiji slika razvijene i bilo bi moguće da se razviju, za približno 60 Indijanskih jezika govorenih u Kanadi. Posebno, koncentrišemo se na tehnologije koje bi mogle biti moguće da se razviju za većinu ili svih tih jezika, ne samo one koje bi mogle biti moguće za nekoliko najresursnijih od ovih. Procjenjujemo prošle postignuće i razmotrimo buduće horizonte za transliteraciju jezika Indijanaca, predviđanje teksta, pretraživanje pisma, približno pretraživanje, prevod mašine, prepoznavanje govora, dijarizaciju govora, sintezu govora, prepoznavanje optičkih karaktera i učenje jezika koji podržava kompjuter.', 'ta': 'இந்த கட்டுரையில், நாம் எந்த உரையை, பேச்சு, பிம்பத்தின் தொழில்நுட்பம் உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம். காண்டாவில் பே குறிப்பிட்ட தொழில்நுட்பத்தை நாம் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம் அது பெரும்பாலும் அல்லது எல்லா மொழிகளுக்கும் உருவாக்க முடியும் என்று ம நாங்கள் முந்தைய வெற்றிகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் மற்றும் நாம் எதிர்கால விளைவுகளை கருதுகிறோம் மற்றும் உள்ளார்ந்த மொழி மாற்றுதல், உரை முன்னேற்றம், சொல்லை பரிசோதிப்பு, சா', 'si': 'මේ ලේඛනයේදී, අපි කතා කරනවා කනාඩාවේ පැත්ත, භාෂාව, පින්තූර තාක්ෂණාව විකාශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ කොහොමද පින්තූර තාක්ෂ විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් තාක්ෂණාත්මක විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න, මේ භාෂාව අපි පහුගිය අවස්ථාව අවස්ථාව සහ අනාගතයේ භාෂාව පාරකිරීම, පාළු අවස්ථාව, පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය, පරීක්ෂණය, පරීක්ෂණය, පරීක්ෂණය, පරීක්ෂණය, කත', 'uz': "Bu maqolada, biz qanday matn, сўз, сур teknologiya va rasm teknologiya tuzishga murojaat qilamiz, va Canada'da gapiradigan 60 oddiy tillar uchun yaratish mumkin. Shunday qilib, biz ko'pchilik tilning ko'pchiligi yoki barcha tillardan foydalanishimiz mumkin emas, balki bu narsalarning ko'pchilik murakkablariga imkoniyatli mumkin bo'lishi mumkin. We assess past achievements and consider future horizons for Indigenous language transliteration, text prediction, spell-checking, approximate search, machine translation, speech recognition, speaker diarization, speech synthesis, optical character recognition, and computer-aided language learning.", 'vi': 'Trong bài báo này, chúng ta bàn về những văn bản, ngôn ngữ, và kỹ thuật hình ảnh đã được phát triển, và sẽ có khả năng phát triển, cho ngôn ngữ xấp xỉ 60genous của Canada. Chúng tôi tập trung vào những công nghệ có khả năng phát triển cho hầu hết hoặc tất cả các ngôn ngữ này, không chỉ những thứ có thể khả thi với những nguồn lực ít nhất. Chúng tôi đánh giá thành tựu trong quá khứ và xem xét khả năng chuyển dạng ngôn ngữ bản, khả năng tiên đoán văn bản, kiểm soát chính xác, tìm kiếm gần nhau, dịch thuật riêng, nhận dạng ngôn ngữ, tổng hợp ngôn ngữ, nhận dạng nhân bản quang học và học ngôn ngữ.', 'da': 'I denne artikel diskuterer vi, hvilke tekst-, tale- og billedteknologier der er blevet udviklet og vil være mulige at udvikle for de ca. 60 oprindelige sprog, der tales i Canada. Vi koncentrerer os især om teknologier, der kan udvikles for de fleste eller alle disse sprog, og ikke kun dem, der kan være mulige for de få af disse mest ressourcer. Vi vurderer tidligere resultater og overvejer fremtidige horisonter for translitteration af oprindelige sprog, tekstforudsigelse, stavekontrol, omtrentlig søgning, maskinoversættelse, talegenkendelse, talediarisering, talesyntese, optisk karakterkendelse og computerstøttet sprogindlæring.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel bespreken we welke tekst-, spraak- en beeldtechnologieën ontwikkeld zijn en haalbaar zouden zijn om te ontwikkelen voor de ongeveer 60 inheemse talen die in Canada gesproken worden. We concentreren ons in het bijzonder op technologieën die mogelijk voor de meeste of al deze talen kunnen worden ontwikkeld, niet alleen op technologieën die mogelijk haalbaar zijn voor de weinige van deze talen. We beoordelen prestaties uit het verleden en kijken naar toekomstige horizonten voor inheemse taaltransliteratie, tekstvoorspelling, spellingscontrole, approximatieve zoekopdracht, machinevertaling, spraakherkenning, sprekersynthese, optische karakterherkenning en computerondersteund taalleren.', 'bg': 'В тази статия обсъждаме кои текстови, речни и образни технологии са разработени и биха могли да бъдат разработени за приблизително 60-те местни езика, говорени в Канада. По-специално, ние се концентрираме върху технологии, които могат да бъдат осъществими за повечето или всички тези езици, а не само тези, които могат да бъдат осъществими за малкото от тях с най-голям ресурс. Ние оценяваме миналите постижения и разглеждаме бъдещите хоризонти за транслитерация на местни езици, предсказване на текст, правописна проверка, приблизително търсене, машинен превод, разпознаване на речта, диаризация на говорителите, синтез на речта, оптично разпознаване на знаци и компютърно подпомагано езиково обучение.', 'de': 'In diesem Artikel diskutieren wir, welche Text-, Sprach- und Bildtechnologien für die etwa 60-jährigen indigenen Sprachen in Kanada entwickelt wurden und entwickelt werden könnten. Insbesondere konzentrieren wir uns auf Technologien, die für die meisten oder alle dieser Sprachen entwickelt werden können, und nicht nur auf solche, die für die wenigen am meisten Ressourcen verfügbar sind. Wir bewerten vergangene Erfolge und betrachten zukünftige Horizonte für indigene Sprachtransliteration, Textvorhersage, Rechtschreibprüfung, approximative Suche, maschinelle Übersetzung, Spracherkennung, Sprecherdiarisierung, Sprachsynthese, optische Zeichenerkennung und computergestütztes Sprachenlernen.', 'id': 'Dalam artikel ini, kita mendiskusikan teks, pidato, dan teknologi gambar yang telah dikembangkan, dan akan dapat dikembangkan, untuk sekitar 60 bahasa asli yang dibicarakan di Kanada. Terutama, kita berkonsentrasi pada teknologi yang mungkin dapat dikembangkan untuk kebanyakan atau semua bahasa-bahasa ini, bukan hanya bahasa-bahasa yang mungkin dapat dikembangkan untuk beberapa yang paling sumber daya. Kami menilai pencapaian masa lalu dan mempertimbangkan horizon masa depan untuk transliterasi bahasa asli, prediksi teks, pemeriksaan ejaan, pencarian sekitar, terjemahan mesin, pengenalan pidato, diarisasi pembicara, sintesis pidato, pengenalan karakter optik, dan belajar bahasa yang membantu komputer.', 'ko': '이 글에서 우리는 캐나다의 약 60개 토착 언어에 대한 텍스트, 음성, 이미지 기술, 그리고 이런 기술 개발의 타당성을 토론할 것이다.특히 우리는 소수의 자원이 가장 풍부한 언어뿐만 아니라 대다수 또는 모든 언어를 위해 실행 가능한 기술을 개발하는 데 전념한다.우리는 과거의 성과를 평가하고 원주민 언어의 음역, 텍스트 예측, 맞춤법 검사, 근사 검색, 기계 번역, 음성 식별, 말하는 사람의 일기, 음성 합성, 광학 문자 식별과 컴퓨터 보조 언어 학습의 미래 전망을 고려한다.', 'sw': 'Katika makala hii, tunajadili teknolojia gani ya maandishi, hotuba, na picha zilizoendelezwa, na ingewezekana kuendeleza, kwa lugha 60 za wenyeji zinazozungumzwa nchini Canada. Kwa hakika, tunajikita kwenye teknolojia ambazo inawezekana kuendeleza kwa lugha nyingi au zote hizi, sio tu wale ambao wanaweza kuwa na uwezekano kwa sababu chache za hizi. Tunafahamu mafanikio yaliyopita na kuangalia upeo wa baadaye wa kutafsiri lugha za wenyeji, utabiri wa maandishi, kutafuta utafiti wa kuandika, tafsiri ya mashine, kutambua hotuba, utaratibu wa hotuba, utambulisho wa mazungumzo, utambulisho wa tabia za kioptical, na kujifunza lugha inayosaidia kompyuta.', 'fa': 'در این مقاله، ما در مورد کدام متن، سخنرانی و تکنولوژی تصویر توسعه داده شده\u200cایم و برای حدود ۶۰ زبان Indigenous در کانادا قابل توسعه است. مخصوصا، ما روی تکنولوژی ها تمرکز می کنیم که ممکن است برای بیشتر یا تمام این زبانها توسعه کنند، نه تنها کسانی که ممکن است برای کمتر منابع این زبانها موجود باشند. ما موفقیت های گذشته را ارزیابی می کنیم و افق های آینده برای ترجمه کردن زبان Indigenous، پیش\u200cبینی متن، بررسی\u200cهای نوشته، محدود جستجو، ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین، شناسایی سخنرانی، ترجمه\u200cهای سخنرانی، ترجمه\u200cهای سخنرانی، شناسایی شخصیت\u200cهای optical و یادگیری زبان کمک', 'tr': 'Bu maksada biz Kanada g체rle첵채n 60 sany indiki diller 체챌in n채hili metin, 챌yky힊 we surat teknolojileri geli힊ip biler. 횜zellikde biz bu dilleri흫 k철p체si 첵a-da 채hli 체챌in geli힊mek m체mkin bolup bilen teknolojilere 체ns ber첵채ris, di흫e olary흫 azajyk ukyplary 체챌in m체mkin d채l. Biz 철흫ki 첵etip ba첵ramlary we Indiki diller terjime edip bilmek 체챌in gelejekde 첵ollardan pikir ed첵채n.', 'af': 'In hierdie artikel bespreek ons wat teks, spreek en beeldteknologies ontwikkel is en sou moontlik wees om te ontwikkel, vir die omtrent 60 Indigenoese tale wat in Kanada gespreek is. In besonderhede, ons konsentreer op teknologies wat dalk moontlik is om vir mees of al hierdie tale te ontwikkel, nie net die wat moontlik kan wees vir die paar mees-hulpbron van hierdie. Ons beoorsaak verlede berekeninge en oorsaak toekomstige horisonte vir Indigenoese taal transliterasie, teks voorskou, spell-kontrole, omtrent soek, masjien vertaling, spraak herkening, sprekker diarisasie, spraak sinteze, optiese karaktererkenning en rekenaar ondersteunde taal leer.', 'sq': 'Në këtë artikull, diskutojmë se cili tekst, fjalim dhe teknologji imazhi janë zhvilluar dhe do të jetë e mundur të zhvillohet, për rreth 60 gjuhët indígene të folura në Kanada. Ne veçanërisht, ne përqëndrohemi në teknologji që mund të jenë të realizueshme për të zhvilluar për shumicën apo të gjitha këto gjuhë, jo vetëm ato që mund të jenë të realizueshme për pak prej tyre më të burimeve. Ne vlerësojmë arritjet e kaluara dhe konsiderojmë horizontet e ardhshme për transliteracionin e gjuhës indígene, parashikimin e tekstit, kontrollin e ortografikës, kërkimin e afërt, përkthimin e makinës, njohjen e fjalës, diarizimin e fjalës, sintezën e fjalës, njohjen optike të karakterit dhe mësimin e gjuhës me ndihmë kompjuterike.', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածի մեջ մենք քննարկում ենք, թե ինչ տեքստ, խոսք և նկարի տեխնոլոգիաներ են զարգացել և կկարողանանք զարգացնել Կանադայում խոսվող մոտ 60 անգամ բնական լեզուների համար: Մենք հատկապես կենտրոնանում ենք տեխնոլոգիաների վրա, որոնք հնարավոր է զարգացնել այս լեզուների մեծ մասի կամ բոլոր լեզուների համար, ոչ միայն այն լեզուների վրա, որոնք հնարավոր են զարգացնել սրանցից ամենաքիչ ռեսուրսների համար: Մենք գնահատում ենք անցյալ հաջողությունները և հաշվի առնում ենք արտաքին լեզվի տրանսգրականության ապագա հորիզոնները, տեքստի կանխատեսումը, գրագիտության ստուգումը, մոտավորապես որոնումը, մեքենայի թարգմանումը, խոսքի ճանաչելը, խոսքի արտահայտումը, խոսքի սինթեզը, օ', 'hr': 'U ovom članku razgovaramo o kojem su tekstu, govoru i tehnologiji slika razvijene i bilo bi moguće razviti za približno 60 Indijanskih jezika govorenih u Kanadi. Posebno, koncentriramo se na tehnologije koje bi mogle biti moguće razviti za većinu ili svih tih jezika, ne samo one koje bi mogle biti moguće za nekoliko najresursnijih od njih. Procjenjujemo prošle postignuće i razmotrimo buduće horizonte za transliteraciju jezika Indijanaca, predviđanje teksta, provjeravanje pisma, približno pretraživanje, prevod strojeva, priznanje govora, dijarizaciju govora, sintezu govora, prepoznavanje optičkih karaktera i učenje jezika koji su podržani računalom.', 'am': 'In this article, we discuss which text, speech, and image technologies have been developed, and would be feasible to develop, for the approximately 60 Indigenous languages spoken in Canada.  በተለይም፣ ለብዙዎቹ ወይም ለሁሉም እነዚህን ቋንቋዎች መፍጠር የሚችሉትን ቴክኖሎጂዎች እናስማማታለን፣ ነገር ግን ለጥቂቶቹ ፍላጎች የሚቻሉትን ብቻ አይደለም፡፡ የቀድሞውን ደረጃዎች እና የአገረ ቋንቋ ትርጉም፣ የጽሑፍ ትንቢት፣ የጽሑፍ ትንቢት፣ የቃላት ትርጉም፣ የመሳሳይ ትርጉም፣ ንግግር ማቀናቀፍ፣ ንግግር ማቀናቀፍ፣ የንግግር አስተያየት፣ የአባቢካዊ ጽሑፍ ማውቀት እና የኮምፒዩተር ቋንቋ ትምህርት እናደርጋለን።', 'bs': 'U ovom članku razgovaramo o kojem su tekstu, govoru i tehnologiji slika razvijene i bilo bi moguće razviti za približno 60 Indijanskih jezika govorenih u Kanadi. Posebno, koncentrišemo se na tehnologije koje bi mogle biti moguće razviti za većinu ili svih tih jezika, ne samo one koje bi mogle biti moguće za nekoliko najresursnijih od ovih. Procjenjujemo prošle postignuće i razmotrimo buduće horizonte za transliteraciju jezika Indijanaca, predviđanje teksta, provjeravanje pisma, približno pretraživanje, prevod strojeva, priznanje govora, dijalizaciju govora, sintezu govora, prepoznavanje optičkih karaktera i učenje jezika pod kompjuterom.', 'bn': 'এই প্রবন্ধে আমরা আলোচনা করি কোন টেক্সট, ভাষণ, এবং ছবি প্রযুক্তি উন্নয়ন করা হয়েছে এবং কানাডাতে প্রায় ৬০ আদিবাসী ভাষার জন্য উন্নয়ন সম্ভব হবে। In particular, we concentrate on technologies that may be feasible to develop for most or all of these languages, not just those that may be feasible for the few most-resourced of these.  আমরা অতীত অর্জনের পরিমাণ মূল্য করি এবং আদিবাসী ভাষা ট্রান্সলিটারেশন, টেক্সটের ভবিষ্যতের ধারাবাহিক, বানান পরীক্ষা, প্রায় অনুসন্ধান, মেশিন অনুবাদ, বক্তৃপক্ষ স্বীকৃতি, বক', 'ca': "En aquest article, discutem quines tecnologies de text, discurs i imatge s'han desenvolupat, i seria viable desenvolupar, per a les aproximadament 60 llengües indígenes parlades al Canadà. En particular, ens concentrem en tecnologies que poden ser viables per desenvolupar la majoria o totes aquestes llengües, no només aquelles que poden ser viables per als pocs més recursos d'aquestes. Evaluam els èxits del passat i considerem horizonts futurs de transliteració de llenguatges indígenes, predicció de textos, correcció ortogràfica, cerca aproximada, traducció màquina, reconeixement de vosaltres, diarització de parladors, síntesi de vosaltres, reconeixement òptic de caràcters i aprenentatge de llenguatges ajudat per ordinador.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku diskutujeme, které textové, řečové a obrazové technologie byly vyvinuty a byly by možné vyvinout pro přibližně šedesát domorodých jazyků hovořících se v Kanadě. Konkrétně se zaměřujeme na technologie, které mohou být proveditelné pro většinu nebo všechny tyto jazyky, a ne jen na ty, které mohou být proveditelné pro několik z nich s nejvíce zdroji. Posuzujeme minulé úspěchy a zvažujeme budoucí horizonty pro transliteraci domorodého jazyka, predikci textu, kontrolu pravopisu, přibližné vyhledávání, strojový překlad, rozpoznávání řeči, diarizaci řeči, syntézu řeči, optické rozpoznávání znaků a počítačově podporované učení jazyků.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa pohdimme, mitä teksti-, puhe- ja kuvateknologioita on kehitetty ja mitä voitaisiin kehittää noin 60 alkuperäiskielellä, joita puhutaan Kanadassa. Keskitymme erityisesti teknologioihin, joita voidaan kehittää useimmille tai kaikille näistä kielistä, eikä vain niihin, jotka ovat mahdollisia muutamille näistä kielistä eniten resursseja tarvitseville. Arvioimme aiempia saavutuksia ja pohdimme tulevaisuuden näkymiä alkuperäiskansojen kielen transliteraatiolle, tekstin ennustukselle, oikeinkirjoitukselle, likimääräiselle haulle, konekäännökselle, puheentunnistukselle, puhujien päiväkirjautumiselle, puheensynteesille, optiselle merkkintunnistukselle ja tietokoneavusteiselle kieltenoppimiselle.', 'et': 'Käesolevas artiklis arutleme, millised teksti-, kõne- ja kujutistehnoloogiad on välja töötatud ja mida oleks võimalik arendada umbes 60 Kanadas räägitava põliskeele jaoks. Eelkõige keskendume tehnoloogiatele, mida võib olla võimalik arendada enamiku või kõigi nende keelte jaoks, mitte ainult neile, mis võivad olla teostatavad vähestele neist kõige ressurssidega keeltest. Hindame varasemaid saavutusi ja kaalume tulevikus põliskeele transliteratsiooni, teksti ennustamise, õigekirja kontrolli, ligikaudse otsingu, masintõlke, kõnetuvastuse, kõnelejate diariseerimise, kõnesünteesi, optilise märgituvastuse ja arvutipõhise keeleõppe jaoks.', 'az': 'Bu məktublarda, Kanada kimin məktub, danışmaq və surat teknolojilərinin icazə edildiyini mübahisə edirik və bu məktub Kanadada danışan yaklaşık 60 Indijin dilləri üçün mümkün olardı. Özellikle, bu dillərin çoxuna və bütün dillərə mümkün olabilen teknolojilərə təsirlik edirik, bunların çoxuna və çoxuna müvəffəqiyyət edə bilənlərə deyil. Biz əvvəlki başarıqları təsdiqləyirik və Indijin dillərin transliterasyonu, metin təsdiqlənməsi, imzalaması təsdiqlənməsi, araştırma, makina tercüməsi, danışma tanıması, danışma sintezi, optik karakterlərin tanıması və kompjuterlə kömək edən dil öyrənməsi üçün gələcək məsafələri düşünürük.', 'jv': 'Nanging artik iki, awak dhéwé pisan kelas teks, sesuk lan teknêlogi surat sing bisa arep nggawe lan ijol-ijolan kanggo meh supoyo sak basa isura awak dhéwé kanggo sabên langa sing bakal terus sabên 60 Jagad sing apik kanggo Keadar. Juara-Juara, awak dhéwé diponton tèknologi sing bisa supoyo nggawe kanggo tukang karo hal barêng langa iki, ora dhèwèké iso ngejaraké kanggo kelangan iki ning susahé. Awakdhéwé éntuk dhéwé éntukno karo halekan kanggo langgambar nggawe tarjamahan kanggo Kemerdekaan kanggo langgambar nggo Kemerdekaan kanggo Kemerdekaan, Peringuhaan langgambar, ingkang nggunaken, Peringuhaan, Trangkat kuwi, Peringuhaan langgambar, Peringuhaan langgambar nggo Kemerdekaan nggo Kemerdekaan kapen.', 'sk': 'V tem članku bomo razpravljali, katere besedilne, govorne in slikovne tehnologije so bile razvite in bi bile izvedljive za približno 60 avtohtonih jezikov, ki se govorijo v Kanadi. Zlasti se osredotočamo na tehnologije, ki jih je mogoče razviti za večino ali vse te jezike, ne samo na tiste, ki so mogoče izvesti za redke od teh jezikov z največjimi viri. Ocenjujemo pretekle dosežke in upoštevamo prihodnja obzorja za transliteracijo avtohtonih jezikov, napovedovanje besedila, preverjanje črkovanja, približno iskanje, strojno prevajanje, prepoznavanje govora, diarizacijo govornikov, sintezo govora, optično prepoznavanje znakov in računalniško podprto učenje jezikov.', 'ha': "A cikin wannan makala, Munã jãyayya wanne technical, magana, da zane an developed su, kuma za'a iya iya buɗe, dõmin takwai 60 harshen iyayyadani da aka faɗa a cikin Kanada. Kayyai, tuna makini a kan technyogi masu yiwuwa za'a buɗe wa masu yawa ko dukkan harshen waɗannan, kuma ba ta zama kawai waɗanda ke iya sauƙi a kan masu kaɗan da ke faransa daga wannan. Ana ƙaddara mafarin da ya gabãta, kuma Muke bincike horifitan baka wa transliteratori na harshen Indanci, mai gargaɗin littafin, kuma masu iya ƙayyade littãfin, yin jarraba cikin littafin, kuma masu amfani da zane-zane-zane, masu amfani da fassarar mashine, zane-zane-zane, masu motsi da ake yi wa magana, diriƙori, zaɓe-hoteli, da sunago", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེ་དང་སྐད་བརྗོད་དང་བརྙན་པར་ཆགས་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་ཤིག་ཡོད། Canada་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏོང ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་འདི་དག་ཆེ་ཤོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལག་ཁྱེར་དང་། ཕྱི་རིགས་འདི་དག་ཆེ་ཤོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་ཚད་མིན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བྱས་ཆོག་ཡིན། We assess past achievements and consider future horizons for Indigenous language transliteration, text prediction, spell-checking, approximate search, machine translation, speech recognition, speaker diarization, speech synthesis, optical character recognition, and computer-aided language learning.', 'he': 'במאמר הזה, אנחנו מדברים על איזה טקסט, נאום וטכנולוגיות התמונה התפתחו, ויהיה אפשרי להתפתח, עבור 60 שפות מקומיות מדברות בקנדה. In particular, we concentrate on technologies that may be feasible to develop for most or all of these languages, not just those that may be feasible for the few most-resourced of these.  We assess past achievements and consider future horizons for Indigenous language transliteration, text prediction, spell-checking, approximate search, machine translation, speech recognition, speaker diarization, speech synthesis, optical character recognition, and computer-aided language learning.'}
{'en': 'Pluralizing Nouns across Agglutinating Bantu Languages', 'fr': 'Pluralisation des noms dans les langues bantoues agglutinantes', 'ar': 'تعدّد الأسماء عبر لغات البانتو المتلصقة', 'es': 'Pluralización de sustantivos en lenguas bantúes aglutinantes', 'pt': 'Pluralizando Substantivos em Línguas Bantu Aglutinantes', 'ja': 'バントゥー諸言語における名詞の複数化', 'zh': '跨凝集班图语者复数名词', 'ru': 'Плюрализация существительных в агглютинирующих языках банту', 'hi': 'Agglutinating Bantu भाषाओं में बहुवचन संज्ञाएं', 'ga': 'Ainmfhocail Iolrúcháin ar fud Agglutinating Bantu Languages', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Πολλαπλασιάζοντας ουσιαστικά σε όλες τις γλώσσες του Μπάντου', 'hu': 'Pluralizáló főnevek az agglutináló bantu nyelveken', 'it': 'Pluralizzazione dei sostantivi nelle lingue Bantu agglutinanti', 'kk': 'Банту тілдерінің арасындағы жаңалықтарды бірнеше түрлендіру', 'lt': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Name', 'ml': 'ബാന്റു ഭാഷകങ്ങളില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d നോയുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന പ്ലഗ്ലൂട്ടിങ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mt': 'Il-Pluralizzazzjoni tal-Ismijiet fil-Lingwi Bantu Agglutinating', 'ro': 'Pluralizarea substantivelor în limbile Bantu agregatoare', 'mn': 'Банту хэл дээр нэмэгдүүлж', 'sr': 'Pluralizirajuæi imene preko Agglutinating Bantu jezika', 'no': 'Pluraliserer nøklar over Agglutinating Bantu Språk', 'pl': 'Pluralizacja rzeczowników w językach Agglutinujących Bantu', 'sv': 'Pluralisera substantiv över agglutinerande bantu språk', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Jawaalka Nouns oo dhan Agglutinating luqadaha Bantu', 'ta': 'பாங்டு மொழிகளை முழுவதும் நோன்ஸ் சேர்க்கிறது', 'ur': 'انگلوٹینٹ بانٹو زبانوں پر نائن پھیلاتے ہیں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kết hợp nguồn tin cấp trên', 'bg': 'Множество съществителни в аглутиниращите бантуски езици', 'da': 'Pluraliserende navneord på tværs af agglutinerende bantu sprog', 'nl': 'Pluralisering van zelfstandige naamwoorden in samenhangende Bantutalen', 'hr': 'Pluralizirajući trenutke preko Agglutinating Bantu jezika', 'id': 'Pluralizing Nouns across Agglutinating Bantu Languages', 'de': 'Pluralisierung von Substantiven über Agglutinierende Bantusprachen', 'ko': '접합반도어의 복수 명사', 'fa': 'روزنامه\u200cها را در زبان\u200cهای بانتوی آگلوتین می\u200cکند', 'sw': 'Kukusanya Nouns katika lugha za Bantu', 'tr': 'Bantu dillerinden öňünde Täzeleri Pluralizýar', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Pluralizimi i emrave nëpërmjet Agglutinating Bantu Languages', 'bn': 'ব্যাঙ্টু ভাষাগুলোর বিভিন্ন অ্যাগ্লুটিউটিং ব্যাঙ্গুটিং ভাষায় নোনাস প্লাগার করছে', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'የባንቱን ቋንቋዎች በመጠቀም ላይ Nouns በመጠቀም ላይ', 'az': 'Bantu dill…ôrinin Agglutinating Dill…ôrinin arasƒ±nda', 'bs': 'Pluralizirajući imene preko Agglutinacije Bantu jezika', 'ca': 'Pluralitzar nom a través de llengües de prohibició agglutinant', 'cs': 'Pluralizující podstatná jména napříč agritujícími jazyky Bantu', 'et': 'Substantiivide mitmekesistamine bantu keeltes', 'fi': 'Monipuoliset substantiivit agglutinoivassa bantu-kielessä', 'jv': 'Ngubah Perusahaan Nang-Perusahaan kanggo Ketokipun Bantu', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Pluraliziranje samostalnikov v agrutirajočih bantujskih jezikih', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྣམ་པ་ལ་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་པའི་Bantu སྐད་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Text generation may require the pluralization of nouns, such as in context-sensitive user interfaces and in natural language generation more broadly. While this has been solved for the widely-used languages, this is still a challenge for the languages in the Bantu language family. Pluralization results obtained for isiZulu and Runyankore showed there were similarities in approach, including the need to combine syntax with semantics, despite belonging to different language zones. This suggests that bootstrapping and generalizability might be feasible. We investigated this systematically for seven languages across three different Guthrie language zones. The first outcome is that Meinhof’s 1948 specification of the noun classes are indeed inadequate for computational purposes for all examined languages, due to non-determinism in prefixes, and we thus redefined the characteristic noun class tables of 29 noun classes into 53. The second main result is that the generic pluralizer achieved over 93 % accuracy in coverage testing and over 94 % on a random sample. This is comparable to the language-specific isiZulu and Runyankore pluralizers.', 'ar': 'قد يتطلب إنشاء النص تعدد الأسماء ، كما هو الحال في واجهات المستخدم الحساسة للسياق وفي توليد اللغة الطبيعية على نطاق أوسع. في حين تم حل هذا الأمر بالنسبة للغات المستخدمة على نطاق واسع ، إلا أن هذا لا يزال يمثل تحديًا للغات في عائلة لغة البانتو. أظهرت نتائج التعددية التي تم الحصول عليها لكل من isiZulu و Runyankore وجود أوجه تشابه في النهج ، بما في ذلك الحاجة إلى الجمع بين النحو مع الدلالات ، على الرغم من الانتماء إلى مناطق لغوية مختلفة. يشير هذا إلى أن التمهيد والتعميم قد يكونان ممكنين. لقد بحثنا في هذا بشكل منهجي لسبع لغات عبر ثلاث مناطق لغوثري مختلفة. النتيجة الأولى هي أن مواصفات Meinhof لعام 1948 لفئات الأسماء غير كافية بالفعل للأغراض الحسابية لجميع اللغات التي تم فحصها ، بسبب عدم الحتمية في البادئات ، وبالتالي قمنا بإعادة تعريف جداول فئة الأسماء المميزة المكونة من 29 فئة اسم إلى 53. العنصر الرئيسي الثاني والنتيجة هي أن أداة الجمع العامة حققت دقة تزيد عن 93٪ في اختبار التغطية وأكثر من 94٪ في عينة عشوائية. هذا مشابه للغة محددة isiZulu و Runyankore pluralizers.', 'pt': 'A geração de texto pode exigir a pluralização de substantivos, como em interfaces de usuário sensíveis ao contexto e na geração de linguagem natural de forma mais ampla. Embora isso tenha sido resolvido para as línguas amplamente utilizadas, ainda é um desafio para as línguas da família das línguas bantu. Os resultados de pluralização obtidos para isiZulu e Runyankore mostraram semelhanças na abordagem, incluindo a necessidade de combinar sintaxe com semântica, apesar de pertencerem a diferentes zonas linguísticas. Isso sugere que o bootstrap e a generalização podem ser viáveis. Investigamos isso sistematicamente para sete idiomas em três zonas diferentes de idiomas Guthrie. O primeiro resultado é que a especificação de 1948 das classes de substantivos de Meinhof é de fato inadequada para fins computacionais para todas as línguas examinadas, devido ao não determinismo em prefixos, e assim redefinimos as tabelas de classes de substantivos características de 29 classes de substantivos em 53. O resultado é que o pluralizador genérico alcançou mais de 93% de precisão nos testes de cobertura e mais de 94% em uma amostra aleatória. Isso é comparável aos pluralizadores isiZulu e Runyankore específicos do idioma.', 'fr': "La génération de texte peut nécessiter la pluralisation des noms, par exemple dans les interfaces utilisateur contextuelles et dans la génération du langage naturel de manière plus générale. Bien que ce problème ait été résolu pour les langues les plus répandues, il s'agit toujours d'un défi pour les langues de la famille des langues bantoues. Les résultats de pluralisation obtenus pour IsiZulu et Runyankore ont montré qu'il existait des similitudes dans l'approche, notamment la nécessité de combiner la syntaxe et la sémantique, malgré l'appartenance à des zones linguistiques différentes. Cela suggère que le bootstrapping et la généralisabilité peuvent être réalisables. Nous avons étudié cela de manière systématique pour sept langues dans trois zones linguistiques différentes de Guthrie. Le premier résultat est que la spécification des classes nominales par Meinhof en 1948 est en effet inadéquate à des fins informatiques pour toutes les langues examinées, en raison du non-déterminisme des préfixes, et nous avons donc redéfini les tables de classes nominales caractéristiques de 29 classes de noms en 53. Le deuxième résultat principal est que le pluraliseur générique a atteint une précision de plus de 93\xa0% dans les tests de couverture et plus de 94\xa0% sur un échantillon aléatoire. Cela est comparable aux pluraliseurs propres à la langue isiZulu et Runyankore.", 'es': 'La generación de texto puede requerir la pluralización de sustantivos, como en las interfaces de usuario sensibles al contexto y en la generación de lenguaje natural en general. Si bien esto se ha resuelto para los idiomas más utilizados, sigue siendo un desafío para los idiomas de la familia lingüística bantú. Los resultados de pluralización obtenidos para iSizulu y Runyankore mostraron que había similitudes en el enfoque, incluida la necesidad de combinar la sintaxis con la semántica, a pesar de pertenecer a diferentes zonas lingüísticas. Esto sugiere que el arranque y la generalización podrían ser factibles. Investigamos esto sistemáticamente para siete idiomas en tres zonas lingüísticas diferentes de Guthrie. El primer resultado es que la especificación de Meinhof de 1948 de las clases de sustantivos es, de hecho, inadecuada para fines computacionales para todos los idiomas examinados, debido al no determinismo en los prefijos, y por lo tanto redefinimos las tablas de clases de sustantivos características de 29 clases de sustantivos en 53. El segundo resultado principal es que el pluralizador genérico logró más del 93% de precisión en las pruebas de cobertura y más del 94% en una muestra aleatoria. Esto es comparable a los pluralizadores iSizulu y Runyankore específicos del idioma.', 'ja': 'テキスト生成は、文脈に応じたユーザインタフェースにおいて、及びより広くは自然言語生成において、名詞の複数化を必要とし得る。 これは広く使われている言語では解決されていますが、バントゥー語族の言語では依然として課題です。 IsiZuluとRunyankoreで得られた複数化結果は、異なる言語ゾーンに属しているにもかかわらず、構文と意味論を組み合わせる必要性を含め、アプローチに類似点があることを示した。 これは、ブートストラップと一般化可能性が実現可能である可能性を示唆しています。 これを3つの異なるガスリー言語圏にまたがる7つの言語について体系的に調査した。 最初の成果は、Meinhofの1948年の名詞クラスの明記が、接頭辞の非決定性のために、すべての検討された言語の計算目的に不十分であることであり、したがって、29の名詞クラスの特徴的な名詞クラステーブルを53に再定義した。 2番目の主な結果は、ジェネリック多重化装置がカバレッジテストで93 ％以上の精度を達成し、ランダムサンプルで94 ％以上の精度を達成したことです。 これは、言語固有のisiZuluとRunyankoreの複数化子に匹敵します。', 'zh': '文本生名复数化,如在上下文关用户界面自然语言中。 虽于博用之言已解,而于班图语系中之言,犹一挑战也。 为isiZulu、Runyankore所得复数化结果表明,虽异言域,其法相似,须将语法与语义合。 明导泛化可也。 吾系统地究三异格思里语区七语。 初则前缀之非确定性,Meinhof 1948年之规范,固不足以尽检言之数,故将29名词之类类表更定义为53。 二要者,通用复数器于覆盖率试中得过93%之准确率,随机样本上得过94%之准确率。 此与特定言isiZulu、Runyankore复数器等也。', 'ru': 'Генерация текста может потребовать плюрализации существительных, например, в контекстно-зависимых пользовательских интерфейсах и в более широком смысле генерации на естественном языке. Хотя это было решено для широко используемых языков, это по-прежнему является проблемой для языков в семье языков банту. Результаты плюрализации, полученные для isiZulu и Runyankore, показали наличие сходств в подходе, включая необходимость сочетания синтаксиса с семантикой, несмотря на принадлежность к разным языковым зонам. Это говорит о том, что загрузка и обобщение могут быть осуществимы. Мы систематически исследовали это для семи языков в трех различных языковых зонах Гатри. Первый результат заключается в том, что спецификация классов существительных Майнхофа 1948 года действительно неадекватна для вычислительных целей для всех исследуемых языков, из-за недетерминизма в префиксах, и мы, таким образом, переопределили характерные таблицы классов существительных 29 классов существительных на 53. Второй основной результат заключается в том, что общий плюрализатор достиг более 93% точности в тестировании покрытия и более 94% в случайной выборке. Это сопоставимо с языковыми плюрализаторами isiZulu и Runyankore.', 'hi': 'पाठ पीढ़ी को संज्ञाओं के बहुवचन की आवश्यकता हो सकती है, जैसे कि संदर्भ-संवेदनशील उपयोगकर्ता इंटरफेस में और प्राकृतिक भाषा पीढ़ी में अधिक व्यापक रूप से। हालांकि यह व्यापक रूप से उपयोग की जाने वाली भाषाओं के लिए हल किया गया है, यह अभी भी बंटू भाषा परिवार में भाषाओं के लिए एक चुनौती है। IsiZulu और Runyankore के लिए प्राप्त बहुवचनीकरण परिणामों से पता चला है कि दृष्टिकोण में समानताएं थीं, जिसमें विभिन्न भाषा क्षेत्रों से संबंधित होने के बावजूद, शब्दार्थ के साथ वाक्यविन्यास को संयोजित करने की आवश्यकता शामिल थी। इससे पता चलता है कि बूटस्ट्रैपिंग और सामान्यता संभव हो सकती है। हमने तीन अलग-अलग गुथरी भाषा क्षेत्रों में सात भाषाओं के लिए व्यवस्थित रूप से इसकी जांच की। पहला परिणाम यह है कि मेइनहोफ के संज्ञा वर्गों के 1948 के विनिर्देश वास्तव में सभी जांच की गई भाषाओं के लिए कम्प्यूटेशनल उद्देश्यों के लिए अपर्याप्त हैं, उपसर्गों में गैर-नियतिवाद के कारण, और इस प्रकार हमने 29 संज्ञा वर्गों की विशेषता संज्ञा वर्ग तालिकाओं को 53 में फिर से परिभाषित किया। दूसरा मुख्य परिणाम यह है कि जेनेरिक बहुलवादी ने कवरेज परीक्षण में 93% से अधिक सटीकता हासिल की और एक यादृच्छिक नमूने पर 94% से अधिक। यह भाषा-विशिष्ट isiZulu और Runyankore pluralizers के लिए तुलनीय है।', 'ga': 'D’fhéadfadh go n-éileoidh giniúint téacs iolrachas na n-ainmfhocal, mar shampla i gcomhéadain úsáideora atá íogair ó thaobh an chomhthéacs agus i nginiúint teanga nádúrtha ar bhonn níos leithne. Cé go bhfuil sé seo réitithe do na teangacha a úsáidtear go forleathan, is dúshlán é seo fós do na teangacha sa teaghlach Bantúis. Léirigh torthaí iolraithe a fuarthas do isiZulu agus Runyankore go raibh cosúlachtaí sa chur chuige, lena n-áirítear an gá atá le comhréir a chomhcheangal le séimeantaic, in ainneoin go mbaineann siad le criosanna teanga éagsúla. Tugann sé seo le tuiscint go bhféadfadh go mbeadh bootstrapping agus ginearálú indéanta. Rinneamar é seo a imscrúdú go córasach do sheacht dteanga thar thrí chrios teanga Guthrie. Is é an chéad toradh ná go bhfuil sonraíocht Meinhof i 1948 ar na haicmí ainmfhocail neamhleor chun críocha ríomha do na teangacha uile a scrúdaíodh, mar gheall ar neamhchinntitheacht sna réimíreanna, agus mar sin rinneamar táblaí sainaicme ainmfhocail 29 aicme ainmfhocail a athshainiú ina 53. is é an toradh atá air ná gur bhain an t-iolraitheoir cineálach breis agus 93% cruinn amach i dtástáil clúdaigh agus breis is 94% ar shampla randamach. Tá sé seo inchomparáide leis na hiolraitheoirí isiZulu agus Runyankore a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის შესაძლებელია, როგორც კონტექსტიური მომხმარებელი ინტერფექციებში და ნახვა ენერგიის შესაძლებელად უფრო დიდ განვითარება. მაგრამ ეს უფრო გამოყენებული ენებისთვის გადაწყენება, ეს უფრო უფრო გამოყენებული ენებისთვის გამოსახულება ბანტუ ენის ოჯახში. პლუტრალიზაციის შედეგები, რომლებიც იზულუ და პუნიანკორი გამოიყენებული, გამოიყენება, რომ კონფიგურაციის განსხვავება იყო, რომლებიც სინტაქსის სიმპენტიკის შემდეგება, მაგრამ ეს იტყვებს, რომ საშუალებო და გენერალური შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებელია. ჩვენ ამ სისტემატიკურად 7 ენების შესახებ სამი განსხვავებული Guthrie ენების ჱონებში. პირველი შედეგი არის, რომ მეინჰოფს 1948 წლის კლასის სპექტიფიკაცია, რომელიც კომპუტიკაციური მიზეზებისთვის, ყველა შემოწმებული ენებისთვის, არ განსაზღვრული პრეფიქსისთვის, და ამიტომ ჩვენ განსაზღვრული 29 წლის კლასის კლასის კლასის კ მეორე მნიშვნელოვანი წარმოდგენა, რომ გენერიკური პულილიზერი 93% დამატებული წარმოდგენა შესახებ ტესტის წარმოდგენა და 94% დამატებული გამოყენებაში. ეს არის სპერიფიკური ენის სპეციფიკური isiZulu და Runyankore pluralizers.', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία κειμένου μπορεί να απαιτεί τον πλουραλισμό των ουσιαστικών, όπως σε ευαίσθητες στο περιβάλλον διεπαφές χρήστη και στη δημιουργία φυσικής γλώσσας ευρύτερα. Αν και αυτό έχει επιλυθεί για τις ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενες γλώσσες, αυτό εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί πρόκληση για τις γλώσσες της οικογένειας των Μπαντού. Τα αποτελέσματα πλουραλισμού που ελήφθησαν για το isiZulu και το Runyankore έδειξαν ότι υπήρχαν ομοιότητες στην προσέγγιση, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της ανάγκης συνδυασμού σύνταξης με σημασιολογία, παρά το γεγονός ότι ανήκουν σε διαφορετικές γλωσσικές ζώνες. Αυτό υποδηλώνει ότι το bootstrapping και η γενικότητα μπορεί να είναι εφικτή. Το ερευνήσαμε συστηματικά για επτά γλώσσες σε τρεις διαφορετικές γλωσσικές ζώνες Γκουθρί. Το πρώτο αποτέλεσμα είναι ότι η προδιαγραφή των τάξεων ουσιαστικών του Μάινχοφ είναι πράγματι ανεπαρκής για υπολογιστικούς σκοπούς για όλες τις εξεταζόμενες γλώσσες, λόγω του μη ντετερμινισμού στα πρόθεματα, και έτσι επαναπροσδιορίσαμε τους χαρακτηριστικούς πίνακες τάξεων ουσιαστικών των 29 τάξεων ουσιαστικών σε 53. Το δεύτερο κύριο αποτέλεσμα είναι ότι ο γενικός πολλαπλασιαστής πέτυχε πάνω από 93% ακρίβεια στη δοκιμή κάλυψης και πάνω από 94% σε ένα τυχαίο δείγμα. Αυτό είναι συγκρίσιμο με τους γλωσσικούς πλουραλιστές isiZulu και Runyankore.', 'hu': 'A szövegkészítés szükségessé teheti a főnevek sokoldalúságát, például a kontextusérzékeny felhasználói felületekben és a természetes nyelv generálásában. Bár ez megoldásra került a széles körben használt nyelvek esetében, ez még mindig kihívást jelent a Bantu nyelvcsalád nyelveinek. Az isiZulu és Runyankore esetében kapott Pluralizációs eredmények azt mutatták, hogy hasonlóak voltak a megközelítésben, beleértve a szintaxis és a szemantika kombinálásának szükségességét, annak ellenére, hogy különböző nyelvzónákhoz tartoznak. Ez azt sugallja, hogy a bootstraping és az általánosíthatóság megvalósítható lehet. Ezt hét nyelven vizsgáltuk szisztematikusan, három különböző Guthrie nyelvzónában. Az első eredmény az, hogy Meinhof 1948-as specifikációja a főnévosztályokról valóban nem megfelelő a számítástechnikai célokra minden vizsgált nyelv esetében, az előtagok nem determinizmusa miatt, így 29 főnévosztály jellemző főnévosztálytábláit 53-ra definiáltuk. A második fő eredmény az, hogy a generikus pluralizátor több mint 93%-os pontosságot ért el a lefedettségi vizsgálatokban, és több mint 94%-ot egy véletlenszerű mintán. Ez összehasonlítható a nyelvspecifikus isiZulu és Runyankore pluralizálókkal.', 'it': "La generazione di testo può richiedere la pluralizzazione dei sostantivi, ad esempio nelle interfacce utente sensibili al contesto e nella generazione del linguaggio naturale più in generale. Anche se questo è stato risolto per le lingue più diffuse, questa è ancora una sfida per le lingue della famiglia Bantu. I risultati di Pluralizzazione ottenuti per isiZulu e Runyankore hanno mostrato che ci sono somiglianze nell'approccio, inclusa la necessità di combinare sintassi con semantica, nonostante appartenessero a diverse zone linguistiche. Ciò suggerisce che il bootstrapping e la generalizzabilità potrebbero essere fattibili. Abbiamo indagato questo sistematicamente per sette lingue in tre diverse zone linguistiche di Guthrie. Il primo risultato è che le specifiche di Meinhof del 1948 delle classi di sostantivi sono infatti inadeguate per scopi computazionali per tutti i linguaggi esaminati, a causa del non determinismo nei prefissi, e così abbiamo ridefinito le tabelle caratteristiche di classe di sostantivi di 29 classi di sostantivi in 53. Il secondo risultato principale è che il pluralizzatore generico ha raggiunto oltre il 93% di accuratezza nei test di copertura e oltre il 94% su un campione casuale. Questo è paragonabile ai pluralizzatori isiZulu e Runyankore specifici per la lingua.", 'lt': 'Tekstų kūrimui gali prireikti įvairių pavadinimų, pavyzdžiui, į kontekstą jautrių naudotojų sąsajų ir platesnės gamtos kalbų kūrimo. Nors tai buvo išspręsta plačiai naudojamomis kalbomis, tai vis dar yra uždavinys kalboms Bantu kalbų šeimoje. Iš isiZulu ir Runyankore gautų pliuralizacijos rezultatų matyti, kad metodas yra panašus, įskaitant poreikį derinti sintaksą su semantika, nepaisant priklausymo skirtingoms kalbų zonoms. Tai rodo, kad gali būti įmanoma įjungti ir išplėsti. Mes sistemingai išnagrinėjome tai septyniomis kalbomis trijose skirtingose Gutrijos kalbų zonose. Pirmasis rezultatas yra tas, kad 1948 m. Meinhofo specifikacija vardų klasėms yra iš tiesų nepakankama skaičiavimo tikslais visoms išnagrinėtoms kalboms, dėl nenustatyvumo prefiksuose, todėl iš naujo apibrėžėme 29 vardų klasių vardų klasės lenteles į 53. Antras pagrindinis rezultatas yra tas, kad bendrasis pliuralizatorius pasiekė daugiau kaip 93 % tikslumo atliekant aprėpties bandymus ir daugiau kaip 94 % atliekant atsitiktinį mėginį. Tai panašu į kalbos specifinius isiZulu ir Runyankore pluralizatorius.', 'ms': 'Penjanaan teks mungkin memerlukan pemutaran nama, seperti dalam antaramuka pengguna sensitif-konteks dan dalam generasi bahasa alami secara luas. Sementara ini telah diselesaikan untuk bahasa yang digunakan secara luas, ini masih tantangan untuk bahasa dalam keluarga bahasa Bantu. Hasil pluralisasi yang diperoleh untuk isiZulu dan Runyankore menunjukkan terdapat persamaan dalam pendekatan, termasuk keperluan untuk menggabungkan sintaks dengan semantik, walaupun milik zon bahasa yang berbeza. Ini menunjukkan bahawa pengikatan bot dan keseluruhan mungkin boleh dilakukan. Kami menyelidiki ini secara sistematik untuk tujuh bahasa melalui tiga zon bahasa Guthrie yang berbeza. Hasil pertama ialah bahawa spesifikasi 1948 Meinhof kelas nama sebenarnya tidak cukup untuk tujuan pengiraan untuk semua bahasa yang diperiksa, disebabkan bukan-determinasi dalam prefiks, dan kami mendefinisikan semula jadual karakteristik kelas nama nama 29 kelas nama ke 53. Hasil utama kedua ialah bahawa pemutar generik mencapai lebih dari 93% ketepatan dalam ujian penyamaran dan lebih dari 94% pada sampel rawak. Ini boleh dibandingkan dengan pemutar isiZulu dan Runyankore yang spesifik bahasa.', 'mk': 'Генерацијата на текст може да бара плурализација на именици, како што е во контекстно чувствителните кориснички интерфејси и во природната генерација на јазици пошироко. Иако ова е решено за широко употребените јазици, ова сé уште претставува предизвик за јазиците во семејството на јазикот Банту. Резултатите од плурализацијата добиени за isiZulu и Runyankore покажаа дека постојат сличности во пристапот, вклучувајќи ја и потребата да се комбинира синтаксата со семантиката, и покрај тоа што припаѓаат на различни јазички зони. Ова укажува на тоа дека шифрирањето и генерализацијата може да бидат остварливи. We investigated this systematically for seven languages across three different Guthrie language zones.  Првиот резултат е дека спецификацијата на Меинхоф во 1948 година на класите за имени се навистина несоодветни за обчистувачки цели за сите испитани јазици, поради недеterminatизмот во префиксите, и така ги предефиниравме карактеристичките таблички на класите за имени од 29 класи за имени во 53. Вториот главен резултат е дека генералниот плурализатор постигнал прецизност од 93 отсто во тестовите за покривање и повеќе од 94 отсто на случајно примерок. Ова е споредливо со плурализаторите за изулу и Рунианкоре, специфични за јазикот.', 'kk': 'Мәтінді құру мүмкін атаулардың плюрализациясы, мысалы, контексті сезімді пайдаланушылардың интерфейстерінде және табиғи тілдерінде көбірек жасау керек. Бұл жалпы қолданылатын тілдер үшін шешілді, бұл әлі Банту тілдер отбасындағы тілдер үшін мәселесі. isiZulu және Runyankore үшін алған плюрализациялау нәтижелері бірнеше тіл аумағындағы синтаксисті біріктіру қажеттігін көрсетті. Бұл жүктеу және жалпы мүмкін болуы мүмкін. Біз бұл жүйелік тілдерді үш түрлі Гутрия тіл аумағындағы жеті тілдерге зерттедік. Бірінші нәтижесі: Меинхофтың 1948 жылы атау класының белгісі барлық тілдерге тексерілген тілдер үшін есептеу мақсаттарына жеткілікті емес. Сонда біз 29 атау класының белгілікті класының кестелерін 53 деп қайта анықтадық. Екінші негізгі нәтижесі: жалпы плюрализатор мәтінді сынақтағы 93% ден артық және 94% ден артық нәтижесін кездейсоқ нәтижесінде жеткізді. Бұл тілдерге салыстырылатын isiZulu және Runyankore плюрализаторларымен салыстырылады.', 'ml': 'Text generation may require the pluralization of nouns, such as in context-sensitive user interfaces and in natural language generation more broadly.  ഇത് വിശാലമായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കായി തീരുമാനിച്ചിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d ബാന്തുവിന്റെ ഭാഷ കുടുംബത്തില യിസുലുവിനും റുനാക്കോരിനും വേറെ ഭാഷയുടെ സംഘത്തോടൊപ്പം സിനാക്സിനെ കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ട് സങ്കല്\u200dപ്പിക്കേണ്ടി വരുന്ന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച് ഇത് ബൂട്ട് സ്ട്രാപ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നതും സാധാരണ സാധ്യതയുമായിരിക്കും. മൂന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷ സ്ഥലങ്ങളില്\u200d ഏഴു ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സിസ്റ്റമികമായി അന്വേഷിച്ചു. ആദ്യത്തെ ഫലം എന്തെന്നാല്\u200d മെയിന്\u200dഫിന്\u200dറെ 1948 ക്ലാസിന്\u200dറെ പ്രത്യേക വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നത് ശരിക്കും പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെട്ട എല്ലാ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും കണക്കെടുക്കുന്നതിന് മതിയാകുന്നില രണ്ടാമത്തെ പ്രധാന ഫലമെന്തെന്നാല്\u200d 93% കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണ പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ പരിശോധനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും 94% കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധാരണ പ ഇത് ഭാഷ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ഇസുലുവിനോടും റൂണാക്കോരിന്\u200dറെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടവരോടും തുല്യമാണ്.', 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni tat-test tista’ teħtieġ il-pluralizzazzjoni tal-ismijiet, bħal f’interfaces tal-utenti sensittivi għall-kuntest u fil-ġenerazzjoni tal-lingwi naturali b’mod aktar wiesa’. Filwaqt li dan ġie solvut għall-lingwi użati ħafna, din għadha sfida għall-lingwi fil-familja tal-lingwi Bantu. Ir-riżultati tal-pluralizzazzjoni miksuba għal isiZulu u Runyankore wrew li kien hemm similaritajiet fl-approċċ, inkluż il-ħtieġa li s-sintaks jiġi kkombinat mas-semantika, minkejja li jappartjenu għal żoni lingwistiċi differenti. Dan jissuġġerixxi li l-bootstrapping u l-ġeneralizzazzjoni jistgħu jkunu fattibbli. Investigajna dan sistematikament għal seba’ lingwi fi tliet żoni differenti tal-lingwa Guthrie. L-ewwel riżultat huwa li l-ispeċifikazzjoni tal-1948 ta’ Meinhof tal-klassijiet ta’ nomi hija tabilħaqq inadegwata għal skopijiet komputattivi għall-lingwi kollha eżaminati, minħabba n-nondeterminazzjoni fil-prefixes, u għalhekk iddefinijna mill-ġdid it-tabelli karatteristiċi tal-klassijiet ta’ nomi ta’ 29 klassi ta’ nomi f’53. It-tieni riżultat ewlieni huwa li l-pluralizzatur ġeneriku kiseb aktar minn 93 % preċiżjoni fl-ittestjar tal-kopertura u aktar minn 94 % fuq kampjun aleatorju. Dan huwa komparabbli mal-pluralizzaturi isiZulu u Runyankore speċifiċi għall-lingwa.', 'mn': 'Текст бүтээлч нь нэр тоонуудыг ихэвчлэх хэрэглэгчийн интерфейс болон байгалийн хэл бүтээлд илүү шинэ хэлбэрээр шаардлагатай байж болно. Энэ нь шийдвэрлэгдсэн хэл дээр шийдвэрлэгдсэн ч энэ нь Банту хэл гэр бүлийн хэл дээр хэлэхдээ зорилго юм. isiZulu болон Runyankore-д авсан олон хэмжээний үр дүн нь ойлголтын тулд ижил төстэй байдгийг харуулсан. Үүнээс илүү олон хэл хэлний хэсэгтэй холбоотой ч синтаксик холбоотой хэрэгтэй. Энэ нь эхлэх болон ерөнхийлөгч чадвар боломжтой байж болно гэсэн үг. Бид үүнийг систематикийн хувьд гуthrie хэл хэлний хэсэгт 7 хэлний хувьд судалсан. Эхний үр дүнг нь Меинховын 1948 оны нэр хичээлийн тодорхойлолт нь бүх шалгалтын зорилгоор тооцоолж чадахгүй байна. Тэгээд бид 29 нэр хичээлийн нэр хичээлийн ширээ 53 руу дахин тооцоолж байна. Хоёр дахь гол үр дүн нь ерөнхий олон хүмүүс дарааллын шалгалтын тулд 93%-аас илүү тодорхой байдал, эсрэг санамсаргүй жишээнд 94%-аас илүү тодорхой байв. Энэ нь зюлу болон Рунянкорын олон хүмүүстэй харьцуулагддаг.', 'no': 'Tekstgenerering kan kreve pluralisering av namn, som i kontekstsensitiv brukargrensesnitt og i naturspråk meir breidde. Mens dette er løyst for dei breidde brukte språka, er dette framleis eit utfordring for språka i Bantu-språkfamilien. Pluraliseringsverdiane oppteken for isiZulu og Runyankore viste at det var liknande i tilnærminga, inkludert nødvendighet for å kombinere syntaks med semantikk, selv om tilhøyrer ulike språkssonar. Dette tyder på at oppstartslingsog generelliserbarhet kan vera feilig. Vi undersøkte dette systematisk for sju språk på tre ulike Guthrie språkssonar. Den første utgåva er at Meinhof s in 1948-spesifikasjon av namnlassene er faktisk ikkje tilgjengeleg for databasemål for alle undersøkte språk, på grunn av ikkje-determinisjon i prefiksar, og vi derfor gjenopprette dei karakteristiske namnlassetabellene i 29 namnlasser til 53. Den andre hovudresultatet er at den generiske pluraliseren oppnådd over 93% nøyaktighet i dekketesten og over 94% på eit tilfeldig prøve. Dette er sammenlignbar med språksspesifiserte isiZulu og Runyankore pluraliserer.', 'sr': 'Generacija teksta može zahtevati pluralizaciju imena, kao što su u kontekstskom osjetljivom interfejsu korisnika i u prirodnoj generaciji jezika šire. Iako je ovo rešeno za široko korišćene jezike, ovo je i dalje izazov jezika u porodici Bantu jezika. Rezultati pluralizacije koji su dobili za isiZulu i Runyankore pokazali su da postoje sličnosti u pristupu, uključujući potrebu kombinacije sintaksa sa semantikom, uprkos pripadanju različitim jezičkim zonama. To predlaže da bi se šipke i generalizacija mogle biti moguće. Istražili smo to sistematski za sedam jezika u tri različite jezičke zone Guthrie. Prvi ishod je da je Meinhov spesifikacija klasa imena 1948. godine zaista nedovoljan za računalne svrhe za sve pregledane jezike zbog neodređenog predsjednika, i tako smo predefinisali karakteristične tablice imena klase 29 klase imena u 53. Drugi glavni rezultat je da je generički pluralizator postigao preko 93% tačnosti u testiranju pokrivanja i preko 94% na nasumičnom uzorku. Ovo je usporedno sa jezikom specifičnim isiZulu i Runyankore pluralizerima.', 'pl': 'Generowanie tekstu może wymagać pluralizacji rzeczowników, takich jak w kontekstowych interfejsach użytkownika i w generowaniu języków naturalnych szerzej. Chociaż zostało to rozwiązane w przypadku szeroko stosowanych języków, nadal stanowi to wyzwanie dla języków z rodziny języków Bantu. Wyniki pluralizacji uzyskane dla isiZulu i Runyankore wykazały podobieństwa w podejściu, w tym konieczność łączenia składni z semantyką, pomimo przynależności do różnych stref językowych. Sugeruje to, że bootstrapping i uogólnienie mogą być wykonalne. Badaliśmy to systematycznie dla siedmiu języków w trzech różnych strefach językowych Guthrie. Pierwszym wynikiem jest fakt, że Meinhofowska specyfikacja klas rzeczownika jest rzeczywiście niewystarczająca do celów obliczeniowych dla wszystkich badanych języków, ze względu na niedeterminizm w prefiksach, dlatego przekształciliśmy charakterystyczne tabele klas rzeczowników 29 klas rzeczownika na 53. Drugim głównym wynikiem jest to, że generyczny pluralizator osiągnął dokładność ponad 93% w testach zasięgu i ponad 94% na próbce losowej. Jest to porównywalne do specyficznych językowych pluralizatorów isiZulu i Runyankore.', 'ro': 'Generarea de text poate necesita pluralizarea substantivelor, cum ar fi în interfețele de utilizare sensibile la context și în generarea limbajului natural mai larg. Deși acest lucru a fost rezolvat pentru limbile utilizate pe scară largă, aceasta este încă o provocare pentru limbile din familia lingvistică Bantu. Rezultatele de Pluralizare obținute pentru isiZulu și Runyankore au arătat că există similarități în abordare, inclusiv necesitatea de a combina sintaxa cu semantica, în ciuda apartenenței la diferite zone lingvistice. Acest lucru sugerează că bootstraping și generalizarea ar putea fi fezabile. Am investigat acest lucru sistematic pentru șapte limbi în trei zone diferite ale limbii Guthrie. Primul rezultat este că specificația lui Meinhof din 1948 a claselor substantive este într-adevăr inadecvată pentru scopuri computaționale pentru toate limbile examinate, datorită non-determinismului în prefixe, și astfel am redefinit tabelele caracteristice claselor substantive din 29 clase substantive în 53. Al doilea rezultat principal este că pluralizatorul generic a obținut o precizie de peste 93% în testarea acoperirii și peste 94% pe un eșantion aleatoriu. Acest lucru este comparabil cu pluralizatorii isiZulu și Runyankore specifice limbii.', 'si': 'පාළ ප්\u200dරභාව ප්\u200dරභාවිතය අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන්, සම්බන්ධ- සංවේදනය ප්\u200dරභාවිතය සහ ස්වභාවිත භාෂා මේක බැන්ටු භාෂාව පවුලේ භාෂාව සඳහා විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා නමුත් මේක තවමත් බැන්ටු භාෂාව පවුලේ භ ඉස්සුලු සහ රුන්යාන්කෝරි වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට සම්බන්ධතාවක් ති මේක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා බූට්ස්ට්\u200dරැප් එක්ක සමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්න පුළුවන්. අපි මේක පද්ධතියෙන් පරීක්ෂා කරලා තියෙන වෙනස් ගුත්\u200dරි භාෂාව තුනක් වලින් භාෂාව හතක් වල මුලින් ප්\u200dරතිදේශය තමයි මෙයින්හෝ ගේ 1948 විශේෂ විශේෂණය නිසා පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ සියළු භාෂාවට පරික්ෂා කරලා තියෙන්නේ නැහැ නිර්දේශ කරලා තියෙ දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප මේක භාෂා විශේෂයෙන් ඉස්සුලූ සහ රුන්යාන්කෝර් විශේෂකයෙන් සම්බන්ධයි.', 'so': "Qarniga qoraalka waxaa laga yaabaa in la baahan karo in la soo ururiyo cuntada, tusaale ahaan wejiyada isticmaalaha xilsaarka ah iyo qarniga afka dabiicadda ah. Inta lagu xalliyey luqadaha lagu isticmaalayo oo dhan, taasi weli waa dhibaato luqadaha ku qoran qoyska luqada Bantu. Iszulu iyo Runyankore waxaa tusay arimaha la soo ururiyo, kuwaas oo ku jira mid isku mid ah, kuwaas oo ku jira baahida in lagu soo ururiyo cashuurta isbitaalka, inkastoo ay leeyihiin goobaha luuqadaha kala duduwan. Tan waxaa looga jeedaa in ay suurtogal noqon karto in boosaska iyo aasaasiga ah. Waxaan si rasmi ah u baaraynay todobo luuqadood oo kala duduwan saddex dhinac oo afka Guthrii. Midhaha ugu horeeya waa in dhaqanka kooxaha cuntada ee Meinhin ay ku filan yihiin sabab xisaab ah oo ay dhammaan luuqadaha la tijaabiyey, sababtoo ah mid aan go'aaneyn hore, sidaas darteed waxaynu u u qornay miisaska kooxaha cuntada ee 29 fasalka nooca ah ee 53. Midhaha labaad ee ugu horeeya waa in jarrabka qaranka lagu kordhiyey 93% oo sax ah iyo in ka badan 94% sameynta fudud. Tanu waxay u eg tahay kuwa luuqada ku qoran isiZulu iyo runyankore.", 'sv': 'Textgenerering kan kräva pluralisering av substantiv, till exempel i kontextkänsliga användargränssnitt och i generering av naturligt språk mer brett. Även om detta har lösts för de mycket använda språken är detta fortfarande en utmaning för språken i Bantu språkfamiljen. Pluraliseringsresultat som erhållits för isiZulu och Runyankore visade att det fanns likheter i tillvägagångssätt, inklusive behovet av att kombinera syntax med semantik, trots att tillhöra olika språkzoner. Detta tyder på att bootstrapping och generalisering kan vara genomförbar. Vi undersökte detta systematiskt för sju språk i tre olika Guthrie språkzoner. Det första resultatet är att Meinhofs 1948 specifikation av substantiv klasser verkligen är otillräcklig för beräkningsändamål för alla undersökta språk, på grund av icke-determinism i prefix, och vi omdefinierade därmed de karakteristiska substantiv klasstabellerna för 29 substantiv klasser till 53. Det andra huvudresultatet är att den generiska pluralizern uppnådde över 93% noggrannhet i täckningstestning och över 94% på ett slumpmässigt urval. Detta är jämförbart med de språkspecifika isiZulu- och Runyankorepluraliserarna.', 'ur': "پیغام کی نسل نیموں کی تعداد کی ضرورت ہو سکتی ہے، جیسے کنٹنسیٹ-حساس کارساز интرفس میں اور طبیعی زبان کی نسل زیادہ وسیع سے۔ حالانکہ یہ بہت وسیع استعمال کی زبانوں کے لئے حل کیا گیا ہے، یہ ابھی بھی Bantu زبان خاندان کی زبانوں کے لئے ایک چال ہے۔ اسزلوی اور رونینکوری کے لئے ملے ہوئے پلورلیزا نتیجے دکھائے گئے کہ ان کے نزدیک طریقے میں برابری ہوئی تھیں، شامل ہوتے ہیں کہ سنٹکس سیمانٹیکس کے ساتھ ملنے کی ضرورت ہے، بغیر اس کے کہ مختلف زبان منطقه میں ہے. یہ بتاتا ہے کہ بوٹ سٹرنگ اور عمومی قابلیت ممکن ہو سکتی ہے۔ ہم نے اس سیستماتیک طور پر سات زبان کی تحقیق کی تین مختلف گوتری زبان Zonوں میں۔ پہلی نتیجہ یہ ہے کہ Meinhof's 1948 noun classes specification is actually inadequate for computational purposes for all examined languages, due to non-determinism in prefixes, and thus we redefined the characteristic noun class tables of 29 noun classes into 53. دوسرا اصلی نتیجہ یہ ہے کہ عمومی پھولیزار نے کاوٹ آزمائش میں 93% سے زیادہ دقیق حاصل کی اور 94% سے زیادہ ناقص نمونہ پر حاصل کیا۔ یہ زبان کے مطابق اسزولو اور رونیانکور کے متعدد کرنے والوں کے ساتھ برابر ہے.", 'ta': 'உரை உரை தலைமுறையின் பெருக்கல் தேவைப்படும், சூழல் உணர்வுடைய பயனர் முகப்புகளில் மற்றும் இயல்பான மொழி உருவாக்கத்தில் அதி இது பரவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட மொழிகளுக்காக தீர்வு செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது, இது இன்னும் பாங்டு மொழிக் குடும்பத்தில் உள் isiZulu மற்றும் ருனாக்கோருக்கான கூட்டுதல் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது அதே வழியில் இருந்தது, மற்றும் வேறு மொழி மண்டலத்திற்குச் சே இது துவக்குதல் மற்றும் பொதுவான சாத்தியம் சாத்தியமாக இருக்கலாம் என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறது. We investigated this systematically for seven languages across three different Guthrie language zones.  முதல் விளைவு என்னவென்றால் நாம் மெய்ன்னின் 1948 வகுப்புகளின் குறிப்பிட்டுக் குறிப்பிடுதல் உண்மையில் சரிபார்க்கப்பட்ட அனைத்து மொழிகளுக்கும் கணக்கிடுவது போதுமானது இல் இரண்டாவது முக்கிய முடிவு என்னவென்றால் 93% க்கு மேல் பொது தொகுப்பாளர் தெளிவாக்கப்பட்டது மற்றும் குறிப்பில்லாத மாதிர இது மொழி- குறிப்பிட்ட ஐசுலு மற்றும் ரனாக்கோர் பொருள்களுக்கு ஒப்பிடும்.', 'uz': "Name Bu ko'plab ishlatilgan tillar uchun o'zgartirilgan bo'lsa, bu Bantu tilning oilasidagi tillar uchun qismi. IsZulu va Runyakore uchun qoʻllanmalar natijalari bir xil tillar sonlariga birlashtirish kerakligini koʻrsatish mumkin. This suggests that bootstrapping and generalizability might be feasible.  Biz bu tizim tilni uchta boshqa bir xil Gthri tili sohalarda 7 tillar uchun o'rganib ko'rdik. Birinchi natijasi: Meinhin'ning 1948 sinfning noto'zgarishlari haqiqatgina qidirilgan tillar uchun kompyutlar uchun yetarli emas, prefiklar davomida aniqlashni sababi, va biz shunday qilib 29 nota sinfning tablarini 53ga qayta ifodalamiz. Ikkinchi asosiy natijasi, 93% dan ortiq toʻplatuvchi davom etilgan va davom etish davomida 94% dan ortiq. Bu isZulu va Runyakor tarkibini bir tilga mos keladi.", 'vi': 'Việc sản xuất văn bản có thể yêu cầu nhiều danh từ, như trong các môi trường nhạy cảm với người dùng và trong việc tạo ngôn ngữ tự nhiên rộng hơn. Tuy nó đã được giải quyết cho các ngôn ngữ phổ biến, nhưng nó vẫn là một thách thức cho các ngôn ngữ trong gia đình Banu. Kết quả khử trùng kết quả cho isiZulu và runyantor cho thấy có nhiều phương pháp tương đồng, bao gồm cả việc kết hợp cú pháp với ngữ pháp, mặc dù thuộc về các khu vực ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Điều này cho thấy khả năng khởi động và vi phạm quy định. Chúng tôi đã điều tra nó một cách thường xuyên trong bảy ngôn ngữ khác nhau ở Guthrie. Kết quả đầu tiên là tính cách của Meinhof về s ố lượng danh từ nay thực sự là không đủ để tính to án cho tất cả các ngôn ngữ đã được kiểm tra, bởi vì không có kềm chế trong hàng đầu, và chúng ta đã định nghĩa lại các bảng danh từ của lớp 29 danh từ trong 37. Lần thứ hai kết quả chính xác là tập đoàn đa số chung đạt được hơn số 93. Chính xác trong việc kiểm tra che đậy và hơn 94. trên một mẫu ngẫu nhiên. Nó có thể so sánh với... isiZulu và Runyanvì người biết nhiều ngôn ngữ.', 'bg': 'Създаването на текст може да изисква плурализиране на съществителни, като например в чувствителни към контекста потребителски интерфейси и в генерирането на естествен език по-широко. Въпреки че това е решено за широко използваните езици, това все още е предизвикателство за езиците от езиковото семейство Банту. Резултатите от плурализацията, получени за езизулу и рунянкоре, показват, че има прилики в подхода, включително необходимостта от комбиниране на синтаксис със семантика, въпреки че принадлежат към различни езикови зони. Това предполага, че може да бъде осъществимо зареждане и обобщаване. Проучихме това систематично за седем езика в три различни езикови зони на Гутри. Първият резултат е, че спецификацията на класовете съществителни от 1948 г. на Майнхоф наистина е неадекватна за изчислителни цели за всички изследвани езици, поради недетерминизма в префиксите, и по този начин предефинирахме таблиците на характерните класове съществителни на 29 класове на 53. Вторият основен резултат е, че генеричният плурализатор е постигнал над 93% точност при тестването за покритие и над 94% при случайна извадка. Това е сравнимо с езиковите плурализатори исулу и рунянкоре.', 'da': "Tekstgenerering kan kræve pluralisering af substantiver, f.eks. i kontekstfølsomme brugergrænseflader og generering af naturligt sprog mere bredt. Selv om dette er blevet løst for de udbredte sprog, er dette stadig en udfordring for sprogene i Bantu-familien. Pluraliseringsresultater opnået for isiZulu og Runyankore viste, at der var ligheder i tilgang, herunder behovet for at kombinere syntaks med semantik, trods at de tilhørte forskellige sprogzoner. Dette tyder på, at bootstrapping og generalisering kan være muligt. Vi undersøgte dette systematisk for syv sprog på tværs af tre forskellige Guthrie sprogzoner. Det første resultat er, at Meinhof's 1948 specifikation af substantivklasserne faktisk er utilstrækkelig til beregningsmæssige formål for alle undersøgte sprog på grund af ikke-determinisme i præfikser, og vi omdefinerede således de karakteristiske substantivklasser tabeller for 29 substantivklasser til 53. Det andet vigtigste resultat er, at den generiske pluralizer opnåede over 93% nøjagtighed i dækningstest og over 94% på en tilfældig prøve. Dette kan sammenlignes med de sprogspecifikke isiZulu- og Runyankore-pluralisere.", 'hr': 'Generacija teksta može zahtijevati pluralizaciju imena, poput interfejsa korisnika osjetljivih konteksta i u prirodnoj generaciji jezika šire. Iako je to riješeno za široko korišćene jezike, to je još uvijek izazov jezika u obitelji Bantu jezika. Rezultati pluralizacije koji su dobili za isiZulu i Runyankore pokazali su da postoje sličnosti u pristupu, uključujući potrebu kombiniranja sintaksa sa semantikom, uprkos pripadanju različitim jezičkim zonama. To ukazuje na to da bi moglo biti moguće prebaciti čizme i generalizaciju. Istražili smo to sistematski za sedam jezika u tri različite jezičke zona Guthrie. Prvi ishod je da je Meinhov specifikacija imenskih klasa 1948. godine zaista nedovoljana za računalne svrhe za sve ispitivane jezike zbog nedodređenosti u prefiksima i tako smo ponovno definirali karakteristične tablice imenskih klasa 29 imenskih klasa u 53. Drugi glavni rezultat je da je generički pluralizator postigao preko 93% preciznost u testiranju pokrivanja i preko 94% na nasumičnom uzorku. To je usporedno s jezikom specifičnim isiZulu i Runyankore pluralizerima.', 'nl': 'Het genereren van tekst kan de pluralisering van zelfstandige naamwoorden vereisen, zoals in contextgevoelige gebruikersinterfaces en in het genereren van natuurlijke taal breder. Hoewel dit is opgelost voor de veel gebruikte talen, is dit nog steeds een uitdaging voor de talen in de Bantu taalfamilie. Pluraliseringsresultaten verkregen voor isiZulu en Runyankore toonden aan dat er overeenkomsten waren in de aanpak, waaronder de noodzaak om syntaxis te combineren met semantiek, ondanks het behoren tot verschillende taalzones. Dit suggereert dat bootstrapping en generaliseerbaarheid mogelijk zijn. We hebben dit systematisch onderzocht voor zeven talen in drie verschillende Guthrie taalzones. De eerste uitkomst is dat Meinhofs 1968 specificatie van de zelfstandige naamwoorden klassen inderdaad ontoereikend is voor rekenkundige doeleinden voor alle onderzochte talen, vanwege niet-determinisme in voorvoegsels, en we aldus de karakteristieke naamwoord klassetabellen van 29 zelfstandige naamwoorden klassen herdefiniëren in 53. Het tweede belangrijkste resultaat is dat de generieke pluralizer meer dan 93% nauwkeurigheid bereikte in dekkingstests en meer dan 94% op een willekeurige steekproef. Dit is vergelijkbaar met de taalspecifieke isiZulu en Runyankore pluralizers.', 'de': 'Die Textgenerierung kann die Pluralisierung von Substantiven erfordern, z.B. in kontextsensitiven Benutzeroberflächen und in der Generierung natürlicher Sprache im Allgemeinen. Obwohl dies für die weit verbreiteten Sprachen gelöst wurde, stellt dies für die Sprachen der Bantu-Sprachfamilie immer noch eine Herausforderung dar. Pluralisierungsergebnisse für isiZulu und Runyankore zeigten Ähnlichkeiten in der Vorgehensweise, einschließlich der Notwendigkeit, Syntax mit Semantik zu kombinieren, obwohl sie zu verschiedenen Sprachzonen gehören. Dies deutet darauf hin, dass Bootstrapping und Verallgemeinerbarkeit möglich sein könnten. Wir untersuchten dies systematisch für sieben Sprachen in drei verschiedenen Guthrie-Sprachzonen. Das erste Ergebnis ist, dass Meinhofs 1968 Spezifikation der Substantivklassen aufgrund des Nicht-Determinismus in Präfixen tatsächlich für rechnerische Zwecke für alle untersuchten Sprachen unzureichend ist und wir daher die charakteristischen Substantivklassentabellen der 29-Substantivklassen in 53 neu definieren. Das zweite Hauptergebnis ist, dass der generische Pluralizer bei Coverage Tests über 93% Genauigkeit und über 94% bei einer Zufallsprobe erzielte. Dies ist vergleichbar mit den sprachspezifischen isiZulu- und Runyankore-Pluralizern.', 'id': 'Generasi teks mungkin membutuhkan pluralisasi nama, seperti dalam konteks sensitif antarmuka pengguna dan dalam generasi bahasa alami lebih luas. Sementara hal ini telah diselesaikan untuk bahasa yang banyak digunakan, ini masih tantangan untuk bahasa dalam keluarga bahasa Bantu. Hasil pluralisasi yang diperoleh untuk isiZulu dan Runyankore menunjukkan ada persamaan dalam pendekatan, termasuk kebutuhan untuk menggabungkan sintaks dengan semantik, meskipun milik zona bahasa yang berbeda. Ini menunjukkan bahwa bootstrapping dan generalisasi mungkin bisa dilakukan. We investigated this systematically for seven languages across three different Guthrie language zones.  Hasil pertama adalah bahwa spesifikasi 1948 Meinhof dari kelas nama benar-benar tidak cukup untuk tujuan komputasi untuk semua bahasa yang diperiksa, karena non-determinisme dalam prefiks, dan kami mendefinisikan ulang karakteristik tabel kelas nama nama dari 29 kelas nama nama ke 53. Hasil utama kedua adalah bahwa pluralizer generik mencapai lebih dari 93% akurasi dalam tes penyamaran dan lebih dari 94% pada sampel acak. Ini dapat dibandingkan dengan isiZulu dan Runyankore pluraliser spesifik bahasa.', 'ko': '텍스트 생성은 명사의 다원화, 예를 들어 상하문이 민감한 사용자 인터페이스와 더욱 광범위한 자연 언어 생성을 필요로 할 수 있다.광범위하게 사용되는 언어는 이미 이 문제를 해결했지만 반도어계의 언어에 있어 이것은 여전히 도전이다.isiZulu와 Runyankore의 다원화 결과에 따르면 서로 다른 언어 구역에 속하지만 문법과 의미를 결합해야 하는 것을 포함하여 방법적으로 비슷한 점이 있다.이것은 유도와 보급이 가능하다는 것을 나타낸다.우리는 세 개의 다른 Guthrie 언어 구역에서 일곱 가지 언어를 체계적으로 조사했다.첫 번째 결과는 접두사의 불확실성 때문에 1948년에 Meinhof가 명사류에 대한 설명은 모든 검사 언어의 계산 목적에 충분하지 않았기 때문에 29개의 명사류의 특징적인 명사류표를 53개로 다시 정의했다.두 번째 주요 결과는 유니버설 곱셈기가 덮어쓰기 테스트에서의 정확도가 93% 를 넘어섰고 랜덤 샘플에서의 정확도가 94% 를 넘어섰다는 것이다.이는 특정 언어의 아이주루나 런안코르 복수와 비슷한 형태다.', 'fa': 'نسل متن ممکن است تعداد زیادی از نام\u200cها را نیاز داشته باشد، مثل در interfaces of user-sensitive context و در نسل زبان طبیعی بیشتری. در حالی که این برای زبانهای استفاده شده است، هنوز یک چالش برای زبانها در خانواده زبان بانتو است. نتیجه\u200cهای پلرالیزی که برای isiZulu و Runyankore دریافت شده نشان داده\u200cاند که شبیه\u200cهایی در دسترسی وجود دارد، شامل نیازی برای ترکیب سنتاکس با سنتاکس، با وجود تعلق به منطقه\u200cهای زبان\u200cهای مختلف. این پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که دستگیری و قابلیت عمومی ممکن است. ما این سیستماتیک را برای هفت زبان در سه منطقه گوتری متفاوت تحقیق کردیم. اولین نتیجه این است که مطالعات کلاس اسم مین\u200cهان 1948 در واقع برای هدف محاسباتی برای همه زبان\u200cهای تحقیق، به دلیل غیر تصمیم\u200cگیری در پیشنهاد کافی نیستند، و بنابراین ما میز کلاس اسم ویژه\u200cای از ۲۹ کلاس اسم را به ۳۳ باز تعریف کردیم. نتیجه اصلی دوم این است که بیشتر از 93 درصد دقیق در آزمایش پوشش و بیشتر از 94 درصد در نمونه تصادفی رسید. این قابل مقایسه با نسبت به زبان مخصوص isiZulu و Runyankore pluralizers است.', 'sw': 'Kizazi cha maandishi kinaweza kuhitaji mkusanyiko wa wasio na chakula, kama vile katika mazingira ya watumiaji wenye hisia na katika kizazi cha asili. While this has been solved for the widely-used languages, this is still a challenge for the languages in the Bantu language family.  Matokeo ya mkusanyiko yaliyopatikana kwa isiZulu na Runyankore yalionyesha kulikuwa na vifano vinavyofanana, ikiwa ni pamoja na haja ya kuunganisha kodi na semantika, pamoja na kuwa ni sehemu mbalimbali za lugha. Hii inapendekeza kua vifaa vya boot na uhalisia unaweza kuweza. Tulichunguza hii kwa lugha saba katika maeneo matatu tofauti ya lugha ya Guthria. Matokeo ya kwanza ni kwamba madai ya Meinhin ya darasa hili la chakula kwa hakika haitoshi kwa lengo la kuhesabu lugha zote zilizochunguzwa, kwa sababu ya kutokuwa na ufanisi wa utambulisho katika prefixi, na kwa hiyo tukaelezea vipindi maalum vya darasa la chakula cha aina 29 katika darasa za chakula 53. Matokeo ya pili ni kwamba mpiga mkusanyiko wa kawaida ulifanikiwa kwa zaidi ya asilimia 93 katika jaribio la habari na zaidi ya asilimia 94 kwenye sampuli ya urahisi. Hii inafanana na waandishi wenye lugha maalum isiZulu na Runyankore.', 'sq': 'Gjenerimi i tekstit mund të kërkojë pluralizimin e emrave, të tillë si në interfaqet e përdoruesve të ndjeshme në kontekst dhe në gjenerimin natyror të gjuhës më gjerësisht. Ndërsa kjo është zgjidhur për gjuhët e përdorura gjerësisht, kjo është ende një sfidë për gjuhët në familjen e gjuhës Bantu. Pluralization results obtained for isiZulu and Runyankore showed there were similarities in approach, including the need to combine syntax with semantics, despite belonging to different language zones.  Kjo sugjeron se çizmet dhe gjeneralizueshmëria mund të jenë të realizueshme. Ne e hetuam këtë sistematikisht për shtatë gjuhë nëpër tre zona të ndryshme gjuhësh Gutri. Rezultati i parë është se specifikimi i Meinhof-it në 1948 i klasave të emrave janë në të vërtetë të papërshtatshëm për qëllime kompjuterike për të gjitha gjuhët e shqyrtuara, për shkak të jo-përcaktimit në prefikse, dhe ne kështu përsëri përcaktuam tabelat karakteristike të klasave të emrave të 29 klasave të emrave në 53. Rezultati i dytë kryesor është se pluralizuesi gjeneral arriti mbi 93% saktësi në testimin e mbulimit dhe mbi 94% në një mostra të rastësishme. Kjo është e krahasueshme me pluralizuesit isiZulu dhe Runyankore specifikë për gjuhën.', 'tr': 'Metin döredişi atalaryň pluralizasyony mümkin edýär, mesela kontekst hasaplanyşylar aralygynda we tebigy diller döredişi ýaly. Bu köp ulanylan diller üçin çözüldi, bu heniz Bantu dilleriniň maşgalasynda adatça kynçylyk. IsiZulu we Runyankore üçin ýeterlik netijeleri bolan ýagdaýynda meňzeşlik bardygyny görkezilýär. Diňe bir dil bölegine degişlikde syntaksi semantik bilen birleşmelidigini bilen birleşdirmelidir. Bu başlatmak we umumy edip biljek bolmagy maslahat berer. Biz bu sistematik bilen Guthriýanyň üç dürli dilinde ýedi diller üçin bardyk. Ilkinji netijede, Meinhiniň 1948-njy isim klaslarynyň hasaplamagyna görä hemme maslahat diller üçin hasaplanýan maksady däldir. Şol sebäpli biz 29 sany klasyň hasaplamagyna görä hasaplanýarys. Ikinji netijede, jenetik pluralizatçi muňa suyt testinde 93%-den ýokary taýýarlyk we 94%-den üst samplede ýetirdi. Bu Zulu we Runyankor pluralizerdeki dillere görä ýaly.', 'af': "Teks generasie kan die pluralisasie van noume benodig, soos in kontekssensitiewe gebruikerkoppelvlakke en in natuurlike taal generasie meer breide. Alhoewel dit is opgelos vir die vaste gebruikte tale, is dit nog 'n uitdaging vir die tale in die Bantu taal familie. Pluralisering resultate wat vir isiZulu en Runyankore ontvang het vertoon het dat daar was gelykenisse in toegang, insluitend die benodig om sintaks met semantieke te kombinerer, selfs by verskillende taalssone te behoort. Hierdie stel voorstel dat opstarting en generaliserbaardigheid moontlik kan wees. Ons het hierdie sistematiese ondersoek vir sewe tale oor drie verskillende Guthrie taalsone. Die eerste uitgaande is dat Meinhof se 1948 spesifikasie van die nouklase is regtig onvoldoende vir rekenaasjonale doels vir alle ondersoekte tale, vanweë nie-determinisie in voorafikse, en ons het daarom die karakteristiese nouklas tabelle van 29 nouklase in 53 herdefinieer. Die tweede hoofresultaat is dat die generieke pluraliseerder oor 93% waarskynlik in dekking toets en oor 94% op 'n willekeurige voorbeeld bereik het. Dit is vergelykbaar met die taal-spesifieke isiZulu en Runyankore pluralisers.", 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ትውልድ ምሳሌ፣ በተስማማሚ ተጠቃሚዎች ፊቶችን እና በተፈጠረ ቋንቋ ትውልድ ላይ በተለየ የበለጠ ጥያቄ እንዲያስፈልጋል፡፡ While this has been solved for the widely-used languages, this is still a challenge for the languages in the Bantu language family.  ለisiZulu እና ሮናኩኮር የተገኘው የውጤት ውጤቶች በተለያዩ ቋንቋዎች ክፍሎች ቢሆኑ ሲንካስታውን ከsemantics ጋር ማሰናከል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ይሄ መጀመሪያ ማሰናከል እና ማወያየት ይቻላል፡፡ በሦስት ልዩ ጉትሪ ቋንቋ ክፍሎች ለሰባት ቋንቋዎች በሥርዓት መርምረናል፡፡ የመጀመሪያው ፍጻሜ እንዲህ ነው። የ1948 የክፍለ ቋንቋዎች ቁጥጥር ለሁሉም ተፈትነው ለቋንቋዎች አይጠቅሟቸውም፡፡ ሁለተኛው ዋናው ፍጻሜ በ93 በመቶ ላይ የብሔራዊ ተሟጋቾች በሽፋን መክፈት እና በ94 በመቶ የሚጨምረው ምሳሌ ነው፡፡ ይሄ ቋንቋ እና ሮናኪኮር ተሟጋቾች ይተካከላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Տեքստի ստեղծումը կարող է պահանջել անվանների բազմազանություն, ինչպիսիք են կոնտեքստի զգայուն օգտագործողների ինտերֆեյսները և բնական լեզուների ստեղծումը ավելի լայն: Մինչդեռ սա լուծվել է լայնորեն օգտագործվող լեզուների համար, սա դեռևս մարտահրավեր է Բանտու լեզուների ընտանիքի լեզուների համար: Իզիզուլյուի և Ռունիանկորի համար ստացված բազմազանության արդյունքները ցույց տվեցին, որ մոտեցումների մեջ նմանություններ կան, ներառյալ կարիքը համադրել սինտաքսը սեմանտիկայի հետ, չնայած տարբեր լեզվային գոտիների պատասխանատվությունը: Սա նշանակում է, որ բարձրացումը և ընդհանուր տարածելիությունը կարող են իրականացվել: Մենք սա սիստեմատիկ ուսումնասիրեցինք 7 լեզուների համար Գութրիի երեք տարբեր լեզվի գոտիներում: Առաջին արդյունքը նրանում է, որ Մեինհոֆի 1948 թվականի անվանումների դասարանների նշանակությունը իսկապես բավարար է բոլոր ուսումնասիրված լեզուների հաշվարկների համար, ոչ որոշումների պատճառով նախադասություններում, և մենք վերաձևակերպեցինք 29 անվանումների դասարանների բնորոշ աղյուսակները 53-ի: Երկրորդ հիմնական արդյունքն այն է, որ ընդհանուր բազմազանույթը հասավ 93 տոկոսի ճշգրիտության ընթացքում, իսկ 94 տոկոսի ընթացքում պատահական նմուշի վրա: Սա համեմատուկ է լեզվի կոնկրետ իզուուլուն և Ռունիանքորի պլառալիզարներին:', 'az': "Mətn nəsilində ismlərin pluralizasyonu lazımdır, bəlkə, mətn-şəkildə hiss edən istifadəçi interfejlərində və təbiətli dil nəsilində daha genişliyi olaraq. Bu çox istifadə edilən dillər üçün çözülmüş halda, bu hələ də Bantu dillərin ailəsindəki dillər üçün çətindir. isiZulu və Runyankoru üçün qazanmış Pluralizasyon sonuçlarını göstərdi ki, bənzər dil bölələrinə sahib olmasına rağmen sintaksiyə semantik ilə birləşdirmək ehtiyacı vardır. Bu, bootstrapping və generalization mümkün olar. Biz bu sistematik olaraq üç müxtəlif Guthrie dil bölgesində yeddi dil araşdırdıq. İlk sonuç Meinhof'ın 1948-ci adlı s ınıfların müəyyənləşdirilməsi həqiqətən, bütün imtahana edilmiş dillər üçün hesablama məqsədilə kifayət deyildir, prefikslərdə müəyyənləşdirilmədiyimiz üçün. Beləliklə biz 29 adlı sınıf masalarını 53 dəfə yenidən təyin etdik. İkinci başlıq sonuçları, gizli pluralizer araşdırma sınamasında 93%-dən çox ədalətli olaraq və vəziyyətli nümunələrdə 94%-dən çox ədalətli olaraq yetişdi. Bu, isiZulu və Runyankor pluralizerlərinin dillərinə bənzəyir.", 'bs': 'Generacija teksta može zahtijevati pluralizaciju imena, poput interfejsa korisnika osjetljivih konteksta i u generaciji prirodnog jezika šire. Iako je ovo rešeno za široko korišćene jezike, to je i dalje izazov jezika u obitelji Bantu jezika. Rezultati pluralizacije dobiveni za isiZulu i Runyankore pokazali su da postoje sličnosti u pristupu, uključujući potrebu kombinacije sintaksa sa semantikom, uprkos pripadanju različitim jezičkim zonama. To predlaže da bi se šipke i generalizacija mogle biti moguće. Istražili smo to sistematski za sedam jezika u tri različite jezičke zone Guthrie. Prvi ishod je da je Meinhov specifikacija klasa imena 1948. godine zaista nedovoljana za računalne svrhe za sve pregledane jezike zbog nedodređenog predsjednika, i tako smo ponovno definisali karakteristične tablice imena klase 29 klasa imena u 53. Drugi glavni rezultat je da je generički pluralizator postigao preko 93% preciznost u testiranju pokrivanja i preko 94% na nasumičnom uzorku. Ovo je usporedno sa jezikom specifičnim isiZulu i Runyankore pluralizerima.', 'bn': 'টেক্সট প্রজন্মের প্রজন্ম নিজেদের প্রলোচনার প্রয়োজন, যেমন কন্টেক্স-সংবেদনশীল ব্যবহারকারীর ইন্টারফেস এবং প্রাকৃত ব্যাপকভাবে ব্যবহৃত ভাষার জন্য এটা সমাধান করা হয়েছে, কিন্তু এটা এখনো বাংটু ভাষার পরিবারের ভাষার জন্য চ্যালেঞ্জ। ইজজুলু এবং রুনাকোরের জন্য প্লাগারেশনের ফলাফল প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে সেমেন্টিক্সের সাথে সিন্টেক্সের সাথে একত্রিত হয়েছে, যদিও ভিন্ন এটি প্রস্তাব করে যে বুটস্ট্র্যাপিং এবং সাধারণ বৈশিষ্ট্য হতে পারে। আমরা তিনটি ভিন্ন ভিন্ন গুথ্রি ভাষার এলাকায় সাত ভাষার জন্য এই ব্যবস্থাতভাবে তদন্ত করেছি। প্রথম ফলাফল হচ্ছে যে মেইনফের ১৯৪৮ সালের নান ক্লাসের নির্দেশ সত্যিই সকল পরীক্ষা করা ভাষার জন্য গণনার জন্য যথেষ্ট নয়, প্রিফিকেসে নির্ধারণের কারণে আমরা ২৯ নান ক্লাসের বৈশি দ্বিতীয় প্রধান ফলাফল হচ্ছে যে জেনারিক প্লারালেজার ৯৩% বেশী সঠিকভাবে অর্জন করেছে কাভারেজ পরীক্ষায় এবং অন্যায়ভাবে ৯৪%  This is comparable to the language-specific isiZulu and Runyankore pluralizers.', 'ca': "La generació de textos pot requerir la pluralització de noms, com en interfaces d'usuaris sensibles al contexte i en generació de llenguatges naturals en general. Mentre això s'ha resolt per a les llengües generalitzats, això encara és un repte per a les llengües de la família Bantu. Els resultats de la pluralització obtinguts per isiZulu i Runyankore van mostrar que hi havia similituds en l'enfocament, incloent la necessitat de combinar sintaxi amb semàntica, malgrat pertanyar a diferents zones lingüístices. Això suggereix que l'arranque de bots i la generalització podrien ser viables. Ho vam investigar sistemàticament per set llengües en tres zones diferents de llengües de Guthrie. El primer resultat és que la especificació de 1948 de Meinhof de les classes de nomes s ón realment insuficients per a propòsits computacionals per totes les llengües examinades, degut a la no determinació en prefixes, i així vam redefinir les taules característices de classe de nomes de 29 classes de nomes en 53. El segon resultat principal és que el pluralitzador genèric va aconseguir més del 93% de precisió en els tests de cobertura i més del 94% en una mostra aleatòria. Això és comparable als pluralitzadors Isulu i Runyankore específics per llenguatge.", 'cs': 'Generování textu může vyžadovat pluralizaci podstatných jmen, například v kontextově citlivých uživatelských rozhraních a v širším rozsahu generování přirozeného jazyka. I když to bylo vyřešeno pro široce používané jazyky, je to stále výzva pro jazyky z rodiny Bantu. Pluralizační výsledky získané pro isiZulu a Runyankore ukázaly, že existují podobnosti v přístupu, včetně nutnosti kombinovat syntaxi se sémantikou, i když patří do různých jazykových zón. To naznačuje, že bootstrapping a zobecnění by mohly být proveditelné. To jsme systematicky zkoumali pro sedm jazyků ve třech různých jazykových zónách Guthrie. Prvním výsledkem je, že Meinhofova 1968 specifikace podstatných tříd je skutečně nedostatečná pro výpočetní účely pro všechny zkoumané jazyky, kvůli nederminismu v předponách, a proto jsme předefinovali charakteristické tabulky podstatných tříd 29 podstatných tříd na 53. Druhým hlavním výsledkem je, že generický pluralizér dosáhl přesnosti při testování pokrytí přes 93% a přes 94% na náhodném vzorku. To je srovnatelné s jazykově specifickými pluralizátory isiZulu a Runyankore.', 'et': 'Teksti genereerimine võib nõuda substantiivide pluraliseerimist, näiteks kontekstitundlikes kasutajaliidesetes ja looduskeele genereerimisel laiemalt. Kuigi see on laialdaselt kasutatavate keelte puhul lahendatud, on see siiski väljakutse bantu keelte perekonna jaoks. IsiZulu ja Runyankore puhul saadud pluraliseerimistulemused näitasid sarnasusi lähenemisviisis, sealhulgas vajadust kombineerida süntaks semantika, vaatamata erinevatesse keeletsoonidesse kuulumisele. See näitab, et bootstrapping ja üldistatavus võivad olla teostatavad. Me uurisime seda süstemaatiliselt seitsme keele puhul kolmes Guthrie keeletsoonis. Esimeseks tulemuseks on, et Meinhofi 1948. aasta nimetusklasside spetsifikatsioon on tõepoolest ebapiisav arvutuslikel eesmärkidel kõigi uuritud keelte puhul, kuna eesliidete mittedeterminism ei ole, ning seega määratlesime 29 nimisõnaklassi iseloomulikud nimisõnaklassi tabelid ümber 53-ks. Teine peamine tulemus on see, et üldine pluralizer saavutas katvuse testimisel üle 93% täpsuse ja juhusliku valimi puhul üle 94%. See on võrreldav keelespetsiifiliste isizulu ja Runyankore pluraliseerijatega.', 'fi': 'Tekstin luonti voi edellyttää substantiivien moniarvoisuutta, kuten kontekstitiivisissä käyttöliittymissä ja laajemmin luonnollisen kielen tuottamisessa. Vaikka tämä on ratkaistu laajalti käytetyillä kielillä, tämä on edelleen haaste bantun kieliperheen kielille. IsiZulun ja Runyankoren moniarvoisuustulokset osoittivat yhtäläisyyksiä lähestymistavassa, mukaan lukien tarve yhdistää syntaksi semantiikkaan, vaikka ne kuuluivat eri kielivyöhykkeisiin. Tämä viittaa siihen, että bootstrapping ja yleistettävyys saattavat olla mahdollisia. Tutkimme tätä systemaattisesti seitsemällä kielellä kolmella eri Guthrien kielivyöhykkeellä. Ensimmäinen tulos on, että Meinhofin vuonna 1948 tekemä substantiivikokonaisuuksien määrittely ei todellakaan sovellu laskennallisiin tarkoituksiin kaikille tutkituille kielille etuliitteiden epädeterminismin vuoksi, ja näin määritimme 29 substantiivikokonaisuuden tunnusomaiset substantiivikokonaisuudet uudelleen 53:ksi. Toinen tärkein tulos on, että yleinen moniarvoisin saavutti yli 93%:n tarkkuuden peittotestauksessa ja yli 94%:n tarkkuuden satunnaisotoksessa. Tämä on verrattavissa kielikohtaisiin isiZulu- ja Runyankore-moniarvoisiin.', 'jv': 'Tuning Nanging, iki lak durung mendhing kanggo langa banter, iki durung iso nggih banter kanggo langa bantu. Rejalaké pluralizasi nggawe nggo isiGulu karo runyanké kuwi wis ana sing sampeyan karo bisalaman maneh, tambah musingan dhéwé ngregani sistem semanti karo semanti, gak dhéwé ngelarang langkung sampeyan. Iki suggeruju kanggo njujug-uteg lan kabèh dumadhi iki. Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistematik iki kanggo saiki banget telu luwih kanggo ngerasah tarjamahan Guthrey. Awak dhéwé sing mbéwé barêng-barêng kanggo Meinên karo rata-barêng kanggo kelas nêmên karo ngono kuwi mau sing gak bener kanggo kelas telu kanggo kebutuhan langa sing is in, dadi kebutuhan geraaks segala macem warni winih dhéwé, lan akeh iso nggawe diumbakdiré kabèh lané kanggo ngerasakno Genjer Iki sampeyan karo perusahaan langgambar kelas isiGulu karo pluralizasi runyankode.', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje besedila lahko zahteva pluralizacijo samostalnikov, na primer v kontekstno občutljivih uporabniških vmesnikih in v naravnem jeziku širše. Čeprav je bilo to rešeno za široko uporabljene jezike, je to še vedno izziv za jezike v bantujski jezikovni družini. Rezultati pluralizacije, pridobljeni za isiZulu in Runyankore, so pokazali podobnosti pri pristopu, vključno s potrebo po kombiniranju sintakse s semantiko, kljub pripadanju različnim jezikovnim območjem. To kaže, da bi bilo mogoče izvesti bootstrapping in splošnost. To smo sistematično raziskovali za sedem jezikov v treh različnih Guthriejevih jezikovnih conah. Prvi rezultat je, da je Meinhofova specifikacija razredov samostalnikov iz leta 1948 zaradi nedeterminizma v predponah dejansko neustrezna za računalniške namene za vse pregledane jezike, zato smo ponovno opredelili tabele značilnih samostalnikov 29 razredov samostalnikov v 53. Drugi glavni rezultat je, da je generični pluralizer dosegel več kot 93% natančnost pri testiranju pokritosti in več kot 94% pri naključnem vzorcu. To je primerljivo z jezikovnim pluralizatorjem isiZulu in Runyankore.', 'ha': "Text generation may require the pluralization of nouns, such as in context-sensitive user interfaces and in natural language generation more broadly.  Wakati da aka riga wannan wa'ura wa lugha waɗanda ake yi amfani da shi mai yawa, wannan yana da wani mai zartar da harshen cikin lugha Bantu. Matarin da aka motsa wa isiZulu da Runyakor sun nuna wasu masu daidai da hanyarwa, kamar da aka buƙata koma komai da takis na semantiki, kuma kuma kõ dã ya kasa cikin wurãro dabam-daban. Wannan yana son cẽwa, za'a iya iya amfani da shirin farawa da mai gabatar. Ba mu yi bincike da wannan a cikin takarda harsunan baka cikin wurãren lugha uku na daban-dabam. Babbar ta farko ni'anar Meinhin'in da aka ƙayyade fasalan nan nan nan nan kuma ba za'a isa ba ga lissafar da ake lissafa zuwa duk lugha masu ƙidãya, saboda haka da ba'a yanka a cikin prefixes, kuma kamar wannan ne muka redrafa karatun masu karatun karatun na danganta na dans 29 na danne zuwa 53. Mataimakin na biyu na farko is that the General Publizator ya sãmu over 93% na tsari cikin jarraba cewa na rufe kuma over 94% a samfani da daidai. Wannan yana daidaita da harshen-ƙayyadadde isiZulu da Runyankor.", 'he': 'דור טקסט עשוי להזדקק לפולרליזציה של השמות, כמו במשקפי משתמשים רגישים לקונקסט ובדור שפת טבעית יותר רחב. למרות שפתרו את זה לשפות השתמשות רחבה, זה עדיין אתגר לשפות במשפחת שפות בנטו. תוצאות הפולורליזציה שנקבלו עבור isiZulu ורוניאנקור הראו שיש דמיונים באמצעות גישה, כולל הצורך לשלב סינטקס עם סמנטיקה, למרות שייכות לאזורים שפות שונים. זה מצביע על כך שצילומי מגפיים והכלליות יכולים להיות אפשריים. We investigated this systematically for seven languages across three different Guthrie language zones.  התוצאה הראשונה היא שהספציפיקציה של מיינהוף ב-1948 של שיעורי השמות אינה מספקת למטרות מחשביות לכל השפות המבחנות, בגלל לא-קבועות בפרקסים, וכך הגענו מחדש את שולחני שיעורי השמות האופייניים של 29 שיעורי השמות לתוך 53. התוצאה העיקרית השנייה היא שהתוספת הגנרית השיגה מדויקת מעל 93% בבדיקות כיסוי ועל 94% בדגימה אקראית. זה שווה למספציפי השפה איזיזולו ורוניאנקור.', 'bo': 'ཡི་གེ་མི་བསྒྱུར་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་རྐྱེན་ཅིག་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། སྐད པ་རྩིས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་། isiZulu དང་Runyankore་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲས་བ་ཡོད་པའི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་མཐུན་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཚིག་མཉམ་དགོས་པ་ཡིན། འདིས་འགོ་འཁྱེར་བ་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏུབ་ཆེ་ནི་འགོ་བཙུགས་ནུས་པ་ཡིན་ཆ་ཉེན། ང་ཚོས་རིགས་སྔོན་གྱི་སྐད་ཆ་གསུམ་ནང་གི་མ་ལག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་ལའང་བརྗོད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། མཇུག་འབྲས་ཐོག་ནི་མིང་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས་ལ་1948 ལྟ་བུ་གྲངས་རིག་གི་དམིགས་བསལ་ཀྱི་རྩིས་རྩིས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ཤེས་ཡོད་མིན་འདུག གལ་ཅན་གཉིས་པ་བརྗོད་བྱས་ན། ཆེ་རྩིས་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཚད་བརྟག་དཔྱད་པ་ཞིག་ལས་93% ལྷག་ཙམ་བྱུང་། འདི་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དམིགས་འབེལ་ཅན་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་དང་རྩོན་ནུའི་ཆ་འཕྲན་སྒྲིག་པ་ཚོར་མཐུན་པ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Automatically Extracting Qualia Relations for the Rich Event Ontology', 'ar': 'استخراج علاقات Qualia تلقائيًا لظاهرة الأحداث الغنية', 'es': 'Extracción automática de relaciones de Qualia para la ontología de eventos enriquecida', 'fr': "Extraction automatique des relations de qualité pour l'ontologie d'événements enrichis", 'pt': 'Extraindo automaticamente relações de Qualia para a ontologia de eventos ricos', 'ja': 'リッチイベントオントロジーのためのクオリア関係の自動抽出', 'zh': '自取富事本体质数', 'hi': 'स्वचालित रूप से रिच इवेंट आंटोलॉजी के लिए क्वालिया संबंधों को निकालना', 'ru': 'Автоматическое извлечение квалификационных отношений для богатой онтологии событий', 'ga': 'Caidreamh Qualia a Bhaint go huathoibríoch don Ontology Imeacht Saibhir', 'el': 'Αυτόματη εξαγωγή σχέσεων για την πλούσια Οντολογία Εκδηλώσεων', 'hu': 'Qualia kapcsolatok automatikus kivonása a gazdag eseményontológia számára', 'ka': 'Comment', 'it': 'Estrazione automatica delle relazioni Qualia per la ricca ontologia degli eventi', 'lt': 'Automatiškai ištraukiami kokybiniai santykiai turtingų įvykių Ontologijai', 'mk': 'Автоматски извлекување на квалитетни односи за богатата онтологија на настаните', 'kk': 'Оқиға онтологиясының сапасы қатынасын автоматты түрде тарқату', 'ms': 'Menekstrak Hubungan Kualiti secara automatik untuk Ontologi Peristiwa Rich', 'ml': 'സമ്പന്നതയുടെ അവസ്ഥ ഒണ്ടോളജിക്കുവേണ്ടി ക്വാലിയയുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം പുറത്താക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'L-Estrazzjoni Awtomatika tar-Relazzjonijiet ta’ Kwalità għall-Ontoloġija tal-Avvenimenti Għolja', 'mn': 'Баян үйл явдал онтологийн Qualia Relations-ыг автоматаар татаж', 'no': 'Pakk ut kvalitetrelasjonar automatisk for riktige hendingsfontologien', 'pl': 'Automatyczne wyodrębnianie relacji Qualia dla bogatej ontologii zdarzeń', 'ro': 'Extragerea automată a relațiilor Qualia pentru ontologia bogată a evenimentelor', 'sr': 'Automatièki izvlaèenje odnosa kvalije za Ontologiju bogatih dogaðaja', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'Automatic Extracting Qualia Relations for the Rich Event Ontology', 'sv': 'Extrahera automatiskt Qualia-relationer för den rika händelseontologin', 'ta': 'செல்லும் நிகழ்வுக்கான தானாகவே குவேலியா தொடர்புகளை வெளியேற்றுகிறது', 'ur': 'ریچ ایڈینٹ انٹولوژی کے لئے کیوائیا رابطہ اٹھانے والی', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Rút Tự động hệ thống phân tử cho khoa học đại sự Rich', 'da': 'Automatisk udtrækning af Qualia-relationer til den rige begivenhedsontologi', 'bg': 'Автоматично извличане на отношенията на Квалиа за онтологията на богатото събитие', 'nl': 'Automatische extractie van Qualia relaties voor de rijke Event Ontologie', 'hr': 'Automatski izvlačenje odnosa Qualia za bogate događaje Ontologije', 'ko': '리치 이벤트 본체의 Qualia 관계 자동 추출', 'de': 'Automatisches Extrahieren von Qualia Relations für die Rich Event Ontologie', 'id': 'Mengekstrak Hubungan Kualitas secara otomatis untuk Ontologi peristiwa kaya', 'sw': 'Kutoa uhusiano wa Kualia kwa ajili ya tukio la Tajiri', 'sq': 'Ekstraktimi automatik i marrëdhënieve të cilësisë për Ontologjinë e Eventeve të pasura', 'am': 'አውቶማቲክ', 'tr': 'Zapas wajyp ontologiýasy üçin kaliwatlary otomatik açylýar', 'fa': 'Name', 'bn': 'সম্পদ ইভেন্ট অনটোলোগির জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কুয়েলিয়া সম্পর্ক বহিস্কার করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Automatski izvlačenje odnosa kvalije za Ontologiju bogatih događaja', 'az': 'Zengin Vaqiyyət Ontologiyası üçün Kvaliya İlişkisini Avtomatik Çıqar', 'ca': "Extraer automàticament les relacions de qualitat per a l'Ontologia d'Events Riches", 'fi': 'Qualia-suhteiden automaattinen purkaminen Rich Event Ontologiaa varten', 'af': 'Name', 'cs': 'Automatické extrahování kvalitních vztahů pro bohatou ontologii událostí', 'et': 'Qualia suhete automaatne ekstraheerimine rikkaliku sündmuse ontoloogia jaoks', 'jv': 'Automatically extract Qualia Relahs kanggo Ribagian events Ontologgi', 'sk': 'Samodejno pridobivanje Qualia relacij za ontologijo bogatega dogodka', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Rich Event Ontology ལ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕྱིར་འདོན།', 'he': 'Automatically Extracting Qualia Relations for the Rich Event Ontology'}
{'en': 'Commonsense, real-world knowledge about the events that entities or things in the world are typically involved in, as well as part-whole relationships, is valuable for allowing computational systems to draw everyday inferences about the world. Here, we focus on automatically extracting information about (1) the events that typically bring about certain entities (origins), (2) the events that are the typical functions of entities, and (3) part-whole relationships in entities. These correspond to the agentive, telic and constitutive qualia central to the Generative Lexicon. We describe our motivations and methods for extracting these qualia relations from the Suggested Upper Merged Ontology (SUMO) and show that human annotators overwhelmingly find the information extracted to be reasonable. Because ontologies provide a way of structuring this information and making it accessible to agents and computational systems generally, efforts are underway to incorporate the extracted information to an ontology hub of Natural Language Processing semantic role labeling resources, the Rich Event Ontology.', 'ar': 'إن مفهوم العموم ، المعرفة الواقعية حول الأحداث التي تشارك فيها الكيانات أو "الأشياء في العالم" عادةً ، بالإضافة إلى العلاقات الجزئية الكاملة ، هي قيمة للسماح للأنظمة الحسابية باستخلاص استنتاجات يومية حول العالم. هنا ، نركز على الاستخراج التلقائي للمعلومات حول (1) الأحداث التي عادةً ما تؤدي إلى كيانات معينة (الأصول) ، (2) الأحداث التي تمثل الوظائف النموذجية للكيانات ، و (3) العلاقات الجزئية في الكيانات. تتوافق هذه مع الجودة التوليدية والتليفونية والتأسيسية المركزية في المعجم التوليدي. نحن نصف دوافعنا وطرقنا لاستخراج علاقات الكواليا هذه من الأنطولوجيا المدمجة العليا المقترحة (SUMO) ونبين أن المعلقين البشريين يجدون بأغلبية ساحقة المعلومات المستخرجة معقولة. نظرًا لأن علم الوجود يوفر طريقة لهيكلة هذه المعلومات وجعلها في متناول الوكلاء والأنظمة الحسابية بشكل عام ، فإن الجهود جارية لدمج المعلومات المستخرجة في مركز علم الوجود لموارد وصف الأدوار الدلالية لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية ، وهو Rich Event Ontology.', 'fr': "Les connaissances du monde réel et de bon sens sur les événements dans lesquels les entités ou «\xa0choses du monde\xa0» sont généralement impliquées, ainsi que les relations parties-entières, sont précieuses pour permettre aux systèmes informatiques de tirer des conclusions quotidiennes sur le monde. Ici, nous nous concentrons sur l'extraction automatique d'informations sur (1) les événements qui provoquent généralement certaines entités (origines), (2) les événements qui sont les fonctions typiques des entités et (3) les relations partie-entier dans les entités. Ceux-ci correspondent aux qualités agentives, téliques et constitutives centrales du lexique génératif. Nous décrivons nos motivations et nos méthodes pour extraire ces relations de qualité à partir de l'Ontologie fusionnée supérieure suggérée (SUMO) et montrons que les annotateurs humains trouvent en grande majorité les informations extraites raisonnables. Étant donné que les ontologies fournissent un moyen de structurer ces informations et de les rendre accessibles aux agents et aux systèmes informatiques en général, des efforts sont en cours pour intégrer les informations extraites à un centre d'ontologie de ressources d'étiquetage des rôles sémantiques de traitement du langage naturel, l'Ontologie des événements enrichis.", 'pt': 'O senso comum, o conhecimento do mundo real sobre os eventos em que entidades ou “coisas no mundo” estão normalmente envolvidas, bem como relacionamentos parte-todo, é valioso para permitir que sistemas computacionais tirem inferências cotidianas sobre o mundo. Aqui, focamos na extração automática de informações sobre (1) os eventos que normalmente trazem certas entidades (origens), (2) os eventos que são as funções típicas das entidades e (3) os relacionamentos parte-todo nas entidades. Estes correspondem aos qualia agentivos, télicos e constitutivos centrais do Léxico Gerador. Descrevemos nossas motivações e métodos para extrair essas relações de qualia da SUMO (Sugested Upper Merged Ontology) e mostramos que os anotadores humanos consideram a informação extraída como razoável. Como as ontologias fornecem uma maneira de estruturar essas informações e torná-las acessíveis a agentes e sistemas computacionais em geral, esforços estão em andamento para incorporar as informações extraídas a um hub de ontologias de recursos de rotulagem de papéis semânticos de Processamento de Linguagem Natural, o Rich Event Ontology.', 'es': 'El conocimiento de sentido común y del mundo real sobre los eventos en los que las entidades o «cosas del mundo» suelen estar involucradas, así como las relaciones parcial-total, es valioso para permitir que los sistemas computacionales extraigan inferencias cotidianas sobre el mundo. Aquí, nos centramos en extraer automáticamente información sobre (1) los eventos que normalmente provocan ciertas entidades (orígenes), (2) los eventos que son las funciones típicas de las entidades y (3) las relaciones parcio-totalidad en las entidades. Corresponden a las cualidades agenciales, télicas y constitutivas centrales del Léxico Generativo. Describimos nuestras motivaciones y métodos para extraer estas relaciones de qualia de la ontología fusionada superior sugerida (SUMO) y mostramos que los anotadores humanos encuentran abrumadoramente que la información extraída es razonable. Debido a que las ontologías proporcionan una forma de estructurar esta información y hacerla accesible a los agentes y los sistemas computacionales en general, se están realizando esfuerzos para incorporar la información extraída a un centro ontológico de recursos de etiquetado de roles semánticos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural, Rich Event Ontology.', 'zh': '常识者,实体、世界事物,常所关涉及 - 一真实世界知识于许计系统对世界常推有价直。 注意于自取之(1)常携某实体(起源)事息,(2)为实体功能之事,与(3)体中 - 体相关。 此词典心之代,telic与质也。 述并体论(SUMO)取此机术,并明注释压倒性见取信息为宜。 本体供一结构化而使常可摄算访问之法,故方务合取息于自然语言处语义角色标本体之中,即事体也。', 'ru': 'Общепринятые, реальные знания о событиях, в которых обычно участвуют сущности или «вещи в мире», а также частичные отношения в целом, ценны для того, чтобы позволить вычислительным системам делать повседневные выводы о мире. Здесь мы фокусируемся на автоматическом извлечении информации о (1) событиях, которые обычно приводят к определенным сущностям (происхождению), (2) событиях, которые являются типичными функциями сущностей, и (3) частично-целых отношениях в сущностях. Они соответствуют агентивным, телическим и конститутивным качествам, центральным для Генеративного лексикона. Мы описываем наши мотивы и методы извлечения этих квалификационных отношений из предложенной верхней объединенной онтологии (SUMO) и показываем, что человеческие аннотаторы в подавляющем большинстве случаев считают извлеченную информацию разумной. Поскольку онтология обеспечивает способ структурирования этой информации и делает ее доступной для агентов и вычислительных систем в целом, предпринимаются усилия по включению извлеченной информации в онтологический концентратор ресурсов семантической ролевой маркировки обработки естественного языка, онтологию богатых событий.', 'ja': 'エンティティまたは「世界の物事」が典型的に関与する事象に関する常識的で現実的な知識、および部分的なホール関係は、コンピューティングシステムが世界に関する日常的な推論を引き出すことを可能にするために価値がある。 ここでは、(1)通常特定のエンティティ（起源）をもたらすイベント、(2)エンティティの典型的な機能であるイベント、(3)エンティティ内の部分的なホール関係に関する情報の自動抽出に焦点を当てています。 これらは、生成辞書の中心的なエージェント、テリック、および構成的なクオリアに対応しています。 私たちは、推奨される上位統合オントロジー（ SUMO ）からこれらのクオリア関係を抽出するための動機と方法を説明し、人間のアノテーターは、抽出された情報が合理的であると圧倒的に感じていることを示します。 オントロジーは、この情報を構造化し、一般的にエージェントや計算システムにアクセスできるようにする方法を提供するため、抽出された情報を自然言語処理のオントロジーハブに組み込むための努力が進められています。', 'hi': 'कॉमनसेंस, उन घटनाओं के बारे में वास्तविक दुनिया का ज्ञान जो संस्थाएं या "दुनिया में चीजें" आमतौर पर शामिल होती हैं, साथ ही साथ भाग-पूरे रिश्ते, कम्प्यूटेशनल सिस्टम को दुनिया के बारे में हर रोज़ अनुमान लगाने की अनुमति देने के लिए मूल्यवान है। यहां, हम स्वचालित रूप से (1) उन घटनाओं के बारे में जानकारी निकालने पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं जो आमतौर पर कुछ संस्थाओं (मूल) के बारे में लाते हैं, (2) ऐसी घटनाएं जो संस्थाओं के विशिष्ट कार्य हैं, और (3) संस्थाओं में भाग-पूरे संबंध। ये उत्पादक शब्दकोश के लिए एजेंटिव, टेलिक और संवैधानिक क्वालिया केंद्रीय के अनुरूप हैं। हम सुझाए गए ऊपरी मर्ज किए गए ओन्टोलॉजी (SUMO) से इन क्वालिया संबंधों को निकालने के लिए हमारी प्रेरणाओं और तरीकों का वर्णन करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि मानव एनोटेटरों को उचित होने के लिए निकाली गई जानकारी मिलती है। क्योंकि ontologies इस जानकारी की संरचना और यह एजेंटों और कम्प्यूटेशनल सिस्टम के लिए आम तौर पर सुलभ बनाने का एक तरीका प्रदान करते हैं, प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग संसाधनों, रिच इवेंट ओंटोलॉजी के एक आंटोलॉजी हब के लिए निकाली गई जानकारी को शामिल करने के प्रयास चल रहे हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá eolas ciallmhar, fíor-dhomhanda ar na himeachtaí a mbíonn baint ag eintitis nó “rudaí ar domhan” de ghnáth leo, chomh maith le caidrimh pháirt-iomlán, luachmhar chun ligean do chórais ríomhaire tátail laethúla a bhaint amach faoin domhan. Anseo, dírímid ar fhaisnéis a bhaint go huathoibríoch faoi (1) na teagmhais a eascraíonn go hiondúil le heintitis áirithe (bunús), (2) na teagmhais ar feidhmeanna tipiciúla na n-eintiteas iad, agus (3) caidrimh pháirt-iomlán in eintitis. Freagraíonn siad seo don qualia gníomhaireach, telic agus bunreachtúil atá lárnach don Fhoclóir Ginideach. Déanaimid cur síos ar ár n-spreagthaí agus ár modhanna chun na caidrimh qualia seo a bhaint as an Ointeolaíocht Chomhcheangail Uachtarach Molta (SUMO) agus taispeánann muid go measann anótálaithe daonna go mór mór an t-eolas a bhaintear a bheith réasúnta. Toisc go soláthraíonn ontologies bealach chun an fhaisnéis seo a struchtúrú agus a dhéanamh inrochtana do ghníomhairí agus do chórais ríomhaireachtúla go ginearálta, tá iarrachtaí ar siúl chun an fhaisnéis a bhaintear a ionchorprú i mol ontology d’acmhainní lipéadaithe róil shéimeantacha Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha, an Rich Event Ontology.', 'el': 'Η κοινή λογική, η γνώση του πραγματικού κόσμου για τα γεγονότα στα οποία συνήθως εμπλέκονται οντότητες ή "πράγματα στον κόσμο", καθώς και οι σχέσεις μερικού-ολόκληρου, είναι πολύτιμη για να επιτρέψουν στα υπολογιστικά συστήματα να αντλούν καθημερινά συμπεράσματα για τον κόσμο. Εδώ, εστιάζουμε στην αυτόματη εξαγωγή πληροφοριών σχετικά με (1) τα γεγονότα που συνήθως επιφέρουν συγκεκριμένες οντότητες (προέλευση), (2) τα γεγονότα που είναι οι τυπικές λειτουργίες των οντοτήτων και (3) τις σχέσεις μερών-ολόκληρων σε οντότητες. Αυτά αντιστοιχούν στην ενεργητική, τελική και συνταγματική ιδιότητα που είναι κεντρική στο Γενητικό Λεξικό. Περιγράφουμε τα κίνητρα και τις μεθόδους μας για την εξαγωγή αυτών των σχέσεων από την προτεινόμενη ανώτερη συγχωνευμένη οντολογία (και δείχνουμε ότι οι ανθρώπινοι σχολιαστές βρίσκουν τις πληροφορίες που εξάγονται ως λογικές. Επειδή οι οντολογίες παρέχουν έναν τρόπο διάρθρωσης αυτής της πληροφορίας και προσπέλασής της σε πράκτορες και υπολογιστικά συστήματα γενικά, βρίσκονται σε εξέλιξη προσπάθειες για την ενσωμάτωση των εξαγόμενων πληροφοριών σε έναν οντολογικό κόμβο των σημασιολογικών πόρων σήμανσης ρόλων επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, την Οντολογία Πλούσιου συμβάντος.', 'ka': "საერთო მსოფლიოში, რეალური მსოფლიო ცოცხოვრების შესახებ, რომელიც ინტერტიები ან 'საერთო მსოფლიოში' ტიპოლურად დაკავშირებულია, და მსოფლიო შესახებ, უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი იქნება აქ, ჩვენ ავტომატურად ინფორმაციის გამოყენება (1) მოვლენების შესახებ, რომლებიც ტიპულად განსაზღვრებული ინტერტიკების შესახებ, 2) მოვლენები, რომლებიც ინტერტიკების ტიპიკური ფუნქციები, და 3) ინტერ ეს კონსპორტიური, ტელექტიური და კონსტრუქტიური კოლექტიური ცენტრალური ლექსიკონის შესახებ. ჩვენ ჩვენი მოტივაციები და მეთოდიები, რომლებიც ამ კვალიტური შესახებ გააკექტრების შესახებ საზოგადო ანტოლოგიდან (SUMO) და ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ადამიანის ანტოტორიები ძალიან ძალიან აღმოჩენა ინფ იმიტომ, რომ ანტოლოგიები ამ ინფორმაციის სტრუქტურაცია და გავაკეთება ადვნენტებისა და კომპუტაციონალური სისტემისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვისთვის, რო", 'it': 'La conoscenza comune e reale degli eventi in cui le entità o le "cose del mondo" sono tipicamente coinvolte, così come le relazioni parziali, è preziosa per consentire ai sistemi computazionali di trarre conclusioni quotidiane sul mondo. Qui, ci concentriamo sull\'estrazione automatica di informazioni su (1) gli eventi che tipicamente causano determinate entità (origini), (2) gli eventi che sono le funzioni tipiche delle entità e (3) le relazioni part-whole nelle entità. Questi corrispondono alla qualità agente, telica e costitutiva centrale del Lexicon Generativo. Descriviamo le nostre motivazioni e i nostri metodi per estrarre queste relazioni di qualità dalla Suggested Upper Merged Ontology (SUMO) e mostriamo che gli annotatori umani trovano ampiamente le informazioni estratte come ragionevoli. Poiché le ontologie forniscono un modo per strutturare queste informazioni e renderle accessibili agli agenti e ai sistemi computazionali in generale, sono in corso sforzi per incorporare le informazioni estratte in un hub ontologico di risorse semantiche di etichettatura dei ruoli di Natural Language Processing, la Rich Event Ontology.', 'lt': 'Bendros, realaus pasaulio žinios apie įvykius, kuriuose paprastai dalyvauja subjektai ar "dalykai pasaulyje", taip pat apie dalinius santykius yra vertingos, kad skaičiavimo sistemos galėtų daryti kasdienes išvadas apie pasaulį. Čia daugiausia dėmesio skiriama automatiniam informacijos apie (1) įvykius, kurie paprastai sukelia tam tikrus subjektus (kilmę), (2) įvykius, kurie yra tipinės subjektų funkcijos, ir (3) dalinius santykius subjektuose. Jie atitinka Generacinio leksikono centrinę agentinę, telinę ir konstitucinę kvaliją. Mes apibūdiname savo motyvacijas ir metodus, kaip ištraukti šiuos kvalijos santykius iš siūlomos viršutinės jungtinės Ontologijos (SUMO) ir rodome, kad žmogaus anotatoriai iš esmės mano, kad gauta informacija yra pagrįsta. Kadangi ontologijos yra būdas struktūrizuoti šią informaciją ir apskritai suteikti galimybę ją naudotis agentams ir skaičiavimo sistemoms, dedamos pastangos įtraukti gautą informaciją į natūralios kalbos apdorojimo semantinio vaidmens ženklinimo išteklių ontologinį centrą, Rich Event Ontology.', 'hu': 'A valós világi tudás azokról az eseményekről, amelyekben az entitások vagy "dolgok a világon" jellemzően részt vesznek, valamint részben egész kapcsolatokról értékes ahhoz, hogy a számítástechnikai rendszerek mindennapi következtetéseket vonjanak le a világról. Itt arra összpontosítunk, hogy automatikusan információkat nyerjünk (1) azokról az eseményekről, amelyek jellemzően bizonyos entitásokat (eredeteket) hoznak létre, (2) azokról az eseményekről, amelyek jellemzően entitások funkciói, és (3) részben egész kapcsolatok entitásokban. Ezek megfelelnek a Generációs Lexikon központi ügynökségi, telikus és alkotmányos minőségének. Leírjuk motivációinkat és módszereinket annak érdekében, hogy ezeket a minőségi kapcsolatokat kivonjuk a javasolt felső egyesült ontológiából (SUMO), és megmutatjuk, hogy az emberi kommentátorok túlnyomóan ésszerűnek találják a kinyert információkat. Mivel az ontológiák lehetővé teszik ezen információk strukturálását és hozzáférhetővé tételét az ügynökök és a számítástechnikai rendszerek számára, folyamatban vannak a kivont információk beépítésére a Natural Language Processing szemantikai szerepjelölő erőforrások ontológiai központjába, a Rich Event Ontológiába.', 'ms': "Pengetahuan umum, dunia nyata mengenai peristiwa yang entiti atau 'perkara-perkara di dunia' biasanya terlibat dalam, serta hubungan sebahagian-seluruh, adalah berharga untuk membenarkan sistem komputasi untuk melukis kesimpulan setiap hari mengenai dunia. Di sini, kita fokus pada mengekstrak maklumat secara automatik mengenai (1) peristiwa yang biasanya membawa mengenai entiti tertentu (asal), (2) peristiwa yang adalah fungsi biasa entiti, dan (3) hubungan bahagian-keseluruhan dalam entiti. Ini sepadan dengan agentif, telik dan kualia konstitutif pusat kepada Lexicon Generatif. Kami menggambarkan motivasi dan kaedah kami untuk mengekstrak hubungan kualia ini dari Ontologi Bergabung Atas Tersarankan (SUMO) dan menunjukkan bahawa penganotator manusia sangat menemukan maklumat yang dikekstrak menjadi masuk akal. Kerana ontologi menyediakan cara untuk strukturkan maklumat ini dan membuatnya boleh didapati kepada ejen dan sistem komputasi secara umum, usaha sedang berlangsung untuk memasukkan maklumat ekstrak ke pusat ontologi Bahasa Sementara Memproses sumber peranan semantik, Ontologi Peristiwa Rich.", 'kk': 'Жалпы мәліметтер мен "әлемдегі нәрселер" деген оқиғалар туралы шын әлемдегі білім әдетте, және бүкіл қатынастар туралы, компьютерлік жүйелерді әлемдегі күнделіктерді түсіндіруге мүмкін болады. Мұнда біз (1) деген оқиғалар туралы автоматты түрде мәліметті (басталып) тарқатып, әдетте кейбір нысандар (басталып), 2) деген нысандардың әдеттегі функциялары және (3) бөлік қатынастары бар. Бұл агентивті, теликті және конституттық кәсіпке сәйкес келеді. Біз бұл көпшіліктерді жоғары біріктірілген онтологиядан шығару үшін мотивацияларымызды және әдістерімізді таңдап, адамдардың жаңартушылары мәліметті маңызды деп табылады. Себебі онтологиялар бұл мәліметті құрастыру және оны агенттерге және компьютерлік жүйелерге қатынауға мүмкіндік беру жолын береді, бұл мәліметті Түзіндік тіл процессорының онтологиясына қосу үшін жасалған жұмыс істейді.', 'mn': 'Олон төрлийн, ертөнцийн бүх зүйлсийн тухай бодит ертөнцийн мэдлэг нь ертөнцийн бүх харилцаанд холбогдож буй үйл явдлын тухай үнэ цэнэтэй байдаг. Энд бид (1) тодорхой байгууллагуудын тухай мэдээллийг автоматжуулахын тулд анхаарлаа анхаарлаа анхаарлаа хандуулдаг байгууллагуудын тухай (эх үүсвэр), (2) байгууллагуудын ердийн функцүүд болон (3) байгууллагуудын бүхэл харилцаа Эдгээр нь сэтгэл хөдлөл, телик болон байгууллагын төвшинд холбогддог. Бид эдгээр квалифик холбоотой холбоотой хамааралтай холбоотой урам зорилго болон арга замыг тайлбарлаж, хүн төрөлхтний сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлгомжтой мэдээллийг үнэхээр ойлгомжтой гэж олдог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Яагаад гэвэл онтологууд энэ мэдээллийг бүтээж, агентууд болон тооцоолон системд ашиглах арга замаар хангадаг. Байгалийн хэлний үйлдвэрлэлийн антологийн төвшинд гарсан мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлэх шаардлагатай.', 'mk': 'Заедничко, реално-светско знаење за настаните во кои ентитетите или „работите во светот“ обично се вклучени, како и дел-цели односи, е вредно за да им се овозможи на компјутерските системи да цртаат секојдневни конференции за светот. Тука, се фокусираме на автоматско извлекување информации за (1) настаните кои обично доведуваат до одредени ентитети (потекло), (2) настаните кои се типични функции на ентитетите, и (3) дел-цели односи во ентитетите. Овие одговараат на агентивната, теличната и конститутивната квалија централна на генеративниот лексикон. Ние ги опишуваме нашите мотивации и методи за извлекување на овие квалијански односи од Suggested Upper Merged Ontology (SUMO) и покажуваме дека човечките анотатори претежно сметаат дека извлечените информации се разумни. Бидејќи онтологиите обезбедуваат начин да ја структурираат оваа информација и да ја направат достапна за агентите и компјутерските системи генерално, се спроведуваат напори за вклучување на извадените информации во онтологијскиот центар на природниот јазик Процесирање семантични ресурси за означување на улогата, бо', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ സംഭവ്യങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും, ലോകത്തിലുള്ള സംഭവങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ജ്ഞാനവും, സാധാരണ ഭാഗമുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ചും ചേര്\u200dന്നിരിക്ക ഇവിടെ (1) സാധാരണ വസ്തുക്കളെപ്പറ്റി കൊണ്ടുവരുന്ന സംഭവങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വയം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി നമ്മള്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. സാധാരണ വസ്തുക്കളുടെ സ ജനററിവ് ലെക്സിക്സനിലേക്ക് ഇവര്\u200d ഏജന്റീവ്, ടെലിക്കിലിക്കും സംവിധാന ക്വാലിയസ് കെന്\u200dററിലേക്കും പ്രത ഈ ക്വാലിയയുടെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിനായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഉത്തരവും മാര്\u200dഗങ്ങളും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. മുകളില്\u200d നിന്ന് മുകളില്\u200d നി ഈ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനും അതിനെ സാധാരണമാക്കുന്നതിനും കണക്കുണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനും ഒരു വഴിയുണ്ട്, പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ സെമാന്റ', 'no': 'Sammenheng, verkeleg kunnskap om hendingane som einingar eller «ting i verden» er vanlegvis involvert i, og delvis heile forhold, er verdileg for å tillata datamaskinelsystemet å teikna kvardag inferensen om verden. Her fokuserer vi automatisk på å ekstrahera informasjon om (1) hendingane som vanlegvis fører til nokre einingar (opphav), (2) hendingane som er dei typiske funksjonane av einingar, og (3) delvis heile forhold i einingar. Desse tilsvarar den aktive, teliske og konstitusjonskvaliteten sentrale til den generelle leksjonen. Vi beskriver våre motivasjonar og metodar for å pakka ut desse kvalitetforholdene frå den foreslåde øvre samlinga av ontologien (SUMO) og viser at menneske annotatorar finn informasjonen utpakka for å vera raskt. Fordi ontologiar gjev ein måte å strukturere denne informasjonen og gjera det tilgjengeleg til agentar og datamaskiner generelt, er forsøk i ferd med å inkludere ekstraherte informasjon til ein ontologisk hub av naturleg språk-handtering av semantiske rolle-merking av ressursar, Rich Event Ontology.', 'pl': 'Powszechne, rzeczywiste wiedzy na temat wydarzeń, w które zazwyczaj angażują się jednostki lub "rzeczy na świecie", jak również relacje częściowo-całość, są cenne dla umożliwienia systemom obliczeniowym wyciągania codziennych wniosków o świecie. Tutaj skupiamy się na automatycznym wydobywaniu informacji o (1) zdarzeniach, które zazwyczaj powodują określone jednostki (pochodzenie), (2) zdarzeniach będących typowymi funkcjami jednostek oraz (3) relacjach częściowo-całościowych w jednostkach. Odpowiadają one kwalifikacjom agentywnym, telicznym i konstytucyjnym kluczowym dla Leksykonu Generatywnego. Opisujemy nasze motywacje i metody wydobycia tych relacji kwalia z Suggested Upper Merged Ontology (SUMO) oraz pokazujemy, że ludzie adnotatorzy przeważają uzyskane informacje za uzasadnione. Ponieważ ontologie zapewniają sposób na strukturyzację tych informacji i udostępnienie ich agentom i systemom obliczeniowym ogólnie, trwają wysiłki na rzecz włączenia wydobytych informacji do ontologicznego centrum semantycznych zasobów oznaczania roli przetwarzania języka naturalnego, Rich Event Ontology.', 'ro': 'Cunoașterea comună, a lumii reale despre evenimentele în care entitățile sau "lucrurile din lume" sunt de obicei implicate, precum și relațiile parțial-întregi, este valoroasă pentru a permite sistemelor de calcul să tragă concluzii cotidiene despre lume. Aici, ne concentrăm pe extragerea automată a informațiilor despre (1) evenimentele care aduc în mod obișnuit anumite entități (origini), (2) evenimentele care sunt funcțiile tipice ale entităților și (3) relațiile parțial-întreg în entități. Acestea corespund calității agentive, telice și constitutive centrale Lexiconului Generativ. Descriem motivațiile și metodele noastre pentru extragerea acestor relații calia din Ontologia Combinată Superioară Sugerată (SUMO) și arătăm că adnotatorii umani consideră că informațiile extrase sunt rezonabile. Deoarece ontologiile oferă o modalitate de structurare a acestor informații și de a le face accesibile agenților și sistemelor computaționale în general, sunt în curs de desfășurare eforturi pentru a integra informațiile extrase într-un centru ontologic al resurselor semantice de etichetare a rolurilor Natural Language Processing, Ontologia Rich Event.', 'mt': 'L-għarfien komuni u reali dwar l-avvenimenti li l-entitajiet jew l-“affarijiet fid-dinja” huma tipikament involuti fihom, kif ukoll relazzjonijiet parzjali sħaħ, huwa ta’ valur biex is-sistemi komputattivi jkunu jistgħu jagħmlu inferenzi ta’ kuljum dwar id-dinja. Hawnhekk, niffokaw fuq l-estrazzjoni awtomatika ta’ informazzjoni dwar (1) l-avvenimenti li tipikament iwasslu għal ċerti entitajiet (oriġini), (2) l-avvenimenti li huma l-funzjonijiet tipiċi tal-entitajiet, u (3) ir-relazzjonijiet parzjali sħaħ fl-entitajiet. Dawn jikkorrispondu mal-kwalija aġenttiva, telika u kostitwenti ċentrali għall-Lexicon Ġenerattiv. Aħna niddeskrivu l-motivazzjonijiet u l-metodi tagħna għall-estrazzjoni ta’ dawn ir-relazzjonijiet tal-kwalija mill-Ontoloġija Magħquda Superjuri Suġġerita (SUMO) u nuru li l-annotaturi umani jsibu l-informazzjoni estratta bħala raġonevoli ħafna. Minħabba li l-ontoloġiji jipprovdu mod kif tiġi strutturata din l-informazzjoni u biex tkun a ċċessibbli għall-aġenti u s-sistemi tal-komputazzjoni b’mod ġenerali, qed isiru sforzi biex l-informazzjoni estratta tiġi inkorporata f’ċentru tal-ontoloġija tal-Proċess tal-Lingwa Naturali tar-riżorsi semantiċi tat-tikkettar tar-rwol, l-Ontoloġija tal-Avvenimenti Riki.', 'sr': "Komunikacija, stvarno-svetsko znanje o događajima u kojima se entiteti ili 'stvari na svijetu' obično uključuju, kao i djelomične veze, je vrijedno za omogućavanje računalnih sistema da izvlače svakodnevne inferencije o svijetu. Ovde se fokusiramo na automatsko izvlačenje informacija o (1) događajima koji obično dovode do određenih entiteta (porekla), (2) događaja koje su tipične funkcije entiteta i (3) deocelne veze u entitetima. Ovo odgovara agentivnoj, teličnoj i ustavnoj kvaliteti centralnoj za generativnu leksiju. Mi opisujemo naše motivacije i metode za izvlačenje tih kvalitetnih odnosa iz predložene gornje spojene ontologije (SUMO) i pokazujemo da ljudski annotatori iznimno nalaze informacije izvedene da su razumne. Zato što ontologije pružaju način strukture ove informacije i čine ga dostupnim agentima i računalnim sistemima općenito, napori su u toku da uključuju izvlačene informacije u ontološki centr prirodnog jezika Processing semantičkih resursa označavanja uloga, bogatskih događaja Ontologija.", 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dයය, ඇත්ත ලෝකය දන්නවන්නේ ලෝකයේ තියෙන අවස්ථාවක් නැත්ත දේවල් ගැන, සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් සම්පූර්ණ සම්බන්ධතාවක් වගේම, ලෝකය ගැන හ මෙතන, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් තොරතුරු අරගන්න (1) ගැන සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සම්බන්ධතාවක් ගැන (ප්\u200dරභාවිතයෙන්), සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩ මේවා නියෝජිත, ටෙලික් හා නියෝජිත ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ලෙක්සිකෝන් වලට ප්\u200dරධ අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා මේ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක සම්බන්ධතාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරනවා සුන්දානය කරලා තියෙනවා මින මොකද ontologies දෙන්නේ මේ තොරතුරු සංවිධානය සහ පරිගණික පද්ධතිය සමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ඒක ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදියට, ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදියට ප්\u200dරවේශ කරලා තොරතුරු සම', 'so': "Heshiiska, aqoonta caadiga ah ee dhacdooyinka ama ''waxyaalaha dunida' sida caadiga ah waxay ku qeyb galaan iyo xiriirka qayb ahaan oo dhan, waxaa muhiim ah in la siiyo nidaamka xisaabta si ay u soo jiidaan cudurada maalin walba ee dunida. Halkan, waxaan ku kalsoonaynaa macluumaad ku saabsan (1) dhacdooyinka sida caadiga ah u keena alaabta qaarkood (asalka), (2) dhacdooyinka ay yihiin shuqullada caadiga ah ee dhamaadka jidhka iyo (3) xiriirka dhamaanka ee dhamaadka ee dhamaadka ee waxyaabaha. Kuwaasu waxay u jeedaan xarunta dhaqaalaha ee la xiriira dhaqaalaha Leksikon. Waxaynu sawirannaa waxqabadka iyo qaababka aan ka soo saarno xiriirkaas ee qofka la isku dayay ee kore (SUMO) waxaana tusnaynaa in dadka dhibaataysa ay si weyn u helaan macluumaadka la soo saaray si caqli ah. Sida darteed xirfadaha waxay u fidiyaan hab ku dhisan macluumaadkan, waxayna u isticmaali karaan dhaqaalaha iyo nidaamka xisaabta, waxay u socdaan in macluumaadka la soo saaray looga soo ururiyo qalabka afka dabiiciga ah ee qaybaha qaybta ah ee la qorayo sawirka, dhacdooyinka taajirka ah.", 'sv': 'Samförstånd, verklig kunskap om de händelser som entiteter eller "saker i världen" vanligtvis är involverade i, liksom delvis hela relationer, är värdefull för att möjliggöra beräkningssystem att dra dagliga slutsatser om världen. Här fokuserar vi på att automatiskt extrahera information om (1) de händelser som vanligtvis orsakar vissa entiteter (ursprung), (2) de händelser som är de typiska funktionerna hos entiteter, och (3) delvis hela relationer i entiteter. Dessa motsvarar den agentiva, teliska och konstitutiva kvalia centrala för Generativ Lexikon. Vi beskriver våra motivationer och metoder för att extrahera dessa kvalia-relationer från Suggested Upper Merged Ontology (SUMO) och visar att mänskliga kommentatorer överväldigande finner den information som utvinns vara rimlig. Eftersom ontologier utgör ett sätt att strukturera denna information och göra den tillgänglig för agenter och beräkningssystem generellt, pågår ansträngningar för att införliva den extraherade informationen till ett ontologiskt nav för Natural Language Processing semantic role labeling resources, Rich Event Ontology.', 'ur': 'کمپنس، حقیقی دنیا کی حقیقی معلومات جن کے بارے میں موجودات یا "دنیا کی چیزوں" معمولاً مشترک ہیں، اور تمام رابطہ، ان کے بارے میں کامپیوتر کی سیستموں کو دنیا کے بارے میں ہر روزی کے معلومات کا ذریعہ دکھانے کی اجازت دینے کے لئے مفید ہے. یہاں، ہم نے (1) کے بارے میں اطلاعات اضافہ کرنا (اضافہ کرنا) پر تمرکز کیا ہے جو معمولاً بعض اجتماعات (اصل) کے بارے میں حاصل کرتے ہیں، اور (2) ایستیموں کے معمولا فعالیت ہیں، اور (3) ایستیموں میں ایک حصہ پورا رابطہ ہے۔ یہ آئینٹیو، ٹیلیک اور قانونی کیلویٹ کے مرکزی مرکزی کے ساتھ ملتے ہیں. ہم اپنے منصوبات اور طریقوں کو توصیح دیتے ہیں کہ ان کیفی رابطہ اٹھانے کے لئے سوگندہ اوپر متحدہ اوٹولوجی (SUMO) سے اٹھانے کے لئے اور نشان دیتے ہیں کہ انسان کے اڑانے والے اس معلومات کو بہت زیادہ منطقی پاتے ہیں۔ کیونکہ انٹولوژ اس معلومات کی ساختاری کا طریقہ دیتے ہیں اور اسے اگنٹوں اور کمپیوٹریشن سیستموں کے لئے دسترسی حاصل کرنے کے لئے، اس کی کوشش کی جاتی ہے کہ انٹولوژی کو ناطبیعی زبان پرسس کی سیمنٹی رول لیبل رسسوسوں کے اوٹولوژی کے اوٹولوژی کے اوٹولوژی', 'ta': "பொருள்கள் அல்லது 'உலக விஷயங்கள்' என்ற நிகழ்வுகளை பற்றி கூடுதல் பொருள், உண்மையான உலக அறிவு பொருள்கள் சாதாரணமாக, மற்றும் பகுதி முழு தொடர்புகளும் சேர்ந்து, கணக் @ info இந்த செயல்பாட்டிற்கு, டெலிக்சிக் மற்றும் சமாதானமான குவாலியா மையம் பொருந்துகிறது. நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மேல் ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்ட இணைப்புகளிலிருந்து இந்த குவாலியா இணைப்புகளை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கான எங்கள் ஊக்குவிப்புகளையும் முறை ஏனென்றால் தொழில்நுட்பம் இந்த தகவலை உருவாக்க ஒரு வழி கொடுக்கிறது மற்றும் அதை மேலாளர்களுக்கு அணுகலாக்குகிறது மற்றும் கணக்கிடும் அமைப்புகளுக்கு அனுமதி செய்கிறது, வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட", 'vi': 'Cộng đồng, kiến thức thực tế về các sự kiện mà thực thể hay "các thứ trong thế giới" thường tham gia, cũng như các mối quan hệ tổng thể, rất có giá trị để cho phép hệ thống tính to án lấy đi những suy luận hàng ngày về thế giới. Ở đây, chúng tôi tập trung vào việc tự động khai thác thông tin về (1) các sự kiện thường mang đến các thực thể (nguồn gốc), hai) các sự kiện là các chức năng điển hình của các thực thể, và (3) các mối quan hệ tổng thể trong thực thể. Những lá thư này tương ứng với chất lượng đặc trưng, telic và Constiptive... Chúng tôi mô tả động cơ và phương pháp khai thác những mối quan hệ chất loại này từ kênh duy nhất kết hợp trên (SUMO) và cho thấy nhà biên niên đại nhân vượt trội phát hiện thông tin là hợp lý. Bởi vì các phương pháp duy nhất giúp cấu trúc thông tin này và làm cho thông tin này dễ dàng với các nhân viên và hệ thống tính to án thông tin, chúng tôi đang tiến hành để kết hợp những thông tin này vào một trung tâm khảo cổ của các nguồn lực phân biệt ngôn ngữ học', 'uz': "Commonsense, real-world knowledge about the events that entities or 'things in the world' are typically involved in, as well as part-whole relationships, is valuable for allowing computational systems to draw everyday inferences about the world.  Bu yerda, biz oddiy narsalar haqida maʼlumotni avtomatik olish uchun foydalanamiz (1) haqida foydalanuvchi hodisalar (asosida), (2) hodisalar maʼlumotlar bajariladigan hodisalarni (asl), (2) hodisalarning turli funksiyatlarini va (3) obʼektlarning hamma bogʻlamalarini bajariladi. Bu bir xil va katta kvaliya markaziga ega bo'ladi Generative Lekson. Biz quyidagi narsalarni yuqori birlashtirilgan shaxsiy aloqalarni ko'rsatuvchimiz va usullarni ko'rsamiz va inson taʼminlovchilari juda muhimiy haqiqida o'rganish mumkin. Chunki ontologiylar bu maʼlumotni yaratish va u ta'minlovchi va kompyuterlar tizimlariga ishlab chiqarishi mumkin, chunki tashkilotlarni tabiiy tillar jarayonlarining semantik role lab chiqarish imkoniyatlarini o'zgartirish uchun o'zgartirib turmoqchilar yordam beradi.", 'bg': 'Обикновено познанията от реалния свят за събитията, в които същностите или "нещата в света" обикновено са замесени, както и частично-цялостните взаимоотношения, са ценни, тъй като позволяват на изчислителните системи да правят ежедневни изводи за света. Тук се фокусираме върху автоматично извличане на информация за (1) събитията, които обикновено водят до определени субекти (произход), (2) събитията, които са типичните функции на субектите, и (3) частични взаимоотношения в субектите. Те съответстват на агентивното, теличното и конституционното качество, централно за Генеративния Лексикон. Описваме нашите мотивации и методи за извличане на тези качествени отношения от предложената горна слета онтология (и показваме, че човешките анотатори в преобладаваща степен намират извлечената информация за разумна. Тъй като онтологиите осигуряват начин за структуриране на тази информация и да я направят достъпна за агенти и изчислителни системи като цяло, се полагат усилия за включване на извлечената информация в онтологичен център на семантични ролеви ресурси за обработка на естествения език, Онтологията на богатите събития.', 'hr': "Komunikacija, znanje realnog svijeta o događajima u kojima se entiteti ili 'stvari na svijetu' obično uključuju, kao i djelomične veze, vrijedno je za omogućavanje računalnih sustava da svakodnevne inferencije crtaju o svijetu. Ovdje se fokusiramo na automatsko izvlačenje informacija o (1) događajima koji obično dovode do određenih entitata (porijekla), (2) događaja koje su tipične funkcije entitata i (3) dio cjelokupnih odnosa u entitetima. Oni odgovaraju agentivnoj, teličnoj i ustavnoj kvaliteti centralnoj za generativnu leksiju. Opišemo naše motivacije i metode za izvlačenje tih kvalitetnih odnosa iz predložene gornje spojene ontologije (SUMO) i pokazujemo da ljudski annotatori iznimno nalaze informacije izvedene da su razumne. Zato što ontologije pružaju način strukture te informacije i čine ga dostupnim agentima i računalnim sustavima općenito, napori su u toku uključenja izvučenih informacija u ontološki centr semantičkih resursa označavanja uloga prirodnog jezika, Ontologije bogatih događaja.", 'da': "Almindelig viden i den virkelige verden om de begivenheder, som enheder eller 'ting i verden' typisk er involveret i, såvel som delvist hele relationer, er værdifuld for at tillade beregningssystemer at drage dagligdags konklusioner om verden. Her fokuserer vi på automatisk at udtrække oplysninger om (1) de begivenheder, der typisk skaber bestemte enheder (oprindelse), (2) de begivenheder, der er de typiske funktioner for enheder, og (3) delhele relationer i enheder. Disse svarer til de agentive, teliske og konstitutive kvaliteter, der er centrale for Generative Lexikon. Vi beskriver vores motiver og metoder til at udtrække disse kvalia relationer fra Suggested Upper Merged Ontology (SUMO) og viser, at menneskelige kommentatorer overvældende finder de udvundne oplysninger rimelige. Fordi ontologier giver en måde at strukturere disse oplysninger på og gøre dem tilgængelige for agenter og beregningssystemer generelt, er der en indsats i gang med at indarbejde de udvundne oplysninger til et ontologi hub af Natural Language Processing semantiske rollemærkningsressourcer, Rich Event Ontology.", 'nl': "Gewoonlijk, reële kennis over de gebeurtenissen waar entiteiten of 'dingen in de wereld' typisch bij betrokken zijn, evenals deel-geheel relaties, is waardevol om computersystemen in staat te stellen dagelijkse conclusies over de wereld te trekken. Hierbij richten we ons op het automatisch extraheren van informatie over (1) de gebeurtenissen die typisch bepaalde entiteiten (oorsprong), (2) de gebeurtenissen die de typische functies van entiteiten zijn, en (3) deel-hele relaties in entiteiten. Deze komen overeen met de agentieve, telische en constitutieve kwaliteit die centraal staat in het Generatieve Lexicon. We beschrijven onze motivaties en methoden voor het extraheren van deze qualia relaties uit de Suggested Upper Merged Ontology (SUMO) en tonen aan dat menselijke annotators de geëxtraheerde informatie overweldigend redelijk vinden. Omdat ontologieën een manier bieden om deze informatie te structureren en toegankelijk te maken voor agenten en computersystemen in het algemeen, zijn er inspanningen gaande om de geëxtraheerde informatie te integreren in een ontologie hub van semantische rollabeling resources van Natural Language Processing, de Rich Event Ontology.", 'de': 'Allgemeines, reales Wissen über die Ereignisse, an denen Entitäten oder "Dinge in der Welt" typischerweise beteiligt sind, sowie Teile-Ganze-Beziehungen sind wertvoll, damit Computersysteme alltägliche Schlussfolgerungen über die Welt ziehen können. Hier konzentrieren wir uns auf das automatische Extrahieren von Informationen über (1) Ereignisse, die typischerweise bestimmte Entitäten (Ursprünge) hervorrufen, (2) Ereignisse, die die typischen Funktionen von Entitäten sind, und (3) Teil-Ganze-Beziehungen in Entitäten. Diese entsprechen der agentiven, telischen und konstitutiven Qualität, die für das Generative Lexikon zentral ist. Wir beschreiben unsere Motivationen und Methoden zur Extraktion dieser Qualia-Beziehungen aus der Suggested Upper Merged Ontology (SUMO) und zeigen, dass menschliche Annotatoren die extrahierten Informationen überwiegend für sinnvoll halten. Da Ontologien eine Möglichkeit bieten, diese Informationen zu strukturieren und für Agenten und Computersysteme allgemein zugänglich zu machen, werden Anstrengungen unternommen, die extrahierten Informationen in einen Ontologie-Hub der semantischen Rollenmarkierungsressourcen Natural Language Processing, die Rich Event Ontology, zu integrieren.', 'id': "Pengetahuan umum, dunia nyata tentang peristiwa bahwa entitas atau 'hal-hal di dunia' biasanya terlibat dalam, serta beberapa hubungan seluruh, adalah berharga untuk memungkinkan sistem komputasi untuk menggambar kesimpulan setiap hari tentang dunia. Di sini, kita fokus pada secara otomatis mengekstraksi informasi tentang (1) peristiwa yang biasanya membawa entitas tertentu (asal), (2) peristiwa yang adalah fungsi tipis entitas, dan (3) hubungan bagian-seluruh dalam entitas. Ini cocok dengan agen, telik dan kualia konstitutif pusat untuk Generative Lexicon. Kami menjelaskan motivasi dan metode kami untuk mengekstraksi hubungan kualia ini dari Ontologi Bergabung Atas Tersaran (SUMO) dan menunjukkan bahwa annotator manusia sangat menemukan informasi yang dikekstraksi menjadi masuk akal. Karena ontologi menyediakan cara untuk mengkonstruksikan informasi ini dan membuatnya tersedia untuk agen dan sistem komputasi secara umum, usaha sedang berlangsung untuk mengikorporasi informasi ekstrakt ke pusat ontologi bahasa alam Proses peran semantis label sumber daya, Ontologi Kejadian Kaya.", 'fa': 'معمولاً دانش دنیای واقعی در مورد اتفاقات که اجتماع یا چیزها در دنیا معمولاً درگیر می\u200cشوند، همچنین رابطه\u200cهای قسمتی کل، ارزشمند برای اجازه دادن سیستم\u200cهای کامپیوتری که روزی در مورد دنیا آلودگی\u200cهای روزی درگیر می\u200cشوند. در اینجا، ما روی اخراج اطلاعات خودکار در مورد (1) اتفاقات که معمولاً در مورد برخی برخی برخی برخی برخی از برخی برخی برخی برخی برخی از برخی برخی برخی از برخی برخی برخی برخی از برخی برخی برخی برخی برخی برخی بر این\u200cها به عنوان کیفیت ماموریت، تلیک و قانونی مرکزی مرکزی به لکسیسون نسل ارتباط دارند. ما انگیزه\u200cهایمان و روش\u200cهایمان را برای اخراج این ارتباط\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای از اونتولوژی بالا پیشنهاد شده (SUMO) توصیف می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که اخراج کننده\u200cهای انسان اطلاعات را خیلی منطقی پیدا می\u200cکنند. چون آنتولوژی\u200cها راهی برای ساختن این اطلاعات را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند و آن را برای ماموران و سیستم\u200cهای کامپیوتری به طور کلی دسترسی می\u200cدهند، تلاش\u200cها در حال حاضر است که اطلاعات اخراج شده را در یک مرکز ontology از نقشه\u200cهای نقشه\u200cهای semantic labeling Resources Rich Event Ontology در یک مرکز تحلیل زبان', 'sw': "Mabaliano, maarifa halisi ya dunia kuhusu matukio yanayohusiana na vyombo vya habari au 'vitu vya dunia' kwa kawaida yanahusika, pamoja na mahusiano yote, ni muhimu kwa kuruhusu mfumo wa kompyuta kuchora magonjwa ya kila siku duniani. Here, we focus on automatically extracting information about (1) the events that typically bring about certain entities (origins), (2) the events that are the typical functions of entities, and (3) part-whole relationships in entities.  Haya yanajibu kwa kituo cha viwanja, kilichotengeneza na kikatiba cha kikatiba cha Lexico. Tunaelezea hamasa zetu na njia zetu za kuondoa mahusiano haya ya qualia kutoka kwenye toleo la Mtandao wa Juu la Juu (SUMO) na kuonyesha kwamba matatizo ya watu wanaweza kutafuta taarifa zilizotolewa kuwa sahihi. Because ontologies provide a way of structuring this information and making it accessible to agents and computational systems generally, efforts are underway to incorporate the extracted information to an ontology hub of Natural Language Processing semantic role labeling resources, the Rich Event Ontology.", 'af': "Commonsense, reël wêreld kennis oor die gebeurtenis wat entiteite of 'dinge in die wêreld' tipies insluit word, en ook deel-hele verwantighede, is waardelik vir toelaat rekenaasjonale stelsels om elke dag inferensies oor die wêreld te teken. Hier, ons fokus op outomaties uitpak inligting oor (1) die gebeurtenis wat tipies oor sekere entiteite (origins), (2) die gebeurtenis wat die tipiese funksies van entiteite is, en (3) deel-hele verwantings in entiteite. Hierdie ooreenstem aan die agentiewe, telike en konstitusielike kwaliteit sentrale aan die Genereerde Leksiek. Ons beskryf ons motivasies en metodes vir uitpakking van hierdie kwaliteit relasies van die voorgestelde Boonste Gesamelede Ontologie (SuMO) en wys dat menslike annotators oorvloedig die inligting uitpak om redelik te wees. Want ontologies verskaf 'n manier om hierdie inligting te struktuur en dit te maak toeganklik tot agente en rekenaasjonale stelsels algemeen, is die versoekte onderwerp om die uitgevoerde inligting te inkorpreer tot 'n ontologie hub van Natuurlike Taal Bewerking semantiese rol merking hulpbronne, die Rich Event Ontology.", 'ko': "상식, 실체나'세계의 사물'이 일반적으로 다루는 사건에 대한 진실한 세계 지식과 부분-전체적인 관계는 계산 시스템이 세계에 대해 일상적인 추측을 허용하는 데 가치가 있다.여기서 우리는 (1) 일반적으로 일부 실체(기원)를 초래하는 사건, (2) 실체의 전형적인 기능으로서의 사건, 그리고 (3) 실체 중의 부분-전체 관계에 대한 정보를 자동으로 추출하는 데 중심을 두었다.이런 것들은 어휘 생성의 중심에 대응하는 능동성, 종결성과 구성성에 대응한다.우리는 우리가 건의한 상합병본체(SUMO)에서 이러한 품질 관계를 추출하는 동기와 방법을 묘사하였으며, 인류 주석자들은 절대 다수가 추출한 정보가 합리적이라고 여긴다는 것을 나타냈다.본체론은 이 정보를 구축하고 에이전트와 계산 시스템에 접근할 수 있는 방법을 제공하기 때문에 추출한 정보를 자연 언어 처리 의미 역할 표기 자원의 본체 중심, 즉 사건 본체에 통합시키기 위해 노력하고 있다.", 'am': "ትምህርት፣ አካባቢዎች ወይም 'በዓለም ያሉ ነገሮች' በሚያሳዩ ነገር እና የክፍለ ግንኙነት ሁሉ ላይ የሚጠያየቁ እውነተኛ ዓለም እውቀት በዓለም ላይ የዕለት ዕለት ድካም ማቀናቀል ዋጋ ነው፡፡ ወደዚህ፣ ስለ አካባቢ አካላት (origins), (2) የሚደረገውን ጉዳዮች እና (3) የክፍለ ጉዳይ ሙሉ ግንኙነቶችን በአካባቢዎች ላይ ማሳየት እናስማማታለን፡፡ These correspond to the agentive, telic and constitutive qualia central to the Generative Lexicon.  እነዚህን ቁልፍ ግንኙነታችንን ከስሙዮ (SUMO) ለመውጣት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ምክንያቱም ኢንተሎጂዎች ይህንን መረጃ መሠረት እና ለተቀናቀሉ ስርዓቶች እና የቁጥጥር ስርዓቶች ለመቀናቀል የሚችሉትን የውጤት መረጃዎችን ለባሕርያዊ ቋንቋ መሥራት የsemantic ተግባር ሀብትን እና የሀብታም ጉዳይ አውቶሎጂ ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡", 'sq': "Njohja e përbashkët e botës reale rreth ngjarjeve në të cilat njësitë apo 'gjërat në botë' janë tipikisht të përfshira si dhe marrëdhëniet pjesërisht të tëra, është e vlefshme për të lejuar sistemet llogaritarë të tërheqin përfundime të përditshme rreth botës. Këtu, ne përqëndrohemi në nxjerrjen automatike të informacionit rreth (1) ngjarjeve që zakonisht sjellin rreth njësive të caktuara (origjina), (2) ngjarjeve që janë funksionet tipike të njësive dhe (3) marrëdhënieve pjesërisht të tëra në njësi. Këto korrespondojnë me agjentin, telikun dhe kualijën përbërëse në qendër të Lexikonit Gjenerativ. Ne përshkruajmë motivimet dhe metodat tona për të nxjerrë këto marrëdhënie kualije nga Ontologjia e Sugjeruar e Përbashkët (SUMO) dhe tregojmë se anotatorët njerëzorë gjejnë në mënyrë të madhe informacionin e nxjerrë të jetë i arsyeshëm. Because ontologies provide a way of structuring this information and making it accessible to agents and computational systems generally, efforts are underway to incorporate the extracted information to an ontology hub of Natural Language Processing semantic role labeling resources, the Rich Event Ontology.", 'hy': 'Հիմնական, իրական աշխարհի գիտելիքները այն իրադարձությունների մասին, որոնց մեջ սովորաբար ներգրավված են էության կամ «աշխարհի բաների» մեջ, ինչպես նաև մասամբ ամբողջ հարաբերությունների մեջ, արժեքավոր են համակարգչային համակարգերի թույլ տալու առօրյա հետևանքներ աշխարհի մասին: Այստեղ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք այն մասին, որ ինքնաբերաբար տեղեկատվություն ստանանք (1) այն իրադարձությունների մասին, որոնք սովորաբար հանգեցնում են որոշ կազմակերպությունների (ծագումների), 2) իրադարձությունների մասին, որոնք կազմակերպությունների բնորոշ ֆունկցիաներ են, և (3) կազմակեր Սրանք համապատասխանում են Գեներատիվ Լեքսիկոնի կենտրոնային, հելիկ և բաղադրական քալիային: Մենք նկարագրում ենք մեր մոտիվացիաները և մեթոդները, որպեսզի վերցնենք այս կալիայի հարաբերությունները Suggered Uper-Միացված Օնթոլոգիայից (ՍՈՄՕ) և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մարդկային նոտատորները գտնում են, որ վերցված տեղեկատվությունը խելամիտ է: Քանի որ օնտոլոգիաները հնարավորություն են տալիս կառուցվածել այս տեղեկատվությունը և դարձնել այն հասանելի գործիչների և համակարգչային համակարգերի համար ընդհանուր առմամբ, փորձություններ են կատարվում վերցված տեղեկատվությունը ներառելու բնական լեզվի մշակույթի բունտոլոգիայի կենտրոնում, որը նշանակում', 'bs': "Komunikacija, znanje realnog svijeta o događajima u kojima se entiteti ili 'stvari na svijetu' obično uključuju, kao i djelomične veze, vrijedno je za omogućavanje računalnih sistema da izvlače svakodnevne inferencije o svijetu. Ovdje se fokusiramo na automatsko izvlačenje informacija o (1) događajima koji obično dovode do određenih entitata (porijekla), (2) događaja koje su tipične funkcije entitata i (3) deocjelokupne odnose u entitetima. Ovo odgovara agentnim, teličkim i ustavnim kvalitetima centralnom za generativnu leksiju. Opišemo naše motivacije i metode za izvlačenje tih kvalitetnih odnosa iz predložene gornje spojene ontologije (SUMO) i pokazujemo da ljudski annotatori iznimno nalaze informacije izvedene da su razumne. Zato što ontologije pružaju način strukture ove informacije i čine ga dostupnim agentima i računalnim sistemima općenito, napori su u toku da uključuju izvučene informacije u ontološki centr semantičkih resursa označavanja uloga prirodnog jezika, Ontologija bogatih događaja.", 'bn': "কমন্সেন্স, বাস্তব বিশ্বের জ্ঞান যে ঘটনাগুলো সাধারণত বা পৃথিবীর বিষয়গুলো 'বিষয়গুলো' সাথে পুরো সম্পর্কের সাথে জড়িত, সেগুলোতে গণনাত্রিক ব্যবস এখানে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তথ্য বের করার ব্যাপারে মনোযোগ দিচ্ছি (১) ঘটনাগুলো যা সাধারণত কিছু বস্তুর (প্রথম), (২) ঘটনাগুলো যা বস্তুর সাধারণ কাজ এবং (৩)  These correspond to the agentive, telic and constitutive qualia central to the Generative Lexicon.  আমরা আমাদের উদ্দেশ্য ও পদ্ধতি বর্ণনা করি প্রস্তাবিত এই কোয়েলিয়া সম্পর্ক বের করার জন্য এবং সার্ভারের উপরের সংযুক্ত অনটলোগির (এসউএমও) থেকে বের করার জন্য এবং  কারণ এই তথ্য তৈরি করা এবং সাধারণত এজেন্ট এবং গণনামূলক সিস্টেমের কাছে প্রবেশ করার একটি উপায় প্রদান করে যাচ্ছে, সাধারণত প্রচেষ্টা হচ্ছে স্বাভাবিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার সেমান্টিক ভূম", 'az': 'Kommunikasiya, həqiqət dünya elmi, həmçin in "dünyadakı şeylər" olaraq, həmçinin bütün ilişkiler arasında, hesap sistemlərinin hər gün dünya haqqında dəyişiklik çəkməsinə münasibdir. Beləliklə, biz (1) haqqında məlumatları avtomatik əlavə edirik ki, bəzi məlumatlar haqqında, bəzi məlumatlar haqqında, bəzi məlumatlar haqqında, bəzi məlumatlar haqqında, bəzi məlumatlar haqqında, bəzi məlumatlar haqqında, bəzi məlumatlar haqqında, bəzi məlumatlar haqqında, bəzi mə Bunlar genellik Leksika\'nın mərkəzi aģentiv, telik və konstitiv qüdrətinə uyuşar. Biz bu qabiliyyat ilişkiləri təmin edilən yüksək ontologiya (SUMO) tərəfind ən çıxartmaq üçün motivasiyalarımızı və metodlarımızı təsdiqləyirik və insan danışmaqlarının çox dəyərli olaraq çıxarılmış məlumatları anlayırıq. Çünki ontoloji bu məlumatları strukturya və bilgisayar sistemlərinə istifadə edə biləcəyi bir yol təmin edir, təbiətli dil işləməsi semantik rol etiketləməsi mənzillərinin, Zengin Vaqiyyət Ontologiyasının ontoloji məlumatını bir ontoloji hub ına qovuşdurmağa çalışır.', 'ca': "El coneixement comú i del món real sobre els esdeveniments en els quals les entitats o les coses del món estan tipicament involucrats, com també les relacions parcials, és valuós per permetre als sistemes computacionals dibuixar inferències cotidianes sobre el món. Here, we focus on automatically extracting information about (1) the events that typically bring about certain entities (origins), (2) the events that are the typical functions of entities, and (3) part-whole relationships in entities.  Aquestes corresponden a la qualia agentiva, tèlica i constitutiva central al Lexicó Generatiu. Descrivem les nostres motivacions i mètodes per extrair aquestes relacions de qualia de l'Ontologia Suprema Combinada Sugerida (SUMO) i demostrem que els anotators humans troben que la informació extraida és raonable. Perquè les ontologies proporcionen una manera d'estructurar aquesta informació i d'accedir-la a agents i sistemes computacionals en general, estan fent esforços per incorporar la informació extraïda a un centre ontologic del Procesador de Llingua Natural que etiqueta recursos semàntics de rol, l'Ontologia d'Events Rich.", 'et': 'Üldmõistlikud reaalmaailma teadmised sündmustest, millega olemid või "asjad maailmas" tavaliselt seotud on, samuti osaliselt terviklikud suhted, on väärtuslikud arvutussüsteemide võimaldamiseks teha igapäevaseid järeldusi maailma kohta. Siin keskendume automaatsele teabe väljavõtmisele (1) sündmuste kohta, mis tavaliselt toovad kaasa teatud olemid (päritolu), (2) sündmuste kohta, mis on olemite tüüpilised funktsioonid, ja (3) osaliste terviklike suhete kohta olemites. Need vastavad Generatiivse leksikoni kesksele agentiivsele, telilisele ja konstitutiivsele kvalifikatsioonile. Kirjeldame oma motivatsioone ja meetodeid nende kvaliteedisuhete ekstraheerimiseks soovitatud ülemisest ühendatud ontoloogiast (SUMO) ning näitame, et inimeste annotatorid peavad ekstraheeritud teavet enamasti mõistlikuks. Kuna ontoloogiad pakuvad võimalust selle teabe struktureerimiseks ja kättesaadavaks muutmiseks agentidele ja arvutussüsteemidele üldiselt, on käimas jõupingutusi ekstraheeritud teabe lisamiseks looduskeele töötlemise semantilise rolli märgistamise ressursside ontoloogiakeskusesse Rich Event Ontology.', 'cs': 'Běžné, reálné znalosti o událostech, do nichž se obvykle zapojují entity nebo "věci ve světě", stejně jako část-celek vztahy, jsou cenné pro umožnění výpočetním systémům vyvozovat každodenní závěry o světě. Zde se zaměřujeme na automatické extrahování informací o (1) událostech, které typicky přinášejí určité entity (původy), (2) událostech, které jsou typickými funkcemi entit, a (3) částečně-celé vztahy v entitách. Ty odpovídají agentivní, telické a konstitutivní kvalitě, která je centrální pro Generační Lexikon. Popisujeme naše motivace a metody pro extrakci těchto kvalitních vztahů z Suggested Horner Merged Ontology (SUMO) a ukazujeme, že lidské anotátory považují extrahované informace za rozumné. Protože ontologie poskytují způsob, jak strukturovat tyto informace a zpřístupnit je agentům a výpočetním systémům obecně, probíhá snaha začlenit extrahované informace do ontologického centra sémantických zdrojů pro označování rolí zpracování přírodního jazyka, Rich Event Ontologie.', 'fi': 'Yleinen, reaalimaailman tieto tapahtumista, joihin entiteetit tai "maailman asiat" ovat tyypillisesti mukana, sekä osittaiset suhteet, on arvokasta, jotta laskennalliset järjestelmät voivat tehdä jokapäiväisiä päätelmiä maailmasta. Tässä keskitytään automaattisesti poimimaan tietoja (1) tapahtumista, jotka tyypillisesti aiheuttavat tiettyjä entiteettejä (alkuperä), (2) tapahtumista, jotka ovat entiteettien tyypillisiä toimintoja, ja (3) osittaisista suhteista entiteeteissä. Nämä vastaavat Generatiivisen Lexikonin keskeistä agentiivista, telistä ja constitutiivista laatua. Kuvaamme motiivejamme ja menetelmiämme näiden kvalita-suhteiden erottamiseksi Suggested Upper Merged Ontology -menetelmästä (SUMO) ja osoitamme, että ihmisen merkinnät ovat ylivoimaisesti kohtuullisia. Koska ontologit tarjoavat keinon jäsentää tätä tietoa ja tehdä siitä yleisesti agenttien ja laskennallisten järjestelmien saatavilla, on käynnissä pyrkimyksiä sisällyttää poimittu tieto ontologian keskukseen Natural Language Processing semantic role label resources, Rich Event Ontology.', 'tr': 'Munu흫 du첵dury, d체n첵채de bir zatlar 첵a-da "d체n첵채de zatlar" hakynda bilim sistemalary d체n첵채de birn채챌e 챌yky힊 bolup ge챌ir첵채r. B채rde, birn채챌e birn채챌e guramlar (origins), birn채챌e birn채챌e guramlar barada (1) informasi첵a a챌makda 체ns ber첵채ris. Olar birn채챌e birn채챌e guramlar barada (2) birn채챌e guramlar we (3) birn채챌e ili힊kiler bar. Bular aja첵yp, telik we konstitucional hasaplaryna g철r첵채rler. Biz bu wajyplary흫 체st bir topar ontologi첵any흫 (SUMO) tarapyndan gola첵larymyzy we y철nlerimizi bu wajyplary 챌ekmek 체챌in tassykla첵arys we adamlary흫 nusgalaryny흫 gaty d체힊체njeli bolmagyny d체힊체ndir첵채ris. 횉체nki ontologiler bu maglumaty d체zenlemek we a 친entlere we kalkular sistemalara el첵eterlik etmek 체챌in bir 첵oly sa첵la첵arlar, tebigy diller i힊lemek 체챌in a힊yrylan maglumaty tebes etmek 체챌in 챌철zil첵채rler. Semantik roli etiketlemek 체챌in, ba첵 bolan Ontologi첵a(Rich Event Ontologi첵a).', 'sk': 'Splošno, resnično znanje o dogodkih, v katere so običajno vključeni entitete ali "stvari v svetu", pa tudi delno celotni odnosi, je dragoceno, ker računalniškim sistemom omogoča, da pripravijo vsakodnevne sklepe o svetu. Tukaj se osredotočamo na samodejno pridobivanje informacij o (1) dogodkih, ki običajno povzročajo določene entitete (izvor), (2) dogodkih, ki so tipične funkcije entitet, in (3) delno celotnih odnosih v entitetah. Ti ustrezajo agentivni, telični in konstitutivni kvalifikaciji, osrednji za Generativni leksikon. Opisujemo naše motivacije in metode za pridobivanje teh kvalifikacijskih odnosov iz predlagane zgornje združene ontologije (SUMO) in pokažemo, da so pridobljene informacije v veliki meri razumne. Ker ontologije zagotavljajo način strukturiranja teh informacij in njihovo dostopnost agentom in računalniškim sistemom na splošno, potekajo prizadevanja za vključitev pridobljenih informacij v ontološko vozlišče semantičnih virov za označevanje vlog naravnega jezika, Ontologijo bogatih dogodkov.', 'ha': 'Umarnin komandanci, da sanin halin duniya a kan munayen da abubuwa ko \'abubuwa cikin duniya\' za su yi shiyya a bayan, da kuma da danganyen rabo-dukkan, yana da kimar da za\'a yarda da tsarin lissafar da za\'a karɓi mala\'a koyau a cikin duniya. Bu, munã fokusar da shirin nuna bayan information farat ɗaya game da (1) alama masu cikin abubuwa da ke zo da shi a bayan abu (origin), "2" (abu da aka sani) da alamomi waɗanda ke cikin musamman abubuwa, da (3) da danganta guda-duk cikin abubuwa. Waɗannan sunã kambu da mataimaki na mataimaki, teleki da katibati zuwa jeniya Lekson. Tuna bayyana kashi da hanyoyinmu dõmin ka sami waɗannan jama\'a daga SUMO wanda aka umurce shi na ƙari na haɗi (SUMO). Saboda haka, ontogi yana samar da wani hanci na tsari wannan information kuma ya sami shi da amfani da mataimaki na masu tsarin matsayi a jumla, ko yana tafiyar da aikin za\'a haɗa bayanin da aka nuna shi zuwa wani hubbo na Lugha na Natural Jarayi, mai fassarar mutane na fassarar mataimaki, Gani na Tajiri.', 'jv': "Komunasi, alam-alam sing paling-alam kuwi events sing dikarepaké karo 'dino sing katêpakan' supaya sakjane karo perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan mat komputar, iso disebarke sistem komputar kanggo ngelarang jut ujaran kanggo awak dhéwé. Punika, kita dipontrol kanggo liwat cara-cara informasi ning (1) events sing dipun automaneh dumateng manut karo ingkang sampeyan (sisan ingkang butek), 2) events sing dipun dianggawe funksi karo ingkang sampeyan (3) sampeyan akeh barêng-barêng Puno mengko karo ajan-ajan, telik lan kelas-ajan sing isih perusahaan ning angkang Leksion Generve. Awak dhéwé nambah perbudhakan karo hal-hal nggawe perusahaan karo ngono nggawe barang nggawe barang iki dadi ono wektu nggawe Ontologhi (SUMO) lan nambah kita alam sing apik dhéwé, mengko iso nggawe informasi luwih apik dhéwé, winih. Soalé ontlogis mbukaké sistem structural informasi iki dan nggawe ngejaraké apakno karo sistem komputer, jênêmêr, kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngubah informasi sing berarti bantuan ingkang ontlogis", 'bo': "མཐོང་སྣང་། དངོས་ཡིག་དང་ 'འཛམ་གླིང་ཐོག་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་'གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་དང་། འབྲེལ་བ་ཆ་ཚང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡད་པའི་རིགས་རྩིས་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དུས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་བྱ་ཚུལ་དག་གི་ཐོག་ལས། འདི་དག་ནི་ཕལ་ཆེན་རིས་དང་སྒྲིག་ཐལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཚོར་མཁན་གྱི་དབུས་མཐུན་གྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་དང་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བཙལ་ནས་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་འདི་ཚོ་སྤྲོད་ནས་བསྡད་ཡོད། Because ontologies provide a way of structuring this information and making it accessible to agents and computational systems generally, efforts are underway to incorporate the extracted information to an ontology hub of Natural Language Processing semantic role labeling resources, the Rich Event Ontology.", 'he': 'ידע משותף בעולם האמיתי על האירועים שבהם יחידות או "דברים בעולם" מעורבים בדרך כלל, כמו גם מערכות יחסים חלקיות שלמות, הוא חשוב לאפשר מערכות מחשביות לצייר משמעות יומיות על העולם. Here, we focus on automatically extracting information about (1) the events that typically bring about certain entities (origins), (2) the events that are the typical functions of entities, and (3) part-whole relationships in entities.  אלה מתאימים לסוכן, טליק וקווליה המרכזית לקסיקון הגנרטיבי. אנחנו מתארים את המוטיבציות והשיטות שלנו להוציא מערכות יחסים קוויה אלה מהאונטולוגיה המתולבת העליונה המוצעת (SUMO) ולהראות כי ציונים אנושיים מוצאים באופן עצום את המידע המווצא להיות הגיוני. מכיוון שאונטולוגיות מספקות דרך להבנה את המידע הזה ולעשות אותו זמין לסוכנים ומערכות מחשבים באופן כללי, מאמצים מתקדמים כדי להכניס את המידע המווצא למרכז אונטולוגי של שיפות טבעיות'}
{'en': 'Using Formulaic Expressions in Writing Assistance Systems', 'ar': 'استخدام التعبيرات الصيغية في أنظمة مساعدة الكتابة', 'pt': 'Usando Expressões Fórmulas em Sistemas de Assistência à Escrita', 'es': 'Uso de expresiones de fórmulas en sistemas de asistencia para la escritura', 'fr': "Utilisation d'expressions formulaires dans les systèmes d'aide à la rédaction", 'ja': '書き込み支援システムでの数式の使用', 'zh': '佐统用公式化表达式', 'hi': 'लेखन सहायता प्रणालियों में सूत्रीय अभिव्यक्तियों का उपयोग करना', 'ru': 'Использование формульных выражений в системах помощи при написании', 'ga': 'Ag baint úsáide as Léirithe Foirmiúla i gCórais Chúnaimh Scríobh', 'el': 'Χρήση τυπικών εκφράσεων σε συστήματα βοήθειας γραφής', 'hu': 'Képleti kifejezések használata az írást segítő rendszerekben', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Жазу көмектесу жүйелерінде формулалық өрнегі қолданылады', 'ms': 'Mengguna ungkapan Formula dalam Sistem Bantuan Tulis', 'mk': 'Користење формални изрази во системите за пишување на помош', 'lt': 'Rašymo pagalbos sistemose naudojami formuliniai išraiškiniai', 'it': 'Utilizzo di espressioni formule nei sistemi di assistenza alla scrittura', 'ml': 'എഴുതുന്ന സഹായ സിസ്റ്റം എഴുതുന്നതില്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dമുലിക് പ്രഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു', 'mt': 'Using Formulaic Expressions in Writing Assistance Systems', 'no': 'Bruk formulære uttrykk i skrivehjelpesystemet', 'pl': 'Używanie wyrażeń formułowych w systemach wspomagania pisania', 'sr': 'Koristeći formularne izraze u sistemima pomoći pisanja', 'ro': 'Utilizarea expresiilor formula în sistemele de asistență la scriere', 'mn': 'Бичих тусламжтай системд хэлбэрийн илэрхийллийг ашиглах', 'si': 'ලියනය සහාය පද්ධතියේදී ප්\u200dරවේශනය භාවිත කරන්න', 'so': 'Isticmaalka formulaic expressions in Writing Assistance Systems', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Använda formulära uttryck i skrivhjälpssystem', 'ur': 'لکھنے کی مدد سیسٹم میں فرمولی اکسپیشن استعمال کیا جاتا ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sử dụng Biểu hiện Formula trong hệ thống hỗ trợ Viết', 'bg': 'Използване на формулирани изрази в системи за подпомагане на писането', 'hr': 'Koristeći formularne izraze u sustavima pomoći pisanja', 'da': 'Brug af formulære udtryk i skrivehjælpesystemer', 'nl': 'Formulaïsche expressies gebruiken in schrijfassistentiesystemen', 'de': 'Verwenden von Formulaic Expressions in Schreibassistenzsystemen', 'id': 'Menggunakan Ekspresi Formula dalam Sistem Bantuan Menulis', 'ko': '창작 보조 시스템에서 공식화 표현을 사용하다', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia Maelezo ya Kiformala katika Mfumo wa Kuandika Usaidizi', 'fa': 'استفاده از واژه\u200cهای فرمولی در سیستم\u200cهای کمک نوشتن', 'tr': 'Ýaz Ýardam Sistemleri', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i shprehjeve formulare në sistemet e ndihmës për shkrim', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով ֆորմուլային արտահայտություններ գրողական օգնության համակարգերում', 'bn': 'লেখক সহায়তা সিস্টেমে ফরমুলিক এক্সপ্রেশন ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'az': 'Yazma Yard캼m Sisteml톛rind톛 Form칲lik 캻fad톛l톛ri kullan캼l캼r', 'ca': "Utilitzant expressions fòrmules en sistemes d'assistència d'escriptura", 'cs': 'Použití vzorcových výrazů v asistenčních systémech psaní', 'fi': 'Kaavaavien ilmaisujen kĂ¤yttĂ¤minen kirjoitusapujĂ¤rjestelmissĂ¤', 'et': 'Valemiliste avaldiste kasutamine kirjutamise abisüsteemides', 'bs': 'Koristeći formularne izraze u sistemima pomoći pisanja', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Panjenengan Senegal', 'sk': 'Uporaba formulalnih izrazov v sistemih pomoči pri pisanju', 'he': 'השימוש ביטויים פורמוליים במערכות עזרה לכתיבה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'རྩིས་འབྲི་ནུས་སྤྱོད་མ་ལག་གི་ཐོག་མཛོད་ཁོངས་སྤྱོད་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'Formulaic expressions (FEs) used in scholarly papers, such as ‘there has been little discussion about’, are helpful for non-native English speakers. However, it is time-consuming for users to manually search for an appropriate expression every time they want to consult FE dictionaries. For this reason, we tackle the task of semantic searches of FE dictionaries. At the start of our research, we identified two salient difficulties in this task. First, the paucity of example sentences in existing FE dictionaries results in a shortage of context information, which is necessary for acquiring semantic representation of FEs. Second, while a semantic category label is assigned to each FE in many FE dictionaries, it is difficult to predict the labels from user input, forcing users to manually designate the semantic category when searching. To address these difficulties, we propose a new framework for semantic searches of FEs and propose a new method to leverage both existing dictionaries and domain sentence corpora. Further, we expand an existing FE dictionary to consider building a more comprehensive and domain-specific FE dictionary and to verify the effectiveness of our method.', 'ar': 'التعبيرات الصيغية (FEs) المستخدمة في الأوراق البحثية ، مثل "كان هناك القليل من النقاش حول" ، مفيدة لغير الناطقين باللغة الإنجليزية. ومع ذلك ، يستغرق المستخدمون وقتًا طويلاً في البحث يدويًا عن تعبير مناسب في كل مرة يريدون الرجوع إلى قواميس FE. لهذا السبب ، نتعامل مع مهمة البحث الدلالي لقواميس FE. في بداية بحثنا ، حددنا صعوبتين بارزتين في هذه المهمة. أولاً ، ينتج عن ندرة الجمل النموذجية في قواميس FE الحالية نقص في معلومات السياق ، وهو أمر ضروري للحصول على التمثيل الدلالي لـ FEs. ثانيًا ، بينما يتم تعيين تسمية فئة دلالية لكل FE في العديد من قواميس FE ، فمن الصعب التنبؤ بالتسميات من إدخال المستخدم ، مما يجبر المستخدمين على تعيين الفئة الدلالية يدويًا عند البحث. لمعالجة هذه الصعوبات ، نقترح إطارًا جديدًا للبحث الدلالي لـ FEs ونقترح طريقة جديدة للاستفادة من كل من القواميس الحالية ومجمل جملة المجال. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بتوسيع قاموس FE الحالي للنظر في إنشاء قاموس FE أكثر شمولاً وخاصًا بالمجال وللتحقق من فعالية طريقتنا.', 'pt': "Expressões formuladas (FEs) usadas em artigos acadêmicos, como 'há pouca discussão sobre', são úteis para falantes não nativos de inglês. No entanto, é demorado para os usuários procurarem manualmente uma expressão apropriada toda vez que desejam consultar os dicionários FE. Por esta razão, abordamos a tarefa de buscas semânticas de dicionários de EF. No início de nossa pesquisa, identificamos duas dificuldades salientes nessa tarefa. Primeiro, a escassez de sentenças de exemplo nos dicionários de EF existentes resulta em uma escassez de informações de contexto, que é necessária para adquirir representação semântica de EFs. Em segundo lugar, enquanto um rótulo de categoria semântica é atribuído a cada EF em muitos dicionários de EF, é difícil prever os rótulos a partir da entrada do usuário, forçando os usuários a designar manualmente a categoria semântica ao pesquisar. Para lidar com essas dificuldades, propomos um novo framework para buscas semânticas de EFs e propomos um novo método para alavancar tanto dicionários existentes quanto corpora de sentenças de domínio. Além disso, expandimos um dicionário de EF existente para considerar a construção de um dicionário de EF mais abrangente e específico de domínio e para verificar a eficácia do nosso método.", 'fr': "Les expressions formaiques (FE) utilisées dans les articles savants, telles que «\xa0there has been little discussion about\xa0», sont utiles pour les anglophones non natifs. Cependant, il est fastidieux pour les utilisateurs de rechercher manuellement une expression appropriée chaque fois qu'ils souhaitent consulter des dictionnaires FE. C'est pourquoi nous nous attaquons à la tâche des recherches sémantiques dans les dictionnaires FE. Au début de nos recherches, nous avons identifié deux difficultés majeures dans cette tâche. Tout d'abord, la rareté des exemples de phrases dans les dictionnaires FE existants entraîne une pénurie d'informations contextuelles, ce qui est nécessaire pour acquérir une représentation sémantique des FE. Deuxièmement, alors qu'une étiquette de catégorie sémantique est attribuée à chaque FE dans de nombreux dictionnaires FE, il est difficile de prévoir les étiquettes à partir des entrées utilisateur, ce qui oblige les utilisateurs à désigner manuellement la catégorie sémantique lors de la recherche. Pour remédier à ces difficultés, nous proposons un nouveau cadre pour les recherches sémantiques des FE et proposons une nouvelle méthode pour tirer parti à la fois des dictionnaires existants et des corpus de phrases de domaine. De plus, nous élargissons un dictionnaire FE existant pour envisager de créer un dictionnaire FE plus complet et spécifique au domaine et pour vérifier l'efficacité de notre méthode.", 'es': 'Las expresiones de fórmula (FE) utilizadas en artículos académicos, como «se ha discutido poco», son útiles para los angloparlantes no nativos. Sin embargo, a los usuarios les lleva mucho tiempo buscar manualmente una expresión adecuada cada vez que quieren consultar diccionarios FE. Por esta razón, abordamos la tarea de las búsquedas semánticas de los diccionarios FE. Al comienzo de nuestra investigación, identificamos dos dificultades importantes en esta tarea. En primer lugar, la escasez de oraciones de ejemplo en los diccionarios de FE existentes resulta en una escasez de información de contexto, que es necesaria para adquirir una representación semántica de las FE. En segundo lugar, si bien se asigna una etiqueta de categoría semántica a cada FE en muchos diccionarios de FE, es difícil predecir las etiquetas a partir de la entrada del usuario, lo que obliga a los usuarios a designar manualmente la categoría semántica al realizar búsquedas. Para abordar estas dificultades, proponemos un nuevo marco para las búsquedas semánticas de EF y proponemos un nuevo método para aprovechar tanto los diccionarios existentes como los corpus de oraciones de dominio. Además, ampliamos un diccionario FE existente para considerar la creación de un diccionario FE más completo y específico del dominio y para verificar la eficacia de nuestro método.', 'ja': '「に関する議論はほとんど行われていない」など、学術論文で使用されている数式表現（ FE ）は、非ネイティブの英語話者にとって役立ちます。 ただし、ユーザーがFE辞書を参照するたびに適切な式を手動で検索するのは時間がかかります。 このため、FE辞書のセマンティック検索という課題に取り組んでいる。 研究の開始時に、私たちはこのタスクの2つの顕著な困難を特定しました。 まず、既存のFE辞書における例文の不足は、FEの意味表現を取得するために必要なコンテキスト情報の不足をもたらす。 第二に、多くのFE辞書では各FEにセマンティックカテゴリラベルが割り当てられているが、ユーザ入力からラベルを予測することは困難であり、ユーザは検索時にセマンティックカテゴリを手動で指定する必要がある。 これらの困難に対処するために、我々はFEの意味論的検索のための新しいフレームワークを提案し、既存の辞書とドメイン文体の両方を活用する新しい方法を提案する。 さらに、既存のFE辞書を拡張して、より包括的でドメイン固有のFE辞書の構築を検討し、メソッドの有効性を検証します。', 'hi': "विद्वानों के पत्रों में उपयोग किए जाने वाले सूत्रबद्ध अभिव्यक्तियों (एफई) जैसे कि 'इसके बारे में बहुत कम चर्चा हुई है', गैर-देशी अंग्रेजी बोलने वालों के लिए सहायक हैं। हालांकि, उपयोगकर्ताओं के लिए हर बार जब वे एफई शब्दकोशों से परामर्श करना चाहते हैं तो मैन्युअल रूप से एक उपयुक्त अभिव्यक्ति की खोज करना समय लेने वाला है। इस कारण से, हम एफई शब्दकोशों की शब्दार्थ खोजों के कार्य से निपटते हैं। हमारे शोध की शुरुआत में, हमने इस कार्य में दो प्रमुख कठिनाइयों की पहचान की। सबसे पहले, मौजूदा एफई शब्दकोशों में उदाहरण वाक्यों की कमी के परिणामस्वरूप संदर्भ जानकारी की कमी होती है, जो एफई के शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व को प्राप्त करने के लिए आवश्यक है। दूसरा, जबकि एक शब्दार्थ श्रेणी लेबल को कई एफई शब्दकोशों में प्रत्येक एफई को सौंपा जाता है, उपयोगकर्ता इनपुट से लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करना मुश्किल है, जिससे उपयोगकर्ताओं को खोजते समय मैन्युअल रूप से शब्दार्थ श्रेणी को नामित करने के लिए मजबूर किया जाता है। इन कठिनाइयों को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एफई की शब्दार्थ खोजों के लिए एक नए ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं और मौजूदा शब्दकोशों और डोमेन वाक्य निगम दोनों का लाभ उठाने के लिए एक नई विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम एक अधिक व्यापक और डोमेन-विशिष्ट एफई शब्दकोश के निर्माण पर विचार करने और हमारी विधि की प्रभावशीलता को सत्यापित करने के लिए एक मौजूदा एफई शब्दकोश का विस्तार करते हैं।", 'zh': '学术论文之用公式化表(FE),如"议论甚寡",对非英语母语人士有济焉。 然用户每欲阅 FE 字典手动搜索得表达式甚耗时。 由此言之,FE字典语义搜索。 论始之时,见此事之两难也。 先是,FE 字典中示例句之匮,上下文息之短,而上下文之于取 FE 者语义必矣。 其次,虽诸 FE 字典中每 FE 分语义类,然难于用户输,使用户搜索手动指语义类也。 为此一新框架以索FE语义,因一字典、领域语料库新法。 又广见 FE 字典,以思构更详特定于域之 FE 字典,验吾法之有效性。', 'ru': 'Формулярные выражения (FE), используемые в научных работах, такие как «было мало дискуссий о», полезны для не-носителей английского языка. Тем не менее, пользователям требуется много времени, чтобы вручную искать подходящее выражение каждый раз, когда они хотят обратиться к словарям FE. По этой причине мы решаем задачу семантического поиска словарей FE. В начале нашего исследования мы определили две основные трудности в этой задаче. Во-первых, нехватка примеров предложений в существующих словарях FE приводит к нехватке контекстной информации, которая необходима для получения семантического представления FE. Во-вторых, хотя метка семантической категории присваивается каждому FE во многих словарях FE, трудно предсказать метки от пользовательского ввода, заставляя пользователей вручную назначать семантическую категорию при поиске. Для устранения этих трудностей мы предлагаем новую структуру семантического поиска FE и предлагаем новый метод для использования как существующих словарей, так и корпусов доменных предложений. Кроме того, мы расширяем существующий FE-словарь, чтобы рассмотреть возможность создания более полного и специфичного для конкретной области FE-словаря и проверить эффективность нашего метода.', 'ga': 'Tá nathanna foirmiúla (FEs) a úsáidtear i bpáipéir léannta, mar ‘ní raibh mórán plé faoi’ ina gcuidiú do chainteoirí Béarla neamhdhúchais. Tógann sé go leor ama, áfach, d’úsáideoirí slonn oiriúnach a chuardach de láimh gach uair is mian leo dul i gcomhairle le foclóirí FE. Ar an ábhar sin, téimid i ngleic le cuardach séimeantach ar fhoclóirí breisoideachais. Ag tús ár dtaighde, d’aithníomar dhá dheacracht shuntasacha sa tasc seo. Ar an gcéad dul síos, mar gheall ar ghanntanas abairtí samplacha i bhfoclóirí breisoideachais atá ann cheana féin tá ganntanas faisnéise comhthéacs, atá riachtanach chun léiriú shéimeantach ar FEanna a fháil. Ar an dara dul síos, cé go sanntar lipéad catagóir shéimeantach do gach FE i go leor foclóirí FE, tá sé deacair na lipéid a thuar ó ionchur úsáideoirí, rud a chuireann iallach ar úsáideoirí an chatagóir shéimeantach a ainmniú de láimh agus iad ag cuardach. Chun dul i ngleic leis na deacrachtaí seo, molaimid creat nua le haghaidh cuardaigh shéimeantacha ar FEanna agus molaimid modh nua chun na foclóirí atá ann cheana féin agus corpora abairtí fearainn araon a ghiaráil. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid leathnú ar fhoclóir FE atá ann cheana féin chun smaoineamh ar fhoclóir FE níos cuimsithí agus a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfearann a thógáil agus chun éifeachtacht ár modha a fhíorú.', 'ka': "ფორმულური გამოსახულებები (FES) სტუდენური დოკუმენტებში გამოყენებული, როგორც `არსებობს პატარა დისკუმენტების შესახებ', მხოლოდ ანგლისური მუშაობისთვის მაგრამ მომხმარებისთვის მარტივი გამოსახულების შესაძლებელი გამოსახულების შესაძლებლობა ყოველ შემთხვევაში, როდესაც ისინი გსურთ კონსტურაციას FE სიტყვა ამის მიზეზით, ჩვენ FE სიტყვანის სემონტიკური ძებნა დავწყებთ. ჩვენი სწავლობას დასაწყისაში, ჩვენ ორი სწავლობული რთულია ამ დავალებში. პირველად, მაგალითად, FE სიტყვანში მაგალითად სიტყვანის დამატება შეიძლება კონტექსტური ინფორმაციის დამატება, რომელიც საჭიროა FES-ის სენმანტიკური გამოსახულებაში. მეორე, როცა ყოველ FE სიტყვანში სმენტიკური კატეგორია დააყენებულია, მაგრამ ძალიან რთულია მომხმარებლის შენახვედან, მომხმარებლის მართლად სმენტიკური კატეგორია დააყენება. ამ რთულებების შესახებ, ჩვენ ახალი ფესმენტიკური ძიება FES-ს და ახალი პროგრამის შესახებ, რომელიც არსებობს სიტყვების და დემონიკური სიტყვების კოპორაციას. შემდეგ, ჩვენ განვითარებით FE სიტყვანის სიტყვანი, რომელიც უფრო უკეთესი და დიომინური FE სიტყვანის შექმნა და ჩვენი მედიოდის ეფექტიურობას დავწეროთ.", 'el': 'Οι τυπικές εκφράσεις (FEs) που χρησιμοποιούνται σε επιστημονικές εργασίες, όπως "υπήρξε μικρή συζήτηση για", είναι χρήσιμες για τους μη φυσικούς ομιλητές της αγγλικής γλώσσας. Ωστόσο, είναι χρονοβόρο για τους χρήστες να αναζητούν χειροκίνητα μια κατάλληλη έκφραση κάθε φορά που θέλουν να συμβουλευτούν λεξικά FE. Για το λόγο αυτό, αντιμετωπίζουμε το έργο των σημασιολογικών αναζητήσεων των λεξικών FE. Στην αρχή της έρευνάς μας εντοπίσαμε δύο σημαντικές δυσκολίες σε αυτό το έργο. Πρώτον, η έλλειψη παραδειγματικών προτάσεων στα υπάρχοντα λεξικά οδηγεί σε έλλειψη πληροφοριών περιβάλλοντος, η οποία είναι απαραίτητη για την απόκτηση σημασιολογικής αναπαράστασης των ΦΑ. Δεύτερον, ενώ μια σημασιολογική ετικέτα κατηγοριών εκχωρείται σε κάθε σε πολλά λεξικά είναι δύσκολο να προβλεφθούν οι ετικέτες από την εισαγωγή χρήστη, αναγκάζοντας τους χρήστες να ορίσουν χειροκίνητα τη σημασιολογική κατηγορία κατά την αναζήτηση. Για την αντιμετώπιση αυτών των δυσκολιών, προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο για σημασιολογικές αναζητήσεις των ΦΑ και προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για να αξιοποιήσουμε τόσο τα υπάρχοντα λεξικά όσο και τα σώματα προτάσεων τομέα. Επιπλέον, επεκτείνουμε ένα υπάρχον λεξικό για να εξετάσουμε τη δημιουργία ενός πιο περιεκτικού και ειδικού τομέα λεξικού και να επαληθεύσουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της μεθόδου μας.', 'hu': 'A tudományos tanulmányokban használt képleti kifejezések, mint például "kevés vitát folytattak", hasznosak a nem anyanyelvűek számára. Mindazonáltal időigényes, hogy a felhasználók manuálisan keressenek egy megfelelő kifejezést minden alkalommal, amikor az FE szótárakat szeretnék megtekinteni. Ezért foglalkozunk az FE szótárak szemantikai keresésével. Kutatásunk kezdetén két jelentős nehézséget azonosítottunk ebben a feladatban. Először is, a meglévő FE szótárak példamondatainak szűkössége a kontextusinformációk hiányát eredményezi, ami szükséges a FE szemantikai ábrázolásához. Másodszor, míg számos FE szótárban szemantikus kategóriacímkét rendelnek minden FE-hez, nehéz megjósolni a címkéket a felhasználói bemenetből, ami arra kényszeríti a felhasználókat, hogy manuálisan jelöljék ki a szemantikai kategóriát a keresés során. E nehézségek kezelése érdekében új keretrendszert javasolunk a FE-k szemantikai keresésére, és új módszert javasolunk mind a meglévő szótárak, mind a domain mondat corpora kihasználására. Továbbá bővítünk egy meglévő FE szótárat, hogy fontolóra vegyük egy átfogóbb és domain-specifikus FE szótár kialakítását, és ellenőrizzük módszerünk hatékonyságát.', 'it': "Le espressioni formulaiche (FE) utilizzate in articoli accademici, come `c'è stata poca discussione su ', sono utili per i non madrelingua inglese. Tuttavia, è necessario che gli utenti cerchino manualmente un'espressione appropriata ogni volta che vogliono consultare dizionari FE. Per questo motivo affrontiamo il compito delle ricerche semantiche dei dizionari FE. All'inizio della nostra ricerca, abbiamo individuato due difficoltà salienti in questo compito. In primo luogo, la scarsità di frasi di esempio nei dizionari FE esistenti provoca una carenza di informazioni di contesto, che è necessaria per acquisire la rappresentazione semantica delle FE. In secondo luogo, mentre un'etichetta semantica di categoria è assegnata a ogni FE in molti dizionari FE, è difficile prevedere le etichette dall'input dell'utente, costringendo gli utenti a designare manualmente la categoria semantica durante la ricerca. Per affrontare queste difficoltà, proponiamo un nuovo framework per le ricerche semantiche delle FE e proponiamo un nuovo metodo per sfruttare sia i dizionari esistenti che i corpora delle frasi di dominio. Inoltre, espandiamo un dizionario FE esistente per considerare la costruzione di un dizionario FE più completo e specifico per il dominio e per verificare l'efficacia del nostro metodo.", 'lt': 'Moksliniuose dokumentuose vartojami formuliniai žodžiai (FE), pavyzdžiui, „apie kuriuos nebuvo daug diskutuojama“, naudingi ne gimtųjų anglų kalbėtojams. Tačiau vartotojams reikia laiko rankiniu būdu ieškoti tinkamos išraiškos kiekvieną kartą, kai jie nori konsultuotis su FE žodynais. Dėl šios priežasties sprendžiame FE žodynų semantinių paieškų užduotį. At the start of our research, we identified two salient difficulties in this task.  Pirma, esamuose FE žodynuose trūksta pavyzdžių sakinių, todėl trūksta informacijos apie aplinkybes, kuri būtina norint įgyti FE semantinį atstovavimą. Antra, nors daugelyje FE žodynų kiekvienam FE skiriama semantinė kategorijos etiketė, sunku numatyti etiketes iš naudotojo įvesties, priversti naudotojus rankiniu būdu nurodyti semantinę kategoriją ieškant. To address these difficulties, we propose a new framework for semantic searches of FEs and propose a new method to leverage both existing dictionaries and domain sentence corpora.  Be to, išplėsime esamą FE žodyną, kad apsvarstytume galimybę sukurti išsamesnį ir konkrečiai sritims skirtą FE žodyną ir patikrintume mūsų metodo veiksmingumą.', 'ms': "Ungkapan formulir (FE) yang digunakan dalam kertas sains, seperti `terdapat sedikit diskusi tentang', membantu untuk pembicara bahasa Inggeris bukan asli. Namun, ia memakan masa bagi pengguna untuk mencari secara manual ungkapan yang sesuai setiap kali mereka mahu konsultasi kamus FE. Untuk sebab ini, kita menghadapi tugas pencarian semantik kamus FE. Pada permulaan kajian kami, kami mengenali dua kesulitan yang penting dalam tugas ini. First, the paucity of example sentences in existing FE dictionaries results in a shortage of context information, which is necessary for acquiring semantic representation of FEs.  Kedua, semasa label kategori semantik ditugaskan kepada setiap FE dalam banyak kamus FE, sukar untuk meramalkan label dari input pengguna, memaksa pengguna untuk menandakan kategori semantik secara manual semasa mencari. Untuk mengatasi kesulitan ini, kami melamar kerangka baru untuk mencari FE semantik dan melamar kaedah baru untuk menggunakan kedua-dua kamus dan kalimat domain corpora. Lagipun, kami mengembangkan kamus FE yang ada untuk mempertimbangkan membina kamus FE yang lebih komprensif dan spesifik domain dan untuk mengesahkan kegunaan kaedah kami.", 'mk': 'Формулалните изрази (ФЕ) кои се користат во научните весници, како што е „малку разговараше за“, им помагаат на англиските говорници кои не се родни. Сепак, потребно е време корисниците рачно да бараат соодветен израз секој пат кога сакаат да се консултираат со речниците на ФЕ. Од оваа причина, се справуваме со задачата на семантичното пребарување на речниците на ФЕ. На почетокот на нашето истражување, идентификувавме две значајни тешкотии во оваа задача. Прво, недостатокот на примерни реченици во постојните речници на ФЕ резултира со недостаток на контекстни информации, што е неопходно за добивање семантично претставување на ФЕ. Второ, додека семантичка категорија е доделена на секоја ФЕ во многу речници на ФЕ, тешко е да се предвидат етикетите од внесувањето на корисникот, принудувајќи ги корисниците рачно да ја одредат семантичката категорија при пребарувањето. За да ги решиме овие тешкотии, предложуваме нова рамка за семантични пребарувања на ФЕ и предложуваме нов метод за искористување на постоечките речници и доменската реченица корпора. Further, we expand an existing FE dictionary to consider building a more comprehensive and domain-specific FE dictionary and to verify the effectiveness of our method.', 'ml': 'സ്കൂളിലുള്ള പേപ്പറുകളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഫോര്\u200dമുലിക്ക് പ്രഭാഷണങ്ങള്\u200d (എഫ്എസ്) പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നത്, അതിനെപ്പറ്റി സംസാരിക എങ്കിലും FE നിഘണ്ടുകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ആഗ്രഹിക്കുമ്പോഴെല്ലാം ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സമയം ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200d കൈക അതിനുവേണ്ടിയാണ് നമ്മള്\u200d എഫ് നിഘണ്ടികങ്ങളുടെ സെമാന്റിക് തെരച്ചിലുള്ള ജോലിയെ നോക്കുന്നത്. നമ്മുടെ ഗവേഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ തുടക്കത്തില്\u200d, ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d രണ്ട് കഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തി. ആദ്യം, നിലവിലുള്ള FE നിഘണ്ടീകരണങ്ങളിലുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നം എഫ് എസിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക് പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുവാന്\u200d ആവശ്യമുള് രണ്ടാമത്, ഒരു സെമാന്റിക് വ്യവസ്ഥയുടെ എല്ലാ FE നിഘണ്ടികങ്ങളിലും ഏല്\u200dപിക്കപ്പെടുമ്പോള്\u200d, തെരയുമ്പോള്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള ലേബുകള്\u200d പ് ഈ പ്രയാസങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, എഫ്എസിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് തെരച്ചിലുകള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഒരു പുതിയ ഫ്രെയിമെന്\u200dറ് പ്രൊജക്ക്  അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള FE നിഘണ്ടി വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. കൂടുതല്\u200d സൂക്ഷ്മതയുള്ള ഒരു ഡോമെയിന്\u200d നിഘണ്ടി പണിയാനും നമ്മുടെ ര', 'kk': 'Білім қағаздарда қолданылатын формулалық өрнектері (ФЕС), мысалы "жұмыс істеген" ағылшынша сөйлейтіншілер үшін көмектеседі. Бірақ, пайдаланушылар FE сөздіктеріне сәйкес келгенде қолмен керек өрнегі іздеу үшін уақыт пайдаланушысы. Бұл себебі FE сөздіктерінің семантикалық іздеу тапсырмасын шешуіміз керек. Біздің зерттеулеріміздің басында бұл тапсырманың екі қажеттігін анықтадық. Біріншіден, FE сөздіктерінде мысал сөздерінің қауіпсіздігі контексті мәліметтерінің қауіпсіздігіне сәйкес береді. Бұл FE симпатикалық түрін алу үшін керек. Екіншіден, FE сөздіктерінде әрбір FE санаттарына семантикалық санаттар жарлығы берілген кезде, пайдаланушының келтірілген жарлықтарын көрсету қиын, іздегенде пайдаланушылардың semantiкалық санаттарын қолмен таңдау үші Бұл мәселелерді өзгерту үшін, біз FES симантикалық іздеу үшін жаңа фреймін жұмыс істеп, бар сөздіктерді және домен сөздіктерді корпораға көмектесу үшін жаңа әдісін таңдап Келесіден біз бар FE сөздігін кеңейту үшін толық және доменге арналған FE сөздігін құру үшін және әдіміздің эффективнігін тексеру үшін қолданатын.', 'mt': 'L-espressjonijiet formulari (FEs) użati f’dokumenti ta’ studju, bħal “ma kienx hemm ftit diskussjoni dwarhom”, huma ta’ għajnuna għal kelliema Ingliżi mhux nattivi. However, it is time-consuming for users to manually search for an appropriate expression every time they want to consult FE dictionaries.  Għal din ir-raġuni, nindirizzaw il-kompitu ta’ tiftix semantiku tad-dikjararji tal-FE. Fil-bidu tar-riċerka tagħna, identifikajna żewġ diffikultajiet importanti f’dan il-kompitu. L-ewwel nett, in-nuqqas ta’ sentenzi eżempji fid-dikjararji eżistenti tal-FE jirriżulta f’nuqqas ta’ informazzjoni ta’ kuntest, li hija meħtieġa biex tinkiseb rappreżentanza semantika tal-FEs. It-tieni nett, filwaqt li tikketta semantika tal-kategorija hija assenjata lil kull FE f’ħafna dikjararji tal-FE, huwa diffiċli li t-tikketti jiġu mbassra mill-input tal-utent, li tobbliga lill-utenti jinnominaw manwalment il-kategorija semantika meta jkunu qed ifittxu. Biex nindirizzaw dawn id-diffikultajiet, nipproponu qafas ġdid għat-tiftix semantiku tal-FEs u nipproponu metodu ġdid għall-ingranaġġ kemm tad-dikjararji eżistenti kif ukoll tas-sentenza tad-dominju korpra. Barra minn hekk, nispandu d-dikjararju eżistenti tal-FE biex nikkunsidraw il-bini ta’ dikjararju tal-FE aktar komprensiv u speċifiku għad-dominju u biex tivverifika l-effettività tal-metodu tagħna.', 'ro': "Expresiile formula (FE) folosite în lucrările științifice, cum ar fi `nu s-a discutat puțin despre ', sunt utile pentru vorbitorii de engleză care nu sunt nativi. Cu toate acestea, este nevoie de timp pentru utilizatori să caute manual o expresie adecvată de fiecare dată când doresc să consulte dicționarele FE. Din acest motiv, abordăm sarcina căutărilor semantice ale dicționarelor FE. La începutul cercetării noastre, am identificat două dificultăți importante în această sarcină. În primul rând, lipsa propozițiilor de exemplu din dicționarele FE existente duce la o lipsă de informații contextuale, care este necesară pentru dobândirea reprezentării semantice a FE. În al doilea rând, în timp ce o etichetă de categorie semantică este atribuită fiecărei FE în multe dicționare FE, este dificil de prezis etichetele de la intrarea utilizatorului, forțând utilizatorii să desemneze manual categoria semantică atunci când caută. Pentru a aborda aceste dificultăți, propunem un nou cadru pentru căutările semantice ale FE și propunem o nouă metodă de a valorifica atât dicționarele existente, cât și corporele de propoziții de domeniu. Mai mult, extindem un dicționar FE existent pentru a lua în considerare construirea unui dicționar FE mai cuprinzător și specific domeniului și pentru a verifica eficiența metodei noastre.", 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны цаасан дээр хэрэглэгдсэн хэлбэрүүдийн илэрхийллүүд (FES) нь Англи хэлний хэлэгчдэд тусалдаг. Гэхдээ хэрэглэгчид FE үгийг зөвшөөрөхийг хүссэн бүрт зөвхөн зөв илэрхийлэл хайх цаг хугацаа хэрэглэдэг. Ийм шалтгаанаас бид FE сөрөг сөрөгчийн семантик хайлтын ажлыг зохицуулдаг. Судалгааны эхлээд бид энэ даалгаврын хоёр хэцүү асуудлыг олж мэдсэн. Эхлээд, FE өгүүлбэр дээрх жишээлүүдийн алдагдал нь харьцуулалтын мэдээллийн алдагдлыг олж авдаг. Энэ нь FE-ын semantic үзүүлбэр хэрэгтэй. Хоёрдугаар, FE-н хэлний үлгэр бүрт semantic category label хэвлэгдсэн ч хэрэглэгчийн орлуулалтын тэмдэглэлийг тодорхойлох нь хэцүү, хэрэглэгчид хайх үед semantic category-г гараар зааж өгдөг. Эдгээр хэцүү зүйлсийг удирдахын тулд бид FES-ийн семантик хайлтын шинэ хэлбэрийг санал болгож, суурилсан сөрөгч болон домгийн үгийн корпора хоёуланг ашиглах шинэ арга санал болгож байна. Дараа нь, бид оршиж байгаа FE үгүйлтэй нэмэгдүүлсэн бөгөөд хамааралтай, дотоод тодорхой FE үгүйлтэй бүтээх болон бидний арга замын үр дүнг шалгахын тулд илүү бүрэн тодорхойлдог.', 'pl': 'Wyrażenia formułowe używane w pracach naukowych, takie jak "nie było wiele dyskusji", są pomocne dla osób niebędących ojczystym językiem angielskim. Jednak czasochłonne jest dla użytkowników ręczne wyszukiwanie odpowiedniego wyrażenia za każdym razem, gdy chcą zapoznać się ze słownikami FE. Z tego powodu podejmujemy zadanie semantycznego wyszukiwania słowników FE. Na początku naszych badań zidentyfikowaliśmy dwie istotne trudności w tym zadaniu. Po pierwsze, brak przykładowych zdań w istniejących słownikach FE powoduje brak informacji kontekstowych, które są niezbędne do uzyskania semantycznej reprezentacji FEs. Po drugie, podczas gdy etykieta kategorii semantycznej jest przypisywana do każdego FE w wielu słownikach FE, trudno jest przewidzieć etykiety z wejścia użytkownika, zmuszając użytkowników do ręcznego wyznaczania kategorii semantycznej podczas wyszukiwania. Aby rozwiązać te trudności, proponujemy nowe ramy semantycznego wyszukiwania FEs i proponujemy nową metodę wykorzystania zarówno istniejących słowników, jak i korpusów zdań domeny. Ponadto rozszerzamy istniejący słownik FE, aby rozważyć budowę bardziej kompleksowego i specyficznego dla domeny słownika FE i zweryfikować skuteczność naszej metody.', 'no': 'Formulære uttrykk (FE) brukt i lærskilde papir, slik som «det har vært lite diskusjon om», er nyttig for ikkje-native engelske taler. Det er likevel tidspunkt for brukarar å søkja etter eit passande uttrykk manuelt kvar gong dei vil konsultera med FE- ordbokar. I denne grunnen løyser vi oppgåva for semantiske søk på FE-ordbokar. På begynnelsen av forskninga våre identifiserte vi to salient difficulties i denne oppgåva. Først resulterer feil av eksempel setningar i eksisterande FE-ordbokar i ein kort mange kontekstinformasjon, som er nødvendig for å henta semantisk representasjon av FE. For andre, mens ein semantisk kategorimerkelapp er tilordna kvar FE i mange FE- ordbokar, er det vanskeleg å foregå merkelappen frå brukaren- inndata, og forandra brukarar å oppgje semantisk kategori manuelt når søkjer. For å handtera desse vanskelighetane, foreslår vi eit nytt rammeverk for semantisk søk på FES og foreslår ein ny metode for å levera både eksisterande ordbokstavar og domenesetningskområde. I tillegg utvida vi eit eksisterande FE-ordbok for å tenke på å bygge eit meir komplekst og domenespesifikke FE-ordbok og for å verifisere effektiviteten av metoden vårt.', 'sr': 'Formulični izraz (FE) koji se koristi u naučnim papirima, kao što je „o malom raspravu“, pomaže neprodičnim engleskim govornicima. Međutim, potrošenje vremena je da korisnici ručno traže odgovarajući izraz svaki put kad žele da se konsultuju sa rečnicima FE-a. Zbog ovog razloga, riješimo zadatak semantičkih pretraživanja reči FE-a. Na poèetku našeg istraživanja, identifikovali smo dve saliène probleme u ovom zadatku. Prvo, nedostatak primjernih rečenica u postojećim rečenicama FE rezultira nedostatak kontekstskih informacija, koja je potrebna za dobivanje semantičkog predstavljanja FE-a. Drugo, dok se semantička etiketa kategorije određuje svakoj FE u mnogim rečnicima FE-a, teško je predvidjeti etikete od ulaska korisnika, prisiljavajući korisnike da ručno određuju semantičku kategoriju kada traži. Da bi se riješili ovim poteškoćama, predlažemo novi okvir za semantičke pretraživanje FE-a i predložimo novi metod da utiče na postojeće rečenice i korporu kazne za domenu. Nadalje, proširili smo postojeći rečnik FE kako bi razmotrili izgradnju sveobuhvatnijeg i domeničkog rečnika FE-a i proverili učinkovitost našeg metoda.', 'so': "Erayada rasmiga ah (FEs) ee lagu isticmaalay warqadaha iskuulka ah, tusaale ahaan `dacwad yar looga hadlin', waxay caawinayaan dadka afka Ingiriiska ah oo aan aheyn. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa isticmaalayaasha waqtiga loo isticmaalayo in ay si qof ah u raadsadaan hadal ku habboon mar kasta oo ay doonayaan inay la taliyaan luqadaha FE. Sababtaas darteed, waxaynu xambaaraynaa shaqada baaritaanka luqadaha FE. Bilowgii baaritaanka waxbarashadeenna, waxaynu ogaanay laba dhibaatooyin oo la xiriiray shaqadan. Marka ugu horeysa, dhamaanshaha tusaale ahaan kaliyooyinka FE ee heysta waxay ka resultiyaan gaaban macluumaad xiriir ah, kaas oo loo baahan yahay in loo helo qayb ka mid ah FEs. Second, while a semantic category label is assigned to each FE in many FE dictionaries, it is difficult to predict calaamada laga soo bandhigo input, forcing users to manually design the semantic category when searching. Si aan u qabsado dhibaatadan, waxaynu u soo jeedinnaa shirkad cusub oo aad u raadineyso FEs, waxaana soo jeedinaynaa qaab cusub oo aad u soo bandhigto korporada xafiiska ku jira iyo qeybta internetka. Further more, waxaynu sii fidinnaa dictionaan FE oo jira si a an uga fikirinno dhisidda luqada FE ee hoos-dhexe iyo deegaan oo gaar ah iyo si aan u xaqiijinno awoodkeenna.", 'si': "විද්\u200dයාවික විස්තර (FEs) ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විද්\u200dයාපාරයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ, වගේම `ගැන පොඩි කතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ', ඉන්ග්\u200dරීසි  නමුත්, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ වලට හැම වෙලාවෙම සම්පූර්ණයක් හොයාගන්න වෙලාවක් විතරයි. මේ හේතුවෙන්, අපි FE වචනාකරුවන්ගේ සිමාන්තික හොයාගන්න වැඩක් කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ පටන් ගත්තේ අපි මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් හොයාගත්තා. මුලින්, ඉතින් FE වචනයේ උදාහරණ වචනයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ සංවේදනය තොරතුරු අඩුවෙන් ඉතින්, ඒක අවශ දෙවෙනි විදියට, සෙමැන්ටික් වර්ගයක් ලේබල් හැම FE වර්ගයක්ම හැම FE වර්ගයක්ම සැලසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා නම්, භාවිතා ඇතුළුම් වලින් ලේබල්  මේ අමාරුවන් විධානය කරන්න, අපි අලුත් ෆෙස් පරීක්ෂණයක් සඳහා අලුත් පරීක්ෂණයක් සඳහා අලුත් පරීක්ෂණයක් සඳහා අලුත් විධාන තවත්, අපි තියෙන්නේ FE වචනාකරණයක් විස්තර කරනවා විශේෂයෙන් තවත් සම්පූර්ණයෙන් සහ ඩොමේන් විශේෂය FE වචනාකරණයක්", 'ta': "பொதுவான எழுத்துக்களில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட வடிவத்தின் கூறுகள் 'சிறிய விவாதத்தில் இருந்தது' போன்று உதவுகிறது தாய் ஆங்கிலத்தில் இல் However, it is time-consuming for users to search for an appropriate expression every time they want to consult FE dictionaries. இந்த காரணத்திற்காக, நாம் FE அகராதிகளின் பெம்பென்டிக் தேடும் செயலை பொருட்படுத்துகிறோம். ஆராய்ச்சியின் ஆரம்பத்தில், இந்த பணியில் இரண்டு விற்பனையான பிரச்சனைகளை கண்டுபிடித்தோம். முதலில், இருக்கும் FE அகராதிகளில் உள்ள உதாரணமான வாக்கியங்களின் குறைவு காணவில்லை FEs யின் semantic representation பெறுவதற்கு தேவையானது. Second, a semantic category label is assigned to each FE in many FE dictionaries, it is difficult to predict the labels from user input, forcing users to manually design the semantic category when searching. இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க, நாம் FEs யின் புதிய சட்டத்தை தேடுகிறோம் மற்றும் இருக்கும் அகராதிகள் மற்றும் களம் வாக்கு நிறுவனத மேலும், நாம் ஒரு இருக்கும் FE அகராதியை விரிவாக்கினோம் ஒரு மிக சூழ்நிலையான மற்றும் களம் குறிப்பிட்ட FE அகராதியை உருவாக்குவதற்", 'sv': "Formulära uttryck (FE) som används i vetenskapliga artiklar, såsom `det har varit lite diskussion om', är användbara för icke-infödda engelsktalande. Det är dock tidskrävande för användare att manuellt söka efter ett lämpligt uttryck varje gång de vill konsultera FE-ordböcker. Därför tar vi oss an uppgiften att semantiska sökningar av FE lexikon. I början av vår forskning identifierade vi två väsentliga svårigheter i denna uppgift. För det första leder bristen på exempelmeningar i befintliga FE-ordböcker till brist på sammanhangsinformation, vilket är nödvändigt för att förvärva semantisk representation av FE. För det andra, medan en semantisk kategorietikett tilldelas varje FE i många FE-ordböcker, är det svårt att förutsäga etiketterna från användarens inmatning, vilket tvingar användare att manuellt ange den semantiska kategorin när de söker. För att ta itu med dessa svårigheter föreslår vi ett nytt ramverk för semantiska sökningar av FE och föreslår en ny metod för att utnyttja både befintliga ordböcker och domänmeningskorpor. Vidare utökar vi en befintlig FE lexikon för att överväga att bygga en mer omfattande och domänspecifik FE lexikon och för att verifiera effektiviteten av vår metod.", 'ur': 'جو علمی کاغذوں میں استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں، جیسے "بہت کم بحث کی گئی ہے" انگلیسی صحبت کرنے والوں کے لئے مددگار ہیں. However, it is time-consuming for users to manually search for an appropriate expression every time they want to consult FE dictionaries. اسی وجہ سے ہم FE لکھنے والوں کی سیمانتیک جستجوں کے کام پر چلتے ہیں۔ ہمارے تحقیقات کے آغاز میں ہم نے اس کام میں دو مشکلات پہچان لیا۔ پہلے، موجود FE لکھنے والوں میں مثال کے مثال کے کمزوری کا نتیجہ ایک کنٹنسیٹ معلومات کی کمزوری کی وجہ سے ہوتا ہے، جو FES کی سیمانٹی معلومات حاصل کرنے کے لئے ضرورت ہے. دوسرا، جبکہ ایک سیمنٹی کاٹی لیبل ہر FE کے لئے بہت سی FE لکھائی میں مقرر کیا جاتا ہے، کارساز اینپیٹ سے لکھائی کی پیش بینی کرنے کا مشکل ہے، کارساز کو جہاد کرنے کے موقع سیمنٹی کاٹیوں کو اپنا طریقہ بنانے کے لئے مجبور کرتا ہے. یہ مشکلات کے بارے میں ہم نے FES کی سیمنٹی تلاش کے لئے ایک نئی فرمود پیش کریں اور ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کریں کہ دونوں موجود لکھنے والے لکھنے والے اور ڈومین لکھنے والے کورپور کو اضافہ کریں. اور اس کے بعد ہم نے ایک موجود FE لکھنے والا پھیلایا ہے کہ اس سے زیادہ گھیرے ہوئے اور ڈومین کے مطابق FE لکھنے کے لئے اور ہمارے طریقے کے مطابق ثابت کرنے کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Fotoblar qoʻllarda (FEs) ishlatilgan foydalanuvchilar, masalan `haqida murojaat yo'q bo'lgan gapiruvchilarga yordam beradi. @ info Bu sababda, biz FE lugʻatlarining semantik qidirish vazifasini boshqaramiz. Taʼminlovchi boshlanishda biz shu vazifaning ikkita ta'siri muammolarini aniqlashimiz mumkin. Birinchi so'zlar mavjud boʻlgan FE lugʻatlaridagi maxfiy soʻzlarning qisqacha maʼlumot yoʻqoladi. Bu FEs'ning semantik representini olish uchun kerak. Ikkinchi marta, bir necha FE lugʻatlarida semantik kategori label qoʻllanilganda, foydalanuvchi kiritidan taglarni koʻrsatish juda qiyin. Foydalanuvchilar qidirishda semantik kategorini qoʻlbola aniqlash mumkin. To address these difficulties, we propose a new framework for semantic searches of FEs and propose a new method to leverage both existing dictionaries and domain sentence corpora.  Koʻrsatganda, biz mavjud FE lugʻatni tezlashimiz mumkin va domen-foydalanuvchi FE lugʻatni yaratishga va metodimizning effektligini tekshirish uchun.", 'vi': 'Những biểu hiện tưởng (FE) được sử dụng trong các bài báo khoa học, như "đã có ít cuộc thảo luận", rất có ích cho người nói tiếng Anh không thổ dân. Tuy nhiên, nó tốn thời gian để người dùng tự tìm kiếm một biểu thức thích hợp mỗi khi họ muốn xem qua các từ điển đắp đắp đắp. Do đó, chúng ta phải xử lý nhiệm vụ tìm kiếm theo ngữ pháp của E từ điển. Khi bắt đầu nghiên cứu, chúng tôi đã nhận ra hai khó khăn lớn trong nhiệm vụ này. Thứ nhất, sự thiếu vắng các câu trích dẫn trong các từ điển đắp đắp đã có kết quả là thiếu thông tin ngữ cảnh, cần thiết để đạt được sự mô tả theo lề thói quen của Liên Minh. Thứ hai, khi mỗi người dùng một nhãn phân biệt ngữ pháp được gán cho mỗi người đắp (cả phần E) trong nhiều từ điển, thì khó mà đoán được nhãn từ người dùng nhập, buộc người dùng phải tự chọn phân biệt ngữ pháp khi tìm kiếm. Để giải quyết những khó khăn này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở mới cho việc tìm kiếm theo lề thói quen của FE và đề xuất một phương pháp mới để điều khiển cả từ điển và luật hạ đẳng miền. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi mở rộng một từ điển bò đắp có sẵn để cân nhắc việc chế tạo một từ điển bò đắp to àn diện và đặc trưng miền và để xác minh hiệu quả của phương pháp này.', 'da': "Formulære udtryk, der anvendes i videnskabelige artikler, såsom `der har været lidt diskussion om', er nyttige for ikke-indfødte engelsktalende. Det er dog tidskrævende for brugerne manuelt at søge efter et passende udtryk, hver gang de ønsker at konsultere FE ordbøger. Derfor tager vi os af opgaven med semantiske søgninger af FE ordbøger. I begyndelsen af vores forskning identificerede vi to væsentlige vanskeligheder i denne opgave. For det første resulterer manglen på eksempelssætninger i eksisterende FE-ordbøger i mangel på kontekstinformation, hvilket er nødvendigt for at erhverve semantisk repræsentation af FE'er. For det andet er det svært at forudsige etiketterne fra brugerinput, hvilket tvinger brugerne til manuelt at angive den semantiske kategori, når de søger. For at løse disse vanskeligheder foreslår vi en ny ramme for semantiske søgninger af FE'er og foreslår en ny metode til at udnytte både eksisterende ordbøger og domænesætningskorpora. Yderligere udvider vi en eksisterende FE ordbog for at overveje at opbygge en mere omfattende og domænespecifik FE ordbog og for at verificere effektiviteten af vores metode.", 'nl': "Formulaïsche uitdrukkingen (FEs) gebruikt in wetenschappelijke artikelen, zoals 'er is weinig discussie over geweest', zijn nuttig voor niet-moedertaalsprekers in het Engels. Het is echter tijdrovend voor gebruikers om elke keer dat ze FE-woordenboeken willen raadplegen handmatig naar een geschikte expressie te zoeken. Om deze reden pakken we de taak van semantische zoekopdrachten van FE-woordenboeken aan. Aan het begin van ons onderzoek hebben we twee belangrijke moeilijkheden in deze taak geïdentificeerd. Ten eerste leidt de gebrek aan voorbeeldzinnen in bestaande FE-woordenboeken tot een tekort aan contextinformatie, wat nodig is voor het verkrijgen van semantische representatie van FE's. Ten tweede, hoewel een semantisch categorielabel is toegewezen aan elke FE in veel FE-woordenboeken, is het moeilijk om de labels te voorspellen op basis van gebruikersinvoer, waardoor gebruikers handmatig de semantische categorie moeten aanwijzen wanneer ze zoeken. Om deze problemen aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuw raamwerk voor semantische zoekopdrachten van FEs voor en stellen we een nieuwe methode voor om gebruik te maken van zowel bestaande woordenboeken als domeinzinnencorpora. Verder breiden we een bestaand FE-woordenboek uit om te overwegen een uitgebreider en domeinspecifiek FE-woordenboek te bouwen en de effectiviteit van onze methode te verifiëren.", 'bg': 'Формулаторните изрази (ФЕ), използвани в научни статии, като "има малко дискусии", са полезни за чуждоезиковите английски езици. Въпреки това, за потребителите отнема време да търсят ръчно подходящ израз всеки път, когато искат да се консултират с речници. Поради тази причина ние се занимаваме със задачата за семантично търсене на речници. В началото на нашето изследване идентифицирахме две съществени трудности в тази задача. Първо, липсата на примерни изречения в съществуващите речници води до недостиг на контекстна информация, която е необходима за придобиване на семантично представяне на ФЕ. Второ, докато етикет на семантична категория се присвоява на всяка ФЕ в много речници, е трудно да се предвидят етикетите от входа на потребителя, което принуждава потребителите ръчно да определят семантичната категория при търсене. За да се справим с тези трудности, предлагаме нова рамка за семантични търсения на ФЕ и предлагаме нов метод за използване както на съществуващите речници, така и на корпусите на домейните изречения. Освен това разширяваме съществуващ речник, за да обмислим изграждането на по-изчерпателен и специфичен за домейна речник и да проверим ефективността на нашия метод.', 'de': "Formelische Ausdrücke (FEs), die in wissenschaftlichen Arbeiten verwendet werden, wie z.B. ‚Es gab wenig Diskussion darüber', sind hilfreich für Nicht-Muttersprachler Englisch. Es ist jedoch zeitaufwändig für Benutzer, jedes Mal, wenn sie FE-Wörterbücher konsultieren möchten, manuell nach einem geeigneten Ausdruck zu suchen. Aus diesem Grund nehmen wir uns der Aufgabe der semantischen Suche von FE-Wörterbüchern an. Zu Beginn unserer Forschung haben wir zwei wesentliche Schwierigkeiten bei dieser Aufgabe identifiziert. Erstens führt die Knappheit von Beispielsätzen in bestehenden FE-Wörterbüchern zu einem Mangel an Kontextinformationen, der notwendig ist, um semantische Repräsentation von FE zu erlangen. Zweitens, während jeder FE in vielen FE-Wörterbüchern eine semantische Kategoriebezeichnung zugewiesen wird, ist es schwierig, die Labels aus Benutzereingaben vorherzusagen, was Benutzer zwingt, die semantische Kategorie bei der Suche manuell zu bestimmen. Um diese Schwierigkeiten anzugehen, schlagen wir ein neues Framework für semantische Suche von FEs vor und schlagen eine neue Methode vor, um sowohl vorhandene Wörterbücher als auch Domänensatzkorpora zu nutzen. Darüber hinaus erweitern wir ein bestehendes FE-Wörterbuch, um den Aufbau eines umfassenderen und domänenspezifischen FE-Wörterbuchs zu erwägen und die Wirksamkeit unserer Methode zu überprüfen.", 'ko': "학술 논문에 사용된'논의된 적이 거의 없다'는 식의 공식적 표현(FES)은 비영어 모국어인들에게 도움이 된다.그러나 사용자가 FE 사전을 찾으려고 할 때마다 적절한 표현식을 수동으로 검색하는 것은 시간이 많이 걸린다.따라서 FE 사전의 의미 검색 작업을 처리해야 합니다.연구를 시작했을 때, 우리는 이 임무 중의 두 가지 두드러진 어려움을 발견하였다.우선, 기존의 유한원 사전에서 예문의 부족은 언어 정보의 부족을 초래하고 언어 정보는 유한원 의미의 표시를 얻는 데 필수적이다.둘째, 많은 FE 사전에서 모든 FE에 의미 클래스 라벨을 분배했지만 사용자가 입력한 예측 라벨에 따라 사용자가 검색할 때 수동으로 의미 클래스를 지정하기 어렵다.이러한 어려움을 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 FES 의미 검색 프레임워크를 제시했고 기존 사전과 영역 문장 자료 라이브러리를 활용하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.그 밖에 우리는 더욱 전면적이고 특정한 분야의 FE 사전을 구축하고 우리의 방법의 유효성을 검증하기 위해 기존의 FE 사전을 확장했다.", 'id': "Ekspresi formulir (FE) yang digunakan dalam kertas ilmiah, seperti `tidak ada sedikit diskusi tentang', membantu para pembicara bahasa Inggris bukan asli. Namun, waktu yang memakan bagi pengguna untuk secara manual mencari ekspresi yang sesuai setiap kali mereka ingin berkonsultasi dengan kamus FE. Untuk alasan ini, kita mengatasi tugas pencarian semantis dari kamus FE. Pada awal penelitian kami, kami mengidentifikasi dua kesulitan penting dalam tugas ini. Pertama, kurangnya kalimat contoh dalam kamus FE yang ada menghasilkan kekurangan informasi konteks, yang diperlukan untuk mendapatkan perwakilan semantis FE. Kedua, sementara label kategori semantis ditugaskan ke setiap FE dalam banyak kamus FE, sulit untuk memprediksi label dari input pengguna, memaksa pengguna untuk menentukan kategori semantis secara manual ketika mencari. Untuk mengatasi kesulitan-kesulitan ini, kami mengusulkan cadangan baru untuk pencarian semantis FE dan mengusulkan metode baru untuk menggunakan kata-kata dan kalimat domain corpora. Lagipula, kita memperluas kamus FE yang ada untuk mempertimbangkan pembangunan kamus FE yang lebih komprensif dan spesifik domain dan untuk memverifikasi efektif metode kita.", 'sw': 'Hotuba za formula (FEs) zilizotumiwa katika karatasi za kisasa, kama vile ‘kumekuwa na mjadala mdogo kuhusu’, zinasaidia kwa wazungumzaji wasio na lugha ya Kiingereza. Hata hivyo, ni matumizi ya muda kwa watumiaji kutafuta kujieleza kwa mkono kila mara wanapotaka kuwasiliana na lugha za FE. Kwa sababu hii, tunakabiliana na jukumu la kutafuta lugha za kimapenzi za FE. Mwanzoni wa utafiti wetu, tuligundua matatizo mawili ya mauzi katika kazi hii. Kwanza, upungufu wa hukumu za mfano katika dictionary existing FE unasababisha ukosefu wa taarifa za muktadha, ambayo ni muhimu kwa kupata uwakilishi wa kimapenzi wa FEs. Pili, wakati alama ya kigaidi imewekwa kwa kila FE katika lugha nyingi za FE, ni vigumu kutabiri alama kutoka kwenye input ya mtumiaji, na kuwalazimisha watumiaji kutengeneza makundi ya kigaidi wakati wa kutafuta. Ili kukabiliana na matatizo haya, tunapendekeza mfumo mpya wa kutafuta mafunzo ya kimapenzi ya FEs na kupendekeza njia mpya ya kutumikia mashirika ya lugha na hukumu ya ndani. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaongeza dictiona iliyopo FE ili kutafakari kujenga dictiona ya kina zaidi na mahsusi ya ndani na kuhakikisha ufanisi wa njia yetu.', 'fa': 'واژه\u200cهای فرمولی (FE) که در کاغذهای دانشمند استفاده می\u200cشود، مثل «در مورد کوچک بحث بوده\u200cاند» برای سخنان انگلیسی غیر طبیعی کمک می\u200cکنند. با این حال، برای کاربران زمان استفاده می\u200cکند که هر بار که می\u200cخواهند به لغو\u200cهای FE مشورت کنند، به دستگیر یک عبارت مناسب بگردند. به خاطر این دلیل، ما کار جستجوی سیمانتیک الگوهای FE را حل می کنیم. در ابتدای تحقیقات ما، دو مشکل سختی در این کار شناسایی کردیم. اول، ناتوانی از جمله\u200cهای مثال در لغو\u200cهای FE موجود به ناتوانی از اطلاعات محیط رسیده می\u200cشود، که نیاز است برای خریدن نمایش\u200cدهنده\u200cی سیمانی FE. دوم، در حالی که یک برچسب نوع سنتی برای هر FE در کلمات FE تعریف می\u200cشود، برچسب\u200cهای ورودی کاربر را پیش\u200cبینی کردن سخت است، مجبور می\u200cکند کاربران در حال جستجویی به دستی برچسب\u200cهای semantic را مشخص کنند. برای حل این مشکلات، ما یک چهارچوب جدید برای جستجوی سیمانتیک FES پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و یک روش جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا هر دو از لغوی\u200cهای موجود و جمله\u200cهای دامنی را به عنوان جستجوی جستجوی دومین برسانیم. بعلاوه، ما یک لغوی FE موجود را گسترش دادیم تا به ساختن یک لغوی FE بسیار گسترش\u200cتری و ویژه\u200cهای مخصوص و تایید کنند فعالیت روش ما.', 'tr': "Akademi kagytlarda ulanylan formular (FEs) ýaly 'hakda kiçi diskusiýa bolup geçdi' iňlis dilinde bolmadyklaryna kömek edip biler. Ýöne Ullançylar üçin wagt taýýarlançylyklary FE sözlerine maslahat etmek isleýän wagtlary ellene gowy bir ifade gözlemek üçin ullanylýar. Bu sebäpden, FE sözlükleriniň semantik gözlemleriniň görevini çözýäris. Araştyrymyzyň başynda, bu zadyň içinde iki düýbi kynçylyk bardyk. Ilkinji gezek, mevcut FE sözlerinde örnek sözleriniň azalygyny kontekst maglumatynyň azalygyna uğratýar, bu FEs semantik temsilini almak üçin gerek. Ikinjisi, FE sözlerinde her FE üçin semantik kategoriýa etiketi takyklaýan wagtynda, ullançylaryň girişinden etiketleri täze etmek kyn, ullançylaryň synanik kategoriýany elimden belli etmegini zorlaýar. Bu kynçylyklary çözmek üçin, FES'iň semantik gözlemekleri üçin täze bir çerçew teklip edip, hem bolan sözlükleriň we domeniň sözleşmeleriniň korporasyny üçin täze bir yöntem teklip edip görkezip. Daşary hem bolan FE sözlügini FE sözlügimizi daşaryk we domaýda bir FE sözlügimizi ýüklemek üçin we biziň täsirlerimiziň etkinligini barlamak üçin a çdyk.", 'sq': "Shprehjet formuluese (FE) të përdorura në gazeta shkencore, të tilla si `ka patur pak diskutim rreth', janë të dobishme për fletësit angleze jo-natyrorë. Megjithatë, përdoruesit kërkojnë me dorë për një shprehje të përshtatshme çdo herë që duan të konsultojnë fjalorët e FE. For this reason, we tackle the task of semantic searches of FE dictionaries.  Në fillim të kërkimit tonë, identifikuam dy vështirësi të rëndësishme në këtë detyrë. Së pari, pakësia e fjalëve shembullore në fjalorët ekzistues të FE rezulton në një mungesë informacioni konteksti, i cili është i nevojshëm për të fituar përfaqësimin semantik të FE. Së dyti, ndërsa një etiketë e kategorisë semantike i caktohet çdo FE në shumë fjalorë FE, është e vështirë të parashikohet etiketat nga hyrja e përdoruesit, duke i detyruar përdoruesit të caktojnë manualisht kategorinë semantike kur kërkojnë. Për të trajtuar këto vështirësi, ne propozojmë një kuadër të ri për kërkimet semantike të FE-ve dhe propozojmë një metodë të re për të përdorur si fjalorët ekzistues, ashtu edhe korprën e fjalimit në domeni. Për më tepër, ne zgjerojmë një fjalor ekzistues FE për të konsideruar ndërtimin e një fjalori më kompleks dhe më specifik për domenin FE dhe për të verifikuar efektshmërinë e metodës sonë.", 'af': "Formule uitdrukkings (FEs) gebruik word in skoonpapiere, soos 'daar is klein diskusie oor', is hulp vir nie-natiewe Engelske sprekkers. Maar, dit is tyd- consuming vir gebruikers om hand te soek vir 'n geskikte uitdrukking elke keer wat hulle wil raadpleeg met FE woordeboeke. Hierdie rede is ons die taak van semantiese soektog van FE-woordeboeke. Op die begin van ons ondersoek het ons twee salient moeilikhede in hierdie taak geïdentifiseer. Eerste, die vermoedigheid van voorbeeld setinge in bestaande FE-woordeboeke resulteer in 'n kortpad van konteksinligting, wat nodig is vir semantiese voorstelling van FEs te kry. Tweede, terwyl 'n semantiese kategorie etiket aan elke FE in baie FE woordeboeke toegelê is, is dit moeilik om die etikette van gebruiker invoer te voorskou, verdrukking van gebruikers om die semantiese kategorie hand te designeer wanneer soek. Om hierdie moeilikhede te adres, voorstel ons 'n nuwe raamwerk vir semantiese soektog van FEs en voorstel 'n nuwe metode om beide bestaande woordeboekvorms en domein se setkopora te verwyder. Verder, ons uitbrei 'n bestaande FE woordeboek om 'n meer kompleksief en domein-spesifieke FE woordeboek te bou en die effektiviteit van ons metode te bevestig.", 'am': 'በተማሪዎች ገጾች ውስጥ (FEs) በተጠቃሚ ድምፅ፣ ‘ትንሽ ውይይት አልደረሰም› በሚል፣ የአገራቸው እንግሊዘኛ ቋንቋዎች ይረዳሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን የFE መዝገበኛ መፍታት ለመጠየቅ በሚፈልጉ ጊዜ ለተጠቃሚዎች ሰዓት መጠቀም ነው፡፡ ስለዚህ ምክንያት የፌ መዝገብ ቃላትን የsemantic መረጃ ስራዎችን እናስቀናለን፡፡ ትምህርት መጀመሪያ፣ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ ሁለት ድካም መከራን አረጋገጥን፡፡ መጀመሪያ፣ የአሁኑ FE መዝገበኞች ያሉት የምሳሌ ቃላት ግንኙነት የአፍሪካ መዝገበኛ መረጃዎችን ለማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ Second, while a semantic category label is assigned to each FE in many FE dictionaries, labels from user input to predict difficulty, force users to manually design the semantic category when searching. እነዚህን ችግሮች ለመቀበል አዲስ የFEs ምርጫዎች አዲስ ፍሬማርቶችን እና የአሁኑ መዝገብ መፍታት እና የዶሜን ፍርድ ኮርፖርት እና አዲስ ልማድ መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚህም በላይ የአፍሪካ መዝገበኛ እና የአፍሪካ መዝገበኛ የመፍጠር መዝገብ እና የሥርዓታችንን ውጤት ለማረጋገጥ እና እናረጋግጥ ዘንድ ነው፡፡', 'az': '"Biraz mübahisə edilmişdir" kimi bilimsel kağıtlarda istifadə edilən formül ifadələr İngilizə danışanlarına fayda verər. Lakin, istifadəçilər üçün hər dəfə FE sözlərinə məsləhət etmək istədikləri zaman istifadəçiləri əlində uyğun ifadə axtarmaq üçün vaxt istifadəsidir. Bu səbəbdən, FE sözlərinin semantik araştırmalarının işini çəkirik. Araştırmalarımızın başlangıcında bu işdə iki çətin çətinlikləri tanıdıq. İlk dəfə, FE sözlərində məsəllərinin yoxsulluğu, FE semantik göstərişlərini almaq üçün lazımdır. İkincisi, FE sözlərində hər bir FE üçün semantik kategoriya etiketi təyin edilən halda, istifadəçin in girişindən etiketləri təmin etmək çətindir, istifadəçilərin araştırdığı zaman semantik kategoriyanı öz əlində təyin etmələrini zorlaşdırmaq çətindir. Bu çətinliklərdən çəkinmək üçün, FES\'nin semantik araştırmalarına yeni bir çerçive təklif edirik və həm də mevcut sözləri, həm də domain sözlərin korporasını təmin etmək üçün yeni bir metod təklif edirik. Daha sonra, həmin FE sözlüyünü daha genişləndirdik ki, daha genişliyi və domain-specific FE sözlüyünü inşa etmək və metodumuzun etkinliğini təsdiqləmək üçün.', 'hy': 'Ֆորմուլային արտահայտությունները, որոնք օգտագործվում են գիտական թղթերում, ինչպես օրինակ "շատ քիչ քննարկում է եղել" օգտակար են ոչ բնիկ անգլերենի խոսնակների համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, օգտագործողների համար պահանջվում է ժամանակ ձեռքով փնտրել համապատասխան արտահայտություն ամեն անգամ, երբ նրանք ուզում են խոսել ՖԵ բառարանների հետ: Այս պատճառով մենք լուծում ենք ՖԵ բառարանների սեմանտիկ որոնման խնդիրը: Մեր հետազոտության սկզբում մենք բացահայտեցինք այս խնդրի երկու կարևոր դժվարությունները: Նախ և առաջ, գոյություն ունեցող ՖԵ բառարանների օրինակի նախադասությունների բացառությունը հանգեցնում է կոնտեքստի տեղեկատվության բացակայության, ինչը անհրաժեշտ է ՖԵ-ների սեմանտիկ ներկայացման ձեռք բերելու համար: Երկրորդ, մինչդեռ սեմանտիկ կատեգորիայի պիտակը տրված է յուրաքանչյուր ՖԵ բառարանում, դժվար է կանխատեսել օգտագործողի ներմուծից ստացված պիտակները, ստիպելով օգտագործողներին ձեռքով նշել սեմանտիկ կատեգորիան որոնման ժամանակ: Այս դժվարություններին լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր շրջանակ էներգիայի ֆոնդների սեմանտիկ որոնման համար և առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ, որպեսզի օգտագործենք նաև գոյություն ունեցող բառարանները, ինչպես նաև բնագավառի նախադասություն Ավելին, մենք ընդլայնում ենք գոյություն ունեցող ՖԵ բառարանը, որպեսզի հաշվի առնենք ավելի ամբողջական և բնագավառի մասնավոր ՖԵ բառարան կառուցելը և ստուգենք մեր մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը:', 'hr': 'Formulične izraze (FE) korištene u učenjskim papirima, poput „o malom raspravu“, pomažu neprodičnim engleskim govornicima. Međutim, potrošenje vremena za korisnicima je ručno potražiti odgovarajući izraz svaki put kad žele savjetovati s riječima FE-a. Zbog ovog razloga, riješimo zadatak semantičkih pretraživanja riječi FE-a. Na početku našeg istraživanja, identificirali smo dvije salične poteškoće u ovom zadatku. Prvo, nedostatak primjernih rečenica u postojećim riječima FE rezultira nedostatak kontekstskih informacija, koja je potrebna za dobivanje semantičkog predstavljanja FE-a. Drugo, dok je etiketa semantičke kategorije određena svakom FE u mnogim FE riječnicima, teško je predvidjeti etikete od ulaska korisnika, tjerati korisnike da ručno održe semantičku kategoriju u potrazi. Za rješavanje tih poteškoća, predlažemo novi okvir za semantičke pretrage FES-a i predlažemo novi način za utjecavanje postojećih riječi i tjelesne kazne za domenu. Nadalje, proširili smo postojeći rečnik FE kako bi razmotrili izgradnju sveobuhvatnijeg i domeničkog rečnika FE-a i potvrdili učinkovitost našeg metoda.', 'bn': 'স্কুলের কাগজে ব্যবহার করা ফর্মুলিক প্রকাশনা (এফএসএস) যেমন ‘সামান্য আলোচনা পাওয়া যায়’, সেগুলো আদিবাসী ইংরেজী ভাষাকারীদের জন্য তবে এটা ব্যবহারকারীদের জন্য সময়-ভক্তি করা হচ্ছে যে প্রত্যেক সময় তারা FE অভিধানের সাথে পরামর্শ করতে চায় তারা নিজেদের হাতে একটি য এই কারণে আমরা এফই অভিভাবকের সেমেন্টিক অনুসন্ধানের কাজের সাথে মুক্তি পাই। আমাদের গবেষণার শুরুতে আমরা এই কাজে দুটি বিক্রেতা কষ্ট চিহ্নিত করেছি। প্রথমত, বিদ্যমান FE অভিধানের বাক্যের প্রাপ্ত বিষয়টি বিদ্যমান সংক্রান্ত তথ্যের সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত বিষয়ের ফল দ্বিতীয়, যখন অনেক FE অভিধানে একটি সেমেন্টিক বিভাগের লেবেল বিতরণ করা হয়, তখন ব্যবহারকারীর ইনপুট থেকে লেবেল ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করা কঠিন, অনুসন্ধানের সময় ব্যবহারকারীদের সেম এই সমস্যাগুলোর কথা বলার জন্য আমরা এফএসের সেম্পেন্টিক অনুসন্ধানের জন্য একটি নতুন ফ্রেম্যাকার্ক প্রস্তাব করি এবং বিদ্যমান স্বৈরশাসক এবং ডোমেইনের শ এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি বিদ্যমান FE অভিধান বৃদ্ধি করেছি যাতে বিভিন্ন সুসংবিধান এবং ডোমেইন-নির্দিষ্ট FE অভিধান নির্মাণ করা এবং আমাদের পদ্ধ', 'ca': 'Les expressions fòrmules (FEs) que s\'utilitzen en publicacions científices, com "no hi ha hagut gaire debat sobre", són útils per als anglès no natius. However, it is time-consuming for users to manually search for an appropriate expression every time they want to consult FE dictionaries.  Per aquest motiu, ens ocupem de la tasca de recerca semàntica dels diccionaris FE. Al principi de la nostra recerca, vam identificar dues dificultats salients en aquesta tasca. Primer, la escassetat d\'exemples de frases en diccionaris FE existents provoca una escassetat d\'informació contextual, que és necessària per aconseguir una representació semàntica de FE. Segon, mentre que cada FE té una etiqueta de categoria semàntica en molts diccionaris FE, és difícil predir les etiquetes de la entrada d\'usuari, forçant els usuaris a designar manualment la categoria semàntica quan busquen. To address these difficulties, we propose a new framework for semantic searches of FEs and propose a new method to leverage both existing dictionaries and domain sentence corpora.  També expandim un diccionari FE existent per considerar la construcció d\'un diccionari FE més complet i específic per domini i per verificar l\'eficacia del nostre mètode.', 'cs': 'Vzorecové výrazy (FEs) používané ve vědeckých článcích, jako například "nebylo o tom diskutováno málo", jsou užitečné pro mluvčí angličtiny, kteří nejsou rodilými mluvčími. Pro uživatele je však časově náročné ručně vyhledávat vhodný výraz pokaždé, když chtějí konzultovat slovníky FE. Z tohoto důvodu se zabýváme úkolem sémantického vyhledávání slovníků FE. Na začátku našeho výzkumu jsme identifikovali dvě zásadní problémy v tomto úkolu. Za prvé, nedostatek příkladových vět ve stávajících slovnících FE vede k nedostatku kontextových informací, které jsou nezbytné pro získání sémantické reprezentace FEs. Za druhé, zatímco každému FE je v mnoha FE slovnících přiřazen název sémantické kategorie, je obtížné předpovídat štítky z uživatelského vstupu, což nutí uživatele ručně určit sémantickou kategorii při vyhledávání. Pro řešení těchto problémů navrhujeme nový rámec pro sémantické vyhledávání FEs a navrhujeme novou metodu využití jak stávajících slovníků, tak korpusů doménových vět. Dále rozšiřujeme stávající slovník FE, abychom zvážili vytvoření komplexnějšího a doménově specifického slovníku FE a ověřili efektivitu naší metody.', 'et': 'Teaduslikes artiklites kasutatavad valemväljendid, nagu näiteks "sellest on vähe arutatud", on kasulikud mitte-emakeelsetele inglise keelt kõnelevatele. Siiski on kasutajatel aeganõudev otsida käsitsi sobivat avaldist iga kord, kui nad soovivad FE sõnaraamatutega tutvuda. Sel põhjusel tegeleme FE sõnaraamatute semantiliste otsingutega. Uurimistöö alguses tuvastasime selles ülesandes kaks olulist raskust. Esiteks, näidislausete vähesus olemasolevates FE sõnaraamatutes toob kaasa kontekstiteabe puuduse, mis on vajalik FEde semantilise esituse omandamiseks. Teiseks, kuigi igale FE-le on paljudes FE-sõnaraamatutes määratud semantilise kategooria silt, on kasutaja sisendist märgistusi raske ennustada, sundides kasutajaid otsingul semantilise kategooria käsitsi määrama. Nende probleemide lahendamiseks teeme ettepaneku luua uus raamistik FEde semantiliste otsingute jaoks ja pakkuda välja uus meetod nii olemasolevate sõnaraamatute kui ka domeenilausekorpuste kasutamiseks. Lisaks laiendame olemasolevat FE sõnaraamatut, et kaaluda terviklikuma ja domeenispetsiifilisema FE sõnaraamatu loomist ning kontrollida meie meetodi tõhusust.', 'bs': "Formulični izraz (FE) koji se koriste u učenjskim papirima, kao što je 'o malom raspravu', pomaže neprodičnim engleskim govornicima. Međutim, potrošenje vremena je da korisnici ručno traže odgovarajući izraz svaki put kad žele da se konsultuju sa riječima FE-a. Zbog ovog razloga, riješimo zadatak semantičkih pretraživanja rečnika FE-a. Na početku našeg istraživanja, identificirali smo dvije salične probleme u ovom zadatku. Prvo, nedostatak primjernih rečenica u postojećim rečenicama FE rezultira nedostatak kontekstskih informacija, koja je potrebna za dobivanje semantičkog predstavljanja FE-a. Drugo, dok je etiketa semantičke kategorije određena svakom FE u mnogim FE dizionarima, teško je predvidjeti etikete iz ulaska korisnika, tjerati korisnike da ručno održe semantičku kategoriju kada traži. Da bi se riješili ovim poteškoćama, predlažemo novi okvir za semantičke pretraživanje FE-a i predložimo novi metod za utjecavanje i postojećih rečenica i kazne za domenu. Nadalje, proširili smo postojeći FE rečnik kako bi razmotrili izgradnju sveobuhvatnijeg i domeničkog rečnika FE-a i provjerili učinkovitost našeg metoda.", 'fi': "Tieteellisissä julkaisuissa käytetyt kaavailmaukset, kuten `siitä on keskusteltu vähän', ovat hyödyllisiä muille kuin äidinkielenään puhuville englanninkielisille. Käyttäjien on kuitenkin aikaa vievää etsiä manuaalisesti sopivaa lauseketta aina, kun he haluavat tutustua FE-sanakirjoihin. Tästä syystä käsittelemme FE-sanakirjojen semanttisia hakuja. Tutkimuksemme alussa havaitsimme kaksi merkittävää ongelmaa tässä tehtävässä. Ensinnäkin esimerkkilauseiden niukkuus olemassa olevissa FE-sanakirjoissa johtaa kontekstitietojen puutteeseen, mikä on tarpeen FE-sanastojen semanttisen edustuksen hankkimiseksi. Toiseksi, vaikka kullekin FE:lle on monissa FE:n sanakirjoissa annettu semanttinen luokkatunniste, on vaikea ennustaa tunnisteita käyttäjän syötteestä, mikä pakottaa käyttäjät nimeämään semanttisen luokan manuaalisesti haussa. Näiden ongelmien ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta viitekehystä FES:ien semanttisille hakuille ja uutta menetelmää, jolla hyödynnetään sekä olemassa olevia sanakirjoja että verkkotunnuksen lausekorpusia. Lisäksi laajennamme olemassa olevaa FE-sanakirjaa harkitsemaan kattavamman ja verkkotunnuskohtaisen FE-sanakirjan rakentamista ja menetelmämme tehokkuuden tarkistamista.", 'jv': 'Wurungu perusahaan (KEs) nggawe lan mapaké awak-awak, koyo \'ana karo bebasan pangalan\' sing tolungano kanggo basa Inggris barang. Nanging, iku time-nggawe arêt kanggo gambar pengguna Manual kanggo ngelakon pawaran adalah saben sapa sapa sira pingin nggunakake diketeksi "GE". Erenong iki, kita sakjane nggambar kelas sematik pangusikno karo diketeksi PV Nang mbiyen sampeyang, dhewe nambah iki sakjane kanggo kalagayang pangan iki. Nalika, awak dhéwé kuwi kapan kelompok kanggo diktualisar "KE" sing ana dadi kapan kelompok informasi sing dikarepaké, sing kudu nggawe sistem sematik dhéwé Sample rate To Address this Hard Disks, we proposal a new frame for semanti-Search of Fes and proposal a new method to raise their current words words and domain word bodora. Additional, we expand an current BE dikenaar to see rebuking a mas comprcompromising and domain-special BE dikenaar and to Very the effectness of the method.', 'ha': "Babu amfani da maganar formulaki (FEs) wanda aka yi amfani da cikin takardar marubũta, kamar `an sami magana kaɗan a cikin sha'anin ', don su yi amfani ga masu saukarwa na Ingiriya masu native. Babu zama mai amfani da amfani da shi dõmin su nẽmi wata magana mai daidai ko da yaushe sun yi nufin su yi kula da dictionaries na FU. Saboda haka, Munã karɓi aikin filinaikin na semantiki na FU. Inã fara da aikinmu, muka gane mataimaki biyu a cikin wannan aikin. First, the ucity of misãli, words in dictionaries that are existing FU will end up in a shortcut of context information, which is important for acquire semantic wakilishi of FEs. Piki, kuma a lokacin da aka raba wani label na semantic category zuwa duk FU cikin wasu dictionaries na FU, yana da nau'in ka ƙayyade alama daga inputi mai amfani da shi, kuma ya lazimta masu amfani da shi da hannun su ƙayyade category na semantic idan an yi searching. To, dõmin a yi musu gargaɗin wannan masu zartar da, muna goyyade wata firam na daban wa filayen na semantic na FEs kuma mu buƙata wata hanyoyi wa su samar da duk dictionaries da cire-gareshi. Furan haka, Munã shimfiɗa wata dictionary wanda ke jira FU dõmin mu yi tunãni ga ka sami wata tsari mai kamfata da wanda ke cikin ɗamfyuta na FU, kuma dõmin mu gaskata fikancin hanyarmu.", 'he': 'ביטויים פורמוליים (FEs) שמשתמשים בעיתונים מדעניים, כמו "היה קצת דיון על", עוזרים לדברים אנגליים לא מקומיים. בכל אופן, משתמשים צריכים זמן לחפש ביטוי מתאים באופן ידני בכל פעם שהם רוצים להתייעץ במילונים FE. מסיבה זו, אנחנו מתמודדים עם המשימה של חיפושים סמנטיים של מילונים FE. בהתחלה של המחקר שלנו, זיהינו שני קשים משמעותיים במשימה הזאת. ראשית, העדר של משפטים דוגמאים במילוני FE קיימים גורם לחסר מידע קונטקסט, שהוא הכרחי כדי לקבל מייצג סמנטי של FE. שנית, בעוד תווית קטגוריה סמנטית מוקצה לכל FE במילונים FE רבים, קשה לחזות את תוויות מהכניסה של משתמש, מכריח את המשתמשים לקבוע באופן ידני את הקטגוריה הסמנטית כשהם מחפשים. כדי להתמודד עם הקשויות האלה, אנחנו מציעים מסגרת חדשה לחיפוש סמנטי של FEs ולהציע שיטה חדשה כדי להשתמש גם במילונים קיימים וגם בתחום משפט corpora. חוץ מזה, אנו מגדילים מילון FE קיים כדי לשקול בניית מילון FE מפורסם יותר ומספציפי לתחום ולאבדוק את היעילות של השיטה שלנו.', 'sk': "Formulacijski izrazi (FEs), ki se uporabljajo v znanstvenih člankih, kot je ‚o tem je bilo malo razprav', so koristni za tuje govoreče angleščine. Vendar pa je za uporabnike dolgotrajno, da ročno iščejo ustrezen izraz vsakič, ko se želijo ogledati v slovarjih FE. Zato se ukvarjamo z nalogo semantičnega iskanja slovarjev FE. Na začetku raziskave smo ugotovili dve pomembni težavi pri tej nalogi. Prvič, pomanjkanje primerov stavkov v obstoječih slovarjih FE povzroči pomanjkanje kontekstnih informacij, ki so potrebne za pridobivanje semantične reprezentacije FEs. Drugič, medtem ko je oznaka semantične kategorije vsakemu FE dodeljena v številnih FE slovarjih, je oznake težko predvideti iz uporabniškega vnosa, zaradi česar morajo uporabniki ročno določiti semantično kategorijo pri iskanju. Za reševanje teh težav predlagamo nov okvir za semantična iskanja FEs in predlagamo novo metodo za vzvod obstoječih slovarjev in domenskih stavkovnih korpusov. Poleg tega razširimo obstoječi slovar FE, da razmislimo o izdelavi celovitejšega in domensko specifičnega slovarja FE in preverimo učinkovitost naše metode.", 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་གྱི་ཤོག་བུ་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་སྤྱད་པའི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཕྱི་ཚོགས། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྤྱོད་མཁན རྒྱུ་མཚན་འདི་ལ་ང་ཚོས་FE ཡིག་ཐུང་ཁོངས་ཀྱི་སྔོན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་འཚོལ་བཤེར་ཀྱི་བྱ་རིམ་ལ་ཐབས་བྱེད། ང་ཚོའི་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་འགོ་འཛུགས་དུས་ལ། བྱ་རིམ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཆེ་གཉིས་མཐོང་བ་རེད། དང་པོ་དེ། གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་FE་འཇུག་ཟམ་ནང་གི་མུང་བའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ཀྱི་འཇུག་ཟམ་ཉུང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཉེ་ཆར་ཡོད། Second, while a semantic category label is assigned to each FE in many FE dictionaries, it is difficult to predict the labels from user input, forcing users to manually designate the semantic category when searching. དཀའ Further, we expand an existing FE dictionary to consider building a more comprehensive and domain-specific FE dictionary and to verify the effectiveness of our method.'}
{'en': 'What’s in Your Embedding, And How It Predicts Task Performance', 'ar': 'ماذا يوجد في التضمين ، وكيف يتنبأ بأداء المهام', 'fr': 'Ce que contient votre intégration et comment elle prédit les performances des tâches', 'pt': 'O que está em sua incorporação e como ela prevê o desempenho da tarefa', 'es': 'Qué incluye su incrustación y cómo predice el rendimiento de las tareas', 'ja': '埋め込みの内容と、タスクのパフォーマンスを予測する方法', 'zh': '嵌入中者,及其占绩效', 'hi': 'आपके एम्बेडिंग में क्या है, और यह कार्य प्रदर्शन की भविष्यवाणी कैसे करता है', 'ru': 'Что находится в вашем встраивании, и как оно предсказывает выполнение задачи', 'ga': 'Cad atá i do Leabú, Agus Conas Feidhmíocht Tasc a Thuar', 'ka': 'კაკგჲ ვ გ რგჲვრჲ თნბვევზევნთვ თ კაკ ოპვეგთეწგა პაბჲრარა ოპვტჲპმაუთწ?', 'hu': 'Mi van a beágyazásban, és hogyan jósolja meg a feladatok teljesítményét', 'el': 'Τι περιέχει η ενσωμάτωση σας και πώς προβλέπει την απόδοση εργασιών', 'it': "Cosa c'è nel tuo embedding e come prevede le prestazioni delle attività", 'kk': 'Ендірілген және тапсырмалар жұмысын қалай бағалайды', 'ms': 'Apa yang ada dalam penyembelihan anda, dan bagaimana ia meramalkan prestasi tugas', 'mk': "What's in Your Embedding, And How It Predicts Task Performance", 'lt': 'Kas yra tavo įdėtyje ir kaip tai numato užduočių vykdymą', 'mt': "X'hemm fl-Inkorporazzjoni tiegħek, U Kif tipprevedi l-prestazzjoni tal-kompiti", 'mn': 'Таны хөрөнгө оруулалт, ажлын үйл ажиллагааг хэрхэн төсөөлөх вэ?', 'ml': 'നിങ്ങളുടെ എംബെഡിങ്ങിലുള്ളത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് ജോലി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്', 'pl': 'Co jest w Twoim osadzeniu i jak przewiduje wydajność zadań', 'sr': 'Šta je u Vašem okupljanju, i kako predviđa funkciju zadataka', 'si': 'මොකද්ද ඔයාගේ සම්පූර්ණයේ තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේම මොකද්ද කාර්ය වැඩ කරන්නේ කියලා', 'ro': 'Ce este în încorporarea ta și cum previne performanța sarcinilor', 'no': 'Kva er i innbygginga din, og korleis det foregår oppgåver', 'ta': 'உங்கள் உட்படுக்கையில் என்ன இருக்கிறது, மற்றும் அது எப்படி பணி செயலை முன்னேற்றுகிறது', 'sv': 'Vad finns i din inbäddning och hur den förutspår uppgifternas prestanda', 'ur': 'آپ کے پیدا کرنے میں کیا ہے، اور یہ کیسے کام کامیابی کی پیش بینی کرتا ہے', 'so': 'Waxa ku jira sariirkaada, iyo siduu u horumariyaa qeybta shaqada', 'uz': 'Vazifaning vazifa bajarishni qanday tayyorlash', 'vi': 'Trong s ứ mệnh bắt giữ, và dự đoán hiệu quả của nhiệm vụ.', 'da': 'Hvad er i din indlejring, og hvordan det forudsiger opgaveydelse', 'bg': 'Какво има във вграждането ви и как прогнозира ефективността на задачите', 'nl': 'Wat zit er in uw embedding en hoe het de prestaties van taken voorspelt', 'de': 'Was ist in Ihrer Einbettung enthalten und wie es die Aufgabenleistung vorhersagt', 'fa': 'چیزی که توی انجمن شما هست، و چطور عملکرد کار را پیش بینی می کند', 'ko': '당신의 삽입 내용이 무엇인지, 그리고 작업 성능을 어떻게 예측하는지', 'sw': 'Kilicho kwenye kitanda chako, na Namna Inawezesha Kufanya kazi', 'tr': 'Siziň Girişiňizde näme, we Göreviň işlerini nähili öňden belleýär', 'hr': 'Što je u Vašem uključenju i kako predviđa funkciju zadataka', 'am': 'በአልጋ መቀመጫህ ውስጥ ያለውን፣ እና እንዴት የስራ ፈቃድ ያቆማል', 'id': 'Apa yang ada dalam Penampilan Anda, dan bagaimana itu memprediksi Performance Tugas', 'az': 'S…ônin daxilind…ô olanlar v…ô iŇül…ôr iŇül…ôtm…ôsini nec…ô t…ôsdiql…ôyir?', 'bn': 'তোমার বিছানায় যা আছে, আর কিভাবে এটা কাজের প্রেমিক করা হয়', 'sq': 'Çfarë ka në përfshirjen tënde, dhe si parashikon performancën e detyrave', 'hy': 'Ի՞նչն է ձեր ներգրավված և ինչպես այն կանխատեսում է առաջադրանքների արտադրողությունը', 'ca': 'Què hi ha a la vostra integració, i com prediu el desempeny de la tasca', 'cs': 'Co je ve vašem vložení a jak předpovídá výkon úkolů', 'et': 'Mis on teie manustamises ja kuidas see ennustab ülesannete jõudlust', 'fi': 'Mitä upotuksessa on ja miten se ennustaa tehtävien suorituskykyä', 'af': 'Wat is in jou Inbêding, en hoe dit voorskryf Opdrag Performasie', 'bs': 'Ono što je u Vašem okupljanju i kako predviđa funkciju zadataka', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Kaj je v vdelavi in kako napoveduje uspešnost opravila', 'jv': 'Ana sing dumatenggo kelompok, lan kelompok Sistem Ngucap Taaksi', 'he': 'מה יש בתכנית שלך, ואיך זה מצפה ביצוע משימה', 'bo': 'ཁྱོད་ཀྱི་Embedding་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་དང་ཇི་ལྟར་སྔོན་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་བྱ་རིམ་སྟོན་ན།'}
{'en': 'Attempts to find a single technique for general-purpose intrinsic evaluation of word embeddings have so far not been successful. We present a new approach based on scaled-up qualitative analysis of word vector neighborhoods that quantifies interpretable characteristics of a given model (e.g. its preference for synonyms or shared morphological forms as nearest neighbors). We analyze 21 such factors and show how they correlate with performance on 14 extrinsic and intrinsic task datasets (and also explain the lack of correlation between some of them). Our approach enables multi-faceted evaluation, parameter search, and generally   a more principled, hypothesis-driven approach to development of distributional semantic representations.', 'ar': 'محاولات العثور على تقنية واحدة للتقييم الجوهري للأغراض العامة لتزيينات الكلمات لم تنجح حتى الآن. نقدم نهجًا جديدًا يعتمد على التحليل النوعي الموسع لأحياء متجه الكلمات التي تحدد الخصائص القابلة للتفسير لنموذج معين (مثل تفضيله للمرادفات أو الأشكال المورفولوجية المشتركة كأقرب جيران). نقوم بتحليل 21 عاملًا من هذا القبيل وإظهار كيفية ارتباطها بالأداء على 14 مجموعة بيانات مهمة خارجية وجوهرية (وشرح أيضًا عدم وجود ارتباط بين بعضها). يمكّن نهجنا التقييم متعدد الأوجه ، والبحث عن المعلمات ، وبشكل عام - نهج أكثر مبدئيًا ، يحركه الفرضيات لتطوير التمثيلات الدلالية التوزيعية.', 'pt': 'As tentativas de encontrar uma única técnica para avaliação intrínseca de propósito geral de incorporação de palavras até agora não foram bem-sucedidas. Apresentamos uma nova abordagem baseada na análise qualitativa ampliada de vizinhanças de vetores de palavras que quantifica características interpretáveis de um determinado modelo (por exemplo, sua preferência por sinônimos ou formas morfológicas compartilhadas como vizinhos mais próximos). Analisamos 21 desses fatores e mostramos como eles se correlacionam com o desempenho em 14 conjuntos de dados de tarefas extrínsecas e intrínsecas (e também explicamos a falta de correlação entre alguns deles). Nossa abordagem permite avaliação multifacetada, pesquisa de parâmetros e, geralmente, uma abordagem mais baseada em princípios e baseada em hipóteses para o desenvolvimento de representações semânticas distributivas.', 'es': 'Los intentos de encontrar una técnica única para la evaluación intrínseca de uso general de la incrustación de palabras no han tenido éxito hasta ahora. Presentamos un nuevo enfoque basado en el análisis cualitativo a escala de vecindarios vectoriales de palabras que cuantifica las características interpretables de un modelo dado (por ejemplo, su preferencia por sinónimos o formas morfológicas compartidas como vecinos más cercanos). Analizamos 21 de estos factores y mostramos cómo se correlacionan con el rendimiento en 14 conjuntos de datos de tareas extrínsecas e intrínsecas (y también explicamos la falta de correlación entre algunos de ellos). Nuestro enfoque permite la evaluación multifacética, la búsqueda de parámetros y, en general, un enfoque más basado en principios y basado en hipótesis para el desarrollo de representaciones semánticas distributivas.', 'fr': "Les tentatives visant à trouver une technique unique d'évaluation intrinsèque générale des intégrations de mots n'ont pas été couronnées de succès jusqu'à présent. Nous présentons une nouvelle approche basée sur une analyse qualitative à grande échelle des voisinages de vecteurs de mots qui quantifie les caractéristiques interprétables d'un modèle donné (par exemple sa préférence pour les synonymes ou les formes morphologiques partagées en tant que voisins les plus proches). Nous analysons 21 de ces facteurs et montrons comment ils sont corrélés avec les performances de 14 ensembles de données de tâches extrinsèques et intrinsèques (et expliquons également l'absence de corrélation entre certains d'entre eux). Notre approche permet une évaluation à multiples facettes, une recherche de paramètres et, de manière générale, une approche plus fondée sur des principes et basée sur des hypothèses pour le développement de représentations sémantiques distributionnelles.", 'ja': '単語埋め込みの汎用的な本質的評価のための単一のテクニックを見つける試みは、今のところ成功していません。我々は、所与のモデルの解釈可能な特徴（例えば、最も近い隣人としての同義語または共有された形態形態の好み）を定量化する、単語ベクトル近傍のスケールアップされた定性分析に基づく新しいアプローチを提示する。私たちは、そのような要因を21個分析し、それらが14個の外因性および内因性タスクデータセットのパフォーマンスとどのように関連しているかを示します（また、それらのいくつかの間の相関の欠如を説明します）。私たちのアプローチは、多面的な評価、パラメータ検索、そして一般的には、分布的意味論的表現の発展に対するより原理的で仮説主導のアプローチを可能にします。', 'zh': '迄今为止,试觅一句嵌入通用内在评估单一术未成。 立对词向量邻域之大定性分析新法,量化给定之可解(,首选同义词共其形以为邻)。 论21之所以然者,示之以14个外内之任数集之性(而解其阙相关性)。 多方评估,参数搜索,及一更具原则性,假设驱驱,以开布语义。', 'hi': 'शब्द एम्बेडिंग के सामान्य उद्देश्य आंतरिक मूल्यांकन के लिए एक ही तकनीक खोजने के प्रयास अब तक सफल नहीं हुए हैं। हम शब्द वेक्टर पड़ोस के स्केल-अप गुणात्मक विश्लेषण के आधार पर एक नया दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो किसी दिए गए मॉडल की व्याख्या योग्य विशेषताओं को निर्धारित करता है (उदाहरण के लिए निकटतम पड़ोसियों के रूप में समानार्थक या साझा रूपात्मक रूपों के लिए इसकी प्राथमिकता)। हम ऐसे 21 कारकों का विश्लेषण करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि वे 14 बाहरी और आंतरिक कार्य डेटासेट पर प्रदर्शन के साथ कैसे सहसंबंध रखते हैं (और उनमें से कुछ के बीच सहसंबंध की कमी की भी व्याख्या करते हैं)। हमारा दृष्टिकोण बहुआयामी मूल्यांकन, पैरामीटर खोज, और आम तौर पर सक्षम बनाता है - वितरणात्मक शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व के विकास के लिए एक अधिक सैद्धांतिक, परिकल्पना-संचालित दृष्टिकोण।', 'ru': 'Попытки найти единую методику для общей внутренней оценки вложений слов до сих пор не увенчались успехом. Предложен новый подход, основанный на расширенном качественном анализе окружений векторов слов, который количественно определяет интерпретируемые характеристики данной модели (например, ее предпочтение синонимам или общим морфологическим формам как ближайшим соседям). Мы анализируем 21 такой фактор и показываем, как они коррелируют с производительностью на 14 внешних и внутренних наборах данных задач (а также объясняем отсутствие корреляции между некоторыми из них). Наш подход позволяет проводить многогранную оценку, поиск параметров и в целом – более принципиальный, гипотетический подход к разработке дистрибутивных семантических представлений.', 'ga': 'Go dtí seo níor éirigh le hiarrachtaí teacht ar theicníc amháin le haghaidh meastóireachta intreach ilchuspóireach ar leabú focal. Cuirimid cur chuige nua i láthair bunaithe ar anailís cháilíochtúil scálaithe ar chomharsanachtaí veicteoirí focal a dhéanann tréithe inmhínithe de shamhail áirithe a chainníochtú (m.sh. a rogha comhchiallaigh nó foirmeacha moirfeolaíocha roinnte mar chomharsana is gaire). Déanaimid anailís ar 21 fachtóir dá leithéid agus léirímid conas a bhaineann siad le feidhmíocht ar 14 thacar sonraí tascanna eistreacha agus intreacha (agus mínímid freisin an easpa comhghaolmhaireachta idir cuid acu). Cumasaíonn ár gcur chuige meastóireacht ilghnéitheach, cuardach paraiméadar, agus go ginearálta – cur chuige níos prionsabail, bunaithe ar hipitéis, maidir le forbairt léirithe dáileacháin shéimeantacha.', 'el': 'Οι προσπάθειες εξεύρεσης μιας ενιαίας τεχνικής γενικής χρήσης εσωτερικής αξιολόγησης των ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων δεν έχουν επιτευχθεί μέχρι στιγμής. Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση βασισμένη στην κλιμακωμένη ποιοτική ανάλυση των διανυσματικών γειτονιών λέξεων που ποσοτικοποιεί ερμηνευτικά χαρακτηριστικά ενός συγκεκριμένου μοντέλου (π.χ. προτίμησή του για συνώνυμα ή κοινές μορφολογικές μορφές ως κοντινότεροι γείτονες). Αναλύουμε 21 τέτοιους παράγοντες και δείχνουμε πώς συσχετίζονται με την απόδοση σε 14α εξωγενή και εγγενή σύνολα δεδομένων εργασίας (και εξηγούμε επίσης την έλλειψη συσχέτισης μεταξύ ορισμένων από αυτούς). Η προσέγγισή μας επιτρέπει την πολύπλευρη αξιολόγηση, την αναζήτηση παραμέτρων και γενικά μια πιο θεμελιώδη, υποθετική προσέγγιση στην ανάπτυξη διανεμητικών σημασιολογικών αναπαραστάσεων.', 'ka': 'უცდილობა ერთი ტექნექტიკის ძებნა საერთო მიზეზი სიტყვების ინტერნექტური გადაწყვეტილებისთვის. ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალი პროგორმა გავაჩვენებთ სიტყვების გვეკტორის საზოგადოებების სკოლატიტური ანალიზაციისთვის, რომელიც კვანტიფიკაციურად განვითარებული მოდელის პროგრამეტრები (მაგალითად, სინონიმის ან გა 21 ასეთი ფაქტორის ანალიზაცია და ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, როგორ ისინი 14 ექსტრინსიკური და ინტერენსიკური სამუშაო მონაცემების შესახებ კორელეციის შესახებ. ჩვენი პროგრამა უფრო მრავალური განსაზღვრება, პარამეტრის ძებნა და სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა პრი', 'hu': 'A szóbeágyazások általános célú belső értékeléséhez szükséges egyetlen technika megtalálására irányuló kísérletek eddig nem voltak sikeresek. Egy új megközelítést mutatunk be a szóvektoros környékek méretezett minőségi elemzésén alapuló új megközelítésre, amely számszerűsíti egy adott modell értelmezhető jellemzőit (pl. a szinonimák vagy a megosztott morfológiai formák, mint legközelebbi szomszédok). 21 ilyen tényezőt elemezünk, és bemutatjuk, hogyan kapcsolódnak össze 14 külső és intrinsec feladat adathalmaz teljesítményével (valamint magyarázzuk egyesek közötti korreláció hiányát). Megközelítésünk lehetővé teszi a sokoldalú értékelést, paraméterkeresést, és általában - egy elvi, hipotézis-vezérelt megközelítést a disztribúciós szemantikai reprezentációk fejlesztéséhez.', 'lt': 'Iki šiol nebuvo sėkminga ieškoti vieno bendro pobūdžio žodžių įterpimo vertinimo metodo. Pateikiame naują metodą, pagrįstą išplėstine kokybine žodžių vektorių rajonų analize, kuria nustatomos aiškinamosios tam tikro modelio savybės (pvz., jo pirmenybė sinonimiams arba bendroms morfologinėms formoms kaip artimiausių kaimynų). Analizuojame 21 tokių veiksnių ir parodome, kaip jie koreliuoja su 14 išorinių ir vidinių užduočių duomenų rinkinių rezultatais (taip pat paaiškiname, kad kai kurie iš jų nėra koreliacijos). Our approach enables multi-faceted evaluation, parameter search, and generally - a more principled, hypothesis-driven approach to development of distributional semantic representations.', 'kk': 'Жалпы мақсатты сөздерді ендіру үшін бір техникалық табу әрекеті жоқ. Біз келтірілген моделінің аудармалы қасиеттерін (мысалы, синонимдер не ортақтастырылған морфологиялық пішімдерді ең жақын көңіл) анықтайтын сөздердің көпшілікті анализ негізінде жаңа тәртібін таңдаймыз. Біз 21 жалпы факторды анализ және 14 сыртқы және сыртқы тапсырма деректер қорларына қалай қатынасын көрсетедік (сондай-ақ олардың кейбірінің қатынасын түсініп көрсетедік). Біздің тәсіліміміз көптеген бағалау, параметрлерді іздеу және әдетте - үлестіріміздің семантикалық таңбаларын жасау үшін көптеген, гипотезиялық тәсілімі.', 'it': "I tentativi di trovare una singola tecnica per la valutazione intrinseca generale delle incorporazioni di parole non hanno finora avuto successo. Presentiamo un nuovo approccio basato sull'analisi qualitativa scalata dei quartieri vettoriali di parola che quantifica le caratteristiche interpretabili di un dato modello (ad esempio la sua preferenza per sinonimi o forme morfologiche condivise come vicini più vicini). Analizziamo 21 di questi fattori e mostriamo come si correlano con le prestazioni su 14 dataset di attività estrinseche ed intrinseche (e spieghiamo anche la mancanza di correlazione tra alcuni di essi). Il nostro approccio consente una valutazione sfaccettata, la ricerca di parametri e, in generale, un approccio più principiale e basato sulle ipotesi allo sviluppo di rappresentazioni semantiche distributive.", 'mk': 'Обидите да се најде единствена техника за генерална интересна оценка на вградувањето на зборови досега не беа успешни. Презентираме нов пристап базиран на зголемена квалитетна анализа на соседствата со вектори кои квантификуваат интерпретабилни карактеристики на одреден модел (на пример, неговата преференција за синоними или споделени морфолошки форми како најблиски соседи). Ние анализираме 21 вакви фактори и покажуваме како тие се поврзани со изведувањето на 14 надворешни и внатрешни датотеки на задачи (и исто така објаснуваме недостатокот на корелација помеѓу некои од нив). Нашиот пристап овозможува мултифактична евалуација, пребарување на параметри и генерално - попринципиран, хипотезен пристап кон развојот на дистрибуционалните семантични претставувања.', 'ms': 'Cubaan untuk mencari teknik tunggal untuk penilaian dalaman-tujuan umum bagi penyambungan perkataan belum berjaya. Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan baru berdasarkan analisis kualitatif skala-up bagi lingkungan vektor perkataan yang mengurangkan ciri-ciri yang boleh diterangkan bagi model tertentu (cth. keutamaannya untuk sinonim atau bentuk morfologi terkongsi sebagai jiran terdekat). We analyze 21 such factors and show how they correlate with performance on 14 extrinsic and intrinsic task datasets (and also explain the lack of correlation between some of them).  Pendekatan kami memungkinkan penilaian berbilang-facet, carian parameter, dan secara umum - pendekatan yang lebih prinsip, dipimpin hipotesis untuk pembangunan perwakilan semantik distribusi.', 'mt': 'S’issa ma rnexxilhomx isiru tentattivi biex tinstab teknika waħda għall-evalwazzjoni intrinsika ta’ skopijiet ġenerali tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem. We present a new approach based on scaled-up qualitative analysis of word vector neighborhoods that quantifies interpretable characteristics of a given model (e.g. its preference for synonyms or shared morphological forms as nearest neighbors).  Aħna nianalizzaw 21 fattur bħal dan u nuru kif jikkorrelataw mal-prestazzjoni fuq 14-il sett ta’ dejta ta’ kompiti esterni u intrinsiċi (u nispjegaw ukoll in-nuqqas ta’ korrelazzjoni bejn xi wħud minnhom). L-approċċ tagħna jippermetti evalwazzjoni b’diversi aspetti, tfittxija tal-parametri, u ġeneralment - approċċ aktar prinċipjat u mmexxi mill-ipoteżi għall-iżvilupp ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi distributtivi.', 'ml': 'സാധാരണ-ലക്ഷ്യത്തിനുള്ള ഉള്ളിലുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെ അകത്തുള്ള നിരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയെ കണ്ടെ വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d അയലുകളുടെ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പുതിയ മാറ്റം നാം അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു മോഡലിന്റെ വ്യക്തിപരമായ സ്വഭാവം നിര്\u200dണയിക്കുന്നു. അത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 21 ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും, 14 പുറത്തുള്ള ജോലിയുടെയും അകത്തുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d അവര്\u200d എങ്ങനെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുന്നുണ്ടെ നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം പല മുഖങ്ങളുടെയും വിവിതരണ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെയും പ്രതിനിധികളുടെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനായി കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാന ന', 'mn': 'Ерөнхий зорилго дээрх нэг техник олох хичээл нь үг нэвтрүүлэх нь амжилттай байхгүй. Бид тодорхой загварын тодорхойлолтыг тодорхойлж чадах вектор тойроны шинэ арга барилгыг харуулж байна (жишээлбэл, түүний синоним эсвэл хамгийн ойрхон хөршүүд болох морфологик хэлбэрүүдийг тодорхойлж чадах боломжтой хэлбэр Бид 21 иймэрхүү хүчин зүйлсийг шинжилгээ хийж, 14 гадна, дотоод даалгаварын өгөгдлийн санд хэрхэн холбоотой вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна (мөн зарим нь холбоотой байдлыг тайлбарлаж байна). Бидний арга хэмжээний олон талаар дүрслэл, параметр хайх болон ерөнхийдөө нь илүү үндсэн, хуваарилцааны semantic илэрхийллийн хөгжүүлэх арга зам юм.', 'no': 'Prøver å finna eit enkelt teknikk for generell mål innebygd evaluering av ordinnbygging har så langt ikkje blitt fullført. Vi presenterer ein ny tilnærming basert på skalerte kvalitative analyse av ordvektornabolar som kvantifiserer tolkbare karakteristikk av eit gitt modell (f.eks. innstillinga for synonym eller delte morfologiske formar som næraste nabolar). Vi analyserer 21 slike faktorer og viser korleis dei korrelaterer med utviklingane på 14 ekstrinsic og intrinsiske oppgåvedatasett (og forklarer også manglar korrelasjon mellom nokre av dei). Tilnærminga vårt slår på å utvikle fleire stadig evaluering, parameter søk og generelt - ein meir prinsippetisert, hypotesisert tilnærming til utvikling av distribusjonelle semantiske representasjonar.', 'pl': 'Próby znalezienia pojedynczej techniki ogólnego celu wewnętrznej oceny osadzeń słów nie były dotychczas udane. Przedstawiamy nowe podejście oparte na skalowanej analizie jakościowej sąsiedztw wektorowych, które ilościowo określa interpretowalne cechy danego modelu (np. jego preferencja dla synonimów lub wspólnych form morfologicznych jako najbliższych sąsiadów). Analizujemy 21 takich czynników i pokazujemy, w jaki sposób korelują one z wydajnością na 14-tku zewnętrznych i wewnętrznych zbiorach danych (a także wyjaśniamy brak korelacji między niektórymi z nich). Nasze podejście umożliwia wieloaspektową ocenę, wyszukiwanie parametrów i ogólnie bardziej zasadnicze, oparte na hipotezach podejście do rozwoju dystrybucyjnych reprezentacji semantycznych.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය- අදහස් සඳහා පරීක්ෂණයක් හොයාගන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා වචන සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණයක් තියෙන්නේ නෑ. අපි අළුත් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් පෙන්වන්නේ වෙක්ටර් වලින් වෙක්ටර් වලින් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා ස්කල්ඩ් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා අළුත් වලින අපි 21 වගේ විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම ඔවුන් පෙන්වන්නේ කොහොමද ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ ප්\u200dර අපේ අභිවිධානය සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න පුළුවන් විශාල විශ්වාස, ප්\u200dරමාණ පරීක්ෂණය, සහ සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් - තව ප්\u200dරමාණය, අභිවිධ', 'ro': 'Încercările de a găsi o singură tehnică pentru evaluarea intrinsecă generală a încorporărilor de cuvinte nu au avut succes până în prezent. Prezentăm o nouă abordare bazată pe analiza calitativă extinsă a vectoriilor de cuvinte, care cuantifică caracteristicile interpretabile ale unui anumit model (de exemplu preferința sa pentru sinonime sau forme morfologice comune ca vecini apropiați). Analizăm 21 de astfel de factori și arătăm modul în care aceștia se corelează cu performanța pe 14 seturi de date extrinsice și intrinsece de sarcini (și explicăm, de asemenea, lipsa de corelație între unii dintre ei). Abordarea noastră permite evaluarea multiplă, căutarea parametrilor și, în general, o abordare mai principială, bazată pe ipoteze pentru dezvoltarea reprezentărilor semantice distribuționale.', 'so': 'Jahaadada la helo teknik kaliya ee qiimeynta caadiga ah ee hadalka la soo geliyo marnaba ma liibaanin. Waxaannu soo bandhignaa qaab cusub oo ku saleysan baaritaanka aqoonta e e degmooyinka wadooyinka ee hadalka, kaas oo qiyaasa qaababka turjumaadda ee modelka la siiyey (tusaale ahaan u doorashada synonyamyada ama noocyada morfologiga ah sida derisyo u dhow). Waxaannu sanaynaa 21 waxyaalo caynkaas ah, waxaana tusaynaa sida ay u xidhiidhayaan waxyaabaha 14 meelo ka baxsan iyo meelaha ka hooseeya ee shaqada (sidoo kale waxaan u caddaynayaa baahida xiriirka qaarkood). Dhaqdhaqaalkayaga waxaa suurtogal ah qiimeynta kala jeeda, baaritaanka kala duduwan iyo sida caadiga ah - qaab ka horumarinta qayb-qaybinta.', 'sr': 'Pokušavanje da nađemo jednu tehniku za opšte svrhe unutrašnju procjenu reèi ugraðenja do sada nije uspešno. Predstavljamo novi pristup na osnovu skalirane kvalitativne analize susjedstva riječi vektora koji kvantificira interpretabilne karakteristike određenog model a (npr. njegove preferencije za sinonime ili zajedničke morfološke forme kao najbliže susjede). Analiziramo 21 takvih faktora i pokazujemo kako se povezuju sa učinkom na 14 izvanzemaljskih i unutrašnjih podataka (i takođe objašnjavamo nedostatak korelacije između nekih od njih). Naš pristup omogućava višestruku procjenu, pretraživanje parametara i općenito - principalniji, hipotezu-vodeni pristup razvoju distribucijskih semantičkih predstavljanja.', 'sv': 'Försöken att hitta en enda teknik för generell inneboende utvärdering av ordinbäddningar har hittills inte varit framgångsrika. Vi presenterar ett nytt tillvägagångssätt baserat på skalad kvalitativ analys av ordvektorkvarter som kvantifierar tolkningsbara egenskaper hos en given modell (t.ex. dess preferens för synonymer eller delade morfologiska former som närmaste grannar). Vi analyserar 21 sådana faktorer och visar hur de korrelerar med prestanda på 14 extrinska och inneboende uppgiftsdata (och förklarar även bristen på korrelation mellan några av dem). Vårt tillvägagångssätt möjliggör mångfacetterad utvärdering, parametersökning och generellt - ett mer principiellt, hypotesdrivet tillvägagångssätt för utveckling av distributionella semantiska representationer.', 'ur': 'ایک تکنیک پیدا کرنے کی کوشش کرتی ہے کہ کلمات انڈینگ کے داخل تحقیقات کے لئے ایک تکنیک ٹیکنیک پیدا کریں یہاں تک کامیابی نہیں ہوتی۔ ہم ایک نوی طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو کلمات ویکتور محله کے مطابق مطابق مقدار والی تحلیل پر بنیاد رکھتی ہے جو ایک مدل کی تعبیر قابل تعبیر کرسکتی ہے (جیسے اس کی ترجیح سینونیم یا مشترک مورفولوجی فرموں کے مطابق نزدیک محله کے مطابق ہے)۔ ہم 21 ایسے فاکتوروں کو تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ وہ 14 خارجی اور داخلی دنیاوی ڈیٹسٹ پر چلنے کے ساتھ کس طرح تعلق کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارا طریقہ بہت سی منطقی ارزیابی، پارامیٹ تلاش، اور عموماً - ایک زیادہ منطقی، منطقی منطقی طریقہ کی تقسیم کے لئے ہے۔', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்களின் உள்ளடக்கம் சொல்லுக்கு ஒரு தொழில்நுட்பத்தைக் கண்டுபிடிக்க முயற்சிக்கும் முயற்சிகள்  ஒரு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியின் விளக்கமான தன்மைகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறது (உதாரணமாக ஒத்திசைவுகள் அல்லது நெருங்கிய அண்டைகளாக பகிர்ந்து கொள்ளும் மாதிரிகளின் முன் 21 இவ்வாறு காரணிகளை ஆய்வு செய்து 14 வெளியில் மற்றும் உள்ளிருக்கும் பணி தரவுகளில் எவ்வாறு அவர்கள் செயல்பாடுடன் இணைக்கின்றன என்பதை காட்டுக நம்முடைய செயல்பாடு பல முகத்தில் மதிப்பு, அளபுரு தேடுதல் மற்றும் பொதுவாக - மேலும் ஒரு தலைப்பு, விதியாசமான பாதிப்பு குறிப்புகளை உர', 'vi': 'Nỗ lực tìm kiếm một kỹ thuật đơn giản cho việc đánh giá các từ ngữ vốn có chung chưa thành công. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp mới dựa trên các phân tích chất lượng nóng của xung quanh các từ vector, để định lượng các đặc điểm giải thích của mô- đun (ví dụ, khả năng của nó cho từ đồng âm hay các hình mẫu khác nhau là hàng xóm cận kề). Chúng tôi phân tích 21 những nhân tố đó và cho thấy cách chúng liên quan đến hiệu suất của bộ dữ liệu Nhiệm vụ đặc biệt ở 14 (và cũng giải thích sự thiếu liên quan giữa một số chúng). Cách tiếp cận của chúng tôi cho phép đánh giá đa mặt, tìm các tham số, và nói chung... một phương pháp dựa trên các giả thuyết để phát triển các biểu tượng phân phối.', 'uz': "Keyingi bir teknologiya topilmadi Biz bir yangi usul qo'llanmagan so'zlar vektorlar sonlarini aniqlash asosida yaratdik. Bu modelning turini aniqlash imkoniyatlarini (m.g. synonym yoki eng karibu neighborlariga boʻlishilgan morfologik formatlarini moslash mumkin). Biz 21 narsalarni analyzemiz va 14 ta ta ta'lim va ichki vazifa maʼlumotlariga qanday bog'lanishini ko'rsamiz (va ularning orasidagi bog'liq mavjudligini anglatamiz). Our approach enables multi-faceted evaluation, parameter search, and generally - a more principled, hypothesis-driven approach to development of distributional semantic representations.", 'nl': 'Pogingen om één enkele techniek te vinden voor algemene intrinsieke evaluatie van woordinbeddingen zijn tot dusver niet succesvol geweest. We presenteren een nieuwe aanpak gebaseerd op een geschaalde kwalitatieve analyse van woordvectorwijken die interpreteerbare kenmerken van een bepaald model kwantificeert (bijvoorbeeld de voorkeur voor synoniemen of gedeelde morfologische vormen als naaste buren). We analyseren 21 dergelijke factoren en laten zien hoe ze correleren met prestaties op 14-extrinsieke en intrinsieke taakgegevens (en verklaren ook het gebrek aan correlatie tussen sommige van hen). Onze aanpak maakt veelzijdige evaluatie, parameterzoeken mogelijk, en over het algemeen een meer principiële, hypothesegedreven benadering van de ontwikkeling van distributionele semantische representaties.', 'bg': 'Опитите за намиране на единна техника за обща цел вътрешна оценка на вграждането на думи досега не са успешни. Представяме нов подход, базиран на мащабиран качествен анализ на словесни векторни квартали, който количествено определя интерпретираните характеристики на даден модел (например предпочитанията му към синоними или споделени морфологични форми като най-близки съседи). Анализираме 21 такива фактора и показваме как те корелират с производителността на 14 външни и вътрешни набора от данни за задачи (както и обясняваме липсата на корелация между някои от тях). Нашият подход позволява многостранна оценка, търсене на параметри и като цяло - по-принципен, хипотезно-ориентиран подход към разработването на дистрибуционни семантични представяния.', 'da': 'Forsøg på at finde en enkelt teknik til generel iboende evaluering af ordindlejringer har hidtil ikke været vellykket. Vi præsenterer en ny tilgang baseret på skaleret kvalitativ analyse af ordvektorkvarterer, der kvantificerer fortolkningsbare karakteristika for en given model (f.eks. dens præference for synonymer eller delte morfologiske former som nærmeste naboer). Vi analyserer 21 sådanne faktorer og viser, hvordan de korrelerer med performance på 14 ekstrene og iboende opgavedatasæt (og forklarer også manglen på korrelation mellem nogle af dem). Vores tilgang muliggør flerfacetteret evaluering, parametersøgning og generelt - en mere principiel, hypotese-drevet tilgang til udvikling af distributionsmæssige semantiske repræsentationer.', 'de': 'Versuche, eine einzige Technik zur allgemeinen intrinsischen Bewertung von Worteinbettungen zu finden, waren bisher nicht erfolgreich. Wir präsentieren einen neuen Ansatz, der auf einer skalierten qualitativen Analyse von Wortvektorvierteln basiert, die interpretierbare Merkmale eines gegebenen Modells quantifiziert (z.B. seine Präferenz für Synonyme oder gemeinsame morphologische Formen als nächste Nachbarn). Wir analysieren 21 solche Faktoren und zeigen auf, wie sie mit der Performance von 14-extrinsischen und intrinsischen Taskdatensätzen korrelieren (und erklären auch die fehlende Korrelation zwischen einigen von ihnen). Unser Ansatz ermöglicht eine facettenreiche Bewertung, Parametersuche und generell einen prinzipielleren, hypothesengesteuerten Ansatz zur Entwicklung verteilter semantischer Repräsentationen.', 'ko': '지금까지 통용되는 내재 평가 단어를 찾아내려는 기술은 아직 성공하지 못했다.우리는 어향량 이웃의 정성 분석을 바탕으로 하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 주어진 모델의 해석 가능한 특징(예를 들어 이 모델은 동의어나 공유 형태를 가장 가까운 이웃으로 선호한다)을 계량화했다.우리는 21개의 이러한 요소를 분석하고 14개의 외재와 내적 임무 데이터 집합의 표현과 어떻게 관련이 있는지 보여주었다(그리고 그 중 일부 요소 간의 관련성이 부족하다는 것을 설명했다).우리의 방법은 다방면의 평가, 파라미터 검색, 그리고 더욱 원칙적이고 가설적으로 구동되는 분포식 의미 표시 개발 방법을 지원한다.', 'sw': 'Jaribio la kutafuta teknolojia moja kwa ajili ya uchunguzi wa kina wa maneno yaliyoandikwa kwa ujumla haujafanikiwa mpaka sasa. Tunaweza kutengeneza mbinu mpya inayotokana na uchambuzi wa kiwango kikubwa wa majirani ya vector za neno ambazo hupima sifa za tafsiri za modeli inayotolewa (kwa mfano utaratibu wake kwa ushirikiano au kusambaza mitazamo ya kifolojia kama majirani karibu). Tunafahamu sababu 21 kama hizo na kuonyesha jinsi wanavyohusiana na utendaji wa kazi 14 za nje na za ndani (na pia kuelezea ukosefu wa uhusiano kati ya baadhi yao). Hatua yetu inawezesha kutathmini, kutafuta parameter, na kwa ujumla - mbinu inayoongozwa na nadharia za kutisha katika maendeleo ya uwakilishi wa sekunde za mchanganyiko.', 'hr': 'Pokušava pronaći jedinu tehniku za uvjetnu procjenu riječima ugrađenja do sada nije uspješna. Predstavljamo novi pristup na osnovu skalirane kvalitativne analize susjedstva riječi vektora koji kvantificiraju interpretabilne karakteristike određenog model a (npr. njegove preferencije za sinonime ili zajedničke morfološke oblike kao najbliže susjede). Analiziramo 21 takvih faktora i pokazujemo kako se povezuju s učinkom na 14 izvanzemaljskih i unutrašnjih zadataka podataka (i objašnjavamo nedostatak korelacije između nekih od njih). Naš pristup omogućava višestruku procjenu, pretragu parametara i općenito - načelniji pristup pod hipotezom na razvoj distribucijskih semantičkih predstavljanja.', 'af': "Versoek om 'n enkele teknike te vind vir algemeen- doel intrinsiese evaluering van woord inbêding tot ver nie suksesvol was nie. Ons stel 'n nuwe toegang gebaseer op skaal-opgemaakte kwalitatiewe analiseer van woord vektor nabiede wat omtelbaar karakteristieke van 'n gegewe model (bv. sy voorkeure vir sinonime of gedeelde morfologiese vorms as nabiese nabiede). Ons analyseer 21 sodanige faktore en wys hoe hulle verbind met effektuur op 14 ekstrinsiese en intrinsiese taakdatasse (en ook verduidelik die ontbreek van korrelasie tussen sommige van hulle). Ons toegang maak multi-gesig evaluering, parameter soek en gewoonlik toegang aan die ontwikkeling van verspreidingssemantiese voorstellings aan 'n meer oorspronklike, hypotese-gedryf toegang tot ontwikkeling van verspreidingse semantiese voorstellings.", 'id': 'Perusahaan untuk menemukan teknik tunggal untuk evaluasi secara umum dari penyambungan kata belum berhasil. We present a new approach based on scaled-up qualitative analysis of word vector neighborhoods that quantifies interpretable characteristics of a given model (e.g. its preference for synonyms or shared morphological forms as nearest neighbors).  Kami menganalisis 21 faktor tersebut dan menunjukkan bagaimana mereka berkorelasi dengan prestasi pada 14 set data tugas ekstrinsik dan intrinsik (dan juga menjelaskan kekurangan korelasi antara beberapa dari mereka). Pendekatan kami memungkinkan evaluasi multi-facet, pencarian parameter, dan secara umum - pendekatan yang lebih prinsip, didorong hipotesis untuk pengembangan representati semantis distribusi.', 'fa': 'تلاش برای پیدا کردن یک تکنیک برای ارزیابی داخلی کلمه\u200cهای ابتدای کلمه تا حالا موفق نشده است. ما روش جدیدی را بر اساس تحلیل کیفیت بالا و بالا آماده کردن محله\u200cهای ویکتور کلمه نشان می\u200cدهیم که ویژگی\u200cهای قابل تعبیر قابل تعبیر از یک مدل داده می\u200cشود (برای مثال ترجیح آن برای سینونیم\u200cها یا فرم\u200cهای مورفولوژیک مشترک به عنوان نزدیکترین همسا ما ۲۱ چنین فاکتور را تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که چگونه با عملکرد در ۱۴ مجموعه داده\u200cهای عملکرد خارجی و داخلی ارتباط دارند (و همچنین ناتوانی ارتباط بین بعضی از آنها توضیح می\u200cدهند). دستور ما به ارزیابی، جستجوی پارامتر و عمومی تواند روش بیشتری را به توسعه نمایش\u200cهای semantic تقسیم دهد.', 'tr': "Umumy maksady üçin ýeke bir tekniki tapmak synanyşýar. Şu wagt sözleri girişinde çykyp bilmedi. Yeni bir yaklaşım şeklinde, ölçeklenmiş şekilde dayanarak kelime vektör etrafının çevrelerine dayanarak, verilen bir model'in yorumlayıcı özelliklerini ölçüp veriyoruz (meselâ, sinonim veya paylaşılan morfolojik biçimleri en yakın komşular olarak tanımlayacak). Biz 21 ýaly faktörleri çözümlendik we 14 ekstrinsic we iç taýdan meslek sanatynda nähili etkilendiklerini görkez. Biziň ýaryşymyz birnäçe-ýüz çykyş, parameterler araştyrmasyny mümkin edýär we dünýä-da daha prinsipli, hypotoziýa-ýüzüni daýlamak semantik temisleriniň gelişmesine göz önüne getirilýär.", 'sq': 'Përpjekjet për të gjetur një teknikë të vetme për vlerësimin me qëllim të përgjithshëm të brendshëm të përfshirjes së fjalëve deri tani nuk kanë qenë të suksesshme. Ne paraqesim një qasje të re bazuar në analizën kualitative të shkallëzuar të lagjeve të vektorit të fjalës që përcakton karakteristikat e interpretueshme të një modeli të caktuar (për shembull preferenca e tij për sinonime apo forma morfologjike të përbashkëta si fqinjë më të afërt). We analyze 21 such factors and show how they correlate with performance on 14 extrinsic and intrinsic task datasets (and also explain the lack of correlation between some of them).  Përqasja jonë mundëson vlerësimin e shumëfaqeve, kërkimin e parametrave dhe përgjithësisht - një metodë më të parim, të drejtuar nga hipoteza për zhvillimin e përfaqësimeve semantike shpërndarëse.', 'hy': "Փորձերը գտնել մեկ մեթոդ ընդհանուր նպատակով ներգրավված բառերի ներքին գնահատման համար մինչ այժմ հաջողակ չեն եղել: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք նոր մոտեցում, որը հիմնված է բառերի վեկտորների հարևանքների որակային վերլուծության մեծացման վրա, որը քանակում է որոշ մոդելի մեկնաբանելի հատկություններ (օրինակ, այն նախընտրում է սինոնիմների կամ տարածված մորֆոլոգիական ձևերի համար որպես ամենամեծ հարև Մենք վերլուծում ենք 21 նման գործոն և ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես են դրանք կապված 14 արտաքին և ներքին գործողությունների տվյալների համակարգերի արտադրության հետ (և նաև բացատրում են նրանցից որոշների միջև կապվածության պակասը): Մեր մոտեցումը հնարավորություն է տալիս բազմակողմնակի գնահատման, պարամետրերի որոնման և ընդհանուր առմամբ' ավելի սկզբունքային, հիպոթեզից հիմնված մոտեցում դիմելու սեմանտիկ ներկայացումների զարգացման համար:", 'bn': 'সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য একটি প্রযুক্তি খুঁজে বের করার চেষ্টা করা হচ্ছে শব্দের বিভিন্ন ভিত্তিক মূল্যায়নের জন্য এত আমরা একটি নতুন পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি শব্দ ভেক্টরের প্রতিবেশীর বিশ্লেষণের উপর ভিত্তিক যা একটি মডেলের ব্যাখ্যাত ব্যাখ্যা করে (যেমন সিনোনিম বা প্রতিবেশী হিসেবে তার পছন আমরা ২১ ধরনের কারণ বিশ্লেষণ করি এবং দেখাই কিভাবে তারা ১৪টি বাইরে এবং অভ্যন্তরীণ কাজের ডাটাসেটের সাথে সম্পর্কিত (এবং তাদের মধ্যে কিছু কিছু আমাদের প্রতিযোগিতা বহুমুখি মুখোমুখি মূল্য, প্যারামাটার অনুসন্ধান এবং সাধারণত - বিতরণের সেমান্টিক প্রতিনিধিদের উন্নয়নের জন্', 'bs': 'Pokušava pronaći jedinu tehniku za uvrnuto procjenu riječi o integraciji do sada nije uspješna. Predstavljamo novi pristup na osnovu skalirane kvalitativne analize susjedstva riječi vektora koji kvantificira interpretabilne karakteristike određenog model a (npr. njegove preferencije za sinonime ili zajedničke morfološke forme kao najbliže susjede). Analiziramo 21 takvih faktora i pokazujemo kako se povezuju s učinkom na 14 izvanzemaljskih i unutrašnjih zadataka (i takođe objašnjavamo nedostatak korelacije između nekih od njih). Naš pristup omogućava višestruku procjenu, pretragu parametara i općenito - načelniji pristup pod hipotezom na razvoj distribucijskih semantičkih predstavljanja.', 'am': 'የጠቅላላ ጉዳይ የቃላት ግንኙነት አካባቢ ማስታወቂያ አንዲት ቴክክኖስን ለማግኘት ፍላጎት እስከ አሁን አልቻለም፡፡ አዲስ የቃላት የዌር ጎረቤቶችን በማስተካከል አዲስ ሥርዓት እናደርጋለን፡፡ 21 እንደዚህ ያሉትን ነገሮች እናሳያልን፣ 14 ውጭ እና ውጪ ስራ ዳታዎችን እንዴት እንደተገናኙ እናሳያቸዋለን (እናም በአንዳንዶቹ መካከል ግንኙነት ግንኙነት እንዳይታወቅ እናብራራለን፡፡ የዓይነታችን ግንኙነት የብዙ facebook ማስታወቂያ፣ ተቃውሞ ፈልግ እና በጠቅላላ - የክፍለ ስምታዊ ተሟጋቾችን ለመፍጠር የሚችል አካሄድ ነው፡፡', 'cs': 'Pokusy o nalezení jediné techniky pro všeobecné vnitřní hodnocení slovních vložení zatím nebyly úspěšné. Představujeme nový přístup založený na škálované kvalitativní analýze slovních vektorových sousedů, který kvantifikuje interpretovatelné charakteristiky daného modelu (např. jeho preference synonymů nebo sdílených morfologických forem jako nejbližších sousedů). Analyzujeme 21 takové faktory a ukazujeme, jak korelují s výkonem na 14-ti extrinsických a intrinsických datových sadách úloh (a také vysvětlujeme nedostatek korelace mezi některými z nich). Náš přístup umožňuje mnohostranné hodnocení, vyhledávání parametrů a obecně zásadnější, hypotézově řízený přístup k vývoji distribučních sémantických reprezentací.', 'az': 'Məqsədilə birləşdirilmiş sözlərin içərisində tək bir tekniki tapmağa çalışırlar. Biz yeni bir tərzim g östəririk ki, belə bir modelinin təfsil edilə biləcək məlumatlarını (məsələn, sinonimlərin və ya paylaşılan morfolojik formların ən yaxın qonşuları kimi təfsil edilə biləcək məlumatların təfsil edilə bilər). Biz 21 böyük faktörləri analiz edirik və onların 14 extrinsic və iç işlər verilənləri ilə necə bağlı olduğunu göstəririk. Bizim tərzimiz çoxlu üzlü değerlendirməyi, parametrləri araştırması və genellik olaraq - dağıtış semantik tərzlərinin gelişməsinə daha çox prinsipli, hipotezi tərzində təşkil edilən tərzini fəallaşdırır.', 'et': 'Püüded leida üks meetod sõna manustamise üldiseks sisemiseks hindamiseks ei ole seni olnud edukad. Esitame uue lähenemisviisi, mis põhineb sõnavaktorite naabruskondade laiendatud kvalitatiivsel analüüsil, mis kvantifitseerib konkreetse mudeli tõlgendatavaid omadusi (nt eelistatakse sünonüüme või jagatud morfoloogilisi vorme lähimate naabritena). Analüüsime 21 sellist tegurit ja näitame, kuidas need seostuvad 14 välise ja sisemise ülesande andmekogumi tulemuslikkusega (samuti selgitame mõne neist puuduvat korrelatsiooni). Meie lähenemine võimaldab mitmetahulist hindamist, parameetrite otsingut ja üldiselt - põhimõttelisemat, hüpoteesipõhist lähenemist jaotussemantiliste representatsioonide arendamisele.', 'fi': 'Yritykset löytää yksi menetelmä sanaupotusten yleiseen sisäiseen arviointiin eivät ole toistaiseksi onnistuneet. Esitämme uuden lähestymistavan, joka perustuu sanavektorinaapurustojen skaalattuun kvalitatiiviseen analyysiin, joka kvantifioi tietyn mallin tulkittavissa olevia ominaisuuksia (esim. sen suosio synonyymejä tai jaettuja morfologisia muotoja lähimpänä naapurina). Analysoimme 21 tällaista tekijää ja osoitamme, miten ne korreloivat suorituskykyyn 14 ulkoisessa ja luontaisessa tehtäväaineistossa (ja selitämme myös korrelaation puuttumisen joidenkin niiden välillä). Lähestymistapamme mahdollistaa monitahoisen arvioinnin, parametrihaun ja yleisesti - periaatteellisemman, hypoteesipohjaisemman lähestymistavan jakelusemanttisten esitysten kehittämiseen.', 'ca': "Attempts to find a single technique for general-purpose intrinsic evaluation of word embeddings have so far not been successful.  Presentam un nou enfocament basat en una anàlisi qualitativa escalada de barris de vectors que quantifica les característiques interpretables d'un model determinat (per exemple la seva preferència per sinonims o formes morfològiques compartides com a veïns més propers). Anàlisim 21 factors d'aquest tipus i demostram com correlacionen amb el rendiment en 14 conjunts de dades de tasques extrínsiques i intrínsecs (i també explicem la falta de correlació entre alguns d'ells). Our approach enables multi-faceted evaluation, parameter search, and generally - a more principled, hypothesis-driven approach to development of distributional semantic representations.", 'jv': 'Tenging We present Awak dh챕w챕 챕n챗m챗n ngerti y챗m챗n iki dadi 챕w챕 nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan kanggo nyengke kapan kanggo nyengke kapan kanggo nyengke kapan kanggo nyengke kapan kanggo nyengke kapan kanggo nyengke kapan karo 14. We method enables multi-shaped assertion, parameters Search, and generous - a additional basic, theorem-drived method to design of Distribubutionsemanti representations.', 'sk': 'Poskusi iskanja ene same tehnike za splošno namensko notranje vrednotenje vgradnje besed doslej niso bili uspešni. Predstavljamo nov pristop, ki temelji na razširjeni kvalitativni analizi besednih vektorskih sosesk, ki kvantificira razložljive značilnosti določenega modela (npr. njegova prednost za sinonime ali skupne morfološke oblike kot najbližje sosede). Analiziramo 21 takšnih dejavnikov in pokažemo, kako se povezujejo z zmogljivostjo na 14 zunanjih in intrinzičnih naborih podatkov o opravilih (pojasnjujemo tudi pomanjkanje korelacije med nekaterimi). Naš pristop omogoča večplastno vrednotenje, iskanje parametrov in na splošno bolj načelni, hipotezno usmerjen pristop k razvoju distribucijskih semantičnih reprezentacij.', 'ha': "Ga jarraba ka gano wani tuɓani na ɗabi'a wa muhalli na ƙari da ke cikin maganar da aka shigar da shi ba za'a ci babban rabo ba. Tuna halatar da wata hanyarwa na daban a kan anayyar da takardar-faɗi mai cikakken kalma na garwaya masu kallo wanda ke ƙaddara fassarar sifatin misãlai da aka ba (misali, zaɓen ka ga synonim ko kuma da shirin fomat na morfologi kamar matabbata). Ana yi anayya ga 21 masu sakan wannan kuma Muke nũna jinsi da suke haɗi da aikin na 14 na bakin da ke cikin aikin na guda (kuma Munã bayyana manyan mazauni a tsakanin wasu daga gare su). Tsarakanmu na iya amfani da evaluci masu yawa-facete, yin basuɗo da parameter, kuma a jumla'a - wata kashfiya masu gabatar da hanyarwa na-hanyoyi zuwa ta ƙara masu motsi na semantic.", 'he': 'ניסיונות למצוא טכניקה אחת עבור הערכה פנימית למטרה כללית של מערכות מילים עד כה לא הצליחו. אנו מציגים גישה חדשה מבוססת על ניתוח איכותי מבוסס של שכונות ווקטוריות מילים שמגדירים את האופיינים הנפשרים של מודל מסוים (למשל העדיפות שלו לסינונימים או צורות מורפולוגיות משותפות כשכנים קרובים ביותר). אנו מנתחים 21 גורמים כאלה ולהראות כיצד הם מתחברים לביצוע על 14 קבוצות מידע משימות חיצוניים ובתוכניות (וגם להסביר את חוסר התחברות בין חלק מהם). הגישה שלנו מאפשרת עריכה מרובה פנים, חיפוש פרמטרים, ובכלל - גישה יותר עקרונית, מונעת על היפותזיה לפיתוח של מייצגים סמנטיים פיצועים.', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་གཏོང་འབེབས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ། We present a new approach based on scaled-up qualitative analysis of word vector neighborhoods that quantifies interpretable characteristics of a given model (e.g. its preference for synonyms or shared morphological forms as nearest neighbors). ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་ཆ་ཉིད་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་གཙོ་རིམ་༡༤་དང་ནང་འཁོད་ཀྱི་ལས་ཀ་གནད་སྡུད་ནང་གི་བྱ་ཚིག Our approach enables multi-faced evaluation, parameter search, and generally - a more principled, hypothesis-driven approach to development of distributional semantic representations.'}
{'en': 'Word Sense Disambiguation Based on Word Similarity Calculation Using Word Vector Representation from a Knowledge-based Graph', 'ar': 'توضيح تحسس الكلمات استنادًا إلى حساب تشابه الكلمات باستخدام تمثيل متجه الكلمات من رسم بياني قائم على المعرفة', 'es': 'Desambiguación del sentido de las palabras basada en el cálculo de similitud de palabras mediante la representación vectorial de palabras a partir de un gráfico', 'pt': 'Desambiguação do Word Sense com base no cálculo de semelhança de palavras usando a representação vetorial de palavras de um gráfico baseado em conhecimento', 'fr': "Désambiguïsation du sens des mots basée sur le calcul de similarité des mots à l'aide de la représentation vectorielle des mots à partir", 'ja': 'ナレッジベースのグラフからのワードベクトル表現を使用したワード類似性計算に基づくワードセンスの曖昧性解消', 'zh': '盖知图之词向量,盖相似性算之词义消歧义', 'hi': 'Word सेंस Disambiguation Word समानता परिकलन पर आधारित Word वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग कर एक ज्ञान-आधारित ग्राफ़ से', 'ru': 'Раздвоение смысла слов на основе вычисления сходства слов с использованием векторного представления слов на основе графа, основанного на знаниях', 'ga': 'Dí-athbhrí Focal Bunaithe ar Ríomh Cosúlacht Focal Ag Úsáid Léiriú Veicteoir Focal ó Ghraf Bunaithe ar an Eolas', 'el': 'Αποσαφήνιση με βάση τον υπολογισμό ομοιότητας λέξεων χρησιμοποιώντας τη διανυσματική αναπαράσταση λέξεων από ένα γράφημα βασισμένο στη γνώση', 'ka': 'სიტყვების გაგრძელება განსხვავება სიტყვების განსხვავებაზე გამოყენებული სიტყვების გაგრძელება სიტყვების გაგრძელებაზე', 'hu': 'A Word érzékelése szóhasonlósági kiszámításon alapuló szóhasonlósági kiszámítás segítségével tudásalapú grafikonból származó Word vektoros ábrázolás segítségével', 'mk': 'Размислување на чувството на зборот базирано на пресметка на сличност на зборот со користење на репрезентација на вектор на зборот од граф базиран на знаење', 'kk': 'Сөздің ұқсас сияқты есептеуіне негізделген сөздің сезімін бұғаттауName', 'it': 'Disambiguazione del senso delle parole basata sul calcolo della somiglianza delle parole utilizzando la rappresentazione vettoriale di Word da un grafico basato sulla conoscenza', 'ml': 'വാക്ക് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നിന്നും അറിവുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ്', 'mn': 'Зөв төстэй тооцоололтын үндсэн үг мэдлэг суурилсан графикийн үеийн векторын үзүүлэлтийг ашиглах', 'lt': 'žodžio jausmų nedviprasmiškumas, pagrįstas žodžio panašumo skaičiavimu, naudojant žodžio vektoriaus atstovavimą iš žiniomis pagrįsto grafiko', 'ms': 'Word Sense Disambiguation Based on Word Similarity Calculation Using Word Vector Representation from a Knowledge-based Graph', 'mt': 'Disambigwazzjoni tas-Sens tal-kliem ibbażata fuq Kalkolu ta’ Similarità tal-kliem bl-użu ta’ Rappreżentazzjoni tal-Vettur tal-kliem minn Grafika bbażata fuq l-Għarfien', 'sr': 'Disambiguacija osjeæaja reèi na osnovu raèunanja sliènosti reèi Koristeæi predstavu vektora reèi iz grafika na osnovu znanja', 'no': 'Disambiguasjon av ordfølelse basert på rekninga av ordlikningar ved bruk av ordvektorrepresentasjon frå ein kjennomsnittbasert graf', 'si': 'වචන වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානයක් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන් වචන විස්තරය අවස්ථානය', 'so': 'Heeganka Sense', 'pl': 'Rozjasnienie funkcji Word Sense oparte na obliczaniu podobieństwa słowa za pomocą przedstawienia wektorowego programu Word z wykresu opartego na wiedzy', 'ta': 'Name', 'ro': 'Deambiguizarea simțului Word bazată pe calculul similitudinii cuvintelor utilizând reprezentarea vectorială Word dintr-un grafic bazat pe cunoștințe', 'sv': 'Ordsinnets Disambiguation Baserat på beräkning av ordlikhet med hjälp av Word Vector Representation från en kunskapsbaserad graf', 'ur': 'Word Sense Disambiguation Based on Word Similarity Calculation using a Word Vector Representation from a Knowledge-based Graph', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Từ thất bại cảm xúc Từ, dựa trên tính hiệu ứng từ, sử dụng sự hiện diện về Từ luân chuyển từ đồ họa dựa vào tri thức', 'bg': 'Разясняване на чувството на думи въз основа на изчисляване на приликата на думи с използване на векторно представяне на думи от базирана на знание графика', 'hr': 'Disambiguacija osjećaja riječi na temelju računa sličnosti riječi Koristeći predstavu vektora riječi iz grafika na znanju', 'da': 'Word Sense Disambiguation Baseret på Word lighedsberegning ved hjælp af Word Vector Representation fra en videnbaseret graf', 'nl': 'Word Sense-verduidelijking op basis van berekening van de gelijkenis van woorden met behulp van Word Vector Representatie van een op kennis gebaseerde grafiek', 'de': 'Word Sense-Disambiguation basierend auf der Berechnung der Wortgleichheit mithilfe von Word-Vektordarstellung aus einem wissensbasierten Diagramm', 'ko': '지식도에 기초한 어향량으로 표시된 단어의 유사도 계산의 의미 변조', 'id': 'Pengambiguasi Sensi Perkataan Berdasarkan Kalkulasi Kesamaan Perkataan Menggunakan Representasi Vektor Perkataan dari Graf Berdasarkan Pengetahuan', 'sw': 'Ukosefu wa Seneti kwa msingi wa Hesabu ya Sayansi kwa Usumi wa Representation of Word based on Knowledge Graph', 'sq': 'Word Sense Disambiguation Based on Word Similarity Calculation Using Word Vector Representation from a Knowledge-based Graph', 'tr': 'Kelimi Taýdalyk Hesaplamasynda Ullanýan Kelimi Vektör Görkezilişi', 'hy': 'Բառերի նմանության հաշվարկումների հիմնված բառերի տարբերակների ներկայացումը գիտելիքի հիմնված գրաֆից', 'am': 'Word Similarity Calculation using Word Vector Representation from a Known-Based Graph', 'fa': 'تبدیل کردن احساس کلمه بر اساس حساب شبیه کلمه استفاده از نمایش ویکتور کلمه از گراف بر اساس علم', 'bn': 'ওয়ার্ড ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধি ব্যবহার করে একটি জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিক গ্রাফ থেকে ব্যবহার করে শব্দের সেন্সের বিভ্রান্তিকর বিভ্র', 'az': 'Bilinm톛-tabanl캼 Grafikd톛n Kelimi Vekt칬r G칬r칲nt칲l톛ri istifad톛 ed톛r톛k Kelimi G칬r칲nt칲l톛ri Qeyd Etm톛si', 'af': "Woord Sense Ontbreking gebaseer op Woord Similariteit Berekening Gebruik Woord Vektor Voorstelling van 'n kennis-gebaseerde Grafik", 'cs': 'Disambiguation Word Sense založené na výpočtu podobnosti slova pomocí vektorové reprezentace slova z grafu založeného na znalostech', 'ca': 'Word Sense Disambiguation Based on Word Similarity Calculation Using Word Vector Representation from a Knowledge-based Graph', 'et': 'Word Sense eristamine sõna sarnasuse arvutamisel Wordi vektori esitamise abil teadmistepõhiselt graafikult', 'fi': 'Word Sense Erottelu Sanan samankaltaisuuden laskentaan perustuva Word Vector Representation from a Knowledge-based Graph', 'bs': 'Disambiguacija osjećaja riječi na temelju računa sličnosti riječi Koristeći predstavu vektora riječi iz grafika na osnovu znanja', 'jv': 'Word Sense disabled mbigution basa nang Word Similrity Calulation Using Word vector representation from a knowknowknown-supported Graph', 'sk': 'Razjasnitev besednega zaznavanja na podlagi izračuna podobnosti besed z uporabo predstavitve besednega vektorja iz grafikona, ki temelji na znanju', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ניתוח תחושת מילים מבוסס על חישוב דומה מילים באמצעות מייצג Vector מילים מגרף מבוסס על ידע', 'bo': 'Word Sense Disambiguation Based on Word Similarity Calculation Using Word Vector Representation from a Knowledge-based Graph'}
{'en': 'Word sense disambiguation (WSD) is the task to determine the word sense according to its context. Many existing WSD studies have been using an external knowledge-based unsupervised approach because it has fewer word set constraints than supervised approaches requiring training data. In this paper, we propose a new WSD method to generate the context of an ambiguous word by using similarities between an ambiguous word and words in the input document. In addition, to leverage our WSD method, we further propose a new word similarity calculation method based on the semantic network structure of BabelNet. We evaluate the proposed methods on the SemEval-13 and SemEval-15 for English WSD dataset. Experimental results demonstrate that the proposed WSD method significantly improves the baseline WSD method. Furthermore, our WSD system outperforms the state-of-the-art WSD systems in the Semeval-13 dataset. Finally, it has higher performance than the state-of-the-art unsupervised knowledge-based WSD system in the average performance of both datasets.', 'ar': 'إن إزالة الغموض عن معنى الكلمة (WSD) هي مهمة تحديد معنى الكلمة وفقًا لسياقها. تستخدم العديد من دراسات WSD الحالية نهجًا خارجيًا قائمًا على المعرفة غير خاضع للإشراف لأنه يحتوي على قيود مجموعة كلمات أقل من الأساليب الخاضعة للإشراف التي تتطلب بيانات التدريب. في هذا البحث ، نقترح طريقة WSD جديدة لتوليد سياق كلمة غامضة باستخدام أوجه التشابه بين كلمة غامضة وكلمات في مستند الإدخال. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، للاستفادة من طريقة WSD الخاصة بنا ، نقترح أيضًا طريقة جديدة لحساب تشابه الكلمات استنادًا إلى بنية الشبكة الدلالية لـ BabelNet. نقوم بتقييم الطرق المقترحة على مجموعة بيانات SemEval-13 و SemEval-15 للغة الإنجليزية WSD. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن طريقة WSD المقترحة تحسن بشكل كبير طريقة WSD الأساسية. علاوة على ذلك ، يتفوق نظام WSD لدينا على أحدث أنظمة WSD في مجموعة بيانات Semeval-13. أخيرًا ، يتمتع بأداء أعلى من نظام WSD الحديث غير الخاضع للرقابة القائم على المعرفة في متوسط أداء مجموعتي البيانات.', 'pt': 'A desambiguação do sentido da palavra (WSD) é a tarefa de determinar o sentido da palavra de acordo com seu contexto. Muitos estudos WSD existentes têm usado uma abordagem não supervisionada baseada em conhecimento externo porque tem menos restrições de conjunto de palavras do que as abordagens supervisionadas que exigem dados de treinamento. Neste artigo, propomos um novo método WSD para gerar o contexto de uma palavra ambígua usando semelhanças entre uma palavra ambígua e palavras no documento de entrada. Além disso, para alavancar nosso método WSD, propomos ainda um novo método de cálculo de similaridade de palavras baseado na estrutura de rede semântica do BabelNet. Avaliamos os métodos propostos no conjunto de dados SemEval-13 e SemEval-15 para WSD em inglês. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que o método WSD proposto melhora significativamente o método WSD de linha de base. Além disso, nosso sistema WSD supera os sistemas WSD de última geração no conjunto de dados Semeval-13. Por fim, possui desempenho superior ao sistema WSD baseado em conhecimento não supervisionado de última geração no desempenho médio de ambos os conjuntos de dados.', 'es': 'La desambiguación del sentido de las palabras (WSD) es la tarea de determinar el sentido de la palabra de acuerdo con su contexto. Muchos estudios de WSD existentes han utilizado un enfoque no supervisado basado en el conocimiento externo porque tiene menos restricciones de conjunto de palabras que los enfoques supervisados que requieren datos de entrenamiento. En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo método WSD para generar el contexto de una palabra ambigua mediante el uso de similitudes entre una palabra ambigua y palabras en el documento de entrada. Además, para aprovechar nuestro método WSD, proponemos un nuevo método de cálculo de similitud de palabras basado en la estructura de red semántica de BabelNet. Evaluamos los métodos propuestos en el conjunto de datos SemEval-13 y SemEval-15 para el WSD en inglés. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que el método de WSD propuesto mejora significativamente el método de WSD de referencia. Además, nuestro sistema WSD supera a los sistemas WSD de última generación en el conjunto de datos Semeval-13. Por último, tiene un rendimiento más alto que el sistema WSD basado en el conocimiento no supervisado de última generación en el rendimiento promedio de ambos conjuntos de datos.', 'fr': "La désambiguïsation des sens des mots (WSD) est la tâche qui consiste à déterminer le sens du mot en fonction de son contexte. De nombreuses études existantes sur les WSD utilisent une approche externe non supervisée fondée sur les connaissances, car elle comporte moins de contraintes de jeu de mots que les approches supervisées nécessitant des données de formation. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode WSD pour générer le contexte d'un mot ambigu en utilisant des similitudes entre un mot ambigu et des mots dans le document d'entrée. De plus, pour tirer parti de notre méthode WSD, nous proposons également une nouvelle méthode de calcul de similarité de mots basée sur la structure du réseau sémantique de BabelNet. Nous évaluons les méthodes proposées sur le jeu de données SemEval-13 et SemEval-15 pour l'anglais WSD. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que la méthode proposée améliore de façon significative la méthode de référence de l'WSD. De plus, notre système WSD surpasse les systèmes WSD de pointe dans le jeu de données Semeval-13. Enfin, il présente des performances supérieures à celles du système WSD basé sur les connaissances non supervisé de pointe en termes de performances moyennes des deux ensembles de données.", 'ja': '単語センスの曖昧さ解消（ WSD ）は、その文脈に応じて単語センスを決定するタスクです。 多くの既存のWSD研究は、トレーニングデータを必要とする監督されたアプローチよりもワードセットの制約が少ないため、外部知識ベースの監督されていないアプローチを使用してきました。 本稿では，曖昧な単語と入力文書の単語との類似性を利用して，曖昧な単語の文脈を生成する新しいWSD法を提案する． また、WSD法を活用するために、BabelNetのセマンティックネットワーク構造に基づいた新たな単語類似性計算法を提案しています。 私たちは、英語のWSDデータセットのSemEval -13およびSemEval -15で提案されている方法を評価します。 実験結果は、提案されたＷＳＤ法がベースラインＷＳＤ法を著しく改善することを実証する。 さらに、弊社のWSDシステムは、Semeval -13データセットの最先端のWSDシステムを上回っています。 最後に、両方のデータセットの平均パフォーマンスにおいて、最先端の無監督知識ベースのWSDシステムよりも高いパフォーマンスを備えています。', 'zh': '词义消歧义 (WSD) 因其上下文定词义也。 诸见WSD治于外者无监督之法,以其少于练数者单词集约束也。 本文有新WSD之法,用之不明单词与输文档中单词之相似性,以成不明单词之上下文。 此外用吾WSD法,更立BabelNet语义网络结构新词相似性算法。 估SemEval-13SemEval-15上英语WSD数集之法。 实验结果表明,所上WSD法著入基线WSD法。 此外,我们的WSD系统在Semeval-13数集优于最先进的WSD系统。 最后,两数集之均,有先进无监之WSD。', 'hi': 'शब्द भावना बहुविकल्पी (WSD) शब्द अर्थ को उसके संदर्भ के अनुसार निर्धारित करने का कार्य है। कई मौजूदा डब्ल्यूएसडी अध्ययन एक बाहरी ज्ञान-आधारित असुरक्षित दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग कर रहे हैं क्योंकि इसमें प्रशिक्षण डेटा की आवश्यकता वाले पर्यवेक्षित दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना में कम शब्द सेट बाधाएं हैं। इस पेपर में, हम इनपुट दस्तावेज़ में एक अस्पष्ट शब्द और शब्दों के बीच समानता का उपयोग करके एक अस्पष्ट शब्द के संदर्भ को उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक नई WSD विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हमारे WSD विधि का लाभ उठाने के लिए, हम आगे BabelNet के शब्दार्थ नेटवर्क संरचना के आधार पर एक नया शब्द समानता गणना विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम अंग्रेजी WSD डेटासेट के लिए SemEval-13 और SemEval-15 पर प्रस्तावित विधियों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि प्रस्तावित WSD विधि बेसलाइन WSD विधि में काफी सुधार करती है। इसके अलावा, हमारी डब्ल्यूएसडी प्रणाली सेमेवल -13 डेटासेट में अत्याधुनिक डब्ल्यूएसडी सिस्टम को मात देती है। अंत में, इसमें दोनों डेटासेट के औसत प्रदर्शन में अत्याधुनिक असुरक्षित ज्ञान-आधारित डब्ल्यूएसडी सिस्टम की तुलना में उच्च प्रदर्शन है।', 'ru': 'Дезагрегирование смысла слова (РСС) - это задача определения смысла слова в соответствии с его контекстом. Во многих существующих исследованиях РСД используется внешний подход, основанный на знаниях и неконтролируемый, поскольку он имеет меньше ограничений набора слов, чем контролируемые подходы, требующие данных обучения. В данной работе мы предлагаем новый метод WSD для генерации контекста неоднозначного слова путем использования сходства между неоднозначным словом и словами во входном документе. Кроме того, чтобы использовать наш метод WSD, мы также предлагаем новый метод расчета подобия слов, основанный на семантической сетевой структуре BabelNet. Мы оцениваем предложенные методы на SemEval-13 и SemEval-15 для английского набора данных WSD. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемый метод WSD значительно улучшает базовый метод WSD. Кроме того, наша система WSD превосходит самые современные системы WSD в наборе данных Semeval-13. Наконец, он имеет более высокую производительность, чем современная неконтролируемая система WSD, основанная на знаниях, по средней производительности обоих наборов данных.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le dí-athbhrí ar chiall na bhfocal (WSD) an tasc chun ciall an fhocail a chinneadh de réir a chomhthéacs. Tá go leor staidéar WSD atá ann cheana féin ag baint úsáide as cur chuige seachtrach eolas-bhunaithe gan mhaoirseacht mar go bhfuil níos lú srianta ar fhoclóirí ann ná mar a bhí cur chuige maoirsithe a éilíonn sonraí oiliúna. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh nua WSD chun comhthéacs focal débhríoch a ghiniúint trí úsáid a bhaint as cosúlachtaí idir focal débhríoch agus focail sa doiciméad ionchuir. Ina theannta sin, chun ár modh WSD a ghiaráil, molaimid tuilleadh modh ríofa cosúlachta focal nua bunaithe ar struchtúr líonra shéimeantach BabelNet. Déanaimid measúnú ar na modhanna atá beartaithe ar an SemEval-13 agus SemEval-15 le haghaidh tacar sonraí WSD Béarla. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go gcuireann an modh WSD atá beartaithe feabhas suntasach ar an modh bonnlíne WSD. Ina theannta sin, sáraíonn ár gcóras WSD na córais WSD úrscothacha sa tacar sonraí Semeval-13. Ar deireadh, tá feidhmíocht níos airde aige ná an córas WSD eolas-bhunaithe gan mhaoirseacht i meánfheidhmíocht an dá thacar sonraí.', 'ka': 'სიტყვის სიტყვის განსხვავება (WSD) არის რაოდენობა, რომელიც სიტყვის სიტყვის განსაზღვრებას მისი კონტექსტის მიმართ. ბევრი მსგავსი WSD კვლევები გამოიყენებენ გარეშე ცნობიერების განსაკუთრებულ პროგრამა, რადგან მას ცოტა სიტყვების განსაკუთრებულება, ვიდრე მონაცემების დასაკუთრე ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ ახალი WSD მეთოდის გამოყენება, რომ შექმნა არსებული სიტყვის კონტექსტის შექმნა, გამოყენებით არსებული სიტყვის და სიტყვის შორის განსხვავებით. დამატებით, ჩვენი WSD მეთოდის გამოყენება, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ახალი სიტყვების გამოყენება მეთოდი, რომელიც BabelNet-ის სენმანტიკური ქსტრუქტურაზე ბაზიან. ჩვენ ვუმუშაობთ სამუშაო-13 და სამუშაო-15 ინგლისური WSD მონაცემების სამუშაო მეტი. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ პირველი WSD მეტი მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო მეტი. დამატებით, ჩვენი WSD სისტემა უფრო გავაკეთება სამყარო-სამყარო მონაცემების სისტემაში. საბოლოოდ, ის უფრო მეტი გამოყენება, ვიდრე სახელსაწყისგან უცნობილი WSD სისტემის საშუალოდ მონაცემების საშუალოდ გამოყენება.', 'it': "La disambiguazione del senso della parola (WSD) è il compito di determinare il senso della parola in base al suo contesto. Molti studi WSD esistenti hanno utilizzato un approccio esterno non supervisionato basato sulla conoscenza perché presenta meno vincoli di word set rispetto agli approcci supervisionati che richiedono dati di formazione. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo metodo WSD per generare il contesto di una parola ambigua utilizzando somiglianze tra una parola ambigua e parole nel documento di input. Inoltre, per sfruttare il nostro metodo WSD, proponiamo un nuovo metodo di calcolo della somiglianza delle parole basato sulla struttura semantica della rete di BabelNet. Valutiamo i metodi proposti sul SemEval-13 e SemEval-15 per il set di dati WSD inglese. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il metodo WSD proposto migliora significativamente il metodo WSD basale. Inoltre, il nostro sistema WSD supera i sistemi WSD all'avanguardia nel dataset Semeval-13. Infine, ha prestazioni superiori rispetto al sistema WSD basato sulla conoscenza non supervisionato all'avanguardia nelle prestazioni medie di entrambi i set di dati.", 'lt': 'žodžio jausmės išaiškinimas (WSD) yra užduotis nustatyti žodžio jausmę pagal jos kontekstą. Many existing WSD studies have been using an external knowledge-based unsupervised approach because it has fewer word set constraints than supervised approaches requiring training data.  Šiame dokumente siūlome naują WSD metodą, kuriuo siekiama sukurti dviprasmiško žodžio kontekstą naudojant dviprasmiško žodžio ir įvadinio dokumento žodžių panašumą. Be to, siekdami sutelkti savo WSD metodą, mes taip pat siūlome naują panašumo skaičiavimo metodą, pagrįstą semantine BabelNet tinklo struktūra. Vertiname siūlomus metodus, taikomus anglų WSD duomenų rinkiniui „SemEval-13“ ir „SemEval-15“. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad siūlomas VSD metodas gerokai pagerina pradinį VSD metodą. Be to, mūsų VSD sistema viršija naujausias VSD sistemas 13-ojo pusmečio duomenų rinkinyje. Galiausiai, abiejų duomenų rinkinių vidutiniai rezultatai yra didesni nei naujausia nepastebima žiniomis pagrįsta VSD sistema.', 'hu': 'A szóérzék egyértelműsítése (WSD) a feladat, hogy meghatározza a szó érzéke kontextusának megfelelően. Számos meglévő WSD-tanulmány külső tudásalapú, felügyelet nélküli megközelítést alkalmaz, mivel kevesebb szómeghatározási korlátozással rendelkezik, mint a képzési adatokat igénylő felügyelt megközelítések. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új WSD módszert javasolunk, amelynek célja egy kétértelmű szó kontextusának létrehozása egy kétértelmű szó és a beviteli dokumentum szavai közötti hasonlóságok felhasználása. A WSD módszerünk kihasználása érdekében továbbá javaslatot teszünk egy új szóhasonlósági számítási módszerre, amely a BabelNet szemantikai hálózati struktúráján alapul. A javasolt módszereket értékeljük a SemEval-13 és SemEval-15 angol WSD adatkészletben. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt WSD módszer jelentősen javítja a kiindulási WSD módszert. Továbbá WSD rendszerünk felülmúlja a Semeval-13 adatkészletben található legkorszerűbb WSD rendszereket. Végül pedig mindkét adatkészlet átlagos teljesítménye tekintetében magasabb teljesítménnyel rendelkezik, mint a korszerű, felügyelet nélküli tudásalapú WSD rendszer.', 'el': 'Η αποσαφήνιση της έννοιας λέξης είναι το καθήκον να καθοριστεί η έννοια της λέξης σύμφωνα με το πλαίσιο της. Πολλές υπάρχουσες μελέτες έχουν χρησιμοποιήσει μια εξωτερική προσέγγιση βασισμένη στη γνώση χωρίς επίβλεψη επειδή έχει λιγότερους περιορισμούς συνόλων λέξεων από τις εποπτευόμενες προσεγγίσεις που απαιτούν δεδομένα κατάρτισης. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για τη δημιουργία του πλαισίου μιας διφορούμενης λέξης χρησιμοποιώντας ομοιότητες μεταξύ μιας διφορούμενης λέξης και λέξεων στο έγγραφο εισαγωγής. Επιπλέον, για να αξιοποιήσουμε τη μέθοδο μας προτείνουμε περαιτέρω μια νέα μέθοδο υπολογισμού ομοιότητας λέξεων βασισμένη στη σημασιολογική δομή δικτύου του BabelNet. Αξιολογούμε τις προτεινόμενες μεθόδους στο σύνολο δεδομένων για τα Αγγλικά. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος βελτιώνει σημαντικά τη μέθοδο της βασικής μεθόδου. Επιπλέον, το σύστημα μας ξεπερνά τα σύγχρονα συστήματα στο σύνολο δεδομένων Semeval-13. Τέλος, έχει υψηλότερη απόδοση από το υπερσύγχρονο σύστημα χωρίς επίβλεψη γνώσης στη μέση απόδοση και των δύο συνόλων δεδομένων.', 'ml': 'വാക്കിന്റെ വികാര്യത്തിന്റെ അസാധാരണമാണ് (WSD) അതിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d അനുസരിച്ച് വാക്കിന്റെ വിശേഷ നിലവിലുള്ള വിഎസ്ഡി പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തുള്ള അറിവ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സൂക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത ഒരു നടപടി ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് രേഖയിലെ ഒരു വാക്കും വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മില്\u200d ഒരുപോലുള്ള വാക്കുകളും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരു പുതിയ വിഎസ്ഡി രീതിയില്\u200d  കൂടാതെ, നമ്മുടെ WSD രീതിയിലേക്ക് വെക്കുന്നതിനു ശേഷം, ബാബെല്\u200dനെറ്റിന്റെ സെമാന്റിക്ക് നെറ്റിന്റെ സ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാ സെമ്എവാല്\u200d-13 എന്നിട്ടും സെമെവാല്\u200d-15 ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിനുള്ള പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d  പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രാദോശിപ്പിക്കപ്പെട്ട WSD രീതിയില്\u200d ബെസ്റ്റ്ലൈന്\u200d ഡബ്ലെസ്ഡി രീതിയില്\u200d മെച്ച അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മുടെ WSD സിസ്റ്റം സെമെവാല്\u200d-13 ഡാറ്റാസസെറ്റിലെ വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥ്യ-യുഎസ്ഡി സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ Finally, it has higher performance than the state-of-the-art unsupervised knowledge-based WSD system in the average performance of both datasets.', 'kk': 'Сөздердің сезімі бұғаттау (WSD) деген сөздердің сезімін анықтайтын тапсырмасы. Бірнеше WSD зерттеулері сыртқы білім негізінде бағытталмаған тәсілді қолданады, себебі ол сөздерді бақылау керек мәліметтерінің қажеттіліктеріне бақылау керек тәсілдеріне артық ше Бұл қағаздың жаңа WSD әдісін келтірілген құжаттың сөз мен сөздер арасындағы ұқсас сөздерді жасау үшін жаңа сөздің контексті құру үшін таңдаймыз. Қосымша, WSD әдісімізді қолдану үшін, BabelNet симантикалық желі құрылымына негізделген жаңа сөздердің ұқсас есептеу әдісін бастаймыз. Біз ағылшын WSD деректер жиынының half Eval-13 және half Eval-15 арқылы ұсынылған әдістерді бағалаймыз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер келтірілген WSD әдісі негізгі WSD әдісін өзгертеді. Сонымен қатар, біздің WSD жүйесіміз жарым-жарым-13 деректер қорындағы WSD жүйелерін жасайды. Соңында, ол екі деректер қорларының орташа әрекеттерінде білім жүйесіне негізделмеген WSD жүйесінен артық әрекеттерінен артық.', 'mt': 'Id-diżambiguazzjoni tas-sens tal-kliem (WSD) hija l-kompitu li jiġi ddeterminat is-sens tal-kliem skont il-kuntest tiegħu. Ħafna studji eżistenti dwar id-DEM kienu qed jużaw approċċ estern mhux sorveljat ibbażat fuq l-għarfien minħabba li għandu inqas restrizzjonijiet tas-sett tal-kliem minn approċċi sorveljati li jeħtieġu dejta ta’ taħriġ. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid ta’ WSD biex jiġġenera l-kuntest ta’ kelma ambigwa billi nużaw similaritajiet bejn kelma ambigwa u kliem fid-dokument ta’ input. Barra minn hekk, biex inħeġġu l-metodu tagħna tad-WSD, qed nipproponu wkoll metodu ġdid ta’ kalkolu ta’ similarità bbażat fuq l-istruttura semantika tan-netwerk ta’ BabelNet. Aħna jevalwaw il-metodi proposti dwar is-SemEval-13 u s-SemEval-15 għas-sett tad-dejta tad-WSD Ingliż. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-metodu propost tad-WSD itejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-metodu tad-WSD fil-linja bażi. Barra minn hekk, is-sistema tagħna tad-DEM tippreżenta s-sistemi l-aktar avvanzati tad-DEM fis-sett tad-dejta Semeval-13. Finally, it has higher performance than the state-of-the-art unsupervised knowledge-based WSD system in the average performance of both datasets.', 'mk': 'Разбирање на зборовите е задачата за одредување на зборовите според нивниот контекст. Многу постоечки студии на ВСД користат надворешен ненадгледуван пристап базиран на знаење бидејќи има помалку ограничувања на зборовите од надгледуваните пристапи кои бараат податоци за обука. Во овој весник предложуваме нов метод на ВСД за генерирање на контекст на двогумен збор со користење на сличности помеѓу двогумен збор и зборови во внатрешниот документ. Покрај тоа, за да го искористиме нашиот метод на ВСД, понатаму предложуваме нов метод за пресметка на сличност на зборот базиран на семантичната мрежна структура на BabelNet. Ги проценуваме предложените методи на SemEval-13 и SemEval-15 за англискиот податок на WSD. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека предложениот метод на ВСД значително го подобрува основниот метод на ВСД. Покрај тоа, нашиот систем на ВСД ги надминува најсовремените системи на ВСД во семевалниот 13-ти податок. Конечно, истиот има повисоки резултати од најсовремениот систем на ВСД базиран на знаење во просечната резултат на двете податоци.', 'no': 'Desmbiguasjon av ordfølelsen (WSD) er oppgåva som skal bestemme ordfølelsen etter konteksten. Mange eksisterande WSD-studier har brukt ein ekstern kunnskapsbasert ukjend tilnærming, fordi han har mindre ord-sett begrensningar enn oversikte tilnærmingar som krev treningsdata. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein ny WSD-metode for å laga konteksten av eit utgjengeleg ord ved å bruka liknande mellom eit utgjengeleg ord og ord i inndatadokumentet. I tillegg, for å levera WSD-metoden vårt, foreslår vi meir ein ny metode for utrekning av ordsimilaritet basert på semantiske nettverksstrukturen av BabelNet. Vi evaluerer dei første metodane på semiEval-13 og semiEval-15 for engelske WSD-datasettet. Eksperimentale resultat viser at den foreslåde WSD-metoden betydelig forbedrar baseline WSD-metoden. I tillegg vil WSD-systemet vårt utføra tilstanden til kunstsystemet WSD i datasettet i halvåkal-13. Etter slutt, har det høgare utviklinga enn kunstheten, uavhengige kunnskap-basert WSD-system i gjennomsnittlig utvikling av begge datasett.', 'ms': 'Nyahambiguasi perasaan perkataan (WSD) adalah tugas untuk menentukan perasaan perkataan mengikut konteks. Banyak kajian WSD yang wujud telah menggunakan pendekatan luar yang tidak diawasi berdasarkan pengetahuan kerana ia mempunyai sedikit keterangan set perkataan daripada pendekatan yang diawasi yang memerlukan data latihan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan kaedah WSD baru untuk menghasilkan konteks perkataan yang ambiguh dengan menggunakan persamaan antara perkataan yang ambiguh dan perkataan dalam dokumen input. Selain itu, untuk menggunakan kaedah WSD kami, kami melamar lagi kaedah pengiraan persamaan perkataan baru berdasarkan struktur rangkaian semantik BabelNet. Kami menilai kaedah yang diusulkan pada SemEval-13 dan SemEval-15 untuk set data WSD Inggeris. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa kaedah WSD yang diusulkan meningkatkan kaedah WSD asas secara signifikan. Selain itu, sistem WSD kita melebihi sistem WSD terbaik dalam set data Semeval-13. Finally, it has higher performance than the state-of-the-art unsupervised knowledge-based WSD system in the average performance of both datasets.', 'pl': 'Rozproszenie zmysłu słowa (WSD) jest zadaniem określenia zmysłu słowa zgodnie z jego kontekstem. Wiele istniejących badań WSD wykorzystuje zewnętrzne podejście oparte na wiedzy bez nadzoru, ponieważ ma mniej ograniczeń zbioru słów niż podejścia nadzorowane wymagające danych szkoleniowych. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową metodę WSD generowania kontekstu niejednoznacznego słowa poprzez wykorzystanie podobieństw między niejednoznacznym słowem a słowami w dokumencie wejściowym. Ponadto, aby wykorzystać naszą metodę WSD, proponujemy nową metodę obliczania podobieństwa słów opartą na semantycznej strukturze sieci BabelNet. Oceniamy proponowane metody na zbiorze danych SemEval-13 i SemEval-15 dla angielskiego WSD. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowana metoda WSD znacznie poprawia podstawową metodę WSD. Ponadto nasz system WSD przewyższa najnowocześniejsze systemy WSD w zbiorze danych Semeval-13. Wreszcie, ma wyższą wydajność niż najnowocześniejszy bez nadzoru system WSD oparty na wiedzy w średniej wydajności obu zbiorów danych.', 'ro': 'Deambiguizarea sensului cuvântului (WSD) este sarcina de a determina sensul cuvântului în funcție de contextul său. Multe studii existente privind ADM au folosit o abordare externă, nesupravegheată bazată pe cunoștințe, deoarece are mai puține constrângeri legate de set de cuvinte decât abordările supravegheate care necesită date de formare. În această lucrare, propunem o nouă metodă WSD pentru a genera contextul unui cuvânt ambiguu folosind asemănări între un cuvânt ambiguu și cuvinte în documentul de intrare. În plus, pentru a valorifica metoda WSD, propunem în continuare o nouă metodă de calcul a similitudinii cuvintelor bazată pe structura semantică a rețelei BabelNet. Evaluăm metodele propuse pe SemEval-13 și SemEval-15 pentru setul de date WSD în limba engleză. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că metoda WSD propusă îmbunătățește semnificativ metoda WSD inițială. În plus, sistemul nostru WSD depășește cele mai moderne sisteme WSD din setul de date Semeval-13. În cele din urmă, acesta are performanțe mai ridicate decât sistemul WSD bazat pe cunoaștere de ultimă generație, nesupravegheat, în ceea ce privește performanțele medii ale ambelor seturi de date.', 'so': 'Word sense disambiguation (WSD) is the task to determine the word sense according to its context.  Waxbarashada WSD oo badan oo jira ayaa isticmaalaya qaab aan aqoonta dibadda ah oo aan ilaalinayn, sababtoo ah waxay leedahay wax yar oo ka kooban xadooyin laga ilaaliyo qaababka loo baahan yahay waxbarashada. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab cusub oo WSD ah in loo sameeyo qalabka hadal a an caqli lahayn, si loo isticmaalo isku mid ah hadal iyo erayo ku qoran warqada gudaha. Intaas waxaa dheer oo aan soo dirno hababka WSD, waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa hadal cusub oo u eg qaababka xisaabta oo ku saleysan dhismaha shabakadda ee BabelNet. Waxaannu qiimeynaynaa qaababka la soo jeeday oo ku qoran SemEval-13 iyo SemEval-15 ee kooxda danbiyada Ingiriis WSD. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qaabka lagu soo jeeday WSD uu si muhiim ah u hagaajiyo habka hoose ee WSD. Sidoo kale, WSD nidaamka ayaa soo saara xaaladda farshaxanka WSD ee Semeval-13 dataset. Ugu dambaysta waxaa ka sarreeya habka farshaxanta ee aqoonta aan la ilaaliyeyn qoraalka WSD ee ugu dhexeeya sameynta labada database.', 'mn': 'Үүний мэдрэмж бус байдал (WSD) гэдэг нь үг мэдрэмжээ тодорхойлох үйл ажиллагаа юм. Мөн олон WSD судалгаанууд гадаад мэдлэгтэй багтаагүй арга зам ашиглаж байна. Учир нь энэ нь сургалтын өгөгдлийн шаардлагатай хүмүүсээс илүү бага хэмжээний хэмжээний хэмжээний хязгаар байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг шинэ WSD арга зам нь бичсэн баримт бичсэн үг болон үг хоорондоо тэнцүү байдлыг ашиглаж байдаг. Мөн бидний WSD хувилбарын тулд BabelNet-ын semantic сүлжээний бүтээгдэхүүний үндсэн шинэ үг төстэй тооцоололтын арга санал болно. Бид Англи ВСД өгөгдлийн сангийн SemEval-13 болон SemEval-15-ын санал дэвшүүлсэн аргыг үнэлэх болно. Үүний туршилтын үр дүн нь WSD хувилбарын суурь шулууны WSD хувилбарыг маш чухал сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулдаг. Мөн бидний WSD систем дундаж зууны 13-р дэх өгөгдлийн сангийн уламжлалтын WSD системийг дамжуулдаг. Эцэст нь, энэ нь хоёр өгөгдлийн сангийн дундаж ажиллагааны үндсэн WSD системээс илүү өндөр ажиллагаатай.', 'sv': 'Ordsinnesdiskussion (WSD) är uppgiften att bestämma ordet mening enligt dess sammanhang. Många befintliga WSD-studier har använt sig av ett externt kunskapsbaserat och oövervakat tillvägagångssätt eftersom det har färre ordbegränsningar än övervakade tillvägagångssätt som kräver utbildningsdata. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny WSD-metod för att skapa kontexten för ett tvetydigt ord genom att använda likheter mellan ett tvetydigt ord och ord i indatadokumentet. För att utnyttja vår WSD-metod föreslår vi dessutom en ny metod för beräkning av ordlikhet baserad på BabelNets semantiska nätverksstruktur. Vi utvärderar de föreslagna metoderna på SemEval-13 och SemEval-15 för engelska WSD dataset. Experimentella resultat visar att den föreslagna WSD-metoden avsevärt förbättrar baslinjen WSD-metoden. Dessutom överträffar vårt WSD-system de senaste WSD-systemen i Semeval-13-datauppsättningen. Slutligen har den högre prestanda än det toppmoderna icke-övervakade kunskapsbaserade WSD-systemet när det gäller genomsnittlig prestanda för båda datauppsättningarna.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தையின் மதிப்பு பிரிவு (WSD) என்பது அதன் சூழ்நிலையை பொருத்தி சொல்லும் உணர்வு தீர்மானிக்க வே பல இருக்கும் WSD ஆய்வுகள் வெளி அறிவு அடிப்படையில் காப்பாற்றப்படாத நிலையை பயன்படுத்துகின்றன ஏனென்றால் இது பயிற்சி தகவல் தேவைப்படு இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய WSD முறைமையை உருவாக்குவதற்கு முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் உள்ளீட்டு ஆவணத்தில் உள்ளீட்டு ஆவணத்தில் ஒரு  மேலும், எங்கள் WSD முறைமையை ஒப்புக்கொள்வதற்கு கூட, நாம் மேலும் ஒரு புதிய வார்த்தையும் பேபெல்நெட்டின் அரைமைப்பு வலைப்பி SemEval-13 மற்றும் SemEval-15 ஆங்கிலம் WSD தரவுத்தளத்திற்கான முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முறைகளை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். பரிசோதனை முடிவுகள் தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது WSD முறைமையை முழுமையாக மேம்படுத்துகிறது. அதற்கும், எங்கள் WSD அமைப்பு செம்மெவ்வால்- 13 தரவு அமைப்பில் உள்ள நிலையில் வெளியேறுகிறது. இறுதியில், அது இரண்டு தரவு அமைப்புகளின் சராசரியான செயல்பாட்டில் காப்பாற்றப்படாத அறிவு சார்ந்த WSD அமைப்பை விட அதிக செயல்பாடு', 'ur': 'Word sense disambiguation (WSD) is the task to determine the word sense according to its context. بہت سی موجود WSD تحقیقات بیرونی علم کی بنیادی غیر قابل تحقیق کے مطابق استعمال کر رہے ہیں کیونکہ اس میں کم لفظ مقرر ہے کہ تحقیق کے مطابق دکھانے کے مطابق کم لفظ ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک نئی WSD روش پیش کریں کہ ایک غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر اور اس کے علاوہ، ہمارے WSD طریقے کے مطابق، ہم ایک نئی کلمات مطابق حساب کا طریقہ پیش کریں گے جو BabelNet کی سیمانٹی نیٹ ورک ساختار پر بنیاد ہے. ہم انگلیسی WSD ڈاٹ سٹ کے لئے SemEval-13 اور SemEval-15 کے مقرر کردہ طریقے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں. آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد WSD طریقہ بنیاس لین WSD طریقہ کو بہت اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، ہماری WSD سیسٹم نے آئندہ WSD سیسٹم کو آئندہ سال ۱۳ ڈاٹ سٹ میں اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ آخر میں، اس کے لئے دوسرے ڈاٹ سٹ کے متوسط عملکرد میں عمدہ عملکرد کے ساتھ زیادہ عملکرد ہے۔', 'sr': 'Desmbiguacija reèi (WSD) je zadatak određivanja smisla reèi u skladu sa svojim kontekstom. Mnogi postojeći ispitivanja WSD koriste nepotrebni pristup na temelju vanjskih znanja jer ima manje ograničenja na rečenicama od nadzornih pristupa koji zahtevaju podatke o obuci. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu WSD-a kako bi stvorili kontekst dvosmislene riječi koristeći sličnosti između dvosmislene riječi i riječi u ulaznom dokumentu. Osim toga, da bi uticali na našu metodu WSD, dalje predlažemo novu metodu proračunanja sličnosti riječi na temelju semantičke strukture mreže BabelNet a. Procjenjujemo predložene metode na semiEval-13 i semiEval-15 za engleski WSD dataset. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda WSD značajno poboljšava početnu metodu WSD. Osim toga, naš WSD sistem nadmašuje stanje umjetničkog WSD-a u polovičnom setu podataka od 13. godine. Konačno, ima veću izvršnost od stanja umjetnosti neodređenog sistema WSD-a na znanju u prosječnoj izvršnosti obje podataka.', 'si': 'වචන අවස්ථාව (WSD) ක්\u200dරියාව තමයි වචන අවස්ථාව අනුවෙන් වචන අවස්ථාවක් නිර්ධාරණය කරන්න. විශ්වාසිත WSD පරීක්ෂණයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් විසින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරලා තියෙනවා මොකද ඒක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය දත්ත අවශ මේ පත්තරේ අපි අලුත් WSD විධානයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඇතුළත් ලිපිළියේ වචන සමාන වචන සහ වචනයක් අතර සමාන වර්තනයක් භාවිත ක ඒ වගේම, අපේ WSD විධානය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, අපි තවත් අලුත් වචනයක් සම්බන්ධ විශාල පරීක්ෂණ විධානයක් BabelNet ගේ සෙමැන්ටි අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි WSD දත්ත සෙට් වෙනුවෙන් සෙම්වෙල් 13 සහ සෙම්වෙල්-15 විශ්වාස කරනවා. පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදියට WSD විදියට විශේෂයෙන් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන්  ඊට පස්සේ, අපේ WSD පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය අධ්\u200dයවර්ධිය WSD පද්ධතිය අධ්\u200dයවර්ධිය 13 දත්ත සෙට් වල ඉවරයි. අන්තිමේදි, ඒකට තියෙන්නේ වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් තියෙන්නේ නැහැ දන්නවත් පද්ධතියේ විශේෂ වැඩක් දෙන්නම', 'uz': "Name Koʻp mavjud WSD taʼminlovchilar tashqi maʼlumot asosida saqlab qolmagan usulni ishlatish mumkin, chunki u taʼminlovchi maʼlumot kerak boʻlgan soʻzlardan keyin qoʻllanilmaydi. Bu qogʻozda, biz kiritish hujjatdagi soʻz va so'zlar orasidagi bir xil so'zni yaratish uchun yangi WSD usulini tahlil qilamiz. Ko'pchilik, biz WSD usulini yozib olish uchun yangi so'zni babelNetning semantik tarmoq structuriyasi asosida yangi soʻz hisoblash usulini talab qilamiz. Biz ingliz tili WSD maʼlumotlar tizimi uchun SemEval-13 va SemEval-15 qiymatimiz. Name Keyin esa, WSD tizimimiz Semeval- 13 maʼlumotlar sahifasini bajaradi. Endi, bu ikkita maʼlumotlar sonlarining o'rtasida o'rtacha bajarishidan himoyalangan maʼlumot tizimdan foydalanmagan.", 'vi': 'Giải dạng cảm nhận từ (WSD) là nhiệm vụ xác định các từ giác quan theo ngữ cảnh của nó. Nhiều nghiên cứu về WSD đã sử dụng phương pháp không giám sát dựa trên kiến thức bên ngoài vì nó có ít giới hạn từ hơn các phương pháp được giám sát đòi hỏi dữ liệu đào tạo. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới về WSD để tạo ra bối cảnh của một từ mơ hồ bằng cách dùng điểm tương đồng giữa từ và từ mơ hồ trong tài liệu nhập. Thêm vào đó, để sử dụng phương pháp WSD, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp tính to án hai từ tương tự dựa trên cấu trúc mạng lưới semantics của BabeNet. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp đề xuất trên bộ dữ liệu SemEvl-13 và SemEvl-15 cho WSD Anh. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp WSD đề xuất cải thiện đáng kể phương pháp WSD hoàn hảo. Hơn nữa, hệ thống WSD hoàn thiện hệ thống WSD hiện đại nhất trong bộ dữ liệu Semeval-13. Cuối cùng, nó có hiệu suất cao hơn hệ thống WSD không giám sát được bảo mật hàng đầu trong khả năng trung bình của cả hai bộ dữ liệu.', 'nl': 'Word sense disambiguation (WSD) is de taak om het woord sense te bepalen op basis van zijn context. Veel bestaande WSD-studies hebben gebruik gemaakt van een externe, op kennis gebaseerde, niet-begeleide benadering omdat deze minder woordenset beperkingen kent dan begeleide benaderingen die trainingsgegevens vereisen. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe WSD methode voor om de context van een dubbelzinnig woord te genereren door gebruik te maken van overeenkomsten tussen een dubbelzinnig woord en woorden in het invoerdocument. Daarnaast stellen we, om gebruik te maken van onze WSD methode, een nieuwe methode voor woordgelijkenisberekening voor gebaseerd op de semantische netwerkstructuur van BabelNet. We evalueren de voorgestelde methoden op de SemEval-13 en SemEval-15 voor Engelse WSD dataset. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat de voorgestelde WSD methode de baseline WSD methode aanzienlijk verbetert. Bovendien presteert ons WSD-systeem beter dan de state-of-the-art WSD-systemen in de Semeval-13 dataset. Ten slotte heeft het hogere prestaties dan het state-of-the-art onbeheerde kennisgebaseerde WSD-systeem in de gemiddelde prestaties van beide datasets.', 'hr': 'Desmbiguacija riječi (WSD) je zadatak određivanja smisla riječi u skladu s svojim kontekstom. Mnogo postojećih ispitivanja WSD-a koristili su nepotrebni pristup na temelju vanjskih znanja jer ima manje ograničenja na riječima, nego nadzorne pristupe koje zahtijevaju podatke o obuci. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu WSD-a kako bi stvorili kontekst dvosmislene riječi koristeći sličnosti između dvosmislene riječi i riječi u ulaznom dokumentu. Osim toga, kako bi uticali na našu WSD metodu, dalje predlažemo novu metodu proračunanja sličnosti riječi na temelju semantičke strukture mreže BabelNet a. Procjenjujemo predložene metode na semiEval-13 i semiEval-15 za engleski WSD dataset. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda WSD značajno poboljšava početnu metodu WSD-a. Osim toga, naš WSD sustav nadmašuje stanje umjetničkih WSD-a u polovičnom setu podataka od 13. godine. Na kraju, ima veći učinkovit od stanja umjetnosti neodređenog sustava WSD-a na znanju u prosječnoj učinkovitosti oba podataka.', 'id': 'Word sense disambiguation (WSD) is the task to determine the word sense according to its context.  Banyak penelitian WSD yang ada telah menggunakan pendekatan eksternal yang tidak diawasi berdasarkan pengetahuan karena memiliki sedikit batas set kata daripada pendekatan yang diawasi yang memerlukan data latihan. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode WSD baru untuk menghasilkan konteks kata yang ambigus dengan menggunakan persamaan antara kata yang ambigus dan kata-kata dalam dokumen masukan. In addition, to leverage our WSD method, we further propose a new word similarity calculation method based on the semantic network structure of BabelNet.  Kami mengevaluasi metode yang diusulkan pada SemEval-13 dan SemEval-15 untuk set data WSD Inggris. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode WSD yang diusulkan meningkatkan secara signifikan metode WSD dasar. Selain itu, sistem WSD kita melebihi sistem WSD terbaik dalam set data Semeval-13. Akhirnya, ia memiliki prestasi yang lebih tinggi dari sistem WSD tidak terbatas yang tidak diawasi berdasarkan pengetahuan dalam prestasi rata-rata kedua set data.', 'de': 'Wortsinn-Begriffsklärung (WSD) ist die Aufgabe, den Wortsinn nach seinem Kontext zu bestimmen. Viele bestehende WSD-Studien verwenden einen externen wissensbasierten, unüberwachten Ansatz, da er weniger Wortsätze hat als überwachte Ansätze, die Trainingsdaten erfordern. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neue WSD-Methode vor, um den Kontext eines mehrdeutigen Wortes zu generieren, indem Ähnlichkeiten zwischen einem mehrdeutigen Wort und Wörtern im Eingabedokument verwendet werden. Um unsere WSD-Methode zu nutzen, schlagen wir außerdem eine neue Methode zur Berechnung der Wortähnlichkeit vor, die auf der semantischen Netzwerkstruktur von BabelNet basiert. Wir evaluieren die vorgeschlagenen Methoden auf dem SemEval-13 und SemEval-15 für englische WSD Datensatz. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene WSD-Methode die WSD-Basismethode signifikant verbessert. Darüber hinaus übertrifft unser WSD-System die modernsten WSD-Systeme im Semeval-13 Datensatz. Schließlich weist es eine höhere Leistung als das moderne, unüberwachte wissensbasierte WSD-System in der durchschnittlichen Leistung beider Datensätze auf.', 'ko': '어의의 변조는 어경에 근거하여 어의를 확정하는 임무다.많은 기존 WSD 연구들은 데이터를 훈련해야 하는 감독 방법에 비해 어집 제약이 적기 때문에 외부 지식을 바탕으로 하는 무감독 방법을 사용해 왔다.본고에서 우리는 새로운 WSD 방법을 제시했는데 잘못된 단어와 입력된 문서의 단어 간의 유사성을 사용하여 잘못된 단어의 상하문을 생성한다.또한 Google의 WSD 방법을 이용하기 위해 BabelNet의 의미 네트워크 구조를 바탕으로 하는 새로운 단어 유사도 계산 방법을 제시했습니다.SemEval-13 및 SemEval-15에서 영어 WSD 데이터 세트에 대한 접근 방식을 평가했습니다.실험 결과 제시된 WSD 방법은 베이스라인 WSD 방법을 현저하게 개선한 것으로 나타났다.그 밖에 우리의 WSD 시스템은 Semeval-13 데이터 집합에서 가장 선진적인 WSD 시스템보다 성능이 우수하다.마지막으로 두 데이터 세트의 평균 성능은 최첨단 무감시 지식형 WSD 시스템보다 성능이 높다.', 'bg': 'Разясняване на смисъла на думата (WSD) е задачата да се определи смисъла на думата според контекста му. Много от съществуващите проучвания на БЗД използват външен подход, основан на знанието, без надзор, тъй като той има по-малко ограничения на набор от думи, отколкото надзорните подходи, изискващи данни за обучение. В настоящата статия предлагаме нов метод за генериране на контекста на двусмислена дума чрез използване на прилики между двусмислена дума и думи във входния документ. В допълнение, за да използваме метода ни, предлагаме и нов метод за изчисляване на сходството на думата, базиран на семантичната мрежова структура на БабелNet. Оценяваме предложените методи на набор от данни за английски WSD. Експерименталните резултати показват, че предложеният метод значително подобрява базовия метод. Освен това нашата система надминава най-съвременните системи в набора от данни. И накрая, тя има по-високи резултати от най-съвременната система без надзор, основана на знание, по отношение на средните резултати на двата набора от данни.', 'da': "Ordsans forståelse (WSD) er opgaven at bestemme ordet sans i henhold til dens kontekst. Mange eksisterende WSD-undersøgelser har anvendt en ekstern videnbaseret uautoriseret tilgang, fordi den har færre begrænsninger i ordsættet end overvågede tilgange, der kræver træningsdata. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny WSD metode til at generere konteksten af et tvetydigt ord ved at bruge ligheder mellem et tvetydigt ord og ord i input dokumentet. For at udnytte vores WSD-metode foreslår vi desuden en ny metode til beregning af ordlighed baseret på BabelNet's semantiske netværksstruktur. Vi evaluerer de foreslåede metoder på SemEval-13 og SemEval-15 for engelsk WSD datasæt. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at den foreslåede WSD-metode betydeligt forbedrer baseline WSD-metoden. Desuden overgår vores WSD-system de avancerede WSD-systemer i Semeval-13 datasættet. Endelig har den højere ydeevne end det avancerede, ukontrollerede videnbaserede WSD-system i gennemsnitsydelsen for begge datasæt.", 'fa': 'تغيير احساس کلمه (WSD) وظيفه\u200cي تعيين احساس کلمه بر اساس محتوياتش است. بسیاری از مطالعه\u200cهای WSD موجود از طریق غیرقابل تحقیق بر اساس علم خارجی استفاده می\u200cکنند چون محدودیت\u200cهای جمع کلمات کمتر از طریق\u200cهای تحقیق که نیاز به داده\u200cهای آموزشی دارند. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش WSD جدید پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا محیط یک کلمه غیرقابل تولید کند با استفاده از شبیه\u200cهایی بین یک کلمه غیرقابل و کلمه در سند ورودی. علاوه بر این، برای تأثیر روش WSD ما، یک روش حساب شبیه کلمه جدید را بر اساس ساختار شبکه semantic BabelNet پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما روش\u200cهای پیشنهاد را در سیم\u200cEval-13 و سیم\u200cEval-15 برای مجموعه داده\u200cهای انگلیسی WSD ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه نشان می\u200cدهند که روش پیشنهاد WSD به طور معنی روش پایین WSD را بهتر می\u200cکند. علاوه بر این، سیستم WSD ما سیستم\u200cهای ایالت هنر WSD را در مجموعه داده\u200cهای نیم قرن ۱۳ انجام می\u200cدهد. بالاخره، عملکرد بیشتری از سیستم دانش و دانش غیرقابل تحقیق در عملکرد متوسط هر دو مجموعه داده است.', 'tr': 'Sözler duýgulanmasy (WSD) sözleriniň duýgularyny öz kontekstüne görä bejermek üçin zadydyr. Aýan WSD öwrenmeleri daşarydaky bilim tabanly tassyklanmadyk approach ullanýar, sebäbi bu sözleriň tassyklanmasy maglumaty gerekýän golaýlardan az däl. Bu kagyzda, biziň täze bir WSD yöntemi giriş senediň daşyrlyk sözleri we sözleriň arasynda meňzeşlik edeniň kontekstini saýlamak üçin teklip edip teklip edýäris. Ayrıca, WSD yöntemimizi etkinleştirmek için BabelNet semantik a ğ yapısına dayanan yeni bir kelime benzeri hesaplama yöntemi teklif ediyoruz. Biz iňlisçe WSD veri setigi üçin SemEval-13 we SemEval-15 guruldygyny çykýarys. Araşdyryş netijeleri WSD hili teklip eden yönteminiň baseline WSD hili gowuralygyny görkezýär. Daha da, WSD sistemimiz 13 sanat setinde sanat sistemi yaratmıştır. Soňunda, sanat sistemasynda bilim sistemasyndan ukyplanmaýan WSD sistemasyndan ýokary ukyplyk bar.', 'sq': 'Dijashtimi i kuptimit të fjalës (WSD) është detyra për të përcaktuar kuptimin e fjalës sipas kontekstit të saj. Shumë studime ekzistuese të WSD-së kanë përdorur një qasje të jashtme të pa mbikqyrur bazuar në njohuri sepse ka më pak kufizime të përcaktuara nga qasjet e mbikqyrura që kërkojnë të dhëna treinimi. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një metodë të re WSD për të gjeneruar kontekstin e një fjale të qartë duke përdorur ngjashmëri midis një fjale të qartë dhe fjalëve në dokumentin e hyrjes. Përveç kësaj, për të përdorur metodën tonë WSD, ne propozojmë më tej një metodë të re të llogaritjes së ngjashmërisë fjalë bazuar në strukturën semantike të rrjetit BabelNet. Ne vlerësojmë metodat e propozuara në SemEval-13 dhe SemEval-15 për të dhënat angleze WSD. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se metoda e propozuar e WSD përmirëson ndjeshëm metodën bazë të WSD. Përveç kësaj, sistemi ynë i WSD-së ekziston mbi sistemet më të moderne të WSD-së në kompletin e të dhënave gjysmë-13. Më së fundi, ai ka performancë më të lartë se sistemi i WSD-së bazuar në njohuri i mosmbikqyrur më i lartë në performancën mesatare të të dy grupeve të dhënash.', 'sw': 'Kutofautiana na neno (WSD) ni jukumu la kuamua maana ya neno kwa muktadha wake. Tafiti nyingi zilizopo na WSD zimekuwa zikitumia mbinu zisizo na usalama wa maarifa ya nje kwa sababu imeweka vizuizi kidogo zaidi ya njia zilizotazama zinazohitaji takwimu za mafunzo. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mbinu mpya ya WSD kutengeneza muktadha wa neno lisilo na maana kwa kutumia usawa kati ya maneno na maneno katika nyaraka ya ndani. Zaidi ya hayo, kwa kutumia mbinu yetu ya WSD, tunapendekeza mbinu mpya ya hisabari inayofanana na neno linalotokana na mfumo wa mitandao ya sekunde ya BabelNet. Tutathmini mbinu zilizopendekezwa kwenye SemEval-13 na SemEval-15 kwa ajili ya seti ya data za Kiingereza WSD. Experimental results demonstrate that the proposed WSD method significantly improves the baseline WSD method.  Zaidi ya hayo, mfumo wetu wa WSD unaonyesha hali ya mfumo wa sanaa wa WSD katika seti ya takwimu ya Semeval-13. Mwisho, imekuwa na ufanisi mkubwa zaidi kuliko hali ya sanaa isiyo na ufahamu usiohifadhiwa na mfumo wa WSD wa kiwango cha wastani wa seti hizo mbili.', 'hy': "Բառի զգացմունքի անբացատրությունը բառի զգացմունքի որոշումն է ըստ կոնտեքստի: Շատ գոյություն ունեցող աշխարհային զարգացման ուսումնասիրություններ օգտագործել են արտաքին գիտելիքներով հիմնված անվերահսկված մոտեցում, որովհետև այն ավելի քիչ բառերի սահմանափակումներ ունի, քան վերահսկված մոտեցումները, որոնք պահանջո Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր համակարգչային զարգացման մեթոդ, որպեսզի ստեղծենք երկիմաստ բառի կոնտեքստը օգտագործելով երկիմաստ բառի և ներմուծման փաստաթղթի բառերի միջև նմանություններ: Ավելին, որպեսզի օգտագործենք մեր աշխարհային զարգացման մեթոդը, մենք նաև առաջարկում ենք նոր բառի նմանության հաշվարկների մեթոդ, որը հիմնված է BabyelNet-ի սեմանտիկ ցանցի կառուցվածքի վրա: Մենք գնահատում ենք Անգլերենի համակարգի համակարգի Անգլերենի Առաջին Արևելյան 13 և Առաջին Արևելյան 15 մեթոդները: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված աշխարհային զարգացման մեթոդը նշանակալիորեն բարելավում է աշխարհային զարգացման հիմնական մեթոդը: Ավելին, մեր համակարգը գերազանցում է ամենակարևոր համակարգերը' կիսադարի 13 տվյալների համակարգում: Վերջապես, այն ունի ավելի բարձր արդյունավետություն, քան ամենաբարձր անվերահսկված գիտելիքներով հիմնված համակարգը երկու տվյալների միջին արդյունավետության մեջ:", 'af': "Woordsens ontsamminging (WSD) is die taak om die woord sens te bepaal volgens sy konteks. Baie bestaande WSD studies het gebruik 'n eksterne kennis-baseerde ononderwerp toegang, omdat dit minder woord stel begrense het as onderwerp toegang wat onderwerp data nodig het. In hierdie papier, ons voorstel 'n nuwe WSD metode om die konteks van 'n onbepaalde woord te genereer deur gelykenisse te gebruik tussen 'n onbepaalde woord en woorde in die invoer dokument. In addition, to leverage our WSD method, we further propose a new word similarity calculation method based on the semantic network structure of BabelNet. Ons evalueer die voorgestelde metodes op die SemEval-13 en SemEval-15 vir Engelske WSD-datastel. Eksperimentale resultate vertoon dat die voorgestelde WSD metode betekenlik die basilyn WSD metode verbeter. Ons WSD stelsel uitvoer die state-of-the-art WSD stelsels in die semievaal-13 datastel. Eindelik het dit hoër prestasie as die state-of-the-art-onveronderwyse kennis-gebaseerde WSD stelsel in die gemiddelde prestasie van beide datastelle.", 'az': "Sözlük duygusu (WSD) məlumatının məlumatına görə söz anlayışını təyin etmək məlumatıdır. Əvvəlki WSD təhsil edilənlərin çoxları, həmin təhsil məlumatlarına ihtiyacı olan təhsil edilməyən təhsil edilməsindən daha az söz qurmaqlarını istifadə edirlər. Bu kağızda yeni WSD metodlarını təbliğ edirik ki, giriş dökümündə müəyyən bir söz və sözlərin arasındakı bənzəri istifadə edərək müəyyən bir söz məlumatını yaratmaq üçün yeni bir WSD metodlarını təbliğ edirik. Əvvəlcə, WSD metodumuzu istifadə etmək üçün, BabelNet'in semantik a ğ strukturlarına dayanan yeni sözlər istifadə etmə metodumu təklif edirik. Biz İngilis WSD veri qutusu üçün SemEval-13 və SemEval-15 təklif etdiyimiz metodları değerləşdiririk. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları təbliğ etdiyi WSD metodlarının temel xətti WSD metodlarını çox yaxşılaşdırır. Daha sonra, WSD sistemimiz yarısı-13 veri qutusundakı sanat WSD sistemlərini istifadə edir. Sonunda, bu hər iki veri setlərinin ortalama performansı içində müəyyən edilməmiş elm sistemində olan WSD sistemindən daha yüksək performansı var.", 'bn': 'শব্দের মান বিভ্রান্তিকভাবে (ডিউএসডি) তার প্রেক্ষাপট অনুসারে শব্দের মান নির্ধারণ করার কাজ। অনেক বিদ্যমান উইএসডি গবেষণা বাইরের জ্ঞান-ভিত্তিক অরক্ষিত পদ্ধতি ব্যবহার করছে কারণ এটি প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য প্রয়োজনীয় তথ্য পর্যবেক্ষণের চে এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নতুন WSD পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি ইনপুট ডকুমেন্টের মধ্যে একটি উল্লেখযোগ্য শব্দ এবং শব্দ ব্যবহার করে একটি উল্লেখিত শব্দের এছাড়াও, আমাদের WSD পদ্ধতি প্রদান করার জন্য আমরা বেবেল নেটনেটের সেম্যান্টিক নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামোর উপর ভিত্তিক একটি নতুন শব্দের সমতুল্য আমরা ইংরেজি ডাটাসেটের জন্য প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিগুলোর মূল্যায়ন করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত WSD পদ্ধতি বেসারে উইএসডি পদ্ধতি উন্নত করে। এছাড়াও, আমাদের WSD সিস্টেম সেমেভাল-১৩ ডাটাসেটের রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের ডাটাসেটের রাষ্ট্রীয় ব্যবস্থা প্রকাশ কর অবশেষে, এটি দুটো ডাটাসেটের গড়ে প্রদর্শনের মধ্যে জ্ঞান-ভিত্তিক উইএসডি সিস্টেমের রাষ্ট্রের চেয়ে বেশী প্রদর্শন করে।', 'am': 'የንግግር አስተያየት (WSD) የቃላትን አስተያየት እንደ ሥርዓቱ መጠን ማረጋገጥ ስራ ነው። ብዙ የአውራጆች የWSD ትምህርት የውጭ እውቀት በማይጠበቅ የማይጠበቀው ሥርዓት በመጠቀም ምክንያት ትምህርት ዳታዎችን ከሚያስፈልጋቸው መጠቀሚያ ግንኙነት ጥቂት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት አዲስ የWSD ሥርዓት በመጠቀም በአዲስ ቃልና በጥያቄው ሰነድ ውስጥ ቃላት በሚመስል እና ቃላትን በመጠቀም እና በመጠቀም አዲስ የውጤት ቃላትን ለመፍጠር እናስጀጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም የWSD ሥርዓት ለመጠቀም፣ በአዲስ ቃላት ምሳሌ በባቢሎን መረብ መሠረት ላይ የተመሳሳይ የቁጥጥር ሥርዓት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የSemEval-13 እና SemEval-15 የኢንግሊዝኛ WSD ዳታ-setet በተፈቀደ ሥርዓቶችን እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ Experimental results demonstrate that the proposed WSD method significantly improves the baseline WSD method.  ከዚህም በላይ የWSD ስርዓታችን የ-የ የ-የ-አርላዊ WSD-ስርዓት ሥርዓት በሳምቪል-13 ዳታተሮች ውስጥ ነው፡፡ በመጨረሻው የሁለተኛው ዳታተር ጥያቄ ጥያቄ በሁለተኛው ጥያቄ ጥያቄ ውስጥ ካልጠበቀው እውቀት ከሀገር ግንኙነት የበለጠ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡', 'cs': 'Slovní smysl disambiguation (WSD) je úkol určit slovo smysl podle jeho kontextu. Mnoho stávajících studií WSD používá externí bez dozoru založený na znalostech přístup, protože má méně omezení slovních sad než přístupy pod dohledem, které vyžadují údaje o školení. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou metodu WSD pro generování kontextu nejednoznačného slova pomocí podobností mezi nejednoznačným slovem a slovy ve vstupním dokumentu. Kromě toho navrhujeme pro využití metody WSD novou metodu výpočtu slovní podobnosti založenou na sémantické síťové struktuře BabelNet. Vyhodnocujeme navržené metody na datové sadě SemEval-13 a SemEval-15 pro anglický WSD. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že navrhovaná metoda WSD výrazně zlepšuje základní metodu WSD. Navíc náš WSD systém překonává nejmodernější WSD systémy v datové sadě Semeval-13. Konečně má vyšší výkon než moderní systém bez dohledu na znalosti založený na WSD v průměrném výkonu obou datových sad.', 'et': 'Sõnatunde eristamine (WSD) on ülesanne määrata sõnatunde vastavalt selle kontekstile. Paljudes olemasolevates WSD uuringutes on kasutatud väliseid teadmistepõhiseid järelevalveta lähenemisviise, sest sellel on vähem sõnakogumipiiranguid kui koolitusandmeid nõudvatel järelevalvemeetoditel. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue WSD meetodi, et genereerida konteksti mitmetähenduslik sõna, kasutades sarnasusi mitmetähendusliku sõna ja sõnade vahel sisenddokumendis. Lisaks pakume välja uue sõnassarnasuse arvutamise meetodi, mis põhineb BabelNeti semantilisel võrgustruktuuril. Hindame kavandatud meetodeid SemEval-13 ja SemEval-15 inglise WSD andmekogumi jaoks. Katsetulemused näitavad, et kavandatud WSD meetod parandab oluliselt WSD algmeetodit. Lisaks on meie WSD süsteem ületanud Semeval-13 andmekogumi tipptasemel WSD süsteeme. Lõpuks on see mõlema andmekogumi keskmise jõudluse osas parem kui tipptasemel järelevalveta teadmistepõhisel WSD süsteemil.', 'ca': "La desambiguació del sentit de les paraules (WSD) és la tasca de determinar el sentit de la paraula segons el seu context. Molts estudis de DEM existents han estat utilitzant un enfocament extern sense supervisió basat en el coneixement perquè té menys restriccions de conjunt de paraules que enfocaments supervisats que requereixen dades de formació. En aquest paper, proposem un nou mètode d'EDD per generar el context d'una paraula ambigua utilitzant similituds entre una paraula ambigua i les paraules del document d'entrada. A més, per aprofitar el nostre mètode WSD, proposem un nou mètode de càlcul de similitud basat en l'estructura semàntica de xarxa de BabelNet. Evaluam els mètodes proposats en SemEval-13 i SemEval-15 per al conjunt de dades anglès WSD. Els resultats experimentals demostren que el mètode proposat d'ESD millora significativament el mètode basal d'ESD. A més, el nostre sistema de DEM supera els sistemes d'DEM més moderns del conjunt de dades del Semeval-13. Finally, it has higher performance than the state-of-the-art unsupervised knowledge-based WSD system in the average performance of both datasets.", 'fi': 'Sanaaistin erottelu (WSD) on tehtävä määrittää sana merkitys sen kontekstin mukaan. Monissa nykyisissä WSD-tutkimuksissa on käytetty ulkoista tietoon perustuvaa valvomatonta lähestymistapaa, koska siinä on vähemmän sanajoukon rajoituksia kuin valvotuissa lähestymistavoissa, jotka edellyttävät koulutustietoja. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta WSD-menetelmää moniselitteisen sanan kontekstin luomiseksi käyttämällä moniselitteisen sanan ja syöteasiakirjan sanojen samankaltaisuuksia. Lisäksi WSD-menetelmämme hyödyntämiseksi ehdotamme uutta sanasamankaltaisuuden laskentamenetelmää, joka perustuu BabelNetin semanttiseen verkkorakenteeseen. Arvioimme ehdotetut menetelmät SemEval-13 ja SemEval-15 englanninkielisille WSD-aineistoille. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotettu WSD-menetelmä parantaa merkittävästi lähtötilanteen WSD-menetelmää. Lisäksi WSD-järjestelmämme on nopeampi kuin Semeval-13-aineiston uusimmat WSD-järjestelmät. Lisäksi se on suorituskykyisempi kuin huipputekninen valvomaton tietopohjainen WSD-järjestelmä molempien aineistojen keskimääräisessä suorituskyvyssä.', 'bs': 'Desmbiguacija riječi (WSD) je zadatak određivanja smisla riječi u skladu sa svojim kontekstom. Mnogi postojeći ispitivanja WSD koriste nepotrebni pristup na temelju vanjskih znanja jer ima manje ograničenja na rečenima nego nadzorne pristupe koje zahtijevaju podatke o obuci. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu WSD-a kako bi stvorili kontekst dvosmislene riječi koristeći sličnosti između dvosmislene riječi i riječi u ulaznom dokumentu. Osim toga, da bi uticali na našu metodu WSD, dalje predlažemo novu metodu proračunanja sličnosti riječi na temelju semantičke strukture mreže BabelNet a. Procjenjujemo predložene metode na semiEval-13 i semiEval-15 za engleski WSD dataset. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da predložena metoda WSD značajno poboljšava početnu metodu WSD-a. Osim toga, naš WSD sistem nadmašuje stanje umjetničkih WSD-a u polovičnom setu podataka od 13. godine. Konačno, ima veće učinke od države umjetnosti neodređenog sustava WSD-a na znanju u prosječnoj učinkovitosti oba podataka.', 'jv': 'Ngucap maring Awak dhéwé éntuk WSD saiki wis nggambar kelas nang ngerasakno sawar nggawe gerakan kelas urip kuwi mau, dadi mau kudu nggambar obang-obang kanggo ngerasakno dadi nyong bisa diangkat dhéwé. Nang pentungé iki, kita mulasah sistem WSD sing gawe nggawe kontext luwih ambekan kelas diumbane gambar kelas diumbang gambar dan kelas nang dokumen input Nambah, nggawe WSD usul dumadhi kamu supoyo urip sistem Anyar samihan kelamsa gambar nggawe sistem semanti tambah babelnet dumadhi. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggunakake pertualangan kanggo ngerasakno dadi wis Inggris WSD karo semi-13 lan semi-5. Rejalaké sing paling nyanggani uwong kelompok nggawe aksi WSD seng jewelasar bukaya ngono nggawe aksi WSD seng basa. Daftar kok, sistem WSD sing paling maneh dumateng Sistem WSD ning dataset sing wis ana ing meta-13. Soalé, kuwi wis nggambar luwih dumadhi kaya sistem WSD sing bisa perusahaan karo hale-hale kanggo durung dumadhi iki dadi.', 'he': 'התפתחות תחושת מילים (WSD) היא המשימה לקבוע את תחושת המילה לפי הקשר שלה. הרבה מחקרי WSD קיימים השתמשו באמצעות גישה חיצונית לא מבוססת על ידע כי יש לה פחות מגבלות קבוצת מילים מאשר גישות מבוססת על ידע שדורשות נתונים אימונים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטה חדשה של WSD כדי ליצור את הקשר של מילה שאומרת על ידי השימוש בדומות בין מילה שאומרת למילים במסמך הכניסה. בנוסף, כדי להשתמש בשיטת WSD שלנו, אנו מציעים עוד שיטת חישוב דומה מילה חדשה מבוססת על מבנה רשת סמנטית של BabelNet. אנו מעריכים את השיטות המוצעות על SemEval-13 ו SemEval-15 עבור קבוצת נתונים WSD אנגלית. תוצאות ניסויים מראות ששיטת WSD המוצעת משפר באופן משמעותי את שיטת WSD הבסיסית. Furthermore, our WSD system outperforms the state-of-the-art WSD systems in the Semeval-13 dataset.  סוף סוף, יש לו ביצועים גבוהים יותר ממערכת WSD המבוססת על ידע ללא השגחה בממוצע של שני קבוצות נתונים.', 'ha': "Word sense disambiguation (WSD) is the task to determine the word sense according to its context.  Wasu da yawa da ake da WSD-fassarar sun yi amfani da wata hanyoyi ba da tsari a baka wajen sani ba, kwani yana da abu kaɗan na daidaita maganar da aka tsare tsari ko da hanyoyin tsari wanda ke nufin data na tsari. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗe wata hanyor WSD don ya ƙãga wani muhalli na wata magana wanda bã ya saurãre ba, da kuma za mu yi amfani da daidaita tsakanin wata kalma da magana cikin takardan injistan. In a ƙaranci, zuwa a samar da hanyarmu na WSD, za mu ƙari wata kalma na lissafa da misalin hisãbi a kan asalin na tsarin jerin na bakin BabelNet. Tuna ƙaddara hanyoyin da aka ƙaddara wa SemEal-13 da SemEl-15 wa tsarin WSD na Ingiriya. Matarinta na jarraba ya nuna cewa metoden WSD da aka buƙata, yana mai girma ga gyãra Metoden WSD a Baselin. Furan haka, tsarin WSD na raye halin-na-kunna WSD cikin tsarin da aka tsare Semewal-13. Ga ƙarshe, yana da mafi girma ga fassarar-halin-sanar da ba'a tsare da ilmi ba, a cikin cikakken cikakken biyu na danahan.", 'sk': 'Razjasnitev besednega smisla (WSD) je naloga določanja besednega smisla glede na njegov kontekst. Številne obstoječe študije WSD uporabljajo zunanji pristop, ki temelji na znanju in ne nadzoruje, ker ima manj omejitev nabora besed kot nadzorovani pristopi, ki zahtevajo podatke o usposabljanju. V prispevku predlagamo novo metodo WSD za ustvarjanje konteksta dvoumne besede z uporabo podobnosti med dvoumno besedo in besedami v vhodnem dokumentu. Poleg tega za izkoriščanje naše metode WSD predlagamo tudi novo metodo izračuna podobnosti besed, ki temelji na semantični mrežni strukturi BabelNet. Predlagane metode smo ocenili na SemEval-13 in SemEval-15 za angleški WSD nabor podatkov. Poskusni rezultati kažejo, da predlagana metoda WSD bistveno izboljša izhodiščno metodo WSD. Poleg tega naš sistem WSD presega najsodobnejše sisteme WSD v naboru podatkov Semeval-13. Nazadnje ima pri povprečni učinkovitosti obeh naborov podatkov večjo učinkovitost kot najsodobnejši neonadzorovani sistem WSD, ki temelji na znanju.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་ཚིག་ལྟ་ཀློག་ནུས་མེད་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་འཇུག་སྟངས་ནི་དེའི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏན་ཁེལ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Many existing WSD studies have been using an external knowledge-based unsupervised approach because it has fewer word set constraints than supervised approaches requiring training data. འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་WSD་ལམ་ལུགས་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གིས་ཡིག་ཆ་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་པ་དང་བརྗོད་ཐོག འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོའི་WSD ལམ་ལུགས་དུ་སྤྲོད་པར་བྱེད་ན། ང་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་BabelNet ་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་ཆ་(SemEval-13)དང་། ཨིན་ཇིའི་WSD གནད་སྡུད་ནང་གི་ལམ་ལུགས་འདིའི་གྲངས་སུ་བཏོན་ཡོད། Experimental results demonstrate that the proposed WSD method has significantly improved the baseline WSD method. ད་དུང་། ང་ཚོའི་WSD མ་ལག་གིས་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆའི་གནས་སྟངས་ WSD་གི་གནས་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་འབྱུང་བ་རེད། མཐའ་མཇུག་དུ། འདི་ལ་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་གཞི་རྟེན་མ་བཀོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་སྐྱེས་སྟངས་ལ་མང་ཤོ'}
{'en': 'Learning Semantic Sentence Embeddings using Sequential Pair-wise Discriminator', 'ar': 'تعلم تضمين الجمل الدلالية باستخدام التمييز المتسلسل الزوجي', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de incrustaciones semánticas de oraciones mediante discriminador secuencial por pares', 'fr': "Apprentissage de l'intégration de phrases sémantiques à l'aide d'un discriminateur séquentiel par paire", 'pt': 'Aprendendo a incorporação de sentenças semânticas usando o discriminador sequencial de pares', 'ja': 'シーケンシャルペアワイズ識別子を使用したセマンティック文の埋め込みの学習', 'zh': '以次成对鉴别器学语义句嵌之', 'hi': 'सीखना शब्दार्थ वाक्य अनुक्रमिक जोड़ी-वार भेदभाव का उपयोग कर एम्बेडिंग', 'ru': 'Изучение семантических предложений с помощью последовательного парного дискриминатора', 'ga': 'Leabú Pianbhreithe Séimeantach a Fhoghlaim ag baint úsáide as Idirdhealaitheach Beirte Seicheamhach', 'ka': 'სემენტიკური სიტყვების შებეჭდვის გამოყენებული სეკრიმინატორის გამოყენება', 'hu': 'Szemantikus mondatok beágyazása szekvenciális páros megkülönböztető segítségével', 'el': 'Μάθηση σημασιολογικών προτάσεων ενσωμάτωσης με τη χρήση του διαδοχικού διαχωριστή ζεύγους', 'it': "Imparare l'incorporazione di frasi semantiche utilizzando il discriminatore sequenziale a coppie", 'kk': 'Келесі жалғыз дискриминаторды қолданатын семантикалық сөз ендіру', 'lt': 'Mokymasis įdėti semestinius sakinius naudojant sekacinį poros diskriminatorių', 'mt': 'Tagħlim ta’ Sentenzi Semantiċi Embedding bl-użu ta’ Diskriminatur Sekwenzjali għal Pawġ', 'mk': 'Научи семантички вградувања на реченици користејќи секвенцијален дискриминатор за парови', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Penciptaan Hukuman Semantik menggunakan Pengdiskriminasi Secuensional-Matahari', 'ml': 'സെമാന്റിക് ശിക്ഷ എംബെഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d സെക്കന്റിക് പേയിര്\u200d ജ്ഞാനിയായ വിവേചകന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പഠിക്കുന', 'ro': 'Învățarea încorporării sentințelor semantice folosind discriminatorul secvențial înțelept pereche', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн хоорондын хувьд зөвшөөрөгч', 'pl': 'Uczenie się osadzeń zdań semantycznych za pomocą sekwencyjnego dyskryminatora para-wise', 'no': 'Læring av semiantiske setningar ved hjelp av diskriminator', 'sr': 'Naučenje semantičnih uloga kazne koristeći sekvencijalni diskriminator', 'si': 'සෙමාන්ටික වාර්තාවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'sv': 'Att lära sig semantiska meningsbeläggningar med hjälp av sekventiell parvis diskriminerare', 'so': 'Soo barta qalabka daryeelka galmada ee lagu isticmaalayo takoor xigmad leh', 'ta': 'செமான்டிக் வாக்குறுப்புகள் உட்பொதிந்து', 'ur': 'سیمنٹی سنت انڈینگ کی تعلیم سکھائی جبکہ دوسری طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کے', 'vi': 'Học thao tác án truyền nhiễm Trung học dùng lực phân hiệp', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Учене на вграждания на семантични изречения с помощта на последователен двоен дискриминатор', 'hr': 'Naučenje semantičkih uvođenja kazne koristeći sekvencijsku diskriminaciju', 'nl': 'Semantische zinsinsluitingen leren met behulp van Sequential Pair-Wise Discriminator', 'da': 'Læring af semantiske sætninger ved hjælp af sekventiel parvis diskriminator', 'de': 'Lernen von semantischen Satz-Einbettungen mit sequentiellem Pair-Wise Discriminator', 'id': 'Mempelajari Pencampuran Sentensi Semantik menggunakan Discriminator Secuential-Pair-wise', 'fa': 'آموزش استفاده از اختلاف\u200cکننده\u200cی پایین\u200cترین جمله\u200cهای عبارت', 'ko': '사용 순서 대감별기 학습 의미 문장 삽입', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Mazungumzo ya Hukumu ya Kisemantic kwa kutumia Mtetezi wa Kisequential Pair-wise', 'af': 'Onderleer Semantiese Sentence Inbêdings deur volgende paar- wyse diskriminator te gebruik', 'tr': 'Semantik söz guramlaryny Aýratyn Döwürme Aralygy', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përfshirjes së dënimeve Semantike duke përdorur diskriminuesin seksual për çifte', 'am': 'ሴሜንቲካዊ ስርዓት አቀማመጥ', 'az': 'Semantik Sözü İşləyici İşləyici Diqriminator', 'hy': 'Սովորեցնել սեմատիկ նախադասությունների ներգրավումները՝ օգտագործելով հաջորդական զույգչային խտրականություն', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক শাস্তি বিভিন্ন বিচারক ব্যবহার করে সেম্যান্টিক শাস্তি বিদ্যমান', 'bs': 'Učenje semantičkih uloga kazne koristeći sekvencijalni diskriminator', 'et': 'Semantiliste lausete manustamise õppimine järjestikuse paari diskrimineerija abil', 'cs': 'Učení se vkládání sémantických vět pomocí sekvenčního párového diskriminátoru', 'ca': 'Aprendre incorporacions de sentences semàntiques fent servir un discriminador secuencial per parell', 'fi': 'Semanttisten lauseiden upottamisen oppiminen sekvenssiaalisella pariviisaalla syrjinnällä', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ללמוד פיצוי גזרים סמנטיים באמצעות דיסקרמינציה רצינית בין זוגות', 'sk': 'Učenje vključevanja semantičnih stavkov z uporabo zaporednega dvojnega diskriminatorja', 'bo': 'རྗེས་སུ་འབྲངས་པའི་ཆ་ལྟར་མཚམས་སྦྱོར་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལུས་པའི་བསྡོད་བྱེད་སྟངས་ཀྱི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས།'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a method for obtaining sentence-level embeddings. While the problem of securing word-level embeddings is very well studied, we propose a novel method for obtaining sentence-level embeddings. This is obtained by a simple method in the context of solving the paraphrase generation task. If we use a sequential encoder-decoder model for generating paraphrase, we would like the generated paraphrase to be semantically close to the original sentence. One way to ensure this is by adding constraints for true paraphrase embeddings to be close and unrelated paraphrase candidate sentence embeddings to be far. This is ensured by using a sequential pair-wise discriminator that shares weights with the encoder that is trained with a suitable loss function. Our loss function penalizes paraphrase sentence embedding distances from being too large. This loss is used in combination with a sequential encoder-decoder network. We also validated our method by evaluating the obtained embeddings for a sentiment analysis task. The proposed method results in semantic embeddings and outperforms the state-of-the-art on the paraphrase generation and sentiment analysis task on standard datasets. These results are also shown to be statistically significant.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقة للحصول على حفلات الزفاف على مستوى الجملة. في حين أن مشكلة تأمين حفلات الزفاف على مستوى الكلمات مدروسة جيدًا ، فإننا نقترح طريقة جديدة للحصول على حفلات الزفاف على مستوى الجملة. يتم الحصول على ذلك بطريقة بسيطة في سياق حل مهمة إعادة الصياغة. إذا استخدمنا نموذجًا متسلسلًا لوحدة فك التشفير لتوليد إعادة الصياغة ، فنحن نود أن تكون إعادة الصياغة التي تم إنشاؤها قريبة من الجملة الأصلية. تتمثل إحدى طرق ضمان ذلك في إضافة قيود على حفلات الزفاف المعاد صياغتها لتكون قريبة وغير مرتبطة بإعادة صياغة الجملة المرشحة لتكون بعيدة. يتم ضمان ذلك باستخدام أداة تمييز زوجية متسلسلة تشترك في الأوزان مع المشفر الذي تم تدريبه بوظيفة خسارة مناسبة. تعمل وظيفة الخسارة لدينا على معاقبة إعادة صياغة الجملة وتضمين المسافات من أن تكون كبيرة جدًا. يتم استخدام هذه الخسارة مع شبكة مفكك تشفير متسلسلة. لقد تحققنا أيضًا من صحة طريقتنا من خلال تقييم حفلات الزفاف التي تم الحصول عليها لمهمة تحليل المشاعر. ينتج عن الطريقة المقترحة عمليات دمج دلالية وتتفوق على أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم في مهمة إعادة الصياغة وتحليل المشاعر في مجموعات البيانات القياسية. تظهر هذه النتائج أيضًا لتكون ذات دلالة إحصائية.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons une méthode pour obtenir des intégrations au niveau de la phrase. Bien que le problème de la sécurisation des intégrations au niveau des mots soit très bien étudié, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode pour obtenir des intégrations au niveau de la phrase. Ceci est obtenu par une méthode simple dans le contexte de la résolution de la tâche de génération de paraphrase. Si nous utilisons un modèle encodeur-décodeur séquentiel pour générer une paraphrase, nous aimerions que la paraphrase générée soit sémantiquement proche de la phrase d'origine. Une façon d'y parvenir est d'ajouter des contraintes pour que les intégrations de vraie paraphrase soient proches et que les intégrations de phrases candidates de paraphrase sans rapport soient éloignées. Ceci est assuré par l'utilisation d'un discriminateur séquentiel par paire qui partage les poids avec le codeur qui est entraîné avec une fonction de perte appropriée. Notre fonction de perte pénalise les distances d'inclusion de phrases de paraphrase parce qu'elles sont trop grandes. Cette perte est utilisée en combinaison avec un réseau encodeur-décodeur séquentiel. Nous avons également validé notre méthode en évaluant les intégrations obtenues pour une tâche d'analyse des sentiments. La méthode proposée se traduit par des intégrations sémantiques et surpasse l'état de la technique en matière de génération de paraphrase et d'analyse des sentiments sur des ensembles de données standard. Ces résultats sont également statistiquement significatifs.", 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos un método para obtener incrustaciones a nivel de oración. Si bien el problema de asegurar incrustaciones a nivel de palabras está muy bien estudiado, proponemos un método novedoso para obtener incrustaciones a nivel de oración. Esto se obtiene mediante un método simple en el contexto de la resolución de la tarea de generación de paráfrasis. Si utilizamos un modelo codificador-decodificador secuencial para generar paráfrasis, nos gustaría que la paráfrasis generada se acercara semánticamente a la oración original. Una forma de garantizar esto es agregando restricciones para que las incrustaciones de paráfrasis verdaderas sean cercanas y las incrustaciones de oraciones candidatas de paráfrasis no relacionadas estén lejos. Esto se asegura mediante el uso de un discriminador secuencial por pares que comparte pesos con el codificador que está entrenado con una función de pérdida adecuada. Nuestra función de pérdida penaliza la frase de paráfrasis que incrusta distancias de ser demasiado grandes. Esta pérdida se utiliza en combinación con una red de codificador-decodificador secuencial. También validamos nuestro método mediante la evaluación de las incrustaciones obtenidas para una tarea de análisis de opinión. El método propuesto da como resultado incrustaciones semánticas y supera al estado de la técnica en la generación de paráfrasis y la tarea de análisis de sentimientos en conjuntos de datos estándar. También se ha demostrado que estos resultados son estadísticamente significativos.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um método para a obtenção de embeddings em nível de sentença. Embora o problema de garantir os embeddings em nível de palavra seja muito bem estudado, propomos um novo método para obter embeddings em nível de sentença. Isso é obtido por um método simples no contexto de resolver a tarefa de geração de paráfrase. Se usarmos um modelo codificador-decodificador sequencial para gerar a paráfrase, gostaríamos que a paráfrase gerada fosse semanticamente próxima da sentença original. Uma maneira de garantir isso é adicionando restrições para que os embeddings de paráfrase verdadeiros sejam próximos e os embeddings de sentenças candidatas de paráfrase não relacionados sejam distantes. Isso é garantido usando um discriminador de pares sequencial que compartilha pesos com o codificador que é treinado com uma função de perda adequada. Nossa função de perda penaliza as distâncias de incorporação de frases de paráfrase por serem muito grandes. Esta perda é usada em combinação com uma rede sequencial de codificador-decodificador. Também validamos nosso método avaliando os embeddings obtidos para uma tarefa de análise de sentimentos. O método proposto resulta em embeddings semânticos e supera o estado da arte na tarefa de geração de paráfrases e análise de sentimentos em conjuntos de dados padrão. Esses resultados também se mostram estatisticamente significativos.', 'zh': '本文中,我们发出一种得句子。 虽护词级嵌之问甚善,然一句新法。 此求说义之上下文,简术而得之也。 若以次编码器- 解码器生释义,愿生释义近语义。 保此一法为真释义嵌束使近,不相关者释义候选句嵌要远。 此以次成对鉴别器保之,鉴别器与用宜函数训练之编码器共其权重也。 我损函数罚销大释义句。 其耗与序编码器-解码器网络合而用之。 我们还因为情理分得的嵌入来验验我们的方法。 所出之法,有语义嵌入,于格数之释义,与情析任,优于先进之术。 亦见统计学义。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम वाक्य-स्तर के एम्बेडिंग प्राप्त करने के लिए एक विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। जबकि शब्द-स्तर के एम्बेडिंग को सुरक्षित करने की समस्या का बहुत अच्छी तरह से अध्ययन किया जाता है, हम वाक्य-स्तर के एम्बेडिंग प्राप्त करने के लिए एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। यह व्याख्या पीढ़ी के कार्य को हल करने के संदर्भ में एक सरल विधि द्वारा प्राप्त किया जाता है। यदि हम व्याख्या उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक अनुक्रमिक एन्कोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं, तो हम चाहते हैं कि उत्पन्न व्याख्या मूल वाक्य के करीब हो। यह सुनिश्चित करने का एक तरीका यह सुनिश्चित करने का है कि सच्चे व्याख्या एम्बेडिंग के लिए बाधाओं को जोड़कर करीबी और असंबंधित व्याख्या उम्मीदवार वाक्य एम्बेडिंग को दूर होने के लिए। यह एक अनुक्रमिक जोड़ी-वार भेदभाव का उपयोग करके सुनिश्चित किया जाता है जो एनकोडर के साथ वजन साझा करता है जो एक उपयुक्त हानि फ़ंक्शन के साथ प्रशिक्षित होता है। हमारे नुकसान समारोह बहुत बड़ा होने से दूरी एम्बेडिंग व्याख्या वाक्य penalizes. इस हानि का उपयोग अनुक्रमिक एन्कोडर-डिकोडर नेटवर्क के साथ संयोजन में किया जाता है। हमने भावना विश्लेषण कार्य के लिए प्राप्त एम्बेडिंग का मूल्यांकन करके अपनी विधि को भी मान्य किया। प्रस्तावित विधि के परिणामस्वरूप शब्दार्थ एम्बेडिंग होती है और मानक डेटासेट पर पैराफ्रेज पीढ़ी और भावना विश्लेषण कार्य पर अत्याधुनिक रूप से बेहतर प्रदर्शन करती है। इन परिणामों को सांख्यिकीय रूप से महत्वपूर्ण भी दिखाया गया है।', 'ja': '本稿では、文レベルの埋め込みを得る方法を提案する。 単語レベルの埋め込みの確保の問題は非常によく検討されていますが、文レベルの埋め込みを得るための新たな方法を提案します。 これは、パラフレーズ生成タスクを解くコンテキストの単純な方法によって得られる。 パラフレーズを生成するためにシーケンシャルエンコーダーデコーダーモデルを使用する場合、生成されたパラフレーズは元の文に意味的に近いものにしたいと考えています。 これを確実にする1つの方法は、真のパラフレーズ埋め込みが近く、無関係なパラフレーズ候補文埋め込みが遠いという制約を追加することです。 これは、適切な損失関数で訓練されたエンコーダと重みを共有するシーケンシャルペアワイズ識別子を使用することによって保証されます。 損失関数は、文の埋め込み距離が大きすぎないように文を言い換えることをペナルティにします。 この損失は、シーケンシャルエンコーダデコーダネットワークと組み合わせて使用されます。 また、センチメント分析タスクのために得られた埋め込みを評価して、メソッドを検証しました。 提案された方法は、セマンティック埋め込みをもたらし、標準データセット上のパラフレーズ生成およびセンチメント分析タスクの最先端を上回ります。 これらの結果はまた、統計的に有意であることが示されている。', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы предлагаем метод получения вложений на уровне предложений. Хотя проблема защиты вложений на уровне слов очень хорошо изучена, мы предлагаем новый метод для получения вложений на уровне предложений. Это достигается простым методом в контексте решения задачи генерации парафраз. Если мы используем последовательную модель кодировщик-декодер для генерации перефразы, мы хотели бы, чтобы сгенерированная перефраза была семантически близка к исходному предложению. Одним из способов обеспечить это является добавление ограничений для вложений истинного перефраза, чтобы быть близкими и несвязанными вложениями кандидатного перефраза, чтобы быть далекими. Это достигается за счет использования последовательного парного дискриминатора, который делит вес с кодером, обученным подходящей функцией потерь. Наша функция потерь наказывает за слишком большие расстояния вложения фразы. Эта потеря используется в сочетании с последовательной сетью кодер-декодер. Мы также проверили наш метод, оценив полученные вложения для задачи анализа настроений. Предложенный метод приводит к семантическим вложениям и превосходит современный по задаче генерации парафраз и анализа настроений по стандартным наборам данных. Эти результаты также являются статистически значимыми.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh chun leabaithe ag leibhéal na habairte a bhaint amach. Cé go ndéantar staidéar an-mhaith ar an bhfadhb maidir le leabú leibhéal na bhfocal a dhaingniú, molaimid modh nua chun leabú ag leibhéal na habairte a bhaint amach. Faightear é seo trí mhodh simplí i gcomhthéacs an tasc giniúna athinsinte a réiteach. Má úsáidimid samhail ionchódóra-dhíchódóra seicheamhach chun athinsint a ghiniúint, ba mhaith linn go mbeadh an t-athinsint ghinte gar go séimeantach don bhun-abairt. Slí amháin chun é seo a chinntiú ná trí shrianta a chur le leabú fíorathinsinte a bheith gar agus athinsint neamhghaolmhar a bheith i bhfad i gcóir leabú abairtí iarrthóra. Cinntítear é seo trí úsáid a bhaint as idirdhealaitheoir seicheamhach péire-ciallmhar a roinneann meáchain leis an ionchódóir atá oilte le feidhm oiriúnach caillteanas. Déanann ár bhfeidhm chaillteanais pionós a chur ar athinsint na habairte a leabaíonn fad achair ó bheith rómhór. Úsáidtear an caillteanas seo i gcomhar le líonra ionchódóra-díchódóra seicheamhach. Rinneamar ár modh a bhailíochtú freisin trí mheastóireacht a dhéanamh ar na leabaithe a fuarthas le haghaidh tasc anailíse meon. Is é an toradh a bhíonn ar an modh atá beartaithe ná leabú séimeantach agus sáraíonn sé an tasc is nua-aimseartha maidir le giniúint athinsinte agus anailís meoin ar thacair sonraí caighdeánacha. Taispeántar freisin go bhfuil na torthaí seo suntasach go staitistiúil.', 'ka': 'ამ წიგნიში ჩვენ მინდომებით წიგნის მიღებელი მეტი. თუმცა სიტყვების სიტყვების შესაძლებლობის პრობლემა ძალიან კარგი სწავლილია, ჩვენ მინდა პრობლემა მეტი სიტყვების შესაძლებლობისთვის. ეს პარაფრესის შემქმნა დავალების კონტექსტში უკეთესი მეტიდან მიიღება. თუ ჩვენ პარაფრაზეზის შექმნა კოდენციალური კოდენციალური კოდენციალური მოდელი გამოყენებთ, ჩვენ მინდა, რომ შექმნილი პარაფრაზეზი იყოს სმენტიკურად პირველური სიტ ერთი გზა, რომ დარწმუნოთ, ეს არის მართლა პარაფრაზეზის დამატებით დარწმუნდება და არ დაკავშირებული პარაფრაზეზის კანდიდენტის სიტყვების დამატებით. ეს დასრულებულია, რომელიც სეკოდენციალური ექსკოდენტიური დისკრიმინატორის გამოყენებით, რომელიც კოდენტირებით გაზიანება, რომელიც საჭირო დასრულების ფუნქციაში გა ჩვენი შემდგომარების ფუნქცია დაბრუნდება პარაფრაზეზის სიტყვა, რომელიც ძალიან დიდი იყოს. ეს დასრულება გამოყენებულია კოდენციალური კოდენციალური ქსელით. ჩვენ ასევე გავაკეთეთეთ ჩვენი მეტი, რომელიც მიიღებული ინტებიზნეციების გავაკეთებით სენტიმენტის ანალიზიციის რაოდენობაზე. პროგრამის შესაძლებელი პროგრამის შემდეგ სენმანტიკური ინბექციების შესაძლებლობა და სენტიმენტიკური ანალიზიციის მოქმედება სენტატრანტური ინბექციების შესაძლებლობა და გა ეს შედეგები ასევე გამოჩვენება სტატისტიკურად მნიშვნელოვანია.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy mondatszintű beágyazási módszert javasolunk. Bár a szószintű beágyazások biztosításának problémáját nagyon jól tanulmányozzák, új módszert javasolunk a mondatszintű beágyazások megszerzésére. Ezt egy egyszerű módszerrel érjük el a parafráz generálási feladat megoldásával összefüggésben. Ha egy szekvenciális kódoló-dekódoló modellt használunk a parafrázis generálásához, szeretnénk, ha a generált parafrázis szemantikusan közel lenne az eredeti mondathoz. Ennek egyik módja annak biztosítása, hogy a valódi parafrázis beágyazások közeli, és a független parafrázis jelölt mondat beágyazások messze legyenek. Ezt egy szekvenciális páros megkülönböztető segítségével biztosítjuk, amely megosztja a súlyokat a megfelelő veszteségfunkcióval kiképzett útmérővel. A veszteség funkciónk bünteti a parafrázis mondatokat, amelyek távolságokat ágyaznak a túl nagyoktól. Ezt a veszteséget egy szekvenciális kódoló-dekódoló hálózattal kombinálják. Módszerünket érvényesítettük az érzelmek elemzéséhez kapott beágyazások értékelésével is. A javasolt módszer szemantikai beágyazásokat eredményez, és felülmúlja a standard adatkészletek parafrázkészítési és sentiment elemzési feladatainak korszerűségét. Ezek az eredmények statisztikailag szignifikánsak bizonyultak.', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo un metodo per ottenere embedding a livello di frase. Mentre il problema della sicurezza delle incorporazioni a livello di parola è molto ben studiato, proponiamo un nuovo metodo per ottenere incorporazioni a livello di frase. Ciò è ottenuto con un metodo semplice nel contesto della risoluzione del compito di generazione della parafrasi. Se usiamo un modello sequenziale encoder-decoder per generare parafrasi, vorremmo che la parafrasi generata fosse semanticamente vicina alla frase originale. Un modo per garantire questo è aggiungere vincoli per le vere incorporazioni di parafrasi per essere vicine e le incorporazioni di frasi candidate per parafrasi non correlate per essere lontane. Ciò è garantito utilizzando un discriminatore sequenziale in coppia che condivide i pesi con l'encoder addestrato con una funzione di perdita adeguata. La nostra funzione di perdita penalizza la frase parafrasa incorporando distanze dall'essere troppo grandi. Questa perdita viene utilizzata in combinazione con una rete sequenziale di encoder-decoder. Abbiamo anche convalidato il nostro metodo valutando gli embedding ottenuti per un compito di analisi del sentiment. Il metodo proposto si traduce in incorporazioni semantiche e supera lo stato dell'arte nel compito di generazione di parafrasi e analisi del sentiment su set di dati standard. Questi risultati sono anche dimostrati statisticamente significativi.", 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο για την απόκτηση ενσωμάτωσης σε επίπεδο ποινής. Ενώ το πρόβλημα της εξασφάλισης ενσωμάτωσης σε επίπεδο λέξεων έχει μελετηθεί πολύ καλά, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο για την απόκτηση ενσωμάτωσης σε επίπεδο πρότασης. Αυτό επιτυγχάνεται με μια απλή μέθοδο στο πλαίσιο της επίλυσης της εργασίας δημιουργίας παραφράσεων. Αν χρησιμοποιήσουμε ένα διαδοχικό μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή για την παραγωγή παραφράσης, θα θέλαμε η παραγόμενη παραφράση να είναι σημασιολογικά κοντά στην αρχική πρόταση. Ένας τρόπος για να διασφαλιστεί αυτό είναι η προσθήκη περιορισμών για τις πραγματικές ενσωμάτωση παραφράσεων ώστε να είναι κοντά και οι μη σχετικές ενσωμάτωση υποψηφίων προτάσεων παραφράσεων να είναι μακρινές. Αυτό διασφαλίζεται με τη χρήση ενός διαδοχικού διαχωριστή ζεύγους που μοιράζεται βάρη με τον κωδικοποιητή που εκπαιδεύεται με μια κατάλληλη λειτουργία απώλειας. Η λειτουργία απώλειας τιμωρεί την παράφραση της πρότασης ενσωματώνοντας αποστάσεις από το να είναι πάρα πολύ μεγάλη. Αυτή η απώλεια χρησιμοποιείται σε συνδυασμό με ένα διαδοχικό δίκτυο κωδικοποιητών-αποκωδικοποιητών. Επίσης επικυρώσαμε τη μέθοδο μας αξιολογώντας τις αποκτηθείσες ενσωματώσεις για μια εργασία ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος έχει ως αποτέλεσμα σημασιολογικές ενσωματώσεις και ξεπερνά την κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας στην εργασία δημιουργίας παραφράσεων και ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων σε τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων. Τα αποτελέσματα αυτά αποδεικνύονται επίσης στατιστικά σημαντικά.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда сөз деңгейіндегі ендіру әдісін ұсынамыз. Сөздер деңгейінің ендіру мәселесі өте жақсы оқылған, біз сөздер деңгейінің ендіру үшін романдық әдісін ұсынамыз. Бұл парафраның құру тапсырмасын шешу контексті қарапайым әдісімен алды. Егер біз парафразды құру үшін кейінгі кодер- декодер үлгісін қолдансақ, құрылған парафраздың бастапқы сөйлеміне жақын болуын қалаймыз. Бұны тексеру үшін бір жол - шын парафраз ендіру үшін жабылып, қосылмаған парафраз ендіру үшін шектеулерді қосулы. Бұл кейінгі екі жүйелік дискриминаторды қолдану үшін қолданылады. Бұл кейінгі жүйелік жоғалу функциясы менен бағытталған кодерлерді ортақтастырады. Жоғалмаған функциясыз үлкен болғандықтан парафраз сөйлесімізді шектеп береді. Бұл жоғалу келесі кодер- декодер желімен қолданылады. Біз сондай-ақ өзіміздің әдімімізді сезімді анализ тапсырмасының ендірілген ендірулерін оқу арқылы тексердік. Келтірілген әдіс семантикалық ендіру және стандартты деректер жиындарындағы парафразды құру және сезімдік анализ тапсырмасының күйін шектеп береді. Бұл нәтижелер де статистикалық маңызды деп көрсетіледі.', 'lt': 'In this paper, we propose a method for obtaining sentence-level embeddings.  Nors žodžių lygio įterpimo užtikrinimo problem a labai gerai išnagrinėta, mes siūlome naują metodą įterpimo į sakinius lygio įterpimui gauti. Tai gaunama taikant paprastą metodą sprendžiant parafrazių kūrimo užduotį. Jei parafrazėms generuoti naudojame sekacinį kodavimo kodavimo model į, norėtume, kad sukaupta parafrazė būtų semantiškai artima pradiniam sakiniui. Vienas iš būdų tai užtikrinti yra pridėjus apribojimus, kad tikros parafrazės įterpiamos būtų artimos, o nesusijusios parafrazės kandidato įterpiamos būtų toli. Tai užtikrinama naudojant eilinį dviejų rūšių diskriminatorių, kuris dalijasi svoriais su kodatoriumi, kuris mokomas tinkama nuostolių funkcija. Mūsų praradimo funkcija baudžia parafrazės sakinį, įtraukiantį atstumus nuo pernelyg didelio. Šis nuostolis naudojamas kartu su sekaciniu kodavimo kodavimo tinklu. Taip pat patvirtinome savo metodą vertindami gautus įdėjimus, atliekančius jautrumo analizės užduotį. Siūlomas metodas lemia semantinius įterpimus ir atitinka standartinių duomenų rinkinių parafrazių kūrimo ir sentiment ų analizės pažangiausią užduotį. Šie rezultatai taip pat yra statistiškai reikšmingi.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, предложуваме метод за добивање вклучувања на ниво на реченици. И покрај тоа што проблемот со обезбедувањето на вградувања на зборови е многу добро проучен, ние предложуваме нов метод за обезбедување на вградувања на ниво на реченици. Ова се добива со едноставен метод во контекст на решавање на задачата за генерација на парафрази. Ако користиме секвенцијален модел на кодер за генерирање на парафраза, би сакале генерираната парафраза да биде семантично блиску до оригиналната реченица. Еден начин да се осигура ова е додавајќи ограничувања за вистинските парафрази да бидат блиски и неповрзани парафрази кандидатски реченици да бидат далеку. Ова се обезбедува со користење секвенцијален дискриминатор за парови кој дели тежини со кодерот кој е обучен со соодветна функција на загуба. Нашата функција на загуба ги казнува парафразите кои вклучуваат далечини од премногу големи. Оваа загуба се користи во комбинација со секвенцијална мрежа на кодер- декодер. Ние, исто така, го потврдивме нашиот метод со проценка на добиените вложувања за задача за анализа на чувствата. Предложениот метод резултира со семантични вложувања и ја надминува најдобрата задача за генерација на парафрази и анализа на чувствата на стандардните податоци. Овие резултати, исто така, се покажаа дека се статистички значајни.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu biex jinkisbu inkorporazzjonijiet fil-livell tas-sentenza. Filwaqt li l-problem a tal-iżgurar tal-inkorporazzjonijiet fil-livell tal-kliem hija studjata sew, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid għall-kisba tal-inkorporazzjonijiet fil-livell tas-sentenza. Dan jinkiseb b’metodu sempliċi fil-kuntest tas-soluzzjoni tal-kompitu tal-ġenerazzjoni tal-parafrażi. Jekk nużaw mudell sekwenzjali ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ parafrażi, nixtiequ li l-parafrażi ġġenerata tkun semantikament qrib is-sentenza oriġinali. Mod wieħed biex jiġi żgurat dan huwa billi jiżdiedu restrizzjonijiet għall-inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ parafrażi reali li jkunu qrib u inkorporazzjonijiet ta’ parafrażi kandidati mhux relatati li jkunu ’l bogħod. Dan jiġi żgurat bl-użu ta’ diskriminatur sekwenzjali għal pari li jaqsam il-piżijiet mal-kodifikatur li huwa mħarreġ b’funzjoni xierqa ta’ telf. Il-funzjoni tagħna tat-telf tippenalizza sentenza parafrażi li tinkludi distanzi milli jkunu kbar wisq. Dan it-telf jintuża flimkien ma’ netwerk sekwenzjali ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder. Ivvalidajna wkoll il-metodu tagħna billi vvalutaw l-inkorporazzjonijiet miksuba għal kompitu ta’ analiżi tas-sentimenti. Il-metodu propost jirriżulta f’inkorporazzjonijiet semantiċi u jwettaq l-aktar ħidma avvanzata dwar il-ġenerazzjoni tal-parafrażi u l-analiżi tas-sentimenti fuq settijiet ta’ dejta standard. Dawn ir-riżultati jintwerew ukoll li huma statistikament sinifikanti.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan kaedah untuk mendapatkan penyembedding tahap kalimat. While the problem of securing word-level embeddings is very well studied, we propose a novel method for obtaining sentence-level embeddings.  Ini diperoleh dengan kaedah sederhana dalam konteks penyelesaian tugas generasi parafrasa. Jika kita menggunakan model pengekod-dekoder sekuensi untuk menghasilkan parafrasa, kita ingin parafrasa yang dijana secara semantik dekat dengan kalimat asal. One way to ensure this is by adding constraints for true paraphrase embeddings to be close and unrelated paraphrase candidate sentence embeddings to be far.  Ini dijamin dengan menggunakan diskriminator sekuntial sepasang yang berkongsi berat dengan pengekod yang dilatih dengan fungsi kehilangan yang sesuai. Fungsi kehilangan kita menghukum kalimat parafrasa memasukkan jarak dari terlalu besar. Kehilangan ini digunakan dalam kombinasi dengan rangkaian pengekod-pengekod berturut-turut. Kami juga sahkan kaedah kami dengan menilai penerbangan yang diperoleh untuk tugas analisis perasaan. Kaedah yang diusulkan mengakibatkan penyampaian semantik dan melampaui kemajuan pada generasi parafrasa dan tugas analisis sentimen pada set data piawai. Hasil-hasil ini juga menunjukkan menjadi statistik signifikan.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид өгүүлбэрийн түвшинд оролцох аргыг санал болгож байна. Үүний түвшинд оролцох асуудал маш сайн судалсан ч бид өгүүлбэрийн түвшинд оролцох шинэ арга замыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь парафрейз бүтээгдэхүүний ажлыг шийдэх үед энгийн арга юм. Хэрвээ бид дараагийн коддогч-декодер загварыг параграл гаргах үед ашиглавал үүсгэсэн параграл эхний өгүүлбэртэй ихэвчлэн ойртохыг хүсч байна. Үүнийг баталгаалах нэг арга нь жинхэнэ парафрейзын хэмжээсүүдийг ойртох, холбоотой парафрейзын хэмжээсүүдийг хол байх болно. Энэ нь зөв алдагдах функцтай сургалтын коддор жингийг хуваалцаж буй хоёр хуваалцагчийг ашиглаж байдаг. Бидний алдах функц нь хэтэрхий том байхаас хоорондоо хоорондоо өргөн үгийг шийтгэдэг. Энэ алдагдал дараагийн коддогч сүлжээтэй холбогдож байна. Мөн бид өөрсдийн арга замыг мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээний ажлын тулд хүлээн зөвшөөрөхөд үнэлгээ хийсэн. Шинэ санал болгосон арга нь семантик хэмжээсүүд болон стандарт өгөгдлийн сан дээрх парафрейз бүтээлийн төвшин болон сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээний ажил дээр үр дүнтэй. Эдгээр үр дүн нь мөн статистикийн чухал байдаг.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi ein metode for å henta setningsnivå. Mens problemet med å sikre inn ordnivået er veldig godt studiert, fører vi eit nytt metode for å få innbygging av setningsnivå. Dette vert henta av ein enkel metode i konteksten for å løysa oppgåva for parafrase. Viss vi brukar ein sekvent koderingsmodell for å laga parafrase, vil vi ha det genererte parafrasen som skal ha semantisk nær den opprinnelige setninga. Ein måte å sikre på at dette er ved å leggja til begrensningar for sanne parafrasiske innbygging som skal vera lukka og ukjend parafrasiske innbygging som skal vera langt. Dette er sikker på å bruka ein sekvensisk par- diskriminator som deler vekt med koderen som er trent med eit passande tapfunksjon. Ver tapsfunksjon påpenaliserer parafrase som innebyr avstandane frå å å vera for stor. Denne tapen vert brukt i kombinasjon med eit sekvensisk koderingsnettverk. Vi har også validert metoden vårt ved å evaluera innbyggingane for ein sentimentanalyseoppgåve. Det foreslåde metoden resulterer i semantiske innbygging og utfører kunstået på parafrasen-generering og sentimentanalyseoppgåva på standard datasett. Desse resultatene vert også viste som statistisk signifikant.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, വാക്ക് നില നിലനില്\u200dക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു രീതിയാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നത്. വാക്ക് നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനെ സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രശ്നം വളരെ നന്നായി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നു പാരാഫ്രേസ് തലമുറയുടെ ജോലി തീരുമാനിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ളില്\u200d ഒരു ലളിതമായ രീതി പാരാഫ്രെയിസ് ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി നമുക്കൊരു പിന്നീട് കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ വാക്കിന്റെ അടയാളപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക വാക്കുകള്\u200d അകലെയാകുന്നതിനും ഇത് ഉറപ് ഇത് സാധാരണ നഷ്ടം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന കോഡെര്\u200d കൊണ്ട് ഭാരം പങ്കുകൊടുക്കുന്ന ഒരു ജോട്ടില്\u200d ജോട്ടില്\u200d വിവേചകന്\u200d ഉപയോ നമ്മുടെ നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട ഫങ്ഷന്\u200d വളരെ വലുതായിരിക്കാന്\u200d പാരാഫ്രേഷന്\u200d വാക്കിനെ ശിക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. ഈ നഷ്ടത്തിന്റെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് സെക്സിനസികമായ ഒരു കോഡെര്\u200d- ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d നെറ്റ്റര്\u200dName നമ്മള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d ശരിയാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു ഒരു വിചാരശ്രമങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നിലനിര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിന പ്രൊദേശിച്ച രീതി ഈ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പുരുഷനായി പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu da dobijemo integraciju na nivou rečenica. Iako je problem osiguranja integracija na nivou reči vrlo dobro proučena, predlažemo novu metodu za dobivanje integracija na nivou rečenica. Ovo je dobijeno jednostavnim metodom u kontekstu rješavanja zadataka generacije parafraze. Ako koristimo sekvencijski model kodera-dekodera za stvaranje parafraze, želeli bismo da stvorena parafraza bude semantički blizu originalne rečenice. Jedan način da se to osigura je dodajući ograničenja za prave parafraze da budu blizu i nepovezane parafraze kandidatne rečenice da budu daleko. To je osigurano koristeći sekvencijski diskriminaciju na parovima koji deli težinu sa koderom koji je obučen odgovarajućim funkcijama gubitka. Naša funkcija gubitka kazni parafrazu koja uključuje udaljenost od prevelikog. Ovaj gubitak se koristi u kombinaciji sa sekvencijalnom mrežom kodera. Takoðe smo potvrdili našu metodu procjenjivanjem nabavljenih uloga za zadatak analize sentiment a. Predložena metoda rezultira semantičkim uvođenjima i iznosi stanje umjetnosti na zadatak generacije parafraze i analize sentimenta na standardnim setima podataka. Ovi rezultati takođe pokazuju da su statistički značajni.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy metodę uzyskania osadzeń na poziomie zdania. Chociaż problem zabezpieczania osadzeń na poziomie słowa jest bardzo dobrze zbadany, proponujemy nową metodę uzyskania osadzeń na poziomie zdania. Jest to uzyskiwane za pomocą prostej metody w kontekście rozwiązania zadania generowania parafraz. Jeśli do generowania parafrazy używamy sekwencyjnego modelu kodera-dekodera, chcielibyśmy, aby wygenerowana parafraza była semantycznie zbliżona do oryginalnego zdania. Jednym ze sposobów, aby zapewnić to, jest dodanie ograniczeń dla prawdziwych osadzeń parafrazy, aby były bliskie, a niepowiązane osadzenia zdań kandydatów parafrazy były dalekie. Jest to zapewnione dzięki zastosowaniu sekwencyjnego dyskryminatora parowego, który dzieli się wagami z koderem, który jest przeszkolony z odpowiednią funkcją utraty. Nasza funkcja straty kara parafrazy zdanie osadzające odległości od bycia zbyt dużym. Utrata ta jest wykorzystywana w połączeniu z sekwencyjną siecią kodera-dekodera. Zatwierdziliśmy również naszą metodę oceniając uzyskane osadzenia dla zadania analizy sentymentów. Proponowana metoda skutkuje osadzeniami semantycznymi i przewyższa najnowocześniejsze zadanie generowania parafraz i analizy sentymentów na standardowych zbiorach danych. Wyniki te są również istotne statystycznie.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o metodă pentru obținerea încorporărilor la nivel de frază. În timp ce problema securizării încorporărilor la nivel de cuvânt este foarte bine studiată, propunem o metodă nouă pentru obținerea încorporărilor la nivel de frază. Acest lucru se obține printr-o metodă simplă în contextul rezolvării sarcinii de generare a parafrazei. Dacă folosim un model secvențial codificator-decodor pentru generarea parafrazei, am dori ca parafraza generată să fie semantic aproape de propoziția inițială. O modalitate de a asigura acest lucru este adăugarea de constrângeri pentru ca încorporările adevărate de parafrază să fie aproape și încorporările fără legătură cu parafrază candidată să fie departe. Acest lucru este asigurat prin utilizarea unui discriminator secvențial în perechi care împarte greutățile cu encoderul care este instruit cu o funcție de pierdere adecvată. Funcția noastră de pierdere penalizează fraza parafrază încorporând distanțele de la a fi prea mari. Această pierdere este utilizată în combinație cu o rețea secvențială de encoder-decoder. De asemenea, am validat metoda noastră prin evaluarea încorporărilor obținute pentru o sarcină de analiză a sentimentului. Metoda propusă are ca rezultat încorporarea semantică și depășește cele mai moderne activități de generare a parafrazelor și analiza sentimentului pe seturile de date standard. Aceste rezultate sunt, de asemenea, dovedite a fi semnificative statistic.', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ka soo jeedaynaa qaab aan helno heerka dhamaadka. While the problem of securing word-level embeddings is very well studied, we propose a novel method for obtaining sentence-level embeddings.  Tan waxaa laga helaa qaab fudud, marka lagu xalliyo shaqada farshaxanka. Haddii aynu isticmaalno muusikada codsiga dabadeed si aan u abuurno fasax, waxaan jeclaan lahayn in qayb ahaan u dhowaado hadalka asalka ah. Si loo xaqiijiyo in taasu ay ku dareyso qasab ay ku leedahay baaritaanka runta ah inay dhowaadaan islamarkaasna ay ku jiraan hadalka mushaarka ah oo aan la mid aheyn. Tan waxaa lagu xaqiijin karaa ku isticmaalka takoorista labo xigmad leh oo ku saabsan miisaanka aqoonta lagu baranayo shaqo khasaaro ku haboon. Shaqo khasaaradeenna waxay dhibaataysaa qeyb ka mid ah meel aad u weyn. Khasaarkaas waxaa lagu isticmaalaa shabakadda koodeynta dabadeed. Sidoo kale waxaynu ku xaqiijinnay qaababkayaga si aan u qiimeynayno shaqada baaritaanka xisaabta. Midabka la soo jeeday wuxuu ka resultiyaa mid ka mid ah meelaha uu ku dhex maro oo uu sameeyaa xaaladda farshaxanka oo ku saabsan farshaxanka iyo xisaabta kaleemeysashada oo ku saabsan sawirada standardka. Arrimahaas waxaa sidoo kale loo muujiyaa inay si statistic ah u muhiimsan yihiin.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පිළිගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් පිළිගන්න. වචන ස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් හොඳයි, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා වචන ස්ථානය සම්බන්ධ කරප මේක සාමාන්\u200dය විධානයක් ලැබෙන්නේ පැරපේස් විශාල වැඩක් විසඳන්න සම්පූර්ණ විධානයක්. අපි පරාප්\u200dරේෂ් සිද්ධ වාර්තාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් භාවිත කරනවා නම්, අපි කැමතියි සිද්ධ වාර්තාවක් ප්\u200dරමාණ මේක සහතිකරගන්න එක ප්\u200dරමාණය තමයි ඇත්ත ප්\u200dරමාණ ප්\u200dරමාණ සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න සහ සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න බැරි ප මේක සුරක්ෂිත වෙනවා පස්සේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයෙක් විශේෂකයෙක් භාවිත කරන්න, ඒක සුරක්ෂිත විශේෂකයෙක් සමඟ විශේෂකයෙන් බ අපේ වැරැද්ධ වැරැද්ධ වැරැද්ධ වාක්ෂා වාක්ෂා වාක්ෂා වාක්ෂා කරනවා කියලා වැඩියෙන්  මේ නැතිවීම සම්බන්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. අපි අපේ විධානය විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණ වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් පිළිබඳින්න පුළුවන් විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න සෙමැන්ටික් සංවිධානය සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණිත දත්ත සේට් වල ස්ථිතිය-සංවිධානය සඳහා  මේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරමාණයක් වගේ', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi en metod för att erhålla meningsnivåinbäddningar. Även om problemet med att säkra inbäddningar på ordnivå är mycket väl studerat, föreslår vi en ny metod för att erhålla inbäddningar på meningsnivå. Detta erhålls med en enkel metod i samband med att lösa parafrasgenereringsuppgiften. Om vi använder en sekventiell encoder-avkodarmodell för att generera parafraser, vill vi att den genererade parafrasen ska vara semantiskt nära den ursprungliga meningen. Ett sätt att säkerställa detta är genom att lägga till begränsningar för sanna parafrasinbäddningar att vara nära och orelaterade parafraskandidatmeningar att vara långt. Detta säkerställs genom att använda en sekventiell parvis diskriminering som delar vikter med kodaren som är tränad med en lämplig förlustfunktion. Vår förlustfunktion straffar parafrasmeningar som inbäddar avstånd från att vara för stora. Denna förlust används i kombination med ett sekventiellt encoder-dekoder nätverk. Vi validerade även vår metod genom att utvärdera erhållna inbäddningar för en sentimentalanalys uppgift. Den föreslagna metoden resulterar i semantiska inbäddningar och överträffar det senaste inom parafrasgenerering och sentimentalanalys på standarddataset. Dessa resultat har också visat sig vara statistiskt signifikanta.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வாக்கு-மட்டத்தை பெறுவதற்கு ஒரு முறையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். வார்த்தை - மட்டத்தை பாதுகாப்பான பிரச்சினை சொற்றொடர் உருவாக்கும் பணியை தீர்வு செய்யும் பொருளில் எளிய முறையால் இது பெறுகிறது. பின்வரும் குறியீட்டு மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி அளபுருவை உருவாக்க, உருவாக்கப்பட்ட சொற்றொடர் மூலத்தின் வாக்கியத்திற்கு அரைப்புரி உண்மையான சொற்றொடர் உள்ளடக்கங்களுக்கான கட்டுப்பாடுகளை சேர்க்க ஒரு வழியாக இருக்கும் மற்றும் முடியாத சொற்றொடர் வாக்கியை தூரத்தில்  பின்வரும் ஜோடி விளக்கமான பீர்ப்பாளரை பயன்படுத்தி இது பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படுகிறது இது பொருத்தமான இழப்பு செயல்பாட்டில் பயி எங்கள் இழப்பு செயல்பாடு மிகவும் பெரியதாக இருக்கும் வாக்கியத்தை சுருக்குகிறது. பின்வரும் குறியீட்டாளர் பிணையத்துடன் இந்த இழப்பு பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. நாங்கள் ஒரு உணர்வு ஆராய்வு செய்யும் செயலை மதிப்பிடுவதற்காக எங்கள் முறைமையை சரிபார்த்தோம். பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் semantic உள்ளடக்கங்களை வெளியேற்றுகிறது மற்றும் சொற்றொடர் உருவாக்கி மற்றும் உணர்வு ஆராய்வு செயல்பாடு இய இந்த முடிவுகள் புள்ளிவிவரமாக முக்கியமானதாக காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ جماعت سطح انڈینگ حاصل کریں۔ While the problem of securing word-level embeddings is very well studied, we propose a new method for obtaining sentence-level embeddings. یہ ایک ساده طریقہ سے پارافریز نسل کا کام حل کرنے کے لئے حاصل ہوتا ہے. اگر ہم پارافریز پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک سکنویل اکوڈر ڈیکوڈر موڈل استعمال کریں تو ہم چاہتے ہیں کہ پیدا کیا گیا پارافریز اصلی جماعت کے قریب ہو۔ یہ ایک طریقہ ہے کہ اسے مطمئن کرنے کے لئے سچا پارافریز امڈینگ کے لئے محدودیت اضافہ کریں کہ نزدیک اور بے ربط پارافریز کڈینڈیٹ جماعت امڈینگ دور ہو جائیں۔ یہ ایک دوسرے طریقے سے تقسیم کرنے والے کے ذریعہ مطابق مضبوط ہے جو اس کوڈر کے ساتھ وزن شریک کرتا ہے جو ایک مناسب خسارہ کے کام سے تعلیم کی جاتی ہے ہماری خسارہ فنقش کو بہت بڑی ہونے سے پارافریز جماعت کی سزا دیتی ہے۔ یہ خسارہ ایک سئکوئندر ڈیکوڈر نیٹ ورک کے ساتھ استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو بھی ایک احساس تحلیل کے کام کے لئے حاصل کئے ہوئے ایمبڈینگ کا ارزش کر دیا۔ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ سیمنٹی ایمبندینگ کے نتیجے ہیں اور استاندارڈ ڈیٹسٹ پر پارافریز پیدا کرنے اور احساسات تحلیل کے کام پر استعمال کرتا ہے. یہ نتیجے بھی منحصار طور پر اہم ہیں۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz gapning darajasini olib tashlash usulini talab qilamiz. Keyin soʻzning darajasini ajratish muammolari juda yaxshi o'qindi, biz so'zning darajasini olib tashlash uchun novel usulini tahrirlash. This is obtained by a simple method in the context of solving the paraphrase generation task.  Agar biz bir xil maxfiy soʻzni yaratish uchun kodlash usulini foydalanishni istaysizki, biz yaratilgan paraphrasning asl soʻzda semantik yaqinligi mumkin. Buni tasdiqlash uchun haqiqiqiy paraphrasning tarkibini qoʻshish usuli yordam berish va notoʻgʻri paraphrasning bir so'zlari uzoq bo'lishi mumkin. Bu qoʻshimcha qoʻshish funksiyasi bilan o'rganish qoidadan bir xil xil ajratuvchidan foydalanish mumkin. Bizning yo'qotgan funksiyamiz juda katta bo'lmagan imkoniyatini paraphras qiladi. Name Biz o'zimizni o'zgartirish vazifasini qidirish uchun o'zgarishga haqiqiqiy beramiz. Name Bu natijalar statistika muhim bo'lishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp để đạt được sự nhúng tay. Trong khi vấn đề được nghiên cứu rất kỹ về sự nhúng vào từ cấp độ, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới để đạt được sự nhúng vào mức án. Đây là cách đơn giản để giải quyết công việc sản xuất tập ảnh. Nếu chúng ta sử dụng một mô hình mã hóa nối tiếp để tạo ra diễn văn, chúng ta muốn các diễn văn được tạo ra gần với câu gốc. Một cách để đảm bảo điều này là thêm những giới hạn cho sự hiểu biết chân thành của sự sắp xếp sắp đặt gần gũi và sự hiểu biết không liên quan đến việc ghép câu chữ. Điều này được đảm bảo bằng cách sử dụng một người phân biệt các cặp nối tiếp chia vật nặng với bộ mã hóa được huấn luyện với chức năng mất mát thích hợp. Bộ phận mất mát của chúng tôi phạt bằng cách diễn giải cách cắt khoảng cách với quá lớn. Sự mất mát này được sử dụng cùng với một mạng lưới mã hóa nối tiếp. Chúng tôi cũng xác nhận phương pháp này bằng cách đánh giá sự nhúng tay của dự án phân tích cảm xúc. Phương pháp được đề nghị dẫn đến sự tác động theo ngữ pháp và hoàn thành công việc tối tân về phân tích tâm lý học tập tin tiêu chuẩn. Những kết quả này cũng được cho thấy có tính to án quan trọng.', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi en metode til at opnå sætningsniveau embeddings. Mens problemet med at sikre indlejringer på ordniveau er meget godt undersøgt, foreslår vi en ny metode til at opnå indlejringer på sætningsniveau. Dette opnås ved en enkel metode i forbindelse med løsning af parafrasegenereringsopgaven. Hvis vi bruger en sekventiel encoder-dekoder model til at generere parafrase, vil vi gerne have, at den genererede parafrase er semantisk tæt på den oprindelige sætning. En måde at sikre dette på er ved at tilføje begrænsninger for sande parafraseindlejringer til at være tæt og uafhængige parafraseindlejringer til at være langt væk. Dette sikres ved hjælp af en sekventiel parvis diskriminering, der deler vægt med encoderen, der er trænet med en passende tabsfunktion. Vores tabsfunktion straffer parafrase sætning, der indlejrer afstande fra at være for store. Dette tab anvendes i kombination med et sekventielt encoder-dekoder netværk. Vi validerede også vores metode ved at evaluere de opnåede indlejringer til en sentiment analyseopgave. Den foreslåede metode resulterer i semantiske indlejringer og overgår den nyeste opgave med parafrasegenerering og sentiment analyse på standard datasæt. Disse resultater er også vist at være statistisk signifikante.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме метод за получаване на вграждания на ниво изречение. Докато проблемът със сигурността на вграждането на думи е много добре проучен, ние предлагаме нов метод за получаване на вграждания на ниво изречение. Това се получава чрез прост метод в контекста на решаването на задачата за генериране на парафрази. Ако използваме модел последователен кодер-декодер за генериране на парафраза, бихме искали генерираната парафраза да бъде семантично близка до първоначалното изречение. Един от начините да се гарантира това е чрез добавяне на ограничения за вграждането на истински парафрази да бъде близко, а несвързаните парафрази за вграждането на изречения за кандидат да бъдат далеч. Това се осигурява чрез използване на последователен двоен дискриминатор, който споделя тежести с кодера, който е обучен с подходяща функция за загуба. Нашата функция за загуба наказва парафразата присъда, вграждаща дистанция от прекалено големи. Тази загуба се използва в комбинация с последователна кодер-декодерна мрежа. Също така валидирахме метода си чрез оценка на получените вграждания за задача за анализ на сентимента. Предложеният метод води до семантични вграждания и превъзхожда най-съвременните в задачата за генериране на парафрази и анализ на сентимента върху стандартни набори от данни. Тези резултати също са показани като статистически значими.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we een methode voor om insluitingen op zinsniveau te verkrijgen. Hoewel het probleem van het beveiligen van embeddings op woordniveau zeer goed bestudeerd is, stellen we een nieuwe methode voor het verkrijgen van embeddings op zinsniveau voor. Dit wordt verkregen door een eenvoudige methode in de context van het oplossen van de parafrase generatie taak. Als we een sequentieel encoder-decodermodel gebruiken voor het genereren van parafrase, willen we dat de gegenereerde parafrase semantisch dicht bij de oorspronkelijke zin staat. Een manier om dit te garanderen is door beperkingen toe te voegen voor echte parafraseinsluitingen om dicht te zijn en niet-gerelateerde parafraseinsluitingen voor kandidaat-zinnen om ver te zijn. Dit wordt gewaarborgd door het gebruik van een sequentiële tweevoudige discriminator die gewichten deelt met de encoder die is getraind met een geschikte verliesfunctie. Onze verliesfunctie bestraft parafraserende zinnen die afstanden bevatten van te groot zijn. Dit verlies wordt gebruikt in combinatie met een sequentieel encoder-decoder netwerk. We hebben onze methode ook gevalideerd door de verkregen embeddings te evalueren voor een sentimentanalysetaak. De voorgestelde methode resulteert in semantische embeddingen en overtreft de state-of-the-art op de parafrase generatie en sentimentanalyse taak op standaard datasets. Deze resultaten zijn ook statistisch significant.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu za dobivanje ugrađenja na razini rečenica. Iako je problem osiguranja integracija na razini riječi vrlo dobro proučena, predlažemo novu metodu za dobivanje integracija na razini rečenica. To je dobijeno jednostavnim metodom u kontekstu rješavanja zadataka generacije parafraze. Ako koristimo sekvencijski model kodera-dekodera za proizvedenje parafraze, želimo da proizvedena parafraza bude semantički blizu originalne rečenice. Jedan način za osiguranje ovoga je dodavanje ograničenja za stvarne parafraze da budu blizu i da budu daleko uključene kandidatne rečenice. To je osigurano koristeći sekvencijski diskriminaciju na parovima koji dijeli težinu sa koderom koji je obučen odgovarajućim funkcijama gubitka. Naša funkcija gubitka kazni parafrazu koja uključuje udaljenost od prevelikog. Ovaj gubitak se koristi u kombinaciji s sekvencijalnom mrežom kodera-dekodera. Također smo potvrdili svoju metodu procjenjivanjem nabavljenih uloga za zadatak analize osjećaja. Predložena metoda rezultira semantičkim ugrađenjima i iznosi stanje umjetnosti na zadatak generacije parafraza i analize osjećaja na standardnim podacima. Ovi rezultati također pokazuju da su statistički značajni.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Methode vor, um Einbettungen auf Satzebene zu erhalten. Während das Problem der Sicherung von Einbettungen auf Wortebene sehr gut untersucht ist, schlagen wir eine neue Methode vor, um Einbettungen auf Satzebene zu erhalten. Dies wird durch eine einfache Methode im Rahmen der Lösung der Paraphrasengenerationsaufgabe erreicht. Wenn wir ein sequenzielles Encoder-Decoder-Modell zur Erzeugung von Paraphrasen verwenden, möchten wir, dass die generierte Paraphrase semantisch nah am ursprünglichen Satz ist. Eine Möglichkeit, dies zu gewährleisten, besteht darin, Einschränkungen hinzuzufügen, damit echte Paraphrasen-Einbettungen nahe und nicht verwandte Paraphrasen-Kandidatensatzeinbettungen weit entfernt sind. Dies wird durch den Einsatz eines sequenziellen paarweisen Diskriminators sichergestellt, der Gewichte mit dem Encoder teilt, der mit einer geeigneten Verlustfunktion trainiert ist. Unsere Verlustfunktion bestraft paraphrasierte Sätze, die Distanzen von zu groß einbetten. Dieser Verlust wird in Kombination mit einem sequentiellen Encoder-Decoder-Netzwerk verwendet. Außerdem validierten wir unsere Methode, indem wir die erhaltenen Einbettungen für eine Sentiment-Analyse auswerten. Die vorgeschlagene Methode führt zu semantischen Einbettungen und übertrifft den Stand der Technik bei der Paraphrasenerzeugung und Stimmungsanalyse auf Standarddatensätzen. Diese Ergebnisse sind auch statistisch signifikant.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode untuk mendapatkan penerbangan tingkat kalimat. Sementara masalah mengamankan embedding tingkat kata-kata dipelajari dengan sangat baik, kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk mendapatkan embedding tingkat kalimat. Ini diperoleh dengan metode sederhana dalam konteks penyelesaian tugas generasi parafrasa. If we use a sequential encoder-decoder model for generating paraphrase, we would like the generated paraphrase to be semantically close to the original sentence.  Salah satu cara untuk memastikan ini adalah dengan menambah batas untuk penyampaian parafrasa sejati yang dekat dan tidak berhubungan dengan penyampaian kalimat kandidat yang jauh. Ini dijamin dengan menggunakan diskriminator sekuensial sepasang yang berbagi berat dengan koder yang dilatih dengan fungsi kehilangan yang sesuai. Fungsi kehilangan kita menghukum kalimat parafrasa memasukkan jarak dari terlalu besar. Kehilangan ini digunakan dalam kombinasi dengan jaringan pengekode-dekoder sekuensial. We also validated our method by evaluating the obtained embeddings for a sentiment analysis task.  Metode yang diusulkan mengakibatkan penerbangan semantis dan melampaui batas terbaik pada generasi parafrasa dan tugas analisis sentimen pada set data standar. Hasil ini juga menunjukkan statistik signifikan.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک روش پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم برای دریافت سطح جمله\u200cها. در حالی که مشکل حفاظت کردن ابتدایی\u200cهای سطح کلمه بسیار خوب مطالعه می\u200cشود، ما یک روش جدید برای دریافت ابتدایی\u200cهای سطح جمله پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. این به وسیله یک روش ساده در محیط حل کار تولید فرجمه دریافت می\u200cشود. اگر از یک مدل رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی سفارشی برای تولید پارافریز استفاده کنیم، ما می\u200cخواهیم که پارافریز تولید شده به طور متعادل نزدیک به جمله اصلی باشد. یک راهی برای مطمئن کردن این است با افزایش محدودیت برای محدودیت\u200cهای پارافراز واقعی که محدودیت\u200cهای پارافراز نزدیک و بی\u200cارتباط محدودیت جمله\u200cهای کاندیده\u200cای که دور باشند. این از طریق استفاده از یک جدا کننده با جفت\u200cهای سفارشی که وزن\u200cها را با کودهر که با عملکرد زیانکاری مناسب آموزش داده می\u200cشود، سفارش می\u200cکند. عملکرد زیادی از دست دادن ما مجازات مجازات کلمه\u200cای را می\u200cکند که فاصله\u200cهای زیادی بزرگ است. این خسارت در ترکیب با شبکه\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی رمز\u200cدهنده\u200cی سفارش استفاده می\u200cشود. ما همچنین روش خودمان را با ارزیابی ارزیابی پیدا کرده\u200cایم برای یک کار تحلیل احساسات. روش پیشنهاد به عنوان انجمن\u200cهای semantic resultates in semantic embedding and outperforms the state-of-the-art on the paraphrase generation and sentiment analysis task on standard datasets. این نتیجه\u200cها همچنین نشان داده می\u200cشوند که در آمریکا مهم است.', 'ko': '본문에서 우리는 문장급의 삽입을 얻는 방법을 제시했다.단어급 삽입의 안전 문제는 이미 좋은 연구를 받았지만, 우리는 문장급 삽입을 얻는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.이것은 해석 생성 임무를 해결하는 간단한 방법을 통해 실현된 것이다.만약에 우리가 순서 인코더-디코더 모형을 사용하여 해석을 생성한다면 우리는 생성된 해석이 의미적으로 원시 문장에 가깝기를 바란다.이 점을 확보하는 방법은 관련 해석 후보 문장이 아닌 진정한 해석을 접근하는 데 제한을 두는 것이다.이것은 사용 순서를 쌍감별기로 나누어 확보하는 것으로, 이 감별기는 적당한 손실 함수를 사용하여 훈련하는 인코더와 공유권을 가진다.우리의 손실 함수는 해석 문장의 삽입 거리가 너무 크다는 것을 징벌할 것이다.이런 손실은 순서 인코더 - 디코더 네트워크와 결합하여 사용된다.우리는 정서 분석 임무에서 얻은 삽입을 평가함으로써 우리의 방법을 검증하기도 한다.제시된 방법은 의미의 삽입을 실현할 수 있고 표준 데이터 집합의 해석 생성과 감정 분석 임무에서 최신 기술보다 우수하다.이런 결과는 통계학적으로도 현저성을 가지고 있다.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda sözlem derejesi içeren bir yöntem teklip edýäris Sözler derejesi bolmagyň kynçylygy örän gowy okalýan bolsa, sözlem derejesi bolmagy üçin bir täze yöntemi teklip edýäris. Bu parafraz döredijilik işini çözmek üçin basit bir yöntem tarapyndan berilýär. Eger biz parafraze janlaşdyrmak üçin yz bir ködleme kodlemek modelini ullasak, önlenen parafraze özüniň özüniň sözleriň ýakynda bolmagy islärdik. Bunu saýlamak üçin bir ýoly saýlaw parafraz eklemek üçin gadyrak we uzaklanmadyk parafraz eklemek üçin gadyrak ekleýändir. Bu ýerde gowy ýitirmek üçin bilinç bir diskriminatçy bilen pikirlenýän koder bilen pikirlenýän bir diskriminatçy ulanarak garaşylýar. Biziň ýok funksiýamyz gaty uly bolmakdan parafraze sözlemi çykarýar Bu ýitişik ýazmak üçin bir ýagdaýlaşdyrma a ňla ullanýar Biz hem öz yönümizi duýgulam analyzasynda alan integralary çykyp bardyk. Önerlenen yöntem semantik saklanmalaryň içine netijesi bar we parafraz döredişi we duýgular çözümleriniň durumyny standart veri setirlerinde çykarýar. Bu netijeler statistiki wajypdyr.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n metode vir die verkry van sin-vlak inbettings. Terwyl die probleem van die seker van woord-vlak inbêdings is baie goed studieer, voorstel ons 'n nuwe metode vir die verkry van setvlak inbêdings. Hierdie word verkry deur 'n eenvoudige metode in die konteks van die oplossing van die parafrase generasie taak. As ons 'n sekwensiele enkoder-dekoder model gebruik om parafrase te genereer, sou ons hou van die genereerde parafrase om semantiese naby te wees aan die oorspronklike seting. Een manier om hierdie te verseker is deur beheinings vir waar parafrase inbêding te voeg om toe te wees en onverwante parafrase kandidate setinge te voeg om ver te wees. Hierdie is verseker deur 'n volgende paar wyse diskrimineerder te gebruik wat gewigte deel met die enkoder wat onderwerp is met 'n geskikte verlies funksie. Ons verlies funksie penaliseer parafrase seting wat binne afstande van te groot te wees. Hierdie verlies word gebruik in kombinasie met 'n volgende enkoder- dekodernetwerk. Ons het ook ons metode gevaliseer deur die aangeneem inbettings te evalueer vir 'n sentimentanaliseerde taak. Die voorgestelde metode resultaat in semantiese inbettings en uitvoer die state-of-the-art op die parafrase generasie en sentimentanaliseerde taak op standaard datastelle. Hierdie resultate is ook vertoon om statistiese betekening te wees.", 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya kupata viwango vya hukumu. Wakati tatizo la kuhakikisha maeneo ya kiwango cha maneno yanasomwa vizuri, tunapendekeza njia ya kisasa ya kupata viwango vya hukumu. Hii inapatikana na njia rahisi katika muktadha wa kutatua kazi ya kizazi chake. Kama tunatumia muundo wa kodi kwa ajili ya kutengeneza upinzani, tunapenda mtazamo uliotengenezwa kuwa karibu na hukumu ya awali. Njia moja ya kuhakikisha hili ni kwa kuongeza vikwazo vya upinzani wa ukweli wa upinzani ili kuwa karibu na upinzani wa upinzani wa mgombea usio na maana yanaingia hukumu ya mbali. Hii inahakikishwa kwa kutumia ubaguzi wa pili wenye akili wa mfululizo ambao unasambaza mizigo kwa mfululizo wa kupoteza. Our loss function penalizes paraphrase sentence embedding distances from being too large.  Tatizo hili limetumika kwa kuunganisha na mtandao wa kodi-decodir wa mfululizo. Pia tulithibitisha mbinu yetu kwa kutathmini maeneo yaliyopata kwa ajili ya uchambuzi wa hisia. Utawala huu unapendekezwa unasababisha mabadiliko ya kimapenzi na kutengeneza hali ya sanaa juu ya uzalishaji wa kizazi na uchambuzi wa hisia katika seti za data za kawaida. Matokeo haya pia yanaonekana kuwa ni muhimu wa takwimu.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք նախադասության մակարդակի ներգրավման մեթոդ: Մինչդեռ բառի մակարդակի ներդրումների ապահովության խնդիրը շատ լավ ուսումնասիրում է, մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր մեթոդ նախադասության մակարդակի ներդրումների ստանալու համար: Սա ստացվում է պարզ մեթոդի միջոցով պարաֆրեզի ստեղծման խնդրի լուծման կոնտեքստում: Եթե մենք օգտագործենք հաջորդական կոդեր-կոդեր մոդել պարաֆրեզի ստեղծման համար, մենք ցանկանում ենք, որ ստեղծված պարաֆրեզին սեմանտիկ մոտ լինի սկզբնական նախադասության: One way to ensure this is by adding constraints for true paraphrase embeddings to be close and unrelated paraphrase candidate sentence embeddings to be far.  Սա վստահվում է, օգտագործելով զույգչային հատուկ խտրականություն, որը կիսում է կշիռը կոդավորի հետ, որը պատրաստված է կորստի համապատասխան ֆունկցիաներով: Մեր կորստի ֆունկցիան դատապարտում է պարաֆրեզ նախադասությունը, որը ներառում է չափազանց մեծ լինելու հեռավորությունները: Այս կորստը օգտագործվում է հաջորդական կոդերի ցանցի հետ: Մենք նաև ստուգեցինք մեր մեթոդը՝ գնահատելով զգացմունքների վերլուծության խնդիրների ստացած ներդրումները: Առաջարկված մեթոդը հանգեցնում է սեմանտիկ ներդրումներին և արտադրում է պարաֆրեզի ստեղծման և զգացմունքների վերլուծության վերաբերյալ ստանդարտ տվյալների համակարգերի առաջադրանքը: Այս արդյունքները նաև վիճակագրական կարևոր են:', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një metodë për të marrë përfshirje në nivelin e dënimeve. Ndërsa problemi i sigurimit të përfshirjeve në nivelin e fjalëve është studiuar shumë mirë, ne propozojmë një metodë të re për të marrë përfshirje në nivelin e fjalëve. Kjo arrihet me një metodë të thjeshtë në kontekstin e zgjidhjes së detyrës së gjenerimit të parafrazave. If we use a sequential encoder-decoder model for generating paraphrase, we would like the generated paraphrase to be semantically close to the original sentence.  Një mënyrë për të siguruar këtë është duke shtuar kufizime për përfshirjet e parafrazëve të vërteta që të jenë të afërta dhe përfshirjet e parafrazës kandidate që të jenë të largëta. Kjo është e siguruar duke përdorur një diskriminues sekuencues për dy palë që ndan peshat me koduesin që është trajnuar me një funksion të përshtatshëm humbjeje. Funksioni ynë i humbjes penalizon parafrazën duke përfshirë distanca nga të jenë shumë të mëdha. Kjo humbje përdoret në kombinim me një rrjet sekuencial kodues-dekoder. Ne gjithashtu vlerësuam metodën tonë duke vlerësuar përfshirjet e fituara për një detyrë analize të ndjenjave. Metoda e propozuar rezulton në përfshirje semantike dhe ekziston më së miri në gjenerimin e parafrazave dhe detyrën e analizës së ndjenjave në grupet standarde të të dhënave. Këto rezultate tregohen gjithashtu se janë statistikisht të rëndësishme.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, cümlələr səviyyəsini almaq üçün bir yol təklif edirik. Sözlük səviyyəsini təhlükəsizləmə problemi çox gözəl təhsil edilirsə də, sözlər səviyyəsini almaq üçün yeni bir metod təklif edirik. Bu parafraz nəsil işini çəkmək məqsədilə basit bir yolla alındı. Əgər parafrazi yaratmaq üçün sequential kodlayıcı-dekoder modelini istifadə etsək, yaratdığımız parafrazi ilk cümləyə semantik olaraq yaxınlaşmaq istəyirik. Bunu təsdiqləmək üçün bir yol, həqiqət parafraz inşallarının yaxınlaşması və bağlı parafraz candidat sözlərinin uzaqlaşması üçün müəyyən edilməsi olaraq. Bu, uyğun zərər funksiyası ilə təhsil edilən kodlayıcı ilə a ğırlığı paylaşır. Bizim zəiflik funksiyamız parafraz sözlərini çox böyüklükdən uzaqlaşdırır. Bu zəiflik sequential kodlayıcı a ğı ilə birlikdə qullanılır. Biz həmçinin metodumuzu hiss analizi işləri üçün tapılan inbingləri təsdiqləyib etdik. Önülləşdirilmiş metod semantik in şallarına nəticə edir və standart verilən qurğular üzerində parafraz nəzəriyyəti və hisslər analizi işlərinin durumu üstün edir. Bu sonuçlar da statistik olaraq mövcuddur.', 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት፣ የፍርድ ደረጃን ለማግኘት የሥርዓት ደረጃን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የቃላት-ደረጃ ግንኙነት መግለጫ ሲያስተምሩ ጉዳይ በጣም መልካም ነው፣ የሥርዓት ደረጃን ለመቀበል የኖረብ ልማድ እናስጀጋለን፡፡ ይህንን የተገኘው አቀላል የፊደል ትውልድ ትውልድ ስራ በመፍታት ውስጥ የተገኘ ነው፡፡ የፊደል ቃላትን ለመፍጠር የሚቀጥለው የፊደል ኮድ-ዴክዶር model ብናስቀምጥ፣ የፍጥረት paraphrase መጀመሪያው ቃላት በአስተናጋሚ ቅርብ እንዲሆን እንፈልጋለን፡፡ One way to ensure this is by adding constraints for true paraphrase embeddings to be close and unrelated paraphrase candidate sentence embeddings to be far.  ይህ በተግባር የሳራ ክፍል በተማራው የሆኑትን የዓይነቱ ዓይነት-ጥበበኛ እና አዋቂዎችን በመቀበል ይታሰናበታል፡፡ የጥፋታችን ስርዓት ከታናሽ ትልቅ እንዳይሆን የፋራፊውን ፍርድ ያፈርሳል፡፡ ይህ ጉዳይ በተጠቃሚ የencoder-decoder መረብ ይጠቀማል። የተገኘውን የስሜት አካሄዱን በማስተዋል የሥርዓታችንን ሥርዓት አረጋገጥን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የስሜንቲካ አካባቢዎች እና የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት በጽሑፍ ትውልድ እና የስሜት ትምህርት ትምህርት በማድረግ የዳታ ማተሚያ ስራ ይደረጋል፡፡ እነዚህ ፍሬዎች በstatistically significant ናቸው፡፡', 'bn': 'In this paper, we propose a method for obtaining sentence-level embeddings.  যেখানে শব্দ-স্তরের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিষয়গুলো নিশ্চিত করার সমস্যা খুব ভালো গবেষণা করা হয়েছে, আমরা শাস্তি স্তরের বিভিন্ন ভাবে  প্যারাফ্রেস প্রজন্মের কাজ সমাধানের ক্ষেত্রে একটি সহজ পদ্ধতি দ্বারা এটি পাওয়া যায়। প্যারাফ্রেস তৈরি করার জন্য আমরা যদি পরবর্তীকালীন এনকোডার-ডেকোডার মডেল ব্যবহার করি, তাহলে আমরা চাই যে তৈরি প্যারাফ্রেস প্যারাফ্রেসের এটা নিশ্চিত করার একটি উপায় যাতে সত্যিকারের প্যারাফ্রেসের বাধা যোগ করে কাছাকাছি এবং অবৈধ প্রার্থীর প্রার্থীর বাক্য অনেক দূরে থাকার এই বিষয়টি নিশ্চিত করা হচ্ছে যে পরবর্তী জোড়া বৈষম্য ব্যবহার করে যা কোডারের মাধ্যমে ওজন শেয়ার করে যা সঠিক ক্ষতির কারণে প্রশিক্ষণ প আমাদের ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত ফাংশন অনেক বড় থাকার দূরত্বে প্যারাফ্রেসের বাক্য প্রতিশোধ করে। এই ক্ষতিটি পরবর্তী এনকোডার- ডেকোডার নেটওয়ার্ক সহযোগিতায় ব্যবহৃত। আমরা অনুভূতি বিশ্লেষণের কাজের জন্য প্রাপ্ত বিশ্লেষণের মাধ্যমে আমাদের পদ্ধতি বৈধ করেছি। প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির ফলে সেমান্টিক বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন প্রজন্ম এবং স্ট্যান্ডার্ড ডাটাসেটের বিশ্লেষণ কর্মসূচীর উপর প্যারাফ্রেস প্র এই ফলাফল পরিসংখ্যানে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu za dobivanje ugrađenja na nivou kazne. Iako je problem osiguranja integracija na nivou riječi vrlo dobro proučena, predlažemo novu metodu za dobivanje integracija na nivou rečenica. To je dobijeno jednostavnim metodom u kontekstu rješavanja zadataka generacije parafraze. Ako koristimo sekvencijski model kodera-dekodera za stvaranje parafraze, željeli bismo da stvorena parafraza bude semantički blizu originalne rečenice. Jedan način za osiguranje ovoga je dodajući ograničenja za prave parafraze da budu blizu i da bi se uključivali uključivanje kandidatske kazne. To se osigurava koristeći sekvencijski diskriminaciju na parovima koji dijeli težinu sa koderom koji je obučen odgovarajućim funkcijama gubitka. Naša funkcija gubitka kazni parafrazu koja uključuje udaljenost od prevelikog. Ovaj gubitak se koristi u kombinaciji sa sekvencijalnom mrežom kodera. Također smo potvrdili svoju metodu procjenjivanjem nabavljenih ugradnji za zadatak analize osjećaja. Predložena metoda rezultira semantičkim ugrađenjima i iznosi stanje umjetnosti na zadatak generacije parafraze i analize osjećanja na standardnim podacima. Ovi rezultati također pokazuju da su statistički značajni.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, proposem un mètode per obtenir incorporacions a nivell de frases. Mentre el problem a de garantir incorporacions de nivell de paraules està molt estudiat, proposem un mètode nou per obtenir incorporacions de nivell de frases. Això es obté amb un mètode senzill en el context de resoldre la tasca de generació de parafrases. Si utilitzem un model seqüencial de codificador-decoder per generar parafrases, volíem que la parafrase generada sigui semànticament propera de la frase original. Una manera d'assegurar-ho és afegint restriccions per a que les incorporacions de parafrases reals siguin estretes i no relacionades amb les incorporacions de parafrases candidates siguin lluny. Això s'assegura utilitzant un discriminador secuencial per parell que comparteix pes amb el codificador que està entrenat amb una funció adequada de pèrdua. La nostra funció de pèrdua penalitza la frase de parafrases que inclou distàncies de ser massa grans. Aquesta pèrdua s'utilitza en combinació amb una xarxa seqüencial de codificadors. També vam validar el nostre mètode evaluant les incorporacions obtenides per a una tasca d'anàlisi del sentiment. El mètode proposat resulta en incorporacions semàntiques i supera l'última tasca de generació de parafrases i anàlisi de sentiments en conjunts de dades estandards. Aquests resultats també són estadísticament significatius.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme metodu pro získání větových vložení. Zatímco problém zabezpečení vložení na úrovni slova je velmi dobře studován, navrhujeme novou metodu pro získání vložení na úrovni věty. To je získáno jednoduchou metodou v kontextu řešení úlohy generování parafráze. Pokud pro generování parafráze používáme sekvenční kodér-dekodér model, chceme, aby generovaná parafráze byla sémanticky blízká původní větě. Jedním ze způsobů, jak to zajistit, je přidání omezení pro skutečné vložení parafráze, aby bylo blízké a nesouvisející vložení kandidátů parafráze, aby bylo daleko. To je zajištěno použitím sekvenčního párového diskriminátoru, který sdílí hmotnost s snímačem, který je trénován s vhodnou ztrátovou funkcí. Naše ztrátová funkce penalizuje parafrázovanou větu zahrnující vzdálenost od příliš velké. Tato ztráta se používá v kombinaci s sekvenční sítí kodéru-dekodéru. Naši metodu jsme rovněž ověřili vyhodnocením získaných vložení pro úlohu sentimentové analýzy. Navržená metoda vede k sémantickému vkládání a překonává nejmodernější úlohu generování parafráz a analýzy sentimentů na standardních datových sadách. Tyto výsledky jsou rovněž statisticky významné.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume välja meetodi lausetaseme manustamiseks. Kuigi sõnatasemel manustamise tagamise probleemi on väga hästi uuritud, pakume välja uue meetodi lausetasemel manustamise saamiseks. See saadakse lihtsa meetodiga parafraasi genereerimise ülesande lahendamise kontekstis. Kui me kasutame parafraasi genereerimiseks järjestikust kodeerija-dekooderi mudelit, soovime, et genereeritud parafraas oleks semantiliselt lähedane algsele lausele. Üks võimalus selle tagamiseks on lisada piirangud tõelisele parafraasi manustamisele lähedaseks ja mitteseotud parafraasi kandidaadi lause manustamisele kaugemaks. Selle tagamiseks kasutatakse järjestikust paari diskrimineerijat, mis jagab kaalu sobiva kaotusfunktsiooniga treenitud kodeerijaga. Meie kaotusfunktsioon karistab parafraasilauset, mis hõlmab kaugust liiga suurest olemisest. Seda kadu kasutatakse kombinatsioonis järjestikuse kodeerija-dekooderi võrguga. Samuti valideerisime oma meetodit, hinnates saadud manustamisi sentimentaalüüsi ülesandeks. Kavandatud meetod annab tulemuseks semantilise manustamise ja ületab standardsete andmekogumite parafraaside genereerimise ja sentimentaalüüsi ülesandeid. Need tulemused on samuti statistiliselt olulised.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme menetelmää lausetason upotusten saamiseksi. Vaikka sanatason upotusten turvaaminen on tutkittu hyvin, ehdotamme uutta menetelmää lausetason upotusten saamiseksi. Tämä saadaan yksinkertaisella menetelmällä parafraasin luontitehtävän ratkaisemisen yhteydessä. Jos käytämme sekvenssiaalista koodaaja-dekooderimallia parafraasin tuottamiseen, toivomme, että luotu parafraasi olisi semanttisesti lähellä alkuperäistä lausetta. Yksi tapa varmistaa tämä on lisätä rajoituksia sille, että todelliset parafraasiupotukset ovat läheisiä ja liittymättömät parafraasiehdokkaan lauseen upotukset ovat kaukana. Tämä varmistetaan käyttämällä sekvensaalista parikohtaista erottinta, joka jakaa painot sopivalla häviötoiminnolla koulutetun kooderin kanssa. Menetystoimintomme rankaisee lausetta, joka pitää etäisyyttä liian suurista. Tätä häviötä käytetään yhdessä sekvensaalisen kooderi-dekooderiverkon kanssa. Validoimme menetelmämme myös arvioimalla saadut upotukset tunteiden analysointitehtävään. Ehdotettu menetelmä tuottaa semanttisia upotuksia ja ylittää standardiaineistojen parafraasien luonti- ja tunneanalyysitehtävän. Näiden tulosten on myös osoitettu olevan tilastollisesti merkitseviä.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo metodo za pridobivanje stavkovnih vdelav. Medtem ko je problem zaščite besednih vdelav zelo dobro preučen, predlagamo novo metodo za pridobivanje vdelav stavkov. To je pridobljeno s preprosto metodo v kontekstu reševanja naloge generiranja parafraze. Če uporabimo model zaporednega kodirnika-dekodirnika za generiranje parafraze, želimo, da je generirana parafraza semantično blizu izvirnemu stavku. Eden od načinov za zagotovitev tega je dodajanje omejitev, da so vdelave pravih parafraz blizu, nepovezane vdelave stavkov kandidata parafraze pa daleč. To je zagotovljeno z uporabo zaporednega parnega diskriminatorja, ki deli uteži z kodirnikom, ki je usposobljen z ustrezno funkcijo izgube. Naša funkcija izgube kaznuje parafrazno kazen, ki vsebuje razdalje od prevelikega. Ta izguba se uporablja v kombinaciji z zaporednim kodirnim in dekodirnim omrežjem. Našo metodo smo potrdili tudi z oceno pridobljenih vdelav za nalogo analize sentimenta. Rezultat predlagane metode je semantična vdelava in presega najsodobnejše opravilo generiranja parafraz in analize sentimenta na standardnih naborih podatkov. Ti rezultati so tudi statistično značilni.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, muna buƙata wata hanyoyi wa ka sami cikin matsayin-daraja. A lokacin da aka jarraba masu tsari da filin-daraja da aka lissafa shi mai kyau, sai muna buƙata wani hanyor yanzu wa ka sami da tsarin sigogi-daraja. Wannan ana samar da shi da wata metode mai sauƙi cikin muhalli da za'a solve aikin kizalin parameter. If we use a sequential encoder-decoder model for generating paraphrase, we would like the generated paraphrase to be semantically close to the original sentence.  Tsarin ya wajabta wannan da za'a ƙara kanzu wa fassarar da gaskiyar da za'a rufe shi kuma a lokace maganar gourta da ba'a sãɓa ba don ya zama mai nĩsa. Wannan ana sikre shi da ya yi amfani da wani rabon nau'i biyu mai hikima guda wanda ya raba nau'i da kodkode wanda aka yi wa aikin hasara mai daidai. Ganin hasãra na zartar da maganar parameteri wanda ke cikin nĩsa mai girma. @ info: whatsthis Mun gaskata hanyoyinmu da za'a iya ƙayyade taskacin da aka samu zuwa wani aikin sanarwa. @ action: button Ana nuna wannan matsala na ƙayyade.", 'jv': 'Nang pemilit iki, kita supoyo sistem kanggo nggawe barang-layang. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Digawe politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Digawe Coverage Perintah iki dipunanggo karo tambahan koder-decoder Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé nggunian cara-cara nggawe barang nggawe barang seneng nggawe barang seneng pisan. Laptop" and "Desktop Rejalaké iki ngono warisané dadi kapan-kapan.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་སྒྲུང་རིམ་གནས་ཚུལ་ལེན་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བསམ་བྱེད། གནད་དོན་དེ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་པ་དེ་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་བདེ་འཇགས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ འདི་ལ་ཚིག་འཆར་བརྗོད་གཞིའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་བྱ་རིམ་ཞིག་གིས་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པ། གལ་ཏེ་འུ་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་རྗེས་སུ་གསལ་བཀོད་པའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བེད་སྤྱོད་དགོས་ན། ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་པ་ཞིག་བདེན་པའི་གནད་འགའ་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་རྟགས་ཁ་སྐོང་རྐྱབས་ འདི་ནི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་པའི་ཕྱོགས་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་གིས་བདེ་སྦྱོར་བའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་ཞིག་བྱས་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་རྐྱེན་འབྲས་ཀྱི་ལས་འབར་ཤིང་སྦྱར་བའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་གང་ཞིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ རྩིས་བ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྗེས་སུ་ཡོད་པའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་གཅིག་མཚུངས་པ་ཞིག་འདུག ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྟོན་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་sentiment་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་རྟོགས་བྱས། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་སྔར་སྒྲིག གྲུབ་འབྲས་འདི་དག་ལ་ཚད་རྩིས་བ་མཚུངས་ཡིན་པས་མངོན་གསལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡིན།', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטה להשיג תוספות ברמה משפטים. בעוד הבעיה של האבטחה של תוכניות ברמה מילים נלמדה היטב מאוד, אנחנו מציעים שיטה חדשה להשיג תוכניות ברמה משפטים. זה מושג באמצעות שיטה פשוטה בתוך הקשר לפתור את משימת הדורה של פראפרזיה. אם נשתמש במודל קודם-קודם רצופי לייצור פראפרזיה, אנו רוצים שהפראפרזיה המיוצרת תהיה סמנטית קרובה למשפט המקורי. One way to ensure this is by adding constraints for true paraphrase embeddings to be close and unrelated paraphrase candidate sentence embeddings to be far.  זה מובטח על ידי השימוש באמצעות דיסקרטיסט רצופי בין זוגות שמחלק משקלים עם הקודן שמתאמן עם תפקיד אובדן מתאים. פונקציית האובדן שלנו מענישה גזר משפט שמכיל מרחקים מלהיות גדולים מדי. האובדן הזה משתמש בשילוב עם רשת קודד-קודד רצינית. אנחנו גם מאשרים את השיטה שלנו על ידי הערכה של התכניות שנקבלו עבור משימה ניתוח רגשות. השיטה המוצעת תוצאת בתכניות סמנטיות ומוציאה את המצב המאודם ביותר של דור המילים ומשימת ניתוח הרגשות על קבוצות נתונים סטנדרטיים. These results are also shown to be statistically significant.'}
{'en': 'A Reassessment of Reference-Based Grammatical Error Correction Metrics', 'ar': 'إعادة تقييم مقاييس تصحيح الأخطاء النحوية المرجعية', 'es': 'Una reevaluación de las métricas de corrección de errores gramaticales basadas en referencias', 'pt': 'Uma Reavaliação das Métricas de Correção de Erros Gramaticais Baseadas em Referências', 'fr': "Réévaluation des mesures de correction d'erreurs grammaticales basées sur des références", 'ja': '参照ベースの文法的誤り訂正指標の再評価', 'zh': '盖参考之语法纠错指标重评也', 'hi': 'संदर्भ-आधारित व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार मेट्रिक्स का पुनर्मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Повторная оценка эталонных грамматических метрик коррекции ошибок', 'ga': 'Athmheasúnú ar Mhéadracht Ceartúcháin Earráidí Gramadaí Bunaithe ar Thagairt', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'A referenciaalapú nyelvtani hibakorrekciós mérések újraértékelése', 'el': 'Μια επανεξέταση των μετρήσεων διόρθωσης γραμματικών σφαλμάτων βάσει αναφοράς', 'it': 'Una rivalutazione delle metriche di correzione degli errori grammaticali basate su riferimento', 'kk': 'Сілтеме негіздеген граматикалық қате түзету метрикаларының қайталау', 'mk': 'Репроценка на метриките за корекција на граматски грешки базирани на референција', 'mt': 'Valutazzjoni mill-ġdid tal-Metriki ta’ Korrezzjoni Grammatika ta’ Żbalji bbażati fuq Referenza', 'lt': 'Atskaitos pagrindu pagrįstų gramatinių klaidų koregavimo metrikų pakartotinis vertinimas', 'ms': 'Pemeriksaan Semula Metrik Pembetulan Ralat Grammatik Berdasarkan Rujukan', 'ml': 'Reference-Based Grammatical Error Correction Metrics', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'O reevaluare a parametrilor de corectare a erorilor gramaticale bazate pe referință', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн багтаасан грамматикийн алдаа засах метр', 'sr': 'Реценсиране граматичких метрика исправи грешке на основи референције', 'pl': 'Ponowna ocena wskaźników korekcji błędów gramatycznych opartych na referencjach', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'A Reassure of Reference-Based Grammatical Error Correction Metrics', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'En omvärdering av referensbaserade grammatiska felkorrigeringsmetoder', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một đánh giá lại lỗi máy theo chương trình.', 'hr': 'Reassessment of Reference-Based Grammatical Error Correction Metrics', 'nl': 'Een herbeoordeling van referentiegebaseerde grammaticale foutcorrectiestatistieken', 'de': 'Eine Neubewertung referenzbasierter grammatischer Fehlerkorrekturkennzahlen', 'da': 'En revurdering af referencebaserede grammatiske fejlkorrektionsmålinger', 'bg': 'Преоценка на референтните базирани граматични метрици за корекция на грешки', 'id': 'A Reassessment of Reference-Based Grammatical Error Correction Metrics', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Makosoleo ya Matokeo ya Siasa ya Tamko', 'ko': '인용된 문법 오류 지표에 기초한 재평가', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një Rivlerësim i Metrikës së Korrektimit të Gabimeve Gramatikë Bazuar në Referencë', 'tr': 'References', 'az': 'Referens-Based Grammatical Hata D칲z톛ltm톛 Metricl톛rinin Yeniden Se칞m톛si', 'am': 'A Reassessment of Reference-Based Grammatical Error Correction Metrics', 'hy': 'Հետևանքների հիմնված գրամմատիկ սխալների ճշտման մետրիկայի վերագնումը', 'ca': "Una reassessió dels mètrics de correcció d'errors gramàtics basats en referències", 'cs': 'Přehodnocení referenčně založených metrik pro korekci gramatických chyb', 'bn': 'Name', 'et': 'Viitepõhiste grammatiliste vigade parandamise meetrite ümberhindamine', 'bs': 'Reassessment of Reference-Based Grammatical Error Correction Metrics', 'fi': 'Viitepohjaisten kielioppivirheiden korjausmetrien uudelleenarviointi', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar', 'sk': 'Ponovna ocena referenčnih metod za popravljanje slovničnih napak', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'A Reassessment of Reference-Based Grammatical Error Correction Metrics', 'bo': 'Reference-Based Grammatical Error Correction Metrics'}
{'en': 'Several metrics have been proposed for evaluating grammatical error correction (GEC) systems based on grammaticality, fluency, and adequacy of the output sentences. Previous studies of the correlation of these metrics with human quality judgments were inconclusive, due to the lack of appropriate significance tests, discrepancies in the methods, and choice of datasets used. In this paper, we re-evaluate reference-based GEC metrics by measuring the system-level correlations with humans on a large dataset of human judgments of GEC outputs, and by properly conducting statistical significance tests. Our results show no significant advantage of GLEU over MaxMatch (M2), contradicting previous studies that claim GLEU to be superior. For a finer-grained analysis, we additionally evaluate these metrics for their agreement with human judgments at the sentence level. Our sentence-level analysis indicates that comparing GLEU and M2, one metric may be more useful than the other depending on the scenario. We further qualitatively analyze these metrics and our findings show that apart from being less interpretable and non-deterministic, GLEU also produces counter-intuitive scores in commonly occurring test examples.', 'ar': 'تم اقتراح العديد من المقاييس لتقييم أنظمة تصحيح الأخطاء النحوية (GEC) بناءً على القواعد النحوية والطلاقة وملاءمة الجمل الناتجة. كانت الدراسات السابقة حول ارتباط هذه المقاييس بأحكام الجودة البشرية غير حاسمة ، بسبب عدم وجود اختبارات أهمية مناسبة ، والتناقضات في الأساليب ، واختيار مجموعات البيانات المستخدمة. في هذه الورقة ، نعيد تقييم مقاييس GEC المستندة إلى المراجع عن طريق قياس الارتباطات على مستوى النظام مع البشر على مجموعة بيانات كبيرة من الأحكام البشرية لمخرجات GEC ، وعن طريق إجراء اختبارات الأهمية الإحصائية بشكل صحيح. تظهر نتائجنا عدم وجود ميزة كبيرة لـ GLEU على MaxMatch (M2) ، مما يتعارض مع الدراسات السابقة التي تدعي أن GLEU متفوقة. للحصول على تحليل أدق ، نقوم أيضًا بتقييم هذه المقاييس لموافقتها مع الأحكام البشرية على مستوى الجملة. يشير تحليلنا على مستوى الجملة إلى أن مقارنة مقياس GLEU و M2 قد يكون أكثر فائدة من الآخر اعتمادًا على السيناريو. نقوم أيضًا بتحليل هذه المقاييس نوعياً وتظهر النتائج التي توصلنا إليها أنه بصرف النظر عن كونها أقل قابلية للتفسير وغير حتمية ، تنتج GLEU أيضًا درجات غير بديهية في أمثلة الاختبار الشائعة.', 'fr': "Plusieurs mesures ont été proposées pour évaluer les systèmes de correction d'erreur grammaticale (GEC) en fonction de la grammaticalité, de la fluidité et de l'adéquation des phrases de sortie. Les études précédentes sur la corrélation de ces paramètres avec les jugements de qualité humaine n'étaient pas concluantes, en raison de l'absence de tests de signification appropriés, de divergences dans les méthodes et du choix des ensembles de données utilisés. Dans cet article, nous réévaluons les métriques GEC basées sur les références en mesurant les corrélations au niveau du système avec les humains sur un vaste ensemble de données de jugements humains des résultats du GEC, et en effectuant correctement des tests de signification statistique. Nos résultats ne montrent aucun avantage significatif de la GLEU par rapport à MaxMatch (M2), contredisant les études précédentes qui prétendent que la GLEU est supérieure. Pour une analyse plus fine, nous évaluons également ces mesures pour déterminer leur accord avec les jugements humains au niveau de la phrase. Notre analyse au niveau de la phrase indique qu'en comparant GLEU et M2, une métrique peut être plus utile que l'autre selon le scénario. Nous analysons ces mesures de manière qualitative et nos résultats montrent qu'en plus d'être moins interprétables et non déterministes, la GLEU produit également des scores contre-intuitifs dans les exemples de tests courants.", 'es': 'Se han propuesto varias métricas para evaluar los sistemas de corrección de errores gramaticales (GEC) en función de la gramaticalidad, la fluidez y la adecuación de las oraciones de salida. Los estudios previos sobre la correlación de estas métricas con los juicios de calidad humana no fueron concluyentes, debido a la falta de pruebas de significación apropiadas, las discrepancias en los métodos y la elección de los conjuntos de datos utilizados. En este artículo, reevaluamos las métricas de GEC basadas en referencias midiendo las correlaciones a nivel del sistema con los humanos en un gran conjunto de datos de juicios humanos de los resultados de GEC y realizando correctamente pruebas de significación estadística. Nuestros resultados no muestran ninguna ventaja significativa de la GLEU sobre MaxMatch (M2), lo que contradice estudios anteriores que afirman que la GLEU es superior. Para un análisis más detallado, también evaluamos estas métricas para determinar su concordancia con los juicios humanos a nivel de sentencia. Nuestro análisis a nivel de oración indica que, al comparar GLEU y M2, una métrica puede ser más útil que la otra según el escenario. Analizamos más a fondo estas métricas de forma cualitativa y nuestros hallazgos muestran que, además de ser menos interpretables y no deterministas, la GLEU también produce puntuaciones contrarias a la intuición en ejemplos de pruebas que ocurren con frecuencia.', 'pt': 'Diversas métricas têm sido propostas para avaliar sistemas de correção de erros gramaticais (GEC) com base na gramaticalidade, fluência e adequação das sentenças de saída. Estudos anteriores da correlação dessas métricas com julgamentos de qualidade humana foram inconclusivos, devido à falta de testes de significância apropriados, discrepâncias nos métodos e escolha dos conjuntos de dados utilizados. Neste artigo, reavaliamos as métricas GEC baseadas em referência medindo as correlações em nível de sistema com humanos em um grande conjunto de dados de julgamentos humanos de saídas GEC e conduzindo adequadamente testes de significância estatística. Nossos resultados não mostram nenhuma vantagem significativa do GLEU sobre o MaxMatch (M2), contrariando estudos anteriores que afirmam que o GLEU é superior. Para uma análise mais refinada, avaliamos adicionalmente essas métricas quanto à sua concordância com julgamentos humanos no nível da sentença. Nossa análise em nível de sentença indica que comparando GLEU e M2, uma métrica pode ser mais útil que a outra dependendo do cenário. Analisamos ainda qualitativamente essas métricas e nossas descobertas mostram que, além de ser menos interpretável e não determinista, o GLEU também produz pontuações contra-intuitivas em exemplos de teste comuns.', 'ja': '文法的誤り訂正（ ＧＥＣ ）システムを評価するためのいくつかの指標が、文法性、流暢性、および出力文の妥当性に基づいて提案されている。 これらの測定基準とヒトの品質判断との相関に関する以前の研究は、適切な有意性テストの欠如、使用される方法の不一致、およびデータセットの選択のために、結論が出なかった。 本稿では， GEC出力のヒト判断の大規模なデータセット上でヒトとのシステムレベルの相関関係を測定し，統計学的有意性試験を適切に実施することにより，参照ベースのGEC指標を再評価する． 当社の結果は、MaxMatch （ M 2 ）に対するGLEUの大きな利点を示しておらず、GLEUが優れていると主張する以前の研究と矛盾しています。 より細かい分析のために、文レベルでの人間の判断との一致について、これらの指標をさらに評価します。 文レベルの分析によると、GLEUとM 2を比較すると、シナリオに応じて1つの指標が他の指標よりも有用になる可能性があります。 私たちはこれらの指標をさらに定性的に分析し、我々の調査結果は、解釈可能性が低く、非決定性であることに加えて、GLEUは一般的に発生するテスト例で直感に反するスコアも生成することを示しています。', 'zh': '已建数指标,以质语法性,流畅性输句之充分性语法纠错(GEC)统。 前此指标与人伦相关性者,究尚无定论,以乏其显著性试,法之差异,及所用数集之选。 于本文之中,GEC输大数集上测统人之相关性,正计显著性试,重评其GEC指标。 臣等论结果表明,GLEU与MaxMatch(M2)无显势,此与前言GLEU优于GLEU者相反也。 为更细粒度之论,评指标句之一致性。 吾句级分析表明,较 GLEU 与 M2,据场景之不同,一指标或更有用于一指标。 吾更定性地论此指标,吾等究结果表明,非易解非确定性之外,GLEU于常试示例中生反直觉之分。', 'hi': 'व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार (जीईसी) प्रणालियों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए कई मैट्रिक्स प्रस्तावित किए गए हैं जो व्याकरणिकता, प्रवाह और आउटपुट वाक्यों की पर्याप्तता पर आधारित हैं। मानव गुणवत्ता के फैसले के साथ इन मीट्रिक के सहसंबंध के पिछले अध्ययन अनिर्णायक थे, उचित महत्व परीक्षणों की कमी, तरीकों में विसंगतियों और उपयोग किए गए डेटासेट की पसंद के कारण। इस पेपर में, हम जीईसी आउटपुट के मानव निर्णयों के एक बड़े डेटासेट पर मनुष्यों के साथ सिस्टम-स्तर के सहसंबंधों को मापकर और सांख्यिकीय महत्व परीक्षणों को ठीक से आयोजित करके संदर्भ-आधारित जीईसी मैट्रिक्स का पुनर्मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारे परिणाम MaxMatch (M2) पर GLEU का कोई महत्वपूर्ण लाभ नहीं दिखाते हैं, जो पिछले अध्ययनों का खंडन करते हैं जो GLEU को बेहतर होने का दावा करते हैं। एक महीन-दाने वाले विश्लेषण के लिए, हम वाक्य स्तर पर मानव निर्णयों के साथ उनके समझौते के लिए इन मीट्रिक का भी मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हमारा वाक्य-स्तर विश्लेषण इंगित करता है कि GLEU और M2 की तुलना में, एक मीट्रिक परिदृश्य के आधार पर दूसरे की तुलना में अधिक उपयोगी हो सकता है। हम आगे गुणात्मक रूप से इन मैट्रिक्स का विश्लेषण करते हैं और हमारे निष्कर्ष बताते हैं कि कम व्याख्यायोग्य और गैर-नियतात्मक होने के अलावा, जीएलईयू आमतौर पर होने वाले परीक्षण उदाहरणों में काउंटर-सहज ज्ञान युक्त स्कोर भी पैदा करता है।', 'ru': 'Было предложено несколько метрик для оценки систем коррекции грамматических ошибок (GEC) на основе грамматичности, беглости и адекватности выходных предложений. Предыдущие исследования корреляции этих показателей с оценками качества человека были неубедительными из-за отсутствия соответствующих тестов значимости, расхождений в методах и выборе используемых наборов данных. В этой статье мы повторно оцениваем эталонные метрики ГЭК путем измерения корреляций на системном уровне с людьми на большом наборе данных человеческих оценок результатов ГЭК и путем надлежащего проведения тестов статистической значимости. Наши результаты не показывают существенных преимуществ GLEU по сравнению с MaxMatch (M2), что противоречит предыдущим исследованиям, которые утверждают, что GLEU превосходит. Для более точного анализа мы дополнительно оцениваем эти показатели на предмет их соответствия человеческим суждениям на уровне предложений. Наш анализ на уровне предложений показывает, что, сравнивая GLEU и M2, одна метрика может быть более полезной, чем другая, в зависимости от сценария. Мы далее качественно анализируем эти показатели, и наши выводы показывают, что, помимо того, что GLEU является менее интерпретируемым и недетерминированным, он также производит противоречивые интуитивные оценки в часто встречающихся тестовых примерах.', 'ga': 'Tá roinnt méadracht molta chun córais ceartaithe earráide gramadaí (GEC) a mheas bunaithe ar ghramadach, líofacht agus leordhóthanacht na n-abairtí aschuir. Bhí staidéir a rinneadh roimhe seo ar chomhghaolú na méadrachta seo le breithiúnais ar cháilíocht an duine neamhchinntitheach, mar gheall ar an easpa tástálacha tábhachta cuí, neamhréireachtaí sna modhanna, agus rogha na dtacar sonraí a úsáideadh. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid athmheasúnú ar mhéadracht GEC atá bunaithe ar thagairtí trí na comhghaolta ar leibhéal an chórais le daoine a thomhas ar thacar sonraí mór de bhreithiúnais daonna ar aschuir GEC, agus trí thástálacha tábhachta staidrimh a dhéanamh i gceart. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí nach bhfuil aon bhuntáiste suntasach ag GLEU thar MaxMatch (M2), rud a thagann salach ar staidéir roimhe seo a mhaíonn go bhfuil GLEU níos fearr. Le haghaidh anailíse níos míne, déanaimid meastóireacht freisin ar na méadrachtaí seo chun a gcomhaontú le breithiúnais daonna ag leibhéal na pianbhreithe. Léiríonn ár n-anailís ar leibhéal na habairte go bhféadfadh méadrach amháin a bheith níos úsáidí i gcomparáid le GLEU agus M2 ag brath ar an gcás. Déanaimid anailís cháilíochtúil bhreise ar na méadrachtaí seo agus taispeánann ár dtorthaí, seachas a bheith chomh soiléir agus neamhchinntitheach, go dtáirgeann GLEU scóir fhrithiomasach i samplaí tástála a tharlaíonn go coitianta.', 'el': 'Έχουν προταθεί αρκετές μετρήσεις για την αξιολόγηση συστημάτων διόρθωσης γραμματικών σφαλμάτων με βάση τη γραμματικότητα, την ευκρίνεια και την επάρκεια των προτάσεων εξόδου. Οι προηγούμενες μελέτες σχετικά με τη συσχέτιση αυτών των μετρήσεων με τις εκτιμήσεις ποιότητας του ανθρώπου δεν ήταν πειστικές, λόγω της έλλειψης κατάλληλων δοκιμών σημασίας, των αποκλίσεων στις μεθόδους και της επιλογής των συνόλων δεδομένων που χρησιμοποιήθηκαν. Σε αυτή την εργασία, αξιολογούμε εκ νέου τις μετρήσεις που βασίζονται σε αναφορές μετρώντας τις συσχετίσεις σε επίπεδο συστήματος με τους ανθρώπους σε ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων ανθρώπινων κρίσεων των αποτελεσμάτων της και διεξάγοντας σωστά δοκιμές στατιστικής σημασίας. Τα αποτελέσματά μας δεν δείχνουν κανένα σημαντικό πλεονέκτημα της GLEU έναντι της MaxMatch (M2), αντίθετα με προηγούμενες μελέτες που ισχυρίζονται ότι η GLEU είναι ανώτερη. Για μια λεπτομερέστερη ανάλυση, αξιολογούμε επιπλέον αυτές τις μετρήσεις για τη συμφωνία τους με τις ανθρώπινες κρίσεις στο επίπεδο ποινής. Η ανάλυση σε επίπεδο πρότασης δείχνει ότι η σύγκριση GLEU και M2, μια μέτρηση μπορεί να είναι πιο χρήσιμη από την άλλη ανάλογα με το σενάριο. Αναλύουμε περαιτέρω ποιοτικά αυτές τις μετρήσεις και τα ευρήματά μας δείχνουν ότι εκτός από το ότι είναι λιγότερο ερμηνευτές και μη ντετερμινιστικές, η GLEU παράγει επίσης αντιδιαισθητικές βαθμολογίες σε κοινά παραδείγματα δοκιμών.', 'it': "Sono state proposte diverse metriche per valutare i sistemi di correzione degli errori grammaticali (GEC) basati su grammaticalità, fluidità e adeguatezza delle frasi di output. Gli studi precedenti sulla correlazione di queste metriche con i giudizi sulla qualità umana sono stati inconcludenti, a causa della mancanza di test di significatività appropriati, delle discrepanze nei metodi e della scelta dei set di dati utilizzati. In questo articolo, rileviamo le metriche GEC basate su riferimento misurando le correlazioni a livello di sistema con gli esseri umani su un ampio set di dati di giudizi umani degli output GEC, e conducendo correttamente test di significatività statistica. I nostri risultati non mostrano alcun vantaggio significativo di GLEU rispetto a MaxMatch (M2), contraddicendo studi precedenti che affermano che GLEU è superiore. Per un'analisi più fine, valutiamo inoltre queste metriche per il loro accordo con i giudizi umani a livello di frase. La nostra analisi a livello di frase indica che confrontando GLEU e M2, una metrica può essere più utile dell'altra a seconda dello scenario. Analizziamo ulteriormente qualitativamente queste metriche e i nostri risultati mostrano che oltre ad essere meno interpretabili e non deterministici, GLEU produce anche punteggi controintuitivi in esempi di test comunemente presenti.", 'ka': 'რამდენიმე მეტრიკები განაზღვრებულია გრამიმატიკური შეცდომის შეცდომის რედაქტირება (GEC) სისტემებზე, რომელიც გრამიმატიკულობა, ფუნქცია და გამოყენებული სიტყვების მარ ამ მეტრიკის კორელეციის წინა სწორედ სწორედ ადამიანის კალიტური სწორეების შესახებ არ შეიძლებელია, რადგან სწორედ მნიშვნელოვანი ტესტის არსებობით, განსხვავებას მეტვებში და გამოყ ამ წიგნაში, ჩვენ განსაზღვრებული GEC მეტრიკის გადავუმუშავებთ სისტემის დონე კოლექციების შეზღვრებით ადამიანებთან დიდი მონაცემების GEC მონაცემების შესახებ და სტატისტიკური მნიშვნელობის ტესტის ჩვენი წარმოდგენები არ აჩვენებს მნიშვნელოვანი გამოსახულება GLEU მაxMatch (M2) ზე, რომელიც წინა წარმოდგენებული სწავლებები, რომლებიც GLEU უფრო მეტია. უკეთესი ანალიზაციისთვის, ჩვენ დამატებით ამ მეტრიკის გავაკეთებთ ადამიანის გადაწყვეტილებისთვის საკუთარი გადაწყვეტილებისთვის. ჩვენი სიტყვა-დონეზე ანალიზია, რომ GLEU და M2 შემდგომარება, ერთი მეტრიკი შეიძლება იყოს უფრო საჭიროა, ვიდრე მეორე, რომელიც სენარიოდან დააყენებული ჩვენ უფრო კვალიტატიურად ამ მეტრიკის ანალიზაციას და ჩვენი შესაძლებლობები ჩვენი შესაძლებლობების გამოყენება, რომ დამატებით უფრო ცხოვრებად და უკეთესტერისტიკის განმავლობაში, GLEU ასევე კონ', 'hu': 'Számos mutatót javasoltunk a nyelvtani hibakorrekciós (GEC) rendszerek értékelésére a kimeneti mondatok nyelvtanitása, folyékonysága és megfelelősége alapján. Ezeknek a mutatóknak az emberi minőségítélésekkel való korrelációjára vonatkozó korábbi vizsgálatok nem voltak meggyőzőek, mivel nem voltak megfelelő szignifikáns tesztek, eltérések a módszerekben és az alkalmazott adatkészletek kiválasztásában. Ebben a tanulmányban újraértékeljük a referenciaalapú GEC-méréseket az emberekkel való rendszerszintű korrelációk mérésével a GEC kimenetek humán ítéleteinek nagy adathalmazán, valamint statisztikai jelentőségi tesztek megfelelő elvégzésével. Eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a GLEU nem jelentős előnye a MaxMatch (M2) szemben, ellentmond a korábbi tanulmányoknak, amelyek szerint a GLEU felsőbbrendű. A finomabb szemű elemzéshez ezeket a mutatókat is értékeljük, hogy megegyeznek az emberi ítéletekkel a mondatszinten. A mondatszintű elemzésünk azt mutatja, hogy a GLEU és az M2 összehasonlítása a forgatókönyvtől függően az egyik mutató hasznosabb lehet, mint a másik. Minőségi szempontból elemezzük ezeket a mutatókat, és eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy a GLEU kevésbé értelmezhető és nem determinisztikus eredményeken kívül a gyakran előforduló tesztpéldákban ellenintuitív pontszámokat is készít.', 'mk': 'Неколку метрики се предложени за проценка на системите за корекција на граматичките грешки (ГЕЦ) базирани на граматичност, течност и соодветност на излезните реченици. Претходните студии за корелацијата на овие метрики со проценките за човечкиот квалитет беа незаклучливи, поради недостатокот на соодветни тестови на значење, дискрепанции во методите и изборот на употребените податоци. Во овој документ, ние повторно ги проценуваме референциските метрики на ГЕЦ со мерење на корелациите на системското ниво со луѓето на големи податоци на човечките пресуди на ГЕЦ излезите, и со соодветно спроведување на статистички тестови на значење. Нашите резултати не покажуваат значителна предност од GLEU во однос на MaxMatch (M2), спротивно на претходните студии кои тврдат дека GLEU е супериорна. За подобра анализа, додатно ги проценуваме овие метрики за нивниот договор со човечките пресуди на ниво на реченица. Нашата анализа на нивото на речениците покажува дека споредувањето на GLEU и M2, една метрика може да биде покорисна од другата во зависност од сценариото. Понатаму квалитетно ги анализираме овие метрики и нашите откритија покажуваат дека освен помалку интерпретабилни и недеterminatивни, ГЛЕУ, исто така, произведува контра-интуитивни резултати во обичните тестови примери.', 'lt': 'Buvo siūloma įvertinti gramatinių klaidų koregavimo (GEC) sistemas, grindžiamas gramatiškumu, lankstumu ir išėjimo sakinių tinkamumu. Ankstesni šių rodiklių koreliacijos su žmogaus kokybės vertinimais tyrimai buvo neišsamūs, nes nebuvo atlikti tinkami reikšmės tyrimai, metodų neatitikimai ir naudotų duomenų rinkinių pasirinkimas. Šiame dokumente iš naujo vertiname atskaitos pagrindu pagrįstus GEC metrinius rodiklius, išmatuodami sistemos lygio koreliacijas su žmonėmis remiantis dideliais žmogaus GEC rezultatų vertinimų duomenų rinkiniais ir tinkamai atliekant statistinės reikšmės tyrimus. Mūsų rezultatai rodo, kad GLEU pranašumas nėra didelis už MaxMatch (M2), prieštaraujant ankstesniems tyrimams, kurie teigia, kad GLEU yra geresnis. Siekiant geriau išnagrinėti grūdus, mes papildomai vertiname šiuos rodiklius, pagal kuriuos jie sutinka su žmogiškaisiais sprendimais bausmės lygiu. Mūsų sakinių lygio analizė rodo, kad GLEU ir M2 palyginimas gali būti naudingesnis nei kita, priklausomai nuo scenarijaus. Toliau kokybiškai analizuojame šiuos rodiklius ir mūsų išvados rodo, kad, be to, kad jie yra mažiau aiškinami ir neapibrėžti, GLEU taip pat gamina priešingus intuityvinius rezultatus dažnai pasitaikančiuose bandymų pavyzdžiuose.', 'kk': 'Грамматикалық қателерді түзету (GEC) жүйелерін бағалау үшін бірнеше метрикалық ұсынылды. Грамматикалық, жылдамдығы және шығыс сөздерінің адекватына негізделген. Бұл метрикалардың алдыңғы зерттеулері адамдардың сапаттамасының тәжірибесімен тәжірибесінің тәжірибесі, қолданылатын деректер жиындарын таңдау үшін бұл метрикалардың тәжірибесінің қатынасы Бұл қағазда, сілтеме негіздеген GEC метрикалықтарын бағалап, жүйелік деңгейіндегі адамдармен көп деректер жиындарының GEC шығысының үлкен мәліметтерін өлшеп, статистикалық маңыздылығын тексеріп жатқан. Біздің нәтижелеріміз MaxMatch (M2) арқылы GLEU-нің маңызды артықшылығын көрсетпейді. Алдыңғы зерттеулерге қарсы болып, GLEU-нің жоғары деп сұрады. Ең жақсы анализ үшін бұл метрикаларды адамдардың шешімдері деңгейінде қатынау үшін қосымша оқиға аламыз. Сөздік деңгейіндегі анализ GLEU және M2 салыстыруын көрсетеді, бір метрикалық сценариядан тәуелді біріншіден артық болуы мүмкін. Біз бұл метрикалықтарды басқа квалификациялық анализ және олардың табылған мәселелеріміздің мәселелерінде көпшілікті мәселелерде қарсы-интуитивтік нәтижелерді жасап береді.', 'ms': 'Beberapa metrik telah diusulkan untuk menilai sistem penyesuaian ralat grammatikal (GEC) berdasarkan grammatikal, keseluruhan, dan keperluan kalimat output. Penelitian terdahulu mengenai korelasi metrik ini dengan penilaian kualiti manusia tidak meyakinkan, kerana kekurangan ujian penting yang sesuai, ketidaksepadan dalam kaedah, dan pilihan set data yang digunakan. Dalam kertas ini, kita menilai semula metrik GEC berasaskan rujukan dengan mengukur korelasi aras sistem dengan manusia pada set data besar penilaian manusia terhadap output GEC, dan dengan melakukan ujian statistik yang signifikan dengan betul. Hasil kami menunjukkan tiada keuntungan yang signifikan GLEU daripada MaxMatch (M2), yang bertentangan dengan kajian terdahulu yang menyatakan GLEU lebih baik. Untuk analisis yang lebih baik, kami tambahan menilai metrik ini untuk persetujuan mereka dengan penilaian manusia pada tahap kalimat. Analisis aras kalimat kami menunjukkan bahawa membandingkan GLEU dan M2, satu metrik mungkin lebih berguna daripada yang lain bergantung pada skenario. Kami menganalisis metrik ini secara kualitatif dan penemuan kami menunjukkan bahawa selain daripada menjadi kurang boleh menerangkan dan tidak menentukan, GLEU juga menghasilkan skor anti-intuitif dalam contoh ujian yang biasa berlaku.', 'mt': 'Ġew proposti diversi metriċi għall-evalwazzjoni tas-sistemi ta’ korrezzjoni tal-iżbalji grammatiċi (GEC) ibbażati fuq il-grammatiċità, il-fluwenza u l-adegwatezza tas-sentenzi tal-ħruġ. Studji preċedenti dwar il-korrelazzjoni ta’ dawn il-metriċi ma’ sentenzi tal-kwalità tal-bniedem ma kinux konklużivi, minħabba n-nuqqas ta’ testijiet xierqa ta’ sinifikat, diskrepanzi fil-metodi, u l-għażla tas-settijiet tad-dejta użati. F’dan id-dokument, irrievalwaw il-metriċi tal-GEC ibbażati fuq referenza billi tkejlu l-korrelazzjonijiet fil-livell tas-sistema mal-bnedmin fuq sett kbir ta’ dejta ta’ sentenzi umani ta’ riżultati tal-GEC, u billi twettaq testijiet ta’ sinifikat statistiku kif suppost. Ir-riżultati tagħna ma juru l-ebda vantaġġ sinifikanti ta’ GLEU fuq MaxMatch (M2), li jikkontradixxi studji preċedenti li jiddikjaraw li GLEU huwa superjuri. Għal analiżi aktar fina, a ħna barra minn hekk ivvalutaw dawn il-metriċi għall-qbil tagħhom mas-sentenzi umani fil-livell tas-sentenza. L-analiżi tagħna fil-livell tas-sentenza tindika li t-tqabbil tal-GLEU u l-M2, metrika waħda tista’ tkun aktar utli mill-oħra skont ix-xenarju. Aħna nianalizzaw aktar b’mod kwalitattiv dawn il-metriċi u s-sejbiet tagħna juru li minbarra li huma inqas interpretabbli u mhux determinanti, il-GLEU jipproduċi wkoll punteġġi kontro-intwittivi f’eżempji ta’ testijiet li jseħħu b’mod komuni.', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാമ്മാട്ടിക്കല്\u200d തെറ്റിനുള്ള സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനായി പല മെട്രിക്കുകളും പ്രായശ്ചിത്ത Previous studies of the correlation of these metrics with human quality judgments were inconclusive, due to the lack of appropriate significance tests, discrepancies in the methods, and choice of datasets used.  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടും പരിഗണിക്കുന്ന ജിസി അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ജിസി മെറ്റിക്കുകള്\u200d വീണ്ടും പരിഗണിക്കുന്നു. ജിസി പുറത്തുള്ള ഒരു വലിയ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d മനുഷ്യര നമ്മുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മാക്സ്മാച്ചിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ജിലിയുവിന്റെ ഗുരുതരമായ ഉപകാരമൊന്നും കാണിക്കുന്നില്ല, മുമ്പുള്ള പഠ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൃത്യമായ ഒരു വിശ്വാസത്തിന് വേണ്ടി, ഈ മെട്രിക്കങ്ങള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. വാക്കിന്റെ നിലയില്\u200d  നമ്മുടെ വാക്ക് നില പരിശോധനമാണ് ഗ്ലീയുവിനെയും എം2-നെയും താല്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് തെളിയിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു മെട്രിക്ക് സി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ മെട്രിക്കങ്ങളെയും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനെയും കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങളില്\u200d സംഭവിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യക്തമ', 'pl': 'Zaproponowano kilka wskaźników oceny systemów korekcji błędów gramatycznych (GEC) opartych na gramatyczności, płynności i adekwatności zdań wyjściowych. Poprzednie badania korelacji tych wskaźników z ocenami jakości człowieka były niejednoznaczne ze względu na brak odpowiednich testów znaczenia, rozbieżności w metodach i wybór zastosowanych zbiorów danych. W niniejszym artykule dokonano ponownej oceny wskaźników GEC opartych na referencjach poprzez pomiar korelacji na poziomie systemu z ludźmi na dużym zbiorze danych ludzkich ocen wyników GEC oraz poprzez prawidłowe przeprowadzenie testów znaczenia statystycznego. Nasze wyniki nie wykazują znaczącej zalety GLEU nad MaxMatch (M2), co jest sprzeczne z poprzednimi badaniami, które twierdzą, że GLEU jest lepszy. W celu dokładniejszej analizy, dodatkowo oceniamy te wskaźniki pod kątem zgodności z osądami ludzkimi na poziomie wyroku. Nasza analiza na poziomie zdań wskazuje, że porównywanie GLEU i M2, jedna metryka może być bardziej przydatna niż druga w zależności od scenariusza. Ponadto analizujemy te wskaźniki jakościowo, a nasze wyniki pokazują, że oprócz tego, że są mniej interpretowalne i niedeterministyczne, GLEU tworzy również nieintuicyjne wyniki w powszechnie występujących przykładach testów.', 'no': 'Fleire metrikar er foreslått for å evaluera grammatiske feilrettingar (GEC) på systemet basert på grammatiske, fluktens og tilsvarande utsetningar. Førre studiar om korrelasjonen av desse metrikane med menneskelige kvalitetsprøytebrukane var inklusiv, grunn av manglene av tilgjengelege meningstestar, forskjellingar i metodane og valet av brukte datasett. I denne papiret evaluerer vi referansbaserte GEC-metrikar på nytt ved å måle systemnivåkorrelasjonane med menneske på ein stor dataset med menneske sprøytebrukar av GEC-utgåver, og ved å gjera rett statistiske betydning. Resultatet våre viser ingen betydelig fordel av GLEU over MaxMatch (M2), som mottar tidlegare studiar som tvar at GLEU er høgare. For ein finere analyse, evaluerer vi desse metrikane tillegg for samtalen med menneske sprøytebrukar på setningsnivået. Ved setningsnivået viser at sammenligning av GLEU og M2 kan ein metrisk vera nyttig enn den andre avhengig av scenarioen. Vi analyserer meir kvalitativ desse metrikane og finningane våre viser at, unntatt å vera mindre tolkbare og ikkje-deterministisk, GLEU produserer også kontraintuitiv poeng i vanleg eksemplar for testar.', 'mn': 'Грамматик, шингэнт, үржүүлэх өгүүлбэрүүдийн адилхан байдлыг үнэлгээд грамматикийн алдаа зөвшөөрүүлэх системүүдийг олон хэмжээний метрик шалгаж өгсөн. Хүн төрөлхтний чанарын шийдвэрлэлтэй тэдгээр метриктикийн холбогдолтын өмнөх судалгаагаар хэрэглэгдсэн тохиромжтой шалгалтууд, аргачлалын ялгаа, өгөгдлийн сангуудын сонголтуудын тулд тохиромжгүй байлаа. Энэ цаасан дээр бид баталгаар суурилсан GEC метрикийг дахин үнэлгээж, системийн түвшинд хүн төрөлхтний холбоотой тоо хэмжээгээр хүн төрөлхтний GEC үр дүнг олон хүн төрөлхтний шийдвэр гаргаж, статистикийн чухал тестикийг зөв хийж. Манай үр дүн нь MaxMatch (M2) дээр GLEU-ын чухал ашиг харагдахгүй. ГLEU-г илүү өндөр гэж үздэг өмнөх судалгааны эсрэг. Дараагүй тарианы шалгалтын тулд бид энэ метрикийг хүн төрөлхтний шүүмжлэлтэй хүлээн зөвшөөрүүлэхэд нэмэлтэй дүгнэж байна. Бидний өгүүлбэрийн түвшинд шинжилгээ нь GLEU болон M2-г харьцуулахад нэг метр нь нөгөөгөөс илүү хэрэгтэй байж болох юм. Бид эдгээр метрикийг бага зэрэг тодорхойлж чадахгүй, тодорхойлж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. ГLEU нь ихэвчлэн тодорхойлж буй шалгалтын жишээнд эсэргүүцэл тодорхойлж чаддаг.', 'ro': 'Au fost propuse mai multe măsurători pentru evaluarea sistemelor de corecție a erorilor gramaticale (GEC) bazate pe gramaticalitate, fluență și adecvarea propozițiilor de ieșire. Studiile anterioare privind corelația acestor măsurători cu evaluările calității umane au fost neconcludente, din cauza lipsei unor teste de semnificație adecvate, a discrepanțelor în metode și a alegerii seturilor de date utilizate. În această lucrare, reevaluăm măsurătorile GEC bazate pe referință prin măsurarea corelațiilor la nivel de sistem cu oamenii pe un set mare de date de evaluări umane ale ieșirilor GEC și prin efectuarea corespunzătoare de teste statistice de semnificație. Rezultatele noastre nu arată niciun avantaj semnificativ al GLEU față de MaxMatch (M2), contrazicând studiile anterioare care susțin că GLEU este superior. Pentru o analiză mai fină, evaluăm în plus aceste valori pentru acordul lor cu judecățile umane la nivelul sentinței. Analiza noastră la nivel de propoziție indică faptul că compararea GLEU și M2, o metrică poate fi mai utilă decât cealaltă, în funcție de scenariu. Analizăm în continuare calitativ aceste măsurători și constatările noastre arată că, pe lângă faptul că sunt mai puțin interpretabile și non-deterministe, GLEU produce, de asemenea, scoruri contraintuitive în exemple de testare frecvente.', 'sr': 'Predloženo je nekoliko metrika za procjenu gramatičkih korekcija grešaka (GEC) sistema na osnovu gramatičke, tekućine i adekvatnosti rečenica za izlaz. Prethodna ispitivanja korelacije tih metrika sa osuđivanjima ljudske kvalitete bila su nesposobna zbog nedostatka odgovarajućih testova značajnosti, nedostatka metoda i izbora korištenih podataka. U ovom papiru, ponovo procjenjujemo na referentnoj bazi GEC metrike mjerenjem korelacija na nivou sustava sa ljudima na velikom setu podataka o ljudskim osuđivanjima rezultata GEC-a i pravilnim provođenjem testova statističkog značaja. Naši rezultati ne pokazuju značajnu prednost GLEU preko MaxMatch (M2), protiv prethodnih studija koje tvrde da je GLEU superior. Za bolju analizu, dodatno procjenjujemo ove metrike za njihov sporazum sa ljudskim sudovima na razini rečenice. Naša analiza na nivou rečenice pokazuje da usporedba GLEU i M2, jedan metrik može biti korisniji od drugog ovisnog o scenariju. Dalje kvalitativno analiziramo ove metrike i naši nalazi pokazuju da, osim manje interpretacije i ne-determinističke, GLEU takođe proizvodi kontraintuitivne rezultate u češćim primjerima ispitivanja.', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරමාත්මක වැරදි විධානය (GEC) පද්ධතිය සැකසුම් විශ්වාස කරන්න බොහොම මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ. මිනිස්සු ගොඩක් විශේෂතාවක් සමග මුලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය ගැන ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණය, විධාන පරීක්ෂණය, සහ දත මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ආපහු විශ්වාස කරන්නේ පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ පද්ධතිය සමග මිනිස්සුන්ගේ ලොකු දත්ත සෙට් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ GEC ප්\u200dරතිචාරණ පරීක්ෂණය අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පෙන්වන්නේ නෑ GLEU මැxMatch (M2) වලින් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක්, ප්\u200dරතිච විශ්ලේෂනයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි මේ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් එක්ක මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂනය සමඟ මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂණ ස්තූ අපේ වාක්ය ස්තූතිය විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ GLEU සහ M2 සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් එක මෙට්\u200dරික් විශ්ලේෂණය විශ්ලේෂණයෙ අපි තවත් විශේෂ විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා මේ මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වලින් අපේ හොයාගත්තොත් පෙන්වනවා කියලා කියලා ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ නැති විද', 'so': "Waxaa la soo jeeday in lagu qiimeeyo hababka hagaajiyada qalabka grammatika (GEC) nidaamka ku saleysan grammatika, faa’iidada iyo saxda xukunka soo baxa. Waxbarashada hore ee ku xiriirta xukunnada qiimaha ee biniaadamka waxay ahaayeen mid aan kooban, sababtoo ah baahida imtixaanka muhiimka ah, kala qiimo ahaanshaha qaababka iyo doorashada sawirada lagu isticmaalo. Qoraalkan ayaannu mar kale ku qiimeynaynaa metriciyada lagu qoray GEC-ka, si aan u qiyaasno xiriirka nidaamka iyo dadka oo ku saabsan garsoorid badan oo xafiisyada dadka ee GEC ka soo baxa, si hagaagsan baaritaanka qiimaha ah. Abaalkayaga ma muuqato GLEU faa'iido muhiim ah oo ku saabsan MaxMatch (M2), iyadoo ka duwan waxbarashooyinkii hore oo sheegaya in GLEU uu ka sarreeyo. Analys aad u fiican, waxaynu kaloo qiimeynaynaa qalabkan si aad ugu heshiisaan xukunka dadka heerka xafiiska. Analyska heerka ereyga waxaa loola jeedaa in la barbardhigo GLEU iyo M2, mid metrici waa ka faa’iido badan karaa tan kale oo ku xiran aragtida. Waxaynu kaloo si qiimo ah u baaraynaa metricadan iyo baaritaannadeena waxaynu muujinaynaa in ayan ahayn mid aan la turjumi karin oo aan la aqoon karin, GLEU wuxuu sameynayaa tusaalaha imtixaanka caadiga ah.", 'sv': 'Flera mätvärden har föreslagits för att utvärdera grammatical error correction (GEC) system baserat på grammaticalitet, flytande och lämplighet i utmatningsmeningarna. Tidigare studier av korrelationen mellan dessa mätvärden och mänskliga kvalitetsbedömningar var ofullständiga på grund av avsaknaden av lämpliga signifikanstester, avvikelser i metoderna och val av datauppsättningar som använts. I denna uppsats omvärderar vi referensbaserade GEC-mätningar genom att mäta systemnivåkorrelationer med människor på en stor datauppsättning mänskliga bedömningar av GEC-utgångar, och genom att korrekt genomföra statistiska signifikanstester. Våra resultat visar ingen signifikant fördel med GLEU jämfört med MaxMatch (M2), vilket motsäger tidigare studier som hävdar att GLEU är överlägsen. För en finkornig analys utvärderar vi dessutom dessa mått för deras överensstämmelse med mänskliga bedömningar på meningsnivå. Vår meningsanalys visar att en jämförelse mellan GLEU och M2 kan vara mer användbar än den andra beroende på scenariot. Vi analyserar vidare kvalitativt dessa mätvärden och våra resultat visar att GLEU förutom att vara mindre tolkningsbara och icke-deterministiska, även producerar kontraintuitiva poäng i vanliga testexempel.', 'ta': 'வரைப்படுத்தல், வெளியீட்டு வாக்கியங்கள் பொருத்தமான பிழை திருத்தம் (GEC) அமைப்புகளை மதிப்பிடுவதற்கு பல மெட்ரிக்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட Previous studies of the correlation of these metrics with human quality judgments were inconclusive, due to the lack of appropriate significance tests, discrepancies in the methods, and choice of datasets used.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மீண்டும் குறிப்பு சார்ந்த GEC மெட்ரிக்களை மீண்டும் மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். ஜிசி வெளியீட்டுகளின் பெரிய தரவு தீர்ப்புகள் மூலம் முற முடிவு சிறந்த கிடைக்கப்பட்ட ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு, நாம் கூட்டுதலாக இந்த மெட்ரிக்களை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் வாக்கியத்தின் நிலையில எங்கள் வாக்கு-மட்டத்தின் ஆய்வு குறிப்பிடுகிறது GLEU மற்றும் M2 ஐ ஒப்பிடுவது, ஒரு மெட்ரிக் தான் பார்வையை சார்ந்ததை விட அத நாம் இந்த மெட்ரிக்களையும் மற்றும் எங்கள் கண்டுபிடிப்புகளையும் மேலும் பரிசோதிப்பு எடுத்துக்காட்டும் பொதுவாக நடக்கும் உதாரணத்தில் கு', 'ur': 'بہت سی میٹریک پیشنهاد کیے گئے ہیں کہ گراماتیکی خطا اصلاح (GEC) سیستموں پر گراماتیکی، فلونٹی اور آوٹ ویٹ ویٹوں کی ادبی پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں. یہ مٹریک کی تعلقات کی پہلی تحقیقات انسان کی کیفیت فیصلہ کے ساتھ غیر مشکل تھی، اس کے باعث مناسب تعلقات کی آزمائش، طریقوں میں اختلاف اور استعمال ہونے والی ڈیٹسٹوں کی انتخاب کی وجہ سے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے روزنامہ بنیادی GEC متریک کو دوبارہ مطالعہ کرلیا ہے، اس طرح انسانوں کے ساتھ سیستم سطح کی تعلقات کا اندازہ کیا ہے جسے GEC اٹوٹوٹ کے بڑے ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ منظور کرتا ہے، اور اسٹیٹیسٹ کی تعلقات کی آ ہمارے نتیجے مکس میٹ (M2) پر GLEU کا کوئی اہم فائدہ نہیں دکھاتے ہیں، جو پہلے تحقیقات سے مخالفت کرتا ہے جو GLEU کو زیادہ اچھا ہے۔ ایک پاکیزہ دانے کی تحلیل کے لئے، ہم اس متریک کو اضافہ کے ساتھ فیصلہ سطح پر انسان کے فیصلے کے ساتھ ان کی توافق کے لئے ارزش کرتے ہیں. ہماری جماعت-سطح تحقیقات کی نشانیاں دیتی ہیں کہ GLEU اور M2 کے مقایسے سے ایک متریک دوسرے سے زیادہ فائدہ اٹھائے گا۔ ہم اس متریک کو اور ہمارے نتیجے کو اس سے زیادہ گواہی کے طور پر تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ کم تعبیر کرنے والی اور غیر تعبیر کرنے والی بات کے بغیر، GLEU نے بھی بہت زیادہ آزمائش مثالوں میں غیر منطقی اسکور پیدا کرتا ہے۔', 'uz': "@ info Previous studies of the correlation of these metrics with human quality judgments were inconclusive, due to the lack of appropriate significance tests, discrepancies in the methods, and choice of datasets used.  Bu hujjatda, biz GEC tuzuvlarining katta maʼlumotlar tarkibini o'zgartirish uchun tizim darajasi bilan bog'liqlarni qayta qiymatimiz va statistik muhim imtiyozni bajarishimiz mumkin. @ info: status Yaxshi taʼminlovchi bo'lgan, biz bu metriklarni qo'shib qo'shish darajada inson xukunalar bilan heshimini qiymatimiz. Bizning so'zning darajasi analyzerimiz GLEU va M2 bilan bir metrik scenario bilan bog'liq boʻlishi mumkin. Biz bu metriklarni aniqlamiz va natijalarimizni ko'rsatganimiz mumkin. Biz ko'proq sinov misollarida hech qachon tarjima qilmaydigan va hech qanday nazar emas, GLEU bunday foydalanuvchi qiymatlarni ko'paytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Một số lượng đã được đề nghị để đánh giá hệ thống sửa sai sai theo ngữ pháp (GED) dựa trên biểu thức, thông thường và độ đủ của các câu xuất. Những nghiên cứu trước về mối tương quan của các cấu trúc đo lường với các phán quyết về chất lượng con người là không xác định, vì thiếu các thử nghiệm ý nghĩa phù hợp, sự khác biệt trong phương pháp, và sự lựa chọn các bộ dữ liệu đã dùng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tái đánh giá âm lượng GED dựa trên một phương pháp đo lường bằng cách đo mối liên hệ hệ hệ hệ thống với con người trên một tập tin lớn về những phán quyết con người về kết xuất của GEC, và thực hiện các thử nghiệm về ý nghĩa thống. Những kết quả của chúng tôi không cho thấy có lợi ích lớn của GLbát hơn MaxMatch (M2), mâu thuẫn với các nghiên cứu trước đó mà GL bị đứng đầu. Để phân tích thêm sâu sắc hơn, chúng tôi còn đánh giá các âm lượng này để họ đồng ý với phán quyết con người ở mức án. Phân tích mức án của chúng tôi cho thấy so sánh GLEU và M2, một mét có thể hữu dụng hơn một cái khác tùy theo kịch bản. Chúng ta tiếp tục phân tích âm lượng này về mặt chất lượng và kết quả của chúng ta cho thấy, ngoài việc ít thể hiện thấu đáo và không phân biệt, GL cũng sản xuất điểm ngược trực giác trong các loại thử nghiệm thường thấy.', 'nl': 'Verschillende metrics zijn voorgesteld voor het evalueren van grammatical error correction (GEC) systemen op basis van grammaticaliteit, vloeiendheid en adequaatheid van de uitvoerzinnen. Eerdere studies naar de correlatie van deze statistieken met menselijke kwaliteitsoordelen waren niet overtuigend, vanwege het ontbreken van geschikte significantietests, discrepanties in de methoden en de keuze van gebruikte datasets. In dit artikel evalueren we referentie-based GEC metrics door het meten van de systeemcorrelaties met mensen op een grote dataset van menselijke beoordelingen van GEC outputs, en door het correct uitvoeren van statistische significantie tests. Onze resultaten tonen geen significant voordeel aan van GLEU ten opzichte van MaxMatch (M2), wat in tegenspraak is met eerdere studies die beweren dat GLEU superieur is. Voor een fijnmazige analyse evalueren we deze statistieken bovendien op hun overeenstemming met menselijke oordelen op strafniveau. Onze zinnenanalyse geeft aan dat het vergelijken van GLEU en M2, afhankelijk van het scenario, de ene metric nuttiger kan zijn dan de andere. We analyseren deze statistieken verder kwalitatief en onze bevindingen tonen aan dat GLEU niet alleen minder interpreteerbaar en niet-deterministisch is, maar ook contra-intuïtieve scores produceert in veelvoorkomende testvoorbeelden.', 'da': 'Flere metrics er blevet foreslået til at evaluere grammatical error correction (GEC) systemer baseret på grammaticalitet, flydende og tilstrækkelighed af output sætninger. Tidligere undersøgelser af sammenhængen mellem disse målinger og menneskelige kvalitetsvurderinger var ikke konklusive på grund af manglende relevante signifikanstests, uoverensstemmelser i metoderne og valg af anvendte datasæt. I denne artikel revurderer vi referencebaserede GEC-målinger ved at måle systemniveau-korrelationer med mennesker på et stort datasæt af menneskelige vurderinger af GEC-output, og ved korrekt at udføre statistiske signifikanstests. Vores resultater viser ingen signifikant fordel ved GLEU i forhold til MaxMatch (M2), hvilket modsiger tidligere undersøgelser, der hævder GLEU at være overlegen. Til en finkornet analyse evaluerer vi desuden disse målinger for deres overensstemmelse med menneskelige dømme på sætningsniveau. Vores sætningsniveau analyse indikerer, at sammenligning af GLEU og M2 kan være mere nyttig end den anden afhængigt af scenariet. Vi analyserer yderligere kvalitativt disse målinger, og vores resultater viser, at udover at være mindre fortolkende og ikke-deterministiske, producerer GLEU også kontraintuitive scorer i almindeligt forekommende testeksempler.', 'hr': 'Predloženo je nekoliko metrika za procjenu gramatičkih korištenja grešaka (GEC) sustava na temelju gramatičke, tekućine i adekvatnosti izjave. Prethodna ispitivanja korelacije tih metrika s osuđivanjima kvaliteta ljudskih kvaliteta bila su nesposobna zbog nedostatka odgovarajućih testova značajnosti, nedostatka metoda i izbora korištenih podataka. U ovom papiru, ponovno procjenjujemo referentni GEC metrike mjerenjem korelacija na razini sustava s ljudima na velikoj skupini podataka o ljudskim osuđivanjima rezultata GEC-a i pravilnim provođenjem testova statističkog značaja. Naši rezultati ne pokazuju značajnu prednost GLEU nad MaxMatch (M2), suprotnost prethodnim ispitivanjima koje tvrde da je GLEU superior. Za bolju analizu, dodatno procjenjujemo ove metrike za njihov sporazum s ljudskim sudovima na razini kazne. Naša analiza razine rečenica ukazuje na to da usporedba GLEU i M2, jedan metrik može biti korisniji od drugog ovisnog o scenariju. Dalje kvalitativno analiziramo ove metrike i naši nalazi pokazuju da, osim manje interpretacije i ne-determinicije, GLEU također proizvodi antiintuitivne rezultate u često pojavljujućim primjerima ispitivanja.', 'bg': 'Предложени са няколко показателя за оценка на системите за граматична корекция на грешки (ГЕК), базирани на граматичност, плавност и адекватност на изходните изречения. Предишните проучвания за корелацията на тези показатели с оценките за качеството на човека са неубедителни поради липсата на подходящи тестове за значимост, несъответствия в методите и избора на използваните набори от данни. В тази статия преразглеждаме референтните показатели на ГЕК чрез измерване на корелациите на системно ниво с хора върху голям набор от данни от човешки преценки на изходните ГЕК и чрез правилно провеждане на тестове за статистическа значимост. Нашите резултати не показват значително предимство на ГЛЕУ пред МаксМач (М2), което противоречи на предишни проучвания, които твърдят, че ГЛЕУ е по-добър. За по-фин анализ ние допълнително оценяваме тези показатели за тяхното съответствие с човешките преценки на ниво изречение. Нашият анализ на ниво изречение показва, че при сравняването на един показател може да бъде по-полезен от другия в зависимост от сценария. Ние допълнително анализираме качествено тези показатели и нашите констатации показват, че освен че са по-малко тълкуваеми и недетерминистични, произвежда и контраинтуитивни резултати в често срещаните примери за тестове.', 'de': 'Mehrere Metriken wurden vorgeschlagen, um grammatische Fehlerkorrektursysteme (GEC) basierend auf Grammatikalität, Fluenz und Angemessenheit der Ausgabesätze zu bewerten. Bisherige Studien zur Korrelation dieser Metriken mit menschlichen Qualitätsbeurteilungen waren aufgrund des Fehlens geeigneter Signifikanztests, Diskrepanzen in den Methoden und der Auswahl der verwendeten Datensätze nicht schlüssig. In diesem Beitrag bewerten wir referenzbasierte GEC-Metriken neu, indem wir die Korrelationen auf Systemebene mit Menschen auf einem großen Datensatz menschlicher Beurteilungen von GEC-Outputs messen und statistische Signifikanztests ordnungsgemäß durchführen. Unsere Ergebnisse zeigen keinen signifikanten Vorteil von GLEU gegenüber MaxMatch (M2), was im Widerspruch zu früheren Studien steht, die GLEU als überlegen behaupten. Für eine detailliertere Analyse werten wir diese Metriken zusätzlich auf ihre Übereinstimmung mit menschlichen Urteilen auf Satzebene aus. Unsere Satzanalyse zeigt, dass der Vergleich von GLEU und M2 je nach Szenario eine Metrik nützlicher sein kann als die andere. Wir analysieren diese Metriken weiter qualitativ und unsere Ergebnisse zeigen, dass GLEU nicht nur weniger interpretierbar und nicht deterministisch ist, sondern auch kontraintuitive Scores in häufig vorkommenden Testbeispielen erzeugt.', 'id': 'Several metrics have been proposed for evaluating grammatical error correction (GEC) systems based on grammaticality, fluency, and adequacy of the output sentences.  Studi sebelumnya tentang korelasi metrik ini dengan penilaian kualitas manusia tidak konklusif, karena kekurangan tes penting yang sesuai, ketidakcocokan dalam metode, dan pilihan dataset yang digunakan. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengevaluasi kembali metrik GEC berdasarkan referensi dengan mengukur korelasi tingkat sistem dengan manusia pada set data besar dari penghakiman manusia dari hasil GEC, dan dengan melakukan tes statistis yang signifikan. Hasil kami tidak menunjukkan keuntungan yang signifikan dari GLEU atas MaxMatch (M2), yang bertentangan dengan studi sebelumnya yang mengklaim GLEU sebagai lebih baik. Untuk analisis yang lebih baik, kita tambahan mengevaluasi metrik ini untuk kesepakatan mereka dengan penilaian manusia di tingkat kalimat. Analisi tingkat kalimat kami menunjukkan bahwa membandingkan GLEU dan M2, satu metrik mungkin lebih berguna dari yang lain tergantung pada skenario. Kami lebih lanjut menganalisis kualitatif metrik ini dan penemuan kami menunjukkan bahwa selain menjadi kurang terinterpretasi dan non-determinis, GLEU juga menghasilkan skor anti-intuitif dalam contoh tes yang biasa terjadi.', 'fa': 'چندتا متریک برای ارزیابی سیستم\u200cهای اصلاح خطای گراماتیک (GEC) بر اساس گراماتیکی، طبیعت و مناسب جمله\u200cهای خروج پیشنهاد شده است. تحقیقات قبلی از ارتباط این متریک با قضاوت های کیفیت انسان به دلیل ناتوانی آزمایش معنی مناسب، اختلاف در روش\u200cها و انتخاب مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها استفاده شده غیرقابل توجه نبود. در این کاغذ، ما متریک GEC بنیاد مربوط به مربوط به مقدار مربوط به سطح سیستم با انسان بر مجموعه داده های بزرگ از قضاوت داده های انسان از نتیجه های GEC، و با بررسی آزمایش معنی آماری به درستی انجام می دهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای ما هیچ فایده\u200cای بزرگی از GLEU بر روی MaxMatch (M2) نمایش نمی\u200cدهند که در مقابل تحقیقات قبلی که GLEU را به عنوان superior می\u200cگویند مخالفت می\u200cکند. برای یک تحلیل دانه\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cتر، ما این متریک\u200cها را اضافه می\u200cکنیم برای توافق با قضاوت\u200cهای انسان در سطح مجازات. تحلیل سطح جمله ما نشان می دهد که مقایسه کردن GLEU و M2، یک متریک ممکن است بیشتر از دیگر بستگی به سناریو باشد. ما این متریک\u200cها را با کیفیت بیشتر تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و نتیجه\u200cهایمان نشان می\u200cدهند که بجز اینکه تعبیر قابل تعبیر و غیر تصمیم\u200cگیری باشیم، GLEU در نمونه\u200cهای آزمایش\u200cهای معمولاً بی\u200cنظیر تولید می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'gramatik hata düzeltmegine (GEC) sistemalary gramatik, akyllyk we çykyş sözleriniň adalatylygyny çözmek üçin birnäçe metrik teklip edildi. Bu metrikleriň öňki araştyrmalaryň adamlaryň kalitesi hökmü bilen meňzeşlik testileriniň ýok bolmagyna, yöntemlerde döwürlenmedikleri we ulanylan veri setirleriniň saýlamasynyň däldir. Bu kağıt içinde, GEC çizgilerinin büyük veri takımında insanlar ile sistem seviyelerini ölçüp, derecede kaynaklı GEC metriklerini değerlendirip, statistik önemli değerlendirmek üzere değerlendiriyoruz. Biziň netijelerimiz MaxMatch (M2) üstünde GLEU üçin has möhüm ýeterliki ýok edip bilmeýär, öňki öňki studileriň üsti bolmagyny diýip jogap edýärler. Iň gowy gönümli analýusiýa üçin bu metrikleri sözläk derejesinde adamlaryň hökmünü bilen ylalaşyklaryna goýberdik. Sözlemiz derejesi çözümleşmerimiz GLEU we M2 bilen karşılaştyrylýandygyny görkezýär, bir metrik senaryýanyň üstünde baglanýan digerinden has bagly bolup biler. Biz bu metrikleri daşaryk şeklinde çözümlendirik we çözümlerimiz çözümlerden daşaryk çykyp bilmez we deterministik däldirmezden başga, GLEU köplenç synag örneklerinde counter-intuitiv notlary üretýär.', 'ko': '출력 문장의 문법성, 유창성과 충분성을 바탕으로 문법 오류 수정(GEC) 시스템을 평가하는 지표를 제시했다.적당한 현저성 검사, 방법의 차이와 사용된 데이터 집합의 선택이 부족하기 때문에 이전에 이런 지표와 인류 품질 판단의 관련성에 대한 연구는 정설이 없었다.본고에서 우리는 대량의 인류가 GEC 출력에 대한 판단 데이터 집합에서 시스템 등급과 인류의 관련성을 측정하고 통계적 현저성 검사를 적절하게 실시함으로써 참고를 바탕으로 하는 GEC 도량을 재평가한다.우리의 연구 결과에 따르면 GLEU는 맥스매치(M2)에 비해 현저한 우세가 없다. 이는 맥스매치(M2)보다 GLEU가 우수하다고 주장한 이전 연구와 모순된다.더욱 세밀한 입도 분석을 위해 우리는 이러한 지표가 문장 차원에서 인류 판단과 일치성을 평가했다.우리의 문장 차원 분석에 의하면 GLEU와 M2를 비교하면 하나의 지표가 다른 지표보다 더 유용할 수 있고 구체적으로는 장면에 달려 있다.우리는 이러한 지표를 한층 더 정성적으로 분석했는데 우리의 발견은 해석성과 불확실성이 비교적 떨어지는 것을 제외하고 GLEU는 흔히 볼 수 있는 테스트 예시에서도 반직각적인 점수를 발생시킬 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Mimetiria kadhaa imependekezwa kutathmini mfumo wa uharibifu wa makosa ya grammatika (GEC) kwa kutumia utaalamu, ufanisi na usahihi wa hukumu za matokeo. Tafiti zilizopita za uhusiano wa mimetrici hii na maamuzi ya ubora wa binadamu hayakuwa na kina, kutokana na ukosefu wa majaribio muhimu, tofauti katika njia, na chaguo la seti za data zilizotumiwa. Katika karatasi hii, tunapitia mbinu za GEC zinazohusiana tena kwa kupima mahusiano ya mfumo na binadamu kwenye seti ya taarifa kubwa ya maamuzi ya binadamu ya mazingira ya GEC, na kwa kutekeleza majaribio muhimu ya takwimu. Matokeo yetu hayajaonyesha faida kubwa ya GLEU juu ya MaxMatch (M2), ikipingana na utafiti uliopita unaosema GLEU ni wa juu. Kwa uchambuzi mzuri, tunapitia mbinu hizi kwa makubaliano yao na maamuzi ya binadamu katika ngazi ya hukumu hiyo. Uchambuzi wetu wa kiwango cha hukumu unaonyesha kuwa kulinganisha GLEU na M2, mbinu moja inaweza kuwa na manufaa zaidi ya mwingine inayotegemea eneo hilo. We further qualitatively analyze these metrics and our findings show that apart from being less interpretable and non-deterministic, GLEU also produces counter-intuitive scores in commonly occurring test examples.', 'sq': 'Disa metrika janë propozuar për vlerësimin e sistemeve të korrigjimit të gabimeve grammatike (GEC) bazuar në grammatikalitetin, fluencën dhe përshtatshmërinë e fjalëve të daljes. Studimet e mëparshme të korrelacionit të këtyre metrikave me gjykimet e cilësisë njerëzore nuk ishin përfundimtare, për shkak të mungesës së testeve të rëndësishme të përshtatshme, mospërputhjeve në metodat dhe zgjedhjes së grupeve të dhënash të përdorura. Në këtë letër, ne rishikojmë metrikat e GEC-së bazuar në referim duke matur korrelacionet në nivelin e sistemit me njerëzit në një sërë të dhënash të mëdha të gjykimeve njerëzore të rezultateve të GEC-së dhe duke kryer testime të rëndësishme statistike. Our results show no significant advantage of GLEU over MaxMatch (M2), contradicting previous studies that claim GLEU to be superior.  Për një analizë më të mirë, ne përveç kësaj vlerësojmë këto metrika për marrëveshjen e tyre me gjykimet njerëzore në nivelin e dënimit. Analiza jonë e nivelit të fjalës tregon se krahasimi i GLEU dhe M2, një metrik mund të jetë më i dobishëm se tjetri në varësi të skenarit. Ne analizojmë më tej kualitativisht këto metrika dhe gjetjet tona tregojnë se përveç të qënit më pak të interpretueshme dhe jo-vendosmore, GLEU prodhon gjithashtu rezultate kundër intuitive në shembuj testimi që ndodhin zakonisht.', 'af': "Verskeie metries is voorgestel vir die evaluering van grammatiese fout korreksie (GEC) stelsels gebaseer op grammatiese, fluiditeit en adekuasie van die uitset setinge. Vorige studie van die korrelasie van hierdie metriek met menslike kwaliteit oordelinge was onklose, vanweë die ontbreek van geskikte betekenis toets, ongelukkigheid in die metodes en kies van gebruikte datastelle. In hierdie papier, ons reevalueer verwysing-gebaseerde GEC metries deur die stelsel-vlak korrelasies met mense te maak op 'n groot datastel van menslike oordelings van GEC uitvoerdes en deur geregtig statistiese betekening toets te bestuur. Ons resultate wys geen betekende voordeel van GLEU oor MaxMatch (M2), teen die vorige studie wat GLEU verkondig om superior te wees nie. Vir 'n finer-koring analiseer, ons verplig hierdie metries by die ooreenkoms met menslike oordelings op die setvlak. Ons sê-vlak analisie wys dat die vergelyking van GLEU en M2, een metrie mag meer nuttig wees as die ander afhang van die scenario. Ons verdere kwaliteit hierdie metries en ons gevinde vertoon dat, behalwe minder uittelbare en nie-deterministiese, GLEU ook teen-intuitiewe punte produseer in algemeen voorbeelde toets.", 'az': "Çərzi metrik qrammatik xəta düzəltməsi (GEC) sistemlərinə, qrammatik, fluqlıq və çıxış cümlələrinin uyğunluğuna dayanan bir neçə metrik təklif edildi. Bu metriklərin insanların kaliteli hökmləri ilə birləşdirilməsinin əvvəlki öyrənməsi müəyyən edilməsi, istifadə edilən məlumat sınaqlarının, metodların müxtəlifliyinə və verilən qurmaqların seçilməsinə görə münasibdir. Bu kağızda, GEC çıxışlarının böyük verilənlər üzerində insanlarla sistem seviyyəti ilə bağlantıları ölçürək, həmçinin statistik ifadəsi sınamaqlarını düzgün idarə edirik. Sonuçlarımız MaxMatch (M2) üstündə GLEU'nin heç bir faydası göstərməz, əvvəlki təhsil ilə GLEU'nin üstün olduğunu iddia edirlər. Daha yaxşı dənəli analizi üçün, bu metrikləri cümlədə insan hökmləri ilə anlaşmaları üçün daha çox değerlendiririk. Bizim cümlələrimiz səviyyədə analizimiz GLEU və M2 ilə qarşılaşdırmağı göstərir ki, bir metrik, digərinin scenarioya bağlı olaraq daha faydalı olar. Biz bu metrikləri daha çox qiymətli analiz edirik və tapındıqlarımız belə göstərir ki, daha az interpretasif və deterministik olmadan, GLEU da sınaq misallarında çox çətinlikli nöqtələr yaradır.", 'hy': 'Գրամատիկական սխալների ուղղումների (ԳԵԿ) համակարգերի գնահատման համար առաջարկել են մի քանի չափով, հիմնված գրամատիկական, ճկունության և արտադրյալ նախադասությունների բավարարության վրա: Այս մետրիկների կապվածության նախկին ուսումնասիրությունները մարդկային որակի դատողությունների հետ անհավասար էին, որովհետև չկային համապատասխան կարևորության թեստեր, մեթոդների տարբերություններ և օգտագործված տվյալների ընտրությունը: In this paper, we re-evaluate reference-based GEC metrics by measuring the system-level correlations with humans on a large dataset of human judgments of GEC outputs, and by properly conducting statistical significance tests.  Մեր արդյունքները ոչ մի նշանակալի առավելություն չեն ցույց տալիս GLԵՎ-ի մասին MaxMatch-ի (M2) դեմ, որը հակասում է նախորդ ուսումնասիրություններին, որոնք ասում են, որ GLԵՎ-ը գերազանցիկ է: Որպեսզի ավելի լավ վերլուծություն անենք, մենք նաև գնահատում ենք այս չափումները մարդկային դատողությունների հետ համաձայնվելու համար նախադասության մակարդակում: Մեր նախադասությունների մակարդակի վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ GLԵՎ և M2 համեմատությունը, մի մետրիկ կարող է ավելի օգտակար լինել, քան մյուսը, կախված սցենարից: Մենք նաև որակավոր վերլուծում ենք այս մետրիկները, և մեր հայտնաբերությունները ցույց են տալիս, որ առանց ավելի քիչ մեկնաբանելի և ոչ որոշիչ լինելու, GLԵՎ-ն նաև արտադրում է հակա-ինտուիտիվ գնահատականներ սովորաբար տեղի ունեցող թեստերի օրինակներում:', 'bn': 'গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটিক্যাল সংশোধন (GEC) সিস্টেম মূল্যায়নের জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি মেট্রিক প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে গ্রামাটিক্যাল সংশোধন এবং  পূর্ববর্তী গবেষণা মানব মানুষের মানের বিচারের সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্কের সম্পর্কের সম্পর্কে অসম্পর্ক ছিল, যার ফলে যথাযথ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পরীক্ষার অভা এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পুনরায় গণভিত্তিক জিসি মেট্রিক পরিমাপের মাধ্যমে মানুষের সাথে সিস্টেম-স্তরের সম্পর্ক মাপের মাধ্যমে মানুষের সাথে মানুষের সাথে মানুষে আমাদের ফলাফল ম্যাক্স ম্যাক্স ম্যাচ (এম২) সম্পর্কে জিলিউ এর গুরুত্বপূর্ণ সুবিধা প্রদর্শন করে না, আগের গবেষণার বিরুদ্ধে যে  সুন্দর বিশ্লেষণের জন্য আমরা এই মেট্রিকের মূল্যায়ন করি শাস্তি স্তরে মানুষের বিচারের সাথে তাদের চুক্তির জন্য। আমাদের শাস্তি পর্যায়ে বিশ্লেষণ নির্দেশ করছে যে জিলিউ এবং এম২ এর তুলনা করা হচ্ছে, একটি মেট্রিক দৃশ্যের উপর নির্ভর করে অন্যের চেয়ে বে আমরা এই মেট্রিক এবং আমাদের আবিস্কার বিশ্লেষণ করি যে পরীক্ষার উদাহরণের মধ্যে গ্লিউ সাধারণত পরীক্ষার বিরুদ্ধে বিভিন্ন স্কোর তৈরি করেছে।', 'am': 'የግራማ ስህተት ማቀናጃ (GEC) ስርዓት፣ ፍጥረት እና ውጤት ክፍሎች በማስተካከል በብዙ ሜትሪኮች ተዘጋጅቷል፡፡ ከዚህ በፊት የሰው ጥሩ ፍርድ ጋር ግንኙነት የሚደረገው እነዚህ ምትርቦች ተቃውሞ የጎደለባቸው ናቸው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የGEC ውጤቶች በተለየ የሰው ውጤቶች ዳታዎችን በመለካት የሲስተም ደረጃውን ግንኙነት እና በተለየን የግንኙነት ግንኙነት እና በተለየን እና በstatistical ማስታወቂያ ፈተና እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፍሬዎቻችን የGLEU ማክስተት (M2) ላይ የተለየ ጥቅማችን አይታየቁም፤ ቀድሞው ጥናት GLEU በላይ እንዲሆን የሚለውጥ ነው፡፡ በተሻለ ምርመራ፣ እነዚህን መተላለፊያ ከፍርድ ደረጃ ጋር ከሰው ፍርድ ጋር ለመስማማት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የቃላት-ደረጃን analysis GLEU እና M2 በማስተካከል፣ አንዱ ሚትሪክ በሁለተኛው ክፍል ላይ ከሚታመኑት ይልቅ ይጠቅማል፡፡ እነዚህን ማተሚያዎች እና ፍላጎታችንን በተለየ ትርጉም እና የማይታወቅ የGLEU ውጤቶች በተለየ በተፈተና ምሳሌዎች ላይ የሚቆይ የሆኑን ተቃዋሚ ነጥቦችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'bs': 'Predloženo je nekoliko metrika za procjenu sistema gramatičke korekcije grešaka (GEC) na temelju gramatičke, tekućine i adekvatne rečenice za izlaz. Prethodna ispitivanja korelacije tih metrika sa osuđivanjima kvaliteta ljudskih kvaliteta bila su nesposobna zbog nedostatka odgovarajućih testova značajnosti, neslaganja metoda i izbora korištenih podataka. U ovom papiru, ponovno procjenjujemo na referenciji bazirane GEC metrike mjerenjem korelacija na nivou sustava sa ljudima na velikoj skupini podataka ljudskih osuđivanja ishoda GEC-a i pravilnim provođenjem testova statističkog značaja. Naši rezultati ne pokazuju značajnu prednost GLEU preko MaxMatch (M2), protiv prethodnih ispitivanja koje tvrde da je GLEU superior. Za bolju analizu, dodatno procjenjujemo ove metrike za njihov sporazum sa ljudskim sudovima na razini kazne. Naša analiza razine rečenica ukazuje na to da usporedba GLEU i M2, jedan metrik može biti korisniji od drugog ovisnog o scenariju. Dalje kvalitativno analiziramo ove metrike i naši nalazi pokazuju da osim manje interpretacije i ne-determinicije, GLEU također proizvodi kontraintuitivne rezultate u često događajućim primjerima testiranja.', 'cs': 'Bylo navrženo několik metrik pro hodnocení systémů korekce gramatických chyb (GEC) založených na gramatice, plynulosti a adekvátnosti výstupních vět. Předchozí studie korelace těchto metrik s hodnocením kvality lidí byly neprůkazné, vzhledem k nedostatku vhodných testů významnosti, nesrovnalosti v metodách a volbě použitých datových sad. V tomto článku přehodnocujeme referenční metriky GEC měřením korelací na úrovni systému s lidmi na rozsáhlém datovém souboru lidských hodnocení výstupů GEC a správným provedením statistických testů významnosti. Naše výsledky neprokazují žádnou významnou výhodu GLEU oproti MaxMatch (M2), což je v rozporu s předchozími studiemi, které tvrdí, že GLEU je lepší. Pro jemnější analýzu navíc vyhodnocujeme tyto metriky pro jejich shodu s lidskými úsudky na úrovni trestu. Naše analýza na úrovni věty ukazuje, že porovnání GLEU a M2 může být jedna metrika užitečnější než ta druhá v závislosti na scénáři. Tyto metriky dále kvalitativně analyzujeme a naše zjištění ukazují, že kromě toho, že jsou méně interpretovatelné a nederministické, GLEU vytváří i kontraintuitivní skóre v běžně se vyskytujících příkladech testů.', 'fi': 'Kielioppivirheiden korjausjärjestelmien (GEC) arviointiin on ehdotettu useita mittareita, jotka perustuvat kieliopillisuuteen, sujuvuuteen ja tuloslauseiden riittävyyteen. Aiemmat tutkimukset näiden mittareiden korrelaatiosta ihmisten laatuarviointiin eivät olleet ratkaisevia asianmukaisten merkittävyystestien puuttumisen, menetelmien eroavuuksien ja käytettyjen aineistojen valinnan vuoksi. Tässä työssä arvioimme uudelleen referenssipohjaisia GEC-mittareita mittaamalla järjestelmätason korrelaatioita ihmisten kanssa suurella tietoaineistolla GEC-tuotoksista ja tekemällä asianmukaisesti tilastollisia merkitsevyystestejä. Tuloksemme eivät osoita GLEU:n merkittävää etua MaxMatchiin (M2) verrattuna, mikä on ristiriidassa aiempien tutkimusten kanssa, joiden mukaan GLEU on parempi. Tarkempaa analyysiä varten arvioimme lisäksi näiden mittareiden yhteensopivuutta ihmisten tuomioiden kanssa lausetasolla. Lausekkeen analyysimme osoittaa, että GLEU:n ja M2:n vertailussa yksi metri voi olla skenaariosta riippuen hyödyllisempi kuin toinen. Analysoimme näitä mittareita laadullisesti ja tulokset osoittavat, että sen lisäksi, että GLEU on vähemmän tulkittavissa ja ei-deterministinen, se tuottaa myös vastaintuitiivisia pisteitä yleisesti esiintyvissä testiesimerkeissä.', 'et': 'Grammatilise veakorrektsiooni (GEC) süsteemide hindamiseks on välja pakutud mitmeid mõõdikuid, mis põhinevad grammatilisel veakorrektsioonil, sujuvusel ja väljundlausete piisavusel. Varasemad uuringud nende mõõdikute korrelatsiooni kohta inimeste kvaliteedi hinnangutega olid ebaselged, kuna puudusid sobivad olulisusetestid, meetodite erinevused ja kasutatud andmekogumide valik. Käesolevas töös hindame ümber referentspõhiseid GEC mõõdikuid, mõõtes süsteemitaseme korrelatsioone inimestega suurel andmekogumil inimeste hinnangutest GEC väljundite kohta ning korralikult läbi viies statistilise olulisuse testid. Meie tulemused ei näita GLEU märkimisväärset eelist MaxMatch (M2) ees, mis on vastuolus varasemate uuringutega, mille kohaselt GLEU on parem. Peeneteralisema analüüsi jaoks hindame neid mõõdikuid lisaks nende vastavuse suhtes inimotsustega lausetasemel. Meie lausetaseme analüüs näitab, et GLEU ja M2 võrreldes võib üks mõõdik olenevalt stsenaariumist olla kasulikum kui teine. Analüüsime neid mõõdikuid kvalitatiivselt ja meie tulemused näitavad, et lisaks vähem tõlgendatavatele ja mittedeterministlikele, annab GLEU ka vastupidiseid tulemusi tavalistes testinäidetes.', 'ca': "S'han proposat diverses mètriques per avaluar els sistemes de correcció d'errors gramàtics (GEC) basats en la gramàtica, la fluïtat i l'adequació de les frases de sortida. Els estudis anteriors de la correlació d'aquestes mètriques amb els judicis de qualitat humana no van ser conclusius, degut a la falta de tests adequats de significat, discrepancies en els mètodes i l'elecció de conjunts de dades utilitzats. In this paper, we re-evaluate reference-based GEC metrics by measuring the system-level correlations with humans on a large dataset of human judgments of GEC outputs, and by properly conducting statistical significance tests.  Els nostres resultats no mostran cap avantatge significatiu de GLEU sobre MaxMatch (M2), contradicant estudis anteriors que afirmen que GLEU és superior. Per a una anàlisi més fina, també evaluem aquestes mètriques pel seu acord amb els judicis humans a nivell de frases. L'anàlisi del nivell de frases indica que comparar GLEU i M2, una mètrica pot ser més útil que l'altra segons l'escenari. Analitzem més de manera qualitativa aquestes mètriques i els nostres descobriments demostren que, a part de ser menys interpretables i no determinants, GLEU també produeix puntuacions contraintuïtives en exemples de prova que ocorren comunament.", 'jv': 'Algorithm Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan karo halekan kelas-karo nganggo hukum sing paling-perusahaan uwong gak adhil, nganggep sistem sing gak dhéwé, onhal-jewisan ngono dipunangé dataset sing wis dipunangé. Nang pepulan iki, kita mulai nggawe barang-akye GEC Metika sing bisa nggawe gerang langgar sampeyan sistem kuwi kesempakan karo perbudhakan nganggep bantayan dataset dadi nggawe justification barang GEC, lan nganggep nggawe barang urip bantayan isi arep bantayan banjuré. Reuniversi nambarang kelas kuwi nggawe bener kanggo GLeU supra MaxMatch Genjer-genjer diagram sing dibenalke, kita nambah bantuan kelas iki dadi iki dadi kanggo kowé nggawe barang hukum sing nganggep kuwi adalah sing nganggep bantuan. Awakdhéwé-kuwi dialog ngomong ngerasakno kanggo nambah GLeU karo M2, akeh metir sing isa basa sing luwih apik dhéwé nang sekènari. Awak dhéwé kaliterasi luwih beraksi maneh karo meta-teka lan gampangé awak dhéwé kuwi mau mungkin ora oleh nyong nggawe lan ora ngDelwistiki, GLAU nambarang bisa kontribusi sing kontribusi uwong sing paling dhéwé', 'ha': "An buƙata wasu metric don a evaluate tsarin ɓata grammati (GEC) na'urar da ƙammanci, da gaske ga cewa masu buƙata. Bayan karatun da suka riga suka yi bincike da waɗannan metric da hukuncin nau'i na mutum, sun kasance ba da ƙidãya wa jarrabo masu muhimu, iskawa cikin metoden da kuma zaɓi tsarin mutane da aka yi amfani da. Ga wannan takardan, za mu haƙulla metric GEC-a-bincike, ana ƙaddara haɗiya da mutum na'ura a kan jama'a-zanen mutane da ke cikakken mutane na GEC masu fitarwa, kuma a yi tafiyar jarrabar statistical muhimmanci. MatamayinMu ba za'a yi amfani da GLEU wa MaxMatch (M2) ba, mai motsar da fassarar da zaman tafarki da za'a dai GLEU ya zama mafi girma. Ga an yi rabo da mafi kyãwo, ko kuma muna ƙaddara waɗannan metric da za'a yi yarda da su da hukuncin mutãne a daraja. Analyyina-daraja na kalma yana indikera cewa, a daidaita GLEU da M2, watanni guda mai amfani ne mafi kamata da wanda ya ƙayyade shi, ana ƙayyade kan mai fasarin. Tuna samarari waɗannan metric da fassararmu ke nuna cewa, bã da kasa fassarawa ba, kuma bã da tabbatarwa ba, GLEU yana samun score da ke motsi-inteki a cikin misãlai masu gaba ta bayani.", 'he': 'הציעו מספר מטריות להערכה מערכות תיקון שגיאות גרמטית (GEC) מבוססות על גרמטיקות, נוזלות ומתאימות משפטי ההוצאה. מחקרים קודמים של התשובות של המטריקות האלה לשיפוטים באיכות האנושית היו לא משמעותיים, בגלל חוסר בדיקות משמעותיות מתאימות, אי-התאימות בשיטות, ובחירה של קבוצות נתונים משתמשות. בעיתון הזה, אנו מעריכים מחדש מטריות GEC מבוססת על התייחסות על ידי למדוד את הקשר ברמה המערכת עם בני אדם על קבוצת נתונים גדולה התוצאות שלנו לא מראות יתרון משמעותי של GLEU על MaxMatch (M2), בהתנגדות למחקרים קודמים שטוענים GLEU להיות עלה יותר. עבור ניתוח מעולה יותר, אנו מעריכים באופן נוסף את המטריקות האלה עבור הסכם שלהם עם שיפוטים אנושיים ברמת המשפט. Our sentence-level analysis indicates that comparing GLEU and M2, one metric may be more useful than the other depending on the scenario.  אנו מנתחים יותר באופן איכותי את המטריקות האלה והמציאות שלנו מראות כי חוץ מלהיות פחות אפשרי לפרש ולא קבעני, GLEU גם מייצר נקודות נגד אינטואיטיביות בדוגמאות מבחן שקורות בדרך כלל.', 'sk': 'Predlagano je bilo več metrik za ocenjevanje sistemov slovničnega popravka napak (GEC), ki temeljijo na slovničnosti, tekočosti in ustreznosti izhodnih stavkov. Prejšnje študije korelacije teh meritev s presojo kakovosti ljudi so bile nedokončne zaradi pomanjkanja ustreznih testov pomembnosti, razlik v metodah in izbire uporabljenih naborov podatkov. V tem prispevku ponovno ocenjujemo referenčne meritve GEC z merjenjem korelacij na sistemski ravni z ljudmi na velikem podatkovnem naboru človeških presoj izhodov GEC in s pravilnim izvajanjem statističnih testov pomembnosti. Naši rezultati ne kažejo pomembne prednosti GLEU pred MaxMatch (M2), kar je v nasprotju s prejšnjimi študijami, ki trdijo, da je GLEU boljši. Za natančnejšo analizo dodatno ocenjujemo te meritve glede na njihovo skladnost s človeškimi sodbami na ravni stavka. Naša analiza stavkov kaže, da je lahko primerjava GLEU in M2 ena meritev bolj uporabna kot druga, odvisno od scenarija. Nadalje kvalitativno analiziramo te meritve in naše ugotovitve kažejo, da GLEU poleg tega, da je manj razložljiv in nedeterminističen, proizvaja tudi kontrainutitivne rezultate v običajnih testnih primerih.', 'bo': 'Several metrics have been proposed for evaluating grammatical error correction (GEC) systems based on grammaticality, fluency, and adequacy of the output sentences. ཧེ་མའི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་གི་སྔོན་ལྟའི་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་མིན་འདུག In this paper, we re-evaluate reference-based GEC metrics by measuring the system-level correlations with humans on a large dataset of human judgments of GEC outputs, and by properly conducting statistical significance tests. ང་ཚོའི་འབྲུག ལྷག་རིམ་པ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དག་ལ་ང་ཚོའི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་འདི་ཚོ་ཡང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our sentence-level analysis indicates that comparing GLEU and M2, one metric may be more useful than the other depending on the scenario. We further qualitatively analyze these metrics and our findings show that apart from being less interpretable and non-deterministic, GLEU also produces counter-intuitive scores in commonly occurring test examples.'}
{'en': 'Information Aggregation via Dynamic Routing for Sequence Encoding', 'ar': 'تجميع المعلومات عبر التوجيه الديناميكي لتشفير التسلسل', 'es': 'Agregación de información mediante enrutamiento dinámico para la codificación de secuencias', 'fr': "Agrégation d'informations via le routage dynamique pour le codage de séquence", 'pt': 'Agregação de informações via roteamento dinâmico para codificação de sequência', 'ja': 'シーケンスエンコーディングの動的ルーティングを介した情報の集約', 'zh': '动静聚会,以序编码', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम एन्कोडिंग के लिए डायनेमिक रूटिंग के माध्यम से जानकारी एकत्रीकरण', 'ru': 'Агрегирование информации посредством динамической маршрутизации для кодирования последовательностей', 'ga': 'Comhiomlánú Faisnéise trí Ródú Dinimiciúla le haghaidh Ionchódú Seichimh', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Információösszesítés dinamikus útválasztással a sorozatkódoláshoz', 'kk': 'Динамикалық маршруттарды реттеу кодтамасы арқылы мәліметті біріктіру', 'it': 'Aggregazione delle informazioni tramite routing dinamico per la codifica di sequenza', 'el': 'Συγκέντρωση πληροφοριών μέσω δυναμικής δρομολόγησης για κωδικοποίηση ακολουθίας', 'ml': 'സെക്കന്\u200dസ് കോഡിങ്ങിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുക', 'lt': 'Informacijos suvestinė naudojant dinaminį sekos kodavimo maršrutą', 'mt': 'Aggregazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni permezz ta’ Rotta Dinamika għall-Kodifikazzjoni tas-Sekwenza', 'mk': 'Агрегација на информации преку динамичен пат за кодирање на секвенции', 'ms': 'Aggregasi Maklumat melalui Jalur Dinamik untuk Pengekodan Sekuensi', 'mn': 'Дараагийн кодлогын хувьд мэдээллийн нэгтгэл', 'pl': 'Agregacja informacji za pomocą dynamicznego routingu dla kodowania sekwencyjnego', 'sr': 'Агрегација информације посредством динамичног пута за кодирање последовања', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරමය සංකේතනය සඳහා තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධය', 'so': 'Wixii macluumaad la xiriira codsiga', 'sv': 'Information Aggregation via dynamisk routning för sekvenskodning', 'ta': 'தொடர் குறியீடு', 'no': 'Informasjonssamlinga via dynamisk rutering for sekvenskoding', 'ro': 'Agregarea informațiilor prin rutare dinamică pentru codificarea secvențelor', 'ur': 'سیکوئنس اکنوڈینگ کے لئے داینامیکی روٹینگ کے ذریعے معلومات اتصال', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự tập hợp thông tin qua đường chuyển động dãy số', 'bg': 'Агрегация на информацията чрез динамично насочване за последователно кодиране', 'nl': 'Informatie aggregatie via dynamische routing voor sequentie codering', 'da': 'Information Aggregation via dynamisk routing til sekvenskodning', 'hr': 'Sastavljanje informacija putem dinamičkog rutiranja za kodiranje sekvence', 'id': 'Aggregasi Informasi melalui Routing Dinamik untuk Pengkodan Sekuensi', 'ko': '동적 루트 기반 시퀀스 인코딩 정보 집합', 'de': 'Information Aggregation über Dynamic Routing zur Sequenzkodierung', 'sw': 'Kuhusiana na taarifa kupitia Utamaduni wa Dynamic kwa Kufunguliwa', 'tr': 'Sinamik Mazmunlar Ködleme', 'sq': 'Aggregimi i informacionit nëpërmjet udhëtimit dinamik për kodimin e sekuencës', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'hy': 'Տեղեկությունների համախմբումը հաջորդականության կոդավորման դինամիկ ուղղությամբ', 'az': 'Sequence Kodlaması üçün dinamik yol vasitəsilə məlumatlar birləşdirilməsi', 'bn': 'সেকেন্স এনকোডিং এর জন্য ডাইনামিক রুটিং মাধ্যমে তথ্য সংযোগ', 'af': 'Name', 'bs': 'Akregacija informacija putem dinamičkog rutiranja za kodiranje sekvence', 'fa': 'جمع اطلاعات از طریق مسیر دینامیک برای رمزبندی سطح', 'ca': 'Aggregació de la informació a través de ruta dinàmica per codificar la seqüència', 'cs': 'Agregace informací prostřednictvím dynamického směrování pro sekvenční kódování', 'fi': 'Tietojen yhdistäminen dynaamisen reitityksen avulla sekvenssikoodistusta varten', 'et': 'Teabe koondamine jadakoodeerimise dünaamilise marsruutimise kaudu', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'he': 'מסגרת מידע באמצעות מסלול דינמי לקוד רצף', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Združevanje informacij prek dinamičnega usmerjanja za kodiranje zaporedja', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་རིམ་ཀྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མ་འགྱུར་བ'}
{'en': 'While much progress has been made in how to encode a text sequence into a sequence of vectors, less attention has been paid to how to aggregate these preceding vectors (outputs of RNN / CNN) into fixed-size encoding vector. Usually, a simple max or average pooling is used, which is a bottom-up and passive way of aggregation and lack of guidance by task information. In this paper, we propose an aggregation mechanism to obtain a fixed-size encoding with a dynamic routing policy. The dynamic routing policy is dynamically deciding that what and how much information need be transferred from each word to the final encoding of the text sequence. Following the work of Capsule Network, we design two dynamic routing policies to aggregate the outputs of RNN / CNN encoding layer into a final encoding vector. Compared to the other aggregation methods, dynamic routing can refine the messages according to the state of final encoding vector. Experimental results on five text classification tasks show that our method outperforms other aggregating models by a significant margin. Related source code is released on our github page. Related source code is released on our github page.', 'ar': 'بينما تم إحراز تقدم كبير في كيفية تشفير تسلسل نصي في سلسلة من المتجهات ، فقد تم إيلاء اهتمام أقل لكيفية تجميع هذه المتجهات السابقة (مخرجات RNN / CNN) في متجه ترميز ثابت الحجم. عادة ، يتم استخدام حد أقصى أو متوسط للتجميع البسيط ، وهو طريقة تجميعية تصاعدية وسلبية ونقص التوجيه حسب معلومات المهمة. في هذا البحث ، نقترح آلية تجميع للحصول على تشفير بحجم ثابت بسياسة توجيه ديناميكية. تحدد سياسة التوجيه الديناميكي ديناميكيًا ما وكمية المعلومات التي يجب نقلها من كل كلمة إلى الترميز النهائي لتسلسل النص. بعد عمل شبكة الكبسولة ، قمنا بتصميم سياستي توجيه ديناميكيين لتجميع مخرجات طبقة تشفير RNN / CNN في متجه ترميز نهائي. بالمقارنة مع طرق التجميع الأخرى ، يمكن للتوجيه الديناميكي تحسين الرسائل وفقًا لحالة متجه التشفير النهائي. تظهر النتائج التجريبية على خمس مهام لتصنيف النص أن طريقتنا تتفوق في الأداء على نماذج التجميع الأخرى بهامش كبير. تم إصدار الكود المصدري ذي الصلة على صفحة جيثب الخاصة بنا.', 'pt': 'Embora muito progresso tenha sido feito em como codificar uma sequência de texto em uma sequência de vetores, menos atenção tem sido dada a como agregar esses vetores anteriores (saídas de RNN/CNN) em um vetor de codificação de tamanho fixo. Normalmente, é usado um pooling máximo ou médio simples, que é uma forma de agregação de baixo para cima e passiva e falta de orientação pelas informações da tarefa. Neste artigo, propomos um mecanismo de agregação para obter uma codificação de tamanho fixo com uma política de roteamento dinâmico. A política de roteamento dinâmico está decidindo dinamicamente quais e quanta informação precisa ser transferida de cada palavra para a codificação final da sequência de texto. Seguindo o trabalho da Capsule Network, projetamos duas políticas de roteamento dinâmico para agregar as saídas da camada de codificação RNN/CNN em um vetor de codificação final. Comparado com outros métodos de agregação, o roteamento dinâmico pode refinar as mensagens de acordo com o estado do vetor de codificação final. Resultados experimentais em cinco tarefas de classificação de texto mostram que nosso método supera outros modelos de agregação por uma margem significativa. O código-fonte relacionado é lançado em nossa página do github. O código-fonte relacionado é lançado em nossa página do github.', 'es': 'Si bien se ha avanzado mucho en cómo codificar una secuencia de texto en una secuencia de vectores, se ha prestado menos atención a cómo agregar estos vectores precedentes (salidas de RNN/CNN) en un vector de codificación de tamaño fijo. Por lo general, se utiliza una agrupación simple de máximo o promedio, que es una forma pasiva y ascendente de agregación y falta de orientación por parte de la información de la tarea. En este artículo, proponemos un mecanismo de agregación para obtener una codificación de tamaño fijo con una política de enrutamiento dinámico. La política de enrutamiento dinámico decide dinámicamente qué y cuánta información se debe transferir de cada palabra a la codificación final de la secuencia de texto. Siguiendo el trabajo de Capsule Network, diseñamos dos políticas de enrutamiento dinámico para agregar las salidas de la capa de codificación RNN/CNN en un vector de codificación final. En comparación con los otros métodos de agregación, el enrutamiento dinámico puede refinar los mensajes de acuerdo con el estado del vector de codificación final. Los resultados experimentales de cinco tareas de clasificación de texto muestran que nuestro método supera a otros modelos de agregación por un margen significativo. El código fuente relacionado se publica en nuestra página de github. El código fuente relacionado se publica en nuestra página de github.', 'fr': "Bien que de nombreux progrès aient été réalisés dans la façon de coder une séquence de texte en une séquence de vecteurs, moins d'attention a été accordée à la façon d'agréger ces vecteurs précédents (sorties de RNN/CNN) en vecteur de codage de taille fixe. Habituellement, une simple mise en commun maximale ou moyenne est utilisée, ce qui constitue une méthode ascendante et passive d'agrégation et un manque d'orientation par les informations sur les tâches. Dans cet article, nous proposons un mécanisme d'agrégation pour obtenir un codage de taille fixe avec une politique de routage dynamique. La politique de routage dynamique décide dynamiquement de la nature et de la quantité d'informations à transférer de chaque mot vers le codage final de la séquence de texte. Suite aux travaux de Capsule Network, nous concevons deux politiques de routage dynamique pour agréger les sorties de la couche d'encodage RNN/CNN dans un vecteur d'encodage final. Comparé aux autres méthodes d'agrégation, le routage dynamique peut affiner les messages en fonction de l'état du vecteur de codage final. Les résultats expérimentaux sur cinq tâches de classification de texte montrent que notre méthode surpasse largement les autres modèles d'agrégation. Le code source associé est publié sur notre page github. Le code source associé est publié sur notre page github.", 'ja': 'テキスト配列をベクトルのシーケンスに符号化する方法には多くの進歩があるが、これらの先行するベクトル（ ＲＮＮ ／ ＣＮＮの出力）を固定サイズの符号化ベクトルに集約する方法にはあまり注意が払われていない。 通常、単純な最大または平均プーリングが使用されます。これは、ボトムアップで受動的な集約方法であり、タスク情報によるガイダンスの欠如です。 本稿では、動的ルーティングポリシーによる固定サイズの符号化を得るための集約メカニズムを提案する。 ダイナミックルーティングポリシーは、各単語からテキストシーケンスの最終エンコードに何がどのくらいの量の情報を転送する必要があるかを動的に決定することである。 Capsule Networkの作業に続いて、RNN/CNN符号化層の出力を最終的な符号化ベクトルに集約するための2つの動的ルーティングポリシーを設計します。 他の集約方法と比較して、動的ルーティングは、最終的な符号化ベクトルの状態に従ってメッセージを絞り込むことができる。 5つのテキスト分類タスクの実験結果は、当社の方法が他の集計モデルを大幅に上回っていることを示しています。 関連するソースコードは、当社のgithubページでリリースされます。関連するソースコードは、当社のgithubページでリリースされます。', 'zh': '虽列文本编码为向量大进,而前向量(RNN/CNN 输)合为定编码向量者少。 凡用简之大平均池,此自下而上与动合,缺乏任务信息之道也。 本文中,设合机制,以得动态路由策之定编码。 动由策动,须从单词传输至文本终编码信息量和量。 以胶囊网络之事,设两态之策,输RNN / CNN编码于终编码向量之中。 比之合术,动由终编码向量细化。 五文本分类之实验结果表明,吾法胜于合模之性多矣。 相关之源代码发于吾github页面。 相关之源代码发于吾github页面。', 'hi': 'जबकि वेक्टर के अनुक्रम में एक पाठ अनुक्रम को एन्कोड करने के तरीके में बहुत प्रगति हुई है, इन पूर्ववर्ती वैक्टरों (आरएनएन / सीएनएन के आउटपुट) को निश्चित आकार एन्कोडिंग वेक्टर में कैसे समेकित किया जाए, इस पर कम ध्यान दिया गया है। आमतौर पर, एक साधारण अधिकतम या औसत पूलिंग का उपयोग किया जाता है, जो एकत्रीकरण का एक नीचे-ऊपर और निष्क्रिय तरीका है और कार्य जानकारी द्वारा मार्गदर्शन की कमी है। इस पेपर में, हम एक गतिशील रूटिंग नीति के साथ एक निश्चित आकार एन्कोडिंग प्राप्त करने के लिए एक एकत्रीकरण तंत्र का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। गतिशील रूटिंग नीति गतिशील रूप से यह तय कर रही है कि प्रत्येक शब्द से पाठ अनुक्रम के अंतिम एन्कोडिंग में क्या और कितनी जानकारी स्थानांतरित करने की आवश्यकता है। कैप्सूल नेटवर्क के काम के बाद, हम एक अंतिम एन्कोडिंग वेक्टर में RNN / CNN एन्कोडिंग परत के आउटपुट को एकत्रित करने के लिए दो गतिशील रूटिंग नीतियों को डिज़ाइन करते हैं। अन्य एकत्रीकरण विधियों की तुलना में, गतिशील रूटिंग अंतिम एन्कोडिंग वेक्टर की स्थिति के अनुसार संदेशों को परिष्कृत कर सकता है। पांच पाठ वर्गीकरण कार्यों पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी विधि एक महत्वपूर्ण मार्जिन से अन्य एकत्रित मॉडलों को मात देती है। संबंधित स्रोत कोड हमारे github पृष्ठ पर जारी किया जाता है। संबंधित स्रोत कोड हमारे github पृष्ठ पर जारी किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'Хотя был достигнут значительный прогресс в том, как кодировать текстовую последовательность в последовательность векторов, меньше внимания уделялось тому, как агрегировать эти предшествующие векторы (выходы RNN/CNN) в вектор кодирования фиксированного размера. Обычно используется простое максимальное или среднее объединение, которое является восходящим и пассивным способом агрегирования и отсутствия руководства по информации о задачах. В данной работе мы предлагаем механизм агрегации для получения кодировки фиксированного размера с политикой динамической маршрутизации. Политика динамической маршрутизации динамически решает, что и сколько информации нужно передавать от каждого слова к окончательной кодировке текстовой последовательности. Следуя работе Capsule Network, мы разрабатываем две политики динамической маршрутизации для объединения выходов слоя кодирования RNN/CNN в конечный вектор кодирования. По сравнению с другими методами агрегирования, динамическая маршрутизация может уточнять сообщения в соответствии с состоянием конечного вектора кодирования. Экспериментальные результаты по пяти задачам классификации текста показывают, что наш метод значительно превосходит другие модели агрегирования. Соответствующий исходный код выпускается на нашей странице github. Соответствующий исходный код выпускается на нашей странице github.', 'ga': 'Cé go bhfuil go leor dul chun cinn déanta maidir le conas seicheamh téacs a ionchódú ina sheicheamh veicteoirí, is lú an aird a tugadh ar conas na veicteoirí sin roimhe seo (aschuir RNN/CNN) a chomhiomlánú i veicteoir ionchódaithe ar mhéid fosaithe. De ghnáth, úsáidtear uas-chomhthiomsú simplí nó meán-chomhthiomsú, rud atá ina bhealach éighníomhach ón mbun aníos chun comhiomlánú agus easpa treorach trí fhaisnéis thasc. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid meicníocht chomhiomlánaithe chun ionchódú ar mhéid seasta a fháil le beartas ródú dinimiciúil. Tá cinneadh dinimiciúil á dhéanamh ag an mbeartas um ródú dinimiciúil maidir le cén t-eolas is gá a aistriú ó gach focal go dtí an t-ionchódú deiridh ar sheicheamh an téacs agus cá mhéad. Tar éis obair Capsule Network, déanaimid dhá bheartas ródaithe dinimiciúla a dhearadh chun aschuir ciseal ionchódaithe RNN/CNN a chomhiomlánú i veicteoir ionchódaithe deiridh. I gcomparáid leis na modhanna comhiomlánaithe eile, is féidir le ródú dinimiciúil na teachtaireachtaí a bheachtú de réir staid an veicteora ionchódaithe deiridh. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar chúig thasc aicmithe téacs go sáraíonn ár modh samhlacha comhiomlánaithe eile le corrlach suntasach. Eisítear cód foinse gaolmhar ar ár leathanach github. Eisítear cód foinse gaolmhar ar ár leathanach github.', 'ka': 'მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი იყო, როგორ ტექსტის კოდენციას გვექტორის კოდენციაში კოდირება, როგორ უფრო დააყენება ამ წინა გვექტორის (RNN/CNN-ის გამოსვლები) კოდირება გვექტორიში. საერთოდ მაქსი ან საშუალო ჯგუფის გამოყენება, რომელიც საშუალოდ და პასიგური გზა აგგრეგურაციის და საშუალოდ მოწყენების არსებობა. ჩვენ ამ დოკუნტში აგრეგურაციის მექანსი მივიღებთ განსაკუთრებული ზომის კონდიგურაციის კონდიგურაცია დინამიკური პოლიტიკის შესახებ. დინამიკური პოლიტიკა დინამიკურად გადაწყვეტის, რომ რა და რამდენი ინფორმაცია უნდა ყოველ სიტყვიდან ტექსტის კონფიგურაციის კონფიგურაციას გადატანა. Capsule ქსელის სამუშაო შემდეგ, ჩვენ ორი დინამიკური პოლიტიკის განაზღვრებით, რომ RNN/CNN კოდირების გადასვლების გადასვლების გადასვლება ბოლო კოდირების ვეკტორიში. სხვა ადგრეგურაციის მეტისთან შემდგომარებული, დინამიკური პროტირება შესაძლებელია შეტყობინება ბოლო კოდირების გვექტორის სტაციას. 5 ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციის დავალების ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი გამოჩენა, რომ ჩვენი მეთოდი სხვა ადგრაციური მოდელების გავაკეთება მნიშვნელოვანი მარტინით. ჟგყპჱან თჱრჲფნთ კჲე ვ ჲჟრაგვნ ნა დთრსბ ჟრპანა. ჟგყპჱან თჱრჲფნთ კჲე ვ ჲჟრაგვნ ნა დთრსბ ჟრპანა.', 'el': 'Ενώ έχει σημειωθεί μεγάλη πρόοδος στον τρόπο κωδικοποίησης μιας ακολουθίας κειμένου σε μια ακολουθία διανυσμάτων, έχει δοθεί λιγότερη προσοχή στον τρόπο συγκέντρωσης αυτών των προηγούμενων διανυσμάτων (εξόδων RNN/CNN) σε διανυσματικό κωδικοποίησης σταθερού μεγέθους. Συνήθως, χρησιμοποιείται μια απλή μέγιστη ή μέση συγκέντρωση, η οποία είναι ένας από κάτω προς τα πάνω και παθητικός τρόπος συγκέντρωσης και έλλειψης καθοδήγησης από πληροφορίες εργασίας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε έναν μηχανισμό συγκέντρωσης για την απόκτηση κωδικοποίησης σταθερού μεγέθους με μια δυναμική πολιτική δρομολόγησης. Η πολιτική δυναμικής δρομολόγησης αποφασίζει δυναμικά τι και πόσες πληροφορίες πρέπει να μεταφερθούν από κάθε λέξη στην τελική κωδικοποίηση της ακολουθίας κειμένου. Ακολουθώντας το έργο του Δικτύου Κάψου, σχεδιάζουμε δύο δυναμικές πολιτικές δρομολόγησης για τη συγκέντρωση των εξόδων του στρώματος κωδικοποίησης σε ένα τελικό διάνυσμα κωδικοποίησης. Σε σύγκριση με τις άλλες μεθόδους συγκέντρωσης, η δυναμική δρομολόγηση μπορεί να βελτιώσει τα μηνύματα σύμφωνα με την κατάσταση του τελικού διανυσματικού κωδικοποίησης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα σε πέντε εργασίες ταξινόμησης κειμένου δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά άλλα μοντέλα συγκέντρωσης. Σχετικός πηγαίος κώδικας κυκλοφορεί στη σελίδα μας. Σχετικός πηγαίος κώδικας κυκλοφορεί στη σελίδα μας.', 'hu': 'Bár sok előrelépés történt a szövegsorozat vektorok sorozatába történő kódolásában, kevesebb figyelmet fordítottunk arra, hogyan lehet ezeket a korábbi vektorokat (RNN/CNN kimeneteit) fix méretű kódolási vektorként összesíteni. Általában egy egyszerű maximális vagy átlagos összevonást használnak, ami alulról felfelé irányuló és passzív összevonási módja, valamint a feladat információinak útmutatásának hiánya. Ebben a tanulmányban egy összesítési mechanizmust javasolunk egy fix méretű kódolás dinamikus útválasztási politikával történő elérésére. A dinamikus útválasztási házirend dinamikusan eldönti, hogy az egyes szavakból milyen és mennyi információt kell átvinni a szövegsorozat végső kódolására. A Capsule Network munkáját követően két dinamikus útválasztási politikát dolgozunk ki az RNN/CNN kódolási réteg kimeneteinek összesítésére egy végső kódolási vektorrá. A többi aggregációs módszerrel összehasonlítva a dinamikus útválasztás finomíthatja az üzeneteket a végső kódolási vektor állapotának megfelelően. Öt szövegosztályozási feladat kísérleti eredményei azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk jelentős mértékben felülmúlja más aggregáló modelleket. A kapcsolódó forráskód megjelenik a github oldalunkon. A kapcsolódó forráskód megjelenik a github oldalunkon.', 'it': 'Mentre molti progressi sono stati fatti nel modo di codificare una sequenza di testo in una sequenza di vettori, meno attenzione è stata dedicata a come aggregare questi vettori precedenti (output di RNN/CNN) in un vettore di codifica a dimensione fissa. Di solito, viene utilizzato un semplice pooling massimo o medio, che è un modo dal basso e passivo di aggregazione e mancanza di guida dalle informazioni sulle attività. In questo articolo, proponiamo un meccanismo di aggregazione per ottenere una codifica a dimensione fissa con una politica di routing dinamico. Il criterio di routing dinamico decide dinamicamente che cosa e quante informazioni devono essere trasferite da ogni parola alla codifica finale della sequenza di testo. Seguendo il lavoro di Capsule Network, progettiamo due politiche di routing dinamico per aggregare gli output del livello di codifica RNN/CNN in un vettore di codifica finale. Rispetto agli altri metodi di aggregazione, il routing dinamico può affinare i messaggi in base allo stato del vettore di codifica finale. I risultati sperimentali su cinque attività di classificazione del testo mostrano che il nostro metodo supera di un margine significativo altri modelli di aggregazione. Il codice sorgente correlato viene rilasciato sulla nostra pagina github. Il codice sorgente correlato viene rilasciato sulla nostra pagina github.', 'ms': 'Walaupun banyak kemajuan telah dilakukan dalam bagaimana mengekodkan jujukan teks ke dalam jujukan vektor, kurang perhatian telah diberikan kepada bagaimana menggabungkan vektor sebelumnya (output RNN/CNN) ke vektor pengekodan saiz-tetap. Biasanya, pengumpulan maksimum mudah atau rata-rata digunakan, yang merupakan cara bawah-atas dan pasif pengumpulan dan kekurangan petunjuk dengan maklumat tugas. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan mekanisme agregasi untuk mendapatkan pengekodan saiz-tetap dengan kebijakan laluan dinamik. The dynamic routing policy is dynamically deciding that what and how much information need be transferred from each word to the final encoding of the text sequence.  Setelah kerja Rangkaian Capsule, kami merancang dua polisi pengekodan dinamik untuk menyempurnakan output lapisan pengekodan RNN/CNN ke vektor pengekodan akhir. Compared to the other aggregation methods, dynamic routing can refine the messages according to the state of final encoding vector. Keputusan percubaan pada lima tugas kelasukan teks menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami melampaui model agregat lain dengan margin yang signifikan. Kod sumber berkaitan dilepaskan di halaman github kita. Kod sumber berkaitan dilepaskan di halaman github kita.', 'ml': 'വെക്റ്ററുകളുടെ സെക്കന്റിലേക്ക് ഒരു ടെക്സ്റ്റ് സെക്കന്റ് എടുക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് വളരെ പുരോഗമുണ്ടാക്കിയിട്ടുണ്ട് സാധാരണയായി, ഒരു എളുപ്പമായ ഒരു കൂടുതല്\u200d അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d സാധാരണ പൂളിങ്ങ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഒരു താഴെയുള്ള കൂട്ടുകാരുടെയും പ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടുകൂട്ടത്തിന്റെ മെനിസ്റ്റമാണ് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നത്, ഒരു നിശ്ചിത വലിപ്പം  വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും എത്ര വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d മാറ്റി എടുക്കേണ്ട വാക്കുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പദാവലിയുടെ അവസാനത്തെ കോഡിങ്ങിലേക്ക് മാറ്റ ക്യാപ്സുള്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കിന്\u200dറെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തിന് ശേഷം നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് ഡൈനാമിക്ക് റൂട്ടിങ്ങ് പോളിസിസിക്ക് ചെയ്യുന്നു. RNN/CNN എന്\u200dക മറ്റുള്ള അഗ്രേഗങ്ങളുടെ രീതികളോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dക്കുക, ഡൈനാമിക് റൂട്ടിങ് അവസാനത്തെ കോഡിങ്ങ് വെക്റ്ററിന്റെ അവസ അഞ്ച് ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലികളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മറ്റു പ്രധാനപൂര്\u200dണ് Related source code is released on our github page. ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഉറവിട കോഡ് നമ്മുടെ ജിത്തുബ് താളില്\u200d വിട്ടുപോകുന്നു.', 'kk': 'Мәтін ретін векторлардың ретінде кодтау үшін көп жағдай жасалған, бұрын бұл векторларды (RNN/CNN шығысы) бағытты өлшемі кодтау векторына қалай жинақтау үшін тәртіпсіздік берілмейді. Әдетте қарапайым максимум не орташа жинақтау қолданылады, бұл тапсырма мәліметі бойынша төменгі және пассивні жинақтау және бағыттау жоқ. Бұл қағазда біз динамикалық маршруттау ережелерімен бағытталған өлшемді кодтамасын алу үшін қосымша механизмін ұсынамыз. Динамикалық жүгірту ережесі әрбір сөзден мәтін ретінің соңғы кодтамасына қанша мен қанша мәліметті тасымалдау керек дегенді динамикалық шешіп береді. Capsule Network жұмысынан кейін екі динамикалық ауруттау ережелерін RNN/CNN кодтамасының шығысын соңғы кодтамасының векторына жинақтау үшін құрамыз. Басқа жинақтау әдістеріне салыстырылған, динамикалық жүгірту хаттарды соңғы кодтама векторының күйіне сәйкес жаңартуға болады. Бес мәтін классификациялау тапсырмаларының эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің әдіміміздің басқа сәйкестіру үлгілерін маңызды шектеу арқылы шектеп жа Қосымша көзі кодын github парағында шығарылды. Қосымша көзі кодын github парағында шығарылды.', 'lt': 'Nors padaryta didelė pažanga koduojant teksto seką į vektorių seką, mažiau dėmesio skiriama, kaip sujungti šiuos ankstesnius vektorius (RNN/CNN rezultatus) į fiksuoto dydžio vektorių. Paprastai naudojamas paprastas maksimalus arba vidutinis sujungimas, kuris yra iš apačios į viršų ir pasyvus sujungimo būdas ir informacijos apie užduotis trūkumas. Šiame dokumente siūlome agregacijos mechanizmą, skirtą nustatyti fiksuoto dydžio kodavimą taikant dinamišką maršrutų nustatymo politiką. Dinamiška maršrutų nustatymo politika dinamiškai nusprendžia, kiek ir kiek informacijos reikia perduoti iš kiekvieno žodžio į galutinį teksto sekos kodavimą. Pagal Kapsulių tinklo veiklą sukuriame dvi dinamiškas maršrutų nustatymo politikas, kad RNN/CNN kodavimo sluoksnio rezultatai būtų sujungti į galutinį kodavimo vektorių. Palyginti su kitais agregaciniais metodais, dinaminis maršrutas gali patobulinti pranešimus atsižvelgiant į galutinio kodavimo vektoriaus būklę. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai dėl penkių teksto klasifikavimo užduočių rodo, kad mūsų metodas yra didesnis už kitus suvestinius modelius didele marža. Susijusis šaltinio kodas išleidžiamas mūsų github puslapyje. Susijusis šaltinio kodas išleidžiamas mūsų github puslapyje.', 'mk': 'While much progress has been made in how to encode a text sequence into a sequence of vectors, less attention has been paid to how to aggregate these preceding vectors (outputs of RNN/CNN) into fixed-size encoding vector.  Обично се користи едноставно максимално или просечно обединување, што е начин од долу нагоре и пасивно на агрегација и недостаток на упатување со информации за задачите. Во овој документ, предложуваме механизам за агрегација за да добиеме фиксна големина кодирање со динамичка политика на рутирање. Динамичката политика на рутирање динамично одлучува што и колку информации треба да се пренесат од секој збор на конечното кодирање на текстовата секвенца. По работата на Capsule Network, дизајнираме две динамични политики за рутирање за да ги агресираме излезите на RNN/CNN кодирачкиот слој во финален вектор за кодирање. Во споредба со другите методи на агрегација, динамичното рутирање може да ги рафинира пораките според состојбата на конечниот вектор на кодирање. Експерименталните резултати на пет задачи за класификација на текст покажуваат дека нашиот метод ги надминува другите агрегациони модели со значителна маргина. Врзаниот изворен код е објавен на нашата страница на github. Врзаниот изворен код е објавен на нашата страница на github.', 'mt': 'Filwaqt li sar ħafna progress fl-ikkodifikar ta’ sekwenza ta’ test f’sekwenza ta’ vetturi, ingħatat inqas attenzjoni biex dawn il-vetturi preċedenti (outputs ta’ RNN/CNN) jiġu aggregati f’vettur ta’ kodifikazzjoni ta’ daqs fiss. Ġeneralment, jintuża aggregazzjoni massima sempliċi jew medja, li hija mod minn isfel għal fuq u passiv ta’ aggregazzjoni u nuqqas ta’ gwida permezz ta’ informazzjoni dwar ix-xogħol. In this paper, we propose an aggregation mechanism to obtain a fixed-size encoding with a dynamic routing policy.  The dynamic routing policy is dynamically deciding that what and how much information need be transferred from each word to the final encoding of the text sequence.  Wara l-ħidma tan-Netwerk tal-Kapsuli, a ħna niddisinjaw żewġ politiki dinamiċi ta’ rotta biex jiġu aggregati r-riżultati tas-saff ta’ kodifikazzjoni RNN/CNN f’vettur finali ta’ kodifikazzjoni. Meta mqabbel mal-metodi l-oħra ta’ aggregazzjoni, ir-rotta dinamika tista’ tirfina l-messaġġi skont l-istat tal-vettur tal-kodifikazzjoni finali. Riżultati esperimentali fuq ħames kompiti ta’ klassifikazzjoni tat-test juru li l-metodu tagħna jaqbeż mudelli aggregati oħra b’marġini sinifikanti. Il-kodiċi tas-sors relatat jiġi rilaxxat fuq il-paġna github tagħna. Il-kodiċi tas-sors relatat jiġi rilaxxat fuq il-paġna github tagħna.', 'no': 'Mens mykje framgang er gjort i korleis tekstsekvensen skal koderast inn i ein rekkjefølgje av vektorar, har mindre oppmerking blitt betalt til korleis denne førre vektorane (utdata av RNN/CNN) skal samla til vektoren for fast storleik. Vanlegvis brukar ein enkel maksimal eller gjennomsnittlig samling, som er ein nedover og pasiv måte å samla og manglar hjelp etter oppgåveinformasjon. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit samlingsmekanismekanismen for å få ein fast storleik koding med ein dynamisk ruteringspolitikk. Den dynamiske ruteringspolitikken bestemmer dynamisk at kva og kor mykje informasjon må overførast frå kvar ord til den siste kodinga av tekstsekvensen. Følgjande arbeidet i Capsule Network lager vi to dynamiske ruteringspolitikk for å samla utdata av RNN/CNN-koding-laget til ein endelig kodingsvektor. Sammenlignet med dei andre samlingsmetodane kan dinamiske ruteringa refinera meldingane etter tilstanden til sluttkodingsvektoren. Eksperimentale resultat på fem tekstklassifikasjonar viser at metoden vårt utfører andre samlingsmodular med ein signifikant margin. Tilhøyrande kjeldekode er tilgjengeleg på githubsida vår. Tilhøyrande kjeldekode er tilgjengeleg på githubsida vår.', 'mn': 'Текст дарааллыг векторуудын дарааллаар кодлохын тулд маш олон хөгжлийн үр дүн гарч ирсэн ч өмнөх векторуудыг (RNN/CNN) тогтмол хэмжээний кодлох вектор руу хэрхэн цуглуулах талаар анхаарал төвлөрсөн байна. Ихэнхдээ энгийн хамгийн их эсвэл дундаж нийлүүлэлт хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ нь ажлын мэдээллээр дамжуулан нийлүүлэх, хүчтэй арга юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хөдөлгөөн хөдөлгөөн бодлого дээр тогтмол хэмжээ кодлох механизмийг санал болгож байна. Динамикийн хөдөлгөөн бодлого нь текст дараагийн сүүлийн кодлого руу юу болон хэр хэмжээний мэдээлэл хэрэгтэй вэ гэдгийг шийдэж байна. Capsule Network-ын ажлын дараа, бид RNN/CNN кодлого давхарын үр дүнг сүүлийн кодлого вектор руу нийлүүлэх хоёр хөдөлгөөн бодлогыг бүтээж байна. Бусад нийлүүлэлтийн аргыг харьцуулахад, динамик хөдөлгөөн нь хамгийн сүүлийн кодлох векторын байр суурь дахин шинэчлэх боломжтой болно. Таван текст хуваалтын даалгаварын туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь бусад нийлүүлэх загваруудыг чухал загвараар үр дүнтэй болгодог. Хамааралтай эх үүсвэрийн код бидний github хуудас дээр гаргагдсан. Хамааралтай эх үүсвэрийн код бидний github хуудас дээр гаргагдсан.', 'sr': 'Iako je napredak napredovao kako kodirati sekvenciju teksta u sekvenciju vektora, manje je pažnje obraćeno na način okupljanja ovih prethodnih vektora (izlaza RNN/CNN) u vektor kodiranja fiksnih veličin a. Obično se koristi jednostavno maksimalno ili prosječno okupljanje, što je donji i pasivni način aggregacije i nedostatak vodstva po informacijama o zadatku. U ovom papiru predlažemo agregacioni mehanizam da dobije fiksno kodiranje sa dinamičnom politikom rutiranja. Динамична рутингова политика динамично решава да се каква и колико информација треба преносити из сваке речи на конечну кодировку текстовог реченика. Nakon rada Capsule Network, dizajnirali smo dve dinamične rutinske politike kako bi okupili rezultate sloja kodiranja RNN/CNN u konačni vektor kodiranja. U usporedbi s drugim metodama aggregacije, dinamična rutiranja može oslabiti poruke prema stanju konačnog vektora kodiranja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na pet zadataka za klasifikaciju teksta pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi druge skupljanje modela značajnom marginom. Relativni izvorni kod je otpušten na našoj githubskoj stranici. Relativni izvorni kod je otpušten na našoj githubskoj stranici.', 'si': 'වෙක්ටර්ස් ක්\u200dරමයක් කොහොමද සංකේතනය කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනත් වෙක්ටර්ස් ක්\u200dරමයක් වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් අවධානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ, අවධානය අඩු වෙක් සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂයෙන්, සාමාන්\u200dය වැඩි හෝ සාමාන්\u200dය පුළුවන් පාවිච්චි කරනවා, ඒක තල්ලිය හා පුළුවන් විදියට සම් මේ පැත්තට, අපි සම්පූර්ණ පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනයක් ගන්න ප්\u200d හැම වචනයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විධානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරනවා මොනවද සහ කොච්චර තොරතුරු අවසාන කැප්සුල් ජාලයේ වැඩට පස්සේ, අපි අන්තිම සංකේතනය වෙක්ටර් වලට RNN/CNN සංකේතනයේ ප්\u200dරතිපූර්ණ ප්\u200dරතිපූර්ණ දෙකක් සං අනිත් සම්පූර්ණ විධානය සමඟ සම්පූර්ණයෙන්, සාමාන්\u200dය විධානය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පණිවිධානය පුළ පරීක්ෂණ විශේෂණ පහයේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විධානය විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ ව සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිපත්ත කෝඩ් අපේ ගිටුබ් පිටුවේ නිදහස් කරලා තියෙනවා. සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරතිපත්ත කෝඩ් අපේ ගිටුබ් පිටුවේ නිදහස් කරලා තියෙනවා.', 'so': 'Inta lagu sameeyo horumar badan sida loo koobi karo qoraal koox ka mid ah vector, waxaa la fiirsaday sida loo koobi karo waddooyinkan hore (ka soo baxay RNN/CNN) oo loo dhigo vector aad u adag. Usually, a simple max or average pooling is used, which is a bottom-up and passive way of aggregation and lack of guidance by task information.  Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedinnaa meymisyo dalbashada si a an u helno mid ku qoran kooxda wadista. Ceymiska wadista ayaa si dhab ah u go’aaminaya in macluumaadka iyo inta badan looga baahan yahay in laga wareejiyo hadal kasta oo ugu dambeeya koordinka qoraalka. Shaqo Kapsel Network kadib waxaynu qoraynaa laba siyaasad oo ku socota si aan uga gaarno bixinta RNN/CNN encoding layer oo ugu dambeyn vector kooding. Isbarbardhig u dhigi karo qaababka kaleba, wadista dhaqdhaqaaqa ah wuxuu ku beddeli karaa wargeyska si waafaqsan xaaladda ugu dambeeya qorsheynta. Imtixaanka waxaa ka mid ah shan shaqooyin tababarid oo qoraal ah, waxayna muuqataa in qaababkayagu uu ka soo bixiyo qaabab kale oo ka mid ah qaab aad u weyn. Kaarada asalka la xiriira waxaa lagu furaa bogagga github. Kaarada asalka la xiriira waxaa lagu furaa bogagga github.', 'pl': 'Podczas gdy poczyniono duże postępy w zakodowaniu sekwencji tekstowej w sekwencję wektorów, mniej uwagi zwrócono na to, jak agregować te poprzednie wektory (wyjścia RNN/CNN) w wektor kodowania o stałej wielkości. Zazwyczaj używa się prostego maksymalnego lub średniego poolingu, który jest oddolnym i biernym sposobem agregacji i braku wskazówek przez informacje o zadaniach. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy mechanizm agregacji pozwalający uzyskać kodowanie o stałym rozmiarze z dynamiczną polityką routingu. Polityka routingu dynamicznego dynamicznie decyduje o tym, jakie i ile informacji należy przenieść z każdego słowa do końcowego kodowania sekwencji tekstowej. Po pracy Capsule Network projektujemy dwie dynamiczne zasady routingu, aby agregować wyjścia warstwy kodowania RNN/CNN w końcowy wektor kodowania. W porównaniu do innych metod agregacji, dynamiczny routing może udoskonalić wiadomości zgodnie ze stanem końcowego wektora kodowania. Wyniki eksperymentalne pięciu zadań klasyfikacji tekstów pokazują, że nasza metoda znacznie przewyższa inne modele agregacji. Powiązany kod źródłowy jest publikowany na naszej stronie github. Powiązany kod źródłowy jest publikowany na naszej stronie github.', 'ro': 'Deși s-au făcut multe progrese în modul de codificare a unei secvențe de text într-o secvență de vectori, s-a acordat mai puțină atenție modului de agregare a acestor vectori anteriori (ieșirile RNN/CNN) în vector de codificare de dimensiuni fixe. De obicei, se utilizează o simplă combinare maximă sau medie, care este o modalitate de agregare pasivă și de jos în sus și lipsă de orientare prin informațiile despre sarcini. În această lucrare, propunem un mecanism de agregare pentru obținerea unei codări de dimensiuni fixe cu o politică de rutare dinamică. Politica de rutare dinamică decide dinamic dacă ce și cât de multe informații trebuie transferate de la fiecare cuvânt la codificarea finală a secvenței de text. În urma activității Capsule Network, proiectăm două politici dinamice de rutare pentru a agrega ieșirile stratului de codificare RNN/CNN într-un vector final de codificare. Comparativ cu celelalte metode de agregare, rutarea dinamică poate rafina mesajele în funcție de starea vectorului final de codificare. Rezultatele experimentale ale cinci sarcini de clasificare a textelor arată că metoda noastră depășește alte modele de agregare cu o marjă semnificativă. Codul sursă asociat este lansat pe pagina noastră github. Codul sursă asociat este lansat pe pagina noastră github.', 'sv': 'Även om mycket framsteg har gjorts i hur man kodar en textsekvens till en sekvens av vektorer, har mindre uppmärksamhet ägnats åt hur dessa föregående vektorer (utgångar av RNN/CNN) ska aggregeras till kodningsvektor i fast storlek. Vanligtvis används en enkel max eller genomsnittlig pooling, vilket är ett nedifrån och upp och passivt sätt att aggregera och brist på vägledning genom uppgiftsinformation. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en aggregeringsmekanism för att erhålla en kodning i fast storlek med en dynamisk routningsprincip. Den dynamiska routningsprincipen bestämmer dynamiskt att vad och hur mycket information som ska överföras från varje ord till den slutliga kodningen av textsekvensen. Efter arbetet med Capsule Network utformar vi två dynamiska routingpolicyer för att aggregera utgångarna av RNN/CNN kodningslager till en slutlig kodningsvektor. Jämfört med de andra aggregeringsmetoderna kan dynamisk routing förfina meddelandena enligt tillståndet för slutlig kodningsvektor. Experimentella resultat på fem textklassificeringsuppgifter visar att vår metod överträffar andra aggregeringsmodeller med en betydande marginal. Relaterad källkod släpps på vår github sida. Relaterad källkod släpps på vår github sida.', 'ta': 'While much progress has been made in how to encode a text sequence into a sequence of vectors, less attention has been paid to how to aggregate these preceding vectors (outputs of RNN/CNN) into fixed-size encoding vector.  பொதுவாக, ஒரு சுலபமான அதிகபட்ச அல்லது சராசரி தொகுதி பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, அது ஒரு கீழ் மேல் மற்றும் ஒரு கடவுச்சொல்லாத வழி மற்றும் பண இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு பிரித்தல் முறைமையை தேர்ந்தெடுக்க ஒரு நிலையான அளவு குறிமுறையாக்கம் ஒரு இயங்கும் தொ இயங்கும் சுழற்சி கொள்கைகள் தீவிரமாக தீர்மானிக்கப்படுகிறது ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்திலிருந்தும் எவ்வளவு தகவல் தேவைப்படும் என்பதை  காப்சுல் வலைப்பின்னல் செய்யும் பின்னர், நாம் இரண்டு இயந்திரமான வழி கொள்கைகளை வடிவமைக்கிறோம் RNN/CNN குறியீட்டு அடுக்கு வெளியீடு மற்ற சேர்த்தல் முறைகளை ஒப்பிட்டால், இயங்கும் வழி செலுத்தல் கடைசி குறியீட்டு நெறியின் நிலையை பொருத்தி செய்தி ஐந்து உரை வகைப்படுத்தல் பணிகளில் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் முக்கியமான முறையில் வேறு குறிப்பிடும் மாதிரிகளை செய்யும். தொடர்புடைய மூல குறியீடு எங்கள் ஜித்துப் பக்கத்தில் வெளியிடப்பட்டது. தொடர்புடைய மூல குறியீடு எங்கள் ஜித்துப் பக்கத்தில் வெளியிடப்பட்டது.', 'ur': 'اگرچہ بہت سی پیشرفت کی گئی ہے کہ ایک ٹیکسٹ کٹر کو ویکتروں کے کٹر میں کیسے اکڈ کرنا ہے، کم توجه کی گئی ہے کہ ان پہلے ویکتروں (RNN/CNN کے نتائج) کو ثابت ساز اکڈ کٹر میں کس طرح جمع کرنا ہے۔ معمولاً ایک ساده مہربانی یا متوسط پولینگ کا استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، جو دنیا کے اوپر اور پیوست طریقے سے جمع کرتا ہے اور کام معلومات کے ذریعہ ہدایت کی کمی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک جمع مکانیسم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ایک سیدھی راٹینگ پالیس کے ساتھ ایک سیدھی سایز اکنوڈینگ حاصل کریں۔ ڈینمانیک روٹینگ پولیسی ڈینمانیک فیصلہ کر رہی ہے کہ ہر کلمہ سے کس چیز اور کس قدر معلومات کی ضرورت ہے کہ ٹیکسٹ کٹینڈ کی آخری اکڈینڈ تک پہنچا جائے۔ کاپسول نیٹ ورک کے کام کے بعد، ہم دو ڈینامیک راوٹ پالیس طراحی کرتے ہیں کہ RNN/CNN اکنوڈینگ لائر کے نتائج کو ایک آخری اکنوڈینگ ویکتور میں جمع کریں. اور دوسری جمع طریقوں کے مقابلہ میں، ڈینامیک روٹینگ پیغام کو آخری اکڈینڈ ویکتور کی حالت کے مطابق پاک کرسکتا ہے. پانچ ٹیکسٹ کلاسیفون کے کاموں پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا طریقہ دوسرے جمع کرنے والے موڈلوں کو ایک اہم مرز کے ذریعہ زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ Related source code is released on our github page. Related source code is released on our github page.', 'uz': "Comment Odatda, oddiy ko'p ko'p koʻpaylik ishlatiladi. Bu vazifa maʼlumoti yordamida eng yuqori va maxfiy yoʻlni yo'q. Bu qogʻozda, biz qoidaga tayyorlik kodlash usuli qoidasi bilan qoidaga ega bo'lish uchun bir guruhlashtirish mechani talab qilamiz. Name Name @ info: whatsthis Experimental results on five text classification tasks show that our method outperforms other aggregating models by a significant margin.  Bogʻliq manba kodi github sahifasida chiqaradi. Bogʻliq manba kodi github sahifasida chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Mặc dù đã có nhiều tiến triển trong việc mã hóa chuỗi văn bản thành một chuỗi các cỗ máy, nhưng đã ít chú ý hơn về cách tổng hợp các cỗ máy trước (kết xuất của RNN/CNN) thành véc- tơ mã hóa kích thước cố định. Thông thường, một tụ điểm tối đa đơn giản hoặc trung bình được dùng, đó là một cách tổng hợp trực tiếp và thụ động và thiếu hướng dẫn qua thông tin nhiệm vụ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ chế tổng hợp để đạt được một quy tắc kích cỡ cố định với một chính sách lộ trình động. Điều chính sách lộ trình động động động sẽ quyết định xem phải chuyển thông tin gì và bao nhiêu từ mỗi từ cho đến mã số đoạn cuối. Theo công trình của Đại đội Capsue, chúng tôi thiết kế hai chính sách lộ trình động động để tổng hợp kết kết xuất của lớp mã số RNN/CNN thành véc- tơ mã số cuối cùng. So với các phương pháp tổng hợp khác, đường dẫn khí có thể lọc các thông điệp theo tình trạng của véc- tơ mã số cuối cùng. Kết quả thí nghiệm với năm nhiệm vụ phân loại văn bản cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta hoàn thành các mô hình tổng hợp khác với một mức ký thừa. Những mã nguồn liên quan được phát hành trên trang Gitmo. Những mã nguồn liên quan được phát hành trên trang Gitmo.', 'bg': 'Въпреки че е постигнат голям напредък в кодирането на текстова последователност в поредица от вектори, по-малко внимание е отделено на това как да се обединят тези предшестващи вектори (изходи на RNN/CNN) в кодиращ вектор с фиксиран размер. Обикновено се използва прост максимален или среден пулинг, който е отдолу нагоре и пасивен начин на агрегиране и липса на насоки чрез информация за задачите. В настоящата статия предлагаме агрегиращ механизъм за получаване на кодиране с фиксиран размер с политика на динамично маршрутизиране. Политиката за динамично маршрутизиране динамично решава какво и колко информация трябва да бъде прехвърлена от всяка дума към окончателното кодиране на текстовата последователност. Следвайки работата на Капсул Мрежа, ние проектираме две динамични правила за маршрутизиране, за да обединим изходите от кодиращия слой в окончателен кодиращ вектор. В сравнение с другите методи за агрегиране, динамичното маршрутизиране може да прецизира съобщенията според състоянието на крайния вектор на кодиране. Експерименталните резултати по пет задачи за класификация на текста показват, че методът ни надминава други модели за агрегиране със значителен марж. Свързан изходен код е публикуван на нашата страница. Свързан изходен код е публикуван на нашата страница.', 'nl': 'Hoewel er veel vooruitgang is geboekt in het coderen van een tekstreeks in een reeks vectoren, is er minder aandacht besteed aan hoe deze voorgaande vectoren (outputs van RNN/CNN) kunnen worden samengevoegd tot een coderingsvector met vaste grootte. Meestal wordt een eenvoudige max of gemiddelde pooling gebruikt, wat een bottom-up en passieve manier is van aggregatie en gebrek aan begeleiding door taakinformatie. In dit artikel stellen we een aggregatiemechanisme voor om een vaste codering te verkrijgen met een dynamisch routingbeleid. Het beleid voor dynamische routering bepaalt dynamisch welke en hoeveel informatie moet worden overgedragen van elk woord naar de uiteindelijke codering van de tekstreeks. Naar aanleiding van het werk van Capsule Network ontwerpen we twee dynamische routeringsbeleid om de outputs van RNN/CNN coderingslaag te aggregeren tot een definitieve coderingsvector. Vergeleken met de andere aggregatiemethoden, kan dynamische routing de berichten verfijnen volgens de toestand van de uiteindelijke coderingsvector. Experimentele resultaten op vijf tekstclassificatietaken tonen aan dat onze methode andere aggregatiemodellen aanzienlijk overtreft. Gerelateerde broncode is vrijgegeven op onze github pagina. Gerelateerde broncode is vrijgegeven op onze github pagina.', 'da': 'Mens der er gjort store fremskridt i hvordan man koder en tekstsekvens i en sekvens af vektorer, er mindre opmærksomhed blevet lagt på, hvordan man samler disse tidligere vektorer (output af RNN/CNN) til kodning vektor i fast størrelse. Normalt anvendes en simpel maks. eller gennemsnitlig pooling, hvilket er en bottom-up og passiv måde at aggregeringere og manglende vejledning ved hjælp af opgaveoplysninger. I denne artikel foreslår vi en aggregeringsmekanisme til at opnå en kodning i fast størrelse med en dynamisk routing politik. Den dynamiske rutepolitik beslutter dynamisk, at hvad og hvor meget information der skal overføres fra hvert ord til den endelige kodning af tekstsekvensen. Efter arbejdet i Capsule Network, designer vi to dynamiske routing politikker til at samle output af RNN / CNN kodning lag til en endelig kodning vektor. Sammenlignet med de andre aggregeringsmetoder kan dynamisk routing finjustere meddelelserne i henhold til tilstanden for endelig kodning vektor. Eksperimentelle resultater på fem tekstklassifikationsopgaver viser, at vores metode overgår andre aggregeringsmodeller med en betydelig margin. Relateret kildekode udgives på vores github side. Relateret kildekode udgives på vores github side.', 'de': 'Zwar wurden große Fortschritte bei der Kodierung einer Textsequenz in eine Sequenz von Vektoren erzielt, jedoch wurde weniger darauf geachtet, wie diese vorhergehenden Vektoren (Ausgänge von RNN/CNN) in einen Kodierungsvektor mit fester Größe aggregiert werden können. Normalerweise wird ein einfaches max oder average pooling verwendet, das eine Bottom-up und passive Art der Aggregation und fehlenden Führung durch Aufgabeninformationen ist. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen Aggregationsmechanismus vor, um eine Kodierung fester Größe mit einer dynamischen Routing-Richtlinie zu erhalten. Die Richtlinie für dynamisches Routing entscheidet dynamisch, welche und wie viele Informationen von jedem Wort in die endgültige Codierung der Textsequenz übertragen werden müssen. Im Anschluss an die Arbeit von Capsule Network entwerfen wir zwei dynamische Routing-Richtlinien, um die Ausgaben der RNN/CNN-Codierungsschicht in einen endgültigen Codierungsvektor zu aggregieren. Im Vergleich zu den anderen Aggregationsmethoden kann dynamisches Routing die Nachrichten entsprechend dem Zustand des endgültigen Kodierungsvektors verfeinern. Experimentelle Ergebnisse bei fünf Textklassifizierungsaufgaben zeigen, dass unsere Methode andere Aggregationsmodelle deutlich übertrifft. Der zugehörige Quellcode wird auf unserer github Seite veröffentlicht. Der zugehörige Quellcode wird auf unserer github Seite veröffentlicht.', 'ko': '텍스트 시퀀스를 벡터 시퀀스로 인코딩하는 데는 이미 큰 진전이 있었지만, 이러한 이전 벡터(RN/CNN의 출력)를 고정 크기의 인코딩 벡터로 모으는 방법에는 큰 관심이 없었다.보통 간단한 최대 또는 평균 탱크를 사용하는데 이것은 아래에서 위로 수동적으로 집합하는 방식으로 임무 정보의 지도가 부족하다.본고에서 우리는 동적 루트 전략을 통해 고정된 크기의 인코딩을 얻을 수 있는 집합 메커니즘을 제시했다.동적 루트 정책은 모든 단어에서 텍스트 서열까지의 최종 인코딩이 무엇을 전송하고 얼마나 많은 정보를 전송해야 하는지를 동적으로 결정하는 것이다.캡슐 네트워크의 작업 후에 우리는 두 가지 동적 루트 전략을 설계하여 RNN/CNN 인코딩층의 출력을 최종 인코딩 벡터로 집합시켰다.다른 집합 방법에 비해 동적 루트는 최종 인코딩 벡터의 상태에 따라 메시지를 세분화할 수 있다.다섯 개의 텍스트 분류 임무에서의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 다른 집합 모델보다 현저한 우위를 가진다.관련 소스 코드가 Googlegithub 페이지에 발표되었습니다.관련 소스 코드가 Googlegithub 페이지에 발표되었습니다.', 'id': 'Meskipun banyak kemajuan telah dilakukan dalam bagaimana mengekodikan urutan teks ke dalam urutan vektor, kurang perhatian telah diberikan kepada bagaimana menggabungkan vektor sebelumnya (keluaran RNN/CNN) ke vektor pengekodan ukuran tetap. Biasanya, pengumpulan maksimum sederhana atau rata-rata digunakan, yang merupakan cara dari bawah ke atas dan pasif untuk agregasi dan kekurangan petunjuk dengan informasi tugas. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan mekanisme agregasi untuk mendapatkan pengekodan ukuran tetap dengan kebijakan rute dinamik. Polisi routing dinamik secara dinamik memutuskan bahwa apa dan berapa banyak informasi yang perlu dipindahkan dari setiap kata ke pengekodan akhir dari urutan teks. Setelah kerja jaringan kapsul, kami merancang dua kebijakan ruting dinamik untuk agregasi hasil dari lapisan pengekodan RNN/CNN ke vektor pengekodan akhir. Berbanding dengan metode agregasi lainnya, routing dinamik dapat memperbaiki pesan menurut keadaan vektor pengekodan akhir. Hasil eksperimental pada lima tugas klasifikasi teks menunjukkan bahwa metode kita melebihi model agregasi lainnya dengan margin yang signifikan. Kode sumber terhubung dilepaskan di halaman github kita. Kode sumber terhubung dilepaskan di halaman github kita.', 'sw': 'Wakati maendeleo mengi yametokea katika namna ya kutangaza mfululizo wa maandishi katika mfululizo wa sekta ya vector, hatua ndogo imejadiliwa namna ya kuingiza vectori hizi zilizopita (matokeo ya RNN/CNN) katika vectori yenye kiwango kikubwa cha kodi. Kwa kawaida, punguzo la kawaida au la kawaida linatumiwa, ambalo ni njia ya chini na yenye uhakika wa uchochezi na ukosefu wa uongozi kwa taarifa za kazi. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa kuunganisha ili kupata utaratibu wa kiwango kikubwa na sera ya utaratibu. Sera ya uchunguzi wa kimaadili inaamua kuwa ni nini na kiasi gani taarifa zinahitaji kubadilishwa kutoka kwa kila neno hadi utoaji wa mwisho wa mfululizo wa maandishi. Following the work of Capsule Network, we design two dynamic routing policies to aggregate the outputs of RNN/CNN encoding layer into a final encoding vector.  Kulinganishwa na mbinu nyingine za upiganaji, utaratibu wa nguvu unaweza kuboresha ujumbe kwa mujibu wa hali ya ukodi wa mwisho. Matokeo ya majaribio yanayotokana na kazi tano za kutangaza maandishi yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu inafanya mifano mingine ya kuboresha kwa kiwango kikubwa. Kodi la vyanzo vinavyohusiana imeachiwa kwenye ukurasa wetu wa github. Kodi la vyanzo vinavyohusiana imeachiwa kwenye ukurasa wetu wa github.', 'tr': "Bir tekst sequencesini vektörler arasına nasıl kodlamak üzere çok ilerlemede, bu ön vektörleri (RNN/CNN çizgileri) sabit ölçüde kodlama vektöre nasıl toplamak üçin az ünsü berildi. Genelde basit bir max veya ortalama toplama kullanılır, bu da a şağıdaki ve pasif bir toplama yoludur ve görev bilgisi tarafından yol gösterim yoktur. Bu kagyzda, dinamik ýöremek politikasy bilen gatnaşmak mekanizmany teklip edýäris Dinamik ýöremek politikasy dinamik görkezilýän çözümler, her sözden soňky ködleme üçin näçe informasiýa we näçe informasiýa gönderilmelidigini karar berýär. Capsul Network'iň işinden soňra, RNN/CNN ködleme katmanyň netijesini soňky bir ködleme vektöre toplamak üçin iki dinamik çykyş setirini tasarlýarys. Beýleki toplama yöntemlerine karşılaştırılýar, dinamik göçürmek mesajlary soňky ködleme vektörinin durumyna görä tertibleyebilir. Beş metin klasifikasyýanyň netijesi üçin örän netijesi biziň metodamyzyň beýleki nusgalary möhüm gabdalyk bilen çykaryp ýöredigini görkez. Github sahypanymyzda baglanýan çeşme kody çykardy. Github sahypanymyzda baglanýan çeşme kody çykardy.", 'fa': 'در حالی که پیشرفت زیادی در حالی که چگونه یک دستور متن را به یک دستور ویکتورها رمزبندی کند، توجه کمتر به چگونه جمع کردن این ویکتورهای پیشینی (نتیجه های RNN/CNN) به ویکتور رمزبندی اندازه ثابت شده است. معمولاً یک مجموعه ساده یا متوسط ساده استفاده می\u200cشود، که یک روش پایین و پایین\u200cتر از جمع کردن و کمبود هدایت توسط اطلاعات کار است. در این کاغذ، ما یک مکانیسم جمع را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا یک رمزبندی اندازه ثابت با یک سیاست مسیر دینامیک برگیرد. سیاست روند\u200cکننده\u200cی دینامیک تصمیم می\u200cگیرد که چه اطلاعات و چقدر از هر کلمه به آخرین رمز\u200cبندی متن نیاز دارد. بعد از کار شبکه کاپسول، ما دو سیاست\u200cهای مسیر دینامیک را طراحی می\u200cکنیم تا نتیجه\u200cهای لایه رمزبندی RNN/CNN را به یک ویکتور آخرین رمزبندی جمع کنیم. در مقایسه با روش\u200cهای دیگر جمع\u200cآوری، مسیر دینامیک می\u200cتواند پیغام\u200cها را بر اساس وضعیت ویکتور آخرین رمزبندی تازه\u200cسازی کند. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی پنج وضعیت مختصات متن نشان می\u200cدهند که روش ما با یک مرز بزرگی دیگر مدل\u200cهای جمع\u200cآوری را از دست داده است. کد منبع ارتباطي در صفحه گيت هوب ما آزاد شده کد منبع ارتباطي در صفحه گيت هوب ما آزاد شده', 'af': "Alhoewel baie vordering is gemaak in hoe om 'n teks sekwensie te kodeer binne 'n sekwensie van vektore, minder aandag is betaal na hoe om hierdie voorheende vektore (uitvoerdes van RNN/CNN) in vaste grootte koderingsvektor te samelei. Gewoonlik word 'n eenvoudige maks of gemiddelde pooling gebruik, wat is 'n onderste en pasiewe manier van samekoms en mislukking van gids deur opdraginligting. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n samekorgasiemekanisme om 'n vaste grootte kodering te kry met 'n dinamiese routing beleid. Die dinamiese routing beleid is dinamies besluit dat wat en hoeveel inligting nodig moet van elke woord na die eindelike kodering van die teks volgorde oordra word. Volgens die werk van Capsule Netwerk, ontwerp ons twee dinamiese routing beleid om die uitvoerdes van RNN/CNN-enkodering laag in 'n eindelike enkodering vektor te koppel. Vergelyk met die ander aggregasie metodes, dinamiese routing kan die boodskappe refiner volgens die staat van die eindelike enkodering vektor. Eksperimentale resultate op vyf teks klassifikasie taak vertoon dat ons metode ander groepende modele deur 'n betekende marge uitvoer. Verwante bronkode is verlos op ons github bladsy. Verwante bronkode is verlos op ons github bladsy.", 'sq': 'Ndërsa është bërë shumë përparim në mënyrën se si të kodohet një sekuencë teksti në një sekuencë vektorësh, më pak vëmendje është kushtuar se si të bashkohen këto vektorë të mëparshëm (daljet e RNN/CNN) në vektorin e kodimit të madhësisë fikse. Zakonisht përdoret një mbledhje maksimum apo mesatare e thjeshtë, e cila është një mënyrë nga poshtë lart dhe pasive për agregim dhe mungesë udhëzimi nga informacioni i detyrave. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një mekanizëm agregimi për të marrë një kodim të madhësisë së fiksuar me një politikë dinamike rutimi. Politika dinamike e udhëtimit është duke vendosur dinamikisht se çfarë dhe sa informacioni duhet të transferohet nga çdo fjalë në kodimin përfundimtar të sekuencës së tekstit. Pas punës së Rrjetit të Kapsulave, ne dizajnojmë dy politika dinamike për të bashkuar rezultatet e nivelit të kodimit RNN/CNN në një vektor të kodimit përfundimtar. Krahasuar me metodat e tjera të agregimit, rutimi dinamik mund të rafinojë mesazhet sipas gjendjes së vektorit përfundimtar të kodimit. Rezultatet eksperimentale në pesë detyra klasifikuese teksti tregojnë se metoda jonë mbivlerëson modele të tjera agregatuese me një margin të rëndësishëm. Kodi i lidhur me burimin është lëshuar në faqen tonë të githubit. Kodi i lidhur me burimin është lëshuar në faqen tonë të githubit.', 'am': 'ምንም እንኳን የጽሑፍ ቅድሚያ ወደ ቅድመት ውጤት መቀናኘት እንደተደረገ፣ እነዚህን የቀድሞውን vector (RNN/CNN ውጤቶች) እንዴት እንደመጨመር መጠን አካባቢ መሆኑን እንደገና ማስታወቂያ ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ቀላል ማህበረሰብ ወይም በመካከለኛ መቆጣጠር ይጠቀማል፡፡ ይህ የስራ መረጃዎች መግለጫ እና የመግለጫ መንገድ ነው፡፡ In this paper, we propose an aggregation mechanism to obtain a fixed-size encoding with a dynamic routing policy.  የጥያቄ ማቀናጃ ፖሊሲ ከሁሉም ቃላት ምን እና ምን ዓይነት መረጃዎች ከጽሑፍ መጨረሻ የጽሑፍ ክፍል እንዲለወጡ በአዲስ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ ከካምፓሊስ መረብ ከተደረገ በኋላ የRNN/CNN የሆኑት ውጤቶች ወደ መጨረሻ የencoding መክፈቻ መግለጫ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር የአምስት ጽሑፍ መግለጫ ስራዎችን የሚያሳየው ምርመራ ውጤቶች በተለየ ግንኙነት አካባቢ ማሳየት ነው፡፡ የኩነቶች ኮድ በgithub ገጽ ላይ ተለይቷል፡፡ የኩነቶች ኮድ በgithub ገጽ ላይ ተለይቷል፡፡', 'hr': 'Iako je napredak napredovao kako kodirati sekvenciju teksta u sekvenciju vektora, manje je pažnje obraćeno na način okupljanja tih prethodnih vektora (ishoda RNN/CNN) u vektor za fiksnu veličinu kodiranja. Obično se koristi jednostavno maksimalno ili prosječno okupljanje, što je donji i pasivni način aggregacije i nedostatak vodstva po informacijama o zadatku. U ovom papiru predlažemo mehanizam aggregacije kako bi dobili fiksni kodiranje s dinamičnom politikom rutiranja. Dinamički rješenje dinamički odlučuje kako se od svake riječi i koliko informacija treba prenijeti na konačni kodiranje teksta sekvence. Nakon rada Capsule Network, dizajnirali smo dvije dinamične politike rutiranja kako bi skupili rezultate sloja kodiranja RNN/CNN u konačni vektor kodiranja. U usporedbi s drugim metodama aggregacije, dinamična rutiranja može oslabiti poruke prema stanju konačnog vektora kodiranja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na pet zadataka klasifikacije teksta pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi druge skupljanje modela značajnom marginom. Relativni izvorni kod je objavljen na našoj githubskoj stranici. Relativni izvorni kod je objavljen na našoj githubskoj stranici.', 'hy': 'Մինչդեռ շատ առաջընթաց է կատարվել տեքստի հաջորդականության կոդավորման մեջ վեկտորների հաջորդականությամբ, ավելի քիչ ուշադրություն է դարձել, թե ինչպես հավաքել նախորդ վեկտորները (ՌՆՆ-ի և ԿՆՆ-ի արտադրությունները) ֆիքսավոր չափի կոդավորման վեկտորների: Սովորաբար օգտագործվում է մի պարզ մաքսավոր կամ միջին հավաքածու, որը հանձնարարության տեղեկատվության միջոցով միավորման ներքև և պասիվ միջոց է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք համախմբման մեխանիզմ, որպեսզի ստանանք ֆիքսավոր չափի կոդավորումը դինամիկ ճանապարհի քաղաքականությամբ: Դանիմական ճանապարհի քաղաքականությունը դինամիկ կերպով որոշում է, թե ինչ և ինչքա՞ն տեղեկատվություն պետք է փոխանցվի յուրաքանչյուր բառից դեպի տեքստի հաջորդականության վերջնական կոդավորումը: Կապուլլային ցանցի աշխատանքից հետո մենք նախագծում ենք երկու դինամիկ ուղղության քաղաքականություն, որպեսզի համախմբենք ՌՆՆ-ի և ՍՆ-ի կոդավորման շերտի արտադրանքները վերջնական կոդավորման վեկտորի: Համեմատելով այլ ագրեգացիայի մեթոդների հետ, դինամիկ ճանապարհորդումը կարող է բարելավել հաղորդագրությունները ըստ վերջնական կոդավորման վեկտորի վիճակի: Հինգ տեքստի դասակարգման խնդիրների փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը արտադրում է այլ համախմբվող մոդելներ նշանակալի տարբերակով: Համաբերված աղբյուրների կոդը արտադրվում է մեր giտրուբ էջի վրա: Համաբերված աղբյուրների կոդը արտադրվում է մեր giտրուբ էջի վրա:', 'az': 'Bir metin seçgisini vektörlərin seçgisinə kodlaması üçün çox ilerləşdirilmiş halda, bu əvvəlki vektörləri (RNN/CNN çıxışları) sabit ölçü kodlama vektörünə necə toplamaq üçün daha az pay verildi. Genellikle, basit max ya da orta birlikdə istifadə edilir. Bu, iş məlumatları ilə a şağı və pasiv yoldur. Bu kağızda, dinamik rutlama siyasəti ilə sabit ölçü kodlaması üçün toplama mekanizmasını təklif edirik. Dinamik yollama siyasəti dinamik olaraq çəkir ki, hər sözdən mətn seçgisinin son kodlamasına nə və nə qədər məlumat göndərilməlidir. Capsule Ağının işindən sonra, RNN/CNN kodlama səviyyəsinin sonuncu kodlama vektoru birləşdirmək üçün iki dinamik yol siyasi tasarladıq. Diğer toplama metodları ilə qarşılaşdırıldı, dinamik rotasiya mesajlarını son kodlama vektorunun durumu ilə refine edə bilər. Beş metin klasifikasiya işlərində təcrübə sonuçları göstərir ki, metodumuzun digər toplama modellərini möhkəm bir margin ilə daha üstün etdiyini göstərir. İlişkili mənbə kodu github səhifələrimizdə yayınlanar. İlişkili mənbə kodu github səhifələrimizdə yayınlanar.', 'bn': 'যদিও বেশী অগ্রগতি তৈরি করা হয়েছে কিভাবে ভেক্টরের ক্ষেত্রে একটি টেক্সট সেকেন্সের সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত কিভাবে এই পূর্ববর্তী ভেক্টরের (RNN/CNN সাধারণত, সাধারণত একটি সাধারণত বা সর্বোচ্চ পুলিং ব্যবহার করা হয়, যা কাজের তথ্য দ্বারা নির্দেশ প্রদান করা এবং কাজের তথ্যের এই পত্রিকায় আমরা একটি গ্রেগিং মেক্সিমেন্ট প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে একটি নির্ধারিত রুটিং নীতি নিয়ে একটি স্থায়ী আকারের কোডিং প্রতিটি শব্দ থেকে কি এবং কতটা তথ্য প্রতিটি শব্দ থেকে টেক্সটের শেষ এনকোডিং পর্যন্ত সিদ্ধান্ত নিয়েছে। ক্যাপ্সুল নেটওয়ার্কের কাজের পরে আমরা দুটি ডায়ান্ডামিক রুটিং নীতি নকশা করি যাতে RNN/CNN এনকোডিং স্টেলের আউটপুট বাড়াতে পারি একটি শেষ এনক অন্যান্য গ্রেগ্রেটিং পদ্ধতির সাথে তুলনায়, ডাইনামিক রুটিং বার্তাগুলো চূড়ান্ত এনকোডিং ভেক্টরের অবস্থার অনুসার পাঁচটি টেক্সট গ্রাফিকেশন কাজের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ মার্গিন দ্বারা অন্যান্য গ্ সম্পর্কিত উৎস কোড আমাদের জিথুব পাতায় মুক্তি প্রদান করা হয়েছে। সম্পর্কিত উৎস কোড আমাদের জিথুব পাতায় মুক্তি প্রদান করা হয়েছে।', 'et': "Kuigi tekstijada kodeerimisel vektorite jadaks on tehtud palju edusamme, on vähem tähelepanu pööratud sellele, kuidas koondada need eelnevad vektorid (RNN/CNN väljundid) fikseeritud suurusega kodeerimisvektoriks. Tavaliselt kasutatakse lihtsat maksimaalset või keskmist koondamist, mis on alt-üles ja passiivne koondamisviis ning ülesannete teabe juhiste puudumine. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja agregatsioonimehhanismi, et saada fikseeritud suurusega kodeering koos dünaamilise marsruutimispoliitikaga. Dünaamiline marsruutimispoliitika otsustab dünaamiliselt, millist ja kui palju teavet tuleb igalt sõnalt edastada tekstijada lõplikku kodeeringusse. Pärast Capsule Network'i tööd töötame välja kaks dünaamilist marsruutimispoliitikat, et koondada RNN/CNN kodeerimiskihi väljundid lõplikuks kodeerimisvektoriks. Võrreldes teiste koondamismeetoditega saab dünaamiline marsruutimine sõnumeid täpsustada vastavalt lõpliku kodeerimisvektori olekule. Viie teksti klassifitseerimisülesande eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie meetod on oluliselt suurem kui teised koondamismudelid. Seotud lähtekood avaldatakse meie githubi lehel. Seotud lähtekood avaldatakse meie githubi lehel.", 'bs': 'Iako je napredak napredovao kako kodirati sekvenciju teksta u sekvencu vektora, manje je pažnje obraćeno na način okupljanja tih prethodnih vektora (ishoda RNN/CNN) u vektor fiksnog kodiranja veličine. Obično se koristi jednostavno maksimalno ili prosječno okupljanje, što je donji i pasivni način aggregacije i nedostatak vodstva po informacijama o zadatku. U ovom papiru predlažemo mehanizam aggregacije da bi dobili fiksno kodiranje sa dinamičnom politikom rutiranja. Dinamički rješavanje dinamički odlučuje da se od svake riječi i koliko informacija treba prebaciti na konačni kodiranje tekstske sekvence. Nakon rada Capsule Network, dizajniramo dve dinamične politike rutiranja kako bi skupili ishod sloja kodiranja RNN/CNN u konačni vektor kodiranja. U usporedbi s drugim metodama aggregacije, dinamična rutiranja može oslabiti poruke prema stanju konačnog vektora kodiranja. Eksperimentalni rezultati na pet zadataka klasifikacije teksta pokazuju da naša metoda iznosi druge skupljanje modela značajnom marginom. Relativni izvorni kod je objavljen na našoj githubskoj stranici. Relativni izvorni kod je objavljen na našoj githubskoj stranici.', 'ca': "Mentre s'ha aconseguit molt progrés en codificar una seqüència de text en una seqüència de vectors, s'ha prestat menys atenció a com agrupar aquests vectors anteriors (resultats de RNN/CNN) en un vector de codificació de mida fixa. Normalment s'utilitza una combinació màxima o mitjana simple, que és una manera d'agregació de baix a dalt i passiva i la falta de orientació per informació sobre les tasques. In this paper, we propose an aggregation mechanism to obtain a fixed-size encoding with a dynamic routing policy.  La política dinàmica de routing està decidint dinàmicament què i quanta informació s'ha de transferir de cada paraula a la codificació final de la seqüència de text. Després de la feina de la Red de Capsules, dissenyem dues polítiques dinàmiques de routing per agrupar els resultats de la capa de codificació RNN/CNN en un vector final de codificació. Comparat amb els altres mètodes d'agregació, la ruta dinàmica pot refinar els missatges segons l'estat del vector final de codificació. Els resultats experimentals de cinc tasques de classificació de textos mostren que el nostre mètode supera altres models agregats per un marge significatiu. El codi d'origen relacionat es publica a la pàgina github. El codi d'origen relacionat es publica a la pàgina github.", 'cs': 'Zatímco bylo dosaženo velkého pokroku v kódování textové sekvence do sekvence vektorů, méně pozornosti bylo věnováno tomu, jak tyto předchozí vektory (výstupy RNN/CNN) agregovat do kódovacího vektoru pevné velikosti. Obvykle se používá jednoduchý max nebo průměrný pooling, což je zdola nahoru a pasivní způsob agregace a nedostatek vedení informací o úkolech. V tomto článku navrhujeme agregační mechanismus pro získání kódování pevné velikosti s dynamickou politikou směrování. Zásada dynamického směrování dynamicky rozhoduje o tom, co a kolik informací je třeba přenést z každého slova do konečného kódování textové sekvence. Na základě práce Capsule Network navrhujeme dvě dynamické směrovací politiky pro agregování výstupů RNN/CNN kódovací vrstvy do konečného kódovacího vektoru. Ve srovnání s ostatními agregačními metodami může dynamické směrování upřesnit zprávy podle stavu konečného kódovacího vektoru. Experimentální výsledky pěti úloh klasifikace textu ukazují, že naše metoda výrazně předčí ostatní agregační modely. Související zdrojový kód je vydán na naší stránce github. Související zdrojový kód je vydán na naší stránce github.', 'fi': 'Vaikka tekstisekvenssin koodaamisessa vektorisekvenssiksi on edistytty paljon, vähemmän huomiota on kiinnitetty siihen, miten nämä edeltävät vektorit (RNN/CNN:n tuotokset) yhdistetään kiinteäkokoiseksi koodausvektoriksi. Yleensä käytetään yksinkertaista maksimi- tai keskitason yhdistämistä, joka on alhaalta ylöspäin suuntautuva ja passiivinen aggregointitapa ja tehtävätietojen ohjaamisen puute. Tässä työssä ehdotamme aggregaatiomekanismia, jolla saadaan kiinteäkokoinen koodaus dynaamisella reitityspolitiikalla. Dynaaminen reitityskäytäntö päättää dynaamisesti, mitä ja kuinka paljon tietoa jokaisesta sanasta on siirrettävä tekstisarjan lopulliseen koodaukseen. Capsule Networkin työn jälkeen suunnittelemme kaksi dynaamista reititystä yhdistämään RNN/CNN-koodauskerroksen tuotokset lopulliseksi koodausvektoriksi. Verrattuna muihin aggregointimenetelmiin dynaaminen reititys voi tarkentaa viestejä lopullisen koodausvektorin tilan mukaan. Kokeelliset tulokset viidestä tekstiluokittelutehtävästä osoittavat, että menetelmämme suoriutuu merkittävästi muista aggregointimalleista. Liittyvä lähdekoodi on julkaistu meidän github sivullamme. Liittyvä lähdekoodi on julkaistu meidän github sivullamme.', 'jv': 'Genbote Awak dhéwé, akeh mbubutané perusahaan nyang sampeyan ampuhé, iki dadi donge lan kelas-perusahaan langgar sampeyan ngon kudu nggawe informasi apakno. Nang kuwi iki, kita mudhaya ngawehi mejane kuwi nggawe buturan kanggo ngono koding kuwi ora bisa stampen karo politik sing dadi nggawe barang apik. Tuning Nyong nambah capsule Network Sample rate Refirming Awak dhéwé kelduk punika dipoleh ing dhéwé gi. Awak dhéwé kelduk punika dipoleh ing dhéwé gi.', 'ha': "Waka da aka samar da gwargwadon da za'a kodi wani matsayi cikin wani sequence na shiryoyi, to, an kiyaye ƙaranci wa wajen cire waɗannan shiryoyi na gabata (OutOutputs of RNN/CNN) zuwa hanya mai daidaita kodi-girma. A ɗabi'a, ana yi amfani da wata makõmi mai sauƙi ko kuma a tsakanin maki, wannan yana da wata hanya bakin-baka kuma yana kasancẽwa na shiryarwa da maɓallin aiki. In this paper, we propose an aggregation mechanism to obtain a fixed-size encoding with a dynamic routing policy.  @ action: button Bayan aikin Kappulu Target, za'a design kodi biyu na dinamic shiryarwa to aggrege the outoutputs of RNN/CNN encoding item to a ƙari kode set. @ action: button Matarin jarraba kan aikin misalin misalin mata ya nuna cewa metodenmu yana samar da wasu misãlai masu aggregering da margin mai girma. Ana sakar da kodi da aka yi danganta a kan zanen giThubb. Ana sakar da kodi da aka yi danganta a kan zanen giThubb.", 'sk': 'Medtem ko je bil dosežen velik napredek pri kodiranju besedilnega zaporedja v zaporedje vektorjev, je bilo manj pozornosti namenjeno združevanju teh predhodnih vektorjev (izhodov RNN/CNN) v kodirni vektor fiksne velikosti. Običajno se uporablja preprost največji ali povprečni način združevanja, ki je od spodaj navzgor in pasiven način združevanja in pomanjkanje vodenja glede informacij o opravilih. V tem prispevku predlagamo mehanizem združevanja za pridobitev kodiranja fiksne velikosti s politiko dinamičnega usmerjanja. Politika dinamičnega usmerjanja dinamično odloča, kaj in koliko informacij je treba prenesti iz vsake besede na končno kodiranje besedilnega zaporedja. Po delu Capsule Network smo oblikovali dve dinamični usmerjevalni politiki za združevanje izhodov kodirne plasti RNN/CNN v končni kodirni vektor. V primerjavi z drugimi metodami združevanja lahko dinamično usmerjanje izboljša sporočila glede na stanje končnega vektorja kodiranja. Eksperimentalni rezultati petih opravil klasifikacije besedil kažejo, da naša metoda za znatno maržo presega druge modele združevanja. Povezana izvorna koda je objavljena na naši github strani. Povezana izvorna koda je objavljena na naši github strani.', 'bo': 'འཕེལ་རིམ་མང་ཙམ་བྱུང་ཡོད་པའི་སྐབས་རིམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ཅིག་ནང་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ལ་ངེས་འཛིན་དགོས་པ་མེད་དེ་འདྲ་བྱུང་བ་རེད། རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དུ་འཕགས་པའི་ཆེ་ཤོས་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ཕྱོགས་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཉམ་གསོག་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱིས་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The dynamic routing policy is dynamically deciding that what and how much information need to be transferred from each word to the final encoding of the text sequence. Capsule དྲ་ཐོག་གི་ལས་ཀ་རྗེས་སུ། ང་ཚོས་རང་བཟོ་སྒྱུར་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་ཨིན མཉམ་སྡུད་ཐབས་ལམ་གཞན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡུར་ཡོད་པ་ལས་ སྤྲོད་རྒྱུན་གྱིས་ཆ་འཕྲིན་རྣམས་མཇུག་བསྡུས་ཀྱི་གནས་ལུགས ལག་ལེན་བྱེད་པའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གེ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལྔའི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་ནི་ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གྱིས་དཔེ་གཏོང་བ་གཞན་ཞིག་མཉམ་གས འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཨང་གྲངས་འདི་ང་ཚོའི་github རིགས་ཤོག་བྱང་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཆོག་ཚར་བ འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཨང་གྲངས་འདི་ང་ཚོའི་github རིགས་ཤོག་བྱང་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཆོག་ཚར་བ', 'he': 'While much progress has been made in how to encode a text sequence into a sequence of vectors, less attention has been paid to how to aggregate these preceding vectors (outputs of RNN/CNN) into fixed-size encoding vector.  בדרך כלל, משתמשים בריכוז מקסים או ממוצע פשוט, שהוא דרך מתחת למעלה ופסיבית של אגרגרפיה וחסר ההנחה על ידי מידע משימה. In this paper, we propose an aggregation mechanism to obtain a fixed-size encoding with a dynamic routing policy.  מדיניות הנתיב הדינמית מחליטה דינמית מה וכמה מידע צריך להעביר מכל מילה לקוד הסופי של רצף הטקסט. לאחר העבודה של רשת הקפסולים, אנחנו מעצבים שתי מדיניות דרך דינמית כדי לארגון את יצורים של שכבת הקוד RNN/CNN לוקטור הקוד סופי. Compared to the other aggregation methods, dynamic routing can refine the messages according to the state of final encoding vector.  תוצאות ניסיוניות על חמישה משימות מסווג טקסט מראות שהשיטה שלנו עולה על מודלים מסוגלים אחרים על ידי שווה משמעותית. Related source code is released on our github page. Related source code is released on our github page.'}
{'en': 'A Full End-to-End Semantic Role Labeler, Syntactic-agnostic Over Syntactic-aware?', 'ar': 'مُلصِف دور دلالي كامل ، حيادي نحوي أكثر من مدرك للنحوية؟', 'es': '¿Un etiquetador de roles semántico de extremo a extremo completo, agnóstico sintáctico sobre sintáctico?', 'pt': 'Um rotulador de função semântica de ponta a ponta, independente da sintática em relação à sintática?', 'fr': 'Un étiqueteur de rôle sémantique complet de bout en bout, agnostique sur syntaxique plutôt que syntaxique\xa0?', 'ja': '完全なエンドツーエンドのセマンティックロールラベラー、構文論的無神論オーバー構文論的認識？', 'zh': '全端到端语义角,句法不知而非句法知?', 'ru': 'Полный сквозной семантический ярлык ролей, синтаксический-диагностический-из-знающий-синтаксический?', 'hi': 'एक पूर्ण अंत-से-अंत शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलर, वाक्यात्मक-अज्ञेयवादी पर वाक्यात्मक-जागरूक?', 'ga': 'Lipéadóir Róil Shéimeantach Iomlán ó cheann ceann go ceann, feasach ar shintactic-agnostic Thar Syntactic?', 'ka': 'ჟვმანრთფნა პაბჲრთრვლკა, ჟთნრაკრთფნა ადნჲჟრთკა ოჲ ჟთნრაკრთფნა ჟგვჟრნჲჟრთკა?', 'hu': 'Egy teljes végtől végig szemantikus szerep címkéző, szintaktikus-agnosztikus szintaktikus felett?', 'el': 'Ένας πλήρης σημασιολογικός μαρκαριστής ρόλων, συνεκτικός-αγνωστικός πάνω από συντακτικός-ενήμερος;', 'kk': 'Синтактикалық синтактикалық белгілерді толық аяқтау- аяқтау үшін семантикалық роль жарлығы, синтактикалық- агностикалық?', 'lt': 'A Full End-to-End Semantic Role Labeler, Syntactic-agnostic Over Syntactic-aware?', 'it': 'Un etichettatore di ruolo semantico completo end-to-end, sintattico-agnostico sopra sintattico-consapevole?', 'ms': 'Pencetak Rol Semantik Akhir-Akhir Penuh, Syntactic-agnostic Over Syntactic-aware?', 'mk': 'Целосна семантичка улога, синтактичка агностика, преку синтактичка свесност?', 'mt': 'Tikkettatur sħiħ tar-rwol Semantiku minn tmiem sa tmiem, Sintattiku-agnostiku Aktar Sintattiku?', 'mn': 'Бүтэн төгсгөл-төгсгөл Semantic Role Labeler, Syntactic-agnostic Over Syntactic-aware?', 'ml': 'സിമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലേബെല്ലര്\u200d, സിന്റാക്റ്റിക്ക്-അഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് സിന്റാക്ടിക് അറിയുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് മുഴുവന്\u200d അവസ', 'no': 'Eit full end- to- end semiantisk rolletikettar, syntaksisk agnostisk over syntaksisk varsel?', 'sr': 'Potpuni termin do kraja semantički etiketer uloge, sintaktički agnostik preko sintaktičkog svjesnog?', 'pl': 'Pełny end-to-end semantyczny oznaczacz ról, syntaktyczny-agnostyczny ponad syntaktyczny-świadomy?', 'ro': 'Un complet end-to-end semantic Role Labeler, Sintactic-agnostic peste Sintactic-conștient?', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් සම්පූර්ණ භාවිත ලේබලර්, සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය සඳහා සංව', 'ta': 'முழு முடிவு- முடிவு செமாண்டிக் விளிம்பு', 'so': 'Labeler dhamaan dhamaan ilaa dhammaadka Semantic Role, Syntactic-agnostic Over Syntactic-aware?', 'sv': 'En heltäckande semantisk rolletikett, syntaktisk-agnostisk över syntaktisk-medveten?', 'ur': 'سینٹیکسی خبردار پر سینٹیکسی-آگانیک سینٹیکسی رول لابلر؟', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Người dán nhãn đồng hồ Rolex Trung Quốc đầy đủ, Synstylist-agnostic over Synachical-knowledge?', 'bg': 'Пълен семантичен етикетер на роли от край до край, синтактически агностик над синтактически наясно?', 'hr': 'Potpuni termin do kraja semantički etiketer uloge, sintaktički agnostičan preko sintaktičkog svjesnog?', 'nl': 'Een volledige end-to-end semantische rollabeler, syntactisch-agnostisch over syntactisch-bewust?', 'da': 'En komplet end-to-end semantisk rollemærkning, syntaktisk-agnostisk over syntaktisk-bevidst?', 'de': 'Ein Full End-to-End semantischer Rollenbeschrifter, syntaktisch-agnostisch über syntaktisch-bewusst?', 'id': 'Sebuah Full End-to-End Semantic Role Labeler, Syntactic-agnostic Over Syntactic-aware?', 'ko': '하나의 완전한 끝에서 끝까지의 의미 역할 라벨, 문법 불가지론자가 문법 감지자보다 낫다?', 'tr': 'Semantik rol etiketçisi, sintaktik-agnostik duyduğunda?', 'af': "'n Volle Einde-na-Einde Semantiese Rolletiketeerder, Sintaktika-agnostik oor Sintaktika-kennis?", 'fa': 'يه بازيگر بازيگر نقش سيمانتي کامل به پايان رسيده، سنتاکتيک-agnostic Over Syntactic-aware؟', 'sq': 'A Full End-to-End Semantic Role Labeler, Syntactic-agnostic Over Syntactic-aware?', 'sw': 'Labela ya mzunguko wa kimaadili wa mwisho mpaka mwishoni, ya Syntactic-agnostic kwa mwenye ufahamu wa Syntactic?', 'bn': 'সিন্ট্যাক্টিক সাবধানের জন্য সিম্যান্টিক রোল লেবেলার, সিন্টাক্টিক-অ্যাঙ্কোস্টিক?', 'am': 'Syntactic-agnostic', 'hy': 'Սենտակտիկ-ագնոստիկ Սինտակտիկ գիտակցության մեջ:', 'az': 'Semantik Rol Labeleri, Sintaktik-agnostik Sintaktik-Biləni?', 'bs': 'Potpuni termin do kraja semantički etiketer uloge, sintaktički agnostik preko sintaktičkog svjesnog?', 'ca': 'Un etiquetador de paper Semàtic de final a final, sintàctic-agnòstic més conscient de la sintàctica?', 'cs': 'Úplný end-to-end sémantický označovač rolí, syntakticky-agnostický přes syntaktickou?', 'fi': 'Täydellinen Semanttinen Roolimerkintäjä, Syntaktiikka-agnostikko yli Syntaktiikka-tietoinen?', 'et': 'Täielik semantiline rolli märgistaja, süntaktiline agnostik üle süntaktiline teadlik?', 'jv': 'Full End-to-End', 'he': 'תג תפקיד סמנטי מלא סוף-סוף, סנטקטי-אגנוסטי מעל מודע לסנטקטי?', 'sk': 'Celoten semantični označevalec vlog, sintaktično-agnostičen nad sintaktičnim zavedanjem?', 'ha': '@ label', 'bo': 'A Full End-to-End Semantic Role Labeler, Syntactic-agnostic Over Syntactic-aware?'}
{'en': 'Semantic role labeling (SRL) is to recognize the predicate-argument structure of a sentence, including subtasks of predicate disambiguation and argument labeling. Previous studies usually formulate the entire SRL problem into two or more subtasks. For the first time, this paper introduces an end-to-end neural model which unifiedly tackles the predicate disambiguation and the argument labeling in one shot. Using a biaffine scorer, our model directly predicts all semantic role labels for all given word pairs in the sentence without relying on any syntactic parse information. Specifically, we augment the BiLSTM encoder with a non-linear transformation to further distinguish the predicate and the argument in a given sentence, and model the semantic role labeling process as a word pair classification task by employing the biaffine attentional mechanism. Though the proposed model is syntax-agnostic with local decoder, it outperforms the state-of-the-art syntax-aware SRL systems on the CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarks for both English and Chinese. To our best knowledge, we report the first syntax-agnostic SRL model that surpasses all known syntax-aware models.', 'ar': 'إن تسمية الدور الدلالي (SRL) هو التعرف على بنية الحجة الأصلية للجملة ، بما في ذلك المهام الفرعية لتوضيح المسند وتسمية الحجة. عادة ما تصوغ الدراسات السابقة مشكلة SRL بالكامل في مهمتين فرعيتين أو أكثر. لأول مرة ، تقدم هذه الورقة نموذجًا عصبيًا من طرف إلى طرف يعالج بشكل موحد توضيح المسند وتسمية الحجة في لقطة واحدة. باستخدام سجل biaffine ، يتنبأ نموذجنا مباشرة بجميع تسميات الأدوار الدلالية لجميع أزواج الكلمات المعطاة في الجملة دون الاعتماد على أي معلومات تحليل نحوية. على وجه التحديد ، قمنا بزيادة مشفر BiLSTM بتحويل غير خطي لمزيد من التمييز بين المسند والحجة في جملة معينة ، ونمذجة عملية تصنيف الدور الدلالي كمهمة تصنيف زوج الكلمات من خلال استخدام آلية الانتباه ثنائية الاتجاه. على الرغم من أن النموذج المقترح حيادي بناء الجملة مع وحدة فك ترميز محلية ، إلا أنه يتفوق على أحدث أنظمة SRL المدركة للنحو على معايير CoNLL-2008 ، 2009 لكل من اللغة الإنجليزية والصينية. على حد علمنا ، قمنا بالإبلاغ عن أول نموذج SRL لا يعتمد على بناء الجملة والذي يفوق جميع النماذج المعروفة التي تدرك بناء الجملة.', 'es': 'El etiquetado semántico de roles (SRL) consiste en reconocer la estructura de predicado-argumento de una oración, incluidas las subtareas de desambiguación de predicados y etiquetado de argumentos. Los estudios anteriores suelen formular todo el problema de SRL en dos o más subtareas. Por primera vez, este artículo presenta un modelo neuronal de extremo a extremo que aborda de manera unificada la desambiguación de los predicados y el etiquetado de argumentos de una sola vez. Utilizando un marcador biafín, nuestro modelo predice directamente todas las etiquetas de roles semánticos para todos los pares de palabras dados en la oración sin depender de ninguna información de análisis sintáctico. Específicamente, aumentamos el codificador BilsTM con una transformación no lineal para distinguir aún más el predicado y el argumento en una oración determinada, y modelamos el proceso de etiquetado semántico de roles como una tarea de clasificación de pares de palabras mediante el empleo del mecanismo de atención biafín. Aunque el modelo propuesto es independiente de la sintaxis con decodificador local, supera a los sistemas SRL con reconocimiento de sintaxis de última generación en los puntos de referencia de ConLL-2008, 2009 tanto para inglés como para chino. Hasta donde sabemos, informamos del primer modelo SRL independiente de la sintaxis que supera a todos los modelos conocidos con reconocimiento de sintaxis.', 'fr': "L'étiquetage de rôle sémantique (SRL) consiste à reconnaître la structure prédicat-argument d'une phrase, y compris les sous-tâches de désambiguïsation des prédicats et d'étiquetage des arguments. Les études précédentes formulent généralement l'ensemble du problème SRL en deux sous-tâches ou plus. Pour la première fois, cet article présente un modèle neuronal de bout en bout qui aborde de manière unifiée la désambiguïsation des prédicats et l'étiquetage des arguments d'un seul coup. À l'aide d'un marqueur biaffine, notre modèle prédit directement toutes les étiquettes de rôle sémantiques pour toutes les paires de mots données dans la phrase sans s'appuyer sur aucune information d'analyse syntaxique. Plus précisément, nous augmentons le codeur BilsTM avec une transformation non linéaire pour mieux distinguer le prédicat et l'argument dans une phrase donnée, et modélisons le processus d'étiquetage des rôles sémantiques comme une tâche de classification de paires de mots en utilisant le mécanisme attentionnel biaffine. Bien que le modèle proposé soit indépendant de la syntaxe avec un décodeur local, il surpasse les systèmes SRL compatibles avec la syntaxe de pointe sur les benchmarks ConLL-2008, 2009 pour l'anglais et le chinois. À notre connaissance, nous présentons le premier modèle SRL indépendant de la syntaxe qui surpasse tous les modèles sensibles à la syntaxe connus.", 'pt': 'A rotulagem de papéis semânticos (SRL) é reconhecer a estrutura predicado-argumento de uma sentença, incluindo subtarefas de desambiguação de predicados e rotulagem de argumentos. Estudos anteriores geralmente formulam todo o problema de SRL em duas ou mais subtarefas. Pela primeira vez, este artigo apresenta um modelo neural de ponta a ponta que aborda de forma unificada a desambiguação de predicados e a rotulagem de argumentos de uma só vez. Usando um marcador biaffine, nosso modelo prevê diretamente todos os rótulos de papéis semânticos para todos os pares de palavras da frase sem depender de nenhuma informação de análise sintática. Especificamente, aumentamos o codificador BiLSTM com uma transformação não linear para distinguir ainda mais o predicado e o argumento em uma determinada frase e modelamos o processo de rotulagem de papéis semânticos como uma tarefa de classificação de pares de palavras, empregando o mecanismo de atenção biafim. Embora o modelo proposto seja agnóstico de sintaxe com decodificador local, ele supera os sistemas SRL com reconhecimento de sintaxe de última geração nos benchmarks CoNLL-2008, 2009 para inglês e chinês. Até onde sabemos, relatamos o primeiro modelo SRL agnóstico de sintaxe que supera todos os modelos de reconhecimento de sintaxe conhecidos.', 'ja': 'セマンティックロールラベリング（ SRL ）は、述語解読と引数ラベリングのサブタスクを含む、文の述語-引数構造を認識することです。 以前の研究では、通常、SRL問題全体を2つ以上のサブタスクに定式化しています。 エンドツーエンドのニューラルモデルを初めて紹介し、述語の曖昧さ解消と引数のラベリングをワンショットで統一的に取り組む。 Biaffineスコアラーを使用して、構文解析情報に依存することなく、文のすべての与えられた単語ペアのすべてのセマンティックロールラベルを直接予測します。 具体的には、所与の文の述語と引数をさらに区別するために非線形変換でBiLSTMエンコーダを増強し、ビアフィン注意メカニズムを採用することにより、意味的役割ラベリングプロセスをワードペア分類タスクとしてモデル化する。 提案されているモデルは、ローカルデコーダーで構文非依存であるが、CoNLL -2008, 2009のベンチマークでは、英語と中国語の両方で最先端の構文認識SRLシステムを上回っている。 私たちの知る限りでは、すべての既知の構文認識モデルを上回る最初の構文非依存SRLモデルを報告します。', 'zh': '语义角色 (SRL) 以识句之谓词-参数结构,谓词消歧义参数之务。 前论常以全SRL为二子。 本文首言端到端之神经,当一次性一以决之谓词消歧义参数。 用双字母评分器,吾形直占句中所有给定单词对所有语义角色标签,不依一切句法解析信。 具体来说以非线性易BiLSTM编码器,以别给定谓词参数,因双affine以语义角建模为单词类。 虽规模本地解码器非关语法,然在CoNLL-2008,2009英文及中文准试中优于先进者语法感知SRL统。 以吾所知,告首与语法无关SRL,当越己知语法感知。', 'hi': 'सिमेंटिक रोल लेबलिंग (एसआरएल) एक वाक्य की विधेय-तर्क संरचना को पहचानना है, जिसमें विधेय बहुविकल्पी और तर्क लेबलिंग के उप-कार्य शामिल हैं। पिछले अध्ययन आमतौर पर पूरे एसआरएल समस्या को दो या दो से अधिक उप-कार्यों में तैयार करते हैं। पहली बार, यह पेपर एक एंड-टू-एंड तंत्रिका मॉडल का परिचय देता है जो एक शॉट में विधेय बहुविकल्पी और तर्क लेबलिंग से एकीकृत रूप से निपटता है। एक biaffine स्कोरर का उपयोग करते हुए, हमारा मॉडल सीधे किसी भी वाक्यात्मक पार्स जानकारी पर भरोसा किए बिना वाक्य में दिए गए सभी शब्द जोड़े के लिए सभी शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करता है। विशेष रूप से, हम किसी दिए गए वाक्य में विधेय और तर्क को और अधिक अलग करने के लिए एक गैर-रैखिक परिवर्तन के साथ BiLSTM एन्कोडर को बढ़ाते हैं, और biaffine ध्यान देने वाले तंत्र को नियोजित करके एक शब्द जोड़ी वर्गीकरण कार्य के रूप में शब्दार्थ भूमिका लेबलिंग प्रक्रिया को मॉडल करते हैं। यद्यपि प्रस्तावित मॉडल स्थानीय डिकोडर के साथ वाक्यविन्यास-अज्ञेयवादी है, यह अंग्रेजी और चीनी दोनों के लिए CoNLL-2008, 2009 बेंचमार्क पर अत्याधुनिक वाक्यविन्यास-जागरूक SRL प्रणालियों को मात देता है। हमारे सर्वोत्तम ज्ञान के लिए, हम पहले वाक्यविन्यास-अज्ञेयवादी एसआरएल मॉडल की रिपोर्ट करते हैं जो सभी ज्ञात वाक्यविन्यास-जागरूक मॉडल को पार करता है।', 'ru': 'Метка семантической роли (SRL) предназначена для распознавания структуры предикат-аргумент предложения, в том числе подзадач разделения предикатов и метки аргумента. Предыдущие исследования обычно формулируют всю задачу SRL в две или более подзадачи. Впервые в этой статье представлена сквозная нейронная модель, которая унифицированно решает проблему предикатной расплывчатости и обозначения аргументов в одном кадре. Используя биаффиновый счетчик, наша модель напрямую предсказывает все семантические метки ролей для всех заданных пар слов в предложении, не полагаясь на какую-либо синтаксическую информацию синтаксического анализа. В частности, мы дополняем кодировщик BiLSTM нелинейным преобразованием, чтобы дополнительно различать предикат и аргумент в данном предложении, и моделируем процесс маркировки семантической роли как задачу классификации пар слов, используя механизм внимания биаффина. Хотя предлагаемая модель является синтаксической диагностикой с локальным декодером, она превосходит современные системы SRL, основанные на синтаксисе, на контрольных показателях CoNLL-2008, 2009 для английского и китайского языков. Насколько нам известно, мы сообщаем о первой синтаксическо-диагностической модели SRL, которая превосходит все известные модели, основанные на синтаксисе.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le lipéadú róil shéimeantach (SRL) struchtúr réamhargóinte abairte a aithint, lena n-áirítear fothascanna a bhaineann le dí-athbhrí réamhaithrise agus lipéadú argóintí. De ghnáth déanann staidéir roimhe seo an fhadhb SRL iomlán a fhoirmiú ina dhá fhothasc nó níos mó. Don chéad uair, tugtar isteach sa pháipéar seo samhail néarúil ceann go ceann a théann i ngleic go haonfhoirmeach leis an dí-athbhrí réamhaithrise agus leis an lipéadú argóinte in aon seat amháin. Trí úsáid a bhaint as scóróir biaifín, déanann ár múnla réamh-mheastachán díreach ar gach lipéad róil shéimeantach do gach péire focal a thugtar san abairt gan a bheith ag brath ar aon fhaisnéis pharsála comhréire. Go sonrach, cuirimid leis an ionchódóir BiLSTM le claochlú neamhlíneach chun idirdhealú breise a dhéanamh idir an tuar agus an argóint in abairt ar leith, agus múnlaimid an próiseas lipéadaithe ról shéimeantach mar thasc aicmithe péire focal trí úsáid a bhaint as an meicníocht airdeach biaifín. Cé go bhfuil an tsamhail bheartaithe comhréire-agnóiseach le díchódóir áitiúil, sáraíonn sé na córais SRL atá ar an eolas faoi chomhréir ar na tagarmharcanna CoNLL-2008, 2009 don Bhéarla agus don tSínis araon. Go dtí an t-eolas is fearr atá againn, tuairiscímid an chéad mhúnla SRL comhréire-agnostic a sháraíonn gach samhail atá ar eolas faoi chomhréir.', 'hu': 'A szemantikus szerepkörcímkézés (SRL) egy mondat predikátum-argumentum struktúrájának felismerése, beleértve a predikátum egyértelműsítésének és az argumentum címkézésének részfeladatait. A korábbi tanulmányok általában az SRL teljes problémáját két vagy több részfeladatra fogalmazzák meg. Ez a tanulmány most először mutat be egy end-to-end neurális modellt, amely egységesen foglalkozik a predikátus egyértelműségével és az érvek címkézésével. Egy biaffin scorer segítségével modellünk közvetlenül előrejelzi az összes szemantikai szerepkör címkét a mondatban, anélkül, hogy szintaktikus elemzési információkra támaszkodna. Konkrétan a BiLSTM kódolót egy nemlineáris transzformációval bővítjük, hogy tovább különböztessük meg egy adott mondatban a predikátumot és az argumentumot, és modellezzük a szemantikai szerepkör-címkézési folyamatot szópár osztályozási feladatként a biaffin figyelmi mechanizmus alkalmazásával. Bár a javasolt modell szintaxis-agnosztikus helyi dekódolóval, felülmúlja a legkorszerűbb szintaxistudatos SRL rendszereket a CoNLL-2008, 2009 referenciaértékeken mind az angol, mind a kínai. Legjobb tudásunk szerint jelentjük az első szintaxis-agnosztikus SRL modellt, amely felülmúlja az összes ismert szintaxistudatos modellt.', 'it': "L'etichettatura semantica dei ruoli (SRL) consiste nel riconoscere la struttura predicato-argomento di una frase, incluse le sottoattività di disambiguazione dei predicati e l'etichettatura degli argomenti. Gli studi precedenti di solito formulano l'intero problema della SRL in due o più sottoattività. Per la prima volta, questo articolo introduce un modello neurale end-to-end che affronta in modo unificato la disambiguazione dei predicati e l'etichettatura dell'argomento in un colpo solo. Utilizzando uno scorer biaffine, il nostro modello predice direttamente tutte le etichette di ruolo semantiche per tutte le coppie di parole date nella frase senza fare affidamento su alcuna informazione sintattica di analisi. Nello specifico, aumentiamo l'encoder BiLSTM con una trasformazione non lineare per distinguere ulteriormente il predicato e l'argomento in una data frase, e modelliamo il processo semantico di etichettatura dei ruoli come un compito di classificazione della coppia di parole utilizzando il meccanismo di attenzione biaffina. Sebbene il modello proposto sia sintassi-agnostico con decoder locale, supera i più moderni sistemi di sintassi-aware SRL sui benchmark CoNLL-2008, 2009 sia per l'inglese che per il cinese. Per quanto ne sappiamo, riportiamo il primo modello sintassi-agnostico SRL che supera tutti i modelli sintassi noti.", 'ka': 'Semantic role labeling (SRL) is to recognize the predicate-argument structure of a sentence, including subtasks of predicate disambiguation and argument labeling. პირველი კვლევები საუკეთესოდ ყველა SRL პრობლემა ორი ან უფრო მეტად სტუმულებენ. პირველი ჯერ, ეს წიგნი დასაწყება ნეიროლური მოდელს, რომელიც ერთადერთად განსხვავებული განსხვავებას და არგუმენტის მართლას ერთი სურათში. ჩვენი მოდელის გამოყენება ყველა სენმანტიკური პროლის ლაბეჭები ყველა მონიშნული სიტყვების ზოგებისთვის სიტყვების მხარეს, რომელიც არაფერი სინტაქტიკური პარასის ინფორმაცი განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ BiLSTM კოდერების კოდერების ბოლონური ტრანფიგურაციას დავიზრდებით, რომ უფრო განსაკუთრებელია პრედიკატის და არსმენტის განსაკუთრებელია განსაკუთრებელია განსაკუთრებელია განსაკუთრებელია, და სმენტი მაგრამ საზოგადოებული მოდელი სინტაქსი-ადნოსტიული იყო ლოკალური ევკოდერებით, ის გავაკეთება სინტაქსი სინტაქსის სისტემის სინტაქსი SRL სისტემის შესახებ CoNLL-2008, 2009 წლის ანგლისური და კინინ ჩვენი საუკეთესო ცნობილებისთვის, ჩვენ შეგვიყვანეთ პირველი სინტაქსი-ადნოსტიული SRL მოდელს, რომელიც უფრო მეტი უცნობილი სინტაქსის მოდელების', 'el': 'Η σημασιολογική σήμανση ρόλων (SRL) είναι η αναγνώριση της δομής των υπαρχόντων-επιχειρημάτων μιας πρότασης, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των δευτερεύοντων εργασιών της διασάφησης των υπαρχόντων και της επισήμανσης των επιχειρημάτων. Οι προηγούμενες μελέτες συνήθως διατυπώνουν ολόκληρο το πρόβλημα σε δύο ή περισσότερες δευτερεύουσες εργασίες. Για πρώτη φορά, η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει ένα ολοκληρωμένο νευρωνικό μοντέλο το οποίο αντιμετωπίζει ενοποιημένα την αποσαφήνιση των προδικαστικών στοιχείων και την επισήμανση των επιχειρημάτων με μια ματιά. Χρησιμοποιώντας έναν βαθμολογητή biaffine, το μοντέλο μας προβλέπει άμεσα όλες τις σημασιολογικές ετικέτες ρόλων για όλα τα δοσμένα ζεύγη λέξεων στην πρόταση χωρίς να βασίζεται σε οποιαδήποτε συντακτική πληροφορία ανάλυσης. Συγκεκριμένα, εμπλουτίζουμε τον κωδικοποιητή με έναν μη γραμμικό μετασχηματισμό για να διακρίνουμε περαιτέρω το υπαρκτό και το επιχείρημα σε μια δεδομένη πρόταση, και μοντελοποιούμε τη διαδικασία σημασιολογικής σήμανσης ρόλων ως εργασία ταξινόμησης ζευγαριού λέξεων χρησιμοποιώντας τον μηχανισμό προσοχής Biaffine. Αν και το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο είναι μη συντακτικό με τοπικό αποκωδικοποιητή, ξεπερνά τα σύγχρονα συστήματα SRL που γνωρίζουν τη σύνταξη στα κριτήρια αναφοράς τόσο στα αγγλικά όσο και στα κινέζικα. Σύμφωνα με τις καλύτερες γνώσεις μας, αναφέρουμε το πρώτο συντακτικό-αγνωστικό μοντέλο που ξεπερνά όλα τα γνωστά συντακτικά μοντέλα.', 'mk': 'Семантичкото означување на улогата (СРЛ) е да се препознае структурата на предикативниот аргумент на реченицата, вклучувајќи ги и подпрашањата на предикативниот раздвојување и означување на аргументите. Претходните студии обично го формулираат целиот SRL проблем во две или повеќе потпрашања. За прв пат, овој весник претставува нервен модел од крај до крај кој едноставно се справува со предикатната дејамбигуација и аргументот со ознака во еден поглед. Користејќи биафински резултат, нашиот модел директно ги предвидува сите семантични ознаки на улогата за сите дадени зборови парови во реченицата без да се потпира на било каква синтактичка информација за анализирање. Специфично, го зголемуваме кодерот BiLSTM со нелинијарна трансформација за понатамошно да го разликуваме предикатот и аргументот во одредена реченица, и да го моделираме процесот на означување на семантичната улога како задача за класификација на пар зборови со употреба на механизмот на внимание на би И покрај тоа што предложениот модел е синтакси-агностичен со локален декодер, тој ги надминува најсовремените системи на СРЛ со свесност за синтаксис на CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarks за англиски и кинески. Според нашето најдобро знаење, го пријавуваме првиот синтаксиско-агностички СРЛ модел кој ги надминува сите познати синтаксиски-свесни модели.', 'ml': 'ഒരു വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക വാക്കുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് റോള്\u200d ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നത്, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച വിഭാഗവും  Previous studies usually formulate the entire SRL problem into two or more subtasks.  ആദ്യ തവണ ഈ പേപ്പറിന് ഒരു അവസാനത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d മോഡലിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് ഒരു ഷോട്ടില്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന അസാധാരണത്തെയ ഒരു ബിഫിന്\u200d സ്കോര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d നേരിട്ട് പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന എല്ലാ വാക്കുകളിലും ജോടികള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി എല്ലാ സെമാന്റ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ബിഎല്\u200dസ്റ്റമിന്റെ കോഡോര്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച വാക്കിലെ പ്രത്യേക വ്യത്യാസവും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ചു വേര്\u200dതിരിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി ബില്\u200dസ്റ്റി പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d ലോക്കല്\u200d ഡെകോഡെരുമായി സിന്റാക്സ്-ആഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് ആണെങ്കിലും അത് കോണ്\u200dഎല്\u200d- 2008-ലെ സിന്റാക്സ് സിന്റ്റാക്സ് സിസ നമ്മുടെ ഏറ്റവും നല്ല അറിവിന് വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ സിന്റാക്സ് ആഗ്നോസ്റ്റിക്ക് എസ്ആര്\u200dഎല്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട്', 'kk': 'Сөздің біртінші рөл жарлығы (SRL) сұлбаның алдындағы аргументтің құрылымын анықтау, бұл аргументтің алдындағы бөлшектері және аргументтің жарлығын белгілеу үшін. Алдыңғы зерттеулері кәдімгі SRL мәселесін екі немесе бірнеше суретке формулайды. Бұл қағаз бірінші ретінде біріктірілген неврал үлгісін біріктіреді. Бұл қағаз біріктірілген неврал үлгісін біріктіреді. Биафин нөмірлерін қолдану үшін біздің үлгіміз синтактикалық талдау мәліметіне сеніміз жоқ, сөздің барлық екі сөздер үшін semantic рөл жарлығын көрсетеді. Ескерту үшін, біз BiLSTM кодерін сызық емес түрлендіру үшін алдыңғы және аргументті келтірілген сұлбадағы түрлендіру үшін, және симантикалық түрлендіру процесін сөздердің екі түрлендіру тапсырмасын өзгертіп, биафин қатынау механ Келтірілген үлгі жергілікті декодермен синтаксис- агностикалық болса да, ол CoNLL- 2008, 2009 жылы ағылшын және қытайша жүйелерінде орындалған синтаксис- артық SRL жүйелерін жасайды. Біздің ең жақсы білімізге бірінші синтаксис агностикалық SRL үлгісін хабарлаймыз. Бұл барлық белгілі синтаксис түсінікті үлгілерінен артық.', 'mn': 'Semantic role labeling (SRL) is to recognize the predicate-argument structure of a sentence, including predicate disambiguation and argument labeling. Өмнөх судалгаанууд SRL асуудлыг ихэвчлэн хоёр эсвэл олон дотоод тодорхойлж байна. Эхлээд, энэ цаас нэг удаа цуглуулагдсан мэдрэлийн төгсгөлийн загварыг тайлбарладаг. Биефин оноогч ашиглан бидний загвар нь юу ч синтактик хуваалцах мэдээлэл дээр итгэлгүйгээр өгөгдсөн үг хоёр нь бүх semantic role labels гэдгийг шууд таамагладаг. Ялангуяа бид BiLSTM кодерийг шулуун биш өөрчлөлтийг илүү тодорхойлж өгсөн өгүүлбэр илүү тодорхойлж, аргументыг тодорхойлж, semantic role labeling process-г биефин удирдлагын механизмийг ашиглаж үгний хоёр хэлбэрийн ажил болгон загварчлах болно. Хэдийгээр санал өгсөн загвар нь орон нутгийн шинэчлэгчтэй синтаксис агностик боловч, энэ нь CoNLL-2008, 2009 оны Англи болон Хятад улсын шинжлэх ухааны төвшин SRL системийг дамжуулдаг. Хамгийн сайн мэдлэгтэй нь бид анхны синтаксис агностик SRL загварыг мэддэг бүх мэдэгдэх синтаксис мэдэх загваруудыг илүү өндөртэй байдаг.', 'lt': 'Semantinis vaidmens ženklinimas (SRL) yra pripažinti teiginio pagrindo struktūrą, įskaitant teiginio pagrindo nedviprasmiškumo ir argumento ženklinimo pakopas. Ankstesniuose tyrimuose paprastai visa SRL problema suskirstoma į du ar daugiau paklausymų. Pirmą kartą šiame dokumente pateikiamas galutinis neurologinis modelis, kuris vieningai sprendžia sudėtingą nedviprasmiškumą ir argument ą, paženklintą vienu kartu. Naudojant biffino rezultatorių, mūsų modelis tiesiogiai nuspėja visas semantines vaidmens etiketes visiems žodžių poroms sakinyje nepasitikius jokia sintaktine analizavimo informacija. Konkrečiai, mes padidiname BiLSTM kodatorių nelinijiniu transformavimu, siekiant toliau atskirti predikatą ir argument ą konkrečiame sakinyje, ir modeliuojame semantinio vaidmens ženklinimo procesą kaip žodžių poros klasifikavimo užduotį naudojant biffino dėmesio mechanizmą. Nors siūlomas model is yra sintakso-agnostinis su vietiniu dekoderiu, jis viršija naujausias sintakso žinomas SRL sistemas pagal CoNLL-2008, 2009 m. anglų ir kinų lyginamuosius rodiklius. Mes geriausiai žinome, kad pranešame apie pirmąjį sintaksinį-agnostinį SRL model į, kuris viršija visus žinomus sintaksinį žinomus modelius.', 'no': 'Semantisk rolletiketting (SRL) er å gjenkjenna den predikarte argument- strukturen av eit setning, inkludert underspørsmål av førehandsvising av disambiguasjon og argument- etiketting. Førre studiar formerer vanlegvis heile SRL- problemet til to eller fleire underspørsmål. Første gong introduserer denne papiret ein neuralmodell til slutt til slutt, som gjer samstunden på den predikate disambiguasjonen og merkelappen på argument i ein gong. Ved å bruka ein biaffin- poeng, vert modellen vårt direkte forhåndsvisa alle semantiske rolletikettar for alle oppgjevne ordpar i setninga utan å tilbakekalla nokon syntaktisk tolkingsinformasjon. Spesielt, vi aukar BiLSTM-koderen med ei ikkje-lineær transformasjon for å forskjere den predikarte og argumentet i eit gitt setning, og modeller den semantiske rolletikettingsprosessen som eit ordpar klassifikasjonsprosessen ved å bruka biaffin-attentionale mekanismen. Selv om den foreslåde modellen er syntaks-agnostisk med lokale dekoder, utfører den ståten av kunstsyntaks-kjent SRL-systemet på CoNLL-2008, 2009-benchmarken for både engelsk og kinesisk. For vårt beste kunnskap rapporterer vi den første syntaks-agnostiske SRL-modellen som overstyrer alle kjente syntaks-bevisste modelane.', 'ms': 'Label peranan Semantik (SRL) adalah untuk mengenali struktur argumen-predikat bagi kalimat, termasuk subtaskan penyelesaian predikat dan label argumen. Ujian terdahulu biasanya membentuk keseluruhan masalah SRL menjadi dua atau lebih sub-tanya. Untuk pertama kalinya, kertas ini memperkenalkan model saraf akhir-akhir yang secara bersatu mengatasi penyesalan predikat dan argumen label dalam satu tembakan. Menggunakan skor biaffin, model kita secara langsung meramalkan semua label peranan semantik untuk semua pasangan perkataan yang diberikan dalam kalimat tanpa bergantung pada maklumat hurai sintaktik. Secara khusus, kami menambah pengekod BiLSTM dengan pengubahan bukan-linear untuk membedakan lebih lanjut predikat dan argumen dalam kalimat tertentu, dan model proses label peranan semantik sebagai tugas kelasukan pasangan perkataan dengan menggunakan mekanisme perhatian biaffin. Walaupun model yang diusulkan adalah sintaks-agnostik dengan dekoder tempatan, ia melebihi sistem SRL yang sedar-sedar sintaks state-of-the-art pada tanda referensi CoNLL-2008, 2009 untuk bahasa Inggeris dan Cina. Menurut pengetahuan terbaik kita, kita laporkan model SRL sintaks-agnostik pertama yang melebihi semua model yang diketahui sintaks-sedar.', 'sr': 'Semantička označavanja uloga (SRL) je prepoznati predikatnu strukturu rečenice, uključujući podatke predikatne disambiguacije i označavanja argument a. Pre ispitivanja obično formuliraju cijeli problem SRL na dva ili više podataka. Prvi put, ovaj papir predstavlja neuralni model koji ujedinjeno rješava predikatnu disambiguaciju i etiketu argumenata u jednom pogledu. Koristeći rezultat biafina, naš model direktno predviđa sve semantičke etikete za sve određene parove reči u rečenici bez oslanjanja na sintaktičke informacije o analizu. Posebno, povećavamo koder BiLSTM sa neolinearnom transformacijom kako bismo dalje razlikovali predikat i argument u određenoj rečenici, i modelili proces označavanja semantičke uloge kao zadatak klasifikacije riječi par, koristeći mehanizam pozornosti biafina. Iako je predloženi model sintaks-agnostik sa lokalnim dekoderom, iznosi stanje sintaksa-svestan SRL-sistem na CoNLL-2008, 2009. godine i standardima engleskog i kineskog jezika. Najbolje znanje, prijavljujemo prvi sintaks-agnostički model SRL-a koji prelazi svim poznatim modelima sa sintaksijom.', 'mt': 'It-tikkettar tar-rwol Semantiku (SRL) huwa li tiġi rikonoxxuta l-istruttura predikata-argument ta’ sentenza, inklużi sottomistoqsijiet ta’ diżambigwazzjoni predikata u tikkettar tal-argumenti. Studji preċedenti normalment jifformulaw il-problema kollha ta’ SRL f’żewġ sottomistoqsijiet jew aktar. Għall-ewwel darba, dan id-dokument jintroduċi mudell newrali minn tarf sa tarf li jindirizza b’mod unifikat id-diżambigwazzjoni predikata u t-tikkettar tal-argument f’ritratt wieħed. Bl-użu ta’ punteġġ biffin, il-mudell tagħna jipprevedi direttament it-tikketti tar-rwol semantiku kollha għall-pari tal-kelma kollha mogħtija fis-sentenza mingħajr ma jiddependi fuq l-ebda informazzjoni sintetika tal-analiżi. Speċifikament, a ħna nżidu l-kodifikatur BiLSTM bi trasformazzjoni mhux lineari biex niddistingwu aktar il-predikat u l-argument f’sentenza partikolari, u nimmudellaw il-proċess semantiku tat-tikkettar tar-rwol bħala kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tal-pari tal-kliem billi nużaw il-mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni biffina. Għalkemm il-mudell propost huwa sintaks-agnostiku bid-dekoder lokali, huwa ogħla mis-sistemi tal-SRL bl-aktar sintaks avvanzati fuq il-punti ta’ riferiment CoNLL-2008, 2009 kemm għall-Ingliż kif ukoll għaċ-Ċiniż. Għall-aħjar għarfien tagħna, nirrappurtaw l-ewwel mudell SRL sintaks-agnostiku li jeċċedi l-mudelli magħrufa kollha li huma konxji mis-sintaks.', 'pl': 'Semantyczne oznaczanie roli (SRL) polega na rozpoznaniu struktury predykatów-argumentów zdania, w tym podzadania dyszifwacji predykatów i etykietowania argumentów. Poprzednie badania zazwyczaj formułują cały problem SRL na dwa lub więcej podzadań. Po raz pierwszy w niniejszym artykule wprowadzono kompleksowy model neuronowy, który jednocześnie zajmuje się dyscyplinacją predykatów i etykietowaniem argumentów w jednym ujęciu. Korzystając z punktera biafinowego, nasz model bezpośrednio przewiduje wszystkie semantyczne etykiety ról dla wszystkich podanych par słów w zdaniu bez opierania się na jakichkolwiek informacjach syntaktycznych analizy. W szczególności, rozszerzamy koder BiLSTM o transformację nieliniową, aby dalej rozróżnić predykat i argument w danym zdaniu, oraz modelować semantyczny proces oznaczania roli jako zadanie klasyfikacji pary słów poprzez zastosowanie mechanizmu uwagi biafinowej. Chociaż proponowany model jest niezależny od składni z lokalnym dekoderem, przewyższa najnowocześniejsze systemy SRL świadome składni na CoNLL-2008, 2009 dla angielskiego i chińskiego. Według naszej najlepszej wiedzy raportujemy pierwszy model SRL agnostyczny dla składni, który przewyższa wszystkie znane modele świadome składni.', 'sv': 'Semantic role labeling (SRL) är att känna igen predikat-argument strukturen i en mening, inklusive underaktiviteter av predikat disambiguation och argumentmärkning. Tidigare studier formulerar vanligtvis hela SRL-problemet i två eller flera deluppgifter. För första gången introducerar denna uppsats en end-to-end neural modell som enhetligt tar itu med predikatets disambiguation och argumentmärkning i ett skott. Med hjälp av en biaffin scorer förutspår vår modell direkt alla semantiska rolletiketter för alla givna ordpar i meningen utan att förlita sig på någon syntaktisk tolkningsinformation. Specifikt utökar vi BiLSTM-kodaren med en icke-linjär transformation för att ytterligare skilja predikatet och argumentet i en given mening, och modellerar den semantiska rollmärkningsprocessen som en ordparsklassificeringsuppgift genom att använda biaffin uppmärksamhetsmekanism. Även om den föreslagna modellen är syntaxagnostisk med lokal avkodare, överträffar den de senaste syntaxmedvetna SRL-systemen på CoNLL-2008, 2009 riktmärken för både engelska och kinesiska. Så vitt vi vet rapporterar vi den första syntax-agnostic SRL-modellen som överträffar alla kända syntax-medvetna modeller.', 'ro': 'Etichetarea rolurilor semantice (SRL) este de a recunoaște structura predicat-argument a unei propoziții, inclusiv subactivitățile dezambiguizării predicatelor și etichetarea argumentelor. Studiile anterioare formulează de obicei întreaga problemă a SRL în două sau mai multe subsarcini. Pentru prima dată, această lucrare introduce un model neural end-to-end care abordează într-o singură lovitură dezambiguizarea predicatului și etichetarea argumentului. Folosind un scorer de biafine, modelul nostru prezice direct toate etichetele de rol semantice pentru toate perechile de cuvinte date din propoziție fără a se baza pe informații sintactice de parsare. În mod specific, extindem codificatorul BiLSTM cu o transformare non-liniară pentru a distinge în continuare predicatul și argumentul dintr-o propoziție dată și modela procesul de etichetare a rolului semantic ca o sarcină de clasificare a perechilor de cuvinte prin utilizarea mecanismului de atenție biafine. Deși modelul propus este agnostic de sintaxă cu decodor local, depășește sistemele de ultimă generație conștiente de sintaxă SRL pe criteriile CoNLL-2008, 2009 atât pentru engleză, cât și pentru chineză. Din cele mai bune cunoștințe ale noastre, raportăm primul model de sintaxă agnostică SRL care depășește toate modelele cunoscute conștiente de sintaxă.', 'so': 'Shaqo galmada ah ee lagu qorayo (SRL) waa in la aqoonsado dhismaha ku qoran qoraalka, kuwaas oo ku jira samooyin ku saabsan kala soocsiga iyo warqadda ku saabsan. Waxbarashada hore sida caadiga ah dhibaatada SRL oo dhan waxay u sameynayaan laba ama ka badan shaqooyin. Marka ugu horeysay warqaddan wuxuu soo bandhigaa model neurada ugu dhammaadka ugu dambeeya, kaas oo si shakhsi ah u tacliinaya burburinta iyo wadanka ku qoran isku shot. Isku isticmaalidda kooxaha biaffin, modellkayagu wuxuu si toos ah u sii sheegayaa alaabta qaybta oo dhan ee labo noocyo ah oo lagu qoray erayga aan ku kalsoonayn macluumaad la xiriira baarkiisa. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ku dareynaa qoraalka BiLSTM oo aan liner ahayn si aan ugu kala soocno warqada la qoray, si aan ugu kala soocno cilmiga iyo dooda, waxaana sameynaa qaybta qaybta ah oo loo magacaabo xiliga labo fasax ah, si aan u isticmaalno meymiska fiirsashada biaffin. In kastoo uu tilmaamay muusikadu uu yahay syntax-agnostic with local decoder, waxay ka samaysaa dowladda-the-art-art syntax-aware SRL systems on the CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarks for both Ingiriis iyo Shiino. Aqoontayada ugu fiican, waxaynu wargelinnaa modelka ugu horeeyay ee SRL ee u horeeyay, kaas oo kor u qoraya modellada la yaqaan dhamaantood oo la yaqaan sameynta cashuurta.', 'si': 'සෙමැන්ටික් භාවිතාව ලේබලින්ග් (SRL) කියන්නේ වාක්ෂාවේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය- තර්කය සංවිධානය, ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිකාරය මුලින් පරීක්ෂණය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම SRL ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්පූර්ණය දෙකක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. පළමු වතාවෙන්, මේ පත්තුව අවසානයෙන් අවසානයෙන් ඉවරයි අවසානයෙන් න්\u200dයූරල් මොඩේල් එක්කෙන් අවසානය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරත බියාෆින් ස්කෝර් එකක් භාවිතා කරනවා, අපේ මොඩල් හරියටම සිමාන්තික භාවිත ලේබල් සියලුම් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් වචනයේ  විශේෂයෙන්, අපි බිLSTM සංකේතකය සහ non-linear සංකේතකයෙන් විශේෂ කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් පුළු ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරපු මොඩල් එක ස්ථානික සංකේතනය සමග සංකේතනය සමග සංකේතනයි, ඒක CoNLL-2008, 2009 වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ චීනි වල සංකේතනය සඳහා සංකේතන අපේ හොඳම දන්නවට, අපි පලවෙනි වාක්ෂාව-agnoසික SRL මොඩේල් එක වාර්තා කරනවා ඒක හැම දැනගන්න සින්තැක්ස් අනතුරු ම', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட வாக்கியத்தின் முன்னிருப்பு பிரிவு மற்றும் வாக்கியத்தின் முன்னிருப்பு பிரிப்பு மற்றும் தருமதிப்பு அடைவு முந்தைய ஆய்வுகள் வழக்கமாக SRL பிரச்சனையை இரண்டு அல்லது அதற்கு மேலும் துணை பணிகளாக வடிவமைக்கும். முதல் முறையில், இந்த காகிதத்திற்கு முடிவு முடிவு புதிய மாதிரியை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, அது தனிப்பட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட பிரிவுப்பு மற்ற ஒரு பைபின் மதிப்பெண் பயன்படுத்தி, எங்கள் மாதிரி நேரடியாக கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தை ஜோடிகளுக்கும் அனைத்து அரைப்புருக்கும் பங்கு சி குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் பில்எஸ்டிஎம் குறியீட்டை குறியீட்டில் சேர்த்து கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக்கில் மாற்றம் மற்றும் வார்த்தையை மாற்ற வேண்டும் மற்றும் கொடுக்கப்பட்ட வாக் Though the proposed model is syntax-agnostic with local decoder, it outperforms the state-of-the-art syntax-aware SRL systems on the CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarks for both English and Chinese.  எங்கள் சிறந்த அறிவிற்கு, நாங்கள் முதல் தொடர்ந்து கொள்ள முறைமை SRL மாதிரியை அறிவிக்கிறோம். அது எல்லா தெரியும் ஒத்', 'ur': 'سیمانیٹی رول لیبلینگ (SRL) یہ ہے کہ ایک جماعت کی مخلوقات الگوئٹ ساختار کو پہچان لیں، اس میں سے مخلوقات غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر قابل غیر اگلے تحقیقات معمولاً تمام SRL مسئلہ کو دو یا زیادہ سٹسٹسٹ میں فرمول کرتے ہیں۔ پہلی دفعہ، یہ کاغذ ایک انتہائی انتہائی انتہائی نئورل موڈل کو معلوم کرتا ہے جو ایک شکل میں مختلف غیر معلوم کرتا ہے۔ ایک بیفائن سکورر کا استعمال کرتا ہے، ہمارا موڈل مستقیماً تمام سیمنٹی رول لیبل کو کلمہ میں تمام لغات جوڑوں کے لئے پیش بینی کرتا ہے بغیر کسی سینٹاکٹی پارس معلومات پر بھروسہ کرتا ہے. مخصوص طور پر، ہم BiLSTM کوڈر کو ایک غیر linear تبدیل کے ساتھ اضافہ کریں گے کہ اس سے زیادہ مخصوص کریں اور ایک مجلس میں اراده کریں، اور سیمانٹی رول لکڑ پرسس کو ایک کلیفوں کے جوڑے کلیفوں کا کام بنا کر بیفائن کی توجه کی مکانیزی کے مطابق استعمال کریں. Though the proposed model is syntax-agnostic with local decoder, it performs the state-of-the-art syntax-aware SRL systems on the CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarks for both English and Chinese. ہمارے بہترین علم کے لئے ہم پہلی سینٹکس-agnostic SRL موڈل کو گزارتے ہیں جو تمام معلوم سینٹکس-aware موڈل سے زیادہ گزر جاتا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Oldingi taʼminlovlar odatda butun SRL muammolarni ikki yoki koʻproq vazifalarga yaratadi. Birinchi marta, bu qogʻoz oxirigi neyron modelini ko'rsatadi. Bu bir usul bilan ishlab chiqaradigan deb o'tkazib keladi. Biffin scorer bilan ishlatish mumkin, modelmiz bir so'zda bir necha so'zlar uchun hamma semantik qoʻllangan tugmalar yordamida qo'llanmagan hech qanday syntactic parse maʼlumotiga ishlatmaydi. Koʻrsatilgan, biz bir so'zdagi prefiklatni va argumentni ajratish uchun BiLSTM kodlash qoidasini qoʻshish va biffin tashkilotni ishlatish imkoniyatini bir so'z klassiflash vazifasi sifatida foydalanishimiz mumkin. Koʻrsatilgan model lokal kodlash bilan syntax-agnostik bo'lgan bo'lsa, bu ingliz va Xitoycha haqida xavfsiz soʻzni ko'rsatadi. To our best knowledge, we report the first syntax-agnostic SRL model that surpasses all known syntax-aware models.", 'vi': 'Phân tích cục bộ phân biệt cục bộ (SLOL) là nhận diện cấu trúc tranh luận cục bộ của một câu, bao gồm các yêu cầu phân dạng cục dạng khó khăn và nhãn tranh luận. Những nghiên cứu trước thường đưa toàn bộ vấn đề SSR vào hai hoặc nhiều chi tiết phụ thuộc. Đây là lần đầu tiên, tờ giấy này giới thiệu một mô hình thần kinh kết thúc mà không đồng ý chống lại sự hư hỏng tình trạng khó khăn và hiệu hoá các luận trong một phát bắn. Sử dụng bảng chữ hai cam kết, mẫu của chúng ta dự đoán trực tiếp mọi nhãn hiệu tác ngữ pháp cho các cặp từ đã chọn trong câu mà không dựa vào thông tin phân tích cú pháp. Cụ thể, chúng tôi tăng cường mã hóa BiLSTM bằng một biến đổi không tuyến tính để phân biệt tình trạng khó khăn và lý lẽ trong một câu nói cụ thể, và mô tả quy trình mô hình thức mô tả vai/phân loại các chữ cái bằng cách sử dụng cơ chế chăm chú của hai chữ. Mặc dù mẫu được đề xuất là syntax-agnostic with local Decder, nó thực hiện hơn cả hệ thống theo cú pháp luật hiện đại nhất trên nền nhạc SRML trên Coy-2007, 2009 tiêu chuẩn cả người Anh và Trung Quốc. Theo hiểu biết của chúng tôi, chúng tôi báo cáo mẫu trước tiên.', 'hr': 'Semantička označavanja uloga (SRL) je prepoznati predikatnu strukturu rečenice, uključujući podatke predikatne disambiguacije i označavanja argumenata. Prethodna ispitivanja obično formuliraju cijeli problem SRL u dvije ili više podizaka. Prvi put, ovaj papir predstavlja neuralni model koji ujedinjeno rješava predikatnu disambiguaciju i etiketu argumenata u jednom pogledu. Koristeći rezultat biafina, naš model direktno predviđa sve etikete semantičke uloge za sve dati parove riječi u rečenici bez oslanjanja na bilo kakve informacije o sintaktičkom analizu. Posebno, povećavamo koder BiLSTM sa neolinearnom transformacijom kako bismo dalje razlikovali predikat i argument u određenoj rečenici, i modelili proces označavanja semantičke uloge kao zadatak klasifikacije riječi par koristeći mehanizam pozornosti biafina. Iako je predloženi model sintaks-agnostičan s lokalnim dekoderom, nadmašuje sustave s umjetničkim sintaksima svjesnim SRL na CoNLL-2008, 2009. godine i za engleski i kineski. Najbolje znanje, prijavljujemo prvi sintaks-agnostički model SRL-a koji prelazi svim poznatim modelima svjesnog sintaksa.', 'nl': 'Semantic role labeling (SRL) is het herkennen van de structuur van een predicaat-argument van een zin, inclusief subtaken van predicaat disambiguation en argument labeling. Eerdere studies formuleren meestal het gehele SRL-probleem in twee of meer subtaken. Voor het eerst introduceert dit artikel een end-to-end neuraal model dat de predicaat disambiguation en het argument labeling in één shot verenigd aanpakt. Met behulp van een biaffine scorer voorspelt ons model direct alle semantische rollabels voor alle gegeven woordparen in de zin zonder te vertrouwen op syntactische parse informatie. Specifiek, we breiden de BiLSTM encoder uit met een niet-lineaire transformatie om het predicaat en het argument in een bepaalde zin verder te onderscheiden, en modelleren het semantische rollabeling proces als een woordpaar classificatie taak door gebruik te maken van het biaffine attentional mechanisme. Hoewel het voorgestelde model syntaxis-agnostisch is met lokale decoder, presteert het beter dan de state-of-the-art syntaxis-bewuste SRL-systemen op de CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarks voor zowel Engels als Chinees. Naar onze beste kennis rapporteren we het eerste syntaxis-agnostische SRL model dat alle bekende syntaxis-bewuste modellen overtreft.', 'bg': 'Семантичното етикетиране на ролята е да разпознава структурата на предикатите-аргументите на изречение, включително подзадачите за разграничаване на предикатите и етикетиране на аргументите. Предишните проучвания обикновено формулират целия проблем на СРЛ в две или повече подзадачи. За първи път тази статия представя невронен модел от край до край, който обединено се занимава с разграничаването на предикатите и етикетирането на аргументите в един кадър. Използвайки биафинов скор, нашият модел директно прогнозира всички семантични ролеви етикети за всички дадени двойки думи в изречението, без да разчита на никаква синтактична информация за анализ. По-конкретно, ние увеличаваме кодера с нелинейна трансформация, за да разграничим допълнително предиката и аргумента в дадено изречение, и моделираме процеса на етикетиране на семантичната роля като задача за класификация на двойката думи чрез използване на биафиновия механизъм за внимание. Въпреки че предложеният модел е агностичен към синтаксиса с локалния декодер, той превъзхожда най-съвременните системи за синтаксис-осъзнаване на SRL на референтните стойности на CoNLL-2008, 2009 за английски и китайски. Доколкото знаем, докладваме за първия синтаксис-агностичен модел, който надминава всички известни модели, осъзнаващи синтаксиса.', 'da': 'Semantisk rollemærkning (SRL) er at genkende en sætnings prædikat-argumentstruktur, herunder underopgaver af prædikat-forståelse og argumentmærkning. Tidligere undersøgelser formulerer normalt hele SRL-problemet i to eller flere underopgaver. For første gang introducerer denne artikel en end-to-end neural model, der samlet tackler prædikatets forståelse og argumentmærkning i ét skud. Ved hjælp af en biaffine scorer forudsiger vores model direkte alle semantiske rolleetiketter for alle givne ordpar i sætningen uden at stole på nogen syntaktisk fortolkning information. Specielt udvider vi BiLSTM-koderen med en ikke-lineær transformation for yderligere at skelne prædikatet og argumentet i en given sætning, og modellerer den semantiske rollemærkningsproces som en ordpar klassifikationsopgave ved at anvende biaffin opmærksomhedsmekanisme. Selvom den foreslåede model er syntaksagnostisk med lokal dekoder, overgår den de avancerede syntaksbevidste SRL-systemer på CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarks for både engelsk og kinesisk. Så vidt vi ved, rapporterer vi den første syntaksagnostiske SRL model, der overgår alle kendte syntaksbevidste modeller.', 'de': 'Semantische Rollenbeschriftung (SRL) ist die Erkennung der Prädikat-Argument-Struktur eines Satzes, einschließlich Unteraufgaben der Prädikat-Begriffsklärung und Argumentbeschriftung. Frühere Studien formulieren normalerweise das gesamte SRL-Problem in zwei oder mehr Teilaufgaben. Zum ersten Mal wird ein neuronales End-to-End-Modell vorgestellt, das die Prädikatsdisambiguation und die Argumentbeschriftung auf einen Schlag vereint. Mit einem Biaffin Scorer prognostiziert unser Modell direkt alle semantischen Rollenbezeichnungen für alle gegebenen Wortpaare im Satz, ohne sich auf syntaktische Parse-Informationen zu verlassen. Insbesondere erweitern wir den BiLSTM-Encoder um eine nichtlineare Transformation, um das Prädikat und das Argument in einem gegebenen Satz weiter zu unterscheiden, und modellieren den semantischen Rollenbeschriftungsprozess als Wortpaarklassifizierungsaufgabe unter Verwendung des biaffinen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus. Obwohl das vorgeschlagene Modell syntaxunabhängig mit lokalen Decodern ist, übertrifft es die neuesten syntaxbewussten SRL-Systeme auf den CoNLL-2008, 2009 Benchmarks für Englisch und Chinesisch. Nach bestem Wissen berichten wir über das erste syntax-agnostische SRL-Modell, das alle bekannten syntax-bewussten Modelle übertrifft.', 'sw': 'Jukumu la kimapenzi linaloitwa (SRL) ni kutambua muundo wa hoja unaotabirika wa hukumu hiyo, ikiwa ni pamoja na majukumu ya utofauti na mazungumzo. Tafiti zilizopita mara nyingi huweka tatizo zote la SRL katika kazi mbili au zaidi. Kwa mara ya kwanza, gazeti hili linaonyesha mtindo wa mwisho wa neura ambao hauna uwezo wa kukabiliana na ubaguzi unaotanguliwa na hoja inayoonyesha kwa risasi moja. Kwa kutumia mchezo wa upinzani, mwelekeo wetu unatabiri alama zote za mchanganyiko wa kimapenzi kwa wanandoa wote waliopewa maneno katika hukumu hiyo bila kutegemea taarifa yoyote ya bunge la ushirikiano. Kwa hakika, tunaongeza kodi ya BiLSTM yenye mabadiliko yasiyo na msingi ili kuonfautisha zaidi utabiri na hoja katika hukumu fulani, na kuonyesha jukumu la kimapenzi linaloitwa kama kazi ya kutangaza kwa neno mbili kwa kutumia mfumo wa kusikiliza biafi. Ingawa muundo huo unapendekezwa ni mkanganyiko wa kodi kwa ajili ya maeneo ya nchi hiyo, unaonyesha mifumo inayofahamika na sanaa ya SRL kwenye CoNLL-2008, 2009 imeweka bendera kwa ajili ya Kiingereza na Kichina. Kwa ufahamu wetu bora zaidi, tunaripoti modeli ya kwanza ya mfumo wa mkono wa SRL ambao unavuka mifano yote inayofahamika na kodi.', 'id': 'Label peran sementik (SRL) adalah untuk mengenali struktur argumen predikat dari kalimat, termasuk subtasks dari desambiguasi predikat dan label argumen. Studi sebelumnya biasanya membentuk seluruh masalah SRL menjadi dua atau lebih subtasks. Untuk pertama kalinya, kertas ini memperkenalkan model saraf akhir-akhir yang secara tidak bersatu mengatasi penyesalan dan argumen label dalam satu tembakan. Menggunakan skor biaffin, model kita secara langsung memprediksi semua label peran semantis untuk semua pasangan kata yang diberikan dalam kalimat tanpa bergantung pada informasi analisis sintaksi apapun. Secara spesifik, kita menambah pengekoder BiLSTM dengan transformasi non-linear untuk membedakan lebih lanjut predikat dan argumen dalam kalimat tertentu, dan model proses label peran semantis sebagai tugas klasifikasi pasangan kata dengan menggunakan mekanisme perhatian biaffin. Meskipun model yang diusulkan adalah sintaks-agnostik dengan dekoder lokal, ia melebihi sistem SRL terbaik yang menyadari sintaks pada CoNLL-2008, benchmarks 2009 untuk Bahasa Inggris dan Cina. Menurut pengetahuan terbaik kita, kita melaporkan model SRL sintaks-agnostik pertama yang melebihi semua model yang dikenal yang sadar sintaks.', 'ko': '의미 역할 표시(SRL)는 문장의 술어-논원 구조를 식별하며, 술어 소멸과 논원 표시의 하위 임무를 포함한다.이전 연구에서는 일반적으로 전체 SRL 문제를 둘 이상의 하위 임무로 분해했습니다.본고는 처음으로 끝에서 끝까지 신경 네트워크 모델을 제기했는데 이 모델은 술어의 변조와 파라미터 표기 문제를 한 번에 해결했다.우리의 모델은 이중 모방 점수기를 사용하여 문장에서 주어진 단어에 대한 모든 의미 역할 라벨을 직접 예측하고 문법 분석 정보에 의존하지 않는다.구체적으로 말하면 우리는 비선형 변환을 통해 BilSTM 인코더를 강화하여 주어진 문장의 술어와 파라미터를 더욱 구분하고 쌍ffine 주의 메커니즘을 사용하여 의미 역할 표기 과정을 하나의 단어 대 분류 임무로 모델링한다.제시된 모델은 로컬 디코더의 문법과 무관하지만 CoNLL-2008, 2009에서 영문 기준 테스트에서 가장 선진적인 문법 감지 SRL 시스템보다 우수하다.우리가 알기로는 모든 알려진 문법 인식 모델을 능가하는 최초의 알 수 없는 SRL 모델을 보고했습니다.', 'fa': 'برچسب نقشه\u200cهای سیماتیک (SRL) ساختار ارجمند پیش\u200cنمایی یک جمله است که شامل پایین\u200cنمایش\u200cهای پیش\u200cنمایش و برچسب ارجمند است. مطالعات قبلی معمولا کل مشکل SRL را به دو یا بیشتر فرمول می\u200cکند. برای اولین بار، این کاغذ یک مدل عصبی از پایان به پایان معرفی می\u200cکند که با یکدیگر با تغییر قابل تغییر قابل تغییر و نقاشی ارائه در یک شکل مشغول می\u200cشود. با استفاده از یک امتیاز بینافین، مدل ما مستقیما همه نقشه\u200cهای سیمانتیک را برای تمام جفت\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای داده شده در جمله پیش بینی می\u200cکند بدون اعتماد به هیچ اطلاعاتی از تجزیه\u200cهای سنتاکتیک. مخصوصا، ما رمزگذاری BiLSTM را با تغییر غیر خطی افزایش می\u200cدهیم تا بیشتر متفاوت و ارائه را در یک جمله معلوم کنیم، و روش برچسب نقش semantic را به عنوان یک کار برچسب کلمه دو کلمه با استفاده از مکانیسم مواظب توجه بیفن برچسب کنیم. با وجود اینکه مدل پیشنهاد سنتاکس-agnostic با دکور محلی است، آن سیستم\u200cهای سنتاکس-آگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی\u200cآگاهی است، که برای بهترین دانش ما، اولین مدل سینتکس-agnostic SRL را گزارش می\u200cدهیم که تمام مدل\u200cهای شناخته\u200cشده\u200cی سینتکس را فراتر می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Semantik rol etiketlemesi bir sözlenin öňündeki tartışma yapısını tanamaktır. Öňki araştyrmalar adatça bütin SRL meseläni iki ýa-da köp süýtgede formularlar. Ilkinji gezek, bu kagyz iň soňunda näral nusgasyny birleştirmek üçin öň bellenen çykyşlygyny we argumlaryň etiketini bir atly çykýar. Biziň modelimiz diňe semantik nähili etiketlerimizi sözlemde berilen söz çiftleriň üçin hiç hili sintaktik analýşim maglumatyny gaýd etmek üçin öngörülýär. Adatça, BiLSTM ködlemeleri çyzgyly däl terjime etmek üçin ön bellenen we berilen sözleriň içine gollaşdyrmak üçin ködleşirdik we semantik täblikler etiketlemesi prosesini bir söz üçin terjime etmek üçin ködleşirdik. Bu teklip eden nusgasy ýerleri dekoder bilen syntaks-agnostik bolsa hem ol CoNLL-2008, 2009-nji ýylda hem iňlisçe hem Çinçe diýip kabul eden syýasatlar çykarýar. Biziň iň gowy bilgimize, ilkinji syntaks-agnostik SRL nusgasyny baglaýarys. Bütin bilinen syntaks bilen nusgalarynyň üstünden geçsin.', 'af': "Semantiese roletiketting (SRL) is om die predikaat- argument struktuur van 'n seting te herken, insluitend subtaske van predikaat ontsamminging en argument etiketting. Vorige studie formeer gewoonlik die hele SRL probleem in twee of meer subtaske. Vir die eerste keer, hierdie papier introduseer 'n einde- na- einde neurale model wat eenvoudig die predikaat ontsammings en die argument etiket in een skoot. By gebruik van 'n biaffine telling, ons model direk voorskou alle semantiese roletikette vir alle gegewe woord paar in die seting sonder om op enige sintaktieke verwerking inligting te vertrou. Spesifieke, ons vermeerder die BiLSTM-enkoder met 'n nie-lineêre transformasie om die predikaat en die argument in 'n gegewe seting te verdere, en model die semantiese rol etiket proses as 'n woord paar klassifikasie taak deur die biaffine aandaglike mekanisme te gebruik. Alhoewel die voorgestelde model is sintaks-agnostik met plaaslike dekoder, maar dit uitvoer die state-of-the-art sintaks-aware SRL stelsels op die CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarke vir beide Engels en Sjinees. Op ons beste kennis, rapporteer ons die eerste sintaks-agnostiese SRL model wat verbygaan alle bekende sintaks-kennis modele.", 'sq': 'Etiketimi i rolit Semantik (SRL) është të njohësh strukturën predikat-argument të një fjalie, duke përfshirë nënkërkesa të çambiguacionit predikat dhe etiketën e argumenteve. Studimet e mëparshme zakonisht formulojnë të gjithë problemin e SRL në dy apo më shumë nënpyetje. Për herë të parë, kjo letër paraqet një model nervor nga fundi në fund që trajton në mënyrë të njëjtë mosqartësinë e predikuar dhe argument in që etiketon në një gjuajtje. Duke përdorur një shënues biffin, modeli ynë parashikon drejtpërdrejt të gjitha etiketat semantike të rolit për të gjitha çiftet e fjalëve të dhëna në fjalë pa u mbështetur në ndonjë informacion sintaktik të analizimit. Veçanërisht, ne shtojmë koduesin BiLSTM me një transformim jo-linear për të dalluar më tej predikatën dhe argument in në një fjalë të caktuar, dhe modelojmë procesin semantik të etiketimit të rolit si një detyrë klasifikimi i palëve fjalësh duke përdorur mekanizmin e vëmendjes biffine. Megjithëse modeli i propozuar është sintaks-agnostik me dekoderin lokal, ai ekziston mbi sistemet e lartë të sintaksit-ndërgjegjshëm të SRL në CoNLL-2008, pikat e referencës 2009 për anglishtin dhe kinezën. Për njohurinë tonë më të mirë, ne raportojmë modelin e parë sintaks-agnostik SRL që kalon të gjitha modelet e njohura sintaks-ndërgjegjshëm.', 'am': 'የስሜናቲካዊ role (SRL) የውይይት ግንኙነት አካባቢ እና የውይይት ግንኙነት እና አካባቢ ማሳየት ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ትምህርት የSRL ጉዳዩን በሁለት ወይም የበዛ ጉዳዮች ላይ ያሳያል፡፡ ለመጀመሪያው ጊዜ ይህ ገጽ የፍጻሜው የኒጀራዊ ሞዴል ያስታውሳል፡፡ የፊፊኒን scorer በመጠቀም ሞዴሌያችን በተሰጠው ቃላት ሁሉ ለስሜናዊ ትክክለኛ የደረጃ ምልክቶችን በማንኛውም መረጃ ሳይታመን በተስማማሚ የፓርላማ መረጃዎችን በመጠቀም ይናገራል፡፡ በተለይም፣ የቢልSTM የፊደል ቅርጽ እና ክርክሩን በተሰጠው ውይይት ለመለየት፣ እና የፊፊኒን አዳማዊ ሥርዓት በመጠቀም የሴሜንቲካዊ ክፍል ማድረጊያውን በቃላት ሁለት ክፍል ማድረግ ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ሞዴል ከሀገር አካባቢ ጋር ሲንካስብ-agnostic ቢሆንም እንኳን ለኢንግሊዝና በቻይናዊ እና የኢንጂል እና የቻይና ሀገሪቱን-የ-art Syntax-የሚያውቀው SRL ስርዓት በኮንነLL-2008፣ 2009 የኢንጂል እና የቻይና benchmarks ነው፡፡ ወደወደሚሻለው እውቀታችን የመጀመሪያውን የሲንካስብ-agnostic SRL ሞዴል እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակ (ՍՌL) այն է, որ ճանաչենք նախադասության կանխագուշակ-բանավեճի կառուցվածքը, ներառյալ նախագուշակ բացատրության ենթախնդիրները և բանավեճի պիտակ: Անցյալ ուսումնասիրությունները սովորաբար ամբողջ SSL խնդիրը երկու կամ ավելի ենթահարցերով են ձևավորում: Առաջին անգամ այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է մի վերջ-վերջ նյարդային մոդել, որը միասին վերաբերում է բարդ բացահայտումներին և բանավեճերին մեկ նկարում: Using a biaffine scorer, our model directly predicts all semantic role labels for all given word pairs in the sentence without relying on any syntactic parse information.  Հատկապես, մենք ավելացնում ենք ԲիԼՍՏՄ-ի կոդերը ոչ գծային փոխակերպման միջոցով, որպեսզի ավելի լավ տարբերակենք նախադասությունը և բանավեճը որոշ նախադասություններում, և մոդելավորենք սեմանտիկ դերի պիտակ տալու գործընթացը որպես բառերի զույգ դասակարգման գործընթաց, օգտագործելով Չնայած, որ առաջարկած մոդելը տեղական կոդերի հետ սինտաքսի-ագնոստիկ է, այն գերազանցում է ամենաբարձր սինտաքսի գիտակցած ՍՌԼ համակարգերը, որոնք գտնվում են 2009թ. ԿոնԼԼ-ի և 2009թ. անգլերենի համեմատական նպատակներում: Մեր լավագույն գիտելիքներից մենք զեկուցում ենք առաջին սինտաքսի-ագնոստիկ SSL մոդելը, որը գերազանցում է բոլոր հայտնի սինտաքսի գիտակցած մոդելները:', 'bn': 'সেম্যান্টিক ভূমিকা লেবেল (এসআরএল) হচ্ছে একটি বাক্যের পূর্ববর্তী যুক্তির কাঠামো স্বীকার করা, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে পূর্ববর্তী বিভ্রান্ Previous studies usually formulate the entire SRL problem into two or more subtasks.  প্রথমবারের জন্য এই পত্রিকাটি একটি শেষ পর্যন্ত নিউরেল মডেল চিহ্নিত করেছে, যা একটি গুলিতে নির্ধারিত বিভ্রান্তি এবং যুক্তি লেবেলের মাধ বিফিন স্কোর ব্যবহার করে, আমাদের মডেল সরাসরি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে যে কোন সিন্ট্যাক্টিক পার্সের তথ্য নির্ভর করে না প্রদান করে যে কোনো তথ্য ন বিশেষ করে, আমরা বিএলস্টিম এনকোডারের সাথে যোগ দিচ্ছি বিশেষ করে একটি বিশেষ বাক্যে প্রাপ্ত বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন প্রক্রিয়া এবং যুক্তি বিচ্ছিন্ন করার জন্য আরো বিচ্ছিন্ন করে দিয়েছি এবং ব যদিও প্রস্তাবিত মডেল স্থানীয় ডেকোডারের সাথে সিন্ক্যাক্স-অ্যাগনোস্টিক, তারপরেও এটি কোএনএল-২০০৮, ২০০৯ সালে ইংরেজি এবং চীনের জন্য বেনমার্ক করে দ আমাদের সর্বোচ্চ জ্ঞানের জন্য আমরা প্রথম সিন্ক্যাক্স-অ্যাঙ্কোস্টিক এসআরএল মডেল প্রতিবেদন প্রদান করি যা সকল পরিচিত স', 'az': 'Semantik rol etiketi (SRL) c√ľml…ônin predikat-argument strukturasńĪnńĪ tanńĪtmaqdńĪr, h…ôm√ßinin √∂nd…ôkili inambiguasyon v…ô argument etiketl…ôrinin altńĪndakńĪlarńĪ da dahil olmaqdńĪr. ∆Źvv…ôlki t…ôhsil olaraq b√ľt√ľn SRL problemini iki ya da daha √ßox √ß…ôkir. ńįlk d…ôf…ô bu kańüńĪt bir-birin…ô g…ôl…ôn n√∂ral modelini t…ôŇükil edir ki, bir-birin…ô qarŇüńĪlńĪq d…ôyiŇüm…ôsini v…ô argument etiketini t…ôŇükil edir. Bizim modell…ôrimiz, s√∂zl…ôrd…ô veril…ôn b√ľt√ľn s√∂z √ßiftl…ôrinin semantik rol etiketl…ôrini m√ľ…ôyy…ôn edir, sintaktik ayńĪrma m…ôlumatńĪna t…ôv…ôkk√ľl etm…ôd…ôn. √Ėzellikle, biz BiLSTM kodlayńĪcńĪnńĪ linear olmayan bir d…ôyiŇüiklikl…ô artńĪrdńĪq ki, predikat v…ô argumenti bel…ô bir c√ľml…ôd…ô daha √ßox ayńĪrmaq √ľ√ß√ľn, semantik rol etiketl…ôm…ôsi prosesini bir c√ľt klasifikasiya g√∂revi olaraq, biafin g√∂zl…ôm…ô mehanizmisini istifad…ô ed…ôr…ôk. ∆Źlb…ôtt…ô, bu modeli yerli dekoder il…ô sintaks-agnostik olaraq, CoNLL-2008, 2009-ci ńįngiliz…ô v…ô √áinl…ô birlikd…ô sintaks-bil…ôn SRL sisteml…ôrinin durumunu daha √ľst√ľn ed…ôr. Bizim …ôn yaxŇüńĪ biliyimiz…ô, ilk sintaks-agnostik SRL modelini bildiririk ki, b√ľt√ľn bilikli sintaks-bilikli modell…ôrin √ľst√ľn√ľ aŇüńĪr.', 'bs': 'Semantička označavanja uloga (SRL) je prepoznati predikatnu strukturu rečenice, uključujući podatke predikatne disambiguacije i označavanja argument a. Prethodna ispitivanja obično formuliraju cijeli problem SRL na dvije ili više podataka. Prvi put, ovaj papir predstavlja neuralni model koji ujedinjeno rješava predikatnu disambiguaciju i etiketu argumenata u jednom pogledu. Koristeći rezultat biafina, naš model direktno predviđa sve semantičke etikete za sve određene parove riječi u rečenici bez oslanjanja na sintaktičke informacije o analizu. Posebno, povećavamo koder BiLSTM sa neolinearnom transformacijom kako bismo dalje razlikovali predikat i argument u određenoj rečenici, i modelili proces označavanja semantičke uloge kao zadatak klasifikacije riječi par, koristeći mehanizam pozornosti biafina. Iako je predloženi model sintaks-agnostičan sa lokalnim dekoderom, on iznosi sisteme SRL-a koji su svesni države umjetnosti na CoNLL-2008, kriteriji za engleski i kineski i 2009. godine. Najbolje znanje, prijavljujemo prvi sintaks-agnostični model SRL-a koji prelazi svim poznatim modelima svijesti sintaksa.', 'ca': "L'etiqueta del paper semàntic (SRL) és reconèixer l'estructura predicat-argument d'una frase, incloent subtaskes de desambiguació predicata i etiqueta d'arguments. Els estudis anteriors normalment formulen tot el problema de l'SRL en dues o més subtaskes. Per primera vegada, aquest article introdueix un model neural de final a final que tracta unificament la desambiguació predicata i l'argumentació etiquetant en una foto. Utilitzant un puntuador de biaffines, el nostre model prediu directament totes les etiquetes de rols semàntics de tots els parells de paraules dadas en la frase sense confiar en cap informació sinàctica d'analització. Concretament, augmentem el codificador BiLSTM amb una transformació no linear per distingir més el predicat i l'argument d'una frase dada, i modelem el procés d'etiquetar el paper semàntic com una tasca de classificació de parell de paraules utilitzant el mecanisme d'atenció biafínica. Though the proposed model is syntax-agnostic with local decoder, it outperforms the state-of-the-art syntax-aware SRL systems on the CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarks for both English and Chinese.  Segons el nostre coneixement, informem del primer model SRL sintaxi-agnòstic que supera tots els models coneguts.", 'cs': 'Sémantické označování rolí (SRL) je rozpoznání struktury predikátu-argumentu věty, včetně dílčích úkolů rozjasnění predikátu a označování argumentů. Předchozí studie obvykle formulují celý problém SRL do dvou nebo více podúkolů. Tento článek poprvé představuje komplexní neuronový model, který jednotně řeší rozcestnění predikátů a značení argumentů v jednom záběru. Pomocí biafinového skórovače náš model přímo předpovídá všechny sémantické popisky rolí pro všechny dané slovní páry ve větě, aniž by se spoléhal na jakékoliv syntaktické analýzy. Konkrétně rozšíříme BiLSTM kodér nelineární transformací, abychom dále rozlišili predikát a argument v dané větě a modelovali proces sémantického označování rolí jako úlohu klasifikace slovních párů pomocí biafinového pozornostního mechanismu. Přestože navržený model je syntax-agnostický s lokálním dekodérem, překonává nejmodernější SRL systémy na CoNLL-2008, 2009 pro angličtinu i čínštinu. Podle našich nejlepších znalostí uvádíme první syntax-agnostický SRL model, který překonává všechny známé syntax-orientované modely.', 'fi': 'Semanttinen roolimerkintä (SRL) on lauseen predikaatti-argumenttirakenteen tunnistaminen, mukaan lukien predikaattien erottelun alitehtävät ja argumenttien merkitseminen. Aiemmat tutkimukset muotoilevat yleensä koko SRL-ongelman kahteen tai useampaan alitehtävään. Ensimmäistä kertaa tässä työssä esitellään end-to-end neuromalli, joka käsittelee yhtenäisesti predikaattien erottelua ja argumenttien merkintää yhdellä laukauksella. Mallimme ennustaa biafiinin pisteytystä käyttäen suoraan kaikki lauseen semanttiset roolimerkinnät kaikille annetuille sanapareille luottamatta syntaktisiin jäsennystietoihin. Tarkemmin sanottuna lisäämme BiLSTM-kooderin epälineaarisella muunnoksella erottamaan tietyn lauseen predikaatin ja argumentin edelleen toisistaan ja mallinnamme semanttisen roolimerkintäprosessin sanaparin luokittelutehtäväksi käyttämällä biafiinin huomiomekanismia. Vaikka ehdotettu malli on syntaksiagnostinen paikallisen dekooderin kanssa, se on parempi kuin uusimmat syntaksiatietoiset SRL-järjestelmät CoNLL-2008, 2009 vertailuarvot sekä englanniksi että kiinaksi. Tietojemme mukaan raportoimme ensimmäisen syntaksiagnostisen SRL-mallin, joka ylittää kaikki tunnetut syntaksiautomaattiset mallit.', 'et': 'Semantiline rolli märgistamine (SRL) on lause predikaatide-argumentide struktuuri äratundmine, sealhulgas predikaatide eristamise alamülesanded ja argumentide märgistamine. Varasemad uuringud sõnastavad tavaliselt kogu SRL probleemi kaheks või enamaks alamülesandeks. Esmakordselt tutvustab see töö otsast otsani neuromudelit, mis ühtselt käsitleb predikaatide eristamist ja argumentide märgistamist ühe võttega. Meie mudel prognoosib biafiini skoorija abil otseselt kõiki semantilisi rollisildisi lause kõigi antud sõnapaaride kohta, tuginemata süntaktilisele parsimisteabele. Täpsemalt täiendame BiLSTM kodeerijat mittelineaarse transformatsiooniga, et eristada veelgi antud lause predikaati ja argumenti, ning modelleerime semantilise rolli märgistamise protsessi kui sõnavaari klassifitseerimisülesannet, kasutades biafiini tähelepanumehhanismi. Kuigi kavandatud mudel on kohaliku dekooderiga süntaksiagnostiline, ületab see kaasaegseid süntaksiagnostilisi SRL-süsteeme CoNLL-2008, 2009. aasta võrdlusalustel nii inglise kui hiina keeles. Meie parimate teadmiste kohaselt esitame esimese süntaksiagnostilise SRL mudeli, mis ületab kõik teadaolevad süntaksiagnostilised mudelid.', 'jv': 'Samanti Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé, akeh sing nambah ngomongke sampek dadi model nêrung liyane wis nguasai iki, nik awak dhéwé nggawe gerapakan karo Start politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive CURRENTCURRENT Genjer-genjer diulanggar, model sing akses-asno karo decoder lokal Awakdhéwé karo awakdhéwé, awakdhéwé éntuk model sing perusahaan seneng, perusahaan anyar pakan seneng model seneng pisan-pakan.', 'ha': "Kirin Semantic na rubũta (SRL) is to gane tilasar-argument na wanda aka ƙayyade birane, kamar abun aikin da ke ƙayyade yin rabo da kuma yin alama. Tayyar da zaman, ana ƙayyade matsayin SRL ta koma cikin taskõki biyu ko sau biyu. Ga na farkon lõkaci, wannan takarda yana ƙunsa da wata motsi na ƙari zuwa ƙari, wanda ya yi kiyayya da bambancin da bakwai da shirin da aka rubũta shi cikin wata shot. Yi amfani da wani mai kwamfyuta, motalinmu yana bayani kawai duk alama na kima da aka yi wa duk alƙaluman faɗin da aka faɗa, kuma bã ya dõgara a kan wani maɓalli na parse mai syntactic. A ƙayyade, za mu ƙara koden BiLStM da wata shida ba-line-canza dõmin ka rarraba bayani ga ɗabi'in da kuma buƙata a cikin birnin da aka yi wa zafi, kuma Mu motsar aikin na semanti wanda za'a yi amfani da shi kamar wani aikin daraja guda biyu ko kuma za'a yi amfani da mekanin masu saurãre. Babu zama shirin da aka goyyade shi suntaɓa-agnostic na lokal kodi, yana ƙaranci ga halin-the-art-acronous SRL's system on the CoNLL-2009, 2009 bangons for both English and China. Ga da saninmu mafi kyãwo, muna rage misalin na farkon syntaki-agnostic SRL wanda ke ƙaranci duk misãlai da aka sani na sami-sami.", 'sk': 'Semantno označevanje vlog (SRL) je prepoznavanje strukture predikatov-argumentov stavka, vključno s podopravili razločitve predikatov in označevanja argumentov. Predhodne študije običajno formulirajo celoten problem SRL v dve ali več podnalogah. Ta prispevek prvič uvaja nevronski model od konca do konca, ki enotno obravnava razločitev predikatov in označevanje argumentov v enem posnetku. Z biafinskim ocenjevalnikom naš model neposredno napoveduje vse semantične oznake vlog za vse dane pare besed v stavku, ne da bi se zanašal na kakršne koli sintaktične informacije o razčlenitvi. Natančneje smo povečali kodirnik BiLSTM z nelinearno transformacijo, da bi dodatno razlikovali predikat in argument v danem stavku, ter modelirali semantični proces označevanja vlog kot opravilo klasifikacije besednih parov z uporabo biafinskega pozornostnega mehanizma. Čeprav je predlagani model sintaktično agnostičen z lokalnim dekoderjem, presega najsodobnejše sisteme SRL, ki se zavedajo sintakse, na referenčnih vrednostih CoNLL-2008, 2009 za angleščino in kitajščino. Po našem najboljšem znanju poročamo o prvem sintaksno-agnostičnem SRL modelu, ki presega vse znane modele, ki se zavedajo sintakse.', 'bo': 'Semantic role labeling (SRL) is to recognize the predicate-argument structure of a sentence, including subtasks of predicate disambiguation and argument labeling. སྔོན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡིག་ཚང་མས་SRL དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་རྩ་བ་གཉིས་ཡང་ན་ཕན་ཚུན་ལ་ཤུགས་ཐབས་བྱེད་པ For the first time, this paper introduces an end-to-end neural model which unifiedly tackles the predicate disambiguation and the argument labeling in one shot. Using a biaffine scorer, our model directly predicts all semantic role labels for all given word pairs in the sentence without relying on any syntactic parse information. Specifically, we augment the BiLSTM encoder with a non-linear transformation to further distinguish the predicate and the argument in a given sentence, and model the semantic role labeling process as a word pair classification task by employing the biaffine attentional mechanism. འདི་ལྟ་བུ ང་ཚོའི་ཆེད་དུ་ལྟར་ཤེས་ཚད་ལྡན་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་པོ་སྣང་ཚོར་བ་མང་ཙམ་མཁན་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས་སྟོན་དཔེ་རིགས་ཚོར་', 'he': 'תווית תפקיד סמנטית (SRL) היא לזהות את מבנה הטיעון הקודם של משפט, כולל תוויות של ניתוח הנתונים והתוויות הטיעון הקודמים. Previous studies usually formulate the entire SRL problem into two or more subtasks.  בפעם הראשונה, העבודה הזו מציגה מודל עצבי סוף-סוף שמטפל באופן בלתי יחיד במסגרת הבטחה והטיעון שמתווים בתקופה אחת. בשימוש במעצב ביאפין, הדוגמא שלנו חושף ישירות את כל תוויות תפקידים סמנטיים לכל זוגות מילים נתונים במשפט מבלי לסמוך על מידע מעבדה סינטקטי. במיוחד, אנו מגדילים את הקודן BiLSTM עם שינוי לא-לינרי כדי להבדיל יותר את הקודם והטיעון במשפט מסוים, ולדוגמן את תהליך התפיסה סמנטית בתור משימה מסווג של זוג מילים על ידי השימוש במנגנון תשומת לב ביאפין. Though the proposed model is syntax-agnostic with local decoder, it outperforms the state-of-the-art syntax-aware SRL systems on the CoNLL-2008, 2009 benchmarks for both English and Chinese.  לדעת הטובה ביותר שלנו, אנחנו דווחים על דוגמא SRL סינטקס-אגנוסטי הראשון שמעביר את כל דוגמאות מודעות לסינקס ידועות.'}
{'en': 'Challenges and Opportunities of Applying Natural Language Processing in Business Process Management', 'ar': 'تحديات وفرص تطبيق معالجة اللغة الطبيعية في إدارة عمليات الأعمال', 'es': 'Desafíos y oportunidades de aplicar el procesamiento del lenguaje natural en la gestión de procesos empresariales', 'pt': 'Desafios e Oportunidades da Aplicação do Processamento de Linguagem Natural no Gerenciamento de Processos de Negócios', 'fr': "Défis et opportunités liés à l'application du traitement du langage naturel dans la gestion des processus métier", 'ja': 'ビジネスプロセス管理における自然言語処理の応用の課題と機会', 'zh': '业务流程治以自然语言挑战', 'hi': 'व्यापार प्रक्रिया प्रबंधन में प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण को लागू करने की चुनौतियां और अवसर', 'ru': 'Проблемы и возможности применения обработки естественного языка в управлении бизнес-процессами', 'ga': 'Dúshláin agus Deiseanna a bhaineann le Próiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha a Chur i bhFeidhm i mBainistíocht Próisis Ghnó', 'ka': 'სამუშაო პროცესების მენეჯეროში მომხმარება და შესაძლებლობა', 'it': "Sfide e opportunità di applicare l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale nella gestione dei processi aziendali", 'kk': 'Бизнес процестерді басқару үшін табиғи тілдерді өңдеу және мүмкіндіктері', 'hu': 'A természetes nyelvfeldolgozás alkalmazásának kihívásai és lehetőségei az üzleti folyamatmenedzsmentben', 'el': 'Προκλήσεις και ευκαιρίες εφαρμογής της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας στη διαχείριση επιχειρηματικών διαδικασιών', 'lt': 'Gamtinės kalbos apdorojimo verslo procesuose valdymo srityje uždaviniai ir galimybės', 'ms': 'Challenges and Opportunities of Applying Natural Language Processing in Business Process Management', 'mk': 'Предизвики и можности за примена на процесот на природен јазик во менаџментот на бизнис процесот', 'ml': 'ബിസിനസ് പ്രക്രിയയുടെ നടത്തില്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്ന സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ച', 'mt': 'Sfidi u Opportunitajiet tal-Applikazzjoni tal-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali fil-Ġestjoni tal-Proċessi tan-Negozju', 'pl': 'Wyzwania i możliwości zastosowania przetwarzania języka naturalnego w zarządzaniu procesami biznesowymi', 'no': 'Utfordringar og muligheter for å bruka naturleg språk- handtering i forretningsprosessehandtering', 'mn': 'Бизнес Процессийн удирдлагатай байгалийн хэл процессийг ашиглан', 'ro': 'Provocări și oportunități de aplicare a procesării limbajului natural în managementul proceselor de afaceri', 'si': 'ව්\u200dයාපාර ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරධානයේ ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ අවස්ථාව', 'sr': 'Izazovi i mogućnosti primjene prirodnog jezika u upravljanju poslovnim procesima', 'so': 'Dhibaatooyinka iyo fursadaha codsashada afka asalka ah ee maamulka baaraandegista ganacsiga', 'sv': 'Utmaningar och möjligheter med att tillämpa naturlig språkbehandling i affärsprocesshantering', 'ta': 'தொழில் செயல் மேலாளரில் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டை பயன்படுத்தும் சிக்கல்கள் மற்றும் வாய்ப்புகள்', 'ur': 'تجارت پرسس منظورت میں طبیعی زبان پرسس کرنے کے اختیار اور فرصت', 'uz': 'Challenges and Opportunities of Applying Natural Language Processing in Business Process Management', 'vi': 'Thách thức và khả năng sử dụng giải pháp ngôn ngữ tự nhiên trong quản lý quy trình kinh doanh', 'hr': 'Izazovi i mogućnosti primjene prirodnog jezika u upravljanju poslovnim procesima', 'bg': 'Предизвикателства и възможности за прилагане на естествената езикова обработка в управлението на бизнес процесите', 'da': 'Udfordringer og muligheder ved at anvende naturlig sprogbehandling i forretningsprocesser', 'nl': 'Uitdagingen en kansen van het toepassen van natuurlijke taalverwerking in bedrijfsprocesbeheer', 'de': 'Herausforderungen und Chancen der Anwendung von Natural Language Processing im Business Process Management', 'id': 'tantangan dan kesempatan untuk menerapkan Proses Bahasa Alami dalam Manajemen Proses Bisnis', 'sw': 'Changamoto na Opportunities of Applying Language asilia in Management of Business Processes', 'ko': '자연 언어 처리가 업무 프로세스 관리에서의 도전과 기회', 'fa': 'چالش\u200cها و فرصت\u200cهایی که در مدیریت پروسه\u200cهای تجاری در کاربرد زبان طبیعی', 'sq': 'Challenges and Opportunities of Applying Natural Language Processing in Business Process Management', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Opdragte en geleenthede van toepassing van Natuurlike Taal Proses in Besigheid Proses Bestuurder', 'hy': 'Բիզնես պրոցեսի ղեկավարման մեջ բնական լեզվի վերամշակման կիրառման մարտահրավերները և հնարավորությունները', 'bn': 'ব্যবসা প্রক্রিয়া ব্যবসায়ীতে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার চ্যালেঞ্জ এবং সুযোগ', 'az': 'ńįŇüraf Procesi ńįdar…ôtind…ô T…ôbi…ôtli Dil ńįŇül…ôm…ôsini ∆Źlav…ô Et', 'bs': 'Izazovi i mogućnosti primjene prirodnog jezika u upravljanju poslovnim procesima', 'ca': "Els reptes i les oportunitats d'aplicar el processament de llenguatges naturals a la gestió dels processos empresarials", 'cs': 'Výzvy a příležitosti aplikace zpracování přirozeného jazyka v řízení obchodních procesů', 'fi': 'Luonnollisen kielen käsittelyn haasteet ja mahdollisuudet liiketoimintaprosessien hallinnassa', 'et': 'Loodusliku keele töötlemise rakendamise väljakutsed ja võimalused äriprotsesside juhtimises', 'tr': 'Bizzat Prozesi Müdirinde Natal Dil Prozesini Uýgunlaşdyrmak üçin kynçylyklar we Mümkinçilikler', 'jv': 'Gak Iso Karo Oportunasi kanggo Sistem Perusahaan Daftar aturan kanggo Kebebasan Perusahaan Manual', 'sk': 'Izzivi in priložnosti uporabe obdelave naravnega jezika v upravljanju poslovnih procesov', 'he': 'אתגרים ותזדמנויות להשתמש בתהליך השפה הטבעית בניהול תהליכים עסקיים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'དངོས་འབྲེལ་ལས་སྦྱོར་དོ་དམ་ནང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་དང་གོ་སྤྲོ་བ།'}
{'en': 'The Business Process Management (BPM) field focuses in the coordination of labor so that organizational processes are smoothly executed in a way that products and services are properly delivered. At the same time, NLP has reached a maturity level that enables its widespread application in many contexts, thanks to publicly available frameworks. In this position paper, we show how NLP has potential in raising the benefits of BPM practices at different levels. Instead of being exhaustive, we show selected key challenges were a successful application of NLP techniques would facilitate the automation of particular tasks that nowadays require a significant effort to accomplish. Finally, we report on applications that consider both the process perspective and its enhancement through NLP.', 'ar': 'يركز مجال إدارة عمليات الأعمال (BPM) على تنسيق العمل بحيث يتم تنفيذ العمليات التنظيمية بسلاسة بطريقة يتم بها تسليم المنتجات والخدمات بشكل صحيح. في الوقت نفسه ، وصل البرمجة اللغوية العصبية إلى مستوى النضج الذي يتيح تطبيقه على نطاق واسع في العديد من السياقات ، وذلك بفضل الأطر المتاحة للجمهور. في ورقة الموقف هذه ، نوضح كيف أن البرمجة اللغوية العصبية لديها القدرة على زيادة فوائد ممارسات BPM على مستويات مختلفة. بدلاً من أن تكون شاملة ، نظهر أن التحديات الرئيسية المختارة كانت أن التطبيق الناجح لتقنيات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية من شأنه أن يسهل أتمتة مهام معينة تتطلب في الوقت الحاضر جهدًا كبيرًا لإنجازها. أخيرًا ، نقدم تقريرًا عن التطبيقات التي تراعي كلاً من منظور العملية وتعزيزها من خلال البرمجة اللغوية العصبية.', 'es': 'El campo de la gestión de procesos de negocio (BPM) se centra en la coordinación de la mano de obra para que los procesos organizacionales se ejecuten sin problemas de manera que los productos y servicios se entreguen correctamente. Al mismo tiempo, la PNL ha alcanzado un nivel de madurez que permite su aplicación generalizada en muchos contextos, gracias a los marcos disponibles públicamente. En este documento de posición, mostramos cómo la PNL tiene potencial para aumentar los beneficios de las prácticas de BPM en diferentes niveles. En lugar de ser exhaustivos, mostramos desafíos clave seleccionados en los que una aplicación exitosa de técnicas de PNL facilitaría la automatización de tareas particulares que hoy en día requieren un esfuerzo significativo para realizar. Finalmente, informamos sobre las aplicaciones que consideran tanto la perspectiva del proceso como su mejora a través de la PNL.', 'fr': "Le domaine de la gestion des processus métier (BPM) se concentre sur la coordination du travail afin que les processus organisationnels soient exécutés en douceur et que les produits et services soient correctement fournis. Dans le même temps, la PNL a atteint un niveau de maturité qui permet son application généralisée dans de nombreux contextes, grâce à des cadres accessibles au public. Dans ce document de position, nous montrons comment la PNL a le potentiel d'augmenter les avantages des pratiques BPM à différents niveaux. Au lieu d'être exhaustif, nous montrons certains défis clés pour lesquels une application réussie des techniques de PNL faciliterait l'automatisation de tâches particulières qui nécessitent aujourd'hui un effort considérable. Enfin, nous présentons des applications qui tiennent compte à la fois de la perspective du processus et de son amélioration grâce à la PNL.", 'pt': 'A área de Business Process Management (BPM) concentra-se na coordenação da mão de obra para que os processos organizacionais sejam executados sem problemas de forma que os produtos e serviços sejam entregues adequadamente. Ao mesmo tempo, a PNL atingiu um nível de maturidade que permite sua ampla aplicação em muitos contextos, graças a frameworks publicamente disponíveis. Neste documento de posicionamento, mostramos como a PNL tem potencial para aumentar os benefícios das práticas de BPM em diferentes níveis. Em vez de ser exaustivo, mostramos os principais desafios selecionados em que uma aplicação bem-sucedida de técnicas de PNL facilitaria a automação de tarefas específicas que hoje exigem um esforço significativo para serem realizadas. Por fim, relatamos aplicações que consideram tanto a perspectiva do processo quanto seu aprimoramento por meio da PNL.', 'ja': 'ビジネスプロセス管理（ BPM ）フィールドは、製品とサービスが適切に提供される方法で組織プロセスがスムーズに実行されるように、労働の調整に焦点を当てています。同時に、NLPは、公開されているフレームワークのおかげで、多くのコンテキストでその広範な適用を可能にする成熟度レベルに達しています。このポジションペーパーでは、NLPが異なるレベルでBPM実践の利点を高める可能性を示しています。網羅的ではなく、NLPテクニックを成功裏に適用することで、現在達成するために大幅な努力が必要な特定のタスクの自動化を促進することが、選択された主要な課題であることを示しています。最後に、プロセスの視点とNLPによる強化の両方を考慮したアプリケーションについて報告します。', 'zh': '业务流程治 (BPM) 字段侧重于劳力调,以正付产服务之宜。 NLP已及成熟度,明可用之框架,可得广泛应用于众上下文。 本立场文,展NLP异层面BPM受其益。 吾未详也,示要挑战,NLP术之成也,将以进今之特定务自动化。 」卒,告而图之视角及NLP益应用程序。', 'hi': 'व्यवसाय प्रक्रिया प्रबंधन (बीपीएम) क्षेत्र श्रम के समन्वय में केंद्रित है ताकि संगठनात्मक प्रक्रियाओं को इस तरह से आसानी से निष्पादित किया जा सके कि उत्पादों और सेवाओं को ठीक से वितरित किया जा सके। उसी समय, एनएलपी एक परिपक्वता स्तर पर पहुंच गया है जो सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध ढांचे के लिए धन्यवाद, कई संदर्भों में अपने व्यापक अनुप्रयोग को सक्षम बनाता है। इस स्थिति के पेपर में, हम दिखाते हैं कि एनएलपी में विभिन्न स्तरों पर बीपीएम प्रथाओं के लाभों को बढ़ाने की क्षमता कैसे है। संपूर्ण होने के बजाय, हम दिखाते हैं कि चयनित प्रमुख चुनौतियां एनएलपी तकनीकों का एक सफल अनुप्रयोग विशेष कार्यों के स्वचालन की सुविधा प्रदान करेगा जिन्हें आजकल पूरा करने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण प्रयास की आवश्यकता होती है। अंत में, हम उन अनुप्रयोगों पर रिपोर्ट करते हैं जो एनएलपी के माध्यम से प्रक्रिया परिप्रेक्ष्य और इसकी वृद्धि दोनों पर विचार करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Область управления бизнес-процессами (BPM) фокусируется на координации трудовых ресурсов, чтобы организационные процессы выполнялись плавно таким образом, чтобы продукты и услуги предоставлялись надлежащим образом. В то же время NLP достигла уровня зрелости, который позволяет широко применять ее во многих контекстах благодаря общедоступным фреймворкам. В этом позиционном документе мы показываем, как NLP обладает потенциалом в повышении преимуществ практик BPM на различных уровнях. Вместо того, чтобы быть исчерпывающими, мы показываем, что выбранные ключевые проблемы заключались в успешном применении методов NLP, что облегчило бы автоматизацию конкретных задач, которые в настоящее время требуют значительных усилий для выполнения. Наконец, мы сообщаем о приложениях, которые учитывают как перспективу процесса, так и его усовершенствование через NLP.', 'ga': 'Díríonn an réimse Bainistíochta Próisis Gnó (BPM) ar chomhordú saothair ionas go gcuirfear próisis eagraíochtúla i gcrích go rianúil ar bhealach a sheachadtar táirgí agus seirbhísí i gceart. Ag an am céanna, tá leibhéal aibíochta bainte amach ag NLP a chuireann ar chumas é a chur i bhfeidhm go forleathan i go leor comhthéacsanna, a bhuíochas sin do chreataí atá ar fáil go poiblí. Sa staidpháipéar seo, léirímid an cumas atá ag NLP buntáistí cleachtais BPM a ardú ag leibhéil éagsúla. In ionad a bheith uileghabhálach, léirímid na príomhdhúshláin roghnaithe dá n-éascódh feidhmiú rathúil na dteicnící NLP uathoibriú tascanna ar leith nach mór iarracht shuntasach a dhéanamh sa lá atá inniu ann. Ar deireadh, tuairiscímid trí NLP ar iarratais a bhreithníonn dearcadh an phróisis agus a fheabhsú.', 'ka': 'ბიზნესი პროცესის მენეჯერება (BPM) პაროლის კოორდინაციაში კონტუკურებულია, რადგან ორგანიზაციული პროცესი მხოლოდ გამოყენებულია როგორც პროცესები და სერვის ერთადერთი დროში, NLP მიიღეთ წარმოდგენების დონე, რომელიც ძალიან გაფართებული პროგრამის გამოყენება მრავალური კონტექსტში, საშუალოდ ხელმისაწარმოდგენებით. ამ პოზიციის დომენტში, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, როგორ NLP-ს პოზიციალური პროგრამის გამოიყენება განსხვავებული დონტში. ჩვენ გამოიყენებული გასაღების გარეშე, ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოიყენებული გასაღების გამოყენება, რომ NLP ტექნოგიების გასაკეთებელი პროგრამის გამოყენება შეუძლებელ საბოლოოდ, ჩვენ შეგვიყვანეთ პროცესის პერსპექტიკური პერსპექტიკური და მისი გაზრუქმება NLP-ით.', 'el': 'Ο τομέας διαχείρισης επιχειρηματικών διαδικασιών επικεντρώνεται στο συντονισμό της εργασίας, ώστε οι οργανωτικές διαδικασίες να εκτελούνται ομαλά με τρόπο που τα προϊόντα και οι υπηρεσίες παραδίδονται σωστά. Ταυτόχρονα, το ΝΛΠ έχει φτάσει σε επίπεδο ωριμότητας που επιτρέπει την ευρεία εφαρμογή του σε πολλά πλαίσια, χάρη στα δημόσια διαθέσιμα πλαίσια. Σε αυτό το έγγραφο θέσης, παρουσιάζουμε πώς η ΝΛΠ έχει δυνατότητες στην αύξηση των οφελών των πρακτικών σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα. Αντί να είναι εξαντλητική, δείχνουμε επιλεγμένες βασικές προκλήσεις όπου μια επιτυχημένη εφαρμογή τεχνικών θα διευκολύνει την αυτοματοποίηση συγκεκριμένων εργασιών που σήμερα απαιτούν σημαντική προσπάθεια για να επιτευχθούν. Τέλος, αναφέρουμε εφαρμογές που εξετάζουν τόσο την προοπτική της διαδικασίας όσο και την αναβάθμιση της μέσω της ΝΛΠ.', 'hu': 'Az üzleti folyamat menedzsment (BPM) terület a munkaerő koordinációjára összpontosít, hogy a szervezeti folyamatok zökkenőmentesen végrehajtsák a termékek és szolgáltatások megfelelő szállítását. Ugyanakkor az NKP olyan érettségi szintet ért el, amely a nyilvánosan elérhető kereteknek köszönhetően számos kontextusban széles körben alkalmazható. Ebben az álláspontban bemutatjuk, hogy az NLP milyen potenciállal rendelkezik a BPM-gyakorlatok különböző szinteken történő növelésében. Ahelyett, hogy kimerítőek lennénk, kiválasztott kulcsfontosságú kihívásokat mutatunk be, hogy az NLP technikák sikeres alkalmazása megkönnyítené bizonyos feladatok automatizálását, amelyek manapság jelentős erőfeszítést igényelnek. Végezetül beszámolunk olyan alkalmazásokról, amelyek figyelembe veszik mind a folyamat perspektíváját, mind annak népszerűsítését.', 'lt': 'Verslo proceso valdymo srityje daugiausia dėmesio skiriama darbo koordinavimui, kad organizaciniai procesai būtų sklandžiai vykdomi tinkamai teikiant produktus ir paslaugas. Be to, NLP pasiekė termino lygį, kuris leidžia plačiai taikyti daugelyje aplinkybių dėl viešai prieinamų sistemų. Šiame pozicijos dokumente parodomi, kaip NLP gali padidinti BPM praktikos naudą įvairiais lygmenimis. Užuot buvę išsamūs, mes rodome, kad pasirinkti pagrindiniai iššūkiai buvo sėkmingas NLP metodų taikymas padėtų automatizuoti konkrečias užduotis, kurioms šiandien reikia daug pastangų. Galiausiai pranešame apie paraiškas, kuriomis atsižvelgiama ir į proceso perspektyvą, ir į jos tobulinimą per NLP.', 'kk': 'Бизнес процесстерді басқару (BPM) өрісі жұмыс координациясына көмектеседі, сондықтан құрылғылар мен қызметтер дұрыс жеткізілген тәртіпке жұмыс істеу арқылы бағытталған. Осы уақытта NLP көптеген жағдайда қолданбаны көптеген жағдайда көптеген жағдайда өтеу деңгейіне жетті, көп жағдайда қолданбаны көп жағдайда қолдануға болады. Бұл қағазында NLP бағдарламасының әртүрлі деңгейінде қалай мүмкіндігін көтеру мүмкіндігін көрсетеді. Бірақ таңдалған кілттердің бәрін көрсету орнына, NLP техникаларының сәтті бағдарламасы қазіргі тапсырмаларды автоматты түрде өзгертуге мүмкіндік береді. Соңында, біз процестің перспективасын және NLP арқылы жақсы көтеретін қолданбаларды туралы хабарлаймыз.', 'ms': 'Medan Pengurusan Proses Bisnes (BPM) fokus dalam koordinasi kerja supaya proses organisasi dilaksanakan dengan lancar dengan cara bahawa produk dan perkhidmatan diberikan dengan betul. Pada masa yang sama, NLP telah mencapai tahap dewasa yang membolehkan aplikasi luas dalam banyak konteks, berkat bingkai yang tersedia kepada masyarakat. Dalam kertas kedudukan ini, kita menunjukkan bagaimana NLP mempunyai potensi untuk meningkatkan keuntungan dari praktek BPM pada tahap yang berbeza. Daripada melelahkan, kami menunjukkan cabaran kunci yang dipilih adalah aplikasi yang berjaya teknik NLP akan memudahkan automatisasi tugas tertentu yang kini memerlukan usaha yang signifikan untuk dilakukan. Akhirnya, kami laporkan aplikasi yang mempertimbangkan perspektif proses dan peningkatan melalui NLP.', 'mk': 'Полгото за менаџмент на бизнис процесот (БПМ) се фокусира на координацијата на работната сила, со цел организациските процеси да бидат функционирани на начин на кој производите и услугите се испорачуваат соодветно. At the same time, NLP has reached a maturity level that enables its widespread application in many contexts, thanks to publicly available frameworks.  Во овој позициски документ покажуваме како НЛП има потенцијал во зголемувањето на бенефициите од практиките на БПМ на различни нивоа. Наместо да бидеме исцрпени, покажуваме избрани клучни предизвици дека успешната апликација на техниките на НЛП би ја олеснила автоматизацијата на одредени задачи кои денес бараат значителни напори за остварување. Конечно, известуваме за апликациите кои ја разгледуваат перспективата на процесот и неговото подобрување преку НЛП.', 'it': "Il campo Business Process Management (BPM) si concentra nel coordinamento del lavoro in modo che i processi organizzativi siano eseguiti senza intoppi in modo che prodotti e servizi siano correttamente forniti. Allo stesso tempo, NLP ha raggiunto un livello di maturità che ne consente l'applicazione diffusa in molti contesti, grazie a framework pubblicamente disponibili. In questo documento di posizione, mostriamo come NLP abbia il potenziale di aumentare i benefici delle pratiche BPM a diversi livelli. Invece di essere esaustivi, mostriamo alcune sfide chiave in cui un'applicazione efficace delle tecniche PNL faciliterebbe l'automazione di particolari compiti che oggi richiedono uno sforzo significativo da realizzare. Infine, riportiamo su applicazioni che considerano sia la prospettiva del processo che il suo miglioramento attraverso PNL.", 'ml': 'ബിസിനസ് പ്രക്രിയസ്സ് മാനേജ്മെന്റ് (ബിപിഎം) ജോലിയുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് സംഘടനക പ്രക്രിയകള്\u200d സൌമ്യമായി പ്രവര്\u200d അതേ സമയത്ത്, NLP പ്രായമുള്ള നില എത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ വിശാലമായ പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്ക ഈ സ്ഥാനത്തെ പേപ്പറില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്\u200dഎല്\u200dപിയുടെ സാധ്യതയുള്ളതെന്നാണ്. ബിപിഎം പിന്റെ  ക്ഷീണിതമായിരിക്കുന്നതിനു പകരം നമ്മള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട താക്കോലുകള്\u200d വിജയിച്ചിരുന്നെങ്കില്\u200d NLP ടെക്നിക്കുകളുടെ വിജയിച്ച പ് അവസാനം, നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രയോഗങ്ങളെപ്പറ്റി റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നു. പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തെപ്പറ്റിയും അതിന്റെ പ്', 'mt': 'Il-qasam tal-Ġestjoni tal-Proċessi tan-Negozju (BPM) jiffoka fil-koordinazzjoni tax-xogħol sabiex il-proċessi organizzattivi jiġu eżegwiti mingħajr xkiel b’mod li l-prodotti u s-servizzi jiġu pprovduti kif suppost. Fl-istess ħin, il-NLP laħqet livell ta’ maturità li jippermetti l-applikazzjoni mifruxa tagħha f’ħafna kuntesti, grazzi għall-oqfsa disponibbli għall-pubbliku. F’dan id-dokument ta’ pożizzjoni, nagħmlu evidenza ta’ kif il-NLP għandu l-potenzjal li jżid il-benefiċċji tal-prattiki tal-BPM f’livelli differenti. Minflok ma nkunu eżawrjenti, nuru sfidi ewlenin magħżula jekk applikazzjoni b’suċċess tat-tekniki NLP tiffaċilita l-awtomatizzazzjoni ta’ kompiti partikolari li llum jeħtieġu sforz sinifikanti biex jitwettqu. Finally, we report on applications that consider both the process perspective and its enhancement through NLP.', 'mn': 'Бизнес Процессийн Менежмент (BPM) салбар ажлын координацийг төвлөрүүлж байгууллагын процессүүд бүтээгдэхүүн болон үйлчилгээ зөв хангалттай байдлаар хөгжүүлдэг. Яг ижил хугацаанд NLP өсөлтийн түвшинд хүрсэн бөгөөд олон нөхцөлд өргөн хэрэглээ ашиглах боломжтой болсон. Энэ байр суурь цаасан дээр бид NLP нь BPM дасгал хөдөлгөөнийг өөр хэмжээнд хэрхэн нэмэгдүүлэх боломжийг харуулж байна. Бүтэлгүйтлүүлэх оронд бид сонгогдсон чухал сорилтуудыг харуулсан. NLP техникуудын амжилттай хэрэглээ өнөөдөр бүтээх тодорхой үйл ажиллагааг автоматжуулахад тусалдаг. Эцэст нь бид процессийн үзэл бодлыг болон NLP-ээр нэмэгдүүлэх хэрэгслүүдийн тухай ярьдаг.', 'ro': 'Domeniul Business Process Management (BPM) se concentrează pe coordonarea forței de muncă, astfel încât procesele organizaționale să fie executate fără probleme, astfel încât produsele și serviciile să fie livrate în mod corespunzător. În același timp, PNL a atins un nivel de maturitate care permite aplicarea sa pe scară largă în multe contexte, datorită cadrelor disponibile publicului. În acest lucru de poziție, arătăm cum PNL are potențial în creșterea beneficiilor practicilor BPM la diferite niveluri. În loc să fim exhaustivi, arătăm că o aplicare cu succes a tehnicilor PNL ar facilita automatizarea anumitor sarcini care în prezent necesită un efort semnificativ pentru a le îndeplini. În cele din urmă, raportăm aplicațiile care iau în considerare atât perspectiva procesului, cât și îmbunătățirea acestuia prin PNL.', 'no': 'Dette feltet Business Process Management (BPM) fokuserer i koordinasjonen av arbeidet slik at organizasjonale prosessar er gjennomført lett på måte at produkt og tenester vert rett levert. Samtidig har NLP nådd ein ferdigheitsnivå som gjer programmet i mange kontekstar, takk på tilgjengelege rammeverk. I denne posisjonspapiret viser vi korleis NLP har potensial for å øke fordelene av BPM-praksis på ulike nivå. I staden for å vera utgåande, viser vi valte nøkkelutfordringar ein suksessfull program av NLP-teknikk som vil gjere automatisering av spesielle oppgåver som i dag krev ein signifikant forsøk for å fullføra. I slutt rapporterer vi om programmer som ser på både prosesseperspektivet og forbetringa av prosessen gjennom NLP.', 'sr': 'Polje upravljanja poslovnim procesima (BPM) fokusira se u koordinaciji rada tako da se organizacijski procesi glatko izvršavaju na način na koji se proizvodi i usluge ispunjavaju kako treba. U isto vreme, NLP je ostvario razinu zrelosti koja omogućava široku primjenu u mnogim kontekstima zahvaljujući javno dostupnim okvirama. U ovom papiru za poziciju pokazujemo kako NLP ima potencijal povećanja prednosti prakse BPM na različitim nivoima. Umesto da budemo iscrpljivi, pokazujemo odabrane ključne izazove da su uspešna primjena tehnika NLP-a olakšala bi automatizaciju određenih zadataka koje danas zahtevaju značajan napor za postizanje. Napokon, prijavljujemo aplikacije koje razmatraju perspektivu procesa i njegovo poboljšanje kroz NLP.', 'pl': 'Obszar zarządzania procesami biznesowymi (BPM) koncentruje się na koordynacji pracy tak, aby procesy organizacyjne były sprawnie realizowane w sposób prawidłowo dostarczane produkty i usługi. Jednocześnie NLP osiągnął poziom dojrzałości, który umożliwia jego szerokie zastosowanie w wielu kontekstach, dzięki publicznie dostępnym frameworkom. W niniejszym artykule pokazujemy, w jaki sposób NLP ma potencjał w zwiększaniu korzyści płynących z praktyk BPM na różnych poziomach. Zamiast być wyczerpującym, pokazujemy wybrane kluczowe wyzwania, w których udane zastosowanie technik NLP ułatwiłoby automatyzację poszczególnych zadań, które obecnie wymagają znacznego wysiłku. Na koniec raportujemy o aplikacjach, które uwzględniają zarówno perspektywę procesu, jak i jego usprawnienie poprzez NLP.', 'si': 'ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධානය (BPM) ක්ෂේත්රය ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා ව්\u200dයාපාර ප්\u200dරධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය ප්\u200dරධානය සහ සේවය සඳහා  එකම වෙලාවෙන්, NLP ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා ඒක ගොඩක් සංවේදනයක් විසින් විසින් විසින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සක්\u200dරිය කරනවා, සාර්ථක මේ ස්ථානය පැත්තේ, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ NLP ට කොහොමද ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙන්නේ BPM ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනස් ස්ථානයක්  අපි තෝරාගත්ත යතුරු අභ්\u200dයාගයක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුවෙන් නැති NLP විද්\u200dයාගයක් සමහර විශේෂ විද්\u200dයාගයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාල අන්තිමේදී, අපි අන්තිමේදී අන්තිමේදී අන්තිමේදී පරීක්ෂණය සහ NLP වලින් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝ', 'ta': 'தொழில் செயல் மேலாளர் (BPM) புலத்தை வேலையின் ஒருங்கிணைப்பில் கவனம் செலுத்துகிறது. நிறுவனமான செயல்கள் எளிதாக இயக்கப்படுகிறது பொருள் மற்று அதே நேரத்தில், NLP ஒரு முழுமையான நிலையை அடைந்துள்ளது, அது அதிகப்படுத்தப்பட்ட பயன்பாட்டை பல நிலைகளில் செயல்படுத்துகிறது, பொது In this position paper, we show how NLP has potential in raising the benefits of BPM practices at different levels.  தற்போது தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட விசையான சவால்க்களை காட்டுவதற்கு பதிலாக NLP தொழில்நுட்பத்தின் வெற்றிகரமான பயன்பாடு என்பதை நாம் காட்டுகிற இறுதியில், நாம் பயன்பாடுகள் பற்றி அறிக்கை செய்கிறோம் செயல் பார்வையும் மற்றும் அதிகரிப்பும் NLP மூலம்.', 'so': "Maamulka baaritaanka ganacsiga (BPM) beeraha ayaa ku hagaya koorsooyinka shaqada si si saxda ah loo sameeyo qalabka shaqada, si ay u sameeyaan qalabka shaqada si saxda ah sida ay u bixiso alaabta iyo adeegyada. Isla waqtigaas NLP wuxuu gaadhay heer barwaaqo ah, kaasoo codsigiisa ballaadhan ee barwaaqada badan ku furi kara, mahad darteed waxaa loo barwaaqaysan yahay firaaqada. Warqadan booska ah waxaynu ka muujinnaa sida NLP u awoodo inuu koriyo faa'iidada danaha BPM ee heerarka kala duduwan. Hadii aan la daalin, waxaynu tusnaynaa dhibaatooyin la doortay inay tahay mid liibaansan dalbashada teknikadaha NLP waxay u sahli lahayd iskuulka shaqooyinka gaarka ah oo ay maanta u baahan yihiin in uu sameeyo hawlo aad u weyn. Ugu dambaysta waxaan wargelinaynaa codsiyada ka fiirsashada aragtida iyo horumarinta ee NLP.", 'sv': 'Fältet Business Process Management (BPM) fokuserar på samordning av arbete så att organisatoriska processer utförs smidigt på ett sätt som produkter och tjänster levereras korrekt. Samtidigt har NLP nått en mognadsnivå som möjliggör en utbredd tillämpning i många sammanhang tack vare offentligt tillgängliga ramverk. I detta positionsdokument visar vi hur NLP har potential att öka fördelarna med BPM-metoder på olika nivåer. Istället för att vara uttömmande visar vi utvalda nyckelutmaningar där en framgångsrik tillämpning av NLP-tekniker skulle underlätta automatisering av vissa uppgifter som idag kräver en betydande ansträngning att utföra. Slutligen rapporterar vi om ansökningar som beaktar både processperspektivet och dess förbättring genom NLP.', 'ur': 'تجارت پروسس منظورت (BPM) فیلڈ کام کی تعلیم میں تمرکز کرتا ہے تاکہ سازمانی پروسس اس طرح آسان کر دیے جاتے ہیں جس طرح تولید اور خدمات ٹھیک طور پر حاصل کیے جاتے ہیں. اسی طرح NLP ایک بڑھاپے سطح تک پہنچ گیا ہے جو بہت سی موقعیتوں میں اپنے گھاپے پھیلائے ہوئے کاروبار کو امکان دیتا ہے، صریح فرمورک کے شکریہ۔ اس موقعیت کاغذ میں، ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ NLP کیسے مختلف سطح پر BPM کے فائدہ اضافہ کرنے کے لئے قابل ہے۔ ہم نے انتخاب کئی چالوں کو دکھایا کہ NLP ٹیکنیکوں کی موفقیت کے ساتھ ایک کاربرد تھی کہ آج کے دن ایک بڑی تلاش کی ضرورت رکھتی ہے آخر میں، ہم اپنا کاروبار کے بارے میں راپورت کرتے ہیں جنہوں نے نلپ کے ذریعہ پرسس کی نظریہ اور اس کی زیادتی سمجھ لیا ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu paytda NLP yetarli darajaga yetishdi. Bu yerda ko'pchilik darajada qoʻllangan dasturni yordam beradi. Bu joyda, biz BPM jarayonlarini boshqa darajada qanday foydalanishini ko'rsamiz. Chaqaloq bo'lmagandan o'rniga, biz tanlangan kalit muammolarini ko'rsatdik, NLP teknikalarning muvaffaqiyatli dasturi bo'lgan vazifalarni avtomatik foydalanishiga foydalanadi. Endi, biz jarayonning ko'rinishini va NLP orqali oshirishni tasavvur qiladigan dasturlar haqida xabar beramiz.", 'vi': 'Trường Quản lý Tiến trình Kinh doanh (P.M) tập trung vào việc phối hợp lao động để các thủ tục tổ chức được thực hiện trơn tru theo cách cung cấp hàng hóa và dịch vụ. Cùng lúc đó, chọc dò tủy sống đã đạt tới mức độ trưởng thành cho phép sử dụng nó rộng rãi trong nhiều tình huống, nhờ vào các khung tranh công khai. Trong bài tập này, chúng tôi cho thấy Njala có tiềm năng làm sao để nâng cao lợi ích của các thói quen P.P. Thay vì phải hết sức mình, chúng tôi cho thấy những thử thách quan trọng đã được chọn là một ứng dụng thành công trong các kỹ thuật độc lập lập đặc biệt mà ngày nay cần một nỗ lực quan trọng để hoàn thành. Cuối cùng, chúng tôi báo cáo về những ứng dụng xem xét cả triển vọng tiến trình và cải tiến nó qua Njala.', 'bg': 'Полето "Управление на бизнес процесите" (БПМ) се фокусира върху координацията на труда, така че организационните процеси да се изпълняват гладко по начин, по който продуктите и услугите се доставят правилно. В същото време НЛП достигна ниво на зрялост, което позволява широко приложение в много контексти, благодарение на публично достъпни рамки. В тази позиция показваме как НЛП има потенциал за повишаване на ползите от практиките на БУМ на различни нива. Вместо да сме изчерпателни, показваме избрани ключови предизвикателства, при които успешното прилагане на техниките за НЛП би улеснило автоматизацията на конкретни задачи, които в днешно време изискват значителни усилия за изпълнение. И накрая, докладваме за приложения, които разглеждат както перспективата на процеса, така и нейното подобряване чрез НЛО.', 'nl': 'Het vakgebied Business Process Management (BPM) richt zich op de coördinatie van arbeid zodat organisatieprocessen soepel worden uitgevoerd op een manier die producten en diensten goed worden geleverd. Tegelijkertijd heeft NLP een volwassenheidsniveau bereikt dat zijn wijdverspreide toepassing in vele contexten mogelijk maakt, dankzij publiek beschikbare frameworks. In dit positiedocument laten we zien hoe NLP potentieel heeft om de voordelen van BPM praktijken op verschillende niveaus te verhogen. In plaats van uitputtend te zijn, tonen we geselecteerde belangrijke uitdagingen aan waarin een succesvolle toepassing van NLP-technieken de automatisering van bepaalde taken zou vergemakkelijken die tegenwoordig een aanzienlijke inspanning vereisen. Tenslotte rapporteren we over toepassingen die zowel het procesperspectief als de verbetering ervan door NLP overwegen.', 'da': 'Business Process Management (BPM) feltet fokuserer på koordinering af arbejdskraft, så organisatoriske processer udføres gnidningsløst på en måde, at produkter og tjenester leveres korrekt. Samtidig har NLP nået et modenhedsniveau, der muliggør udbredt anvendelse i mange sammenhænge takket være offentligt tilgængelige rammer. I dette positionsdokument viser vi, hvordan NLP har potentiale til at øge fordelene ved BPM-praksis på forskellige niveauer. I stedet for at være udtømmende viser vi udvalgte centrale udfordringer, hvor en vellykket anvendelse af NLP teknikker ville lette automatiseringen af bestemte opgaver, som i dag kræver en betydelig indsats at udføre. Endelig rapporterer vi om ansøgninger, der tager hensyn til både procesperspektivet og dets forbedring gennem NLP.', 'hr': 'Polje upravljanja poslovnim procesima (BPM) usredotoči se na koordinaciju rada kako bi organizacijski procesi glatko izvršili na način kako se proizvodi i usluge ispunjavaju kako treba. U isto vrijeme, NLP je postigao razinu zrelosti koja omogućava široku primjenu u mnogim kontekstima zahvaljujući javno dostupnim okvirama. U ovom pozicijskom papiru pokazujemo kako NLP ima potencijal povećanja koristi prakse BPM na različitim razinama. Umjesto da budemo iscrpljivi, pokazujemo odabrane ključne izazove da su uspješna primjena tehnika NLP-a olakšala bi automatizaciju posebnih zadataka koje danas zahtijevaju značajan napor za postizanje. Napokon, prijavljamo se o aplikacijama koje smatraju perspektivom procesa i njegovom poboljšanju putem NLP-a.', 'de': 'Der Bereich Business Process Management (BPM) konzentriert sich auf die Koordination der Arbeit, damit organisatorische Prozesse reibungslos ausgeführt werden, so dass Produkte und Dienstleistungen ordnungsgemäß geliefert werden. Gleichzeitig hat NLP einen Reifegrad erreicht, der seine breite Anwendung in vielen Kontexten dank öffentlich zugänglicher Frameworks ermöglicht. In diesem Positionspapier zeigen wir, wie NLP Potenzial hat, den Nutzen von BPM-Praktiken auf verschiedenen Ebenen zu erhöhen. Anstatt erschöpfend zu sein, zeigen wir ausgewählte Schlüsselherausforderungen, bei denen eine erfolgreiche Anwendung von NLP-Techniken die Automatisierung bestimmter Aufgaben erleichtern würde, die heutzutage einen erheblichen Aufwand erfordern. Abschließend berichten wir über Anwendungen, die sowohl die Prozessperspektive als auch deren Verbesserung durch NLP berücksichtigen.', 'ko': '업무 프로세스 관리(BPM) 분야는 제품과 서비스를 적절하게 납품하는 방식으로 조직 프로세스를 순조롭게 집행하기 위해 노동력을 조율하는 데 중심을 두었다.이와 동시에 NLP는 이미 성숙한 수준에 이르렀으며 공개적으로 사용할 수 있는 프레임워크를 빌려 많은 환경에서 광범위하게 응용될 수 있다.본고에서 우리는 NLP가 어떻게 서로 다른 차원에서 BPM 실천의 장점을 향상시키는지 보여줄 것이다.우리는 무궁무진하지 않고 선택한 관건적인 도전을 보여 주었다. 즉, NLP 기술의 성공적인 응용은 현재 많은 노력을 기울여야만 완성할 수 있는 특정한 임무의 자동화를 실현하는 데 도움이 될 것이다.마지막으로 프로세스 시각과 NLP 향상을 모두 고려하는 애플리케이션을 보고했습니다.', 'id': 'Ruang Manajemen Proses Bisnis (BPM) fokus dalam koordinasi pekerjaan sehingga proses organisasi diselesaikan dengan lancar dengan cara bahwa produk dan layanan disediakan dengan benar. Pada saat yang sama, NLP telah mencapai tingkat dewasa yang memungkinkan aplikasi tersebar dalam banyak konteks, berkat bingkai yang tersedia publik. Dalam kertas posisi ini, kami menunjukkan bagaimana NLP memiliki potensi untuk meningkatkan keuntungan dari praktek BPM pada tingkat yang berbeda. Daripada melelahkan, kami menunjukkan tantangan kunci yang dipilih adalah aplikasi sukses dari teknik NLP akan memudahkan otomatisasi tugas tertentu yang sekarang membutuhkan usaha yang signifikan untuk dilakukan. Akhirnya, kami melaporkan aplikasi yang mempertimbangkan perspektif proses dan peningkatannya melalui NLP.', 'fa': 'میدان مدیریت فرایند تجاری (BPM) در مرکز کاری تمرکز می\u200cکند تا فرایند سازمانی به راهی که تولید و خدمات به طور درست تحویل داده می\u200cشوند به طور مستقیم اجرا شوند. در همین زمان، NLP به سطح بزرگسالگی رسید که در بسیاری از موقعیت\u200cها کاربرد گسترده\u200cاش را اجازه می\u200cدهد، سپاسگزاری فرم\u200cهایی که در دسترس عمومی موجود هستند. در این کاغذ موقعیت، ما نشان می دهیم که NLP چگونه پتانسیل دارد تا سودهای تمرین BPM را در سطح مختلف بالا ببرید. به جای اینکه استفاده کنیم، ما نشان می دهیم که چالش های کلید انتخاب شده یک کاربرد موفقیت از تکنیک های NLP آسان سازی اتوماتیک کارهای خاصی که امروز نیاز به تلاش مهم برای انجام کردن است. بالاخره، ما در مورد کاربردهای گزارش می دهیم که به نظر نظر فرایند و افزایش آن از طریق NLP فکر می کنند.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa mchakato wa Biashara (BPM) ulijikita katika ushirikiano wa kazi ili mchakato wa shirika unatekelezwa vizuri kwa namna bidhaa na huduma zinavyotolewa vizuri. Wakati huo huo, NLP imefikia kiwango cha kukua ambacho kinawezesha matumizi makubwa katika matatizo mengi, shukrani kwa miundombi inayopatikana hadharani. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha jinsi NLP ina uwezekano wa kukuza faida za mazoea ya BPM katika ngazi tofauti. Badala ya kuwa na hali ya kushindwa, tunaonyesha changamoto zilizochaguliwa zilikuwa ni mafanikio ya kutumia mbinu za NLP kutasaidia kutekeleza kazi maalum ambazo leo zinahitaji juhudi kubwa ili kufanikiwa. Mwisho, tunaripoti kuhusu matumizi yanayofikiria mtazamo wa mchakato na kuongezeka kwa njia ya NLP.', 'sq': 'Fusha e Menaxhimit të Procesit të Biznesit (BPM) përqëndrohet në koordinimin e punës në mënyrë që proceset organizative të ekzekutohen lehtë në një mënyrë që prodhimet dhe shërbimet të dorëzohen siç duhet. Në të njëjtën kohë, NLP ka arritur një nivel pjekurie që lejon aplikimin e saj të përhapur në shumë kontekste, falë kuadrit në dispozicion publik. Në këtë dokument pozicioni, ne tregojmë se si NLP ka potencial në rritjen e përfitimeve të praktikave të BPM në nivele të ndryshme. Në vend që të jemi të lodhur, ne tregojmë sfida kryesore të zgjedhura nëse një aplikim i suksesshëm i teknikave NLP do të lehtësojë automatizimin e detyrave të veçanta që sot kërkojnë një përpjekje të rëndësishme për të përmbushur. Më në fund, ne raportojmë mbi aplikimet që konsiderojnë si perspektivën e procesit, ashtu edhe përmirësimin e tij nëpërmjet NLP.', 'af': "Die Besigheid Proses Bestuurder (BPM) veld fokus in die koordinasie van arbeid sodat organizasionale prosesse gelukkig uitgevoer word in 'n manier dat produkte en dienste regverdig verskaf word. Op dieselfde tyd het NLP 'n vervuldigheid vlak bereik wat sy breeduitbreidige toepassing in baie kontekste kan aktiveer, dankie aan openlik beskikbaar raamwerke. In hierdie posisie papier wys ons hoe NLP potensieal het om die voordele van BPM-praksies op verskillende vlakke te verhoog. In plaas van uitbreiding te wees, vertoon ons gekose sleutel uitdrukkings is 'n suksesvol toepassing van NLP-teknike sal die outomatiese van spesifieke taak wat vandag 'n betekende versoek nodig nodig nodig nodig benodig om te voldoen. Eindelik, ons rapporteer op toepassings wat die proses perspektief en sy verbetering deur NLP aanneem.", 'tr': "Business Process Management (BPM) sahypalary işgärlik koordinatýasynda gurumsal proseller gowy bir şekilde işledilýär. Şol wagtda, NLP ýerleşýän çalaşyk düzümlerini köp wagtlarda üýtgetmegi mümkin edýär, publika meýilleşdirýän çarawçalaryň üçin sag bol. Bu ýerde gazetde, NLP'iň BPM praktika etmäniň has faýllaryny üýtgetmek üçin nähili potensialyny görkezýäris. Tamamlanmak ýerine, saýlanan a çyk kynçylyklary NLP tehnikalarynyň başarnykly uygulamasy üçin häzirki günlerde beýleki zadlaryň awtomatik taýýarlanmagyny kömek edip biler. Soňunda, procesiň perspektivini we NLP tarapyndan gelişmegini düşünýän uygulamalary barada bildirip ýöredýäris.", 'am': 'የንግድ ፕሮጀክት መቆጣጠር (BPM) መሬት የሠርዓዊ ፕሮጀክቶች ፍሬዎችን እና አገልግሎቶችን በመስጠት በተስፋት ማድረግ ይታያል፡፡ በዚያው ሰዓት፣ NLP በተሰፋው ፕሮግራሙን በብዙ ሁኔታዎች እንዲያስችል የፍሬም አካባቢ ደረጃ ደርሶአል፡፡ In this position paper, we show how NLP has potential in raising the benefits of BPM practices at different levels.  ሳይደክም፣ የተመረጠውን የቁልፎች ጥቃት የNLP ቴክኖክኖች ማቀናቀል ነው፡፡ በመጨረሻም የፕሮጀክቱን ስሜት እና በNLP ማድረግ በሚያስቡ ፕሮግራሞች ላይ እናስታውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Բիզնես պրոցեսի ղեկավարման (BPM) ոլորտը կենտրոնանում է աշխատանքի կոորդինավորման մեջ, որպեսզի կազմակերպական պրոցեսները լավ իրականացվում են այնպես, որ ապրանքները և ծառայությունները ճիշտ են տրամադրվում: Միևնույն ժամանակ, ՆԼՊ-ը հասել է հասունության մակարդակի, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս իր տարածված կիրառությունը բազմաթիվ կոնտեքստներում, շնորհիվ հանրային հասանելի շրջանակներին: Այս դիրքի թղթի մեջ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես է ՆԼՊ-ը պոտենցիալ բարձրացնելու BPM-ի գործողությունների առավելությունները տարբեր մակարդակներում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ընտրված հիմնական մարտահրավերները հաջողությամբ կիրառելով ՆԼՊ տեխնիկաները, կհեշտացնեն որոշակի առաջադրանքների ավտոմատիզացիան, որոնք այսօր մեծ ջանքեր են պահանջում կատարելու համար: Վերջապես, մենք զեկուցում ենք ծրագրերի մասին, որոնք վերաբերում են նաև գործընթացի տեսանկյունին, նաև դրա բարելավմանը ՆԼՊ-ի միջոցով:', 'bn': 'ব্যবসা প্রক্রিয়া ম্যানেজেন্ট (বিপিএমি) ক্ষেত্রের ক্ষেত্রে মনোযোগ প্রদান করেছে যাতে সংগঠনের প্রক্রিয়া স্বচ্ছতার ভাবে প্রযুক্ত একই সাথে এনএলপি একটি পূর্ণ স্তরে পৌঁছেছে যা অনেক প্রকল্পে ব্যাপক অ্যাপলিকেশন সক্রিয় করেছে, প্রকাশ্যে প্রাপ্ত ফ্রেমের কা এই অবস্থানের প্রতিবেদনে আমরা দেখাচ্ছি কিভাবে এনএলপি বিপিএমের অনুশীলনের সুবিধা বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছে। ক্লান্ত হওয়ার পরিবর্তে আমরা নির্বাচিত কী চ্যালেঞ্জ দেখিয়েছি যদি এনএলপি কৌশলের সফল প্রয়োগ করা হয়, তাহলে স্বয়ংক্রিয় কাজের স্বয়ংক্রিয় কর্মসূ অবশেষে, আমরা প্রক্রিয়ার দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং এনএলপির মাধ্যমে এর উন্নতি বিবেচনা করি অ্যাপলিকেশন সম্পর্কে রিপোর্ট করি।', 'bs': 'Polje upravljanja poslovnim procesima (BPM) fokusira se u koordinaciji rada tako da se organizacijski procesi glatko izvršavaju na način kako se proizvodi i usluge ispunjavaju kako treba. U isto vrijeme, NLP je ostvario razinu zrelosti koja omogućava široku primjenu u mnogim kontekstima zahvaljujući javno dostupnim okvirama. U ovom pozicijskom papiru pokazujemo kako NLP ima potencijal povećanja koristi prakse BPM na različitim nivoima. Umjesto da budemo iscrpljivi, pokazujemo odabrane ključne izazove da su uspješna primjena tehnika NLP-a olakšala bi automatizaciju posebnih zadataka koje danas zahtijevaju značajan napor za postizanje. Napokon, prijavljujemo aplikacije koje smatraju perspektivom procesa i njegovom poboljšanjem putem NLP-a.', 'ca': "El camp de Gestió del Proces de Negocis (BPM) es centra en la coordinació del treball de manera que els processos organitzacionals siguin executats de manera que els productes i serveis siguin proporcionats adequadament. Al mateix temps, la NLP ha arribat a un nivell de maturitat que permet la seva aplicació generalitzada en molts contextos, gràcies a cadres disponibles al públic. En aquest paper de posició, demostram com la NLP té potencial per augmentar els beneficis de les pràctiques de PM a diferents nivells. En comptes de ser exhaustius, demostram que els reptes clau seleccionats eren que una aplicació exitosa de tècniques NLP facilitaria l'automatització de tasques específices que actualment necessiten un esforç significatiu per aconseguir. Finalment, informem sobre aplicacions que consideren tant la perspectiva del procés com el seu millor a través del NLP.", 'az': "Business Process Management (BPM) sahəsi işin koordinasyonunda odaqlanır ki, organizasiya proqramları təmiz olaraq ürəklər və servislər düzgün təklif ediləcək yolla düzgün işlədilər. Həmçin in NLP çoxlu müxtəliflərdə genişlənən uyğulamasını çox genişləndirən bir ölçülük seviyesinə çatdı, halqa faydalanır frameworklərə şükür edərək. Bu pozisyon kağıdında, NLP'in BPM praksilərinin faydalarını müxtəlif səviyyələrdə artırmaq üçün necə potensialı olduğunu göstəririk. Tərəfləndirmək yerinə, seçilmiş a çar çətinlikləri NLP tehniklərinin başarılı uyğulaması günümüzdə böyük bir çabaları lazımdır. Sonunda, NLP vasitəsilə proses perspektivini və onun artırmasını düşünən proqramlar barəsində xəbər veririk.", 'cs': 'Obor Business Process Management (BPM) se zaměřuje na koordinaci práce tak, aby organizační procesy byly plynule prováděny tak, aby produkty a služby byly řádně dodávány. Zároveň NLP dosáhla úrovně vyspělosti, která umožňuje jeho široké uplatnění v mnoha kontextech díky veřejně dostupným rámcům. V tomto pozičním dokumentu ukazujeme, jak má NLP potenciál zvyšovat výhody BPM postupů na různých úrovních. Namísto vyčerpávání ukazujeme vybrané klíčové výzvy, v nichž by úspěšné aplikace NLP technik usnadnilo automatizaci konkrétních úkolů, které dnes vyžadují značné úsilí. Nakonec podáváme zprávu o aplikacích, které zohlední jak perspektivu procesu, tak jeho vylepšení prostřednictvím NLP.', 'et': 'Äriprotsesside juhtimise (BPM) valdkond keskendub tööjõu koordineerimisele, nii et organisatsioonilised protsessid viiakse sujuvalt ellu viisil, et tooted ja teenused on nõuetekohaselt tarnitud. Samal ajal on uue õppekava jõudnud küpsustasemele, mis võimaldab tänu avalikult kättesaadavatele raamistikele selle laialdast rakendamist paljudes kontekstides. Käesolevas seisukohadokumendis näitame, kuidas NLP-l on potentsiaali suurendada BPM-praktika kasu erinevatel tasanditel. Selle asemel, et olla ammendav, näitame välja valitud peamised väljakutsed, mille puhul NLP tehnikate edukas rakendamine hõlbustaks konkreetsete ülesannete automatiseerimist, mis nõuavad tänapäeval märkimisväärset pingutust. Lõpetuseks anname aru taotlustest, mis arvestavad nii protsessi perspektiivi kui ka selle täiustamist uue õppekava kaudu.', 'fi': 'Business Process Management (BPM) -kenttä keskittyy työn koordinointiin siten, että organisaatioprosessit toteutetaan sujuvasti siten, että tuotteet ja palvelut toimitetaan asianmukaisesti. Samalla NLP on saavuttanut kypsyystason, joka mahdollistaa sen laajan soveltamisen monissa yhteyksissä julkisesti saatavilla olevien puitteiden ansiosta. Tässä kannanotossa näytämme, miten NLP:llä on potentiaalia nostaa BPM-käytäntöjen hyötyjä eri tasoilla. Sen sijaan, että olisimme tyhjentäviä, näytämme valitut keskeiset haasteet, joissa NLP-tekniikoiden onnistunut soveltaminen helpottaisi sellaisten tehtävien automatisointia, joiden toteuttaminen vaatii nykyään merkittävää työtä. Lopuksi raportoimme sovelluksista, joissa otetaan huomioon sekä prosessinäkökulma että sen parantaminen uuden ohjelman avulla.', 'jv': 'fun Sampeyan ngono, NLP wis digowok kelas terus-terusahaan sing iso ngejarakake aplikasi karo akeh liyane contexter, misasa akeh iso nggawe akeh nesaturan tambah. Awakdhéwé éntuk kartané iki, kita sembarang piye NLP iso nggawe bener liyane dolanan sing pertama BPM sampek. Ayo ora ono sampeyan, kita menehi perbudhakan sing dibutuhke Lha wih-wih, awak dhéwé ngertuk aplikasi sing paling nggawe perspektur perusahaan lan nglanggar nggambar NLP.', 'he': 'שדה ניהול תהליך העסקים (BPM) מתמקד בתיאור העבודה כדי שהתהליכים הארגוניים יוצאים להורג באופן חלק בדרך שמוצרים ושירותים מושלמים כראוי. באותו הזמן, NLP הגיעה לרמה בוגרת שמאפשרת את ההשתמשות המפורסמת שלה בקשר רבה, תודות למסגרות זמינות לציבור. בנייר העמדה הזה, אנו מראים איך NLP יש פוטנציאל בגידול יתרונות של פעולות BPM ברמות שונות. במקום להיות מותשים, אנחנו מראים אתגרים מפתחיים נבחרים היתה שימוש מוצלח של טכניקות NLP שיקל את האוטומטיקה של משימות מסוימות סוף סוף, אנחנו מדווחים על היישומים ששוקלים גם את פרספקטיבת התהליך וגם את השיפור שלה דרך NLP.', 'ha': "Manajan Shirin Ayuka (BP) field na fokus a cikin shirin aikin sa'an nan a yi zartar da zartar da shirin kiraici mai sauƙi a cikin hanyar da za'a samar da abubuwa da servicin da gaske. A sami guda, NLP ya isa wani daraja da ya tsohon, mai amfani da shirinsa mai faɗa ɗa cikin masu hushi, masu gõde wa firam masu buƙata. Ga wannan takardan aiki, Munã nũna jinsi NLP zai iya ƙara amfani da abincin BBC a cikin daraja dabam. Bai zama mai rauni ba, sai mu nũna wa masu kanyaƙi waɗanda aka zãɓe su idan an kasance na cin nasara wa shirin ayuka na NLP, zai yarda farat farat faratarwa na aikin haske da ke buƙata a yanzu, aikin mai girma dõmin ya cika. Gani, Munã warar da shiryoyin ayukan ayuka waɗanda ke ƙaddara masu kallo da shirin aiki da za'a ƙara shi zuwa NLP.", 'sk': 'Področje upravljanja poslovnih procesov (BPM) se osredotoča na koordinacijo dela, tako da se organizacijski procesi nemoteno izvajajo tako, da so izdelki in storitve pravilno dostavljeni. Hkrati je NLP dosegla raven zrelosti, ki omogoča njegovo široko uporabo v številnih kontekstih, zahvaljujoč javno dostopnim okvirom. V tem stališču pokažemo, kako ima NLP potencial za povečanje koristi praks BPM na različnih ravneh. Namesto da bi bili izčrpni, smo pokazali izbrane ključne izzive, da bi uspešna uporaba tehnik NLP olajšala avtomatizacijo določenih nalog, ki jih danes zahtevajo veliko truda. Na koncu poročamo o aplikacijah, ki upoštevajo perspektivo procesa in njeno izboljšanje prek NLP.', 'bo': 'The Business Process Management (BPM)field focuses in the coordination of labor so that organizational processes are smoothly executed in a way that products and services are properly delivered. དུས་གཅིག་པ་དང་NLP ཡིས་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་མང་པོ་ནང་དུ་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ་ཐོག་ཡོད། གནས་སྟངས་འདིའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཐོག་ཏུ། NLP ལ་གྱིས་BPM སྒྲུབ་གཏོང་གི་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་པ་སྟོན་ཡོད། རང་ཉིད་དུས་ཡོད་མེད་ལ། འུ་ཅག་གིས་བདམས་ཟིན་པའི་གནད་དོན་ལ་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ནོར་སྤྱོད་ནི་NLP ད་ལྟར་གྱི་གྲུབ་སྤྱོད་བཞིན་གྱིས་ད་ལྟ མཐའ་མར། འོས་ཀྱིས་ལས་སྦྱོར་གྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཡར་རྒྱས་རྐྱེན་འདི་ལ་བསམ་བྱེད་པའི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་'}
{'en': 'Novelty Goes Deep. A Deep Neural Solution To Document Level Novelty Detection', 'ar': 'الجدة تتعمق. حل عصبي عميق لتوثيق مستوى اكتشاف الحداثة', 'es': 'La novedad va más allá. Una solución neuronal profunda para la detección de novedades a nivel de documento', 'pt': 'A novidade vai fundo. Uma solução neural profunda para a detecção de novidades em nível de documento', 'fr': 'La nouveauté va en profondeur. Une solution neuronale profonde pour la détection des nouveautés au niveau des documents', 'ja': 'Novelty Goes Deep. A Deep Neural Solution to Document Level Novelty Detection', 'zh': '新奇深入。 以文档级新颖性检测深神经解决方案', 'ru': 'Новизна глубоко уходит в прошлое. Глубокое нейронное решение для определения новизны на уровне документа', 'hi': 'नवीनता गहरी हो जाती है। दस्तावेज़ स्तर नवीनता का पता लगाने के लिए एक गहरी तंत्रिका समाधान', 'ga': 'Úrscéalta ag dul go domhain. Réiteach Néarach domhain chun Brath Úrnuachta a Dhoiciméadú', 'ka': 'ნჲგვლრთრვ დჲეთ ეყლბჲკჲ. დოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის ნეირალური განსახულება', 'el': 'Η καινοτομία πηγαίνει βαθιά. Μια βαθιά νευρωνική λύση για την τεκμηρίωση της ανίχνευσης καινοτομίας επιπέδου', 'it': 'La novità va in profondità. Una soluzione neurale profonda per il rilevamento di novità a livello documentale', 'hu': 'Az újdonság mélyre megy. Mélyidegi megoldás az újdonságok dokumentumszintű felismeréséhez', 'kk': 'Жаңалық түсіндіреді. Құжат деңгейінің жаңалық деңгейіне түйінгі невралдық шешуі', 'mk': 'Novelty Goes Deep.  Name', 'lt': 'Novelty Goes Deep.  Gilus neurologinis tirpalas dokumentų lygiui naujumo nustatymas', 'ms': 'Novelty Goes Deep.  Name', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തിലേക്ക് പോകുന്നു. A Deep Neural Solution To Document Level Novelty Detection', 'mt': 'Novelty Goes Deep.  Soluzzjoni Newrali Profonda għad-Dokument', 'mn': 'Шинээс гүн гүнзгий. Документын түвшинд шийдвэрлэх гүнзгий мэдрэлийн шийдвэрлэл', 'pl': 'Nowość idzie głęboko. Rozwiązanie głębokiego neuronu do dokumentowania wykrywania nowości na poziomie poziomu', 'sr': 'Novelty Goes Deep. Duboko neurološko rješenje za detekciju novinskog nivoa dokumenta', 'si': 'නෝවෙල්ටි ගියා ගොඩක්. ගොඩක් න්\u200dයූරල් විස්තරයක් විස්තරයක් විස්තර කරන්න ලොකුණු ස්තූතියක් හොයාගන්න', 'so': 'Novelty Goes Deg. Heshiiska nooca ee hoose u dhexeeya', 'sv': 'Nytt går djupt. En djup neural lösning för detektering av nyheter på dokumentnivå', 'ro': 'Noutatea merge adânc. O soluție neurală profundă pentru detectarea noutăților la nivel de document', 'ta': 'ஆழமாக போகிறது. ஆவண நிலை மட்டத்திற்கு ஆழமான புதிய தீர்வு', 'ur': 'نوئل ڈوب جاتا ہے ایک عمیق نیورال حل ڈکومکسٹ لیویل نیوولتی اچانک', 'no': 'Novelty går dypt. Name', 'uz': 'Toʻldirish A Deep Neural Solution To Document Level Novelty Detection', 'vi': 'Tin mới nhận sâu. Một giải pháp thần kinh sâu để phát hiện dạng nâng cấp tin tức', 'bg': 'Новостта отива дълбоко. Дълбоко неврално решение за откриване на новости на ниво документ', 'nl': 'Nieuwigheid gaat diep. Een diepe neurale oplossing om nieuwigheidsdetectie op peil te documenteren', 'da': 'Nyheden går dybt. En dyb neural løsning til registrering af nyheder på dokumentniveau', 'de': 'Neuheit geht tief. Eine tiefneuronale Lösung zur Dokumentation der Neutralitätserkennung', 'hr': 'Novelty Goes Deep. Duboko neurološko rješenje za otkrivanje novčanosti nivoa dokumenta', 'ko': '신기감이 사람들의 마음속에 깊이 파고들다.문서급 참신성 검출의 심층 신경 알고리즘', 'fa': 'نوبتي عميق ميشه Name', 'sw': 'Ujadala unaenda kina. Uthibitisho wa kina wa Neural kwa Kugundua Viwango vya Ukurasa', 'af': 'Name Name', 'tr': 'Täzeliklik Derje gitýär Senediň derejesi Taýýarlama', 'hy': 'Նորությունը խորը է գնում: A Deep Neural Solution To Document Level Novelty Detection', 'sq': 'E re shkon thellë. Një zgjidhje e thellë neurone për të zbuluar nivelin e ri të dokumentit', 'az': 'Yax캼nl캼q derinlik edir. D칬k칲m톛nin s톛viyy톛sin톛 N칬ral 칂칬z칲m', 'am': 'undo-type undo-type', 'id': 'Novelty Goes Deep.  A Deep Neural Solution To Document Level Novelty Detection', 'cs': 'Novinka jde hluboko. Hluboké nervové řešení pro dokumentaci detekce novinky na úrovni úrovně', 'bn': 'নভেল্টি গভীরে যাচ্ছে। ডকুমেন্টের স্তরের নিউরেল সমাধান', 'bs': 'Novelty Goes Deep. Duboko neurološko rješenje za otkrivanje novinskog nivoa dokumenta', 'fi': 'Uutuus menee syvälle. Syvä hermoratkaisu dokumenttitason uutuuksien havaitsemiseen', 'ca': 'Novelty Goes Deep.  A Deep Neural Solution To Document Level Novelty Detection', 'et': 'Uudsus läheb sügavale. Sügav neuraalne lahendus dokumenditaseme uudsuste tuvastamiseks', 'jv': 'Nolomi Goes deep deep', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'החדשות הולכות עמוקות. פתרון עצבי עמוק לגלות חדשות ברמה המסמך', 'sk': 'Novica gre globoko. Globoka živčna rešitev za zaznavanje novosti na ravni dokumenta', 'bo': 'རྨང་གཞུང་གི་འགྲམ་པ། སྒྲིག་ཡིག་གི་གནས་ཚད་མཐོ་རྗེས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་སྒོ་རྩིས་བ་ཞིག་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'The rapid growth of documents across the web has necessitated finding means of discarding redundant documents and retaining novel ones. Capturing redundancy is challenging as it may involve investigating at a deep semantic level. Techniques for detecting such semantic redundancy at the document level are scarce. In this work we propose a deep Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) based model to classify a document as novel or redundant with respect to a set of relevant documents already seen by the system. The system is simple and do not require any manual feature engineering. Our novel scheme encodes relevant and relative information from both source and target texts to generate an intermediate representation which we coin as the Relative Document Vector (RDV). The proposed method outperforms the existing state-of-the-art on a document-level novelty detection dataset by a margin of 5 % in terms of accuracy. We further demonstrate the effectiveness of our approach on a standard paraphrase detection dataset where paraphrased passages closely resemble to semantically redundant documents.', 'ar': 'استلزم النمو السريع للوثائق عبر الويب إيجاد وسائل للتخلص من المستندات الزائدة عن الحاجة والاحتفاظ بالمستندات الجديدة. يعد التقاط التكرار أمرًا صعبًا لأنه قد يتضمن التحقيق على مستوى دلالي عميق. تقنيات الكشف عن مثل هذا التكرار الدلالي على مستوى الوثيقة نادرة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح نموذجًا عميقًا يستند إلى الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية (CNN) لتصنيف المستند على أنه جديد أو زائد عن الحاجة فيما يتعلق بمجموعة من المستندات ذات الصلة التي شاهدها النظام بالفعل. النظام بسيط ولا يتطلب أي ميزات هندسية يدوية. يقوم مخططنا الجديد بترميز المعلومات ذات الصلة والنسبية من كل من النصوص المصدر والهدف لإنشاء تمثيل وسيط نقوم بصرفه على أنه ناقل المستند النسبي (RDV). تتفوق الطريقة المقترحة على أحدث ما هو موجود على مجموعة بيانات اكتشاف الجدة على مستوى المستند بهامش 5٪ من حيث الدقة. نوضح كذلك فعالية نهجنا في مجموعة بيانات قياسية لاكتشاف إعادة الصياغة حيث تشبه المقاطع المعاد صياغتها إلى حد كبير المستندات الزائدة عن الحاجة.', 'es': 'El rápido crecimiento de documentos en la Web ha obligado a encontrar medios para descartar documentos redundantes y conservar los nuevos. Capturar la redundancia es un desafío, ya que puede implicar investigar a un nivel semántico profundo. Las técnicas para detectar dicha redundancia semántica a nivel de documento son escasas. En este trabajo proponemos un modelo profundo basado en redes neuronales convolucionales (CNN) para clasificar un documento como novedoso o redundante con respecto a un conjunto de documentos relevantes ya vistos por el sistema. El sistema es simple y no requiere ninguna ingeniería manual de funciones. Nuestro novedoso esquema codifica información relevante y relativa de los textos de origen y destino para generar una representación intermedia que acuñamos como el Vector de Documento Relativo (RDV). El método propuesto supera al estado actual de la técnica en un conjunto de datos de detección de novedades a nivel de documento por un margen de ~ 5% en términos de precisión. Además, demostramos la eficacia de nuestro enfoque en un conjunto de datos de detección de paráfrasis estándar donde los pasajes parafraseados se parecen mucho a documentos semánticamente redundantes.', 'pt': 'O rápido crescimento de documentos na web exigiu encontrar meios de descartar documentos redundantes e reter os novos. Capturar a redundância é um desafio, pois pode envolver a investigação em um nível semântico profundo. Técnicas para detectar tal redundância semântica no nível do documento são escassas. Neste trabalho propomos um modelo baseado em Redes Neurais Convolucionais (CNN) para classificar um documento como novo ou redundante em relação a um conjunto de documentos relevantes já vistos pelo sistema. O sistema é simples e não requer nenhuma engenharia manual de recursos. Nosso novo esquema codifica informações relevantes e relativas de textos de origem e de destino para gerar uma representação intermediária que cunhamos como o Relative Document Vector (RDV). O método proposto supera o estado da arte existente em um conjunto de dados de detecção de novidade em nível de documento por uma margem de ∼5% em termos de precisão. Demonstramos ainda a eficácia de nossa abordagem em um conjunto de dados padrão de detecção de paráfrases, onde passagens parafraseadas se assemelham a documentos semanticamente redundantes.', 'fr': "La croissance rapide des documents sur le Web a nécessité de trouver des moyens de supprimer les documents redondants et de conserver les nouveaux. La capture de la redondance est un défi car elle peut impliquer une enquête à un niveau sémantique approfondi. Les techniques permettant de détecter une telle redondance sémantique au niveau du document sont rares. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un modèle basé sur des réseaux de neurones convolutionnels profonds (CNN) pour classer un document comme nouveau ou redondant par rapport à un ensemble de documents pertinents déjà vus par le système. Le système est simple et ne nécessite aucune ingénierie manuelle des fonctionnalités. Notre nouveau schéma code les informations pertinentes et relatives provenant des textes source et cible pour générer une représentation intermédiaire que nous appelons le vecteur de document relatif (RDV). La méthode proposée surpasse l'état actuel d'un ensemble de données de détection de nouveauté au niveau du document d'une marge d'environ 5\xa0% en termes de précision. Nous démontrons également l'efficacité de notre approche sur un ensemble de données standard de détection de paraphrase où les passages paraphrasés ressemblent étroitement à des documents sémantiquement redondants.", 'ja': 'ウェブ全体で文書が急速に成長したため、冗長な文書を破棄し、新規の文書を保持する手段を見つける必要がありました。 冗長性のキャプチャは、深い意味レベルでの調査を伴う可能性があるため、困難です。 文書レベルでこのような意味的冗長性を検出するための技術は乏しい。 この研究では、深層畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）ベースのモデルを提案し、システムによって既に見られる関連文書のセットに関して文書を新規または冗長に分類する。 システムはシンプルで、手動による機能工学は必要ありません。 私たちの新規のスキームは、ソーステキストとターゲットテキストの両方からの関連情報と相対情報をエンコードして、相対ドキュメントベクター（ RDV ）としてコイン化する中間表現を生成します。 提案された方法は、文書レベルの新規性検出データセットで既存の最先端を正確さの点で5%のマージンで上回っています。 さらに、パラフレーズが意味的に冗長な文書によく似ている標準的なパラフレーズ検出データセットに対するアプローチの有効性を示します。', 'zh': '一 Web 上文档之快速增长,故有求弃冗余文档而存新文档之法。 获冗余有挑战性,以及深层语义级勘之也。 于文档级检此语义冗余术甚少。 于此之中,立一卷积神经网络(CNN)之深,以对统见之文档分文档为新冗余。 其统甚简,无所手动役。 新案相关信息编码,以成相对文档向量(RDV)中。 所上之法,于文档级新颖性检数集上优于先进,于准确性为∼5%。 余证吾法释之义检数集上之有效性,其释义段落与语义冗余文档相似。', 'hi': 'वेब भर में दस्तावेजों की तेजी से वृद्धि ने अनावश्यक दस्तावेजों को छोड़ने और उपन्यास लोगों को बनाए रखने के साधनों को खोजने की आवश्यकता पैदा कर दी है। अतिरेक पर कब्जा करना चुनौतीपूर्ण है क्योंकि इसमें एक गहरे शब्दार्थ स्तर पर जांच शामिल हो सकती है। दस्तावेज़ स्तर पर इस तरह के शब्दार्थ अतिरेक का पता लगाने के लिए तकनीक दुर्लभ हैं। इस काम में हम एक गहरे Convolutional तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) आधारित मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करने के लिए उपन्यास या प्रासंगिक दस्तावेजों के एक सेट के संबंध में उपन्यास या अनावश्यक के रूप में एक दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकृत करने के लिए पहले से ही प्रणाली द्वारा देखा. सिस्टम सरल है और किसी भी मैनुअल सुविधा इंजीनियरिंग की आवश्यकता नहीं है। हमारी उपन्यास योजना एक मध्यवर्ती प्रतिनिधित्व उत्पन्न करने के लिए स्रोत और लक्ष्य ग्रंथों दोनों से प्रासंगिक और सापेक्ष जानकारी को एन्कोड करती है जिसे हम सापेक्ष दस्तावेज़ वेक्टर (आरडीवी) के रूप में सिक्का करते हैं। प्रस्तावित विधि सटीकता के मामले में ~5% के मार्जिन से एक दस्तावेज़-स्तर की नवीनता का पता लगाने वाले डेटासेट पर मौजूदा अत्याधुनिक को मात देती है। हम आगे एक मानक व्याख्या का पता लगाने डेटासेट पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं जहां संक्षिप्त मार्ग बारीकी से शब्दार्थ रूप से अनावश्यक दस्तावेजों के समान होते हैं।', 'ru': 'Быстрый рост числа документов в Интернете обусловил необходимость поиска средств для отказа от излишних документов и сохранения новых. Захват избыточности является сложной задачей, поскольку он может включать в себя глубокие исследования на семантическом уровне. Методы выявления такого семантического избыточности на уровне документов ограничены. В этой работе мы предлагаем модель на основе глубоких сверточных нейронных сетей (CNN), чтобы классифицировать документ как новый или избыточный по отношению к набору соответствующих документов, уже видимых системой. Система проста и не требует ручного проектирования функций. Наша новая схема кодирует соответствующую и относительную информацию как из исходных, так и из целевых текстов для создания промежуточного представления, которое мы используем в качестве относительного вектора документа (RDV). Предложенный метод превосходит существующий современный по набору данных обнаружения новизны на уровне документа с запасом 5% по точности. Мы далее демонстрируем эффективность нашего подхода к стандартному набору данных для обнаружения перефразов, где перефразированные отрывки близко напоминают семантически избыточные документы.', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar fhás tapa na gcáipéisí ar fud an ghréasáin, tá gá le bealaí a aimsiú chun doiciméid iomarcacha a chaitheamh amach agus chun cinn nua a choinneáil. Tá sé dúshlánach iomarcaíocht a ghabháil mar d’fhéadfadh go mbeadh gá le himscrúdú a dhéanamh ar leibhéal séimeantach domhain. Is tearc na teicnící chun iomarcaíocht shéimeantach den sórt sin a bhrath ar leibhéal na ndoiciméad. San obair seo molaimid múnla domhain bunaithe ar Líonraí Néaracha Comhdhlúite (CNN) chun doiciméad a rangú mar dhoiciméad úr nó iomarcach maidir le sraith doiciméad ábhartha atá feicthe ag an gcóras cheana féin. Tá an córas simplí agus ní gá aon innealtóireacht gné láimhe. Ionchódaíonn ár scéim nua faisnéis ábhartha agus choibhneasta ó théacsanna foinse agus spriocthéacs araon chun léiriú idirmheánach a ghiniúint a bonnaimid mar Veicteoir Doiciméid Choibhneasta (RDV). Feidhmíonn an modh atá beartaithe le corrlach de ∼5% i dtéarmaí cruinnis ná an ceann is déanaí ar thacar sonraí braite núíosaigh ar leibhéal doiciméad. Léirímid a thuilleadh éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige ar thacar sonraí braite athinsinte caighdeánach ina bhfuil sleachta paraphrasaithe cosúil go dlúth le doiciméid sheimeantacha iomarcacha.', 'ka': 'გვერდის სიმართლე დოკუმენტების წარმოდგენა უნდა მოიძებნა სხვადასხვა დოკუმენტების გადასრულება და პრომენტების გადასრულება. შესაძლებელია, რომ შესაძლებელია განსხვავება სიმენტიკური დონეში. დოკუმენტის დოკუმენტის განსაზღვრებისთვის ტექნეკები არაა. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მუშაობთ ძალიან კონტუალური ნეიროლური ნეიროლური ქსელების (CNN) მოდელს, რომ კლასიფიკაცია დოკუმენტის როგორც პრომენტი ან გაუკეთესებულია შესახებ Name ჩვენი პრომენტის სქემის კოდირება მნიშვნელოვანი და რედაციალური ინფორმაცია ორივე მსოფლიო და მისაღების ტექსტიდან იქნება საშუალო რედაქტირება, რომელიც ჩვენ შევქმნით როგ პროგრამის შესაძლებელი პროგრამის შესაძლებელია, რომ დოკუმენტის ახალგაზრულების განახლების მონაცემების შესაძლებელად მომხმარების შესაძლებელად გავაკეთება მართლა +5%-ის მა ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ჩვენი პროგრამის ეფექტიურობას სტანდარტაციის მონაცემების სტანდარტაციის მონაცემებზე, სადაც პარაფრაციული მონაცემები ძალიან გამოიყურება სმენტიკ', 'hu': 'A dokumentumok interneten történő gyors növekedése miatt a felesleges dokumentumok megsemmisítésére és az új dokumentumok megőrzésére szükség volt. A redundancia rögzítése kihívást jelent, mivel mély szemantikai szinten végzett vizsgálatot is magában foglalhat. Az ilyen szemantikai redundancia felismerésére szolgáló technikák dokumentumszinten ritkák. Ebben a munkában egy mély konvolúciós neurális hálózat (CNN) alapú modellt javasolunk, amely egy dokumentumot új vagy redundánsnak minősít a rendszer által már látott releváns dokumentumokhoz képest. A rendszer egyszerű, és nem igényel manuális funkciótervezést. Új sémánk mind a forrás-, mind a célszövegekből származó releváns és relatív információkat kódolja, hogy olyan közbenső ábrázolást hozzon létre, amelyet relatív dokumentumvektorként (RDV) érünk. A javasolt módszer pontossága szempontjából 5%-kal felülmúlja a meglévő legkorszerűbb dokumentumszintű újdonságérzékelési adatokat. Ezenkívül bemutatjuk a megközelítés hatékonyságát egy olyan szabványos parafrázdetektálási adatkészleten, ahol a parafrázott részek nagyon hasonlítanak a szemantikailag redundáns dokumentumokhoz.', 'kk': 'Интернеттегі құжаттардың жылдам өсімі көп құжаттарды жою және романдарды сақтау арқылы табу керек. Қайталық деңгейін түсіру көмектесілі, себебі ол терең семантикалық деңгейінде зерттеу мүмкін. Құжаттың деңгейіндегі симантикалық қалқымалығын анықтау техникалары жоқ. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біз жүйеңізде көрінетін құжатты қатынастық құжаттар жиынына қатынау немесе қайталау үлгісін қолданатын тереңдік невралдық желілер (CNN) негіздеген үлгісін таңдаймыз Жүйе қарапайым және қолмен құрылғының инженері керек емес. Біздің романдық сұлбасымыз көзі мен мақсатты мәтіндерден қатынасыз және қатынасыз мәліметін кодтамыз. Біз Сәйкесті құжат векторы (RDV) ретінде құрамыз. Келтірілген тәсілі құжат деңгейіндегі жаңа деректерді анықтау деректерінің барлық орындағы күй- жайын 5% жиегінен шығарылады. Келесіден бұл парафразды анықтау деректерінің стандартты парафразды анықтау бағдарламасының эффектілігін көрсету үшін парафраз пайдаланушылары semantically redundant құжаттарға тең сияқты.', 'it': "La rapida crescita dei documenti sul web ha reso necessario trovare mezzi per scartare documenti ridondanti e conservarne di nuovi. Catturare la ridondanza è difficile in quanto può comportare indagini a livello semantico profondo. Le tecniche per rilevare tale ridondanza semantica a livello di documento sono scarse. In questo lavoro proponiamo un modello profondo basato sulle Reti Neurali Convoluzionali (CNN) per classificare un documento come nuovo o ridondante rispetto ad una serie di documenti rilevanti già visti dal sistema. Il sistema è semplice e non richiede alcuna tecnica manuale. Il nostro nuovo schema codifica informazioni rilevanti e relative sia dai testi di origine che di destinazione per generare una rappresentazione intermedia che coinvolgiamo come il Relative Document Vector (RDV). Il metodo proposto supera lo stato dell'arte esistente su un set di dati di rilevamento delle novità a livello di documento di un margine del 5% in termini di accuratezza. Dimostriamo inoltre l'efficacia del nostro approccio su un set di dati standard per il rilevamento di parafrasi in cui passaggi parafrasi assomigliano molto a documenti semanticamente ridondanti.", 'el': 'Η ταχεία ανάπτυξη των εγγράφων σε όλο το διαδίκτυο έχει απαιτήσει την εύρεση μέσων απόρριψης περιττών εγγράφων και διατήρησης νέων εγγράφων. Η καταγραφή της πλεονάζουσας είναι πρόκληση καθώς μπορεί να περιλαμβάνει έρευνα σε βαθύ σημασιολογικό επίπεδο. Οι τεχνικές ανίχνευσης τέτοιας σημασιολογικής πλεονότητας σε επίπεδο εγγράφων είναι σπάνιες. Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε ένα βαθύ μοντέλο βασισμένο στα Σύγκλημα Νευρικά Δίκτυα (ΚΝΝ) για να ταξινομήσουμε ένα έγγραφο ως νέο ή περιττό σε σχέση με ένα σύνολο σχετικών εγγράφων που έχουν ήδη δει το σύστημα. Το σύστημα είναι απλό και δεν απαιτεί οποιαδήποτε χειρωνακτική μηχανική χαρακτηριστικών. Το νέο σχέδιό μας κωδικοποιεί σχετικές και σχετικές πληροφορίες τόσο από τα κείμενα προέλευσης όσο και από τα κείμενα προορισμού για να δημιουργήσει μια ενδιάμεση αναπαράσταση την οποία διαμορφώνουμε ως το σχετικό διάνυσμα εγγράφων (RDV). Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος ξεπερνά την υφιστάμενη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας σε επίπεδο εγγράφων δεδομένων ανίχνευσης καινοτομίας κατά ένα περιθώριο 5% όσον αφορά την ακρίβεια. Επιδεικνύουμε περαιτέρω την αποτελεσματικότητα της προσέγγισής μας σε ένα τυποποιημένο σύνολο δεδομένων ανίχνευσης παραφράσεων όπου παραφράσεις αποσπάσματα μοιάζουν πολύ με σημασιολογικά περιττά έγγραφα.', 'mk': 'Брзото растење на документите низ интернет доведе до потреба да се најдат средства за отфрлање на претерани документи и задржување на нови документи. Зафатувањето на отпуштање е тешко бидејќи може да вклучи истрага на длабоко семантично ниво. Техниките за откривање на ваква семантична отпуштаност на ниво на документот се мали. Во оваа работа предложуваме длабок модел на конволуционални неврални мрежи (CNN) за класификување на документот како нов или претеран во однос на множина релевантни документи кои веќе се гледаат од системот. Системот е едноставен и не бара никаква рачна инженерска функција. Нашата нова шема ги кодира релевантните и релативните информации од изворните и метните тексти за да генерира меѓувремено претставување кое го собираме како релативен документ вектор (РДВ). Предложениот метод ја надминува постоечката најнова состојба на податоците за детекција на новости на ниво на документот со маргина од ≤ 5 отсто во поглед на точноста. Понатаму ја демонстрираме ефикасноста на нашиот пристап на стандардниот набор на податоци за детекција на парафрази, каде парафразираните премини се блиски слични на семантично претерани документи.', 'ms': 'Pertumbuhan cepat dokumen di seluruh web telah memerlukan mencari cara untuk membuang dokumen yang berlebihan dan menyimpan yang baru. Menangkap redundansi adalah menantang kerana ia mungkin melibatkan penyelidikan pada tahap semantik yang dalam. Techniques for detecting such semantic redundancy at the document level are scarce.  Dalam kerja ini kami cadangkan model berasaskan Rangkaian Neural Perubahan (CNN) yang mendalam untuk mengklasifikasikan dokumen sebagai baru atau tidak berguna dengan set dokumen berkaitan yang telah dilihat oleh sistem. Sistem ini mudah dan tidak memerlukan sebarang teknik ciri manual. Skema novel kami mengekodkan maklumat berkaitan dan relatif dari kedua-dua teks sumber dan sasaran untuk menghasilkan perwakilan sementara yang kami sukai sebagai Vektor Dokumen Relatif (RDV). Kaedah yang diusulkan melampaui keadaan-state-of-the-art yang wujud pada set data pengesan baru pada aras dokumen dengan margin ≤ 5% dalam terma ketepatan. Kami juga menunjukkan keefektivitas pendekatan kita pada set data pengesan parafrasa piawai di mana laluan parafrasa sangat mirip dengan dokumen yang tidak berguna secara semantik.', 'ml': 'വെബില്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d രേഖകളുടെ വേഗത്തിലുള്ള രേഖകളുടെ വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് കുറഞ്ഞ രേഖകള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുന്നതിനും നോവലിനെ  കുറഞ്ഞുപിടിക്കുന്നത് വിലപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കാരണം അത് ആഴത്തെ സെമാന്റിക് നിലയില്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത ഇത്തരം സെമാന്റിക് കുറവ് കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാനുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d രേഖത്തിന്റെ നില കുറവാണ്. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ആഴത്തെ കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും കണ്ടിട്ടു സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ സാധാരണ എളുപ്പമാണ്. കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്ന പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200d എഞ്ചിനീയറിങ്ങിനെ ആ നമ്മുടെ നോവല്\u200d പദ്ധതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളും സ്രോതസ്സില്\u200d നിന്നും ലക്ഷ്യസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉള്\u200dക്കൊള്ളുന്നു. നമ്മള്\u200d വ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതി ഒരു സാധാരണ പാരാഫ്രേസ് ഡെറ്റാസ്റ്റ് ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം നമ്മുടെ പ്രത്യേകം കൂടുതല്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നു. പാരാഫ്ര', 'mt': 'The rapid growth of documents across the web has necessitated finding means of discarding redundant documents and retaining novel ones.  Il-qabda tas-sensja hija sfida peress li tista’ tinvolvi investigazzjoni fuq livell semantiku profond. It-tekniki biex tinstab tali sensja semantika fil-livell tad-dokument huma skarsi. In this work we propose a deep Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) based model to classify a document as novel or redundant with respect to a set of relevant documents already seen by the system.  Is-sistema hija sempliċi u ma teħtieġx inġinerija manwali ta’ karatteristiċi. L-iskema l-ġdida tagħna tikkodifika l-informazzjoni rilevanti u relattiva kemm mit-testi tas-sors kif ukoll mit-testi fil-mira biex tiġġenera rappreżentanza intermedja li nġabru bħala l-Vettur tad-Dokument Relattiv (RDV). Il-metodu propost jaqbeż l-a ġġornament eżistenti fuq sett ta’ dejta dwar l-iskoperta ta’ novitajiet fil-livell tad-dokument b’marġini ta’ = 5 % f’termini ta’ preċiżjoni. Aħna nippruvaw ukoll l-effettività tal-approċċ tagħna fuq sett ta’ dejta standard għall-individwazzjoni tal-parafrażi fejn il-passaġġi parafrażizzati jixbħu mill-qrib id-dokumenti semantikament żejda.', 'lt': 'Dėl spartaus dokumentų plėtros internete reikėjo rasti būdų, kaip išmesti nereikalingus dokumentus ir išlaikyti naujus dokumentus. Paėmus atleidimą iš darbo yra sunku, nes gali būti atliekami gilūs semantiniai tyrimai. Tokio semantinio atleidimo iš darbo dokumentų lygiu nustatymo metodai yra riboti. Šiame darbe siūlome gilius konvoliucinius nervinius tinklus (CNN) grindžiamą model į, pagal kurį dokumentas būtų klasifikuojamas kaip naujas arba nereikalingas, atsižvelgiant į sistemoje jau matytus atitinkamus dokumentus. Sistema paprasta ir nereikalaujama jokios rankinės savybės inžinerijos. Mūsų nauja schema koduoja svarbią ir santykinę informaciją tiek iš šaltinio, tiek iš tikslinių tekstų, kad būtų sukurtas tarpinis atstovavimas, kurį mes sukuriame kaip santykinį dokumentų vektorių (RDV). Siūlomas metodas viršija esamą naujausią dokumentų lygmens naujumo nustatymo duomenų rinkinį 5 % tikslumo ribomis. Be to, įrodome savo požiūrio į standartinį parafrazės nustatymo duomenų rinkinį veiksmingumą, kuriame parafrazės dalys glaudžiai panašios į semantiškai nereikalingus dokumentus.', 'mn': 'Веб дахь баримтуудын хурдан өсөлт нь шинэ баримтуудыг хадгалах, шинэ сэтгэл зүйлсийг хадгалах арга хэрэгтэй. Гайхалтай байдлыг барьж авах нь хэцүү. Яагаад гэвэл энэ нь гүнзгий семантийн түвшинд судалгаа хийх боломжтой. Документын түвшинд ийм хэмжээний дулаарлыг олж мэдэх техник бага байдаг. Энэ ажлын тухай бид системээс харагдаж байгаа олон асуудалтай баримтуудыг шинэ эсвэл дуусгахын тулд дүн гүнзгий сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний загвар (CNN) суурилсан. Энэ систем энгийн бөгөөд гар чадварын инженер хэрэггүй. Бидний шинэ төлөвлөгөө нь эх үүсвэр болон зорилготой текстүүдийн хоёр харьцаатай мэдээллийг хоёуланг шинэчлэхэд бидний харьцаатай документийн вектор (RDV) гэж зохион байгуулдаг. Өөрчлөлтийн арга нь баримтуудын түвшинд шинэ мэдээллийн мэдээллийн хувьд 5% нь зөв байдалд оршиж байна. Бид өөрсдийнхөө арга замын үр дүнтэй байдлыг стандарт парафрейз тогтоох өгөгдлийн санд харуулж байна. Гэвч парафрейз замын замын замын баримтууд ихэнхдээ шиг харагдаж байна.', 'pl': 'Szybki rozwój dokumentów w sieci wymagał znalezienia sposobów na odrzucenie zbędnych dokumentów i zachowanie nowych. Przechwytywanie redundancji jest wyzwaniem, ponieważ może wiązać się z badaniem na głębokim poziomie semantycznym. Techniki wykrywania takiej redundancji semantycznej na poziomie dokumentu są rzadkie. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy model oparty na głębokich sieciach konwolucyjnych (CNN), aby klasyfikować dokument jako nowy lub redundantny w odniesieniu do zbioru istotnych dokumentów już widzianych przez system. System jest prosty i nie wymaga ręcznej inżynierii funkcji. Nasz nowatorski schemat koduje istotne i względne informacje zarówno z tekstów źródłowych, jak i docelowych, aby wygenerować pośrednią reprezentację, którą tworzymy jako Względny wektor dokumentów (RDV). Proponowana metoda przewyższa istniejący stan techniki w zakresie wykrywania nowości na poziomie dokumentu o margines 5% pod względem dokładności. Ponadto demonstrujemy skuteczność naszego podejścia do standardowego zestawu danych wykrywania parafraz, w którym parafrazowane fragmenty ściśle przypominają semantycznie redundantne dokumenty.', 'ro': 'Creșterea rapidă a documentelor pe internet a necesitat găsirea mijloacelor de eliminare a documentelor redundante și păstrarea celor noi. Capturarea redundanței este o provocare deoarece poate implica investigarea la un nivel semantic profund. Tehnicile de detectare a unei astfel de redundanțe semantice la nivelul documentelor sunt rare. În această lucrare propunem un model profund bazat pe Rețele Neurale Convoluționale (CNN) pentru clasificarea unui document ca fiind nou sau redundant în raport cu un set de documente relevante deja văzute de sistem. Sistemul este simplu și nu necesită nici o inginerie manuală a caracteristicilor. Noua noastră schemă codează informații relevante și relative atât din textele sursă, cât și din textele țintă pentru a genera o reprezentare intermediară pe care o monedăm ca Vector Document Relativ (RDV). Metoda propusă depășește nivelul de ultimă generație existent într-un set de date de detectare a noutăților la nivel de document cu o marjă de 5% în ceea ce privește acuratețea. De asemenea, demonstrăm eficacitatea abordării noastre cu privire la un set standard de date de detectare a parafrazelor în care pasajele parafrazate seamănă foarte mult cu documentele redundante semantic.', 'sr': 'Brzi rast dokumenta širom mreže je potrebno pronaći sredstva za odbacivanje redundantnih dokumenta i zadržavanje novela. Uhvaćanje redundancije je izazovno jer može uključiti istragu na dubokom semantičkom nivou. Tehnika za otkrivanje takvog semantičkog redundancije na nivou dokumenta je manja. U ovom poslu predlažemo duboki konvolucionalni neuronski mreži (CNN) bazirani model da klasifikuje dokument kao roman ili redundant u vezi sa setom relevantnih dokumenta koji je već vidio sistem. Sistem je jednostavan i ne zahteva nikakve manualne inženjerstvo. Naša romanska šema kodira relevantne i relativne informacije iz izvora i ciljnih tekstova kako bi stvorili međuvremenu predstavu koju smo našli kao Relativni dokument vektor (RDV). Predložena metoda iznosi postojeće stanje umjetnosti na podacima otkrivanja novosti na nivou dokumenta sa marginom od 5% u smislu tačnosti. Dalje pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa na standardnom setu podataka za detekciju parafraze gdje parafraze prolaze bliže slične semantički redundantnim dokumentima.', 'so': "Dhaqso u koritaanka dukumentiyada bogga internetka oo dhan waxaa u baahan yahay inaad hesho qalabka heshiiska dukumentiyada oo lagu saxeynayo iyo in lagu sii daayo warqadaha saxda ah. Qabashada lacagta la'aanta waa dhibaatooyin, sababtoo ah waxay ka mid noqon kartaa baaritaanka heerka aad u dheer. Teknolojiyadu waa yaraan yihiin heerka dukumentiga. In this work we propose a deep Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) based model to classify a document as novel or redundant with respect to a set of relevant documents already seen by the system.  nidaamka waa fudud, mana u baahnid injiilka qalabka gacanta. Qorshaha warqaddayada waxaa ku qoran macluumaad la xiriira iyo saaxiib ah oo ka soo qoran kooxaha iyo qoraalka waxqabadka iyo waxyaabaha la jeedo in loo sameeyo qaab dhexdhexe ah oo aynu u u sawiranno sida Vectorka Documentiga la xiriira (RDV). Midabka la soo jeedo wuxuu soo saaraa xaaladda hore oo ku qoran taariikhda aqoonsiga ee warqada saxda ah oo lagu qoray maro /5% si saxda ah. Waxaynu sii muujinnaa faa’iidada dhaqdhaqaalahayaga ku qoran taariikhda aqoonsiga ee caadiga ah oo lagu qoray baasaboorada si ugu dhow u eg dukumentiyada kooban.", 'no': 'Den raske veksten av dokument over nettet har nødvendig å finna måtar å fjerna gjeldande dokument og lagra novelane. Det er vanskeleg å få opp redundans, sidan det kan involvere undersøking på ein dyp semantisk nivå. Teknikk for å oppdaga slike semantiske redundansjon på dokumentnivået er kraftig. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi ein dyp konvolusjonell neiralnettverk (CNN) basert modell for å klassifisera eit dokument som novel eller redundant med respekt til eit sett av relevante dokument som allereie ser av systemet. Systemet er enkel og treng ikkje ingen manuell funksjonsengineering. Dette romanskjemaet koderer relevante og relative informasjon frå både kjeldetekst og måltekst for å laga eit mellombels representasjon som vi finn som Relativt Document Vector (RDV). Dette første metoden utfører den eksisterande tilstanden av kunsten på eit dokumentnivåoppdagingsdatasett ved margin av « 5 % med nøyaktighet. Vi viser meir effektiviteten av tilnærminga vårt på eit standard parafrase-oppdagingsdataset der parafrase passar nærare liknar til semantisk redundant dokument.', 'sv': 'Den snabba tillväxten av dokument över webben har gjort det nödvändigt att hitta sätt att kassera överflödiga dokument och behålla nya dokument. Att fånga redundans är utmanande eftersom det kan innebära att undersöka på en djup semantisk nivå. Tekniker för att upptäcka sådan semantisk redundans på dokumentnivå är knappa. I detta arbete föreslår vi en djupgående konvulutionsneurala nätverk (CNN) baserad modell för att klassificera ett dokument som nytt eller överflödigt med avseende på en uppsättning relevanta dokument som redan ses av systemet. Systemet är enkelt och kräver ingen manuell funktionsteknik. Vårt nya schema kodar relevant och relativ information från både käll- och måltexter för att generera en mellanliggande representation som vi myntar som Relative Document Vector (RDV). Den föreslagna metoden överträffar den befintliga toppmoderna datamängden för detektering av nyheter på dokumentnivå med en marginal på 5% när det gäller noggrannhet. Vi visar vidare hur effektivt vårt tillvägagångssätt är på ett standardiserat dataset för parafrasering där parafraserade avsnitt liknar semantiskt överflödiga dokument.', 'si': 'වෙබ් වලින් ලිපිණියේ ඉක්මනින් විශාල විශාලයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා විශාල විස්තාරයක් හොයාගන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙනව ප්\u200dරධානයක් අල්ලගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙන්නේ, ඒක ගොඩක් සෙමාන්තික ස්ථානයක් පරීක දස්තාවේදි සැමැන්තික ප්\u200dරමාණයක් හොයාගන්න තාක්ෂණික විද්\u200dයාවක් අවශ්\u200dයයි. මේ වැඩේ අපි ගොඩක් සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූ පද්ධතිය සාමාන්\u200dය විදියයි ඒ වගේම කිසිම පද්ධතියක් අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ. අපේ කතාවක් පද්ධතිය සහ සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරභාව සහ ඉලක්ෂාව පාළුවන් වලින් සම්බන්ධ තොරතුරු සංකේතය කරනවා අපි සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය ප්\u200dරශ්න විධානය ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට පර අපි තවදුරටත් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා අපේ පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරාමාණික ප්\u200dරකාශ පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සැකසුම් වලට ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා කියලා පැරප්\u200d', 'ur': 'ویب کے درمیان لکھائی کے سریع بڑھنے کی ضرورت ہے کہ بہت سی دکھائی کاغذوں کو چھوڑ دیں اور رمان کو روک دیں۔ دھوڈنڈنسیٹ کو پکڑنا مشکل ہے کیونکہ یہ ایک عمیق سیمنٹی سطح میں تحقیق میں شامل ہو سکتا ہے. دفتر سطح میں ایسی سیمنٹی رڈونڈنسیٹ کی تلاش کرنے کے لئے تکنیکی کم ہے. اس کام میں ہم ایک عمیق کنویرول نیورال نیٹورک (سین ان) کی مدل پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ایک دکھانے کو نوم یا دوبارہ دکھانے کے لئے سیسٹم نے پہلے دیکھا ہے ایک مجموعہ کے معاملہ میں ایک مجموعہ دکھانے کے ساتھ کلاس کریں۔ سیسٹم آسان ہے اور کسی منوی فوجینٹ انجینژی کی ضرورت نہیں ہے۔ ہماری روزنامہ طریقہ دونوں سورج اور موقع کے متن سے معاملہ اور مقابلہ معلومات کو کوڈ کرتا ہے تاکہ ایک میانہ روزنامہ پیدا کریں جسے ہم رابطہ دار دکھائی ویکتور (RDV) بناتے ہیں۔ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ دقیقات کے مطابق 5% کی مارجینٹ سے دقیقات کے مطابق موجود حالت-آرت کو دکھانے والی نئی سطح ڈیٹ پر عمل کرتا ہے. ہم اس سے زیادہ دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارے طریقے کا اثبات ایک استاندارد پارافریز ڈیٹ سٹ پر ہے جہاں پارافریز پھیلانے کے مطابق سیمنٹی دکھانے کے مطابق مطابق ہے.', 'ta': 'வலையம் முழுவதும் ஆவணங்களின் வேகமான வளர்ச்சி குறைந்த ஆவணங்களை விட்டு வைத்து புதிய புத்தகத்தை வைத்துக் கொள்ள வேண்ட குறைவாக்கத்தை பிடிப்பது சவாலானது ஏனெனில் அது ஆழமான பெம்பென்டிக் மட்டத்தில் ஆய்வு சேர்க்கலாம். ஆவண நிலையில் இத்தகைய பாதிப்பு குறைவை கண்டறியும் தொழில்நுட்பம் குறைந்தது. இந்த வேலையில் நாம் ஒரு ஆழமான தொடர்பு நெருக்கல் வலைப்பின்னல் (CNN) அடிப்படையிலான மாதிரியை பிரிந்து ஒரு ஆவணத்தை புதிய அல்லது குறைவாக்குவதற் அமைப்பு எளிதானது மற்றும் கைமுறை சொற்பொறியின் தேவையில்லை. எங்கள் புதிய திட்டம் தொடர்புடைய ஆவண நெறிமுறையாக உருவாக்குவதற்கு மூலம் மற்றும் இலக்கு உரைகளிலிருந்து தொடர்புடைய தகவல்களை குறியிடும். The proposed method outperforms the existing state- of- the art on a document- level novelty detection data set by a margin of 5% in accuracy terms. நாங்கள் மேலும் எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை காட்டுகிறோம் ஒரு நிலையான சொற்றொடர் கண்டுபிடிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பின் செயல்பாட்டை காட', 'vi': 'Sự phát triển nhanh chóng của tài liệu trên toàn bộ web đã đòi hỏi phải tìm cách loại bỏ các tài liệu thừa thải và giữ lại những tài liệu mới. Có thừa kế là một thử thách vì có thể gồm việc điều tra theo một mực ngữ nghĩa sâu sắc. Kỹ thuật để tìm ra sự đơn giản này trên mức tài liệu rất hiếm. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một mô hình về thần kinh có liên kết sâu, dựa trên CNN, để phân loại một tài liệu là tiểu thuyết hoặc dư thừa với một bộ tài liệu liên quan đã được kiểm tra bởi hệ thống. Hệ thống này đơn giản và không cần thiết thiết cấu trúc dự phòng. Trong tiểu thuyết của chúng tôi có mã hóa thông tin liên quan và tương đối từ cả nguồn và các văn bản đích để tạo ra một sự đại diện trung ương mà chúng tôi nhận được như Máy phát tín dụng (RDV). Phương pháp được đề nghị vượt qua khả năng xác thực hiện hiện hiện đại trên một tập tin xác định trên mức công nghệ có tài liệu có tính mới với một khoảng 5. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp tìm hiểu thông thường của tập tin do công khai, nơi các đoạn được liệt kê gần giống với các văn bản không cần thiết.', 'uz': "Veb- saytdagi hujjatlarning tez uzoqligi qisqa hujjatlarni olib tashlash va novel yoziqlarini saqlash kerak. Qatlamni olish muvaffaqiyatsiz murakkab qiladi, chunki u juda katta semantik darajada qidirish mumkin. Comment Ushbu vazifani biz tizim orqali ko'rib koʻrilgan muhim hujjatlarni qoʻllash uchun boshqa shaklga nazar tarmoq tarmoq (CNN) asosida yaratilgan modelni yaratish mumkin. Tizim oddiy va qoʻlbola boshqaruv imkoniyati muhandisi kerak emas. Bizning novel qolipimiz bogʻliq va bog'liq maʼlumot yordamida maʼlumot yordamida qo'shiladi. Biz murojaat hujjat vektori (RDV) sifatida yaratish uchun intermediate representation yaratish uchun. Name Biz qo'shimcha maxfiy soʻzlarni semikal qoʻllanmagan hujjatlarga kamaytirish mumkin.", 'nl': 'De snelle groei van documenten op het web heeft ertoe geleid dat er middelen moeten worden gevonden om overbodige documenten te verwerpen en nieuwe documenten te behouden. Redundantie vastleggen is een uitdaging omdat het onderzoek op een diep semantisch niveau kan inhouden. Technieken om dergelijke semantische redundantie op documentniveau op te sporen zijn schaars. In dit werk stellen we een diep Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) gebaseerd model voor om een document te classificeren als nieuw of redundant ten opzichte van een reeks relevante documenten die al door het systeem worden gezien. Het systeem is eenvoudig en vereist geen handmatige feature engineering. Ons nieuwe schema codeert relevante en relatieve informatie uit zowel bron- als doelteksten om een intermediaire representatie te genereren die we als relatieve documentvector (RDV) gebruiken. De voorgestelde methode overtreft de bestaande state-of-the-art op documentniveau met een marge van 5% qua nauwkeurigheid. We demonstreren verder de effectiviteit van onze aanpak op een standaard parafrasedetectie dataset waarbij parafrasedetectie passages sterk lijken op semantisch redundante documenten.', 'bg': 'Бързият растеж на документите в интернет наложи намирането на средства за отхвърляне на излишните документи и запазване на нови такива. Заснемането на излишността е предизвикателство, тъй като може да включва разследване на дълбоко семантично ниво. Техниките за откриване на такава семантична излишност на ниво документ са оскъдни. В тази работа предлагаме модел, базиран на дълбоки конволюционни неврални мрежи (ЦНН), за класифициране на документ като нов или излишен по отношение на набор от релевантни документи, които вече се виждат от системата. Системата е проста и не изисква ръчно инженерство на функциите. Нашата нова схема кодира релевантна и относителна информация както от изходните, така и от целевите текстове, за да генерира междинно представяне, което използваме като относителен документен вектор (RDV). Предложеният метод превъзхожда съществуващите съвременни технологии на ниво документ данни за откриване на новости с 5% по отношение на точността. Освен това демонстрираме ефективността на нашия подход върху стандартен набор от данни за откриване на парафрази, където парафразираните пасажи много приличат на семантично излишни документи.', 'da': 'Den hurtige vækst af dokumenter på internettet har gjort det nødvendigt at finde midler til at kassere overflødige dokumenter og bevare nye dokumenter. At fange redundans er udfordrende, da det kan indebære undersøgelser på et dybt semantisk niveau. Teknikker til detektering af en sådan semantisk redundans på dokumentniveau er knappe. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en dyb Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) baseret model for at klassificere et dokument som nyt eller overflødigt i forhold til et sæt relevante dokumenter, der allerede ses af systemet. Systemet er simpelt og kræver ingen manuel feature engineering. Vores nye skema koder relevante og relative oplysninger fra både kilde- og måltekster for at generere en mellemliggende repræsentation, som vi mønter som Relative Document Vector (RDV). Den foreslåede metode overstiger den eksisterende state-of-the-art på et dokumentniveau nyhedsdetektionsdatasæt med en margen på 5% med hensyn til nøjagtighed. Vi demonstrerer yderligere effektiviteten af vores tilgang til et standard parafrasedetektionsdatasæt, hvor parafraserede passager nøje ligner semantisk overflødige dokumenter.', 'ko': '웹에서 문서가 빠르게 증가함에 따라, 불필요한 문서를 버리고 새 문서를 보존하는 방법을 찾아야 한다.군더더기 포획은 심층적 의미 수준의 연구와 관련이 있을 수 있기 때문에 매우 도전적이다.문서 단계에서 이런 의미의 군더더기를 검출하는 기술은 매우 적다.이 작업에서 우리는 시스템이 이미 본 관련 문서 그룹에 따라 문서를 새로운 문서나 불필요한 문서로 분류하는 심층권적신경망(CNN)을 기반으로 한 모델을 제시했다.이 시스템은 간단하여 어떠한 수동 특징 공사도 필요 없다.우리의 새 방안은 원본 텍스트와 목표 텍스트의 관련 정보와 상대 정보를 인코딩하여 중간 표시를 만들어 상대 문서 벡터 (RDV) 로 삼는다.문서급 참신성 검측 데이터 집합에서 이 방법의 정확도는 기존의 최신 기술보다 5% 높다.우리는 표준적인 해석 검측 데이터 집합에서 우리의 방법의 유효성을 증명했다. 그 중에서 해석 단락은 의미의 불필요한 문서와 매우 비슷하다.', 'de': 'Das rasante Wachstum von Dokumenten im Internet hat es erforderlich gemacht, Mittel zu finden, um überflüssige Dokumente zu verwerfen und neue zu behalten. Redundanz zu erfassen ist eine Herausforderung, da es möglicherweise eine Untersuchung auf einer tiefen semantischen Ebene erfordern kann. Techniken zur Erkennung einer solchen semantischen Redundanz auf Dokumentenebene sind rar. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein tiefes Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) basiertes Modell vor, um ein Dokument als neu oder redundant in Bezug auf eine Reihe relevanter Dokumente zu klassifizieren, die bereits vom System gesehen wurden. Das System ist einfach und erfordert kein manuelles Feature Engineering. Unser neuartiges Schema kodiert relevante und relative Informationen aus Quell- und Zieltexten, um eine Zwischendarstellung zu generieren, die wir als Relative Document Vector (RDV) prägen. Die vorgeschlagene Methode übertrifft den bestehenden Stand der Technik auf Dokumentenebene um einen Rand von 5% hinsichtlich Genauigkeit. Weiterhin zeigen wir die Effektivität unseres Ansatzes auf einem Standard-Datensatz zur Paraphrasenerkennung, bei dem paraphrasierte Passagen semantisch redundanten Dokumenten sehr ähnlich sind.', 'fa': 'رشد سریع سند در اینترنت نیاز به پیدا کردن وسیله\u200cهای تبدیل کردن سند\u200cهای زیادی و نگه داشتن رمانی است. دستگير کردن سرمايه گذاري سخت است چون ممکنه توسط تحقيقات در سطح عميق semantic باشه. فناوری برای شناسایی چنین سرعت سنتی در سطح سند کم است. در این کار ما یک مدل عمیق شبکه\u200cهای عصبی (CNN) بنیادی عمیق را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم تا یک مدل سند را به عنوان رمان یا بازگشت به عنوان یک مجموعه از سند\u200cهای مربوطه که قبلاً توسط سیستم دیده شده باشد، به عنوان یک مجموعهٔ سند\u200cهای سیستم ساده است و هیچ مهندسی ویژگی دستی نیاز ندارد. نقشه رمانی ما اطلاعات ارتباطی و نسبتی را از متن منبع و هدف برای تولید نمایش بین\u200cالمللی که ما به عنوان ویکتور سند مرتباطی (RDV) قرار می\u200cدهیم، رمز می\u200cدهد. این روش پیشنهاد، موقعیت هنر موجود را بر روی داده\u200cهای شناسایی جدید سطح سند با مرز ۵ درصد در مورد دقیق انجام می\u200cدهد. ما بیشتر نشان می دهیم که موثرت دستور ما در یک مجموعه اطلاعات شناسایی پارافریز استاندارد، جایی که گذشته های پارافریز نزدیک به مدارک\u200cهای سنت\u200cهای زیادی زیادی شبیه می\u200cشوند.', 'hr': 'Brzi rast dokumenta širom mreže potrebno je pronaći sredstva za odbacivanje redundantnih dokumenta i zadržavanje novih dokumenta. Uhvaćanje redundancije je izazovno jer može uključiti istragu na dubokoj semantičkoj razini. Tehnike za otkrivanje takvog semantičkog redundancije na razini dokumenta nisu manje. U ovom poslu predlažemo duboki konvolucionalni neuronski mreži (CNN) bazirani model za klasifikaciju dokumenta kao novog ili redundantnog u odnosu na skup relevantnih dokumenta koji je već vidio sustav. Sistem je jednostavan i ne zahtijeva nikakvu manualnu inženjernicu. Naš romanski plan kodira relevantne i relativne informacije iz izvora i ciljnih tekstova kako bi stvorili prosječnu predstavu koju smatramo Relativnim dokumentovim vektorom (RDV). Predložena metoda iznosi postojeće stanje umjetnosti na podacima za otkrivanje novosti na razini dokumenta s marginom od 5% u smislu točnosti. Dalje pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa na standardnom setu podataka za detekciju parafraze gdje parafraze prolaze bliže slične semantički redundantnim dokumentima.', 'af': "Die vinnige groei van dokumente oor die web het nodig om middel te vind om rooi dokumente te verwerp en novele te hou. Om die ontvang van herdenheid is aanvaardig, omdat dit kan insluit op 'n diep semantiese vlak. Tehnikasies vir die ontdekking van sodanige semantiese redundansie by die dokumentvlak is skaars. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n diep Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerke (CNN) gebaseerde model om 'n dokument as roman of herlaai te klassifiseer met betrekking na' n stel van relevante dokumente wat reeds deur die stelsel gesien is. Die stelsel is eenvoudig en doen nie nodig enige hand funksie inženiering. Ons novel skema enkodeer relevante en relatiewe inligting van beide bron en doel teks om 'n middelste verteenwoording te genereer wat ons as die Relatiewe Dokument Vektor (RDV). Die voorgestelde metode uitvoer die bestaande state-of-the-art op 'n dokumentvlak nuwe beskrywing datastel deur 'n lyn van “ 5% in ingevolge presisie. Ons wys verder die effektiviteit van ons toegang op 'n standaard parafrase-beskrywing datastel waar parafrase wagte naby lyk aan semantiese roondande dokumente.", 'id': 'Pertumbuhan cepat dokumen di seluruh web telah membutuhkan cara untuk menemukan cara untuk membuang dokumen yang berlebihan dan menyimpan dokumen yang baru. Menangkap redundansi adalah tantangan karena mungkin melibatkan penyelidikan di tingkat semantis dalam. Techniques for detecting such semantic redundancy at the document level are scarce.  Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengusulkan model berasaskan Networks Neural Konvelusional (CNN) yang mendalam untuk mengklasifikasi dokumen sebagai novel atau redundant dengan kaitan dengan set dokumen relevan yang sudah dilihat oleh sistem. Sistem ini sederhana dan tidak membutuhkan teknik karakteristik manual. Skema novel kami mengkode informasi relevan dan relatif dari kedua sumber dan teks sasaran untuk menghasilkan sebuah representation intermediate yang kami koin sebagai Vektor Dokumen Relatif (RDV). Metode yang diusulkan melampaui keadaan terbaik yang ada di dataset deteksi novelti tingkat dokumen dengan margin ≤ 5% dalam termasuk akurasi. Kita lebih lanjut menunjukkan efektivitas pendekatan kita pada set data deteksi parafrasa standar di mana pasar parafrasa dekat mirip dengan dokumen semantis redundant.', 'tr': 'Web tarapynda senediň tiz ösümlisi ýok dökümleri taşlamak we romanlary gaýd etmek üçin meýdançalary tapmaly gerek. Kökülik taýýarlamak kynçylykly bolýar, sebäbi derin semantik derejede barlagy çykyp biler. Sened derejesinde şeýle bir semantik atlandyrylygy aňlamak üçin teknikler ýeňil. Bu işde biz sistemiň öňden gören möhüm senediň bir täblisine (CNN) daýan bir nusga döretmek üçin derin bir nusga teklip edip görýäris. Bu sistem basit we hiç hili el enjiniýeti gerek däl. Biziň roman taslaýymyz hem çeşmeden hem maksady metinlerden möhüm we relative maglumatlary ködleýär. Biz golaýat Sened Vektory (RDV) diýip kabul edip otyrýarys. Maslahat edilen yöntem bolan ýagdaýyň durumyny desktap-derejesi taýýarlamak üçin  5% gabdaly bir gabdaly tarapyndan çykar. Biz özümiziň ýaryşymyzyň etkinliýetini standart parafraz deteksiyonyň veri setirinde görkezýäris. parafraz geçirişleri semantik ýagdaýda ýakyn ýaly görünýär.', 'sw': 'Uongezeko wa haraka wa nyaraka katika mtandao wa intaneti umehitaji kutafuta njia za kuondoa nyaraka zilizopungua na kubaki riwaya. Kukamata uchunguzi unachangamoto kwa sababu inaweza kuhusisha uchunguzi katika kiwango kikubwa cha semantic. Teknolojia za kutambua kupungua kwa kiwango cha nyaraka ni vigumu. Katika kazi hii tunapendekeza mtindo wa kina wa mtandao wa Neurali wa kujitolea (CNN) wa kutangaza nyaraka kama riwaya au kupungua kwa kuhusiana na seti ya nyaraka zinazohusiana tayari zilizoonekana na mfumo huo. Mfumo ni rahisi na haihitaji ubunifu wowote wa manufaa. Our novel scheme encodes relevant and relative information from both source and target texts to generate an intermediate representation which we coin as the Relative Document Vector (RDV).  Utawala huu unapendekezwa unaonyesha hali ya sanaa iliyopo kwenye taarifa za kutambua kiwango cha sayansi cha nyaraka na kiwango cha asilimia 5 kwa lengo la uhakika. Tunaonyesha ufanisi wa hatua yetu kwenye kituo cha taarifa cha uchunguzi wa hali ya kawaida ambapo njia zinazoelezwa zinafanana na nyaraka zilizopungua kwa kiasi kikubwa.', 'sq': 'Rritja e shpejtë e dokumenteve nëpër internet ka nevojë për gjetjen e mjeteve për heqjen e dokumenteve të tepruara dhe mbajtjen e dokumenteve të reja. Capturing redundancy is challenging as it may involve investigating at a deep semantic level.  Teknikët për zbulimin e një redundance të tillë semantike në nivelin e dokumentit janë të pakta. Në këtë punë ne propozojmë një model të thellë të rrjeteve nervore konvolutive (CNN) për të klasifikuar një dokument si i ri apo i tepruar lidhur me një sërë dokumentesh të rëndësishme që tashmë janë parë nga sistemi. Sistemi është i thjeshtë dhe nuk kërkon asnjë inxhinieri manual. Our novel scheme encodes relevant and relative information from both source and target texts to generate an intermediate representation which we coin as the Relative Document Vector (RDV).  The proposed method outperforms the existing state-of-the-art on a document-level novelty detection dataset by a margin of  5% in terms of accuracy.  Ne demonstrojmë më tej efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë në një grup të dhënash standarte për zbulimin e parafrazave ku pasazhet parafrazave ngjajnë afër dokumenteve semantikisht të tepruara.', 'am': 'ሰነዱን ፈጥኖ ማድረግ ገልጦአል፡፡ በጥልቅ የsemantic ደረጃን መፍጠር የሚችል ነው፡፡ የሰነዱ ደረጃዎች ውስጥ እንደዚህ ያለ ስሜቲካዊ አሰናክሎ ማግኘት ስህተት ጥቂት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ ውስጥ የተጠቃሚ የኔural Network (CNN) የተመሠረተውን ሰነዱን እንደ መቃኛ ወይም በሥርዓት የተጠቃሚ ሰነዱን በተመለከተ ቁጥር ላይ መክፈት እናስባለን፡፡ ሲስተምሩ ቀላል ነው እና የጃንደረባ የፊደል እስኪንጂር አያስፈልግም፡፡ የአሁኑ ፕሮግራማችን የሥርዓት ሰነድ መክፈት (RDV) እና የአካባቢ ጽሑፎች እና የአካባቢ ጽሑፎችን የግንኙነት እና የአካባቢ መረጃዎችን ማድረግ ነው፡፡ የተዘጋጀው ዘዴ የአሁኑን ሥርዓት-አርእስት በሰነድ-ደረጃ አቅራቢያ ማግኘት ዳታዎችን በ5 በመቶ እርግጠኛ ማግኘት ይጠቅማል፡፡ ደግሞም የግልጾችን መግለጫ በአስተናጋሪው ሰነድ በሚያሳየው ሰነጃዎች በኩል በሚያሳየው የደብዳቤ አካባቢ ማግኘት ዳታ ማሳየትን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡', 'az': 'İnternet səhifələrinin hızlı artıqlığı, çətinlikli belələri tərk etmək və romanları saxlamaq üçün vasitələri tapmaq lazımdır. Çətinlikləri almaq çətinlikdir, çünki bu dərin bir semantik seviyyətində araştırmaları içərisində olar. Dökümət seviyesində böyük semantik redundantlığı keşfetmək üçün təhniklər az idi. Bu işdə sistemin gördüyü məsələlər barəsində bir dəstə məlumatları ilə dəyişdirmək üçün dərin Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) modeli təklif edirik. Sistem asandır və heç bir əlavə mühendisliyə ehtiyacı yoxdur. Bizim yeni taslağımız məlumatlardan və məlumatlardan əlaqəli və qohumluq məlumatlarını kodlayır ki, əlaqəli Döküman Vektörü (RDV) olaraq yaratdığımız orta bir göstəriş yaratmaq üçün. Təksihət metodu, həqiqətən , mövcud mövcud mövcud mövcud mövcud-səviyyədə yeni keşif verilən verilənlərdən üstün gəlir. Daha sonra, parafrazlərin keçişləri semantik çəkilmiş belələrə yaxınlaşdığı standart parafrazlərin keçirməsi verilənlərin istifadəsini göstəririk.', 'hy': 'Համացանցում փաստաթղթերի արագ աճը ստիպված է գտնել միջոցներ, որոնք կօգնեն անհրաժեշտ փաստաթղթեր արձակել և նոր փաստաթղթեր պահել: Անհրաժեշտության բռնելը դժվար է, քանի որ այն կարող է ներառել խորը սեմանտիկ մակարդակում ուսումնասիրություններ: Այսպիսի սեմանտիկ անհրաժեշտության հայտնաբերման տեխնիկան փաստաթղթի մակարդակում հազվադեպ է: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք խորը համառուցվածքային նյարդային ցանցերի (CNN) հիմնված մոդել, որպեսզի փաստաթղթին դասակարգեն որպես նորարար կամ անհրաժեշտ մի շարք համակարգի արդեն տեսած նշանակալի փաստաթղթեր: Համակարգը պարզ է և չի պահանջում ոչ մի ձեռքի հնարավորությունների ճարտարագիտություն: Our novel scheme encodes relevant and relative information from both source and target texts to generate an intermediate representation which we coin as the Relative Document Vector (RDV).  Առաջարկված մեթոդը գերազանցում է փաստաթղթի մակարդակի նորությունների հայտնաբերման տվյալների ընթացքում գոյություն ունեցող ամենակարևորը 5 տոկոսով ճշգրտության տեսքով: Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս մեր մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը ստանդարտ պարաֆրեզի հայտնաբերման տվյալների համակարգի վրա, որտեղ պարաֆրեզի հատվածները շատ նման են սեմանտիկապես անհրաժեշտ փաստաթղթերին:', 'ca': "El ràpid creixement dels documents a través de la Web ha necessitat trobar mitjans per eliminar documents redundants i conservar-los noves. Captar la licenciatura és difícil perquè pot implicar investigacions a nivell semàntic profund. Les tècniques per detectar aquesta redundancia semàntica a nivell dels documents són escases. En aquesta feina proposem un model profund basat en Redes Neurals Convolucionals (CNN) per classificar un document com nou o redundant en relació a un conjunt de documents pertinents ja vists pel sistema. The system is simple and do not require any manual feature engineering.  El nostre nou esquema codifica la informació rellevant i relativa dels textos d'origen i d'objectiu per generar una representació intermediària que anomenem Vector Relatiu del Document (RDV). El mètode proposat supera l'actualitat existent en un conjunt de dades de detecció de novetats a nivell documental d'un marge de 5% en termes de precisió. També demostram l'eficacia del nostre enfocament en un conjunt de dades de detecció de parafrases estàndard on passatges parafrasitzats s'assemblen estretament a documents semànticament redundants.", 'cs': 'Rychlý růst dokumentů napříč webem vyžadoval nalezení prostředků k odstranění nadbytečných dokumentů a zachování nových dokumentů. Zachycení redundance je náročné, protože může zahrnovat zkoumání na hluboké sémantické úrovni. Techniky pro detekci takové sémantické redundance na úrovni dokumentů jsou vzácné. V této práci navrhujeme hluboký model konvelučních neuronových sítí (CNN) pro klasifikaci dokumentu jako nového nebo redundantního s ohledem na soubor relevantních dokumentů, které již systém vidí. Systém je jednoduchý a nevyžaduje žádné manuální inženýrství funkcí. Naše nové schéma kóduje relevantní a relativní informace ze zdrojového i cílového textu a vytváří tak mezipředstavení, které vytváříme jako relativní dokumentový vektor (RDV). Navržená metoda překonává stávající nejmodernější datovou sadu detekce novosti na úrovni dokumentů o rozpětí 5% z hlediska přesnosti. Dále demonstrujeme efektivitu našeho přístupu na standardní datové sadě detekce parafráz, kde parafrázované pasáže úzce připomínají sémanticky redundantním dokumentům.', 'bs': 'Brzi rast dokumenta širom mreže je potrebno pronaći sredstva za odbacivanje redundantnih dokumenta i zadržavanje novela. Uhvaćanje redundancije je izazovno jer može uključiti istragu na dubokoj semantičkoj razini. Tehnika za otkrivanje takvog semantičkog redundancije na nivou dokumenta je manja. U ovom poslu predlažemo duboki konvolucionalni neuronski mreži (CNN) bazirani model za klasifikaciju dokumenta kao roman ili redundant u vezi sa setom relevantnih dokumenta koje je već vidio sustav. Sistem je jednostavan i ne zahtijeva nikakve manualne inženjerstvo. Naša romanska šema kodira relevantne i relativne informacije iz izvora i ciljnih tekstova kako bi stvorili prosječnu zastupnicu koju smislimo kao Relativni dokument vektor (RDV). Predložena metoda iznosi postojeće stanje umjetnosti na podacima za otkrivanje novosti na nivou dokumenta sa marginom od 5% u smislu tačnosti. Dalje pokazujemo učinkovitost našeg pristupa na standardnom setu podataka za detekciju parafraze gdje parafraze prolaze bliže slične semantički redundantnim dokumentima.', 'et': 'Dokumentide kiire kasv kogu veebis on nõudnud leida vahendeid üleliigsete dokumentide kõrvaldamiseks ja uute dokumentide säilitamiseks. Liigsuse jäädvustamine on keeruline, sest see võib hõlmata sügaval semantilisel tasandil uurimist. Sellise semantilise redundantsuse tuvastamise meetodid dokumendi tasandil on vähe. Selles töös pakume välja sügavate konvolutsiooniliste neuraalsete võrkude (CNN) mudeli, et klassifitseerida dokument uudseks või üleliigseks seoses asjakohaste dokumentidega, mida süsteem juba näeb. Süsteem on lihtne ja ei nõua käsitsi funktsioonide projekteerimist. Meie uudne skeem kodeerib asjakohast ja suhtelist informatsiooni nii lähte- kui sihttekstidest, et luua vahepealne esitus, mille me mõtleme suhtelise dokumendivektorina (RDV). Kavandatud meetod ületab dokumentide tasandil uudsuste tuvastamise andmekogumi olemasolevaid tehnika tasemeid 5% täpsuse poolest. Lisaks demonstreerime oma lähenemisviisi tõhusust standardse parafraasituvastusandmekogumi puhul, kus parafraasid sarnanevad täpselt semantiliselt üleliigsete dokumentidega.', 'fi': 'Asiakirjojen nopea kasvu Internetissä on vaatinut keinoja hylätä tarpeettomat asiakirjat ja säilyttää uudet asiakirjat. Redundanssin talteenotto on haastavaa, koska se voi edellyttää syvällistä semanttista tutkimusta. Tekniikkaa tällaisen semanttisen redundanssin havaitsemiseksi asiakirjatasolla on niukasti. Tässä työssä ehdotamme syvään konvolutional neural networks (CNN) perustuvaa mallia, jolla dokumentti luokitellaan uudeksi tai tarpeettomaksi suhteessa järjestelmään jo nähtyihin olennaisiin asiakirjoihin. Järjestelmä on yksinkertainen eikä vaadi manuaalista ominaisuuksien suunnittelua. Uusi kaaviomme koodaa relevanttia ja suhteellista tietoa sekä lähde- että kohdeteksteistä luodakseen välimuotoisen esityksen, jonka käytämme suhteellisena asiakirjavektorina (RDV). Ehdotettu menetelmä on 5 prosentin tarkkuudella parempi kuin dokumenttitason uutuuksien havaitsemistietojen nykytaso. Osoitamme myös lähestymistapamme tehokkuuden vakiomuotoisessa parafraasitunnistustiedostossa, jossa parafraasit muistuttavat läheisesti semanttisesti tarpeettomia asiakirjoja.', 'bn': 'ওয়েব জুড়ে নথিপত্রের দ্রুত বৃদ্ধি প্রয়োজনীয় তথ্যগুলো নিম্নলিখিত নথি ছেড়ে দেওয়ার উপায় খুঁজে বের করে রেখেছে। Capturing redundancy is challenging as it may involve investigating at a deep semantic level.  নথির স্তরে এই ধরনের সেমেন্টিক কমান্ডেন্সি সনাক্ত করার প্রযুক্তি কম। এই কাজে আমরা একটি গভীর কনভোলোভেলেশন নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) ভিত্তিক মডেল প্রস্তাব করছি যাতে সিস্টেমের দ্বারা ইতোমধ্যে দেখা হয়েছে একটি সংখ্যা  সিস্টেম সহজ এবং কোন হাতিয়াল বৈশিষ্ট্য ইঞ্জিনিয়নের প্রয়োজন নেই। আমাদের উপন্যাস পরিকল্পনা উভয় উৎস এবং লক্ষ্য টেক্সট থেকে প্রাপ্ত এবং আত্মিক তথ্য তৈরি করা হয়েছে যাতে আমরা একটি মধ্যবর্তী প্রতিনিধিত্ব তৈরি করি যা  প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি সঠিকভাবে সঠিকভাবে একটি ডকুমেন্ট- স্তরের নোভেলিটি সনাক্ত তথ্যের মাধ্যমে বিদ্যমান অবস্থান-শিল্পের অবস্থান প্ আমরা আরো প্রদর্শন করি একটি স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার প্যারাফ্রেস ডিজেক্ট ডাটাসেটে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়ার কার্যক্রম যেখানে প্যারাফ্রেসের পাস', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Ina kãma rabo ya yi tsõratar, kwani kanza ta sami karatu a cikin daraja mai ƙaranci. Technical for the gane of such an ƙari na semantic at levels of document are kaɗan. In this work we propose a deep Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) based model to classify a document as novel or redundant with respect to a set of relevant documents already seen by the system.  @ item: inmenu Text Completion Layout ɗin nan na kode maɓallin na da danganiya daga both sources da shiryoyin ayuka dõmin ya ƙãga wani hoto mai tsakiya da za'a sami da shi kamar The Relative Document (RDV). @ action: button Tuna nuna kafirar hanyarmu a kan data na gane parameteri na daidaita, inda parafrasa suka sami takardar takardar da nake ƙaranci.", 'sk': 'Hitra rast dokumentov po spletu je zahtevala iskanje sredstev za odstranitev odvečnih dokumentov in ohranitev novih dokumentov. Zajemanje redundance je zahtevno, saj lahko vključuje raziskovanje na globoki semantični ravni. Tehnike za odkrivanje takšne semantične redundance na ravni dokumentov so malo. V tem delu predlagamo model, ki temelji na globokih konvolucijskih živčnih omrežjih (CNN), za razvrstitev dokumenta kot novega ali odvečnega glede na nabor ustreznih dokumentov, ki jih sistem že vidi. Sistem je preprost in ne zahteva ročnega inženiringa funkcij. Naša nova shema kodira relevantne in relativne informacije iz izvornih in ciljnih besedil, da ustvari vmesno predstavitev, ki jo uporabljamo kot relativni vektor dokumentov (RDV). Predlagana metoda presega obstoječe najsodobnejše vrste podatkov o odkrivanju novosti na ravni dokumenta za 5% glede natančnosti. Dodatno dokazujemo učinkovitost našega pristopa pri standardnem naboru podatkov o zaznavanju parafraz, kjer parafrazirani odlomki zelo podobni semantično odvečnim dokumentom.', 'he': 'הגידול המהיר של מסמכים ברשת הצריך למצוא דרכים לזרוק מסמכים מוגזמים ולשמור על מסמכים חדשים. לתפוס מוגבלות זה מאתגר כי זה עלול להיות מעורב בחקירה ברמה סמנטית עמוקה. טכניקות לגלות מיותרות סמנטית כזו ברמה המסמכים הן נדירות. בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים מודל עמוק של רשתות נוירוליות משתנות (CNN) המבוסס כדי לקlassifika מסמך כרומן או מוגזם בנוגע לקבוצה של מסמכים רלוונטיים כבר ראויים על ידי המערכת. המערכת פשוטה ולא דורשת הנדסה של תכונות ידנית. המערכת הרומנית שלנו קודמת מידע רלוונטי יחסי משני טקסטים מקור ומטרה כדי ליצור מייצג בינוני שאנחנו ממטבעים כVector המסמכים יחסיים (RDV). השיטה המוצעת מגבירה את המצב החדש ביותר ברמת המסמכים על קבוצת נתונים לגילוי חדשות על ידי שווה של 5% במונחים של מדויקה. אנחנו גם מראים את היעילות של הגישה שלנו על קבוצת נתונים סטנדרטית לגילוי פראפרסמים שבו מעברים פראפרסמים דומים מקרוב למסמכים סמנטיים מוגזמים.', 'bo': 'དྲ་ཐོག་ཏུ་ཡིག་ཆ་འཕེལ་དར་དུ་ཡིག་ཆ་མང་བའི་ཡིག་ཆ དཔལ་མྱུར་བའི་ཚད་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟེང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་གི་ཡོད། ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་ཚད་ལ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་རྐྱེན་ཚད་དཀའ་པོ་རེད། In this work we propose a deep Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) based model to classify a document as novel or redundant with respect to a set of relevant documents already seen by the system. The system is simple and do not require any manual feature engineering. Our novel scheme encodes relevant and relative information from both source and target texts to generate an intermediate representation which we coin as the Relative Document Vector (RDV). དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ནི་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གསལ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནུས་ཚོད་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་བཟོ་རྣམ་གཟུགས་རིས་བཙལ', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé sing paling beraksi dokumen ing web kudu butaké awak dhéwé kuwi duluran dokumen sing ngedol lan ijol-ijolan winih. Capture Genjer-teknik kanggo nambah sematik kuwi duluran ning layang dokumen Nang barêng-barêng iki kita supoyo sistem sing gawe akèh condvolution Neral Network (MT) supoyo urip kuwi nggawe dokumen nganggo dolanan sing apik obah nguasai balêr o kuwi lagi nggawe gerakan akeh akeh dokumen sing wis ana dadi bisa nguasai sistèm. Sistem sampeyan lan ora butakon manut neng akeh manut. Awak dhéwé sistem sing kode nggawe barang nggawe informasi tambahan karo Ketoken nggo Ketoken nggawe tarjamahan Perintah sing dipunabah iso nggambar kalagayet Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan aplikasi kanggo ndelok dadi kapan-asar tentang'}
{'en': 'What represents style in authorship attribution?', 'ar': 'ما الذي يمثل "الأسلوب" في إسناد التأليف؟', 'es': '¿Qué representa el «estilo» en la atribución de autoría?', 'pt': 'O que representa “estilo” na atribuição de autoria?', 'fr': "Qu'est-ce que le «\xa0style\xa0» dans l'attribution de la paternité\xa0?", 'ja': '著者の帰属における「スタイル」を表すものは何ですか？', 'zh': '作者属中,何者为风?', 'hi': 'लेखकत्व एट्रिब्यूशन में "शैली" का क्या प्रतिनिधित्व करता है?', 'ru': 'Что означает «стиль» в атрибуции авторства?', 'ga': 'Cad a sheasann do “stíl” i leithroinnt an údair?', 'el': 'Τι αντιπροσωπεύει το "στυλ" στην απόδοση της συγγραφής;', 'ka': 'კაკგჲ ოპვეოჲლჲზაგა "ჟრთლ" გ ატპთბსუთწრა?', 'hu': 'Mi jelenti a "stílust" a szerzői hozzárendelésben?', 'it': 'Cosa rappresenta lo "stile" nell\'attribuzione dell\'autore?', 'mk': 'Кој претставува „стил“ во атрибутот на авторство?', 'ml': "ആധിപത്യത്തിന്റെ അധികാരത്തില്\u200d 'സ്റ്റൈല്\u200d' എന്താണ് പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നത്?", 'ms': "What represents 'style' in authorship attribution?", 'mn': 'Эрхэмчийн хувьд "стиль" юу гэсэн үг вэ?', 'mt': "X'jirrappreżenta 'stil' fl-attribuzzjoni tal-awtur?", 'no': 'Kva representerer « stil » i autoriseringsattribusjon?', 'pl': 'Co reprezentuje styl w przypisywaniu autorstwa?', 'ro': 'Ce reprezintă "stilul" în atribuirea autorului?', 'kk': "Авториялық қатынасында 'стиль' дегенді не көрсетеді?", 'lt': 'Ką reiškia "stilius" autoriaus priskyrimo atžvilgiu?', 'sr': 'Šta predstavlja "stil" u privlačenju autoriteta?', 'si': "මොකද්ද අධිකාරිත්වය ගැන 'ස්ටයිල්' කියන්නේ?", 'sv': 'Vad representerar "stil" i författarskap attribution?', 'so': "Maxaa u jeedaa 'style' oo ku qoran warqada rasmiga?", 'ta': "அதிகாரத்தின் பங்கீட்டில் 'பாணி' என்ன குறிப்பிடுகிறது?", 'ur': 'جو "استیل" کی تعریف کرتا ہے؟', 'vi': "Cái gì đại diện cho'phong cách'trong tác quyền?", 'uz': "Mualliflik atributlarida 'style' ni nima represent?", 'bg': 'Какво представлява "стил" в приписването на авторството?', 'da': 'Hvad repræsenterer "stil" i forfatterskabets tilskrivning?', 'nl': "Wat staat voor 'stijl' in auteurschapsattributie?", 'de': 'Was steht für "Stil" in der Autorenschaftszuweisung?', 'ko': "무엇이 작가의 귀속 중의'풍격'을 대표합니까?", 'fa': 'چی معرفی میکنه "سبک" در تعریف اختیار؟', 'sw': "Ni nini kinachowakilisha 'mtindo' katika kitendo cha mwandishi?", 'tr': "Oturmanyň hyzmaty içinde 'stil'-i nähili ifade edýär?", 'hr': "Što predstavlja 'stil' u privlačenju autoriteta?", 'am': 'በሥልጣን አካባቢ ላይ ‹ዓይነት› ምን ያሳያል?', 'sq': "Çfarë përfaqëson 'stilin' në atribucionin e autorisë?", 'id': "Apa yang mewakili 'gaya' dalam atribut pengarang?", 'hy': 'Ի՞նչը ներկայացնում է «ոճը» հեղինակության պատասխանատվության մեջ:', 'bn': "লেখক অ্যাট্রিবিউশনে 'স্টাইল' প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা কি?", 'ca': "Què representa l'estil en l'atribució d'autoresa?", 'cs': 'Co představuje styl při atribuci autorství?', 'et': 'Mis tähendab "stiili" autori omistamisel?', 'az': "Yax캼nl캼q t톛rzind톛 'stil' n톛dir?", 'fi': 'Mikä edustaa "tyyliä" tekijän nimeämisessä?', 'bs': 'Šta predstavlja "stil" u privlačenju autoriteta?', 'af': "Wat verteenwoordig 'styl' in autoriseertoestelling?", 'jv': "omongke kuwi 'style' nganggo iburunge autorti?", 'he': "מה מייצג 'סגנון' בתיאור הסופרים?", 'ha': "Mẽne ne zai gaya 'salon' cikin fassarar mutane?", 'sk': 'Kaj predstavlja "slog" pri pripisovanju avtorstva?', 'bo': "དབང་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ནང་དུ་ 'བཟོ་རྣམ'་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གང་ཞིག་མཚོན་གྱི་ཡིན།"}
{'en': 'Authorship attribution typically uses all information representing both content and style whereas attribution based only on stylistic aspects may be robust in cross-domain settings. This paper analyzes different linguistic aspects that may help represent style. Specifically, we study the role of syntax and lexical words (nouns, verbs, adjectives and adverbs) in representing style. We use a purely syntactic language model to study the significance of sentence structures in both single-domain and cross-domain attribution, i.e. cross-topic and cross-genre attribution. We show that syntax may be helpful for cross-genre attribution while cross-topic attribution and single-domain may benefit from additional lexical information. Further, pure syntactic models may not be effective by themselves and need to be used in combination with other robust models. To study the role of word choice, we perform attribution by masking all words or specific topic words corresponding to nouns, verbs, adjectives and adverbs. Using a single-domain dataset, IMDB1 M reviews, we demonstrate the heavy influence of common nouns and proper nouns in attribution, thereby highlighting topic interference. Using cross-domain Guardian10 dataset, we show that some common nouns, verbs, adjectives and adverbs may help with stylometric attribution as demonstrated by masking topic words corresponding to these parts-of-speech. As expected, it was observed that proper nouns are heavily influenced by content and cross-domain attribution will benefit from completely masking them.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما تستخدم إسناد التأليف جميع المعلومات التي تمثل المحتوى والأسلوب معًا ، بينما قد تكون الإسناد المستندة إلى الجوانب الأسلوبية قوية في الإعدادات عبر النطاقات. تحلل هذه الورقة الجوانب اللغوية المختلفة التي قد تساعد في تمثيل الأسلوب. على وجه التحديد ، ندرس دور النحو والكلمات المعجمية (الأسماء والأفعال والصفات والظروف) في تمثيل الأسلوب. نحن نستخدم نموذجًا لغويًا نحويًا بحتًا لدراسة أهمية تراكيب الجملة في كل من المجال الفردي وعبر المجال ، أي الإسناد عبر الموضوع وعبر الأنواع. نوضح أن بناء الجملة قد يكون مفيدًا للإحالة عبر الأنواع بينما قد تستفيد الإحالة عبر الموضوعات والنطاق الفردي من المعلومات المعجمية الإضافية. علاوة على ذلك ، قد لا تكون النماذج النحوية البحتة فعالة من تلقاء نفسها وتحتاج إلى استخدامها مع نماذج قوية أخرى. لدراسة دور اختيار الكلمات ، نقوم بالإسناد عن طريق إخفاء جميع الكلمات أو كلمات الموضوع المحددة المقابلة للأسماء والأفعال والصفات والظروف. باستخدام مجموعة بيانات ذات مجال واحد ، مراجعات IMDB1M ، نوضح التأثير الكبير للأسماء الشائعة والأسماء الصحيحة في الإسناد ، وبالتالي نبرز تداخل الموضوع. باستخدام مجموعة بيانات Guardian10 عبر النطاقات ، نوضح أن بعض الأسماء والأفعال والصفات والظروف الشائعة قد تساعد في الإسناد الأسلوبي كما هو موضح من خلال إخفاء كلمات الموضوع المقابلة لأجزاء الكلام هذه. كما هو متوقع ، لوحظ أن أسماء العلم تتأثر بشدة بالمحتوى و\nسوف تستفيد الإسناد عبر المجال من إخفاءها تمامًا.', 'es': 'La atribución de autoría normalmente utiliza toda la información que representa tanto el contenido como el estilo, mientras que la atribución basada únicamente en aspectos estilísticos puede ser sólida en entornos multidominio. Este artículo analiza diferentes aspectos lingüísticos que pueden ayudar a representar el estilo. Específicamente, estudiamos el papel de la sintaxis y las palabras léxicas (sustantivos, verbos, adjetivos y adverbios) en la representación del estilo. Utilizamos un modelo de lenguaje puramente sintáctico para estudiar la importancia de las estructuras de las oraciones en la atribución de un solo dominio y entre dominios, es decir, la atribución entre temas y géneros. Mostramos que la sintaxis puede ser útil para la atribución entre géneros, mientras que la atribución entre temas y un solo dominio pueden beneficiarse de información léxica adicional. Además, los modelos sintácticos puros pueden no ser efectivos por sí mismos y deben usarse en combinación con otros modelos robustos. Para estudiar el papel de la elección de palabras, realizamos la atribución enmascarando todas las palabras o palabras temáticas específicas correspondientes a sustantivos, verbos, adjetivos y adverbios. Mediante el uso de un conjunto de datos de dominio único, revisiones de IMDB1M, demostramos la gran influencia de los sustantivos comunes y los nombres propios en la atribución, destacando así la interferencia del tema. Al usar el conjunto de datos de Guardian10 entre dominios, mostramos que algunos sustantivos, verbos, adjetivos y adverbios comunes pueden ayudar con la atribución estilométrica, como lo demuestra el enmascaramiento de palabras temáticas correspondientes a estas partes del discurso. Como era de esperar, se observó que los sustantivos propios están fuertemente influenciados por el contenido y\nLa atribución entre dominios se beneficiará de enmascararlos por completo.', 'fr': "L'attribution de la paternité utilise généralement toutes les informations représentant à la fois le contenu et le style, tandis que l'attribution basée uniquement sur des aspects stylistiques peut être robuste dans des contextes interdomaines. Cet article analyse différents aspects linguistiques qui peuvent aider à représenter le style. Plus précisément, nous étudions le rôle de la syntaxe et des mots lexicaux (noms, verbes, adjectifs et adverbes) dans la représentation du style. Nous utilisons un modèle de langage purement syntaxique pour étudier la signification des structures de phrases dans l'attribution à un seul domaine et à plusieurs domaines, c'est-à-dire l'attribution entre sujets et entre genres. Nous montrons que la syntaxe peut être utile pour l'attribution entre genres, tandis que l'attribution entre sujets et domaine unique peut bénéficier d'informations lexicales supplémentaires. De plus, les modèles syntaxiques purs peuvent ne pas être efficaces en eux-mêmes et doivent être utilisés en combinaison avec d'autres modèles robustes. Pour étudier le rôle du choix des mots, nous effectuons l'attribution en masquant tous les mots ou mots de sujets spécifiques correspondant à des noms, des verbes, des adjectifs et des adverbes. À l'aide d'un ensemble de données à domaine unique, revues IMDB1M, nous démontrons la forte influence des noms communs et des noms propres dans l'attribution, mettant ainsi en évidence l'interférence des sujets. À l'aide de l'ensemble de données Guardian10 interdomaines, nous montrons que certains noms, verbes, adjectifs et adverbes courants peuvent aider à l'attribution stylométrique, comme le montre le masquage des mots de sujet correspondant à ces parties du discours. Comme prévu, il a été observé que les noms propres sont fortement influencés par le contenu et\nl'attribution entre domaines bénéficiera de leur masquage complet.", 'ja': '著者帰属は通常、コンテンツとスタイルの両方を表すすべての情報を使用しますが、スタイルの側面のみに基づく帰属は、クロスドメイン設定では堅牢である可能性があります。 この論文では、スタイルを表現するのに役立つかもしれないさまざまな言語学的側面を分析している。 具体的には、文体を表す際の構文や語彙の単語（名詞、動詞、形容詞、副詞）の役割を研究している。 私たちは、純粋な構文言語モデルを使用して、シングルドメインとクロスドメインの帰属、すなわちクロストピックとクロスジャンルの帰属の両方における文章構造の意義を研究します。 我々は、構文がクロスジャンルの帰属に役立つ一方で、クロストピックの帰属と単一ドメインが追加の語彙情報から恩恵を受ける可能性があることを示しています。 さらに、純粋な構文モデルは、それ自体が効果的ではなくてもよく、他の堅牢なモデルと組み合わせて使用する必要がある。 単語選択の役割を研究するために、私たちは名詞、動詞、形容詞、および副詞に対応するすべての単語または特定のトピック単語をマスキングすることによって帰属を実行します。 単一ドメインのデータセット、IMDB 1 Mレビューを使用して、私たちは、一般名詞と帰属における固有名詞の大きな影響を示し、それによってトピックの干渉を強調します。 クロスドメインのガーディアン10データセットを使用して、これらの発話部分に対応するトピック単語をマスキングすることによって示されるように、いくつかの一般的な名詞、動詞、形容詞、および副詞がスタイルメトリックの帰属を助ける可能性があることを示します。 予想されるように、固有名詞は内容と\nクロスドメインの帰属は、それらを完全にマスキングすることによって利益を得るでしょう。', 'pt': 'A atribuição de autoria normalmente usa todas as informações que representam conteúdo e estilo, enquanto a atribuição baseada apenas em aspectos estilísticos pode ser robusta em configurações de vários domínios. Este artigo analisa diferentes aspectos linguísticos que podem ajudar a representar o estilo. Especificamente, estudamos o papel da sintaxe e das palavras lexicais (substantivos, verbos, adjetivos e advérbios) na representação do estilo. Usamos um modelo de linguagem puramente sintático para estudar o significado das estruturas de sentenças na atribuição de domínio único e de domínio cruzado, ou seja, atribuição entre tópicos e gêneros. Mostramos que a sintaxe pode ser útil para a atribuição entre gêneros, enquanto a atribuição entre tópicos e domínio único pode se beneficiar de informações lexicais adicionais. Além disso, modelos sintáticos puros podem não ser eficazes por si só e precisam ser usados em combinação com outros modelos robustos. Para estudar o papel da escolha de palavras, realizamos a atribuição mascarando todas as palavras ou palavras de tópicos específicos correspondentes a substantivos, verbos, adjetivos e advérbios. Usando um conjunto de dados de domínio único, revisões do IMDB1M, demonstramos a forte influência de nomes comuns e nomes próprios na atribuição, destacando a interferência do tópico. Usando o conjunto de dados Guardian10 de vários domínios, mostramos que alguns substantivos, verbos, adjetivos e advérbios comuns podem ajudar na atribuição estilométrica, conforme demonstrado pelo mascaramento de palavras de tópico correspondentes a essas partes do discurso. Como esperado, observou-se que os nomes próprios são fortemente influenciados pelo conteúdo e\na atribuição entre domínios se beneficiará do mascaramento completo.', 'zh': '夫作者,所以为义也;而仅者,所以为跨域也。 本文析或助风格。 具体来说,治句法词汇(名词,动词,形容词副词)风格之用也。 吾以纯句法言模形治句结于单领、跨领归因中之要,即跨题、跨流派归因也。 明语法或助跨流派归因,而跨主题归因与单域或受益额外词汇息。 此外纯句法模无效,须与他鲁棒合用。 所以研单词择用,掩其名词,动词其形容词副词,所有单词特定主题单词以行归因。 用单域数据集,IMDB1M论之,证常见名词及专有名词在归因中甚相损益,以显干扰。 用跨域 Guardian10 数集,明常见之名词、动词、形容词、副词或助风格归因,如屏蔽对此词性主题词所证也。 如预期者,察其专有名词也\n跨域归因将受益屏蔽之。', 'hi': 'लेखकत्व एट्रिब्यूशन आमतौर पर सामग्री और शैली दोनों का प्रतिनिधित्व करने वाली सभी जानकारी का उपयोग करता है जबकि केवल शैलीगत पहलुओं पर आधारित एट्रिब्यूशन क्रॉस-डोमेन सेटिंग्स में मजबूत हो सकता है। यह पेपर विभिन्न भाषाई पहलुओं का विश्लेषण करता है जो शैली का प्रतिनिधित्व करने में मदद कर सकते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम शैली का प्रतिनिधित्व करने में वाक्यविन्यास और लेक्सिकल शब्दों (संज्ञा, क्रिया, विशेषण और क्रियाविशेषण) की भूमिका का अध्ययन करते हैं। हम एकल-डोमेन और क्रॉस-डोमेन एट्रिब्यूशन दोनों में वाक्य संरचनाओं के महत्व का अध्ययन करने के लिए एक विशुद्ध रूप से वाक्यात्मक भाषा मॉडल का उपयोग करते हैं, यानी क्रॉस-टॉपिक और क्रॉस-शैली एट्रिब्यूशन। हम दिखाते हैं कि वाक्यविन्यास क्रॉस-शैली एट्रिब्यूशन के लिए सहायक हो सकता है जबकि क्रॉस-टॉपिक एट्रिब्यूशन और सिंगल-डोमेन को अतिरिक्त लेक्सिकल जानकारी से लाभ हो सकता है। इसके अलावा, शुद्ध वाक्यात्मक मॉडल स्वयं से प्रभावी नहीं हो सकते हैं और अन्य मजबूत मॉडलों के साथ संयोजन में उपयोग करने की आवश्यकता होती है। शब्द पसंद की भूमिका का अध्ययन करने के लिए, हम संज्ञा, क्रिया, विशेषण और क्रियाविशेषण के अनुरूप सभी शब्दों या विशिष्ट विषय शब्दों को मास्क करके एट्रिब्यूशन करते हैं। एक एकल-डोमेन डेटासेट, IMDB1M समीक्षाओं का उपयोग करते हुए, हम एट्रिब्यूशन में सामान्य संज्ञाओं और उचित संज्ञाओं के भारी प्रभाव को प्रदर्शित करते हैं, जिससे विषय हस्तक्षेप को उजागर किया जाता है। क्रॉस-डोमेन गार्जियन 10 डेटासेट का उपयोग करते हुए, हम दिखाते हैं कि कुछ सामान्य संज्ञाएं, क्रियाएं, विशेषण और क्रियाविशेषण स्टाइलोमेट्रिक एट्रिब्यूशन के साथ मदद कर सकते हैं जैसा कि इन भागों-भाषण के अनुरूप विषय शब्दों को मास्क करके प्रदर्शित किया गया है। जैसा कि अपेक्षित था, यह देखा गया था कि उचित संज्ञाएं सामग्री से बहुत प्रभावित होती हैं और\nक्रॉस-डोमेन एट्रिब्यूशन उन्हें पूरी तरह से मास्किंग से लाभ होगा।', 'ru': 'Атрибуция авторства обычно использует всю информацию, представляющую как содержание, так и стиль, тогда как атрибуция, основанная только на стилистических аспектах, может быть надежной в междоменных настройках. В этой статье анализируются различные лингвистические аспекты, которые могут помочь представить стиль. В частности, мы изучаем роль синтаксиса и лексических слов (существительных, глаголов, прилагательных и наречий) в представлении стиля. Мы используем чисто синтаксическую языковую модель для изучения значимости структур предложений как в однодоменной, так и в междоменной атрибуции, т.е. кросс-темической и кросс-жанровой атрибуции. Мы показываем, что синтаксис может быть полезен для кросс-жанровой атрибуции, в то время как кросс-темическая атрибуция и однодоменная может выиграть от дополнительной лексической информации. Кроме того, чистые синтаксические модели могут быть неэффективными сами по себе и должны использоваться в сочетании с другими надежными моделями. Чтобы изучить роль выбора слова, мы выполняем атрибуцию, маскируя все слова или слова конкретной темы, соответствующие существительным, глаголам, прилагательным и наречиям. Используя однодоменный набор данных, обзоры IMDb1M, мы демонстрируем сильное влияние общих существительных и собственных существительных в атрибуции, тем самым подчеркивая интерференцию тем. Используя междоменный набор данных Guardian10, мы показываем, что некоторые общие существительные, глаголы, прилагательные и наречия могут помочь со стилометрической атрибуцией, что подтверждается маскировкой тематических слов, соответствующих этим частям речи. Как и ожидалось, было отмечено, что собственные существительные в значительной степени зависят от содержания и\nмеждоменная атрибуция выиграет от их полной маскировки.', 'ga': 'Is gnách go n-úsáideann sannadh údar an fhaisnéis go léir a léiríonn ábhar agus stíl araon ach is féidir go mbeadh sannadh bunaithe ar ghnéithe stíle amháin láidir i suímh tras-fearainn. Déanann an páipéar seo anailís ar ghnéithe éagsúla teangeolaíochta a d’fhéadfadh cabhrú le stíl a léiriú. Go sonrach, déanaimid staidéar ar an ról atá ag comhréir agus focail fhoclóra (ainmfhocail, briathra, aidiachtaí agus dobhriathra) maidir le stíl a léiriú. Bainimid úsáid as múnla teanga atá comhréire amháin chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar thábhacht struchtúir abairtí i leithroinnt aonfhearainn agus i leithroinnt trasréimse araon, i.e. sannadh tras-ábhar agus tras-seánra. Léirímid go bhféadfadh comhréir a bheith ina chuidiú maidir le sannadh tras-seánra agus d’fhéadfadh go mbainfeadh sannadh tras-ábhair agus aon-fhearainn leas as faisnéis fhoclóra bhreise. Ina theannta sin, b’fhéidir nach mbeidh samhlacha comhréire íona éifeachtach leo féin agus gur gá iad a úsáid in éineacht le samhlacha láidre eile. Chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar ról an rogha focal, déanaimid sannadh trí gach focal nó gach focal topaice ar leith a fhreagraíonn d’ainmfhocail, briathra, aidiachtaí agus dobhriathar a chumhdach. Ag baint úsáide as tacar sonraí aonraoin, léirmheasanna IMDB1M, léirímid an tionchar trom atá ag ainmfhocail choiteanna agus ag ainmfhocail chearta san shannadh, rud a aibhsíonn cur isteach topaicí. Ag baint úsáide as tacar sonraí tras-fhearainn Guardian10, léirímid go bhféadfadh roinnt ainmfhocail, briathra, aidiachtaí agus briathra coitianta cabhrú le sannadh stílmhéadrach mar a léirítear trí fhocail ábhair a fhreagraíonn do na codanna cainte seo a chumhdach. Mar a bheifí ag súil leis, breathnaíodh go bhfuil tionchar mór ag ainmfhocail chearta ar ábhar agus\nbainfidh leithroinnt tras-fearainn tairbhe as iad a chumhdach go hiomlán.', 'el': 'Η απόδοση συγγραφέα χρησιμοποιεί συνήθως όλες τις πληροφορίες που αντιπροσωπεύουν τόσο το περιεχόμενο όσο και το στυλ, ενώ η απόδοση που βασίζεται μόνο σε στυλιστικές πτυχές μπορεί να είναι ισχυρή σε ρυθμίσεις μεταξύ τομέων. Η παρούσα εργασία αναλύει διάφορες γλωσσικές πτυχές που μπορεί να βοηθήσουν στην αναπαράσταση του στυλ. Συγκεκριμένα, μελετάμε το ρόλο της σύνταξης και των λεξικών λέξεων (ουσιαστικά, ρήματα, επίθετα και επίθετα) στην αναπαράσταση του στυλ. Χρησιμοποιούμε ένα καθαρά συντακτικό γλωσσικό μοντέλο για να μελετήσουμε τη σημασία των δομών προτάσεων τόσο στην απόδοση ενός τομέα όσο και στην απόδοση μεταξύ τομέων, δηλαδή στην απόδοση μεταξύ θεμάτων και ειδών. Δείχνουμε ότι η σύνταξη μπορεί να είναι χρήσιμη για την απόδοση μεταξύ των ειδών, ενώ η απόδοση μεταξύ των θεμάτων και ο ενιαίος τομέας μπορεί να ωφεληθεί από πρόσθετες λεξικές πληροφορίες. Επιπλέον, τα καθαρά συντακτικά μοντέλα ενδέχεται να μην είναι αποτελεσματικά από μόνα τους και πρέπει να χρησιμοποιηθούν σε συνδυασμό με άλλα ισχυρά μοντέλα. Για να μελετήσουμε το ρόλο της επιλογής λέξεων, πραγματοποιούμε την απόδοση συγκαλύπτοντας όλες τις λέξεις ή συγκεκριμένες θεματικές λέξεις που αντιστοιχούν σε ουσιαστικά, ρήματα, επίθετα και επίθετα. Χρησιμοποιώντας ένα σύνολο δεδομένων ενός τομέα, αναλύσεις του IMDB1M, καταδεικνύουμε τη μεγάλη επιρροή των κοινών ουσιαστικών και των κανονικών ουσιαστικών στην απόδοση, αναδεικνύοντας έτσι την παρεμβολή θεμάτων. Χρησιμοποιώντας το σύνολο δεδομένων μεταξύ τομέων, δείχνουμε ότι ορισμένα κοινά ουσιαστικά, ρήματα, επίθετα και επίθετα μπορούν να βοηθήσουν στην στυλομετρική απόδοση, όπως αποδεικνύεται με τη συγκάλυψη λέξεων θεμάτων που αντιστοιχούν σε αυτά τα μέρη ομιλίας. Όπως αναμενόταν, παρατηρήθηκε ότι τα ίδια ουσιαστικά επηρεάζονται σε μεγάλο βαθμό από το περιεχόμενο και το περιεχόμενο.\nΗ απόδοση μεταξύ τομέων θα ωφεληθεί από την πλήρη απόκρυψή τους.', 'ka': 'ავტორიების ატრიბუცია ტიპულად გამოყენება ყველა ინფორმაცია, რომელიც მხოლოდ სტილისტიკური აპექტირებზე მხოლოდ ატრიბუცია შეიძლება იყოს ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან კ ეს წიგნის ანალიზაცია განსხვავებული ლუნგურისტიკური აპექტები, რომელიც შეიძლება დახმარება სტილის გამოსახულება. განსაკუთრებულად, ჩვენ სინტაქსის და ლექსიკალური სიტყვების პროლის შესწავლობთ (სიტყვები, გერბები, აექექტიგები და აბერბები) სტილში. ჩვენ მხოლოდ სინტაქტიური ენის მოდელს გამოყენებთ, რომ სწავლათ სიტყვების სტრუქტურაციის მნიშვნელობას ერთ-დიომინის და კრესდემინის ატრიბუქტურაციაში, მაგალითად კრესტემის და კრე ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ სინტაქსი შეიძლება იქნება საკუთარ გენერის ატრიბუციაზე, როცა კრისი ტემიკური ატრიბუციაზე და ერთ-დომინზე შეიძლება დამატებული ლექსიკ დამატებით, უფრო სინტაქტიური მოდელები შეიძლება არ იყოს ეფექტიური და უნდა გამოყენება სხვა ძალიან მოდელებით კომბურაციაში. სიტყვების არჩევის პროლის შესწავლისთვის, ჩვენ ყველა სიტყვები ან სპექტიკური ტემების სიტყვების მაქსიკურად გავაკეთებთ, რომელსაც სიტყვები, გერბები, აექექ IMDB1M გამოყენება ერთ-დომენის მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ საერთო სახელის და სწორი სახელის ძალიან გეტვირციას, ამიტომ მისი თემენტების ინტერფერენციას გა ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ძალიან საერთო სახელის სახელის სახელი10 მონაცემების სახელის გამოყენებას, რომ რაღაც საერთო სახელის, ვერბების, აექექტიგების და აბერბების შესაძლებელია სტილომეტრიული ატრიბუციების შესაძლებ როგორც უნდა იქნებოდა, მონაცემული იყო, რომ საჭირო ნიმენტები ძალიან გამოყენებულია შემდგომარებით და\nკრისი დომინის ატრიბუცია იქნება ისინი ყველაფერად მაქსირებადან გამოიყენება.', 'hu': 'A szerzői hozzárendelés jellemzően minden tartalmat és stílust képviselő információt használ, míg a kizárólag stilisztikai szempontokon alapuló hozzárendelés tartományközi beállításokban robusztus lehet. Ez a tanulmány különböző nyelvi aspektusokat elemez, amelyek segíthetnek a stílus képviseletében. Konkrétan tanulmányozzuk a szintaxis és a lexikai szavak (főnevek, igék, melléknevek és határozószavak) szerepét a stílus ábrázolásában. Tisztán szintaktikus nyelvi modellt használunk arra, hogy tanulmányozzuk a mondatszerkezetek jelentőségét mind az egydományos, mind a többdományos attribúcióban, azaz a témák és a műfajok közötti attribúcióban. Megmutatjuk, hogy a szintaxis hasznos lehet a műfajok közötti hozzárendeléshez, míg a témák közötti hozzárendeléshez és az egytartományokhoz további lexikai információk előnyei lehetnek. Továbbá a tiszta szintaktikus modellek önmagukban nem hatékonyak, és más robusztus modellekkel kombinálva kell használni. A szóválasztás szerepének tanulmányozásához a tulajdonítást úgy végezzük el, hogy a főneveknek, igéknek, melléknéveknek és határozószavaknak megfelelő összes szót vagy konkrét témaszót elfedjük. Az IMDB1M áttekintésével egy egytartományból álló adatkészletet használva bemutatjuk a közönséges főnevek és tulajdonsági főnevek erős hatását a hozzárendelésben, kiemelve ezáltal a téma interferenciáját. Tartományok közötti Guardian10 adatkészletet használva megmutatjuk, hogy néhány közös főnev, igék, melléknevek és határozószavak segíthetnek a stylometrikus attribúcióban, amint azt az ezeknek a beszédrészeknek megfelelő témaszavak maszkolása mutatja. Ahogy várható, megfigyelték, hogy a tulajdonos főneveket nagymértékben befolyásolják a tartalom és\nA tartományok közötti hozzárendelés előnyös lesz, ha teljes mértékben eltakarja őket.', 'lt': 'Autoriaus priskyrimas paprastai naudoja visą informaciją, atitinkančią tiek turinį, tiek stilą, o priskyrimas, pagrįstas tik stilistiniais aspektais, gali būti patikimas įvairių domenų nustatymuose. Šiame dokumente analizuojami skirtingi kalbiniai aspektai, kurie gali padėti atspindėti stilą. Konkrečiai, mes tiriame sintaksijos ir leksinių žodžių (vardų, žodžių, priedyvų ir reklamų) vaidmenį atstovaujant stiliui. Naudojame grynai sintaktinį kalbos model į, kad i štirtume sakinių struktūrų reikšmę tiek vieno domeno, tiek tarpdomeno priskyrimuose, t. y. tarpteminiuose ir tarpgenres priskyrimuose. Mes rodome, kad sintaksija gali būti naudinga skirtingų genrų priskyrimui, o skirtingų temų priskyrimui ir vienam domenui gali būti naudinga papildoma leksinė informacija. Be to, vien tik grynasis sintaksinis modelis gali būti neveiksmingas ir jį reikia naudoti kartu su kitais tvirtais modeliais. Norėdami ištirti žodžių pasirinkimo vaidmenį, mes atliekame priskyrimą paslėpdami visus žodžius ar konkrečius teminius žodžius, atitinkančius vardus, žodžius, priedėlius ir adverbus. Naudodami vienos srities duomenų rinkinį, IMDB1M peržiūras, įrodome didelę bendrų vardų ir tinkamų vardų įtaką priskyrimui, taip atkreipiant dėmesį į temų trukdymą. Naudojant tarpdomeninį Guardian10 duomenų rinkinį, mes parodome, kad kai kurie bendri vardai, žodžiai, priedai ir prieštaravimai gali padėti stilometriniam priskyrimui, kaip parodyta maskuojant teminius žodžius, atitinkančius šias kalbos dalis. Kaip tikėtasi, pastebėta, kad turinys labai veikia tinkamus vardinius pavadinimus ir\nįvairių sričių priskyrimas bus naudingas visiškai juos paslėpiant.', 'mk': 'Атрификацијата на авторството обично ги користи сите информации кои ја претставуваат содржината и стилот, додека атрификацијата базирана само на стилистички аспекти може да биде силна во поставувањата на крстодомените. Оваа хартија анализира различни јазички аспекти кои може да помогнат во претставувањето на стилот. Специфично, ја проучуваме улогата на синтаксичните и лексичките зборови (именици, стапки, адективи и анберби) во претставувањето на стилот. Ние користиме чисто синтактички јазички модел за да го проучуваме значењето на структурите на речениците во припишувањето на еднодомен и крстодомен, т.е. крстотемска и крстогенерна припишување. Ние покажуваме дека синтаксата може да биде корисна за крстогенерна атрибутација додека крстотемската атрибутација и еднодомен може да имаат корист од дополнителни лексикални информации. Покрај тоа, чистите синтактички модели можеби не се ефикасни сами и мора да се користат во комбинација со други силни модели. За да ја проучуваме улогата на изборот на зборовите, ние ја извршуваме атрибутацијата со маскирање на сите зборови или специфични темски зборови кои одговараат на именици, дективи, адективи и анберби. Користејќи еднодомен датотек, IMDB1M рецензии, го демонстрираме тешкото влијание на заедничките именици и соодветните именици во припишувањето, со што се истакнува влијанието на темата. Користејќи компјутер на податоци на Cross-Domain Guardian10, покажуваме дека некои заеднички имена, декларации, асективи и анберби може да помогнат со стилометричната атрибутација, како што е демонстрирано со маскирање на темски зборови кои се совпаѓаат со овие делови на говорот. Како што се очекуваше, се забележа дека соодветните именици се многу влијани од содржината и\nКросдомен атрибут ќе има корист од целосно маскирање на нив.', 'ms': 'Atribusi penulis biasanya menggunakan semua maklumat yang mewakili kandungan dan gaya sementara atribut berdasarkan aspek stilistik sahaja boleh menjadi kuat dalam tetapan cross-domain. Kertas ini menganalisis aspek bahasa yang berbeza yang boleh membantu mewakili gaya. Specifically, we study the role of syntax and lexical words (nouns, verbs, adjectives and adverbs) in representing style.  Kami menggunakan model bahasa yang murni untuk mempelajari makna struktur kalimat dalam atribut domain tunggal dan cross-domain, iaitu atribut cross-topic dan cross-genre. Kami menunjukkan bahawa sintaks mungkin berguna untuk atribut genre salib sementara atribut topik salib dan domain tunggal mungkin berguna dari maklumat leksikal tambahan. Selain itu, model sintaktik murni mungkin tidak berkesan sendirian dan perlu digunakan dalam kombinasi dengan model yang kuat lain. Untuk mempelajari peran pilihan perkataan, kita melakukan atribut dengan menutup semua perkataan atau perkataan topik khusus yang sepadan dengan nama, verb, adjektif dan adverbs. Menggunakan set data-domain tunggal, ulasan IMDB1M, kami menunjukkan pengaruh berat nama umum dan nama yang betul dalam atribut, dengan demikian menyatakan gangguan topik. Menggunakan set data Guardian10 melintasi-domain, kami menunjukkan bahawa beberapa nama, verb, adjektif dan adverbs biasa mungkin membantu dengan atribut stilometrik seperti yang dipaparkan dengan menutup perkataan topik yang sepadan dengan bahagian-ucapan ini. Seperti yang dijangka, ia diperhatikan bahawa nama yang betul dipengaruhi oleh kandungan dan\ncross-domain attribution will benefit from completely masking them.', 'ml': 'അധികാരികത്തിന്റെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഉള്ളടക്കത്തിന്റെയും രീതിയിലെയും പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കുന്ന എല്ലാ വിവരങ്ങളും ഉപയ This paper analyzes different linguistic aspects that may help represent style.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d സിന്റാക്സിലും ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകളുടെയും പങ്കാളി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിനിട്ടാക്റ്റിക്ക് ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു ഡൊമൈനിലും ക്രിസ്റ്റര്\u200d ഡോമെയിനിലും വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രാധാന്യം പഠിക്കാന്\u200d  ക്രിസ്റ്റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒറ്റയ്ക്കുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും കൂടുതല്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും സിന്\u200d അതിനുശേഷം, ശുദ്ധ സിനിട്ടാക്കിക് മോഡലുകള്\u200d സ്വയം പ്രവർത്തികമാകുന്നില്ല. മറ്റു റോബോസ്റ്റ് മോഡലുകളോടൊപ് വാക്ക് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പങ്ക് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, എല്ലാ വാക്കുകളെയും വിശിഷ്ടമായ വാക്കുകളെയും മുഖം മൂടിക്കൊണ് ഒരു ഡോമെയിന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് IMDB1M നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് കാണിക്കുന്നു, സാധാരണ പുരുഷന്മാരുടെയും പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയ ക്രിസ്റ്റോമെന്\u200d ഗാര്\u200dഡിയന്\u200d10 ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റ് ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കാണിക്കുന്നു, കുറച്ച് സാധാരണ പാഠങ്ങള്\u200d, വാര്\u200dപ്പുകള്\u200d, കൂട്ടുകാര്\u200d, കൂട്ടുകാര്\u200d എന്നിവയുടെ വാക പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് പോലെ ശരിക്കുള്ള വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dക്കൊണ്ട് വലിയ പ്രഭാവിക്കുന്നു\nക്രിസ്റ്റോമെന്\u200d അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായും മുഖപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതില', 'it': "L'attribuzione dell'autore utilizza in genere tutte le informazioni che rappresentano sia il contenuto che lo stile, mentre l'attribuzione basata solo su aspetti stilistici può essere robusta nelle impostazioni cross-domain. Questo articolo analizza diversi aspetti linguistici che possono aiutare a rappresentare lo stile. Nello specifico, studiamo il ruolo della sintassi e delle parole lessicali (sostantivi, verbi, aggettivi e avverbi) nella rappresentazione dello stile. Usiamo un modello linguistico puramente sintattico per studiare il significato delle strutture di frase sia nell'attribuzione a dominio singolo che cross-domain, cioè nell'attribuzione cross-topic e cross-genre. Mostriamo che la sintassi può essere utile per l'attribuzione cross-genre, mentre l'attribuzione cross-topic e single-domain possono beneficiare di ulteriori informazioni lessicali. Inoltre, i modelli sintattici puri potrebbero non essere efficaci da soli e devono essere utilizzati in combinazione con altri modelli robusti. Per studiare il ruolo della scelta delle parole, eseguiamo l'attribuzione mascherando tutte le parole o parole specifiche corrispondenti a sostantivi, verbi, aggettivi e avverbi. Utilizzando un set di dati a dominio singolo, IMDB1M recensioni, dimostriamo la forte influenza dei sostantivi comuni e dei sostantivi propri nell'attribuzione, evidenziando così l'interferenza degli argomenti. Utilizzando il set di dati Guardian10 cross-domain, mostriamo che alcuni sostantivi, verbi, aggettivi e avverbi comuni possono aiutare con l'attribuzione stilometrica, come dimostrato mascherando parole topiche corrispondenti a queste parti del discorso. Come previsto, è stato osservato che i sostantivi propri sono fortemente influenzati dal contenuto e\nL'attribuzione cross-domain trarrà beneficio dal mascheramento completo.", 'kk': 'Авториялық бөлімі әдетте мазмұны мен стиліне негізделген барлық мәліметтерді қолданады, бірақ тек стилистикалық бөлімдерге негізделген бөлімі бірнеше доменнің параметрлерінде дұрыс бол Бұл қағаз басқа лингвистикалық аспекттерін анализиру, стилін көрсетуге көмектеседі. Сәйкес, біз синтаксис және лексикалық сөздер (атаулар, вертолар, бөлшектер және adverbs) рөлін стилінде зерттейміз. Біз сөздің құрылымының маңыздылығын бір доменге және бір доменге қарсы қатынау үшін толық синтактикалық тіл үлгісін қолданып, мысалы, көшек нақышты және көшек жанры қатынау үшін. Біз синтаксисі көп жанрлық бөліктерге көмектесетін болуы мүмкін екенін көрсетедік, бір-бір доменге қосымша лексикалық мәліметтерден пайдалы болуы мүмкін. Қосымша, таза синтактикалық үлгілер өзінің ішінде эффективті болмайды және басқа құпты үлгілерімен бірге қолдану керек. Сөзді таңдау рөлін зерттеу үшін, біз сөздерді немесе нақышты сөздерді қалқалап, әріптерді, адективтерді және адективтерге сәйкес келеді. Бір доменге деректер жинағын қолдану үшін IMDB1M бақылауын көрсетеді. Біз жалпы атаулар мен дұрыс атаулардың қатынасын көрсетедік, сондықтан тақырыптың интерфейсін бояулауын көрсетедік. Қосымша домендің Guardian10 деректер жиынын қолдану үшін, біз кейбір жалпы атаулар, вербалар, адективтер және адективтердің стилометриялық атауларын көрсетуге көмектеседі. Бұл сөздерге сәйкес келетін нақыштар сөздерін қалқала Күтпеген сияқты, дұрыс атаулар мазмұның көмегімен\nдоменге қарсы бөлімі оларды толық қалқалауға мүмкіндік береді.', 'no': 'Autorisasjonen brukar vanlegvis alle informasjonar som representerer både innhald og stil, mens attribusjon berre basert på stylistiske aspektar kan vera sterkt i kryssdomsetjingar. Denne papiret analyserer ulike lingviske aspektar som kan hjelpa til å representera stil. Spesielt studerer vi rolen på syntaks og leksiske ord (namn, verb, adjektiv og adverb) i representeringsstil. Vi bruker eit reint syntaksisk språk-modell for å studera uttrykket av setningsstrukturar i både enkeldomene og krysdomene-attribusjon, t.d. cross-topic og cross-genre attribusjon. Vi viser at syntaksen kan vera nyttig for cross-genre attribusjon mens kryss-temaattribusjon og enkeldomene kan bruka frå ekstra leksisk informasjon. Det er kanskje ikkje ein rein syntaktisk modell effektivt av seg selv og må brukast i kombinasjon med andre robust modeller. For å studera rolen på ordvalet, utfører vi attribusjon ved å maskera alle ord eller spesifikke emne ord som passar til namn, verbar, adjektiv og adverb. Bruk ein enkelt domenedataset, viser vi at IMDB1M gjennomgåver er vanskeleg påvirkning av vanlege namn og passande namn i attribusjon, slik at du markerer temainterfejsen. Bruk datasett for krysdomene Guardian10 viser vi at nokre vanlege namn, verbar, adjektiv og adverb kan hjelpa med stylometriske attribusjon som viste ved maskering av emne-ord som passar til desse taledelene. Som forventa, ble det observert at rette namn er sterkt påvirka av innhaldet og\ncross-domain attribution will benefit from completely masking them.', 'pl': 'Autorskie atrybucje zazwyczaj wykorzystują wszystkie informacje reprezentujące zarówno treść, jak i styl, natomiast atrybucja oparta wyłącznie na aspektach stylistycznych może być solidna w ustawieniach między domenami. Niniejszy artykuł analizuje różne aspekty językowe, które mogą pomóc reprezentować styl. W szczególności badamy rolę składni i słów leksykalnych (rzeczowniki, czasowniki, przymiotniki i przysłówki) w reprezentowaniu stylu. Wykorzystujemy czysto składniowy model językowy do badania znaczenia struktur zdań zarówno w atrybucji pojedynczej domeny, jak i między domenami, tj. atrybucji między tematami i między gatunkami. Pokazujemy, że składnia może być pomocna dla atrybucji między gatunkami, podczas gdy atrybucja między tematami i pojedyncza domena mogą korzystać z dodatkowych informacji leksykalnych. Ponadto czyste modele składni mogą nie być skuteczne same w sobie i muszą być stosowane w połączeniu z innymi solidnymi modelami. Aby zbadać rolę wyboru słów, wykonujemy atrybucję poprzez maskowanie wszystkich słów lub konkretnych słów tematycznych odpowiadających rzeczownikom, czasownikom, przymiotnikom i przysłówkom. Wykorzystując zestaw danych pojedynczej domeny, przeglądy IMDB1M, demonstrujemy duży wpływ rzeczowników wspólnych i rzeczowników właściwych na atrybucję, podkreślając tym samym interferencje tematyczne. Korzystając z zestawu danych Guardian10, pokazujemy, że niektóre rzeczowniki, czasowniki, przymiotniki i przysłówki mogą pomóc w atrybucji stylometrycznej, co pokazuje maskowanie słów tematycznych odpowiadających tym fragmentom mowy. Zgodnie z oczekiwaniami, zauważono, że rzeczowniki właściwe są silnie wpływane przez treść i\nAtrybucja między domenami skorzysta z całkowitego maskowania ich.', 'sr': 'Pritisak autoriteta obično koristi sve informacije koje predstavljaju sadržaj i stil, a pritisak zasnovan samo na stilističkim aspektima može biti jačan u postavkama preko domena. Ovaj papir analizira različite lingvističke aspekte koje mogu pomoći predstavljati stil. Posebno, proučavamo ulogu sintaksa i leksičkih reči (imena, verba, adjektivnih i reklama) u predstavljanju stila. Koristimo čisto sintaktički jezički model da proučimo značajnost struktura rečenica u jednoj domenu i pridruživanju krstog domena, tj. krstotemu i krstogenru. Pokazujemo da bi sintaksa mogla biti korisna za krstogensku atribuciju, dok bi privlačnost i jedinstvena domena mogla imati korist od dodatnih leksičkih informacija. Dalje, čisti sintaktički modeli možda ne mogu biti efikasni sami i moraju se koristiti u kombinaciji sa drugim robnim modelima. Da bi proučili ulogu izbora riječi, izvršili smo privlačnost maskiranjem svih riječi ili specifičnih temanih riječi koje odgovaraju imenima, verbima, adjektivama i reklamama. Koristeći set podataka u jednom domenu, preglede IMDB1M pokazujemo težak uticaj zajedničkih imena i odgovarajućih imena u privlačenju, tako oslanjujući interferenciju teme. Koristeći preko domena čuvara10 podataka, pokazujemo da neki zajednički imenovi, verbi, adjektivni i reklami mogu pomoći sa stilometrijskom atribucijom kao što je pokazalo maskiranjem temnih riječi koje odgovaraju ovim dijelovima govora. Kao što je očekivano, primijetilo se da su pravi imenovi teško utjecani na sadržaj i\nPritisak preko domena će koristiti od potpuno maskiranja njih.', 'mt': 'L-attribuzzjoni tal-awtur tipikament tuża l-informazzjoni kollha li tirrappreżenta kemm il-kontenut kif ukoll l-istil filwaqt li l-attribuzzjoni bbażata biss fuq aspetti stilistiċi tista’ tkun robusta f’ambjenti transdomestiċi. Dan id-dokument janalizza aspetti lingwistiċi differenti li jistgħu jgħinu jirrappreżentaw l-istil. Speċifikament, nistudjaw ir-rwol tas-sintaks u l-kliem lexiku (ismijiet, verbi, aġġettivi u avverbs) fir-rappreżentazzjoni tal-istil. Aħna nużaw mudell lingwistiku purament sintattiku biex nistudjaw is-sinifikat tal-istrutturi tas-sentenzi kemm fl-attribuzzjoni ta’ dominju wieħed kif ukoll f’dik ta’ dominju trasversali, jiġifieri l-attribuzzjoni cross-topic u cross-genre. We show that syntax may be helpful for cross-genre attribution while cross-topic attribution and single-domain may benefit from additional lexical information.  Barra minn hekk, mudelli sintetiċi puri jistgħu ma jkunux effettivi waħedhom u jeħtieġu jintużaw flimkien ma’ mudelli robusti oħra. Biex nistudjaw ir-rwol tal-għażla tal-kelma, nagħmlu l-attribuzzjoni billi naskrivu l-kelmiet kollha jew il-kelmiet tematiċi speċifiċi li jikkorrispondu għal ismijiet, verbs, aġġettivi u avverbs. Using a single-domain dataset, IMDB1M reviews, we demonstrate the heavy influence of common nouns and proper nouns in attribution, thereby highlighting topic interference.  Bl-użu ta’ sett ta’ dejta ta’ Guardian10 transdomestiku, nagħmlu evidenza li xi nomi, verbi, aġġettivi u avverbs komuni jistgħu jgħinu fl-attribuzzjoni stilometrika kif muri bl-għassa ta’ kliem suġġettiku li jikkorrispondi għal dawn il-partijiet ta’ diskors. Kif mistenni, ġie osservat li l-ismijiet xierqa huma influwenzati ħafna mill-kontenut u\nl-attribuzzjoni bejn id-dominji se tibbenefika mill-għassa kompleta tagħhom.', 'mn': 'Шинэ зохиолын шалтгаан нь бүх мэдээллийг хэрэглэдэг. Гэхдээ зөвхөн стилист хэлбэрээр үндсэн шалтгаан нь олон хэлбэрээр хүчтэй байж болно. Энэ цаас хэлний хэлний хэлбэрүүдийг дүрслэхэд тусалж чадна. Ялангуяа бид синтаксис, лексик үг (нэр, үг, adjectives, adverbs) хэлбэрээр дүрслэх үүрэг судлаж байна. Бид зүгээр л нэг хэлбэрийн болон олон хэлбэрийн харилцааны чухал ач холбогдолтыг судлахад цэвэрхэн синтактик хэл загварыг ашигладаг. Бид синтаксис олон төрлийн асуудлын тусламжтай байж магадгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Гэхдээ олон сэдвийн асуудлын тусламжтайгаар, нэг зохиолын тусламжтайгаар нэмэлт хэлний мэдээллээс ашиг ав Дараа нь цэвэр синтактик загварууд өөрсдөө үр дүнтэй байж болохгүй байж болох ба бусад хүчтэй загваруудтай холбогдох хэрэгтэй байж болох юм. Үүний сонголтын үүрэг судлах үед бид бүх үг эсвэл тодорхой сэдэв үгсийг нэр, үг, тусламжтай, адал явдалтай харьцуулж, харилцаа хийдэг. Нэг холбоотой өгөгдлийн санг ашиглан, IMDB1M шинжилгээ үзүүлэхэд бид нийтлэг нэр, зөвхөн нэр нэрлэгчдийн нөлөө үзүүлдэг. Энэ нь сэдвийн нөлөөлөлийг тодорхойлдог. Зарим нэг нэр, үг, жишээлүүд, адабор, стилометрийн харилцааны тусламжтай туслах боломжтой гэдгийг бид харуулж байна. Таамаглаж байгаачлан, зөв нэр нь бүтээгдэхүүнээс хүнд нөлөөлдөг ба\nтэднийг бүрэн дүрслэхээс ашигтай болно.', 'so': 'Xuquuqsadu wuxuu sida caadiga ah u isticmaalaa macluumaad kasta oo ka mid ah wax ku saabsan waxyaabaha ku jira iyo qaababka, sababtoo ah xuquuqda waxaa laga yaabaa in lagu tuuraa goobaha kordhinta. Qoraalkan wuxuu ku sawiraa dhinaca luuqadaha kala duduwan oo caawimaad u yeelan kara qaababka. Si gaar ah, waxaynu ku baranaynaa qayb ku saabsan hadalka kaalmada iyo lexicka (noocyada, verbs, juriska iyo ganacsiga). Tusaale ahaan oo kaliya ayaan u isticmaalnaa muusikada luuqada e e isku-hoosaysiinta si aan u barano muhiimka dhismaha xukunka ee hal-domen iyo iskuulka-gudaha ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa in cashuurta ay caawimaad u tahay in lagu sameynayo sameynta jinsiga, marka lagu sameynayo macluumaad dheeraad ah oo la xiriira arimaha kala duduwan iyo wadanka kaliya. Sidoo kale waxaa suurtogal ah in tusaalooyin daahir ah ay tayo u yeelan karaan oo ay u baahan yihiin in la isticmaalo tusaalooyin kale oo roboti ah. Si aan u barano qaybta doorashada hadalka, waxaynu sameynaa qaabilaad ku qoran hadal oo dhan ama hadal gaar ah oo u eg cuntada, warqadaha, isbedelka iyo ganacsiga. Si aan u isticmaalno baaritaanka macluumaadka oo kaliya ee IMDB1M, waxaynu muujinnaa saameyn culus oo ku saabsan cuntada caadiga ah iyo cuntada saxda ah, markaasna waxaynu ku cadaynaynaa iskujoorida mada. Sida lagu isticmaalayo macluumaadka xafiiska gaarka ah 10, waxaynu tusnaynaa in qaar ka mid ah noocyo caadi ah, hadal caadi ah, iskudarka iyo ganacsiga ayaa caawinaya sida loo muujiyey macluumaad ku qorayo hadalladan oo u eg qaybahan hadalka. Sida la filan yahay waxaa la arkay in cuntada sax ah ay ku saameyaan waxyaabaha ku jira iyo\nDib-qaadashada guriga ayaa faa’iido u yeelan kara dhamaantood.', 'sv': 'Författarattribution använder vanligtvis all information som representerar både innehåll och stil, medan attribution baserad endast på stilistiska aspekter kan vara robust i gränsöverskridande inställningar. Denna uppsats analyserar olika språkliga aspekter som kan hjälpa till att representera stil. Specifikt studerar vi syntax och lexikala ord (substantiv, verb, adjektiv och adverb) roll för att representera stil. Vi använder oss av en rent syntaktisk språkmodell för att studera betydelsen av meningsstrukturer i både enkeldomäns- och domänöverskridande attribution, dvs tvärämnesöverskridande och genreröverskridande attribution. Vi visar att syntax kan vara till hjälp för genreröverskridande attribution medan ämnesöverskridande attribution och enkeldomän kan dra nytta av ytterligare lexikal information. Dessutom är rena syntaktiska modeller kanske inte effektiva av sig själva och behöver användas i kombination med andra robusta modeller. För att studera rollen av ordval utför vi attribution genom att maskera alla ord eller specifika ämnesord som motsvarar substantiv, verb, adjektiv och adverb. Med hjälp av en enda domän datauppsättning, IMDB1M granskningar, visar vi den stora påverkan av vanliga substantiv och egensubstantiv i attribution, vilket belyser ämnesinterferens. Med hjälp av Guardian10-dataset över domäner visar vi att vissa vanliga substantiv, verb, adjektiv och adverb kan hjälpa till med stylometrisk attribution, vilket visas genom att maskera ämnesord som motsvarar dessa delar av tal. Som förväntat observerades att egensubstantiv påverkas starkt av innehåll och\nallokering över domäner kommer att gynnas av att helt maskera dem.', 'ta': 'ஆசிரியர் பங்கீட்டு வழங்குதல் வழக்கமாக உள்ளடக்கத்தையும் பாணியையும் குறிப்பிடும் அனைத்து தகவலையும் பயன்படுத்துகிறது ஆனால் ப இந்த தாள் வேறு மொழிகளின் விளைவுகளை ஆராய்க்கிறது பாணியை குறிக்க உதவும். குறிப்பிட்ட பாணியில் நாம் ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் லெக்சிக்சியல் வார்த்தைகளின் பங்கை கற்றுக்கொள்கிறோம். நாம் ஒரு ஒற்றைகளம் மற்றும் குறுக்கும் களஞ்சியத்தில் வாக்கு உருவமைப்புகளின் முக்கியத்தை படிக்க ஒரு ஒத்திசைக்க மொழி மாதிரி பயன்படுத்துகி நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் குறிப்பு தலைப்புகள் மற்றும் ஒற்றையதளத்தில் கூடுதல் லெக்சிக்சியல் தகவலிலிருந்து கூடுதல் உதவியாக மேலும், சுத்தமான ஒத்திசைவு மாதிரிகள் தன்னால் பயன்படுத்த இயலாது மற்றும் மற்ற ரோப்ட் மாதிரிகளுடன் பயன்படுத்த வேண் To study the role of word choice, we perform attribution by masking all words or specific topic words corresponding to nouns, verbs, adjectives and adverbs.  ஒரே டோமைன் தரவுத்தளத்தைப் பயன்படுத்தி, IMDB1M முன்னோட்டம், பொதுவான புள்ளிகள் மற்றும் சரியான உணவுகளின் கடுமையான விளைவுகளை காட்டுகிறது, அதனால 10 தரவுத்தளத்தை பயன்படுத்தி காப்பாற்றுகிறது, சில பொதுவான உணவு, வார்த்தைகள், இணைப்புகள் மற்றும் வியாபாரத்திற்கு முறைமையான பங்கீட்டை மூடும் பொருத்து எதிர்பார்த்தது போல, சரியான உணவுகள் உள்ளடக்கத்தால் பாதிக்கப்பட்டது\nமுழுமையாக மூடுவதிலிருந்து அவர்களுக்கு உதவும்.', 'si': 'නියෝජිතය සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම සාමාන්\u200dයය සහ විස්තාරය සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dයය සඳහා සංවිධානය සඳහා සංවිධානය භාවිත කරනවා නම මේ පැත්තේ වෙනස් භාෂාවික විශ්ලේෂණය කරනවා ඒ වගේම විශේෂ විදිහට උදව් කරනවා. විශේෂයෙන්ම, අපි වාක්ෂාව සහ ලෙක්සිකල් වචන (නම්, වාක්ෂාව, අයික්ටිව් සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය) වලට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරන්න අපි සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම භාෂා මොඩේලයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විධානය සහ ක්\u200dරිස් ඩොමේන් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණය ස අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කියලා වාක්ෂාව ක්\u200dරිස්ජෙන්ර් සැකසුම් සඳහා වාක්ෂාව සමහර විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙ ඉතින්, සුදුසු සංකේතික මොඩල් ඔවුන්ගෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න බැරි වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙන්නේ  වචන තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරතිදේශය අධික්\u200dරීය කරන්න, අපි හැම වචන සහ විශේෂ විදේශ වචන සම්බන්ධ විදිහට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිදේ එකක් ඩොමේන් දත්ත සූදානයක් භාවිත කරන්න, IMDB1M පරීක්ෂණයක්, අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා සාමාන්\u200dය නාමය සහ හැකි නාමය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ඒ න Cross-domain Guardian10 දත්ත සැට භාවිත කරන්න, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ සාමාන්\u200dය නම්, වාර්තාවක්, සම්පූර්ණය සහ වාර්තාවක්, ස්ටිලෝමීට්\u200dරික විශේෂය සමග උදව් කරන්න පුළ බලාපොරොත්තු විදිහට, ඒක බලාපොරොත්තු කරලා තියෙන්නේ නියමයි නම් සාමාන්\u200dය වලින් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ\nප්\u200dරමාණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ඔවුන්ව සම්පූර්ණයෙන් මුහුණු කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙයි.', 'ur': 'لکھنے کی تعریف معمولی طور پر تمام معلومات کا استعمال کرتا ہے جو منزل اور استیل کی تعریف کرتی ہیں، حالانکہ صرف استیلیسٹی الگوں پر بنیاد رکھتی ہے، کرس ڈومین کے سامنے مضبوط ہو سکتی ہے. یہ کاغذ مختلف زبان انحصار کا تحلیل کرتا ہے جو استیل کی تعریف کرسکتی ہے۔ خاص طور پر، ہم سینٹکس اور لکسیکل کلمات کے رول (نام، کلمات، اضافہ اور اضافہ) کو استیل میں پڑھتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک دامین اور کرس دامین کی تعریف کے مطابق فیصلہ ساختار کی تعریف کے لئے صرف سینٹکتیک زبان کی موڈل استعمال کرتے ہیں، یعنی کرس-ٹیپ اور کرس-جنر تعریف کے لئے۔ ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ سینٹکس کرس ژنر کی تعریف کے لئے مددگار ہو سکتا ہے حالانکہ کرس-ٹوپ کی تعریف اور single-domain اضافہ لکھی معلومات سے فائدہ دے سکتے ہیں. اور اس کے بعد، پاک سینٹکتیک موڈل خود اپنا فائدہ نہیں ہوسکتے اور دوسرے طاقتور موڈل کے ساتھ استعمال کیا جائے گا۔ کلمات انتخاب کے رول کی تعلیم کرنے کے لئے، ہم تمام کلمات یا مخصوص موضوع کے کلمات کو ماسک کر رہے ہیں جو نام, کلمات، اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپن ایک ڈومین ڈیٹ سٹ کے استعمال سے IMDB1M روشن کرتا ہے، ہم مشترک ناموں اور مناسب ناموں کی سخت اثرات دکھاتے ہیں، اس کے ذریعے ٹومین اثرات کو ہیلایت کرتا ہے. کرس ڈومین گارڈن 10 ڈاٹ سٹ کے استعمال سے ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ کچھ عام نام، ویربز، اضافہ اور اضافہ استیلومیٹریک تعریف کے ساتھ مدد کرسکتے ہیں جس طرح دکھائے جاتے ہیں ان ٹومیٹ کلمات کے مطابق ان قسموں کے مطابق موجود ہیں. جس طرح انتظار کی گئی تھی، سمجھ لیا گیا تھا کہ ٹھیک نوم اٹھائے جاتے ہیں\nکروٹ ڈمین کی تعریف ان کو پورے پورے ماسک سے فائدہ دے گی۔', 'ro': 'Atribuirea autorului utilizează de obicei toate informațiile care reprezintă atât conținutul, cât și stilul, în timp ce atribuirea bazată numai pe aspecte stilistice poate fi robustă în setările cross-domeniu. Această lucrare analizează diferite aspecte lingvistice care pot ajuta la reprezentarea stilului. În mod specific, studiem rolul sintaxei și cuvintelor lexicale (substantive, verbe, adjective și adverbe) în reprezentarea stilului. Folosim un model pur sintactic de limbaj pentru a studia semnificația structurilor propozițiilor atât în atribuirea pe un singur domeniu, cât și în atribuirea cross-topic și cross-gen. Arătăm că sintaxa poate fi utilă pentru atribuirea cross-gen, în timp ce atribuirea cross-topic și single-domeniu pot beneficia de informații lexicale suplimentare. În plus, modelele sintactice pure pot să nu fie eficiente de la sine și trebuie utilizate în combinație cu alte modele robuste. Pentru a studia rolul alegerii cuvintelor, efectuăm atribuirea mascând toate cuvintele sau cuvintele tematice specifice corespunzătoare substantivelor, verbelor, adjectivelor și adverbelor. Folosind un set de date cu un singur domeniu, recenziile IMDB1M, demonstrăm influența puternică a substantivelor comune și a substantivelor proprii în atribuire, evidențiind astfel interferența subiectelor. Folosind setul de date Guardian10 cross-domain, arătăm că unele substantive comune, verbe, adjective și adverbe pot ajuta la atribuirea stilometrică, așa cum demonstrează mascarea cuvintelor subiectului corespunzător acestor părți de vorbire. După cum era de așteptat, s-a observat că substantivele proprii sunt puternic influențate de conținut și\nAtribuirea între domenii va beneficia de mascarea completă a acestora.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Bu qogʻoz uslubni tahrirlash uchun boshqa lingvistik aspektlarini analyzer. Ko'rsatilgan, biz uslubni represent qilish uchun syntax va leksikal so'zlar (nuqta, verbs, adjektiv va tadbirkorlar) ning rolini o'rganamiz. Biz bitta domen va cross-domen tahrirlarining muhimligini o'rganish uchun bir tentactik tili modeldan foydalanamiz, balki cross-topik va cross-genre attribution. We show that syntax may be helpful for cross-genre attribution while cross-topic attribution and single-domain may benefit from additional lexical information.  Ko'rsatilgan, pure syntactik modellari o'z bilan ishlashi mumkin va boshqa robot modellari bilan birlashtirish kerak. so'z tanlash orqali o'rganish uchun biz hamma so'zlarni ko'zlashimiz mumkin, soʻzlar, adjektivlar va taxminan so'zlarni qo'yish mumkin. Biz bir domen maʼlumotlar tizimidan foydalanib, IMDB1M taʼminlovchilarini ko'rsatamiz, biz oddiy narsalarning ko'paytirish uchun umumiy nuqta va haqiqiqiy narsalarning juda katta ishlatishni ko'rsatdik. Bu bilan mavzu interference'ini ko'rsatish. 10 maʼlumot bazasini ishlatish uchun biz bir necha umumiy nuqta, verb, adjektiv va ishlab chiqaruvchilar yordamida yordam beramiz. Ushbu gapirish qismlariga mos keladigan mavzu soʻzlarni ko'rsatish mumkin. Va kutilgan paytda, ma'lum narsa juda qiziqarli narsalar tarkibi va\njuda qo'shish qobiliyati butunlay qo'yishga yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Tác quyền của tác giả thường sử dụng mọi thông tin đại diện cho cả nội dung và phong cách, trong khi thuật toán chỉ dựa trên các khía cạnh thiết kế có thể vững chắc trong nội thất. Tờ giấy này phân tích các khía cạnh ngôn ngữ khác nhau có thể tượng trưng phong cách. Cụ thể, chúng tôi nghiên cứu vai trò của từ ngữ và pháp (danh từ, động từ, tính từ và phó) theo cách đại diện cho phong cách. Chúng tôi sử dụng một mô hình ngôn ngữ cấu hình cấu trúc từ đi ển để nghiên cứu ý nghĩa của cấu trúc câu ở cả miền đơn và ngang miền, tức là thuật ngữ chéo và lai giống. Chúng tôi cho thấy cú pháp có thể hữu ích cho việc gán ghép đa thể, trong khi gán vào chủ đề khác nhau và một miền có thể được lợi dụng thông tin ngôn ngữ khác. Các mô hình cấu tạo cú pháp thuần túy có thể không tự hiệu quả và cần được dùng cùng với các mô hình vững chắc khác. Để nghiên cứu vai trò lựa chọn từ, chúng tôi thực hiện thuật to án bằng cách che đậy mọi từ hay các từ ngữ cụ thể tương ứng với danh từ, động từ, tính từ và Phó từ. Sử dụng một tập tin riêng miền, đánh giá định dạng MIME, chúng tôi chứng minh sự ảnh hưởng nặng nề của danh từ thường và danh từ thích hợp trong việc phân biệt, bằng cách nhấn mạnh sự can thiệp chủ đề. Sử dụng dữ liệu Hộ Vệ Thập miền, chúng tôi cho thấy rằng một số danh từ, động từ, tính từ và phó từ thường có thể giúp việc phân biệt kiểu lotam giác như được chứng minh bằng cách che dấu các từ ngữ đối tượng này. Theo dự kiến, được quan sát rằng các danh từ thích hợp bị ảnh hưởng nặng nề bởi nội dung và\nGiao tài ngang miền sẽ có lợi khi che chúng hoàn toàn.', 'bg': 'Приписването на междудомейни ще се възползва от пълното им маскиране.', 'nl': 'cross-domein attributie zal baat hebben bij het volledig maskeren ervan.', 'hr': 'privlačenje preko domena će koristiti od potpuno maskiranja njih.', 'de': 'Die domänenübergreifende Attribution wird von einer vollständigen Maskierung profitieren.', 'da': 'Tildeling på tværs af domæner vil drage fordel af fuldstændig maskering af dem.', 'ko': '전역 귀인은 그것들을 완전히 덮는 데 도움이 될 것이다.', 'fa': 'تعریف دامنه\u200cهای مختلف از کامل ماسک کردن آنها سود می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'geçiş alan bir özelliği, onları tamamen maskelendirmekten faydalanacak.', 'sw': 'Kujitambuliana kwa mipaka itanufaisha kuwavaa.', 'af': 'kruisdomein-ooreenkoms sal voordeel van hulle volledig maskering.', 'am': 'የድምፅ ግጭት መቆጣጠር ሙሉ ትጠቅማቸዋለች፡፡', 'az': '√ßoxlu domena t…ôsiri onlarƒ± tamamlamaqdan fayda ver…ôc…ôk.', 'bn': 'ক্রাস্ট ডোমেইনের প্রতিযোগিতা তাদের পুরোপুরি মুখোশ করা থেকে সুবিধা পাবে।', 'id': 'atribut cross-domain akan berguna dari penutup mereka.', 'sq': 'atribucioni cross-domain do të përfitojë nga maskimi i plotë i tyre.', 'hy': 'շրջակա տիեզերքի առանձնահատկությունը կօգտագործի դրանց ամբողջովին ծածկելը:', 'cs': 'Atribuce mezi doménami bude mít prospěch z jejich úplného maskování.', 'et': 'Valdkondadevaheline omistamine saab kasu nende täielikust varjamisest.', 'fi': 'verkkotunnusten välinen attribuutio hyötyy siitä, että ne peitetään kokonaan.', 'ca': "l'atribució transdomínica es beneficiarà d'amagar-los completament.", 'bs': 'Pritisak preko domena će koristiti od potpuno maskiranja njih.', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar Pesene iki dipunasi langkung sampeyan anyar neng sampeyan ingkang dipunangé nggambar styl user profileSpanish We use a purly textactive language model to read the Signance of Sentencils structural in all single-domain and inter-domain attribution, i.e. inter-tema and inter-genve attribution. http://www.example.com We show that Sentencils can be help for intergenve attribution when inter-tema attribution and single-domain can help from additional lectucal information. Daerah-asai, model sing ditambah sing ora bisa nguasai efes karo hal-hal dadi sing bisa ditambah karo model sing wis ana. Mbok pisan kelas pawaran Using a single Using krus-domain Guardan10 dataset, we show that some Common Nuts, verbs, Adectivers and Advrbs can help with stylometric attribution as displayed by Masking Subject words conflicting to this parts-of-language. Sugeng-awakdhéwé, dino sing ngerasakno iki dadi kapan-kapan ngono nganggep barang\ntext-box-mode', 'sk': 'Pripisovanje avtorstva običajno uporablja vse informacije, ki predstavljajo vsebino in slog, medtem ko je pripisovanje, ki temelji samo na slogovnih vidikih, lahko robustno v nastavitvah med domenami. V prispevku so analizirani različni jezikovni vidiki, ki lahko pomagajo predstavljati slog. Natančneje preučujemo vlogo sintakse in leksikalnih besed (samostalniki, glagoli, pridevniki in adverbi) pri predstavljanju sloga. Uporabljamo popolnoma sintaktični jezikovni model za proučevanje pomena stavkovnih struktur pri enodomenskem in meddomenskem pripisovanju, tj. medtematskem in medžanrskem pripisovanju. Pokazali smo, da je sintaksa lahko koristna pri medžanrskem pripisovanju, medtem ko lahko medtematsko pripisovanje in eno domeno koristi od dodatnih leksikalnih informacij. Poleg tega čisti sintaktični modeli sami po sebi morda niso učinkoviti in jih je treba uporabljati v kombinaciji z drugimi robustnimi modeli. Za preučevanje vloge izbire besed izvajamo pripisovanje tako, da prikrijemo vse besede ali določene tematske besede, ki ustrezajo samostalnikom, glagolom, pridevnikom in priložkom. Z uporabo enodomenskega nabora podatkov IMDB1M prikazujemo močan vpliv skupnih samostalnikov in ustreznih samostalnikov pri pripisovanju, s čimer poudarjamo motnje teme. Z uporabo meddomenskega nabora podatkov Guardian10 smo pokazali, da lahko nekateri skupni samostalniki, glagoli, pridevniki in priložniki pomagajo pri stilometričnem pripisovanju, kar je dokazano s prikrivanjem tematskih besed, ki ustrezajo tem delom govora. Kot je bilo pričakovano, je bilo ugotovljeno, da na ustrezne samostalnike močno vplivajo vsebina in\nPripisovanje meddomenskih področij bo koristilo, če jih popolnoma zakrije.', 'he': 'תואר האוטוריות משתמש בדרך כלל בכל מידע המייצג גם תוכן וגם סגנון בזמן שהתואר המבוסס רק על היבטים הסטיליסטיים יכול להיות חזק במסדרות בין שטחים. הנייר הזה מנתח אפקטים שפתיים שונים שיכולים לעזור לייצג סגנון. במיוחד, אנחנו לומדים את התפקיד של סינטקס ומילים לקסיות (שם, verbs, adjectives and adverbs) באמצעות סגנון מייצג. אנו משתמשים במודל שפה טהור סינטקטי כדי ללמוד את המשמעות של מבני משפטים בשל פיקוד דומין יחיד ושל דומין, כלומר פיקוד נושא צלב וגנרס צלב. אנחנו מראים שהסינטקס עשוי להיות מועיל עבור התייחסות בין גנרל, בעוד התייחסות בין נושאים ויש תועלת מידע לקסיקלי נוסף. Further, pure syntactic models may not be effective by themselves and need to be used in combination with other robust models.  כדי ללמוד את תפקיד הבחירה במילים, אנו מבצעים מחויפות על ידי מסיכה של כל המילים או מילים נושאיות מסוימות מתאימות לשמות, כפתולים, אדיקטיבים ופרסמים. באמצעות קבוצת נתונים של שטח אחד, ביקורות IMDB1M, אנו מראים את השפעה כבדה של שמות משותפים ושמות מתאימים בתפיסה, ובכך מזכירים את ההפרעה בנושא. באמצעות קבוצת נתונים של Guardian10 מעבר לתחום, אנו מראים שמות משותפים, אלברים, אדיקטיבים ופרסומים יכולים לעזור עם התייחסות סטילומטרית כפי שהוכיחה על ידי מסיכת מילים נושאיות מתאימות לחלקי הנאום האלה. כפי שציפיתי, נצפה שמות נכונות משפיעות בכבד על ידי התוכן\nהתייחסות מעבר לתחום תהיה מועילה מלהסתיר אותם לחלוטין.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Wannan takardan na yi anayyani ga masu cikin linguistic da za'a iya ƙara wa sharrin. A ƙayyade, munã karatun rolin misalin kodi da maganar leki (nau'i, verbs, juyi da masu shawara). Tuna amfani da wani misali na harshe-na'ura dõmin mu karanta muhimu na matsayin ayuka cikin shirin ayuka guda da tsohon-domin, misali, sarki-topin da ake yi ta sarrafa-genre. Tuna nũna cewa sunanta mai amfani da fassarar-genre a lokacin da sarautar-topic da shekara ta yi amfani da ko ƙaranci tsarin leksisi. Furan, misãlai masu tsari na syntactic ya kamata ta yin amfani da kansu kuma ana bukãta a yi amfani da su koma da misãlai masu abubuwa. Ko karatun rabon maganar, za mu yi amfani da baka rufe duk maganar ko wasu magana masu ƙayyade da daidai da nau'i, verbs, juyi da mataimaki. Yi amfani da tsarin danne-danne guda, IMDB1M, za mu nuna matsayin mai nauyi wa matsayin daɗabi'a da kuma ma'abun daidai a cikin taɓa, sai ka nuna interfekt ga madaidaici. Using cross-domain Guardian10 dataset, we show that some common nouns, verbs, adjectives and adverbs may help with stylometric attribution as demonstrated by masking topic words corresponding to these parts-of-speech.  Kama da ake ƙayyade, an gane cewa madaidaici za su yi girma an yi amfani da abin da ke cikin\nKowane harassment bã zai amfãne su ba.", 'bo': 'Authorship attribution typically uses all information representing both content and style whereas attribution based only on stylistic aspects may be robust in cross-domain settings. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ཆ་ཤས་འདྲ་བའི་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་རྩོམ་འབྲི་པ་དེ་ཚོར་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We use a purely syntactic language model to study the significance of sentence structures in both single-domain and cross-domain attribution, i.e. cross-topic and cross-genre attribution. Examples: We show that syntax may be helpful for cross-genre attribution while cross-topic attribution and single-domain may benefit from additional lexical information. ལས་ཀྱང་། དབུས་བྱ་ཚིག་གཙང་དག་གི་མིག ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་ཀྱི་གདམ་ཀ་ལས་གནད་དོན་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་བཏང་ན་ཡི་གེ་དང་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་སྣང་དང་། བྱ་ཚིག་ཚིག་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་ཁ Using a single-domain dataset, IMDB1M reviews, we demonstrate the heavy influence of common nouns and proper nouns in attribution, thereby highlighting topic interference. Using cross-domain Guardian10 dataset, we show that some common nouns, verbs, adjectives and adverbs may help with stylometric attribution as demonstrated by masking topic words corresponding to these parts-of-speech. རེ་འདོད་པ་དང་། སྔོན་ལྟར་དུས་རབས་པའི་ཆོས་ཉིད་དེ་ནང་དུས་ཡོད་པ་དང་།\ncross-domain attribution will benefit from completely masking them.'}
{'en': 'Model-Free Context-Aware Word Composition', 'ar': 'نموذج خالية من السياق تكوين كلمة', 'pt': 'Composição de palavras sensível ao contexto sem modelo', 'es': 'Composición de palabras sensible al contexto sin modelos', 'fr': 'Composition de mots contextuelle sans modèle', 'hi': 'मॉडल-मुक्त संदर्भ-जागरूक शब्द रचना', 'ja': 'モデルフリーのコンテキストを意識した単語の構成', 'zh': '无模上下文感之单词合', 'ru': 'Контекстно-зависимая композиция слов без модели', 'ga': 'Comhthéacs Múnla-Saor in Aisce-Comhdhéanamh Focal Feasach', 'ka': 'მოდელ- ბირადი კონტექსტის შეცდომა სიტყვას', 'hu': 'Modellmentes kontextustudatos szóösszetétel', 'it': 'Composizione delle parole senza contesto', 'kk': 'Үлгі бос контексті- түсінікті сөзді құру', 'lt': 'Be modelio sąmoningas žodžių sudėtis', 'mk': 'Композиција на зборови без модел', 'ms': 'Model-Free Context-Aware Word Composition', 'el': 'Σύνθεση λέξης χωρίς μοντέλο με επίγνωση του πλαισίου', 'mt': 'Kompożizzjoni tal-kliem mingħajr il-Kuntest Mingħajr Mudell', 'ml': 'മോഡല്\u200d- സ്വതന്ത്രമായ ഉള്ളിലുള്ള വാക്ക് കോപ്പോഷന്\u200d', 'pl': 'Kompozycja słowa bez modelu kontekstu', 'sr': 'Komposicija reči bez modela', 'ro': 'Compoziție de cuvinte conștientă de context fără model', 'si': 'නිදහස් සම්බන්ධ වචන සම්බන්ධය', 'no': 'Komposisjon av ord frå modell frå kontekst- vekk', 'mn': 'Загвар-үнэгүй контекст-Aware Word Composition', 'so': 'Model-Free Context-Aware Word Composition', 'sv': 'Modellfri sammanhangsberoende ordsammansättning', 'ta': 'மாதிரி- சுலபமான உள்ளடக்கம்- அறிவிக்கப்பட்ட வார்த்தை கூறுதல்', 'ur': 'Model-Free Context-Aware Word Composition', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Sự kết hợp chữ viết tự do', 'bg': 'Текстов състав без модел', 'da': 'Modelfri sammenhængsbevidst ordsammensætning', 'nl': 'Modelvrije contextbewuste woordsamenstelling', 'de': 'Modellfreie kontextbasierte Wortzusammensetzung', 'id': 'Komposisi Kata Bebas Konteks-Awas Model', 'hr': 'Složenje riječi bez modela', 'ko': '무모형 상하문 감지 구사', 'fa': 'ترکیب کلمه\u200cهای آگاهی آگاهی مدل آزاد', 'sw': 'Composition', 'tr': '_Mazmunlar', 'af': 'Model- Vry Konteks- Aware Woord Komposisie', 'sq': 'Kompozita e fjalëve pa model', 'hy': 'Մոդելի ազատ կոնտեքստ գիտակցած բառերի կառուցվածք', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Komposicija riječi bez modela', 'az': 'Model-free Context-Aware Word Composition', 'bn': 'Name', 'ca': 'Composició de paraules conscients del context sense model', 'cs': 'Složení slova bez modelů bez kontextu', 'fi': 'Malliton kontekstitietoinen sanakoostumus', 'et': 'Mudelivaba kontekstiteadlik sõna koostis', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Sestava besed brez modela, ozaveščena o kontekstu', 'he': 'Model-Free Context-Aware Word Composition', 'bo': 'Model-Free Context-Aware Word Composition'}
{'en': 'Word composition is a promising technique for representation learning of large linguistic units (e.g., phrases, sentences and documents). However, most of the current composition models do not take the ambiguity of words and the context outside of a linguistic unit into consideration for learning representations, and consequently suffer from the inaccurate representation of semantics. To address this issue, we propose a model-free context-aware word composition model, which employs the latent semantic information as global context for learning representations. The proposed model attempts to resolve the word sense disambiguation and word composition in a unified framework. Extensive evaluation shows consistent improvements over various strong word representation / composition models at different granularities (including word, phrase and sentence), demonstrating the effectiveness of our proposed method.', 'ar': 'يعد تكوين الكلمات أسلوبًا واعدًا لتعلم التمثيل للوحدات اللغوية الكبيرة (مثل العبارات والجمل والمستندات). ومع ذلك ، فإن معظم نماذج التكوين الحالية لا تأخذ غموض الكلمات والسياق خارج الوحدة اللغوية في الاعتبار لتمثيلات التعلم ، وبالتالي تعاني من التمثيل غير الدقيق للدلالات. لمعالجة هذه المشكلة ، نقترح نموذج تكوين كلمات خالٍ من السياق ، والذي يستخدم المعلومات الدلالية الكامنة كسياق عالمي لتمثيلات التعلم. يحاول النموذج المقترح حل مشكلة توضيح معنى الكلمة وتكوين الكلمات في إطار موحد. يُظهر التقييم الشامل تحسينات متسقة على نماذج تمثيل / تكوين كلمات قوية مختلفة بدقة مختلفة (بما في ذلك الكلمة والعبارة والجمل) ، مما يدل على فعالية طريقتنا المقترحة.', 'fr': "La composition de mots est une technique prometteuse pour l'apprentissage de la représentation de grandes unités linguistiques (phrases, phrases et documents, par exemple). Cependant, la plupart des modèles de composition actuels ne tiennent pas compte de l'ambiguïté des mots et du contexte en dehors d'une unité linguistique pour les représentations d'apprentissage, et souffrent donc d'une représentation imprécise de la sémantique. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un modèle de composition de mots sensible au contexte sans modèle, qui utilise les informations sémantiques latentes comme contexte global pour l'apprentissage des représentations. Le modèle proposé tente de résoudre la désambiguïsation et la composition des mots dans un cadre unifié. Une évaluation approfondie montre des améliorations constantes par rapport à divers modèles de représentation/composition de mots forts à différentes granularités (y compris le mot, la phrase et la phrase), démontrant ainsi l'efficacité de la méthode que nous proposons.", 'pt': 'A composição de palavras é uma técnica promissora para o aprendizado de representação de grandes unidades linguísticas (por exemplo, frases, sentenças e documentos). No entanto, a maioria dos modelos de composição atuais não levam em consideração a ambiguidade das palavras e o contexto fora de uma unidade linguística para a aprendizagem de representações e, consequentemente, sofrem com a representação imprecisa da semântica. Para resolver este problema, propomos um modelo de composição de palavras sensível ao contexto livre de modelo, que emprega a informação semântica latente como contexto global para representações de aprendizagem. O modelo proposto tenta resolver a desambiguação do sentido da palavra e a composição da palavra em uma estrutura unificada. A avaliação extensiva mostra melhorias consistentes em vários modelos de representação/composição de palavras fortes em diferentes granularidades (incluindo palavra, frase e sentença), demonstrando a eficácia do nosso método proposto.', 'es': 'La composición de palabras es una técnica prometedora para el aprendizaje de la representación de grandes unidades lingüísticas (por ejemplo, frases, oraciones y documentos). Sin embargo, la mayoría de los modelos de composición actuales no tienen en cuenta la ambigüedad de las palabras y el contexto fuera de una unidad lingüística para aprender representaciones y, en consecuencia, sufren la representación inexacta de la semántica. Para abordar este problema, proponemos un modelo de composición de palabras sensible al contexto sin modelos, que emplea la información semántica latente como contexto global para las representaciones de aprendizaje. El modelo propuesto intenta resolver la desambiguación del sentido de las palabras y la composición de las palabras en un marco unificado. La evaluación exhaustiva muestra mejoras consistentes con respecto a varios modelos fuertes de representación/composición de palabras con diferentes granularidades (incluidas palabras, frases y oraciones), lo que demuestra la eficacia de nuestro método propuesto.', 'ja': '単語構成は、大規模な言語単位（例えば、フレーズ、文章、文書）の表現学習のための有望な手法である。しかしながら、現在の構成モデルのほとんどは、単語の曖昧さと言語単位の外側の文脈を学習表現のために考慮せず、結果として意味論の不正確な表現に苦しむ。この問題に対処するために、学習表現のためのグローバルなコンテキストとして潜在的な意味情報を採用した、モデルフリーの文脈認識の単語構成モデルを提案する。提案されたモデルは、統一されたフレームワークで単語の意味の曖昧さを解消し、単語の構成を解決しようと試みる。広範な評価は、さまざまな粒度（単語、フレーズ、文を含む）でのさまざまな強力な単語表現/構成モデルよりも一貫した改善を示し、提案された方法の有効性を示しています。', 'zh': '单词合者,有前术也,所以示大言单元(如短语,句与文档)也。 然方今多作文模学习表征不思单词模糊性语言单元外之上下文,故遭语义不正。 为此者,举无上下文感之单词,以潜语义为学上下文。 试于一框架中解词义歧义与词语相成。 博评之明,异粒度(包单词,短语句)下,比诸强单词/合模形,同者改进,证其有效性也。', 'hi': 'शब्द रचना बड़ी भाषाई इकाइयों (जैसे, वाक्यांशों, वाक्यों और दस्तावेजों) के प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए एक आशाजनक तकनीक है। हालांकि, अधिकांश वर्तमान रचना मॉडल शब्दों की अस्पष्टता और भाषाई इकाई के बाहर के संदर्भ को सीखने के अभ्यावेदन के लिए ध्यान में नहीं रखते हैं, और परिणामस्वरूप शब्दार्थ के गलत प्रतिनिधित्व से पीड़ित होते हैं। इस मुद्दे को हल करने के लिए, हम एक मॉडल-मुक्त संदर्भ-जागरूक शब्द रचना मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो अव्यक्त शब्दार्थ जानकारी को सीखने के लिए वैश्विक संदर्भ के रूप में नियोजित करता है। प्रस्तावित मॉडल एक एकीकृत ढांचे में शब्द अर्थ बहुविकल्पी और शब्द संरचना को हल करने का प्रयास करता है। व्यापक मूल्यांकन विभिन्न ग्रैन्युलैरिटी (शब्द, वाक्यांश और वाक्य सहित) पर विभिन्न मजबूत शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व / संरचना मॉडल पर लगातार सुधार दिखाता है, जो हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करता है।', 'ru': 'Композиция слов - перспективная техника репрезентативного обучения больших языковых единиц (например, фраз, предложений и документов). Однако большинство современных композиционных моделей не принимают во внимание двусмысленность слов и контекст вне языковой единицы для учебных представлений и, следовательно, страдают от неточного представления семантики. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем бесконтекстную модель компоновки слов, которая использует скрытую семантическую информацию в качестве глобального контекста для обучения представлениям. Предложенная модель пытается разрешить слово чувствовать расплывчатость и словосочетание в единой структуре. Обширная оценка показывает последовательные улучшения по сравнению с различными сильными моделями представления слов/композиций при различных деталях (включая слово, фразу и предложение), демонстрируя эффективность предложенного нами метода.', 'ga': 'Teicníc dhearfach is ea comhdhéanamh focal chun léiriú a thabhairt ar fhoghlaim na n-aonad mór teanga (m.sh. frásaí, abairtí agus doiciméid). Mar sin féin, ní chuireann an chuid is mó de na samhlacha cumadóireachta reatha san áireamh athbhrí na bhfocal agus an comhthéacs lasmuigh d’aonad teangeolaíochta le haghaidh léirithe foghlama, agus dá bharr sin bíonn siad thíos le léiriú míchruinn an tséimeantaic. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar an tsaincheist seo, molaimid múnla cumadóireachta focal atá feasach ar chomhthéacs saor ó eiseamláir, a úsáideann an fhaisnéis shéimeantach folaigh mar chomhthéacs domhanda le haghaidh léirithe foghlama. Déanann an tsamhail mholta iarracht an dí-athbhrí ar chiall na bhfocal agus comhdhéanamh na bhfocal a réiteach i gcreat aontaithe. Léiríonn meastóireacht fhairsing feabhsuithe comhsheasmhacha ar mhúnlaí láidre ionadaíochta/cumadóireachta focal éagsúla ag gráinneachtaí éagsúla (focal, frása agus abairt san áireamh), rud a léiríonn éifeachtacht ár modh molta.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების კომპოზიცია არის დიდი ლენგურისტიკური ერთეულების განსწავლებისთვის გამოსახულებელი ტექნოგია (მაგალითად, ტრაზები, სიტყვები და დოკუმენტები მაგრამ მიმდინარე კომპოზიციო მოდელების უფრო მეტი სიტყვების და სიტყვების კონტექსტის გარეშე არ იყენებს სიტყვების გარეშე სიტყვების განმავლობაში, რომლებიც სწავლის გამოსახულებებისთვის ამ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ მოეხსენებთ მოდელს თავისუფალი კონტექსტური სიტყვების კომპოზიციის მოდელს, რომელიც მუშაობს ლანტენტური სმენტიკი პროგრამის მოდელის მოცდილობა სიტყვების განსხვავება და სიტყვების კომპოზიცია ერთადერთებული ფრამეტში. განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრება გამოჩვენება განსხვავებული გრანულაციის მოდელების განსაზღვრება/კომპოზიციის განსაზღვრებული სიტყვების შესაძლებლობის შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობების შესაძლებლობ', 'hu': 'A szóösszetétel ígéretes technika a nagy nyelvi egységek (pl. kifejezések, mondatok és dokumentumok) reprezentációs tanulására. A jelenlegi kompozíciós modellek többsége azonban nem veszi figyelembe a szavak kétértelműségét és a nyelvi egységen kívüli kontextust a reprezentációk tanulásához, ezért a szemantika pontatlan reprezentációjától szenved. A probléma megoldására egy modellmentes kontextustudatos szóösszetételi modellt javasolunk, amely a látens szemantikai információt globális kontextusként használja a tanulási reprezentációk tanulásához. A javasolt modell megpróbálja megoldani a szó értelmezésének egyértelműségét és szóösszetételét egy egységes keretrendszerben. A kiterjedt értékelés szerint a különböző erős szóreprezentációs/kompozíciós modellek következetes javulást mutat különböző granularitásokon (beleértve a szót, kifejezést és mondatot), bizonyítva a javasolt módszer hatékonyságát.', 'el': 'Η σύνθεση λέξεων είναι μια ελπιδοφόρα τεχνική για την εκμάθηση μεγάλων γλωσσικών μονάδων (π.χ. φράσεις, προτάσεις και έγγραφα). Ωστόσο, τα περισσότερα από τα σημερινά μοντέλα σύνθεσης δεν λαμβάνουν υπόψη την ασάφεια των λέξεων και το πλαίσιο έξω από μια γλωσσική μονάδα για τις μαθησιακές αναπαραστάσεις και συνεπώς υποφέρουν από την ανακριβή αναπαράσταση της σημασιολογίας. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό το ζήτημα, προτείνουμε ένα μοντέλο-ελεύθερο πλαίσιο-συνειδητό μοντέλο σύνθεσης λέξεων, το οποίο χρησιμοποιεί τις λανθάνουσες σημασιολογικές πληροφορίες ως παγκόσμιο πλαίσιο για τις αναπαραστάσεις μάθησης. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιχειρεί να επιλύσει την αποσαφήνιση της λέξης και τη σύνθεση της λέξης σε ένα ενιαίο πλαίσιο. Η εκτεταμένη αξιολόγηση δείχνει συνεπείς βελτιώσεις σε σχέση με διάφορα ισχυρά μοντέλα αναπαράστασης/σύνθεσης λέξεων σε διαφορετικές κοκκοποιότητες (συμπεριλαμβανομένης λέξης, φράσης και πρότασης), αποδεικνύοντας την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης μεθόδου μας.', 'it': "La composizione delle parole è una tecnica promettente per l'apprendimento della rappresentazione di grandi unità linguistiche (ad esempio frasi, frasi e documenti). Tuttavia, la maggior parte dei modelli compositivi attuali non prendono in considerazione l'ambiguità delle parole e il contesto al di fuori di un'unità linguistica per l'apprendimento delle rappresentazioni, e di conseguenza soffrono di una rappresentazione inesatta della semantica. Per affrontare questo problema, proponiamo un modello di composizione di parole contestuale senza modello, che utilizza le informazioni semantiche latenti come contesto globale per le rappresentazioni di apprendimento. Il modello proposto tenta di risolvere la disambiguazione del senso della parola e la composizione delle parole in un quadro unificato. Un'ampia valutazione mostra miglioramenti costanti rispetto a vari modelli di rappresentazione/composizione di parole forti con granularità diverse (comprese parole, frasi e frasi), dimostrando l'efficacia del metodo proposto.", 'kk': 'Сөздің құрылымы - үлкен лингвистикалық бірліктерді (мысалы, сөздер, сөздер және құжаттар) үйрену үшін әлемді техника. Бірақ назардағы композициялық үлгілерінің көбі сөздер мен лингвистикалық бірлігінің сыртындағы контексті оқыту үшін қарастырылмайды, сондықтан семантикалық дұрыс түсініктерінен тұрады. Бұл мәселеге шешу үшін, біз үлгі бос контексті білмейтін сөздерді құру үлгісін ұсынамыз. Бұл соңғы семантикалық мәліметті оқыту үшін жалпы контексті ретінде қолданы Келтірілген үлгі біріктірілген фреймінде сөздердің түсініктемесін және сөздердің түсініктемесін шешуге әрекет етеді. Кеңейтілген оқиға түрлі грануляриялық (сөз, сөз және сөз) үлгілерінде әртүрлі күшті сөздерді көрсету/жасау үлгілерінде тұрақты жақсартылығын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Sąvokų sudėtis yra žadantis didelių kalbų vienetų mokymosi būdas (pvz., frazės, sakiniai ir dokumentai). Vis dėlto dauguma dabartinių sudėties modelių neatsižvelgia į žodžių dviprasmiškumą ir aplinkybes už kalbos vieneto ribų mokymosi atstovavimams ir todėl kenčia nuo netikslaus semantikos atstovavimo. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, siūlome modeliui nepriklausantį kontekstą turintį žodžių sudėties model į, kuriame kaip visuotinis mokymosi atstovavimų kontekstas naudojama latenti semantinė informacija. Siūlomas modelis bando išspręsti žodžio supratimo nedviprasmiškumą ir žodžio sudėtį vienodomis sąlygomis. Išsamus vertinimas rodo nuoseklius įvairių stiprių žodžių atstovavimo ir (arba) sudėties modelių patobulinimus įvairiuose granuliariškumuose (įskaitant žodį, frazę ir sakinį), kurie rodo mūsų siūlomo metodo veiksmingumą.', 'ms': 'Komposisi perkataan adalah teknik yang berjanji untuk mewakili belajar unit bahasa besar (cth., frasa, kalimat dan dokumen). Namun, kebanyakan model komposisi semasa tidak mengambil ambiguiti perkataan dan konteks diluar unit bahasa mempertimbangkan untuk mewakili belajar, dan oleh itu menderita dari mewakili yang tidak tepat semantik. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami cadangkan model komposisi perkataan tanpa konteks model, yang menggunakan maklumat semantik tersembunyi sebagai konteks global untuk mewakili belajar. Model yang diusulkan cuba untuk menyelesaikan penyelesaian perasaan perkataan dan komposisi perkataan dalam kerangka bersatu. Evaluasi luas menunjukkan peningkatan konsisten atas pelbagai model perwakilan perkataan kuat/komposisi pada granulariti yang berbeza (termasuk perkataan, frasa dan kalimat), menunjukkan kegunaan kaedah yang kami cadangkan.', 'ml': 'Word composition is a promising technique for representation learning of large linguistic units (e.g., phrases, sentences and documents).  എന്നാലും ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളുടെ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d മിക്കവും ഭാഷകൂട്ടത്തിന്റെ പുറത്തുള്ള വാക്കുകളുടെയും സംസ്ഥാനവും പഠിക്കാനുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു മോഡല്\u200d-ഫ്രീഡ് കോണ്\u200dസ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റ് വാക്കിന്റെ കൂട്ടുതല്\u200d മ ഒരു യൂണിക്കൂട്ടിയ ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dക്കില്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ മനസ്സിന്റെ അസാധ്യതയും വാക്കുകളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണവും പരിഹരി വ്യത്യസ്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d/ഘടനയുടെ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കും മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന മുന്നറിയിപ്', 'mt': 'Il-kompożizzjoni tal-kliem hija teknika promettenti g ħar-rappreżentazzjoni tat-tagħlim ta’ unitajiet lingwistiċi kbar (e ż., frażijiet, sentenzi u dokumenti). Madankollu, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-mudelli attwali tal-kompożizzjoni ma jikkunsidrawx l-ambigwità tal-kliem u l-kuntest barra minn unit à lingwistika għar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-tagħlim, u konsegwentement ibatu mir-rappreżentazzjoni mhux eżatta tas-semantika. Biex nindirizzaw din il-kwistjoni, qed nipproponu mudell ta’ kompożizzjoni tal-kliem mingħajr mudell u mingħajr kuntest, li juża l-informazzjoni semantika moħbija bħala kuntest globali għar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tat-tagħlim. Il-mudell propost jippruva jsolvi l-kelma diżambiguazzjoni tas-sens u l-kompożizzjoni tal-kelma f’qafas unifikat. Evalwazzjoni estensiva turi titjib konsistenti fuq diversi mudelli b’saħħithom ta’ rappreżentazzjoni/kompożizzjoni tal-kliem f’granularitajiet differenti (inklużi l-kelma, il-frażi u s-sentenza), li juri l-effettività tal-metodu propost tagħna.', 'pl': 'Kompozycja słowa jest obiecującą techniką nauki reprezentacyjnej dużych jednostek językowych (np. zwrotów, zdań i dokumentów). Jednak większość obecnych modeli kompozycji nie uwzględnia jednoznaczności słów i kontekstu poza jednostką językową dla reprezentacji uczących się, a w konsekwencji cierpi z powodu niedokładnej reprezentacji semantyki. Aby rozwiązać ten problem, proponujemy wolny od modelu model kompozycji słów kontekstowych, który wykorzystuje utajoną informację semantyczną jako globalny kontekst do uczenia się reprezentacji. Proponowany model próbuje rozwiązać rozporządzenie słowa rozmysłowego i kompozycję słowa w jednolitych ramach. Obszerna ocena pokazuje spójne ulepszenia w stosunku do różnych silnych modeli reprezentacji/kompozycji słów w różnych granularnościach (w tym słowa, frazy i zdania), co pokazuje skuteczność proponowanej metody.', 'mk': 'Композицијата на зборовите е ветувачка техника за претставување на учењето на големите јазички единици (на пример, фрази, реченици и документи). Сепак, повеќето од сегашните модели на композиција не ја земаат во предвид нејасноста на зборовите и контекстот надвор од јазичката единица за учењето на претставувањата и, како резултат на тоа, страдаат од неправилното претставување на семантиката. За да го решиме ова прашање, предлагаме модел без модел без контекст свесен за зборови композиција, кој ги користи лантните семантични информации како глобален контекст за учење претставувања. Предложениот модел се обидува да го реши зборот смисла дејамбигуација и зборот композиција во обединета рамка. Екстензивната евалуација покажува константни подобрувања во врска со различните модели на силно претставување на зборовите/композиција на различни грануларности (вклучувајќи збор, фраза и реченица), што ја покажува ефикасноста на нашиот предло', 'ro': 'Compoziția cuvintelor este o tehnică promițătoare pentru învățarea reprezentării unităților lingvistice mari (de exemplu, fraze, propoziții și documente). Cu toate acestea, majoritatea modelelor actuale de compoziție nu iau în considerare ambiguitatea cuvintelor și contextul din afara unei unități lingvistice pentru învățarea reprezentărilor și, prin urmare, suferă de reprezentarea inexactă a semanticii. Pentru a aborda această problemă, propunem un model de compoziție a cuvintelor conștient de context fără model, care utilizează informația semantică latentă ca context global pentru reprezentările de învățare. Modelul propus încearcă să rezolve dezambiguizarea sensului cuvântului și compoziția cuvântului într-un cadru unificat. Evaluarea extinsă arată îmbunătățiri consistente față de diferite modele puternice de reprezentare / compoziție a cuvintelor la diferite granularități (inclusiv cuvânt, frază și propoziție), demonstrând eficacitatea metodei propuse.', 'no': 'Ordsamansetting er eit velkommande teknikk for å læra representasjon av store språksteiningar (f.eks. fraser, setningar og dokument). Dei fleste av den gjeldande komponentsmodellen tar imidlertid ikkje eit uttrykk av ord og konteksten utenfor ein lingvisk eining til å forstå å lære representasjonar, og derfor går det frå den ugyldig representasjonen av semantikk. For å handtera dette problemet, foreslår vi eit modell frå kontekst-merke ordkomponentsmodell, som brukar latent semantisk informasjon som globalt kontekst for læringsrepresentasjonar. Det foreslåde modellet prøver å løyse ordfølelsen av disambiguasjon og ordkomposisjon i eit vienot rammeverk. Utvidingsevalueringa viser konsistent forbedringar over ulike sterke ordrepresentasjonsmodular på ulike granularitier (inkludert ord, frase og setningar), som viser effektiviteten av vår foreslått metode.', 'so': 'Heshiiska hadalku waa tekniko loo ballanqaaday in lagu barto barashada qalabka luuqadaha waaweyn (tusaale ahaan hadalka, imtixaanka iyo dukumentiyada). Si kastaba ha ahaatee, noocyada sameynta ee joogtada badankood ma qaataan qalabka hadalka iyo kooxda ka baxsan xarunta luuqadaha, taas darteed waxay ku xanuunsadaan noocyada saxda ah ee qeybta qoraalka. Si aan arrintan uga sheekeyno, waxaan u soo jeedaynaa model-free-context-aware word sameynta, kaas oo macluumaadka ugu dambeeya ee semantika ah u shaqeynaya sida mukhtarka caalamiga ah ee waxbarashada. Tusaale-ka la soo jeeday ayaa ku dayaya in uu xalliyo burburista hadalka iyo qalabka hadalka ku qoran. Qiimeynta dheeraad ah waxaa ka muuqata horumarinta ah oo ku saabsan noocyada hadalka oo xoogga leh/qeyb-dhigista noocyada kala duduwan (sida hadal, hadal iyo imtixaan), waxayna muujiyaan waxqabadka qaababka la soo jeeday.', 'sr': 'Komponekcija reči je obećavajuća tehnika za predstavljanje učenja velikih jezičkih jedinica (npr. rečenica, rečenica i dokumenti). Međutim, većina trenutnih modela kompozicije ne uzima u obzir ambiguitet riječi i konteksta izvan jezičke jedinice za predstavljanje učenja, i stoga pati od nepravednog predstavljanja semantika. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo model slobodnog konteksta, koji koristi latentne semantičke informacije kao globalni kontekst za predstavljanje učenja. Predloženi model pokušava rešiti disambiguaciju riječi i kompoziciju riječi u ujedinjenom okviru. Ekstensivna procjena pokazuje konsekventne poboljšanja u raznim jakim modelima predstavljanja/kompozicije reči na različitim granularitima (uključujući reč, frazu i rečenicu), pokazujući učinkovitost našeg predloženog metoda.', 'mn': 'Үг зохиол нь том хэлний нэгжүүдийн суралцахын тулд амлалтай техник юм. Гэхдээ одоогийн бүтээлтийн загварын ихэнх нь үг болон хэлний нэгжээс гадна байдлыг суралцах загваруудын тухай ойлголтын тухай ойлгох аргагүй. Үүний дараа нь зөв хэмжээний үзүүлэлтийн тухай зовж байгаа юм. Энэ асуудлыг зохицуулахын тулд бид үнэгүй орчин үеийн бүтцийн загварыг санал болгож байна. Энэ нь сүүлийн семантийн мэдээллийг суралцах үзүүлэлтийн дэлхийн тухай дэлхийн тухай ажилладаг. Өөрчлөгдсөн загвар нь нэгтгэх хэлбэрээр хэмжээний хэлбэрийг зохицуулахын тулд оролдсон. Өнгөрсөн дүгнэлт нь олон хүчтэй үг илэрхийлэл/бүтээлтийн загваруудыг харуулж байна (үг, үг, өгүүлбэр, өгүүлбэр) өөр өөр өөр гранулацийн загваруудын үр дүнг харуулж байна.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை கூட்டுதல் பெரிய மொழி அலகுகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ள வேண்டிய தொழில்நுட்பமான தொழில்நுட்பம் However, most of the current composition models do not take the ambiguity of words and the context outside of a linguistic unit into consideration for learning representations, and consequently suffer from the inaccurate representation of semantics.  இந்த பிரச்சனையை விளக்க, நாம் ஒரு மாதிரி இலவச சூழல் உணர்ந்து கொள்ள வார்த்தை உருவாக்க மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது சமீபத ஒரு unified சட்டம் விரிவான மதிப்பெண் முன்னேற்றத்தைக் காண்பிக்கிறது வேறு வார்த்தைகளின் பிரதிநிதித்தல்/கூட்டுதல் மாதிரிகளின் முன்னேற்றங்களை வெவ்வே', 'si': 'වචන සම්පූර්ණය තමයි ලොකු භාෂාවික යුනිටික් ඉගෙනගන්න ප්\u200dරාර්ථික වාද්\u200dයාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂාවක නමුත්, ප්\u200dරස්තූතිය සංවිධානයේ බොහෝ මොඩල් වචනය සහ භාෂාත්මක යුනිට් වලින් පිටත් වලින් භාෂාත්මක යුනිට් වලින් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනුවෙ මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය විදිහට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප ප්\u200dරශ්න විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජන විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා වචන අවස්ථාවක් සහ වචන සංවිධානයක් එක්ක විදි විශේෂ විශේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ විවිධ ශක්තිමත් වචන ප්\u200dරතිනිශේෂණය/සංවිධානය විවිධියක් වෙනස් විදියට (වචන, වචන සහ ව', 'sv': 'Ordkomposition ﾃ､r en lovande teknik fﾃｶr representationsinlﾃ､rning av stora sprﾃ･kliga enheter (t.ex. fraser, meningar och dokument). De flesta av de nuvarande kompositionsmodellerna tar dock inte hﾃ､nsyn till ordets tvetydighet och kontext utanfﾃｶr en sprﾃ･klig enhet vid inlﾃ､rning av representationer och lider fﾃｶljaktligen av felaktig representation av semantik. Fﾃｶr att ta itu med denna frﾃ･ga fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi en modellfri kontextmedveten ordkompositionsmodell, som anvﾃ､nder latent semantisk information som global kontext fﾃｶr lﾃ､rande representationer. Den fﾃｶreslagna modellen fﾃｶrsﾃｶker lﾃｶsa ordmeningsdeklarationen och ordsammansﾃ､ttningen i en enhetlig ram. Omfattande utvﾃ､rdering visar konsekventa fﾃｶrbﾃ､ttringar jﾃ､mfﾃｶrt med olika starka ordrepresentations-/kompositionsmodeller vid olika granulariteter (inklusive ord, fras och mening), vilket visar effektiviteten av vﾃ･r fﾃｶreslagna metod.', 'ur': 'کلمات کی پیدائش بڑی زبانی یونیٹوں کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک وعدہ دینے والی تکنیک ہے۔ لیکن اکثر موجود مثالیں کلمات اور ایک زبان یونیٹ کے بغیر کی موجود باتوں کی غلطی کو سمجھ لیتے نہیں ہیں، اور اس کے نتیجہ میں سیمانٹیکوں کی غلطی نمونی سے پڑھتے ہیں. اس مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم نے ایک موڈل بے پرورش کنٹنسیٹ کی بات کامپیٹ موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جس نے لٹینٹ سیمانٹی معلومات کو سیکھنے کے لئے global context کے طور پر استعمال کرتا ہے. پیغمبر کی مدل ایک متحدہ فرم میں کلمات کا احساس غیر قابل تحقیق کرنے کی کوشش کرتی ہے۔ اکسٹنسوی ارزیابی دکھاتی ہے کہ مختلف گرنولیریٹ کے مطابق مختلف قوت لفظ/پیدائش موڈلوں کے ذریعہ (لفظ، عبارت اور عبارت کے شامل) مطابق بہترین سوداگری کرتی ہیں، جو ہمارے پیش کیا ہوا طریقہ', 'uz': "Name Lekin, hozirgi kompyuterning ko'pchiligi modellari o'rganish uchun so'zlar va tillik birinchi birikmasining chegarasini o'rganish uchun o'ylamaydi, va keyin esa semantika notoʻgʻri taʼminlovchi bo'lmaydi. Bu muammani boshqarish uchun, biz model bilan bog'liq soʻz tuzuvchi modelni tahlil qilamiz. Bu eng oxirgi semantik maʼlumotni o'rganish uchun umumiy muhit sifatida ishlaydi. Name Koʻproq qiymatni ko'rsatadi, boshqa granulatlar (soʻz, сўз ва сўз) bilan bir qancha kalit so'zlar taqdimoti/kompyuterning modellaridan foydalanishni ko'rsatadi. Bizning fikrlarimizning effektligini ko'rsatadi.", 'vi': 'Thành phần từ là một kỹ thuật hứa hẹn để đại diện học về các đơn vị ngôn ngữ lớn (v.d. các cụm từ, câu và tài liệu). Tuy nhiên, hầu hết các mô hình cấu trúc hiện tại không ghi nhận sự mập mờ trong ngôn ngữ và bối cảnh bên ngoài một đơn vị ngôn ngữ để xem xét các diễn văn học, và do đó phải chịu sự mô tả ngữ pháp không chính xác. Để giải quyết vấn đề này, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình không ràng buộc ngữ cảnh về cấu trúc từ ngữ cảnh, sử dụng các thông tin ngữ pháp tiềm ẩn như nền tảng để phát triển học. Kiểu mẫu đề xuất nhằm giải quyết sai lầm từ nhạy cảm và cấu tạo từ trong một bộ phận thống nhất. Bản đánh giá đầy đủ cho thấy sự cải tiến liên tục trên các mô hình chữ đại diện và cấu tạo khác nhau với các quy định khác nhau (bao gồm từ, cụm từ và câu) chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp được đề nghị.', 'bg': 'Текстовата композиция е обещаваща техника за представяне на големи езикови единици (например фрази, изречения и документи). Въпреки това, повечето от съвременните модели на композиция не вземат предвид двусмислеността на думите и контекста извън езиковата единица за изучаване на репрезентации и следователно страдат от неточното представяне на семантиката. За да се справим с този проблем, предлагаме модел на композиция на думи без контекст, който използва латентната семантична информация като глобален контекст за изучаване на изображения. Предложеният модел се опитва да реши яснотата на смисъла на думата и състава на думата в единна рамка. Обширната оценка показва последователни подобрения в сравнение с различни модели на силно представяне/композиция на думи при различни гранулии (включително дума, фраза и изречение), демонстрирайки ефективността на предлагания от нас метод.', 'da': 'Ordsammensætning er en lovende teknik til repræsentationslæring af store sproglige enheder (f.eks. sætninger, sætninger og dokumenter). De fleste af de nuværende sammensætningsmodeller tager imidlertid ikke hensyn til ordets tvetydighed og konteksten uden for en sproglig enhed i betragtning for at lære repræsentationer, og lider derfor af en unøjagtig repræsentation af semantik. For at løse dette problem foreslår vi en modelfri kontekstbevidst ordsammensætningsmodel, der anvender den latente semantiske information som global kontekst for læringsrepræsentationer. Den foreslåede model forsøger at løse ordets forståelse og ordsammensætning i en samlet ramme. Omfattende evaluering viser konsekvente forbedringer i forhold til forskellige stærke ordrepræsentations-/sammensætningsmodeller ved forskellige granulariteter (herunder ord, sætning og sætning), der viser effektiviteten af vores foreslåede metode.', 'nl': 'Woordcompositie is een veelbelovende techniek voor het leren van grote taaleenheden (bijv. zinnen, zinnen en documenten). De meeste huidige compositiemodellen houden echter geen rekening met de ambiguïteit van woorden en de context buiten een taaleenheid voor lerende representaties, en lijden derhalve onder de onnauwkeurige representatie van semantiek. Om dit probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een model-vrij contextbewust woordcompositiemodel voor, dat de latente semantische informatie gebruikt als globale context voor lerende representaties. Het voorgestelde model tracht de woordbetekenis en woordsamenstelling op te lossen in een uniform kader. Uitgebreide evaluatie toont consistente verbeteringen aan ten opzichte van verschillende sterke woordrepresentatie/compositiemodellen met verschillende granulariteiten (waaronder woord, zin en zin), wat de effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde methode aantoont.', 'de': 'Wortkomposition ist eine vielversprechende Technik für das Darstellungslernen großer sprachlicher Einheiten (z.B. Phrasen, Sätze und Dokumente). Die meisten aktuellen Kompositionsmodelle berücksichtigen jedoch die Mehrdeutigkeit von Wörtern und den Kontext außerhalb einer linguistischen Einheit nicht für lernende Repräsentationen und leiden folglich unter der ungenauen Repräsentation von Semantik. Um dieses Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir ein modellfreies kontextbewusstes Wortkompositionsmodell vor, das latente semantische Informationen als globalen Kontext für lernende Repräsentationen verwendet. Das vorgeschlagene Modell versucht, die Wortsinn-Disambiguation und Wortzusammensetzung in einem einheitlichen Rahmen aufzulösen. Umfangreiche Evaluierungen zeigen konsistente Verbesserungen gegenüber verschiedenen starken Wortrepräsentations-/Kompositionsmodellen bei unterschiedlichen Granularitäten (einschließlich Wort, Phrase und Satz), was die Wirksamkeit unserer vorgeschlagenen Methode demonstriert.', 'id': 'Komposisi kata adalah teknik yang berjanji untuk mewakili belajar dari unit bahasa besar (contohnya frasa, kalimat dan dokumen). Namun, kebanyakan dari model komposisi saat ini tidak mengambil ambigusi kata-kata dan konteks diluar unit bahasa mempertimbangkan untuk mempelajari rappresentasi, dan konsekuensinya menderita dari rappresentasi yang tidak tepat semantik. Untuk mengatasi isu ini, kami mengusulkan model komposisi kata tanpa konteks yang menyadari model, yang menggunakan informasi semantis tersembunyi sebagai konteks global untuk mempelajari representati. Model yang diusulkan mencoba untuk menyelesaikan kata rasa tidak ambiguasi dan komposisi kata dalam rangka yang bersatu. Evaluasi ekstensif menunjukkan peningkatan konsisten atas berbagai model represensi/komposisi kata yang kuat di granularitas yang berbeda (termasuk kata, frasa dan kalimat), menunjukkan efektivitas metode yang diusulkan kita.', 'ko': '단어 조합은 전도가 유망한 대형 언어 단원(예를 들어 단어, 문장과 문서) 표징 학습 기술이다.그러나 현재 대부분의 작문 모델은 표징을 공부할 때 어휘의 모호성과 언어 단위 이외의 언어 환경을 고려하지 않기 때문에 의미 표징이 정확하지 않은 문제가 존재한다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 무모형의 상하문 감지 구사 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 잠재적인 의미 정보를 전체적인 상하문으로 활용하여 표현을 학습한다.이 모델은 하나의 통일된 틀 안에서 단어의 의미 변조와 구사 문제를 해결하려고 한다.광범위한 평가에 따르면 입도(단어, 단어와 문장 포함)에 따라 각종 강한 단어 표시/조합 모델에 비해 일치성이 개선되었고 우리가 제시한 방법의 유효성을 증명했다.', 'sw': 'Uwekezaji wa neno ni teknolojia inayofaa kuwakilisha kujifunza vifaa vikubwa vya lugha (kwa mfano, maneno, hukumu na nyaraka). Hata hivyo, mifano mingi ya uzalishaji wa sasa haichukulii uchochezi wa maneno na muktadha wa nje ya kituo cha lugha ili kuwafikiria wakilisha elimu, na hivyo wanaathiri kutokana na uwakilishi usio sahihi wa miambo. Ili kukabiliana na suala hili, tunapendekeza muundo wa usambazaji wa maneno yasiyo na mifano huru, ambao unatumia taarifa za hivi karibuni kama muktadha wa kimataifa kwa ajili ya kujifunza uwakilishi. The proposed model attempts to resolve the word sense disambiguation and word composition in a unified framework.  Utafiti mkubwa unaonyesha maendeleo yanayoendelea zaidi ya uwakilishi wa maneno mbalimbali/utengenezaji katika mifano mbalimbali (ikiwa ni pamoja na maneno, maneno na hukumu), yanaonyesha ufanisi wa njia yetu ya pendekezo.', 'tr': 'Sözler uly dil birlikleriniň öwrenmesini täze etmek üçin bir söz teknikidir. Ýöne şu and a taýýarlama modelleriniň köpüsi sözlerin ve dil birliğinin dışındaki saçmalıklaryny öwrenmek üçin gözden almaz. Bu yüzden semantiklerin do ğru şekilde nädogry bir şekilde näsazlanıyor. Bu meseleyi çözmek üçin, öğrenmek üçin son semantik bilgileri dünýä bir kontekst şeklinde bilinmeyen kelime kompozisyon modelini teklif ediyoruz. Mazmunlar nusgasy sözlerini çözmek we sözlerini birleştirmek üçin synanyşýar. Döwletli değerlendirmeler farklı granularitlerde (söz, söz we sözlerimiz dahil edilen), teklif edilen yöntemimizin etkinliğini gösterip, düzenli kelimelerde sabitçe gelişmeleri gösterir.', 'hr': 'Kompozicija riječi je obećavajuća tehnika za predstavljanje učenja velikih jezičkih jedinica (npr. fraze, rečenica i dokumenti). Međutim, većina trenutnih modela kompozicije ne uzimaju u obzir dvosmislenost riječi i konteksta izvan jezičke jedinice u obzir za predstavljanje učenja, te stoga pati od nepravednog predstavljanja semantika. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo model slobodnog konteksta, koji koristi latentne semantičke informacije kao globalni kontekst za predstavljanje učenja. Predloženi model pokušava riješiti disambiguaciju riječi i sastavu riječi u ujedinjenom okviru. Proširena procjena pokazuje konsekvente poboljšanje u raznim modelima predstavljanja/sastojanja riječi na različitim granularitima (uključujući riječ, frazu i rečenicu), pokazujući učinkovitost našeg predloženog metoda.', 'am': 'ቃላት አካባቢ ትልቅ ቋንቋዊ ክፍሎች ማስተማር የተስፋ ስክሮት ነው (ምሳሌ ቃላት፣ ቃላት እና ሰነዶች) ምንም እንኳን፣ የአሁኑ አካባቢዎች ምሳሌዎች ከቋንቋዊው ክፍል ውጭ የቃላትን እና ግንኙነትን ለመማር መልዕክቶችን ለማስተማር አይጠይቁም፣ ከዚያም በኋላ የሴሜንቲካ መልዕክት የማይገባ ክፍል መከራ ይቀበላሉ፡፡ ወደዚህ ጉዳይ ለመቀበል የሞዴል-ነጻ የቃላት አካባቢ አካባቢ ሞዴል እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሞዴል የቃላትን አስተያየት እና ቃላት አካባቢ ክፍል በመመለስ ይሞክራል፡፡ በተለየ ግንኙነት (ቃላት፣ ቃል እና ቃላት እና ፍርድ) በተለየ ልዩ ኃይለኛ ቃላት እና አካባቢ ምሳሌዎች ላይ የሚተካክሉ ክፍተቶችን እያሳየቱ፡፡', 'af': "Woordkomponisie is 'n beloftende teknikkie vir voorsien van die leer van groot lingwisiese eenhede (bv. frase, setnings en dokumente). Maar die meeste van die huidige opstellingsmodele neem nie die onregtigheid van woorde en die konteks buite van 'n lingwisiese eenheid in aandag vir die leer voorstellings nie, en daarom lyk van die onregte voorstelling van semantieke nie. Om hierdie probleem te raak, voorstel ons 'n model-vry konteks-bevestig woordkomposisie model, wat die latente semantiese inligting as globale konteks gebruik vir leer voorstellings. Die voorgestelde model probeer om die woord sens ontsamming en woordkomponisie in 'n eenvoudige raamwerk te oplos. Ekstensiewe evaluasie vertoon konsistente verbeteringe oor verskeie sterke woord voorstelling/komponensiemodele by verskeie granularisies (insluitend woord, frase en seting), wat die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde metode vertoon.", 'sq': 'Përbërja e fjalëve është një teknikë premtuese për përfaqësimin e mësimit të njësive të mëdha gjuhësore (për shembull frazat, fjalët dhe dokumentet). Megjithatë, shumica e modeleve të përbërjes së tanishme nuk marrin në konsideratë dy-qartësinë e fjalëve dhe kontekstin jashtë njësisë gjuhësore për përfaqësimet e mësimit dhe në pasojë vuajnë nga përfaqësimi i pakurat i semantikës. Për të trajtuar këtë çështje, ne propozojmë një model të përbërjes së fjalëve pa kontekst, i cili përdor informacionin semantik të fshehtë si kontekst global për përfaqësimet e mësimit. Modeli i propozuar përpiqet të zgjidhë fjalën kuptim të çambiguarisë dhe përbërjen e fjalës në një kuadër të unifikuar. Vlerësimi i gjerë tregon përmirësime konsistente mbi modelet e ndryshme të forta të përfaqësimit/kompozimit të fjalëve në granularitete të ndryshme (duke përfshirë fjalën, frazën dhe fjalën), duke demonstruar efektshmërinë e metodës sonë të propozuar.', 'hy': 'Բառերի բաղադրությունը խոստացնող տեխնիկա է մեծ լեզվաբանական միավորների (օրինակ, արտահայտություններ, նախադասություններ և փաստաթղթեր) ներկայացման համար: Այնուամենայնիվ, ներկայիս կառուցվածքի մոդելների մեծ մասը չի վերաբերում բառերի և լեզվաբանական միավորից դուրս գտնվող բառերի անհավասարությունը ուսումնասիրության ներկայացումների համար, և հետևաբար տառապում է սեմանտիկայի անճշգրիտ ներկայացումից: Այս խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք անմոդել կոնտեքստի գիտակցած բառի կառուցվածքի մոդել, որը օգտագործում է թաքնված սեմանտիկ ինֆորմացիան որպես համաշխարհային կոնտեքստ ուսուցման ներկայացումների համար: Առաջարկված մոդելը փորձում է լուծել բառը զգայական բացատրություն և բառի բաղադրությունը միավոր շրջանակներում: Ընդլայնված գնահատումը ցույց է տալիս, որ բառերի ներկայացման և բաղադրության տարբեր ուժեղ մոդելների հետ կապված կատարյալ բարելավումներ են կատարվում տարբեր գրանյալների (ներառյալ բառերը, արտահայտությունները և նախադասությունները), որոնք ցույց են', 'az': 'Söz kompozisyonu böyük dil birliklərinin öyrənməsini g östərmək üçün təhdid edən bir teknikdir. Halbuki, a ğımdaki kompozisyon modellərin çoxu sözlərin və dil birliklərinin dışındakı məlumatlarını öyrənmək üçün düşünməz və buna görə də semantik dəyişikliklərinin ədalətli ifadə edilməsindən çəkinməz. Bu məsələdən çəkinmək üçün, öyrənmək üçün küresel məlumatlar olaraq küresel məlumatlar kimi çoxlu məlumatlar təklif edirik. Önülləşdirilmiş modellər təklif bir çerçiftədə söz anlayışını çəkmək və söz kompozisyonunu çəkmək üçün çalışırlar. Yaxınlıq değerlendirməsi müxtəlif granularitilərdə, sözləri və cümlələrdə, təklif etdiyimiz metodların etkinliğini göstərir.', 'bn': 'শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য একটি প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল প্রযুক্তি However, most of the current composition models do not take the ambiguity of words and the context outside of a linguistic unit into consideration for learning representations, and consequently suffer from the inaccurate representation of semantics.  এই বিষয়টি নিয়ে আলোচনা করার জন্য আমরা একটি মডেল-ফ্রি প্রতিনিধিত্ব-সচেতনতা শব্দের প্রতিষ্ঠান মডেল প্রস্তাব করি, যা সাম্প্রতিক সেমেন্ প্রস্তাবিত মডেল একটি একত্রিত ফ্রেমে শব্দের বিভ্রান্তি এবং শব্দ প্রতিষ্ঠান সমাধান করার চেষ্টা করছে। বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন গ্রানুলিটির (যার মধ্যে শব্দ, বাক্য এবং শাস্তি) প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির কার্যকর প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে বিভিন্ন শক্তিশালী শব্দ প', 'fa': 'ترکیب کلمات یک تکنیک وعده\u200cدهنده برای تعلیم یادگیری از واحدهای زبان بزرگ است (مثال جمله\u200cها، جمله\u200cها و سند). ولی بیشتر مدلهای ترکیب فعلی از کلمات و محیط بیرون یک واحد زبان را به توجه به نمایش یادگیری نمی\u200cگیرند، و به این نتیجه از نمایش غیرقابل تعریف سیمانتیک رنج می\u200cگیرند. برای حل این مسئله، ما یک مدل ترکیب کلمات را آگاهی بدون مدل پیشنهاد می کنیم که اطلاعات طبیعی latent را به عنوان محیط جهانی برای نمایش یادگیری استفاده می کند. این مدل پیشنهاد سعی می\u200cکند که در یک چهارچوب متحد به حل کردن کلمه احساس نامبوغ و ترکیب کلمه را حل کند. ارزیابی گسترده نشان می\u200cدهد که توسط مدل\u200cهای نمایش/ترکیب کلمه\u200cهای قوی مختلف (شامل کلمه، عبارت و جمله) تثبیت\u200cکننده\u200cای بر روی نمایش/ترکیب کلمه\u200cهای مختلف (شامل کلمه، عبارت و جمله) مو', 'bs': 'Kompozicija riječi je obećavajuća tehnika za predstavljanje učenja velikih jezičkih jedinica (npr. fraze, rečenica i dokumenta). Međutim, većina sadašnjih modela kompozicije ne uzimaju u obzir ambiguitet riječi i konteksta izvan jezičke jedinice u obzir na predstavljanje učenja i stoga pati od nepravednog predstavljanja semantika. Za rješavanje ovog pitanja predlažemo model slobodnog konteksta, koji koristi latentne semantičke informacije kao globalni kontekst za predstavljanje učenja. Predloženi model pokušava riješiti disambiguaciju riječi i sastavu riječi u ujedinjenom okviru. Provećana procjena pokazuje konsekvente poboljšanje u raznim jakim modelima predstavljanja/kompozicije riječi na različitim granularitima (uključujući riječ, frazu i rečenicu), pokazujući učinkovitost našeg predloženog metoda.', 'ca': 'La composició de paraules és una tècnica prometedora per a representar l\'aprenentatge de grans unitats lingüístices (per exemple, frases, frases i documents). No obstant això, la majoria dels models de composició actuals no tenen en compte l\'ambigüitat de les paraules i el context for a d\'una unitat lingüística per a les representacions d\'aprenentatge, i, conseqüentment, pateixen la representació incorrecta de la semàntica. Per abordar aquesta qüestió, proposem un model de composició de paraules sense model, que utilitza la informació semàntica latent com un context global per a representacions d\'aprenentatge. El model proposat intenta resoldre la paraula "desambiguació del sentit" i la composició de paraules en un marc unificat. Una evaluació extensa mostra millors consistents sobre diversos models forts de representació/composició de paraules a diferents granularitats (incloent paraules, frases i frases), demostrant l\'eficacia del nostre mètode proposat.', 'fi': 'Sanasommittelu on lupaava tekniikka suurten kieliyksiköiden (esim. lauseiden, lauseiden ja asiakirjojen) esittämiseen. Useimmat nykyisistä sävellysmalleista eivät kuitenkaan ota huomioon sanojen epäselvyyttä ja kielellisen yksikön ulkopuolista kontekstia oppimisrepresentaatioiden oppimisessa, vaan kärsivät näin ollen semantiikan epätarkkasta esittämisestä. Tämän ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme mallivapaata kontekstitietoista sanakoostumusmallia, joka käyttää latenttia semanttista tietoa oppimisesitysten globaalina kontekstina. Ehdotettu malli pyrkii ratkaisemaan sanan merkityksen erottelun ja sanakoostumuksen yhtenäisessä kehyksessä. Laaja arviointi osoittaa johdonmukaisia parannuksia eri vahvojen sanojen esittämis-/koostumusmallien suhteen (mukaan lukien sana, lause ja lause), mikä osoittaa ehdotetun menetelmän tehokkuuden.', 'cs': 'Slovní kompozice je slibná technika pro reprezentaci výuky velkých jazykových jednotek (např. frází, vět a dokumentů). Nicméně většina současných kompozičních modelů nebere v úvahu nejednoznačnost slov a kontext mimo jazykovou jednotku pro učení reprezentace, a proto trpí nepřesným reprezentací sémantiky. Pro řešení této problematiky navrhujeme model slovní kompozice bez modelu, který využívá latentní sémantické informace jako globální kontext pro učení se reprezentace. Navržený model se snaží řešit slovo rozšíření smyslu a slovní složení v jednotném rámci. Rozsáhlé hodnocení ukazuje konzistentní zlepšení oproti různým silným modelům reprezentace/kompozice slov v různých granularitách (včetně slova, fráze a věty), což ukazuje účinnost naší navrhované metody.', 'et': 'Sõna kompositsioon on paljulubav tehnika suurte keeleüksuste (nt fraasid, laused ja dokumendid) esindamiseks. Enamik praegustest kompositsioonimudelitest ei arvesta aga sõnade ebamäärasust ja konteksti keeleüksusest väljaspool ning kannatab seetõttu semantika ebatäpse esituse all. Selle probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja mudelivaba kontekstiteadliku sõnakompositsiooni mudeli, mis kasutab latentset semantilist informatsiooni globaalse kontekstina õppimise esituste jaoks. Kavandatud mudel püüab lahendada sõna tähenduse eristamist ja sõna kompositsiooni ühtses raamistikus. Põhjalik hindamine näitab erinevate tugevate sõnade esitamise/kompositsiooni mudelite järjepidevat paranemist erinevate granulaarsusega (sh sõna, fraas ja lause), mis näitab meie kavandatud meetodi tõhusust.', 'sk': 'Besedna kompozicija je obetavna tehnika za reprezentativno učenje velikih jezikovnih enot (npr. fraz, stavki in dokumenti). Vendar večina sedanjih kompozicijskih modelov pri učenju reprezentacij ne upošteva dvoumnosti besed in konteksta zunaj jezikovne enote, zato trpi zaradi netočne reprezentacije semantike. Za reševanje tega vprašanja predlagamo model kompozicije besed brez konteksta, ki uporablja latentne semantične informacije kot globalni kontekst za učenje reprezentacij. Predlagani model poskuša rešiti razločitev besednega pomena in sestavo besed v enotnem okviru. Obsežno ocenjevanje kaže dosledne izboljšave v primerjavi z različnimi modeli močnega predstavljanja/kompozicije besed pri različnih podrobnostih (vključno z besedo, frazo in stavkom), kar dokazuje učinkovitost naše predlagane metode.', 'he': 'מילים היא טכניקה מבטיחה לייצג לימודים של יחידות שפתיות גדולות (למשל ביטויים, משפטים ומסמכים). בכל אופן, רוב הדוגמנים של המרכיב הנוכחי לא לוקחים את השפעה של המילים והקשר מחוץ ליחידה שפתית בהתחשב במציגות הלימודים, ולכן סובלים ממציגה לא מדויקת של סמנטיקה. כדי להתמודד עם הנושא הזה, אנו מציעים מודל מילוי ללא מודל מודע לקונקסט, שמשתמש במידע סמנטי הלא מוכר כהקונקסט גלובלי למציגות ללמוד. המודל המוצע מנסה לפתור את המילה "חוש ביטחון" ומרכיבת המילים במסגרת מאוחדת. הערכה רחבה מראה שיפורים קבועים על דוגמני מילים חזקים שונים מייצגה/מייצגה שונים בגרינוליות שונות (כולל מילה, ביטוי ומשפט), שמוכיחים את היעילות של השיטה המוצעת שלנו.', 'jv': 'Sampeyan kelas saiki un teknik sing nglanggar kanggo ngubah akeh unani ingkang luwih (adil.isar, kapan, penaraning lan dokumen). Nanging, akeh model sing paling nggambar kuwi, ora ono dumadhi kapan kelangan kelangan kelangan lan kontèks limo nang titimbang nggawe gerakan kelangan representasi, lan uga sapa-itik dhéwé kuwi mau. Ngawe nyimpen seng pangan iki, kita supoyo model kuwi wis bebas telu nggawe model kuwi "sampek" sing berarti informasi sematik bantuan kanggo ngubah sistem global kanggo ngerasakno pawaran gambar. Miscellaneous assertive', 'ha': "Tsarin maganar ta zama wani taki mai yi wa'azi wa mai ƙididdigewa g a sanar da sunayen lingui masu girma (misali, maganar, da takardun aiki da takardun aiki). Amma, mafi yawansu masu motsi da ke cikin shirin ayuka yanzu ba su ɗauki bakin maganar da mazaɓa na guda daga cikin linguistic kuma suna yin tunãni ga masu karatun tsarin da aka sani, kuma don su ƙara mataimaki na daidaita. Ko da za mu yi amfani da wannan masu zartar da, za'a buƙata wani misali wanda ba'a sami ba-da-magana mai fahimta, wanda ke amfani da muhimmin mutane na farko kamar mazaɓa wa masu sani. @ info: tooltip Extensive evaluation shows consistent improvements over various strong word representation/composition models at different granularities (including word, phrase and sentence), demonstrating the effectiveness of our proposed method.", 'bo': 'སྐད་ཆ་སྒྲིག་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཆེ་བའི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལ་གཏོང་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། ད་ལྟོའི་མཛུབ་སྒྲིག་མིག་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡིག To address this issue, we propose a model-free context-aware word composition model, which employs the latent semantic information as global context for learning representations. གྲོས་འཆར་བཀོད་པའི་མ་དབུགས་དེ་ལ་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་དང་ཐ་སྙད་ཚིག་ཆ་གཅིག་གི་གྲངས་སྒྲིག དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་བསྡུར་ན་གྱིས་རྩ་བའི་ཚིག'}
{'en': 'Learning Features from Co-occurrences : A Theoretical Analysis', 'ar': 'ميزات التعلم من الأحداث المشتركة: تحليل نظري', 'fr': "Caractéristiques d'apprentissage à partir de cooccurrences\xa0: une analyse théorique", 'pt': 'Recursos de Aprendizagem de Coocorrências: Uma Análise Teórica', 'es': 'Características de aprendizaje de coocurrencias: un análisis teórico', 'zh': '从共生中学特征:理析', 'ja': '共起からの学習機能：理論的分析', 'hi': 'सह-घटनाओं से सीखने की विशेषताएं: एक सैद्धांतिक विश्लेषण', 'ru': 'Особенности обучения на основе сопутствующих факторов: теоретический анализ', 'ga': 'Gnéithe Foghlama ó Chomhtharluithe: Anailís Teoiriciúil', 'hu': 'Tanulási jellemzők az együttes előfordulásokból: Elméleti elemzés', 'el': 'Μάθηση Χαρακτηριστικά από Συμπλήψεις: Μια Θεωρητική Ανάλυση', 'it': "Caratteristiche di apprendimento dalle co-occorrenze: un'analisi teorica", 'kk': 'Бірлескен үйрену мүмкіндіктері: Теоретикалық анализ', 'mk': 'Learning Features from Co-occurrences: A Theoretical Analysis', 'lt': 'Mokymosi savybės iš bendrų įvykių: teorinė analizė', 'mt': 'Karatteristiċi tat-Tagħlim mill-Kookkorrenzi: Analiżi Teoretika', 'ka': 'ერთადერთი მოვლენებიდან შესწავლობა: ტეორეტიკალური ანალიზი', 'no': 'Læring av funksjonar frå samtidig hendingar: ein teoretisk analyse', 'mn': 'Хамтран үйл явдлын өөрчлөлт сурах: Теоретикийн шинжилгээ', 'ms': 'Features Learning from Co-occurrences: A Theoretical Analysis', 'pl': 'Uczenie się cech ze współwystępowań: analiza teoretyczna', 'ro': 'Caracteristici de învățare din co-evenimente: O analiză teoretică', 'sr': 'Naučenje karakteristika iz saradnjih događaja: teoretička analiza', 'ml': 'സഹസംഭവങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന വിശേഷതകള്\u200d: ഒരു തിയോറിക്കല്\u200d അന്യായം', 'so': 'Waxbarashada tababarka dhacdooyinka: A theoretical Analysis', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'ur': 'ایک تئوریٹیکل تحلیل', 'sv': 'Lärande funktioner från samtidiga händelser: En teoretisk analys', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வுகளிலிருந்து கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் சிறப்புகள்: ஒரு தொடர்ந்த ஆராய்ச்சி', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Học thức từ việc đồng diễn: A Theoretical Analysis', 'nl': 'Leren van kenmerken van co-incidenten: een theoretische analyse', 'bg': 'Характеристики на ученето от съвпадения: Теоретичен анализ', 'de': 'Lernen von Merkmalen aus Co-Vorkommen: Eine theoretische Analyse', 'id': 'Belajar Features dari Ko-Kejadian: A Theoretical Analysis', 'ko': '공현 현상에서 특징을 학습하는 이론 분석', 'fa': 'تحلیل تئوریتی', 'sw': 'Tamko za kujifunza kutoka kwa matukio yanayotokea: Uchambuzi wa maadili', 'da': 'Læringsfunktioner fra samtidige forekomster: En teoretisk analyse', 'hr': 'Naučenje karakteristika iz saradnjih događaja: teoretička analiza', 'af': 'Leer eienskappe vanaf koerensies: √¢¬Ä¬ôn teoretiese analisie', 'sq': 'Mësimi i Karakteristikave nga Bashkëndodhjet: Një Analizë Teoretike', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Birlikd…ôn f…ôrqli √∂yr…ônm…ôk: Teorƒìtik Analizi', 'bn': 'অনুষ্ঠান থেকে শিক্ষা বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী', 'tr': 'Durumlar öwrenmek üçin özellikleri: A teoretical Analysis', 'ca': 'Aprendre característiques de les Co-ocurrències: Una anàlisi teòrica', 'hy': 'Կարևոր իրադարձություններից ուսումնասիրել առանձնահատկություններ. տեսական վերլուծություն', 'fi': 'Oppimisominaisuudet rinnakkaistapahtumista: teoreettinen analyysi', 'cs': 'Učení se vlastností ze společných výskytů: Teoretická analýza', 'bs': 'Naučenje karakteristika iz saradnjih događaja: teoretička analiza', 'et': 'Õppimisomadused koos-juhtumitest: teoreetiline analüüs', 'jv': 'Learning Attributions from co-events: A theorretcal Test', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učne značilnosti iz sočasnih dogodkov: teoretična analiza', 'he': 'ללמוד תמונות מתרחשות משותפות: ניתוח תיאורטי', 'bo': 'Learning Features from Co-occurrences: A Theoretical Analysis'}
{'en': 'Representing a word by its co-occurrences with other words in context is an effective way to capture the meaning of the word. However, the theory behind remains a challenge. In this work, taking the example of a word classification task, we give a theoretical analysis of the approaches that represent a word X by a function f(P(C|X)), where C is a context feature, P(C|X) is the conditional probability estimated from a text corpus, and the function f maps the co-occurrence measure to a prediction score. We investigate the impact of context feature C and the function f. We also explain the reasons why using the co-occurrences with multiple context features may be better than just using a single one. In addition, based on the analysis, we propose a hypothesis about the conditional probability on zero probability events.', 'ar': 'يمثل تمثيل كلمة من خلال تواجدها مع كلمات أخرى في السياق طريقة فعالة لالتقاط معنى الكلمة. ومع ذلك ، فإن النظرية الكامنة وراء ما زالت تشكل تحديا. في هذا العمل ، بأخذ مثال مهمة تصنيف الكلمات ، نقدم تحليلًا نظريًا للطرق التي تمثل كلمة X بواسطة دالة f (P (C | X)) ، حيث C هي سمة سياق ، P (C | X) هو الاحتمال الشرطي المقدّر من مجموعة نصية ، وتقوم الوظيفة f بتعيين مقياس التكرار إلى درجة التنبؤ. نحن نحقق في تأثير ميزة السياق C والوظيفة f. نوضح أيضًا الأسباب التي تجعل استخدام التكرارات المشتركة مع ميزات سياق متعددة أفضل من مجرد استخدام واحد. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، بناءً على التحليل ، نقترح فرضية حول الاحتمال الشرطي لأحداث احتمالية صفرية.', 'pt': 'Representar uma palavra por suas co-ocorrências com outras palavras no contexto é uma maneira eficaz de capturar o significado da palavra. No entanto, a teoria por trás continua a ser um desafio. Neste trabalho, tomando o exemplo de uma tarefa de classificação de palavras, damos uma análise teórica das abordagens que representam uma palavra X por uma função f(P(C|X)), onde C é um traço de contexto, P(C| X) é a probabilidade condicional estimada a partir de um corpus de texto, e a função f mapeia a medida de coocorrência para uma pontuação de previsão. Investigamos o impacto do recurso de contexto C e da função f . Também explicamos as razões pelas quais o uso de co-ocorrências com vários recursos de contexto pode ser melhor do que apenas usar um único. Além disso, com base na análise, propomos uma hipótese sobre a probabilidade condicional em eventos de probabilidade zero.', 'es': 'Representar una palabra por sus concurrencias con otras palabras en contexto es una forma eficaz de captar el significado de la palabra. Sin embargo, la teoría subyacente sigue siendo un desafío. En este trabajo, tomando el ejemplo de una tarea de clasificación de palabras, damos un análisis teórico de los enfoques que representan una palabra X por una función f (P (C|X)), donde C es una característica del contexto, P (C|X) es la probabilidad condicional estimada a partir de un corpus de texto, y la función f mapea la medida de co-ocurrencia a un puntuación de predicción. Investigamos el impacto de la función de contexto C y la función f. También explicamos las razones por las que usar las co-ocurrencias con múltiples funciones de contexto puede ser mejor que usar una sola. Además, en base al análisis, proponemos una hipótesis sobre la probabilidad condicional de los eventos de probabilidad cero.', 'fr': "Représenter un mot par ses co-occurrences avec d'autres mots dans son contexte est un moyen efficace de saisir le sens du mot. Cependant, la théorie sous-jacente reste un défi. Dans ce travail, en prenant l'exemple d'une tâche de classification de mots, nous donnons une analyse théorique des approches qui représentent un mot X par une fonction f (P (C|X)), où C est une caractéristique contextuelle, P (C|X) est la probabilité conditionnelle estimée à partir d'un corpus de texte, et la fonction f mappe la mesure de co-occurrence à un score de prédiction. Nous étudions l'impact de la fonction contextuelle C et de la fonction f. Nous expliquons également les raisons pour lesquelles il peut être préférable d'utiliser les co-occurrences avec plusieurs fonctionnalités contextuelles plutôt que d'en utiliser une seule. En outre, sur la base de l'analyse, nous proposons une hypothèse concernant la probabilité conditionnelle d'événements à probabilité nulle.", 'ja': '文脈内の他の単語との共起によって単語を表すことは、単語の意味を取り込むための効果的な方法である。しかし、その背後にある理論は依然として課題である。この研究では、単語分類タスクの例を挙げて、関数f (P (C | X))によって単語Xを表すアプローチの理論的解析を行います。ここで、Cは文脈特徴であり、P (C | X)はテキストコーパスから推定される条件付き確率であり、関数fは共起メジャーを予測スコアにマッピングします。文脈特徴Cと関数fの影響を調査します。また、複数のコンテキスト機能を持つ同時発生を単一のものを使用するよりも優れている可能性がある理由も説明します。また、その解析を踏まえ、ゼロ確率事象の条件付き確率についての仮説を提案している。', 'zh': '以一单词上下文中与他单词共现以效单词也。 然背论犹一挑战也。 以此言之,以单词类为例,吾于函数f(P(C|X)示单词X之道,其C为上下文特征,P(C|X)从文本语料库度之概率,函数f将共现度射分数。 考上下文特征 C 与函数 f 相染。 又解所以用多上下文之共现可比仅用一上下文之征也。 至于零概率之事概率设也。', 'hi': 'संदर्भ में अन्य शब्दों के साथ इसकी सह-घटनाओं द्वारा एक शब्द का प्रतिनिधित्व करना शब्द के अर्थ को पकड़ने का एक प्रभावी तरीका है। हालांकि, पीछे सिद्धांत एक चुनौती बनी हुई है। इस काम में, एक शब्द वर्गीकरण कार्य का उदाहरण लेते हुए, हम उन दृष्टिकोणों का सैद्धांतिक विश्लेषण करते हैं जो एक फ़ंक्शन एफ (पी (पी (सी |एक्स) द्वारा एक शब्द एक्स का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं, जहां सी एक संदर्भ विशेषता है, पी (सी |एक्स) एक पाठ कॉर्पस से अनुमानित सशर्त संभावना है, और फ़ंक्शन एफ एक भविष्यवाणी स्कोर के लिए सह-घटना उपाय को मैप करता है। हम संदर्भ सुविधा C और फ़ंक्शन f के प्रभाव की जांच करते हैं। हम उन कारणों की भी व्याख्या करते हैं कि कई संदर्भ सुविधाओं के साथ सह-घटनाओं का उपयोग करना सिर्फ एक ही का उपयोग करने से बेहतर हो सकता है। इसके अलावा, विश्लेषण के आधार पर, हम शून्य संभाव्यता घटनाओं पर सशर्त संभावना के बारे में एक परिकल्पना का प्रस्ताव करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Представление слова его совпадениями с другими словами в контексте является эффективным способом уловить значение этого слова. Однако теория, лежащая в основе этой теории, остается сложной задачей. В этой работе, взяв в качестве примера задачу классификации слов, мы приводим теоретический анализ подходов, которые представляют слово X функцией f(P(C|X)), где C - контекстная особенность, P(C|X) - условная вероятность, оцененная из текстового корпуса, а функция f отображает меру совпадения с оценкой предсказания. Исследуем влияние контекстного признака С и функции f . Мы также объясняем причины, по которым использование совмещения с несколькими контекстными признаками может быть лучше, чем просто использование одного. Кроме того, на основе анализа предлагаем гипотезу об условной вероятности на событиях нулевой вероятности.', 'ga': 'Bealach éifeachtach chun brí an fhocail a ghabháil is ea focal a léiriú trína chomhtharlú le focail eile i gcomhthéacs. Mar sin féin, tá an teoiric taobh thiar ina dhúshlán. Sa saothar seo, agus an sampla de thasc aicmithe focal á tógáil againn, tugaimid anailís theoiriciúil ar na cuir chuige a sheasann d’fhocal X le feidhm f(P(C|X)), áit a bhfuil C ina ghné comhthéacs, P(C| Is é X) an dóchúlacht choinníollach a mheastar ó chorpas téacs, agus mapálann an fheidhm f an tomhas comhtharlaithe go dtí scór tuar. Fiosróimid an tionchar atá ag gné an chomhthéacs C agus ag an bhfeidhm f . Mínímid freisin na fáthanna go bhféadfadh sé go mbeadh sé níos fearr comhtharluithe a úsáid le gnéithe comhthéacs iolracha ná úsáid a bhaint as ceann amháin. Ina theannta sin, bunaithe ar an anailís, molaimid hipitéis maidir leis an dóchúlacht choinníollach ar imeachtaí dóchúlacht nialasach.', 'el': 'Η αναπαράσταση μιας λέξης με τις συνυπάρξεις της με άλλες λέξεις στο πλαίσιο είναι ένας αποτελεσματικός τρόπος για να συλλάβετε το νόημα της λέξης. Ωστόσο, η θεωρία πίσω από αυτό παραμένει μια πρόκληση. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παίρνοντας το παράδειγμα μιας εργασίας ταξινόμησης λέξεων, δίνουμε μια θεωρητική ανάλυση των προσεγγίσεων που αντιπροσωπεύουν μια λέξη Χ με μια συνάρτηση όπου το C είναι ένα χαρακτηριστικό περιβάλλοντος, το P(C|X) είναι η υπό όρους πιθανότητα εκτιμώμενη από ένα σώμα κειμένου, και η συνάρτηση χαρτογραφεί το μέτρο συνεμφάνισης σε μια βαθμολογία πρόβλεψης. Ερευνούμε τον αντίκτυπο του χαρακτηριστικού περιβάλλοντος Γ και της συνάρτησης f. Εξηγούμε επίσης τους λόγους για τους οποίους η χρήση των συμπτωμάτων με πολλαπλές δυνατότητες περιβάλλοντος μπορεί να είναι καλύτερη από τη χρήση ενός μόνο. Επιπλέον, με βάση την ανάλυση, προτείνουμε μια υπόθεση σχετικά με την υπό όρους πιθανότητα συμβάντων μηδενικής πιθανότητας.', 'hu': 'A szó jelentésének megragadására hatékony módja annak, hogy egy szót ábrázoljon más szavakkal a kontextusban. A mögöttes elmélet azonban továbbra is kihívást jelent. Ebben a munkában egy szóosztályozási feladat példájával elméleti elemzést adunk azokról a megközelítésekről, amelyek egy X szót reprezentálnak egy f(C|X)), ahol C kontextusfunkció, P(C|X) a szövegkorpuszból becsült feltételes valószínűség, és az f függvény az együttes előfordulási mértéket egy előrejelzési pontszámmal leképezi. Vizsgáljuk a C kontextusfunkció és az f függvény hatását. Azt is elmagyarázzuk, hogy miért lehet jobb az együttes előfordulások több kontextusfunkcióval történő használata, mint egyetlen használata. Ezenkívül az elemzés alapján egy hipotézist javasolunk a nulla valószínűségi események feltételes valószínűségéről.', 'ka': 'სხვა სიტყვების შემდეგ სიტყვების გამოსახულება კონტექსტში ეფექტიური გზა იქნება სიტყვების სიტყვების შესახებ. მაგრამ, თეორია შემდეგ იქნება წინასწორება. ამ სამუშაოში, სიტყვების კლასიფიკაციის რაოდენობის მაგალითვის, ჩვენ აღწერეთ ტეორეტიკური ანალიზაციას, რომელიც X სიტყვების ფუნქციის f(P(C.X)-ის გამოსახულება, სადაც C არის კონტექსტური ფუნქცია, P(C.X) არის ტექსტური კორპუსის შესაძლებლობა, და f ფ ჩვენ შევხედავთ C-ის და f-ის ფუნქციის შედეგი. ჩვენ ასევე განვიხსნა მიზეზები, რატომ გამოყენება მრავალ კონტექსტური ფუნქციებით შეიძლება უკეთესია, ვიდრე ერთი გამოყენება. დამატებით, ანალიზაციის ბაზეზე, ჩვენ მინდა ჰიპოტეზის შესაბამისი შესაბამისი ნულ შესაბამისი მოვლენების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი.', 'kk': 'Сөзді басқа сөздермен біріктіру - сөздің мәліметін түсіну эффективні жолы. Бірақ артындағы теория мәселе болады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, сөздерді шектеу тапсырмасының мысалы, біз X функциясы (P(C.X)) деген функциясының теоретикалық анализ береміз, бұл C контексті мүмкіндігі, P(C.X) деген мәтін корпустағы шарттық мүмкіндігі, және f функциясы кездейтін мәліметтің ше Біз C контексті және f функциясының нәтижесін зерттейміз. Біз сондай-ақ бірнеше контексті мүмкіндіктерді қолданудың себептерін түсіндіреміз, тек бір жалғыз мәліметті қолданудан артық болуы мүмкін. Қосымша, анализ негізінде, біз нөл ықтималдық оқиғалардың шарт ықтималдығы туралы гипотезасын ұсынамыз.', 'it': "Rappresentare una parola attraverso le sue co-occorrenze con altre parole nel contesto è un modo efficace per catturare il significato della parola. Tuttavia, la teoria alla base rimane una sfida. In questo lavoro, prendendo l'esempio di un compito di classificazione delle parole, diamo un'analisi teorica degli approcci che rappresentano una parola X da una funzione f(P(C|X)), dove C è una caratteristica di contesto, P(C|X) è la probabilità condizionale stimata da un corpus di testo, e la funzione f mappa la misura della co-occorrenza a un punteggio predittivo. Investighiamo l'impatto della funzione di contesto C e della funzione f . Spieghiamo anche le ragioni per cui utilizzare le co-occorrenze con più funzionalità di contesto può essere meglio che usare una sola. Inoltre, sulla base dell'analisi, proponiamo un'ipotesi sulla probabilità condizionale su eventi di probabilità zero.", 'lt': 'Pažymėjimas žodžiu kartu su kitais žodžiais kontekste yra veiksmingas būdas suprasti žodžio reikšmę. Tačiau teorija tebėra iššūkis. Šiame darbe, pasitelkiant žodžių klasifikavimo užduoties pavyzdį, atliekame teorinę metodų, kurie reiškia žodį X f(P(C[UNK]X)), analizę, kurioje C yra konteksto savybė, P(C[UNK]X) yra sąlyginė tikimybė, apskaičiuota iš teksto korpuso, ir f funkcija žemėlapizuoja bendro įvykio rodiklį iki prognozės rezultato. Mes tiriame konteksto požymio C ir f funkcijos poveikį . Mes taip pat paaiškiname priežastis, kodėl gali būti geresnis bendras įvykis su įvairiomis konteksto savybėmis nei tik viena. Be to, remiantis analize siūlome hipotezę dėl sąlyginės tikimybės nulinės tikimybės įvykiams.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം പിടികൂടുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി മറ്റു വാക്കുകളുമായി മറ്റൊരു സംഭവിക്കുന്ന വാക്ക് പകര്\u200dത്തുക എന്നാലും, പിന്നിലുള്ള തിയറിയൊരു വെല്ലുവാണ്. ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലിയുടെ ഉദാഹരണമായി എടുത്ത് കൊണ്ട് നാം ഒരു വാക്ക് എക്സിനെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന സ്വഭാവങ്ങളുടെ പരിശോധനം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. സി ഒരു കെന്\u200dസ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റിഫ നമ്മള്\u200d കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d C എന്നിവയുടെ പ്രഭാവം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മളും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന കാരണങ്ങള്\u200d എന്തിനാണ് ഇങ്ങനെ സംഭവിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് ഒരാളെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഒരു കൂ അതുകൂടാതെ, അന്വേഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്, സാധ്യതയുള്ള സംഭവങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് നാം ഒരു ഹൈപ്പിറ്റസിസിയെ പ്രാ', 'mk': 'Претставувањето на збор со неговите соопштества со други зборови во контекст е ефикасен начин да се сфати значењето на зборот. Сепак, теоријата зад неа останува предизвик. Во оваа работа, земајќи пример на задача за класификација на зборови, даваме теоретска анализа на пристапите кои претставуваат збор X со функција f(P(C[UNK]X)), каде што C е контекстна карактеристика, P(C[UNK]X) е условната веројатност проценета од текст корпус, и функцијата f ја мапира мерката на соопштеност до предвидувачки резултат. Го истражуваме влијанието на контекстната карактеристика Ц и функцијата Ф . Ние, исто така, ги објаснуваме причините зошто користењето на заедничките настани со повеќе контекстни карактеристики може да биде подобро отколку само користењето на една. Покрај тоа, врз основа на анализата, предложуваме хипотеза за условната веројатност на случаите со нула веројатност.', 'ms': 'Mengwakili perkataan dengan sambungan dengan perkataan lain dalam konteks adalah cara yang efektif untuk menangkap makna perkataan. Namun, teori di belakang masih satu cabaran. Dalam kerja ini, mengambil contoh tugas klasifikasi perkataan, kami memberikan analisis teori pendekatan yang mewakili perkataan X dengan fungsi f(P(C[UNK]X)), di mana C adalah ciri konteks, P(C[UNK]X) adalah kemungkinan syarat dijangka dari korpus teks, dan fungsi f petakan ukuran kejadian sama-sama kepada skor ramalan. Kami menyelidiki kesan fitur konteks C dan fungsi f . Kami juga menjelaskan alasan mengapa menggunakan sambungan dengan ciri-ciri konteks berbilang mungkin lebih baik daripada menggunakan satu. Selain itu, berdasarkan analisis, kita cadangkan hipotesis tentang kemungkinan syarat pada kejadian kemungkinan sifar.', 'mt': 'Ir-rappreżentazzjoni ta’ kelma mill-ko-okkorrenzi tagħha ma’ kliem ieħor fil-kuntest hija mod effettiv biex jinqabad it-tifsira tal-kelma. Madankollu, it-teorija wara tibqa’ sfida. F’dan ix-xogħol, billi nieħdu l-eżempju ta’ kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni tal-kelma, nagħtu analiżi teoretika tal-approċċi li jirrappreżentaw kelma X minn funzjoni f(P(C[UNK]X)), fejn C hija karatteristika ta’ kuntest, P(C[UNK]X) hija l-probabbiltà kondizzjonali stmata minn korpus tat-test, u l-funzjoni f timmappa l-miżura ta’ kookkorrenza għal punteġġ ta’ tbassir. Aħna ninvestigaw l-impatt tal-karatteristika tal-kuntest C u l-funzjoni f . Aħna nistpjegaw ukoll ir-raġunijiet għaliex l-użu tal-kookkorrenzi b’karatteristiċi ta’ kuntest multipli jista’ jkun a ħjar milli biss l-użu ta’ waħda waħda. In addition, based on the analysis, we propose a hypothesis about the conditional probability on zero probability events.', 'ro': 'Reprezentarea unui cuvânt prin coerentențele sale cu alte cuvinte în context este o modalitate eficientă de a capta sensul cuvântului. Cu toate acestea, teoria din spate rămâne o provocare. În această lucrare, luând exemplul unei sarcini de clasificare a cuvintelor, oferim o analiză teoretică a abordărilor care reprezintă un cuvânt X printr-o funcție f(C|X)), unde C este o caracteristică contextuală, P(C|X) este probabilitatea condiționată estimată dintr-un corpus text, iar funcția f mapează măsura coerentă la un scor de predicție. Investigăm impactul caracteristicii contextuale C și al funcției f . De asemenea, explicăm motivele pentru care utilizarea concomitentelor cu mai multe caracteristici contextuale poate fi mai bună decât utilizarea uneia singură. În plus, pe baza analizei, propunem o ipoteză cu privire la probabilitatea condiționată a evenimentelor cu probabilitate zero.', 'pl': 'Reprezentowanie słowa poprzez jego współwystępowanie z innymi słowami w kontekście jest skutecznym sposobem na uchwycenie znaczenia tego słowa. Jednak teoria stojąca za tym pozostaje wyzwaniem. W niniejszej pracy, biorąc przykład zadania klasyfikacji słów, podajemy teoretyczną analizę podejść reprezentujących słowo X przez funkcję f(P(C|X)), gdzie C jest cechą kontekstową, P(C|X) jest prawdopodobieństwem warunkowym oszacowanym z korpusu tekstowego, a funkcja f mapuje miarę współwystępowania do wyniku predykcyjnego. Badamy wpływ cech kontekstowych C i funkcji f. Wyjaśniamy również powody, dla których używanie współwystępowań z wieloma funkcjami kontekstowymi może być lepsze niż tylko używanie jednej. Dodatkowo, na podstawie analizy, proponujemy hipotezę o prawdopodobieństwie warunkowym dla zdarzeń zerowego prawdopodobieństwa.', 'mn': 'Үүний хамтран үйл явцдаа өөр үгүүдтэй илэрхийлэх нь үгийн утгыг ойлгох эффективны арга юм. Гэхдээ энэ онол нь сорилт байдаг. Энэ ажлын жишээ нь үг хуваалцах үйлдлийн жишээ авч үзвэл бид X-г F(P.C.X)-ын функцээр илэрхийлж буй ойлголтын теоретикийн шинжилгээ өгдөг. С нь орчин тохиолдол, P(C.X) нь текст корпус-ын шаардлагатай шаардлагатай магадлал ба f-ын функц нь хамтран үйлдлийн хэмжээг таамаглах тоон Бид C болон f функцын нөлөөг судалж байна. Бид мөн яагаад олон тохиолдолын харилцааны харилцааны хэрэглээний шалтгаан нь ганц нэгийг ашигласнаас илүү сайн байж болох юм. Үүнээс ч, шинжилгээнд үндсэн, бид 0 магадлал үйл явдлын шаардлагатай магадлалын талаар тодорхойлолт гаргадаг.', 'sr': 'Predstavljanje reči njegovim saradnjima s drugim rečima u kontekstu je efikasan način da se uhvati smisao reči. Međutim, teorija iza toga ostaje izazov. U ovom poslu, uzimajući primjer zadatka klasifikacije reči, dajemo teoretičku analizu pristupa koja predstavlja reč X od funkcije f(P.C.X)), gdje je C kontekstska funkcija, P(C.X) je uvjetna verovatnoća procjenjena iz tekstnog korpusa, a funkcija f mapira mjeru saradnje prema predviđanju. Istražujemo uticaj konteksta C i funkcije f . Takođe objašnjavamo razloge zašto korištenje saradnje sa višestrukim kontekstskim karakteristikama može biti bolje nego samo korištenje jednog. Osim toga, na osnovu analize, predlažemo hipotezu o uvjetnoj verovatnošću na nulu verovatnošću događaja.', 'si': 'වචනයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිස්ථාපනය කරන්නේ වෙනස් වචනයක් සමඟ වෙනස් වචනයක් තියෙන්නේ වචනයේ අදහස් අල්ලන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජ නමුත්, පිටිපස්සේ සිද්ධිය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා. මේ වැඩේදී, වචන විශේෂණ වැඩේ උදාහරණය ගන්න, අපි දෙන්න තීරණික විශ්ලේෂණයක් තියෙන්නේ අවස්ථාවක් වලින් වචන X වචන f(P(C.X)), කොහෙද C is a Contexts character, P(C.X) is the Conditial Sanbility Estimed from a text Corpus, and the Function f map the co අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ C සම්බන්ධ විශේෂය සහ f විශේෂයේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරය. අපි පැහැදිලි කරනවා හේතුවක් ඇයි සාමාන්\u200dය වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් තියෙන එකක් භාවිත කරන්න වඩා හොඳ ඒ වගේම, විශ්ලේෂණයේ අධික, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා ශූන්වත් සැකසුම් සැකසුම් ගැන සා', 'so': 'Ereyga lagugu soo celin karo marka uu ku jiro hadal kale, waa qaab faa’iido ah in lagu qabto micnihiisa ereyga. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, fikrada dib ku jirta waxay noqotaa dhibaato. Shaqoonkan, tusaale ahaan shaqo fasax ah, waxaynu ku siinaynaa baaritaan theoretical ah oo ka mid ah qaababka ay ka muuqato eray X oo ku qoran fursad f(C)), meesha C ku yaala xaraf hoose, P(C.).X) waa suurtagalka ku habboon oo laga qiimeeyay qoraal, oo nafsaddiisa f wuxuu karaa qiyaastii la soconayo oo la mid ah. Waxaynu baaraynaa saamaynta kooxda C iyo waxqabadka f. Sidoo kale waxaynu u caddaynaynaa sababaha lagu isticmaalayo xaaladaha isku jirka ah oo ay leeyihiin noocyo kala duduwan in ay ka wanaagsan yihiin isticmaalka hal keliya. Intaas waxaa dheer oo lagu saleynayo baaritaanka, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa fikir ku saabsan suurtagalka xaaladaha ah oo ku saabsan dhacdooyinka nuurka ah.', 'sv': 'Att representera ett ord genom dess samtidigheter med andra ord i sammanhanget är ett effektivt sätt att fånga betydelsen av ordet. Teorin bakom är dock fortfarande en utmaning. I detta arbete, med exempel på en ordklassificeringsuppgift, ger vi en teoretisk analys av de tillvägagångssätt som representerar ett ord X med en funktion f(C|X)), där C är en sammanhangsfunktion, P(C|X) är den villkorliga sannolikheten uppskattad från en textkorpus, och funktionen f mappar samförekomstmåttet till en prediktionspoäng. Vi undersöker effekten av sammanhangsfunktionen C och funktionen f. Vi förklarar också varför det kan vara bättre att använda samtidiga händelser med flera sammanhangsfunktioner än att bara använda en enda. Dessutom föreslår vi utifrån analysen en hypotes om villkorlig sannolikhet för nollsannolikhetshändelser.', 'no': 'Dette er ein effektiv måte å henta betydninga til ordet ved sammenhendingar med andre ord i kontekst. Teorien bak er imidlertid eit utfordring. I denne arbeida, med å ta eksempel på eit ordklassifikasjonsprogrammet, gir vi ein teoretisk analyse av tilnærmingane som representerer eit ord X med ein funksjon f(P(C.X)), der C er ein kontekstfunksjon, er P(C.X) den betydelige sannsynligheten estimert frå ein tekstkorpus, og funksjonen f karterer samtidige målet til eit forhåndsvising. Vi undersøker effekten av kontekstfunksjonen C og funksjonen f . Vi forklarer også grunnene til at sammenhendingane med fleire kontekstfunksjonar kan vera bedre enn berre bruk ein enkel. I tillegg, basert på analysen, foreslår vi ein hipotese om den kondicionale sannsynligheten på null sannsynlighetsbehandlingane.', 'ta': 'வார்த்தையின் அர்த்தத்தை பிடிக்க ஒரு வார்த்தையை அதன் இணைப்பு நிகழ்வுடன் மற்ற வார்த்தைகளுடன் பதில் அளிக்கும். எனினும், பின்னால் இருக்கும் நிகழ்ச்சி ஒரு சவாலாக இருக்கிறது. இந்த வேலையில், ஒரு வார்த்தை வகைப்படுத்தும் பணியை எடுத்துக்காட்டாக எடுத்துக்காட்டினால், நாம் ஒரு செயல்பாடு F(C)(X)-ல் ஒரு செயல்பாட்டை குறிப்பிடும் முன்னோட்டத்திற்கு ஒரு செயல்பாட்டை X(C)) என் C மற்றும் f-ன் செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவுகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம். நாம் ஏன் நிகழ்வுகளை பயன்படுத்தி பல குணங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் என்று காரணங்களை விளக்குகிறோம் ஒரு தனியை பயன்படுத்துவத மேலும், ஆராய்ச்சியை அடிப்படையில், நாம் பூஜ்ஜியமான சாத்தியமான நிகழ்வுகள் பற்றி ஒரு கூட்டத்திற்கு ஒரு கூட்டத்த', 'ur': 'اس کے ساتھ دوسرے کلمات کے ساتھ ایک کلمات کی تصویر کرنا ایک عمدہ طریقہ ہے کہ کلمات کا مطلب پکڑے۔ لیکن پیچھے کی نظریہ ایک چال ہے۔ اس کام میں، ایک کلیفوں کے کلیفوں کا مثال لیتے ہیں، ہم ایک نظریہ تحلیل دیتے ہیں جو ایک فنقش f(P(C.X) کے ذریعہ ایک کلیفوں X کے ذریعہ ایک کلیفوں کے ذریعہ ہے، جہاں C ایک کنٹیفوں کا فیصلہ ہے، P(C.X) ایک ٹیکس کورپوس سے مقرر ہونے والی احتمال ہے، اور فنقش f نے ایک پیش بینی کا اندازہ مقرر کیا ہے. ہم کانٹسٹ فوکیٹ سی اور فوکیٹ F کے تاثیر کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں . ہم نے بھی واضح کردیا ہے کیونکہ بہت سی کنٹکس ویٹیوں کے ساتھ اتفاقات کا استعمال کرنا صرف ایک استعمال سے بہتر ہو سکتا ہے۔ اس کے علاوہ، تحلیل پر بنیاد ہے، ہم صفر احتمال حادثہ کے بارے میں ایک فرضی پیش کریں گے.', 'vi': 'Thay mặt một từ bằng sự đối tác với những từ khác trong ngữ cảnh là một cách hiệu quả để nắm bắt ý nghĩa của từ này. Tuy nhiên, giả thuyết đằng sau vẫn là thách thức. Trong công việc này, lấy ví dụ của một nhiệm vụ phân loại từ, chúng tôi cung cấp một phân tích lý thuyết về các phương pháp đại diện một từ X bằng một hàm f(P(P(C d d. 124X) khi C là một tính năng ngữ cảnh, P(C. d. 124X) là khả năng xác suất điều kiện được đánh giá từ một tập thể văn bản, và hàm của bản đồ kích thước đồng phát ra thành một điểm dự đoán. Chúng tôi điều tra tác động của tính năng C ngữ cảnh và chức năng f. Chúng tôi cũng giải thích lý do tại sao sử dụng các đối tượng khớp với nhiều tính năng ngữ cảnh có thể tốt hơn chỉ sử dụng một lần. Ngoài ra, dựa trên các phân tích, chúng tôi đề xuất một giả thuyết về khả năng xác suất phụ thuộc vào trường hợp ngẫu nhiên không.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Lekin, tezasi esa murakkab bo'ladi. Bu vazifanda, bir so'zni classiflash vazifasi masalan, biz X funksiyasini f(C)- funksiyatidan foydalanuvchi sonlarning teoretikal analytikini anglatamiz. C (C)- muhit moslamasi, P(C),. X - matn funksiyasidan muhimlik, va predikt qiymatidan bir xil bo'lgan chegaraga qaraydi. C va f funksiyasining natijasini o'rganimiz. Biz bir necha xil xususiyatlar bilan bir necha xil xususiyatlarni ishlatish mumkin, biz bir narsa ishlatishdan yaxshi bo'lishi mumkin. In addition, based on the analysis, we propose a hypothesis about the conditional probability on zero probability events.", 'bg': 'Представянето на една дума чрез съвпадението й с други думи в контекста е ефективен начин за улавяне на значението на думата. Теорията зад нея обаче остава предизвикателство. В тази работа, като вземем пример за задача за класификация на думи, даваме теоретичен анализ на подходите, които представляват думата Х чрез функция където С е контекстна характеристика, П(С|Х) е условната вероятност, оценена от текстов корпус, а функцията е картографира мярката за съвместно възникване до прогнозен резултат. Изследваме въздействието на контекстната характеристика С и функцията е . Също така обясняваме причините, поради които използването на съвпадения с множество контекстни функции може да бъде по-добре, отколкото просто използването на една. Освен това, въз основа на анализа, предлагаме хипотеза за условната вероятност на събития с нулева вероятност.', 'hr': 'Predstavljanje riječi s drugim riječima u kontekstu je učinkovit način da se uhvati smisao riječi. Međutim, teorija iza toga ostaje izazov. U ovom poslu, uzimajući primjer zadatka klasifikacije riječi, dajemo teoretsku analizu pristupa koji predstavljaju riječ X funkcijom f(P.C.X)), gdje je C kontekstska funkcija, P(C.X) je uvjetna vjerojatnost procijenjena iz tekstnog korpusa, a funkcija f mapira mjeru saradnje prema predviđanju. Istražujemo utjecaj kontekstske funkcije C i funkcije f . Također objašnjavamo razloge zašto korištenje saradnje s višestrukim kontekstskim karakteristikama može biti bolje nego samo korištenje jednog. Osim toga, na temelju analize, predlažemo hipotezu o uvjetnoj vjerojatnosti o nulim događajima vjerojatnosti.', 'da': 'At repræsentere et ord ved dets samtidige forekomster med andre ord i kontekst er en effektiv måde at fange ordets betydning på. Men teorien bag er fortsat en udfordring. I dette arbejde giver vi en teoretisk analyse af de tilgange, der repræsenterer et ord X ved en funktion f(C|X)), hvor C er en kontekstfunktion, P(C|X) er den betingede sandsynlighed estimeret fra et tekstkorpus, og funktionen f kortlægger samtidig forekomstmålingen til en forudsigelsespoäng. Vi undersøger effekten af kontekst funktion C og funktionen f . Vi forklarer også årsagerne til, at brug af samtidige forekomster med flere kontekstfunktioner kan være bedre end blot at bruge en enkelt. Derudover foreslår vi, baseret på analysen, en hypotese om den betingede sandsynlighed for nul sandsynlighed begivenheder.', 'nl': 'Het vertegenwoordigen van een woord door zijn co-voorkomen met andere woorden in context is een effectieve manier om de betekenis van het woord vast te leggen. De theorie erachter blijft echter een uitdaging. In dit werk geven we, aan het voorbeeld van een woordclassificatietaak, een theoretische analyse van de benaderingen die een woord X vertegenwoordigen door een functie f(P(C|X)), waarbij C een contextkenmerk is, P(C|X) de voorwaardelijke waarschijnlijkheid is geschat uit een tekstcorpus, en de functie f de co-incident maat toewijst aan een voorspellingsscore. We onderzoeken de impact van contextfunctie C en de functie f. We leggen ook de redenen uit waarom het gebruik van co-incidents met meerdere contextfuncties beter kan zijn dan alleen het gebruik van één enkele. Daarnaast stellen we op basis van de analyse een hypothese voor over de voorwaardelijke waarschijnlijkheid op zero waarschijnlijkheid gebeurtenissen.', 'de': 'Die Repräsentation eines Wortes durch seine Ko-Vorkommen mit anderen Wörtern im Kontext ist eine effektive Möglichkeit, die Bedeutung des Wortes zu erfassen. Die Theorie dahinter bleibt jedoch eine Herausforderung. In dieser Arbeit, am Beispiel einer Wortklassifikationsaufgabe, geben wir eine theoretische Analyse der Ansätze, die ein Wort X durch eine Funktion f(P(C|X)) repräsentieren, wobei C ein Kontextmerkmal ist, P(C|X) die bedingte Wahrscheinlichkeit ist, die aus einem Textkorpus geschätzt wird, und die Funktion f das Koexistenzmaß einem Vorhersagescore zuordnet. Wir untersuchen die Auswirkungen von Kontextmerkmal C und der Funktion f. Wir erläutern auch die Gründe, warum die Verwendung von Co-Vorkommen mit mehreren Kontextfunktionen besser sein kann, als nur eine einzige. Darüber hinaus schlagen wir basierend auf der Analyse eine Hypothese über die bedingte Wahrscheinlichkeit von Nullwahrscheinlichkeitsereignissen vor.', 'ko': '상하문에서 다른 단어와 함께 표현함으로써 한 단어를 나타내는 것은 단어의 의미를 효과적으로 얻는 방법이다.그러나 배후의 이론은 여전히 도전이다.이 작업에서 우리는 하나의 단어 분류 임무를 예로 들어 함수 f(P(C | X)로 단어 X를 나타내는 방법을 이론적으로 분석했다. 그 중에서 C는 상하문 특징이고 P(C | X)는 텍스트 자료 라이브러리에서 추정되는 조건 확률로 함수 f는 공현도량을 예측 점수에 비추었다.우리는 상하문 특징 C와 함수 f의 영향을 연구했다.우리는 또 왜 여러 개의 상하문 특징을 사용하는 것이 한 개의 상하문 특징만 사용하는 것보다 더 좋은지 설명했다.그 밖에 분석을 토대로 우리는 제로 확률 사건의 조건 확률 가설을 제기했다.', 'id': 'Mempersembahkan kata dengan korespondensi dengan kata lain dalam konteks adalah cara yang efektif untuk menangkap arti kata. Namun, teori di belakang tetap tantangan. Dalam pekerjaan ini, mengambil contoh dari tugas klasifikasi kata, kita memberikan analisis teori pendekatan yang mewakili kata X dengan fungsi f(P(C[UNK]X)), di mana C adalah fitur konteks, P(C[UNK]X) adalah kemungkinan syarat yang diharapkan dari sebuah corpus teks, dan fungsi f memetakan ukuran korespondensi ke skor prediksi. Kami menyelidiki dampak dari fitur konteks C dan fungsi f . Kami juga menjelaskan alasan mengapa menggunakan korespondensi dengan karakteristik konteks berbilang mungkin lebih baik daripada menggunakan satu. Selain itu, berdasarkan analisis, kami mengusulkan hipotesis tentang kemungkinan syarat pada kejadian kemungkinan nol.', 'fa': 'نمایش یک کلمه توسط اتفاقات همکاری با کلمه های دیگر در محیط یک راه موثر برای گرفتن معنی کلمه است. با این حال، نظریه پشت آن یک چالش باقی مانده است. در این کار، برای مثال یک وظیفه\u200cی کلمه\u200cی کلمه\u200cی گرانیش کلمه، ما تحلیل نظریه\u200cای از نزدیک\u200cها را می\u200cدهیم که کلمه\u200cی X را توسط یک وظیفه f(P(C.X)، جایی که C یک وضعیت محیط است، P(C.X) احتمال محیط محیط است که از یک کورپوس متن محیط می\u200cشود، و فعالیت f نقشه\u200cی اندازه\u200cی همکاری ما تحقيق تاثير ويژه سي و فعاليت f را انجام ميديم . ما همچنین دلایل\u200cهایی را توضیح می\u200cدهیم که برای استفاده از اتفاقات همکاری با ویژه\u200cهای متنوع بهتر از استفاده از یک تن باشد. در addition, based on the analysis, we propose a hypothesis about the conditional probability on zero probability events.', 'sw': 'Akijibu neno kwa matukio yake yanayotokana na maneno mengine katika muktadha huo ni njia yenye ufanisi ya kutambua maana ya neno. Hata hivyo, nadharia ya nyuma bado inabaki kuwa changamoto. Katika kazi hii, kwa mfano wa kazi ya kutangaza maneno, tunatoa uchambuzi wa nadharia wa mbinu zinazoonyesha neno X kwa функсия f(P(C)), ambapo C ni utaratibu wa muktadha, P(C.).X) ni uwezekano wa mazingira yanayokadiriwa kutoka kwenye makampuni ya maandishi, na function f anaramani hatua ya pamoja ya kutabiri. Tunachunguza madhara ya muktadha wa C na kazi ya f . Tunaweza pia kuelezea sababu kwa nini kutumia matukio yanayotokea pamoja na tabia mbalimbali za muktadha inaweza kuwa bora kuliko kutumia moja tu. Zaidi ya hayo, kwa kuzingatia uchambuzi, tunapendekeza nadharia inayohusu uwezekano wa hali halisi wa matukio yasiyo na uwezekano.', 'sq': 'Përfaqja e një fjale nga bashkëndodhjet e saj me fjalë të tjera në kontekst është një mënyrë efektive për të kapur kuptimin e fjalës. However, the theory behind remains a challenge.  Në këtë punë, duke marrë shembullin e një detyre klasifikimi të fjalëve, ne japim një analizë teorike të qasjeve që përfaqësojnë një fjalë X nga një funksion f(P(C[UNK]X)), ku C është një funksion konteksti, P(C[UNK]X) është probabiliteti kushtuese vlerësuar nga një korpus teksti, dhe funksioni f harton masën e bashkëndodhjes në një pikë parashikimi. Ne hetojmë ndikimin e elementit kontekst C dhe funksionin f . Ne shpjegojmë gjithashtu arsyet pse përdorimi i bashkëndodhjeve me karakteristika të shumta konteksti mund të jetë më i mirë se përdorimi i vetëm një. Përveç kësaj, bazuar në analizë, ne propozojmë një hipotezë rreth probabilitetit kushtetues në ngjarjet zero probabiliteti.', 'tr': 'Başga sözleriň daşlygy bilen bir sözü täze etmek sözleriniň a ňladygyny laňlamak üçin täsirli bir ýoldur. Ýöne arkadaky teoriýa kynçylyk bolup dur. Bu işde, sözleriň klasifikasy täbligini örneşine görä, biz X sözleriň f(P(C.X)) funksiýasynda möhüm bolan metodlaryň teoriýaly analýşini verip, bu ýerde C kontekst özellikleridir, P(C.X) metin korpusundan değerlendirilen mümkinçilik mümkinçiligidir we f funksiýasynyň sahypasyny tahmin et sanatyna görýär. Biz C we f funksiýasynyň täsirini barlaýarys. Biz hem birnäçe kontekst özellikleri bilen nusgalary ulanmakyň bir ýeke ulanmakdan has gowy bolmagyny düşündiris. Ayrıca, analiziye dayanan, şartlı olası hakkında şartlı olası hakkında bir hipotezi teklif ediyoruz.', 'af': "Die voorstel van 'n woord deur sy samewerkoms met ander woorde in konteks is 'n effektief manier om die betekenis van die woord te vang. Maar die teorie agter bly 'n uitdaging. In hierdie werk, neem die voorbeeld van 'n woord klasifikasie taak, gee ons 'n teorieese analisie van die toegang wat 'n woord X verteenwoordig deur' n funksie f(P(C.X)), waar C is 'n konteks funksie, P(C.X) is die voorwaardige waarskynlikheid gespesifiseer van 'n teks korpus, en die funksie f kaart die koeveurkunde maat na' n voorskynlikskouer. Ons ondersoek die effek van konteks funksie C en die funksie f . Ons verduidelik ook die redes waarom die samekoms met veelvuldige konteksfunksies gebruik kan wees beter as net 'n enkele een gebruik. In addition, based on the analysis, we propose a hypothesis about the conditional probability on zero probability events.", 'am': 'ቃሉን በመስጠት በተግባር በሌላ ቃላት በመስጠት በመስጠት የቃልን ማህበረሰብ ጥሩ ነው፡፡ እንግዲህ በኋላው የነበረው ታሪዮው የጥላቻ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ ውስጥ ቃላትን መግለጫ ምሳሌ ለመያዝ፣ የX ቃላትን በфунксия (P(C)፣ X በሚያሳየው አካባቢ፣ C (C)፣ የጽሑፍ ኮንፕስ የሚቆጠር የግንኙነት ግንኙነት እና ፍቃዱ የፍጥረት ክፍል ለትንቢት ክፍል ነው፡፡ የሥርዓት ግንኙነት C እና функсия እናም የምናብራራው ምክንያት፣ ሁኔታዊውን በመቀበል በብዛት የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ከአንዲት አንዲት ጥያቄ ከመጠቀም የበለጠ ሊሆን ይችላል፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ በአካባቢው ግንኙነት በ0 ምናልባት ሁኔታ ላይ የተመሳሳይን ጉዳይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Representing a word by its co-occurrences with other words in context is an effective way to capture the meaning of the word.  Այնուամենայնիվ, հետևի տեսությունը դեռևս մարտահրավեր է: Այս աշխատանքում, վերցնելով բառի դասակարգման առաջադրանքի օրինակը, մենք տալիս ենք տեսական վերլուծություն այն մոտեցումներից, որոնք X բառը ներկայացնում են f(P(C):X) ֆունկցիայի միջոցով, որտեղ C-ը կոնտեքստի հատկություն է, P(C):X-ը թեքստի կորպոսից հաշվարկված պայմանական հավանականությունն է, և f-ը քարտեզագրում է համապատասխան Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք C-ի և f-ի կոնտեքստի ազդեցությունը: Մենք նաև բացատրում ենք պատճառները, թե ինչու օգտագործել բազմաթիվ կոնտեքստի հատկությունների հետ համապատասխանատվությունները կարող է ավելի լավ լինել, քան միայն մեկ հատկություն օգտագործելը: Ավելին, հիմնված վերլուծության վրա, մենք առաջարկում ենք հիպոթեզի զրո հավանականության դեպքերի պայմանավոր հավանականության մասին:', 'bn': 'অন্যান্য শব্দের সাথে একটি শব্দ প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রতিক্রিয়া হচ্ছে শব্দের অর্থ গ্রহণের একটি কার্যকর উপায়। তবে পেছনের তত্ত্বাবধান একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ। এই কাজে একটি শব্দ বিভক্ত কাজের উদাহরণ নিয়ে আমরা একটি ততিত্ত্বিক বিশ্লেষণ দিচ্ছি যা একটি ফাংশন ফাংশনের মাধ্যমে এক্সের প্রতিনিধিত্ব করে একটি শব্দ (P(C)(X)), যেখানে C একটি কন্টেক্সটেক্সট বৈশিষ্ট্য, পি(C)-X) একটি টে আমরা প্রসঙ্গের বৈশিষ্ট্য সি এবং ফাংশন ফাংশনের প্রভাব তদন্ত করি। আমরা একই সাথে ব্যাখ্যা করি কেন এই সংঘর্ষের সাথে বিভিন্ন কন্টেক্সটেক্সট ব্যবহার করা যাচ্ছে তা কেন একটা ব্যবহার করার চ In addition, based on the analysis, we propose a hypothesis about the conditional probability on zero probability events.', 'bs': 'Predstavljanje riječi njegovim saradnjima s drugim riječima u kontekstu je efikasan način da se uhvati smisao riječi. Međutim, teorija iza toga ostaje izazov. U ovom poslu, uzimajući primjer zadatka klasifikacije riječi, dajemo teoretičku analizu pristupa koje predstavljaju riječ X funkcijom f(P(C.X)), gdje je C kontekstska karakteristika, P(C.X) je uvjetna verovatnoća procjenjena iz tekstnog korpusa, a funkcija f mapira mjeru saradnje prema predviđanju. Istražujemo uticaj konteksta C i funkcije f . Također objašnjavamo razloge zašto korištenje saradnje sa višestrukim kontekstskim karakteristikama može biti bolje nego samo korištenje jednog. Osim toga, na temelju analize, predlažemo hipotezu o uvjetnoj vjerojatnosti o nuloj verovatnoj događaji.', 'ca': "Representing a word by its co-occurrences with other words in context is an effective way to capture the meaning of the word.  Però la teoria darrera encara és un repte. En aquesta feina, prenent l'exemple d'una tasca de classificació de paraules, donem una anàlisi teòrica dels enfocaments que representen una paraula X per una funció f(P(C[UNK]X)), on C és una característica contextual, P(C[UNK]X) és la probabilitat condicional estimada d'un cos de text, i la funció f mapeja la mesura de coincidència a una puntuació de predicció. We investigate the impact of context feature C and the function f .  També explicem les raons per les que utilitzar les coincidències amb múltiples característiques contextuals pot ser millor que utilitzar una sola. A més, basant-nos en l'anàlisi, proposem una hipòtesi sobre la probabilitat condicional en esdeveniments de probabilitat zero.", 'cs': 'Zastoupení slova společnými výskyty s jinými slovy v kontextu je účinným způsobem, jak zachytit význam slova. Teorie však zůstává výzvou. V této práci, na příkladu klasifikační úlohy slov, provedeme teoretickou analýzu přístupů, které reprezentují slovo X funkcí f(P(C|X)), kde C je kontextový prvek, P(C|X) je podmíněná pravděpodobnost odhadnutá z textového korpusu a funkce f mapuje míru současného výskytu k predikčnímu skóru. Zkoumáme vliv kontextového prvku C a funkce f. Vysvětlujeme také důvody, proč používání koexistencí s více kontextovými funkcemi může být lepší než použití jednoho. Navíc na základě analýzy navrhujeme hypotézu o podmíněné pravděpodobnosti událostí nulové pravděpodobnosti.', 'az': 'Sözünün başqa sözlərlə birlikdə bir sözü göstərmək, sözün anlamını almaq üçün effektiv bir yoldur. Ancaq arxandakı teorija səbəb həmişə qalır. Bu işdə, söz klasifikasiyasının məsəlinə bənzəyirik, biz X sözünü f ərqli f(P(C.X)-dən göstərən təriqətli analizi veririk, C məlumatların məlumatlarından tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərəfindən tərə Biz C və f funksiyasının təsirini incidirik . Biz də müxtəlif məlumatlarla birlikdə olanların istifadə etməsinin səbəblərini təkcə təkcə təkcə istifadə etməkdən daha yaxşı olaraq bildiririk. Əvvəlcə, analiziyə dayanan, sıfır olaraq mümkün olaraq şəkildə mümkün olaraq haqqında hipotezi təklif edirik.', 'et': 'Sõna esindamine koos teiste sõnadega kontekstis on tõhus viis sõna tähenduse kindlakstegemiseks. Kuid teooria taga jääb väljakutseks. Käesolevas töös, võttes näiteks sõna klassifitseerimise ülesande, anname teoreetilise analüüsi lähenemistest, mis esindavad sõna X funktsiooni f(P(C|X)), kus C on kontekstifunktsioon, P(C|X) on tekstikorpusest hinnatud tingimuslik tõenäosus ning funktsioon f kaardistab kaasesinemise mõõdu prognoosimisskooriga. Me uurime mõju konteksti funktsioon C ja funktsioon f . Samuti selgitame põhjuseid, miks mitme konteksti funktsiooniga samaaegsete esinemiste kasutamine võib olla parem kui lihtsalt ühe konteksti kasutamine. Lisaks pakume analüüsi põhjal välja hüpoteesi tingimusliku tõenäosuse kohta nulltõenäosuse sündmuste puhul.', 'fi': 'Sanan esittäminen sen rinnakkaiselolla muiden sanojen kanssa kontekstissa on tehokas tapa vangita sanan merkitys. Teoria taustalla on kuitenkin edelleen haaste. Tässä työssä annamme esimerkin sanaluokittelutehtävästä teoreettisen analyysin lähestymistavoista, jotka edustavat sanaa X funktiolla f(P(C|X)), jossa C on kontekstiominaisuus, P(C|X) on tekstikorpusesta arvioitu ehdollinen todennäköisyys ja funktio f kartoittaa rinnakkaisesiintymismittarin ennustepisteeksi. Tutkimme konteksti ominaisuus C ja funktio f . Selitämme myös syitä, miksi rinnakkaisesiintymien käyttäminen useiden kontekstitoimintojen kanssa voi olla parempi kuin vain yhden kontekstin käyttäminen. Lisäksi analyysin perusteella ehdotamme hypoteesia nollatodennäköisyystapahtumien ehdollisesta todennäköisyydestä.', 'jv': 'Ngubah awak dhéwé Nanging, theori sing paling apik dhéwé kuwi susahé. Nang iki trabah, ngilanggar sampek kelompok kelompok kelompok, kita enye theoretik ranjelisaké nggawe barang nggambar nggambar kelompok nggambar kelompok nggambar kelompok (P(C.X). Awak dhéwé nyokot cara nggawe barang tanggal "C" lan "f". Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih perusahaan nganggo sampek karo akeh sampek kapan kanggo masakno sing luwih apik. Nambah, digawe kang dipileksi, kita supoyo suposipun kanggo mulasakno perusahaan kanggo kowé operasi 0.', 'he': 'מייצג מילה על ידי התרחשות השותפות שלה עם מילים אחרות בקשר היא דרך יעילה לתפוס את המשמעות של המילה. However, the theory behind remains a challenge.  בעבודה הזאת, לוקחת דוגמא של משימה מסווג מילים, אנו נותנים ניתוח תיאורטי של הגישויים שמייצגים מילה X על ידי פונקציה f(P(C[UNK]X)), שבו C הוא תכונה קונטקסט, P(C[UNK]X) היא הסבירות המתנאי המערכת ממקורפוס טקסט, והפונקציה f מפה את מדידת התרחשות השותפת לתוצאה חיזוי. אנחנו חוקרים את ההשפעה של תכונת הקשר C והתפקיד f. אנחנו גם מסבירים את הסיבות למה להשתמש באירועים השותפים עם תכונות קונטקסט רבים יכול להיות יותר טוב מאשר להשתמש רק באחד. בנוסף, בהתבסס על הניתוח, אנו מציעים היפותזה על הסבירות המתנאי על אירועי סיכוי אפס.', 'ha': "Ka karɓa wani magana da ke haɗa shi da wasu kalmõmi, idan an haɗa shi, yana da wani amfani da yin gane maganar. Kayya, teorin bakin yana da wata rabo. A cikin wannan aikin, idan ka sami misãlin wani kalma mai rarraba kalma, sai Mu bãyar wani anayyari na theoreci na hanyõyi wanda ke gaya wata kalma X na da wani functional f(P(C)(X)), a inda C yana da wani muhimmi mai daidaita, P(C)¡X, yana da muhimmin muhimmada wanda aka ƙaddara daga wani nau'in matsayi na rubutu, kuma fassaran f yana karta matsayin da ke koma zuwa wani matsayi mai basĩri. Ina ƙidãya matsayin C da aikin f. Kayya, Munã bayyana saba ne don ka yi amfani da ko-komai da wasu misãlai masu yawa sun fi zama mafiya alhẽri daga amfani da guda guda. Da wannan, a kan da aka yi anadi, Munã buƙata wani misãlai na muhimmin halin a kan halin sifuri.", 'sk': 'Predstavljanje besede s sočasnim pojavom z drugimi besedami v kontekstu je učinkovit način za zajem pomena besede. Vendar pa teorija ostaja izziv. V tem delu na primer klasifikacijske naloge besed predstavljamo teoretično analizo pristopov, ki predstavljajo besedo X s funkcijo f(P(C|X)), kjer je C kontekstna značilnost, P(C|X) pogojna verjetnost ocenjena iz besedilnega korpusa, funkcija f pa kartira merilo soobstojnosti na oceno napovedi. Raziskujemo vpliv kontekstne funkcije C in funkcije f . Razložimo tudi razloge, zakaj je uporaba sočasnih pojavov z več kontekstnimi funkcijami morda boljša kot uporaba ene same. Poleg tega na podlagi analize predlagamo hipotezo o pogojni verjetnosti dogodkov ničelne verjetnosti.', 'bo': 'ཚིག་འདི་ཚིག་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཞན་པ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་ནི་སྒྲུབ་པའི་དོན་རྟགས་བཀོད་པའི་ཐོག་ལས། ཡིན་ནའང་དེའི་རྒྱབ་ལྗོངས་ཀྱི་གཞི་རྩལ་ནི་གདོང་ལེན་པ་ཞིག་རེད། In this work, taking the example of a word classification task, we give a theoretical analysis of the approaches that represent a word X by a function f(P(C.X)), where C is a context feature, P(C.X) is the conditional probability estimated from a text corpus, and the function f maps the co-occurrence measure to a prediction score. ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་དང་འགྲེལ་བཤད་པ་ཚོར་བརྟག་ཞིབ་བྱེད། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱད་པར་ཅིའི་རྒྱུ་མཚན་འདི་ཚོར་ཡུན་དག་ཕྱིར་སྤྱད་ནས་མཐུན་རྣམས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བེད་སྤྱོད་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ འོན་ཀྱང་། དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་གཞི་རྟེན་ཏེ། ང་ཚོས་གནས་སྟངས་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་ཚུལ་སྟོན་པར་བྱ་ཚུལ་དང་་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་སྐྱེ'}
{'en': 'Towards a unified framework for bilingual terminology extraction of single-word and multi-word terms', 'ar': 'نحو إطار موحد لاستخراج المصطلحات ثنائية اللغة للمصطلحات المكونة من كلمة واحدة ومتعددة الكلمات', 'pt': 'Em direção a uma estrutura unificada para extração de terminologia bilíngue de termos de uma e várias palavras', 'es': 'Hacia un marco unificado para la extracción terminológica bilingüe de términos de una sola palabra y de varias palabras', 'fr': "Vers un cadre unifié pour l'extraction terminologique bilingue de termes à un mot et à plusieurs mots", 'ja': '単語・多言語用語のバイリンガル用語抽出のための統一された枠組みを目指す', 'zh': '为单字与多字术语者双语术语取建立一框架', 'hi': 'एकल-शब्द और बहु-शब्द शब्दों के द्विभाषी शब्दावली निष्कर्षण के लिए एक एकीकृत ढांचे की ओर', 'ru': 'На пути к унифицированной структуре двуязычного терминологического извлечения однословных и многословных терминов', 'ga': 'I dtreo creata aontaithe chun téarmaíocht dhátheangach a bhaint as téarmaí aonfhocail agus ilfhocail', 'ka': 'ერთადერთი სტრუმენოლოგიის ექსტრაქციის ერთადერთი სიტყვა და მრავალური სიტყვა', 'el': 'Προς ένα ενοποιημένο πλαίσιο για δίγλωσση εξαγωγή ορολογίας μονολέξεων και πολυλέξεων όρων', 'it': "Verso un quadro unificato per l'estrazione terminologica bilingue di termini monoparola e multiparola", 'lt': 'Vieningos dvikalbės terminologijos ekstrahavimo vieno žodžio ir kelių žodžių terminų sistemos link', 'hu': 'Az egyszós és többszós kifejezések kétnyelvű terminológiai kinyerésének egységes keretrendszere felé', 'kk': 'Екі тілі терминология бір сөз мен көп сөз терминологиясын тарқату үшін біріктірілген фрейміне қарсы', 'mt': 'Lejn qafas unifikat għall-estrazzjoni tat-terminoloġija bilingwi ta’ termini b’kelma waħda u b’ħafna kliem', 'mk': 'За унифицирана рамка за двојјазична терминолошка екстракција на еднозборни и мултизборни термини', 'ms': 'Ke arah kerangka bersatu untuk ekstraksi terminologi bilingual bagi terma-kata tunggal dan berbilang-kata', 'mn': 'Хоёр хэл терминологийг нэг үг болон олон үг үгийг хадгалахын тулд', 'ro': 'Către un cadru unificat pentru extragerea terminologiei bilingve a termenilor cu un singur cuvânt și cu mai multe cuvinte', 'ml': 'ഒരൊറ്റ വാക്കും പല വാക്ക് വാക്കുകളും', 'sr': 'Do ujedinjenog okvira za izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije jednorečnih i višerečnih termina', 'pl': 'W kierunku ujednoliconych ram ekstrakcji dwujęzycznej terminologii pojedynczych i wielosłownych terminów', 'no': 'Gå til eit einaste rammeverk for utpakking av eit enkelt ord og fleire ord', 'so': 'Horay waxaa loogu talagalay firaaqad isku dayan oo la soo bixiyo qoraal keliya iyo hadal badan', 'sv': 'Mot en enhetlig ram för tvåspråkig terminologiutvinning av ett ord och flera ord', 'ta': 'தனிச்சொல் மற்றும் பல்வார்த்தைகளின் தனிப்படுத்தலுக்கு ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்ட சட்டம்', 'si': 'දෙවල් භාෂාවික ශ්\u200dරේෂාවිද්\u200dයාවයේ එකම වචනයක් සහ වචනයක් වර්තනයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා', 'ur': 'ایک کلمه اور بہت سی کلمات کی تعلیم دو زبان ترمینلوژی کے لئے ایک متحدہ فرم کی طرف', 'uz': "Bir so'z va ko'p so'zlar uchun ikkita tillar terminalologni ajratish uchun bir bir bir necha so'zlar", 'vi': 'Hướng tới một cơ sở thống nhất về việc chia sẻ thuật ngữ bằng một từ và nhiều từ.', 'bg': 'Към единна рамка за извличане на двуезична терминология на еднословни и многословни термини', 'hr': 'Prema ujedinjenom okviru za izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije jedne riječi i višeriječi', 'da': 'På vej mod en fælles ramme for tosproget terminologiudvinding af enkelt- og flerordsbegrænsninger', 'nl': 'Naar een uniform kader voor tweetalige terminologie extractie van termen uit één woord en meerdere woorden', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu einem einheitlichen Rahmen für die zweisprachige Terminologieextraktion von Ein- und Mehrwortbegriffen', 'ko': '이중 언어 용어 추출의 통일된 틀에 대한 연구', 'fa': 'به سمت یک چهارچوب متحد برای استخراج ترمینالوژی دو زبان از شرایط یک کلمه و چند کلمه', 'id': 'Menuju rangka yang bersatu untuk ekstraksi terminologi bilingual dari istilah-istilah satu-kata dan multi-kata', 'sw': 'Mpaka mfumo wa pamoja wa utekelezaji wa tamaduni za lugha mbili wa neno moja na maneno mengi', 'tr': 'Iki dilli terminologiýa ýeke söz we köp söz sözleriniň a çmaklygy üçin bir ýerleşdirilen bir çerçewde', 'sq': 'Për një kuadër të unifikuar për nxjerrjen e terminologjisë dygjuhe të termave me fjalë të vetme dhe me fjalë të shumta', 'af': "Gaan teen 'n eeneenvoudige raamwerk vir twee lengte terminologie uittrekking van eenwoord en multiwoord terme", 'am': 'በሁለት ቋንቋዎች ተርሚኖጂ እና በብዙ ቃላት ለማውጣት', 'hy': 'Առաջ երկլեզու տերմինոլոգիայի միավոր կառուցվածքի մեկբառի և բազբառի տերմինոլոգիայի վերացման համար', 'bn': 'একক শব্দ এবং বহুশবাক্যের শর্তের জন্য দুই ভাষার টার্মিনোলজি বের করার একটি একত্রিত ফ্রেম', 'bs': 'ka jedinstvenom okviru za izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije jedne riječi i više riječi', 'az': 'İki dil terminoloji tək sözlərin və çox sözlərin çıxarılması üçün birləşdirilmiş bir framework ə tərəf', 'cs': 'Směrem k jednotnému rámci pro extrakci dvojjazyčné terminologie jednoslovných a víceslovních termínů', 'ca': "Vers un marc unificat per a l'extracció bilingüe de termes d'una sola paraula i de múltiples paraules", 'et': 'Ühtse raamistiku suunas ühe- ja mitmesõnaliste terminoloogia väljatõmbamiseks', 'fi': 'Kohti yhtenäistä kehystä yhden ja useamman sanan termien kaksikieliselle poimimiselle', 'ha': 'Sama wani firam mai haɗa wa cire-aiki na biyu-lugha na cire-magana guda da multi-word', 'sk': 'K enotnemu okviru za dvojezično pridobivanje terminologije enobesednih in večbesednih izrazov', 'he': 'לכיוון מסגרת מאוחדת להוציא טרמינולוגיה שתיים לשונות של מילים אחת ומילים רבות', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག', 'jv': 'word'}
{'en': 'Extracting a bilingual terminology for multi-word terms from comparable corpora has not been widely researched. In this work we propose a unified framework for aligning bilingual terms independently of the term lengths. We also introduce some enhancements to the context-based and the neural network based approaches. Our experiments show the effectiveness of our enhancements of previous works and the system can be adapted in specialized domains.', 'ar': 'لم يتم البحث على نطاق واسع في استخراج المصطلحات ثنائية اللغة للمصطلحات متعددة الكلمات من مجموعات مماثلة. في هذا العمل نقترح إطار عمل موحد لمحاذاة المصطلحات ثنائية اللغة بشكل مستقل عن أطوال المصطلح. نقدم أيضًا بعض التحسينات على النهج القائم على السياق والشبكة العصبية. تُظهر تجاربنا فاعلية التحسينات التي أجريناها على الأعمال السابقة ويمكن تكييف النظام في مجالات متخصصة.', 'es': 'No se ha investigado ampliamente la extracción de una terminología bilingüe para términos de varias palabras de corpus comparables. En este trabajo proponemos un marco unificado para alinear los términos bilingües independientemente de la duración de los términos. También introducimos algunas mejoras en los enfoques basados en el contexto y en las redes neuronales. Nuestros experimentos muestran la eficacia de nuestras mejoras de trabajos anteriores y el sistema se puede adaptar en dominios especializados.', 'fr': "L'extraction d'une terminologie bilingue pour des termes comportant plusieurs mots à partir de corpus comparables n'a pas fait l'objet de nombreuses recherches. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un cadre unifié pour aligner les termes bilingues indépendamment de la durée des trimestres. Nous apportons également quelques améliorations aux approches basées sur le contexte et les réseaux de neurones. Nos expériences montrent l'efficacité de nos améliorations des travaux précédents et le système peut être adapté dans des domaines spécialisés.", 'pt': 'Extrair uma terminologia bilíngue para termos de várias palavras de corpora comparáveis não foi amplamente pesquisado. Neste trabalho propomos uma estrutura unificada para alinhar termos bilíngues independentemente dos comprimentos dos termos. Também introduzimos algumas melhorias nas abordagens baseadas em contexto e nas redes neurais. Nossos experimentos mostram a eficácia de nossos aprimoramentos de trabalhos anteriores e o sistema pode ser adaptado em domínios especializados.', 'ja': '類似するコーラから多言語用語のバイリンガル用語を抽出することは、広く研究されていない。この研究では、用語の長さとは無関係にバイリンガル用語を整列させるための統一されたフレームワークを提案します。また、コンテキストベースのアプローチとニューラルネットワークベースのアプローチにいくつかの強化を導入します。私たちの実験は、以前の作品の強化の有効性を示しており、システムは専門領域に適応することができます。', 'zh': '取可较之语料库多词术语者双语术语未得博究。 于是建一统之框架,以立于术语长以齐双语术语。 上下文基于神经网络。 吾实验明吾所以增益前有效性,而统可以调于专域也。', 'hi': 'तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट से बहु-शब्द शब्दों के लिए एक द्विभाषी शब्दावली निकालने पर व्यापक रूप से शोध नहीं किया गया है। इस काम में हम शब्द लंबाई से स्वतंत्र रूप से द्विभाषी शब्दों को संरेखित करने के लिए एक एकीकृत रूपरेखा का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम संदर्भ-आधारित और तंत्रिका नेटवर्क आधारित दृष्टिकोणों के लिए कुछ संवर्द्धन भी पेश करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगपिछले कार्यों के हमारे संवर्द्धन की प्रभावशीलता दिखाते हैं और सिस्टम को विशेष डोमेन में अनुकूलित किया जा सकता है।', 'ru': 'Извлечение двуязычной терминологии для многословных терминов из сопоставимых корпусов не было широко исследовано. В этой работе мы предлагаем унифицированную структуру для выравнивания двуязычных терминов независимо от длины терминов. Мы также вносим некоторые улучшения в контекстно-ориентированные и нейросетевые подходы. Наши эксперименты показывают эффективность наших улучшений предыдущих работ, и система может быть адаптирована в специализированных областях.', 'ga': 'Ní dhearnadh mórán taighde ar théarmaíocht dhátheangach a bhaint as téarmaí ilfhoclacha ó chorpas inchomparáide. San obair seo molaimid creat aontaithe chun téarmaí dátheangacha a ailíniú go neamhspleách ar fhad na dtéarmaí. Tugaimid isteach freisin roinnt feabhsuithe ar an gcur chuige comhthéacs-bhunaithe agus an líonra néar-bhunaithe. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh éifeachtacht ár bhfeabhsuithe ar shaothar roimhe seo agus is féidir an córas a oiriúnú i sainréimsí.', 'ka': 'მრავალური სიტყვებისთვის ორიენგური ტერმინოლოგიის გამოყენება შემდგომარებელი კორპორაზე არ აღმოჩენა. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ერთადერთი ფრამეტრი, რომელიც ორიენგური სიტყვების განსაზღვრებად განსაზღვრებული სიტყვების განმავლობაში. ჩვენ ასევე კონტექსტური დაბათებული და ნეიროლური ქსელის დაბათებული მიღებებისთვის დავიყენებთ. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენი წინა სამუშაო მუშაობის ეფექტიურობა და სისტემის შესაძლებელია დააპექტირება სპექციალური სამუშაოში.', 'el': 'Η εξαγωγή μιας δίγλωσσης ορολογίας για όρους πολλαπλών λέξεων από συγκρίσιμα σώματα δεν έχει ερευνηθεί ευρέως. Στην εργασία αυτή προτείνουμε ένα ενιαίο πλαίσιο ευθυγράμμισης δίγλωσσων όρων ανεξάρτητα από τα μήκη των όρων. Επίσης εισάγουμε κάποιες βελτιώσεις στις προσεγγίσεις που βασίζονται στο πλαίσιο και στις προσεγγίσεις του νευρικού δικτύου. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν την αποτελεσματικότητα των βελτιώσεων των προηγούμενων εργασιών μας και το σύστημα μπορεί να προσαρμοστεί σε εξειδικευμένους τομείς.', 'hu': 'A többszós kifejezések kétnyelvű terminológiájának kivonását hasonló corporákból nem kutatták széles körben. Ebben a munkában egységes keretrendszert javasolunk a kétnyelvű kifejezések összehangolására, a kifejezések hosszától függetlenül. Bemutatunk néhány fejlesztést a kontextus alapú és neurális hálózat alapú megközelítésekben is. Kísérleteink megmutatják korábbi munkáink fejlesztéseinek hatékonyságát és a rendszer speciális területeken adaptálható.', 'kk': 'Көп сөз терминологиясын салыстыруға арналған корпорадан екі тілді терминология тарқату үшін көпшілік зерттеулі жоқ. Бұл жұмыс ішінде біріктірілген фреймді терминнің ұзындығынан тәуелсіз түрлендіру үшін біріктірілген фреймді таңдаймыз. Біз сондай-ақ контексті негіздеген және невралдық желінің негіздеген кейбір жақсартуларын таңдаймыз. Біздің тәжірибеміз алдыңғы жұмыстардың көтеріліктеріміздің эффективнігін көрсетеді, жүйеңіз арнаулы доменге адаптациялануға болады.', 'it': "Estrarre una terminologia bilingue per termini multi-parola da corpora comparabili non è stato ampiamente ricercato. In questo lavoro proponiamo un quadro unificato per allineare i termini bilingui indipendentemente dalla lunghezza dei termini. Introduciamo anche alcuni miglioramenti agli approcci basati sul contesto e sulla rete neurale. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano l'efficacia dei nostri miglioramenti di lavori precedenti e il sistema può essere adattato in domini specializzati.", 'lt': 'Dviejų žodžių terminologijos ištraukimas iš panašios korpros nebuvo išsamiai tirtas. In this work we propose a unified framework for aligning bilingual terms independently of the term lengths.  We also introduce some enhancements to the context-based and the neural network based approaches.  Mūsų eksperimentai rodo mūsų ankstesnių darbų tobulinimo veiksmingumą ir sistema gali būti pritaikyta specializuotose srityse.', 'mk': 'Екстракцијата на двојјазична терминологија за мултизборни термини од споредливи тела не е широко истражена. Во оваа работа предлагаме обединета рамка за усогласување на двојјазичните термини независно од должината на терминот. Ние, исто така, воведуваме некои подобрувања на контекстните и неуралните мрежни пристапи. Нашите експерименти покажуваат ефикасност на нашите подобрувања на претходните дела и системот може да се адаптира во специјализирани домени.', 'ms': 'Mengekstrak terminologi dua bahasa untuk terma berbilang-kata dari korpra yang boleh dibandingkan belum diperiksa secara luas. Dalam kerja ini kami cadangan bersatu untuk menyesuaikan term a dua bahasa secara independen dari panjang terma. Kami juga memperkenalkan beberapa peningkatan kepada pendekatan berdasarkan konteks dan rangkaian saraf berdasarkan. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan keefektivitas peningkatan kerja sebelumnya dan sistem boleh disesuaikan dalam domain khusus.', 'mt': 'L-estrazzjoni ta’ terminoloġija bilingwi għal termini b’ħafna kliem minn korpra komparabbli ma ġietx studjata b’mod wiesa’. In this work we propose a unified framework for aligning bilingual terms independently of the term lengths.  Inintroduċu wkoll xi titjib fl-approċċi bbażati fuq il-kuntest u n-netwerk newrali. L-esperimenti tagħna juru l-effettività tat-titjib tagħna tax-xogħlijiet preċedenti u s-sistema tista’ tiġi adattata f’oqsma speċjalizzati.', 'pl': 'Wyodrębnienie dwujęzycznej terminologii dla wielosłownych terminów z porównywalnych korpusów nie zostało szeroko zbadane. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy ujednolicone ramy dostosowania terminów dwujęzycznych niezależnie od długości terminów. Wprowadzamy również pewne ulepszenia podejścia kontekstowego i sieci neuronowej. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują skuteczność naszych ulepszeń poprzednich prac i system może być dostosowany do specjalistycznych dziedzin.', 'no': 'Utpakking av eit bilinguelt terminologi for fleire ord-terminar frå sammenlignbare korpora er ikkje veldig forsøkt. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit einaste rammeverk for å justera bilinguelt uttrykk uavhengig av terminlengda. Vi introduserer også nokre forbedringar til kontekstbaserte og nøyralnettverksbaserte tilnærmingar. Eksperimentane våre viser effektiviteten av våre forbedringar av tidlegare arbeid og systemet kan tilpassast i spesialiserte domene.', 'ml': 'ഒരു രണ്ടു ഭാഷ ടെര്\u200dമിനിലോളജി പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നത് തുല്യമായ കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയില്\u200d നിന്നും പല വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ നീളം സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായി രണ്ടു ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉയര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിനായി ഒരു യൂണിക് നമ്മള്\u200d കുറച്ച് മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലികളുടെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ ഫലം കാണിച്ചു തരുന്നു. സിസ്റ്റം പ്രത്', 'mn': 'Хоёр хэл хэлний терминологийг олон үг хэлний хувьд харьцуулагддаг Корпора-аас хамгийн их судалгаагүй. Энэ ажлын тулд бид хоёр хэл хэлний томъёонуудыг томъёогүйгээр тэнцүү хэлбэрээр нэгтгэсэн хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Мөн бид нөхцөлд суурилсан, мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан арга барилгуудыг нэмэгдүүлнэ. Бидний туршилтууд бидний өмнөх ажлын хөгжлийн үр дүнг харуулж, системийг мэргэжлийн хэсэгт давхарлаж болно.', 'sr': 'Izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije za višerečne uslove iz usporednog korporacije nije široko istraženo. U ovom poslu predlažemo jedinstveni okvir za usklađivanje dvojezičkih uslova nezavisno od trajanja. Takođe predstavljamo neke poboljšanje na kontekstu i pristupe na osnovu neuronske mreže. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost naših poboljšanja prethodnih radova i sistem se može prilagoditi u specijalizovanim domenama.', 'ro': 'Extragerea unei terminologii bilingve pentru termeni multi-cuvinte din corpore comparabile nu a fost cercetată pe scară largă. În această lucrare propunem un cadru unificat pentru alinierea termenilor bilingvi independent de lungimea termenilor. Introducem, de asemenea, unele îmbunătățiri la abordările bazate pe context și pe rețeaua neurală. Experimentele noastre arată eficienţa îmbunătăţirilor lucrărilor anterioare, iar sistemul poate fi adaptat în domenii specializate.', 'so': 'Waxbarashada labada luqadood oo hadal badan loogama baahan yahay shirkadda u eg. Shuqulkaas waxaynu u soo jeedaynaa koox la xiriira si xor ah oo aan u sameynno qorshaha labada luqadood oo ka mid ah dhererka waqtiga. Sidoo kale waxaan horumarinaa horumarinta ku qoran iyo qaabab ku saleysan shabakadda neurada. Imtixaankayada waxay muujiyaan shaqada horumarinta horumarinta hore, nidaamkana waxaa lagu beddeli karaa meelo gaar ah.', 'si': 'වඩා වචන වචන වර්තනය සඳහා දෙවෙනි භාෂාවක් වර්තනය නිකාලනය කරන්න බොහොම විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ නෑ. මේ වැඩේ අපි එකම ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කරනවා දෙවල් භාෂාවක් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂයෙන් ස්වයංගයෙන අපි සමහරවිට සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් සහ න්\u200dයුරෝල ජාලය අධාරිත විදියට. අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ කලින් වැඩේ වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් සහ පද්ධතිය විශේෂ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේ', 'sv': 'Att extrahera en tvåspråkig terminologi för flerordsbehov från jämförbara corpora har inte undersökts i stor utsträckning. I detta arbete föreslår vi en enhetlig ram för att anpassa tvåspråkiga termer oberoende av termlängderna. Vi introducerar också några förbättringar av kontextbaserade och neurala nätverksbaserade tillvägagångssätt. Våra experiment visar effektiviteten i våra förbättringar av tidigare arbeten och systemet kan anpassas inom specialiserade områden.', 'ta': 'பல வார்த்தைகளிலிருந்து ஒப்பீடுபடுத்தப்பட்ட பல வார்த்தைகளுக்கு ஒரு இரு மொழி முனையமானத்தை வெளியேற்றுதல் பொருள் ப இந்த வேலையில் நாம் ஒரு ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்ட சட்டத்தை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் என்று சொல்லப்பட்ட நீளம் நாம் சில மேம்படுத்தும் சூழல் அடிப்படையில் மற்றும் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையிலான முன்னேற்றங்கள Our experiments show the effectiveness of our enhancements of previous works and the system can be adapted in specialized domains.', 'ur': 'ایک دوسری زبان کی ترمینلوژی کے لئے بہت سی کلمات کا مثال قابل مقابلہ کروپور سے نکالنا بہت زیادہ تحقیق نہیں کیا گیا۔ ہم اس کام میں ایک متحدہ فرم کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ دو زبان کی قوموں کو مدت کے بغیر مستقل کریں۔ ہم نے بھی کنٹکس بنیادی اور نیورل نیٹ ورک کی طریقے سے کچھ زیادہ اضافہ کریں۔ ہماری آزمائش پہلے کے کاموں کی اثبات دکھاتی ہے اور سیسٹم کو مخصوص دامنوں میں اثبات کر سکتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Ikkita tillar terminologini ajratish qoidadan bir so'z so'zlardan ko'p so'zlarni ajratish qo'llanmagan. Bu vazida biz bir necha so'zlarni o'zgartirish uchun bir bir bir necha freymni tahlil qilamiz. Biz bir necha tarmoq asosida va neyron tarmoqning asosiy usullarini ko'rib chiqaramiz. Bizning imtiyozlarimiz oldingi ishlarimizning kuchligini ko'rsatadi va tizimning tayyorlik dometlarida o'zgartira oladi.", 'vi': 'Việc rút ra một thuật ngữ hai chữ từ nhiều chữ từ so sánh từ hạ sĩ chưa được nghiên cứu rộng. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một cơ sở thống nhất để thẳng đứng các chữ hai chữ không phân biệt từ độ dài. Chúng tôi cũng giới thiệu một số cải tiến về các phương pháp dựa trên bối cảnh và mạng thần kinh. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy hiệu quả của việc cải tiến các tác phẩm trước đó và hệ thống có thể được thích nghi trong lĩnh vực đặc biệt.', 'bg': 'Извличането на двуезична терминология за многословни термини от сравними корпуси не е широко изследвано. В тази работа предлагаме единна рамка за подравняване на двуезичните термини независимо от дължините на термините. Също така въвеждаме някои подобрения в контекстното-базираните и невронно-базираните подходи. Нашите експерименти показват ефективността на подобренията на предишни работи и системата може да бъде адаптирана в специализирани области.', 'da': 'Uddrag af en tosproget terminologi for flere ord udtryk fra sammenlignelige corpora er ikke blevet udbredt undersøgt. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en fælles ramme for tilpasning af tosprogede termer uafhængigt af termlængden. Vi introducerer også nogle forbedringer af de kontekstbaserede og neurale netværksbaserede tilgange. Vores eksperimenter viser effektiviteten af vores forbedringer af tidligere værker, og systemet kan tilpasses inden for specialiserede områder.', 'de': 'Das Extrahieren einer zweisprachigen Terminologie für mehrwortige Begriffe aus vergleichbaren Korpora ist bisher noch nicht umfassend erforscht. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir einen einheitlichen Rahmen für die Ausrichtung zweisprachiger Begriffe unabhängig von den Termlängen vor. Wir führen auch einige Verbesserungen des kontextbasierten und des neuronalen Netzwerks-basierten Ansatzes ein. Unsere Experimente zeigen die Effektivität unserer Erweiterungen früherer Arbeiten und das System kann in spezialisierten Bereichen angepasst werden.', 'nl': "Het extraheren van een tweetalige terminologie voor meerwoordtermen uit vergelijkbare corpora's is nog niet uitgebreid onderzocht. In dit werk stellen we een uniform kader voor het afstemmen van tweetalige termen onafhankelijk van de termlengtes voor. We introduceren ook enkele verbeteringen aan de context-gebaseerde en de neurale netwerk gebaseerde benaderingen. Onze experimenten tonen de effectiviteit van onze verbeteringen van eerdere werken aan en het systeem kan worden aangepast in gespecialiseerde domeinen.", 'hr': 'Izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije za višeriječne uvjete iz usporednog tijela nije široko istraženo. U ovom poslu predlažemo jedinstveni okvir za usklađivanje dvojezičkih uvjeta nezavisno od trajanja. Također predstavljamo neke poboljšanje na kontekstu i pristupe na temelju neurone mreže. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost naših poboljšanja prethodnih radova i sustav se može prilagoditi u specijaliziranim domenama.', 'id': 'Mengekstraksi terminologi dua bahasa untuk istilah multi-kata dari korpra yang bisa dibandingkan belum diteliti secara luas. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengusulkan cadangan bersatu untuk menyesuaikan istilah dua bahasa secara independen dari panjang istilah. Kami juga memperkenalkan beberapa peningkatan pada pendekatan berdasarkan konteks dan jaringan saraf. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan efektivitas peningkatan kami dari pekerjaan sebelumnya dan sistem dapat diadaptasi dalam domain khusus.', 'ko': '비교할 수 있는 자료 라이브러리에서 다사 용어를 추출한 이중 언어 용어는 아직 광범위한 연구를 받지 못했다.이 업무에서 우리는 이중 언어 용어를 조정하고 용어의 길이에 독립시키는 통일된 틀을 제시했다.우리는 또한 상하문 기반과 신경 네트워크 기반의 방법에 대한 개선도 소개했다.우리의 실험은 우리가 이전의 업무에 대한 개선이 효과적이며, 이 시스템은 특정 분야에 적응할 수 있다는 것을 보여 준다.', 'fa': 'اخراج یک ترمینالوژی دو زبان برای شرایط چندین کلمه از شرایط قابل مقایسه تحقیق زیادی نشده است. در این کار یک چهارچوب متحد برای تنظیم کردن شرایط دو زبان به طور مستقل از طول ترمیم پیشنهاد می کنیم. ما همچنین برخی از افزایش\u200cها را به عنوان محیط و شبکه\u200cهای عصبی معرفی می\u200cکنیم. آزمایش های ما موثرت افزایش کارهای قبلی ما را نشان می دهند و سیستم می تواند در منطقه های مخصوص adapt شود.', 'sq': 'Extracting a bilingual terminology for multi-word terms from comparable corpora has not been widely researched.  Në këtë punë ne propozojmë një kuadër të unifikuar për përshtatjen e termave dygjuhëse pavarësisht nga gjatësia e termit. Ne gjithashtu paraqesim disa përmirësime në metodat bazuar në kontekst dhe në rrjetin nervor. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë efektshmërinë e përmirësimeve tona të punëve të mëparshme dhe sistemi mund të përshtatet në fusha të specializuara.', 'sw': 'Kutoa tamko la lugha mbili kwa maneno mengi kutoka makampuni yanayofanana haijatafitiwa sana. In this work we propose a unified framework for aligning bilingual terms independently of the term lengths.  Pia tunaonyesha baadhi ya maendeleo ya muktadha na mbinu za mtandao wa neura. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha ufanisi wa kukuza kazi zetu zilizopita na mfumo unaweza kubadilishwa katika maeneo maalumu.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe-söz şartlary üçin ikinji dil terminologiýany çykmak örän uly şekilde gözlenmedi. Bu işde ikinji dilli şartlary uzunlygdan özgür bir şekilde çykarmak üçin bir birleşik çarşaw teklip edip görýäris. Biz hem kontekst tabanly we nöral şebekesine taýýarlanan ýagdaýlary tanyşdyrýarys. Biziň deneylerimiz öňki işlerimiziň täsirleşmeligini görkezip bilýär we sistemamyz özellikle alanlarda üýtgebilir.', 'am': 'በሁለት ቋንቋ ተርሚኖሎጂ ለብዛት ቃላት ለማውጣት ከኮርፖር ስፋት አልተመረጠም፡፡ በዚህ ስራ የሁለት ቋንቋዎች ግንኙነትን በተለየ ርዝመት ለማንቀሳቀስ አንድ ፍሬም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ አካባቢ እና የደዌብ መረብ መሠረት የሚደረገውን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የቀድሞው ሥራችንን ማስታወቂያ የሚያሳየው እና ሲስተማርን በተለየ አካባቢ አዳራቢ ውስጥ ሊሰራው ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Երկուլեզու տերմինոլոգիան բազմաբառերի համար համեմատական մարմնից դուրս բերելը լայնորեն չի ուսումնասիրել: Այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկում ենք միավոր շրջանակ երկլեզու տերմինների հավասարակշռության համար անկախ տերմինի երկարությունից: We also introduce some enhancements to the context-based and the neural network based approaches.  Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս նախորդ աշխատանքների բարելավման արդյունավետությունը, և համակարգը կարող է հարմարվել մասնագիտական ոլորտներում:', 'af': "Die uitpakking van 'n tweedelingse terminologie vir meerderwoorde terme van vergelykbare korpora is nie heeltemal ondersoek nie. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n eenvoudige raamwerk vir die belangrike terme onveilig van die term lengte te aligneer. Ons introduseer ook sommige verbeteringe aan die konteksgebaseerde en die neuralnetwerk gebaseerde toegang. Ons eksperimente vertoon die effektiviteit van ons verbeteringe van vorige werke en die stelsel kan in spesialiseerde domeine aanpas word.", 'az': 'İki dil terminologiyasını çəkmək müəyyən edilən korporadan çoxlu sözlər üçün çəkilmək geniş bir araştırma edilməmişdir. Bu işdə ikili dil şartlarını term uzunluğundan uzaqlaşdırmaq üçün birləşdirilmiş bir çerçive təklif edirik. Biz həmçinin context-based və nöral ağ tərəfindən olan təsirlərə bəzi artırmaları təşkil edirik. Bizim təcrübələrimiz əvvəlki işlərin yaxşılıqlarını göstərir və sistemi özellikli domeylərdə uyğunlaşdırılabilir.', 'bs': 'Izvlačenje dvojezičke terminologije za višeriječne uvjete iz usporednog korporacije nije široko istraženo. U ovom poslu predlažemo jedinstveni okvir za usklađenje dvojezičkih uvjeta nezavisno od trajanja termina. Također predstavljamo neke poboljšanje na kontekstu i pristupe na temelju neurone mreže. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju učinkovitost naših poboljšanja prethodnih radova i sistem se može prilagoditi u specijaliziranim domenama.', 'bn': 'তুলনামূলক কোর্পোরা থেকে বহুভাষী শব্দের জন্য একটি দুই ভাষা টার্মিনোলজি বের করা হয় নি। এই কাজে আমরা একটি একত্রিত কার্যক্রম প্রস্তাব করি মেয়াদের দীর্ঘদিনের স্বাধীন দুই ভাষার শর্তের স্বাধীনতার জন্য। এছাড়াও আমরা কিছু উন্নতি প্রদান করেছি প্রকৃতিক ভিত্তিক এবং নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক ক্ষেত্রে। আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো পূর্ববর্তী কাজের উন্নতির কার্যক্রম দেখাচ্ছে এবং সিস্টেম বিশেষ কোম্পানীতে প্রতিষ্ঠিত হতে', 'cs': 'Extrahování dvojjazyčné terminologie pro víceslovní termíny ze srovnatelných korpusů nebylo široce zkoumáno. V této práci navrhujeme jednotný rámec pro sladění dvojjazyčných termínů nezávisle na délce termínů. Představujeme také některá vylepšení kontextového a neuronového přístupu. Naše experimenty ukazují efektivitu našich vylepšení předchozích prací a systém lze adaptovat do specializovaných oblastí.', 'ca': "Extracting a bilingual terminology for multi-word terms from comparable corpora has not been widely researched.  En aquesta feina proposem un marc unificat per alinejar els termes bilingües independentment de les llargues del terme. També introduim alguns millors en els enfocaments basats en el context i en la xarxa neuronal. Els nostres experiments demostren l'eficacia dels nostres millors treballs anteriors i el sistema es pot adaptar en dominis especialitzats.", 'et': 'Mitmesõnaliste terminite kakskeelse terminoloogia väljavõtmist võrreldavatest korpustest ei ole laialdaselt uuritud. Käesolevas töös pakume välja ühtse raamistiku kahekeelsete terminite ühtlustamiseks sõltumata terminite pikkusest. Lisaks tutvustame mõningaid täiustusi kontekstipõhistes ja närvivõrgupõhistes lähenemisviisides. Meie eksperimendid näitavad meie varasemate tööde täiustamise efektiivsust ja süsteemi saab kohandada spetsialiseeritud valdkondades.', 'fi': 'Monisanaisten termien kaksikielisen terminologian poimimista vastaavista korpusista ei ole tutkittu laajasti. Tässä työssä ehdotamme yhtenäistä kehystä kaksikielisten termien yhdenmukaistamiseksi termien pituudesta riippumatta. Esittelemme myös joitakin parannuksia kontekstiin ja neuroverkkoihin perustuviin lähestymistapoihin. Kokeemme osoittavat aikaisempien töiden parannusten tehokkuuden ja järjestelmää voidaan mukauttaa erikoisaloille.', 'jv': 'Ngawe Nang gawar iki, kita supoyo nggawe sistem sing beraksi kanggo nggawe aturan biasane karo ditambah sing luwih apik. Awak dhéwé éntuk nglanggar nganggep bantên kanggo masalan tambah sing basa gambar lan nganggep dino sing basa oleh dumadhi. Awak dhéwé éntuk ngéwé éntuk kanggo nggawe aturan kanggo nyebuté nggawe barang kanggo sistem sing bisa adapépakan karo winih sing perusahaan kanggo nyebuté', 'ha': "Babu ƙiƙiri wata tsohon harshen biyu wa wasu magana masu ƙaranci daga sami-koma ba'a sami ba. Daga wannan aikin da Muke goyyade wata firam mai haɗa wa'anar harshen biyu wanda ba ya kasancẽwa ba ga tsawo. Kayya, Munã ƙara wasu mafiya ƙaranci zuwa a cikin mazaɓa da sami masu baka jerin neura. Kayan jarrabõyinmu sun nũna fikanci masu ƙaranci na aikin da aka gabãta kuma ana iya sami muhalli cikin jama'a masu ƙayyade.", 'he': 'הוצאת טרמינולוגיה שתיים לשמועות רבות מילים מתוך גופורה שווה לא נחקרה באופן רחב. בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים מסגרת מאוחדת להתאים את התנאים השולשיים ללא קשר לאורך המונח. We also introduce some enhancements to the context-based and the neural network based approaches.  Our experiments show the effectiveness of our enhancements of previous works and the system can be adapted in specialized domains.', 'sk': 'Pridobivanje dvojezične terminologije za večbesedne izraze iz primerljivih korpusov ni bilo široko raziskano. V tem delu predlagamo enoten okvir za uskladitev dvojezičnih izrazov neodvisno od dolžine izrazov. Predstavljamo tudi nekaj izboljšav pristopov, ki temeljijo na kontekstu, in pristopov, ki temeljijo na nevronskih omrežjih. Naši poskusi kažejo učinkovitost naših izboljšav prejšnjih del in sistem je mogoče prilagoditi na specializiranih področjih.', 'bo': 'སྤྱད་པར་མཐུན་རུང་བའི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་གྱི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཟིན་པའི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ལས་ཕན་ཚོགས འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་འབྲེལ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གཉིས་ཡིག ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་ལ་མཐོང་དང་མཐུད་ལམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་ཐབས་ཤིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིག་གིས་སྔོན་གྱི་བྱ་ཚིག་གི་ཡར་རྒྱས་འགྲོ་བ་ཡིན་པས། མ་ལག་གིས་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གནས་ཁོངས་ནང་གི་གོ་སྒྲི'}
{'en': 'Emotion Representation Mapping for Automatic Lexicon Construction (Mostly) Performs on Human Level', 'ar': 'رسم خرائط تمثيل العاطفة لبناء المعجم التلقائي (في الغالب) يعمل على المستوى البشري', 'fr': 'La cartographie de la représentation des émotions pour la construction automatique de lexiques (principalement) fonctionne au niveau humain', 'pt': 'Mapeamento de representação de emoções para construção automática de léxicos (principalmente) é executado em nível humano', 'es': 'El mapeo de representación de emociones para la construcción automática de léxico (principalmente) funciona a nivel humano', 'ja': '自動辞書作成のための感情表現マッピング（ほとんど）人間レベルで実行', 'zh': '自词典构情()在人层面', 'ru': 'Отображение эмоционального представления для автоматической конструирования лексикона (в основном) выполняется на человеческом уровне', 'hi': 'स्वचालित शब्दकोश निर्माण के लिए भावना प्रतिनिधित्व मैपिंग (ज्यादातर) मानव स्तर पर प्रदर्शन करता है', 'ga': 'Léiríonn Mapáil Léirithe Mothúcháin le haghaidh Foirgníochta Foclóra Uathoibríoch (Go príomha) ar Leibhéal an Duine', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Az érzelmek reprezentációs térképezése az automatikus Lexikon konstrukcióhoz (többnyire) emberi szinten teljesít', 'el': 'Η χαρτογράφηση αναπαράστασης συναισθημάτων για την κατασκευή αυτόματου λεξικού (κυρίως) εκτελεί σε ανθρώπινο επίπεδο', 'kk': 'Адрес деңгейінде автоматты лексиканды құру (көпшілігімен) көңіл күй- жайын таңдау картасы', 'mk': 'Мапирање на емоции за автоматска конструкција на лексикони (претежно) извршува на човечко ниво', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ലെക്സിക്സണ്\u200d കെട്ടിടത്തിനുള്ള ഇമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d മാപ്പി (മിക്കവാറും) മനുഷ്യരുടെ നില', 'it': 'Mappatura della rappresentazione emotiva per la costruzione automatica di Lexicon (per lo più) esegue a livello umano', 'lt': 'Automatinės leksikono konstrukcijos (daugiausia) emocijų atstovavimo žemėlapiai žmogaus lygiu', 'ms': 'Peta Perwakilan Emosi untuk Pembangunan Leksikon Automatik (Kebanyakan) Buat pada Aras Manusia', 'mn': 'Хүн төвшин дээр автоматически лексикон бүтээмж (ихэнхдээ) мэдрэмжтэй төлөвлөгөөний газрын зураг', 'pl': 'Mapowanie reprezentacji emocji dla automatycznej konstrukcji słowników (głównie) działa na poziomie ludzkim', 'mt': 'Ippjanar tar-Rappreżentanza Emoċjali għall-Kostruzzjoni Awtomatika tal-Lexicon (l-aktar) Performances fuq Livell Uman', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Maparea reprezentării emoțiilor pentru construcția automată de Lexicon (în mare parte) efectuează la nivel uman', 'sr': 'Mapiranje emocija za automatsku izgradnju leksiona (uglavnom) funkcioniše na ljudskoj nivou', 'si': 'Comment', 'so': 'Xafiisyo Representation Mapping for Automatic Lexicon Construction (Mostly) Performs on Human Level', 'sv': 'Kartläggning av känslorepresentation för automatisk Lexikonkonstruktion (oftast) utförs på mänsklig nivå', 'ta': 'தானியங்கி லெக்சிகோன் கட்டுப்பாட்டிற்கான உணர்வு பிரதிநிகழ்வு', 'ur': 'Comment', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bản đồ Bộ phát triển cảm xúc về nhà máy sản xuất Lexicon (phần lớn) hoa phát trên cấp người', 'bg': 'Картиране на емоционалното представяне за автоматичното изграждане на лексикони (предимно) се извършва на човешко ниво', 'nl': 'Emotie Representatie Mapping voor Automatische Lexiconbouw (meestal) presteert op menselijk niveau', 'da': 'Følelsesmæssig repræsentation kortlægning for automatisk Lexikon konstruktion (hovedsageligt) udfører på menneskeligt niveau', 'hr': 'Mapiranje emocija za automatsku izgradnju leksija (uglavnom) provede na ljudskoj razini', 'ko': '자동 사전 구축에 사용되는 감정 표징 시사(주요) 인간 차원에서 집행', 'de': 'Emotion Representation Mapping für den automatischen Lexikonbau (meist) funktioniert auf menschlicher Ebene', 'id': 'Peta Perwakilan Emosi untuk Konstruksi Lexikon Otomatis (Kebanyakan) Melakukan pada Tingkat Manusia', 'fa': 'نمایش احساسات نقشه\u200cبندی برای ساختن آزمایشگاهی خودکار (اکثر) روی سطح انسان انجام می\u200cدهد', 'tr': 'Emotik Görkezilişi Avtomatik Lexicon Construction (Mostly) Iňlisler Derjesinde Görkez', 'af': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo ya hisia kwa ajili ya ujenzi wa Lexico binafsi', 'sq': 'hartimi i përfaqësimit të emocioneve për ndërtimin automatik të leksikonit (kryesisht) kryen në nivelin njerëzor', 'hy': 'Comment', 'am': 'አቀማመጥ', 'az': '캻nsan s톛viyy톛sind톛 Avtomatik Leksion Yap캼lmas캼 칲칞칲n Emotion Representation Mapping', 'ca': 'Mapa de representació emocional per a la construcció automàtica de Lexicons (majoritàriament) es fa a nivell humà', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে লেক্সিকোন নির্মাণ (বেশীরভাগ) প্রতিনিধিত্ব মানচিত্র মানচিত্র মানচিত্র', 'fi': 'Tunteiden edustamisen kartoitus automaattiseen Lexicon-rakenteeseen (useimmiten) suoritetaan ihmisen tasolla', 'bs': 'Mapiranje emocija za automatsku izgradnju leksiona (uglavnom) funkcioniše na ljudskoj nivou', 'et': 'Emotsioonide esinduse kaardistamine automaatse leksikooniehituse jaoks (enamasti) toimib inimese tasandil', 'cs': 'Mapování reprezentace emocí pro automatickou konstrukci Lexikonu (většinou) funguje na lidské úrovni', 'jv': 'emutation representation Mapping for Automatically Leksion Konstition (Maskly) Completes on Human Grade', 'sk': 'Mapiranje čustvene reprezentacije za avtomatsko konstrukcijo leksikonov (večinoma) deluje na človeški ravni', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מפת מייצג רגשות לבניית לקסיקון אוטומטית (בעיקר) מבצעת ברמה אנושית', 'bo': 'Emotion Representation Mapping for Automatic Lexicon Construction (Mostly) Performs on Human Level'}
{'en': 'Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) has the goal to convert existing emotion ratings from one representation format into another one, e.g., mapping Valence-Arousal-Dominance annotations for words or sentences into Ekman’s Basic Emotions and vice versa. ERM can thus not only be considered as an alternative to Word Emotion Induction (WEI) techniques for automatic emotion lexicon construction but may also help mitigate problems that come from the proliferation of emotion representation formats in recent years. We propose a new neural network approach to ERM that not only outperforms the previous state-of-the-art. Equally important, we present a refined evaluation methodology and gather strong evidence that our model yields results which are (almost) as reliable as human annotations, even in cross-lingual settings. Based on these results we generate new emotion ratings for 13 typologically diverse languages and claim that they have near-gold quality, at least.', 'ar': 'يهدف تعيين تمثيل العاطفة (ERM) إلى تحويل تقييمات المشاعر الحالية من تنسيق تمثيل إلى تنسيق آخر ، على سبيل المثال ، تعيين تعليقات Valence-Arousal-Dominance للكلمات أو الجمل في عواطف Ekman الأساسية والعكس صحيح. وبالتالي ، لا يمكن اعتبار ERM فقط كبديل لتقنيات Word Emotion Induction (WEI) لبناء معجم العاطفة التلقائي ، ولكن قد يساعد أيضًا في التخفيف من المشكلات التي تأتي من انتشار تنسيقات تمثيل المشاعر في السنوات الأخيرة. نقترح نهجًا جديدًا للشبكة العصبية لإدارة المخاطر المؤسسية لا يتفوق فقط على أحدث التقنيات السابقة. على نفس القدر من الأهمية ، نقدم منهجية تقييم مصقولة ونجمع أدلة قوية على أن نموذجنا يعطي نتائج (تقريبًا) موثوقة مثل التعليقات التوضيحية البشرية ، حتى في الإعدادات متعددة اللغات. بناءً على هذه النتائج ، قمنا بإنشاء تقييمات عاطفة جديدة لـ 13 لغة متنوعة نسبيًا ونزعم أن جودة هذه اللغات قريبة من الذهب ، على الأقل.', 'fr': "Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) a pour objectif de convertir les évaluations d'émotions existantes d'un format de représentation à un autre, par exemple, mapper les annotations Valence-Éveil et Dominance pour des mots ou des phrases dans les émotions de base d'Ekman et vice versa. L'ERM peut donc non seulement être considéré comme une alternative aux techniques d'induction émotionnelle Word (WEI) pour la construction automatique de lexiques émotionnels, mais peut également aider à atténuer les problèmes liés à la prolifération des formats de représentation des émotions ces dernières années. Nous proposons une nouvelle approche du réseau de neurones pour la gestion des risques électroniques qui surpasse non seulement les performances de pointe précédentes. Tout aussi important, nous présentons une méthodologie d'évaluation affinée et rassemblons des preuves solides que notre modèle produit des résultats qui sont (presque) aussi fiables que les annotations humaines, même dans des contextes multilingues. Sur la base de ces résultats, nous générons de nouvelles évaluations d'émotions pour 13 langues typologiquement diverses et affirmons qu'elles ont une qualité presque or, au moins.", 'pt': 'O Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) tem o objetivo de converter as classificações de emoção existentes de um formato de representação para outro, por exemplo, mapear anotações de Valence-Arousal-Dominance para palavras ou frases em Basic Emotions de Ekman e vice-versa. O ERM pode, assim, não só ser considerado como uma alternativa às técnicas de Word Emotion Induction (WEI) para a construção automática de léxicos de emoções, mas também pode ajudar a mitigar problemas decorrentes da proliferação de formatos de representação de emoções nos últimos anos. Propomos uma nova abordagem de rede neural para ERM que não apenas supera o estado da arte anterior. Igualmente importante, apresentamos uma metodologia de avaliação refinada e reunimos fortes evidências de que nosso modelo produz resultados que são (quase) tão confiáveis quanto as anotações humanas, mesmo em ambientes multilíngues. Com base nesses resultados, geramos novas classificações de emoção para 13 idiomas tipologicamente diversos e afirmamos que eles têm qualidade quase dourada, pelo menos.', 'es': 'El mapeo de representación de emociones (ERM) tiene el objetivo de convertir las calificaciones de emoción existentes de un formato de representación a otro, por ejemplo, mapear anotaciones de Valencia-Excitación-Dominancia para palabras u oraciones en Emociones Básicas de Ekman y viceversa. Por lo tanto, la ERM no solo puede considerarse como una alternativa a las técnicas de inducción de emociones de palabras (WEI) para la construcción automática del léxico emocional, sino que también puede ayudar a mitigar los problemas que provienen de la proliferación de formatos de representación de emociones en los últimos años. Proponemos un nuevo enfoque de red neuronal para la ERM que no solo supera al estado de la técnica anterior. De igual importancia, presentamos una metodología de evaluación refinada y recopilamos pruebas sólidas de que nuestro modelo produce resultados que son (casi) tan confiables como las anotaciones humanas, incluso en entornos multilingües. En base a estos resultados, generamos nuevas calificaciones de emociones para 13 idiomas tipológicamente diversos y afirmamos que tienen una calidad casi dorada, al menos.', 'ja': '感情表現マッピング（ ERM ）は、既存の感情評価をある表現形式から別の表現形式に変換することを目標としている。例えば、単語や文章のValence - Arousal - Dominance注釈をEkmanのBasic Emotionsにマッピングし、その逆も同様である。したがって、ERMは、自動感情語彙構築のためのWord Emotion Induction （ WEI ）テクニックの代替として考慮されるだけでなく、近年の感情表現フォーマットの拡散から生じる問題を軽減するのに役立つ可能性があります。私たちは、ERMへの新しいニューラルネットワークのアプローチを提案します。これは、以前の最先端のものを上回るだけではありません。同様に重要なのは、私たちは洗練された評価方法論を提示し、私たちのモデルが、クロスリンガルの状況であっても、人間の注釈と（ほぼ）同じくらい信頼できる結果をもたらすという強力な証拠を収集することです。これらの結果に基づいて、私たちは13の類型的に多様な言語の新しい感情評価を生成し、少なくともそれらはほぼ金の品質を持っていると主張します。', 'zh': '情感表征映(ERM)者,以见情评级转格式为式,如单词句Valence-Arousal-Dominance注射Ekman本情,反之亦然。 故ERM非徒可以为自情词典构Word情归(WEI)术之代方,而助缓近年之情激增式也。 吾建一新神经网络ERM术,非特优于前最先进之术也。 同要者,立一改进评法,收其强证,证其模样所生(几)与人人注同,虽跨语境亦如之。 盖为13多样化之言生新情评级,谓之近黄金之量。', 'hi': 'भावना प्रतिनिधित्व मानचित्रण (ईआरएम) का लक्ष्य एक प्रतिनिधित्व प्रारूप से मौजूदा भावना रेटिंग को दूसरे में परिवर्तित करना है, उदाहरण के लिए, शब्दों या वाक्यों के लिए वैलेंस-उत्तेजना-प्रभुत्व एनोटेशन को एकमैन की मूल भावनाओं में मैप करना और इसके विपरीत। इस प्रकार ईआरएम को न केवल स्वचालित भावना शब्दकोश निर्माण के लिए वर्ड इमोशन इंडक्शन (डब्ल्यूईआई) तकनीकों के विकल्प के रूप में माना जा सकता है, बल्कि हाल के वर्षों में भावना प्रतिनिधित्व प्रारूपों के प्रसार से आने वाली समस्याओं को कम करने में भी मदद मिल सकती है। हम ईआरएम के लिए एक नए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो न केवल पिछले अत्याधुनिक अत्याधुनिक को मात देता है। समान रूप से महत्वपूर्ण, हम एक परिष्कृत मूल्यांकन पद्धति प्रस्तुत करते हैं और मजबूत सबूत इकट्ठा करते हैं कि हमारे मॉडल के परिणाम उत्पन्न होते हैं जो (लगभग) मानव एनोटेशन के रूप में विश्वसनीय हैं, यहां तक कि क्रॉस-लिंगुअल सेटिंग्स में भी। इन परिणामों के आधार पर हम 13 टाइपोलॉजिकल रूप से विविध भाषाओं के लिए नई भावना रेटिंग उत्पन्न करते हैं और दावा करते हैं कि उनके पास कम से कम सोने की गुणवत्ता है।', 'ru': "Целью Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) является преобразование существующих оценок эмоций из одного формата представления в другой, например, отображение аннотаций Valence-Arousal-Dominance для слов или предложений в Ekman 's Basic Emotions и наоборот. Таким образом, ERM можно не только рассматривать как альтернативу методам Word Emotion Induction (WEI) для автоматической конструирования лексики эмоций, но также может помочь смягчить проблемы, которые возникают из-за распространения форматов представления эмоций в последние годы. Мы предлагаем новый нейросетевой подход к ОУР, который не только превосходит предыдущий современный подход. Не менее важно и то, что мы представляем усовершенствованную методологию оценки и собираем убедительные доказательства того, что наша модель дает результаты, которые (почти) так же надежны, как и человеческие аннотации, даже в межъязыковых условиях. На основе этих результатов мы генерируем новые рейтинги эмоций для 13 типологически разнообразных языков и утверждаем, что они имеют качество, близкое к золотому, по крайней мере.", 'ga': 'Tá sé mar sprioc ag Mapáil Léirithe Mothúcháin (ERM) rátálacha mothúcháin atá ann cheana a thiontú ó fhormáid ionadaíochta amháin go formáid ionadaíochta eile, m.sh. nótaí Valence-Arousal-Tominance a mhapáil le haghaidh focail nó abairtí go Bun-Mhothúcháin Ekman agus vice versa. Mar sin ní hamháin gur féidir ERM a mheas mar mhalairt ar theicnící Ionduchtú Mothúcháin Word (WEI) le haghaidh uathfhoirgniú foclóir mothúcháin ach d’fhéadfadh sé cabhrú freisin le fadhbanna a mhaolú a thagann as iomadú formáidí ionadaíochta mothúcháin le blianta beaga anuas. Molaimid cur chuige nua líonra néaraigh i leith ERM a sháraíonn ní hamháin an úrscothacht roimhe seo. Rud atá chomh tábhachtach céanna, cuirimid modheolaíocht mheastóireachta scagtha i láthair agus bailímid fianaise láidir go n-eascraíonn ár samhail torthaí atá (beagnach) chomh hiontaofa le nótaí daonna, fiú i suíomhanna tras-teangacha. Bunaithe ar na torthaí seo gineann muid rátálacha mothúcháin nua do 13 theanga atá éagsúil ó thaobh na clódóireachta de agus deirtear go bhfuil cáilíocht nach mór ór acu, ar a laghad.', 'ka': 'Emotion Representation Mapping ERM შეიძლება არა მხოლოდ იყოს ალტენტიფიკაცია სიტყვების ემოციონის ინდექტუციაციის (WEI) ტექნოგიებისთვის ავტომატური ემოციონის ლექსიკონის შექმნა, მაგრამ შეიძლება ასევე დახმარება პრობლემების გა ჩვენ შეგიძლიათ ახალი ნეიროლური ქსელის პროგრამა ERM-ზე, რომელიც არა მხოლოდ მხოლოდ წინა წინა წარმოქმედება. ერთადერთად მნიშვნელოვანია, ჩვენ აჩვენებთ განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრების მეტოლოგია და ძალიან წარმოდგენება, რომ ჩვენი მოდელის მიღება შედეგილები, რომლებიც (პირველ) ადამიანის ანოტაციები, კ ამ შედეგი შედეგი შემდეგ ჩვენ შევქმნით ახალი ემოციონის რეტენტირები 13 ტიპოლოგიურად განსხვავებული ენებისთვის და აღწერეთ, რომ მათ უფრო დამატებული ჱლარული კაalitეტი', 'hu': 'Az Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) célja, hogy átalakítsa a meglévő érzelmi minősítéseket egy reprezentációs formátumból egy másikba, például a Valence-Arousal-Dominance jegyzékeket szavakhoz vagy mondatokhoz való feltérképezése Ekman Alapvető érzelmeibe és fordítva. Az ERM tehát nemcsak a Word Emotion Induction (WEI) technikák alternatívájaként tekinthető az automatikus érzelmek lexikon konstrukciójára, hanem segíthet enyhíteni az elmúlt években az érzelmek reprezentációjának elterjedéséből eredő problémákat is. Az ERM új neurális hálózati megközelítését javasoljuk, amely nem csak a korábbi korszerű teljesítményt felülmúlja. Ugyanilyen fontos, hogy kifinomult értékelési módszert mutatunk be, és erős bizonyítékokat gyűjtünk arra vonatkozóan, hogy modellünk olyan eredményeket eredményez, amelyek (majdnem) olyan megbízhatóak, mint az emberi megjegyzések, még többnyelvű beállítások esetén is. Ezen eredmények alapján 13 tipológiailag különböző nyelvre új érzelmi minősítést hozunk létre, és azt állítjuk, hogy legalább közel arany minőségűek.', 'el': 'Η χαρτογράφηση απεικόνισης συναισθημάτων έχει ως στόχο να μετατρέψει τις υπάρχουσες βαθμολογίες συναισθημάτων από μια μορφή αναπαράστασης σε άλλη, π.χ. χαρτογράφηση σχολίων Valence-Arousal-Dominance για λέξεις ή προτάσεις στα Βασικά Συναισθήματα του Ekman και αντίστροφα. Έτσι, ο ΕΜΜ δεν μπορεί μόνο να θεωρηθεί ως εναλλακτική λύση στις τεχνικές επαγωγής συναισθημάτων λέξεων για την αυτόματη κατασκευή λεξικού συναισθημάτων, αλλά μπορεί επίσης να βοηθήσει στην άμβλυνση των προβλημάτων που προκύπτουν από τον πολλαπλασιασμό μορφών αναπαράστασης συναισθημάτων τα τελευταία χρόνια. Προτείνουμε μια νέα προσέγγιση νευρωνικών δικτύων στον ΕΜΣ που όχι μόνο ξεπερνά την προηγούμενη κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Εξίσου σημαντικό, παρουσιάζουμε μια εκλεπτυσμένη μεθοδολογία αξιολόγησης και συγκεντρώνουμε ισχυρές αποδείξεις ότι το μοντέλο μας παράγει αποτελέσματα που είναι (σχεδόν) τόσο αξιόπιστα όσο οι ανθρώπινες σχολιασμοί, ακόμη και σε γλωσσικά περιβάλλοντα. Με βάση αυτά τα αποτελέσματα δημιουργούμε νέες βαθμολογίες συναισθημάτων για 13τυπολογικά διαφορετικές γλώσσες και ισχυριζόμαστε ότι έχουν σχεδόν χρυσή ποιότητα, τουλάχιστον.', 'it': "Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) ha l'obiettivo di convertire le valutazioni emotive esistenti da un formato di rappresentazione in un altro, ad esempio, mappare le annotazioni Valence-Arousal-Dominance per parole o frasi nelle Emozioni di base di Ekman e viceversa. L'ERM può quindi non solo essere considerato come un'alternativa alle tecniche WEI (Word Emotion Induction) per la costruzione automatica del lessico emotivo, ma può anche contribuire a mitigare i problemi derivanti dalla proliferazione dei formati di rappresentazione emotiva negli ultimi anni. Proponiamo un nuovo approccio alla rete neurale all'ERM che non solo supera lo stato dell'arte precedente. Altrettanto importante, presentiamo una metodologia di valutazione raffinata e raccogliamo prove forti che il nostro modello produce risultati (quasi) affidabili come le annotazioni umane, anche in contesti cross-lingual. Sulla base di questi risultati generiamo nuove valutazioni emotive per 13 lingue tipologicamente diverse e affermiamo che hanno una qualità quasi oro, almeno.", 'lt': 'Emocijų atstovavimo žemėlapių (ERM) tikslas – pakeisti esamus emocijų reitingus iš vieno atstovavimo formato į kitą, pvz., Valence-Arousal-Dominance anotacijas žodžiams ar sakiniams į Ekman pagrindines emocijas ir atvirkščiai. ERM can thus not only be considered as an alternative to Word Emotion Induction (WEI) techniques for automatic emotion lexicon construction but may also help mitigate problems that come from the proliferation of emotion representation formats in recent years.  Siūlome taikyti naują požiūrį į nervų tinklą ERM, kuris ne tik viršytų ankstesnę pažangą. Taip pat svarbu pristatyti patobulintą vertinimo metodiką ir surinkti tvirtus įrodymus, kad mūsų modelis duoda (beveik) tokių pat patikimų rezultatų, kaip ir žmogaus anotacijos, net ir tarpkalbinėse aplinkybėse. Remiantis šiais rezultatais sukuriame naujus emocinius vertinimus 13 tipologiškai įvairaus pobūdžio kalbų ir teigiame, kad jos bent jau turi beveik aukso kokybę.', 'kk': 'Эмоциялық таңдау картасының (ERM) мақсатындағы эмоциялық рейтинге бір таңдау пішімінен басқа пішіміне аударуға мақсат бар, мысалы, Valence-Arousal-Dominance сөздерді не сөздерді Ekman негізгі көңіл күйіне аударуға және қарсы. Осылайша, ERM тек Word Emotion Induction (WEI) деген автоматты эмоциялық лексиконды құру техникаларының альтернативі болмайды, бірақ соңғы жылдарда эмоциялық түсіндіру пішімдерінен келесі мәселелерді азайту мүмкін болады. Біз ERM-ге жаңа невралдық желінің қасиетін таңдаймыз. Бұл тек алдыңғы суреттің күйіне емес. Ең маңызды, біз түзетілген оқу методологиясын таңдап, біздің үлгіміздің (жалғыз) адамдардың оқу ретінде сенімді нәтижелерді, тілдердің бірнеше параметрлерінде де де қатты құптарын жинап береміз Бұл нәтижелердің негізінде біз 13 типтологиялық тілдер үшін жаңа емоциялық рейтинг жасап, олардың алтын сапасы бар деп ойлаймыз.', 'ms': 'Pempetaan Perwakilan Emosi (ERM) mempunyai tujuan untuk menukar nilai emosi yang ada dari satu format perwakilan ke yang lain, cth., memetakan anotasi Valence-Arousal-Dominance untuk perkataan atau kalimat ke Emosi Asas Ekman dan sebaliknya. ERM tidak hanya boleh dianggap sebagai alternatif kepada teknik Indukti Emosi Perkataan (WEI) untuk pembangunan leksikon emosi automatik tetapi juga boleh membantu mengurangi masalah yang berasal dari proliferasi format perwakilan emosi dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. We propose a new neural network approach to ERM that not only outperforms the previous state-of-the-art.  Equally important, we present a refined evaluation methodology and gather strong evidence that our model yields results which are (almost) as reliable as human annotations, even in cross-lingual settings.  Berdasarkan hasil ini, kita menghasilkan nilai emosi baru untuk 13 bahasa yang berbeza secara tipologik dan menyatakan bahawa mereka mempunyai kualiti hampir emas, sekurang-kurangnya.', 'mk': 'Мапирањето на емоциите (ЕРМ) има за цел да ги претвори постоечките емоции од еден формат на претставување во друг, на пример мапирање на анотациите за зборови или реченици во основните емоции на Екман и обратно. ЕРМ може да се смета не само за алтернатива на техниките на Word Emotion Induction (WEI) за автоматска изградба на емоционски лексикони, туку и може да помогне во олеснувањето на проблемите кои доаѓаат од проширувањето на форматите на емоционска претстава во последниве години. Предложуваме нов пристап на нервната мрежа кон ЕРМ кој не само што го надминува претходното најново. Исто важно, ние претставуваме рафинирана методологија на евалуацијата и собираме силни докази дека нашиот модел дава резултати кои се (речиси) доверливи како човечките анотации, дури и во меѓујазични услови. Based on these results we generate new emotion ratings for 13 typologically diverse languages and claim that they have near-gold quality, at least.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള വികാരങ്ങളുടെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരു പ്രതിനിധിയുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും മറ്റൊന്നിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുവാനുള്ള ലക്ഷ്യമുണ്ട്, ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്കോ വാ അതുകൊണ്ട് എര്\u200dഎം വാക്ക് ഇമോട്ടിഷന്\u200d ഇന്\u200dഡിക്ഷന്\u200d (WEI) വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് മാത്രമല്ലെന്ന് വിചാരിക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധിക്കില്ല, പക്ഷെ അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d വികാരങ്ങള നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ നെയൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്കിലേക്ക് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. മുമ്പുള്ള സ്ഥിതി അത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പരിശോധനയുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. ശക്തമായ തെളിവുകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ ഫലങ ഈ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 13 സാധാരണ ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് പുതിയ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അവര്\u200dക്ക് അടുത്ത സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണിക്കുന്', 'no': 'Førehandsvisningskarting (ERM) har målet å konvertera eksisterande emosjonsratingar frå ein representasjonsformat til eit anna, f.eks. kartlegging av Valence-Arousal-Dominance-notasjonar for ord eller setningar i Ekman sin grunnleggjande følelser og omvendt. ERM kan derfor ikkje berre bli kalla som alternativ for teknikkar for ordemosjonsinduksjon (WEI) for automatisk oppbygging av emosjonsleksikon, men kan også hjelpa til å redusere problemar som kommer frå utvideringa av emosjonsrepresentasjonsformata i siste år. Vi foreslår ein ny neuralnettverkstilnærming til ERM som ikkje berre utfører den førre kunsttilstanden. Likevel viktig, presenterer vi ein refined evalueringsmetodologi og samla sterke beviser at modellen vårt gjev resultat som (nesten) er så betrig som menneske annotasjonar, sjølv i fleirspråk innstillingar. Basert på desse resultatene, lager vi nye emosjonsretningar for 13 typologisk forskjellige språk og tvar at dei har minst nær gullkvalitet.', 'mt': 'L-Ippjanar tar-Rappreżentanza tal-Emazzjonijiet (ERM) g ħandu l-għan li jikkonverti l-klassifikazzjonijiet tal-emozzjonijiet e żistenti minn format ta’ rappreżentazzjoni għal format ieħor, pereżempju l-immappjar tal-annotazzjonijiet Valence-Arousal-Dominance għal kliem jew sentenzi f’Emazzjonijiet Bażiċi ta’ Ekman u viċi versa. ERM can thus not only be considered as an alternative to Word Emotion Induction (WEI) techniques for automatic emotion lexicon construction but may also help mitigate problems that come from the proliferation of emotion representation formats in recent years.  Aħna nipproponu approċċ ġdid tan-netwerk newrali għall-ERM li mhux biss jisboq l-a ħħar avvanz preċedenti. Bl-istess mod importanti, nippreżentaw metodoloġija ta’ evalwazzjoni raffinata u niġbru evidenza qawwija li l-mudell tagħna jagħti riżultati li huma (kważi) affidabbli daqs l-annotazzjonijiet umani, anki f’ambjenti translingwi. Abbażi ta’ dawn ir-riżultati niġġeneraw klassifikazzjonijiet emozzjonali ġodda għal 13-il lingwa tipikament differenti u niddikjaraw li għandhom kważi kwalità tad-deheb, tal-inqas.', 'mn': 'Эмгэн үндсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төлөвлөгөөний газрын зураг (ERM) нь нэг төлөвлөгөөс өөр нэг төлөвлөгөөнд орших сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төлөвлөгөөг өөр нэг төлөвлөгөө рүү шилжүүлэх зорилго, жишээ нь Валенс-Ароуз-Доминанс үг эсвэл өгүүл Иймээс ЭРМ зөвхөн Word Emotion Induction (WEI) болон автоматически сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн бүтээх технологийг өөрчлөх боломжгүй гэхдээ сүүлийн жилийн дотор сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төлөвлөгөөний асуудлыг багасгах боломжтой. Бид эрдэмтэд шинэ мэдрэлийн сүлжээний шинэ арга замыг зөвхөн өмнөх урлагийн нөхцөл байдлыг дамжуулж чадахгүй гэдгийг санал дэвшүүлнэ. Яг ижил чухал нь, бид цэвэрлэгдсэн оюуны методологийг тайлбарлаж, бидний загвар нь хүн төрөлхтний анзаарлыг ихэвчлэн итгэлтэй (бараг) үр дүнг хүртэл олон хэлний тохиолдолд хүртэл хамгийн их баталгаатай Эдгээр үр дүн дээр бид 13 төрлийн хэл дээр шинэ сэтгэл хөдлөлийн дүрэм бий болгож, хамгийн бага зэрэг алтын чанартай гэдгийг хэлж байна.', 'si': "Emotion reposition Mapping (ERM) has the object to turn Exists Emotion Rates from one reposition format to another, e.g. Maping Vallence-Arouse-Dominiance Notes for Words or Words in Ecman's baseEmotions and vice versa. ERM මෙහෙම විතරයි Word Emotion Indiction (WEI) ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි විතරයි, ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය භාවිතය නිර්මාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි, නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතර අපි අළුත් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලය ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ERM වලට ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ඒක පිළිබඳ ස්ථිතියේ විතරක් නෙවෙයි. සාමාන්\u200dය වැදගත්, අපි ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස විද්\u200dයාත්මක විද්\u200dයාත්මක සම්බන්ධ සාක්ෂි කරනවා අපේ මද්\u200dයාව ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්ම මේ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරති", 'pl': 'Mapowanie reprezentacji emocji (ERM) ma na celu przekształcenie istniejących ocen emocji z jednego formatu reprezentacji na inny, np. mapowanie adnotacji Valence-Arousal-Dominance dla słów lub zdań na podstawowe emocje Ekmana i odwrotnie. ERM może być zatem nie tylko uważany za alternatywę dla technik indukcji emocji słowa (WEI) dla automatycznej konstrukcji leksykonu emocji, ale może również pomóc złagodzić problemy wynikające z rozprzestrzeniania się formatów reprezentacji emocji w ostatnich latach. Proponujemy nowe podejście sieci neuronowej do ERM, które nie tylko przewyższa poprzednie najnowocześniejsze. Równie ważne jest, że przedstawiamy dopracowaną metodologię oceny i gromadzimy mocne dowody na to, że nasz model daje wyniki, które są (prawie) równie wiarygodne jak adnotacje ludzkie, nawet w warunkach wielojęzycznych. Na podstawie tych wyników generujemy nowe oceny emocji dla 13-tych typologicznie zróżnicowanych języków i twierdzimy, że mają one przynajmniej niemal złotą jakość.', 'ro': 'Maparea reprezentării emoțiilor (ERM) are scopul de a converti ratingurile emoționale existente dintr-un format de reprezentare în altul, de exemplu, cartografierea adnotărilor Valence-Arousal-Dominance pentru cuvinte sau propoziții în Emoțiile de bază ale Ekman și invers. Astfel, ERM poate fi considerat nu numai ca o alternativă la tehnicile Word Emotion Induction (WEI) pentru construcția automată a lexiconului emoțional, ci poate contribui, de asemenea, la atenuarea problemelor care provin din proliferarea formatelor de reprezentare a emoțiilor în ultimii ani. Propunem o nouă abordare a rețelei neurale a ERM, care nu numai că depășește performanța anterioară de ultimă generație. La fel de important, prezentăm o metodologie de evaluare rafinată și adunăm dovezi puternice că modelul nostru dă rezultate care sunt (aproape) la fel de fiabile ca adnotările umane, chiar și în setări cross-lingvistice. Pe baza acestor rezultate generăm noi evaluări emoționale pentru 13 limbi tipologice diverse și susținem că acestea au cel puțin o calitate aproape aurie.', 'so': 'Qoraabka qaabilaadda xasuusta (ERM) wuxuu ku qoran yahay inuu ka beddelo aragtida islamarkaasna uu ka bedeli karo qaababka mid ka mid ah, tusaale ahaan kartada warqadaha ama hadallada iyo hadallada u beddelan Emirayaasha Basic e e Ekman. ERM can thus not only be considered as an alternative to Word Emotion Induction (WEI) techniques for automatic emotion lexicon construction but may also help mitigate problems that come from the proliferation of emotion representation formats in recent years.  Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa shabakado cusub oo neural ah oo u dhow ERM, taas oo keliya maayo ku sameynta xaaladdii hore ee farshaxanta. Si isku muhiim ah, waxaynu keenaynaa qaabab qiimeynta lagu sawiray, waxaana soo ururinnaa caddeynta xoogga leh in modellkayagu uu soo bixiyo resultiyada (dhowr) oo u aamin karo sida dhibaatooyinka dadka, xataa meelaha luuqadaha kala duwan. Sababtaas darteed waxaan dhashaa aragtida jimicsiga cusub oo 13 luqadood oo kala duduwan ah, waxayna sheegtaa inay haystaan qiimaha dahabka ee dhow.', 'sr': 'Ima cilj da preobratimo postojeće ocjene emocija iz jednog formāta predstavljanja u drugu, npr. mapiranje annotacija Valence-Arousal-Dominance za reči ili rečenice u Ekmanove osnovne emocije i suprotno. Zbog toga se ERM ne može smatrati alternativom tehnika Emotion Induction (WEI) tehnika automatske konstrukcije leksiona emocija, nego može takođe pomoći smanjiti probleme koje dolaze iz proširenja formata predstavljanja emocija u poslednjih godina. Predlažemo novi neuralni pristup ERM-u koji ne samo iznosi prethodno stanje umjetnosti. Isto važno, predstavljamo rafiniranu metodologiju procjene i skupljamo jake dokaze da naš model daje rezultate koji su (skoro) pouzdani kao ljudske annotacije, čak i u međujezičkim nastavama. Na temelju ovih rezultata, stvaramo nove ocene emocija za 13 tipološki različitih jezika i tvrdimo da imaju barem kvalitet blizu zlata.', 'sv': 'Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) har som mål att omvandla befintliga känslobetyg från ett representationsformat till ett annat, t.ex. kartlägga Valence-Arousal-Dominans anteckningar för ord eller meningar till Ekmans Basic Emotions och vice versa. ERM kan därför inte bara ses som ett alternativ till Word Emotion Induction (WEI) tekniker för automatisk emotion lexikonkonstruktion utan kan också bidra till att mildra problem som kommer från spridningen av emotion representation format under de senaste åren. Vi föreslår ett nytt neuralt nätverkstillvägagångssätt för ERM som inte bara överträffar tidigare state-of-the-art. Lika viktigt är att vi presenterar en förfinad utvärderingsmetod och samlar in starka bevis för att vår modell ger resultat som är (nästan) lika tillförlitliga som mänskliga anteckningar, även i flerspråkiga miljöer. Baserat på dessa resultat genererar vi nya känslobetyg för 13 typologiskt olika språk och hävdar att de har nästan guldkvalitet, åtminstone.', 'ta': 'உணர்வு பிரதிநிகழ்வு வரைபடம் (ERM) இருக்கும் உணர்வு விகிதத்தை ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட வடிவத்திலிருந்து மற்றொரு வடிவத்தில் மாற்ற வேண்டும், உ. மா, வார்த்தைகளுக்கான வார்த்தைகள்  பிரச்சனைகளை தானாகவே உணர்வு லெக்சிக் கட்டுப்பாட்டிற்கான வார்த்தை உணர்வு செயல்பாடு (WEI) தொழில்நுட்பமாக கருத முடியாது ஆனால் சமீபத்திய ஆண்டுகளில் உணர்வு ப நாம் ERM க்கு ஒரு புதிய புதிய புதிய பிணையத்தின் அணுகலை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் என்று முந்தைய நிலையில் மட்டும்  முக்கியமானது, நாம் ஒரு சுருக்கப்பட்ட மதிப்பீட்டு முறைமையை கொண்டுள்ளோம் மற்றும் உறுதியான ஆதாரங்களை ஒன்று சேர்க்கிறோம் நம்முடைய மாதிர இந்த முடிவுகளை அடிப்படையில் நாம் 13 வழக்கமாக புதிய உணர்வு விகிதத்தை உருவாக்குகிறோம் மற்றும் குறைந்தபட்சம் தங்கக் தரம்', 'ur': 'Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) کے لئے موجود احساسات راتینگوں کو ایک نمایش فرمود سے دوسری فرمود میں تبدیل کرنے کا موقع ہے، جیسے کہ والنس-آروئز-دومینس ڈمنٹنس کا مکاپیٹ کرنا ہے کلمات یا کلمات کے لئے اکمن کی بنیاس احساسات میں اور مختلف. اس طرح ERM کو صرف Word Emotion Induction (WEI) تکنیک کے بدلے نہیں سمجھ سکتا بلکہ اگلے سالوں میں اپنا احساسات نمایش فرمول کے گھیرنے سے مشکلات کو بھی کمزور کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم ایک نور نیورل نیٹ ورک کی تقریبا ERM کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو صرف اگلوں کی حالت کے خلاف نہیں کرتا۔ برابر ضرورت ہے، ہم ایک پاکیزہ ارزیابی methodology کو پیش کرتے ہیں اور مضبوط شہادت جمع کرتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل نتیجے حاصل کرتے ہیں جو (تقریباً) انسان کی آواز کے مطابق یقین رکھنے والی ہیں، اگرچہ مختلف زبان تنظیمات میں بھی۔ یہ نتیجے پر ہم 13 ٹائپولوژیکی مختلف زبانوں کے لئے نو احساسات ریٹینگ پیدا کرتے ہیں اور کہتے ہیں کہ ان کے پاس سونے کی کیفیت ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Шундай қилиб, ERM фойдаланиш учун автоматича hissiyotni yaratish учун овоз кўриниш (WEI) тарқатилади, аммо охирги йиллардан кўриниш форматларининг жиҳатидан чиққан маслаҳатларни камайтириш мумкин. Biz ERM orqali yangi neyrol tarmoqni tahlil qilamiz, bu faqat faqat oldingi sananing holatini bajarishi mumkin. Muhimlik bo'lgan, biz tashkilotlarni qiymatlash usulini hozir qilamiz va bizning modelimizning natijalari inson tajribalari kabi ishlatadigan natijalarini ko'p tillar moslamalarida ishlatadi. Based on these results we generate new emotion ratings for 13 typologically diverse languages and claim that they have near-gold quality, at least.", 'vi': 'Emotion Representation mapping (ERM) có mục đích chuyển đổi tỷ lệ cảm xúc tồn tại từ một mô hình đại diện thành dạng khác, ví dụ như bản đồ s ử dụng sử dụng sử dụng Valence-Arousal-Dominnce cho từ hay câu vào cảm xúc cơ bản của Ekman và ngược lại. Vị động cơ độc không chỉ có thể được coi là một sự thay đổi với công nghệ hành mến hữu sắp động về việc phát đạn đạn đạn động cảm, mà có thể cũng có thể giúp xoá những vấn đê Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mạng thần kinh mới để tránh tránh khỏi những khả năng hiện đại trước đây. Cũng quan trọng, chúng tôi trình bày một phương pháp đánh giá tinh xảo và thu thập chứng cứ mạnh mẽ rằng mô hình của chúng tôi cung cấp kết quả (gần) đáng tin cậy như ghi chú con người, thậm chí trong môi trường ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Dựa trên kết quả này, chúng ta tạo ra tỉ lệ cảm xúc mới cho thứ mười ngôn ngữ khác nhau, và khẳng định rằng chúng có chất lượng gần bằng vàng, ít nhất.', 'bg': 'Картографирането на емоционалното представяне (ЕМР) има за цел да преобразува съществуващите емоционални рейтинги от един формат на представяне в друг, например да картографира анотациите на Валенсия-Възбуда-Доминиране за думи или изречения в Основните емоции на Екман и обратно. По този начин ЕРМ може не само да се разглежда като алтернатива на техниките за автоматично изграждане на емоционални лексикони, но и да спомогне за смекчаване на проблемите, произтичащи от разпространението на формати за представяне на емоции през последните години. Предлагаме нов подход на невронната мрежа към ЕНМ, който не само превъзхожда предишните съвременни технологии. Също толкова важно, ние представяме усъвършенствана методология за оценка и събираме силни доказателства, че нашият модел дава резултати, които са (почти) толкова надеждни, колкото човешките анотации, дори и в междуезични условия. Въз основа на тези резултати генерираме нови емоционални рейтинги за 13 типологично различни езика и твърдим, че те имат почти златно качество поне.', 'da': 'Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) har til formål at konvertere eksisterende emotion ratings fra et repræsentationsformat til et andet, f.eks. kortlægge Valence-Arousal-Dominance annotationer for ord eller sætninger til Ekmans Basic Emotions og omvendt. ERM kan således ikke kun betragtes som et alternativ til Word Emotion Induction (WEI) teknikker til automatisk følelsesleksikokonstruktion, men kan også bidrage til at afbøde problemer, der kommer fra spredningen af følelsesrepræsentationsformater i de seneste år. Vi foreslår en ny neural netværkstilgang til ERM, der ikke kun overgår den tidligere state-of-the-art. Lige så vigtigt er, at vi præsenterer en raffineret evalueringsmetode og indsamler stærke beviser for, at vores model giver resultater, der er (næsten) lige så pålidelige som menneskelige annotationer, selv i tværsprogede indstillinger. På baggrund af disse resultater genererer vi nye følelsesvurderinger for 13 typologisk forskellige sprog og hævder, at de i det mindste har næsten guldkvalitet.', 'nl': "Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) heeft als doel bestaande emotie ratings van het ene representatieformaat naar het andere te converteren, bijvoorbeeld Valence-Arousal-Dominance annotaties voor woorden of zinnen in kaart te brengen in Ekman's Basic Emotions en vice versa. ERM kan dus niet alleen worden beschouwd als een alternatief voor Word Emotion Induction (WEI) technieken voor automatische emotie lexicon constructie, maar kan ook helpen problemen te verminderen die voortvloeien uit de proliferatie van emotie representatie formaten in de afgelopen jaren. We stellen een nieuwe neurale netwerkbenadering voor ERM voor die niet alleen de vorige state-of-the-art overtreft. Even belangrijk is dat we een verfijnde evaluatiemethodologie presenteren en sterk bewijs verzamelen dat ons model resultaten oplevert die (bijna) even betrouwbaar zijn als menselijke annotaties, zelfs in cross-lingual settings. Op basis van deze resultaten genereren we nieuwe emotie ratings voor 13-typologisch diverse talen en beweren dat ze in ieder geval bijna gouden kwaliteit hebben.", 'de': 'Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) hat das Ziel, bestehende Emotion Ratings von einem Darstellungsformat in ein anderes zu konvertieren, z.B. Valence-Arousal-Dominance Annotationen für Wörter oder Sätze in Ekmans Basic Emotions abzubilden und umgekehrt. ERM kann somit nicht nur als Alternative zu Word Emotion Induction (WEI) Techniken für die automatische Emotion Lexikon Konstruktion betrachtet werden, sondern kann auch helfen, Probleme zu lindern, die durch die Verbreitung von Emotion Repräsentationsformaten in den letzten Jahren entstehen. Wir schlagen einen neuen Ansatz für neuronale Netze vor, der nicht nur den bisherigen Stand der Technik übertrifft. Ebenso wichtig ist, dass wir eine verfeinerte Evaluationsmethodik präsentieren und starke Beweise dafür sammeln, dass unser Modell Ergebnisse liefert, die (fast) genauso zuverlässig sind wie menschliche Annotationen, auch in sprachübergreifenden Umgebungen. Basierend auf diesen Ergebnissen generieren wir neue Emotionsbewertungen für 13-typologisch verschiedene Sprachen und behaupten, dass diese mindestens Goldqualität aufweisen.', 'id': 'Perpetakan Perwakilan Emosi (ERM) memiliki tujuan untuk mengubah nilai emosi yang ada dari satu format perwakilan ke yang lain, misalnya, memetakan anotasi Valence-Arousal-Dominance untuk kata atau kalimat ke Emosi dasar Ekman dan sebaliknya. ERM tidak hanya dapat dianggap sebagai alternatif untuk teknik Word Emotion Induction (WEI) untuk konstruksi leksikon emosi otomatis tetapi juga dapat membantu mengurangi masalah yang berasal dari proliferasi format representation emosi di tahun-tahun terakhir. Kami mengusulkan pendekatan jaringan saraf baru ke ERM yang tidak hanya melampaui peringkat terakhir sebelumnya. Sama penting, kami mempersembahkan metodologi evaluasi yang baik dan mengumpulkan bukti yang kuat bahwa model kami memberikan hasil yang (hampir) setia seperti anotasi manusia, bahkan dalam pengaturan saling bahasa. Berdasarkan hasil ini kami menghasilkan nilai emosi baru untuk 13 bahasa tipologis yang berbeda dan mengklaim bahwa mereka memiliki kualitas hampir emas, setidaknya.', 'ko': '정서표징영사(ERM)의 목표는 기존의 정서 등급을 하나의 표징 형식에서 다른 것으로 바꾸는 것이다. 예를 들어 단어나 문장의 배가를 우위 주석을 Ekman의 기본 정서로 환기하는 것이다. 반대로도 마찬가지다.따라서 ERM은 감정 어휘를 자동으로 구축하는 어휘인 감정유도(WEI) 기술의 대체 방법으로 볼 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 최근 몇 년 동안 감정 표징 양식의 급증에 따른 문제점을 완화하는 데도 도움이 될 것이다.우리는 이전의 최신 기술보다 우수할 뿐만 아니라 새로운 ERM 신경 네트워크 방법을 제시했다.마찬가지로 중요한 것은 우리가 완벽한 평가 방법을 제시했고 강력한 증거를 수집하여 우리의 모델이 발생한 결과(거의)가 인류의 주석과 같이 믿을 만하다는 것을 증명했다. 설령 크로스 언어 환경에서도 마찬가지다.이러한 결과에 근거하여 우리는 13가지 유형의 다양한 언어에 대해 새로운 감정 평가를 형성했고 적어도 황금에 가까운 질을 가지고 있다고 주장했다.', 'sw': 'Ramani ya Uwakilishaji wa hisia (ERM) ina lengo la kubadilisha hisia zilizopo kutokana na format moja ya uwakilishi kuwa moja kwa moja, kwa mfano, ramani ya matangazo ya Valence-Arouse kwa maneno au hukumu katika hisia za msingi za Ekman na kinyume na vibaya vinginevyo. Kwa hiyo, ERM haiwezi kuchukuliwa kama njia mbadala ya Mradi wa Tamko la Kuhamasisha (WEI) kwa ajili ya ujenzi wa kujihisia wa kujitegemea, lakini pia inaweza kusaidia kupunguza matatizo yanayotokana na maendeleo ya uwakilishi wa hisia kwa miaka ya hivi karibuni. Tunazipendekeza njia mpya ya mtandao wa neura kwenda kwa ERM ambayo si tu inaonyesha hali iliyopita ya sanaa. Ni muhimu sawa, tunaweka mbinu za uchunguzi zilizotafsiriwa na kukusanya ushahidi wenye nguvu kwamba mifano yetu inaleta matokeo ambayo (karibu) yanategemea kama matatizo ya binadamu, hata katika mazingira ya lugha mbalimbali. Kutokana na matokeo haya tunatengeneza hisia mpya kwa lugha 13 mbalimbali na kudai kuwa wana kiwango cha karibu cha dhahabu, angalau.', 'af': "Emotie Representation Mapping (ERM) het die doel om bestaande emosie-reitings van een voorstelling formaat na 'n ander een te omskakel, bv. die kaart van Valence-Arousal-Dominance-annotasies vir woorde of setings in Ekman s e Basiese Emoties en vice verskillig. ERM kan dan nie alleen as 'n alternatief wees as 'n Woord Emotion Induksie (WEI) teknike vir outomatiese emosie lexicon konstruksie nie, maar dalk mag ook hulp help om probleme te verminder wat van die uitbreiding van emosie voorstelling formaat in onlangse jaar kom. Ons voorstel 'n nuwe neuralnetwerk toegang tot ERM wat nie net die vorige staat van die kuns uitvoer nie. Gelyk belangrik is ons 'n opgewerde evalueringsmetodologie voorsien en sterk getuienis versamel dat ons model resultate verkry wat (amper) so betroubaar as menslike notasies is, selfs in kruistale instellings. Op hierdie resultate genereer ons nuwe emosie-reitings vir 13 tipologiese verskillende tale en verkondig dat hulle naby-goud kwaliteit het, ten minste.", 'hr': 'Ima cilj preobraćati postojeće ocjene emocija iz jednog predstavljanja u drugu formu, npr. mapiranje oznake Valence-Arousal-Dominance za riječi ili kazne u Ekmanove osnovne emocije i suprotno. Zbog toga se ERM ne može smatrati samo alternativom tehnika Emotion Induction (WEI) riječi za automatičku izgradnju leksiona emocija, nego može pomoći i smanjiti probleme koje dolaze iz proširenja formata predstavljanja emocija u posljednjih godina. Predlažemo novi pristup neuralnoj mreži ERM-u koji ne samo iznosi prethodno stanje umjetnosti. Isto važno, predstavljamo rafiniranu metodologiju procjene i skupljamo jake dokaze da naš model daje rezultate koji su (skoro) pouzdani kao ljudske annotacije, čak i u međujezičkim nastavama. Na temelju tih rezultata stvaramo nove ocjene emocija za 13 tipološki različitih jezika i tvrdimo da imaju najmanje kvalitet blizu zlata.', 'sq': 'hartimi i përfaqësimit të emocioneve (ERM) ka qëllimin të konvertojë vlerësimet ekzistuese të emocioneve nga një format përfaqësimi në një tjetër, për shembull hartimi i anotacioneve Valence-Arousal-Dominance për fjalë apo fjalë në Emocionet Bazës e të Ekmanit dhe përkundrazi. ERM mund të konsiderohet kështu jo vetëm si një alternativë ndaj teknikave të induksionit të emocioneve të fjalëve (WEI) për ndërtimin automatik të lexikonëve të emocioneve, por mund të ndihmojë gjithashtu në lehtësimin e problemeve që vijnë nga përhapja e formateve të përfaqësimit të emocioneve në vitet e fundit. Ne propozojmë një qasje të re të rrjetit nervor për ERM që jo vetëm mbizotëron gjendjen e mëparshme të teknologjisë. Gjithashtu e rëndësishme, ne paraqesim një metodologji të rafinuar vlerësimi dhe mbledhim prova të forta se modeli ynë jep rezultate që janë (pothuajse) të besueshme si anotacionet njerëzore, edhe në ambientet ndërgjuhësore. Bazuar në këto rezultate ne krijojmë vlerësime të reja emocionale për 13 gjuhë tipologjikisht të ndryshme dhe pretendojmë se ato kanë cilësi të afërt ari, të paktën.', 'fa': 'نقشه نمایش احساسات (ERM) هدف دارد که نقشه\u200cهای احساسات موجود را از یک فرم نمایش به یک فرم دیگر تبدیل کند، مثال نقشه\u200cهای واژه\u200cهای والنس-Arousal-Dominance برای کلمات یا جمله\u200cها به احساسات بنیادی اکمن و بر خلاف آن. این نتیجه ERM نمی تواند تنها به عنوان جایگزینی برای تکنیک\u200cهای فشار احساسات (WEI) برای ساختن زبان\u200cهای احساسات خودکار بنیاد گیرد، بلکه می\u200cتواند همچنین مشکلات را کمک کند که در سال\u200cهای اخیر از گسترش فرموده\u200cهای نمایش احساسات می\u200cکنند. ما یک شبکه عصبی جدید به ERM پیشنهاد می کنیم که نه تنها وضعیت پیشینیان را انجام می دهد. همانطور مهم است، ما یک روش ارزیابی پاکیزه را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و مدرک قوی را جمع می\u200cکنیم که مدرک ما نتیجه\u200cهایی را می\u200cدهد که (تقریبا) به طور قابل اعتماد به عنوان ارزیابی انسان، حتی در تنظیم\u200cهای متوسط زبان است. بر اساس این نتیجه\u200cها، ما برای 13 زبان\u200cهای گوناگون نوع احساسات جدید را تولید می\u200cکنیم و می\u200cگوییم که حداقل کیفیت طلا نزدیک است.', 'tr': "Emotion Representation Mapping Bu sebäpli, EOM duýgym leňsiýasynyň(WEI) otomatik leňsiýasynyň in şaat teknikleri diňe Word Emotion Induction (Word Emotion Induction (WEI) ýagdaýynyň üýtgetmegine kömek edip biler, ýöne şeýle däldiklerinden soňky ýyllarda duýgyş şekillerini azaltmakdan Biz ERM'a täze bir nuýral şebeke gollanmagy teklip edip görýäris ki, diňe öňki sanatyň durumyny üstüne çykarýar. Daha möhüm bolsa, biz düzenlenen çözümleme methodologiýasyny görkezip we nusgymyzyň adamlaryň sözleşmeleri ýaly güýçli, hatda çerçe dil düzümlerinde hem güýçli kanıtlary getirip bilýäris. Bu netijelerde biz 13-nji tipologik dürli diller üçin täze duýgym düzenlemeklerini döredip, iň azyndan ýakyn altyn howpsuzlyklarynyň bardygyny iddia edip bilýäris.", 'bn': 'ইমোটেশন প্রতিনিধিত্ব ম্যাপিং (এরএম) বিদ্যমান আবেগের রেজিং এর লক্ষ্য রয়েছে এক প্রতিনিধিত্বের বিন্যাস থেকে অন্যের কাছে পরিবর্তন করার, যেমন ভ্যালেন্স-আরোজাল-ডোমিনেন্সের সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে অনুভূতির প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রযুক্তির বিকল্প হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা যাবে না। আমরা আরএমের কাছে নতুন নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক প্রস্তাব করছি যেটা শুধুমাত্র পূর্ববর্তী শিল্পের অবস্থা প্রদর্শন করা নয়। একই সাথে গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, আমরা একটি পরিস্কারিত মূল্যায়নের পদ্ধতি উপস্থাপন করি এবং শক্তিশালী প্রমাণ সংগ্রহ করি যে আমাদের মডেলের ফলাফল প্রদান করে (প্রায় Based on these results we generate new emotion ratings for 13 typologically diverse languages and claim that they have near-gold quality, at least.', 'hy': "Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) has the goal to convert existing emotion ratings from one representation format into another one, e.g., mapping Valence-Arousal-Dominance annotations for words or sentences into Ekman's Basic Emotions and vice versa.  Այսպիսով, ERM-ը կարող է համարվել ոչ միայն որպես բառերի զգացմունքների ինդուկցիայի (WEI) հնարավորությունների այլընտրանք ավտոմատիկ զգացմունքների լեքսիկոնի կառուցման համար, այլ նաև օգնել նվազեցնել խնդիրները, որոնք առաջացել են զգացմունքների ներկայացման ֆորմատների տարածման Մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր նյարդային ցանցի մոտեցում ERM-ին, որը ոչ միայն գերազանցում է նախորդ տեխնոլոգիաները: Նույնքան կարևոր է, որ մենք ներկայացնում ենք բարելավված գնահատման մեթոդոլոգիա և հավաքում ենք ուժեղ ապացույցներ, որ մեր մոդելը բերում է արդյունքներ, որոնք (գրեթե) այնքան վստահելի են, ինչքան մարդկային նոտացիաները, նույնիսկ լեզվային միջավայրում: Հիմնված այս արդյունքների վրա մենք ստեղծում ենք նոր զգացմունքների գնահատականներ 13 տիպոլոգիապես բազմազան լեզուների համար և պնդում, որ դրանք ունեն մոտ ոսկու որակ, առնվազն:", 'az': 'Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) m…ôqs…ôdil…ô bir t…ôsirli format ńĪndan m√∂vcuddur emosyon qiym…ôtl…ôrini baŇüqasńĪna √ßevirm…ôk m…ôqs…ôdil…ô m…ôqs…ôdil…ô, m…ôs …ôl…ôn Valence-Arousal-Dominance Ňü…ôkill…ôrini ifad…ô etm…ôk v…ô s√∂zl…ôrini Ekman ńĪn temel EmotiyalarńĪna √ßevirm…ôk m…ôqs…ôdil…ô. Buna g√∂r…ô d…ô ERM ancaq Word Emotion Induction (WEI) tehnikl…ôrinin otomatik emosiyal leksikon in ŇüaatńĪ √ľ√ß√ľn alternatifi deyil, lakin √ßox son ill…ôrd…ô emosiyalńĪq t…ôsirl…ôrinin geniŇül…ônm…ôsind…ôn g…ôl…ôn probleml…ôrin azaltmasńĪna k√∂m…ôk ed…ô bil…ôr. Biz ERM √ľ√ß√ľn yeni n√∂ral Ňü…ôb…ôk…ô t…ôklif edirik ki, ancaq …ôvv…ôlki sanatńĪn v…ôziyy…ôtini baŇüa d√ľŇü…ôr. ∆Źlb…ôtt…ô d…ô, biz d√ľz…ôldilmiŇü deńüerlendirm…ô metodolojisini g√∂st…ôririk v…ô modelimizin insan bildirm…ôl…ôri kimi g√ľvenilir, h…ôtta √ßoxlu dil ayarlarńĪnda m√∂hk…ôm d…ôlill…ôri toplayńĪrńĪq. Bu n√∂vb…ôtl…ôr…ô baxmayaraq, 13 tipolojik m√ľxt…ôlif dill…ôr √ľ√ß√ľn yeni duygusal qiym…ôtl…ôr yaratdńĪq v…ô az qala altńĪn keyfiyy…ôtini iddia edirik.', 'bs': 'Ima cilj preobraćati postojeće ocjene emocija iz jednog formāta predstavljanja u drugu, npr. mapiranje annotacija Valence-Arousal-Dominance za riječi ili kazne u Ekmanove osnovne emocije i suprotno. Zbog toga se ERM ne može smatrati alternativom tehnika Emotion Induction (WEI) za automatsku konstrukciju leksiona emocija, nego može pomoći i smanjiti probleme koje dolaze iz proširenja formata predstavljanja emocija u posljednjih godina. Predlažemo novi neuronski pristup ERM-u koji ne samo iznosi prethodnu stanju umjetnosti. Isto važno, predstavljamo rafiniranu metodologiju procjene i skupljamo jake dokaze da naš model donosi rezultate koji su (skoro) pouzdani kao ljudske annotacije, čak i u međujezičkim nastavama. Na temelju ovih rezultata stvaramo nove ocjene emocija za 13 tipološki različitih jezika i tvrdimo da imaju barem kvalitet blizu zlata.', 'am': 'የኢሜይል አቀማመጥ (ERM) የአሁኑን እውቀት ማድረግ ከአንዲት መልዕክት ክፍል ወደ ሌላ ክፍል ለመለወጥ ጉዳዩ ነው፤ ለምሳሌ የዋሌንስ-አርማሲ-ዶሚናስ ማስታወቂያ ለቃላት ወይም sentences ወደ Ekman የመጀመሪያ ስህተት እና ክፍለ ክፍል. በኋለኛው ዓመታት የስብሰባ መልዕክቶች ማሳየት የሚችሉትን አሜሪካዊ (WEI) ስህተት አካባቢ አካባቢ (አሜሪካ) ቴክክኖችን ለመቀበል ብቻ አይችልም፡፡ የቀድሞውን የ-art ሁኔታ ብቻ ሳይሆን አዲስ የደብዳቤ መረብ መቀናቀል እናስባለን፡፡ በተለያዩ አዋቂነት፣ የክፍለ ማስታወቂያ ማድረጊያውን እናስቀርባለን እና በቋንቋዎች ውስጥ እንኳ እንደሚታመኑ (በአጠቃላይ) የሚታመኑት ፍሬዎችን እናስሰብስባታለን፡፡ እነዚህን ፍሬዎች በመሠረት አዲስ የስህተት እውቀት ለ13 በተለያየ ቋንቋዎች እና ምንም እንኳ የወርቅ ጥሩ እንዳላቸው እናስባለን፡፡', 'et': 'Emotsioonide esindamise kaardistamise (ERM) eesmärk on teisendada olemasolevad emotsioonide reitingud ühest esitusvormingust teise, näiteks kaardistada Valence-Arousal-Dominance märkused sõnadele või lausetele Ekmani põhilistesse emotsioonidesse ja vastupidi. ERMi ei saa seega pidada mitte ainult alternatiiviks sõnade emotsioonide induktsiooni (WEI) tehnikatele automaatse emotsiooni leksikoni ehitamiseks, vaid võib aidata leevendada ka probleeme, mis tulenevad emotsioonide esitamise formaatide levikust viimastel aastatel. Pakume välja ERMile uue närvivõrgu lähenemisviisi, mis mitte ainult ei ületa eelmist tehnika taset. Sama oluline on esitleda täiustatud hindamismeetodit ja koguda tugevaid tõendeid selle kohta, et meie mudel annab tulemusi, mis on (peaaegu) sama usaldusväärsed kui inimese märkused, isegi keeleüleselt. Nende tulemuste põhjal loome uued emotsioonide hinnangud 13 tüpoloogiliselt mitmekesisele keelele ja väidame, et neil on peaaegu kuldne kvaliteet.', 'ca': "El mapa de representació emocional (ERM) té l'objectiu de convertir les valoracions emocionals existents d'un format de representació en un altre, per exemple, mapejant anotacions de Valence-Arousal-Dominance per paraules o frases en les emocions bàsiques d'Ekman i vice versa. L'ERM no només pot ser considerada una alternativa a les tècniques de Word Emotion Induction (WEI) per la construcció automàtica de lexicons emocionals, sinó també pot ajudar a mitigar els problemes que surten de la proliferació de formats de representació emocional en els últims anys. We propose a new neural network approach to ERM that not only outperforms the previous state-of-the-art.  També important, presentem una metodologia d'evaluació refinada i recollim fortes evidències que el nostre model produeix resultats que són (gairebé) tan fiables com les anotacions humanes, fins i tot en entorns translingües. Sobre la base d'aquests resultats generem noves valoracions emocionals per 13 llengües tipològicament diverses i afirmem que tenen gairebé qualitat d'or, almenys.", 'cs': 'Emoční reprezentace mapování (ERM) má za cíl převést stávající hodnocení emocí z jednoho reprezentačního formátu do jiného, např. mapování Valence-Arousal-Dominance anotací pro slova nebo věty do Ekmanovy základní emoce a naopak. ERM tak může být považován nejen za alternativu k technikám indukce emocí slova (WEI) pro automatickou konstrukci emočního lexikonu, ale může také pomoci zmírnit problémy, které vyplývají z šíření formátů reprezentace emocí v posledních letech. Navrhujeme nový přístup neuronové sítě k ERM, který nejen překoná předchozí nejmodernější. Stejně důležité je, že prezentujeme rafinovanou metodiku hodnocení a shromažďujeme silné důkazy o tom, že náš model přináší výsledky, které jsou (téměř) stejně spolehlivé jako lidské anotace, a to i v různých jazycích. Na základě těchto výsledků generujeme nové emoční hodnocení pro 13 typologicky rozmanité jazyky a tvrdíme, že mají téměř zlatou kvalitu.', 'fi': 'Emotion Representation Mapping (ERM) pyrkii muuntamaan olemassa olevat emotionaaliset luokitukset yhdestä esitysmuodosta toiseen, esim. kartoittamalla Valence-Arousal-Dominance-merkinnät sanoille tai lauseille Ekmanin Perustunneiksi ja päinvastoin. ERM:ää voidaan näin ollen pitää vaihtoehtona sanallisen emotionaalisen induktion (WEI) tekniikoille automaattisessa emotionaalisen sanaston rakentamisessa, mutta se voi myös auttaa lieventämään ongelmia, jotka johtuvat emotionaalisten esitysmuotojen lisääntymisestä viime vuosina. Ehdotamme uutta neuroverkkolähestymistapaa ERM:ään, joka ei ainoastaan ylitä aikaisempaa huipputekniikkaa. Yhtä tärkeää on, että esittelemme hienostuneen arviointimenetelmän ja keräämme vahvaa näyttöä siitä, että mallimme tuottaa tuloksia, jotka ovat (lähes) yhtä luotettavia kuin inhimilliset merkinnät, jopa monikielisissä asetuksissa. Näiden tulosten perusteella luomme uusia tunneluokituksia 13 typologisesti erilaiselle kielelle ja väitämme niiden olevan lähes kultaisia.', 'he': 'למפות מייצג רגשות (ERM) יש את המטרה להפוך את ציוני רגשות קיימים מתוך צורת מייצג אחד לתוך צורת אחרת, למשל למפות ציונים של Valence-Arousal-Dominance למילים או משפטים לארגשות בסיסיים של Ekman והפך. ERM יכול, לכן, לא רק להיות נחשב כאלטרנטיבה לטכניקות לייצור רגשות של מילים (Word Emotion Induction, WEI) לבניית רקסיקון רגשות אוטומטית, אלא גם יכול לעזור להקל את הבעיות שבהן מגיעות מהפיתוח של פורמטים מייצג רגשות בשנים האחרונות. אנו מציעים גישה חדשה לרשת עצבית לאי.ר.ם. שלא רק יוצאת מעל המצב הקודם. Equally important, we present a refined evaluation methodology and gather strong evidence that our model yields results which are (almost) as reliable as human annotations, even in cross-lingual settings.  Based on these results we generate new emotion ratings for 13 typologically diverse languages and claim that they have near-gold quality, at least.', 'ha': "Map na Mawallafin Fikirati (ERM) yana da goa ya mayar da shirin hisãbi wanda ke cikin shirin nunawa daga fomat guda zuwa wani na daban, misali, karnin zane-zane na-Aryan-Dominance wa maganar gaske ko ƙoƙasassun zuwa Fifiko na Kiasalin Ekiman da ke versa. Dõmin haka, ERM bã za a iya ƙaddara shi ba, kamar wata matsayi na Kalmar Tafiyar da ido (WEI) na canza wa mazaɗar tamkar laksi farat ɗaya, kuma amma yana iya amfani da su ƙara mataimaki waɗanda ke zo daga pro-zayon tsarin masu wakilishi na hisia a cikin shekara na farko. Munã goyyar da wani zanen aikin neural zuwa ERM, bã zai iya gabatar da halin-da-gaba kawai ba. Kuma daidai da muhimu, tuna gabatar da wata hanyoyi mai saɓa ta ƙaddara kuma munã samun shaidar tabbatacce cẽwa misalinmu yana fitar fassarar da su (nesta) kamar misalin mutane ne da ake amintar da, kõ da cikin tsarin misalin misalin. Basic kan waɗannan matsalar, za'a ƙiƙiro hisãbi da ke iya hanyarwa na 13 cikin harshen dabam-dabam kuma munã faɗa sun da sifar-kyakkon zĩnãriya kusa, a lokacin.", 'jv': 'Emadong ESM Gak bener mengko iso nggawe ngubah Alternate kanggo Kemerdekaan Word emuation Awak dhéwé ngerbah sistem sing dibutuhke alat sing gawe nggambar oleh dumadhi durung-kebuturan Ingat kabèh lanian, kita mengko perusahaan ngerasakno dadi aturan nggawe nguasakno karo perusahaan winih sing dadi nggawe modèl kejahatan (amèh) ngono nggawe dolanan liyane dadi kapan-ayakno, dadi kapan kanggo ngerasakno dumadhi winih. Balika ditambah kuwi nggambar kuwi, kita mbukake nggawe tarjamahan sing luwih kanggo kalah-luwih kanggo kalah-luwih kanggo ngerasakno', 'sk': 'Namen Mapiranja čustvene reprezentacije (ERM) je pretvoriti obstoječe ocene čustev iz ene oblike reprezentacije v drugo, npr. mapiranje opomb Valence-Arousal-Dominance za besede ali stavke v Ekmanova osnovna čustva in obratno. ERM se torej ne more obravnavati le kot alternativa tehnikam besedne indukcije čustev (WEI) za avtomatsko konstrukcijo čustev leksikona, ampak lahko pomaga tudi ublažiti težave, ki nastanejo zaradi širjenja formatov čustev reprezentacije v zadnjih letih. Predlagamo nov pristop nevronskih omrežij k ERM, ki ne le presega prejšnje najsodobnejše. Prav tako pomembno je, da predstavimo prefinjeno metodologijo ocenjevanja in zbiramo trdne dokaze, da naš model prinaša rezultate, ki so (skoraj) enako zanesljivi kot človeške opombe, tudi v medjezičnih okoljih. Na podlagi teh rezultatov ustvarimo nove ocene čustev za 13 tipološko različnih jezikov in trdimo, da imajo vsaj skoraj zlato kakovost.', 'bo': 'Emotion Representation Mapping ERM འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་བཟོ་བརྗོད་པ་ཅིག་ཞིག་ཡིན་པ་མིན་པར། འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྔོན་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་དྲ་བ་གསརཔ་ཞིག་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་མིན་པར། དཔེར་ན། ང་ཚོས་མིག་དཔྱད་འཐབ་རྩོལ་བ་བཟོས་ཡོད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་བསྡུར་བརྟན་པར་མཐུན་པ་ཞིག་ཡོད། གནད་སྡུད་འདི་དག་ལ་འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་འགྱུར་བའི་སེམས་ཚོར་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གསར་བསྐྲུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Emotion Detection and Classification in a Multigenre Corpus with Joint Multi-Task Deep Learning', 'ar': 'كشف وتصنيف المشاعر في مجموعة أجناس متعددة مع التعلم العميق المشترك متعدد المهام', 'es': 'Detección y clasificación de emociones en un corpus multigénero con aprendizaje profundo conjunto multitarea', 'fr': 'Détection et classification des émotions dans un corpus multigenre avec Deep Learning multitâche conjoint', 'pt': 'Detecção e classificação de emoções em um corpus multigênero com aprendizado profundo conjunto multitarefa', 'ja': 'マルチタスク共同深層学習を伴うマルチジェレルコーパスにおける感情の検出と分類', 'zh': '有合多任务深学者多语料库情检类', 'hi': 'संयुक्त बहु-कार्य डीप लर्निंग के साथ एक मल्टीजेनर कॉर्पस में भावना का पता लगाना और वर्गीकरण', 'ru': 'Обнаружение и классификация эмоций в мультигенном корпусе с совместным многозадачным глубоким обучением', 'ga': 'Brath Mothúchán agus Aicmiú i gCorpas Ilchineálach ina bhfuil Foghlaim Dhomhain Chomhpháirteach Ilthasc', 'hu': 'Az érzelmek felismerése és osztályozása egy többműfajú testületben, közös többfeladatú mélytanulással', 'ka': 'Emotion Detection and Classification in a Multigenre Corpus with Joint Multi-Task Deep Learning', 'it': 'Rilevamento e classificazione delle emozioni in un corpo multigenere con Deep Learning Multi-Task congiunto', 'lt': 'Emocijų aptikimas ir klasifikavimas daugiasluoksniame korpuse su bendru daugiasluoksniu išsamiu mokymusi', 'el': 'Ανίχνευση συναισθημάτων και ταξινόμηση σε ένα σώμα πολλαπλών ειδών με κοινή βαθιά μάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών', 'ms': 'Pengesanan emosi dan Klasifikasi dalam Multigenre Corpus dengan Joint Multi-Task Deep Learning', 'mk': 'Детектирање и класификација на емоции во мултиџенерски корпус со заедничко мултизадачно длабоко учење', 'ml': 'യൂണ്ട് Multi-Task ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിനോടൊപ്പം ഒരു മള്\u200dജെന്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്സില്\u200d എമോട്ടോഷന്\u200d കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'mt': 'Id-Detezzjoni u l-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Emezzjonijiet f’Korp Multi ġeneriku b’Tagħlim Profond Multikompitu Konġunt', 'kk': 'Көптеген көптеген тапсырмалар қалыпты оқытумен көңіл табу мен классификациясы', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie emocji i klasyfikacja w korpusie wielogartunkowym ze wspólnym wielozadaniowym Deep Learning', 'ro': 'Detectarea și clasificarea emoțiilor într-un corpus multigen cu învățare profundă multiactivă comună', 'mn': 'Олон жанрын холбоотой олон ажлын гүнзгий суралцах холбоотой сэтгэл хөдлөл ойлголт болон классификация', 'no': 'Oppdag og klassifisering av emosjonar i eit multigenre korpus med samanlikning av fleire oppgåver', 'so': 'Xasuuska iyo baaritaanka iskuulka ah ee la xiriira iskuulka shaqaalaha', 'sv': 'Känsledomsdetektering och klassificering i en flergenrekorpus med gemensam djupinlärning med flera uppgifter', 'ta': 'இணைய பல பணி ஆழமாக கற்றுக்கொண்டு பல ஜென் கார்புஸில் உணர்வு கண்டுபிடிப்பு மற்றும் வகைப்படுத்தல்', 'sr': 'Detekcija emocija i klasifikacija u multigenru korpusu sa zajedničkim dubokim učenjem multizadataka', 'ur': 'Multigenre Corpus کے ساتھ ملی-ٹاکس عمیق سیکھنے کے ساتھ ایموٹیशन شناسایی اور کلاسیفی', 'si': 'සම්බන්ධ ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩි කාර්ය ගොඩක් හොයාගන්න සහ ක්ලාසිෆේන්ස් එක්ක ගොඩක් වැඩි කාර්ය', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Phát hiện cảm xúc và phân tích theo đa thể của tập đoàn Phát triển sâu', 'bg': 'Откриване и класификация на емоциите в мултижанров корпус със съвместно многофункционално дълбоко обучение', 'da': 'Følelsesladelse og klassificering i et multigenre korpus med fælles multi-opgave dyb læring', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje emocija i klasifikacija u multigenru korpusu s zajedničkim dubokim učenjem višezadataka', 'nl': 'Emotiedetectie en classificatie in een multigenre corpus met Joint Multi-Task Deep Learning', 'de': 'Emotionserkennung und Klassifizierung in einem Multigenre-Korpus mit gemeinsamem Multi-Task Deep Learning', 'id': 'Deteksi emosi dan Klasifikasi dalam Multigenre Corpus dengan Joint Multi-Task Deep Learning', 'ko': '다중 임무 심도 있는 학습을 바탕으로 하는 다중 장르 어료 라이브러리에서의 감정 검측과 분류', 'fa': 'شناسایی احساسات و کلاس\u200cشناسایی در یک کورپوس چند ژنر با یادگیری عمیق عمیق چندین کار مشترک', 'tr': 'Çoklu-genr bölümünde duygusal tanış ve klasifikasyon Birlikte Çoklu-Görev Derin Öğrenmesi bilen', 'sw': 'Kutambua hisia na Kutangaza katika Makosa ya Kikundi na Kujifunza Kikuu cha Kazi', 'sq': 'Detektimi i emocioneve dhe klasifikimi në një korpus shumëgjeneral me mësim të përbashkët shumë-detyrash të thella', 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների հայտնաբերումը և դասակարգումը բազմագենրի կորպուսում, որի միջոցով ընդհանուր բազմախնդիրներ խորը սովորելը', 'af': 'Comment', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': "Multigenre Corpus'da bir çox-Task Deep Learning ilə Emotion Detection and Classification", 'bn': 'সংযুক্ত বহুজাতিক কাজের গভীর শিক্ষার সাথে মাল্টিজেন কোর্পাসে ইমোটেশন সন্ধান এবং পরিচয়', 'bs': 'Detekcija emocija i klasifikacija u multigenru korpusu sa zajedničkim dubokim učenjem multizadataka', 'ca': "Detecció i classificació d'emocions en un cos multigènere amb aprenentatge profund multitascat conjunt", 'cs': 'Detekce emocí a klasifikace v multižánrovém korpusu se společným multiúkolovým hlubokým učením', 'et': 'Emotsioonide tuvastamine ja klassifitseerimine mitmežanri korpuses ühise mitmeülesandega sügavõppega', 'fi': 'Tunteiden tunnistus ja luokittelu monigenren korpusissa yhteisen monitehtävän syväoppimisen avulla', 'jv': 'iCalImp', 'he': 'גילוי רגשות וקlassifikaציה בקורפוס Multigenre עם למידה עמוקה במשימות רבות משותפות', 'sk': 'Zaznavanje čustev in klasifikacija v večžanrskem korpusu s skupnim večopravilnim globokim učenjem', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྣང་བརྗོད་རྟོགས་དང་ཚོར་བ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ནང་དུ་འཕགས་རིས་མཐུན་སྣ་གྲངས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་འདུག'}
{'en': 'Detection and classification of emotion categories expressed by a sentence is a challenging task due to subjectivity of emotion. To date, most of the models are trained and evaluated on single genre and when used to predict emotion in different genre their performance drops by a large margin. To address the issue of robustness, we model the problem within a joint multi-task learning framework. We train this model with a multigenre emotion corpus to predict emotions across various genre. Each genre is represented as a separate task, we use soft parameter shared layers across the various tasks. our experimental results show that this model improves the results across the various genres, compared to a single genre training in the same neural net architecture.', 'ar': 'يعد اكتشاف وتصنيف فئات المشاعر التي تعبر عنها الجملة مهمة صعبة بسبب ذاتية العاطفة. حتى الآن ، يتم تدريب معظم النماذج وتقييمها على نوع واحد وعند استخدامها للتنبؤ بالعواطف في نوع مختلف ، ينخفض أداؤها بهامش كبير. لمعالجة مسألة المتانة ، نقوم بنمذجة المشكلة ضمن إطار عمل تعليمي مشترك متعدد المهام. نقوم بتدريب هذا النموذج بمجموعة من المشاعر متعددة الأجناس للتنبؤ بالعواطف عبر الأنواع المختلفة. يتم تمثيل كل نوع كمهمة منفصلة ، ونحن نستخدم طبقات مشتركة للمعلمات اللينة عبر المهام المختلفة. تظهر نتائجنا التجريبية أن هذا النموذج يحسن النتائج عبر الأنواع المختلفة ، مقارنةً بنوع واحد من التدريب في نفس بنية الشبكة العصبية.', 'pt': 'A detecção e classificação de categorias de emoção expressas por uma frase é uma tarefa desafiadora devido à subjetividade da emoção. Até o momento, a maioria dos modelos são treinados e avaliados em um único gênero e, quando usados para prever emoções em diferentes gêneros, seu desempenho cai em grande margem. Para abordar a questão da robustez, modelamos o problema dentro de uma estrutura de aprendizado multitarefa conjunta. Treinamos este modelo com um corpus de emoção multigênero para prever emoções em vários gêneros. Cada gênero é representado como uma tarefa separada, usamos camadas compartilhadas de parâmetros suaves nas várias tarefas. nossos resultados experimentais mostram que esse modelo melhora os resultados em vários gêneros, em comparação com um único treinamento de gênero na mesma arquitetura de rede neural.', 'es': 'La detección y clasificación de las categorías de emociones expresadas por una oración es una tarea difícil debido a la subjetividad de la emoción. Hasta la fecha, la mayoría de los modelos están entrenados y evaluados en un solo género y, cuando se utilizan para predecir emociones en diferentes géneros, su rendimiento disminuye en gran medida. Para abordar el problema de la robustez, modelamos el problema dentro de un marco de aprendizaje conjunto multitarea. Entrenamos este modelo con un corpus de emociones multigénero para predecir emociones en varios géneros. Cada género se representa como una tarea separada, utilizamos capas compartidas de parámetros suaves en las distintas tareas. Nuestros resultados experimentales muestran que este modelo mejora los resultados en los distintos géneros, en comparación con un entrenamiento de un solo género en la misma arquitectura de red neuronal.', 'fr': "La détection et la classification des catégories d'émotions exprimées par une phrase constituent une tâche difficile en raison de la subjectivité de l'émotion. À ce jour, la plupart des modèles sont formés et évalués sur un seul genre et lorsqu'ils sont utilisés pour prédire l'émotion dans un genre différent, leur performance diminue considérablement. Pour résoudre le problème de la robustesse, nous modélisons le problème dans un cadre d'apprentissage multitâche commun. Nous entraînons ce modèle avec un corpus d'émotions multigenres afin de prédire les émotions dans différents genres. Chaque genre est représenté comme une tâche distincte, nous utilisons des couches partagées de paramètres souples pour les différentes tâches. Nos résultats expérimentaux montrent que ce modèle améliore les résultats dans les différents genres, par rapport à un entraînement de genre unique dans la même architecture de réseau neuronal.", 'ja': '文章によって表現される感情のカテゴリーの検出と分類は、感情の主観性に起因する困難な課題である。現在までに、ほとんどのモデルは単一のジャンルで訓練され評価されており、異なるジャンルで感情を予測するために使用されると、パフォーマンスが大幅に低下します。堅牢性の問題に対処するために、私たちは共同マルチタスク学習フレームワーク内で問題をモデル化します。様々なジャンルの感情を予測するために、このモデルを多ジャンルの感情コーパスでトレーニングします。各ジャンルは個別のタスクとして表され、様々なタスクにわたってソフトパラメータ共有レイヤーを使用します。実験結果は、このモデルが同じニューラルネットアーキテクチャの単一のジャンルトレーニングと比較して、様々なジャンルにわたる結果を改善することを示しています。', 'ru': 'Выявление и классификация категорий эмоций, выраженных предложением, является сложной задачей из-за субъективности эмоций. На сегодняшний день большинство моделей обучены и оценены в одном жанре, и при использовании для прогнозирования эмоций в разных жанрах их производительность падает на большой отступ. Чтобы решить проблему надежности, мы моделируем проблему в рамках совместного многозадачного обучения. Мы тренируем эту модель с помощью многожанрового корпуса эмоций, чтобы предсказывать эмоции в различных жанрах. Каждый жанр представлен в виде отдельной задачи, мы используем мягкие общие слои параметров между различными задачами. наши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что эта модель улучшает результаты между различными жанрами, по сравнению с одним жанром обучения в одной и той же нейронной сетевой архитектуре.', 'hi': 'एक वाक्य द्वारा व्यक्त की गई भावना श्रेणियों का पता लगाना और वर्गीकरण भावना की व्यक्तिपरकता के कारण एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है। आज तक, अधिकांश मॉडलों को एकल शैली पर प्रशिक्षित और मूल्यांकन किया जाता है और जब विभिन्न शैली में भावनाओं की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए उपयोग किया जाता है तो उनका प्रदर्शन एक बड़े मार्जिन से गिर जाता है। मजबूती के मुद्दे को संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एक संयुक्त बहु-कार्य सीखने के ढांचे के भीतर समस्या को मॉडल करते हैं। हम विभिन्न शैली में भावनाओं की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए एक multigenre भावना कॉर्पस के साथ इस मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं। प्रत्येक शैली को एक अलग कार्य के रूप में दर्शाया जाता है, हम विभिन्न कार्यों में नरम पैरामीटर साझा परतों का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि यह मॉडल एक ही तंत्रिका नेट आर्किटेक्चर में एक एकल शैली प्रशिक्षण की तुलना में विभिन्न शैलियों में परिणामों में सुधार करता है।', 'zh': '情之主观性,检类之情,一挑战性之任也。 迄今为止者,大率皆练评于一体,当以占情,其形大幅降。 为稳健性者,合多任务学框架而建模之也。 多流情语料库练此形,以占各种类型之情。 每流示独任,百务用软参数共。 臣等实验结果表明,比于同神经网络架构之流教,宜模样改善。', 'ga': 'Is tasc dúshlánach é catagóirí na mothúchán a chuirtear in iúl le habairt a bhrath agus a rangú de bharr suibiachtúlacht na mothúchán. Go dtí seo, déantar an chuid is mó de na samhlacha a oiliúint agus a mheas ar sheánra aonair agus nuair a úsáidtear iad chun mothúcháin i seánraí éagsúla a thuar titeann a bhfeidhmíocht go mór. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt ar shaincheist na stóinseachta, déanaimid an fhadhb a shamhaltú laistigh de chomhchreat foghlama il-tasc. Cuirimid oiliúint ar an tsamhail seo le corpas mothúcháin ilchineálacha chun mothúcháin thar seánraí éagsúla a thuar. Léirítear gach seánra mar thasc ar leith, úsáidimid sraitheanna bog paraiméadar roinnte ar fud na dtascanna éagsúla. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha go bhfeabhsaíonn an tsamhail seo na torthaí ar fud na seánraí éagsúla, i gcomparáid le hoiliúint seánra amháin san ailtireacht néarghlan chéanna.', 'ka': 'ემოციონის კატეგორიების განსახულება და კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც გამოსახულებული სიტყვებით, ემოციონის სუბუქტივისთვის გამოსახულებელია. ახლა მოდელების უფრო მეტი მოდელები ერთი გენერზე განაკეთებულია და განაკეთებულია და როდესაც გამოყენებულია ემოციას განსხვავებული გენერში განაკეთებულია მათი მუშაობა დიდ მარ ჩვენ ძალიან ძალიან მსგავსი პრობლემას შესახებ, ჩვენ მხოლოდ მრავალური სწავლების ფრამეტში მოდელურებთ. ჩვენ ამ მოდელს მულტიგენერი ემოციონის კორპუსით გავარწმუნოთ ემოციონები განსხვავებული გენერის განმავლობაში. ყოველ გენერი იყოს განსაკუთრებული რაოდენობა, ჩვენ განსაკუთრებული რაოდენობების განსაკუთრებული პარამეტრები გამოყენებთ. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგები აჩვენებენ, რომ ეს მოდელ განსხვავებული გენერების შესაბამისი შედეგების შესაბამისი ერთი გენერის განაცემთა ერთი ნეიროლური მხოლოდ ა', 'el': 'Η ανίχνευση και ταξινόμηση των κατηγοριών συναισθημάτων που εκφράζονται από μια πρόταση είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο λόγω της υποκειμενικότητας του συναισθήματος. Μέχρι σήμερα, τα περισσότερα από τα μοντέλα εκπαιδεύονται και αξιολογούνται σε ένα είδος και όταν χρησιμοποιούνται για την πρόβλεψη συναισθημάτων σε διαφορετικό είδος, η απόδοση τους μειώνεται κατά μεγάλο περιθώριο. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί το ζήτημα της ανθεκτικότητας, μοντελοποιούμε το πρόβλημα μέσα σε ένα κοινό πλαίσιο μάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών. Εκπαιδεύουμε αυτό το μοντέλο με ένα σώμα συναισθημάτων πολλαπλών ειδών για να προβλέψουμε συναισθήματα σε διάφορα είδη. Κάθε είδος αντιπροσωπεύεται ως ξεχωριστή εργασία, χρησιμοποιούμε μαλακές παραμέτρους κοινόχρηστα στρώματα σε διάφορες εργασίες. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι αυτό το μοντέλο βελτιώνει τα αποτελέσματα στα διάφορα είδη, σε σύγκριση με ένα μόνο είδος εκπαίδευσης στην ίδια αρχιτεκτονική νευρικού δικτύου.', 'hu': 'A mondatban kifejezett érzelmi kategóriák felismerése és osztályozása kihívást jelent az érzelmek szubjektivitása miatt. A mai napig a modellek többségét egyetlen műfajra képezik és értékelik, és amikor a különböző műfajokban érzelmek előrejelzésére használják, a teljesítményük nagy mértékben csökken. A robusztusság kérdésének kezelése érdekében a problémát egy közös, többfeladatos tanulási keretben modellezzük. Ezt a modellt egy többműfajú érzelmi korpussal képezzük, hogy megjósoljuk az érzelmeket a különböző műfajokban. Minden műfaj külön feladatként jelenik meg, a különböző feladatok között puha paramétereket használunk. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy ez a modell javítja az eredményeket a különböző műfajok között, összehasonlítva egyetlen műfajú képzéssel azonos neurális hálózati architektúrában.', 'kk': 'Эмоциялық санаттарын табу мен түрлендіру - емоциялық тапсырмасының маңызды тапсырмасы. Қазір, моделдердің көпшілігі бір жанр бойынша оқылған және өзгертілген жанр бойынша емоцияларды өзгерту үшін көпшіліктерінің көпшілігі үлкен шегінде ұстайд Бірнеше көп тапсырманың оқыту бағдарламасында мәселеді түсіндіру үшін. Бұл үлгі көптеген емоциялық корпус арқылы көптеген жанрының көптеген емоцияларды таңдау үшін көптеген емоциялық корпус арқылы үйренеміз Әрбір жанр бөлек тапсырма ретінде көрсетіледі, біз әртүрлі тапсырмалардың ортақтастырылған параметрлерін қолданамыз. біздің тәжірибелік нәтижелеріміз, бұл үлгі әртүрлі жанрлардың нәтижелерін жақсартып, бір жанрлық желі архитектурасының бір жанрлық оқыту архитектурас', 'lt': 'Emocijų kategorijų nustatymas ir klasifikavimas, išreikštas sakinyje, yra sunki užduotis dėl emocijų subjektyvumo. Iki šiol dauguma modelių yra apmokomi ir vertinami pagal vieną genrą, o kai jie naudojami emocijoms įvairių genrų atžvilgiu prognozuoti, jų rezultatai labai mažėja. Siekiant spręsti patikimumo klausimą, modeliuojame šią problem ą pagal bendrą daugiafunkcinio mokymosi sistemą. Mes treniruojame šį model į su daugiasluoksniu emociniu korpusu, kad būtų galima prognozuoti emocijas įvairiose genėse. Kiekvienas žaneras yra atstovaujamas kaip atskira užduotis, mes naudojame minkštus parametrų bendrus sluoksnius įvairiose užduotyse. mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad šis modelis gerina įvairių genrų rezultatus, palyginti su vienu genrų mokymu toje pačioje nervų tinklo architektūroje.', 'it': "La rilevazione e la classificazione delle categorie emotive espresse da una frase è un compito impegnativo dovuto alla soggettività dell'emozione. Ad oggi, la maggior parte dei modelli sono addestrati e valutati su un singolo genere e quando utilizzati per prevedere le emozioni in diversi generi la loro performance diminuisce di un ampio margine. Per affrontare il problema della robustezza, modeliamo il problema all'interno di un quadro comune di apprendimento multi-task. Alleniamo questo modello con un corpus emozionale multigenere per predire emozioni attraverso vari generi. Ogni genere è rappresentato come un compito separato, utilizziamo livelli condivisi di parametri soft tra i vari compiti. I nostri risultati sperimentali mostrano che questo modello migliora i risultati attraverso i vari generi, rispetto ad un singolo genere di formazione nella stessa architettura di rete neurale.", 'ml': 'വാക്കില്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കപ്പെട്ട വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുകയും, വികാരണത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ കാരണം വികാ ഇന്നത്തേക്ക് മോഡലുകളില്\u200d മിക്കവും ഒരു ജീനില്\u200d പരിശീലിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത ജീനിലെ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുമ്പോ To address the issue of robustness, we model the problem within a joint multi-task learning framework.  നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ മോഡലിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു മള്\u200dട്ടിഗ്രെയിന്\u200dറെ വികാരങ്ങള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് കൊണ്ടാണ്. വ്യത്യ ഓരോ ജന്തുവും വേര്\u200dതിരിച്ച ജോലിയായി പ്രതിനിധിയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു, വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളിലേക്ക് മോശമാ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ജീനുകളിലെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഒരേ പ്രവർ', 'mk': 'Детектирањето и класификацијата на категориите на емоции изразени со реченица е предизвикувачка задача поради субјективноста на емоциите. До сега, повеќето модели се обучени и оценети на еден џенер и кога се користат за предвидување на емоциите во различни џенери нивната изведба падна за голема маргина. За да го решиме прашањето на robustness, го моделираме проблемот во заедничката рамка за учење со повеќе задачи. Го тренираме овој модел со мултигенериски емоционален корпус за да предвидеме емоции низ различни генери. Секој џенр е претставен како одделна задача, ние користиме меки параметри споделени слоеви низ различните задачи. our experimental results show that this model improves the results across the various genres, compared to a single genre training in the same neural net architecture.', 'ms': 'Detection and classification of emotion categories expressed by a sentence is a challenging task due to subjectivity of emotion.  Sehingga kini, kebanyakan model dilatih dan diteliti pada jenis tunggal dan apabila digunakan untuk meramalkan emosi dalam jenis yang berbeza prestasi mereka jatuh dengan margin besar. Untuk mengatasi isu kepekatan, kita model masalah dalam kerangka pembelajaran berbilang-tugas bersama. Kami melatih model ini dengan banyak jenis emosi corpus untuk meramalkan emosi di seluruh jenis. Setiap jenis diwakili sebagai tugas terpisah, kami menggunakan lapisan berkongsi parameter lembut melalui pelbagai tugas. our experimental results show that this model improves the results across the various genres, compared to a single genre training in the same neural net architecture.', 'mt': "L-identifikazzjoni u l-klassifikazzjoni ta’ kategoriji ta’ emozzjonijiet espressi minn sentenza hija kompitu ta’ sfida minħabba s-suġġettività tal-emozzjoni. Sal-lum, il-biċċa l-kbira tal-mudelli huma mħarrġa u evalwati fuq ġeneru wieħed u meta jintużaw biex jipprevedu l-emozzjoni f’ġeneru differenti l-prestazzjoni tagħhom tonqos b’marġni kbir. Biex nindirizzaw il-kwistjoni tar-robustezza, nimmudellaw il-problem a fi ħdan qafas konġunt ta' tagħlim b'ħafna kompiti. Aħna nħarrġu dan il-mudell b’korpus emozzjonali multiġeneriku biex nipprevedi emozzjonijiet madwar diversi ġeneri. Kull ġeneru huwa rrappreżentat bħala kompitu separat, a ħna nużaw saffi maqsuma b’parametri rotob madwar id-diversi kompiti. ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru li dan il-mudell itejjeb ir-riżultati madwar id-diversi ġeneri, meta mqabbel ma’ taħriġ ta’ ġeneru wieħed fl-istess arkitettura tan-netwerk newrali.", 'mn': 'Шийтгэл дээр илэрхийлэгдсэн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн категориудын тодорхойлолт болон хуваалцах нь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тулд хэцүү Өнөөдөр ихэнх загварууд нэг жанр дээр суралцаж, үнэлдэг. Хэрэв өөр жанр дээр сэтгэл хөдлөлийг таамаглах хэрэгтэй вэ гэвэл тэдний үйл ажиллагааны давхар нь том зайдаар унасан. Үнэндээ хүчтэй асуудлыг асуухын тулд бид олон ажлын суралцах үйл явцын дотор асуудлыг загварчлах болно. Бид энэ загварыг олон төрлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн корпус болон өөр төрлийн төрлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийг таамаглах зорилготой. Женр бүр ялгаатай ажлын хувьд илэрхийлэгддэг. Бид олон ажил дээр энгийн параметр хуваалцах давхарга хэрэглэдэг. бидний туршилтын үр дүн нь энэ загварын үр дүнг өөр төрлийн жинхэнээс сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Oppdaging og klassifisering av følelseskategoriar uttrykket av eit setning er ein vanskeleg oppgåve ved grunn av subjektiviteten av følelser. Til dag vert dei fleste modelane trengte og evaluerte på enkelt genre og når brukt for å foregå følelser i ulike genre gjennomsnittspunkt på ein stor margin. For å handtere problemet med kraftighet, modeller vi problemet i eit saman multioppgåve-læringsrammeverket. Vi treng denne modellen med ein multigenre emosjonskorpus for å foregå følelser over ulike gener. Kvar gener er representert som ei eige oppgåve, og vi brukar måk parametrar delt lag over dei ulike oppgåvene. eksperimentelle resultatet våre viser at denne modellen forbetrar resultatet gjennom dei ulike generane, samanlikna med ei enkelt genre trening i den same neuralnettarkitekturen.', 'pl': 'Wykrywanie i klasyfikacja kategorii emocji wyrażonych przez zdanie jest wyzwaniem ze względu na subiektywność emocji. Do tej pory większość modeli jest trenowana i oceniana na pojedynczym gatunku, a gdy są używane do przewidywania emocji w różnych gatunkach, ich wydajność spada znacznie. Aby rozwiązać problem solidności, modelujemy ten problem w ramach wspólnych wielozadaniowych ram uczenia się. Trenujemy ten model z wielogartunkowym korpusem emocji, aby przewidywać emocje w różnych gatunkach. Każdy gatunek jest reprezentowany jako osobne zadanie, używamy warstw współdzielonych miękkimi parametrami w różnych zadaniach. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że model ten poprawia wyniki w różnych gatunkach, w porównaniu do treningu pojedynczego gatunku w tej samej architekturze sieci neuronowej.', 'ro': 'Detectarea și clasificarea categoriilor emoționale exprimate printr-o propoziție este o sarcină provocatoare datorită subiectivității emoției. Până în prezent, majoritatea modelelor sunt instruite și evaluate pe un singur gen și atunci când sunt folosite pentru a prezice emoțiile în diferite gen performanțele lor scad cu o marjă mare. Pentru a aborda problema robusteții, modelăm problema într-un cadru comun de învățare multi-sarcină. Antrenăm acest model cu un corpus emoțional multigen pentru a prezice emoțiile din diferite genuri. Fiecare gen este reprezentat ca o sarcină separată, folosim straturi soft parametre partajate în diferitele sarcini. Rezultatele experimentale arată că acest model îmbunătățește rezultatele diferitelor genuri, comparativ cu un singur gen de formare în aceeași arhitectură a rețelei neurale.', 'so': 'Xiriiridda iyo fasaxa kooxo emotion lagu soo daayay waa shaqa dhibaataysan, sababtoo ah waxyaabaha la dhiganayo. Maanta waxaa lagu tababariyaa tusaalooyin badan oo lagu qiimeeyaa jinsi kaliya, markana waxaa loo hormari karaa xisaabta jinsi kala duduwan oo lagu soo bandhigi karo daruur weyn. Si aan u baaraandegiso arimaha xoogsashada, waxaynu sameynaa dhibaatada qashinka waxbarashada wadajirka ah. Tusaaladan waxaynu ku tababarinnaa qof aad u dhaqdhaqaaqsan oo kala duduwan si aan u sii sheegno fikrada midab kala duduwan. Qof kasta oo jinsi ah waxaa loo muujiyaa shaqo gooni ah, waxaynu isticmaalnaa heer jilicsan oo lagu qeybeeyo meelo kala duduwan. arimahayaga tijaabada ah waxay muuqataa in tusaalahan uu kordhiyaa resultiyada jinsiyada kala duduwan, barbaro waxbarasho jinni oo keliya ah oo ku qoran dhismaha shabakadda neurada.', 'sv': 'Detektering och klassificering av känslokategorier uttryckta i en mening är en utmanande uppgift på grund av känslosubjektivitet. Hittills är de flesta modeller tränade och utvärderade på en enda genre och när de används för att förutsäga känslor i olika genrer minskar deras prestanda med stor marginal. För att ta itu med frågan om robusthet modellerar vi problemet inom en gemensam multi-task learning ram. Vi tränar denna modell med en känslokorpus för flera genrer för att förutsäga känslor över olika genrer. Varje genre representeras som en separat uppgift, vi använder mjuka parametrar delade lager över de olika uppgifterna. Våra experimentella resultat visar att denna modell förbättrar resultaten över de olika genrerna, jämfört med en enda genre utbildning i samma neuralnätsarkitektur.', 'ta': 'வாக்கியத்தால் வெளிப்படுத்தப்பட்ட உணர்வு வகைகளை கண்டுபிடிப்பது இப்போது, பெரும்பாலான மாதிரிகள் ஒரே மரத்தில் பயிற்சி மற்றும் மதிப்பிடப்படுகிறது மற்றும் வேறு மரத்தில் உணர்வுகளை முன்வெளிப்பட ஆடுதல் பிரச்சனையை முடிக்க, நாம் ஒரு இணைய பல பணி கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் சட்டத்தில் பிரச்சனையை மாதிரிக்கிறோ நாம் இந்த மாதிரியை பல்வளைந்த உணர்வு குறிப்புகளுடன் பயிற்சி செய்கிறோம் பல மரபணுக்கு முழுவதும் உணர்வுகளை ம ஒவ்வொரு இனமும் தனிப்பட்ட பணியாக குறிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, நாம் மென்ன அளபுரு அளவுரு பல பணிகளில் பகிர்ந்த அடுக்கு எங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் காண்பிக்கப்படுகிறது இந்த மாதிரி பல மரபணுகளின் முடிவுகளை மேம்படுத்துகிறது, அதே புதிய நெட் கட்டுப்பா', 'sr': 'Otkrivanje i klasifikacija kategorija emocija izraženih rečenicom je izazovni zadatak zbog subjektivnosti emocija. Do sada, većin a modela se obučavaju i procjenjuju na jednom genru i kada se koristi za predviđanje emocija u različitim genrima, njihova predstava pada velikom marginom. Da bi se riješili pitanje robotnosti, modeliramo problem u zajedničkom okviru multi task učenja. Ovaj model treniramo sa multigenarnim emocionalnim korpusom da predviđamo emocije u raznim genrima. Svaki genr je predstavljen kao odvojeni zadatak, koristimo meke parametre zajedničke slojeve preko različitih zadataka. naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da ovaj model poboljšava rezultate u raznim genrima u usporedbi sa jednom treningam genra u istoj neuralnoj mrežnoj arhitekturi.', 'ur': 'احساسات کائٹیوں کی شناسایی اور کلاسپیٹ جو ایک جماعت کے ذریعے بیان کی گئی ہے احساسات کی سرپرست کی وجہ سے ایک مشکل کام ہے. یہاں تک، اکثر نمڈلوں کی تعلیم اور ارزیابی کی جاتی ہے ایک جنر پر اور جب ان کی عملکرد ایک بڑی مرز سے مختلف جنر میں احساسات کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے استعمال کی جاتی ہے۔ طاقت کے مسئلہ کے بارے میں ہم مشکل کو ایک ملتی ٹاکس کی تعلیم فرم میں مدل کریں گے۔ ہم نے اس موڈل کو ایک مختلف جنس کے اندر مختلف احساسات کی پیش بینی کرنے کے لئے ایک متعدد جنس احساسات کورپوس کے ساتھ سکھایا ہے۔ ہر جنر ایک جدا کام کے طور پر نمایش کی جاتی ہے، ہم مختلف کاموں میں نرم پارامیٹ شریک لائٹ استعمال کرتے ہیں. ہمارے آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ مدل مختلف ژنر کے نتیجے بہتر کر دیتا ہے، اس کے مطابق ایک جینر کی تطابق ایک نئورل نیٹ معماری میں۔', 'si': 'භාවිත වර්ගයක් හොයාගන්න හා වර්ගයක් වර්ගයක් වලින් ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි භාවිතාවක්  අවස්ථානයෙන්, බොහෝ මොඩල් එක්ක ජේන්ටර් එක්ක විශේෂයෙන් ප්\u200dරධානය කරලා තියෙනවා ඒ වගේම වෙනස් ජේන්ටර් එක්ක විශ ශක්තිමත්වය ගැන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ විශ්ණ වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අ අපි මේ මොඩල් එක්ක ගොඩක් ජාතික හැඟීම් කොර්පස් එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා වෙනස් ජාතික වලට හැඟීම හැම වර්ගයක්ම වෙනස් වැඩක් විදියට ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා, අපි වෙනස් වැඩක් වෙනස් වැඩක් විදියට සාමාන අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ මේ මොඩේල විවිධ විශේෂයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් විසිද', 'uz': "Bu so'z tomonidan keladigan hissiyotning turlarini aniqlash va tahrirlash, hissiyotning muhimligi sababchi qiyin. Hozirga, ko'pchilik modellar bir geni o'rganiladi va qiymatlashadi va har xil gendagi hissiyalarni ko'rsatadi va ko'pchilikdan foydalanishni o'ylab turganda, ularning xulosi katta margin orqali chiqaradi. Ko'pchilik muammolarini boshqarish uchun, biz bir necha vazifa o'rganish qoidadagi muammolarni modellaymiz. Biz bu modelni ko'pchilik hissiyotning qo'shib o'rganamiz va har xil genlar ichida hissiyotlarini ko'rganamiz. Har bir geni aloqa vazifa sifatida hisoblanadi, biz har xil vazifalar bilan bog'liq parametrlarni ishlatamiz. tajriba natijalarimizni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bu model har xil genlar natijalari natijalarini o'zgartiradi, va bir necha neyron nett arxituvchisiga o'rganishga kamaytirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Việc phát hiện và phân loại cảm xúc diễn ra bằng một câu nói là một thử thách do tính người của cảm xúc gây ra. Cho đến nay, hầu hết các mô hình được đào tạo và đánh giá về một thể loại riêng lẻ và được sử dụng để dự đoán cảm xúc trong thể loại khác nhau những tác phẩm của chúng với một khoảng cách lớn. Để giải quyết vấn đề vững chắc, chúng tôi mô tả vấn đề trong một hệ thống học tập nhiều nhiệm vụ chung. Chúng tôi đào tạo mô hình này với một cơ thể cảm xúc đa thể để dự đoán cảm xúc trong nhiều thể loại. Mỗi thể loại được đại diện như một nhiệm vụ riêng biệt, chúng tôi sử dụng các lớp tham số mềm chia sẻ trong các nhiệm vụ khác nhau. Kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy rằng mô hình này cải thiện kết quả trên các thể loại khác nhau, so với một thể loại riêng trong cấu trúc lưới thần kinh.', 'bg': 'Откриването и класифицирането на емоционалните категории, изразени чрез изречение, е предизвикателна задача поради субективността на емоцията. Към днешна дата повечето модели са обучени и оценени по един жанр и когато се използват за предсказване на емоции в различен жанр, представянето им спада с голям марж. За да се справим с проблема с устойчивостта, моделираме проблема в рамките на съвместна рамка за многозадачи обучение. Обучаваме този модел с мултижанров емоционен корпус, за да предсказваме емоциите в различни жанрове. Всеки жанр е представен като отделна задача, използваме меки параметри споделени слоеве в различните задачи. нашите експериментални резултати показват, че този модел подобрява резултатите в различните жанрове, в сравнение с един жанр обучение в една и съща архитектура на невронната мрежа.', 'hr': 'Otkrivanje i klasifikacija kategorija emocija izraženih rečenicom je izazovni zadatak zbog subjektivnosti emocija. Do sada, većin a modela se obučavaju i procjenjuju na jednom genru i kada se koristi za predviđanje emocija u različitim genrima, njihovi propasti učinkovitosti na velikoj margini. Da bi se riješili pitanje snage, modelirali smo problem u zajedničkom okviru multizadatka učenja. Ovaj model treniramo sa multigenarnim emocionalnim korpusom da predviđamo emocije u raznim genrima. Svaki genr je predstavljen kao odvojeni zadatak, koristimo meke dijeljene slojeve u raznim zadatacima. naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da ovaj model poboljšava rezultate u raznim genrima u usporedbi s jednom treniranjem genra u istoj neuralnoj mrežnoj arhitekturi.', 'da': 'Detektion og klassificering af følelseskategorier udtrykt af en sætning er en udfordrende opgave på grund af følelsens subjektivitet. Til dato er de fleste af modellerne trænet og evalueret på enkelt genre, og når de bruges til at forudsige følelser i forskellige genre deres performance falder med en stor margin. For at løse spørgsmålet om robusthed modellerer vi problemet inden for en fælles multi-task læringsramme. Vi træner denne model med et multigenre følelseskorpus til at forudsige følelser på tværs af forskellige genrer. Hver genre er repræsenteret som en separat opgave, vi bruger bløde parameter delte lag på tværs af de forskellige opgaver. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser, at denne model forbedrer resultaterne på tværs af de forskellige genrer sammenlignet med en enkelt genre træning i samme neurale netarkitektur.', 'nl': 'Het opsporen en classificeren van emotiecategorieën uitgedrukt door een zin is een uitdagende taak vanwege de subjectiviteit van emotie. Tot op heden worden de meeste modellen getraind en geëvalueerd op één genre en wanneer ze gebruikt worden om emotie in verschillende genres te voorspellen, daalt hun prestaties met een grote marge. Om het probleem van robuustheid aan te pakken, modelleren we het probleem binnen een gezamenlijk multitask leerkader. We trainen dit model met een multigenre emotie corpus om emoties in verschillende genres te voorspellen. Elk genre wordt vertegenwoordigd als een afzonderlijke taak, we gebruiken zachte parameter gedeelde lagen over de verschillende taken. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat dit model de resultaten in de verschillende genres verbetert, vergeleken met één genre training in dezelfde neurale netarchitectuur.', 'id': 'Deteksi dan klasifikasi kategori emosi yang diungkapkan oleh kalimat adalah tugas yang menantang karena subjektivitas emosi. Sehingga saat ini, kebanyakan modelnya dilatih dan diteliti pada genre tunggal dan ketika digunakan untuk memprediksi emosi dalam genre yang berbeda prestasi mereka jatuh dengan margin besar. Untuk mengatasi masalah kepekatan, kita model masalah dalam rangka belajar multi-tugas bersama. Kami melatih model ini dengan tubuh emosi multigenre untuk memprediksi emosi di berbagai genre. Setiap genre dipilih sebagai tugas terpisah, kami menggunakan lapisan berbagi parameter lembut di antara berbagai tugas. hasil percobaan kami menunjukkan bahwa model ini meningkatkan hasil di berbagai jenis, dibandingkan dengan satu jenis latihan dalam arsitektur jaringan saraf yang sama.', 'de': 'Die Erkennung und Klassifizierung von Emotionskategorien, die durch einen Satz ausgedrückt werden, ist aufgrund der Subjektivität der Emotion eine herausfordernde Aufgabe. Bis heute werden die meisten Modelle auf einzelne Genres trainiert und bewertet und wenn sie verwendet werden, um Emotionen in verschiedenen Genres vorherzusagen, sinkt ihre Performance erheblich. Um das Thema Robustheit anzugehen, modellieren wir das Problem in einem gemeinsamen Multi-Task-Lernrahmen. Wir trainieren dieses Modell mit einem multigenre Emotionskorpus, um Emotionen über verschiedene Genres hinweg vorherzusagen. Jedes Genre wird als separate Aufgabe dargestellt, wir verwenden weiche Parameter geteilte Ebenen für die verschiedenen Aufgaben. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass dieses Modell die Ergebnisse über die verschiedenen Genres hinweg verbessert, im Vergleich zu einem einzelnen Genre Training in derselben neuronalen Netzarchitektur.', 'ko': '감정의 주관성 때문에 문장이 표현하는 감정 유형의 검측과 분류는 도전적인 임무이다.지금까지 대부분의 모델은 단일 장르에서 훈련과 평가를 해 왔기 때문에 서로 다른 장르의 정서를 예측하는 데 사용될 때 그 표현이 크게 떨어진다.노봉성 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 연합 다중 임무 학습 틀 안에서 문제를 모델링한다.우리는 다양한 장르의 감정 자료 라이브러리로 이 모델을 훈련시켜 서로 다른 장르의 감정을 예측한다.모든 유형은 하나의 단독 임무로 표시되며, 우리는 각 임무에서 소프트 파라미터 공유층을 사용합니다.우리의 실험 결과 같은 신경 네트워크 구조에서의 단일 유형 훈련에 비해 이 모델은 서로 다른 유형의 훈련 결과를 향상시켰다.', 'fa': 'شناسایی و گروه\u200cهای احساسات که توسط یک جمله توضیح داده شده\u200cاند یک کار سخت\u200cکننده\u200cای است به دلیل تحقیق احساسات. تا حالا، بیشتر مدلها روی یک ژنتر آموزش و ارزیابی می\u200cشوند و وقتی برای پیش بینی احساسات در ژنتر مختلف استفاده می\u200cشوند، عملکرد آنها با یک مرز بزرگ فرود می\u200cشود. برای حل مسئله قوی، مشکل را در یک چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچها ما این مدل را با یک کورپوس احساسات چند ژن آموزش می دهیم تا احساسات را در مختلف ژن مختلف پیش بینی کنیم. هر نوع به عنوان یک کار جدا نمایش داده می\u200cشود، ما از لایه\u200cهای متفاوت پارامتر نرم در کار مختلف استفاده می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه آزمایشی ما نشان می دهد که این مدل نتیجه\u200cهای مختلف را در مقایسه با آموزش یک ژن در یک معماری شبکه عصبی بهتر می\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'Kugundua na kutangazwa kwa makundi ya hisia yaliyoonyeshwa na hukumu ni kazi ya changamoto kutokana na utulivu wa hisia. Mpaka sasa, mifano mingi inafundishwa na kutathmini kwa jinsia moja na wakati ambapo zilitumika kutabiri hisia za jinsia tofauti zinapungua utendaji wao kwa kiwango kikubwa. Ili kujadili suala la uvumbuzi, tunaelezea tatizo ndani ya mfumo wa kujifunza kazi za pamoja. Tunafundisha muundo huu kwa viungo vya hisia vingi kutabiri hisia mbalimbali. Kila geni kinawakilishwa kama kazi tofauti, tunatumia parameter myeufu zilizosambazwa katika kazi mbalimbali. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo huu unabadilisha matokeo katika mitindo mbalimbali, ukilinganisha na mafunzo ya kijinsia moja katika ujenzi huo wa neura.', 'sq': 'Detektimi dhe klasifikimi i kategorive të emocioneve shprehur nga një dënim është një detyrë sfiduese për shkak të subjektivitetit të emocioneve. Deri tani, shumica e modeleve janë trajnuar dhe vlerësuar në një xhener të vetëm dhe kur përdoren për të parashikuar emocionet në një xhener të ndryshëm performanca e tyre bie me një margin të madh. Për të trajtuar çështjen e qëndrueshmërisë, ne modelojmë problemin brenda një kuadri të përbashkët mësimi me shumë detyra. Ne e trajnojmë këtë model me një korpus emocional shumëgjeneral për të parashikuar emocionet anembanë gjenerave të ndryshme. Çdo xhener është përfaqësuar si një detyrë e veçantë, ne përdorim nivele të ndara me parametra të butë përgjatë detyrave të ndryshme. rezultatet tona eksperimentale tregojnë se ky model përmirëson rezultatet anembanë gjenerëve të ndryshme, krahasuar me një stërvitje të vetme gjeneri në të njëjtën arkitekturë rrjeti nervor.', 'tr': 'Duýgyş kategoriýalaryň tanyş we klasifikasy bir sözlem tarapyndan ifade edilen duýgyş subjektiýasynyň sebäbi örän kynçylyk täbi. Şu wagt, modelleriň köp bölegi ýeke jener bilen bilinmediler we çalyşyrylýar, we haçan duýgularyň üýtgeýänligini üýtgetmek üçin ulanylýarlar. Gürlidärlik meseleni çözmek üçin, biz multi-täblik öwrenme çerçevesinde meseleni örän çykýarys. Biz bu nusgany görnüş ýaly duýgularyň köpüsi bilen öwrülip otyrýarys. Her çeşit ayrı bir görev olarak temsil edildi, biz farklı görevlerde yumuşak parametreleri kullanırız. Synaniýaly netijelerimiz bu nusga dürli jenerallaryň netijelerini üýtgedýändigini görkezýär, birnäçe jeneral syýahat arhitekteriýasynda degişli.', 'hy': 'Զգացմունքների կատեգորիաների հայտնաբերումը և դասակարգումը նախադասության միջոցով արտահայտված մարտահրավեր է զգացմունքների սուբյեկտիվության պատճառով: Այսօր մոդելների մեծ մասը սովորեցվում է և գնահատվում մեկ գենդերով, և երբ օգտագործվում է տարբեր գենդերում զգացմունքներ կանխատեսելու համար, նրանց արտադրողությունը մեծ սահմանով նվազում է: Որպեսզի լուծենք ուժեղության խնդիրը, մենք մոդելավորում ենք խնդիրը միասին բազմախնդիրների ուսուցման շրջանակում: We train this model with a multigenre emotion corpus to predict emotions across various genre.  Յուրաքանչյուր ժեներ ներկայացված է որպես առանձին խնդիր, մենք օգտագործում ենք փափուկ պարամետրերի բաժանված շերտեր տարբեր խնդիրների ընթացքում: մեր փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ այս մոդելը բարելավում է տարբեր գենդերների արդյունքները, համեմատած նույն նեյրոնային ցանցային ճարտարապետության մի գենդերային ուսումնասիրության հետ:', 'am': 'በቁጥጥር የተናገሩት የemotional ክፍሎች ማፍረስ እና መግለጫ የስብሰባ ታዋቂነት ምክንያት አዋቂ ስራ ነው፡፡ እስከ ዛሬ ድረስ ብዙዎቹ ሞዴሎቹ በአንድ ጀርና ላይ ተማርተዋል እናም በተለያዩ የሥርዓት ልዩ ልዩ ሥርዓት ላይ ስሜታቸውን በተለየ ትልቅ ማረፊያ ይጎድላሉ፡፡ የልብስ ጉዳይ ለመቀላቀል፣ ጉዳዩን በብዙ ስራ ትምህርት ፍሬም ውስጥ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህንን ምሳሌ በብዙ ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ዓይነቶች የሚኖረውን አካባቢ እናስተምረዋለን፡፡ የሥርዓት ሁሉ የተለየ ስራ ነው፣ ነጥብ ምርጫዎች በተለያዩ ስራዎች ላይ የተካፈሉትን ደረጃዎች እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን ይህ ምሳሌ በተለያዩ የሥርዓት ፍሬዎችን ያሳድጋል፣ በአንድ በኩል የደቡብ መረብ መሠረት ትምህርት ይተካክላል፡፡', 'bn': 'একটি শাস্তি দ্বারা প্রকাশিত আবেগের বিভাগের সনাক্তি এবং বিভাগের বিভাগ হচ্ছে আবেগের বিশেষত্বের কারণে। এখন পর্যন্ত, বেশীরভাগ মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ ও মূল্য প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করা হয় এক জিনিসের উপর এবং যখন বিভিন্ন প্রজাতিতে অনুভূতি প্রত্যাখ্যান করা হয়, তখন রাস্তার ব্যাপারে কথা বলার জন্য, আমরা এই সমস্যার মডেল করি যুক্ত বহুকাজের শিক্ষা ফ্রেমের মধ্যে। আমরা এই মডেলের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ করি বিভিন্ন জিনিসের বিভিন্ন অনুভূতি ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করার জন্য এক মাল্টিজারের প্রত্যেক জিনিস একটি আলাদা কাজ হিসেবে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা হয়, আমরা বিভিন্ন কাজের মধ্যে সফটপ্যারামিটার ব্যবহার কর আমাদের পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে এই মডেল বিভিন্ন জিনিসের ফলাফল উন্নত করে দেয়, একই নিউরেল নেট কাঠামোর তুলনায় এক গ্রীন প্রশিক্ষণের', 'az': 'Cümlədən ifadə edilən emosyon kategoriyalarının tanıması və klasifikasyonu duyguların subjektivi üzündən çətin bir işdir. Şimdiye qədər, modellərin çoxu təhsil edilir və təkcə təhsil edilir və təhsil edilir. Nəhayət, fərqli genr içində duygularını təhsil etmək üçün onların performansları böyük bir margin ilə düşür. Qüvvətli olan məsələni çəkmək üçün, bir çoxlu iş öyrənmə qurğusu içində problemi modelləyirik. Biz bu modeli çoxlu genr emosyon korpusu ilə təhsil edirik, cürbəcür genr arasında emosyonları təhsil etmək üçün. Hər genr ayrı bir iş kimi göstərilir, biz müxtəlif işlər arasında yumuşaq parametrlər paylaşır. eksperimental sonuçlarımız göstərir ki, bu modellərin sonuçlarını müxtəlif çenlərdə yaxşılaşdırır, eyni nöral a ğ arhitektarında təhsil edir.', 'ca': "La detecció i la classificació de categories emocionals expresses per una frase és una tasca desafiadora degut a la subjectivitat de l'emoció. Fins ara, la majoria dels models s'entrenen i s'evaluen en un únic gènere i quan s'utilitzen per predir emocions en diferents gèneres, el seu rendiment disminueix en un gran marge. Per abordar la qüestió de la robustet, modelem el problem a dins un marc conjunt d'aprenentatge multitascat. Ensenyem aquest model amb un corpus emocional multigènere per predir emocions a través de diversos gèneres. Cada gènere està representat com una tasca separada, utilitzem capes compartides de paràmetres suaus a través de les diverses tasques. els nostres resultats experimentals mostren que aquest model millora els resultats dels diversos gèneres, comparat amb un únic gènere de formació en la mateixa arquitectura de xarxa neural.", 'cs': 'Detekce a klasifikace emočních kategorií vyjádřených větou je náročným úkolem vzhledem k subjektivitě emocí. K dnešnímu dni je většina modelů trénována a hodnocena na jednom žánru a při předpovědi emocí v různých žánrech jejich výkon klesá značně. Pro řešení otázky robustnosti modelujeme problém v rámci společného rámce víceúkolového učení. Tento model trénujeme s multižánrovým emočním korpusem k předpovědi emocí napříč různými žánry. Každý žánr je reprezentován jako samostatný úkol, používáme měkké parametry sdílené vrstvy napříč různými úkoly. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že tento model zlepšuje výsledky napříč různými žánry ve srovnání s jedním žánrovým tréninkem ve stejné architektuře neuronové sítě.', 'et': 'Lauses väljendatud emotsioonikategooriate tuvastamine ja klassifitseerimine on emotsiooni subjektiivsuse tõttu keeruline ülesanne. Praeguseks on enamik mudeleid koolitatud ja hinnatud ühe žanri järgi ning kui neid kasutatakse emotsioonide ennustamiseks eri žanris, langeb nende jõudlus suure marginaali võrra. Vastupidavuse küsimuse lahendamiseks modelleerime probleemi ühises mitmeülesandelises õpperaamistikus. Me treenime seda mudelit mitme žanri emotsioonikorpusega, et ennustada emotsioone erinevates žanrites. Iga žanr on esitatud eraldi ülesandena, kasutame pehmete parameetrite jagatud kihte erinevates ülesannetes. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et see mudel parandab erinevate žanrite tulemusi võrreldes ühe žanri koolitusega samas neuraalvõrgu arhitektuuris.', 'af': "Opdekking en klasifikasie van emosie kategories wat deur 'n seting uitgevoer is is 'n pragtige taak vanweë subjektiviteit van emosie. Op dag is die meeste van die modele onderwerp en evalueer op enkele genre en wanneer gebruik word om emosie in verskillende genre te voorskou, hulle prestasie val deur 'n groot lyn. Om die probleem van kragtigheid te raak, moet ons die probleem in 'n saamste multi-taak leer raamwerk model. Ons tref hierdie model met 'n multigenre emosie korpus om emosie oor verskillende genre te voorskou. Elke genre is verteenwoordig as 'n aparte taak, ons gebruik sagte parameter gedeelde laag oor die verskillende taak. ons eksperimentale resultate wys dat hierdie model die resultate verbeter oor die verskillende genre, vergelyk met 'n enkele genre onderwerking in dieselfde neurale net-arkitektuur.", 'fi': 'Lausekkeen ilmaisemien tunneluokkien tunnistaminen ja luokittelu on haastava tehtävä tunteen subjektiivisuuden vuoksi. Tähän mennessä suurin osa malleista on koulutettu ja arvioitu yhden genren perusteella ja kun niitä käytetään ennustamaan tunteita eri genressä, niiden suorituskyky laskee suurella marginaalilla. Kestävyysongelman ratkaisemiseksi mallinnamme ongelman yhteisessä monitehtävän oppimiskehyksessä. Koulutamme tätä mallia monigenren emokorpusella ennustamaan tunteita eri genreissä. Jokainen genre on esitetty erillisenä tehtävänä, käytämme pehmeitä parametreja jaettuja kerroksia eri tehtävissä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että tämä malli parantaa tuloksia eri genreissä verrattuna yhden genren harjoitteluun samassa neuroverkkoarkkitehtuurissa.', 'bs': 'Otkrivanje i klasifikacija kategorija emocija izraženih rečenicom je izazovni zadatak zbog subjektivnosti emocija. Do sada, većin a modela se obučavaju i procjenjuju na jednom genru i kada se koristi za predviđanje emocija u različitim genrima, njihovi propasti učinka velikom marginom. Da bi se riješili pitanje robotnosti, modeliramo problem u zajedničkom okviru multi task učenja. Ovaj model treniramo sa multigenarnim emocionalnim korpusom da predvidi emocije u raznim genrima. Svaki genr je predstavljen kao odvojeni zadatak, koristimo meke dijeljene slojeve u raznim zadatacima. naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da ovaj model poboljšava rezultate u raznim genrima u usporedbi sa jednim treningom genra u istoj neuronskoj mrežnoj arhitekturi.', 'sk': 'Odkrivanje in klasifikacija čustvenih kategorij, izraženih s stavkom, je zahtevna naloga zaradi subjektivnosti čustva. Do danes se večina modelov trenira in ocenjuje po enem žanru in ko se uporablja za napovedovanje čustev v različnih žanrih, se njihova zmogljivost zmanjša za veliko maržo. Za reševanje vprašanja robustnosti problem modeliramo znotraj skupnega večopravilnega učnega okvira. Ta model treniramo z večžanrskim čustvenim korpusom za napovedovanje čustev v različnih žanrih. Vsak žanr je predstavljen kot ločeno opravilo, uporabljamo mehke parametrske skupne plasti med različnimi opravili. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da ta model izboljšuje rezultate v različnih žanrih v primerjavi z enim žanrskim usposabljanjem v isti arhitekturi nevronske mreže.', 'ha': "Mai gane kuma mai rarraba jama'a na cikin birane da aka nuna shi, shi ne wani aikin mai walãki wa matsayin hisia. Ga yanzu, mafi yawansu an sanar da su kuma an evaluce su a kan wata jini guda kuma a lokacin da ake yi amfani da su yi bayani ga hisia cikin jini dabam-daban, musamman su ƙara da margin babba. To, dõmin mu yi magana ga masu al'amarin tuttsiya, muna motsar matsalar cikin firam mai amfani da multi-aiki guda. Tuna sanar da wannan misalin da jinin mutane mai yawa dõmin ka yi gargaɗi kan hisãbi dukkan jini dabam-dabam. Each genre is represented as a separate task, we use soft parameter shared layers across the various tasks.  Matarinmu na nuna cewa wannan misalin ya improve matsalan a cikin wasu genre, sammenfani da wata macalin mutane a cikin bakin tarakin neurar.", 'jv': 'Tatanan lan kelas karo kategori alaman sing dipunangke dipunangke kapan kuwi aturan sing gagal kuwi nggawe perusahaan karo iCalImp Dadine, akeh model sing dituruti bareng sampeyan karo akeh lanjut lan ijol-ijolan sing bakal genr lan supoyo supoyo kuwi tindakan irurampun kejahatan kanggo nganggo kesalahan ning jewis ngerasakno, kita model kuwi seneng nggawe multi-task nyimpen Awak dhéwé éntuk modèl iki karo sakjane sampeyan karo perbudhakan sing sampeyan karo perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno Display routing Awak dhéwé éntuk sing paling-tolerané iki, uwong nêmên ngerasakno karo hal dadi sing paling maneh, karo ngono kuwi jenis-jenis sing nyimpen karo architecture sing netulé iki.', 'he': 'גילוי וקטגוריה של קטגוריות רגשות המוביעות על ידי משפט הוא משימה מאתגרת בגלל סוביקטיביות של רגשות. עד היום, רוב הדוגמנים מאומנים ומערכים על גנרל אחד וכאשר משתמשים כדי לחזות רגשות במגנרל שונה ההופעה שלהם נופלת על גבול גדול. כדי להתמודד עם עניין החזקה, אנחנו דוגמנים את הבעיה בתוך מסגרת לימוד רב משימות משותפת. אנו מאמן את המודל הזה עם גופוס רגשות ממרבה גנטרים כדי לחזות רגשות ברחבי גנטרים שונים. כל סוג מייצג בתור משימה נפרדת, אנחנו משתמשים בפרמטרים רכים שכבות משותפות ברחבי המשימות השונים. התוצאות הניסיונייות שלנו מראות שהמודל הזה משפר את התוצאות ברחבי הסגנונים השונים, בהשוואה לאימוני סגנון אחד באותה ארכיטקטורה רשת עצבית.', 'bo': 'སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་དབྱེ་བ་རྟོགས་དང་དབྱེ་བ་ནི་ཚིག་ཚིག་གཅིག་གི་ནང་འདྲེན་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ལས་དཀའ་ངལ་གཏམ། ད་ལྟ། མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མང་ཆེ་བ་ནི་སྐྱེས་རིས་གཅིག་གི་ནང་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་དང་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད་པ་ལས། སྟོབས་ཤུགས་ཅན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་ལ་བཤད་ན་ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁག་ཅིག་མཐུན་གྱི་བྱ་བ་ཅིག ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་གྲངས་འདི་ལ་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་སེམས་ཚོར་དང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཤིག་གི་མཐོང་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། Each genre is represented as a separate task, we use soft parameter shared layers across the various tasks. ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་འཕྲུལ་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་བ་ནི་མིག་རྩལ་འདིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་ནང་གི་གྲངས་འབྲེལ་མ་འདྲ་བའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་མཐོང་བ'}
{'en': 'How emotional are you? Neural Architectures for Emotion Intensity Prediction in Microblogs', 'ar': 'كيف حالك عاطفية؟ البنى العصبية للتنبؤ بكثافة العاطفة في المدونات الصغيرة', 'pt': 'Quão emocional você é? Arquiteturas neurais para previsão de intensidade de emoção em microblogs', 'fr': "À quel point êtes-vous émotif\xa0? Architectures neuronales pour la prédiction de l'intensité des émotions dans", 'es': '¿Qué tan emocional estás? Arquitecturas neuronales para la predicción de la intensidad emocional en microblogs', 'ja': 'どれくらい感情的ですか？マイクロブログにおける感情の強度予測のためのニューラルアーキテクチャ', 'ru': 'Насколько ты эмоционален? Нейронные архитектуры для прогнозирования интенсивности эмоций в микроблогах', 'hi': 'आप कितने भावुक हैं? माइक्रोब्लॉग्स में भावना तीव्रता भविष्यवाणी के लिए तंत्रिका आर्किटेक्चर', 'zh': '子有情绪化? 微博中情强度之神经架构', 'ga': 'Cé chomh mothúchánach atá tú? Ailtirí Néaracha chun Déine Mothúcháin a Thuar i Micribhléid', 'hu': 'Mennyire érzelmes vagy? Neurális architektúrák az érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzéséhez mikroblogokban', 'el': 'Πόσο συναισθηματικός είσαι; Νευρικές Αρχιτεκτονικές για την πρόβλεψη Έντασης Συναίσθησης σε Μικροblogs', 'ka': 'კჲლკჲ ჟთ ვმჲუთჲნალნა? Name', 'it': "Quanto sei emotivo? Architetture neurali per la previsione dell'intensità emotiva in Microblog", 'lt': 'Kiek jautiesi? Neural in ės emocijų intensyvumo prognozės mikrobloguose architektūros', 'kk': 'Сен қанша емоциялық? Микроблогтардың көңіл көңіл теңділіктерінің нейрондық архитектуралары', 'mk': 'Колку си емоционален? Неурални архитектури за предвидување на емоционска интензитет во микроблоговите', 'ml': 'നിനക്കെത്ര വികാരം? മൈക്രോബ്ലോഗിലെ ഇമോട്ടിഷന്\u200d സൂക്ഷ്മമായ വിനിമയത്തിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിച്ചറുകള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Seberapa emosi awak? Name', 'mt': 'Kemm emozzjonali inti? Arkitetturi Newrali għat-Tbassir tal-Intensità Emozzjonali fil-Mikroblogs', 'mn': 'Та хэр сэтгэл хөдлөл байдаг вэ? Микроблог дахь сэтгэл хөдлөлийн мэдрэлийн архитектурууд', 'no': 'Kor emosjonell er du? Neural Architectures for Emotion Intensity Prediction in microblogs', 'pl': 'Jak bardzo jesteś emocjonalny? Architektury neuronowe do prognozowania intensywności emocji w mikroblogach', 'sr': 'Koliko ste emocionalni? Neuralne arhitekture za predviđanje emocija intenziteta u mikroblogu', 'ro': 'Cât de emoţional eşti? Arhitecturi neurale pentru predicția intensității emoțiilor în microbloguri', 'si': 'ඔයා කොච්චර හැඟීමක්ද? මයික්රොබ්ලෝග්ස් වල හිතාවෙන්න පුළුවන් සඳහා නිර්මාණ විද්\u200dයාපෘතිය', 'so': 'sidaad u xisaabta? Horumarka aragtida', 'sv': 'Hur känslosam är du? Neurala arkitekturer för prediktion av känslointensitet i mikrobloggar', 'ta': 'நீங்கள் எவ்வளவு உணர்வு? மைக்ரோப்லாக்களில் உணர்வு உணர்வு தனிப்பட்ட முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'آپ کس طرح احساساتی ہیں؟ میکروبلوگ میں ایموٹیون انٹنسیٹ کی پیش بینی کے لئے نیورال آرکیٹرک', 'uz': 'Qancha hissiyotga ega? Name', 'vi': 'Anh xúc động thế nào? Cấu hình thần kinh cho cảm xúc Có cài đặt', 'bg': 'Колко си емоционален? Неврозни архитектури за прогнозиране на интензивността на емоциите в микроблоговете', 'nl': 'Hoe emotioneel ben je? Neuronale architecturen voor voorspelling van emotie intensiteit in microblogs', 'da': 'Hvor følelsesladet er du? Neurale arkitekturer for forudsigelse af følelsesintensitet i mikroblogs', 'hr': 'Koliko ste emocionalni? Neuralne arhitekture za predviđanje emocija intenzitete u mikroblogu', 'de': 'Wie emotional bist du? Neuronale Architekturen zur Vorhersage der Emotionsintensität in Microblogs', 'ko': '당신은 얼마나 정서적입니까?미박에서 정서 강도가 예측되는 신경 구조', 'fa': 'چقدر احساساتي؟ معماری عصبی برای پیشنهاد هوشمند احساسات در میکروبلاگ', 'sw': 'Una hisia gani? Makasiliano ya Neural kwa ajili ya Uhamiaji Uwezeshaji Udhibiti katika Microblogs', 'id': 'Seberapa emosional kau? Arkitektur Neural untuk Prediksi Intensitas Emosi di Microblog', 'tr': 'Sen nähili duýgun? Mikrobloglarda duýgym ahyrlygyny üçin näsir arhitekturlar', 'af': 'Hoe emosionele is jy? Neural Architectures for Emotion Intensity Prediction in microblogs', 'am': 'ስህተት እንዴት ነው? ምርጫዎች', 'sq': 'Sa emocionale je? Arkitektura neuronale për parashikimin e intensitetit të emocioneve në mikrobloge', 'hy': 'How emotional are you?  Միկրոբլոգերում', 'bn': 'তুমি কতটা আবেগ? মাইক্রোব্লগের ইমোটেশন সংক্রান্ত প্রেরণের জন্য নিউরেল আর্কিটেক্টর', 'ca': 'Què emocional ets? Les arquitectures neuronals per a la predicció de la intensitat emocional dels microblogs', 'az': 'Siz necə hiss edirsiniz? Mikrobloglarda Emotion Intensity Prediction for Neural Architectures in Microblogs', 'bs': 'Koliko ste emocionalni? Neuralne arhitekture za predviđanje emocija intenzitete u mikroblogu', 'cs': 'Jak emocionální jsi? Neurální architektury pro predikci intenzity emocí v mikroblogech', 'et': 'Kui emotsionaalne sa oled? Neuraalsed arhitektuurid emotsioonide intensiivsuse prognoosimiseks mikroblogides', 'fi': 'Kuinka tunteellinen olet? Neuraaliset arkkitehtuurit tunteiden intensiteetin ennustamiseen mikroblogeissa', 'sk': 'Kako čustvena si? Nevralne arhitekture za napoved intenzivnosti čustev v mikroblogih', 'ha': 'Yãya zafi? dictionary variant', 'jv': 'Kowe duwih apik opo ? Neral architectures for emutation Intensity prediktion in miktograms', 'bo': 'རང་གི་སེམས་ཚོར་ཇི་འདྲ་ཡིན་ནམ། སྐྱེས་ཆེན་ནང་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་དབུས་བཟོའི་བཟོ་བརྩོན་པ།', 'he': 'כמה רגשי אתה? ארכיטקטורות עצביות לקיום חוסר רגשות במיקרובלוגים'}
{'en': 'Social media based micro-blogging sites like Twitter have become a common source of real-time information (impacting organizations and their strategies, and are used for expressing emotions and opinions. Automated analysis of such content therefore rises in importance. To this end, we explore the viability of using deep neural networks on the specific task of emotion intensity prediction in tweets. We propose a neural architecture combining convolutional and fully connected layers in a non-sequential manner-done for the first time in context of natural language based tasks. Combined with lexicon-based features along with transfer learning, our model achieves state-of-the-art performance, outperforming the previous system by 0.044 or 4.4 % Pearson correlation on the WASSA’17 EmoInt shared task dataset. We investigate the performance of deep multi-task learning models trained for all emotions at once in a unified architecture and get encouraging results. Experiments performed on evaluating correlation between emotion pairs offer interesting insights into the relationship between them.', 'ar': "أصبحت مواقع المدونات الصغيرة القائمة على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي مثل Twitter مصدرًا شائعًا للمعلومات في الوقت الفعلي (تؤثر على المنظمات واستراتيجياتها ، وتُستخدم للتعبير عن المشاعر والآراء. وبالتالي ، تزداد أهمية التحليل الآلي لمثل هذا المحتوى. ولهذه الغاية ، فإننا استكشاف جدوى استخدام الشبكات العصبية العميقة في المهمة المحددة للتنبؤ بكثافة العاطفة في التغريدات. نقترح بنية عصبية تجمع بين الطبقات الالتفافية والمتصلة بالكامل بطريقة غير متسلسلة - تم إجراؤها لأول مرة في سياق المهام القائمة على اللغة الطبيعية. بالاقتران مع الميزات المستندة إلى المعجم جنبًا إلى جنب مع التعلم عن طريق النقل ، يحقق نموذجنا أداءً متطورًا ، ويتفوق على النظام السابق بنسبة 0.044 أو 4.4٪ من ارتباط بيرسون على مجموعة بيانات المهام المشتركة WASSA'17 EmoInt. نحن نتحرى أداء العميقة تم تدريب نماذج التعلم متعدد المهام لجميع المشاعر في وقت واحد في بنية موحدة والحصول على نتائج مشجعة. أجريت التجارب على التقييم يقدم الارتباط بين أزواج العاطفة رؤى مثيرة للاهتمام حول العلاقة بينهما.", 'fr': "Les sites de micro-blogging basés sur les réseaux sociaux tels que Twitter sont devenus une source courante d'informations en temps réel (ayant un impact sur les organisations et leurs stratégies) et sont utilisés pour exprimer des émotions et des opinions. L'analyse automatisée de tels contenus prend donc de l'importance. À cette fin, nous explorons la viabilité de l'utilisation de réseaux neuronaux profonds pour la tâche spécifique de prédiction de l'intensité des émotions dans les tweets. Nous proposons une architecture neuronale combinant des couches convolutives et entièrement connectées de manière non séquentielle - réalisée pour la première fois dans le contexte de tâches basées sur le langage naturel. Combiné à des fonctionnalités basées sur un lexique et à l'apprentissage par transfert, notre modèle atteint des performances de pointe, surpassant le système précédent de 0,044, soit 4,4\xa0% de corrélation Pearson sur l'ensemble de données de tâches partagées WASSA'17 ePoint. Nous étudions les performances de modèles d'apprentissage multitâches approfondis formés à toutes les émotions à la fois dans une architecture unifiée et obtenons des résultats encourageants. Les expériences réalisées sur l'évaluation de la corrélation entre les paires d'émotions offrent des éclairages intéressants sur la relation qui les unit.", 'es': "Los sitios de microblogueo basados en redes sociales, como Twitter, se han convertido en una fuente común de información en tiempo real (que afecta a las organizaciones y sus estrategias) y se utilizan para expresar emociones y opiniones. Por lo tanto, el análisis automatizado de dicho contenido cobra importancia. Con este fin, exploramos la viabilidad del uso de redes neuronales profundas en la tarea específica de predecir la intensidad de las emociones en los tuits. Proponemos una arquitectura neuronal que combine capas convolucionales y totalmente conectadas de manera no secuencial, realizada por primera vez en el contexto de tareas basadas en el lenguaje natural. Combinado con funciones basadas en léxico junto con el aprendizaje por transferencia, nuestro modelo logra un rendimiento de vanguardia, superando al sistema anterior en una correlación de Pearson de un 0,044 o un 4,4% en el conjunto de datos de tareas compartidas eMoint de WASSA'17. Investigamos el rendimiento de modelos de aprendizaje multitarea profundos entrenados para todas las emociones a la vez en una arquitectura unificada y obtenemos resultados alentadores. Los experimentos realizados para evaluar la correlación entre pares de emociones ofrecen información interesante sobre la relación entre ellos.", 'pt': "Sites de microblogs baseados em mídia social, como o Twitter, tornaram-se uma fonte comum de informações em tempo real (que impactam as organizações e suas estratégias, e são usados para expressar emoções e opiniões. Portanto, a análise automatizada desse conteúdo ganha importância. Para isso, nós explorar a viabilidade do uso de redes neurais profundas na tarefa específica de previsão de intensidade de emoção em tweets. Propomos uma arquitetura neural combinando camadas convolucionais e totalmente conectadas de maneira não sequencial - feita pela primeira vez no contexto de tarefas baseadas em linguagem natural. Combinado com recursos baseados em léxico juntamente com aprendizado de transferência, nosso modelo alcança desempenho de última geração, superando o sistema anterior em 0,044 ou 4,4% de correlação de Pearson no conjunto de dados de tarefas compartilhadas WASSA'17 EmoInt. modelos de aprendizagem multitarefa treinados para todas as emoções ao mesmo tempo em uma arquitetura unificada e obter resultados encorajadores. A correlação entre pares de emoções oferece insights interessantes sobre a relação entre eles.", 'ja': "Twitterのようなソーシャルメディアベースのマイクロブログサイトは、リアルタイムの情報（組織やその戦略に影響を与える）の一般的なソースとなり、感情や意見を表現するために使用されています。 したがって、そのようなコンテンツの自動分析は重要性を増している。 この目的のために、私たちはツイートの感情の強度予測の特定のタスクにディープニューラルネットワークを使用することの生存可能性を探ります。 私たちは、自然言語ベースのタスクの文脈で初めて行われた、畳み込みと完全に接続されたレイヤーを非順序的に組み合わせたニューラルアーキテクチャを提案します。 当社のモデルは、トランスファー学習と共に辞書ベースの機能と組み合わせることで、最先端のパフォーマンスを実現し、WASSA '17 EmoInt共有タスクデータセットで、従来のシステムを0.044または4.4%上回る相関性を実現しています。 私たちは、統一されたアーキテクチャで一度にすべての感情のためにトレーニングされた深いマルチタスク学習モデルのパフォーマンスを調査し、奨励される結果を得ます。 感情ペア間の相関を評価するために行われた実験は、感情ペア間の関係について興味深い洞察を提供します。", 'zh': '若Twitter之基于社交媒体微博网站已为实时息之常源(及其战略,施于情义。 故自析益重。 为问推情度特定深神经网络用可行性。 建一神经架构,以非次合卷积层与全连接层 - 此一于自然语言之上下文也。 合词典之功,及迁徙之学,模致先进之性,WASSA17 EmoInt共享之数集上高于前统0.044444.4%之Pearson相关性。 考之于一架构,而练之于情多任务学之于模形,而获其令人鼓舞焉。 论情相关性者实验为之有趣。', 'hi': "ट्विटर जैसी सोशल मीडिया आधारित माइक्रो-ब्लॉगिंग साइटें वास्तविक समय की जानकारी का एक सामान्य स्रोत बन गई हैं (संगठनों और उनकी रणनीतियों को प्रभावित करती हैं, और भावनाओं और विचारों को व्यक्त करने के लिए उपयोग की जाती हैं। इसलिए इस तरह की सामग्री का स्वचालित विश्लेषण महत्व में बढ़ जाता है। इस अंत तक, हम ट्वीट्स में भावना तीव्रता की भविष्यवाणी के विशिष्ट कार्य पर गहरे तंत्रिका नेटवर्क का उपयोग करने की व्यवहार्यता का पता लगाते हैं। हम एक गैर-अनुक्रमिक तरीके से कनवल्शनल और पूरी तरह से जुड़ी परतों के संयोजन के संयोजन वाले एक तंत्रिका वास्तुकला का प्रस्ताव करते हैं - प्राकृतिक भाषा आधारित कार्यों के संदर्भ में पहली बार किया गया। स्थानांतरण सीखने के साथ-साथ शब्दकोश-आधारित सुविधाओं के साथ संयुक्त, हमारा मॉडल अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है, जो WASSA'17 EmoInt साझा कार्य डेटासेट पर 0.044 या 4.4% पियर्सन सहसंबंध द्वारा पिछली प्रणाली को पछाड़ता है। हम एक एकीकृत वास्तुकला में एक बार में सभी भावनाओं के लिए प्रशिक्षित गहरे बहु-कार्य सीखने के मॉडल के प्रदर्शन की जांच करते हैं और उत्साहजनक परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं। भावना जोड़े के बीच सहसंबंध का मूल्यांकन करने पर किए गए प्रयोग उनके बीच संबंधों में दिलचस्प अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करते हैं।", 'ru': "Сайты микроблогов, основанные на социальных сетях, такие как Twitter, стали общим источником информации в реальном времени (влияющей на организации и их стратегии) и используются для выражения эмоций и мнений. Поэтому все большее значение приобретает автоматизированный анализ такого содержания. С этой целью мы исследуем целесообразность использования глубоких нейронных сетей для конкретной задачи прогнозирования интенсивности эмоций в твитах. Предложена нейронная архитектура, объединяющая сверточные и полностью связанные слои непоследовательным образом - впервые сделанная в контексте задач на основе естественного языка. В сочетании с функциями, основанными на лексиконе, наряду с обучением переносу, наша модель достигает самой современной производительности, превосходя предыдущую систему на 0,044 или 4,4% корреляции Пирсона в наборе данных совместной задачи WASSA '17 EmoInt. Мы исследуем эффективность моделей глубокого многозадачного обучения, обученных для всех эмоций сразу в единой архитектуре, и получаем обнадеживающие результаты. Эксперименты, проведенные по оценке корреляции между парами эмоций, дают интересное представление о взаимоотношениях между ними.", 'ga': "Tá suíomhanna micreabhlagála bunaithe ar na meáin shóisialta cosúil le Twitter tar éis éirí ina bhfoinse coiteann faisnéise fíor-ama (eagraíochtaí a mbíonn tionchar acu ar eagraíochtaí agus a straitéisí, agus úsáidtear iad chun mothúcháin agus tuairimí a chur in iúl. Dá bhrí sin tá tábhacht ag baint le hanailís uathoibrithe ar ábhar dá leithéid. Chuige sin, táimid Iniúchadh a dhéanamh ar inmharthanacht úsáid a bhaint as líonraí néaracha domhain ar an tasc sonrach de thuar déine mothúcháin i tweets Molaimid ailtireacht néarúil a chomhcheanglaíonn sraitheanna convolutional agus lán-nasctha ar bhealach neamh-seicheamhach - déanta den chéad uair i gcomhthéacs tascanna nádúrtha teanga-bhunaithe. In éineacht le gnéithe foclóireachta-bhunaithe mar aon le foghlaim aistrithe, baineann ár múnla feidhmíocht úrscothach amach, ag feidhmiú níos fearr ná an córas roimhe seo le 0.044 nó 4.4% comhghaol Pearson ar thasc sonraí roinnte WASSA'17 EmoInt. samhlacha foghlama il-tascanna oilte do gach mothúchán ag an am céanna in ailtireacht aontaithe agus torthaí spreagúla a fháil. Tugann an comhghaol idir péirí mothúcháin léargas suimiúil ar an ngaol eatarthu.", 'hu': "A közösségi média alapú mikroblogoló oldalak, mint a Twitter, gyakori valós idejű információforrássá váltak Ezért egyre fontosabb az ilyen tartalom automatizált elemzése. Ennek érdekében megvizsgáljuk a mély neurális hálózatok használatának életképességét az érzelmi intenzitás előrejelzésének konkrét feladatára tweetekben. Egy olyan idegi architektúrát javasolunk, amely összekapcsolja a konvoluális és teljesen összekapcsolt rétegeket egy nem szekvenciális formában. Módszer - első alkalommal, természetes nyelvi alapú feladatok összefüggésében. Lexikon alapú funkciókkal és transzfer tanulással kombinálva modellünk a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt ér el, 0,044 vagy 4,4%-os Pearson korrelációt tesz lehetővé a WASSA'17 EmoInt megosztott feladatadatkészleten. Vizsgáljuk az összes érzelemre egyszerre képzett, többfeladatos tanulási modellek teljesítményét egységes architektúrában, és bátorító eredményeket érünk el. Az érzelmi párok közötti korreláció értékelésére irányuló kísérletek érdekes betekintést nyújtanak a köztük lévő kapcsolatba.", 'el': 'Ιστότοποι μικροblogging με βάση τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης όπως το Twitter έχουν γίνει κοινή πηγή πληροφοριών σε πραγματικό χρόνο (επηρεάζοντας τους οργανισμούς και τις στρατηγικές τους, και χρησιμοποιούνται για την έκφραση συναισθημάτων και απόψεων. Ως εκ τούτου, η αυτοματοποιημένη ανάλυση αυτού του περιεχομένου αυξάνεται σε σημασία. Για το σκοπό αυτό, διερευνούμε τη βιωσιμότητα της χρήσης βαθέων νευρωνικών δικτύων στο συγκεκριμένο καθήκον της πρόβλεψης έντασης συναισθημάτων σε Προτείνουμε μια νευρωνική αρχιτεκτονική που συνδυάζει σύνθετα και πλήρως συνδεδεμένα στρώματα σε μια μη διαδοχική δομή. τρόπος που γίνεται για πρώτη φορά στο πλαίσιο εργασιών που βασίζονται στη φυσική γλώσσα. Σε συνδυασμό με χαρακτηριστικά βασισμένα στο λεξικό μαζί με τη μάθηση μεταφοράς, το μοντέλο μας επιτυγχάνει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, ξεπερνώντας το προηγούμενο σύστημα κατά 0.044 ή 4.4% συσχέτιση στο σύνολο δεδομένων κοινής εργασίας. Ερευνούμε την απόδοση των μοντέλων εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών που εκπαιδεύονται για όλα τα συναισθήματα ταυτόχρονα σε μια ενιαία αρχιτεκτονική και παίρνουμε ενθαρρυντικά αποτελέσματα. Τα πειράματα που πραγματοποιήθηκαν για την αξιολόγηση της συσχέτισης μεταξύ ζευγαριών συναισθημάτων προσφέρουν ενδιαφέρουσες γνώσεις για τη σχέση μεταξύ τους.', 'ka': "სოციალური მედიაში მიკრობლოგური საიტები, როგორც Twitter, იყო რეალური დროის ინფორმაციის საერთო მხოლოდ (ორგანიზაციების და ისინი სტრატიგიების შესახებ და გამოყენებულია ემოციების და მიხედვილების გამოსახულებლად. ასეთი შემდვილეების ავტომატიური ანალიზაცია იქნება მნიშვნელობაში. ამ მიზეზით, ჩვენ განვიყენებთ ძალიან სიცოცხლეობა, რომელიც ემოციონის ინტენსტივის განსახულებ - პირველად დავაკეთებული თავისუფალური სახელის კონტექსტში. ჩვენი მოდელი გავაკეთება სისტემა, რომელიც წინა სისტემა 0.044 ან 4.4% პერსონის კორელაციაზე WASSA'17 EmoInt მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ. ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი მოდელს სწავლების გამოყენებას, რომლებიც ყველა ემოციონებისთვის ერთადერთად ერთადერთიანული არქტიქტურაში განსხვავებული მოდელების გამო ვკჟოვპთმვნრთ, კჲთრჲ ჟვ ჲუვნწგარ კჲპვლაუთწრა между ვმჲუთჲნჟკთრვ ეპსდთ, ოპველჲზაგარ თნრვპვჟნთ ნამვპთ ჱა გპყჱკარა между რწჳ.", 'it': "Siti di micro-blogging basati sui social media come Twitter sono diventati una fonte comune di informazioni in tempo reale L'analisi automatizzata di tali contenuti aumenta quindi di importanza. A tal fine, esploriamo la fattibilità di utilizzare reti neurali profonde sul compito specifico della previsione dell'intensità emotiva nei tweet. Proponiamo un'architettura neurale che combina strati convoluzionali e completamente connessi in modo non sequenziale. modo - fatto per la prima volta nel contesto di compiti basati sul linguaggio naturale. Combinato con funzionalità basate sul lessico e l'apprendimento del trasferimento, il nostro modello raggiunge prestazioni all'avanguardia, superando il sistema precedente dello 0,044 o del 4,4% di correlazione Pearson sul set di dati delle attività condivise WASSA'17 EmoInt. Investighiamo le prestazioni di modelli di apprendimento multi-task profondi formati per tutte le emozioni contemporaneamente in un'architettura unificata e otteniamo risultati incoraggianti. Gli esperimenti effettuati sulla valutazione della correlazione tra coppie emotive offrono interessanti approfondimenti sulla relazione tra loro.", 'lt': "Socialinės žiniasklaidos mikroblogo svetainės, pvz., Twitter, tapo bendrais realaus laiko informacijos šaltiniais. (daro poveikį organizacijoms ir jų strategijoms, ir jos naudojamos emocijoms ir nuomonėms išreikšti. Todėl automatizuota tokio turinio analizė tampa vis svarbesnė. - būdas - pirmą kartą atliekamas vykdant gamtinėmis kalbomis grindžiamas užduotis. Mūsų modelis kartu su tekstikonų savybėmis ir perdavimo mokymu pasiekia pažangiausius rezultatus, o ankstesnė sistema viršija 0,044 arba 4,4 % Pearson koreliaciją su bendrais WASSA'17 EmoInt užduočių duomenų rinkiniu. Mes tiriame gilių daugiafunkcinių mokymosi modelių, parengtų visoms emocijoms vienu metu vieningoje architektūroje, rezultatus ir gauname skatinančius rezultatus. Experiments performed on evaluating correlation between emotion pairs offer interesting insights into the relationship between them.", 'mk': "Социјалните медиуми базирани на микроблогови, како што е Твитер, станаа заеднички извор на информации во реално време (impacting organizations and their strategies, and are used for expressing emotions and opinions. Automated analysis of such content therefore rises in importance. To this end, we explore the viability of using deep neural networks on the specific task of emotion intensity prediction in tweets. We propose a neural architecture combining convolutional and fully connected layers in a non-sequential - начин - направен за првпат во контекст на природните јазички задачи. Комбинирано со лексикони основани карактеристики заедно со пренесувањето учење, нашиот модел постигнува најнова резултат, надминувајќи го претходниот систем за 0,044 или 4,4 отсто од корелацијата на Пирсон на податоците на WASSA'17 EmoInt. Ние ја истражуваме изведбата на длабоките модели за учење со повеќе задачи обучени за сите емоции одеднаш во единствена архитектура и добиваме охрабрувачки резултати. Експериментите спроведени за проценка на корелацијата помеѓу емоционалните парови нудат интересни информации за односот помеѓу нив.", 'ms': "laman mikroblog berdasarkan media sosial seperti Twitter telah menjadi sumber umum maklumat masa sebenar (mempengaruhi organisasi dan strategi mereka, dan digunakan untuk mengekspresikan emosi dan pendapat. Analisis automatik kandungan tersebut oleh itu meningkat dalam penting. Untuk tujuan ini, kami mengeksplorasi kemampuan menggunakan rangkaian saraf dalam tugas spesifik prediksi intensiti emosi dalam tweet. Kami cadangkan arkitektur saraf yang menggabungkan lapisan konvolusi dan sepenuhnya terhubung dalam lapisan yang tidak sequential cara - dilakukan untuk pertama kalinya dalam konteks tugas berdasarkan bahasa alami. Bergabung dengan ciri-ciri berdasarkan leksikon bersama dengan pembelajaran pemindahan, model kami mencapai prestasi state-of-the-art, melebihi sistem terdahulu dengan 0.044 atau 4.4% korelasi Pearson pada set data kerja terkongsi EmoInt WASSA'17. We investigate the performance of deep multi-task learning models trained for all emotions at once in a unified architecture and get encouraging results.  Eksperimen yang dilakukan dalam menilai korelasi antara pasangan emosi menawarkan pandangan menarik tentang hubungan antara mereka.", 'kk': "Твиттер сияқты микро-блог сайттары, социалдық медиақтарының негізінде шын уақытты мәліметтің көзі болды. Бұл мазмұның автоматты анализ маңызды болады. Бұл үшін біз таңбаларда эмоциялық теңдік тапсырмасының түсінік желілерін қолдану мүмкіндігін зерттейміз. Біз нейрондық архитектурасын көпшілікті және толық қосылмаған қабаттарды таңдаймыз. Табиғи тілдегі тапсырмалардың контексті бірінші ретінде жасалған. Тексикондың негіздеген мүмкіндіктерімен біріктірілген, біздің үлгіміз өзгертілген күй- жайымдық әдістерін жеткізеді. Алдыңғы жүйеңізді 0, 044 немесе 4, 4% персондың WASSA'17 EmoInt ортақ тапсырмалар деректер жиынында ко Біз біріктірілген архитектурасындағы барлық емоциялар үшін көп тапсырмаларды оқыту үлгілерін зерттеп, көп тапсырмаларды оқыту үлгілерін зерттеп, көмектесетін н Эмоциялық екеуі арасындағы қатынастығын бағалау үшін тәжірибелер көмектеседі.", 'mt': 'Siti ta’ mikroblogging ibbażati fuq il-midja soċjali bħal Twitter saru sors komuni ta’ informazzjoni f’ħin reali L-analiżi awtomatizzata ta’ dan il-kontenut għalhekk tiżdied fl-importanza. Il-metodu – magħmul għall-ewwel darba fil-kuntest ta’ kompiti bbażati fuq il-lingwi naturali. Flimkien ma’ karatteristiċi bbażati fuq il-lexicon flimkien mat-tagħlim tat-trasferiment, il-mudell tagħna jikseb prestazzjoni avvanzata, li taqbeż is-sistema preċedenti b’0.044 jew 4.4% korrelazzjoni Pearson fuq is-sett ta’ kompiti kondiviżi tal-WASSA’17 EmoInt. Aħna ninvestigaw il-prestazzjoni ta’ mudelli ta’ tagħlim profond b’ħafna kompiti mħarrġa għall-emozzjonijiet kollha f’daqqa f’arkitettura unifikata u niksbu riżultati inkoraġġanti. L-esperimenti mwettqa fuq l-evalwazzjoni tal-korrelazzjoni bejn il-pari emozzjonali joffru fehmiet interessanti fir-relazzjoni bejniethom.', 'mn': "Твиттер шиг нийгмийн хэвлэлийн микро-блог сайтууд нь бодит цаг хугацааны мэдээллийн нийтлэг эх үүсвэр болсон. (байгууллагууд болон стратегийг нөлөөлдөг, сэтгэл хөдлөл болон бодлого илэрхийлэх үед хэрэглэгддэг. Ийм тохиолдолд автоматжуулсан шинжилгээ нь чухал болж байна. Иймээс бид түүнд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжлэх ухааны тухай ажил дээр гүн гүнзгий мэдрэлийн сүлжээ ашиглах чадварыг судлах болно. Байгалийн хэл суурилсан үйл ажиллагаанд анхны удаа хийгдсэн. Лексикон суралцах сургалтын тухай хамтдаа, бидний загвар нь урлагийн үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг гаргаж, өмнөх системийг 0.044 эсвэл 4.4% нь Персон WASSA'17 EmoInt хуваалцах ажлын өгөгдлийн санд холбоотой байдаг. Бид бүх сэтгэл хөдлөлд нэгдсэн архитектурд сургалтын гүнзгий олон ажлын суралцах загварын үйл ажиллагааг судалж, урам зоригтой үр дүн авдаг. Хоёр сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хоорондын хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой байдлыг үнэлэх туршилт нь тэдний хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой сонирхолтой ойлголт өгдөг.", 'no': "Som sosiale mediabasert mikro-blogging-nettstader som Twitter har blitt ein felles kjelde av verkeleg informasjon (påvirkar organisasjonar og strategiane sine, og blir brukt for å uttrykke emosjonar og meningar. Automatisk analyse av slike innhaldet er derfor økt i viktighet. I denne slutten utforskar vi å bruke dype neuralnettverk på den spesifikke oppgåva av følelsesintensitetsforventing i tweeter. Vi foreslår ein neuralarkitektur som kombinerer konvolusjonelle og fullstendig tilkopla lag i eit ikkje-sekvensisk lag. Måte – første gong i konteksten av naturspråkbaserte oppgåver. Kombinert med lexicon-baserte funksjonar saman med overføringsling, er modellen vårt oppnådd av kunsten, som utfører tidlegare systemet med 0,044 eller 4,4% Pearson-korrelasjon på delte oppgåvedatasettet WASSA'17 EmoInt. Vi undersøker utviklinga av dype multioppgåver-læringsmodeller som trengte for alle følelser samtidig i ein eine arkitektur og får oppmerking av resultat. Eksperiment utført ved evaluering av korrelasjon mellom emosjonspar tilbyr interessante innsikt i forholdet mellom dei.", 'ml': 'ടൂട്ടര്\u200d പോലുള്ള മൈക്രോ ബ്ലോഗിങ്ങ് സൈറ്റുകള്\u200d സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയയില്\u200d നിന്നും യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ സമയ വിവരങ്ങളു (സംഘടനങ്ങളെയും അവയുടെ പ്രഭാവങ്ങളെയും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, വികാരങ്ങളെയും അഭിപ്രായമാക്കുന്നതിനായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള വസ്തുക്കളുടെ സ്വയം അന്വേഷണം പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അതുകൊണ സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ജോലികളുടെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d ആദ്യത്തെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന് ലെക്സിക്സന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുമായി മാറ്റുന്നത് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനോടൊപ്പം നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓഫ് കലാര്\u200dട്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനം നേടുന്നു. മുമ്പ് സിസ് We investigate the performance of deep multi-task learning models trained for all emotions at once in a unified architecture and get encouraging results.  വികാരങ്ങളുടെ ഇണകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിച്ചിരിക്കുന്', 'pl': "Serwisy mikroblogowe oparte na mediach społecznościowych, takie jak Twitter, stały się powszechnym źródłem informacji w czasie rzeczywistym W tym celu badamy możliwość wykorzystania głębokich sieci neuronowych do specyficznego zadania prognozowania intensywności emocji w tweetach. Proponujemy architekturę neuronową łączączącą warstwy konwolucyjne i w pełni połączone w niesekwencjonalnych warstwach. sposób wykonywany po raz pierwszy w kontekście zadań opartych na języku naturalnym. W połączeniu z funkcjami opartymi na leksykonie wraz z uczeniem się transferowym, nasz model osiąga najnowocześniejszą wydajność, przewyższając poprzedni system o 0,044 lub 4,4% korelację Pearsona na współdzielonym zestawie danych zadań WASSA'17 EmoInt. Badamy wydajność głębokich wielozadaniowych modeli uczenia się przeszkolonych pod kątem wszystkich emocji jednocześnie w ujednoliconej architekturze i uzyskujemy zachęcające rezultaty. Eksperymenty przeprowadzone w celu oceny korelacji pomiędzy parami emocji dają ciekawe wglądy w związek między nimi.", 'ro': "Site-urile de micro-blogging bazate pe social media precum Twitter au devenit o sursă comună de informații în timp real Analiza automată a unui astfel de conținut crește, prin urmare, în importanță. În acest scop, explorăm viabilitatea utilizării rețelelor neuronale profunde pe sarcina specifică de predicție a intensității emoțiilor în tweet-uri. Propunem o arhitectură neurală care combină straturi convoluționale și complet conectate într-o non-secvențială. modul - făcut pentru prima dată în contextul sarcinilor bazate pe limbaj natural. Combinat cu caracteristici bazate pe lexicon împreună cu învățarea transferurilor, modelul nostru atinge performanțe de ultimă generație, depășind sistemul anterior cu 0,044 sau 4,4% corelație Pearson pe setul de date de sarcini partajate WASSA'17 EmoInt. Investigăm performanța modelelor profunde de învățare multi-sarcină instruite pentru toate emoțiile simultan într-o arhitectură unificată și obținem rezultate încurajatoare. Experimentele efectuate prin evaluarea corelației dintre perechile emoționale oferă perspective interesante asupra relației dintre ele.", 'sr': "Socijalni mediji bazirani mikro-blogging sajtovi poput Twitter postali su zajednički izvor realne informacije (uticaju organizacije i njihove strategije, i koriste se za izražavanje emocija i mišljenja. Zato se automatska analiza takvog sadržaja povećava u važnosti. Za taj cilj, istražujemo živototvornost korištenja dubokih neuralnih mreža na specifični zadatak predviđanja emocionalne intenzitete u tweetima. Predlažemo neuralnu arhitekturu koja kombinuje konvolucionalne i potpuno povezane slojeve u nekosekvencijalnim slojevima. Način - urađen po prvi put u kontekstu prirodnog jezika. Kombinovane sa leksikonskim karakteristikama zajedno sa učenjem prijenosa, naš model postiže izvršnost stanja umjetnosti, iznosi prethodni sistem za korelaciju od 0,044 ili 4,4% Pearsona na kompletu podataka WASSA'17 EmoInt. Istražujemo provedbu dubokih modela multizadataka obučenih za sve emocije u jedinstvenoj arhitekturi i dobijemo ohrabrujuće rezultate. Eksperimenti provedeni u procjeni korelacije između parova emocija nude zanimljive uvide o odnosu između njih.", 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයානය අධාරිත මයික්රෝබ්ලෝග් සැයිට්ටර් වගේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරධානයක් ඇත්ත කා (Impecting Organisations and its tacticals, and are Used for expressing emoticons and opiinations. Auto-censing of so contingent so rises in vitality. To this end, we Explore the vitability of use depth neural network on the espezie job of emotion Inteity forecast in tweets. we advise a neural art combination ConVoltive and fully linked layer in a non-sequantive ස්වභාවික භාෂාව අධාරිත භාෂාවේ පළමුවෙනි වතාවට කරලා තියෙන්නේ. ලෙක්සිකෝන් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් සමඟ සංවිධානය කරන්න, අපේ මොඩේල් අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් ලැබෙනවා, පළවෙනි පද්ධතිය 0.044 නැත්තම් 4.4% පර් අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ගොඩක් විශාල වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට හැම දැනගන්න පුළුවන් හැම දේවල්ම එක්ක විදිය හැඟීම සම්බන්ධයක් අතර සම්බන්ධයක් ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණයක් උන්ගේ අතර සම්බන්ධයේ සැ', 'so': "Bogagga micro-blogging ee macluumaadka bulshada ee sida Twitterka waxaa noqday macluumaad caadi ah oo ku saabsan waqtiga (saameyn ku yeelan ururada iyo qorshahooda, waxana looga isticmaali karaa si ay u muuqato fikradooda iyo fikirrada. Fiirinta iskuulka ah ayaa muhiim u kordha. Taas darteed waxaynu baaraynaa isticmaalka shabakada neurada ee deegaanka ah oo ku saabsan shaqo gaar ah oo xisaabta deeqsi ah oo la sii sheego Twitteetka. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa dhismaha neurada ah oo isugu wada ururiya qataanka dhaqaalaha ah oo wada xidhiidha ah qaab- loo sameeyay marka ugu horeysa marka lagu jiro shuqullada afka asalka ah. Combined with lexicon-based features along with transfer learning, our model achieves state-of-the-art performance, outperforming the previous system by 0.044 or 4.4% Pearson correlation on the WASSA'17 EmoInt shared task dataset.  Dhaqso waxaynu baaraynaa sameynta qaababka waxbarashada waxbarashada oo aad u dheer oo shaqo badan, taas oo loo baray fikrada oo dhan islamarkaasna la wada baaraandegayo dhismaha la xiriiray, waxaana helaynaa midhihiisa dhiirigelinta. Imtixaanka lagu sameeyay qiimeynta xiriirka labada ismood waxay bixiyaan aragtida xiiseynaya xiriirka dhexdooda.", 'sv': "Sociala medier baserade mikrobloggsidor som Twitter har blivit en vanlig källa till realtidsinformation Automatiserad analys av sådant innehåll ökar därför i betydelse. För detta ändamål undersöker vi möjligheten att använda djupa neurala nätverk på den specifika uppgiften att förutsäga känslointensitet i tweets. Vi föreslår en neural arkitektur som kombinerar konvulutionella och fullt anslutna lager i en icke-sekventiell sätt - görs för första gången i samband med naturliga språkbaserade uppgifter. Kombinerat med lexikonbaserade funktioner tillsammans med överföringsinlärning, uppnår vår modell toppmoderna prestanda, överträffar det tidigare systemet med 0,044 eller 4,4% Pearson korrelation på WASSA'17 EmoInt delade uppgiftsdata. Vi undersöker prestandan av djupgående multi-task inlärningsmodeller utbildade för alla känslor på en gång i en enhetlig arkitektur och får uppmuntrande resultat. Experiment som utförts för att utvärdera korrelationen mellan känslopar erbjuder intressanta insikter i relationen mellan dem.", 'ur': "سوسیلی میڈیا بنیاد میکروٹر-بلاگ سائٹ جیسے ٹویٹر حقیقی وقت معلومات کا سامان سراسر ہو گیا ہے (سازمانوں اور ان کے استراتژیاں کا اثر دیتا ہے، اور ان کے احساسات اور نظریوں کی تعریف کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں۔ اس طرح ایسی محتویات کا اتموٹی تحلیل اثر ہوتا ہے۔ اس لئے، ہم توئیٹوں میں احساسات مضبوط پیش بینی کے مطابق عمیق نیورل نیورل نیٹ ورک کا استعمال کرنے کے قابلیت کا استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ ہم ایک نیورل معماری پیش بینی کرتا ہیں جو ایک طریقہ - پہلی بار طبیعی زبان کی عملیات میں کیا گیا ہے۔ ٹرنسفر کی تعلیم کے ساتھ لکسیون کی بنیادی فکرتوں کے ساتھ ملے ہوئے، ہماری موڈل کو ایموئٹ کی عملکرد پہنچتی ہے، پہلے سیسٹم کو 0.044 یا 4.4% کے ذریعہ WASSA'17 ایموئٹ کے شریک ٹاکس ڈیٹ سٹ کے ذریعہ سے زیادہ کامل کرتی ہے. ہم ایک بار تمام احساساتوں کے لئے تعلیم کی عمیق multi-task سیکھنے کی مدلکوں کی عملکرد کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں اور ایک متحدہ معماری میں تحقیق کرنے والے نتائج حاصل کرتے ہیں۔ احساسات جوڑوں کے درمیان تعلق کا ارزیابی کرنا کے ذریعہ آزمائش کرتے ہیں ان کے درمیان تعلق میں علاقمند نظریں پیش کرتے ہیں.", 'ta': "தொடர்பு போன்ற மைக்ரோ-blogging தளங்கள் சார்ந்த சமூக ஊடகங்கள் உண்மையான நேர தகவல்களின் பொதுவான மூலமாகிவிட் (நிறுவனங்களுக்கும் அவரது திட்டங்களுக்கும் பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது, மற்றும் உணர்வுகளையும் கருத்துக்களையும் வெளிப்படுத்த பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது. இது போன்ற உள்ளடக்கங்களின் தானாகவே ஆய்வு முக்கியமாக அதிகரிக்கிறது. அதனால்  இயல்பான மொழியின் அடிப்படையான பணிகளில் முதல் முறை செய்யப்பட்டது. லெக்சிக்சன் அடிப்படையான குணங்களுடன் மாற்றி கற்றுக்கொண்டு தொடர்புடன், எங்கள் மாதிரி நிலையை பெறுகிறது, முந்தைய கணினியில் 0. 044 அல்லது 4. 4% பீர்சன் இணைப்பு WASSA '17 Emo நாங்கள் ஒரு ஒன்றிணைக்கப்பட்ட கட்டுப்பாட்டில் அனைத்து உணர்வுகளுக்கும் பயிற்சிக்கப்பட்ட ஆழமான பல்வேலை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும உணர்வு ஜோடிகளுக்கிடையே இணைப்பு மதிப்பு செய்யும் முயற்சிகள் அவர்களுக்கு இடையே உள்ள உறவிற்கு சுவாரசியமான உணர்", 'uz': "Name Bu narsalarning avtomatik analyzeri muhim bo'ladi. Bu sababda, biz hissiyotning muhim vazifani foydalanuvchi tashkilotlari haqida o'zgarishni foydalanishimiz mumkin, Twitterda hissiyotning muhimi hissiyotlarida juda katta ishlatish imkoniyatini o'rganamiz. Biz bir necha qanday bog'liq qatlamlarni birlashtirishni tahlil qilamiz. Avtomatik til asosiy vazifalar bilan birinchi marta bajarilgan. Leksika asosida o'rganish imkoniyatlari bilan birlashtirilgan imkoniyatlarni birlashtirish mumkin, modelimizning oldingi tizimni 0.044 yoki 4.4% WASSA' 17 EmoInt bilan birlashtirilgan vazifa maʼlumotlarini bajaradi. Biz bir necha vazifa o'rganish modellarining natijasini o'rganamiz va bir necha tashkilotda bir necha tashkilotga o'rganish modellarini o'rganamiz va bir necha tashkilotda bir necha ishni o'rganamiz va natijalarni qo'shish hissiyotlar orasidagi munosabatlarni qidirishda bajarilgan tajribalar orasidagi munosabatlarni qiziqarli hayot qiladi.", 'vi': "Các trang vi blog dựa trên mạng xã hội như Twitter đã trở thành nguồn thông tin thời gian thực. (tác động với các tổ chức và chiến thuật của chúng, và được dùng để thể hiện cảm xúc và ý kiến. Phân tích tự động các nội dung như vậy tăng lên quan trọng. chúng tôi khám phá khả năng sử dụng những mạng thần kinh sâu trong nhiệm vụ dự đoán nhiệt độ cảm xúc trên Twitter. Chúng tôi đề xuất kiến kiến kiến kiến kiến kiến kiến trúc thần kinh kết hợp các lớp xoắn và kết nối hoàn toàn trong các lớp không nối nhau. làm cách..lần đầu tiên trong các công việc văn hóa ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Kết hợp với các tính năng tồn tại dựa trên ngôn ngữ, cùng với việc học chuyển nhượng, mẫu của chúng ta đạt được trình độ hiện đại, vượt qua hệ thống trước bởi 0.04.4=.* tạ Pearson tương quan về bộ nhớ công việc chia sẻ WASA'17 EmoInt. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu khả năng của những mô hình đa nhiệm sâu được huấn luyện cho tất cả cảm xúc cùng một lúc trong một kiến trúc thống nhất và có kết quả tích cực. Những thử nghiệm tiến hành để đánh giá mối tương quan giữa các cặp cảm xúc cung cấp những hiểu biết thú vị về mối quan hệ.", 'bg': 'Сайтовете за микроблог, базирани на социални медии, като Туитър, се превърнаха в общ източник на информация в реално време За тази цел изследваме жизнеспособността на използването на дълбоки невронни мрежи върху конкретната задача за предсказване на интензивността на емоциите в Туитър. Предлагаме невронна архитектура, съчетаваща конволюционни и напълно свързани слоеве в несеквенциален вид. начин - направен за първи път в контекста на задачи, базирани на естествен език. В комбинация с функциите, базирани на лексикон, заедно с трансферното обучение, нашият модел постига най-съвременни резултати, надминавайки предишната система с 0,044 или 4,4% корелация на Пиърсън на споделената задача набор от данни. Ние изследваме изпълнението на модели за дълбоко многозадачно обучение, обучени за всички емоции наведнъж в единна архитектура и получаваме окуражаващи резултати. Експериментите за оценка на корелацията между емоционалните двойки предлагат интересни прозрения за връзката между тях.', 'nl': "Social media gebaseerde micro-blogging sites zoals Twitter zijn uitgegroeid tot een veelvoorkomende bron van real-time informatie Geautomatiseerde analyse van dergelijke inhoud neemt daarom toe. Hiervoor onderzoeken we de haalbaarheid van het gebruik van diepe neurale netwerken op de specifieke taak van de voorspelling van emotie intensiteit in tweets. We stellen een neurale architectuur voor die convolutionele en volledig verbonden lagen combineert in een niet-sequentiële De eerste keer gedaan in het kader van taken op basis van natuurlijke taal. Gecombineerd met lexicon-gebaseerde functies samen met transfer learning, bereikt ons model state-of-the-art prestaties en presteert het vorige systeem met 0.044 of 4.4% Pearson correlatie op de WASSA'17 EmoInt gedeelde taakgegevenset. We onderzoeken de prestaties van diepe multi-task leermodellen die zijn getraind voor alle emoties in één keer in een uniforme architectuur en krijgen bemoedigende resultaten. Experimenten uitgevoerd op het evalueren van correlatie tussen emotieparen bieden interessante inzichten in de relatie tussen hen.", 'de': "Social-Media-basierte Micro-Blogging-Websites wie Twitter sind zu einer häufigen Quelle von Echtzeit-Informationen geworden Die automatisierte Analyse solcher Inhalte gewinnt daher an Bedeutung. Zu diesem Zweck untersuchen wir die Machbarkeit des Einsatzes tiefer neuronaler Netze für die spezifische Aufgabe der Vorhersage der Emotionsintensität in Tweets. Wir schlagen eine neuronale Architektur vor, die convolutionale und vollständig vernetzte Schichten in einer nicht-sequentiellen Art und Weise, die zum ersten Mal im Kontext natürlicher Sprachaufgaben durchgeführt wird. In Kombination mit lexikon-basierten Funktionen und Transfer Learning erreicht unser Modell modernste Leistung und übertrifft das bisherige System um 0,044 oder 4,4% Pearson Korrelation auf dem WASSA'17 EmoInt Shared Task Dataset. Wir untersuchen die Leistungsfähigkeit von Deep Multi-Task-Lernmodellen, die für alle Emotionen gleichzeitig in einer einheitlichen Architektur trainiert wurden und erzielen ermutigende Ergebnisse. Experimente zur Beurteilung der Korrelation zwischen Emotionspaaren bieten interessante Einblicke in die Beziehung zwischen ihnen.", 'hr': "Društveni mediji bazirani na mikro-blogging stranicama poput Twitter postali su zajednički izvor realne informacije (utječe na organizacije i njihove strategije i koriste se za izražavanje emocija i mišljenja. Automatična analiza takvog sadržaja stoga se povećava u važnosti. Za taj cilj, istražujemo živototvornost upotrebe dubokih neuralnih mreža na specifični zadatak predviđanja emocionalne intenzitete u tweetsima. Predlažemo neuralnu arhitekturu kojom se kombinira konvolucionalna i potpuno povezana slojeva u nekosekvencijalnom sloju. Način - napravljen po prvi put u kontekstu prirodnih zadataka na temelju jezika. U kombinaciji s leksikonskim funkcijama zajedno s učenjem prijenosa, naš model postiže izvršnost stanja umjetnosti, nadmašući prethodni sustav od 0,044 ili 4,4% korelacije Pearsona na kompletu podataka WASSA'17 EmoInt. Istražujemo provedbu dubokih multizadatačnih modela učenja obučenih za sve emocije u jedinstvenoj arhitekturi i dobijemo ohrabrujuće rezultate. Eksperimenti provedeni u procjeni korelacije između parova emocija nude zanimljive uvide o odnosu između njih.", 'ko': '트위터 등 소셜 미디어 기반의 웨이보 사이트는 이미 실시간 정보의 흔한 출처가 되었다(조직과 전략에 영향을 주고 정서와 관점을 표현하는 데 쓰인다. 따라서 이러한 내용에 대한 자동 분석이 점점 중요해지고 있다. 이를 위해 트위터에서 심층 신경 네트워크를 이용하여 정서의 강도를 예측하는 구체적인 임무의 타당성을 모색했다. 우리는 권적층과 완전 연결층을 비연속적인 구조에 결합시키는 신경 구조를 제시했다.방식 - 처음으로 자연 언어를 바탕으로 하는 임무에서 완성된다.사전 기반의 특징과 이동 학습을 결합하여 우리의 모델은 가장 선진적인 성능을 실현했고 WASSA의 17개 EmoInt 공유 임무 데이터 집합에서 이전 시스템보다 0.044 또는 4.4%의 Pearson 관련성을 나타냈다.우리는 통일된 체계 구조에서 모든 정서 훈련을 동시에 겨냥한 깊이 있는 다중 임무 학습 모델의 성능을 연구하여 고무적인 결과를 얻었다.감정의 상관성에 대한 평가를 위한 실험은 그들 사이의 관계에 대한 흥미로운 견해를 제공했다.', 'sw': "Mitandao ya kijamii ya tovuti micro-blogging kama vile Twita imekuwa chanzo cha moja kwa moja cha taarifa za muda halisi (zinaathiri mashirika na mikakati yao, na wanatumiwa kwa ajili ya kuonyesha hisia na maoni. uchambuzi wa kujitegemea wa maudhui kama hayo unaongezeka kwa umuhimu. Kwa hiyo, tunachunguza uwezekano wa kutumia mitandao ya ndani ya ubongo mahsusi ya utabiri wa hisia katika twiti. Tunazipendekeza ujenzi wa neurali unaoanganisha vipengele vya kikatili na vilivyohusiana vizuri katika vifaa vinavyofuata. njia - imefanywa kwa mara ya kwanza katika muktadha wa kazi za asili za lugha. Kuunganishwa na vipengele vya lexico pamoja na kujifunza kwa uhamishaji, mwelekeo wetu hufanikiwa utendaji wa hali ya sanaa, kutengeneza mfumo uliopita kwa asilimia 0.044 au 4.4 ya Pearson kuhusiana na takwimu za kazi za WASSA'17. Tunajaribu utendaji wa mifano ya kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi zilizofundishwa kwa hisia zote kwa wakati mmoja katika ujenzi wa pamoja na kupata matokeo ya kuhamasisha. Majaribio yaliyofanywa katika kutathmini uhusiano kati ya wanandoa wa hisia yanatoa mitazamo ya kuvutia katika uhusiano kati yao.", 'da': "Sociale medier baserede mikroblogsider som Twitter er blevet en almindelig kilde til real-time information (påvirker organisationer og deres strategier, og bruges til at udtrykke følelser og meninger. Automatiseret analyse af sådant indhold stiger derfor i betydning. Til dette formål undersøger vi muligheden for at bruge dybe neurale netværk på den specifikke opgave med forudsigelse af følelsesintensitet i tweets. Vi foreslår en neural arkitektur, der kombinerer konvulutionelle og fuldt forbundne lag i en ikke-sekventiel måde - udført for første gang i forbindelse med natursprogbaserede opgaver. Kombineret med leksikon-baserede funktioner sammen med transfer learning opnår vores model state-of-the-art ydeevne, der overgår det tidligere system med 0,044 eller 4,4% Pearson korrelation på WASSA'17 EmoInt delte opgavedatasæt. Vi undersøger ydeevnen af dybe multi-task læringsmodeller trænet til alle følelser på én gang i en samlet arkitektur og får opmuntrende resultater. Eksperimenter med evaluering af korrelation mellem følelsespar giver interessant indblik i forholdet mellem dem.", 'tr': "Twitter ýaly sosialy mediýatlar sistemasynda micro-blogging habarlar, hakyky wagtyň orta çeşmesi bolup geçirdi Gurganlary we olaryň strategiýalaryny etjek we duýgularyny we pikirlerini a ýdyrmak üçin ullanýarlar. Şol sebäpli meýdançasynyň otomatik analizi şeýle däl möhüm bolup ýokaýar. Şol sebäpli, duýgularyň ýigrenligi täzelikleriniň spesifik täzeliklerinde ullanýan nuýral şebekelerini çykaryp bilýäris. Biz nuýral arhitekturlygyň cäreler we doly Taýdaly dillerde birinji gezek edilen zady üçin edildi. Leksikoň tabanly özellikleri transfers öwrenmegi bilen birleştirilýär, biziň modelimiz sanat eserlerini 0.044 ýa 4.4% Person meselelerini WASSA'17 EmoInt tarapynda ýeňýär. Biz ähli duýgular üçin bir gezek birleşen arhitektura tarapyndan öwrenme nusgalarynyň etkinleşigini barýarys we netijeleri çykarýarys. Duýgyş çiftleri arasyndaky çykyşlygyny deňleýän tecrübeleri olaryň aralygynda gyzykly düşünjeler taparlar.", 'id': "Situs mikroblog berdasarkan media sosial seperti Twitter telah menjadi sumber umum informasi waktu nyata (mempengaruhi organisasi dan strategi mereka, dan digunakan untuk mengekspresikan emosi dan pendapat. Analisis otomatis dari isi tersebut jadi meningkat dalam penting. Untuk tujuan ini, kami mengeksplorasi kemampuan menggunakan jaringan saraf dalam tugas spesifik prediksi intensitas emosi dalam tweet. kami mengusulkan arsitektur saraf yang menggabungkan lapisan konvolusi dan sepenuhnya terhubung dalam bukan sekwensial Cara - dilakukan untuk pertama kalinya dalam konteks tugas berbasis bahasa alam. Combined with lexicon-based features along with transfer learning, our model achieves state-of-the-art performance, outperforming the previous system by 0.044 or 4.4% Pearson correlation on the WASSA'17 EmoInt shared task dataset.  Kami menyelidiki prestasi model belajar multi-tugas yang dalam dilatih untuk semua emosi sekaligus dalam arsitektur yang bersatu dan mendapatkan hasil yang mendorong. Eksperimen yang dilakukan dalam mengevaluasi korelasi antara pasangan emosi menawarkan pandangan menarik tentang hubungan antara mereka.", 'sq': "Sitet e mikroblogimit të bazuar në media sociale si Twitter janë bërë një burim i përbashkët informacioni në kohë reale (impacting organizations and their strategies, and are used for expressing emotions and opinions. Automated analysis of such content therefore rises in importance. To this end, we explore the viability of using deep neural networks on the specific task of emotion intensity prediction in tweets. We propose a neural architecture combining convolutional and fully connected layers in a non-sequential  manner - done for the first time in context of natural language based tasks.  Kombinuar me karakteristika bazuar në lexikon së bashku me mësimin e transferit, modeli ynë arrin shfaqje më të larta, duke kaluar sistemin e mëparshëm me 0.044 apo 4.4% korrelacion Pearson në kompletin e të dhënave të përbashkëta të detyrave të WASSA'17 EmoInt. Ne hetojmë shfaqjen e modeleve të mësimit të thellë me shumë detyra të trajnuar për të gjitha emocionet njëherë në një arkitekturë të unifikuar dhe marrim rezultate inkurajuese. Eksperimentet e kryera në vlerësimin e korrelacionit midis çifteve emocionale ofrojnë pamje interesante në lidhjen mes tyre.", 'af': "Soziale media gebaseerde mikro-blogging tuistes soos Twitter het 'n gemeenskaplike bron van reël-tyd inligting geword (Organisasies en hul strategies beïnvloor en word gebruik vir uitdrukking van emosies en besonderhede. Automaties analiseer van sodanige inhoud daarom vergroot in belangrikheid. Na hierdie einde, word ons die beïnvoudigheid van die gebruik van diep neuralnetwerke op die spesifieke taak van emosieintensiteit voorskou in tweets. Ons voorstel 'n neurale arkitektuur wat konvolusieele en volledig verbind laagte in 'n nie-sekwensieel wyse - gedoen vir die eerste keer in konteks van natuurlike taal gebaseerde taak. Kombineer met lexicon-gebaseerde funksies saam met oordrag leer, ons model bereik state-of-the-art-performance, uitvoer die vorige stelsel deur 0.044 of 4.4% Pearson-korrelasie op die WASSA'17 EmoInt gedeelde taakdatasset. Ons ondersoek die prestasie van diep multi-taak leer modele wat opgelei is vir alle emosies op een keer in 'n eenvoudige arkitektuur en kry encouraging resultate. Eksperimente wat uitgevoer het by die evaluering van korrelasie tussen emosie paars gee interessante insigte in die verhouding tussen hulle.", 'fa': "سایت\u200cهای میکروبلاگ\u200cهای اجتماعی مانند توئیتر یک منبع معمولی از اطلاعات زمان واقعی شدند (تأثیر سازمان\u200cها و استراتژی\u200cهایشان، و برای تعریف احساسات و نظریه\u200cها استفاده می\u200cشوند. تحلیل اتوماتیک این محتویات به این دلیل به اثر افزایش می\u200cشود. به این دلیل، ما قابلیت استفاده از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی عمیق در کار خاص پیش\u200cبینی شدت احساسات در توئیت تحقیق می\u200cکنیم. ما یک معماری عصبی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که لایه روش - برای اولین بار در محیط وظیفه\u200cهای زبان طبیعی انجام شده است. با ویژگی\u200cهای متعلق به لکسیون با یادگیری انتقال، مدل ما به اجرای وضعیت هنر رسیده است، که سیستم قبلی را با ارتباط 0.044 یا 4.4% Pearson در مجموعه داده\u200cهای مشترک عملی WASSA'17 EmoInt انجام می\u200cدهد. ما تحقیق عملکرد مدل یادگیری زیادی از کارها را تحقیق می کنیم که برای همه احساسات در یک معماری متحد آموزش داده شده و نتیجه\u200cهای تحقیق می\u200cکنند. تجربه\u200cهایی که در ارزیابی ارزیابی بین جفت احساسات انجام شده\u200cاند، مشاهده\u200cهای جالبی در رابطه بین آنها پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند.", 'am': "በትዊተር የሚመስል ማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚክሮን-ጦማር መቀመጫዎች እውነተኛ የጊዜው መረጃዎች የሆኑት ዕድል ሆነዋል፡፡ (ድርጅቶች እና ዘጠኝነታቸውን በመቀበል እና አስተያየት እና አስተያየት ለመናገር የሚጠቀሙ ናቸው፡፡  manner - done for the first time in context of natural language based tasks.  ከሌክሲኮን ጋር በመለስ ትምህርት ጋር በተለየ ሞዴላታችን የ-የ-art ድረ-ሥርዓት አግኝቷል፤ የቀድሞውን ስርዓት 0.044 ወይም 4.4% ፋርሶን በWASSA'17 EmoInt የተካፈለውን የስራ ዳታተር ማድረጊያውን አግኝቷል፡፡ የብዙ ስራ ትምህርት ሞዴላዎችን በአንድ ጊዜ በተማራች መሠረት እና ፍሬዎችን አጽናናት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአሳብ ሁኔታዎች መካከል ግንኙነት በማስተካከል የተፈጸመ ውይይቶች በመካከላቸው ግንኙነት የሚጠያየቁትን አስተያየት ያቀርባሉ፡፡", 'hy': "Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների վրա հիմնված միկրոբլոգի կայքերը, ինչպիսիք են Թվիթերը, դառնում են իրական ժամանակի տեղեկատվության ընդհանուր աղբյուր, Մենք առաջարկում ենք նյարդային ճարտարապետություն, որը միավորում է կոնվոլյուցիոն և լիովին կապված շերտերը Դա առաջին անգամ կատարվում է բնական լեզվով հիմնված խնդիրների կոնտեքստում: Համակերպված լեքսիկոնի հիմնված հատկանիշների հետ, ինչպես նաև փոխանցման ուսումնասիրության հետ, մեր մոդելը հասնում է ամենաբարձր արդյունքների, որոնք գերազանցում են նախորդ համակարգը 0.04 կամ 4.4 տոկոսով' Պիրսոնի կապվածությունը, որը կապված է ՈւՍՍԱ'17 EmoINT-ի ընդհանուր We investigate the performance of deep multi-task learning models trained for all emotions at once in a unified architecture and get encouraging results.  Զգացմունքների զույգերի միջև կապը գնահատելու փորձերը հետաքրքիր ընկալումներ են տալիս նրանց միջև կապը:", 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের ভিত্তিক মাইক্রো-ব্লগিং সাইট টুইটারের মতো বাস্তব তথ্যের একটি সাধারণ উৎস (সংগঠন এবং তাদের কৌশল প্রভাবিত করে এবং আবেগ ও মতামত প্রকাশের জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়। তাই এই বিষয়বস্তুর স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে বিশ্লেষণ গুরুত্বপূর্ণ। এই কারণে আমরা টুইটারে অনুভূতির বিশেষ কাজের উপর গভীর নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার কর প্রাকৃতিক ভিত্তিক কাজের প্রাকৃতিক ভাষায় প্রথমবারের জন্য কাজ করা হয়েছে। লেক্সিকোর ভিত্তিক বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে পরিবর্তন শিক্ষা নিয়ে আমাদের মডেলের রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের কার্যক্রম অর্জন করে, পূর্ববর্তী সিস্টেমের মাধ্যমে ০. 044 অথবা ৪. আমরা গভীর মাল্টিক কাজ শিক্ষা মডেলের প্রদর্শনের তদন্ত করি একসাথে একত্রিত একটি প্রতিষ্ঠান এবং উৎসাহিত ফলাফল পাই। আবেগের জোড়ার মধ্যে সম্পর্কের মূল্যের বিষয়টি মূল্য করার পরীক্ষা করা হয়েছে তাদের মধ্যে সম্পর্কের মধ্যে কৌতূহলিক দ', 'ca': "Sitis de microblog basats en mitjans socials com Twitter s'han convertit en una font comú d'informació en temps real (afectant les organitzacions i les seves estratègies, i són utilitzades per expressar emocions i opinions. Per tant, l'anàlisi automàtica d'aquest contingut augmenta en importància. Per això, explorem la viabilitat d'utilitzar xarxes neuronales profondes en la tasca específica de predicció de l'intensitat emocional en els tweets. Proposem una arquitectura neuronal que combini capes convolutives i completament connectades en una no seqüencial de manera - feta per primera vegada en el context de tasques basades en idiomes naturals. Combinad amb característiques basades en lexicons, juntament amb l'aprenentatge de transfer ències, el nostre model aconsegueix un rendiment més avançat, superant el sistema anterior en un 0,044 o 4,4% la correlació Pearson en el conjunt de dades compartit de tasques EmoInt de WASSA'17. We investigate the performance of deep multi-task learning models trained for all emotions at once in a unified architecture and get encouraging results.  Els experiments fets en valorar la correlació entre parelles emocionals ofereixen una visió interessant sobre la relació entre elles.", 'bs': "Društveni mediji bazirani na mikro-blogging stranicama poput Twitter postali su zajednički izvor realne informacije (utječe na organizacije i njihove strategije i koriste se za izražavanje emocija i mišljenja. Zato se automatska analiza takvog sadržaja povećava u važnosti. Za taj cilj istražujemo živototvornost upotrebe dubokih neuralnih mreža na specifični zadatak predviđanja emocionalne intenzitete u tweetima. Predlažemo neuralnu arhitekturu koja kombinuje konvolucione i potpuno povezane slojeve u nekosekvencijalnim slojevima. Način - urađen po prvi put u kontekstu prirodnog jezika. U kombinaciji sa leksikonskim funkcijama zajedno sa učenjem prijenosa, naš model postiže izvršnost stanja umjetnosti, nadmašući prethodni sistem od 0,044 ili 4,4% korelacije Pearsona na kompletu podataka WASSA'17 EmoInt. Istražujemo provedbu dubokih multizadatačnih modela učenja obučenih za sve emocije u jedinstvenoj arhitekturi i dobijamo ohrabrujuće rezultate. Eksperimenti provedeni u procjeni korelacije između parova emocija nude zanimljive uvide o odnosu između njih.", 'cs': "Mikroblogové stránky založené na sociálních médiích, jako je Twitter, se staly běžným zdrojem informací v reálném čase Za tímto účelem zkoumáme životaschopnost využití hlubokých neuronových sítí na konkrétní úlohu predikce intenzity emocí ve tweetech. Navrhujeme neuronovou architekturu kombinující konvoluční a plně propojené vrstvy v nekekvenčním prostředí. způsob hledání poprvé provedený v kontextu úkolů založených na přirozeném jazyce. V kombinaci s funkcemi založenými na lexikonu spolu s transferovým učením dosahuje náš model nejmodernějšího výkonu a překonává předchozí systém o 0,044 nebo 4,4% Pearsonovu korelaci na datové sadě sdílených úkolů WASSA'17 EmoInt. Zkoumáme výkonnost modelů hlubokého víceúlohového učení trénovaných pro všechny emoce najednou v jednotné architektuře a dosahujeme povzbuzujících výsledků. Experimenty prováděné na hodnocení korelace mezi emočními páry nabízejí zajímavý pohled na vztah mezi nimi.", 'az': "Twitter kimi sosyal media tabanlńĪ mikro-blogging sit…ôl…ôri h…ôqiq…ôt zamanlńĪ m…ôlumatlarńĪn ortaq m…ônb…ôsi oldular. Bu m…ôlumatlarńĪn otomatik analizi b√∂y√ľk m…ôlumatńĪ artńĪrńĪr. Bu s…ôb…ôbd…ô, duygusal a ńüńĪrlńĪq t…ôdbirl…ôrinin m√ľ…ôyy…ôn etdiyi t…ôqdird…ô duygularńĪn v…ô fikirl…ôrin istifad…ôsi √ľ√ß√ľn d…ôrin n√∂ral ańülarńĪnńĪ t…ôŇükil edirik. T…ôbi…ôtli dil temizl…ônmiŇü iŇül…ôrd…ô ilk d…ôf…ô yapńĪlmńĪŇü. X…ôrcl…ôm…ô √∂yr…ônm…ôsi il…ô birlikd…ô leksikon tabanlńĪ √∂zellikl…ôri il…ô birlikd…ô, modell…ôrimiz WASSA'17 EmoInt paylaŇüńĪlan iŇül…ôr veri qutusu il…ô …ôvv…ôlki sistemi 0.044 ya da 4.4% il…ô d…ôyiŇüdirir. Biz b√ľt√ľn emosiyalar √ľ√ß√ľn t…ôhsil edil…ôn √ßoxlu iŇü √∂yr…ônm…ô modell…ôrin performansńĪnńĪ t…ôhsil edirik v…ô t…ôhsil ed…ôn sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ t…ôhsil edirik. Duygusal √ßiftl…ôr arasńĪndakńĪ bańülantńĪlarńĪ deńüerl…ôŇüdirm…ôkd…ô t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôr onlarńĪn arasńĪndakńĪ bańülantńĪlara ilgin√ß fikirl…ôr verir.", 'fi': "Sosiaaliseen mediaan perustuvista mikrobloggaussivustoista, kuten Twitteristä, on tullut yleinen reaaliaikaisen tiedon lähde Tässä tarkoituksessa tutkimme syvien hermoverkkojen toteuttamiskelpoisuutta tunnetehokkuuden ennustamiseksi tweeteissä. Ehdotamme neuroarkkitehtuuria, jossa yhdistyvät konvolutionaaliset ja täysin toisiinsa kytkeytyvät kerrokset, jotka eivät ole sekvenssiaalisia. tapa - tehdään ensimmäistä kertaa luonnolliseen kieleen perustuvien tehtävien yhteydessä. Yhdistettynä sanastoon perustuviin ominaisuuksiin ja siirtooppimiseen mallimme saavuttaa huipputason suorituskyvyn ja ylittää aiemman järjestelmän 0,044 tai 4,4% Pearson-korrelaation WASSA'17 EmoInt-jaetussa tehtäväaineistossa. Tutkimme syvän monitehtävän oppimismallien suorituskykyä, joka on koulutettu kaikille tunteille kerralla yhtenäisessä arkkitehtuurissa ja saamme rohkaisevia tuloksia. Tunneparien välisen korrelaation arviointikokeet tarjoavat mielenkiintoista tietoa niiden välisestä suhteesta.", 'et': "Sotsiaalmeediapõhised mikroblogimise saidid, nagu Twitter, on muutunud reaalajas infoallikaks Selle sisu automatiseeritud analüüs tõuseb tähtsuseks. Selleks uurime sügavate närvivõrkude kasutamise elujõulisust emotsioonide intensiivsuse ennustamise konkreetsel ülesandel tweetides. Pakume välja närviarhitektuuri, mis ühendab konvolutsioonilised ja täielikult ühendatud kihid mittesjärjestikusel kujul. viis - tehakse esimest korda looduskeelel põhinevate ülesannete kontekstis. Koos leksikonipõhiste funktsioonidega koos siirdeõppega saavutab meie mudel kaasaegse jõudluse, ületades eelmise süsteemi 0,044 või 4,4% Pearsoni korrelatsiooni WASSA'17 EmoInt jagatud ülesannete andmekogumil. Uurime ühtses arhitektuuris kõigile emotsioonidele korraga koolitatud sügavate mitmeülesannetega õppemudelite toimimist ja saame julgustavaid tulemusi. Emotsioonipaaride vahelise korrelatsiooni hindamiseks tehtud eksperimendid pakuvad huvitavat ülevaadet nende vahelistest suhetest.", 'jv': 'Media sotiné digawe sistem sistem mikro-blongging sajiné kaya Tom kuwi pangunakan kelas telu informasi nyimpen (Kowe ngupakan universi karo perusahaan lan akeh pancening nggawe empresa karo hal empresa karo hal-hal sing dirawih nggawe gerakan. Automated edah pancening kuwi kudu nggawe barang nggawe lanjut cara nggawe ngubah kebutuhan netwisan karo kesempresan ingkang dipun dadi nggawe Kasama sing dirangawe tarjamahan karo kuwi tindakan Kasama soko nggawe Wacom Kombined karo Leksiyon-basa perusahaan karo transfer kuwi, model nambah dhéwé iso state-of-the Awak dhéwé yatêkake ngerasakno akeh model sing nggambar multi-task lan ijol-ijol kuwi nggawe duwé kuwi kesempatan sampek ning acara architecture sing beraksi lan ijol-ijolan winih. Gebudhakan langgar nggambar kelas kuwi nggawe gerakan kelas karo perusahaan sing luwih apik sing nyimpen kanggo nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan langgar.', 'sk': "Spletna mesta za mikrobloganje na družbenih omrežjih, kot je Twitter, so postala pogost vir informacij v realnem času V ta namen raziskujemo sposobnost uporabe globokih nevronskih omrežij pri določeni nalogi napovedovanja intenzivnosti čustev v tweetih. Predlagamo nevronsko arhitekturo, ki združuje konvolucionalne in popolnoma povezane plasti v nezaporedju. Način - prvič opravljen v kontekstu nalog, ki temeljijo na naravnem jeziku. V kombinaciji s funkcijami, ki temeljijo na leksikonu, skupaj s prenosnim učenjem, naš model dosega najsodobnejšo zmogljivost in presega prejšnji sistem za 0,044 ali 4,4% Pearsonove korelacije na skupnem naboru opravil WASSA'17 EmoInt. Raziskujemo uspešnost modelov globokega večopravilnega učenja, usposobljenih za vsa čustva hkrati v enotni arhitekturi in dobimo spodbudne rezultate. Eksperimenti, izvedeni na področju ocenjevanja korelacije med čustvenimi pari, ponujajo zanimive vpoglede v razmerje med njimi.", 'ha': "Socket error code NotSupported (masu yin amfani da shirin ayukansu da tunikinsu, kuma ana yi amfani da su ga bayyana hisia da mawaƙo. Anarari farat-farat mai amfani da wannan maɓalli yana ƙara ga muhimu. Daga wannan, Munã jarraba abinci da za'a yi amfani da wato masu ƙari na neural a kan wani aikin muhimmi na aikin hiso da za'a yi sauna cikin Twitter. @ action: inmenu Ana haɗi da masu tsarin leksikon da aka samu da transfer education, motel yana sãmun state-of-the-art, mai cika na zaman system by 0.044 or 4.4% Pearson Correlated on the WANSA'17 EmoInt da aka raba aikin aiki na tsari. Ina ƙidãya game da misãlai masu karanta mulki masu aikin da aka sanar wa duk hisãbi a koma cikin bakin da aka haɗa shi kuma ke sami matsayin mai farin ciki. Da jarrabõ da suka aikata a kan evaluation mutane da hisia, suna da fasãho mai raɗaɗi a tsakaninsu.", 'bo': "ཌིས་ཌིར་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བརྟེན་ནས་ཀློག་འཕྲིན་གྱི་དྲ་བ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཆགས་པ་དང་། (impacting organizations and their strategies, and are used for expressing emotions and opinions. Automated analysis of such content therefore rises in importance. To this end, we explore the viability of using deep neural networks on the specific task of emotion intensity prediction in tweets. We propose a neural architecture combining convolutional and fully connected layers in a non-sequential layer ཐབས་ལམ། རང་བཞིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་ལ་ཐོག་དང་པོ་བྱེད་པ་དེ་རེད། Combined with lexicon-based features along with transfer learning, our model achieves state-of-the-art performance, outperforming the previous system by 0.044 or 4.4% Pearson correlation on the WASSA'17 EmoInt shared task dataset. ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གཅིག་ཁར་གྱི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་ལས་འགན་སྣེ་མང་བོའི་དཔེ་གཞི་ཚོགས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། སེམས་ཚོར་གྱི་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་བར་ཐག", 'he': "Social media based micro-blogging sites like Twitter have become a common source of real-time information  (משפיעים על ארגונים ואסטרטגיות שלהם, ומשתמשים לבטא רגשות ודעות. ניתוח אוטומטי של תוכן כזה עולה לכן בחשוב. לכן, אנו חוקרים את היציאות של השימוש ברשתות עצביות עמוקות על משימה ספציפית של צפוי אינטנסיביות רגשות בטוויטים. אנו מציעים ארכיטקטורה עצבית דרך - נעשה בפעם הראשונה בקשר למשימות טבעיות מבוססות בשפה. ביחד עם תכונות מבוססות על לקסיקון יחד עם לימוד העברה, המודל שלנו משיג ביצועים מוקדמים, מעלים את המערכת הקודמת על ידי 0.044 או 4.4% שיתוף פירסון על קבוצת מידע משימות משותפת של WASSA'17 EmoInt. אנחנו חוקרים את ההופעה של דוגמני לימוד רב משימות עמוקים מאומנים לכל רגשות בבת אחת בארכיטקטורה מאוחדת ולקבל תוצאות מעודדות. Experiments performed on evaluating correlation between emotion pairs offer interesting insights into the relationship between them."}
{'en': 'Expressively vulgar : The socio-dynamics of vulgarity and its effects on sentiment analysis in social media', 'ar': 'مبتذلة بشكل صريح: الديناميكيات الاجتماعية للابتذال وتأثيراتها على تحليل المشاعر في وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي', 'es': 'Expresivamente vulgar: la sociodinámica de la vulgaridad y sus efectos en el análisis de sentimientos en las redes sociales', 'pt': 'Expressivamente vulgar: a sociodinâmica da vulgaridade e seus efeitos na análise de sentimentos nas mídias sociais', 'fr': "Expressivement vulgaire\xa0: la socio-dynamique de la vulgarité et ses effets sur l'analyse des sentiments dans les médias sociaux", 'hi': 'अभिव्यंजक रूप से अश्लील: अश्लीलता की सामाजिक-गतिशीलता और सोशल मीडिया में भावना विश्लेषण पर इसके प्रभाव', 'ja': '表現的に低俗：ソーシャルメディアにおける感情分析における低俗さの社会的動態とその影響', 'ru': 'Выраженно вульгарно: Социальная динамика вульгарности и ее влияние на анализ настроений в социальных сетях', 'zh': '达俗:俗社会动态社交媒体情', 'ga': 'Go sainráite vulgar: Sochdhinimic na vulgarity agus a éifeachtaí ar anailís meon sna meáin shóisialta', 'ka': 'ძალიან ძალიან ძალიან: სოციო-დინამიკა ძალიან ძალიან და მისი ეფექტი სენტიმენტის ანალიზაზე სოციალური მედიაში', 'hu': 'Kifejezetten vulgáris: A vulgaritás társadalmi-dinamikája és hatásai a közösségi médiában az érzelmek elemzésére', 'el': 'Εκφραστικά χυδαία: Η κοινωνικοδυναμική της χυδαίας και οι επιπτώσεις της στην ανάλυση συναισθημάτων στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης', 'it': "Espressivamente volgare: le sociodinamiche della volgarità e i suoi effetti sull'analisi del sentiment nei social media", 'kk': 'Эксперсиялық көпшілік: Айырымдылығының социалдық динамикасы және оның әсері социалдық медиақтардың көпшілік анализациясына', 'lt': 'Akivaizdžiai vulgarus: vulgarumo socialindinamika ir poveikis jautrumo analizei social in ėje žiniasklaidoje', 'mk': 'Експресивно вулгарна: Социо-динамиката на вулгарноста и нејзините ефекти на анализата на чувствата во социјалните медиуми', 'ms': 'Expressively vulgar: The socio-dynamics of vulgarity and its effects on sentiment analysis in social media', 'ml': 'സാമൂഹിക മാധ്യമങ്ങളില്\u200d സാമൂഹ്യത്തിന്റെ സാമൂഹ്യത്തിന്റെ ജീവിതത്തിന്റെയും അതിന്റെയും പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Үнэндээ эмзэг, нийгмийн мэдээллийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээнд нөлөөлөх', 'mt': 'Expressively vulgar: The socio-dynamics of vulgarity and its effects on sentiment analysis in social media', 'pl': 'Wyraźnie wulgarna: Społeczno-dynamika wulgarności i jej wpływ na analizę sentymentów w mediach społecznościowych', 'no': 'Uttrykk sårbar: Sårbarhetsdynamikken og effekten på sentimentanalysen i sosiale medier', 'sr': 'Eksplozivno vulgarna: socio-dinamika vulgarnosti i njegovi uticaji na analizu sentimenta u društvenim medijima', 'ro': 'Expresiv vulgar: Sociodinamica vulgarității și efectele sale asupra analizei sentimentelor în rețelele sociale', 'si': 'සාමාජික විශ්ලේෂණ විශ්ලේෂණයේ සමාජික විද්\u200dයාපනය', 'so': 'si aad u fiirsan kartid: cilmiga bulshada iyo waxyaabaha ku saabsan baaritaanka maandooriyaha ee shabakadda bulshada', 'sv': 'Expressivt vulgärt: Vulgaritetens sociodynamik och dess effekter på sentimentalanalys i sociala medier', 'ta': 'குறிப்பாக கருத்து', 'ur': 'کھول کھول کھول کھول گیا: آسیب کی سوسی ڈینامیک اور اس کے اثرات سوسیلی میڈیا میں احساسات تحلیل پر', 'uz': "Ko'rib chiqish: Shaxsiylikning jamiyatli dynamika va ijodkorlik media'da hissiyotlari analyzerida effekti", 'vi': 'Giọng nói thô tục: Tính chất xã hội của thô tục và tác động của nó lên phân tích cảm xúc trong truyền thông xã hội', 'bg': 'Експресивно вулгарно: Социо-динамиката на вулгарността и нейните ефекти върху сентименталния анализ в социалните медии', 'hr': 'Eksplozivno vulgarna: socio-dinamika vulgarnosti i njegovi učinci na analizu osjećaja u društvenim medijima', 'da': 'Ekspressivt vulgært: Vulgaritetens sociodynamik og dens virkninger på følelsesanalyse i sociale medier', 'de': 'Expressiv vulgär: Die Soziodynamik von Vulgarität und ihre Auswirkungen auf die Stimmungsanalyse in sozialen Medien', 'nl': 'Expressief vulgair: De socio-dynamiek van vulgariteit en de effecten ervan op sentimentanalyse in sociale media', 'ko': '표현 저속: 저속한 사회 동력학 및 소셜 미디어 정서 분석에 대한 영향', 'id': 'Ekspresif vulgar: Sosialdinamika vulgaritas dan efeknya pada analisis sentimen di media sosial', 'sw': 'Tatizo kubwa: Utamaduni wa kijamii na madhara yake kwenye uchambuzi wa hisia katika mitandao ya kijamii', 'fa': 'اثراتش بر تحلیل احساسات در رسانه های اجتماعی', 'tr': 'Eşitli bir şekilde vulgarlık:Sosyal medyelerdeki duygusal analizi üzerinde sosyal dinamik ve etkisi', 'sq': 'Expressively vulgar: The socio-dynamics of vulgarity and its effects on sentiment analysis in social media', 'am': 'በአሳማዊ ሚዲያ ላይ የስሜት ትምህርት ማኅበራዊ እና ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ ጥያቄ', 'af': 'Uitdrukking vulgar: Die sosiale-dinamike van vulgariteit en sy effekte op sentimentanalisie in sosiale media', 'hy': 'Expressively vulgar: The socio-dynamics of vulgarity and its effects on sentiment analysis in social media', 'az': 'X칲susiyy톛tli vulgarl캼qlar캼n sosyal dinamiki v톛 sosyal medialarda hiss analizi 칲z톛rind톛', 'bn': 'বিশেষভাবে ভুলগের: সামাজিক মিডিয়াতে বিশ্লেষণের প্রভাবের সমাজ-ধারণা এবং এর প্রভাব', 'cs': 'Výrazně vulgární: Sociálně-dynamika vulgárnosti a její vliv na sentimentovou analýzu v sociálních médiích', 'ca': "Expressivament vulgar: La sociodinàmica de la vulgaritat i els seus efectes en l'anàlisi de sentiments dels mitjans socials", 'et': 'Ekspressiivselt vulgaarne: Vulgaalsuse sotsiaalne-dünaamika ja selle mõju sentimentaalüüsile sotsiaalmeedias', 'fi': 'Expressiivisesti vulgaari: Vulgaarisuuden sosiodynamiikka ja sen vaikutukset tunteiden analysointiin sosiaalisessa mediassa', 'bs': 'Eksplozivno vulgarna: socio-dinamika vulgarnosti i njegovi učinci na analizu osjećaja u društvenim medijima', 'jv': 'Olasahan nggagal: soko-dynamics sing njogêrungke lan efek dhéwé ngono edam pancen dumadhi sing gagal ning media sotiane', 'he': 'וולגרי באופן מיוחד: הסוציודינמיקה של הווגריות וההשפעות שלה על ניתוח רגשות בתקשורת חברתית', 'sk': 'Izrazito vulgarno: Družbeno-dinamika vulgarnosti in njeni učinki na analizo čustva v družbenih medijih', 'ha': 'Expressively vulgar: The socio-dynamics of vulgarity and its effects on sentiment analysis in social media', 'bo': 'གསལ་བཤད་མི་vulgar: སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་གནས་སྟངས་དང་'}
{'en': 'Vulgarity is a common linguistic expression and is used to perform several linguistic functions. Understanding their usage can aid both linguistic and psychological phenomena as well as benefit downstream natural language processing applications such as sentiment analysis. This study performs a large-scale, data-driven empirical analysis of vulgar words using social media data. We analyze the socio-cultural and pragmatic aspects of vulgarity using tweets from users with known demographics. Further, we collect sentiment ratings for vulgar tweets to study the relationship between the use of vulgar words and perceived sentiment and show that explicitly modeling vulgar words can boost sentiment analysis performance.', 'es': 'La vulgaridad es una expresión lingüística común y se utiliza para realizar varias funciones lingüísticas. Comprender su uso puede ayudar a los fenómenos lingüísticos y psicológicos, así como beneficiar a las aplicaciones posteriores de procesamiento del lenguaje natural, como el análisis de sentimientos. Este estudio realiza un análisis empírico a gran escala basado en datos de palabras vulgares utilizando datos de redes sociales. Analizamos los aspectos socioculturales y pragmáticos de la vulgaridad mediante tuits de usuarios con datos demográficos conocidos. Además, recopilamos calificaciones de opinión para tuits vulgares para estudiar la relación entre el uso de palabras vulgares y el sentimiento percibido y demostrar que el modelado explícito de palabras vulgares puede mejorar el rendimiento del análisis de opiniones.', 'ar': 'اللغة المبتذلة هي تعبير لغوي شائع وتستخدم لأداء العديد من الوظائف اللغوية. يمكن أن يساعد فهم استخدامها على الظواهر اللغوية والنفسية وكذلك الاستفادة من تطبيقات معالجة اللغة الطبيعية مثل تحليل المشاعر. تقوم هذه الدراسة بإجراء تحليل تجريبي واسع النطاق قائم على البيانات للكلمات المبتذلة باستخدام بيانات وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. نحن نحلل الجوانب الاجتماعية والثقافية والبراغماتية للابتذال باستخدام تغريدات من المستخدمين ذوي التركيبة السكانية المعروفة. علاوة على ذلك ، نقوم بجمع تقييمات المشاعر للتغريدات المبتذلة لدراسة العلاقة بين استخدام الكلمات المبتذلة والمشاعر المتصورة وإظهار أن صياغة الكلمات المبتذلة بشكل صريح يمكن أن تعزز أداء تحليل المشاعر.', 'fr': "La vulgarité est une expression linguistique courante qui est utilisée pour remplir plusieurs fonctions linguistiques. La compréhension de leur utilisation peut aider à la fois les phénomènes linguistiques et psychologiques ainsi que les applications de traitement du langage naturel en aval, telles que l'analyse des sentiments. Cette étude effectue une analyse empirique à grande échelle basée sur des données de mots vulgaires à l'aide de données de médias sociaux. Nous analysons les aspects socioculturels et pragmatiques de la vulgarité à l'aide de tweets d'utilisateurs dont la démographie est connue. En outre, nous collectons des évaluations d'opinion pour les tweets vulgaires afin d'étudier la relation entre l'utilisation de mots vulgaires et le sentiment perçu et de montrer que la modélisation explicite de mots vulgaires peut améliorer les performances de l'analyse des sentiments.", 'pt': 'Vulgaridade é uma expressão linguística comum e é usada para desempenhar várias funções linguísticas. Compreender seu uso pode ajudar tanto nos fenômenos linguísticos quanto psicológicos, bem como beneficiar aplicativos de processamento de linguagem natural a jusante, como a análise de sentimentos. Este estudo realiza uma análise empírica em larga escala baseada em dados de palavras vulgares usando dados de mídia social. Analisamos os aspectos socioculturais e pragmáticos da vulgaridade usando tweets de usuários com dados demográficos conhecidos. Além disso, coletamos classificações de sentimento para tweets vulgares para estudar a relação entre o uso de palavras vulgares e o sentimento percebido e mostrar que a modelagem explícita de palavras vulgares pode aumentar o desempenho da análise de sentimento.', 'ja': '低俗性は一般的な言語表現であり、いくつかの言語機能を実行するために使用されます。それらの使用を理解することは、言語現象と心理現象の両方を助けるだけでなく、感情分析などの下流の自然言語処理アプリケーションにも利益をもたらすことができます。本研究では、ソーシャルメディアデータを用いた低俗な言葉の大規模なデータ駆動型実証分析を行う。私たちは、既知の人口統計を持つユーザーからのツイートを使用して、低俗さの社会文化的および実用的な側面を分析します。さらに、低俗なツイートの感情評価を収集して、低俗な言葉の使用と知覚された感情との関係を研究し、低俗な言葉を明示的にモデリングすることで、感情分析のパフォーマンスを向上させることができることを示します。', 'zh': '粗俗者,常见之言,所以行多种语言功能也。 知其用法可以助言语心理现象,而利于下流之自然语言应用程序,如情析之。 其议用社交媒体大词汇粗俗、数驱之实。 吾用已知人计用户之推文,以析粗俗之文用。 此外收拾粗俗推文情评级,以究粗词之用感知之际,明建模粗俗之语可以益情性也。', 'hi': 'अश्लीलता एक सामान्य भाषाई अभिव्यक्ति है और इसका उपयोग कई भाषाई कार्यों को करने के लिए किया जाता है। उनके उपयोग को समझने से भाषाई और मनोवैज्ञानिक दोनों घटनाओं में सहायता मिल सकती है और साथ ही भावना विश्लेषण जैसे डाउनस्ट्रीम प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण अनुप्रयोगों को लाभ हो सकता है। यह अध्ययन सोशल मीडिया डेटा का उपयोग करके अश्लील शब्दों का एक बड़े पैमाने पर, डेटा-संचालित अनुभवजन्य विश्लेषण करता है। हम ज्ञात जनसांख्यिकी वाले उपयोगकर्ताओं से ट्वीट्स का उपयोग करके अश्लीलता के सामाजिक-सांस्कृतिक और व्यावहारिक पहलुओं का विश्लेषण करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम अश्लील शब्दों के उपयोग और कथित भावना के बीच संबंधों का अध्ययन करने के लिए अश्लील ट्वीट्स के लिए भावना रेटिंग एकत्र करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि स्पष्ट रूप से मॉडलिंग अश्लील शब्द भावना विश्लेषण प्रदर्शन को बढ़ावा दे सकते हैं।', 'ru': 'Вульгарность является распространенным языковым выражением и используется для выполнения нескольких лингвистических функций. Понимание их использования может помочь как лингвистическим, так и психологическим явлениям, а также принести пользу последующим приложениям для обработки естественного языка, таким как анализ настроений. Данное исследование выполняет масштабный эмпирический анализ вульгарных слов на основе данных социальных сетей. Мы анализируем социально-культурные и прагматические аспекты вульгарности, используя твиты пользователей с известной демографией. Кроме того, мы собираем рейтинги настроений для вульгарных твитов, чтобы изучить взаимосвязь между использованием вульгарных слов и воспринимаемыми чувствами и показать, что явное моделирование вульгарных слов может повысить эффективность анализа настроений.', 'ga': 'Is slonn coitianta teangeolaíoch í vulgarity agus úsáidtear í chun roinnt feidhmeanna teanga a chomhlíonadh. Is féidir le tuiscint a fháil ar a n-úsáid cuidiú le feiniméin theangeolaíocha agus shíceolaíocha chomh maith le bheith ina bhuntáiste d’fheidhmchláir phróiseála teanga nádúrtha iartheachtacha ar nós anailís meoin. Déanann an staidéar seo anailís eimpíreach ar scála mór arna thiomáint ag sonraí ar fhocail bhréagacha ag baint úsáide as sonraí meán sóisialta. Déanaimid anailís ar ghnéithe soch-chultúrtha agus pragmatacha na leochaileachta trí úsáid a bhaint as tweets ó úsáideoirí a bhfuil déimeagrafaic aitheanta acu. Ina theannta sin, bailímid rátálacha meon le haghaidh tweets vulgar chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar an ngaol idir úsáid na bhfocal sobhriste agus an meon braite agus a thaispeánann gur féidir le samhaltú sainráite focail bhréagacha cur le feidhmíocht anailíse meon.', 'hu': 'A vulgaritás egy közös nyelvi kifejezés, amelyet több nyelvi funkció ellátására használnak. Használatuk megértése segíthet mind a nyelvi, mind a pszichológiai jelenségek, valamint hasznos lehet a természetes nyelvfeldolgozó alkalmazások, mint például az érzelmek elemzése. A tanulmány a vulgáris szavak nagyszabású, adatközpontú empirikus elemzését végzi a közösségi média adataival. A vulgaritás társadalmi-kulturális és pragmatikus aspektusait ismert demográfiai felhasználók tweetjeivel elemezzük. Továbbá a vulgáris tweetekre vonatkozó érzelmi minősítéseket gyűjtjük, hogy tanulmányozzuk a vulgáris szavak használata és az érzékelt érzelmek közötti kapcsolatot, és megmutassuk, hogy a vulgáris szavak explicit modellezése növelheti az érzelmek elemzésének teljesítményét.', 'it': "La volgarità è un'espressione linguistica comune e viene utilizzata per svolgere diverse funzioni linguistiche. Comprendere il loro utilizzo può aiutare sia i fenomeni linguistici che psicologici, nonché beneficiare le applicazioni di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale a valle come l'analisi del sentiment. Questo studio esegue un'analisi empirica su larga scala basata sui dati di parole volgari utilizzando i dati dei social media. Analizziamo gli aspetti socio-culturali e pragmatici della volgarità utilizzando tweet di utenti con demografia nota. Inoltre, raccogliamo valutazioni di sentiment per tweet volgari per studiare la relazione tra l'uso di parole volgari e il sentimento percepito e mostrare che modellare esplicitamente parole volgari può aumentare le prestazioni di analisi del sentiment.", 'el': 'Η χυδαιότητα είναι μια κοινή γλωσσική έκφραση και χρησιμοποιείται για να εκτελέσει διάφορες γλωσσικές λειτουργίες. Η κατανόηση της χρήσης τους μπορεί να βοηθήσει τόσο τα γλωσσικά όσο και τα ψυχολογικά φαινόμενα, καθώς και να ωφελήσει μεταγενέστερες εφαρμογές επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, όπως η ανάλυση συναισθημάτων. Αυτή η μελέτη εκτελεί μια ευρείας κλίμακας εμπειρική ανάλυση χυδαίων λέξεων χρησιμοποιώντας δεδομένα κοινωνικών μέσων. Αναλύουμε τις κοινωνικοπολιτικές και ρεαλιστικές πτυχές της χυδαίας χρησιμοποιώντας tweets από χρήστες με γνωστά δημογραφικά στοιχεία. Επιπλέον, συλλέγουμε αξιολογήσεις συναισθημάτων για χυδαία tweets για να μελετήσουμε τη σχέση μεταξύ της χρήσης χυδαίων λέξεων και του αντιληπτόυ συναισθήματος και να δείξουμε ότι η ρητή μοντελοποίηση χυδαίων λέξεων μπορεί να ενισχύσει την απόδοση ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων.', 'ka': 'Vulgarity is a common linguistic expression and is used to perform several linguistic functions. მათი გამოყენება შეიძლება ინგლინგისტიკური და ფსიქოლოგიური ფენომენების შესაძლებლობა და გამოყენება ნახვა ენერგიური პროცესის პროცესი პროცესი პროგრამები ეს სწავლად სოციალური მედიაზე გამოყენებული სოციალური მონაცემების გამოყენებული სოციალური სიტყვების ემპერიკალური ანალიზია. ჩვენ სოციო-კულტურული და პრაგმატიკური აპექტიკების ანალიზაციას ვიყენებთ, რომლებიც ცნობილი დემოგრაფიკაში გამოყენებული ტივიტები გამოყენებთ. დამატებით, ჩვენ სენტიმენტების რეტენტირები ვალგური ტვიტებისთვის, რომ სწავლათ საერთო საერთო სიტყვების გამოყენება და დავიწყება სენტიმენტი სიტყვების გამოყენება და გამოყენებული სიტყვების გამოყ', 'kk': 'Vulgarity - жалпы лингвистикалық өрнегі, бірнеше лингвистикалық функцияларды орындау үшін қолданылады. Олардың қолдануын түсіну мүмкін лингвистикалық және психологикалық пайдалануларды, сондай-ақ, сезімдік анализ секілді, тәуелсіздік тілдерді өңдеу қолданбаларының Бұл зерттеу социалдық медиа деректерін қолдану үлкен, деректердің импирикалық анализациясын жасайды. Біз белгілі демографиялық пайдаланушылардың tweets қолдану арқылы көпшілік-мәдениетті және прагматикалық аспекттерін анализирақ. Келесіден, біз көпшілікті tweets үшін көпшілікті сөздерді қолдану мен сезімді қолдану арасындағы қатынастығын зерттеу үшін көпшілікті рейтинг жинап, көпшілікті сөздерді моделдеу үшін көпшілікт', 'ms': 'Vulgariti adalah ungkapan bahasa umum dan digunakan untuk melakukan beberapa fungsi bahasa. Memahami penggunaan mereka boleh membantu fenomena bahasa dan psikologi serta manfaat aplikasi pemprosesan bahasa alami turun seperti analisis perasaan. kajian ini melaksanakan analisis empirik pada skala besar yang dipimpin oleh data perkataan vulgar menggunakan data media sosial. Kami menganalisis aspek sosio-budaya dan pragmatik vulgariti menggunakan tweet dari pengguna dengan demografi yang diketahui. Lagipun, kami mengumpulkan nilai perasaan untuk tweet vulgar untuk mempelajari hubungan antara penggunaan kata vulgar dan perasaan yang didapati dan menunjukkan bahawa pemodelan secara eksplicit perkataan vulgar boleh meningkatkan prestasi analisis perasaan.', 'lt': 'Vulgarumas yra bendra kalbinė išraiška ir naudojamas kelioms kalbinėms funkcijoms atlikti. Supranti jų naudojimą gali padėti tiek kalbiniams, tiek psichologiniams reiškiniams, taip pat gauti naudos tolesnėms gamtos kalbų apdorojimo programoms, pavyzdžiui, jausmų analizei. Šiame tyrime atliekama plataus masto, duomenų pagrindu pagrįsta empirinė vulgar ų žodžių analizė naudojant socialinės žiniasklaidos duomenis. Analizuojame socialinius, kultūrinius ir pragmatinius pažeidžiamumo aspektus naudojant žinomos demografijos naudotojų tweetus. Be to, renkame jausmų reitingus vulgariems tweetams, kad ištirtume ryšį tarp vulgar ų žodžių naudojimo ir suvokiamo jausmo ir parodytume, kad aiškiai modeliuojant vulgarus žodžius gali sustiprinti jausmų analizės rezultatus.', 'mk': 'Вулгаритетот е обичен јазички израз и се користи за извршување на неколку јазички функции. Разбирањето на нивната употреба може да им помогне на јазичките и психолошките феномени, како и да им помогне на природните апликации за обработување на јазиците како што е анализата на чувствата. Оваа студија спроведува голема емпирична анализа на вулгарни зборови со користење на податоци од социјалните медиуми. Ние ги анализираме социо-културните и прагматичните аспекти на вулгарноста користејќи твитови од корисниците со позната демографија. Покрај тоа, собираме оценки на чувствата за вулгарните твитови за да ја проучуваме врската помеѓу употребата на вулгарните зборови и перцепираниот чувства и да покажеме дека експлицитно моделирањето на вулгарните зборови може да ја зголеми изведбата на анализата на чувствата.', 'mt': 'Vulgarity is a common linguistic expression and is used to perform several linguistic functions.  Il-fehim tal-użu tagħhom jista’ jgħin kemm fil-fenomeni lingwistiċi kif ukoll psikoloġiċi kif ukoll fil-benefiċċju ta’ applikazzjonijiet downstream għall-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali bħall-analiżi tas-sentimenti. Dan l-istudju jwettaq analiżi empirika fuq skala kbira u bbażata fuq id-dejta ta’ kliem vulgar bl-użu tad-dejta tal-midja soċjali. We analyze the socio-cultural and pragmatic aspects of vulgarity using tweets from users with known demographics.  Barra minn hekk, aħna nġabru klassifikazzjonijiet tas-sentimenti għal tweets vulgar biex nistudjaw ir-relazzjoni bejn l-użu ta’ kliem vulgar u s-sentiment perċepit u nuru li l-immudellar espliċitu tal-kliem vulgar jista’ jsaħħaħ il-prestazzjoni tal-analiżi tas-sentimenti.', 'mn': 'Vulgarity бол ерөнхий хэлний илэрхийлэл ба хэдэн хэлний функцүүдийг хийхэд хэрэглэгддэг. Тэдний хэрэглээ ойлгохын тулд хэлний болон психологик явдал болон байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн хэрэглээ, мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээ шинжилгээ шинжилгээний тулд туслах боломжтой болно. Энэ судалгаа нийгмийн хэвлэлийн мэдээллийг ашиглан хамгийн их хэмжээтэй, өгөгдлийн хөдөлгөөнтэй эмперикийн шинжилгээг хийдэг. Бид мэдэгдсэн демографикийн хэрэглэгчдийн tweets ашиглан нийгмийн, соёлын, прагматикийн талаар шинжилгээ хийдэг. Дараа нь, бид эмзэг tweets дээр сэтгэл хөдлөлийг цуглуулж, эмзэг үг, мэдрэмжтэй сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хоорондын харилцаа судалж, эмзэг үг дээр тодорхой загварчлах нь мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээний үйл ажиллагааг нэмэгдүүлж ча', 'ml': 'വുള്\u200dഗേരിറ്റി ഒരു സാധാരണ ഭാഷ വാക്ക് പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്നു. കുറച്ച് ഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപ അവരുടെ ഉപയോഗം മനസ്സിലാക്കിയാല്\u200d ഭാഷക്കാര്\u200dക്കും സൈക്കോളജിക്കല്\u200d സ്വഭാവ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും സഹായിക്കാന്\u200d സാധ്യഭാഷ പ്രവര ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d സാമൂഹിക മീഡിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ വല നമ്മള്\u200d സാമൂഹിക സംസ്കാര്യത്തിന്റെയും സംസ്കാരത്തിന്റെയും പ്രാഗ്രാമിക്കേറ്റിക്കാരുടെയും ഭാഗങ്ങളെയും വിശ് അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d വിചാരപൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിനും മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്ന വികാരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുമിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധം പഠിപ്പിക്കാനും വ്യക്തമായി വാ', 'ro': 'Vulgaritatea este o expresie lingvistică comună și este folosită pentru a îndeplini mai multe funcții lingvistice. Înțelegerea utilizării acestora poate ajuta atât fenomenele lingvistice, cât și psihologice, cât și aplicațiile de procesare a limbajului natural în aval, cum ar fi analiza sentimentului. Acest studiu efectuează o analiză empirică la scară largă, bazată pe date, a cuvintelor vulgare folosind date de social media. Analizăm aspectele socio-culturale și pragmatice ale vulgarității folosind tweet-uri de la utilizatori cu demografie cunoscută. Mai mult, colectăm ratinguri sentimentale pentru tweeturile vulgare pentru a studia relația dintre utilizarea cuvintelor vulgare și sentimentul perceput și pentru a arăta că modelarea explicită a cuvintelor vulgare poate stimula performanța analizei sentimentelor.', 'no': 'Vulgaritet er ein felles lingvisk uttrykk og vert brukt for å utføra fleire lingviske funksjonar. For å forstå bruken av dei kan hjelpa både linguistiske og psihologiske fenomenar, og fordel nedstrekke naturspråksbehandlingsprogrammer som sentimentanalyser. Denne studien utfører ein stor, datadrivt empirisk analyse av vulgar ord med sosiale media data. Vi analyserer sosialkulturelle og pragmatiske aspektane av vulgaritet med tweets frå brukarar med kjente demografikk. I tillegg samler vi sentimentertinger for vulgar tweet for å studera forholdet mellom bruken av vulgar ord og oppfatte sentiment og vise at eksplisitt modellering av vulgar ord kan auka sentimentanalisering.', 'sr': 'Vulgaritet je zajednički jezički izraz i koristi se za izvršavanje nekoliko lingvističkih funkcija. Razumevanje njihovog korištenja može pomoći i lingvističkim i psihološkim fenomenima, kao i korištenje prirodnih aplikacija obrade jezika poput analize sentimenta. Ova studija izvršava veliku, empirièku analizu vulgarnih reèi koje vode podatke o društvenim medijima. Analiziramo socio-kulturne i pragmatične aspekte vulgarnosti koristeći tweet od korisnika sa poznatim demografijom. Nadalje, skupljamo ocjene sentimenta za vulgarne tweete da proučimo odnos između korištenja vulgarnih reči i osećanja osjećaja i pokažemo da eksplicitno modeliranja vulgarnih reči mogu povećati učinkovitost analize sentimenta.', 'pl': 'Wulgarność jest powszechnym wyrażeniem językowym i jest używana do pełnienia kilku funkcji językowych. Zrozumienie ich użycia może pomóc zarówno zjawiskom językowym, jak i psychologicznym, a także korzystać z dalszych aplikacji przetwarzania języka naturalnego, takich jak analiza sentymentów. Badanie to przeprowadza na dużą skalę, oparte na danych empiryczną analizę wulgarnych słów z wykorzystaniem danych mediów społecznościowych. Analizujemy społeczno-kulturowe i pragmatyczne aspekty wulgarności za pomocą tweetów od użytkowników o znanej demograficzności. Ponadto zbieramy oceny sentymentów dla wulgarnych tweetów, aby zbadać związek między użyciem wulgarnych słów a postrzeganymi sentymentami i pokazać, że jednoznaczne modelowanie wulgarnych słów może zwiększyć wydajność analizy sentymentów.', 'si': 'වුල්ගාරිත්වය සාමාන්\u200dය භාෂාවික ප්\u200dරකාශයක් වගේම භාෂාවික වැඩක් කරන්න භාවිතා කරනවා. ඔවුන්ගේ භාවිතාව තේරුම් ගන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාවාද්\u200dය සහ මනුස්ත්\u200dරික ප්\u200dරදේශය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජන භාවිත ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරිය මේ පරීක්ෂණය සමාජික මාධ්\u200dයාත්මක දත්ත භාවිත කරන්න ලොකු ප්\u200dරමාණයක්, දත්ත ප්\u200dරමාණයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනයක්  අපි සාමාජික සංස්කෘතිය සහ ප්\u200dරාග්මතික ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් විශ්ලේෂ කරනවා දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝ තවත්, අපි සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා විශ්වාසික වචන වගේ සම්බන්ධයක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරන්න සම්බන්ධයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ඒ වගේම පැහැදිලි විශ්වා', 'sv': 'Vulgaritet är ett vanligt språkligt uttryck och används för att utföra flera språkliga funktioner. Att förstå deras användning kan hjälpa både språkliga och psykologiska fenomen samt gynna nedströms naturliga språkbehandlingsapplikationer såsom sentimentalanalys. Denna studie genomför en storskalig, datadriven empirisk analys av vulgära ord med hjälp av data från sociala medier. Vi analyserar de sociokulturella och pragmatiska aspekterna av vulgaritet med hjälp av tweets från användare med känd demografi. Vidare samlar vi in sentimentbetyg för vulgära tweets för att studera förhållandet mellan användning av vulgära ord och upplevda känslor och visa att explicit modellering av vulgära ord kan öka sentimentanalysprestanda.', 'so': 'Vulgarity waa muuqasho luuqadeed oo caadi ah, waxaa loo isticmaalaa in uu sameeyo shaqooyin luuqadeed oo kala duduwan. Marka la garto isticmaalkoodu waxay caawimaad ka heli karaan arimaha luuqada iyo cilmi-ka iyo faa’iidada baaraandegista afka dabiicadda ah, tusaale ahaan baaritaanka fikradda. This study performs a large-scale, data-driven empirical analysis of vulgar words using social media data.  Waxaynu kala fakaraynaa dhinacyada bulshada iyo dhaqamada iyo caqliga caqliga ah, waxaynu isticmaalaynaa tweetiyada isticmaalayaasha dadka la yaqaan. Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu soo ururinnaa qiimeynta tweetka si aan u barano xiriirka isticmaalka hadalka shakhsiga ah iyo fikrada la garto, waxaana tusinayaa in tusaale ahaan hadalka bulshada ah uu kordhin karo sameynta sameynta fikradda.', 'ta': 'Vulgarity is a common language expression and is used to perform several languages functions. அவர்களுடைய பயன்பாடுகளை புரிந்து கொள்வது புரிந்து கொள்ள முடியும் மொழியியல் மற்றும் மனநிலையான பொருள்களுக்கும் உதவி செய்யலா இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி பெரிய அளவில், தரவு இயக்கப்பட்ட முக்கியமான வார்த்தைகளைப் பயன்படுத்தும் சமூக ஊடக தரவுகளைப் பயன்படுத் நாங்கள் தெரியும் மக்களுடன் தெரியப்பட்டுள்ள பயனர்களிடம் இருந்து tweets பயன்படுத்தி சமூக- கலாச்சாரத்தில் மற்றும் பிரச்சனைய மேலும், நாம் உணர்வு விகிதத்தை சேகரிக்கிறோம் வார்த்தைகளை பயன்படுத்தும் உணர்ந்த உணர்வுகளுக்கும் இடையே தொடர்பை படிக்க மற்றும் வெளிப்படையாக மாற்று', 'ur': 'Vulgarity is a common language expression and is used to perform several linguistic functions. ان کے استعمال کو سمجھ سکتے ہیں زبان شناسی اور روانشنی اتفاق کی مدد کرسکتے ہیں اور نیچے طبیعی زبان پردازش کی کاربرد کی مثال احساسات تحلیل کے مطابق فائدہ دیتے ہیں۔ یہ مطالعہ سوسیل میڈیا ڈیٹا کے مطالعہ سے ایک بڑی اسکیل، ڈیٹا چلنے والی مطالعہ کی تحلیل کرتا ہے. ہم جانے والی جمعیت کے کارساز سے ٹیوٹ کے استعمال کر رہے ہیں۔ اور اس کے بعد، ہم آہستہ ٹویٹوں کے لئے احساس راتینگ جمع کرتے ہیں کہ آہستہ کلمات کے استعمال اور احساس کے درمیان رابطہ کا تحقیق کریں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ آہستہ کلمات کے مطابق آہستہ مدل کرنے کے لئے احساس تحلیل کے کام میں زیادہ اضافہ کرسکتے ہیں', 'uz': "Vulgarity bir umumiy tillik ifodasi va bir necha tillar funksiyalarini bajarish uchun ishlatiladi. Understanding their usage can aid both linguistic and psychological phenomena as well as benefit downstream natural language processing applications such as sentiment analysis.  Bu o'qituvni social media maʼlumotdan foydalanish uchun juda katta taʼminlov qiladi. Biz taʼminlovchi demografik bilan foydalanuvchidan foydalanuvchilardan foydalanuvchilardan foydalanuvchi jamiyat- cultural va pragmatik qismlarini analyzeriz. Ko'rsatganda, biz vulgan Twitterdan foydalanuvchi soʻzlarni o'rganish uchun o'zgarishni o'rganish uchun hissiyotlarni o'rganish uchun hissiyotni o'rganamiz va o'ylab keladigan g'oyalarni ko'rsamiz va xuddi shaklga so'zlarni tasdiqlash natijasini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Sự thô lỗ là một ngôn ngữ phổ biến và được dùng để thực hiện nhiều chức năng ngôn ngữ. Sự hiểu biết về sử dụng của họ có thể giúp cả các hiện tượng ngôn ngữ lẫn tâm lý lẫn lợi ích cho các ứng dụng xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên sau, như là phân tích tình cảm. Nghiên cứu này thực hiện một nghiên cứu kinh nghiệm đầy đủ, dựa trên dữ liệu của các từ thông tục sử dụng dữ liệu mạng xã hội. Chúng tôi phân tích những khía cạnh tiêu hóa xã hội và thực dụng của thô tục bằng Twitter được dùng từ những người dùng có thiết lập dân chủ. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi thu thập tỉ lệ cảm xúc của các tweet tầm thường để nghiên cứu mối quan hệ giữa việc dùng những từ thông thường và cảm xúc được cảm nhận và cho thấy rằng những từ thông thường có thể làm tăng khả năng phân tích cảm xúc.', 'nl': 'Vulgariteit is een veelvoorkomende taaluitdrukking en wordt gebruikt om verschillende taalfuncties uit te voeren. Het begrijpen van hun gebruik kan zowel linguïstische als psychologische fenomenen helpen, evenals downstream natuurlijke taalverwerkingstoepassingen, zoals sentimentanalyse. Dit onderzoek voert een grootschalige, data-gedreven empirische analyse uit van vulgaire woorden met behulp van social media data. We analyseren de sociaal-culturele en pragmatische aspecten van vulgariteit aan de hand van tweets van gebruikers met bekende demografie. Verder verzamelen we sentimentbeoordelingen voor vulgaire tweets om de relatie tussen het gebruik van vulgaire woorden en waargenomen sentiment te bestuderen en aan te tonen dat expliciet modelleren van vulgaire woorden de prestaties van sentimentanalyse kan verbeteren.', 'da': 'Vulgaritet er et almindeligt sprogligt udtryk og bruges til at udføre flere sproglige funktioner. Forståelse af deres brug kan hjælpe både sproglige og psykologiske fænomener samt gavne downstream natursprogbehandling applikationer såsom sentimental analyse. Denne undersøgelse udfører en omfattende, datadrevet empirisk analyse af vulgære ord ved hjælp af data fra sociale medier. Vi analyserer de sociokulturelle og pragmatiske aspekter af vulgaritet ved hjælp af tweets fra brugere med kendt demografi. Desuden indsamler vi sentiment ratings for vulgære tweets for at studere forholdet mellem brugen af vulgære ord og opfattet sentiment og vise, at eksplicit modellering af vulgære ord kan øge sentiment analyse ydeevne.', 'hr': 'Vulgaritet je zajednički jezički izraz i koristi se za izvršavanje nekoliko jezičkih funkcija. Razumijevanje njihovog korištenja može pomoći i jezičkim i psihološkim fenomenima, kao i korištenje prirodnih primjena obrade jezika poput analize osjećaja. U ovom ispitivanju izvršava veliku, empiričku analizu vulgarnih riječi s podacima društvenih medija. Analiziramo socio-kulturne i pragmatične aspekte vulgarnosti koristeći tweet od korisnika s poznatim demografijom. Nadalje, skupljamo ocjene osjećaja za vulgarne tweets kako bi proučavali odnos između uporabe vulgarnih riječi i osjećaja osjećaja i pokazali da jasno modeliranje vulgarnih riječi može povećati učinkovitost analize osjećaja.', 'bg': 'Вулгарността е общ езиков израз и се използва за изпълнение на няколко езикови функции. Разбирането на използването им може да помогне както на езиковите, така и на психологическите явления, така и на приложенията за обработка на естествения език надолу по веригата, като например анализ на чувствата. Това изследване извършва мащабен, базиран на данни емпиричен анализ на вулгарни думи, използвайки данни от социалните медии. Анализираме социално-културните и прагматичните аспекти на вулгарността чрез туитове от потребители с известни демографски данни. Освен това събираме оценки на сантименталността за вулгарни туитове, за да проучим връзката между използването на вулгарни думи и възприети сантименталности и да покажем, че изричното моделиране на вулгарни думи може да подобри ефективността на анализа на сантименталността.', 'id': 'Vulgaritas adalah ekspresi bahasa umum dan digunakan untuk melakukan beberapa fungsi bahasa. Mengerti penggunaan mereka dapat membantu fenomena bahasa dan psikologi serta manfaat dari aplikasi proses bahasa alami turun seperti analisis sentimen. Studi ini melaksanakan analisis empirik dari skala besar dari data dari kata-kata vulgar menggunakan data media sosial. Kami menganalisis aspek sosio-budaya dan pragmatis vulgaritas menggunakan tweet dari pengguna dengan demografi yang dikenal. Lagipula, kami mengumpulkan nilai sentimen untuk tweet vulgar untuk mempelajari hubungan antara penggunaan kata vulgar dan sentimen yang didapati dan menunjukkan bahwa secara eksplicit model kata vulgar dapat meningkatkan prestasi analisis sentimen.', 'fa': 'Vulgarity is a common language expression and is used to perform several linguistic functions. درک استفاده از زبان\u200cشناسی و روانشناسی آنها می\u200cتواند به عنوان پدیده\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی و روانشناسی کمک کند، و به عنوان کاربردهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی پایین\u200cترین سود می\u200cدهد، مانند تح این مطالعه با استفاده از داده\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی یک تحلیل عمومی با مقیاس بزرگ و داده\u200cها با استفاده از کلمات زخمی انجام می\u200cدهد. ما با استفاده از تويت\u200cها از کاربران با دموگرافيک شناخته شده\u200cايم، نقطه\u200cهاي اجتماعي و فرهنگي و پراگرافيک آسيب\u200cگيري را تحليل مي\u200cکنيم. بعلاوه، ما نسخه\u200cهای احساسات برای توئیت های آسیب جمع می\u200cکنیم تا رابطه بین استفاده از کلمات آسیب و احساسات مشاهده می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که مدل\u200cهای آسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسیب\u200cآسی', 'de': 'Vulgarität ist ein allgemeiner sprachlicher Ausdruck und wird verwendet, um mehrere linguistische Funktionen auszuführen. Das Verständnis ihrer Verwendung kann sowohl linguistische als auch psychologische Phänomene unterstützen, als auch nachgelagerte Anwendungen zur Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache, wie z.B. Stimmungsanalyse, unterstützen. Diese Studie führt eine umfangreiche, datengetriebene empirische Analyse vulgärer Wörter mithilfe von Social Media Daten durch. Wir analysieren die soziokulturellen und pragmatischen Aspekte von Vulgarität anhand von Tweets von Nutzern mit bekannter Demografie. Darüber hinaus sammeln wir Stimmungsbewertungen für vulgäre Tweets, um den Zusammenhang zwischen der Verwendung vulgärer Wörter und wahrgenommener Stimmung zu untersuchen und zu zeigen, dass explizite Modellierung vulgärer Wörter die Leistung der Stimmungsanalyse steigern kann.', 'ko': '저속함은 흔히 볼 수 있는 언어 표현 방식으로 여러 가지 언어 기능을 이행하는 데 쓰인다.그들의 용법을 이해하는 것은 언어와 심리 현상에 도움이 될 뿐만 아니라 후속적인 자연 언어 처리 응용, 예를 들어 정서 분석에도 도움이 된다.본 연구는 소셜 미디어 데이터를 이용하여 저속한 어휘에 대해 대규모, 데이터 구동의 실증 분석을 실시했다.우리는 이미 알고 있는 인구 통계 데이터의 사용자의 추문을 이용하여 저속한 사회 문화와 언어 사용 방면을 분석한다.그 밖에 우리는 저속한 추문의 정서 평점을 수집하여 저속한 단어의 사용과 감지 정서 간의 관계를 연구하고 현식 모델링 저속한 단어가 정서 분석 성능을 향상시킬 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'sq': 'Vulgariteti është një shprehje e përbashkët gjuhësore dhe përdoret për të kryer disa funksione gjuhësore. Duke kuptuar përdorimin e tyre mund të ndihmojë si fenomenet gjuhësore ashtu edhe psikologjike si dhe të përfitojnë nga aplikimet e përpunimit natyror të gjuhës, të tilla si analiza e ndjenjave. Ky studim kryen një analizë të madhe empirike të fjalëve vulgare duke përdorur të dhënat e medias sociale. Ne analizojmë aspektet sociokulturore dhe pragmatike të vulgaritetit duke përdorur tweetet nga përdoruesit me demografi të njohur. Further, we collect sentiment ratings for vulgar tweets to study the relationship between the use of vulgar words and perceived sentiment and show that explicitly modeling vulgar words can boost sentiment analysis performance.', 'af': "Vulgariteit is 'n gemeenskap lingvisse uitdrukking en word gebruik om verskeie lingvisse funksies te uitvoer. Om hulle gebruik te verstaan kan die lingwisiese en psykologiese fenomene en die voordeel van onderstreem natuurlike taal verwerking toepassings soos sentimentanalisie help. Hierdie studie uitvoer 'n groot-skaal, data-gedrywe empiriese analiseer van vulgare woorde met die gebruik van sosiale media data. Ons analyseer die sosiale-kulturele en pragmatiese aspekte van vulgariteit met tweets van gebruikers met bekende demografie. Verder, ons versamel sentimente-reitings vir vulgare tweets om die verwanting tussen die gebruik van vulgare woorde en aangeneem sentiment te leer en wys dat eksplisiese modeling van vulgare woorde kan verhoog sentimente-analisie-effektuur.", 'tr': 'Vulgarlyk bir orta lingwistiki ifade we birnäçe lingwistiki fonksiyonlary etmäge ullanýar. Ullanmaklaryny düşünmek hem lingwistiki hem psikolojik fenomenlere, hem tebigy dil işlemegi hem duýgym analyzasy ýaly kömek edip biler. Bu araşdyrma sosial mediýa maglumatlaryny ulanan uly düýpden, data-tarapyndan eýpirik sözlerin analýusiny edýär. Biz sazly-kültürel we pragmatik aspektlerini bilinen demografik bilen ulananlaryň tweets ullanýarys. Daha soňra, vulgar tweetler üçin duýgym derejesini jemgylaýarys, lezzetli sözler we duýgular arasyndaky baglaýyşyny öwrenmek üçin we duýgular sözlerini açyk görkezmek üçin duýgular analyzasyny gowurap biler.', 'am': 'Vulgarity የቋንቋ ቋንቋ አካባቢ ነው እና ብዙ ቋንቋዎች ተግባር ይደረጋል፡፡ የቋንቋዊ እና የሲኮሎጂ አካባቢ እና የአፍሪካዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል ፕሮግራሙን እንደምትመስል አስተያየት የሚችል ነው፡፡ ይህም ትምህርት በማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የሽልማግሌ ቃላትን የሚያሳውቅ ትልቅ ትልቅ፣ የዳታ የሚነዳውን የውጤት ማተሚያ ያደርጋል፡፡ የባሕላዊ እና የባሕላዊ እና የግንኙነት ጉዳዮች ከታወቀ ዲሞግራፊ ጋር በትዊተር ተጠቃሚዎች እናስተምር፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የስሜት እውቀት እና የሽልማት ቃላት እና የተመለከቱትን ግንኙነት ለመማየት እናሳያቸዋለን እናም የሽንክሮት ቃላትን ግልፅ ማሳየት የሚችሉትን የአስማተኝነቱን ትምህርት ማሳየት ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Վուլգարիզմը տարածված լեզվաբանական արտահայտություն է և օգտագործվում է լեզվաբանական գործառույթների կատարման համար: Նրանց օգտագործման հասկանալը կարող է օգնել լեզվաբանական և հոգեբանական երևույթներին, ինչպես նաև օգնել ներքևի բնական լեզվի վերլուծության ծրագրերին, ինչպիսիք են զգացմունքների վերլուծությունը: Այս ուսումնասիրությունը կատարում է վուլգար բառերի մեծ մասշտաբով, տվյալների հիմնված էմպրիկական վերլուծություն, օգտագործելով սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների տվյալները: Մենք վերլուծում ենք խուլգարության սոցիալ-մշակույթային և պրագմատիկ ասպեկտները օգտագործելով հայտնի դեմոգրաֆիկ օգտագործողների թվիթերը: Further, we collect sentiment ratings for vulgar tweets to study the relationship between the use of vulgar words and perceived sentiment and show that explicitly modeling vulgar words can boost sentiment analysis performance.', 'az': 'Vulgariyyət ortaq dil ifadəsidir və bir çox dil fonksiyonlarını gerçəkləşdirmək üçün istifadə edilir. Onların istifadəsini anlamaq dil və psikolojik fenomenlərə və sentiment analizi kimi təbiətli dil işləmə uygulamalarına fayda verə bilər. Bu təhsil sosyal media məlumatlarını istifadə edərək çox böyük ölçüdə, verilən empirik sözlərin empirik analizi işlədir. Biz məlumatlı demografik istifadəçilərindən tweets vasitəsilə cəmiyyət-kültür və pragmatik aspektlərini analiz edirik. Daha sonra, vulgar tweetlər üçün hiss reitinglərini toplayırıq ki, vulgar sözlərin və hisslərin istifadəsi arasındakı ilişkisini təhsil etmək üçün və açıq-aydın modelləşdirmək vulgar sözlərin hisslərin analizi performansını artırabilir.', 'bs': 'Vulgaritet je zajednički jezički izraz i koristi se za izvršavanje nekoliko jezičkih funkcija. Razumijevanje njihovog korištenja može pomoći i jezičkim i psihološkim fenomenima, kao i korištenje prirodnih aplikacija obrade jezika poput analize osjećaja. Ova istraživanja izvodi veliku, empiričku analizu vulgarnih riječi s podacima društvenih medija. Analiziramo socio-kulturne i pragmatične aspekte vulgarnosti koristeći tweet od korisnika sa poznatim demografijom. Nadalje, skupljamo ocjene osjećanja za vulgarne tweete kako bi proučili odnos između upotrebe vulgarnih riječi i osjećanja i pokazali da eksplicitno modeliranja vulgarnih riječi mogu povećati učinkovitost analize osjećaja.', 'bn': 'ভুলগেরিতি একটি সাধারণ ভাষার ভাষার প্রকাশ এবং বেশ কয়েকটি ভাষার ভাষার কাজ করার জন্য ব্যবহার করা হয়। তাদের ব্যবহার বুঝতে পারে তারা ভাষাগত এবং মানসিক বিষয়বস্তুকে সাহায্য করতে পারে এবং প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার অ্যাপ্লিকেশন এই গবেষণাটি সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যমের তথ্য ব্যবহার করে ভুলগের শব্দের ব্যাপারে বিশাল পরিমাণ, তথ্য চালানো হয়েছ We analyze the socio-cultural and pragmatic aspects of vulgarity using tweets from users with known demographics.  এছাড়াও আমরা ভুলগের টুইটের জন্য অনুভূতির রেজ সংগ্রহ করি ভুলগের শব্দ ব্যবহার এবং বুঝতে পারে অনুভূতির সম্পর্ক গবেষণা করতে এবং দেখাতে পারি যে ভুলগের শব্দের পরিস্ক', 'sw': 'Vulgarity ni hisia za lugha za kawaida na inatumiwa kutekeleza kazi kadhaa za lugha. Kuelewa matumizi yao yanaweza kusaidia hali ya lugha na kisaikolojia pamoja na faida ya matumizi ya utaratibu wa lugha za asili kama vile uchambuzi wa hisia. Utafiti huu unafanya uchambuzi mkubwa, unaoendeshwa na taarifa kwa kutumia taarifa za kijamii. Tunafahamu masuala ya kijamii na utamaduni na mazingira ya hali ya hatari kwa kutumia twiti kutoka kwa watumiaji wenye idadi inayofahamika. Zaidi ya hayo, tunakusanya kiwango cha hisia kwa twiti za vulga ili kusoma uhusiano kati ya matumizi ya maneno ya vulga na hisia zinazoelewa na kuonyesha kuwa maneno ya kijinga yanaweza kuongeza utendaji wa uchambuzi wa hisia.', 'cs': 'Vulgárita je běžným jazykovým výrazem a slouží k plnění několika jazykových funkcí. Pochopení jejich použití může pomoci jak jazykovým, tak psychologickým jevům, tak i následným aplikacím pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka, jako je analýza sentimentů. Tato studie provádí rozsáhlou, datově řízenou empirickou analýzu vulgárních slov pomocí dat sociálních médií. Analyzujeme sociálně-kulturní a pragmatické aspekty vulgarity pomocí tweetů uživatelů se známou demografií. Dále shromažďujeme hodnocení sentimentu pro vulgární tweety, abychom studovali vztah mezi použitím vulgárních slov a vnímaným sentimentem a ukázali, že explicitní modelování vulgárních slov může zvýšit výkon analýzy sentimentu.', 'fi': 'Vulgariteetti on yleinen kielellinen ilmaisu ja sitä käytetään useiden kielellisten toimintojen suorittamiseen. Niiden käytön ymmärtäminen voi auttaa sekä kielellisiä että psykologisia ilmiöitä että hyödyttää luonnollisten kielten käsittelysovelluksia, kuten tunteiden analysointia. Tässä tutkimuksessa tehdään laajamittainen, datavetoinen empiirinen analyysi vulgaareista sanoista sosiaalisen median datan avulla. Analysoimme vulgaarisuuden sosiokulttuurisia ja pragmaattisia näkökohtia käyttämällä tweettejä käyttäjiltä, joilla on tunnettua väestörakennetta. Lisäksi keräämme tunteenluokituksia vulgaareille tweeteille tutkiaksemme vulgaarien sanojen käytön ja tunnetun tunteen välistä suhdetta ja osoittaaksemme, että vulgaarien sanojen explicita mallintaminen voi parantaa tunteiden analysointia.', 'ca': "La vulgaritat és una expressió lingüística comú i s'utilitza per desempenyar diverses funcions lingüístices. Entendre el seu ús pot ajudar tant fenomens lingüístics com psicològics, i beneficiar aplicacions de processament de llenguatges naturals a avall, com l'anàlisi del sentiment. Aquest estudi fa una anàlisi empírica a gran escala basada en dades de paraules vulgares utilitzant dades dels mitjans socials. Analitzem els aspectes socioculturals i pragmàtics de la vulgaritat fent servir tweets d'usuaris amb demografia coneguda. També recollim valoracions de sentiments per tweets vulgars per estudiar la relació entre l'ús de paraules vulgars i el sentiment perceptiu i demostrar que modelar expressament paraules vulgars pot impulsar el rendiment de l'anàlisi de sentiments.", 'et': 'Vulgaarsus on levinud keeleline väljend ja seda kasutatakse mitmete keeleliste funktsioonide täitmiseks. Nende kasutamise mõistmine võib aidata kaasa nii keelelistele kui psühholoogilistele nähtustele, samuti kasutada loodusliku keele töötlemise rakendusi, nagu sentimentaalüüs. Käesolev uuring teostab ulatusliku andmepõhise vulgaarsete sõnade empiirilise analüüsi sotsiaalmeedia andmete abil. Analüüsime vulgaalsuse sotsiaal-kultuurilisi ja pragmaatilisi aspekte tuttavate demograafiliste kasutajate säutsude abil. Lisaks kogume vulgaarsete säutsude sentimentaalseid hinnanguid, et uurida seost vulgaarsete sõnade kasutamise ja tajutava sentimentaalsuse vahel ning näidata, et vulgaarsete sõnade selgesõnaline modelleerimine võib parandada sentimentaalüüsi tulemuslikkust.', 'sk': 'Vulgarnost je skupni jezikovni izraz in se uporablja za opravljanje več jezikovnih funkcij. Razumevanje njihove uporabe lahko pomaga tako jezikovnim kot psihološkim pojavom ter koristi nadaljnjim aplikacijam za obdelavo naravnega jezika, kot je analiza čustva. Ta študija izvaja obsežno, podatkovno usmerjeno empirično analizo vulgarnih besed z uporabo podatkov družbenih medijev. Analiziramo socialno-kulturne in pragmatične vidike vulgarnosti z uporabo tweetov uporabnikov z znano demografijo. Poleg tega zbiramo ocene občutkov za vulgarne tweete, da bi preučili razmerje med uporabo vulgarnih besed in zaznanimi občutki ter pokazali, da lahko eksplicitno modeliranje vulgarnih besed poveča učinkovitost analize občutkov.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Ana fahimta amfani da su yana iya taimakon su ga abubuwa na lugha da kisaikolki da kuma yana da amfani da shiryoyin ayuka masu zartar da lugha na natura kamar anadi na hisia. Wannan littãfi yana tafiyar da rabon jama'a mai girma da aka yi wa data-run Ana yi amfani da data na mitandai da jamii. We analyze the socio-cultural and pragmatic aspects of vulgarity using tweets from users with known demographics.  Furan, Munã samun rabo na sauri na Twitter masu bashi dõmin mu karanta mazaunin tsakanin da za'a yi amfani da maganar sarki da za'a gane na hisia, kuma munã nuna cewa, misalin sarki mai bayani, za'a iya ƙara muhimmin fasarin hisia.", 'jv': 'Bilih Awakdhéwé nggawe aturan luwih dumadhi kaya nggawe barang langkung karo petani sing luwih dumadhi, ngono nggawe aplikasi kanggo nggawe barang kelangan langgar-sistem sing koyo ngono ngénalasi winih. Wuraning iki wis ngawe akeh basa gambar, data-ngene empirhik kanggo ngilangno langgar ujaran gambar data de media sotiki. Awak dhéwé énglek éntuk karo soko-sukelan lan pragmulasat sak nguasai gambarang tuytir tentang karo akeh daemongké diangkat dhéwé. Lah, awak dhéwé ngregani aturan kelangan langgar kanggo tuytir dhéwé kuwi kesempatan kanggo ngerasah perusahaan kelangan langgar nggambar obah-obahan lan kelangan langgar kuwi kesempatan lan wong-wong kuwi dianggo langgar kuwi tindakan dhéwé kesempatan langgar kuwi tindakan dhéwé kuwi', 'he': 'Vulgarity הוא ביטוי שפתי משותף ומשתמש כדי לבצע כמה תפקידים שפתיים. Understanding their usage can aid both linguistic and psychological phenomena as well as benefit downstream natural language processing applications such as sentiment analysis.  This study performs a large-scale, data-driven empirical analysis of vulgar words using social media data.  אנו מנתחים את היבטים הסוציו-תרבותיים והפרגמטיים של הוולגריות באמצעות טוויטים משתמשים עם דמוגרפיה ידועה. Further, we collect sentiment ratings for vulgar tweets to study the relationship between the use of vulgar words and perceived sentiment and show that explicitly modeling vulgar words can boost sentiment analysis performance.', 'bo': 'Vulgarity་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་གསལ་བརྗོད་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྣ་མང་ཙམ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་ཡོད། དེ་ཚོའི་སྤྱོད་བརྗོད་ཀྱིས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་ཕྱི་རིགས་ལུགས་སྣང་ཚུལ་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་ལ་ཕན་ཐོགས་ལས་ཕན་ཐོགས་འབད ལས་གནས་ཚུལ་འདིས་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་བྱེད་པའི་གྲངས་སུ་བཏོན་འགྱུར ང་ཚོས་མི་ཤེས་པའི་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་གླེང་མོལ་ཁང་གི་ཞལ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ཚོར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། འུ་ཚོས་མཁའ་གྱི་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཚོར་བ་སྐྱེན་པའི་བརྗོད་རིས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་བ་གཅིག་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་དང་ཤེས་པའི་སེམས་ཚོར་བ'}
{'en': 'Clausal Modifiers in the Grammar Matrix', 'ar': 'معدّلات كلوسل في المصفوفة النحوية', 'pt': 'Modificadores Clausais na Matriz Gramática', 'es': 'Modificadores de clausura en la matriz gramatical', 'fr': 'Modificateurs de clause dans la matrice grammaticale', 'ja': '文法マトリックスのClausal修飾子', 'hi': 'व्याकरण मैट्रिक्स में क्लॉसल संशोधक', 'zh': '语法矩阵中幽闭修符', 'ru': 'Клаусовые модификаторы в матрице грамматики', 'ga': 'Mionathraitheoirí Clásail sa Mhaitrís Gramadaí', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Záradékmódosítók a nyelvtani mátrixban', 'el': 'Οριστικοί Τροποποιητές στον πίνακα γραμματικής', 'it': 'Modifiche Clausole nella matrice grammaticale', 'kk': 'Name', 'lt': 'Klausimų modifikatoriai gramatikoje', 'mk': 'Name', 'ms': 'Pengubahsuai Clausul dalam Matriks Grammar', 'ml': 'ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്സിലെ ക്ലാസല്\u200d മാറ്ററുകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Матрик дахь шалгалтын өөрчлөлтүүд', 'mt': 'Modifikaturi tal-Klawżola fil-Matrix Grammar', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Modyfikatory klauzul w macierzy gramatycznej', 'ro': 'Modificatori clauzali în matricea gramaticală', 'sr': 'Modifikatori klase u matrici', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Isbedelka fasalada ee dhamaadka', 'sv': 'Klausulförändringar i grammatikamatrisen', 'ta': 'வகுப்பு மாற்றங்கள்', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Клаусни модификатори в граматическата матрица', 'hr': 'Modifikatori klase u matrici', 'da': 'Klausulændringsværktøjer i grammatikmatrisen', 'nl': 'Wijzigers in de grammatica', 'de': 'Klauselmodifikatoren in der Grammatikmatrix', 'ko': '문법 행렬 중의 작은 문장 수식어', 'id': 'Pengubah Clausul dalam Matriks Grammar', 'fa': 'Comment', 'tr': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Clausal Modifiers in the Grammar Matrix', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Modifikuesit e Klauzës në Matriksën Gramatike', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Grammar Matrix √ľnd…ô Klasifik DeńüiŇüiklikl…ôri', 'am': 'dialogs-action', 'bn': 'গ্রামার ম্যাট্রিক্সে ক্লাসাল পরিবর্তন', 'bs': 'Modifikatori klase u matrici Grammar', 'ca': 'Modificadors de la cláusula de la matriu gramàtica', 'cs': 'Klauzulární modifikátory v matici gramatiky', 'et': 'Klauslilised muudatused grammatika maatriksis', 'fi': 'Klausiset muokkaukset kielioppimatriisissa', 'jv': 'Name', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Klavzualni spreminjevalci v slovnici matrike', 'he': 'משתנים קלאוזליים במטריקס הגרמה', 'bo': 'འགྲོ་རིས་གྱི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་ནང་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བཅོས་ཆས'}
{'en': 'We extend the coverage of an existing grammar customization system to clausal modifiers, also referred to as adverbial clauses. We present an analysis, taking a typologically-driven approach to account for this phenomenon across the world’s languages, which we implement in the Grammar Matrix customization system (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Testing our analysis on testsuites from five genetically and geographically diverse languages that were not considered in development, we achieve 88.4 % coverage and 1.5 % overgeneration.', 'ar': 'نقوم بتوسيع نطاق تغطية نظام التخصيص النحوي الحالي ليشمل المعدلات الجملية ، والتي يشار إليها أيضًا باسم الجمل الظرفية. نقدم تحليلاً ، مع الأخذ في الاعتبار نهجًا مدفوعًا بالنمطية لمراعاة هذه الظاهرة عبر لغات العالم ، والتي ننفذها في نظام تخصيص Grammar Matrix (Bender et al. ، 2002 ، 2010). باختبار تحليلنا على مجموعات من خمس لغات متنوعة وراثيًا وجغرافيًا لم يتم اعتبارها قيد التطوير ، نحقق تغطية بنسبة 88.4٪ وتوليد بنسبة 1.5٪.', 'fr': "Nous étendons la couverture d'un système de personnalisation grammaticale existant aux modificateurs de clauses, également appelés clauses adverbiales. Nous présentons une analyse, utilisant une approche typologique pour tenir compte de ce phénomène dans toutes les langues du monde, que nous mettons en œuvre dans le système de personnalisation de Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). En testant notre analyse sur des suites de tests provenant de cinq langues génétiquement et géographiquement différentes qui n'ont pas été prises en compte dans le développement, nous atteignons une couverture de 88,4\xa0% et une surgénération de 1,5\xa0%", 'es': 'Ampliamos la cobertura de un sistema de personalización gramatical existente a los modificadores de clausura, también denominados cláusulas adverbiales. Presentamos un análisis, que adopta un enfoque basado en la tipología para tener en cuenta este fenómeno en los idiomas del mundo, que implementamos en el sistema de personalización de Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Al probar nuestros análisis en conjuntos de pruebas de cinco idiomas genética y geográficamente diversos que no se consideraron en el desarrollo, logramos una cobertura del 88,4% y una sobregeneración del 1,5%.', 'pt': 'Estendemos a cobertura de um sistema de customização gramatical existente para modificadores oracionais, também chamados de cláusulas adverbiais. Apresentamos uma análise, adotando uma abordagem tipologicamente orientada para dar conta desse fenômeno em todas as línguas do mundo, que implementamos no sistema de customização Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Testando nossa análise em conjuntos de testes de cinco idiomas geneticamente e geograficamente diversos que não foram considerados em desenvolvimento, alcançamos 88,4% de cobertura e 1,5% de supergeração.', 'ja': '既存の文法カスタマイズシステムの範囲を、副詞句とも呼ばれる句修飾子に拡張します。私たちは、文法マトリックスカスタマイズシステムで実装する、世界の言語全体でこの現象を説明するための類型主導のアプローチを取り入れた分析を提示します（ Bender et al., 2002, 2010 ）。開発で考慮されなかった5つの遺伝的および地理的に多様な言語からのテストスイートの分析をテストすると、88.4 ％のカバレッジと1.5 ％のオーバージェネレーションを達成しました。', 'zh': '吾将见语法自定义系统之覆盖范围扩及 clausal 修饰符,亦谓之副词从句。 以类型学驱解世界诸语言,于Grammar Matrix定制系统中得之(Bender等,20022010)。 试我五传异言之试,言发中未虑,吾得88.4%覆盖率1.5%之超代化。', 'hi': 'हम एक मौजूदा व्याकरण अनुकूलन प्रणाली के कवरेज को क्लॉसल संशोधक तक बढ़ाते हैं, जिसे क्रियाविशेषण खंड के रूप में भी जाना जाता है। हम एक विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं, दुनिया की भाषाओं में इस घटना के लिए खाते में एक टाइपोलॉजिकल रूप से संचालित दृष्टिकोण लेते हैं, जिसे हम व्याकरण मैट्रिक्स अनुकूलन प्रणाली (बेंडर एट अल। पांच आनुवंशिक और भौगोलिक रूप से विविध भाषाओं से टेस्टसूट पर हमारे विश्लेषण का परीक्षण करना, जिन्हें विकास में नहीं माना जाता था, हम 88.4% कवरेज और 1.5% ओवरजेनरेशन प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Мы расширяем охват существующей системы настройки грамматики на клаузульные модификаторы, также называемые наречиями. Мы представляем анализ, используя типологически управляемый подход к учету этого явления на всех языках мира, который мы реализуем в системе кастомизации Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Тестируя наш анализ на тестовых комплексах из пяти генетически и географически разнообразных языков, которые не рассматривались в разработке, мы достигаем 88,4% охвата и 1,5% перегенерации.', 'ga': 'Leathnaímid an clúdach ar chóras saincheaptha gramadaí atá ann cheana féin chuig mionathruithe clásail, ar a dtugtar clásail briathartha freisin. Cuirimid i láthair anailís, ag glacadh le cur chuige tíopeolaíochta chun an feiniméan seo ar fud theangacha an domhain a chur san áireamh, a chuirimid i bhfeidhm i gcóras saincheaptha Maitrís Ghramadaí (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Agus ár n-anailís á thástáil againn ar shuímh tástála ó chúig theanga atá éagsúil ó thaobh géiniteacha agus tíreolaíocha nár breithníodh le linn na forbartha, bainimid amach clúdach 88.4% agus róghiniúint 1.5%.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მიმდინარე გრამეტრის კონფიგურაციის სისტემის შესახებ კონფიგურაციის შესახებ კონფიგურაციის შესახებ, ასევე როგორც adverbial clauses. ჩვენ ანალიზია, რომელიც ტიპოლოგიურად გავაკეთებთ ამ ფენომენს მსოფლიოს ენაში, რომელიც ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ Grammar Matrix კონფიგურაციის სისტემაში (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). ჩვენი ანალიზაციის შესახებ ცენტიკური და გეგოგოფიკაურად განსხვავებული ენებიდან, რომლებიც განვითარებაში არ იყო, ჩვენ მივიღეთ 88,4% დასახულება და 1,5% დავითარება.', 'hu': 'Egy meglévő nyelvtani testreszabási rendszer lefedettségét kiterjesztjük a clausal módosítókra, más néven adverbial záradékok. Elemzést mutatunk be, tipológiailag vezérelt megközelítést alkalmazva ennek a jelenségnek a világ minden nyelvén történő figyelembevételére, amelyet a Grammar Matrix testreszabási rendszerben alkalmazunk (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Az elemzésünket öt genetikailag és földrajzilag különböző nyelvből készítettük, amelyeket nem vettek figyelembe a fejlesztés során, 88,4%-os lefedettséget és 1,5%-os túltermelést érünk el.', 'el': 'Επεκτείνουμε την κάλυψη ενός υπάρχοντος συστήματος προσαρμογής γραμματικής σε τροποποιητές ρήτρες, που αναφέρονται επίσης ως παροδικές ρήτρες. Παρουσιάζουμε μια ανάλυση, λαμβάνοντας μια τυπολογικά προσανατολισμένη προσέγγιση για να ληφθεί υπόψη αυτό το φαινόμενο σε όλες τις γλώσσες του κόσμου, την οποία εφαρμόζουμε στο σύστημα προσαρμογής γραμματικής (κ.α., 2002, 2010). Δοκιμάζοντας την ανάλυση μας σε δοκιμαστικές σουίτες από πέντε γενετικά και γεωγραφικά διαφορετικές γλώσσες που δεν εξετάστηκαν στην ανάπτυξη, επιτυγχάνουμε 88,4% κάλυψη και 1,5% υπερπαραγωγή.', 'it': "Estendiamo la copertura di un sistema di personalizzazione grammaticale esistente ai modificatori clausal, chiamati anche clausole avverbial. Presentiamo un'analisi, seguendo un approccio tipologicamente guidato per tenere conto di questo fenomeno in tutte le lingue del mondo, che implementiamo nel sistema di personalizzazione Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Testando la nostra analisi su testsuites di cinque lingue geneticamente e geograficamente diverse che non sono state prese in considerazione nello sviluppo, otteniamo una copertura dell'88,4% e una sovragenerazione dell'1,5%.", 'lt': 'Mes išplečiame esamos gramatikos pritaikymo sistemos taikymo sritį ir įtraukiame klauzolų modifikatorius, taip pat vadinamus neigiamomis sąlygomis. Pateikiame analizę, vadovaudamiesi tipologiškai pagrįstu požiūriu, kad būtų atsižvelgta į šį reiškinį visomis pasaulio kalbomis, kurį įgyvendiname Grammar Matrix pritaikymo sistemoje (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Bandydami analizę, atliktą su penkiomis genetiškai ir geografiškai įvairiomis kalbomis, kurios nebuvo svarstomos vystymosi procese, pasiekėme 88,4 proc. aprėptį ir 1,5 proc. per didelę kartą.', 'kk': 'Біз бар грамматикалық баптау жүйесінің мәліметті басқарушыларға, сондай-ақ "adverbial clauses" деп аталады. Біз анализ береміз, әлемдегі тілдерде бұл панельдерді қарастыру үшін типтологиялық тәртібін қолданып, Grammar Matrix баптау жүйесінде (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Бес генетикалық және географиялық тілдердің анализациясын тексеру үшін жасау үшін жасалмаған, 88,4% жасау және 1,5% жасау үшін жеткіземіз.', 'mk': 'Ние го прошируваме покривањето на постоечкиот систем на прилагодување на граматиката на модификаторите на клаузулите, исто така наречени како непријателски клаузули. Презентираме анализа, применувајќи типологички управуван пристап за да го прифатиме овој феномен низ целиот светски јазик, кој го имплементираме во системот на прилагодување на граматрицата (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Истражувајќи ја нашата анализа на тестовите од пет генетски и географски различни јазици кои не се сметаат за развој, постигнавме 88,4 отсто покривање и 1,5 отсто прегенерација.', 'ms': "Kami memperluas perlindungan sistem penyesuaian grammar yang wujud kepada pengubahsuai klausul, juga disebut sebagai klausul yang tidak suka. We present an analysis, taking a typologically-driven approach to account for this phenomenon across the world's languages, which we implement in the Grammar Matrix customization system (Bender et al., 2002, 2010).  Uji analisis kami pada pakaian ujian dari lima bahasa yang berbeza secara genetik dan geografik yang tidak dianggap dalam pembangunan, kami mencapai 88.4% penutupan dan 1.5% overgeneration.", 'ml': "നിലവിലുള്ള ഗ്രാമാര്\u200d സ്റ്റേഷന്\u200d സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കറപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് വ്യക്തമായ മോഡിഫയര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയാണ്, വ We present an analysis, taking a typologically-driven approach to account for this phenomenon across the world's languages, which we implement in the Grammar Matrix customization system (Bender et al., 2002, 2010).  പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണസ്യൂട്ടുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു. വ", 'mt': "Aħna jestendu l-kopertura ta' sistema eżistenti ta' personalizzazzjoni grammarja għal modifikaturi klawżoli, imsejħa wkoll klawżoli avversi. Aħna nippreżentaw analiżi, billi nieħdu approċċ immexxi fuq it-tipoloġija biex nikkunsidraw dan il-fenomenu fil-lingwi kollha tad-dinja, li nimplimentaw fis-sistema ta’ personalizzazzjoni tal-Matrix Grammar (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Meta nittestjaw l-analiżi tagħna dwar it-test suits minn ħames lingwi ġenetikament u ġeografikament differenti li ma kinux ikkunsidrati fl-iżvilupp, inkisbu kopertura ta' 88.4% u ġenerazzjoni żejda ta' 1.5%.", 'ro': 'Extindem acoperirea unui sistem de personalizare gramaticală existent la modificatorii clauzali, denumiți și clauze adverbiale. Prezentăm o analiză bazată pe o abordare tipologică pentru a lua în considerare acest fenomen în toate limbile lumii, pe care o implementăm în sistemul de personalizare Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Testând analiza noastră pe testsuites din cinci limbi diferite genetic și geografic care nu au fost luate în considerare în dezvoltare, obținem o acoperire de 88,4% și o suprapunere de 1,5%.', 'mn': 'Бид бараг байгаа грамматикийн өөрчлөлтийн системийн мэдээллийг хувьсалын өөрчлөлтүүд рүү нэмэгдүүлнэ. Мөн адал явдал гэдэг. Бид энэ явдалыг дэлхийн хэл дээр тодорхойлж буй шинжилгээ хийдэг. Гэмтэн Матрикс багасгалын системд (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Таван генетик болон географик олон хэл дээр шинжилгээний талаар бидний шинжилгээг судалж, хөгжлийн хувьд бодож үзэгдэхгүй 88.4% хувьд, 1.5% хувьд хүргэдэг.', 'no': 'Vi utvidar omslag av eit eksisterande grammatisk tilpassingssystem til klausmodifikatorar, også kalla som adverbialklausar. Vi presenterer ein analyse, som tar ein typologisk tilnærming til å rekna på denne fenomenen over verdens språk, som vi implementerer i Grammar Matrix-tilpassingssystemet (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). For å testa vårt analyse på testsuite frå fem genetisk og geografisk forskjellige språk som ikkje er anslått i utviklinga, oppnår vi 88,4% dekkefølgje og 1,5% overgenerasjon.', 'pl': 'Rozszerzamy zakres istniejącego systemu dostosowywania gramatyki o modyfikatory klauzulne, zwane również klauzulami przysłówkowymi. Przedstawiamy analizę, wykorzystującą typologiczne podejście do uwzględnienia tego zjawiska we wszystkich językach świata, którą wdrażamy w systemie personalizacji Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Testując naszą analizę na zestawach testowych z pięciu genetycznie i geograficznie zróżnicowanych języków, które nie zostały uwzględnione w rozwoju, osiągamy zasięg 88,4% i 1,5% nadgeneracji.', 'sr': 'Proširimo pokrivanje postojećeg gramatičkog sistema prilagodbe prema modifikatorima klauzula, takođe nazvanom reklamskim klauzulama. Predstavljamo analizu, uzimajući tipološki pristup u obzir na taj fenomen širom svijetskih jezika, koji implementiramo u sistemu prilagodbe Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Provjeravajući našu analizu testova iz pet genetski i geografski različitih jezika koje nisu smatrali razvojom, postigli smo 88,4% pokrivanja i 1,5% pregeneracije.', 'si': 'අපි තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ ග්රැමාර්ක් සැකසුම් පද්ධතියේ ආවරණය සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා ක්\u200dලායුස් වෙනස් කරුණාකරුවන අපි විශ්ලේෂණයක් පෙනුම් කරනවා, ලෝකයේ භාෂාවට මේ සිද්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා විශ්ලේෂණයක් ගන්න, අපි ග්\u200dරාම්මාර් මැට්\u200dරික්ස් සැකසු අපේ විශ්ලේෂණය පරීක්ෂණය සහ ජාතික විවිධ භාෂාවල් පස්සේ පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, අපිට 88.4% ආවරණය සහ 1.5% ප්\u200dරමාණය පරීක්ෂණය වෙන', 'sv': 'Vi utökar täckningen av ett befintligt grammatikanpassningssystem till clausal modifiers, även kallade adverbial satser. Vi presenterar en analys, med en typologiskt driven ansats för att ta hänsyn till detta fenomen över världens språk, som vi implementerar i Grammar Matrix anpassningssystem (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Genom att testa vår analys på testsviter från fem genetiskt och geografiskt olika språk som inte beaktades i utvecklingen uppnår vi 88,4% täckning och 1,5% övergenerering.', 'so': 'Waxaan ku fidinaynaa daboolka nidaamka isticmaalka ee heysta si loo beddelo qalabka cayimanta ah, waxaana lagu magacaabaa sharciga ganacsiga. Analys baaritaan, waxaynu qaadannaa qaabab caadi ah oo loo soo jeedo si a an ugu xisaabinno xaaladan afka caalamka oo dhan, taasoo aan ku sameeyno nidaamka qaabilaadda ee Grammar Matrix (Bender et, 2002, 2010). Shartaynta baaritaanka koontarooyinka lagu tijaabiyey shan luuqadood oo geneysiga ah iyo geographically kala duduwan oo aan horumarinta lagu tirin, waxaynu gaadhnaa 88.4% daboolka iyo 1.5% oo ka kordhaya.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஏற்கனவே இருக்கும் ஒரு புள்ளிகள் தனிப்பயன் அமைப்பின் கவர்ப்பை விரிவாக்குகிறோம் மாற்றங்களை விளக்கமான மாற்றங்கள்  உலகத்தின் மொழிகள் முழுவதும் இந்த நிகழ்வை நாம் கணக்கிட ஒரு ஆராய்ச்சியை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், அதை நாம் சிறந்த மாட்ரிக்ஸ் தனிப்பயன் அமைப்பில் செயல்படுத்த நாம் முன்னேற்றத்தில் கருத்தப்படாத ஐந்து மரபணு மற்றும் பூவியியல் வேறு மொழிகளிலிருந்து சோதனைகளை பரிசோதிக்கிறோம், 88.4% மற்றும் 1.', 'ur': 'ہم ایک موجود گراماری تنظیم سیسٹم کی حفاظت کو گھیر دیتے ہیں کہ کلیز متغیر کرنے والوں کے لئے بھی، اور اس کے ذریعہ علائم کی کلیزوں کا نام بھی ہے. ہم ایک تحلیل پیش کرتے ہیں، دنیا کی زبانوں میں اس پھونک کا حساب کرنے کے لئے ایک تایپولوژیکی طریقہ لیتے ہیں، جسے ہم گرم ماتریکس تنظیم سیستم میں لاتے ہیں (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). ہم پانچ ژنتیکی اور جغرافی طرح طرح طرح کی زبانوں سے آزمائش کے بارے میں آزمائش کرتے ہیں جن کو توسعہ میں نہیں سمجھا گیا تھا، ہم 88.4% کاوٹ اور 1.5% اوپر نسل پہنچتے ہیں۔', 'uz': "Biz mavjud grammatika moslash tizimini boshqaramiz, o'zgarishlarni qo'shish uchun qo'llanmiz. Bu yerda erkak soʻzlar deb ataymiz. Biz bir analyzerni hozir qilamiz, dunyo tilidagi oddiy narsalarni hisoblash uchun o'ylab turganmiz. Buni Grammar Matrix moslamalari tizimida bajaramiz (Bender et, 2002, 2010). Biz taʼminlovchi davlatda o'ylamagan besh genetika va geografisk turli tillardan analyzerimizni tekshirib, 88.4% kodlash va 1.5% bir necha zavlagan olimiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi mở rộng sự bao quát của hệ thống chỉnh sửa lỗi máy đã có, còn được gọi là các điều khoản quảng cáo. Chúng tôi đưa ra một kết quả phân tích, s ử dụng một phương pháp theo tiêu đề để giải thích hiện tượng này trên khắp các ngôn ngữ trên thế giới, mà chúng tôi thực hiện trong hệ thống thay đổi lỗi máy Grammar (Bender et al., 2009, 46). Thử nghiệm phân tích của chúng tôi về cầu thử từ năm ngôn ngữ đa-vi-củ và địa lý khác nhau mà không được xem trong quá trình phát triển, chúng tôi đạt được độ phân tích 88.4 vi-4 và 1.5 vi-tạo quá.', 'bg': 'Разширяваме обхвата на съществуваща система за персонализиране на граматиката до клаузални модификатори, наричани още adverbial клаузи. Представяме анализ, използвайки типологично ориентиран подход за отчитане на това явление в световните езици, който внедряваме в системата за персонализиране на граматическата матрица (Бендер и др., 2002, 2010). Тествайки нашия анализ върху тестови комплекти от пет генетично и географски различни езика, които не са били разглеждани в разработката, постигаме 88,4% покритие и 1,5% свръхгенериране.', 'nl': 'We breiden de dekking van een bestaand grammatica aanpassingssysteem uit tot clausale modifiers, ook wel adverbiale clausules genoemd. We presenteren een analyse, waarbij we rekening houden met dit fenomeen in alle talen van de wereld, die we implementeren in het Grammar Matrix customization systeem (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Door onze analyse te testen op testsuites uit vijf genetisch en geografisch diverse talen die niet in de ontwikkeling werden meegenomen, bereiken we 88,4% dekking en 1,5% overgeneratie.', 'hr': 'Proširimo pokrivanje postojećeg gramatičkog sustava prilagodbe prema modifikatorima klauzula, također se naziva reklamskim klauzulama. Predstavljamo analizu, uzimajući tipološki vodeni pristup u obzir na taj fenomen širom svijetskih jezika, koji implementiramo u sustavu prilagodbe Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Provjeravajući našu analizu testova iz pet genetski i geografski različitih jezika koje nisu smatrali razvojom, postigli smo 88,4% pokrivanja i 1,5% pregeneracije.', 'da': 'Vi udvider dækningen af et eksisterende grammatiktilpasningssystem til clausal modifikatorer, også kaldet adverbial sætninger. Vi præsenterer en analyse, der tager en typologisk drevet tilgang til at tage højde for dette fænomen på tværs af verdens sprog, som vi implementerer i Grammar Matrix tilpasningssystem (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Ved at teste vores analyse på testsuiter fra fem genetisk og geografisk forskellige sprog, som ikke blev taget i betragtning under udviklingen, opnår vi 88,4% dækning og 1,5% overgenerering.', 'de': 'Wir erweitern die Abdeckung eines bestehenden Grammatik-Anpassungssystems auf klausale Modifikatoren, auch Adverbialsätze genannt. Wir präsentieren eine Analyse unter Berücksichtigung eines typologisch getriebenen Ansatzes, um dieses Phänomen in allen Sprachen der Welt zu berücksichtigen, die wir im Anpassungssystem Grammar Matrix implementieren (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Testen wir unsere Analyse an Testsuiten aus fünf genetisch und geografisch unterschiedlichen Sprachen, die nicht in der Entwicklung berücksichtigt wurden, erreichen wir 88,4% Abdeckung und 1,5% Übergeneration.', 'ko': '우리는 기존 문법 맞춤형 시스템의 범위를 작은 문장 수식어로 확대하여 장어종문이라고도 부른다.우리는 유형 구동 방법을 이용하여 세계 언어의 이러한 현상을 해석하고 문법 매트릭스 맞춤형 시스템에서 이러한 현상을 실현했다(벤더 등, 2002년, 2010년).다섯 가지 서로 다른 유전자와 지리적 위치에서 온 언어에 대한 테스트 세트에 대한 분석을 통해 우리는 88.4%의 커버율과 1.5%의 과도한 생성을 실현했다.', 'id': 'Kami memperluas perlindungan dari sistem pengasuaian grammar yang ada untuk modifikasi klausul, juga disebut sebagai klausul negatif. Kami mempersembahkan analisis, mengambil pendekatan tipologi untuk memperhitungkan fenomena ini di seluruh bahasa dunia, yang kami implementasikan dalam sistem pengasuaian Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Menguji analisis kami pada pakaian tes dari lima bahasa genetik dan geografi yang berbeda yang tidak dianggap dalam pengembangan, kami mencapai 88,4% penutupan dan 1,5% overgeneration.', 'fa': 'ما پوشش یک سیستم تنظیمات گرامی موجود را به تغییردهنده\u200cها گسترش می\u200cدهیم، همچنین به عنوان کلاس\u200cهای تبلیغات نامیده می\u200cشود. ما یک تحلیل را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، با یک روش تایپولوژیکی راهنمایی برای حساب این پدیده در زبان جهان، که در سیستم تنظیم سازی ماتریکس گرم (Bender et al., 2002، 2010) عملیات می\u200cکنیم. تحقیقات تحلیل ما در مورد ساختمان آزمایش ها از پنج زبان ژنتیکی و جغرافی متفاوت که در توسعه به نظر نمی رسید، ما 88.4% پوشش و 1.5% نسل زیادی را می رسانیم.', 'af': "Ons uitbrei die dekking van 'n bestaande grammatiese aanpassingsstelsel na klauswysigers, ook as adverbiale klauses verwys. Ons stel 'n analisie voor te neem, met 'n tipologies gedruk toegang te reken vir hierdie fenomen oor die wêreld se tale, wat ons implementeer in die Grammar Matrix aanpassingsstelsel (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Toets ons analisie op testsuites van vyf geneetiese en geografiese verskillende tale wat nie in ontwikkeling aangeneem is nie, het ons 88.4% dekking en 1.5% oorslag bereik.", 'sw': 'Tunaongeza habari za mfumo wa utumiaji wa programu ulioendelea kwa mabadiliko ya wazi, na pia tunatajwa kama matangazo ya kibiashara. Tunatoa uchambuzi, kwa kuchukua mbinu za kawaida zinazoendeshwa kuzungumzia hali hii katika lugha za dunia kote, ambazo tunatekeleza katika mfumo wa usambazaji wa Matrix wa Grammar (Bender et al, 2002, 2010). Kujaribu uchambuzi wetu kuhusu mashitaka yanayotokana na lugha mbalimbali za kimenea na geografia ambazo hazikuchukuliwa katika maendeleo, tunapata asilimia 88.4 na asilimia 1.5 zaidi ya uzalishaji.', 'tr': 'Biz bar bir gramatik üýtgetmek sisteminiň öränini saýlamak üçin, bu da adverbial klamalar diýip atlandyrýarys. Biz bu fenomeni dünýädäki dillerde çykarmak üçin tipologik taýýarlanan bir ýazşyny çykaryp çykýarys. Bu şekilde Grammar Matrix customizaýonyň sisteminde implement edilýäris (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Beş jenetik we geografik dillerden analizimizi çykyp bilmeýän çykyş dilinden barlap analizimizi barlap 88.4% ajaýyp we 1.5% ýetişdirip ýetirdik.', 'sq': 'Ne zgjerojmë mbulimin e një sistemi ekzistues të personalizimit të gramatikës në modifikatorët e kushteve, të quajtur gjithashtu klauzula kundërshtare. Ne paraqesim një analizë, duke marrë një qasje tipologjike për të llogaritur këtë fenomen anembanë gjuhëve të botës, të cilën ne e zbatojmë në sistemin e personalizimit të Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Duke testuar analizën tonë mbi kostume testuese nga pesë gjuhë gjenetikisht dhe gjeografikisht të ndryshme që nuk u konsideruan në zhvillim, arrijmë 88.4% mbulim dhe 1.5% mbigjeneratë.', 'hy': 'Մենք ընդլայնում ենք գոյություն ունեցող գրամական հատուկ համակարգի ծավալը մինչև պայմանագրական փոփոխիչներ, որոնք նաև անվանում են հակառակ պայմանագրեր: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի վերլուծություն, որը տիպոլոգիապես հիմնված մոտեցում է այս երևույթի հաշվի առնելու համար աշխարհի բոլոր լեզուներում, որը մենք կիրառում ենք Գրամար Մատրիքսի հատուկ համակարգում (Բենդեր և այլն., 2002, 2010). Հինգ գենետիկորեն և գենետիկորեն բազմազան լեզուների մեր վերլուծությունը ստուգելով, որոնք զարգացման մեջ չհամարվում էին, մենք հասնում ենք 88.4 տոկոսի ծախսերի և 1.5 տոկոսի գեներգեներգեներգեներգիայի:', 'az': 'Biz, həmçinin grammatik tərzdə sisteminin örtüsünü müəyyənləşdirənlərə yayındırırıq, həmçinin adverbial clauses kimi adlandırılır. Biz bu fenomeni dünyanın dillərində hesablamaq üçün typolojik tərzdə təşkil etdiyimiz analizi göstəririk, Grammar Matrix təşkil sistemində istifadə edirik (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Beş genetik və ģeogrāfiski müxtəlif dillərdən analizimizi təşkil etmək üçün təşkil edilmədi, 88,4% vəzifə və 1,5% vəzifə yetiririk.', 'am': 'የአሁኑን አካባቢ ግንኙነት አካባቢ ስርዓት እናሳድጋለን፡፡ በዓለማዊ ቋንቋዎች ላይ ያሉትን አካባቢ ማድረግ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የአምስት የውይይት እና የጂዮግራፍ ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ያልተጠቃጠሩን የፍትሕት ፍትወት ላይ ማስታወቂያውን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা বিদ্যমান একটি গ্রামার ব্যবহারকারী সিস্টেমের কাভারেজ বাড়িয়ে দিচ্ছি ব্যাপারবিয়াল ক্লাস হিসেবে। আমরা একটি বিশ্লেষণ উপস্থাপন করি, বিশ্বের ভাষার জন্য একটি সাধারণ ভাষায় চালিয়ে যাচ্ছি, যা আমরা গ্রামার ম্যাট্রিক্স সিস্টেম (বেন্দার এল, ২০০২, ২০১০)। আমাদের টেস্ট স্যুটের বিশ্লেষণের পরীক্ষা করা হচ্ছে পাঁচটি জেনেটিক্যালিক এবং ভূগোগ্রাফিক ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষার বিভিন্ন ভাষায় যা', 'ca': "Estendem la cobertura d'un sistema de personalització gramàtica existent fins a modificadors de clàusules, també anomenats clàusules adversaries. Presentam una an àlisi, prenent un enfocament tipològicament orientat per tenir en compte aquest fenomen a través de les llengües del món, que implementam al sistema de personalització de la Matrix Grammar (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Testant la nostra anàlisi en suites de prova de cinc llengües genèticament i geogràficament diverses que no van ser considerades en el desenvolupament, aconseguim 88,4% cobertura i 1,5% sobregeneració.", 'cs': 'Rozšiřujeme pokrytí stávajícího systému přizpůsobení gramatiky na klauzulní modifikátory, také označované jako příslovné věty. Předkládáme analýzu s typologicky řízeným přístupem k zohlednění tohoto jevu napříč světovými jazyky, kterou implementujeme v systému přizpůsobení Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Testováním naší analýzy na testsuitech z pěti geneticky a geograficky rozmanitých jazyků, které nebyly považovány ve vývoji, dosahujeme 88,4% pokrytí a 1,5% nadgenerace.', 'et': 'Laiendame olemasoleva grammatika kohandamise süsteemi katvust klauslilistele modifikaatoritele, mida nimetatakse ka adverbiaalseteks klausliteks. Esitame analüüsi, mis lähtub tüpoloogilisest lähenemisviisist selle nähtuse arvessevõtmiseks maailma keeltes, mida rakendame grammatika maatriksi kohandamise süsteemis (Bender jt., 2002, 2010). Testides oma analüüsi viiest geneetiliselt ja geograafiliselt mitmekesisest keelest, mida arendamisel ei arvestatud, saavutame 88,4% ulatuse ja 1,5% ülepõlvnemise.', 'bs': 'Proširimo pokrivanje postojećeg gramatičkog sustava prilagođenja prema modifikatorima klauzula, također se naziva reklamskim klauzulama. Predstavljamo analizu, uzimajući tipološki pristup u obzir na taj fenomen širom svijetskih jezika, koji implementiramo u sistemu prilagodbe Grammar Matrix (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Provjeravajući našu analizu testova iz pet genetski i geografski različitih jezika koje nisu smatrali razvojom, postigli smo 88,4% pokrivanja i 1,5% pregeneracije.', 'fi': 'Laajennamme olemassa olevan kieliopin räätälöintijärjestelmän kattavuutta klausaalimuokkaimiin, joita kutsutaan myös adverbiaalilauseiksi. Esitämme analyysin, joka perustuu typologiseen lähestymistapaan tämän ilmiön huomioon ottamiseksi maailman eri kielillä, jonka toteutamme Grammar Matrix -räätälöintijärjestelmässä (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). Testaamalla analyysiämme viidestä geneettisesti ja maantieteellisesti erilaisesta kielestä, joita ei otettu huomioon kehityksessä, saavutamme 88,4% kattavuuden ja 1,5% ylikuormituksen.', 'sk': 'Obstoječi sistem za prilagajanje slovnice razširimo na klausne modifikatorje, imenovane tudi adverbialne klavzule. Predstavljamo analizo s tipološko usmerjenim pristopom k upoštevanju tega pojava v svetovnih jezikih, ki jo uporabljamo v sistemu prilagajanja slovnične matrice (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). S testiranjem naše analize na testnih kompletih petih genetsko in geografsko različnih jezikov, ki niso bili upoštevani v razvoju, dosežemo 88,4% pokritosti in 1,5% pregeneracije.', 'ha': "We extend the coverage of an existing grammar customization system to clausal modifiers, also referred to as adverbial clauses.  Tuna halatar da wani anayya, an a sami wani hanyoyi wanda aka yi wa matsayi a cikin harshen duniya, wanda Muke amfani da shi a cikin tsarin Matrix na Grammar Matrix (Binder et, 2002, 2010). Ko jarraba kanmu a kan jarrabar tufãfin ta daga lingui bakwai jeniya da geographica dabam-dabam waɗanda ba a yi bincike ba a ci-developer, za'a sami karatun 88.4 da asilimi 1.5.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé ngéwangi kapan kanggo ngerasakno sistem dadi kanggo nyelarakno kanggo nguasakno dadi, kaya ngono "klaus" sing berarti. Awak dhéwé éntuk panelusi, nggawe sistem perusahaan mat rak-perusahaan kanggo nggawe barang iki ning dunya iki, sing nyimpen dhéwé nggawe sistem perusahaan GraGraGraGraGraGraGram (Bender et al, 2002n, 2011). Genjer', 'he': "אנחנו ממשיכים את הכיסוי של מערכת התאמת גרמטית קיימת למונדיקטורים קלאוזליים, שנקראים גם כחוקים רפואיים. We present an analysis, taking a typologically-driven approach to account for this phenomenon across the world's languages, which we implement in the Grammar Matrix customization system (Bender et al., 2002, 2010).  לבדוק את הניתוח שלנו על חליפות בדיקות מחמש שפות מגנטיות וגיאוגרפיות ששוקלות לא התחשבו בפיתוח, אנחנו מגיעים לכיסוי 88.4% ו-1.5% דור יתר.", 'bo': "ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་རང་བཟོ་བཅོས་མ་ལག་གི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་ཕར་བསྐྱེད་བཟོ་བྱེད་པ་དེ་ཡང་བསྒྲགས་སྐབས་འགའ We present an analysis, taking a typologically-driven approach to account for this phenomenon across the world's languages, which we implement in the Grammar Matrix customization system (Bender et al., 2002, 2010). འུ་ཅག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ནས་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ལས་ཆ་སྟངས་འཛིན་པའི་ནང་དུ་མི་མཐུན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག"}
{'en': 'Sliced Recurrent Neural Networks', 'ar': 'شرائح الشبكات العصبية المتكررة', 'es': 'Redes neuronales recurrentes cortadas', 'pt': 'Redes neurais recorrentes fatiadas', 'fr': 'Réseaux neuronaux récurrents', 'zh': '切片递归神经网络', 'ja': 'スライス再発ニューラルネットワーク', 'ru': 'Рекуррентные нейронные сети на срезе', 'hi': 'कटा हुआ आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क', 'ga': 'Líonraí Néaracha Athfhillteacha slisnithe', 'el': 'Κομμένα επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα', 'hu': 'Szeletelt ismétlődő ideghálózatok', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Reti neurali reciproche affettate', 'kk': 'Қайталанған нейралық желіComment', 'lt': 'Išpjaustyti pasikartojantys nerviniai tinklai', 'ms': 'Sliced Recurrent Neural Networks', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': '@ info: status', 'mt': 'Netwerks newrali rikorrenti mqassma', 'no': 'Slått gjentaande neuralnettverk', 'mn': 'Дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээлүүд', 'pl': 'Pokrojone sieci neuronowe', 'ro': 'Rețele neurale recurente feliate', 'sr': 'Slikovane neuralne mreže', 'si': 'ස්ලයිස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය නිර්මාණ ජාලය', 'so': 'Shabakada Neural ee waqtiga soo socda', 'sv': 'Skivade återkommande neurala nätverk', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய நியூரல் பிணையம்', 'ur': 'سڈیس دوبارہ نئورل نیٹورک', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cắt ngang các mạng thần kinh', 'hr': 'Sličene povratne neurone mreže', 'bg': 'Нарязани повтарящи се невронни мрежи', 'da': 'Skæret tilbagevendende neurale netværk', 'nl': 'Sliced Recurrent Neural Networks', 'id': 'Rangkaian Neural Berulang Terpotong', 'de': 'Geschnittene wiederkehrende neuronale Netze', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی تکرار شده', 'ko': '절편 귀속 신경 네트워크', 'tr': 'Geditiň sened aplananlar', 'af': 'Geskiedende Herhaling Nurale Netwerke', 'am': 'plug-in-action', 'hy': 'Sliced Recurrent Neural Networks', 'sq': 'Rrjete neurale të përsëritura', 'az': 'Gedişan Nöral Ağları', 'bn': 'পুনরাবৃত্ত নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক', 'bs': 'Slikovane povratne neurone mreže', 'ca': 'Redes neuronals recurrents fetes', 'cs': 'Řezané recidivní neuronové sítě', 'et': 'Lõigatud korduvad närvivõrgud', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea', 'fi': 'Viipaloidut toistuvat hermoverkot', 'he': 'Name', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Rezana ponavljajoča se živčna mreža', 'bo': 'རྒྱུད་འགྱུར་བའི་སྐྱེལ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ', 'jv': 'structural navigation'}
{'en': 'Recurrent neural networks have achieved great success in many NLP tasks. However, they have difficulty in parallelization because of the recurrent structure, so it takes much time to train RNNs. In this paper, we introduce sliced recurrent neural networks (SRNNs), which could be parallelized by slicing the sequences into many subsequences. SRNNs have the ability to obtain high-level information through multiple layers with few extra parameters. We prove that the standard RNN is a special case of the SRNN when we use linear activation functions. Without changing the recurrent units, SRNNs are 136 times as fast as standard RNNs and could be even faster when we train longer sequences. Experiments on six large-scale sentiment analysis datasets show that SRNNs achieve better performance than standard RNNs.', 'ar': 'حققت الشبكات العصبية المتكررة نجاحًا كبيرًا في العديد من مهام البرمجة اللغوية العصبية. ومع ذلك ، فإنهم يواجهون صعوبة في الموازاة بسبب الهيكل المتكرر ، لذلك يستغرق تدريب RNNs الكثير من الوقت. في هذا البحث ، نقدم شرائح الشبكات العصبية المتكررة (SRNNs) ، والتي يمكن موازنتها عن طريق تقطيع التسلسلات إلى العديد من التتابعات اللاحقة. تمتلك SRNNs القدرة على الحصول على معلومات عالية المستوى من خلال طبقات متعددة مع القليل من المعلمات الإضافية. لقد أثبتنا أن RNN القياسي هو حالة خاصة لـ SRNN عندما نستخدم وظائف التنشيط الخطي. بدون تغيير الوحدات المتكررة ، تكون سرعة شبكات SRNN أسرع بـ 136 مرة من شبكات RNN القياسية ويمكن أن تكون أسرع عندما نقوم بتدريب تسلسلات أطول. تُظهر التجارب على ست مجموعات بيانات لتحليل المشاعر على نطاق واسع أن شبكات SRNN تحقق أداءً أفضل من شبكات RNN القياسية.', 'pt': 'As redes neurais recorrentes alcançaram grande sucesso em muitas tarefas de PNL. No entanto, eles têm dificuldade de paralelização por causa da estrutura recorrente, por isso leva muito tempo para treinar RNNs. Neste artigo, apresentamos as redes neurais recorrentes fatiadas (SRNNs), que podem ser paralelizadas dividindo as sequências em muitas subsequências. Os SRNNs têm a capacidade de obter informações de alto nível por meio de várias camadas com poucos parâmetros extras. Provamos que o RNN padrão é um caso especial do SRNN quando usamos funções de ativação linear. Sem alterar as unidades recorrentes, os SRNNs são 136 vezes mais rápidos que os RNNs padrão e podem ser ainda mais rápidos quando treinamos sequências mais longas. Experimentos em seis conjuntos de dados de análise de sentimento em grande escala mostram que os SRNNs alcançam melhor desempenho do que os RNNs padrão.', 'es': 'Las redes neuronales recurrentes han logrado un gran éxito en muchas tareas de PNL. Sin embargo, tienen dificultades en la paralelización debido a la estructura recurrente, por lo que se necesita mucho tiempo para entrenar a las RNN. En este artículo, presentamos redes neuronales recurrentes cortadas (SRNN), que podrían paralelizarse dividiendo las secuencias en muchas subsecuencias. Las SRNN tienen la capacidad de obtener información de alto nivel a través de múltiples capas con pocos parámetros adicionales. Demostramos que la RNN estándar es un caso especial de la SRNN cuando utilizamos funciones de activación lineal. Sin cambiar las unidades recurrentes, las SRNN son 136 veces más rápidas que las RNN estándar y podrían ser incluso más rápidas cuando entrenamos secuencias más largas. Los experimentos en seis conjuntos de datos de análisis de sentimiento a gran escala muestran que los SRNN logran un mejor rendimiento que los RNN estándar.', 'fr': "Les réseaux de neurones récurrents ont connu un grand succès dans de nombreuses tâches de PNL. Cependant, ils ont des difficultés de parallélisation en raison de la structure récurrente, de sorte que l'entraînement des RNN prend beaucoup de temps. Dans cet article, nous présentons des réseaux neuronaux récurrents tranchés (SRNs), qui peuvent être parallélisés en découpant les séquences en plusieurs sous-séquences. Les SRNN ont la capacité d'obtenir des informations de haut niveau via plusieurs couches avec peu de paramètres supplémentaires. Nous prouvons que le RNN standard est un cas particulier du SRNN lorsque nous utilisons des fonctions d'activation linéaires. Sans changer les unités récurrentes, les SRNN sont 136 fois plus rapides que les RNN standard et pourraient l'être encore lorsque nous entraînons des séquences plus longues. Des expériences sur six ensembles de données d'analyse des sentiments à grande échelle montrent que les SRNN obtiennent de meilleures performances que les RNN standard.", 'ja': '再発性ニューラルネットワークは、多くのNLPタスクで大きな成功を収めている。しかし、それらは再帰的な構造のため並列化が困難であるため、RNNの訓練に多くの時間がかかります。本稿では、配列を多くの連鎖にスライスすることで並列化することができるスライスされた再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ ＳＲＮＮ ）を紹介する。SRNNは、余分なパラメータをほとんど使用せずに、複数のレイヤーを介して高レベルの情報を取得することができます。線形活性化関数を使用する場合、標準RNNはSRNNの特殊な場合であることを証明します。反復単位を変更することなく、SRNNは標準的なRNNの136倍の速度であり、長いシーケンスをトレーニングするとさらに高速になる可能性があります。６つの大規模センチメント分析データセットの実験は、ＳＲＮＮが標準的なＲＮＮよりも優れた性能を達成することを示す。', 'zh': '递归神经网络大功于众NLP。 然循环构构,难于并化,故训练RNN费日月。 本文引切片递归神经网络(SRNNs),可因将序切片为诸子序列来并行化。 SRN 能数得高第,少额外参数。 吾证其法RNN用线性激活函数SRNN之例也。 不变其位,SRN倍其数,RNN136长序,SRN疾甚。 六情析数实验,SRNN 性优 RNN。', 'ru': 'Рекуррентные нейронные сети добились больших успехов во многих задачах NLP. Однако у них возникают трудности с параллелизацией из-за повторяющейся структуры, поэтому обучение RNN занимает много времени. В этой статье мы представляем нарезанные рекуррентные нейронные сети (SRNN), которые могут быть параллелизованы путем разрезания последовательностей на множество подпоследовательностей. SRNN имеют возможность получать информацию высокого уровня через несколько уровней с небольшим количеством дополнительных параметров. Доказано, что стандартный RNN является особым случаем SRNN при использовании функций линейной активации. Без изменения периодических единиц, SRNN в 136 раз быстрее, чем стандартные RNN, и может быть еще быстрее, когда мы тренируем более длинные последовательности. Эксперименты с шестью крупномасштабными наборами данных анализа настроений показывают, что SRNN достигают лучшей производительности, чем стандартные RNN.', 'hi': 'आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क ने कई एनएलपी कार्यों में बड़ी सफलता हासिल की है। हालांकि, उन्हें आवर्तक संरचना के कारण समानांतरीकरण में कठिनाई होती है, इसलिए आरएनएन को प्रशिक्षित करने में बहुत समय लगता है। इस पेपर में, हम कटा हुआ आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (SRNNs) पेश करते हैं, जिसे कई उप-अनुक्रमों में अनुक्रमों को स्लाइस करके समानांतर किया जा सकता है। SRNNs में कुछ अतिरिक्त मापदंडों के साथ कई परतों के माध्यम से उच्च-स्तरीय जानकारी प्राप्त करने की क्षमता है। हम साबित करते हैं कि मानक RNN SRNN का एक विशेष मामला है जब हम रैखिक सक्रियण कार्यों का उपयोग करते हैं। आवर्तक इकाइयों को बदलने के बिना, SRNNs मानक RNNs के रूप में 136 गुना तेज हैं और जब हम लंबे समय तक अनुक्रमों को प्रशिक्षित करते हैं तो और भी तेज़ हो सकता है। छह बड़े पैमाने पर भावना विश्लेषण डेटासेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि SRNNs मानक RNNs की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ga': "D'éirigh thar barr le líonraí neural athfhillteacha i go leor tascanna NLP. Mar sin féin, tá deacracht acu le comhthreomhaireacht mar gheall ar an struchtúr athfhillteach, agus mar sin tógann sé go leor ama RNNanna a oiliúint. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid isteach líonraí néaracha athfhillteacha slisnithe (SRNNanna), a d'fhéadfaí a chomhthreomharú trí na seichimh a ghearradh ina go leor fo-sheichimh. Tá an cumas ag SRNNanna faisnéis ardleibhéil a fháil trí shraitheanna iolracha gan mórán paraiméadair bhreise. Cruthaíonn muid gur cás speisialta den SRNN é an RNN caighdeánach nuair a úsáidimid feidhmeanna gníomhachtaithe líneacha. Gan na haonaid athfhillteacha a athrú, tá SRNNanna 136 uair chomh tapa le RNNanna caighdeánacha agus d'fhéadfadh siad a bheith níos tapúla fós nuair a dhéanaimid oiliúint ar sheichimh níos faide. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar shé thacar sonraí anailíse ar mhórscála go mbaineann SRNNanna feidhmíocht níos fearr amach ná na RNNanna caighdeánacha.", 'el': 'Τα επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα έχουν επιτύχει μεγάλη επιτυχία σε πολλές εργασίες. Ωστόσο, έχουν δυσκολία στην παραλληλοποίηση λόγω της επαναλαμβανόμενης δομής, έτσι παίρνει πολύ χρόνο για να εκπαιδεύσει τα RNN. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εισάγουμε κομμένα επαναλαμβανόμενα νευρωνικά δίκτυα (τα οποία θα μπορούσαν να παραλληλιστούν με την κοπή των ακολουθιών σε πολλές υπο-ακολουθίες. Τα έχουν τη δυνατότητα να λαμβάνουν πληροφορίες υψηλού επιπέδου μέσω πολλαπλών στρωμάτων με λίγες επιπλέον παραμέτρους. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι το τυποποιημένο RNN είναι μια ειδική περίπτωση του SRNN όταν χρησιμοποιούμε γραμμικές λειτουργίες ενεργοποίησης. Χωρίς αλλαγή των επαναλαμβανόμενων μονάδων, τα SRNN είναι 136 φορές γρηγορότερα από τα τυπικά RNN και θα μπορούσαν να είναι ακόμα γρηγορότερα όταν εκπαιδεύουμε μεγαλύτερες ακολουθίες. Τα πειράματα σε έξι μεγάλης κλίμακας σύνολα δεδομένων ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων δείχνουν ότι τα SRNN επιτυγχάνουν καλύτερη απόδοση από τα τυποποιημένα RNN.', 'ka': 'განმეორებული ნეიროლური ქსელები უფრო დიდი წარმატებით NLP მომუშაობაში. მაგრამ, ისინი პარალელიზაციაში შეუძლებელია რეკურენტიური სტრუქტურაზე, ამიტომ უნდა ბევრი დრო გაგრძელოთ RNN-ს. ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ ჩვენ შევცვალობთ წიგნილი რეკურენტური ნეიროლური ქსელები (SRNNs), რომელიც შეიძლება პარალელეზიან, რომელიც შეიძლება წიგნის წიგნის მრა SRNN აქვს უფრო მეტად პარამეტრებით შესაძლებელი ინფორმაციის მიღება. ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ სტანდარული RNN არის SRNN-ის განსაკუთრებული შემთხვევაში, როდესაც ჩვენ linear activation ფუნქციების გამოყენება. რეკურენტური ერთეულების შეცვლის გარეშე, SRNN არის 136-ჯერ უფრო სიჩქარე როგორც სტანდარტური RNN და შეიძლება უფრო სიჩქარე იყოს, როდესაც ჩვენ უფრო სიჩქარ ექვსი დიდი სენტიმენტის ანალიზაციის მონაცემების ექსპერიმენტები ჩვენებს, რომ SRNN მონაცემები უფრო მეტი პროცემენტისგან უფრო მეტი პროც', 'hu': 'Az ismétlődő neurális hálózatok számos NLP feladatban nagy sikert értek el. A visszatérő struktúra miatt azonban nehézségeik vannak a párhuzamosságban, így az RNN-ek kiképzése sok időbe telik. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a szeletelt visszatérő neurális hálózatokat (SRNN-ket), amelyek párhuzamossá válhatnak a szekvenciák számos aljegyzékre történő szeletelésével. Az SRNN-k képesek magas szintű információkat szerezni több rétegen keresztül, kevés extra paraméterrel. Lineáris aktiválási funkciók használata esetén bizonyítjuk, hogy a standard RNN az SRNN speciális esete. A visszatérő egységek megváltoztatása nélkül az SRNN-k 136-szor gyorsabbak, mint a standard RNN-ek, és még gyorsabbak lehetnek, ha hosszabb szekvenciákat edzünk. Hat nagyszabású hangulatelemzési adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy az SRNN-k jobb teljesítményt érnek el, mint a standard RNN-ek.', 'it': "Le reti neurali ricorrenti hanno raggiunto un grande successo in molti compiti NLP. Tuttavia, hanno difficoltà nella parallelizzazione a causa della struttura ricorrente, quindi ci vuole molto tempo per addestrare RNN. In questo articolo, introduciamo reti neurali recidivanti (SRNN), che potrebbero essere parallelizzate tagliando le sequenze in molte sottosezioni. Gli SRNN hanno la capacità di ottenere informazioni di alto livello attraverso più strati con pochi parametri aggiuntivi. Dimostriamo che l'RNN standard è un caso speciale della SRNN quando utilizziamo funzioni di attivazione lineare. Senza cambiare le unità ricorrenti, gli SRNN sono 136 volte più veloci degli RNN standard e potrebbero essere ancora più veloci quando addestriamo sequenze più lunghe. Esperimenti su sei set di dati di analisi del sentiment su larga scala mostrano che gli SRNN raggiungono prestazioni migliori rispetto agli RNN standard.", 'kk': 'Қайталанған невралды желілер NLP тапсырмалардың көп сәтті жеткізді. Бірақ олар қайталанатын құрылғының себебінде параллелизациялау қиындығы бар, сондықтан RNN құрылғыларын оқыту үшін көп уақыт керек. Бұл қағазда біз қайталанатын невралдық желілерді (SRNN) келтіреміз. Бұл реттеулерді көптеген реттеулерге бөліп параллелизацияланады. SRNN бірнеше қосымша параметрлермен бірнеше қабаттар арқылы жоғары деңгейінің мәліметін алу мүмкіндігі бар. Біз стандартты RNN - сызық белсендіру функцияларын қолданғанда SRNN- нің арнайы әдісін көрсетедік. Қайталану бірліктерін өзгертпей, SRNN- дер стандартты RNN- дер ретінде 136 рет жылдам болады және біз ұзындық реттеулерді оқытуға мүмкін болады. Алты үлкен масштабтағы сезімдік анализ деректер жиындарының тәжірибесі, SRNN стандартты RNN- ден артық жақсы жұмыс істейді.', 'lt': 'Daugeliu NLP užduočių pasikartojantys nerviniai tinklai pasiekė didelę sėkmę. Tačiau dėl pasikartojančios struktūros jiems sunku paralelizuoti, todėl RNN mokymui reikia daug laiko. Šiame dokumente mes įdiegiame pjaustytus pasikartojančius nervinius tinklus (SRNN), kurie galėtų būti paralelizuojami padalijant sekas į daugelį pasekmių. SRNN gali gauti aukšto lygio informaciją per kelis sluoksnius su keliais papildomais parametrais. Mes įrodome, kad standartinis RNR yra specialus SRNN atvejis, kai naudojame linijinės aktyvacijos funkcijas. Nepažeidžiant pasikartojančių vienetų, SRNN yra 136 kartus greitesni nei standartiniai RNN ir gali būti net greitesni, kai treniruojame ilgesnes sekas. Eksperimentai su šešiais didelio masto jautrumo analizės duomenų rinkiniais rodo, kad SRNN veiksmingumas yra geresnis nei standartiniai RNN.', 'mk': 'Рекурентните нервни мрежи постигнаа голем успех во многу НЛП задачи. Сепак, тие имаат тешкотии во паралелизацијата поради повторната структура, па потребно е многу време за обука на РНН. Во овој весник, ние воведуваме рецидентни нервни мрежи (СРНН), кои би можеле да бидат паралелизирани со рециденција на секвенциите на многу потеквенции. SRNNs имаат способност да добијат информации на високо ниво преку повеќе слоеви со неколку дополнителни параметри. Докажуваме дека стандардниот РНН е специјален случај на СРНН кога користиме линијарни активациски функции. Without changing the recurrent units, SRNNs are 136 times as fast as standard RNNs and could be even faster when we train longer sequences.  Експериментите на шест големи сентиментални анализи податоци покажуваат дека СРНН постигнуваат подобра резултатност од стандардните РНН.', 'ml': 'ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ശൃംഖലങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ വിജയം പ്രാപിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. എന്നാലും അവര്\u200dക്ക് പാരാമിലേറ്റ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പ്രയാസമുണ്ട്, ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന കൃത്യം കാരണം, അതുകൊണ്ട് RNNs പരിശീലനം ച ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റുറല്\u200d വര്\u200dക്കുകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. അത് വളരെ സബ്കെക്കന്\u200dസുകളില്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതി കുറച്ചു കൂടുതല്\u200d പരാമീറ്ററുകളുള്ള പല തലകളിലൂടെ ഉയര്\u200dന്ന നില വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുവാന്\u200d SRNNs സാധ്യതയുണ നമ്മള്\u200d തെളിയിക്കുന്നത് RNN എന്\u200dറെ സാധാരണ പ്രത്യേക ക കേസാണെന്നാണ്. നമ്മള്\u200d ലൈയര്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d. ആവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്ന യൂണിറ്റുകള്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നില്ലെങ്കില്\u200d, സാധാരണ RNNs എന്നത്ര വേഗത്തില്\u200d 136 പ്രാവശ്യം ആയിരിക്കും. നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പരി ആറു വലിയ സാധാരണ അനുഭവങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു SRNNs സാധാരണ RNNs-കളെക്ക', 'ms': 'Recurrent neural networks have achieved great success in many NLP tasks.  Namun, mereka mempunyai kesulitan dalam selari kerana struktur berulang, jadi ia mengambil banyak masa untuk melatih RNN. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan rangkaian saraf berkurang yang dipotong (SRNNs), yang boleh bersamaan dengan memotong urutan ke dalam banyak turutan. SRNNs mempunyai kemampuan untuk mendapatkan maklumat tahap tinggi melalui lapisan berbilang dengan beberapa parameter tambahan. Kami membuktikan bahawa RNN piawai adalah kes istimewa SRNN apabila kita menggunakan fungsi aktivasi linear. Tanpa mengubah unit berulang, SRNN 136 kali lebih cepat daripada RNN piawai dan boleh lebih cepat bila kita melatih urutan yang lebih panjang. Eksperimen pada enam set data analisis sentimen skala besar menunjukkan bahawa SRNN mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik daripada RNN piawai.', 'mt': 'In-netwerks newrali rikorrenti kisbu suċċess kbir f’ħafna kompiti tal-NLP. Madankollu, huma għandhom diffikultà fil-parallelizzazzjoni minħabba l-istruttura rikorrenti, għalhekk jieħu ħafna żmien biex jitħarrġu RNNs. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nintroduċu netwerks newrali rikorrenti maqtugħin (SRNNs), li jistgħu jiġu parallelizzati billi nqatgħu s-sekwenzi f’ħafna sussegwenzi. L-SRNNs għandhom il-kapaċità li jiksbu informazzjoni ta’ livell għoli permezz ta’ diversi saffi bi ftit parametri addizzjonali. Aħna nippruvaw li l-RNN standard huwa każ speċjali tal-SRNN meta nużaw funzjonijiet ta’ attivazzjoni lineari. Without changing the recurrent units, SRNNs are 136 times as fast as standard RNNs and could be even faster when we train longer sequences.  Esperimenti fuq sitt settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ analiżi tas-sentimenti fuq skala kbira juru li l-SRNNs jiksbu prestazzjoni aħjar mill-RNNs standard.', 'mn': 'Дахин дахин сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээний олон NLP даалгаврын амжилтыг хүртсэн. Гэхдээ тэд дахин дахин бүтэц учраас параллелизацийн хэцүү байдаг. Тиймээс RNN-г сургахад маш их цаг зарцуулдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид дахин дахин давтагдсан мэдрэлийн сүлжээг (SRNNs) тайлбарлаж болно. Энэ дарааллыг олон дарааллын дарааллаар хувааж болно. SRNN-д олон давхар давхар параметрлээр өндөр түвшинд мэдээллийг авч чадна. Бид стандарт RNN нь шулуун активчлалын функцийг ашиглах үед SRNN-ийн ялгаатай тохиолдол гэдгийг баталж байна. Дахин дахин дахин нэгж өөрчлөгдсөнгүй, SRNN нь стандарт RNN-тэй хурдан 136-ыг үржүүлэх бөгөөд бид урт дарааллыг дасгах үед илүү хурдан байж болно. 6 том хэмжээний мэдрэмжтэй шинжилгээний мэдрэмж өгөгдлийн сангийн туршилт нь SRNN-үүд стандарт RNN-ээс илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг гэдгийг харуулж байна.', 'no': 'Gjennomsiktige neuralnettverk har oppnådd stor suksess i mange NLP- oppgåver. Dei har likevel vanskeleg å parallelisera på grunn av rekursetrukturen, så det treng mykje tid for å trenja RNN. I denne papiret introduserer vi slisen gjentaande neuralnettverk (SRNN), som kan paralleliserast ved å slisa sekvensane til mange undersekvensar. SRNN har kapasiteten for å få informasjon på høg nivå gjennom fleire lag med få ekstra parametrar. Vi prøver at standard RNN er ein spesiell tilfelle til SRNN når vi brukar lineære aktiveringsfunksjonar. Utan å endra gjentakingseiningane er SRNN 136 ganger så raskt som standard RNN, og kan vera enda raskare når vi treng langre sekvensar. Eksperimentar på seks stor sentimentanalyser viser at SRNN har bedre utvikling enn standard RNN.', 'pl': 'Powtarzające się sieci neuronowe osiągnęły ogromny sukces w wielu zadaniach NLP. Mają jednak trudności z paralelizacją ze względu na powtarzającą się strukturę, więc trening RNN zajmuje dużo czasu. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy przecięte powtarzające się sieci neuronowe (SRNN), które mogą być równoległe poprzez krojenie sekwencji na wiele podsekwencji. SRNN mają możliwość uzyskiwania informacji na wysokim poziomie poprzez wiele warstw z kilkoma dodatkowymi parametrami. Udowadniamy, że standardowy RNN jest szczególnym przypadkiem SRNN, gdy używamy funkcji aktywacji liniowych. Bez zmiany jednostek powtarzających się, SRNN są 136 razy szybsze niż standardowe RNN i mogą być jeszcze szybsze, gdy trenujemy dłuższe sekwencje. Eksperymenty na sześciu dużych zbiorach danych analizy sentymentów pokazują, że SRNN osiągają lepszą wydajność niż standardowe RNN.', 'ro': 'Rețelele neurale recurente au obținut un mare succes în multe sarcini PNL. Cu toate acestea, ele au dificultăți în paralelizare din cauza structurii recurente, astfel încât este nevoie de mult timp pentru a instrui RNN. În această lucrare, introducem rețele neurale recurente feliate (SRNN), care ar putea fi paralelizate prin tăierea secvențelor în mai multe subsecvențe. SRNN-urile au capacitatea de a obține informații de nivel înalt prin mai multe straturi cu câțiva parametri suplimentari. Demonstrăm că RNN standard este un caz special al SRNN atunci când utilizăm funcții de activare liniară. Fără a schimba unitățile recurente, SRNN-urile sunt de 136 de ori mai rapide decât RNN-urile standard și ar putea fi chiar mai rapide atunci când antrenăm secvențe mai lungi. Experimentele efectuate pe șase seturi de date de analiză a sentimentelor la scară largă arată că SRNN-urile obțin performanțe mai bune decât RNN-urile standard.', 'sr': 'Ponovne neuralne mreže postigle su veliki uspeh u mnogim zadacima NLP-a. Međutim, oni imaju teškoće u parallelizaciji zbog povratne strukture, tako da je potrebno mnogo vremena da treniraju RNN. U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezervne neuralne mreže (SRNN), koje bi mogle biti parallelizirane prekidanjem sekvencija u mnoge sekvence. SRNN imaju sposobnost da dobiju informacije o visokom nivou kroz višestruke slojeve sa nekoliko dodatnih parametara. Dokazujemo da je standardni RNN poseban slučaj SRNN kada koristimo linearne aktivacije funkcije. Bez promjene ponovnih jedinica, SRNN su 136 puta brže nego standardni RNN i mogli bi biti još brže kada treniramo duže sekvence. Eksperimenti na šest velikih analiza sentimenta pokazuju da SRNN postignu bolju funkciju nego standardni RNN.', 'si': 'ආයෙත් න්\u200dයුරෝල් ජාලයෙන් NLP වැඩේ ගොඩක් සාර්ථක විසින් ලැබුනා. ඒත් ඔවුන්ට සමාන්\u200dය විදිහට අමාරුවක් තියෙනවා ආයෙත් සංවිධානය නිසා, ඉතින් RNN සංවිධානය කරන්න වෙලාව ගො මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්ලායිස් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක න්\u200dයූරාල ජාලය (SRNNs) වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනුව Name අපි ප්\u200dරමාණය RNN එක SRNN ගේ විශේෂ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් කියලා සාක්ෂි කරනවා අපි ලේනියර් සක්\u200dරීය වැඩක් භාවිත ක ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක යුනිකය වෙනස් කරලා නැතුව, SRNNs සාමාන්\u200dය RNN වගේ ඉක්මනට 136 වතාවක් වේගයෙන් ඉක්මනට වේගයෙන් වෙ විශාල විශාල විශ්ලේෂණ දත්ත සූදානයක් තියෙන්නේ SRNN ස්ථානය RNN වඩා හොඳ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් ලැබෙනවා.', 'so': "Shabakadaha neurada ee soo dhowaaday waxay ku guulaysteen shaqooyin badan oo NLP. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxay ku adag yihiin in ay isbartaan dhismaha soo socda sababtoo ah, sidaas darteed waxay u baahan tahay waqti badan in lagu tababaro RNNs. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo bandhignaa shabakado neurada ah oo soo socda (SRNNs), taas oo lagu simi karo si loo kala gooyo isbedelka dabaqa badan. SRNNs waxay awood u yeelan karaan macluumaadka heerka sare ee lagu heli karo tallaalo kala duduwan oo ay leeyihiin parameters yar oo dheer ah. Waxaynu caddaynaynaa in caadiga ah RNN waa xaalad gaar ah ee SRNN markaynu isticmaalno waxqabadka linear. Isbedelka qalabka soo deganaanshaha la'aanta SRNNs waa 136 jeer oo u dhaqdhaqaaqsan RNNs, waxayna noqon karaan dhaqso marka aan tababarinno xilliyada dheer. Imtixaanka ku qoran lix baaritaanka calibta digtoonaanta ah waxay muujiyaan in SRNNs ay gaadhaan wax ka wanaagsan sameyn karto standard RNNs.", 'sv': 'Återkommande neurala nätverk har uppnått stor framgång i många NLP-uppgifter. Men de har svårt att parallellisera på grund av den återkommande strukturen, så det tar mycket tid att träna RNN. I denna uppsats introducerar vi skivade återkommande neurala nätverk (SRNNs), som skulle kunna parallelliseras genom att skära sekvenserna i många subsecvenser. SRNN har förmågan att få information på hög nivå genom flera lager med få extra parametrar. Vi bevisar att standard RNN är ett specialfall för SRNN när vi använder linjära aktiveringsfunktioner. Utan att ändra de återkommande enheterna är SRNN 136 gånger så snabba som standard RNN och kan vara ännu snabbare när vi tränar längre sekvenser. Experiment på sex storskaliga sentimentalanalysdatauppsättningar visar att SRNN uppnår bättre prestanda än standard RNN.', 'ta': 'மறுநிகழ்ந்த புதிய பிணைய வலைப்பின்னல்கள் பல NLP பணிகளில் பெரிய வெற்றியடைந்தது. ஆனால் திரும்ப அமைப்பு காரணத்தால் ஒப்பிடுவதில் அவர்களுக்கு கடினம் உள்ளது, எனவே RNNs பயிற்சி செய்ய அதிகமான நேரம் தேவை. இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் மீண்டும் திரும்ப நெருக்கிய வலைப்பின்னல்களை (SRNNs) குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இது பல துணுக்குகளில் வரிசைகளை ஒ SRNNs கூடுதல் அளபுருக்கள் கொண்ட பல அடுக்குகள் மூலம் உயர் நிலையில் தகவலை பெற முடியும். நாங்கள் வரிசை செயல்பாடுகளை பயன்படுத்தும்போது SRNN ஒரு சிறப்பு விஷயம் என்பதை நாம் நிரூபிக்கிறோம். நிகழ்வு அலகுகளை மாற்றாமல், SRNs என்பது இயல்பான RNs என்பது 136 மடங்கு வேகமாக இருக்கும். நாம் நீண்ட வரிசைகளை பயிற்சி செய்யும் போது அதிகம Name', 'ur': 'دوبارہ نیورال نیٹورک بہت سے NLP کاموں میں بڑی موفقیت پیدا ہوئی ہے۔ لیکن ان کے لئے دوبارہ ساختار کی وجہ سے parallelization میں مشکل ہے، تو RNN کی تعلیم کے لئے بہت وقت لازم ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے اسلایٹ ریکورنٹ نیورال نیٹورک (SRNNS) کو معلوم کر دیا ہے، جو کئی سٹکونس میں سٹکونس ڈالنے کے ذریعہ مشابہ ہو سکتا ہے۔ SRNS کے پاس بہت سی لائر کے ذریعہ بہت سے پارامتر کے ساتھ اوپر لائل معلومات حاصل کرنے کی قابلیت ہے. ہم ثابت کر رہے ہیں کہ استاندارد RNN SRNN کی ایک مخصوص کیس ہے جب ہم linear activation functions استعمال کرتے ہیں. اور جب ہم دوبارہ تکرار کرنے والے یونیٹوں کو بدلنے کے بغیر، SRNNs 136 دفعہ ایسے ہیں جو استاندارد RNNs کے برابر تیز ہے اور جب ہم دور ترکیب تکرار کرتے ہیں تو بھی تیز تر ہوسکتے ہیں۔ چھ بڑے اسکیل سنٹمنٹ تحلیل ڈیٹ سٹ پر تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ SRNs استاندارڈ رن سے بہتر عمل حاصل کرتی ہیں.', 'uz': "Davom etilgan tarmoq tarmoqlari NLP vazifalarda juda muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli topdi. Lekin ular qaytadan qo'llangan tizim sababini tenglashda qiyin bo'ladi, shunday qilib RNNS'ni o'rganish uchun ko'p vaqt kerak. Bu qogʻozda qaytadan davom etilgan neyron tarmoqlarini (SRNNS) ishlab chiqaramiz. Bu sonlarni ko'p cheksiz cheksizga qo'yish mumkin. @ info Biz oddiy RNN'ning andoza narsa SRNN'ning maxsus holatidir, biz liney aktiv funksiyalaridan foydalanayotganda. @ info: whatsthis Experiments on six large-scale sentiment analysis datasets show that SRNNs achieve better performance than standard RNNs.", 'vi': 'Liên tiếp các mạng thần kinh đã đạt được thành công lớn trong nhiều công việc. Tuy nhiên, họ có khó khăn trong việc đồng loạt vì cấu trúc thường xuyên, nên cần rất nhiều thời gian để huấn luyện RNN. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu các mạng thần kinh thường nhật (SR), có thể tương đồng với việc cắt các chuỗi trong nhiều dạng phụ tùng. S.R.T. có khả năng cung cấp thông tin cấp cao qua nhiều lớp với vài tham số phụ. Chúng tôi chứng minh RNN tiêu chuẩn là một trường hợp đặc biệt của SR-N khi chúng tôi sử dụng chức năng kích hoạt tuyến tính. Không thay đổi các đơn vị thường nhật, SR-66 với tốc độ 66 như RNN chuẩn và có thể còn nhanh hơn khi chúng ta luyện dãy dài hơn. Thí nghiệm trên sáu nhà dữ liệu phân tích đa cảm trên diện rộng cho thấy SR có hiệu suất tốt hơn RNN tiêu chuẩn.', 'bg': 'Повтарящите се невронни мрежи са постигнали голям успех в много задачи на НЛП. Въпреки това, те имат трудности в паралелизацията поради повтарящата се структура, така че отнема много време за обучение на RNN. В тази статия ние въвеждаме резени повтарящи се невронни мрежи (СРН), които могат да бъдат успоредни чрез разрязване на последователностите в много подсеквения. СРН имат способността да получават информация от високо ниво чрез няколко слоя с няколко допълнителни параметри. Доказваме, че стандартният RNN е специален случай на SRNN, когато използваме линейни активиращи функции. Без да променят повтарящите се единици, SRNN са 136 пъти по-бързи от стандартните RNN и могат да бъдат дори по-бързи, когато тренираме по-дълги последователности. Експериментите върху шест масиви от данни за анализ на сентимента показват, че СРН постигат по-добра производителност от стандартните RNN.', 'hr': 'Ponovne neurone mreže postigle su veliki uspjeh u mnogim zadacima NLP-a. Međutim, oni imaju teškoće u parallelizaciji zbog rekonstrukcije strukture, tako da je potrebno mnogo vremena za treniranje RNN-a. U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezervirane neuralne mreže (SRNNs), koje bi mogle biti parallelizirane prekidanjem sekvencija u mnoge sekvence. SRNN imaju sposobnost dobiti informacije o visokoj razini kroz višestruke slojeve s nekoliko dodatnih parametara. Dokazujemo da je standardni RNN poseban slučaj SRNN kada koristimo linearne aktivacijske funkcije. Bez promjene ponovnih jedinica, SRNNs je 136 puta brže nego standardni RNN-ovi i može biti brže kada treniramo duže sekvence. Eksperimenti na šest velikih analiza osjećaja pokazuju da SRNN postignu bolju učinku od standardnih RNN-a.', 'da': "Tilbagevendende neurale netværk har opnået stor succes i mange NLP-opgaver. Men de har svært ved parallelisering på grund af den tilbagevendende struktur, så det tager meget tid at træne RNN'er. I denne artikel introducerer vi udskårne tilbagevendende neurale netværk (SRNNs), som kunne paralleliseres ved at skære sekvenserne i mange undersøgelser. SRNN'er har evnen til at få oplysninger på højt niveau gennem flere lag med få ekstra parametre. Vi beviser, at standard RNN er et specielt tilfælde af SRNN, når vi bruger lineære aktiveringsfunktioner. Uden at ændre de tilbagevendende enheder er SRNNs 136 gange så hurtige som standard RNN'er og kunne være endnu hurtigere, når vi træner længere sekvenser. Eksperimenter med seks store sentiment analysedatasæt viser, at SRNN'er opnår bedre ydeevne end standard RNN'er.", 'nl': "Recurrente neurale netwerken hebben veel succes geboekt in veel NLP-taken. Ze hebben echter moeite met parallellisatie vanwege de terugkerende structuur, dus het kost veel tijd om RNN's te trainen. In dit artikel introduceren we sliced recidiviering neural networks (SRNN's), die kunnen worden parallelliseerd door de sequenties in vele subsequenties te snijden. SRNN's hebben de mogelijkheid om informatie op hoog niveau te verkrijgen via meerdere lagen met weinig extra parameters. We bewijzen dat de standaard RNN een speciaal geval is van de SRNN wanneer we lineaire activeringsfuncties gebruiken. Zonder de terugkerende eenheden te veranderen, zijn SRNN's 136 keer zo snel als standaard RNN's en zouden ze zelfs sneller kunnen zijn als we langere sequenties trainen. Experimenten op zes grootschalige sentimentanalyse datasets tonen aan dat SRNN's betere prestaties behalen dan standaard RNN's.", 'de': 'Wiederkehrende neuronale Netze haben in vielen NLP-Aufgaben große Erfolge erzielt. Allerdings haben sie Schwierigkeiten bei der Parallelisierung wegen der wiederkehrenden Struktur, so dass es viel Zeit braucht, RNNs zu trainieren. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir Sliced Recidiviering Neuronal Networks (SRNNs) vor, die parallelisiert werden könnten, indem die Sequenzen in viele Subsequenzen zerlegt werden. SRNNs haben die Fähigkeit, hochrangige Informationen über mehrere Ebenen mit wenigen zusätzlichen Parametern zu erhalten. Wir beweisen, dass der Standard-RNN ein Sonderfall des SRNN ist, wenn wir lineare Aktivierungsfunktionen verwenden. Ohne die wiederkehrenden Einheiten zu ändern, sind SRNNs 136-mal so schnell wie Standard-RNNs und könnten sogar schneller sein, wenn wir längere Sequenzen trainieren. Experimente an sechs großen Stimmungsanalyse-Datensätzen zeigen, dass SRNNs eine bessere Leistung als Standard-RNNs erzielen.', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای عصبی دوباره موفقیت بزرگی در بسیاری از کارهای NLP به دست آورده\u200cاند. با این حال، آنها به خاطر ساختار تکرار مشکلی دارند، بنابراین زمان زیادی برای آموزش RNN نیاز دارد. در این کاغذ، شبکه های عصبی تکرار تکرار شده (SRNNs) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، که می\u200cتواند از طریق ترکیب\u200cها به بسیاری از زیستکانس\u200cها متصل شود. SRNN توانایی داشته باشد که اطلاعات سطح بالا را از طریق لایه\u200cهای چندتا با چند پارامتر اضافه دریافت کند. ما ثابت می کنیم که RNN استاندارد یک پرونده خاص از SRNN است وقتی از فعالیت های خطی استفاده می کنیم. بدون تغییر واحدهای تکرار، SRNNs 136 برابر سریع تر از RNN استاندارد هستند و می توانند هنگامی که ما مدت طولانی را آموزش می دهیم سریع تر باشند. تجربه\u200cهایی روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای تحلیل احساسات بزرگ در مقیاس بزرگ نشان می\u200cدهند که SRNN به عملکرد بهتر از RNN استاندارد رسیده است.', 'id': 'Jaringan saraf yang berkembang telah mencapai sukses besar dalam banyak tugas NLP. Namun, mereka memiliki kesulitan dalam paralelisasi karena struktur yang berulang, sehingga butuh banyak waktu untuk melatih RNN. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan jaringan saraf yang berkurang terpotong (SRNN), yang dapat bersamaan dengan memotong urutan ke dalam banyak subsequensi. SRNNs have the ability to obtain high-level information through multiple layers with few extra parameters.  Kita membuktikan bahwa RNN standar adalah kasus khusus dari SRNN ketika kita menggunakan fungsi aktivasi linear. Tanpa mengubah unit recurrent, SRNN 136 kali lebih cepat dari RNN standar dan bahkan lebih cepat ketika kita melatih urutan yang lebih panjang. Eksperimen pada enam set data analisis sentimen skala besar menunjukkan bahwa SRNN mencapai prestasi yang lebih baik dari RNN standar.', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa uraia unaoendelea umefanikiwa mafanikio makubwa katika kazi nyingi za NLP. Hata hivyo, wanakuwa na vigumu kulinganisha kwa sababu ya muundo unaoendelea, kwa hiyo inachukua muda mwingi wa kufundisha RNN. Katika karatasi hii, tunaonyesha mitandao ya neura yanayoendelea kwa mara nyingi (SRNN), ambayo inaweza kulinganishwa kwa kupunguza mfululizo katika viungo vingi. Watu wa SRNN wana uwezo wa kupata taarifa za juu kupitia vifaa vingi vingi vya ziada. Tunashiria kuwa kiwango cha RNN ni kesi maalum ya SRNN wakati tunatumia shughuli za siri. Bila kubadilisha vifaa vinavyoendelea, SRNN ni mara 136 kwa haraka kama RNN na inaweza kuwa haraka zaidi pale tunapojifunza mfululizo wa muda mrefu. Majaribio juu ya taarifa za uchambuzi wa hisia sita kubwa zinaonyesha kuwa SRNN hupata ufanisi mzuri zaidi ya RNN.', 'ko': '반복 신경 네트워크는 많은 NLP 작업에서 큰 성공을 거두었다.그러나 역귀구조 때문에 병행화에 어려움이 있어 RNN을 훈련하는 데 많은 시간이 걸린다.본고에서는 서열을 여러 개의 하위 서열로 나누어 병행화할 수 있는 절편귀속신경망(SRNN)을 소개했다.SRNN은 여러 계층을 통해 높은 수준의 정보를 얻을 수 있는 능력을 가지고 있으며, 아주 적은 추가 매개 변수만 필요로 한다.우리가 선형 활성화 함수를 사용할 때 표준 RNN이 SRNN의 특례라는 것을 증명했다.중복성 단위를 바꾸지 않은 상태에서 SRNN의 속도는 표준 RNN의 136배로, 우리가 더 긴 서열을 훈련할 때 SRNN이 더 빨라질 수 있다.6개의 대규모 정서 분석 데이터 세트에서의 실험은 SRNN이 표준 RNN보다 더 좋은 성능을 가지고 있음을 나타냈다.', 'af': "Herhaalde neuralnetwerke het groot sukses in baie NLP-opdragte bereik. Maar hulle het moeilikheid in parallelisering vanweë die herhaalde struktuur, sodat dit neem baie tyd om RNN te trein. In hierdie papier, introduseer ons die slippe herhaalde neuralnetwerke (SRNN), wat kon paralleliseer word deur die sekvens in baie subkvense te slippe. SRNs het die moontlik om hoë vlak inligting te kry deur veelvuldige laag met paar ekstra parameters. Ons bevestig dat die standaard RNN 'n spesiaal Kas van die SRNN is wanneer ons lineêre aktivering funksies gebruik. Sonder om die herhaalde eenhede te verander, is SRNN 136 maal so vinnig as standaard RNN en kan selfs vinniger wees wanneer ons langer sekwensies trein. Eksperimente op ses groot skaal sentimentanaliseerdatasse vertoon dat SRNs beter funksie bereik as standaard RNN.", 'tr': "NLP täzeliklerinde ýene-de agşamlyk täzelikleri başarmady. Ýöne, tekrarly strukturyň sebäbi parallelizanyň kynçylygynda kynçylyk bar, şonuň üçin RNN otlamak üçin köp wagt gerek. Bu kagyzda, ýene-de süýşikli näyral şebekleri (SRNN) girdirip, bu sequenceleri birnäçe sequencelere süýşirip çykyp biler. SRNlar birnäçe ilat kalamlary bilen ýokary dereje maglumaty almaga başarýarlar Biz standart RNN hat aktiwitaty fonksiyonlary ulananda SRNN'iň has hasaplanyşyny barlaýarys. Rekursiv bir sany üýtgetmek bolmasa, SRNN 136 gezek standart RNN hökmünde çalt bolup biler we uzak hatlary öwrenjekde gaty çalt bolup biler. Alty uly ölçekli duýgular analyzasynda örnekler SRNN standart RNN'den gowy ukyp gazanýandygyny görkezýär.", 'am': 'የአሁኑ የኔትራዊ መረብ በብዙ NLP ስራ ውስጥ ትልቅ ድል አግኝተዋል፡፡ However, they have difficulty in parallelization because of the recurrent structure, so it takes much time to train RNNs.  በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በተቆጠሩ የደዌብ መረብ (SRNNs) እናሳውቃለን፡፡ image-action የRNN ደካማው የSRNN ጥያቄ ስብሰባ መሆኑን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የአሁኑን ክፍል ሳይለውጡ SRNs እንደ standard RNNs 136 እጥፍ ነው፣ የረጅም ቁጥጥር ባስተማርን ጊዜ ይቻላል፡፡ የስድስት ትልቅ ስሜትናዊ አስተያየት ዳታተር ማሳየት ፈተናዎች SRNNs ከstandard RNNs እንዲሻል ያሳየቃሉ፡፡', 'sq': 'Rrjetet neurale të përsëritura kanë arritur sukses të madh në shumë detyra NLP. Megjithatë, ata kanë vështirësi në paralelizim për shkak të strukturës së përsëritur, kështu që duhet shumë kohë për të trajnuar RNN. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim rrjete të prera neurale të përsëritura (SRNNs), të cilat mund të paralelizohen duke prerë sekuencat në shumë pasoja. SRNNs have the ability to obtain high-level information through multiple layers with few extra parameters.  Ne dëshmojmë se RNN standard është një rast i veçantë i SRNN kur përdorim funksione aktiviteti linear. Pa ndryshuar njësitë e përsëritura, SRNNs janë 136 herë më të shpejtë se RNN standarde dhe mund të jenë edhe më të shpejtë kur stërvitemi sekuenca më të gjata. Eksperimentet në gjashtë grupe të dhënash të analizave të ndjenjave në shkallë të madhe tregojnë se SRNNs arrijnë performancë më të mirë se RNN standarte.', 'az': "NLP işlərində bir çox böyük başarılı oldu. Halbuki, onlar yenidən yapılara görə parallelizasyonda çətin olanlardır, bu yüzden RNN təhsil etmək üçün çox vaxt lazımdır. Bu kağızda, sıraları çoxlu sıralar içində parçalanaraq parçalanaraq parçalanmış nöral ağları (SRNN) ilə tanıyırıq. SRNN-lər çoxlu səviyyə ilə yüksək səviyyə məlumatlarını çoxlu səviyyə ilə əlaqə edə bilərlər. Biz standart RNN, linear aktif funksiyalarını istifadə etdiyimiz zaman, SRNN'in özel bir məsəli olduğunu kanıtlayırıq. Yenidən dəyişmədən, SRNN standart RNN kimi 136 dəfə hızlı və daha hızlı olar ki, daha uzun sıralar təhsil edirik. Altı böyük ölçülü sentiment analizi verilənlərin təcrübələrinin standart RNN'lərdən daha yaxşı performansı tapacağını göstərir.", 'hy': 'Կարգավոր նյարդային ցանցերը շատ հաջողություն են հասել ՆԼՊ-ի խնդիրների մեջ: Այնուամենայնիվ, նրանք համեմատացման խնդիրներ ունեն կրկնվող կառուցվածքի պատճառով, այնպես որ շատ ժամանակ է պահանջվում ՌՆԹ-ների վարժեցնելու համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք բաժանված կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցեր, որոնք կարող են զուգահեռվել բաժանվելով հաջորդականությունները բազմաթիվ հաջորդականություններով: ՍՌՆ-ները ունի հնարավորություն ստանալ բարձր մակարդակի ինֆորմացիա բազմաթիվ շերտերի միջոցով մի քանի պարամետրերով: Մենք ապացուցուցում ենք, որ ստանդարտ ՌՆԹ-ն է, երբ մենք օգտագործում ենք գծային ակտիվացման ֆունկցիաներ: Առանց փոխելու կրկնվող միավորները, ՍՌՆՆ-ները 136 անգամ ավելի արագ են, քան ստանդարտ ՌՆՆ-ները, և կարող են ավելի արագ լինել, երբ մենք ավելի երկար հաջորդականություններ ենք վարժեցնում: Վեց մեծ մասշտաբ զգացմունքների վերլուծության տվյալների փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ ՍՌՆՆ-ները ավելի լավ արդյունք են ստանում քան ստանդարտ ՌՆՆ-ները:', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক অনেক এনএলপি কাজে বেশী সফল হয়েছে। কিন্তু পুনরাবার কাঠামোর কারণে তাদের সাথে তৈরি করার কষ্ট নেই, তাই RNNs প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য অনেক সময় লাগবে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পুনরাবার নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক (SRNs) পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, যা অনেক সাবকেন্দ্রের মধ্যে মাত্রার মাধ্যমে সংযুক্ত করা যাবে। এসআরএনএন-এর ক্ষমতা আছে বেশ কয়েকটি অতিরিক্ত প্যারামিটারের মাধ্যমে বেশী স্তরের তথ্য পাওয়ার ক্ষমতা। আমরা প্রমাণ করি যে স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার্ডার RNN একটি বিশেষ কেস যখন আমরা লাইনিয়ার কার্যক্রম ব্যবহার করি। প্রত্যাবর্তন ইউনিট পরিবর্তন না করে এসআরএনএন-এর দ্রুত ১৩৬ বার দ্রুত আর আমরা আরো দ্রুত প্রশিক্ষণ করি। ছয়টি বড় আকারের বিশ্লেষণ বিশ্লেষণের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে SRNs স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার রিএনএন এর চেয়ে ভালো কাজ অর্জন করে।', 'bs': 'Ponovne neurone mreže postigle su veliki uspjeh u mnogim zadacima NLP-a. Međutim, oni imaju teškoće u parallelizaciji zbog povratne strukture, tako da je potrebno mnogo vremena da obuče RNN. U ovom papiru predstavljamo rezervne neuralne mreže (SRNNs), koje bi mogle biti parallelizirane prekidanjem sekvencija u mnoge sekvence. SRNN imaju sposobnost da dobiju informacije o visokom nivou kroz višestruke slojeve sa nekoliko dodatnih parametara. Dokazujemo da je standardni RNN poseban slučaj SRNN kada koristimo linearne aktivacije funkcije. Bez promjene povratnih jedinica, SRNNs je 136 puta brže nego standardni RNN-ovi i može biti brže kada treniramo duže sekvence. Eksperimenti na šest velikih analiza sentimenta pokazuju da SRNN postignu bolju funkciju od standardnih RNN-a.', 'ca': "Les xarxes neurals recurrents han aconseguit un gran èxit en moltes tasques del NLP. Tot i així, tenen dificultats en parallelització a causa de l'estructura recurrent, així que triga molt de temps per treinar RNN. In this paper, we introduce sliced recurrent neural networks (SRNNs), which could be parallelized by slicing the sequences into many subsequences.  SRNNs tenen l'habilitat d'obtenir informació d'alt nivell a través de múltiples capes amb pocs paràmetres extra. Demonstrem que el RNA estàndard és un cas especial de l'SRNN quan utilitzem funcions d'activació linear. Sense canviar les unitats recurrents, els RNS són 136 vegades més ràpids que els RNS estàndard i podrien ser encara més ràpids quan entrenem seqüències més llargues. Els experiments de sis conjunts de dades d'anàlisi del sentiment a gran escala mostran que els RNS aconsegueixen millor rendiment que els RNS estàndard.", 'cs': 'Recidivní neuronové sítě dosáhly velkého úspěchu v mnoha úkolech NLP. Nicméně mají potíže s paralelizací kvůli opakující se struktuře, takže trvá mnoho času trénovat RNN. V tomto článku představujeme řezané rekurentní neuronové sítě (SRNN), které by mohly být paralelizovány řezáním sekvencí do mnoha podsekvencí. SRNN mají schopnost získat informace na vysoké úrovni prostřednictvím více vrstev s několika dalšími parametry. Dokazujeme, že standardní RNN je zvláštním případem SRNN, pokud používáme lineární aktivační funkce. Bez změny opakujících se jednotek, SRNN jsou 136krát rychlejší než standardní RNN a mohou být ještě rychlejší, když trénujeme delší sekvence. Experimenty na šesti rozsáhlých datových sadách analýzy sentimentů ukazují, že SRNN dosahují lepšího výkonu než standardní RNN.', 'et': 'Korduvad närvivõrgud on saavutanud paljudes NLP ülesannetes suure edu. Siiski on neil raskusi paralleelsuse tõttu korduva struktuuri, nii et see võtab palju aega koolitada RNN. Käesolevas töös tutvustame lõigatud korduvaid närvivõrke (SRNN), mida saaks paralleelselt lõigata järjestusteks paljudeks alljärgedeks. SRNN-idel on võimalus saada kõrgetasemelist teavet mitme kihi kaudu, millel on vähe lisaparameetreid. Tõestame, et standardne RNN on SRNN erijuhtum, kui kasutame lineaarset aktiveerimisfunktsiooni. Ilma korduvate ühikute muutmata on SRNN 136 korda kiirem kui standardsed RNN ja võivad olla veelgi kiiremad, kui treenime pikemaid järjestusi. Kuue suuremahulise sentimentaalüüsi andmekogumi eksperimendid näitavad, et SRNN-id saavutavad parema jõudluse kui standardsed RNN-d.', 'fi': 'Toistuvat hermoverkot ovat saavuttaneet suurta menestystä monissa NLP-tehtävissä. Heillä on kuitenkin vaikeuksia rinnastaa toistuvan rakenteen vuoksi, joten RNN:ien kouluttaminen vie paljon aikaa. Tässä työssä esitellään viipaloituja toistuvia hermoverkkoja (SRNN), jotka voitaisiin rinnastaa leikkaamalla sekvenssit moniin sekvensseihin. SRNN:illä on kyky saada korkean tason tietoa useiden kerrosten kautta muutamalla ylimääräisellä parametrilla. Todistamme, että standardi RNN on SRNN:n erityistapaus käytettäessä lineaarisia aktivointitoimintoja. Vaihtamatta toistuvia yksiköitä SRNN:t ovat 136 kertaa nopeampia kuin tavalliset RNN:t ja voivat olla jopa nopeampia, kun harjoittelemme pidempiä jaksoja. Kuuden suuren mittakaavan tunneanalyysiaineiston kokeet osoittavat, että SRNN:t saavuttavat paremman suorituskyvyn kuin standardit RNN:t.', 'jv': 'Kernel Nanging, yo sampeyan luwih-luwih sak kelas karo pallelisasi merga sak structural recurring, dadi dumadhi kanggo teka nglakoni DNN. string" in "context_BAR_stringLink paper size Awak dhéwé ngerti bakal iki bakal nggawe barang nggawe DNN iki bakal terus maring cara nggawe Atihan linear Yo wis ngubah perusahaan anyari dadi, paper Name', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Amma kuma suna da mataimaki a daidaita, don haka, yana riƙon lokaci mai amfani da RNNs. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara wa zanen tarakin neura da aka dace (SRNNN), wanda za'a daidaita da shi a cikin ƙararra masu yawa. @ info Munã jarraba cewa tsakanin RNN yana da wata al'amari na SRNN idan za'a yi amfani da aikin aiki na ƙarani. Fãce canza tsarin da aka sake koma, SRNNs yana da 136 sau biyu kamar tsakanin RNN na daidaita kuma yana kasa kasi idan mun yi kõre masu sauri. Tajararin a kan salon bayani na sita mai girma-girma na nuna cewa SRNN's za'a sami mafi alhẽri ga performance ko da daidaita RNNN.", 'he': 'רשתות עצביות חוזרות השיגו הצלחה גדולה במשימות רבות של NLP. בכל אופן, יש להם קשה במשותף בגלל המבנה המחוזר, אז לוקח הרבה זמן לאמן RNN. בעיתון הזה, אנו מכירים רשתות עצביות חוזרות (SRNNs), שיכולות להיות משותפות על ידי לחתוך את השורות לתוראות רבות. SRNN יש את היכולת להשיג מידע ברמה גבוהה דרך שכבות רבות עם כמה פרמטרים נוספים. אנחנו מוכיחים שהRNN הסטנדרטי הוא מקרה מיוחד של SRNN כאשר אנחנו משתמשים בתפקידים הפעילה לינרית. בלי לשנות את היחידות המחזרות, SRNNs הם 136 פעמים מהר יותר ממה RNN סטנדרטי ויכולים להיות אפילו מהר יותר כשאנחנו מאמן רצפים ארוכים יותר. ניסויים על שישה קבוצות נתונים של ניתוח רגשות בקנה מידה גדולה מראים ש SRNNs להשיג ביצועים טובים יותר מאשר RNN סטנדרטי.', 'sk': 'Ponavljajoča se nevronska omrežja so dosegla velik uspeh pri številnih nalogah NLP. Vendar pa imajo težave pri paralelizaciji zaradi ponavljajoče se strukture, zato je potrebno veliko časa za usposabljanje RNN. V tem prispevku smo predstavili rezila ponavljajočih se nevronskih omrežij (SRNN), ki jih je mogoče paralelizirati z rezanjem zaporedij v številne podsekvence. SRNN imajo sposobnost pridobiti informacije na visoki ravni skozi več plasti z nekaj dodatnih parametrov. Dokazujemo, da je standardni RNN poseben primer SRNN pri uporabi funkcij linearne aktivacije. Brez spreminjanja ponavljajočih se enot so SRNN 136-krat hitrejši od standardnih RNN-jev in bi lahko bili še hitrejši, ko treniramo daljše zaporedje. Eksperimenti na šestih obsežnih podatkovnih nizov analize sentimenta kažejo, da SRNN dosegajo boljšo zmogljivost kot standardni RNN.', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་དྲ་རྒྱ་ནི་NLP ལས་ཀ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་གྲུབ་སྐྱོང་བ་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་། འདི་ཚོ་ཕྱོགས་དབུལ་བཟོ་བ་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་ཡོད། རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་རིམ་པ་ཚོར་སྒྲིག་འགོད་དང་། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འོད་ལྟ་བུའི་རྒྱུད་དུང་མཐུན་པ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་ཡིན། SRNNs have the ability to obtain high-level information through multiple layers with few extra parameters. We prove that the standard RNN is a special case of the SRNN when we use linear activation functions. དང་གཅིག་པུ་མ་བསྒྱུར་བའི་ཆ་ཤས་ལ་འགྱུར་བ་མེད་པར་ SRNNs ནི་འགྱུར་བའི་ཚད་རྗེས་སུ་འབྱུར་བའི་ཚད་ལྡན་གྱི་འགྱུར སྒེར་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་ཐོག་པའི་སྐད་ཆ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་ཕྱོགས་ཉེན་པས།'}
{'en': 'Using J-K-fold Cross Validation To Reduce Variance When Tuning NLP Models', 'ar': 'استخدام J-K-fold Cross Validation لتقليل التباين عند ضبط نماذج البرمجة اللغوية العصبية (NLP)', 'pt': 'Usando a validação cruzada J-K-fold para reduzir a variação ao ajustar modelos de PNL', 'fr': 'Utilisation de la validation croisée J-K pour réduire la variance lors du réglage de modèles NLP', 'es': 'Uso de la validación cruzada J-K-fold para reducir la varianza al ajustar los modelos de PNL', 'ja': 'NLPモデルをチューニングする際の差異を減らすためのJ - K - Foldクロスバリデーションの使用', 'hi': 'एनएलपी मॉडल ट्यूनिंग करते समय विचरण को कम करने के लिए जे-के-फोल्ड क्रॉस सत्यापन का उपयोग करना', 'zh': '用 J-K 折叠交验以减调 NLP 模形之方差', 'ru': 'Использование J-K-кратной перекрестной проверки для уменьшения дисперсии при настройке моделей NLP', 'ga': 'Trasbhailíochtú J-K-fold a Úsáid Chun Athraitheas a Laghdú Nuair a bhíonn Múnlaí NLP á dTiúnadh', 'el': 'Χρήση διασταυρούμενης επικύρωσης J-Κ-πτυχής για να μειώσει την παραλλαγή κατά τη ρύθμιση των μοντέλων', 'hu': 'J-K-fold kereszthitelesítés használata NLP modellek hangolásakor a változás csökkentésére', 'ka': 'J- K- fold კრესტის გავალიდაციის გამოყენება NLP მოდელების შემცირებისთვის გამოყენება', 'it': 'Utilizzo della convalida incrociata J-K-fold per ridurre la variazione durante la sintonizzazione dei modelli NLP', 'kk': 'NLP үлгілерін кеңейту үшін J- K- fold көздеген қарсы тексеру қолданылады', 'lt': 'J K kryžminio patvirtinimo naudojimas siekiant sumažinti skirtumą koreguojant NLP modelius', 'ml': 'Using J-K-fold Cross Validation To Reduce Variance When Tuning NLP Models', 'ms': 'Mengguna Pengesahan Salib J-K-fold untuk mengurangi Perubahan Bila Menyesuai Model NLP', 'mt': 'L-użu ta’ validazzjoni inkroċjata J-K-fold biex titnaqqas il-varjanza meta jiġu aġġustati l-mudelli NLP', 'mk': 'Користење на J- K- поврзана крсто- валидација за намалување на варијансата при приспособувањето на NLP моделите', 'ro': 'Utilizarea validării încrucișate J-K-fold pentru a reduce variația la reglarea modelelor NLP', 'sr': 'Koristenje J-K-fold krstovne validacije za smanjenje varijansa kada podešavaju NLP modele', 'mn': 'NLP загваруудыг багасгах үед J-K-fold Cross validation ашиглах', 'no': 'Bruk J- K- fold kryss- validering for å redusera variansen når du tuner NLP- modeller', 'pl': 'Korzystanie z walidacji krzyżowej J-K-fold w celu zmniejszenia różnic podczas dostrajania modeli NLP', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'J-K-fold Cross Validation کا استعمال کرتا ہے NLP موڈل کو تنگ کرنے کے لئے ویرینس کم کرنے کے لئے', 'so': 'Using J-K-fold Cross Validation To Reduce Variance When Tuning NLP Models', 'sv': 'Använda J-K-fold korsvalidering för att minska variationen vid justering av NLP-modeller', 'ta': 'NLP மாதிரிகளை உபயோகிக்கும் போது மாறியை குறை', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Dùng sự xác thực xuyên chữ J-K để giảm sự biến đổi khi in mẫu mã NLP.', 'bg': 'Използване на кръстосана валидация за намаляване на вариациите при настройване на модели', 'nl': 'J-K-vouw kruisvalidatie gebruiken om variatie te verminderen bij het afstemmen van NLP-modellen', 'da': 'Brug af J-K-fold krydsverifikation til at reducere variationen ved justering af NLP-modeller', 'de': 'Verwendung der J-K-Falz-Kreuzvalidierung zur Verringerung der Varianz beim Tuning von NLP-Modellen', 'id': 'Using J-K-fold Cross Validation To Reduce Variance When Tuning NLP Models', 'fa': 'استفاده از ارزیابی کروس J- K- fold برای کاهش Variance در تنظیم مدل NLP', 'hr': 'Koristeći J-K-fold križ validaciju za smanjenje varijansa kada prilagođava NLP modele', 'ko': 'NLP 모델을 조정할 때 J-K 축소 교차 검증을 사용하여 방차 감소', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i Validacionit Kryqësor J-K-fold për të reduktuar variacionin kur rregullohen modelet NLP', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia Uchunguzi wa Msalaba wa J-K Kupunguza Mabadiliko', 'tr': 'NLP nusgalary düşürmek üçin J-K-fold Çapraz Jemi ullanýar', 'af': 'Gebruik J- K- fold Kruis Geldigheidsverklaring Na Redigeer Verandering Wanneer Tuning NLP Modelle', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով Ջ-Կ-անգամ խաչը ստուգում, որպեսզի նվազեցնենք տարբերությունը, երբ հարմարվում են ՆԼՊ մոդելները', 'az': 'NLP modell톛rini Tuning ed톛rk톛n varians azaltmaq 칲칞칲n J-K-fold Cross Validation qullan캼l캼r', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'ca': 'Utilitzant la validació cruzada J-K per reduir la variació quan ajustes els models NLP', 'cs': 'Použití J-K-fold křížové validace ke snížení odchylky při ladění NLP modelů', 'bn': 'NLP মডেল টিউনিং করার সময় পার্থক্য কমানোর জন্য জে- কে- ফোল্ড ক্রস পরীক্ষা ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে', 'fi': 'J-K-fold ristivahvistuksen käyttäminen vaihtelun vähentämiseksi NLP-malleja viritettäessä', 'et': 'J-K-foldi ristvalideerimise kasutamine erinevuse vähendamiseks NLP mudelite häälestamisel', 'bs': 'Koristi J-K-fold krstovnu validaciju da smanji varijant kada prilagodi NLP modele', 'he': 'Using J-K-fold Cross Validation To Reduce Variance When Tuning NLP Models', 'sk': 'Uporaba navzkrižnega preverjanja J-K-fold za zmanjšanje odstopanj pri nastavitvi modelov NLP', 'ha': '@ action', 'jv': 'tutorial_basic', 'bo': 'J-K-fold Cross Validation To reduce Variance When Tuning NLP Models'}
{'en': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) is a popular method for estimating the true performance of machine learning models, allowing model selection and parameter tuning. However, the very process of CV requires random partitioning of the data and so our performance estimates are in fact stochastic, with variability that can be substantial for natural language processing tasks. We demonstrate that these unstable estimates can not be relied upon for effective parameter tuning. The resulting tuned parameters are highly sensitive to how our data is partitioned, meaning that we often select sub-optimal parameter choices and have serious reproducibility issues. Instead, we propose to use the less variable J-K-fold CV, in which J independent K-fold cross validations are used to assess performance. Our main contributions are extending J-K-fold CV from performance estimation to parameter tuning and investigating how to choose J and K. We argue that variability is more important than bias for effective tuning and so advocate lower choices of K than are typically seen in the NLP literature and instead use the saved computation to increase J. To demonstrate the generality of our recommendations we investigate a wide range of case-studies : sentiment classification (both general and target-specific), part-of-speech tagging and document classification.', 'ar': 'يعد التحقق من صحة K-fold (CV) طريقة شائعة لتقدير الأداء الحقيقي لنماذج التعلم الآلي ، مما يسمح باختيار النموذج وضبط المعلمات. ومع ذلك ، تتطلب عملية السيرة الذاتية تقسيمًا عشوائيًا للبيانات ، وبالتالي فإن تقديرات الأداء لدينا هي في الواقع عشوائية ، مع تنوع يمكن أن يكون جوهريًا لمهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. نبرهن على أنه لا يمكن الاعتماد على هذه التقديرات غير المستقرة لضبط المعلمات الفعال. تكون المعلمات المضبوطة الناتجة حساسة للغاية لكيفية تقسيم بياناتنا ، مما يعني أننا غالبًا ما نختار خيارات المعلمات دون المستوى الأمثل ولدينا مشكلات استنساخ خطيرة. بدلاً من ذلك ، نقترح استخدام السيرة الذاتية الأقل تنوعًا في J-K-fold ، حيث تُستخدم عمليات التحقق من صحة K-fold المستقلة لتقييم الأداء. تتمثل مساهماتنا الرئيسية في توسيع السيرة الذاتية لـ J-K-fold من تقدير الأداء إلى ضبط المعلمات والتحقيق في كيفية اختيار J و K. ونجادل بأن التباين أكثر أهمية من التحيز للضبط الفعال وبالتالي ندعو إلى خيارات أقل لـ K مما يُرى عادةً في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية الأدب وبدلاً من ذلك استخدم الحسابات المحفوظة لزيادة J. لإثبات عمومية توصياتنا ، نقوم بالتحقيق في مجموعة واسعة من دراسات الحالة: تصنيف المشاعر (العامة والخاصة بالهدف) ، وعلامات جزء من الكلام ، وتصنيف المستندات.', 'fr': "La validation croisée (CV) K-fold est une méthode populaire pour estimer les performances réelles des modèles d'apprentissage automatique, permettant la sélection du modèle et le réglage des paramètres. Cependant, le processus même du CV nécessite un partitionnement aléatoire des données. Nos estimations de performance sont donc en fait stochastiques, avec une variabilité qui peut être importante pour les tâches de traitement du langage naturel. Nous démontrons que ces estimations instables ne peuvent pas être utilisées pour régler efficacement les paramètres. Les paramètres ajustés qui en résultent sont très sensibles à la façon dont nos données sont partitionnées, ce qui signifie que nous sélectionnons souvent des choix de paramètres sous-optimaux et que nous avons de sérieux problèmes de reproductibilité. Au lieu de cela, nous proposons d'utiliser le CV J-K-fold moins variable, dans lequel des validations croisées indépendantes du facteur K sont utilisées pour évaluer les performances. Nos principales contributions sont l'extension du CV J-K de l'estimation des performances à l'ajustement des paramètres et l'étude de la façon de choisir J et K. Nous soutenons que la variabilité est plus importante que le biais pour un réglage efficace et préconisons donc des choix de K plus faibles que ceux généralement vus dans la littérature NLP et utilisons plutôt le Pour démontrer la généralité de nos recommandations, nous étudions un large éventail d'études de cas\xa0: classification des sentiments (à la fois générale et spécifique à une cible), marquage de parties du discours et classification des documents.", 'pt': 'A validação cruzada K-fold (CV) é um método popular para estimar o verdadeiro desempenho de modelos de aprendizado de máquina, permitindo a seleção de modelos e o ajuste de parâmetros. No entanto, o próprio processo de CV requer particionamento aleatório dos dados e, portanto, nossas estimativas de desempenho são de fato estocásticas, com variabilidade que pode ser substancial para tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural. Demonstramos que essas estimativas instáveis não são confiáveis para um ajuste de parâmetro eficaz. Os parâmetros ajustados resultantes são altamente sensíveis à forma como nossos dados são particionados, o que significa que muitas vezes selecionamos opções de parâmetros abaixo do ideal e temos sérios problemas de reprodutibilidade. Em vez disso, propomos usar o CV menos variável de J-K-fold, no qual as validações cruzadas de J-K-fold independentes são usadas para avaliar o desempenho. Nossas principais contribuições são estender o J-K-fold CV da estimativa de desempenho para o ajuste de parâmetros e investigar como escolher J e K. Argumentamos que a variabilidade é mais importante do que o viés para o ajuste eficaz e, portanto, defendemos escolhas mais baixas de K do que normalmente são vistas na PNL literatura e, em vez disso, usamos a computação salva para aumentar J. Para demonstrar a generalidade de nossas recomendações, investigamos uma ampla gama de estudos de caso: classificação de sentimento (geral e específica de destino), marcação de parte do discurso e classificação de documentos.', 'es': 'La validación cruzada (CV) de K veces es un método popular para estimar el rendimiento real de los modelos de aprendizaje automático, lo que permite la selección de modelos y el ajuste de parámetros. Sin embargo, el propio proceso de CV requiere una partición aleatoria de los datos, por lo que nuestras estimaciones de rendimiento son, de hecho, estocásticas, con una variabilidad que puede ser sustancial para las tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Demostramos que no se puede confiar en estas estimaciones inestables para un ajuste efectivo de los parámetros. Los parámetros ajustados resultantes son muy sensibles a la forma en que se dividen nuestros datos, lo que significa que a menudo seleccionamos opciones de parámetros que no son óptimas y tenemos graves problemas de reproducibilidad. En su lugar, proponemos utilizar el CV menos variable J-K veces, en el que se utilizan validaciones cruzadas K veces independientes de J para evaluar el rendimiento. Nuestras principales contribuciones son extender el CV J-K veces desde la estimación del rendimiento hasta el ajuste de parámetros e investigar cómo elegir J y K. Argumentamos que la variabilidad es más importante que el sesgo para un ajuste efectivo y, por lo tanto, abogamos por opciones más bajas de K que las que se ven normalmente en la literatura sobre PNL y, en su lugar, utilizar cálculo ahorrado para aumentar J. Para demostrar la generalidad de nuestras recomendaciones, investigamos una amplia gama de estudios de casos: clasificación de sentimientos (tanto generales como específicos del objetivo), etiquetado de partes del discurso y clasificación de documentos.', 'ja': 'Kフォールドクロスバリデーション（ CV ）は、モデル選択とパラメータチューニングを可能にする、機械学習モデルの真のパフォーマンスを推定するための一般的な方法です。 しかし、CVのプロセス自体にはデータのランダムなパーティショニングが必要であるため、パフォーマンスの推定値は実際には確率的であり、自然言語処理タスクには実質的なばらつきがあります。 これらの不安定な推定値は、効果的なパラメータチューニングに依存できないことを実証した。 結果として生じる調整されたパラメータは、データがどのようにパーティション化されるかに非常に敏感であるため、最適以下のパラメータを選択することが多く、再現性に深刻な問題があることを意味します。 代わりに、変数の少ないJ - K -フォールドCVを使用することを提案します。このCVでは、J個別のK -フォールド交差検証を使用してパフォーマンスを評価します。 私たちの主な貢献は、パフォーマンス推定からパラメータチューニングにJ - K -倍CVを拡張し、JとKを選択する方法を調査することです。私たちは、効果的なチューニングのためのバイアスよりも可変性が重要であると主張しているため、NLPの文献で一般的に見られるよりも低いKの選択肢を提唱し、代わりに保存された計算を使用してJを増加させます。私たちの推奨事項の一般性を示すために、私たちは広範なケーススタディを調査します：センチメント分類（一般的およびターゲット固有の）、スピーチの一部タグ付け、および文書分類。', 'zh': 'K-fold交验者(CV)所以度机器学真性之常用,许择参数调之。 然CV事须随机分区,故能度其实,其可变性于自然语言事可大也。 吾证此不定者估计值不可以有效者参数调之。 以此生调参数敏于分数之分,此吾常择次优参数而有大现性也。 臣等议用可变性小J-K-fold CV,其用J独立K折叠交验以质性能。 吾主献将J-K折叠CV从性能度广至参数调,并究择JK。 臣愚以为调谐有效,可变性重于偏差,故议下NLP文之所见者K择,而用存算以益J。 为证臣等言普遍性,考之广例:情类(类特定),词性表文档类。', 'hi': 'के-फोल्ड क्रॉस सत्यापन (सीवी) मशीन लर्निंग मॉडल के सही प्रदर्शन का अनुमान लगाने के लिए एक लोकप्रिय विधि है, जिससे मॉडल चयन और पैरामीटर ट्यूनिंग की अनुमति मिलती है। हालांकि, सीवी की बहुत प्रक्रिया के लिए डेटा के यादृच्छिक विभाजन की आवश्यकता होती है और इसलिए हमारे प्रदर्शन का अनुमान वास्तव में स्टोकेस्टिक है, परिवर्तनशीलता के साथ जो प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों के लिए पर्याप्त हो सकता है। हम प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि इन अस्थिर अनुमानों को प्रभावी पैरामीटर ट्यूनिंग के लिए भरोसा नहीं किया जा सकता है। परिणामी ट्यून किए गए पैरामीटर इस बात के लिए अत्यधिक संवेदनशील हैं कि हमारे डेटा को कैसे विभाजित किया जाता है, जिसका अर्थ है कि हम अक्सर उप-इष्टतम पैरामीटर विकल्पों का चयन करते हैं और गंभीर पुनरुत्पादन के मुद्दे होते हैं। इसके बजाय, हम कम चर जे-के-फोल्ड सीवी का उपयोग करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जिसमें प्रदर्शन का आकलन करने के लिए जे स्वतंत्र के-फोल्ड क्रॉस सत्यापन का उपयोग किया जाता है। हमारे मुख्य योगदान पैरामीटर ट्यूनिंग के लिए प्रदर्शन अनुमान से जे-के-गुना सीवी का विस्तार कर रहे हैं और जांच कर रहे हैं कि जे और के को कैसे चुना जाए। हम तर्क देते हैं कि परिवर्तनशीलता प्रभावी ट्यूनिंग के लिए पूर्वाग्रह से अधिक महत्वपूर्ण है और इसलिए आमतौर पर एनएलपी साहित्य में देखे जाने की तुलना में K के कम विकल्पों की वकालत करते हैं और इसके बजाय जे को बढ़ाने के लिए सहेजी गई गणना का उपयोग करते हैं। हमारी सिफारिशों की व्यापकता को प्रदर्शित करने के लिए हम मामले-अध्ययन की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला की जांच करते हैं: भावना वर्गीकरण (दोनों सामान्य और लक्ष्य-विशिष्ट), भाग-के-भाषण टैगिंग और दस्तावेज़ वर्गीकरण।', 'ru': 'K-кратная перекрестная валидация (CV) - популярный метод оценки истинной производительности моделей машинного обучения, позволяющий выбирать модели и настраивать параметры. Однако сам процесс CV требует случайного разделения данных, и поэтому наши оценки эффективности на самом деле являются стохастическими, с изменчивостью, которая может быть существенной для задач обработки естественного языка. Мы демонстрируем, что эти нестабильные оценки не могут быть использованы для эффективной настройки параметров. Результирующие настроенные параметры очень чувствительны к тому, как разделяются наши данные, а это значит, что мы часто выбираем неоптимальные параметры и имеем серьезные проблемы с воспроизводимостью. Вместо этого мы предлагаем использовать менее вариабельный CV J-K-fold, в котором J-независимые перекрестные проверки K-fold используются для оценки производительности. Наш основной вклад заключается в расширении J-K-кратного резюме от оценки производительности до настройки параметров и исследовании того, как выбрать J и K. Мы утверждаем, что изменчивость важнее, чем смещение для эффективной настройки, и поэтому выступаем за более низкий выбор K, чем обычно наблюдается в литературе NLP, и вместо этого используем сохраненные вычисления для увеличения J. Чтобы продемонстрировать общность наших рекомендаций, мы исследуем широкий спектр тематических исследований: классификацию настроений (как общих, так и целевых), частичную маркировку речи и классификацию документов.', 'ga': 'Is modh coitianta é tras-bhailíochtú K-huaire (CV) chun fíorfheidhmíocht na múnlaí meaisínfhoghlama a mheas, rud a cheadaíonn roghnú samhlacha agus tiúnadh paraiméadar. Mar sin féin, éilíonn an próiseas CV féin deighilt randamach na sonraí agus mar sin tá ár meastacháin feidhmíochta stochastic, le héagsúlacht is féidir a bheith suntasach do thascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha. Léirímid nach féidir brath ar na meastacháin éagobhsaí seo le haghaidh tiúnadh éifeachtach paraiméadar. Tá na paraiméadair tiúnta dá bharr seo an-íogair maidir leis an gcaoi a roinntear ár sonraí, rud a chiallaíonn gur minic a roghnaíonn muid roghanna paraiméadar fo-optamacha agus go mbíonn fadhbanna tromchúiseacha in-atáirgthe againn. Ina áit sin, tá sé beartaithe againn an CV J-K-huaire nach bhfuil chomh athróg sin a úsáid, ina n-úsáidtear J K-fold tras-bhailíochtaithe neamhspleácha chun feidhmíocht a mheas. Is é ár bpríomhranníocaíochtaí ná CV J-K-huaire a shíneadh ó mheastachán feidhmíochta go tiúnadh paraiméadar agus imscrúdú a dhéanamh ar conas J agus K a roghnú. Áitímid go bhfuil inathraitheacht níos tábhachtaí ná claonadh chun tiúnadh éifeachtach a dhéanamh agus mar sin molaimid roghanna níos ísle K ná mar a fheictear go hiondúil san NLP. litríochta agus ina ionad sin bain úsáid as an ríomhaireacht shábháilte chun J a mhéadú. Chun ginearálta ár moltaí a léiriú déanaimid imscrúdú ar raon leathan cás-staidéir: rangú meon (idir ghinearálta agus sprioc-shonrach), clibeáil pháirteach cainte agus rangú doiciméad.', 'el': "Η διασταυρούμενη επικύρωση Κ (βιογραφικό σημείωμα) είναι μια δημοφιλής μέθοδος για την εκτίμηση της πραγματικής απόδοσης των μοντέλων μηχανικής μάθησης, επιτρέποντας την επιλογή μοντέλου και τον συντονισμό παραμέτρων. Ωστόσο, η ίδια η διαδικασία του βιογραφικού σημείου απαιτεί τυχαία κατανομή των δεδομένων και έτσι οι εκτιμήσεις απόδοσης μας είναι στην πραγματικότητα stochastic, με μεταβλητότητα που μπορεί να είναι ουσιαστική για εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι αυτές οι ασταθείς εκτιμήσεις δεν μπορούν να βασιστούν για τον αποτελεσματικό συντονισμό παραμέτρων. Οι συντεταγμένες παράμετροι που προκύπτουν είναι ιδιαίτερα ευαίσθητες στο πώς χωρίζονται τα δεδομένα μας, πράγμα που σημαίνει ότι συχνά επιλέγουμε υποβέλτιστες επιλογές παραμέτρων και έχουμε σοβαρά προβλήματα αναπαραγωγής. Αντίθετα, προτείνουμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε το λιγότερο μεταβλητό βιογραφικό σημείωμα, στο οποίο χρησιμοποιούνται ανεξάρτητες επικυρώσεις διασταυρούμενου σημείου για την αξιολόγηση των επιδόσεων. Οι κυριότερες συνεισφορές μας είναι η επέκταση του βιογραφικού σημείου από την εκτίμηση απόδοσης στον συντονισμό παραμέτρων και η διερεύνηση του τρόπου επιλογής του και του Κ. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι η μεταβλητότητα είναι πιο σημαντική από την προκατάληψη για τον αποτελεσματικό συντονισμό και γι' αυτό υποστηρίζουμε χαμηλότερες επιλογές του Κ από ό,τι συνήθως παρατηρούνται στη βιβλιογραφία και αντ' αυτού χρησιμοποιούμε τον αποθηκευμένο υπολογισμό για να αυξήσουμε το Για να καταδείξουμε τη γενικότητα των συστάσεών μας Ερευνούμε ένα ευρύ φάσμα περιπτωσιολογικών μελετών: ταξινόμηση συναισθημάτων (γενική και στοχοθετημένη), σήμανση τμημάτων ομιλίας και ταξινόμηση εγγράφων.", 'hu': 'A K-fold keresztvalidálás (CV) egy népszerű módszer a gépi tanulási modellek valódi teljesítményének becslésére, lehetővé téve a modellek kiválasztását és a paraméterek beállítását. Azonban az önéletrajz folyamata az adatok véletlenszerű partícióját igényli, így teljesítménybecsléseink valójában sztochasztikusak, amelyek a természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatok esetében jelentősek lehetnek. Bemutatjuk, hogy ezek az instabil becslések nem támaszkodhatnak a hatékony paraméterek beállításához. Az így kapott hangolt paraméterek nagyon érzékenyek az adataink partíciójára, ami azt jelenti, hogy gyakran választunk ki nem optimális paramétereket, és komoly reprodukálhatósági problémák merülnek fel. Ehelyett javasoljuk a kevésbé változó J-K-fold CV használatát, amelyben J független K-fold keresztvalidációkat használnak a teljesítmény értékelésére. Fő hozzájárulásaink a J-K-fold CV kiterjesztése a teljesítménybecsléstől a paraméterek beállításáig, valamint a J és K kiválasztásának vizsgálata. Úgy érvelünk, hogy a változékonyság fontosabb, mint az elfogultság a hatékony hangolás érdekében, így a K alacsonyabb választási lehetőségeit javasoljuk, mint amit tipikusan látnak az NLP irodalomban, és ehelyett a mentett számítást használjuk J növelésére. Az esettanulmányok széles skáláját vizsgáljuk: érzelmi osztályozás (általános és célspecifikus), beszédrész címkézés és dokumentum osztályozás.', 'kk': 'K- fold көздеген тексеру (CV) деген машина оқыту үлгілерінің шындығын оқыту әдісі, үлгісін таңдау мен параметрлерді баптауға мүмкіндік беретін әдіс. Бірақ CV процесінде деректерді кездейсоқ бөлімдеу керек, сондықтан біздің істеу бағаламаларымыз шындығында stochastic, табиғлық тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларында көбірек болуы мүмкін. Біз бұл бағаламаларды эффективті параметрлерді баптау үшін көмектесуге болмайды деп көрсетедік. Бапталған параметрлер деректеріміздің бөлігін қалай бөліп тұрғанына көп сезімді болады. Сонымен біз көп-оптималдық параметрлерді таңдап, маңызды қайталану мәселелері бар. Осының орнына, J- K- fold CV- нің төменгі айнымалылығын қолдануға мүмкіндік береміз. J тәуелсіз K- fold көлемді тексеру үшін қолданылады. Біздің негізгі қатынасыз J-K-fold CV дегенді жылдамдығынан параметрлерді баптауға және J және K дегенді қалай таңдау үшін зерттеуде келеді. Біз айнымалылығы эффективті баптауға арналған кезде көмектеседі, сондықтан K таңдауларды NLP литературасында қалыпты көрінгеннен төмен таңдау жә Біз көп бөлікті зерттеулерді зерттейміз: сезімдердің классификациясы (жалпы және мақсат белгісінің бөлігі мен құжаттардың классификациясы).', 'ka': 'Name მაგრამ CV-ის მხოლოდ პროცესი მოჭირდება მონაცემების გადაყოფილება და ამიტომ ჩვენი პროცესი მონაცემები ფაქტიურია, რომელიც შეიძლება იყოს ძალიან ძალიან ნაირადი ენის პროცესი დავალებ ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს არსებელი განსაზღვრებები არ შეიძლება იყოს ეფექტიური პარამეტრების განსაზღვრებისთვის. შესაძლებელი პარამეტრები ძალიან სიგრძნობელია, როგორ ჩვენი მონაცემები გაყოფილი, რაც ნიშნავს, რომ ჩვენ ზოგიერთად ვაირჩევთ სპოპტიმალური პარამეტრები და გვაქვს серიგი შემდეგ, ჩვენ გვეძლია გამოყენოთ უფრო ცვლილებული J-K-fold CV, რომელსაც J-ს განსაკუთრებული K-fold კონფიგური გადაწყენება გამოყენებული გამოყენება კონფიგურაციის შესა ჩვენი მნიშვნელოვანი დამატებები J-K-fold CV-ს გაფარდება, როგორ J და K-ს ამოყენება და განსხვავება. გვაქვს, რომ განსხვავებელობა უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ვიდრე ეფექტიური კონფიგურაციისთვის და ამიტომ K-ის დამატებული მონიშვნები, ვიდრე როგორც ტიპულად NLP ლიტერ ჩვენ განსხვავებთ მნიშვნელოვანი კოსტაციების განსხვავება: სენტიმენტის კლასიფიკაცია (both general and target-specific), საუბრის კოსტაცია და დოკუმენტის კლასიფიკაცია.', 'mk': 'К-плочна крстовалидација (CV) е популарен метод за проценка на вистинската перформанса на моделите на машинско учење, овозможувајќи селекција на моделот и налаштување на параметрите. Сепак, самиот процес на CV бара случајно поделба на податоците и затоа нашите проценки на перформансата се всушност стохастични, со варијабилност која може да биде значајна за природните задачи за обработување јазик. Демонстрираме дека овие нестабилни проценки не можат да се потпираат на ефикасно прилагодување на параметрите. Резултатите на прилагодените параметри се многу чувствителни на тоа како нашите податоци се поделени, што значи дека честопати избираме подоптимални параметри и имаме сериозни проблеми со репродуктибилноста. Наместо тоа, предложуваме да се користи помалку променливиот J-K-fold CV, во кој се користат J независни K-fold крстовалидации за проценка на перформансата. Нашите главни придонеси се проширување на J-K-fold CV од проценка на перформансата до промена на параметрите и истражување како да се избере J и K. Аргументираме дека варијабилноста е поважна од предрасуда за ефикасно прилагодување и така застапуваат пониски избори на K отколку што се обично гледаат во NLP литературата и наместо тоа користат зачувани компјутери за зголемување истражуваме широк опсег на случаи-студии: класификација на чувствата (генерална и специфична за цел), одбележување на дел од говорот и класификација на документите.', 'it': "La convalida incrociata K-fold (CV) è un metodo popolare per stimare le reali prestazioni dei modelli di machine learning, consentendo la selezione dei modelli e la messa a punto dei parametri. Tuttavia, il processo stesso del CV richiede partizionamento casuale dei dati e quindi le nostre stime di performance sono infatti stocastiche, con variabilità che può essere sostanziale per le attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Dimostriamo che queste stime instabili non possono essere invocate per un'efficace sintonizzazione dei parametri. I parametri sintonizzati risultanti sono altamente sensibili al modo in cui i nostri dati sono partizionati, il che significa che spesso selezioniamo scelte di parametri non ottimali e abbiamo seri problemi di riproducibilità. Proponiamo invece di utilizzare il CV J-K-fold meno variabile, in cui vengono utilizzate validazioni incrociate J-K-fold indipendenti per valutare le prestazioni. I nostri principali contributi sono l'estensione del CV J-K-fold dalla stima delle prestazioni alla sintonizzazione dei parametri e l'indagine su come scegliere J e K. Sosteniamo che la variabilità è più importante del bias per una sintonizzazione efficace e quindi sosteniamo scelte inferiori di K rispetto a quelle tipicamente viste nella letteratura NLP e invece usiamo il calcolo salvato per aumentare J. Per dimostrare la generalità delle nostre raccomandazioni Investighiamo una vasta gamma di casi di studio: classificazione sentiment (sia generale che target-specific), tag part-of-speech e classificazione dei documenti.", 'lt': 'K kryžminis patvirtinimas (CV) yra populiarus metodas vertinant tikrąjį mašinų mokymosi modelių veiksmingumą, leidžiantis pasirinkti model į ir pritaikyti parametrus. Tačiau pačiam CV procesui reikalingas atsitiktinis duomenų pasidalijimas, todėl mūsų veiklos vertinimai iš tiesų yra stochastiniai ir gali būti labai skirtingi gamtos kalbų apdorojimo užduotims. Mes įrodome, kad negalima remtis šiais nestabiliais skaičiavimais siekiant veiksmingai pritaikyti parametrus. Atitinkami pritaikyti parametrai labai jautrūs mūsų duomenų pasidalijimui, tai reiškia, kad dažnai pasirinksime nepaoptimalius parametrų pasirinkimus ir turime rimtų atkuriamumo problemų. Vietoj to siūlome naudoti mažiau kintamą J-K-fold CV, kuriame vertinant rezultatus naudojami J nepriklausomi K-fold kryžminiai patvirtinimai. Mūsų pagrindiniai įnašai yra išplėsti J-K kartus CV nuo veiklos vertinimo iki parametrų koregavimo ir tirti, kaip pasirinkti J ir K. Mes tvirtiname, kad kintamumas yra svarbesnis nei sąžiningas veiksmingo koregavimo ir todėl palaikome mažesnius K pasirinkimus nei paprastai matoma NLP literatūroje ir vietoj to panaudojame išsaugotą skaičiavimą didinti J. Siekiant įrodyti mūsų rekomendacijų bendrumą tiriame įvairius atvejų tyrimus: jautrumo klasifikavimą (bendrąją ir tikslinę), kalbos dalies žymėjimą ir dokumentų klasifikavimą.', 'mt': 'Il-validazzjoni inkroċjata b’K-fold (CV) hija metodu popolari għall-istima tal-prestazzjoni vera tal-mudelli tat-tagħlim bil-magna, li jippermetti l-għa żla tal-mudell u l-aġġustament tal-parametri. Madankollu, il-proċess stess tas-CV jeħtieġ tqassim każwali tad-dejta u għalhekk l-istimi tal-prestazzjoni tagħna fil-fatt huma stokastiċi, b’varjabilità li tista’ tkun sostanzjali għal kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Aħna nuru li dawn l-istimi instabbli ma jistgħux jissejsu fuq aġġustament effettiv tal-parametri. Il-parametri aġġustati li jirriżultaw huma sensittivi ħafna għall-mod kif id-dejta tagħna hija maqsuma, li jfisser li ħafna drabi nagħżlu għażliet ta’ parametri subottimali u għandna kwistjonijiet serji ta’ riproduċibbiltà. Minflok, qed nipproponu li jintużaw CV b’J-K-fold inqas varjabbli, fejn jintużaw validazzjonijiet inkroċjati b’K-fold indipendenti J biex tiġi vvalutata l-prestazzjoni. Il-kontribuzzjonijiet ewlenin tagħna huma l-estensjoni tas-CV J-K-fold mill-istima tal-prestazzjoni għall-aġġustament tal-parametri u l-investigazzjoni ta’ kif wieħed jagħżel J u K. Aħna jargumentaw li l-varjabilità hija aktar importanti mill-preġudizzju għall-aġġustament effettiv u għalhekk jappoġġjaw għażliet aktar baxxi ta’ K milli jidhru tipikament fil-letteratura NLP u minflok jużaw il-komputazzjoni ffrankata biex iżidu J. Biex juru l-ġeneralit ninvestigaw firxa wiesgħa ta’ studji ta’ każijiet: klassifikazzjoni tas-sentimenti (kemm ġenerali kif ukoll speċifiċi għall-mira), tikkettar ta’ parti mid-diskors u klassifikazzjoni tad-dokumenti.', 'ms': 'Pengesahan salib-lipat K (CV) adalah kaedah populer untuk menghargai prestasi sebenar model pembelajaran mesin, membolehkan pemilihan model dan penyesuaian parameter. Bagaimanapun, proses CV memerlukan sekatan rawak data dan jadi anggaran prestasi kita sebenarnya stokastik, dengan variabiliti yang boleh menjadi penting untuk tugas pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi. We demonstrate that these unstable estimates cannot be relied upon for effective parameter tuning.  Parameter tersesuai yang berasal sangat sensitif kepada bagaimana data kita disedarkan, bermakna bahawa kita sering memilih pilihan parameter sub-optimal dan mempunyai masalah pemulihan serius. Sebaliknya, kami cadangkan untuk menggunakan CV yang kurang variabel J-K-fold, di mana pengesahihan salib K-fold bebas J digunakan untuk menilai prestasi. Suatu kontribusi utama kami adalah memperluas CV J-K-fold dari penghargaan prestasi kepada penyesuaian parameter dan penyelidikan bagaimana untuk memilih J dan K. Kami menyangka bahawa variabiliti lebih penting daripada bias untuk penyesuaian berkesan dan demikian mendukung pilihan lebih rendah K daripada yang biasanya dilihat dalam literatur NLP dan menggunakan komputasi yang disimpan untuk meningkatkan J. Untuk menunjukkan keseluruhan rekomendasi kami kami menyelidiki julat luas kes-kajian: klasifikasi perasaan (sama umum dan sasaran-spesifik), tag-sebahagian-ucapan dan klasifikasi dokumen.', 'no': 'Name Det er imidlertid at CV-prosessen krev tilfeldige partisjonar av data, og så våre utviklingsstatingar er faktisk stokastiske, med variabilitet som kan vera viktig for naturspråkshandsamar oppgåver. Vi demonstrerer at desse ulike estimalane kan ikkje verta tilbakekalla til effektiv innstilling av parametrar. Dette resulterte innstillingane er svært sensitivne til korleis data våre er partisjonalisert. Dette betyr at vi ofte veljer underoptimal parametraval og har alvorleg reproduktivitetsverktøy. I staden foreslår vi å bruka den mindre variabelen J-K-fold CV, der J-uavhengige K-fold kryssvildingar vert brukt for å vurdere utviklinga. Våre hovudbidragar er å utvida J-K-fold CV frå utdanning av utdanning til parametrar og undersøka korleis å velja J og K. Vi argumenterer at variabelen er meir viktig enn forsiktighet for effektivt tuning, og så advokerer lavere val av K enn som normalt vert vist i NLP-literaturen, og i staden bruker lagra datamaskina for å øke J. For å demonstrere genereliteten av våre anbefalingar vi undersøker ein stor rekke av tilfeldige studier: sentimentklassifikasjon (både generell og målspesifikert), del av talemerking og dokumentklassifikasjon.', 'ml': 'മോഡല്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതും പരാമീറ്റര്\u200d ടൂണിങ്ങിങ്ങിനും അനുവദിക്കുന്നതും കെഫോള്\u200dഡ് ക്രിസ്റ്റ് ക്രൂസ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള യഥാ എന്നാലും സിവിയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയുടെ പ്രക്രിയയ്ക്ക് വ്യക്തമായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിഭാഗവിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. അതുകൊണ്ട് നമ്മുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d സ നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു ഈ അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത കണക്കുകള്\u200d സാധ്യതയുള്ള പരാമീറ്ററിന നമ്മുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d എങ്ങനെ ഭിന്നിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നുവെന്ന് വിചാരിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ഫലമായ പരാമീറ്ററുകള്\u200d വളരെ സൂക്ഷ്മമായിരിക്കുന്നു. അത പകരം, നമ്മള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നത് J-K-ഫോള്\u200dഡര്\u200d സിവി ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കുറച്ച് മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അതില്\u200d ജെ സ്വാതന്ത് നമ്മുടെ പ്രധാന പദാനങ്ങള്\u200d J-K-ഫോള്\u200dഡര്\u200d സിവി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് പരാമീറ്ററിങ്ങിലേക്ക് നീട്ടിക്കൊടുക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ജെയും കെയും തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണെന്ന് അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യ വിശാലമായ കേസ് പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നുണ്ട്: വികാരം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d (ജനറലും ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെയും ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെയും ക', 'ro': 'Validarea încrucișată K-fold (CV) este o metodă populară pentru estimarea performanței reale a modelelor de învățare automată, permițând selectarea modelului și reglarea parametrilor. Cu toate acestea, chiar procesul CV necesită partiționarea aleatorie a datelor și astfel estimările noastre de performanță sunt de fapt stocastice, cu variabilitate care poate fi substanțială pentru sarcinile de procesare a limbajului natural. Demonstrăm că aceste estimări instabile nu pot fi bazate pe ajustarea eficientă a parametrilor. Parametrii reglați rezultați sunt foarte sensibili la modul în care datele noastre sunt partajate, ceea ce înseamnă că selectăm adesea alegeri sub-optime ale parametrilor și avem probleme serioase de reproductibilitate. În schimb, propunem să folosim CV-ul mai puțin variabil J-K-fold, în care validarile încrucișate independente J-fold sunt utilizate pentru a evalua performanța. Contribuțiile noastre principale sunt extinderea CV-ului J-K-fold de la estimarea performanței la reglarea parametrilor și investigarea modului de a alege J și K. Susținem că variabilitatea este mai importantă decât părtinirea pentru reglarea eficientă și astfel susținem alegeri mai mici ale K decât cele văzute în literatura de specialitate NLP și, în schimb, utilizăm calculul salvat pentru a crește J. Pentru a demonstra generalitatea recomandărilor noastre Investigăm o gamă largă de studii de caz: clasificarea sentimentelor (atât generală cât și specifică țintei), etichetarea parțial-of-speech și clasificarea documentelor.', 'mn': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) нь машин суралцах загварын үнэн үйлдлийг тодорхойлдох, загварын сонголт болон параметрын тодорхойлдох арга юм. Гэвч CV-ын үйл явц нь өгөгдлийн санамсаргүй хуваалцах хэрэгтэй. Тиймээс бидний үйлдвэрлэлийн тооцоолол нь үнэндээ тооцоололтой. Байгалийн хэлний үйлдвэрлэлийн үйлдвэрлэлд маш чухал боломжтой. Бид эдгээр тогтворгүй тооцоололтуудыг үр дүнтэй параметр шалгаж чадахгүй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Ингээд бидний мэдээллийг хэрхэн хуваагдах талаар маш чухал харагдаж байна. Энэ нь бид ихэвчлэн суб-optimal параметр сонголтыг сонгож, маш чухал үржүүлэлтийн асуудалтай. Үүний оронд бид J-K-fold CV-г бага хувьсагчдыг ашиглах санал болгож байна. J-г хамааралтай K-fold удирдлага ашиглах хэрэгтэй. Бид J болон K-г хэрхэн сонгох талаар J-K-fold CV-г нэмэгдүүлж байна. Бид J болон K-г хэрхэн сонгох вэ гэдгийг судалж байна. Бид олон олон судалгаануудыг судалж байна: мэдрэмжтэй хуваалцлага (ерөнхий болон зорилготой тодорхой), ярианы хэсэг, баримт хуваалцлага.', 'pl': 'Walidacja krzyżowa K-fold (CV) jest popularną metodą oszacowania rzeczywistej wydajności modeli uczenia maszynowego, umożliwiającą wybór modelu i dostrajanie parametrów. Jednak sam proces CV wymaga losowego podziału danych, dlatego nasze szacunki wydajności są w rzeczywistości stochastyczne, z zmiennością, która może być istotna dla zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Wykazujemy, że nie można polegać na tych niestabilnych szacunkach dla skutecznego dostrajania parametrów. Wynikające z nich dostrojone parametry są bardzo wrażliwe na sposób partycjonowania naszych danych, co oznacza, że często wybieramy nieoptymalne parametry i mamy poważne problemy z odtwarzalnością. Zamiast tego proponujemy zastosowanie mniej zmiennego CV J-K-fold, w którym do oceny wydajności wykorzystywane są niezależne walidacje krzyżowe J-fold. Naszym głównym wkładem jest rozszerzenie J-K-fold CV z oszacowania wydajności do dostrajania parametrów oraz badanie sposobu wyboru J i K. Twierdzimy, że zmienność jest ważniejsza niż uprzedzenie dla efektywnego strojenia i dlatego opowiadamy się za niższymi wyborami K niż są zwykle widoczne w literaturze NLP i zamiast tego wykorzystujemy zapisane obliczenia do zwiększenia J. Aby zademonstrować ogólność naszych zaleceń Badamy szeroki zakres studiów przypadków: klasyfikację sentymentów (zarówno ogólną, jak i specyficzną dla celów), tagowanie części mowy oraz klasyfikację dokumentów.', 'so': 'K-fold waa qaab maamul ah oo ku qiimeeya tusaalaha waxbarashada ee dhabta ah, kaas oo u ogolaada doorashada modelalka iyo qaababka qaababka. Si kastaba ha ahaatee xiliga CV waxay u baahan tahay qeybinta macluumaadka si fudud ah, sidaa darteed waxaa qiimeynaya in horumar lagu sameeyo, waxayna leedahay beddelaadka u muhiimsan shaqooyinka baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa in qiimahaan aan awoodin loogama kalsoonaan karo in lagu kalsoonaado mid faa’iido ah oo faa’iido ah. Parameeroyinka la soo jeedo aad bay u jilicsan yihiin sida loo qaybsado macluumaadkayagu, taas oo micnaheedu yahay inaannu marar badan dooranno doorashooyinka parameter hoos-optimal oo aan hayno dhibaato adag oo la xiriira qofka. Waxan badalkeeda ka bilaabaynaa in aan isticmaalno J-K-fold CV oo ka yar, kaas oo lagu isticmaalaa in lagu qiimeeyo bandhigyada koronta J-fold oo xor ah. Kharashyadayada ugu horeeya ayaa ka fidinaya J-K-fold CV-ka kordhiya qiimeynta horumarinta iyo baaritaanka qaabilaadda iyo siduu u dooranayo J iyo K. Waxaynu ka qiiraynaa in beddelaadka ay muhiim u tahay in ka sii muhiimsan tababarada shaqada, sidaas darteed u hagaajiya doorashada hoose ee K-ka sida caadiga ah waxaa laga arki karo qoraalka NLP iyo badalkiisa isticmaala xisaabta la kordhiyey J. waxaynu baaraynaa waxbarasho badan oo kala duduwan: fasaxa maandooriyaha (dhamaan iyo waxyaabaha la gaarayo), qeyb ka mid ah tagsiga hadalka iyo fasaxa dukumentiga.', 'sv': 'K-fold korsvalidering (CV) 채r en popul채r metod f철r att uppskatta den verkliga prestandan hos maskininl채rningsmodeller, vilket m철jligg철r modellval och parameterjustering. Men sj채lva processen med CV kr채ver slumpm채ssig partitionering av data och d채rf철r 채r v책ra prestationsbed철mningar i sj채lva verket stokastiska, med variabilitet som kan vara betydande f철r naturliga spr책kbehandlingsuppgifter. Vi visar att dessa instabila uppskattningar inte kan anv채ndas f철r effektiv parameterjustering. De justerade parametrarna 채r mycket k채nsliga f철r hur v책ra data 채r partitionerade, vilket inneb채r att vi ofta v채ljer suboptimala parameterval och har allvarliga reproducerbarhetsproblem. Ist채llet f철resl책r vi att anv채nda den mindre variabla J-K-fold CV, d채r J oberoende K-fold korsvalideringar anv채nds f철r att bed철ma prestanda. V책ra huvudsakliga bidrag 채r att ut철ka J-K-fold CV fr책n prestationsbed철mning till parameterjustering och unders철ka hur man v채ljer J och K. Vi h채vdar att variabilitet 채r viktigare 채n bias f철r effektiv justering och f철respr책kar d채rf철r l채gre val av K 채n vad som normalt ses i NLP litteraturen och ist채llet anv채nder den sparade ber채kningen f철r att 철ka J. F철r att visa generellheten i v책ra rekommendationer Vi unders철ker ett brett spektrum av fallstudier: sentimentklassificering (b책de allm채n och m책lspecifik), delm채rkning och dokumentklassificering.', 'sr': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) je popularna metoda za procjenu prave funkcije model a učenja mašine, omogućavajući selekciju modela i prilagodbu parametara. Međutim, sami proces CV zahteva nasumično podeljenje podataka i tako da su naša procjena učinkovitosti u stvari stokastična, sa varijancijom koja može biti značajna za zadatke prirodnog obrađivanja jezika. Pokazujemo da se ove nestabilne procjene ne mogu oslanjati na efikasne prilagodbe parametara. Rezultatni parametri su veoma osetljivi na način razdvajanja podataka, što znači da često odaberemo podoptimalne izbore parametara i imamo ozbiljne probleme reproduktivnosti. Umjesto toga, predlažemo da koristimo manje varijante J-K-fold CV, u kojima se koriste J nezavisni K-fold cross validation za procjenu provedbe. Naši glavni doprinosi proširuju J-K-fold CV od procjene učinkovitosti do punjenja parametara i istražuju kako odabrati J i K. Tvrdimo se da je varijancija važnija od predrasude za učinkovito tuniranje i tako advokate manje izbore K nego što se obično viđaju u književnosti NLP i umjesto toga koristite spašenu računovođenje da bi povećali J. Da bismo pokazali generalnost naših preporuka istražujemo širok niz istraživanja slučajeva: klasifikacija sentiment a (i generalna, i ciljna specifična), uloga govora i klasifikacija dokumenta.', 'si': 'Name නමුත්, CV ගේ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව අවශ්\u200dයයෙන් තොරතුරු දත්ත වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200dයයි, ඉතින් අපේ ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාව අවශ්\u200dයය ඇත්තටම ස්ටොකාස්ටික්  අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා මේ අස්ථායිත විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අපේ දත්ත කොහොමද පාර්ටසිකරණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ කියලා ගොඩක් සංවේදනයි, ඒ කියන්නේ අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විශ ඒ වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්නේ J-K-ෆෝල්ඩ් CV වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, J ස්වත්වික K-ෆෝල් අපේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් J-K-ෆෝල්ඩ් CV වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරධාන පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණයෙන් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා J සහ K විශ්නයක් තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වඩා ව අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරන්නේ විශාල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්: සාමාන්\u200dය සහ ඉලක්ෂිත විශේෂයක්, කොටස් කොටස් කිරීමේ ටැග් එක', 'ur': "K-fold cross validation (CV) ایک محبوب طریقہ ہے کہ ماشین سیکھنے کے موڈل کی حقیقی فعالیت کا مطالبہ کریں، موڈل انتخاب اور پارامیٹ ٹونگ کی اجازت دیں. However, the very process of CV requires random partition of the data and so our performance estimates are actually stochastic, with variability that can be substantial for natural language processing tasks. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ غیرقابل اندازے اثرات پارامیٹ تنظیم کے لئے اعتماد نہیں کر سکتے۔ نتیجۂ تنظیم پارامیٹر ہماری دادہ کیونکر پارتیٹ کیے جاتے ہیں، یعنی ہم اکثر زیادہ اچھی پارامیٹر انتخاب کرتے ہیں اور سنگین پھولائی مسئلہ رکھتے ہیں۔ اس عوض، ہم نے کم متغیر J-K-fold CV کا استعمال کرنا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے، جس میں J independent K-fold cross validations استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں کہ عملکرد کا امتحان کریں. ہماری اصلی حصہ کے ذریعے J-K-fold CV کو عملکرد کی مطالبہ سے پارامیٹ ٹونگ اور K کو کس طرح انتخاب کرنا اور تحقیق کرنا ہے ہم argue that variability is more important than bias for effective tuning and so advocate K's lower choices than typically seen in the NLP literature and instead of saving computation to increase J. to demonstrate the generality of our recommendations ہم ایک وسیع طریقے کے مطالعہ کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں: sentiment classification (both general and target-specific), part-of-speech tagging and document classification.", 'ta': 'K- அடைவு குறிப்பு செலுத்தல் (CV) இயந்திரம் கற்றல் மாதிரிகளின் உண்மையான செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிட ஒரு பிரபலமான முறைமை எனினும், சிவி செயல்பாட்டின் மிகவும் குறிப்பில்லாத பிரிவு தகவலை தேவைப்படுகிறது எனவே எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டின் மதிப்புகள் உண்மையில் தொகுதிய நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் இந்த நிலையான கணக்கீடுகள் வெறும் அளபுரு மூலம் நம்பிக்கை கொள்ள முடியாது. முடிவு குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட அளபுருக்கள் எங்கள் தரவு எப்படி பிரிக்கப்படுகிறது என்பது என்று அர்த்தம் என்னவென்றால் நாம் பெரும்பாலாக உப- optimal அளபு அதற்கு பதிலாக, நாம் குறைந்த மாறி J- K- அடைவு CV ஐ பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும், அதில் J சுதந்தி K- அடைவு குறியீடு செல்லும் செயல்பாட்டை  ஜே- கே- பெருக்கல் சிவி செயல்பாட்டின் மதிப்பிலிருந்து செயல்பாட்டு மதிப்பிட்டு அளபுரு மதிப்புகளை விரிவாக்குகிறது எப்படி தேர்ந்தெடுக்க வேண்டும் என்பதை நாம் விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் மாறுபாடு மாறுப நாம் நிறைய விஷயங்களின் படிப்புகளை ஆய்வு செய்கிறோம்: உணர்வு வகுப்பு (பொது மற்றும் குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட்ட குறிப்பிட', 'uz': "Name Lekin CV jarayonini tarqatish haqida maʼlumotni qismlash kerak, shunday qilib biz bajarish qiymatlarimiz aslida o'zgarishga ega bo'lishi mumkin. Biz buni ko'rsatganimiz, bu qo'llanmagan qiymatlar qo'llanilmaydi. @ info Yani biz J-K-fold CV bilan bir qisqa oʻzgaruvchini foydalanishni talab qilamiz. Biz J-K-ning asosiy qanday parametrlarni tanlash va qidirish uchun J-K-ning qo'shimcha CV ni ajratish va o'rganish mumkin. Biz aytganimiz, variability to'g'ri bo'lish uchun o'zgarishlar juda muhim, shunday qilamiz, K'ning qisqartmalarini odatda NLP littatiyatida ko'rsatish mumkin va J'ni o'zgartirish uchun saqlangan kompyuterni foydalanish mumkin. biz bir necha ta'lim o'qituvchilarini o'rganamiz: hissiyotning darajasini (umumiy va hodisa shaklga), gapirish tugmasining qismi va hujjatning darajasini.", 'vi': 'K-fold cross miếng dán (Cv) là một phương pháp phổ biến để ước lượng thực sự của các mô hình học máy, cho phép chọn mô hình và tinh chỉnh tham số. Tuy nhiên, quá trình siêu âm đòi hỏi sự phân chia ngẫu nhiên dữ liệu, và do đó, khả năng đánh giá khả năng của chúng tôi là ngẫu nhiên, với sự biến thiên văn có thể rất lớn. Chúng tôi chứng minh rằng những ước tính bất ổn này không thể dựa vào khả năng cấp độ. Kết quả của các tham số hoà rất nhạy cảm với cách chia gỡ dữ liệu của chúng tôi, nghĩa là chúng tôi thường chọn các tham số không tối ưu và có vấn đề về khả năng sinh sản nghiêm trọng. Thay vào đó, chúng tôi đề nghị sử dụng CV J-K-gấp lại ít được dùng để đánh giá thành quả Những đóng góp chính của chúng tôi là kéo dài J-K-fold CVC từ dự đoán năng suất tới việc tinh chỉnh và điều tra xem làm thế nào để chọn J và K. Chúng tôi cho rằng sự thay đổi quan trọng hơn khuynh hướng âm nhạc hiệu quả, nên ủng hộ các lựa chọn của K thấp hơn thường thấy trong văn chương NIP, và thay vào đó dùng tính đã lưu để tăng cường J. Để chứng minh tổng thể của những lời khuyên của chúng tôi. Chúng tôi nghiên cứu một loạt các nghiên cứu về trường hợp, phân loại cảm xúc (cả chung lẫn mục tiêu), mô tả và phân loại tài liệu.', 'nl': "K-fold cross validation (CV) is een populaire methode voor het schatten van de werkelijke prestaties van machine learning modellen, waardoor modelselectie en parameterafstemming mogelijk zijn. Echter, het proces van CV vereist willekeurige partitionering van de gegevens en daarom zijn onze prestatieschattingen in feite stochastisch, met variabiliteit die aanzienlijk kan zijn voor natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken. We tonen aan dat deze instabiele schattingen niet kunnen worden gebruikt voor effectieve parameterafstemming. De resulterende afgestemde parameters zijn zeer gevoelig voor hoe onze gegevens worden partitioneerd, wat betekent dat we vaak suboptimale parameterkeuzes selecteren en ernstige reproduceerbaarheidsproblemen hebben. In plaats daarvan stellen we voor om de minder variabele J-K-fold CV te gebruiken, waarin J onafhankelijke K-fold kruisvalidaties worden gebruikt om prestaties te beoordelen. Onze belangrijkste bijdragen zijn het uitbreiden van J-K-fold CV van prestatieschatting naar parameter tuning en het onderzoeken van hoe J en K te kiezen. We argumenteren dat variabiliteit belangrijker is dan bias voor effectieve afstemming en pleiten daarom voor lagere keuzes van K dan normaal gezien in de NLP literatuur en gebruiken in plaats daarvan de opgeslagen berekening om J te verhogen. We onderzoeken een breed scala aan casestudy's: sentiment classificatie (zowel algemeen als doelgericht), part-of-speech tagging en document classificatie.", 'da': 'K-fold cross validering (CV) er en populær metode til at estimere den sande ydeevne af maskinlæringsmodeller, der muliggør modelvalg og parameterjustering. Men selve processen med CV kræver tilfældig opdeling af dataene, og derfor er vores præstationsestimater faktisk stokastiske, med variabilitet, der kan være betydelig for naturlige sprogbehandlingsopgaver. Vi påviser, at disse ustabile estimater ikke kan påberåbes til effektiv parameterjustering. De resulterende tunede parametre er meget følsomme over for, hvordan vores data er partitioneret, hvilket betyder, at vi ofte vælger suboptimale parametervalg og har alvorlige reproducerbarhedsproblemer. I stedet foreslår vi at bruge den mindre variable J-K-fold CV, hvor J uafhængige K-fold krydsgolidationer bruges til at vurdere ydeevnen. Vores vigtigste bidrag er at udvide J-K-fold CV fra præstationsestimering til parametertuning og undersøge, hvordan man vælger J og K. Vi hævder, at variabilitet er vigtigere end bias for effektiv tuning og derfor anbefaler lavere valg af K end normalt ses i NLP litteraturen og i stedet bruge den gemte beregning til at øge J. For at demonstrere den generelle anbefaling Vi undersøger en lang række case-studier: sentiment klassificering (både generel og målspecifik), del-of-speech tagging og dokumentklassificering.', 'hr': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) je popularna metoda za procjenu istinske funkcije model a učenja strojeva, omogućavajući izbor modela i prilagodbu parametara. Međutim, sami proces CV zahtijeva slučajno dijelivanje podataka i tako da su procjene učinkovitosti stokastične, s varijancijom koja može biti značajna za zadatke prirodnog obradivanja jezika. Pokazujemo da se te nestabilne procjene ne mogu oslanjati na učinkovito prilagođenje parametara. Rezultatni parametri su jako osjetljivi na način razdvajanja podataka, što znači da često odaberemo podoptimalne izbore parametara i imamo ozbiljne probleme reproduktivnosti. Umjesto toga, predlažemo koristiti manje promjene J-K-fold CV, u kojima se koriste J nezavisni K-fold cross validati za procjenu učinka. Naši glavni doprinosi proširuju J-K-fold CV od procjene učinkovitosti do punjenja parametara i istražuju kako odabrati J i K. Svjedočimo da je varijantnost važnija od pristrasnosti za učinkovito punjenje i tako odbranite manje izbore K nego što se obično viđaju u književnosti NLP i umjesto toga koristite spašeno računalo kako bi povećali J. kako bi pokazali generalnost naših preporuka istražujemo širok raspon istraživanja slučajeva: klasifikacija osjećaja (obična i specifična ciljeva), označavanja dijela govora i klasifikacija dokumenta.', 'bg': 'К-фолд кръстосано валидиране (КВ) е популярен метод за оценка на истинската производителност на моделите за машинно обучение, позволяващ избор на модели и настройка на параметрите. Въпреки това, самият процес на автобиография изисква случайно разделяне на данните и така нашите оценки за ефективност са всъщност стохастични, с променливост, която може да бъде значителна за задачите по обработка на естествен език. Ние демонстрираме, че тези нестабилни оценки не могат да се разчитат за ефективно настройване на параметрите. Получените настройки параметри са силно чувствителни към начина, по който нашите данни са разделени, което означава, че често избираме недостатъчни избори на параметри и имаме сериозни проблеми с възпроизводимостта. Вместо това предлагаме да се използва по-малко променливата J-K-fold CV, в която J независими K-fold кръстосани валидации се използват за оценка на ефективността. Основните ни приноси са разширяването на стойността от оценката на производителността до настройката на параметрите и проучването как да изберем Ние твърдим, че променливостта е по-важна от отклонението за ефективно настройване и затова се застъпваме за по-нисък избор на К, отколкото обикновено се вижда в литературата на НЛП, а вместо това използваме запазеното изчисление за увеличаване на За да демонстрираме общата стойност на нашите препоръки изследваме широк спектър от казуси: класификация на сантимента (както обща, така и специфична за целта), маркиране на част от речта и класификация на документи.', 'de': 'K-Fold Cross Validation (CV) ist eine beliebte Methode zur Schätzung der tatsächlichen Leistung von Machine Learning Modellen, die Modellauswahl und Parameteroptimierung ermöglicht. Der Prozess des Lebenslaufs erfordert jedoch eine zufällige Aufteilung der Daten und so sind unsere Leistungsschätzungen in der Tat stochastisch, mit Variabilität, die für die Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache erheblich sein kann. Wir zeigen, dass diese instabilen Schätzungen nicht für eine effektive Parameterabstimmung verwendet werden können. Die daraus resultierenden abgestimmten Parameter sind sehr empfindlich für die Partitionierung unserer Daten, was bedeutet, dass wir oft suboptimale Parameter auswählen und ernsthafte Reproduzierbarkeitsprobleme haben. Stattdessen schlagen wir vor, den weniger variablen J-K-Falz CV zu verwenden, bei dem J-unabhängige K-Falz Kreuzvalidierungen zur Leistungsbewertung verwendet werden. Unsere Hauptbeiträge sind die Erweiterung des J-K-fold CV von der Leistungsschätzung bis zur Parameterabstimmung und die Untersuchung der Wahl von J und K. Wir argumentieren, dass Variabilität wichtiger ist als Bias für effektives Tuning und befürworten daher niedrigere K-Wahlmöglichkeiten als typischerweise in der NLP Literatur zu sehen und verwenden stattdessen die gespeicherte Berechnung, um J zu erhöhen. Wir untersuchen eine Vielzahl von Fallstudien: Sentiment-Klassifizierung (sowohl allgemein als auch zielspezifisch), Part-of-Speech-Tagging und Dokumentenklassifizierung.', 'ko': 'K-폴딩 교차 검증(CV)은 모델 선택과 매개변수 조정을 허용하는 머신러닝 모델의 실제 성능을 평가하는 데 자주 사용되는 방법이다.그러나 CV의 과정 자체가 데이터에 대해 무작위로 구분해야 하기 때문에 우리의 성능은 사실상 무작위이고 자연 언어 처리 임무에 있어 매우 큰 가변성을 가진다.우리는 이러한 불안정한 예측이 효과적인 매개 변수 조정에 쓰일 수 없다는 것을 증명한다.이로 인해 발생하는 조정 매개 변수는 데이터의 구분 방식에 매우 민감하다. 이것은 우리가 항상 우수한 매개 변수 선택을 선택하고 심각한 재현성 문제가 존재한다는 것을 의미한다.반면, J의 독립된 K-fold 교차 검증은 성능 평가에 사용되는 변수가 작은 J-K-fold CV를 사용하는 것이 좋습니다.J-K-fold CV를 성능 추정에서 패라메트릭 조정으로 확장하고 J와 K를 어떻게 선택해야 하는지를 연구하는 데 주된 기여를 했다.효과적인 조정에는 편차보다 변이성이 중요하다고 판단해 NLP 문헌에서 흔히 볼 수 있는 것보다 낮은 K선택을 권장하는 대신 절감된 계산을 사용해 J의 보편성을 증대시키기 위해 제안한 보편성을 입증하고자 한다.우리는 대량의 사례 연구를 조사했는데 그것이 바로 감정 분류(일반과 특정 목표 포함), 어성 표시와 문서 분류이다.', 'id': 'Validasi salib K-fold (CV) adalah metode populer untuk memperkirakan prestasi sebenarnya dari model belajar mesin, memungkinkan pemilihan model dan penyesuaian parameter. Namun, proses CV membutuhkan partisi acak dari data dan sehingga perkiraan prestasi kita sebenarnya stokastik, dengan variabilitas yang dapat menjadi substansial untuk tugas proses bahasa alam. Kami menunjukkan bahwa perkiraan yang tidak stabil ini tidak dapat dipercaya untuk pengaturan parameter efektif. Parameter tersebut sangat sensitif pada bagaimana data kita dipartisikan, artinya kita sering memilih pilihan sub-optimal parameter dan memiliki masalah reproduksi serius. Sebaliknya, kami mengusulkan untuk menggunakan CV yang kurang variabel J-K-fold, di mana J independen K-fold cross validation digunakan untuk menilai prestasi. Our main contributions are extending J-K-fold CV from performance estimation to parameter tuning and investigating how to choose J and K. We argue that variability is more important than bias for effective tuning and so advocate lower choices of K than are typically seen in the NLP literature and instead use the saved computation to increase J. To demonstrate the generality of our recommendations  kami menyelidiki jangkauan lebar dari kasus-studi: klasifikasi sentimen (umum dan target-spesifik), bagian dari pembicaraan tagging dan klasifikasi dokumen.', 'fa': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) یک روش محبوب برای ارزیابی واقعی عملکرد مدل یادگیری ماشین است، که اجازه می\u200cدهد انتخاب مدل و تنظیم پارامتر را برگزیند. ولی فرایند CV نیاز به تقسیم داده های تصادفی دارد و بنابراین تقسیم عملکرد ما در حقیقت استوکاستیک هستند، با تغییرات که می تواند برای کار های پردازش زبان طبیعی بسیار بزرگ باشد. ما نشان می دهیم که این تخمین غیرقابل استفاده نمی\u200cتوانند برای تنظیم پارامتر موثر بر آن اعتماد داشته باشند. پارامترهای پارامترهای متصل شده بسیار حساس هستند که اطلاعات ما چگونه تقسیم می شود، یعنی ما اغلب انتخاب انتخاب پارامترهای زیر optimal را انتخاب می کنیم و مشکلات بازگشت جدی داریم. در عوض، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از متغیر کمتر J-K-fold CV استفاده کنیم، که در آن J independent K-fold cross validation برای ارزیابی عملکرد استفاده می\u200cشوند. شرکت اصلی ما دارند J-K-fold CV را از ارزیابی عملکرد به تنظیم پارامتر و تحقیق کردن چگونه انتخاب J و K را انتخاب کنیم. ما می گوییم که تغییرات مهمتر از تغییرات برای تنظیم موثر است و بنابراین انتخاب کمتری از K را محافظت کنیم که معمولاً در ادبیات NLP دیده می شوند و به جای اینکه از محاسبات نجات یافته برای افزایش J استفاده کنیم ما تحقیق یک مجموعه از مطالعه پرونده\u200cها را می\u200cکنیم: مختصات احساسات (both general and target-specific), بخشی از نقاشی سخنرانی و مختصات سند.', 'af': "Name Maar die baie proses van CV benodig willekeurige partisiering van die data, sodat ons prestasie is in werklikheid stokastiek, met veranderlikheid wat betekeurig kan wees vir natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte. Ons bevestig dat hierdie unstable estimaties nie op effektief parameters toestel kan word nie. Die resulteerde tuned parameters is baie sensitief na hoe ons data is partisioneer, beteken dat ons dikwels sub-optimal parameter keuses kies en het ernstige reproduksibiliteit probleme. In plaas, ons voorstel om die minder veranderlike J- K- vou CV te gebruik, waarin J onafhanklike K- vou kruis geldigheidse gebruik word om performance te asseer. Ons hoofbydraaiïngs word J-K-vou CV uitbrei van prestasie estimatie na parameter tuning en ondersoek hoe om J en K te kies. Ons argumenteer dat veranderlikheid is meer belangrik as bias vir effektief tuning en so bevestig minder keuses van K as is tipies gesien in die NLP literaat en in plaas van die gestoor rekenaar om J te vermeerder om die generelheid van ons aanbevelings te wys ondersoek ons 'n groot reek geval-studie: sentiment-klasifikasie (beide algemeen en doel-spesifieke), deel-van-woord-etiketing en dokumentklasifikasie.", 'sw': 'Kusaidiwa kwa mabango ya K-fold (CV) ni njia maarufu ya kutathmini ufanisi wa ukweli wa mifano ya kujifunza mashine, na kusaidia uchaguzi wa modeli na upatikanaji wa parameter. Hata hivyo, mchakato mkubwa wa CV unahitaji kupangwa kwa taarifa na kwa hiyo idadi yetu ya utendaji ni ya ukweli, na mabadiliko yanayoweza kuwa muhimu kwa kazi za upasuaji wa lugha za asili. Tunaonyesha kwamba kadri hizi zisizo imara haziwezi kutegemea kwa ajili ya kuangalia vifaa vyema. Kiparameters kinachotokana na matokeo ni wenye uelewa wa jinsi taarifa zetu zinavyogawanywa, ina maana kwamba mara nyingi tunachagua chaguo la upasuaji na tuna masuala makubwa ya uzazi. Badala yake, tunapendekeza kutumia mabadiliko yanayobadilika zaidi ya CV ya J-K-K, ambapo juhudi huru la kutathmini ufanisi. Our main contributions are extending J-K-fold CV from performance estimation to parameter tuning and investigating how to choose J and K. We argue that variability is more important than bias for effective tuning and so advocate lower choices of K than are typically seen in the NLP literature and instead use the saved computation to increase J. To demonstrate the generality of our recommendations  tunachunguza tafiti mbalimbali za kesi: usambazaji wa hisia (wote wa jumla na hasa), sehemu ya alama za hotuba na usambazaji wa nyaraka.', 'tr': "K-katly karşılaşdyrma (CV) makine öwrenmek modelleriniň dogry performansyny hasaplamak üçin popüler bir yöndür. Bu şekilde örnek saýlamak we parameterler düzenlemesine izin berýär. Ýagna görä, CV-yň özi prosesi ýagdaýynyň sanly bölümlerini gerek bolýar we netijesimiz çözümleri dogry dil işlemegi üçin örän möhüm bolup biler. Biz bu sabitçi hasaplamalaryň etkinlik parametreler düzenlemesi üçin üýtgedilemedigini kanıtlaýarys. Sonuçta çykylýan parameterler, maglumatymyzyň nähili bölümleşendigini aňsatly hasaplanýar. Bu meniň saýlamagymyz köplenç sub-optimal parameterler saýlamak we çykyşlyk bilen aýratylyk meseleleri bar. Bunun yerine, J-K-fold CV'i daha az değişkenli kullanmayı teklif ediyoruz. Bu şekilde J bağımsız K-fold karşılaştırılmak için kullanılır. Biziň esasy gabdalyklarymyz J-K-fold CV'i performans deňlendirmelerinden J we K seçimlerini nädip saýlamaga we barlagyndan uzaklaşdyrylýar. Biz öz üýtgeşiklerimiz effektiv düzenlemek üçin tertiblerden has möhüm diýip pikir edýäris we şonuň üçin K seçimlerini NLP edebiýatynda görkezilýän düşük seçimlerini savun we bu ýerine J-iň üstine saglanýa Bir näçe köp hasaplanja diýip soruşýarys: duýgular klasifikasy", 'hy': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) is a popular method for estimating the true performance of machine learning models, allowing model selection and parameter tuning.  Այնուամենայնիվ, CV-ի գործընթացը պահանջում է պատահական տվյալների բաժանման, և մեր արտադրողականության գնահատումները փաստորեն ստոշատիկ են, որի տարբերակությունը կարող է նշանակալի լինել բնական լեզվի վերլուծության խնդիրների համար: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս անկայուն հաշվարկները չեն կարող հիմնվել արդյունավետ պարամետրերի հարմարեցման համար: Արդյունքում կազմված պարամետրերը շատ զգայուն են մեր տվյալների բաժանման համար, ինչը նշանակում է, որ մենք հաճախ ընտրում ենք ենթաօպտիմալ պարամետրերի ընտրություններ և ունենք լուրջ վերարտադրողականության խնդիրներ: Փոխարենը, մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել ավելի քիչ փոփոխական Ջ-Ք-անգամ CV-ը, որտեղ Ջ անկախ Կ-անգամ խաչը հավասարումները օգտագործվում են արդյունքների գնահատման համար: Մեր հիմնական ներդրումը Ջ-Կ-անգամ CV-ի ընդլայնումն է արդյունավետության գնահատումից մինչև պարամետրերի հարմարեցման և ուսումնասիրելու, թե ինչպես ընտրել Ջ-ը և Քը. մենք փաստարկում ենք, որ տարբերակությունը ավելի կարևոր է, քան արդյունավետ հարմարեցման կողմնականությունը, և այսպես պաշտպանում ենք K-ի ավելի ցածր ընտրությունները, քան սովորաբար տեսնում են մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք մի շարք դեպքերի ուսումնասիրություններ. զգացմունքների դասակարգում (ընդհանուր և նպատակային), խոսքի մասի նշաններ և փաստաթղթերի դասակարգում:', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ምንም እንኳን የCV ፕሮጀክት የዳራዎችን አካፍል እንዲያስፈልጋል እናም የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ስራዎችን ለመቀናቀል የሚችል ተቃውሞ ነው፡፡ እነዚህም ጥያቄዎች በጥያቄ ተግባር ማሰናከል አይችሉም ብለን እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የግንኙነት አካባቢ ምርጫዎች የዳራችን እንዴት እንዲለየቁ ያሳውቃሉ፡፡ በፋንታ የJ-K-ፎርት የክፍለ የክፍለ ጉዳይ የክፍለ ጉዳይ የክፍለ ጉዳይ ማረጋገጫ የሚጠቅሙበት የJ-K-ፎርዶች ክፍል ማረጋገጫ እንዲጠቀሙ እናስባለን፡፡ Our main contributions are extending J-K-fold CV from performance estimation to parameter tuning and investigating how to choose J and K. We argue that variability is more important than bias for effective tuning and so advocate lower choices of K than are typically seen in the NLP literature and instead use the saved computation to increase J. To demonstrate the generality of our recommendations  የሥርዓት ትምህርት ብዙዎችን እናምርመራለን፤ የስሜት ክፍል (አነስተኛዊ እና የጉዳዩ ክፍል), የንግግር ማተሚያ ክፍል እና የሰነድ ክፍል እናደርጋለን፡፡", 'sq': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) është një metodë popullore për vlerësimin e performancës së vërtetë të modeleve të mësimit të makinave, duke lejuar zgjedhjen e modelit dhe rregullimin e parametrave. Megjithatë, procesi i CV kërkon ndarjen e rastësishme të të dhënave dhe kështu vlerësimet tona të performancës janë në fakt stokastike, me variabilitet që mund të jetë thelbësore për detyrat natyrore të procesimit të gjuhës. Ne demonstrojmë se këto vlerësime të paqëndrueshme nuk mund të mbështeten për rregullimin efektiv të parametrave. Parametrat e rregulluara që rezultojnë janë shumë të ndjeshëm ndaj mënyrës se si të dhënat tona janë ndarë, që do të thotë se shpesh zgjedhim zgjedhje sub-optimale të parametrave dhe kemi probleme serioze riprodhimi. Në vend të kësaj, ne propozojmë të përdorim CV më pak të ndryshueshme J-K-fold, në të cilin J i pavarur K-fold kryqëzimet përdoren për të vlerësuar performancën. Kontributet tona kryesore janë zgjerimi i J-K-fold CV nga vlerësimi i performancës në rregullimin e parametrave dhe hetimi si të zgjedhim J dhe K. Ne argumentojmë se variabiliteti është më i rëndësishëm se paragjykimi për rregullimin efektiv dhe kështu mbrojmë zgjedhjet më të ulta të K sesa janë tipikisht parë në letraturën NLP dhe në vend të kësaj përdorim llogaritjen e ruajtur për të rritur J. Për të demonstruar gjeneralitetin e rekomandimeve tona ne hetojmë një gamë të gjerë rastesh-studimesh: klasifikimin e ndjenjave (si të përgjithshme ashtu edhe të caktuar për objektiv), shënimin e pjesës së fjalimit dhe klasifikimin e dokumenteve.', 'ca': "La validació cruzada de K-fold (CV) és un mètode popular per estimar el veritable rendiment dels models d'aprenentatge automàtic, permetent la selecció del model i l'ajustament de paràmetres. Però el procés mateix de CV requereix una divisió aleatòria de les dades, així que les nostres estimacions de rendiment són de fet estòcastiques, amb variabilitat que pot ser substancial per a les tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges. We demonstrate that these unstable estimates cannot be relied upon for effective parameter tuning.  Els paràmetres ajustats resultants són molt sensibles a la manera en que les nostres dades es reparten, i això vol dir que sovint seleccionem opcions sub-optimals de paràmetres i tenim problemes seriosos de reproducibilitat. En comptes d'això, proposem utilitzar el CV menys variable J-K-fold, en el qual s'utilitzen validacions cruzades independents J-K-fold per avaluar el rendiment. Les nostres principals contribucions són estendre el CV J-K-fold des de l'estimació del rendiment a l'ajustament de paràmetres i investigar com escollir J i K. Afirmem que la variabilitat és més important que el bias per ajustament efectiu i així defensem opcions més baixes de K que les que normalment es veuen a la literatura NLP i en canvi utilitzem el calcul estalviat per augmentar J. Per demostrar la generalitat de les nostres recomendacions investigam una gran varietat d'estudis de casos: classificació de sentiments (tant general com específica per a l'objectiu), etiqueta de part de la xerrada i classificació de documents.", 'bs': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) je popularna metoda za procjenu istinske funkcije model a učenja mašine, omogućavajući selekciju modela i prilagodbu parametara. Međutim, u samom procesu CV-a zahtijeva slučajno dijelivanje podataka i tako da su naša procjena učinkovitosti u stvari stokastična, sa varijancijom koja može biti značajna za zadatke prirodnog obradivanja jezika. Pokazujemo da se ove nestabilne procjene ne mogu oslanjati na učinkovito prilagođenje parametara. Rezultatni parametri su veoma osjetljivi na način razdvajanja podataka, što znači da često odaberemo podoptimalne izbore parametara i imamo ozbiljne probleme reproduktivitete. Umjesto toga, predlažemo da koristimo manje promjene J-K-fold CV, u kojima se koriste J nezavisni K-fold cross validationi za procjenu učinka. Naši glavni doprinosi proširuju J-K-fold CV od procjene učinkovitosti do punjenja parametara i istražuju kako odabrati J i K. tvrdimo da je varijancija važnija od predrasude za učinkovito punjenje i tako odbranite manje izbore K nego što se obično viđaju u literaturi NLP-a i umjesto toga koristite spašenu računovodstvo kako bi povećali J. kako bi pokazali generalnost naših preporuka istražujemo širok niz istraživanja slučajeva: klasifikacija osjećaja (i generalna, i ciljna specifična), dijelom oznake govora i klasifikacija dokumenta.', 'cs': 'K-fold křížová validace (CV) je populární metoda pro odhad skutečného výkonu modelů strojového učení, umožňující výběr modelu a ladění parametrů. Samotný proces životopisu však vyžaduje náhodné rozdělení dat, a proto jsou naše odhady výkonu ve skutečnosti stochastické, s variabilitou, která může být podstatná pro úkoly zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Dokazujeme, že tyto nestabilní odhady nelze spoléhat na efektivní ladění parametrů. Výsledné vyladěné parametry jsou vysoce citlivé na rozdělení našich dat, což znamená, že často vybíráme suboptimální volby parametrů a máme vážné problémy s reprodukovatelností. Místo toho navrhujeme použít méně variabilní J-K-fold CV, ve kterém jsou k hodnocení výkonnosti použity J nezávislé K-fold křížové validace. Našimi hlavními příspěvky jsou rozšíření J-K-fold CV z odhadu výkonu na ladění parametrů a zkoumání způsobu volby J a K. Argumentujeme, že variabilita je pro efektivní ladění důležitější než bias, a proto obhajujeme nižší volby K, než jsou obvykle viděny v NLP literatuře, a namísto toho využíváme uložené výpočty ke zvýšení J. Zkoumáme širokou škálu případových studií: klasifikaci sentimentu (obecné i cílové), tagování části řeči a klasifikaci dokumentů.', 'bn': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) is a popular method for estimating the true performance of machine learning models, allowing model selection and parameter tuning.  তবে সিভির প্রক্রিয়াটি তথ্য বিভক্ত করার প্রয়োজন এবং তাই আমাদের প্রকাশ্য হিসেবে বাস্তবতা সত্যিকারে প্রকৃত ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার জন্যে প্রাকৃত আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে এই অসমর্থিত হিসেবে কার্যকর প্যারামিটারের নির্ভর করা যাবে না। ফলাফলের সংক্রান্ত প্যারামিটার অত্যন্ত সংবেদনশীল, কিভাবে আমাদের তথ্য বিভক্ত করা হয়, এর মানে হচ্ছে যে আমরা প্রায়শ সাব-optimal প্যারামিটারে এর পরিবর্তে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যে কম ভেরিয়েবেল জে-কে-ফোল্ড সিভি ব্যবহার করার জন্য, যেখানে জে স্বাধীন কে- ফোল্ডারের ক্রসের বৈধ বৈধ আমাদের প্রধান অংশগ্রহণগুলো জে-কে-ফোল্ডার সিভি প্রদর্শনী হিসেব থেকে প্যারামিটার টিনিং থেকে প্রসারিত করা এবং তদন্ত করা হচ্ছে কিভাবে জে এবং কে নির্বাচন করা যায়। আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভি আমরা বিশাল ব্যাপারে কেসের গবেষণা অনুসন্ধান করছি: আবেগের বিভাগ (জেনারেল এবং লক্ষ্যবস্তুতে), ভাষণের ট্যাগিং অংশ এবং নথি বিভাগ।', 'et': 'K-fold ristvalideerimine (CV) on populaarne meetod masinõppe mudelite tõelise jõudluse hindamiseks, võimaldades mudelite valimist ja parameetrite häälestamist. Kuid CV protsess nõuab andmete juhuslikku jagamist ja seega on meie tulemuslikkuse hinnangud tegelikult stohhastilised, varieeruvusega, mis võib olla oluline looduskeele töötlemise ülesannete puhul. Näitame, et nendele ebastabiilsetele hinnangutele ei saa tugineda parameetrite efektiivseks häälestamiseks. Saadud häälestatud parameetrid on väga tundlikud meie andmete jagamise suhtes, mis tähendab, et valime sageli ebaoptimaalseid parameetrite valikuid ja esineb tõsiseid reprodutseeritavusega seotud probleeme. Selle asemel teeme ettepaneku kasutada väiksemat muutujat J-K-kordne CV, kus jõudluse hindamiseks kasutatakse J sõltumatut K-kordne ristvalideerimist. Meie peamised panused on J-K-kordse CV laiendamine jõudluse hindamisest parameetrite häälestamiseni ning uurimine, kuidas valida J ja K. Väidame, et varieeruvus on olulisem kui eelarvamus efektiivse häälestamise jaoks ja seega toetame väiksemaid K valikuid, kui tavaliselt on näha NLP kirjanduses, ning selle asemel kasutame salvestatud arvutust J suurendamiseks. Uurime laia valikut juhtumiuuringuid: sentimentaalne klassifikatsioon (nii üldine kui sihtmärk), kõneosa sildistamine ja dokumentide klassifikatsioon.', 'fi': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) on suosittu menetelmä koneoppimismallien todellisen suorituskyvyn arviointiin, joka mahdollistaa mallin valinnan ja parametrien säätämisen. Itse CV:n prosessi vaatii kuitenkin tiedon satunnaista jakamista, joten suoritusarviomme ovat itse asiassa stokastisia, ja vaihtelu voi olla huomattavaa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä. Osoitamme, että näihin epävakaisiin arvioihin ei voida luottaa parametrien tehokkaaseen säätöön. Tuloksena olevat viritetyt parametrit ovat erittäin herkkiä sille, miten tietomme jaetaan, mikä tarkoittaa, että valitsemme usein epäoptimaalisia parametrivalintoja ja meillä on vakavia toistettavuusongelmia. Sen sijaan ehdotamme, että käytettäisiin vähemmän muuttujaa J-K-fold CV, jossa käytetään J-riippumattomia K-fold ristikkäisvalidointeja suorituskyvyn arvioimiseksi. Tärkeimmät panoksemme ovat J-K-kertaisen CV:n laajentaminen suorituskyvyn estimoinnista parametrien viritykseen ja sen tutkiminen, miten valita J ja K. Väitämme, että vaihtelu on tärkeämpää kuin bias tehokkaassa virityksessä, ja siksi kannatamme pienempiä K-valintoja kuin NLP-kirjallisuudessa tyypillisesti nähdään, ja sen sijaan käytämme tallennettua laskentaa J:n kasvattamiseen. Tutkimme monenlaisia tapaustutkimuksia: tunteiden luokittelua (sekä yleistä että kohdekohtaista), puheen osamerkintää ja dokumenttien luokittelua.', 'az': "K-fold cross validation (CV) maşın öyrənmə modellerinin həqiqət performansını hesablamaq üçün məşhur bir metodu, modeli seçməyə və parametru tunlamasına izin verir. Lakin CV-nin həm prosesi məlumatların rastgele bölümünə ehtiyacı verir və bu yüzden performansımız müəyyənləşdirilməsi həqiqətən, stochastik, təbiətli dil işləmə işləri üçün çox mövcuddur. Biz göstəririk ki, bu dəyişiklik hesabların effektiv parametru düzəltməsi üçün təvəkkül edilməz. Növbəti təyin edilmiş parametrlər məlumatlarımızın necə bölünməsini çox hiss edirlər ki, bu anlamına gelir ki, biz çox çox-optimal parametr seçimləri seçir və ciddi reproducibilitə məsələləri sahib oluruq. Bunun yerinə, biz J-K-fold CV'i daha az dəyişiklik istifadə etməyi təklif edirik. J bağımsız K-fold dəyişiklik təsdiqləmək üçün istifadə edilir. Əsas qismətlərimiz J-K-fold CV-i performans değerlendirməsindən parametro tuning və kimin J və K seçməsini təsdiqləyirik. Biz müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif tuning üçün müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif müxtəlif seçimləri və bu halda NLP Biz böyük bir səviyyə məsələlər təhsil edirik: sentiment klasifikasyonu (həmçinin genel, həmçinin məsələlərini təsdiqləyici), sözlərin bir parçasını etiketləyici və döküm klasifikasyonu.", 'sk': 'K-fold cross validation (CV) je priljubljena metoda za ocenjevanje resnične zmogljivosti modelov strojnega učenja, ki omogoča izbiro modelov in nastavitev parametrov. Vendar pa že sam proces življenjepisa zahteva naključno delitev podatkov, zato so naše ocene uspešnosti dejansko stohastične, z variabilnostjo, ki je lahko precejšnja za obdelavo naravnega jezika. Dokazujemo, da se na te nestabilne ocene ni mogoče zanašati za učinkovito nastavitev parametrov. Nastali parametri so zelo občutljivi na način razdeljevanja naših podatkov, kar pomeni, da pogosto izberemo neoptimalne izbire parametrov in imamo resne težave s ponovljivostjo. Namesto tega predlagamo uporabo manj spremenljive J-K-kratne CV, v kateri se za oceno uspešnosti uporabljajo J neodvisne K-kratne navzkrižne validacije. Naši glavni prispevki so razširitev J-K-fold CV od ocene zmogljivosti do uglaševanja parametrov in raziskovanje, kako izbrati J in K. Trdimo, da je variabilnost pomembnejša od pristranskosti za učinkovito uglaševanje in zato zagovarjamo nižje izbire K, kot je običajno videno v literaturi NLP, namesto tega pa uporabimo shranjeni izračun za povečanje J. Da bi dokazali splošnost naših priporočil Raziskujemo širok spekter študij primerov: klasifikacija sentimentalnih občutkov (splošno in ciljno specifično), označevanje delov govora in klasifikacija dokumentov.', 'jv': 'K-folder politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness We Poke Jabber Account Parameter sing dibutuhke YAccel Awak dhéwé perusahaan punika ingkang jerak punika dipunangé CV karo perusahaan punika ingkang jerak nggunakake parameter tuning nggunakake dipunangé punika dipunangé Jung lan K. Awak dhéwé ngerasai perusahaan karo perusahaan sing wis dipunangé karo perusahaan punika ingkang éntualan tambah aken akeh lanjuré K podho dipunangé kapan liyane NLP kuwi ampuhé perusahaan komputasi kanggo nyenggawe Jaakan string" in "context_BAR_stringLink', 'ha': "K-fomat mai maras inganci (CV) shi ne wata shirin jama'a wa ka ƙaddara gyare-gyare na shiryoyin ayuka masu amfani da kwamfyutan tebur, kuma yana yarda in zaɓi shirin ayuka da shirin parameter. Kayya, aikin CV na buƙata rabo da takarda data, sabõda haka aikin aikininmu na ƙaddara, su zama taƙaitaccen, da varianci wanda za'a iya muhimu wa aikin aiki na fassarar harshen na asili. Muna nũna cewa ba za a dõgara waɗannan da ba'a sami ba kan tunkuɗe mafarin parameteri. Parametr da aka danne shi yana mai gane wa yadda za'a raba danganmu, ma'anar cẽwa, ko da yawa za'a zãɓe zaɓallin tsumare-parameteri kuma za'a da masu saka ga dubu. Kayyansa, Munã buɗa mu yi amfani da mafi ƙaranci da juyin-K-danne CV, a cikinsa, ana amfani da masu ingancin K-danne-nau'i da kuma don a ƙayyade fasarin. Mana ƙari da amfani da kuma suna shimfiɗa CV daga cikakken hisãbi na tsari zuwa tuning na parameter. Tuna yi jãyayya cewa zafi muhimmi ne mafi girma ga tunkuɗe wa masu yin amfani da tunkuɗawa na yi amfani da shi, kuma don ka yi amfani da lissafi na ƙaranci na NLP Tuna karatun masu yawa masu sakan-bayani: mai fassarar hisani (duka jama'a da kuma masu ƙayyade, rabin tagogi na faɗi da fassarar takardar.", 'he': 'אישור צלב K-fold (CV) הוא שיטה פופולרית להערכה את ההופעה האמיתית של דוגמני לימוד מכונות, שמאפשר לבחור דוגמנים ולהתאמת פרמטרים. בכל אופן, התהליך של CV דורש מחלקה אקראית של הנתונים וכך הערכות ביצועים שלנו למעשה סטוקסטיות, עם שונה שיכולה להיות משמעותית עבור משימות עיבוד שפה טבעית. אנחנו מראים שהערכות הללו לא יציבות לא יכולות לסמוך על התאמה הפרמטרית יעילה. הפרמטרים המתאימים הנוצאים הם רגישים מאוד לאיך המידע שלנו מתחלק, מה שאומר שאנחנו לעתים קרובות בוחרים פארמטרים לא אופטימיים ויש לנו בעיות חזקות רציניות. Instead, we propose to use the less variable J-K-fold CV, in which J independent K-fold cross validations are used to assess performance.  התרומות העיקריות שלנו הם להאריך את J-K-fold CV מערכת ביצועים לתרגיל הפרמטרים וחקירה איך לבחור J ו K. אנחנו טוענים שהשינוי הוא חשוב יותר מאשר היחידות לתרגיל יעיל אנו חוקרים מגוון רחב של מחקרי תיקים: מסווג רגשות (גם כללי וגם מסויים למטרה), מסווג חלק מהנאום ומסמך.', 'bo': "K-fold cross validation (CV) is a popular method for estimating the true performance of machine learning models, allowing model selection and parameter tuning. འོན་ཀྱང་། CV ནང་གི་ལས་སྦྱོར་དེ་ལ་གནད་མེད་ཅིག་གི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་བཤད་དགོས། We demonstrate that these unstable estimates can't be relied on for effective parameter tuning. The resulting tuned parameters are highly sensitive to how our data is partitioned, meaning that we often select sub-optimal parameter choices and have serious reproducibility issues. དེ་ལས། འུ་ཅག་གིས་འགྱུར་ཅན་ཅིག་J-K-ཡིག་སྣོད་CV རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་K-ཡིག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་བསྡུས་ཞིབ་བྱེད་སྐབས་སྤྱོད་རྒྱུ་མཚན་ཡིན། Our main contributions are extending J-K-fold CV from performance estimation to parameter tuning and investigating how to choose J and K. We argue that variability is more important than bias for effective tuning and so advocate lower choices of K than are typically seen in the NLP literature and instead use the saved computation to increase J. To demonstrate the generality of our recommendations ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་བརྗོད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་ཡིག་ཅིག་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།"}
{'en': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing : Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation', 'ar': 'معالجة اللغة الطبيعية المتزايدة: التحديات والاستراتيجيات والتقييم', 'es': 'Procesamiento incremental del lenguaje natural: desafíos, estrategias y evaluación', 'fr': 'Traitement incrémentiel du langage naturel\xa0: défis, stratégies et évaluation', 'pt': 'Processamento Incremental de Linguagem Natural: Desafios, Estratégias e Avaliação', 'ru': 'Инкрементальная обработка естественного языка: проблемы, стратегии и оценка', 'hi': 'वृद्धिशील प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण: चुनौतियां, रणनीतियां, और मूल्यांकन', 'ja': 'インクリメンタル自然言語処理：課題、戦略、評価', 'zh': '增量自然语言处置:挑战、方略、评估', 'ga': 'Próiseáil Incriminteach Teanga Nádúrtha: Dúshláin, Straitéisí, agus Measúnú', 'ka': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing: Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation', 'hu': 'Növekvő természetes nyelvfeldolgozás: kihívások, stratégiák és értékelés', 'el': 'Προσωρινή επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας: προκλήσεις, στρατηγικές και αξιολόγηση', 'it': 'Elaborazione incrementale del linguaggio naturale: sfide, strategie e valutazione', 'kk': 'Кеңейтілген тәуелсіздік тіл процессі: шындықтар, стратегиялар және оқу', 'lt': 'Didesnis gamtos kalbų apdorojimas: iššūkiai, strategijos ir vertinimas', 'ms': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing: Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation', 'mk': 'Окрементално природно обработување јазик: предизвици, стратегии и евалуација', 'mt': 'L-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwa Naturali inkrementali: Sfidi, Strateġiji, u Evalwazzjoni', 'ml': 'കൂടുതല്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d: സങ്കല്\u200dപ്പികള്\u200d, സ്ട്രേറ്റേജികള്\u200d, പ്രത്യേകിച്ചും', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл процесс: сорилтууд, стратеги, үнэлгээ', 'no': 'Inkremental naturspråk- prosessering: utfordringar, strategiar og evaluering', 'pl': 'Przyrostowe przetwarzanie języka naturalnego: wyzwania, strategie i ocena', 'ro': 'Procesarea incrementală a limbajului natural: provocări, strategii și evaluare', 'sr': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing: Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation', 'si': 'විශාල භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය: ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, විශේෂණය', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka afka asalka ah: Dhibaatooyinka, Strategies iyo Qiimeynta', 'sv': 'Ökande behandling av naturligt språk: utmaningar, strategier och utvärdering', 'ta': 'அதிகபட்ச இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்பாடு: சவால்கள், சட்டங்கள், மற்றும் மதிப்பீடுகள்', 'ur': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing: Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'hr': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing: Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation', 'nl': 'Incrementele verwerking van natuurlijke taal: uitdagingen, strategieën en evaluatie', 'da': 'Forøgelse af naturlig sprogbehandling: Udfordringer, strategier og evaluering', 'bg': 'Повишаване на естествената обработка на езика: предизвикателства, стратегии и оценка', 'de': 'Inkrementale Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache: Herausforderungen, Strategien und Evaluation', 'fa': 'پردازش زبان طبیعی افزایش: چالش، استراتژی و ارزیابی', 'id': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing: Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation', 'sw': 'Mchakato wa lugha ya asili: Changamoto, Mitizo na Uchunguzi', 'tr': 'Tebiýal dil işlemesi: çözgüler, Strategiýalar, we Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Incremental Natuurlike Taal Prosessering: Opdragte, Strategies en Evaluering', 'sq': 'Procesimi i gjuhës natyrore në rritje: sfida, strategji dhe vlerësim', 'hy': 'Ամենաբարձր բնական լեզվի մշակումը. մարտահրավերներ, ռազմավարություններ և գնահատում', 'am': 'የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ', 'ko': '증량 자연 언어 처리: 도전, 전략과 평가', 'az': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing: Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া: চ্যালেঞ্জ, স্ট্রেটেজি এবং মূল্যায়ন', 'ca': 'Procesament de llenguatges naturals incremental: reptes, estratègies i evaluació', 'bs': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing: Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation', 'et': 'Kasvav looduslik keele töötlemine: väljakutsed, strateegiad ja hindamine', 'cs': 'Inkrementální zpracování přirozeného jazyka: výzvy, strategie a hodnocení', 'fi': 'Kasvava luonnollisen kielen käsittely: haasteet, strategiat ja arviointi', 'jv': 'Inkluwat Sak Jaengan Doasar: Rasane, Tatanan, lan Iwujuara', 'sk': 'Incrementalna obdelava naravnega jezika: izzivi, strategije in vrednotenje', 'he': 'מעבדת שפת טבעית נוספת: אתגרים, אסטרטגיות והערכה', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Incremental Natural Language Processing: Challenges, Strategies, and Evaluation'}
{'en': 'Incrementality is ubiquitous in human-human interaction and beneficial for human-computer interaction. It has been a topic of research in different parts of the NLP community, mostly with focus on the specific topic at hand even though incremental systems have to deal with similar challenges regardless of domain. In this survey, I consolidate and categorize the approaches, identifying similarities and differences in the computation and data, and show trade-offs that have to be considered. A focus lies on evaluating incremental systems because the standard metrics often fail to capture the incremental properties of a system and coming up with a suitable evaluation scheme is non-trivial.', 'ar': 'التزايد موجود في كل مكان في التفاعل بين الإنسان والإنسان ومفيد للتفاعل بين الإنسان والحاسوب. لقد كان موضوعًا للبحث في أجزاء مختلفة من مجتمع البرمجة اللغوية العصبية ، مع التركيز في الغالب على الموضوع المحدد المطروح على الرغم من أن الأنظمة الإضافية يجب أن تتعامل مع تحديات مماثلة بغض النظر عن المجال. في هذا الاستطلاع ، أقوم بدمج الأساليب وتصنيفها ، وتحديد أوجه التشابه والاختلاف في الحساب والبيانات ، وإظهار المفاضلات التي يجب أخذها في الاعتبار. ينصب التركيز على تقييم الأنظمة التزايدية لأن المقاييس القياسية غالبًا ما تفشل في التقاط الخصائص المتزايدة للنظام ، كما أن التوصل إلى خطة تقييم مناسبة أمر غير بسيط.', 'es': 'La incrementalidad es omnipresente en la interacción humano-humano y es beneficiosa para la interacción humano-ordenador. Ha sido un tema de investigación en diferentes partes de la comunidad de PNL, principalmente con un enfoque en el tema específico en cuestión, a pesar de que los sistemas incrementales tienen que lidiar con desafíos similares independientemente del dominio. En esta encuesta, consolido y categorizo los enfoques, identifico similitudes y diferencias en la computación y los datos, y muestro las compensaciones que deben tenerse en cuenta. El enfoque se centra en la evaluación de los sistemas incrementales porque las métricas estándar a menudo no capturan las propiedades incrementales de un sistema y no es trivial encontrar un esquema de evaluación adecuado.', 'pt': 'A incrementalidade é onipresente na interação humano-humano e benéfica para a interação humano-computador. Tem sido um tópico de pesquisa em diferentes partes da comunidade de PNL, principalmente com foco no tópico específico em questão, embora os sistemas incrementais tenham que lidar com desafios semelhantes, independentemente do domínio. Nesta pesquisa, consolido e categorizo as abordagens, identificando semelhanças e diferenças na computação e nos dados, e mostro os trade-offs que devem ser considerados. O foco está na avaliação de sistemas incrementais porque as métricas padrão geralmente falham em capturar as propriedades incrementais de um sistema e não é trivial chegar a um esquema de avaliação adequado.', 'fr': "L'incrémentalité est omniprésente dans l'interaction homme-homme et bénéfique pour l'interaction homme-machine. Il a fait l'objet de recherches dans différentes parties de la communauté de la PNL, principalement en se concentrant sur le sujet spécifique à traiter, même si les systèmes incrémentiels doivent faire face à des défis similaires quel que soit le domaine. Dans cette enquête, je consolide et catégorise les approches, en identifiant les similitudes et les différences dans le calcul et les données, et je montre les compromis qui doivent être pris en compte. L'accent est mis sur l'évaluation des systèmes incrémentiels, car les métriques standard ne parviennent souvent pas à saisir les propriétés incrémentielles d'un système et il n'est pas anodin de trouver un schéma d'évaluation approprié.", 'ja': 'インクリメンタリティは、ヒトとヒトの相互作用に普遍的に存在し、ヒトとコンピュータの相互作用に有益である。増分システムは領域に関係なく同様の課題に対処しなければならないにもかかわらず、NLPコミュニティのさまざまな部分で主に手元の特定のトピックに焦点を当てて、研究のトピックとなってきた。この調査では、アプローチを統合して分類し、計算とデータの類似点と違いを特定し、考慮しなければならないトレードオフを示します。標準的なメトリクスは、システムの増分特性を取り込むことができず、適切な評価スキームを考えることが重要ではないため、増分システムを評価することに焦点が当てられている。', 'zh': '增量性于人机交互,利人机交互。 直是NLP社区分研究课题,要在手头特定主题,虽增量统必应类挑战,无论领域如何。 于本考中,吾整合分类,定算数之同异,而示必虑之权衡。 重在估增量系统,以指标常不得其增量性,且举其宜并非易事。', 'hi': 'वृद्धिशीलता मानव-मानव बातचीत में सर्वव्यापी है और मानव-कंप्यूटर इंटरैक्शन के लिए फायदेमंद है। यह एनएलपी समुदाय के विभिन्न हिस्सों में अनुसंधान का विषय रहा है, ज्यादातर हाथ में विशिष्ट विषय पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के साथ, भले ही वृद्धिशील प्रणालियों को डोमेन की परवाह किए बिना समान चुनौतियों से निपटना पड़े। इस सर्वेक्षण में, मैं दृष्टिकोणों को समेकित और वर्गीकृत करता हूं, गणना और डेटा में समानता और अंतर की पहचान करता हूं, और ट्रेड-ऑफ दिखाता हूं जिन पर विचार किया जाना है। वृद्धिशील प्रणालियों के मूल्यांकन पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया जाता है क्योंकि मानक मीट्रिक अक्सर एक प्रणाली के वृद्धिशील गुणों को पकड़ने में विफल रहते हैं और एक उपयुक्त मूल्यांकन योजना के साथ आना गैर-तुच्छ है।', 'ru': 'Приращение широко распространено во взаимодействии человека с человеком и полезно для взаимодействия человека с компьютером. Это была тема исследований в различных частях сообщества NLP, в основном с акцентом на конкретную тему под рукой, даже несмотря на то, что инкрементные системы должны решать аналогичные проблемы независимо от области. В этом опросе я консолидирую и классифицирую подходы, выявляя сходства и различия в расчетах и данных, и показываю компромиссы, которые необходимо учитывать. Основное внимание уделяется оценке инкрементных систем, поскольку стандартные метрики часто не отражают инкрементные свойства системы, и разработка подходящей схемы оценки является нетривиальной.', 'ga': "Tá an incriminteacht uileláithreach in idirghníomhaíocht dhaonna-daonna agus tairbheach d'idirghníomhú daonna-ríomhaire. Is ábhar taighde é i gcodanna éagsúla de phobal an NLP, agus díríodh go príomha ar an topaic ar leith atá idir lámha cé go gcaithfidh córais incriminteacha déileáil le dúshláin chomhchosúla beag beann ar an bhfearann. Sa suirbhé seo, déanaim na cineálacha cur chuige a chomhdhlúthú agus a chatagóiriú, ag aithint cosúlachtaí agus difríochtaí sa ríomh agus sna sonraí, agus taispeánann comhbhabhtáil nach mór a mheas. Dírítear ar chórais incriminteacha a mheas mar is minic a theipeann ar an méadracht chaighdeánach airíonna incriminteacha córais a ghabháil agus ní fánach scéim mheastóireachta oiriúnach a cheapadh.", 'ka': 'ინქრემენტალურობა ადამიანის-ადამიანის ინტერფექციაში და ადამიანის-კომპიუტერისტის ინტერფექციაში მუშაობელია. ეს იყო განსხვავებული NLP საზოგადოებაში განსხვავებული განსხვავებული განსხვავებული საზოგადოებაში, რომელიც განსხვავებული საზოგადოებაზე ფონსკურებულია, თუმცა კრემონემენტიური სისტემი ამ მონაცემებში, მე კონსოლიდირებს და კატეგორიზებს მიღებების განსაზღვრება და განსხვავებების განსაზღვრება კომპუტექტურაციაში და მონაცემების განსხვავებების განსაზღვრება და გამოჩვენებ ფონსკური იყო ინტერემენტური სისტემების განსაზღვრებაზე, რადგან სტანდარტური მეტრიკის ზოგიერთად არ შეუძლებელია სისტემის ინტერემენტური განსაზღვრებების და შესაძლებელი განსაზღვ', 'el': 'Η αύξηση είναι πανταχού παρούσα στην ανθρώπινη-ανθρώπινη αλληλεπίδραση και ευεργετική για την αλληλεπίδραση ανθρώπου-υπολογιστή. Έχει αποτελέσει αντικείμενο έρευνας σε διάφορα μέρη της κοινότητας με έμφαση κυρίως στο συγκεκριμένο θέμα, παρόλο που τα αυξανόμενα συστήματα πρέπει να αντιμετωπίσουν παρόμοιες προκλήσεις ανεξάρτητα από τον τομέα. Σε αυτή την έρευνα, ενοποιώνω και κατηγοριοποιώ τις προσεγγίσεις, εντοπίζοντας ομοιότητες και διαφορές στον υπολογισμό και τα δεδομένα, και δείχνω συμβιβασμούς που πρέπει να ληφθούν υπόψη. Η εστίαση έγκειται στην αξιολόγηση των βαθμιαίων συστημάτων επειδή οι τυποποιημένες μετρήσεις συχνά αποτυγχάνουν να συλλάβουν τις βαθμιαίες ιδιότητες ενός συστήματος και η εξεύρεση ενός κατάλληλου σχήματος αξιολόγησης δεν είναι ασήμαντη.', 'hu': 'A növekedés mindenütt jelen van az ember-ember interakcióban, és előnyös az ember-számítógép interakcióban. Kutatási téma volt az NLP közösség különböző részein, leginkább a konkrét témára összpontosítva annak ellenére, hogy az inkrementális rendszereknek hasonló kihívásokkal kell foglalkozniuk, függetlenül attól, hogy tartománytól. Ebben a felmérésben konszolidálom és kategorizálom a megközelítéseket, azonosítom a hasonlóságokat és különbségeket a számításban és az adatokban, és megmutatom azokat a kompromisszumokat, amelyeket figyelembe kell venni. A hangsúly az inkrementális rendszerek értékelésére helyezkedik el, mivel a szabványos mutatók gyakran nem tudják rögzíteni a rendszer inkrementális tulajdonságait, és nem triviális egy megfelelő értékelési séma kidolgozása.', 'lt': 'Incrementalumas yra visur žmogaus ir žmogaus sąveikoje ir naudingas žmogaus ir kompiuterio sąveikai. Tai buvo mokslinių tyrimų įvairiose NLP bendruomenės dalyse tema, daugiausia dėmesio skiriant konkrečiai aptariamai temai, nors papildomos sistemos turi spręsti panašius uždavinius, nepriklausomai nuo srities. Šiame tyrime konsoliduoju ir suskirstysiu metodus, nustatydamas skaičiavimų ir duomenų panašumą ir skirtumus, ir parodžiu kompromisus, kuriuos reikia apsvarstyti. Daugiausia dėmesio skiriama papildomų sistemų vertinimui, nes standartiniai metriniai rodikliai dažnai nesugeba nustatyti papildomų sistemos savybių, o tinkamos vertinimo sistemos parengimas yra nedidelis.', 'it': "L'incrementalità è onnipresente nell'interazione uomo-uomo e benefica per l'interazione uomo-computer. È stato un argomento di ricerca in diverse parti della comunità NLP, principalmente con attenzione all'argomento specifico a portata di mano, anche se i sistemi incrementali devono affrontare sfide simili indipendentemente dal dominio. In questo sondaggio, consolido e categorizzo gli approcci, identificando somiglianze e differenze nel calcolo e nei dati, e mostro compromessi che devono essere presi in considerazione. Un focus è sulla valutazione dei sistemi incrementali perché le metriche standard spesso non riescono a catturare le proprietà incrementali di un sistema e trovare uno schema di valutazione adeguato non è banale.", 'ms': 'Incrementality ada di mana-mana dalam interaksi manusia-manusia dan berguna untuk interaksi manusia-komputer. Ia telah menjadi topik penelitian di bahagian-bahagian yang berbeza dari komuniti NLP, kebanyakan dengan fokus pada topik khusus di tangan walaupun sistem tambahan perlu menghadapi cabaran yang sama tidak kira-kira domain. Dalam survei ini, saya konsolidasi dan kategori pendekatan, mengidentifikasikan persamaan dan perbezaan dalam perhitungan dan data, dan menunjukkan perdagangan yang perlu dipertimbangkan. Fokus berdasarkan penilaian sistem incremental kerana metrik piawai sering gagal menangkap ciri-ciri incremental sistem dan datang dengan skema penilaian yang sesuai bukanlah trivial.', 'kk': 'Кеңейту адамдар-адамдар интерфейсінде және адамдар-компьютер интерфейсіне пайдалы болады. Ол NLP коммуникациясының түрлі бөліктерінде зерттеу нақышы болды, көпшілігінің көпшілігі қолданыстағы нақышыға назар берілген, бірақ көпшілікті жүйелер доменге қарамастан ұқсас жа Бұл зерттеулерде, өзгерістерді теңдеп, есептеу және деректердің айырмашылығын анықтап, қатынау керек тәртібін баптаймын. Стандартты метрика жүйеңіздің көптеген қасиеттерін түсіруге болмайды, жүйеңіздің көптеген бағалау сұлбасын жасау үшін көптеген жүйеңіздің көптеген қасиеттерін түсіруге болмайды.', 'mk': 'Неверојатноста е насекаде во човечка-човечка интеракција и корисна за човечка-компјутерска интеракција. Тоа беше тема на истражување во различни делови на заедницата на НЛП, претежно со фокус на специфичната тема на рацете иако инкременталните системи мора да се справат со слични предизвици без оглед на доменот. Во ова истражување, ги консолидирам и категоризирам пристапите, идентификувајќи сличности и разлики во пресметките и податоците, и покажувам компромис кои мора да се разгледаат. Фокусот се наоѓа на проценката на инекстременталните системи бидејќи стандардните метрики честопати не ги заземаат инекстременталните сопствености на системот и создавањето на соодветна шема на проценка не е тривијална.', 'ml': 'മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഇടപാടില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും മനുഷ്യന്\u200d കമ്പ്യൂട്ടറിന്റെ ഇടപാടിന് ഉപകാരമ NLP സമൂഹത്തിന്റെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഭാഗങ്ങളില്\u200d ഇത് പഠിക്കാനുള്ള ഒരു വിഷയത്തിലായിരിക്കുന്നു. പ്രത്യേകിച്ചും പ്രത്യേക വിഷയത്തില്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ ഈ അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d ഞാന്\u200d സൂക്ഷിപ്പിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്ന വഴികള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുകയും, കണക്കെടുക്കുന്നതിനും വ്യത്യാസങ്ങളും കണ്ടെത്തുകയും, വ ഒരു ഫോക്സോക്സ്റ്റോക്ക് സംവിധാനങ്ങളെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ചാണ്. കാരണം സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ കൂടുതല്\u200d വിശേഷതകള്\u200d പിടികൂടുന', 'pl': 'Przyrostowość jest wszechobecna w interakcji człowiek-człowiek i korzystna dla interakcji człowiek-komputer. Był to temat badań w różnych częściach społeczności NLP, głównie skupiając się na konkretnym temacie, mimo że systemy przyrostowe muszą radzić sobie z podobnymi wyzwaniami niezależnie od domeny. W niniejszym badaniu konsoliduję i kategoryzuję podejścia, identyfikując podobieństwa i różnice w obliczeniach i danych oraz pokazuję kompromisy, które należy uwzględnić. Skupia się na ocenie systemów przyrostowych, ponieważ standardowe wskaźniki często nie są w stanie uchwycić właściwości przyrostowych systemu, a opracowanie odpowiedniego schematu oceny nie jest trywialne.', 'mt': 'L-inkrementalità hija kullimkien fl-interazzjoni bejn il-bniedem u l-bniedem u hija ta’ benefiċċju għall-interazzjoni bejn il-bniedem u l-kompjuter. Kien suġġett ta’ riċerka f’partijiet differenti tal-komunità tal-NLP, l-aktar b’enfasi fuq is-suġġett speċifiku inkwistjoni anki jekk is-sistemi inkrementali jridu jindirizzaw sfidi simili irrispettivament mill-qasam. F’dan l-istħarriġ, nikkonsolida u nikkategorizza l-approċċi, nidentifika similaritajiet u differenzi fil-komputazzjoni u d-dejta, u niwera kompromessi li jridu jiġu kkunsidrati. Fokus jinsab fuq l-evalwazzjoni tas-sistemi inkrementali minħabba li l-metriċi standard spiss jonqsu milli jaqbdu l-proprjetajiet inkrementali ta’ sistema u l-ħolqien ta’ skema ta’ evalwazzjoni xierqa mhuwiex trivjali.', 'mn': 'Хүн-хүн холбоотой харилцааны тухай нэмэгдүүлэлт нь хүн-компьютерийн харилцааны ашигтай байдаг. Энэ нь NLP нийгмийн олон хэсэгт судалгааны сэдэв болсон. Олон хэсэгт нь тодорхой сэдэв дээр анхаарлаа хандуулж байгаа. Гэвч нэмэлт систем нь тодорхой сорилтуудыг зохицуулах хэрэгтэй. Энэ судалгаанд би ойлголтыг тооцоолж, тооцоолох, өгөгдлийн ялгааг тооцоолж, бодох хэрэгтэй худалдааныг харуулж байна. Стандарт метрик нь системийн нэмэлт чадваруудыг авч, зөвхөн дүгнэлтийн төлөвлөгөө бүтээж чадахгүй.', 'no': 'Øvrengde er alltid i menneskelig-menneskelig samarbeid og nyttig for menneskelig-datasamarbeid. Det har vært eit emne på forskning i ulike deler av NLP-fellesskapet, hovudsakelig med fokus på den spesifikke emnet på hånd selv om inkrementalsystemet må handtera liknande utfordringar uavhengig av domenet. I denne undersøkinga konsoliderer eg og kategoriserer tilnærmingane, identifiserer tilnærmingane og ulike forskjeller i datamaskinen og dataene, og viser forskjeller som må betra. Eit fokus ligg på å evaluera inkrementalsystemet, fordi standardmetrikane ofte ikkje kan henta aukande eigenskapar til eit systemet og komma opp med eit passande evalueringsplan er ikkje trivial.', 'ro': 'Incrementalitatea este omniprezentă în interacțiunea om-om și benefică pentru interacțiunea om-computer. Acesta a fost un subiect de cercetare în diferite părți ale comunității PNL, în special cu accent pe subiectul specific în discuție, chiar dacă sistemele incrementale trebuie să facă față provocărilor similare indiferent de domeniu. În cadrul acestui studiu, consolidez și categorizez abordările, identificând asemănări și diferențe în calcul și date și prezint compromisuri care trebuie luate în considerare. Un accent se concentrează pe evaluarea sistemelor incrementale deoarece valorile standard adesea nu reușesc să capteze proprietățile incrementale ale unui sistem și să găsească o schemă de evaluare adecvată nu este trivială.', 'sv': 'Ökning är allestädes närvarande i människa-människa interaktion och fördelaktig för människa-dator interaktion. Det har varit ett forskningsämne i olika delar av NLP-gemenskapen, mestadels med fokus på det specifika ämnet, även om inkrementella system måste hantera liknande utmaningar oavsett domän. I denna undersökning konsoliderar och kategoriserar jag tillvägagångssätten, identifierar likheter och skillnader i beräkning och data samt visar kompromisser som måste beaktas. Fokus ligger på att utvärdera inkrementella system eftersom standardmåtten ofta misslyckas med att fånga inkrementella egenskaper hos ett system och att komma fram till ett lämpligt utvärderingsschema är inte trivialt.', 'sr': 'Povećanje je svuda u interakciji sa ljudima i ljudima i korisno za ljudsku kompjutersku interakciju. To je bila tema istraživanja u različitim dijelovima zajednice NLP-a, uglavnom sa fokusom na specifičnu tema na kojoj se nalazi, iako povećavajući sistemi moraju da se suoči sa sličnim izazovima bez obzira na domenu. U ovom istraživanju, konsolidujem i kategorišem pristupe, identifikujem sličnosti i razlike u računalu i podacima, i pokazujem trgovinske odluke koje moraju razmotriti. Fokus se nalazi na procjenjivanju incrementalnih sustava jer standardna metrika često ne hvata incrementalne vlasništvo sistema i smisliti odgovarajuću režimu procjenjivanja nije trivialna.', 'si': 'මිනිස්සු මිනිස්සු සම්බන්ධයක් සහ මිනිස්සු පරිගණක සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය වෙනුවෙන් වැඩිය ඒක NLP සමාජයේ වෙනස් කොටස් වල පරීක්ෂණයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙලා තියෙනවා, ප්\u200dරශ්නයෙන් අතර ඉන්න විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා නමුත මේ පරීක්ෂණයේදී, මම පරීක්ෂණය සහ දත්තේ වගේ සමානත්වය සහ වෙනස් තොරතුරු කරනවා, පරීක්ෂණය සහ තොරතුරු වලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, සහ ප විශාල පද්ධතිය අවශ්\u200dයය කරන්න ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා මොකද ප්\u200dරමාණය මෙට්\u200dරික්ස් වලින් පද්ධතියේ විශාල විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක්', 'ta': 'அதிகரிப்பு மனித இடைவெளியில் ஒற்றைப்படையானது மற்றும் மனித கணினி இடைவெளியில் பயனுள்ளது. அது NLP சமுதாயத்தின் வேறு பகுதிகளில் ஆராய்ச்சியின் தலைப்பாக இருந்தது, பெரும்பாலும் குறிப்பிட்ட தலைப்புகளை கவனம் செலுத்திக் கொள்ளு இந்த அறிவிப்பில், நான் முன்னேற்றங்களை உறுதிப்படுத்தி வகுக்குகிறேன், கணக்கு மற்றும் தரவுகளின் வேறுபாடுகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க, மற்றும் த ஒரு முன்னிறுத்தல் தொகுப்பு முறைமைகளை மதிப்பீடு செய்ய முடியும். ஏனென்றால் இயல்பான மெட்ரிக்கள் பெரும்பாலாக ஒரு கணினியின் அதிகரிப்பு', 'so': 'Koritaanku waa mid aan qummanayn oo ku dhexeeya iskutallaabta biniaadamka iyo faa’iido u leh interfeysiga kambiyuutarka dadka. Waxay ahaan jirtay wax baaritaan oo ku saabsan kooxo kala duduwan oo ka mid ah jamiiqada NLP, inta badan waxay focus ugu leedahay mada gaar ah, xataa in kastoo ay habboon nidaamka horumarinta ah ay u baahan yihiin inay la macaamilooto dhibaatooyin la mid ah, haba kastoo ay ahaatee deegaanka. Baaritaankan ayaan qallafsanaanayaa oo kala qeybinayaa qaababka, waxaan ogaanayaa isku mid ah iyo kala duwanaanshaha xisaabinta iyo macluumaadka, waxaana tusayaa qaybaha ganacsiga ee loo baahan yahay in la fikiro. A focus lies on evaluating incremental systems because the standard metrics often fail to capture the incremental properties of a system and coming up with a suitable evaluation scheme is non-trivial.', 'ur': 'افزایش انسان-انسان کی تعامل میں ہر طرف سے ہے اور انسان-کمپیوٹر کی تعامل کے لئے فائدہ اٹھانے والی ہے. یہ NLP کمونٹی کے مختلف ٹکڑوں میں تحقیق کا موضوع ہے، اکثر اس موضوع پر تمرکز کیا جاتا ہے، اگرچہ اضافہ کی سیستموں کو دومین کے بغیر کسی طرح کے مشکل کے مطابق مشکل کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. اس تحقیقات میں میں مطالبہ کرتا ہوں اور طریقوں کو تقسیم کرتا ہوں، کمپیوٹر اور ڈیٹا میں برابری اور اختلافات کا پہچان کرتا ہوں، اور تجارت کو دکھاتا ہوں جو سمجھنا چاہیے۔ ایک مضبوط نظام کا ارزش کرنا ہے کیونکہ استاندارڈ میٹریک اکثر سیسٹم کے اضافہ کے خصوصے کو پکڑنے کے لئے ناکام ہوتا ہے اور ایک مناسب ارزش طریقے کے ساتھ پیدا ہوتا ہے۔', 'uz': "Ko'paylik inson interfeyslarida o'xshash va inson kompyuterning interfeys uchun foydali. Bu NLP jamoasidagi boshqa qismlarda o'rganish mavzu edi. Ko'pchilik, kamida ma'lum mavzuga foydalanishi mumkin. Bu tajribada men murojaatlarni birlashtiraman, hisoblash va maʼlumotdagi tenglarni aniqlab, va qidirish kerakligini ko'rsatayman. A focus lies on evaluating incremental systems because the standard metrics often fail to capture the incremental properties of a system and coming up with a suitable evaluation scheme is non-trivial.", 'vi': 'Sự phức tạp luôn hữu hiệu trong giao tiếp giữa người và người và có lợi cho giao tiếp máy tính. Nó là một chủ đề nghiên cứu ở nhiều nơi trong cộng đồng Njala, hầu hết với tập trung vào chủ đề cụ thể hiện tại, mặc dù hệ thống số dần phải đối mặt với những thử thách tương tự bất kể miền nào. Trong cuộc khảo sát này, tôi củng cố và phân loại các phương pháp, xác định những điểm tương đồng và khác nhau trong tính to án và dữ liệu, và cho thấy những quyết định đáng cân nhắc. Điểm mấu chốt nằm ở việc đánh giá các hệ thống số dần bởi vì các đo chuẩn thường thất bại trong việc nắm giữ các tính chất tăng dần của một hệ thống và phát triển một kế hoạch đánh giá thích hợp không phải là vô giá trị.', 'bg': 'Увеличаването е повсеместно в човешкото взаимодействие и полезно за човешкото взаимодействие. Тя е тема на изследване в различни части на общността на НЛП, най-вече с фокус върху конкретната тема, която се разглежда, въпреки че програмните системи трябва да се справят с подобни предизвикателства независимо от областта. В това проучване консолидирам и категоризирам подходите, идентифицирам приликите и разликите в изчисленията и данните и показвам компромисите, които трябва да бъдат взети предвид. Фокусът е върху оценката на допълнителните системи, тъй като стандартните показатели често не успяват да уловят допълнителните свойства на системата и създаването на подходяща схема за оценка е нетривиално.', 'nl': 'Incrementaliteit is alomtegenwoordig in mens-mens interactie en gunstig voor mens-computer interactie. Het is een onderwerp van onderzoek geweest in verschillende delen van de NLP gemeenschap, meestal met focus op het specifieke onderwerp bij de hand, hoewel incrementele systemen moeten omgaan met soortgelijke uitdagingen ongeacht domein. In deze enquête consolideer en categoriseer ik de benaderingen, identificeer ik overeenkomsten en verschillen in de berekening en data, en laat ik compromissen zien die moeten worden overwogen. Een focus ligt op het evalueren van incrementele systemen omdat de standaard metrics vaak niet in staat zijn om de incrementele eigenschappen van een systeem vast te leggen en het bedenken van een geschikt evaluatieschema niet triviaal is.', 'da': 'Incrementalitet er allestedsnærværende i menneske-menneske interaktion og gavnlig for menneske-computer interaktion. Det har været et forskningsemne i forskellige dele af NLP-fællesskabet, hovedsageligt med fokus på det specifikke emne, selvom inkrementelle systemer skal håndtere lignende udfordringer uanset domæne. I denne undersøgelse konsoliderer og kategoriserer jeg tilgangene, identificerer ligheder og forskelle i beregning og data og viser kompromiser, der skal overvejes. Et fokus ligger på at evaluere inkrementelle systemer, fordi standardmålene ofte ikke opfanger et systems inkrementelle egenskaber, og det er ikke trivielt at finde frem til en passende evalueringsordning.', 'de': 'Inkrementalität ist allgegenwärtig in der Mensch-Mensch-Interaktion und vorteilhaft für die Mensch-Computer-Interaktion. Es war ein Forschungsthema in verschiedenen Teilen der NLP-Community, meist mit Fokus auf das jeweilige Thema, obwohl inkrementelle Systeme unabhängig von der Domäne mit ähnlichen Herausforderungen konfrontiert sind. In dieser Umfrage konsolidiere und kategorisiere ich die Ansätze, identifiziere Ähnlichkeiten und Unterschiede in der Berechnung und den Daten und zeige Kompromisse auf, die berücksichtigt werden müssen. Ein Schwerpunkt liegt auf der Bewertung inkrementeller Systeme, da die Standardmetriken oft nicht die inkrementellen Eigenschaften eines Systems erfassen und ein geeignetes Bewertungsschema nicht trivial ist.', 'hr': 'Povećanje je svuda u interakciji ljudskih i ljudskih ljudi i korisno za interakciju ljudskih kompjutera. To je bila tema istraživanja u različitim dijelovima zajednice NLP-a, uglavnom s usredotočenjem na konkretnu temu u ruku, iako povećani sustavi moraju riješiti slične izazove bez obzira na domenu. U ovom istraživanju, konsolidiram i kategoriziram pristupe, identificiram sličnosti i razlike u računalu i podacima i pokažem trgovinske odluke koje moraju razmotriti. Fokus se nalazi na procjenjivanju incrementalnih sustava jer standardna metrika često ne može uhvatiti povećane vlasništva sustava i smisliti odgovarajuću procjenu shēmu nije trivialna.', 'id': 'Incrementality is ubiquitous in human-human interaction and beneficial for human-computer interaction.  Ini adalah topik penelitian di berbagai bagian dari komunitas NLP, kebanyakan dengan fokus pada topik spesifik yang ada di tangan meskipun sistem incremental harus menghadapi tantangan yang sama tidak peduli domain. Dalam survei ini, saya mengkonsolidasi dan mengkategorisasi pendekatan, mengidentifikasi persamaan dan perbedaan dalam komputasi dan data, dan menunjukkan kompromi yang harus dipertimbangkan. Fokus terserah pada evaluasi sistem incremental karena metrik standar sering gagal menangkap properti incremental sistem dan datang dengan skema evaluasi yang sesuai bukan trivial.', 'ko': '증량 사상은 인간과 기계의 상호작용에 보편적으로 존재하고 인간과 기계의 상호작용에 유리하다.NLP 커뮤니티의 다양한 부분에 대한 연구 주제로 주로 수중에 있는 특정한 주제에 집중되어 왔다. 비록 어느 분야에서든 증량 시스템은 유사한 도전에 대응해야 하지만.이번 조사에서 나는 이러한 방법을 통합하고 분류하여 계산과 데이터의 유사성과 차이성을 확정하고 반드시 고려해야 할 균형을 보여 주었다.증량 시스템을 평가하는 데 중점을 두는데 표준 도량은 일반적으로 시스템의 증량 속성을 포획할 수 없기 때문에 적당한 평가 방안을 제시하는 것이 매우 중요하다.', 'fa': 'افزایش در تعامل انسان و انسان\u200cها و مفید برای تعامل کامپیوتر انسان است. این موضوع تحقیقات در بخشی های مختلف جامعه NLP بود، که بیشتر با تمرکز روی موضوع خاص در دست است، حتی با وجود اینکه سیستم افزایش باید با چالش های مشابهی بغیر از دامنه حل کنند. در این تحقیقات، من روش\u200cها را متصل می\u200cکنم و تقسیم می\u200cکنم، مشابهی و تفاوت\u200cها در محاسبات و داده\u200cها را شناسایی می\u200cکنم، و تفاوت\u200cهای تجارت را نشان می\u200cدهم که باید تحقیق شود. تمرکز بر ارزیابی سیستم\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای است چون متریک استاندارد اغلب نمی\u200cتواند ویژه\u200cهای اضافه\u200cای از یک سیستم را بگیرد و برنامه\u200cی ارزیابی مناسب را پیدا کند غیر ترویژه است.', 'sw': 'Kuongezeka ni tofauti katika mahusiano ya binadamu na yenye manufaa kwa ajili ya mahusiano ya kompyuta ya binadamu. Imekuwa mada ya utafiti katika sehemu mbalimbali za jumuiya ya NLP, has a kwa lengo la kutangaza mada maalum kwa upande mwingine hata kama mfumo wa kuongezeka unapaswa kukabiliana na changamoto kama hizo bila kujali domain. Katika utafiti huu, ninaunganisha na kutenganisha mbinu hizo, kutambua sawa na tofauti katika hisabati na taarifa, na kuonyesha matumizi ya biashara yanayopaswa kuchukuliwa. Lengo linalenga kutathmini mfumo wa kuongezeka kwa sababu mbinu za kiwango ambazo mara nyingi hushindwa kushindwa kukutana na utaalam wa mfumo unaoendelea na kuja na mpango wa uchunguzi unaoendelea hauna vizuri.', 'sq': 'Incrementaliteti është gjithandej në ndërveprimin njerëzor-njerëzor dhe i dobishëm për ndërveprimin njerëzor-kompjuter. Ajo ka qenë një temë kërkimi në pjesë të ndryshme të komunitetit NLP, kryesisht me përqëndrim në temën specifike në dorë edhe pse sistemet shtesë duhet të trajtojnë sfida të ngjashme pavarësisht nga domenia. Në këtë sondazh, unë konsolidoj dhe kategorizoj qasjet, identifikoj ngjashmëritë dhe dallimet në llogaritjet dhe të dhënat, dhe tregoj kompromise që duhet konsideruar. Një fokus mbështetet në vlerësimin e sistemeve shtesë sepse metrikat standarte shpesh nuk kapin pronësitë shtesë të një sistemi dhe të vijnë me një skemë të përshtatshme vlerësimi është jo-trivial.', 'am': 'Incrementality is ubiquitous in human-human interaction and beneficial for human-computer interaction.  የNLP ማኅበረሰብ በተለዩ ክፍሎች ላይ ትምህርት መሆኑን ነው፡፡ አብዛኛውም የፍጥረት ስርዓቶች ምንም እንኳ ከውይይት ቢሆንም እንኳን እንደዚህ የሚመስል ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀበል ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ምርመራ፣ የግንኙነቶችን አካካካክል እና ልዩነትን በማሳየት፣ ቁጥጥር እና ዳታዎችን ልዩነት እና ማሳየት እና የንግድ-ፍላጎቶችን ማሳየት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ምኩስነቱ ስርዓቶችን በማስተካከል ላይ ነው፤ ምክንያቱም የደካማው ሜትሪኮች ብዙ ጊዜ የሲስተም ምርጫዎችን ለመያዝ አይችሉም፤ በመጠቀም ማስታወቂያ ፕሮግራም አይፈለጉም፡፡', 'af': "Inkrementaliteit is onbeskikbaar in menslike-menslike interaksie en voordeel vir menslike-rekenaar interaksie. Dit is 'n onderwerp van ondersoek in verskillende dele van die NLP gemeenskap, meeste met fokus op die spesifieke onderwerp aan die hand selfs al het inkremensiele stelsels met gelyke uitdagings moet behandel ongeag van domein. In hierdie ondersoek, ek konsoliseer en kategoriseer die toegange, identifiseer gelykenisse en verskillinge in die rekenaar en data en vertoon die handelings wat moet aandag word. 'n Fokus lê op die evaluering van inkremensiele stelsels omdat die standaard metries dikwels misluk om die inkremensiele eienskappe van 'n stelsel te vang en met 'n geskikte evalueringsskema te kom is nie-triviaal.", 'bn': 'মানুষের মানুষের প্রতিক্রিয়ার মধ্যে বাড়তে পারে এবং মানুষ-কম্পিউটার ইন্টারেকশনের জন্য সুবিধা। এনএলপি সম্প্রদায়ের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন অংশে গবেষণার বিষয়টি ছিল, বেশীরভাগ দিকে নির্দিষ্ট বিষয়ের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়ে মনোযোগ দিয়েছে, যদিও বা এই জরিপে আমি এই পদ্ধতিগুলোকে সংশোধন এবং তথ্যের মধ্যে পার্থক্য চিহ্নিত করি এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের বিভিন্ন ধরনের পরিচিতি এবং দেখ কারণ স্ট্যান্ডার্ড মেট্রিক প্রায়শই একটি সিস্টেমের বৈশিষ্ট্যের বৈশিষ্ট্য ধরে নিতে ব্যর্থ এবং একটি যথাযথ মূল্য পরিকল্পনা নিয়ে আসতে ব্যর', 'tr': 'Beýik ýagdaýy adam-ynsan etkileşinde we adam-kompýuter etkileşinde faydaly däldir. NLP jemgyýetiniň farklı bölgelerinde araştyrma meselesi bar, köplenç öz ýagdaýdaky temada üns berýän. Aýratyn sistemalar domena raýratyn soňra meňzeş kynçylyklary çözmelidir. Bu araşdyrmada, men golaýlary konsolidýar we kategoriýalaýaryn, hasaplamalar we berüvleriň farklygyny tanyýaryn we gözlemeli işlerini görkezmek üçin ýüze çözmelidir. Adamlar sistemalary deňleşdirmek üçin fokus edýär sebäbi standart metrikler köplenç sistemiň hasaplaryny çekip bilmeýärler we gowy deňleşdirmek taslamasynda ýetişmeýärler.', 'ca': "L'incrementalitat és ubicada en l'interacció humana-humana i beneficiosa per l'interacció humana-ordinador. Ha estat un tema de recerca en diverses parts de la comunitat del NLP, principalment centrant-se en el tema específic a mà, encara que els sistemes incrementals han de afrontar desafiaments similars independentment del domini. En aquest estudi, consolido i categorijo els enfocaments, identificant similituds i diferències en els càlculs i les dades, i mostro compensacions que s'han de considerar. Un enfocament es centra en l'evaluació de sistemes incrementals perquè les mètriques estándar sovint no capturen les propietats incrementals d'un sistema i crear un esquema d'evaluació adequat no és trivial.", 'hy': 'Ամենաբարձրությունը գոյություն ունի մարդկային-մարդկային փոխազդեցության մեջ և օգտակար է մարդկային-համակարգիչների փոխազդեցության մեջ: Դա ՆԼՊ համայնքի տարբեր մասերում ուսումնասիրության թեման է եղել, հիմնականում կենտրոնանալով կոնկրետ թեմայի վրա, չնայած, որ բազմաթիվ համակարգերը պետք է լուծեն նման մարտահրավերներ անկախ բնագավառից: In this survey, I consolidate and categorize the approaches, identifying similarities and differences in the computation and data, and show trade-offs that have to be considered.  Սկզբունքն այն է, որ գնահատում են ավելացված համակարգերը, որովհետև ստանդարտ մետրիկները հաճախ չեն ընդունում համակարգի ավելացված հատկությունները, և համապատասխան գնահատման ծրագիր ստեղծելը անփոքրիկ է:', 'az': 'İnsan-insan interaksiyasında böyüklük və insan-kompjuter interaksiyası üçün faydalandır. Bu NLP toplumunun müxtəlif hissələrində araştırmaların məsəli idi, çoxluğu dəyişiklik sistemlərin domain olmasına baxmayaraq bənzər çətinliklərlə çəkilməsi lazımdır. Bu araştırmalarda, mən tərzlərini birləşdirir və kategoriyalar edirəm, hesablama və məlumatlarda bənzərini və fərqli tərzlərini tanıyır və düşünməli ticarətlər göstərirəm. Standardlı metrik sistemin artımlı xüsusiyyətlərini değerləşdirməyə məcburiyyət edir, çünki sistemin artımlı xüsusiyyətlərini yaxalamaq və uyğun değerləşdirmək taslağı yaratmaq çox kiçik deyildir.', 'bs': 'Povećanje je svuda u interakciji ljudskih i ljudskih ljudi i korisno za interakciju ljudskih kompjutera. To je bila tema istraživanja u različitim dijelovima zajednice NLP-a, uglavnom s fokusom na specifičnu tema na kojoj se nalazi, iako povećani sistemi moraju riješiti slične izazove bez obzira na domenu. U ovom istraživanju, konsolidujem i kategoriziram pristupe, identifikujem sličnosti i razlike u računalu i podacima, i pokazujem trgovinske odluke koje moraju razmotriti. Fokus se nalazi na procjenjivanju incrementalnih sustava jer standardna metrika često ne hvata incrementalne vlasništva sustava i smisliti odgovarajuću procjenu schemu nije trivialna.', 'cs': 'Inkrementalita je všudypřítomná v interakci člověk-člověk a přínosná pro interakci člověk-počítač. Bylo tématem výzkumu v různých částech NLP komunity, především se zaměřením na konkrétní téma, i když inkrementální systémy musí řešit podobné výzvy bez ohledu na doménu. V tomto průzkumu konsoliduji a kategorizuji přístupy, identifikuji podobnosti a rozdíly ve výpočtu a datech a ukazuji kompromisy, které je třeba zvážit. Zaměřujeme se na hodnocení inkrementálních systémů, protože standardní metriky často nedokážou zachytit inkrementální vlastnosti systému a vytvoření vhodného schématu hodnocení je netriviální.', 'fi': 'Kasvautuminen on kaikkialla ihmisen ja ihmisen välisessä vuorovaikutuksessa ja hyödyllinen ihmisen ja tietokoneen välisessä vuorovaikutuksessa. Se on ollut tutkimusaiheena eri puolilla NLP-yhteisöä, lähinnä keskittyen käsiteltävään aiheeseen, vaikka inkrementaaliset järjestelmät joutuvat käsittelemään samankaltaisia haasteita toimialueesta riippumatta. Tässä tutkimuksessa konsolidoin ja luokittelen lähestymistapoja, tunnistan yhtäläisyyksiä ja eroja laskennassa ja tiedoissa sekä esittelen kompromisseja, jotka on otettava huomioon. Painopiste on inkrementaalisten järjestelmien arvioinnissa, koska standardimittareilla ei usein pystytä kuvaamaan järjestelmän inkrementaalisia ominaisuuksia ja sopivan arviointijärjestelmän laatiminen ei ole triviaalia.', 'et': 'Kasvatavus on inimese-inimese suhtluses kõikjal leviv ja kasulik inimese-arvuti suhtlusele. See on olnud uurimisteema NLP kogukonna erinevates osades, peamiselt keskendudes konkreetsele teemale, kuigi täiendavad süsteemid peavad tegelema sarnaste probleemidega olenemata valdkonnast. Selles uuringus konsolideerin ja kategoorisin lähenemisviise, tuvastasin arvutuste ja andmete sarnasused ja erinevused ning näitan kompromisse, mida tuleb arvestada. Keskendutakse täiendavate süsteemide hindamisele, sest standardsed mõõdikud ei suuda sageli süsteemi täiendavaid omadusi hõlmata ja sobiva hindamisskeemi väljatöötamine ei ole triviaalne.', 'he': 'האינדרמנטליות היא בכל מקום באינטראקציה אנושית-אנושית ויעילה לאינטראקציה אנושית-מחשב. It has been a topic of research in different parts of the NLP community, mostly with focus on the specific topic at hand even though incremental systems have to deal with similar challenges regardless of domain.  בסקר הזה, אני קונצנציה וקטגוריה את הגישויים, מזהה דמיונות והשונים בחשבונות ובנתונים, ומראה את הסחרות שעליהן לשקול. התמקדות נמצאת על הערכה של מערכות משותפות כי המטריקות הסטנדרטיות לעתים קרובות לא מצליחות לתפוס את תכונות המשותפות של מערכת ולמצוא תכנית הערכה מתאימה היא לא טריוויאלית.', 'ha': "Tsarin mutane na da amfani ga interaction na mutane. Tana zama madaidaita a cikin rabo dabam-daban na jamii NLP, mafi yawa, yana makõmi zuwa ga madaidaici masu ƙayyadadde da hannun, kuma kõ dã na'urar da ƙarami za'a karɓi kwamfyuta masu kami da kwamfyuta ko da yaushe. A cikin wannan suriyar, Ina tabbatar da kuma nake rarraba masu hanyõyi, kuma ina gane masu daidaita da sãɓãni a cikin lissafar da data, kuma na nuna fatauci-offs da za'a iya ƙayyade. Wata fokus na ƙayyade kan evaluation na'urar na'urar da za'a iya ƙara, kwani metric na'urar da ɗabi'a, ana kasa yin kãma properties na'urar na'urar da kuma a sami da wani shirin evaluation da daidai, yana da amfani ba.", 'sk': 'Povečanje je vsepovsod v interakciji med človekom in človekom in koristno za interakcijo med človekom in računalnikom. To je bila tema raziskav v različnih delih skupnosti NLP, večinoma s poudarkom na posebni temi, čeprav se morajo postopni sistemi soočati s podobnimi izzivi ne glede na področje. V tej anketi konsolidiram in kategoriziram pristope, ugotavljam podobnosti in razlike v izračunu in podatkih ter prikazujem kompromise, ki jih je treba upoštevati. Poudarek je na vrednotenju sistemov postopkov, saj standardne meritve pogosto ne zajemajo postopkovnih lastnosti sistema in oblikovanje ustrezne sheme ocenjevanja ni trivialno.', 'bo': 'ཡར་རྒྱས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་མི་དང་མི་འབྲེལ་འདྲེན་བའི་སུ་བཏང་བའི་རྐྱེན་པ་ཡིན། It has been a topic of research in different parts of the NLP community, mostly with focus on the specific topic at hand, even though incremental systems have to deal with similar challenges regardless of domain. ངས་ལྟ་ཞིབ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་དང་གནད་དོན་མཉམ་དུ་ཆེ་རྣམས་མཐུན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡར་རྒྱས་ལུགས་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་གི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་སྟངས་འདྲ་ཡིན། རྒྱུ་མཚན་ནི་ཚད་རྩིས་གཞི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཡིག་ལག་གི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཀྱི་ཡར་རྒྱས', 'jv': 'Tolimanggu Rasané dumadhi kapan kelas kapan dumadhi NLP, ingkang dipun nggawe tema sing apik dhéwé, gawe sistem sing isih akeh podho akeh operasi luwih dumadhi. Nang araha-arahan iki, aku sênêmên karo kategori sing beraksi karo pawar Soalé kabèh mengko nggawe sistem sing nggawe luwih apik dadi, kuwi awak dhéwé, nik awak dhéwé kuwi kesempatan karo sistem sing entuk dhéwé gawe nguasai sistem sing bisa teka-tribalé.'}
{'en': 'Multi-layer Representation Fusion for Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'دمج التمثيل متعدد الطبقات للترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'pt': 'Fusão de representação multicamada para tradução automática neural', 'fr': 'Fusion de représentations multicouches pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'es': 'Fusión de representación multicapa para traducción automática neuronal', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳のための多層表現融合', 'zh': '以神经机器翻译重为融合', 'ru': 'Слияние многослойного представления для нейронного машинного перевода', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए बहु-परत प्रतिनिधित्व संलयन', 'ga': "Comhleá Léirithe Ilchiseal d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach", 'el': 'Πολυστρωματική σύντηξη αναπαράστασης για νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'hu': 'Többrétegű reprezentációs fúzió a neurális gépi fordításhoz', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Fusione di rappresentazione multistrato per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'kk': 'Көп қабатты түріндіру нейрондық машинаны аудару үшін түріндіру Fusion', 'lt': 'Daugiasluoksnio reprezentacinė sintezė neuroninių mašinų vertimui', 'ms': 'Fusi Perwakilan Berlapisan untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക്കുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Fużjoni ta’ Rappreżentanza f’diversi saffi għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Magni Newrali', 'pl': 'Wielowarstwowa fuzja reprezentacji dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ro': 'Fusion de reprezentare în mai multe straturi pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'mn': 'Олон-давхар төлөвлөгөө мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулах', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'Представљање многослојева фузија за превод невралног машина', 'sv': 'Flerskiktig representation Fusion för neural maskinöversättning', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Fusion for Neural machine Translation', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான பல் அடுக்கு மாற்றுதல் மூலம்', 'ur': 'نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے بہت سی لائر ریسپرینٹشن فوزین', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết đa cấp về máy móc thần kinh', 'bg': 'Многослойно представяне за неврален машинен превод', 'da': 'Flerlagsrepræsentationsfusion til neural maskinoversættelse', 'hr': 'Većina slojeva prezentacija fuzije za neuronski prevod strojeva', 'nl': 'Multilayer Representation Fusion voor Neural Machine Translation', 'de': 'Mehrschichtige Repräsentationsfusion für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Multi-layer Representation Fusion for Neural Machine Translation', 'ko': '신경 기계 번역의 다중 표시 융합', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa', 'af': 'Name', 'tr': 'Nural Makina Terjime üçin Köçek Kalamlar Temsil Fusion', 'sq': 'Multi-layer Representation Fusion for Neural Machine Translation', 'am': 'undo-type', 'az': 'Nöral Makin Çeviri üçün çoxlu-katlı Representation Fusion', 'hy': 'Բազմաշերտ ներկայացման ֆուզիան նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համար', 'bn': 'Multi-layer Representation Fusion for Neural Machine Translation', 'bs': 'Višeslojno predstavljanje fuzije za neuronski prevod mašine', 'cs': 'Vícevrstvá fúze reprezentace pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'et': 'Mitmekihiline Representation Fusion neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Multi-layer Representation Fusion for Neural Machine Translation', 'ca': 'Representació multicapa fusió per traducció de màquines neurals', 'jv': 'Multi layer', 'sk': 'Večplastna združitev predstavništva za nevralno strojno prevajanje', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion', 'he': 'מייצגת מספר שכבות', 'bo': 'Neural Machine Translation for Multi layer Representation Fusion'}
{'en': 'Neural machine translation systems require a number of stacked layers for deep models. But the prediction depends on the sentence representation of the top-most layer with no access to low-level representations. This makes it more difficult to train the model and poses a risk of information loss to prediction. In this paper, we propose a multi-layer representation fusion (MLRF) approach to fusing stacked layers. In particular, we design three fusion functions to learn a better representation from the stack. Experimental results show that our approach yields improvements of 0.92 and 0.56 BLEU points over the strong Transformer baseline on IWSLT German-English and NIST Chinese-English MT tasks respectively. The result is new state-of-the-art in German-English translation.', 'ar': 'تتطلب أنظمة الترجمة الآلية العصبية عددًا من الطبقات المكدسة للنماذج العميقة. لكن التنبؤ يعتمد على تمثيل الجملة للطبقة الأعلى مع عدم إمكانية الوصول إلى التمثيلات منخفضة المستوى. هذا يجعل من الصعب تدريب النموذج ويشكل خطر فقدان المعلومات للتنبؤ. في هذا البحث ، نقترح طريقة دمج تمثيل متعدد الطبقات (MLRF) لدمج الطبقات المكدسة. على وجه الخصوص ، نقوم بتصميم ثلاث وظائف اندماج لمعرفة تمثيل أفضل من المكدس. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نهجنا ينتج عنه تحسينات بمقدار 0.92 و 0.56 نقطة BLEU على خط الأساس القوي للمحول في مهام الترجمة الآلية IWSLT الألمانية-الإنجليزية و NIST الصينية-الإنجليزية على التوالي. والنتيجة هي أحدث ما توصلت إليه الترجمة في الترجمة الألمانية-الإنجليزية.', 'fr': "Les systèmes de traduction automatique neuronale nécessitent un certain nombre de couches empilées pour les modèles profonds. Mais la prédiction dépend de la représentation de phrase de la couche supérieure sans accès aux représentations de bas niveau. Cela rend plus difficile l'entraînement du modèle et présente un risque de perte d'informations pour les prévisions. Dans cet article, nous proposons une approche de fusion de représentation multicouche (MLRF) pour fusionner des couches empilées. En particulier, nous concevons trois fonctions de fusion afin d'obtenir une meilleure représentation de la pile. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre approche produit des améliorations de 0,92 et 0,56 point UEBL par rapport à la base forte du transformateur sur les tâches MT allemand-anglais IWSLT et chinois-anglais du NIST respectivement. Le résultat est une nouvelle technologie de traduction allemand-anglais.", 'pt': 'Os sistemas de tradução automática neural exigem várias camadas empilhadas para modelos profundos. Mas a previsão depende da representação de sentença da camada superior sem acesso a representações de baixo nível. Isso dificulta o treinamento do modelo e representa um risco de perda de informações para a previsão. Neste artigo, propomos uma abordagem de fusão de representação multicamada (MLRF) para fundir camadas empilhadas. Em particular, projetamos três funções de fusão para aprender uma representação melhor da pilha. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nossa abordagem produz melhorias de 0,92 e 0,56 pontos BLEU sobre a forte linha de base do Transformer nas tarefas de MT IWSLT Alemão-Inglês e NIST Chinês-Inglês, respectivamente. O resultado é um novo estado-da-arte na tradução alemão-inglês.', 'es': 'Los sistemas de traducción automática neuronal requieren una serie de capas apiladas para los modelos profundos. Pero la predicción depende de la representación de la oración de la capa superior sin acceso a representaciones de bajo nivel. Esto hace que sea más difícil entrenar el modelo y plantea un riesgo de pérdida de información para la predicción. En este artículo, proponemos un enfoque de fusión de representación multicapa (MLRF) para fusionar capas apiladas. En particular, diseñamos tres funciones de fusión para aprender una mejor representación de la pila. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro enfoque produce mejoras de 0.92 y 0.56 puntos BLEU sobre la sólida base de Transformer en las tareas de MT alemán-inglés de IWSLT y chino-inglés del NIST, respectivamente. El resultado es un nuevo estado de la técnica en traducción alemán-inglés.', 'ja': 'ニューラル機械翻訳システムは、ディープモデルのために多数の積層を必要とする。しかし、予測は、低レベルの表現にアクセスできない最上位のレイヤーの文章表現に依存します。これにより、モデルのトレーニングがより困難になり、予測に情報が失われるリスクがあります。本稿では，積層層の融合に対する多層表現融合（ MLRF ）アプローチを提案する．特に、3つの融合関数を設計して、スタックからより良い表現を学びます。実験結果は、私たちのアプローチが、IWSLTドイツ語-英語およびNIST中国語-英語MTタスクの強力なトランスフォーマーベースラインに対して、それぞれ0.92および0.56 BLEUポイントの改善をもたらすことを示しています。その結果、ドイツ語と英語の翻訳における最先端の新技術が生まれた。', 'ru': 'Нейронные системы машинного перевода требуют ряда слоёв для глубоких моделей. Но предсказание зависит от представления предложения самого верхнего слоя без доступа к низкоуровневым представлениям. Это затрудняет обучение модели и создает риск потери информации для прогнозирования. В этой статье мы предлагаем подход многослойного слияния представлений (MLRF) для слияния слоёв в стопку. В частности, мы проектируем три функции слияния, чтобы узнать лучшее представление из стека. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш подход дает улучшения на 0,92 и 0,56 пунктов BLEU по сравнению с сильной базовой линией Трансформатора на задачах IWSLT немецко-английский и NIST китайско-английский MT соответственно. Результатом является новый современный немецко-английский перевод.', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद प्रणालियों को गहरे मॉडल के लिए कई स्टैक्ड परतों की आवश्यकता होती है। लेकिन भविष्यवाणी निम्न-स्तरीय प्रतिनिधित्व तक पहुंच के साथ शीर्ष-सबसे परत के वाक्य प्रतिनिधित्व पर निर्भर करती है। यह मॉडल को प्रशिक्षित करना अधिक कठिन बनाता है और भविष्यवाणी के लिए जानकारी के नुकसान का जोखिम पैदा करता है। इस पेपर में, हम स्टैक्ड परतों को फ्यूज करने के लिए एक बहु-परत प्रतिनिधित्व संलयन (एमएलआरएफ) दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम स्टैक से बेहतर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए तीन संलयन कार्यों को डिजाइन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारे दृष्टिकोण से क्रमशः IWSLT जर्मन-अंग्रेजी और NIST चीनी-अंग्रेजी एमटी कार्यों पर मजबूत ट्रांसफॉर्मर बेसलाइन पर 0.92 और 0.56 BLEU अंकों में सुधार होता है। परिणाम जर्मन-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद में नया अत्याधुनिक है।', 'zh': '神经机器翻译统须多积重而成深度。 然占在顶层句,无法访问下也。 此益难,而信失之险也。 于本文中,多示融合(MLRF)法以融合叠层。 设三融合函数,以从堆栈中学之。 实验结果表明在IWSLT德英、NIST中英MT之任,在强变压器基线之上,各崇0.920.56 BLEU。 新最先进之德语 - 英语翻译。', 'ga': 'Teastaíonn roinnt sraitheanna cruachta le haghaidh mionsamhlacha ó chórais néaraistriúcháin. Ach braitheann an tuar ar léiriú na habairte den chiseal is airde gan rochtain ar uiríll ar leibhéal íseal. Fágann sé sin go bhfuil sé níos deacra an tsamhail a oiliúint agus cruthaíonn sé baol go gcaillfear faisnéis roimh thuar. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid cur chuige comhleá ionadaíochta ilchiseal (MLRF) maidir le sraitheanna cruachta a chomhleá. Go háirithe, déanaimid trí fheidhm chomhleá a dhearadh chun ionadaíocht níos fearr a fhoghlaim ón gcruach. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go dtugann ár gcur chuige feabhsuithe de 0.92 agus 0.56 pointe BLEU thar an mbonnlíne láidir Transformer ar thascanna MT Gearmáinis-Béarla IWSLT agus NIST Sínis-Béarla faoi seach. Is é an toradh ar an stát-de-aimseartha aistriúchán Gearmáinis-Béarla.', 'hu': 'A neurális gépi fordító rendszerek számos halmozott réteget igényelnek a mély modellekhez. De az előrejelzés a legfelső réteg mondatábrázolásától függ, ahol nincs hozzáférés az alacsony szintű reprezentációkhoz. Ez megnehezíti a modell képzését, és kockázatot jelent az információvesztés előrejelzése szempontjából. Ebben a tanulmányban egy többrétegű reprezentációs fúziós (MLRF) megközelítést javasolunk a halmozott rétegek összeolvadására. Különösen három fúziós függvényt tervezünk, hogy jobb ábrázolást tanuljunk a stackből. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk 0,92 és 0,56 BLEU ponttal javul az IWSLT német-angol, illetve NIST kínai-angol MT feladatok erős transzformátor alapjához képest. Az eredmény egy új korszerű német-angol fordítás.', 'el': 'Τα νευρωνικά συστήματα μηχανικής μετάφρασης απαιτούν έναν αριθμό στοιβαγμένων στρωμάτων για βαθιά μοντέλα. Αλλά η πρόβλεψη εξαρτάται από την αναπαράσταση της πρότασης του ανώτερου στρώματος χωρίς πρόσβαση σε αναπαραστάσεις χαμηλού επιπέδου. Αυτό καθιστά πιο δύσκολο να εκπαιδεύσει το μοντέλο και ενέχει κίνδυνο απώλειας πληροφοριών για την πρόβλεψη. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση σύντηξης αναπαράστασης πολλαπλών στρωμάτων (ΜΛΦ) για τη συγχώνευση στοιβαγμένων στρωμάτων. Ειδικότερα, σχεδιάζουμε τρεις λειτουργίες σύντηξης για να μάθουμε μια καλύτερη αναπαράσταση από τη στοίβα. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας αποδίδει βελτιώσεις των σημείων 0.92 και 0.56 έναντι της ισχυρής βάσης μετασχηματιστή σε γερμανικά-αγγλικά και κινεζικά-αγγλικά καθήκοντα NIST αντίστοιχα. Το αποτέλεσμα είναι μια νέα υπερσύγχρονη μετάφραση στα γερμανικά-αγγλικά.', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური მაქინის გადატვირთვა სისტემები ძალიან დიდი მოდელეებისთვის დაკავშირებული სისტემები იჭირდება. მაგრამ პროგრამები უფრო მეტი სიტყვის გამოსახულებაზე დაახლოდება, რომელიც უფრო მეტი სიტყვის გამოსახულებაში არაფერად მიიღება. ეს უფრო რთული იქნება მოდელის გაგრძნობა და იქნება ინფორმაციის დაკავშირების რისკი. ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ მრავალური განსაზღვრებების ფუზიცია (MLRF) მიზემი, რომელიც სტუზიციებული სიახლეების შესახებ. განსაკუთრებით, ჩვენ სამი ფუნქციების განაზღვრება, რომ უკეთესი გამოყენება სტატიდან ვისწავლოთ. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა 0.92 და 0.56 BLEU წარმოდგენების უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო ძალიან ტრანფორმენტერის ბაზლინზე IWSLT გერმანეთიურ პვჱსლრარა ვ ნჲგჲ ჟრანარჲ ნა თჱკლძფვნთვ გ დვპმანჟკჲ-ანდლთფვჟკჲ ოპვგყპჟგანვ.', 'it': "I sistemi di traduzione automatica neurale richiedono un certo numero di strati impilati per i modelli profondi. Ma la previsione dipende dalla rappresentazione della frase del livello più alto senza accesso alle rappresentazioni di basso livello. Ciò rende più difficile allenare il modello e comporta un rischio di perdita di informazioni alla previsione. In questo articolo, proponiamo un approccio multi-layer representation fusion (MLRF) per la fusione di strati impilati. In particolare, progettiamo tre funzioni di fusione per imparare una migliore rappresentazione dallo stack. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il nostro approccio produce miglioramenti di 0,92 e 0,56 punti BLEU rispetto alla forte base Transformer sulle attività IWSLT tedesco-inglese e NIST cinese-inglese MT rispettivamente. Il risultato è un nuovo stato dell'arte nella traduzione tedesco-inglese.", 'kk': 'Нейрондық компьютердің аудару жүйелері үлкен үлгілер үшін бірнеше қабатты қабаттарды талап етеді. Бірақ бұл таңдау сөздердің ең жоғары қабаттың негізінде тәуелді, төмен деңгейіне қатынау мүмкіндігі жоқ. Бұл үлгі оқыту және мәліметтің жоғалуының қауіпсіздігін көрсетеді. Бұл қағазда біз бірнеше қабатты қабаттарды біріктіру (MLRF) түрінде бірнеше қабатты түрлендіру арқылы ұсынадық. Әрине біз үш функциясын құрастырып, стактан жақсы мәліметті үйрену үшін. Эксперименталдық нәтижелер біздің тәсіліміздің 0,92 және 0,56 BLEU нәтижелерін IWSLT неміс-ағылшын және NIST қытайлық-ағылшын MT тапсырмаларындағы күшті трансформатордың негізгі жолында жа Нәтижесі - неміс- ағылшын тілінде жаңа орындау күйі.', 'lt': 'Neuralinėms mašinų vertimo sistemoms reikia keleto pilnų sluoksnių giliems modeliams. Tačiau prognozė priklauso nuo aukščiausio sluoksnio frazės, neturinčios galimybės gauti žemo lygio reprezentacijų. Tai apsunkina modelio mokymą ir kelia informacijos praradimo prognozėms riziką. Šiame dokumente siūlome įvairių sluoksnių reprezentacinės sintezės (MLRF) metodą sintezei surinktų sluoksnių. In particular, we design three fusion functions to learn a better representation from the stack.  Experimental results show that our approach yields improvements of 0.92 and 0.56 BLEU points over the strong Transformer baseline on IWSLT German-English and NIST Chinese-English MT tasks respectively.  Šis rezultatas yra naujausias vertimas vokiečių ir anglų kalbomis.', 'ms': 'Sistem terjemahan mesin saraf memerlukan sejumlah lapisan tumpukan untuk model dalam. Tetapi ramalan bergantung pada perwakilan kalimat paling atas lapisan tanpa akses ke perwakilan aras rendah. Ini membuat ia lebih sukar untuk melatih model dan mengakibatkan risiko kehilangan maklumat untuk ramalan. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan pelbagai lapisan perwakilan fusi (MLRF) untuk menggabungkan lapisan tumpukan. Terutama, kita merancang tiga fungsi fusi untuk belajar perwakilan yang lebih baik dari tumpukan. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita memberikan peningkatan 0.92 dan 0.56 titik BLEU atas dasar Transformer kuat pada tugas MT Jerman-Inggeris IWSLT dan NIST Cina-Inggeris. Hasilnya adalah state-of-the-art baru dalam terjemahan bahasa Jerman-Inggeris.', 'ml': 'Neural machine translation systems require a number of stacked layers for deep models.  പക്ഷെ ഈ പ്രവചനം മുകളില്\u200d ഏറ്റവും കൂടുതല്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന വാക്കിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയില്\u200d ആശ്രയിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ക ഇത് മോഡലിനെ പരിശീലിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന് കൂടുതല്\u200d ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടാക്കുന്നു. വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d നഷ്ടപ്പെടുത്തുന് ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പല-layer പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്ന ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d (എംഎല്\u200dആര്\u200dഎഫ്) സ്റ്റാക്കിന്റെ അടുത്തുള്ള അടുത്തു പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d മൂന്നു ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d ഫങ്ഷനുകള്\u200d ഡിസൈന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നു. സ്റ്റാക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും നല്ല പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നടപടി 0. 92, 0. 56 ബിലിയുവിന്റെ മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഐവ്വിഎസ്എല്\u200dടി ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200dഷ്യന അതിന്റെ ഫലം ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d- ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിഭാഷയിലെ പുതിയ സ്ഥാനം- കാര്യം.', 'mk': 'Системите за превод на неврални машини бараат голем број составени слоеви за длабоки модели. Но предвидувањето зависи од претставувањето на речениците на највисокиот слој без пристап до ниско ниво претставувања. Ова го прави потешко обуката на моделот и претставува ризик за загуба на информации за предвидување. Во оваа хартија, предложуваме пристап на мултислоевна репрезентација на фузија (MLRF) за фузија на составени слоеви. Особено, дизајнираме три функции за функција на функција за да научиме подобра репрезентација од купот. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот пристап предизвикува подобрувања од 0,92 и 0,56 БЛЕУ поени во однос на силната база на трансформирање на IWSLT германско-англиски и NIST кинеско-англиски мет задачи, односно. Резултатот е нов најнов превод на германско-англиски.', 'mt': 'Is-sistemi tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali jeħtieġu għadd ta’ saffi stacked għal mudelli profondi. Iżda t-tbassir jiddependi fuq ir-rappreżentazzjoni tas-sentenza tal-ogħla saff mingħajr aċċess għal rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ livell baxx. This makes it more difficult to train the model and poses a risk of information loss to prediction.  F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu approċċ ta’ fużjoni ta’ rappreżentanza fuq diversi saffi (MLRF) għall-fużjoni ta’ saffi stacked. B’mod partikolari, a ħna niddisinjaw tliet funzjonijiet ta’ fużjoni biex nitgħallmu rappreżentazzjoni aħjar mill-pila. Riżultati sperimentali juru li l-approċċ tagħna jwassal għal titjib ta’ 0.92 u 0.56 punti BLEU fuq il-linja bażi qawwija Transformer fuq il-kompiti MT IWSLT Ġermaniż-Ingliż u NIST Ċiniż-Ingliż rispettivament. Ir-riżultat huwa l-aktar avvanzat fit-traduzzjoni Ġermaniża-Ingliża.', 'no': '@ info Men forhåndsvising er avhengig av setninga som representerer det øvre meste laget utan tilgang til låg nivårepresentasjonar. Dette gjer det vanskeleg å trena modellen og gjera ein risiko for å mista informasjon til forhåndsvising. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein tilnærming av fleire lagrepresentasjonar (MLRF) til å fyssera stakke lag. I særskilt designerer vi tre fusjonsfunksjonar for å lære eit betre representasjon frå stakken. Eksperimentale resultat viser at tilnærminga vårt gjer forbedringar av 0,92 og 0,56 BLEU-punkt over den sterke transformeringsbaseline på IWSLT-tysk-engelsk og NIST kinesisk-engelsk MT-oppgåver. Resultatet er ny kunsttilstand i tysk-engelsk omsetjing.', 'pl': 'Neuralne systemy tłumaczenia maszynowe wymagają szeregu układanych warstw dla głębokich modeli. Ale przewidywanie zależy od reprezentacji zdań najwyższej warstwy bez dostępu do reprezentacji niskiego poziomu. Utrudnia to szkolenie modelu i stwarza ryzyko utraty informacji do przewidywania. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy podejście do fuzji wielowarstwowej reprezentacji (MLRF) do łączenia warstw stosowanych. W szczególności projektujemy trzy funkcje fuzji, aby nauczyć się lepszej reprezentacji ze stosu. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasze podejście przynosi poprawę punktów 0.92 i 0.56 BLEU w porównaniu z silną bazą podstawową Transformera odpowiednio w zadaniach MT IWSLT niemiecko-angielski i NIST chińsko-angielski. Rezultatem jest nowy state-of-the-art w tłumaczeniu niemiecko-angielskim.', 'ro': 'Sistemele de traducere automată neurală necesită un număr de straturi stivuite pentru modelele profunde. Dar predicția depinde de reprezentarea frazei celui mai de sus strat, fără acces la reprezentări de nivel scăzut. Acest lucru face mai dificilă pregătirea modelului și prezintă un risc de pierdere a informațiilor la predicție. În această lucrare, propunem o abordare de fuziune de reprezentare multistrat (MLRF) pentru fuziunea straturilor stivuite. În special, proiectăm trei funcții de fuziune pentru a învăța o reprezentare mai bună din stivă. Rezultatele experimentale arată că abordarea noastră generează îmbunătățiri de 0,92 și 0,56 puncte BLEU față de valoarea de referință puternică a Transformer pe sarcinile IWSLT germană-engleză și, respectiv, NIST chineză-engleză MT. Rezultatul este o nouă traducere de ultimă generație în limba germană-engleză.', 'mn': 'Дөвөрмөц машины хөрөнгө оруулах системүүд гүн загварын тулд олон хэмжээний давхар хэрэгтэй. Гэхдээ таамаглал нь хамгийн өндөр хэмжээний илэрхийлэл дээр байдаг. Бага хэмжээний илэрхийлэл дээр байхгүй. Энэ загварыг суралцаж, мэдээллийн алдагдах эрсдэлтэй болгодог. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон давхар хэмжээний хэмжээний нийлүүлэлтийг (MLRF) цуглуулах аргыг санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа бид хэсэгт илүү сайн дүрслэлийг сурахад гурван цуглуулах функц бүтээж байна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний аргыг 0.92, 0.56 BLEU цэг дээр илүү сайжруулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Үүний үр дүнд Герман-Англи хэлний хөгжлийн шинэ улс орнууд юм.', 'sr': 'Neuralni sistemi prevoda mašine zahtevaju broj slojeva za duboke modele. Ali predviđanje zavisi od reprezentacije rečenice najvećeg sloja bez pristupa predstavljanju niskog nivoa. To je teže trenirati model i predviđati rizik gubitka informacija. U ovom papiru predlažemo pristup višeslojnom zastupanju fuzije (MLRF) na fuziju stakla slojeva. Posebno, dizajniramo tri fuzijske funkcije da naučimo bolju predstavu iz gomile. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup pruža poboljšanje od 0,92 i 0,56 BLEU bodova na snažnom osnovnoj liniji transformera IWSLT na njemačkom-engleskom i NIST kineskom-engleskom MT zadatku. Rezultat je novi nacin umjetnosti na njemačkom-engleskom prevodu.', 'so': 'Isticmaalo mool dheer ah waxaa loo baahan yahay nidaamka turjumidda maskinada. Laakiin wixii la soo sheegay waxay ku xiran tahay mid ku qoran xarunta ugu sarreeya, iyadoon helin faa’iidada heerka hoose. Taas waxay ka dhigtaa in aad u adag tahay in sameynta qaabilsan lagu tababaro, waxaadna ka dhigaysaa khatar la’aanta macluumaadka in la sii sheego. Warqadan waxan ku qornaa, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa fudud fuushan xariijimo badan (MLRF). In particular, we design three fusion functions to learn a better representation from the stack.  Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu soo kordhiyo 0.92 iyo 0.56 BLEU goobaha ku qoran karo baaritaanka xoogga badan ee IWSLT Jarmal-Ingiriis iyo shaqada NIST-Ingiriis-Ingiriis MT. Abaalku waa dowladda cusub ee farshaxanka afka Jarmalka-Ingiriiska.', 'sv': 'Neurala maskin철vers채ttningssystem kr채ver ett antal staplade lager f철r djupa modeller. Men f철ruts채gelsen beror p책 meningsrepresentationen av det 철versta skiktet utan tillg책ng till l책gniv책representationer. Detta g철r det sv책rare att tr채na modellen och inneb채r en risk f철r informationsf철rlust till f철ruts채gelse. I denna uppsats f철resl책r vi en flerlagers representation fusion (MLRF) metod f철r fusion av staplade lager. Framf철r allt utformar vi tre fusionsfunktioner f철r att l채ra oss en b채ttre representation fr책n stacken. Experimentella resultat visar att v책rt tillv채gag책ngss채tt ger f철rb채ttringar p책 0,92 och 0,56 BLEU po채ng j채mf철rt med den starka Transformer baseline f철r IWSLT tysk-engelska respektive NIST kinesisk-engelska MT uppgifter. Resultatet 채r en ny toppmodern tysk-engelsk 철vers채ttning.', 'ta': 'நெய்யூரில் இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அமைப்புகள் ஆழமான மாதிரிகளுக்கு ஒரு எண்ணிக்கப்பட்ட அடுக்குகள்  ஆனால் மேல் அதிக அடுக்கு குறைந்த மட்டத்திற்கு அணுகல் இல்லாத வாக்கியத்தின் பிரதிநிதியை சார்ந்துள்ளது. இது மாதிரி பயிற்சி செய்ய மிகவும் கடினமாக செய்கிறது மற்றும் எதிர்காலத்திற்கு தகவல் இழப்பு ஒரு ஆபத்தை கொட இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் பல அடுக்கு குறிப்பிட்ட அடுக்குகளை குறைக்க ஒரு முறையாக தேர்வு செய்கிறோம். குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் மூன்று குளிர்ச்சி செயல்பாடுகளை வடிவமைக்கிறோம் ஸ்டாக் இருந்து சிறந்த பிரதி சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் 0. 92 மற்றும் 0. 56 பிலியு முன்னேற்றத்தை காட்டுகிறது IWSLT ஜெர்மன்- ஆங்கிலம் மற்றும் NIST சீன- ஆங்கிலம் MT பணிகளில் வலிமை மாற் முடிவு என்பது ஜெர்மன்- ஆங்கிலம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் புதிய நிலை- of- the- art.', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාව පද්ධතියට ගොඩක් මෝඩේල් වලට ස්ටැක් ස්ථාපනයක් ඕනි. නමුත් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පහළ ස්තූතියේ වාක්ය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි. මේක තරම් අමාරුයි මොඩල් එක ප්\u200dරධානය කරන්න සහ තොරතුරු නැතිවෙන්න අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ. මේ පත්තරේ අපි ගොඩක් ස්ටැක් ස්ටැක් ස්ථානයෙන් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් ගොඩක් ස්ථානයක් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ප විශේෂයෙන්, අපි ස්ටැක් වලින් හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය තුනක් විනිශ පරීක්ෂණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ විදිහට 0.92 සහ 0.56 BLUE ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරකයේ IWSLT ජර්මන්-ඉංග්\u200dරී ප්\u200dරතිචාරය තමයි ජර්මාන්-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාවිතානයේ අලුත් ජාතියේ ස්ථානය.', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ سیسٹم کی تعداد عمیق موڈل کے لئے سٹک لائر کی ضرورت ہے. لیکن یہ پیش بینی کم سطح کے نمونات کے بغیر کوئی دسترسی نہیں ہے یہ مدل کی تعلیم کے لئے زیادہ مشکل بنا رہا ہے اور پیش بینی کے لئے اطلاعات خسارہ کا خطرہ بنا رہا ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک متعدد لائر نمایش فوسین (MLRF) کی تقریبا پیشنهاد کریں گے۔ مخصوصاً ہم تین فصل فصل طراحی کرتے ہیں کہ استک سے اچھی طراحی سیکھیں۔ Experimental results show that our approach yields 0.92 and 0.56 BLEU points improvements on the strong Transformer baseline on IWSLT German-English and NIST Chinese-English MT tasks respectively. نتیجہ جرمن-انگلیسی ترجمہ میں نئی موقعیت ہے.', 'uz': "Name But the prediction depends on the sentence representation of the top-most layer with no access to low-level representations.  Bu modelni o'rganish qiyin qiladi va hozirganish uchun maʼlumot yoʻqolishi xavfliga ega bo'ladi. Bu qogʻozda, biz bir qatlam representing fusion (MLRF) qo'shish uchun ko'plab qatlamni koʻchirishni talab qilamiz. Hullas, biz uch fusion funksiyalarini o'rganish uchun o'z bir yaxshi tashkilotni o'rganamiz. Tekshirish natijalari shunday ko'rsatadi, bizning qismimiz 0.92 va 0.56 BLEU ishlarini o'zgartiradi IWSLT Olmon- Inglizcha va NIST xitoycha-Ingliz MT vazifalari haqida katta tarjima boshqaruv asosida. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Hệ thống dịch chuyển máy thần kinh yêu cầu một số lớp chồng cho các mô hình sâu. Nhưng dự đoán phụ thuộc vào mức đại diện câu cuối cùng mà không có quyền sử dụng các biểu tượng cấp thấp. Việc này làm khó đào tạo mô hình hơn và gây ra nguy cơ mất thông tin để dự đoán. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp sắp xếp các lớp đại diện nhiều tầng. Chúng tôi thiết kế ba chức năng dung hợp để học cách đại diện tốt hơn từ chồng. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta mang lại sự cải tiến của hàng chục. 92 và 0.56 LEU trên một đường cơ sở biến áp vững cho IWSLT. Tiếng Đức-Anh và NIST. Tiếng Mỹ. đường dẫn đường. Kết quả là bản dịch Đức-Anh mới nổi tiếng.', 'bg': 'Системите за неврален машинен превод изискват редица подредени слоеве за дълбоки модели. Но предсказанието зависи от представянето на изречението на най-горния слой без достъп до представяне на ниско ниво. Това затруднява обучението на модела и представлява риск от загуба на информация за прогнозирането. В настоящата статия предлагаме подход за сливане на многослойно представяне (МЛР) при сливане на подредени слоеве. По-специално, ние проектираме три функции за синтез, за да научим по-добро представяне от стека. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият подход води до подобрения от 0,92 и 0,56 точки спрямо силната база на трансформаторите по немски-английски и китайски-английски МТ задачи съответно. Резултатът е нов съвременен превод на немски-английски език.', 'da': 'Neurale maskinoversættelsessystemer kræver en række stablede lag til dybe modeller. Men forudsigelsen afhænger af sætningsrepræsentationen af det øverste lag uden adgang til lavt niveau repræsentationer. Dette gør det vanskeligere at træne modellen og udgør en risiko for tab af information til forudsigelse. I denne artikel foreslår vi en multi-lags repræsentation fusion (MLRF) tilgang til fusion af stablede lag. Især designer vi tre fusionsfunktioner for at lære en bedre repræsentation fra stakken. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang giver forbedringer på 0,92 og 0,56 BLEU point i forhold til den stærke Transformer baseline på IWSLT tysk-engelsk og NIST kinesisk-engelsk MT opgaver henholdsvis. Resultatet er ny state-of-the-art i tysk-engelsk oversættelse.', 'nl': 'Neuronale machinevertaalsystemen vereisen een aantal gestapelde lagen voor diepe modellen. Maar de voorspelling hangt af van de zinsweergave van de bovenste laag zonder toegang tot laagniveau representaties. Dit maakt het moeilijker om het model te trainen en vormt een risico van informatieverlies aan voorspelling. In dit artikel stellen we een multi-layer representation fusion (MLRF) benadering voor om gestapelde lagen te fuseren. In het bijzonder ontwerpen we drie fusiefuncties om een betere weergave van de stack te leren. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak verbeteringen oplevert van 0.92 en 0.56 BLEU punten boven de sterke Transformer baseline op IWSLT Duits-Engels en NIST Chinees-Engels MT taken respectievelijk. Het resultaat is een nieuwe state-of-the-art vertaling in Duits-Engels.', 'hr': 'Neuralni sustavi prevoda strojeva zahtijevaju broj slojeva za duboke modele. Ali predviđanje ovisi o predstavljivanju rečenice najvećeg sloja bez pristupa predstavljanju niskog nivoa. To je teže trenirati model i predviđati rizik gubitka informacija. U ovom papiru predlažemo pristup višeslojnom zastupanju fuzije (MLRF) na fuziju stakla slojeva. Posebno, dizajniramo tri fuzijske funkcije da naučimo bolju predstavu iz gomile. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup pruža poboljšanje od 0,92 i 0,56 BLEU bodova na snažnoj početnoj liniji transformera IWSLT-a na njemačkom-engleskom i NIST kineskom-engleskom MT zadatku. Rezultat je novi nacin umjetnosti na njemačkom-engleskom prevodu.', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungssysteme erfordern eine Reihe von gestapelten Schichten für tiefe Modelle. Die Vorhersage hängt jedoch von der Satzdarstellung der obersten Ebene ab, ohne Zugriff auf niedere Darstellungen. Dies erschwert das Trainieren des Modells und birgt das Risiko eines Informationsverlustes zur Vorhersage. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir einen mehrschichtigen Repräsentationsfusionsansatz (MLRF) zum Verschmelzen gestapelter Schichten vor. Insbesondere entwerfen wir drei Fusionsfunktionen, um eine bessere Darstellung aus dem Stack zu lernen. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Ansatz Verbesserungen von 0,92 und 0,56 BLEU Punkten gegenüber der starken Transformer Baseline für IWSLT Deutsch-Englisch und NIST Chinesisch-Englisch MT Aufgaben liefert. Das Ergebnis ist ein neuer Stand der Technik in der Deutsch-Englischen Übersetzung.', 'id': 'Sistem terjemahan mesin saraf membutuhkan beberapa lapisan yang dikumpulkan untuk model dalam. Tapi prediksinya tergantung pada waktunya dari lapisan paling atas tanpa akses ke representation tingkat rendah. Ini membuat lebih sulit untuk melatih model dan menawarkan risiko kehilangan informasi untuk prediksi. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan multilapisan representation fusion (MLRF) untuk fusi lapisan tumpukan. Terutama, kita merancang tiga fungsi fusi untuk belajar representation yang lebih baik dari tumpukan. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita memberikan peningkatan 0,92 dan 0,56 poin BLEU atas dasar Transformer yang kuat pada IWSLT Jerman-Inggris dan NIST China-English MT tugas secara sesuai. Hasilnya adalah state-of-the-art baru dalam terjemahan bahasa Jerman-Inggris.', 'ko': '신경 기계 번역 시스템은 심층 모형에 대해 다층 중첩을 해야 한다.그러나 이런 예측은 맨 윗부분의 문장 표현에 의존해 밑바닥 표현에 접근할 수 없다.이로 인해 훈련 모델이 더욱 어려워지고 예측에 정보 분실 위험을 가져왔다.본고에서 우리는 다층 표현 융합(MLRF) 방법을 제시하여 중첩층을 융합시켰다.특히 우리는 세 개의 융합 함수를 설계하여 창고에서 더 좋은 표현을 배웠다.실험 결과 IWSLT 독일어-영어와 NIST 중국어-영어 기계 번역 임무에서 우리의 방법은 강변압기 기선보다 각각 0.92점과 0.56개의 BLEU점을 높였다.그 결과 덕영 번역이 새로운 수준에 이르렀다.', 'tr': 'Nöral maşynyň terjime sistemleri derin nusgalar üçin birnäçe gaty kalamlar gerek. Ama tahmin eden, en yüksek katın ifadesine bağlı, düşük seviye ifade etmeye erişilmez. Bu nusgany öwrenmek kynçylyga ýok edýär we tahmin etmek üçin maglumatyň ýitirmegini täsirleýär. Bu kağıtda, çöplü katlar birleşmesine çok katlanmış bir şekilde teklif ediyoruz. Özellikle, stacktan gowy bir ifadesi öwrenmek üçin birleşme fonksiyonunu tasarlaýarız. Aramanyň netijesi biziň metodamyzyň 0.92 we 0.56 BLEU taýýarlandyrylygyny görkezýär. IWSLT Germaniýa-Iňlisçe we NIST Hytaý-Iňlisçe MT zadynyň güýçli Transformer taýýarlandyrylygyny görkezýär. Netijäni Alman-Iňlisçe terjime etmäge täze sanat taryhy.', 'af': "Nurale masjien vertaling stelsels benodig 'n aantal stapele lagte vir diepe modele. Maar die voorskou afhang van die seting voorstelling van die bo-meeste laag met geen toegang tot lae vlak voorstellings nie. Dit maak dit meer moeilik om die model te oefen en 'n risiko van inligting verloor te stel na voorskou. In hierdie papier, voorstel ons 'n veelvuldige laag voorstelling van fuisie (MLRF) toegang na fuisie stapele laagte. Spesifieke, ons ontwerp drie fuisie funksies om 'n beter voorsiening van die stapel te leer. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons toegang verbetering van 0.92 en 0.56 BLEU punte verkry oor die sterk Transformer basislien op IWSLT Duits-Engels en NIST Sjinese-Engels MT-opdragte respektief. Die resultaat is nuwe state-of-the-art in Duitse-Engels vertaling.", 'sw': 'Mfumo wa kutafsiri mashine ya asili unahitaji vipande kadhaa vilivyowekwa kwa mifano ya ndani. Lakini utabiri unategemea uwakilishi wa hukumu ya juu na bila upatikanaji wa uwakilishi wa ngazi ya chini. Hii inafanya kuwa vigumu kufundisha muundo na inaleta hatari ya kupoteza taarifa kwa kutabiri. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza mbinu ya uwakilishaji wa ngazi nyingi (MLRF) ili kupunguza vipande vilivyowekwa. Kwa hakika, tunaunda shughuli tatu za fujo ili kujifunza uwakilizaji bora kutoka kwenye viwanja. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kwamba mbinu yetu inaleta maboresho ya 0.92 na 0.56 BLEU juu ya msingi mkali wa Transformer kwa asili ya IWSLT Ujerumani-Kiingereza na MT wa Kichina-Kiingereza na NIST. The result is new state-of-the-art in German-English translation.', 'fa': 'سیستم ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی برای مدل عمیق تعدادی از لایه\u200cهای جمع شده نیاز دارد. اما پیش\u200cبینی بر روی نمایش جمله\u200cای از بالاترین طبقه بستگی دارد که هیچ دسترسی به نمایش\u200cهای سطح پایین ندارد. این باعث می شود که مدل را تمرین کنیم و خطر از دست دادن اطلاعات را برای پیش بینی قرار دهیم. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک دستور متعدد لایه\u200cهای متعدد (MLRF) برای ترکیب لایه\u200cهای متعدد. مخصوصا، ما سه فعالیت تغییرات را طراحی می کنیم تا یک نمایش بهتر از جمله یاد بگیریم. نتایج تجربه\u200cی ما نشان می\u200cدهد که دستور ما بهترین نقطه\u200cهای 0.92 و 0.56 BLEU بر پایه\u200cهای پایه\u200cهای تغییر\u200cدهنده قوی IWSLT آلمانی-انگلیسی و NIST چینی-انگلیسی MT را ارائه می\u200cدهد. نتیجه ایالت هنری جدید در ترجمه آلمانی و انگلیسی است.', 'sq': 'Neural machine translation systems require a number of stacked layers for deep models.  Por parashikimi varet nga përfaqësimi i fjalëve i nivelit më të lartë pa qasje në përfaqësime të nivelit të ulët. Kjo e bën më të vështirë të trajnohet modeli dhe përbën një rrezik humbjeje informacioni për parashikimet. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë një metodë përfaqësimi të shumënivelit të fusionit (MLRF) për fusionin e niveleve të grumbulluara. Në veçanti, ne dizajnojmë tre funksione të fuzionit për të mësuar një përfaqësim më të mirë nga grumbulli. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se qasja jonë jep përmirësime prej 0.92 dhe 0.56 pikë BLEU mbi bazën e fortë të Transformer në IWSLT gjerman-anglisht dhe NIST kinez-anglisht MT detyrat respektivisht. Rezultati është i ri i teknologjisë në përkthimin gjerman-anglez.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համակարգերը պահանջում են խորը մոդելների համար մի շարք հավաքված շերտեր: Բայց կանխատեսումը կախված է ամենաբարձր շերտի նախադասությունների ներկայացումից առանց ցածր մակարդակի ներկայացումների: Սա ավելի դժվարանում է մոդելը վարժեցնել և առաջացնում է տեղեկատվության կորստի վտանգ կանխատեսելու համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմաշերտ ներկայացուցիչ ֆուզիայի (MLRF) մոտեցում հավաքված շերտերի հավաքման համար: Մասնավորապես, մենք ստեղծում ենք երեք ֆունկցիաներ ֆունկցիայի ֆունկցիայի, որպեսզի սովորենք ավելի լավ ներկայացուցիչ կառուցվածքից: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը կատարում է 0.92 և 0.56 կետի բարելավումներ ԲԼԵՎ-ի վերաբերյալ IW-Գերմանական-Անգլերեն և ՆԻՍՏ-ի Չինաստանական-Անգլերեն MT-ի խնդիրների հզոր վերա Արդյունքը գերմաներեն-անգլերեն թարգմանման նոր տեխնոլոգիան է:', 'az': 'Nöral mašin tərcümə sistemlərinin derin modellər üçün bir neçə yerli düzlük lazımdır. Lakin tədbir aşağı səviyyə təsirlərinə istifadə edilməyən ən yüksək səviyyənin təsirinə bağlı olur. Bu modeli təhsil etmək və tədbir etmək üçün məlumatların itirməsi riskini daha çətin edər. Bu kağızda, çoxlu katlı fəsasiya (MLRF) fikrini çəkiririk. Özellikle, çəkidən daha yaxşı bir göstəriş öyrənmək üçün üç fəsad funksiyasını dizayn edirik. Experimental sonuçları göstərir ki, bizim tərzimiz 0,92 və 0,56 BLEU noktalarını IWSLT Alman-İngilizce və NIST Çin-İngilizce MT işlərində güclü Transformer səhifəsində yaxşılaşdırır. Növbəti Alman-İngilizce tercüməsində yeni sanat halı.', 'am': 'የነዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም ሲስተም ለጥልቅ ዓይነቶች የተጠቃሚ ደረጃዎችን ያስፈልጋል። ነገር ግን የውይይት ግንኙነት የደረጃ መልዕክት ከታናሹ ደረጃዎች ምንም መግለጫ የላቸውም፡፡ ይህም ሞዴላውን ለማስተማር በጣም ችግር ያደርጋል፣ የመረጃ ጉዳይ ለመፍጠር የሀብት ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በብዙ ደረጃዎች አካባቢ (MLRF) የደረጃን ደረጃዎች ለመቀላቀል እናስባለን፡፡ በተለይም፣ ሦስት የውጤት ክፍሎችን ከመስመር የበለጠ መልዕክት ለመማር እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች የ0.92 እና 0.56 BLEU ስራ በIWSLT ጀርመን-እንግሊዘኛ እና NIST-ቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ አሜሪካ ስራዎችን በመጠቀም የበረታች ትርጓሜ ባይነክራሉ፡፡ ፍጻሜው በጀርመን-እንግሊዘኛ ትርጉም አዲስ የ-የ-የ-የ-የ-ዐርድ ግዛት ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ সিস্টেম গভীর মডেলের জন্য বেশ কয়েকটি স্ট্যাক্টেকের প্রয়োজন। But the prediction depends on the sentence representation of the top-most layer with no access to low-level representations.  এটা মডেল প্রশিক্ষণের জন্য আরো কঠিন করে ভবিষ্যতের তথ্যের ক্ষতির ঝুঁকি পায়। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বহুস্তরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব ফ্যাশন (এমএলআরএফ) প্রস্তাব করি স্ট্যাক্টেলের ক্ষেত্রে হারিয়ে ফেলা বিশেষ করে, আমরা তিনটি ফ্যাশন ফাংশন ডিজাইন করি স্ট্যাক থেকে ভালো প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখতে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া দেখা যাচ্ছে যে পরীক্ষার পরিবর্তনগুলো প্রত্যেক ভাবে ইউএসএলটি জার্মান-ইংরেজি এবং এনআইএসটি চীন-ই ফলাফল হচ্ছে জার্মান-ইংরেজি অনুবাদের নতুন রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্প।', 'bs': 'Neuralni sistemi prevođenja strojeva zahtijevaju broj slojeva za duboke modele. Ali predviđanje ovisi o predstavljanju rečenice najvećeg sloja bez pristupa predstavljanju niskog nivoa. To je teže trenirati model i predviđati rizik gubitka informacija. U ovom papiru predlažemo pristup višeslojnom zastupanju fuzije (MLRF) na fuziju stakla slojeva. Posebno, dizajniramo tri fuzijske funkcije da naučimo bolju predstavu iz gomile. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup pruža poboljšanje od 0,92 i 0,56 BLEU bodova na snažnoj osnovnoj liniji transformera IWSLT-a na njemačkom-engleskom i NIST kineskom-engleskom MT zadatku. Rezultat je novi nacin umjetnosti na njemačkom-engleskom prevodu.', 'ca': "Els sistemes neuromàquines de traducció requereixen una sèrie de capes pilades per a models profunds. Però la predicció depèn de la representació de frases de la capa superior sense accés a representacions de baix nivell. Això fa més difícil formar el model i representa un risc de pèrdua d'informació a la predicció. En aquest paper, proposem un enfocament de fusió de representació multicapa (MLRF) a la fusió de capes pilades. En particular, dissenyem tres funcions de fusió per aprendre una millor representació de la pila. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre enfocament produeix millores de 0,92 i 0,56 punts BLEU sobre el fort punt de referència Transformer en les tasques MT alemanya-anglès IWSLT i NIST xinès-anglès respectivament. El resultat és un nou avançat en la traducció alemanya-anglès.", 'cs': 'Neurální strojové překlady vyžadují řadu stohovaných vrstev pro hluboké modely. Předpověď však závisí na reprezentaci věty nejvyšší vrstvy bez přístupu k reprezentacím nízké úrovně. Tím je obtížnější trénovat model a představuje riziko ztráty informací pro predikci. V tomto článku navrhujeme vícevrstvý přístup k fúzi stohovaných vrstev (MLRF). Konkrétně navrhujeme tři fúzní funkce, abychom se naučili lepší reprezentaci ze zásobníku. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš přístup přináší zlepšení 0,92 a 0,56 BLEU bodů nad silnou transformátorovou základnou pro IWSLT německo-anglické a NIST čínsko-anglické MT úlohy. Výsledkem je nový state-of-the-art v německo-anglickém překladu.', 'et': 'Neuraalsed masintõlkesüsteemid vajavad sügavate mudelite jaoks mitmeid virnastatud kihte. Kuid prognoos sõltub lause esitamisest kõige ülemisemal kihil, millel puudub juurdepääs madala taseme esitustele. See muudab mudeli koolitamise keerulisemaks ja kujutab endast ohtu, et prognoositakse teavet. Käesolevas töös pakume välja mitmekihilise representatsiooni fusiooni (MLRF) lähenemisviisi virnastatud kihtide ühendamisele. Eelkõige kujundame kolm fusion funktsiooni, et õppida parem esitus virnast. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemisviis parandab 0,92 ja 0,56 BLEU punkti võrra võrreldes tugeva transformaatori lähtetasemega IWSLT saksa-inglise ja NIST hiina-inglise MT ülesannete puhul. Tulemuseks on uus kaasaegne saksa-inglise tõlke.', 'fi': 'Neuroiden konekäännösjärjestelmät vaativat useita pinottuja kerroksia syviin malleihin. Ennuste riippuu kuitenkin ylimmän kerroksen lauseiden esittämisestä, jolla ei ole pääsyä matalan tason esityksiin. Tämä vaikeuttaa mallin kouluttamista ja aiheuttaa riskin tiedon menetyksestä ennustettaessa. Tässä työssä ehdotamme monikerroksisen representation fusion (MLRF) -lähestymistapaa pinottujen kerrosten fuusioon. Suunnittelemme erityisesti kolme fuusiotoimintoa oppiaksemme paremman edustuksen pinosta. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme tuottaa parannuksia 0,92 ja 0,56 BLEU pistettä verrattuna vahvaan Transformer-lähtötilanteeseen IWSLT saksa-englanti ja NIST kiina-englanti MT tehtävissä vastaavasti. Tuloksena on uusi huipputekniikka saksa-englanti käännöksessä.', 'jv': 'System layers-action Iki lak susah-susahe sakjane kanggo ngwalikno model lan nganggo perbudhakan informasi kanggo ngerasakno. Pinging this paper, we proposal a multi layer representation Awak dhéwé éntukne telu nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing luwih apik nyebuturan karo Stak. Rasane sing paling dhéwé kuwi nglanggar sapa tarjamahan kanggo ngerasah ning 0.2 lan 0.6 B luwih barang nggawe barang nggawe Transformer barang nggawe barang IWSLT Genghis-Inggris lan NIRT Dinggis-Inggris MT sing nggawe barang bisa. Pametuné kanggo tarjamahan sing bagian karo kuwi duljamahan-ingles.', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis Amma abin da ya ƙayyade shi yana dõgara ga wakilin maganar ƙanshi na sama-mafi girma kuma bã ya da wata matsayi da ya samu-daraja. Wannan yana kasancẽwa mai sauƙi a sanar da misalin ayuka kuma yana kasar hasara ga hasara na gane. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buƙata wata fushi na mai yawan-Layer mai wakilisha (MLRF) zuwa ta ƙara ƙananan da aka fasa. Kayyai, Munã design mafiya amfani uku na fusarci dõmin mu iya sanar da mafiya alhẽri daga matar. Matarin jarrabãwa na nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana ƙara mafaniko na 0.92 da 0.46 BLEU points over the strong Transformer Baselin on the IWSLT Jarman-Ingiriya da NIS T-Kilimiya-Ingiriya. @ info: status', 'sk': 'Sistemi nevralnega strojnega prevajanja zahtevajo številne zložene plasti za globoke modele. Toda napoved je odvisna od predstavitve stavka najvišje plasti brez dostopa do predstavitev nizke ravni. To otežuje usposabljanje modela in predstavlja tveganje izgube informacij za napoved. V prispevku predlagamo pristop večplastne fuzije reprezentacije (MLRF) k združevanju zloženih plasti. Zlasti oblikujemo tri fuzijske funkcije, da se naučimo boljše predstavitve iz sklopa. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš pristop prinaša izboljšave za 0,92 in 0,56 točke BLEU glede na močno osnovno osnovo transformatorja pri opravilih IWSLT nemško-angleščina oziroma NIST kitajsko-angleščina MT. Rezultat je nov najsodobnejši prevod v nemško-angleščini.', 'he': 'מערכות התרגום של מכונות נוירות דורשות מספר שכבות ערומות לדוגמנים עמוקים. אבל החזוי תלוי ביצוע המשפטים של השכבה העליונה בלי גישה ליציגות רמה נמוכה. זה עושה את זה יותר קשה לאמן את המודל ומציג סיכון לאבד מידע לחזוי. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים גישה לייצג מייצג רב-שכבות (MLRF) לייצג מייצג שכבות עמוסות. במיוחד, אנחנו מעצבים שלושה תפקידים של פיאוזיה כדי ללמוד מייצג טוב יותר מהערימה. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהגישה שלנו נותנת שיפורים של 0.92 ו-0.56 נקודות BLEU מעל הבסיס החזק של Transformer על משימות MT גרמנית-אנגלית IWSLT ו-NIST סיני-אנגלית. התוצאה היא התרגום החדש בגרמנית-אנגלית.', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁྲུལ་གྱི་སྤྲོད་ལམ་ལུགས་ལ་པར་ཆས་བཅད་པའི་བང་རིམ་ཆས་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། སྔོན་ཚུལ་དེ་མཐོ་རིམ་མཐོ་མའི་བང་རིམ་གྱི་ཚིག་རྟོགས་པ་དེ་རྟོགས་ཞིང་མེད། འདིས་མ་དབྱེ་བ་དང་གནད་དོན་དགོས་མེད་པར་སྐྱེལ་གྱིས་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་པར་ཉེན་རྐྱེན་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་མང་ཆེ་རུ་འཆར་ཡོད་པའི་མཉམ་སྒྲིག དམིགས་བསལ་ན། ང་ཚོས་མཛུབ་ཀྱི་ལས་འཆར་གསུམ་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་མཛུབ་ཀྱི་རྩ་སྒྲིག་ཤིག་ལས་ཕར་རྟགས་ཤ Experimental results show that our approach yields improvement of 0.92 and 0.56 BLEU points over the strong Transformer baseline on IWSLT German-English and NIST Chinese-English MT tasks respectively. གྲུབ་འབྲས་འདི་ཕལ་ཆེན་སྐད་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་རིགས་གསར་པ་ཞིག་རེད།'}
{'en': 'Toward Better Loanword Identification in Uyghur Using Cross-lingual Word Embeddings', 'ar': 'نحو تعريف أفضل للكلمات المستعارة في الأويغور باستخدام الكلمات المتقاطعة باللغات', 'fr': "Vers une meilleure identification des mots empruntés en ouïghour grâce à l'intégration de mots multilingues", 'es': 'Hacia una mejor identificación de préstamos en uigur mediante incrustaciones de palabras en varios idiomas', 'pt': 'Para uma melhor identificação de palavras de empréstimo em uigur usando incorporações de palavras em vários idiomas', 'ja': 'クロスリンガルワード埋め込みを使用したウイグル語のより良いローンワード識別に向けて', 'zh': '用跨语言词嵌入益识维吾尔语中外来词', 'ru': 'На пути к лучшей идентификации заимствованных слов в уйгурском языке с использованием кросс-лингвистических вложений слов', 'hi': 'क्रॉस-लिंगुअल वर्ड एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करके उइघुर में बेहतर Loanword पहचान की ओर', 'ga': 'I dTreo Aitheantas Focal Iasachta Níos Fearr in Uyghur ag Úsáid Leabaithe Focal Trastheangacha', 'el': 'Προς την καλύτερη ταυτοποίηση δανειακών λέξεων στα Ουιγούρικα χρησιμοποιώντας τις εγκάρσια ενσωμάτωση λέξεων', 'ka': 'უფრო უკეთესი ლუნდური სიტყვის იდენტიფიკაციაში სიგურაში გამოყენება კრესენგური სიტყვის', 'hu': 'Jobb hitelszó azonosítás felé Ujgurban a többnyelvű szóbeágyazások használatával', 'lt': 'Geresnio paskolos žodžių identifikavimo Uyghure, naudojant tarpkalbinius žodžių įdėjimus', 'mk': 'За подобра идентификација на позајмени зборови во Уигур користејќи меѓујазични вградувања на зборови', 'it': "Verso una migliore identificazione delle parole in prestito in uiguro utilizzando l'incorporazione di parole cross-lingual", 'kk': 'Уйгурда көп тілді сөз ендіруді қолдану үшін жақсы құқық сөздер идентификациясы', 'mt': 'Lejn Identifikazzjoni Aħjar tal-Kliem tas-Self f’Uyghur bl-Użu ta’ Embeddings ta’ Kliem Translingwi', 'ml': 'മുകളിലേക്ക് മെച്ചപ്പെട്ട ലോവന്\u200dവാര്\u200dഡ് തിരിച്ചറിയുക', 'mn': 'Uyghur-д илүү хөрөнгө үг тодорхойлолтыг ашиглаж', 'ro': 'Către o mai bună identificare a cuvintelor de împrumut în uigură folosind încorporarea cuvintelor în limba interlingvă', 'sr': 'Prema boljoj identifikaciji kreditnih reči u Uyghuru koristeći krstojezičke reči', 'ms': 'Ke arah Pengenalan Kata Pinjaman Lebih Baik dalam Uyghur Mengguna Penciptaan Kata Bersaling Bahasa', 'si': 'Name', 'no': 'Gå til bedre långsord- identifikasjon i Uyghur ved bruk av krysspråk- ordinnbygging', 'pl': 'W kierunku lepszej identyfikacji słów pożyczkowych w języku ujgurskim za pomocą wielojęzycznych osadzeń słów', 'sv': 'Mot bättre identifiering av lånord på uiguriska med hjälp av korspråkiga ordinbäddningar', 'ta': 'Toward Better Loanword Identification in Uyghur Using Cross-lingual Word Embeddings', 'ur': 'Uyghur میں بہترین لائن لفظ شناسایی کی طرف کروس زبان لفظ ابڈینگ استعمال کرتا ہے', 'so': 'Isticmaalka hadalka luuqada ee Uyghur', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Nhận diện từ chính sách cho vay nặng lãi ở Uyghur Sử dụng nhúng chữ thập-ngôn-', 'bg': 'Към по-добра идентификация на заемни думи в уйгур с помощта на междуезични словни вграждания', 'hr': 'Prema boljem identifikacijom kreditnih riječi u Uyghuru koristeći krstojezičke prijevoze', 'da': 'På vej mod bedre identifikation af lånord i Uyghur ved hjælp af tværsprogede ordindlejringer', 'nl': 'Naar een betere identificatie van leenwoorden in het Oeigoers met behulp van meertalige woordinsluitingen', 'de': 'Auf dem Weg zu einer besseren Loanwort-Identifikation in Uigurisch mithilfe von crosslingualen Word Embeddings', 'id': 'Menuju Identifikasi kata pinjaman yang lebih baik di Uyghur Menggunakan Embedding kata saling bahasa', 'ko': '다국어 단어 삽입법을 사용하여 위구르어 외래어를 더욱 잘 식별하다', 'fa': 'به سمت شناسایی کلمه\u200cهای بهتر در Uyghur با استفاده از جمع کردن کلمه\u200cهای متوسط زبان', 'sw': 'Utambulisho bora wa neno la Loanword nchini Uyghur kwa kutumia neno la lugha', 'af': 'Gaan na Beter Loanwoord Identifikasie in Uyghur gebruik Kruistale Woord Inbetering', 'tr': 'Uýgurda Ullançy kelimelerden gowy maýyp kimligi', 'am': 'Word Identification in Uyghur using Cross-ቋንቋ word Embedding', 'hy': 'Ավելի լավ վարկերի բառերի հայտնաբերման ուղղությամբ Օգտագործելով բառերի խաչլեզվով ներգրավումներ', 'az': 'Uygur dilində daha xeyirli Sözlük İşlənməsinə tərəf', 'sq': 'Në drejtim të identifikimit më të mirë të fjalëve të huave në Uyghur duke përdorur përfshirje fjalësh ndërgjuhësore', 'cs': 'K lepší identifikaci výpůjčních slov v ujgurštině pomocí křížových vložení slov', 'bn': 'উইঘুরে ক্রস- ভাষাভাষী শব্দ ব্যবহার করে উইজুরে লোনওয়ার্ড পরিচয় বেশি ভাল', 'et': 'Laenusõnade parema identifitseerimise suunas Uõguuris keeleüleste sõnade manustamise abil', 'bs': 'Prema boljoj identifikaciji kreditnih riječi u Uyghuru koristeći krstojezičke reči', 'ca': 'cap a una millor identificació de paraules de préstec a Uyghur utilitzant incorporacions de paraules translingües', 'fi': 'Kohti parempaa lainasanatunnistusta uiguurissa monikielisten sanaupotusten avulla', 'jv': 'Nambah luwih Kemerdekaan sing apik Kemerdekaan ning UYgur Ngawe Bukak Kros-dilengan Kemerdekaan', 'he': 'לכיוון זיהוי מילים לוואה טובה יותר באויוהר בשימוש בתכניות מילים צלוליות', 'sk': 'Za boljšo identifikacijo posojilnih besed v Ujguru z uporabo medjezičnih besednih vdelav', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Uyghur ནང་དུ་འཛམ་གླིང་སྐད་ཀྱི་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཁ་སྐོང་ཚིག་ནང་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་རྟགས་བཀལ་བའི་ཐོག་ཁྲམ།'}
{'en': 'To enrich vocabulary of low resource settings, we proposed a novel method which identify loanwords in monolingual corpora. More specifically, we first use cross-lingual word embeddings as the core feature to generate semantically related candidates based on comparable corpora and a small bilingual lexicon ; then, a log-linear model which combines several shallow features such as pronunciation similarity and hybrid language model features to predict the final results. In this paper, we use Uyghur as the receipt language and try to detect loanwords in four donor languages : Arabic, Chinese, Persian and Russian. We conduct two groups of experiments to evaluate the effectiveness of our proposed approach : loanword identification and OOV translation in four language pairs and eight translation directions (Uyghur-Arabic, Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian, and Russian-Uyghur). Experimental results on loanword identification show that our method outperforms other baseline models significantly. Neural machine translation models integrating results of loanword identification experiments achieve the best results on OOV translation(with 0.5-0.9 BLEU improvements)', 'ar': 'لإثراء مفردات الإعدادات منخفضة الموارد ، اقترحنا طريقة جديدة تحدد الكلمات المستعارة في مجموعات أحادية اللغة. وبشكل أكثر تحديدًا ، نستخدم أولاً عمليات دمج الكلمات متعددة اللغات كميزة أساسية لإنشاء مرشحين مرتبطين لغويًا بناءً على مجموعات قابلة للمقارنة ومعجم ثنائي اللغة صغير ؛ ثم ، نموذج لوغاريتمي خطي يجمع بين العديد من الميزات الضحلة مثل تشابه النطق وميزات نموذج اللغة الهجينة للتنبؤ بالنتائج النهائية. في هذه الورقة ، نستخدم الأويغور كلغة استلام ونحاول اكتشاف الكلمات المستعارة بأربع لغات للمانحين: العربية والصينية والفارسية والروسية. نجري مجموعتين من التجارب لتقييم فعالية منهجنا المقترح: تحديد الكلمات المستعارة وترجمة OOV في أربعة أزواج لغوية وثمانية اتجاهات ترجمة (الأويغورية - العربية ، والعربية - الأويغورية ، والأويغورية - الصينية ، والصينية - الأويغورية ، والأويغورية - الفارسية ، والفارسية - الأويغور ، والأويغور - الروس ، والروس - الأويغور). تظهر النتائج التجريبية لتعريف الكلمات المستعارة أن طريقتنا تتفوق في الأداء على النماذج الأساسية الأخرى بشكل كبير. نماذج الترجمة الآلية العصبية التي تدمج نتائج تجارب تحديد الكلمات المستعارة تحقق أفضل النتائج في ترجمة OOV (مع تحسينات 0.5-0.9 BLEU)', 'pt': 'Para enriquecer o vocabulário de ambientes com poucos recursos, propusemos um novo método que identifica palavras emprestadas em corpora monolíngues. Mais especificamente, primeiro usamos a incorporação de palavras em vários idiomas como o recurso principal para gerar candidatos semanticamente relacionados com base em corpora comparáveis e um pequeno léxico bilíngue; em seguida, um modelo log-linear que combina vários recursos superficiais, como semelhança de pronúncia e recursos de modelo de linguagem híbrida para prever os resultados finais. Neste artigo, usamos o uigur como idioma de recebimento e tentamos detectar palavras emprestadas em quatro idiomas doadores: árabe, chinês, persa e russo. Conduzimos dois grupos de experimentos para avaliar a eficácia de nossa abordagem proposta: identificação de palavras emprestadas e tradução OOV em quatro pares de idiomas e oito direções de tradução (uigur-árabe, árabe-uigur, uigur-chinês, chinês-uigur, uigur-persa, persa -Uigur, Uigur-Russo e Russo-Uigur). Resultados experimentais na identificação de palavras emprestadas mostram que nosso método supera significativamente outros modelos de linha de base. Modelos de tradução automática neural que integram resultados de experimentos de identificação de palavras emprestadas alcançam os melhores resultados na tradução OOV (com melhorias de 0,5-0,9 BLEU)', 'es': 'Para enriquecer el vocabulario de entornos con pocos recursos, propusimos un método novedoso que identifica préstamos en corpus monolingües. Más específicamente, primero utilizamos incrustaciones de palabras en varios idiomas como característica principal para generar candidatos semánticamente relacionados basados en corpus comparables y un léxico bilingüe pequeño; luego, un modelo log-lineal que combina varias características superficiales, como la similitud de pronunciación y el modelo de lenguaje híbrido funciones para predecir los resultados finales. En este artículo, utilizamos el uigur como idioma de recibo y tratamos de detectar préstamos en cuatro idiomas de donantes: árabe, chino, persa y ruso. Llevamos a cabo dos grupos de experimentos para evaluar la eficacia de nuestro enfoque propuesto: identificación de préstamos y traducción OOV en cuatro pares de idiomas y ocho direcciones de traducción (uigur árabe, árabe-uigur, uigur chino, chino-uigur, uigur chino, uigur persa, persa-uigur, uigur ruso y ruso-uigur). Los resultados experimentales sobre la identificación de préstamos muestran que nuestro método supera significativamente a otros modelos de referencia. Los modelos de traducción automática neuronal que integran los resultados de los experimentos de identificación de préstamos logran los mejores resultados en la traducción de OOV (con mejoras de 0,5-0,9 BLEU)', 'fr': "Pour enrichir le vocabulaire des milieux à faibles ressources, nous avons proposé une nouvelle méthode qui identifie les mots empruntés dans des corpus monolingues. Plus précisément, nous utilisons d'abord les intégrations de mots interlinguistiques comme fonctionnalité principale pour générer des candidats sémantiquement liés sur la base de corpus comparables et d'un petit lexique bilingue\xa0; puis, un modèle log-linéaire qui combine plusieurs caractéristiques superficielles telles que la similitude de prononciation et le modèle linguistique hybride fonctionnalités permettant de prédire les résultats finaux. Dans cet article, nous utilisons l'ouïghour comme langue de réception et essayons de détecter les mots empruntés dans quatre langues du donateur\xa0: l'arabe, le chinois, le persan et le russe. Nous menons deux groupes d'expériences pour évaluer l'efficacité de l'approche que nous proposons\xa0: identification des mots de prêt et traduction OOV dans quatre paires de langues et huit directions de traduction (ouïghour-arabe, arabe-ouïghour, ouïghour-chinois, chinois-ouïghour, ouïghour-persan, persan-ouïghour, ouïghour-russe et russe-ouïghour). Les résultats expérimentaux sur l'identification des mots de prêt montrent que notre méthode surpasse largement les autres modèles de référence. Les modèles de traduction automatique neuronale intégrant les résultats d'expériences d'identification de mots de prêt permettent d'obtenir les meilleurs résultats en matière de traduction OOV (avec des améliorations de 0,5 à 0,9 UEBL)", 'ja': '低リソース設定の語彙を充実させるために、単一言語のコーラでローンワードを識別する新しい方法を提案しました。 より具体的には、まずクロスリンガルワード埋め込みをコア機能として使用して、同等のコーラと小さなバイリンガル辞書に基づいて意味的に関連する候補を生成し、次に、発音の類似性やハイブリッド言語モデルの特徴などのいくつかの浅い特徴を組み合わせて最終結果を予測する対数線形モデルを作成します。 本稿では、受領言語としてウイグル語を使用し、アラビア語、中国語、ペルシア語、ロシア語の4つのドナー言語でローンワードを検出しようと試みる。 私たちは、提案されたアプローチの有効性を評価するための2つのグループの実験を行います。4つの言語ペアと8つの翻訳方向（ウイグル語-アラビア語、アラビア語-ウイグル語、ウイグル語-中国語、中国語-ウイグル語、ウイグル語-ペルシャ語、ペルシャ語-ウイグル語、ウイグル語-ロシア語、ロシア語-ウイグル語）でのローンワードの識別とOOV翻訳。 ローンワードの識別に関する実験結果は、当社の方法が他のベースラインモデルを大幅に上回っていることを示しています。 ローンワード識別実験の結果を統合したニューラルマシン翻訳モデルは、OOV翻訳で最高の結果を達成します（ 0.5-0.9 BLEU改善）', 'ru': 'Чтобы обогатить словарный запас низкоресурсных установок, мы предложили новый метод, который идентифицирует заимствованные слова в одноязычных телах. Более конкретно, мы сначала используем межъязыковые вложения слов в качестве основной функции для генерации семантически связанных кандидатов на основе сопоставимых корпусов и небольшого двуязычного лексикона; затем, логарифмическая линейная модель, которая объединяет несколько неглубоких функций, таких как сходство произношения и особенности гибридной языковой модели для прогнозирования конечных результатов. В данной работе мы используем уйгурский язык в качестве языка поступления и пытаемся обнаружить заимствованные слова на четырех донорских языках: арабском, китайском, персидском и русском. Мы проводим две группы экспериментов для оценки эффективности предложенного нами подхода: идентификация ссудных слов и перевод OOV в четырех языковых парах и восемь направлений перевода (уйгуро-арабский, арабско-уйгурский, уйгурско-китайский, китайско-уйгурский, уйгурско-персидский, персидско-уйгурский, уйгурско-русский и русско-уйгурский). Экспериментальные результаты по идентификации ссудных слов показывают, что наш метод значительно превосходит другие базовые модели. Нейронные модели машинного перевода, интегрирующие результаты экспериментов по идентификации ссудных слов, достигают наилучших результатов при переводе OOV (с улучшениями 0,5-0,9 BLEU)', 'zh': '为低资源境词汇量,出一识单语料库中外来词新法。 更具体地说,先用跨语言词嵌为核心特征,较语料库与小双语词典生语义相关者候选词。 然后合数线性数浅层,音相似性言语,以占其终。 本文以维吾尔语为收据语,并试检四捐赠语者借词:阿拉伯语,中文,波斯语、俄语。 为之两组实验,以质其有效性:四语对和八译向(维吾尔语 - 阿拉伯语,阿拉伯语 - 维吾尔语,维吾尔语 - 中文 - 维吾尔语,维吾尔语 - 波斯语 , 波斯语 - 维吾尔语,维吾尔语 - 俄语与俄语 - 维吾尔语)。 外来词识之实验结果表明,吾道明优于他基线。 整合外来词识实验神经机器翻译形于OOV译为上效(改进0.5~0.9 BLEU)', 'hi': 'कम संसाधन सेटिंग्स की शब्दावली को समृद्ध करने के लिए, हमने एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव दिया जो मोनोलिंगुअल कॉर्पोरेट में लोनवर्ड की पहचान करता है। अधिक विशेष रूप से, हम पहले तुलनीय कॉर्पोरेट और एक छोटे से द्विभाषी शब्दकोश के आधार पर शब्दार्थ से संबंधित उम्मीदवारों को उत्पन्न करने के लिए कोर सुविधा के रूप में क्रॉस-लिंगुअल शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग करते हैं; फिर, एक लॉग-रैखिक मॉडल जो अंतिम परिणामों की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए उच्चारण समानता और हाइब्रिड भाषा मॉडल सुविधाओं जैसी कई उथली विशेषताओं को जोड़ता है। इस पेपर में, हम रसीद भाषा के रूप में उइघुर का उपयोग करते हैं और चार दाता भाषाओं में उधारी शब्दों का पता लगाने की कोशिश करते हैं: अरबी, चीनी, फारसी और रूसी। हम अपने प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण की प्रभावशीलता का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए प्रयोगों के दो समूहों का संचालन करते हैं: चार भाषा जोड़े और आठ अनुवाद दिशाओं (उइघुर-अरबी, अरबी-उइघुर, उइघुर-चीनी, चीनी-उइघुर, उइघुर-फारसी, फारसी-उइघुर, उइघुर-रूसी, और रूसी-उइघुर) में उधार की पहचान और ओओवी अनुवाद। Loanword पहचान पर प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी विधि अन्य बेसलाइन मॉडल को काफी बेहतर बनाती है। उधार पहचान प्रयोगों के परिणामों को एकीकृत करने वाले तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद मॉडल OOV अनुवाद पर सबसे अच्छे परिणाम प्राप्त करते हैं (0.5-0.9 BLEU सुधारों के साथ)', 'ga': 'Chun stór focal suíomhanna ísle acmhainní a shaibhriú, mholamar modh nua a shainaithníonn focail iasachta i gcorpas aonteangach. Go sonrach, úsáidimid leabaithe focal tras-teangacha ar dtús mar phríomhghné chun iarrthóirí a bhaineann le séimeantach a chruthú bunaithe ar chorpora inchomparáide agus foclóir beag dátheangach; mar sin, múnla log-líneach a chomhcheanglaíonn roinnt gnéithe éadomhain amhail cosúlacht foghraíochta agus gnéithe samhail teanga hibrideacha chun na torthaí deiridh a thuar. Sa pháipéar seo, úsáidimid Uyghur mar an teanga admhála agus déanaimid iarracht focail iasachta a bhrath i gceithre theanga deontóra: Araibis, Sínis, Peirsis agus Rúisis. Déanaimid dhá ghrúpa turgnaimh chun éifeachtacht ár gcur chuige molta a mheas: aithint focal iasachta agus aistriúchán OOV i gceithre phéire teanga agus ocht dtreo aistriúcháin (Uyghur-Arabais, Araibis-Uyghur, Uyghur-Sínis, Sínis-Uyghur, Uyghur-Peirsis, Peirsis -Uyghur, Uyghur-Rúisis, agus Rúisis-Uyghur). Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha ar aithint focal iasachta go sáraíonn ár modh samhlacha bonnlíne eile go suntasach. Baintear amach na torthaí is fearr ar aistriúchán OOV ar shamhlacha meaisín-aistrithe néaracha a chomhtháthaíonn torthaí turgnaimh aitheantais focal iasachta (le feabhsuithe 0.5-0.9 BLEU)', 'hu': 'Az alacsony erőforrás-beállítások szókincsének gazdagítása érdekében egy új módszert javasoltunk, amely azonosítja a kölcsönszavakat az egynyelvű corporákban. Pontosabban, először a többnyelvű szóbeágyazásokat használjuk alapvető funkcióként a szemantikailag kapcsolódó jelöltek létrehozására hasonló corpora és egy kis kétnyelvű lexikon alapján; Ezután egy log-lineáris modell, amely több sekély jellemzőt kombinál, mint például a kiejtési hasonlóság és a hibrid nyelvi modell jellemzőit, hogy előrejelezze a végső eredményeket. Ebben a tanulmányban az ujgur nyelvet használjuk átvételi nyelvként, és megpróbáljuk felderíteni a kölcsönszavakat négy donor nyelven: arab, kínai, perzsa és orosz. Két kísérleti csoportot végzünk a javasolt megközelítés hatékonyságának értékelésére: kölcsönszó azonosítás és OOV fordítás négy nyelvpárban és nyolc fordítási irányban (ujgur-arab, arab-ujgur, ujgur-kínai, kínai-ujgur, ujgur-perzsa, perzsa-ujgur, ujgur-orosz és orosz-ujgur). A kölcsönszavak azonosítására vonatkozó kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy módszerünk jelentősen felülmúlja a többi alapvető modellt. A kölcsönszavak azonosítási kísérleteinek eredményeit integráló neurális gépi fordítási modellek a legjobb eredményeket érik el OOV fordításban (0,5-0,9 BLEU fejlesztésekkel)', 'el': 'Για να εμπλουτίσουμε το λεξιλόγιο χαμηλών ρυθμίσεων πόρων, προτείναμε μια νέα μέθοδο που προσδιορίζει τις δανειζόμενες λέξεις σε μονογλωσσικά σώματα. Πιο συγκεκριμένα, χρησιμοποιούμε πρώτα τις εγκάρσιες λέξεις ως βασικό χαρακτηριστικό για τη δημιουργία σημασιολογικά συνδεδεμένων υποψηφίων βασισμένων σε συγκρίσιμα σώματα και ένα μικρό δίγλωσσο λεξικό. στη συνέχεια, ένα γραμμικό μοντέλο που συνδυάζει διάφορα ρηχά χαρακτηριστικά όπως ομοιότητα προφοράς και υβριδικά χαρακτηριστικά μοντέλου γλώσσας για να προβλέψει τα τελικά αποτελέσματα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, χρησιμοποιούμε τα Ουιγούρικα ως γλώσσα παραλαβής και προσπαθούμε να εντοπίσουμε δανειστικές λέξεις σε τέσσερις γλώσσες δωρητών: αραβικά, κινέζικα, περσικά και ρωσικά. Διεξάγουμε δύο ομάδες πειραμάτων για να αξιολογήσουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισής μας: αναγνώριση δανείων και μετάφραση σε τέσσερα γλωσσικά ζεύγη και οκτώ μεταφραστικές κατευθύνσεις (Ουιγούρ-αραβικά, Αραβικά-ουιγούρ, Ουιγούρ-κινέζικα, Κινεζικά-ουιγούρ, Ουιγούρ-περσικά, Περσικά-ουιγούρ, Ουιγούρ-ρωσικά και Ρωσικά-ουιγούρ). Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα στον προσδιορισμό δανείων δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά άλλα μοντέλα βάσης. Νευρικά μοντέλα μηχανικής μετάφρασης που ενσωματώνουν τα αποτελέσματα των πειραμάτων αναγνώρισης δανείων επιτυγχάνουν τα καλύτερα αποτελέσματα στη μετάφραση (με βελτιώσεις 0.5-0.9)', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მინუს რესურსის კონფიგურაციის სიტყვებულების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისათვის პრომენტი, რომელიც მონოლენგური კოპორაში დასაბამი უფრო განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ პირველი გამოყენებთ კრიცენგური სიტყვები, როგორც მნიშვნელოვანი ფუნქცია, როგორც სემონტიკურად დაკავშირებული კანდიდეტები, როგორც შემდგ შემდეგ, ლოგლინიური მოდელი, რომელიც მრავალური უკეთესი ფუნქციები, როგორც გამოსახულება სხვადასხვა და ჰიბრიდის ენის მოდელური ფუნქციები, რომელიც დასახულება ბ ჩვენ სიგურს გამოიყენებთ როგორც მიღებული ენაში და ვცდილობთ საკუთარ დონორის ენაში: აპაბი, კინეული, პერსიანი და პერსიანი. ჩვენ ექსპერიმენტების ორი ჯგუფი ექსპერიმენტები გავაკეთებთ, რომ ჩვენი წინასწორებული პროგრამის ეფექტიურობას გავამუშავოთ: კიდენტიფიკაცია და OOV გავამუშავოთ ოთხი ენის ზოგრაში და 8 წინასწორებული მიერდებში (სიგურ-აპაბი, აპაბი-სიგურ, სიგურ-კინინეთი ექსპერიმენტიური გამოცდილობა კიდენტიფიკაციის გამოცდილობაში ჩვენი მეტი უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სხვა ფექსური მოდელების გამოცდილობა. ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელების მოდელები, რომლებიც კიდენტიფიკაციის ექსპერიმენტების შედეგების ინტერგურაციას მიიღებენ უკეთესი შედეგები OOV გაგრძელების შემდე', 'mk': 'To enrich vocabulary of low resource settings, we proposed a novel method which identify loanwords in monolingual corpora.  More specifically, we first use cross-lingual word embeddings as the core feature to generate semantically related candidates based on comparable corpora and a small bilingual lexicon;  тогаш, лог-линијарен модел кој комбинира неколку плошки карактеристики како што се сличноста на изјавата и карактеристиките на моделот на хибриден јазик за предвидување на конечните резултати. Во овој весник, го користиме Уигур како јазик на примање и се обидуваме да откриеме кредитни оружја на четири донаторски јазици: арапски, кинески, персиски и руски. Ние спроведуваме две групи експерименти за проценка на ефикасноста на нашиот предложен пристап: идентификација на кредитниот вод и превод на ОВ на четири јазички парови и осум насоки за превод (Уигур-Арапски, Арапски-Уигур, Уигур-Кинески, Кинески-Уигур, Уигур-Персиски, Персиски-Уигур, Уигур Експерименталните резултати на идентификацијата на кредитниот свет покажуваат дека нашиот метод значително ги надминува другите основни модели. Неуралните машински модели за превод кои ги интегрираат резултатите од експериментите за идентификација на кредитната борда ги постигнуваат најдобрите резултати на преводот OOV (со 0, 5- 0, 9 БЛЕУ подобрувања)', 'ms': 'Untuk memperkaya vocabulari tetapan sumber rendah, kami mencadangkan kaedah baru yang mengenalpasti penggunaan pinjaman dalam korpora monobahasa. Lebih spesifik, pertama-tama kita gunakan pelengkapan kata saling bahasa sebagai ciri utama untuk menghasilkan calon berkaitan semantik berdasarkan korpra yang sama dan leksikon bilingual kecil; kemudian, model log-linear yang menggabungkan beberapa ciri rendah seperti persamaan ungkapan dan ciri-ciri model bahasa hibrid untuk meramalkan hasil akhir. Dalam kertas ini, kami menggunakan Uyghur sebagai bahasa penerimaan dan cuba untuk mengesan wang pinjaman dalam empat bahasa pemberi: Arab, Cina, Persia dan Rusia. Kami melakukan dua kumpulan eksperimen untuk menilai keefektivitas pendekatan yang kami cadangkan: pengenalan loanword dan terjemahan OOV dalam empat pasangan bahasa dan lapan arah terjemahan (Uyghur-Arabic, Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian, dan Russian-Uyghur). Keputusan percubaan mengenai pengenalan loanword menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kita melebihi model asas lain secara signifikan. Model terjemahan mesin saraf yang mengintegrasikan keputusan eksperimen pengenalan loanword mencapai keputusan terbaik pada terjemahan OOV(dengan 0.5-0.9 BLEU perkembangan)', 'it': "Per arricchire il vocabolario delle impostazioni a basso contenuto di risorse, abbiamo proposto un nuovo metodo che identifica le parole di prestito nei corpora monolingue. Più specificamente, usiamo innanzitutto incorporazioni di parole cross-lingual come caratteristica principale per generare candidati semanticamente correlati basati su corpora comparabili e un piccolo lessico bilingue; poi, un modello log-lineare che combina diverse caratteristiche superficiali come la somiglianza della pronuncia e le caratteristiche del modello linguistico ibrido per prevedere i risultati finali. In questo articolo usiamo l'uiguro come lingua di ricezione e cerchiamo di individuare i prestiti in quattro lingue donatrici: arabo, cinese, persiano e russo. Conduciamo due gruppi di esperimenti per valutare l'efficacia del nostro approccio proposto: identificazione del loanword e traduzione OOV in quattro coppie linguistiche e otto direzioni di traduzione (uiguro-arabo, arabo-uiguro, uiguro-cinese, cinese-uiguro, uiguro-persiano, persiano-uiguro, uiguro-russo e russo-uiguro). I risultati sperimentali sull'identificazione dei prestiti mostrano che il nostro metodo supera significativamente altri modelli di base. I modelli di traduzione automatica neurale che integrano i risultati degli esperimenti di identificazione dei loanword raggiungono i migliori risultati sulla traduzione OOV (con miglioramenti BLEU 0.5-0.9)", 'kk': 'Төмен ресурс параметрлерінің сөздерін бағалау үшін біз монолингілік корпорадағы займаларды анықтайтын романдық әдісін ұсындық. Ең жақсы, біріншіден бірінші тілді тілді ендіруді негізгі мүмкіндіктер ретінде салыстыратын корпора мен кішкентай екі тілді лексиканың негізгі қасиеті ретінде қолданамыз. Содан соңғы нәтижелерді таңдау үшін журнал сызық үлгісін бірнеше қалқымалы мүмкіндіктерді біріктіру үшін және гибридтік тіл үлгісі үлгісін біріктіреді. Бұл қағазда Уйгурды қабылдау тілі ретінде қолданып, төрт донор тілдерінде көлемдерді табуға тырысқақ: араб, қытап, перс және русс тілдерінде. Біз қолданылатын тәртібіміздің ең әсер етілігін бағалау үшін екі топты тәжірибелерді орындаймыз: көлемді идентификациялау мен ООВ төрт тіл екі және сегіз аудару бағыттары (Уйгур-араб, араб-уйгур, уйгур-қытайша, қытайша-уйгур, уйгур-персиялық, персиялық Біздің әдіміміздің басқа негізгі үлгілерді өзгерту үшін көмектесу үлгілерінің эксперименталдық нәтижелері көрсетіледі. Керек сөздерді идентификациялау тәжірибесінің нәтижесін біріктіру үлгілері OOV аудармасының ең жақсы нәтижесін жеткізеді (0.5- 0.9 BLEU жақсартулары менен)', 'lt': 'Norėdami praturtinti mažų išteklių nustatymų žodyną, pasiūlėme naują metodą, kuriuo nustatomos paskolos vienakalbinėje korporoje. Konkrečiau, pirmą kartą mes naudojame tarpkalbinius žodžių įterpimus kaip pagrindinę savybę, kad generuotume semantiškai susijusius kandidatus, pagrįstus panašia korpora ir mažu dvikalbiu leksikonu; tada log-linijinis modelis, kuriame numatomi keli plokšti požymiai, pavyzdžiui, išraiškos panašumas ir hibridinio kalbos modelio požymiai. Šiame dokumente Uyghur as naudojamas kaip gavimo kalba ir bandome aptikti paskolas keturiomis donor ų kalbomis: arabų, kinų, persų ir rusų. Mes atliekame dvi eksperimentų grupes, kad įvertintume siūlomo metodo veiksmingumą: paskolų lauko identifikavimą ir OOV vertimą keturiomis kalbomis poromis ir aštuoniais vertimo kryptimis (Uygur-Arabic, Arabic-Uygur, Uygur-Chinese, Chinese-Uygur, Uygur-Persian, Persian-Uygur, Uygur-Russian ir Russian-Uygur). Eksperimentiniai duomenys dėl paskolų lauko identifikavimo rodo, kad mūsų metodas gerokai viršija kitus pradinius modelius. Neural machine translation models integrating results of loanword identification experiments achieve the best results on OOV translation(with 0.5-0.9 BLEU improvements)', 'ml': 'കുറഞ്ഞ വിഭവങ്ങളുടെ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് വാക്കുകള്\u200d സമ്പന്നമാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d രീതി കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ആദ്യം ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് കോര്\u200dപ്പോരായും ചെറിയ രണ്ടു ഭാഷ ലെക്സിക്കോണും അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പിന്നെ ഒരു ലോഗ് ലൈനൈര്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d, അതിന്റെ അവസാന ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നതിനായി കുറച്ചു തണുപ്പുകളെ കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നു ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഉഗ്ഹുരിനെ സ്വീകരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷയായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. നാലു ഭാഷകളില്\u200d കടം കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്നു. അറബ നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയുടെ സാക്ഷ്യം നിരീക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു കൂട്ടം പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു; നാല് ഭാഷയിലുള്ള വാക്ക് തിരിച്ചറിയാനും ഒവി പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതും നാല് ഭാഷ ഭാഷയില്\u200d  ലോണ്\u200dവേര്\u200dഡ് തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ രീതിയില്\u200d മറ്റു ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d മോഡലുകള ലോണ്\u200dവോര്\u200dഡ് തിരിച്ചറിയാനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ മോഡലുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Biex nirrikjedu l-vokabulari ta’ setturi ta’ riżorsi baxxi, ipproponejna metodu ġdid li jidentifika l-muniti tas-self f’korpura monolingwi. B’mod aktar speċifiku, l-ewwel a ħna nużaw l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem translingwi bħala l-karatteristika ewlenija biex niġġeneraw kandidati relatati semantikament ibbażati fuq korpura komparabbli u lexicon billingwi żgħir; imbagħad, mudell log-lineari li jikkombina diversi karatteristiċi baxxi bħas-similarità tal-pronunzja u karatteristiċi tal-mudell tal-lingwa ibrida biex jipprevedu r-riżultati finali. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nużaw l-Uyghur bħala l-lingwa tal-irċevuta u nippruvaw niskopru l-oġġetti tas-self f’erba’ lingwi donaturi: l-Għarab, iċ-Ċiniż, il-Persjan u r-Russu. Għandna twettaq żewġ gruppi ta’ esperimenti biex tevalwa l-effettività tal-approċċ propost tagħna: l-identifikazzjoni tas-self u t-traduzzjoni OOV f’erba’ pari lingwistiċi u tmien direzzjonijiet ta’ traduzzjoni (Uyghur-Arabic, Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian, u Russian-Uyghur). Riżultati esperimentali dwar l-identifikazzjoni tas-self juru li l-metodu tagħna jaqbeż mudelli oħra ta’ linja bażi b’mod sinifikanti. Mudelli newrali ta’ traduzzjoni bil-magna li jintegraw ir-riżultati ta’ esperimenti ta’ identifikazzjoni tas-self jiksbu l-aħjar riżultati dwar it-traduzzjoni OOV (b’titjib ta’ 0.5-0.9 BLEU)', 'mn': 'Бага бага баялаг байгууллагын үгийг багасгахын тулд бид нэг хэлний корпоратын худалдааныг тодорхойлох шинэ арга зам санал өгсөн. Илүү тодорхой нь, бид анхны хэл хэлний нэвтрүүлэлтийг жижиг хоёр хэл хэлний лексикон дээр харьцуулагдах семантийн холбоотой удирдагчийг үүсгэх гол чанар болгож хэрэглэдэг. Лог шугам загвар нь эцсийн үр дүнг тодорхойлдохын тулд хэд хэдэн гүнзгий болон гибрид хэлний загварыг нэгтгэдэг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Уйгурыг хүлээн авагчийн хэл болгон ашиглаж 4 донор хэл дээр худалдааныг олохыг хичээдэг: Араб, Хятад, Перс, Орос. Бид хоёр хэсэг туршилтын үр дүнтэй байдлыг үнэлгээд үзүүлдэг: худалдааны тодорхойлолт, OOV хөрөнгө хөрөнгө дөрвөн хэл хоёр, найм хөрөнгө хөрөнгө хөрөнгө оруулалт (Uyghur-Arabic, Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian, Russian-Uyghur Зээлийн худалдааны тодорхойлолтын туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга нь бусад суурь шугам загваруудыг илүү чухал болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна. ООВ-ын орчуулалтын хамгийн сайн үр дүнг олох боломжтой болно(0.5-0.9 BLEU сайжруулалт)', 'no': 'For å rykke ordboka i låge ressursinnstillingar, foreslåde vi eit nytt metode som identifiserer lånar i monospråk korpora. Meir spesifikke bruker vi først krysspråk ordinnbygging som kjernefunksjonen for å generera semantisk relaterte kandidatar basert på sammenlignbare korpora og ein liten bilinguelt leksikon. så kombinerer ein log-lineær modell som kombinerer fleire sålite funksjonar, slik som pronunciation similarity og hybridspråk-modellen for å foregå dei siste resultatene. I denne papiret bruker vi Uyghur som mottakarsspråket og prøver å finna lånsspråk i fire donorspråk: arabisk, kinesisk, persisk og russisk. Vi gjer to grupper eksperimenter for å evaluere effektiviteten av vårt foreslått tilnærming: lån- identifikasjon og OOV- omsetjing i fire språkopar og åtte omsetjingsmeldingar (Uyghur-arabisk, arabisk-Uyghur, ughur-kinesisk, ughur-persisk, persisk-Uyghur, Uyghur-russisk og russisk-Uyghur). Eksperimentale resultat på lån- ord- identifikasjon viser at metoden vårt utfører andre baseline- modeller betydelig. Nøyrale maskineomsetjingsmodular som integrerer resultatet av lånsidentifikasjonsprosektar gjer dei beste resultatene på OOV-omsetjinga(med 0.5-0.9 BLEU-forbetringar)', 'ro': 'Pentru a îmbogăți vocabularul de setări cu resurse reduse, am propus o metodă nouă care identifică cuvintele de împrumut în corpore monolingve. Mai exact, folosim mai întâi încorporări de cuvinte încrucișate ca caracteristică de bază pentru a genera candidați cu legătură semantică bazată pe corpore comparabile și un lexicon bilingv mic; apoi, un model log-liniar care combină mai multe caracteristici superficiale, cum ar fi similitudinea pronunției și caracteristicile modelului limbajului hibrid, pentru a prezice rezultatele finale. În această lucrare, folosim uigura ca limbă de primire și încercăm să detectăm cuvintele de împrumut în patru limbi donatoare: arabă, chineză, persană și rusă. Realizăm două grupuri de experimente pentru a evalua eficacitatea abordării propuse: identificarea cuvintelor împrumutate și traducerea OOV în patru perechi de limbi și opt direcții de traducere (uigur-arabă, arabă-uigură, uigur-chineză, chineză-uigură, uigur-persană, persană-uigură, uigur-rusă și rusă-uigură). Rezultatele experimentale privind identificarea cuvintelor de credit arată că metoda noastră depășește semnificativ alte modele de bază. Modelele de traducere automată neurală care integrează rezultatele experimentelor de identificare a cuvintelor de credit obțin cele mai bune rezultate în traducerea OOV (cu îmbunătățiri 0.5-0.9 BLEU)', 'si': 'අඩුම භාෂාවක් සැකසුම් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ නියම විධානයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dර විශේෂයෙන්, අපි මුලින්ම ක්\u200dරිස් භාෂාවක් වචනය සම්බන්ධයක් භාවිත විදිහට භාවිත කරන්නේ සැමැන්තිකිරීම සම්බන්ධ විදි ඊට පස්සේ, ලොග් ලිනියර් මොඩේල් එකක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර මේ පත්තරේ අපි යුගුර්ව පාවිච්චි භාෂා විදිහට භාවිත කරනවා සහ දේවල් හතර භාෂාවක් තියෙන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා: අරාබියි අපි පරීක්ෂණ දෙකක් කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායම් කණ්ඩායම් කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශ්වාස කරන්න: ලෝන්වර්ඩ් පරීක්ෂණය සහ OOOv පරීක්ෂණය හතර භාෂාවක් සහ අයිගුර් අරාබි අයිගුර්, UY අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විදියට අනිත් පරීක්ෂණ මොඩේල් විශේෂයෙන් අනිත් පරීක්ෂණ මොඩේල් වලට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරිය න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් වාර්ථාව මනුස්ත්\u200dරය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර පරීක්ෂණයක් OOOv වාර්ථාවේ', 'pl': 'Aby wzbogacić słownictwo o niskie ustawienia zasobów, zaproponowaliśmy nową metodę identyfikacji pożyczek w jednojęzycznych korpusach. W szczególności, najpierw używamy wielojęzycznych osadzeń słów jako głównej cechy do generowania semantycznie powiązanych kandydatów opartych na porównywalnych korpusach i małym dwujęzycznym leksykonie; Następnie model log-liniowy, który łączy kilka płytkich cech, takich jak podobieństwo wymowy i hybrydowy model języka, aby przewidzieć końcowe wyniki. W niniejszym artykule używamy języka uzgurskiego jako języka odbiorów i staramy się wykryć pożyczki w czterech językach dawcy: arabskim, chińskim, perskim i rosyjskim. Przeprowadzamy dwie grupy eksperymentów, aby ocenić skuteczność proponowanego podejścia: identyfikację pożyczki i tłumaczenie OOV w czterech parach językowych i ośmiu kierunkach tłumaczenia (ujgursko-arabski, arabsko-ujgurski, ujgursko-chiński, chińsko-ujgurski, ujgursko-perski, perski-ujgurski, ujgursko-rosyjski i rosyjski-ujgurski). Wyniki eksperymentalne dotyczące identyfikacji pożyczek pokazują, że nasza metoda znacznie przewyższa inne modele bazowe. Neuronowe modele tłumaczeń maszynowych integrujące wyniki eksperymentów identyfikacji pożyczek uzyskują najlepsze wyniki w translacji OOV (z ulepszeniami 0.5-0.9 BLEU)', 'sv': 'För att berika ordförrådet med låga resurser föreslog vi en ny metod som identifierar låneord i enspråkiga corpora. Mer specifikt använder vi först korspråkiga ordinbäddningar som kärnfunktion för att generera semantiskt relaterade kandidater baserade på jämförbara corpora och ett litet tvåspråkigt lexikon; sedan en log-linjär modell som kombinerar flera ytliga funktioner såsom uttalslimitag och hybridspråksmodellfunktioner för att förutsäga slutresultatet. I denna uppsats använder vi uiguriska som kvittospråk och försöker upptäcka låneord på fyra givarspråk: arabiska, kinesiska, persiska och ryska. Vi genomför två grupper av experiment för att utvärdera effektiviteten av vårt föreslagna tillvägagångssätt: lånord identifiering och OOV översättning i fyra språkpar och åtta översättningsriktningar (uiguriska-arabiska, arabiska-uiguriska, uiguriska-kinesiska, kinesisk-uiguriska, uiguriska-persiska, persiska-uiguriska, uiguriska-ryska och ryska-uiguriska). Experimentella resultat på lånord identifiering visar att vår metod överträffar andra baslinjemodeller avsevärt. Neurala maskinöversättningsmodeller som integrerar resultat av lånord identifiering experiment ger bästa resultat på OOV översättning (med 0,5-0,9 BLEU förbättringar)', 'sr': 'Da bi obogatili rečnik niskih resursa, predložili smo novu metodu koja identifikuje pozajmice u monojezičkoj korpori. Još specifiènije, prvo koristimo međujezičke reèi kao osnovnu karakteristiku da bi stvorili semantički povezane kandidate na osnovu usporednog korpora i malog dvojezičkog leksikona; Onda, log-linearni model koji kombinuje nekoliko plitkih karakteristika kao što su pronalaženje sličnosti i hibridni jezički model karakteristike za predviđanje konačnih rezultata. U ovom papiru koristimo Uyghur kao jezik prijema i pokušavamo otkriti kreditne poruke na četiri jezika donatora: Arapski, kineski, persijanski i ruski. Vodimo dve grupe eksperimenata kako bi procenili učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa: identifikacija kredita i prevod OOV u četiri jezičke pare i osam smjernica prevoda (Uyghur-arapski, arapski-Uyghur, Uyghur-kineski, kineski-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persi, Persi-Uyghur, Uyghur-ruski i ruski-Uyghur). Eksperimentalni rezultati identifikacije kreditnih režima pokazuju da naša metoda značajno iznosi druge osnovne modele. Neuralni modeli prevoda mašine koji integriraju rezultate identifikacije kreditnih eksperimenata postižu najbolji rezultat prevoda OOV(sa poboljšanjem 0.5-0.9 BLEU)', 'so': 'Si aan u hodanayno hadalka habka hoose ee midhaha, waxaynu horumarinnay qaab warqad ah oo ku qoran qoraal amaaheed oo ku qoran shirkadda noocyada afka ah. More specifically, we first use cross-lingual word embeddings as the core feature to generate semantically related candidates based on comparable corpora and a small bilingual lexicon;  Markaas waxaa laga yaabaa tusaale ahaan qoraal-liner oo u soo ururiya qaar xujooyin khaas ah, tusaale ahaan ogeysiiska siman iyo muusikada afka hybrid, si loo sii sheego ugu dambeeya. Warqadan waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa Uyghur sida afka aqbalka oo kale, waxaana isku daynaa inaannu ku ogaano af afar luqadood oo wax amaahsan, Carabi, Shiino, Bershan iyo Ruush. Waxaan sameeyaa laba kooxood oo imtixaan ah si aan u qiimeyno awoodkayaga loo soo jeeday: aqoonsiga codsiga iyo tarjumidda OOV oo af af labo iyo siddeed kooxood oo turjuman (Uyghur Carabi ah, Carabi-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Ruush iyo Ruush-Uyghur). Imtixaanka ku saabsan aqoonsiga amaahda waxaa muuqda in qaababkayagu uu sameeyo qaabab kale oo asal ah. Tusaalada turjumidda maskinada ee Neural machine-translation oo la qabsashada resultada imtixaanka aqoonsiga borrowga ayaa gaadha resultada ugu wanaagsan ee turjumidda OOV (with 0.5-0.9 BLEU bedelka)', 'ta': 'குறைந்த மூலத்தை அமைப்புகளின் சொல்லை வளர்ச்சி செய்வதற்கு, நாங்கள் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை தேர்ந்தெடுத்துள்ளோம், அது மொழிம மேலும் குறிப்பிட்டு, முதலில் நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட மொழி வார்த்தைகளை உபயோகிக்கிறோம் மூல குணங்கள் என்பதை முதலில் ஒப்பிடும் கோர்போரால்  பின்னர், ஒரு பதிவு கோட்டு மாதிரி அது சேர்க்கும் பல மஞ்சள் குணங்களை ஒன்று சேர்க்கும் மற்றும் வெளிப்பாட்டு போன்ற மொழி மாதிரி மாத இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் உக்குரை பெற்ற மொழியாக பயன்படுத்தி நான்கு கொடுக்கும் மொழிகளில் கடன் வார்த்தைகளை கண்டுபிடிக நாங்கள் எங்கள் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாட்டின் விளைவை மதிப்பிட இரண்டு குழுக்களை செய்கிறோம்: loanword identification and OOV மொழிபெயர்ப்பு நான்கு மொழி ஜோடி மற்றும் எட்டு மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளில் (உக்குரி அரபி அரேபி, அரபி மொழ கடன் அடையாளத்தில் சோதனையின் முடிவு Name', 'ur': 'کم سرمایہ کے سازوں کے لکھنے کے لئے، ہم نے ایک نو طریقہ پیش کیا جو ایک زبان کے شرکت میں وام لکھنے کی تعریف کرتا ہے. اور زیادہ مشخص ہے، ہم پہلی بار کرس زبان کی کلمات انبودینگ کا استعمال کریں گے کیونکہ سیمنٹی رابطہ دار کاندینٹ پیدا کرنے کے لئے ایک چھوٹی دو زبان کی لکسون پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں۔ پھر ایک لاگ لینیر موڈل جو بہت سی گھنی ویژگی جمع کرتا ہے جیسے بات کی شباهت اور ہیبریڈ زبان موڈل کی ویژگی کے لئے آخری نتیجے کی پیش آنے کے لئے۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم Uyghur کو پکڑنے کی زبان کے طور پر استعمال کرتے ہیں اور چار دنیور زبانوں میں قرض لکھنے کی کوشش کرتے ہیں: عربی, چینی, فارسی اور روسی. ہم نے دو امتحان کے گروہوں کو اپنی پیشنهاد کی طریقے کے اثبات کا ارزش کرنا چاہا تھا: loanword identification and OOV translation in four language pairs and eight translation directions (Uyghur-Arabic, Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian, and Russian-Uyghur). قرض ورڈ کی شناسایی پر تجربہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا طریقہ دوسرے بنسٹ لین نمڈلوں سے اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ لینڈورڈ شناسایی آزمائش کے نتائج میں نیورال ماشین ترجمہ موڈل کے ساتھ تفریق کرنے کے لئے OOV ترجمہ کے بہترین نتائج حاصل کرتے ہیں(0.5-0.9 BLEU ترجمہ کے ساتھ)', 'uz': "Keyingi manba moslamalarini ko'paytirish uchun biz monolingual kompaniyadagi yomon soʻzlarni aniqlash usulini davom qildik. Ko'pchilik, biz birinchi tillar ichki so'zlardan foydalanamiz, bir necha ikkita tillar va bir kichkina ikkita tillar leksisini yaratish uchun semantik bog'langan kandidalarni yaratish mumkin; keyin, log-liner modeli, bu bir necha sariq xususiyatlarni birlashtirish mumkin, huddi ishlab chiqarish va hybrid tili modeli xususiyatlarini ko'paytirish mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz Ruscha tili sifatida yughurdan foydalanamiz va to'rtta qo'l tilida yozilgan so'zlarni aniqlashga harakat qilamiz: arab, Xitoycha, Person va Ruscha. Biz taʼminlovchi tilimizning effektini qiymati uchun ikkita guruhni bajaramiz: to'rt tillar qidirish va OOV tarjimasi to'rt tillar qoʻyicha va sakkizcha tarjimasida (Uyghur arab, Arab-Uyghur, Uyghur-Xitoycha, Xitoycha- Uyghur, Uyghur-Person, Person-Uyghur, Uyghur-Ruscha va Ruscha-Uyghur). Name Name", 'vi': 'Để làm giàu ngôn ngữ của thiết lập ít tài nguyên, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp mới xác định chữ vay bằng chữ "một ngôn ngữ". Cụ thể hơn, chúng ta sử dụng từ ngữ khác nhau để tạo ra các ứng cử viên theo ngữ pháp dựa trên chữ viết hai chữ so sánh, sau đó, một mô hình nhật tính kết hợp nhiều tính năng nông cạn như khả năng phát âm tương tự và mô hình ngôn ngữ lai để dự đoán kết quả cuối cùng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi dùng Ogygia làm ngôn ngữ thu nhập và cố gắng phát hiện chữ mượn bằng bốn ngôn ngữ hiến tặng: A-rập, Trung Quốc, Ba Tư và Nga. Chúng tôi tiến hành hai nhóm thí nghiệm để đánh giá hiệu quả của phương pháp đã đề nghị: nghiên cứu từ dự phòng và bản dịch OOOV theo bốn cặp ngôn ngữ và tám hướng dịch (Uyghur-Ả-rập, Ả Rập-hà, Uyghur, Uzyghur-wor, Uzyghur-xian-đươc đươc đươc-wore, Uzhur-Nga và Nga-Ogygia. Kết quả thí nghiệm xác định từ dự phòng cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta vượt trội hơn những mẫu cơ bản khác. Mẫu dịch về máy thần kinh, thành lập kết quả thí nghiệm nhận dạng từ dự án... đạt được kết quả tốt nhất trong dịch OOOV (với cải tiến 0.5-0.9 tiếng bíp)', 'bg': 'За обогатяване на речника с ниски ресурсни настройки, ние предложихме нов метод, който идентифицира заемните думи в едноезични корпуси. По-конкретно, първо използваме междуезични словни вграждания като основна характеристика за генериране на семантично свързани кандидати въз основа на сравними корпуси и малък двуезичен лексикон; след това, логлинеен модел, който съчетава няколко плитки характеристики като сходство с произношението и хибриден езиков модел, за да прогнозира крайните резултати. В тази статия използваме уйгур като език за получаване и се опитваме да открием заеми на четири донорски езика: арабски, китайски, персийски и руски. Провеждаме две групи експерименти за оценка на ефективността на предлагания от нас подход: идентификация на заем и превод в четири езикови двойки и осем направления на превод (уйгур-арабски, арабско-уйгур, уйгур-китайски, китайско-уйгур, уйгур-персийски, персийски-уйгур, уйгур-руски и руски-уйгур). Експерименталните резултати за идентифициране на заеми показват, че методът ни значително превъзхожда другите базови модели. Моделите на неврален машинен превод, интегриращи резултатите от експериментите за идентификация на заем, постигат най-добри резултати при превода на ОВ (с подобрения от 0.5-0.9)', 'da': 'For at berige ordforråd med lave ressourcer indstillinger, foreslog vi en ny metode, der identificerer lånord i ensprogede corpora. Mere specifikt bruger vi først tværsprogede ordindlejringer som kernefunktionen til at generere semantisk relaterede kandidater baseret på sammenlignelige corpora og et lille tosproget leksikon; derefter en log-lineær model, der kombinerer flere overfladiske funktioner såsom udtalelighed og hybridsprogsmodellfunktioner for at forudsige de endelige resultater. I denne artikel bruger vi uigurisk som kvitteringssprog og forsøger at opdage lånord på fire donorsprog: arabisk, kinesisk, persisk og russisk. Vi gennemfører to grupper af eksperimenter for at evaluere effektiviteten af vores foreslåede tilgang: lånord identifikation og OOV oversættelse i fire sprogpar og otte oversættelsesretninger (uigurisk-arabisk, arabisk-uigurisk, uigurisk-kinesisk, kinesisk-uigurisk, uigurisk-persisk, persisk-uigurisk, uigurisk-russisk og russisk-uigurisk). Eksperimentelle resultater på identifikation af lånord viser, at vores metode overgår andre basismodeller betydeligt. Neurale maskinoversættelsesmodeller, der integrerer resultater af lånord identifikation eksperimenter, opnår de bedste resultater på OOV oversættelse (med 0,5-0,9 BLEU forbedringer)', 'id': 'Untuk memperkaya vocabulari pengaturan sumber daya rendah, kami mengusulkan metode baru yang mengidentifikasi uang pinjaman dalam korpora monobahasa. Lebih spesifik, kita pertama-tama menggunakan pembangunan kata saling bahasa sebagai fitur utama untuk menghasilkan kandidat yang berhubungan semantis berdasarkan corpora yang dapat dibandingkan dan sebuah leksikon bilingual kecil; then, a log-linear model which combines several shallow features such as pronunciation similarity and hybrid language model features to predict the final results.  Dalam kertas ini, kami menggunakan Uyghur sebagai bahasa penerimaan dan mencoba untuk mendeteksi uang pinjaman dalam empat bahasa pendorong: Arab, Cina, Persia dan Rusia. Kami melakukan dua kelompok eksperimen untuk mengevaluasi efektivitas pendekatan kami yang diusulkan: pengenalan loanword dan terjemahan OOV dalam empat pasangan bahasa dan delapan arah terjemahan (Uyghur-Arabic, Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian, dan Russian-Uyghur). Experimental results on loanword identification show that our method outperforms other baseline models significantly.  Model terjemahan mesin saraf yang mengintegrasikan hasil dari eksperimen identifikasi loanword mencapai hasil terbaik pada terjemahan OOV(dengan 0,5-0,9 BLEU perbaikan)', 'nl': "Om de woordenschat van lage resource instellingen te verrijken, hebben we een nieuwe methode voorgesteld die leenwords in eentalige corpora identificeert. Meer specifiek gebruiken we eerst cross-lingual woord embeddings als kernfunctie om semantisch gerelateerde kandidaten te genereren op basis van vergelijkbare corpora's en een klein tweetalig lexicon; Vervolgens, een log-lineair model dat verschillende oppervlakkige kenmerken combineert zoals uitspraakgelijkenis en hybride taalmodel kenmerken om de uiteindelijke resultaten te voorspellen. In dit artikel gebruiken we Oeigoers als ontvangsttaal en proberen we leenwoorden in vier donortalen te detecteren: Arabisch, Chinees, Perzisch en Russisch. We voeren twee groepen experimenten uit om de effectiviteit van onze voorgestelde aanpak te evalueren: leenword identificatie en OOV vertaling in vier taalparen en acht vertaalrichtingen (Oeigoers-Arabisch, Arabisch-Oeigoers, Oeigoers-Chinees, Chinees-Oeigoers, Oeigoers-Perzisch, Perzisch-Oeigoers, Oeigoers-Russisch en Russisch-Oeigoers). Experimentele resultaten op leenword identificatie tonen aan dat onze methode veel beter presteert dan andere baseline modellen. Neurale machine translation modellen integreren resultaten van leenword identificatie experimenten bereiken de beste resultaten op OOV vertaling (met 0.5-0.9 BLEU verbeteringen)", 'de': 'Um das Vokabular von ressourcenarmen Einstellungen zu bereichern, schlugen wir eine neue Methode vor, die Leihwörter in einsprachigen Korpora identifiziert. Insbesondere verwenden wir zunächst sprachübergreifende Worteinbettungen als Kernfunktion, um semantisch verwandte Kandidaten basierend auf vergleichbaren Korpora und einem kleinen zweisprachigen Lexikon zu generieren; Dann ein log-lineares Modell, das mehrere oberflächliche Merkmale wie Aussprache Ähnlichkeit und hybride Sprachmodelle kombiniert, um die endgültigen Ergebnisse vorherzusagen. In diesem Beitrag verwenden wir Uigurisch als Empfangssprache und versuchen, Leihwörter in vier Gebersprachen zu erkennen: Arabisch, Chinesisch, Persisch und Russisch. Wir führen zwei Gruppen von Experimenten durch, um die Wirksamkeit unseres vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes zu evaluieren: Loanword Identifikation und OOV Übersetzung in vier Sprachpaaren und acht Übersetzungsrichtungen (Uigurisch-Arabisch, Arabisch-Uigurisch, Uigurisch-Chinesisch, Chinesisch-Uigurisch, Uigurisch-Persisch, Persisch-Uigurisch, Uigurisch-Russisch und Russisch-Uigurisch). Experimentelle Ergebnisse zur Loanword-Identifikation zeigen, dass unsere Methode andere Basismodelle deutlich übertrifft. Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzungsmodelle, die Ergebnisse von Leihwort-Identifikationsexperimenten integrieren, erzielen die besten Ergebnisse auf OOV-Übersetzung (mit 0.5-0.9 BLEU-Verbesserungen)', 'ko': '저자원 환경에서의 어휘를 풍부하게 하기 위해 우리는 단어 자료 라이브러리에서 차용사를 식별하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.더욱 구체적으로 말하자면 우리는 먼저 다중 언어 단어의 삽입을 핵심 특징으로 하고 비교할 수 있는 자료 라이브러리와 하나의 소형 이중 언어 사전을 바탕으로 의미와 관련된 후보어를 생성한다.그 다음에 음성 유사성과 혼합 언어 모델 등 얕은 특징을 결합시켜 수선형 모델을 구축하여 최종 결과를 예측한다.본고에서 우리는 위구르어를 수신어로 사용하고 네 가지 기증어 중의 외래어인 아랍어, 중국어, 페르시아어와 러시아어를 검출해 보았다.우리는 두 그룹의 실험을 통해 우리가 제시한 방법의 유효성을 평가했다. 네 개의 언어 대조와 여덟 개의 번역 방향(위구르-아랍어, 아랍어-위구르어, 위구르-중국어, 중국어-위구르어, 위구르-보스어, 보스어-위구르어, 위구르-러시아어-위구르어)에서의 외래어 식별과 OOV 번역이다.대외래어 식별의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 다른 기선 모델보다 현저히 우수하다는 것을 알 수 있다.외래어 식별 실험 결과를 결합한 신경기계 번역 모델은 OOV 번역에서 가장 좋은 결과를 얻었다(BLEU 0.5-0.9로 개선)', 'sw': 'Kutajiri lugha ya mafanikio ya rasilimali chini, tulipendekeza njia ya riwaya ambayo inaonyesha maneno ya mikopo katika makampuni ya kiutamaduni. Zaidi hasa, kwanza tunatumia maneno ya lugha yenye lugha mbalimbali kama utaratibu wa msingi wa kutengeneza wagombea waliohusiana na kimapenzi kwa kutumia kampuni inayofanana na lexico ndogo ya lugha mbili; halafu, mtindo wa mstari unaohamasisha vipengele kadhaa vibaya kama vile utangazaji wa lugha za kihybrid unaonyesha kutabiri matokeo ya mwisho. Katika karatasi hii, tunatumia Uyghur kama lugha ya kupokea na tunajaribu kugundua maneno yanayotumiwa kwa lugha nne za wafadhili: Kiarabu, Kichina, Kipersia na Urusi. Tunafanya makundi mawili ya majaribio ili kutathmini ufanisi wa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa: utambulisho wa maneno ya mkono na tafsiri ya OOV kwa lugha nne na mitazamo nane ya tafsiri (Uyghur, Kiarabu, Ki-Uyghur, Uyghur-Kichina, Kichina-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persia, Kipersia-Uyghur, Uyghur-Urusi na Urusi-Uyghur). Experimental results on loanword identification show that our method outperforms other baseline models significantly.  Mradi wa utafsiri wa mashine ya asili unaohamasisha matokeo ya majaribio ya utambulisho wa maneno ya mkononi yanafanikiwa matokeo bora katika tafsiri ya OOV (kwa maboresho ya 0.5-0.9 BLEU)', 'fa': 'برای ثروت کردن کلمات از تنظیمات منابع کم، ما پیشنهاد دادیم روش نویی که در شرکت یک زبان وام شناسایی می کند. دقیقاً ما اولین بار به عنوان ویژه اصلی برای تولید کاندیدای متصل به semantically based on comparable corpora and a small bilingual lexicon استفاده می کنیم. بعدش، یک مدل لینی که چند ویژه\u200cهای گسترده\u200cای را ترکیب می\u200cکند، مانند شبیه\u200cسازی و ویژه\u200cهای مدل زبان hybrid برای پیش\u200cبینی نتایج نهایی. در این کاغذ، ما از ویگور به عنوان زبان رسیدگی استفاده می\u200cکنیم و سعی می\u200cکنیم به چهار زبان قرض\u200cدهنده\u200cها: عربی، چینی، فارسی و روسیه کشف کنیم. ما دو گروه آزمایش را برای ارزیابی فعالیت دستور پیشنهاد ما انجام می دهیم: شناسایی وام و ترجمه OOV در چهار جفت زبان و هشت راهی ترجمه کردن (Uyghur-Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian, and Russian-Uyghur). نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه روی شناسایی وام\u200cورد نشان می\u200cدهد که روش ما مدل\u200cهای پایین\u200cخط\u200cهای دیگر را به طور معنی انجام می\u200cدهد. مدل ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین عصبی که نتایج شناسایی وام\u200cنامه\u200cها را جمع می\u200cکند بهترین نتایج ترجمه\u200cهای OOV (با توسعه\u200cهای 0.5-0.9 BLEU) می\u200cرسد.', 'af': "Om die woordeboek van lae hulpbron instellings te verryk, het ons 'n nuwe metode voorgestel wat loanworde in monolinglike korpora identifiseer. Meer spesifieke, ons gebruik eerste kruistale woord inbêdings as die kjernefunksie om semantiese verwante kandidate te genereer wat gebaseer is op vergelykbare korpora en 'n klein twee tale leksikoon; dan, 'n log-lineêre model wat verskeie slag funksies soos verklaar gelykheid en hibride taal model funksies kombinieer om die eindelike resultate te voorskou. In hierdie papier gebruik ons Uyghur as die ontvangspraak en probeer om loanworde in vier donor tale te vind: Arabiese, Sjinese, Persies en Russe. Ons doen twee groepe eksperimente om die effektiviteit van ons voorgestelde toegang te evalueer: loanword identifikasie en OOV vertaling in vier taal pare en agt vertalingsdireksies (Uyghur-Arabiese, Arabiese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Sjinese, Uyghur-Persies, Persies-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russe en Russe-Uyghur). Eksperimentale resultate op loan woord identifikasie vertoon dat ons metode ander basilyn modele betekenlik uitvoer. Neurale masjien vertaling modele wat die resultate van loanword identifikasie eksperimente integreer word, bereik die beste resultate op OOV vertaling( met 0.5-0.9 BLEU verbeteringe)", 'sq': 'Për të pasuruar fjalorin e rregullimeve të ulëta të burimeve, ne propozuam një metodë të re që identifikon hua në korpra monogjuhësore. Më specifikisht, ne së pari përdorim përfshirjet e fjalëve ndërgjuhësore si karakteristikë kryesore për të gjeneruar kandidatë të lidhur semantikisht bazuar në korpra të krahasueshme dhe një lexikon të vogël dy gjuhësh; pastaj, një model log-linear që kombinon disa karakteristika të thella të tilla si ngjashmëria e shprehjes dhe karakteristika të modelit të gjuhës hibride për të parashikuar rezultatet përfundimtare. Në këtë letër, ne përdorim Uyghur in si gjuhën e marrëveshjes dhe përpiqemi të zbulojmë armët e huave në katër gjuhë dhuruese: arabisht, kinez, persian dhe rusisht. Ne kryejmë dy grupe eksperimentesh për të vlerësuar efektshmërinë e qasjes sonë të propozuar: identifikimi i borxhit dhe përkthimi OOV në katër çifte gjuhësh dhe tetë drejtime përkthimi (Uyghur-Arabic, Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian dhe Russian-Uyghur). Experimental results on loanword identification show that our method outperforms other baseline models significantly.  Modelet e përkthimit nervor të makinave që integrojnë rezultatet e eksperimenteve të identifikimit të huanvordit arrijnë rezultatet më të mira në përkthimin OOV(me 0.5-0.9 përmirësime BLEU)', 'hr': 'Za bogatstvo riječnika niskih resursa, predložili smo novu metodu koja identificira kreditne rečenice u monojezičkoj korpori. Posebno, prvo koristimo uključenje međujezičkih riječi kao osnovnu karakteristiku za stvaranje semantički povezanih kandidata na temelju usporednog korporacije i malog dvojezičkog leksikona; Onda, log-linearni model koji kombinira nekoliko plitkih karakteristika poput pronalaženja sličnosti i hibridnog jezičkog model a karakteristika za predviđanje konačnih rezultata. U ovom papiru koristimo Uyghur kao jezik primanja i pokušavamo otkriti pozajmice na četiri jezika donatora: Arapski, kineski, persijski i ruski. Vodimo dvije skupine eksperimenata kako bi procijenili učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa: identifikacija kredita i prevod OOV-a u četiri jezičke pare i osam smjernica prevoda (Uyghur-arapski, arapski-Uyghur, Uyghur-kineski, kineski-Uyghur, Uyghur-Perski, Perski-Uyghur, Uyghur-ruski i ruski-Uyghur). Eksperimentalni rezultati identifikacije kreditnih režima pokazuju da naša metoda značajno iznosi druge početne modele. Modeli prijevoza neuroloških strojeva koji integriraju rezultate identifikacije kreditnih eksperimenata postignu najbolji rezultat prijevoza OOV(s poboljšanjem BLEU-a 0,5-0,9)', 'am': 'እና የአንባቢ የክፍለ ሀብት አካባቢ እና የአንባቢ ቃላትን በሞሎንቋል ኮርፖርት የሚያሳውቅ የአሁኑን ደረጃ ለመጠቀም አቀረብን፡፡ በተለይም፣ በመጀመሪያ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ቃላትን አካባቢ እና ትንሽ ሁለት ቋንቋ ሊክሲን በመተካከል የsemantically related አማካሪዎች መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ ከዚያም በኋላ የፍጻሜውን ፍጻሜ ለመቀበል የሚችል ብዙዎችን የባዶ ምርጫዎች እና የኬብሪድ ቋንቋ ሞዴል የሚያሳስብ የጦማር መስመር ነው፡፡ በዚህ ካላት ጉዳይ፣ የጉዳይኛ ቋንቋ እንደ ተቀባይ ቋንቋ እናስቀምጣለን በአራት ቋንቋ የዕዳ ቃላትን ለማግኘት እንሞክራለን፤ ዐረብኛ፣ ቻይና፣ ፋርስ እና ራሽኛ፡፡ የተዘጋጀውን ልግስናችንን ለማስተዋል ሁለት ክፍሎች እና የኦኦቪ ትርጉም በአራት ቋንቋ ሁለት ዓይነቶች እና ስምንት ትርጉም መንገድ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የድምፅ ውጤቶች በአዳራጅ ቃላት ማውጣት ማሳየት የሥርዓታችን ሥርዓት ሌሎችን መሳሪያ ዓይነቶች በሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ የኔural machine translation models integrating the results of loanword identification experiments on OOV translation (with 0.5-0.9 BLEU improvements)', 'tr': 'Içik resurslar düzümlerini baýlamak üçin, monolingw korporasynda borçlary tanap täze bir täze yöntemi teklip etdik. Adatça, biz ilkinji gezek uluslary söz baglanmalaryny semantik bilen baglaýyn korpora we kiçi bir iki dil lingüňe daýanýan kandidýalary döretmek üçin ullanýarys. soňra Log çyzgyly bir nusga üçin soňky netijeleri çaklamak üçin birnäçe gaty möhümleri birleşýär. Bu kagyzda biz Uýgury almak dili üçin ulanýarys we dört donor dilinde wagtlary alyp synanyşýarys: Arabça, Çin çe, Persça we Rusça. Biz öz teklipimiziň etkinliýetini deňlemek üçin iki topar deneyler etdik: wagt wagtlaryň kimligini we OW terjimesini dört dil çift we sekiz terjime edilmesi (Uygur-Arabça, arap-aýgur, Uygur-Çin çe, Hygur-Uygur, Uygur-Persiýa, Peris-Uygur, Uygur-Russiýa we Russiýa-Uygur). Uz sözleriň tanyşdyrmasynyň netijesi biziň metodamyzyň başga çyzgylyň nusgalarynyň üstüne çykarypdygyny görkez. Näyral maşynyň terjime modelleri kredit maşynyň kimligi barlamasynyň netijelerini birleştirip OOV terjime edilen iň gowy netijelerini ýetip bilýär(0.5-0.9 BLEU gelişmeleri bilen)', 'bn': 'কম সম্পদ বৈশিষ্ট্যের শব্দভাণ্ডার সমৃদ্ধ করার জন্য আমরা একটি উপন্যাস পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করেছিলাম যা মোনোলিভাল কোর্পোরায় ঋণের শব আরো বিশেষ করে, আমরা প্রথম ক্রস-ভাষাভাষী শব্দ ব্যবহার করি মূল বৈশিষ্ট্য হিসেবে যাতে সেমান্টিক্যালের সাথে সম্পর্কিত প্রার্থীদের তৈরি করা এবং  তারপর, একটি লোক-লাইনার মডেল যা বেশ কয়েকটি শুষ্ক বৈশিষ্ট্য যেমন প্রকাশের সমতা এবং হাইব্রিড ভাষার মডেলের বৈশিষ্ট্য প্রদর্শন করতে পারে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা উইজুর গ্রহণযোগ্য ভাষা হিসেবে ব্যবহার করি এবং চারটি দানী ভাষায় ঋণ শব্দ খুঁজে বের করার চেষ্টা করি: আরবী, চীন আমরা আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপের কার্যকর পরীক্ষার দুই গ্রুপ পরীক্ষা করেছি: চার ভাষা জোড়া এবং আট ট ট্রান্সভার অনুবাদ (ইউগুর আরবী, আরবী উইগুর, উগুর-চীনা, চীনা-উইগুর, উগুর-পার্সিয়ান, পার্সিয়ান-উগু লোনওয়ার্ড চিহ্নিত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের পদ্ধতি অন্যান্য বেসাইলাইন মডেলের মাধ্যমে গুরুত্বপূর নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ মডেল ল লোনওয়ার্ড পরিচয় পরীক্ষার ফলাফল সম্পূর্ণ করে যাচ্ছে অওভি অনুবাদের মধ্যে সর্বোচ্চ ফলাফল অর্জন করে (০. 5-0. 9 বেলু উন', 'bs': 'Da bismo obogatili rečnik niskih resursa, predložili smo novu metodu koja identificira pozajmice u monojezičkoj korpori. Posebno, prvo koristimo međujezičke reči ugrađivanje kao osnovnu karakteristiku da bi stvorili semantički povezane kandidate na temelju usporedbene korpore i malih dvojezičkih leksikona; Onda, log-linearni model koji kombinira nekoliko plitkih karakteristika poput pronalaženja sličnosti i hibridnog jezičkog model a karakteristika za predviđanje konačnih rezultata. U ovom papiru koristimo Uyghur kao jezik primanja i pokušavamo otkriti pozajmice na četiri jezika donatora: Arapski, kineski, persijski i ruski. Vodimo dve grupe eksperimenata kako bi procijenili učinkovitost našeg predloženog pristupa: identifikacija kredita i prevod OOV-a u četiri jezičke pare i osam smjernica prevoda (Uyghur-arapski, arapski-Uyghur, Uyghur-kineski, kineski-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persi, Persi-Uyghur, Uyghur-ruski i ruski-Uyghur). Eksperimentalni rezultati identifikacije kreditnih režima pokazuju da naša metoda značajno iznosi druge početne modele. Modeli neurološkog prevoda uređaja koji integriraju rezultate identifikacije kreditnih eksperimenata postignu najbolji rezultat prevoda OOV(s poboljšanjem BLEU-a 0.5-0.9)', 'az': 'Düşük ressurs qurğularının zənginləndirmək üçün, monodil korporasında borc sözlərini tanıyan yeni bir yol təklif etdik. Daha çox xüsusiyyətli ki, ilk dəlillərlə birləşdirilmək üçün semantik olaraq əlaqə edilən kandidātları yaratmaq üçün ilk dəlillərlə birləşdirilmiş kəlmələri və küçük iki dilli leksikon kimi istifadə edirik. Sonra, sonuncu sonuçlarını öyrənmək üçün çox çətin fərqli fərqli modelləri birləşdirir. Bu kağızda Uyghuru alış dili kimi istifadə edir və dörd donor dilində borc yazmağa çalışırıq: ərəbcə, Çincə, Pers və Rus dilində. Biz təklif etdiyimiz tərzimizin etkinliğini değerləşdirmək üçün iki dəstə təcrübə etdik: kredi tanımlaması və OOV çevirimi dörd dil çift və sekiz çeviri yolu ilə (Uyghur-ərəb, ərəb-Uyghur, Uyghur-Çinli, Çinli-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persi, Persi-Uyghur, Uyghur-Rus və Rus-Uyghur). Yardım sözlərini təsdiqləyən təcrübə sonuçları, metodumuzun başqa səviyyə modellərini çox böyük göstərir. OOV tercüməsinin ən yaxşı sonuçlarını ödəyir(0.5-0.9 BLEU təmizlənənləri ilə)', 'ca': "Per enriquecer el vocabulari de baixos nivells de recursos, vam proposar un mètode nou per identificar els préstecs en corpora monolingüa. Més específicament, primer fem servir l'incorporació de paraules translingües com a característica central per generar candidats relacionats semànticament basats en corpora comparable i un petit lexicó bilingüe; llavors, un model log-linear que combina diverses característiques superficials com la similitud de pronunciació i les característiques del model de llenguatge híbrid per predir els resultats finals. En aquest article, utilitzem Uyghur com a llenguatge de recepció i intentem detectar les barres de préstec en quatre llengües donadores: àrab, xinès, persa i rus. Fem dos grups d'experiments per avaluar l'eficacia del nostre enfocament proposat: identificació del lloc de préstec i traducció OOV en quatre parells de llengües i vuit direccions de traducció (Uyghur-Arabic, Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Chinese-Uyghur, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian i Russian-Uyghur). Els resultats experimentals d'identificació del préstec demostren que el nostre mètode supera significativament altres models de base. Models neuromàquines de traducció que integran els resultats d'experiments d'identificació del lloc de préstec aconsegueixen els millors resultats en la traducció OOV(amb millors de 0,5 a 0,9 BLEU)", 'et': 'Väheste ressursside seadete sõnavara rikastamiseks pakkusime välja uue meetodi, mis identifitseerib laenusõnu ühekeelsetes korpustes. Täpsemalt kasutame esmakordselt keeleüleseid sõnade põhifunktsioone semantiliselt seotud kandidaatide genereerimiseks võrreldavate korpuste ja väikese kakskeelse leksikoni põhjal; Seejärel kasutatakse logilineaarset mudelit, mis ühendab lõpptulemuste prognoosimiseks mitmeid madalaid omadusi nagu häälduse sarnasus ja hübriidkeelemudeli omadused. Käesolevas dokumendis kasutame vastuvõtukeelena uiguuri keelt ja püüame tuvastada laenusõnu neljas doonorkeeles: araabia, hiina, pärsia ja vene keeles. Meie kavandatud lähenemisviisi efektiivsuse hindamiseks teostame kaks eksperimendirühma: laenuõna identifitseerimine ja OOV tõlge neljas keelepaaris ja kaheksas tõlkesuunas (uõguur-araabia, araabia-uõguur, uõguur-hiina, hiina-uõguur, uõguur-pärsia, pärsia-uõguur, uõguur-vene ja vene-uõguur). Eksperimentaalsed tulemused laenude identifitseerimisel näitavad, et meie meetod on oluliselt suurem kui teised baasmudelid. Neuraalsed masintõlke mudelid, mis integreerivad laenusõna identifitseerimise katsete tulemusi, saavutavad parimad tulemused OOV tõlkimisel (0,5-0,9 BLEU parandustega)', 'hy': "Մենք առաջարկեցինք նոր մեթոդ, որպեսզի հարստացնենք ցածր ռեսուրսների սահմանափակումները, որպեսզի բացահայտենք վարկերի արժեքները միալեզու կոպորա մեջ: More specifically, we first use cross-lingual word embeddings as the core feature to generate semantically related candidates based on comparable corpora and a small bilingual lexicon;  ապա մի լոգ-գծային մոդել, որը համադրում է մի քանի մակերեսային հատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են արտահայտության նմանությունը և հիբրիդ լեզվի մոդելի հատկությունները վերջնական արդյունքների կանխատեսելու համար: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք օգտագործում ենք Ոյգուրը որպես ընդունակ լեզու և փորձում ենք բացահայտել վարկեր չորս դոնոր լեզուներով՝ արաբերեն, չինարեն, պարսիացի և ռուսերեն: Մենք կատարում ենք երկու փորձարկումների խումբ, որպեսզի գնահատենք մեր առաջարկված մոտեցումների արդյունավետությունը' վարկերի հայտնաբերումը և OOO թարգմանումը չորս լեզվով զույգերով և ութ թարգմանման ուղղությամբ (Օգուր-արաբեր, արաբեր-Ոգուր, Օգուր-չինական, Չինաստանի-Ոգուր, Օգուր-պարսիացի, Պ Փորձարկման արդյունքները վարկերի հայտնաբերման վերաբերյալ ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մեթոդը շատ ավելի լավ է քան հիմնական մոդելները: Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման մոդելները, որոնք ինտեգրում են վարկերի հայտնաբերման փորձարկումների արդյունքները, հասնում են OOO թարգմանման լավագույն արդյունքներին (0.5-0.9 բլեուզի բարելավման դեպքում)", 'cs': 'Pro obohacení slovní zásoby nízkých zdrojů jsme navrhli novou metodu identifikace půjčovacích slov v jednojzyčných korpusech. Konkrétněji, nejprve používáme cross-jazyčné vložení slov jako základní funkci pro generování sémanticky souvisejících kandidátů založených na srovnatelných korpusech a malém dvojjazyčném lexikonu; pak log-lineární model, který kombinuje několik mělkých vlastností, jako je podobnost výslovnosti a hybridní jazykový model pro předpověď konečných výsledků. V tomto článku používáme ujgurštinu jako jazyk přijetí a snažíme se detekovat půjčky ve čtyřech dárcovských jazycích: arabštině, čínštině, perštině a ruštině. Provádíme dvě skupiny experimentů pro hodnocení efektivity našeho navrhovaného přístupu: identifikaci půjčených slov a OOV překladu ve čtyřech jazykových párech a osmi směrech překladu (ujgursko-arabština, arabština-ujgurská, ujgursko-čínština, čínsko-ujgurská, ujgursko-perská, perská-ujgurská, ujgursko-ruská a rusko-ujgurská). Experimentální výsledky identifikace půjčených slov ukazují, že naše metoda výrazně předčí ostatní základní modely. Neurální strojové modely překladu integrující výsledky identifikačních experimentů půjčeného slova dosahují nejlepších výsledků na OOV translaci (s vylepšením 0.5-0.9 BLEU)', 'fi': 'Pienten resurssien sanaston rikastamiseksi ehdotimme uutta menetelmää, joka tunnistaa lainasanoja monikielisissä korpusissa. Tarkemmin sanottuna käytämme aluksi monikielisiä sanaupotuksia keskeisenä ominaisuutena semanttisesti samankaltaisten ehdokkaiden luomisessa vertailukelpoisten korpusten ja pienen kaksikielisen sanaston pohjalta. Tämän jälkeen logilineaarinen malli, jossa yhdistyvät useita pinnallisia piirteitä, kuten ääntämisen samankaltaisuus ja hybridikielen malli, jotta lopputulokset voidaan ennustaa. Tässä artikkelissa käytämme uiguuria vastaanottokeelenä ja yritämme havaita lainasanoja neljällä lahjoittajakielellä: arabia, kiina, persia ja venäjä. Toteutamme kaksi kokeiluryhmää arvioidaksemme ehdotetun lähestymistapamme tehokkuutta: lainasanatunnistus ja OOV-käännös neljällä kieliparilla ja kahdeksalla käännössuunnalla (uiguuri-arabia, arabia-uiguuri, uiguuri-kiina, kiina-uiguuri, uiguuri-persia, persia-uiguuri, uiguuri-venäjä ja venäjä-uiguuri). Kokeelliset tulokset lainalainan tunnistamisesta osoittavat, että menetelmämme suoriutuu merkittävästi muista perusmalleista. Loanword-tunnistuskokeiden tuloksia yhdistävät neurokonekäännösmallit saavuttavat parhaat tulokset OOV-käännöksessä (0,5-0,9 BLEU-parannuksilla)', 'he': 'כדי לעשיר את המילים של סדרות משאבים נמוכות, הצענו שיטה חדשה שיזהה שוויות הלוואה בקופורה monolingual. במיוחד יותר, אנו משתמשים קודם במילים דרך שפתיים בתור התוכנית הליבית לייצר מועמדים קשורים סמנטית מבוססים על גופרה שווה ולקסיקון שתיים-שפתי קטן; אז, מודל לוג-לינרי שמשולב מספר תכונות שטחים כמו דומות ביטוי ומתכונות של מודל שפה היברידית כדי לחזות את התוצאות הסופיות. בעיתון הזה, אנו משתמשים באויגור כשפת הקבלה וניסינו לגלות שומרי הלוואה בארבעה שפות תורמים: ערבית, סינית, פרסית ורוסית. אנו מבצעים שתי קבוצות ניסויים כדי להעריך את היעילות של הגישה המוצעת שלנו: זיהוי לואנוורד ותרגום OOV בארבעה זוגות שפות ושמונה כיוונים התרגום (אויגור-ערבי, ערבי-אויגור, אויגור-סיני, סיני-אויגור, אויגור-פרסי, פרסי-אויגור, אויגור-רוסי, ורוסי-אויגור). תוצאות ניסויים על זיהוי לוואנוורד מראות שהשיטה שלנו מעליפה מודלים בסיסיים אחרים באופן משמעותי. דוגמני תרגום מכונות נוירות שמשלמים תוצאות ניסויים זיהוי לואנוורד משיגים את התוצאות הטובות ביותר על תרגום OOV (עם 0.5-0.9 שיפורים BLEU)', 'ha': "To, dõmin ya wadãtar da maganar masu tsari na wuri, sai mu buƙata wani hanyoyi na yanzu wanda ke iya gane maganar a cikin makampuni matalauci. Kayya da ƙayyade, za mu yi amfani da maganar cikin lugha ta farko kamar na ɗabi'a ga ya ƙãga mutane masu danganta na semantically a kan daidaita koropa da wani littafan sauri biyu; then, a log-linear model which combines several shallow features such as pronunciation similarity and hybrid language model features to predict the final results.  Daga wannan takardan, Munã yi amfani da Uighur kamar harshen aka karɓi kuma munã jarraba ka gane wasu kalmar na'ura huɗu: Carabi, Kitoyi, Persian da Ruushi. Tuna aiki ƙungiyoyi biyu dõmin a evaluate the Effekt of hanyarmu wanda aka yi niyyar da shi: bonnword ID and OOV translation in harshen biyu na huɗu (Uighur-Arabic, Arabic-Uighur, Uighur-China, China-Uighur, Uighur-Persian, Persian-Uighur, Uighur-Ruush, kuma Ruush-Uighur). Matarin jarrabo a kan shaidar magana ya nuna cewa metodenmu yana samar da wasu misãlai na basalin. @ info: whatsthis", 'sk': 'Za obogatitev besedišča z nizkimi viri smo predlagali novo metodo, ki identificira posojilne besede v enojezičnih korpusih. Natančneje, najprej uporabljamo večjezične besedne vdelave kot osrednjo funkcijo za ustvarjanje semantično sorodnih kandidatov na podlagi primerljivih korpusov in majhnega dvojezičnega leksikona; Nato je log-linearni model, ki združuje več plitvih značilnosti, kot sta podobnost izgovorjave in značilnosti hibridnega jezikovnega modela za napoved končnih rezultatov. V tem članku uporabljamo ujgur kot jezik prejemanja in poskušamo odkrivati posojila v štirih jezikih donatorjev: arabščini, kitajščini, perzijščini in ruščini. Izvajamo dve skupini eksperimentov za oceno učinkovitosti našega predlaganega pristopa: identifikacija posojil in prevajanje OOV v štirih jezikovnih parih in osmih smereh prevajanja (ujgur-arabščina, arabščina-ujgur, ujgur-kitajščina, ujgur-perzijščina, ujgur-ruščina in ruska-ujgur). Eksperimentalni rezultati identifikacije posojil kažejo, da naša metoda znatno presega druge osnovne modele. Modeli nevralnega strojnega prevajanja, ki vključujejo rezultate poskusov identifikacije posojil, dosegajo najboljše rezultate pri prevajanju OOV (z izboljšavami 0,5-0,9 BLEU)', 'jv': 'Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk kelas pernik-pernik sing wis ana, awak dh챕w챕 ngerasakno ngono pernik kuwi nggawe tarjamahan kanggo nggolok tarjamahan kanggo kebebasan pangan Juara-Juara, kita gambar perusahaan kelangan langgar-nggambar embedding nggambar kelangan winih dh챕w챕 manut karo sematik nggawe barang sematik tambah karo perusahaan karo didasakno lan didasal kelangan langgar-langgar politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Nang pepul iki, k챕n챕 gambar UYhur nganggo lenggal kuwi nggawe sapa pangan lan ujian neng langa donor sing apik: Tenggu, Cine, Perancis lan Russe. Awak dh챕w챕 챕ntuk karo kelompok sing beraksi kanggo nggawe geraksi kanggo nyengk챕 kanggo nyengk챕 nggambar cara nggawe geraksi kanggo nyengk챕 tarjamahan karo pitik urip lan limo itlanjut. Menu item to Open \'Search for Open Files\' dialog model penting', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག་ལས་ཉུང་བའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ་བཤ More specifically, we first use cross-lingual word embeddings as the core feature to generate semantically related candidates based on comparable corpora and a small bilingual lexicon; and དེ་ནས་དྲན་དུ་རིམ་པ་ལྟ་བུའི་མ་དབྱིབས་འདིས་མཐའ་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་དང་མཐུན་རྐྱེན་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ལྡོག ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྗེས་ཐོག་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་གི་ཡུ་གུ་རིའི་སྐད་རིགས་བཞིན་ནང་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་རིགས་སྟོན་རྒྱུ་བྱས་ནི། ཨ་ར ང་ཚོས་དབང་ཆ་གཅིག་གི་སྔོན་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་གནད་དོན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གོ་སྐབས་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་མིན་འདུག( Uyghur-Arabic, Arabic-Uyghur, Uyghur-Chinese, Uyghur-Persian, Persian-Uyghur, Uyghur-Russian, Russian-Uyghur ). ང་ཚོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་གཟུགས་རིས་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་འཚོལ་བ་ནི་འགྱུར་བ་ཡིན་པའི་རྨན་གཞི་མིག Neural machine translation models integrating results of loanword identification experiments achieve the best results of OOV translation(with 0.5-0.9 BLEU improvements)'}
{'en': 'Adaptive Weighting for Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'الترجيح التكيفي لترجمة الآلة العصبية', 'pt': 'Ponderação adaptável para tradução automática neural', 'fr': 'Pondération adaptative pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'es': 'Ponderación adaptativa para la traducción automática neuronal', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳のための適応加重', 'zh': '神经机器翻译自适加权', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के लिए अनुकूली भार', 'ru': 'Адаптивное взвешивание для нейронного машинного перевода', 'ga': "Ualú Oiriúnaitheach d'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach", 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Adaptív súlyozás idegi gépi fordításhoz', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή στάθμισης για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'it': 'Pesatura adattiva per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'mk': 'Адаптивна тежина за превод на неврална машина', 'kk': 'Невралдық машинаны аудару үшін адаптификация', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള അഡാപ്റ്റിവ് വൈറ്റിങ്ങ്', 'ms': 'Pembilangan Adaptif untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'mt': 'Piż Adattattiv għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali', 'lt': 'Adaptive Weighting for Neural Machine Translation', 'no': 'Adaptiv vekt for neuralmaskinsomsetjing', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл машины орчуулалтын адаптер хэмжээг', 'pl': 'Adaptywne ważenie dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'sr': 'Adaptivno težino za neuronski prevod mašine', 'ro': 'Ponderare adaptivă pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'so': 'Adaptive Weighting for Neural machine Translation', 'si': 'න්\u200dයූරාල් මෙසින් පරිවර්තනය සඳහා සැකසුම් බලය', 'sv': 'Adaptiv viktning för neural maskinöversättning', 'ta': 'Adaptive Weighting for Neural Machine Translation', 'ur': 'نیورال ماشین ترجمہ کے لئے اڈپٹیٹ ویٹینگ', 'vi': 'Đặt giọng chuẩn cho máy thần kinh', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'bg': 'Адаптивно претегляне за неврален машинен превод', 'nl': 'Adaptief wegen voor neuronale machinevertaling', 'hr': 'Adaptivna težina za neuronski prevod stroja', 'da': 'Adaptiv vægtning til neural maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Adaptive Gewichtung für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Pembilangan Adaptif untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'ko': '신경 기계 번역 중의 자동 적응 가중치', 'fa': 'وزن مناسب برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'tr': 'Neural Mazmunlar terjime üçin elläb', 'sw': 'Utafiti wa Tafsiri wa Mashine ya Njerumani', 'sq': 'Adaptive Weighting for Neural Machine Translation', 'af': 'Aanpasseer Wegting vir Nural Masjien Vertaling', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য অ্যাডপেটিভ ওয়াইটিং', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Adaptive Weighting for Neural Machine Translation', 'az': 'Nöral mašin tərcüməsinə uyğunlaşdırma', 'bs': 'Adaptivna težina za neuronski prevod mašine', 'cs': 'Adaptivní vážení pro neurální strojový překlad', 'ca': 'Pes adaptatiu per a la traducció de màquines neurals', 'et': 'Kohanduv kaalumine neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'fi': 'Adaptiivinen painotus neurokääntämiseen', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'משקל מתאים לתרגום מכונת נוירולית', 'sk': 'Prilagodljiva utež za strojno prevajanje nevronov', 'bo': 'ནུས་མེད་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་སྤྲོད་འགྲོ་བ་ལ་བཟོ་བཅོས་པ'}
{'en': 'In the popular sequence to sequence (seq2seq) neural machine translation (NMT), there exist many weighted sum models (WSMs), each of which takes a set of input and generates one output. However, the weights in a WSM are independent of each other and fixed for all inputs, suggesting that by ignoring different needs of inputs, the WSM lacks effective control on the influence of each input. In this paper, we propose adaptive weighting for WSMs to control the contribution of each input. Specifically, we apply adaptive weighting for both GRU and the output state in NMT. Experimentation on Chinese-to-English translation and English-to-German translation demonstrates that the proposed adaptive weighting is able to much improve translation accuracy by achieving significant improvement of 1.49 and 0.92 BLEU points for the two translation tasks. Moreover, we discuss in-depth on what type of information is encoded in the encoder and how information influences the generation of target words in the decoder.', 'ar': 'في التسلسل الشائع للترجمة الآلية العصبية المتسلسلة (seq2seq) (NMT) ، توجد العديد من نماذج المجموع الموزون (WSMs) ، كل منها يأخذ مجموعة من المدخلات ويولد ناتجًا واحدًا. ومع ذلك ، فإن الأوزان في WSM مستقلة عن بعضها البعض وثابتة لجميع المدخلات ، مما يشير إلى أنه من خلال تجاهل الاحتياجات المختلفة للمدخلات ، تفتقر WSM إلى التحكم الفعال في تأثير كل مدخل. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح ترجيحًا تكيفيًا لـ WSM للتحكم في مساهمة كل مدخل. على وجه التحديد ، نطبق ترجيحًا تكيفيًا لكل من GRU وحالة الإخراج في NMT. توضح التجارب على الترجمة من الصينية إلى الإنجليزية والترجمة من الإنجليزية إلى الألمانية أن الترجيح التكيفي المقترح قادر على تحسين دقة الترجمة كثيرًا من خلال تحقيق تحسن كبير يبلغ 1.49 و 0.92 نقطة BLEU لمهمتي الترجمة. علاوة على ذلك ، نناقش بالتفصيل نوع المعلومات المشفرة في المشفر وكيف تؤثر المعلومات على توليد الكلمات المستهدفة في وحدة فك التشفير.', 'pt': 'Na popular tradução de máquina neural (NMT) de sequência para sequência (seq2seq), existem muitos modelos de soma ponderada (WSMs), cada um dos quais recebe um conjunto de entrada e gera uma saída. No entanto, os pesos em um WSM são independentes uns dos outros e fixos para todos os insumos, sugerindo que, ao ignorar as diferentes necessidades de insumos, o WSM não tem controle efetivo sobre a influência de cada entrada. Neste artigo, propomos ponderação adaptativa para WSMs para controlar a contribuição de cada entrada. Especificamente, aplicamos ponderação adaptativa tanto para GRU quanto para o estado de saída em NMT. A experimentação na tradução de chinês para inglês e tradução de inglês para alemão demonstra que a ponderação adaptativa proposta é capaz de melhorar muito a precisão da tradução, alcançando uma melhoria significativa de 1,49 e 0,92 pontos BLEU para as duas tarefas de tradução. Além disso, discutimos em profundidade que tipo de informação é codificada no codificador e como a informação influencia a geração de palavras-alvo no decodificador.', 'fr': "Dans la populaire traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) de séquence à séquence (seq2seq), il existe de nombreux modèles de somme pondérée (WSM), chacun prenant un ensemble d'entrées et générant une sortie. Cependant, les pondérations dans un MSF sont indépendantes les unes des autres et fixes pour toutes les entrées, ce qui suggère qu'en ignorant les différents besoins d'entrées, le MSF ne contrôle pas efficacement l'influence de chaque entrée. Dans cet article, nous proposons une pondération adaptative pour les MSF afin de contrôler la contribution de chaque entrée. Plus précisément, nous appliquons une pondération adaptative à la fois au GRU et à l'état de sortie dans NMT. L'expérimentation de la traduction du chinois vers l'anglais et de la traduction de l'anglais vers l'allemand montre que la pondération adaptative proposée est capable d'améliorer considérablement la précision de la traduction en obtenant une amélioration significative de 1,49 et 0,92 point BLEU pour les deux tâches de traduction. De plus, nous discutons en profondeur du type d'informations codées dans l'encodeur et de la manière dont les informations influencent la génération de mots cibles dans le décodeur.", 'es': 'En la popular traducción automática neuronal (NMT) de secuencia a secuencia (seq2seq), existen muchos modelos de suma ponderada (WSM), cada uno de los cuales toma un conjunto de entradas y genera una salida. Sin embargo, las ponderaciones en un WSM son independientes entre sí y fijas para todas las entradas, lo que sugiere que al ignorar las diferentes necesidades de entradas, el WSM carece de control efectivo sobre la influencia de cada entrada. En este artículo, proponemos una ponderación adaptativa para los WSM para controlar la contribución de cada entrada. Específicamente, aplicamos ponderación adaptativa tanto para GRU como para el estado de salida en NMT. La experimentación con la traducción del chino al inglés y la traducción del inglés al alemán demuestra que la ponderación adaptativa propuesta puede mejorar mucho la precisión de la traducción al lograr una mejora significativa de 1,49 y 0,92 puntos BLEU para las dos tareas de traducción. Además, discutimos en profundidad qué tipo de información se codifica en el codificador y cómo la información influye en la generación de palabras objetivo en el decodificador.', 'ja': 'シーケンス（ seq 2 seq ）ニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）への一般的なシーケンスでは、多くの加重和モデル（ WSM ）が存在し、それぞれが入力のセットを取り、１つの出力を生成する。 しかしながら、ＷＳＭ内の重みは互いに独立しており、すべての入力に対して固定されており、入力の異なるニーズを無視することによって、ＷＳＭが各入力の影響に対する効果的な制御を欠いていることを示唆する。 本稿では、各入力の寄与を制御するためのWSMの適応加重を提案する。 具体的には、NMTにおけるGRUと出力状態の両方に適応加重を適用します。 中国語から英語への翻訳と英語からドイツ語への翻訳の実験は、2つの翻訳タスクで1.49と0.92のBLEUポイントの大幅な改善を達成することによって、提案された適応的重み付けが翻訳精度を大幅に向上させることができることを示しています。 さらに、どのような種類の情報がエンコーダに符号化され、情報がデコーダ内のターゲット単語の生成にどのように影響するかについて詳細に議論します。', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम (seq2seq) तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (NMT) के लिए लोकप्रिय अनुक्रम में, कई भारित योग मॉडल (WSMs) मौजूद हैं, जिनमें से प्रत्येक इनपुट का एक सेट लेता है और एक आउटपुट उत्पन्न करता है। हालांकि, एक WSM में वजन एक दूसरे से स्वतंत्र हैं और सभी इनपुट के लिए तय किए गए हैं, यह सुझाव देते हुए कि इनपुट की विभिन्न आवश्यकताओं को अनदेखा करके, WSM में प्रत्येक इनपुट के प्रभाव पर प्रभावी नियंत्रण का अभाव है। इस पेपर में, हम प्रत्येक इनपुट के योगदान को नियंत्रित करने के लिए डब्ल्यूएसएम के लिए अनुकूली भार का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। विशेष रूप से, हम एनएमटी में जीआरयू और आउटपुट राज्य दोनों के लिए अनुकूली भार लागू करते हैं। चीनी-से-अंग्रेजी अनुवाद और अंग्रेजी-से-जर्मन अनुवाद पर प्रयोग यह दर्शाता है कि प्रस्तावित अनुकूली भार दो अनुवाद कार्यों के लिए 1.49 और 0.92 BLEU अंकों के महत्वपूर्ण सुधार को प्राप्त करके अनुवाद सटीकता में सुधार करने में सक्षम है। इसके अलावा, हम इस बात पर गहराई से चर्चा करते हैं कि एन्कोडर में किस प्रकार की जानकारी एन्कोडर में एन्कोडेड है और कैसे जानकारी डिकोडर में लक्ष्य शब्दों की पीढ़ी को प्रभावित करती है।', 'ru': 'В популярной последовательности к последовательности (seq2seq) нейронного машинного перевода (NMT) существует множество моделей взвешенных сумм (WSM), каждая из которых принимает набор входных данных и генерирует один выход. Однако веса в WSM не зависят друг от друга и фиксируются для всех входов, что позволяет предположить, что, игнорируя различные потребности во входе, WSM не имеет эффективного контроля над влиянием каждого входа. В этой работе мы предлагаем адаптивное взвешивание для WSMs для того чтобы контролировать вклад каждого входного сигнала. В частности, мы применяем адаптивное взвешивание как для GRU, так и для состояния выхода в NMT. Эксперименты с китайско-английским переводом и английско-немецким переводом показывают, что предлагаемое адаптивное взвешивание способно значительно повысить точность перевода, достигнув значительного улучшения в 1,49 и 0,92 балла BLEU для двух задач перевода. Кроме того, мы подробно обсуждаем, какой тип информации кодируется в кодере и как информация влияет на генерацию целевых слов в декодере.', 'zh': '流行之序(seq2seq)神经机器翻译(NMT),多有加权(WSM),皆受而成输。 然WSM中权重彼此独立,而于诸输皆定,盖忽于所输之不同,WSM阙于每输之效也。 本文中,WSM自适加权,以制贡献。 此GRU、NMT之所宜自适加权。 汉译英和英德译实验明,所陈自适加权能大大提高译精度,使两译分明1.49分0.92 BLEU。 深论编码器中编码息及解码器中单词生。', 'ga': 'Sa seicheamh móréilimh chun aistriúchán meaisín néarúil (seq2seq) a sheicheamhú (NMT), tá go leor samhlacha suime ualaithe (WSManna), a thógann gach ceann acu sraith ionchuir agus gineann aschur amháin. Mar sin féin, tá na meáchain i WSM neamhspleách ar a chéile agus seasta le haghaidh gach ionchuir, rud a thugann le tuiscint, trí neamhaird a dhéanamh ar riachtanais éagsúla ionchuir, nach bhfuil smacht éifeachtach ag an WSM ar thionchar gach ionchuir. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid ualú oiriúnaitheach do WSManna chun rannchuidiú gach ionchuir a rialú. Go sonrach, cuirimid ualú oiriúnaitheach i bhfeidhm don GRU agus don stát aschuir in NMT. Léiríonn turgnamh ar aistriúchán Sínis-go-Béarla agus aistriúchán Béarla-go-Gearmáinis go bhfuil an t-ualú oiriúnaitheach atá beartaithe in ann cruinneas an aistriúcháin a fheabhsú go mór trí fheabhas suntasach de 1.49 agus 0.92 pointe BLEU a bhaint amach don dá thasc aistriúcháin. Ina theannta sin, déanaimid mionphlé ar an gcineál faisnéise atá ionchódaithe san ionchódóir agus ar an gcaoi a mbíonn tionchar ag faisnéis ar ghiniúint na spriocfhocail sa díchódóir.', 'hu': 'A népszerű sorozat-sorozat (seq2seq) neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) számos súlyozott összegű modell létezik, amelyek mindegyike bemeneti halmazt vesz és egy kimenetet generál. A WSM súlyai azonban függetlenek egymástól és minden bemenetre rögzítettek, ami arra utal, hogy a különböző bemeneti igények figyelmen kívül hagyásával a WSM nem rendelkezik hatékony ellenőrzéssel az egyes bemenetek befolyására. Ebben a tanulmányban adaptív súlyozást javasolunk a WSM-ek számára az egyes input hozzájárulásának ellenőrzése érdekében. Konkrétan adaptív súlyozást alkalmazunk mind a GRU, mind a kimeneti állapot NMT-ben. A kínai-angol fordítással és az angol-német fordítással kapcsolatos kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt adaptív súlyozás jelentősen javíthatja a fordítási pontosságot azáltal, hogy a két fordítási feladat tekintetében 1,49 és 0,92 BLEU pont jelentős javulást ér el. Ezenkívül részletesen megvitatjuk, hogy milyen típusú információkat kódolnak a kódolóban, és hogyan befolyásolják az információ a dekódolóban a célszavak generálását.', 'el': 'Στη δημοφιλή ακολουθία σε ακολουθία (seq2seq) νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT), υπάρχουν πολλά σταθμισμένα μοντέλα αθροισμού (WSMs), καθένα από τα οποία λαμβάνει ένα σύνολο εισόδων και παράγει μια έξοδο. Ωστόσο, τα βάρη σε ένα WSM είναι ανεξάρτητα μεταξύ τους και σταθερά για όλες τις εισροές, γεγονός που υποδηλώνει ότι αγνοώντας διαφορετικές ανάγκες εισροών, ο WSM στερείται αποτελεσματικού ελέγχου στην επιρροή κάθε εισροής. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε προσαρμοστική στάθμιση για τα WSM για τον έλεγχο της συνεισφοράς κάθε εισροών. Συγκεκριμένα, εφαρμόζουμε προσαρμοστική στάθμιση τόσο για την GRU όσο και για την κατάσταση παραγωγής σε NMT. Ο πειραματισμός στη μετάφραση κινέζικων-αγγλικών και αγγλικών-γερμανικών καταδεικνύει ότι η προτεινόμενη προσαρμοστική στάθμιση είναι σε θέση να βελτιώσει σημαντικά την ακρίβεια της μετάφρασης επιτυγχάνοντας σημαντική βελτίωση των σημείων 1.49 και 0.92 για τις δύο μεταφραστικές εργασίες. Επιπλέον, συζητάμε σε βάθος για το είδος των πληροφοριών που κωδικοποιούνται στον κωδικοποιητή και πώς οι πληροφορίες επηρεάζουν την παραγωγή λέξεων-στόχων στον αποκωδικοποιητή.', 'ka': 'პოლიპური სექციენტის შემდეგ (seq2seq) ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) არსებობს ბევრი მნიშვნელოვანი სემის მოდელები (WSMs), რომელიც ყოველ იქნება ერთი გაგრძელება და შექმნა მაგრამ, WSM-ის სიმაღლეები ერთმანეთისგან უცნობიერია და ყველა მონაცემებისთვის დარწმუნდება, რომელსაც ყველა მონაცემებისთვის განსხვავებული მონაცემების განსხვავებით, WSM-ს არ აქვ ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ მინდომებით აეპტიგური განმავლობა WSMs-ს, რომ ყველა მონაცემების დამავლობას კონტროლისთვის. განსაკუთრებულია, ჩვენ აეპტიფიური სიმაღლე დაყენებთ GRU და NMT-ში გამოყენება. ჩინეთიდან ანგლისურად და ანგლისურად გერმანეთიდან გადაწყვეტილების ექსპერიმენტია აპექტიგურად შეუძლია უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო დამატებით, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ ძალიან დუნე ინფორმაციის ტიპის ინფორმაციის კოდირებით და როგორ ინფორმაცია გამოიყენება მისაწყისი სიტყვების განვითარებაში.', 'it': "Nella popolare sequenza-sequenza (seq2Seq) della traduzione automatica neurale (NMT), esistono molti modelli a somma ponderata (WSM), ognuno dei quali prende un insieme di input e genera un output. Tuttavia, i pesi in un WSM sono indipendenti l'uno dall'altro e fissi per tutti gli input, suggerendo che ignorando le diverse esigenze di input, il WSM manca di un controllo efficace sull'influenza di ciascun input. In questo articolo, proponiamo una ponderazione adattiva per i WSM per controllare il contributo di ogni input. In particolare, applichiamo la ponderazione adattiva sia per GRU che per lo stato di uscita in NMT. Gli esperimenti sulla traduzione cinese-inglese e sulla traduzione dall'inglese-tedesco dimostrano che la ponderazione adattiva proposta è in grado di migliorare notevolmente l'accuratezza della traduzione ottenendo un significativo miglioramento di 1,49 e 0,92 punti BLEU per i due compiti di traduzione. Inoltre, discutiamo in profondità su quale tipo di informazione è codificata nell'encoder e come le informazioni influenzano la generazione di parole target nel decoder.", 'lt': 'Populiarinėje sekoje po sekos (seq2seq) nervinių mašinų vertimo (NMT) egzistuoja daug svertinių sum ų modelių (WSM), iš kurių kiekvienas gauna įvestą rinkinį ir sukuria vieną išėjimą. Tačiau WSM svoriai yra nepriklausomi vienas nuo kito ir nustatomi visiems įvedimams, o tai rodo, kad, ignoruojant skirtingus įvedimų poreikius, WSM neturi veiksmingos kiekvieno įvedimo įtakos kontrolės. Šiame dokumente siūlome pritaikyti VSM koeficientą, kad būtų galima kontroliuoti kiekvieno įnašo indėlį. Konkrečiai taikome pritaikomąjį koeficientą tiek GRU, tiek išėjimo būklei NMT. Eksperimentai, susiję su vertimu anglų kalba iš kinų į anglų ir vertimu anglų į vokiečių kalbą, rodo, kad siūlomas adaptacinis koeficientas gali gerokai pagerinti vertimo tikslumą, gerokai pagerindamas 1,49 ir 0,92 BLEU taškų dviem vertimo užduotims. Be to, išsamiai aptariame, kokios rūšies informacija koduojama koduotoje ir kaip informacija daro įtaką tikslinių žodžių kūrimui koduotoje.', 'kk': 'Көпшілікті реттеу (seq2seq) невралдық компьютерді аудару (NMT) ретінде көптеген жиілік моделдері (WSMs) бар, олардың әрбірі келтірілген және бір шығыс құрылады. Бірақ WSM бағандағы тең бір-бірінен тәуелсіз және барлық енгізу үшін тәуелсіз. Барлық енгізу қажеттігін елемей алу үшін WSM әрбір енгізуінің әрбіріне эффективні контроллері жоқ. Бұл қағазда, WSMs үшін әрбір енгізудің қатынасын басқару үшін адаптациялық өлшемін ұсынамыз. Ескерілі, GRU мен NMT шығыс күйінде адаптикалық өлшемі қолданылады. Қытай-ағылшын аудармалардың және ағылшын-неміс аудармалардың тәжірибесі қолданылған адаптациялық өлшемінің 1,49 және 0,92 BLEU нүктелерін жақсартып, аудармалардың дұрыстығын көп жақсартуға болады деп көрсете Сонымен қатар, біз кодердегі мәліметтердің қандай түрін кодтамыз және мәліметі декодтамыздың мақсатты сөздердің құрылуына қалай нәтижесін ұсынып тұрмыз.', 'mk': 'Во популарната секвенца на секвенцијата (seq2seq) на невралниот машински превод (NMT), постојат многу модели на тежани суми (WSMs), од кои секој зема сет влози и генерира еден излез. Сепак, теговите во ВСМ се независни еден од друг и фиксирани за сите внесувања, што сугерира дека со игнорирање на различните потреби на внесувања, ВСМ нема ефикасна контрола врз влијанието на секој внес. In this paper, we propose adaptive weighting for WSMs to control the contribution of each input.  Специфично, аплицираме адаптивно тежирање за GRU и излезната состојба во NMT. Експериментацијата за превод од кинески на англиски и превод од англиски на германски покажува дека предложеното адаптивно тежирање е во можност да ја подобри преводната точност со постигнување значително подобрување на 1,49 и 0,92 БЛЕУ поени за двете преводни задачи. Покрај тоа, ние во длабока разговараме за какви информации се кодирани во кодерот и како информациите влијаат на генерацијата на метни зборови во декодерот.', 'ms': 'Dalam jujukan populer ke jujukan (seq2seq) terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT), terdapat banyak model jumlah berat (WSM), masing-masing mengambil set input dan menghasilkan satu output. Namun, berat dalam WSM adalah independen satu sama lain dan tetap untuk semua input, menyarankan bahawa dengan mengabaikan keperluan yang berbeza input, WSM kekurangan kawalan yang efektif pada pengaruh setiap input. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan penimbangan adaptif untuk WSM untuk mengawal kontribusi setiap input. Secara khusus, kita gunakan penimbangan adaptif untuk kedua-dua GRU dan keadaan output dalam NMT. Pengalaman dalam terjemahan bahasa Cina ke Inggeris dan terjemahan bahasa Inggeris ke Jerman menunjukkan bahawa pembagian adaptif yang diusulkan mampu meningkatkan ketepatan terjemahan dengan mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan 1.49 dan 0.92 titik BLEU untuk kedua-dua tugas terjemahan. Selain itu, kita bincang dalam-dalam tentang jenis maklumat apa yang dikekodkan dalam pengekod dan bagaimana maklumat mempengaruhi generasi kata sasaran dalam pengekod.', 'ml': 'പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട സെക്കന്റ് (seq2seq) ന്യൂറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ പരിഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d (NMT) നിലവിലുണ്ടു്, ഒരുപാട് ഭാരം തൂക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200d (WSMs), ഓരോരുത്തരും ഒരു  എന്നാലും WSM-ലെ തൂക്കങ്ങള്\u200d പരസ്പരം സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യതയിലാണ്. എല്ലാ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടുകള്\u200dക്കും വ്യത്യസ്ത ആവശ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപേക്ഷിക്കുന്നത്, എല്ലാ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടുകള്\u200dക്കും പ In this paper, we propose adaptive weighting for WSMs to control the contribution of each input.  പ്രത്യേകിച്ച്, നമ്മള്\u200d ജിആര്\u200dയുവിനും പുറപ്പെടുത്തിയ സ്ഥാനത്തിനും പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ചൈനീസില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകളില്\u200d പരീക്ഷിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണം പ്രദര്\u200dശിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട തൂക അതുകൊണ്ട്, നമ്മള്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d സംസാരിക്കുന്നു, എന്ത് തരം വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കോഡെരില്\u200d എടുക്കുന്നുവെന്നും വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഡെകോഡെറിലെ ലക്', 'mt': 'Fis-sekwenza popolari għas-sekwenza (seq2seq) tat-traduzzjoni tal-magna newrali (NMT), jeżistu ħafna mudelli ta’ somma peżata (WSMs), li kull wieħed minnhom jieħu sett ta’ input u jiġġenera output wieħed. Madankollu, il-piżijiet f’WSM huma indipendenti minn xulxin u ffissati għall-inputs kollha, li jissuġġerixxu li billi jinjoraw il-ħtiġijiet differenti tal-inputs, id-WSM m’għandux kontroll effettiv fuq l-influwenza ta’ kull input. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu piż adattat għall-WSMs biex jikkontrollaw il-kontribuzzjoni ta’ kull input. B’mod speċifiku, aħna napplikaw piż adattat kemm għall-GRU kif ukoll għall-istat ta’ ħruġ fl-NMT. L-esperimentazzjoni dwar it-traduzzjoni Ċiniża-Ingliża u t-traduzzjoni Ingliża-Ġermaniża turi li l-ippeżar adattiv propost huwa kapaċi jtejjeb ħafna l-preċiżjoni tat-traduzzjoni billi jinkiseb titjib sinifikanti ta’ 1.49 u 0.92 punti BLEU għaż-żewġ kompiti ta’ traduzzjoni. Barra minn hekk, niddiskutu fil-fond dwar liema tip ta’ informazzjoni hija kkodifikata fil-kodifikatur u kif l-informazzjoni tinfluwenza l-ġenerazzjoni ta’ kliem fil-mira fid-dekoder.', 'mn': 'Олон хүн төрөлхтний дарааллаар (seq2seq) мэдрэлийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) дээр маш олон жингийн нийлбэр загвар (WSMs) байдаг. Энэ бүгдээрээ нэг хэмжээний орлуулалт авч, нэг гаралт гаргадаг. Гэвч WSM-ын жин нь бүх орноос хамааралтай, бүх орноос тогтмол байдаг. Энэ нь өөр орноос хэрэгтэй зүйлсийг тодорхойлохын тулд WSM нь орноос бүрт үр дүнтэй контрол байхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид WSMs-д өгөгдлийн оролцоог удирдах зорилгоор адаптийн хэмжээг санал болгож байна. Ялангуяа бид GRU болон NMT дахь гаргалтын төвшинд адаптийн жингийг хэрэглэдэг. Хятад болон Англи хэл болон Англи хэл болон Герман хэл дамжуулах туршилтын туршилт нь хоёр дамжуулах ажлын тулд 1.49 болон 0.92 BLEU цэгүүдийг сайжруулахад илүү сайжруулж чадна. Мөн бид коддоор ямар төрлийн мэдээлэл шинэчлэгдсэн талаар гүн гүнзгий ярилцдаг бөгөөд мэдээлэл хэрхэн зорилготой үгнүүдийн үр дүнд нөлөөлдөг талаар ярилцдаг.', 'no': 'I den populære rekkjefølgja til sekvensen (seq2seq) neuralmaskinsomsetjinga (NMT) finst mange vekte summmodeller (WSMs), kvar av dei tar eit sett inndata og lagar ei utdata. Men vektene i ein WSM er uavhengig av kvarandre og fastsett for alle inndata, som tyder på at ved å ignorera ulike nødvendingar for inndata, manglar WSM effektiv kontroll på påvirkninga av kvart inndata. I denne papiret foreslår vi tilpassande vekt for WSMs for å kontrollere bidragen til kvar inndata. Spesielt bruker vi tilpassande vekt for både GRU og utdata i NMT. Eksperiment om omsetjing av kinesisk til engelsk og engelsk-til-tysk viser at den foreslåde tilpassande vekten kan forbedra omsetjingskøyhet mykje ved å gjere signifikante forbedring av 1,49 og 0,92 BLEU-punkt for dei to omsetjingskårene. I tillegg diskuterer vi i dybde om kva type informasjon er koda i koderen og korleis informasjon påvirkar genereringa av målord i dekoderen.', 'pl': 'W popularnej sekwencji do sekwencji (seq2seq) neuronowej maszynowej translacji (NMT) istnieje wiele modeli sumy ważonej (WSM), z których każdy bierze zestaw wejść i generuje jedno wyjście. Jednak wagi w WSM są niezależne od siebie i ustalone dla wszystkich wejść, co sugeruje, że ignorując różne potrzeby wejść, WSM brakuje skutecznej kontroli nad wpływem każdego wejścia. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy adaptacyjne ważenie dla WSM w celu kontroli wkładu każdego wkładu. W szczególności stosujemy wagę adaptacyjną zarówno dla GRU, jak i stanu wyjściowego w NMT. Eksperymenty na temat tłumaczenia chińsko-angielskiego i angielsko-niemieckiego pokazują, że proponowana waga adaptacyjna jest w stanie znacznie poprawić dokładność tłumaczenia poprzez osiągnięcie znaczącej poprawy punktów 1.49 i 0.92 BLEU dla dwóch zadań tłumaczeniowych. Ponadto omawiamy dogłębnie, jaki rodzaj informacji jest zakodowany w koderze i jak informacja wpływa na generowanie słów docelowych w dekoderze.', 'ro': 'În secvența populară la secvență (seq2seq) traducere automată neurală (NMT), există multe modele cu sumă ponderată (WSM), fiecare dintre ele ia un set de intrare și generează o ieșire. Cu toate acestea, greutățile dintr-un MCA sunt independente una de cealaltă și fixe pentru toate intrările, sugerând că, prin ignorarea diferitelor nevoi de intrări, MCA nu are un control eficient asupra influenței fiecărei intrări. În această lucrare, propunem ponderea adaptivă pentru MDC pentru a controla contribuția fiecărei intrări. Mai exact, aplicăm ponderea adaptivă atât pentru GRU, cât și pentru starea de ieșire în NMT. Experimentele privind traducerea din chineză în engleză și traducerea din engleză în germană demonstrează că ponderea adaptivă propusă poate îmbunătăți mult acuratețea traducerii, obținând îmbunătățiri semnificative de 1,49 și 0,92 puncte BLEU pentru cele două sarcini de traducere. Mai mult decât atât, discutăm în profunzime ce tip de informație este codificată în encoder și modul în care informația influențează generarea de cuvinte țintă în decoder.', 'sr': 'U popularnoj sekvenciji do sekvencije (seq2seq) prevoda neuralne mašine (NMT), postoji mnogo težih modela sume (WSMs), svaka od njih uzima setu unosa i stvara jedan izlaz. Međutim, težine WSM-a su nezavisne jedni od drugih i postavljene za sve ulaze, sugerirajući da ignorišući različite potrebe ulaganja WSM nedostaje efikasna kontrola na utjecaj svakog ulaganja. U ovom papiru predlažemo adaptivnu težinu za WSMs-e da kontroliše doprinos svakog ulaza. Posebno, primjenjujemo adaptivnu težinu za GRU i stanje izlaza u NMT-u. Eksperimentacija o prevodu kineskog i engleskog i njemačkog prevoda pokazuje da je predloženo adaptivno težino može mnogo poboljšati preciznost prevoda postizanjem značajnog poboljšanja 1,49 i 0,92 bodova BLEU za dva prevodnog zadatka. Osim toga, razgovaramo o dubini o tome kakvoj je vrsti informacija kodirana u koderu i kako informacija utiče na generaciju ciljnih reči u dekoderu.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරජාතික පරීක්ෂණය (seq2seq) න්\u200dයූරල් මැෂින් පරීක්ෂණය (NMT), අතර ගොඩක් විශේෂ සම්පූර්ණයක් තියෙනවා (WSMs), හැමෝම ඇතුළුම් ස නමුත්, WSM වලින් වේජ් එක්කෙනෙක් නිදහස් වෙනවා සහ සේරම ඇතුළුම් වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනුවෙන් සිද්ධ වෙනවා, වෙනස් අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය අව මේ පත්තරේ අපි WSMs ගැන සැකසුම් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා හැම ප්\u200dරවේශයක්ම පාලනය කරන්න. විශේෂයෙන්, අපි GRU සහ NMT වලින් ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප චීනි වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය වල පරීක්ෂණය සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසිය වල ජර්මන් වලට පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙනවා කියලා ප්\u200dරශ තවත්, අපි ගොඩක් ගොඩක් කතා කරනවා මොන වර්ගයක් තොරතුරු සංකේතකයේ සංකේතය කරලා තියෙන්නේ කියලා, ඒ වගේම තොරතුරු කොහො', 'so': "Inta lagu qoro qoraalka neurada (seq2seq), waxaa jira tusaalooyin badan oo miisaamay (WSMs), mid kastaaba wuxuu qaadaa koox input, wuxuuna soo saaraa midho qudha. Si kastaba ha ahaatee miisaanka WSM midkoodba midka kale iskama xoreeyo, waxyaabaha oo dhan waxaa looga hagaajiyaa in marka uu ka tago baahida waxyaabaha kala duduwan, WSM ayaa u baahan maamula maamul saameyn faa'iido leh oo saameyn ku yeelan waxyaabaha mid kasta. Warqadan waxan ka soo jeedaynaa miisaanka adag ee WSMs si aan u maamulno bixinta input kasta. Si gaar ah, waxaynu u codsanaynaa miisaanka adag ee GRU iyo habka soo baxaba NMT. Baaritaanka tarjumaadda Chinese-to-Ingiriis iyo tarjumaadda Ingiriis-to-German waxay muujiyaan in miisaanka la soo jeeday ay uu aad u beddeli karo saxda turjumaadda si fiican loogu hagaajiyo 1.49 iyo 0.92 BLEU goobaha labada shaqaalaha turjumaadda. Sidoo kale waxaynu deegaan ka sheekeynaynaa macluumaadka ku qoran kooxda iyo siduu macluumaadku saameyn ugu yeelan karo qarniga hadalka waxqabadka.", 'sv': 'I den populära sekvens till sekvens (seq2seq) neural machine translation (NMT) finns det många viktade summemodeller (WSM), som var och en tar en uppsättning indata och genererar en utgång. Vikterna i en WSM är dock oberoende av varandra och fasta för alla insatsvaror, vilket tyder på att WSM, genom att ignorera olika behov av insatsvaror, saknar effektiv kontroll över påverkan från varje insatsvara. I detta dokument föreslår vi anpassningsbar viktning för WSM för att kontrollera bidraget från varje input. Specifikt tillämpar vi adaptiv viktning för både GRU och utgångsläget i NMT. Experiment med kinesisk-engelsk översättning och engelsk-tysk översättning visar att den föreslagna adaptiva viktningen avsevärt kan förbättra översättningens noggrannhet genom att uppnå betydande förbättringar på 1,49 och 0,92 BLEU-poäng för de två översättningsuppgifterna. Dessutom diskuterar vi ingående vilken typ av information som kodas i kodaren och hur information påverkar skapandet av målord i dekoden.', 'ta': 'தொடர்ந்து வரும் பொது தொடர்ச்சில் (seq2seq) புதிய இயந்திர மொழிமாற்றி (NMT) மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் பல எடை தொகுப்பு மாதிரிகள் இருக்கின்றன, ஒவ்வொருவரும் ஒரு உள However, WSM யில் உள்ள எடைகள் ஒருவருக்கொருவர் சொந்தமாக இருக்கும் மற்றும் அனைத்து உள்ளீடுகளுக்கும் சரியாக அமைக்கப்பட்டது, வெவ்வேறு உள்ளீடுகளின் விளைவுகளை  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் WSMs க்கு ஒப்பீட்டுப் பொருத்தமான அளவை நிர்ணயிக்கிறோம் ஒவ்வொரு உள்ளீடு குறிப்பிட்டு, நாம் GRU மற்றும் NMT வெளியீட்டு நிலைக்கும் பொருத்தமான அளவை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். Name மேலும், நாம் குறியீட்டில் எந்த வகையான தகவல் குறியிடப்பட்டுள்ளது என்பதை ஆழமாக விவாதம் செய்கிறோம் மற்றும் தகவல் குறியீட்ட', 'ur': 'جماعت کی سطح (seq2seq) نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کے لئے بہت سی وزن جمع موڈل (WSMs) موجود ہیں، ان میں سے ہر ایک کو ایک سٹ اینپیٹ لیتا ہے اور ایک اینپیٹ پیدا کرتا ہے. However, the weights in a WSM are independent of each other and fixed for all input, suggesting that by ignoring different needs of input, the WSM lacks effective control on each input. اس کاغذ میں ہم WSMs کے لئے اپنا وزن اضافہ کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ہر ورودی کے ذریعے کنٹرول کریں. خاص طور پر، ہم GRU اور NMT میں ناوٹ موقعیت کے لئے اڈپٹیٹ وزن کے لئے کاروبار کرتے ہیں. چین سے انگلیسی ترجمہ اور انگلیسی سے جرمانی ترجمہ کے بارے میں تجربہ کرنا دکھاتا ہے کہ پیشنهاد کی اڈپٹیٹ وزن بہت سی ترجمہ دقیقیقیت کو زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ زیادہ سمجھ سکتا ہے 1.49 اور 0.92 BLEU دو ترجمہ کے کاموں کے لئے بہت اضافہ کرنے کے لئے۔ اور ہم اس کے بارے میں گہرے اندھیرے سے بحث کرتے ہیں کہ کیسی طرح معلومات کوڈر میں کوڈ کیا جاتا ہے اور کیسی معلومات ڈکوڈر میں موجود لغات کی نسل پر اثر دیتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Ketma- ketlik uchun kattalashtirish (seq2seq) neural tarjima (NMT) davomida ko'p qiymati modeli (WSMs) mavjud. Bu yerda bir tartibi kiritish va bir natijani yaratish. Ammo, WSM'ning balandlari birлари bir-бирларига моддий бўлган ва hamma narsalar uchun qo'llangan. Ularning har xil keraklarini saqlash uchun, WSM har bir kiritining effekti haqida qo'llanmaydi. Bu qogʻozda biz WSMs uchun yetarli qiymatni boshqarishni talab qilamiz. Ko'rsatilgan, biz GRU va chiqarish holatida davom etishni qoʻllamiz. Name Kodlash usulida qanday maʼlumot yordamida kodlash turini va maʼlumot kodlash uchun foydalanuvchi soʻzlarni qanday ishlatishga tayyorlaydi haqida murojaat qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Trong dãy số được phổ biến thành chuỗi (seq2seq) dịch phiên bản máy thần kinh (NMB) tồn tại nhiều mô hình tổng cân bằng (WSMs), mỗi bộ đều lấy một bộ nhập và tạo ra một xuất. Tuy nhiên, lượng tạ phải ở dạng WSM độc lập với nhau và được đặt cho tất cả các nội dung, cho thấy rằng, lờ đi nhu cầu nội dung khác nhau, WSM thiếu kiểm soát hiệu quả về ảnh hưởng của mỗi lần nhập. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị cân bằng thích nghi cho WSM để kiểm soát sự đóng góp của mỗi đầu tư. Cụ thể, chúng tôi áp dụng cân bằng thích ứng cho cả GRU và tổng phát trong NMB. Thí nghiệm dịch từ Trung Quốc sang Anh và dịch từ Anh sang Đức chứng minh rằng tỉ số cân bằng thích nghi đã được đề nghị có khả năng tăng độ chính xác dịch nhiều hơn bằng cách đạt được sự cải tiến đáng kể của một.42 và 0.Tại 2. Hơn nữa, chúng ta thảo luận sâu về loại thông tin được mã hóa hóa hóa thông tin và cách thông tin ảnh hưởng đến việc sản xuất từ đích trong bộ giải mã.', 'bg': 'В популярната последователност към последователност (seq2seq) неврален машинен превод (NMT), съществуват много модели с претеглена сума (WSMs), всеки от които взема набор от входове и генерира един изход. Въпреки това, тежестите в един WSM са независими един от друг и фиксирани за всички входове, което предполага, че като игнорира различните нужди от входове, WSM липсва ефективен контрол върху влиянието на всеки вход. В тази статия предлагаме адаптивно претегляне за ДЗМ, за да се контролира приносът на всеки входящ материал. По-конкретно, ние прилагаме адаптивно претегляне както за GRU, така и за изходното състояние в NMT. Експериментите по китайско-английски превод и английски-немски превод показват, че предложеното адаптивно претегляне е в състояние значително да подобри точността на превода чрез постигане на значително подобрение от 1,49 и 0,92 точки за двете преводни задачи. Освен това обсъждаме задълбочено какъв тип информация е кодирана в кодера и как информацията влияе върху генерирането на целеви думи в декодера.', 'nl': "In de populaire seq2seq (seq2seq) neural machine translation (NMT) bestaan er veel gewogen summodellen (WSM's), die elk een set input nemen en één output genereren. Echter, de gewichten in een WSM zijn onafhankelijk van elkaar en vast voor alle inputs, wat suggereert dat door het negeren van verschillende behoeften van inputs, de WSM ontbreekt effectieve controle over de invloed van elke input. In dit document stellen we adaptieve weging voor WSM's voor om de bijdrage van elke input te controleren. Specifiek passen we adaptieve weging toe voor zowel GRU als de outputtoestand in NMT. Experimenten met Chinees-naar-Engels vertaling en Engels-naar-Duits vertaling tonen aan dat de voorgestelde adaptieve weging de vertaalnauwkeurigheid aanzienlijk kan verbeteren door een aanzienlijke verbetering van 1.49 en 0.92 BLEU punten voor de twee vertaaltaken te bereiken. Daarnaast bespreken we diepgaand wat voor soort informatie in de encoder is gecodeerd en hoe informatie invloed heeft op het genereren van doelwoorden in de decoder.", 'hr': 'U popularnoj sekvenciji za sekvenciju (seq2seq) prevod neuralnih strojeva (NMT) postoji mnogi težinski modeli sume (WSMs), svaki od kojih uzima skup unosa i proizvodi jedan izlaz. Međutim, težine WSM-a su nezavisne jedni od drugih i postavljene za sve ulaze, sugerirajući da ignoriranjem različitih potreba ulaganja WSM nedostaje učinkovita kontrola na utjecaj svakog ulaganja. U ovom papiru predlažemo prilagodljivu težinu za WSMs-e kako bi kontrolirali doprinos svakog ulaza. Posebno, primjenjujemo adaptivnu težinu za GRU i stanje izlaza u NMT-u. Eksperimentacija o prevodu kineskog i engleskog i njemačkog prevoda pokazuje da je predloženo prilagođavajuće težine moguće mnogo poboljšati preciznost prevoda postizanjem značajnog poboljšanja od 1,49 i 0,92 bodova BLEU-a za dva prevodnog zadatka. Osim toga, razgovaramo duboko o tome kakvom je vrstu informacija kodirana u koderu i kako informacija utječe na generaciju ciljnih riječi u dekoderu.', 'da': "I den populære sekvens til sekvens (seq2seq) neural maskinoversættelse (NMT), findes der mange vægtede summemodeller (WSM), som hver især tager et sæt input og genererer et output. Vægtene i en WSM er imidlertid uafhængige af hinanden og fastsat for alle input, hvilket tyder på, at WSM ved at ignorere forskellige behov for input mangler effektiv kontrol med indflydelsen af hver enkelt input. I dette dokument foreslår vi en adaptiv vægtning for WSM'er for at kontrollere bidraget fra hvert input. Specielt anvender vi adaptiv vægtning for både GRU og output tilstand i NMT. Eksperimenter med kinesisk-engelsk oversættelse og engelsk-tysk oversættelse viser, at den foreslåede adaptive vægtning i høj grad kan forbedre oversættelsesnøjagtigheden ved at opnå en betydelig forbedring på 1,49 og 0,92 BLEU-point for de to oversættelsesopgaver. Desuden diskuterer vi grundigt, hvilken type information der er indkodet i koderen, og hvordan information påvirker genereringen af målord i dekoden.", 'de': 'In der populären Sequenz-to-Sequenz (seq2seq) neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung (NMT) gibt es viele gewichtete Summenmodelle (WSMs), von denen jedes einen Satz von Eingaben nimmt und einen Ausgang generiert. Allerdings sind die Gewichtungen in einem WSM unabhängig voneinander und für alle Eingänge festgelegt, was darauf hindeutet, dass der WSM durch das Ignorieren unterschiedlicher Bedürfnisse von Eingängen keine effektive Kontrolle über den Einfluss der einzelnen Eingänge hat. In diesem Papier schlagen wir eine adaptive Gewichtung für WSMs vor, um den Beitrag jedes Inputs zu kontrollieren. Konkret wenden wir adaptive Gewichtung sowohl für GRU als auch für den Ausgangszustand in NMT an. Experimente mit Chinesisch-Englisch-Übersetzung und Englisch-Deutsch-Übersetzung zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagene adaptive Gewichtung die Übersetzungsgenauigkeit erheblich verbessern kann, indem die BLEU-Punkte 1.49 und 0.92 für die beiden Übersetzungsaufgaben signifikant verbessert werden. Darüber hinaus diskutieren wir ausführlich, welche Art von Information im Encoder codiert ist und wie Informationen die Generierung von Zielwörtern im Decoder beeinflussen.', 'id': 'In the popular sequence to sequence (seq2seq) neural machine translation (NMT), there exist many weighted sum models (WSMs), each of which takes a set of input and generates one output.  Namun, berat badan dalam WSM independen satu sama lain dan tetap untuk semua masukan, menyarankan bahwa dengan mengabaikan kebutuhan berbeda masukan, WSM kekurangan kontrol efektif pada pengaruh setiap masukan. In this paper, we propose adaptive weighting for WSMs to control the contribution of each input.  Secara spesifik, kita menerapkan berat adaptif untuk GRU dan keadaan keluaran di NMT. Eksperimen pada terjemahan bahasa Cina ke Inggris dan terjemahan bahasa Inggris ke Jerman menunjukkan bahwa berat adaptif yang diusulkan mampu meningkatkan akurasi terjemahan dengan mencapai peningkatan signifikan dari 1,49 dan 0,92 poin BLEU untuk dua tugas terjemahan. Selain itu, kita mendiskusikan dalam-dalam tentang jenis informasi apa yang dikodeksi dalam pengekode dan bagaimana informasi mempengaruhi generasi kata-kata sasaran dalam pengekode.', 'fa': 'در ترجمه\u200cهای مشهور برای ترجمه (seq2seq) ماشین عصبی (NMT) بسیاری از مدل\u200cهای جمع وزن (WSMs) وجود دارد، هر کدام از آن یک مجموعه ورودی می\u200cگیرد و یک خروج را تولید می\u200cکند. ولی وزن\u200cهای یک WSM مستقل از یکدیگر هستند و برای هر ورودی ثابت می\u200cشوند، پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که با نادیده از نیازهای مختلف ورودها، WSM کنترل موثری روی تاثیر هر ورودی ندارد. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم وزن مناسب برای WSMs تا کنترل شرکت هر ورودی کنترل کند. به طور خاص، ما وزن مناسب برای GRU و وضعیت خروجی در NMT کاربرد می کنیم. تجربه درباره ترجمه\u200cهای چینی و انگلیسی و ترجمه\u200cهای انگلیسی و آلمانی نشان می\u200cدهد که وزن\u200cهای پیشنهاد اضافه\u200cای می\u200cتواند دقیق ترجمه\u200cها را بسیار بهتر کند با رسیدن بهترین توسعهٔ ۱.۴۹ و ۰.۲۲ نقطه\u200cهای بلوپ برای دو تابع علاوه بر این، ما در عمیق در مورد نوع اطلاعات کودکان کد شده و چگونه اطلاعات به نسل کلمات هدف در dekoder تأثیر می دهد.', 'ko': '유행하는 서열부터 서열(seq2seq)신경기계번역(NMT)에는 많은 가중치와 모델(WSM)이 존재하며, 모델마다 하나의 입력을 받아들여 출력을 생성한다.그러나 WSM의 권중은 서로 독립되고 모든 입력에 대해 고정적이다. 이것은 입력의 서로 다른 수요를 소홀히 하기 때문에 WSM은 모든 입력에 대한 효과적인 제어가 부족하다는 것을 나타낸다.본고에서 우리는 WSMs의 자체 적응 가중치를 제시하여 모든 입력의 공헌을 제어했다.구체적으로 NMT에서 GRU 및 출력 상태에 대한 사용자 적응 가중치를 적용합니다.한영 번역과 영독 번역에서의 실험에 따르면 제시된 자적응권은 번역 정밀도를 현저히 높일 수 있으며 두 가지 번역 임무의 BLEU 점수는 각각 1.49와 0.92 높아졌다.그 밖에 우리는 인코더에서 인코딩된 정보 유형과 정보가 인코더에서 목표어의 생성에 어떻게 영향을 미치는지 깊이 있게 토론했다.', 'sw': 'Katika mfululizo maarufu wa kutangaza utafsiri wa mashine ya neura (NMT), kuna mifano mengi yenye uzito (WSMs), ambapo kila mmoja anachukua seti ya input na kutengeneza matokeo moja. However, the weights in a WSM are independent of each other and fixed for all inputs, suggesting that by ignoring different needs of inputs, the WSM lacks effective control on the influence of each input.  Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza uzito mzuri wa WSMs kusimamia mchango wa kila input. Kwa hakika, tunatumia uzito mzuri wa GRU na hali ya matokeo nchini NMT. Tafiti kuhusu tafsiri ya Kichina-kwa-Kiingereza na tafsiri ya Kiingereza-hadi-Ujerumani inaonyesha kwamba uzito unaopendekezwa unaweza kuboresha ukweli wa tafsiri kwa kutekeleza maendeleo makubwa ya vituo vya 1.49 na 0.92 BLEU kwa kazi hizi mbili za tafsiri. Zaidi ya hayo, tunajadili kina kina kuhusu aina ya taarifa iliyokuwa imewekwa kwenye idadi hiyo na jinsi taarifa zinavyoathiri kizazi cha maneno yanayolenga katika kodi hiyo.', 'af': "In die populêre volgorde na volgorde (seq2seq) neurale masjien vertaling (NMT), bestaan daar baie gewigte sum modele (WSMs), elkeen van wat neem 'n stel van invoer en genereer een uitvoer. Maar die gewigte in 'n WSM is afhanklik van mekaar en vasgestel vir alle inputs, voorstel dat deur verskillende behoefte van inputs te ignoreer, die WSM het effektief kontrole ontbreek op die influens van elke invoer. In hierdie papier, ons voorstel aanpasbare weegting vir WSMs om die bydraag van elke invoer te beheer. Spesifieke, ons aanwend aanpaslike gewig vir GRU en die uitset-staat in NMT. Eksperimentasie oor Sjinese-na-Engelse vertaling en Engelse-na-Duitse vertaling bevestig dat die voorgestelde aanpasbare weegting kan baie verbeter vertaling waarheid deur betekende verbetering van 1.49 en 0.92 BLEU-punte te bereik vir die twee vertaling-taak. Ook, ons bespreek in diepte oor watter tipe inligting in die enkoder kodeerd is en hoe inligting influens die generasie van doelwoorde in die dekoder.", 'tr': "Popular terjime (seq2seq) näyral maşynyň terjimesinde (NMT), birnäçe kiçi azalan toplam nusgalar (WSMs), her biri giriş takmynyny alan we bir çizgi döreýär. Ýagna görä, WSM'iň a ğırlyklary birbirine seretsiz we her giriş üçin bejerilip sabitlenýar, girişiň beýleki gerekliklerini ýok etmek üçin WSM her girişiniň täsirinde etkinlik kontroli ýok. Bu kagyzda, biz WSM üçin esasy girişiniň täsirini kontrol etmek üçin adatça taýýarlanmagy teklip edýäris. Adatça, GRU we NMT-de çykyş durumynda adatýarlyk taýýarlamagy uygulaýarys. Çinçe-we Iňlisçe terjime edilen we iňlisçe-we-nemesçe terjime edilen örän gyssagly taýýarlamak 1.49 we 0.92 BLEU iki terjime edilen işiň üçin esasy gowurarak gowurap biljekdigini görkez. Mundan hem, biz gowurak şeklinde kodçda nähili maglumatyň kodeýändigini we informasiýa kodçda maksadyň sözleriniň döwletlerine nähili täsirleýändigini gürrüň edýäris.", 'sq': 'Në sekuencën popullore të sekuencës (seq2seq) të përkthimit të makinës nervore (NMT), ekzistojnë shumë modele të shumës së peshuar (WSMs), secila prej të cilave merr një sërë input dhe gjeneron një output. However, the weights in a WSM are independent of each other and fixed for all inputs, suggesting that by ignoring different needs of inputs, the WSM lacks effective control on the influence of each input.  Në këtë letër, propozojmë peshojë adaptuese për WSM për të kontrolluar kontributin e çdo hyrje. Veçanërisht, ne aplikojmë peshojën adaptuese për GRU dhe për gjendjen e daljes në NMT. Eksperimentimi mbi përkthimin kinez-në-anglez dhe përkthimin anglez-në-gjerman tregon se peshimi i propozuar përshtatës është në gjendje të përmirësojë shumë saktësinë e përkthimit duke arritur përmirësim të konsiderueshëm prej 1.49 dhe 0.92 pikë BLEU për të dy detyrat e përkthimit. Përveç kësaj, diskutojmë në thellësi se çfarë lloj informacioni është koduar në koduesin dhe se si informacioni ndikon në gjeneratën e fjalëve objektive në koduesin.', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) հաջորդականության հայտնի հաջորդականության մեջ կան շատ կենտրոնացված գումարի մոդելներ, որոնցից յուրաքանչյուրը վերցնում է մի շարք մուտք և ստեղծում է մեկ մուտք: Այնուամենայնիվ, WESM-ի կշիռները միմյանց անկախ են և հաստատում են բոլոր ներմուծների համար, առաջարկում է, որ անտեսելով ներմուծների տարբեր կարիքները, WESM-ը չունի արդյունավետ վերահսկողություն յուրաքանչյուր ներմուծի ազդեցության վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք ադապտիվ կենտրոնացիչ կենտրոնացիչ համակարգերի համար, որպեսզի կառավարենք յուրաքանչյուր ներմուծի ներդրումը: Հատկապես, մենք կիրառում ենք ադապտիվ կշռումը GRU-ի և NMT-ի արտադրյալ վիճակի համար: Չինաստանի-անգլերեն թարգմանման և անգլերեն-գերմանացի թարգմանման փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված ադապտիվ կշիռը կարող է շատ բարելավել թարգմանման ճշգրտությունը, հասնելով 1.49 և 0.92 բլեուն կետի նշանակալի բարելավման երկու Ավելին, մենք խորապես քննարկում ենք, թե ինչ տեսակի ինֆորմացիա է կոդավորված կոդերի մեջ և թե ինչպես է ինֆորմացիան ազդում կոդերի նպատակային բառերի ստեղծման վրա:', 'az': "Seq2seq (NMT) nöral maşına çevirilməsi üçün məşhur seqlərdə çox a ğırlı toplam modelləri (WSMs) var, hər birinin bir qoşunu girdi və bir çıxış yaradır. Ancaq WSM'nin a ğırlığı bir-birindən bağımsız və bütün inputlər üçün təyin edilmişdir, buna görə də müxtəlif inputlərin ehtiyacını yox etməklə, WSM hər inputlərin təsirlərinin etkisində efektiv kontroli yoxdur. Bu kağızda, WSMs üçün adaptiv ağırlığı təklif edirik ki, hər girişin iştirağını kontrol etmək üçün. Biz GRU və NMT çıxış durumu üçün adaptiv ağırlığı uygulayırıq. Çin-İngilizə çevirilməsi və İngilizə-Almanca çevirilməsi təcrübə edilən adaptiv ağırlığın 1.49 və 0.92 BLEU məqsədilərin çox yaxşılaşdığını göstərir. Daha sonra, biz çətinliklə çəkiririk ki, kodadan hansı məlumat kodlandırılır və haqqında məlumat sözlərin nəslinə nəticə edir.", 'am': 'በpopular seq2seq (seq2seq) የደዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም (NMT) ብዙዎች ሚዛን ሞዴል (WSMs) አሉ፡፡ ነገር ግን በWSM ሚዛኖቹ እርስ በርሳቸው ነጻ ናቸው እና ለሁሉም ጥያቄዎች የተቆጠሩ ናቸው፤ የጥያቄ ጥያቄዎችን በመውሰድ የጥያቄ ጥያቄዎችን በመውሰድ የWSM ጥያቄ በሁሉም ላይ ጥሩ ሥልጣን አለበት፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለWSMs ሚዛን ለማቆጣጠር እናስባለን፡፡ Specifically, we apply adaptive weighting for both GRU and the output state in NMT.  በቻይና-ወደ እንግሊዘኛ ትርጓሜ እና እንግሊዘኛ-ወደ ጀርመን ትርጓሜ ላይ የተፈተናው ሚዛን ለሁለቱ ትርጓሜዎች ስርዓቶችን በማድረግ ትርጓሜውን ማድረግ ይችላል፡፡ ደግሞም፣ የሆዶ ኮድ ውስጥ ምን ዓይነት መረጃ የሆኑት እና መረጃዎች የሆኑት ቃላትን ትውልድ እንዴት እንደሚያጠቅሙ እናውራለን፡፡', 'ca': "En la seqüència popular de seq2seq, la traducció neuromàtica (NMT) existeix molts models de sum a ponderada (WSMs), cada un dels quals agafa un conjunt d'entrada i genera una sortida. Tanmateix, els pesos d'un WSM són independents dels altres i fixats per a totes les entrades, suggerent que ignorant les diferents necessitats d'entrades, el WSM no té control efectiu sobre l'influència de cada entrada. En aquest paper, proposem una ponderació adaptativa per als SMM per controlar la contribució de cada entrada. En concret, apliquem una ponderació adaptativa tant a la GRU com a l'estat de sortida a la NMT. L'experimentació sobre la traducció xinesa a anglès i la traducció anglesa a alemana demostra que el pes adaptatiu proposat pot millorar molt la precisió de la traducció aconseguint una millora significativa de 1,49 i 0,92 punts BLEU per les dues tasques de traducció. A més, discutem en profunditat quin tipus d'informació està codificat en el codificador i com la informació influeix en la generació de paraules alvos en el codificador.", 'cs': 'V populární sekvenci na sekvenci (seq2seq) neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) existuje mnoho modelů váženého součtu (WSM), z nichž každý bere sadu vstupu a generuje jeden výstup. Nicméně váhy ve WSM jsou na sobě nezávislé a pevné pro všechny vstupy, což naznačuje, že ignorováním různých potřeb vstupů WSM postrádá efektivní kontrolu vlivu jednotlivých vstupů. V tomto článku navrhujeme adaptivní vážení pro WSM pro kontrolu přínosu každého vstupu. Konkrétně aplikujeme adaptivní vážení jak pro GRU, tak pro výstupní stav v NMT. Experimenty s překladem z čínštiny do češtiny a z češtiny do němčiny ukazují, že navrhovaná adaptivní váha dokáže výrazně zlepšit přesnost překladu tím, že dosáhne významného zlepšení bodů 1.49 a 0.92 BLEU pro obě překladatelské úkoly. Dále podrobně diskutujeme o tom, jaký typ informací je kódován v snímači a jak informace ovlivňují generování cílových slov v dekodéru.', 'bs': 'U popularnoj sekvenciji do sekvencije (seq2seq) prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT), postoji mnogo težih modela sume (WSMs), svaka od njih uzima setu unosa i proizvodi jedan izlaz. Međutim, težine WSM-a su nezavisne jedni od drugih i postavljene za sve ulaze, sugerirajući da ignoriranjem različitih potreba ulaganja WSM nedostaje učinkovita kontrola na utjecaj svakog ulaganja. U ovom papiru predlažemo adaptivnu težinu za WSMs-e da kontroliše doprinos svakog ulaza. Posebno, primjenjujemo adaptivnu težinu za GRU i stanje izlaza u NMT-u. Eksperimentacija o prevodu kineskog i engleskog i njemačkog prevoda pokazuje da je predloženo adaptivno težino može mnogo poboljšati preciznost prevoda postizanjem značajnog poboljšanja od 1,49 i 0,92 BLEU bodova za dva prevodnog zadatka. Osim toga, razgovaramo duboko o tome kakvoj je vrsti informacija kodirana u koderu i kako informacija utiče na generaciju ciljnih riječi u dekoderu.', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) জনপ্রিয় সেকেন্ডে অনুবাদ (সেকেন্ড) অনুবাদের মধ্যে অনেক ওজন সাম মডেল (WSMs) রয়েছে, যার মধ্যে প্রত্যেকেই একটি সেট ইনপুট নি তবে উইএসএমের ওজন একে অপরকে স্বাধীন এবং সকল ইনপুটের জন্য নির্ধারিত এবং পরামর্শ দেয় যে ইনপুটের বিভিন্ন প্রয়োজন উপেক্ষা করে উইএসএমটি প্রত্যেক ইনপুটের প্ এই কাগজটিতে আমরা উইএসএমএসের জন্য প্রস্তাব করছি প্রত্যেক ইনপুটের অবদান নিয়ন্ত্রণের জন্য। বিশেষ করে, আমরা জিআরইউ এবং এনএমটির আউটপুট রাষ্ট্রের জন্য প্রয়োগ করি। চীনা-থেকে ইংরেজি অনুবাদ এবং ইংরেজী থেকে জার্মান অনুবাদের পরীক্ষা প্রদর্শন করেছে যে প্রস্তাবিত প্রস্তাবিত মানচিত্রের পরিমাণ অনুবাদের সঠিকভাবে বেশী উন্নত করতে পারে এই দ এছাড়াও, আমরা গভীরভাবে আলোচনা করি এনকোডারে কি ধরনের তথ্য এনকোড করা হয়েছে এবং তথ্য কিভাবে ডিকোডারের লক্ষ্য শব্দের প্রভাব ফেলে দে', 'et': 'Populaarses järjestuses järjestusesse (seq2seq) neuro masintõlkes (NMT) on olemas palju kaalutud summa mudeleid (WSMs), millest igaüks võtab sisendi komplekti ja genereerib ühe väljundi. Kuid WSM kaalud on üksteisest sõltumatud ja fikseeritud kõigi sisendite jaoks, mis viitab sellele, et erinevate sisendivajaduste eiramisel puudub WSM tõhus kontroll iga sisendi mõju üle. Käesolevas dokumendis pakume välja kohandatava kaalumise WSM-ile, et kontrollida iga sisendi panust. Täpsemalt rakendame adaptiivset kaalu nii GRU kui väljundseisundi NMT jaoks. Hiina-inglise tõlke ja inglise-saksa tõlke eksperimenteerimine näitab, et kavandatud adaptiivne kaalumine suudab oluliselt parandada tõlke täpsust, saavutades olulise paranemise 1,49 ja 0,92 BLEU punkti võrra kahe tõlketöö puhul. Lisaks arutame põhjalikult, millist tüüpi teavet kodeerijas kodeeritakse ja kuidas teave mõjutab sihtsõnade genereerimist dekoodris.', 'fi': 'Suositussa sekvenssin sekvenssiin (seq2seq) neurokonekäännöksessä (NMT) on olemassa monia painotettuja summia malleja (WSMs), joista jokainen ottaa joukon syötteitä ja tuottaa yhden tuotoksen. WSM:n painot ovat kuitenkin toisistaan riippumattomia ja kiinteitä kaikille syötteille, mikä viittaa siihen, että sivuuttamalla erilaiset syötteiden tarpeet WSM:llä ei ole tehokasta kontrollia kunkin syötteen vaikutusta. Tässä asiakirjassa ehdotamme mukautuvaa painotusta WSM: lle kunkin panoksen hallitsemiseksi. Erityisesti sovellamme adaptiivista painotusta sekä GRU:lle että lähtötilaan NMT:ssä. Kokeet kiina-englanti- ja englanti-saksa-käännöksistä osoittavat, että ehdotettu mukautuva painotus pystyy parantamaan käännöksen tarkkuutta huomattavasti saavuttamalla merkittäviä parannuksia 1,49 ja 0,92 BLEU pistettä molemmissa käännöstehtävissä. Lisäksi pohdimme perusteellisesti, millaista tietoa koodaajaan koodataan ja miten tieto vaikuttaa kohdesanojen syntymiseen dekooderissa.', 'jv': 'Genjer-Genjer populer Nombro, awak dhéwé nêmên WSM kuwi wis dipunangé karo kabèh lan basa sing gak inputs, supoyo supoyatan mênêmên kuwi cah éwangut inputs, awak dhéwé nêmên WSM kuwi ora bisa nguasai perusahaan langkung inputs. Nang pemilih iki, kita supoyo nggawe luwih dumadhi kanggo ngilangno WSM kanggo nguasai pawaran nganggep bantayan ning sabên input. CURRENTCURRENT Isopo sing berarti tarjamahan Jewanika-karo Inggris lan tarjamahan Inggris-karo aleman sing bisa nggambar na supoyo nggawe gerangkat nggawe barang nggawe tarjamahan sing bisa bantuan kanggo ngerasai kapan tanggal nggunakake sing berarti 1.49 lan 0.2B Label', 'sk': 'V popularnem zaporedju do zaporedja (seq2seq) nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) obstaja veliko modelov tehtanega vsota (WSMs), od katerih vsak vzame niz vhodov in ustvari en izhod. Vendar pa so uteži v WSM neodvisni drug od drugega in fiksni za vse vhode, kar kaže, da WSM z ignoriranjem različnih potreb po vhodih nima učinkovitega nadzora nad vplivom vsakega vhoda. V tem članku predlagamo prilagodljivo ponderiranje za WSM za nadzor prispevka vsakega vložka. Natančneje uporabljamo prilagodljivo utež tako za GRU kot za izhodno stanje v NMT. Eksperimentacija s prevajanjem kitajsko-angleščino in angleščino-nemščino kaže, da lahko predlagana prilagodljiva utež bistveno izboljša natančnost prevajanja z doseganjem znatnega izboljšanja 1,49 in 0,92 točke BLEU za obe prevajalski nalogi. Poleg tega poglobljeno razpravljamo o tem, kakšne vrste informacij so kodirane v kodirniku in kako informacije vplivajo na generiranje ciljnih besed v dekodirniku.', 'ha': "In the popular sequence to sequence (seq2seq) neural machine translation (NMT), there exist many weighted sum models (WSMs), each of which takes a set of input and generates one output.  Haƙĩƙa, masu nauyi cikin WSM masu kamfata da jũna kuma masu daidaita zuwa duk inputai, yana son cẽwa, idan ana manta da haja daban-dabam na shiga WSM, WSM bã ya da ikon mai amfani kan mai amfani ga fassaran kõwane inputi. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa musamman masu adadi wa WSM don ya kanna ƙarami ga kõwane inputi. A ƙayyade, Munã amfani da nauyi mai daidai wa GRU da halin fitarwa cikin NMT. Tajararin sarrafin China-to-Ingiriya da translation na Ingiriya-to-Jarman yana nuna cewa, ma'anar taƙaita masu adapti na iya ƙari fassarar tsari da kuma ya sami muhimmi wa aikin fassarar biyu. Furan haka, Munã jãyayya a cikin-depth game da wace nau'in information wanda aka kode cikin kodi kuma da jinsi information za'a yi amfani da zayen kalmõmin bango.", 'he': 'ברצף הפופולרי לרצף (seq2seq) התרגום של מכונות עצביות (NMT), קיימים המודלים רבים של סכום משקל (WSMs), שכל אחד מהם לוקח קבוצה של כניסה ויוצר יציאה אחת. בכל אופן, המשקלים של WSM הם עצמאים אחד מהשנים ומתקנים לכל הכניסות, מציעים כי על ידי התעלמות לצרכים שונים של הכניסות, WSM חסר שליטה יעילה על השפעה של כל הכניסה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים משקל מתאים עבור WSMs לשלוט בתרומה של כל input. במיוחד, אנחנו משתמשים במשקל מתאים לשני GRU ומצב יציאה ב NMT. ניסויים על תרגום סיני לאנגלית ותרגום אנגלי לגרמנית מראים שהמשקל המתאים המוצע מסוגל לשפר הרבה את מדויקת התרגום על ידי השיפור משמעותי של 1.49 ו-0.92 נקודות BLEU לשני משימות התרגום. חוץ מזה, אנחנו מדברים עמוק על איזה סוג של מידע מוצפן בקודר ואיך מידע משפיע על הדור של מילים מטרה בקודר.', 'bo': 'In the popular sequence to sequence (seq2seq) neural machine translation (NMT), there are many weighted sum models (WSMs), each of which takes a set of input and generates one output. However, the weights in a WSM are independent of each other and fixed for all inputs, suggesting that by ignoring different needs of inputs, the WSM lacks effective control on the influence of each input. ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་WSMs འི་ཉེན་མཁན་གྱི་ཚད་འཛིན་ཚད་ལ་འཛིན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དེ་རེད། Specifically, we apply adaptive weighting for both GRU and the output state in NMT. Experimentation on Chinese-to-English translation and English-to-German translation shows that the proposed adaptive weighting is able to much improve translation accuracy by achieving significant improvement of 1.49 and 0.92 BLEU points for the translation tasks two. འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རིགས་རྩལ་ནང་གི་གསལ་བཤད་པ་དེ་ག་དུ་ཟབ་པ་སྦྲེལ་བ་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Generic refinement of expressive grammar formalisms with an application to discontinuous constituent parsing', 'pt': 'Refinamento genérico de formalismos gramaticais expressivos com aplicação à análise de constituintes descontínuos', 'ar': 'تنقيح عام للصيغ النحوية التعبيرية مع تطبيق للتحليل المتقطع للمكونات', 'fr': "Raffinement générique des formalismes grammaticaux expressifs avec une application à l'analyse discontinue des constituants", 'es': 'Refinamiento genérico de los formalismos gramaticales expresivos con una aplicación al análisis discontinuo de constituyentes', 'ja': '不連続構成構文解析への応用を伴う表現文法形式論の一般的な洗練', 'zh': '言性语法形式主义之常细化,用于不续之分解析', 'hi': 'असंतत घटक पार्सिंग के लिए एक आवेदन के साथ अभिव्यंजक व्याकरण औपचारिकताओं का सामान्य शोधन', 'ru': 'Общее уточнение выразительных грамматических формализмов с применением прерывистого составляющего синтаксического анализа', 'ga': 'Coigeartú cineálach ar fhoirmiúlachtaí gramadaí léiritheacha le feidhm ar pharsáil neamhleanúnach na gcomhábhar', 'el': 'Γενική βελτίωση εκφραστικών γραμματικών φορμαλισμών με εφαρμογή σε ασυνεχή ανάλυση συστατικών', 'hu': 'Az expresszív nyelvtani formalizmusok általános finomítása szakaszos alkotóelemekre való alkalmazással', 'ka': 'ექსპრესიური გრამეტური ფორმალიზმის გენერიკური გადასრულება პროგრამეტური პროგრამეტური პროგრამეტური პროგრამეტური პროგრამეტური დასრულ', 'kk': 'Қолданбамен өрнекті грамматикалық офилизмдердің жалпы түзетуі', 'it': "Raffinamento generico dei formalismi grammaticali espressivi con applicazione all'analisi costituente discontinua", 'lt': 'Bendras išraiškų gramatinių formalumų tobulinimas taikant prašymą nutraukti sudedamųjų dalių analizę', 'mk': 'Генерално рафинирање на експресивните граматични формализми со апликација за прекинување на анализирањето на составниците', 'ms': 'Penyempurnaan generik formalisme grammar ekspresif dengan aplikasi untuk penghuraian konstitusi yang berhenti', 'mt': 'Rifinar ġeneriku ta’ formaliżmi grammatiċi espressivi b’applikazzjoni għall-analiżi kostitwenti kontinwa', 'ml': 'സംഘടിപ്പിന്റെ പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ് നിര്\u200dത്താന്\u200d ഒരു പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെ സാധാരണ ഗ്രാമാര്\u200d ഫോര്\u200dമാലിസിമുകളുടെ സാധാരണ', 'mn': 'Үүний грамматикийн официалистуудыг зогсоохын тулд зогсохгүй загварын хуваалцлыг ашиглаж', 'no': 'Generisk refinering av uttrykkelige grammatiske formalismar med eit program for stopping av tolking av konstituent', 'ro': 'Rafinarea generică a formalismelor gramaticale expresive cu aplicare la parsarea constitutivă discontinuu', 'sr': 'Generalna rafiniranja ekspresivnih gramatičkih formalizma sa aplikacijom za prekinuti razmatranje sastavnih sastavnika', 'pl': 'Ogólne udoskonalenie wyrazistych formalizmów gramatycznych z zastosowaniem do nieciągłego parsowania składników', 'so': 'Isticmaalka rasmiga ah ee lagu sameeyo codsiga uu joojiyo baaritaanka dooriyaha', 'sv': 'Generisk förfining av uttrycksfulla grammatiska formalismer med tillämpning på diskontinuell komponenttolkning', 'ta': 'Generic refinement of expressive grammar formalisms with an application to discontinuous constituent parsing', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසික ව්\u200dයාප්\u200dතිකාරීය සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාසිකය සමග අනුවෙන් අනුවිධාන විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'ur': 'نمایش گراماری فرمولیسم کی عمومی تغییر', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Sự tinh tế của các chính thức ngôn ngữ có biểu hiện với ứng dụng phân tích nội dung', 'bg': 'Генерално усъвършенстване на изразителните граматически формализми с приложение към прекъснато анализиране на съставните елементи', 'nl': 'Generieke verfijning van expressieve grammaticaformalismen met een toepassing op discontinuous constitution parsing', 'da': 'Generisk forfinelse af udtryksfulde grammatiske formalismer med anvendelse på diskontinuel bestanddel parsing', 'id': 'Penyesuaian umum formalisme gramatika ekspresif dengan aplikasi untuk penghuraian konstitusi berhenti', 'hr': 'Općenito refineranje ekspresivnih gramatičkih formalizma s zahtjelom za prekinuti razmatranje sastavnih sastavnika', 'ko': '표현 문법 형식의 범화 세분화 및 불연속 성분 분석에서의 응용', 'de': 'Generische Verfeinerung expressiver Grammatikformalismen mit Anwendung auf diskontinuierliches Parsen von Bestandteilen', 'fa': 'بازسازی عمومی از فرمولیسم\u200cهای نمایش\u200cشناسی با یک کاربرد برای بازسازی پایین\u200cکننده\u200cهای نمایش\u200cشناسی', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko ya kawaida ya utaratibu wa kura wa maoni na matumizi ya kusitisha ubaguzi wa kura', 'tr': 'Edilýän gramatik formalismlerini kesişmek üçin bir uygulama bilen taýýarlamak', 'am': 'Generic refinement of expressive grammar formalisms with an application to discontinuous constituent parsing', 'af': "Algemeen refinering van uitdrukking grammatiese formalisme met 'n toepassing om afsluit konstituent verwerking", 'hy': 'Էքսպասիվ գրամական ֆորմալիզմների ընդհանուր բարելավումը անընդհատ բաղադրիչների վերլուծության ծրագրով', 'az': 'Q캼sqa m칲톛yy톛n ay캼rmaq 칲칞칲n istifad톛 etm톛k 칲칞칲n istifad톛 edil톛n grammatik formalisml톛rin generiki rafin칞iliyi', 'bs': 'Generalna rafiniranja ekspresivnih gramatičkih formalizma sa zahtjelom za prekinuti analizu sastavnih sastavnika', 'sq': 'Përmirësimi gjeneral i formalizmave të grammisë shprehëse me një aplikim për analizimin e përbërësve të ndërprerë', 'ca': "Refineixement genèric de formalismes gramàtics expressius amb una aplicació a l'analització discontinua de components", 'et': 'Eksprektiivse grammatika formaalsuse üldine täpsustamine koostisosade katkematu parsimise rakendamisega', 'bn': 'প্রতিনিধি পার্সিং বন্ধ করার জন্য একটি অ্যাপ্লিকেশনের সাথে এক্সপ্রেক্টিভ গ্রামার ফরমেলিস্মেশনের সাধারণ সং', 'cs': 'Obecné zdokonalení expresivních gramatických formalismů s aplikací na diskontinuální analýzu složek', 'fi': 'Ekspressiivisen kieliopin muodollisuuksien yleinen viimeistely soveltamalla epäjatkuvaa jäsennystä', 'jv': 'AllProgressBar', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Generic refinement of expressive grammar formalisms with an application to discontinuous constituent parsing', 'sk': 'Splošna izpopolnitev izraznih slovničnih formalizmov z aplikacijo za prekinjeno razčlenjevanje sestavnih delov', 'bo': 'སྤྲོད་གཏོང་བའི་བྱ་རིམ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཞིབ་བཤེར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ།'}
{'en': 'We formulate a generalization of Petrov et al. (2006)’s split / merge algorithm for interpreted regular tree grammars (Koller and Kuhlmann, 2011), which capture a large class of grammar formalisms. We evaluate its effectiveness empirically on the task of discontinuous constituent parsing with two mildly context-sensitive grammar formalisms : linear context-free rewriting systems (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) as well as hybrid grammars (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).', 'es': 'Formulamos una generalización del algoritmo de separación/fusión de Petrov et al. (2006) para gramáticas de árbol regulares interpretadas (Koller y Kuhlmann, 2011), que capturan una gran clase de formalismos gramaticales. Evaluamos su eficacia empíricamente en la tarea de análisis discontinuo de componentes con dos formalismos gramaticales ligeramente sensibles al contexto: sistemas de reescritura lineal sin contexto (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) así como gramáticas híbridas (Nederhof y Vogler, 2014).', 'pt': 'Formulamos uma generalização de Petrov et al. (2006) algoritmo split/merge para gramáticas de árvores regulares interpretadas (Koller e Kuhlmann, 2011), que capturam uma grande classe de formalismos gramaticais. Avaliamos sua eficácia empiricamente na tarefa de análise de constituintes descontínuos com dois formalismos gramaticais levemente sensíveis ao contexto: sistemas lineares de reescrita livres de contexto (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987), bem como gramáticas híbridas (Nederhof e Vogler, 2014).', 'ar': 'نصوغ تعميمًا لـ Petrov et al. (2006) خوارزمية الانقسام / الدمج لقواعد النحو الشجرية المفسرة المنتظمة (Koller and Kuhlmann ، 2011) ، والتي تلتقط فئة كبيرة من الأشكال النحوية. نقوم بتقييم فعاليتها تجريبياً في مهمة التحليل غير المستمر للمكونات باستخدام شكلين نحويين حساسين للسياق بشكل معتدل: أنظمة إعادة الكتابة الخطية الخالية من السياق (Vijay-Shanker et al. ، 1987) وكذلك القواعد النحوية الهجينة (Nederhof and Vogler ، 2014).', 'fr': "Nous formulons une généralisation de l'algorithme de séparation/fusion de Petrov et al. (2006) pour les grammaires arborescentes régulières interprétées (Koller et Kuhlmann, 2011), qui capture une grande classe de formalismes grammaticaux. Nous évaluons son efficacité empiriquement sur la tâche d'analyse discontinue des constituants avec deux formalismes grammaticaux légèrement sensibles au contexte\xa0: les systèmes de réécriture linéaire sans contexte (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) ainsi que les grammaires hybrides (Nederhof et Vogler, 2014).", 'ja': '我々は、解釈された正規木文法のためのPetrov et al .( 2006)の分割/結合アルゴリズムの一般化を定式化します(Koller and Kuhlmann, 2011 )。これは、文法形式主義の大きなクラスを取り込んでいます。我々は、線形文脈自由書き換えシステム（ Vijay - Shanker et al., 1987 ）とハイブリッド文法（ Nederhof and Vogler, 2014 ）の2つの軽度の文脈依存文法形式主義を用いた不連続な構成要素構文解析のタスクに基づいて、その有効性を実証的に評価する。', 'zh': '臣等Petrov等(2006)说正则树语法拆分/并算法推广(KollerKuhlmann,2011),其获大语法形式主义。 以温上下文敏感语法形式主义于不续成分解析,论其有效性:线性上下文无关重写系统(Vijay-Shanker等,1987)及混合语法(NederhofVogler,2014)。', 'hi': 'हम Petrov et al. (2006) के विभाजन / मर्ज एल्गोरिथ्म का एक सामान्यीकरण तैयार करते हैं, जो नियमित रूप से पेड़ व्याकरण (Koller and Kuhlmann, 2011) की व्याख्या के लिए है, जो व्याकरण औपचारिकताओं के एक बड़े वर्ग पर कब्जा कर लेता है। हम दो हल्के संदर्भ-संवेदनशील व्याकरण औपचारिकताओं के साथ असंतत घटक पार्सिंग के कार्य पर इसकी प्रभावशीलता का मूल्यांकन करते हैं: रैखिक संदर्भ-मुक्त पुनर्लेखन प्रणाली (विजय-शंकर एट अल।', 'ru': 'Мы формулируем обобщение алгоритма разделения/слияния Петрова и др. (2006) для интерпретированных регулярных древовидных грамматик (Koller and Kuhlmann, 2011), которые захватывают большой класс грамматических формализмов. Мы оцениваем его эффективность эмпирически по задаче прерывистого компонентного синтаксического анализа с двумя слабо контекстно-чувствительными грамматическими формализмами: линейными бесконтекстными системами переписывания (Виджей-Шанкер и др., 1987), а также гибридными грамматиками (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).', 'ga': 'Déanaimid ginearálú ar Petrov et al. (2006) algartam scoilte/cumaisc do ghramadach rialta chrainn léirmhínithe (Koller agus Kuhlmann, 2011), a chuimsíonn aicme mór foirmiúlachtaí gramadaí. Déanaimid meastóireacht eimpíreach ar a éifeachtúlacht maidir le parsáil neamhleanúnach comhábhar le dhá fhoirmiúlacht ghramadaí atá íogair ó thaobh comhthéacs de: córais líneacha athscríobh saor ó chomhthéacs (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) chomh maith le gramadach hibrideach (Nederhof agus Vogler, 2014).', 'el': 'Σχηματίζουμε μια γενικοποίηση του αλγόριθμου διαχωρισμού/συγχώνευσης του Πέτροφ κ.α. (2006) για ερμηνευμένες γραμματικές κανονικών δέντρων (Κόλερ και Κούλμαν, 2011), οι οποίες συλλαμβάνουν μια μεγάλη κατηγορία γραμματικών φορμαλισμών. Αξιολογούμε εμπειρικά την αποτελεσματικότητά του στο έργο της ασυνεχής ανάλυσης συστατικών με δύο ήπια ευαίσθητους γραμματικούς φορμαλισμούς: γραμμικά συστήματα επαναγραφής χωρίς πλαίσιο (Βιτζέι-Σάνκερ κ.λ., 1987) καθώς και υβριδικές γραμματικές (Νέντεροφ και Βόγκλερ, 2014).', 'hu': 'A Petrov és társai (2006) split/merge algoritmusának általánosítását fogalmazzuk meg az értelmezett szabályos fa nyelvtanfolyamokra (Koller és Kuhlmann, 2011), amelyek a nyelvtani formalizmusok nagy osztályát rögzítik. Hatékonyságát empirikusan értékeljük két enyhén kontextusérzékeny nyelvtani formalizmussal: lineáris kontextusmentes újraírási rendszerekkel (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987), valamint hibrid nyelvtanokkal (Nederhof és Vogler, 2014).', 'ka': 'ჩვენ პეტროვას და ალგორიტიმს ჯერნალიზაციას (2006) გაყოფილი/ერთადერთებული ალგორიტიმს, რომელიც განსხვავებული რეგილური ხელის გრამიმარებისთვის (Koller და Kuhlmann, 2011), რომელიც გრამიმარიური ფორმალიზმის დიდი კლასი ჩვენ მისი ეფექტიურობას ემპერიკურად გავამუშავებთ ორი კონტექსტიური გრამიკური ფორმალიზმისთვისთან გადაწერების დავაკეთებაზე: ლეინერი კონტექსტის გადაწერების სისტემი (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) და ჰიბრიტური გრამისთან (Nederhof and', 'it': "Formuliamo una generalizzazione dell'algoritmo split/merge di Petrov et al. (2006) per grammatiche ad albero regolari interpretate (Koller e Kuhlmann, 2011), che catturano una grande classe di formalismi grammaticali. Ne valutiamo empiricamente l'efficacia sul compito di analisi costitutiva discontinua con due formalismi grammaticali leggermente contestuali: sistemi lineari di riscrittura senza contesto (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) e grammatiche ibride (Nederhof e Vogler, 2014).", 'kk': 'Біз Петров т.л. жалпы алгоритмін (2006) бөлу/біріктіру алгоритмін қалыпты ағаш граммалары (Koller және Kuhlmann, 2011) үлкен граммалық офилизмдерді түсіндіреді. Біз оның эффективнігін эмпирикалық түрде екі жақсы контекстік сезімді грамматикалық формализммен талдау тапсырмасына тең етік: линеттік контекстік бос қайта жазу жүйелері (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) және гибрид грамматтары (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).', 'mk': 'Формулизираме генерализација на алгоритмот за поделба/спојување на Петров и други (2006) за интерпретирање на регуларните граматики на дрвјата (Koller и Kuhlmann, 2011), кои заземаат голема класа граматични формализми. Ние ја оценуваме нејзината ефективност емпирички на задачата на прекинување на анализирањето на конститунтите со два лесно контекстно-чувствителни граматични формализми: линијарни системи без контекст за препишување (Vijay-Shanker итн., 1987) како и хибридни граматички (Nederhof и Vogler, 2014).', 'ms': 'Kami membentuk generalisasi algoritma pecahan/gabungan Petrov et al. (2006) untuk gramatik pokok biasa diterjemahkan (Koller dan Kuhlmann, 2011), yang menangkap kelas besar formalisme gramatik. Kami menilai keefektivitasnya secara empirik pada tugas penghuraian komponen yang berhenti dengan dua formalisme grammatik yang sensitif konteks yang ringan: sistem tulisan semula tanpa konteks linear (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) serta grammatik hibrid (Nederhof dan Vogler, 2014).', 'lt': 'Mes suformuluojame Petrov et al. (2006 m.) suskaidymo ir susijungimo algoritmo generalizaciją aiškinamoms reguliarioms medžių gramatikams (Koller ir Kuhlmann, 2011 m.), kuriuose yra didelė gramatinių formalumų klasė. Mes empiriniu būdu vertiname jo veiksmingumą atliekant nuolatinį sudedamųjų dalių analizavimą dviem lengvai kontekstui jautriais gramatiniais formalumais: linijinėmis be konteksto perrašymo sistemomis (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987), taip pat hibridinėmis gramatinėmis raidėmis (Nederhof ir Vogler, 2014).', 'mn': 'Бид Петров т.л. (2006) хуваагдах/нэгтгэх алгоритмыг тодорхойлдог. Энэ нь маш их хэмжээний грамматын официализмыг агуулдаг. Бид түүний үр дүнг эзэмшигтэй байдлын ажил дээр хоёр давхар сэтгэл хөдлөлтэй грамматын официалуудын тухай хуваалцах ажил дээр үнэлдэг: шулуун байдлын үнэгүй дахин бичих систем (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) мөн гибрид грамм (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പെട്രോവ് എറ്റ് അലിന്റെ ജനറലേഷന്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. (2006) വ്യക്തമാക്കിയ വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ സാധാരണ വൃക്ഷത്തിന്റെ ഗ്രാമഗ്രാമാര്\u200dക്ക് വേര്\u200dപെടു നിര്\u200dത്തുന്ന പ്രസിദ്ധാന പാര്\u200dഗ്ഗിന്റെ പ്രവർത്തിയില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d അതിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. രണ്ട് പതിവുള്ള കോണ്ടെക്സ്റ്റെന്റ് സെന്\u200dസിറ്റീവ് ഗ്രാമിലേക്ക്:', 'mt': "We formulate a generalization of Petrov et al. (2006)'s split/merge algorithm for interpreted regular tree grammars (Koller and Kuhlmann, 2011), which capture a large class of grammar formalisms.  We evaluate its effectiveness empirically on the task of discontinuous constituent parsing with two mildly context-sensitive grammar formalisms: linear context-free rewriting systems (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) as well as hybrid grammars (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).", 'pl': 'Formułujemy uogólnienie algorytmu podziału/scalania Petrova et al. (2006) dla interpretowanych gramatyk regularnych drzew (Koller i Kuhlmann, 2011), które uwzględniają dużą klasę formalizmów gramatycznych. Oceniamy jego skuteczność empirycznie w zakresie nieciągłego parsowania składników za pomocą dwóch łagodnie kontekstowych formalizmów gramatycznych: liniowych systemów przepisywania bezkontekstowego (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) oraz gramatyk hybrydowych (Nederhof i Vogler, 2014).', 'sr': 'Formirali smo generalizaciju algoritma podjele/spojivanja Petrov a et al. (2006) za tumačene regularne gramare drveta (Koller i Kuhlmann, 2011), koji uključuje veliku klasu gramatičkih formalizma. Procjenjujemo njegovu učinkovitost empirički na zadatku prekida razmatranja sastavnika sa dvije blago osjetljive gramatične formalizme konteksta: linearne sisteme prepisanja bez konteksta (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) kao i hibridne gramare (Nederhof i Vogler, 2014).', 'no': 'Vi formerer ein generellisering av Petrov et al. (2006) sin delt/fletting algoritme for tolka regulære tregrammar (Koller og Kuhlmann, 2011), som får ein stor klasse grammatiske formalismar. Vi evaluerer effektiviteten sine empirisk på oppgåva av avslutting av konstituent med to milt kontekstsensitiv grammatiske formalismar: lineære kontekstfri omskrivingssystemer (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) og hybrid grammar (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).', 'si': 'අපි පෙට්රෝව් ට් ල් වල සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂණයක් සූදානම් කරනවා. (2006) ග්\u200dරාමාර්ග්\u200dරාමාර්ග්\u200dරාමාර්ග්\u200dරාමාර්ග්\u200dරාමාර්ග්\u200dරාමාර්ග්රාමාර්ග සඳහ අපි විශ්වාස කරනවා එයාගේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය empiriically on the job of decontauous constitution Paring with 2 Mildless Contexts-sensive gram formisms: linear Contexts-Free rewriting systems (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) as well as hybrit gram mars (Nerhof and Voggler, 2014).', 'so': '(2006) waxaa loo sameynaa qoraal kala duduwan/Merge algorithm oo lagu turjumay geed caadi ah (Koller and Kuhlmann, 2011), kaasoo qabsada fasalka badan oo grammar ah. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa shaqadiisa qiimeynta ku saabsan shaqada uu joojin karo baarlamaanka oo ku qoran labo milow context-sensitive grammar formalisms: linear context-free rewriting systems (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) iyo hybrid grammars (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).', 'sv': 'Vi formulerar en generalisering av Petrov et al. (2006):s split/merge algoritm för tolkade vanliga trädgrammater (Koller och Kuhlmann, 2011), som fångar en stor klass av grammatiska formalismer. Vi utvärderar dess effektivitet empiriskt på uppgiften med diskontinuell konstituerande tolkning med två lätt kontextkänsliga grammatiska formalismer: linjära kontextfria omskrivningssystem (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) samt hybridgrammar (Nederhof och Vogler, 2014).', 'ta': 'பெட்ரோவ் மற்றும் அல் ஒரு பொதுவான உருவாக்கத்தை நாம் உருவாக்குகிறோம். பிரிக்கப்பட்ட/ஒன்று அல்கோரிட்டம் பிரிக்கப்பட்ட வழக்கமான மரக வரைப்படங்களுக்கு ( நாம் நிறுத்தும் பாடல் செயல்பாட்டில் அதன் விளைவை பெரும்பாலாக மதிப்பிடுகிறோம் இரண்டு மிகவும் குறைவான சூழல் உணர்வுடைய கிராம் வடிவமைப்புகள்: வரிசையின் சூழல் சொற்று மீண்டும்', 'ur': 'ہم نے پیٹروف اور ال کی ایک عمومی تفریق (2006) کی تقسیم/جمع الگوریٹم کی تفریق کے لئے (Koller and Kuhlmann, 2011) کی، جس نے ایک بڑی کلاس گراماری فرضیالیسم کو پکڑ لیا ہے. ہم اس کی عمدگی کا ارزش کررہے ہیں کہ دو مائل کنٹنسیٹ-حساس گراماری فرمولیسم کے ساتھ پارسیٹ کنٹنسیٹ کنٹنسیٹ ڈال دینے کی کوشش کے ذریعہ دو مائل کنٹنسیٹ-حساس گراماری فرمولیسم (ویجی-Shanker et al., 1987) اور ہیبراڈ گرامر (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).', 'ro': 'Formulăm o generalizare a algoritmului split/merge al lui Petrov et al. (2006) pentru gramaticile arborelor regulate interpretate (Koller și Kuhlmann, 2011), care capturează o clasă largă de formalisme gramaticale. Evaluăm empiric eficacitatea acesteia în ceea ce privește analizarea constitutivă discontinuu cu două formalisme gramaticale ușor sensibile la context: sisteme liniare de rescriere fără context (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) și gramaticale hibride (Nederhof și Vogler, 2014).', 'uz': "Bu bir katta grammatika formatlarni qabul qiladigan daraxt grammatika (Koller va Kuhlmann, 2011) bir necha darajaga birlashtirish/birlashtirish algoritni (2006) yaratishimiz. Biz bu tashkilotni o'qiymatimiz, ikki qisqa, qisqarli, ikkita qismi sensitive grammatika formatlari bilan o'tkazishni toʻxtatish vazifasiga qaramamiz: liner context-free rewriting systems (Vijay-Shanker et al, 1987), va hybrid grammatika (Nederhof va Vogler, 2014).", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đã mô tả thuật toán tổng hợp của Petrov et al. (ngây thơ) thuật toán phân tách/hợp để giải thích các tạp trình gốc cây thông thường (Koller và Kullmann, 2011), nó bắt được một lớp chính thức văn pháp lớn. Chúng tôi thử nghiệm hiệu quả của nó với nhiệm vụ phân tích bằng cách ngắt quãng với hai chính thức ngữ pháp mềm mỏng nhạy với ngữ cảnh: hệ thống lắp ghép hoàn toàn hoàn toàn trường hợp tuyến (Vimy-Shanker et al., 1987) cũng như tạp âm lai (Nederhof và Vogler, 2004).', 'nl': "We formuleren een generalisatie van Petrov et al. (2006)'s split/merge algoritme voor geïnterpreteerde reguliere boomgrammatica's (Koller en Kuhlmann, 2011), die een grote klasse grammatica formalismen vastleggen. We evalueren de effectiviteit ervan empirisch op de taak van discontinuous constitution parsing met twee licht contextgevoelige grammaticaformalismen: lineaire contextvrije herschrijvingssystemen (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) en hybride grammatica's (Nederhof en Vogler, 2014).", 'bg': 'Формулираме обобщение на алгоритъма на разделяне/сливане на Петров и др. (2006) за интерпретирани обикновени дървесни граматики (Колер и Кулман, 2011), които улавят голям клас граматически формализми. Емпирично оценяваме ефективността му върху задачата за прекъснато анализиране на съставни елементи с два леко чувствителни към контекста граматически формализма: линейни системи за пренаписване без контекст (Виджай-Шанкер и др., 1987), както и хибридни граматики (Недерхоф и Воглер, 2014).', 'hr': 'Formirali smo generalizaciju algoritma podjele/spojivanja Petrov a et al. (2006) za tumačene redovne gramare drveta (Koller i Kuhlmann, 2011), koji uključuju veliku klasu gramatičkih formalizma. Procjenjujemo njegovu učinkovitost empirički na zadatku prekida razmatranja sastavnika s dvije blago osjetljive gramatičke formalizme konteksta: linearne sisteme prepisanja bez konteksta (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) kao i hibridne gramare (Nederhof i Vogler, 2014).', 'de': 'Wir formulieren eine Verallgemeinerung des Split/Merge Algorithmus von Petrov et al. (2006) für interpretierte reguläre Baumgrammatiken (Koller und Kuhlmann, 2011), die eine große Klasse von Grammatikformalismen erfassen. Die Wirksamkeit der diskontinuierlichen konstituierenden Parsing wird empirisch mit zwei leicht kontextsensitiven Grammatikformalismen bewertet: lineare kontextfreie Umschreibungssysteme (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) sowie hybride Grammatiken (Nederhof und Vogler, 2014).', 'id': 'Kami membentuk generalisasi algoritma pembagian/gabungan Petrov et al. (2006) untuk interpretasi gramatika pohon biasa (Koller dan Kuhlmann, 2011), yang menangkap kelas besar formalisme gramatika. Kami mengevaluasi efektivitasnya secara empirik pada tugas penganalisan konstituen tidak berhenti dengan dua formalisme gramatika yang sedikit sensitif konteks: sistem pengtulisan tanpa konteks linear (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) serta gramatika hibrid (Nederhof dan Vogler, 2014).', 'fa': 'ما یک فرمول ژنرال پیتروف و الگوریتم تقسیم/جمع کردن الگوریتم برای ترجمه\u200cهای درخت معمولی (Koller and Kuhlmann, 2011) را فرمودیم که یک کلاس بزرگی از فرمول\u200cهای گرامی را گرفته است. ما عملکرد اش را به طور مثبت بر روی وظیفه پارسایی متوقف کننده با دو فرم\u200cنامه\u200cهای متوسط حساسی آسان ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم: سیستم بازنوشتن آزاد کنترل (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) و گرم\u200cنامه\u200cهای هیبرید (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).', 'da': "Vi formulerer en generalisering af Petrov et al. (2006)'s split/flet algoritme for fortolkede regulære trægrammater (Koller og Kuhlmann, 2011), som fanger en stor klasse af grammatiske formalismer. Vi evaluerer dens effektivitet empirisk på opgaven med diskontinuel bestemmende parsing med to mildt kontekstfølsomme grammatiske formalismer: lineære kontekstfrie omskrivningssystemer (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) samt hybrid grammatik (Nederhof og Vogler, 2014).", 'tr': "Petrov et al'yň döredilik taslamasynda (2006) düzgün agaç grammalaryny terjime etmek üçin bir algoritmi döredik. Biz onuň etkinliýetini empirik bilen döwürýän constituent hökmünde iki mil duýgun gramatik formalismi bilen çykyp çykmak üçin deňleýäris: çizgi kontekst boş täzeden ýazma sistemalary (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) we hybrid gramalary (Nederhof we Vogler, 2014).", 'sq': 'Ne formojmë një gjeneralizim të algoritmit të ndarjes/bashkimit të Petrov et al. (2006) për gramatikat e interpretuara të rregullta të pemëve (Koller dhe Kuhlmann, 2011), që kapin një klasë të madhe formalizmash gramatike. Ne vlerësojmë efektshmërinë e saj empirikisht në detyrën e analizimit të përbërësit të vazhdueshëm me dy formalizma të lehta gramatike të ndjeshme në kontekst: sisteme lineare të rishkrimit pa kontekst (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) si dhe gramatike hibride (Nederhof dhe Vogler, 2014).', 'ko': '우리는 Petrov 등(2006)이 제기한 정규 트리 문법을 해석하는 데 사용되는 분할/합병 알고리즘(Koller와 Kuhlmann, 2011)을 보급했는데 이 알고리즘은 큰 문법 형식을 포착했다.우리는 두 가지 가벼운 상하문에 민감한 문법 형식을 사용했다. 선형 상하문은 재작성 시스템(Vijay Shanker et al., 1987)과 혼합 문법(Nederhof and Vogler, 2014)과 상관없이 불연속 성분 분석 임무에서의 유효성에 대해 실증 평가를 실시했다.', 'am': 'የፌትሮቪል እና አል (2006) የተለየ/ማጋጠሚያ አልgoritm ለዘወትር ዛፍ grammar (Koller እና Kuhlman, 2011) የተለየ ትልቅ ክፍል የgrammar ፍርማሌዎችን ለመያዝ ነው፡፡ በሁለት ታናሽ context-sensitive grammar ማዘጋጃዎችን በማስተካከል ጥቅማቸውን በማስተካከል እናስተዋልታለን፤ የጽሑፍ context-free rewriting systems (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) እና የኬብሪክ መዝገብ (ኔድራፊ እና Vogler, 2014).', 'hy': "Մենք ձևավորում ենք Պետրովի և այլների (2006) բաժանման և միավորման ալգորիթմի ընդհանուր ընդհանուր ընդհանուր բաղադրությունը հասարակ ծառերի գրամագրությունների մեկնաբանման համար (Կոլեր և Կուլմանը, 2011), որոնք գրամագրական ֆորմալիզմների մեծ դասարան են ներառում Մենք էմպրիկապես գնահատում ենք դրա արդյունավետությունը դադարի բաղադրիչների վերլուծության խնդրի վրա երկու թեթև կոնտեքստի զգայուն գրամական ֆորմալիզմներով' գծային կոնտեքստից ազատ վերագրման համակարգերով (Vijay-Sharker et al., 1987), ինչպես նաև հիբրիդ գրամագրություններով (Նեդերհոն և Vogle", 'sw': 'Tunaweza kutengeneza utaratibu wa Petrov et al. (2006) uligawanywa/kuunganisha kwa ajili ya michoro ya miti ya kawaida (Koller na Kuhlmann, 2011), ambao unakamata idadi kubwa ya rasmi za grammani. Tunatathmini ufanisi wake kwa makini juu ya kazi ya kumaliza ubunge wa kuimba kwa ajili ya utaratibu wa tabia mbili yenye uchunguzi wa taratibu mbili: mfumo wa kuandika kwa mfumo usio na mfumo wa msingi (Vijay-Shanker et al, 1987) pamoja na viongozi wa hybrid (Nederhof na Vogler, 2014).', 'af': "Ons formeer 'n generellisering van Petrov et al. (2006) se splitting/verbinding algoritme vir gewone boom gramme (Koller en Kuhlmann, 2011), wat 'n groot klas grammatiese formalisme opvang. Ons evalueer sy effektiviteit empiriese op die opdrag van afsluiting konstituent verwerking met twee mild konteks-sensitiewe grammatiese formalisme: lineêre konteks-vry herskryfstelsels (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) en hybride gramme (Nederhof en Vogler, 2014).", 'az': "Biz Petrov et al'in generalizasyonu (2006) ilə müxtəlif a ğac qrammaları (Koller və Kuhlmann, 2011) üçün bölünmüş/birləşdirilmiş algoritmi formüləyirik. Bu çox qrammatik formalismlərini al ır. Biz onun etkinliğini empirik olaraq müəyyən etdiyimiz müəyyən müddəti iki mil kontekst-sensitiv grammatik formalismi ilə ayırmaq üçün müəyyən edirik: linear kontekst-boş yeni yazma sistemləri (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) və hibrid grammaları (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).", 'bn': 'আমরা পেট্রোভ এন্ট আলের একটি জেনারেলিজেশন তৈরি করেছি (২০০৬) বিভক্ত/একত্রিত অ্যালগরিদম ব্যাখ্যা করা নিয়মিত গাছ গ্রামগ্রামের (কলার এবং কুহল্মান, ২০১১ আমরা তাদের কার্যকর প্রতিনিধিদের পার্গারের কাজে প্রতিষ্ঠিত করে দুটি কম্পেন্ট-সেন্টিভিটিভ গ্রামের বিষয়টির মাধ্যমে প্রতিক্রিয়া মূল্যায়ন করি: লাইনিয়ার কন্টেক্স-মুক্ত পুনরায়', 'bs': 'Formiramo generalizaciju algoritma podjele/spojivanja Petrov a et al. (2006) za tumačene redovne gramare drveta (Koller i Kuhlmann, 2011), koji uključuju veliku klasu gramatičkih formalizma. Procjenjujemo njegovu učinkovitost empirički na zadatku prekida razmatranja sastavnika sa dvije blago osjetljive gramatične formalizme konteksta: linearne sisteme prepisanja bez konteksta (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) kao i hibridne gramare (Nederhof i Vogler, 2014).', 'cs': 'Formulujeme zobecnění algoritmu rozdělení/sloučení Petrova et al. (2006) pro interpretované gramatiky pravidelných stromů (Koller a Kuhlmann, 2011), které zachycují velkou třídu gramatických formalismů. Jeho efektivitu hodnotíme empiricky na úkolu diskontinuální analýzy složek se dvěma mírně kontextově citlivými gramatickými formalismy: lineárními bezkontextovými přepisovacími systémy (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) a hybridními gramatikami (Nederhof a Vogler, 2014).', 'ca': "Formulem una generalització del algoritme de divisió/fusió de Petrov et al. (2006) per interpretar gramàtiques d'arbres regular s (Koller i Kuhlmann, 2011), que capturen una gran classe de formalismes gramàtics. Evaluam la seva eficacia empíricament en la tasca d'analitzar els components discontinus amb dos formalismes gramàtics poc sensibles al contexte: sistemes linears de reescriptura sense contest (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) i gramàtiques híbrides (Nederhof i Vogler, 2014).", 'et': 'Sõnastame Petrov jt. (2006) split/merge algoritmi tõlgendamise regulaarsete puugrammatikate jaoks (Koller ja Kuhlmann, 2011), mis hõlmavad suurt klassi grammatilisi formaalsusi. Hindame empiiriliselt selle efektiivsust katkematu koostisosade parsimise ülesandel kahe kergelt kontekstitundliku grammatika formaalsusega: lineaarsed kontekstivabad ümberkirjutamissüsteemid (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) ja hübriidgrammatikad (Nederhof ja Vogler, 2014).', 'fi': 'Kehitämme yleistyksen Petrov et al. (2006) split/merge algoritmista tulkituille säännöllisille puille (Koller ja Kuhlmann, 2011), joka vangitsee suuren luokan kielioppimuodollisuuksia. Arvioimme empiirisesti sen tehoa epäjatkuvien osatekijöiden jäsentämisessä kahdella lievästi kontekstille herkällä kieliopin formalismilla: lineaarisilla kontekstivapaalla uudelleenkirjoitusjärjestelmillä (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) sekä hybridi-kieliopilla (Nederhof ja Vogler, 2014).', 'jv': 'We formate a Generalization of Pedow et al (06)s Split/Merge Algorithm for Awak dhéwé éntukno ngéwé éntukno karo nggawe geranglangno karo hal-hal mulasar tentang iki nggawe barang-sengatesno nggawe barang kelas: sistem linear context-free nggawe tarjamahan (Wiljay-Shakker et al), padha uga wijahasar nggawe rambarang (Neechof lan Vogler, 2013).', 'sk': 'Formuliramo posplošitev algoritma split/spajanja Petrova et al. (2006) za interpretirane navadne drevesne slovnice (Koller in Kuhlmann, 2011), ki zajemajo velik razred slovničnih formalizmov. Empirično ocenjujemo njegovo učinkovitost pri nalogi prekinjenega razčlenjanja sestavnih delov z dvema blago kontekstno občutljivima slovničnima formalizmoma: linearnimi sistemi brez konteksta (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) in hibridnimi slovničnimi slovnicami (Nederhof in Vogler, 2014).', 'ha': "Mu ƙayyade wani jenalisation of PetrV et al. (2006)'s division/haɗe algoritm for interpreted regular Tree grammars (Coller and Kuhlman, 2011), which fanger some huge grammar formalism. Tuna ƙaddara fikanci a kan aikin da za'a sãtar da constituent mai yin parse da biyu sauri-context-sensitive grammar: rayin context-raye rewriting system (Wijay-Shanker et al, 1987) da kyauta (Neder hof da Vogle, 2014).", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་Petrov et al(2006)ཡི་སྣང་ཚུལ་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གླེང་སྒྲུང་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཆ་རྣམས་ལ། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་འགྱུར་བའི་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་ཕར་ཆེན་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་ཡིན་པའི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱ་རིམ་གནང་བ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་གྱི་བྱ་རིམ་དང་།', 'he': 'אנו מייצרים את הגנרליזציה של אלגוריתם של פטרוב וס. (2006) לחלק/המיזוג לתפרצות גרמטיקות עצים רגילות (Koller and Kuhlmann, 2011), שמתפסות כיתה גדולה של רשמיות גרמטיקות. We evaluate its effectiveness empirically on the task of discontinuous constituent parsing with two mildly context-sensitive grammar formalisms: linear context-free rewriting systems (Vijay-Shanker et al., 1987) as well as hybrid grammars (Nederhof and Vogler, 2014).'}
{'en': 'Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'pt': 'Redes de caminho duplo para aprendizado de sequência a sequência', 'ar': 'شبكات المسار المزدوج للتسلسل لتسلسل التعلم', 'es': 'Redes de doble ruta para el aprendizaje secuencia a secuencia', 'fr': "Réseaux à double chemin pour l'apprentissage séquence par séquence", 'ja': 'シーケンス学習へのシーケンスのためのダブルパスネットワーク', 'zh': '至于双径网络', 'hi': 'अनुक्रम सीखने के लिए अनुक्रम के लिए डबल पथ नेटवर्क', 'ru': 'Двухпутные сети для обучения последовательности к последовательности', 'ga': 'Líonraí Cosán Dúbailte le haghaidh Seicheamh Foghlama le Seicheamh', 'ka': 'სერვენტის შესწავლებისთვის ეუბრალური გეზის ქსელი', 'el': 'Δίκτυα διπλής διαδρομής για τη μάθηση διαδοχής σε διαδοχή', 'hu': 'Kettős útvonalú hálózatok a szekvencia és a szekvencia tanulás érdekében', 'it': "Reti a doppio percorso per l'apprendimento da sequenza a sequenza", 'lt': 'Dvigubų kelių tinklai sekai mokytis sekai', 'mk': 'Двопатни мрежи за секвенција до училиште на секвенција', 'kk': 'Қосымша реттеу оқыту үшін жұмыс желілері', 'ms': 'Rangkaian Laluan Dua untuk Kelajuan ke Pelajaran Kelajuan', 'ml': 'സെക്കന്\u200dസിന് പഠനം വരുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള രണ്ട് പാത്ത് നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d', 'mn': 'Дараагийн суралцах хоёр замын сүлжээлүүд', 'mt': 'Netwerks ta’ Rotta Doppja għas-Sekwenza għat-Tagħlim tas-Sekwenza', 'ro': 'Rețele de cale dublă pentru învățarea secvențelor la secvență', 'no': 'Dobbelt banesnettverk for sekvens til sekvenslæring', 'pl': 'Sieci podwójnej ścieżki dla uczenia się sekwencji do sekwencji', 'sr': 'Dvostruke mreže za sekvenciju do sekvence učenje', 'si': 'ක්\u200dරමයක් ඉගෙනගන්න වෙනුවෙන් දෙකක් පාත් ජාලය', 'so': 'Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'sv': 'Nätverk med dubbla vägar för sekvens till sekvensinlärning', 'ta': 'Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence Learning', 'ur': 'سکوئنس کی تعلیم کے لئے دوبل پٹ نیٹورک', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Mạng Đường dẫn đôi để Thêm dãy để học dãy', 'nl': 'Dubbele paden netwerken voor sequentie naar sequentie leren', 'bg': 'Двоен път мрежи за последователност към последователност обучение', 'hr': 'Dvostruke mreže za učenje sekvence do sekvence', 'da': 'Dobbelt vej netværk til sekvens til sekvenslæring', 'de': 'Doppelpfadnetzwerke für das Lernen von Sequenz zu Sequenz', 'id': 'Jaringan Laluan Dua untuk Sekuensi ke Belajar Sekuensi', 'fa': 'شبکه\u200cهای مسیر دوبرابر برای تعلیم سعادت به سعادت', 'tr': 'PrefDlgSlideSwitchPrefix', 'ko': '시퀀스에서 시퀀스 학습에 사용되는 이중 경로 네트워크', 'sw': 'Mtandao wa njia mbili kwa ajili ya Kufuatilia Kujifunza', 'af': 'Dubbel Pad Netwerke vir Sequence na Sequence Learning', 'sq': 'Rrjetet e Rrugës së Dyfishtë për Sekuencën e Mësimit të Sekuencës', 'hy': 'Հաջորդականության սովորելու հաջորդականության համար երկու ճանապարհի ցանցեր', 'am': 'የመስመር ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'সেকেন্স শিক্ষার জন্য দ্বিগুণ পাথ নেটওয়ার্ক', 'az': 'Sıradan öyrənmək üçün iki yol ağları', 'ca': "Redes de camí doble per a la seqüència a l'aprenentatge de seqüències", 'bs': 'Dvostruke mreže za učenje sekvence do sekvence', 'cs': 'Sítě dvojité cesty pro učení sekvence na sekvenci', 'et': 'Topelttee võrgud järjestuse ja järjestuse õppe jaoks', 'fi': 'Kaksinkertaisen polun verkostot sekvenssi-oppimiseen', 'jv': 'query-sort', 'he': 'רשתות דרכים כפולות עבור רצף ללימוד רצף', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Dvojna omrežja za učenje zaporedja do zaporedja', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་དབྱེ་རིམ་གྱི་འགྲུལ་ལམ་གཉིས་པ'}
{'en': 'Encoder-decoder based Sequence to Sequence learning (S2S) has made remarkable progress in recent years. Different network architectures have been used in the encoder / decoder. Among them, Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) and Self Attention Networks (SAN) are the prominent ones. The two architectures achieve similar performances but use very different ways to encode and decode context : CNN use convolutional layers to focus on the local connectivity of the sequence, while SAN uses self-attention layers to focus on global semantics. In this work we propose Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence learning (DPN-S2S), which leverage the advantages of both models by using double path information fusion. During the encoding step, we develop a double path architecture to maintain the information coming from different paths with convolutional layers and self-attention layers separately. To effectively use the encoded context, we develop a gated attention fusion module and use it to automatically pick up the information needed during the decoding step, which is also a double path network. By deeply integrating the two paths, both types of information are combined and well exploited. Experiments show that our proposed method can significantly improve the performance of sequence to sequence learning over state-of-the-art systems.', 'ar': 'حقق التسلسل إلى التعلم المتسلسل (S2S) القائم على وحدة فك التشفير والتشفير تقدمًا ملحوظًا في السنوات الأخيرة. تم استخدام معماريات شبكة مختلفة في جهاز التشفير / وحدة فك التشفير. من بينها ، الشبكات العصبية التلافيفية (CNN) وشبكات الاهتمام الذاتي (SAN) هي الشبكات البارزة. تحقق البنيتان أداءً مشابهًا لكنهما تستخدمان طرقًا مختلفة جدًا لتشفير السياق وفك تشفيره: تستخدم CNN الطبقات التلافيفية للتركيز على الاتصال المحلي للتسلسل ، بينما تستخدم SAN طبقات الانتباه الذاتي للتركيز على الدلالات العالمية. في هذا العمل ، نقترح شبكات مزدوجة المسار لتعلم التسلسل إلى التسلسل (DPN-S2S) ، والتي تستفيد من مزايا كلا النموذجين باستخدام دمج معلومات المسار المزدوج. أثناء خطوة التشفير ، نقوم بتطوير بنية مسار مزدوج للحفاظ على المعلومات القادمة من مسارات مختلفة مع طبقات تلافيفية وطبقات الانتباه الذاتي بشكل منفصل. لاستخدام السياق المشفر بشكل فعال ، نقوم بتطوير وحدة دمج الانتباه باستخدام بوابات ونستخدمها تلقائيًا لالتقاط المعلومات المطلوبة أثناء خطوة فك التشفير ، والتي تعد أيضًا شبكة مسار مزدوج. من خلال التكامل العميق بين المسارين ، يتم دمج كلا النوعين من المعلومات واستغلالهما جيدًا. تظهر التجارب أن طريقتنا المقترحة يمكن أن تحسن بشكل كبير أداء التسلسل لتسلسل التعلم على أحدث الأنظمة.', 'fr': "L'apprentissage Sequence to Sequence (S2S) basé sur encodeur-décodeur a fait des progrès remarquables ces dernières années. Différentes architectures réseau ont été utilisées dans l'encodeur/décodeur. Parmi eux, les réseaux de neurones convolutifs (CNN) et les réseaux d'attention personnelle (SAN) sont les plus importants. Les deux architectures obtiennent des performances similaires mais utilisent des méthodes très différentes pour encoder et décoder le contexte\xa0: CNN utilise des couches convolutives pour se concentrer sur la connectivité locale de la séquence, tandis que le SAN utilise des couches d'auto-attention pour se concentrer sur la sémantique globale. Dans ce travail, nous proposons des réseaux à double chemin pour l'apprentissage de séquence à séquence (DPN-S2S), qui tirent parti des avantages des deux modèles en utilisant la fusion d'informations à double chemin. Au cours de l'étape d'encodage, nous développons une architecture à double chemin pour conserver les informations provenant de différents chemins avec des couches convolutives et des couches d'auto-attention séparément. Pour utiliser efficacement le contexte codé, nous développons un module de fusion d'attention fermée et l'utilisons pour récupérer automatiquement les informations nécessaires pendant l'étape de décodage, qui est également un réseau à double chemin. En intégrant profondément les deux voies, les deux types d'informations sont combinés et bien exploités. Les expériences montrent que la méthode que nous proposons peut améliorer de manière significative les performances de l'apprentissage séquence par séquence par rapport à des systèmes de pointe.", 'pt': 'O aprendizado de sequência a sequência (S2S) baseado em codificador-decodificador fez um progresso notável nos últimos anos. Diferentes arquiteturas de rede têm sido usadas no codificador/decodificador. Dentre elas, as Redes Neurais Convolucionais (CNN) e as Redes de Autoatendimento (SAN) são as de destaque. As duas arquiteturas atingem desempenhos semelhantes, mas usam maneiras muito diferentes de codificar e decodificar o contexto: a CNN usa camadas convolucionais para se concentrar na conectividade local da sequência, enquanto a SAN usa camadas de autoatenção para se concentrar na semântica global. Neste trabalho propomos redes de caminho duplo para aprendizado de sequência a sequência (DPN-S2S), que aproveitam as vantagens de ambos os modelos usando fusão de informações de caminho duplo. Durante a etapa de codificação, desenvolvemos uma arquitetura de caminho duplo para manter as informações provenientes de diferentes caminhos com camadas convolucionais e camadas de autoatenção separadamente. Para usar efetivamente o contexto codificado, desenvolvemos um módulo de fusão de atenção fechada e o usamos para coletar automaticamente as informações necessárias durante a etapa de decodificação, que também é uma rede de caminho duplo. Ao integrar profundamente os dois caminhos, ambos os tipos de informação são combinados e bem explorados. Experimentos mostram que nosso método proposto pode melhorar significativamente o desempenho do aprendizado de sequência a sequência em sistemas de última geração.', 'es': 'El aprendizaje de secuencia a secuencia (S2S) basado en codificadores y descodificadores ha hecho progresos notables en los últimos años. Se han utilizado diferentes arquitecturas de red en el codificador/decodificador. Entre ellas, las redes neuronales convolucionales (CNN) y las redes de autoatención (SAN) son las más destacadas. Las dos arquitecturas logran rendimientos similares, pero utilizan formas muy diferentes de codificar y decodificar el contexto: la CNN utiliza capas convolucionales para centrarse en la conectividad local de la secuencia, mientras que SAN utiliza capas de autoatención para centrarse en la semántica global. En este trabajo proponemos redes de doble ruta para el aprendizaje de secuencia a secuencia (DPN-S2S), que aprovechan las ventajas de ambos modelos mediante el uso de la fusión de información de doble ruta. Durante el paso de codificación, desarrollamos una arquitectura de doble ruta para mantener la información proveniente de diferentes rutas con capas convolucionales y capas de autoatención por separado. Para utilizar eficazmente el contexto codificado, desarrollamos un módulo de fusión de atención cerrada y lo utilizamos para recoger automáticamente la información necesaria durante el paso de decodificación, que también es una red de doble ruta. Al integrar profundamente las dos rutas, ambos tipos de información se combinan y se aprovechan bien. Los experimentos muestran que nuestro método propuesto puede mejorar significativamente el rendimiento del aprendizaje secuencia a secuencia en comparación con los sistemas más avanzados.', 'ja': 'エンコーダデコーダベースのSequence to Sequence learning (S 2 S)は、近年顕著な進歩を遂げている。 エンコーダ/デコーダでは、異なるネットワークアーキテクチャが使用されています。 その中でも、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）と自己注目ネットワーク（ SAN ）が顕著である。 2つのアーキテクチャは、同様のパフォーマンスを達成しますが、コンテキストをエンコードおよびデコードするために非常に異なる方法を使用します。CNNは畳み込みレイヤーを使用してシーケンスのローカル接続に焦点を当て、SANは自己注目レイヤーを使用してグローバルセマンティクスに焦点を当てます。 本研究では、ダブルパス情報融合を用いて両モデルの利点を活用したシーケンス学習用ダブルパスネットワーク（ DPN - S 2 S ）を提案した。 符号化ステップでは、畳み込みレイヤーと自己注目レイヤーを別々に使用して、異なるパスから来る情報を維持するためのダブルパスアーキテクチャを開発します。 エンコードされたコンテキストを効果的に使用するために、ゲート化された注意融合モジュールを開発し、これを使用してデコードステップ中に必要な情報を自動的に取得します。デコードステップは、ダブルパスネットワークでもあります。 2つの経路を深く統合することで、両方のタイプの情報が組み合わされ、うまく利用されます。 実験によると、我々が提案した方法は、最先端のシステムを超えてシーケンス学習のシーケンスのパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させることができることが示されている。', 'zh': '近年以来,编码器-解码器之序(S2S)著于序。 编码器/解码器用异网络架构。 其中,卷积神经网络(CNN)与自网络(SAN)异也。 此二架构者,成类而编码解码上下文:CNN用卷积层以接序,而SAN用自关注层来关全局语义。 于此言之,序于双径之网络(DPN-S2S),合双径之信以乘两模之势。 编码步驿中,开一双径架构,以分卷积层意层来护其消息。 用编码之上下文,开一门控模块,以自拾解码,此亦一径网络。 二径之深整合,二者之信合而得其利。 实验明,比之先进之统,所以显崇序学之性也。', 'ru': 'Кодер-декодер на основе обучения последовательности к последовательности (S2S) добился значительного прогресса в последние годы. В кодере/декодере использовались различные сетевые архитектуры. Среди них наиболее заметными являются сверточные нейронные сети (CNN) и сети самовнимания (SAN). Две архитектуры достигают одинаковых характеристик, но используют очень разные способы кодирования и декодирования контекста: CNN использует сверточные слои, чтобы сосредоточиться на локальной связности последовательности, в то время как SAN использует слои самовнимания, чтобы сосредоточиться на глобальной семантике. В этой работе мы предлагаем сети двойного пути для обучения последовательности (DPN-S2S), которые используют преимущества обеих моделей, используя слияние информации двойного пути. На этапе кодирования мы разрабатываем архитектуру двойного пути для поддержания информации, поступающей с разных путей со сверточными слоями и слоями самовнимания отдельно. Чтобы эффективно использовать закодированный контекст, мы разрабатываем модуль слияния с синхронизированным вниманием и используем его для автоматического сбора информации, необходимой на этапе декодирования, который также является сетью с двойным трактом. Глубоко интегрируя эти два пути, оба типа информации объединяются и хорошо используются. Эксперименты показывают, что предлагаемый нами метод может значительно улучшить производительность обучения последовательности по современным системам.', 'hi': 'एनकोडर-डिकोडर आधारित अनुक्रम अनुक्रम सीखने के लिए (S2S) ने हाल के वर्षों में उल्लेखनीय प्रगति की है। एनकोडर/डिकोडर में विभिन्न नेटवर्क आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग किया गया है। उनमें से, Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) और Self Attention Networks (SAN) प्रमुख हैं। दो आर्किटेक्चर समान प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं लेकिन संदर्भ को एन्कोड और डिकोड करने के लिए बहुत अलग-अलग तरीकों का उपयोग करते हैं: सीएनएन अनुक्रम की स्थानीय कनेक्टिविटी पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए कनवल्शनल परतों का उपयोग करता है, जबकि सैन वैश्विक शब्दार्थ पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए आत्म-ध्यान परतों का उपयोग करता है। इस काम में हम अनुक्रम से अनुक्रम सीखने (DPN-S2S) के लिए डबल पथ नेटवर्क का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, जो डबल पथ सूचना संलयन का उपयोग करके दोनों मॉडलों के लाभों का लाभ उठाते हैं। एन्कोडिंग चरण के दौरान, हम अलग-अलग पथ परतों और आत्म-ध्यान परतों के साथ अलग-अलग पथों से आने वाली जानकारी को बनाए रखने के लिए एक डबल पथ वास्तुकला विकसित करते हैं। एन्कोडेड संदर्भ का प्रभावी ढंग से उपयोग करने के लिए, हम एक गेटेड ध्यान संलयन मॉड्यूल विकसित करते हैं और इसका उपयोग डिकोडिंग चरण के दौरान आवश्यक जानकारी को स्वचालित रूप से लेने के लिए करते हैं, जो एक डबल पथ नेटवर्क भी है। दो पथों को गहराई से एकीकृत करके, दोनों प्रकार की जानकारी को संयुक्त और अच्छी तरह से शोषण किया जाता है। प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि अत्याधुनिक प्रणालियों पर अनुक्रम सीखने के लिए अनुक्रम के प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार कर सकती है।', 'ga': 'Tá dul chun cinn suntasach déanta le blianta beaga anuas ó Sheicheamh go Foghlaim Seicheamhaí (S2S) atá bunaithe ar ionchódóir- díchódaithe. Baineadh úsáid as ailtireachtaí líonra éagsúla san ionchódóir/díchódóir. Ina measc, is iad Líonraí Néaracha Convolutional (CNN) agus Líonraí Féin-aird (SAN) na cinn is suntasaí. Baineann an dá ailtireacht feidhmíochtaí comhchosúla amach ach úsáideann siad bealaí an-difriúla chun comhthéacs a ionchódú agus a dhíchódú: úsáideann CNN sraitheanna drogallacha chun díriú ar nascacht áitiúil an tseichimh, agus úsáideann SAN sraitheanna féin-aird chun díriú ar shéimeantaic dhomhanda. San obair seo molaimid Líonraí Cosán Dúbailte don Fhoghlaim ó Sheicheamh go Seicheamh (DPN-S2S), a ghiaráil buntáistí an dá mhúnla trí úsáid a bhaint as comhleá faisnéise cosáin dhúbailte. Le linn na céime ionchódaithe, déanaimid forbairt ar ailtireacht cosán dúbailte chun an fhaisnéis a thagann ó chosáin éagsúla a choinneáil le sraitheanna convolutional agus sraitheanna féin-aird ar leithligh. Chun an comhthéacs ionchódaithe a úsáid go héifeachtach, déanaimid forbairt ar mhodúl comhleá aird gated agus é a úsáid chun an fhaisnéis a theastaíonn le linn na céime díchódaithe a phiocadh suas go huathoibríoch, ar líonra cosán dúbailte é freisin. Trí an dá chosán a chomhtháthú go domhain, cuirtear an dá chineál faisnéise le chéile agus déantar dea-shaothrú orthu. Léiríonn turgnaimh gur féidir lenár modh molta feabhas suntasach a chur ar fheidhmíocht an tseichimh chun an fhoghlaim a sheicheamhú thar chórais den scoth.', 'hu': 'Kódoló-dekóder alapú Sequence to Sequence tanulás (S2S) jelentős előrelépést ért el az elmúlt években. A kódoló/dekóder különböző hálózati architektúrákat használt. Közülük a konvolúciós ideghálózatok (CNN) és az önfigyelmeztető hálózatok (SAN) a kiemelkedőek. A két architektúra hasonló teljesítményt ér el, de nagyon különböző módszereket használ a kontextus kódolására és dekódolására: a CNN konvolúciós rétegeket használ a sorozat helyi kapcsolatára, míg a SAN önfigyelmet használ a globális szemantikára. Ebben a munkában javasoljuk a Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence tanuláshoz (DPN-S2S), amelyek kettős útvonal információs fúzió alkalmazásával kihasználják mindkét modell előnyeit. A kódolási lépés során kettős útvonal architektúrát fejlesztünk ki a különböző útvonalakról érkező információk konvolúciós rétegekkel és önfigyelemmel rendelkező rétegekkel külön-külön tartására. A kódolt kontextus hatékony használata érdekében kifejlesztünk egy zárt figyelem fúziós modult, amelyet arra használunk, hogy automatikusan felvegyük a dekódolási lépés során szükséges információkat, ami egyben kettős útvonalú hálózat. A két út mélyreható integrációjával mindkét típusú információ kombinálódik és jól kiaknázható. A kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy javasolt módszerünk jelentősen javíthatja a szekvencia-szekvencia tanulás teljesítményét a korszerű rendszereken keresztül.', 'ka': 'კოდირების განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით განსაზღვრებით (S2S) ბოლო წლის შემდეგ მარტივი პროგრესი გავაკეთეთ. განსხვავებული ქსელის არქტიქტურები გამოყენებულია კოდერში/დეკოდერში. მათ შორის კონტუალური ნეიროლური ქსელები (CNN) და თავისუფალური გრძნობის ქსელები (SAN) არის მნიშვნელოვანი. ორი არქტიქტურები განსხვავებულ პროცენტურების შესაძლებლობა, მაგრამ გამოყენება ძალიან განსხვავებული გზები კონტექსტის კონტუქტურაციის და ევკოდის შესაძლებლობა: CNN გამოყენება კონტუქტურაციული ნა ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მუშაობით ეუბრალო გზის ქსელები სწავლებისთვის (DPN-S2S), რომლებიც ორივე მოდელების სამუშაო გამოყენებით ეუბრალო გზის ინფორმაციის ფუზიციის გამოყ ჩვენ კონფორმაციის ნაგულისხმების განმავლობაში, ჩვენ განვითარებთ ორივე გზის აქტიქტიქტიქტიქტიკაცია, რომ ინფორმაცია განსხვავებული გზებიდან გადარჩენა, რომელიც კონ ეფექტიურად კონტექსტის გამოყენებაში, ჩვენ შევქმნით დაახლოებით მოდულის ფუნქციის მოდულის და გამოყენებთ მას ავტომატურად გამოყენებთ ინფორმაციას, რომელიც საჭირო მოდულის ორი გეზის ძალიან ინტერგურაციით, ორი ტიპი ინფორმაციის კომბიზებულია და ძალიან გამოყენებულია. ექსპერიმენტები გამოჩვენება, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამა შეუძლია მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უ', 'it': "L'apprendimento Sequence to Sequence (S2S) basato su encoder-decoder ha fatto notevoli progressi negli ultimi anni. Diverse architetture di rete sono state utilizzate nell'encoder/decoder. Tra questi, le Reti Neurali Convoluzionali (CNN) e le Reti di Self Attention (SAN) sono le principali. Le due architetture raggiungono prestazioni simili ma utilizzano modi molto diversi per codificare e decodificare il contesto: CNN utilizza livelli convoluzionali per concentrarsi sulla connettività locale della sequenza, mentre SAN utilizza livelli di auto-attenzione per concentrarsi sulla semantica globale. In questo lavoro proponiamo Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence learning (DPN-S2S), che sfruttano i vantaggi di entrambi i modelli utilizzando la fusione di informazioni su doppio percorso. Durante la fase di codifica, sviluppiamo un'architettura a doppio percorso per mantenere le informazioni provenienti da percorsi diversi con livelli convoluzionali e livelli di auto-attenzione separatamente. Per utilizzare efficacemente il contesto codificato, sviluppiamo un modulo gated attention fusion e lo utilizziamo per raccogliere automaticamente le informazioni necessarie durante la fase di decodifica, che è anche una rete a doppio percorso. Integrando profondamente i due percorsi, entrambi i tipi di informazioni sono combinati e ben sfruttati. Gli esperimenti dimostrano che il nostro metodo proposto può migliorare significativamente le prestazioni dell'apprendimento sequenziale su sistemi all'avanguardia.", 'el': 'Η εκμάθηση ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία (έχει σημειώσει αξιοσημείωτη πρόοδο τα τελευταία χρόνια. Έχουν χρησιμοποιηθεί διαφορετικές αρχιτεκτονικές δικτύων στον κωδικοποιητή/αποκωδικοποιητή. Ανάμεσά τους, τα Σύλληλα Νευρικά Δίκτυα (CNN) και τα Δίκτυα Αυτοπροσοχής (SAN) είναι τα εξέχουσα. Οι δύο αρχιτεκτονικές επιτυγχάνουν παρόμοιες επιδόσεις αλλά χρησιμοποιούν πολύ διαφορετικούς τρόπους για την κωδικοποίηση και αποκωδικοποίηση του περιβάλλοντος: το CNN χρησιμοποιεί διασταλτικά στρώματα για να επικεντρωθεί στην τοπική συνδεσιμότητα της ακολουθίας, ενώ το χρησιμοποιεί στρώματα αυτοπροσοχής για να επικεντρωθεί στην παγκόσμια σημασιολογία. Στην παρούσα εργασία προτείνουμε δίκτυα διπλής διαδρομής για μάθηση διαδοχής σε ακολουθία (τα οποία αξιοποιούν τα πλεονεκτήματα και των δύο μοντέλων χρησιμοποιώντας συγχώνευση πληροφοριών διπλής διαδρομής. Κατά τη διάρκεια του βήματος κωδικοποίησης, αναπτύσσουμε μια αρχιτεκτονική διπλής διαδρομής για να διατηρήσουμε τις πληροφορίες που προέρχονται από διαφορετικές διαδρομές με τα στρώματα συστολής και τα στρώματα αυτοπροσοχής ξεχωριστά. Για να χρησιμοποιήσουμε αποτελεσματικά το κωδικοποιημένο πλαίσιο, αναπτύσσουμε μια ενότητα σύντηξης προσοχής και τη χρησιμοποιούμε για να πάρουμε αυτόματα τις πληροφορίες που απαιτούνται κατά τη διάρκεια του βήματος αποκωδικοποίησης, το οποίο είναι επίσης ένα δίκτυο διπλής διαδρομής. Με την βαθιά ενσωμάτωση των δύο διαδρομών, και οι δύο τύποι πληροφοριών συνδυάζονται και αξιοποιούνται καλά. Τα πειράματα δείχνουν ότι η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος μπορεί να βελτιώσει σημαντικά την απόδοση της μάθησης ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία σε συστήματα τελευταίας τεχνολογίας.', 'kk': 'Соңғы жылдарда кодтардың кодтарының негіздеген реттегі (S2S) оқыту ретінде белгілі жағдай жасады. Желі архитектуралары кодтамасы/декодтамасында қолданылды. Олардың арасындағы Конверсионалды нейрондық желі (CNN) және Өзінің қатынау желі (SAN) маңызды. Екі архитектуралар ұқсас істеу арқылы жеткізеді, бірақ контексті кодтау және декодтау арқылы өте әртүрлі жолдарды қолданыңыз: CNN соңындағы жергілікті қосылымдық қабаттарды қолданып, SAN жалпы семантикалық қаба Бұл жұмыстың ішінде біз реттеу оқыту үшін екі жол желілерін қосып, екі жол мәліметін біріктіру арқылы, екі үлгілердің артықшылығын көмектеседі. Кодтамасының қадамында біз қос жол архитектурасын құрамыз. Бұл мәліметті әртүрлі қабаттардан және өзіңізге қатынау қабаттары болып тұрады. Кодталған контексті қолдану үшін, біз қос жол желінде қажетті мәліметті автоматты түрде алу үшін қолданамыз. Екі жолды тереңнен біріктіру арқылы, екі түрлі мәлімет біріктірілген және қолданылады. Тәжірибелер біздің таңдалған әдіміміздің реттеу жүйелері бойынша оқыту үшін таңдау әдістерін өзгерте алады.', 'lt': 'Encoder-decoder based Sequence to Sequence learning (S2S) has made remarkable progress in recent years.  Koduojant ir (arba) dekoduojant naudojamos skirtingos tinklo architektūros. Ypač svarbi yra konvoliuciniai neurologiniai tinklai (CNN) ir savitarpio dėmesio tinklai (SAN). Abi architektūros pasiekia panašius rezultatus, tačiau naudoja labai skirtingus būdus koduoti ir dekoduoti kontekstą: CNN naudoja konvoliucinius sluoksnius, kad sutelktų dėmesį į vietos sekos jungiamumą, o SAN naudoja savarankišką dėmesį sluoksnius, kad sutelktų dėmesį į pasaulinę semantiką. Šiame darbe siūlome dvigubo kelio tinklus, skirtus sekos mokymuisi (DPN-S2S), kurie naudodami dvigubo kelio informacinę sintezę sutelkia abiejų modelių privalumus. Kodavimo etapo metu sukuriame dvigubo kelio architektūrą, kad išsaugotume informaciją, gautą iš skirtingų kelių su konvoliuciniais sluoksniais ir savarankiškumo sluoksniais atskirai. Kad būtų veiksmingai naudojamas koduotas kontekstas, sukuriame vartų dėmesio sintezės modulį ir jį naudojame automatiškai surinkti informaciją, reikalingą dekodinimo etape, kuris taip pat yra dvigubo kelio tinklas. By deeply integrating the two paths, both types of information are combined and well exploited.  Eksperimentai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomas metodas gali gerokai pagerinti mokymosi sekos rezultatus moderniausiose sistemose.', 'mk': 'Секвенцијата на учењето на секвенцијата (S2S) базирана на кодерот на декодерот постигна извонреден напредок во последните години. Различни мрежни архитектури се користат во кодерот/декодерот. Меѓу нив се истакнатите конволуционалните неврални мрежи (CNN) и Самовниманските мрежи (SAN). Двете архитектури постигнуваат слични изведби, но користат многу различни начини за кодирање и декодирање на контекст: ЦНН користи конволуционални слоеви за фокусирање на локалната поврзаност на секвенцијата, додека САН користи слоеви за самовнимание за фокусирање на глобалната семан Во оваа работа предложуваме двојни патишни мрежи за учење на секвенција (DPN-S2S), кои ги искористуваат предностите на двата модели со користење на информации за двојни патишта. За време на чекорот на кодирање, развиваме двојна архитектура за одржување на информациите кои доаѓаат од различни патишта со конволуционални слоеви и слоеви на самовнимание одделно. To effectively use the encoded context, we develop a gated attention fusion module and use it to automatically pick up the information needed during the decoding step, which is also a double path network.  Со длабоко интегрирање на двете патишта, двата вида информации се комбинирани и добро искористени. Експериментите покажуваат дека нашиот предложен метод може значително да ја подобри перформансата на секвенцата за секвенцирање на учењето преку најновите системи.', 'ms': 'Sejujukan pembelajaran Sejujukan berdasarkan penyekod-dekoder (S2S) telah membuat kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Arkitektur rangkaian berbeza telah digunakan dalam pengekod/dekoder. Di antara mereka, Rangkaian Neural Convolutional (CNN) dan Rangkaian Perhatian Sendiri (SAN) adalah yang terkenal. Kedua arkitektur mencapai penampilan yang sama tetapi menggunakan cara yang sangat berbeza untuk mengekod dan nyahkod konteks: CNN menggunakan lapisan konvolusi untuk fokus pada sambungan setempat urutan, sementara SAN menggunakan lapisan perhatian-diri untuk fokus pada semantik global. Dalam kerja ini kami cadangkan Rangkaian Laluan Dua untuk Pelajaran Kelajuan (DPN-S2S), yang menggunakan keuntungan kedua-dua model dengan menggunakan fusion maklumat laluan dua. Selama langkah pengekodan, kami mengembangkan arkitektur laluan ganda untuk menyimpan maklumat yang datang dari laluan yang berbeza dengan lapisan konvolusi dan lapisan perhatian diri secara terpisah. To effectively use the encoded context, we develop a gated attention fusion module and use it to automatically pick up the information needed during the decoding step, which is also a double path network.  Dengan mengintegrasikan kedua-dua laluan secara mendalam, kedua-dua jenis maklumat bergabung dan dikeluarkan dengan baik. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang kami cadangkan boleh meningkatkan prestasi urutan untuk urutan pembelajaran melalui sistem-sistem terbaik.', 'ml': 'അടുത്ത വര്\u200dഷങ്ങളില്\u200d സെക്കന്റ് പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സെക്കന്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി എന്\u200dകോഡെര്\u200d- ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസ് വ്യത്യസ്ത നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടുകള്\u200d കോഡെര്\u200d/ഡെകോഡെറില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അവരില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വയം ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്ന നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകളും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടവരാണ്. The two architectures achieve similar performances but use very different ways to encode and decode context: CNN use convolutional layers to focus on the local connectivity of the sequence, while SAN uses self-attention layers to focus on global semantics.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് പാത്ത് നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. സെക്കന്\u200dസ് വിദ്യാഭ്യാസത്തിന് വേണ്ടി സെക്കന്\u200dസിന്  എന്\u200dകോഡിങ്ങിന്\u200dറെ പടിയില്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത വഴികളില്\u200d നിന്ന് വരുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു പാതയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന് എന്\u200dകോഡിങ്ങ് കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റെക്സ്റ്റെക്റ്റ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഗാറ്റ് ചെയ്ത ശ്രദ്ധ ഫ്യൂഷന്\u200d ഘടകം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക് രണ്ടു വഴികളെ ആഴത്തോടെ കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, രണ്ട് തരം വിവരങ്ങളും ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d സെക്കന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ പ്രകടനത്തിന് പ്രധാ', 'no': 'Koder- dekoderbasert sekvens til sekvenslæring (S2S) har lagt merkelig framgang i siste år. Du har brukt ulike nettverksarkitekturar i kodaren/dekoderen. I tillegg til desse er konvolusjonelle neuralnettverk (CNN) og selvmerksnettverk (SAN) dei viktige. Dei to arkitekturane oppnår liknande utføringar, men bruk svært forskjellige måtar å koda og dekode konteksten: CNN bruk konvolusjonelle lag for å fokusera på den lokale tilkoplinga av sekvensen, mens SAN brukar selvmerkingslag for å fokusera på globale semantikk. I dette arbeidet foreslår vi dobbelt banesnettverk for sekvens til læring av sekvensar (DPN-S2S), som leverer fordelene til begge modeller ved å bruka dobbelt bansinformasjon. I løpet av teiknkodingsteget, utviklar vi ein dobbelt bane-arkitektur for å halda opp informasjonen som kommer frå ulike baner med konvolusjonelle lag og selvmerksomslag separat. For å bruka den koderte konteksten, utviklar vi ein tilfeldig oppmerksmodul for å få opp informasjonen nødvendig under dekoderingssteg, som også er ein dobbelt banettverk. Med dypt integrering av to bane er begge typar informasjon kombinert og godt eksplodert. Eksperimentar viser at vår foreslått metode kan betydelig forbedra utføringen av sekvens for å sekvensera læring over kunstsystemet.', 'mt': 'Is-Sequence to Sequence learning (S2S) ibbażata fuq id-dekodifikatur tal-kodiċi għamlet progress notevoli f’dawn l-aħħar snin. Different network architectures have been used in the encoder/decoder.  Fost dawn, in-Netwerks Newrali Konveoluzzjonali (CNN) u n-Netwerks ta’ Attenzjoni Awtoma (SAN) huma dawk prominenti. Iż-żewġ arkitetturi jiksbu prestazzjonijiet simili iżda jużaw modi differenti ħafna biex jikkodifikaw u jiddekodifikaw il-kuntest: is-CNN juża saffi konvoluzzjonali biex jiffokaw fuq il-konnettività lokali tas-sekwenza, filwaqt li s-SAN juża saffi ta’ awtonomija biex jiffoka fuq is-semantika globali. F’din il-ħidma qed nipproponu Netwerks Doppji ta’ Rotta għas-Sekwenza għat-Tagħlim tas-Sekwenza (DPN-S2S), li jiġġeneraw il-vantaġġi taż-żewġ mudelli billi jużaw fużjoni ta’ informazzjoni ta’ rotta doppja. Matul il-pass tal-kodifikazzjoni, a ħna niżviluppaw arkitettura ta’ rotta doppja biex inżammu l-informazzjoni li ġejja minn rotot differenti b’saffi konvoluzzjonali u saffi ta’ awtonomija separatament. To effectively use the encoded context, we develop a gated attention fusion module and use it to automatically pick up the information needed during the decoding step, which is also a double path network.  Permezz tal-integrazzjoni profonda taż-żewġ rotot, iż-żewġ tipi ta’ informazzjoni huma kkombinati u sfruttati tajjeb. L-esperimenti juru li l-metodu propost tagħna jista’ jtejjeb b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni tas-sekwenza għat-tagħlim tas-sekwenza fuq sistemi l-aktar avvanzati.', 'pl': 'Uczenie się sekwencji do sekwencji (S2S) oparte na koderze poczyniło w ostatnich latach znaczące postępy. W koderze/dekoderze zastosowano różne architektury sieci. Wśród nich najważniejsze są Konwolucyjne Sieci Neuralne (CNN) i Sieci Self Attention (SAN). Obie architektury osiągają podobne wydajności, ale używają bardzo różnych sposobów kodowania i dekodowania kontekstu: CNN używa warstw konwolucyjnych, aby skupić się na lokalnej łączności sekwencji, podczas gdy SAN wykorzystuje warstwy uwagi na siebie, aby skupić się na globalnej semantyce. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy sieci podwójnej ścieżki dla uczenia się sekwencji do sekwencji (DPN-S2S), które wykorzystują zalety obu modeli poprzez wykorzystanie podwójnej fuzji informacji. Podczas etapu kodowania opracowujemy architekturę podwójnej ścieżki, aby utrzymywać informacje pochodzące z różnych ścieżek z warstwami konwolucyjnymi i warstwami własnej uwagi osobno. Aby skutecznie wykorzystać zakodowany kontekst, opracowujemy gated attention fusion moduł i używamy go do automatycznego odbierania informacji potrzebnych podczas kroku dekodowania, który jest również siecią dwuścieżkową. Dzięki głębokiej integracji tych dwóch ścieżek oba rodzaje informacji są łączone i dobrze wykorzystywane. Eksperymenty pokazują, że proponowana przez nas metoda może znacznie poprawić wydajność uczenia się sekwencji do sekwencji w stosunku do najnowocześniejszych systemów.', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн жилүүдэд кодлогч нарын үндсэн дарааллын суралцах (S2S) нь гайхалтай хөгжлийг хийсэн. Өөр өөр сүлжээний архитектурууд кодлогч/кодлогч дээр хэрэглэгдсэн. Тэднээс хамгийн чухал мэдрэлийн сэтгэл зүйн сүлжээ (CNN) болон өөрийн анхаарлын сүлжээ (SAN). Хоёр архитектурууд адилхан үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг гэхдээ өөр өөр арга хэрэглэдэг: CNN-ийн хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой хол Энэ ажил дээр бид хоёр загварын давхар мэдээллийн нийлүүлэлтийг ашиглан хоёр загварын давхар ашиглах хоёр давхар загварын шилжүүлэлтийг санал болгож байна. Кодлох алхам үед бид хоёр дахин замын архитектурыг хөгжүүлж, өөр замын алхам болон өөр анхаарлын давхартай мэдээллийг хадгалах боломжтой. Үнэндээ кодлогдсон байдлыг ашиглахын тулд бид цуглуулсан анхаарал цуглуулах модуль үүнийг автоматжуулахын тулд хэрэгтэй мэдээллийг автоматжуулахын тулд ашиглаж байна. Энэ нь хоёр замын сүлжээ юм. Хоёр замыг гүн гүнзгий нэгтгэхэд мэдээллийн хоёр төрлийн мэдээллийг нийлүүлж, сайн ашигладаг. Түүнчлэл бидний санал өгсөн арга нь урлагийн системийн хувьд суралцах үйл ажиллагааны үр дүнг илүү сайжруулж чадна.', 'ro': 'Învățarea secvenței la secvență (S2S) bazată pe encoder-decoder a făcut progrese remarcabile în ultimii ani. Diferite arhitecturi de rețea au fost utilizate în encoder / decoder. Printre acestea, Rețelele Neurale Convoluționale (CNN) și Rețelele de Auto Atenție (SAN) sunt cele proeminente. Cele două arhitecturi obțin performanțe similare, dar utilizează modalități foarte diferite de codificare și decodare a contextului: CNN folosește straturi convoluționale pentru a se concentra pe conectivitatea locală a secvenței, în timp ce SAN folosește straturi de auto-atenție pentru a se concentra pe semantica globală. În această lucrare propunem rețele de cale dublă pentru învățarea secvenței la secvență (DPN-S2S), care valorifică avantajele ambelor modele prin utilizarea fuziunii informațiilor de cale dublă. În timpul etapei de codificare, dezvoltăm o arhitectură de cale dublă pentru a menține informațiile provenind din diferite căi cu straturi convoluționale și straturi de auto-atenție separat. Pentru a utiliza în mod eficient contextul codificat, dezvoltăm un modul de fuziune a atenției închise și îl folosim pentru a colecta automat informațiile necesare în timpul etapei de decodare, care este, de asemenea, o rețea de cale dublă. Prin integrarea profundă a celor două căi, ambele tipuri de informații sunt combinate și bine exploatate. Experimentele arată că metoda noastră propusă poate îmbunătăți semnificativ performanța de învățare secvențială la secvență peste sisteme de ultimă generație.', 'sr': 'Za poslednje godine, sekvencija učenja sekvence (S2S) osnovana na koderu-dekoderu postigla je izuzetan napredak. Razne mrežne arhitekture su korištene u koderu/dekoderu. Među njima su konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN) i samopouzdane mreže (SAN) poznati. Dvije arhitekture postižu slične izvode, ali koriste veoma različite načine za kodiranje i dekodiranje konteksta: CNN koristi konvolucione slojeve da se fokusiraju na lokalnu povezanost sekvence, dok SAN koristi slojeve samopouzdanja da se fokusiraju na globalne semantike. U ovom poslu predlažemo dvostruke mreže za sekvenciju učenja sekvence (DPN-S2S), koje utiču na prednost oba modela koristeći kombinaciju informacija o dvostrukom putu. Tokom koraka kodiranja, razvijamo dvostruku arhitekturu puta kako bi održali informacije koje dolaze iz različitih puteva sa konvolucionalnim slojevima i slojevima samopouzdanja odvojeno. Da bi efikasno iskoristili kodirani kontekst, razvili smo modul fuzije pažnje i koristili ga da bi automatski pokupili potrebne informacije tokom koraka dekodiranja, koja je takođe dvostruka mreža putovanja. Duboko integrisanjem dva puta, obje vrste informacija su kombinirane i dobro iskorištavane. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi metod može značajno poboljšati učenje sekvence u sekvenciji učenja nad državnim umjetničkim sistemima.', 'so': "Sannadihii ugu dambeeyey waxaa la soo baxay codcoder-coder-based Sequence to Sequence waxbarasho (S2S). Arkitiyeyaasha shabakada kala duduwan waxaa lagu isticmaalay codsiga/codcodsiga. Qaarkood waxaa ka mid ah Internetka Neural Network (CNN) iyo Self Attention Network (SAN) waa kuwa maaruf. Labada dhismaha waxay gaadhaan bandhigyo la mid ah, laakiin waxay isticmaalaan qaabo kala duduwan si aad u kooban karto iyo codcod-dhigidda: CNN wuxuu isticmaalaa xariirka caalamiga ah si aad ugu kalsoonaato xiriirka deegaanka, marka SAN wuxuu isticmaalaa iskuul-attention-layers si uu ugu focuseeyo semantika caalamiga ah. Markaas waxan ayaannu u soo jeedaynaa Internetka Dubbel Path for Sequence to Sequence waxbarasho (DPN-S2S), kaas oo ku fidiya faa'iidada labada model by using fusion information labaad. Marka lagu jiro tallaabo codsiga, waxaynu horumarinaa dhismo wadan labanlaab ah si aan u ilaalinayno macluumaadka ka soo socda waddooyinka kala duduwan oo ay gooni u leeyihiin qasnadaha rasmiga ah iyo iskuulka. Si faa’iido ah ayaannu u isticmaalno kooxeedka, waxaynu horumarinnaa qalabka warqada fuusha islamarkaasna waxaynu isticmaalnaa si aan automatic u qaadano macluumaadka loo baahan yahay marka tallaabada deynta, kaas oo ah shabakadda jidadka labanlaabka ah. Si deegaan u wada qabsashada labada waddoo, labada nooc oo macluumaad ah waa la isku darsadaa oo si wanaagsan loo isticmaalaa. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqanaya in qaabkeenkeennu uu soo jeeday ay ay si aad u hagaajin karto dhamaadka xiliga waxbarashada nidaamka farshaxanka.", 'sv': 'Encoder-dekoder baserad Sequence to Sequence Learning (S2S) har gjort anmärkningsvärda framsteg under de senaste åren. Olika nätverksarkitekturer har använts i kodaren/avkodaren. Bland dem är konvulutionsneurala nätverk (CNN) och Self Attention Networks (SAN) de framträdande. De två arkitekturerna uppnår liknande prestanda men använder mycket olika sätt att koda och avkoda kontext: CNN använder konvulutionella lager för att fokusera på den lokala anslutningen av sekvensen, medan SAN använder självuppmärksamhetslager för att fokusera på global semantik. I detta arbete föreslår vi Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence learning (DPN-S2S), som utnyttjar fördelarna med båda modellerna genom att använda dubbel väg informationsfusion. Under kodningssteget utvecklar vi en dubbelspårsarkitektur för att upprätthålla informationen från olika banor med konvulutionslager och självuppmärksamhetslager separat. För att effektivt kunna använda det kodade sammanhanget utvecklar vi en gated attention fusionsmodul och använder den för att automatiskt plocka upp den information som behövs under avkodningssteget, vilket också är ett dubbelvägsnätverk. Genom att integrera de två vägarna på djupet kombineras och utnyttjas båda typerna av information väl. Experiment visar att vår föreslagna metod avsevärt kan förbättra prestandan av sekvens till sekvensinlärning över state-of-the-art system.', 'si': 'පසුගින් අවුරුද්දේවල් සිද්ධිය සිදුවීමට සංකේතකය- ඩිකොඩර් ආධාරණය කරලා තියෙනවා. වෙනස් ජාලය ස්ථාපනය භාවිතා කරලා තියෙන්නේ. ඔවුන්ගෙන් අතර, සම්පූර්ණ න්\u200dයූරාල් ජාලය (CNN) සහ ස්වයංග්\u200dරහණ ජාලය (SAN) තමයි ප්\u200dරධානයි. ස්ථාපනය දෙකයි වගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා නමුත් වෙනස් විදියට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න: CNN සඳහා ස්ථානික සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා  මේ වැඩේ අපි දෙප්පාත් වාර්තාව සඳහා ක්\u200dරමයක් ඉගෙනීම (DPN-S2S) වෙනුවෙන් දෙප්පාත් වාර්තාව සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා @ info: whatsthis සම්පූර්ණයෙන්ම සංකේතය භාවිතා කරන්න, අපි ගැට් අවධානය සම්පූර්ණය මොඩියුල් එකක් විස්තර කරනවා ඒක ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන මාර්ගය දෙකක් ගොඩක් සංවිධානය කරන්න, තොරතුරු වර්ගය දෙකක් සංවිධානය සහ හොඳටම ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනව පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් අපේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විද්\u200dයාව විශේෂ කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂයෙන් පරීක්ෂණ පද්ධත', 'ur': 'اس کے اگلے سالوں میں بہت اچھی پیشرفت کر رہی ہے۔ اکڈر/ڈیکوڈر میں مختلف نیٹ ورک معماری استعمال کئے گئے ہیں. ان میں سے معلوم ترین نیورال نیٹورک (سین ان) اور اپنا ذهن نیٹورک (سین ان) ہیں۔ دو معماری مشابہ طریقوں کو پہنچا رہے ہیں لیکن مختلف طریقوں کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ کنٹنسیٹ کو کوڈ اور ڈیکوڈ کریں: سی ان ان کی کنٹنسیٹ کے محلی اتصال کی کونسیٹی پر استعمال کرتا ہے، حالانکہ سی ان کی اپنی توجه لہروں کو گلوبی سی منٹیٹ اس کام میں ہم سکوئنس کی تعلیم (DPN-S2S) کے لئے دوبل پیٹ نیٹورک پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو دونوں نمڈلوں کے فائدے کو دوبل پیٹ معلومات فوجین کے مطابق استعمال کرتے ہیں۔ اور ہم ایک دوگنا مسیر معماری بنا رہے ہیں جو مختلف مسیروں سے آتے ہیں اور مختلف طبقات کے ساتھ آتے ہیں اور اپنی ذات سے متوجہ طبقات کے ساتھ مختلف طبقات کے ساتھ آتے ہیں۔ اکنوڈ کنٹیکسٹ کا استعمال کرنا، ہم نے ایک گٹ ڈیٹ ڈیٹ فوجین موڈل ایجاد کرلیا ہے اور اسے اپنے ساتھ استعمال کریں کہ دکوڈ سٹپٹ میں ضروری کی اطلاعات اٹھائے، جو دوبل مسیر نیٹ ورک ہے. دو مسیروں کو عمیق ترکیب کے ذریعہ، دونوں قسموں کی اطلاعات متصل ہوتی ہیں اور اچھی طرح استعمال ہوتی ہیں. تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ سیستموں پر سیکھنے کی سفارش کا عملہ بہتر کر سکتی ہے۔', 'ta': 'அண்மைய வருடங்களில் குறியீட்டாளர் அடிப்படையான தொடர்பு வேறு வலைப்பின்னல் உருவாக்கிகள் குறியீடு/குறியீட்டில் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்டது. அவர்களில் சிலர், தொடர்பு நெருக்கர் வலைப்பின்னல்கள் (CNN) மற்றும் சார்ந்த கவனிப்பு வலைப்பின்னல்கள் (SAN) மிகப்பெரியது. இந்த இரண்டு அட்டவணைகள் அதே போன்ற செயல்களை அடைக்கும் ஆனால் குறியீட்டு மற்றும் குறியீட்டு சூழலை மிகவும் வேறு வழிகளை பயன்படுத்துக: CNN பயன்படுத்தி தொடர்பின் உள்ளூர்ந இந்த வேலையில் நாம் இரட்டை பாதையின் வலைப்பின்னல்களை தொடர்ந்து கற்றுக்கொள்ள வேண்டும் வரிசையில் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது இரு பாதை தக குறிமுறையாக்கும் படியில், நாம் ஒரு இரட்டை பாதையை உருவாக்குகிறோம், வேறு பாதைகளிலிருந்து வரும் தகவலை பாதுகாக்குவதற்கு,  குறியாக்கப்பட்ட சூழலை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டுமானால், நாம் ஒரு குறிப்பிட்ட கவனம் குறியீட்டு பாதையை உருவாக்கி மற்றும் குறியீட்டு படியில இரண்டு பாதைகளை ஆழமாக ஒருங்கிணைக்கும் மூலம், இரண்டு வகையான தகவல்களும் ஒன்று சேர்க்கப்பட்டுள்ளன. முயற்சிகள் தெரியும் என்றால் எங்கள் முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் வரிசையின் செயல்முறையை மேம்படுத்த முடியும்.', 'uz': "Name Name Ularning orasidagi kompyuterning Neural Tarmoqlari (CNN) va o'zingiz taʼminlovchi tarmoqlar (SAN) eng katta katta narsalar. @ info Ushbu vazifani biz ikki yoʻl tarmoq tarmoqni davom etish uchun davom etaymiz. Uni ikkita yoʻl maʼlumot fuqarishdan foydalanish mumkin. Kodlash usuli davomida biz bir necha yoʻl arxituvchi muammolarni boshqa yo'llardan keladigan maʼlumotni ajratish uchun bir necha yoʻl muammolar va o'zimni boshqa qatlardan boshqa qatlam bilan alohida qarish uchun yaramiz. Kodlash usulidan foydalanish uchun biz bir marta murakkab paydo fusion modulini yaratish va uni avtomatik kodlash usulida foydalanish uchun foydalanamiz. Bu ikki yoʻl tarmoq. Ikkita yoʻl bilan eng yaxshi birlashtirish uchun ikkita tur maʼlumot birlashtirilgan va yaxshi ishlatiladi. Tajribalar esa taʼminlovchi usullarni o'rganish davlat tizimi davomida o'rganishni o'rganish imkoniyatini juda muhim oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Đã có tiến triển đáng kể trong những năm gần đây. Các cấu trúc mạng khác nhau đã được dùng trong bộ mã hóa. Trong số đó, mạng lưới thần kinh có liên kết (CNN) và mạng chú ý tự động (SAN) là những công cụ quan trọng. Hai kiến trúc đạt được trình độ tương tự nhưng dùng cách rất khác nhau để mã hóa và giải ngữ cảnh: CNN dùng các lớp xoắn ốc để tập trung vào kết nối cục bộ của chuỗi, trong khi SAN sử dụng các lớp tự chú ý để tập trung vào ngữ pháp to àn cầu. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất Mạng Đường Gấp đôi để quyết định hậu quả học quyền lặp: DN-S2S, làm thế dựa trên lợi của cả hai mô hình bằng cách sử dụng tổng hợp thông tin đường kép. Trong giai đoạn mã hóa, chúng tôi phát triển một cấu trúc đường kép để duy trì thông tin đến từ các đường khác nhau với các lớp xoắn ốc và lớp tự chú ý riêng. Để có hiệu quả sử dụng nội dung được mã hóa, chúng tôi phát triển một mô- đun nhiệt trí chú ý cách nhiệt đới và sử dụng nó để tự động thu thập thông tin cần thiết trong thời gian giải mã, cũng là một mạng lưới đường hai chiều. Bằng cách nhập sâu vào hai phương pháp, cả hai thông tin đều được kết hợp và được khai thác tốt. Các thí nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta có thể cải thiện hiệu quả của chuỗi thành chuỗi học qua các hệ thống hiện đại.', 'bg': 'Научаването на последователност към последователност (S2S) е постигнало забележителен напредък през последните години. В кодера/декодера са използвани различни мрежови архитектури. Сред тях са конволюционните неврални мрежи (ЦНС) и мрежите за самовнимание (САН). Двете архитектури постигат сходни изпълнения, но използват много различни начини за кодиране и декодиране на контекста: използват конволюционни слоеве, за да се фокусират върху локалната свързаност на последователността, докато използва слоеве на самовнимание, за да се фокусира върху глобалната семантика. В тази работа предлагаме двойни мрежи за последователност към последователност обучение (които използват предимствата на двата модела чрез използване на двоен път информационен синтез. По време на етапа на кодиране разработваме архитектура на двоен път, за да поддържаме информацията, идваща от различни пътища с конволюционни слоеве и слоеве на самовнимание поотделно. За ефективно използване на кодирания контекст, ние разработваме модул за синтез на вниманието затворено и го използваме за автоматично събиране на информацията, необходима по време на етапа на декодиране, която също е мрежа с двоен път. Чрез дълбоко интегриране на двата пътя и двата вида информация се комбинират и използват добре. Експериментите показват, че нашият предложен метод може значително да подобри ефективността на последователност към последователност обучение чрез най-съвременни системи.', 'hr': 'Za posljednje godine učenje sekvence učenja (S2S) osnovana na kodiranju dekodera ostvarila je izuzetan napredak. U koderu/dekoderu se koriste različite arhitekture mreže. Među njima su konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN) i samopouzdane mreže (SAN) poznati. Dvije arhitekture postignu slične učinke, ali koriste vrlo različite načine za kodiranje i dekodiranje konteksta: CNN koristi konvolucione slojeve da se fokusiraju na lokalnu povezanost sekvence, dok SAN koristi slojeve samopouzdanja da se fokusiraju na globalne semantike. U ovom poslu predlažemo dvostruke mreže za učenje sekvence do sekvence (DPN-S2S), koje utiču na prednost oba modela koristeći kombinaciju informacija o dvostrukom putu. Tijekom koraka kodiranja, razvijamo dvostruku arhitekturu puta kako bi održali informacije koje dolaze iz različitih puteva sa konvolucionalnim slojevima i slojevima samopouzdanja odvojeno. Da bismo učinkovito koristili kodirani kontekst, razvijali smo modul fuzije prikupljenog pažnje i koristili ga da bi automatski pokupili potrebne informacije tijekom koraka dekodiranja, što je također i dvostruka mreža putovanja. Duboko integriranjem dva puta, obje vrste informacija su kombinirane i dobro iskorištavane. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naš predloženi metod može značajno poboljšati učenje sekvencije u sekvenciji učenja nad državnim umjetničkim sustavima.', 'nl': 'Sequence to Sequence learning (S2S) heeft de afgelopen jaren opmerkelijke vooruitgang geboekt. In de encoder/decoder zijn verschillende netwerkarchitecturen gebruikt. Onder hen zijn Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) en Self Attention Networks (SAN) de prominente netwerken. De twee architecturen bereiken vergelijkbare prestaties, maar gebruiken zeer verschillende manieren om context te coderen en te decoderen: CNN gebruikt convolutionele lagen om zich te focussen op de lokale connectiviteit van de reeks, terwijl SAN zelfattentielagen gebruikt om zich te focussen op globale semantiek. In dit werk stellen we Double Path Networks voor Sequence to Sequence Learning (DPN-S2S) voor, die de voordelen van beide modellen benutten door gebruik te maken van dubbele pad informatie fusie. Tijdens de coderingsstap ontwikkelen we een dubbele padarchitectuur om de informatie die afkomstig is van verschillende paden met convolutionele lagen en zelfattentielagen apart te houden. Om de gecodeerde context effectief te gebruiken, ontwikkelen we een gated attention fusion module en gebruiken deze om automatisch de informatie op te pikken die nodig is tijdens de decoderingsstap, wat ook een dubbel pad netwerk is. Door de twee paden diep te integreren, worden beide soorten informatie gecombineerd en goed benut. Experimenten tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde methode de prestaties van sequence to sequence learning aanzienlijk kan verbeteren over state-of-the-art systemen.', 'da': 'Encoder-dekoder baseret Sequence to Sequence learning (S2S) har gjort bemærkelsesværdige fremskridt i de seneste år. Forskellige netværksarkitekturer er blevet brugt i encoder/dekoder. Blandt dem er Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) og Self Attention Networks (SAN) de fremtrædende. De to arkitekturer opnår lignende præstationer, men bruger meget forskellige måder at kode og afkode kontekst på: CNN bruger konvulutionslag til at fokusere på den lokale forbindelse af sekvensen, mens SAN bruger selvopmærksomhedslag til at fokusere på global semantik. I dette arbejde foreslår vi Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence learning (DPN-S2S), som udnytter fordelene ved begge modeller ved at bruge Double Path information fusion. Under kodningstrin udvikler vi en dobbelt sti arkitektur til at opretholde de oplysninger, der kommer fra forskellige stier med konvulutionslag og selvopmærksomhedslag separat. For effektivt at bruge den kodede kontekst udvikler vi et gated attention fusionsmodul og bruger det til automatisk at opsamle de oplysninger, der er nødvendige under afkodningstrin, som også er et dobbelt sti netværk. Ved dybt at integrere de to veje kombineres begge typer oplysninger og udnyttes godt. Eksperimenter viser, at vores foreslåede metode kan forbedre ydeevnen af sekvens til sekvens læring væsentligt over state-of-the-art systemer.', 'de': 'Encoder-Decoder basiertes Sequence to Sequence Learning (S2S) hat in den letzten Jahren bemerkenswerte Fortschritte gemacht. Im Encoder/Decoder wurden verschiedene Netzwerkarchitekturen verwendet. Unter ihnen sind Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) und Self Attention Networks (SAN) die prominenten. Die beiden Architekturen erzielen ähnliche Leistungen, verwenden jedoch sehr unterschiedliche Wege, um Kontext zu kodieren und zu dekodieren: CNN verwendet Faltungsschichten, um sich auf die lokale Konnektivität der Sequenz zu konzentrieren, während SAN Self-Attention-Layer verwendet, um sich auf globale Semantik zu konzentrieren. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir Double Path Networks für Sequence to Sequence Learning (DPN-S2S) vor, die die Vorteile beider Modelle durch die Verwendung von Double Path Information Fusion nutzen. Während des Codierungsschritts entwickeln wir eine Doppelpfad-Architektur, um die Informationen aus verschiedenen Pfaden mit Faltungsebenen und Selbstaufmerksamkeitsschichten getrennt zu halten. Um den kodierten Kontext effektiv zu nutzen, entwickeln wir ein gated attention fusion modul und nutzen es, um automatisch die Informationen aufzunehmen, die während des Dekodierungsschritts benötigt werden, was auch ein Doppelpfadnetzwerk ist. Durch die tiefe Integration beider Wege werden beide Arten von Informationen kombiniert und gut genutzt. Experimente zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagene Methode die Leistung von Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Lernen über modernste Systeme signifikant verbessern kann.', 'ko': '인코더-디코더 기반의 시퀀스 간 학습(S2S)은 최근 몇 년 동안 현저한 진전을 거두었다.인코더 / 디코더에는 서로 다른 네트워크 구조가 사용되었다.이 가운데 볼륨신경망(CNN)과 자기주의망(SAN)이 두드러진 두 가지다.이 두 가지 구조는 비슷한 성능을 실현했지만 매우 다른 방식으로 상하문을 인코딩하고 디코딩했다. CNN은 권적층을 사용하여 서열의 국부적 연결성을 주목하고 SAN은 자기관심층을 사용하여 전체적인 의미를 주목한다.이 작업에서 우리는 서열 학습에 사용되는 이중 경로 네트워크(DPN-S2S)를 제시했는데 이중 경로 정보 융합을 통해 두 모델의 장점을 이용한다.인코딩 단계에서 우리는 이중 경로 구조를 개발하여 각각 권적층과 자기주의층을 이용하여 서로 다른 경로에서 온 정보를 유지했다.인코딩의 상하문을 효과적으로 이용하기 위해 우리는 문 제어 주의 융합 모듈을 개발하고 이를 사용하여 디코딩 절차에 필요한 정보를 자동으로 추출한다. 이것도 이중 경로 네트워크이다.이 두 가지 경로를 깊이 있게 통합함으로써 두 가지 유형의 정보가 모두 결합되고 충분히 이용되었다.실험에 의하면 기존 시스템에 비해 본고가 제시한 방법은 서열 간 학습의 성능을 현저하게 향상시킬 수 있다.', 'id': 'Sequence to Sequence learning (S2S) berdasarkan kode-decoder telah membuat kemajuan yang luar biasa dalam tahun-tahun terakhir. Arkitektur jaringan berbeda telah digunakan dalam pengekode/dekoder. Di antara mereka, Networks Neural Convolutional (CNN) dan Self-Attention Networks (SAN) adalah yang terkenal. Kedua arsitektur mencapai prestasi yang sama tetapi menggunakan cara yang sangat berbeda untuk mengkode dan mengkode konteks: CNN menggunakan lapisan konvolusi untuk fokus pada konektivitas lokal dari urutan, sementara SAN menggunakan lapisan perhatian diri untuk fokus pada semantik global. Dalam pekerjaan ini kami mengusulkan Rangkaian Laluan Dua untuk Sequence to Sequence learning (DPN-S2S), yang menguntungkan keuntungan kedua model dengan menggunakan dual path information fusion. Selama langkah pengekodan, kami mengembangkan arsitektur jalur ganda untuk mempertahankan informasi yang datang dari jalur yang berbeda dengan lapisan konvolusi dan lapisan perhatian diri secara terpisah. To effectively use the encoded context, we develop a gated attention fusion module and use it to automatically pick up the information needed during the decoding step, which is also a double path network.  Dengan mendalam mengintegrasi dua jalan, kedua jenis informasi dikombinasikan dan dieksploitasi dengan baik. Eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa metode kami yang diusulkan dapat meningkatkan prestasi urutan untuk urutan belajar melalui sistem state-of-the-art.', 'fa': 'در سال های اخیر پیشرفت قابل توجه به تعلیم سطح\u200cهای سطح (S2S) بر اساس رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cها انجام داده است. معماری\u200cهای شبکه متفاوتی در رمزگذاری/dekoder استفاده شده\u200cاند. در میان آنها، شبکه\u200cهای عصبی (CNN) و شبکه\u200cهای حوادث خود (SAN) بزرگترند. دو معمار به اجرای مشابه رسیده است ولی از راه های بسیار متفاوتی برای رمزبندی و دکود کنترل استفاده می\u200cکند: CNN از لایه\u200cهای کنترل استفاده می\u200cکند تا روی ارتباطی محلی از ترکیب کنترل شود، در حالی که SAN از لایه\u200cهای خودتوجه برای تمرکز روی سیمانتیک جه ما در این کار شبکه های مسیر دوبرابر برای تعلیم تعلیم سطح (DPN-S2S) پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که سودهایی هر دو مدل را با استفاده از مجموعه اطلاعات دوبرابر مسیر تأثیر می\u200cدهد. در طول قدم رمزبندی، ما یک معماری دوبرابر مسیر توسعه می\u200cکنیم تا اطلاعات را از راه\u200cهای مختلف با لایه\u200cهای متفاوتی و لایه\u200cهای خودتوجه جدا نگه داریم. برای استفاده از موقعیت\u200cهای کودک\u200cشده، ما یک موقعیت متصل توجه را توسعه می\u200cکنیم و از آن استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا اطلاعات لازم در طول قدم\u200cهای کودک\u200cبندی را خودکار برگیریم، که همچنین شبکه دو راه است. با عمیق ترکیب دو راه، هر دو نوع اطلاعات ترکیب می\u200cشوند و خوب استفاده می\u200cشوند. تجربه\u200cها نشان می\u200cدهند که روش پیشنهاد ما می\u200cتواند عملکرد ترکیب\u200cها را برای تعلیم یادگیری بر سیستم\u200cهای دولتی هنر بسیار بهتر کند.', 'af': "Enkoder- dekoder gebaseerde Sewensie na Sewensieleer (S2S) het betekeurige vordering gemaak in onlangse jaar. Verskillende netwerk arkitekturke is gebruik in die enkoder/dekoder. onder hulle is die geweldige neurale netwerke (CNN) en Self-aandagnetwerke (SAN) die prominente. Die twee arkitektuurs het gelyke uitvoerings bereik, maar gebruik baie verskillende maniere om konteks te kodeer en dekode: CNN gebruik konvolusiele lage om fokus te maak op die plaaslike konnektiviteit van die volgorde, terwyl SAN self-aandag laag gebruik om fokus te maak op globale semantieke. In hierdie werk voorstel ons Dubbel Pad Netwerke vir Sekvensie na Sekvense Lêer (DPN- S2S), wat die voordekende van beide modele verwyder deur dubbel pad inligting fussie te gebruik. In die enkodering stap, ontwikkel ons 'n dubbel pad arkitektuur om die inligting van verskillende paaie te hou met konvolusiele laagte en self-aandag laagte indien. Om effektief die enkodeerde konteks te gebruik, ontwikkel ons 'n gated aandag fuisie module en gebruik dit om outomaties die inligting wat benodig is tydens die dekodeerde stap te haal, wat is ook 'n dubbel pad netwerk. Deur diep die twee paaie te integreer, word beide tipes inligting gekombineer en goed uitgebruik. Eksperimente wys dat ons voorgestelde metode betekenlik die prestasie van sekvensie kan verbeter om sekvensie leer oor staat van die kunstenstelsels te volgorde.", 'sw': 'Mfumo wa kufunua mfululizo wa kujifunza kwa mfululizo (S2S) umefanya maendeleo mazuri katika miaka ya hivi karibuni. Mahakama tofauti ya mtandao imetumiwa kwenye kodi/decoder. Miongoni mwao, Mtandao wa Neural unaojitolea (CNN) na Mtandao wa Kujitegemea (SAN) ni maarufu. Viwanda viwili vya majengo vinaweza kutekeleza maonyesho yanayofanana lakini vinatumia njia tofauti za kutambua na kupunguza muktadha: CNN hutumia vipengele vya kimataifa kwa lengo la kuunganisha mitandao ya eneo hilo, wakati SAN inatumia vipande vya kujitegemea kujichunguza kwenye mitandao ya kimataifa. In this work we propose Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence learning (DPN-S2S), which leverage the advantages of both models by using double path information fusion.  Wakati wa hatua ya kutangaza, tunajenga ujenzi wa njia mbili ili kuendelea taarifa zinazotoka katika njia tofauti na vipande vya utata na kujitegemea tofauti. Ili kutumia mazingira yaliyoandikwa kwa ufanisi, tunatengeneza kituo cha uchunguzi na kutumia ili kujichukua taarifa zinazohitajika wakati wa hatua ya kupunguza, ambacho pia ni mtandao wa njia mbili. Kwa kuunganisha njia mbili za kina, aina zote za taarifa zinaunganishwa na kutumika vizuri. Majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa inaweza kuboresha ufanisi wa mfumo wa mfumo wa sanaa kwa ajili ya kujifunza kwa mfumo wa hali ya mambo.', 'am': "የቀድሞው ዓመታት ውስጥ የሆኑት የሆኑት የሆኑት የሆኑት የሆኑት የኮድ-ኮድ ምርጫዎች ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s ከእነዚህም መካከል፣ የነፃ መረብ (CNN) እና የራሳቸው ትኩረት መረብ (SAN) ታላላቆቹ ናቸው፡፡ ሁለቱ የመሠረተኞቹ አካባቢዎች ብጤ አካባቢዎችን እንዲያገኙ ነገር ግን ለኮድ እና ለኮድ ማክሰል በጣም የተለየ መንገዶችን ይጠይቃሉ: CNN በአካባቢው ግንኙነት ላይ ለመጠቀም እና በዓለምአቀፍ ስምናን ላይ ማጠቃቀሚያ ለመጠየቅ ተጠቃሚ ደረጃዎችን ይጠቀቃሉ፡፡ በዚህ ስራ የሁለት መንገድ መረጃዎችን ለመግለጽ (DPN-S2S) የሚጠቅመውን የሁለቱን ዓይነቶች ጥቅሞችን በሁለት መንገድ የመረጃ መረጃን በመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በኮድ አካሄዱ ውስጥ የተለያየ ደረጃዎች እና የራሳቸውን ምርጫዎች በተለየ ደረጃዎች የመጣውን መረጃ ለመጠበቅ የሁለት እጥፍ መንገድ መሠረት እናደርጋለን፡፡ የጽሑፉ ጽሑፍ ለመጠቀም፣ የድምፅ ጉዳይ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ ሁለቱን መንገዶች በጥልቅ በመቀላቀል፣ ሁለቱም የመረጃ ዓይነቶች በተሰበሰቡ እና በመልካም ተጠቃቀሙ፡፡ ፈተናዎች የሥርዓት-የ-አርእስት ስርዓት ላይ ትምህርትን ለመግለጥ የሚችሉትን ሥርዓት ማድረግ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡", 'tr': 'S2S soňky ýyllarda öwrenme üçin ködleme taýýarlanan sıralar öwrenmesine mühüm ýetişdirdi. Aýry enkoder/dekoderde beýleki arhitektarlar ullanylar. Olaryň arasynda, Eýratyn Neural Networks (CNN) we Öz Attention Networks (SAN) möhüm. Iki arhitektura ýaly çykyş eserlerini ýetip bilýär ýöne dünýäb semantika üstine fokus etmek üçin örän farklı yönlerden ullan: CNN ködleme gatlaklary daýlamak üçin ýerli baglanyşlyklary ulanýar. Bu işde çift yol maglumaty birleşdirmek üçin çift yol netijesini (DPN-S2S) süýtgedýäris. Ködleme a ýratynda, biz iki gezek ýoldan arhitektura baglaşýarys. Çeşitli ýoldan bäri ylalaşyk we özüne üns berilýän gatlaklary aýratynda saglamak üçin. Name Iki ýolyň derinliklerini birleşdirmek bilen, her iki hili maglumat birleştirilýär we gowy ulanylýar. Denminatlar biziň teklip eden metodumyzyň sanat sistemalarynda öwrenmek üçin hatlaryň üstüni gowurap biljekdigini görkezýär.', 'sq': 'Sequence to Sequence learning (S2S) based on encoder-decoder has made remarkable progress in recent years. Different network architectures have been used in the encoder/decoder.  Midis tyre, rrjetet nervore konvolutive (CNN) dhe rrjetet e vetëvëmendjes (SAN) janë të shquara. Të dy arkitekturat arrijnë shfaqje të ngjashme por përdorin mënyra shumë të ndryshme për të koduar dhe dekodiuar kontekstin: CNN përdorin shtresa konvolutive për të përqëndruar në lidhjen lokale të sekuencës, ndërsa SAN përdorë shtresa vetëvëmendjeje për të përqëndruar në semantikën globale. Në këtë punë ne propozojmë Rrjete të Rrugës së Dyfishtë për Sekuencën e Mësimit të Sekuencës (DPN-S2S), që nxjerrin përfitimet e të dy modeleve duke përdorur fuzionin e informacionit të Rrugës së Dyfishtë. Gjatë hapit të kodimit, ne zhvillojmë një arkitekturë të rrugës së dyfishtë për të mbajtur informacionin që vjen nga rrugë të ndryshme me shtresa konvolutive dhe shtresa vetë-vëmendjeje veçanërisht. Për të përdorur në mënyrë efektive kontekstin e koduar, ne zhvillojmë një modul të fusion it të vëmendjes së portës dhe e përdorim atë për të marrë automatikisht informacionin e nevojshëm gjatë hapit të dekodimit, i cili është gjithashtu një rrjet me dy rrugë. Duke integruar thellësisht të dy rrugët, të dy llojet e informacionit kombinohen dhe shfrytëzohen mirë. Eksperimentet tregojnë se metoda jonë e propozuar mund të përmirësojë ndjeshëm performancën e sekuencës për të sekuencuar mësimin mbi sistemet më të larta.', 'hy': 'Վերջին տարիների ընթացքում կարևոր առաջընթաց է կատարվել: Ցանցի տարբեր ճարտարապետություններ են օգտագործվել կոդերի և (կամ) կոդերի մեջ: Նրանց միջոցով հակառակցող նյարդային ցանցերը (CNN) և ինքնաուշադրություն դարձնող ցանցերը (SaN) ամենակարևոր են: Երկու ճարտարապետությունները հասնում են նմանատիպ արտադրություններին, բայց օգտագործում են շատ տարբեր ձևեր կոդավորելու և բացահայտելու կոնտեքստը. CNN-ը օգտագործում է կոնվոլյուցիոն շերտեր կենտրոնանալու հաջորդականության տեղական կապվածության վրա, մինչդեռ SA-ը օգտագործում Այս աշխատանքում մենք առաջարկում ենք երկու ճանապարհի ցանցեր հաջորդականության սովորելու համար (PDN-S2S), որոնք օգտագործում են երկու մոդելների առավելությունները՝ օգտագործելով երկու ճանապարհի ինֆորմացիայի ֆուզիան: Կոդավորման քայլի ընթացքում մենք զարգանում ենք երկու ճանապարհ ճարտարապետություն, որպեսզի պահպանենք տարբեր ճանապարհներից առաջացած տեղեկատվությունը, առանձին հաղորդակցված շերտերով և ինքնաուշադրության շերտերով: Որպեսզի արդյունավետ օգտագործենք կոդավորված կոնտեքստը, մենք զարգանում ենք ուշադրության միացման մոդուլը և օգտագործում ենք այն ինքնաբերաբար վերցնելու տեղեկատվությունը, որը անհրաժեշտ է կոդավորման ժամանակ, որը նաև երկու ուղի ցանց է: By deeply integrating the two paths, both types of information are combined and well exploited.  Փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկված մեթոդը կարող է նշանակալի բարելավել սովորելու հաջորդականության արդյունքը ամենաբարձր համակարգերի միջոցով:', 'az': 'S2S öyrənməsi üçün kodlayıcı-dekoder tabanlı sıralar son illərdə müəyyən bir ilerleme yaratdı. Çeşitli ağ arhitektarı kodlayıcı/decoder içində istifadə edildi. Onların içərisində Convolutional Neural Networks (CNN) və Self Attention Networks (SAN) möhtərəm olanlardır. İki arhitektura bənzər performanslar qəbul edir, amma çox fərqli yollar istifadə edir və kodlamaq üçün: CNN səviyyənin yerli bağlantısına fokus edər, SAN küresel semantika üzərində fokus edər. Bu işdə ikinci yol məlumatlarını birləşdirərək ikinci yol məlumatlarının faydalarını dəyişdirir. Kodlama adımı sırasında, müxtəlif yollardan gələn məlumatları və özünün dikkatini ayrı-ayrı ilə qorumaq üçün ikiqat yol arhitektarını təhsil edirik. Kodlandırılmış məlumatı istifadə etmək üçün, biz dəyişiklik fəsasiya modulu təşkil edir və onu avtomatik olaraq dəyişiklik adımları sırasında ehtiyacı olan məlumatı almaq üçün istifadə edirik, bu da iki yol a ğıdır. İki yolu derinliklə birləşdirərək, hər iki məlumat birləşdirilmiş və yaxşı istifadə edilir. Tərəbbür göstərir ki, təklif edilmiş metodumuzun seçmə sistemlərini seçmək üçün seçmə müəyyən edə bilər.', 'bn': 'সাম্প্রতিক বছরগুলোতে এনকোডার-ডেকোডার ভিত্তিক সেকেন্স শিক্ষার (S2S) ব্যবহার করেছে। এনকোডার/ডেকোডারে বিভিন্ন নেটওয়ার্ক কাঠামো ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে। তাদের মধ্যে স্বেচ্ছাসেবক নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) এবং স্বাধীন মনোযোগ নেটওয়ার্ক (এসএন) হচ্ছে বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়। এই দুই প্রতিষ্ঠানগুলো একই ধরনের কাজ অর্জন করে কিন্তু বিভিন্ন উপায় ব্যবহার করে এনকোড করা এবং কোড করার জন্য: সিএনএন ব্যবহার করে স্থানীয় সংযোগের উপর মনোযোগ প্রদান করে, যখন সান বিশ্ব এই কাজে আমরা দুইবার পাথ নেটওয়ার্কের প্রস্তাব করছি সেকেন্সের শিক্ষার জন্য (ডিপিএন-এস২এস), যা দুটি পাথের তথ্য ফ্লুশন ব্যবহার করে দুই মডেলে এনকোডিং পদক্ষেপের মধ্যে আমরা দ্বিগুণ রাস্তা আর্কিটেক্টার উন্নয়ন করি বিভিন্ন রাস্তা থেকে তথ্য সংরক্ষণ করার জন্য যারা সংশ্ল এনকোডিং পদক্ষেপ ব্যবহার করার জন্য আমরা একটি গ্রেট করা ফ্যাশন ফ্যাশন মডিউল তৈরি করি এবং ডিকোডিং পদক্ষেপে প্রয়োজনীয় তথ্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে নিয়ে  দুটি পথ গভীরভাবে একত্রিত করে, উভয় ধরনের তথ্য একত্রিত এবং ভাল ব্যবহার করা হয়। পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতিতে শিক্ষা প্রাপ্ত রাষ্ট্র-শিল্প ব্যবস্থার বিষয়গুলোর প্রতিক্রিয়', 'bs': 'Za poslednje godine, sekvencija učenja sekvence (S2S) osnovana na koderu-dekoderu postigla je izuzetan napredak. U koderu/dekoderu se koriste različite arhitekture mreže. Među njima su konvolucionalne neuronske mreže (CNN) i samopouzdane mreže (SAN) poznati. Dvije arhitekture postignu slične učinke, ali koriste vrlo različite načine za kodiranje i dekodiranje konteksta: CNN koristi konvolucione slojeve da se fokusiraju na lokalnu povezanost sekvence, dok SAN koristi slojeve samopouzdanja da se fokusiraju na globalne semantike. U ovom poslu predlažemo dvostruke mreže za učenje sekvence do sekvence (DPN-S2S), koje utiču na prednost oba modela koristeći kombinaciju informacija o dvostrukom putu. Tokom koraka kodiranja, razvijamo dvostruku arhitekturu puta kako bi održali informacije koje dolaze iz različitih puteva sa konvolucionalnim slojevima i slojevima samopouzdanja odvojeno. Da bi učinkovito iskoristili kodirani kontekst, razvijamo modul fuzije pažnje i koristimo ga da bi automatski pokupili potrebne informacije tokom koraka dekodiranja, što je također i dvostruka mreža putovanja. Duboko integrisanjem dva puta, obje vrste informacija su kombinirane i dobro iskorištavane. Eksperimenti pokazuju da naša predložena metoda može značajno poboljšati učenje sekvence u sekvenciji učenja nad državnim umjetničkim sistemima.', 'ca': "Seqüència a l'aprenentatge de seqüència (S2S) basada en codificadors ha fet progrés notables en els últims anys. En el codificador/decodificador s'han utilitzat diferents arquitectures de xarxa. Entre elles, les xarxes neurals convolucionals (CNN) i les xarxes d'autoatenció (SAN) són les més importants. Les dues arquitectures aconsegueixen actuacions similars però utilitzen maneres molt diferents per codificar i descodificar el context: el CNN utilitza capes convolutives per centrar-se en la connectivitat local de la seqüència, mentre que el SAN utilitza capes d'auto-atenció per centrar-se en la semàntica global. En aquest treball proposem Redes Doubles de Camí per a l'aprenentatge de la Seqüència a la Seqüència (DPN-S2S), que aprofiten les avantatges dels dos models utilitzant la fusió d'informació de doble camí. Durant el pas de codificació, desenvolupem una arquitectura de doble camí per mantenir la informació que prové de diferents camí amb capes convolucionaires i capes d'autoatenció separadament. Per utilitzar efectivament el context codificat, desenvolupem un módul de fusió d'atenció portada i l'utilitzem per recollir automàticament la informació requerida durant la etapa de decodificació, que també és una xarxa de doble camí. Integrant profundament els dos camis, ambdós tipus d'informació es combina i s'explota bé. Els experiments demostren que el nostre mètode proposat pot millorar significativament el rendiment de la seqüència per a seqüenciar l'aprenentatge sobre els sistemes més moderns.", 'et': 'Kodeerija-dekoodripõhine järjestuse õppimine (S2S) on viimastel aastatel teinud märkimisväärseid edusamme. Kodeerijas/dekooderis on kasutatud erinevaid võrguarhitektuure. Nende hulgas on silmapaistvad konvolutsioonivõrgud (CNN) ja enesetähelepanu võrgud (SAN). Need kaks arhitektuuri saavutavad sarnased tulemused, kuid kasutavad väga erinevaid viise konteksti kodeerimiseks ja dekodeerimiseks: CNN kasutab konvolutsioonilisi kihte, et keskenduda jada kohalikule ühenduvusele, samas SAN kasutab enesetähelepanu kihte, et keskenduda globaalsele semantikale. Käesolevas töös pakume välja topelttee võrgustikud järjestuse õppeks (DPN-S2S), mis kasutavad mõlema mudeli eeliseid topelttee infofusiooni abil. Kodeerimisetapi käigus töötame välja topelttee arhitektuuri, et säilitada erinevatelt teedelt pärit informatsiooni koos konvolutsioonikihtide ja enesetähelepanu kihtidega eraldi. Kodeeritud konteksti tõhusaks kasutamiseks töötame välja suletud tähelepanu fusiooni mooduli ja kasutame seda dekodeerimise etapis vajaliku teabe automaatseks kogumiseks, mis on samuti topelttee võrk. Nende kahe suuna sügavalt integreerimisega kombineeritakse ja kasutatakse hästi mõlemat liiki teavet. Eksperimentid näitavad, et meie kavandatud meetod võib oluliselt parandada järjestuse ja järjestuse õppimise jõudlust state-of-the-art süsteemides.', 'cs': 'Výuka sekvence na sekvenci (S2S) se v posledních letech dosáhla pozoruhodného pokroku. V kodéru/dekodéru byly použity různé síťové architektury. Mezi nimi patří Convoluční neuronové sítě (CNN) a Self Attention Networks (SAN). Obě architektury dosahují podobných výkonů, ale používají velmi odlišné způsoby kódování a dekódování kontextu: CNN používá konvoluční vrstvy k zaměření se na lokální konektivitu sekvence, zatímco SAN používá vrstvy vlastní pozornosti k zaměření se na globální sémantiku. V této práci navrhujeme sítě Double Path for Sequence to Sequence Learning (DPN-S2S), které využívají výhod obou modelů pomocí dvojité fúze informací. Během kroku kódování vyvíjíme architekturu dvojité cesty, abychom udrželi informace pocházející z různých cest s konvolučními vrstvami a vrstvami sebepozornosti odděleně. Abychom efektivně využili kódovaný kontext, vyvinuli jsme modul Gated Attention Fusion a použili ho k automatickému získání informací potřebných během dekódování kroku, což je také síť dvojité cesty. Díky hluboké integraci obou cest jsou oba typy informací kombinovány a dobře využívány. Experimenty ukazují, že naše navržená metoda může výrazně zlepšit výkon učení sekvence k sekvenci nad nejmodernějšími systémy.', 'fi': 'Encoder-decoder based Sequence to Sequence learning (S2S) on edistynyt merkittävästi viime vuosina. Kooderissa/dekooderissa on käytetty erilaisia verkkoarkkitehtuuria. Niistä merkittävimpiä ovat konvolutionaaliset hermoverkot (CNN) ja itsepalveluverkot (SAN). Nämä kaksi arkkitehtuuria saavuttavat samanlaisen suorituskyvyn, mutta käyttävät hyvin erilaisia tapoja koodata ja purkaa kontekstia: CNN käyttää konvolutionaalisia kerroksia keskittyäkseen sekvenssin paikalliseen liitettävyyteen, kun taas SAN käyttää itsepalvelukerroksia keskittyäkseen globaaliin semantiikkaan. Tässä työssä ehdotamme Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence Learning (DPN-S2S), jotka hyödyntävät molempien mallien etuja käyttämällä kaksoispolkutietofuusiota. Koodausvaiheen aikana kehitämme kaksoispolkuarkkitehtuurin, joka säilyttää eri poluilta tulevan tiedon konvolutionaalisilla kerroksilla ja itsepalvelutasoilla erikseen. Koodatun kontekstin tehokkaaksi hyödyntämiseksi kehitämme suljetun huomiofuusiomoduulin ja käytämme sitä automaattisesti poimimaan dekoodausvaiheen aikana tarvittavat tiedot, joka on myös kaksoispolkuverkko. Molempia tietoja yhdistetään ja hyödynnetään hyvin yhdistämällä nämä kaksi polkua syvällisesti. Kokeet osoittavat, että ehdotetulla menetelmällä voidaan merkittävästi parantaa sekvenssin ja sekvenssin oppimista huipputekniikan järjestelmissä.', 'sk': 'Učenje zaporedja v zaporedje (S2S) na podlagi kodirnikov in dekodirnikov je v zadnjih letih doseglo izjemen napredek. V kodirniku/dekoderju so bile uporabljene različne omrežne arhitekture. Med njimi sta konvolucijska živčna omrežja (CNN) in omrežja samopozornosti (SAN) vidna. Obe arhitekturi dosegata podobne zmogljivosti, vendar uporabljata zelo različne načine za kodiranje in dekodiranje konteksta: CNN uporablja konvolucijske plasti za osredotočanje na lokalno povezljivost zaporedja, SAN pa uporablja plasti samopozornosti za osredotočanje na globalno semantiko. V tem delu predlagamo dvojna omrežja za učenje sekvenc v sekvence (DPN-S2S), ki izkoriščajo prednosti obeh modelov z uporabo fuzije informacij dvojnih poti. V koraku kodiranja razvijamo arhitekturo dvojnih poti, da ohranimo informacije, ki prihajajo iz različnih poti s konvolucijskimi plastmi in plastmi samopozornosti ločeno. Za učinkovito uporabo kodiranega konteksta razvijamo modul za fuzijo zaprte pozornosti in ga uporabljamo za samodejno zbiranje informacij, potrebnih med dekodiranjem, ki je tudi omrežje dvojne poti. Z globokim povezovanjem obeh poti sta obe vrsti informacij združeni in dobro izkoriščeni. Eksperimenti kažejo, da lahko naša predlagana metoda bistveno izboljša učinkovitost zaporedja do učenja zaporedja prek najsodobnejših sistemov.', 'he': 'תורגם וסונכרן ע"י תורגם וסונכרן ע"י Qsubs ארכיטקטורות רשת שונות השתמשו בקודר/מפענח. ביניהם, רשתות נוירוליות משתנות (CNN) ורשתות תשומת לב עצמית (SAN) הן הבהודות. שני הארכיטקטורות משיגות הופעות דומות, אך משתמשות בדרכים שונות מאוד כדי לקוד ולפתח הקשר: CNN משתמש בשכבות משתנות כדי להתמקד על הקשר המקומי של הרצף, בעוד SAN משתמש בשכבות תשומת לב עצמית כדי להתמקד בסמנטיקה גלובלית. בעבודה הזו אנו מציעים רשתות דרכים כפולות עבור רצף ללימודי רצף (DPN-S2S), אשר משתמשות במיזוג מידע דרכים כפולים. במהלך צעד הקוד, אנחנו מפתחים ארכיטקטורת דרך כפולה כדי לשמור על המידע שבא מסלולים שונים עם שכבות משתנות ושכבות תשומת לב עצמית בנפרד. To effectively use the encoded context, we develop a gated attention fusion module and use it to automatically pick up the information needed during the decoding step, which is also a double path network.  By deeply integrating the two paths, both types of information are combined and well exploited.  ניסויים מראים שהשיטה המוצעת שלנו יכולה לשפר באופן משמעותי את ההופעה של הרצף כדי לרצף לימוד מעל מערכות מצוינות.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis An amfani da wasu layayenaiki masu cikin kode/koda. Daga cikinsu, Congolous Neural Networks (CNN) da Self Attitory Networks (SAN) ne mafiya girma. Ana amfani da zane-zanen tsari biyu, kuma ana amfani da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane kan kodi da kode-mazaɓa: CNN za'a yi amfani da zane-zane kan haɗi na lokaci, kuma amma SAN yana amfani da zane-zura kan zane-zura kan masu kallo na duniya. In this work we propose Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence learning (DPN-S2S), which leverage the advantages of both models by using double path information fusion.  During hanyõyin kodi, Munã ƙãga masu tsarin matsayin hanyõyi biyu, dõmin mu tsare information za'a zo daga hanyõyi daban-dabam da zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane. Ko yin amfani da mazaɓa na kodi, za mu buɗe wata module na zura ido ta haɗi kuma mu yi amfani da shi dõmin ka ɗauki shirin farat ɗaya idan an yi amfani da shi a lokacin kodi, wannan na zama zanen hanya biyu. Ina haɗa hanyõyi biyu guda, ko kuma a haɗa nau'i biyu masu sani. Kayan jarrabai yana nũna cewa metoden da aka buƙata, yana iya ƙari mai kyau ga gyaranin matsayin mutane da za'a sanar da shi a kan halin-na-sanar.", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Sampeyan akeh online dadi wis digawe nang koder/decoder Gak dhéwé, Ngomongke Neral Network (MT) lan Self Attribution Network (SVN) iki dadi sing perkaran-perkaran kuwi. Arkita durung sampeyan gawe akeh menyang pisan sampeyan karo iso nggo langgar sampeyan karo akeh sampeyan kanggo kodahan lan dekondahan kontext: MT usaha layers konvoluntal kanggo dipun nggo sampeyan sampeyan tapi ditubagian sing berarti, terus saben CUN usaha layers autoatens kanggo dikoleh dumadhi semanti nggo global. Genjer-Genjer Text-tool-action Tool Options, Layersdock Genjer-Genjer Perintah Panjenengan langkung wigatining sistem sing gak bener', 'bo': 'དབྱེ་བ་གསང་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་ལྟར་མཇུག་བསྡུ་བཞིན་པའི་གོ་རིམ།S2S། དྲ་བ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་འདི་ཁྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་ཡོད་པ་encoder/decoder ནང་དུ་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ དེ་དག་ལས་ཀྱང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་ནུས་མཐུན་དྲ་བ་ (CNN) དང་སྒེར་གྱི་རྟོགས་དྲ་བ་ (SAN)ཚོ་ནི་གཙོ་ཆེན་པོ་རེད། སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་རྩིས་ཐོག་ལས་བཟོ་བ་ཡིན་ནའང་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་མ་འདྲ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་སྟངས། CNN ཡིས་ཆ་ཁོངས In this work we propose Double Path Networks for Sequence to Sequence learning (DPN-S2S), which leverage the advantages of both models by using double path information fusion. During the encoding step, we develop a double path architecture to maintain the information coming from different paths with convolutional layers and self-attention layers separately. འུ་ཅག་གིས་གསང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདྲ་བ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་དགོས་པ འགྲུལ་ལམ་གཉིས་དབྱེ་བ་དེ་དག་གི་ཁྱད་པར་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གཉིས་པོ་མཉམ་དུ་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས་སླར་བ་བསྒྲགས་ཡོད། Experiments show that our proposed method can significantly improve the performance of sequences to sequence learning over state-of-the-art system་དང་།'}
{'en': 'Parallel Corpora for bi-lingual English-Ethiopian Languages Statistical Machine Translation', 'ar': 'هيئة موازية للترجمة الآلية الإحصائية للترجمة الآلية باللغات الإنجليزية والإثيوبية', 'fr': 'Corpus parallèles pour la traduction automatique statistique bilingue anglais-éthiopienne', 'pt': 'Corpora Paralelo para Tradução Automática Estatística de Línguas Inglês-Etíope bilíngües', 'es': 'Corpus paralelos para idiomas bilingües inglés-etíopes Traducción automática estadística', 'ja': '2言語の英語とエチオピアの言語の並列コーポラ統計機械翻訳', 'zh': '双语英语-埃塞俄比亚语计机器翻译并行语料库', 'ru': 'Параллельные корпуса для двуязычного статистического машинного перевода на английский и эфиопский языки', 'hi': 'द्विभाषी अंग्रेजी-इथियोपियाई भाषाओं सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद के लिए समानांतर निगम', 'ga': 'Corpora Comhthreomhar le haghaidh Aistriúchán Meaisín Staitistiúil do Theangacha Béarla-Aetóipe dátheangacha', 'el': 'Παράλληλο Σώμα για δίγλωσσες Αγγλικά-Αιθιοπικές Γλώσσες Στατιστική Μηχανική Μετάφραση', 'ka': 'პარალელი კორპორა ორიენგური ინგლისური- ეტისონიური ენების სტატისტური მაქინის განსაგულისხმებისთვის', 'lt': 'Parallel Corpora for bi-lingual English-Ethiopian Languages Statistical Machine Translation', 'hu': 'Parallel Corpora kétnyelvű angol-etióp nyelvekhez Statisztikai gépi fordítás', 'ms': 'Korpora Paralel untuk Perjemahan Mesin Statistik Bahasa Inggeris-Ethiopia', 'kk': 'Екі тілді ағылшын- итопиялық тілдер статистикалық машинаның аудармасының параллелі корпорасы', 'it': 'Corpora parallela per lingue bilingue inglese-etiope Traduzione automatica statistica', 'mn': 'Хоёр хэл Англи-Ефиопын хэл Статистикийн Машины хөгжлийн параллел Корпора', 'mk': 'Паралелна корпора за двојазичен англиско-етиопски превод на статистички машини', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Korpus równoległy dla dwujęzycznych języków angielsko-etiopskich Statystyczne tłumaczenie maszynowe', 'ml': 'ബി- ലിങ്കുല്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്- എപ്പിയ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷകള്\u200d സ്റ്റാറ്റിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോറ', 'mt': 'Korpora Paralela għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Statistiċi tal-Ingliż-Etjopjan b’żewġ lingwi', 'ro': 'Corpora paralelă pentru limbi bi-lingve engleză-etiopiene Traducere statistică mașină', 'sr': 'Paralelna korpora za dvojezički engleski-etiopski prevod statističkih mašina jezika', 'ta': 'இர- மொழி ஆங்கிலம்- எதிப்பிய மொழிகள் புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான Parallel Corpora', 'si': 'දෙකක් භාෂාත්මක ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාන්-එතියෝපියානු භාෂාවක් ස්ථිතික මැෂින් භාෂාව', 'so': 'Korpora baarlamaanka ee afka ingiriisiga- Itoobiya tarjumista machine', 'ur': 'دو زبان انگلیسی-ایٹیوپی زبانوں کے لئے پارالی کورپور', 'sv': 'Parallell Corpora för tvåspråkiga engelska-etiopiska språk Statistisk maskinöversättning', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Dịch vụ ảo ảo', 'da': 'Parallel Corpora for tosprogede engelsk-etiopiske sprog Statistisk maskinoversættelse', 'bg': 'Паралелна корпора за двуезични английски и етиопски езици Статистически машинен превод', 'hr': 'Paralelna korpora za dvojezički engleski-etiopski prevod statističkih strojeva', 'nl': 'Parallel Corpora voor tweetalige Engels-Ethiopische Talen Statistische Machine Translation', 'de': 'Parallelkorpora für zweisprachige Englisch-Äthiopische Sprachen Statistische Maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Korpora Paralel untuk Perjemahan Mesin Statistik Bahasa Inggris-Etiopi', 'ko': '에티오피아 언어 통계', 'fa': 'شرکت پاراللی برای ترجمه ماشین آمار انگلیسی و اروپایی دو زبان انگلیسی و اروپایی', 'sw': 'Kampuni ya Parallel kwa Tafsiri ya Kiingereza na lugha za Ethiopia', 'af': 'Parallele Korpora vir twee-tale Engels-Etiopiaanse Taal Statistiese Masjien Vertaling', 'sq': 'Korpora paralele për përkthimin e makinës statistike të gjuhëve anglo-etiopiane', 'am': 'የብልቋንቋ ቋንቋ-ኢትዮጵያ ቋንቋዎች Statistical Machine ትርጉም', 'hy': 'Երկուլեզու անգլերեն-էթիոպիական լեզուների վիճակագրական մեքենայի թարգմանման զուգահեռ կոպորա', 'bn': 'বি ভাষায় ইংরেজী-ইথিওপিয়ান ভাষার পরিসংখ্যান পরিসংখ্যান মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য প্যারালেল কোর্পোরা', 'az': '캻ki dil 캻ngiliz톛-Etopiya dill톛rinin Statistik Makinel톛rin Terc칲m톛si 칲칞칲n Parallel Korpora', 'bs': 'Paralelna korpora za dvojezički engleski-etiopski prevod statističkih mašina jezika', 'tr': 'Iki dilli iňlisçe-Etiopça diller Statistik Machine terjime üçin Parallel Korpora', 'fi': 'Parallel Corpora kaksikielisille englannin ja etiopian kielille Tilastollinen konekäännös', 'ca': 'Parallel Corpora per traducció bilingüe de màquines estadístiques anglo-etíopiques', 'cs': 'Paralelní korpora pro dvojjazyčné anglicko-etiopské jazyky Statistický strojový překlad', 'et': 'Paralleelkorpora kahekeelsele inglise-etioopia keeltele Statistiline masintõlge', 'jv': 'Paralll corpodha kanggo tanggal Inggris-Etik Basa Stastik Device Traversesi', 'ha': '@ item Spelling dictionary', 'he': 'קורפורה Parallel לתרגום מכונת סטטיסטיקה בשפתיים אנגלית-אתיופית', 'sk': 'Vzporedni korpus za dvojezične angleško-etiopske jezike Statistični strojni prevod', 'bo': 'སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་ཨིན་ཡུ་ཡུ་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་ཚད་རྩིས་འཁོར་ཆོག་དང་།'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe an attempt towards the development of parallel corpora for English and Ethiopian Languages, such as Amharic, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta and Ge’ez. The corpora are used for conducting a bi-directional statistical machine translation experiments. The BLEU scores of the bi-directional Statistical Machine Translation (SMT) systems show a promising result. The morphological richness of the Ethiopian languages has a great impact on the performance of SMT specially when the targets are Ethiopian languages. Now we are working towards an optimal alignment for a bi-directional English-Ethiopian languages SMT.', 'ar': 'في هذا البحث ، نصف محاولة لتطوير مجموعات موازية للغات الإنجليزية والإثيوبية ، مثل الأمهرية والتغرينية وأفان أورومو والولايتة والجعزية. تُستخدم المجاميع لإجراء تجارب ترجمة آلية إحصائية ثنائية الاتجاه. تُظهر درجات BLEU لأنظمة الترجمة الآلية الإحصائية ثنائية الاتجاه (SMT) نتيجة واعدة. للثراء المورفولوجي للغات الإثيوبية تأثير كبير على أداء SMT خاصة عندما تكون الأهداف هي اللغات الإثيوبية. نحن الآن نعمل من أجل التوافق الأمثل للغات ثنائية الاتجاه الإنجليزية-الإثيوبية SMT.', 'es': "En este artículo, describimos un intento hacia el desarrollo de corpus paralelos para los idiomas inglés y etíope, como el amárico, el tigrigna, el afan-oromo, el wolaytta y el ge'ez. Los cuerpos se utilizan para realizar experimentos de traducción automática estadística bidireccional. Las puntuaciones BLEU de los sistemas bidireccionales de traducción automática estadística (SMT) muestran un resultado prometedor. La riqueza morfológica de las lenguas etíopes tiene un gran impacto en el rendimiento de SMT, especialmente cuando los objetivos son las lenguas etíopes. Ahora estamos trabajando para lograr una alineación óptima para un SMT bidireccional en inglés y etíope.", 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons une tentative de développement de corpus parallèles pour les langues anglaise et éthiopienne, telles que l'amharique, le tigrigna, l'afan-oromo, le wolaytta et le ge'ez. Les corpus sont utilisés pour mener des expériences statistiques bidirectionnelles de traduction automatique. Les scores BLEU des systèmes de traduction automatique statistique bidirectionnelle (SMT) montrent un résultat prometteur. La richesse morphologique des langues éthiopiennes a un impact important sur les performances de SMT, en particulier lorsque les cibles sont des langues éthiopiennes. Nous travaillons maintenant à un alignement optimal pour un SMT bidirectionnel anglais-éthiopien.", 'pt': "Neste artigo, descrevemos uma tentativa de desenvolvimento de corpora paralelos para línguas inglesas e etíopes, como amárico, tigrínia, afan-oromo, wolaytta e ge'ez. Os corpora são usados para conduzir experimentos de tradução automática estatística bidirecional. As pontuações BLEU dos sistemas de tradução automática estatística bidirecional (SMT) mostram um resultado promissor. A riqueza morfológica das línguas etíopes tem um grande impacto no desempenho da SMT principalmente quando os alvos são as línguas etíopes. Agora estamos trabalhando para um alinhamento ideal para um SMT bidirecional de idiomas inglês-etíope.", 'ja': '本稿では、アムハラ語、ティグリニャ語、アファン・オロモ語、ウォライタ語、ゲエズ語などの英語とエチオピア語の並列言語の発展に向けた試みについて述べる。コーパスは、双方向統計機械翻訳実験を行うために使用される。双方向統計機械翻訳（ ＳＭＴ ）システムのＢＬＥＵスコアは、有望な結果を示す。エチオピアの言語の形態的な豊かさは、ターゲットがエチオピアの言語である場合に特にSMTのパフォーマンスに大きな影響を与えます。現在、双方向の英語-エチオピア語SMTの最適なアライメントに向けて取り組んでいます。', 'zh': '本文,叙英语、埃塞俄比亚语并行语料库,如阿姆哈拉语、Tigrigna、Afan-Oromo、Wolaytta、Geeeez。 语料库以双向计机器翻译实验。 双向计机器翻译(SMT)统者BLEU分数见一望也。 埃塞俄比亚言语之形丰富性大感于SMT,尤埃塞俄比亚言时也。 如今努力实现双向英语-埃塞俄比亚语 SMT 最佳齐。', 'hi': "इस पत्र में, हम अंग्रेजी और इथियोपियाई भाषाओं के लिए समानांतर कॉर्पोरेट के विकास की दिशा में एक प्रयास का वर्णन करते हैं, जैसे कि अम्हारिक, तिग्रिगना, अफान-ओरोमो, वोलेट्टा और गे'ईज़। निगम का उपयोग द्वि-दिशात्मक सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद प्रयोगों के संचालन के लिए किया जाता है। द्वि-दिशात्मक सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद (एसएमटी) प्रणालियों के BLEU स्कोर एक आशाजनक परिणाम दिखाते हैं। इथियोपियाई भाषाओं की रूपात्मक समृद्धि का एसएमटी के प्रदर्शन पर बहुत प्रभाव पड़ता है, खासकर जब लक्ष्य इथियोपियाई भाषाएं हैं। अब हम एक द्वि-दिशात्मक अंग्रेजी-इथियोपियाई भाषाओं एसएमटी के लिए एक इष्टतम संरेखण की दिशा में काम कर रहे हैं।", 'ru': 'В этом документе мы описываем попытку развития параллельных корпусов для английского и эфиопского языков, таких как амхарский, тигринья, афан-оромо, волайтта и геез. Корпуса используются для проведения двунаправленных статистических экспериментов машинного перевода. Оценки BLEU двунаправленных систем статистического машинного перевода (SMT) показывают многообещающий результат. Морфологическое богатство эфиопских языков оказывает большое влияние на эффективность СМТ, особенно в тех случаях, когда мишенью являются эфиопские языки. Сейчас мы работаем над оптимальным выравниванием для двунаправленного SMT на английском и эфиопском языках.', 'ga': "Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar iarracht i dtreo corpora comhthreomhar a fhorbairt don Bhéarla agus do Theangacha na hAetóipe, mar Amarais, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta agus Ge'ez. Úsáidtear na corparáidí chun turgnaimh aistrithe meaisín staitistiúla déthreocha a dhéanamh. Léiríonn scóir BLEU na gcóras déthreoracha um Aistriú Meaisín Staidrimh (SMT) toradh iontach. Tá tionchar mór ag saibhreas moirfeolaíoch na dteangacha hAetóipe ar fheidhmíocht an SMT go háirithe nuair is teangacha Aetóipe na spriocanna. Anois táimid ag obair i dtreo ailíniú optamach le haghaidh SMT teangacha Béarla-Aetóipe déthreoch.", 'hu': "Ebben a tanulmányban leírjuk az angol és etióp nyelvek párhuzamos corporáinak fejlesztésére irányuló kísérletet, mint amilyen az amár, a tigrigna, az Afan-Oromo, a wolajtta és a Ge'ez. A testeket kétirányú statisztikai gépi fordítási kísérletek elvégzésére használják. A kétirányú Statisztikai Gépi Fordítás (SMT) rendszerek BLEU pontszáma ígéretes eredményt mutat. Az etióp nyelvek morfológiai gazdagsága nagy hatással van az SMT teljesítményére, különösen akkor, ha a célpont etióp nyelvek. Most egy kétirányú angol-etióp nyelvű SMT optimális összehangolásán dolgozunk.", 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ აღწერეთ პარალელი კოპორაის განვითარებას ინგლისური და ვოფიოური ენებისთვის, როგორც ამჰარიური, ტიგრიგნია, აფან-ორო, გულაიტა და გეზი. კოპორა გამოიყენება ორედირექციონალური სტატისტიკალური მაქანის გადატყვების ექსპერიმენტებისთვის. BLEU-ის ბუდირექციონალური სტატისტიკური მაქინის გადატყვება (SMT) სისტემების მონაცემების შედეგები აჩვენებენ გვეუბნებული შედეგები. მორპოლოგიური ბედნიერება ვფიოდიური ენების მნიშვნელოვანობაში SMT სპეციალურად იქნება, როცა მიზეზები ვფიოდიური ენებია. ახლა ჩვენ ვამუშაობთ ორგანრიგური ანგლისური-ვოფიოური ენების SMT-ზე.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, περιγράφουμε μια προσπάθεια ανάπτυξης παράλληλων σωμάτων για τις Αγγλικές και Αιθιοπικές γλώσσες, όπως τα Αμχαρικά, τα Τιγρίγνα, τα Αφάν-Ορόμο, τα Γουολαίττα και τα Γκέεζ. Τα σώματα χρησιμοποιούνται για τη διενέργεια αμφίδρομης στατιστικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης πειραμάτων. Οι βαθμολογίες BLEU των αμφίδρομης στατιστικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (SMT) δείχνουν ένα ελπιδοφόρο αποτέλεσμα. Ο μορφολογικός πλούτος των αιθιοπικών γλωσσών έχει μεγάλο αντίκτυπο στην απόδοση της ειδικά όταν οι στόχοι είναι οι αιθιοπικές γλώσσες. Τώρα εργαζόμαστε για μια βέλτιστη ευθυγράμμιση για μια αμφίδρομη αγγλική-αιθιοπική γλώσσα SMT.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente apibūdiname bandymą plėtoti lygiagrečią anglų ir etiopų kalbų korporą, pvz., amharišką, tigriną, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta ir Ge ez. Korpora naudojama dvikryptiniams statistiniams vertimo mašinomis eksperimentams atlikti. Dviejų krypčių statistinių mašinų vertimo (SMT) sistemų BLEU rezultatai rodo perspektyvų rezultatą. Etiopijos kalbų morfologinis turtingumas turi didelį poveikį SMT veiklos rezultatams, ypač tais atvejais, kai tikslai yra Etiopijos kalbos. Dabar stengiamės optimaliai suderinti dvikrypčius anglų ir etiopų kalbas SMT.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз ағылшын және эфиопиялық тілдер үшін параллел корпора жасау әрекетін, мысалы Амхарик, Тигригна, Афан- Оромо, Вулайтта және Гез тілдерінің жасау әрекетін түсіндіреміз. Корпора екі бағытты статистикалық компьютерді аудару тәжірибесін істеу үшін қолданылады. Екі бағытты статистикалық машинаны аудару (SMT) жүйелерінің BLEU нәтижелері үлкен нәтижесін көрсетеді. Эфиопиялық тілдердің морфологиялық бағасы SMT тілдерінің істеуіне әсер етеді. Мақсаттары Эфиопиялық тілдерінде. Біз екі бағытты ағылшын-эфиопиялық тілдер SMT үшін оптимал түрлендіру үшін жұмыс істейміз.', 'it': "In questo articolo, descriviamo un tentativo di sviluppo di corpora paralleli per le lingue inglesi ed etiopiche, come l'amarico, il tigrigna, l'afan-oromo, Wolaytta e Ge'ez. I corpora sono utilizzati per condurre esperimenti di traduzione automatica statistica bidirezionale. I punteggi BLEU dei sistemi bidirezionali di traduzione automatica statistica (SMT) mostrano un risultato promettente. La ricchezza morfologica delle lingue etiopiche ha un grande impatto sulle prestazioni di SMT soprattutto quando gli obiettivi sono le lingue etiopiche. Ora stiamo lavorando per un allineamento ottimale per un SMT bidirezionale inglese-etiope lingue.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, ние опишуваме обид за развој на паралелна корпора за англиски и етиопски јазици, како што се Амариќ, Тигригна, Афан-Оромо, Волајта и Геез. Корпората се користи за спроведување на бидирекционални статистички експерименти за превод на машина. БЛЕУ резултатите на двоупотребните системи за транслативна статистичка машина (СМТ) покажуваат ветувачки резултат. Морфолошката богатост на етиопските јазици има големо влијание врз изведувањето на СМТ посебно кога метите се етиопски јазици. Сега работиме кон оптимално пристапување на двоправниот англиско-етиопски јазик СМТ.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷിലും എപ്പിയ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കും പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോരിയുടെ ഉന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വിവരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ശ്രമം വിവരിക്കുന്നു. ആമ ഈ കോര്\u200dപ്പോര ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ബി തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന മെഷിന്\u200d പരിശോധന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നതിനാണ്. ബി- നേരിട്ടുള്ള സ്റ്റാറ്റിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷകളുടെ (SMT) സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ ബില്യൂ സ്കോര്\u200dസ് പ്രത എസ്എംടിയുടെ പ്രകടനത്തിന്റെ മൊര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പത്തിന്റെ പ്രഭാവം പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് എസ്എംടി ഭാഷകളാണെങ്കില്\u200d എപ് ഇപ്പോള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സാധാരണ ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്-എംഎപ്യൂപ്യന്\u200d ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുകയാണ്.', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, aħna niddeskrivu tentattiv lejn l-iżvilupp ta’ korpra parallela għall-lingwi Ingliżi u Etjopiċi, bħall-Amharic, it-Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta u Ge'ez. The corpora are used for conducting a bi-directional statistical machine translation experiments.  Il-punteġġi BLEU tas-sistemi tat-Traduzzjoni Bidirezzjonali tal-Magni Statistiċi (SMT) juru riżultat promettenti. Ir-rikkezza morfoloġika tal-lingwi Etjopiċi għandha impatt kbir fuq il-prestazzjoni tal-SMT speċjalment meta l-miri jkunu lingwi Etjopiċi. Issa qed naħdmu lejn allinjament ottimali għal lingwa bi-direzzjoni tal-Ingliż-Etjopjan SMT.", 'ms': "Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan cubaan untuk mengembangkan corpora selari untuk Bahasa Inggeris dan Ethiopia, seperti Amharic, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta dan Ge'ez. Korpora digunakan untuk melakukan eksperimen terjemahan mesin statistik bidireksi. Skor BLEU sistem Terjemahan Mesin Statistik (SMT) dua arah menunjukkan hasil yang berjanji. Kekayaan morfologi bahasa Ethiopia mempunyai kesan besar pada prestasi SMT khususnya apabila sasaran adalah bahasa Ethiopia. Sekarang kita sedang bekerja untuk penyesuaian optimal untuk bahasa Inggeris-Ethiopia dua arah SMT.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Англи, Эфиопийн хэл, Амхарик, Тигригна, Афан-Оромо, Вулайтта, Гэз зэрэг параллел корпора хөгжүүлэх хичээлийг тайлбарлаж байна. Корпора хоёр багын статистикийн хөрөнгө оруулах туршилтын тулд хэрэглэгддэг. БЛЕУ-ын хоёр багын статистикийн машины хөрөнгө оруулалт (SMT) системийн тоонууд амлалтай үр дүнг харуулдаг. Эфиопын хэлнүүдийн морфологик баялаг байдал нь Ифиопын хэлнүүдийн зорилготой үед SMT-ийн үйлдвэрлэлд маш их нөлөөтэй. Одоо бид хоёр багын Англи-Эфиопийн хэлний SMT-д эерэг тэгшитгэл дээр ажиллаж байна.', 'no': "I denne papiret beskriver vi ein forsøk mot utviklinga av parallelle korpora for engelsk og etiopsk språk, som Amharisk, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta og Ge'ez. Korpora vert brukt for å gjera ein divretning statistisk omsetjingsperiment. BLEU- poeng for dei to retningssystemene for statistiske omsetjingar (SMT) viser eit forståande resultat. Morfologiske rykkhet på Ethiopiske språk har stor effekt på utviklinga av SMT spesielt når målene er Ethiopiske språk. Nå arbeider vi mot ein optimal justering for ein divretning engelsk-etiopsk SMT.", 'ro': "În această lucrare, descriem o încercare de dezvoltare a corporelor paralele pentru limbile engleză și etiopiană, cum ar fi amharic, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta și Ge'ez. Corporele sunt folosite pentru efectuarea unor experimente bidirecționale de traducere automată statistică. Scorurile BLEU ale sistemelor bidirecționale de traducere automată statistică (SMT) arată un rezultat promițător. Bogăția morfologică a limbilor etiopiene are un impact mare asupra performanței SMT, în special atunci când țintele sunt limbile etiopiene. Acum lucrăm spre o aliniere optimă pentru o limbă bi-direcțională engleză-etiopiană SMT.", 'pl': "W artykule opisujemy próbę rozwoju równoległych korpusów dla języków angielskich i etiopskich, takich jak Amharic, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta i Ge'ez. Korpusy są wykorzystywane do przeprowadzania dwukierunkowych statystycznych eksperymentów z tłumaczeniem maszynowym. Wyniki BLEU dwukierunkowych systemów statystycznego tłumaczenia maszynowego (SMT) wykazują obiecujący wynik. Bogactwo morfologiczne języków etiopskich ma ogromny wpływ na wydajność SMT, zwłaszcza gdy celem są języki etiopskie. Teraz pracujemy nad optymalnym wyrównaniem dwukierunkowego języka angielsko-etiopskiego SMT.", 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa isku dayo horumarinta shirkadda u eg afka Ingiriiska iyo afka Itoobiya, tusaale ahaan Amharic, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta iyo Ge ez. Shirkadda waxaa loo isticmaalaa in lagu sameeyo imtixaanka tarjumaadda machine-ka. Xirfaha BLEU ee kooxaha tarjumista machine (SMT) waxay muujiyaan resulto la ballanqaaday. Dhaqaalaha hooyo ee luqada Itoobiya ayaa saameyn weyn ku leh sameynta SMT, khusuusan marka ay goalku yihiin luuqadaha Itoobiya. Hada waxaynu u shaqeynaynaa isbedelka habboon ee luuqadaha afka Ingiriiska-Itoobiya SMT.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இங்கிலம் மற்றும் எதியோப்பிய மொழிகளுக்கான இணைய நிறுவனத்தை விவரிக்கிறோம், அதாவது ஆமாரிக், திக்ரிக்கா, ஆபான்-ஓரோமோ, வோல இந்த நிறுவனத்தில் இருதிசையில் புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு பரிசோதனைகளை செயல்படுத்த பயன்படுத் BLEU மதிப்புகள் இர- திசையில் புள்ளி புள்ளிவிவரம் இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (SMT) அமைப்புகளின் பிலியு மதிப்புகள் வ இலக்குகள் எதிப்பிய மொழிகளாக இருக்கும் போது எஸ்எம்டி செயல்பாட்டின் முக்கியமான பாதிப்பு உள்ளது. இப்போது நாங்கள் ஒரு இருதிசையாக ஆங்கிலத்திற்கு ஒரு விருப்பமான ஒழுங்குபடுத்தலுக்கு வேலை செய்கிறோம்.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාවට සමාන්\u200dය කාර්පෝරාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න උත්සහ කරනවා, වගේම අම්හාරික්, ටිග්\u200dරින්නා,  කොර්පෝරා භාවිතා වෙනවා දෙපාර්ථික සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණයක් කරන්න. BLUE ප්\u200dරමාණයක් දෙවෙනි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් සංඛ්\u200dයාත්මක පද්ධතිය (SMT) පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරතිශ්නයක් පෙන්වනවා. ඉතිවියෝපිය භාෂාවේ මාර්ෆෝලෝජික විශේෂයෙන් SMT විශේෂයෙන් ඉලක්කය ඉතිවියෝපියෝයි භාෂ දැන් අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂාවක් SMT වෙනුවෙන් වැඩ කරන්නේ.', 'sv': "I denna uppsats beskriver vi ett f철rs철k att utveckla parallella korporar f철r engelska och etiopiska spr책k, s책som amhariska, tigrigna, afan-oromo, wolaytta och ge'ez. Corporas anv채nds f철r att utf철ra ett tv책riktad statistiskt maskin철vers채ttningsexperiment. BLEU-po채ngen f철r de tv책riktade statistiska maskin철vers채ttningssystemen (SMT) visar ett lovande resultat. De etiopiska spr책kens morfologiska rikedom har stor inverkan p책 SMT:s prestanda, s채rskilt n채r m책len 채r etiopiska spr책k. Nu arbetar vi mot en optimal anpassning f철r ett dubbelriktad engelsk-etiopiskt spr책k SMT.", 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo pokušaj razvoja paralelnog korporacije za engleski i Etiopski jezike, kao što su Amharski, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta i Ge ez. Koristi se za provođenje dvosmjernih statističkih eksperimenata za prevod mašine. BLEU rezultati dvosmjernih statističkih sistema prevoda (SMT) pokazuju obećavajući rezultat. Morfološka bogatstva Etiopskih jezika ima veliki uticaj na provedbu SMT-a posebno kada su ciljevi Etiopski jezici. Sada radimo ka optimalnom poravnanju za dvosmjerno engleski-Etiopski SMT jezika.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم انگلیسی اور ایٹیوپی زبانوں کے لئے مشابہ کوپرا کی تخلیق کی کوشش کررہے ہیں، جیسے امهاریک، تیگرینا، افان-اورومو، وولیٹا اور جیز۔ کورپورا ایک دوسری طریقے کی آمیزش ماشین ترجمہ آزمائش کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. بلیوس کے دو دقیقا سیستمی مشین ترجمہ (SMT) سیسٹموں کی دو دقیقا سیٹیوں کا ایک وعدہ کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے۔ ایٹیوپی زبانوں کی مورپولوژیکی ثروت SMT کی عملکرد پر بہت اثر ہے جب موجود ایٹیوپی زبانیں ہیں۔ اب ہم ایک دوسری دقیق انگلیسی-ایٹیوپی زبان SMT کے لئے بہترین تفریق کے لئے کام کر رہے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu takarda biz Ingliz va Efiopcha tillari uchun parallel kompaniya ta'lim tilini aniqlashga qaramaymiz, Amharik, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta va Gez kabi. The corpora are used for conducting a bi-directional statistical machine translation experiments.  Name Efiopiya tilning morfological taqdimoti SMT bajarishga juda katta ta'sir beradi. Boshqa qanday etish tili bo'lsa. Hozirda biz bir xil ingliz-Ethiopian tilni SMT'ning optimal birlashga ishlayapmiz.", 'vi': "Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi mô tả nỗ lực phát triển ngôn ngữ đồng loại về Anh ngữ và Ethiopia, như Amharic, Tigrigina, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta và Ge'ez. Hạ sĩ được sử dụng để tiến hành các thí nghiệm dịch thuyết âm tính hai hướng. Số lượng liên lạc của hệ thống dịch chuyển theo hướng liên tiếp (SMT) cho thấy một kết quả hứa hẹn. Tính chất của ngôn ngữ Ethiopia này có tác động lớn lên khả năng ứng biến SMT đặc biệt khi mục tiêu là ngôn ngữ Ethiopia. Bây giờ chúng ta đang hướng tới một sự thẳng hàng tối ưu cho ngôn ngữ Anh-Ethiopian SMT theo hai hướng.", 'nl': "In dit artikel beschrijven we een poging tot de ontwikkeling van parallelle corpora voor Engels en Ethiopische talen, zoals Amharisch, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta en Ge'ez. De corpora worden gebruikt voor het uitvoeren van een bi-directionele statistische machine translation experimenten. De BLEU scores van de bi-directionele Statistische Machine Translation (SMT) systemen laten een veelbelovend resultaat zien. De morfologische rijkdom van de Ethiopische talen heeft een grote invloed op de prestaties van SMT, vooral wanneer de doelwitten Ethiopische talen zijn. Nu werken we aan een optimale uitlijning voor een bidirectionele Engels-Ethiopische talen SMT.", 'da': "I denne artikel beskriver vi et forsøg på at udvikle parallelle korpora til engelske og etiopiske sprog, såsom amharisk, tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta og Ge'ez. Corporaerne bruges til at udføre en tovejsende statistisk maskinoversættelse eksperimenter. BLEU-resultaterne af SMT-systemerne (Statistisk Machine Translation) viser et lovende resultat. Den morfologiske rigdom af de etiopiske sprog har en stor indflydelse på SMT's ydeevne, især når målene er etiopiske sprog. Nu arbejder vi på en optimal tilpasning til en tovejdet engelsk-etiopisk sprog SMT.", 'hr': "U ovom papiru opisujemo pokušaj razvoja paralelnog korporacije za engleski i Etiopski jezike, poput Amharičkog, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta i Ge'esa. Koristi se tijelo za provođenje dvosmjernih statističkih eksperimenata za prevod stroja. BLEU rezultati dvosmjernih statističkih sustava prevoda (SMT) pokazuju obećavajući rezultat. Morfološka bogatstva Etiopskih jezika ima veliki utjecaj na učinku SMT-a posebno kada su ciljevi Etiopski jezici. Sada radimo na optimalnom poravnanju za dvosmjerno engleski-etiopski SMT jezika.", 'id': "Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan percobaan untuk mengembangkan corpora paralel untuk Bahasa Inggris dan Etiopi, seperti Amharic, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta dan Ge'ez. Kopora ini digunakan untuk melakukan eksperimen terjemahan mesin statistik bidireksi. Skor BLEU dari dua arah sistem Translation Statistical Machine (SMT) menunjukkan hasil yang berjanji. Kekayaan morfologi bahasa Ethiopia memiliki dampak besar pada prestasi SMT khusus ketika sasaran adalah bahasa Ethiopia. Now we are working towards an optimal alignment for a bi-directional English-Ethiopian languages SMT.", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 영어와 에티오피아 언어를 위해 평행어 자료 라이브러리를 개발하는 시도, 예를 들어 암하라어, 티그리니아어, 아판 오로모어, 워레타어와 게즈어를 묘사했다.이 어료 라이브러리는 양방향 통계 기계 번역 실험을 하는 데 쓰인다.쌍방향 통계기계번역(SMT) 시스템의 BLEU 점수는 유망한 결과를 보여준다.에티오피아 언어의 형태 풍부성은 특히 대상 언어가 에티오피아 언어일 때 SMT의 성능에 큰 영향을 미친다.현재 우리는 쌍방향 영어 에티오피아 언어 SMT의 최상의 정렬을 실현하기 위해 노력하고 있다.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме опит за развитие на паралелни корпори за английски и етиопски езици като амхарски, тигрижна, афан-оромо, вулайта и геес. Корпората се използва за провеждане на двупосочни статистически експерименти с машинен превод. Резултатите от двупосочните системи за статистически машинен превод показват обещаващ резултат. Морфологичното богатство на етиопските езици оказва голямо влияние върху изпълнението на СМТ, особено когато целите са етиопските езици. Сега работим за оптимално подравняване на двупосочния английски и етиопски език.', 'sw': "Katika karatasi hii, tunaelezea jaribio la maendeleo ya makampuni yanayofanana kwa lugha za Kiingereza na Ethiopia kama vile Kiamhariki, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta na Ge'ez. Shirika hilo linatumiwa kufanya majaribio ya utafsiri wa mashine ya takwimu mbili. Tafsiri ya mbinu za takwimu za BLEU (SMT) zinaonyesha matokeo yanayoahidi. Utaji wa kifolojia wa lugha za Ethiopia una athari kubwa ya utendaji wa SMT has a pale lengo ni lugha za Ethiopia. Sasa tunafanya kazi kwa ajili ya kujitengeneza kwa lugha za Kiingereza-Ethiopia yenye moja kwa moja SMT.", 'de': "In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir einen Versuch zur Entwicklung paralleler Korpora für englische und äthiopische Sprachen, wie Amharisch, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta und Ge'ez. Die Korpora werden für die Durchführung von bidirektionalen statistischen maschinellen Übersetzungsexperimenten verwendet. Die BLEU-Werte der bidirektionalen Statistischen Maschinellen Übersetzung (SMT) zeigen ein vielversprechendes Ergebnis. Der morphologische Reichtum der äthiopischen Sprachen hat einen großen Einfluss auf die Leistung von SMT, insbesondere wenn es sich um äthiopische Sprachen handelt. Nun arbeiten wir an einer optimalen Ausrichtung für ein bidirektionales englisch-äthiopisches Sprachen SMT.", 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz iňlisçe we Etiopça diller üçin parallel korpora gelişmegi ýaly Amharça, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta we Ge'ez dillerini tassyklaýarys. Korpoýa iki görnüş statistik makina terjime edilişi deneyler üçin ulanylýar. BLEU iki görnöşi Statistik Maşynyň terjime (SMT) sistemleriniň sanlarynyň bir söz netijesini görkez. Etiopça dillerin morfolojik baýramçylygy SMT dilleriniň eserleşmesine örän täsir edýär, haçanda maksadlar Etiopça dillerdir. Indi biz iki görnüş Iňlisçe-Etiopça SMT dilleri üçin optimal bir çyzyga çevrilýäris.", 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons 'n probeer teenoor die ontwikkeling van parallele korpora vir Engels en Etiopiaanse tale, soos Amhariese, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta en Ge'ez. Die korpora word gebruik om 'n twee- rigting statistiese masjien vertaling eksperimente te doen. Die BLES-rekening van die twee-rigting Statistiese Masjien Vertaling (SMT) stelsels vertoon 'n beloftende resultaat. Die morfologiese rykdom van die Etiopiaanse tale het 'n groot invloek op die prestasie van SMT spesiaal wanneer die doel Ethiopiese tale is. Nou werk ons teen 'n optimale lyn vir 'n twee-rigting Engels-Etiopiaanse tale SMT.", 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ፣ የኢንጂልኛ እና የኢትዮጵያ ቋንቋዎች፣ አሜሪካ፣ ቲግሪጋን፣ አፌን-ኦሮሞ፣ ኦላቴና እና ጌ ያሉትን አካላዊ ኮርፖርት ለመፍጠር ለመግለጥ የሚችል ሙከራ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ኮርፖሬያው በሀይዳዊ የሳንተር ትርጉም ፈተና ለመፈለግ ይጠቅማል፡፡ የBLEU scores of the bi-directional statistical machine translation (SMT) systems show a promising result. የኢትዮጵያውያን ቋንቋዎች የሞፎological ሀብት የኢትዮጵያ ቋንቋዎች በተለዩ ጊዜ የSMT ውጤት ውጤት ላይ ታላቅ ጥቅም አላቸው። አሁንም የኢንጂልኛ-ኢትዮጵያ ቋንቋዎች SMT ለማቀናቀል እናስፈልጋለን፡፡', 'az': "Bu kańüńĪzda, Amharic, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta v…ô Ge'ez kimi ńįngilizce v…ô Etiopia dill…ôrin paralel korpora t…ôŇükil etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn bir √ßalńĪŇüma t…ôrzini t…ôsdiq edirik. Korpora iki t…ôr…ôfli statistik maŇüńĪna √ßevirilm…ôsi t…ôcr√ľb…ôl…ôrini t…ôqdim etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edilir. ńįkinci t…ôr…ôfli Statistik Makinel…ôrin (SMT) sisteml…ôrin BLEU n√∂qt…ôl…ôri v…ô ‚Äô d verici sonu√ßlarńĪnńĪ g√∂st…ôrir. Etiopya dill…ôrin morfolojik zenginlińüi, m…ôqs…ôdil…ôr Etiopya dill…ôri olduńüu zaman SMT performansńĪna b√∂y√ľk bir etkisi var. ńįndi biz iki t…ôr…ôfli ńįngilizce-Etopiya dill…ôrinin SMT √ľ√ß√ľn optimal t…ôr…ôfl…ônm…ôy…ô √ßalńĪŇüńĪrńĪq.", 'sq': "Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë një përpjekje drejt zhvillimit të korprave paralele për gjuhët angleze dhe etiopike, të tilla si Amhariç, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta dhe Ge'ez. Korpora përdoret për kryerjen e eksperimenteve të përkthimit të makinave statistike dy-drejtuese. Punimet e BLEU-së të sistemeve dy-drejtuese të përkthimit të Makinës Statistike (SMT) tregojnë një rezultat premtues. pasuria morfologjike e gjuhëve etiopiane ka një ndikim të madh në shfaqjen e SMT-ve veçanërisht kur objektivat janë gjuhët etiopiane. Tani po punojmë drejt një rregullimi optimal për një gjuhë dy-drejtuese anglisht-etiopiane SMT.", 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք անգլերենի և էթիոպիացի լեզուների զուգահեռ կոպորա զարգացման փորձը, ինչպիսիք են Ամարիկը, Տիգրինան, Աֆան-Օրոմոն, Ուոլայտան և Ջեեզը: Կոպորան օգտագործվում է երկու ուղղությամբ վիճակագրական մեքենայի թարգմանման փորձերի կատարման համար: Երկու ուղղությամբ վիճակագրական մեքենայի թարգմանման (SMT) համակարգերի ԲԼԵՎ գնահատականները ցույց են տալիս խոստացնող արդյունք: Էթիոպիական լեզուների մորֆոլոգիական հարստությունը մեծ ազդեցություն ունի SMT-ի կատարման վրա, հատկապես երբ նպատակները էթիոպիական լեզուներ են: Այժմ մենք աշխատում ենք օպտիմալ հարմարեցման համար երկու ուղղությամբ անգլերեն-էթիոպական լեզուների SMT-ի համար:', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা ইংরেজি এবং ইথিওপিয়ান ভাষার জন্য প্যালেলিল কর্পোরা উন্নয়নের প্রতি একটি প্রচেষ্টা বর্ণনা করি যেমন আমারিক, তিগ্রিগ্রিনা, আফান-ওরোমো, উলাত এই কোর্পোরা ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে ব্যাটিডিয়াল পরিসংখ্যান পরিসংখ্যানের পরীক্ষার জন্য। বি সরাসরি পরিসংখ্যান মেশিন অনুবাদ (SMT) সিস্টেমের বিলু স্কোর প্রতিশ্রুতিশীল ফলাফল দেখায়। The morphological richness of the Ethiopian languages has a great impact on the performance of SMT specially when the targets are Ethiopian languages.  এখন আমরা দ্বিধানের ইংরেজী ও ইথিওপিয়ান ভাষার এসএমটি এর জন্য একটি অপ্রাসঙ্গিক স্থাপনের দিকে কাজ করছি।', 'ca': "En aquest article, descrivim un intent de desenvolupament de corpora paral·lela per a llengües ingleses i etíopes, com ara amàric, tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta i Ge'ez. El corpora s'utilitza per a fer experimentsde traducció de màquines estadístices bidireccionals. Les puntuacions BLEU dels sistemes bidireccionals de traducció de màquines estadístiques (SMT) mostren un resultat prometedor. La riquesa morfològica de les llengües etíopes té un gran impacte en el rendiment de la SMT especialment quan els objectius són llengües etíopes. Ara estem treballant cap a un alliniament optim per a un SMT bidireccional anglo-etíope.", 'cs': "V tomto článku popisujeme pokus o vývoj paralelních korpusů pro anglické a etiopské jazyky, jako jsou Amharic, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta a Ge'ez. Korpusy slouží k provádění obousměrných statistických experimentů strojového překladu. Skóre BLEU obousměrných systémů statistického strojového překladu (SMT) ukazují slibný výsledek. Morfologické bohatství etiopských jazyků má velký vliv na výkon SMT zvláště v případě, že cílem jsou etiopské jazyky. Nyní pracujeme na optimálním zarovnání obousměrného anglicko-etiopského jazyka SMT.", 'et': "Käesolevas töös kirjeldame katset arendada paralleelseid korpuseid inglise ja etioopia keeltele, nagu amharia, tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta ja Ge'ez. Korpuseid kasutatakse kahesuunaliste statistiliste masintõlke eksperimentide läbiviimiseks. Kahesuunalise statistilise masintõlke (SMT) süsteemide BLEU skoorid näitavad paljulubavat tulemust. Etioopia keelte morfoloogiline rikkus avaldab suurt mõju SMT jõudlusele, eriti kui sihtmärgiks on etioopia keeled. Nüüd töötame kahesuunalise inglise-etioopia keele SMT optimaalse ühtlustamise nimel.", 'fi': "Tässä artikkelissa kuvailemme yritystä kehittää rinnakkaisia korporaatioita englannin ja etiopian kielille, kuten amharic, tigrigna, afan-oromo, wolaytta ja ge'ez. Korpusia käytetään kaksisuuntaisten tilastollisten konekäännöskokeilujen suorittamiseen. Kaksisuuntaisten tilastollisten konekäännösjärjestelmien BLEU-pisteet osoittavat lupaavan tuloksen. Etiopian kielten morfologisella rikkaudella on suuri vaikutus SMT:n suorituskykyyn erityisesti silloin, kun kohteena ovat etiopian kielet. Nyt pyrimme optimoimaan kaksisuuntaisen englannin ja etiopian kielen SMT:n kaksisuuntaisen linjauksen.", 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما تلاشی را برای توسعه شرکت پارالی برای زبان انگلیسی و اتوپی، مثل آمهاریک، تیگرینا، آفان-اورومو، ولایتا و گاز توصیف می کنیم. این شرکت برای انجام آزمایش ترجمه ماشین دو مسیر استفاده می\u200cشود. نمونه\u200cهای BLEU از سیستم\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین Statistical (SMT) دو طرف نشان می\u200cدهند نتیجه\u200cی قول\u200cدهنده. ثروتمندی مورفولوژیک زبانهای اتوپی اثر بزرگی بر فعالیت SMT مخصوصاً وقتی هدف ها زبانهای اتوپی هستند. حالا ما داریم به سمت یک تنظیم optimal برای یک زبان انگلیسی-اتوپیایی SMT کار می کنیم.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo pokušaj razvoja paralelnog korporacije za engleski i Etiopski jezike, kao što su Amharski, Tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta i Ge ez. Koristi se za provođenje dvosmjernih statističkih eksperimenata za prevod mašine. BLEU rezultati dvosmjernih statističkih sustava prevoda (SMT) pokazuju obećavajući rezultat. Morfološka bogatstva Etiopskih jezika ima veliki uticaj na učinku SMT-a posebno kada su ciljevi Etiopski jezici. Sada radimo ka optimalnom poravnanju za dvosmjerno engleski-Etiopski SMT jezika.', 'jv': 'Nanging kuwi iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo nggawe gerakan kanggo tuwih-tuwih karo perusahaan kanggo Lingué Inggris karo Etiôp, koyaké amhari, Tigringna, Afan-Oriomo, wolayta karo Gez. Cebutun Punika blok sing dibenakake karo sistem sing dibenaké, dadi tanggal (SMT) Awakdhéwé kuwi nyong bok sing luwih barang Etipus kuwi nggawe barang SMT karo sakjane kanggo nggawe tarjamahan kanggo idiwang Etipus. Saiki, kita mau gunakake meluran kanggo nggawe luwih operasi kanggo saben tarjamahan ingkang-Etipus SMT.', 'he': "בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים ניסיון לפיתוח של גופורה מקבילה לשונות אנגליות ואתיופיות, כמו אמהרית, טיגרינה, אפן-אורומו, וולאיטה וג'ז. הקופורה משתמשת לבצע ניסויים של התרגום של מכונות סטטיסטיות שתיים כיוונים. נקודות BLEU של מערכות התרגום של מכונות סטטיסטיקה שתי כיוונים (SMT) מראות תוצאה מבטיחה. העשירות המורפולוגית של שפות אתיופיות יש השפעה גדולה על ההופעה של SMT במיוחד כשהמטרות הן שפות אתיופיות. עכשיו אנחנו עובדים לכיוון התאמה אופטימית לשפה אנגלית-אתיופית שתי כיוונים SMT.", 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana juyin ta wajen ƙararin da ke sami zuwa harshen Ingiriya da Ethiopia, kamar Amharic, Tigrenga, Afan-Oromi, Wolaytta da Ge'iz. Yana amfani da shirin karya wata jarrabo ta fassarar masu shiryuwa da takis. @ item: inmenu Taimar mutane da harshen Ethiopia yana da matsayi mai girma a kan aikin SMT hasa'a idan misalin su kasance harshen Ethiopia. Aka nan munã aiki zuwa wani sauri mai tsawo wa harshen Ingiriya-Ethiopia-da-sauti SMT.", 'sk': "V prispevku opisujemo poskus razvoja vzporednih korpusov za angleške in etiopske jezike, kot so amhariščina, tigrigna, Afan-Oromo, Wolaytta in Ge'ez. Korpusi se uporabljajo za izvajanje dvosmernih statističnih eksperimentov strojnega prevajanja. Rezultati BLEU dvosmernih sistemov statističnega strojnega prevajanja (SMT) kažejo obetaven rezultat. Morfolško bogastvo etiopskih jezikov veliko vpliva na uspešnost SMT, zlasti če so cilji etiopski jeziki. Zdaj si prizadevamo za optimalno uskladitev dvosmernega angleško-etiopskega jezika SMT.", 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་ཨི་སི་ཡུ་ཡི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚོའི་ནང་གི་སྦྱོང་འཕེལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད། སྡོང BLEའདིས་གནས་ཚུལ་གྲངས་རིམ་པ་གཉིས་གཤམ་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་འཁོར་གཞུང་གི་ཚིག་ཕན་ཚུན་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཨེ་ཐོ་ཡིའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚོའི་དབྱིབས་འཕགས་རིས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་ཡུལ་འདི་ཨེ་ཐོ་ཡི་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་སྒོ་འབྱེད་དང་ཁྱད་པར་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་དང་ཨིན་ཡུའི་སྐད་རིགས་SMT གཉིས་གཤམ་གྱི་གྲལ་སྒྲིག་ཐད་ཤིག་ཏུ་གྲ་སྒྲིག་'}
{'en': 'Tailoring Neural Architectures for Translating from Morphologically Rich Languages', 'ar': 'تفصيل البنى العصبية للترجمة من اللغات الغنية شكليًا', 'fr': 'Adaptation des architectures neuronales pour la traduction à partir de langages morphologiquement riches', 'es': 'Adaptación de arquitecturas neuronales para traducir desde lenguajes ricos morfológicamente', 'pt': 'Adaptando arquiteturas neurais para tradução de linguagens morfologicamente ricas', 'ja': '形態学的に豊富な言語から翻訳するためのニューラルアーキテクチャのテーラリング', 'ru': 'Адаптация нейронных архитектур для перевода с морфологически богатых языков', 'hi': 'रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं से अनुवाद के लिए तंत्रिका आर्किटेक्चर सिलाई', 'zh': '定制神经架构,以繁言译', 'ga': "Ailtirí Néaracha a Chur in oiriúint d'Aistriú ó Theangacha atá Saibhir Moirfeolaíoch", 'hu': 'Neurális architektúrák testreszabása morfológiailag gazdag nyelvekről történő fordításhoz', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Personalizzare architetture neurali per tradurre da lingue morfologicamente ricche', 'kk': 'Марфологикалық бағатты тілдерден аудару үшін нейралық архитектураларды тайлау', 'lt': 'Neuralinių architektūrų, skirtų vertimui iš morfologiškai turtingų kalbų, nustatymas', 'mk': 'Размислување на неуралните архитектури за преведување од морфолошки богати јазици', 'ml': 'മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d റിച്ച് ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ആര്\u200dക്ടിച്ചറുത്തുക', 'ms': 'Name', 'mt': 'Tailoring Neural Architectures for Translating from Morphologically Rich Languages', 'mn': 'Марфологикийн баян хэлд орчуулахын тулд сэтгэл зүйн архитектурууд', 'no': 'Name', 'el': 'Προσαρμογή Νευρικών Αρχιτεκτόνων για Μετάφραση από Μορφολογικά Πλούσιες Γλώσσες', 'pl': 'Dostosowanie architektur neuronowych do tłumaczenia z języków bogatych morfologicznie', 'ro': 'Croirea arhitecturilor neurale pentru traducerea din limbi bogate morfologic', 'sr': 'Pripremanje neuroloških arhitektura za prevod iz morfološki bogatih jezika', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Tailoring Neural Architectures for Translation from Morphologically Rich Languages', 'ur': 'Morphologically Rich Languages', 'sv': 'Skräddarsydda neurala arkitekturer för översättning från morfologiskt rika språk', 'ta': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thái độ Kiến trúc thần kinh cho dịch từ ngôn ngữ Morpholo Rich', 'bg': 'Персонализиране на неврални архитектури за превод от морфологично богати езици', 'nl': 'Neurale architecturen op maat maken voor vertaling uit morfologisch rijke talen', 'da': 'Skræddersy neurale arkitekturer til oversættelse fra morfologisk rige sprog', 'hr': 'Priprema neuroloških arhitektura za prevod iz morfološki bogatih jezika', 'de': 'Anpassung neuronaler Architekturen für Übersetzungen aus morphologisch reichen Sprachen', 'id': 'Mengekor Arkitektur Neural untuk Terjemahan dari Bahasa Morfologis Kaya', 'ko': '형태가 풍부한 언어로부터 번역할 수 있도록 신경 구조를 재단하다', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza Makasiliano ya Neural kwa Kutafsiri kutoka lugha za Kimorphologically Rich', 'tr': 'Marfologiki Rich Dillerden terjime etmek üçin näraly arhitektura taýýarlanýar', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'ساختارهای عصبی برای ترجمه از زبانهای مورفولوژیکی پولدار', 'sq': 'Përzgjedhja e arkitekturave neuronale për përkthimin nga gjuhët morfologjikisht të pasura', 'am': 'ለመርፎሎጂ ሀብታም ቋንቋዎች ለመተርጓም የኔural Architecture for Translations from Morphologically Rich Languages', 'hy': 'Մորֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուներից թարգմանելու նյարդային ճարտարապետությունները', 'bn': 'মরোফোলজিক্যালি সমৃদ্ধ ভাষা থেকে অনুবাদের জন্য নিউরাল আর্কিটেক্টর তাইলোরিং করছে', 'bs': 'Očišćavanje neuroloških arhitektura za prevod iz morfološki bogatih jezika', 'ca': 'Tailoring Neural Architectures for Translating from Morphologically Rich Languages', 'az': 'Morphologically Zengin Dill톛rd톛n t톛rc칲m톛 etm톛k 칲칞칲n n칬ral arhitekt칲rl톛r', 'et': 'Neuraalsete arhitektuuride kohandamine morfoloogiliselt rikkalikest keeltest tõlkimiseks', 'cs': 'Přizpůsobení neuronových architektur pro překlad z morfologicky bohatých jazyků', 'fi': 'Neuraalisten arkkitehtuurien räätälöinti morfologisesti rikkaista kielistä kääntämiseen', 'jv': 'Ngulang sampeyan Jejaring', 'sk': 'Prilagajanje nevralnih arhitektur za prevajanje iz morfološko bogatih jezikov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'סיפור ארכיטקטורות עצביות לתרגום משפתים מורפולוגיות עשירות', 'bo': 'རྨང་གཞུང་གིས་རྨང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་ཚོར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དཔུད་རིགས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ།'}
{'en': 'A morphologically complex word (MCW) is a hierarchical constituent with meaning-preserving subunits, so word-based models which rely on surface forms might not be powerful enough to translate such structures. When translating from morphologically rich languages (MRLs), a source word could be mapped to several words or even a full sentence on the target side, which means an MCW should not be treated as an atomic unit. In order to provide better translations for MRLs, we boost the existing neural machine translation (NMT) architecture with a double- channel encoder and a double-attentive decoder. The main goal targeted in this research is to provide richer information on the encoder side and redesign the decoder accordingly to benefit from such information. Our experimental results demonstrate that we could achieve our goal as the proposed model outperforms existing subword- and character-based architectures and showed significant improvements on translating from German, Russian, and Turkish into English.', 'ar': 'الكلمة المعقدة شكليًا (MCW) هي مكون هرمي مع وحدات فرعية تحافظ على المعنى ، لذلك قد لا تكون النماذج القائمة على الكلمات والتي تعتمد على أشكال السطح قوية بما يكفي لترجمة مثل هذه الهياكل. عند الترجمة من اللغات الغنية شكليًا (MRLs) ، يمكن تعيين كلمة مصدر إلى عدة كلمات أو حتى جملة كاملة على الجانب المستهدف ، مما يعني أنه لا ينبغي معاملة MCW كوحدة ذرية. من أجل تقديم ترجمات أفضل لـ MRLs ، نقوم بتعزيز بنية الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) الحالية باستخدام مشفر مزدوج القناة ووحدة فك ترميز مزدوجة الانتباه. الهدف الرئيسي المستهدف في هذا البحث هو توفير معلومات أكثر ثراءً من جانب المشفر وإعادة تصميم وحدة فك التشفير وفقًا لذلك للاستفادة من هذه المعلومات. توضح نتائجنا التجريبية أنه يمكننا تحقيق هدفنا حيث أن النموذج المقترح يتفوق على البنى القائمة على الكلمات الفرعية والحروف وأظهر تحسينات كبيرة في الترجمة من الألمانية والروسية والتركية إلى الإنجليزية.', 'es': 'Una palabra morfológicamente compleja (MCW) es un componente jerárquico con subunidades que preservan el significado, por lo que los modelos basados en palabras que se basan en formas superficiales podrían no ser lo suficientemente poderosos como para traducir tales estructuras. Al traducir de lenguajes ricos en morfología (LMR), una palabra fuente podría asignarse a varias palabras o incluso a una oración completa en el lado objetivo, lo que significa que un MCW no debe tratarse como una unidad atómica. Con el fin de ofrecer mejores traducciones para los LMR, mejoramos la arquitectura de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) existente con un codificador de doble canal y un decodificador de doble atención. El objetivo principal de esta investigación es proporcionar información más rica en el lado del codificador y rediseñar el decodificador en consecuencia para beneficiarse de dicha información. Nuestros resultados experimentales demuestran que podíamos lograr nuestro objetivo, ya que el modelo propuesto supera a las arquitecturas existentes basadas en caracteres y subpalabras y muestra mejoras significativas en la traducción del alemán, el ruso y el turco al inglés.', 'pt': 'Uma palavra morfologicamente complexa (MCW) é um constituinte hierárquico com subunidades de preservação de significado, de modo que os modelos baseados em palavras que dependem de formas de superfície podem não ser poderosos o suficiente para traduzir tais estruturas. Ao traduzir de linguagens morfologicamente ricas (MRLs), uma palavra de origem pode ser mapeada para várias palavras ou até mesmo uma frase completa no lado de destino, o que significa que um MCW não deve ser tratado como uma unidade atômica. Para fornecer melhores traduções para MRLs, aumentamos a arquitetura de tradução automática neural (NMT) existente com um codificador de canal duplo e um decodificador de atenção dupla. O principal objetivo visado nesta pesquisa é fornecer informações mais ricas do lado do codificador e redesenhar o decodificador de acordo para se beneficiar dessas informações. Nossos resultados experimentais demonstram que podemos atingir nosso objetivo, pois o modelo proposto supera as arquiteturas existentes baseadas em subpalavras e caracteres e mostrou melhorias significativas na tradução do alemão, russo e turco para o inglês.', 'fr': "Un mot morphologiquement complexe (MCW) est un constituant hiérarchique avec des sous-unités préservant la signification, de sorte que les modèles basés sur des mots qui s'appuient sur des formes de surface peuvent ne pas être assez puissants pour traduire de telles structures. Lors de la traduction à partir de langues morphologiquement riches (LMR), un mot source peut être mappé à plusieurs mots ou même à une phrase complète du côté cible, ce qui signifie qu'un MCW ne doit pas être traité comme une unité atomique. Afin de fournir de meilleures traductions pour les LMR, nous renforçons l'architecture de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) existante avec un codeur à double canal et un décodeur à double attention. L'objectif principal visé dans cette recherche est de fournir des informations plus riches côté codeur et de reconcevoir le décodeur en conséquence pour bénéficier de ces informations. Nos résultats expérimentaux démontrent que nous pouvons atteindre notre objectif étant donné que le modèle proposé surpasse les architectures existantes basées sur des sous-mots et des caractères et a montré des améliorations significatives sur la traduction de l'allemand, du russe et du turc vers l'anglais.", 'ja': '形態学的に複雑な単語（ ＭＣＷ ）は、意味を保持するサブユニットを有する階層構成要素であるため、表面形態に依存する単語ベースのモデルは、そのような構造を翻訳するのに十分に強力ではない場合がある。 形態学的に豊富な言語（ ＭＲＬ ）から翻訳する場合、ソース単語は、いくつかの単語、またはターゲット側の完全な文章にマッピングすることができ、これは、ＭＣＷを原子単位として扱うべきではないことを意味する。 MRLのためのより良い翻訳を提供するために、既存のニューラルマシン翻訳（ NMT ）アーキテクチャを、ダブルチャネルエンコーダとダブルアテンティブデコーダで強化します。 この研究の主な目標は、エンコーダ側でより豊富な情報を提供し、そのような情報から利益を得るためにそれに応じてデコーダを再設計することです。 私たちの実験結果は、提案されたモデルが既存のサブワードおよび文字ベースのアーキテクチャを上回り、ドイツ語、ロシア語、トルコ語から英語への翻訳に大幅な改善を示したため、目標を達成できたことを示しています。', 'zh': '形杂词者(MCW)义之亚基分也,故依于外形者,或不足以译之。 当从富言(MRL)译,源词可映射至数单词至一全句,此意MCW不宜为原子单元。 为 MRL 重译,因双通道编码器注解码器以增神经机器翻译 (NMT) 架构。 大抵资之于编码器,而应之于计解码器,以受其益。 吾实验结果表明,吾所以得吾志者,以其形优于子词、字符之架构,而显于德语、俄语、土耳其语翻译成英语也。', 'hi': 'एक रूपात्मक रूप से जटिल शब्द (MCW) अर्थ-संरक्षण सबयूनिट्स के साथ एक पदानुक्रमित घटक है, इसलिए शब्द-आधारित मॉडल जो सतह के रूपों पर भरोसा करते हैं, ऐसी संरचनाओं का अनुवाद करने के लिए पर्याप्त शक्तिशाली नहीं हो सकते हैं। रूपात्मक रूप से समृद्ध भाषाओं (एमआरएल) से अनुवाद करते समय, एक स्रोत शब्द को कई शब्दों या यहां तक कि लक्ष्य पक्ष पर एक पूर्ण वाक्य में मैप किया जा सकता है, जिसका अर्थ है कि एक एमसीडब्ल्यू को परमाणु इकाई के रूप में नहीं माना जाना चाहिए। MRLs के लिए बेहतर अनुवाद प्रदान करने के लिए, हम मौजूदा तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद (NMT) आर्किटेक्चर को डबल-चैनल एनकोडर और डबल-चौकस डिकोडर के साथ बढ़ावा देते हैं। इस शोध में लक्षित मुख्य लक्ष्य एन्कोडर पक्ष पर समृद्ध जानकारी प्रदान करना है और इस तरह की जानकारी से लाभ उठाने के लिए तदनुसार डिकोडर को फिर से डिज़ाइन करना है। हमारे प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हम अपने लक्ष्य को प्राप्त कर सकते हैं क्योंकि प्रस्तावित मॉडल मौजूदा उप-शब्द- और चरित्र-आधारित आर्किटेक्चर को मात देता है और जर्मन, रूसी और तुर्की से अंग्रेजी में अनुवाद करने पर महत्वपूर्ण सुधार दिखाता है।', 'ru': 'Морфологически сложное слово (MCW) является иерархической составляющей с субъединицами, сохраняющими значение, поэтому основанные на словах модели, которые опираются на поверхностные формы, могут быть недостаточно мощными для перевода таких структур. При переводе с морфологически богатых языков (MRL) исходное слово может быть сопоставлено с несколькими словами или даже полным предложением на целевой стороне, что означает, что MCW не следует рассматривать как атомную единицу. Чтобы обеспечить лучшее преобразование для MRL, мы улучшаем существующую архитектуру нейронного машинного перевода (NMT) с помощью двухканального кодера и двойного внимательного декодера. Основной целью данного исследования является предоставление более обширной информации на стороне кодера и, соответственно, перепроектирование декодера, чтобы извлечь выгоду из такой информации. Наши экспериментальные результаты показывают, что мы могли бы достичь нашей цели, поскольку предлагаемая модель превосходит существующие архитектуры, основанные на подсловах и символах, и показала значительные улучшения при переводе с немецкого, русского и турецкого языков на английский.', 'ga': 'Is comhábhar ordlathach é focal atá casta ó thaobh moirfeolaíoch (MCW) le fo-aonaid a chaomhnaíonn brí, mar sin b’fhéidir nach mbeadh múnlaí focal-bhunaithe a bhíonn ag brath ar fhoirmeacha dromchla sách cumhachtach chun struchtúir dá leithéid a aistriú. Agus é á aistriú ó theangacha atá saibhir i moirfeolaíocht (MRLanna), d’fhéadfaí focal foinse a mhapáil go cúpla focal nó fiú abairt iomlán ar an taobh sprice, rud a chiallaíonn nár cheart déileáil le MCW mar aonad adamhach. Chun aistriúcháin níos fearr a chur ar fáil do MRLanna, déanaimid an ailtireacht néaraistriúcháin meaisín (NMT) atá ann faoi láthair a threisiú le hionchódóir cainéal dúbailte agus díchódóir aireach dúbailte. Is é an príomhsprioc a ndírítear air sa taighde seo ná faisnéis níos saibhre a sholáthar ar thaobh an ionchódóra agus an díchódóir a athdhearadh dá réir chun leas a bhaint as an bhfaisnéis sin. Léiríonn ár dtorthaí turgnamhacha go bhféadfaimis ár sprioc a bhaint amach mar go sáraíonn an tsamhail mholta na hailtireachtaí atá bunaithe ar fhofhocail agus ar charachtair agus gur léirigh sé feabhsuithe suntasacha ar an aistriúchán ón nGearmáinis, ón Rúisis agus ón Tuircis go Béarla.', 'hu': 'A morfológiailag összetett szó (MCW) egy hierarchikus összetevő, jelentést megőrző alegységekkel, így a felületi formákra támaszkodó szóalapú modellek lehet, hogy nem elég erősek az ilyen struktúrák lefordításához. A morfológiailag gazdag nyelvekről (MRL) történő fordítás során a forrásszó több szóval vagy akár egy teljes mondattal is leképezhető a céloldalon, ami azt jelenti, hogy egy MCW nem kezelhető atomegységként. Az MRL-ek jobb fordítása érdekében kettős csatornás kódolóval és kettős figyelmes dekódolóval bővítjük a meglévő neurális gépi fordítás (NMT) architektúráját. A kutatás fő célja, hogy gazdagabb információkat szolgáltasson a kódoló oldaláról, és ennek megfelelően újratervezze a dekódolót, hogy hasznos legyen az ilyen információk. Kísérleti eredményeink azt mutatják, hogy elérhettük célunkat, mivel a javasolt modell felülmúlja a meglévő alszó- és karakteralapú architektúrákat, és jelentős javulást mutatott a német, orosz és török angolról történő fordításban.', 'el': 'Μια μορφολογικά σύνθετη λέξη (MCW) είναι ένα ιεραρχικό συστατικό με υπομονάδες διατήρησης της έννοιας, οπότε τα μοντέλα βασισμένα σε λέξεις που βασίζονται σε επιφανειακές μορφές μπορεί να μην είναι αρκετά ισχυρά για να μεταφράσουν τέτοιες δομές. Κατά τη μετάφραση από μορφολογικά πλούσιες γλώσσες (ΑΟΚ), μια λέξη προέλευσης θα μπορούσε να αντιστοιχιστεί σε πολλές λέξεις ή ακόμη και σε μια πλήρη πρόταση στην πλευρά του στόχου, πράγμα που σημαίνει ότι μια λέξη δεν πρέπει να αντιμετωπίζεται ως ατομική μονάδα. Προκειμένου να παρέχουμε καλύτερες μεταφράσεις για ΑΟΚ, ενισχύουμε την υπάρχουσα αρχιτεκτονική νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT) με έναν κωδικοποιητή διπλοκαναλιών και έναν αποκωδικοποιητή διπλής προσοχής. Ο κύριος στόχος αυτής της έρευνας είναι η παροχή πλουσιότερων πληροφοριών από την πλευρά του κωδικοποιητή και ο επανασχεδιασμός του αποκωδικοποιητή ανάλογα για να επωφεληθεί από αυτές τις πληροφορίες. Τα πειραματικά μας αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι μπορούμε να επιτύχουμε το στόχο μας καθώς το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά τις υπάρχουσες αρχιτεκτονικές με βάση τις λέξεις και τους χαρακτήρες και έδειξε σημαντικές βελτιώσεις στη μετάφραση από τα γερμανικά, τα ρωσικά και τα τουρκικά στα αγγλικά.', 'it': "Una parola morfologicamente complessa (MCW) è un costituente gerarchico con sottounità che preservano il significato, quindi i modelli basati su parole che si basano su forme superficiali potrebbero non essere abbastanza potenti per tradurre tali strutture. Quando si traduce da linguaggi morfologicamente ricchi (MRLs), una parola sorgente potrebbe essere mappata a più parole o addirittura a una frase completa sul lato target, il che significa che un MCW non dovrebbe essere trattato come un'unità atomica. Al fine di fornire traduzioni migliori per gli MRL, potenziamo l'architettura esistente di traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) con un encoder a doppio canale e un decoder a doppio controllo. L'obiettivo principale di questa ricerca è quello di fornire informazioni più ricche sul lato encoder e ridisegnare il decoder di conseguenza per beneficiare di tali informazioni. I nostri risultati sperimentali dimostrano che potremmo raggiungere il nostro obiettivo in quanto il modello proposto supera le architetture esistenti basate su subparole e caratteri e ha mostrato miglioramenti significativi nella traduzione dal tedesco, russo e turco in inglese.", 'ka': 'მორპოლოგიურად კომპლექსი სიტყვა (MCW) იქნება იერაქტიკური კონსტიუნტი, რომელიც სანიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო სუბუნტების შესახებ, ამიტომ სიტყვანის მოდელები, რომელი როდესაც მოპოროლოგიურად ბეჭდვი ენებიდან (MRLs) გადატანა, შეიძლება მრავალური სიტყვის გადატანა ან უფრო მუშაობის სიტყვის, რომელიც ნიშნავს, რომ MCW არ უნდა იყოს ატომიური ერთეულის MRLs-ის უკეთესი გადაწყვეტილება, ჩვენ მიმდინარე ნეიროლური მანქანის გადაწყვეტილების (NMT) აქტიქტიქტურაციას ეუბრალური კანალური კოდირებით და ეუბრალური მონაცემე ამ სწავლობაში უფრო დიდი მიზეზი იყო უფრო დიდი ინფორმაცია, რომელიც კოდირების მხარეს და შესაბამისი გამოსახულებლად განახულებლად დიკოდირების გამოსახულებლად. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია მივიღოთ ჩვენი მიზეზი, როგორც ჩვენი მიზეზი მოდელის მოდელიც არსებობს სუბერიმენტების და საქაღალური აქტიქტიქტურების გარეშე', 'kk': 'Морфологиялық комплекс сөз (MCW) мәліметті сақтау үшін иерархиялық бірліктері, сондықтан мәліметті сақтау үшін мәліметті сақтау үшін мәліметті қалдыру үшін мәліметтің негізделген ү Морфологиялық баяны тілдерден (MRL) аударғанда, көзінің сөзі бірнеше сөздерге немесе мақсатты сөздерге да толық сөздерге карталануға болады, бұл MCW атомдық бірлігі ретінде қатынауға тиіс. МРЛ үшін жақсы аудармаларды таңдау үшін, біз бар невралдық компьютердің аудармаларды (NMT) архитектурасын екі- арналдық кодері мен екі- қатарлық декодермен көтереміз. Бұл зерттеулердің негізгі мақсаты - кодер жағындағы бағатты мәлімет беру және осы мәліметті қалай декодерді қайта сақтау. Біздің эксперименттік нәтижелеріміз мақсатымызды жеткізе аламыз дегенді көрсетеді. Бұл үлгі бар субсөздерді және таңбаларды негіздеген архитектураларды жеткізе алады және неміс, руссиялық және Түрк тілке', 'lt': 'Morfologiškai sudėtingas žodis (MCW) yra hierarchinė sudedamoji dalis su reikšmę išsaugojančiais padaliniais, taigi žodžiu grindžiami modeliai, kurie priklauso nuo paviršiaus formų, gali būti nepakankamai galingi tokių struktūrų vertimui. Vertant iš morfologiškai turtingų kalbų (DLK), išorinį žodį galima paversti keliais žodžiais arba net visais tikslinės pusės sakiniais, o tai reiškia, kad MCW neturėtų būti laikomas atominiu vienetu. Siekiant geriau išversti DLK, stipriname esamą nervinių mašinų vertimo (NMT) architektūrą dviejų kanalų kodatoriumi ir dviejų dėmesio kodatoriumi. Pagrindinis šiame tyrime numatytas tikslas – suteikti turtingesnę informaciją kodavimo pusėje ir atitinkamai perskirstyti dekoderį, kad ši informacija būtų naudinga. Mūsų eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad galėtume pasiekti savo tikslą, nes siūlomas modelis atitinka esamas subžodžių ir simbolių architektūras ir parodė reikšmingus vertimo iš vokiečių, rusų ir turkų į anglų kalbą patobulinimus.', 'ms': 'Kata yang kompleks secara morfologik (MCW) ialah komponen hierarkik dengan subunit yang menyimpan makna, jadi model berdasarkan perkataan yang bergantung pada bentuk permukaan mungkin tidak cukup kuat untuk menerjemahkan struktur seperti itu. Apabila menerjemahkan dari bahasa yang kaya secara morfologik (MRL), perkataan sumber boleh dipetakan ke beberapa perkataan atau bahkan kalimat penuh di sisi sasaran, yang bermakna MCW tidak patut dianggap sebagai unit atom. Untuk menyediakan terjemahan yang lebih baik untuk MRL, kami meningkatkan arkitektur terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) yang wujud dengan pengekod saluran ganda dan pengekod perhatian ganda. Tujuan utama yang ditujukan dalam kajian ini adalah untuk menyediakan maklumat yang lebih kaya pada sisi pengekod dan merencanakan semula pengekod sesuai dengan itu untuk mengambil manfaat dari maklumat tersebut. Our experimental results demonstrate that we could achieve our goal as the proposed model outperforms existing subword- and character-based architectures and showed significant improvements on translating from German, Russian, and Turkish into English.', 'ml': 'ഒരു മോര്\u200dഫോളജിക്കല്\u200d കുഴപ്പമുള്ള വാക്ക് (MCW) അതിന്\u200dറെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം- സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്ന സബ്യൂണിറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉള്ള ഹിയെരാര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പാണ്. അതുകൊണ് മോര്\u200dഫോളിക്കല്\u200d സമ്പന്നരായ ഭാഷകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുമ്പോള്\u200d, ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സ് വാക്ക് കൂടുതല്\u200d വാക്കുകളിലേക്ക് മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യുമ്പോള്\u200d  MRLകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി നല്ല പരിഭാഷകങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകുവാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി, നിലവിലുള്ള ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ (NMT) ആര്\u200dക്കിട്ടറിക്കുന്നത് രണ്ട് ചാനല്\u200d കോഡെ ഈ പരിശോധനത്തിലെ പ്രധാന ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം എന്തെന്നാല്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം എത്താന്\u200d കഴിയുമെന്ന് തെളിയിക്കുന്നു. പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള സബ്വോര്\u200dഡ്- അക്ഷരര്\u200dത്ഥ', 'mn': 'Морфологийн төвөгтэй үг (MCW) гэдэг нь утгатай хамгаалах суб-нэгжүүдийн төвөгтэй байгууллага юм. Тиймээс гадаргуу хэлбэрээс хамгаалдаг үг загварууд ийм бүтцийг орлуулахад хангалттай хүчтэй байж магадгүй. Морфологийн баян хэлээс (MRLs) орчуулахад эх үүсвэрийн үг хэдэн үг эсвэл зорилготой талд бүрэн өгүүлбэр газрын зураг зурж болно. Энэ нь MCW-г атомын нэгж болгохгүй гэсэн үг. MRL-д илүү сайн орчуулалт өгөхийн тулд бид суурилсан мэдрэлийн машин орчуулалт (NMT) архитектурыг давхар архитектур, хоёр давхар архитектур, хоёр давхар архитектурыг нэмэгдүүлнэ. Энэ судалгаанд зориулсан гол зорилго нь кодчуудын талд баян мэдээлэл өгөх ба тэдгээр мэдээллээс ашиг ашиглах зорилго юм. Бидний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний зорилго олох боломжтой гэдгийг харуулж байна. Өөрсдийн загвар нь суурь үг болон харилцааны суурь барилгууд болон Герман, Орос, Турк, Англи хэл руу орчуулахад маш их сайжруулсан.', 'mk': 'Морфолошки комплексен збор (MCW) е хиерархичен конститунт со подединици за зачувување на значењето, така што зборни модели кои се потпираат на површината можеби не се доволно моќни за преведување на вакви структури. Кога се преведува од морфолошки богати јазици (МРЛ), изворен збор може да се мапира на неколку зборови или дури и целосна реченица на страната на целта, што значи дека MCW не треба да се третира како атомска единица. Со цел да обезбедиме подобри преводи за МРЛ, ја зајакнуваме постоечката архитектура за превод на невројални машини (НМТ) со двоканален кодер и двоканален декодер. Главната цел насочена во ова истражување е да се обезбедат побогати информации на страната на кодерот и да се предизајнира декодерот соодветно за да се користи од ваквите информации. Нашите експериментални резултати покажуваат дека можеме да ја оствариме нашата цел бидејќи предложениот модел ги надминува постојните архитектури базирани на подзборови и карактери и покажа значителни подобрувања во преводот од германски, руски и турски на англиски.', 'no': 'Eit morfologisk komplekst ord (MCW) er ein hierarkisk konstituent med undereiningar som gjeld mening og beholdar, slik at ordbaserte modeller som rely på overflateformar kan kanskje ikkje vera kraftig nok for å oversette slike strukturar. Når det vert omsett frå morfologisk rike språk (MRLs), kan ein kjeldeord bli kartert til fleire ord eller til og med ein fullt setning på målside, som betyr at ein MCW ikkje skal behandleast som ein atomeining. For å gjera betre omsetjingar for MRL, styrer vi den eksisterande neuralmaskineoversettelsa (NMT) arkitekturen med ein dobbelkanal- kodar og ein dobbelt attentiv dekoder. Dette hovudmålet som er målt i denne forskningen er å gje riklare informasjon om koderingssiden og omsette dekoderen derfor for for å få nytte frå slike informasjon. Våre eksperimentelle resultater demonstrerer at vi kunne oppnå målet vårt som den foreslåde modellen utfører eksisterande underord- og teiknbaserte arkitekturar og viste signifikante forbedringar på omsetjinga frå tysk, russisk og tursk til engelsk.', 'mt': 'Il-kelma morfoloġikament kumplessa (MCW) hija kostitwent ġerarkiku b’subunitajiet li jippreservaw it-tifsira, għalhekk mudelli bbażati fuq il-kliem li jiddependu fuq forom tal-wiċċ jistgħu ma jkunux qawwija biżżejjed biex jittraduċu strutturi bħal dawn. Meta tiġi tradotta minn lingwi morfoloġikament rikki (MRLs), kelma tas-sors tista’ tiġi mmappjata għal diversi kliem jew saħansitra sentenza sħiħa fuq in-naħa fil-mira, li jfisser li MCW m’għandux jiġi ttrattat bħala unit à atomika. Sabiex jiġu pprovduti traduzzjonijiet a ħjar għall-MRLs, aħna nixprunaw l-arkitettura eżistenti tat-traduzzjoni tal-magna newrali (NMT) b’kodifikatur b’kanal doppju u dekoder b’attenzjoni doppja. L-għan ewlieni mmirat f’din ir-riċerka huwa li tiġi pprovduta informazzjoni aktar rikka fuq in-naħa tal-kodifikatur u li d-dekoder jiġi ddisinjat mill-ġdid skont dan sabiex jibbenefika minn tali informazzjoni. Ir-riżultati sperimentali tagħna juru li nistgħu nilħqu l-għan tagħna billi l-mudell propost iwettaq arkitetturi eżistenti bbażati fuq subkliem u karattru u wera titjib sinifikanti fit-traduzzjoni mill-Ġermaniż, mir-Russu u mit-Turkiż għall-Ingliż.', 'ro': 'Un cuvânt complex morfologic (MCW) este un constituent ierarhic cu subunități care păstrează semnificația, astfel încât modelele bazate pe cuvinte care se bazează pe forme de suprafață ar putea să nu fie suficient de puternice pentru a traduce astfel de structuri. Când traduceți din limbi bogate din punct de vedere morfologic (LMR), un cuvânt sursă ar putea fi mapat la mai multe cuvinte sau chiar o propoziție completă pe partea țintă, ceea ce înseamnă că un MCW nu ar trebui tratat ca o unitate atomică. Pentru a oferi traduceri mai bune pentru LMR-uri, stimulăm arhitectura existentă de traducere automată neurală (NMT) cu un encoder cu două canale și un decoder cu dublă atenție. Scopul principal vizat în această cercetare este de a furniza informații mai bogate pe partea codificatorului și de a reproiecta decodorul în mod corespunzător pentru a beneficia de astfel de informații. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că ne-am putea atinge obiectivul deoarece modelul propus depășește arhitecturile existente bazate pe subcuvinte și caractere și a arătat îmbunătățiri semnificative în traducerea din germană, rusă și turcă în engleză.', 'pl': 'Morfologicznie złożone słowo (MCW) jest składnikiem hierarchicznym z podjednostkami zachowującymi znaczenie, więc modele oparte na słowach, które opierają się na formach powierzchniowych, mogą nie być wystarczająco silne do tłumaczenia takich struktur. Podczas tłumaczenia z języków bogatych morfologicznie (MRL) słowo źródłowe może być odwzorowane do kilku słów lub nawet pełnego zdania po stronie docelowej, co oznacza, że MCW nie powinno być traktowane jako jednostka atomowa. Aby zapewnić lepsze tłumaczenia NDP, wzmacniamy istniejącą architekturę neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) o koder dwukanałowy i dekoder dwuuważny. Głównym celem badań jest dostarczenie bogatszych informacji po stronie kodera i odpowiednie przeprojektowanie dekodera, aby korzystać z takich informacji. Nasze wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że możemy osiągnąć nasz cel, ponieważ proponowany model przewyższa istniejące architektury oparte na podsłowach i znakach oraz wykazał znaczące ulepszenia w tłumaczeniu z niemieckiego, rosyjskiego i tureckiego na angielski.', 'so': 'Hadal morphologically complex word (MCW) is a hierarchical constituent with meaning-preserving subunits, so models based on word-based which rely on surface forms may not be able to translate such structures. Marka lagu turjumo luqadaha hodanka ah (MRLs), waxaa lagu qori karaa erayo badan ama xataa eray buuxsan oo dhinaca goalka ah, taasoo micnaheedu waa inaan MCW looga macaamiloon sida qayb atom ah. Si aad u hesho turjumyo wanaagsan oo MRLs, waxaan boost a a turjumista existing neural machine neural (NMT) oo ku qoran labanlaab kanal codder iyo qoraal labanlaab ah. Ujeedada ugu horeeya ee waxbarashadan lagu talo galay waa in la siiyo macluumaad taajir ah oo ku saabsan dhinaca codsiga, laguna beddeliyo kaararka si loo faa’iido ah macluumaadkaas. Imtixaankayada waxaa muujiya in aynu ku gaadhi karno goalkayaga, marka modelka la soo jeeday ay ay soo bandhigto dhismaha ku qoran qoraalka hoose-qoraalka iyo xarafta, waxaana tusay hagaajimo aad u weyn in lagu turjumo afka Jarmalka, Ruushka iyo Turki ilaa Ingiriis.', 'si': 'Name මොර්ෆෝලෝජික විශේෂ භාෂාව (MRLs) වලින් වාර්තාවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වචනයක් වගේ වචනයක් වගේ වචනයක් නැත්නම් ඉලක්ක පැත්තේ සම් MRLs වෙනුවෙන් හොඳ වාර්තාවක් දෙන්න, අපි තියෙන්න තියෙන්නේ න්\u200dයුරෝල් යන්ත්\u200dරය භාවිත (NMT) විශාලාව සඳහා දුප්පු චානල් ක මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ මුලින් ඉලක්කය තමයි කෝඩාර් පැත්තේ විශාල තොරතුරු දෙන්න සහ කෝඩාර් පැත්තෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න සහ අපේ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වනවා අපිට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ලැබෙන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන', 'sr': 'Morfološki kompleksna reč (MCW) je hijerarhički sastav sa podjedinicama koja čuvaju značenje, tako da su modeli na rečima oslanjeni na površinskim oblicima možda nisu dovoljno moćni da prevedu takve strukture. Kada se prevodi sa morfološki bogatih jezika (MRL), izvornu reč može biti mapirana na nekoliko reči ili čak i punu rečenicu na ciljnoj strani, što znači da se MCW ne smije tretirati kao atomska jedinica. Da bismo obezbedili bolji prevod za MRL-ove, podižemo postojeću strukturu neuralnog prevoda (NMT) sa koderom dvokanala i dvostruko-pažljivom dekoderom. Glavni cilj ciljanog u ovom istraživanju je pružati bogatije informacije o koderskoj strani i potpisati dekoder u skladu s tim informacijama. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da možemo postići svoj cilj jer predloženi model iznosi postojeće podriječi i karakterske arhitekture i pokazuje značajne poboljšanje prema prevodu od njemačkog, ruskog i turskog na engleski jezik.', 'ta': 'Name Morphologically rich languages (MRLs) லிருந்து மொழிமாற்றப்படும்போது, மூல வார்த்தையை பல வார்த்தைகளுக்கு வரைபடமாக்கலாம் அல்லது இலக்கு பக்கத்தில் ஒரு முழு வாக்கியம In order to provide better translations for MRLs, we boost the existing neural machine translation (NMT) architecture with a double- channel encoder and a double-attentive decoder.  இந்த ஆராய்ச்சியில் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட முக்கிய இலக்கு அதிக தகவல் குறியீட்டு பக்கத்தில் உள்ளது மற்றும் குறியீட்டின் குறிய எங்கள் சோதனையின் முடிவுகள் எங்கள் இலக்கை நாம் அடைய முடியும் என்று காட்டுகிறது முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி நடப்பில் இருக்கும் துணை மற்றும் எழுத்து அட', 'sv': 'Ett morfologiskt komplext ord (MCW) är en hierarkisk komponent med betydelsebevarande underenheter, så ordbaserade modeller som förlitar sig på ytformer kanske inte är tillräckligt kraftfulla för att översätta sådana strukturer. När man översätter från morfologiskt rika språk (MRL), kan ett källord mappas till flera ord eller till och med en hel mening på målsidan, vilket innebär att en MCW inte bör behandlas som en atomenhet. För att ge bättre översättningar av MRL förstärker vi den befintliga neurala maskinöversättningsarkitekturen (NMT) med en dubbelkanals kodare och en dubbeluppmärksam avkodare. Det huvudsakliga målet i denna forskning är att ge rikare information på encodersidan och omdesigna avkodaren i enlighet med detta för att dra nytta av sådan information. Våra experimentella resultat visar att vi kunde nå vårt mål eftersom den föreslagna modellen överträffar befintliga underord- och teckenbaserade arkitekturer och visade betydande förbättringar när det gäller översättning från tyska, ryska och turkiska till engelska.', 'ur': 'ایک مورپولوژیکی پیچیدہ لفظ (MCW) ایک ہیرآرشیک کانسیٹ ہے جو مطلب-حفاظت کرنے والی سوب یونیٹیوں کے ساتھ ہے، لہٰذا لفظ بنیادی موڈل جو سطح فرموں پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں اس طرح کی ترجمہ کے لئے کافی طاقت جب مورپولوژیکی ثروت زبانوں سے (MRLs) ترجمہ کیا جاتا ہے، ایک سراسر لفظ کئی کلمات یا حتی ایک کامل لفظ کی طرف متوجہ ہو سکتا ہے، یعنی ایک MCW کو اتم یونیٹ کے طور پر نہ سمجھنا چاہتا ہے. MRLs کے لئے بہتر ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے، ہم موجود نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) معماری کو دوبل چانال کا کوڈر اور دوبل ڈیکوڈر کے ساتھ بڑھاتے ہیں. اس تحقیقات میں مالک مقصد یہ ہے کہ کوڈر کی طرف سے زیادہ مالک معلومات دے اور اس کے مطابق دکوڈر کو دوبارہ دئینڈ کریں۔ ہمارے آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہم اپنے موقع کو پہنچا سکتے ہیں جیسے پیشنهاد کی موډل موجود ہونے والی سوبرویڈ اور شخص بنیاد معماری معماری کے مطابق اور جرمن, روسی اور ترکیش سے انگلیسی کی طرف ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے بہت اضافہ کی۔', 'uz': 'Name Name Name Ushbu tarkibdagi asosiy maqsad - kodlash usulini kodlash usuli yordam berish va bu maʼlumotdan foydalanish uchun kodlash usulini qayta qayta qayta yaratish. Our experimental results demonstrate that we could achieve our goal as the proposed model outperforms existing subword- and character-based architectures and showed significant improvements on translating from German, Russian, and Turkish into English.', 'vi': 'Một từ thú sợ của trang thường lượng đạo (MCW) là một thức quý trị với chính chính có nghĩa. Vì thế một một các một bộ thống của nó có nghĩa nó, nên một bộ thô Khi dịch từ ngôn ngữ có độ phong phú (MRX) thì từ nguồn có thể được chỉ ra nhiều từ hoặc thậm chí là một câu đầy đủ ở phía mục tiêu, nghĩa là MCW không thể được coi là một đơn vị nguyên tử. Để cung cấp một bản dịch tốt hơn cho MRX Chúng tôi tăng cường cấu trúc dịch cỗ máy thần kinh (NMB) tồn tại với bộ mã hóa kênh kép và một bộ giải mã cẩn thận. Mục tiêu chính của nghiên cứu này là cung cấp những thông tin giàu có về mặt mã hóa và tái thiết kế bộ giải mã để có lợi dụng thông tin đó. Những kết quả thử nghiệm của chúng ta chứng minh rằng chúng ta có thể đạt được mục tiêu khi mô hình đã đề ra ngoài thực hiện các kiến trúc tiềm năng và tính cách đã có và đã có những cải tiến quan trọng trong việc chuyển từ Đức, Nga, Thổ sang Anh.', 'bg': 'Морфологично сложната дума (MCW) е йерархична съставка с подединици, запазващи значението, така че моделите, базирани на думи, които разчитат на повърхностни форми, може да не са достатъчно мощни, за да преведат такива структури. Когато се превежда от морфологично богати езици (МДГОВ), изходната дума може да бъде картографирана с няколко думи или дори с пълно изречение от целевата страна, което означава, че MCW не трябва да се третира като атомна единица. За да осигурим по-добри преводи на МДГОВ, ние подобряваме съществуващата архитектура на невронния машинен превод (НМТ) с двуканален кодер и двойно внимателен декодер. Основната цел на изследването е да се осигури по-богата информация от страна на кодера и да се преработи декодера съответно, за да се възползва от такава информация. Нашите експериментални резултати показват, че можем да постигнем целта си, тъй като предложеният модел превъзхожда съществуващите архитектури, базирани на поддуми и символи, и показва значителни подобрения в превода от немски, руски и турски на английски език.', 'hr': 'Morfološki kompleksna riječ (MCW) je hijerarhijski sastav s podjedinicama koja čuvaju značenje, tako da modeli koji se oslanjaju na površinske oblike možda nisu dovoljno moćni da prevedu takve strukture. Kada se prevodi sa morfološki bogatih jezika (MRL), izvornu riječ može biti mapirana na nekoliko riječi ili čak i punu rečenicu na ciljnoj strani, što znači da se MCW ne smije tretirati kao atomska jedinica. Da bismo omogućili bolji prevod za MRL-e, pojačali smo postojeću strukturu prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) s koderom dvokanala i dvostruko pozornim dekoderom. Glavni cilj u ovom istraživanju je pružati bogatije informacije o koderu strani i premjestiti dekoder u skladu s tim informacijama. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da možemo postići svoj cilj jer predloženi model iznosi postojeće podriječje i karakterske arhitekture i pokazuje značajne poboljšanje prema prevodu s njemačkog, ruskog i turskog na engleski jezik.', 'da': "Et morfologisk komplekst ord (MCW) er en hierarkisk bestanddel med betydningsbevarende underenheder, så ordbaserede modeller, der er afhængige af overfladeformer, er måske ikke stærke nok til at oversætte sådanne strukturer. Ved oversættelse fra morfologisk rige sprog (MRL), kan et kildeord kortlægges til flere ord eller endda en hel sætning på målsiden, hvilket betyder, at en MCW ikke bør behandles som en atomenhed. For at kunne levere bedre oversættelser af MRL'er, øger vi den eksisterende neurale maskinoversættelsesarkitektur (NMT) med en dobbeltkanal encoder og en dobbelt-opmærksom dekoder. Hovedformålet med denne forskning er at give fyldigere oplysninger på encodersiden og redesigne dekoden i overensstemmelse hermed for at drage fordel af sådanne oplysninger. Vores eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vi kunne nå vores mål, da den foreslåede model overgår eksisterende underord- og tegnbaserede arkitekturer og viste betydelige forbedringer i oversættelse fra tysk, russisk og tyrkisk til engelsk.", 'nl': "Een morfologisch complex woord (MCW) is een hiërarchisch onderdeel met betekenisbehoud subeenheden, dus woordgebaseerde modellen die afhankelijk zijn van oppervlaktevormen kunnen niet krachtig genoeg zijn om dergelijke structuren te vertalen. Bij het vertalen van morfologisch rijke talen (MRL's) kan een bronwoord worden toegewezen aan meerdere woorden of zelfs een volledige zin aan de doelzijde, wat betekent dat een MCW niet als een atomaire eenheid moet worden behandeld. Om betere vertalingen voor MRL's te kunnen leveren, versterken we de bestaande neuronale machine translation (NMT) architectuur met een dubbelkanaals encoder en een dubbelattente decoder. Het belangrijkste doel van dit onderzoek is om rijkere informatie aan de encoderzijde te verstrekken en de decoder dienovereenkomstig te herontwerpen om van dergelijke informatie te profiteren. Onze experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat we ons doel konden bereiken omdat het voorgestelde model beter presteert dan bestaande subwoord- en karaktergebaseerde architecturen en significante verbeteringen vertoonde bij het vertalen van Duits, Russisch en Turks naar Engels.", 'de': 'Ein morphologisch komplexes Wort (MCW) ist eine hierarchische Komponente mit bedeutungserhaltenden Untereinheiten, so dass wortbasierte Modelle, die auf Oberflächenformen basieren, möglicherweise nicht mächtig genug sind, um solche Strukturen zu übersetzen. Bei der Übersetzung aus morphologisch reichen Sprachen (MRLs) könnte ein Quellwort auf mehrere Wörter oder sogar einen ganzen Satz auf der Zielseite abgebildet werden, was bedeutet, dass ein MCW nicht als atomare Einheit behandelt werden sollte. Um bessere Übersetzungen für MRLs zu ermöglichen, erweitern wir die bestehende Architektur der neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung (NMT) mit einem Doppelkanalencoder und einem doppelt aufmerksamen Decoder. Das Hauptziel dieser Forschung ist es, umfassendere Informationen auf der Encoder-Seite bereitzustellen und den Decoder entsprechend umzugestalten, um von solchen Informationen zu profitieren. Unsere experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass wir unser Ziel erreichen konnten, da das vorgeschlagene Modell bestehende Subword- und Zeichenarchitekturen übertrifft und signifikante Verbesserungen bei der Übersetzung aus dem Deutschen, Russischen und Türkischen ins Englische zeigte.', 'id': 'A morphologically complex word (MCW) is a hierarchical constituent with meaning-preserving subunits, so word-based models which rely on surface forms might not be powerful enough to translate such structures.  Ketika menerjemahkan dari bahasa yang kaya secara morfologis (MRL), kata sumber dapat dipetakan ke beberapa kata atau bahkan kalimat penuh di sisi sasaran, yang berarti MCW tidak harus diperlakukan sebagai unit atom. Untuk menyediakan terjemahan yang lebih baik untuk MRL, kami meningkatkan arsitektur terjemahan mesin saraf (NMT) yang ada dengan pengekode dua saluran dan pengekode dua perhatian. Tujuan utama yang ditujukan dalam penelitian ini adalah untuk menyediakan informasi yang lebih kaya di sisi pengekode dan merencanakan ulang pengekode sesuai dengan itu untuk mengambil keuntungan dari informasi tersebut. Hasil percobaan kita menunjukkan bahwa kita bisa mencapai tujuan kita sebagai model yang diusulkan melampaui arsitektur subword dan karakter yang ada dan menunjukkan peningkatan yang signifikan dalam terjemahan dari Jerman, Rusia, dan Turki ke Inggris.', 'sw': 'MCW ni neno tatizo la msingi (MCW) linalomaanisha viungo vinavyolinda, kwa hiyo miundo yenye msingi wa maneno yanayotegemea mifumo ya juu inaweza kuwa na uwezo wa kutosha kutafsiri miundombinu kama hizi. Wakati kutafsiri kutoka lugha zenye utajiri wa kifolojia (MRLs), neno la chanzo kinaweza kuchapishwa kwa maneno kadhaa au hata hukumu kamili kwenye upande wa lengo, ambalo linamaanisha kuwa MCW haipaswi kuchukuliwa kama kituo cha atomu. Ili kutoa tafsiri bora kwa ajili ya MRLs, tunaongeza ujenzi wa utafsiri wa mashine ya neurali (NMT) kwa kiwango kikubwa cha mkononi mara mbili na kiwango cha kupunguza vifaa vinginevyo viwili. Lengo kuu lililolengwa katika utafiti huu ni kutoa taarifa za utajiri zaidi kuhusu upande wa kodi na kurekebisha kodi kwa sababu ya faida ya taarifa hizo. Matokeo yetu ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa tunaweza kufikia lengo letu kama mifano ilivyopendekezwa inavyoonyesha majengo yaliyopo kwenye msingi wa maneno- na wahusika na kuonyesha maboresho makubwa kuhusu kutafsiri kutoka Ujerumani, Urusi na Uturuki hadi Kiingereza.', 'fa': 'یک کلمه مرفولاژی پیچیده (MCW) یک داستان داستان داستان داستانی با معنی حفاظت زیر واحدهای معنی است، بنابراین مدل\u200cهای بنیادی به کلمه که بر فرم سطح اعتماد دارند ممکن است به اندازه کافی قوی باشد تا این ساختارها را ترجمه کند. وقتی از زبانهای مورفولوژیکی پولدار (MRLs) ترجمه می\u200cشود، یک کلمه منبع می\u200cتواند به چند کلمه یا حتی یک کلمه کامل در سمت هدف برقرار شود، که یعنی یک MCW نباید به عنوان واحد اتمی درمان شود. برای تغییرات بهتر برای MRLs، ما معماری نورول موجود (NMT) را با یک کودهر دو کانال و یک dekoder دو دفعه مواظب می\u200cکنیم. هدف اصلی که در این تحقیقات هدف گرفته شده است این است که اطلاعات ثروتمندتر از طرف کودها را بدهید و به همین دلیل dekoder را برای سود از این اطلاعات بازسازی کنید. نتایج آزمایشی ما نشان می دهند که ما می توانیم هدف خود را به عنوان مدل پیشنهاد از زیر کلمه و معماری که بر اساس شخصیت وجود دارد انجام می دهیم و بهترین ترجمه های بزرگی را در ترجمه از آلمان، روسیه و ترکیه به انگلیسی نشان می دهیم.', 'ko': '형태복잡어(MCW)는 의미가 있는 보존 하위 단원의 차원 구조이기 때문에 표면적인 형식에 의존하는 단어 기반 모델은 이런 구조를 번역하기에 부족할 수 있다.형태가 풍부한 언어(MRL)에서 번역할 때 하나의 원시어는 목표단의 몇 개의 단어, 심지어 하나의 완전한 문장에 비칠 수 있다. 이것은 MCW가 하나의 원자 단원으로 간주되어서는 안 된다는 것을 의미한다.MRL에 더 좋은 번역을 제공하기 위해 우리는 이중 채널 인코더와 이중 관심 인코더를 사용하여 기존의 신경기계 번역(NMT) 체계 구조를 개선했다.본 연구의 주요 목표는 인코더 측에서 더욱 풍부한 정보를 제공하고 이에 상응하여 디코더를 재설계하여 이러한 정보에서 이익을 얻는 것이다.우리의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리는 우리의 목표를 실현할 수 있다. 왜냐하면 제시된 모델은 기존의 자어와 문자를 바탕으로 하는 체계 구조보다 우수하고 독일어, 러시아어, 터키어를 영어로 번역하는 데 현저한 개선이 있기 때문이다.', 'tr': 'Morfologiýaly karmaşık söz (MCW) bir iýerarhiýa taýýarlama subunatlary bilen meýilleşdirilýär, şonuň üçin sözleriň daýarlyk modelleri surat biçimlerine daýalan şekilde terjime etmek üçin ýeterlik güýçli däldir. Morfoloýlyk baý dillerden (MRLs) terjime edilende, bir çeşme sözleri birnäçe sözlere ýa-da maksadyň bir sözlere surat edilip biler, oňa MCW bir atom birimi hökmünde terjime edilmemelidir. MRLs üçin gowy terjime etmek üçin bolan neural maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) ýetişdirmegi üçin çift-kanal ködleme we çift-ünsli bir dekoder bilen ekleýäris. Bu araştyrmanyň esasy maksady şudyr: koder tarapynda baýlyk maglumaty beremek we koder tarapyny beýleki maglumaty üçin ýene-de süýtgetmek. Deneymeli netijelerimiz öz maksadymyzy ýetip biljekdigimizi teklip eden nusgasymyzy bolup bar we ol bar üçin öz subwoodlara - we karakterlere tabanly arhitekturlary ýüze çykaryp biljekdigimizi we nemesçe, Rusça we türkçe dilinden Iňlisçe terjime etmäge has bag', 'sq': 'Një fjalë morfologikisht e komplekshme (MCW) është një përbërës hierarkik me nënnjësi që ruajnë kuptimin, kështu që modelet me bazë fjalësh që mbështeten në format e sipërfaqes mund të mos jenë të fuqishëm për të përkthyer struktura të tilla. When translating from morphologically rich languages (MRLs), a source word could be mapped to several words or even a full sentence on the target side, which means an MCW should not be treated as an atomic unit.  Me qëllim që të ofrojmë përkthime më të mira për MRL, ne rritim arkitekturën ekzistuese të përkthimit të makinave nervore (NMT) me një kodues të kanalit të dyfishtë dhe një dekoder të dyfishtë vëmendje. Qëllimi kryesor i synuar në këtë kërkim është të ofrojë informacion më të pasur në anën e koduesit dhe të rishkruajë dekoderin në mënyrë të përshtatshme për të përfituar nga informacioni i tillë. Rezultatet tona eksperimentale demonstrojnë se ne mund të arrijmë qëllimin tonë pasi modeli i propozuar ekziston arkitektura ekzistuese bazuar në nënfjalë dhe karakter dhe tregoi përmirësime të rëndësishme në përkthimin nga gjermani, rus dhe turk në anglisht.', 'am': 'A morphologically complex word (MCW) is a hierarchical constituent with meaning-preserving subunits, so word-based models which rely on surface forms might not be powerful enough to translate such structures.  ከmorphologically ሀብታሞች ቋንቋዎች (MRLs) በመግለጽ ጊዜ የsource word may be mapped to several words or even full sentence on the target side, which means an MCW is not supposed to be a atomic unit. ለMRLs የተሻለ ትርጉም ለማድረግ፣ የአሁኑን የነዌብ መሣሪያን ትርጉም (NMT) የመሠረታዊውን መዝገብ እና በሁለት-channel encoding እና በሁለት-አዲስ አቃራቢ ቀድሚያ እናበረታለን፡፡ በዚህ ትምህርት ላይ የሚደረገው የዋነኛው ጉዳይ የሆኑት የሆኑት የኮድ መረጃዎች የሆኑን ክፍል ማቀናጃ እና ከዚህም መረጃዎች ለመጠቀም ማድረግ ማድረግ ነው፡፡ ፈተና ፍሬዎቻችን የግንኙነቱን አካባቢ እና የሥርዓት መሠረት ማድረግ እና በጀርመን፣ ሮሽኛ እና የቱርክ መንግስታት ለመዘርጋት የሚያስፈልገውን ትልቅ ጉዳይ ማድረግ ያሳየናል፡፡', 'hy': 'Մորֆոլոգիապես բարդ բառը (MCW) հիերարխիկ բաղադրիչ է, որն ունի իմաստ պահպանող ենթամիավորներ, այնպես որ բառի հիմնված մոդելները, որոնք հիմնված են մակերևույթի ձևերի վրա, կարող են բավականին հզոր չլինել նման կառուցված Երբ մաֆոլոգիապես հարուստ լեզուներից (ՄՌԼ) թարգմանվում է, աղբյուր բառը կարելի է քարտեզագրել մի քանի բառի կամ նույնիսկ ամբողջ նախադասության վրա նպատակային կողմում, ինչը նշանակում է, որ MCW-ը չպետք է վերաբերվում ատոմային միա ՄՌԼ-ի համար ավելի լավ թարգմանություններ տրամադրելու համար մենք խրախուսում ենք գոյություն ունեցող նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունների (NMT) ճարտարապետությունը երկու կանանց կոդերով և երկու ուշադրության կոդերով: Այս հետազոտության հիմնական նպատակն այն է, որ ավելի հարուստ տեղեկատվություն տրամադրենք կոդերի կողմում և վերաձևավորենք կոդերը, որպեսզի օգտագործենք այդ տեղեկատվությունը: Our experimental results demonstrate that we could achieve our goal as the proposed model outperforms existing subword- and character-based architectures and showed significant improvements on translating from German, Russian, and Turkish into English.', 'af': "'n Morfologiese kompleks woord (MCW) is 'n hierarkies konstituent met betekenis- behoort subeenhede, sodat woord- gebaseerde modele wat op oorspronklike vorms vertrou dalk mag nie kragtige genoeg wees om sodanige strukture te vertaal nie. Wanneer vertaling van morfologiese ryk tale (MRLs), kan 'n bron woord na veelvuldige woorde of selfs 'n volledige seting op die doel kant wees, wat beteken dat 'n MCW nie as 'n atomiese eenheid behandel moet word nie. In order to provide better translations for MRLs, we boost the existing neural machine translation (NMT) architecture with a double- channel encoder and a double- attentive decoder. Die hoofdoel wat in hierdie ondersoek gemaak is om ryker inligting op die enkoder kant te verskaf en die dekoder te herteken na voordeel van sodanige inligting. Ons eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons ons doel kon bereik as die voorgestelde model uitvoer bestaande subwoord- en karaktergebaseerde arkitektuur en wys betekende verbeteringe op te vertaling van Duits, Russe en Turkse na Engels.", 'bn': 'মোরফোলিক্যালিকভাবে জটিল শব্দ (এমসিউবি) হচ্ছে একটি হিয়েরার্কিল প্রতিনিধি যার মানে অর্থ সংরক্ষণ করা সাব ইউনিট, তাই শব্দের ভিত্তিক মডেল যা মাসে যখন মরোফোলিক্যাল ভাষায় সমৃদ্ধ ভাষা অনুবাদ করা হয় (এমআরএলএস), একটি উৎস শব্দ বেশ কয়েকটি শব্দে ম্যাপ করা যাবে অথবা এমনকি লক্ষ্যবস্তুতে একটি পুরো বাক্য মানচি এমআরএল এর জন্য ভালো অনুবাদ প্রদান করার জন্য আমরা বিদ্যমান নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) আর্কিস্টারেক্টার বাড়িয়ে দিয়েছি একটি দ্বিগুণ চ্যানেল এনক এই গবেষণার উদ্দেশ্যে প্রধান লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে এনকোডারের পাশে সমৃদ্ধ তথ্য প্রদান করা এবং এই তথ্য থেকে সুবিধা পুনরায় সংরক্ষণ করা। Our experimental results demonstrate that we could achieve our goal as the proposed model outperforms existing subword- and character-based architectures and showed significant improvements on translating from German, Russian, and Turkish into English.', 'ca': "Una paraula morfològicament complex a (MCW) és un constituent jeràrquic amb subunitats que conserven el sentit, així que els models basats en paraules que confien en formes superficials potser no són prou poderosos per traduir aquestes estructures. Quan es traduis de llengües morfològicament rics (LMR), es podria mapejar una paraula fonten diverses paraules o fins i tot una frase completa al costat de l'objectiu, que vol dir que un MCW no hauria de ser tractat com una unitat atòmica. Per tal de proporcionar millors traduccions a LMR, fomentem l'arquitectura de traducció neural de màquines (NMT) amb un codificador doble canal i un codificador doble atenció. The main goal targeted in this research is to provide richer information on the encoder side and redesign the decoder accordingly to benefit from such information.  Els nostres resultats experimentals demostren que podríem aconseguir el nostre objectiu mentre el model proposat supera les arquitectures existents basades en subparaules i caràcters i mostra millores significatives en la traducció d'alemanya, russa i turca en anglès.", 'az': 'Morfolojik kompleks söz (MCW) bir hiyerarşik komponentdir ki, anlamını qoruyub saxlayan altı ünvanları ilə birlikdə, bu yüzden səyahət formlarına təvəkkül edən modellər böyük yapıları tercümə etmək üçün yeterli güclü deyildir. Morfolojik zəngin dillərin (MRL) tərcümlərindən dönüşündə, mənbə sözü bir neçə sözlərə və ya hətta məqsəd tərəfində dolu sözlərə qarşılaşdırıla bilər ki, MCW atom birimi olaraq görünməyəcəkdir. MRL üçün daha yaxşı tercümələr təyin etmək üçün, həmin nöral maşın tercüməsini (NMT) arhitektarını iki kanal kodlayıcı və iki-dikkatli dekoderlə artırırıq. Bu araştırmalarda müəyyən edilən ən ən böyük məqsəd kodlayıcı tərəfindən daha zengin məlumat verməkdir və bu məlumatlardan fayda verməkdir. Bizim təcrübəmiz sonuçlarımız məqsədimizi təklif etdiyimiz modellərin mevcut sözlərdən və karakterlərdən qurulmuş arhitektarlarından üstün gəlməsini göstərir və Alman, Rus və Türk dilindən İngilizə tercümə etmək haqqında möhkəm uzlaşmaları göstərir.', 'bs': 'Morfološki kompleksna riječ (MCW) je hijerarhički sastav sa podjedinicama koja čuvaju značenje, tako da su modeli na riječima oslanjeni na površinskim oblicima možda nisu dovoljno moćni da prevedu takve strukture. Kada se prevodi sa morfološki bogatih jezika (MRL), izvornu riječ može biti mapirana na nekoliko riječi ili čak i punu rečenicu na ciljnoj strani, što znači da se MCW ne smije tretirati kao atomska jedinica. Da bismo omogućili bolji prevod za MRL-ove, pojačali smo postojeću strukturu prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) sa koderom dvokanala i dvostruko pozornim dekoderom. Glavni cilj ciljanog u ovom istraživanju je pružati bogatije informacije o koderskoj strani i premjestiti dekoder u skladu s tim informacijama. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da možemo postići svoj cilj jer predloženi model iznosi postojeće podriječi i karakterske arhitekture i pokazuje značajne poboljšanje prema prevodu od njemačkog, ruskog i turskog na engleski jezik.', 'cs': 'Morfologicky komplexní slovo (MCW) je hierarchická složka s podjednotkami zachovávajícími význam, takže slovní modely, které spoléhají na povrchové formy, nemusí být dostatečně silné k překladu takových struktur. Při překladu z morfologicky bohatých jazyků (MRL) by zdrojové slovo mohlo být mapováno na několik slov nebo dokonce na celou větu na cílové straně, což znamená, že MCW by neměla být považována za atomovou jednotku. Abychom mohli poskytnout lepší překlady MRL, posilujeme stávající architekturu neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) o dvoukanálový kodér a dekodér s dvojitou pozorností. Hlavním cílem tohoto výzkumu je poskytnout bohatší informace na straně snímače a odpovídajícím způsobem přepracovat dekodér tak, aby z těchto informací profitoval. Naše experimentální výsledky ukazují, že bychom mohli dosáhnout našeho cíle, protože navržený model překonává stávající architektury založené na podslovech a znakách a ukázal významné zlepšení překladu z němčiny, ruštiny a turečtiny do angličtiny.', 'et': 'Morfoloogiliselt keeruline sõna (MCW) on hierarhiline koostisosa tähendust säilitavate alamühikutega, nii et sõnapõhised mudelid, mis tuginevad pinnavormidele, ei pruugi olla piisavalt võimsad selliste struktuuride tõlkimiseks. morfoloogiliselt rikkatest keeltest tõlkimisel võib lähtesõna kaardistada mitmeks sõnaks või isegi täielikuks lauseks sihtküljel, mis tähendab, et MCW-d ei tohiks käsitleda aatomüksusena. Jääkide piirnormide paremaks tõlkimiseks tõhustame olemasolevat neuraalse masintõlke (NMT) arhitektuuri kahekanalise kodeerija ja topelttähelepaneliku dekoodriga. Selle uuringu põhieesmärk on pakkuda kodeerija poolel rikkalikumat teavet ja dekooderi vastavalt ümber kujundada, et sellisest teabest kasu saada. Meie eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et suudame saavutada oma eesmärgi, kuna kavandatud mudel ületab olemasolevaid alamsõna- ja märgipõhiseid arhitektuure ning näitas märkimisväärseid edusamme saksa, vene ja türgi keelest inglise keelde tõlkimisel.', 'fi': 'Morfologisesti monimutkainen sana (MCW) on hierarkkinen komponentti, jolla on merkitystä säilyttäviä aliyksiköitä, joten pintamuotoihin perustuvat sanapohjaiset mallit eivät välttämättä ole riittävän tehokkaita kääntämään tällaisia rakenteita. Kun käännetään morfologisesti rikkaista kielistä (MRL), lähdesana voitaisiin yhdistää useaan sanaan tai jopa koko lauseeseen kohdepuolella, mikä tarkoittaa, että MCW:tä ei pitäisi kohdella atomiyksikkönä. Parantaaksemme jäämien enimmäismäärien käännöksiä parannamme olemassa olevaa NMT-arkkitehtuuria kaksikanavaisella kooderilla ja kaksoistarkkaavaisella dekooderilla. Tutkimuksen päätavoitteena on tuottaa kooderin puolelta rikkaampaa tietoa ja suunnitella dekooderi uudelleen siten, että se hyötyy tällaisesta tiedosta. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että pystymme saavuttamaan tavoitteemme, koska ehdotettu malli on parempi kuin olemassa olevat ala- ja merkkipohjaiset arkkitehtuurit ja osoitti merkittäviä parannuksia käännöksessä saksasta, venäjästä ja turkista englanniksi.', 'jv': 'NAME OF TRANSLATORS Alternate Digawe kanggo nggawe tarjamahan luwih dumadhi kanggo MRLs, kita unyakake nggawe tarjamahan (NMT) sing isih dumadhi karo koder double-channel lan padha-Attentive decoder Tarjamahan punika ingkang dipunangguna punika ingkang dianggap punika ingkang karo koder Rejalekan winih dhéwé éntuk mungkin ngerasai awak dhéwé iso nggawe goal awak dhéwé iki dadi supoyo nggawe barang-lan caratar sing basa gambaran karo akeh lanjut lan mbukakipun ciptaaken sing bisa nyebutuhan kanggo ngerngerusani Sugar, Rusi lan turki.', 'sk': 'Morfološko kompleksna beseda (MCW) je hierarhična sestavina s podenotami, ki ohranjajo pomen, zato besedni modeli, ki temeljijo na površinskih oblikah, morda niso dovolj močni za prevajanje takih struktur. Pri prevajanju iz morfološko bogatih jezikov (MRL) se lahko izvorna beseda preslika v več besed ali celo celoten stavek na ciljni strani, kar pomeni, da se MCW ne sme obravnavati kot atomska enota. Da bi zagotovili boljše prevode MRL, z dvokanalnim kodirnikom in dvojno pozornim dekoderjem krepimo obstoječo arhitekturo nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT). Glavni cilj raziskave je zagotoviti bogatejše informacije na strani kodirnika in ustrezno preoblikovati dekoder, da bi imeli koristi od takih informacij. Naši eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da bi lahko dosegli naš cilj, saj predlagani model presega obstoječe arhitekture podbesed in znakov temelječe arhitekture in je pokazal znatne izboljšave pri prevajanju iz nemščine, ruščine in turščine v angleščino.', 'ha': "An kasa wani magana na morfologically murakkab (MCW) shi ne hierrrchical constituent with an gane-tsare subunit, sabõda haka, misãlai-based kan word wanda ke dõgara kan former forms za'a iya zama mai ƙarfi wa translate such founders. Idan an fassara daga harshen matalauci na morfologically (MRLs), za'a iya saka wata maganar source zuwa several words ko kuma kõ kõ da wata magana cikakken kan hagan goan, da ma'anar cẽwa ba za'a yi amfani da wani MCW kamar wani nau'in atomic. Dõmin a samar da fassarar masu kyau wa MRLs, za mu ƙarfafa fassarar masu gaba da maɓallin neural (NMT) da kode dubu-kanal da kode-dubu. Gagon muhimmin wanda aka yi amfani da shi a cikin wannan tafarkin, shine in bayani na kode kuma ka sake koda kode don ya amfani da wannan maɓalli. Matarinmu na jarrabi ya nuna cẽwa, za'a iya sãmu goanmu kamar da misalin da aka buƙata, za'a samar da wasu matsayi masu da bincike-da-rubutu kuma ya nũna masu gyãra mai girma a fassarar fassarar daga jeruman, Ruushi da turukiya zuwa Ingiriki.", 'he': 'מילה מורפולוגית מורפולוגית (MCW) היא רכיבה היררכית עם יחידות משמר משמעות, אז דוגמנים מבוססים במילים שמסומכים על צורות פני השטח עשויים לא להיות חזקים מספיק כדי לתרגם מבנים כאלה. כשמתרגמים משפות עשירות מורפולוגית (MRLs), מילה מקורה יכולה להיות ממופת לכמה מילים או אפילו משפט מלא בצד המטרה, מה שאומר MCW לא צריך להתייחס ליחידה אטומית. על מנת לספק תרגומות טובות יותר עבור MRLs, אנחנו מגבירים את הארכיטקטורה הנוכחית של מכונת העצבים (NMT) עם קודד ערוץ כפול וקודר כפול תשומת לב. המטרה העיקרית המתכוונת במחקר הזה היא לספק מידע עשיר יותר בצד הקודד ולעיצב מחדש את הקודד בהתאם כדי להצליח ממידע כזה. התוצאות הניסיונייות שלנו מראות שאנחנו יכולים להשיג את המטרה שלנו כאשר המודל המוצע מוביל את הארכיטקטורות המבוססת על תחת מילים ואפירות קיימות והראה שיפורים משמעותיים בתרגום מגרמנית, רוסית וטורקית לאנגלית.', 'bo': 'A morphologically complex word (MCW) is a hierarchical constituent with meaning-preserving subunits, so word-based models which rely on surface forms might not be powerful enough to translate such structures. When translating from morphologically rich languages (MRLs), a source word could be mapped to several words or even a full sentence on the target side, which means an MCW should not be treated as an atomic unit. MRLs་ལ་ཕན་ཚུན་ཚུན་མང་པོ་བྱེད་དགོས་པ་དེ་ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཡོད་པའི་neural machine translation The main goal of this research is to provide richer information on the encoder side and redesign the decoder accordingly to benefit from such information. Our experimental results demonstrate that we can achieve our goal as the proposed model outperforms existing subword- and character-based architectures and showed significant improvements on translating from German, Russian, and Turkish to English.'}
{'en': 'Butterfly Effects in Frame Semantic Parsing : impact of data processing on model ranking', 'ar': 'تأثيرات الفراشة في التحليل الدلالي للإطار: تأثير معالجة البيانات على ترتيب النموذج', 'es': 'Efectos de mariposa en el análisis semántico de cuadros: impacto del procesamiento de datos en la clasificación del modelo', 'fr': "Effets de papillon dans l'analyse sémantique des trames\xa0: impact du traitement des données sur le classement des modèles", 'pt': 'Efeitos Borboleta na Análise Semântica de Quadros: impacto do processamento de dados na classificação do modelo', 'ja': 'フレームセマンティック解析におけるバタフライ効果：モデルランキングにおけるデータ処理の影響', 'zh': '帻语义解析中蝴蝶效应:数据处理对模型排名', 'hi': 'फ्रेम सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग में तितली प्रभाव: मॉडल रैंकिंग पर डेटा प्रसंस्करण का प्रभाव', 'ru': 'Эффекты бабочки в семантическом разборе кадров: влияние обработки данных на ранжирование моделей', 'ga': 'Éifeachtaí Féileacán i bParsáil Shéimeantach Fráma: tionchar na próiseála sonraí ar rangú samhail', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Pillangóhatások a keretek szemantikus értelmezésében: az adatfeldolgozás hatása a modellrangsorolásra', 'el': 'Επίδραση πεταλούδας στη σηματική ανάλυση πλαισίων: αντίκτυπος της επεξεργασίας δεδομένων στην κατάταξη μοντέλων', 'kk': 'Фреймдің семантикалық талдау жабыс эффекттері: деректерді өңдеу үлгісінде', 'lt': 'Butterfly Effects in Frame Semantic Parsing: data processing impact on model ranking', 'it': "Effetti a farfalla nell'analisi semantica dei fotogrammi: impatto dell'elaborazione dei dati sulla classifica dei modelli", 'mk': 'Ефекти на пеперутка во семантичното анализирање на рамките: влијание на обработувањето на податоци врз рангирањето на моделот', 'ms': 'Kesan Butterfly dalam Penghuraian Semantik Bingkai: kesan pemprosesan data pada peringkat model', 'mt': 'Effetti tal-Butterfly fl-Analiżi Semantika tal-Qafas: impatt tal-ipproċessar tad-dejta fuq il-klassifikazzjoni tal-mudell', 'ml': 'ഫ്രെയിം സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങിലെ ബട്ടര്\u200dഫ്ലൈ പ്രഭാവങ്ങള്\u200d: മോഡല്\u200d റിങ്ങിങ്ങില്\u200d ഡേറ്റാ പ്രവര്\u200dത്ത', 'mn': 'Фрейм Semantic Тайлбар: өгөгдлийн үйл ажиллагааны нөлөө', 'no': 'Butterfly Effects in Frame Semantic Analysing: impact of data processing on model ranking', 'sr': 'Efekti leptira u semantičkom razmatranju okvira: utjecaj obrade podataka na režim modela', 'pl': 'Efekty motylowe w ramce Semantycznej Parsing: wpływ przetwarzania danych na ranking modeli', 'so': 'Butterfly Effects in Frame Semantic Parsing: impact of data processing on model ranking', 'ro': 'Efectele fluture în analiza semantică a cadrelor: impactul procesării datelor asupra clasificării modelelor', 'ta': 'விளிம்பு செமாண்டிக் பாசிங்கில் உள்ள விளைவுகள்:', 'sv': 'Fjärilseffekter i bildsemantisk tolkning: inverkan av databehandling på modellrankning', 'si': 'Name', 'ur': 'فرم سمانٹیک پارسینگ میں باٹرفلی اثرات: موڈل رینگ پر ڈاٹر پرینس کی اثرات', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tác dụng con bướm trong chế độ kỳ truyền hình: tác động của việc xử lý dữ liệu lên cấp bậc mẫu', 'hr': 'Efekti leptira u semantičkom razmatranju okvira: utjecaj obrade podataka na redoviranje modela', 'nl': 'Vlindereffecten in Frame Semantic Parsing: impact van gegevensverwerking op modelranking', 'da': 'Butterfly Effects in Frame Semantic Parsing: effekten af databehandling på modelrrangering', 'bg': 'Ефекти на пеперудата в семантичното анализиране на рамката: въздействие на обработката на данни върху класирането на моделите', 'de': 'Schmetterlingseffekte in Frame Semantic Parsing: Einfluss der Datenverarbeitung auf das Modellranking', 'id': 'Efek Butterfly dalam Frame Semantic Parsing: impak dari proses data pada peringkat model', 'ko': '프레임 의미 분석에서의 나비 효과: 데이터 처리가 모델 정렬에 미친 영향', 'fa': 'تاثیر پرداخت داده\u200cها روی رشته\u200cهای مدل', 'tr': 'Täzele Etkileri Çerçive Semantik Taýýarlama: maglumat işlemeginiň täsir', 'sq': 'Efektet e Butterfly në analizimin Semantik të Kornizës: ndikimi i procesimit të të dhënave në renditjen e modelit', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Effects of Butterfly in Frame Semantic Parsing: impact of data processing on model ranking', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'ফ্রেম সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং-এর বাটরফ্লাই প্রভাব: মডেল রেঙ্কিং এর তথ্য প্রক্রিয়ার প্রভাব', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'Frame Semantic Analyzing effektl…ôri: modell…ôrin iŇül…ôm…ôsinin etkisi', 'bs': 'Efekti leptira u semantičkom razmatranju okvira: utjecaj obrade podataka na redoviranje modela', 'ca': 'Effets Butterfly en Frame Semantic Parsing: impact of data processing on model ranking', 'cs': 'Motýlí efekty v sémantickém parsování rámců: vliv zpracování dat na hodnocení modelů', 'fi': 'Butterfly Effects in Frame Semantic Parsing: tietojenkäsittelyn vaikutus mallien sijoitukseen', 'et': 'Liblikaefektid raami semantilises parsimises: andmetöötluse mõju mudelite järjestusele', 'he': 'השפעות של פטריות בפרסמה סמנטית: השפעה של עיבוד נתונים על הדרגה של דוגמנים', 'ha': 'Butterfly Effects in Frame Semantic Parsing: impact of data processing on model ranking', 'sk': 'Metuljčni učinki v semantičnem razvrščanju okvirja: vpliv obdelave podatkov na razvrščanje modelov', 'bo': 'Butterfly Effects in Frame Semantic Parsing: impact of data processing on model ranking', 'jv': 'Transform handle tip'}
{'en': 'Knowing the state-of-the-art for a particular task is an essential component of any computational linguistics investigation. But can we be truly confident that the current state-of-the-art is indeed the best performing model? In this paper, we study the case of frame semantic parsing, a well-established task with multiple shared datasets. We show that in spite of all the care taken to provide a standard evaluation resource, small variations in data processing can have dramatic consequences for ranking parser performance. This leads us to propose an open-source standardized processing pipeline, which can be shared and reused for robust model comparison.', 'ar': 'تعد معرفة أحدث ما توصلت إليه مهمة معينة عنصرًا أساسيًا في أي تحقيق في علم اللغة الحسابي. ولكن هل يمكننا أن نكون واثقين حقًا من أن أحدث طراز هو بالفعل أفضل نموذج أداء؟ في هذه الورقة ، ندرس حالة التحليل الدلالي للإطار ، وهي مهمة راسخة مع مجموعات بيانات مشتركة متعددة. نظهر أنه على الرغم من كل العناية التي تم اتخاذها لتوفير مورد تقييم معياري ، فإن الاختلافات الصغيرة في معالجة البيانات يمكن أن يكون لها عواقب وخيمة على تصنيف أداء المحلل اللغوي. يقودنا هذا إلى اقتراح خط أنابيب معالجة موحد مفتوح المصدر ، يمكن مشاركته وإعادة استخدامه لمقارنة نموذج قوية.', 'pt': 'Conhecer o estado da arte para uma tarefa específica é um componente essencial de qualquer investigação em linguística computacional. Mas podemos estar realmente confiantes de que o atual estado da arte é de fato o modelo com melhor desempenho? Neste artigo, estudamos o caso de análise semântica de quadros, uma tarefa bem estabelecida com vários conjuntos de dados compartilhados. Mostramos que, apesar de todo o cuidado para fornecer um recurso de avaliação padrão, pequenas variações no processamento de dados podem ter consequências dramáticas para o desempenho do analisador de classificação. Isso nos leva a propor um pipeline de processamento padronizado de código aberto, que pode ser compartilhado e reutilizado para comparação robusta de modelos.', 'fr': "La connaissance de l'état de la technique pour une tâche particulière est un élément essentiel de toute recherche en linguistique informatique. Mais pouvons-nous vraiment être certains que l'état actuel de la technologie est effectivement le modèle le plus performant\xa0? Dans cet article, nous étudions le cas de l'analyse sémantique de trames, une tâche bien établie avec plusieurs ensembles de données partagés. Nous montrons que malgré tout le soin apporté à la fourniture d'une ressource d'évaluation standard, de petites variations dans le traitement des données peuvent avoir des conséquences dramatiques sur les performances de l'analyseur de classement. Cela nous amène à proposer un pipeline de traitement standardisé open source, qui peut être partagé et réutilisé pour une comparaison robuste des modèles.", 'es': 'Conocer el estado de la técnica para una tarea en particular es un componente esencial de cualquier investigación lingüística computacional. Pero, ¿podemos estar realmente seguros de que el estado de la técnica actual es, de hecho, el modelo de mejor rendimiento En este artículo, estudiamos el caso del análisis semántico de marcos, una tarea bien establecida con múltiples conjuntos de datos compartidos. Demostramos que, a pesar de todo el cuidado puesto para proporcionar un recurso de evaluación estándar, las pequeñas variaciones en el procesamiento de datos pueden tener consecuencias dramáticas en la clasificación del rendimiento del analizador. Esto nos lleva a proponer una canalización de procesamiento estandarizada de código abierto, que se puede compartir y reutilizar para una comparación sólida de modelos.', 'ja': '特定のタスクのための最先端を知ることは、あらゆる計算言語学調査の不可欠な要素である。しかし、現在の最先端のモデルが実際に最高のパフォーマンスを発揮するモデルであることに、本当に自信を持てるでしょうか？本稿では、フレーム意味解析の事例を研究する。フレーム意味解析は、複数の共有データセットを持つ確立されたタスクである。標準的な評価リソースを提供するためにあらゆる注意を払っているにもかかわらず、データ処理の小さな変化は、構文解析器のパフォーマンスのランキングに劇的な結果をもたらす可能性があることを示しています。これにより、オープンソースの標準化された処理パイプラインを提案し、堅牢なモデル比較のために共有し、再利用することができます。', 'zh': '知特定之最新术者,计语言学之要组成部分。 然吾辈果正确信,今之最先进者,固性之车型也? 本文中,臣等究框架语义解析例,此数集之熟务也。 虽资估资用,数据处理微变解析器。 此使吾建一开源之标准化以处管道,可与用之可也。', 'ru': 'Знание новейших технологий для выполнения конкретной задачи является важным компонентом любого исследования в области вычислительной лингвистики. Но можем ли мы быть по-настоящему уверены в том, что нынешнее состояние дел действительно является наилучшей моделью? В этой статье мы изучаем случай семантического синтаксического анализа фреймов, хорошо поставленной задачи с несколькими общими наборами данных. Мы показываем, что, несмотря на все усилия, предпринятые для обеспечения стандартного ресурса оценки, небольшие вариации в обработке данных могут иметь драматические последствия для ранжирования производительности анализатора. Это приводит нас к предложению стандартизированного процесса обработки с открытым исходным кодом, который может использоваться совместно и повторно для надежного сравнения моделей.', 'hi': 'किसी विशेष कार्य के लिए अत्याधुनिक को जानना किसी भी कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान जांच का एक आवश्यक घटक है। लेकिन क्या हम वास्तव में आश्वस्त हो सकते हैं कि वर्तमान अत्याधुनिक वास्तव में सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन करने वाला मॉडल है? इस पेपर में, हम फ्रेम सिमेंटिक पार्सिंग के मामले का अध्ययन करते हैं, जो कई साझा डेटासेट के साथ एक अच्छी तरह से स्थापित कार्य है। हम दिखाते हैं कि एक मानक मूल्यांकन संसाधन प्रदान करने के लिए की गई सभी देखभाल के बावजूद, डेटा प्रोसेसिंग में छोटी विविधताओं के रैंकिंग पार्सर प्रदर्शन के लिए नाटकीय परिणाम हो सकते हैं। यह हमें एक ओपन-सोर्स मानकीकृत प्रसंस्करण पाइपलाइन का प्रस्ताव करने के लिए प्रेरित करता है, जिसे मजबूत मॉडल तुलना के लिए साझा और पुन: उपयोग किया जा सकता है।', 'ga': 'Tá eolas ar an úrscothacht do thasc ar leith ina chuid riachtanach d’aon imscrúdú ríomhaireachtúil teangeolaíochta. Ach an féidir linn a bheith muiníneach go deimhin gurb é an tsamhail úrscothach reatha an tsamhail is fearr feidhmíochta? Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar chás parsála shéimeantach fráma, tasc seanbhunaithe ina bhfuil il-thacair sonraí comhroinnte. Léirímid, in ainneoin an chúraim ar fad a dhéantar chun acmhainn chaighdeánach mheastóireachta a sholáthar, go bhféadfadh iarmhairtí drámatúla a bheith ag éagsúlachtaí beaga i bpróiseáil sonraí ar fheidhmíocht parsálaí a rangú. Mar thoradh air sin molaimid píblíne próiseála caighdeánaithe foinse oscailte, ar féidir a roinnt agus a athúsáid chun comparáid a dhéanamh idir samhlacha láidir.', 'hu': 'Minden számítástechnikai nyelvészeti vizsgálat elengedhetetlen eleme az adott feladathoz szükséges korszerű ismeretek. De valóban biztosak lehetünk abban, hogy a jelenlegi korszerű modell valóban a legjobb teljesítményű modell? Ebben a tanulmányban a keretszemetikai elemzés esetét tanulmányozzuk, amely egy jól bevált feladat, több megosztott adatkészlettel. Megmutatjuk, hogy a standard értékelési erőforrás biztosítására fordított gondosság ellenére az adatfeldolgozás kis változásai drámai következményekkel járhatnak a rangsorolási elemzők teljesítményére. Ez arra vezet, hogy egy nyílt forráskódú szabványosított feldolgozási csővezetéket javasoljunk, amely megosztható és újra felhasználható a robusztus modellek összehasonlítása érdekében.', 'el': 'Η γνώση της τελευταίας τεχνολογίας για μια συγκεκριμένη εργασία αποτελεί βασικό στοιχείο κάθε υπολογιστικής γλωσσικής έρευνας. Αλλά μπορούμε να είμαστε πραγματικά σίγουροι ότι το σημερινό μοντέλο τελευταίας τεχνολογίας είναι πράγματι το μοντέλο με τις καλύτερες επιδόσεις; Σε αυτή την εργασία, μελετάμε την περίπτωση της σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης πλαισίων, μια καθιερωμένη εργασία με πολλαπλά κοινά σύνολα δεδομένων. Αποδεικνύουμε ότι παρά τη φροντίδα που λαμβάνεται για την παροχή ενός τυποποιημένου πόρου αξιολόγησης, μικρές διακυμάνσεις στην επεξεργασία δεδομένων μπορούν να έχουν δραματικές συνέπειες για την απόδοση του αναλυτή κατάταξης. Αυτό μας οδηγεί να προτείνουμε έναν τυποποιημένο αγωγό επεξεργασίας ανοικτού κώδικα, ο οποίος μπορεί να μοιραστεί και να επαναχρησιμοποιηθεί για εύρωστη σύγκριση μοντέλων.', 'ka': 'განსაკუთრებული დავალებისთვის კომპუტაციული სიგულისტიკის გასაკეთებელი კომპონტენტიკური პასუხისთვის გასაკეთება. მაგრამ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ნამდვილად დარწმუნდეთ რომ მიმდინარე სურათების მდგომარეობა ნამდვილად საუკეთესო მოდელია? ამ დოკუნში, ჩვენ ვისწავლობთ სემენტიკური პარასტის შესახებ, რამდენიმე საზოგადოებული მონაცემების რაოდენობა. ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ, რომ ყველა სტანდარტული განსაზღვრების რესურსის შემდეგ, ცოტა განსაზღვრება მონაცემების პროცესის შესაძლებელია დირამიკური შედეგი პროცესტის განსაზ ეს გვეძლია ჩვენ გახსნა სტანდარტურებული პროცესის გარეშე, რომელიც შეიძლება გაყოფილი და გამოყენება ძალიან მოდელური შემდგენისთვის.', 'it': "Conoscere lo stato dell'arte per un particolare compito è una componente essenziale di qualsiasi indagine linguistica computazionale. Ma possiamo essere veramente sicuri che l'attuale stato dell'arte sia davvero il modello più performante? In questo articolo, studiamo il caso dell'analisi semantica dei frame, un compito consolidato con più set di dati condivisi. Dimostriamo che nonostante tutta la cura prestata per fornire una risorsa di valutazione standard, piccole variazioni nell'elaborazione dei dati possono avere conseguenze drammatiche per le prestazioni del parser ranking. Questo ci porta a proporre una pipeline di elaborazione standardizzata open source, che può essere condivisa e riutilizzata per un solido confronto dei modelli.", 'kk': 'Белгілі тапсырманың күйін білуі - барлық компьютерлік лингвистикалық зерттеулердің негізгі компоненті. Бірақ біз тек қазіргі орындау үлгісінің ең жақсы орындау үлгісін сене аламыз ба? Бұл қағазда, біз фрейм семантикалық талдау үшін, бірнеше ортақ деректер жинақтарымен жақсы құрылған тапсырманы зерттейміз. Біз стандартты бағалау ресурсын қамтамасыз ететін барлық көздерге қарамастан, деректерді өңдеу үшін кішкентай айнымалылықтар оқу мүмкіндігінің драматикалық нәтижелері болады. Бұл бізді ашық көзінің стандартты процессордық қабырғын қолдануға болады. Бұл құпты үлгілерді салыстыру үшін ортақтастырып, қайта қолдануға болады.', 'mk': 'Познавањето на најновата технологија за одредена задача е суштинска компонента на секоја истрага за компјутација на јазикот. Но дали навистина можеме да бидеме сигурни дека сегашната технологија е навистина најдобриот модел? Во овој весник, го проучуваме случајот на семантично анализирање на рамките, добро воспоставена задача со повеќе споделени податоци. Ние покажуваме дека и покрај целата грижа што се презема за обезбедување стандарден ресурс за проценка, малите варијации во обработувањето на податоци може да имаат драматични последици за рангирањето на перформансите на анализаторот. Ова не води да предложиме стандардизиран гасовод за процес со отворен извор, кој може да се сподели и повторно да се употреби за robust споредба на моделите.', 'lt': 'Konkrečios užduoties naujausios žinios yra esminis bet kokio skaičiavimo kalbos tyrimo elementas. Tačiau ar galime būti tikrai įsitikinę, kad dabartinis moderniausias model is iš tiesų yra geriausias rezultatas? Šiame dokumente mes tiriame frame semantinio analizavimo atvejį, gerai nustatytą užduotį su daugeliu bendrų duomenų rinkinių. Mes parodome, kad nepaisant visų pastangų teikti standartinius vertinimo išteklius, nedideli duomenų apdorojimo skirtumai gali turėti dramatiškų pasekmių analizatoriaus veiklos klasifikavimui. Dėl to siūlome atvirojo šaltinio standartizuotą perdirbimo vamzdyną, kuris gali būti dalijamasis ir pakartotinai naudojamas patikimam modelio palyginimui.', 'ms': 'Mengetahui kemajuan untuk tugas tertentu adalah komponen penting bagi setiap penyelidikan bahasa komputasi. Tetapi adakah kita benar-benar yakin bahawa state-of-the-art semasa adalah benar-benar model yang paling berkesan? In this paper, we study the case of frame semantic parsing, a well-established task with multiple shared datasets.  Kami menunjukkan bahawa walaupun semua perhatian yang diperlukan untuk menyediakan sumber penilaian piawai, variasi kecil dalam pemprosesan data boleh mempunyai konsekuensi dramatis untuk peringkat prestasi penghurai. Ini membawa kita untuk melaporkan saluran paip pemprosesan sumber terbuka, yang boleh dikongsi dan digunakan semula untuk perbandingan model yang kuat.', 'mt': 'L-għarfien tal-aktar avvanzat għal kompitu partikolari huwa komponent essenzjali ta’ kwalunkwe investigazzjoni lingwistika komputattiva. Iżda nistgħu nkunu tassew kunfidenti li l-istat attwali tal-aħħar huwa tabilħaqq il-mudell bl-aħjar prestazzjoni? F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw il-każ ta’ analiżi semantika ta’ qafas, kompitu stabbilit sew b’settijiet ta’ dejta komuni multipli. Aħna nuru li minkejja l-attenzjoni kollha meħuda biex tiġi pprovduta riżorsa standard ta’ evalwazzjoni, varjazzjonijiet żgħar fl-ipproċessar tad-dejta jista’ jkollhom konsegwenzi drammatiċi għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-prestazzjoni tal-analizzatur. Dan iwassalna biex nipproponu pipeline tal-ipproċessar standardizzat b’sors miftuħ, li jista’ jinqasam u jerġa’ jintuża għal paragun robust tal-mudell.', 'ml': 'ഒരു പ്രത്യേക ജോലിക്കുള്ള രാജ്യത്തിന്റെ രാജ്യത്തെ അറിയുന്നത് കണക്കൂട്ടുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ അന്വേഷണത്തിന്റെ പ But can we be truly confident that the current state-of-the-art is indeed the best performing model?  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമിന്റിക് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിന്റെ കേസ് പഠിക്കുന്നു, പല പങ്കിട്ട ഡാറ്റ നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് സാധാരണ വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d നല്\u200dകാന്\u200d എടുത്തിട്ടുള്ള എല്ലാ സൂക്ഷ്മമാണെങ്കിലും ഡേറ്റാ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളില ഇത് നമ്മളെ ഒരു തുറന്ന സോര്\u200dസ്സ് സാധാരണ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പൈപ്പെലിന്\u200d പ്രൊജന്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതാണ്. അത് റോബോസ്റ്റ് മ', 'mn': 'Ямар нэгэн ажлын хувьд урлагийн байдлыг мэдэх нь компьютерийн хэлний судалгааны чухал компонент юм. Гэхдээ одоогийн урлагийн байр суурь нь үнэндээ хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааны загвар гэж итгэх үү? Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон хуваалцагдсан өгөгдлийн сангийн фрэйм semantic хуваалцааны тухай судалж байна. Бид стандарт үнэлгээний баялаг өгөгдлийн үйлдвэрлэлийн жижиг өөрчлөлт нь хуваалцагчийн үйлдвэрлэлийн үндсэн үр дагавартай байж болно гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь биднийг нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн стандарттайгаар ажиллах хоолойн шугам зааж өгдөг. Энэ нь хүчтэй загварын харьцуулахад хуваалцаж, дахин ашиглаж болно.', 'no': 'Kjenning av kunsttilstanden for eit bestemt oppgåve er ein viktig komponent av alle datamaskinelske språk. Men kan vi vera sikkert på at den gjeldande tilstanden av kunsten er faktisk den beste utføringsmodulen? I denne papiret studerer vi tilfellet på semantisk tolking av ramma, eit godt oppretta oppgåve med fleire delte datasett. Vi viser at sjølv om alle sorgane som er henta til å gjera eit standardvaleringssurs, kan små variasjonar i datahandsaming ha dramatiske konsekvensar for å rekna utviklingar av tolkaren. Dette fører oss til å foreslå ein standardisert prosesseringsrett for åpen-kjelde, som kan deles og gjenoppretta for sterkt sammenlikning av modeller.', 'pl': 'Znajomość najnowocześniejszego stanu techniki dla konkretnego zadania jest niezbędnym elementem każdego badania językoznawstwa obliczeniowego. Ale czy możemy być naprawdę pewni, że obecny state-of-the-art jest rzeczywiście najlepszym modelem? W niniejszym artykule badamy przypadek parsowania semantycznego ramki, ugruntowanego zadania z wieloma wspólnymi zbiorami danych. Pokazujemy, że pomimo całej staranności podjętej w celu zapewnienia standardowego zasobu oceny, niewielkie różnice w przetwarzaniu danych mogą mieć dramatyczne konsekwencje dla wydajności parsera rankingowego. To prowadzi nas do zaproponowania open-source standardowego rurociągu przetwarzania, który może być udostępniany i ponownie wykorzystywany do solidnego porównywania modeli.', 'sr': 'Znanje države umjetnosti za određeni zadatak je ključna komponenta bilo koje računalne lingvističke istrage. Ali možemo li zaista biti sigurni da je trenutno stanje umjetnosti zaista najbolji model izvršenja? U ovom papiru, proučavamo slučaj semantičkog analiza okvira, dobro određen zadatak sa višestrukim zajedničkim podacima. Pokazujemo da, uprkos svim brigama koji su poduzeti za pružanje standardnog resursa procjene, male varijacije u procesu podataka mogu imati dramatične posledice za postizanje učinka analizatora. To nas vodi da predložimo standardizovanu kanalizaciju obrade otvorenog izvora, koja se može podeliti i ponovo iskoristiti za robnu usporedbu modela.', 'si': 'විශේෂ වැඩක් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂ කාර්යයක් වෙනුවෙන් ස්ථානයක් දැනගන්නේ කිසිම පරීක්ෂණාත්මක භා ඒත් අපිට ඇත්තටම විශ්වාස වෙන්න පුළුවන්ද කියලා, ප්\u200dරස්තූත විද්\u200dයාත්මක කියලා, ඇත්තටම හොඳම ප්\u200dරස මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා, හොඳ ස්ථාපිත වැඩක් විශේෂ කරලා තියෙන්නේ ගොඩක් භාගිත අපි පෙන්වන්නේ හැම බලාපොරොත්තුවක්ම ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා, දත්ත පරීක්ෂණයේ පොඩි වෙනස් වෙනස් කරන් මේක අපිට ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශ විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශ කරන්න පුළුවන් පුළුවන් නිර්භාවිත කරන්න.', 'ro': 'Cunoașterea de ultimă generație pentru o anumită sarcină este o componentă esențială a oricărei investigații lingvistice computaționale. Dar putem fi cu adevărat încrezători că actualul model de ultimă oră este într-adevăr cel mai performant model? În această lucrare, studiem cazul analizării semantice a cadrelor, o sarcină bine stabilită cu mai multe seturi de date partajate. Noi arătăm că, în ciuda tuturor atenției acordate pentru a furniza o resursă standard de evaluare, micile variații în procesarea datelor pot avea consecințe dramatice pentru performanța analizorului de clasificare. Acest lucru ne conduce să propunem o conductă de procesare standardizată open-source, care poate fi partajată și reutilizată pentru compararea robustă a modelelor.', 'ta': 'குறிப்பிட்ட பணிக்கான மாநிலை-கலை அறிந்து கொள்ளும் எந்த கணக்கீட்டு மொழிகள் ஆய்வு ஒரு முக்கியமான பகுதியாகும். ஆனால் நாம் உண்மையில் நம்ப முடியுமா தற்போதைய நிலைமை- கலை உண்மையில் சிறந்த செயல்படுத்தும் மாதிரி? இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் சட்டத்தின் பெம்பென்டிக் காட்சியின் விஷயத்தை படிக்கிறோம், பல பகிர்ந்த தரவுத்தளங்கள We show that in spite of all the care taken to provide a standard evaluation resource, small variations in data processing can have dramatic consequences for ranking parser performance.  இது எங்களை திறந்த மூலம் நிலைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட செயல்படுத்தும் பைப்லைனை முன்நிர்ணயிக்கும், இது ரோப்ட் மாதிரி ஒப்பீட்ட', 'ur': 'ایک مقررہ کام کے لئے آرتی کی حالت کا جاننا ہر کمپیوٹریشن زبان شناسی کا ضروری رقم ہے. لیکن کیا ہم یقین رکھتے ہیں کہ موجود هنر کی حالت واقعی بہترین نمونه ہے؟ اس کاغذ میں، ہم فرم سیمانٹیک پارسینگ کے کیس کی تلاش کرتے ہیں، ایک بہترین شریک ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ ایک بہترین استعمال کی تابع. ہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ تمام مراقبت کے باوجود ایک استاندارڈ ارزیابی رسسور کے لئے اٹھائے گئے ہیں، ڈیٹا پرسس کے اندر چھوٹے تغییرات رانڈ پارچر کی عملکرد کے لئے بہت اچھے اثرات پاسکتے ہیں. یہ ہمیں کھولتا ہے ایک کھولتا سورس استاندارڈیز پرسیس پائپ لین کی پیشنهاد کرنے کے لئے، جسے مضبوط موڈل مقایسہ کے لئے شریک اور دوبارہ استعمال کر سکتا ہے.', 'so': 'Aqoonsashada dowladda farshaxanka gaarka ah waa qayb muhiim ah oo ka mid ah baaritaanka luuqadaha xisaabta ah. Laakin miyaynu aaminsan karnaa in xaaladda hore ee farshaxanku uu yahay modelka ugu wanaagsan ee sameynta? Warqaddan waxaynu ku baranaynaa xaalada baaritaanka semantic ee frame, shaqa aad u sahlan oo ay leedahay kooban macluumaadyo kala duduwan. Waxaynu tusnaynaa in kastoo daryeelka loo qaaday in kastoo uu helo qiimeynta caadiga ah, kala duwanaanshaha koontarooyinka macluumaadku waxay noqon karaan matooyin aad u dhaqdhaqaaqi kara sameynta lambarada. Taas waxay noogu hoggaami kartaa in aan soo bandhigi karo baaritaanka shaqaalaha oo furan, kaas oo lagu qeybin karo oo lagu isticmaali karo sameynta modelka robista.', 'sv': 'Att känna till den senaste tekniken för en viss uppgift är en väsentlig komponent i all beräkningslingvistisk undersökning. Men kan vi verkligen vara säkra på att den nuvarande toppmodern verkligen är den bästa modellen? I denna uppsats studerar vi fallet med frame semantic parsing, en väletablerad uppgift med flera delade datauppsättningar. Vi visar att trots all omsorg som gjorts för att tillhandahålla en standardutvärderingsresurs kan små variationer i databehandlingen få dramatiska konsekvenser för ranking parsers prestanda. Detta leder oss till att föreslå en standardiserad process pipeline med öppen källkod, som kan delas och återanvändas för robust modelljämförelse.', 'uz': "Maxsus vazifaning holatning holatini bilish bu kompyuterlik tillarini qidirish muhim qismi. Lekin biz joriy shaxsiy holatda eng yaxshi bajarish modeli deb ishonchingiz mumkin? Bu qogʻozda, biz bir necha bir necha bogʻliq maʼlumotlar satri bilan ajratilgan frame semantik parsing haqida o'rganamiz. We show that in spite of all the care taken to provide a standard evaluation resource, small variations in data processing can have dramatic consequences for ranking parser performance.  Bu bizni ochiq manbaning andoza boshqaruvchi pipelinini tahrirlash mumkin, bu robot modeli bilan moslash mumkin va qaytadan foydalanish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Biết được tình trạng hiện đại cho một nhiệm vụ đặc biệt là một phần quan trọng trong cuộc điều tra ngôn ngữ tính. Nhưng chúng ta có thể thực sự tin tưởng rằng hiện thời là mẫu hiện đại nhất? Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu trường hợp phân tích ngữ pháp khung, một nhiệm vụ được thiết lập đầy đủ với nhiều bộ dữ liệu chia sẻ. Chúng tôi cho thấy, mặc dù đã rất cẩn thận cung cấp một nguồn đánh giá tiêu chuẩn, những biến đổi nhỏ trong việc xử lý dữ liệu có thể có hậu quả kịch tính với việc xếp hạng mục tiêu. Điều này dẫn tới việc đề xuất một đường ống xử lý nguyên gốc, được chia sẻ và tái sử dụng để so sánh mô hình vững chắc.', 'bg': 'Познаването на най-съвременните технологии за конкретна задача е съществен компонент на всяко компютърно лингвистично изследване. Но можем ли да бъдем наистина уверени, че сегашното състояние на изкуството наистина е най-добре представящият модел? В настоящата статия изследваме случая на семантичен анализ на рамки, добре установена задача с множество споделени набори от данни. Показваме, че въпреки всички грижи, които се полагат за осигуряване на стандартен ресурс за оценка, малките вариации в обработката на данни могат да имат драматични последици за представянето на класацията на анализатора. Това ни кара да предложим стандартизиран тръбопровод за обработка с отворен код, който може да бъде споделен и използван повторно за надеждно сравнение на моделите.', 'nl': 'Kennis van de state-of-the-art voor een bepaalde taak is een essentieel onderdeel van elk computerlinguïstisch onderzoek. Maar kunnen we er echt op vertrouwen dat de huidige state-of-the-art inderdaad het best presterende model is? In dit artikel bestuderen we het geval van frame semantisch parsen, een gevestigde taak met meerdere gedeelde datasets. We laten zien dat ondanks alle zorg die wordt besteed aan het leveren van een standaard evaluatiebron, kleine variaties in gegevensverwerking dramatische gevolgen kunnen hebben voor de ranking parser prestaties. Dit leidt ons tot een open-source gestandaardiseerde processing pipeline, die gedeeld en hergebruikt kan worden voor robuuste modelvergelijking.', 'hr': 'Znanje države umjetnosti za određeni zadatak je ključni dio bilo kojeg računalnog jezičkog istrage. Ali možemo li zaista biti sigurni da je trenutno stanje umjetnosti zaista najbolji model? U ovom papiru proučavamo slučaj semantičkog analiza okvira, dobro određen zadatak s višestrukim zajedničkim podacima. Pokazujemo da, uprkos svim brigama koje su poduzete za pružanje standardnog resursa procjene, male varijacije u obradi podataka mogu imati dramatične posljedice za učinkovitost razmatrača. To nas vodi da predložimo standardiziranu kanalizaciju obrade otvorenog izvora, koja se može podijeliti i ponovno iskoristiti za jaku usporedbu modela.', 'da': 'At kende den nyeste teknologi til en bestemt opgave er en væsentlig komponent i enhver beregningslingvistisk undersøgelse. Men kan vi virkelig være sikre på, at den nuværende state-of-the-art faktisk er den bedste model? I denne artikel undersøger vi tilfældet med frame semantic parsing, en veletableret opgave med flere delte datasæt. Vi viser, at på trods af al den omhu, der er taget for at levere en standard evalueringsressource, små variationer i databehandling kan have dramatiske konsekvenser for ranking parsers ydeevne. Dette fører os til at foreslå en open source standardiseret behandlingspipeline, som kan deles og genbruges til robust model sammenligning.', 'de': 'Den Stand der Technik für eine bestimmte Aufgabe zu kennen, ist ein wesentlicher Bestandteil jeder computerlinguistischen Untersuchung. Aber können wir wirklich zuversichtlich sein, dass der aktuelle Stand der Technik tatsächlich das leistungsstärkste Modell ist? In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir den Fall von Frame Semantic Parsing, einer etablierten Aufgabe mit mehreren gemeinsamen Datensätzen. Wir zeigen, dass trotz aller Sorgfalt bei der Bereitstellung einer Standard-Evaluierungsressource kleine Abweichungen in der Datenverarbeitung dramatische Auswirkungen auf die Performance des Ranking-Parsers haben können. Dies führt uns dazu, eine Open-Source standardisierte Verarbeitungspipeline vorzuschlagen, die für einen robusten Modellvergleich gemeinsam genutzt und wiederverwendet werden kann.', 'ko': '특정 임무를 이해하는 최신 기술은 모든 계산언어학 연구의 중요한 구성 부분이다.그러나 현재 가장 선진적인 기술이 확실히 가장 잘 표현되는 모델이라는 것을 우리는 정말 확신할 수 있습니까?본고는 여러 개의 의미 데이터 집합을 예로 삼아 의미 분석 구조를 세웠다.우리는 표준 평가 자원을 제공하기 위해 모든 조치를 취했지만 데이터 처리 중의 미세한 변화가 해석기의 성능 순위에 현저한 영향을 미칠 수 있음을 나타낸다.이로 인해 우리는 건장한 모델 비교를 위해 공유되고 중용될 수 있는 표준화 처리 파이프를 개발했다.', 'id': 'Mengetahui state-of-the-art untuk tugas tertentu adalah komponen penting dari setiap penyelidikan bahasa komputasi. But can we be truly confident that the current state-of-the-art is indeed the best performing model?  Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari kasus penghuraian semantis bingkai, tugas yang ditentukan dengan banyak set data berbagi. Kami menunjukkan bahwa meskipun semua perhatian yang diperlukan untuk menyediakan sumber evaluasi standar, variasi kecil dalam proses data dapat memiliki konsekuensi dramatis untuk menandai prestasi parser. Hal ini membawa kita untuk mengusulkan sebuah pipa proses standar sumber terbuka, yang dapat dibagi dan digunakan kembali untuk perbandingan model yang kuat.', 'fa': 'دانستن وضعیت هنری برای یک کار خاص یک بخش ضروری از هر تحقیقات زبان\u200cشناسی محاسبه است. اما آیا ما واقعا مطمئن هستیم که موقعیت فعلی هنر واقعا بهترین مدل عملکرد است؟ در این کاغذ، ما پرونده\u200cی تجزیه\u200cهای semantic frame را مطالعه می\u200cکنیم، یک کار بسیار قابل تشکیل شده با مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای مشترک. ما نشان می دهیم که با وجود تمام مراقبت برای تهیه یک منبع ارزیابی استاندارد، تغییرات کوچک در پردازش داده\u200cها می\u200cتوانند نتایج\u200cهای دراماتیکی برای اجرای رشته\u200cگیری برگزار کننده باشند. این ما را به پیشنهاد یک لوله\u200cی پردازش استاندارد منبع باز پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که می\u200cتواند برای مقایسه\u200cی مدل استاندارد و استفاده شود.', 'tr': 'Häzirki zadyň meýdançasynyň halyny bilýäni her hili sanat lingwistiki barlagynyň esasy komponenti. Ýöne häzirki möhüm möhüm möhümmetiň çykyşy nähili gowy edip biljek nusgadygyna ynanyp bileris mi? Bu kagyzda, biz çeräk semantik analýşiniň durumyny öwrenýärdik, birnäçe beýleki sanat setirleri bilen gowy döredildi. Biz standart deňleşme resursy temin etmek üçin ähli gözlemek isleýän pikirimizi görkezip, data processesinde kiçi deňleşmeler paýlaşmak üçin örän netijesi bolup biler. Bu bizi açyk-kaynakly standartlaşdyran işleýän pipelini teklip etmek üçin önleýär. Bu bizi robust nusgasyna gollaşdyrmak üçin paylaşyp biler.', 'sw': 'Kujua hali ya sanaa kwa kazi fulani ni sehemu ya muhimu ya uchunguzi wa lugha yoyote. Lakini tunaweza kuwa na uhakika kwamba hali ya sasa ya sanaa ni mfano bora zaidi wa kutengeneza kazi? Katika karatasi hii, tunasoma kesi ya uchimbaji wa sekunde wa mfumo, kazi iliyoanzishwa vizuri yenye seti mbalimbali za data zinazoshirikishwa. Tunaonyesha kwamba pamoja na kujali zote zinazochukuliwa kutoa rasilimali za kawaida za uchunguzi, mabadiliko madogo katika upasuaji wa data yanaweza kuwa na matokeo makubwa kwa ajili ya utendaji wa mabadiliko. Hii inatupelekea kupendekeza pipeli inayotengenezwa na kiwango cha upatikanaji, ambacho kinaweza kusambazwa na kutumika tena kwa ajili ya kuunganisha muundo wa roboti.', 'am': 'የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት ለማወቅ የቁጥጥር ቋንቋዎች ምርመራ ሁሉ ያስፈልጋል፡፡ But can we be truly confident that the current state-of-the-art is indeed the best performing model?  በዚህ ገጽ የፍሬም semantic ማኅበረሰብ ጉዳይ፣ በብዛት የተካፈሉት ዳታተሮች የደጋሚ ስራ እናስተምራለን፡፡ የአዳራዊ አዋቂዎችን ማሰናከል በተደረገው ሁሉ እንኳን፣ የዳታ ክፍተት ትንሹ ልውጤቶች በተለየ ተሳታፊ ስርዓት ውጤቶች ሊደርስበት ይችላል፡፡ ይህም የክፈት የኩነቶች ክፍተት የተደረገውን የፖስታ ሞዴል ለመተካከል እና ለመጠቀም ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'Որոշակի առաջադրանքի ամենաբարձր գիտելիքը յուրաքանչյուր հաշվարկների լեզվաբանական հետազոտության կարևոր բաղադրիչ է: Բայց կարո՞ղ ենք մենք իսկապես վստահ լինել, որ ներկայիս տեխնոլոգիան իսկապես լավագույն արդյունքներ ունի: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք շրջանակի սեմանտիկ վերլուծության դեպքը, լավ հաստատված խնդիր բազմաթիվ ընդհանուր տվյալների համակարգերով: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ չնայած ստանդարտ գնահատման ռեսուրսների տրամադրման խնդիրներին, տվյալների վերաբերյալ փոքր տարբերությունները կարող են ունենալ դրամատիկ հետևանքներ վերլուծության արդյունքների դասավորման համար: Սա մեզ հանգեցնում է առաջարկելու բաց աղբյուրի ստանդարտիզացված մշակման խողովակաշար, որը կարող է կիսվել և կրկին օգտագործվել ուժեղ մոդելների համեմատության համար:', 'af': "Die kenning van die state-of-the-art vir 'n bepaalde taak is 'n nuwe komponent van enige rekenasielike lingvisiese ondersoek. Maar kan ons regtig vertrou wees dat die huidige staat van die kuns regtig die beste uitvoerde model is? In hierdie papier, ons studeer die geval van raam semantiese verwerking, 'n goed geïnstalleerde taak met veelvuldige gedeelde datastelle. Ons wys dat, alhoewel al die sorg geneem is om 'n standaard evalueringshulpbron te verskaf, klein variasies in data-prosessering kan dramatiese konsekvens hê vir ranking ontleerder prestasie. Hierdie lei ons om 'n oop-bron standardiseerde verwerking pyplyn te voorstel, wat kan gedeel word en hergebruik word vir kragtige model vergelyking.", 'sq': 'Njohja e teknologjisë për një detyrë të veçantë është një përbërës thelbësore e çdo hetimi gjuhësor llogaritës. Por a mund të jemi me të vërtetë të bindur se gjendja aktuale e teknologjisë është me të vërtetë modeli më i performueshëm? Në këtë letër, ne studiojmë rastin e analizimit semantik të kuadrit, një detyrë e vendosur mirë me shumë të dhëna të ndara. Ne tregojmë se pavarësisht nga të gjitha kujdesit të marrë për të siguruar një burim standard vlerësimi, variacionet e vogla në procesimin e të dhënave mund të kenë pasoja dramatike për renditjen e paraqitjeve të analizuesve. Kjo na çon të propozojmë një tubacion procesimi me burim të hapur të standartizuar, i cili mund të ndahet dhe të përdoret përsëri për krahasim të fortë të modelit.', 'az': 'Müəyyən bir işin vəziyyətini bilmək hər bilgisayar dil araşdırmasının əsas komponenti. Amma biz həqiqətən də möminlərmi olaraq ki, həmin mövcudduki mövcuddur, həqiqətən də ən yaxşı mövcuddur? Bu kağızda, çoxlu paylaşılmış veri qurğuları ilə fərm semantik ayırmaq məqsədini təhsil edirik. Biz göstəririk ki, standart değerlendirmə resursu təyin etmək üçün bütün gözləmələrə baxmayaraq, məlumatların işləməsində kiçik dəyişikliklərin dəyişiklikləri seçmək üçün dəyişiklik sonuçları ola bilər. Bu bizi açıq-kaynaq standardizlənmiş işləmə boru çizgisini təbliğ edir, ki bu möhkəm modelləri salmaq üçün paylaşır və yenidən istifadə edilər.', 'bn': 'নির্দিষ্ট কাজের জন্য রাষ্ট্র-অফ-শিল্পের বিষয়টি জানা গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভাষার তদন্তের একটি অংশ। কিন্তু আমরা কি সত্যিই নিশ্চিত হতে পারি যে বর্তমান পরিস্থিতি সত্যিই শিল্পের সর্বোত্তম মডেল? এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ফ্রেমের সেমেন্টিক পার্জিং এর কেস পড়ি, বেশ কয়েকটি ভাগ ভাগাভাগি ডাটাসেটের কাজ। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে স্বাভাবিক মূল্য মূল্যের উৎস প্রদানের জন্য সকল সেবা সত্ত্বেও, তথ্য প্রক্রিয়ার ছোট বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ এটি আমাদের একটি উন্মুক্ত সোর্স স্ট্যান্ডারেশন প্রক্রিয়ার পাইপেলাইন প্রস্তাব করার জন্য, যা রোবস্ট মডেলের তুলনায় শেয়ার', 'bs': 'Znanje države umjetnosti za određeni zadatak je ključna komponenta bilo koje računalne lingvističke istrage. Ali možemo li zaista biti sigurni da je trenutno stanje umjetnosti zaista najbolji model? U ovom papiru proučavamo slučaj semantičkog analiza okvira, dobro određen zadatak sa višestrukim zajedničkim podacima. Pokazujemo da, uprkos svim brigama koji su poduzeti za pružanje standardnog resursa procjene, male varijacije u procesu podataka mogu imati dramatične posljedice za postizanje učinka analizatora. To nas vodi da predložimo standardizovanu kanalizaciju obrade otvorenog izvora, koja se može podijeliti i ponovno iskoristiti za jaku usporedbu modela.', 'ca': "Conèixer l'última tasca d'una tasca en particular és un component essencial de qualsevol investigació lingüística computacional. Però podem estar realment segurs que l'actualitat és realment el model de millor rendiment? In this paper, we study the case of frame semantic parsing, a well-established task with multiple shared datasets.  Mostrem que malgrat tota la atenció feta per proporcionar un recurso standard d'evaluació, les petites variacions en el processament de dades poden tenir conseqüències dràstices per classificar el rendiment del analizador. Això ens porta a proposar un tub de processament estàndaritzat de codi obert, que pot ser compartit i reutilitzat per a una comparació robusta del model.", 'cs': 'Znalost nejmodernějšího stavu pro konkrétní úkol je základní součástí každého výpočetního lingvistického šetření. Můžeme si však být skutečně jisti, že současný nejmodernější model je skutečně nejvýkonnějším modelem? V tomto článku se zabýváme případem sémantického parsování rámečků, zavedeného úkolu s více sdílenými datovými sadami. Ukazujeme, že i přes veškerou péči věnovanou standardnímu vyhodnocovacímu zdroji, malé rozdíly ve zpracování dat mohou mít dramatické důsledky na výkon hodnocení parseru. To nás vede k navržení open-source standardizovaného procesního potrubí, které lze sdílet a znovu použít pro robustní srovnání modelů.', 'et': 'Teadmine konkreetse ülesande kaasaegse taseme teadmine on igasuguse arvutuslingvistika uurimise oluline komponent. Kuid kas me saame olla tõesti kindlad, et praegune tehnika tase on tõepoolest parim tulemuslik mudel? Käesolevas töös uurime raamsemantilise parsimise juhtumit, mis on väljakujunenud ülesanne mitme jagatud andmekogumiga. Näitame, et vaatamata kõigile standardsete hindamisressursside pakkumisele võivad väikesed erinevused andmetöötluses avaldada dramaatilisi tagajärgi parseri tulemuslikkusele. See viib meid pakkuma välja avatud lähtekoodiga standarditud töötlemisjuhtme, mida saab jagada ja uuesti kasutada tugeva mudeli võrdlemiseks.', 'fi': 'Tietyn tehtävän nykytekniikan tunteminen on olennainen osa laskennallista kielitutkimusta. Mutta voimmeko olla todella varmoja siitä, että nykyinen huipputekniikka on todellakin parhaiten suoriutuva malli? Tässä työssä tutkitaan kehyssentiikan jäsentämistä, joka on vakiintunut tehtävä, jossa on useita jaettuja datakokonaisuuksia. Osoitamme, että huolimatta normaalin arviointiresurssin tarjoamisesta pienillä tietojenkäsittelyn vaihteluilla voi olla dramaattisia seurauksia luokittelun suorituskykyyn. Tämä johtaa siihen, että ehdotamme avoimen lähdekoodin standardoitua prosessointiputkea, joka voidaan jakaa ja käyttää uudelleen vankkaa mallivertailua varten.', 'sk': 'Poznavanje najsodobnejšega znanja za določeno nalogo je bistvena sestavina vsake računalniške jezikoslovne raziskave. Ali smo lahko resnično prepričani, da je trenutno najsodobnejši model? V prispevku preučujemo primer semantičnega razčlenjanja okvirjev, ki je uveljavljena naloga z več skupnimi nabori podatkov. Pokazali smo, da imajo majhne različice v obdelavi podatkov kljub vsej skrbi za zagotavljanje standardnega vira ocenjevanja dramatične posledice za uspešnost razvrščanja razvrščanja razčlenjevalnika. To nas pripelje do predloga odprtokodnega standardiziranega cevovoda za obdelavo, ki ga je mogoče deliti in ponovno uporabiti za robustno primerjavo modelov.', 'ha': "Knowing the state-of-the-art for a particular task is an essential component of any computational linguistics investigation.  Ashe, zã mu amince ba, lalle ne shi ne mafi alhẽrin mai aiki da wannan? Ga wannan takardan, Munã karatun masu karatun parse na semantic na firam, wani aikin da aka tabbatar da shi mai yawa da masu haɗa zalumai masu yawa. Tuna nũna cewa, kuma amma duk da aka kiyaye shi dõmin a bãyar da kimar kimar ta daidaita, variablettu ƙarami cikin shirin da za'a yi amfani da data, za'a iya da matsalari ga fassarar parse. Wannan yana shiryar da mu buɗe wani piilen da aka daidaita aiki na kwamfyuta, wanda za'a iya raba shi kuma a yi amfani da shi dõmin misalin abun.", 'he': 'הידוע במצב המיוחד למשימה מסויימת הוא רכיב חיוני בכל חקירה שפתית מחשבית. But can we be truly confident that the current state-of-the-art is indeed the best performing model?  בעיתון הזה, אנו לומדים את המקרה של בדיקת סמנטית מסגרת, משימה מאושרת היטב עם מספר קבוצות נתונים משותפים. אנחנו מראים שלמרות כל הטיפול שנטפל בכדי לספק משאב עריכה סטנדרטי, ויריאציות קטנות בעבודת נתונים יכולות להיות תוצאות דרמטיות להדרגות ביצועי המחקר. זה מוביל אותנו להציע צינור עיבוד סטנדרטי מקור פתוח, שיכול לחלוק ולהשתמש מחדש לשוואה מודל חזק.', 'jv': 'Ngawe ngerti Stad-of-the-arts kanggo nganggo perusahaan sing dibenalke nguasara ingkang sapa sing perusahaan kanggo resmi ingkang telangustik. Nanging, iso ngomong pengen nganggo nyatakake tresnani iki banget, dadi sing luwih apik lan ora ? frame Genjer-Genjer Iki lak segala awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem Open-source sing dadi perusahaan sistem sing bisa seperakan lan gampang nggawe model sing bisa dianggap', 'bo': 'དམིགས་བསལ་བྱས་པར་སྒེར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ཤེས་པ་ནི་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དངོས་ཡོད་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་གནས་སྟངས་དེ་ལས་འཕགས་པའི་མ་དཔེ་གཏོང་ཆོག་ཡིན་ནམ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གཞུང་གི་སྔོན་ལྟར་བཅས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ལྟ་བུ་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་བློ་གཏད་པ་ཡིན། གྲངས་རིམ་གྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ལྟར་ཚད་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ལྟར་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་བ་རྐྱེན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ This leads us to propose an open-source standardized processing pipeline, which can be shared and reused for robust model comparison.'}
{'en': 'Sensitivity to Input Order : Evaluation of an Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model', 'ar': 'الحساسية لترتيب المدخلات: تقييم نموذج تعلم الكلمات الواقعي عبر مواقف بايزي المتزايد والمحدود بالذاكرة', 'pt': 'Sensibilidade à Ordem de Entrada: Avaliação de um Modelo de Aprendizagem de Palavras Bayesianas Incrementais e com Limitação de Memória', 'es': 'Sensibilidad al orden de entrada: evaluación de un modelo de aprendizaje de palabras bayesiano intersituacional incremental y limitado en memoria', 'fr': "Sensibilité à l'ordre d'entrée\xa0: évaluation d'un modèle d'apprentissage de mots bayésien intersituationnel incrémental et limité en mémoire", 'ja': '入力順序に対する感度：増分的でメモリに制限されたベイジアン・クロスシチュエーション・ワード・ラーニング・モデルの評価', 'zh': '其入次之敏感性:增量与内存受限贝叶斯跨情境单词学模形之评估', 'hi': 'इनपुट ऑर्डर के लिए संवेदनशीलता: एक वृद्धिशील और मेमोरी-सीमित बायेसियन क्रॉस-सिचुएशनल वर्ड लर्निंग मॉडल का मूल्यांकन', 'ru': 'Чувствительность к порядку ввода: оценка инкрементной и ограниченной памятью байесовской кросс-ситуационной модели изучения слов', 'ga': "Ordú Íogaireachta d'Ionchur: Meastóireacht ar Mhúnla Foghlama Focal Trasshuímh de chuid Bayesian Incriminteach agus Faoi Theorainn Chuimhne", 'el': 'Ευαίσθητη στη σειρά εισαγωγής: Αξιολόγηση ενός αναλογικού και περιορισμένου μνήμης Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Models', 'ka': 'სიცნობიერება შეტყობინებაზე: შემდეგი და მეხსიერება- ზემოდული ბეიზიანის გასწავლების მოდელი', 'hu': 'Bemeneti sorrendre való érzékenység: Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayezian Cross-Situation Word Learning Model értékelése', 'it': "Sensibilità all'ordine di input: valutazione di un modello di apprendimento delle parole bayesiane cross-situazionale incrementale e limitato alla memoria", 'lt': 'Padidėjęs jautrumas įėjimo tvarkai: didėjančio ir atminties riboto Bayezijos tarpsituacinio žodžių mokymosi modelio vertinimas', 'kk': 'Кіріс ретіне сезімділік: Үлкейтін және жады- шектелген бейезиялық көп- уақытты сөздерді оқыту үлгісін оқу', 'mk': 'Чувствителност кон влезниот ред: Оценка на екстременталниот и мемориски меморијански модел за крсто ситуационално учење зборови', 'ms': 'Sensitiviti kepada Perintah Input: Evaluasi Model Pembelajaran Kata Bayesian Selatan Situasi dan Akhir', 'mt': 'Sensitivity to Input Order: Evaluation of an Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model', 'ml': 'ഇന്\u200dപുട്ടിന്റെ ക്രമീകരണത്തിലേക്കുള്ള സെന്റിസിറ്റി: ഉയര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്ന, മെമ്മറി- നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട ബെയിസിയന്\u200d ക്ര', 'mn': 'Ингээд мэдрэмжтэй байдал: нэмэгдэх, санамсар-хязгаарлагдсан Байзесийн Төвөрмөц Сургуулах үг загварын үнэлгээ', 'pl': 'Wrażliwość na kolejność wejścia: Ocena przyrostowego i ograniczonego pamięci Bayesowskiego modelu krzyżowego uczenia się słowa', 'no': 'Sensitivitet til inndata- rekkefølgje: Evaluering av ein inkremental og minne- Limited Bayesian Cross- Situational Word Learning Model', 'ro': 'Sensibilitatea la ordinea de intrare: Evaluarea unui model de învățare a cuvintelor bayesiane cross-situațională incrementală și limitată de memorie', 'sr': 'Sensitivnost na ulazni red: Evaluacija povećanog i Memory-ograničenog Bejzejskog preko situacijalnog modela učenja reči', 'so': 'Qoraalka input: Evaluation of an Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situation Word Learning Model', 'si': 'සංවේදනය ඇතුළුම් පද්ධතියට: විශාලය සහ මතක සීමාවිත බේසියාන් ක්\u200dරොස් සිටියාත්මක වචනය ඉගෙනීම් මොඩේල්', 'sv': 'Känslighet för inmatningsordning: Utvärdering av en inkrementell och minnesbegränsad bayesiansk korssituationell ordinlärningsmodell', 'ta': 'உள்ளீட்டு வரிசை', 'ur': 'Input Order کے ساتھ سنسیٹیوتی: ایک اضافہ اور مہمانی-لیمیٹ بیزین کرس-سیٹیوشن ویڈ سیکھانے کی موڈل کی Evaluation of an Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model', 'vi': 'Nhạy cảm với trật tự nhập: Đánh giá của Chỉ số liệu và Ký Ức Giới hạn Bayisian Cross-Siturative Word Learning Model', 'uz': 'Comment', 'bg': 'Чувствителност към реда на въвеждане: оценка на ингрементален и ограничен с паметта Байезийски модел за кръстосано-ситуационно учене на думи', 'nl': 'Gevoeligheid voor Invoervolgorde: Evaluatie van een Incremental en Geheugenbeperkt Bayesiaans Cross-Situationeel Woordleermodel', 'hr': 'Osjetljivost na ulazni red: procjena povećanog i ograničenog modela učenja riječi Bayesian Cross-Situational', 'da': 'Følsomhed over for input rækkefølge: Evaluering af en Incremental og Hukommelsesbegrænset Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model', 'de': 'Sensitivität für Eingabereihenfolge: Evaluation eines inkrementalen und gedächtnisbegrenzten Bayesischen Cross-Situational Word Learning Modells', 'id': 'Sensitivity to Input Order: Evaluation of an Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model', 'ko': '입력 순서에 대한 민감성: 증량과 기억이 제한된 베일스 크로스 상황 어휘 학습 모델에 대한 평가', 'fa': 'حساسیت به دستور ورودی: ارزیابی یک مدل یادگیری کلمات بیشتر و حافظه محدودیت Bayesian Cross-Situational', 'sw': 'Uhuru wa amri ya Uingizaji: Uthibitisho wa Modala ya Kufundisha na Kumbukumbu Bora Bora ya Msingi wa Bayesia', 'tr': 'Girdi Aralygy', 'af': "Sensitiwiteit na Invoer Volgorde: Evaluering van 'n Incremental en Geheue- Begrens Bayesian Kruis- Situationale Woord Leer Model", 'sq': 'Sensitiviteti ndaj urdhërit të hyrjes: vlerësimi i një modeli të mësimit të fjalëve në Bejzi të kufizuar në mënyrë të madhe dhe të kufizuar në kujtesë', 'am': 'Sensitivity to Input Order: Evaluation of an Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model', 'hy': 'Ներմուծի պատվիճակի հանդեպ զգացմությունը. Արժեքը', 'az': 'Girdi Sətirinə Duyarlılıq: Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model Evaluation of an Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model', 'bn': 'ইনপুটের নির্দেশ: বেয়েশিয়ার সীমিত বেয়েশিয়ান ক্রস-স্থানীয় শব্দ শিক্ষা মডেল', 'ca': "Sensibilitat a l'ordre d'entrada: Evaluació d'un model d'aprenentatge de paraules incremental i limitat a la memòria", 'bs': 'Sensitivnost na ulazni red: procjena povećanog i Memory-ograničenog modela učenja riječi Bayesijskog preko situacije', 'et': 'Sisendjärjekorra tundlikkus: täiendava ja mälupiiranguga bayesia situatsioonidevahelise sõnaõppe mudeli hindamine', 'cs': 'Citlivost na vstupní pořadí: Hodnocení inkrementálního a paměťově omezeného Bayesovského cross-situačního modelu učení slov', 'fi': 'Herkkyys syöttöjärjestykseen: Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model -mallin arviointi', 'jv': 'Sensitity to Ininput order: Validity of an Incretal and membersty-limited bayessan krus-Situable Word Learning model', 'sk': 'Občutljivost na vrstni red vnosa: ocena bajskega navzkrižnega modela učenja besed z omejenim pomnilnikom', 'he': 'רגישות לסדר הכניסה: הערכה של דוגמנית לימוד מילים בייזית מוגבלת ומגבלת בזיכרון', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'Sensitivity to Input Order: Evaluation of an Incremental and Memory-Limited Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning Model'}
{'en': 'We present a variation of the incremental and memory-limited algorithm in (Sadeghi et al., 2017) for Bayesian cross-situational word learning and evaluate the model in terms of its functional performance and its sensitivity to input order. We show that the functional performance of our sub-optimal model on corpus data is close to that of its optimal counterpart (Frank et al., 2009), while only the sub-optimal model is capable of predicting the input order effects reported in experimental studies.', 'ar': 'نقدم تباينًا في الخوارزمية المتزايدة والمحدودة للذاكرة في (Sadeghi et al. ، 2017) لتعلم كلمة Bayesian عبر المواقف وتقييم النموذج من حيث أدائه الوظيفي وحساسيته لترتيب الإدخال. لقد أظهرنا أن الأداء الوظيفي لنموذجنا دون الأمثل على بيانات الجسم قريب من نظيره الأمثل (فرانك وآخرون ، 2009) ، بينما النموذج دون الأمثل هو الوحيد القادر على التنبؤ بتأثيرات ترتيب الإدخال المبلغ عنها في التجربة. دراسات.', 'es': 'Presentamos una variación del algoritmo incremental y de memoria limitada en (Sadeghi et al., 2017) para el aprendizaje de palabras bayesiano intersituacional y evaluamos el modelo en términos de su rendimiento funcional y su sensibilidad al orden de entrada. Mostramos que el rendimiento funcional de nuestro modelo subóptimo en datos de corpus es cercano al de su homólogo óptimo (Frank et al., 2009), mientras que solo el modelo subóptimo es capaz de predecir los efectos del orden de entrada informados en estudios experimentales.', 'fr': "Nous présentons une variation de l'algorithme incrémental et limité en mémoire dans (Sadeghi et al., 2017) pour l'apprentissage de mots bayésien intersituationnel et évaluons le modèle en termes de performance fonctionnelle et de sensibilité à l'ordre d'entrée. Nous montrons que la performance fonctionnelle de notre modèle sous-optimal sur les données de corpus est proche de celle de son homologue optimal (Frank et al., 2009), alors que seul le modèle sous-optimal est capable de prédire les effets d'ordre d'entrée rapportés dans les études expérimentales.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma variação do algoritmo incremental e limitado por memória em (Sadeghi et al., 2017) para aprendizagem de palavras intersituacional Bayesiana e avaliamos o modelo em termos de seu desempenho funcional e sua sensibilidade à ordem de entrada. Mostramos que o desempenho funcional do nosso modelo sub-ótimo em dados de corpus é próximo ao de sua contraparte ideal (Frank et al., 2009), enquanto apenas o modelo sub-ótimo é capaz de prever os efeitos de ordem de entrada relatados em experimentos. estudos.', 'zh': '臣等建贝叶斯跨情境词学之增量,与内存受限算法之变体(Sadeghi et al., 2017),因其功能及其次第之敏感性质之。 臣等明次优在语料库数近其最优者(Frank等,2009),唯次优能测实验言事者输阶次效。', 'ja': '我々は、（ Sadeghi et al., 2017 ）におけるベイズ型クロスシチュエーションワード学習のための増分アルゴリズムとメモリ制限アルゴリズムのバリエーションを提示し、その機能性能と入力順序に対する感度の観点からモデルを評価する。我々は、コーパスデータに対する我々のサブ最適モデルの機能性能が、その最適相手の機能性能に近いことを示している(Frank et al., 2009 )。一方、サブ最適モデルのみが、実験研究で報告された入力オーダー効果を予測することができる。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем вариацию инкрементного и ограниченного памятью алгоритма в (Sadeghi et al., 2017) для байесовского кросс-ситуационного изучения слов и оцениваем модель с точки зрения ее функциональной производительности и чувствительности к порядку ввода. Мы показываем, что функциональные характеристики нашей субоптимальной модели на корпусных данных близки к таковым ее оптимального аналога (Frank et al., 2009), в то время как только субоптимальная модель способна предсказывать эффекты входного порядка, сообщаемые в экспериментальных исследованиях.', 'hi': 'हम बायेसियन क्रॉस-सिचुएशनल वर्ड लर्निंग के लिए (Sadeghi et al., 2017) में वृद्धिशील और मेमोरी-सीमित एल्गोरिथ्म की भिन्नता प्रस्तुत करते हैं और इसके कार्यात्मक प्रदर्शन और इनपुट ऑर्डर के प्रति इसकी संवेदनशीलता के संदर्भ में मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम दिखाते हैं कि कॉर्पस डेटा पर हमारे उप-इष्टतम मॉडल का कार्यात्मक प्रदर्शन इसके इष्टतम समकक्ष (फ्रैंक एट अल. 2009) के करीब है, जबकि केवल उप-इष्टतम मॉडल प्रयोगात्मक अध्ययनों में रिपोर्ट किए गए इनपुट ऑर्डर प्रभावों की भविष्यवाणी करने में सक्षम है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair éagsúlacht ar an algartam incriminteach agus cuimhne-teoranta i (Sadeghi et al., 2017) d’fhoghlaim focal tras-shuíomh Bayesian agus meastóireacht ar an tsamhail i dtéarmaí a feidhmíochta feidhme agus a íogaireacht ord ionchuir. Léirímid go bhfuil feidhmíocht fheidhmiúil ár múnla fo-optamach ar shonraí corpais gar do fheidhmíocht a comhghleacaithe optamach (Frank et al., 2009), cé nach bhfuil ach an tsamhail fho-optamach in ann éifeachtaí an oird ionchuir a tuairiscíodh i dturgnamh a thuar. staidéir.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ინტერემენტიური და მეხსიერების განსხვავება ალგორტიმს (Sadeghi et al., 2017) ბაეზიანის კრესისტაციალური სიტყვების სწავლებისთვის და მისი ფუნქციალური მუშაობისთვის და მისი სიგრძნობისთვის შე ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ჩვენი სოპტიმალური მოდელის ფუნქციალური გამოსახულება კორპუსს მონაცემების მონაცემებისთვის უფრო მხოლოდ მისი ოპტიმალური კონტაქტის მონაცემებისთვის (Frank et al., 2009) და მაგრამ მხ', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια παραλλαγή του αλγόριθμου αύξησης και περιορισμένης μνήμης σε (κ.α., 2017) για την Bayesian Cross-Situation εκμάθηση λέξεων και αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο όσον αφορά τη λειτουργική του απόδοση και την ευαισθησία στην τάξη εισαγωγής. Δείχνουμε ότι η λειτουργική απόδοση του υποβέλτιστου μοντέλου μας σε δεδομένα σώματος είναι κοντά σε αυτή του βέλτιστου ομολόγου του (Φρανκ κ.α., 2009), ενώ μόνο το υποβέλτιστο μοντέλο είναι ικανό να προβλέψει τις επιπτώσεις της σειράς εισόδου που αναφέρθηκαν σε πειραματικές μελέτες.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az inkrementális és memória-korlátozott algoritmus változatát (Sadeghi et al., 2017) a bayesiai cross-situational word learning esetében, és értékeljük a modellt funkcionális teljesítménye és a bemeneti sorrendre való érzékenysége szempontjából. Kimutatjuk, hogy a korpusz adataira vonatkozó szuboptimális modellünk funkcionális teljesítménye közel áll az optimális megfelelőéhez (Frank et al., 2009), míg csak a szuboptimális modell képes előrejelezni a kísérleti vizsgálatokban jelentett input sorrend hatásokat.', 'it': "Presentiamo una variazione dell'algoritmo incrementale e a memoria limitata in (Sadeghi et al., 2017) per l'apprendimento bayesiano cross-situational word learning e valutiamo il modello in termini di prestazioni funzionali e sensibilità all'ordine di input. Mostriamo che le prestazioni funzionali del nostro modello sub-ottimale sui dati del corpo sono vicine a quelle della sua controparte ottimale (Frank et al., 2009), mentre solo il modello sub-ottimale è in grado di prevedere gli effetti dell'ordine di input riportati negli studi sperimentali.", 'mk': 'Презентираме варијација на екстременталниот и мемориски ограничен алгоритм во (Sadeghi et al., 2017) за бајезиското крстоситуационално учење на зборови и го проценуваме моделот во поглед на неговата функционална перформанса и нејзината чувствителност кон редот на внесување. Ние покажуваме дека функционалната перформанса на нашиот суб-оптимален модел на податоците од корпусот е блиску до онаа на неговиот оптимален колега (Френк и г.', 'kk': 'Біз Байезиялық сөздерді білім беру үшін көптеген және жады шектелген алгоритм алгоритмін (Sadeghi et al., 2017) және оның функциялық істеу және енгізу ретінде өзінің сезімділігін бағалаймыз. Корпус деректерінің ішкі оптималдық үлгісінің функциялық іске асыратынын көрсетедік. Оның оптималдық партнерінің (Frank et al., 2009) жағында жақын болады, бірақ тек ішкі оптималдық үлгісінің тек эксперименталдық зерттеулерде берілг', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan variasi algoritma tambahan dan memori-terbatas dalam (Sadeghi et al., 2017) untuk pembelajaran perkataan salib situasi Bayesian dan menilai model dalam terma prestasi fungsionalnya dan sensitifitas kepada perintah input. Kami menunjukkan bahawa prestasi fungsi model sub-optimal kami pada data corpus adalah dekat dengan prestasi kontrak optimal (Frank et al., 2009), sementara hanya model sub-optimal mampu meramalkan kesan tertib input yang dilaporkan dalam kajian percubaan.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame Bayezijos tarpsituacinio žodžių mokymosi papildomo ir atminties riboto algoritmo variantą (Sadeghi et al., 2017 m.) ir vertiname model į atsižvelgiant į jo funkcinį veiksmingumą ir jautrumą įvedimo tvarkai. Mes parodome, kad mūsų suboptimalaus modelio corpus duomenų funkciniai rezultatai yra panašūs į jo optimalaus lygiaverčio modelio (Frank et al., 2009 m.), o tik suboptimalus model is gali prognozuoti įvedimo eilės poveikį, apie kurį pranešta eksperimentiniuose tyrimuose.', 'ml': 'ബെയിസ്യന്\u200d ക്രിസ്റ്റീവ് വാക്ക് പഠിക്കുകയും അതിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനപ്രകൃതിയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനവും അതിന്റെ ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ ശ്രദ്ധയുടെ കാര്യത്തില്\u200d മാതൃകയും  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പ് ഡേറ്റില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ഉപോക്രിമാല്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d അതിന്റെ പ്രത്യേക പരീക്ഷണ പഠനത്തില്\u200d റിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ട് ചെയ്തിരിക്കുന്ന ഉള്\u200dപ', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw varjazzjoni tal-algoritmu inkrementali u limitat għall-memorja f’ (Sadeghi et al., 2017) għat-tagħlim tal-kliem bejn is-sitwazzjonijiet Bayeżjani u nivvalutaw il-mudell f’termini tal-prestazzjoni funzjonali tiegħu u s-sensittività tiegħu għall-ordni tal-input. We show that the functional performance of our sub-optimal model on corpus data is close to that of its optimal counterpart (Frank et al., 2009), while only the sub-optimal model is capable of predicting the input order effects reported in experimental studies.', 'mn': 'Бид Байзийн олон тохиромжтой үгийн суралцах болон санамж хязгаарлагдсан алгоритмын өөрчлөлт (Sadeghi et al., 2017) дээр үзүүлж, функцын үйл ажиллагааны талаар загварыг үнэлэх болон өгөгдлийн дарааллын мэдрэмжтэй байдлыг үнэлэх болно. Бид корпус өгөгдлийн суб-өөдрөг загварын функц үйл ажиллагааны үйл ажиллагааг харуулж байна. Франк et al., 2009 оны эерэг хамтрагч (Франк et al., 2009 оны) хоорондоо ойрхон байдаг. Гэхдээ зөвхөн суб-өөдрөг загвар нь туршилтын суд', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein variasjon av den inkrementale og minnelgrenserte algoritmen i (Sadeghi et al., 2017) for Bayesian kryssituasjonell ordlæring og evaluerer modellen i forhold til funksjonell utvikling og følsomhet til inndatarekkefølgje. Vi viser at funksjonelle utviklinga av underoptimal modellen vårt på korpusdata er nær det av sin optimal trekant (Frank et al., 2009), mens berre underoptimal modellen er i stand til å foregå inndata rekkefølgja rapporterte i eksperimentelle studiar.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy wariację algorytmu przyrostowego i ograniczonego pamięci w (Sadeghi et al., 2017) dla Bayesowskiego międzysystuacyjnego uczenia się słów oraz oceniamy model pod względem jego wydajności funkcjonalnej i wrażliwości na kolejność wejściową. Pokazujemy, że funkcjonalność naszego suboptymalnego modelu na danych korpusowych jest zbliżona do jego optymalnego odpowiednika (Frank et al., 2009), natomiast tylko model suboptymalny jest w stanie przewidzieć efekty kolejności wejściowej zgłaszane w badaniach eksperymentalnych.', 'ro': 'Prezentăm o variație a algoritmului incremental și limitat de memorie în (Sadeghi et al., 2017) pentru învățarea cuvântului cross-situațional bayesian și evaluăm modelul în termeni de performanță funcțională și sensibilitate la ordinea de intrare. Demonstrăm că performanța funcțională a modelului nostru suboptim pe datele corpului este apropiată de cea a omologului său optim (Frank et al., 2009), în timp ce numai modelul suboptim este capabil să prevină efectele ordinii de intrare raportate în studiile experimentale.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo varijaciju incrementalnog i ograničenog algoritma na pamćenju u (Sadeghi et al., 2017) za učenje prekrassituacionalnih reči u Bejziji i procjenjivanje model a u smislu njegove funkcionalne funkcionalnosti i njegove osjetljivosti na ulazni red. Pokazujemo da je funkcionalna funkcionalna funkcija našeg podoptimalnog modela na podacima korpusa blizu optimalnog kolega (Frank et al., 2009), dok je samo podoptimalnog modela sposoban da predvidi efekte ulaznog reda koji su prijavljeni u eksperimentalnim ispitivanjima.', 'si': 'අපි බේසියාන් විශාල වචනය ඉගෙනීම සහ මතකය සම්පූර්ණ අල්ගෝරිතම් වලින් වෙනස් කරනවා බේසියාන් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වචනය ඉගෙනීම සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ඒකේ ස අපි පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ සබ් හොඳින් මොඩේල් එකේ වැඩිය ප්\u200dරභාව ප්\u200dරභාව ප්\u200dරභාව ප්\u200dරභාව (ෆ්\u200dරෑන්ක් ට් අල්, 2009) ගැන හොඳ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරභාවිත විතරයි', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaa isbedelka algorithiga korsocodka iyo xasuusta (Sadeghi et al., 2017) ee barashada hadalka xaaladaha ah ee Bayesian, waana qiimeynaynaa modelka sameynta tababarka shaqaalaha iyo xilligiisa sawirida. Waxaynu muujinnaa in sameynta hoos-optimal modeleena oo ku qoran taariikhda korpus uu u dhow yahay mid ka mid ah saaxiibkiisa optimiska ah (Frank et al., 2009), laakiin qaabka hoos-optimal oo keliya ayaa awoodi kara inuu sii sheego saameyaasha arimaha lagu qoray baaritaanka.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en variation av den inkrementella och minnesbegränsade algoritmen i (Sadeghi et al., 2017) för Bayesian cross-situational word learning och utvärderar modellen med avseende på dess funktionella prestanda och dess känslighet för indataordning. Vi visar att den funktionella prestandan hos vår suboptimala modell på korpusdata ligger nära den hos dess optimala motsvarighet (Frank et al., 2009), medan endast den suboptimala modellen kan förutsäga de ingångsordningseffekter som rapporterats i experimentella studier.', 'ta': 'நாம் பேயிசியாவின் செயல்பாட்டின் செயல்பாட்டின் செயல்பாட்டிலும் உள்ளீட்டு வரிசையிலும் உணர்ச்சியுடனும் மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் கார்ப்ஸ் தகவலில் எங்கள் உப- optimal மாதிரியின் செயல்பாடு செயல்பாடு அது விருப்பமான எதிர்பார்ட் (பிராங்க் et al., 2009) சமீபத்தாக இருக்கிறது என்பதை காண', 'ur': 'ہم نے بائئسی کے کرس-سیٹیونٹی کلمات کی تعلیم کے لئے (Sadeghi et al., 2017) میں اضافہ اور یادِ محدود الگوریتم کی ایک تغییر پیش کرتا ہے اور اس کے کامل عمل کے مطابق مدل کو مطابق مطابق مطابق کرتا ہے اور اس کی نسبت اضافہ کے مطابق اس کی حس ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ کورپوس ڈیٹا پر ہمارے sub-optimal موڈل کی عملکرد عملکرد اس کے اچھے کنٹرپارت (Frank et al., 2009) کے قریب ہے، حالانکہ صرف sub-optimal موڈل آزمائش کی تحقیقات میں گزارے ہوئے اینپیٹ اوردر اثرات کی پیش بینی کرنے کے قابل ہے.', 'uz': "Biz Bayrisi har bir holatda o'rganish so'zlari o'rganish va o'zgarishning vazifasi va kiritish tartibi haqida modelni qiymatlashimiz mumkin. Biz kompyuterlar maʼlumotidagi sub-optimal modelimizning funksiyatlarini ko'rsatdik, faqat tizim tajribalarida berilgan kiritish muvaffaqiyatlarini o'rganish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi trình bày một sự khác biệt của thuật to án thu nhỏ và chỉ số bộ nhớ (Sadeghi et al., 2007) cho học chữ chéo vị trí của người Bayisian và đánh giá mô hình về khả năng hoạt động của nó và độ nhạy cảm với thứ tự nhập. Chúng tôi cho thấy khả năng chức năng của mô hình không tối ưu của chúng tôi trên dữ liệu cơ thể gần với khả năng ứng dụng tối ưu của nó (Frank et al., 2009), trong khi chỉ có mô hình không tối ưu tiên tiên tiên tiên tiên tiên tiên đoán được các hiệu ứng trong các nghiên cứu thử nghiệm.', 'bg': 'Представяме вариация на алгоритъма с ограничена памет и допълнителен алгоритъм в (Садеги и др., 2017) за Байезийско кръстосано-ситуационно учене на думи и оценяваме модела по отношение на функционалното му представяне и чувствителността му към реда на въвеждане. Показваме, че функционалното представяне на нашия субоптимален модел върху корпусни данни е близко до това на неговия оптимален екземпляр (Франк и др., 2009), докато само субоптимален модел е способен да предвиди ефектите от входния ред, докладвани в експериментални проучвания.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een variatie van het incrementele en geheugenbeperkte algoritme in (Sadeghi et al., 2017) voor Bayesiaanse cross-situationele woordleren en evalueren het model in termen van functionele prestaties en gevoeligheid voor invoervolgorde. We laten zien dat de functionele prestaties van ons suboptimale model op corpusgegevens dicht bij die van zijn optimale tegenhanger (Frank et al., 2009) liggen, terwijl alleen het suboptimale model in staat is om de effecten van de invoervolgorde te voorspellen die in experimentele studies zijn gerapporteerd.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo varijaciju povećanog i ograničenog algoritma pamćenja u (Sadeghi et al., 2017) za učenje prekrassituacijskih riječi Bayesian a i procjenjivanje modela u smislu njegove funkcionalne funkcionalnosti i osjetljivosti na ulazni red. Pokazujemo da je funkcionalni učinkoviti našeg podoptimalnog modela na podacima korpusa blizu onih njegovih optimalnih kolega (Frank et al., 2009), dok je samo podoptimalni model sposoban predvidjeti učinke ulaznog reda prijavljene u eksperimentalnim ispitivanjima.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en variation af den inkrementelle og hukommelsesbegrænsede algoritme i (Sadeghi et al., 2017) for Bayesian cross-situational word learning og evaluerer modellen med hensyn til dens funktionelle ydeevne og dens følsomhed over for input orden. Vi viser, at den funktionelle ydeevne af vores suboptimale model på korpusdata ligger tæt på den optimale modpart (Frank et al., 2009), mens kun den suboptimale model er i stand til at forudsige de input orden effekter rapporteret i eksperimentelle undersøgelser.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren eine Variation des inkrementellen und speicherbeschränkten Algorithmus in (Sadeghi et al., 2017) für Bayesian Cross-Situational Word Learning und bewerten das Modell hinsichtlich seiner funktionalen Leistung und seiner Empfindlichkeit gegenüber Eingabereihenfolge. Wir zeigen, dass die funktionelle Leistung unseres suboptimalen Modells auf Korpusdaten nahe der seines optimalen Gegenstandes liegt (Frank et al., 2009), während nur das suboptimale Modell in der Lage ist, die in experimentellen Studien berichteten Input-Order-Effekte vorherzusagen.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan variasi dari algoritma incremental dan memory-limited dalam (Sadeghi et al., 2017) untuk pembelajaran kata salib situasi Bayesian dan mengevaluasi model dalam terma prestasi fungsionalnya dan sensitivitasnya terhadap perintah input. Kami menunjukkan bahwa prestasi fungsional dari model sub-optimal kami pada data corpus dekat dengan yang dari counterpart optimal (Frank et al., 2009), sementara hanya model sub-optimal mampu memprediksi efek urutan input yang dilaporkan dalam studi eksperimental.', 'ko': '우리는 (Sadeghi 등, 2017년)에서 베일스의 다양한 상황 단어 학습에 사용되는 증량과 메모리 제한 알고리즘의 변체를 제시하고 기능 성능과 입력 순서에 대한 민감성 측면에서 이 모델을 평가했다.우리는 우리의 차우모델이 어료 라이브러리 데이터에서의 기능 성능이 그 최적 대응 모델(Frank 등, 2009)에 가깝고 차우모델만 실험 연구에서 보고된 입력 순서 효과를 예측할 수 있다는 것을 발견했다.', 'fa': 'ما تغییری از الگوریتم افزایش و حافظه محدود در (Sadeghi et al., 2017) برای یادگیری کلمات متفاوتی بیزیایی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و مدل را با توجه به عملکرد عملکرد و حساسیت آن به سفارش ورودی ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که عملکرد مدل زیر optimal ما در اطلاعات کورپوس نزدیک به همکارش optimal (Frank et al., 2009) است، در حالی که فقط مدل زیر optimal تواند پیش بینی اثرات دستور ورودی که در تحقیقات آزمایشی گزارش شده است.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha mabadiliko ya algorithi yenye ukomo wa kumbukumbu katika (Sadeghi et al., 2017) kwa maneno yanayohusiana na Bayesia ya kujifunza na kutathmini mtindo huo kwa mujibu wa utendaji wake wa kazi na ufahamu wake wa kuingia. Tunaonyesha kwamba utendaji wa mfumo wetu wa ubora wa matumaini kwenye taarifa za makampuni ni karibu na ile ya mpinzani wake bora (Frank et al., 2009), wakati tu mtindo wa ubora wa matumaini pekee unaweza kutabiri madhara yanayoripotiwa katika tafiti za majaribio.', 'tr': 'Biz Bayeziýanyň (Sadeghi et al., 2017) geçişik söz öwrenmesi üçin azaltylyk we bellenenlerde yada çykylyk algoritminiň üýtgeşişini we bellenenleri a ňladýarys. Biz korpus maglumatynda işleýän işleýän nusgadymyzyň (Frank et al., 2009) we diňe sub-optimal nusgadymyzyň operatýasynyň (Frank et al., 2009) ýakyndygyny görkezilýäris we munyň barlany barlag düzümlerini çaklamak mümkin edip biler.', 'af': "Ons stel 'n variasie van die inkremensielle en geheue-beperkte algoritme in (Sadeghi et al., 2017) vir Bayesian kruis-situasieele woorde leer en evalueer die model in terms van sy funksieele prestasie en sy sensitiviteit na invoer volgorde. Ons wys dat die funksionele prestasie van ons sub-optimale model op korpus data naby is aan die wat van sy optimale komponent (Frank et al., 2009), terwyl slegs die sub-optimal model is in staat om die invoer volgorde effekte te voorskou wat in eksperimentele studie berig is.", 'sq': 'We present a variation of the incremental and memory-limited algorithm in (Sadeghi et al., 2017) for Bayesian cross-situational word learning and evaluate the model in terms of its functional performance and its sensitivity to input order.  Ne tregojmë se performanca funksionale e modelit tonë sub-optimal mbi të dhënat e korpusit është pranë asaj të homologut optimal të tij (Frank et al., 2009), ndërsa vetëm modeli sub-optimal është i aftë të parashikojë efektet e rendit të hyrjes të raportuar në studimet eksperimentale.', 'am': 'ለባይስያ የሥልጣን ትምህርት እና የስታሪነቱን ግንኙነት በማስተማር እና ሞዴልዩን በሥርዓት ስርዓት እና የግንኙነቱን ስርዓት ማስተማርና አስተዋልታለን፡፡ በኮርፓስ ዳታ ላይ የተደረገው የደብዳቤችን የሥርዓት ሞዴል በክፍለ ዘመቻው (የፋርንክ ኤል., 2009) የቀረበ እንደሆነ እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Բեյզիայի բառերի փոխիրական ուսումնասիրության (Սադեգի և այլն., 2017) բառերի աճի և հիշողության սահմանափակ ալգորիթմի տարբերակը և գնահատում ենք մոդելը իր ֆունկցիոնալ արտադրողականության և դրա զգացմունքի առումով ներմուծի կարգով: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մեր կորպոպիտալ տվյալների ենթաօպտիմալ մոդելի ֆունկցիոնալ արտադրողությունը մոտ է իր օպտիմալ համեմատակի արտադրողությանը (Ֆրանկ և այլն., 2009), մինչդեռ միայն ենթաօպտիմալ մոդելը կարող է կանխատեսել փորձարկումների ընթաց', 'az': 'Biz Bayeziya çoxlu şəkildə söz öyrənməsi üçün (Sadeghi et al., 2017) ilə çoxluğu və yaddaşlarının sınırlı algoritminin dəyişikliyini göstəririk və modelini funkcional performansının və onun hisslərinin giriş sırasına değerləşdiririk. Biz korpus məlumatının (Frank et al., 2009) üstündəki sub-optimal modelimizin funkcional performansının optimal performansının yaxınlığını göstəririk, lakin yalnız sub-optimal modeli təcrübələrində xəbərdar edilmiş giriş sıralarının effektlərini təcrübə edə bilər.', 'bn': 'আমরা বেয়েশিয়ার ক্ষেত্রে শিক্ষা এবং তার কার্যকর কর্মকাণ্ডের কারণে মডেলের বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন স্মৃতি ও সীমিত অ্যালগোরিদম (সাদেগি এন আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে কোর্পাসের তথ্যে আমাদের সাব-অপারেমিক মডেলের কার্যকর কর্মকাণ্ডের কার্যক্রম তার অপটিমাল প্রতিপক্ষ (ফ্র্যাঙ্কেট আল, ২০০৯), যদিও শুধু সাব-optimal মডে', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo varijaciju incrementalnog i ograničenog algoritma pamćenja u (Sadeghi et al., 2017) za učenje prekrassituacijskih riječi Bayesijanca i procjenjivanje model a u smislu njegove funkcionalne funkcionalnosti i njegove osjetljivosti na ulazni red. Pokazujemo da je funkcionalna učinka našeg podoptimalnog modela na podacima korpusa blizu onoga sa optimalnim kolegom (Frank et al., 2009), dok je samo podoptimalni model sposoban predvidjeti učinke ulaznog reda prijavljene u eksperimentalnim ispitivanjima.', 'cs': 'Představujeme variaci inkrementálního a paměťově omezeného algoritmu (Sadeghi et al., 2017) pro Bayesovské cross-situační učení slov a vyhodnocujeme model z hlediska jeho funkčního výkonu a citlivosti na vstupní pořadí. Ukazujeme, že funkční výkonnost našeho suboptimálního modelu na korpusových datech je blízká výkonu jeho optimálního protějšku (Frank et al., 2009), zatímco pouze suboptimální model je schopen predikovat efekty vstupního pořadí hlášené v experimentálních studiích.', 'et': 'Esitleme bayesi situatsioonidevahelise sõnaõppe algoritmi (Sadeghi et al., 2017) variatsiooni ning hindame mudelit funktsionaalse jõudluse ja sisendjärjekorra tundlikkuse järgi. Näitame, et meie suboptimaalse mudeli funktsionaalne jõudlus korpusandmetel on lähedane selle optimaalse vaste omale (Frank et al., 2009), samas kui ainult suboptimaalne mudel suudab ennustada eksperimentaalsetes uuringutes kirjeldatud sisendjärjestuse mõjusid.', 'ca': "Presentam una variació del algoritme incremental i limitat a la memòria en (Sadeghi et al., 2017) per l'aprenentatge de paraules transsituacional bayèsia i evaluem el model en termes de rendiment funcional i sensibilitat a l'ordre d'entrada. Mostrem que el rendiment funcional del nostre model sub-optim en dades de corpus està prop d'aquell de la seva homologue òptima (Frank et al., 2009), mentre que només el model sub-optim està capaç de predir els efectes d'ordre d'entrada reportats en estudis experimentals.", 'fi': 'Esitämme bayesilaisen ristisituaatiosanaoppimisen inkrementaalisen ja muistirajoitetun algoritmin variaation (Sadeghi et al., 2017) ja arvioimme mallin toiminnallista suorituskykyä ja herkkyyttä syöttöjärjestykseen. Osoitamme, että alioptimaalisen mallimme toiminnallinen suorituskyky korpusaineistossa on lähellä optimaalisen vastineen (Frank et al., 2009), kun taas vain alioptimaalinen malli pystyy ennustamaan kokeellisissa tutkimuksissa raportoidut syöttöjärjestyksen vaikutukset.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים שינוי של האלגוריתם המספר והמוגבל בזיכרון ב (Sadeghi et al., 2017) עבור לימוד מילים בייסיאני במצב צלב ולעריך את המודל במונחים של ההופעה הפונקציאלית שלה והרגישות שלה לסדר הכניסה. אנו מראים שהביצועים המפעילים של המודל התא-אופטימלי שלנו על נתונים הקורפוס קרובים לאותו של השותף האופטימלי שלו (פרנק וס.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da varianin algoritin da aka ƙara da hukarin a cikin (Sadeghi et al., 2017) wa karanta maganar masu shige na Bayesian, kuma Mu ƙaddara misalin ayuka cikin muhimmin mai amfani da kuma tana da saniyarsa da za'a shiga cikin tarakin. We show that the functional performance of our sub-optimal model on corpus data is close to that of its optimal counterpart (Frank et al., 2009), while only the sub-optimal model is capable of predicting the input order effects reported in experimental studies.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo variacijo incrementalnega in pomnilniško omejenega algoritma v (Sadeghi et al., 2017) za bajzijsko navzkrižno situacijsko učenje besed in ocenimo model glede na njegovo funkcionalno učinkovitost in občutljivost na vhodni vrstni red. Pokazali smo, da je funkcionalna učinkovitost našega suboptimalnega modela na podatkih korpusa blizu učinkovitosti njegovega optimalnega primerljivega modela (Frank et al., 2009), medtem ko je le suboptimalni model sposoben napovedati učinke vhodnega vrstnega reda, poročane v eksperimentalnih študijah.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk karo Algorithm sing gak nggawe geraraning apakno karo mempernik (Sadughi et al), nggawe "bayesi" kanggo kelas sistem sing berartil gak dhéwé karo sistem sing berartil nêmên karo akeh perusahaan karo sistem sing gak dhéwé gak nggawe barang kelas nêmên. Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan funksisi ning model sing paling-Optimat nang dawat karo coropo sing klobahan kanggo kuwi nggawe kotak dhéwé (France et al, 2008), sampeyan bener model sing iso nggawe Perintah bener dumadhi sing bisa ngubah ujaran pangan anyari dadi sing perusahaan anyari dadi kapan banget nggawe', 'bo': 'We present a variation of the incremental and memory-limited algorithm in (Sadeghi et al., 2017) for Bayesian cross-situational word learning and evaluate the model in terms of its functional performance and its sensitivity to input order. ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་གྱི་རྣམ་པ་གྲངས་ལས་ཕན་ཆེར་བ་སྐྱེལ་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གནང་བ་དེ་མང་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Sentence Weighting for Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'ar': 'ترجيح الجملة لتكييف مجال ترجمة الآلة العصبية', 'pt': 'Ponderação de sentença para adaptação de domínio de tradução automática neural', 'es': 'Ponderación de oraciones para la adaptación del dominio de traducción automática neuronal', 'fr': "Pondération des phrases pour l'adaptation du domaine de traduction automatique neuronale", 'ru': 'Взвешивание предложения для адаптации домена нейронного машинного перевода', 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション・ドメイン・アダプテーションのための文章の重み付け', 'zh': '神经机器翻译域自应句加权', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए वाक्य भार', 'ga': 'Ualú Pianbhreithe le haghaidh Oiriúnú Fearainn um Aistriú Inneall Néarach', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ζυγισμός φράσεων για την προσαρμογή του τομέα της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης', 'hu': 'mondatsúlyozás a Neural Machine Translation Domain adaptációhoz', 'it': 'Ponderamento delle frasi per adattamento del dominio di traduzione automatica neurale', 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašinų vertimo domeno pritaikymo bausmės koeficientas', 'mk': 'Тежина на речениците за адаптација на доменот за превод на неврална машина', 'kk': 'Неврал машинаны аудару доменінің адаптациясы', 'ms': 'Pembilangan perkataan untuk Penyesuaian Domain Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള ശിക്ഷ വീതി', 'mt': 'Piż tas-Sentenza għall-Adattament tad-Domain tat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл мэдрэлийн машин орчуулах домагийн адаптацийн хэмжээг', 'ro': 'Ponderarea sentinței pentru adaptarea domeniului de traducere automată neurală', 'no': 'Comment', 'sr': 'Težina rečenica za adaptaciju domena za prevod neuroloških mašina', 'pl': 'Ważenie zdań dla adaptacji domeny neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'si': 'වාර්තාව භාවිත ක්\u200dරමය සඳහා වාර්තාව', 'so': 'Adaptation Domain', 'sv': 'Punktviktning för Neural Machine Translation Domain Anpassning', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு களம் மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான வாக்குறிப்பு', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Tarjima xonasini tahrirlash', 'vi': 'Công cụ dịch phiên bản thần kinh', 'da': 'Sætningsvægtning for Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaption', 'hr': 'Težina izraza za adaptaciju domena za prevod neuroloških strojeva', 'nl': 'Zinnweging voor Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation', 'de': 'Satz Gewichtung für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung Domänenanpassung', 'id': 'Pembilangan Sentence untuk Adaptasi Domain Translation Mesin Neural', 'bg': 'Претегляне на изреченията за адаптация на домейна за неврален машинен превод', 'ko': '신경기계 번역 영역 자체 적응 문장 가중권', 'sw': 'Hukumu kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural Adaptation Domain', 'af': 'Uitdrukking vir neurale masjien vertaling domein aanpassing', 'tr': 'Neural Makina Terjime Etmek üçin Säreler Mazmunlary', 'fa': 'وزن جمله برای تغییرات دامنۀ ترجمه ماشین عصبی', 'sq': 'Peshimi i dënimeve për adaptimin e domenit të përkthimit të makinës nervore', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման բնագավառի հարմարեցման արտահայտության կշիռը', 'az': 'Nöral Makina Çeviri Domain Adjustasyonu', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Težina kazna za adaptaciju domena neurološkog prevoda', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ ডোমেন অনুবাদের জন্য শাস্তি উইটটিং', 'ca': "Pes de frases per l'adaptació del domini de traducció de màquines neurones", 'cs': 'Vážení vět pro adaptaci domény neuronového strojového překladu', 'et': 'lausete kaalumine neuroaalse masintõlke domeeni kohandamise korral', 'fi': 'Lausekkeiden punnitus hermojen konekäännöksen verkkotunnuksen mukauttamiseen', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Ponderiranje stavkov za prilagajanje domene nevralnega strojnega prevajanja', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'he': 'משקל גזר עבור התאמה לתחום התרגום של מכונות נוירות', 'bo': 'Neural Machine Translation Domain Adaptation'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we propose a new sentence weighting method for the domain adaptation of neural machine translation. We introduce a domain similarity metric to evaluate the relevance between a sentence and an available entire domain dataset. The similarity of each sentence to the target domain is calculated with various methods. The computed similarity is then integrated into the training objective to weight sentences. The adaptation results on both IWSLT Chinese-English TED task and a task with only synthetic training parallel data show that our sentence weighting method is able to achieve an significant improvement over strong baselines.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقترح طريقة جديدة لترجيح الجملة لتكييف مجال الترجمة الآلية العصبية. نقدم مقياس تشابه المجال لتقييم الصلة بين الجملة ومجموعة بيانات المجال بالكامل المتاحة. يتم حساب تشابه كل جملة مع المجال الهدف بطرق مختلفة. ثم يتم دمج التشابه المحسوب في هدف التدريب لجمل الوزن. تظهر نتائج التكيف في كل من مهمة TED الصينية-الإنجليزية في IWSLT ومهمة مع بيانات موازية للتدريب الاصطناعي فقط أن طريقة ترجيح الجملة لدينا قادرة على تحقيق تحسن كبير على خطوط الأساس القوية.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode de pondération des phrases pour l'adaptation du domaine de la traduction automatique neuronale. Nous introduisons une métrique de similarité de domaine pour évaluer la pertinence entre une phrase et un ensemble de données de domaine complet disponible. La similitude de chaque phrase avec le domaine cible est calculée à l'aide de différentes méthodes. La similitude calculée est ensuite intégrée dans l'objectif d'entraînement pour pondérer les phrases. Les résultats de l'adaptation de la tâche TED chinois-anglais IWSLT et d'une tâche avec uniquement des données parallèles d'entraînement synthétiques montrent que notre méthode de pondération des phrases est capable d'obtenir une amélioration significative par rapport à des bases de référence solides.", 'es': 'En este artículo, proponemos un nuevo método de ponderación de oraciones para la adaptación de dominios de la traducción automática neuronal. Introducimos una métrica de similitud de dominio para evaluar la relevancia entre una oración y un conjunto de datos de dominio completo disponible. La similitud de cada oración con el dominio objetivo se calcula con varios métodos. La similitud calculada se integra luego en el objetivo de entrenamiento para ponderar las oraciones. Los resultados de adaptación tanto en la tarea TED chino-inglés de IWSLT como en una tarea con solo datos paralelos de entrenamiento sintéticos muestran que nuestro método de ponderación de oraciones es capaz de lograr una mejora significativa sobre líneas de base sólidas.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, propomos um novo método de ponderação de sentenças para a adaptação de domínio da tradução automática neural. Introduzimos uma métrica de similaridade de domínio para avaliar a relevância entre uma sentença e um conjunto de dados de domínio inteiro disponível. A similaridade de cada sentença com o domínio alvo é calculada com vários métodos. A similaridade calculada é então integrada ao objetivo de treinamento para ponderar sentenças. Os resultados da adaptação tanto na tarefa TED chinês-inglês do IWSLT quanto em uma tarefa com apenas dados paralelos de treinamento sintético mostram que nosso método de ponderação de sentenças é capaz de alcançar uma melhoria significativa em linhas de base fortes.', 'ja': '本稿では，ニューラル機械翻訳の領域適応のための新しい文章加重法を提案する．文章と利用可能なドメインデータセット全体との関連性を評価するために、ドメイン類似性メトリックを導入しています。各文のターゲットドメインとの類似性は、様々な方法で計算される。その後、計算された類似性がトレーニング目標に統合され、文章に重み付けされます。IWSLT中国語-英語TEDタスクと、合成トレーニング並列データのみを使用したタスクの両方の適応結果は、私たちの文章加重法が強力なベースラインよりも大幅な改善を達成することができることを示しています。', 'zh': '本文中,新句加权法,以应神经机器翻译域。 引入一域相似性指标以评句与全域数集之相关性。 句与域相似性,以数数也。 然后集其相似性于训练之中,以加权句句。 IWSLT中英文TED务与合练并行数事改编结果表明,比于强基线,吾句加权法得以显改。', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы предлагаем новый метод взвешивания предложений для адаптации домена нейронного машинного перевода. Мы вводим метрику подобия домена для оценки релевантности между предложением и доступным набором данных всего домена. Сходство каждого предложения с целевым доменом вычисляется различными методами. Рассчитанное сходство затем интегрируется в цель обучения к весовым предложениям. Результаты адаптации как по задаче IWSLT Chinese-English TED, так и по задаче только с параллельными данными синтетического обучения показывают, что наш метод взвешивания предложений способен достичь значительного улучшения по сравнению с сильными базовыми линиями.', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद के डोमेन अनुकूलन के लिए एक नई वाक्य भार विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम एक वाक्य और एक उपलब्ध पूरे डोमेन डेटासेट के बीच प्रासंगिकता का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए एक डोमेन समानता मीट्रिक पेश करते हैं। लक्ष्य डोमेन के लिए प्रत्येक वाक्य की समानता की गणना विभिन्न विधियों के साथ की जाती है। परिकलित समानता को तब वजन वाक्यों के लिए प्रशिक्षण उद्देश्य में एकीकृत किया जाता है। IWSLT चीनी-अंग्रेजी टेड कार्य और केवल सिंथेटिक प्रशिक्षण समानांतर डेटा के साथ एक कार्य दोनों पर अनुकूलन परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारी वाक्य भार विधि मजबूत बेसलाइन पर एक महत्वपूर्ण सुधार प्राप्त करने में सक्षम है।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh ualaithe abairtí nua chun aistriúchán meaisín néarach a oiriúnú don fhearann. Tugaimid isteach méadrach cosúlachta fearainn chun an ábharthacht idir abairt agus tacar sonraí fearainn iomláin atá ar fáil a mheas. Ríomhtar cosúlacht gach abairte leis an spriocfhearann le modhanna éagsúla. Comhtháthaítear an chosúlacht ríofa ansin isteach sa chuspóir oiliúna chun abairtí a mheá. Léiríonn na torthaí oiriúnaithe ar thasc TED Sínis-Béarla IWSLT agus tasc gan ach sonraí comhthreomhara oiliúna sintéiseacha go bhfuil ár modh ualaithe abairtí in ann feabhas suntasach a bhaint amach thar bhunlínte láidre.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο στάθμισης προτάσεων για την προσαρμογή του τομέα της νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Εισάγουμε μια μετρική ομοιότητα τομέα για να αξιολογήσουμε τη συνάφεια μεταξύ μιας πρότασης και ενός διαθέσιμου συνόλου δεδομένων τομέα. Η ομοιότητα κάθε πρότασης με τον τομέα προορισμού υπολογίζεται με διάφορες μεθόδους. Η υπολογιζόμενη ομοιότητα ενσωματώνεται στη συνέχεια στον προπονητικό στόχο για τη στάθμιση ποινών. Τα αποτελέσματα προσαρμογής τόσο στην κινεζική-αγγλική εργασία TED όσο και σε μια εργασία με μόνο συνθετικά δεδομένα παράλληλης εκπαίδευσης δείχνουν ότι η μέθοδος στάθμισης των προτάσεων μας είναι σε θέση να επιτύχει σημαντική βελτίωση σε σχέση με ισχυρές γραμμές βάσης.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban egy új mondatsúlyozási módszert javasolunk a neurális gépi fordítás domain adaptációjára. Bevezetünk egy domain hasonlósági mutatót a mondat és a rendelkezésre álló teljes domain adatkészlet relevanciájának értékelésére. Az egyes mondatok hasonlóságát a céltartományhoz különböző módszerekkel számítjuk ki. A számított hasonlóságot ezután integrálják az edzési célkitűzésbe a súlymondatokkal. Az IWSLT kínai-angol TED feladatának adaptációs eredményei és egy csak szintetikus képzési párhuzamos adatokat tartalmazó feladat adaptációjának eredményei azt mutatják, hogy mondatsúlyozási módszerünk képes jelentős javulást érni az erős alapvető értékekhez képest.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენში ჩვენ ახალი სიტყვების გარგება მინუს ნეიროლური მანქანის გარგება დიომინის აკაპეტიფიკაციისთვის. ჩვენ მოვიყენებთ დემომინის სინამდვილეობის მეტრიკი, რომელიც შესაძლებელია სინამდვილეობის შესახებ და სამყარო დემომინის მონაცემების შესახებ. ყველა წერტილის განსხვავება მისაღების დემომინის განსხვავებული მეტოვებით გამოყენება. შემდეგ კომპიუტერებული სხვადასხვა იქნება შემდეგ ინტერნექტირებულია საკუთარი საკუთარი სხვადასხვა სიტყვებში. შესაბამისი წარმოდგენები IWSLT კინელი-ანგლისური TED დავალების და მხოლოდ სინტეტიკური განაკლების პარალელი მონაცემების შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაბამისი შესაძლებლობა ძალიან უფრო მეტი გა', 'it': "In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo metodo di ponderazione delle frasi per l'adattamento del dominio della traduzione automatica neurale. Introducemo una metrica di somiglianza del dominio per valutare la rilevanza tra una frase e un intero set di dati di dominio disponibile. La somiglianza di ogni frase con il dominio di destinazione viene calcolata con vari metodi. La somiglianza calcolata viene poi integrata nell'obiettivo di allenamento alle frasi di peso. I risultati dell'adattamento sia sul compito TED cinese-inglese IWSLT che su un compito con solo dati sintetici paralleli di allenamento dimostrano che il nostro metodo di ponderazione delle frasi è in grado di ottenere un miglioramento significativo rispetto a linee di base forti.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, невралдық компьютердің аудармасының доменге адаптациялау үшін жаңа сөздерді өлшейту әдісін ұсынамыз. Біз домендің ұқсас метрикалығын келтіреміз, сөйлем мен барлық домендің деректер жиынының маңыздылығын бағалау үшін. Мақсатты доменге әрбір сөздің ұқсастығы түрлі әдістерімен есептеледі. Есептеулердің ұқсастығы содан кейін оқыту мақсатына көлемі сөздерге ендіріледі. IWSLT қытайлық-ағылшын TED тапсырмасының және тек синтетикалық оқыту параллелі деректері бар тапсырманың түзету нәтижесі, сөздердің маңызды тәсіліміздің күшті негізгі сызықтардан артық', 'mk': 'Во овој весник предлагаме нов метод за тежина на речениците за адаптација на доменот на преводот на невралните машини. Ние воведуваме метрика на сличност на домен за да ја процениме релевантноста помеѓу реченицата и достапната цела датотека на домен. Сличноста на секоја реченица со доменот на целта се пресметува со различни методи. Пресметачката сличност потоа е интегрирана во објектот за обука со речениците за тежина. The adaptation results on both IWSLT Chinese-English TED task and a task with only synthetic training parallel data show that our sentence weighting method is able to achieve an significant improvement over strong baselines.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d പുതിയ വാക്കുകള്\u200d തൂക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d മാറ്റുന്നതിനുള്ള പുതിയ മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ ഒരു വാക്കിനും ലഭ്യമായ ഒരു ഡൊമെന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റും തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനും ഒരു ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d ഒരു തുല്യമായ മെറ് ലക്ഷ്യം ഡൊമെയിനിലേക്കുള്ള ഓരോ വാക്കിന്റെയും സമമാണു് വ്യത്യസ്ത രീതികളാല്\u200d കണക്കാക്കുന്നതു്. The computed similarity is then integrated into the training objective to weight sentences.  IWSLT ചൈനീസ്-ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ടെഡിയുടെ ജോലിയിലും ഒരു ജോലിയിലും നമ്മുടെ വാക്ക് തൂക്കുന്ന രീതിയില്\u200d ശക്തിയുള്ള അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്ത', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid ta’ ponderazzjoni tas-sentenzi għall-adattament tad-dominju tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali. Aħna nintroduċu metrika ta’ similarità tad-dominju biex tevalwa r-rilevanza bejn sentenza u sett ta’ dejta tad-dominju sħiħ disponibbli. Is-similarità ta’ kull sentenza għad-dominju fil-mira hija kkalkulata b’diversi metodi. Imbagħad, is-similarità kkalkulata tiġi integrata fl-għan tat-taħriġ għas-sentenzi tal-piż. Ir-riżultati tal-adattament kemm fuq il-kompitu tat-TED IWSLT Ċiniż-Ingliż kif ukoll kompitu b’dejta parallel a ta’ taħriġ sintetiku biss juru li l-metodu tagħna tal-ippeżar tas-sentenzi huwa kapaċi jikseb titjib sinifikanti fuq linji bażi b’saħħithom.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулах зорилготой шинэ өгүүлбэрийг хүчирхэг арга зааж байна. Бид холбоотой адилхан метрийг өгүүлбэр болон бүх холбоотой өгөгдлийн сангийн хоорондоо хамааралтай байдлыг үнэлгээд үзүүлнэ. Цагийн зорилготой холбооны өгүүлбэр бүр төстэй төстэй нь олон аргаар тооцож байна. Хэрэв тооцоолж байгаа төстэй тэнцүү байдал нь жингийн өгүүлбэрт суралцах зорилго руу нэгтгэгддэг. IWSLT Хятад-Англи TED даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын үр дүнд, зөвхөн синтетик даалгаврын параллел өгөгдлийн даалгаврын даалгаврын даалгаврын үр дүнд бидний өгүүлбэр жингийн арга нь хүчтэй суурь шугам дээр маш', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nową metodę ważenia zdań dla adaptacji domeny neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego. Wprowadzamy wskaźnik podobieństwa domeny, aby ocenić znaczenie między zdaniem a dostępnym całym zbiorem danych domeny. Podobieństwo każdego zdania do domeny docelowej obliczane jest różnymi metodami. Obliczone podobieństwo jest następnie zintegrowane z celem treningowym do ważenia zdań. Wyniki adaptacji zarówno zadania TED IWSLT chińsko-angielskiego, jak i zadania zawierającego jedynie syntetyczne dane równoległe treningowe pokazują, że nasza metoda ważenia zdań jest w stanie osiągnąć znaczącą poprawę nad silnymi liniami bazowymi.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente siūlome naują sakinių svertinimo metodą, skirtą prisitaikyti prie nervinių mašinų vertimo srities. Įdiegiame domeno panašumo metriją, kad įvertintume sakinio ir turimo viso domeno duomenų rinkinio svarbą. The similarity of each sentence to the target domain is calculated with various methods.  Tada apskaičiuotas panašumas įtraukiamas į mokymo tikslą kaip ir svorio sakiniai. Prisitaikymo rezultatai, susiję su IWSLT Kinijos ir anglų kalbų TED užduotimi, ir užduotis, susijusi tik su sintetiniais mokymo lygiagrečiais duomenimis, rodo, kad mūsų sakinių svertinimo metodas gali gerokai pagerinti, palyginti su tvirtais baziniais duomenimis.', 'ms': 'In this paper, we propose a new sentence weighting method for the domain adaptation of neural machine translation.  We introduce a domain similarity metric to evaluate the relevance between a sentence and an available entire domain dataset.  Kesempatan setiap kalimat kepada domain sasaran dihitung dengan berbeza kaedah. Kesamaan yang dikira kemudian disertai dalam objektif latihan untuk kalimat berat. Hasil penyesuaian pada kedua-dua tugas TED Cina-Inggeris IWSLT dan tugas dengan hanya data selari latihan sintetik menunjukkan bahawa kaedah beratan kalimat kita mampu mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas garis dasar yang kuat.', 'no': 'I denne papiret foreslår vi ein ny setningsverkingsmetode for domenetilpassing av neuralmaskineomsetjinga. Vi introduserer ein domenetilsvarende metrisk for å evaluera tilsvarende mellom eit setning og ei tilgjengeleg heile domenedataset. Kvar setning med måldområdet er rekna ut med ulike metodar. Den rekna ut likheten er så integrert i opplæringsmålet til vektssetningar. Tilpassingsresultatet på både kinesisk-engelsk TED-oppgåva og ei oppgåve med berre syntetiske trening parallelle data viser at setningsveiksmetoden vårt kan oppnå ein betydelig forbedring over sterke baselinjer.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, propunem o nouă metodă de ponderare a frazelor pentru adaptarea domeniului traducerii automate neurale. Introducem o metrică de similitudine a domeniului pentru a evalua relevanța dintre o propoziție și un set de date întreg de domenii disponibil. Similaritatea fiecărei propoziții cu domeniul țintă este calculată cu diferite metode. Similaritatea calculată este apoi integrată în obiectivul antrenamentului cu propozițiile de greutate. Rezultatele adaptării atât la sarcina TED chinezească-engleză IWSLT, cât și la o sarcină cu doar date sintetice de formare paralelă arată că metoda noastră de ponderare a frazelor este capabilă să obțină o îmbunătățire semnificativă față de liniile de bază puternice.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa qoraal cusub oo miisaamayn qaab cusub oo lagu beddelo tarjumaadka maskinada ah. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa metric siman oo domain ah si a an u qiimeyno xiriirka u dhexeeya xarunta iyo sawirka macluumaadka ee domain oo dhan. Halkaas oo isku mid ah hal eray kasta oo ku qoran guriga goalka waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa qaabab kala duduwan. Sinnaanta la xisaabiyay waxaa lagu qabsadaa goal waxbarashada si uu u miisaamo. Heshiiska bedelka ee IWSLT iyo shaqada la qabanayo waxbarashada lambarka ah oo kaliya waxay muuqataa in qaababka miisaanka ee ereygayada lagu qiyaaso uu gaadhi karo horumar aad u weyn oo ka sareeya saldhigyada xoogga badan.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu težine rečenice za adaptaciju domena neuralnog prevoda mašine. Predstavljamo metričku sličnost domena kako bi procenili relevantnost između rečenice i dostupnog kompleta podataka domena. Sličnost svake rečenice sa ciljnim domenom se računa različitim metodama. Izračunalna sličnost je onda integrisana u cilj obuke do težine kazne. Rezultati adaptacije na obje zadatke IWSLT kineskog-engleskog TED a i zadatku sa samo sintetičkim paralelnim podacima pokazuju da naša metoda težine rečenice može postići značajno poboljšanje nad jakim osnovnim linijama.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny meningsvägtningsmetod för domänanpassning av neural maskinöversättning. Vi introducerar ett domänlikhetsmått för att utvärdera relevansen mellan en mening och en tillgänglig hel domändataset. Likheten mellan varje mening och måldomänen beräknas med olika metoder. Den beräknade likheten integreras sedan i träningsmålet med viktmeningar. Anpassningsresultaten på både IWSLT kinesisk-engelsk TED-uppgift och en uppgift med endast syntetiska träningsparallella data visar att vår meningsvägtningsmetod kan uppnå en betydande förbättring jämfört med starka baslinjer.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் புதிய வாக்கியத்தை எடுத்துக் கொள்ள முறைமையை தொடர்ந்து கொள்கிறோம் புதிய இயந்திரத்  ஒரு வாக்கியத்திற்கும் ஒரு முழு களம் தரவுத்தளத்திற்கும் இடையே தொடர்பை மதிப்பிடுவதற்கும் ஒரு டோமைன் ஒத்த மெட்ரிக் இலக்கு களத்திற்கு ஒவ்வொரு வாக்கின் ஒத்திசையும் பல முறைகளால் கணக்கிடப்படும். கணக்கிடப்பட்ட ஒற்றைப் பின்னர் ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது எடை வாக்கியங்களுக்கு பயிற்சியின் தலைப்பி IWSLT சீனம்- ஆங்கிலம் TED பணியின் மேலும் ஒரு சேவையில் மட்டும் ஒரே கூட்டிணைப்பு பயிற்சி இணைப்பு தகவல் காண்பிக்கும் என்று எங்கள் வாக்கு எடை முறையில', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے نئورل ماشین ترجمہ کے دامین کے لئے ایک نوی جماعت کا وزن طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے. ہم ایک ڈومین برابری متریک کو معلوم کرتے ہیں کہ ایک جماعت اور ایک پورا ڈومین ڈاٹ سٹ کے درمیان موافقت کا ارزش کریں. ہدایت ڈومین کے ہر جماعت کی برابری مختلف طریقوں سے شمار کی جاتی ہے. کمپیوٹر کی برابری اس کے بعد ٹرینگ کا موضوع وزن کے لئے تدریس کیا جاتا ہے. IWSLT چینی-انگلیسی TED تابع کے اور ایک تابع جو صرف سینٹیسی تطارین پارالٹ ڈیٹے کے ساتھ ہے دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری جماعت وزن کی روش مضبوط بنسٹلین پر ایک بڑی اضافہ پہنچا سکتی ہے۔', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි අළුත් වාක්ය බලන්න ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරනවා න්\u200dයූරාල් මැෂින් අවවාදයේ ප්\u200dරවේශයේ  අපි වාක්ෂාවක් සහ සම්පූර්ණ ඩෝමේන් දත්ත සැට් අතර සම්පූර්ණ විශ්වාස කරන්න ඩෝමේන් එක් සම්පූර් හැම වාක්යෙක්ම ඉලක්ෂිත ඩොමේන් එක්ක සම්බන්ධතාවය විවිධ විදියට ගණන් කරනවා. පරිගණනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ සම්බන්ධතාවයක් පස්සේ ප්\u200dරියාසනය අරමුණ විදිහට බලන්න. IWSLT චීනි-ඉංග්\u200dරීසි TED වැඩේ දෙන්නම ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් සමහර සංවිධාන දත්ත පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විතරයි අප', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz neyrolik mashinaning tarjima tarjimalarining domen tahrirlash uchun yangi so'zni o'zgartirish usulini talab qilamiz. Biz bir so'z va butun domen maʼlumotlar tarkibini qiymatish uchun domen huddi metrikni koʻrsatimiz. Koʻrsatilgan domen har bir maxfiy soʻz turli usulda hisoblanadi. Bu hisoblanadigan huddi, keyin o'qish soʻzlariga o'rganish tizimga birlashtiriladi. IWSLT xitoycha- ingliz tili TED vazifasi va faqat bir tizim parametrlari bilan ishlaydigan vazifani ko'rsatish mumkin, bizning soʻzning uzilish usuli eng katta asboblar bilan yaxshi yaxshi ko'ra oladi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp cân nhắc bản án mới cho việc thích nghi miền của dịch dịch cỗ máy thần kinh. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một thước đo tương tự để đánh giá sự liên quan giữa một câu và một bộ dữ liệu miền sẵn sàng. Sự giống nhau của mỗi câu với miền đích được tính to án với các phương pháp khác nhau. Tính tương đồng được tính to án được hợp nhất trong mục tiêu huấn luyện với các trường kỷ trọng lượng. Kết quả thích ứng cho cả công việc về I.WSLT tiếng Trung và một nhiệm vụ chỉ có dữ liệu song huấn luyện tổng hợp cho thấy phương pháp cân bằng phần tử của chúng ta có thể đạt được một tiến bộ đáng kể hơn những đường cơ bản vững chắc.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия предлагаме нов метод за претегляне на изречения за домейнната адаптация на невронния машинен превод. Въвеждаме метричен показател за сходство на домейна, за да оценим релевантността между изречение и наличния цял набор от данни на домейна. Приликата на всяко изречение с целевия домейн се изчислява с различни методи. Изчисленото сходство след това се интегрира в целта на тренировката за тежест на изреченията. Резултатите от адаптацията както по китайско-английската TED задача, така и задача със синтетични паралелни данни за обучение показват, че методът ни за претегляне на изреченията е в състояние да постигне значително подобрение спрямо силните базови линии.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe zinswegingsmethode voor voor de domeinaanpassing van neurale machinevertaling. We introduceren een domain similarity metric om de relevantie tussen een zin en een beschikbare hele domein dataset te evalueren. De gelijkenis van elke zin met het doeldomein wordt met verschillende methoden berekend. De berekende gelijkenis wordt dan geïntegreerd in de trainingsdoelstelling om zinnen te wegen. De aanpassingsresultaten van zowel IWSLT Chinees-Engels TED-taak als een taak met alleen synthetische trainingsparallelle gegevens tonen aan dat onze zinswegingsmethode een significante verbetering ten opzichte van sterke baselines kan bereiken.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neue Satzgewichtungsmethode für die Domänenanpassung neuronaler maschineller Übersetzung vor. Wir führen eine Domain Ähnlichkeitsmetrik ein, um die Relevanz zwischen einem Satz und einem verfügbaren gesamten Domain Dataset zu bewerten. Die Ähnlichkeit jedes Satzes zur Zieldomäne wird mit verschiedenen Methoden berechnet. Die berechnete Ähnlichkeit wird dann in das Trainingsziel zur Gewichtung von Sätzen integriert. Die Anpassungsergebnisse sowohl an IWSLT chinesisch-englischer TED-Aufgabe als auch an einer Aufgabe mit nur synthetischen Trainingsparallelen Daten zeigen, dass unsere Satzgewichtung eine signifikante Verbesserung gegenüber starken Baselines erzielen kann.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu težine rečenice za adaptaciju domena neuralnog prevoda stroja. Predstavljamo metričku sličnost domena kako bi procijenili važnost između rečenice i dostupnu cijelu domenu podataka. Sličnost svake rečenice ciljnoj domenu se izračuna različitim metodama. Izračunala sličnost je onda integrirana u cilj obuke do težine kazne. Rezultati prilagodbe na zadatku IWSLT kineskog-engleskog TED-a i zadatku s samo sintetičkim paralelnim podacima pokazuju da je metod težine kazne u mogućnosti ostvariti značajno poboljšanje nad jakim osnovnim linijama.', 'da': 'I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny sætningsvægtningsmetode til domænetilpasning af neural maskinoversættelse. Vi indfører en domænelighedsmetric for at vurdere relevansen mellem en sætning og et tilgængeligt hele domænedatasæt. Ligheden mellem hver sætning og måldomænet beregnes med forskellige metoder. Den beregnede lighed integreres derefter i træningsmålet med vægtsætninger. Tilpasningsresultaterne på både IWSLT kinesisk-engelsk TED opgave og en opgave med kun syntetiske træningsparallelle data viser, at vores sætningsvægtningsmetode er i stand til at opnå en betydelig forbedring i forhold til stærke basislinjer.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode berat kalimat baru untuk adaptasi domain dari terjemahan mesin saraf. Kami memperkenalkan metrik kejadian domain untuk mengevaluasi relevansi antara kalimat dan set data domain yang tersedia. Kesempatan setiap kalimat dengan domain target dihitung dengan berbagai metode. Persamaan komputer kemudian terintegrasi ke tujuan latihan untuk kalimat berat. Hasil adaptasi pada kedua tugas TED Cina-Inggris IWSLT dan tugas dengan data paralel pelatihan sintetis menunjukkan bahwa metode berat kalimat kita mampu mencapai peningkatan yang signifikan atas garis dasar yang kuat.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش سنگین جمله جدید برای تغییر دومین ترجمه ماشین عصبی. ما متریک شبیه\u200cی دامنی را معرفی می\u200cکنیم تا ارزیابی ارزیابی بین یک جمله و یک مجموعه اطلاعات دامنی کامل موجود باشد. شبیه هر جمله به دامین هدف با روش\u200cهای مختلف محاسبه می\u200cشود. شباهت محاسبات بعدش به هدف آموزش به جمله\u200cهای وزن متصل می\u200cشود. نتیجه تغییر دادن روی کار TED چینی و انگلیسی IWSLT و یک کار با فقط داده های متناسب آموزش متناسب تغییر تغییر تغییر نشان می دهد که روش وزن کردن جمله ما قادر است به رسیدن بهترین بزرگی در خطوط پایین قوی باشد.', 'sw': 'Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza namna mpya ya hukumu yenye uzito wa namna ya kubadilishwa kwa mashine ya kijamii. Tunaonyesha mbinu inayofanana na ndani ya kutathmini umuhimu kati ya hukumu na seti nzima ya taarifa za ndani. Sambamba na kila hukumu kwa eneo la lengo linahesabiwa kwa njia mbalimbali. Ufananishaji wa idadi hiyo unaunganishwa na lengo la mafunzo ili kuongeza sentensi za uzito. Matokeo hayo yanatokana na kazi ya TED ya Kichina na Kiingereza na kazi yenye mafunzo ya pamoja tu yanaonyesha kuwa njia ya uzito wa hukumu inaweza kupata maboresho makubwa zaidi ya misingi yenye nguvu.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz näyral maşynyň terjime edilmesi üçin täze bir sözleşme a ğırlygy yöntemi teklip edýäris. Biz bir sözlem ve mümkün bir domun veri seti arasında önemliliğini değerlendirmek için bir domun benzeri metrik olarak tanıştırıyoruz. Maksad domaýynyň her sözlerin meňzeşliki görnüş yönlerle hasaplanýar. Soňra hasaplanýan meňzeşlikler, sözleri goýmak üçin bilim maksadyna üýtgedildi. IWSLT Çinçe-Iňlisçe TED zadynyň we diňe syntetik eğitim parallel maglumatlarynyň netijesi şol sözlerimiziň a ğırlyk yöntemimiziň güýçli baseliniň üstünde möhüm gelişmegi başaryp biljekdigini görkez.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodë të re peshimi të fjalëve për përshtatjen në domeni të përkthimit të makinës nervore. Ne prezantojmë një metrik të ngjashmërisë së domenit për të vlerësuar rëndësinë midis një fjalimi dhe një grupi të dhënash në dispozicion të gjithë domenit. Ngjashmëria e çdo fjalie me domenin e objektivit llogaritet me metoda të ndryshme. Shikimi i llogaritur është më pas i integruar në objektivin e trajnimit me fjalët e peshës. Rezultatet e përshtatjes në detyrën e IWSLT Kino-Anglisht TED dhe një detyrë me vetëm të dhëna paralele të trainimit sintetik tregojnë se metoda jonë e peshimit të fjalëve është në gjendje të arrijë një përmirësim të rëndësishëm mbi linjat bazë të forta.', 'af': "In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n nuwe setgewig metode vir die domein aanpassing van neurale masjien vertaling. Ons introduseer 'n domein gelykenis metriek om die relevansie tussen 'n seting en 'n beskikbaar hele domein datastel te evalueer. Die gelykheid van elke seting na die doel domein is bereken met verskillende metodes. Die berekende gelykenis is dan integreer in die onderwerp-doel tot gewig-teikens. Die aanpassingsresultate van beide IWSLT Sjinese-Engels TED taak en 'n taak met slegs sintetiese onderring parallele data wys dat ons setgewig metode kan 'n betekende verbetering oor sterke basisline bereik.", 'am': 'በዚህ ካላት አዲስ የደብዳቤ መሣሪያዎች ማተርጓሜን ለማቀናቀል አዲስ የፍርድ መክፈት እናሳስባለን፡፡ የዶሜን ብጤት ሜትሪን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የአካላቢው ዶሜን እንደገና ይቆጠራል፡፡ የተቆጠሩ ብጤት በኋላም ወደ ትምህርት አካባቢ ወደ ሚዛን ቃላት ይታሰራል፡፡ በቻይና-እንግሊዘኛ ቴድ ስራ እና ማሰናከያ ማህበረሰብ ብቻ የሚያስፈልገውን ስራ የቃላችን ሚዛን ሥርዓት በብርቱ መሠረት ላይ ትልቅ ማድረግ እንዲችል ይችላል፡፡', 'hy': 'In this paper, we propose a new sentence weighting method for the domain adaptation of neural machine translation.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք տիեզերքի նմանության մետրիկ, որպեսզի գնահատենք նախադասության և տիեզերքի ամբողջ տվյալների համակարգը: The similarity of each sentence to the target domain is calculated with various methods.  Համակարգված նմանությունը հետո ինտեգրված է քաշի նախադասությունների ուսուցման նպատակի մեջ: Ադապտացիայի արդյունքները երկուսի IW-Անգլերենի-Չինաստանի TED խնդրի և միայն սինթետիկ վարժեցման զուգահեռ տվյալների վրա ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր նախադասությունների կշիռման մեթոդը կարող է նշանակալի բարելավում հասնել ուժեղ հի', 'ko': '본고는 신경기계 번역의 영역에 적응하는 새로운 문장 가중 방법을 제시했다.우리는 문장과 사용할 수 있는 전체 분야의 데이터 집합 간의 상관성을 평가하기 위해 분야의 유사성 도량을 도입했다.모든 문장과 목표역의 유사성은 각종 방법을 통해 계산된다.그리고 계산된 싱크로율을 훈련 목표에 집적하여 문장에 가중시킨다.IWSLT 한영TED 임무와 평행 데이터를 종합적으로 훈련하는 임무에 대한 적응 결과에 따르면 우리의 문장 가중 방법은 강기선에서 현저한 개선을 실현할 수 있다.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu težine rečenice za adaptaciju domena neuralnog prevoda stroja. Predstavljamo metričku sličnost domena za procjenu relevantnosti između rečenice i dostupne cijele domena podataka. Sličnost svake rečenice sa ciljnim domenom se računa različitim metodama. Izračunalna sličnost je onda integrisana u cilj obuke do težine kazne. Rezultati adaptacije na zadatku IWSLT kineskog-engleskog TED-a i zadatku sa samo sintetičkim paralelnim podacima pokazuju da je metod težine kazne u mogućnosti ostvariti značajno poboljšanje nad jakim osnovnim linijama.', 'ca': "En aquest article proposem un nou mètode de ponderació de frases per l'adaptació de domini de la traducció neuromàtica. Introduïm una mètrica de similitud de domini per avaluar la pertinencia entre una frase i un conjunt de dades de domini sencer disponible. La similitud de cada frase al domini d'objectiu es calcula amb diversos mètodes. La similitud computada s'integra en l'objectiu d'entrenament a les frases de pes. Els resultats d'adaptació en la tasca TED xinès-anglès IWSLT i una tasca amb només dades paralleles de formació sintètica mostran que el nostre mètode de ponderació de frases pot aconseguir una millora significativa sobre línies de base fortes.", 'az': 'Bu kağızda, nöral maşın çevirisinin domain adaptasiyonu üçün yeni cümlələr a ğırlığı yolunu təklif edirik. Biz bir cümlənin və bütün domena verilənlərin arasındakı bağlılığı değerləşdirmək üçün bir domena bənzərini metrik təşkil edirik. Hər cümlənin məqsəd domeinə bənzəri müxtəlif metodlar ilə hesablanır. Hesaplanmış bənzəri sonra təhsil məqsədilə ağırlıq cümlələrinə qatılır. İki IWSLT Çin-İngilizce TED işinin və yalnız sintetik təhsil paralel verilər olan bir iş, cümlələrimizin a ğırlığı metodumuzun güclü sətirlərdən çox yaxşılıq edə biləcəyini göstərir.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকায় আমরা নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য একটি নতুন বাক্য প্রস্তাব করি। আমরা একটি ডোমেইনের সমতুল্য মেট্রিক চিহ্নিত করি যাতে একটি বাক্য এবং পুরো ডোমেইন ডাটাসেটের মধ্যে প্রাসঙ্গিক মূল্যায়ন করা য টার্গেট ডোমেইনের প্রত্যেক বাক্যের সমতুল্য বিভিন্ন পদ্ধতিতে গণনা করা হয়। হিসেবে গণনা করা হয়েছে একই ধরনের প্রশিক্ষণের উদ্দেশ্যে একত্রিত হয়েছে ওজনের বাক্যের জন্য। আইউএসএলটি চীন-ইংরেজী টেডি কাজ এবং একটি কাজ যার কারণে শুধুমাত্র সিন্টেটিক প্রশিক্ষণ প্যারালেল ডাটা দেখা যায় যে আমাদের বাক্য ওজনের মাধ্যমে শক্তিশা', 'cs': 'V tomto článku navrhujeme novou metodu vážení vět pro doménovou adaptaci neuronového strojového překladu. Představujeme metriku podobnosti domény k vyhodnocení relevance mezi větou a dostupnou celou datovou sadou domény. Podobnost každé věty s cílovou doménou je vypočítána různými metodami. Vypočtená podobnost je pak integrována do cíle tréninku na vážení vět. Výsledky adaptace jak na čínsko-anglickém TED úkolu IWSLT, tak na úkolu s pouze syntetickými paralelními údaji výcviku ukazují, že naše metoda vážení vět je schopna dosáhnout výrazného zlepšení oproti silným základním liniím.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta lauseiden painotusmenetelmää neurokonekäännöksen domeenisopeuttamiseen. Otamme käyttöön toimialueen samankaltaisuusmittarin, jolla arvioidaan lauseen ja käytettävissä olevan koko toimialueen datajoukon merkitystä. Kunkin lauseen samankaltaisuus kohdealueeseen lasketaan eri menetelmillä. Laskettu samankaltaisuus integroidaan sitten harjoitustavoitteeseen painaa lauseita. Sopeutumistulokset sekä IWSLT kiina-englanti TED-tehtävässä että tehtävässä, jossa on vain synteettistä harjoittelua rinnakkaisaineistoa, osoittavat, että lausepainotusmenetelmämme pystyy saavuttamaan merkittävän parannuksen vahvoihin lähtökohtiin verrattuna.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue lausete kaalumise meetodi neuraalse masintõlke kohandamiseks. Tutvustame domeeni sarnasuse mõõdikut, et hinnata lause ja kogu olemasoleva domeeni andmekogumi asjakohasust. Iga lause sarnasus sihtdomeeniga arvutatakse erinevate meetoditega. Arvutatud sarnasus integreeritakse seejärel treeningu eesmärki lausete kaalumiseks. Kohanemise tulemused nii IWSLT hiina-inglise TED ülesandel kui ka ainult sünteetiliste treeningute paralleelsete andmetega ülesandel näitavad, et meie lausete kaalumise meetod suudab saavutada olulise paranemise tugevatest lähtejoontest.', 'jv': 'In this paper, we proposal a new word jefting method for the domain modification of Neral device translation. We Intruse a domain Simlarty Metric to assess the REPLANS amongst a word and an available whole domain dataset. The Simlarity of every word to the goal domain is kalkulated with Variable Methods. Subtitles Awakdhéwé éntuk akéwé ning cara IWSLT Cena-Inggris lan akéwé menyang kita alam sistem sing dadi nyong pada seneng nggawe barang seneng pisan kang dipunangé nggawe aturan sing bisa nggawe ngubah bantuan sing apik dhéwé.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים שיטת משקל משפטים חדשה עבור ההתאמה לתחום של התרגום של מכונות עצביות. אנחנו מציגים מטריקה של דומינציה לתחום כדי להעריך את הרלוונציה בין משפט לבין קבוצת נתונים של דומינציה שלמה זמינה. הדמיון של כל משפט לתחום המטרה נחשב בשיטות שונות. ההדמיון המחשובה הושלם לאחר מכן למטרה האימונית למשפטי משקל. תוצאות ההתאמה על משימה TED סיני-אנגלית IWSLT ומשימה עם מידע מקביל סינטטי בלבד מראות ששיטת משקל המשפטים שלנו מסוגלת להשיג שיפור משמעותי מעל קווי בסיס חזקים.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata kalma mai nauyi wa shirin adadin ayuka na fassarar mashine na neural. Tuna ƙuyya da wani metric wanda ke daidai a Domen dõmin ka ƙayyade muhimmada a tsakanin wata cewa da tsarin da ke iya samu. Kila irin duk hukuma zuwa Domen da aka aimar da aka ƙaddara shi da wasu hanyõyi. Ana lissafa da aka lissafa shi, sa'an nan kuma aka haɗa shi cikin muhallin na ƙidãya zuwa matsayin nau'i. Salon adaptarin na biyu na IWSLT na aikin TeD na China-Ingiriya da wani aikin wanda yana da shirin da tsari kawai da data masu daidaita kawai, yana nũna cewa metoden nauyi da kalmõminmu na iya kai wani mai girma a kanan fassaran ƙarfi.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predlagamo novo metodo tehtanja stavkov za domensko prilagoditev nevronskega strojnega prevajanja. Uvedli smo merilo podobnosti domene za oceno relevantnosti med stavkom in razpoložljivim celotnim naborom podatkov domene. Podobnost vsakega stavka s ciljno domeno se izračuna z različnimi metodami. Izračunana podobnost se nato vključi v cilj vadbe za tehtanje stavkov. Rezultati prilagajanja pri IWSLT kitajsko-angleški TED nalogi in nalogi s samo sintetičnimi vzporednimi podatki o treningu kažejo, da lahko naša metoda tehtanja stavkov doseže znatno izboljšanje v primerjavi z močnimi osnovnimi vrsticami.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚིག་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་པ་ཞིག་གི་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་འཇུག We introduce a domain similarity metric to evaluate the relevance between a sentence and an available entire domain dataset. དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་domain་ལ་ཚིག་ཚང་མ་མཚུངས་ནི་ཐབས་ལམ་འདྲ་བ་རྩིས་བྱས་ཡོད། རྩིས་གཞི་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོར་བ་སྒྲིག་གི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནང་དུ་བགོ་སྒྲིག་ཡོད། IWSLT རྒྱ་ནག་གི་TED ལས་འགན་གཉིས་ཀྱི་གྲོས་སྒྲིག'}
{'en': 'Seq2seq Dependency Parsing', 'ar': 'تحليل تبعية Seq2seq', 'pt': 'Análise de dependência Seq2seq', 'es': 'Análisis de dependencias Seq2seq', 'fr': 'Analyse des dépendances Seq2Seq', 'ja': 'Seq 2 seqдҫқеӯҳй–ўдҝӮи§Јжһҗ', 'zh': 'Seq2seq 赖解析', 'ru': 'Синтаксический анализ зависимостей Seq2seq', 'hi': 'Seq2seq निर्भरता पार्सिंग', 'ga': 'Parsáil Spleáchais Seq2seq', 'hu': 'Következő függőségi feldolgozás', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ανάλυση εξάρτησης του Seq2seq', 'it': 'Seq2seq Analisi delle dipendenze', 'kk': 'Seq2seq тәуелдік талдау', 'lt': 'Sekq2seq priklausomybės analizavimas', 'mk': 'Проверка на зависноста Seq2seq', 'ml': 'സെക്ക്2seq ആശ്രയിക്കുന്ന പാര്\u200dസിങ്', 'ms': 'Penghuraian Dependensi Seq2seq', 'mn': 'Seq2seq хамаарлын талдаа', 'mt': 'Analiżi tad-Dipendenza Seq2seq', 'no': 'Seq2seq avhengighetstolking', 'pl': 'Parsowanie zależności od Seq2seq', 'ro': 'Seq2seq Interpretarea dependenței', 'sr': 'Seq2seq zavisnost analize', 'ta': 'Seq2seq சார்ந்த பாசிங்க்', 'sv': 'Seq2seq Beroendetolkning', 'si': 'Seq2seq විශේෂතාව විශ්ලේෂණය', 'so': 'Heshiiska lacagta ku filan ee Seq2seq', 'ur': 'Seq2seq Dependency Parsing', 'uz': 'Seq2seq qoĘ»shish', 'vi': 'Phân tích mã số Seq2seq', 'bg': 'Сеq2seq анализ на зависимостта', 'da': 'Efterfølgende afhængighedsfortolkning', 'hr': 'Očitanje zavisnosti Seq2seq', 'nl': 'Seq2seq afhankelijkheidsparsing', 'de': 'Seq2seq Abhängigkeitsparsing', 'ko': 'Seq2seq 종속성 분석', 'id': 'Analisasi Dependensi Seq2seq', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Seq2seq baglançylyk Taýýarlamasy', 'sq': 'Analizimi i Varësisë Seq2seq', 'sw': 'paper size', 'af': 'Seq2seq afhanklikheid verwerking', 'am': 'seconds', 'bn': 'Seq2seq নির্ভর পার্সিং', 'hy': 'Seq2seq Dependency Parsing', 'az': 'Seq2seq bağlılıq analizi', 'bs': 'Očitanje zavisnosti Seq2seq', 'cs': 'Parsování závislosti na Seq2seq', 'ca': 'Analització de dependencies Seq2seq', 'et': 'Seq2seq sõltuvuse parsimine', 'fi': 'Seq2seq Riippuvuuden jäsentäminen', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Seq2seq Razčlenitev odvisnosti', 'he': 'מחקר תלויות Seq2seq', 'bo': 'Seq2seq རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ལ་བསམ་བཤེར', 'jv': 'Seq2seq Didipendènsi Parasing'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a sequence to sequence (seq2seq) dependency parser by directly predicting the relative position of head for each given word, which therefore results in a truly end-to-end seq2seq dependency parser for the first time. Enjoying the advantage of seq2seq modeling, we enrich a series of embedding enhancement, including firstly introduced subword and node2vec augmentation. Meanwhile, we propose a beam search decoder with tree constraint and subroot decomposition over the sequence to furthermore enhance our seq2seq parser. Our parser is evaluated on benchmark treebanks, being on par with the state-of-the-art parsers by achieving 94.11 % UAS on PTB and 88.78 % UAS on CTB, respectively.', 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة تسلسلًا لمحلل تبعية التسلسل (seq2seq) من خلال التنبؤ المباشر بالموضع النسبي للرأس لكل كلمة معينة ، مما ينتج عنه محلل تبعية حقيقي من طرف إلى طرف seq2seq لأول مرة. بالاستمتاع بمزايا نمذجة seq2seq ، فإننا نثري سلسلة من تحسينات التضمين ، بما في ذلك الكلمات الفرعية المقدمة أولاً وزيادة node2vec. وفي الوقت نفسه ، نقترح وحدة فك ترميز بحث شعاعية مع قيود الشجرة وتحلل الجذور الجزئية على التسلسل لتعزيز محلل seq2seq الخاص بنا علاوة على ذلك. يتم تقييم المحلل اللغوي الخاص بنا على البنوك الشجرية المعيارية ، بحيث يكون على قدم المساواة مع أجهزة التحليل اللغوي الحديثة من خلال تحقيق 94.11٪ UAS على PTB و 88.78٪ UAS على CTB ، على التوالي.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un analyseur de dépendance séquence à séquence (seq2seq) en prédisant directement la position relative de la tête pour chaque mot donné, ce qui aboutit donc à un véritable analyseur de dépendance seq2seq de bout en bout pour la première fois. Profitant de l'avantage de la modélisation seq2seq, nous enrichissons une série d'améliorations d'intégration, y compris l'introduction d'un sous-mot et d'une augmentation node2vec. Pendant ce temps, nous proposons un décodeur de recherche de faisceau avec contrainte d'arbre et décomposition de sous-racine sur la séquence pour améliorer encore notre analyseur seq2seq. Notre analyseur est évalué sur des banques d'arbres de référence, étant au même niveau que les analyseurs de pointe en atteignant 94,11\xa0% UAS sur PTB et 88,78\xa0% UAS sur CTB, respectivement.", 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un analizador de dependencias de secuencia a secuencia (seq2seq) mediante la predicción directa de la posición relativa de la cabeza para cada palabra dada, lo que por lo tanto resulta en un verdadero analizador de dependencias seq2seq de extremo a extremo por primera vez. Disfrutando de la ventaja del modelado seq2seq, enriquecemos una serie de mejoras de incrustación, que incluyen el aumento de subpalabras y node2vec introducido por primera vez. Mientras tanto, proponemos un decodificador de búsqueda de haces con restricción de árbol y descomposición de subraíz sobre la secuencia para mejorar aún más nuestro analizador seq2seq. Nuestro analizador se evalúa en bancos de árboles de referencia, estando a la par con los analizadores de última generación al lograr un 94,11% de UAS en PTB y un 88,78% de UAS en CTB, respectivamente.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um analisador de dependência de sequência para sequência (seq2seq) prevendo diretamente a posição relativa da cabeça para cada palavra dada, o que resulta em um analisador de dependência seq2seq verdadeiramente de ponta a ponta pela primeira vez. Aproveitando a vantagem da modelagem seq2seq, enriquecemos uma série de aprimoramentos de incorporação, incluindo a subpalavra introduzida pela primeira vez e o aumento node2vec. Enquanto isso, propomos um decodificador de busca de feixe com restrição de árvore e decomposição de subraiz sobre a sequência para aprimorar ainda mais nosso analisador seq2seq. Nosso analisador é avaliado em treebanks de benchmark, estando no mesmo nível dos analisadores de última geração ao atingir 94,11% de UAS em PTB e 88,78% de UAS em CTB, respectivamente.', 'zh': '本文以直占给定单词头相对,立一序于序(seq2seq)依赖性解析器,而首生真端seq2seq赖于解析器。 因seq2seq建模之势,富列销强,包首引子词node2vec。 同时,我们发出一个波束搜索解码器,该解码器具有树约束和序列上的子根分解,以增强我们的seq2seq解析器。 吾解析器质于基准树库,与先进之解析器相当,各得94.11%于PTB,成于CTB88.78%之UAS。', 'ja': '本稿では、所与の単語ごとにヘッドの相対的な位置を直接予測することによって、シーケンス（ seq 2 seq ）依存性解析器へのシーケンスを提示する。したがって、真のエンドツーエンドのseq 2 seq依存性解析器が初めて得られる。seq 2 seqモデリングの利点を活かし、最初に導入されたサブワードやnode 2 vec拡張機能など、一連の埋め込み機能を充実させています。また、シーケンス上の木の制約とサブルート分解を備えたビーム検索デコーダを提案し、さらにseq 2 seq構文解析器を強化する。当社のパーサーは、ベンチマークツリーバンクで評価され、それぞれPTBで94.11%、CTBで88.78%のUASを達成することで、最先端のパーサーと同等です。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर अनुक्रम (seq2seq) निर्भरता पार्सर के लिए एक अनुक्रम प्रस्तुत करता है, जो सीधे प्रत्येक दिए गए शब्द के लिए सिर की सापेक्ष स्थिति की भविष्यवाणी करके, जिसके परिणामस्वरूप पहली बार वास्तव में अंत-से-अंत seq2seq निर्भरता पार्सर होता है। seq2seq मॉडलिंग के लाभ का आनंद लेते हुए, हम एम्बेडिंग वृद्धि की एक श्रृंखला को समृद्ध करते हैं, जिसमें पहले पेश किए गए सबवर्ड और node2vec वृद्धि शामिल हैं। इस बीच, हम पेड़ बाधा और अनुक्रम पर subroot अपघटन के साथ एक बीम खोज विकोडक का प्रस्ताव आगे हमारे seq2seq पार्सर को बढ़ाने के लिए. हमारे पार्सर का मूल्यांकन बेंचमार्क ट्रीबैंक पर किया जाता है, जो क्रमशः पीटीबी पर 94.11% यूएएस और सीटीबी पर 88.78% यूएएस प्राप्त करके अत्याधुनिक पार्सर के बराबर है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена последовательность к синтаксическому анализатору зависимостей последовательности (seq2seq) путем прямого прогнозирования относительного положения головы для каждого данного слова, что, следовательно, приводит к по-настоящему сквозному синтаксическому анализатору зависимостей seq2seq в первый раз. Наслаждаясь преимуществом моделирования seq2seq, мы обогащаем ряд улучшений встраивания, включая первое введенное подслово и расширение node2vec. Тем временем, мы предлагаем дешифратор поиска луча с деревом ограничений и субкорневой декомпозиции над последовательностью, чтобы, кроме того, улучшить наш seq2seq парсер. Наш парсер оценивается на сравнительных древовидных банках, находясь на одном уровне с самыми современными парсерами, достигнув 94,11% БАС на PTB и 88,78% БАС на CTB, соответственно.', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair parsálaí spleáchais seicheamh go seicheamh (seq2seq) trí shuíomh coibhneasta an chinn do gach focal ar leith a thuar go díreach, rud a fhágann, dá bhrí sin, parsálaí spleáchais seq2seq fíor deireadh go deireadh den chéad uair. Ag baint taitnimh as an leas a bhaint as samhaltú seq2seq, saibhrímid sraith feabhsaithe leabú, lena n-áirítear fo-fhocal a tugadh isteach ar dtús agus méadú node2vec. Idir an dá linn, molaimid díchódóir cuardaigh bíomaí le srian crann agus dianscaoileadh fofhréamhacha thar an seicheamh chun ár parsálaí seq2seq a fheabhsú ina theannta sin. Déantar ár gcuid parsálaí a mheas ar chrainn thagarmharcála, agus é ar chomhchéim leis na parsálaithe úrscothacha trí 94.11% UAS a bhaint amach ar PTB agus 88.78% UAS ar CTB, faoi seach.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტი განსაზღვრება (seq2seq) განსაზღვრებულობის პანსერერაციისთვის განსაზღვრებით, რომელიც პირველად განსაზღვრებულია ყველა სიტყვის პროცესის პროცესი, რომელიც შეიძლება ნამდვილად დასრულებ Seq2seq მოდელების გასაკეთესება, ჩვენ გავიღებთ სერიის გასაკეთესება, რომელიც პირველად გავიღებული სუბსიტყვა და სუბსიტყვა 2vec augmentation. Meanwhile, we propose a beam search decoder with tree constraint and subroot decomposition over the sequence to further enhance our seq2seq parser. ჩვენი პანსერილის განსაზღვრებულია ბენქმარკური საზოგადოებში, რომელიც განსაზღვრებულია საზოგადოებო პანსერილებთან 94.11% UAS-ს PTB და 88.78% UAS-ს CTB-ში.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy szekvencia a szekvencia (seq2Seq) függőség elemzőjét mutatja be közvetlenül az adott szó fejének relatív pozícióját, ami így először egy valóban end-to-end seq2Seq függőség elemzőt eredményez. Élvezve a seq2seq modellezés előnyeit, gazdagítunk egy sor beágyazási fejlesztést, beleértve az első bevezetett alszót és node2vec augmentációt. Eközben javasoltunk egy sugárkereső dekódolót fa korlátozással és szubgyökér bomlással a sorozat fölött, hogy tovább erősítsük a seq2seq elemzőt. Az elemzőnk referenciafák alapján értékelésre kerül, a legkorszerűbb elemzőkkel egyenértékben áll azzal, hogy 94,11% UAS-t ér el PTB-n, illetve 88,78% UAS-t ér el CTB-n.', 'el': 'Αυτή η εργασία παρουσιάζει έναν αναλυτή εξάρτησης ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία (σεq2seq) με άμεση πρόβλεψη της σχετικής θέσης του κεφαλιού για κάθε δεδομένη λέξη, γεγονός που ως εκ τούτου έχει ως αποτέλεσμα έναν αναλυτή εξάρτησης σεq2seq για πρώτη φορά. Απολαμβάνοντας το πλεονέκτημα της μοντελοποίησης εμπλουτίζουμε μια σειρά βελτίωσης ενσωμάτωσης, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της πρώτης εισαγόμενης υπολέξης και αύξησης κόμβων. Εν τω μεταξύ, προτείνουμε έναν αποκωδικοποιητή αναζήτησης ακτίνων με περιορισμό δέντρου και αποσύνθεση υποριζών πάνω από την ακολουθία για περαιτέρω ενίσχυση του αναλυτή seq2seq. Ο αναλυτής μας αξιολογείται σε βάσεις δέντρων αναφοράς, όντας στο ίδιο επίπεδο με τους υπερσύγχρονους αναλυτές επιτυγχάνοντας 94.11% UAS στον PTB και 88.78% UAS στη CTB, αντίστοιχα.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз келтірілген әрбір сөз үшін басының қатынастық орналасуын тәуелдік (seq2seq) тәуелдік талдаушының ретін таңдайды, сондықтан ол бірінші рет seq2seq тәуелдік талдаушының соңына келтіріледі. Сеq2seq моделиндің артықшылығын қолдануға көмектеседі, бірінші ішкі сөз мен 2vec көмектесу тізімін қолдануға болады. Осы уақытта, біз ағаш шектеуді және ішкі түрінің шектеуді шектеуден іздеу декодторын таңдаймыз. Сонымен қатар, seq2seq талдаушысын көтеру үшін. Біздің парзеріміз банк белгілерінде бағытталған. Бұл парзерлердің күйі PTB және CTB жүйесінде 88,78% UAS жеткізіп, 94,11% UAS жеткізіп тұрады.', 'it': "Questo articolo presenta un parser di dipendenza sequenza-sequenza (seq2Seq) predicendo direttamente la posizione relativa della testa per ogni parola data, che quindi si traduce in un parser di dipendenza veramente end-to-end seq2Seq per la prima volta. Sfruttando il vantaggio della modellazione seq2seq, arricchiamo una serie di miglioramenti di embedding, tra cui l'aumento di subword e node2vec introdotto in primo luogo. Nel frattempo, proponiamo un decoder di ricerca del fascio con vincolo albero e decomposizione subroot sopra la sequenza per migliorare ulteriormente il nostro parser seq2Seq. Il nostro parser è valutato sui banchi degli alberi di riferimento, essendo alla pari con i parser all'avanguardia raggiungendo rispettivamente il 94,11% UAS su PTB e l'88,78% UAS su CTB.", 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiama priklausomybės analizatoriaus seka (seq2seq), tiesiogiai nuspėjant santykinę galvos padėtį kiekvienam konkrečiam žodžiui, todėl pirmą kartą iš tikrųjų sukuriamas priklausomybės analizatorius nuo eilės iki eilės. Naudodamiesi seq2seq modeliavimo pranašumu, mes praturtiname įvairius įterpimo patobulinimus, įskaitant pirmiausia įvestą subžodį ir node2vec padidinimą. Tuo tarpu mes siūlome šviesos paieškos dekoderį su medžio apribojimais ir subšaknių dekompozicija per seką, kad dar labiau sustiprintų mūsų seq2seq analizatorių. Mūsų analizatorius vertinamas pagal standartinius medienos pagrindus, lyginant su naujausiais analizatoriais, atitinkamai pasiekus 94,11 % UAS PTB ir 88,78 % UAS CTB.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува секвенца на анализатор на зависност од секвенца (seq2seq) со директно предвидување на релативната позиција на главата за секој даден збор, што со тоа резултира со вистински анализатор на зависност од seq2seq од крај до крај за прв пат. Уживајќи во предноста од моделирањето seq2seq, ја богатуваме серијата на подобрување на вградувањето, вклучувајќи прво воведена подзбор и зголемување на node2vec. Во меѓувреме, предложуваме декодер за пребарување по прозорец со ограничување на дрвото и декомпозиција на подкоренот преку секвенцијата за понатаму да го подобриме нашиот секвентни анализатор. Нашиот анализатор е проценет на врските на дрвјата, во однос со најновите анализатори со постигнување на 94,11 отсто УАС за ПТБ и 88,78 отсто УАС за ПТБ, односно.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan urutan ke penghurai dependensi urutan (seq2seq) dengan secara langsung meramalkan kedudukan relatif kepala bagi setiap perkataan yang diberikan, yang mengakibatkan penghurai dependensi seq2seq untuk pertama kalinya. Menikmati keuntungan pemodelan seq2seq, kami memperkaya siri peningkatan penyembedding, termasuk peningkatan subkata pertama yang diperkenalkan dan node2vec. Sementara itu, kami cadangkan dekoder carian cahaya dengan batasan pokok dan dekomposisi subroot di atas urutan untuk lebih lanjut meningkatkan penghurai seq2seq kami. Penganalis kami diuji pada pangkalan pokok benchmark, sama dengan penganalis state-of-the-art dengan mencapai 94.11% UAS pada PTB dan 88.78% UAS pada CTB, berdasarkan itu.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta sekwenza għall-analizzatur tad-dipendenza tas-sekwenza (seq2seq) billi jipprevedi direttament il-pożizzjoni relattiva tar-ras għal kull kelma partikolari, li għalhekk tirriżulta f’analizzatur tad-dipendenza tas-sekwenza mill-a ħħar sal-aħħar għall-ewwel darba. Bl-użu tal-vantaġġ tal-mudell seq2seq, a ħna nagħmlu sensiela ta’ titjib fl-inkorporazzjoni, inkluż l-ewwel introduzzjoni ta’ żieda fis-subkelma u fin-node2vec. Sadanittant, qed nipproponu dekoder tat-tiftix tar-raġġ b’restrizzjoni tas-siġar u dekompożizzjoni tas-subgħeruq fuq is-sekwenza biex aktar itejbu l-analizzatur tagħna seq2seq. Il-analizzatur tagħna huwa evalwat fuq il-punti ta’ riferiment tas-siġar, li huwa ugwali għall-analizzaturi l-aktar avvanzati billi jinkiseb 94.11% UAS fuq PTB u 88.78% UAS fuq CTB, rispettivament.', 'ml': 'This paper presents a sequence to sequence (seq2seq) dependency parser by directly predicting the relative position of head for each given word, which therefore results in a truly end-to-end seq2seq dependency parser for the first time.  സെക്ക്\u200c2സെക്ക് മോഡല്\u200d മാതൃകയുടെ ഉപകാരം ആസ്വദിക്കുന്നു, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു സിരിക്കല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനെ സമ്പന്നരാക്കുന്നു. ആദ്യം തു ഈ സമയത്ത്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ബീമിലെ തെരച്ചില്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു, മരത്തിന്റെ നിയന്ത്രണവും സബ്രൂട്ട് ഡികോമോപ്പിഷനും ക നമ്മുടെ പരാജയപ്രകാരം ബെന്\u200dച്മാര്\u200dക്ക് ട്രീബാങ്കില്\u200d വിലയിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു, സിറ്റിബിയില്\u200d 94. 11% യൂഎസ് പിടിബിയില്\u200d എത്തുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് രാജ്യത്തില്\u200d പാര്\u200d', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас дарааллаар (seq2seq) хамааралтай хуваалцааны дарааллыг харьцуулж өгсөн үг бүрт харьцуулсан байрлалыг шууд таамаглаж байна. Иймээс анхны удаа seq2seq хамааралтай хуваалцааны төгсгөл нь үнэхээр төгсгөл болно. Seq2seq загварын давуу талаар баярлаж, бид нэг хэсэг нэмэгдүүлж, хамгийн эхлээд суб үг болон node2vec нэмэгдүүлж байдаг. Тэр үед бид модны хязгаарлалт болон доорх язгуур хуваагдах газрын хайлтын загварыг илүү дэлгэрүүлэх гэж санал болно. Бидний судлаачид банкны зам дээр дүгнэлт хийгддэг. Урлагчийн ажиллаачид PTB дээр 94.11% UAS болон CTB дээр 88.78% UAS гарч ирсэн.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono parser zależności sekwencji do sekwencji (seq2seq) poprzez bezpośrednie przewidywanie względnej położenia głowy dla każdego danego słowa, co powoduje, że po raz pierwszy powstaje naprawdę kompleksowy parser zależności seq2seq. Korzystając z zalet modelowania seq2seq, wzbogacamy serię ulepszeń osadzenia, w tym pierwsze wprowadzone podsłowo i powiększenie node2vec. Tymczasem proponujemy dekoder wyszukiwania wiązki z ograniczeniem drzewa i rozkładem podkorzeniowym nad sekwencją, aby dodatkowo ulepszyć nasz parser seq2seq. Nasz parser jest oceniany na benchmarkowych bankach drzew, będąc na równi z najnowocześniejszymi parserami, osiągając odpowiednio 94,11% UAS na PTB i 88,78% UAS na CTB.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un parser de dependență secvență la secvență (seq2Seq) prin prezicerea directă a poziției relative a capului pentru fiecare cuvânt dat, ceea ce rezultă astfel într-un parser de dependență cu adevărat end-to-end seq2Seq pentru prima dată. Bucurându-ne de avantajul modelării seq2seq, îmbogățim o serie de îmbunătățiri de încorporare, incluzând prima dată subcuvântul introdus și augmentarea node2vec. Între timp, propunem un decodor de căutare a fasciculului cu constrângere copacă și descompunere subrădăcină peste secvență pentru a îmbunătăți în plus parserul nostru seq2seq. Analizorul nostru este evaluat pe banci de copac de referință, fiind la egalitate cu analizorul de ultimă generație prin atingerea de 94,11% UAS pe PTB și respectiv 88,78% UAS pe CTB.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser ei rekkjefølgje til sekvensavhengighetsanalyser (seq2seq) ved å direkte forventa den relative posisjonen av hodet for kvar gitt ord, som derfor resulterer i ein truleg ende-til-end seq2seq avhengighetsanalyser for første gong. I bruk av forbetringa av seq2seq-modellen, røyker vi ein serie av innbyggingsforbetringar, inkludert første innførte underord og node2vec-augmentasjon. I tillegg foreslår vi eit søkdekoder for stråm med tråbegrensning og underrotdekomposisjon over sekvensen for å forbetra vår seq2seq-tolkar. Tolkaren vårt er evaluert på benchmarktråbenka, som er på samme måte med kunstanalyserane ved å oppnå 94,11 % UAS på PTB og 88,78 % UAS på CTB.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sekvenciju seq2seq zavisnosti analizatora direktno predviđajući relativnu poziciju glave za svaku predstavljenu reč, što stoga stvarno rezultuje u analizatoru zavisnosti seq2seq do kraja po prvi put. Uživajući u prednosti modeliranja seq2seq, obogatili smo seriju pojačanja ugrađenja, uključujući prvo uvedenu podreč i povećanje node2vec. U međuvremenu, predlažemo dekoder pretraživanja zraka sa ograničenjem drveta i raskršenjem podkorijena preko sekvence da unaprijedimo naš seq2seq analizator. Naš analizator je procjenjen na benchmarkovim trgovinama, koji je u skladu sa državnim parserima umjetnosti ostvarivši 94,11% UAS na PTB-u i 88,78% UAS na CTB-u.', 'so': "Qoraalkan wuxuu soo saaraa xilli ku xiran (seq2seq) si toos ah oo ku sii sheegayo meeshii qoyska madaxa ee eray kasta la qoray, taasoo sababtuna waxay ugu sababtaa dhammaadka ugu dambaysta seq2seq ku xiran Paragga ugu horraysa marka hore. Markaynu ku raaxaynaa faa'iidada sameynta seq2seq, waxaynu hodanaynaa horumarinta kordhiska badan, waxaana ku jira marka ugu horeysa qoraalka hooseeya iyo kordhiska node2vec. Wakhtigaas, waxaynu horumarinaynaa qori raadinta ah oo ku qoran geed xadhig ah iyo hoos roob, si aan u sii kordhinno seq2seq baaritaankeenna. UAS waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa baarlamayaashayada oo ku qoran baarlamayaasha qoriga ah, iyadoo wadamada-farshaxanka ah, si gaar ah u gaadha PTB 94.11% UAS iyo 88.78% UAS oo ku qoran CTB.", 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar en sekvens till sekvens (sek2seq) beroendetolkare genom att direkt förutsäga den relativa positionen för huvudet för varje givet ord, vilket därför resulterar i en verkligt end-to-end sek2seq beroendetolkare för första gången. Med fördel av sek2seq modellering berikar vi en serie inbäddningsförbättringar, inklusive först introducerade underord och node2vec-förstärkning. Under tiden föreslår vi en beam search dekoder med trädbegränsning och subroot nedbrytning över sekvensen för att ytterligare förbättra vår sek2seq parser. Vår parser utvärderas på benchmark treebanks och är i nivå med state-of-the-art parsers genom att uppnå 94,11% UAS på PTB respektive 88,78% UAS på CTB.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் தொடர்ச்சிக்கு (seq2seq) சார்ந்த பிரிவை கொடுக்கப்பட்ட ஒவ்வொரு வார்த்தைக்கும் தலைப்பின் சார்ந்த நிலையை நேரடியாக முற்படுத்துகிறது, அது உண்மைய பெக்ஸ்க் மாதிரியின் விருப்பங்களை மகிழ்ச்சி செய்து, நாம் ஒரு தொகுதி மேம்படுத்தலை செலுத்துகிறோம், முதலில் துணை சொல்லை மற்றும் நோட இப்பொழுது, நாம் ஒரு beam தேடும் குறியீட்டை மரத்தின் கட்டுப்பாட்டு மற்றும் துணை மூலம் குறியீட்டை மேலும் மேலும் அதிகப்படுத்து எங்கள் பெங்க்கர்க் ட்ரெப்பாங்க்கள் மீது மதிப்பெடுக்கப்படுகிறது, பிடிபி மீது 94.11% UAS மற்றும் CTB மீது 88.78% UAS நிலையில் இருக்கும்.', 'si': 'This page presents a sequence to sequence (seq2seq) Dependency Parsers by tied forecast the comparison location of the head for any word, so that ends-to-end seq2seq Dependency Parsers for the first time. seq2seq මෝඩිලින්ගේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න, අපි සම්බන්ධ විශාලනය සම්බන්ධ විශාලනය සහ node2Vec විශාලනය සම්බන්ධ අතර වෙලාවෙන්, අපි කුළු හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ සබ්\u200dරූට් විස්තර කරන්න පුළුවන් කරනවා අපේ seq2seq විශ්ලේෂකය වැඩ කරන්න. අපේ පරීක්ෂකය බෙන්ච්මාර්ක් ට්\u200dරෙබැන්ක් වලින් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා, ස්ථානයේ ඉන්න ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙන් ඉන්නේ PTB වල 94.11% UAS සහ 88.78% UAS වලින් CT', 'ur': 'This paper presents a sequence to sequence (seq2seq) dependency parser by direct predicting the relative position of each given word, which is therefore the result of a truly end-to-end seq2seq dependency parser for the first time. Seq2seq موڈلینگ کے فائدہ کے مزے سے خوش ہوتے ہیں، ہم ایک سری مزید مزید اضافہ کرنے کے لئے ثروت دیتے ہیں، اس میں پہلی بار سوب ورڈ اور نوڈ 2vek اضافہ کیا جاتا ہے۔ یہاں تک کہ ہم نے درخت محدودیت اور زیربریٹ کے سٹکٹ کے ساتھ ایک بجلی تلاش ڈیکوڈر کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے تاکہ ہمارے سq2seq پارچر کو اضافہ کرے۔ ہمارا پارچر بنچم مارک ٹریبنک پر مطالعہ کیا گیا ہے، جو PTB پر 94.11% UAS اور CTB پر 88.78% UAS کو پہنچا رہا ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu hujjat birinchi marta koʻrsatilgan soʻzning chegarasini koʻrsatish uchun chegara (seq2seq) ishlatiladi. Seq2seq modelining foydalanishini tasavvur qilib, biz bir necha soʻzni ko'paytirishni tahlil qilamiz. Birinchi marta tub soʻzni va node2vek soʻzlashtiradi. Bu paytda, biz daraxtning chegarasi va tub root cheksiz bilan qidirish kodlash orqali davom etishimiz va seq2seq parametrlarimizni ko'proq qilamiz. Bizning tarjima qiluvchimiz benchmark treebanklarda qiymat qilinadi, har xil davlatda, PTB'da 94.11% UAS va CTB'da 88.78% UAS yuboradi.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này phân tích phân biệt từng chuỗi (seq2seq phân phân tách phụ thuộc) bằng cách dự đoán trực tiếp vị trí tương đối của đầu cho mỗi từ đã đưa ra, vì thế kết quả là một phân tách phụ thuộc đích thực sự của K2se2seq lần đầu tiên. Thưởng thức lợi thế của việc tạo mẫu Kq2seq, chúng tôi làm giàu một loạt cải tiến sự gia nhập, bao gồm đầu tiên là cài nội dung và lõi 2vec. Trong khi đó, chúng tôi đề nghị một giải mã tìm tia sáng với giới hạn cây và phân hủy phụ gốc trên chuỗi để tăng thêm phân tách seq2seq. Vị cha xứ của chúng ta được đánh giá trên giá giá giá giá giá giá giá giá giá giá giá ba chiều, bằng cách đạt được quan điểm của 94.11=. UAS tại PTB và 88.78=. UAS tại CTX.', 'bg': 'Тази статия представя последователност към последователност (сеq2seq) анализатор на зависимост чрез директно прогнозиране на относителната позиция на главата за всяка дадена дума, което следователно води до истински край-до-край анализатор на зависимост сеq2seq за първи път. Наслаждавайки се на предимството на моделирането, ние обогатяваме серия от вграждани подобрения, включително първоначално въведена субдума и увеличение. Междувременно, ние предлагаме декодер за търсене на лъч с ограничение на дърветата и подкоренно разлагане върху последователността, за да подобрим допълнително нашия сеq2seq анализатор. Нашият анализатор се оценява на бенчмаркови дървесни ленти, като е равен на най-съвременните анализатори, като постига съответно 94.11% УАС на ПТБ и 88.78% УАС на ТТБ.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een seq2seq afhankelijkheidsparser (seq2seq) door direct de relatieve positie van hoofd voor elk gegeven woord te voorspellen, wat resulteert in een echt end-to-end seq2seq afhankelijkheidsparser voor de eerste keer. Met het voordeel van seq2seq modellering verrijken we een reeks embedding verbeteringen, waaronder eerst geïntroduceerde subwoord en node2vec augmentatie. Ondertussen stellen we een beam search decoder voor met boombeperking en subroot decompositie over de reeks om onze seq2seq parser verder te verbeteren. Onze parser wordt geëvalueerd op benchmark boombanken en staat op gelijke voet met de state-of-the-art parsers door respectievelijk 94,11% UAS op PTB en 88,78% UAS op CTB te behalen.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt einen Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Abhängigkeitsparser (seq2seq) vor, indem die relative Position des Kopfes für jedes gegebene Wort direkt vorhergesagt wird, was daher zum ersten Mal zu einem wirklich End-to-End-Seq2seq-Abhängigkeitsparser führt. Wir nutzen die Vorteile der seq2seq-Modellierung und bereichern eine Reihe von Einbettungsverbesserungen, einschließlich zuerst eingeführter Subword- und Node2vec-Augmentation. In der Zwischenzeit schlagen wir einen Beam Search Decoder mit Tree Constraint und Subroot Dekomposition über die Sequenz vor, um unseren seq2seq Parser weiter zu verbessern. Unser Parser wird an Benchmark-Baumbänken evaluiert und ist auf Augenhöhe mit den State-of-the-Art-Parsern, indem er 94,11% UAS auf PTB und 88,78% UAS auf CTB erreicht.', 'id': 'Kertas ini menampilkan urutan ke penghurai dependensi urutan (seq2seq) dengan secara langsung memprediksi posisi relatif kepala untuk setiap kata yang diberikan, yang oleh itu berasal dari benar-benar end-to-end seq2seq penghurai dependensi untuk pertama kalinya. Menikmati keuntungan dari modeling seq2seq, kami memperkaya seri peningkatan embedding, termasuk pertama kali memperkenalkan subword dan node2vec peningkatan. Sementara itu, kami mengusulkan dekoder pencarian sinar dengan batas pohon dan dekomposisi subroot di atas urutan untuk lebih lanjut meningkatkan parser seq2seq kami. Analyser kami dihargai di pangkalan pohon benchmark, sama dengan parser state-of-the-art dengan mencapai 94,11% UAS pada PTB dan 88,78% UAS pada CTB, sesuai.', 'ko': '본고는 모든 주어진 단어의 머리 상대적인 위치를 직접 예측함으로써 서열부터 서열(seq2seq) 의존 해석기를 제시함으로써 처음으로 진정한 끝에서 끝까지의 seq2seq 의존 해석기를 실현하였다.seq2seq 모델링의 장점을 이용하여 우리는 일련의 삽입 강화를 풍부하게 했다. 이는 처음으로 서브단어와 노드 2vec 강화를 도입한 것을 포함한다.또한, 우리는 트리 제약과 서열상의 하위 궤적 분해를 가진 파束 검색 디코더를 제시하여, 우리의seq2seq 디코더를 더욱 강화시켰다.Google 해상도는 PTB와 CTB에서 각각 94.11%와 88.78%의 UAS를 구현함으로써 가장 선진적인 해상도와 비슷하게 평가되었습니다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ به عنوان مستقیم پیش\u200cبینی موقعیت نسبت سر برای هر کلمه داده می\u200cشود، که برای اولین بار به یک بازیگر بستگی seq2seq واقعاً پایان می\u200cدهد. با استفاده از مدل\u200cسازی seq2seq، یک سری از افزایش\u200cسازی\u200cها را ثروت می\u200cکنیم، شامل اولین بار زیر کلمه\u200cها و افزایش\u200cسازی\u200cهای node2vec را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. در ضمن، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک دستگاه جستجوی چراغ با محدودیت درخت و دستگاهی زیر ریشه بر روی دستگاهی تا بیشتر دستگاهی seq2seq ما را افزایش دهیم. تقسیم\u200cکننده\u200cی ما روی تخته\u200cهای تخته\u200cها ارزیابی می\u200cشود، با بررسی\u200cکنندگان ایالت هنر با رسیدن 94.11 درصد UAS در PTB و 88.78 درصد UAS در CTB، با بررسی\u200cکنندگان ایالت هنر.', 'tr': 'Bu käfer her berilen söz üçin seq2seq baglanyşynyň tansçysyny täzeden çaklaýar, şol sebäpli ilkinji gezek seq2seq baglanyşynyň tansçysyny çykarýar. Enjoying the advantage of seq2seq modeling, we rich a series of embedding enhancements, including first introduced subword and node2vec augmentation. Bu arada, agaç çyzygy we subköt çykyşymyzy üçin agaç gözlemäzligini teklip edip görýäris Çarçylyk çyzgyşlarynda çykyş çyzgyşlarynda çykylýar. Şu ýagdaýyň durumynda PTB we 88.78% UAS-a görä çykyşymyz bar.', 'sw': 'Makala hii inaonyesha mfululizo wa kutegemea mfululizo (seq2seq) kwa kutabiri moja kwa moja nafasi ya ndugu kwa kila neno la kipindi, na kwa hiyo inasababisha kutegemea kwa mwisho wa seq2seq kwa ajili ya uchaguzi wa kwanza. Kufurahia faida ya mifano ya seq2seq, tunatajiri mfululizo wa kuongezeka, ikiwa ni pamoja na kuanzisha kwa mara ya kwanza maneno ya chini na ongezeko la Node2vec. Wakati huo huo, tunapendekeza kutafuta umeme kwa kiwango cha uchunguzi wa miti na kiwango cha chini cha miti kwa kuongeza zaidi seq2seq mchanganyiko. Mchangiaji wetu umetatuliwa kwenye bendera za bendera, akiwa kwenye bunge la serikali ya sanaa kwa kufikia asilimia 94.11 ya UAS kwenye PTB na asilimia 88.78 ya UAS kwenye CTB.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer en sekvens til sekvens (sek2seq) afhængighedsfortolker ved direkte at forudsige den relative position af hoved for hvert givet ord, hvilket derfor resulterer i en virkelig end-to-end sek2seq afhængighedsfortolker for første gang. Nyder fordelen ved sek2seq modellering, vi beriger en række integrering forbedring, herunder først introduceret underord og node2vec augmentation. I mellemtiden foreslår vi en beam search dekoder med træbegrænsning og subroot nedbrydning over sekvensen for yderligere at forbedre vores sek2seq parser. Vores parser er evalueret på benchmark træbanker, der er på niveau med state-of-the-art parsere ved at opnå henholdsvis 94,11% UAS på PTB og 88,78% UAS på CTB.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sekvenciju seq2seq zavisnosti analizatora izravno predviđajući relativnu poziciju glave za svaku određenu riječ, što stoga stvarno rezultira u analizatoru zavisnosti seq2seq do kraja po prvi put. Uživajući u prednosti modela seq2seq, obogatili smo niz pojačanja ugrađenja, uključujući prvo uvedene podriječje i povećanje node2vec a. U međuvremenu, predlažemo dekoder pretraživanja zraka sa ograničenjem drveta i raskršenjem podkorijena preko sekvence kako bismo dalje poboljšali naš seq2seq analizator. Naš analitičar procjenjuje se na benchmarkovim trgovinama, što je u skladu s državnim analitičarima umjetnosti ostvarivši 94,11% UAS na PTB-u i 88,78% UAS na CTB-u.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n volgorde na volgorde (seq2seq) afhanklikheidspanseerder deur direk die relatiewe posisie van kop vir elke gegewe woord te voorskou, wat daarom resultaat in 'n regtige end- to- end seq2seq afhanklikheidspanseerder vir die eerste keer. By die voordeel van seq2seq modellering, ons ryk 'n serie van inbêding verbetering, insluitend eerste ingevoerde subwoord en node2vec groottering. Ons voorstel 'n trap soektog dekoder met boom beheining en subroot dekomposisie oor die volgorde om ons seq2seq ontwerker te verhoog. Ons ontleerder is geevalueer op benchmark treebanks, met die staat van die kunstenaars, deur 94.11% UAS op PTB en 88.78% UAS op CTB te bereik.", 'am': 'ይህም ሕትመት የራስ ቦታ ለሁሉም የተሰጠውን ቃላት አቅራቢያ እንዲያሳየፍ (seq2seq) መጠቀሚያ እንዲያሳየው ነው፤ ስለዚህም መጨረሻ ወደ መጨረሻ የseq2seq መጠቀሚያ መጀመሪያ ተቃራኒ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ የseq2seq ምሳሌ ጥቅም ደስ ይለናል፣ በመጀመሪያ የመስመር ጥቃት እና የኖዲ2vec ማስታወቂያ እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በዚያን ጊዜም በዛፍ ግንኙነት እና በሥርዓት ላይ የሥር ክፍል እና በክፍለ ሥርዓት ላይ የበዛን የብረት መረጃ አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በቴክቲ ላይ 94.11 በመቶ UAS በPTB እና 88.78 በመቶ UAS በሀገር-አካባቢ ፓርስር ላይ በመደረጃ ላይ በተለየ የቅርንጫፎች ግንኙነታችንን በማድረግ ግንኙነት በማድረግ ይታወቃል፡፡', 'hy': 'This paper presents a sequence to sequence (seq2seq) dependency parser by directly predicting the relative position of head for each given word, which therefore results in a truly end-to-end seq2seq dependency parser for the first time.  Եթե օգտագործենք Sex2Sex մոդելավորման առավելությունը, մենք հարստացնում ենք ներառման բարելավման մի շարք, ներառյալ առաջին ներկայացված ենթաբառերը և 2-րդ կետի բարելավումը: Միևնույն ժամանակ, մենք առաջարկում ենք ճառագայթի որոնման դեկոդեր ծառի սահմանափակումներով և ենթաարմատների բաժանումներով հաջորդականության ընթացքում, որպեսզի ավելին բարելավենք մեր հետևյալ 2SEQ վերլուծողը: Մեր խմբագրողը գնահատվում է հարաբերականների ծառերի հիմնադրամի վրա, որը հավասար է ամենաբարձր խմբագրողների հետ, հասնելով 94.11 տոկոսի UAS-ին ՀՏԲ-ի դեպքում և 88.78 տոկոսի UAS-ին ՀՏԲ-ի դեպքում:', 'az': "Bu kağıt, ilk dəfə seq2seq bağımlılığı ayırıcılığına seq2seq verilən hər sözün qohumluq pozisiyasını müəyyən edərək seq2seq bağımlılığı ayırıcılığına seq2seq verir. Seq2seq modelinin mənfəətlərini ləzzət edərək, ilk dəfə ünvanlı sözlər və node2vec yükselməsini bəxş edirik. Bu arada, seq2seq ayırıcımızı daha da artırmaq üçün a ğaç çətinlikləri və alt kökü çəkilməsini təklif edirik. Bizim par çacımız benchmark çubuqlarında değerlendirilmişdir, sanatçıların durumu ilə PTB'də 94.11% UAS və CTB'də 88.78% UAS çatdırılmışdır.", 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sekvenciju seq2seq zavisnosti analizatora direktno predviđajući relativnu poziciju glave za svaku predstavljenu riječ, što stoga stvarno rezultira u analizatoru zavisnosti seq2seq do kraja po prvi put. Uživajući u prednosti modeliranja seq2seq, obogatili smo seriju pojačanja ugrađenja, uključujući prvo uvedenu podriječ i povećanje node2vec. U međuvremenu, predlažemo dekoder pretraživanja zraka sa ograničenjem drveta i raskršenjem podkorijena preko sekvence da unaprijedimo naš seq2seq analizator. Naš analitičar procjenjuje se na benchmarkovim trgovinama, što je u skladu s državnim analitičarima umjetnosti ostvarivši 94,11% UAS na PTB-u i 88,78% UAS na CTB-u.', 'ca': "This paper presents a sequence to sequence (seq2seq) dependency parser by directly predicting the relative position of head for each given word, which therefore results in a truly end-to-end seq2seq dependency parser for the first time.  Aproveitant l'avantatge de la modelació seq2seq, enriquecem una sèrie de milloraments d'incorporació, incloent el primer increment de subparaules i node2vec. Mentrestant, proposem un decodificador de cerca de raig amb restriccions d'arbre i descomposició subraíz sobre la seqüència per millorar més el nostre analitzador seq2seq. El nostre analitzador es valora en bancs d'arbres de referència, en comparació amb els analitzadors més avançats aconseguint un 94,11% d'UAS en PTB i un 88,78% d'UAS en CTB, respectivament.", 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një sekuencë në analizuesin e varësisë së sekuencës (seq2seq) duke parashikuar drejtpërdrejt pozicionin relativ të kokës për çdo fjalë të dhënë, që kështu rezulton në një analizuesin e varësisë seq2seq për herë të parë. Duke kënaqur me avantazhin e modelimit seq2seq, ne pasurojmë një seri përmirësimi të përfshirjes, duke përfshirë së pari përmirësimin e nënfjalës dhe node2vec. Ndërkohë, ne propozojmë një dekoder kërkimi në rreze me kufizime pemësh dhe dekompozim nënrrënjë mbi sekuencën për të përmirësuar më tej analizuesin tonë seq2seq. Analizatori ynë vlerësohet në bazat e pemëve, duke qenë në krahasim me analizuesit më të lartë duke arritur respektivisht 94.11% UAS në PTB dhe 88.78% UAS në CTB.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকাটি প্রত্যেক নির্দিষ্ট শব্দের জন্য সরাসরি প্রতিটি আত্মিক অবস্থান প্রত্যেক আত্মিক অবস্থানের মাধ্যমে সেকেন্ড (seq2seq) নির্ভর প্রকাশ করে, যা প্রথমবারের সেক্স২সেক মডেলিং এর সুবিধা উপভোগ করছি, আমরা বেশ কিছু বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করি, যার মধ্যে প্রথমে সাবওয়ার্ড এবং নোডে২ভেকের সাথে যোগাযোগ করেছি। এদিকে, আমরা একটি বীম অনুসন্ধান ডেকোডার প্রস্তাব করছি গাছের সীমাবদ্ধতা এবং সাবমূর্তির ক্ষেত্রে সাবমূর্তির ব্যাপারটি আরো বাড়াতে  আমাদের বেঞ্চমার্ক ট্রেব্যাংকে মূল্যায়ন করা হয়েছে, সেখানে পিটিবিতে ৯৪.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje parser závislosti sekvence na sekvenci (seq2seq) přímo predikcí relativní polohy hlavy pro každé dané slovo, což vede k skutečně end-to-end parser závislosti seq2seq poprvé. Využíváme výhody modelování seq2seq a obohacujeme řadu vylepšení vkládání, včetně nejprve zavedeného podslova a rozšíření node2vec. Mezitím navrhujeme dekodér vyhledávání paprsku s omezením stromů a dekompozicí podkořenů nad sekvencí, abychom dále zlepšili náš parser seq2seq. Náš parser je hodnocen na benchmarkových stromových bázích a je na stejné úrovni s nejmodernějšími parsery dosažením 94,11% UAS na PTB a 88,78% UAS na CTB.', 'fi': 'Tämä artikkeli esittää sekvenssin sekvenssiin (seq2seq) riippuvuuden parserin ennustamalla suoraan pään suhteellista asemaa kullekin annetulle sanalle, mikä näin ollen johtaa todella end-to-end seq2seq riippuvuuden parseriin ensimmäistä kertaa. Nautimme seq2seq-mallinnuksen edusta ja rikastamme useita upotusparannuksia, mukaan lukien ensiksi esitelty alasana ja node2vec-augmentaatio. Samaan aikaan ehdotamme sädehaun dekooderia, jossa on puun rajoitus ja alijuuren hajoaminen sekvenssin päälle parantaaksemme sek2seq-jäsentäjäämme. Analysoijamme arvioidaan benchmark-treebankeilla, ja se on samalla tasolla huippuluokan jäsentäjien kanssa saavuttamalla 94,11% UAS PTB:ssä ja 88,78% UAS CTB:ssä.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös esitatakse jada järjestuseni (seq2seq) sõltuvuse parser otseselt ennustades pea suhtelist positsiooni iga antud sõna, mis seega tulemuseks tõeliselt end-to-end seq2seq sõltuvuse parser esimest korda. Naudides seq2seq modelleerimise eelist, rikastame rida manustamise täiustamist, sealhulgas esimest korda tutvustatud alamsõna ja node2vec suurendamist. Samal ajal pakume välja kiire otsingu dekoodri, millel on puupiirangud ja alljuure lagunemine järjestuses, et täiustada meie seq2seq parser. Meie parserit hinnatakse võrdlusalustel puupankadel, olles samaväärne kaasaegsete parseritega, saavutades vastavalt 94,11% UAS PTB ja 88,78% UAS CTB.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג רצף למחקר ההתמודדות של רצף (seq2seq) על ידי צפוי ישיר את עמדת הראש יחסית לכל מילה נתונה, מה שמביא לכן למחקר ההתמודדות של seq2seq בסופו של דבר בפעם הראשונה. ניהנה מהיתרון של דוגמניות seq2seq, אנו משעשרים סדרה של שיפור תוכנית, כולל שיפור תחת מילה והנודל 2vec הוציא ראשון. Meanwhile, we propose a beam search decoder with tree constraint and subroot decomposition over the sequence to furthermore enhance our seq2seq parser.  המחקר שלנו מוערך על גבי עצים, להיות שווה עם המחקרים המיוחדים על ידי להשיג 94.11% UAS על PTB ו-88.78% UAS על CTB, בהתאם.', 'sk': 'Ta prispevek predstavlja razčlenjevalnik odvisnosti zaporedja do zaporedja (seq2seq), tako da neposredno napoveduje relativni položaj glave za vsako dano besedo, kar ima za posledico resnično razčlenjevalnik odvisnosti seq2seq od konca do konca prvič. Uživamo v prednosti modeliranja seq2seq, obogatimo vrsto izboljšav vgradnje, vključno s prvo uvedeno podbesedno in node2vec povečanjem. Medtem pa predlagamo dekoder iskanja žarka z drevesno omejitvijo in razgradnjo podkorenin v zaporedju, da bi dodatno izboljšali naš razčlenjevalec seq2seq. Naš razčlenjevalnik je ocenjen na referenčnih drevesnih ploščah, ki je enakovreden z najsodobnejšimi razčlenjevalniki z doseganjem 94,11% UAS na PTB oziroma 88,78% UAS na CTB.', 'ha': "Wannan takarda na bãyar da wani sauri na dabar-daban (seq2seq) mai ƙayyade fassarar da shirin nuna ɗabi'a ɗabi'a ɗabi'a, don haka yana ƙara ga ƙanshi na ƙarshen seq2seq na ƙayyade ga parse na farko. Fara da kyautar misalin seq2seq, za'a rikitar da wasu masu ƙari na ƙari, tare da farkon ya fara ƙari sauri da ƙari na node 2ve. A lokacin da, Muke goyyade kodi na nẽman firam da tsari ga itãce na ƙunci da dufaƙori na ƙaranci ga matsayin da za'a ƙara samar da mazaɓa seq2seq. Our parser is evaluated on benchmark treebanks, being on par with the state-of-the-art parsers by achieving 94.11% UAS on PTB and 88.78% UAS on CTB, respectively.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé iki ngewehi tanggal sekondirno (seq2seq) nggabungi layar, iso dianggabungi nggawe pawaran position nggo kelompok nggo sabên kelompok, sampek iso dianggap sistem sing wis mulai end-to-end seq2seq ngewehi tanggal dhéwé sampek tanggal nggo sampek. Genjer-genjer esukuno karbote seq2seq modelining, we inwealtur a set of embedding advancement, inserting first failed Subword and node2vec agement. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Rasane sing dipatensi nggambar nggambar obang-obang, suwek ngomong perusahaan sugasar tentang karo perusahaan-sanga-sanga kuwi pacarane sak atungke pacarane kanggo nggawe 1994.11% si pacarane unggal (rat) lan banget saben nggawe rata-sanga (rat) lan meta-sanga (rat)', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་གོ་རིམ་གཤམ་གྱི་དབྱེ་རིམ་པ་ལ་དབྱེ་རིམ་པ་ཞིག་ཡིན། seq2seq མ་དབུགས་གྱི་སྐྱོན་འབྱུང་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ངེད་ཚོ་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་མཐུན་གྱི་གོ་རིམ་མཐུན་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ། དེ་འབདཝ་ད། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་དབྱིབས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་དང་རྩ་བའི་རྩིས་བ་སྦྱོར་བའི་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་། ང་ཚོའི་དབྱེ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་ཚད་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Revisiting the Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM', 'ar': 'إعادة النظر في LSTM الهرمي متعدد النطاقات', 'es': 'Revisando el LSTM multiescala jerárquico', 'fr': 'Revisiter le LSTM multiéchelle hiérarchique', 'pt': 'Revisitando o LSTM Multiescala Hierárquico', 'ja': '階層型マルチスケールLSTMの再検討', 'zh': '重审分多尺度 LSTM', 'hi': 'पदानुक्रमित मल्टीस्केल LSTM revisiting', 'ru': 'Повторное рассмотрение иерархической многомасштабной LSTM', 'ga': 'Athchuairt ar an LSTM Ilscála Ordlathach', 'ka': 'ჰიერარიქული მრავალური LSTM', 'hu': 'A hierarchikus többskálás LSTM felülvizsgálata', 'el': 'Επανεξέταση της ιεραρχικής πολυκλίμακας LSTM', 'it': "Revisione dell'LSTM gerarchico multiscala", 'kk': 'Гирархикалық көп- масштабын LSTM қайталау', 'lt': 'Hierarchinio daugiaskalio LSTM peržiūra', 'mk': 'Ревизирање на хиерархичниот мултискален LSTM', 'ms': 'Memulihkan LSTM Berskala Hierarkikal', 'ml': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM വീണ്ടും റിസ്റ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'mt': 'Ir-reviżjoni tal-LSTM Multiskala Erarkika', 'mn': 'Иерархик олон хэмжээний LSTM', 'no': 'Reviserar hierarkisk multiskal LSTM', 'pl': 'Przegląd hierarchicznego wieloskalowego LSTM', 'ro': 'Revizuirea LSTM ierarhică multiscala', 'sr': 'Revizija hijerarhičkog višestrukog LSTM', 'si': 'හයිරාර්චිකල් ගොඩප්\u200dරමාණය LSTM ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න', 'so': 'Ka baaraandegista LSTM', 'ta': 'உயர்நிலை பல அளவு LSTM மீள்நோக்குகிறது', 'sv': 'Revidering av den hierarkiska flerskaliga LSTM', 'ur': 'ہیر ریچکل Multiscale LSTM کو دوباره سنائی جا رہی ہے', 'uz': 'Revisiting the Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM', 'vi': 'Chỉnh lại kỷ luật đa quy', 'bg': 'Преразглеждане на йерархичната многомащабна LSTM', 'nl': 'De hiërarchische multiscale LSTM opnieuw bekijken', 'da': 'Revidering af den hierarkiske multiskala LSTM', 'hr': 'Revizija hijerarhičkog višestrukog LSTM-a', 'fa': 'بازگرداندن LSTM مقیاس زیادی', 'de': 'Überarbeitung des hierarchischen Mehrskalen-LSTM', 'id': 'Mengubah LSTM Multiskala Hierarkis', 'ko': '다시 말하면 분층 다자도 LSTM', 'sw': 'Kupitia upya LSTM', 'af': 'Hersiening van die Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM', 'tr': 'Hierarhiýal köp kalamlar LSTM bejerilýär', 'sq': 'Duke revizuar LSTM me shumëshkallë hierarkike', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Hiyerarşik çox ölçü LSTM', 'bn': 'Hierarchic Multiscale LSTM পুনরায় প্রদর্শন করা হচ্ছে', 'hy': 'Հիերարքիկական բազմաչափ LStm-ի վերանայելը', 'ca': 'La revisió del LSTM de múltiples escales hieràrquiques', 'bs': 'Revizija hijerarhičkog višestrukog LSTM', 'et': 'Hierarhilise mitmemahulise LSTM läbivaatamine', 'cs': 'Revitalizace hierarchického víceměřítkového LSTM', 'fi': 'Hierarkkisen monimittakaavaisen LSTM:n uudelleentarkastelu', 'jv': 'text', 'he': 'מחדש LSTM הייררכי', 'ha': 'QSystemSemaphore', 'sk': 'Pregled hierarhičnega večobsežnega LSTM', 'bo': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM་ལ་བསྐྱར་གསོ་བྱེད་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) is a state-of-the-art language model that learns interpretable structure from character-level input. Such models can provide fertile ground for (cognitive) computational linguistics studies. However, the high complexity of the architecture, training and implementations might hinder its applicability. We provide a detailed reproduction and ablation study of the architecture, shedding light on some of the potential caveats of re-purposing complex deep-learning architectures. We further show that simplifying certain aspects of the architecture can in fact improve its performance. We also investigate the linguistic units (segments) learned by various levels of the model, and argue that their quality does not correlate with the overall performance of the model on language modeling.', 'ar': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al. ، 2016) هو نموذج لغة حديث يتعلم البنية القابلة للتفسير من المدخلات على مستوى الشخصية. يمكن أن توفر مثل هذه النماذج أرضية خصبة لدراسات اللغويات الحاسوبية (المعرفية). ومع ذلك ، فإن التعقيد الكبير للهندسة المعمارية والتدريب والتطبيقات قد يعيق قابليتها للتطبيق. نحن نقدم دراسة استنساخ واجتثاث مفصلة للعمارة ، مع تسليط الضوء على بعض المحاذير المحتملة لإعادة تصميم هياكل التعلم العميق المعقدة. نوضح كذلك أن تبسيط جوانب معينة من البنية يمكن في الواقع تحسين أدائها. نتحرى أيضًا عن الوحدات (المقاطع) اللغوية التي تعلمتها مستويات مختلفة من النموذج ، ونجادل بأن جودتها لا ترتبط بالأداء العام للنموذج في نمذجة اللغة.', 'fr': "Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016) est un modèle de langage de pointe qui apprend une structure interprétable à partir d'entrées au niveau du caractère. De tels modèles peuvent constituer un terrain fertile pour des études de linguistique informatique (cognitive). Cependant, la grande complexité de l'architecture, de la formation et des implémentations peut entraver son applicabilité. Nous fournissons une étude détaillée de reproduction et d'ablation de l'architecture, mettant en lumière certaines des mises en garde potentielles liées à la réaffectation d'architectures complexes d'apprentissage profond. Nous montrons également que la simplification de certains aspects de l'architecture peut en fait améliorer ses performances. Nous étudions également les unités linguistiques (segments) apprises à différents niveaux du modèle et soutenons que leur qualité n'est pas corrélée avec les performances globales du modèle sur la modélisation linguistique.", 'es': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016) es un modelo de lenguaje de vanguardia que aprende la estructura interpretable a partir de la entrada a nivel de caracteres. Estos modelos pueden proporcionar un terreno fértil para los estudios lingüísticos computacionales (cognitivos). Sin embargo, la alta complejidad de la arquitectura, la capacitación y las implementaciones podrían dificultar su aplicabilidad. Proporcionamos un estudio detallado de reproducción y ablación de la arquitectura, que arroja luz sobre algunas de las posibles advertencias de la reutilización de arquitecturas complejas de aprendizaje profundo. Además, demostramos que la simplificación de ciertos aspectos de la arquitectura puede, de hecho, mejorar su rendimiento. También investigamos las unidades lingüísticas (segmentos) aprendidas por varios niveles del modelo y argumentamos que su calidad no se correlaciona con el rendimiento general del modelo en el modelado del lenguaje.', 'pt': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) é um modelo de linguagem de última geração que aprende a estrutura interpretável a partir da entrada em nível de caractere. Tais modelos podem fornecer terreno fértil para estudos de linguística computacional (cognitiva). No entanto, a alta complexidade da arquitetura, treinamento e implementações podem dificultar sua aplicabilidade. Fornecemos um estudo detalhado de reprodução e ablação da arquitetura, esclarecendo algumas das possíveis ressalvas de redefinir arquiteturas complexas de aprendizado profundo. Mostramos ainda que simplificar certos aspectos da arquitetura pode, de fato, melhorar seu desempenho. Também investigamos as unidades linguísticas (segmentos) aprendidas por vários níveis do modelo e argumentamos que sua qualidade não se correlaciona com o desempenho geral do modelo na modelagem de linguagem.', 'ja': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016)は、文字レベルの入力から解釈可能な構造を学習する最先端の言語モデルです。このようなモデルは、（認知的）計算言語学研究のための肥沃な土壌を提供することができる。しかし、アーキテクチャ、トレーニング、および実装の高い複雑性は、その適用性を妨げる可能性がある。私たちは、アーキテクチャの詳細な再現とアブレーションの研究を提供し、複雑なディープラーニングアーキテクチャを再利用する際の潜在的な注意点のいくつかを明らかにします。さらに、アーキテクチャの特定の側面を単純化することは、実際にそのパフォーマンスを向上させることができることを示します。また、モデルのさまざまなレベルで学習された言語単位（セグメント）を調査し、その質が言語モデリングにおけるモデルの全体的なパフォーマンスと相関しないと主張する。', 'ru': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) - это современная языковая модель, которая изучает интерпретируемую структуру на основе ввода на уровне символов. Такие модели могут обеспечить благодатную почву для (когнитивных) исследований вычислительной лингвистики. Вместе с тем высокая сложность архитектуры, подготовки кадров и осуществления может препятствовать ее применению. Мы предоставляем подробное исследование воспроизведения и абляции архитектуры, проливая свет на некоторые из потенциальных предостережений о перепрофилировании сложных архитектур глубокого обучения. Мы далее показываем, что упрощение некоторых аспектов архитектуры может на самом деле улучшить ее производительность. Мы также исследуем лингвистические единицы (сегменты), изученные на различных уровнях модели, и утверждаем, что их качество не коррелирует с общей производительностью модели по языковому моделированию.', 'zh': '分层多尺度LSTM(Chung等,2016)是最先进的言语模样,可以从字符级输入中学习可解释的结构。 可以为(知)计语言学治膏腴之土。 然体系结构、培训、成之高复杂性或妨其适用性。 备架构之详,明复用杂学架构潜于警告。 吾益明之,简体系结构者实可以益其性。 又考其言语单元(段),以为不关言建模。', 'hi': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016) एक अत्याधुनिक भाषा मॉडल है जो चरित्र-स्तर के इनपुट से व्याख्यायोग्य संरचना सीखता है। इस तरह के मॉडल (संज्ञानात्मक) कम्प्यूटेशनल भाषाविज्ञान अध्ययन के लिए उपजाऊ जमीन प्रदान कर सकते हैं। हालांकि, वास्तुकला, प्रशिक्षण और कार्यान्वयन की उच्च जटिलता इसकी प्रयोज्यता में बाधा डाल सकती है। हम वास्तुकला का एक विस्तृत प्रजनन और एब्लेशन अध्ययन प्रदान करते हैं, जो जटिल गहरी-सीखने वाली आर्किटेक्चर को फिर से निर्धारित करने की कुछ संभावित चेतावनियों पर प्रकाश डालते हैं। हम आगे दिखाते हैं कि वास्तुकला के कुछ पहलुओं को सरल बनाने से वास्तव में इसके प्रदर्शन में सुधार हो सकता है। हम मॉडल के विभिन्न स्तरों द्वारा सीखी गई भाषाई इकाइयों (खंडों) की भी जांच करते हैं, और तर्क देते हैं कि उनकी गुणवत्ता भाषा मॉडलिंग पर मॉडल के समग्र प्रदर्शन के साथ सहसंबंधित नहीं है।', 'ga': "Múnla teanga den scoth is ea LSTM Ordlathach Ilscála (Chung et. al., 2016) a fhoghlaimíonn struchtúr inléirmhínithe ó ionchur ar leibhéal na gcarachtar. Is féidir le samhlacha den sórt sin talamh torthúil a sholáthar le haghaidh staidéir (cognaíocha) ar theangeolaíocht ríomhaireachtúil. Mar sin féin, d'fhéadfadh castacht ard na hailtireachta, na hoiliúna agus na bhfeidhmiúcháin bac a chur ar a infheidhmeacht. Soláthraímid mionstaidéar atáirgeadh agus díláithrithe ar an ailtireacht, rud a thugann léargas ar chuid de na caveatanna a d’fhéadfadh a bheith ann maidir le hailtireachtaí casta domhainfhoghlama a athchuspóirí. Léirímid freisin gur féidir feabhas a chur ar a fheidhmíocht trí ghnéithe áirithe den ailtireacht a shimpliú. Déanaimid iniúchadh freisin ar na haonaid teangeolaíocha (deighleoga) a d’fhoghlaim na leibhéil éagsúla den mhúnla, agus áitímid nach bhfuil a gcáilíocht ag teacht le feidhmíocht iomlán na samhla ar shamhaltú teanga.", 'el': 'Το Ιεραρχικό Πολυκλίμακα είναι ένα σύγχρονο γλωσσικό μοντέλο που μαθαίνει ερμηνευτή δομή από την εισαγωγή σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων. Τέτοια μοντέλα μπορούν να αποτελέσουν γόνιμο έδαφος για (γνωστικές) υπολογιστικές γλωσσικές μελέτες. Ωστόσο, η υψηλή πολυπλοκότητα της αρχιτεκτονικής, της κατάρτισης και των υλοποιήσεων μπορεί να εμποδίσει την εφαρμογή της. Παρέχουμε μια λεπτομερή μελέτη αναπαραγωγής και αφαίρεσης της αρχιτεκτονικής, ρίχνοντας φως σε μερικά από τα πιθανά εμπόδια της επαναχρησιμοποίησης σύνθετων αρχιτεκτονικών βαθιάς μάθησης. Δείχνουμε επίσης ότι η απλοποίηση ορισμένων πτυχών της αρχιτεκτονικής μπορεί στην πραγματικότητα να βελτιώσει την απόδοσή της. Ερευνούμε επίσης τις γλωσσικές μονάδες (τμήματα) που μαθαίνονται από διάφορα επίπεδα του μοντέλου, και υποστηρίζουμε ότι η ποιότητά τους δεν συσχετίζεται με τη συνολική απόδοση του μοντέλου στη γλωσσική μοντελοποίηση.', 'hu': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016) egy korszerű nyelvi modell, amely karakterszintű bevitelből tanul értelmezhető struktúrát. Az ilyen modellek termékeny terepet nyújthatnak a (kognitív) számítástechnikai tanulmányokhoz. Az építészet, a képzés és a megvalósítás nagy összetettsége azonban akadályozhatja annak alkalmazhatóságát. Részletes reprodukciós és ablációs tanulmányozást nyújtunk az építészetről, amely rávilágít a komplex mélytanulási architektúrák újrafelhasználásának lehetőségeire. Megmutatjuk továbbá, hogy az architektúra bizonyos aspektusainak egyszerűsítése valójában javíthatja teljesítményét. Vizsgáljuk továbbá a modell különböző szintjei által tanult nyelvi egységeket (szegmenseket), és azzal érvelünk, hogy minőségük nem korrelál a modell nyelvmodellezési teljesítményével.', 'ka': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) არის ხელსაწყოთა ენის მოდელი, რომელიც შესწავლის ინტერუქტუქტურის სტრუქტურაცია სიმბოლოების შენახვედან. ასეთი მოდელები შეუძლიათ კომპუტიური ლენგურისტიკის სწავლებისთვის (კონციგური) ფერტილური ფერტილი დაახლოთ. მაგრამ აქტიქტურაციის, სწავლების და ინტელექტურაციის მაღალი კომპლექტირება შეიძლება შეუძლებელია მისი აპლექტურაცია. ჩვენ ახალგაზრუქტურის დეტალური პროპლექტირება და ახალგაზრუქტირებას სწავლა, რომელიც პოტენციალური კომპლექტირებულ კომპლექტირებულ ახალგაზრუქტურ ჩვენ დავიწყებთ, რომ არქტიქტურის განსაკუთრებული აპექტიკურების განსაკუთრებლად შეუძლია მისი მუშაობა გაუკეთება. ჩვენ ასევე განსხვავებით მოდელის განსხვავებული სიმბოლოგიური ერთეულები (ჟედმენტები) სწავლილი მოდელის განსხვავებული დონეულებით, და არსებობით, რომ მათი კალგატი არ კოლექცია ენის მო', 'it': "Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016) è un modello linguistico all'avanguardia che impara la struttura interpretabile dall'input a livello di carattere. Tali modelli possono fornire terreno fertile per gli studi di linguistica computazionale (cognitiva). Tuttavia, l'elevata complessità dell'architettura, della formazione e delle implementazioni potrebbe ostacolare la sua applicabilità. Forniamo uno studio dettagliato di riproduzione e ablazione dell'architettura, facendo luce su alcuni dei potenziali rischi della ri-applicazione di architetture complesse di deep-learning. Dimostriamo inoltre che la semplificazione di alcuni aspetti dell'architettura può infatti migliorarne le prestazioni. Analizziamo anche le unità linguistiche (segmenti) apprese dai vari livelli del modello, e sosteniamo che la loro qualità non è correlata con le prestazioni complessive del modello sulla modellazione linguistica.", 'kk': 'Хирархикалық көп масштабы LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) таңбалар деңгейіндегі ендірілген құрылымды үйренетін тіл үлгісі. Бұл үлгілер компьютерлік лингвистикалық зерттеулерге (конитивтік) жұмыс істей алады. Бірақ, архитектура, оқыту және іске асырудың көпшілігі оның қолдануға көмектеседі. Біз архитектураның егжей- тегжейлі репродукция және қолдануға арналған зерттеулерді береміз. Кейбірде комплексті терең оқыту архитектураларын қайта келтіру мүмкіндіктерінің жарықтығын өзге Біз архитектураның кейбір бөлшектерін қарапайым көмектесетінін көрсетедік. Мұндай-ақ біз үлгінің түрлі деңгейінде үйренген лингвистикалық бірліктерін (сегменттер) зерттеп, олардың сапасы тіл моделінің жалпы ықтималдығымен байланысты деп айтып тұрмыз.', 'lt': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016 m.) yra naujausias kalbos model is, kuris mokosi aiškinamosios struktūros iš ženklų lygio įvedimų. Tokie modeliai gali suteikti vaisingą pagrindą (pažintiniams) kompiuteriniams kalbos tyrimams. Tačiau didelis architektūros, mokymo ir įgyvendinimo sudėtingumas gali trukdyti ją taikyti. Mes pateikiame išsamų architektūros reprodukcijos ir abliacijos tyrimą, skleidžiantį šviesą tam tikroms galimoms sudėtingų gilaus mokymosi architektūrų atžvilgiu. Be to, mes rodome, kad tam tikrų architektūros aspektų supaprastinimas iš tikrųjų gali pagerinti jos veiklos rezultatus. Taip pat tiriame įvairių modelio lygių mokomus kalbinius vienetus (segmentus) ir teigiame, kad jų kokybė neatitinka bendro kalbinio modeliavimo modelio veiklos rezultatų.', 'mk': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) е најнов јазички модел кој научи интерпретабилна структура од внесување на ниво на карактери. Таквите модели можат да обезбедат плодна основа за (когнитивните) компјутативни јазични студии. Сепак, високата комплексност на архитектурата, обуката и имплементацијата може да ја попречи неговата апликабилност. Ние обезбедуваме детална студија на репродукција и аблација на архитектурата, фрлајќи светлина на некои од потенцијалните пештери на повторно наменетите комплексни архитектури на длабоко учење. Понатаму покажуваме дека едноставувањето на одредени аспекти на архитектурата може всушност да ја подобри својата резултат. We also investigate the linguistic units (segments) learned by various levels of the model, and argue that their quality does not correlate with the overall performance of the model on language modeling.', 'ml': 'മിറ്റര്\u200dക്കിക്കല്\u200d പല്ലിസ്കേല്\u200d എല്\u200dസ്റ്റിം (ചങ്ങ് എറ്റ്. al., 2016) ഒരു സ്റ്റേറ്റ്- ലാര്\u200dട്ട് ഭാഷ മോഡലാണു്. അക്ഷരസഞ്ചയില്\u200d നിന് ഇങ്ങനെയുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് (കോഗ്രിനിവ്) കണക്കിടുന്ന ഭാഷ പഠനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ഫാരില്\u200d ഭൂമി നല്\u200dകാം. എങ്കിലും സ്ഥാനം, പരിശീലനത്തിനും പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും അതിന്റെ പ്രയോഗത്തിനും തടസ്സപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d കഴിയും. നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വിശദീകരിച്ച പ്രവർത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്നതും പുതുക്കുന്നതും പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതുമായ പദ്ധതിയുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ പഠനത്തിന്റെ പ നമ്മള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് ആര്\u200dക്കിച്ചിട്ടുള്ള ചില പ്രഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d ലളിതമാക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്ത നിലയില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ യൂണിറ്റുകളെയും അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. അവയുടെ ഗുണവും ഭാഷ മോഡലിന്റെ മൊത്തം പ്രദര്\u200dശനത്', 'mt': 'LSTM Multiskala Erarkika (Chung et al., 2016) hija mudell lingwistiku avvanzat li jitgħallem struttura interpretabbli minn input fil-livell tal-karattri. Dawn il-mudelli jistgħu jipprovdu art fertili għal studji lingwistiċi (konjittivi) komputattivi. Madankollu, il-kumplessità għolja tal-arkitettura, it-taħriġ u l-implimentazzjoni tista’ tfixkel l-applikabbiltà tagħha. Aħna nipprovdu studju dettaljat dwar ir-riproduzzjoni u l-ablazzjoni tal-arkitettura, u nixfu d-dawl fuq xi wħud mill-għeruq potenzjali ta’ arkitetturi kumplessi ta’ tagħlim fil-fond. We further show that simplifying certain aspects of the architecture can in fact improve its performance.  Investigaw ukoll l-unitajiet lingwistiċi (segmenti) li jitgħallmu minn diversi livelli tal-mudell, u jargumentaw li l-kwalità tagħhom ma tikkorrelatax mal-prestazzjoni globali tal-mudell dwar l-immudellar tal-lingwi.', 'ms': 'LSTM Berskala Hierarkikal (Chung et. al., 2016) adalah model bahasa state- of- the- art yang mempelajari struktur yang boleh dienterpret dari input aras aksara. Model tersebut boleh menyediakan tanah buah untuk kajian bahasa komputasi (kognitif). Namun, kompleksiti tinggi arkitektur, latihan dan implementasi mungkin menghalangi kemampuannya. Kami menyediakan kajian reproduksi dan ablasi terperinci tentang arkitektur, melemparkan cahaya pada sebahagian dari caveats potensi arkitektur belajar dalam kompleks semula. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa kemudahan aspek tertentu arkitektur sebenarnya boleh meningkatkan prestasinya. Kami juga menyelidiki unit bahasa (segmen) yang dipelajari oleh pelbagai tahap model, dan menyangka kualiti mereka tidak berkorrelasi dengan prestasi keseluruhan model pada model bahasa.', 'mn': 'Хиерархик олон хэмжээний LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) гэдэг нь харьцаа-түвшин орноос илэрхийлж чадах бүтэц загвар юм. Ийм загварууд компьютерийн хэлний судалгаанд жимс суурь хангаж болно. Гэхдээ барилгууд, сургалт болон үйлдвэрлэлийн өндөр төвөгтэй байдал нь үүнийг хэрэглэх боломжтой болгодог. Бид архитектурын талаар нарийвчлан үржүүлэх болон үйлдвэрлэлтийн судалгаа гаргаж, комплекс гүнзгий суралцах архитектуруудыг дахин цэвэрлэх боломжтой архитектуруудын нэг гэрлийг шингээж байна. Бид архитектурын зарим асуудлыг хялбарчлах нь үнэндээ үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулж чадна. Мөн бид хэл хэлний нэгжүүдийг (хэлбэрүүдийг) загварын олон түвшинд сурсан хэлбэрийн нэгжүүдийг судалж, хэл загварын загварын ерөнхий үйлдэлтэй холбоотой гэж хэлж байна.', 'ro': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016) este un model lingvistic de ultimă generație care învață structura interpretabilă din introducerea la nivel de caracter. Astfel de modele pot oferi teren fertil pentru studiile lingvistice computaționale (cognitive). Cu toate acestea, complexitatea ridicată a arhitecturii, formării și implementărilor ar putea împiedica aplicabilitatea acesteia. Oferim un studiu detaliat de reproducere și ablație a arhitecturii, punând lumină asupra unora dintre potențialele avertismente ale reproducerii arhitecturilor complexe de învățare profundă. De asemenea, arătăm că simplificarea anumitor aspecte ale arhitecturii îi poate îmbunătăți performanța. De asemenea, investigăm unitățile lingvistice (segmentele) învățate de diferite niveluri ale modelului și susținem că calitatea lor nu corelează cu performanța generală a modelului de modelare lingvistică.', 'no': 'Hierarisk multiskal LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) er eit tilstandsspråsmodul som lærer uttolkbar struktur frå inndata frå teiknivå. Desse modeller kan tilbygge grønngrunn for (kognitiv) datamaskinske lingviske studiar. Den høge kompleksiteten av arkitekturen, opplæring og implementasjonane kan imidlertid hindra programmet. Vi tilbyr ein detaljert reproduksjon og aktiveringsstudie av arkitekturen, som skal skilja lys på nokre av de potensielle håvane av komplekse dypslæringsarkitekturar på nytt. Vi viser meir at å forenkla nokre aspektar av arkitekturen kan faktisk forbetra utviklinga. Vi undersøker også dei lingviske einingane (segmentane) som er lærte av forskjellige nivå av modellen, og argumenterer at kvaliteten deres ikkje er korrelatert med den generelle utviklinga av modellen på språk-modellering.', 'pl': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Church et. al., 2016) to najnowocześniejszy model językowy, który uczy się interpretowalnej struktury z wejścia na poziomie znaków. Takie modele mogą stanowić żyzną podstawę dla (poznawczych) badań językoznawstwa obliczeniowego. Jednak duża złożoność architektury, szkoleń i wdrożeń może utrudniać jej zastosowanie. Zapewniamy szczegółowe badanie reprodukcji i ablacji architektury, rzucając światło na niektóre z potencjalnych zastrzeżeń ponownego przeznaczenia złożonych architektur głębokiego uczenia się. Ponadto pokazujemy, że uproszczenie niektórych aspektów architektury może w rzeczywistości poprawić jej wydajność. Badamy również jednostki językowe (segmenty) uczone przez różne poziomy modelu i argumentujemy, że ich jakość nie koreluje z ogólną wydajnością modelu w modelowaniu językowym.', 'sr': 'Hijerarhički multiskalni LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) je model umjetničkog jezika koji nauči interpretabilnu strukturu od ulaska na nivo karaktera. Takvi modeli mogu pružiti plodno područje za (kognitivne) kompjuterske jezičke studije. Međutim, visoka kompleksnost arhitekture, obuke i provedbe bi mogla ometati njegovu primjenu. Mi obezbeđujemo detaljno razmnožavanje i proučavanje arhitekture, širenje svetla na neke od potencijalnih pećina ponovno čišćenja kompleksnih arhitektura dubokog učenja. Dalje pokazujemo da pojednostavljanje određenih aspekta arhitekture može u stvari poboljšati svoj izvod. Istražujemo i lingvističke jedinice (segmenti) naučene različitim nivoima modela, i tvrdimo da njihova kvaliteta ne povezuje sa ukupnim izvodima modela jezika.', 'si': 'හියාර්චිකාල් බොහොම විශේෂ LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) තමයි අක්ෂර ස්තූතියේ භාෂාවක් නිර්මාණයෙන් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ස්ථ මෙහෙම මොඩේල්ස් පුළුවන් පරීක්ෂණ භාෂාවික අධ්\u200dයානය සඳහා (පරීක්ෂණික) විශ්වාස කරනවා. නමුත්, ස්ථාපනය, ප්\u200dරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය ගැන ඉහළ සංකෘතියක් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා කරන්න බෑ. අපි විස්තර ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් සහ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා, ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් සම්බන්ධ විශ්වාස කරනවා, පුළ අපි තවත් පෙන්වන්නේ විස්තාරයේ විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් කියලා. අපි භාෂාවික යුනිටිකය (සෙක්ටම්) පරීක්ෂා කරනවා මොඩේලයේ විවිධ ස්ථානයෙන් ඉගෙන ගත්තා, ඒ වගේම ඔවුන්ගේ කුළුවත් භාෂ', 'sv': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016) är en toppmodern språkmodell som lär sig tolkningsbar struktur från inmatning på teckenivå. Sådana modeller kan ge en fruktbar grund för (kognitiva) lingvistiska studier. Den höga komplexiteten i arkitekturen, utbildningen och genomförandet kan dock hindra dess tillämpning. Vi ger en detaljerad reproduktions- och ablationsstudie av arkitekturen och belyser några av de potentiella varningarna med att återanvända komplexa djupinlärningsarkitekturer. Vi visar vidare att en förenkling av vissa aspekter av arkitekturen faktiskt kan förbättra dess prestanda. Vi undersöker också de språkliga enheter (segment) som lärts av olika nivåer av modellen, och hävdar att deras kvalitet inte korrelerar med modellens övergripande prestanda på språkmodellering.', 'so': 'Qoraalka kala duduwan LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) waa qoraal-state-of-the-art-model, kaas oo ka baranaya dhismo turjuman oo laga barto qoraal-level input. Tusaaladan waxaa lagu sameyn karaa ardayda luuqadaha xisaabta ah (koontative). Si kastaba ha ahaatee qalabka, waxbarashada iyo waxqabashada waxaa laga yaabaa in ay ka hor joogsado codsigiisa. Waxaannu qornaa waxbarasho la xiriira soo saarista iyo korsashada, kaasoo ku qoraya boholaha suurtagalka ah oo ku qoran dhismaha waxbarashada ee adag. Sidoo kale waxaynu tusnaynaa in fududeynta dhinaca kamid ah ee dhismaha ayaa horumarin kara tababarkiisa. We also investigate the linguistic units (segments) learned by various levels of the model, and argue that their quality does not correlate with the overall performance of the model on language modeling.', 'ta': 'அதிக அளவு LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) ஒரு நிலையான- கலை மொழி மாதிரி இது எழுத்து- level உள்ளீட்டிலிருந்து விளக்கமான அமைப்பை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும். இவ்வாறு மாதிரிகள் கணிப்பு மொழிமாற்றங்களுக்கான புள்ளிய நிலத்தை வழங்க முடியும். ஆயினும், அடைவு, பயிற்சி மற்றும் செயல்பாடுகளின் அதிக சிக்கல்கள் அதன் பயன்பாடுகளை தடுக்கலாம். நாம் கட்டப்பணியில் ஒரு விவரமான புதுப்பாக்கி மற்றும் நெருப்பு ஆராய்ச்சியை வழங்குகிறோம், சில சில சிக்கலான ஆழமான கற்கும் கட்டுக்க நாம் இன்னும் காண்பிக்கிறோம் கட்டப்பணியின் சில பாகங்களை எளிதாக்குதலாம் உண்மையில் அதன் செயல்பாட்டை மேம நாம் மாதிரி நிலைகளால் கற்ற மொழி அலகுகள் (பிரிவுகள்) மொழி மாதிரி மாதிரியின் மொத்த மாதிரியின் மொத்த செயல்பாடுடன் இணைக்கப்படவில்லை என்ற', 'ur': 'ہیر ریچکل Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) ایک ایرٹ کی زبان کی موڈل ہے جو شخص سطح سے تفسیر قابل استعمال سکھاتا ہے۔ اس طرح کی مدلکوں کی کمپیوٹریشن زبان شناسی کی تحقیقات کے لئے فرٹیل زمین پیدا کر سکتے ہیں۔ لیکن معماری، تعلیم اور عملکرد کی بہت زیادہ پیچیدگی اس کے قابلیت کو روکا سکتی ہے۔ ہم نے معماری کے بارے میں ایک تفصیل پھیلانے اور پھیلانے کی مطالعہ پیدا کیا ہے، اور ایک تفصیل عمیق تعلیم معماری کے بعض غاروں پر نور پھیلاتے ہیں۔ ہم اس سے زیادہ نشان دیتے ہیں کہ معماری کے چند قسم کے منظور آسانی کرنا حقیقت میں اس کی عملکرد بہتر کر سکتا ہے۔ ہم نے بھی مدل کے مختلف سطح سے سکھائے ہوئے زبان شناسی یونیٹوں کی تحقیق کرتی ہیں، اور جھگڑتے ہیں کہ ان کی کیفیت زبان مدل کے کل عملکرد کے ساتھ برابر نہیں ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu modellar kompyuterlik tillarini o'rganish (kognitiv) uchun fertil soni beradi. Lekin, maktablar, taʼminlovchi va ishlashni juda murakkablik bu qo'llanmalarni o'zgartiradi. Biz tashkilotlarni tahrirlash va qo'llashni tahlil qilamiz, bu muammolar murakkab o'rganish maktablarining bir necha qismlarni ko'rsatadi. Biz yana ko'rsatganimiz, arxituvchi bir necha qismlarni soddalash aslida uni bajarishini bajarishi mumkin. Biz modelning turli darajalari bilan o'rganilgan lingvistik bir qismlarini tahrirlamiz, va ularning sifatida tilning modeli modelidagi umumiy natijada bog'lanmaydi.", 'vi': 'Hierarchal Mulscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 206) là một mô hình ngôn ngữ hiện đại học giải thích cấu trúc từ cấp ký tự. Những mẫu này có thể cung cấp đất màu mỡ cho nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ. Tuy nhiên, sự phức tạp cao của kiến trúc, huấn luyện và thực dụng có thể gây trở ngại cho nó. Chúng tôi cung cấp một nghiên cửa về bệnh bẩm chính bảo và bệnh sắp về những tòa kiến trúc được biển thành. Chúng tôi cũng cho thấy việc đơn giản vài khía cạnh của kiến trúc có thể cải thiện khả năng của nó. Chúng tôi cũng điều tra các đơn vị (phân đoạn) được học bởi các cấp độ khác nhau của mô hình, và cho rằng chất lượng của chúng không phù hợp với khả năng tổng hợp của mô phỏng ngôn ngữ.', 'hr': 'Hijerarhički multiskalni LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) je model umjetničkog jezika koji uči interpretabilnu strukturu iz ulaza na nivo karaktera. Takvi modeli mogu pružiti plodno područje za (kognitivne) računalne jezičke studije. Međutim, visoka kompleksnost arhitekture, obuke i provedbe bi mogla ometati njegovu primjenu. Mi pružamo detaljno proučavanje reprodukcije i aktivacije arhitekture, otvaranje svjetla na neke od potencijalnih pećina ponovno čišćenja kompleksnih arhitektura dubokog učenja. Dalje pokazujemo da pojednostavljanje određenih aspekta arhitekture može u stvari poboljšati svoj učinkovit. Istražujemo i jezičke jedinice (segmenti) naučene različitim razinama modela i tvrdimo da njihova kvaliteta ne povezuje s ukupnim učinkom modela jezičke modele.', 'nl': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Church et. al., 2016) is een state-of-the-art taalmodel dat interpreteerbare structuur leert van invoer op tekenniveau. Dergelijke modellen kunnen een vruchtbare basis vormen voor (cognitieve) computerlinguïstische studies. Echter, de hoge complexiteit van de architectuur, training en implementaties kan de toepasbaarheid ervan belemmeren. We bieden een gedetailleerde reproductie- en ablatiestudie van de architectuur, waarbij we licht werpen op enkele van de mogelijke beperkingen van het hergebruiken van complexe deep-learning architecturen. Verder laten we zien dat het vereenvoudigen van bepaalde aspecten van de architectuur de prestaties ervan kan verbeteren. We onderzoeken ook de linguïstische eenheden (segmenten) geleerd door verschillende niveaus van het model, en stellen dat hun kwaliteit niet correleert met de algehele prestaties van het model op taalmodellering.', 'bg': 'Йерархичен многомащабен LSTM (Чънг и др., 2016) е съвременен езиков модел, който изучава интерпретируема структура от вход на ниво символ. Такива модели могат да осигурят плодородна почва за (когнитивни) изчислителни лингвистични изследвания. Въпреки това, високата сложност на архитектурата, обучението и внедряването може да възпрепятства нейната приложимост. Предоставяме детайлно проучване за възпроизвеждане и аблация на архитектурата, хвърляйки светлина върху някои от потенциалните пречки на преосмислянето на сложни архитектури за дълбоко обучение. Освен това показваме, че опростяването на някои аспекти на архитектурата всъщност може да подобри нейното представяне. Също така изследваме езиковите единици (сегменти), научени от различни нива на модела, и твърдим, че тяхното качество не съответства на цялостното представяне на модела по езиково моделиране.', 'da': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) er en avanceret sprogmodel, der lærer fortolkningsbar struktur fra input på tegneniveau. Sådanne modeller kan give frugtbar grund til (kognitive) beregningslingvistiske studier. Den høje kompleksitet af arkitekturen, uddannelsen og implementeringen kan imidlertid hindre dens anvendelighed. Vi leverer en detaljeret reproduktions- og ablationsundersøgelse af arkitekturen, der kaster lys over nogle af de potentielle forbehold ved genbrug af komplekse deep-learning arkitekturer. Vi viser endvidere, at en forenkling af visse aspekter af arkitekturen faktisk kan forbedre dens ydeevne. Vi undersøger også de sproglige enheder (segmenter) lært af forskellige niveauer af modellen, og argumenterer for, at deres kvalitet ikke korrelerer med modellens overordnede præstation på sprogmodellering.', 'id': 'LSTM Multiskala Hierarkis (Chung et. al., 2016) adalah model bahasa terbaik yang mempelajari struktur yang dapat diterjemahkan dari input tahap karakter. Model tersebut dapat menyediakan tanah buah untuk studi bahasa komputasi (kognitif). Namun, kompleksitas tinggi arsitektur, pelatihan dan implementasi mungkin menghalangi aplikabilitasnya. Kami menyediakan studi reproduksi dan ablasi terperinci dari arsitektur, melemparkan cahaya pada beberapa dari potensi caveats arsitektur belajar dalam kompleks kembali. Kami lebih lanjut menunjukkan bahwa penyimplifikasi aspek tertentu arsitektur dapat למעשה meningkatkan prestasinya. Kami juga menyelidiki unit bahasa (segmen) yang dipelajari oleh berbagai tingkat model, dan berdebat bahwa kualitas mereka tidak berkorelasi dengan prestasi umum model pada model bahasa.', 'fa': 'LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) یک مدل زبان هنری است که ساختار قابل تعبیر از ورودی سطح شخصیت را یاد می\u200cگیرد. این مدل\u200cها می\u200cتوانند برای مطالعه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی کامپیوتری (شناخته) زمینه\u200cای پذیر کنند. با این حال، پیچیدگی بزرگی از معماری، آموزش و عملیات ممکن است از کاربردی آن بازداشت کند. ما یک مطالعه تولید و فعالیت جزئیات از معماری را تغییر می دهیم، نور را روی بعضی از غارهای پتانسیل از معماری های عمیق یادگیری پیچیده دوباره پاک می کنیم. ما نشان می دهیم که ساده کردن نقطه\u200cهای خاص معماری می\u200cتواند در واقع عملکرد آن را بهتر کند. ما همچنین از واحدهای زبان\u200cشناسی (بخش\u200cها) که با سطح مختلف مدل یاد گرفته\u200cاند تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، و می\u200cگوییم که کیفیتشان با عملکرد کلی مدل در مورد مدل\u200cسازی زبان ارتباط ندارد.', 'sw': 'LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) ni mfano wa lugha ya sanaa inayojifunza muundo wa tafsiri kutoka kwa kiwango cha tabia. Mfano huu unaweza kutoa ardhi ya uzazi kwa utafiti wa lugha za kompyuta. Hata hivyo, utata mkubwa wa ujenzi, mafunzo na utekelezaji unaweza kuzuia matumizi yake. Tunatoa utafiti wa uzalishaji na ujenzi wa kina kuhusu ujenzi, kuonyesha mwangaza juu ya baadhi ya maeneo ya uwezekano wa kutafuta makazi ya kujifunza kwa mara nyingine. Tunaonyesha zaidi kwamba kuwezesha baadhi ya maeneo ya ujenzi yanaweza kuboresha ufanisi wake. We also investigate the linguistic units (segments) learned by various levels of the model, and argue that their quality does not correlate with the overall performance of the model on language modeling.', 'de': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) ist ein hochmodernes Sprachmodell, das interpretierbare Strukturen aus der Eingabe auf Zeichenebene lernt. Solche Modelle können einen fruchtbaren Boden für (kognitive) computerlinguistische Studien bieten. Die hohe Komplexität der Architektur, Schulungen und Implementierungen kann jedoch die Anwendbarkeit behindern. Wir bieten eine detaillierte Reproduktions- und Ablationsstudie der Architektur und beleuchten einige der potenziellen Vorbehalte der Re-Purposing komplexer Deep-Learning-Architekturen. Wir zeigen weiter, dass die Vereinfachung bestimmter Aspekte der Architektur ihre Leistung verbessern kann. Wir untersuchen auch die linguistischen Einheiten (Segmente), die von verschiedenen Ebenen des Modells gelernt werden, und argumentieren, dass ihre Qualität nicht mit der Gesamtleistung des Modells bei der Sprachmodellierung korreliert.', 'ko': '분층다자도 LSTM(Chung 등, 2016)은 가장 선진적인 언어 모델로 문자급 입력에서 해석 가능한 구조를 배울 수 있다.이런 모델은 계산언어학 연구에 비옥한 토양을 제공할 수 있다.그러나 구조, 교육과 실현의 고도의 복잡성은 그 적용성을 방해할 수 있다.우리는 이 체계 구조에 대해 상세한 복제와 소식 연구를 진행하여 복잡한 심도 학습 체계 구조를 재설계하는 잠재적인 주의사항을 밝혔다.우리는 아키텍처의 일부분을 간소화하면 사실상 성능을 향상시킬 수 있다는 것을 한층 더 보여 주었다.우리는 또한 서로 다른 차원의 모델이 학습한 언어 단원(부분)을 연구했고 그들의 질은 모델이 언어 모델링 방면의 전체적인 성능과 관련이 없다고 주장했다.', 'tr': 'LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) karakter derejesinden terjime edilebilir strukturuny öwrenýär. Bütin nusgalar bilýän köpüjilik dilleriniň(bilgili) sahypalaryna ýerleşdirip biler. Ýöne arhitektura, okuwçylyk we implementasynyň ýokary çykyşlygyny üýtgetmegi mümkin edip biler. Biz arhitektura barada nähili detaylar öwrenmek we çykyş edip biljek bir arhitektura baglanýarys, gaty kelläp derin öwrenmek arhitektura geçirmek üçin ýagtylygy çykarýarys. Biz indi arhitektura birnäçe aspektlerini ýeňil etmek üçin ukyplarymyz ýöne gelip biler. Biz hem dürli derejelerde öwrenen lingwistiki birimleri (segmentler) inceleýäris we olaryň kalitetleri dil modelleýän modelleýän nusgalaryna meňzeşlik däldir diýip pikir edýäris.', 'af': "Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) is 'n staat- of- the- art taal model wat leer ontwikkelbaar struktuur van karaktervlak invoer. Soos modele kan vrystele grond verskaf vir (kognitiewe) rekenasielike lingwisiese studie. Maar die hoë kompleksiteit van die arkitektuur, onderwerp en implementasies kan sy toepassing verhinder. Ons verskaf 'n gedetale reproduksie en ablasie studie van die arkitektuur, die lig op sommige van die potensiele speletjies van komplekse diep-leer-arkitektuur herverwyder. Ons wys verder dat die eenvoudiging van sekere aspekte van die arkitektuur in werklikheid sy prestasie kan verbeter. Ons ondersoek ook die lingwisiese eenhede (segmente) wat deur verskeie vlakke van die model geleer het, en spreek dat hulle kwaliteit nie verbind met die hele prestasie van die model op taal modellering nie.", 'sq': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) is a state-of-the-art language model that learns interpretable structure from character-level input.  Modelet e tilla mund të ofrojnë një bazë të pjekur për studimet (kognitive) gjuhësore kompjuterike. Megjithatë, kompleksiteti i lartë i arkitekturës, trainimit dhe zbatimit mund të pengojë aplikabilitetin e saj. Ne ofrojmë një studim të hollësishëm riprodhimi dhe ablacioni të arkitekturës, duke hedhur dritë mbi disa nga shpejtat e mundshme të rindërtimit të arkitekturave komplekse të mësimit të thellë. Ne tregojmë më tej se thjeshtimi i disa aspekteve të arkitekturës mund në fakt të përmirësojë performancën e saj. Ne gjithashtu hetojmë njësitë gjuhësore (segmentet) e mësuara nga nivelet e ndryshme të modelit dhe argumentojmë se cilësia e tyre nuk korrelon me performancën e përgjithshme të modelit gjuhësor.', 'am': 'በሀያማሪክ ብዛት LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) ሀገር-of-the-art ቋንቋ model ነው፤ ትርጉም መሠረት ከcharacter-level input ያስተምራል። እንደነዚህ ዓይነቶች ለቋንቋዎች ትምህርት መሬት ማቅረብ ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን የመዝገብ ግንኙነት፣ ማስተማር እና ተሟጋቾች የሥርዓት ግንኙነት ሊከለክሉ ይችላል፡፡ የመዝገብ ግንኙነት እና አካባቢ ምርመራ እና መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ አካባቢው ጉዳዩን ማሻሻል እናሳየዋለን፡፡ በቋንቋው ቋንቋዎች (ክፍሎች) በተለያዩ ደረጃዎች በሞዴል የተማሩ የቋንቋዎች ክፍተቶችን እናመርራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Հիերարքիկական բազմաչափ LSMT (Չունգ և այլն., 2016) լեզվի նորագույն մոդել է, որը սովորում է թարգմանելի կառուցվածք բնավորական մակարդակի ներմուծից: Այս մոդելները կարող են տալ պտուղ հող (ճանաչողական) հաշվարկների լեզվաբանական ուսումնասիրությունների համար: Սակայն ճարտարապետության, ուսուցման և իրականացման բարդ բարդությունը կարող է խոչընդոտել դրա կիրառելիությունը: We provide a detailed reproduction and ablation study of the architecture, shedding light on some of the potential caveats of re-purposing complex deep-learning architectures.  Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ճարտարապետության որոշ ասպեկտներ պարզաբանելը կարող է իրականում բարելավել դրա արտադրողությունը: Մենք նաև ուսումնասիրում ենք լեզվաբանական միավորները, որոնք սովորել են մոդելի տարբեր մակարդակների միջոցով, և փաստարկում ենք, որ նրանց որակը չի կապված լեզվաբանական մոդելի ընդհանուր արտադրողության հետ:', 'bn': 'মাল্টিক্যাল মাল্টিক্যাল এলসিএম (চুং এন্ট. al., ২০১৬) হচ্ছে একটি রাষ্ট্র-of-the-art ভাষা মডেল যা অক্ষর-level ইনপুট থেকে ব্যাখ্যায়ত এই ধরনের মডেলগুলো গণনাকৃত ভাষার গবেষণার জন্য উৎকৃষ্ট ভূমি প্রদান করতে পারে। তবে স্থাপত্তি, প্রশিক্ষণ এবং প্রয়োগের বেশী জটিলতা তার প্রয়োগ বাধা দিতে পারে। আমরা স্থাপত্তি সম্ভাব্য কিছু গুহা পুনরায় গভীর শিক্ষা প্রতিষ্ঠানের উদ্দেশ্যে একটি বিস্তারিত প্রজন্ম এবং আগুনের গবেষণা দিয়েছি। আমরা আরো দেখাচ্ছি যে আর্কিটারের কিছু বিষয় সহজ করে তার প্রভাব উন্নত করতে পারে। We also investigate the linguistic units (segments) learned by various levels of the model, and argue that their quality does not correlate with the overall performance of the model on language modeling.', 'az': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) karakter s…ôviyy…ôsind…ôn istifad…ô edil…ô bil…ôn quruluŇü modelindir. B√ľt√ľn modell…ôr (kognitiv) bilgisayar dil t…ôhsil…ôl…ôri √ľ√ß√ľn fertilik toprakńĪ t…ôhsil ed…ô bil…ôr. Ancaq, arhitektura, t…ôhsil v…ô implementasiyonlarńĪn y√ľks…ôk kompleksit…ôsi onun uyńüunluńüunu d…ôf ed…ô bil…ôr. Biz m…ôkt…ôb…ônin detaylńĪ n√ľtf…ôd…ô v…ô f…ôaliyy…ôt t…ôhsil edilm…ôsini t…ômin edirik, kompleks derin √∂yr…ônm…ôk m…ôkt…ôb…ôl…ôrinin b…ôzisinin √ľz…ôrind…ô iŇüńĪq √ß…ôkiririk. Biz daha da g√∂st…ôririk ki, arhitektura b…ôzi aspektl…ôrini asanlaŇüdńĪrmaq onun performansńĪnńĪ yaxŇüńĪlaŇüdńĪrabilir. Biz d…ô modell…ôrin m√ľxt…ôlif s…ôviyy…ôl…ôrind…ôn √∂yr…ôndiyi dil birlikl…ôrini inceleyirik v…ô onlarńĪn keyfiyy…ôti dil modell…ôrinin b√ľt√ľn performans il…ô …ôlaq…ôsi olmadńĪńüńĪnńĪ iddia edirik.', 'ca': "L'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et al., 2016) és un model de llenguatge més avançat que aprene una estructura interpretable a partir de les entrades a nivell de caràcter. Aquests models poden proporcionar terrenys fertiles per a estudis lingüístics (cognitius). However, the high complexity of the architecture, training and implementations might hinder its applicability.  Oferecem un estudi detallat de reproducció i ablació de l'arquitectura, tirant llum sobre alguns dels potencials caveats de la reimposició de complexes arquitectures d'aprenentatge profund. Ens mostram que simplificar certs aspectes de l'arquitectura pot millorar el seu rendiment. També investigam les unitats lingüístiques (segments) aprengutes per diversos nivells del model, i argumentem que la seva qualitat no correlaciona amb el rendiment global del model en la modelació lingüística.", 'cs': 'Hierarchický multiscale LSTM (Church et. al., 2016) je nejmodernější jazykový model, který se učí interpretovatelnou strukturu ze vstupu na úrovni znaků. Tyto modely mohou poskytnout plodnou půdu pro (kognitivní) výpočetní lingvistiku studia. Vysoká složitost architektury, školení a implementací však může bránit její použitelnosti. Poskytujeme detailní reprodukční a ablační studii architektury a vrháme světlo na některé z potenciálních důvodů přepracování komplexních architektur hlubokého učení. Dále ukazujeme, že zjednodušení určitých aspektů architektury může ve skutečnosti zlepšit její výkon. Dále zkoumáme jazykové jednotky (segmenty) naučené různými úrovněmi modelu a argumentujeme, že jejich kvalita nekoreluje s celkovým výkonem modelu na jazykovém modelování.', 'et': 'Hierarhical Multiscale LSTM (Church et al., 2016) on kaasaegne keelemudel, mis õpib tõlgendatavat struktuuri märgitasemel sisendist. Sellised mudelid võivad pakkuda viljakat alust (kognitiivsetele) arvutuslikele lingvistikauuringutele. Arhitektuuri, koolituse ja rakendamise suur keerukus võib siiski takistada selle kohaldatavust. Pakume arhitektuuri üksikasjalikku reproduktsiooni- ja ablatsiooniuuringut, heidates valgust keerukate sügavõppe arhitektuuride ümberkujundamise võimalikele nõuetele. Lisaks näitame, et teatavate arhitektuuriaspektide lihtsustamine võib tõepoolest parandada arhitektuuri tulemuslikkust. Samuti uurime mudeli erinevatel tasanditel õppitud keeleüksusi (segmente) ning väidame, et nende kvaliteet ei ole korrelatsioonis mudeli üldise tulemuslikkusega keele modelleerimisel.', 'fi': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Church et. al., 2016) on uusin kielimalli, joka oppii tulkittavan rakenteen merkkitason syötteestä. Tällaiset mallit voivat tarjota hedelmällistä maaperää (kognitiivisille) laskennallisille kielitieteen tutkimuksille. Arkkitehtuurin, koulutuksen ja toteutuksen suuri monimutkaisuus saattaa kuitenkin haitata sen sovellettavuutta. Tarjoamme yksityiskohtaisen jäljentämis- ja ablaatiotutkimuksen arkkitehtuurista, valottaen joitain monimutkaisten syväoppimisarkkitehtuurien uudelleenmäärittelyn mahdollisia haittoja. Osoitamme myös, että arkkitehtuurin tiettyjen näkökohtien yksinkertaistaminen voi itse asiassa parantaa sen suorituskykyä. Tutkimme myös mallin eri tasoilla opittuja kielellisiä yksiköitä (segmenttejä) ja väitämme, että niiden laatu ei korreloi mallin yleiseen suorituskykyyn kielimallinnuksessa.', 'bs': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) je državni jezički model koji nauči interpretabilnu strukturu iz ulaza na nivo karaktera. Takvi modeli mogu pružiti plodno područje za (kognitivne) računalne jezičke studije. Međutim, visoka kompleksnost arhitekture, obuke i provedbe bi mogla ometati njegovu primjenu. Mi pružamo detaljno proučavanje reprodukcije i aktivacije arhitekture, otvaranje svjetla na neke od potencijalnih pećina ponovno čišćenja kompleksnih arhitektura dubokog učenja. Dalje pokazujemo da pojednostavljanje određenih aspekta arhitekture može u stvari poboljšati svoj učinkovit. Istražujemo i lingvističke jedinice (segmenti) naučene različitim nivoima modela i tvrdimo da njihova kvaliteta ne povezuje sa ukupnim učinkom modela jezika.', 'he': 'LSTM Hierarchical Multiscale (Chung et. al., 2016) הוא מודל שפה מצוין ביותר שמלמד מבנה אפשרי לפרשנות מהכניסה ברמה אופי. דוגמנים כאלה יכולים לספק מקום פרי למחקרים (קוגניטיביים) של שפת מחשב. עם זאת, המורכבות הגבוהה של הארכיטקטורה, האימונים והשימושים עלולים למנוע את אפשרותו. אנחנו מספקים מחקר התרבות ופרט של הארכיטקטורה, משליך אור על חלק מהערות הפוטנציאליות של הארכיטקטורות המסובכות של הלימודים העמוקים. אנו נוספים מראים כי הפשטת היבטים מסוימים של האדריכלות יכולה למעשה לשפר את ביצועיה. אנו חוקרים גם את היחידות הלשוניות (חלקים) שנלמדו על ידי רמות שונות של הדוגמנית, ותווכחים שהאיכות שלהם לא מתחברת עם ההופעה הכללית של הדוגמנית על הדוגמניות לשפה.', 'sk': 'Hierarhični večstopenjski LSTM (Church et. al., 2016) je najsodobnejši jezikovni model, ki se uči razlagalne strukture iz vnosa znakov. Takšni modeli lahko zagotovijo plodno podlago za (kognitivne) računalniške jezikoslovne študije. Vendar pa lahko visoka kompleksnost arhitekture, usposabljanja in izvedb ovira njeno uporabo. Zagotavljamo podrobno reprodukcijsko in ablacijsko študijo arhitekture, ki osvetljuje nekatere potencialne opozorile ponovne namene kompleksnih arhitektur globokega učenja. Dodatno dokazujemo, da lahko poenostavitev nekaterih vidikov arhitekture dejansko izboljša njeno učinkovitost. Raziskujemo tudi jezikovne enote (segmente), ki se jih naučijo različne ravni modela, in trdimo, da njihova kakovost ni povezana s splošno uspešnostjo modela pri modeliranju jezikov.', 'jv': 'Hebrew Multiscale Laptop" and "Desktop Nanging, akeh akeh sing komplikasi luwih akeh, aturan ngono iso nggawe ngubah iso nggawe barang kanggo awak dhéwé. Awak dhéwé ngewehke perbudhakan nganggep nggawe lan ijol-ijolan karo architecture, nggawe barang langgar oleh dumadhan sing perbudhakan nganggep kuwi tindakan Where\'s the Open Source File System Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih nggawe barang akeh sing rumplin karo architecture iso nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang urip kuwi. Awak dhéwé éntuk karo unidadi ingkang (segment) sing paling nggambar luwih-luwih kaya model, lan ngongarep kuwi nggawe kalite dhéwé kuwi ora nggawe akeh operasi ning model kuwi model sing apik.', 'ha': "Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) is a state-of-the-art language model that learns interpretable structure from character-level input.  Wannan misalin za'a iya samar da bakin fara wa karatun cikin linguinin lissafi na lissafi. A lokacin da, muhimmanci na masu matsayin matsayi, mafarin aiki da shiryoyin ayuka za'a kange amfani da shi. Tuna samar da karatun na salo da muhimmanci na takardan matsayin, na shekara haske a kan wani abu na karar kõgon masu iya amfani da matsayin muhimmada. Kayya, Munã nũna cewa, mai sauƙi masu cikin matsayin na musamman, yana iya ƙara mafarinta. Tuna ɗauki sunayen linguistic (rabo) wanda aka sanar da shi daga wasu darajõji na misalin, kuma Munã yi jãyayya cẽwa sifar su ba ta yi kamid da shi ba da sami'in tsarin misalin harshe.", 'bo': 'Hierarchical Multiscale LSTM (Chung et. al., 2016) is a state-of-the-art language model that learns interpretable structure from character-level input. སྙན་རིས་གྲངས་སྤྱོད་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་གྲངས་རིག་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལྷག་འདུག ཡིན་ནའང་། སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གཙོ་ཆེ་མཐོ་རིམ་པ་དེ་ལ་འགྲོ་སློང་བ་དང་འཇུག་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་རྐྱེན་ཐུབ་ We provide a detailed reproduction and ablation study of the architecture, shedding light on some of the potential caveats of re-purposing complex deep-learning architectures. འུ་ཅག་གི་སྒྲིག་འགོད་གནས་སྟངས་ཤས་གཅིག་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་འགྱུར་བ་རེད་ཅེ། ང་ཚོས་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་གྱི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Character-Level Feature Extraction with Densely Connected Networks', 'ar': 'استخراج الميزات على مستوى الأحرف مع الشبكات المتصلة بكثافة', 'fr': "Extraction d'entités au niveau des caractères avec des réseaux fortement connectés", 'es': 'Extracción de funciones a nivel de caracteres con redes densamente conectadas', 'pt': 'Extração de recursos em nível de caractere com redes densamente conectadas', 'ja': '密接に接続されたネットワークを使用した文字レベルの機能抽出', 'zh': '用密集连网络字符级特征提取', 'hi': 'घनी कनेक्टेड नेटवर्क के साथ वर्ण-स्तर सुविधा निष्कर्षण', 'ru': 'Извлечение признаков на уровне символов с помощью плотно подключенных сетей', 'ga': 'Eastóscadh Gné Leibhéal Carachtair le Líonraí Dlúithe Nasctha', 'el': 'Εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών επιπέδου χαρακτήρων με πυκνά συνδεδεμένα δίκτυα', 'it': 'Estrazione di funzionalità a livello di carattere con reti densamente connesse', 'ka': 'სიმბოლოების დონე ფექტურის ექსტრექცია დაკავშირებული ქსელებით', 'hu': 'Karakterszintű funkciókivonás sűrűn csatlakoztatott hálózatokkal', 'ms': 'Ekstraksi Feature Aras-Aksara dengan Rangkaian Tersambung Dengan Densely', 'lt': 'Character Level Feature Extraction with Denely Connected Networks', 'mk': 'Екстракција на карактеристички ниво со тесно поврзани мрежи', 'kk': 'Қосылған желілерден таңбалар деңгейіндегі қасиеттерді тарқату', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni tal-Karatteristiċi fil-Livell tal-Karatteristiċi b’Netwerks Konnessi Dentament', 'mn': 'Хэрэгтэй холбогдсон сүлжээлүүдтэй харьцаа-түвшин боломжуудыг хадгалах', 'ml': 'വെറുതെ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകളുമായി അക്ഷരത്തിന്റെ നില വ്യവസ്ഥ പുറത്താക്കുക', 'no': 'Tekstnivå-funksjonspakking med nekta tilkopla nettverk', 'ro': 'Extragerea caracteristicilor la nivel de caractere cu rețele dense conectate', 'pl': 'Ekstrakcja funkcji na poziomie znaków z sieciami gęsto połączonymi', 'so': 'Iska soo saarista xarafta-darajada la xiriira Internetka', 'sr': 'Ekstrakcija karakterskih karakterskih nivoa karakterskih karakterskih funkcija sa odvratnim mrežama', 'si': 'අක්ෂර- ප්\u200dරමාණය සම්බන්ධ ජාලය සමඟ අක්ෂර- ප්\u200dරමාණයක් පිළිගන්න', 'ur': 'Name', 'sv': 'Extraktion av funktioner på teckenivå med tätt anslutna nätverk', 'ta': 'தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட பிணைப்புகளுடன் எழுத்து- நிலை பண்புகளை வெளியேற்றுதல்', 'uz': 'Belgilangan tarmoq bilan aloqa oʻrnatilmagan harf- darajasi moslamasi', 'vi': 'Bộ vẽ đặc trưng với mạng mật', 'bg': 'Извличане на функции на ниво символи с плътно свързани мрежи', 'da': 'Karakterniveau Feature Extraction med tæt forbundne netværk', 'de': 'Extraktion von Features auf Zeichenebene mit dicht vernetzten Netzwerken', 'id': 'Character-Level Feature Extraction with Densely Connected Networks', 'nl': 'Extractie van functies op karakterniveau met dicht verbonden netwerken', 'fa': 'اخراج ویژه\u200cهای سطح شخصیت با شبکه\u200cهای ارتباط به کفر', 'hr': 'Ekstrakcija karakterskih karakterskih karakterskih nivoa sa odvratnim mrežama', 'af': 'Name', 'ko': '밀접 네트워크 기반 문자급 특징 추출', 'tr': 'Karakter Derjesi Aç', 'hy': 'Նկարի մակարդակի առանձնահատկությունների արտահանումը խիստ կապված ցանցերով', 'sw': 'Character-Level Feature Extraction with Densely Connected Networks', 'bn': 'অক্ষর- স্তর বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী সংযুক্ত নেটওয়ার্কের সাথে এক্সট্র্যাকশন', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'Karakter-səviyyəsi Özü Çıqışma', 'bs': 'Ekstrakcija karaktera na nivou karaktera sa odvratnim mrežama', 'cs': 'Extrakce funkcí na úrovni znaků s hustě propojenými sítěmi', 'et': 'Märgitasemel funktsioonide ekstraheerimine tihedalt ühendatud võrkudega', 'fi': 'Merkkitason ominaisuuksien poisto tiheästi yhdistettyjen verkkojen avulla', 'sq': 'Character-Level Feature Extraction with Densely Connected Networks', 'ca': 'Extracció de característiques a nivell de caràcters amb xarxes estretament connectades', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'יציאת תכונות ברמה של אותיות עם רשתות מחוברות באופן עצום', 'sk': 'Izvlečevanje funkcij na ravni znakov z gosto povezanimi omrežji', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དང་ཉམས་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་འབྲུ་མཐུད་ཚད་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་ཕྱིར་འདོན'}
{'en': 'Generating character-level features is an important step for achieving good results in various natural language processing tasks. To alleviate the need for human labor in generating hand-crafted features, methods that utilize neural architectures such as Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) or Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) to automatically extract such features have been proposed and have shown great results. However, CNN generates position-independent features, and RNN is slow since it needs to process the characters sequentially. In this paper, we propose a novel method of using a densely connected network to automatically extract character-level features. The proposed method does not require any language or task specific assumptions, and shows robustness and effectiveness while being faster than CNN- or RNN-based methods. Evaluating this method on three sequence labeling tasks-slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging, and Named-Entity Recognition (NER)-we obtain state-of-the-art performance with a 96.62 F1-score and 97.73 % accuracy on slot tagging and POS tagging, respectively, and comparable performance to the state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score on NER.', 'ar': 'يعد إنشاء ميزات على مستوى الشخصية خطوة مهمة لتحقيق نتائج جيدة في مختلف مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. لتخفيف الحاجة إلى العمالة البشرية في إنشاء ميزات مصنوعة يدويًا ، تم اقتراح الأساليب التي تستخدم البنى العصبية مثل الشبكة العصبية التلافيفية (CNN) أو الشبكة العصبية المتكررة (RNN) لاستخراج هذه الميزات تلقائيًا وأظهرت نتائج رائعة. ومع ذلك ، فإن CNN تنشئ ميزات مستقلة عن الموضع ، و RNN بطيئة لأنها تحتاج إلى معالجة الأحرف بالتتابع. في هذا البحث ، نقترح طريقة جديدة لاستخدام شبكة متصلة بكثافة لاستخراج ميزات على مستوى الأحرف تلقائيًا. الطريقة المقترحة لا تتطلب أي لغة أو افتراضات مهمة محددة ، وتظهر المتانة والفعالية بينما تكون أسرع من الطرق المستندة إلى CNN أو RNN. تقييم هذه الطريقة في ثلاث مهام لوضع العلامات على التسلسل - وضع علامات على الفتحات ، ووضع علامات على جزء من الكلام (POS) ، والتعرف على الكيان المُسمّى (NER) - نحصل على أداء متطور مع درجة 96.62 F1 و 97.73٪ الدقة في وضع علامات على الفتحات وعلامات نقاط البيع ، على التوالي ، وأداء مشابه لأحدث نقاط 91.13 F1 على NER.', 'pt': 'A geração de recursos em nível de caractere é uma etapa importante para obter bons resultados em várias tarefas de processamento de linguagem natural. Para aliviar a necessidade de mão de obra humana na geração de recursos artesanais, métodos que utilizam arquiteturas neurais como Rede Neural Convolucional (CNN) ou Rede Neural Recorrente (RNN) para extrair automaticamente tais recursos foram propostos e têm mostrado ótimos resultados. No entanto, o CNN gera recursos independentes de posição e o RNN é lento, pois precisa processar os caracteres sequencialmente. Neste artigo, propomos um novo método de usar uma rede densamente conectada para extrair automaticamente recursos em nível de caractere. O método proposto não requer suposições específicas de linguagem ou tarefa, e mostra robustez e eficácia ao ser mais rápido do que métodos baseados em CNN ou RNN. Avaliando esse método em três tarefas de rotulagem de sequência - marcação de slot, marcação de parte da fala (POS) e reconhecimento de entidade nomeada (NER) - obtemos desempenho de última geração com uma pontuação F1 de 96,62 e 97,73% precisão na marcação de slot e marcação de POS, respectivamente, e desempenho comparável à pontuação F1 de 91,13 de última geração no NER.', 'es': 'La generación de funciones a nivel de personaje es un paso importante para lograr buenos resultados en varias tareas de procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Para aliviar la necesidad de trabajo humano en la generación de características hechas a mano, se han propuesto métodos que utilizan arquitecturas neuronales como la Red Neural Convolucional (CNN) o la Red Neural Recurrente (RNN) para extraer automáticamente dichas características y han demostrado excelentes resultados. Sin embargo, la CNN genera funciones independientes de la posición, y la RNN es lenta, ya que necesita procesar los personajes secuencialmente. En este artículo, proponemos un método novedoso para utilizar una red densamente conectada para extraer automáticamente características a nivel de caracteres. El método propuesto no requiere ningún lenguaje o suposición específica de la tarea, y muestra robustez y eficacia, a la vez que es más rápido que los métodos basados en CNN o RNN. Al evaluar este método en tres tareas de etiquetado de secuencias: etiquetado de ranuras, etiquetado de parte de voz (POS) y reconocimiento de entidad nombrada (NER), obtenemos un rendimiento de vanguardia con una puntuación F1 de 96,62 y una precisión del 97,73% en el etiquetado de ranuras y el etiquetado de POS, respectivamente, y un rendimiento comparable al de la tecnología más avanzada. art 91.13 Puntuación de F1 en NER.', 'fr': "La génération de fonctionnalités au niveau du caractère est une étape importante pour obtenir de bons résultats dans diverses tâches de traitement du langage naturel. Pour alléger le besoin de travail humain pour générer des caractéristiques artisanales, des méthodes utilisant des architectures neuronales telles que le réseau neuronal convolutionnel (CNN) ou le réseau de neurones récurrent (RNN) pour extraire automatiquement de telles caractéristiques ont été proposées et ont donné d'excellents résultats. Cependant, CNN génère des fonctionnalités indépendantes de la position, et RNN est lent car il doit traiter les caractères de manière séquentielle. Dans cet article, nous proposons une nouvelle méthode d'utilisation d'un réseau densément connecté pour extraire automatiquement des entités au niveau des caractères. La méthode proposée ne nécessite aucune hypothèse spécifique au langage ou à la tâche, et fait preuve de robustesse et d'efficacité tout en étant plus rapide que les méthodes basées sur CNN ou RNN. En évaluant cette méthode sur trois tâches d'étiquetage de séquence - le marquage des créneaux, le marquage des parties du discours (POS) et la reconnaissance d'entité nommée (NER) - nous obtenons des performances de pointe avec un score F1 de 96,62 et une précision de 97,73\xa0% sur le marquage des emplacements et des points de vente, respectivement, et des performances comparables à l'état de la technologie art 91.13 Score F1 sur NER.", 'ja': '文字レベルの機能を生成することは、さまざまな自然言語処理タスクで良好な結果を達成するための重要なステップです。 手作り特徴の生成における人間の労働の必要性を軽減するために、畳み込みニューラルネットワーク（ CNN ）または再帰ニューラルネットワーク（ RNN ）などのニューラルアーキテクチャを利用して、そのような特徴を自動的に抽出する方法が提案され、大きな成果を示している。 しかしながら、CNNは位置に依存しない機能を生成し、RNNは文字を順次処理する必要があるため、速度が遅い。 本稿では、文字レベルの特徴を自動的に抽出するために、密接に接続されたネットワークを使用する新規の方法を提案する。 提案された方法は、言語やタスク固有の仮定を必要とせず、CNNベースまたはRNNベースの方法よりも高速でありながら、堅牢性と有効性を示します。 この方法を、スロットタグ付け、部分音声（ POS ）タグ付け、および名前付きエンティティ認識（ NER ）の3つのシーケンスラベリングタスクで評価すると、スロットタグ付けとPOSタグ付けでそれぞれ96.62 F 1スコアと97.73 ％の精度、およびNERでの最先端の91.13 F 1スコアと同等の性能を備えた最先端のパフォーマンスが得られます。', 'zh': '生字符者,自然语言治之要也。 所以轻人工生成特征者,已建卷积神经网络(CNN)、递归神经网络(RNN)等神经架构自取之法,著为佳效。 然CNN 生非关位,且 RNN 甚迟,以其次第处字符也。 本文中,发用密集网络自取字符新法。 所言不须言语、任特定之设,而示出鲁棒性、有效性,疾于CNNRNN之术。 于三序(插槽标、词性 (POS) 标、名实识 (NER))上评之,得最先进之性,各于插槽标 POS 得 96.62 F1 分数与 97.73% 之准确率,而性与 NER 上最先进者 91.13 F1 分数相当。', 'hi': 'विभिन्न प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण कार्यों में अच्छे परिणाम प्राप्त करने के लिए चरित्र-स्तर की सुविधाओं को उत्पन्न करना एक महत्वपूर्ण कदम है। हाथ से तैयार की गई सुविधाओं को उत्पन्न करने में मानव श्रम की आवश्यकता को कम करने के लिए, ऐसी सुविधाओं को स्वचालित रूप से निकालने के लिए कनवल्शनल न्यूरल नेटवर्क (सीएनएन) या आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (आरएनएन) जैसे तंत्रिका आर्किटेक्चर का उपयोग करने वाले तरीकों का प्रस्ताव दिया गया है और महान परिणाम दिखाए गए हैं। हालांकि, सीएनएन स्थिति-स्वतंत्र सुविधाओं को उत्पन्न करता है, और आरएनएन धीमा है क्योंकि इसे वर्णों को क्रमिक रूप से संसाधित करने की आवश्यकता होती है। इस पेपर में, हम स्वचालित रूप से चरित्र-स्तर की सुविधाओं को निकालने के लिए घने जुड़े नेटवर्क का उपयोग करने की एक उपन्यास विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। प्रस्तावित विधि को किसी भी भाषा या कार्य विशिष्ट मान्यताओं की आवश्यकता नहीं होती है, और सीएनएन- या आरएनएन-आधारित तरीकों की तुलना में तेज होने के दौरान मजबूती और प्रभावशीलता दिखाता है। तीन अनुक्रम लेबलिंग कार्यों पर इस विधि का मूल्यांकन - स्लॉट टैगिंग, पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच (पीओएस) टैगिंग, और नामित-एंटिटी मान्यता (एनईआर) - हम क्रमशः स्लॉट टैगिंग और पीओएस टैगिंग पर 96.62 एफ 1-स्कोर और 97.73% सटीकता के साथ अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं, और एनईआर पर अत्याधुनिक 91.13 एफ 1-स्कोर के लिए तुलनीय प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Создание характеристик на уровне символов является важным шагом для достижения хороших результатов в различных задачах обработки естественного языка. Чтобы уменьшить потребность в человеческом труде при создании функций ручной работы, были предложены методы, которые используют нейронные архитектуры, такие как сверточная нейронная сеть (CNN) или рекуррентная нейронная сеть (RNN), чтобы автоматически извлечь такие функции, и показали большие результаты. Тем не менее, CNN генерирует функции, не зависящие от положения, а RNN работает медленно, поскольку ему необходимо последовательно обрабатывать символы. В этой статье мы предлагаем новый метод использования плотно связанной сети для автоматического извлечения признаков на уровне символов. Предложенный метод не требует каких-либо допущений в отношении языка или конкретной задачи и демонстрирует устойчивость и эффективность, одновременно будучи быстрее, чем методы на основе CNN или RNN. Оценивая этот метод по трем задачам маркировки последовательностей - пометка слотов, пометка части речи (POS) и распознавание именных сущностей (NER) - мы получаем современную производительность с 96,62 баллами F1 и 97,73% точностью по пометке слотов и пометке POS, соответственно, и сопоставимую производительность с современной 91,13 баллами F1 по NER.', 'ga': 'Céim thábhachtach chun torthaí maithe a bhaint amach i dtascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha éagsúla is ea gnéithe ar leibhéal na gcarachtar a ghiniúint. Chun an gá atá le saothair dhaonna chun gnéithe lámhdhéanta a ghiniúint a mhaolú, moltar modhanna a úsáideann ailtireachtaí néaracha mar Líonra Néarach Comhtháite (CNN) nó Líonra Néarach Athfhillteach (RNN) chun gnéithe den sórt sin a bhaint go huathoibríoch agus tá torthaí iontacha léirithe acu. Mar sin féin, gineann CNN gnéithe seasamh-neamhspleách, agus tá RNN mall toisc go gcaithfidh sé na carachtair a phróiseáil go seicheamhach. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modh nua chun líonra dlúthcheangailte a úsáid chun gnéithe ar leibhéal na gcarachtar a bhaint go huathoibríoch. Ní éilíonn an modh molta aon toimhdí a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga nó tasc, agus léiríonn sé stóinseacht agus éifeachtacht agus é níos tapúla ná modhanna CNN- nó RNN-bhunaithe. Agus an modh seo á mheas ar thrí thasc lipéadaithe seicheamh - clibeáil sliotán, clibeáil Pháirt-de-Caint (POS), agus Aitheantas Aonán Ainmnithe (NER) - faightear feidhmíocht den scoth le scór 96.62 F1 agus 97.73% cruinneas ar chlibeáil sliotán agus ar chlibeáil POS, faoi seach, agus feidhmíocht inchomparáide leis an scóir úrscothach 91.13 F1 ar NER.', 'el': 'Η δημιουργία χαρακτηριστικών σε επίπεδο χαρακτήρων είναι ένα σημαντικό βήμα για την επίτευξη καλών αποτελεσμάτων σε διάφορες εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Για να ανακουφιστεί η ανάγκη για ανθρώπινη εργασία στη δημιουργία χειροποίητων χαρακτηριστικών, έχουν προταθεί μέθοδοι που χρησιμοποιούν νευρωνικές αρχιτεκτονικές όπως το ανακυκλωμένο Νευρικό Δίκτυο (ή το επαναλαμβανόμενο Νευρικό Δίκτυο (για να εξαγάγουν αυτόματα τέτοια χαρακτηριστικά και έχουν δείξει μεγάλα αποτελέσματα. Ωστόσο, το παράγει ανεξάρτητα από τη θέση χαρακτηριστικά, και είναι αργό δεδομένου ότι πρέπει να επεξεργαστεί τους χαρακτήρες διαδοχικά. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια νέα μέθοδο χρήσης ενός πυκνά συνδεδεμένου δικτύου για την αυτόματη εξαγωγή χαρακτηριστικών επιπέδου χαρακτήρων. Η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος δεν απαιτεί καμία γλωσσική ή εργασία συγκεκριμένες παραδοχές και παρουσιάζει ανθεκτικότητα και αποτελεσματικότητα ενώ είναι ταχύτερη από τις μεθόδους που βασίζονται σε CNN ή RNN. Αξιολόγηση αυτής της μεθόδου σε τρεις εργασίες μαρκαρίσματος ακολουθίας: την επισήμανση αυλακώσεων, την επισήμανση μέρους ομιλίας (και την αναγνώριση ονοματεπώνυμων οντοτήτων (αποκτούμε απόδοση τελευταίας τεχνολογίας με ένα σκορ 96.62 και 97.73% ακρίβειας στην επισήμανση αυλακώσεων και την επισήμανση αντίστοιχα, και συγκρίσιμη απόδοση με την υπερσύγχρονη βαθμολογία 91.13 στο ΝΕΡ.', 'hu': 'Karakterszintű funkciók generálása fontos lépés a különböző természetes nyelvfeldolgozási feladatok jó eredményeinek eléréséhez. Annak érdekében, hogy enyhítse az emberi munka igényét a kézzel készített funkciók létrehozásában, olyan módszereket javasoltak, amelyek az idegi architektúrákat használják, mint például a Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) vagy a Recurrent Neural Network (RNN), hogy automatikusan kivonják ezeket a funkciókat, és nagyszerű eredményeket mutattak. A CNN azonban pozíciófüggetlen funkciókat generál, és az RNN lassú, mivel szekvenciálisan kell feldolgoznia a karaktereket. Ebben a tanulmányban egy új módszert javasolunk egy sűrűn csatlakoztatott hálózat használatára a karakterszintű funkciók automatikus kivonására. A javasolt módszer nem igényel nyelvi vagy feladatspecifikus feltételezéseket, és robusztusságot és hatékonyságot mutat, miközben gyorsabb, mint a CNN vagy RNN alapú módszerek. Ezt a módszert három szekvenciás címkézési feladaton értékelve - slot címkézés, Part-of-Speech (POS) címkézés és Neved-Entity Recognition (NER) - a legkorszerűbb teljesítményt érjük el 96,62 F1 pontszámmal és 97,73%-os pontossággal a slot címkézéssel és POS címkézéssel, valamint a legkorszerűbb 91,13 F1 pontszámmal a NER-en.', 'ka': 'Character-level ფუნქციების შექმნა არის მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილის შესაძლებლობა განსხვავებული ნაწილური ენის პროცესირების მომხმარებისთვის. ადამიანის სამუშაო მუშაობის შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც გამოყენება ნეიროლური აქტიქტიქტურები, როგორც Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) ან Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) ან აქტიქტურად გამოყენება ასეთი ფუნქტურების გამოყენებაში, იქნება მაგრამ, CNN იქნება პოციციონის განსაზღვრებული ფუნქციები, და RNN მარტივია, რადგან ის უნდა პროცესი სიმბოლოების შემდეგ. ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში პრომენტის მეტი გამოყენება ძალიან დაკავშირებული ქსელის ავტომატურად გამოყენება სიმბოლოების განსაზღვრებისთვის. პროგრამის შესაძლებელი პროგრამა არ მოჭირდება ყველა ენაზე ან დავალების განსაკუთრებული წარმოდგენების და გამოჩვენება ძალიან და ეფექტიურობა, როცა CNN- ან RNN-დაბათებული მე ამ პროცემის შესახებ სამი წერტილის შესახებ შესახებ - სიტყვის შესახებ, სიტყვის წერტილის ნაწილი (POS) მონიშვნა, და სახებ ინტერტის მონიშვნა (NER) - ჩვენ მივიღეთ სიტყვის შესახებ 96.62 F1 წერტილით და 97.73% წერტილის მარტივის შესახებ სიტყვის და POS-მარტივის და შესაბამისი პროცემის შესაბამისი პ', 'it': "Generare caratteristiche a livello di carattere è un passo importante per ottenere buoni risultati in varie attività di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. Per alleviare la necessità di lavoro umano nella generazione di caratteristiche artigianali, sono stati proposti metodi che utilizzano architetture neurali come la rete neurale convoluzionale (CNN) o la rete neurale ricorrente (RNN) per estrarre automaticamente tali caratteristiche e hanno mostrato grandi risultati. Tuttavia, CNN genera caratteristiche indipendenti dalla posizione, e RNN è lento poiché ha bisogno di elaborare i caratteri in sequenza. In questo articolo, proponiamo un nuovo metodo di utilizzo di una rete densamente connessa per estrarre automaticamente le caratteristiche a livello di carattere. Il metodo proposto non richiede alcun linguaggio o ipotesi specifiche del compito, e mostra robustezza ed efficacia pur essendo più veloce dei metodi basati su CNN o RNN. Valutando questo metodo su tre attività di etichettatura sequenziale - tag slot, tag Part-of-Speech (POS) e Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - otteniamo prestazioni all'avanguardia con un punteggio F1 96,62 e un'accuratezza del 97,73% rispettivamente su tag slot e tag POS, e prestazioni paragonabili allo stato dell'arte 91,13 F1-score su NER.", 'kk': 'Таңбалар деңгейінің мүмкіндіктерін құру - табиғи тілдерді өңдеу тапсырмаларында жақсы нәтижелерді жеткізу үшін маңызды қадам. Қол құрылған мүмкіндіктерді құру үшін адам жұмысының қажеттігін көшірмелеу үшін, Конvolutional Neural Network (CNN) немесе Қайталық Неврал Желі (RNN) секілді неврал архитектураларды автоматты түрде тарқату үшін әдістер ұсынылды және оның көп Бірақ CNN орны тәуелсіз мүмкіндіктерді құрады, және RNN баяу, себебі ол таңбаларды кейінгі ретінде өзгерту керек. Бұл қағазда, таңбалардың деңгейіндегі мүмкіндіктерін автоматты түрде тарқату үшін тұрақты желі қолданатын романдық әдісін таңдаймыз. Келтірілген әдістер CNN- немесе RNN негіздеген әдістерден тез жүргізілген тіл не тапсырманың арнайы тапсырмаларын талап етпейді. Бұл әдістерді үш реттік жарлық тапсырмаларында оқу - слот тегтері, сөйлеу бөлігі (POS) тегтері және аталған нысандарды анықтау (NER) деп оқу - біз 96.62 F1- нәтижесімен 96.62 F1- нәтижесінде және 97.73% нәтижесінде слот тегтері және POS тегтерінің тегтері және NER 91.13 F1- нәтижесінде салыстырылатын әдісте', 'lt': 'Žymelių lygio savybių kūrimas yra svarbus žingsnis siekiant gerų rezultatų įvairiose gamtinių kalbų apdorojimo užduotyse. Siekiant sušvelninti žmogaus darbo poreikį gaminant rankinius požymius, buvo pasiūlyti metodai, kuriais naudojamos neurologinės architektūros, pvz., konvolucinis neurologinis tinklas (CNN) arba pakartotinis neurologinis tinklas (RNN), kad tokie požymiai būtų automatiškai ištraukti, ir buvo pasiekti dideli rezultatai. However, CNN generates position-independent features, and RNN is slow since it needs to process the characters sequentially.  Šiame dokumente siūlome naują būdą naudoti tankiai prijungtą tinklą, kad būtų galima automatiškai ištraukti požymių lygį. Siūlomas metodas nereikalauja jokių konkrečių kalbų ar užduočių prielaidų ir rodo patikimumą ir veiksmingumą, tačiau jis yra greitesnis nei CNN arba RNN pagrįsti metodai. Evaluating this method on three sequence labeling tasks - slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging, and Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - we obtain state-of-the-art performance with a 96.62 F1-score and 97.73% accuracy on slot tagging and POS tagging, respectively, and comparable performance to the state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score on NER.', 'ms': 'Generating character-level features is an important step for achieving good results in various natural language processing tasks.  Untuk mengurangi keperluan kerja manusia dalam menghasilkan ciri-ciri buatan tangan, kaedah yang menggunakan arkitektur saraf seperti Rangkaian Neural Convolutional (CNN) atau Rangkaian Neural Recurrent (RNN) untuk mengekstrak ciri-ciri tersebut secara automatik telah diusulkan dan telah menunjukkan keputusan yang besar. Namun, CNN menghasilkan ciri-ciri independen-kedudukan, dan RNN lambat kerana ia perlu memproses aksara secara berturut-turut. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan kaedah baru untuk menggunakan rangkaian yang tersambung padat untuk mengekstrak secara automatik ciri-ciri aras aksara. Kaedah yang dicadangkan tidak memerlukan sebarang anggapan bahasa atau tugas khusus, dan menunjukkan ketepatan dan kegunaan semasa lebih cepat daripada kaedah berasaskan CNN atau RNN. Mengevaluasi kaedah ini pada tiga tugas label urutan - tag slot, tag Part-of-Speech (POS), dan Pengenalan Entiti-Nama (NER) - kita mendapatkan prestasi terbaik dengan nilai 96.62 F1 dan 97.73% akurat pada tag slot dan tag POS, secara berdasarkan, dan prestasi yang sama dengan nilai 91.13 F1 state-of-the-art pada NER.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന ജോലികളില്\u200d നല്ല ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പട കൈക്കൊണ്ടുള്ള പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതില്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്റെ ജോലിയുടെ ആവശ്യം ലഘൂകരിക്കുവാന്\u200d, കോണ്\u200dവോളേഷന്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്ക് പോലെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രീതികള്\u200d, അല്ലെങ്കി എന്നാലും സിഎന്\u200dഎന്\u200d സ്ഥാനത്തിലെ സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യതയുടെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. RNN പതുക്കെയാണ്. അതിന്റെ അക്ഷരങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവര ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. കറങ്ങാതെ ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ശൃംഖല ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d ഭാഷയോ ജോലിയോ പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ഊഹികങ്ങളോ ആവശ്യമില്ല, CNN- അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d RNN-അടിസ്ഥാനമായ രീതികളെ മൂന്നു സെക്കന്റ് ലേബിള്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന ജോലികളുടെ മേല്\u200d ഈ രീതിയില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കുന്നു. സ്ലോട്ട് ടാഗ്ഗിംഗ്, ഭാഗം- ഓഫ് സംസാരം, പേര് എന്റിറ്റി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതും (NER) - നമുക്ക് 96. 62 F1 സ്കോര്\u200d സ്ലോട്ട് ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങും 97. 73% ശ്രീത', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл боловсруулах үйл ажиллагаанд сайн үр дүнг олох нь чухал алхам юм. Хүн төрөлхтөн ажиллах хэрэгцээ нь гараар бүтээгдэхүүнийг бий болгохын тулд Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) эсвэл Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) шиг мэдрэлийн архитектуруудыг автоматжуулахын тулд автоматжуулах боломжтой болсон бөгөөд гайхалтай үр дүнг харуулсан. Гэвч CNN нь байр суурь тогтнолтой байрлал бий болгодог бөгөөд ДНХ нь бага байдаг учир нь тэр дүрсийг дараа нь үйлдвэрлэх хэрэгтэй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хүмүүсийн түвшинд автоматаар холбогдсон сүлжээг ашиглах шинэ арга зам санал болгож байна. Өөрчлөлтийн арга нь хэл, ажлын тодорхой тодорхойлолтуудыг хэрэглэхгүй. CNN-эсвэл RNN-ын суурь аргаас илүү хурдан байх үед хүчтэй болон үр дүнтэй байдлыг харуулдаг. Энэ аргыг гурван дарааллын маркингийн даалгаврын талаар дүгнэх нь slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging, Named-Entity Recognition (NER)-ын талаар бид 96.62 F1-score болон POS tagging дээр 97.73% тохиромжтой болон NER-ын урлагийн 91.13 F1-score дээр харьцуулагдах үйл ажиллагааг авна.', 'no': 'Oppretting av karakternivåfunksjonar er ein viktig steg for å oppnå gode resultat i ulike naturspråk- handsamingsoppgåver. For å redusera behov for menneskelig arbeid i å laga håndkopla funksjonar, har metodar som brukar neuralarkitekturar som Konvolusjonell Neuralnettverk (CNN) eller gjentakelig Neuralnettverk (RNN) for å automatisk pakka ut slike funksjonar, og har vist stor resultat. CNN lagar likevel posisjonsuavhengige funksjonar, og RNN er tregt sidan han må handsama teikna ettersom. I denne papiret foreslår vi eit nytt metode for å bruka eit tett tilkopla nettverk for å pakka ut funksjonar for teiknivå automatisk. Det foreslåde metoden krev ikkje nokon språk eller oppgåve- spesifikke antar, og viser kraftighet og effektivitet mens det er raskare enn CNN- eller RNN-baserte metodar. Evaluerer denne metoden på tre rekkefølgjande oppgåver – slot tagging, Part of Speech (POS) tagging, og Named-Entity Recognition', 'mt': 'Il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi fil-livell tal-karattru hija pass importanti biex jinkisbu riżultati tajbin f’diversi kompiti ta’ pproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Biex tittaffa l-ħtieġa għax-xogħol uman fil-ġenerazzjoni ta’ karatteristiċi maħduma bl-idejn, ġew proposti metodi li jużaw arkitetturi newrali bħan-Netwerk newrali konvoluzzjonali (CNN) jew in-Netwerk newrali rikorrenti (RNN) biex jiġu estratti awtomatikament dawn il-karatteristiċi u wrew riżultati kbar. Madankollu, CNN jiġġenera karatteristiċi indipendenti mill-pożizzjoni, u RNN huwa bil-mod peress li jeħtieġ jipproċessa l-karattri b’mod sekwenzjali. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodu ġdid ta’ użu ta’ netwerk densament konness biex jiġu estratti awtomatikament karatteristiċi fil-livell tal-karattri. The proposed method does not require any language or task specific assumptions, and shows robustness and effectiveness while being faster than CNN- or RNN-based methods.  L-evalwazzjoni ta’ dan il-metodu fuq tliet kompiti ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenza - tikkettar tas-slots, tikkettar tal-Parti tal-Kellem (POS), u Rikonoxximent tal-Entità Ismija (NER) - inkisbu prestazzjoni l-aktar avvanzata b’punteġġ F1 96.62 u preċiżjoni ta’ 97.73% fuq it-tikkettar tas-slots u tikkettar tal-POS, rispettivament, u prestazzjoni komparabbli mal-punteġġ F1 91.13 l-aktar avvanzat fuq in-NER.', 'ro': 'Generarea caracteristicilor la nivel de caracter este un pas important pentru obținerea de rezultate bune în diferite sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural. Pentru a atenua nevoia de muncă umană în generarea caracteristicilor lucrate manual, metode care utilizează arhitecturi neuronale, cum ar fi Rețeaua Neurală Convoluțională (CNN) sau Rețeaua Neurală Recurentă (RNN) pentru a extrage automat astfel de caracteristici au fost propuse și au arătat rezultate excelente. Cu toate acestea, CNN generează caracteristici independente de poziție, iar RNN este lent deoarece trebuie să proceseze caracterele secvențial. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă nouă de utilizare a unei rețele dense conectate pentru a extrage automat caracteristici la nivel de caracter. Metoda propusă nu necesită presupuneri specifice limbajului sau sarcinilor și arată robustețe și eficacitate, în același timp fiind mai rapidă decât metodele bazate pe CNN sau RNN. Evaluând această metodă pe trei sarcini de etichetare a secvențelor - etichetarea sloturilor, etichetarea Part-of-Speech (POS) și recunoașterea entităților denumite (NER) - obținem performanțe de ultimă oră cu un scor F1 de 96,62 și o acuratețe de 97,73% la etichetarea sloturilor și, respectiv, etichetarea POS, și performanțe comparabile cu scorul F1 de ultimă generație 91,13 pe NER.', 'mk': 'Генерирањето на карактеристички карактеристики е важен чекор за постигнување добри резултати во различни природни задачи за обработување јазици. За да се олесни потребата од човечка труд во генерирањето рачно направени карактеристики, се предложени методи кои користат нервни архитектури како што се Конволуционалната нервна мрежа (CNN) или Рекурентната нервна мрежа (RNN) за автоматски да се извадат вакви карактеристики и покажаа големи резултат Сепак, ЦНН генерира независни карактеристики од позиција, а РНН е бавен бидејќи мора да ги процесира карактерите секвенцијално. Во овој весник предложуваме нов метод за користење на густо поврзана мрежа за автоматски извлекување на карактеристички карактеристики. The proposed method does not require any language or task specific assumptions, and shows robustness and effectiveness while being faster than CNN- or RNN-based methods.  Оваа оценка на овој метод на три задачи за означување на секвенца - означување на слотови, означување на дел од говорот (POS) и признавање на именуван ентитет (NER) - добиваме најнова резултат со 96,62 F1-оценка и 97,73 отсто точност на означување на слотови и POS-оценка, односно, и споредлива резултат со најновата 91,13 F1-оценка на NER.', 'pl': 'Generowanie funkcji na poziomie znaków jest ważnym krokiem do osiągnięcia dobrych rezultatów w różnych zadaniach przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Aby złagodzić potrzebę ludzkiej pracy w generowaniu ręcznie wykonanych funkcji, zaproponowano metody, które wykorzystują architektury neuronowe, takie jak Konwolucyjna Sieć Neuralna (CNN) lub Recurrent Neuroral Network (RNN), aby automatycznie wyodrębnić takie funkcje i wykazały doskonałe rezultaty. Jednak CNN generuje funkcje niezależne od pozycji, a RNN jest powolny, ponieważ musi przetwarzać znaki kolejno. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy nowatorską metodę wykorzystania gęsto połączonej sieci do automatycznego wyodrębniania cech na poziomie znaków. Proponowana metoda nie wymaga żadnych założeń językowych ani specyficznych dla zadania, wykazuje solidność i skuteczność, a jednocześnie jest szybsza niż metody oparte na CNN lub RNN. Oceniając tę metodę na trzech zadaniach etykietowania sekwencji: tagowanie slotów, tagowanie części mowy (POS) i rozpoznawanie nazwanych jednostek (NER) uzyskujemy najnowocześniejszą wydajność z wynikiem 96.62 F1 i 97.73% dokładności tagowania slotów i tagowania POS, odpowiednio, oraz porównywalną wydajnością do najnowocześniejszego wyniku 91.13 F1 na NER.', 'sr': 'Generacija karakterskih karakterskih karakterskih karakterskih karakterskih funkcija je važan korak za ostvarivanje dobrih rezultata u različitim zadacima obrade prirodnog jezika. Da bi olakšali potrebu za ljudskim radom u stvaranju funkcija koje su napravljene rukama, predložene su metode koje koriste neuralne arhitekture kao što su Konvolucionalna Neuralna mreža (CNN) ili ponovna Neuralna mreža (RNN) za automatski izvlačenje takvih karakteristika i pokazale su velike rezultate. Međutim, CNN stvara nezavisne karakteristike na poziciji, a RNN je spor jer mora sekvenciji procesirati karaktere. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu da koristimo gustu povezanu mrežu da bi automatski izvukli karakterske funkcije. Predložena metoda ne zahteva nikakve konkretne pretpostavke jezika ili zadatka, i pokazuje robustnost i učinkovitost dok je brže od metoda na CNN-u ili RNN-u. Procjenjujući ovu metodu na tri uzorke označavanja sekvencija - označavanje slot a, označavanje dijela govora (POS) i prepoznavanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) - dobijemo izvedbu stanja umjetnosti sa 96,62 F1 rezultata i tačnost 97,73% na označavanju slota i označavanju POS-a, odgovarajući, i usporednost izvedbe stanja umjetnosti 91,13 F1 rezultata na NER-u.', 'sv': 'Att generera funktioner på karaktärsnivå är ett viktigt steg för att uppnå goda resultat i olika naturliga språkbehandlingsuppgifter. För att lindra behovet av mänskligt arbete för att generera handgjorda funktioner har metoder som använder neurala arkitekturer såsom Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) eller Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) för att automatiskt extrahera sådana funktioner föreslagits och har visat bra resultat. CNN genererar dock positionsoberoende funktioner, och RNN är långsam eftersom det behöver bearbeta tecknen sekventiellt. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en ny metod för att använda ett tätt anslutet nätverk för att automatiskt extrahera karaktärsfunktioner. Den föreslagna metoden kräver inga språk- eller uppgiftsspecifika antaganden, och visar robusthet och effektivitet samtidigt som den är snabbare än CNN- eller RNN-baserade metoder. Genom att utvärdera denna metod på tre sekvensmärkningsuppgifter - korttaggning, POS-taggning och Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - erhåller vi toppmodern prestanda med 96,62 F1-poäng respektive 97,73% noggrannhet på korttaggning respektive POS-taggning, och jämförbar prestanda med den senaste 91,13 F1-poängen på NER.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය විවිධ භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණයේ හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර මිනිස්සුන් වැඩකට අත් කරපු විශේෂතාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න අවශ්\u200dය අවශ්\u200dය විද්\u200dයාවක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, නිර්මාණ විශේෂතාව භාවිත කරපු විද්\u200dයාවක් වගේ ConVol නමුත්, CNN ස්ථාන ස්ථානයෙන් ස්ථානය විශේෂතාවක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම RNN ස්ථානය විශේෂයෙන් අ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශේෂය සම්බන්ධයක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විධානයේ කිසිම භාෂාවක් නැත්තම් විශේෂ විශේෂයක් අවශ්\u200dය නැහැ, ඒ වගේම CNN- නැත්තම් RNN-විධානය This way on three sequence Labling Jobs - slot Tagging, Parts-of-Talk (POS) Tagging, and Named-Unitity Recording (NER) - we got state-of-the-art Perfection with a 96.62 F1-score and 97.73% Precracy on slot Tagging and POS Tagging, venerably, and comparble Perfection to the state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score on NER.', 'so': 'Isticmaalka heer-heer waa tallaabo muhiim ah oo ku imaanshaha arimaha lagu baaraandegayo arimaha kala duduwan luuqadaha dabiicadda ah. Si loo fududeeyo baahida shaqada dadka in ay sameeyaan tayooyin ay gacanta-crafteed, methods that utilizi dhismaha neural, such as Convolution Neural Network (CNN) or Recurrence Neural Network (RNN) in ay automatically extract such features, and have shown the results weyn. Si kastaba ha ahaatee CNN wuxuu soo saaraa heer xor ah, RNN waa u gaaban yahay, sababtoo ah in loo baahdo in ay sameeyo qalabka dabadeed. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaab saxda ah oo lagu isticmaalayo shabakad aad u xiran tahay si aan automatic uga soo bixino tayada heerka. Midabka la soo jeedo looma baahna qof luuqad ama shaqo oo gaar ah, wuxuuna tusiyaa fikrada iyo waxqabashada, marka uu dhaqso u noqdo qaababka CNN- ama RNN-based. Qiimeynta qaabkaas oo ku qoran saddex xilli oo lagu qorayo shaqooyin-slot tagging, Part of-Speech (POS) tagging, and magac-Entity Recognition (NER) - waxaan helaynaa xaalad-art with a 96.62 F1 score iyo 97.73% sax ah oo ku saabsan slot tagging and POS tagging, oo u eg sameynta xiliga sanad-91.13 F1 score ee NER.', 'ta': 'எழுத்து- மட்டத்தின் குணங்களை உருவாக்குவது இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாடுகளில் நல்ல முடிவுகளை பெறுவதற்கு முக்கியமான பட கையில் செய்யப்பட்ட பண்புகளை உருவாக்க மனித செயல்பாட்டின் தேவையை எளிதாக்குவதற்கு, முறைமைகளை பயன்படுத்தும் நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல் (CNN) அல்லது மீண்டும் நிகழ்ந்த நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல @ info இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய முறைமையை பயன்படுத்தி தன்னியக்கமாக எழுத்து- மட்டத்தின் தன்மையை வெளியேற்றுவதற்கான ஒரு ப முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட முறைமையில் எந்த மொழி அல்லது செயல் குறிப்பிட்ட கருத்துக்களுக்கும் தேவையில்லை, மற்றும் CNN- அல்லது RNN-  மூன்று வரிசையான குறியீட்டு பணிகளின் மீது இந்த முறையை மதிப்பிடுகிறது - slot tagging, Part of Speech (POS) tagging, and Named- Entity Recognition (NER) - நாங்கள் நிலைமையை பெறுகிறோம் 96. 62 F1- score and 97. 73% சரியான வெட்டி ஒட்டுதல் மற்றும் POS ஒட்டுதல் மற்றும் NER- art- 91. 13 F1-', 'ur': 'Character-level فعالیت پیدا کرنے کے لئے بہترین نتیجے پہنچانے کے لئے ایک اہم قدم ہے۔ ہاتھ-کرافٹ کے فرصت پیدا کرنے کے لئے انسان کے کام کی ضرورت کو کمزور کرنے کے لئے، ایسے طریقے ہیں جن کی استعمال کرتی ہیں جیسے Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) یا دوبارہ Neural Network (RNN) اس طرح اضافہ کرنے کے لئے اور بہت بڑے نتیجے دکھائے جاتے ہیں۔ لیکن، سی ان اس نے موقعیت-مستقل ویژے پیدا کیے ہیں، اور RNN آسان ہے کیونکہ اس کے لئے آئندہ آئندہ کے ساتھ پیدا کرنے کی ضرورت ہے. اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک نئی طریقہ پیش کریں گے کہ ایک گہرے نٹورک کا استعمال کریں تابع سطح کے متعلق فائولوں کو اضافہ کریں۔ پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کسی زبان یا کوشش کی مخصوص فرض کی ضرورت نہیں ہے، اور سی ان سے زیادہ سریع اور فعالیت دکھاتا ہے جبکہ وہ سی ان سے زیادہ سریع ہو رہا ہے یا RNN بنیادی طریقے سے۔ اس طریقہ کو تین سیر لیبلینگ ٹاکس پر مطالب کیا گیا ہے - slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging, and Named-Entity Recognition', 'uz': "Tafsilotlar Name @ info Bu qogʻozda, biz murakkab bogʻ'liq tarmoqni ishlatish uchun qogʻoz darajadagi imkoniyatlarni avtomatik olib tashlash uchun novel usulini talab qilamiz. Talab qilingan usul hech qanday til yoki vazifa foydalanishi kerak emas, va CNN yoki RNN asosida tez bo'lgan usullarni ko'rsatadi. Name", 'vi': 'Tạo các tính năng cấp độ đặc trưng là một bước quan trọng để đạt được kết quả tốt trong các công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Để giảm thiểu nhu cầu lao động con người trong việc tạo ra các tính năng tự làm tay, các phương pháp sử dụng các kiến trúc thần kinh như kênh thần kinh có liên kết (CNN) hay tiếp tục mạng thần kinh (RNN) để tự động trích các tính năng đó đã được đề xuất và đã cho thấy kết quả tốt. Tuy nhiên, CNN tạo ra tính năng độc lập tư thế, và RNN rất chậm, vì nó cần phải xử lý các ký tự theo nhau. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp mới để sử dụng một mạng có liên quan mật độ đặc biệt để tự động trích các tính chất. Phương pháp đề nghị không yêu cầu bất kỳ giả định ngôn ngữ hay nhiệm vụ nào, và cho thấy sự vững chắc và hiệu quả trong khi chạy nhanh hơn phương pháp dựa trên CNN hay RNN. Đánh giá phương pháp này dựa trên ba hiệu ứng phân chia hàng loạt các công việc - đánh dấu suất, phần-of-Speech (POS) và Named-Entity recognition (NER) - chúng ta đạt được trình độ cao nghệ thuật với 96.62 F1-score và 97.73=. Chính xác trong việc đánh dấu thời gian và thẻ vị trí vị trí, và tương ứng với sản phẩm cập-of-the-Art-time-the-tae.13 F1-score on NER.', 'bg': 'Генерирането на функции на ниво символ е важна стъпка за постигане на добри резултати в различни задачи за обработка на естествен език. За да се облекчи нуждата от човешки труд при генерирането на ръчно изработени функции, са предложени методи, които използват невронни архитектури като конвелуционна невронна мрежа (CNN) или повтаряща се невронна мрежа (RNN) за автоматично извличане на такива функции и показват големи резултати. Въпреки това, генерира независими от позицията функции, а RNN е бавен, тъй като трябва да обработва символите последователно. В тази статия предлагаме нов метод за използване на гъсто свързана мрежа за автоматично извличане на функции на ниво символ. Предложеният метод не изисква никакви специфични езикови или задачи предположения и показва здравина и ефективност, като същевременно е по-бърз от базираните на CNN или RNN методи. Оценявайки този метод на три задачи за етикетиране на последователността - маркиране на слотове, маркиране на част от речта (ПОС) и разпознаване на имена на субекти (НР) - получаваме най-съвременно представяне с 96,62 точки и 97,73% точност при маркиране на слотове и ПОС маркиране съответно, и сравнима производителност с най-съвременната 91,13 точки на НЕР.', 'da': 'Generering af karakterniveau funktioner er et vigtigt skridt for at opnå gode resultater i forskellige naturlige sprogbehandlingsopgaver. For at afhjælpe behovet for menneskelig arbejde i at generere håndlavede funktioner, metoder, der udnytter neurale arkitekturer såsom Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) eller Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) til automatisk at udtrække sådanne funktioner er blevet foreslået og har vist gode resultater. CNN genererer dog positionsuafhængige funktioner, og RNN er langsom, da det skal behandle tegnene sekventielt. I denne artikel foreslår vi en ny metode til at bruge et tæt tilsluttet netværk til automatisk at udtrække karakterniveau funktioner. Den foreslåede metode kræver ingen sprog- eller opgavespecifikke antagelser, og viser robusthed og effektivitet samtidig med at den er hurtigere end CNN- eller RNN-baserede metoder. Ved at evaluere denne metode på tre sekvensmærkningsopgaver - slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging og Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - opnår vi state-of-the-art ydeevne med en 96,62 F1-score og 97,73% nøjagtighed på slot tagging og POS tagging, henholdsvis, og sammenlignelig ydeevne med state-of-the-art 91,13 F1-score på NER.', 'nl': 'Het genereren van kenmerken op karakterniveau is een belangrijke stap voor het behalen van goede resultaten in verschillende natuurlijke taalverwerkingstaken. Om de behoefte aan menselijke arbeid bij het genereren van handgemaakte functies te verlichten, zijn methoden voorgesteld die neurale architecturen zoals Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) of Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) gebruiken om dergelijke functies automatisch te extraheren. CNN genereert echter positieonafhankelijke functies, en RNN is traag omdat het de karakters opeenvolgend moet verwerken. In dit artikel stellen we een nieuwe methode voor om een dicht verbonden netwerk te gebruiken om automatisch kenmerken op karakterniveau te extraheren. De voorgestelde methode vereist geen taal- of taakspecifieke aannames en toont robuustheid en effectiviteit terwijl ze sneller is dan CNN- of RNN-gebaseerde methoden. Door deze methode te evalueren op drie sequentie labeling taken: slot tagging, part-of-speech (POS) tagging en Named-Entity Recognition (NER) verkrijgen we state-of-the-art prestaties met respectievelijk 96.62 F1-score en 97.73% nauwkeurigheid op slot tagging en POS tagging, en vergelijkbare prestaties met de state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score op NER.', 'de': 'Die Generierung von Features auf Zeichenebene ist ein wichtiger Schritt, um gute Ergebnisse bei verschiedenen Aufgaben der natürlichen Sprachverarbeitung zu erzielen. Um den Bedarf an menschlicher Arbeit bei der Erzeugung von handgefertigten Merkmalen zu verringern, wurden Methoden vorgeschlagen, die neuronale Architekturen wie Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) oder Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) verwenden, um solche Merkmale automatisch zu extrahieren. CNN generiert jedoch positionsunabhängige Features und RNN ist langsam, da es die Zeichen sequenziell verarbeiten muss. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine neuartige Methode vor, ein dicht vernetztes Netzwerk zu nutzen, um Merkmale auf Zeichenebene automatisch zu extrahieren. Die vorgeschlagene Methode erfordert keine sprachlichen oder aufgabenspezifischen Annahmen, zeigt Robustheit und Effektivität und ist gleichzeitig schneller als CNN- oder RNN-basierte Methoden. Durch die Evaluierung dieser Methode auf drei Sequenz-Beschriftungsaufgaben Slot Tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) Tagging und Named-Entity Recognition (NER) erhalten wir eine State-of-the-Art Performance mit 96.62 F1-Score und 97.73% Genauigkeit bei Slot Tagging bzw. POS Tagging, und vergleichbare Leistung mit dem State-of-the-Art 91.13 F1-Score auf NER.', 'id': 'Menjana fitur tingkat karakter adalah langkah penting untuk mencapai hasil yang baik dalam berbagai tugas proses bahasa alam. Untuk mengurangi kebutuhan pekerjaan manusia dalam menghasilkan fitur-fitur buatan tangan, metode yang menggunakan arsitektur saraf seperti jaringan saraf konvolusi (CNN) atau jaringan saraf rekurren (RNN) untuk secara otomatis mengekstraksi fitur-fitur tersebut telah diusulkan dan telah menunjukkan hasil besar. Namun, CNN menghasilkan ciri-ciri independen posisi, dan RNN lambat karena perlu memproses karakter secara berturut-turut. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metode baru untuk menggunakan jaringan yang terhubung padat untuk secara otomatis mengekstrak fitur-fitur tahap karakter. Metode yang diusulkan tidak membutuhkan apapun bahasa atau asumsi spesifik tugas, dan menunjukkan ketepatan dan efektivitas sementara lebih cepat dari metode berdasarkan CNN atau RNN. Mengevaluasi metode ini pada tiga urutan tugas label - slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging, dan Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - kami mendapatkan prestasi state-of-the-art dengan 96.62 F1-score dan 97.73% akurasi pada slot tagging dan POS tagging, respektif, dan prestasi yang komparabbl dengan state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score pada NER.', 'hr': 'Stvaranje karakterskih funkcija je važan korak za ostvarivanje dobrih rezultata u različitim zadacima obrade prirodnog jezika. Da bi se smanjila potreba za ljudskim radom u stvaranju karakteristika na rukama, predložene su metode koje koriste neuralne arhitekture poput Konvolucionalne Neuralne mreže (CNN) ili ponovne Neuralne mreže (RNN) za automatski izvlačenje takvih karakteristika i pokazale su velike rezultate. Međutim, CNN stvara nezavisne funkcije na poziciji, a RNN je spor jer mora postupati karaktere. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu korištenja guste povezane mreže kako bi se automatski izvukli karakterističke karakterske funkcije. Predložena metoda ne zahtijeva određene pretpostavke jezika ili zadatka i pokazuje robustnost i učinkovitost dok je brže od metoda na CNN-u ili RNN-u. Procjenjujući ovu metodu na tri zadatka označavanja sekvencija - označavanje slot a, označavanje dijela govora (POS) i priznanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) - dobijemo postupak umjetnosti s 96,62 F1 rezultatom i tačnost 97,73% na označavanju slota i označavanju POS-a, odgovarajući, i usporednost postupaka s ocjenom stanja umjetnosti 91,13 F1 na NER-u.', 'tr': 'Karakter derejesi bejermek tiz işlemek üçin gowy netijesi ýetirmek üçin wajyp adımdır. Adamlar işiniň elimden çykyş özelliklerini janlaşdyrmak üçin, bu şekilde özüni oňat harplary çykmak üçin näyral arhitektarlaryň (CNN) ýaly Kerçekli Näyral Network (RNN) bilen üýtgetmek üçin ullanýar we uly netijeleri görkezilýär. Emma, CNN goragsyz möhümlerini döredir, we RNN ýuwaşlyk möhüm karakterlerni soňra işlemelidigine görä ýuwaşlyk bar. Bu kagyzda, karakter derejesini otomatik a ňlamak üçin tigirli bir şebeke ulanmagy täze bir roman yöntemi teklip edýäris. Bu teklip yöntemi CNN-ýa-da RNN tabanly çykyşlardan ýok bir dil ýa-da täsirli pikirlere gerek däldir. Bu döwüri üç sanat etiketlemesi takmynlarynda çykýarys - slot etiketlemesi, söz etiketlemesi (POS) bölümi, we Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - sanat etiketlemesi 96.62 F1 अंतर we 97.73% sanat etiketlemesi we POS etiketlemesi bilen deňleşikli we sungat 91.13 F1 अंतर we NER-de deňleşikli bir şekilde çykýarys.', 'fa': 'ایجاد ویژه\u200cهای سطح شخصیت یک قدم مهم برای رسیدن نتیجه\u200cهای خوب در کار\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی مختلف است. برای تخفیف نیازی به کار انسان در تولید ویژگی\u200cهای دستی ساخته شده، روش\u200cهای استفاده از معماری\u200cهای عصبی مانند شبکه عصبی (CNN) یا شبکه عصبی دوباره (RNN) برای اخراج از این ویژگی\u200cها به خودکار پیشنهاد شده و نتایج بزرگی نشان داده شده\u200cاند. با این حال، CNN ویژگی\u200cهای مستقل به موقعیت تولید می\u200cکند، و RNN آهسته است از آنجا که لازم است به طریق بعدی بررسی شخصیت\u200cها کند. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش رمانی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از یک شبکه متصل به عمیق برای اخراج ویژه\u200cهای سطح شخصیت\u200cها استفاده کنیم. این روش پیشنهاد به هیچ زبان یا کار فرض خاصی نیاز ندارد، و در حالی که سریع تر از روش\u200cهای بنیاد CNN یا RNN نشان می\u200cدهد، استعداد و فعالیت را نشان می\u200cدهد. با ارزیابی این روش بر روی سه مشخص برچسب - نقاشی نقاشی نقاشی نقاشی نقاشی، نقاشی نقاشی نقاشی نقاشی (POS) و شناسایی نقاشی نامیده شده (NER) - ما اجرای موقعیت هنری را با نمونه 96.62 F1 و دقیق 97.73 درصد بر نقاشی نقاشی نقاشی نقاشی و نقاشی نقاشی POS (نقاشی نقاشی) دریافت می\u200cکنیم.', 'sw': 'Kutengeneza vipengele vya tabia ni hatua muhimu ya kupata matokeo mazuri katika kazi mbalimbali za utaratibu wa lugha za asili. Kupunguza haja ya kazi za binadamu katika kutengeneza vipengele vya mikononi, mbinu ambazo hutumia majengo ya neura kama vile Mtandao wa Neural (CNN) au Mtandao wa Karibu unaoendelea tena (RNN) ili kutengeneza tayari kama hizo zimependekezwa na kuonyesha matokeo makubwa. Hata hivyo, CNN hutengeneza vipengele vya nafasi huru, na RNN ni pole kwa sababu inahitaji kufanya wahusika mara kwa mara. Katika gazeti hili, tunapendekeza njia ya riwaya ya kutumia mtandao wa intaneti uliohusishwa kwa kiasi kikubwa ili kutengeneza sifa za kiwango cha tabia. Utawala huu unapendekezwa hauhitaji dhana yoyote ya lugha au kazi, na inaonyesha ukatili na ufanisi wakati wa kuwa haraka zaidi ya njia za CNN-au RNN-based. Evaluating this method on three sequence labeling tasks - slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging, and Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - we obtain state-of-the-art performance with a 96.62 F1-score and 97.73% accuracy on slot tagging and POS tagging, respectively, and comparable performance to the state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score on NER.', 'ko': '문자급 특징을 생성하는 것은 각종 자연 언어 처리 임무에서 좋은 효과를 얻는 중요한 절차이다.인공적으로 수동적 특징을 생성하는 필요성을 덜어주기 위해 권적신경망(CNN)이나 귀속신경망(RNN) 등 신경구조를 이용해 이런 특징을 자동으로 추출하는 방법을 제시하면서 좋은 효과를 거뒀다.그러나 CNN은 문자를 순서대로 처리해야 하기 때문에 위치와 무관한 피쳐를 생성합니다.본고는 밀접 네트워크를 이용하여 문자급 특징을 자동으로 추출하는 새로운 방법을 제시했다.제시된 방법은 언어나 임무에 특정한 가설이 필요하지 않고, CNN이나 RNN을 기반으로 하는 방법보다 훨씬 빠르고, 노봉성과 유효성을 나타낸다.세 가지 서열 표기 작업(POS) 표기와 명명 실체 식별(NER)에서 이런 방법을 평가한 결과 우리는 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻었다. 틈새 표기와 어성 표기의 F1 점수는 각각 96.62와 97.73%로 NER에서 가장 선진적인 91.13 F1 점수와 비슷하다.', 'am': 'የፊደል ቅርጽ-ደረጃ ምርጫዎች መፍጠር በአካባቢ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል መልካም ፍሬዎችን ለማግኘት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ሰብዓዊ ድካም እጁን-እጁን በመፍጠር የሚያስፈልገውን ማቅረብ፣ የneyural መሠረት ማድረግ (CNN) ወይም የቀድሞው የኔural ኔural Network (RNN) እንደዚህ ምርጫዎች በራስነት ለማውጣት እና ታላላቅ ፍሬዎችን ማሳየት ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን CNN የቦታ-ነፃ ምርጫዎችን ያስጀምርበታል፣ RNN በኋላው ግንኙነቶችን ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ የፊደል-ደረጃ ምርጫዎችን በራስነት ለማውጣት የተጠቃሚ መረብ በመጠቀም የመረጃ ዘዴ እናሳስባታለን፡፡ በተዘጋጀው ሥርዓት የቋንቋ ወይም አድራሻ ምንም ጉዳይ አያስፈልግም፤ ከCNN ወይም RNN-ተመሳሳይ ሥርዓት ይልቅ ፍጥረት እና ጥብቀትን ያሳያል፡፡ በሦስት ክፍል ላይ የጽሑፍ ስራ - slot tagging, Part of-Speech (POS) tagging, and Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - የ-art-ስርዓት ስርዓት 96.62 F1 score እና 97.73% እርግጠኛ ስርዓት እና POS-tagging, እና ትክክክል ስርዓት 91.13 F1-score.', 'az': 'Karakter səviyyəsini təhsil etmək müxtəlif təbiətli dil işləmə işlərində yaxşı nəticələri yetirmək üçün vacib bir adımdır. İnsan işin in əl yaratdığı özellikləri yaratmaq üçün, Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) və ya yenidən Nöral Network (RNN) kimi nöral arhitektarları istifadə edən metodları, bu özellikləri avtomatik əlavə çıxartmaq və böyük nəticələri göstərmək üçün istifadə edilmişdir. Ancaq CNN pozisyon-bağımsız xüsusiyyətləri yaradır, RNN yavaşdır, çünki bu karakterləri sonradan işlədirmək lazımdır. Bu kağızda, karakter səviyyəsini avtomatik olaraq çıxartmaq üçün sıxıntılı şəbəkə istifadə etmək üçün yeni bir yol təklif edirik. Bu təbliğ metodu, CNN-dən və RNN-dən daha hızlı davranırkən, heç bir dil və işin müəyyən edilməsi ehtiyacı yoxdur. Bu metodları üç sırala etiketləmə görevi ilə təmin edirik - slot etiketləməsi, POS etiketlərinin bir parçası, və İsmim-Entity Recognition (NER - İsmimi-Entity Recognition - İsmimi-Entity Recognition (NER) ilə 96.62 F1-score və POS etiketində 97.73% ədaləti və NER-nin 91.13 F1 nöqtəsinə qarşılaşdırılabilir.', 'af': "Genereer karaktervlak funksies is 'n belangrike stap vir toegang van goeie resultate in verskillende natuurlike taal verwerking opdragte. Om die behoefte van menslike arbeid te verminder in die genereer van hand-gebreekte funksies, metodes wat neurale arkitektuure soos Konvolusionele Neurale Netwerk (CNN) of Herhaling Neurale Netwerk (RNN) te gebruik om sodanige funksies outomaties te uitpak is voorgestel en het groot resultate vertoon. Maar CNN genereer posisie-onafhanklike funksies, en RNN is stadig omdat dit nodig om die karakters sekwensies te proses. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n roman metode om 'n dens verbind netwerk te gebruik om automaties karaktervlak funksies te uitpak. Die voorgestelde metode benodig nie enige taal of taak spesifieke aanvaardes nie, en wys kragtigheid en effektiviteit terwyl vinniger as CNN- of RNN-gebaseerde metodes is nie. Geevalueer hierdie metode op drie reeks etiketting opdragte - slot etiketting, Part-of-Speech (POS) etiketting, en Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - ons kry status-of-the-kuns prestasie met 'n 96.62 F1-score en 97.73% presisie op slot etiketting en POS etiketting, respektief, en vergelykbare presisie met die state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score op NER.", 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ার কাজে ভাল ফলাফল পাওয়ার জন্য অক্ষর-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করা একটি গুরুত্ব হ্যান্ডক্যাপ্ট বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করার জন্য মানুষের শ্রমের প্রয়োজন কমিয়ে দিতে প্রস্তাব করা হয়েছে, যেমন কনভোলেশনাল নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (সিএনএন) বা পুনরায় নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (আরএনএন) ব্যবহার করা  তবে সিএনএন-এর অবস্থান-স্বাধীন বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করেছে এবং আরএনএন ধীরে ধীরে যেহেতু এর ক্ষতিগুলোকে পরিচালনা করা দরকার। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি নোভেল পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি যেটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে অক্ষর-স্তরের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর বৈশিষ্ট্য ব্যবহার প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি কোন ভাষা বা কাজের কোন নির্দিষ্ট ধারণার প্রয়োজন নেই, এবং সিএনএন- বা RNN-ভিত্তিক পদ্ধতির চেয়ে দ্রুত দেখানো হচ্ তিন সেকেন্ড লেবেলিং কাজের উপর এই পদ্ধতিকে মূল্যায়ন করা হচ্ছে - স্লোট ট্যাগিং, অংশ অফ-ভাষা (পোএস) ট্যাগিং, এবং নাম-এন্টিটি স্বীকৃতির (NER) - আমরা ৯6. 62 এফ১ স্কোরের অবস্থান পেয়েছি এবং স্লোট ট ট্যাগিং এবং পোস ট্যাগিং এর সাথে ৯1. 13 F1 স্কোরে', 'bs': 'Stvaranje karakterskih funkcija je važan korak za ostvarivanje dobrih rezultata u različitim zadacima obrade prirodnog jezika. Da bi se ublažila potreba za ljudskim radom u stvaranju karakteristika koje su napravljene rukama, predložene su metode koje koriste neuralne arhitekture kao što su Konvoluciona Neuralna mreža (CNN) ili ponovna Neuralna mreža (RNN) za automatski izvlačenje takvih karakteristika i pokazale su velike rezultate. Međutim, CNN stvara nezavisne funkcije na poziciji, a RNN je spor jer mora sekvenciji procesirati karaktere. U ovom papiru predlažemo novu metodu korištenja guste povezane mreže kako bi automatski izvukli karakterske karakterske funkcije. Predložena metoda ne zahtijeva nikakve specifične pretpostavke jezika ili zadatka i pokazuje robustnost i učinkovitost dok je brže od metoda na CNN-u ili RNN-u. Procjenjujući ovu metodu na tri uzorke označavanja sekvencija - označavanje slot a, označavanje dijela govora (POS) i priznanje imenovanih entiteta (NER) - dobijemo izvedbu stanja umjetnosti sa 96,62 F1 rezultatima i tačnost 97,73% na označavanju slota i označavanju POS-a, odgovarajući, i usporednost izvedbe stanja umjetnosti 91,13 F1 rezultatima na NER-u.', 'cs': 'Generování funkcí na úrovni znaků je důležitým krokem k dosažení dobrých výsledků v různých úkolech zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Pro zmírnění potřeby lidské práce při generování ručně vytvářených funkcí byly navrženy metody, které využívají neuronové architektury, jako jsou Convoluční neuronová síť (CNN) nebo Recurrent Neural Network (RNN), aby automaticky extrahovaly tyto funkce a ukázaly skvělé výsledky. Nicméně CNN generuje funkce nezávislé na poloze a RNN je pomalý, protože musí zpracovávat znaky postupně. V tomto článku navrhujeme novou metodu využití hustě propojené sítě k automatické extrakci funkcí na úrovni znaků. Navrhovaná metoda nevyžaduje žádné jazykové nebo úkolové předpoklady, vykazuje robustnost a efektivitu a je rychlejší než metody založené na CNN nebo RNN. Vyhodnocením této metody na třech úlohách označování sekvencí – slotování, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagování a Named-Entity Recognition (NER) získáme nejmodernější výkon s 96.62 F1 skóre a 97.73% přesnosti při tagování slotů a POS tagování, resp. srovnatelný výkon s nejmodernějším 91.13 F1 skóre na NER.', 'et': 'Märgitasemel funktsioonide genereerimine on oluline samm heade tulemuste saavutamiseks erinevates looduskeele töötlemise ülesannetes. Et leevendada inimtöö vajadust käsitsi valmistatud funktsioonide loomisel, on välja pakutud meetodid, mis kasutavad neuroarhitektuure, nagu konvolutsiooniline neurovõrk (CNN) või korduv neurovõrk (RNN) selliste funktsioonide automaatseks ekstraheerimiseks ja on näidanud suurepäraseid tulemusi. CNN loob siiski positsioonist sõltumatuid funktsioone ja RNN on aeglane, kuna ta peab töötlema märke järjestikuselt. Käesolevas töös pakume välja uue meetodi tihedalt ühendatud võrgu kasutamiseks märgitasemel funktsioonide automaatseks ekstraheerimiseks. Kavandatud meetod ei nõua keele- või ülesandespetsiifilisi eeldusi ning näitab tugevust ja tõhusust, olles samas kiirem kui CNN- või RNN-põhised meetodid. Hinnates seda meetodit kolme järjestuse märgistamise ülesande puhul - teenindusaegade märgistamine, kõneosa märgistamine (POS) ja nimetatud üksuste tuvastamine (NER) - saavutame kaasaegse jõudluse vastavalt 96,62 F1-skooriga ja 97,73% täpsusega teenindusaegade märgistamisel ja POS-märgistamisel ning võrreldava jõudlusega NER-i tipptasemel 91,13 F1-skooriga.', 'fi': 'Merkkitason ominaisuuksien luominen on tärkeä askel hyvien tulosten saavuttamiseksi erilaisissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä. Ihmisen työn tarvetta käsintehtyjen ominaisuuksien luomisessa on ehdotettu menetelmiä, jotka hyödyntävät neuroarkkitehtuuria, kuten konvolutional neural Network (CNN) tai toistuva neural Network (RNN) näiden ominaisuuksien automaattiseen purkamiseen, ja ne ovat osoittaneet hyviä tuloksia. CNN tuottaa kuitenkin sijainnista riippumattomia ominaisuuksia, ja RNN on hidas, koska sen täytyy käsitellä merkit peräkkäin. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta menetelmää tiheästi kytketyn verkon käyttämiseksi merkkitason ominaisuuksien automaattiseen purkamiseen. Ehdotettu menetelmä ei vaadi kieli- tai tehtäväkohtaisia oletuksia, ja se osoittaa kestävyyttä ja tehokkuutta, mutta on nopeampi kuin CNN- tai RNN-pohjaiset menetelmät. Arvioimalla tätä menetelmää kolmessa sekvenssimerkintätehtävässä - slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging ja Nimetty entity recognition (NER) - saavutamme huipputason suorituskyvyn 96,62 F1-pisteellä ja 97,73% tarkkuudella slot tagging ja POS tagging -pisteellä sekä vertailukelpoisella suorituskyvyllä NER:n huippuluokan 91,13 F1-pisteellä.', 'sq': 'Generating character-level features is an important step for achieving good results in various natural language processing tasks.  To alleviate the need for human labor in generating hand-crafted features, methods that utilize neural architectures such as Convolutional Neural Network (CNN) or Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) to automatically extract such features have been proposed and have shown great results.  However, CNN generates position-independent features, and RNN is slow since it needs to process the characters sequentially.  In this paper, we propose a novel method of using a densely connected network to automatically extract character-level features.  The proposed method does not require any language or task specific assumptions, and shows robustness and effectiveness while being faster than CNN- or RNN-based methods.  Evaluating this method on three sequence labeling tasks - slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging, and Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - we obtain state-of-the-art performance with a 96.62 F1-score and 97.73% accuracy on slot tagging and POS tagging, respectively, and comparable performance to the state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score on NER.', 'ca': "Generar característiques a nivell de caràcter és un pas important per aconseguir bons resultats en diverses tasques naturals de processament de llenguatges. Per aliviar la necessitat de treball humà en generar característiques manuals, s'han proposat mètodes que utilitzen arquitectures neuronals com la Red Neural Convolutiva (CNN) o la Red Neural Recurrent (RNN) per extrair aquestes característiques automàticament i han mostrat grans resultats. No obstant això, el CNN genera característiques independents de posició, i el RNN és lent, ja que necessita processar els caràcters seqüencialment. En aquest article, proposem un mètode nou d'utilitzar una xarxa densament connectada per extrair automàticament característiques de nivell caràcter. The proposed method does not require any language or task specific assumptions, and shows robustness and effectiveness while being faster than CNN- or RNN-based methods.  Evaluant aquest mètode en tres tasques d'etiquetar seqüències - etiquetar slots, etiquetar Part-of-Speech (POS) i Recognition Named-Entity (NER) - obtenim un rendiment d'última generació amb una puntuació F1 de 96,62% i una precisió del 97,73% en etiquetar slots i etiquetar POS, respectivament, i un rendiment comparable amb l'última puntuació F1 de 91,13% en NER.", 'hy': 'Generating character-level features is an important step for achieving good results in various natural language processing tasks.  Որպեսզի նվազեցնենք մարդկային աշխատանքի անհրաժեշտությունը ձեռքով ստեղծված հատկանիշների ստեղծման մեթոդներ, որոնք օգտագործում են նյարդային ճարտարապետություններ, ինչպիսիք են Կանվոլյուցիոն Նյարդային ցանցը (CNN) կամ Կանգամ Նյարդային ցանցը (ՌՆN) այս հատկանիշները However, CNN generates position-independent features, and RNN is slow since it needs to process the characters sequentially.  In this paper, we propose a novel method of using a densely connected network to automatically extract character-level features.  The proposed method does not require any language or task specific assumptions, and shows robustness and effectiveness while being faster than CNN- or RNN-based methods.  Evaluating this method on three sequence labeling tasks - slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging, and Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - we obtain state-of-the-art performance with a 96.62 F1-score and 97.73% accuracy on slot tagging and POS tagging, respectively, and comparable performance to the state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score on NER.', 'jv': '#a11y <joanie> hello!<joanie> hello! Rasané awak dhéwé nglanggar sampeyan kanggo nguasai perbudhakan kanggo ngilanggar manut lan tambah sing dirangkat manut, kuwi nggawe Arkturaturanan Neral (MT) lan Una Perintah Néural Network (R.N) sing berarti yang diputuhé nyebutaké sewi padha winih. Nanging, MT mbukak perusahaan-kenapa kok, lan DNN kuwi basa sedhaya dadi kudu sampeyan caratar susahe sak. Nang pebuk iki, kita mudhun manut kanggo gambar sistem sing ditambah ginasu Awakdhéwé apa-apa kuwi ora bisa nggawe langkung karo nggawe kesempatan kanggo nik nggawe barang, lan ngono nggawe barang nggawe barang-sistem sing luwih karo MTN- karo ngguna-sistem. invaluing this method on third order label tasks - slot tagging, parts-of', 'sk': 'Ustvarjanje znakov je pomemben korak za doseganje dobrih rezultatov pri različnih nalogah obdelave naravnega jezika. Za ublažitev potrebe po človeškem delu pri ustvarjanju ročno izdelanih funkcij so bile predlagane metode, ki uporabljajo nevralno arhitekturo, kot sta konvolucijsko živčno omrežje (CNN) ali ponavljajoče se živčno omrežje (RNN) za samodejno ekstrakcijo takšnih funkcij in so pokazale odlične rezultate. Vendar CNN ustvarja funkcije, neodvisne od položaja, RNN pa je počasen, saj mora znake obdelati zaporedno. V prispevku predlagamo novo metodo uporabe gosto povezanega omrežja za samodejno ekstrakcijo znakov. Predlagana metoda ne zahteva nobenih jezikovnih ali nalog specifičnih predpostavk ter kaže robustnost in učinkovitost, hkrati pa je hitrejša od metod, ki temeljijo na CNN ali RNN. Vrednotenje te metode na treh nalogah označevanja zaporedja – označevanje rež, označevanje dela govora (POS) in prepoznavanje imenovanih subjektov (NER) – dosežemo najsodobnejšo zmogljivost z 96,62 točnostjo F1 označevanja rež oziroma 97,73% točnostjo označevanja rež oziroma označevanjem POS označevanja ter primerljivo zmogljivostjo z najsodobnejšo rezultato 91,13 F1 na NER.', 'he': 'יצירת תכונות רמת האופים היא צעד חשוב להשיג תוצאות טובות במשימות מעבד שפה טבעיות שונות. כדי להקל על הצורך לעבודה אנושית לייצור תכונות ידנית, שיטות שמשתמשות בארכיטקטורות עצביות כמו רשת נוירולית משתנה (CNN) או רשת נוירולית משתנה (RNN) כדי להוציא אוטומטית תכונות כאלה הציעו ויראו תוצאות גדולות. עם זאת, CNN יוצר תכונות עצמאות לעמדה, ו RNN הוא איטי מכיוון שהוא צריך לעבד את הדמויות ברצף. In this paper, we propose a novel method of using a densely connected network to automatically extract character-level features.  השיטה המוצעת לא דורשת שום שפה או משימה ספציפית, והיא מראה יציבות ויעילות בזמן שהיא מהירה יותר משיטות מבוססות על CNN או RNN. בערכת השיטה הזאת על שלושה משימות תווית רצף - תווית קופסאות, תווית קופסאות, תווית קופסאות (POS) ו-זיהוי-נקודות בשם (NER) - אנחנו מקבלים ביצועים מוקדמים עם תווית 96.62 F1 ו-97.73% מדויקת על תוויות קופסאות ו-POS, בהתאם, והביצועים שווים עם תווית קופסאות 91.13 F1 מוקדמות על NER.', 'ha': "Mai ƙiƙira fassarar-daraja ne da muhimu wa ku sami matsalar mai kyau a cikin aikin manajan da aka aiki na fassarar harshen. Ga sauƙi da haja ga aikin mutum in ƙiƙira wasu feature-hannayen-hannayen, metode waɗanda ke yin amfani da matsayin neural kamar shirin Naural Netware (CNN) ko da Cikakken Neural Netki na Recurrence (RNN) zuwa an farat fitar da su farat ɗaya, kuma an nuna matsalar mai girma. A lokacin da CNN ke ƙãga matsayin-da-huru, kuma RNN yana da sauri, kwanan da za ta canza karatun takwarar daban. Daga wannan takardan, muna buƙata wata hanyor noveli da za'a yi amfani da wani shirin da ke haɗi da shi mai nau'i zuwa ya fita wasu tayari na-daraja farat ɗaya. The proposed method does not require any language or task specific assumptions, and shows robustness and effectiveness while being faster than CNN- or RNN-based methods.  Ana iya ƙayyade wannan metode a kan aikin rubutun sau-sakan, belgi-of-Speakin (PoS) da sunan-Entity (NER) - za'a sami halin-mai sanar-art with a shekara 96.42 F1 da 97.73% taƙaitacce kan tagning na slot and taging PoS, kuma yana daidaita da mazaunin-state-the-art-91.13 F1 score on NER.", 'bo': 'ཡིག་འབྲུ་རྩོམ་མཁན་གྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གསར་འཛུགས་ནི་རང་བཞིན་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར མིའི་རྩོམ་འབྲེལ་གྱི་སྐོར་ལས་དུས་ཕར་ཆེན་འབད་ནི་ལག་ལེན་པ་གཙང་དག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཡིན་ནའང་། CNN་ཡི་གེའི་གནས་ཡུལ་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་གསར་འཛུགས་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་ཡིག་འབྲུ་གཟུགས་རིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྱད་ནས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་དང་། དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ལ་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་ལས་ཀ་གསལ་བཤད་པ་གང་ཡང་མིན་དགོས། བྱས་ན་ངེས་པར་སྟོན་རུང་བ་དང་ནུས Evaluating this method on three sequence labeling tasks - slot tagging, Part-of-Speech (POS) tagging, and Named-Entity Recognition (NER) - we obtain state-of-the-art performance with a 96.62 F1-score and 97.73% accuracy on slot tagging and POS tagging, respectively, and comparable performance to the state-of-the-art 91.13 F1-score on NER.'}
{'en': 'Neural Machine Translation Incorporating Named Entity', 'es': 'Traducción automática neuronal que incorpora entidad nombrada', 'ar': 'الترجمة الآلية العصبية بما في ذلك الكيان المحدد', 'pt': 'Tradução Automática Neural Incorporando Entidade Nomeada', 'fr': 'Traduction automatique neuronale incorporant une entité nommée', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳法人', 'zh': '包名实体之神经机器翻译', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद नामित इकाई को शामिल करना', 'ru': 'Нейронный машинный перевод, включающий именованную сущность', 'ga': 'Aistriúchán Meaisín Néarach lena n-ionchorpraítear Aonán Ainmnithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Neural Machine Translation Incorporating Name Entity', 'el': 'Νευρική μηχανική μετάφραση με ονομαστική οντότητα', 'it': 'Traduzione automatica neurale che incorpora entità con nome', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аудармасы аталған нысандары', 'lt': 'Nervų mašinų vertimas su pavadinimu subjektu', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷ Incorporing Named Entity', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл машины хөрөнгө оруулалт', 'ms': 'Entiti Nama Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'no': '@ info: status', 'mt': 'Entità Ismija li tinkorpora Traduzzjoni tal-Magna Newrali', 'pl': 'Neuronalne tłumaczenie maszynowe zawierające nazwę podmiotu', 'ro': 'Traducere automată neurală care încorporează entitatea denumită', 'sr': 'Neuralna mašina za prevod uključujući imenovani entitet', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Neural maskinöversättning som innehåller namngiven enhet', 'so': 'Turjumista maskinenta Neural Incorporating Named Entity', 'ur': 'نائورل ماشین ترجمہ نام کی اینٹیٹی', 'ta': 'புதிய இயந்திரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு', 'uz': 'Tarjima qilish', 'vi': 'Dịch về máy thần kinh có tên Thực thể', 'da': 'Neural maskinoversættelse med navngivet enhed', 'nl': 'Neural Machine Translation Incorporating Named Entity', 'bg': 'Невроден машинен превод, включващ име', 'hr': 'Neuralni uređaj za prevod', 'de': 'Neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung mit benannter Entität', 'id': 'Terjemahan Mesin Neural Incorporating Entitas bernama', 'ko': '명명 실체를 포함하는 신경 번역', 'fa': 'تغییرات ماشین عصبی عنوان نامیده', 'sw': 'Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa Incorporating Entity', 'tr': 'Nural Mazmunlar terjime Edilýär', 'sq': 'Përkthimi i Makinës Neurale duke përfshirë njësinë e emëruar', 'am': 'ትርጉም', 'az': 'Nöral Makinat Çeviri Adlı Entity', 'af': 'Nural Masjien Vertaling Inkorporeer Genaamde Eenheid', 'bn': 'নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ', 'cs': 'Neurální strojový překlad zahrnující jmenovanou entitu', 'et': 'Neuraalne masintõlge, mis sisaldab nimega üksust', 'bs': 'Neuralni uređaj za prevod', 'ca': 'La traducció de màquines neuronals incorpora una entitat anomenada', 'fi': 'Neuraalinen konekäännös, joka sisältää nimetyn yksikön', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանություն, որը ներառում է անվանված միավոր', 'jv': "Menu item to Open 'Search for Open Files' dialog", 'sk': 'Nevralni strojni prevod, ki vključuje imenovani subjekt', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'he': 'תרגום מכונת נוירולית שמכיל יחידה בשם', 'bo': 'མིང་དངུལ་འཁོར་གྱི་ལག་འཁྱེར་ལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་མིང་དངུལ།'}
{'en': 'This study proposes a new neural machine translation (NMT) model based on the encoder-decoder model that incorporates named entity (NE) tags of source-language sentences. Conventional NMT models have two problems enumerated as follows : (i) they tend to have difficulty in translating words with multiple meanings because of the high ambiguity, and (ii) these models’abilitytotranslatecompoundwordsseemschallengingbecausetheencoderreceivesaword, a part of the compound word, at each time step. To alleviate these problems, the encoder of the proposed model encodes the input word on the basis of its NE tag at each time step, which could reduce the ambiguity of the input word. Furthermore, the encoder introduces a chunk-level LSTM layer over a word-level LSTM layer and hierarchically encodes a source-language sentence to capture a compound NE as a chunk on the basis of the NE tags. We evaluate the proposed model on an English-to-Japanese translation task with the ASPEC, and English-to-Bulgarian and English-to-Romanian translation tasks with the Europarl corpus. The evaluation results show that the proposed model achieves up to 3.11 point improvement in BLEU.', 'ar': 'تقترح هذه الدراسة نموذجًا جديدًا للترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) يعتمد على نموذج وحدة فك التشفير الذي يشتمل على علامات الكيان المسماة (NE) لجمل لغة المصدر. تحتوي نماذج NMT التقليدية على مشكلتين تم تعدادهما على النحو التالي: (1) تميل إلى أن تواجه صعوبة في ترجمة الكلمات ذات المعاني المتعددة بسبب الغموض الشديد ، و (2) إمكانية ترجمة هذه النماذج للكلمات المركبة التي تبدو صعبة بسبب الاستلام ، وهي جزء من الكلمة المركبة ، في كل خطوة زمنية . للتخفيف من هذه المشكلات ، يقوم مشفر النموذج المقترح بتشفير كلمة الإدخال على أساس علامة NE الخاصة به في كل خطوة زمنية ، مما قد يقلل من غموض كلمة الإدخال. علاوة على ذلك ، يقدم المشفر طبقة LSTM على مستوى القطعة فوق طبقة LSTM على مستوى الكلمة ويقوم بترميز جملة لغة المصدر بشكل هرمي لالتقاط مركب NE كقطعة على أساس علامات NE. نقوم بتقييم النموذج المقترح على مهمة ترجمة من الإنجليزية إلى اليابانية مع ASPEC ، ومهام الترجمة من الإنجليزية إلى البلغارية ومن الإنجليزية إلى الرومانية مع مجموعة Europarl. تظهر نتائج التقييم أن النموذج المقترح يحقق تحسناً يصل إلى 3.11 نقطة في BLEU.', 'pt': 'Este estudo propõe um novo modelo de tradução automática neural (NMT) baseado no modelo codificador-decodificador que incorpora tags de entidade nomeada (NE) de sentenças do idioma de origem. Os modelos convencionais de NMT têm dois problemas enumerados a seguir: (i) eles tendem a ter dificuldade em traduzir palavras com múltiplos significados devido à alta ambiguidade, e (ii) a capacidade desses modelos de traduzir palavras compostas parece desafiadora porque o codificador recebe uma palavra, uma parte da palavra composta, a cada passo de tempo . Para aliviar esses problemas, o codificador do modelo proposto codifica a palavra de entrada com base em sua tag NE a cada passo de tempo, o que poderia reduzir a ambiguidade da palavra de entrada. Além disso, o codificador introduz uma camada LSTM em nível de bloco sobre uma camada LSTM em nível de palavra e codifica hierarquicamente uma sentença do idioma de origem para capturar um NE composto como um bloco com base nas tags NE. Avaliamos o modelo proposto em uma tarefa de tradução de inglês para japonês com o ASPEC e tarefas de tradução de inglês para búlgaro e inglês para romeno com o corpus Europarl. Os resultados da avaliação mostram que o modelo proposto alcança até 3,11 pontos de melhoria no BLEU.', 'es': 'Este estudio propone un nuevo modelo de traducción automática neuronal (NMT) basado en el modelo codificador-decodificador que incorpora etiquetas de entidad nombrada (NE) de oraciones en el idioma fuente. Los modelos NMT convencionales tienen dos problemas que se enumeran a continuación: (i) tienden a tener dificultades para traducir palabras con múltiples significados debido a la alta ambigüedad, y (ii) la capacidad de estos modelos para traducir palabras compuestas parece desafiante porque el codificador recibe una palabra, una parte de la palabra compuesta, en cada paso de tiempo. Para mitigar estos problemas, el codificador del modelo propuesto codifica la palabra de entrada sobre la base de su etiqueta NE en cada paso de tiempo, lo que podría reducir la ambigüedad de la palabra de entrada. Además, el codificador introduce una capa LSTM a nivel de fragmento sobre una capa LSTM a nivel de palabra y codifica jerárquicamente una oración en idioma fuente para capturar un NE compuesto como un fragmento sobre la base de las etiquetas NE. Evaluamos el modelo propuesto en una tarea de traducción del inglés al japonés con la ASPEC, y las tareas de traducción del inglés al búlgaro y del inglés al rumano con el corpus Europarl. Los resultados de la evaluación muestran que el modelo propuesto logra una mejora de hasta 3.11 puntos en BLEU.', 'fr': "Cette étude propose un nouveau modèle de traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) basé sur le modèle encodeur-décodeur qui intègre des balises d'entité nommée (NE) de phrases en langage source. Les modèles NMT classiques présentent deux problèmes, énumérés comme suit\xa0: (i) ils ont tendance à avoir de la difficulté à traduire des mots ayant des significations multiples en raison de la grande ambiguïté, et (ii) la capacité de ces modèles à traduire des mots composés semble difficile parce que le codeur reçoit un mot, une partie du mot composé, à chaque pas dans le temps. Pour pallier ces problèmes, le codeur du modèle proposé code le mot d'entrée sur la base de son étiquette NE à chaque pas de temps, ce qui pourrait réduire l'ambiguïté du mot d'entrée. En outre, le codeur introduit une couche LSTM au niveau du segment sur une couche LSTM au niveau du mot et code hiérarchiquement une phrase de langage source pour capturer un NE composé en tant que fragment sur la base des étiquettes NE. Nous évaluons le modèle proposé pour une tâche de traduction de l'anglais vers le japonais avec l'ASPEC, et des tâches de traduction de l'anglais vers le bulgare et de l'anglais vers le roumain avec le corpus Europarl. Les résultats de l'évaluation montrent que le modèle proposé permet d'améliorer jusqu'à 3,11 points de l'UEBL.", 'ja': '本研究は、ソース言語文の名前付きエンティティ（ NE ）タグを組み込んだエンコーダデコーダモデルに基づいた新しいニューラルマシン翻訳（ NMT ）モデルを提案する。 従来のNMTモデルには、次のように列挙される2つの問題があります。（ i ）高い曖昧さのために、複数の意味を持つ単語を翻訳することが困難になる傾向があります。（ ii ）これらのモデルは、各ステップで、複合単語の一部である、難易度が高いことを意味します。 これらの問題を軽減するために、提案されたモデルのエンコーダは、各時間ステップでそのＮＥタグに基づいて入力ワードを符号化し、入力ワードの曖昧さを低減することができる。 さらに、エンコーダは、ワードレベルＬＳＴＭ層にわたってチャンクレベルＬＳＴＭ層を導入し、ＮＥタグに基づいて化合物ＮＥをチャンクとして取り込むためにソース言語文を階層的に符号化する。 私たちは、ASPECを用いた英語から日本語への翻訳タスク、Europarlコーパスを用いた英語からブルガリア語および英語からルーマニア語への翻訳タスクについて、提案されたモデルを評価します。 評価結果は、提案されたモデルがBLEUで最大3.11ポイントの改善を達成していることを示している。', 'hi': 'यह अध्ययन एनकोडर-डिकोडर मॉडल के आधार पर एक नए न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करता है जिसमें स्रोत-भाषा वाक्यों के नामित इकाई (एनई) टैग शामिल हैं। पारंपरिक एनएमटी मॉडल में दो समस्याएं इस प्रकार हैं: (i) उन्हें उच्च अस्पष्टता के कारण कई अर्थों के साथ शब्दों का अनुवाद करने में कठिनाई होती है, और (ii) इन मॉडलों की क्षमता प्रत्येक समय चरण में यौगिक शब्द का एक हिस्सा, यौगिक शब्द का एक हिस्सा होने के कारण समग्र शब्दों को स्थानांतरित करने की क्षमता। इन समस्याओं को कम करने के लिए, प्रस्तावित मॉडल का एन्कोडर प्रत्येक समय चरण में अपने एनई टैग के आधार पर इनपुट शब्द को एन्कोड करता है, जो इनपुट शब्द की अस्पष्टता को कम कर सकता है। इसके अलावा, एन्कोडर एक शब्द-स्तरीय LSTM परत पर एक चंक-स्तरीय LSTM परत का परिचय देता है और पदानुक्रमित रूप से NE टैग के आधार पर एक भाग के रूप में एक यौगिक NE को कैप्चर करने के लिए एक स्रोत-भाषा वाक्य को एन्कोड करता है। हम ASPEC के साथ एक अंग्रेजी-से-जापानी अनुवाद कार्य पर प्रस्तावित मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और Europarl कॉर्पस के साथ अंग्रेजी-से-बल्गेरियाई और अंग्रेजी-से-रोमानियाई अनुवाद कार्यों का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। मूल्यांकन परिणामों से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित मॉडल BLEU में 3.11 अंक तक सुधार प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'В этом исследовании предлагается новая модель нейронного машинного перевода (NMT), основанная на модели кодировщик-декодер, которая включает именованные метки сущностей (NE) предложений на исходном языке. Обычные модели НМТ имеют две проблемы, перечисленные следующим образом: (i) они, как правило, испытывают трудности при переводе слов с несколькими значениями из-за высокой двусмысленности, и (ii) способность этих моделей переводить сложные слова, которые кажутся сложными, вызывает энкодер, который получает слово, часть сложного слова, на каждом временном шаге. Для облегчения этих проблем кодировщик предлагаемой модели кодирует входное слово на основе его метки NE на каждом временном шаге, что может уменьшить двусмысленность входного слова. Кроме того, кодер вводит уровень LSTM на уровне фрагмента над словом уровня LSTM и иерархически кодирует предложение на исходном языке для захвата соединения NE в виде фрагмента на основе тегов NE. Мы оцениваем предлагаемую модель по задаче перевода с английского на японский язык с помощью ASPEC, а также по задаче перевода с английского на болгарский и с английского на румынский язык с помощью корпуса Europarl. Результаты оценки показывают, что предлагаемая модель достигает улучшения BLEU до 3,11 пункта.', 'zh': '本论立编码器-解码器新型神经机器翻译(NMT),合其语言句者名实体(NE)标。 旧NMT有二事:(i)歧义性高,往往难译多单词,及(ii)时步中译复合词之能。 所以缓之者,编码器日月步长基其NE标编码,以省输字之歧义。 又编码器于字级 LSTM 层上引入块级 LSTM 层,对源语言句分编码,以 NE 标记合 NE 为块。 估ASPEC之英语于日语翻译之拟议模形,及Europarl语料库之英语于保加利亚语、英语之罗马尼亚语译。 论结果表明,BLEU增3.11分。', 'ga': "Molann an staidéar seo múnla nua néaraistriúcháin meaisín (NMT) bunaithe ar an tsamhail ionchódóra-díchódóra a ionchorpraíonn clibeanna aonáin ainmnithe (NE) d’abairtí teanga foinse. Tá dhá fhadhb san áireamh mar seo a leanas ag samhlacha traidisiúnta NMT: (i) bíonn deacracht acu focail a bhfuil bríonna iolracha leo a aistriú mar gheall ar an ard-débhríocht, agus (ii) cumas na múnlaí seo chun comhfhocail a aistriú go bhfeiceann siad dúshlánach mar gheall ar an gcódóir faightear focal, cuid den fhocal cumaisc, ag gach céim ama. . Chun na fadhbanna seo a mhaolú, ionchódaíonn ionchódóir na samhla molta an focal ionchuir ar bhonn a chlib NE ag gach céim ama, rud a d'fhéadfadh athbhrí an fhocail ionchuir a laghdú. Ina theannta sin, tugann an t-ionchódóir isteach ciseal LSTM leibhéal smután thar chiseal focal-leibhéal LSTM agus ionchódaíonn sé go ordlathach abairt fhoinse-teanga chun comhdhúil NE a ghabháil mar smután ar bhonn na gclibeanna NE. Déanaimid measúnú ar an tsamhail atá beartaithe maidir le tasc aistriúcháin Béarla go Seapáinis leis an ASPEC, agus tascanna aistriúcháin Béarla go Bulgáiris agus Béarla go Rómáinis le corpas Europarl. Léiríonn torthaí na meastóireachta go mbaineann an tsamhail atá beartaithe feabhas suas le 3.11 pointe amach i BLEU.", 'el': 'Η παρούσα μελέτη προτείνει ένα νέο μοντέλο νευρωνικής μηχανικής μετάφρασης (NMT) βασισμένο στο μοντέλο κωδικοποιητή-αποκωδικοποιητή που ενσωματώνει ετικέτες ονομαστικής οντότητας (NE) των προτάσεων της πηγής. Τα συμβατικά μοντέλα NMT έχουν δύο προβλήματα που απαριθμούνται ως εξής: (i) τείνουν να δυσκολεύονται στη μετάφραση λέξεων με πολλαπλές έννοιες λόγω της μεγάλης ασάφειας και (ii) η ικανότητα των μοντέλων αυτών να μεταφράσουν σύνθετες λέξεις φαίνεται δύσκολη επειδή η κωδικοποίηση λαμβάνεται, μέρος της σύνθετης λέξης, σε κάθε στάδιο. Για να ανακουφιστούν αυτά τα προβλήματα, ο κωδικοποιητής του προτεινόμενου μοντέλου κωδικοποιεί τη λέξη εισόδου με βάση την ετικέτα NE σε κάθε βήμα χρόνου, γεγονός που θα μπορούσε να μειώσει την ασάφεια της λέξης εισόδου. Επιπλέον, ο κωδικοποιητής εισάγει ένα στρώμα σε επίπεδο κομματιού πάνω από ένα στρώμα επιπέδου λέξεων και ιεραρχικά κωδικοποιεί μια πρόταση γλώσσας προέλευσης για να συλλάβει ένα σύνθετο Ν ως κομμάτι με βάση τις ετικέτες Ν. Αξιολογούμε το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο για μεταφραστικές εργασίες από αγγλικά προς ιαπωνικά με το ASPEC και μεταφραστικές εργασίες από αγγλικά προς βουλγαρικά και αγγλικά προς ρουμανικά με το σώμα. Τα αποτελέσματα της αξιολόγησης δείχνουν ότι το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο επιτυγχάνει έως 3.11 σημεία βελτίωση στην BLEU.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy új neurális gépi fordítási modellt (NMT) javasol, amely a kódoló-dekóder modellre épül, és amely magában foglalja a forrásnyelv mondatok nevezett entitás (NE) címkéit. A hagyományos NMT modelleknek két problémája van, amelyeket az alábbiak szerint sorolnak fel: (i) a nagy kétértelműség miatt általában nehezen fordítanak több jelentésű szavakat, és (ii) ezeknek a modelleknek az összetett szavak lefordítására való képessége kihívásnak tűnik, mert az összetett szó egy részét minden időlépésben egy-egy szót fogadnak. A problémák enyhítése érdekében a javasolt modell kódolója minden időlépésben NE címke alapján kódolja a beviteli szót, ami csökkentheti a beviteli szó kétértelműségét. Továbbá, a kódoló egy darabszintű LSTM réteget vezet be egy szószintű LSTM rétegre és hierarchikusan kódol egy forrásnyelvű mondatot, hogy az NE címkék alapján rögzítse az összetett NE réteget. A javasolt modellt angol-japán fordítási feladat során értékeljük az ASPEC, valamint angol-bolgár és angol-román fordítási feladatok során az Europarl korpussal. Az értékelés eredményei azt mutatják, hogy a javasolt modell 3,11 pontos javulást ér el a BLEU-ban.', 'it': "Questo studio propone un nuovo modello di traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) basato sul modello encoder-decoder che incorpora tag entity named (NE) delle frasi in lingua sorgente. I modelli NMT convenzionali presentano due problemi enumerati come segue: (i) tendono ad avere difficoltà a tradurre parole con significati multipli a causa dell'elevata ambiguità e (ii) la capacità di tradurre parole composte sembra difficile perché il codice riceve una parola, una parte della parola composta, ad ogni passo temporale. Per alleviare questi problemi, l'encoder del modello proposto codifica la parola di input sulla base del suo tag NE ad ogni passo temporale, il che potrebbe ridurre l'ambiguità della parola di input. Inoltre, l'encoder introduce un livello LSTM a livello di chunk sopra un livello LSTM a livello di parola e codifica gerarchicamente una frase in lingua sorgente per catturare un NE composto come un chunk sulla base dei tag NE. Valutiamo il modello proposto su un compito di traduzione inglese-giapponese con l'ASPEC, e compiti di traduzione inglese-bulgaro e inglese-rumeno con il corpus Europarl. I risultati della valutazione mostrano che il modello proposto raggiunge un miglioramento fino a 3,11 punti nell'UEBLE.", 'ka': 'ამ სწავლად ახალი ნეიროლური მანქანის გაგრძელება (NMT) მოდელი, რომელიც კოდირების დეკოდერების მოდელიდან ბაზიან, რომელიც სახელ ინტერტი (NE) მანქანების შაბლოები მხოლოდ. შესაბამისი NMT მოდელები აქვს ორი პრობლემები, რომლებიც შემდეგ იყოს: i) ისინი ძალიან რთულია სიტყვების გადატყვება მრავალური მნიშვნელობის შემთხვევაში, და ii) ამ მოდელების შესაძლებლობა გადატყვებული სიტყვების შემთხვევაში იქნება შემდეგ, რადგან კოდერირების სიტ ამ პრობლემების გახსნა, მოდელის კოდირები კოდირებს ჩართულის სიტყვას, რომელიც ყოველ დროს ჩართულის ნაწილის ბაზაზე, რომელიც შეუძლია გახსნა სიტყვას ამბიდვიტის გახსნა. დამატებით, კოდერები LSTM სიტყვების დონეზე LSTM სიტყვების სიტყვების ზომაზე ჩვენებს და hiერაქტიკურად კოდირებს სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების სიტყვების შესაძლებლობა, როგორც კომპონდის NE-ს ჩვენ განვითარებთ მოდელს ინგლისურ-იაპონისურ თავისუფალური დავალების შესახებ ASPEC, ანგლისური-ბულდარისურ და პრომინური თავისუფალური თავისუფალური დავალების შესახებ. წარმოდგენების შედეგი დააჩვენება, რომ მოდელის მოდელის შესაძლებლობა სამ.11 წერტილის შესაძლებლობა BLEU-ში.', 'kk': 'Бұл зерттеу жаңа невралдық компьютердің аудару үлгісін (NMT) кодер- декодер үлгісіне негізделген кодер- декодер үлгісі (NE) деп аталатын мәліметтердің тегтерін ұсынады. Кәдімгі NMT үлгілерінің екі мәселелері осылай саналады: i) олар бірнеше мәселелерді ақпараттау үшін бірнеше мәселелерді аудару қиын болады. ii) бұл үлгілерді бірнеше мәселелерді өзгерту қиын болады, себебі кодтардың сөздің бөлігі әрбір қадамдастыру үшін. Бұл мәселелерді көшірмелеу үшін, келтірілген үлгінің кодері келтірілген сөзді NE тегтерінің негізінде әрбір қадамда кодтады. Бұл келтірілген сөздің амбигивілігін азайта алады. Қосымша, кодер сөз деңгейінде LSTM қабатты LSTM қабатты бір бөлшек деңгейінде ендіреді, және NE тегтерінің негізінде бір бөлшек үшін көпшілік тілді сөзді кодтады. Біз ASPEC және ағылшын тілінен жапон тілінен аудару тапсырмасының, ағылшын тілінен болгарша және руманша тілінен аудару тапсырмаларының үлгісін бағалаймыз. Бұл бағалау нәтижелері БЛЕС үлгісінде 3,11 нүкте жақсарту үшін көрсетіледі.', 'ms': "kajian ini melaporkan model terjemahan mesin saraf baru (NMT) berdasarkan model pengekod-pengekod yang mengandungi tag entiti bernama (NE) bagi kalimat bahasa sumber. Conventional NMT models have two problems enumerated as follows: (i) they tend to have difficulty in translating words with multiple meanings because of the high ambiguity, and (ii) these models'abilitytotranslatecompoundwordsseemschallengingbecausetheencoderreceivesaword, a part of the compound word, at each time step.  Untuk mengurangi masalah ini, pengekod model yang diusulkan mengekodkan perkataan input berdasarkan tag NE pada setiap langkah masa, yang boleh mengurangi ambiguiti perkataan input. Selain itu, pengekod memperkenalkan lapisan LSTM aras-potongan atas lapisan LSTM aras-perkataan dan secara hierarkis mengekodkan kalimat bahasa-sumber untuk menangkap NE komponen sebagai potongan berdasarkan tag NE. Kami menilai model yang diusulkan pada tugas terjemahan bahasa Inggeris-Jepun dengan ASPEC, dan tugas terjemahan bahasa Inggeris-Bulgari dan bahasa Inggeris-Rumania dengan korpus Europarl. Hasil penilaian menunjukkan bahawa model yang diusulkan mencapai hingga 3.11 titik peningkatan dalam BLEU.", 'mk': 'Оваа студија предложува нов модел на нервен машински превод (НМТ) базиран на моделот на кодер-декодер кој вклучува ознаки на именуваниот ентитет (НЕ) на речениците на изворот-јазик. Конвенционалните модели на НМТ имаат два проблеми кои се наведени како што следува: (i) тие имаат тешкотии да преведуваат зборови со повеќе значења поради високата нејасност, и (ii) способноста на овие модели да пренесуваат сложени зборови изгледа предизвикувачки бидејќи кодерот добива збор, дел од сложениот збор, во секој чекор. За да ги олесни овие проблеми, кодерот на предложениот модел го кодира вложениот збор врз основа на нејзината NE ознака во секој чекор, што може да ја намали двосмисленоста на вложениот збор. Покрај тоа, кодерот воведува слој на LSTM на ниво на парчиња преку слој на LSTM на ниво на зборови и хиерархички кодира реченица на извор- јазик за да се фати компонент NE како парче на основа на NE- ознаките. Го проценуваме предложениот модел за задачата на англиско-јапонски превод со АСПЕЦ, и задачите на англиско-бугарски и англиско-романски превод со корпусот Europarl. Резултатите од проценката покажуваат дека предложениот модел постигнува подобрување од 3,11 поени во БЛЕУ.', 'lt': 'Šiame tyrime siūlomas naujas neurologinio vertimo mašina (NMT) modelis, pagrįstas koduotojo ir dekoderio modeliu, kuriame pateikiami pavadinti subjekto (NE) ženklai išorinės kalbos frazėse. Įprastiniai NMT modeliai turi dvi problemas, i švardytas taip: i) dėl didelio dviprasmiškumo jie dažnai turi sunkumų vertti žodžius įvairiomis reikšmėmis, ir ii) šių modelių gebėjimas perkelti sudėtinius žodžius atrodo sudėtingas, nes koduotojas kiekvienu etapu gauna žodį, sudėtinio žodžio dalį. Siekiant sušvelninti šias problemas, siūlomo modelio koduotojas kiekvienu etapu koduoja įvesties žodį pagal savo NE ženklą, o tai galėtų sumažinti įvesties žodžio dviprasmiškumą. Be to, koduotojas įveda LSTM sluoksnį, kurio lygis yra vienas iš gabalėlių, virš žodžių lygio LSTM sluoksnio, ir hierarchiškai koduoja išorinės kalbos sakinį, kad pagal NE ženklus būtų gautas junginys NE kaip vienas iš gabalėlių. Vertiname siūlomą vertimo anglų kalba į Japoniją užduoties model į ASPEC ir vertimo anglų kalba į Bulgariją bei anglų kalba į Rumuniją užduotis Europarl corpus. Vertinimo rezultatai rodo, kad pasiūlytame modelyje BLEU pagerėjo iki 3,11 punkto.', 'mt': "Dan l-istudju jipproponi mudell ġdid ta’ traduzzjoni bil-magna newrali (NMT) ibbażat fuq il-mudell ta’ kodifikatur-dekoder li jinkorpora tikketti msejħa entità (NE) ta’ sentenzi fil-lingwa tas-sors. Conventional NMT models have two problems enumerated as follows: (i) they tend to have difficulty in translating words with multiple meanings because of the high ambiguity, and (ii) these models'abilitytotranslatecompoundwordsseemschallengingbecausetheencoderreceivesaword, a part of the compound word, at each time step.  Biex jittaffew dawn il-problemi, il-kodifikatur tal-mudell propost jikkodifika l-kelma input abbażi tat-tikketta NE tiegħu f’kull pass ta’ żmien, li tista’ tnaqqas l-ambigwità tal-kelma input. Barra minn hekk, il-kodifikatur jintroduċi saff LSTM ta’ livell ta’ biċċiet fuq saff LSTM ta’ livell ta’ kliem u jikkodifika b’mod ġerarkiku sentenza tal-lingwa tas-sors biex jinqabad NE kompost bħala biċċiet fuq il-bażi tat-tikketti NE. Aħna jevalwaw il-mudell propost dwar kompitu ta’ traduzzjoni Ingliż-Ġappuniż mal-ASPEC, u kompiti ta’ traduzzjoni Ingliż-Bulgari u Ingliż-Rumen mal-Europarl corpus. Ir-riżultati tal-evalwazzjoni juru li l-mudell propost jikseb titjib sa 3.11 punti fil-BLEU.", 'ml': 'ഈ പഠനത്തില്\u200d സോര്\u200dസ്സ്- ഭാഷ വാക്കുകളുടെ പേരിലുള്ള എന്\u200dകോഡെര്\u200d ഡെക്കോഡെര്\u200d മോഡലിനെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ ഒരു പുതിയ നെയുറല്\u200d യന്ത്രത്തിന്റെ  സാധാരണ NMT മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് പിന്നിലുള്ള രണ്ടു പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d എണ്ണുന്നതാണ്: (i) വാക്കുകള്\u200d പല അർത്ഥങ്ങളുമായി അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്തമാക്കുന്നതില്\u200d അവര്\u200dക്ക് ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുണ്ട്. അതിനാല്\u200d ഈ മോഡലുകളുടെ കഴ ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d ലളിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡലിന്റെ കോഡോര്\u200dഡര്\u200d അതിന്റെ NE ടാഗിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വാക്ക് ക അതിനുമുമ്പ്, ഒരു വാക്ക്- നില LSTM ലേറ്ററിനുമീതെ കോണ്\u200dഡോര്\u200d എക്കോണ്\u200dഡ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. നെയിന്\u200d ടാഗുകള്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനത്ത് ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സ്- ഭാഷ വാക്ക് എന് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആസ്പെക്സിയില്\u200d നിന്നും ഇംഗ്ലീഷില്\u200d നിന്നും ജപ്പാനീസില്\u200d നിന്നും പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന ഒരു മോഡലിനെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഇ ഈ വിലാസങ്ങളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു പ്രൊദ്ദേശിച്ച മോഡല്\u200d ബിലിയൂയില്\u200d 3. 11 പോയിന്റ് മ', 'no': 'Denne studien foreslår eit nytt neuralmaskinsomsetjingsmodul (NMT) basert på koderingsmodellen som inkluderer merke på kjeldespråk med namnet entitet (NE). Konventionale NMT-modeller har to problemer som er nummerert som følgjande: i) dei har vanskeleg å oversette ord med fleire meningar på grunn av høg ambiguitet, og ii) at disse modelane kan omsetjast sammensatte ordet synes vanskeleg fordi koderingsordet er ein del av sammensatte ordet på kvar gong. For å redusera desse problemene, koderen av den foreslåde modellen koderer inndataordet på grunnlag av den NE- taggen på kvar gong, som kan redusera avgjevnaden av inndataordet. Denne koderen introduserer også ein LSTM-lag over eit ordnivå LSTM-lag og hierarkisk koder ein kjeldespråk setning for å henta ein samansett NE som ein del på grunnlag av NE-taggane. Vi evaluerer den foreslåde modellen på eit oversettelsesoppgåve i engelsk til japansk med ASPEC, og engelsk-til-bulgarsk og engelsk-til-Romansk oversettelsesoppgåver med Europarliske korpus. Resultatet av evalueringa viser at den foreslåde modellen oppnår opp til 3,11 punktforbetringa i BLEU.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym opracowaniu proponuje się nowy model neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) oparty na modelu kodera-dekodera, który zawiera tagi nazwanych entity (NE) zdań językowych źródłowych. Konwencjonalne modele NMT mają dwa problemy wymienione w następujący sposób: (i) mają tendencję do trudności z tłumaczeniem słów o wielu znaczeniach ze względu na dużą niejednoznaczność oraz (ii) zdolność tych modeli do przetłumaczenia słów złożonych wydaje się trudna, ponieważ na każdym etapie odbioru kodu, części słowa złożonego, są wymagane. Aby złagodzić te problemy, koder proponowanego modelu koduje słowo wejściowe na podstawie znacznika NE na każdym etapie czasu, co może zmniejszyć dwuznaczność słowa wejściowego. Ponadto koder wprowadza warstwę LSTM na poziomie kawałków nad warstwą LSTM na poziomie słowa i hierarchicznie koduje zdanie języka źródłowego, aby uchwycić złożone NE jako kawałek na podstawie znaczników NE. Oceniamy proponowany model zadań tłumaczeniowych z języka angielskiego na japoński z ASPEC oraz zadań tłumaczeniowych z języka angielskiego na bułgarski i angielsko-rumuński z korpusem Europarl. Wyniki oceny pokazują, że proponowany model osiąga do 3,11 punktową poprawę BLEU.', 'ro': 'Acest studiu propune un nou model de traducere automată neurală (NMT) bazat pe modelul encoder-decoder care încorporează etichetele entității denumite (NE) ale propozițiilor de limbă sursă. Modelele NMT convenţionale au două probleme enumerate după cum urmează: (i) acestea tind să aibă dificultăţi în traducerea cuvintelor cu semnificaţii multiple din cauza ambiguităţii ridicate şi (ii) capacitatea acestor modele de a traduce cuvinte compuse pare dificilă deoarece coderul recepţionează un cuvânt, o parte a cuvântului compus, la fiecare pas temporal. Pentru a atenua aceste probleme, codificatorul modelului propus codează cuvântul de intrare pe baza etichetei NE la fiecare pas orar, ceea ce ar putea reduce ambiguitatea cuvântului de intrare. În plus, codificatorul introduce un strat LSTM la nivel de bucată peste un strat LSTM la nivel de cuvânt și codează ierarhic o propoziție în limba sursă pentru a capta un NE compus ca o bucată pe baza etichetelor NE. Evaluăm modelul propus în cadrul unei sarcini de traducere din engleză în japoneză cu ASPEC, iar sarcinile de traducere din engleză în bulgară și din engleză în română cu corpul Europarl. Rezultatele evaluării arată că modelul propus realizează o îmbunătățire de până la 3,11 puncte în UEBLE.', 'mn': 'Энэ судалгаанд эх хэлний өгүүлбэрүүдийн тегтэй (NE) нэрлэгдэх шинэ мэдрэлийн машин хөрөнгө оруулалт (NMT) загварыг сануулдаг. Үндсэн NMT загваруудын хоёр асуудлыг дараа нь тооцоолж байна: i) тэд хэдэн утгатай илэрхийлэх хэцүү байдаг бөгөөд ii) эдгээр загваруудын хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хэцүү байдаг. Эдгээр асуудлуудыг багасгахын тулд, санал өгсөн загварын коддогч нь НЭ тэгшитгэлийн үндсэн үгийг цаг бүрт багасгаж өгсөн үгийг багасгаж чадна. Үүнээс гадна коддогч нь LSTM хэмжээний дээр хэмжээний LSTM хэлбэрийг танилцуулж, НЭ тэмдэгүүдийн үндсэн хэлбэрээр эх хэлний өгүүлбэрийг коддог. Бид англи-Japon-т орчуулах үйл ажиллагааны төлөвлөгөөний загварыг АСПЕС, Англи-болон Болгари, Англи-болон Румын Европын Корпус-тай хамт орчуулах үйл ажиллагааны тухай үнэлгээ үзүүлсэн. Үүний шалгалтын үр дүнд санал өгсөн загвар нь БЛЕУ-ын 3.11 цэгийн сайжруулалт хүртэл гарч ирнэ.', 'si': 'මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ අළුත් න්\u200dයුරෝල් මැෂින් අවවාදය (NMT) මොඩේලයක් අධාරිත කරන්නේ කෝඩර්- ඩිකෝඩර් මොඩේලය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ  සාමාන්\u200dය NMT මොඩලයේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙකක් තියෙනවා: i) ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අනුවෙන් ඉන්නේ වචනය වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා වචනය වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා වගේ වචනය වලින් විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒ වගේම මොඩල මෙම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අඩංගුවන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා ඇතුළු වචනය ඔක්කොඩ් කරනවා ඔක්කොම ප්\u200d එතකොට, එන්කෝඩර් එක්ක LSTM ස්තූතියෙන් වචන ස්තූතිය LSTM ස්තූතියෙන් චංක් ස්තූතියෙන් ඇතුළත් කරනවා ඒ වගේම මුළු භාෂාවක් වචන ස්තූ අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් ජාපානියෙන් වාර්තාවෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසියෙන් බුල්ගරියාන් වල ඉංග්\u200dරීසියාන් වල රෝමාන විශ්වාසයේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරතිචාරණය බ්ලෝයුස් වලින් 3.11 පැත්ත', 'sr': 'Ova studija predlaže novi model neuronskog prevoda mašine (NMT) na osnovu model a kodera-dekodera koji uključuje znakove rečenica na izvornom jeziku imena entiteta (NE). Konvencionalni modeli NMT imaju dva problema koje su navedene sljedeće: i) oni imaju teškoća da prevode riječi sa višestrukim značenjima zbog visoke ambiguitete, i ii) mogućnost modela da preusmjerene reèi izgledaju manje zato što je koder primio reč, deo složene reči, u svakom koraku. Da bi olakšao te probleme, koder predloženog modela kodira ulaznu reč na osnovu njenog oznake na svakom koraku, koji bi mogao smanjiti nesposobnost ulazne reči. Osim toga, koder predstavlja sloj LSTM na sloju LSTM na razini reči i hijerarhički kodira rečenicu izvornog jezika da uhvati spoj NE kao komad na temelju oznake NE. Procjenjujemo predloženi model za prevođenje engleskog na japanski zadatak sa ASPEC-om, i poslovima prevođenja engleskog na Bugarsku i engleskog na rumunsku sa evropskom korpusom. Rezultati procjene pokazuju da je predloženi model postigao poboljšanje do 3,11 tačka u BLEU-u.', 'so': 'Tan waxbarashadu wuxuu soo jeedaa tarjumaad cusub oo machine neural ah (NMT) model ku saleysan modelka cododer oo ku qoran alaabta magaca entity (NE) oo ku qoran hadalka afka sourceed. Tusaalooyinka waqtiga caadiga ah ee NMT waxay leeyihiin laba dhibaato oo lagu tiriyo sida soo socda: (i) waxay inta badan ku adag yihiin in ay ku turjumaan hadal ay leeyihiin micnaha kala duduwan sababtoo ah dhaqdhaqaaq badan darteed, iyo (ii) qaababka modelladan awoodytotranslatey waxay u muuqatay inay halligmaan, maxaa yeelay, eencoderreceivesawood, qayb ka mid ah hadalka kooxeedka, marka kasta. Si uu u fududeeyo dhibaatooyinkaas, saxda midowga la soo jeeday wuxuu ku qoran yahay erayga input oo ku saleysan baatagkiisa NE marka kasta, kaas oo hoos u dhigi kara qalabka hadalka input. Furthermore, Qordirku wuxuu ka soo bandhigaa darajada LSTM ee darajada LSTM ee aad ku qoran karto qoraal luqad ah oo aad ku qabsato NE sida guud oo kale. Tusaalada la soo jeeday waxaan qiimeynayaa shaqada turjumista Ingiriis-to-Japanese ee lagu sameeyo ASPEC, iyo shaqada afka Ingiriis-ilaa-Bulgarian iyo Ingiriis-to-Romanian-Romanian-korpus Yurub. Qiimeynta waxaa ka muuqda in qaababka la soo jeeday uu kordhin karo ilaa 3.11 baro ah BLEU.', 'sv': 'Denna studie föreslår en ny neural machine translation (NMT) modell baserad på encoder-avkodarmodellen som innehåller namngivna entitetstaggar (NE) av källspråkiga meningar. Konventionella NMT-modeller har två problem uppräknade enligt följande: i) de tenderar att ha svårt att översätta ord med flera betydelser på grund av den höga tvetydigheten, och ii) dessa modellers förmåga att översätta sammansatta ord förefaller utmanande eftersom de inte får ett ord, en del av det sammansatta ordet, vid varje tidssteg. För att lindra dessa problem kodar kodaren för den föreslagna modellen inmatningsordet på grundval av dess NE-tagg vid varje tidsteg, vilket skulle kunna minska tvetydigheten i inmatningsordet. Dessutom introducerar kodaren ett LSTM-lager på chunknivå över ett LSTM-lager på ordnivå och kodar hierarkiskt en källspråkig mening för att fånga en sammansatt NE som en bit baserat på NE-taggarna. Vi utvärderar den föreslagna modellen på en engelsk-japansk översättningsuppgift med ASPEC, och engelsk-bulgariska och engelsk-rumänska översättningsuppgifter med Europarl-korpusen. Utvärderingsresultaten visar att den föreslagna modellen uppnår en förbättring på upp till 3,11 punkter i BLEU.', 'ur': 'یہ مطالعہ ایک نئورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) موڈل کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو اسورس زبان کا ٹاگ (نیا) نامہ دار ہو سکتا ہے۔ اس کے مطابق دوسری مشکلات ہیں: i) ان کی کلمات کو بہت سی معنی سے ترجمہ کرنے کے لئے مشکل ہے، اور ii) ان نمڈلوں کی قابلیت دوسری باتوں کی ترجمہ کرنے کی وجہ سے ایک دوسرے سے متصل ہوئی کلمات میں مشکل ہوتی ہے کیونکہ ان کا پیدا ہوا کلمات کا ایک حصہ ہے. ان مشکلوں کو آسان کرنے کے لئے، پیشنهاد مدل کا کوڈر اسے اپنا نیٹ ٹاگ کے بنیاد پر اس کے نیٹ ٹاگ کے بنیاد پر کوڈ کرتا ہے، جو اپنا انگلیٹ لفظ کی غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ اور اس کے علاوہ، کوڈر ایک لفظ لفظ LSTM لفظ پر ایک چانک-لفظ LSTM لفظ کو معلوم کرتا ہے اور اس کے ذریعہ ایک سورس لفظ لفظ کو NE ٹاگ کے بنیاد پر ایک ٹاگ بنانے کے لئے ایک سورس لفظ لفظ کو کوڈ کرتا ہے. ہم نے ایک انگلیسی سے جاپانی ترجمہ کے کام پر پیشنهاد کی موڈل کا ارزش کیا ہے ASPEC اور انگلیسی سے Bulgarian اور انگلیسی سے رومانی ترجمہ کے کاموں کے ساتھ۔ ارزیابی نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد مدل BLEU میں 3.11 پوینٹوں کی زیادتی ہوتی ہے۔', 'ta': 'இந்த ஆராய்ச்சி மூலத்தின் மொழிகளின் மொழிகளின் பெயர் பெயரிடப்பட்ட பொருள் (NE) ஒட்டுகளை சேர்க்கும் குறியீட்டு மாதிரி அடிப்படையில் புத பொதுவான NMT மாதிரிகளுக்கு பின்வரும் இரு பிரச்சனைகள் எண்ணிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது: (i) அவர்கள் வார்த்தைகளை மொழிபெயர்ப்பில் பல பொருள்களுடன் கடினமாக இருக்க வேண்டும், மற்றும் (ii) இந்த மாதிரிகளின் இயலுமையா இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை நீக்க, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரியின் குறியீட்டு உள்ளீட்டு வார்த்தையை ஒவ்வொரு படியிலும் அதன் NE குறியீட்டின் அட மேலும், இந்த குறியீடு ஒரு சொல்- மட்டத்திற்கு மேல் LSTM அடுக்கை குறியீட்டை அறிவிக்கும் மற்றும் மூல- மொழி வாக்கியத்தை குறியீட்டு NE யை பிடிக்க ஒரு கூட்ட We evaluate the proposed model on an English-to-Japanese translation task with the ASPEC, and English-to-Bulgarian and English-to-Romanian translation tasks with the Europarl corpus.  மதிப்பிடும் முடிவுகள் தெரியும் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி பிலியூவில் 3. 11 புள்ளியின் மேம்படுத்தல் வர', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu này đề xuất một mô hình dịch cỗ máy thần kinh mới dựa trên mô hình mã hóa chứa đầy các thẻ tên thực thể (N) của câu cung cấp ngôn ngữ gốc. Mô hình NMB thông thường có hai vấn đề được liệt kê như sau: Để giải quyết những vấn đề này, bộ mã hóa của mô hình đề xuất mã hóa từ nhập trên nền tảng của nó vào mỗi bước thời gian, để giảm sự mơ hồ của từ nhập. Hơn nữa, bộ mã hóa (bộ mã hóa) giới thiệu lớp luật luật dạng phân khối lớn hơn lớp luật dạng từ, và hệ thống đã mã hóa một câu ngôn ngữ từ để ghi nhớ một loại N dạng liên hợp thành một loại thành phần cấu tạo trên các thẻ N. Chúng tôi đánh giá mẫu được đề xuất về một nhiệm vụ dịch chuyển giữa Anh và Nhật với ASAP, và dịch vụ Anh-Bulgaria và Anh-gọi-Romani với tập đoàn Châu Âu. Kết quả đánh giá cho thấy mô hình đề xuất đạt đến mức độ 311.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis Qoidagi NMT modellari quyidagi ikki muammolar esa hisoblanadi:(i) ular bir marta bir qadam so'zlarni tarjima qilish juda qiyin bo'ladi, va (ii) bu modelning abilitotranslatebir so'zlari mumkin deb o'ylaydi, chunki uning coderreceivesaword, bir bir bir qadam, har marta bir qadam. Bu muammolarni kamaytirish uchun, talab qilingan modelning kodlash usulini har marta yangi qadam yordamida kiritish imkoniyatini kodlash mumkin. Kodlash usuli Biz ASPEC va Ingliz tilidan Bulgarian va Ingliz tilidan Romaniya tarjima qilish vazifalari bilan o'qiymatimiz. Qiymati natijalarini koʻrsatish mumkin, talab qilingan modeli BLEU'da 3.11 nuqta yaxshi tugadi.", 'bg': 'Това изследване предлага нов модел на невронен машинен превод (НМТ), базиран на модела на кодер-декодер, който включва тагове с имена на единици (НЕ) на изречения на изходния език. Конвенционалните модели на НМТ имат два проблема, изброени по следния начин: (i) те са склонни да имат трудности при превеждането на думи с множество значения поради високата двусмисленост, и ii) способността на тези модели да превеждат съставени думи изглежда трудна, тъй като тези модели съответстват на думата, част от съставената дума, на всяка стъпка от времето. За да се облекчат тези проблеми, кодерът на предложения модел кодира входната дума на базата на неговия етикет по всяко време, което би могло да намали двусмислеността на входната дума. Освен това кодерът въвежда слой LSTM на ниво парче върху слой LSTM на ниво дума и йерархично кодира изречение на изходния език, за да улови съставен NE като парче въз основа на етикетите NE. Оценяваме предложения модел на преводаческа задача от англо-японски език с АСПЕК и преводаческа задача от англо-български и англо-румънски език с корпуса Европарл. Резултатите от оценката показват, че предложеният модел постига до 3.11 точки подобрение в БЛЮ.', 'da': 'Denne undersøgelse foreslår en ny neural machine translation (NMT) model baseret på encoder-dekoder modellen, der inkorporerer navngivne entitets (NE) tags af kildesprogssætninger. Konventionelle NMT-modeller har to problemer opstillet som følger: i) de har tendens til at have svært ved at oversætte ord med flere betydninger på grund af den høje tvetydighed, og ii) disse modellers evne til at oversætte sammensatte ord synes udfordrende, fordi de modtager et ord, en del af det sammensatte ord, på hvert tidstrin. For at afhjælpe disse problemer indkoder koderen for den foreslåede model indtastningsordet på grundlag af dets NE tag på hvert tidstrin, hvilket kunne reducere tvetydigheden af indtastningsordet. Desuden introducerer koderen et LSTM-lag på chunk-niveau over et LSTM-lag på ordniveau og koder hierarkisk en kildesprogssætning for at fange en sammensat NE som en chunk på grundlag af NE tags. Vi evaluerer den foreslåede model på en engelsk-japansk oversættelsesopgave med ASPEC, og engelsk-bulgarsk og engelsk-rumænsk oversættelsesopgaver med Europarl korpus. Evalueringsresultaterne viser, at den foreslåede model opnår en forbedring på op til 3,11 point i BLEU.', 'nl': 'Deze studie stelt een nieuw neural machine translation (NMT) model voor dat gebaseerd is op het encoder-decoder model dat named entity (NE) tags van zinnen in de brontaal bevat. Conventionele NMT-modellen hebben twee problemen die als volgt worden opgesomd: (i) zij hebben de neiging om woorden met meerdere betekenissen te vertalen vanwege de hoge ambiguïteit, en (ii) de mogelijkheid van deze modellen om samengestelde woorden te vertalen, lijkt uitdagend omdat de coderreceptie, een deel van het samengestelde woord, bij elke stap wordt vermeld. Om deze problemen op te lossen, codeert de encoder van het voorgestelde model het invoerwoord op basis van zijn NE-tag bij elke tijdsstap, wat de dubbelzinnigheid van het invoerwoord zou kunnen verminderen. Verder introduceert de encoder een chunk-level LSTM laag over een woordniveau LSTM laag en codeert hiërarchisch een brontaalzin om een samengestelde NE als een chunk vast te leggen op basis van de NE tags. We evalueren het voorgestelde model op een Engels-naar-Japans vertaaltaak met de ASPEC, en Engels-naar-Bulgaars en Engels-naar-Roemeens vertaaltaken met het Europarl corpus. Uit de evaluatieresultaten blijkt dat het voorgestelde model tot 3,11 puntsverbetering in BLEU bereikt.', 'hr': 'U ovom ispitivanju predlaže novi model prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) na temelju model a kodera-dekodera koji uključuje označene oznake entiteta (NE) oznake kazne iz izvornog jezika. Uobičajeni NMT modeli imaju dva problema koje su navedene sljedeće: i) oni imaju teškoća prevoditi riječi sa višestrukim smislama zbog visoke ambiguitete, i ii) mogućnost modela drugoslatespojene riječi izgleda manja jer koderska riječ, dio složene riječi, u svakom koraku. Za ublažavanje tih problema, koder predloženog modela kodira ulaznu riječ na temelju njenog oznake NE na svakom koraku, što bi moglo smanjiti nesposobnost ulazne riječi. Osim toga, koder predstavlja sloj LSTM na razini riječi na LSTM sloju i hijerarhički kodira rečenicu izvornog jezika da uhvati spoj NE kao komad na temelju oznake NE. Procjenjujemo predloženi model za prevođenje engleskog na japanski zadatak s ASPEC-om i poslovima prevođenja engleskog na bugarsko i engleskog na rumunsko s Europarlskim korpusom. Rezultati procjene pokazuju da je predloženi model postigao poboljšanje do 3,11 bodova u BLEU-u.', 'id': 'Studi ini mengusulkan model terjemahan mesin saraf baru (NMT) berdasarkan model decoder-decoder yang mengandung tag entity (NE) bernama dari kalimat bahasa sumber. Model NMT konvensional memiliki dua masalah yang terdaftar seperti in i: (i) mereka cenderung memiliki kesulitan dalam menerjemahkan kata-kata dengan berarti berbilang karena ambigusi tinggi, dan (ii) kemampuan model ini menerjemahkan kata-kata komponen tampak mencabar karena pengekoder menerima kata, bagian dari kata komponen, setiap langkah. Untuk mengurangi masalah ini, pengekodi model yang diusulkan mengekodi kata input berdasarkan tag NE pada setiap langkah waktu, yang dapat mengurangi ambiguitas kata input. Selain itu, pengekoder memperkenalkan lapisan LSTM tingkat potongan di atas lapisan LSTM tingkat kata dan secara hierarkis mengekodikan kalimat bahasa-sumber untuk menangkap NE komponen sebagai potongan berdasarkan tag NE. Kami mengevaluasi model yang diusulkan pada tugas terjemahan bahasa Inggris-Jepang dengan ASPEC, dan tugas terjemahan bahasa Inggris-Bulgari dan bahasa Inggris-Rumania dengan korpus Europarl. Hasil evaluasi menunjukkan bahwa model yang diusulkan mencapai sampai 3,11 poin peningkatan di BLEU.', 'fa': 'این مطالعه یک مدل جدید ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد که بر اساس مدل رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cی رمزبندی\u200cکننده\u200cای است که برچسب\u200cهای جمله\u200cهای زبان منبع (NE) نامیده شده است. مدلهای NMT معمولی دو مشکل را شماره داده می\u200cشود: i) آنها مشکلی دارند که کلمات را با تعریف تعداد تعداد تعداد تعدادی از معنی\u200cهای زیادی داشته باشند، و ii) توانایی این مدلها کلمات\u200cهای متصل\u200cشده\u200cای به نظر تغییر می\u200cرسند، زیرا آن\u200cها به عنوان یک بخشی از کلمات متصل، در هر قدم. برای آسان کردن این مشکلات، رمزگار مدل پیشنهاد کلمه ورودی را بر اساس نقاشی NE در هر مرحله زمانی رمزگذاری می\u200cکند که می\u200cتواند ناتوانی کلمه ورودی را کاهش دهد. علاوه بر این، کودهر یک طبقه LSTM را بر روی طبقه\u200cی لغت LSTM معرفی می\u200cکند و به صورت طبقه\u200cای یک جمله زبان منبع را برای گرفتن یک جمله NE به عنوان یک جمله بر اساس برچسب\u200cهای NE کودک می\u200cکند. ما مدل پیشنهاد را در مورد یک کار ترجمه انگلیسی به ژاپن با ASPEC و کارهای ترجمه انگلیسی به بولگاری و انگلیسی به رومانی با کورپوس اروپال اروپال ارزیابی ارزیابی ارزیابی می کنیم. نتایج ارزیابی نشان می دهد که مدل پیشنهاد تا 3.11 نقطه توسط BLEU به دست یافت.', 'de': 'Diese Studie schlägt ein neues neuronales maschinelles Übersetzungsmodell (NMT) vor, das auf dem Encoder-Decoder-Modell basiert, das benannte Entity-Tags (NE) von quellsprachigen Sätzen enthält. Konventionelle NMT-Modelle haben zwei Probleme, die wie folgt aufgezählt werden: (i) sie haben aufgrund der hohen Mehrdeutigkeit tendenziell Schwierigkeiten bei der Übersetzung von Wörtern mit mehreren Bedeutungen und (ii) die Fähigkeit dieser Modelle, zusammengesetzte Wörter zu übersetzen, erscheint schwierig, weil sie in jedem Schritt einen Teil des zusammengesetzten Wortes enthalten. Um diese Probleme zu beheben, kodiert der Encoder des vorgeschlagenen Modells das Eingabewort auf der Grundlage seines NE-Tags in jedem Zeitschritt, was die Mehrdeutigkeit des Eingabeworts verringern könnte. Darüber hinaus führt der Encoder eine Chunk-Level LSTM Schicht über eine Word-Level LSTM Schicht ein und codiert hierarchisch einen quellsprachigen Satz, um ein zusammengesetztes NE als Chunk auf Basis der NE Tags zu erfassen. Wir evaluieren das vorgeschlagene Modell für eine Übersetzungsaufgabe Englisch-Japanisch mit dem ASPEC und Englisch-Bulgarisch und Englisch-Rumänisch mit dem Europarl-Korpus. Die Evaluierungsergebnisse zeigen, dass das vorgeschlagene Modell eine bis zu 3,11-Punkt-Verbesserung in BLEU erreicht.', 'ko': '본 연구는 새로운 신경기계번역(NMT) 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 인코더-디코더 모델을 바탕으로 원본 언어 문장의 명칭 실체(NE) 표기를 포함한다.전통적인 NMT 모델에는 다음과 같은 두 가지 문제가 존재한다. (i) 고도의 다른 의미성 때문에 다양한 의미를 가진 단어를 번역하기 어렵다. (ii) 이런 모델들은 매 시간에 복합어를 번역하는 능력이 있다. 왜냐하면 복합어의 일부분인 encoder-receivesaword 때문이다.이러한 문제점을 완화하기 위해 이 모델의 인코더는 매 시간마다 입력된 글자의 NE 라벨에 따라 입력된 글자를 인코딩하면 입력된 글자의 잘못된 뜻을 줄일 수 있다.또한 인코더는 단어급 LSTM층에 블록급 LSTM층을 도입하고 NE 표기를 바탕으로 원본 언어 문장을 층별로 인코딩하여 복합 NE를 블록으로 포획한다.우리는 ASPEC를 사용하여 제시된 모델에 대해 영어부터 일본어까지의 번역 임무 평가를 실시했고, Europarl 어료 라이브러리를 이용하여 영어에서 불가리아어와 영어에서 루마니아어까지의 번역 임무를 평가했다.평가 결과 제시된 모델은 BLEU에서 3.11포인트까지 개선됐다.', 'sw': 'Utafiti huu unapendekeza tafsiri mpya ya mashine ya neurali (NMT) kwa kutumia muundo wa kodi-decodir unaoandika alama zinazoitwa entity (NE) za sentensi za lugha. Mradi wa kawaida wa NMT una matatizo mawili yanayohesabiwa kama ifuatavyo: (i) huwa ni vigumu kwa kutafsiri maneno yenye maana mbalimbali kwa sababu ya utazamo mkubwa, na (ii) vigezo vya uwezo wa mifano haya vinaonekana kuwa hallengingbecause we coderreceivesaword, part of the compound word, kwa kila hatua. Ili kupunguza matatizo haya, kodi ya modeli iliypendekezwa inajumuisha neno la input kwa msingi wa alama yake ya NE kwa kila hatua, ambalo linaweza kupunguza ukosefu wa neno la input. Zaidi ya hayo, idadi hiyo inaonyesha ngazi ya LSTM yenye kiwango kikubwa juu ya ngazi ya neno la LSTM na kwa ujumla unajumuisha sentensi ya lugha ya asili ya lugha ya kuikamata mkusanyiko wa NE kama mfumo wa kufuatia alama za NE. Tutathmini muundo ulipendekezwa katika kazi ya tafsiri ya Kiingereza-hadi Japani kwa ASPEC, na kazi za tafsiri za Kiingereza-hadi Kiingereza-hadi-Romania kwa mashirika ya Europarl. Matokeo ya uchunguzi yanaonyesha kuwa modeli ya pendekezo inafanikiwa kuboreshwa kwa pointi 3.11 nchini BLEU.', 'tr': "Bu aralyň täze näyral maşynyň terjimesini (NMT) ködleme-dekoder nusgasyna daýanýan täze bir nusgasyny teklip edýär. Adatça NMT modelleriň bu şekilde hasaplanýan iki meseleleri bar: (i) sözleriň birnäçe wajyp bilen terjime etmesi kynçylyk bolýar, we (ii) bu modelleriň ýokaryň ýokaryň ýokaryň üýtgeýän sözleriň üýtgeýänligi üçin hasaplanýar, çünki kodeýji sözüň bir bölegi bar. Bu meseleleri azaltmak üçin, teklif eden nusganyň kodçysynyň girdi sözüni her adımda NE tägleriniň esasynda ködleýär. Bu kär girdi sözüniň imbesiyetini azaltyp biler. Munuň üçin, koder LSTM düzümleriniň üstünde bir sany gatlaky LSTM gatlakyny görkez we iýerarhiýa bir sany NE tägleriniň esasynda bir sany çykmak üçin bir çeşme dilini ködleýär. Biz bu nusgany Europarl korpusu bilen Iňlisçe-ýa-japonça terjime täbliginde ASPEC we iňlisçe-we-bulgarça we iňlisçe-we-rumança terjime täbliginde çykýarys. Ýalňyşyň netijeli şu nusganyň teklip eden nusganyň BLEU'da 3.11 punkt gelişmegi başarýandygyny görkezýär.", 'af': "Hierdie studie voorstel 'n nuwe neurale masjien vertaling (NMT) model gebaseer op die enkoder- dekoder model wat inkorpreer naamde entiteit (NE) etikette van bron- taal setings. Konvensionele NMT-modelles het twee probleem getelde soos volgende: i) hulle het moeilikheid om woorde te vertaling met veelvuldige betekenings te wees vanweë die hoë ambiguiteit, en ii) hierdie modelles' abiliteit om te trek die samelekteerde woorde lyk skakel omdat die enkoder ontvang woord, 'n deel van die samelekteerde woord, op elke tyd stap. Om hierdie probleem te verklein, kodeer die enkoder van die voorgestelde model die invoer woord op die basis van sy NE etiket op elke tyd stap, wat kon die onbedienheid van die invoer woord verklein. Verder, die enkoder introduseer 'n blok- vlak LSTM laag oor' n woord- vlak LSTM laag en hierarkies kodeer 'n bron- taal seting om 'n komponent NE as 'n blok op die basis van die ne etikette te vang. Ons evalueer die voorgestelde model op 'n Engels-na-Japanse vertalingstaak met die ASPEC en Engels-na-Bulgaarse en Engels-na-Rumuniese vertalingstaak met die Europarle korpus. Die evalueringsresultate wys dat die voorgestelde model tot 3.11 punt verbetering in BLEU bereik word.", 'sq': 'Ky studim propozon një model të ri të përkthimit të makinës nervore (NMT) bazuar në modelin e koduesit-dekoderit që përfshin etiketa të emëruara të njësisë (NE) të fjalëve në gjuhën burimore. Modelet konvencionale të NMT kanë dy probleme të përmendura si pason: (i) at a kanë tendencë të kenë vështirësi në përkthimin e fjalëve me kuptime të shumta për shkak të ambigurisë së lartë, dhe (ii) aftësia e këtyre modeleve për të transliuar fjalë të komplikuara duket e vështirë sepse koduesit marrin fjalë, një pjesë e fjalës së komplikuar, në çdo hap të kohës. Për të lehtësuar këto probleme, koduesi i modelit të propozuar kodon fjalën e hyrjes në bazë të etiketës së tij NE në çdo hap të kohës, gjë që mund të reduktojë pasigurinë e fjalës së hyrjes. Përveç kësaj, koduesi fut një shtresë LSTM në nivelin e copave mbi një shtresë LSTM në nivelin e fjalëve dhe hierarkikisht kodon një fjalë në gjuhën e burimit për të kapur një përbërje NE si një copë në bazë të etiketave NE. Ne vlerësojmë modelin e propozuar për një detyrë përkthimi anglisht-japonez me ASPEC dhe detyrat përkthimi anglisht-bullgare dhe anglisht-rumune me korpusin Europarl. Rezultatet e vlerësimit tregojnë se modeli i propozuar arrin deri në 3.11 pikë përmirësim në BLEU.', 'hy': 'Այս ուսումնասիրությունը առաջարկում է նոր նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) մոդել, որը հիմնված է կոդավոր-կոդավոր մոդելի վրա, որը ներառում է կոդավոր-կոդավոր նախադասությունների կոչված անհատականության (N) նշաններ Հավանդական NMT մոդելներն ունեն երկու խնդիր, որոնք ցույց են տալիս հետևյալն. i) նրանք հակված են ունենալ բառեր բազմաթիվ իմաստով թարգմանելու դժվարություններ բարձր անորոշակիության պատճառով, և (i) այս մոդելների կարողությունը թարգմանել բարդ բառերը դժվար է թվում, քանի որ կոդերը ստանում է բառը, բառի մի մասը, յուրաքանչյու To alleviate these problems, the encoder of the proposed model encodes the input word on the basis of its NE tag at each time step, which could reduce the ambiguity of the input word.  Ավելին, կոդավորը ներկայացնում է բառերի մակարդակի LSMT շերտ և հիերարխիկապես կոդավորում է աղբյուր-լեզու նախադասություն, որպեսզի ընկալեն համադրված ՆԵ-ն որպես կտոր ՆԵ-ի նշանների հիմքում: Մենք գնահատում ենք անգլերեն-ճապոներեն թարգմանման խնդիրը ASPSC-ի հետ, անգլերեն-բուլգարեն և անգլերեն-ռոմաներեն թարգմանման խնդիրները Եվրոպալ կորպուսի հետ: Ագնահատման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ առաջարկված մոդելը հասնում է մինչև 3.11 միավորի բարելավման ԲԼԵՎ-ում:', 'az': "Bu təhsil yeni nöral maşın çevirimi (NMT) modelini koder-dekoder modelini təklif edir ki, mənbə dili cümlələrinin (NE) adı ilə birləşdirilən nöral məlumatın etiketlərini birləşdirir. NMT modelləri bu kimi hesablanmış iki problemi vardır: i) onlar çoxlu anlama ilə sözləri tərcümə etməklə çətin idilər, çünki bu modellərin hər dəfə sözlərini tərcümə edə bilər. Bu problemləri yüngülləşdirmək üçün, bu modelinin kodlayıcısı giriş sözünü hər dəfə NE etiketinin негізində kodlayır, ki, giriş sözünün müəyyənlığını azaltır. Daha sonra, koder söz-seviyyəti LSTM səviyyəsinin üstündə bir parça LSTM səviyyəsini təşkil edir və hiyerarşik olaraq, NE etiketlərinin üstündə bir parça olmaq üçün mənbə dili sözləri kodlayır. Biz İsPEC, İngilizə-Japonca tercümə görevlərinin, İngilizə-Bulgarca və İngilizə-Romalı tercümə işləri ilə birlikdə olan İngilizə-Japonca törətməsində təklif etdik. Növbəti sonuçları göstərir ki, təbliğ edilmiş modellərin BLEU'da 3.11 noktalarına qədər yaxşılaşdığını göstərir.", 'am': 'ይሄ ትምህርት አካባቢ (NE) የተባለውን ማህበራዊ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋዎች መክፈቻን በሚያሳድገው አዲስ የናውሬል መኪና ትርጉም (NMT) ሞዴል ያሳያል፡፡ በተቀናቀሉ የNMT ሞዴል ሁለት መከራዎች እንደ ተቆጠሩ ናቸው:(i) ቃላትን በብዙ አህላቶች በመተርጓፍ አስቸጋሪ ነው፤ እናም (ii) እነዚህን ዓይነቶች የሚችሉበት የኖሮቶranslateቃላት በመጠቀም ይችላል ብለዋል (በ) ምክንያቱም የትክክል ቃላት አንዱ ክፍል ነው፡፡ To alleviate these problems, the encoder of the proposed model encodes the input word on the basis of its NE tag at each time step, which could reduce the ambiguity of the input word.  ከዚህም በላይ የኮድ ደረጃው LSTM ደረጃን በንግግር ደረጃ ላይ ያስተካክላል፤ በአዲስ ደረጃ ላይ የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ ክፈት ይዘረጋል፡፡ በASPEC፣ እና ኢንጂልኛ-ወደ ቡልጋሪያን እና ኢንጂልኛ-ወደ ሮማኒያን ትርጉም ማዕከላዊ ኢትዮጵያ ካርፓስ ጋር በተዘጋጀው የኢንዝርዘኛ-ወደ ኢንጂል-ወደ ሮማኒያን ትርጓሜ ስራዎችን እናስተዋልታለን፡፡ የውጤቱ ውጤቶች ብሊዩን 3.11 ነጥብ ማድረግ እንዲደርስ ያሳያል፡፡', 'bn': 'এই গবেষণাটি একটি নতুন নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদ (NMT) মডেলের প্রস্তাব করেছে সোর্স-ভাষার শাস্তির উৎস-ভাষার শাস্তির (NE) ট্যাগ অনুবাদের ভিত সাধারণ এনএমটি মডেলের দুটি সমস্যা নিচে হিসেবে হিসেবে বিবেচনা করা হয়েছে: (i) তারা বেশ কঠিন শব্দ অনুবাদ করার ব্যাপারে কঠিন আছে যার মানে বেশ কঠিন, আর (ii) এই মডেলের ক্ষমতার ক্ষমতার কারণে তাদের কোডেরে To alleviate these problems, the encoder of the proposed model encodes the input word on the basis of its NE tag at each time step, which could reduce the ambiguity of the input word.  এছাড়াও, এনকোডার একটি শব্দ-স্তরের LSTM স্তরের উপর চিহ্নিত LSTM স্তর চিহ্নিত করে এবং এনএন ট্যাগের ভিত্তিতে একটি সোর্স-ভাষার সার্ভাষী বাক্যের মাধ্যমে একটি কম্পোনেন ইউরোপার্ল কোর্পাসের সাথে আমরা প্রস্তাবিত একটি ইংরেজি থেকে জাপানি অনুবাদ কর্মসূচীর মডেলের মূল্য মূল্য দিচ্ছি। এই মূল্যের ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে প্রস্তাবিত মডেল বিলিউতে ৩.', 'bs': 'Ova ispitivanja predlaže novi model prevoda neuralnih strojeva (NMT) na osnovu model a kodera-dekodera koji uključuje oznake entiteta (NE) oznake rečenica izvornog jezika. Konvencionalni modeli NMT imaju dva problema koji su navedeni u sljedećem broju: i) oni imaju teškoće prevoditi riječi sa višestrukim smislama zbog visoke nesposobnosti, i ii) sposobnost modela drugoslatespojene riječi čini manje zato što je koder primio riječ, dio složene riječi, u svakom koraku. Da bi ublažio te probleme, koder predloženog modela kodira ulaznu riječ na temelju njenog oznake NE na svakom koraku, što bi moglo smanjiti nesposobnost ulazne riječi. Osim toga, koder predstavlja sloj LSTM na sloju LSTM na razini riječi i hijerarhički kodira rečenicu izvornog jezika da uhvati spoj NE kao komad na temelju oznake NE. Procjenjujemo predloženi model za prevođenje engleskog na japanski zadatak sa ASPEC-om, i poslovima prevođenja engleskog na bugarsko i engleskog na rumunsko s europskim korpusom. Rezultati procjene pokazuju da je predloženi model postigao poboljšanje do 3,11 tačka u BLEU-u.', 'et': 'Käesolev uuring pakub välja uue neuro masintõlke mudeli (NMT) mudeli, mis põhineb kodeerija-dekooder mudelil, mis sisaldab lähtekeele lausete nimetatud olemi (NE) silte. Tavapärastel NMT mudelitel on kaks probleemi, mis on loetletud järgmiselt: i) neil kipub suure ebaselguse tõttu tekkima raskusi mitme tähendusega sõnade tõlkimisel ja ii) nende mudelite võime liitesõnade tõlkimiseks tundub raske, sest need mudelid on liitesõna osa igal ajasammul. Nende probleemide leevendamiseks kodeerib kavandatud mudeli kodeerija sisendsõna NE-märgise alusel igal ajasammul, mis võib vähendada sisendsõna ebaselgust. Lisaks tutvustab kodeerija tükkide tasemel LSTM kihi sõnatasemel LSTM kihi kohale ja kodeerib hierarhiliselt lähtekeele lause, et jäädvustada liitne NE tükiks NE siltide alusel. Hindame väljapakutud mudelit inglise-jaapani tõlkeülesande kohta ASPEC-ga ning inglise-bulgaaria ja inglise-rumeenia tõlkeülesandeid Europarl korpusega. Hindamistulemused näitavad, et kavandatud mudeliga saavutatakse kuni 3,11-punktiline paranemine BLU-s.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä ehdotetaan uutta neurokonekäännösmallia (NMT), joka perustuu kooderi-dekooderimalliin, joka sisältää lähdekielen lauseiden nimettyjä entiteettitunnisteita (NE). Perinteisillä NMT-malleilla on kaksi ongelmaa, jotka luetellaan seuraavasti: (i) niillä on taipumus kääntää sanoja, joilla on useita merkityksiä, suuren epäselvyyden vuoksi, ja (ii) näiden mallien kyky kääntää yhdistetyt sanat vaikuttaa haastavalta, koska se on koodinmukainen sana, joka on osa yhdistettyä sanaa, jokaisessa vaiheessa. Ongelmien lievittämiseksi ehdotetun mallin koodaaja koodaa syötösanan NE-tunnisteen perusteella kussakin vaiheessa, mikä voisi vähentää syötösanan epäselvyyttä. Lisäksi kooderi tuo palatason LSTM-kerroksen sanatason LSTM-kerroksen päälle ja hierarkisesti koodaa lähdekielen lauseen, jotta NE-yhdiste saadaan palaksi NE-tagien perusteella. Arvioimme ehdotettua mallia englannin-japanin käännöstehtävästä ASPEC:llä ja englannin-bulgarian- ja englannin-romanian käännöstehtävistä Europarl-korpusella. Arviointitulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetulla mallilla saavutetaan jopa 3,11 pisteen parannus BLEU:ssa.', 'ca': "Aquest estudi propon un nou model de traducció neural de màquina (NMT) basat en el model de codificador-descodificador que incorpora etiquetes denominades d'entitat (NE) de frases de llenguatge fontal. Conventional NMT models have two problems enumerated as follows: (i) they tend to have difficulty in translating words with multiple meanings because of the high ambiguity, and (ii) these models'abilitytotranslatecompoundwordsseemschallengingbecausetheencoderreceivesaword, a part of the compound word, at each time step.  Per aliviar aquests problemes, el codificador del model proposat codifica la paraula d'entrada sobre la base de la seva etiqueta NE en cada pas, que podria reduir l'ambigüitat de la paraula d'entrada. A més, el codificador introdueix una capa LSTM de nivell de trossos sobre una capa LSTM de nivell de paraules i codifica jeràrquicament una frase en llenguatge fontper capturar un compost NE com trossos sobre la base de les etiquetes NE. Evaluam el model proposat en una tasca de traducció anglès-japonès amb l'ASPEC, i tasques de traducció anglès-búlgar-anglès-rumà amb el corpus Europarl. Els resultats de l'evaluació demostren que el model proposat aconsegueix una millora de 3,11 punts a la BLEU.", 'cs': 'Tato studie navrhuje nový model neuronového strojového překladu (NMT) založený na modelu kodéru-dekodéru, který obsahuje značky pojmenované entity (NE) vět ve zdrojovém jazyce. Konvenční NMT modely mají dva problémy vyjmenované následujícím způsobem: (i) mají tendenci potíže s překladem slov s více významy kvůli vysoké nejednoznačnosti a (ii) schopnost těchto modelů překládat složená slova se zdá být náročná, protože v každém časovém kroku přijímá slovo, část složeného slova. Pro zmírnění těchto problémů kodér navrženého modelu kóduje vstupní slovo na základě jeho NE tagu v každém časovém kroku, což by mohlo snížit nejednoznačnost vstupního slova. Kromě toho kodér představuje LSTM vrstvu na úrovni kusů přes LSTM vrstvu slova na úrovni slova a hierarchicky kóduje větu zdrojového jazyka pro zachycení složeného NE jako kusu na základě NE tagů. Navržený model hodnotíme na překladatelské úlohy z angličtiny do japonštiny s ASPEC a překladatelské úlohy z angličtiny do bulharštiny a z angličtiny do rumunštiny s korpusem Europarl. Výsledky hodnocení ukazují, že navržený model dosahuje až 3,11 bodového zlepšení v BLEU.', 'jv': 'Wurusi iki supoyo sistem anyar terjamahan (NMT) sing basa nang model sing dibutuhke koder-decoder sing dibutungan Entèni (NMT) sing dibutuhke ditambah kelangan kelangan bangsane. model NMT sampeyan genjer saiki wis ramu popular ning sumulai durung: Ngubah Kasunyatan Ubah, koder first Awak dhéwé nggunakake model sing pawarno kanggo tarjamahan Inggris-kanggo japon karo ASBEC, lan basa Inggris-kanggo-bugar lan basa Inggris-kanggo-rumani karo Cwangalas kuwi nggo urjamahan iki. Rejalaké pancening sumulai sawetara dadi, akeh nggawe model sing bisa nyelehake tanggal 3.11 puntu kanggo nyelehake sing ditambah pancene kanggo BEL.', 'sk': 'Ta študija predlaga nov model nevronskega strojnega prevajanja (NMT), ki temelji na modelu kodir-dekoder, ki vključuje oznake imenovane entitete (NE) stavkov izvornega jezika. Konvencionalni modeli NMT imajo dve težavi, našteti na naslednji način: (i) imajo zaradi visoke dvoumnosti težave pri prevajanju besed z več pomeni, in (ii) sposobnost teh modelov prevajanja sestavljenih besed se zdi izzivna, ker je v vsakem koraku označena beseda, del sestavljene besede. Za lajšanje teh težav kodirnik predlaganega modela kodira vhodno besedo na podlagi oznake NE v vsakem časovnem koraku, kar bi lahko zmanjšalo dvoumnost vhodne besede. Poleg tega kodirnik uvaja plast LSTM na ravni kosov nad plastjo LSTM na ravni besede in hierarhično kodira stavek izvornega jezika, da zajame sestavljeno NE kot kos na podlagi oznak NE. Predlagani model prevajalske naloge angleško-japonsko smo ocenili z ASPEC, prevajalske naloge angleško-bolgarsko in angleško-romunsko pa s korpusom Europarl. Rezultati ocene kažejo, da predlagani model doseže do 3,11 točke izboljšave v BLEU.', 'ha': "Wannan littafin da ke buƙata wata salon tarjima na aikin neural (NMT) kan salon da misalin kode-coder da ke shigar da tagogi na sunan abun (NE) da maganar-language. Modalin NMT da ake ƙudura suna da mataimaki biyu a yi ƙidãya kamar da ke bi: (i) sun fi zaman wahala ga su fassara magana da ma'anar wasu masu yawa sabõda tsakanin da ya yi tsawo, kuma (ii) waɗannan misalin abincin matsayin otranlantecompound sunsance hasHallengingkwance Ga ka sauƙaƙara wa masu yiwuwa, kodkin motsi da aka buɗe shi yana kodi maganar inputin a baka ga tagogi na NE a kowace lokacin, wanda yana iya ƙarantar maganar inputi. Furthermore,the encoder introduces a chunk-level LSTM layer over a word-level LSTM layer and hierarchically encodes a source-language sentence to capture a compound NE as a chunk on the basis of the NE tags.  Tuna ƙaddara misalin da aka faɗa a kan wani aikin fassarar Ingiriya-zuwa-japane da the ANPAC, da kuma Ingiriya-zuwa-Bulgaria da Ingiriya-zuwa-Rumoniyan fassarar aiki da Corpoon EURparl. Matarin evaluci ya nuna cewa misalin da aka buƙata, ya sami up to 3.11 points in BLEU.", 'he': 'המחקר הזה מציע מודל חדש לתרגום מכונת עצבית (NMT) מבוסס על מודל קודד-קודד שמכיל תוויות נקראות (NE) של משפטים בשפת מקור. לדוגמאות NMT קונבנציונליות יש שתי בעיות שמרשומות ככה: (i) הם נוטים להיות קשים לתרגם מילים עם משמעות רבות בגלל השambiguity הגבוהה, ו (ii) היכולת של הדוגמאות האלה לטרנסל מילים מורכבות נראית מאתגרת בגלל שהקודם מקבל ord, חלק ממילה מורכבת, בכל צעד. כדי להקל על הבעיות האלה, הקודן של המודל המוצע קודם את המילה הכניסה על בסיס התג NE שלה בכל צעד, שיכול להפחית את השambiguity של המילה הכניסה. חוץ מזה, הקודן מציג שכבת LSTM ברמה של חתיכות מעל שכבת LSTM ברמה של מילים וקודה היררכית משפט בשפת מקור כדי לתפוס מחוזק NE כחתיכה על בסיס התגים NE. We evaluate the proposed model on an English-to-Japanese translation task with the ASPEC, and English-to-Bulgarian and English-to-Romanian translation tasks with the Europarl corpus.  תוצאות הערכה מראות שהמודל המוצע משיג שיפור עד 3.11 נקודות ב BLEU.', 'bo': 'This study proposes a new neural machine translation (NMT) model based on the encoder-decoder model that incorporates named entity (NE) tags of source-language sentences. Conventional NMT models have two problems enumerated as follows: To alleviate these problems, the encoder of the proposed model encodes the input word on the basis of its NE tag at each time step, which could reduce the ambiguity of the input word. འོན་ཀྱང་། ཨིན་ཀོ་ཌང་གིས་ཡིག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་chunk-level LSTM བང་རིམ་སྟོན་པ་དང་དབྱིབས་ཁུངས་ཀྱིས་རྐྱེན་སྐད་ཡིག་ཚིག་རྩོམ་སྒྲིག་ནང་དུ་ཆ་ཤས་ཤིག་རྩོམ We evaluate the proposed model on an English-to-Japanese translation task with the ASPEC, and English-to-Bulgarian and English-to-Romanian translation tasks with the Europarl corpus. རྒྱལ'}
{'en': 'Semantic Parsing for Technical Support Questions', 'pt': 'Análise semântica para perguntas de suporte técnico', 'es': 'Análisis semántico para preguntas de soporte técnico', 'ja': 'テクニカルサポートの質問に対するセマンティック解析', 'zh': '技术支持之语义解析', 'hi': 'तकनीकी सहायता प्रश्नों के लिए शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग', 'ru': 'Семантический анализ вопросов технической поддержки', 'fr': 'Analyse sémantique pour les questions de support technique', 'ar': 'الاعراب الدلالي لأسئلة الدعم الفني', 'ga': 'Parsáil Shéimeantach le haghaidh Ceisteanna Tacaíochta Teicniúla', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Szemantikus értelmezés a technikai támogatási kérdésekhez', 'el': 'Σημαντική ανάλυση για ερωτήσεις τεχνικής υποστήριξης', 'kk': 'Техникалық қолдау сұрақтарының семантикалық талдау', 'it': 'Analisi semantica delle domande di supporto tecnico', 'mk': 'Семантично анализирање на прашањата за техничка поддршка', 'lt': 'Semantinis analizavimas techninės paramos klausimams', 'ms': 'Pengesahan Semantik untuk Sokongan Teknik', 'ml': 'ടെക്നിക്കല്\u200d പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങ്', 'mt': 'Analiżi Semantika għal Mistoqsijiet ta’ Appoġġ Tekniku', 'pl': 'Parsowanie semantyczne dla pytań o wsparcie techniczne', 'ro': 'Analiza semantică a întrebărilor de asistență tehnică', 'mn': 'Техникийн дэмжлэх асуултуудын Semantic Parsing for Technical Support Questions', 'so': 'Isticmaalka kaalmada Teknolojiga', 'no': 'Semantisk tolking for teknisk støtte spørsmål', 'si': 'තාක්ෂික උදව් ප්\u200dරශ්න සඳහා සෙමාන්ටික විශ්ලේෂණය', 'sr': 'Semantičko razmatranje za pitanja tehničke podrške', 'ur': 'تخنیکی مدد سؤال کے لئے سیمنٹی پارسینگ', 'sv': 'Semantisk tolkning av frågor om teknisk support', 'ta': 'தொழில்நுட்ப ஆதரவு கேள்விகளுக்கான செமான்டிக் பாசிங்கள்', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Phân tích kỹ thuật cho các câu hỏi hỗ trợ', 'bg': 'Семантично анализиране на въпроси за техническа поддръжка', 'da': 'Semantisk fortolkning af spørgsmål vedrørende teknisk support', 'nl': 'Semantische parsing voor vragen over technische ondersteuning', 'hr': 'Semantička analiza za pitanja tehničke podrške', 'de': 'Semantisches Parsing für Fragen zum technischen Support', 'id': 'Analisasi Semantik untuk Pertanyaan Sokongan Teknik', 'fa': 'پرداخت سؤال های حمایت تکنیکی', 'sw': 'Maombi ya Kiteknolojia kwa ajili ya Maswali', 'tr': 'Tekniki Destek Soraglary üçin Semantik Taýýarlama', 'af': 'Semantiese verwerking vir tegniese ondersteuning vrae', 'sq': 'Semantic Parsing for Technical Support Questions', 'am': 'የTechnical Support Questions', 'hy': 'Տեխնիկական աջակցության հարցերի սեմատիկ վերլուծությունը', 'bn': 'প্রযুক্তিগত সমর্থন প্রশ্নের জন্য সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং', 'bs': 'Semantička analiza za pitanja tehničke podrške', 'az': 'Tehnik Desteği Soruları üçün Semantik Çözüm', 'ko': '기술 지원 문제의 의미 분석', 'ca': 'Analització Semàtica per a qüestions de suport tècnic', 'cs': 'Sémantické analýzy pro otázky technické podpory', 'et': 'Tehnilise toe küsimuste semantiline analüüs', 'fi': 'Teknistä tukea koskevien kysymysten semanttinen käsittely', 'jv': 'semanti Ngubah Kelangan kanggo Kelangang Tulungan', 'he': 'בדיקת סמנטית לשאלות תמיכה טכנית', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Semantna analiza za vprašanja tehnične podpore', 'bo': 'དྲ་རྒྱ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ས Semantic Parsing for Technical Support Questions'}
{'en': 'Technical support problems are very complex. In contrast to regular web queries (that contain few keywords) or factoid questions (which are a few sentences), these problems usually include attributes like a detailed description of what is failing (symptom), steps taken in an effort to remediate the failure (activity), and sometimes a specific request or ask (intent). Automating support is the task of automatically providing answers to these problems given a corpus of solution documents. Traditional approaches to this task rely on information retrieval and are keyword based ; looking for keyword overlap between the question and solution documents and ignoring these attributes. We present an approach for semantic parsing of technical questions that uses grammatical structure to extract these attributes as a baseline, and a CRF based model that can improve performance considerably in the presence of annotated data for training. We also demonstrate that combined with reasoning, these attributes help outperform retrieval baselines.', 'ar': 'مشاكل الدعم الفني معقدة للغاية. على عكس استعلامات الويب العادية (التي تحتوي على عدد قليل من الكلمات الرئيسية) أو الأسئلة الواقعية (وهي عبارة عن بضع جمل) ، تتضمن هذه المشكلات عادةً سمات مثل الوصف التفصيلي لما هو فشل (الأعراض) ، والخطوات المتخذة في محاولة لإصلاح الفشل ( النشاط) ، وأحيانًا طلب أو طلب محدد (نية). الدعم الآلي هو مهمة تقديم إجابات لهذه المشاكل تلقائيًا في ضوء مجموعة من وثائق الحل. تعتمد الأساليب التقليدية لهذه المهمة على استرجاع المعلومات وهي تعتمد على الكلمات الرئيسية ؛ البحث عن تداخل الكلمات الأساسية بين مستندات السؤال والحلول وتجاهل هذه السمات. نقدم نهجًا للتحليل الدلالي للأسئلة التقنية التي تستخدم البنية النحوية لاستخراج هذه السمات كخط أساس ، ونموذج قائم على نموذج CRF يمكنه تحسين الأداء بشكل كبير في وجود بيانات مشروحة للتدريب. نثبت أيضًا أن هذه السمات ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع التفكير ، تساعد في التفوق في الأداء على خطوط أساس الاسترجاع.', 'es': 'Los problemas de soporte técnico son muy complejos. A diferencia de las consultas web habituales (que contienen pocas palabras clave) o las preguntas factoides (que son unas pocas frases), estos problemas suelen incluir atributos como una descripción detallada de lo que está fallando (síntoma), pasos que se toman en un esfuerzo por remediar el error (actividad) y, a veces, una solicitud o solicitud específica (intención). Automatizar el soporte es la tarea de proporcionar automáticamente respuestas a estos problemas dado un conjunto de documentos de solución. Los enfoques tradicionales de esta tarea se basan en la recuperación de información y se basan en palabras clave; buscan la superposición de palabras clave entre los documentos de preguntas y soluciones e ignoran estos atributos. Presentamos un enfoque para el análisis semántico de preguntas técnicas que utiliza la estructura gramatical para extraer estos atributos como línea de base, y un modelo basado en CRF que puede mejorar el rendimiento considerablemente en presencia de datos anotados para la capacitación. También demostramos que, combinados con el razonamiento, estos atributos ayudan a superar las líneas base de recuperación.', 'fr': "Les problèmes de support technique sont très complexes. Contrairement aux requêtes Web ordinaires (qui contiennent peu de mots-clés) ou aux questions factuelles (qui ne sont que quelques phrases), ces problèmes incluent généralement des attributs tels qu'une description détaillée de ce qui échoue (symptôme), des mesures prises pour remédier à l'échec (activité) et parfois une demande ou une demande spécifique (intention). L'automatisation du support consiste à fournir automatiquement des réponses à ces problèmes à partir d'un corpus de documents de solution. Les approches traditionnelles de cette tâche reposent sur la récupération d'informations et sont basées sur des mots clés\xa0; elles recherchent le chevauchement de mots clés entre la question et les documents de solution et ignorent ces attributs. Nous présentons une approche pour l'analyse sémantique de questions techniques qui utilise la structure grammaticale pour extraire ces attributs comme base, et un modèle basé sur CRF qui peut améliorer considérablement les performances en présence de données annotées pour la formation. Nous démontrons également que, combinés au raisonnement, ces attributs permettent de surpasser les niveaux de référence de récupération.", 'pt': 'Os problemas de suporte técnico são muito complexos. Em contraste com as consultas regulares da Web (que contêm poucas palavras-chave) ou perguntas factóides (que são algumas frases), esses problemas geralmente incluem atributos como uma descrição detalhada do que está falhando (sintoma), etapas tomadas em um esforço para remediar a falha ( atividade) e, às vezes, uma solicitação ou solicitação específica (intenção). Automatizar o suporte é a tarefa de dar respostas automáticas a esses problemas a partir de um corpus de documentos de solução. As abordagens tradicionais para essa tarefa dependem da recuperação de informações e são baseadas em palavras-chave; procurando por sobreposição de palavras-chave entre os documentos de pergunta e solução e ignorando esses atributos. Apresentamos uma abordagem para análise semântica de questões técnicas que usa estrutura gramatical para extrair esses atributos como linha de base e um modelo baseado em CRF que pode melhorar consideravelmente o desempenho na presença de dados anotados para treinamento. Também demonstramos que, combinados com o raciocínio, esses atributos ajudam a superar as linhas de base de recuperação.', 'ja': '技術サポートの問題は非常に複雑です。 通常のウェブクエリ（キーワードがほとんど含まれていない）や事実に基づく質問（わずかな文章）とは対照的に、これらの問題には通常、失敗しているもの（症状）の詳細な説明、失敗を修正するために取られた手順（アクティビティ）、時には特定の要求や質問（意図）などの属性が含まれます。 サポートの自動化は、ソリューション文書のコマンドを与えられたこれらの問題に対する回答を自動的に提供する作業です。 このタスクに対する従来のアプローチは、情報検索に依存し、キーワードベースです。質問と解決策ドキュメントの間でキーワードの重複を探し、これらの属性を無視します。 文法構造を用いてこれらの属性をベースラインとして抽出する技術的質問の意味解析のためのアプローチと、トレーニングのための注釈付きデータの存在下でパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させることができるCRFベースのモデルを提示する。 また、推論と組み合わせることで、これらの属性が検索ベースラインを上回ることを実証しています。', 'zh': '技术支持问非常复杂。 与常 Web 询(包数关键字)、factoid 数语(即数句)比,常以下属性:其败状详细描述()、修复故障()步骤,或特定请问(意)。 自动化所赞给定解决方案文档库自给也。 其法赖于信息检索,而基于关键字。 寻问解决方案文档间关键字重叠,略其性也。 吾为术语义解析之法,以语法结构取性为基线,及CRF之形势,可得而练数下显能也。 证合推理,有助于越检基线。', 'hi': 'तकनीकी सहायता समस्याएं बहुत जटिल हैं। नियमित वेब प्रश्नों (जिनमें कुछ कीवर्ड होते हैं) या फैक्टोइड प्रश्नों (जो कुछ वाक्य होते हैं) के विपरीत, इन समस्याओं में आमतौर पर क्या असफल हो रहा है (लक्षण) का विस्तृत विवरण, विफलता (गतिविधि) को सुधारने के प्रयास में उठाए गए कदम, और कभी-कभी एक विशिष्ट अनुरोध या पूछना (इरादा) जैसी विशेषताएं शामिल होती हैं। स्वचालित समर्थन स्वचालित रूप से समाधान दस्तावेजों के एक कॉर्पस को देखते हुए इन समस्याओं के उत्तर प्रदान करने का कार्य है। इस कार्य के लिए पारंपरिक दृष्टिकोण जानकारी पुनर्प्राप्ति पर निर्भर करते हैं और कीवर्ड आधारित हैं; प्रश्न और समाधान दस्तावेज़ों के बीच कीवर्ड ओवरलैप की तलाश में और इन विशेषताओं को अनदेखा करना। हम तकनीकी प्रश्नों के शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो इन विशेषताओं को बेसलाइन के रूप में निकालने के लिए व्याकरणिक संरचना का उपयोग करता है, और एक सीआरएफ आधारित मॉडल जो प्रशिक्षण के लिए एनोटेट डेटा की उपस्थिति में प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार कर सकता है। हम यह भी प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि तर्क के साथ संयुक्त, ये विशेषताएं पुनर्प्राप्ति बेसलाइन को बेहतर बनाने में मदद करती हैं।', 'ru': 'Проблемы технической поддержки очень сложны. В отличие от обычных веб-запросов (которые содержат несколько ключевых слов) или фактических вопросов (которые являются несколькими предложениями), эти проблемы обычно включают атрибуты, такие как подробное описание того, что терпит неудачу (симптом), шаги, предпринятые в попытке исправить ошибку (активность), а иногда и конкретный запрос или запрос (намерение). Автоматизация поддержки - это задача автоматического предоставления ответов на эти проблемы с учетом совокупности документов по решению. Традиционные подходы к этой задаче опираются на поиск информации и основаны на ключевых словах; поиск дублирования ключевых слов между вопросами и документами решения и игнорирование этих атрибутов. Мы представляем подход к семантическому разбору технических вопросов, который использует грамматическую структуру для извлечения этих атрибутов в качестве базовой линии, и модель на основе ОФД, которая может значительно улучшить производительность при наличии аннотированных данных для обучения. Мы также демонстрируем, что в сочетании с рассуждениями эти атрибуты помогают превзойти исходные показатели поиска.', 'ga': 'Tá fadhbanna tacaíochta teicniúla an-chasta. I gcodarsnacht le fiosrúcháin rialta gréasáin (nach bhfuil mórán eochairfhocail iontu) nó ceisteanna factoid (cúpla abairt), is iondúil go n-áiríonn na fadhbanna seo tréithe cosúil le cur síos mionsonraithe ar cad atá ag teip (symptom), céimeanna a ghlactar mar iarracht an teip a leigheas. gníomhaíocht), agus uaireanta iarratas nó ceist ar leith (intinn). Is éard atá i gceist le tacaíocht uathoibrithe ná freagraí a sholáthar go huathoibríoch ar na fadhbanna seo nuair a thugtar corpas de dhoiciméid réitigh. Braitheann cur chuige traidisiúnta don tasc seo ar aisghabháil faisnéise agus tá siad bunaithe ar eochairfhocail; ag lorg forluí eochairfhocail idir na doiciméid ceiste agus réitigh agus neamhaird a dhéanamh ar na tréithe sin. Cuirimid i láthair cur chuige maidir le parsáil shéimeantach ar cheisteanna teicniúla a úsáideann struchtúr gramadaí chun na tréithe seo a bhaint amach mar bhonnlíne, agus samhail bunaithe ar CRF ar féidir leis an fheidhmíocht a fheabhsú go mór i láthair na sonraí anótáilte le haghaidh oiliúna. Léirímid freisin, in éineacht leis an réasúnaíocht, go gcuidíonn na tréithe seo le sárobair a dhéanamh ar bhunlínte aisghabhála.', 'hu': 'A technikai támogatási problémák nagyon összetettek. Ellentétben a rendszeres webes lekérdezésekkel (amelyek néhány kulcsszót tartalmaznak) vagy a tényleges kérdésekkel (amelyek néhány mondat), ezek a problémák általában olyan attribútumokat tartalmaznak, mint a hibás (tünet) részletes leírása, a hiba (tevékenység) orvoslására tett lépések, és néha egy konkrét kérés vagy kérés (szándék). A támogatás automatizálása az a feladat, hogy automatikusan választ adjon ezekre a problémákra a megoldási dokumentumok sorozatával. E feladat hagyományos megközelítése az információk lekeresésén alapul, és kulcsszavakon alapul; kulcsszó átfedést keres a kérdéses és megoldási dokumentumok között, és figyelmen kívül hagyja ezeket az attribútumokat. Bemutatjuk a technikai kérdések szemantikai elemzéséhez szükséges megközelítést, amely nyelvtani struktúrát használ ezeknek az attribútumoknak az alapként történő kivonásához, valamint egy CRF alapú modellt, amely jelentősen javíthatja a teljesítményt jegyzetelt adatok jelenlétében a képzéshez. Azt is bizonyítjuk, hogy az érveléssel kombinálva ezek az attribútumok segítenek felülmúlni a visszakeresési alapvető értékeket.', 'el': 'Τα προβλήματα τεχνικής υποστήριξης είναι πολύ περίπλοκα. Σε αντίθεση με τα συνηθισμένα διαδικτυακά ερωτήματα (που περιέχουν λίγες λέξεις-κλειδιά) ή τις πραγματικές ερωτήσεις (που είναι λίγες προτάσεις), αυτά τα προβλήματα συνήθως περιλαμβάνουν χαρακτηριστικά όπως μια λεπτομερή περιγραφή του τι αποτυγχάνει (σύμπτωμα), βήματα που λαμβάνονται σε μια προσπάθεια αποκατάστασης της αποτυχίας (δραστηριότητα), και μερικές φορές ένα συγκεκριμένο αίτημα ή ερώτηση (πρόθεση). Η αυτοματοποίηση της υποστήριξης είναι το καθήκον της αυτόματης παροχής απαντήσεων σε αυτά τα προβλήματα με ένα σύνολο εγγράφων λύσης. Οι παραδοσιακές προσεγγίσεις για το έργο αυτό βασίζονται στην ανάκτηση πληροφοριών και βασίζονται σε λέξεις-κλειδιά. αναζητώντας επικάλυψη λέξεων-κλειδιών μεταξύ των εγγράφων ερώτησης και λύσης και αγνοώντας αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά. Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση για τη σημασιολογική ανάλυση τεχνικών ερωτήσεων που χρησιμοποιεί τη γραμματική δομή για να εξάγει αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά ως βάση, και ένα μοντέλο βασισμένο στο το οποίο μπορεί να βελτιώσει σημαντικά την απόδοση παρουσία σχολιασμένων δεδομένων για την εκπαίδευση. Αποδεικνύουμε επίσης ότι σε συνδυασμό με τη λογική, αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά βοηθούν στην απόδοση των βασικών γραμμών ανάκτησης.', 'it': "I problemi di supporto tecnico sono molto complessi. A differenza delle normali query web (che contengono poche parole chiave) o domande fattuali (che sono poche frasi), questi problemi di solito includono attributi come una descrizione dettagliata di ciò che non funziona (sintomo), passi intrapresi nel tentativo di rimediare al fallimento (attività), e talvolta una richiesta specifica o domanda (intenzione). Automatizzare il supporto è il compito di fornire automaticamente risposte a questi problemi grazie a un corpus di documenti di soluzione. Gli approcci tradizionali a questo compito si basano sul recupero di informazioni e sono basati su parole chiave; cercando la sovrapposizione di parole chiave tra i documenti di domanda e soluzione e ignorando questi attributi. Presentiamo un approccio per l'analisi semantica di domande tecniche che utilizza la struttura grammaticale per estrarre questi attributi come base, e un modello basato su CRF che può migliorare notevolmente le prestazioni in presenza di dati annotati per la formazione. Dimostriamo anche che, combinati con il ragionamento, questi attributi aiutano a superare le linee di riferimento di recupero.", 'ka': 'ტექნიკური დახმარების პრობლემები ძალიან კომპლექსია. რეგილური ვებ კითხვების კონტაქტებით (რომელიც ცოტა კითხვები) ან ფაქტოიდის კითხვების კონტაქტებით (რომელიც ცოტა კითხვები) ეს პრობლემებით უბრალოდ აქვს ატრიბუტები, როგორც წარმოდგენა (სიმპტომი), წარმოდგენა ავტომატიკური დახმარება არის ამ პრობლემებისთვის, რომლებიც გაუმუშავებულია პრობლემენტების კოპორსს. ტრადიციონალური დახმარება ამ დავალებისთვის ინფორმაციის მიღებაზე დარწმუნდება და გასაღების სიტყვის დაბათება; კითხვა და გახსნა დოკუმენტების შორის გადარჩენა და ამ ატრიბუტების გადარჩენა. ჩვენ გვეყვანეთ ტექნონიკური კითხვების სენმანტიკური პარასტის მიზეზი, რომელიც გამოყენებს გრამიკური სტრუქტურაციის გამოყენება ამ ატრიბუტებს როგორც ფესტური სტრუქტურაცია, და CR ჩვენ ასევე გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ახალგაზრულებთან დაკავშირებულია, ეს ახალგაზრულებები უფრო მეტად გამოიყენება ბაზი ხაზები.', 'mk': 'Проблемите со техничката поддршка се многу комплексни. За разлика од редовните веб- прашања (кои содржат неколку клучни зборови) или фактоидни прашања (кои се неколку реченици), овие проблеми обично вклучуваат атрибути како детално опишување на тоа што не успева (симптом), чекори преземени во обид за поправка на неуспехот (активност), а понекогаш специфично барање или прашање (намера). Автоматизирањето на поддршката е задачата автоматски да се обезбедат одговори на овие проблеми со оглед на корпус документи за решение. Традиционалните пристапи до оваа задача зависат од преземањето информации и се базирани на клучните зборови; барајќи прекривање на клучните зборови помеѓу прашањето и документите за решение и игнорирајќи ги овие атрибути. Презентираме пристап за семантично анализирање на техничките прашања кои користат граматска структура за извлекување на овие атрибути како основа, и модел базиран на ЦРФ кој може значително да ја подобри резултатот во присуството на анотирани податоци за обука. Исто така, демонстрираме дека во комбинација со размислување, овие атрибути помагаат над извршувањето на основните линии.', 'kk': 'Техникалық қолдау мәселелері өте комплекс. Кәдімгі веб сұрақтарының (бірнеше кілт сөздері) немесе фактоид сұрақтарының (бірнеше сұрақтар) қарамастан, бұл мәселелер әдетте қателердің (симптомы) симптомының егжей- тегжейі симптомы, қатесін (белсенділікті) түзету ү Автоматты түрде қолдау - шешім құжаттарының корпус жауаптарын автоматты түрде беру тапсырмасы. Бұл тапсырманың әдетті қатынау мәліметті алу және кілт сөздерді негіздеп тұрады. Сұрақ мен шешу құжаттары арасындағы кілттің сөздерді іздеп, осы атрибуттарды елемейді. Біз бұл атрибуттарды негізгі жол ретінде тарқату үшін грамматикалық құрылымды қолданатын техникалық сұрақтарды semantic талдау үшін, және CRF негізгі үлгісі бұл атрибуттарды оқыту үшін жарияланған деректерді жақсы Сонымен қатар, бұл атрибуттардың негізгі сызықтарын алу үшін көмектесетінін көрсетейміз.', 'lt': 'Techninės paramos problemos yra labai sudėtingos. Priešingai nei reguliarius internetinius klausimus (kuriuose yra keli raktiniai žodžiai) arba faktinius klausimus (kurie yra keli sakiniai), šios problemos paprastai apima požymius, pvz., išsamų trūkumų aprašymą (simptomas), veiksmus, kurių imamasi siekiant ištaisyti trūkumą (veiklą), ir kartais konkretų prašymą arba klausimą (ketinimą). Paramos automatizavimas yra užduotis automatiškai pateikti atsakymus į šias problemas, atsižvelgiant į sprendimų dokumentų rinkinį. Tradiciniai šios užduoties metodai grindžiami informacijos gavimu ir grindžiami pagrindiniais žodžiais; ieškant klausimo ir sprendimo dokumentų klavižodžių dubliavimo ir ignoruojant šiuos požymius. Pateikiame metodą semantiniam techninių klausimų analizavimui, kuris naudoja gramatinę struktūrą šiems požymiams ištraukti kaip bazinę vertę, ir CRF pagrįstą model į, kuris gali gerokai pagerinti rezultatus, jei yra anotuotų mokymo duomenų. Taip pat įrodome, kad kartu su motyvavimu šie požymiai padeda viršyti surinkimo bazines linijas.', 'mt': 'Il-problemi ta’ appoġġ tekniku huma kumplessi ħafna. B’kuntrast ma’ mistoqsijiet regolari fuq l-internet (li fihom ftit kliem ewlieni) jew mistoqsijiet fattojdi (li huma ftit sentenzi), dawn il-problemi normalment jinkludu attributi bħal deskrizzjoni dettaljata ta’ dak li qed ifalli (sintomu), passi meħuda fi sforz biex jiġi rimedjat il-falliment (attività), u xi kultant talba speċifika jew mistoqsija (intenzjoni). L-awtomatizzazzjoni tal-appoġġ hija l-kompitu li tipprovdi awtomatikament tweġibiet għal dawn il-problemi minħabba korpus ta’ dokumenti ta’ soluzzjoni. L-approċċi tradizzjonali għal dan il-kompitu jiddependu fuq il-ġbir tal-informazzjoni u huma bbażati fuq il-kliem ewlieni; looking for keyword overlap between the question and solution documents and ignoring these attributes.  Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ għall-analiżi semantika ta’ kwistjonijiet tekniċi li juża struttura grammatika biex jiġu estratti dawn l-attributi bħala linja bażi, u mudell ibbażat fuq is-CRF li jista’ jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni konsiderevolment fil-preżenza ta’ dejta annotata għat-taħriġ. Jiġu murija wkoll li flimkien mar-raġunament, dawn l-attributi jgħinu fit-twettiq tal-linji bażi tal-irkupru.', 'ml': 'സാങ്കേതിക പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമാണ്. സാധാരണ വെബ് ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ (ചില വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്ള) അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഫാക്ടോയിഡ് ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ (ചില വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുന്നു) അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200d സാധാരണയായി പരാജയപ്പെട്ടിരിക് സ്വയം പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നത് തീരുമാനിക്കുന്ന രേഖകളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം സ്വയം നല്\u200dകുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലി ഈ ജോലിയിലേക്കുള്ള പാട്ടികമായ സമ്മാനങ്ങള്\u200d വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്നതിനെ ആശ്രയിക്കുകയും കീവോ ചോദ്യത്തിനും തീരുമാനിക്കുന്ന രേഖകള്\u200dക്കും ഇടയില്\u200d കീവോര്\u200dഡ് മേല്\u200dപ്പ് തേടുകയും ഈ കുറേപ്പുകള്\u200d അവഗണ സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ക് ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് ഗ്രാമാന്റിക്കല്\u200d ഘട്ടത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മ്മിക്കുന്നതിനായി നമ്മ കാരണങ്ങളോടൊപ്പം ചേര്\u200dന്നിരിക്കുന്ന കാര്യങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ക', 'pl': 'Problemy z pomocą techniczną są bardzo złożone. W przeciwieństwie do zwykłych zapytań internetowych (które zawierają kilka słów kluczowych) lub pytań faktycznych (które składają się z kilku zdań), problemy te zazwyczaj obejmują atrybuty takie jak szczegółowy opis tego, co się nie uda (symptom), kroki podjęte w celu usunięcia awarii (aktywność), a czasem konkretne żądanie lub zapytanie (intencja). Automatyzacja wsparcia jest zadaniem automatycznego udzielania odpowiedzi na te problemy pod kątem korpusu dokumentów rozwiązania. Tradycyjne podejście do tego zadania opiera się na pozyskiwaniu informacji i opiera się na słowach kluczowych; Szukanie słów kluczowych nakładających się na dokumenty pytania i rozwiązania oraz ignorowanie tych atrybutów. Przedstawiamy podejście do semantycznego parsowania pytań technicznych, które wykorzystuje strukturę gramatyczną do wyodrębnienia tych atrybutów jako bazę bazową, oraz model oparty na CRF, który może znacznie poprawić wydajność w obecności adnotacji danych do treningu. Pokazujemy również, że w połączeniu z rozumowaniem, atrybuty te pomagają przewyższać linie bazowe pobierania.', 'mn': 'Техникийн дэмжлэх асуудлууд маш нарийн. Эдгээр асуудлууд нь ихэвчлэн алдагдсан (шинж тэмдэглэгдсэн) веб кверсийн эсрэг (хэдэн түлхүүр үг) эсвэл фактоид асуудлуудын эсрэг, эдгээр асуудлууд нь ихэвчлэн алдагдсан (шинж тэмдэглэгдсэн) зүйлсийг сайжруулахын тулд нарийвчлалтай тайлбар, ал Автоматтын дэмжлэг бол шийдвэрлэлийн баримт өгсөн асуудлыг автоматаар хариулт өгөх үйл ажил юм. Энэ ажлын уламжлалт ойлголт мэдээллийг авах болон түлхүүр үг үндсэн байдаг. асуулт болон шийдвэрлэлийн баримтуудын хоорондох түлхүүр үгийг хайж, эдгээр харилцааныг үгүйсгэдэг. Бид грамматикийн бүтэц ашигладаг техник асуултуудын семантик хуваалцах арга загварыг суурь шугам болгон ашиглаж, CRF-ын суурь загварын загварыг суралцах боломжтой болгодог. Мөн бид ойлголттой холбогдож байгааг харуулж байна. Эдгээр харилцаа нь үндсэн шугам гаргахын тулд тусалдаг.', 'no': 'Tehniske støtte er svært komplekse. I contrast to regular web questions (that contain few keywords) or factoid questions (which are a few sentences), these problems usually include attributes like a detailed description of what is failing (symptom), steps taken in an effort to remedy the failure (activity), and sometimes a specific request or ask (intent). Automatisk støtte er oppgåva for å gi svar på desse problemene oppgjeve eit korpus av løysingsdokumenter automatisk. Tradisjonale tilnærmingar til denne oppgåva er på informasjonshenting og er nøkkelord basert. etter nøkkelordoverlapping mellom spørsmålet og løysingsdokumentet og ignorerer desse attributtane. Vi presenterer ein tilnærming for semantisk tolking av tekniske spørsmål som brukar grammatiske struktur for å pakka ut desse attributtane som baseline, og ein CRF-basert modell som kan forbetra utviklinga betydelig i tilstand til oppmerkte data for opplæring. Vi viser også at kombinasjonen med rasjon, hjelper disse attributtane å utføra baselinjer.', 'sr': 'Problemi sa tehničkom podrškom su veoma kompleksni. Pored običnih web ispitivanja (koje sadrže nekoliko ključnih reči) ili fakoidnih pitanja (koje su nekoliko rečenica), ovi problemi obično uključuju atribute kao detaljno opis onoga što nedostaje (simptom), korake koji su poduzeti u naporu da se oporavi neuspjeh (aktivnost), i ponekad specifični zahtev ili pitaju (nameru). Automatizacija podrške je zadatak automatskog pružanja odgovora na te probleme s obzirom na korpus rešenja dokumenta. Tradicionalni pristupi ovom zadatku oslanjaju se na prikupljanje informacija i zasnovane su ključne riječi; tražeći ključnu riječ preklapanje između pitanja i rešenja dokumenta i ignorišući te atribute. Predstavljamo pristup semantičkom analizu tehničkih pitanja koja koristi gramatičku strukturu da izvuče te atribute kao osnovnu liniju, i model bazirani na CRF-u koji može znatno poboljšati provedbu u prisustvu annotiranih podataka za obuku. Takoðe pokazujemo da kombinacija sa razumijevanjem, te atribute pomažu da izvrše osnovne linije.', 'ms': 'Masalah sokongan teknikal sangat kompleks. In contrast to regular web queries (that contain few keywords) or factoid questions (which are a few sentences), these problems usually include attributes like a detailed description of what is failing (symptom), steps taken in an effort to remediate the failure (activity), and sometimes a specific request or ask (intent).  Sokongan automatik adalah tugas untuk menyediakan jawapan secara automatik kepada masalah ini diberikan korpus dokumen penyelesaian. pendekatan tradisional untuk tugas ini bergantung pada pemulihan maklumat dan berdasarkan kata kunci; mencari salinan kunci yang meliputi antara soalan dan dokumen penyelesaian dan mengabaikan atribut ini. Kami memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk penghuraian semantik soalan teknikal yang menggunakan struktur grammatik untuk mengekstrak atribut ini sebagai dasar as as, dan model berasaskan CRF yang boleh meningkatkan prestasi secara konsideratif dalam kehadiran data yang dicatat untuk latihan. Kami juga menunjukkan bahawa bergabung dengan alasan, atribut ini membantu melampaui garis dasar pemulihan.', 'ro': 'Problemele de asistenţă tehnică sunt foarte complexe. Spre deosebire de interogările web obișnuite (care conțin câteva cuvinte cheie) sau întrebările factoide (care sunt câteva propoziții), aceste probleme includ de obicei atribute precum o descriere detaliată a ceea ce eșuează (simptom), pașii luați în efortul de a remedia eșecul (activitate), și uneori o cerere specifică sau întrebare (intenție). Automatizarea suportului este sarcina de a oferi automat răspunsuri la aceste probleme, având în vedere un corpus de documente de soluție. Abordările tradiționale ale acestei sarcini se bazează pe recuperarea informațiilor și se bazează pe cuvinte cheie; căutarea suprapunerii cuvintelor cheie între documentele de întrebare și soluție și ignorarea acestor atribute. Prezentăm o abordare pentru analizarea semantică a întrebărilor tehnice care utilizează structura gramaticală pentru a extrage aceste atribute ca bază de referință și un model bazat pe CRF care poate îmbunătăți considerabil performanța în prezența datelor adnotate pentru formare. De asemenea, demonstrăm că, combinate cu raționamentul, aceste atribute ajută la depășirea valorilor de referință de recuperare.', 'si': 'තාක්ෂික සහය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්. සාමාන්\u200dය වෙබ් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් (සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කිහිපයක් තියෙන්නේ) නැත්නම්, මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සාමාන්\u200dය විස්තරයක්  ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක සහාය ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියා දෙන්නේ මේ ප්\u200dරශ මේ වැඩේ සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරාප්ත කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඒ වගේම යතුරු  ප්\u200dරශ්නය සහ විස්තර දස්තාව අතර ප්\u200dරශ්නය වචන වචනය හොයාගන්න සහ මේ සැකසුම් අවධානය කරන්න. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් මේ  අපි ප්\u200dරදර්ශනය කරනවා ඒක සම්බන්ධයෙන් සම්බන්ධයෙන්, මේ විශේෂතාවන් අධාර්ථ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් ප්\u200dර', 'so': "Dhibaatooyinka kaalmada teknolojiyadu waa mid adag. Iska duwan su'aalaha joogtada ah ee internetka (kaas oo ku jira hadalo yar) ama su'aalo saameyn ah (kuwaas oo ay yihiin dhawr imtixaan), dhibaatooyinkaas waxaa inta badan ka mid ah tusaale sawir gaar ah oo ku saabsan waxa ka baaqanaya (calaamad), tallaabooyin lagu sameeyo si aad u soo xasuusto khatarta (waxqabad), qaar qaar waqti lagu weyddiisto codsi gaar ah ama weydiinta (inteni). Automating support is the task of automatically providing answers to these problems given a corpus of solution documents.  Waxyaabahan waxaa lagu xiran karaa soo celinta macluumaadka iyo hadalka furan; oo raadinaya hadalka furayaasha oo u dhexeeya dukumentiyada iyo macluumaadka ku saabsan islamarkaasna ka tegaya qalabkan. Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab baaritaanka semantika ee su'aalaha teknikada ah oo isticmaalaya dhismaha grammatika si uu uga soo bixiyo tusaalahan sida basaaska, iyo qaab asalka CRF oo ku hagi kara tababarka si aad u fiican marka laga helo macluumaadka waxbarashada. Sidoo kale waxaynu muujinnaa, taas oo la xiriira sababaha, tusaalahaas waxay caawinayaan inay sameeyaan saldhigyada dib u soo celinta.", 'ta': 'தொழில்நுட்ப ஆதரவு பிரச்சனைகள் மிகவும் சிக்கலானது. In contrast to regular web queries (that contain few keywords) or factoid questions (which are a few sentences), these problems usually include attributes like a detailed description of what is failing (symptom), steps taken in an effort to remediate the failure (activity), and sometimes a specific request or ask (intent).  தீர்வு ஆவணங்களுக்கு கொடுக்கப்பட்ட இந்த பிரச்சனைகளுக்கு பதில் தானாகவே வழங்கும் செயல் இந்த செயல்பாட்டிற்கு பாரமான நெருங்குதல் தகவல் மீட்டெடுப்பதை சார்ந்து மற்றும் விசைவார்த்தை கேள்வி மற்றும் தீர்வு ஆவணங்களுக்கும் இடையே விசைவார்த்தை மேலேற்றும் தேடும் மற்றும் இந்த குணங நாம் தொழில்நுட்ப கேள்விகளை பாடலுக்கு ஒரு செயல்பாட்டை காண்பிக்கிறோம். இது குணங்களை அடிப்படைக்கோட்டாக வெளியேற்றுவதற்கு பயன்படுத்துகிறது, மற்றும்  நாம் காரணங்களுடன் இணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ள குணங்களை காட்டுகிறோம், இந்த குணங்கள் மீட்டெடுக்கும் அடிப்படைகளை வ', 'sv': 'Problemen med tekniskt stöd är mycket komplexa. Till skillnad från vanliga webbfrågor (som innehåller få sökord) eller faktafrågor (som är några meningar), inkluderar dessa problem vanligtvis attribut som en detaljerad beskrivning av vad som misslyckas (symptom), åtgärder som vidtagits i ett försök att åtgärda misslyckandet (aktivitet) och ibland en specifik begäran eller fråga (avsikt). Automatisering av supporten är uppgiften att automatiskt ge svar på dessa problem med hjälp av en samling lösningsdokument. Traditionella tillvägagångssätt för denna uppgift bygger på informationssökning och är sökordsbaserade. söka efter nyckelord överlappning mellan fråga- och lösningsdokument och ignorera dessa attribut. Vi presenterar ett tillvägagångssätt för semantisk tolkning av tekniska frågor som använder grammatisk struktur för att extrahera dessa attribut som baslinje, och en CRF-baserad modell som kan förbättra prestandan avsevärt i närvaro av kommenterade data för utbildning. Vi visar också att dessa attribut tillsammans med resonemang hjälper till att prestera bättre än baslinjer för hämtning.', 'ur': 'تکنیکی مدد مشکلات بہت پیچیدہ ہیں۔ یہ مشکلات معمولاً غلطی (نشانیاں) کے مطابق تفصیل کے مطابق (کم کلیدوں) یا فکٹوئیڈ سؤال کے بارے میں ہیں، یہ مشکلات معمولاً ایک تفصیل سؤال کے مطابق ایک تفصیل سؤال کے مطابق شامل ہوتے ہیں جو غلطی (نشانیاں) کے مطابق ہے، غلطی (فعالیت) کے سپارٹ کی اتوماٹی کرنا یہ کام ہے کہ ان مشکلوں کے جواب دینے کے لئے اپنا مسئلہ ہے جنہیں حل کے دفتروں کی کورپوس دی گئی ہے. اس کام کے منطقی طریقے پر اطلاعات اٹھانے پر بھروسہ رکھتے ہیں اور کلیدوار بنیاد رکھتے ہیں۔ سوال اور حل دکھانیوں کے درمیان کلیدورڈ اورلپ تلاش کرتا ہے اور ان آبریٹوں کو نادانی کرتا ہے۔ ہم تخنیک سؤال کے سیمنٹی پارسینگ کے لئے ایک طریقہ پیش کرتے ہیں جو ان آبریٹوں کو بنیاس لین کے طور پر استعمال کرتا ہے، اور ایک سی.اف. بنیادی موڈل جو ٹرینگ ڈیٹے کے حضور عملکرد بہت زیادہ اضافہ کرسکتا ہے۔ ہم بھی دکھاتے ہیں کہ دلیل کے ساتھ ملے ہوئے ہیں، یہ آبریٹیوں کو پھیر لینے کے زیادہ مدد دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Technical qoʻllanmalar juda murakkab. @ info: whatsthis Name @ info Name Biz texnologiya savollarining semantik parsing usuli, bu atributlarni baseline sifatida chiqarish uchun grammatik tuzilishini foydalanadi, va CRF asosidagi modelni taʼminlovchi maʼlumot maʼlumotlari uchun juda katta bajarishi mumkin. Biz buning sabablar bilan birlashtirilgan xususiyatlarni ko'rsatishimiz mumkin, bu xususiyatlarni qayta olish asboblarni bajarishiga yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Vấn đề hỗ trợ kỹ thuật rất phức tạp. Ngược lại với các câu hỏi trên mạng thường xuyên (chứa vài từ khoá) hay các câu hỏi Factionless (chỉ là vài câu), các vấn đề này thường gồm các thuộc tính chi tiết như một mô tả chi tiết về cái thiếu sót (triệu chứng), các bước tiến hành trong nỗ lực bù đắp thất bại (hành động), và đôi khi một yêu cầu hay hỏi cụ thể (mục đích). Tự động hỗ trợ là nhiệm vụ phải tự động cung cấp câu trả lời cho những vấn đề này. Phương pháp truyền thống của nhiệm vụ này dựa trên việc lấy thông tin và là từ khoá. tìm kiếm sự chồng chéo từ khoá giữa các tài liệu hỏi và giải pháp và lờ đi các thuộc tính này. Chúng tôi đưa ra một phương pháp phân tích theo ngữ pháp về các câu hỏi kỹ thuật dùng cấu trúc ngôn ngữ để trích các thuộc tính này làm cơ sở cơ bản, và một mô hình nền CRF có thể cải thiện hiệu suất đáng kể khi có các dữ liệu được ghi chú để đào tạo. Chúng tôi cũng chứng minh rằng những thuộc tính này kết hợp với lí luận, giúp thực hiện các nền trích xuất.', 'nl': "Problemen met technische ondersteuning zijn zeer complex. In tegenstelling tot reguliere webquery's (die weinig trefwoorden bevatten) of factoïde vragen (die een paar zinnen zijn), bevatten deze problemen meestal kenmerken zoals een gedetailleerde beschrijving van wat mislukt (symptoom), stappen genomen om de fout (activiteit) te verhelpen, en soms een specifiek verzoek of vraag (intentie). Het automatiseren van ondersteuning is de taak om automatisch antwoorden te geven op deze problemen met behulp van een corpus van oplossingsdocumenten. Traditionele benaderingen voor deze taak berusten op informatieterugwinning en zijn gebaseerd op trefwoorden; zoeken naar trefwoordoverlapping tussen de vraag- en oplossingsdocumenten en deze kenmerken negeren. We presenteren een benadering voor semantisch parsen van technische vragen die grammaticale structuur gebruikt om deze attributen als baseline te extraheren, en een CRF gebaseerd model dat prestaties aanzienlijk kan verbeteren in de aanwezigheid van geannoteerde gegevens voor training. We tonen ook aan dat in combinatie met redeneren deze kenmerken helpen om de baselines van het ophalen te overtreffen.", 'da': 'Problemerne med teknisk støtte er meget komplekse. I modsætning til almindelige webforespørgsler (der indeholder få søgeord) eller faktiske spørgsmål (som er et par sætninger), omfatter disse problemer normalt attributter som en detaljeret beskrivelse af, hvad der fejler (symptom), skridt taget i et forsøg på at afhjælpe fejlen (aktivitet) og nogle gange en specifik anmodning eller spørg (hensigt). Automatisering af support er opgaven med automatisk at give svar på disse problemer på baggrund af et korpus af løsningsdokumenter. Traditionelle tilgange til denne opgave er baseret på informationssøgning og er søgeordsbaserede. søger efter overlapning af søgeord mellem spørgsmål og løsningsdokumenter og ignorerer disse attributter. Vi præsenterer en tilgang til semantisk fortolkning af tekniske spørgsmål, der bruger grammatisk struktur til at udtrække disse attributter som baseline, og en CRF baseret model, der kan forbedre ydeevnen betydeligt i tilstedeværelse af annoterede data til træning. Vi demonstrerer også, at disse egenskaber kombineret med ræsonnement hjælper med at opnå bedre resultater end hentning baselines.', 'bg': 'Проблемите с техническата поддръжка са много сложни. За разлика от обикновените уеб заявки (които съдържат няколко ключови думи) или фактически въпроси (които са няколко изречения), тези проблеми обикновено включват атрибути като подробно описание на това, което се проваля (симптом), стъпки, предприети в опит за отстраняване на неуспеха (дейност), а понякога конкретно искане или запитване (намерение). Автоматизирането на поддръжката е задачата автоматично да се предоставят отговори на тези проблеми, като се дава корпус от документи за решаване. Традиционните подходи към тази задача разчитат на извличане на информация и са базирани на ключови думи; търсене на припокриване на ключовите думи между въпросите и решенията документи и игнориране на тези атрибути. Представяме подход за семантично анализиране на технически въпроси, който използва граматическа структура за извличане на тези атрибути като базова база, както и модел, който може да подобри значително ефективността при наличието на анотирани данни за обучение. Също така демонстрираме, че в комбинация с разсъжденията, тези атрибути помагат да превъзхождат базовите линии за извличане.', 'hr': 'Problemi tehničke podrške su veoma kompleksni. Za razliku od običnih web ispitivanja (koje sadrže nekoliko ključnih riječi) ili faktoidnih pitanja (koje su nekoliko rečenica), te probleme obično uključuju atribute poput detaljnog opisa onoga što nedostaje (simptom), koraka koraka u snazi za rješavanje neuspjeha (aktivnosti) i ponekad specifičnog zahtjeva ili pitanje (namjera). Automatična podrška je zadatak automatskog pružanja odgovora na te probleme s obzirom na korpus rješenjskih dokumenta. Tradicionalni pristupi ovom zadatku oslanjaju se na prikupljanje informacija i temeljene su ključne riječi; tražeći ključnu riječ preklapanje između pitanja i rješenja dokumenta i ignorirajući te atribute. Predstavljamo pristup semantičkom analizu tehničkih pitanja koje koriste gramatičku strukturu kako bi izvukli te atribute kao početnu liniju, i model bazirani na CRF-u koji može značajno poboljšati provedbu u prisustvu annotiranih podataka za obuku. Također pokazujemo da kombinacija s razumljivanjem, te atribute pomažu izvršiti osnovne linije.', 'de': 'Technische Supportprobleme sind sehr komplex. Im Gegensatz zu normalen Web-Abfragen (die nur wenige Keywords enthalten) oder faktoiden Fragen (die nur wenige Sätze sind) beinhalten diese Probleme in der Regel Attribute wie eine detaillierte Beschreibung dessen, was fehlschlägt (Symptom), Schritte zur Behebung des Fehlers (Aktivität) und manchmal eine spezifische Anfrage oder Frage (Absicht). Die Automatisierung des Supports ist die Aufgabe, diese Probleme automatisch mit einem Korpus von Lösungsdokumenten zu beantworten. Traditionelle Ansätze für diese Aufgabe beruhen auf der Information Retrieval und basieren auf Schlüsselwörtern; Suche nach Keyword-Überschneidungen zwischen Frage- und Lösungsdokumenten und ignoriere diese Attribute. Wir präsentieren einen Ansatz für das semantische Parsen von technischen Fragen, der grammatische Struktur verwendet, um diese Attribute als Basis zu extrahieren, und ein CRF-basiertes Modell, das die Leistung in Gegenwart von annotierten Daten für das Training erheblich verbessern kann. Wir zeigen auch, dass diese Attribute in Kombination mit Argumentation dazu beitragen, Retrieval Baselines zu übertreffen.', 'id': 'Masalah dukungan teknis sangat rumit. In contrast to regular web queries (that contain few keywords) or factoid questions (which are a few sentences), these problems usually include attributes like a detailed description of what is failing (symptom), steps taken in an effort to remediate the failure (activity), and sometimes a specific request or ask (intent).  Otomatisasi dukungan adalah tugas untuk secara otomatis menyediakan jawaban untuk masalah ini diberikan corpus dokumen penyelesaian. pendekatan tradisional untuk tugas ini bergantung pada penerimaan informasi dan berdasarkan kata kunci; mencari salinan kunci yang meliputi antara pertanyaan dan dokumen solusi dan mengabaikan atribut-atribut ini. Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan untuk pemeriksaan semantis pertanyaan teknis yang menggunakan struktur gramatik untuk mengekstraksi atribut ini sebagai dasar dasar, dan model berdasarkan CRF yang dapat meningkatkan prestasi dengan konsideratif dalam kehadiran data anotasi untuk latihan. Kami juga menunjukkan bahwa bergabung dengan alasan, atribut ini membantu melampaui garis dasar penghasilan.', 'ko': '기술 지원 문제는 매우 복잡하다.일반적인 웹 조회(아주 적은 키워드 포함)나factoid 문제(몇 마디만)와 달리 이 문제들은 실패 원인(증상)에 대한 상세한 설명, 실패를 보완하기 위한 절차(활동), 특정한 요청이나 문의(의도) 등 속성을 포함한다.자동화 지원의 임무는 해결 방안 문서 그룹을 정한 상황에서 이 문제들에 대한 답을 자동으로 제공하는 것이다.전통적인 방법은 정보 검색에 의존하고 키워드를 바탕으로 한다.문제와 해결 방안 문서 사이의 키워드가 중첩되어 있는 것을 찾고 이 속성을 무시합니다.우리는 기술 문제에 대해 의미 분석을 하는 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 문법 구조를 이용하여 이러한 속성을 기선으로 추출하고 CRF를 바탕으로 하는 모델로 이 모델은 훈련에 사용되는 주석 데이터가 존재하는 상황에서 성능을 현저하게 향상시킬 수 있다.추리와 결합하면 이러한 속성이 검색 기선을 초월하는 데 도움이 된다는 것도 증명했다.', 'fa': 'مشکلات پشتیبانی تکنیکی بسیار پیچیده است. در مقابل سوالات وب معمولی (که شامل چند کلمه کلید) یا سوالات فکتوئید (که چند کلمه هستند) این مشکلات معمولاً ویژگی\u200cهایی مثل توضیح جزئیح از آنچه شکست می\u200cشود (علائم، قدم\u200cهایی که در تلاش می\u200cکنند برای اصلاح شکست (فعالیت) و گاهی یک خواست خاص یا بپرسند (هدف). پشتیبانی خودکار وظیفه\u200cای است که به طور خودکار جواب دادن به این مشکلات به عنوان یک قالب مدارک راه حل داده شده است. دسترسی سنتی به این کار بر گرفتن اطلاعات بستگی دارد و کلمه کلید بر پایه دارند. دنبال کلمه کلید بین سوال و مدارک راه حل و نادیده گرفتن این ویژگی ها. ما یک روش برای تجزیه\u200cگیری semantic از سوالات تکنیکی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که از ساختار گراماتیکی استفاده می\u200cکند تا این ویژگی\u200cها را به عنوان خط پایین خارج کند، و یک مدل بنیاد CRF که می\u200cتواند عملکرد را در حضور داده\u200cهای نوشته شده برای آموزش به طور زی ما همچنین نشان می دهیم که با دلیل ترکیب، این ویژگی\u200cها کمک می\u200cکنند که پایین\u200cهای استراحت را انجام دهند.', 'sw': 'matatizo ya misaada ya teknolojia ni tatizo sana. In contrast to regular web queries (that contain few keywords) or factoid questions (which are a few sentences), these problems usually include attributes like a detailed description of what is failing (symptom), steps taken in an effort to remediate the failure (activity), and sometimes a specific request or ask (intent).  Msaidizi wa kujitegemea ni jukumu la kutoa majibu katika matatizo haya yaliyopewa makampuni ya utatuzi. Matokeo ya kitamaduni kwa kazi hii yanategemea kupata taarifa na ni neno muhimu; kutafuta neno la ufunguo kati ya nyaraka za swali na suluhisho na kuacha vifaa hivi. Tunaweza kuweka mbinu ya kuiba maswali ya kiufundi yanayotumia muundo wa kiufundi ili kutengeneza vifaa hivi kama msingi, na mtindo wa CRF ambao unaweza kuboresha utendaji wa mafunzo kwa kiasi kikubwa katika uwepo wa taarifa zilizotajwa kwa mafunzo. Tunaonyesha pia kuwa imeunganisha kwa sababu, hizi misingi yanasaidia kutengeneza msingi wa kurejea.', 'tr': 'Tehnik kömek meseleleri gaty karmaşık. Adatça web soraglaryň (käçe kelläp sözleri barýan) ýa-da faktoid soraglaryň (käçe sözler bolsa), bu meseleler adatça bolup başarypsyzlygyň (syýahatyň) detayly waspyny ýaly hasaplaýarlar, başarypsyzlygy täzeden geçirmek üçin synanyşdyrylýar we käwagt beýleki soragy ýa-da (mak Otomatik gaýd etmek üçin bu meselelere çözüm senediň çözümlerini otomatik üýtgetmek üçin zady. Däpli zadyň şu zada golaýlary maglumat almagyna ynanýar we aç sözleriň daýanýar; soragy we çözgüt senedleri arasynda aç sözleri gözleýän we bu häsiýetleri ignoreýän. Semantik soraglary üçin gramatik strukturyň bu atributlaryny baseline çykarmak üçin ullanýan tekniki çözümleme üçin we CRF tabanly nusgasyny eğitim üçin ýüze çykaryp biljek tekniki soraglary üçin bir nusgasyny çykarýarys. Biz hem düşünseler bilen birleşende bu atributlar özüni almak üçin kömek edip otyrýarys.', 'am': 'የቴክኖክዊ ድጋፍ መከራዎች በጣም አካባቢ ናቸው፡፡ In contrast to regular web queries (that contain few keywords) or factoid questions (which are a few sentences), these problems usually include attributes like a detailed description of what is failing (symptom), steps taken in an effort to remediate the failure (activity), and sometimes a specific request or ask (intent).  አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር ወደዚህ ስራ የባሕላዊው ደረጃዎች መረጃ ማግኘት ላይ ይታመካሉ በቁልፍ ቃልም ላይ ናቸው፤ ጥያቄ እና መፍትሄ ሰነዱን በመካከለኛው የቁልፍ ቃላትን መክፈት ይፈልጋል እነዚህንም ምርጫዎች መሳሰል ይፈልጋል፡፡ የቴክኖክቲካዊ ጥያቄዎችን ለመውጣት የሚጠይቅ የግራማቲካዊ መሠረት እና የCRF መሠረት ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ እናም በአእምሮው የተደላደለ እናሳየዋለን፤ እነዚህ ምርጫዎች የድምፅ መደገፊያዎችን ማድረግ ይረዳሉ፡፡', 'sq': 'Technical support problems are very complex.  Në kundërshtim me pyetjet e rregullta të internetit (që përmbajnë disa fjalë kyçe) apo pyetje faktoide (që janë disa fjalë), këto probleme zakonisht përfshijnë atribute si një përshkrim të hollësishëm të asaj që dështon (simptom), hapa të ndërmarrë në një përpjekje për të shëruar dështimin (veprimtari) dhe ndonjëherë një kërkesë specifike apo pyetje (qëllim). Automatizimi i mbështetjes është detyra e dhënies automatike të përgjigjeve për këto probleme duke dhënë një korpus dokumentesh zgjidhjesh. Përqasjet tradicionale për këtë detyrë mbështeten në marrjen e informacionit dhe janë bazuar në fjalët kyçe; duke kërkuar për mbikryrjen e fjalëve kyçe midis dokumenteve të pyetjes dhe zgjidhjes dhe duke injoruar këto atribute. Ne paraqesim një qasje për analizimin semantik të pyetjeve teknike që përdor strukturën grammatike për të nxjerrë këto atribute si bazë dhe një model bazuar në CRF që mund të përmirësojë performancën konsiderueshëm në praninë e të dhënave të anotuara për trajnimin. Ne gjithashtu demonstrojmë se së bashku me arsyetimin, këto atribute ndihmojnë në kryerjen e linjave bazë të marrjes.', 'af': "Tegniese ondersteuning probleme is baie kompleks. In contrast to regular web queries (that contain few keywords) or factoid questions (which are a few sentences), these problems usually include attributes like a detailed description of what is failing (symptom), steps taken in an effort to remedy the failure (activity), and sometimes a specific request or ask (intent). Outomatiese ondersteuning is die taak van outomaties verskaf antwoorde na hierdie probleme gegee 'n korpus van oplossing dokumente. Tradisjoneel toegang tot hierdie taak vertrou op inligting ontvang en is sleutelwoord gebaseer; soek na sleutelwoord oorvloei tussen die vraag en oplossing dokumente en ignoreer hierdie eienskappe. Ons stel 'n toegang voor semantiese verwerking van tekniske vrae wat grammatiese struktuur gebruik om hierdie eienskappe as 'n basislien uit te trek, en 'n CRF-gebaseerde model wat effektuur aansienlik kan verbeter in die voorsiening van aanmerkte data vir onderwerp. Ons bevestig ook dat gekombineer met redening, hierdie eienskappe hulp uitvoer die ontvang van basisline.", 'hy': 'Տեխնիկական աջակցության խնդիրները շատ բարդ են: Ի հակադրություն առօրյա վեբ հարցերին (որոնք պարունակում են մի քանի բառ) կամ փակտոիդ հարցերին (որոնք մի քանի նախադասություններ են), այս խնդիրները սովորաբար ներառում են առանձնահատկություններ, ինչպիսիք են ձախողումների մանրամասն նկարագրությունը (ախտանիշներ), քայլեր, որոնք կայանում են ձախողումների (ակ Ավտոմատիկ աջակցությունը այս խնդիրներին ինքնաբերաբար պատասխաններ տալու խնդիր է, որովհետև լուծումների փաստաթղթեր կան: Traditional approaches to this task rely on information retrieval and are keyword based;  փնտրելով հարցի և լուծումների փաստաթղթերի միջև կողմնականություն և անտեսելով այս առանձնահատկությունները: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք տեխնիկական հարցերի սեմանտիկ վերլուծության մոտեցում, որը օգտագործում է գրամատիկ կառուցվածք այս առանձնահատկությունները որպես հիմք վերցնելու համար, և մի ԿՌՖ-ի հիմքում հիմնված մոդել, որը կարող է նշանակալի բարելավել արդյունքը, եթե ուսու Մենք նաև ցույց ենք տալիս, որ միասին մտածողության հետ, այս առանձնահատկությունները օգնում են վերականգնելու հիմնական գծերից դուրս գալ:', 'bn': 'প্রযুক্তিগত সমর্থন সমস্যা খুব জটিল। নিয়মিত ওয়েব প্রশ্নের (যার মধ্যে কয়েকটি কীবোর্ড) অথবা ফ্যাক্টোইড প্রশ্ন রয়েছে (যেগুলো কয়েকটি বাক্য), এই সমস্যাগুলো সাধারণত ব্যর্থ বিস্তারিত ব্যাখ্যার মত বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর ব্যাখ্ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সমর্থন হচ্ছে এই সমস্যার উত্তর প্রদান করার কাজ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সমাধানের কোর্পাস প্রদান করা। এই কাজের প্রতি ঐতিহ্যবাহী উপায় নির্ভর করে তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধারের উপর এবং কী শব্দ ভিত্তিক; প্রশ্ন এবং সমাধানের নথি এবং এই বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীকে উপেক্ষা করার মধ্যে কীওয়ার্ডের মুছে ফেলা খুঁজছে। প্রযুক্তিগত প্রশ্নের জন্য আমরা সেম্যান্টিক পার্সিং এর একটি উপায় উপস্থাপন করি যা গ্রামাটিক্যাল কাঠামো ব্যবহার করে এই বৈশিষ্ট্যের বেসারেলাইন হিসেবে বের কর We also demonstrate that combined with reasoning, these attributes help outperform retrieval baselines.', 'bs': 'Problemi sa tehničkom podrškom su veoma kompleksni. Za razliku od običnih internetskih ispitivanja (koje sadrže nekoliko ključnih riječi) ili faktoidnih pitanja (koje su nekoliko rečenica), te probleme obično uključuju atribute kao detaljno opis onoga što nedostaje (simptom), korake koje su poduzete u naporu da se oporavi neuspjeh (aktivnost), i ponekad specifični zahtjev ili pitaju (namjera). Automatizacija podrške je zadatak automatskog pružanja odgovora na te probleme s obzirom na korpus dokumenta rješenja. Tradicionalni pristupi ovom zadatku oslanjaju se na prikupljanje informacija i zasnovane su ključne riječi; tražeći ključnu riječ preklapanje između pitanja i rješenja dokumenta i ignorišući te atribute. Predstavljamo pristup semantičkom analizu tehničkih pitanja koje koriste gramatičku strukturu kako bi izvukli te atribute kao osnovnu liniju, i model bazirani na CRF-u koji može značajno poboljšati provedbu u prisustvu annotiranih podataka za obuku. Također pokazujemo da kombinacija sa razumijevanjem, te atribute pomažu izvršiti osnovne linije.', 'az': 'Tehnik dəstək problemləri çox kompleks. Düzgün web soruşmalarına (bir neçə anahtar sözləri barəsində) və ya faktoid soruşmalarına (bir neçə sözləri barəsində), bu problemlər genellikle başarısız sözlərin (simptomların) detaylı təsbit kimi, başarısız sözlərin (fəaliyyəti) təmizləmək üçün çabalar və bəzən də təsbit istəyi və ya istəyi kimi təsbit edilirlər Əməliyyat avtomatik olaraq çətin belələri verilən bu problemlərə cavab vermək işidir. Bu işin ehtiyacılıq tərzlərini məlumat almaq üçün təvəkkül edir və anahtar sözlərinə dayanılır; sual və çözüm belələri arasındakı anahtar sözləri gözləyir və bu xüsusiyyətləri görməzlər. Biz bu xüsusiyyətləri ilk sətir kimi çıxartmaq üçün qrammatik quruluşu istifadə edən teknik sualların semantik analizi üçün bir yol göstəririk, və CRF tabanlı modeli təhsil etmək üçün müəyyən edilmiş məlumatların yanında çox yüksək təhsil edə bilər. Biz də dəlillərlə birlikdə göstəririk ki, bu xüsusiyyətlər geri alma səhifələrindən daha çox kömək edir.', 'ca': "Els problemes de suport tècnic són molt complexes. Contrariament a preguntes regulars a la web (que contenen poques paraules clau) o preguntes factoides (que són poques frases), aquests problemes normalment inclouen atributs com una descripció detallada del que està fracassant (símptoma), passos fets en un esforç per corregir el fracàs (activitat), i a vegades una pregunta o pregunta específices (intenció). L'automàtic suport és la tasca de proporcionar respostes automàticament a aquests problemes donant un cos de documents de solució. Els enfocaments tradicionals d'aquesta tasca depenen de la recuperació d'informació i són basats en paraules clau; looking for keyword overlap between the question and solution documents and ignoring these attributes.  We present an approach for semantic parsing of technical questions that uses grammatical structure to extract these attributes as a baseline, and a CRF based model that can improve performance considerably in the presence of annotated data for training.  També demostram que combinats amb el raonament, aquests atributs ajuden a superar les línies de base de recuperació.", 'cs': 'Problémy s technickou podporou jsou velmi složité. Na rozdíl od běžných webových dotazů (které obsahují několik klíčových slov) nebo faktických otázek (které jsou několik vět), tyto problémy obvykle obsahují atributy, jako je podrobný popis toho, co selhává (symptom), kroky přijaté ve snaze napravit selhání (aktivitu), a někdy konkrétní požadavek nebo dotázku (záměr). Automatizace podpory je úkolem automatického poskytování odpovědí na tyto problémy s korpusem řešení dokumentů. Tradiční přístupy k tomuto úkolu spoléhají na vyhledávání informací a jsou založeny na klíčových slovech; hledání překrývání klíčových slov mezi otázkou a dokumenty řešení a ignorování těchto atributů. Představujeme přístup pro sémantickou analýzu technických otázek, který používá gramatickou strukturu k extrakci těchto atributů jako základní základnu, a model založený na CRF, který může výrazně zlepšit výkon za přítomnosti anotovaných dat pro trénink. Také ukazujeme, že v kombinaci s uvažováním tyto atributy pomáhají překonat základní linie vyhledávání.', 'et': 'Tehnilise abi probleemid on väga keerulised. Erinevalt tavapärastest veebipäringutest (mis sisaldavad vähe märksõnu) või faktilistest küsimustest (mis on mõned laused), sisaldavad need probleemid tavaliselt atribuute nagu ebaõnnestumise üksikasjalik kirjeldus (sümptom), ebaõnnestumise (tegevus) parandamiseks võetud sammud ja mõnikord konkreetne päring või küsimine (kavatsus). Toetuse automatiseerimine on ülesanne neile probleemidele automaatselt lahendusdokumentide korpuse abil vastata. Traditsioonilised lähenemisviisid sellele ülesandele tuginevad teabe hankimisele ja põhinevad märksõnadel; otsides märksõna kattumist küsimuse ja lahenduse dokumentide vahel ning ignoreerides neid atribuute. Esitleme tehniliste küsimuste semantilise parsimise lähenemisviisi, mis kasutab grammatilist struktuuri nende atribuutide eraldamiseks lähtealusena, ja CRF-il põhinevat mudelit, mis võib märkimisväärselt parandada tulemuslikkust koolituse jaoks märgitud andmete juuresolekul. Samuti näitame, et koos põhjendustega aitavad need atribuudid ületada tagasivõtmise lähtejooni.', 'fi': 'Teknisen tuen ongelmat ovat hyvin monimutkaisia. Toisin kuin tavalliset verkkokyselyt (jotka sisältävät muutamia avainsanoja) tai faktoiset kysymykset (jotka ovat muutamia lauseita), nämä ongelmat sisältävät yleensä määritteitä, kuten yksityiskohtainen kuvaus epäonnistumisesta (oire), toimenpiteet epäonnistumisen korjaamiseksi (toiminta) ja joskus erityinen pyyntö tai kysymys (aikomus). Avustuksen automatisoinnin tehtävänä on vastata näihin ongelmiin automaattisesti ratkaisudokumenttien avulla. Perinteiset lähestymistavat tähän tehtävään perustuvat tiedonhakuun ja avainsanoihin. etsitään avainsanojen päällekkäisyyttä kysymys- ja ratkaisuasiakirjojen välillä ja jätetään nämä attribuutit huomiotta. Esittelemme teknisten kysymysten semanttisen jäsentämisen lähestymistavan, joka käyttää kieliopillista rakennetta näiden attribuuttien poimimiseen lähtökohdaksi, sekä CRF-pohjaisen mallin, joka voi parantaa suorituskykyä huomattavasti harjoitteluun tarkoitetun annotoidun datan läsnä ollessa. Osoitamme myös, että yhdistettynä päättelyyn nämä attribuutit auttavat suoriutumaan noutamisen lähtökohdista paremmin.', 'sk': 'Težave s tehnično podporo so zelo zapletene. V nasprotju z običajnimi spletnimi poizvedbami (ki vsebujejo nekaj ključnih besed) ali dejanskimi vprašanji (ki so nekaj stavkov), te težave običajno vključujejo atribute, kot so podroben opis neuspeha (simptom), korake, sprejete za odpravo neuspeha (dejavnosti), včasih pa določena zahteva ali vprašanje (namen). Avtomatizacija podpore je naloga samodejnega zagotavljanja odgovorov na te težave s korpusom rešitvenih dokumentov. Tradicionalni pristopi k tej nalogi temeljijo na pridobivanju informacij in temeljijo na ključnih besedah; iskanje prekrivanja ključnih besed med dokumenti z vprašanjem in rešitvijo ter ignoriranje teh atributov. Predstavljamo pristop za semantično razčlenitev tehničnih vprašanj, ki uporablja slovnično strukturo za izvlečevanje teh atributov kot osnovno osnovo, in model CRF, ki lahko ob prisotnosti označenih podatkov za usposabljanje znatno izboljša učinkovitost. Prav tako dokazujemo, da skupaj z razmišljanjem ti atributi pomagajo preseči osnovne vrste pridobivanja.', 'ha': "QNetworkAccessFileBackend Babu motsi da masu tambayi masu daidai a web (da ke ƙunsa da masu saurãro kaɗan) ko kuma masu tambayi faktoid (masu da ɗan daidai), waɗannan masu matsayi kamar misãlin da aka ƙayyade wa'anar da abin da yake kasa yin ɓarna (shirin ayuka), hanyõyi da aka yi amfani da wajen zartar da (farat-aikin), da kuma a karɓi wata tambayar da aka ƙayyade (henna). @ action: button QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu Tuna gabatar da hanyoyi wa yin salo na semantic ga masu tambayar masu kima da ke amfani da matsayin grammaki dõmin ya fitar wannan halin kamar a baka-line, da misãlin CRF wanda yake iya ƙaranci aikin sa'an nan a gaba ga masana da aka sanar da shi. Kayya, Muna nũna masu haɗi da masu kashfa, waɗannan misalin sune taimako da za'a sami bakin mataimaki.", 'he': 'בעיות תמיכה טכנית מורכבות מאוד. בניגוד לשאלות רשת רגילות (שמכילות מספר מילים מפתחות) או שאלות עובדות (שהן מספר משפטים), בעיות אלה בדרך כלל כוללות תכונות כמו תיאור פרטי של מה הוא כשל (סימפטום), צעדים שנלקחו במאמץ לתקן את הכישלון (פעילות), ולפעמים בקשה או שאלה ספציפית (כוונה). התמיכה אוטומטית היא המשימה של לספק באופן אוטומטי תשובות לבעיות הללו בהתחשב בקורפוס מסמכי פתרון. גישות מסורתיות למשימה הזאת תלויות על השיג מידע והן מבוססות על מילים מפתחות; מחפשים מעקב מילים מפתחות בין מסמכי השאלה ומפתרון ולהתעלם מהתכונות הללו. אנו מציגים גישה לאבחן סמנטי של שאלות טכניות שמשתמשת במבנה גרמטי כדי להוציא את האישורים האלה כבסיס, ומודל מבוסס על CRF שיכול לשפר את ההופעה באופן משמעותי בנוכחות נתונים מוכתבים לאימון. We also demonstrate that combined with reasoning, these attributes help outperform retrieval baselines.', 'jv': 'Rasang tékno sing dikarepaké sing apik tenan. Tulung ing kontribusi sing web dadi (sing sumulakno kapan kelas-kelas) uga sapa paketen " Automatically Chinese, Simplified FindOK Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem kanggo semanti nggunakake sistem teknik sing bisa nguasakno dadi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang dhéwé Awak dhéwé mulai ngono kuwi ngregani karo awak dhéwé, atiribute iki ngono nggawe barang maning.', 'bo': 'ལག་རྩལ་གྱི་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཆེས་སྟབས་ཆེན་པོ་རེད། In contrast to regular web queries (that contain few keywords) or factoid questions (which are a few sentences), these problems usually include attributes like a detailed description of what is failing (symptom), steps taken in an effort to remediate the failure (activity), and sometimes a specific request or ask (intent). རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་དེ་ཡིག་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱིས་དཀའ་ངལ་འདི་དག་པར་མཐུན་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པ Traditional approaches to this task rely on information retrieval and are keyword based;  འདྲི་ཚིག་དང་ཡིག་ཆ་དབར་གྱི་གཙོ་ཚིག་ལ་བསུབ་རྫོགས་དང་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་སྣང་མེད་བཞག་པ ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལྟར་བརྟན་དཔྱད་སྤྱད་པར་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པའི་རྩོལ་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད་པ་ལས། ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུ་རྐྱེན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བསྡོད་ནས་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འདི་དག་གིས་ཡར་ཕྱིར་ཡར་ལ'}
{'en': 'Deconvolution-Based Global Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'ar': 'فك التشفير العالمي المستند إلى Deconvolution للترجمة الآلية العصبية', 'pt': 'Decodificação global baseada em deconvolução para tradução automática neural', 'es': 'Decodificación global basada en la deconvolución para la traducción automática neuronal', 'fr': 'Décodage global basé sur la déconvolution pour la traduction automatique neuronale', 'zh': '盖反卷积之神经机器翻译全局解码', 'ja': '神経機械翻訳のためのデコンボリューションベースのグローバルデコード', 'ru': 'Деконволюционное глобальное декодирование для нейронного машинного перевода', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद के लिए Deconvolution-आधारित वैश्विक डिकोडिंग', 'ga': 'Díchódú Domhanda Deconvolution-bhunaithe le haghaidh Aistriú Meaisín Néarach', 'hu': 'Dekonvolíciós alapú globális dekódolás idegi gépi fordításhoz', 'it': 'Decodifica globale basata sulla deconvoluzione per la traduzione automatica neurale', 'el': 'Παγκόσμια αποκωδικοποίηση βασισμένη στην αποκωδικοποίηση για τη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση', 'ka': 'Name', 'mk': 'Глобално декодирање за преведување на неврални машини базирано на деконволуција', 'ms': 'Pengekodan Global Berasas Dekonvolusi untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаның аудармасының жүйелік декодтамасын бағыттау', 'mt': 'Dikodifikazzjoni Globali bbażata fuq id-Dekonvoluzzjoni għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Magni Newrali', 'mn': 'Цэцэг машин хөгжүүлэхэд дэлхийн үндсэн шийдвэрлэлт', 'lt': 'Neuralinių mašinų vertimo kodavimas pagal dekonvoluciją', 'pl': 'Globalne dekodowanie oparte na dekolucji dla neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego', 'ml': 'volution-Based Global Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'sr': 'Deconvolution-Based Global Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Decodificare globală bazată pe deconvoluție pentru traducerea automată neurală', 'so': 'Degvolution-Based Global Decoding for Translation of Neural machine', 'sv': 'Avkonvulsionsbaserad global avkodning för neural maskinöversättning', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'Volume- Based Global Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Boò£sh joy', 'vi': 'Giải trí Hoàn Cầu Giải mã cho máy móc thần kinh', 'nl': 'Op deconvolutie gebaseerde wereldwijde decodering voor neurale machinevertaling', 'hr': 'Deconvolution-Based Global Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'bg': 'Глобално декодиране, базирано на деконволюция, за неврален машинен превод', 'da': 'Dekonvolutionsbaseret global dekodning til neural maskinoversættelse', 'de': 'Dekonvolutionsbasierte globale Dekodierung für neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung', 'id': 'Decoding Global Berdasarkan Dekonvolusi untuk Translation Mesin Neural', 'ko': '반권적 기반 신경 기계 번역 전역 디코딩', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'volume-based Decoding Global Decoding for Translation of Neural Mashine', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Decoding Global për Translation Neural Machine', 'tr': 'Neural Mazmunlar terjime üçin Wasp', 'am': 'volume-Based Global Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման համաշխարհային համակարգչային տախտավորումը', 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদের জন্য ডিসোনভলেশন- ভিত্তিক গ্লোবাল ডিকোডিং', 'az': 'Nöral Makin Çevirməsi üçün Qlobal Dekodlama', 'ca': 'Decodificació global per traducció de màquines neuronals basada en la desconversió', 'cs': 'Globální dekódování založené na dekompoluci pro neuronový strojový překlad', 'et': 'Dekonvolutsioonipõhine globaalne dekodeerimine neuroaalse masintõlke jaoks', 'bs': 'Deconvolution-Based Global Decoding for Neural Machine Translation', 'fi': 'Deconvoluatiopohjainen maailmanlaajuinen dekoodaus hermokonekäännökselle', 'jv': 'Language', 'he': 'התקן גלובלי מבוסס על התפרצות לתרגום מכונות נוירות', 'sk': 'Globalno dekodiranje nevrološkega strojnega prevajanja na osnovi dekonvolucije', 'ha': 'QUnicodeControlCharacterMenu', 'bo': 'Neural Machine Translation (Deconvolution-Based Global Decoding)'}
{'en': 'A great proportion of sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) models for Neural Machine Translation (NMT) adopt Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) to generate translation word by word following a sequential order. As the studies of linguistics have proved that language is not linear word sequence but sequence of complex structure, translation at each step should be conditioned on the whole target-side context. To tackle the problem, we propose a new NMT model that decodes the sequence with the guidance of its structural prediction of the context of the target sequence. Our model generates translation based on the structural prediction of the target-side context so that the translation can be freed from the bind of sequential order. Experimental results demonstrate that our model is more competitive compared with the state-of-the-art methods, and the analysis reflects that our model is also robust to translating sentences of different lengths and it also reduces repetition with the instruction from the target-side context for decoding.', 'ar': 'تعتمد نسبة كبيرة من نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل (Seq2Seq) للترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) الشبكة العصبية المتكررة (RNN) لإنشاء ترجمة كلمة بكلمة بعد ترتيب تسلسلي. نظرًا لأن دراسات علم اللغة قد أثبتت أن اللغة ليست تسلسلًا خطيًا للكلمات بل تسلسلًا للبنية المعقدة ، يجب أن تكون الترجمة في كل خطوة مشروطة بسياق الجانب المستهدف بأكمله. لمعالجة المشكلة ، نقترح نموذجًا جديدًا لـ NMT يقوم بفك تشفير التسلسل بتوجيه من التنبؤ الهيكلي لسياق التسلسل المستهدف. يولد نموذجنا الترجمة بناءً على التنبؤ الهيكلي لسياق الجانب المستهدف بحيث يمكن تحرير الترجمة من قيود الترتيب التسلسلي. تُظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا أكثر تنافسية مقارنةً بأحدث الأساليب ، ويعكس التحليل أن نموذجنا قوي أيضًا في ترجمة الجمل ذات الأطوال المختلفة ، كما أنه يقلل التكرار مع التعليمات من الجانب المستهدف سياق فك التشفير.', 'pt': 'Uma grande proporção de modelos de sequência a sequência (Seq2Seq) para Tradução Automática Neural (NMT) adota Rede Neural Recorrente (RNN) para gerar tradução palavra por palavra seguindo uma ordem sequencial. Como os estudos da linguística provaram que a linguagem não é uma sequência linear de palavras, mas uma sequência de estrutura complexa, a tradução em cada etapa deve ser condicionada a todo o contexto do lado-alvo. Para resolver o problema, propomos um novo modelo NMT que decodifica a sequência com a orientação de sua predição estrutural do contexto da sequência alvo. Nosso modelo gera a tradução com base na previsão estrutural do contexto do lado do alvo para que a tradução possa ser liberada do vínculo de ordem sequencial. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que nosso modelo é mais competitivo em comparação com os métodos do estado da arte, e a análise reflete que nosso modelo também é robusto para traduzir sentenças de diferentes comprimentos e também reduz a repetição com a instrução do lado alvo contexto para decodificação.', 'es': 'Una gran proporción de modelos de secuencia a secuencia (Seq2Seq) para la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) adoptan la red neuronal recurrente (RNN) para generar la traducción palabra por palabra siguiendo un orden secuencial. Como los estudios de lingüística han demostrado que el lenguaje no es una secuencia lineal de palabras sino una secuencia de estructura compleja, la traducción en cada paso debe estar condicionada a todo el contexto del objetivo. Para abordar el problema, proponemos un nuevo modelo de NMT que decodifica la secuencia con la guía de su predicción estructural del contexto de la secuencia diana. Nuestro modelo genera la traducción basada en la predicción estructural del contexto del lado del objetivo para que la traducción pueda liberarse del enlace del orden secuencial. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro modelo es más competitivo en comparación con los métodos más avanzados, y el análisis refleja que nuestro modelo también es robusto para traducir oraciones de diferentes longitudes y también reduce la repetición con la instrucción del contexto del lado del objetivo para la decodificación.', 'fr': "Une grande partie des modèles séquence à séquence (Seq2Seq) pour la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) adoptent un réseau neuronal récurrent (RNN) pour générer une traduction mot par mot suivant un ordre séquentiel. Comme les études de linguistique ont prouvé que le langage n'est pas une séquence de mots linéaire mais une séquence de structure complexe, la traduction à chaque étape doit être conditionnée à l'ensemble du contexte côté cible. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons un nouveau modèle NMT qui décode la séquence en s'appuyant sur sa prédiction structurelle du contexte de la séquence cible. Notre modèle génère une traduction basée sur la prédiction structurelle du contexte côté cible afin que la traduction puisse être libérée de la liaison de l'ordre séquentiel. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que notre modèle est plus compétitif que les méthodes de pointe, et l'analyse montre que notre modèle est également robuste pour traduire des phrases de différentes longueurs et qu'il réduit également la répétition avec les instructions du contexte côté cible pour le décodage.", 'ja': 'ニューラル・マシン・トランスレーション（ ＮＭＴ ）のシーケンス・ツー・シーケンス（ Ｓｅｑ ２ Ｓｅｑ ）モデルの大部分は、順序に従って単語ごとに翻訳を生成するためにリカレント・ニューラル・ネットワーク（ ＲＮＮ ）を採用する。 言語学の研究が、言語が線形の単語配列ではなく、複雑な構造の配列であることを証明しているように、各ステップでの翻訳は、ターゲット側の文脈全体に条件付けられるべきである。 問題に取り組むために、標的配列の文脈の構造予測の指針を用いて配列をデコードする新しいＮＭＴモデルを提案する。 私たちのモデルは、ターゲット側のコンテキストの構造予測に基づいて翻訳を生成し、翻訳を順序の結合から解放することができます。 実験結果は、私たちのモデルが最先端の方法と比較してより競争力があることを示しており、分析は、私たちのモデルが異なる長さの文章を翻訳するのにも堅牢であり、デコードのためのターゲット側のコンテキストからの命令で繰り返しを減らすことを反映しています。', 'zh': '神经机器翻译(NMT)之大序(Seq2Seq)模则递归神经网络(RNN)以次逐字成译。 语言学研已证,言非线性单词序,乃杂构之序,一步之译,当以全侧上下文为资。 为之新NMT,在上下文为解码。 模形基于的端上下文结构生成译,以便从序绑定中解放出来。 实验结果表明与先进之法,吾更具竞争力分析表明,吾于译句亦强,而损其侧上下文之令解码。', 'hi': 'न्यूरल मशीन ट्रांसलेशन (NMT) के लिए अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम (Seq2Seq) मॉडल का एक बड़ा अनुपात एक अनुक्रमिक क्रम के बाद शब्द से अनुवाद शब्द उत्पन्न करने के लिए आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क (RNN) को अपनाता है। जैसा कि भाषाविज्ञान के अध्ययन ने साबित कर दिया है कि भाषा रैखिक शब्द अनुक्रम नहीं है, बल्कि जटिल संरचना का अनुक्रम है, प्रत्येक चरण में अनुवाद को पूरे लक्ष्य-पक्ष संदर्भ पर वातानुकूलित किया जाना चाहिए। समस्या से निपटने के लिए, हम एक नए एनएमटी मॉडल का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो लक्ष्य अनुक्रम के संदर्भ की अपनी संरचनात्मक भविष्यवाणी के मार्गदर्शन के साथ अनुक्रम को डीकोड करता है। हमारा मॉडल लक्ष्य-पक्ष संदर्भ की संरचनात्मक भविष्यवाणी के आधार पर अनुवाद उत्पन्न करता है ताकि अनुवाद को अनुक्रमिक क्रम के बंधन से मुक्त किया जा सके। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा मॉडल अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में अधिक प्रतिस्पर्धी है, और विश्लेषण दर्शाता है कि हमारा मॉडल विभिन्न लंबाई के वाक्यों का अनुवाद करने के लिए भी मजबूत है और यह डिकोडिंग के लिए लक्ष्य-साइड संदर्भ से निर्देश के साथ पुनरावृत्ति को भी कम करता है।', 'ru': 'Большая часть моделей последовательности в последовательности (Seq2Seq) для нейронного машинного перевода (NMT) используют рекуррентную нейронную сеть (RNN) для генерации перевода от слова к слову в последовательном порядке. Поскольку исследования лингвистики доказали, что язык - это не линейная последовательность слов, а последовательность сложной структуры, перевод на каждом этапе должен быть обусловлен всем целевым контекстом. Для решения проблемы мы предлагаем новую модель НМТ, которая декодирует последовательность с руководством ее структурного прогнозирования контекста целевой последовательности. Наша модель генерирует перевод на основе структурного прогнозирования контекста целевой стороны, так что перевод может быть освобожден от привязки последовательного порядка. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель более конкурентоспособна по сравнению с современными методами, и анализ показывает, что наша модель также устойчива к переводу предложений различной длины, а также уменьшает повторение с инструкцией из контекста целевой стороны для декодирования.', 'ga': 'Glacann cuid mhór de na samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh (Seq2Seq) le haghaidh Neural Machine Translation (NMT) Líonra Néarach Athfhillteach (RNN) chun aistriúchán focal ar fhocal a ghiniúint tar éis ord seicheamhach. Toisc go bhfuil sé cruthaithe ag staidéir na teangeolaíochta nach seicheamh líneach focal atá i dteanga ach seicheamh struchtúir chasta, ba chóir go mbeadh an t-aistriúchán ag gach céim de réir an chomhthéacs iomláin sprice. Chun dul i ngleic leis an bhfadhb, molaimid múnla nua NMT a dhíchódaíonn an seicheamh le treoir a thuar struchtúrach ar chomhthéacs na seicheamh sprice. Gineann ár múnla aistriúchán bunaithe ar thuar struchtúrach an chomhthéacs sprice ionas gur féidir an t-aistriúchán a shaoradh ón gceangal ord seicheamhach. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil ár múnla níos iomaíche i gcomparáid leis na modhanna úrscothacha, agus léiríonn an anailís go bhfuil ár múnla láidir freisin maidir le habairtí d’fhaid éagsúla a aistriú agus laghdaíonn sé athrá freisin leis an teagasc ón taobh sprice. comhthéacs le haghaidh díchódaithe.', 'el': 'Ένα μεγάλο ποσοστό των μοντέλων ακολουθίας-σε-ακολουθίας (για τη Νευρική Μηχανική Μετάφραση (NMT) υιοθετεί το Επαναλαμβανόμενο Νευρικό Δίκτυο (RNN) για να παράγει μετάφραση λέξη προς λέξη ακολουθώντας μια διαδοχική σειρά. Δεδομένου ότι οι μελέτες της γλωσσολογίας έχουν αποδείξει ότι η γλώσσα δεν είναι γραμμική ακολουθία λέξεων αλλά ακολουθία σύνθετης δομής, η μετάφραση σε κάθε βήμα θα πρέπει να εξαρτάται από το σύνολο του πλαισίου στόχου. Για την αντιμετώπιση του προβλήματος, προτείνουμε ένα νέο μοντέλο που αποκωδικοποιεί την ακολουθία με την καθοδήγηση της δομικής πρόβλεψης του πλαισίου της ακολουθίας στόχου. Το μοντέλο μας παράγει μετάφραση με βάση τη δομική πρόβλεψη του πλαισίου στόχου, έτσι ώστε η μετάφραση να μπορεί να απελευθερωθεί από τη δέσμευση διαδοχικής τάξης. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν ότι το μοντέλο μας είναι πιο ανταγωνιστικό σε σύγκριση με τις μεθόδους τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, και η ανάλυση δείχνει ότι το μοντέλο μας είναι επίσης ανθεκτικό στη μετάφραση προτάσεων διαφορετικού μήκους και μειώνει επίσης την επανάληψη με την οδηγία από το πλαίσιο του στόχου για την αποκωδικοποίηση.', 'hu': 'A Neurális Gépi Fordítás (NMT) szekvencia-szekvencia (Seq2Seq) modelljeinek nagy része alkalmazza az Ismétlődő Neurális Hálózatot (RNN) a fordítás szó szerinti sorrendben történő létrehozására. Mivel a nyelvészeti tanulmányok bebizonyították, hogy a nyelv nem lineáris szósorozat, hanem komplex struktúrájú sorozat, a fordítást minden lépésnél a teljes céloldali kontextusnak kell megfelelnie. A probléma megoldása érdekében új NMT modellt javasolunk, amely dekódolja a szekvenciát a célszekvencia kontextusának strukturális előrejelzésével. Modellünk a céloldali kontextus strukturális előrejelzése alapján készít fordítást, így a fordítás megszabadulhat a szekvenciális sorrend kötésétől. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk versenyképesebb a legkorszerűbb módszerekhez képest, és az elemzés azt mutatja, hogy modellünk erőteljes a különböző hosszúságú mondatok fordítására, és csökkenti az ismétlést a céloldali kontextusból a dekódolásra vonatkozó utasításokkal.', 'it': "Una grande percentuale di modelli sequenza-sequenza (Seq2Seq) per la traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) adotta la rete neurale ricorrente (RNN) per generare la traduzione parola per parola seguendo un ordine sequenziale. Poiché gli studi di linguistica hanno dimostrato che il linguaggio non è sequenza lineare di parole, ma sequenza di struttura complessa, la traduzione in ogni fase dovrebbe essere condizionata dall'intero contesto di destinazione. Per affrontare il problema, proponiamo un nuovo modello NMT che decodifica la sequenza con la guida della sua previsione strutturale del contesto della sequenza target. Il nostro modello genera una traduzione basata sulla previsione strutturale del contesto target-side in modo che la traduzione possa essere liberata dal bind dell'ordine sequenziale. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro modello è più competitivo rispetto ai metodi più moderni, e l'analisi riflette che il nostro modello è anche robusto per tradurre frasi di diversa lunghezza e riduce anche la ripetizione con le istruzioni dal contesto target-side per la decodifica.", 'lt': 'Didelė dalis iš eilės į eilę (Seq2Seq) modelių, skirtų neurologiniam mašinų vertimui (NMT), priima pakartotinį neurologinį tinklą (RNN), kad būtų galima išversti žodžius žodžiu po eilės. Kadangi kalbos tyrimai parodė, kad kalba nėra linijinė žodžių seka, o sudėtingos struktūros seka, vertimas kiekvienu etapu turėtų būti priklausomas nuo viso tikslinės pusės konteksto. Siekiant išspręsti šią problem ą, siūlome naują NMT model į, kuris dekoduoja seką vadovaudamasis struktūrinėmis tikslinės sekos konteksto prognozėmis. Mūsų modelis sukuria vertimą, pagrįstą struktūrine tikslinės pusės konteksto prognoze, kad vertimas būtų laisvas nuo sekacinės tvarkos susiejimo. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų model is yra konkurencingesnis, palyginti su naujausiais metodais, ir analizė atspindi, kad mūsų modelis taip pat yra tvirtas skirtingų ilgių sakinių vertimui ir taip pat mažina pakartojimą nurodant dekodifikuoti tikslinį kontekstą.', 'mk': 'Голем дел од моделите од секвенца до секвенца (Seq2Seq) за неурална машинска транслекција (NMT) усвојуваат рекурентна неурална мрежа (RNN) за да генерираат превод збор по збор по секвенцијален ред. Како што студиите на лингвистиката докажаа дека јазикот не е линијарна секвенца на зборови, туку секвенца на комплексна структура, преводот на секој чекор треба да биде условен на целиот контекст на страната на целта. За да го решиме проблемот, предлагаме нов модел на НМТ кој ја декодира секвенцијата со упатствата на неговата структурна предвидување на контекстот на целната секвенца. Our model generates translation based on the structural prediction of the target-side context so that the translation can be freed from the bind of sequential order.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел е поконкурентен во споредба со најсовремените методи, а анализата рефлектира дека нашиот модел е, исто така, силен во преведувањето на реченици од различни должини и исто така ја намалува повторувањето со инструкциите од контекстот на метата за декодирање.', 'ka': 'Name როგორც ლინგურისტიკის კვლევები გამოწვებულია, რომ ენერგია არ არის ლინური სიტყვების წერტილი, მაგრამ კომპლექციური სტრუქტურის წერტილი, ყოველ წერტილის წერტილი უნდა იყოს ყ პრობლემას გადაწყვეტისთვის, ჩვენ ახალი NMT მოდელს, რომელიც მისი სტრუქტურული წარმოდგენისთვის მიმდინარების კონტექსტური წარმოდგენისთვის გავაკეთებთ. ჩვენი მოდელი შექმნა გადაწყვეტილება, რომელიც სტრუქტურული წარმოდგენა მისაწყისი კონტექსტის სტრუქტური წარმოდგენისთვის, რადგან გადაწყვეტილება შეიძლება ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი უფრო კონპექტიურია კონპექტიურია, რომელიც განსხვავებული სიგრძე განსხვავებული სიგრძე და ასევე უფრო შემცირება ინსტრუქციის სტრუქცია მიზედან კონტექსტის გან', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷക (NMT) ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെയുറല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറാല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറാല്\u200d നെറുല്\u200d നെറാള്\u200d നെറാവര്\u200dക്ക്( RNN) വാക്കിനു ശേഷം വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉല്\u200d ഭാഷകങ്ങളുടെ അന്വേഷണങ്ങള്\u200d തെളിയിച്ചിട്ടുണ്ടെങ്കില്\u200d ഭാഷ ലൈനര്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് അല്ല എന്നാല്\u200d സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ ക്രമീകരണങ്ങളുട പ്രശ്നം നോക്കാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ NMT മോഡല്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. അതിന്റെ സ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തിലുള്ള സംവിധാനത്തി നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d പരിഭാഷണത്തെ സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്നു. ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ പ്രവചനങ്ങളില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d രാഷ്ട്രീതിയോടൊപ്പം കൂടുതല്\u200d സമര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നത്, അന്യായം പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത ദീര', 'kk': 'Нейрондық машинаны аудару (NMT) үшін реттеу- реттеу (Seq2Seq) үлгілерінің ұзындығы қайталанатын нейрондық желі (RNN) сөздерді сөзден кейін аудару үшін кейінгі реттеу үшін қайталанатын нейрондық желі (SEq2Seq) ү Лингвистикалық зерттеулері тіл сызық сөздер ретінде емес дегенді көрсетті, бірақ комплекс құрылғының ретінде, әрбір қадамда аудару үшін мақсатты жағындағы контексті шарт болу керек. Мәселесін шешу үшін, мәселесін шешу үшін, мәселесінің структуралық таңдау бағдарламасының мақсат ретінің контексті бағыттайтын жаңа NMT үлгісін таңдаймыз. Біздің үлгіміз мақсат жағындағы контекстің құрылымына негізделген аудармаларды жасайды, сондықтан аудармаларды келесі ретінің тізбегінен бос тартуға болады. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің моделіміз әртүрлі әдістерімен салыстырылып тұрғанын көрсетеді, анализ біздің моделіміз әртүрлі ұзындықтарды аудару үшін жұмыс істейді, сондай-ақ бұл мәліметтің мақсатты контекстінен қайталау', 'mt': 'Proporzjon kbir ta’ mudelli minn sekwenza għal sekwenza (Seq2Seq) għat-Traduzzjoni ta’ Magni Newrali (NMT) jadottaw Netwerk Newrali Rikorrenti (RNN) biex jiġġeneraw it-traduzzjoni kelma b’kelma wara ordni sekwenzjali. Peress li l-istudji tal-lingwistika wrew li l-lingwa mhijiex sekwenza lineari ta’ kliem iżda sekwenza ta’ struttura kumplessa, it-traduzzjoni f’kull pass għandha tkun kondizzjonata fuq il-kuntest kollu tal-mira. Biex nindirizzaw il-problem a, nipproponu mudell ġdid ta’ NMT li jiddekodifika s-sekwenza bil-gwida tat-tbassir strutturali tiegħu tal-kuntest tas-sekwenza fil-mira. Il-mudell tagħna jiġġenera traduzzjoni bbażata fuq it-tbassir strutturali tal-kuntest min-naħa tal-mira sabiex it-traduzzjoni tkun tista’ tinħeles mill-irbit tal-ordni sekwenzjali. Experimental results demonstrate that our model is more competitive compared with the state-of-the-art methods, and the analysis reflects that our model is also robust to translating sentences of different lengths and it also reduces repetition with the instruction from the target-side context for decoding.', 'mn': 'Ньюрал машин хөгжүүлэх (NMT) үеийн дараагийн дараагийн дараагийн үеийн дараагийн дарааллаар орчуулах үеийн дараагийн дараагийн дараагийн дараагийн дараагийн дараа дахин дараагийн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний (RNN) загварын гол хэмжээст хуваагддаг. Холбооны судалгаагаар хэл шулуун үг дарааллаа биш гэдгийг баталсан ч комплекс бүтцийн дарааллаар орлуулах хэрэгтэй. Бид асуудлыг шийдэхийн тулд дарааллыг зорилготой дарааллын тухай бүтэц тодорхойлолтоор шинэ NMT загварын загварыг зааж өгдөг. Бидний загвар нь зорилго-талын тохиолдлын бүтэц тохиолдлын төлөвлөгөө үүсгэдэг. Ингээд орлуулалт нь дараагийн дарааллаас чөлөөлж чадна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний загвар нь урлагийн хувьд харьцуулахад илүү өрсөлдөөнтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Шалгууль нь бидний загвар нь мөн өөр урт өргөн үеийн өгүүлбөрүүдийг орлуулахад хүчтэй гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ нь мөн загварын загвараас давтах загварыг', 'no': 'Eit stor andel av sekvens- til- sekvens- modeller (Seq2Seq) for neiralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT) kan adoptera gjentakelig neiralnettverk (RNN) for å laga omsetjingsverdi etter ord etter ei sekvensisk rekkjefølgje. Som studiane av språk har bevist at språk er ikkje lineær ordsekvens, men rekkjefølgje av komplekse struktur, bør omsetjinga på kvar steg gjerast i heile målside-konteksten. For å løyse problemet, foreslår vi ein ny NMT-modell som dekoderer sekvensen med hjelpelinjene til den strukturelle forhåndsvising av konteksten av målskjefølgja. Modellen vårt lager omsetjinga basert på strukturelle forhåndsvising av målside-konteksten slik at omsetjinga kan frigjerast frå bindinga av sekvensiske rekkefølgje. Eksperimentale resultat viser at modellen vårt er mer konkurentivt samanlikna med kunstmetodane, og analysen gjer at modellen vårt er også kraftig til å omsetja setningar av ulike lengde og reduserer gjentakingar med instruksjonen frå målside-konteksten for dekoding.', 'pl': 'Duża część modeli sekwencji-sekwencji (Seq2Seq) do neuronowego tłumaczenia maszynowego (NMT) przyjmuje sieć powtarzającą się (RNN) do generowania tłumaczenia słowo po słowie według kolejności sekwencyjnej. Ponieważ badania lingwistyki udowodniły, że język nie jest liniową sekwencją słów, lecz sekwencją o złożonej strukturze, tłumaczenie na każdym kroku powinno być uwarunkowane całym kontekście strony docelowej. Aby rozwiązać problem, proponujemy nowy model NMT, który dekoduje sekwencję z wytycznym jej strukturalnej predykcji kontekstu sekwencji docelowej. Nasz model generuje tłumaczenie w oparciu o przewidywanie strukturalne kontekstu po stronie docelowej, tak aby tłumaczenie można było uwolnić od wiązania kolejności sekwencyjnej. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model jest bardziej konkurencyjny w porównaniu z najnowocześniejszymi metodami, a analiza odzwierciedla, że nasz model jest również solidny do tłumaczenia zdań o różnej długości, a także zmniejsza powtarzanie się z instrukcją z kontekstu docelowego do dekodowania.', 'ro': 'O mare parte de modele secvență-la-secvență (Seq2Seq) pentru traducerea automată neurală (NMT) adoptă Rețeaua neurală recurentă (RNN) pentru a genera traduceri cuvânt cu cuvânt, urmând o ordine secvențială. Deoarece studiile lingvistice au demonstrat că limba nu este o secvență liniară de cuvinte, ci o secvență de structură complexă, traducerea la fiecare etapă ar trebui să fie condiționată de întregul context vizat. Pentru a aborda problema, propunem un nou model NMT care decodează secvența cu ghidarea predicției structurale a contextului secvenței țintă. Modelul nostru generează traduceri bazate pe predicția structurală a contextului țintă, astfel încât traducerea să poată fi eliberată de legătura ordinii secvențiale. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că modelul nostru este mai competitiv în comparație cu metodele de ultimă generație, iar analiza reflectă că modelul nostru este, de asemenea, robust pentru traducerea frazelor de diferite lungimi și reduce repetarea cu instrucțiunile din contextul țintă pentru decodare.', 'ms': 'Sebuah nisbah besar dari model jujukan-ke-jujukan (Seq2Seq) untuk Terjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) mengadopsi Rangkaian Neural Berulang (RNN) untuk menghasilkan perkataan terjemahan dengan perkataan mengikut tertib jujukan. Kerana kajian bahasa telah membuktikan bahasa bukanlah urutan perkataan linear tetapi urutan struktur kompleks, terjemahan pada setiap langkah patut dikundisikan pada seluruh konteks sisi-sasaran. Untuk menangani masalah ini, kami cadangkan model NMT baru yang menyahkod urutan dengan panduan ramalan strukturnya terhadap konteks urutan sasaran. Model kami menghasilkan terjemahan berdasarkan ramalan struktur konteks sisi-sasaran supaya terjemahan boleh dibebaskan dari ikatan tertib sunyi. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kita lebih kompetitif dibandingkan dengan kaedah-kaedah terbaik, dan analisis mencerminkan bahawa model kita juga kuat untuk menerjemahkan kalimat panjang berbeza dan ia juga mengurangkan ulangan dengan arahan dari konteks-sisi sasaran untuk penyahkodan.', 'sv': 'En stor del sekvens-till-sekvens (Seq2Seq) modeller för neural maskinöversättning (NMT) använder Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) för att generera översättningar ord för ord enligt en sekventiell ordning. Eftersom studier av lingvistik har visat att språket inte är linjär ordsekvens utan sekvens av komplex struktur, bör översättningen vid varje steg vara beroende av hela målsidan kontext. För att lösa problemet föreslår vi en ny NMT-modell som avkodar sekvensen med vägledning av dess strukturella förutsägelse av kontexten för målsekvensen. Vår modell genererar översättning baserad på strukturell förutsägelse av målsidan kontext så att översättningen kan frigöras från bindningen av sekventiell ordning. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell är mer konkurrenskraftig jämfört med de senaste metoderna, och analysen visar att vår modell också är robust för att översätta meningar av olika längd och minskar också repetition med instruktionerna från målsidan för avkodning.', 'sr': 'Velika proporcija modela sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) za neurološki prevod mašine (NMT) usvoji ponovnu neurološku mrežu (RNN) kako bi stvorili prevodnu reč po reèi nakon sekvencijskog reda. Kao što su ispitivanja jezika dokazale da jezik nije linearna rečna sekvencija, već sekvencija kompleksnog strukture, prevod na svakom koraku treba biti podložen u cijelom kontekstu ciljne strane. Da bi se riješili problem, predlažemo novi NMT model koji dekodira sekvencu sa uputstvom strukturnog predviđanja konteksta ciljne sekvence. Naš model stvara prevod na osnovu strukturnog predviđanja konteksta ciljne strane kako bi prevod mogao biti oslobođen iz veze sekvencijskog reda. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš model konkurentniji u usporedbi sa metodama države umjetnosti, i analiza određuje da je naš model takođe jak da prevodi rečenice različitih dužina i smanjuje i ponavljanje sa uputstvom iz konteksta ciljne strane za dekodiranje.', 'si': 'Name භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා භාෂාව ලේනියර් වචන පරීක්ෂණය නෙවෙයි නමුත් පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා  ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හරිගන්න, අපි අළුත් NMT මොඩල් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ඒකේ සං අපේ මොඩල් පරිවර්තනය පරිවර්තනය කරන්නේ ඉලක්ක-පැත්තේ සංවේදනයේ සංවේදනය සඳහා පරිවර්තනය පරිවර්තනය සඳහා පරිව පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩේල් තරම් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිතයෙන් තරම් ප්\u200dරතිචාරිතයි, සහ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරතිචාරිතයෙන් අපේ මොඩේල් වගේ', 'so': 'Tusaale faro badan oo xilliga (Seq2Seq) u dhexeeya tarjumaadka Neural machine (NMT) waxay adoptaan shabakadda Neural Neural Network (RNN) si ay u generaan hadal turjuman ku qoran qoraal dabadeed. Waxbarashada luuqadaha waxaa lagu xaqiijiyey in luqadu uusan aheyn qoraal sawir ah, laakiin koox ka mid ah dhismaha complex, turjumaadda koox kasta waa in lagu sharciyo qoraalka qoriga ah oo dhan. Si aan u tacliino dhibaatada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model cusub oo NMT ah oo kooban dhamaadka, kaasoo ku qoran hagitaanka horumarinta qaababka ku qoran xiliga jiilaalka. Tusaalkayagu wuxuu sameeyaa turjumaan ku saleysan qaababka qaabka ah oo ku qoran qaababka qaababka ku yaal, si turjumaadda looga furi karo xidhiidhka amarka soo socda. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in modellkayagu aad u adag yahay isbarbardhigga dowladda farshaxanta, baaritaanku wuxuu ka muuqanayaa in modellkayaga looga turjumo hadallada dheeraadka kala duduwan, wuxuuna sidoo kale dib u dhigi karaa hagitaanka dhinaca saxda.', 'ur': 'نیورل ماشین ترجمہ (NMT) کے لئے سیکٹ-ٹ-سیکٹ (Seq2Seq) نمڈلوں کی ایک بڑی نسبت پراثر ہے کہ کلمات کے پیچھے ترجمہ کلمات پیدا کریں۔ جس طرح زبان شناسی کی تحقیقات ثابت ہوئی ہے کہ زبان لینیاری لفظ کی سفارش نہیں ہے لیکن پیچیدہ ساختار کی سفارش ہے، ہر سفارش پر مترجم تمام موقعیت کی سفارش پر قائم ہونا چاہیے۔ اس مسئلہ کے ساتھ ہم نے ایک نئی NMT موڈل کو پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو اس کے ساختاری پیش بینی کے ذریعے موقعیت کی سیدھی پیش بینی کے ذریعے دکھاتا ہے. ہمارا موڈل مترجم کو مترجم کرتا ہے تاکہ مترجم کو دوسری اوردن سے آزاد کر سکے۔ آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل آزمائش کے مطابق زیادہ مساوی ہے اور تحقیق دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا موڈل بھی مختلف درازوں کے مطابق مطابق مطابق ہے اور یہ بھی ہدایت کے منظور کے مطابق تدبیر کے مطابق دکھاتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'நெயுரல் இயந்திரத்தின் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) மொழிபெயர்ப்புக்கான தொடர்ச்சில் இருக்கும் மாதிரியின் பெரிய விகிதம் (Seq2Seq) மாதிரிகள் பின்வரும் வரிசையின மொழிகளின் ஆய்வுகள் தெரியும் போது, மொழி வரிசையில் சிக்கல் அமைப்பின் வரிசையில் அல்ல, ஒவ்வொரு படியிலும் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு முழு பக்கத்தி பிரச்சனையை எதிர்பார்க்க, நாம் ஒரு புதிய NMT மாதிரியை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், அது இலக்கு வரிசையின் கட்டுப்பாட்டு முன்னோட்டின்  எங்கள் மாதிரி மொழிபெயர்ப்பை உருவாக்குகிறது இலக்கு- பக்கத்தின் கட்டுப்பாட்டு மொழிபெயர்ப்பை அடிப்படையில் மொழிபெயர்ப் முயற்சி முடிவுகள் நமது மாதிரி மாதிரி முறைமையை ஒப்பிடுவது மிகவும் போராட்டியாகும் மற்றும் ஆராய்ச்சி பிரிவிக்கும் மாதிரி வாக்குகளை மொழிபெயர்த்துவதற்காகவும் மற்றும் க', 'uz': "Name Tilni o'rganishni tasdiqlash mumkin, bu tilning soʻz chegarasi emas, ammo murakkab structurning seksiyati emas, har bir qadamda bir qadam tarjima qilish kerak. Muammo xabar qilish uchun, biz qanday cheksiz tarkibini ko'paytirish uchun yangi NMT modelini talab qilamiz. Modemiz tarjima beradi va tarjima keyingi tarjima boshqarishdan foydalanishi mumkin. Tajriba natijalari esa modelimizning holatning holatida bir rivojlanishimizni ko'rsatadi. Analytika esa bizning modelimizni boshqa uzun soniyalarni tarjima qilish uchun harakat qiladi, va u kodlash usulidan foydalanish uchun taklif qiladi.", 'vi': 'Một phần lớn các mô hình lặp lại (Seq2Seq) cho cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc thần kinh (NMB) áp dụng liên tục mạng thần kinh (RNN) để tạo ra lời dịch theo một trật tự tương tự. Như các nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ đã chứng minh rằng ngôn ngữ không phải là chuỗi chữ tuyến nhưng là chuỗi cấu trúc phức tạp, nên phiên dịch tại mỗi bước phải được điều chỉnh toàn bộ nội dung đối với mục tiêu. Để giải quyết vấn đề, chúng tôi đề xuất một mô hình NMT mới giải mã dãy số bằng cách chỉ dẫn cho dự đoán cấu trúc của nó về hậu quả của dãy mục tiêu. Phiên bản của chúng tôi tạo ra dịch dựa trên dự đoán cấu trúc của ngữ cảnh đối diện đích để giải phóng bản dịch khỏi ràng buộc của trật tự lặp. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta cạnh tranh hơn so với các phương pháp hiện đại, và kết quả phân tích này phản ánh rằng mô hình của chúng ta cũng mạnh mẽ để dịch những câu ở độ dài khác nhau và cũng giảm độ lặp lại bằng việc hướng dẫn từ mặt mục tiêu để giải mã.', 'da': 'En stor del af sekvens-til-sekvens (Seq2Seq) modeller til Neural Machine Translation (NMT) anvender Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) til at generere oversættelse ord for ord i en sekvensrækkefølge. Da lingvistiske undersøgelser har vist, at sproget ikke er lineær ordsekvens, men sekvens af kompleks struktur, bør oversættelse i hvert trin være betinget af hele målsidens kontekst. For at løse problemet foreslår vi en ny NMT-model, der afkoder sekvensen med vejledning af dens strukturelle forudsigelse af konteksten af målsekvensen. Vores model genererer oversættelse baseret på den strukturelle forudsigelse af målsidens kontekst, så oversættelsen kan frigøres fra bindingen af sekventiel rækkefølge. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model er mere konkurrencedygtig sammenlignet med de nyeste metoder, og analysen afspejler, at vores model også er robust til at oversætte sætninger af forskellig længde og reducerer gentagelse med instruktionerne fra målsidens kontekst til afkodning.', 'hr': 'Velika dio modela sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) za neurološki prevod strojeva (NMT) usvoji ponovnu neurološku mrežu (RNN) kako bi stvorili prevodnu riječ po riječi nakon sekvencijskog reda. Kako su ispitivanja jezika dokazale da jezik nije linearna riječi sekvencija, već sekvencija složene strukture, prevod na svakom koraku treba biti podložen u cijelom kontekstu ciljne strane. Da riješimo problem, predlažemo novi NMT model koji dekodira sekvencu s uputstvom strukturnog predviđanja konteksta ciljne sekvence. Naš model stvara prevod na temelju strukturnog predviđenja konteksta ciljne strane kako bi prevod mogao biti oslobođen iz veze sekvencijskog reda. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš model konkurentniji u usporedbi s metodama stanja umjetnosti, a analiza odražava da je naš model također jak prevoditi rečenice različitih dužina i smanjiti se i ponavljanje s instrukcijom iz konteksta ciljne strane za dekodiranje.', 'nl': 'Een groot deel van seq2Seq (seq2seq) modellen voor neuronale machinevertaling (NMT) gebruiken Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) om vertaling woord voor woord te genereren volgens een sequentiële volgorde. Aangezien de studies van de linguïstiek hebben aangetoond dat taal geen lineaire woordvolgorde is, maar een reeks van complexe structuren, moet de vertaling bij elke stap worden geconditioneerd op de hele doelcontext. Om het probleem aan te pakken, stellen we een nieuw NMT-model voor dat de sequentie decodeert met de begeleiding van de structurele voorspelling van de context van de doelsequentie. Ons model genereert vertaling op basis van de structurele voorspelling van de target-side context, zodat de vertaling kan worden bevrijd van de bind van sequentiële orde. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model concurrerender is in vergelijking met de state-of-the-art methoden, en de analyse toont aan dat ons model ook robuust is voor het vertalen van zinnen van verschillende lengtes en het ook herhaling vermindert met de instructie uit de doelcontext voor decodering.', 'id': 'Sebuah proporsi besar dari model urutan-ke-urutan (Seq2Seq) untuk Translasi Mesin Neural (NMT) mengadopsi Jaringan Neural Recurrent (RNN) untuk menghasilkan kata terjemahan dengan kata mengikuti urutan urutan. Karena penelitian bahasa telah membuktikan bahasa bukan urutan kata linear tetapi urutan struktur kompleks, terjemahan pada setiap langkah harus dikundisikan pada seluruh konteks sisi target. Untuk mengatasi masalah ini, kami mengusulkan model NMT baru yang menyatukan urutan dengan petunjuk dari prediksi strukturnya tentang konteks urutan sasaran. Model kami menghasilkan terjemahan berdasarkan prediksi struktur konteks sisi-target sehingga terjemahan dapat dibebaskan dari ikatan dari urutan sekuensial. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita lebih kompetitif dibandingkan dengan metode state-of-the-art, dan analisis mencerminkan bahwa model kita juga kuat untuk menerjemahkan kalimat dari panjang yang berbeda dan juga mengurangi ulangan dengan instruksi dari konteks sisi target untuk dekoding.', 'de': 'Ein großer Teil der Sequenz-zu-Sequenz (Seq2Seq)-Modelle für die neuronale maschinelle Übersetzung (NMT) verwendet das wiederkehrende neuronale Netzwerk (RNN), um die Übersetzung Wort für Wort nach einer sequenziellen Reihenfolge zu generieren. Da die linguistischen Studien bewiesen haben, dass Sprache keine lineare Wortfolge, sondern eine Sequenz komplexer Strukturen ist, sollte die Übersetzung in jedem Schritt vom gesamten zielseitigen Kontext abhängig gemacht werden. Um das Problem anzugehen, schlagen wir ein neues NMT-Modell vor, das die Sequenz unter Anleitung seiner strukturellen Vorhersage des Kontexts der Zielsequenz entschlüsselt. Unser Modell generiert Übersetzung basierend auf der strukturellen Vorhersage des zielseitigen Kontexts, so dass die Übersetzung von der Bindung sequentieller Ordnung befreit werden kann. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell wettbewerbsfähiger ist im Vergleich zu den modernsten Methoden, und die Analyse zeigt, dass unser Modell auch robust ist, Sätze unterschiedlicher Länge zu übersetzen und es reduziert auch Wiederholungen mit der Anweisung aus dem zielseitigen Kontext für die Dekodierung.', 'bg': 'Голяма част от моделите последователност към последователност (Seq2Seq) за невронен машинен превод (NMT) приемат повтаряща се невронна мрежа (RNN), за да генерират превод дума по дума, следвайки последователен ред. Тъй като изследванията на лингвистиката доказват, че езикът не е линейна последователност на думите, а последователност от сложна структура, преводът на всяка стъпка трябва да бъде обусловен върху целия контекст от целевата страна. За да се справим с проблема, предлагаме нов модел, който декодира последователността с ръководството на нейното структурно прогнозиране на контекста на целевата последователност. Нашият модел генерира превод въз основа на структурното прогнозиране на контекста от целевата страна, така че преводът може да бъде освободен от свързването от последователен ред. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел е по-конкурентен в сравнение с най-съвременните методи, а анализът отразява, че нашият модел също е здрав за превеждане на изречения с различна дължина и намалява повторението с инструкциите от целевия контекст за декодиране.', 'fa': 'یک مقدار بزرگ از مدل\u200cهای ترجمه به رده (Seq2Seq) برای ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) شبکه عصبی دوباره (RNN) را برای تولید کردن کلمه\u200cهای ترجمه به کلمه بعد از سفارش سفارشی سفارش می\u200cکند. همانطور که مطالعه\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی ثابت شده است که زبان تعادل کلمه\u200cهای خطی نیست بلکه تعادل ساختار پیچیده، ترجمه در هر قدم باید در تمام محیط\u200cهای هدف باشد. برای حل مشکل، ما یک مدل NMT جدید پیشنهاد می کنیم که ردیابی را با هدایت پیش بینی ساختارش از محیط ردیابی هدف دکوع می کند. مدل ما بر اساس پیش\u200cبینی ساختاری از محیط هدف\u200cطرف تولید می\u200cکند تا ترجمه\u200cای از محیط سفارش\u200cهای سفارش آزاد شود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهند که مدل ما در مقایسه با روش\u200cهای هنر رقابت\u200cکننده\u200cتر است، و تحلیل نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما همچنین قابل ترجمه جمله\u200cهای طولانی متفاوتی است و همچنین تکرار کردن با دستورات از محیط هدف برای دکوندن می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '신경기계번역(NMT)에 사용되는 대부분의 서열에서 서열(Seq2Seq) 모델은 귀속신경망(RNN)을 이용하여 순서대로 번역을 생성한다.언어학 연구에 의하면 언어는 선형적인 어순이 아니라 복잡한 구조의 서열이며 번역의 매 단계는 전체 목적의 어경을 조건으로 해야 한다는 것이 증명되었다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 새로운 NMT 모델을 제시했는데 이 모델은 목표 서열 상하문의 구조 예측에 대한 지도 아래 서열을 디코딩한다.우리의 모델은 목표 언어 환경의 구조적 예측을 바탕으로 번역을 생성하고 번역은 순서의 속박에서 벗어날 수 있다.실험 결과에 의하면 가장 선진적인 방법에 비해 우리의 모델은 더욱 경쟁력이 있다. 분석에 의하면 우리의 모델은 서로 다른 길이의 문장을 번역하는 데 노봉성을 가지고 목표 측 상하문에서 온 지령이 디코딩할 때의 중복을 감소시켰다.', 'sw': 'Kiwango kikubwa cha mifano ya mfululizo (Seq2Seq) kwa ajili ya Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Neural (NMT) hutumia Mtandao wa Neural unaoendelea (RNN) kutengeneza neno la kutafsiri kwa neno kufuatia amri ya mfululizo. Kwa kuwa utafiti wa lugha umethibitisha kuwa lugha si mfululizo wa maneno madhubuti lakini mfululizo wa muundo mgumu, tafsiri katika kila hatua lazima iwe kizuizini katika muktadha mzima wa lengo. To tackle the problem, we propose a new NMT model that decodes the sequence with the guidance of its structural prediction of the context of the target sequence.  Mfano wetu unatengeneza tafsiri kwa msingi wa utabiri wa miundombinu wa muktadha wa lengo ili tafsiri inaweza kuachiliwa huru na mfumo wa amri inayofuata. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa muundo wetu una ushindani zaidi ukilinganishwa na hali ya sanaa, na uchambuzi unaonyesha kuwa mwelekeo wetu pia umetupwa kutafsiri sentensi za mrefu tofauti na pia inapunguza tena kwa maelekezo kutoka kwenye muktadha wa upande wa lengo kwa ajili ya decodi.', 'tr': 'Neural Makine terjime (NMT) üçin hatlaryň (Seq2Seq) nusgalarynyň beýik proporsiýasyny terjime eden Nural Network (RNN) sözleriň ardynda terjime edilen sözleri döretmek üçin ullanýar. Diller çyzgylyň araştyrmalaryna görä çyzgylyň sözleriň sıralama däldigini kanıtlandyrylýar, her adımda bir terjime bütin hedef tarapynda mümkin edilmeli. Meseläni çözmek üçin, biz täze bir NMT nusgasyny bejermek üçin bu nusganyň strukturlarynyň hadysynyň geçişini çykýan bir nusgasyny teklip edip görýäris. Biziň modelimiz maksad-tarap kontekstiň strukturly önümlerine dayanan terjime täzer edýär şeýle däl terjime täzeden boşadyr. Aramanyň netijeleri nusgalarymyz nusgalarymyz ýakynlaşykly-ýagtylyk ýoldaşdygyny görkezýär, we analýşimiz nusgalarymyz farklı uzlyklaryň sözlerini terjime etmäge ýok bolandygyny görkezýär we bu nusgalarymyz hem maksadyň kontekstinden gaýtalanmagy bilen azaltýar.', 'sq': 'Një proportë e madhe e modeleve sekuencë-në-sekuencë (Seq2Seq) për Translacionin e Makinës Neurale (NMT) miratojnë Rrjetin Neural Rekurent (RNN) për të gjeneruar fjalë përkthimi me fjalë pas një rendi sekuencial. Ndërsa studimet e gjuhës kanë provuar se gjuha nuk është sekuenca lineare fjalësh por sekuenca e strukturës komplekse, përkthimi në çdo hap duhet të kushtëzohet me të gjithë kontekstin e anës objektive. Për të trajtuar problemin, ne propozojmë një model të ri NMT që dekoden sekuencën me udhëzimin e parashikimit struktural të saj të kontekstit të sekuencës objektive. Modeli ynë gjeneron përkthime bazuar në parashikimin strukturor të kontekstit të anës objektive kështu që përkthimi mund të lirohet nga lidhja e rendit sekuencor. Rezultatet eksperimentale demonstrojnë se modeli ynë është më konkurrues krahasuar me metodat më të larta dhe analiza pasqyron se modeli ynë është gjithashtu i fortë për përkthimin e fjalëve me gjatësi të ndryshme dhe redukton gjithashtu përsëritjen me instruksionet nga konteksti i anës së objektivit për dekodimin.', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች የቋንቋዎች ትምህርት ሲያስታውቁ ቋንቋ የቋንቋ ቃላት ክፍተት አይደለም ነገር ግን በተጨማሪው ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ ጉዳዩን ለመቀበል አዲስ NMT ሞዴል እናሳልጋለን፡፡ ሞዴሌያችን የግንኙነት ግንኙነታችንን ለመግለጽ ከግንኙነቱ ግንኙነት ላይ የተመሳሳይ ትርጉም እንዲፈታ ነው፡፡ ፈተና ውጤቶች ሞዴላታችን ከሀገሪቱ-የ-አርእስት ጋር እንዲተካክሉ ይታያል፡፡', 'af': "'n Groot proporsie van volgorde- na- volgorde (Seq2Seq) modele vir Neurale Masjien Vertaling (NMT) aanvaar Rekursiewe Neurale Netwerk (RNN) om vertaling woord te genereer deur woord volgens 'n volgorde volgorde. Soos die studie van lingwisiese bevestig het dat taal nie lineêre woord volgorde is nie, maar volgorde van kompleks struktuur, vertaling by elke stap moet op die hele doel- kant konteks beteken word. Om die probleem te probeer, voorstel ons 'n nuwe NMT-model wat die sekvens met die gids van sy strukturele voorskou van die konteks van die doel-sekvens dekodeer. Ons model genereer vertaling gebaseer op die strukturele voorskou van die doel- side konteks sodat die vertaling van die binding van sekwensielle volgorde vry kan word. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons model meer gemeenskap is, vergelyk met die state-of-the-art metodes, en die analisie reflekteer dat ons model ook kragtig is om sagte van verskillende lengte te te vertaling en dit ook herhaal met die instruksie van die doel-kant konteks vir dekodering.", 'hy': 'Նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման (NMT) մոդելների հաջորդականության մեծ մասը ընդունում է Կարգավոր Նյարդային ցանց (ՌՆՆ), որպեսզի ստեղծի թարգմանման բառ բառ առ բառ հաջորդականության հետևից: Քանի որ լեզվաբանության ուսումնասիրությունները ապացուցել են, որ լեզուն գծային բառերի հաջորդականություն չէ, այլ բարդ կառուցվածքի հաջորդականություն, թարգմանությունը յուրաքանչյուր քայլի վրա պետք է կախված լինի նպատակային կոնտեքստ Խնդիրը լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք նոր NMT մոդել, որը կոդավորում է հաջորդականությունը նպատակային հաջորդականության կոնտեքստի կանխատեսման ուղղությամբ: Մեր մոդելը ստեղծում է թարգմանություն, հիմնված նպատակի կոնտեքստի կառուցվածքային կանխատեսումների վրա, որպեսզի թարգմանությունը կարողանա ազատվել հաջորդականության կապերից: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը ավելի մրցակցունակ է, համեմատած ամենաբարձր մեթոդների հետ, և վերլուծությունը արտացոլում է, որ մեր մոդելը նույնպես ուժեղ է տարբեր երկարությունների նախադասությունների թարգմանման համար, և այն նաև նվազեցնում է կրկնօրինակումը նպատակայի', 'az': "Neural Machine Translation (NMT) üçün sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) modellərin böyük proporciji, seq2Seq səviyyəsi ilə təkrarlama sözünü yaratmaq üçün yenidən nöral Network (RNN) qəbul edir. Dillərin təhsil edildikləri kimi dilin linear söz sıralaması deyildir, lakin kompleks strukturların sıralaması, hər adımda təhsil-sıralaması bütün təhsil-tərəfdə təhsil edilməlidir. Problemi çəkmək üçün yeni NMT modeli təbliğ edirik ki, sequence'i məqsəd seçgisinin qurduğu strukturlu tədbir ilə dəyişdirir. Bizim modellərimiz məqsəd-tərəflərinin qurbanlıq tədbirliklərinə dayanan qurbanlıq tədbirliklərini yaradır ki, dəyişiklik sıralıq bağından azad edilsin. Müxtəlif sonuçlarımız modellərimiz sanat metodları ilə qarşılaşdığı kimi daha münafiq olduğunu göstərir, analizi is ə modellərimiz də müxtəlif uzunluğun cümlələrini tercümə etmək üçün qüvvətli olduğunu göstərir və bu da həmçinin dəyişiklik məlumatının məlumatı ilə təkrarlanmasını azaltır.", 'bn': 'নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) নিউরেল মেশিন অনুবাদের (এনএমটি) অনুবাদের একটি বিশাল অংশ (সেক২সেক) মোডেলের বিশাল অংশ নিয়ে পুনরায় নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক (RNN)  ভাষাভাষার গবেষণা প্রমাণ করেছে যে ভাষা লাইনিয়ার শব্দের সেকেন্স নয়, কিন্তু জটিল কাঠামোর সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত ক্ষেত্রে অনুবাদ পু To tackle the problem, we propose a new NMT model that decodes the sequence with the guidance of its structural prediction of the context of the target sequence.  আমাদের মডেল তৈরি করে টার্গেট-পার্শ্ববর্তী পূর্ণ ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিতে অনুবাদ সৃষ্টি করে যাতে অনুবাদের পরবর্ পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল প্রতিযোগিতার চেয়ে বেশী প্রতিযোগিতায়, আর বিশ্লেষণ প্রতিফলিত হচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল বিভিন্ন দীর্ঘদিনের বাক্য অনুবাদের জন্য চুরি করা হয়েছে এবং', 'bs': 'Velika proporcija modela sekvence do sekvence (Seq2Seq) za neurološki prevod mašine (NMT) usvoji ponovnu neurološku mrežu (RNN) kako bi stvorila prevodnu riječ po riječi nakon sekvencijskog reda. Kako su ispitivanja jezika dokazale da jezik nije linearna sekvencija riječi, već sekvencija kompleksne strukture, prevod na svakom koraku treba biti podložen u cijelom kontekstu ciljne strane. Da bi se riješili problem, predlažemo novi NMT model koji dekodira sekvencu sa uputstvom strukturnog predviđanja konteksta ciljne sekvence. Naš model stvara prevod na temelju strukturnog predviđenja konteksta ciljne strane kako bi prevod mogao biti oslobođen iz veze sekvencijskog reda. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da je naš model konkurentniji u usporedbi sa metodama države umjetnosti, a analiza odražava da je naš model također jak da prevodi rečenice različitih dužina i smanjuje i ponavljanje s uputstvom iz konteksta ciljne strane za dekodiranje.', 'cs': 'Velký podíl modelů sekvence na sekvenci (Seq2Seq) pro neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) přijímá recidivní neuronovou síť (RNN) k generování překladu slovo po slovu podle sekvenčního pořadí. Jelikož lingvistické studie prokázaly, že jazyk není lineární slovní posloupnost, ale posloupnost složité struktury, překlad by měl být v každém kroku podmíněn celým cílovým kontextem. Pro řešení problému navrhujeme nový NMT model, který dekóduje sekvenci s vedením její strukturální predikce kontextu cílové sekvence. Náš model generuje překlad na základě strukturální predikce cílového kontextu tak, aby byl překlad osvobozen od vazby sekvenčního řádu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model je konkurenceschopnější ve srovnání s nejmodernějšími metodami a analýza odráží, že náš model je robustní i pro překlad vět různých délek a také snižuje opakování pomocí instrukcí z cílového kontextu pro dekódování.', 'et': 'Suur osa neuromasintõlke mudelitest (Seq2Seq) võtab kasutusele korduva neurovõrgu (RNN), et genereerida tõlge sõna-sõnalt järjestikuse järjekorra järgi. Kuna keeleteaduse uuringud on tõestanud, et keel ei ole lineaarne sõnade jada, vaid keeruka struktuuri jada, tuleks igas etapis tõlkimine sõltuda kogu sihtkülje kontekstist. Probleemi lahendamiseks pakume välja uue NMT mudeli, mis dekodeerib jada struktuurilise prognoosimise suunisega sihtjada konteksti. Meie mudel genereerib tõlke, mis põhineb sihtkülje konteksti struktuuriprognoosil, nii et tõlke saab vabastada järjestikuse järjekorra sidemest. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel on võrreldes kaasaegsete meetoditega konkurentsivõimelisem ning analüüs näitab, et meie mudel on tugev ka erineva pikkusega lausete tõlkimiseks ja vähendab ka dekodeerimise sihtkonteksti juhiste kordamist.', 'fi': 'Suuri osa sekvenssi-sekvenssiin (Seq2Seq) malleista neurokonekäännökseen (NMT) omaksuu toistuvan hermoverkon (RNN) tuottaakseen käännöksen sana sanalta sekvenssijärjestyksessä. Koska kielitieteen tutkimukset ovat osoittaneet, että kieli ei ole lineaarinen sanasarja vaan monimutkaisen rakenteen sekvenssi, kääntämisen tulisi kussakin vaiheessa riippua koko kohdepuolen kontekstista. Ongelman ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme uutta NMT-mallia, joka dekoodaa sekvenssin ohjaamalla sen rakenteellista ennustetta kohdesekvenssin kontekstista. Mallimme tuottaa käännöksen kohdepuolen kontekstin rakenteelliseen ennustukseen perustuen, jotta käännös voidaan vapauttaa sekvenssijärjestyksen sidoksesta. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme on kilpailukykyisempi verrattuna viimeisimpiin menetelmiin, ja analyysi heijastaa, että mallimme on myös vankka kääntämään eripituisia lauseita ja vähentää toistoa kohdepuolen dekoodauksen ohjeissa.', 'ca': "A great proportion of sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) models for Neural Machine Translation (NMT) adopt Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) to generate translation word by word following a sequential order.  Com els estudis de la lingüística han demostrat que el llenguatge no és seqüència linear de paraules sinó seqüència d'estructura complexa, la traducció a cada pas hauria de ser condicionada en tot el context de la banda d'objectiu. Per abordar el problem a, proposem un nou model NMT que decodifica la seqüència amb la orientació de la seva predicció estructural del context de la seqüència d'objectius. El nostre model genera traducció basada en la predicció estructural del context de la banda d'objectiu de manera que la traducció pugui ser lliberta de l'ordre seqüencial. Els resultats experimentals demostren que el nostre model és més competitiu en comparació amb els mètodes més avançats, i l'anàlisi reflecteix que el nostre model també és robust per traduir frases de diferents llargues i també redueix la repetició amb l'instrucció del contexte de l'objectiu per la descodificació.", 'jv': 'Una bebas ratio of seq2Seq modells for Neq2Seq (NMT) Tampilan kanggo langkung banjur-barêng langkung sapa-barêng, kuwi tindang kuwi ora dadi sekondirno langkung sampeyan seneng sampeyan pakan, terjamahan ing sabên langkung sampeyan kawit langkung sampek. Mbok iso nggawe pertualangan kowe ngerasai model NMT sing gawe dadi sekonduran karo nduwih dumadhi structural dipurangan sampek tanggal sekondirno. Name Rejuwisan sing paling nggambar na model sing paling-peringatan karo perusahaan-karo sistem sing gak perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan kuwi model nambah dhéwé kuwi nggawe perusahaan kanggo nguasai kapan langgar samihan lan tambah kuwi nggawe gerakan sak ujaran karo perusahaan sugirne sing bera', 'sk': 'Velik delež modelov zaporedja v zaporedje (Seq2Seq) za nevralni strojni prevod (NMT) sprejme ponavljajočo nevralno mrežo (RNN), da ustvari prevod besede za besedo po zaporednem vrstnem redu. Ker so jezikoslovne študije dokazale, da jezik ni linearno zaporedje besed, temveč zaporedje kompleksne strukture, je treba prevajanje na vsakem koraku pogoditi na celotni ciljni strani konteksta. Za reševanje problema predlagamo nov model NMT, ki dekodira zaporedje s smernicami strukturne napovedi konteksta ciljnega zaporedja. Naš model generira prevod na podlagi strukturne napovedi konteksta ciljne strani, tako da se prevod lahko osvobodi vezi zaporednega reda. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da je naš model bolj konkurenčen v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi metodami, analiza pa kaže, da je naš model robusten tudi za prevajanje stavkov različnih dolžin in zmanjšuje ponavljanje z navodili iz ciljnega konteksta za dekodiranje.', 'ha': "Babu rabon tsakanin shiryoyin masu saka (Seq2Seq) wa shiryoyin ayuka na Tarjima na Kifin Naural Kama da aka jarraba karantannin linguin, za'a ƙayyade harshen ba da sequence na maganar linje kuma amma sequence wa tsarin murakku, za'a ƙayyade fassarar cikin kowandan ƙẽtare da ke cikakken mazaɓa. Yana buɗawa ga masu motsi, za'a buƙata wata shekara na NMT wanda ke ƙarantar sauri da shiryarwa na gabanin matsayin da ke cikin muhallin da aka yi amfani da shi. @ info: tooltip Experimental results demonstrate that our model is more competitive compared with the state-of-the-art methods, and the analysis reflects that our model is also robust to translating sentences of different lengths and it also reduces repetition with the instruction from the target-side context for decoding.", 'bo': 'A great proportion of sequence-to-sequence (Seq2Seq) models for Neural Machine Translation (NMT) adopt Recurrent Neural Network (RNN) to generate translation word by word following a sequential order. Name སྐད་ཡིག To tackle the problem, we propose a new NMT model that decodes the sequence with the guidance of its structural prediction of the context of the target sequence. Our model generates translation based on the structural prediction of the target-side context so that the translation can be freed from the bind of sequential order. Experimental Results demonstrate that our model is more competitive than the state-of-the-art methods, compared with the state-of-art methods, and the analysis reflects that our model is also robust to translating sentences of different lengths and it also reduces the instruction from the target-side context for decoding.', 'he': 'אחוז גדול של דוגמנים רצף-לרצף (Seq2Seq) לתרגום מכונות נוירות (NMT) מאמצים רשת נוירות מתחזרה (RNN) כדי ליצור מילה לתרגום מילה לאחר סדר רצופי. כפי שהמחקרים של שפת הוכיחו ששפה אינה רצף מילים לינרית, אלא רצף של מבנה מורכב, התרגום בכל צעד צריך להתאים על כל הקשר לצד המטרה. כדי להתמודד עם הבעיה, אנו מציעים מודל NMT חדש שמפרסם את הרצף עם ההנחה של חיזוי המבנה שלו של הקשר של הרצף המטרה. המודל שלנו יוצר תרגומה מבוססת על חיזוי המבנה של הקשר לצד המטרה כך שהתרגומה יכולה להיות חופשית מהקשר של סדר רצופי. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהדוגמא שלנו יותר תחרותית בהשוואה לשיטות המיוחדות ביותר, והניתוח משקף שהדוגמא שלנו גם חזקה לתרגם משפטים באורך שונה'}
{'en': 'Pattern-revising Enhanced Simple Question Answering over Knowledge Bases', 'ar': 'مراجعة النمط المحسن والإجابة البسيطة للأسئلة على قواعد المعرفة', 'pt': 'Resposta a perguntas simples aprimoradas de revisão de padrões sobre bases de conhecimento', 'fr': 'Révision des modèles de réponses aux questions simples améliorées par rapport aux bases de connaissances', 'es': 'Revisión de patrones de respuesta simple mejorada a preguntas sobre bases de conocimientos', 'ja': 'ナレッジベースに対する拡張されたシンプルな質問への回答のパターン改訂', 'hi': 'पैटर्न-संशोधित एन्हांस्ड सरल प्रश्न नॉलेज बेस पर उत्तर देना', 'zh': '式修 增强知识库略以对', 'ru': 'Пересмотр шаблона Улучшенный простой вопрос, отвечающий на базы знаний', 'ga': 'Athchóiriú patrún Feabhsaithe Ceist Shimplí ag Freagairt thar Bhunáit Eolais', 'el': 'Βελτιωμένη απλή απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις μέσω βάσεων γνώσης', 'hu': 'Mintafelülvizsgálat Továbbfejlesztett egyszerű kérdések megválaszolása tudásbázisokon keresztül', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'Risposta alle domande semplici migliorata su basi di conoscenza', 'lt': 'Patvirtintas paprastas atsakymas į klausimus dėl žinių bazių', 'kk': 'Білім негізінде қарапайым сұрақ жауап беру үлгіні қайталау', 'mk': 'Повеќе едноставни одговори на прашања во врска со базите на знаење', 'ms': 'Penyesuaian Corak Perjawapan Pertanyaan Sederhana Tertinggi atas Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'ml': 'പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനങ്ങളില്\u200d ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന സാധാരണ ചോദ്യം', 'mt': 'Ir-reviżjoni tal-mudelli tat-tweġiba għal mistoqsijiet sempliċi mtejba dwar il-Bażijiet tal-Għarfien', 'mn': 'Загвар дахин дахин нэмэгдүүлсэн энгийн асуулт мэдлэг суурь дээр хариулт', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Răspunsuri simple la întrebări îmbunătățite în bazele de cunoștințe', 'pl': 'Ulepszone proste odpowiedzi na pytania w bazach wiedzy', 'sr': 'Rezerviranje obrazaca poboljšanog jednostavnog pitanja odgovor na znanstvene baze', 'sv': 'Mönsterrevidering Förbättrat enkelt frågesvar över kunskapsbaser', 'si': 'Name', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalka fudud ee ku saabsan aasaasiga aqoonta", 'ta': 'மாதிரி மாற்றுதல் மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட சுலபமான கேள்வி', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Kiểu sửa đổi lại câu hỏi đơn giản hơn', 'bg': 'Подобрено опростено отговаряне на въпроси в базата на знания', 'nl': 'Verbeterde eenvoudige beantwoording van vragen via kennisbanken', 'hr': 'Rezerviranje obrazaca povećano jednostavno pitanje odgovor na znanja', 'da': 'Forbedret simpelt spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensbaser', 'de': 'Verbesserte einfache Beantwortung von Fragen über Wissensbasen', 'ko': '패턴 수정은 지식 라이브러리의 간단한 문제 대답을 강화시켰다', 'id': 'Penyesuaian pola Perjawaban Pertanyaan Sederhana Diperkembangkan atas Pangkalan Pengetahuan', 'fa': 'پاسخ سوال ساده\u200cای بیشتر از پایه\u200cهای دانش', 'sw': 'Swali rahisi la Kupitia Uzazi', 'sq': 'Përgjigja e thjeshtë e zgjeruar për pyetje mbi bazat e njohurive', 'af': 'Patroon- hersiening Verbeter Eenvoudige Vrag Antwoord oor kennis Basies', 'am': 'patterns-action', 'tr': 'Bilim Baseleri üzerinde nusgala tertiblenen Enişik Sorag Cevap', 'bn': 'প্যাটার- পরিবর্তন করা সাধারণ প্রশ্নের উত্তর জ্ঞানের ভেতরে', 'bs': 'Rezerviranje obrazaca poboljšanog jednostavnog pitanja odgovor na znanstvene baze', 'hy': 'Գիտության հիմքերի վերաբերյալ բարելավված պարզ հարցերի պատասխանը', 'ca': 'Una revisió de patrons millorada de la resposta a preguntes senzilles sobre les bases del coneixement', 'az': 'Bilim 칖st칲nd톛 쿮lav톛 Et톛n Basit sual cavab캼', 'cs': 'Vylepšené jednoduché odpovědi na otázky prostřednictvím znalostních bází', 'et': 'Mustri läbivaatamine Täiustatud lihtne küsimustele vastamine teadmistebaaside kaudu', 'fi': 'Mallien tarkistaminen Parannettu yksinkertainen kyselyvastaus tietokantojen kautta', 'jv': 'Name', 'sk': 'Izboljšano preprosto odgovarjanje na vprašanja prek baz znanja', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'གཟུགས་རིས་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་བྱས་པའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གནས་ཚུལ་གྱིས་མཐོང་ནུས་པ', 'he': 'תשובת שאלות פשוטה משותפת על בסיסי ידע'}
{'en': 'Question Answering over Knowledge Bases (KB-QA), which automatically answer natural language questions based on the facts contained by a knowledge base, is one of the most important natural language processing (NLP) tasks. Simple questions constitute a large part of questions queried on the web, still being a challenge to QA systems. In this work, we propose to conduct pattern extraction and entity linking first, and put forward pattern revising procedure to mitigate the error propagation problem. In order to learn to rank candidate subject-predicate pairs to enable the relevant facts retrieval given a question, we propose to do joint fact selection enhanced by relation detection. Multi-level encodings and multi-dimension information are leveraged to strengthen the whole procedure. The experimental results demonstrate that our approach sets a new record in this task, outperforming the current state-of-the-art by an absolute large margin.', 'es': 'La respuesta a preguntas a través de bases de conocimientos (KB-QA), que responden automáticamente a las preguntas del lenguaje natural en función de los datos contenidos en una base de conocimientos, es una de las tareas más importantes del procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP). Las preguntas simples constituyen una gran parte de las preguntas consultadas en la web, y siguen siendo un desafío para los sistemas de control de calidad. En este trabajo, proponemos llevar a cabo primero la extracción de patrones y el enlace de entidades, y presentar un procedimiento de revisión de patrones para mitigar el problema de propagación de errores. Para aprender a clasificar los pares candidatos sujeto-predicado para permitir la recuperación de hechos relevantes dada una pregunta, proponemos hacer una selección conjunta de hechos mejorada por la detección de relaciones. Las codificaciones multinivel y la información multidimensional se aprovechan para fortalecer todo el procedimiento. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que nuestro enfoque establece un nuevo récord en esta tarea, superando al estado de la técnica actual por un margen absolutamente amplio.', 'pt': 'O Question Answering over Knowledge Bases (KB-QA), que responde automaticamente a perguntas de linguagem natural com base nos fatos contidos em uma base de conhecimento, é uma das tarefas mais importantes de processamento de linguagem natural (NLP). Perguntas simples constituem grande parte das perguntas feitas na web, ainda sendo um desafio para os sistemas de controle de qualidade. Neste trabalho, propomos realizar a extração de padrões e vinculação de entidades primeiro, e apresentar um procedimento de revisão de padrões para mitigar o problema de propagação de erros. A fim de aprender a classificar pares sujeito-predicado candidatos para permitir a recuperação de fatos relevantes dada uma questão, propomos fazer uma seleção conjunta de fatos aprimorada pela detecção de relação. Codificações multinível e informações multidimensionais são aproveitadas para fortalecer todo o procedimento. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que nossa abordagem estabelece um novo recorde nesta tarefa, superando o atual estado da arte por uma margem absolutamente grande.', 'ar': 'تعد الإجابة على الأسئلة حول قواعد المعرفة (KB-QA) ، التي تجيب تلقائيًا على أسئلة اللغة الطبيعية بناءً على الحقائق الواردة في قاعدة المعرفة ، واحدة من أهم مهام معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP). تشكل الأسئلة البسيطة جزءًا كبيرًا من الأسئلة المطروحة على الويب ، ولا تزال تمثل تحديًا لأنظمة ضمان الجودة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح إجراء استخراج النمط وربط الكيان أولاً ، وطرح إجراء مراجعة النمط للتخفيف من مشكلة انتشار الخطأ. من أجل تعلم ترتيب أزواج المسند الموضوعية المرشحة لتمكين استرجاع الحقائق ذات الصلة في ظل سؤال ما ، نقترح القيام باختيار مشترك للحقائق معزّزًا باكتشاف العلاقة. يتم الاستفادة من الترميزات متعددة المستويات والمعلومات متعددة الأبعاد لتقوية الإجراء بأكمله. توضح النتائج التجريبية أن نهجنا يسجل رقمًا قياسيًا جديدًا في هذه المهمة ، متفوقًا على أحدث التقنيات بهامش كبير مطلق.', 'fr': "La réponse aux questions sur les bases de connaissances (KB-QA), qui répond automatiquement aux questions en langage naturel en fonction des faits contenus dans une base de connaissances, est l'une des tâches les plus importantes du traitement du langage naturel (NLP). Les questions simples constituent une grande partie des questions posées sur le Web, ce qui représente toujours un défi pour les systèmes d'assurance qualité. Dans ce travail, nous proposons de procéder d'abord à l'extraction de modèles et à la liaison d'entités, et de proposer une procédure de révision de modèle pour atténuer le problème de propagation des erreurs. Afin d'apprendre à classer les paires sujet-prédicat candidat afin de permettre la récupération des faits pertinents en fonction d'une question, nous proposons de faire une sélection conjointe de faits améliorée par la détection de relation. Les codages multiniveaux et les informations multidimensionnelles sont exploités pour renforcer l'ensemble de la procédure. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que notre approche établit un nouveau record dans cette tâche, surpassant de loin l'état actuel de la technologie.", 'ja': 'ナレッジベースに含まれる事実に基づいて自然言語の質問に自動的に答える質問回答オーバーナレッジベース（ KB - QA ）は、最も重要な自然言語処理（ NLP ）タスクの1つです。質疑応答システムへの課題でありながら、単純な質問がウェブ上で問われる質問の大部分を占めています。本作業では、まずパターン抽出とエンティティリンクを行い、エラー伝播の問題を軽減するためのパターン修正手順を提案します。特定の質問に関連する事実の検索を可能にするために、候補の主語-述語ペアをランク付けすることを学ぶために、関係検出によって強化された合同事実選択を行うことを提案する。マルチレベルエンコーディングとマルチディメンション情報を活用して、手順全体を強化します。実験結果は、当社のアプローチがこのタスクで新記録を樹立し、現在の最先端を絶対的に大きく上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '知识库问者 (KB-QA) 至重自然语言处 (NLP) 之一,以知识库事自对自然语言。 简者, Web 之大者也,犹 QA 之统也。 臣等议首行模取实链接,并条式改程序以纾谬传。 以学对选体-谓词名,以关给定事实检索,请因检度以强联合事实择。 用多编码、多维息以强之。 实验结果表明,吾道造新录于此,过于先进远矣。', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस (KB-QA) पर प्रश्न का उत्तर देना, जो स्वचालित रूप से ज्ञान के आधार पर निहित तथ्यों के आधार पर प्राकृतिक भाषा के प्रश्नों का उत्तर देता है, सबसे महत्वपूर्ण प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) कार्यों में से एक है। सरल प्रश्न वेब पर पूछे गए प्रश्नों का एक बड़ा हिस्सा हैं, जो अभी भी क्यूए सिस्टम के लिए एक चुनौती है। इस काम में, हम पैटर्न निष्कर्षण और इकाई को पहले जोड़ने का संचालन करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और त्रुटि प्रसार समस्या को कम करने के लिए पैटर्न संशोधन प्रक्रिया को आगे बढ़ाते हैं। एक प्रश्न दिए गए प्रासंगिक तथ्यों को सक्षम करने के लिए उम्मीदवार विषय-विधेय जोड़े को रैंक करना सीखने के लिए, हम संबंध का पता लगाने द्वारा बढ़ाया गया संयुक्त तथ्य चयन करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। पूरी प्रक्रिया को मजबूत करने के लिए बहु-स्तरीय एन्कोडिंग और बहु-आयाम जानकारी का लाभ उठाया जाता है। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण इस कार्य में एक नया रिकॉर्ड सेट करता है, जो वर्तमान राज्य-कला को एक पूर्ण बड़े मार्जिन से आगे बढ़ाता है।', 'ru': 'Ответы на вопросы по базам знаний (KB-QA), которые автоматически отвечают на вопросы естественного языка на основе фактов, содержащихся в базе знаний, являются одной из важнейших задач обработки естественного языка (NLP). Простые вопросы составляют значительную часть вопросов, поставленных в Интернете, по-прежнему являясь вызовом для систем обеспечения качества. В этой работе мы предлагаем сначала провести извлечение шаблона и связывание сущностей, а также выдвинуть процедуру пересмотра шаблона, чтобы смягчить проблему распространения ошибок. Для того, чтобы научиться ранжировать пары субъект-предикат кандидата, чтобы обеспечить возможность извлечения соответствующих фактов по заданному вопросу, мы предлагаем сделать совместный отбор фактов, улучшенный за счет обнаружения отношений. Многоуровневые кодировки и многомерная информация используются для укрепления всей процедуры. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наш подход устанавливает новый рекорд в этой задаче, опережая по абсолютному большому запасу современное состояние.', 'ga': "Tá Freagra Ceist thar Bhoinn Eolais (KB-QA), a fhreagraíonn go huathoibríoch ceisteanna teanga nádúrtha bunaithe ar na fíricí atá i mbunachar eolais, ar cheann de na tascanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha (NLP) is tábhachtaí. Is cuid mhór de na ceisteanna a cuireadh ar an ngréasán iad ceisteanna simplí, agus is dúshlán iad fós do chórais QA. San obair seo, tá sé beartaithe againn eastóscadh patrún agus nascadh eintiteas a dhéanamh ar dtús, agus nós imeachta athbhreithnithe patrún a chur chun cinn chun fadhb iomadaithe earráide a mhaolú. D'fhonn foghlaim conas péirí ábhar-réamh-mheastacháin iarrthóra a rangú le gur féidir na fíorais ábhartha a thugtar i gceist a aisghabháil, tá sé beartaithe againn comhroghnú fíricí a dhéanamh feabhsaithe trí bhrath caidrimh. Déantar ionchóduithe illeibhéil agus faisnéis iltoiseacha a ghiaráil chun an nós imeachta iomlán a neartú. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go leagann ár gcur chuige taifead nua amach sa tasc seo, ag déanamh níos fearr ná an staid reatha le corrlach mór.", 'ka': 'Name პირადი კითხვები იყოს დიდი კითხვების ნაწილი, რომლებიც ინტერფექტში დაკითხვა, რომლებიც QA სისტემისთვის იყო გამოცდილობა. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ მინდომებით გამოყენება სტრუქტურის და ინტერტიკის პირველი დაკავშირება, და შეცდომის პრობლემაციის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომის შეცდომი რომ გავისწავლოთ კანდიდენტის საქმენო საქმენო საქმენო საქმენო საქმენო საქმენო საქმენო, რომ შესაძლებელი ფაქტები გაიღება კითხვა, ჩვენ გვეძლება გავაკეთოთ ერთადერთი მრავალი დონე კოდირებები და მრავალე განზომილებების ინფორმაცია უფრო პროცესტის სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოჩვენებენ, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა ახალი წარმოდგენა ამ რაოდენობაში, რომელიც მიმდინარე წარმოდგენის სიტყვა აბსოლუტური დიდი', 'hu': 'A tudásbázis tényei alapján automatikusan megválaszoló természetes nyelvi kérdésekre adott válasz (KB-QA) az egyik legfontosabb természetes nyelvi feldolgozási (NLP) feladat. Az egyszerű kérdések az interneten feltett kérdések nagy részét képezik, még mindig kihívást jelentenek a minőségbiztosítási rendszerek számára. Ebben a munkában azt javasoljuk, hogy először minta extrakciót és entitás összekapcsolást végezzünk, és javasoljuk a minta felülvizsgálati eljárást a hiba terjedési problémájának enyhítése érdekében. Annak érdekében, hogy megtanuljuk rangsorolni a jelölt alany-predikatív párokat, hogy lehetővé tegyük a releváns tények lekérdezését egy adott kérdésben, javasoljuk, hogy közös tények kiválasztását kapcsolatfelderítéssel javítsuk. Többszintű kódolásokat és többdimenziós információkat használnak fel az egész eljárás megerősítése érdekében. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy megközelítésünk új rekordot állít fel ebben a feladatban, abszolút nagy mértékben felülmúlva a jelenlegi korszerűséget.', 'el': 'Η απάντηση σε ερωτήσεις μέσω βάσεων γνώσεων (ΚΒ-QA), οι οποίες απαντούν αυτόματα σε ερωτήσεις φυσικής γλώσσας με βάση τα γεγονότα που περιέχονται σε μια βάση γνώσεων, είναι μια από τις σημαντικότερες εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Οι απλές ερωτήσεις αποτελούν ένα μεγάλο μέρος των ερωτήσεων στο διαδίκτυο, εξακολουθούν να αποτελούν πρόκληση για τα συστήματα QS. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε να διεξαχθεί η εξαγωγή προτύπων και η σύνδεση οντοτήτων πρώτα, και να προταθεί η διαδικασία αναθεώρησης προτύπων για να μετριάσει το πρόβλημα διάδοσης σφαλμάτων. Προκειμένου να μάθουμε να κατατάσσουμε υποψήφια ζεύγη υποκειμένου-προδιάθεσης ώστε να καταστεί δυνατή η ανάκτηση σχετικών γεγονότων δεδομένης μιας ερώτησης, προτείνουμε να κάνουμε κοινή επιλογή γεγονότων ενισχυμένη με ανίχνευση σχέσεων. Οι κωδικοποιήσεις πολλαπλών επιπέδων και οι πληροφορίες πολλαπλών διαστάσεων χρησιμοποιούνται για την ενίσχυση ολόκληρης της διαδικασίας. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα αποδεικνύουν ότι η προσέγγισή μας θέτει ένα νέο ρεκόρ σε αυτό το έργο, ξεπερνώντας την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας με απόλυτο μεγάλο περιθώριο.', 'it': "La risposta alle domande sulle Knowledge Base (KB-QA), che rispondono automaticamente alle domande del linguaggio naturale sulla base dei fatti contenuti da una Knowledge Base, è uno dei compiti più importanti di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (PNL). Le domande semplici costituiscono una gran parte delle domande poste sul web, essendo ancora una sfida per i sistemi di QA. In questo lavoro, proponiamo di condurre prima l'estrazione del modello e il collegamento dell'entità, e proporre la procedura di revisione del modello per mitigare il problema di propagazione degli errori. Al fine di imparare a classificare coppie soggetto-predicato candidato per consentire il recupero dei fatti rilevanti dato una domanda, proponiamo di fare la selezione congiunta dei fatti migliorata dalla rilevazione delle relazioni. Codificazioni multilivello e informazioni multidimensionali vengono sfruttate per rafforzare l'intera procedura. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro approccio stabilisce un nuovo record in questo compito, superando con un margine assoluto lo stato dell'arte attuale.", 'kk': 'Білім негізінде (KB-QA) жауап беру сұрақтары, білім негізінде тәуелді тілдер сұрақтарына автоматты түрде жауап береді, бұл ең маңызды тәуелді тіл процессерінің (NLP) тапсырмаларының бірі. Қарапайым сұрақтар интернетте сұрақталған сұрақтардың көп бөлігі болады, әлі QA жүйелеріне бұл көмек болады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде үлгі тарқату және біріншіден сілтейтін нысандарды жұмыс істеп, қате пропагациясының мәселесін азайту үшін үлгі редакциялау процедурын жібереміз. Кандидаттарды тақырыпты қарау үшін қолданыстағы сұрақ қабылдау үшін қолданыстағы факттарды таңдау үшін біз қатынау арқылы жалпы факттарды таңдауға мүмкіндік береміз. Көп деңгейлі кодтамасы және көп өлшемді мәлімет толық процедурын құрастыру үшін көптеген. Тәжірибелі нәтижелер біздің тәжірибеміз осы тапсырманың жаңа жазуын таңдайды. Қолданыстағы орындау күйін абсолюттік үлкен шегімен шектеп тұрады.', 'ms': 'Question Answering over Knowledge Bases (KB-QA), which automatically answer natural language questions based on the facts contained by a knowledge base, is one of the most important natural language processing (NLP) tasks.  Soalan sederhana merupakan sebahagian besar soalan yang ditanyai di web, masih menjadi cabaran bagi sistem QA. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan untuk menjalankan ekstraksi corak dan entiti yang menghubungkan terlebih dahulu, dan melanjutkan prosedur penyesuaian corak untuk mengurangkan masalah penyebaran ralat. Untuk belajar menandakan pasangan subjek-predikasi calon untuk memungkinkan pemulihan fakta berkaitan diberikan soalan, kami cadangkan untuk melakukan pemilihan fakta kongsi meningkat dengan pengesan hubungan. Pengekodan-aras berbilang dan maklumat-dimensi berbilang digunakan untuk menguatkan keseluruhan prosedur. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita menetapkan rekod baru dalam tugas ini, melampaui keadaan-state-of-the-art semasa dengan margin yang sangat besar.', 'mk': 'Одговорите на прашањата во врска со базите на знаење (КБ-КА), кои автоматски одговараат на прашањата на природниот јазик врз основа на фактите што ги содржи базата на знаење, се една од најважните задачи за процес на природниот јазик (НЛП). Едноставните прашања претставуваат голем дел од прашањата кои се испрашуваат на интернет, сé уште претставуваат предизвик за системите на QA. Во оваа работа, предложуваме да се спроведе извлекување на шеми и ентитетот кој прво се поврзува, и да се предложи процедура на ревизија на шеми за олеснување на проблемот со пропагацијата на грешките. In order to learn to rank candidate subject-predicate pairs to enable the relevant facts retrieval given a question, we propose to do joint fact selection enhanced by relation detection.  Мулти-нивните кодирања и мулти-димензионални информации се искористени за зајакнување на целата процедура. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот пристап поставува нов рекорд во оваа задача, надминувајќи ја сегашната техничка состојба со апсолутно голема маргина.', 'lt': 'Question Answering over Knowledge Bases (KB-QA), which automatically answer natural language questions based on the facts contained by a knowledge base, is one of the most important natural language processing (NLP) tasks.  Paprasti klausimai sudaro didelę dalį internete užduodamų klausimų, kurie vis dar kelia iššūkį QA sistemoms. Šiame darbe siūlome atlikti modelių išgavimą ir pirmą kartą sujungti subjektą ir pateikti modelių peržiūros procedūrą klaidų plitimo problemai sušvelninti. Siekiant išmokti klasifikuoti kandidatus, turinčius objektus, kad būtų galima rasti atitinkamus faktus atsižvelgiant į klausimą, siūlome atlikti bendrą faktų atranką, sustiprintą santykių nustatymu. Siekiant sustiprinti visą procedūrą, naudojami daugiapakopiai kodai ir daugiapakopė informacija. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų požiūris sukuria naują įrašą šioje užduotyje, o dabartinė pažanga viršija absoliučiai didelę maržą.', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്ന ചോദ്യം (കെബി- ക്യൂഎ), അത് സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് സ്വാഭാവികമായി ഉത്തരം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. അറിവുള്ള ബ Simple questions constitute a large part of questions queried on the web, still being a challenge to QA systems.  ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d മാതൃകയുടെ പ്രോഗ്രേഷന്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രയോഗത്തിന് മുന്\u200dകൂട്ടുവാന്\u200d പ്രോഗ്ര പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്ന വിഷയത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോട്ടികളെ നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കാന്\u200d പഠിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി... ...ഒരു ചോദ്യം കൊടുത്ത സത്യത്തി മുഴുവന്\u200d പ്രക്രിയയും ഉറപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d പല-നില കോഡിങ്ങുകളും പല-ഡിമെന്\u200dഷന്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളും അയച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പരീക്ഷണത്തിന്റെ ഫലം കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ നടപടി ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d ഒരു പുതിയ റെക്കോര്\u200dഡ് സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നത്, നിലവിലുള്ള സ്ഥിത', 'no': 'Spørsmål Svar over kjenskapsbaser (KB-QA), som automatisk svarar på naturspråksspørsmål basert på fakta som inneheld av kjenskapsbasen, er ein av dei viktigste naturspråkshandsamane (NLP) oppgåva. Ein enkel spørsmål er ein stor del av spørsmål som er spørsmåla på nettet, og er fortsatt eit utfordring til QA-systemet. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi å utpakka mønsteret og eininga som lenkjer først, og leggja fram mønsteret for å gjere gjennomsikt av prosedyren for å gjere feilpropagasjonsproblem. For å lære å rankera kandidat-subjekt-predikarte par for å slå på tilgjengelege fakta for å henta eit spørsmål, fører vi å gjera kopla faktiskutval forbetra ved oppdaging av relasjonar. Fleirnivåkoding og fleirdimensjonsinformasjon blir levert til å styrke heile prosedyren. Eksperimentale resultatet viser at tilnærminga vårt setter eit nytt rekord i denne oppgåva, som utfører den gjeldande tilstanden av kunsten med ein absolutt stor margin.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь (KB-QA) дээр хариулах асуулт нь мэдлэгийн суурь дээр автоматаар байгалийн хэл асуултыг хариулах нь хамгийн чухал байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн нэг юм. Энгийн асуултууд вэб дээр асуултын ихэнх хэсэг байдаг. QA системийн сорилт байдаг. Энэ ажил дээр бид загварыг хадгалах болон нэгж эхлээд холбогдох болон алдаа тархалтын асуудлыг багасгах боломжтой арга загварыг явуулж байна. Харин нэг асуулт өгөгдсөн үнэндээ олох боломжтой болгохын тулд бид холбоотой үнэндээ холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой холбоотой сонголтыг сура Ихэнх түвшинд кодлох болон олон хэмжээст мэдээллийг бүх процедурыг баталж чаддаг. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд бидний арга хэмжээнд шинэ бичлэг бий болгодог гэдгийг харуулж байна. Одоо байгаа урлагийн байр суурь нь маш том хэмжээгээр үр дүнтэй.', 'ro': 'Răspunsul la întrebări în bazele de cunoștințe (KB-QA), care răspunde automat la întrebările de limbaj natural bazate pe faptele conținute de o bază de cunoștințe, este una dintre cele mai importante sarcini de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL). Întrebările simple constituie o mare parte a întrebărilor interogate pe web, fiind încă o provocare pentru sistemele de calitate. În această lucrare, propunem să efectuăm mai întâi extragerea modelului și legătura entității și să propunem procedura de revizuire a modelului pentru a atenua problema propagarii erorilor. Pentru a învăța să clasificăm perechile candidate subiect-predicate pentru a permite recuperarea faptelor relevante dată unei întrebări, propunem să facem selecția comună a faptelor îmbunătățită prin detectarea relațiilor. Codările pe mai multe niveluri și informațiile pe mai multe dimensiuni sunt utilizate pentru a consolida întreaga procedură. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că abordarea noastră stabilește un nou record în această sarcină, depășind cu o marjă absolut mare stadiul actual al tehnologiei.', 'mt': 'Question Answering over Knowledge Bases (KB-QA), which automatically answer natural language questions based on the facts contained by a knowledge base, is one of the most important natural language processing (NLP) tasks.  Mistoqsijiet sempliċi jikkostitwixxu parti kbira mill-mistoqsijiet mistoqsija fuq l-internet, li għadhom sfida għas-sistemi QA. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu li jsir estrazzjoni ta’ mudelli u entità li l-ewwel tgħaqqad, u nippreżentaw proċedura ta’ reviżjoni ta’ mudelli biex titnaqqas il-problema tal-propagazzjoni tal-iżbalji. Sabiex nitgħallmu jikklassifikaw pari kandidati suġġetti-predikati biex jippermettu l-ġbir mill-ġdid tal-fatti rilevanti minħabba mistoqsija, nipproponu li jsir għa żla konġunta ta’ fatti msaħħa permezz ta’ detezzjoni ta’ relazzjonijiet. Il-kodifikazzjonijiet f’diversi livelli u l-informazzjoni f’diversi dimensjonijiet huma mħeġġa biex tissaħħaħ il-proċedura kollha. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-approċċ tagħna jistabbilixxi rekord ġdid f’dan il-kompitu, li jeċċedi l-istat attwali tal-a ħħar b’marġni assolut kbir.', 'pl': 'Odpowiadanie na pytania przez bazy wiedzy (KB-QA), które automatycznie odpowiadają na pytania języka naturalnego w oparciu o fakty zawarte w bazie wiedzy, jest jednym z najważniejszych zadań przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP). Proste pytania stanowią dużą część pytań zadawanych w sieci, nadal stanowiąc wyzwanie dla systemów QA. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy najpierw przeprowadzenie ekstrakcji wzorców i łączenia jednostek oraz przedstawienie procedury rewizji wzorców w celu złagodzenia problemu propagacji błędów. Aby nauczyć się rankingować pary kandydatów podmiot-predykatów, aby umożliwić odzyskanie istotnych faktów danego pytania, proponujemy wykonanie wspólnej selekcji faktów wzmocnionej o wykrywanie relacji. Wielopoziomowe kodowanie i wielopoziomowe informacje są wykorzystywane do wzmocnienia całej procedury. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasze podejście stawia nowy rekord w tym zadaniu, przewyższając obecny state-of-the-art o absolutnie duży margines.', 'sr': 'Odgovor na pitanje o bazama znanja (KB-QA), koja automatski odgovara na pitanja prirodnog jezika na temelju činjenica koje sadrži baza znanja, je jedan od najvažnijih zadataka prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP). Jednostavna pitanja predstavljaju veliki deo pitanja koje su postavljene na internetu, i dalje su izazov za QA sisteme. U ovom poslu predlažemo da prvo izvučemo uzorke i entitet koji povezuje obrazac, i da predložimo reviziranje procedure kako bi smanjili problem propagacije grešaka. Da bismo naučili da postavljaju kandidatske predikatne parove kako bi omogućili odgovarajuće činjenice po pitanju, predlažemo da napravimo zajednički izbor činjenica povećan otkrivanjem odnosa. Višeniverski kodiranje i višedimenzionalne informacije su uticale na jačanje cijele procedure. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postavlja novi rekord u ovom zadatku, iznosi trenutno stanje umjetnosti apsolutno velikom marginom.', 'si': 'Name සරල ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙබ් එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, තාමත් QA පද්ධතියට අභ්\u200dයානයක් වෙනවා. මේ වැඩේ අපි පළමුවෙන් සම්බන්ධ කරපු ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නැති කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබීමට සම්බන්ධ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබීමට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබීමට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ල ගොඩක් ස්තූතිය සංකේතනය සහ ගොඩක් විශාල තොරතුරු සම්පූර්ණ පද්ධතිය සම්පූර්ණ කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය මේ වැඩේ අලුත් රිකෝඩ් එකක් තියෙනවා කියලා, ප්\u200dරතිච', 'sv': 'Frågesvar över kunskapsbaser (KB-QA), som automatiskt besvarar frågor på naturligt språk baserat på fakta som finns i en kunskapsbas, är en av de viktigaste uppgifterna för behandling av naturligt språk (NLP). Enkla frågor utgör en stor del av frågorna som ställs på webben, men är fortfarande en utmaning för kvalitetssäkringssystem. I detta arbete föreslår vi att utföra mönsterutvinning och entitetslänkning först, och lägga fram mönsterrevidering förfarande för att mildra problemet med felspridning. För att lära oss att rangordna kandidater subjekt-predikatpar för att möjliggöra relevant faktaundersökning i en fråga föreslår vi att göra gemensamt faktaunderval förstärkt av relationsdetektion. Multinivåkodningar och flerdimensionell information utnyttjas för att stärka hela proceduren. De experimentella resultaten visar att vårt tillvägagångssätt sätter ett nytt rekord i denna uppgift och överträffar nuvarande state-of-the-art med absolut stor marginal.', 'so': "Jawaabta aqoonta (KB-QA), kaas oo si automatic ah ugu jawaabaya su'aalaha luuqada asalka ah oo ku saleysan waxyaabaha ku qoran asalka aqoonta, waa mid ka mid ah shaqooyinka ugu muhiimsan baaraandegista luqada dabiicadda (NLP). Suaalooyin fudud waxay ka mid yihiin su'aalo badan oo laga warsanayo bogga internetka, weli waxay ku jirtaa dhibaato ay ka timaadaan nidaamka QA. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan sameyno qalabka ka soo baxista iyo dhaqaalaha ku xidhan marka hore, waxaana horumarinaynaa qalabka beddelista si aan u go’aanno dhibaatada ogeysiinta qalabka. Si aad u barto in aad u sarrayso labo labo ah oo la doortay arimaha la xiriira, si aan u awoodno in laga soo celiyo waxyaabaha la xiriiray ay wax weydiin jireen, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in la sameeyo doorashooyinka wadajirka ah oo lagu kordhiyey aqoonsiga xiriirka. Qoidaha heerka kala duduwan iyo macluumaadka kala duduwan waxaa loo soo dhiibaa si ay u xoogeeyaan dhamaan tartanka. Imtixaanka waxaa muujiyaya in dhaqdhaqaalahayagu uu sameeyo warqaddan cusub, oo uu soo bandhigayo xaaladda hore ee farshaxanka oo dhan.", 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படைகளின் மீது கேள்வி பதில் (KB- QA), அது தானாகவே இயல்பான மொழி கேள்விகளுக்கு பதில் அளிக்கும் அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள உண்மை Name இந்த வேலையில், நாம் மாதிரி பிரித்தல் மற்றும் பொருள் இணைப்பதை செயல்படுத்த பரிந்துரைக்க வேண்டும், பிழை பிரச்சாரத்தை சுரு தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட கேள்வியை மீட்டெடுக்க செயல்படுத்துவதற்கு தேர்ந்தெடுக்க வேண்டிய பொருள் குறிப்பிட்ட ஜோடியை வரிசைப்படுத Multi-level encodings and multi-dimension information are leveraged to strengthen the whole procedure.  சோதனை முடிவு', 'ur': 'علم Bases (KB-QA) کے بارے میں جواب دینے والی سؤال جو اپنے ساتھ طبیعی زبان سوالوں کی جواب دیتی ہے جو علم base کے ذریعے لکھی ہوئی حقیقت پر بنیاد رکھتے ہیں، یہ سب اہم طبیعی زبان پردازی (NLP) کاموں میں سے ہے. ساده سوال ویب میں سوال کی بہت بڑی حصہ ہے، اب بھی QA سیستم کے لئے چال ہے. ہم اس کام میں پٹرنے کے اخراج اور انٹیٹی کو پہلی مرتبہ کرنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں، اور پٹرنے کے پٹرنے کی پردازش کو پیش کریں کہ خطا پھیلانے کے مسئلہ کو کمزور کریں۔ اس لئے کہ کاندینڈیٹ کے معاملہ میں ایک سوال کے ذریعہ موجود حقیقتوں کو قادر کرنے کے لئے صحیح صحیح جمع کرنے کی تعلیم کریں، ہم نے مشترک حقیقت کا انتخاب کرنے کی پیشنهاد کرتا ہے جو ارتباط شناسی کے ذریعہ مزید ہے. Multi-level encodings and multi-dimension information are leveraged to strengthen the whole procedure. آزمائش کا نتیجہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ اس کام میں ایک نئی ریکورد مقرر کرتی ہے، جو موجود state-of-the-art کو ایک بڑی حد سے زیادہ اضافہ کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Maʼlumot bazasi asosida (KB- QA) savol javob beradi. Avto-aniqlik asosida maʼlumot bazasi yaratilgan maslahatlarni asosida javob beradi. Name Bu vazifani biz birinchi marta bogʻ'liqchi shaklni bajarishni istaysizmi, va xato propaganda harakat qilish uchun muvaffaqiyatlarni koʻchirish imkoniyatini qoʻllamiz. Boshqa narsalarni qayta olish uchun, biz murojaat aniqlash orqali birlashtirilgan tashkilotni o'rganamiz. Name Tekshirish natijalari shu vazifani yangi raqamli yozib qo'yishni ko'rsatadi. Joriy kunlarning holatini butunlay katta harfga bajarish.", 'vi': 'Câu hỏi đáp ứng kênh tri thức (KB-QA), mà tự động trả lời các câu hỏi ngôn ngữ tự động dựa trên sự thật trong một căn cứ kiến thức, là một trong những công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên quan trọng nhất (NLP). Những câu hỏi đơn giản là một phần lớn các câu hỏi được đặt ra trên mạng, vẫn là thách thức với hệ thống QA. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị tiến hành khai thác mẫu và thực thể kết nối trước, và đưa ra quy trình sửa đổi mẫu để giảm thiểu vấn đề lây lan lỗi. Để học được cách xếp hạng các cặp nhắm chủ đề để có thể lấy dữ liệu liên quan khi có câu hỏi, chúng tôi đề nghị tiến hành việc chọn các thực tế chung, nâng cao khả năng nhận diện quan hệ. Các mã số đa cấp và thông tin đa chiều được hỗ trợ để củng cố to àn bộ quy trình. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy phương pháp của chúng ta đặt kỷ lục mới trong nhiệm vụ này, vượt trội trạng thái hiện nay bằng một mức độ lớn tuyệt đối.', 'da': 'Spørgsmål besvarelse over vidensbaser (KB-QA), som automatisk besvarer spørgsmål om naturligt sprog baseret på fakta indeholdt i en vidensbase, er en af de vigtigste opgaver for naturlig sprogbehandling (NLP). Enkle spørgsmål udgør en stor del af spørgsmål, der stilles på nettet, og er stadig en udfordring for QA-systemer. I dette arbejde foreslår vi først at udføre mønsterekstraktion og entitet linking, og foreslå mønsterrevision procedure for at afbøde fejlspredningsproblemet. For at lære at rangere kandidat emne-prædikater par for at muliggøre den relevante facts hentning givet et spørgsmål, foreslår vi at gøre fælles fact selection forbedret af relation detektion. Kodninger på flere niveauer og oplysninger om flere dimensioner udnyttes til at styrke hele proceduren. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores tilgang sætter en ny rekord i denne opgave og overgår den nuværende state-of-the-art med en absolut stor margin.', 'bg': 'Отговарянето на въпроси чрез бази от знания (КБ-КВ), които автоматично отговарят на въпросите на естествения език въз основа на фактите, съдържащи се в базата от знания, е една от най-важните задачи за обработка на естествения език (НЛП). Простите въпроси представляват голяма част от въпросите, задавани в интернет, като все още представляват предизвикателство за системите за контрол на качеството. В тази работа предлагаме първо да се извърши извличане на модели и свързване на entiтети и да се предложи процедура за преразглеждане на модели за смекчаване на проблема с разпространението на грешки. За да се научим да класираме двойки субект-предикат кандидат, за да позволим възстановяването на съответните факти при даден въпрос, предлагаме да направим съвместен избор на факти, подобрен чрез откриване на релации. Многостепенните кодировки и многоизмерната информация се използват за укрепване на цялата процедура. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият подход поставя нов рекорд в тази задача, надминавайки сегашното състояние на изкуството с абсолютно голям марж.', 'nl': 'Vragen beantwoorden via Knowledge Bases (KB-QA), die automatisch natuurlijke taalvragen beantwoorden op basis van de feiten in een kennisbank, is een van de belangrijkste taken voor de verwerking van natuurlijke talen (NLP). Eenvoudige vragen vormen een groot deel van de vragen die op het web worden beantwoord, en vormen nog steeds een uitdaging voor QA-systemen. In dit werk stellen we voor om eerst patroonextractie en entiteitskoppeling uit te voeren, en een patroonherzieningsprocedure voor te stellen om het probleem van foutpropagatie te beperken. Om te leren kandidaten subject-predicaat paren te rangschikken om relevante feiten terug te vinden bij een vraag, stellen we voor om gezamenlijke feitenselectie te doen versterkt door relatiedetectie. Multi-level coderingen en multi-dimensie informatie worden gebruikt om de hele procedure te versterken. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze aanpak een nieuw record in deze taak zet en de huidige state-of-the-art absoluut overtreft.', 'hr': 'Odgovor na temelju znanja (KB-QA), koji automatski odgovara na pitanja prirodnog jezika na temelju činjenica koje sadrži baza znanja, jedan je od najvažnijih zadataka prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP). Jednostavna pitanja predstavljaju veliki dio pitanja koje su postavljene na internetu, i dalje su izazov za QA sustave. U ovom poslu predlažemo prvo izvlačiti uzorke i entitet koji se povezuje i predložiti postupak reviziranja uzorka kako bi smanjili problem propagacije grešaka. Da bismo naučili postaviti kandidatske predikatne parove kako bi omogućili odgovarajuće činjenice po pitanju, predlažemo da napravimo zajednički izbor činjenica poboljšan otkrivanjem odnosa. Većina razina kodiranja i višedimenzionalne informacije su primjenjene za jačanje cijelog postupaka. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postavlja novi zapis u ovom zadatku, koji je nadmažen trenutnom stanju umjetnosti apsolutno velikom marginom.', 'de': 'Die Beantwortung von Fragen über Wissensbasen (KB-QA), die automatisch natursprachliche Fragen beantworten, basierend auf den in einer Wissensdatenbank enthaltenen Fakten, ist eine der wichtigsten Aufgaben der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache (NLP). Einfache Fragen stellen einen großen Teil der Fragen dar, die im Web abgefragt werden und stellen immer noch eine Herausforderung für Qualitätssicherungssysteme dar. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir vor, Muster-Extraktion und Entity-Verknüpfung zuerst durchzuführen und Muster-Revisionsverfahren vorzuschlagen, um das Problem der Fehlerausbreitung zu verringern. Um zu lernen, Kandidaten Subjekt-Prädikat-Paare zu rangieren, um den relevanten Facts Retrieval einer Frage zu ermöglichen, schlagen wir eine gemeinsame Faktenauswahl vor, die durch Beziehungserkennung verbessert wird. Mehrstufige Codierungen und mehrdimensionale Informationen werden genutzt, um das gesamte Verfahren zu stärken. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Ansatz in dieser Aufgabe einen neuen Rekord setzt und den aktuellen Stand der Technik mit absolutem Abstand übertrifft.', 'id': 'Jawaban Pertanyaan Atas Pangkalan Pengetahuan (KB-QA), yang secara otomatis menjawab pertanyaan bahasa alami berdasarkan fakta yang terkandung oleh pangkalan pengetahuan, adalah salah satu tugas yang paling penting proses bahasa alami (NLP). Pertanyaan sederhana merupakan bagian besar dari pertanyaan yang ditanyai di web, masih menjadi tantangan bagi sistem QA. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan untuk melakukan ekstraksi pola dan entitas menghubungkan pertama, dan melanjutkan prosedur revisi pola untuk mengurangi masalah propagasi kesalahan. Untuk belajar mengatur pasangan kandidat-subjek-predikasi untuk memungkinkan penemuan fakta relevan diberikan pertanyaan, kami mengusulkan untuk melakukan seleksi fakta bersama yang meningkat oleh deteksi hubungan. Multi-level encodings and multi-dimension information are leveraged to strengthen the whole procedure.  Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pendekatan kita menetapkan catatan baru dalam tugas ini, melampaui keadaan-state-of-the-art saat ini dengan margin yang sangat besar.', 'ko': '지식 라이브러리 퀴즈(KB-QA)는 자연 언어 처리(NLP)에서 가장 중요한 임무 중 하나로 지식 라이브러리에 포함된 사실에 따라 자연 언어 문제에 자동으로 대답한다.간단한 문제는 인터넷 조회 문제에서 큰 부분을 차지하기 때문에 QA시스템에 있어 여전히 도전이다.이 작업에서 우리는 먼저 모델 추출과 실체 링크를 하고 모델 수정 프로그램을 제시하여 오류 전파 문제를 완화할 것을 건의합니다.주어진 문제에 대한 관련 사실을 검색할 수 있도록 후보 주술어에 대한 정렬을 배우기 위해 관계 검측을 통해 강화된 연합사실 선택을 제시했다.다중 인코딩과 다중 정보를 이용하여 전체 과정을 강화하다.실험 결과에 의하면 우리의 방법은 이 임무에서 새로운 기록을 창조했고 현재의 기술 수준을 크게 초과했다.', 'fa': 'سوال جواب دادن بر اساس علم (KB-QA) که به طور خودکار سوال زبان طبیعی را بر اساس حقیقت\u200cهایی که توسط پایگاه علم وجود دارد، یکی از مهمترین کارهای پردازش زبان طبیعی (NLP) است. سوال ساده\u200cها بخشی از سوال\u200cهای بزرگی که در وب پرسیده می\u200cشوند، هنوز یک چالش برای سیستم\u200cهای QA است. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که نخستین برداشتن الگو و شرکت\u200cهای ارتباط به ارتباط برقرار کنیم، و الگوی تغییر دادن روش را پیش فرستادیم تا مشکل گسترش خطا را کاهش دهیم. تا یاد بگیریم که جفت\u200cهای موضوع مختلف کاندیداتی را به عنوان بازیابی حقیقت\u200cهای مربوط به یک سوال اجازه دهیم، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cدهیم که انتخاب حقیقت مشترک را با کشف ارتباطی بیشتر کنیم. رمزبندی\u200cهای متعدد سطح و اطلاعات متعدد برای تأثیر تمام روش استفاده می\u200cشود. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می\u200cدهد که دستور ما یک ثبت جدید در این کار را تنظیم می\u200cکند، که در حالت فعلی هنر با یک مرز بزرگ کامل انجام می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Bilim Basitleri (KB-QA) barada soragy jogap bermek, bilim bazy tarapyndan daşary edilen zatlaryň (NLP) işleriniň iň möhüm täbiýet işlemeginiň biridir. Basit soraglar web-de soraglaryň köp bölegi däldir, hala QA sistemlerine kynçylyk bar. Bu işde, biz örnekleri çıkarmak we bir zat ilkinji bilen baglaşmak üçin örnekleri taýýarlamak teklif edip, hata döwürme meselesini azaltmak üçin örnekleri önüne getirip barýarys. Mazmunlar üçin kandidatyň ön bellenen çiftleri takyklamak üçin wajyp bir sorag berilýän faktlary gaýd etmek üçin, suýunlar tarapyndan gelişmiş bir faýly saýlamak üçin teklip edýäris. Birnäçe dereje ködleme we köp-ölçü maglumaty bütin prosedürüni güçlendirmek üçin ullanýar. Deneysel netijeler biziň ýaryşymyzyň şu işiň içinde täze bir kayda gurlaýandygyny görkezýär, häzirki möhüm taýýarlaryň üstüne gaty uly gabdalyk bilen.', 'sw': 'Question Answering over Knowledge Bases (KB-QA), which automatically answer natural language questions based on the facts contained by a knowledge base, is one of the most important natural language processing (NLP) tasks.  Maswali rahisi ni sehemu kubwa ya maswali yanayoulizwa kwenye mtandao wa intaneti, bado ni changamoto kwa mfumo wa QA. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza kutekeleza utoaji wa mifano na vyombo vinavyounganisha kwanza, na kuweka mbinu za kuchunguza mchakato wa kutangaza tatizo la kutangaza kosa. Ili kujifunza kuweka nafasi ya wagombea wawili wanaohitaji mada ili kuwezesha upya ukweli unaohusika kufuatia swali, tunapendekeza kufanya uchaguzi wa pamoja wa ukweli uliongezeka kwa kutambua mahusiano. Ujumbe wa kiwango kikubwa na taarifa mbalimbali zinatumiwa ili kuimarisha utaratibu wote. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa hatua yetu inaweka rekodi mpya katika kazi hii, inayoonyesha hali ya sasa ya sanaa kwa kiwango kikubwa kabisa.', 'am': 'የእውቀት ቋንቋ መቀመጫዎች (KB-QA) የሚመልስ ጥያቄ በአውቀት መቀመጫዎች ላይ የተደረገው እውነተኞች ጥያቄዎችን በአውቀት መቀመጫዎች ላይ የተመሳሳይ ጥያቄ ነው፡፡ ቀላል ጥያቄዎች በመረብ ላይ የተጠያየቁ ብዙ ጥያቄዎች ናቸው፣ ነገር ግን የQA ስርዓቶች መቀናቀል ነው፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ መተላለፊያ ውጤት እና አካሄድን በመጀመሪያ እና ማጠቃቀሚያ እና የስህተት አካባቢ ስህተት ማቀናጃ ፕሮግራሙን ለመቀላቀል እናስጀምር፡፡ በተጠያየቁ ውይይቶችን ለማስቀመጥ የሚቃርለውን ጉዳይ-ጉዳዩ ሁለቶችን ለመማር እናስጀምር ዘንድ፣ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ማግኘት የተሻለ የውይይት ምርጫ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የብዙ ደረጃ ኮድ እና የብዙልdimension መረጃዎች በሙሉ ሥርዓት ለማበረታት የተሰጡት ናቸው። የፈተናው ውጤቶች አዲስ ስራ እንዲያሳየው ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን የ-art ሁኔታ በተለየ ትልቅ ማረፊያ ነው፡፡', 'af': "Vraog Antwoord oor kennis Basies (KB-QA), wat automaties natuurlike taal vrae antwoord gebaseer op die fakte wat deur 'n kennis basis bevat is, is een van die belangrikste natuurlike taal verwerking (NLP) taak. Eenvoudige vrae bestuur 'n groot deel van vraagte wat op die web gevra is, nog steeds 'n uitdrukking vir QA stelsels. In hierdie werk voorstel ons om patroon uittrekking en entiteit eerste te verbind en voort patroon hersiening prosedure te stel om die fout propagasie probleem te verminder. Om te leer om kandidate onderwerp-predikaat paar te rankeer om die relevante fakte wat 'n vraag gegee is, te aktiveer, voorstel ons om joint faktuur-keuse te doen wat verhoog is deur verwanting-opdekking. Multivlak enkodering en multidimensie inligting word aangewys om die hele prosedure te versterk. Die eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons toegang 'n nuwe rekord in hierdie taak stel, uitvoer die huidige staat-van-die-kuns deur 'n absoluut groot marge.", 'sq': 'Përgjigja e pyetjeve mbi bazat e njohurive (KB-QA), që automatikisht përgjigjen pyetjeve të gjuhës natyrore bazuar në faktet e përmbajtura nga një bazë e njohurive, është një nga detyrat më të rëndësishme të procesimit natyror të gjuhës (NLP). Pyetje të thjeshta përbëjnë një pjesë të madhe të pyetjeve të pyetura në internet, duke qenë ende një sfidë për sistemet QA. Në këtë punë, ne propozojmë të kryejmë nxjerrjen e modeleve dhe njësinë që lidhet së pari, dhe të paraqesim procedurën e rishikimit të modeleve për të lehtësuar problemin e përhapjes së gabimeve. Me qëllim që të mësojmë të rendisni çiftet kandidate-subjekt-predikat për të mundësuar marrjen e fakteve të rëndësishme duke dhënë një pyetje, ne propozojmë të bëjmë zgjedhjen e përbashkët të fakteve të përmirësuar nga zbulimi i marrëdhënieve. Kodifikimet shumënivele dhe informacioni shumëdimensional janë përdorur për të forcuar të gjithë procedurën. Rezultatet eksperimentale demonstrojnë se qasja jonë vë një rekord të ri në këtë detyrë, duke kaluar gjendjen aktuale të teknologjisë me një margin absolut të madh.', 'az': 'Bilim Baseları (KB-QA) üzərində cavab verən sual, elm bazı ilə sadəcə təbiətli dil suallarına bağlı olaraq təbiətli suallarına cavab verən ən təbiətli dil işləməsindən biridir. Basit suallar internette soruşan sualların böyük bir hissəsi olur, hələ də QA sistemlərinə səbəb olur. Bu işdə, fərqli çəkməyi və birincisi bağlamağı təklif edirik və xəta propagasyonu problemini azaltmaq üçün fərqli çəkməyi təklif edirik. Bir sual verilmiş həqiqilərə istifadə etmək üçün kandidát-predikat çiftləri dəyişdirmək üçün, əlaqələr keşfetməsi ilə çoxlu istifadə etməyi təklif edirik. Çoxlu səviyyə kodlaması və çoxlu ölçü məlumatları bütün prosedüyü gücləndirmək üçün istifadə edilir. Eksperiment sonuçları göstərir ki, bizim tərzimiz bu işdə yeni bir kayıt təyin edir, həmin mövcudduki mövcudduki mövcudduki mövcudduki mövcuddu tamamilə böyük bir margin ilə istifadə edir.', 'bs': 'Odgovor na temelju znanja (KB-QA), koji automatski odgovara na pitanja prirodnog jezika na temelju činjenica koje sadrži baza znanja, je jedan od najvažnijih zadataka prirodnog obrade jezika (NLP). Jednostavna pitanja predstavljaju veliki dio pitanja koje su postavljene na internetu, i dalje su izazov za QA sisteme. U ovom poslu predlažemo prvo izvlačiti uzorke i entitet koji se povezuje i predložiti proceduru reviziranja uzorka kako bi smanjili problem propagacije grešaka. Da bismo naučili da postavljaju kandidatske predikatne parove kako bi omogućili odgovarajuće činjenice po pitanju, predlažemo da napravimo zajednički izbor činjenica poboljšan otkrivanjem odnosa. Većina nivoa kodiranja i višedimenzionalne informacije su uticale na jačanje cijele procedure. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš pristup postavlja novi rekord u ovom zadatku, iznosi trenutno stanje umjetnosti apsolutno velikom marginom.', 'ca': "La resposta a preguntes sobre les bases de coneixements (KB-QA), que responen automàticament a preguntes de llenguatge natural basades en els fets contenuts en una base de coneixements, és una de les tasques més importants de processament de llenguatges naturals (NLP). Les preguntes senzilles constitueixen una gran part de les preguntes preguntades a la Web, i encara són un repte per als sistemes QA. En aquesta feina, proposem conduir l'extracció de patrons i l'entitat que vinculi primer, i proposem un procediment de revisió de patrons per mitigar el problema de propagació d'errors. Per tal d'aprendre a classificar parells candidats-predicats per permetre la recuperació de fets pertinents dada una pregunta, proposem fer selecció conjunta de fets millorada per la detecció de relacions. Multi-level encodings and multi-dimension information are leveraged to strengthen the whole procedure.  Els resultats experimentals demostren que el nostre enfocament estableix un nou registre en aquesta tasca, superant l'estat actual d'última generació d'un marge absolut gran.", 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের ভেসের (কেবি-কিউএ) সম্পর্কে প্রশ্নের উত্তর, যা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রশ্নের উত্তর দেয় জ্ঞানের বেসের ভিত্তিক তথ্যের উপর ভ সাধারণ প্রশ্ন ওয়েবে প্রশ্নের একটি বিশাল অংশ, এখনও কিউএ সিস্টেমের চ্যালেঞ্জ। In this work, we propose to conduct pattern extraction and entity linking first, and put forward pattern revising procedure to mitigate the error propagation problem.  প্রার্থী বিষয়বস্তুর প্রার্থী জোড়ার স্থান নির্ধারিত করার জন্য প্রশ্নের প্রশ্ন পুনরুদ্ধার করার জন্য, আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি যৌথ বাস্তবতা সনা পুরো প্রক্রিয়াকে শক্তিশালী করার জন্য বহুস্তর স্তর এনকোডিং এবং বহুডিমেন্ট তথ্য প্রদান করা হয়েছে। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের এই কাজে একটি নতুন রেকর্ড নির্ধারণ করা হয়েছে, যা একটি সম্পূর্ণ বিশাল মার্গিন দ্বারা বর্তমান অবস্থার', 'et': 'Küsimustele vastamine teadmistebaaside kaudu (KB-QA), mis vastab automaatselt looduskeele küsimustele teadmistebaasis sisalduvate faktide põhjal, on üks olulisemaid looduskeele töötlemise ülesandeid. Lihtsad küsimused moodustavad suure osa veebis päritud küsimustest, mis on endiselt väljakutseks kvaliteedi tagamise süsteemidele. Selles töös teeme ettepaneku viia läbi mustri ekstraheerimine ja olemi sidumine esimesena ning esitada mustri läbivaatamise protseduur, et leevendada vigade levimise probleemi. Selleks et õppida järjestama kandidaadi subjekti-predikaadi paare, et võimaldada asjakohaste faktide taastamist antud küsimuses, teeme ettepaneku teha ühine faktide valik, mida parandab seose tuvastamine. Mitmetasandilisi kodeeringuid ja mitmemõõtmelist teavet kasutatakse kogu menetluse tugevdamiseks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie lähenemine seab selles ülesandes uue rekordi, ületades absoluutselt suure marginaali praegust tehnika taset.', 'fi': 'Knowledge Bases (KB-QA), joka vastaa automaattisesti luonnollisen kielen kysymyksiin tietopohjan sisältämien faktojen perusteella, on yksi tärkeimmistä luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävistä. Yksinkertaiset kysymykset muodostavat suuren osan verkossa kysytyistä kysymyksistä, jotka ovat edelleen haaste laadunvarmistusjärjestelmille. Tässä työssä ehdotamme ensin kaavojen uuttamista ja entiteettien linkittämistä, ja ehdotamme kaavojen tarkistusmenettelyä virheiden leviämisongelman lieventämiseksi. Jotta oppisimme luokittelemaan ehdokkaan subjekti-predikaatti parit, jotta merkitykselliset faktat voidaan hakea kysymyksessä, ehdotamme yhteistä faktojen valintaa, jota tehostetaan suhdetunnistuksella. Monitasoisia koodauksia ja moniulotteista tietoa hyödynnetään koko menettelyn vahvistamiseksi. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että lähestymistapamme asettaa uuden ennätyksen tässä tehtävässä, ylittäen nykyiset huipputasot absoluuttisesti suurella marginaalilla.', 'cs': 'Odpovědi na otázky prostřednictvím znalostních bází (KB-QA), které automaticky odpovídají na otázky přirozeného jazyka na základě faktů obsažených znalostní bází, patří k nejdůležitějším úkolům zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP). Jednoduché otázky tvoří velkou část dotazů na webu, které jsou stále výzvou pro QA systémy. V této práci navrhujeme nejprve provést extrakci vzorů a propojení entit a navrhnout postup revize vzorů pro zmírnění problému šíření chyb. Abychom se naučili hodnotit páry kandidátů subjekt-predikátů tak, aby bylo možné vyhledat relevantní fakta dané otázky, navrhujeme provést společný výběr faktů rozšířený detekcí vztahů. Víceúrovňové kódování a vícedimenzionální informace jsou využity k posílení celého postupu. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš přístup v tomto úkolu vytváří nový rekord, který výrazně překonává současný stav techniky.', 'hy': 'Հարցերը գիտելիքի հիմքերի մասին (ԿԲ-ՔԱ), որոնք ինքնաբերաբար պատասխանում են բնական լեզվի հարցերին, հիմնված գիտելիքի հիմքի փաստերի վրա, ամենակարևոր բնական լեզվի վերամշակումներից մեկն է: Պարզ հարցերը համարվում են ինտերնետում հարցված հարցերի մեծ մասը, որոնք դեռևս մարտահրավեր են տալիս QA համակարգերին: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք կատարել կաղապարի վերացումը և առաջին հերթին կապել կաղապարը և առաջարկել կաղապարի վերացման գործընթացը սխալների տարածման խնդիրների նվազեցնելու համար: In order to learn to rank candidate subject-predicate pairs to enable the relevant facts retrieval given a question, we propose to do joint fact selection enhanced by relation detection.  Բազմամամակարդակ կոդավորումները և բազմաչափ ինֆորմացիան օգտագործվում են ամբողջ գործընթացը ուժեղացնելու համար: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոտեցումը նոր ձայնագրություն է ստեղծում այս խնդրի մեջ, առավել բարձր արդյունքների արդյունքները բացարձակ մեծ արժեքներով:', 'jv': 'Sugeng Inggabung mulasar mulai aké Awaraning baz (kb-qA), sing automatically gawe ngubah ingkang pribadi kanggo basa sing nggawe sapa-sapa sing sabanjuré karo perusahaan sapa-sapa sing, sing dimulakno akeh langkung sapa-sapa sing gawe nguasai perusahaan (NLP). Sugeng-suarané sing sampeyan akèh akeh akeh lan situs sing bisa web, isih dumateng lan susahe sistem KA. Nang iki jalluh, kita nggunakake ingkang nggawe kesalahan butunggal nggawe barang sampeyan siji dadi, lan nganggep nggawe paten nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas nggawe kesalahan boten. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Laptop" and "Desktop', 'ha': "Socket error code NotSupported QFontDatabase Daga wannan aikin, Munã buƙata, don ka sami zartar da shirin ayuka da masu haɗi da halin na farko, kuma Mu sanya shirin ayuka da za'a zartar da shirin yin zartar da shi don ya cire matabbatar da bayani. Dõmin ya iya amfani da danna nau'i-nau'in-abun da aka ƙayyade nau'in da za'a iya amfani da masu husika da tambayi, sai Mu kwaɗai ka sami zaɓen tabbatarwa da kuma a ƙara kwamfyuta da gano na danganta. An cika kodin-daraja mai yawa da data na tsohon-tsohon mai yawa dõmin ya ƙarfafa kodi duk. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa hanyoyinmu yana samar da wani rekodi na yanzu cikin wannan aikin, kuma yana samar da halin-sanar da yanzu-yanzu mai girma.", 'sk': 'Odgovarjanje na vprašanja prek baz znanja (KB-QA), ki samodejno odgovarjajo na vprašanja naravnega jezika na podlagi dejstev, ki jih vsebuje baza znanja, je ena najpomembnejših nalog obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP). Preprosta vprašanja predstavljajo velik del vprašanj, ki jih poizvedujemo na spletu, in še vedno predstavljajo izziv za sisteme zagotavljanja kakovosti. V tem delu predlagamo, da najprej izvedemo ekstrakcijo vzorcev in povezovanje entitet ter predlagamo postopek revizije vzorcev za ublažitev problema širjenja napak. Da bi se naučili razvrstiti par kandidatov predmet-predikatov, da bi omogočili pridobivanje relevantnih dejstev glede na vprašanje, predlagamo skupno izbiro dejstev, okrepljeno z odkrivanjem relacij. Za okrepitev celotnega postopka se uporabljajo kodiranje na več ravneh in večdimenzionalne informacije. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naš pristop postavlja nov rekord v tej nalogi, saj za absolutno veliko maržo presega trenutno stanje tehnike.', 'bo': 'ངོས་ཤེས་པའི་རྨན་གཞི་ལ་ཐོག དྲི་ཚིག་ལས་སླ་བའི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆེ་ཆུང་བའི་དྲི་ཚིག་དྲ་རྒྱ་ཐོག་ཏུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་ཆ་ཤས་ཤིག་རེད། In this work, we propose to conduct pattern extraction and entity linking first, and put forward pattern revising procedure to mitigate the error propagation problem. ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་གྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་ལ་རྟོགས་པའི་དོན་དག་ཆ་རྐྱེན་དང་ཤེས་ལེན་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། སྣ་མཐོང་གི་ཨིན་རྟགས་དང་ཆེ་ཆུང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་མང་ཙམ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཡོངས་སྒྲིག་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲས་མང་ཙམ་སྟོན་ན་ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་སྐོར་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གསར་བ་ཞིག་སྒྲིག', 'he': 'Question Answering over Knowledge Bases (KB-QA), which automatically answer natural language questions based on the facts contained by a knowledge base, is one of the most important natural language processing (NLP) tasks.  שאלות פשוטות מייצרות חלק גדול של שאלות שנשאלות באינטרנט, עדיין אתגר למערכות QA. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים לבצע חיפוש דפוסים ויותות שקשורות קודם, ולהציע הליך שיפוי דפוסים כדי להקל את בעיית ההתפתחות של השגיאות. כדי ללמוד לדרג זוגות מועמדים-נושאים כדי לאפשר להחזיר את העובדות הרלוונטיות בהתחשב בשאלה, אנו מציעים לבחור עובדות משותפת משותפת על ידי זיהוי יחסים. קודים רבים רמות ומידע רבים מימדים משתמשים כדי לחזק את כל הליך. התוצאות הניסוייות מראות שהגישה שלנו קובעת תקליט חדש במשימה הזאת, מעלית את המצב הנוכחי של האמנות על ידי שווה גדולה לחלוטין.'}
{'en': 'Integrating Question Classification and Deep Learning for improved Answer Selection', 'ar': 'دمج تصنيف الأسئلة والتعلم العميق لتحسين اختيار الإجابة', 'es': 'Integración de clasificación de preguntas y aprendizaje profundo para mejorar la selección de respuestas', 'fr': 'Intégrer la classification des questions et le Deep Learning pour améliorer la sélection des réponses', 'pt': 'Integrando Classificação de Perguntas e Aprendizado Profundo para Melhor Seleção de Respostas', 'ja': '問題の分類とディープラーニングを統合して、回答の選択を改善', 'zh': '集成类深学,改进对案择', 'hi': 'बेहतर उत्तर चयन के लिए प्रश्न वर्गीकरण और गहरी शिक्षा को एकीकृत करना', 'ru': 'Интеграция классификации вопросов и глубокого обучения для улучшения отбора ответов', 'ga': 'Aicmiú na gCeisteanna agus an Fhoghlaim Dhomhain a chomhtháthú le haghaidh Roghnú Freagraí feabhsaithe', 'hu': 'A kérdések osztályozása és a mélytanulás integrálása a jobb válaszok kiválasztása érdekében', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση ταξινόμησης ερωτήσεων και βαθιάς μάθησης για βελτιωμένη επιλογή απαντήσεων', 'ka': 'კითხვების კლასიფიკაცია და ძალიან სწავლების ინტერგურაცია', 'lt': 'Įtraukti klausimų klasifikavimą ir išsamų mokymąsi siekiant pagerinti atsakymų atranką', 'it': 'Integrazione della classificazione delle domande e del deep learning per una migliore selezione delle risposte', 'mk': 'Integrating Question Classification and Deep Learning for improved Answer Selection', 'kk': 'Жауап таңдау үшін сұрақ классификациясын және қалыпты оқыту', 'ms': 'Menyempurnakan Klasifikasi Soalan dan Belajar Dalam untuk Pemilihan Jawapan Terbaik', 'ml': 'ഉത്തരം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനായി ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷനിഷനും ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതും ചേര്\u200dക്കുക', 'mt': 'Integrating Question Classification and Deep Learning for improved Answer Selection', 'mn': 'Сайжруулсан хариулт сонголтын тулд асуулт классификацийн болон гүн суралцах', 'pl': 'Integracja klasyfikacji pytań i głębokiego uczenia w celu lepszego wyboru odpowiedzi', 'no': 'Integrerer spørsmålsklassifikasjon og dypt læring for forbetra svarutval', 'ro': 'Integrarea clasificării întrebărilor și a învățării profunde pentru o selecție îmbunătățită a răspunsurilor', 'sr': 'Integracija klasifikacije pitanja i duboko učenje za poboljšan izbor odgovora', 'so': 'Integrating Question Classification and Deep Learning for improved Answer Selection', 'sv': 'Integrera frågeklassificering och djupinlärning för bättre svarsval', 'ta': 'மேம்படுத்தப்பட்ட பதில் தேர்வு', 'ur': 'سؤال کلاسیفٹ اور عمیق سیکھنے کے لئے سوال کا انتخاب کیا جاتا ہے', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණය සහ ගොඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cài đặt hạng các câu hỏi và học sâu để chọn đáp án tốt hơn', 'bg': 'Интегриране на класификация на въпроси и задълбочено обучение за по-добър избор на отговори', 'da': 'Integrering af spørgsmålstegnelse og dyb læring for forbedret svarvalg', 'nl': 'Integratie van vragenclassificatie en Deep Learning voor verbeterde antwoordselectie', 'de': 'Integration von Fragenklassifikation und Deep Learning für verbesserte Antwortauswahl', 'hr': 'Integracija klasifikacije pitanja i duboko učenje za poboljšan izbor odgovora', 'id': 'Integrating Question Classification and Deep Learning for improved Answer Selection', 'sw': 'Kuunganisha Makala ya Swali na Kufunza Kideep kwa ajili ya Uchaguzi wa Jibu Bora', 'fa': 'جمع کردن کلاس\u200cشناسی سوال و یادگیری عمیق برای انتخاب جواب بهتر', 'ko': '문제 분류 및 심층 학습을 통합하여 답변 선택 향상', 'af': 'Integreer Fraag Klassifikasie en Deep Leer vir verbeterde Antwoord Keuse', 'tr': 'Sorag Sözlemesi we Derjup Öwrenmesi Gelişmiş Jogabat Saýlamak üçin birleştirilip', 'sq': 'Integrimi i klasifikimit të pyetjeve dhe mësimit të thellë për zgjedhjen e përmirësuar të përgjigjeve', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Հարցերի դասակարգման և խորը սովորելու ինտեգրելը բարելավված պատասխանների ընտրության համար', 'az': 'İyileşmiş cavab Seçimi üçün sual klasifikasyonu və derin öyrənməsi', 'bs': 'Integracija klasifikacije pitanja i duboko učenje za poboljšan izbor odgovora', 'bn': 'উত্তর নির্বাচনের জন্য প্রশ্ন ক্লাসিকেশন এবং গভীর শিক্ষা যুক্ত করুন', 'cs': 'Integrace klasifikace otázek a hlubokého učení pro lepší výběr odpovědí', 'et': 'Küsimuste klassifitseerimise ja sügavõppe integreerimine paremaks vastuste valikuks', 'ca': "Integrar la classificació de preguntes i l'aprenentatge profund per a millorar la selecció de respostes", 'fi': 'Kysymysten luokittelun ja syväoppimisen integrointi parantaa vastausten valintaa', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Integriranje klasifikacije vprašanj in poglobljenega učenja za izboljšanje izbire odgovorov', 'he': 'שיתוף שיעור שאלות וללמוד עמוק לבחירת תשובות משופרת', 'bo': 'རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བདེན་པར་དུ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་དང་deep learning'}
{'en': 'We present a system for Answer Selection that integrates fine-grained Question Classification with a Deep Learning model designed for Answer Selection. We detail the necessary changes to the Question Classification taxonomy and system, the creation of a new Entity Identification system and methods of highlighting entities to achieve this objective. Our experiments show that Question Classes are a strong signal to Deep Learning models for Answer Selection, and enable us to outperform the current state of the art in all variations of our experiments except one. In the best configuration, our MRR and MAP scores outperform the current state of the art by between 3 and 5 points on both versions of the TREC Answer Selection test set, a standard dataset for this task.', 'ar': 'نقدم نظامًا لاختيار الإجابة يدمج تصنيف الأسئلة الدقيق مع نموذج التعلم العميق المصمم لاختيار الإجابة. نقوم بتفصيل التغييرات الضرورية على تصنيف ونظام تصنيف الأسئلة ، وإنشاء نظام جديد لتعريف الكيان وطرق تسليط الضوء على الكيانات لتحقيق هذا الهدف. تُظهر تجاربنا أن فئات الأسئلة هي إشارة قوية لنماذج التعلم العميق لاختيار الإجابة ، وتمكننا من التفوق على الحالة الحالية للفن في جميع أشكال تجاربنا باستثناء واحدة. في أفضل تكوين ، تتفوق درجات MRR و MAP الخاصة بنا على الحالة الحالية للفن بما يتراوح بين 3 و 5 نقاط في كلا الإصدارين من مجموعة اختبار تحديد الإجابة TREC ، وهي مجموعة بيانات قياسية لهذه المهمة.', 'es': 'Presentamos un sistema de selección de respuestas que integra la clasificación de preguntas detallada con un modelo de aprendizaje profundo diseñado para la selección de respuestas. Detallamos los cambios necesarios en la taxonomía y el sistema de Clasificación de Preguntas, la creación de un nuevo sistema de Identificación de Entidades y los métodos para destacar entidades para lograr este objetivo. Nuestros experimentos muestran que las clases de preguntas son una señal fuerte para los modelos de aprendizaje profundo para la selección de respuestas y nos permiten superar el estado actual de la técnica en todas las variaciones de nuestros experimentos excepto en uno. En la mejor configuración, nuestras puntuaciones MRR y MAP superan al estado actual de la técnica en entre 3 y 5 puntos en ambas versiones del conjunto de pruebas TREC Answer Selection, un conjunto de datos estándar para esta tarea.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un système de sélection de réponses qui intègre une classification précise des questions avec un modèle d'apprentissage profond conçu pour la sélection des réponses. Nous détaillons les modifications nécessaires à apporter à la taxonomie et au système de classification des questions, la création d'un nouveau système d'identification des entités et les méthodes de mise en évidence des entités pour atteindre cet objectif. Nos expériences montrent que les classes de questions sont un signal fort pour les modèles de Deep Learning pour la sélection de réponses, et nous permettent de surpasser l'état actuel de l'art dans toutes les variantes de nos expériences sauf une. Dans la meilleure configuration, nos scores MRR et MAP surpassent l'état actuel de l'art de 3 à 5 points sur les deux versions de l'ensemble de tests TREC Answer Selection, un ensemble de données standard pour cette tâche.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos um sistema para Seleção de Respostas que integra Classificação de Perguntas refinada com um modelo de Deep Learning projetado para Seleção de Respostas. Detalhamos as mudanças necessárias na taxonomia e sistema de Classificação de Questões, a criação de um novo sistema de Identificação de Entidades e métodos de destaque de entidades para atingir este objetivo. Nossos experimentos mostram que as Classes de Perguntas são um forte sinal para os modelos de Deep Learning para Seleção de Respostas e nos permitem superar o estado da arte atual em todas as variações de nossos experimentos, exceto uma. Na melhor configuração, nossas pontuações MRR e MAP superam o atual estado da arte entre 3 e 5 pontos em ambas as versões do conjunto de testes TREC Answer Selection, um conjunto de dados padrão para essa tarefa.', 'ja': '回答選択のために設計されたディープラーニングモデルと細かい質問分類を統合した、回答選択のためのシステムを提示します。質問分類の分類とシステム、新しいエンティティ識別システムの作成、およびこの目標を達成するためのエンティティの強調表示方法に必要な変更を詳しく説明します。私たちの実験では、質問クラスは回答選択のためのディープラーニングモデルへの強力なシグナルであり、1つを除くすべての実験のバリエーションで現状の最先端を上回ることを可能にすることが示されています。最良の構成では、MRRとMAPのスコアは、このタスクの標準データセットであるTREC Answer Selectionテストセットの両方のバージョンで、現在の最先端を3〜5ポイント上回っています。', 'zh': '臣等立一答案择系统,当系统将细粒度分类与专为答案择深度学习模样集成。 臣等备言分类、系统者必改,创造新体识别系统及显见实体以成其法。 吾实验明,类深学模形之强信,使吾等得于实验之变体,超越先进之术,非一也。 其最佳者,余 MRR 、 MAP 分数于两版 TREC 答案择试集(此格数集)皆高于最先进之术 3 至 5 分。', 'hi': 'हम उत्तर चयन के लिए एक प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो उत्तर चयन के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए डीप लर्निंग मॉडल के साथ ठीक-ठाक प्रश्न वर्गीकरण को एकीकृत करता है। हम प्रश्न वर्गीकरण वर्गीकरण और प्रणाली में आवश्यक परिवर्तनों का विस्तार करते हैं, एक नई इकाई पहचान प्रणाली का निर्माण और इस उद्देश्य को प्राप्त करने के लिए संस्थाओं को हाइलाइट करने के तरीकों का विवरण देते हैं। हमारे प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि प्रश्न कक्षाएं उत्तर चयन के लिए डीप लर्निंग मॉडल के लिए एक मजबूत संकेत हैं, और हमें एक को छोड़कर हमारे प्रयोगों के सभी रूपों में कला की वर्तमान स्थिति को मात देने में सक्षम बनाती हैं। सबसे अच्छा विन्यास में, हमारे MRR और MAP स्कोर TREC उत्तर चयन परीक्षण सेट के दोनों संस्करणों पर 3 और 5 अंकों के बीच कला की वर्तमान स्थिति से आगे निकल जाते हैं, जो इस कार्य के लिए एक मानक डेटासेट है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем систему отбора ответов, которая объединяет мелкозернистую классификацию вопросов с моделью глубокого обучения, предназначенной для отбора ответов. Мы подробно описываем необходимые изменения в таксономии и системе классификации вопросов, создание новой системы идентификации субъектов и методы выделения субъектов для достижения этой цели. Наши эксперименты показывают, что классы вопросов являются сильным сигналом к моделям глубокого обучения для выбора ответов и позволяют нам превзойти современное состояние во всех вариациях наших экспериментов, за исключением одного. В лучшей конфигурации наши баллы MRR и MAP превосходят текущий уровень техники на 3-5 баллов в обеих версиях тестового набора TREC Answer Selection, стандартного набора данных для этой задачи.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair córas um Roghnú Freagraí a chomhtháthaíonn Aicmiú na gCeisteanna mínghlana le múnla Deep Learning atá deartha do Roghnú Freagraí. Déanaimid mionsonrú ar na hathruithe is gá ar thacsanomaíocht agus ar chóras Aicmiú na gCeisteanna, cruthú córais nua Aitheantais Aonáin agus modhanna chun aonáin a aibhsiú chun an cuspóir seo a bhaint amach. Léiríonn ár dturgnaimh gur comhartha láidir iad Ranganna Ceisteanna do mhúnlaí Deep Learning le haghaidh Roghnú Freagraí, agus cuireann siad ar ár gcumas sárobair a dhéanamh ar an staid reatha i ngach éagsúlacht dár dturgnaimh seachas ceann amháin. Sa chumraíocht is fearr, sáraíonn ár scóir MRR agus MAP an úrscothacht faoi láthair idir 3 agus 5 phointe ar an dá leagan de thacar tástála Roghnú Freagra TREC, tacar sonraí caighdeánach don tasc seo.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα επιλογής απαντήσεων που ενσωματώνει την λεπτή ταξινόμηση ερωτήσεων με ένα μοντέλο βαθιάς μάθησης σχεδιασμένο για την επιλογή απαντήσεων. Διευκρινίζουμε τις απαραίτητες αλλαγές στην ταξινόμηση ερωτήσεων, τη δημιουργία ενός νέου συστήματος αναγνώρισης οντοτήτων και μεθόδους ανάδειξης οντοτήτων για την επίτευξη αυτού του στόχου. Τα πειράματά μας δείχνουν ότι οι τάξεις ερωτήσεων αποτελούν ισχυρό σήμα στα μοντέλα βαθιάς μάθησης για την επιλογή απαντήσεων και μας επιτρέπουν να ξεπεράσουμε την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τέχνης σε όλες τις παραλλαγές των πειράματός μας εκτός από ένα. Στην καλύτερη διαμόρφωση, οι βαθμολογίες MRR και MAP ξεπερνούν την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας μεταξύ 3 και 5 σημείων και στις δύο εκδόσεις του σετ δοκιμής επιλογής απάντησης, ενός τυποποιημένου συνόλου δεδομένων για αυτήν την εργασία.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ მივიღეთ სისტემა პასუხის მონიშნისთვის, რომელიც კითხვის კლასიფიკაციას, რომელიც კლასიფიკაცია ძალიან სწავლების მოდელზე, რომელიც განახლების მონიშნელისთვი ჩვენ კითხვის კლასიფიკაციის რაკონომია და სისტემის შექმნა, ახალი ინტერტიფიკაციის სისტემის განსაზღვრება და განსაზღვრება ინტერტიკური განსაზღვრების მეტოვების შექმნა. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები აჩვენებენ, რომ კითხვის კლასები ძალიან სიგნალე იყო ძალიან სწავლების მოდელების გარეშე, და ჩვენ შეგვიძლია გავაკეთოთ სურათის მიმდინარე სურათის მდგომარეობა საუკეთესო კონფიგურაციაში, ჩვენი MRR და MAP მონაცემები მიმდინარე სურათის სურათის სურათის განმავლობაზე გავაკეთებენ სამი და ხუთი წერტილების განმავლობაში TREC პასუხის მონიშნული ტესტი', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a Válaszok kiválasztására szolgáló rendszert, amely integrálja a finom szemű kérdések osztályozását a Válaszok kiválasztására tervezett Deep Learning modellel. Részletesen részletezzük a Kérdések Osztályozása taxonómiájának és rendszerének szükséges változásait, egy új Entity Identification rendszer létrehozását, valamint az entitások kiemelésének módszereit e cél eléréséhez. Kísérleteink azt mutatják, hogy a kérdéses osztályok erős jelzést jelentenek a mélytanulási modelleknek a válaszok kiválasztására, és lehetővé teszik számunkra, hogy kísérleteink minden változatában felülmúlják a technika jelenlegi állapotát, kivéve egyet. A legjobb konfigurációban az MRR és MAP pontszámaink 3 és 5 ponttal felülmúlják a jelenlegi technika állapotát a TREC válaszkiválasztási tesztkészlet mindkét verziójában, amely egy szabványos adatkészlet erre a feladatra.', 'it': "Presentiamo un sistema di selezione delle risposte che integra la classificazione delle domande a grana fine con un modello di Deep Learning progettato per la selezione delle risposte. Descriviamo le modifiche necessarie alla tassonomia e al sistema di classificazione delle domande, la creazione di un nuovo sistema di identificazione delle entità e metodi di evidenziazione delle entità per raggiungere questo obiettivo. I nostri esperimenti dimostrano che le Question Class sono un segnale forte per i modelli di Deep Learning per la selezione delle risposte, e ci consentono di superare lo stato attuale dell'arte in tutte le varianti dei nostri esperimenti tranne uno. Nella migliore configurazione, i nostri punteggi MRR e MAP superano lo stato attuale dell'arte di 3-5 punti su entrambe le versioni del set di test TREC Answer Selection, un set di dati standard per questa attività.", 'kk': 'Біз жауап беру таңдауының жүйесін таңдаймыз. Жауап таңдау үшін құрылған қалыпты оқу үлгісімен сұрақтар классификациясын біріктіреді. Біз Сұрақ классификациясының таксономиясы мен жүйесінің қажетті өзгерістерін, бұл мақсатты жеткізу үшін жаңа Нысандық идентификациялау жүйесін жаңа Нысандық идентификациялау жүйес Біздің тәжірибеміз Сұрақ классиясы - жауап таңдау үшін түсті оқыту үлгілеріне күшті сигнал деп көрсетеді, және бізге бірнеше тәжірибеміздің түрлі түрлі түрлендіріліктерімізде ө Ең жақсы баптауда, MRR мен MAP нәтижелеріміз TREC жауап таңдау сынақтарының екі нұсқасындағы 3 мен 5 нұсқасында, осы тапсырманың стандартты деректер жиынында орындалады.', 'lt': 'Pateikiame atsakymų atrankos sistemą, kuri integruoja smulkiai išgrūdintą klausimų klasifikaciją su išsamaus mokymosi modeliu, sukurtu atsakymų atrankos tikslais. We detail the necessary changes to the Question Classification taxonomy and system, the creation of a new Entity Identification system and methods of highlighting entities to achieve this objective.  Mūsų eksperimentai rodo, kad klausimų klasės yra stiprus ženklas gilaus mokymosi atsakymų atrankos modeliams ir leidžia mums viršyti dabartinę pažangą visose mūsų eksperimentų, išskyrus vieną, variantuose. Geriausioje konfigūracijoje mūsų MRR ir MAP rezultatai viršija dabartinę pažangą 3–5 taškais abiejose TREC atsakymų atrankos bandymo rinkinio versijose, standartinio duomenų rinkinio šiai uždavinei atlikti.', 'ml': 'ഉത്തരം തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ഉത്തരം സിസ്റ്റത്തിനുള്ള ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത്. അതിന്റെ ഉത്തരം ത ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ക്ലാസ്സിക്ഷനിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെയും ആവശ്യമായ മാറ്റങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ലക്ഷ്യം എതിര്\u200d നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നത് ചോദ്യം ക്ലാസുകള്\u200d ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് ശക്തിയുള്ള സിഗ്നലാണെന്നും, മറുപടി തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്ക ഏറ്റവും നല്ല ക്രമീകരണത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മുടെ MRR-MAP സ്കോര്\u200d ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ കലാലക സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d നിന്നും 5 പോയിന്റുകള്\u200dക്കും ഇടയില്\u200d 3-5 പോയിന്റുകള്\u200dക്കുമിടയില്\u200d മ', 'mk': 'Презентираме систем за избор на одговори кој ја интегрира фино растената класификација на прашања со модел за длабоко учење дизајниран за избор на одговори. Ние ги деталираме потребните промени во таксономијата и системот за класификација на прашања, создавањето на новиот систем за идентификација на ентитетите и методите за истакнување на ентитетите за остварување на оваа цел. Our experiments show that Question Classes are a strong signal to Deep Learning models for Answer Selection, and enable us to outperform the current state of the art in all variations of our experiments except one.  Во најдобрата конфигурација, нашите оценки на МРР и МАП ја надминуваат сегашната техничка состојба за помеѓу 3 и 5 поени на двете верзии на тестот за избор на одговори TREC, стандарден набор на податоци за оваа задача.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan sistem untuk Pemilihan Jawapan yang mengintegrasikan Klasifikasi soalan berwarna ganda dengan model belajar dalam yang direka untuk Pemilihan Jawapan. Kami perincian perubahan yang diperlukan untuk taksonomi dan sistem Klasifikasi Pertanyaan, penciptaan sistem Identifikasi Entiti baru dan kaedah untuk mempertimbangkan entiti untuk mencapai tujuan ini. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahawa Kelas Pertanyaan adalah isyarat yang kuat untuk model Pelajaran Dalam untuk Pemilihan Jawaban, dan membolehkan kami untuk melampaui keadaan seni semasa dalam semua variasi eksperimen kami kecuali satu. Dalam konfigurasi terbaik, skor MRR dan MAP kami melebihi keadaan seni semasa dengan antara 3 dan 5 titik pada kedua-dua versi set ujian Pemilihan Jawapan TREC, set data piawai untuk tugas ini.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer eit system for svarutvalet som integrerer fint spørsmålklassifikasjon med ein dyp læringsmodell utforma for svarutvalet. Vi detaljerer dei nødvendige endringane i spørsmålsklassifikasjonstakonomien og systemet, opprettinga av eit nytt entitetsidentifikasjonssystem og metodar for merking av entiteter for å oppnå dette målet. Eksperimentane våre viser at spørsmålklassar er ein sterk signal til dyppa læringsmodeller for svarutvalet, og slå oss på å utføra den gjeldande tilstanden til kunsten i alle variasjonane av eksperimentene våre unntatt ein. I den beste oppsettet vil MRR og MAP-poeng våre utføra den gjeldande tilstanden til kunsten mellom 3 og 5 punkt på begge versjonar av TREC-utval-testen, eit standard dataset for denne oppgåva.', 'mn': 'Бид хариулт сонголтын системийг хариулт сонголтын тулд хариулт сонголтын тулд дүнтэй суралцах загварыг нэгтгэдэг. Бид асуултын классификацийн taxonomy болон системийн хэрэгтэй өөрчлөлтийг нарийвчлан тайлбарлаж, шинэ Объектын идентификацийн систем болон энэ зорилго хүртэх үйлдлийг тодорхойлох арга замыг бүтээх болно. Бидний туршилтууд асуулт класс нь хариулт сонголтын гүнзгий суралцах загваруудын хүчтэй тэмдэглэл гэдгийг харуулж байна. Тэгээд бидэнд урлагийн орчин чадварыг бидний туршилтын өөрчлөлттэй бүх өөрчлөлт гаргаж чадна. Хамгийн сайн тохиолдолд, бидний MRR болон MAP нь урлагийн орчин үеийн байдлыг TREC Хариулт Солголтын шалгалтын хоёр хувилбар дээр 3-5 цэгийн хоорондоо дамжуулдаг. Энэ ажлын стандарт өгөгдлийн санг.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw sistema għall-Għa żla tat-Tweġibiet li tintegra l-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Mistoqsijiet b’ħbub fin ma’ mudell ta’ Tagħlim fil-fond iddisinjat għall-Għażla tat-Tweġibiet. Aħna niddettaljaw il-bidliet meħtieġa fit-tassonomija u s-sistema tal-Klassifikazzjoni tal-Mistoqsijiet, il-ħolqien ta’ sistema ġdida ta’ Identifikazzjoni tal-Entità u metodi li jenfasizzaw l-entitajiet biex jinkiseb dan l-għan. Our experiments show that Question Classes are a strong signal to Deep Learning models for Answer Selection, and enable us to outperform the current state of the art in all variations of our experiments except one.  Fl-a ħjar konfigurazzjoni, il-punteġġi tagħna tal-MRR u tal-MAP jaqbżu l-istat attwali tal-aħħar b’bejn 3 u 5 punti fuq iż-żewġ verżjonijiet tas-sett tat-test tal-għażla tat-tweġibiet TREC, sett ta’ dejta standard għal dan il-kompitu.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy system wyboru odpowiedzi, który integruje precyzyjną klasyfikację pytań z modelem Deep Learning przeznaczonym do wyboru odpowiedzi. Przedstawiamy niezbędne zmiany w taksonomii i systemie Klasyfikacji Pytań, stworzenie nowego systemu Identyfikacji Podmiotów oraz metody wyróżniania podmiotów w celu osiągnięcia tego celu. Nasze eksperymenty pokazują, że klasy pytań są silnym sygnałem dla modeli Deep Learning dla wyboru odpowiedzi i pozwalają nam przewyższyć obecny stan techniki we wszystkich wariantach naszych eksperymentów z wyjątkiem jednego. W najlepszej konfiguracji nasze wyniki MRR i MAP przewyższają aktualny stan techniki o pomiędzy 3-5 punktami w obu wersjach zestawu testowego TREC Answer Selection, standardowego zbioru danych dla tego zadania.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un sistem de selecție a răspunsurilor care integrează clasificarea fină a întrebărilor cu un model de învățare profundă conceput pentru selecția răspunsurilor. Detalizăm modificările necesare în taxonomia și sistemul de clasificare a întrebărilor, crearea unui nou sistem de identificare a entităților și metodele de evidențiere a entităților pentru atingerea acestui obiectiv. Experimentele noastre arată că Clasele de întrebări reprezintă un semnal puternic pentru modelele de învățare profundă pentru selectarea răspunsurilor și ne permit să depășim starea actuală a artei în toate variațiile experimentelor noastre, cu excepția unuia. În cea mai bună configurație, scorurile noastre MRR și MAP depășesc starea actuală a tehnologiei cu între 3 și 5 puncte pentru ambele versiuni ale setului de testare TREC Answer Selection, un set de date standard pentru această sarcină.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo sistem za izbor odgovora koji integriše klasifikaciju ispitivanja sa model dubokog učenja dizajniranim za izbor odgovora. Objašnjavamo potrebne promjene taksonomije i sistema klasifikacije pitanja, stvaranje novog sustava identifikacije entiteta i metode osvjetljavanja entiteta za postizanje ovog cilja. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su klase pitanja jaki signal za model dubokog učenja za odabire odgovora i omogućavaju nam da izvršimo trenutno stanje umjetnosti u svim varijacijama naših eksperimenata osim jednog. U najboljoj konfiguraciji, naši MRR i MAP rezultati iznose trenutno stanje umjetnosti između 3 i 5 bodova na obje verzije test a TREC Odgovora, standardnu setu podataka za ovaj zadatak.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තෝරාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක අපි ප්\u200dරශ්න විශ්ලේෂණය සහ පද්ධතියට අවශ්\u200dය වෙනස් විස්තර කරනවා, අළුත් අන්තිම පද්ධතිපද්ධතිය සහ අන්තිම අන්තිම පද්ධතිය අපේ පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්න ක්ලාස් වලින් ගොඩක් සංඥානයක් තියෙන්නේ උත්තර තෝරණය සඳහා ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න මොඩේල් වලින් සං හොඳම සංවිධානයෙන්, අපේ MRR සහ MAP ස්කෝර්ස් වලින් කල්ලාගේ ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය තියෙන්නේ TREC උත්තර තෝරණ පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ සූදා', 'so': "Waxaan diyaarinaynaa nidaam u qoran doorashada jawaabta oo ku kooban kara fasalka su'aalaha si fiican loo qabto iyo modelka waxbarashada hoose oo loo qoray doorashada jawaabta. Waxaannu u qoraynaa beddelaadka loo baahan yahay ee ku saabsan canshuuraha arimaha iyo nidaamka, abuuridda nidaamka aqoonsiga ganacsiga cusub iyo qaababka ku sawiraya waxyaabaha ay ku gaadhaan goalkan. Imtixaanadeena waxay muujinayaan in fasalaha su'aaladu ay yihiin calaamad xoog leh u leeyihiin tusaalaha waxbarashada deegaan ee doorashada jawaabta, waxaana inagu caawin karnaa inaan dhamaadno xaaladda farshaxanka oo dhan oo kala duwan jirrabadeenna mooyaane. Tilmaamaha ugu fiican ee MRR iyo MAP kooxahooda ayaa sameynaya xaaladda farshaxanka oo u dhexeeya 3-5 baro oo ku qoran labada kooxood oo ay ka kooban yihiin imtixaanka doorashada TREC, taas oo ah saxda macluumaadka caadiga ah ee shaqadan.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett system för svarsval som integrerar finkornig frågeklassificering med en djupinlärningsmodell utformad för svarsval. Vi beskriver de nödvändiga förändringarna i frågeklassificeringens taxonomi och system, skapandet av ett nytt system för identifiering av enheter och metoder för att markera enheter för att uppnå detta mål. Våra experiment visar att frågeklasser är en stark signal till djupinlärningsmodeller för svarsval, och gör det möjligt för oss att överträffa det nuvarande tillståndet i alla varianter av våra experiment utom ett. I den bästa konfigurationen överträffar våra MRR- och MAP-poäng det aktuella läget med mellan 3 och 5 poäng på båda versionerna av TREC Answer Selection testset, en standarddatauppsättning för denna uppgift.', 'ur': 'ہم نے جواب انتخاب کے لئے ایک سیستم پیش کرتا ہے جو جواب انتخاب کے لئے طراحی کی گھنی سیکھنے کی موڈل کے ساتھ پاکیزہ دانے کے سوال کلاسیفی کرتا ہے۔ ہم سؤال کے کلاسیفٹ تاکسینومی اور سیسٹم کی ضرورت کی تغییرات کو تفصیل دیتے ہیں، ایک نئی ایٹنی شناسیفٹ سیسٹم کی پیدائش اور اس موضوع کو پہنچ جانے کے لئے ابتدائیٹ کی روش کا طریقہ بناتے ہیں. ہمارے آزمائش دکھاتے ہیں کہ سوال کلاس ایک مضبوط سیگنال ہے جو جگہ انتخاب کرنے کے لئے عمیق سیکھنے کی موڈل کے لئے ہے اور ہمیں ایک کے سوا سب مختلف آزمائش میں آزمائش کی موجود موجود کرنا اجازت دیتے ہیں۔ بہترین پیکربندی میں، ہمارے MRR اور MAP اسکوروں نے آرتی کی موجود حالت کو 3 اور 5 پوینٹوں کے درمیان ترEC جواب انتخاب کی جگہ سیٹ کے دونوں نسخے پر زیادہ اضافہ کیا ہے، یہ کام کے لئے ایک استاندارڈ ڈیٹ سٹ ہے.', 'ta': 'நாம் பதில் தேர்ந்தெடுப்பிற்கான ஒரு அமைப்பை காண்பிக்கிறோம். அது சரியான பிடிக்கப்பட்ட கேள்வி வகைப்படுத்தலை ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொ நாம் கேள்வி வகைப்படுத்தல் வரிசைப்படுத்தல் மற்றும் அமைப்புக்கு தேவையான மாற்றங்களை விளக்குகிறோம், புதிய அடையாளம் அடையாளம் அமைப்பு  எங்கள் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கிறது கேள்வி வகுப்புகள் ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் மாதிரிகள் ஆழமான குறிகை சிறந்த வடிவமைப்பில், எங்கள் MRR மற்றும் MAP மதிப்புகள் 3 மற்றும் 5 புள்ளிகளுக்கு இடையே தற்போதைய கலைத்தின் நிலையை வெளியேற்றுகிறது, TREC பதில் தேர்வ', 'uz': '@ info Биз саволлар классаниция ва системага муҳим ўзгартиришларни бажаримиз, бу манзилга етишиш учун янги маълумотлар аниқланган системни яратиш ва усулларни кўрсатиш учун. Bizning tajribalarimiz esa savol sinflari, javob tanlash modellari uchun juda qiyin imkoniyat, va bizni tashqarish imtiyozlarimizning hamma tajribalarimizning har xil turlaridagi sarlavhasini bajarishga imkoniyat beradi. @ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống để chọn trả lời, bao gồm các phân bổ câu hỏi đặc biệt với một mô hình học sâu được thiết kế để chọn trả lời. Chúng tôi chi tiết những thay đổi cần thiết cho loại thuế và hệ thống phân tích các câu hỏi, tạo ra một hệ thống xác định các loài thực thể mới và phương pháp tô sáng các thực thể để đạt được mục tiêu này. Những thí nghiệm của chúng tôi cho thấy Lớp Vấn đề là một tín hiệu mạnh mẽ cho các mô hình về Cách chọn Đáp ứng sâu học, và cho phép chúng tôi vượt trội trạng thái hiện tại của nghệ thuật trong mọi biến đổi trong thí nghiệm trừ một. Trong các cấu hình tốt nhất, điểm MRR và MAP vượt qua trạng thái hiện thời của nghệ thuật qua các điểm giữa 3 và 5 trên cả hai phiên bản của tập thử chọn giá trị Trả lời RẤT, một tập tin tiêu chuẩn cho nhiệm vụ này.', 'bg': 'Представяме система за подбор на отговори, която интегрира фина класификация на въпроси с модел за задълбочено обучение, предназначен за подбор на отговори. Подробни са необходимите промени в таксономията и системата за класификация на въпроси, създаването на нова система за идентификация на субектите и методите за открояване на субектите за постигане на тази цел. Нашите експерименти показват, че класовете с въпроси са силен сигнал за моделите на задълбочено обучение за избор на отговори и ни позволяват да превъзхождаме текущото състояние на изкуството във всички вариации на нашите експерименти, с изключение на един. В най-добрата конфигурация нашите резултати надминават текущото състояние на техниката с между 3 и 5 точки и в двете версии на тестовия набор за избор на отговори, стандартен набор от данни за тази задача.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et system til svarvalg, der integrerer finkornet spørgsmål klassificering med en Deep Learning model designet til svarvalg. Vi beskriver de nødvendige ændringer i spørgsmålsklassifikationens taksonomi og -system, oprettelsen af et nyt enhedsidentifikationssystem og metoder til fremhævelse af enheder for at nå dette mål. Vores eksperimenter viser, at spørgsmål klasser er et stærkt signal til Deep Learning modeller for svarvalg, og gør det muligt for os at overgå den nuværende state of te art i alle variationer af vores eksperimenter undtagen én. I den bedste konfiguration overgår vores MRR- og MAP-score den aktuelle state of te art med mellem 3 og 5 point på begge versioner af TREC Answer Selection testsæt, et standarddatasæt til denne opgave.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een systeem voor Answer Selection dat fijngranige Question Classification integreert met een Deep Learning model ontworpen voor Answer Selection. We beschrijven de noodzakelijke wijzigingen in de taxonomie en het systeem van de vragenclassificatie, de oprichting van een nieuw systeem voor entiteitsidentificatie en methoden om entiteiten te markeren om dit doel te bereiken. Onze experimenten tonen aan dat vragenklassen een sterk signaal zijn voor Deep Learning modellen voor antwoordselectie, en ons in staat stellen om de huidige stand van de techniek te overtreffen in alle variaties van onze experimenten behalve één. In de beste configuratie overtreffen onze MRR- en MAP-scores de huidige stand van de techniek met tussen 3 en 5 punten op beide versies van de TREC Answer Selection testset, een standaard dataset voor deze taak.', 'ko': '우리는 답안 선택 시스템을 제시했는데 이 시스템은 세립도 문제의 분류와 답안 선택에 사용되는 깊이 있는 학습 모델을 통합시켰다.우리는 문제 분류법과 시스템에 대한 필요 변경, 새로운 실체 식별 시스템의 창설, 그리고 이 목표를 실현하기 위해 실체를 돋보이게 하는 방법을 상세하게 소개했다.우리의 실험에 의하면 문제류는 깊이 있는 학습 모델이 답안을 선택하는 강렬한 신호이며, 우리가 하나를 제외한 모든 실험에서 현재의 기술 수준을 초월할 수 있도록 한다.최적 설정에서 우리의 MRR과 MAP 점수는 두 버전의 TREC 답안 선택 테스트 세트(이 임무의 표준 데이터 세트)에서 현재 가장 선진적인 수준보다 3~5점 높다.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan sistem untuk Pemilihan Jawab yang mengintegrasikan Klasifikasi Pertanyaan yang baik dengan model belajar dalam yang direncanakan untuk Pemilihan Jawab. Kami mendetail perubahan yang diperlukan untuk taksonomi dan sistem Klasifikasi Pertanyaan, penciptaan sistem Identifikasi Entitas baru dan metode mempertimbangkan entitas untuk mencapai tujuan ini. Eksperimen kami menunjukkan bahwa Kelas Pertanyaan adalah sinyal yang kuat untuk model Belajar Dalam untuk Pemilihan Jawaban, dan memungkinkan kita untuk melampaui keadaan seni saat ini dalam semua variasi eksperimen kami kecuali satu. Dalam konfigurasi terbaik, skor MRR dan MAP kami melebihi keadaan seni saat ini dengan antara 3 dan 5 poin pada kedua versi dari set tes TREC Pemilihan Jawab, set data standar untuk tugas ini.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein System für die Antwortauswahl, das eine feingranulare Fragenklassifikation mit einem Deep Learning Modell für die Antwortauswahl integriert. Wir beschreiben die notwendigen Änderungen an der Taxonomie und dem System der Fragenklassifikation, die Schaffung eines neuen Entity Identification Systems und Methoden zur Hervorhebung von Entitäten, um dieses Ziel zu erreichen. Unsere Experimente zeigen, dass Question Classes ein starkes Signal für Deep Learning Modelle für die Antwortauswahl sind und es uns ermöglichen, den aktuellen Stand der Technik in allen Variationen unserer Experimente außer einer zu übertreffen. In der besten Konfiguration übertreffen unsere MRR- und MAP-Scores den aktuellen Stand der Technik um drei bis fünf Punkte auf beiden Versionen des TREC Answer Selection Testsets, einem Standarddatensatz für diese Aufgabe.', 'fa': 'ما یک سیستم برای انتخاب پاسخ را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که با یک مدل یادگیری عمیق طراحی برای انتخاب پاسخ\u200cبندی سوال\u200cهای پاکیزه\u200cای را جمع می\u200cکند. ما تغییرات نیاز را برای تغییرات تاکسونوم و سیستم شناسایی سوال، ایجاد یک سیستم شناسایی واحد جدید و روش\u200cهایی برای برق این هدف، تفصیل می\u200cکنیم. آزمایشات ما نشان می دهند که کلاس سوال یک سیگنال قوی برای مدل یادگیری عمیق برای انتخاب پاسخ هستند و اجازه می دهند که موقعیت فعلی هنر را در تمام تغییرات آزمایشات ما به جز یک انجام دهیم. در بهترین پیکربندی، امتیاز MRR و MAP ما موقعیت فعلی هنر را بین ۳ و ۵ نقطه در هر دو نسخهٔ امتحان انتخاب پاسخ TREC، یک مجموعه داده\u200cهای استاندارد برای این کار انجام می\u200cدهند.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuweka mfumo wa Uchaguzi wa Jibu unaohamasisha Tamko la Swali lililofanikiwa vizuri na modeli ya Ufunzi wa kina inayotengenezwa kwa ajili ya Uchaguzi wa Jibu. Tunaelezea mabadiliko yanayohitajika kwa ajili ya utaratibu wa Tamko na mfumo, kutengeneza mfumo mpya wa Kutambua Ujadala wa Enterprise na njia za kuonyesha vitu ili kupata lengo hili. Majaribio yetu yanaonyesha kuwa darasa la Maswali ni ishara yenye nguvu kwa mifano ya Mafunzo ya Kideep kwa ajili ya Uchaguzi wa Jibu, na kutuwezesha kuendelea hali ya sasa ya sanaa katika tofauti zote za majaribio yetu isipokuwa moja tu. Katika uthibitisho mzuri zaidi, vipindi vyetu vya MRR na MAP vinavyoonyesha hali ya sasa ya sanaa kwa kati ya pointi 3 na 5 kwenye toleo la vipimo vya Uchaguzi wa TREC, seti ya takwimu za kawaida kwa kazi hii.', 'tr': 'Biz janlaşma Saýlawy üçin bir sistemi görkezýäris. Ýeri jogap saýlawy üçin düzümlenmiş gaty öwrenme nusgasyny bilen birleştirir. Biz sorag klasifikasyonuň we sistemasyna gerekli üýtgewleri, bu maksady ýetmek üçin täze bir Entiteit Kimligi Sistemi we Ýagtylama sistemasyny bejerdik. Biziň deneylerimiz sorag klaslarymyz Garyp Öwrenme nusgalarynyň Jogap Saýlamak üçin güýçli sinyaldir we biziň sungatyň häzirki durumyny hemme deneylerimiziň üýtgeşiklerinden başga etmegimizi mümkin edip bilýäris. Iň gowy konfigurasiýada, MRR we MAP sanatyň häzirki durumyny TREC Jogap Saýlawyň iki sany arasynda 3 we 5 puç arasynda üstine çykýar, bu zadyň standart veri setidi.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një sistem për zgjedhjen e përgjigjeve që integron klasifikimin e pyetjeve të holla me një model mësimi të thellë të dizajnuar për zgjedhjen e përgjigjeve. Ne detalizojmë ndryshimet e nevojshme në taksonominë dhe sistemin e klasifikimit të pyetjeve, krijimin e një sistemi të ri të Identifikimit të njësisë dhe metodat e theksimit të njësive për të arritur këtë objektiv. Eksperimentet tona tregojnë se klasat e pyetjeve janë një sinjal i fortë për modelet e mësimit të thellë për zgjedhjen e përgjigjeve, dhe na lejojnë të mbizotërojmë gjendjen aktuale të artit në të gjitha variacionet e eksperimenteve tona përveç një. Në konfigurimin më të mirë, rezultatet tona të MRR dhe MAP-së kalojnë gjendjen aktuale të teknologjisë me 3 deri 5 pikë në të dy versionet e grupit TREC për zgjedhjen e zgjedhjes së përgjigjeve, një grup të dhënash standard për këtë detyrë.', 'am': 'የመልስ ምርጫዎች ለጥያቄ መግለጫ እና ስብስብ፣ ይህንን አካባቢ ለማግኘት አዲስ የስህተት ማውቀት እና ማቀናጃ ማድረግ የሚችሉትን ለውጦች እናብራራለን፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን የጥያቄ ክፍሎች ለጥልቅ ትምህርት መተማር ሞዴላዎችን እንደሚያሳየው እና ከፈተናችን በቀር አንድ በቀር የአንዱን ልዩ ልዩነት የዐርስ ሁኔታ ማውጣትን እናስችላለን፡፡ በመልካም ምርጫዎች ውስጥ MRR እና MAP ነጥቦች የአሁኑን ሁኔታ በ3 እና 5 ነጥቦች መካከል በTREC የመምረጥ መልስ ፈተና ጥናት በሁለቱም ክፍሎች ላይ ያስተካክሉ፤ ለዚህ ስራ የተመደበ ዳታዎችን ማሰናከል።', 'af': "Ons voorsien 'n stelsel vir Antwoord Keuse wat integreer fyn-graan Vrag Klassifikasie met 'n Deep Leer Model wat vir Antwoord Keuse ontwerp is. Ons beëindig die nodige veranderinge aan die Fraag Klassifikasie taksonomie en stelsel, die skepping van 'n nuwe Entiteit Identifikasie stelsel en metodes van verligting entiteite om hierdie doel te bereik. Ons eksperimente wys dat Fraag Klasse 'n sterk sein is vir Deep Leer Modelle vir Antwoord Keuse, en aktiveer ons om die huidige staat van die kuns te uitvoer in alle veranderinge van ons eksperimente behalwe een. In die beste opstelling, ons MRR en MAP tel uitvoer die huidige staat van die kuns deur tussen 3 en 5 punte op beide weergawe van die TREC Antwoord Keuse Toestel stel, 'n standaard datastel vir hierdie taak.", 'hr': 'Predstavljamo sustav za izbor odgovora koji integrira klasifikaciju ispitivanja sa model dubokog učenja dizajniranim za izbor odgovora. Objašnjavamo potrebne promjene taksonomije i sustava klasifikacije pitanja, stvaranje novog sustava identifikacije entiteta i metode osvjetljavanja subjekta kako bi postigli taj cilj. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su klase pitanja jaki signal za model dubokog učenja za odabire odgovora i omogućavaju nam da izvršimo trenutno stanje umjetnosti u svim različitim našim eksperimentima osim jednog. U najboljoj konfiguraciji, naši MRR i MAP rezultati iznosi trenutno stanje umjetnosti između 3 i 5 bodova na obje verzije određenog ispitivanja TREC odgovornog izbora, standardnog set a podataka za ovaj zadatak.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք պատասխանների ընտրության համակարգ, որը ինտեգրում է գեղեցիկ հարցերի դասակարգը խորը սովորելու մոդելի հետ, որը նախագծված է պատասխանների ընտրության համար: Մենք բացատրում ենք հարցերի դասակարգման դասակարգման տաքսոնոմիայի և համակարգի անհրաժեշտ փոփոխությունները, նոր անհատականության հայտնաբերման համակարգի ստեղծման և անհատականությունների նշանակման մեթոդներ այս նպատակի հասնելու համար: Մեր փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ հարցերի դասերը խորը ազդանշան են պատասխանների ընտրության խորը սովորելու մոդելներին և հնարավորություն են տալիս մեզ գերազանցել մեր փորձարկումների բոլոր տարբերակներում, բացի մեկից: Լավագույն կառուցվածքի մեջ մեր ՄՌՌ և MAP գնահատականները գերազանցում են ներկայիս տեխնոլոգիաները 3-5 միավորով այս խնդրի համար ստանդարտ տվյալների կառուցվածքի երկու տարբերակների վրա:', 'ca': "Presentam un sistema de selecció de respostes que integra la classificació de preguntes fines amb un model d'aprenentatge profund dissenyat per seleccionar respostes. Detallem els canvis necessaris en la taxonomia i el sistema de classificació de preguntes, la creació d'un nou sistema d'identificació de les entitats i els mètodes de destacar les entitats per aconseguir aquest objectiu. Els nostres experiments demostren que les classes de preguntes són un senyal fort als models d'aprenentatge profund per a seleccionar respostes, i ens permeten superar l'estat actual d'art en totes les variacions dels nostres experiments excepte un. En la millor configuració, les puntuacions MRR i MAP superen l'estat actual d'art entre 3 i 5 punts en les dues versions del conjunt de prova TREC de selecció de resposta, un conjunt de dades estàndard per aquesta tasca.", 'az': 'Cevap seçmək üçün müəyyən edilən sual klasifikasiyasını, cavab seçmək üçün müəyyən edilən derin öyrənmə modeli ilə birləşdiririk. Biz sual klasifikasiyasının taxonomiya və sisteminin ehtiyacı olan dəyişikliklərini, bu məqsədilə yetişmək üçün yeni Entity Identification sistemini və şəkildə işıqlandırma metodlarını təmizləyirik. Bizim eksperimentlərimiz sual Sınıfələri, cavab seçmək üçün derin öyrənmə modellərinə qüvvətli sinyal olduğunu göstərir və bizi həmin təcrübələrimizin hər cür dəyişikliklərində təşkil etməyə qadirdir. Ən yaxşı konfigurasiyada, MRR və MAP nöqtələrimiz sanatın günlük durumunu TREC Cevap Seçmə sınamasının iki versiyonu ilə 3-5 nöqtələrin arasında, bu işin standart veri qurulması ilə istifadə edir.', 'bn': 'আমরা উত্তর নির্বাচনের জন্য একটি সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করি যা উত্তর নির্বাচনের জন্য নির্বাচনের জন্য নির্ধারিত গভীর শিক্ষা মডেলের সাথে ভালো  প্রশ্নের ক্লাসিকেশন ট্যাক্সোনোমি এবং সিস্টেমের প্রয়োজনীয় পরিবর্তন আমরা বিস্তারিত বর্ণনা করি, এই উদ্দেশ্য অর্জনের জন্য নতুন এন্টিটি পরিচয় আমাদের পরীক্ষাগুলো দেখাচ্ছে যে প্রশ্ন ক্লাস গভীর শিক্ষার মডেলের জন্য একটি শক্তিশালী সিগন্যাল, এবং আমাদের এক পরীক্ষার ব্যতীত বর্তমান পরীক্ষার বর্তম সর্বোচ্চ কনফিগারেশনে আমাদের MRR এবং MAP স্কোর তিন থেকে ৫ পয়েন্টের মধ্যে বর্তমান শিল্পের অবস্থা প্রদর্শন করে ট্রিটিসি উত্তর নির্বাচন পরীক্ষার উভয় সংস্', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo sistem za izbor odgovora koji integrira klasifikaciju ispitivanja sa model dubokog učenja dizajniranim za izbor odgovora. Mi detaljno objašnjavamo potrebne promjene taksonomije i sustava klasifikacije pitanja, stvaranje novog sustava identifikacije entiteta i metode osvjetljavanja entiteta za postizanje ovog cilja. Naši eksperimenti pokazuju da su klase pitanja jaki signal za model dubokog učenja za odabire odgovora i omogućavaju nam da izvršimo trenutno stanje umjetnosti u svim varijacijama naših eksperimenata osim jedne. U najboljoj konfiguraciji, naši MRR i MAP rezultati iznose trenutno stanje umjetnosti između 3 i 5 bodova na obje verzije set a testa TREC odgovora na izbor, standardnu setu podataka za ovaj zadatak.', 'cs': 'Představujeme systém pro výběr odpovědi, který integruje jemnou klasifikaci otázek s modelem Deep Learning určeným pro výběr odpovědi. Popisujeme potřebné změny taxonomie a systému klasifikace otázek, vytvoření nového systému identifikace entit a metody zvýraznění entit k dosažení tohoto cíle. Naše experimenty ukazují, že třídy otázek jsou silným signálem pro modely hlubokého učení pro výběr odpovědí a umožňují nám překonat současný stav techniky ve všech variantách našich experimentů kromě jednoho. V nejlepší konfiguraci naše skóre MRR a MAP překonávají současný stav techniky o tři až pět bodů v obou verzích testovací sady TREC Answer Selection, standardní sady dat pro tento úkol.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme vastausvalintajรคrjestelmรคn, joka integroi hienojakoisen kysymysluokituksen vastausvalintaan suunniteltuun syvรคoppimismalliin. Esitรคmme yksityiskohtaisesti tarvittavat muutokset kysymysluokituksen taksonomiaan ja jรคrjestelmรครคn, uuden entiteettitunnistusjรคrjestelmรคn luomisen ja menetelmien yksilรถimiseksi tรคmรคn tavoitteen saavuttamiseksi. Kokeemme osoittavat, ettรค kysymysluokat ovat vahva signaali Deep Learning malleille vastausvalintaa varten ja antavat meille mahdollisuuden ylittรครค nykytekniikan kaikissa kokeilujemme variaatioissa yhtรค lukuun ottamatta. Parhaassa kokoonpanossa MRR- ja MAP-pisteemme ylittรคvรคt nykytekniikan 3โ\x80\x935 pisteellรค TREC Answer Selection -testisarjan molemmissa versioissa, jotka ovat tรคmรคn tehtรคvรคn vakioaineisto.', 'et': 'Esitleme vastuste valimise süsteemi, mis ühendab täpse küsimuste klassifitseerimise sügavõppe mudeliga, mis on mõeldud vastuste valimiseks. Üksikasjalikult kirjeldame küsimuste klassifitseerimise taksonoomia ja süsteemi vajalikke muudatusi, uue üksuste identifitseerimise süsteemi loomist ja üksuste esiletõstmise meetodeid selle eesmärgi saavutamiseks. Meie eksperimendid näitavad, et küsimusklassid on tugev signaal sügavõppe mudelitele vastuste valimiseks ja võimaldavad meil ületada praegust tehnika taset kõigis meie eksperimentide variatsioonides, välja arvatud üks. Parimal konfiguratsioonil ületavad meie MRR- ja MAP-skoorid praegust tehnika taset 3–5 punkti võrra TREC Answer Selection testikomplekti mõlemas versioonis, mis on selle ülesande standardne andmekogum.', 'jv': "Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem kanggo Répongan Balian sing isih perusahaan kelas kang kelas barang nggawe barang kelas deep Awak dhéwé ngerti perusahaan langgar kanggo Kemerdekaan Karo Sistem Kelangang Pangan Where's the question Nang pengaturan sing luwih apik, MRR karo MAP nambah sing gak dhéwé ngerasai pertama karo 3 lan 5 punti nang sampek durungé perusahaan TRUE Jawisan Keterarané", 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מערכת לבחירה של תשובות שמשלכת שיגור שאלות מעולה עם מודל למידה עמוקה מעוצב לבחירה של תשובות. אנו מפרטים את השינויים הנדרשים למקסנומיה ומערכת שידור השאלות, ליצור מערכת זיהוי איכויות חדשה ושיטות להדגיש איכויות כדי להשיג את המטרה הזאת. הניסויים שלנו מראים כי שיעורי שאלות הם אות חזק לדוגמאות ללימודים עמוקים לבחירת תשובות, ואפשר לנו להעביר את מצב האמנות הנוכחי בכל שונות הניסויים שלנו מלבד אחד. במסדרה הטובה ביותר, הציונים שלנו MRR ו MAP מעלים את מצב האמנות הנוכחי בין 3 ל-5 נקודות בשני הגרסאות של קבוצת מבחן התשובה TREC, קבוצת נתונים סטנדרטית למשימה זו.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo sistem za izbiro odgovorov, ki združuje natančno klasifikacijo vprašanj z modelom globokega učenja, ki je zasnovan za izbiro odgovorov. Podrobno opisujemo potrebne spremembe taksonomije in sistema klasifikacije vprašanj, oblikovanje novega sistema identifikacije subjektov in metode poudarjanja subjektov za dosego tega cilja. Naši eksperimenti kažejo, da so razredi vprašanj močan signal modelom globokega učenja za izbiro odgovorov in nam omogočajo, da presežemo trenutno stanje tehnike v vseh različicah naših eksperimentov, razen enega. V najboljši konfiguraciji naši rezultati MRR in MAP presegajo trenutno stanje tehnike za 3 do 5 točk v obeh različicah testiranja TREC Answer Selection, standardnega nabora podatkov za to opravilo.', 'ha': "Tuna gabatar da wani tsarin Jafi wanda ke haɗa Shirin Jarrawa na Nafi da wani misali na Shirin Lõkaci na Deƙas wanda aka ƙayyade wa Zaɓa. Tuna bayyana musanyoyin da aka buƙata zuwa taxenomi na Kwamfyuta da Kwamfyuta, an ƙiƙiro wani na'urar Jayyar Intity da shiryoyin ayuka da za'a iya sãmun wannan objective. Our experiments show that Question Classes are a strong signal to Deep Learning models for Answer Selection, and enable us to outperform the current state of the art in all variations of our experiments except one.  In da tsari mafi kyãwo, MRR da MAP scores na zartar da halin sanar da ke kai yanzu a tsakanin 3 da 5 points kan duk versiyori na Jaɓãn na TREC, wata tsarin da aka daidaita zaɓa wa wannan aikin.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དུས་མཐུན་གདམ་པ་ལ་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོན་པ་དེ་རྨན་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་གྲྭར་ཞིག་གི་དབྱེ་རིགས ང་ཚོས་དྲི་ཚིག་གི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་རིམ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་དགོས་པ་ཚོར་གསལ་བཤད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། Our experiments show that Question Classes are a strong signal to Deep Learning models for Answer Selection, and enable us to outperform the current state of the art in all variations of our experiments except one. In the best configuration, our MRR and MAP scores outperform the current state of the art by 3 and 5 points on both versions of the TREC Answer Selection test set, a standard dataset for this task.'}
{'en': 'Modeling Semantics with Gated Graph Neural Networks for Knowledge Base Question Answering', 'ar': 'نمذجة الدلالات باستخدام الشبكات العصبية للرسم البياني المسور للإجابة على أسئلة قاعدة المعرفة', 'pt': 'Modelagem semântica com redes neurais de grafo fechado para respostas a perguntas da base de conhecimento', 'fr': 'Modélisation de la sémantique avec des réseaux neuronaux à graphes fermés pour la réponse aux questions', 'es': 'Modelado de semántica con redes neuronales de gráficos cerrados para la respuesta a preguntas', 'ja': 'ナレッジベースの質問に対する回答のためのゲーテッドグラフニューラルネットワークを使用した意味論のモデリング', 'zh': '用门控图神经网络建模于语义,施于知识库问', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए गेटेड ग्राफ तंत्रिका नेटवर्क के साथ मॉडलिंग शब्दार्थ', 'ru': 'Моделирование семантики с помощью нейронных сетей с синхронным графиком для ответа на вопросы базы знаний', 'ga': 'Séimeantaic a Shamhaltú le Líonraí Néaracha Graif Gated le haghaidh Freagra ar Cheisteanna ar Bhonn Eolais', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Μοντελοποίηση Σημαντικών με Gated Graph Νευρικά Δίκτυα για την Απάντηση Ερωτήσεων Βάσης Γνώσης', 'hu': 'Szemantika modellezése Gated Graph Neurális hálózatokkal a tudásbázis kérdéseinek megválaszolásához', 'it': 'Modellare la semantica con reti neurali Gated Graph per rispondere alle domande della Knowledge Base', 'kk': 'Білім негізгі сұрақ жауап беру үшін біріктірілген графикалық невралдық желілер үлгілеу', 'lt': 'Semantikų modeliavimas naudojant tinklus, skirtus atsakymui į žiniomis pagrįstus klausimus', 'mk': 'Моделирање на семантиките со неурални мрежи за одговори на прашањата на базата на знаење', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തെ ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200d', 'no': 'Modelering av semantikk med gated graph neural networks for kunnskapsbasespørsmål', 'mt': 'L-immudellar ta’ Semanti b’Netwerks Newrali ta’ Grafika Miġbura għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet ibbażati fuq l-Għarfien', 'pl': 'Modelowanie semantyki z Gated Graph Sieci neuronowe dla odpowiedzi na pytania bazy wiedzy', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь асуулт хариултын төлөө Gated Graph Neural Networks-тэй Semantics модель', 'ms': 'Name', 'ro': 'Modelarea semanticei cu rețele neurale Gated Graph pentru răspunsul la întrebările bazei de cunoștințe', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Modeliranje semantika sa neuralnim mrežama grafika za odgovor na pitanje baze znanja', 'sv': 'Modellera semantik med Gated Graph Neural Networks för att besvara kunskapsbasens frågeställningar', 'ta': 'அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை கேள்விக்கு பதிலளிக்கப்பட்ட நெருக்கல் வலைப்பின்னல் மாதிரியான செமான்டிக்ஸ்', 'so': 'Modeling Semantics with Gated Graph Neural Network for Knowledge Basic Questions', 'ur': 'علم Base سوال جواب کے لئے گراف نئورل نیٹورک کے ساتھ سیمانٹیکس مدل کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ trung thành với các mạng thần kinh của máy đồ họa kết hợp cho câu hỏi.', 'bg': 'Моделиране на семантика с неврални мрежи за отговор на въпроси от базата знания', 'nl': 'Semantica modelleren met Gated Graph Neural Networks voor het beantwoorden van vragen in de kennisbank', 'da': 'Modellering af semantik med Gated Graph Neurale Netværk til besvarelse af spørgsmål fra videnbasen', 'hr': 'Modeliranje semantika sa neuralnim mrežama grafika za odgovor na pitanja baze znanja', 'de': 'Modellierung von Semantik mit Gated Graph Neuronalen Netzwerken für die Beantwortung von Fragen in der Wissensdatenbank', 'id': 'Modeling Semantik dengan Jaringan Neural Graf Gated untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Basa Pengetahuan', 'sw': 'Semantiki za Modeling with Negro Graph for Knowledge Response to Question Base of Knowledge', 'fa': 'Modeling Semantics with Gated Graph Neural Networks for Knowledge Base Question', 'ko': '문 제어도 신경 네트워크 기반 지식 라이브러리 문답 의미 모델링', 'tr': 'Bilgi Base sorgular cevap için Gated Graph Nöral Ağları ile semantik düzenleme', 'sq': 'Modelimi i Semantikave me rrjetet neuronale të grafikut të portuar për përgjigjet e pyetjeve të bazuara në njohuri', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የእውቀት መደብ ጥያቄ', 'hy': 'Գիտության հիմնական հարցերի պատասխանի նյարդային ցանցերով', 'az': 'Bilim Basi sual cavab verm톛k 칲칞칲n Gated Graph N칬ral Netikl톛ri il톛 Semantik modell톛ri', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিক প্রশ্নের উত্তর দিয়ে গেট গ্রাফ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক দিয়ে মডেলিং সেমান্টিক', 'bs': 'Modeliranje semantika sa neuralnim mrežama grafika za odgovor na pitanje baze znanja', 'ca': 'Modelar Semàtics amb xarxes neurals portades per respondre a preguntes basades en el coneixement', 'cs': 'Modelování sémantiky s Gated Graph Neurální sítě pro zodpovězení otázek znalostní báze', 'et': 'Semantika modelleerimine värvitud graafika neuraalsete võrkudega teabebaasi küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'Semantiikan mallintaminen Gated Graph Neural Networks for Knowledge Base Question Answering', 'jv': 'Layout semanti karo gated Graph Neral Network nggo Kemerdekaan Panjenengan Bilih', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'דוגמנית סמנטיקה עם רשתות נוירוליות גרפים משולבות לענות על שאלות בסיס ידע', 'sk': 'Modeliranje semantike z živčnimi omrežji Gated Graph za odgovarjanje na vprašanja zbirke znanja', 'bo': 'Modeling Semantics with Gated Graph Neural Networks for Knowledge Base Question Answering'}
{'en': 'The most approaches to Knowledge Base Question Answering are based on semantic parsing. In this paper, we address the problem of learning vector representations for complex semantic parses that consist of multiple entities and relations. Previous work largely focused on selecting the correct semantic relations for a question and disregarded the structure of the semantic parse : the connections between entities and the directions of the relations. We propose to use Gated Graph Neural Networks to encode the graph structure of the semantic parse. We show on two data sets that the graph networks outperform all baseline models that do not explicitly model the structure. The error analysis confirms that our approach can successfully process complex semantic parses.', 'ar': 'تستند معظم طرق الإجابة على أسئلة قاعدة المعارف إلى التحليل الدلالي. في هذه الورقة ، نتناول مشكلة تعلم تمثيلات المتجهات للتحليلات الدلالية المعقدة التي تتكون من كيانات وعلاقات متعددة. ركز العمل السابق إلى حد كبير على اختيار العلاقات الدلالية الصحيحة لسؤال ما وتجاهل بنية التحليل الدلالي: الروابط بين الكيانات واتجاهات العلاقات. نقترح استخدام شبكات Gated Graph Neural لتشفير بنية الرسم البياني للتحليل الدلالي. نوضح في مجموعتين من البيانات أن شبكات الرسم البياني تتفوق في الأداء على جميع النماذج الأساسية التي لا تمثل الهيكل بشكل صريح. يؤكد تحليل الخطأ أن نهجنا يمكنه معالجة التحليلات الدلالية المعقدة بنجاح.', 'pt': 'A maioria das abordagens de resposta a perguntas da base de conhecimento são baseadas na análise semântica. Neste artigo, abordamos o problema de aprender representações vetoriais para análises semânticas complexas que consistem em múltiplas entidades e relações. O trabalho anterior se concentrou amplamente na seleção das relações semânticas corretas para uma pergunta e desconsiderava a estrutura da análise semântica: as conexões entre entidades e as direções das relações. Propomos usar Redes Neurais Gated Graph para codificar a estrutura do grafo da análise semântica. Mostramos em dois conjuntos de dados que as redes de grafos superam todos os modelos de linha de base que não modelam explicitamente a estrutura. A análise de erros confirma que nossa abordagem pode processar com sucesso análises semânticas complexas.', 'es': 'La mayoría de los enfoques para responder a preguntas de la base de conocimientos se basan en el análisis semántico. En este artículo, abordamos el problema de aprender representaciones vectoriales para análisis semánticos complejos que consisten en múltiples entidades y relaciones. El trabajo anterior se centró en gran medida en seleccionar las relaciones semánticas correctas para una pregunta y no tuvo en cuenta la estructura del análisis semántico: las conexiones entre las entidades y las direcciones de las relaciones. Proponemos utilizar redes neuronales de gráficos cerrados para codificar la estructura gráfica del análisis semántico. Mostramos en dos conjuntos de datos que las redes de gráficos superan a todos los modelos de referencia que no modelan explícitamente la estructura. El análisis de errores confirma que nuestro enfoque puede procesar con éxito análisis semánticos complejos.', 'fr': "La plupart des approches de réponse aux questions de la base de connaissances sont basées sur l'analyse sémantique. Dans cet article, nous abordons le problème de l'apprentissage des représentations vectorielles pour des analyses sémantiques complexes constituées de plusieurs entités et relations. Les travaux précédents étaient largement axés sur la sélection des relations sémantiques correctes pour une question et ignoraient la structure de l'analyse sémantique\xa0: les connexions entre les entités et les directions des relations. Nous proposons d'utiliser des réseaux neuronaux à graphes fermés pour coder la structure graphique de l'analyse sémantique. Nous montrons sur deux ensembles de données que les réseaux de graphes surpassent tous les modèles de base qui ne modélisent pas explicitement la structure. L'analyse des erreurs confirme que notre approche peut traiter avec succès des analyses sémantiques complexes.", 'ja': 'ナレッジベースの質問に対する回答の最も重要なアプローチは、セマンティック解析に基づいています。本稿では、複数の実体と関係からなる複雑な意味論的構文の学習ベクトル表現の問題について述べる。これまでの研究は、主に質問に対する正しい意味関係の選択に焦点を当て、意味論的構文の構造：実体間のつながりと関係の方向性を無視していた。ゲーテッドグラフニューラルネットワークを使用して、セマンティックパースのグラフ構造をエンコードすることを提案します。グラフネットワークは、構造を明示的にモデル化しないすべてのベースラインモデルよりも優れていることを2つのデータセットで示しています。エラー分析は、私たちのアプローチが複雑な意味解析を正常に処理できることを確認しています。', 'ru': 'Большинство подходов к ответам на вопросы базы знаний основаны на семантическом разборе. В данной работе мы рассмотрим проблему обучения векторным представлениям для сложных семантических синтаксических разборов, которые состоят из множества сущностей и отношений. Предыдущая работа была в значительной степени сосредоточена на выборе правильных семантических отношений для вопроса и игнорировала структуру семантического анализа: связи между сущностями и направления отношений. Мы предлагаем использовать Gated Graph Neural Networks для кодирования структуры графа семантического анализа. Мы показываем на двух наборах данных, что графовые сети превосходят все базовые модели, которые явно не моделируют структуру. Анализ ошибок подтверждает, что наш подход может успешно обрабатывать сложные семантические синтаксические разборы.', 'hi': 'नॉलेज बेस प्रश्न उत्तर देने के लिए सबसे अधिक दृष्टिकोण शब्दार्थ पार्सिंग पर आधारित हैं। इस पेपर में, हम जटिल शब्दार्थ पार्स के लिए वेक्टर अभ्यावेदन सीखने की समस्या को संबोधित करते हैं जिसमें कई संस्थाएं और संबंध शामिल हैं। पिछला काम काफी हद तक एक प्रश्न के लिए सही शब्दार्थ संबंधों का चयन करने पर केंद्रित था और शब्दार्थ पार्स की संरचना की उपेक्षा की: संस्थाओं और संबंधों की दिशाओं के बीच कनेक्शन। हम शब्दार्थ पार्स की ग्राफ संरचना को एन्कोड करने के लिए गेटेड ग्राफ न्यूरल नेटवर्क का उपयोग करने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम दो डेटा सेट पर दिखाते हैं कि ग्राफ नेटवर्क उन सभी बेसलाइन मॉडलों से आगे निकल जाते हैं जो स्पष्ट रूप से संरचना को मॉडल नहीं करते हैं। त्रुटि विश्लेषण पुष्टि करता है कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण जटिल शब्दार्थ पार्स को सफलतापूर्वक संसाधित कर सकता है।', 'zh': '知识库问答多方略,皆出于语义。 本文解体语义解析学向量。 前事要在择正语义,而忽语义解析之结构,实体之所系向。 臣等请用门控图神经网络编码于语义解析图。 两数集上明,图网络之性,优于未显建模结构之基线。 误析证实,吾道能成杂语义解析。', 'ga': 'Tá na cineálacha cur chuige is mó maidir le Freagra ar Cheisteanna ar Bhonn Eolais bunaithe ar pharsáil shéimeantach. Sa pháipéar seo, tugaimid aghaidh ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le huiríll veicteora foghlama le haghaidh parsaí shéimeantacha casta a chuimsíonn aonáin agus caidrimh iolracha. Dhírigh obair roimhe seo den chuid is mó ar an gcaidreamh shéimeantach cearta a roghnú le haghaidh ceiste agus thug sí neamhaird ar struchtúr na parse shéimeantaí: na naisc idir eintitis agus treoracha an chaidrimh. Tá sé beartaithe againn Gated Graph Neural Networks a úsáid chun struchtúr graf na parse shéimeantaí a ionchódú. Léirímid ar dhá thacar sonraí go sáraíonn na líonraí graif na samhlacha bonnlíne go léir nach múnlaíonn an struchtúr go sainráite. Deimhníonn an anailís earráide gur féidir lenár gcur chuige parsaí shéimeantacha casta a phróiseáil go rathúil.', 'hu': 'A tudásbázis kérdések megválaszolásának legtöbb megközelítése szemantikai elemzésen alapul. Jelen tanulmányban a több entitásból és kapcsolatból álló komplex szemantikai elemezések vektorreprezentációinak tanulásának problémáját foglalkozunk. Az előző munkák nagyrészt a helyes szemantikai kapcsolatok kiválasztására összpontosítottak egy kérdéshez, és figyelmen kívül hagyták a szemantikai elemzés struktúráját: az entitások és a kapcsolatok irányait. A Gated Graph Neural Networks használatát javasoljuk a szemantikai elemzés grafikonszerkezetének kódolására. Két adatkészleten megmutatjuk, hogy a grafikonhálózatok felülmúlják az összes olyan alapvető modellt, amely nem modellezi kifejezetten a struktúrát. A hibaelemzés megerősíti, hogy megközelítésünk sikeresen feldolgozható komplex szemantikai elemzések.', 'el': 'Οι περισσότερες προσεγγίσεις για την απάντηση ερωτήσεων της βάσης γνώσης βασίζονται στη σημασιολογική ανάλυση. Στην παρούσα εργασία, εξετάζουμε το πρόβλημα της εκμάθησης διανυσματικών αναπαραστάσεων για σύνθετες σημασιολογικές αναλύσεις που αποτελούνται από πολλαπλές οντότητες και σχέσεις. Η προηγούμενη εργασία επικεντρώθηκε σε μεγάλο βαθμό στην επιλογή των σωστών σημασιολογικών σχέσεων για μια ερώτηση και αγνοούσε τη δομή της σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης: τις συνδέσεις μεταξύ οντοτήτων και τις κατευθύνσεις των σχέσεων. Προτείνουμε να χρησιμοποιήσουμε Gated Graph Νευρικά Δίκτυα για να κωδικοποιήσουμε τη δομή γραφήματος της σημασιολογικής ανάλυσης. Δείχνουμε σε δύο σύνολα δεδομένων ότι τα δίκτυα γραφήματος ξεπερνούν όλα τα μοντέλα βάσης που δεν μοντελοποιούν ρητά τη δομή. Η ανάλυση σφαλμάτων επιβεβαιώνει ότι η προσέγγισή μας μπορεί να επεξεργαστεί με επιτυχία σύνθετες σημασιολογικές αναλύσεις.', 'ka': 'უფრო მეტი შესაძლებლობა იცნობების ბაზის პასუხისთვის პასუხისთვის დაბაზიან სმენტიკური პასუხისთვის. ამ წიგნაში, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ პრობლემა, რომელიც მრავალ ინტერციები და პრობლემების შემდეგ კომპლექსიკური სემონტიკური პარასებისთვის გასწავლების წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო მუშაოდ სემონტიკური შესახებ კითხვისთვის არჩევისთვის და სემონტიკური პასუზის სტრუქტურაციას გადაუყურება: ელექტიების და შესახებ შესახებ ჩვენ მინდა გამოყენოთ Gated Graph ნეიროლური ქსტრუქტურები, რომ სემონტიკური პარაზის გრაფიკის სტრუქტურის კოდირება. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ ორი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, რომ გრაფიკური ქსელები ყველა ფესლინის მოდელეების გამოყენება, რომლებიც სტრუქტურაციის არ შეცდომის ანალიზაცია დარწმუნება, რომ ჩვენი პროგრამის შესაძლებელად კომპლექსიკური სიმენტიკური პარაზაციების პროცესი.', 'it': "La maggior parte degli approcci alla risposta alle domande della Knowledge Base si basa sull'analisi semantica. In questo articolo, affrontiamo il problema dell'apprendimento delle rappresentazioni vettoriali per analisi semantiche complesse che consistono in più entità e relazioni. Il lavoro precedente si è concentrato in gran parte sulla selezione delle relazioni semantiche corrette per una domanda e ha trascurato la struttura del parse semantico: le connessioni tra entità e le direzioni delle relazioni. Proponiamo di utilizzare Gated Graph Neural Networks per codificare la struttura del grafico dell'analisi semantica. Mostriamo su due set di dati che le reti grafiche superano tutti i modelli di base che non modellano esplicitamente la struttura. L'analisi degli errori conferma che il nostro approccio può elaborare con successo analisi semantiche complesse.", 'lt': 'Didžiausias požiūris į atsakymus į žiniomis pagrįstus klausimus grindžiamas semantiniu analizavimu. Šiame dokumente sprendžiame problem ą, susijusią su mokymosi vektorių atstovavimu sudėtingiems semantiniams tyrimams, kuriuos sudaro keli subjektai ir santykiai. Ankstesniame darbe daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama teisingų semantinių santykių pasirinkimui klausimui ir nebuvo atsižvelgta į semantinių santykių struktūrą: ryšius tarp subjektų ir santykių kryptis. Siūlome naudoti Gated Graph Neural Networks, kad koduotume semantinės analizės grafikos struktūrą. Dviejuose duomenų rinkiniuose parodomi, kad grafikų tinklai viršija visus bazinius modelius, kurie aiškiai nepamodeliuoja struktūros. Klaidų analizė patvirtina, kad mūsų metodas gali sėkmingai apdoroti sudėtingus semantinius tyrimus.', 'ms': 'Kebanyakan pendekatan kepada Jawapan soalan Pangkalan Pengetahuan berdasarkan penghuraian semantik. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah pembelajaran perwakilan vektor untuk huraian semantik kompleks yang terdiri dari entiti berbilang dan hubungan. Kerja terdahulu berkonsentrasi pada memilih hubungan semantik yang betul untuk soalan dan mengabaikan struktur huraian semantik: sambungan antara entiti dan arah hubungan. Kami cadangkan untuk menggunakan Rangkaian Neural Graf Gated untuk mengekodkan struktur graf huraian semantik. Kami menunjukkan pada dua set data bahawa rangkaian graf melebihi semua model asas yang tidak secara eksplicit model struktur. Analisis ralat mengesahkan bahawa pendekatan kita boleh memproses huraian semantik kompleks dengan berjaya.', 'kk': 'Білім негізгі сұрақтардың жауаптарының көбірек жауаптары semantic талдауына негізделген. Бұл қағазда біз бірнеше бөліктер мен қатынастардан тұратын комплекс семантикалық талдау үшін векторды оқыту мәселесін шешуіміз. Алдыңғы жұмыс бір сұрақ үшін дұрыс семантикалық қатынасын таңдау үшін көбінесе семантикалық талдау құрылымының құрылымын қабылдамады: бірліктер мен қатынастардың қатынастары арасындағы қосылым. Семантикалық талдау графикасының графикалық құрылғысын кодтамыз. Біз екі деректер жинағында график желілер құрылғыны түсінікті үлгілемейтін бағдарламалардың негізгі үлгілерін жасайды. Қате анализиясы біздің тәсіліміздің комплекс семантикалық талдауды сәтті өзгертуге болады.', 'ml': 'അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലേക്ക് ഏറ്റവും അടുത്തുവരുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് ഉത്തരം സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിങ്ങിനെ  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രശ്നത്തെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അത് പല വസ് മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി ഒരു ചോദ്യത്തിന്റെ ശരിയായ സെമാന്റിക്ക് ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതിനായി ശ്രദ്ധിച്ച് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിന്റെ ഘ ഗേട്ട് ഗ്രാഫ് നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്വര്\u200dക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചെയ്യുന്നു. ആ സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസിന നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളില്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു, ഈ സ്ഥാനത്തെ പ്രത്യക്ഷമായി മോഡല്\u200d ചെയ്യാത്ത എല്ലാ ബേസ്ലൈന്\u200d  പിശക് അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നത് നമ്മുടെ സമ്പ്രദായം വിജയിച്ചു കൊണ്ട് സെമാന്റിക് പാര്\u200dസുകള്\u200d പ്രക്രിയയ', 'mt': 'L-aktar approċċi għat-tweġibiet għall-mistoqsijiet ibbażati fuq l-għarfien huma bbażati fuq analiżi semantika. F’dan id-dokument, nindirizzaw il-problema tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi tat-tagħlim għal analiżijiet semantiċi kumplessi li jikkonsistu f’entitajiet u relazzjonijiet multipli. Il-ħidma preċedenti ffukat l-aktar fuq l-għa żla tar-relazzjonijiet semantiċi korretti għal kwistjoni u injorat l-istruttura tal-analiżi semantika: il-konnessjonijiet bejn l-entitajiet u d-direzzjonijiet tar-relazzjonijiet. Aħna nipproponu li jintużaw Netwerks Newrali ta’ Grafika Miġbura biex tiġi kkodifikata l-istruttura tal-grafika tal-analiżi semantika. Intwera fuq żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta li n-netwerks tal-grafika jaqbżu l-mudelli ta’ bażi kollha li ma jimmudellawx espliċitament l-istruttura. L-analiżi tal-iżbalji tikkonferma li l-approċċ tagħna jista’ jipproċessa b’suċċess analiżijiet semantiċi kumplessi.', 'no': 'Dei meste tilnærmingane til kunnskapsbasespørsmålssvara er basert på semantisk tolking. I denne papiret vert vi oppretta problemet med å lære vektorrepresentasjonar for komplekse semantiske tolking som inneheld fleire einingar og relasjonar. Førre arbeid fokuserte stort på å velja korrekte semantiske forhold for eit spørsmål og ikkje gjera opp strukturen til semantiske tolking: tilkoplingane mellom einingar og retningane til forholdet. Vi foreslår å bruka Gated Graph Neural Nettverk for å koda grafstrukturen til semantiske tolking. Vi viser på to datasett at grafenettverka utfører alle grunnlinjesmodeller som ikkje eksplisiserer strukturen. Feilanalysen stadfestar at tilnærminga vårt kan handterast komplekse semantiske tolking.', 'mn': 'Мэдлэгийн суурь асуултын хариултын хамгийн ойлголт нь semantic parsing дээр суурилсан. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон бүтэц болон харилцаа бүрдсэн комплекс semantic хуваалцааны векторын илэрхийллийг суралцах асуудлыг асуудаг. Өмнөх ажлын тухай асуултын тухай зөв семантик харилцаа сонгохын тулд ихэвчлэн анхаарлаа төвлөрсөн бөгөөд семантик хуваалцааны бүтэц байгууллагын тухай харилцааны холбоотой холбоотой. Бид Gated Graph Neural Networks-г semantic parsing-ын график бүтцийг кодлохын тулд ашиглах гэсэн санал байна. Бид хоёр өгөгдлийн сүлжээнд график сүлжээний бүтээгдэхүүнийг тодорхой загварчлахгүй бүх суурь шугам загваруудыг дамжуулдаг гэдгийг харуулж байна. Алдаа асуудлын шинжилгээ нь бидний арга замыг амжилттай шинжилгээ хийж чадна.', 'pl': 'Największość podejść do odpowiedzi na pytania bazy wiedzy opiera się na parsowaniu semantycznym. W artykule poruszamy problem uczenia się reprezentacji wektorowych dla złożonych pars semantycznych składających się z wielu podmiotów i relacji. Poprzednie prace koncentrowały się w dużej mierze na wyborze właściwych relacji semantycznych dla danego pytania i lekceważyły strukturę parsy semantycznej: powiązania między jednostkami i kierunki relacji. Proponujemy użycie Gated Graph Neuroral Networks do zakodowania struktury wykresu parsy semantycznej. Na dwóch zbiorach danych pokazujemy, że sieci wykresów przewyższają wszystkie modele bazowe, które nie wyraźnie modelują struktury. Analiza błędów potwierdza, że nasze podejście potrafi z powodzeniem przetwarzać złożone parsy semantyczne.', 'ro': 'Cele mai multe abordări ale răspunsului la întrebări din baza de cunoștințe se bazează pe analizarea semantică. În această lucrare, abordăm problema învățării reprezentărilor vectoriale pentru parse semantice complexe care constau în mai multe entități și relații. Lucrările anterioare s-au concentrat în mare măsură pe selectarea relațiilor semantice corecte pentru o întrebare și au ignorat structura parsului semantic: conexiunile dintre entități și direcțiile relațiilor. Vă propunem să utilizați Gated Graph Neural Networks pentru a codifica structura grafică a parsului semantic. Aratăm pe două seturi de date că rețelele grafice depășesc toate modelele de referință care nu modelează în mod explicit structura. Analiza erorilor confirmă faptul că abordarea noastră poate procesa cu succes analize semantice complexe.', 'sr': 'Najveći pristup odgovoru na pitanja baze znanja osnovan je na semantičkom analizu. U ovom papiru rješavamo problem predstavljanja vektora za kompleksne semantičke analize koji se sastoje od višestrukih entiteta i odnosa. Prethodni rad se uglavnom fokusirao na biranje ispravnih semantičkih odnosa na pitanje i odbacivanje strukture semantičkog analiza: veze između entitata i upute odnosa. Predlažemo da koristimo Neuralne mreže Gated Graph za kodiranje grafske strukture semantičkog analiza. Pokazujemo na dva seta podataka da mreža grafika iznosi sve osnovne modele koje ne obrađuju strukturu. Analiza greške potvrđuje da naš pristup može uspešno procesirati kompleksne semantičke analize.', 'so': "Jawaabta su'aalaha aasaasiga ah ee aqoonta ugu dhaw waa baarlamaanka semantika. Warqadan waxaynu ka sheekeysanaynaa dhibaatada barashada wadiiqooyinka barashada ee kaniisadaha kamid ah oo ka mid ah maadooyin badan iyo xiriir kala duduwan. Shaqodii hore waxaa ugu horeeyay si badan loo doortay xiriirka saxda ah ee su'aal islamarkaasna uu diiday dhismaha baarlamaha semantika: xiriirka ay u dhexeeyaan dhamaanka iyo hagitaanka xiriirka. Waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan isticmaalno Gated Graph Neural Network si aan u kooban xarunta qoraalka baarlamaha semantic. Waxan ka muujinnaa labada macluumaad oo ku qoran in shabakada maamulka lagu qoro sameynta dhammaan tusaalooyin asal ah oo aan si cad u sameyn dhismaha. Analyska qaladka wuxuu xaqiijiyaa in qaababkayagu uu liibaansan karo baaritaanka halka kooxa.", 'mk': 'Најмногу пристапи до одговорите на прашањата на базата на знаење се базирани на семантична анализа. Во овој документ, го решаваме проблемот со учењето на представувањата на векторите за комплексни семантични анализи кои се состојат од повеќе ентитети и односи. Претходната работа во голема мера се фокусираше на изборот на правилните семантични односи за прашање и ја игнорираше структурата на семантичната анализа: врските помеѓу ентитетите и насоките на односите. Ние предложуваме да се користат Гејт Граф Неурални мрежи за кодирање на графската структура на семантичната анализа. We show on two data sets that the graph networks outperform all baseline models that do not explicitly model the structure.  Анализата на грешките потврдува дека нашиот пристап може успешно да процесира комплексни семантични анализи.', 'sv': 'De flesta tillvägagångssätt för kunskapsbasens frågesvar baseras på semantisk tolkning. I denna uppsats behandlar vi problemet med att lära sig vektorrepresentationer för komplexa semantiska tolkningar som består av flera entiteter och relationer. Tidigare arbete fokuserade till stor del på att välja rätt semantiska relationer för en fråga och bortsåg från strukturen i den semantiska tolkningen: kopplingarna mellan entiteter och riktningarna för relationerna. Vi föreslår att använda Gated Graph Neural Networks för att koda grafstrukturen i den semantiska tolkningen. Vi visar på två datauppsättningar att grafnätverken överträffar alla basmodeller som inte uttryckligen modellerar strukturen. Felanalysen bekräftar att vårt tillvägagångssätt framgångsrikt kan bearbeta komplexa semantiska tolkningar.', 'si': 'දැනගැනීම් මූලික ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරය ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් සෙමාන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණයේ  මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්පූර්ණ සෙමැන්ටික් ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සඳහා ප අපි ගේට්ඩ් ග්\u200dරාෆ් න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලවාර්ක්ස් පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා සෙමැන්ටික් විශ්ලේෂණය අපි දත්ත සටහන් දෙකට පෙන්වන්නේ ග්\u200dරාෆ් ජාලයේ සියළුම මොඩේල් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිකෘතියෙන්නේ නැති සියළ වැරදි විශ්ලේෂණය තහවුරු කරනවා අපේ පරීක්ෂණය සමහරවිට පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියා', 'ta': 'அறிவு அடிப்படை கேள்வி பதில் பெரும்பாலான நெருங்குதல் அருகில் உள்ளது. In this paper, we address the problem of learning vector representations for complex semantic parses that consist of multiple entities and relations.  முந்தைய வேலை பெரும்பாலாகவே ஒரு கேள்விக்கான சரியான பெம்பான்டிக் தொடர்பை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து பார்ச்சின் அமைப்பை தவிர் நாங்கள் கேட்டிட் வரைப்படம் நெயுரல் வலைப்பின்னல்களை பயன்படுத்த வேண்டும் என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். நாம் இரண்டு தரவு அமைப்புகளில் காட்டுகிறோம் வரைப்படத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல்கள் வெளிப்படையாக உருவமைப்பை மாதிரியாத பிழை அறிவிப்பு நம் முறைமையை வெற்றிகரமாக சிக்கலான அரை பார்ஸ் செயல்படுத்த முடியும் என்பதை உறுதிப்', 'ur': 'علم Base سوال جواب دینے کے زیادہ نزدیک ہیں سیمنٹی پارسینگ پر بنیاد ہیں. ہم اس کاغذ میں مشکل کی تعلیم ویکتوروں کی تعلیم کے لئے پیچیدہ سیمانٹیک پارس کے لئے مشکل کریں جو بہت سی اجتماعات اور رابطہ میں ہیں۔ اگلے کام ایک سوال کے لئے ٹھیک سیمنٹی رابطہ انتخاب کرنے کے لئے بہت بڑا منتظر ہوا اور سیمنٹی پارس کے ساختار کو نادیدہ کیا گیا: اتنی اور رابطہ کے درمیان رابطہ کی تعلق. ہم نے گیٹ گراف نیورال نیٹورک کا استعمال کرنا پیشنهاد کرتا ہے کہ سیمنٹی پارس کے گراف ساختار کو کوڈ کرے۔ ہم دو ڈیٹ سٹ پر دکھاتے ہیں کہ گراف نیٹ ورک تمام بنسلین نمڈلوں کو کامل نہیں کرتا۔ غلطی تحلیل کی تصدیق کرتی ہے کہ ہماری طریقہ موفق طور پر پیچیدہ سیمانٹیک پارس کرسکتی ہے.', 'uz': "Ogohlantirish asosiy savol javobi semantik parsing asosida. Bu qogʻozda, biz bir necha narsa va munosabatlarning bir necha bog'liqlarni o'rganish vektorning muammolarini boshqaramiz. Oldingi ishni savol uchun toʻgʻri semantik huquqlarini tanlash va semantik parcha tuzusining tuzilishini avto'g'ri qildi: entities орасида алоқалар ва алоқалар тўғрисида bogʻlash. Biz Gated Graph Neural Tarmoqlardan foydalanish uchun semantik parzning grafik structurini kodlash uchun talab qilamiz. We show on two data sets that the graph networks outperform all baseline models that do not explicitly model the structure.  Xatolarni aniqlash muvaffaqiyatli muvaffaqiyatli amalga oshirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Cách tiếp cận nhiều nhất với câu hỏi của Nhà tri thức là dựa trên ngữ pháp. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề các biểu tượng vector để học các phân tích văn học phức tạp gồm nhiều thực thể và quan hệ. Việc trước đây chủ yếu tập trung vào việc lựa chọn mối quan hệ ngữ pháp đúng đắn cho một câu hỏi và coi thường cấu trúc của phân biệt cơ bản: các mối liên hệ giữa các thực thể và hướng dẫn của các mối quan hệ. Chúng tôi đề xuất sử dụng các mạng thần kinh của đồ họa tụ tập để mã hóa cấu trúc đồ thị của các phân tách ngữ pháp. Chúng tôi cho thấy trên hai nhóm dữ liệu rằng các mạng đồ thị vượt trội tất cả các mô hình cơ bản mà không mô tả rõ ràng cấu trúc. Phân tích lỗi xác nhận phương pháp của chúng ta có thể xử lý các phân tích mẫu phức tạp.', 'bg': 'Повечето подходи към Отговаряне на въпроси от базата на знания се основават на семантично анализиране. В настоящата статия разглеждаме проблема с изучаването на векторни представяния за сложни семантични анализи, състоящи се от множество единици и връзки. Предишната работа до голяма степен се фокусира върху избора на правилните семантични връзки за даден въпрос и пренебрегва структурата на семантичния анализ: връзките между единиците и направленията на отношенията. Предлагаме да се използват неврални мрежи за кодиране на графичната структура на семантичния анализ. Показваме на два набора от данни, че графичните мрежи превъзхождат всички базови модели, които не моделират изрично структурата. Анализът на грешките потвърждава, че нашият подход може успешно да обработва сложни семантични анализи.', 'da': 'De fleste tilgange til Knowledge Base spørgsmål besvarelse er baseret på semantisk parsing. I denne artikel behandler vi problemet med at lære vektorrepræsentationer for komplekse semantiske fortolkninger, der består af flere entiteter og relationer. Tidligere arbejde fokuserede stort set på at vælge de korrekte semantiske relationer til et spørgsmål og ignorerede strukturen af den semantiske parse: forbindelserne mellem entiteter og retningerne af relationerne. Vi foreslår at bruge Gated Graph Neural Networks til at kode grafstrukturen i den semantiske parse. Vi viser på to datasæt, at grafnetværket overgår alle oprindelige modeller, der ikke udtrykkeligt modellerer strukturen. Fejlanalysen bekræfter, at vores tilgang med succes kan behandle komplekse semantiske fortolkninger.', 'hr': 'Najveći pristup odgovoru na pitanja baze znanja osnovan je na semantičkom analizu. U ovom papiru rješavamo problem predstavljanja vektora učenja kompleksnih semantičkih analiza koji se sastoji od višestrukih entitata i odnosa. Prethodni rad se uglavnom fokusirao na odabiru ispravnih semantičkih odnosa na pitanje i odbacivanje strukture semantičkog razmatranja: veze između subjekta i smjera odnosa. Predlažemo koristiti Neuralne mreže Gated Graph kako bi kodirali graf strukturu semantičkog analiza. Pokazujemo na dva seta podataka da mreža grafika iznosi svih osnovnih modela koji ne izražavaju strukturu. Analiza greške potvrđuje da naš pristup može uspješno procesirati kompleksne semantičke analize.', 'nl': 'De meeste benaderingen voor het beantwoorden van vragen in de Knowledge Base zijn gebaseerd op semantische parsing. In dit artikel behandelen we het probleem van het leren van vectorrepresentaties voor complexe semantische parsen die bestaan uit meerdere entiteiten en relaties. Eerder werk richtte zich grotendeels op het selecteren van de juiste semantische relaties voor een vraag en negeerde de structuur van de semantische parse: de verbindingen tussen entiteiten en de richtingen van de relaties. We stellen voor om Gated Graph Neural Networks te gebruiken om de grafiekstructuur van de semantische parse te coderen. We laten aan twee datasets zien dat de grafieknetwerken beter presteren dan alle basismodellen die de structuur niet expliciet modelleren. De foutanalyse bevestigt dat onze aanpak complexe semantische parsen succesvol kan verwerken.', 'de': 'Die meisten Ansätze zur Beantwortung von Fragen in der Wissensdatenbank basieren auf semantischem Parsing. In diesem Beitrag behandeln wir das Problem des Lernens von Vektorrepräsentationen für komplexe semantische Parsen, die aus mehreren Entitäten und Beziehungen bestehen. Bisherige Arbeiten konzentrierten sich weitgehend auf die Auswahl der richtigen semantischen Beziehungen für eine Frage und ignorierten die Struktur der semantischen Parse: die Verbindungen zwischen Entitäten und die Richtungen der Beziehungen. Wir schlagen vor, Gated Graph Neural Networks zu verwenden, um die Graphstruktur der semantischen Parse zu kodieren. Wir zeigen an zwei Datensätzen, dass die Graphennetzwerke alle Baseline-Modelle übertreffen, die die Struktur nicht explizit modellieren. Die Fehleranalyse bestätigt, dass unser Ansatz komplexe semantische Parses erfolgreich verarbeiten kann.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan pendekatan untuk Jawaban Pertanyaan Pangkalan Pengetahuan berdasarkan pemeriksaan semantis. Dalam kertas ini, kita mengatasi masalah mempelajari representation vektor untuk analisis semantis kompleks yang terdiri dari banyak entitas dan hubungan. Pekerjaan sebelumnya sangat fokus pada memilih hubungan semantis yang benar untuk pertanyaan dan mengabaikan struktur analisis semantis: koneksi antara entitas dan arah hubungan. Kami mengusulkan untuk menggunakan Gated Graph Neural Networks untuk mengkode struktur grafik dari analisis semantis. Kami menunjukkan pada dua set data bahwa jaringan grafik melebihi semua model dasar yang tidak secara eksplicit model struktur. Analisis kesalahan mengkonfirmasi bahwa pendekatan kita bisa dengan sukses memproses analisis semantis kompleks.', 'fa': 'بزرگترین دسترسی به پاسخ سوال بنیادی دانش بر اساس پرسیدن سنتی است. در این کاغذ، ما مشکل یادگیری ویکتورها را برای تجزیه\u200cهای semantic پیچیده درباره\u200cی تعلیم مشکل یادگیری را حل می\u200cکنیم که از تعلیم\u200cهای متعدد و ارتباط است. کار قبلی بیشتر روی انتخاب رابطه\u200cهای طبیعی درست برای یک سوال تمرکز می\u200cشود و ساختار تجزیه\u200cهای طبیعی را نادیده گرفت: ارتباط بین واحدها و رابطه\u200cهای رابطه\u200cها. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم از شبکه\u200cهای عصبی گراف دروازه استفاده کنیم تا ساختار گراف تجزیه\u200cهای semantic را رمز کنیم. ما روی دو مجموعه داده نشون میدیم که شبکه های گراف تمام مدل های پایین\u200cخط را انجام می\u200cدهند که ساختمان را به طور کامل مدل نمی\u200cدهند. تحلیل خطای تایید می\u200cکند که دستور ما با موفقیت می\u200cتواند تحلیل\u200cهای semantic پیچیده را فرایند کند.', 'sw': 'Matokeo makubwa zaidi ya maswali ya msingi ya ufahamu yanatumiwa na mabadiliko ya kimapenzi. Katika karatasi hii, tunazungumzia tatizo la kujifunza uwakilizaji wa barabara la sekundi ambalo ni pamoja na vitu kadhaa na mahusiano. Kazi iliyopita ilijikita zaidi kwenye kuchagua mahusiano sahihi ya sekunda kwa swali na kupuuza muundo wa bunge la sekunde: uhusiano kati ya vyombo na maelekezo ya mahusiano. Tunazipendekeza kutumia Mtandao wa Neural wa Gated Graph ili kuweka ramani ya bunge la sekunde. Tunaonyesha kwenye seti za takwimu mbili kwamba mitandao ya picha hiyo inafanya mifano yote ya msingi ambayo hayaweza kutengeneza muundo huo kwa uwazi. Uchambuzi wa makosa unathibitisha kuwa mbinu yetu inaweza kuchukua mafanikio magenge ya sekunde.', 'tr': 'Bilim tabasy soraglaryň jogabynyň iň köp golaýy semantik analyzasyna daýanýar. Bu kağıt içinde, karmaşık semantik ayırımlar için vektör öğrenmesinin sorunu çözeriz. Öňki işiň esasy hem semantik baglaýyşlaryny bir soragy üçin dogry semantik baglaýyşlary saýlamak üçin üns berdi we semantik parslamasynyň strukturyny ýok etmedi: zatlaryň we baglaýyşlaryň arasyndaky baglaýyşlary. Semantik ayırıştırmanın grafik yapısını kodlamak için Gated Graph Nöral Ağlarını kullanmayı teklif ediyoruz. Biz iki maglumat düzümlerinde grafik şebekleri çykarmaýan ähli baseline modelleriň strukturuny çykarmadygyny görkeýäris. Hata analyzasynda biziň metodamyzyň gaty bir semantik analyzasyny başarap biljekdigini tassyklaýar.', 'af': "Die mees toegang tot kennis basis vraag antwoord is gebaseer op semantiese verwerking. In hierdie papier raak ons die probleem van leer vektor voorstellings vir komplekse semantiese verwerking wat bestaan van veelvuldige entiteite en relasies. Vorige werk het groot gefokus op die kies van die korrekte semantiese relasies vir 'n vraag en die struktuur van die semantiese verwerking onthou: die verbindings tussen entiteite en die rigtings van die relasies. Ons voorstel om Gated Graph Neural Netwerke te gebruik om die graafstruktuur van die semantiese verwerking te kodeer. Ons wys op twee data stel dat die graaf netwerke uitvoer alle basisline modele wat nie eksplisieslik die struktuur model nie. Die fout analisie bevestig dat ons toegang suksesvol komplekse semantiese verwerking kan proses.", 'sq': 'Përqasjet më të mëdha për përgjigjet e pyetjeve bazë të njohurive janë bazuar në analizimin semantik. Në këtë letër, ne trajtojmë problemin e mësimit të përfaqësimeve të vektorëve për analiza semantike komplekse që përbëhen nga njësi të shumta dhe marrëdhënie. Puna e mëparshme u përqëndrua kryesisht në zgjedhjen e marrëdhënieve semantike të sakta për një pyetje dhe harroi strukturën e analizës semantike: lidhjet midis njësive dhe drejtimet e marrëdhënieve. We propose to use Gated Graph Neural Networks to encode the graph structure of the semantic parse.  Ne tregojmë në dy grupe të dhënash se rrjetet e grafikut mbivlerësojnë të gjitha modelet bazë që nuk modelojnë shprehësisht strukturën. Analiza e gabimeve konfirmon se qasja jonë mund të procesojë me sukses analizat semantike komplekse.', 'hy': 'Գիտության հիմնական հարցերի պատասխանի ամենամոտեցումները հիմնված են սեմանտիկ վերլուծության վրա: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք լուծում ենք վեկտորների ուսումնասիրելու խնդիրը բարդ սեմանտիկ վերլուծումների համար, որոնք բազմաթիվ միավորներից և հարաբերություններից են կազմված: Նախորդ աշխատանքը հիմնականում կենտրոնացավ հարցի ճիշտ սեմանտիկ հարաբերությունների ընտրության վրա և անտեսեց սեմանտիկ վերլուծության կառուցվածքը՝ կապերի և հարաբերությունների ուղղությունների միջև կապերը: Մենք առաջարկում ենք օգտագործել Gated Graf Նյարդային ցանցեր, որպեսզի կոդավորենք սեմանտիկ վերլուծության գծագրային կառուցվածքը: Երկու տվյալների համակարգում մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ գծագրային ցանցերը գերազանցում են բոլոր հիմնական մոդելները, որոնք բացահայտորեն չեն մոդելավորում կառուցվածքը: Սխալների վերլուծությունը հաստատում է, որ մեր մոտեցումը կարող է հաջողությամբ վերլուծել բարդ սեմանտիկ վերլուծումները:', 'am': 'የእውቀት መሳሪያ ጥያቄ መልስ በsemantic ማኅበረሰብ ላይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ ብዙዎች አካባቢዎች እና ግንኙነትን ለመማር የvector መልዕክቶችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የቀድሞው ስራ ለጥያቄ ጥያቄ ግንኙነትን ለመምረጥ እና የsemantic ፓርላማ ግንኙነት: አካባቢዎች መካከል ግንኙነት እና ግንኙነትን ወደ ግንኙነት መንገድ ለመምረጥ ትክክለኛ ነው፡፡ የጋትድ ግራፍ ኔural ኔትዎርክቶችን የsemantic ፓርላማ ግንኙነትን ለማክበር እናስባለን፡፡ በሁለቱ ዳታዎች ላይ እናሳያቸዋለን የግንኙነቱ መረብ መሠረቱን ግልፅ ሳይገልጥ የሚያደርጉትን ሁሉ ምሳሌዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ The error analysis confirms that our approach can successfully process complex semantic parses.', 'bn': 'জ্ঞানের ভিত্তিক প্রশ্নের উত্তরের সবচেয়ে বেশী প্রতিক্রিয়া সেমেন্টিক পার্জিং এর ভিত্তিতে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষার সমস্যা নিয়ে আলোচনা করি কমপ্লাক্স সেম্যান্টিক পার্সের জন্য যা বেশ কয়ে পূর্ববর্তী কাজ বেশীরভাগ একটি প্রশ্নের জন্য সঠিক সেমান্টিক সম্পর্ক নির্বাচনের প্রতি মনোযোগ প্রদান করে এবং সেমেন্টিক পার্সের কাঠামো উপেক্ষ আমরা গেট গ্রাফ নেউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করার প্রস্তাব করছি সেমেন্টিক পার্সের গ্রাফ কাঠামোর জন্য। আমরা দুটি ডাটা সেটে দেখাচ্ছি যে গ্রাফ নেটওয়ার্কেরা সকল বেসাইলাইন মডেল প্রদর্শন করে যারা এই কাঠামোটি পরিস্কার করে না। ত্রুটি বিশ্লেষণ নিশ্চিত করে যে আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া সফলভাবে সেম্যান্টিক পার্স প্রক্রিয়া করতে পা', 'bs': 'Najveći pristup odgovoru na pitanja baze znanja osnovan je na semantičkom analizu. U ovom papiru rješavamo problem predstavljanja vektora za kompleksne semantičke analize koji se sastoje od višestrukih entitata i odnosa. Prethodni rad se uglavnom fokusirao na odabiru ispravnih semantičkih odnosa na pitanje i odvraćao strukturu semantičkog razmatranja: veze između entitata i smjera odnosa. Predlažemo da koristimo Neuralne mreže Gated Graph za kodiranje grafske strukture semantičkog analiza. Pokazujemo na dva seta podataka da mreža grafika iznosi sve osnovne modele koje ne modeluju strukturu. Analiza greške potvrđuje da naš pristup može uspješno procesirati kompleksne semantičke analize.', 'az': 'Bilim Base sual cavab verməsinin ən yaxınlıqları semantik ayırmasına dayanılır. Bu kağızda, çoxlu ünvanlardan və əlaqələrindən oluşan kompleks semantik ayırışların vektör tərzlərinin problemlərini çəkirik. Əvvəlki işin çoxluğuna bir sual üçün doğru semantik ilişkileri seçmək və semantik ayırışının qurulması haqqında təsirlənmək üçün təsirlərin və ilişkilerin yolları arasındakı bağlantıları təsirlənmək üçün təsirlənmişdir. Semantik analizinin grafının quruluşunu kodlamaq üçün Gated Graph Nöral Networks istifadə etməyi təklif edirik. Biz iki məlumat qurğularına göstəririk ki, grafik ağlarının qurğunu açıq-aydın modellərdən yaratmayan bütün baseline modellərdən üstün tutur. Qəta analizi bizim tərzimizin kompleks semantik analizi müvəffəqiyyətlə işlədə biləcəyini təsdiq edir.', 'ca': "Els més enfocaments a la resposta a preguntes basades en el coneixement es basan en l'analització semàntica. En aquest article, abordem el problema de l'aprenentatge de representacions de vectors per a complexes analitzacions semàntiques que consisteixen en múltiples entitats i relacions. La feina anterior es va centrar en seleccionar les relacions semàntiques correctes per a una pregunta i va ignorar l'estructura de l'analisi semàntica: les connexions entre entitats i les direccions de les relacions. Proposem fer servir les xarxes neurals portades per codificar l'estructura del gràfic de l'analisi semàntica. Mostrem en dos conjunts de dades que les xarxes de gràfics superen tots els models de base que no modelen explícitament l'estructura. L'anàlisi d'errors confirma que el nostre enfocament pot processar amb èxit analitzacions semàntiques complexes.", 'ko': '대부분의 지식 라이브러리 퀴즈 방법은 의미 분석에 기초한 것이다.본고에서 우리는 학습 벡터 표시의 문제를 해결하여 복잡한 의미 분석에 사용하고 여러 개의 실체와 관계를 포함한다.이전의 작업은 주로 문제를 위해 정확한 의미 관계를 선택하는 데 집중되었지만 의미 분석의 구조인 실체 간의 연결과 관계의 방향을 소홀히 했다.우리는 문 제어 도면 신경 네트워크를 사용하여 의미 분석의 도면 구조를 인코딩할 것을 건의합니다.우리는 두 개의 데이터 집합에서 그림 네트워크의 성능이 모든 뚜렷하지 않은 모델링 구조의 기선 모델보다 우수하다는 것을 나타냈다.잘못된 분석은 우리의 방법이 복잡한 의미 분석을 성공적으로 처리할 수 있다는 것을 증명했다.', 'et': 'Enamik teabebaasi küsimustele vastamise lähenemisviise põhineb semantilisel parsimisel. Käesolevas töös käsitleme vektoriesituste õppimise probleemi keerukate semantiliste parsimiste jaoks, mis koosnevad mitmest olemist ja seostest. Eelmine töö keskendus suurel määral õigete semantiliste seoste valimisele küsimusele ning eiras semantilise parsi struktuuri: olemite vahelisi seoseid ja seoste suundu. Teeme ettepaneku kasutada semantilise parsi graafilise struktuuri kodeerimiseks Gated Graph Neural Networks. Näitame kahel andmekogumil, et graafikuvõrgud ületavad kõiki baasmudeleid, mis struktuuri selgesõnaliselt ei modelleeri. Vigade analüüs kinnitab, et meie lähenemine suudab edukalt töödelda keerukaid semantilisi parse.', 'cs': 'Většina přístupů k odpovědi na otázky znalostní báze je založena na sémantickém parsování. V tomto článku se zabýváme problematikou učení se vektorovými reprezentacemi pro komplexní sémantické parsy, které se skládají z více entit a vztahů. Předchozí práce se do značné míry zaměřila na výběr správných sémantických vztahů pro otázku a ignorovala strukturu sémantické parsy: spojení mezi entitami a směry vztahů. Navrhujeme použít Gated Graph Neural Networks pro kódování grafové struktury sémantické parse. Na dvou datových sadách ukazujeme, že grafové sítě překonávají všechny základní modely, které strukturu explicitně nemodelují. Analýza chyb potvrzuje, že náš přístup dokáže úspěšně zpracovat složité sémantické parsy.', 'fi': 'Useimmat Knowledge Base Question Answeringin lähestymistavat perustuvat semanttiseen jäsentämiseen. Tässä työssä käsitellään vektoriesitysten oppimista monimutkaisille semanttisille jäsennyksille, jotka koostuvat useista entiteeteistä ja suhteista. Aiempi työ keskittyi suurelta osin oikeiden semanttisten suhteiden valintaan kysymykselle ja sivuutti semanttisen jäsennyksen rakenteen: entiteettien väliset yhteydet ja suhteiden suunta. Ehdotamme, että käytetään Gated Graph Neural Networks koodaamaan semanttisen parsin graafirakenteen. Osoitamme kahdella tietojoukolla, että graafiverkostot suoriutuvat kaikista perusmalleista, jotka eivät nimenomaisesti mallinna rakennetta. Virheanalyysi vahvistaa, että lähestymistapamme pystyy käsittelemään onnistuneesti monimutkaisia semanttisia jäsennyksiä.', 'jv': 'Punika dipoleh kanggo ngerasakno Bilih basa Pangunian Balika Genjer-Genjer Awak dhéwé sing kudu nglanggar nganggo sampeyan semanti sing berarti kanggo nganggo kesempatan lan ora nggawe ngupakan khirusa semanti: nggawe barang sampeyan karo sampeyan karo hal-sampeyan ingkang sampeyan. Awak dhéwé nggunakake nambah gated Graph Neral Network nggawe nggawe barang kelas Jejaring Genjer-Genjer Ndoles kesalahan kanggo barang nggunakake nambah iso nggunakake semanti karo hal-hal.', 'sk': 'Večina pristopov k odgovarjanju na vprašanja zbirke znanja temelji na semantičnem razčlenjevanju. V prispevku obravnavamo problem učenja vektorskih reprezentacij za kompleksne semantične razčlenjenosti, ki so sestavljene iz več entitet in relacij. Prejšnje delo se je v veliki meri osredotočalo na izbiro pravilnih semantičnih relacij za vprašanje in zanemarilo strukturo semantičnega razporejanja: povezave med entitetami in smeri relacij. Predlagamo uporabo živčnih omrežij Gated Graph za kodiranje grafske strukture semantičnega razčlenjanja. Na dveh naborih podatkov pokažemo, da grafična omrežja presegajo vse osnovne modele, ki strukture ne modelirajo izrecno. Analiza napak potrjuje, da lahko naš pristop uspešno obdeluje kompleksne semantične razčlenitve.', 'ha': "Makusanta mafi kusantar da su zuwa ga Babban San Haƙin da ake karɓa wajen parse ta semantic. Ga wannan takardan, Munã tambayar masu cikin matsalar da za'a sanar masu karatun masu karatun masu shiryuwa da matsayin sakanti da masu haɗi da masu yawa. Yin aikin da ya riga ya yi amfani da yin amfani da yin zãɓi masu haɗi na semantic na daidai wa tambayi kuma ya ƙẽtare ƙidãya na parse na semantic: da haɗi tsakanin maɓalli da shiryoyin haɗi. Tuna goyyar da za'a yi amfani da Networks na Girted Graf Neural dõmin a kode graph tilasanin parse na semantic. Muna nuna kan data biyu zaɓa cẽwa, zanen grafyutan su ƙara duk misãlai masu basketa da ba masu motsi da bayyane ba. Analũrin ɓata ta gaskata cewa hanyoyinmu yana iya samun jarraba parse masu haɗi na semantic.", 'he': 'הגישות הכי טובות לענות על שאלות בסיסית ידע מבוססות על בדיקת סמנטית. בעיתון הזה, אנו מתייחסים לבעיה של לימוד מייצגים ווקטורים למבחנים סמנטיים מורכבים העבודה הקודמת התמקדה בעיקר בבחירה במערכת יחסים סמנטיים הנכונות לשאלה והתעלמה ממבנה של המחקר הסמנטי: הקשר בין יחידות והכיוונים של יחסים. אנו מציעים להשתמש ברשתות נוירוליות גרפים שעורות כדי לקוד את מבנה הגרפים של המחקר הסמנטי. אנחנו מראים בשני קבוצות נתונים שהרשתות הגרפים מעליפות את כל הדוגמנים הבסיסיים שלא דוגמנים באופן ברור את המבנה. ניתוח השגיאות מאשר שהגישה שלנו יכולה לעבוד בהצלחה בדיקות סמנטיות מורכבות.', 'bo': 'ཆེས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་གཞི་རྟེན་གནས་ཚུལ་ལ་གནད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད། འོག་གི་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་རྩོམ་པ་ཁག་གི་དཀའ་ངལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་རྐྱེན་བ་དང་མཐུན་འབྲེལ་འདུག སྔོན་གྱི་ལས་ཀ་དེ་ལ་ཆེ་བའི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གིས་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་ཟིན་བྲིས་དང་མིན་ལྟ་བུའི་རྩ་སྒྲིག་དང་། དབྱེ་འབུལ་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཕ ང་ཚོས་Gated Graph neural Networks་ལ་སྤྱོད་པར་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་གྱི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་རྨང་གཞིའི་མིག་གཟུགས་རིས་བཀོལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་མཐོང་བ་ཡིན་པ། The error analysis confirms that our approach can successfully process complex semantic parses.'}
{'en': 'Automated Fact Checking : Task Formulations, Methods and Future Directions', 'ar': 'التحقق الآلي من صحة المعلومات: صياغة المهام ، والطرق ، والتوجيهات المستقبلية', 'fr': 'Vérification automatisée des faits\xa0: formulations de tâches, méthodes et orientations futures', 'pt': 'Verificação de Fatos Automatizada: Formulações de Tarefas, Métodos e Direções Futuras', 'es': 'Verificación automatizada de datos: formulaciones de tareas, métodos y direcciones futuras', 'ja': '自動ファクトチェック：タスクの策定、方法、今後の方向性', 'zh': '自实核:务、法、方来', 'hi': 'स्वचालित तथ्य ों की जाँच: कार्य योगों, विधियों और भविष्य के निर्देश', 'ru': 'Автоматизированная проверка фактов: формулировки задач, методы и будущие направления', 'ga': 'Seiceáil Fíricí Uathoibrithe: Foirmlithe Tasc, Modhanna agus Treonna don Todhchaí', 'ka': 'ავტომატიური ფაქტის შემოწმება', 'el': 'Αυτοματοποιημένος έλεγχος γεγονότων: Μορφοποιήσεις εργασιών, μέθοδοι και μελλοντικές κατευθύνσεις', 'hu': 'Automatizált tényező ellenőrzés: feladatformulák, módszerek és jövőbeli irányok', 'it': 'Controllo automatico dei fatti: formulazioni, metodi e direzioni future', 'kk': 'Автоматты тексеру: Тапсырмалар формулациясы, әдістер және келесі бағыттары', 'lt': 'Automatinis faktų patikrinimas: užduočių formuluotės, metodai ir būsimos kryptys', 'mk': 'Автоматско проверување на факти: Формулации на задачите, методи и идни насоки', 'ml': 'സ്വയം ഫാക്റ്റ് പരിശോധിക്കുക: പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ രീതികള്\u200d, പിന്നീട് തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Verifika awtomatizzata tal-Fatti: Formulazzjonijiet tax-Xogħol, Metodi u Direzzjonijiet futuri', 'mn': 'Автоматтын үндсэн шалгалт: ажлын хэлбэрүүд, арга, ирээдүйн зам', 'pl': 'Automatyczne sprawdzanie faktów: Formuły zadań, metody i przyszłe kierunki', 'no': 'Automatisk faktisksjekk: oppgåveformulasjon, metodar og framtidige retningar', 'ro': 'Verificarea automată a faptelor: Formulări de sarcini, metode și direcții viitoare', 'sr': 'Automatisano provjeravanje činjenica: Formulacije zadataka, metode i buduće upute', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය ප්\u200dරතිකාර පරීක්ෂණය: වැඩක් ප්\u200dරමාණය, විද්\u200dයාව සහ අනාගතය ප්\u200dරමාණය', 'ms': 'Semak Fakta Automatik: Formulasi Tugas, Kaedah dan Arah Masa Hadapan', 'so': 'Shaqooyinka shaqada, Methods and Future Directions', 'ta': 'தானாக தேர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட விளைவு: பணி வடிவமைப்புகள், முறைமைகள் மற்றும் எதிர்கால திசைகள்', 'ur': 'Automated Fact Checking: Task Formulations, Methods and Future Directions', 'sv': 'Automatiserad faktakontroll: Uppgiftsformuleringar, metoder och framtida riktlinjer', 'vi': 'Kiểm tra dữ liệu tự động: Các công thức, phương pháp và hướng dẫn sau', 'uz': 'Faktni avtomatik tekshirish: Vazifa formatlari, Methods and Future Directions', 'da': 'Automatiseret faktakontrol: Opgaveformuleringer, metoder og fremtidige retningslinjer', 'nl': 'Geautomatiseerde feitencontrole: Taakformuleringen, methoden en toekomstige richtingen', 'bg': 'Автоматизирана проверка на фактите: Формулации на задачите, методи и бъдещи насоки', 'hr': 'Automatično provjeravanje činjenica: Formulacije zadataka, metode i buduće upute', 'de': 'Automatisiertes Fact Checking: Aufgabenformulationen, Methoden und zukünftige Richtungen', 'id': 'Pemeriksaan Fakta Otomatis: Formulasi Tugas, Metode dan Arah Masa depan', 'fa': 'بررسی حقیقت خودکار: فرمول\u200cسازی کار، روش\u200cها و مسیرهای آینده', 'sw': 'Task Formulations, Methods and Future Directions', 'tr': 'Hat Barlamak: Task Formulations, Methods and Future Directions', 'af': 'Outomatiese faktuursoek: Taak Formulasies, Metode en Toekomstige Regtings', 'ko': '자동 팩트 체크: 임무 공식, 방법과 미래 방향', 'sq': 'Kontrolli automatik i fakteve: Formulimet e detyrave, metodat dhe drejtimet e ardhshme', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'az': 'Avtomatik Fakat Seçimi: Göndər Formulasyonları, Metodolar və Geləcək İşləri', 'hy': 'Ավտոմացված փաստերի ստուգելը. առաջադրանքի ձևավորումներ, մեթոդներ և ապագա ուղղություններ', 'bs': 'Automatično provjeravanje činjenica: Formulacije zadataka, metode i buduće upute', 'ca': 'Verifica automàtica de fets: Formulacions de tasca, mètodes i direccions futures', 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় ফ্যাক্ট পরীক্ষা', 'cs': 'Automatizovaná kontrola faktů: Formulace úkolů, metody a budoucí směry', 'et': 'Automaatne faktide kontroll: ülesannete vormid, meetodid ja tulevased suunised', 'fi': 'Automaattinen faktojen tarkistus: tehtäväkaavat, menetelmät ja tulevat ohjeet', 'jv': 'Automated Actual Checking: task shapes, Methods and Next directions', 'sk': 'Samodejno preverjanje dejstev: formule nalog, metode in prihodnje smeri', 'he': 'בדיקת עובדות אוטומטית:', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Automated Fact Checking: Task Formulations, Methods and Future Directions'}
{'en': 'The recently increased focus on misinformation has stimulated research in fact checking, the task of assessing the truthfulness of a claim. Research in automating this task has been conducted in a variety of disciplines including natural language processing, machine learning, knowledge representation, databases, and journalism. While there has been substantial progress, relevant papers and articles have been published in research communities that are often unaware of each other and use inconsistent terminology, thus impeding understanding and further progress. In this paper we survey automated fact checking research stemming from natural language processing and related disciplines, unifying the task formulations and methodologies across papers and authors. Furthermore, we highlight the use of evidence as an important distinguishing factor among them cutting across task formulations and methods. We conclude with proposing avenues for future NLP research on automated fact checking.', 'pt': 'O foco recentemente aumentado na desinformação estimulou a pesquisa na verificação de fatos, a tarefa de avaliar a veracidade de uma afirmação. Pesquisas para automatizar essa tarefa foram conduzidas em várias disciplinas, incluindo processamento de linguagem natural, aprendizado de máquina, representação de conhecimento, bancos de dados e jornalismo. Embora tenha havido um progresso substancial, artigos e artigos relevantes foram publicados em comunidades de pesquisa que muitas vezes desconhecem umas das outras e usam terminologia inconsistente, impedindo assim a compreensão e o progresso. Neste artigo, examinamos pesquisas automatizadas de verificação de fatos decorrentes de processamento de linguagem natural e disciplinas relacionadas, unificando as formulações e metodologias de tarefas entre artigos e autores. Além disso, destacamos o uso de evidências como um importante fator de distinção entre elas, atravessando formulações e métodos de tarefas. Concluímos propondo caminhos para futuras pesquisas de PNL sobre verificação automatizada de fatos.', 'ar': 'أدى التركيز المتزايد مؤخرًا على المعلومات الخاطئة إلى تحفيز البحث في التحقق من الحقائق ، وهي مهمة تقييم مصداقية الادعاء. تم إجراء البحث في أتمتة هذه المهمة في مجموعة متنوعة من التخصصات بما في ذلك معالجة اللغة الطبيعية والتعلم الآلي وتمثيل المعرفة وقواعد البيانات والصحافة. بينما كان هناك تقدم كبير ، تم نشر الأوراق والمقالات ذات الصلة في مجتمعات البحث التي غالبًا ما تكون غير مدركة لبعضها البعض وتستخدم مصطلحات غير متسقة ، مما يعيق الفهم والمزيد من التقدم. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بمسح أبحاث التحقق الآلي من الحقائق النابعة من معالجة اللغة الطبيعية والتخصصات ذات الصلة ، وتوحيد صياغة المهام والمنهجيات عبر الأوراق والمؤلفين. علاوة على ذلك ، فإننا نسلط الضوء على استخدام الأدلة كعامل مميز مهم فيما بينها تتقاطع مع صيغ وأساليب المهام. نختتم باقتراح طرق للبحث المستقبلي في البرمجة اللغوية العصبية حول التحقق الآلي من الحقائق.', 'fr': "L'accent récemment mis sur la désinformation a stimulé la recherche sur la vérification des faits, la tâche d'évaluer la véracité d'une affirmation. Des recherches sur l'automatisation de cette tâche ont été menées dans diverses disciplines, notamment le traitement du langage naturel, l'apprentissage automatique, la représentation des connaissances, les bases de données et le journalisme. Bien que des progrès substantiels aient été réalisés, des articles et des articles pertinents ont été publiés dans des communautés de chercheurs qui ne se connaissent souvent pas et utilisent une terminologie incohérente, entravant ainsi la compréhension et les progrès futurs. Dans cet article, nous examinons les recherches automatisées de vérification des faits issues du traitement du langage naturel et des disciplines connexes, en unifiant les formulations de tâches et les méthodologies entre les articles et les auteurs. En outre, nous soulignons que l'utilisation des données probantes est un facteur distinctif important entre elles, dans les formulations de tâches et les méthodes. Nous concluons en proposant des pistes pour de futures recherches sur la PNL sur la vérification automatisée des faits.", 'es': 'El reciente aumento del enfoque en la desinformación ha estimulado la investigación en la verificación de hechos, la tarea de evaluar la veracidad de una afirmación. La investigación para automatizar esta tarea se ha llevado a cabo en una variedad de disciplinas, incluyendo el procesamiento del lenguaje natural, el aprendizaje automático, la representación del conocimiento, las bases de datos y el periodismo. Si bien ha habido un progreso sustancial, se han publicado artículos y artículos relevantes en comunidades de investigación que a menudo no se conocen entre sí y utilizan terminología inconsistente, lo que impide la comprensión y el progreso posterior. En este artículo analizamos la investigación automatizada de verificación de datos derivada del procesamiento del lenguaje natural y disciplinas relacionadas, unificando las formulaciones de tareas y metodologías en todos los artículos y autores. Además, destacamos el uso de la evidencia como un factor distintivo importante entre ellas que afectan a las formulaciones de tareas y los métodos. Concluimos con la propuesta de vías para futuras investigaciones sobre PNL sobre la verificación automática de datos.', 'ja': '最近、誤った情報に焦点を当てることが増えたことで、クレームの真実性を評価するタスクである、実際のチェックの研究が刺激されました。このタスクの自動化に関する研究は、自然言語処理、機械学習、知識表現、データベース、ジャーナリズムなど、さまざまな分野で行われています。実質的な進歩はあったが、関連する論文や論文は、互いに認識しておらず、一貫性のない用語を使用していることが多く、理解とさらなる進歩を妨げている研究コミュニティで発表されている。この論文では、自然言語処理と関連分野に由来する事実チェック研究の自動調査を行い、論文と著者間でタスクの定式化と方法論を統一した。さらに、エビデンスの使用は、タスクの定式化と方法を横断する重要な区別要因であることを強調しています。最後に、自動ファクトチェックに関する将来のNLP研究のための手段を提案します。', 'hi': 'गलत सूचना पर हाल ही में बढ़े हुए ध्यान ने तथ्यों की जांच में अनुसंधान को प्रेरित किया है, एक दावे की सच्चाई का आकलन करने का कार्य। इस कार्य को स्वचालित करने में अनुसंधान प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण, मशीन लर्निंग, ज्ञान प्रतिनिधित्व, डेटाबेस और पत्रकारिता सहित विभिन्न विषयों में आयोजित किया गया है। हालांकि पर्याप्त प्रगति हुई है, प्रासंगिक कागजात और लेख अनुसंधान समुदायों में प्रकाशित किए गए हैं जो अक्सर एक-दूसरे से अनजान होते हैं और असंगत शब्दावली का उपयोग करते हैं, इस प्रकार समझ और आगे की प्रगति को बाधित करते हैं। इस पत्र में हम प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण और संबंधित विषयों से उपजी स्वचालित तथ्य जांच अनुसंधान का सर्वेक्षण करते हैं, कागजों और लेखकों में कार्य योगों और तरीकों को एकजुट करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम उनके बीच एक महत्वपूर्ण विशिष्ट कारक के रूप में साक्ष्य के उपयोग को उजागर करते हैं जो कार्य योगों और विधियों में कटौती करते हैं। हम स्वचालित तथ्यों की जांच पर भविष्य के एनएलपी अनुसंधान के लिए अवसरों का प्रस्ताव करने के साथ समाप्त करते हैं।', 'zh': '近错误信息日注刺核,即估索赔真。 自动化其治已行于众学科,兼自然语言处之,机器学,示数据库新闻学。 虽得实质性进,而论文已发于论界,往往不相知,用术语不一,以阻解益进。 于本文之中,考自然语言理学科自动化事,参同文术。 此外,我们强调用证据是贯穿职务制作和法术的要别。 最后,我们为未来自己事实核查的NLP研究了道路。', 'ru': 'Возросший в последнее время акцент на дезинформацию стимулировал исследования по фактической проверке, задаче оценки правдивости заявления. Исследования по автоматизации этой задачи проводились в различных дисциплинах, включая обработку естественного языка, машинное обучение, представление знаний, базы данных и журналистику. Хотя был достигнут существенный прогресс, соответствующие документы и статьи были опубликованы в исследовательских кругах, которые зачастую не знают друг друга и используют непоследовательную терминологию, препятствуя тем самым пониманию и дальнейшему прогрессу. В этой статье мы рассмотрим автоматизированные исследования по проверке фактов, связанные с обработкой естественного языка и смежными дисциплинами, объединив формулировки задач и методологии между статьями и авторами. Кроме того, мы подчеркиваем использование доказательств в качестве важного отличительного фактора среди них, охватывающего формулировки задач и методы. В заключение мы предлагаем направления для будущих исследований NLP по автоматизированной проверке фактов.', 'ga': 'Spreag an fócas méadaithe le déanaí ar fhaisnéis mhícheart taighde ar sheiceáil fíricí, an tasc chun fírinneacht éilimh a mheas. Rinneadh taighde chun an tasc seo a uathoibriú i ndisciplíní éagsúla lena n-áirítear próiseáil teanga nádúrtha, foghlaim meaisín, léiriú eolais, bunachair shonraí, agus iriseoireacht. Cé go bhfuil dul chun cinn suntasach déanta, foilsíodh páipéir agus ailt ábhartha i bpobail taighde nach mbíonn a fhios acu go minic ar a chéile agus a úsáideann téarmaíocht neamhréireach, rud a chuireann bac ar thuiscint agus ar dhul chun cinn breise. Sa pháipéar seo déanaimid suirbhé ar thaighde seiceála fíricí uathoibrithe a eascraíonn as próiseáil teanga nádúrtha agus disciplíní gaolmhara, ag aontú foirmlithe agus modheolaíochtaí tascanna trasna páipéir agus údair. Ina theannta sin, leagaimid béim ar úsáid na fianaise mar thoisc idirdhealúcháin thábhachtach ina measc ag baint trasna tascanna agus modhanna oibre. Tugaimid chun críche le bealaí a mholadh le haghaidh taighde NLP amach anseo ar sheiceáil fíricí uathoibrithe.', 'el': 'Η πρόσφατη αυξημένη εστίαση στην παραπληροφόρηση έχει τονώσει την έρευνα στον έλεγχο της πραγματικότητας, το καθήκον της αξιολόγησης της αλήθειας ενός ισχυρισμού. Η έρευνα για την αυτοματοποίηση αυτού του έργου έχει διεξαχθεί σε ποικίλους κλάδους, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας, της μηχανικής μάθησης, της αναπαράστασης της γνώσης, των βάσεων δεδομένων και της δημοσιογραφίας. Ενώ έχει σημειωθεί σημαντική πρόοδος, έχουν δημοσιευθεί σχετικές εργασίες και άρθρα σε ερευνητικές κοινότητες που συχνά δεν γνωρίζουν ο ένας τον άλλο και χρησιμοποιούν ασυνεπή ορολογία, εμποδίζοντας έτσι την κατανόηση και την περαιτέρω πρόοδο. Σε αυτή την εργασία ερευνούμε αυτοματοποιημένη έρευνα ελέγχου γεγονότων που προέρχεται από την επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας και συναφείς κλάδους, ενοποιώντας τις διατυπώσεις εργασιών και τις μεθοδολογίες μεταξύ των άρθρων και των συγγραφέων. Επιπλέον, υπογραμμίζουμε τη χρήση των αποδεικτικών στοιχείων ως σημαντικού διακριτικού παράγοντα μεταξύ τους που περικόπτουν τις διατυπώσεις και τις μεθόδους εργασιών. Συμπερασματικά προτείνουμε τρόπους για μελλοντική έρευνα σχετικά με τον αυτοματοποιημένο έλεγχο γεγονότων.', 'hu': 'A téves tájékoztatásra irányuló közelmúltban fokozott figyelem ösztönözte a tényleges kutatást, amely egy állítás valódiságának értékelését célozza. A feladat automatizálására irányuló kutatásokat számos tudományágban végezték, beleértve a természetes nyelvfeldolgozást, a gépi tanulást, a tudásképviseletet, az adatbázisokat és az újságírást. Bár jelentős előrelépés történt, releváns tanulmányokat és cikkeket publikáltak olyan kutatóközösségekben, amelyek gyakran nem ismerik egymást, és következetlen terminológiát használnak, ami akadályozza a megértést és a további fejlődést. Ebben a tanulmányban a természetes nyelvfeldolgozásból és a kapcsolódó tudományágakból származó automatizált tényező-ellenőrzési kutatásokat vizsgáljuk fel, egyesítve a feladatmegfogalmazásokat és módszertanokat a tanulmányok és szerzők között. Emellett kiemeljük a bizonyítékok felhasználását, mint fontos megkülönböztető tényezőt, amelyek között a feladatformációk és módszerek között átfogó megkülönböztetést jelent. Az automatizált tények ellenőrzésére vonatkozó jövőbeli NLP kutatási lehetőségeket javasoljuk.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ გავაკეთებული ფონსტურაციის შეცდომაზე სტიმულია შესწავლობა, ფაქტიურად შემოწმება, დავამუშავება წარმოდგენის სიმართლეობას. ამ დავალების ავტომატიკურად გამოყენება განსხვავებულ დისპლინტებში გავაკეთებულია, რომელიც ჩემი ენის პროცესი, მაქინის სწავლება, ცნობიერების გამოყენება, დეტატური ბა თუმცა მნიშვნელოვანი პროგრესი იყო, შესაბამისი კომპოგრესი და ახალგაზრულები გამოსახულებულია, რომლებიც ძალიან ერთმანეთის უცნობიერებულია და გამოყენებულია კომპოგრესი ამ დომენტში ჩვენ ავტომატიური ფექტის შემოწმება, რომელიც ნახვა ენის პროცესიდან და შესაბამისი დისპლინტებიდან გამოვიყენება, დავამუშავებთ დავამუშავებული ფორმულები და მეტოლო დამატებით, ჩვენ აღწერეთ ძალიან მნიშვნელოვანი განსხვავებელი ფაქტორის გამოყენების გამოყენების გამოყენებას, როგორც სამუშაო პრომლუმენტების და მეტ ჩვენ დავაკეთებთ მომავალე NLP სწორედ გავაკეთებთ მომავალე ფაქტის შემოწმებაზე.', 'it': "La recente crescente attenzione alla disinformazione ha stimolato la ricerca di fatto check, il compito di valutare la veridicità di un'affermazione. La ricerca nell'automatizzazione di questo compito è stata condotta in una varietà di discipline tra cui l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale, l'apprendimento automatico, la rappresentazione della conoscenza, i database e il giornalismo. Sebbene ci siano stati progressi sostanziali, sono stati pubblicati articoli e articoli pertinenti in comunità di ricerca che spesso non si conoscono l'un l'altro e utilizzano terminologia incoerente, impedendo così la comprensione e ulteriori progressi. In questo articolo analizziamo le ricerche automatizzate di verifica dei fatti derivanti dall'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale e dalle discipline correlate, unificando le formulazioni e le metodologie dei compiti tra articoli e autori. Inoltre, sottolineiamo l'uso delle prove come un importante fattore distintivo tra loro tagliando formulazioni e metodi di lavoro. Concludiamo proponendo strade per la futura ricerca PNL sul controllo automatizzato dei fatti.", 'kk': 'Жуырдағы жарамсыз түрлендіру үшін зерттеулерді тексеру, жарамсыз дұрыстығын анықтау тапсырмасын стимулировады. Бұл тапсырманы автоматты түрде зерттеу көптеген дисциплинлерде тәуелсіз тіл процессоры, машиналық оқыту, білім мәліметі, деректер қорлары журналистік және журналистік істеді. Көп жағдай болғанда, қағаздар мен мақалалар бір-бірінен білмейді, бір-бірінен білмейді, бір-бірінен білмейтін терминологияны қолдануға көмектеседі, бұл үшін түсініктерді және жалға Бұл қағазда біз табиғи тілдерді өңдеу және қайшылық дисциплиналардан бастап, тапсырмалар формулацияларын және методологияларды қағаз және авторлары бойынша біріктіру үшін автоматты түрде тексер Қосымша, біз тапсырмалар формулацияларын және әдістерді таңдау үшін маңызды түрлендіру факторының пайдалануын таңдаймыз. Біз келесі NLP зерттеулерін автоматты түрде тексеру үшін жұмыс істеу арқылы жасадық.', 'ms': 'Fokus yang baru-baru ini meningkat pada maklumat salah telah mendorong penyelidikan pada pemeriksaan fakta, tugas untuk menilai kebenaran sebuah klaim. Penelitian dalam automatikan tugas ini telah dilakukan dalam berbagai disiplin termasuk pemprosesan bahasa alam, pembelajaran mesin, mewakili pengetahuan, pangkalan data, dan wartawan. Walaupun terdapat kemajuan yang besar, kertas dan artikel yang berkaitan telah diterbitkan di komuniti penyelidikan yang sering tidak sedar satu sama lain dan menggunakan terminologi yang tidak konsisten, sehingga menghalangi pemahaman dan kemajuan lanjut. Dalam kertas ini kami survei penyelidikan fakta automatik yang berasal dari pemprosesan bahasa alam dan disiplin berkaitan, menyatukan formulasi tugas dan metodologi di seluruh kertas dan penulis. Furthermore, we highlight the use of evidence as an important distinguishing factor among them cutting across task formulations and methods.  Kami menyelesaikan dengan melamar jalan untuk kajian NLP masa depan mengenai pemeriksaan fakta automatik.', 'lt': 'Neseniai daugiau dėmesio skiriama netinkamai informacijai paskatino mokslinius tyrimus iš tikrųjų tikrinti, užduotį įvertinti teiginio tikrumą. Šios užduoties automatizavimo moksliniai tyrimai buvo atlikti įvairiose srityse, įskaitant natūralų kalbų apdorojimą, mašin ų mokymą, žinių atstovavimą, duomenų bazes ir žurnalistiką. Nors padaryta didelė pažanga, mokslinių tyrimų bendruomenėse buvo paskelbti atitinkami dokumentai ir straipsniai, kurie dažnai nežino viena apie kitą ir naudoja nenuoseklią terminologiją, taip trukdančią supratimui ir tolesnei pažangai. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame automatizuotą faktų tikrinimą atliekant mokslinius tyrimus, susijusius su natūraliu kalbų apdorojimu ir susijusiomis drausmėmis, suvienodinant užduočių formuluotes ir metodikas įvairiuose dokumentuose ir autoriuose. Be to, mes pabrėžiame įrodymų naudojimą kaip svarbų skiriamąjį veiksnį tarp jų, apimantį užduočių formuluotes ir metodus. Baigdami siūlome galimybes ateityje atlikti NLP mokslinius tyrimus automatizuoto faktų tikrinimo srityje.', 'mk': 'Неодамна зголемениот фокус на погрешните информации стимулираше истражување во фактичното проверување, задачата за проценка на вистината на тврдењето. Истражувањата за автоматизација на оваа задача се спроведуваат во различни дисциплини, вклучително и природното обработување јазик, машинско учење, претставување на знаењето, бази на податоци и новинарство. И покрај тоа што постои значителен напредок, релевантните документи и статии се објавени во истражувачките заедници кои честопати не се свесни еден за друг и користат непостојна терминологија, со што се попречува разбирањето и понатамошниот напредок. Во овој документ ги испитуваме автоматизираните проверки на фактите кои произлегуваат од природното обработување на јазиците и поврзаните дисциплини, обединувајќи ги формулациите и методологиите на задачите меѓу документите и авторите. Покрај тоа, ја истакнуваме употребата на докази како важен разликувачки фактор меѓу нив преку формулациите и методите на задачите. Завршиме со предложување на патишта за идно истражување на НЛП за автоматизирано проверување на фактите.', 'mt': 'L-enfasi miżjuda reċentement fuq l-informazzjoni ħa żin a stimulat ir-riċerka fil-fatt il-verifika, il-kompitu li tiġi vvalutata l-verità ta’ dikjarazzjoni. Ir-riċerka fl-awtomatizzazzjoni ta’ dan il-kompitu twettqet f’varjetà ta’ dixxiplini inklużi l-ipproċessar naturali tal-lingwi, it-tagħlim tal-magni, ir-rappreżentanza tal-għarfien, il-bażijiet tad-dejta, u l-ġurnaliżmu. Filwaqt li kien hemm progress sostanzjali, ġew ippubblikati dokumenti u artikoli rilevanti fil-komunitajiet tar-riċerka li spiss ma jkunux konxji minn xulxin u jużaw terminoloġija inkonsistenti, u b’hekk jimpedixxu l-fehim u aktar progress. F’dan id-dokument aħna nistħarrġu r-riċerka ta’ verifika awtomatizzata tal-fatti li tirriżulta mill-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali u dixxiplini relatati, li tgħaqqad il-formulazzjonijiet u l-metodoloġiji tal-kompiti bejn id-dokumenti u l-awturi. Barra minn hekk, nagħmlu enfasi fuq l-użu tal-evidenza bħala fattur importanti li jiddistingwi fosthom it-tqassim bejn il-formulazzjonijiet u l-metodi tal-kompiti. Aħna nikkonkludu billi nipproponu mezzi għar-riċerka futura tal-NLP dwar il-verifika awtomatizzata tal-fatti.', 'mn': 'Саяхан буруу ойлголтын тухай анхаарлаа нэмэгдсэн нь судалгааг шалгаж, үнэндээ үнэндээ үнэндээ тодорхойлох үйл ажил. Энэ ажлыг автоматжуулахын тулд байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэл, машин суралцах, мэдлэг илэрхийлэх, өгөгдлийн санг, сэтгүүл судалгаагаар олон салбарт хийгдсэн. Хэдийгээр маш их хөгжлийн байдал бий болсон ч, хамааралтай баримтууд, баримтууд судалгааны нийгэмд бие биенээ мэдэхгүй, буруутгагүй терминологийг ашиглаж, ойлголт болон улам хөгжлийг зогсоож байна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлээс болон хамааралтай салбаруудыг автоматжуулсан судалгааны шалгалтыг судалж, ажлын томъёо, методологийг цаасан, зохиолчдын хамтдаа нэгтгэдэг. Мөн бид үүнийг ажлын томъёо болон арга замыг тайлбарлах чухал тодорхойлж буй хүчин зүйл болгон баталгаа ашиглахыг тодорхойлдог. Бид ирээдүйн НЛП судалгааны арга замыг автоматжуулсан үнэний шалгалтын тухай төгсгөл хийсэн.', 'ml': 'അടുത്തുതന്നെ തെറ്റായ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. സത്യത്തില്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തിലും, യന്ത്ര പഠനം, ജ്ഞാനം പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d, ഡാറ്റാബേസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d, പത്രിപ്പോര്\u200dട്ടിസ്റ്റില്\u200d ഉള്ള വ വലിയ പ്രകടനം ഉണ്ടായിരുന്നപ്പോള്\u200d, പഠിക്കുന്ന സമൂഹത്തില്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പേപ്പറുകളും ലേഖനങ്ങളും പ്രസ്താവിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുക ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്രത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഡിസ്കിപ്ലിനുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിക്കുന്ന പഠ അതിനുശേഷം, തെളിവുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു വ്യത്യസ്തമായ കാര്യം ആയിരിക്കും. ജോലിയുടെ രീതികളും മുറി നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാവിയിലെ NLP ഗവേഷണം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിനായി അവസാനിക്കുന്നു.', 'ro': 'Concentrarea recent crescută asupra dezinformării a stimulat cercetarea efectivă de verificare, sarcina de a evalua veridicitatea unei afirmații. Cercetările în automatizarea acestei sarcini au fost efectuate într-o varietate de discipline, inclusiv procesarea limbajului natural, învățarea automată, reprezentarea cunoștințelor, baze de date și jurnalism. Deși s-au înregistrat progrese substanțiale, au fost publicate lucrări și articole relevante în comunitățile de cercetare care adesea nu se cunosc reciproc și utilizează terminologie incoerentă, împiedicând astfel înțelegerea și progresul ulterior. În această lucrare analizăm cercetările automatizate de verificare a faptelor provenite din procesarea limbajului natural și discipline conexe, unificand formularea sarcinilor și metodologiile în lucrări și autori. Mai mult decât atât, evidențiem utilizarea dovezilor ca un factor distinctiv important între acestea prin intermediul formulărilor și metodelor de sarcini. Încheiem cu propunerea de căi pentru cercetarea viitoare a PNL privind verificarea automată a faptelor.', 'pl': 'Ostatnio zwiększony nacisk na dezinformację stymulował badania w zakresie sprawdzania faktów, zadania oceny prawdziwości roszczenia. Badania nad automatyzacją tego zadania zostały przeprowadzone w różnych dyscyplinach, w tym przetwarzanie języka naturalnego, uczenie maszynowe, reprezentacja wiedzy, bazy danych i dziennikarstwo. Pomimo znacznych postępów, odpowiednie artykuły i artykuły zostały opublikowane w środowiskach badawczych, które często nie są sobie świadome i stosują niespójną terminologię, utrudniając tym samym zrozumienie i dalszy postęp. W niniejszym artykule badamy zautomatyzowane badania sprawdzające fakty pochodzące z przetwarzania języka naturalnego i pokrewnych dyscyplin, ujednolicając sformułowania zadań i metodologii pomiędzy artykułami i autorami. Ponadto podkreślamy wykorzystanie dowodów jako ważnego czynnika wyróżniającego wśród nich przecinającego między formułami i metodami zadań. Na zakończenie proponujemy możliwości przyszłych badań NLP w zakresie zautomatyzowanego sprawdzania faktów.', 'no': 'Den siste økte fokusen på feil-informasjonen har stimulert forskning i faktisk, oppgåva til å vurdere sannheten på eit oppgåve. Research in automating this task has been conducted in a variety of disciplines including natural language processing, machine learning, knowledge representation, databases and journalism. Selv om det har vært vanskeleg framdrift, har relevante papir og artiklar blitt publisert i forskningssamfunn som ofte ikkje er kjent over kvarandre og bruker inkonsistent terminologi, slik at det hindrar forståelse og framframdring. I denne papiret undersøker vi automatisk å sjekka forskningar som stemmer frå naturspråkshandtering og tilhøyrande discipliner, og å unifisera oppgåveformasjonane og metodologiane over papir og utviklarar. I tillegg markerer vi bruken av beviser som ein viktig forskjellingsfaktor mellom dei som køyrer gjennom oppgåveformasjonar og metodar. Vi avsluttar med å foreslå avener for framtidige NLP-forskning om automatisk sjekking av faktum.', 'sr': 'Nedavno je povećan fokus na pogrešnu informaciju stimulirao istraživanje u stvari proverenje, zadatak procjene istine tvrdnje. Istraživanje u automatizaciji ovog zadatka provedena je u raznim disciplinama, uključujući prirodno obrađivanje jezika, učenje strojeva, zastupanje znanja, baze podataka i novinarstvo. Iako je postojao značajan napredak, relevantni papiri i članovi su objavljeni u istraživačkim zajednicama koji često ne znaju jedni druge i koriste nekonstvenu terminologiju, tako da ometaju razumevanje i daljnji napredak. U ovom papiru istražujemo automatsku činjenicu provjere istraživanja iz prirodnog jezika i povezanih disciplina, ujedinjavajući formulacije zadataka i metode preko papira i autora. Osim toga, naglašavamo korištenje dokaza kao važan različitelj među njima koji presječu formulacije i metode zadatka. Završili smo sa predloženjem avenata za buduće istraživanje NLP-a o automatskom provjeru činjenica.', 'sv': 'Den senaste tidens ökade fokus på felaktig information har stimulerat forskning i faktakontroll, uppgiften att bedöma sanningsenligheten i ett påstående. Forskning om att automatisera denna uppgift har bedrivits inom en mängd olika discipliner, inklusive naturlig språkbearbetning, maskininlärning, kunskapsrepresentation, databaser och journalistik. Även om det har gjorts betydande framsteg har relevanta artiklar och artiklar publicerats i forskargrupper som ofta är omedvetna om varandra och använder inkonsekvent terminologi, vilket hindrar förståelsen och ytterligare framsteg. I denna uppsats undersöker vi automatiserad faktakontroll forskning som härrör från naturlig språkbehandling och relaterade discipliner, vilket förenar uppgiftsformuleringar och metoder mellan uppsatser och författare. Vidare lyfter vi fram användningen av evidens som en viktig särskiljningsfaktor bland dem som sträcker sig över arbetsformuleringar och metoder. Vi avslutar med att föreslå vägar för framtida NLP-forskning om automatiserad faktakontroll.', 'si': 'අවස්ථාවයෙන් වැරදි සංවේදනය ගැන අවස්ථාව විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙනවා ඇත්තටම පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය, අවස්ථාවක මේ වැඩේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය, මැෂින් ඉගෙනීම, දන්නවය ප්\u200dරත විශාල ප්\u200dරධානයක් තියෙනවා නමුත්, සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරධානයක් සහ ප්\u200dරධානයක් පරීක්ෂණ සමාජාවට ප්\u200dරකාශ කරලා තියෙන්නේ, ඒ වගේ මේ පත්තරේ අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට පරීක්ෂණය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ සම්බන්ධ වි තවත්, අපි සාක්ෂික ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විශ්වාස කරනවා වැදගත් විශ්වාස කරනවා ඔවුන්ගෙන් වැදගත් විශ්වාස කරනවා. අපි අනාගතයේ NLP පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා අවස්ථාව කරනවා.', 'so': 'Xafiiska ugu dambeysay ee la kordhiyey macluumaad khalad ah ayaa ku dadaalay baaritaanka xaqiiqda, shaqada qiimeynta runta qiimeynta codsiga. Shaqooyinkaas waxaa lagu sameeyay baaritaanka iskuul kala duduwan, kuwaas oo ah baaritaanka luqada dabiicadda ah, waxbarashada machine, qaabilaadda aqoonta, saldhigyada databaseyada iyo journaliska. While there has been substantial progress, relevant papers and articles have been published in research communities that are often unaware of each other and use inconsistent terminology, thus impeding understanding and further progress.  Qoraalkan waxaan ka baaraynaa baaritaanka rasmiga ah oo baaritaanka baaritaanka luuqada dabiicadda ah iyo iskuullada la xiriira, waxaana ku qornaa qoraalka shaqada iyo qaabiiqoyinka warqadaha iyo qoraalka. Furthermore, waxaynu ku iftiimaynaa isticmaalka caddeynta sida arrin muhiim ah oo kala duwan oo ka jaraya qaabab iyo qaabab shaqo oo dhan. Waxaynu ku dhamaystirnay qalabka soo jeedidda baaritaanka NLP ee ku saabsan baaritaanka xaqiiqda ee iskudarka ah.', 'ta': 'சமீபத்தில் தவறான தகவல் மீது கவனம் பெரிதாக்கப்பட்டது உண்மையில் சரிபார்ப்பது, ஒரு கேட்பாட்டின் உண்மையை மதிப்பிடும் செ இந்த பணியை தானாக்குதலில் ஆராய்ச்சி செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல், இயந்திரம் கற்றல், அறிவு பிரதிநியூகம், தரவுத்தளத்தில்  பெரிய முன்னேற்றம் இருக்கும் போது, தொடர்புடைய ஆவணங்களும் கட்டுரைகளும் ஆய்வு சமூகத்தில் வெளியிடப்பட்டுள்ளது, அது பெரும்பாலும் ஒருவர் மற்றொ இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் மற்றும் தொடர்புடைய வடிவமைப்புகள் மற்றும் எழுத்தாளர்கள் மற்றும் ஒருங்கிணைக்கப்பட மேலும், நாம் தெளிவான பயன்பாட்டை முக்கியமான முக்கியமான பிரிவாக்காரணிகளாக பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் செயல் வடிவமைப்புகள்  நாங்கள் எதிர்காலத்திற்கான NLP ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு தானாக தானியங்கி உண்மை சரிபார்ப்பதை முடிவு செய்தோ', 'ur': 'اچھے سے زیادہ اضافہ ہونے والی غلط تعلیم کے ذریعے تحقیقات کو حقیقت میں تحقیق کرنے کے ذریعہ، ایک ادعا کی سچائی کا ارزیابی کرنے کے ذریعہ ہے. اس کام کی آٹوٹی کرنا میں تحقیق طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح طرح کی طرح کی گئی ہے جس میں طبیعی زبان کی پردازش، ماشین کی تعلیم، علم کی تعلیم، ڈاٹابیز اور جورنیسم ہے. اگرچہ بہت بڑی پیشرفت کی گئی ہے، اہم کاغذ اور لکھائی تحقیق کمونٹیوں میں منتشر کئے گئے ہیں جو اکثر ایک دوسرے سے غیر جانتے ہیں اور ایک دوسرے سے غیرقابل ترمینلوژی استعمال کرتے ہیں، یہاں سے سمجھ اور اضافہ کرنے کے باعث اس کاغذ میں ہم نے اپنا تحقیقات کی تحقیقات کی تحقیق کی جو طبیعی زبان پردازش اور رابطہ داری صحیفوں سے پیدا ہوئی ہے، تابع فرمول اور روشنی کو کاغذوں اور لکھنے والوں میں متحد کر دیا ہے. اور اس کے علاوہ، ہم نشانیوں کے استعمال کو ان کے درمیان ایک اہم فرق کرنے والی فرمول اور طریقوں میں کاٹ رہے ہیں۔ ہم نے مستقبل NLP تحقیقات کے لئے مستقبل پیشنهاد کرنے کے ساتھ پورا پورا کیا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Sự tập trung vào tin sai trái gần đây đã thúc đẩy nghiên cứu thực tế kiểm tra, nhiệm vụ đánh giá sự thật của một yêu cầu. Nghiên cứu về tự động của nhiệm vụ này đã được thực hiện trong nhiều lĩnh vực bao gồm việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, học máy, đại diện kiến thức, cơ sở dữ liệu và báo chí. Trong khi đã có tiến triển đáng kể, các giấy tờ và bài báo đã được công bố trong các cộng đồng nghiên cứu, những người thường không biết về nhau và sử dụng các thuật ngữ mâu thuẫn, làm thế cản trở sự hiểu biết và tiến bộ. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi khảo sát các nghiên cứu về thực tế tự động, kiểm tra các nguyên tố ngôn ngữ tự nhiên và các quy trình liên quan, thống nhất các công thức và phương pháp về các giấy tờ và tác giả. Thêm nữa, chúng tôi nhấn mạnh việc dùng bằng chứng như một nhân tố phân biệt quan trọng giữa họ cắt ngang các công thức và các phương pháp. Chúng tôi kết thúc bằng cách đề xuất các phương pháp nghiên cứu New York về việc kiểm tra thực tế tự động.', 'uz': "Yaqinda ko'paytirilgan xato haqida o'zgarishni tasavvur qiladi, haqiqida tekshirish, davlatning haqiqatni qiymatish vazifasini o'zgartiradi. Ushbu vazifani avtomatik taʼminlovchi qilish natijasi tilni boshqarish, mashinani o'rganish, илм taʼminlovchisi, maʼlumot bazasini va roʻyxat bilan turli taʼminlovchilarga bajarildi. Muhimlik darajada muvaffaqiyatli bo'lganda, ma'lumot qoʻllar va maqolalar boshqa bir-бирлари bilan bilmagan va muvaffaqiyatli terminologiya ishlatish mumkin, shunday qilib o'rganishni va yaxshi darajaga olib keladi. In this paper we survey automated fact checking research stemming from natural language processing and related disciplines, unifying the task formulations and methodologies across papers and authors.  Ko'rib, biz vazifa formulalarini va metodlarni o'zgartirish muhim narsa deb tushunamiz. Biz kelajakdagi NLP tafoviyatlarini avtomatik tashqarish haqiqida avtomatik tekshirish uchun qo'llanmiz.", 'da': 'Det nylige øgede fokus på misinformation har stimuleret forskning i faktisk kontrol, som har til opgave at vurdere sandheden af en påstand. Forskning i automatisering af denne opgave er blevet udført inden for en række discipliner, herunder naturlig sprogbehandling, maskinindlæring, vidensrepræsentation, databaser og journalistik. Selv om der er sket betydelige fremskridt, er relevante papirer og artikler blevet offentliggjort i forskningssamfund, der ofte er uvidende om hinanden og bruger inkonsekvent terminologi, hvilket hæmmer forståelsen og yderligere fremskridt. I denne artikel undersøger vi automatisk fact checking forskning, der stammer fra naturlig sprogbehandling og relaterede discipliner, og forener opgaveformuleringer og metoder på tværs af papirer og forfattere. Desuden fremhæver vi brugen af evidens som en vigtig kendetegn blandt dem, der skærer på tværs af opgaveformuleringer og metoder. Vi afslutter med at foreslå muligheder for fremtidig NLP-forskning om automatiseret faktisk kontrol.', 'bg': 'Наскоро засиленият фокус върху дезинформацията стимулира изследванията за проверка на фактите, задачата за оценка на истинността на дадено твърдение. Изследванията в автоматизирането на тази задача са проведени в различни дисциплини, включително обработка на естествен език, машинно обучение, представяне на знания, бази данни и журналистика. Въпреки че е постигнат значителен напредък, в научноизследователски общности са публикувани съответни доклади и статии, които често не се познават помежду си и използват непоследователна терминология, като по този начин възпрепятстват разбирането и по-нататъшния напредък. В тази статия изследваме автоматизирани изследвания за проверка на фактите, произтичащи от обработката на естествения език и свързаните с тях дисциплини, обединявайки формулировките и методологиите на задачите в докладите и авторите. Освен това, ние подчертаваме използването на доказателства като важен отличителен фактор сред тях, обхващащ формулировките и методите на задачите. В заключение предлагаме възможности за бъдещи изследвания на НЛП за автоматизирана проверка на фактите.', 'de': 'Der jüngst verstärkte Fokus auf Fehlinformationen hat die Forschung in der Faktenkontrolle angeregt, die Aufgabe, die Wahrhaftigkeit einer Behauptung zu beurteilen. Forschung zur Automatisierung dieser Aufgabe wurde in einer Vielzahl von Disziplinen durchgeführt, darunter natürliche Sprachverarbeitung, maschinelles Lernen, Wissensrepräsentation, Datenbanken und Journalismus. Zwar sind erhebliche Fortschritte zu verzeichnen, doch in Forschungsgemeinschaften, die sich oft nicht kennen und inkonsistente Terminologie verwenden, wurden relevante Artikel und Artikel veröffentlicht, die das Verständnis und weitere Fortschritte behindern. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir automatisierte Faktenüberprüfungen, die aus der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache und verwandten Disziplinen stammen, und vereinheitlichen die Aufgabenformulierungen und -methoden über Beiträge und Autoren hinweg. Darüber hinaus heben wir den Einsatz von Evidenz als wichtigen Unterscheidungsfaktor zwischen Aufgabenformulierungen und Methoden hervor. Abschließend schlagen wir Wege für die zukünftige NLP-Forschung zur automatisierten Faktenüberprüfung vor.', 'id': 'Fokus yang baru-baru ini meningkat pada informasi salah telah mendorong penelitian fakta memeriksa, tugas untuk menilai kebenaran klaim. Penelitian dalam otomatisasi tugas ini telah dilakukan dalam berbagai disiplin termasuk proses bahasa alami, pembelajaran mesin, representation pengetahuan, pangkalan data, dan jurnalisme. Meskipun ada kemajuan yang besar, kertas dan artikel yang relevan telah diterbitkan di komunitas penelitian yang sering tidak menyadari satu sama lain dan menggunakan terminologi yang tidak konsisten, sehingga menghalangi pemahaman dan kemajuan lanjut. Dalam kertas ini kami mengawasi pemeriksaan fakta otomatis penelitian berasal dari proses bahasa alam dan disiplin terkait, menyatukan formulasi tugas dan metodologi di seluruh kertas dan penulis. Selain itu, kami menyatakan penggunaan bukti sebagai faktor penting yang membedakan diantara mereka memotong formulasi dan metode tugas. Kami menyelesaikan dengan mengusulkan jalan untuk penelitian NLP masa depan tentang pemeriksaan fakta otomatis.', 'nl': 'De recent toegenomen focus op verkeerde informatie heeft onderzoek gestimuleerd in feitelijke controle, de taak om de waarheid van een claim te beoordelen. Onderzoek naar het automatiseren van deze taak is uitgevoerd in een verscheidenheid van disciplines, waaronder natuurlijke taalverwerking, machine learning, kennisrepresentatie, databases en journalistiek. Hoewel er aanzienlijke vooruitgang is geboekt, zijn relevante artikelen en artikelen gepubliceerd in onderzoeksgemeenschappen die elkaar vaak niet kennen en inconsistente terminologie gebruiken, waardoor begrip en verdere vooruitgang worden belemmerd. In dit artikel onderzoeken we geautomatiseerde fact checking onderzoek afkomstig uit natuurlijke taalverwerking en aanverwante disciplines, waarbij de taakformuleringen en methodologieën tussen papers en auteurs worden verenigd. Daarnaast benadrukken we het gebruik van bewijsmateriaal als een belangrijke onderscheidende factor tussen hen die doorsnijden tussen taakformuleringen en methoden. We sluiten af met voorstellen voor toekomstig NLP-onderzoek naar geautomatiseerde fact checking.', 'ko': '최근 잘못된 정보에 대한 관심은 사실 검증, 즉 성명의 진실성을 평가하는 임무를 증가시켰다.자연 언어 처리, 기계 학습, 지식 표시, 데이터베이스와 뉴스학 등 여러 학과에서 이 임무 자동화 연구를 진행했다.비록 실질적인 진전을 거두었지만 관련 논문과 문장은 이미 연구계에서 발표되었는데 이런 연구계는 왕왕 서로 이해하지 못하고 일치하지 않는 용어를 사용하기 때문에 이해와 진일보한 진전을 방해한다.본고에서 우리는 자연 언어 처리와 관련 학과의 자동 사실 검사 연구를 조사하고 논문과 저자의 임무 공식과 방법을 통일시켰다.그 밖에 우리는 증거의 사용이 임무 공식과 방법을 관통하는 중요한 차이 요소라고 강조한다.마지막으로 우리는 미래 NLP 자동 사실 검사 연구의 경로를 제시했다.', 'fa': 'اخیراً تمرکز افزایش روی تغییر اندازه\u200cگیری، تحقیقات را در واقع تحقیق کرد، وظیفه\u200cی تحقیق حقیقت یک ادعا. تحقیقات در اتوماتیک این وظیفه در دسته\u200cهای مختلف، شامل پردازش زبان طبیعی، یادگیری ماشین، نمایش علم، بنیاد داده\u200cها و روزنامه انجام شده است. در حالی که پیشرفت زیادی وجود داشته است، کاغذها و مقاله های مربوط به جامعه تحقیقات منتشر شده\u200cاند که اغلب از یکدیگر آگاهی ندارند و از ترمینالوژی غیرقابل استفاده می\u200cکنند، به نتیجه درک و پیشرفت بیشتری تحقیق می\u200cکنند در این کاغذ ما در مورد تحقیقات تحقیقات اتوماتیک از طریق پرداخت زبان طبیعی و دستورات مربوط به زبان طبیعی تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، فرمول\u200cهای وضعیت و روش\u200cهای کار را در کاغذها و نویسندگان متحد می\u200cکنی علاوه بر این، ما استفاده از مدارک را به عنوان یک faktor جدا کننده مهم بین آنها که در فرمول و روش\u200cهای وظیفه\u200cای بریده می\u200cشوند، تشکیل می\u200cدهیم. ما با پیشنهاد راه\u200cهایی برای تحقیقات NLP آینده در مورد تحقیقات حقیقت خودکار انجام می\u200cدهیم.', 'sw': 'Hivi karibuni, lengo la kuongezeka juu ya taarifa zisizo sahihi limesababisha utafiti wa kutafuta ukweli, jukumu la kutathmini ukweli wa madai. Utafiti katika kutengeneza kazi hii umefanya katika maarifa mbalimbali ikiwa ni pamoja na upasuaji wa lugha asili, kujifunza mashine, uwakilishi wa maarifa, databases, na uandishi wa habari. Wakati kulikuwa na maendeleo makubwa, makaratasi na makala zinazohusiana yamechapishwa katika jamii za utafiti ambazo mara nyingi hawafahamu na kutumia utambulisho usio na maana, kwa hiyo inazuia kuelewa na maendeleo zaidi. Katika karatasi hii tunachunguza ukweli wa kuangalia utafiti unaotokana na utafiti wa lugha za asili na maasi yanayohusiana, kuunganisha miundo na mbinu za kazi katika magazeti na waandishi. Zaidi ya hayo, tunaonyesha matumizi ya ushahidi kama sababu muhimu ya kutofautisha miongoni mwao kwa kukata miundo na mbinu za kazi. We conclude with proposing avenues for future NLP research on automated fact checking.', 'sq': 'Fokusi i rritur i kohëve të fundit në informata të gabuara ka stimuluar kërkimin në fakt kontrollin, detyrën e vlerësimit të vërtetës së një pretendimi. Kërkimi në automatizimin e kësaj detyre është kryer në një varietet disiplinash duke përfshirë procesimin natyror të gjuhës, mësimin e makinave, përfaqësimin e njohurive, bazat e të dhënave dhe gazetarinë. Ndërsa ka patur përparim thelbësor, dokumentet dhe artikujt e rëndësishëm janë botuar në komunitetet e kërkimeve që shpesh nuk janë të njohur për njëri-tjetrin dhe përdorin terminologji jo konsistente, duke penguar kështu kuptimin dhe përparimin e mëtejshëm. Në këtë letër ne vëzhgojmë kontrollin e fakteve të automatizuara të kërkimeve që vijnë nga përpunimi natyror i gjuhës dhe disiplinat lidhur me të, bashkimin e formulimeve dhe metodologjive të detyrave nëpër letra dhe autorë. Përveç kësaj, ne theksojmë përdorimin e provave si një faktor të rëndësishëm dallues midis tyre duke shkelur ndërmjet formulimeve dhe metodave të detyrave. We conclude with proposing avenues for future NLP research on automated fact checking.', 'tr': 'Soňky günlerde ýalňyş şeklinde üns bermek ýöne barlap dogrylygyny barlamak üçin netijesini ýüklendirdi. Bu zady otomatik bilen araştyrmalar tebigy dil işlemegi, maşyny öwrenmesi, bilgileri temizlemegi, databaseler we žurnalistik bilen meňzeş discipllerde işledildi. Araşty jemgyýetlerde örän uly ösümlik bar bolsa hem möhüm kagytlar we makalaglar bir-birini bilmeýän we bir-birini bilmeýän terminologiýany ulanyp, şeýle diýip düşünmegi we ilerlemeyi täsirleýän. Bu kagyzda biz tebigy dil işleýän we ýagdaýyndan gelen araştyrmalary otomatik barlap, işin formülerini we metodologilerini gazete we awtorlaryň arasynda birleştirip barýarys. Munuň üçin, bu kanunlaryň ullanyşyny gören formulalary we metodlaryny kesmek üçin wajyp tapawutlandyrýan faktor hökmünde ýagtylaşdyrýarys. NLP araştyrmasynyň gelejekde otomatik barlamasynda ulagany teklip etmek üçin kararyna çykypdyk.', 'hr': 'Nedavno je povećan fokus na pogrešnu informaciju stimulirao istraživanje u stvari proverenje, zadatak procjene istine tvrdnje. Istraživanje u automatizaciji ovog zadatka provedeno je u raznim disciplinama uključujući obradu prirodnog jezika, učenje strojeva, zastupanje znanja, baze podataka i novinarstvo. Iako je postojao značajan napredak, relevantni papiri i članovi objavljeni su u istraživačkim zajednicama koji često ne znaju jedni druge i koriste nekonstvenu terminologiju, tako da ometaju razumijevanje i daljnji napredak. U ovom papiru istražujemo automatsku činjenicu provjere istraživanja iz prirodnog jezika i povezanih disciplina, ujedinjavajući formulacije zadataka i metode preko papira i autora. Osim toga, naglašavamo korištenje dokaza kao važan različitelj među njima koji će presjeći formulacije i metode zadatka. Zaključili smo s predloženjem načina za buduće istraživanje NLP-a o automatskom provjeru činjenica.', 'af': "Die onlangs vergroot fokus op verkeerde formasie het gestimuleer ondersoek in feit toets, die taak van die waarheid van 'n aandrukking te evalueer. Deursoek in outomaties hierdie taak is gedoen in 'n verskeie dissipels insluitend natuurlike taal verwerking, masjien leer, kennis verteenwoording, databasis en journalism. Alhoewel daar betekende vordering is, is relevante papiere en artikels uitgepubliseer in die ondersoek gemeenskappe wat dikwels onbevestig is van mekaar en gebruik onvoldoende terminologie, sodat die verstanding en verdere vordering verhinder. In hierdie papier ondersoek ons outomatiese feit deur ondersoek te kyk van natuurlike taal verwerking en verwante dissipels, die opdragformasies en metodologies oor papiere en outeure te unifiseer. Ons verlig ook die gebruik van getuienis as 'n belangrike afdelingsfaktor onder hulle om oor taak formulasies en metodes te knip. Ons sluit met voorstel van aveniers vir toekomstige NLP ondersoek op outomatiese faktuursoek.", 'am': 'በቅርብ ዘመን የስሕተት መረጃዎች ላይ ትኩረትን በመፈለግ፣ የእውነቱን የሥርዓት ውሸት ማረጋገጥ ስራ ነው፡፡ ይህንን ስራ በራሱ ማምረጥ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ፣ የመኪና ትምህርት፣ እውቀት መልዕክት፣ ዳታ መቀመጫዎች እና ጋዜጠኛ ተሟጋለች፡፡ ብዙ ጊዜ እርስ በርሳቸው ሳያውቁ ተርሚኖሎጂም ሳይጠቃቀሙ ተርሚኖሎጂ ሲጠይቁ፣ የግንኙነት ገጾችና ጽሑፎች ተለይተዋል፡፡ በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ እና የግንኙነት ትምህርት እና የሥርዓት መልክቶችን እና ማቀናጃዎችን በጋዜጠቶች እና ጸሐፊዎች ላይ እና ባለሥልጣናዎችን ማቀናቀል እና የሥርዓተ ገጾችን እና ማድረጊዎችን እና አስተያየት እናደርጋ ከዚህም በላይ የስራ መልክ እና ዘዴዎችን ለመቆርጥ የሚያስፈልገውን ማስረጃዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የመጨረሻው የNLP ምርመራ በራሱ ውይይት ማረጋገጫ ላይ የፍላጎት ደረጃዎችን ለመፍጠር እናቆማለን፡፡', 'bn': 'সম্প্রতি ভুল তথ্যের উপর মনোযোগ বৃদ্ধি প্রদান করা হয়েছে বাস্তবতা পরীক্ষা করার জন্য গবেষণা উৎসাহিত করেছে, দাবীর সত্যিকা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া, মেশিন শিক্ষা, জ্ঞান প্রতিনিধিত্ব, ডাটাবেস এবং সাংবাদিকতা সহ বিভিন্ন ধরনের শিক্ষার্থীতে এই কাজের গবে যদিও বিশাল অগ্রগতি ঘটেছে, তদন্ত সম্প্রদায়ের মধ্যে প্রসঙ্গ কাগজ ও প্রবন্ধগুলো প্রকাশ করা হয়েছে, যারা প্রায়শই একে অপরকে অজ্ঞাত এবং অসম্পর্কিত টার্ম এই কাগজটিতে আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে তথ্য পরীক্ষা করি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া এবং সম্পর্কিত শিক্ষা থেকে গবেষণা এবং কাগজপত্র ও লেখকদের প এছাড়াও, আমরা প্রমাণ ব্যবহার করি তাদের মধ্যে একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ বিচ্ছিন্ন কারণ হিসেবে তুলে ধরি। ভবিষ্যতের এনএলপি গবেষণার প্রস্তাব নিয়ে আমরা শেষ করেছি স্বয়ংক্রিয় তথ্য পরীক্ষা সম্পর্কে।', 'hy': 'Վերջերս սխալ ինֆորմացիայի վրա կենտրոնացված կենտրոնացումը խրախուսել է հետազոտությունը փաստորեն ստուգել, խնդիրը՝ գնահատել փաստարկության ճշմարտությունը: Այս խնդրի ավտոմատիզացման հետազոտությունները կատարվել են տարբեր ոլորտներում, ներառյալ բնական լեզվի վերամշակումը, մեքենային ուսումնասիրությունը, գիտելիքների ներկայացումը, տվյալների բազաները և լրագրությունը: Մինչդեռ նշանակալի առաջընթաց է կատարվել, հետազոտական համայնքներում հրատարակվել են նշանակալի փաստաթղթեր և հոդվածներ, որոնք հաճախ միմյանց մասին չգիտակցում են և օգտագործում են անհամապատասխան տերմինոլոգիա, ինչը խոչ Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք ավտոմատիկ փաստեր ստուգելու հետազոտությունները, որոնք առաջացել են բնական լեզվի վերամշակումից և դրանց հետ կապված ոլորտներից, միավորելով աշխատանքի ձևավորման և մեթոդոլոգիաների միջև Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք ապացույցների օգտագործումը որպես կարևոր տարբերակող գործոն դրանց միջոցով, որը բաժանում է խնդիրների ձևավորումները և մեթոդները: Մենք ավարտեցինք առաջարկելով միջոցներ ապագա ՆԼՊ հետազոտության համար ավտոմատիկ փաստերի ստուգելու համար:', 'az': 'YaxńĪnlńĪqlarńĪn t…ôrzind…ô f…ôrql…ônm…ôsi h…ôqiq…ôt…ôn d…ô, t…ôrzin dońüruluńüunu t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôsi v…ô t…ôrzin t…ôrzini t…ôsdiql…ônm…ôsi m…ôqs…ôdil…ô t…ôŇükil etdi. Bu iŇü avtomatik olaraq araŇütńĪrma t…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ôsi, maŇüńĪn √∂yr…ônm…ôsi, bilgi g√∂st…ôricisi, veri tabanlarńĪ v…ô Ňĺurnalistik i√ß…ôrisind…ô m√ľxt…ôlif diziplinl…ôrd…ô iŇül…ôdi. ∆Źn b√∂y√ľk t…ôdbir olmuŇü halda, …ôlaq…ôtli kańüńĪtlar v…ô m…ôktublar bir-birind…ôn x…ôb…ôrsiz olmayan araŇütńĪrma c…ômiyy…ôtl…ôrd…ô yayńĪnlanmńĪŇüdńĪr v…ô t…ôdbir terminoloji istifad…ô edirl…ôr, buna g√∂r…ô d…ô anlama v…ô daha artńĪq t…ôdbir g√∂st…ôrm…ôy…ô mane olurlar. Bu kańüńĪzda t…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ôsind…ôn v…ô bańülńĪ diziplinl…ôrd…ôn g…ôl…ôn araŇütńĪrmalarńĪ v…ô iŇül…ôr form√ľll…ôrini v…ô metodlarńĪnńĪ yazńĪcńĪlarńĪn arasńĪnda birl…ôŇüdir…ôn avtomatik olaraq t…ôŇükil etdik. Daha sonra, onlarńĪn arasńĪndakńĪ m√∂h√ľm t…ôŇükil ed…ôn fakt√∂r olaraq kanńĪtlarńĪn istifad…ôsini t…ôŇükil edirik. Biz g…ôl…ôc…ôk NLP araŇütńĪrmalarńĪnńĪ t…ôblińü etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn avtomatik olaraq t…ôblińü edirik.', 'ca': "L'augment recent de la concentració en la mala informació ha estimulat la recerca en la verificació de fets, la tasca de valorar la veritat d'una afirmació. La recerca en l'automatització d'aquesta tasca s'ha fet en diverses disciplines, incloent el processament natural de llenguatges, l'aprenentatge màquina, la representació del coneixement, les bases de dades i el periodisme. Mentre hi ha hagut progrés substancial, s'han publicat documents i articles pertinents en comunitats de recerca que sovint no se coneixen els uns dels altres i que utilitzen terminologia inconsistent, impedint així l'entendre i el progrés ulterior. En aquest paper estudiem la investigació automatitzada de verificació de fets derivant del processament natural de llenguatges i disciplines relacionades, unificant les formulacions i metodologies de les tasques entre els papers i els autors. A més, destaquem l'ús de l'evidència com un factor important que distingeix entre ells tallant a través de formulacions i mètodes de tasques. Concluïm amb proposar camins per a la futura recerca del NLP sobre la verificació automatitzada de fets.", 'bs': 'Nedavno je povećan fokus na pogrešnu informaciju stimulirao istraživanje u stvari provjeru, zadatak procjene istine tvrdnje. Istraživanje u automatizaciji ovog zadatka provedeno je u raznim disciplinama, uključujući prirodnu obradu jezika, učenje strojeva, zastupanje znanja, baze podataka i novinarstvo. Iako je postojao značajan napredak, objavljeni su relevantni papiri i članovi u istraživačkim zajednicama koji često ne znaju jedni druge i koriste nekonstvenu terminologiju, tako da ometaju razumijevanje i daljnji napredak. U ovom papiru istražujemo automatsku činjenicu provjere istraživanja iz prirodnog jezika i povezanih disciplina, ujedinjavajući formulacije zadataka i metode preko papira i autora. Osim toga, naglašavamo korištenje dokaza kao važan različitelj među njima koji presječu formulacije i metode zadatka. Završili smo sa predloženjem avenata za buduće istraživanje NLP-a o automatskom provjeru činjenica.', 'cs': 'Nedávno se zvýšené zaměření na dezinformace stimulovalo výzkum ve skutečnosti kontroly, úkol posouzení pravdivosti tvrzení. Výzkum v oblasti automatizace tohoto úkolu byl proveden v různých disciplínách, včetně zpracování přirozeného jazyka, strojového učení, reprezentace znalostí, databází a žurnalistiky. Přestože došlo k podstatnému pokroku, příslušné články a články byly publikovány ve výzkumných komunitách, které se často nevědí a používají nekonzistentní terminologii, čímž brání porozumění a další pokrok. V tomto článku zkoumáme automatizovaný výzkum kontroly faktů vycházející ze zpracování přirozeného jazyka a souvisejících disciplín, sjednocující formulace úkolů a metodiky napříč články a autory. Dále zdůrazňujeme využití důkazů jako důležitý rozlišovací faktor mezi nimi, který řeší napříč formulacemi a metodami úkolů. Na závěr navrhujeme možnosti budoucího výzkumu NLP v oblasti automatizované kontroly faktů.', 'et': 'Hiljuti suurenenud keskendumine valeteabele on ergutanud teadusuuringuid faktide kontrollimiseks, mille ülesanne on hinnata väite tõesust. Selle ülesande automatiseerimise uuringuid on läbi viidud erinevates valdkondades, sealhulgas looduskeele töötlemine, masinõpe, teadmiste esindamine, andmebaasid ja ajakirjandus. Kuigi olulisi edusamme on tehtud, on asjakohased dokumendid ja artiklid avaldatud teadusringkondades, mis sageli ei ole üksteisest teadlikud ja kasutavad ebaühtlast terminoloogiat, takistades seega mõistmist ja edasist arengut. Käesolevas töös uurime looduskeele töötlemise ja sellega seotud erialade automatiseeritud faktide kontrollimise uuringuid, ühendades ülesannete vorminguid ja metoodikaid erinevates artiklites ja autorites. Lisaks rõhutame tõendite kasutamist kui olulist eristavat tegurit ülesannete koostamisel ja meetoditel. Lõpetuseks pakume välja võimalusi uue arenguprogrammi edasiseks uurimiseks automatiseeritud faktide kontrollimiseks.', 'fi': 'Viime aikoina lisääntynyt keskittyminen väärään tietoon on kannustanut tutkimaan tosiseikkojen tarkistamista eli arvioimaan väitteen totuudenmukaisuutta. Tämän tehtävän automatisoinnin tutkimusta on tehty useilla eri aloilla, kuten luonnollisen kielen käsittely, koneoppiminen, tiedon edustaminen, tietokannat ja journalismi. Merkittävää edistystä on tapahtunut, mutta asiaa koskevia artikkeleita on julkaistu tutkimusyhteisöissä, jotka eivät usein tunne toisiaan ja käyttävät epäjohdonmukaista terminologiaa, mikä vaikeuttaa ymmärtämistä ja edistymistä. Tässä artikkelissa kartoitamme luonnollisen kielen käsittelystä ja siihen liittyvistä tieteenaloista peräisin olevaa automaattista faktojen tarkistamista yhdistäen tehtävien muotoilut ja menetelmät eri julkaisujen ja tekijöiden kesken. Lisäksi korostamme todistusaineiston käyttöä tärkeänä erottuvana tekijänä tehtävien muotoilussa ja menetelmissä. Lopuksi ehdotamme keinoja automaattista tietojen tarkistamista koskevalle NLP:n tulevalle tutkimukselle.', 'jv': 'Open recent information Rasané karo sistem sing beraksi perbudhakan iki dadi akeh lan akeh sampeyan karo perusahaan langgambar, ingkang sampeyan, akeh-ingkang ngerasahan, databasa lan ijol-ijolan. Hèwèké kayané akeh bantên pergrens, kuwi matèran lan artik sing wis dipuluhayo nèng kapulungan karo perusahaan ingkang sampek bantêr, nganggep sistem sing gak nggawe gerakan sampek, lan akeh iso ngbagian nggawe gerakan sampek. Nang paper iki, awak dhéwé ngerasakno perusahaan kelas nang resmi sak bantuan ingkang dadi, lan ijol-ijolan karo perusahaan langgambar, nggawe ngupakan perusahaan lan manipulan kanggo tukang cara lan autor. Ngubah kok, kita ngubah perusahaan nggambar obahan kanggo ngilangno nggawe ngupakan cara nggawe barang nggawe kapan cara nggawe Fomaci karo perusahaan cara nggawe Awak dhéwé wis ambekan karo pawartos kanggo urêhadi NLP nang pawartèng neng pawartos nggawe barang otomatik.', 'he': 'התמקדות הגבוהה לאחרונה על מידע לא נכון מעוררה מחקר למעשה לבדוק, המשימה להעריך את האמת של טענה. מחקר באוטומטיזציה של המשימה הזאת הובצע במגוון משמעות כולל עיבוד שפה טבעי, לימוד מכונות, מייצג ידע, בסיסי נתונים, ועיתונות. למרות שהיתה התקדמות משמעותית, מסמכים ומאמרים רלוונטיים פורסמו בקהילות מחקרים שלעתים קרובות לא מודעים אחד לשני ושימושים בטרמונולוגיה לא תואמת, כך מפריעים להבין ולהתקדמות נוספת. בעיתון הזה אנו סוקרים מחקר בדיקת עובדות אוטומטית שמגיע מעבדת שפת טבעית ומשומעות קשורות, מאחדים את התצורות ומתוכניות המשימה בין מסמכים וסופרים. חוץ מזה, אנו מזכירים את השימוש של ראיות כגורם חשוב מבחין ביניהם לחתוך את התצורות ושיטות המשימה. אנחנו מסתיימים עם הצעה דרכים למחקר עתיד NLP על בדיקת עובדות אוטומטית.', 'sk': 'Nedavno povečana osredotočenost na napačne informacije je spodbudila raziskave preverjanja dejstev, nalogo ocenjevanja resničnosti trditve. Raziskave na področju avtomatizacije te naloge so potekale v različnih disciplinah, vključno z obdelavo naravnega jezika, strojnim učenjem, reprezentacijo znanja, bazami podatkov in novinarstvom. Čeprav je bil dosežen znaten napredek, so bili ustrezni prispevki in članki objavljeni v raziskovalnih skupnostih, ki se pogosto ne zavedajo in uporabljajo nedosledno terminologijo, kar ovira razumevanje in nadaljnji napredek. V prispevku pregledujemo avtomatizirane raziskave preverjanja dejstev, ki izhajajo iz obdelave naravnega jezika in sorodnih disciplin ter združujemo formulacije nalog in metodologije med prispevki in avtorji. Poleg tega poudarjamo uporabo dokazov kot pomemben razlikovalni dejavnik med njimi, ki sega med formulacijami in metodami nalog. Zaključimo s predlogom možnosti za prihodnje raziskave NLP o avtomatiziranem preverjanju dejstev.', 'ha': "Ga ta ƙara, ana ƙara fokus a kan bayan information, ya ƙãga tafiti a cikin jarraba gaskiya, aikin ka ƙayyade gaskiyar matsayin. An aikata research in farat farat-farat wannan aikin a cikin wasu disciplines, kamar manyan aiki da aka haramta, da zane, da tsarin ilmi, da database, da journalism. Kuma a lokacin da aka sami marubuci mai girma, aka rarrabe takardar da karãtunsu masu husu a cikin jamii za'a sani ba, ko da yawa, kuma suna yin amfani da tsauni na'urar, sai ya haramta fahimta da kodi. A cikin wannan takardan, Munã tambaya bayani farat ɗaya, kan jarraba fitina na daga ma'anar harshen na natura da kuma da mistakardan da masu husũma, suna daidaita fassarar aikin da metode dukkan takardar da marubũta. Furan haka, Munã ƙayyade istinin bayani kamar wani ma'auni mai muhimu da rarrabe su a tsakanin fassarar da shiryoyin aiki. Tuna ƙare da kafaffiyata masu bukãta wa research na NLP masu gaba ga jarraba gaskiya farat ɗaya.", 'bo': 'ཉེ་ཆར་བརྗོད་དུ་བཟོ་བཅོས་ནི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་དམིགས་བསལ་བ་འདིས་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ཡོད་པའི་ལས་རྗེས་སུ་དངོས་གནས་ཚུལ རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ལས་འགུལ་འདི་དག་གི་སྒྲུབ་ལ་རྗེས་སུ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དུ་བྱུང་སྟེ། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་ཀྱང་ནང་ལུགས་པ་སྐྱེན་ གནད་དོན་ཡོད་ཚད་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡོད་ནའང་། བྲིས་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚོགས་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་འཚོལ་ཞིབ་བྱས་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཏེ། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བུ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་རང་བཞིན་གྱིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་མཐུན་པའི་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་ཐབས་ལམ་དུ་བཏོན་པའི་རྐྱེན་ཁག་ཅིག་གིས་བཀོད་པའི་ལྟ་བུའི་བྱ་ཚིག་དང་། ང་ཚོས་མ་འོངས་པར་NLP འཚོལ་ཞིབ་དང་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དཔྱད་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག'}
{'en': 'Predicting Stances from Social Media Posts using Factorization Machines', 'ar': 'توقع المواقف من منشورات التواصل الاجتماعي باستخدام آلات التخصيم', 'pt': 'Prevendo posturas de postagens de mídia social usando máquinas de fatoração', 'fr': "Prédire les positions à partir de publications sur les réseaux sociaux à l'aide de machines", 'es': 'Predicción de posturas a partir de publicaciones en redes sociales mediante máquinas de factorización', 'ja': '係数化マシンを使用したソーシャルメディア投稿からのスタンスの予測', 'hi': 'फैक्टराइजेशन मशीनों का उपयोग करके सोशल मीडिया पोस्ट से रुख की भविष्यवाणी करना', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование позиций из постов в социальных сетях с помощью машин факторизации', 'zh': '用分解机器于社交媒体帖中测立场', 'ga': 'Staideanna a Thuar ó Phoist ar na Meáin Shóisialta ag baint úsáide as Meaisíní Fachtóireachta', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედია პოსტის სტანტიკაციის მაქანების გამოყენება', 'el': 'Προβλέποντας στάσεις από δημοσιεύσεις κοινωνικών μέσων με τη χρήση μηχανών παραγοντισμού', 'hu': 'Álláspontok előrejelzése a közösségi média posztokból faktorizáló gépekkel', 'it': 'Prevedere le posizioni dai post sui social media utilizzando macchine di fattorizzazione', 'lt': 'Socialinės žiniasklaidos postų, naudojančių gamybos mašinas, pozicijų prognozavimas', 'mk': 'Предвидување на ставови од социјалните медиуми со употреба на факторизациски машини', 'kk': 'Факторизациялау машиналарын қолданатын социалдық медиа поштасының станциялары', 'ms': 'Menjadikan Kejadian dari Pos Media Sosial menggunakan Mesin Pemfaktorisasi', 'mt': 'Tbassir ta’ Stanzi minn Postijiet tal-Midja Soċjali bl-użu ta’ Magni tal-Fattorizzazzjoni', 'no': 'Forhåndsvising av stader frå sosiale mediepost ved bruk av faktoriseringsmaskiner', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ പോസ്റ്റുകളില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള സ്റ്റേഷനുകള്\u200d സമര്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നു', 'ro': 'Predicția pozițiilor din posturile de social media folosind mașini de factorizare', 'sr': 'Predviđanje stanica iz pošta socijalnih medija koristeći fabrikacijske mašine', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн медиа захирал дээр Факторизацийн машинуудыг ашиглан', 'pl': 'Przewidywanie stanowisk z postów w mediach społecznościowych za pomocą maszyn faktoryzacyjnych', 'so': 'Isu diyaarinta hawlaha boostooyinka sooshalka ee hagitaanka', 'sv': 'Att förutsäga ställningstaganden från inlägg i sociala medier med hjälp av faktoriseringsmaskiner', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடக புள்ளிகளிலிருந்து நிலைகளை முன்னேற்றுகிறது தொகுப்பு இயந்திரங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයම පොස්ටස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න', 'ur': 'سوسیل میڈیا پوسٹ سے استنس کی پیش بینی کرتی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ dự đoán của các bưu phẩm phương tiện nhân tạo dùng máy tạo', 'da': 'Forudsigelse af stillinger fra indlæg på sociale medier ved hjælp af faktoriseringsmaskiner', 'nl': 'Posities voorspellen vanuit Social Media Posts met behulp van Factorization Machines', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на позициите от публикациите в социалните медии с помощта на машини за факторизация', 'hr': 'Predviđanje stanica iz postova socijalnih medija koristeći fabrikacijske mašine', 'de': 'Vorhersage von Positionen aus Social Media Posts mit Factorization Machines', 'fa': 'پیش\u200cبینی استاندارها از پوست رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی با استفاده از ماشین فکتوریزی', 'ko': '인자 분해기를 이용하여 소셜미디어 게시물의 입장을 예측하다', 'id': 'Memprediksi Stans dari Social Media Posts menggunakan Mesin Faktorisasi', 'tr': 'Soýunlar Medýdançalaryň ýerlerini Faýlikat Makinelerini ulanan ýerlerden bejermek', 'af': 'Voorskou Stensils van Sosiale Media Pos gebruik Faktorisasie Masjiene', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i qëndrimeve nga postimet e medias sociale duke përdorur makinat e fabrikimit', 'sw': 'Kujiandaa vituo kutoka Postika za Mitandao ya Kijamii kwa kutumia Mashine ya Kutengeneza', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ፖለቲካዎችን በመጠቀም የተቀናቀሉ ስፍራዎች', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների դիրքերի կանխատեսումը ֆակտորիզացիայի մեքենաներով', 'az': 'Faktorizasyon Makinel…ôrini istifad…ô ed…ôn Sosyal Media Postlarƒ±ndan', 'bn': 'ফ্যাক্টরেশন মেশিন ব্যবহার করে সামাজিক মিডিয়া পোস্ট থেকে অবস্থান প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Predviđanje stanica iz postova socijalnih medija koristeći fabrikacijske mašine', 'cs': 'Predikce postojů z příspěvků na sociálních médiích pomocí faktorizačních strojů', 'ca': 'Predicting Stances from Social Media Posts using Factorization Machines', 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia postituste seisukohtade prognoosimine faktorisatsiooni masinate abil', 'fi': 'Sosiaalisen median julkaisujen kantojen ennustaminen faktorisointikoneiden avulla', 'jv': 'Learn Mode', 'he': 'צפוי עמדות משימות מדיה חברתית באמצעות מכונות מפקטוריזציה', 'ha': 'PrePredicting Stances from Jamii Media Posts by Use Factor', 'sk': 'Predvidevanje stanj iz objav v socialnih medijih z uporabo faktorizacijskih strojev', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གི་སྒེར་གྱི་རྣམ་པ'}
{'en': 'Social media provide platforms to express, discuss, and shape opinions about events and issues in the real world. An important step to analyze the discussions on social media and to assist in healthy decision-making is stance detection. This paper presents an approach to detect the stance of a user toward a topic based on their stances toward other topics and the social media posts of the user. We apply factorization machines, a widely used method in item recommendation, to model user preferences toward topics from the social media data. The experimental results demonstrate that users’ posts are useful to model topic preferences and therefore predict stances of silent users.', 'es': 'Las redes sociales ofrecen plataformas para expresar, debatir y dar forma a las opiniones sobre eventos y problemas en el mundo real. Un paso importante para analizar los debates en las redes sociales y ayudar a tomar decisiones saludables es la detección de posturas. Este artículo presenta un enfoque para detectar la postura de un usuario hacia un tema en función de sus posturas hacia otros temas y las publicaciones del usuario en las redes sociales. Aplicamos máquinas de factorización, un método ampliamente utilizado en la recomendación de artículos, para modelar las preferencias de los usuarios hacia los temas de los datos de las redes sociales. Los resultados experimentales demuestran que las publicaciones de los usuarios son útiles para modelar las preferencias temáticas y, por lo tanto, predecir las posturas de los usuarios silenciosos', 'pt': 'As mídias sociais fornecem plataformas para expressar, discutir e formar opiniões sobre eventos e questões do mundo real. Um passo importante para analisar as discussões nas redes sociais e auxiliar na tomada de decisões saudáveis é a detecção de posturas. Este artigo apresenta uma abordagem para detectar a postura de um usuário em relação a um tópico com base em suas posturas em relação a outros tópicos e as postagens de mídia social do usuário. Aplicamos máquinas de fatoração, um método amplamente utilizado na recomendação de itens, para modelar as preferências do usuário em relação a tópicos dos dados de mídia social. Os resultados experimentais demonstram que as postagens dos usuários são úteis para modelar preferências de tópicos e, portanto, prever posturas de usuários silenciosos.', 'ar': 'توفر وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي منصات للتعبير عن الآراء ومناقشتها وتشكيلها حول الأحداث والقضايا في العالم الحقيقي. يعد اكتشاف الموقف خطوة مهمة لتحليل المناقشات على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي وللمساعدة في اتخاذ قرارات صحية. تقدم هذه الورقة طريقة للكشف عن موقف المستخدم من موضوع ما بناءً على مواقفه تجاه مواضيع أخرى ومنشورات المستخدم على وسائل التواصل الاجتماعي. نحن نطبق آلات التحليل إلى عوامل ، وهي طريقة مستخدمة على نطاق واسع في التوصية بالعناصر ، لنمذجة تفضيلات المستخدم تجاه الموضوعات من بيانات الوسائط الاجتماعية. توضح النتائج التجريبية أن مشاركات المستخدمين مفيدة لنمذجة تفضيلات الموضوع وبالتالي توقع مواقف المستخدمين الصامتين.', 'fr': "Les réseaux sociaux fournissent des plateformes permettant d'exprimer, de discuter et de façonner des opinions sur des événements et des problèmes du monde réel. La détection de la position est une étape importante pour analyser les discussions sur les réseaux sociaux et aider à prendre des décisions saines. Cet article présente une approche permettant de détecter la position d'un utilisateur à l'égard d'un sujet en fonction de ses positions vis-à-vis d'autres sujets et des publications de l'utilisateur sur les réseaux sociaux. Nous appliquons des machines de factorisation, une méthode largement utilisée dans la recommandation d'articles, pour modéliser les préférences des utilisateurs à l'égard des sujets issus des données des réseaux sociaux. Les résultats expérimentaux démontrent que les publications des utilisateurs sont utiles pour modéliser les préférences de sujets et donc pour prédire les positions des utilisateurs silencieux.", 'zh': '社交媒体具以表示,论议及塑造见实世界事论平台。 析社交媒体之论,助健决之要,立场检测。 本文立一法,据用户立场及用户社交媒体帖以检测用户。 宜用分解机(一在项目荐中广用之法)以拟用户社交媒体数之偏善。 实验结果表明,用户帖有助于模拟主题偏好,以占默用户之立。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया वास्तविक दुनिया में घटनाओं और मुद्दों के बारे में राय व्यक्त करने, चर्चा करने और आकार देने के लिए प्लेटफ़ॉर्म प्रदान करता है। सोशल मीडिया पर चर्चाओं का विश्लेषण करने और स्वस्थ निर्णय लेने में सहायता करने के लिए एक महत्वपूर्ण कदम रुख का पता लगाना है। यह पेपर अन्य विषयों और उपयोगकर्ता के सोशल मीडिया पोस्ट के प्रति उनके रुख के आधार पर एक विषय के प्रति उपयोगकर्ता के रुख का पता लगाने के लिए एक दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करता है। हम सोशल मीडिया डेटा से विषयों के प्रति उपयोगकर्ता वरीयताओं को मॉडल करने के लिए, आइटम सिफारिश में एक व्यापक रूप से उपयोग की जाने वाली विधि, फैक्टराइजेशन मशीनों को लागू करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम दर्शाते हैं कि उपयोगकर्ताओं के पोस्ट विषय वरीयताओं को मॉडल करने के लिए उपयोगी हैं और इसलिए मूक उपयोगकर्ताओं के रुख की भविष्यवाणी करते हैं।', 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアは、現実世界の出来事や問題について意見を述べ、議論し、形成するプラットフォームを提供します。ソーシャルメディア上の議論を分析し、健全な意思決定を支援するための重要なステップは、スタンス検出です。本稿では、他のトピックに対するユーザーのスタンスとユーザーのソーシャルメディア投稿に基づいて、トピックに対するユーザーのスタンスを検出するアプローチを提示する。私たちは、ソーシャルメディアデータからのトピックに対するユーザーの好みをモデル化するために、アイテム推奨で広く使用されている方法である因数分解マシンを適用します。実験結果は、ユーザーの投稿がトピックの好みをモデル化するのに有用であり、したがって、サイレントユーザーのスタンスを予測することを示している。', 'ru': 'Социальные сети предоставляют платформы для выражения, обсуждения и формирования мнений о событиях и проблемах в реальном мире. Важным шагом для анализа дискуссий в социальных сетях и оказания помощи в принятии здоровых решений является определение позиции. В этой статье представлен подход к обнаружению отношения пользователя к теме на основе его отношения к другим темам и публикациям пользователя в социальных сетях. Мы применяем машины факторизации, широко используемый метод в рекомендации элемента, чтобы моделировать предпочтения пользователей в отношении тем из данных социальных сетей. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что сообщения пользователей полезны для моделирования предпочтений тем и, следовательно, прогнозирования позиций молчаливых пользователей.', 'ga': 'Soláthraíonn na meáin shóisialta ardáin chun tuairimí a chur in iúl, a phlé agus a mhúnlú faoi imeachtaí agus faoi cheisteanna sa saol fíor. Céim thábhachtach chun anailís a dhéanamh ar an bplé ar na meáin shóisialta agus chun cabhrú le cinnteoireacht shláintiúil is ea seasamh a bhrath. Cuireann an páipéar seo cur chuige i láthair chun seasamh úsáideora i leith ábhar a bhrath bunaithe ar a sheasamh i leith ábhair eile agus ar phoist an úsáideora ar na meáin shóisialta. Cuirimid meaisíní fachtóirithe i bhfeidhm, modh a úsáidtear go forleathan chun míreanna a mholadh, chun roghanna úsáideoirí a shamhaltú i dtreo topaicí ó shonraí na meán sóisialta. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go bhfuil postálacha úsáideoirí úsáideach chun roghanna topaicí a shamhaltú agus mar sin chun seasamh na n-úsáideoirí ciúine a thuar.', 'ka': 'სოციალური მედიაში გამოსახულებელი, განსახულებელი, და განახულებელი შესახებ მოვლენების და პრობლემების შესახებ რეალური მსოფლიოში. მნიშვნელოვანი ნაწილია, რომ სოციალური მედიაში განსაზღვრება და დახმარება ჯანმრთელი გადაწყვეტილების შესახებ არის სტანციის განსაზღვრება. ეს დოკუნტი აჩვენებს მომხმარებლის სტანციას ტემიკისთვის მიერ სხვა ტემიკისთვის და მომხმარებლის სოციალური მედია სტანციას. ჩვენ ფაქტორიზაციის მაქანების გამოყენება, სოციალური მედია მონაცემებისთვის მომხმარებელი პრეფიკაციების მოდულისთვის. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები გამოყენებელი პოსტაციების მოდგენისთვის გამოსახულებელია და ამიტომ გადაწყენება მუშაობელი გამოყენებელი სტაციები', 'el': 'Τα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης παρέχουν πλατφόρμες για να εκφράσουν, να συζητήσουν και να διαμορφώσουν απόψεις σχετικά με γεγονότα και θέματα στον πραγματικό κόσμο. Ένα σημαντικό βήμα για να αναλύσουμε τις συζητήσεις στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης και να βοηθήσουμε στην υγιή λήψη αποφάσεων είναι η ανίχνευση στάσεων. Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει μια προσέγγιση για τον εντοπισμό της στάσης ενός χρήστη απέναντι σε ένα θέμα με βάση τις θέσεις του απέναντι σε άλλα θέματα και τις δημοσιεύσεις του χρήστη στα μέσα κοινωνικής δικτύωσης. Εφαρμόζουμε μηχανές παραγοντισμού, μια ευρέως χρησιμοποιούμενη μέθοδος στη σύσταση στοιχείων, για να μοντελοποιήσουμε τις προτιμήσεις των χρηστών σε θέματα από τα δεδομένα των κοινωνικών μέσων. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα καταδεικνύουν ότι οι δημοσιεύσεις των χρηστών είναι χρήσιμες για τη μοντελοποίηση των προτιμήσεων θεμάτων και επομένως για την πρόβλεψη των στάσεων των σιωπηλών χρηστών.', 'hu': 'A közösségi média platformokat biztosít a való világ eseményeiről és kérdéseiről szóló vélemények kifejezésére, megvitatására és alakítására. Fontos lépés a közösségi médiában folytatott megbeszélések elemzéséhez és az egészséges döntéshozatal elősegítéséhez az álláspont felismerése. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a felhasználó álláspontjának felismerését egy témával szemben, a többi témával és a felhasználó közösségi média posztjaival kapcsolatos álláspontja alapján. A faktorizációs gépeket, amelyek széles körben használt módszert alkalmaznak az elemek ajánlásában, a felhasználói preferenciák modellezésére a közösségi média adataiból. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy a felhasználók hozzászólásai hasznosak a témakörök preferenciáinak modellezéséhez, és ezért előrejelzik a néma felhasználók álláspontját.', 'it': "I social media forniscono piattaforme per esprimere, discutere e modellare opinioni su eventi e questioni nel mondo reale. Un passo importante per analizzare le discussioni sui social media e per aiutare a prendere decisioni sane è il rilevamento della posizione. Questo articolo presenta un approccio per rilevare la posizione di un utente verso un argomento in base alla sua posizione verso altri argomenti e i post sui social media dell'utente. Applichiamo macchine di fattorizzazione, un metodo ampiamente utilizzato nella raccomandazione degli articoli, per modellare le preferenze degli utenti verso argomenti dai dati dei social media. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che i post degli utenti sono utili per modellare le preferenze degli argomenti e quindi prevedere le posizioni degli utenti silenziosi.", 'kk': 'Оқиғалар мен мәселелер туралы көзгерту, талқылау және түсініктемелер үшін әлемдік медиақтар платформаларын береді. Социалдық медиақтардың талқылауын анализ және саулы шешімдерге көмектесу үшін маңызды қадам - станцияны анықтау. Бұл қағаз пайдаланушының мәліметін басқа тақырыптар мен пайдаланушының социаллық медиа пошталарына негізделген мәліметті таңдау үшін жағдайын көрсетеді. Біз факторизациялау машиналарын, элементтердің рекомендациясының көп қолданылатын әдістерін, әлеуметтік медиақпарат деректерінің нақыштарының қасиеттерін үлгілеу ү Тәжірибелі нәтижелер пайдаланушылардың поштасы нақыштың параметрлерін үлгілеу үшін пайдаланушыларды көрсетеді, сондықтан тыныс пайдаланушылардың жағдайын көрсетеді.', 'mk': 'Социјалните медиуми обезбедуваат платформи за изразување, дискусија и формирање на мислењата за настаните и прашањата во реалниот свет. An important step to analyze the discussions on social media and to assist in healthy decision-making is stance detection.  Овој весник претставува пристап за детектирање на ставот на корисникот кон тема базирана на нивните ставови кон други теми и постови на социјалните медиуми на корисникот. Ние аплицираме факторизациски машини, широко употребен метод во препораката на предмети, за моделирање на преференциите на корисниците кон теми од податоците на социјалните медиуми. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека постовите на корисниците се корисни за моделирање на преференциите на темата и затоа предвидуваат ставови на тивките корисници.', 'lt': 'Social in ė žiniasklaida teikia platformas, skirtas išreikšti, aptarti ir formuoti nuomones apie įvykius ir klausimus realiame pasaulyje. Svarbus žingsnis analizuojant diskusijas apie social in ę žiniasklaidą ir padėti priimti sveikus sprendimus yra pozicijų nustatymas. Šiame dokumente pateikiamas metodas, kaip nustatyti vartotojo poziciją temos atžvilgiu, pagrįstą jų pozicijomis kitų temų atžvilgiu ir vartotojo socialinių žiniasklaidos postų atžvilgiu. We apply factorization machines, a widely used method in item recommendation, to model user preferences toward topics from the social media data.  Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad naudotojų pareigos yra naudingos modeliuojant temines preferencijas ir todėl numatant tylių naudotojų pozicijas.', 'ms': 'Social media provide platforms to express, discuss, and shape opinions about events and issues in the real world.  Langkah penting untuk menganalisis perbincangan tentang media sosial dan membantu dalam keputusan yang sehat adalah pengesan kedudukan. Kertas ini memperkenalkan pendekatan untuk mengesan kedudukan pengguna terhadap topik berdasarkan kedudukan mereka terhadap topik lain dan pos media sosial pengguna. Kami melaksanakan mesin faktorisasi, kaedah yang digunakan secara luas dalam rekomendasi item, untuk model keutamaan pengguna terhadap topik dari data media sosial. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa pos pengguna berguna untuk model keutamaan topik dan oleh itu meramalkan kedudukan pengguna diam.', 'mn': 'Нийгмийн мэдээллийн хэрэглэгчид бодит ертөнцийн үйл явдал, асуудлыг илэрхийлэх, ярилцах, төсөөлөх платформ хангадаг. Нийгмийн хэвлэлийн тухай ярилцлагааг шинжилгээ, эрүүл шийдвэр гаргах тулд туслах чухал алхам нь нөхцөл байдлыг олох юм. Энэ цаас хэрэглэгчийн нөхцөл байдлыг бусад сэдэв болон хэрэглэгчдийн нийгмийн мэдээллийн захирал дээр үндсэн сэдэв дээр олж мэдэх арга зам гаргадаг. Бид бүтээгдэхүүний хэрэглэгчийн сонголтуудыг нийгмийн медиа өгөгдлийн сэдвээс илүү их хэрэглэгддэг аргыг ашиглаж байна. Үүний туршилтын үр дүнд хэрэглэгчийн захидал сэдвийн сонголтуудын загварын тулд хэрэглэгддэг болохоор чимээгүй хэрэглэгчийн нөхцөл байдлыг таамаглаж байна.', 'ml': 'സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമുകള്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിപ്പിക്കുന്നു, സംസാരിക്കുന്നത്, സംസാരിക്കുന്നതും രൂപം ചെയ്യ സോഷ്യല്\u200d മീഡിയിലെ സംസാരം അന്വേഷിക്കാനും സുഖമായ തീരുമാനിക്കാനും സഹായിക്കാനും ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പടി ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സ്ഥിതിയെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഒരു വഴിയുണ്ട്. മറ്റു വിഷയങ്ങളിലേക്കും ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സാമൂഹ്യ മ സോഷ്യല്\u200d മെഡിയാ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്നും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ മുന്\u200dഗണങ്ങള്\u200d മാതൃകയിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുക. പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു ഉപയോക്താക്കളുടെ പോസ്റ്റുകള്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്', 'no': 'Socielle medier tilbyr plattformar for å uttrykke, diskutere og formere meningar om hendingar og problemar i verkeleg verda. Eit viktig steg for å analysera diskusjonane på sosiale medier og å hjelpa i helse beslutningar er oppdaging av stasjon. Denne papiret viser ein tilnærming til å finna stasjonen av ein brukar mot eit emne basert på stasjonen sine til andre emne og sosiale mediepost av brukaren. Vi brukar faktoriseringsmaskiner, ein breidde brukt metode i tilrådd av elementet, for å modellere brukarinnstillingar mot emne frå sosiale media-data. Eksperimentale resultatet viser at brukarane er nyttig for å modellere emne-innstillingar og derfor foregå stasjon på stille brukarar.', 'mt': 'Il-midja soċjali tipprovdi pjattaformi biex jesprimu, jiddiskutu u jiffurmaw opinjonijiet dwar avvenimenti u kwistjonijiet fid-dinja reali. Pass importanti biex jiġu analizzati d-diskussjonijiet dwar il-midja soċjali u biex tingħata għajnuna fit-teħid ta’ deċiżjonijiet b’saħħithom huwa l-identifikazzjoni tal-pożizzjonijiet. Dan id-dokument jippreżenta approċċ biex jinstab il-pożizzjoni ta’ utent lejn suġġett ibbażat fuq il-pożizzjonijiet tagħhom lejn suġġetti oħra u l-postijiet tal-midja soċjali tal-utent. Aħna napplikaw magni tal-fatturizzazzjoni, metodu użat ħafna fir-rakkomandazzjoni tal-punt, biex nimmudellaw il-preferenzi tal-utenti lejn suġġetti mid-dejta tal-midja soċjali. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li l-postijiet tal-utenti huma utli biex jimmudellaw il-preferenzi tematiċi u għalhekk jipprevedu l-pożizzjonijiet tal-utenti silenzjużi.', 'pl': 'Media społecznościowe zapewniają platformy do wyrażania, dyskusji i kształtowania opinii na temat wydarzeń i problemów w realnym świecie. Ważnym krokiem do analizy dyskusji w mediach społecznościowych i pomocy w zdrowym podejmowaniu decyzji jest wykrywanie stanowiska. W artykule przedstawiono podejście do wykrywania stanowiska użytkownika wobec tematu na podstawie jego stanowiska wobec innych tematów i postów użytkownika w mediach społecznościowych. Do modelowania preferencji użytkowników wobec tematów z danych mediów społecznościowych stosujemy maszyny faktoryzacyjne, szeroko stosowaną metodę rekomendacji produktów. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że posty użytkowników są przydatne do modelowania preferencji tematycznych i tym samym przewidywania stanowisk cichych użytkowników.', 'sr': 'Socijalni mediji pružaju platforme za izražavanje, raspravu i oblikovanje mišljenja o događajima i pitanjima u stvarnom svijetu. Važan korak za analiziranje diskusija o društvenim medijima i pomoć u donošenju zdravih odluka je otkrivanje stanja. Ovaj papir predstavlja pristup otkrivanju stava korisnika prema temi koja se temelji na njihovim stavovima prema drugim temama i postima društvenih medija korisnika. Mi primjenjujemo fabrikacijske mašine, široko korištenu metodu preporuke predmeta, na modelu preferencija korisnika prema temama iz podataka o društvenim medijima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da su pozicije korisnika korisne za modelu preferencija teme i stoga predviđaju stanje tihih korisnika.', 'ro': 'Social media oferă platforme pentru a exprima, discuta și forma opinii despre evenimente și probleme din lumea reală. Un pas important pentru a analiza discuțiile pe rețelele de socializare și pentru a ajuta la luarea deciziilor sănătoase este detectarea poziției. Această lucrare prezintă o abordare pentru a detecta poziția unui utilizator față de un subiect bazat pe poziția acestuia față de alte subiecte și posturile de pe rețelele de socializare ale utilizatorului. Aplicăm mașini de factorizare, o metodă utilizată pe scară largă în recomandarea articolelor, pentru a modela preferințele utilizatorilor față de subiecte din datele social media. Rezultatele experimentale demonstrează că postările utilizatorilor sunt utile pentru a modela preferințele subiectelor și, prin urmare, pentru a prezice pozițiile utilizatorilor silențioși.', 'so': 'Macluumaadka bulshada ayaa bixiya jardiinooyin ay ku hadlaan, ka sheekaystaan, ku sameynayaan fikirrada dhacdooyinka iyo arrimaha caalamka ah. Xarunta muhiimka ah in la analysiyo hadallada ku saabsan shabakada bulshada iyo in la caawiyo go’aanka caafimaadku ay tahay mid joogista ah. Qoraalkan wuxuu soo bandhigaa qaab ay ku ogaato xaalada uu isticmaalaha ku soo jeedo arimaha kale iyo warqadaha shabakadda bulshada ee isticmaalaha. Waxaynu isticmaalnaa mashiinada waxqabadka, qaab aad u badan oo lagu isticmaalayo arimaha arimaha, si aan u sameynno doorashooyinka isticmaalayaasha arimaha macluumaadka bulshada. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in warqadaha isticmaalayaasha ay faa’iido u leeyihiin tusaale doorashooyinka mada, sababtaas darteed waxay sii sheegtaa xaaladaha caafimaadka ee isticmaalayaasha aamusan.', 'sv': 'Sociala medier erbjuder plattformar för att uttrycka, diskutera och forma åsikter om händelser och frågor i den verkliga världen. Ett viktigt steg för att analysera diskussionerna på sociala medier och hjälpa till med hälsosamt beslutsfattande är ställningstagande detektering. Denna uppsats presenterar ett tillvägagångssätt för att upptäcka en användares inställning till ett ämne baserat på deras inställning till andra ämnen och användarens inlägg på sociala medier. Vi använder faktoriseringsmaskiner, en allmänt använd metod i artikelrekommendation, för att modellera användarpreferenser mot ämnen från sociala mediedata. De experimentella resultaten visar att användarnas inlägg är användbara för att modellera ämnespreferenser och därmed förutsäga ställningstaganden hos tysta användare.', 'ta': 'சமூக ஊடகங்கள் உண்மையான உலகின் நிகழ்வுகளையும் பிரச்சனைகளையும் பற்றிய கருத்துக்களையும் வெளிப்படுத்த, விவாதம ஒரு முக்கியமான படி சமூக ஊடகங்களில் விவாதத்தை ஆய்வு செய்ய மற்றும் நல்ல தீர்ப்பு முடிவு செய்வது நிலையான கண்டு இந்த காகிதத்தில் பயனர் நிலையை கண்டறிவதற்கு ஒரு வழி காட்டுகிறது மற்ற தலைப்புகளின் நிலைமையை அடிப்படையில் அவர்களுடைய நிலைமைகளை மற நாம் காரணி செய்தல் இயந்திரங்களை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம், உருப்படி பரிந்துரையில் விரிவாக பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகி பரிசோதனை முடிவு', 'si': 'සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමාධ්\u200dයම ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය, කතා කරන්න, සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඇත්ත ලෝකය සාමාජික මාධ්\u200dයමයේ කතාව විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න වැදගත් වැදගත් පැත්තක් සහ ස්වාස්ථික තීරණය කරන්න උදව් කරන්න ත මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙක්ගේ ස්ථානය හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශකයේ ප්\u200dරවේශකයෙක්ගේ ස්ථානය හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරවේශකයේ අනිත් විදි අපි සාමාජික මිඩියා දත්තෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් භාවිත කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරයෝජකයාගේ පොස්ට් එක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය', 'ur': 'سوسیلی میڈیا نے سچی دنیا میں اتفاقات اور مسائل کے بارے میں فیصلہ کرنے، بحث کرنے اور روشنی کرنے کے لئے پٹرومیڈ پیدا کیے ہیں۔ سوسیل میڈیا کے بحث کا تحقیق کرنے اور سلامتی فیصلہ کرنے کے لئے مدد کرنے کے لئے ایک اہم قدم ہے. This paper presents a approach to detect the status of a user towards a topic based on their positions towards other topics and the social media posts of the user. ہم فاکتوریزی ماشینوں کو لازم کریں گے، ایک وسیع طریقہ آیتوں کی سفارش میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے، سوسیل میڈیا ڈیٹا سے موضوع کے بارے میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے. آزمائش نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ کارساز کے پوسٹ موڈل ٹوپ غورائش کے لئے فائدہ ہیں اور لہذا چاپ کارساز کے موقعیت کی پیش بینی کریں.', 'uz': "Name Ахборот маълумотларини таҳлил қилиш ва шифо ҳукм чиқариш учун ёрдам бериш мумкин қадамли қадам кўринади. This paper presents an approach to detect the stance of a user toward a topic based on their stances toward other topics and the social media posts of the user.  Biz soʻzni taʼminlovchi soʻzlarda foydalanuvchilarni foydalanuvchining xossalarini o'zgartirish uchun foydalanuvchining moslamalarini qoʻllamiz. Tasavvur natijalari foydalanuvchilar mavzu parametrlarini modellashga foydalanishi mumkin va shunday qilib bu foydalanuvchilar holatlarini koʻrsatish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Các phương tiện xã hội cung cấp bục phát biểu, thảo luận và hình dung ý kiến về các sự kiện và vấn đề trong thế giới thực. Một bước quan trọng để phân tích cuộc thảo luận về các phương tiện xã hội và hỗ trợ cho việc đưa ra quyết định tốt đẹp là phát hiện lập trường. Tờ giấy này đưa ra một phương pháp để phát hiện quan điểm của người dùng về một chủ đề dựa trên quan điểm của họ đối với các chủ đề khác và các bài viết truyền thông xã hội của người dùng. Chúng tôi áp dụng các máy tính sản, một phương pháp được sử dụng rộng rãi trong lời giới thiệu mục tiêu, để mô hình các mục ưa thích đối với các chủ đề từ dữ liệu phương tiện. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy bài đăng của người dùng có ích trong việc mô hình các sở thích chủ đề và do đó dự đoán giọng của người dùng im lặng.', 'bg': 'Социалните медии предоставят платформи за изразяване, обсъждане и оформяне на мнения за събития и проблеми в реалния свят. Важна стъпка за анализ на дискусиите в социалните медии и подпомагане на здравословното вземане на решения е откриването на позиции. Настоящата статия представя подход за откриване на позицията на потребителя към дадена тема въз основа на позициите му към други теми и публикациите в социалните медии на потребителя. Ние прилагаме машини за факторизация, широко използван метод в препоръката на артикули, за моделиране на потребителските предпочитания към теми от социалните медии. Експерименталните резултати показват, че публикациите на потребителите са полезни за моделиране на тематичните предпочитания и следователно прогнозиране на позициите на мълчаливите потребители.', 'nl': 'Sociale media bieden platforms om meningen over gebeurtenissen en kwesties in de echte wereld uit te drukken, te bespreken en vorm te geven. Een belangrijke stap om de discussies op sociale media te analyseren en te helpen bij gezonde besluitvorming is standdetectie. Dit artikel presenteert een benadering om de houding van een gebruiker ten opzichte van een onderwerp te detecteren op basis van hun standpunten ten opzichte van andere onderwerpen en de sociale media berichten van de gebruiker. We passen factorization machines toe, een veel gebruikte methode in artikelaanbeveling, om gebruikersvoorkeuren te modelleren ten opzichte van onderwerpen uit de social media data. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat posts van gebruikers nuttig zijn om topic voorkeuren te modelleren en daarmee standpunten van stille gebruikers te voorspellen.', 'da': 'Sociale medier giver platforme til at udtrykke, diskutere og forme meninger om begivenheder og spørgsmål i den virkelige verden. Et vigtigt skridt til at analysere diskussionerne på sociale medier og hjælpe med sund beslutningstagning er holdningsdetektering. Denne artikel præsenterer en tilgang til at detektere en brugers holdning til et emne baseret på deres holdning til andre emner og brugerens indlæg på sociale medier. Vi anvender faktoriseringsmaskiner, en meget udbredt metode i artikelanbefaling, til at modellere brugerpræferencer mod emner fra sociale medier data. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at brugernes indlæg er nyttige til at modellere emnepræferencer og derfor forudsige holdninger af tavse brugere.', 'de': 'Social Media bieten Plattformen, um Meinungen über Ereignisse und Themen in der realen Welt auszudrücken, zu diskutieren und zu gestalten. Ein wichtiger Schritt zur Analyse der Diskussionen in sozialen Medien und zur Unterstützung gesunder Entscheidungen ist die Positionserkennung. Dieser Beitrag stellt einen Ansatz vor, um die Haltung eines Nutzers zu einem Thema basierend auf seiner Haltung zu anderen Themen und den Social-Media-Beiträgen des Nutzers zu erkennen. Wir verwenden Factorization Machines, eine weit verbreitete Methode in der Artikelempfehlung, um Benutzerpräferenzen zu Themen aus den Social-Media-Daten zu modellieren. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass Nutzerbeiträge nützlich sind, um Themenpräferenzen zu modellieren und somit Haltungen stiller Nutzer vorherzusagen.', 'fa': 'رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی برای تعریف، بحث و شکل نظریه\u200cها در مورد اتفاقات و مسائل در دنیای واقعی، Platform\u200cهای اجتماعی را فراهم می\u200cکنند. یک قدم مهم برای تحلیل مکالمات در رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی و کمک به تصمیم\u200cگیری سلامتی شناسایی موقعیت است. این کاغذ یک روش برای شناسایی وضعیت یک کاربر به عنوان یک موضوع بر اساس وضعیت\u200cهایشان به عنوان موضوع دیگر و وضعیت رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی کاربر نشان می\u200cدهد. ما ماشین\u200cهای فکتوریزی، یک روش وسیع استفاده شده در پیشنهاد عناصر، برای مدل ترجیح\u200cهای کاربر به عنوان موضوع\u200cهای داده\u200cهای رسانه\u200cهای اجتماعی استفاده می\u200cکنیم. نتایج آزمایشی نشان می دهد که پوست کاربران برای مدل ترجیح\u200cهای موضوع مفید هستند و بنابراین وضعیت\u200cهای کاربران ساکت را پیش بینی کنید.', 'id': 'Media sosial menyediakan platform untuk mengekspresikan, mendiskusikan, dan membentuk pendapat tentang peristiwa dan isu di dunia nyata. An important step to analyze the discussions on social media and to assist in healthy decision-making is stance detection.  Kertas ini menunjukkan pendekatan untuk mendeteksi posisi pengguna menuju topik berdasarkan posisi mereka menuju topik lain dan pos media sosial pengguna. Kami menerapkan mesin faktorisasi, metode yang sangat digunakan dalam rekomendasi item, untuk model keutamaan pengguna terhadap topik dari data media sosial. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa pos pengguna berguna untuk model keutamaan topik dan oleh itu memprediksi posisi pengguna diam.', 'ko': '소셜 미디어는 현실 세계의 사건과 문제에 대한 견해를 표현하고 토론하며 형상화하는 데 플랫폼을 제공한다.소셜 미디어의 토론을 분석하고 건강한 결정을 돕는 중요한 단계는 자세 측정이다.본고는 사용자가 다른 주제에 대한 태도와 사용자가 소셜 미디어에 올린 게시물을 바탕으로 사용자가 특정한 주제에 대한 태도를 측정하는 방법을 제시했다.우리는 프로젝트 추천에서 광범위하게 사용되는 인자 분해기를 사용하여 사용자가 소셜 미디어 데이터 주제에 대한 선호도를 모의한다.실험 결과 사용자의 게시물은 화제 선호 모델을 구축해 침묵 사용자의 입장을 예측하는 데 도움이 된다.', 'sw': 'Vyombo vya habari vya kijamii vinatoa jukwaa la kuonyesha, kujadili, na kutengeneza maoni kuhusu matukio na masuala yanayohusu dunia halisi. Hatua muhimu ya kuchambua mijadala kwenye mitandao ya kijamii na kusaidia kufanya maamuzi ya afya ni kutambua msimamo. Gazeti hili linaleta mbinu ya kutambua mtazamo wa mtumiaji kwenye mada inayohusiana na mtazamo wao kwenye mada nyingine na makala za mitandao ya kijamii za mtumiaji. We apply factorization machines, a widely used method in item recommendation, to model user preferences toward topics from the social media data.  Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa makala za watumiaji zinasaidia kuonyesha vipaumbele vya mada na hivyo kutabiri hali ya watumiaji wa ukimya.', 'tr': 'Sosyal medýýatlar hakynda bolup geçýän hadysalar we meseleler barada düşünjeleri ifade etmek, gürrüňlemek we çykmak üçin platformlary saýlaýarlar. Soýunlar medýdançalarynyň söhbetlerini çözümlemek we saglykly karar bermege kömek etmek üçin wajyp adım şol durum tapmakdyr. Bu kagyz ulançyň meýdanyny başga meýdanlary we sosial mediýalyň meýdanlary tarapyna daýan bir meýdany tapmak üçin bir nusga görkezýär. Biz fabrikasiýa makinelerini, elementler maslahat täblisasynda ullanýan bir yöntem saýlamak üçin ullanýarys. Deneysel netijeler ularynyň meýdançalarynyň meýdança tercihleri örän faydaly bolandygyny görkezýär we şonuň üçin sessiz ularyň durumlaryny çaklama.', 'af': "Soziale media verskaf platforme om besonderhede oor gebeurtenis en probleme in die werklike wêreld te uitspreek, bespreek en te vorm. 'n belangrike stap om die diskusie op sosiale media te analiseer en om in gesond besluit te stel te help is staanse-opdekking. Hierdie papier stel 'n toegang om die staanse van 'n gebruiker na 'n onderwerp te vind wat op hul staanse gebaseer word tot ander onderwerpe en die sosiale media pos van die gebruiker. Ons toewend faktoriseeringmasjiene, 'n vaste gebruikte metode in item aanbeveling, om gebruiker voorkeure te model teen onderwerpe van die sosiale media data. Die eksperimentale resultate wys dat gebruikers se pos nuttig is om temavoorkeure te model en dus voorskou staanse van stilte gebruikers.", 'sq': 'Media sociale ofron platforma për të shprehur, diskutuar dhe formuar opinione rreth ngjarjeve dhe çështjeve në botën reale. Një hap i rëndësishëm për të analizuar diskutimet mbi mediat sociale dhe për të ndihmuar në marrjen e vendimeve të shëndetshme është zbulimi i qëndrimeve. Ky dokument paraqet një qasje për të zbuluar qëndrimin e një përdoruesi drejt një teme bazuar në qëndrimet e tyre drejt temave të tjera dhe posteve të medias sociale të përdoruesit. Ne aplikojmë makina faktorizimi, një metodë e përdorur gjerësisht në rekomandimin e objekteve, për të modeluar preferimet e përdoruesve ndaj temave nga të dhënat e medias sociale. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se postimet e përdoruesve janë të dobishme për të modeluar preferimet tematike dhe kështu parashikojnë qëndrimet e përdoruesve të heshtur.', 'hr': 'Socijalni mediji pružaju platforme za izražavanje, raspravu i oblikovanje mišljenja o događajima i pitanjima u stvarnom svijetu. Važan korak za analiziranje diskusija o društvenim medijima i pomoć u donošenju zdravih odluka je otkrivanje stanja. Ovaj papir predstavlja pristup otkrivanju stava korisnika prema temi na temi koja se temelji na njihovim stavovima prema drugim temama i postima društvenih medija korisnika. Primjenjujemo fabrikacijske strojeve, široko korištenu metodu preporuke predmeta, na modelu preferencija korisnika prema temama iz podataka o društvenim medijima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da su mjesta korisnika korisna za modelu preferencija teme i stoga predviđaju stanje tihih korisnika.', 'am': 'ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያዎች እውነተኛ ዓለም ላይ ሁኔታዎችን እና ጉዳዮችን ለመግለጥ፣ ለመግለጽ፣ እና ለማሳየት እና አስተያየትን ለማድረግ ጦማሪያዎችን ሰጥተዋል፡፡ በአማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ላይ ውይይቶችን ለማስተዋል እና ጤናዊ መፍትሄድን ለመረዳት የሚያስፈልገው የግል እርግጠኛ ደረጃ ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ ለሌሎች ጉዳዮች እና የማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያ ደብዳቤዎች ላይ የተደረገውን የተጠቃሚውን ጉዳይ ለመግለጥ የሚችሉትን አካባቢ ያሳየዋል፡፡ ማኅበራዊ ሚዲያ ዳታዎችን ለመምረጥ የተጠቃሚዎችን ምርጫዎች እናደርጋለን፡፡ ፈተናው ውጤቶች የተጠቃሚዎቹ ጽሑፎች የጉዳዩ ምርጫዎችን ማሳየት ይጠቅማል፡፡', 'hy': 'Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցները տրամադրում են պլատֆորմներ, որոնք արտահայտում են, քննարկում և ձևավորում են կարծիքներ իրական աշխարհի իրադարձությունների և խնդիրների մասին: Սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների քննարկումների վերլուծման և օգնելու առողջ որոշումների կայացման մեջ կարևոր քայլ է դիրքի հայտնաբերման: Այս թղթին ներկայացնում է մոտեցում օգտագործողի դիրքի հայտնաբերելու համար մի թեմայի վրա, որը հիմնված է նրանց դիրքերի վրա այլ թեմայի և օգտագործողի սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների դիրքերի վրա: Մենք կիրառում ենք գործոնավորումների մեքենաներ, տարածաբար օգտագործված մեթոդներ, որպեսզի մոդելավորենք օգտագործողների նախընտրությունները սոցիալական մեդիայի տվյալների թեմաների նկատմամբ: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ օգտագործողների դիրքերը օգտակար են թեմայի նախընտրությունների մոդելավորման համար, և հետևաբար կանխատեսում են լռ օգտագործողների դիրքերը:', 'bn': 'সামাজিক প্রচার মাধ্যম বাস্তব বিশ্বের ঘটনা এবং বিষয়গুলো নিয়ে মতামত প্রকাশ, আলোচনা এবং আকৃতি প্রদান করার জন্য প্লাটফর্ স্বাস্থ্য সিদ্ধান্ত নিতে সাহায্য করার জন্য সামাজিক মিডিয়ায় আলোচনা বিশ্লেষণের একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ পদক্ষে এই পত্রিকাটি অন্যান্য বিষয়ের দিকে তাদের অবস্থান এবং ব্যবহারকারীর সামাজিক মিডিয়া পোস্টের উপর ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক এক ব্যবহারকারীর অবস সামাজিক মিডিয়া তথ্য থেকে বিষয়বস্তুর প্রতি ব্যবহারকারীদের পছন্দ মডেল করার জন্য আমরা ফ্যাক্টরিশন মেশিন প্রয়োগ করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল প্রমাণ করে যে ব্যবহারকারীদের পোস্টগুলো বিষয়বস্তুর পছন্দের মডেল করার জন্য উপকার রয়েছে এবং তাই নীরব ব্যবহারকারীদে', 'bs': 'Socijalni mediji pružaju platforme za izražavanje, raspravu i oblikovanje mišljenja o događajima i pitanjima u stvarnom svijetu. Važan korak za analiziranje diskusija o društvenim medijima i pomoć u donošenju zdravih odluka je otkrivanje stanja. Ovaj papir predstavlja pristup otkrivanju stava korisnika prema temi koja se temelji na njihovim stavovima prema drugim temama i postima društvenih medija korisnika. Primjenjujemo fabrikacijske mašine, široko korištenu metodu preporuke predmeta, na modelu preferencija korisnika prema temama iz podataka o društvenim medijima. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da su pozicije korisnika korisne za modelu preferencija teme i stoga predviđaju stanje tihih korisnika.', 'ca': "Els mitjans socials proporcionen plataformes per expressar, discutir i formar opinions sobre esdeveniments i qüestions al món real. Un pas important per analitzar les discussions sobre els mitjans socials i ajudar a prendre decisions sanes és la detecció de posicions. Aquest paper presenta un enfocament per detectar la posició d'un usuari cap a un tema basat en les seves posicions cap a altres temes i les publicacions dels mitjans socials del usuari. We apply factorization machines, a widely used method in item recommendation, to model user preferences toward topics from the social media data.  Els resultats experimentals demostren que els posts dels usuaris són útils per modelar preferències temàtiques i, per tant, predir les posicions dels usuaris silenciosos.", 'az': 'Sosyal media həqiqət dünyada olaraq və məsələlər barəsindəki fikirləri ifadə etmək, mübahisə etmək və şəkildə təşkil etmək üçün platformları təmin edir. Sosyal media danışmalarını analizə etmək və sağlam karar verməyə kömək etmək məqsədilə bir adım var. Bu kağıt istifadəçinin vəziyyətini başqa məsələlərə və istifadəçinin sosyal media məsələlərinə dayanan məsələlərə təsdiqləmək üçün tərzini göstərir. Biz faktorizasyon makinelərini, elementlərin tövsiyəsində geniş istifadə edilən metodları, sosyal media məlumatlarından istifadəçilərin seçimlərini modellərə uydururuq. Müxtəlif sonuçlar istifadəçilərin məsələlərin məsələlərinin seçimlərinin modeli üçün faydalı olduğunu göstərir və buna görə də susam istifadəçilərin durumlarını təmin edirlər.', 'cs': 'Sociální média poskytují platformy pro vyjádření, diskusi a formování názorů na události a problémy v reálném světě. Důležitým krokem pro analýzu diskusí na sociálních médiích a pomoc při zdravém rozhodování je detekce postojů. Tento článek představuje přístup k detekci postoje uživatele k tématu na základě jeho postojů k jiným tématům a příspěvků uživatele na sociálních sítích. Používáme faktorizační stroje, široce používanou metodu při doporučování položek, k modelování preferencí uživatelů k tématům z dat sociálních médií. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že příspěvky uživatelů jsou užitečné pro modelování preferencí témat, a proto předpovídají postoje tichých uživatelů.', 'et': 'Sotsiaalmeedia pakub platvorme arvamuste väljendamiseks, arutamiseks ja kujundamiseks reaalses maailmas toimuvate sündmuste ja probleemide kohta. Oluline samm sotsiaalmeedias toimuvate arutelude analüüsimisel ja tervislike otsuste tegemisel on seisukohtade tuvastamine. Käesolev töö esitab lähenemisviisi kasutaja seisukoha tuvastamiseks teema suhtes, tuginedes tema seisukohtadele teiste teemade ja kasutaja sotsiaalmeedia postituste suhtes. Rakendame faktorisatsiooni masinaid, mis on laialdaselt kasutatav meetod toodete soovitamisel, et modelleerida kasutajate eelistusi sotsiaalmeedia andmete teemade suhtes. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et kasutajate postitused on kasulikud teemaeelistuste modelleerimiseks ja seega vaikivate kasutajate seisukohtade prognoosimiseks.', 'fi': 'Sosiaalinen media tarjoaa alustoja ilmaista, keskustella ja muokata mielipiteitä tapahtumista ja kysymyksistä reaalimaailmassa. Tärkeä askel sosiaalisen median keskustelujen analysoinnissa ja terveellisessä päätöksenteossa on asenteiden havaitseminen. Tässä artikkelissa esitetään lähestymistapa käyttäjän asenteen havaitsemiseen aihetta kohtaan hänen asenteensa muihin aiheisiin ja käyttäjän sosiaalisen median viesteihin. Hyödynnämme laajasti käytettyä tuotesuosituksessa käytettävää faktorisointikonetta käyttäjien mieltymysten mallintamiseen sosiaalisen median datan aiheita kohtaan. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että käyttäjien julkaisut ovat hyödyllisiä aihemieltymysten mallintamiseen ja hiljaisten käyttäjien asenteiden ennustamiseen.', 'ha': 'Social media provide platforms to express, discuss, and shape opinions about events and issues in the real world.  Babu wani takwara mai muhimu dõmin a yi analyza masu jãyayya a cikin mita da jamii kuma taimakon su yi taimako da yin hukunci da afya, na gane fassara. Wannan takardan na bãyar da wani matsayi ya gane hali na mai amfani da shi zuwa ga wani madaidaici wanda ya samu da matsayin wasu madaidaita da matsayin mitandaci na amfani da shi. Tuna amfani da mashine masu tsari, shirin mai amfani da shi cikin shawarar ƙanni, dõmin ka motsa zaɓen amfani da masu amfani zuwa madaidaita daga danne-zanen mutane na jamii. Matarin jarrabai sun nuna cewa posten mãsu amfani da shi yana da amfani ga ka motsa zaɓaniyan madaidaita, kuma don haka ka yi bayani ga halin mãsu amfani da sauti.', 'sk': 'Družbeni mediji ponujajo platforme za izražanje, razpravljanje in oblikovanje mnenj o dogodkih in vprašanjih v realnem svetu. Pomemben korak za analizo razprav na družbenih medijih in pomoč pri zdravem sprejemanju odločitev je odkrivanje stališča. V prispevku je predstavljen pristop k odkrivanju stališča uporabnika do teme, ki temelji na njegovih stališčih do drugih tem in objavah uporabnika v družabnih omrežjih. Uporabljamo faktorizacijske stroje, ki je pogosto uporabljena metoda pri priporočanju izdelkov, za modeliranje uporabniških preferenc do teme iz podatkov družbenih omrežij. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da so objave uporabnikov koristne za modeliranje tematskih preferenc in s tem napovedovanje stališč tihih uporabnikov.', 'jv': 'Media sothik nyenggawe sistem kanggo tukang, ngrungawe, lan nggawe oleh panjenengan karo events lan usul kanggo awak dhéwé kuwi mungkane ora. Pak sing dikarepaké kanggo maneh pisan kanggo media sotiki lan nglanggar nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe barang maning. Gambar iki rambarang panjenengan ngerasakno nggawe ngubah tresnaning sak tema sing bisa digawe cara-tema sing luwih dumadhi sing nggawe tema sing wis nong, lan situs media sampeyan pengguna. section Rejalaké sing paling nggambar daké peugot nang gunakake bener tentang kanggo nggawe Perintah Tema lan dadi supoyo ngerayakno karo pengguna sing isih.', 'he': 'התקשורת החברתית מספקת פלטפורמות להביע, לדון ולצור דעות על אירועים ובנושאים בעולם האמיתי. צעד חשוב לנתח את הדיונים על התקשורת החברתית ולעזור בהחלטה בריאה הוא גילוי עמדה. העיתון הזה מציג גישה כדי לזהות את עמדתו של משתמש כלפי נושא המבוסס על עמדותיהם כלפי נושאים אחרים ומועדות התקשורת החברתית של המשתמש. אנו משתמשים במכונות פיקטוריזציה, שיטה משתמשת בצורה רחבה בהמלצה של פריטים, כדי לדוגמא עדיפות משתמשים כלפי נושאים ממידע התקשורת החברתית. התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שפוסטים של המשתמשים שימושיים למודל עדיפות נושאים ולכן לחזות עמדות של משתמשים שקטים.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་ཐོག་གི་གཏམ་གླེང་འཆར་བརྟན་པར་གལ་ཆེན་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ནའང་ཡང་ནད་མེད་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་དང་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གནས་ཚུལ་གཞན་དང་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་འཁོར་བཟོ་བྱེད་མི་ལག་འཁྱེར་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་པ་ཡིན་ནའང་ཚང་མཁན་གྱི་འགྲོ་སྟངས་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐ ལག་ལེན་པའི་མཐོང་སྣང་གི་གནས་ཡུལ་ནི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་ཡུལ་དེ་གནད་དོན་གྱི་རང་མོས་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ལ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཐབས'}
{'en': 'Automatic Detection of Fake News', 'ar': 'الكشف التلقائي عن الأخبار الكاذبة', 'fr': 'Détection automatique des fausses nouvelles', 'pt': 'Detecção automática de notícias falsas', 'es': 'Detección automática de noticias falsas', 'ja': 'フェイクニュースの自動検出', 'hi': 'नकली समाचार का स्वत: पता लगाना', 'ru': 'Автоматическое обнаружение фейковых новостей', 'zh': '自动检测假新闻', 'ga': 'Brath Uathoibríoch ar Nuacht Bréige', 'ka': 'Comment', 'hu': 'Hamis hírek automatikus felismerése', 'el': 'Αυτόματη ανίχνευση πλαστών ειδήσεων', 'mk': 'Автоматска детекција на лажни вести', 'it': 'Rilevamento automatico di notizie false', 'lt': 'Automatinis suklastotų naujienų aptikimas', 'kk': 'Жаңалықтарды автоматты түрде анықтау', 'ms': 'Pengesanan automatik berita palsu', 'mt': 'Sejbien Awtomatiku ta’ Aħbarijiet Falsi', 'mn': 'Хуудлын мэдээллийг автоматаар мэдэх', 'no': 'Automatisk oppdaging av falske nyttar', 'ml': 'ഫെയ്ക് വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ സ്വയം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കുക', 'ro': 'Detectarea automată a știrilor false', 'pl': 'Automatyczne wykrywanie fałszywych wiadomości', 'si': 'Name', 'sr': 'Automatski otkrivanje lažnih vesti', 'so': 'Sidoo kale baaritaanka macluumaadka dhaqdhaqaaqa', 'sv': 'Automatisk upptäckt av falska nyheter', 'ur': 'Comment', 'ta': 'போலி செய்திகளின் தானாகவே கண்டுபிடிப்பு', 'uz': 'Faqat yangiliklarni avtomatik aniqlash', 'vi': 'Phát hiện bản tin giả', 'da': 'Automatisk registrering af falske nyheder', 'hr': 'Automatski otkrivanje lažnih vijesti', 'bg': 'Автоматично откриване на фалшиви новини', 'nl': 'Automatische detectie van nepnieuws', 'ko': '가짜 뉴스의 자동 검출', 'fa': 'پیدا کردن اخبار غلط خودکار', 'id': 'Deteksi Otomatis Berita Salah', 'de': 'Automatische Erkennung von Fake News', 'sw': 'Kugundua Habari za Udanganyiko', 'sq': 'Zbulimi automatik i lajmeve të rreme', 'af': 'Comment', 'tr': 'ýalňyş Täzelikleri Otomatik Aňlamak', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'az': 'Fake Haqlarının Avtomatik Açışı', 'hy': 'Սխալ նորությունների ավտոմատ հայտնաբերումը', 'bn': 'ফ্যাক সংবাদের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে সনাক্ত করা হবে', 'bs': 'Automatski otkrivanje lažnih vijesti', 'ca': 'Detecció automàtica de notícies falses', 'cs': 'Automatická detekce falešných zpráv', 'et': 'Võltsitud uudiste automaatne tuvastamine', 'fi': 'Väärennettyjen uutisten automaattinen tunnistaminen', 'jv': 'dockable-action', 'sk': 'Samodejno zaznavanje lažnih novic', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'גילוי אוטומטי של חדשות מזויפות', 'bo': 'རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དྲ་བ་བཙལ་བ'}
{'en': 'The proliferation of misleading information in everyday access media outlets such as social media feeds, news blogs, and online newspapers have made it challenging to identify trustworthy news sources, thus increasing the need for computational tools able to provide insights into the reliability of online content. In this paper, we focus on the automatic identification of fake content in online news. Our contribution is twofold. First, we introduce two novel datasets for the task of fake news detection, covering seven different news domains. We describe the collection, annotation, and validation process in detail and present several exploratory analyses on the identification of linguistic differences in fake and legitimate news content. Second, we conduct a set of learning experiments to build accurate fake news detectors, and show that we can achieve accuracies of up to 76 %. In addition, we provide comparative analyses of the automatic and manual identification of fake news.', 'ar': 'أدى انتشار المعلومات المضللة في وسائل الإعلام ذات الوصول اليومي مثل خلاصات الوسائط الاجتماعية والمدونات الإخبارية والصحف عبر الإنترنت إلى صعوبة تحديد مصادر الأخبار الجديرة بالثقة ، وبالتالي زيادة الحاجة إلى أدوات حسابية قادرة على توفير رؤى حول موثوقية المحتوى عبر الإنترنت. في هذه الورقة ، نركز على التحديد التلقائي للمحتوى الوهمي في الأخبار عبر الإنترنت. اسهامنا على قسمين. أولاً ، نقدم مجموعتي بيانات جديدتين لمهمة الكشف عن الأخبار المزيفة ، تغطي سبعة مجالات إخبارية مختلفة. نحن نصف عملية الجمع والتعليق التوضيحي والتحقق من الصحة بالتفصيل ونقدم العديد من التحليلات الاستكشافية حول تحديد الاختلافات اللغوية في محتوى الأخبار المزيف والشرعي. ثانيًا ، نجري مجموعة من التجارب التعليمية لبناء أجهزة كشف دقيقة للأخبار الوهمية ، ونوضح أنه يمكننا تحقيق دقة تصل إلى 76٪. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقدم تحليلات مقارنة للتعرف التلقائي واليدوي للأخبار المزيفة.', 'es': 'La proliferación de información engañosa en los medios de comunicación de acceso diario, como las redes sociales, los blogs de noticias y los periódicos en línea, ha hecho que sea difícil identificar fuentes de noticias confiables, lo que aumenta la necesidad de herramientas computacionales capaces de proporcionar información sobre la confiabilidad del contenido en línea. . En este artículo, nos centramos en la identificación automática de contenido falso en las noticias en línea. Nuestra contribución es doble. Primero, presentamos dos conjuntos de datos novedosos para la tarea de detección de noticias falsas, que cubren siete dominios de noticias diferentes. Describimos el proceso de recopilación, anotación y validación en detalle y presentamos varios análisis exploratorios sobre la identificación de diferencias lingüísticas en el contenido de noticias falsas y legítimas. En segundo lugar, realizamos una serie de experimentos de aprendizaje para construir detectores de noticias falsas precisos y demostramos que podemos lograr una precisión de hasta el 76%. Además, ofrecemos análisis comparativos de la identificación automática y manual de noticias falsas.', 'pt': 'A proliferação de informações enganosas nos meios de comunicação de acesso diário, como feeds de mídia social, blogs de notícias e jornais online, tornou desafiador identificar fontes de notícias confiáveis, aumentando assim a necessidade de ferramentas computacionais capazes de fornecer insights sobre a confiabilidade do conteúdo online. Neste artigo, focamos na identificação automática de conteúdo falso em notícias online. Nossa contribuição é duas vezes. Primeiro, apresentamos dois novos conjuntos de dados para a tarefa de detecção de notícias falsas, abrangendo sete domínios de notícias diferentes. Descrevemos detalhadamente o processo de coleta, anotação e validação e apresentamos várias análises exploratórias sobre a identificação de diferenças linguísticas em conteúdo de notícias falsas e legítimas. Em segundo lugar, realizamos um conjunto de experimentos de aprendizado para construir detectores precisos de notícias falsas e mostramos que podemos alcançar precisão de até 76%. Além disso, fornecemos análises comparativas da identificação automática e manual de notícias falsas.', 'fr': "La prolifération d'informations trompeuses dans les médias d'accès quotidiens tels que les flux de médias sociaux, les blogs d'information et les journaux en ligne a rendu difficile l'identification de sources d'information fiables, augmentant ainsi le besoin d'outils informatiques capables de fournir des informations sur la fiabilité du contenu en ligne. . Dans cet article, nous nous concentrons sur l'identification automatique des faux contenus dans les actualités en ligne. Notre contribution est double. Tout d'abord, nous introduisons deux nouveaux ensembles de données pour la détection des fausses nouvelles, couvrant sept domaines d'actualités différents. Nous décrivons en détail le processus de collecte, d'annotation et de validation et présentons plusieurs analyses exploratoires sur l'identification des différences linguistiques dans les contenus d'actualités faux et légitimes. Ensuite, nous menons une série d'expériences d'apprentissage pour créer des détecteurs de fausses nouvelles précis, et nous montrons que nous pouvons atteindre des précisions allant jusqu'à 76\xa0%. En outre, nous fournissons des analyses comparatives de l'identification automatique et manuelle des fausses nouvelles.", 'ja': 'ソーシャルメディアフィード、ニュースブログ、オンライン新聞などの日常的なアクセスメディアにおける誤解を招く情報の拡散は、信頼できるニュースソースを特定することを困難にし、オンラインコンテンツの信頼性に関する洞察を提供することができる計算ツールの必要性を高めています。本稿では、オンラインニュースにおけるフェイクコンテンツの自動識別に焦点を当てる。私たちの貢献は2つあります。まず、7つの異なるニュースドメインをカバーするフェイクニュース検出タスクのための2つの新規データセットを紹介します。私たちは、収集、注釈、および検証プロセスを詳細に説明し、偽物および正当なニュースコンテンツにおける言語的差異の特定に関するいくつかの探索的分析を提示します。第二に、正確なフェイクニュース検出器を構築するための一連の学習実験を行い、最大76 ％の精度を達成できることを示します。さらに、フェイクニュースの自動および手動識別の比較分析を提供します。', 'hi': 'सोशल मीडिया फीड, समाचार ब्लॉग और ऑनलाइन समाचार पत्रों जैसे रोजमर्रा के एक्सेस मीडिया आउटलेट्स में भ्रामक जानकारी के प्रसार ने भरोसेमंद समाचार स्रोतों की पहचान करना चुनौतीपूर्ण बना दिया है, इस प्रकार ऑनलाइन सामग्री की विश्वसनीयता में अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करने में सक्षम कम्प्यूटेशनल उपकरणों की आवश्यकता बढ़ गई है। इस पेपर में, हम ऑनलाइन समाचारों में नकली सामग्री की स्वचालित पहचान पर ध्यान केंद्रित करते हैं। हमारा योगदान दोगुना है। सबसे पहले, हम नकली समाचार का पता लगाने के कार्य के लिए दो उपन्यास डेटासेट पेश करते हैं, जिसमें सात अलग-अलग समाचार डोमेन शामिल होते हैं। हम संग्रह, एनोटेशन और सत्यापन प्रक्रिया का विस्तार से वर्णन करते हैं और नकली और वैध समाचार सामग्री में भाषाई मतभेदों की पहचान पर कई अन्वेषणात्मक विश्लेषण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। दूसरा, हम सटीक नकली समाचार डिटेक्टरों का निर्माण करने के लिए सीखने के प्रयोगों का एक सेट आयोजित करते हैं, और दिखाते हैं कि हम 76% तक की सटीकता प्राप्त कर सकते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम नकली समाचारों की स्वचालित और मैनुअल पहचान का तुलनात्मक विश्लेषण प्रदान करते हैं।', 'zh': '社交媒体源、新闻博客、在线报纸访问媒体中,误导性信息者激增使知可信赖之新闻来源有挑战性,而增在线可靠性计之具。 本文,我们重点介了在线新闻中虚妄的自动识别。 我献双重。 首言二假新闻检测之新集,涵盖七异之新闻域。 臣等详细描述集,注验之际,别其虚法新闻语言差异,有所探索性析。 其次学实验,以立正假新闻检测器,明可以达76%之准确率。 此外假新闻自与手动相知也。', 'ru': 'Распространение вводящей в заблуждение информации в повседневных средствах массовой информации, таких как ленты социальных сетей, новостные блоги и интернет-газеты, затрудняет выявление заслуживающих доверия источников новостей, тем самым увеличивая потребность в вычислительных инструментах, способных дать представление о надежности онлайн-контента. В этой статье мы сосредоточимся на автоматической идентификации фейкового контента в онлайн-новостях. Наш вклад является двойным. Во-первых, мы вводим два новых набора данных для задачи обнаружения фейковых новостей, охватывающих семь различных доменов новостей. Мы подробно описываем процесс сбора, аннотации и проверки и представляем несколько поисковых анализов по выявлению языковых различий в поддельном и законном содержании новостей. Во-вторых, мы проводим ряд обучающих экспериментов по созданию точных детекторов фейковых новостей и показываем, что мы можем достичь точности до 76%. Кроме того, мы проводим сравнительный анализ автоматической и ручной идентификации фейковых новостей.', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar an iomadú faisnéise míthreorach in asraonta meán rochtana laethúla ar nós fothaí meán sóisialta, blaganna nuachta, agus nuachtáin ar líne tá sé dúshlánach foinsí iontaofa nuachta a aithint, rud a mhéadaigh an gá atá le huirlisí ríomhaireachtúla chun léargais a sholáthar ar iontaofacht ábhair ar líne. Sa pháipéar seo, dírímid ar shainaithint uathoibríoch ábhar falsa i nuacht ar líne. Tá dhá pháirt againn. Ar an gcéad dul síos, tugaimid isteach dhá thacar sonraí úrnua chun nuacht bhréige a bhrath, a chlúdaíonn seacht réimse nuachta éagsúla. Déanaimid cur síos mion ar an bpróiseas bailithe, anótála agus bailíochtaithe agus cuirimid i láthair roinnt anailísí taiscéalaíoch ar aithint difríochtaí teanga in ábhar nuachta falsa agus dlisteanach. Ar an dara dul síos, déanaimid sraith turgnaimh foghlama chun brathadóirí nuachta falsa cruinne a thógáil, agus léiríonn siad gur féidir linn cruinneas suas le 76% a bhaint amach. Ina theannta sin, soláthraímid anailísí comparáideacha ar shainaithint uathoibríoch agus láimhe na nuachta bréige.', 'ka': 'ყოველდღესობის მისამართების შეცდომა ინფორმაციის გაფართვა, როგორც სოციალური მედიახის ფორმაციები, ნუტური ბლოგები და ინტერნეტიური გვერდილებები შეუძლებელია, რომელიც ინტერნეტიური ინფორმაციის მისამართებელი ფორმაციების გან ამ დოკუნტში ჩვენ ინტერნეტიკური ინფორმაციის ავტომატიკური ინდენტიფიკაციაზე დავყენებთ. ჩვენი დამატება ექნება. პირველი, ჩვენ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ ორი პრომენური მონაცემების კონფიგურაციის დავაკეთება, რომელიც შვიდი განსხვავებული მონაცემების კონფიგურაციას. ჩვენ კოლექციის, ანოტაციის და გავაკეთების პროცესის დეტალურად გამოსახულებთ და გამოსახულებთ რამდენიმე განსხვავებული ანალიზების ინდინტიფიკაციის განსხვავების ინდინტიფიკაციის განსხვავებაზე მეორე, ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სწავლის ექსპერიმენტები, რომელსაც წარმოადგენა მარტივი სიახლეების განახლებელი, და ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ, რომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია 76%-ის წარმოადგენ დამატებით, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ შემდგომარებული ანალიზების ავტომატიკური და მანქანური ინდენტიფიკაციის შესახებ.', 'hu': 'A megtévesztő információk elterjedése a mindennapi hozzáféréssel rendelkező médiákban, például a közösségi média hírcsatornákban, a hírblokkokban és az online újságokban, kihívást jelentett a megbízható hírforrások azonosítása, így növelve a számítástechnikai eszközök szükségességét, amelyek betekintést nyújtanak az online tartalom megbízhatóságába. Ebben a tanulmányban a hamis tartalom automatikus azonosítására összpontosítunk az online hírekben. A hozzájárulásunk kettős. Először is bemutatunk két új adatkészletet a hamis hírek felderítésére, amelyek hét különböző hírdományt fednek fel. Részletesen ismertetjük a gyűjtési, jegyzetelési és validálási folyamatot, valamint számos feltáró elemzést mutatunk be a hamis és törvényes hírtartalom nyelvi eltéréseinek azonosítására. Másodszor, tanulási kísérleteket végzünk, hogy pontos hamis hír detektorokat építsünk, és megmutassuk, hogy akár 76%-os pontosságot is el tudunk érni. Emellett összehasonlító elemzéseket végezünk a hamis hírek automatikus és manuális azonosításáról.', 'el': 'Ο πολλαπλασιασμός παραπλανητικών πληροφοριών στα μέσα ενημέρωσης καθημερινής πρόσβασης, όπως οι ροές κοινωνικών μέσων, τα ιστολόγια ειδήσεων και οι διαδικτυακές εφημερίδες, έχουν καταστήσει δύσκολη τον εντοπισμό αξιόπιστων πηγών ειδήσεων, αυξάνοντας έτσι την ανάγκη για υπολογιστικά εργαλεία ικανά να παρέχουν πληροφορίες σχετικά με την αξιοπιστία του διαδικτυακού περιεχομένου. Σε αυτή την εργασία, εστιάζουμε στην αυτόματη αναγνώριση ψεύτικου περιεχομένου σε διαδικτυακές ειδήσεις. Η συνεισφορά μας είναι διπλή. Πρώτον, εισάγουμε δύο νέα σύνολα δεδομένων για το έργο της ανίχνευσης ψεύτικων ειδήσεων, καλύπτοντας επτά διαφορετικούς τομείς ειδήσεων. Περιγράφουμε λεπτομερώς τη διαδικασία συλλογής, σχολιασμού και επικύρωσης και παρουσιάζουμε διάφορες διερευνητικές αναλύσεις σχετικά με τον εντοπισμό γλωσσικών διαφορών στο ψεύτικο και νόμιμο περιεχόμενο ειδήσεων. Δεύτερον, διεξάγουμε ένα σύνολο μαθησιακών πειραμάτων για να χτίσουμε ακριβείς ανιχνευτές ψεύτικων ειδήσεων και να δείξουμε ότι μπορούμε να επιτύχουμε ακρίβεια μέχρι 76%. Επιπλέον, παρέχουμε συγκριτικές αναλύσεις για την αυτόματη και χειρωνακτική ταυτοποίηση πλαστών ειδήσεων.', 'it': "La proliferazione di informazioni fuorvianti nei media di accesso quotidiano come feed di social media, blog di notizie e giornali online ha reso difficile identificare fonti di notizie affidabili, aumentando così la necessità di strumenti computazionali in grado di fornire approfondimenti sull'affidabilità dei contenuti online. In questo articolo, ci concentriamo sull'identificazione automatica dei contenuti falsi nelle notizie online. Il nostro contributo è duplice. In primo luogo, introduciamo due nuovi dataset per il compito di rilevamento delle fake news, coprendo sette diversi domini di notizie. Descriviamo nel dettaglio il processo di raccolta, annotazione e convalida e presentiamo diverse analisi esplorative sull'identificazione delle differenze linguistiche nei contenuti di notizie false e legittime. In secondo luogo, conduciamo una serie di esperimenti di apprendimento per costruire rivelatori di fake news accurati, e mostriamo che possiamo raggiungere precisione fino al 76%. Inoltre, forniamo analisi comparative dell'identificazione automatica e manuale delle fake news.", 'mk': 'Проширувањето на збркувачки информации во секојдневните медиуми за пристап, како што се податоци од социјалните медиуми, новинските блогови и онлајн весници, го направи тешко идентификувањето на доверливи новински извори, со што се зголемува потребата за компјутерски алатки кои можат да обезбедат информации за Во овој весник се фокусираме на автоматска идентификација на лажна содржина во онлајн вестите. Нашиот придонес е двојен. Прво, воведуваме два нови податоци за задачата на лажно детекција на вести, кои покриваат седум различни новински домени. Ја опишуваме колекцијата, анотацијата и процесот на валидација во детали и претставуваме неколку експлоаторни анализи за идентификацијата на јазичните разлики во лажната и легитимната содржина на вестите. Второ, спроведуваме научни експерименти за изградба на точни лажни новински детектори и покажуваме дека можеме да постигнеме точност до 76 отсто. In addition, we provide comparative analyses of the automatic and manual identification of fake news.', 'kk': 'Күнделікті медиаға қатысты мәліметтер, социалдық медиаға ақпарат, жаңалық блогтар және онлайн жаңалықтар, сенімді жаңалық көзгерістерді анықтау үшін, сондықтан онлайн мазмұның сенімді құқықтарын анықтау үшін компьютер құрылғыларының Бұл қағазда, онлайн жаңалықтарда жалғыз мазмұның автоматты түрде идентификациясына көздейміз. Біздің қатынасыз екі жақсы. Біріншіден, біз жалғыз жаңалық анықтау тапсырмасының екі романдық деректер жиынын келтіріп, 7 жаңалық домендерді жазып тұрмыз. Біз жинақтау, жаңалықтау және тексеру процесін егжей- тегжейлі түсініп, тілдік және жаңалық жаңалықтар мазмұнындағы лингвистикалық айырмашылықтарын анықтау үшін бірнеше зерттеушілерді таңдап Екіншіден, біз дұрыс жаңалық детекторларды құру үшін бірнеше оқыту тәжірибелерін жасап, 76% дегенге дейін дұрыс жеткізе аламыз. Қосымша, біз жалғыз жаңалықтарды автоматты және қолмен анықтайтын салыстырмалы анализ береміз.', 'lt': 'Dėl klaidinančios informacijos plitimo kasdienėse žiniasklaidos rinkose, pavyzdžiui, socialinių žiniasklaidos pranešimuose, naujienų bloguose ir internetiniuose laikraščiuose, sunku nustatyti patikimus naujienų šaltinius ir taip padidinti skaičiavimo priemonių, galinčių suteikti informaciją apie internetinio turinio patikimumą, poreikį. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriame netikslinio turinio automatiniam identifikavimui internetinėse naujienose. Mūsų indėlis yra dvigubas. Pirma, pristatysime du naujus duomenų rinkinius, skirtus suklastotų naujienų aptikimui, apimančius septynis skirtingas naujienų sritis. Išsamiai apibūdiname rinkimo, anotacijos ir patvirtinimo procesą ir pateikiame keletą tiriamųjų analizių, susijusių su klastojo ir teisėto naujienų turinio kalbinių skirtumų nustatymu. Antra, mes atliekame mokymosi eksperimentus, kad sukurtume tikslius suklastotų naujienų detektorius ir parodytume, kad galime pasiekti iki 76 proc. tikslumo. Be to, teikiame lyginamąją automatinio ir rankinio suklastotų naujienų identifikavimo analizę.', 'ms': 'Penjelasan maklumat yang menyesatkan di luar media akses sehari-hari seperti feed media sosial, blog berita, dan surat khabar online telah membuat ia mencabar untuk mengenalpasti sumber berita yang boleh dipercayai, sehingga meningkatkan keperluan untuk alat pengiraan yang mampu menyediakan pemahaman mengenai kepercayaan kandungan online. Dalam kertas ini, kita fokus pada pengenalan automatik kandungan palsu dalam berita online. Kontribusi kita dua kali ganda. Pertama, kita memperkenalkan dua set data novel untuk tugas pengesan berita palsu, meliputi tujuh domain berita yang berbeza. Kami menggambarkan proses koleksi, anotasi, dan pengesahihan secara terperinci dan mempersembahkan beberapa analisis esploratori mengenai pengenalisan perbezaan bahasa dalam kandungan berita palsu dan sah. Kedua, kita melakukan set percubaan belajar untuk membina pengesan berita palsu yang tepat, dan menunjukkan bahawa kita boleh mencapai ketepatan sehingga 76%. Selain itu, kami menyediakan analisis perbandingan mengenai pengenalisan automatik dan manual berita palsu.', 'mt': 'Il-proliferazzjoni ta’ informazzjoni qarrieqa f’postijiet ta’ aċċess għall-midja ta’ kuljum bħal feeds tal-midja soċjali, blogs tal-aħbarijiet, u gazzetti onlajn għamluha diffiċli li jiġu identifikati sorsi ta’ aħbarijiet affidabbli, u b’hekk żdiedet il-ħtieġa għal għodod tal-komputazzjoni li jistgħu jipprovdu għarfien dwar l-affidabbiltà tal-kontenut onlajn. F’dan id-dokument, niffokaw fuq l-identifikazzjoni awtomatika tal-kontenut falz fl-aħbarijiet onlajn. Il-kontribuzzjoni tagħna hija doppja. L-ewwel nett, aħna nintroduċu żewġ settijiet ta’ dejta ġodda għall-kompitu ta’ individwazzjoni ta’ aħbarijiet foloz, li jkopru seba’ oqsma differenti ta’ aħbarijiet. Aħna niddeskrivu fid-dettall il-proċess tal-ġbir, l-annotazzjoni u l-validazzjoni u nippreżentaw diversi analiżi esploratorji dwar l-identifikazzjoni tad-differenzi lingwistiċi fil-kontenut tal-aħbarijiet foloz u leġittimu. It-tieni nett, nagħmlu sett ta’ esperimenti ta’ tagħlim biex nibnu detetturi tal-a ħbarijiet foloz preċiżi, u nuru li nistgħu niksbu preċiżjonijiet sa 76%. In addition, we provide comparative analyses of the automatic and manual identification of fake news.', 'no': 'Utvidelsen av feil informasjon i kvardag tilgang til media-omrisset, slik som sosiale media-meldingar, nyhetsbloggar og nettavviklar har gjort det vanskeleg å identifisera tiltrudige nyhetskjelder, slik at det øker nødvendighet for dataverktøy som kan gjere innsyningar i tiltrudigheten til nettinnhaldet. I denne papiret fokuserer vi på automatisk identifisering av falske innhald i nettnyhetar. Bidraget vårt er to gamle. Først introduserer vi to romanske datasett for oppgåva av falske nyhetsinformasjon og dekker syv forskjellige nyhetseiner. Vi beskriver samlinga, notasjon og validasjonsprosessen i detaljar og presenterer fleire utforskingslar om identifiseringa av språkstiske forskjeller i falsk og legitimt nyhetsinhald. Andre, vi gjer eit sett læringseksperimenter for å bygge nøyaktig falske nyhetsinformasjonar, og viser at vi kan oppnå nøyaktighet til 76%. I tillegg gjev vi sammenlignbare analyser av automatisk og manuelt identifisering av falske nyhetar.', 'mn': 'Өдөр тутам нийгмийн хэвлэл, мэдээллийн блог болон онлайн сонинууд бүр буруу мэдээллийг нэмэгдүүлэх нь итгэлтэй мэдээллийн эх үүсвэрүүдийг тодорхойлж чадна. Иймээс компьютерийн хэрэгслүүд онлайн хэвлэлийн итгэлтэй байдлын талаар ойлголт гаргаж чадна. Энэ цаасан дээр бид онлайн мэдээллийн хуурамч хэмжээний автоматжуулалтыг анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Бидний хөрөнгө оруулалт хоёр дахь. Эхлээд бид хоёр шинэ өгөгдлийн сангуудыг хуурамч мэдээг олохын тулд тайлбарлаж, 7 өөр мэдээний сүлжээг нэвтрүүлнэ. Бид цуглуулалт, анзаарал, шийдвэрлэлт болон шийдвэрлэх процессийг нарийвчлан тайлбарлаж, хэлний ялгааг хуурамжлалтай, хууль мэдээний тодорхойлолтын тухай олон судалгааны анализ өгдөг. Хоёрдугаар, бид худлаа мэдээлэл тогтоогч бүтээхэд суралцах туршилтыг хийж, 76% хүртэл шударга байдал гаргаж чадна. Мөн бид хуурамч мэдээний автоматжуулалтын, гарын тодорхойлолтын харьцуулалтыг гаргадаг.', 'ml': 'വിശ്വസ്തനായ വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ സ്രോതസ്സുകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d വിശ്വാസമുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അതുകൊണ്ട് കണക്കുകൂട്ടുകണക്കിനുള്ള ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d കൂ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ സ്വയം തിരിച്ചറിയാന്\u200d ശ്രദ്ധിക്കുന്നു. നമ്മുടെ പങ്ക് രണ്ടിരട്ടിയാണ്. ആദ്യം, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് നോവല്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വാര്\u200dത്തകള്\u200d ഡോമെന്\u200dസിനെ സൂക് നമ്മള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന കൂട്ടത്തിനെക്കുറിച്ചും, വിവരങ്ങളെയും വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന പ്രക്രിയയെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. കള്ള രണ്ടാമത്, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു കൂട്ടം പഠിക്കുന്ന പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d നടത്തുന്നു. കൃത്യമായ വാര്\u200dത്ത ഡിക്റ്ററുകള്\u200d പണിയാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി നമുക്ക് 76 കൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d താല്\u200dക്കാലികമായ വാര്\u200dത്തകളുടെ സ്വയമായും കൈകാര്യം തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ത', 'pl': 'Rozprzestrzenianie się wprowadzających w błąd informacji w codzienny dostęp do mediów, takich jak kanały mediów społecznościowych, blogi informacyjne i gazety internetowe sprawiło, że identyfikacja wiarygodnych źródeł wiadomości stała się trudna, co zwiększa potrzebę narzędzi obliczeniowych, które mogą zapewnić wgląd w wiarygodność treści online. W artykule skupiamy się na automatycznej identyfikacji fałszywych treści w wiadomościach online. Nasz wkład jest dwukrotny. Po pierwsze, wprowadzamy dwa nowatorskie zbiory danych do zadania wykrywania fake news, obejmujące siedem różnych domen wiadomości. Szczegółowo opisujemy proces gromadzenia, adnotacji i walidacji oraz przedstawiamy kilka analiz eksploracyjnych dotyczących identyfikacji różnic językowych w treściach fałszywych i legalnych wiadomości. Po drugie, przeprowadzamy zestaw eksperymentów uczących się, aby zbudować dokładne detektory fałszywych wiadomości i pokazać, że możemy osiągnąć dokładność do 76%. Ponadto prowadzimy analizy porównawcze automatycznej i ręcznej identyfikacji fake news.', 'sr': 'Proširenje pogrešnih informacija u svakodnevnim medijima poput hrane društvenih medija, novinskih blogova i online novina učinilo je izazovnom da identifikuju pouzdane novinske izvore, tako povećava potrebu za računalnim alatima koje mogu pružiti uvid u pouzdanost online sadržaja. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na automatsku identifikaciju lažnog sadržaja u online vijestima. Naš doprinos je dvostruki. Prvo, predstavljamo dva novca podataka za zadatak lažnog otkrivanja vijesti, pokrivajući sedam različitih vijesti domena. Opišemo detaljno proces kolekcije, annotacije i validacije i predstavljamo nekoliko istraživačkih analiza o identifikaciji jezičkih razlika u lažnom i legitimnom sadržaju vesti. Drugo, vodimo niz učenjskih eksperimenata da izgradimo tačne lažne detektore vijesti i pokažemo da možemo postići tačnost do 76%. Osim toga, pružamo komparativne analize automatske i ruène identifikacije lažnih vesti.', 'ro': 'Proliferarea informațiilor înșelătoare în mass-media cu acces zilnic, cum ar fi fluxurile de social media, blogurile de știri și ziarele online, a făcut dificilă identificarea surselor de știri de încredere, sporind astfel nevoia de instrumente de calcul capabile să ofere informații despre fiabilitatea conținutului online. În această lucrare, ne concentrăm pe identificarea automată a conținutului fals în știrile online. Contribuţia noastră este dublă. În primul rând, introducem două seturi de date noi pentru sarcina detectării știrilor false, acoperind șapte domenii diferite de știri. Descriem în detaliu procesul de colectare, adnotare și validare și prezentăm mai multe analize exploratorii privind identificarea diferențelor lingvistice în conținutul de știri false și legitime. În al doilea rând, efectuăm un set de experimente de învățare pentru a construi detectoare precise de știri false și arătăm că putem obține precizii de până la 76%. În plus, oferim analize comparative ale identificării automate și manuale a știrilor false.', 'so': 'Koritaanka macluumaadka khiyaanada ku saabsan maalin walba ee isticmaalka macluumaadka dardaaranka sida quudinta shabakadda bulshada, blogyada warbixinta iyo wargeysyada internetka ayaa ka dhigay inay dhibaato ku ogaato sourceoyinka aaminka ah, sidaa darteed waxaa kordhiya baahida qalabka xisaabta ah oo u awoodda inay u fidiyaan aaminnimada internetka. Warqadan waxaynu ku kalsoonaynaa aqoonsiga macluumaadka been ah ee internetka. qeybtayada waa laba jibbaar. Marka ugu horeysa, waxaynu soo bandhignaa laba sawir oo macluumaad la xiriira shaqada warqada been ah, waxaana ku daboolaynaa toddoba meelood oo warqad ah oo kala duduwan. Waxaannu si gaar ah u qoraynaa baaritaanka shaqada, wargelinta, iyo baaritaanka shaqeynta, waxaana soo bandhignaynaa wax baaritaanka ah oo ku saabsan aqoonsashada kala duwanaanshaha luuqada ee ku qoran waxyaabaha warqada been ah oo sharciga ah. Second, we conduct a set of learning experiments to build accurate fake news detectors, and show that we can achieve accuracies of up to 76%.  Intaas waxaa dheer, waxaynu siinaynaa baaritaanka isbardhigga ah ee aqoonsiga dhakhtarka iyo qofka gacanta ah ee wararka been ah.', 'si': 'සාමාජික මිඩියාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය, වාර්තාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය, අන්තර්ජාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ අන්තර්ජාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරලා තියෙන්නේ විශ්වාසිත වා මේ පත්තරේ අපි අන්ලයින් වාර්තාවේ බොරු සාමාන්\u200dය පරීක්ෂණය ගැන ස්වයංක්\u200dරිය පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. අපේ සම්බන්ධය දෙකක්. මුලින්ම, අපි වෙනස් විදිහට ආරංචික දත්ත සෙට් දෙකක් පෙනුම් කරනවා. අපි සංග්\u200dරහණය, කිරීම, විශේෂ පරීක්ෂණය විස්තර කරනවා සහ විස්තරයෙන් විශ්ලේෂණය සඳහා භාෂාවික වෙනස් අවශ්\u200dය විශ්ලේෂණ දෙවෙනි විදියට, අපි ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් කරනවා හරියට වැරදි වාර්තාව පරීක්ෂකයන් නිර්මාණය කරන්න, අපිට පෙන්වන්න පුළ ඒ වගේම, අපි බොරු වාර්තාවක් ගැන ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවක් සහ පුද්ගලික පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා සම්බන්ධ විශ්ල', 'sv': 'Spridningen av vilseledande information i dagliga medier som sociala medier, nyhetsbloggar och onlinetidningar har gjort det svårt att identifiera pålitliga nyhetskällor, vilket ökar behovet av beräkningsverktyg som kan ge insikter i tillförlitligheten hos onlineinnehåll. I denna uppsats fokuserar vi på automatisk identifiering av falskt innehåll i onlinenyheter. Vårt bidrag är dubbelt. Först introducerar vi två nya datauppsättningar för uppgiften att upptäcka falska nyheter, som täcker sju olika nyhetsdomäner. Vi beskriver insamlings-, antecknings- och valideringsprocessen i detalj och presenterar flera undersökande analyser för identifiering av språkliga skillnader i falskt och legitimt nyhetsinnehåll. För det andra genomför vi en uppsättning inlärningsexperiment för att bygga korrekta falska nyhetsdetektorer, och visar att vi kan uppnå noggrannhet på upp till 76%. Dessutom tillhandahåller vi jämförande analyser av automatisk och manuell identifiering av falska nyheter.', 'ta': 'The proliferation of misleading information in everyday access media outlets such as social media feeds, news blogs, and online newspapers have made it challenging to identify trustworthy news sources, thus increasing the need for computational tools able to provide insights into the reliability of online content.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் தானாகவே பொய் உள்ளடக்கத்தை கண்டுபிடித்து கவனம் செலுத்துகிறோம். எங்கள் பங்கு இருமடங்கு உள்ளது. முதலில், நாம் பொய் செய்தி கண்டுபிடிப்பதற்கான இரண்டு புதிய தரவுத்தளங்களை அறிமுகப்படுத்துகிறோம், ஏழு வேறு வ நாம் தொகுப்பு, அறிவிப்பு, மற்றும் செலுத்தல் செயலை விவரமாக விவரிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் பொய் மற்றும் சரியான செய்தி உள்ளடக்கத்தில் பொய் மற இரண்டாவது, மேலும், நாம் பொய் செய்திகளின் தானியங்கி மற்றும் கைமுறை அடையாளத்தை ஒப்பிடும் ஆய்வுகளை வழங்குகிறோ', 'ur': 'ہر دن میڈیا ایکس آورٹوں میں غلط معلومات کی گھیر گھیر گئی جیسے سوسیل میڈیا فیڈ، نویس بلاگ، اور آنلاین خبرنگاروں نے اسے اپنا امانت دار خبرنگار سوسوں کا پہچان کرنے کا مشکل بنایا ہے، اسی طرح کمپیوٹریشن ابزار کی ضرورت اضافہ کرتی ہے جو آنلاین منصوبات کی اس کاغذ میں، ہم آنلاین خبروں میں جھوٹی منصوبات کی آٹوٹی شناسایی پر تمرکز کرتے ہیں۔ ہمارا حصہ دو گنا ہے۔ پہلی بار، ہم نے دو نویس ڈیٹ سٹ کو فریب کی خبر شناسی کے کام کے لئے معرفی کیا ہے، سات مختلف نویس ڈیمین پر پورے کرتے ہیں۔ ہم نے کلکسیوں، انٹوریٹ، اور واضح طریقے کو تفصیل کے ساتھ توصیل دیتے ہیں اور بہت سی انٹوریٹ شناسایوں کو جھوٹی اور قانونی خبروں کے منصوبات کی شناسایی کے بارے میں پیش کیا ہے. دوسرا، ہم ایک مجموعہ سیکھنے کی آزمائش کررہے ہیں کہ دقیق جھوٹے اخبار ڈاکٹر بنائیں، اور دکھائیں کہ ہم 76% تک سیکھ سکتے ہیں۔ اور ہم فریب خبروں کی اتمامات اور مہمانی شناسایی کا مقایسہ تحقیقات دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik haqida hamma maʼlumot yordam berish, shaxsiy mitanda soʻzlari, yangiliklar bloglari va online newspaper kabi narsalarni aniqlash uchun ishonchining muammiy xabar manbaslarini aniqlashga murakkab beradi, shunday qilib, kompyuterlar vositalarni o'zgartirish kerakligini online tarkibining ishoniga imkoniyatlash kerak. Bu hujjatda, biz online xabar tarkibini avtomatik ravishda foydalanamiz. Bizning qandaydir ikki marta. Birinchisi biz ikkita novel maʼlumotlar tashkilotlarini ko'rib chiqaramiz. Biz yetti boshqa xabar domenalarini koʻpayapmiz. Biz toʻplam, taʼminlovchi va taʼminlovchi jarayonlarni taʼrif qilamiz va bir necha ta'minlovchi tarjimalarni o'rganish haqida o'xshash va notoʻgʻri maʼlumot tarkibini aniqlash haqida ko'p ta'minlovchilar aniqlashni hosil qilamiz. Ikkinchi so'zda, biz tasavvur qilishni to'g'ri notoʻgʻri yangilik tuzuvchilarini yaratish uchun ko'plab o'rganimiz va biz 76%gako'paytirish mumkin. Ko'pchilik, biz avtomatik va qoʻlbola-qoʻlbola-qoʻlbola raqamlarini qo'llanmalamiz.", 'vi': 'Sự gia tăng những thông tin sai lầm trên mạng hàng ngày như truyền thông xã hội, blogs và báo chí trên mạng đã tạo ra một thử thách để xác định nguồn tin đáng tin cậy, làm tăng nhu cầu cho các công cụ tính to án có thể cung cấp thông tin về tính tin đáng tin của nội dung trực tuyến. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi tập trung vào việc nhận diện đồ giả trong các tin tức online. Chúng tôi có hai phần. Đầu tiên, chúng tôi giới thiệu hai bộ dữ liệu mới cho nhiệm vụ khám phá tin giả, bao gồm bảy khu vực tin tức khác nhau. Chúng tôi mô tả chi tiết các tiến trình thu thập, ghi chú và xác nhận, và đưa ra các phân tích thăm dò về sự khác biệt ngôn ngữ trong nội dung tin tức giả và hợp pháp. Thứ hai, chúng tôi tiến hành một loạt các thí nghiệm học tập để chế tạo máy dò báo giả chính xác, và cho thấy rằng chúng tôi có thể đạt được độ chính xác lên đến cả triệu tập. Chúng tôi cung cấp các phân tích tương đối về việc nhận dạng tự động và thủ công của tin giả.', 'da': 'Den spredning af vildledende information i dagligdags adgang mediekanaler såsom sociale medier feeds, nyhedsblogge og onlineaviser har gjort det udfordrende at identificere troværdige nyhedskilder, hvilket øger behovet for beregningsværktøjer, der kan give indsigt i pålideligheden af onlineindhold. I denne artikel fokuserer vi på automatisk identifikation af falsk indhold i online nyheder. Vores bidrag er dobbelt. For det første introducerer vi to nye datasæt til opgaven med opdagelse af falske nyheder, der dækker syv forskellige nyhedsområder. Vi beskriver indsamlings-, anmærknings- og valideringsprocessen i detaljer og præsenterer flere ekspertise analyser af identifikation af sproglige forskelle i falsk og legitimt nyhedsindhold. For det andet gennemfører vi et sæt læringseksperimenter for at bygge nøjagtige fake news detektorer, og viser, at vi kan opnå nøjagtigheder på op til 76%. Derudover leverer vi sammenlignende analyser af automatisk og manuel identifikation af fake news.', 'hr': 'Proširenje pogrešnih informacija u dnevnim medijima poput prenosa društvenih medija, novinskih blogova i online novina učinilo je teško identificirati povjerljive izvore vijesti, tako povećavajući potrebu za računalnim alatima koje mogu pružiti uvid u pouzdanost sadržaja interneta. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na automatsku identifikaciju lažnog sadržaja u online vijestima. Naš doprinos je dvostruki. Prvo, predstavljamo dvije novine podatke za zadatak lažnog otkrivanja vijesti, pokrivajući sedam različitih vijesti domena. Opisujemo detaljno proces kolekcije, annotacije i validacije i predstavljamo nekoliko istraživačkih analiza o identifikaciji jezičkih razlika u lažnom i legitimnom sadržaju vijesti. Drugo, provodimo niz učenjskih eksperimenata kako bi izgradili to čne lažne novine detektore i pokazali da možemo postići točnost do 76%. Osim toga, pružamo usporedbene analize automatske i ručne identifikacije lažnih vijesti.', 'bg': 'Разпространението на подвеждаща информация в медиите за всекидневен достъп, като например емисиите в социалните медии, новинарските блогове и онлайн вестниците, затруднява идентифицирането на надеждни източници на новини, като по този начин увеличава необходимостта от изчислителни инструменти, способни да предоставят представа за надеждността на онлайн съдържанието. В тази статия се фокусираме върху автоматичното идентифициране на фалшиво съдържание в онлайн новините. Нашият принос е двоен. Първо, въвеждаме два нови набора от данни за задачата за откриване на фалшиви новини, обхващащи седем различни области на новините. Описваме подробно процеса на събиране, анотация и валидиране и представяме няколко проучвателни анализи за идентифициране на езикови различия във фалшиво и легитимно новинарско съдържание. Второ, провеждаме набор от учебни експерименти за изграждане на точни детектори за фалшиви новини и показваме, че можем да постигнем точност до 76%. Освен това предоставяме сравнителни анализи на автоматичното и ръчно идентифициране на фалшивите новини.', 'nl': 'De proliferatie van misleidende informatie in alledaagse toegangsmedia zoals social media feeds, nieuwsblogs en online kranten heeft het moeilijk gemaakt om betrouwbare nieuwsbronnen te identificeren, waardoor de behoefte aan computertools die inzicht kunnen geven in de betrouwbaarheid van online content toenemen. In dit artikel richten we ons op de automatische identificatie van nepcontent in online nieuws. Onze bijdrage is tweeledig. Ten eerste introduceren we twee nieuwe datasets voor de taak van fake news detectie, die zeven verschillende nieuwsdomeinen bestrijken. We beschrijven het verzamel-, annotatie- en validatieproces in detail en presenteren verschillende verkennende analyses over het identificeren van taalverschillen in nep- en legitieme nieuwsinhoud. Ten tweede voeren we een reeks leerexperimenten uit om nauwkeurige nepnieuwsdetectoren te bouwen, en laten we zien dat we nauwkeurigheiden tot 76%. Daarnaast verzorgen wij vergelijkende analyses van de automatische en handmatige identificatie van fake news.', 'de': 'Die Verbreitung irreführender Informationen in alltäglichen Medien wie Social-Media-Feeds, Nachrichtenblogs und Online-Zeitungen hat es schwierig gemacht, vertrauenswürdige Nachrichtenquellen zu identifizieren, wodurch der Bedarf an Rechenwerkzeugen steigt, die Einblicke in die Zuverlässigkeit von Online-Inhalten liefern können. In diesem Beitrag konzentrieren wir uns auf die automatische Identifizierung von gefälschten Inhalten in Online-Nachrichten. Unser Beitrag ist zweifach. Zunächst stellen wir zwei neuartige Datensätze für die Aufgabe der Fake News Detection vor, die sieben verschiedene Nachrichtendomänen abdecken. Wir beschreiben den Erfassungs-, Annotations- und Validierungsprozess im Detail und stellen mehrere explorative Analysen zur Identifizierung sprachlicher Unterschiede in Fake- und legitimen Nachrichteninhalten vor. Zweitens führen wir eine Reihe von Lernexperimenten durch, um genaue Fake News Detektoren zu bauen und zu zeigen, dass wir Genauigkeiten von bis zu 76%. Darüber hinaus bieten wir vergleichende Analysen zur automatischen und manuellen Identifizierung von Fake News an.', 'sw': 'Kuongezeka kwa taarifa zinazopotosha katika vyombo vya habari vya kila siku kama vile matumizi ya mitandao ya kijamii, blogu za habari na magazeti ya mtandaoni yamesababisha changamoto ya kutambua vyanzo vya habari vinavyoaminika, kwa hiyo inaongeza haja ya vifaa vya kompyuta vinavyoweza kutoa macho katika uaminifu wa maudhui ya mtandaoni. Katika gazeti hili, tunajikita kutambua maudhui bandia kwenye habari za mtandaoni. Mchango wetu ni mara mbili. Kwanza, tunaanzisha taarifa mbili za riwaya kwa ajili ya jukumu la kugundua habari bandia, zinazoandika maeneo saba tofauti ya habari. Tunaelezea mkusanyiko, taarifa, na mchakato wa uhakika na kuweka uchambuzi kadhaa wa uchunguzi kuhusu kutambua tofauti za lugha katika maudhui ya habari bandia na halali. Pili, tunafanya majaribio ya kujifunza ili kujenga wachunguzi wa habari bandia, na kuonyesha kwamba tunaweza kufikia ukweli wa asilimia 76. Zaidi ya hayo, tunatoa uchambuzi uliofanana kuhusu utambulisho wa kibinafsi na manufaa wa habari potofu.', 'ko': '소셜 미디어 개요, 뉴스 블로그와 온라인 신문 등 일상 미디어 채널에서 오도적인 정보의 확산으로 인해 신뢰할 수 있는 뉴스 출처를 식별하기 어려워지고 온라인 내용의 신뢰성을 깊이 있게 이해할 수 있는 계산 도구에 대한 수요가 증가했다.본고는 주로 인터넷 뉴스에서 허위 내용의 자동 식별을 연구한다.우리의 공헌은 이중적이다.우선, 우리는 두 개의 새로운 데이터 집합의 임무를 소개했는데, 가짜 뉴스 검측은 7개의 서로 다른 뉴스 분야를 포함한다.우리는 수집, 주석과 검증 과정을 상세하게 묘사하고 허위와 합법적인 뉴스 내용 중의 언어 차이를 식별하는 탐색적 분석을 실시했다.그 다음에 우리는 일련의 학습 실험을 실시하여 정확한 가짜 뉴스 검측기를 구축했는데 그 결과 우리는 76%에 달하는 정확도를 실현할 수 있었다.이 밖에 우리는 자동과 수동으로 가짜 뉴스를 식별하는 비교 분석을 제공했다.', 'id': 'Penjelasan informasi yang menyesatkan di media akses sehari-hari seperti media sosial feed, blog berita, dan koran online telah membuat tantangan untuk mengidentifikasi sumber berita yang dapat dipercaya, sehingga meningkatkan kebutuhan untuk alat komputasi yang mampu menyediakan penglihatan tentang kepercayaan konten online. Dalam kertas ini, kita fokus pada identifikasi otomatis dari konten palsu dalam berita online. Kontribusi kita dua kali lipat. Pertama, kita memperkenalkan dua set data novel untuk tugas deteksi berita palsu, meliputi tujuh domain berita yang berbeda. Kami menggambarkan koleksi, anotasi, dan proses validasi secara rinci dan mempersembahkan beberapa analisis eksploratori mengenai identifikasi perbedaan bahasa dalam konten berita palsu dan sah. Kedua, kita melakukan set percobaan belajar untuk membangun detektor berita palsu yang akurat, dan menunjukkan bahwa kita dapat mencapai akurasi sampai 76%. Selain itu, kami menyediakan analisis perbandingan dari identifikasi otomatis dan manual berita palsu.', 'fa': 'گسترش اطلاعات اشتباه کننده در اطلاعات رسانه های روزانه مانند غذاهای رسانه های اجتماعی، بلوگ های خبری و روزنامه های آنلاین، آن را سخت ساخته است که منبع های خبری قابل اعتمادی را شناسایی کنند، بنابراین نیازی برای ابزارهای محاسبه\u200cای که قابل اطلاعات در اطمینان محتویات آنلاین را به در این کاغذ، ما روی شناسایی خودکار محتوای دروغ در اخبار آنلاین تمرکز می کنیم. کمک ما دو برابر است. اول، ما دو مجموعه داده\u200cهای رمانی را برای کاری شناسایی اخبار دروغ معرفی می\u200cکنیم که هفت حوزه\u200cهای خبری متفاوت را پوشانده می\u200cشوند. ما مجموعه، اظهار و تحقیقات را در جزئیات توصیف می کنیم و چند تحلیل تحقیقاتی را در مورد شناسایی تفاوت زبان\u200cشناسی در محتوای خبرهای دروغ و قانونی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. دوم، ما یک مجموعه آزمایش یادگیری را انجام می دهیم تا بازرسان خبری دقیق را بسازیم، و نشان می دهیم که ما می توانیم دقیق تا 76 درصد به دست آورده باشیم. علاوه بر این، ما تحلیل مقایسه\u200cای از شناسایی اخبار دروغگویی خودکار و دستی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم.', 'af': "Die uitbreiding van verkeerde inligting in elke dag toegang van media-uitlegte soos sosiale media-voedsel, nuusbloge en online koerante het dit aangedoen om vertroude nuusbronne te identifiseer, sodat die behoefte vir rekenaar-nutsprogramme verhoog kan word om inligting te verskaf in die vertroulikerheid van online inhoud. In hierdie papier, ons fokus op die outomatiese identifikasie van falske inhoud in online nuus. Ons bydraai is twee ou. Eerste, ons introduseer twee romaniese datastelle vir die taak van falske nuusbeskrywing wat sewe verskillende nuusdomene oordek. Ons beskryf die versameling, annotasie en geldigheidproses in detaljes en voorskryf verskeie ondersoek analiseer op die identifiseering van lingwisiese verskille in falsies en legitimie nuusinhoud. Tweede, ons doen 'n stel van leer eksperimente om presies falske nuusdetektors te bou, en wys dat ons kan presies tot 76% bereik. In addition, we provide comparative analyses of the automatic and manual identification of fake news.", 'sq': 'Përhapja e informacionit ngatërrestar në vendet e përditshme të aksesit të medias të tilla si ushtrimet e medias sociale, bloget e lajmeve dhe gazetat online e kanë bërë të vështirë të identifikohet burime të besueshme të lajmeve, duke rritur kështu nevojën për mjete llogaritëse në gjendje të sigurojnë kuptime në besueshmërinë e përmbajtjes online. Në këtë letër, ne përqëndrohemi në identifikimin automatik të përmbajtjeve të rreme në lajmet online. Kontributi ynë është i dyfishtë. Së pari, ne prezantojmë dy grupe të dhënash të reja për detyrën e zbulimit të lajmeve të rreme, duke mbuluar shtatë fusha të ndryshme të lajmeve. Ne përshkruajmë procesin e mbledhjes, anotacionit dhe vlerësimit në hollësi dhe paraqesim disa analiza eksploruese mbi identifikimin e dallimeve gjuhësore në përmbajtjen e lajmeve të rreme dhe të ligjshme. Së dyti, ne kryejmë një sërë eksperimentesh mësimi për të ndërtuar detektorë të saktë të lajmeve të rreme dhe tregojmë se ne mund të arrijmë saktësitë deri në 76%. Përveç kësaj, ne ofrojmë analiza krahasuese të identifikimit automatik dhe manual të lajmeve të rreme.', 'tr': 'Her gün sosial mediýa üýtgewleri, täzelikler we online gazetler ýaly ýalňyşlyk maglumatlaryň ýagdaýynda ýalňyş maglumatlaryň kösümi ýüze çykarmagyny çözedi, şonuň üçin ol wagtlar ynamly täzeliklerden habar täzeliklerini tanyşdyrmak kynçylygyny çözedi, şol sebäpli köpüşeni Bu kagyzda, internetde ýalňyş maksadyň awtomatik tanamagyna üns berýäris. Biziň rugsat ikinji gezek. Ilkinji gezek, biz ýalňyş haber tanyşynyň görevi üçin iki roman sanatyny tanyşdyrýarys we ýedi beýleki sanat alanyny örän belleýäris. Biz ýygnak, duýdurma we golaýlama prosesini detaylarda tassyýaryp görýäris we kelläpden soňra ýalňyş we leňikli bagytlaryň bardygyny bir näçe çözümleri çözýäris. Ikinjisi, biz sahte haber detektirleri düzenlemek üçin bir topar öwrenmek deneylerini ýerine ýetirdik we 76%-a çenli derejesimizi ýetip bileris. Munuň üstine, biz ýalňyş täzelikleriniň awtomatik we el kimligini tapylýarys.', 'hy': 'Ամեն օր մոլորեցնող տեղեկատվության տարածումը լրատվամիջոցների միջոցներում, ինչպիսիք են սոցիալական լրատվամիջոցների հոսքերը, նորությունների բլոգերը և առցանց թերթերը, դարձրել է դժվար բացահայտել վստահելի նորությունների աղբյուրներ, ինչը մեծանում է հաշվարկների միջոցների կարիքը, որոնք կարող են Այս թղթի մեջ մենք կենտրոնանում ենք կեղծ պարունակության ավտոմատիկ հայտնաբերման վրա առցանց նորություններում: Մեր ներդրումը երկու անգամ է: Առաջինը, մենք ներկայացնում ենք երկու նոր տվյալներ կեղծ նորությունների հայտնաբերման խնդրի համար, որոնք ներկայացնում են յոթ տարբեր նորությունների ոլորտներ: Մենք մանրամասն նկարագրում ենք հավաքածու, annoտացիայի և հավասարման գործընթացը և ներկայացնում ենք մի քանի հետազոտություններ լեզվաբանական տարբերությունների հայտնաբերման մասին կեղծ և իրավական նորությունների պարունակության մեջ: Երկրորդ, մենք մի շարք ուսումնասիրության փորձեր ենք կատարում, որպեսզի կառուցենք ճշգրիտ կեղծ նորությունների դետեկտորներ և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ մենք կարող ենք հասնել 76 տոկոսի ճշմարտության: Ավելին, մենք ներկայացնում ենք կեղծ նորությունների ավտոմատիկ և ձեռքով հայտնաբերման համեմատական վերլուծություններ:', 'am': 'በማኅበራዊ አውታር ሚዲያ ምግብ፣ ዜና ጦማሮች እና በመስመር ገጾች ላይ የሚታመነውን ዜና ምንጮች ለማግኘት የዘወትር መረጃዎችን ለማሳሳየት አቀረበ፡፡ ስለዚህም የቁጥጥር መሣሪያዎች ማቀናቀል የኢንተርኔት መረጃዎችን ማቀናቀል የሚያስፈልጋቸውን ጥያቄ ማድረግ አበጅቷል፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ላይ የሐሰት ውይይት ማረጋገጥን በራሱ ላይ እናስማራለን፡፡ Our contribution is twofold.  መጀመሪያ፣ ለሐሰት ዜና ማግኘት ሁለት የመረጃ ዳታዎችን እናስጠጋለን፡፡ በሐሰት እና በአግባብ ዜና ውስጥ የቋንቋዊ ልዩነቶችን ማረጋገጥ ብዙ ምርመራዎችን እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በሁለተኛው የሐሰት ዜና ተቃዋሚዎችን ለመሥራት የትምህርት ፈተናዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የሐሰት ዜና የራሱ እና የሐሰት ማውቀት እናስተያየት፡፡', 'bn': 'The proliferation of misleading information in everyday access media outlets such as social media feeds, news blogs, and online newspapers have made it challenging to identify trustworthy news sources, thus increasing the need for computational tools able to provide insights into the reliability of online content.  এই পত্রিকায় আমরা অনলাইন সংবাদে মিথ্যা বিষয়বস্তুর স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে চিহ্নিত করি। আমাদের অবদান দ্বিগুণ। প্রথমত, আমরা মিথ্যা সংবাদ আবিষ্কারের কাজের জন্য দুই নভেল ডাটাসেট পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি, সাত ভিন্ন সংবাদ ডোমেন আমরা বিস্তারিত সংগ্রহ, বিস্তারিত এবং বৈধ সংবাদ বিষয়বস্তুতে ভুয়া এবং বৈধ সংবাদ বিষয়বস্তুতে ভাষাগত ভাষার পার্থক্য পরিচিতির বিষয় দ্বিতীয়, আমরা সঠিক ভুয়া সংবাদ ডিটেক্টর নির্মাণের জন্য শিক্ষা পরীক্ষা করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে আমরা ৭৬ শতাংশের পরিমাণ সঠিকভাবে প এছাড়াও, আমরা ভুয়া সংবাদের স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং হাতে চিহ্নিত বিশ্লেষণ প্রদান করি।', 'az': 'Hər gün sosyal media besikləri, xəbər blogları və online gazetların istifadə edilməsi kimi yoldan çıxmış məlumatların genişlənməsi, güvenilir xəbər kaynaqlarını təsdiqləməsi üçün çətin etdi, böylece onlayn məlumatının güvenilir gücünü təsdiqləyə bilən hesap vasitələrinin ehtiyacını artırdı. Bu kağızda, online xəbərlərində sahte məlumatın avtomatik təşkil edilməsinə odaqlanırıq. Bizim işimiz ikincidir. İlk dəfə, biz sahte xəbərlər keşfetməsi üçün iki yeni veri qurğunu tanıyırıq, yeddi müxtəlif xəbər domeini örtürük. Biz koleksiyonu, annotasını və təsdiqləmə prosesini detaylı təsdiqləyirik və elmi müxtəliflərinin sahte və yasal xəbərlərin məlumatının tanıdılması haqqında çoxlu keşif analizi təsdiqləyirik. İkincisi, biz sahte xəbər detektörlərini düzgün inşa etmək üçün öyrənmək təcrübələrini təşkil edirik və 76%-ə qədər ədalətlərə nail olacağımızı göstəririk. Əvvəlcə, sahte xəbərlərin avtomatik və əlavə təşkil edilməsini təmin edirik.', 'bs': 'Proširenje pogrešnih informacija u svakodnevnim novinama medija poput hrane društvenih medija, novinskih blogova i online novina učinilo je izazovno utvrditi povjerljive izvore vijesti, tako povećavajući potrebu za računalnim alatima koje mogu pružiti uvid u pouzdanost interneta sadržaja. U ovom papiru, fokusiramo se na automatsku identifikaciju lažnog sadržaja u online vijestima. Naš doprinos je dvostruki. Prvo, predstavljamo dva novca podataka za zadatak lažnog otkrivanja vijesti, pokrivajući sedam različitih vijesti domena. Opišemo detaljno proces kolekcije, annotacije i validacije i predstavljamo nekoliko istraživačkih analiza o identifikaciji jezičkih razlika u lažnom i legitimnom sadržaju vijesti. Drugo, vodimo niz učenjskih eksperimenata da izgradimo tačne lažne detektore vijesti i pokažemo da možemo postići tačnost do 76%. Osim toga, pružamo usporedbene analize automatske i ručne identifikacije lažnih vijesti.', 'ca': "La proliferació d'informació enganyadora en publicacions de mitjans d'accés cotidià com els feeds dels mitjans socials, els blogs de notícies i els diaris en línia ha fet difícil identificar fonts de notícies fiables, augmentant així la necessitat d'eines computacionals capaços de proporcionar informació sobre la fiabilitat del contingut en línia. En aquest article ens centrem en la identificació automàtica del contingut fals en les notícies en línia. La nostra contribució és doble. First, we introduce two novel datasets for the task of fake news detection, covering seven different news domains.  Descrivem en detall el procés de col·lecció, anotació i validació i presentem diverses anàlisis exploratories sobre l'identificació de diferències lingüístices en continguts de notícies falses i legítimes. Segon, fem un conjunt d'experiments d'aprenentatge per construir detectors de notícies falses i demostrar que podem aconseguir exactitudes fins al 76%. A més, proporcionem anàlisis comparatius de la identificació automàtica i manual de notícies falses.", 'et': 'Ekitava teabe levik igapäevastes meediakanalites, nagu sotsiaalmeedia kanalid, uudisteblogid ja veebilehed, on muutnud usaldusväärsete uudisteallikate tuvastamise keeruliseks, suurendades seega vajadust arvutusvahendite järele, mis suudaksid anda ülevaate veebisisu usaldusväärsusest. Käesolevas artiklis keskendume võltsisu automaatsele tuvastamisele online-uudistes. Meie panus on kahekordne. Esiteks tutvustame valeuudiste tuvastamise ülesandeks kahte uut andmekogumit, mis hõlmavad seitset erinevat uudiste valdkonda. Kirjeldame üksikasjalikult kogumise, märgistamise ja valideerimise protsessi ning esitame mitmeid uurivaid analüüse võlts- ja õiguspärase uudiste keeleliste erinevuste tuvastamiseks. Teiseks viime läbi õppekatseid, et ehitada täpseid valeuudiste detektoreid ja näidata, et suudame saavutada kuni 76% täpsust. Lisaks pakume võrdlevaid analüüse valeuudiste automaatse ja käsitsi tuvastamise kohta.', 'cs': 'Šíření zavádějících informací v každodenních přístupových médiích, jako jsou kanály sociálních médií, zpravodajské blogy a on-line noviny, činilo náročnou identifikaci důvěryhodných zdrojů zpravodajství, čímž zvyšuje potřebu výpočetních nástrojů schopných poskytnout informace o spolehlivosti online obsahu. V tomto článku se zaměřujeme na automatickou identifikaci falešného obsahu v online zprávách. Náš příspěvek je dvojnásobný. Nejprve představujeme dva nové datové sady pro úkol detekce falešných zpráv, které pokrývají sedm různých zpravodajských domén. Podrobně popisujeme proces sběru, anotace a validace a představujeme několik průzkumných analýz identifikace jazykových rozdílů v falešných a legitimních zprávách. Za druhé, provádíme sadu učebních experimentů, abychom vytvořili přesné detektory falešných zpráv a ukázali, že můžeme dosáhnout přesnosti až 76%. Kromě toho poskytujeme srovnávací analýzy automatické a ruční identifikace falešných zpráv.', 'fi': 'Harhaanjohtavan tiedon lisääntyminen päivittäisissä mediakanavissa, kuten sosiaalisen median syötteissä, uutisblogeissa ja verkkosanomalehdissä, on tehnyt luotettavien uutislähteiden tunnistamisesta haastavaa, mikä lisää tarvetta laskentatyökaluille, jotka tarjoavat tietoa verkkosisällön luotettavuudesta. Tässä artikkelissa keskitymme väärennetyn sisällön automaattiseen tunnistamiseen verkkouutisissa. Meidän panoksemme on kaksinkertainen. Ensin esittelemme kaksi uutta datajoukkoa fake news detection -tehtävään, jotka kattavat seitsemän eri uutisaluetta. Kuvaamme keräys-, huomautus- ja validointiprosessia yksityiskohtaisesti ja esittelemme useita eksploratiivisia analyysejä valeuutissisällön kielellisten erojen tunnistamisesta. Toiseksi suoritamme joukon oppimiskokeita tarkkojen fake news detektorien rakentamiseksi ja osoitamme, että pystymme saavuttamaan jopa 76 prosentin tarkkuuden. Lisäksi teemme vertailevia analyysejä väärennösten automaattisesta ja manuaalisesta tunnistamisesta.', 'jv': 'Go kalah-kalah sing mbukak informasi sing gak bênêr dumadhi kanggo ngakses media, gambaran medialan, balikat lan online Nang mapun iki, kéné dipontrolaké awak dhéwé, kudu tanggal nggo langgar-aman kanggo nganggo barang online Ombudhak dhéwé kuwi duluh durung. Awak dhéwé, ngéwé nambah éntuk duruh dadi sing pernik nggawe barang kelas barang dhéwé, winih-winih sing pernik sabên sithik. Awak dhéwé pisan ngéwé nggambar, ditambahak, lan ngéwé ngerasakno karo hal-hal kanggo nyukaké karo nggawe barang nggawe barang langgar sampeyan kanggo nggawe barang langgar sampeyan karo akeh sing paling dhéwé. Sikondh, awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing beraksi perbudhakan kanggo nggawe barang kelas pertamane, lan mungkasi dhéwé iso nggawe barang langkung wih-wih sabané pertamane sak ujaran 75%. Nambah, awak dhéwé ngewehke karo perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan anyar tentang karo Manual', 'sk': 'Zaradi širjenja zavajajočih informacij v vsakodnevnih medijskih omrežjih, kot so viri družbenih omrežij, novinarski blogi in spletni časopisi, je bilo težko prepoznati zanesljive vire novic, kar povečuje potrebo po računalniških orodjih, ki lahko zagotovijo vpogled v zanesljivost spletnih vsebin. V tem članku se osredotočamo na avtomatsko identifikacijo lažnih vsebin v spletnih novicah. Naš prispevek je dvojen. Najprej predstavljamo dve novi nabori podatkov za nalogo odkrivanja lažnih novic, ki pokrivajo sedem različnih področij novic. Podrobno opisujemo proces zbiranja, označevanja in validacije ter predstavljamo več raziskovalnih analiz o identifikaciji jezikovnih razlik v lažnih in legitimnih vsebinah novic. Drugič, izvajamo niz učnih eksperimentov za izdelavo natančnih detektorjev lažnih novic in pokažemo, da lahko dosežemo natančnost do 76%. Poleg tega nudimo primerjalne analize avtomatske in ročne identifikacije lažnih novic.', 'ha': "Kidalilin da masu ɓatarwa da information a koyau na samun mitandai kamar feedin wa mitandai na jamii, Blogyogi da waɗansu newspaper da ke cikin Online sun sanya ta kanana ga gane sourcen da ake gaskata, sabõda haka yana ƙara wa muhimmada na zance lissafi da za'a iya bãyar da gannai ga mutane na intani. Ga wannan takardan, munã fokus a kan gane-bayan cikin zane-zanen baka. Kirinmu na sau biyu ne. Kayyan, za mu gaura danna biyu na nowaya wa aikin da za'a gane na ƙarya, da ke rufe wasu bakwai masu sani. Tuna bayyana aikin mai kusantar da shirin ayuka, da kuma masu inganci a bayani, kuma munã halatar da wasu masu ƙidãya a kan gane diffukan linguistic cikin maɓallin lãbãri na ƙarya da halaki. Dukkan na, Munã samun wasu jarrabo masu sani dõmin mu sami masu tsari masu ƙarya, kuma mu nuna cẽwa, za'a iya sãmu gaskiya a tsakanin asilimin 76. Ina ƙara, Munã samar da fasalin masu samura a kan sunan-bayani na farat ɗaya da hannun aiki na ƙarya.", 'he': 'ההתפשטות של מידע מוטעה במציאות תקשורת גישה יומית, כמו מזונות תקשורת חברתית, בלוגים חדשות, ועיתונים באינטרנט, גרמו לזהות מקורות חדשות אמינים, כך מגבירים את הצורך לכלי מחשב שיכולים לספק תובנות לאמינות של תוכן באינטרנט. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתמקדים בזיהוי אוטומטי של תוכן מזויף בחדשות באינטרנט. התרומה שלנו כפולה. First, we introduce two novel datasets for the task of fake news detection, covering seven different news domains.  אנחנו מתארים את תהליך האספה, הערות והאישור בפרטים ומציגים מספר ניתוחים חקירתיים על זיהוי ההבדלים השפתיים בתוכן החדשות המזויף והחוקי. שנית, אנחנו מבצעים קבוצה של ניסויים ללמוד כדי לבנות גלאי חדשות מזויפים מדויקים, ולהראות שאנחנו יכולים להשיג מדויקות עד 76%. בנוסף, אנחנו מספקים ניתוח שיוותי של זיהוי אוטומטי והידני של חדשות מזויפות.', 'bo': 'ཉིན་དུང་གི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ནང་དུ་ཕལ་ཆེར་འགྱུར་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འགྲེལ་བཙུགས་ཀྱི་གློག་འཕྲིན་འགྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་། སྤྱི་ཚོགས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དང་དྲ་བ་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་དག་གི་ཁྱད་དུ་ཡོད་ཆེས་ དྲ་བརྡ་ནང་དུ་བཟོ་བཅོས་པའི་ནང་དོན་ཡིག་ཆ་འདིའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་པ ང་ཚོའི་གུས་ཐུག་རམ་གཉིས་རེད་གཉིས་པ་རེད། དང་པོ་ནས་ང་ཚོས་བརྗོད་ཆེན་དུ་འོང་བའི་བྱ་ཚིག་རྟོགས་པ་ལ་བཟུང་བའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་གཉིས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We describe the collection, annotation, and validation process in detail and present several exploratory analyses on the identification of linguistic differences in fake and legitimate news content. གཉིས་པ། ང་ཚོས་བརྡ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཞིག་བྱས་པ་ལས་ཉིད་ཅིག་གི་བདེ་ཞིབ་རྟོགས་པ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་76% བར་མཐུན་གྱིས་ འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཉེན་བརྡ་ཞིག་དང་ལག་བཟོས་ཐོག་གི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'All-in-one : Multi-task Learning for Rumour Verification', 'ar': 'الكل في واحد: التعلم متعدد المهام للتحقق من الشائعات', 'es': 'Todo en uno: aprendizaje multitarea para la verificación de rumores', 'fr': 'Tout-en-un\xa0: apprentissage multitâche pour la vérification des rumeurs', 'pt': 'Tudo em um: aprendizado multitarefa para verificação de rumores', 'ja': 'オールインワン：噂検証のためのマルチタスク学習', 'zh': '多合一:多任务学,讹言征', 'hi': 'ऑल-इन-वन: अफवाह सत्यापन के लिए मल्टी-टास्क लर्निंग', 'ru': 'Все-в-одном: многозадачное обучение для проверки слухов', 'ga': 'Uile-i-amháin: Foghlaim Ilthasc le haghaidh Fíorú Rumor', 'el': 'Όλα σε ένα: Μάθηση πολλαπλών εργασιών για την επαλήθευση φήμων', 'it': 'All-in-one: apprendimento multi-task per la verifica delle voci', 'ka': 'ყველაფერი ერთი: მრავალ დავასწავლობა სწავლობა', 'hu': 'All-in-one: többfeladatos tanulás a pletyka ellenőrzéséhez', 'ms': 'All-in-one: Multi-task Learning for Rumour Verification', 'kk': 'Біріншіден: Көп тапсырма тексеру үшін оқыту', 'lt': 'Visi iš vieno: Daugiauždavinių mokymasis garsų tikrinimui', 'ml': 'All-in-one: Multi-task Learning for Rumour Verification', 'mk': 'Сите во еден: Повеќезадачно учење за верификација на гласини', 'mt': 'Kollox f’wieħed: Tagħlim multikompiti għall-Verifika tas-Rumori', 'mn': 'Нэгт, олон даалгаварын суралцах', 'no': 'All-in-one: Multi task Learning for Rumour Verification', 'ro': 'All-in-one: Învățare multifuncțională pentru verificarea zvonurilor', 'sr': 'Sve u jednom: učenje višezadataka za provjeru ružnosti', 'si': 'හැම දෙයක්ම එක්කෙන්: විශාල විශ්වාස කරන්න ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙනගන්න', 'sv': 'Allt-i-ett: Multi-task lärande för verifiering av rykten', 'pl': 'Wszystko w jednym: Wielozadaniowe uczenie się do weryfikacji plotek', 'ur': 'ایک: بہت سی دنیا کی تعلیم', 'so': 'Dhammaan isku mid: Waxbarashada shaqo badan', 'ta': 'அனைத்தும் ஒன்று: விசாரண செய்தி', 'vi': 'Học nhiều nhiệm vụ cho việc kiểm tra Rumour', 'uz': 'Hamma narsa: Tasdiqlash uchun bir necha vazifa', 'bg': 'Всичко в едно: многофункционално обучение за проверка на слуховете', 'da': 'Alt-i-én: Multi-task læring til bekræftelse af rygter', 'hr': 'Sve u jednom: učenje višezadataka za provjeru ružnosti', 'nl': 'Alles-in-één: Multi-task leren voor geruchtverificatie', 'de': 'All-in-one: Multi-Task Learning für die Überprüfung von Gerüchten', 'id': 'Semua-dalam-satu: Multi-task Learning for Rumor Verification', 'ko': '모두 갖추어져 있다: 헛소문 검증의 다중 임무 학습', 'fa': 'همه\u200cی یک: آموزش تعداد زیادی برای تحقیقات خشونت', 'sw': 'Kila mmoja: Kujifunza kazi nyingi kwa ajili ya Uthibitisho wa ukweli', 'tr': 'Birinji: Aýratyn barlamak üçin köp-zady öwrenmek', 'af': 'Alle-in-een: Multi-task Learning for Rumour Verifiering', 'sq': 'Të gjithë në një: Mësimi me shumë detyra për verifikimin e zërave', 'am': 'ሁሉንም በአንድ ላይ', 'hy': "Առաջինը' բազմախնդիրներ սովորելու հնչյունների ստուգելու համար", 'bn': 'সর্বশেষ: গুজব সার্টিফিকেশনের জন্য অনেক কাজ শিক্ষা', 'ca': 'Tots en un: Aprendre multitasca per a verificar rumors', 'bs': 'Naučenje više zadataka za provjeru ružnosti', 'cs': 'Vše v jednom: Víceúkolové učení pro ověřování pověstí', 'et': 'Kõik ühes: mitme ülesandega õppimine kuulujuttude kinnitamiseks', 'fi': 'All-in-one: Useiden tehtävien oppiminen huhujen todentamista varten', 'az': 'Birinci: Birc…ô iŇü √∂yr…ônm…ôsi', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Vse-v-enem: učenje več nalog za preverjanje govoric', 'he': 'כל-אחד: ללמוד משימות רבות לבדיקה שמועות', 'ha': 'Dukan ɗaya: Mai Lean aiki mai yawa wa Tsarin Kirina', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་གཅིག་ནང་གི་: རྣམ་པ་ཞིབ་ལ་གྲངས་སུ་འབྲི་བཞིན་པའི་སྣ་མང་བོར་སློབ་འཇུག'}
{'en': 'Automatic resolution of rumours is a challenging task that can be broken down into smaller components that make up a pipeline, including rumour detection, rumour tracking and stance classification, leading to the final outcome of determining the veracity of a rumour. In previous work, these steps in the process of rumour verification have been developed as separate components where the output of one feeds into the next. We propose a multi-task learning approach that allows joint training of the main and auxiliary tasks, improving the performance of rumour verification. We examine the connection between the dataset properties and the outcomes of the multi-task learning models used.', 'ar': 'يعد الحل التلقائي للشائعات مهمة صعبة يمكن تقسيمها إلى مكونات أصغر تشكل خط أنابيب ، بما في ذلك اكتشاف الشائعات وتتبع الشائعات وتصنيف الموقف ، مما يؤدي إلى النتيجة النهائية لتحديد صحة الشائعات. في العمل السابق ، تم تطوير هذه الخطوات في عملية التحقق من الشائعات كمكونات منفصلة حيث يتم تغذية ناتج أحدهما في التالي. نقترح نهجًا تعليميًا متعدد المهام يسمح بالتدريب المشترك للمهام الرئيسية والإضافية ، وتحسين أداء التحقق من الشائعات. ندرس العلاقة بين خصائص مجموعة البيانات ونتائج نماذج التعلم متعدد المهام المستخدمة.', 'es': 'La resolución automática de rumores es una tarea desafiante que puede dividirse en componentes más pequeños que forman un canal, incluida la detección de rumores, el seguimiento de rumores y la clasificación de posturas, lo que lleva al resultado final de determinar la veracidad de un rumor. En trabajos anteriores, estos pasos en el proceso de verificación de rumores se han desarrollado como componentes separados donde la salida de uno se alimenta al siguiente. Proponemos un enfoque de aprendizaje multitarea que permite el entrenamiento conjunto de las tareas principales y auxiliares, mejorando el rendimiento de la verificación de rumores. Examinamos la conexión entre las propiedades del conjunto de datos y los resultados de los modelos de aprendizaje multitarea utilizados.', 'pt': 'A resolução automática de rumores é uma tarefa desafiadora que pode ser dividida em componentes menores que compõem um pipeline, incluindo detecção de rumores, rastreamento de rumores e classificação de postura, levando ao resultado final da determinação da veracidade de um boato. Em trabalhos anteriores, essas etapas no processo de verificação de rumores foram desenvolvidas como componentes separados, onde a saída de um alimenta o próximo. Propomos uma abordagem de aprendizagem multitarefa que permite o treinamento conjunto das tarefas principais e auxiliares, melhorando o desempenho da verificação de rumores. Examinamos a conexão entre as propriedades do conjunto de dados e os resultados dos modelos de aprendizado multitarefa usados.', 'fr': "La résolution automatique des rumeurs est une tâche difficile qui peut être décomposée en composants plus petits qui constituent un pipeline, y compris la détection des rumeurs, le suivi des rumeurs et la classification des positions, ce qui permet de déterminer la véracité d'une rumeur. Dans les travaux précédents, ces étapes du processus de vérification des rumeurs ont été développées en tant que composants séparés où la sortie de l'une alimente la suivante. Nous proposons une approche d'apprentissage multitâche qui permet une formation conjointe des tâches principales et auxiliaires, améliorant ainsi les performances de la vérification des rumeurs. Nous examinons le lien entre les propriétés de l'ensemble de données et les résultats des modèles d'apprentissage multitâches utilisés.", 'ja': 'うわさの自動解決は、うわさの検出、うわさの追跡、スタンス分類など、パイプラインを構成する小さなコンポーネントに分解され、うわさの真偽を判断する最終結果につながる困難なタスクです。前作では、うわさ検証の過程におけるこれらのステップは、あるものの出力が次のものに送り込まれる個別のコンポーネントとして開発されています。主な業務と補助業務の共同訓練を可能にするマルチタスク学習アプローチを提案し、噂検証のパフォーマンスを向上させます。私たちは、データセットの特性と使用されるマルチタスク学習モデルのアウトカムとの間の関連性を検討します。', 'zh': '自解讹言一挑战性之任,可分解成管道之小组件,及其讹言检测,讹言踪迹之类,以定其终。 先是,讹言验其步骤已发独组件,其一输下一组件。 建言多任务学之法,许主与佐命合从训练,以崇讹言验验之性。 考数集性,与所用多任务学模形相关。', 'hi': 'अफवाहों का स्वचालित समाधान एक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है जिसे छोटे घटकों में विभाजित किया जा सकता है जो एक पाइपलाइन बनाते हैं, जिसमें अफवाह का पता लगाना, अफवाह ट्रैकिंग और रुख वर्गीकरण शामिल है, जिससे अफवाह की सत्यता का निर्धारण करने का अंतिम परिणाम होता है। पिछले काम में, अफवाह सत्यापन की प्रक्रिया में इन चरणों को अलग-अलग घटकों के रूप में विकसित किया गया है जहां एक का आउटपुट अगले में फ़ीड करता है। हम एक बहु-कार्य सीखने के दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो मुख्य और सहायक कार्यों के संयुक्त प्रशिक्षण की अनुमति देता है, अफवाह सत्यापन के प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है। हम डेटासेट गुणों और उपयोग किए गए बहु-कार्य सीखने के मॉडल के परिणामों के बीच संबंध की जांच करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Автоматическое разрешение слухов является сложной задачей, которую можно разбить на более мелкие компоненты, составляющие трубопровод, включая обнаружение слухов, отслеживание слухов и классификацию положения, что приводит к окончательному результату определения достоверности слуха. В предыдущей работе эти шаги в процессе проверки слухов были разработаны как отдельные компоненты, где выход одного из них подается в следующий. Мы предлагаем многозадачный подход к обучению, который позволяет совместно обучать основным и вспомогательным задачам, улучшая выполнение проверки слухов. Мы изучаем связь между свойствами набора данных и результатами используемых многозадачных моделей обучения.', 'ga': 'Is tasc dúshlánach é réiteach ráflaí go huathoibríoch ar féidir é a mhiondealú i gcomhpháirteanna níos lú a chomhdhéanann píblíne, lena n-áirítear brath ráflaí, rianú ráflaí agus aicmiú seasaimh, as a dtiocfaidh an toradh deiridh maidir le fírinneacht ráflaí a chinneadh. In obair roimhe seo, forbraíodh na céimeanna seo sa phróiseas fíoraithe ráflaí mar chomhpháirteanna ar leith ina bhfothaítear aschur ceann amháin isteach sa chéad cheann eile. Molaimid cur chuige foghlama ilthascanna a cheadaíonn oiliúint chomhpháirteach ar na príomhthascanna agus na tascanna cúnta, chun feabhas a chur ar fheidhmíocht fíoraithe ráflaí. Scrúdaímid an nasc idir airíonna an tacair shonraí agus torthaí na múnlaí foghlama il-tasc a úsáideadh.', 'hu': 'A pletykák automatikus feloldása egy kihívást jelentő feladat, amely egy csővezetéket alkotó kisebb komponensekre bontható, beleértve a pletykák észlelését, a pletykák nyomon követését és az álláspontok osztályozását, ami egy pletyka valódiságának meghatározásához vezet. Az előző munkában a pletykák ellenőrzésének ezeket a lépéseket külön komponensekként fejlesztették ki, ahol az egyik kimenete a következőbe jut. Olyan többfeladatos tanulási megközelítést javasolunk, amely lehetővé teszi a fő és kiegészítő feladatok közös képzését, javítva a pletykák ellenőrzésének teljesítményét. Vizsgáljuk az adatkészlet tulajdonságai és az alkalmazott többfeladatos tanulási modellek eredményei közötti kapcsolatot.', 'el': 'Η αυτόματη επίλυση των φήμων είναι ένα δύσκολο έργο που μπορεί να διασπαστεί σε μικρότερα συστατικά που αποτελούν έναν αγωγό, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της ανίχνευσης φήμων, της παρακολούθησης φήμων και της ταξινόμησης θέσης, οδηγώντας στο τελικό αποτέλεσμα του προσδιορισμού της αλήθειας μιας φήμης. Σε προηγούμενες εργασίες, αυτά τα βήματα στη διαδικασία επαλήθευσης φήμων έχουν αναπτυχθεί ως ξεχωριστά συστατικά όπου η παραγωγή του ενός τροφοδοτείται στο επόμενο. Προτείνουμε μια προσέγγιση εκμάθησης πολλαπλών εργασιών που επιτρέπει την κοινή εκπαίδευση των κύριων και βοηθητικών εργασιών, βελτιώνοντας την απόδοση της επαλήθευσης φήμων. Εξετάζουμε τη σύνδεση μεταξύ των ιδιοτήτων του συνόλου δεδομένων και των αποτελεσμάτων των πολυμορφικών μαθησιακών μοντέλων που χρησιμοποιούνται.', 'it': "La risoluzione automatica delle voci è un compito impegnativo che può essere suddiviso in componenti più piccoli che compongono una pipeline, tra cui il rilevamento delle voci, il tracciamento delle voci e la classificazione delle posizioni, portando al risultato finale di determinare la veridicità di una voce. Nel lavoro precedente, questi passaggi nel processo di verifica delle voci sono stati sviluppati come componenti separati in cui l'output di uno alimenta l'altro. Proponiamo un approccio di apprendimento multi-task che consente la formazione congiunta dei compiti principali e ausiliari, migliorando le prestazioni della verifica delle voci. Esaminiamo la connessione tra le proprietà del dataset e i risultati dei modelli di apprendimento multi-task utilizzati.", 'kk': 'Автоматты жаңалықтардың айырмашылығы - тыңдау сызығын табу, дыбыс табу, дыбыс қадағалау және уақыттардың классификациясының соңғы нәтижесін анықтауға болады. Алдыңғы жұмыс ішінде бұл жағдайларды тексеру процесінде бір ақпарлардың шығысы келесі жағдайда бөлек компоненттер ретінде жасалған. Біз көптеген тапсырмаларды оқыту арқылы, негізгі және көмекшілік тапсырмаларды біріктіруге мүмкіндік береді, шеңберді тексеру арқылы жақсарту арқылы. Біз қолданылатын көптеген тапсырмалар оқыту үлгілерінің қасиеттері мен қасиеттері арасындағы байланысын тексереміз.', 'lt': 'Automatinis gandų išsprendimas yra sunki užduotis, kurią galima suskirstyti į mažesnius vamzdyną sudarančius komponentus, įskaitant gandų aptikimą, gandų sekimą ir pozicijų klasifikavimą, todėl galutinis gandų tikrumo nustatymo rezultatas. Ankstesniame darbe šie gandų tikrinimo proceso etapai buvo parengti kaip atskiri komponentai, kuriuose vienas pašaras patenka į kitą. Siūlome įvairių užduočių mokymosi metodą, kuris leistų bendrai mokyti pagrindines ir pagalbines užduotis ir pagerinti gandų tikrinimo rezultatus. Mes nagrinėjame duomenų rinkinio savybių ir naudojamų daugiafunkcinių mokymosi modelių rezultatų ryšį.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების ავტომატურად გადაწყვეტილება არის შესაძლებელი რაოდენტი, რომელიც შეიძლება გადაწყვეტილია პატარა კომპონენტებში, რომელიც გავაკეთებენ სიტყვები, სიტყვების გადაწყვეტილება და სტანციის კლასიფიკაცია, რომე პირველი სამუშაოში, ამ ნაწილეების შემოწმების პროცესში განვითარებულია როგორც განსხვავებული კომპონენტები, რომლებიც ერთი შემოწმების გამოწვება შემდეგი ჩვენ მრავალ დავასწავლობთ მრავალ დავასწავლობის მიღება, რომელიც შესაძლებელია ერთადერთი დავასწავლობა მნიშვნელოვანი და დახმარებელი დავასწავლობა, რომელიც შეუძლებ ჩვენ შევხედავთ მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ და მონაცემების შემდეგ.', 'ms': 'Resolusi automatik khabar angin adalah tugas yang menantang yang boleh dibahagikan ke komponen yang lebih kecil yang membentuk saluran paip, termasuk pengesan khabar angin, pengesan khabar angin dan klasifikasi kedudukan, yang membawa kepada hasil akhir untuk menentukan kebenaran khabar angin. Dalam kerja sebelumnya, langkah-langkah ini dalam proses pengesahan khabar angin telah dikembangkan sebagai komponen terpisah di mana output satu sumber ke dalam seterusnya. Kami cadangkan pendekatan pembelajaran berbilang tugas yang membolehkan latihan bersama tugas utama dan bantuan, memperbaiki prestasi pengesahan khabar angin. Kami memeriksa sambungan antara ciri-ciri set data dan hasil model pembelajaran berbilang-tugas yang digunakan.', 'mn': 'Шингэлийн автоматтыг шийдвэрлэх нь хоолойн шугам бүтээж буй жижигхэн хэсэгт хуваагдаж болно. Шингэлийн ололт, шүгэл дагах, байр суурь хэлэлцүүлэх нь үнэнийг тодорхойлох эцсийн үр дүн юм. Өмнөх ажлын дараа нь нэг хэвлэлийн үр дүнг дараагийн хэвлэлийн бүтээгдэхүүн болгон эдгээр шагналыг шалгах үйл ажиллагаанд хөгжүүлсэн. Бид олон ажлын суралцах арга замыг санал болгож, үндсэн, тусламжтай ажлын хамтран суралцах боломжтой болгож, ярианы шалгалтын үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулах боломжтой. Бид өгөгдлийн сангийн чанар болон олон ажлын суралцах загварын үр дүн хоорондын холбоотой холбоотой байдлыг судалж байна.', 'mk': 'Автоматска резолуција на гласините е предизвикувачка задача која може да се раздели во помали компоненти кои создаваат гасовод, вклучително и детекција на гласини, следење гласини и класификација на ставот, што води до конечниот резултат на одредувањето на вистината на гласините. Во претходната работа, овие чекори во процесот на верификација на гласините се развиени како одделни компоненти каде што излезот на еден се вклучува во следниот. We propose a multi-task learning approach that allows joint training of the main and auxiliary tasks, improving the performance of rumour verification.  Ја проверуваме поврзаноста помеѓу сопственостите на податоците и резултатите на користените модели за учење со повеќе задачи.', 'ml': 'വാക്കുകളുടെ സ്വയം വിലപിടിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ചെറിയ ഭാഗങ്ങളിലേക്ക് തകര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന ചെറിയ വിലാസകരമായ ഒരു ജോലിയാണ്. അത് ഒരു പൈപ്പെലിന്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. അതില മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലിയില്\u200d, വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉറപ്പാക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഈ പടികള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ ഘടകങ്ങളായി വികസിച്ചിരി പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലികളുടെയും പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലികളുടെയും കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പല്ലാ ജോലി ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200dക്കും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പല ജോലി പഠിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകളുടെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലു', 'pl': 'Automatyczne rozwiązywanie plotek to trudne zadanie, które można podzielić na mniejsze elementy tworzące rurociąg, w tym wykrywanie plotek, śledzenie plotek i klasyfikację stanowiska, prowadząc do ostatecznego wyniku określenia prawdziwości plotki. W poprzednich pracach te etapy w procesie weryfikacji plotek zostały opracowane jako oddzielne komponenty, w których wyjście jednego trafia do drugiego. Proponujemy wielozadaniowe podejście do uczenia się, które umożliwia wspólne szkolenie zadań głównych i pomocniczych, poprawiając wydajność weryfikacji plotek. Badamy związek między właściwościami zbioru danych a wynikami stosowanych modeli wielozadaniowych uczenia się.', 'mt': 'Ir-riżoluzzjoni awtomatika ta’ rumours hija kompitu ta’ sfida li jista’ jinqasam f’komponenti iżgħar li jiffurmaw pipeline, inkluż l-individwazzjoni ta’ rumours, it-traċċar ta’ rumours u l-klassifikazzjoni tal-pożizzjoni, li jwassal għar-riżultat finali tad-determinazzjoni tal-veraċità ta’ rumour. F’ħidma preċedenti, dawn il-passi fil-proċess ta’ verifika tar-rumori ġew żviluppati bħala komponenti separati fejn ir-riżultat ta’ alimentazzjoni waħda f’dik li jmiss. Aħna nipproponu approċċ ta’ tagħlim b’diversi kompiti li jippermetti taħriġ konġunt tal-kompiti ewlenin u awżiljarji, li jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni tal-verifika tar-rumori. Aħna teżamina l-konnessjoni bejn il-proprjetajiet tas-sett tad-dejta u r-riżultati tal-mudelli ta’ tagħlim multikompiti użati.', 'ro': 'Rezolvarea automată a zvonurilor este o sarcină dificilă care poate fi împărțită în componente mai mici care alcătuiesc o conductă, inclusiv detectarea zvonurilor, urmărirea zvonurilor și clasificarea poziției, ducând la rezultatul final al determinării veridicității zvonurilor. În lucrările anterioare, acești pași în procesul de verificare a zvonurilor au fost dezvoltați ca componente separate în care ieșirea unuia se hrănește în următoarea. Propunem o abordare de învățare multi-task care permite formarea comună a sarcinilor principale și auxiliare, îmbunătățind performanța verificării zvonurilor. Examinăm conexiunea dintre proprietățile setului de date și rezultatele modelelor de învățare multi-task utilizate.', 'no': 'Automatisk oppløysing av rumorer er ein vanskeleg oppgåve som kan bli brytt ned i mindre komponentar som lager opp ein røytlinje, inkludert rumoreoppdaging, rumoreoppføring og stasjonsklassifikasjon, som fører til den siste utgåva av å bestemme sannheten på ein rumor. I førre arbeid har desse stegane i prosessen av avtaleverifikasjonen utvikla som separe komponentar der utdata av ein kjelde inneheld i neste. Vi foreslår ein fleire oppgåver-læringstilnærming som tillater felles opplæring av hovudoppgåvene og hjelpeoppgåvene, og forbetrar utviklinga av rumoreverifikasjonen. Vi undersøker tilkoplinga mellom datasetteigenskapane og utgåva av dei fleire oppgåvelæringsmodelane som er brukte.', 'si': 'ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාලික විශ්වාස කරන්න පුළුවන් චාලන් වැඩක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් පායිප්ලින් එකක් හදන්න, අවස්ථාවක් පරීක්ෂණය, අවස්ථාවක් පරීක්ෂණය,  මුලින් වැඩේදී, මේ පැත්තක් පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා වෙනස් කොටස් වලින් විශේෂ කරලා තියෙනවා, ඊළඟ පැ අපි ගොඩක් වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් සහ උදව් වැඩක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් වෙනවා,  අපි පරීක්ෂා කරනවා දත්ත සැට් ගෞරවය සහ භාවිත වැඩි වැඩි වැඩි වැඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරතිදේශය.', 'sr': 'Automatska rezolucija glasina je izazovan zadatak koji se može razbiti u manje komponente koji sastavljaju cijevi, uključujući otkrivanje glasina, praćenje glasina i klasifikaciju stanja, koji vodi do konačnog ishoda određivanja veranosti glasine. U prethodnom poslu, ovi koraci u procesu provjere glasine su razvijene kao odvojene komponente u kojima se izlaz jednog hrani u sledeće. Predlažemo pristup učenja višezadataka koji omogućava zajedničku obuku glavnih i pomoćnih zadataka, poboljšavanje provedbe glasina. Pregledali smo vezu između vlasništva podataka i rezultata korištenih modela multi task učenja.', 'sv': 'Automatisk lösning av rykten är en utmanande uppgift som kan delas upp i mindre komponenter som utgör en pipeline, inklusive ryktesdetektering, ryktesspårning och ställningstagandeklassificering, vilket leder till slutresultatet av att fastställa sanningsenheten i ett rykte. I tidigare arbete har dessa steg i processen för ryktesverifiering utvecklats som separata komponenter där resultatet från en matas in i nästa. Vi föreslår en multi-task inlärningsmetod som möjliggör gemensam utbildning av huvuduppgifter och hjälpuppgifter, vilket förbättrar prestandan av ryktesverifiering. Vi undersöker sambandet mellan datasetets egenskaper och resultaten av de multi-task learning modeller som används.', 'so': 'Go’aanka hore ee warqadu waa shaqada dhibaatada ah oo lagu burburin karo qaybaha yaryar, kuwaas oo ka mid ah caddeynta warqada, koobsashada warqadda iyo fasaxda, waxaana ku soo jeedaa dhammaadka ugu dambeeya go’aanka ku saabsan runta warqada. Shaqo hore, tallaabooyinkaas marka lagu xaqiijiyo warqada waxaa loo horumariyey sida qayb gaar ah, meesha laga soo bixiyo cunto ka mid ah tan soo socda. Waxaannu horumarinaynaa qaab waxbarasho oo shaqo badan ah, taas oo ka heli karta waxbarashada wadajirka ah ee shaqada aasaasiga ah iyo kuwa la xiriira, horumarinta sameynta xaqiijinta warqada. Waxaan baaraynaa xiriirka u dhexeeya hantida macluumaadka iyo tusaalaha waxbarashada badan ee loo isticmaalay.', 'ta': 'வாய்ப்புகளின் தானியங்கி தீர்வு ஒரு சவாலிக்கும் சிறிய பொருள்கள் உடைக்கப்படும் செயலாகும், அது ஒரு குரல் கண்டுபிடிப்பு, குரல் பின்பற்றுதல் மற்றும் நிலை வகைப முந்தைய வேலையில், அறிவிப்பு உறுதிப்படுத்தல் செயல்பாட்டில் இந்த படிகள் தனிப்பட்ட பொருளாக உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, அங்கு  நாங்கள் பல பணிகள் கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் செயல்பாடு முக்கியமான பயிற்சியை அனுமதிக்கும் முக்கியமான மற்றும் அனுமதிக்கும் செயல்களை ம நாம் தகவல் அமைப்பு பண்புகளுக்கும் மற்றும் பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட பல பணி கற்றல் மாதிரிகளின் முடிவு', 'ur': 'افسانے کی آٹوٹی رخصت ایک مشکل کام ہے جو چھوٹے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے ٹکڑے کیے جاتے ہیں جو پیپ لین بناتے ہیں، شامل شامل شامل شامل شامل شامل شامل شامل شامل شامل شامل، شامل tracking اور موقعیت کلیسی، ایک شامل کی حقیقت کا فیصلہ کرنے کے نت پہلے کے کام میں، یہ پچھلوں کی تصدیق کی پروسس میں تقسیم کیا گیا ہے کہ مختلف قسمتوں کے طور پر، جہاں ایک فائدہ کے نتیجہ آگئی ہے. ہم ایک بہت سے کام کی تعلیم کا طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو اصلی اور مددگار کاموں کی مشترک تعلیم کرنے کی اجازت دیتا ہے اور شاعر کی تصدیق کی عمدگی کو بہتر کر دیتا ہے۔ ہم ڈاٹیسٹ کے خصوصے اور مثال مطالعہ کی تعلیم مدلکوں کے درمیان اتصال کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Name Oldingi ishda, bu tasdiqlarni tasdiqlash jarayonini boshqa komponentlar sifatida yaratildi. Keyingi bir xabar natijasi keyingi keladi. Biz bir necha vazifa o'rganish usulini tahrirlash imkoniyatini tahrirlash imkoniyatini beradi, asosiy va muhim vazifalarni bajarish imkoniyatini oshirish mumkin. Maʼlumotlar toʻplami xossalari va bir necha vazifa o'rganish modellarining natijalarini tekshirimiz.", 'vi': 'Tự động giải quyết những tin đồn là một nhiệm vụ thách thức có thể được phân loại thành các thành phần nhỏ mà tạo ra một đường ống dẫn, bao gồm việc phát hiện tin đồn, dấu vết tin đồn và phân loại vị trí, dẫn đến kết quả cuối cùng của việc xác định sự thật của tin đồn. Những bước trong quá trình kiểm tra tin đồn đã được phát triển như những thành phần khác nhau nơi sản xuất của một bộ phận nối tiếp. Chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp học tập đa nhiệm vụ, cho phép huấn luyện chung các công việc chính và phụ, cải thiện việc kiểm tra tin đồn. Chúng tôi kiểm tra sự kết nối giữa các thuộc tính nhà dữ liệu và kết quả của các mô hình học đa nhiệm vụ đã dùng.', 'nl': 'Automatische oplossing van geruchten is een uitdagende taak die kan worden opgesplitst in kleinere componenten die een pijplijn vormen, waaronder geruchtdetectie, geruchttracking en standclassificatie, wat leidt tot het uiteindelijke resultaat van het bepalen van de waarheidsgetrouwheid van een gerucht. In eerdere werkzaamheden zijn deze stappen in het proces van geruchtverificatie ontwikkeld als afzonderlijke componenten waarbij de output van de ene naar de andere leidt. We stellen een multi-task leerbenadering voor die gezamenlijke training van de hoofd- en hulptaken mogelijk maakt, waardoor de prestaties van geruchtverificatie worden verbeterd. We onderzoeken het verband tussen de dataseteigenschappen en de uitkomsten van de gebruikte multitask leermodellen.', 'bg': 'Автоматичното разделяне на слуховете е трудна задача, която може да бъде разделена на по-малки компоненти, които съставляват тръбопровода, включително откриване на слухове, проследяване на слухове и класификация на позицията, което води до окончателния резултат от определянето на истинността на слуховете. В предишна работа тези стъпки в процеса на проверка на слуховете са разработени като отделни компоненти, където изходът на единия се подава в следващия. Предлагаме подход за обучение с множество задачи, който позволява съвместно обучение на основните и спомагателните задачи, подобрявайки изпълнението на проверката на слуховете. Проучваме връзката между свойствата на набора от данни и резултатите от използваните модели за многозадачно обучение.', 'da': 'Automatisk løsning af rygter er en udfordrende opgave, der kan opdeles i mindre komponenter, der udgør en rørledning, herunder rygter detektering, rygtsporing og holdningsklassificering, hvilket fører til det endelige resultat af at fastslå sandheden af et rygte. I tidligere arbejde er disse trin i processen med rygtekontrol blevet udviklet som separate komponenter, hvor output fra den ene føres ind i den næste. Vi foreslår en multi-task læringstilgang, der muliggør fælles træning af de vigtigste og hjælpeopgaver, hvilket forbedrer effektiviteten af rygtebeverifikation. Vi undersøger sammenhængen mellem datasætteegenskaberne og resultaterne af de anvendte multi-task læringsmodeller.', 'hr': 'Automatski rješenje glasina je izazovan zadatak koji se može slomiti u manje komponente koji sastavljaju cijevi, uključujući otkrivanje glasina, klasifikaciju glasina i pozicija, što vodi do konačnog ishoda određivanja veranosti glasine. U prethodnom poslu, te korake u procesu provjere glasina razvijene su kao odvojene komponente u kojima se proizvod jedne hrane u sljedeće. Predlažemo višezadatačni pristup učenja koji omogućava zajedničku obuku glavnih i pomoćnih zadataka, poboljšavanje provedbe glasina. Provjeravamo povezanost između vlasništva podataka i rezultata korištenih multizadatačkih modela učenja.', 'de': 'Die automatische Lösung von Gerüchten ist eine herausfordernde Aufgabe, die in kleinere Komponenten unterteilt werden kann, die eine Pipeline bilden, einschließlich Gerüchterkennung, Gerüchtverfolgung und Haltungsklassifizierung, was zum endgültigen Ergebnis führt, die Wahrhaftigkeit eines Gerüchtes zu bestimmen. In früheren Arbeiten wurden diese Schritte im Prozess der Gerüchtverifizierung als separate Komponenten entwickelt, bei denen der Ausgang eines in den nächsten fließt. Wir schlagen einen Multi-Task-Lernansatz vor, der eine gemeinsame Schulung der Haupt- und Hilfsaufgaben ermöglicht, wodurch die Leistung der Gerüchtverifizierung verbessert wird. Wir untersuchen den Zusammenhang zwischen den Datensatzeigenschaften und den Ergebnissen der verwendeten Multi-Task-Lernmodelle.', 'id': 'Resolusi otomatis rumor adalah tugas yang menantang yang dapat dibagi menjadi komponen yang lebih kecil yang membuat pipeline, termasuk deteksi rumor, pelacakan rumor dan klasifikasi posisi, yang membawa ke hasil akhir dari menentukan kebenaran rumor. Dalam pekerjaan sebelumnya, langkah-langkah ini dalam proses verifikasi rumor telah dikembangkan sebagai komponen terpisah di mana output dari satu feed ke berikutnya. Kami mengusulkan pendekatan belajar multi-tugas yang memungkinkan pelatihan bersama tugas utama dan bantuan, memperbaiki prestasi verifikasi rumor. Kami memeriksa koneksi antara properti dataset dan hasil dari model belajar multi-tugas yang digunakan.', 'fa': 'حل خودکار شایعات یک کار سخت است که می تواند به عنوان عناصر کوچک شکسته شود که یک لوله ساخته شود، شایعات شناسایی شایعات، ردیابی شایعات و محرمانه موقعیت، به نتیجه نهایی تعیین حقیقت شایعات است. در کار قبل، این قدم\u200cها در فرایند تصدیق شایعه\u200cها به عنوان بخش\u200cهای جدا توسعه داده شده\u200cاند که نتیجه یک تغذیه\u200cی بعدی به بعدی می\u200cرسد. ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم روش یادگیری بسیاری از کارها که اجازه می\u200cدهد آموزش مشترک کارهای اصلی و کمک کند، و عملکرد تصدیق شایعات را بهتر کند. ما ارتباط بین ویژه\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها و نتیجه\u200cهای مدل یادگیری چند کار استفاده می\u200cکنیم.', 'sw': 'Uamuzi wa kujitegemea wa uvumi ni jukumu la changamoto ambalo linaweza kuvunjika katika vifaa vidogo vinavyotengeneza pipeline, ikiwa ni pamoja na uvumi wa uvumi, ufuatiliaji wa uvumi na utofauti wa msimamo, na kusababisha matokeo ya mwisho ya kuamua ukweli wa uvumi. Katika kazi zilizopita, hatua hizi katika mchakato wa kuthibitishwa kwa uvumi umeundwa kama sehemu tofauti ambapo matokeo ya chakula kimoja katika kipindi kingine. Tunazipendekeza mbinu za kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi ambazo zinaruhusu mafunzo ya pamoja ya kazi za msingi na zinazohitajika, kuboresha ufanisi wa ukweli wa uvumi. Tunatachunguza uhusiano kati ya utaalam wa taarifa na matokeo ya mifano ya kujifunza kwa kazi nyingi yaliyotumika.', 'af': "Outomatiese oplossing van rumours is 'n pragtige taak wat kan afgebreek word in kleinere komponente wat 'n pyplin maak, insluitend rumour detection, rumour tracking en staanse klasifikasie, wat na die eindelike uitgaan van die waarheid van 'n rumour bevestig. In vorige werk, hierdie stappe in die proses van rumour verifikasie is ontwikkel as aparte komponente waar die uitvoer van een voer in die volgende. Ons voorstel 'n multi-taak leer toegang wat toelaat saamste onderwerp van die hoofde en hulpbrukke opdragte, en die prestasie van rumourverifikasie verbeter. Ons ondersoek die verbinding tussen die datastel eienskappe en die resultate van die multi-taak leer modele wat gebruik is.", 'tr': 'Döwürleriň awtomatik çözümlenmesi, pipeline düzümlenmesi, diňe sözlerini gözlemek we durum klasifikasyny bejeren iň soňky netijede çykyp biljek täsiridir. Öňki işde, bu aýratyn barlamasynyň prosesi aýratyn bölekler bolup gelinýär. Şol ýerde bir besiniň netijesi indiki bölekler bolup durýar. Biz esasy we kömek taýýarlanmagyna meňzeş bir öwrenmek metodasyny teklip edýäris we a ýdym barlagynyň etkinleşigini geliştirir. Datum sets häsiýetleri we multi-täbli öwrenmek nusgalarynyň arasynda baglaýyşy barýarys.', 'sq': 'Automatic resolution of rumours is a challenging task that can be broken down into smaller components that make up a pipeline, including rumour detection, rumour tracking and stance classification, leading to the final outcome of determining the veracity of a rumour.  Në punën e mëparshme, këto hapa në procesin e verifikimit të thashethemeve janë zhvilluar si komponente të veçanta ku prodhimi i një ushqehet në tjetrën. We propose a multi-task learning approach that allows joint training of the main and auxiliary tasks, improving the performance of rumour verification.  Ne shqyrtojmë lidhjen midis pronave të grupit të të dhënave dhe rezultateve të modeleve të mësimit me shumë detyra të përdorura.', 'ko': '헛소문의 자동 해결은 도전적인 임무로 이를 파이프라인을 구성하는 작은 구성 요소로 분해할 수 있다. 헛소문 검출, 헛소문 추적과 입장 분류를 포함하여 헛소문의 진실성을 최종적으로 확정할 수 있다.이전의 작업에서 루머를 검증하는 과정에서 이러한 절차는 단독 구성 요소로 개발되었고 그 중 하나의 출력은 다음 구성 요소로 피드백되었다.우리는 주요 임무와 보조 임무에 대한 연합 훈련을 허용하고 루머 검증의 성능을 향상시키는 다중 임무 학습 방법을 제시했다.우리는 데이터 집합 속성과 사용된 다중 임무 학습 모델의 결과 간의 관계를 연구했다.', 'am': 'የውይይት መፍትሄ የውሸትን እውነተኛ ውጤት ማረጋገጥ፣ የውይይት መግለጫ እና ትርጓሜ መግለጫ የሚችል ታናሽ ክፍል ነው፡፡ የቀድሞው ሥራ፣ እነዚህ እርምጃዎች የውይይት ማረጋገጫ በክፍል የተለየ ክፍሎች ሆነዋል፡፡ የዋና እና የአግባር ስራዎችን ለመግለጥ የሚችል የብዙ ስራ ትምህርት መግለጫ እና የውይይቱን ማረጋገጫ እንዲያሳድግ የሚችል ጥያቄን እናሳስባለን፡፡ የዳታ ሰርቨሮች ግንኙነት እና የብዙ ትምህርት ምሳሌዎችን የሚጠቀሙትን ውጤቶች እናይሞክራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Խոսքերի ավտոմատիկ լուծումը մարտահրավեր է, որը կարող է բաժանել փոքր բաղադրիչներով, որոնք կառուցում են խողովակաշար, ներառյալ հնչյունների հայտնաբերումը, հնչյունների հետևումը և դիրքի դասակարգումը, ինչը հանգեցնում է հնչյունների ճշմարտության վերջնական արդյու Անցյալ աշխատանքի ընթացքում ձայների հավասարման գործընթացի այս քայլերը զարգացել են որպես առանձին բաղադրիչներ, որտեղ մեկ հոսանքի արտադրությունը հաջորդի մեջ է: Մենք առաջարկում ենք բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության մոտեցում, որը թույլ է տալիս միասին վարժեցնել հիմնական և օգնական խնդիրները, բարելավելով ձայների հավասարման արտադրությունը: Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք տվյալների համակարգի հատկությունների և օգտագործված բազմախնդիրների ուսումնասիրության արդյունքների կապը:', 'ca': "La resolució automàtica dels rumors és una tasca desafiadora que pot ser dividida en components més petits que formen un tub, incloent la detecció de rumors, el seguiment de rumors i la classificació de posició, portant al final de determinar la veritat d'una rumora. En treballs anteriors, aquestes etapes en el procés de verificació de rumors s'han desenvolupat com components separats on la producció d'un s'alimenta al següent. Proposem un enfocament d'aprenentatge multitascat que permet formar conjuntament les tasques principals i auxiliars, millorant el rendiment de la verificació de rumors. Examinem la connexió entre les propietats del conjunt de dades i els resultats dels models d'aprenentatge multitascat utilitzats.", 'bn': 'স্বয়ংক্রিয় গুজবের সিদ্ধান্ত হচ্ছে একটি চ্যালেঞ্জ কাজ যা ছোট একটি পাইপেলেনে ভেঙ্গে যেতে পারে, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে গুজব সন্ধান, গুজব ট্র্যাকিং এবং স্থানীয় বিভা In previous work, these steps in the process of rumour verification have been developed as separate components where the output of one feeds into the next.  আমরা একটি বহুকাজ শিক্ষা পদক্ষেপ প্রস্তাব করি যা প্রধান এবং অনুগ্রহের কাজের যৌথ প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করার সুযোগ দেয়, গুজবের নিশ্চি আমরা ডাটাসেটের বৈশিষ্ট্য এবং বহুকাজের শিক্ষা মডেলের ফলাফলের মধ্যে যোগাযোগ পরীক্ষা করি।', 'az': 'Söhbətlərin avtomatik çəkilməsi çətinlikləridir ki, tüpü çizgisini yaradan kiçik komponentlərə bölünə bilər, danışıqları keşfetmək, danışıqları izləmək və vəziyyətlərin klasifikasyonu dahil edərlər. Söhbətlərin doğruluğunu təsdiqləməsinin son sonuna yol a çar. Əvvəlki işdə, bu səslərin təsdiqlənməsi sürecindəki adımlar bir-birinin sonrakılara istifadə etməsi üçün ayrı komponent olaraq hazırlanmışdır. Biz çoxlu işin öyrənməsi tərzini təklif edirik ki, böyük və köməkçi işlərin birlikdə təhsil etməsinə müvəffəq edər, dediklərin təsdiqləməsini yaxşılaşdırır. Biz verilən qüsusiyyətlərin və çoxlu işlər öyrənmə modellerinin sonuçlarının bağlantısını incidirik.', 'cs': 'Automatické řešení zvěstí je náročný úkol, který lze rozdělit do menších složek, které tvoří potrubí, včetně detekce zvěstí, sledování zvěstí a klasifikace postojů, což vede k konečnému výsledku určení pravdivosti zvěsti. V předchozí práci byly tyto kroky v procesu ověřování zvěstí vyvinuty jako samostatné komponenty, kde výstup jednoho přichází do druhého. Navrhujeme víceúkolový učební přístup, který umožňuje společné školení hlavních a pomocných úkolů, zlepšení výkonu ověřování zvěstí. Zkoumáme souvislost mezi vlastnostmi datových sad a výsledky použitých multi-tasking modelů učení.', 'bs': 'Automatska rezolucija glasina je izazovan zadatak koji se može razbiti u manje komponente koji sastavljaju cijevi, uključujući otkrivanje glasina, praćenje glasina i klasifikaciju stanja, koji vodi do konačnog ishoda određivanja veranosti glasine. U prethodnom poslu, te korake u procesu provjere glasina razvijene su kao odvojene komponente u kojima se proizvod jedne hrane u sljedeće. Predlažemo pristup učenja višezadataka koji omogućava zajedničku obuku glavnih i pomoćnih zadataka, poboljšavanje provedbe glasina. Provjeravamo vezu između vlasništva seta podataka i rezultata korištenih modela multi task učenja.', 'et': 'Kuuljujuttude automaatne lahendamine on keeruline ülesanne, mida saab jagada väiksemateks komponentideks, mis moodustavad torujuhtme, sealhulgas kuulujuttude avastamise, kuulujuttude jälgimise ja seisukohtade klassifitseerimise, mille tulemuseks on kuulujuttude õigsuse kindlaksmääramine. Varasemates töödes on need kuulujuttude kontrollimise etapid välja töötatud eraldi komponentidena, kus ühe väljund toimub teise. Pakume välja mitmeülesandelise õppe lähenemisviisi, mis võimaldab põhi- ja abiülesannete ühist koolitamist, parandades kuulujuttude kontrollimise tulemuslikkust. Uurime seost andmekogumi omaduste ja kasutatud mitmeülesandelise õppe mudelite tulemuste vahel.', 'fi': 'Huhujen automaattinen erottelu on haastava tehtävä, joka voidaan jakaa putkiston pieniin osiin, kuten huhujen havaitsemiseen, huhujen seurantaan ja asennon luokitteluun, mikä johtaa huhun totuudenmukaisuuden määrittämiseen. Aiemmissa tutkimuksissa nämä huhujen todentamisprosessin vaiheet on kehitetty erillisiksi komponenteiksi, joissa yhden tuotos syötetään seuraavaan. Ehdotamme monitehtäväoppimista, joka mahdollistaa yhteisen koulutuksen pää- ja aputehtävissä ja parantaa huhujen todentamista. Tutkimme aineiston ominaisuuksien ja käytettyjen monitehtäväoppimismallien tulosten välistä yhteyttä.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé Na dhéwé éntuk sing beraksi barêng, akeh barêng-barêng langgar sampeyan karo ingkang separah sing katêpakan ning acara mbukaké kebebasan barêng langgar sampeyan. Awak dhéwé ngerasah sistem multi-task kanggo nyeanye nggawe gerakan pamirke tarjamah lan tambah bantuan, njaluke nggawe gerakan kanggo ngerasah panembok dhéwé. Awak dhéwé éntuk nggambar pergambaran dataset karo barang nggambar model multi-task sing gambar', 'ha': "Cikake farat-farat aikin rumors yana da wata tãshin wanda za'a samar da shi cikin ƙanshin ƙarami wanda ke samar da wani lumino, kamar yadda ya gane wani rumori, kan gane na rumori da kuma tsofanin sigar, yana ƙara zuwa ƙarshen ta ƙayyade gaskiyar sauri. Ga aikin da ya gabata, za'a buɗe waɗannan hanyõyin a cikin jararin tabbatarwa na rumor kamar ƙanshi guda, inda ƙarshen fitarwa guda zuwa na ƙarshe. Munã goyyar da wata hanyor wa masu sani na mulki-aikin wanda ke yarda da coadar wa aikin muhimmi da masu inganci, kuma suna kyautata gyaran tabbatarwa na rumor. Kana jarraba haɗi tsakanin tsarin database da matsalan misãlai masu amfani da", 'sk': 'Samodejno ločevanje govoric je zahtevna naloga, ki jo je mogoče razdeliti na manjše komponente, ki sestavljajo cevovod, vključno z odkrivanjem govoric, sledenjem govoricam in klasifikacijo položaja, kar vodi do končnega rezultata ugotavljanja resničnosti govoric. V prejšnjem delu so bili ti koraki v procesu preverjanja govoric razviti kot ločene komponente, pri katerih se izhod enega napaja v drugo. Predlagamo večopravilni učni pristop, ki omogoča skupno usposabljanje glavnih in pomožnih nalog ter izboljšanje izvedbe preverjanja govoric. Preučujemo povezavo med lastnostmi nabora podatkov in rezultati uporabljenih modelov večopravilnega učenja.', 'he': 'הפתרון אוטומטי של שמועות הוא משימה מאתגרת שאפשר להפריד לרכיבים קטנים יותר שמכילים צינור, כולל זיהוי שמועות, מעקב שמועות וסיפור עמדה, שמוביל לתוצאה הסופית של קבענת האמת של שמועה. בעבודה הקודמת, צעדים אלה בתהליך האמת שמועות פותחו כרכיבים נפרדים שבו יציאה של אחד מאכיל לתוך הבא. אנו מציעים גישה ללמוד במשימות רבות שמאפשרת אימון משותף של המשימות העיקריות והעזריות, לשפר את ביצוע האישור של שמועות. אנו בודקים את הקשר בין תכונות קבוצת הנתונים לתוצאות של דוגמני הלימודים של משימות רבות.', 'bo': 'Automatic resolution of rumours is a challenging task that can be broken down into smaller components that make up a pipeline, including rumour detection, rumour tracking and stance classification, leading to the final outcome of determining the veracity of a rumour. In previous work, these steps in the process of rumour verification have been developed as separate components where the output of one feeds into the next. ང་ཚོས་རྩ་བའི་ལས་འགན་སྣེ་མང་བོའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་གྱིས་རྩ་བའི་དང་རྗེས་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ལས་འགན་སྤྲོད་དང་། rumor་ཞིབ་དཔྱད་ ང་ཚོས་བེད་སྤྱོད་པའི་གནད་སྡུད་ཚན་གྱི་ངོ་བོའི་དབར་གྱི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་དང་གྲངས་འབོར་མང་བོའི་དཔེ་དབྱིབས་སྤྱོད'}
{'en': 'Open Information Extraction on Scientific Text : An Evaluation', 'ar': 'فتح استخراج المعلومات على النص العلمي: تقييم', 'fr': "Extraction d'informations ouvertes sur un texte scientifique\xa0: une évaluation", 'pt': 'Extração de Informação Aberta em Texto Científico: Uma Avaliação', 'es': 'Extracción abierta de información en textos científicos: una evaluación', 'ja': '科学的テキストに関するオープン情報抽出：評価', 'zh': '科学文本开信息提取评估', 'ru': 'Открытое извлечение информации из научного текста: оценка', 'hi': 'वैज्ञानिक पाठ पर खुली जानकारी निष्कर्षण: एक मूल्यांकन', 'ga': 'Sliocht Faisnéise Oscailte ar Théacs Eolaíoch: Meastóireacht', 'ka': 'მეცნიერო ტექსტის ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის გახსნა: განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Ανοιχτή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών για επιστημονικό κείμενο: Μια αξιολόγηση', 'hu': 'Nyílt információs kivonat a tudományos szövegről: egy értékelés', 'it': 'Estrazione di informazioni aperte sul testo scientifico: una valutazione', 'lt': 'Atvira informacija apie mokslinį tekstą: vertinimas', 'ms': 'Buka Ekstraksi Maklumat mengenai Teks Saintifik: Penghargaan', 'kk': 'Ғылыми мәтін туралы мәліметті тарқату мәліметін ашу: Үлгілеу', 'mk': 'Отвори информации за научен текст: Evaluation', 'ml': 'ശാസ്ത്ര പദാവലിയുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുക: A evaluation', 'mt': 'Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa dwar it-Test Xjentifiku: Evalwazzjoni', 'mn': 'Шинжлэх ухааны текст дээрх мэдээлэл татах', 'no': 'Opna utpakking av informasjon om vitenskapelig tekst: ein evaluering', 'ro': 'Extracție de informații deschise asupra textului științific: o evaluare', 'si': 'විද්\u200dයාණික පාළුවේ තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය විවෘත කරන්න: විශ්වාස කරන්න', 'so': 'Wixii macluumaad la furan karo oo ku saabsan matxafka cilmiga: Baaritaanka', 'sv': 'Utdrag av öppen information om vetenskaplig text: En utvärdering', 'pl': 'Otwarty wyciąg informacji na temat tekstu naukowego: ocena', 'sr': 'Otvori izvlačenje informacija o naučnom tekstu: Evaluacija', 'ur': 'سائنس ٹیکسٹ پر معلومات اضافہ کھول دے: ایک ارزش', 'ta': 'அறிவியல் உரையில் தகவல் வெளியீட்டை திற: ஒரு மதிப்பு', 'uz': 'Ilmiy matnni ochish: Evaluation', 'vi': 'Sơ tán thông tin khoa học: Một bài đánh giá', 'da': 'Uddrag af åben information om videnskabelig tekst: en evaluering', 'hr': 'Otvori izvlačenje informacija o znanstvenom tekstu: procjena', 'bg': 'Отворена информация за научния текст: оценка', 'nl': 'Open informatieextractie over wetenschappelijke tekst: een evaluatie', 'de': 'Open Information Extraction on Scientific Text: Eine Evaluation', 'id': 'Buka Ekstraksi Informasi tentang Teks Sains: Sebuah Evaluasi', 'ko': '과학 텍스트의 개방 정보 추출: 평가', 'fa': 'باز کردن اطلاعات روی متن علمی: ارزیابی', 'sw': 'Open Information Extraction on Sayansi Text: A Evaluation', 'tr': 'Ilmi Metin barada Maglumat Açmak', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'af': "Open Informasie Uitpakking op Wetenskaplike Teks: ' n Evaluering", 'sq': 'Hap nxjerrjen e informacionit mbi tekstin shkencore: Një vlerësim', 'az': 'Bilimli Metin haqqında məlumat Aç: Qıymet', 'bn': 'বৈজ্ঞানিক টেক্সটে তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাকশন খুলুন', 'ca': "Extracció oberta d'informació sobre el text científic: Una evaluació", 'bs': 'Otvori izvlačenje informacija o naučnom tekstu: Evaluacija', 'et': 'Avatud teabe väljavõte teadusliku teksti kohta: hindamine', 'cs': 'Otevřený extrakt informací o vědeckém textu: hodnocení', 'hy': 'Գիտական տեքստի վերաբերյալ բաց տեղեկատվությունը: A', 'fi': 'Open Information Extraction on Scientific Text: An Evaluation', 'jv': 'string" in "context_BAR_stringNew', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'Odprti izvleček informacij o znanstvenem besedilu: ocena', 'ha': '@ action', 'bo': 'ཚན་རིག་གི་ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འཕགས་ཀྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁ་ཕྱེ། རིམ་ལྟར་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) is the task of the unsupervised creation of structured information from text. OIE is often used as a starting point for a number of downstream tasks including knowledge base construction, relation extraction, and question answering. While OIE methods are targeted at being domain independent, they have been evaluated primarily on newspaper, encyclopedic or general web text. In this article, we evaluate the performance of OIE on scientific texts originating from 10 different disciplines. To do so, we use two state-of-the-art OIE systems using a crowd-sourcing approach. We find that OIE systems perform significantly worse on scientific text than encyclopedic text. We also provide an error analysis and suggest areas of work to reduce errors. Our corpus of sentences and judgments are made available.', 'es': 'La extracción abierta de información (OIE) es la tarea de la creación sin supervisión de información estructurada a partir del texto. La OIE se utiliza a menudo como punto de partida para una serie de tareas posteriores, como la construcción de bases de conocimientos, la extracción de relaciones y la respuesta a preguntas. Si bien los métodos de la OIE están destinados a ser independientes del dominio, se han evaluado principalmente en textos periodísticos, enciclopédicos o generales de la web. En este artículo, evaluamos el desempeño de la OIE en textos científicos procedentes de 10 disciplinas diferentes. Para ello, utilizamos dos sistemas de la OIE de última generación que utilizan un enfoque de colaboración colectiva. Observamos que los sistemas de la OIE funcionan significativamente peor en textos científicos que en textos enciclopédicos. También ofrecemos un análisis de errores y sugerimos áreas de trabajo para reducir los errores. Nuestro corpus de sentencias y sentencias está disponible.', 'ar': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) هو مهمة الإنشاء غير الخاضع للإشراف للمعلومات المنظمة من النص. غالبًا ما يتم استخدام OIE كنقطة انطلاق لعدد من المهام النهائية بما في ذلك بناء قاعدة المعرفة واستخراج العلاقة والإجابة على الأسئلة. في حين أن أساليب المنظمة العالمية للصحة الحيوانية (OIE) تهدف إلى أن تكون مستقلة عن المجال ، فقد تم تقييمها في المقام الأول على الصحف أو الموسوعات أو نصوص الويب العامة. في هذه المقالة ، نقوم بتقييم أداء OIE على النصوص العلمية التي نشأت من 10 تخصصات مختلفة. للقيام بذلك ، نستخدم نظامين من أحدث أنظمة OIE باستخدام نهج المصادر الجماعية. نجد أن أداء أنظمة OIE في النص العلمي أسوأ بكثير من أداء النص الموسوعي. نقدم أيضًا تحليلًا للخطأ ونقترح عليك مجالات عمل لتقليل الأخطاء. يتم توفير مجموعة الأحكام والأحكام الخاصة بنا.', 'fr': "L'extraction ouverte d'informations (OIE) est la tâche de créer sans supervision des informations structurées à partir de texte. L'OIE est souvent utilisée comme point de départ pour un certain nombre de tâches en aval, notamment la construction d'une base de connaissances, l'extraction de relations et la réponse aux questions. Alors que les méthodes de l'OIE visent à être indépendantes du domaine, elles ont été évaluées principalement sur des textes de journaux, encyclopédiques ou généraux sur le Web. Dans cet article, nous évaluons les performances de l'OIE sur des textes scientifiques issus de 10 disciplines différentes. Pour ce faire, nous utilisons deux systèmes de pointe de l'OIE utilisant une approche de crowdsourcing. Nous constatons que les systèmes de l'OIE sont nettement moins performants sur les textes scientifiques que sur les textes encyclopédiques. Nous fournissons également une analyse des erreurs et suggérons des domaines de travail pour réduire les erreurs. Notre corpus de sentences et de jugements est disponible.", 'pt': 'A Extração de Informação Aberta (OIE) é a tarefa da criação não supervisionada de informação estruturada a partir de texto. A OIE é frequentemente usada como ponto de partida para várias tarefas posteriores, incluindo construção de base de conhecimento, extração de relação e resposta a perguntas. Embora os métodos da OIE tenham como objetivo ser independentes de domínio, eles foram avaliados principalmente em jornais, textos enciclopédicos ou na web em geral. Neste artigo, avaliamos o desempenho da OIE em textos científicos oriundos de 10 disciplinas diferentes. Para isso, usamos dois sistemas OIE de última geração usando uma abordagem de crowdsourcing. Descobrimos que os sistemas OIE têm um desempenho significativamente pior em texto científico do que em texto enciclopédico. Também fornecemos uma análise de erros e sugerimos áreas de trabalho para reduzir os erros. Nosso corpus de sentenças e julgamentos é disponibilizado.', 'ja': 'オープン情報抽出（ OIE ）は、テキストから構造化された情報を無監督で作成する作業です。OIEは、多くの場合、ナレッジベース構築、関係抽出、質問応答を含む多くのダウンストリームタスクの出発点として使用されます。OIEメソッドは、ドメインに依存しないことを目標としていますが、主に新聞、百科事典、または一般的なウェブテキストで評価されています。この記事では、10の異なる分野に由来する科学的テキストに対するOIEのパフォーマンスを評価します。そのためには、クラウドソーシングアプローチを使用して2つの最先端のOIEシステムを使用します。OIEシステムは、百科事典的なテキストよりも科学的なテキストに対して著しく悪いパフォーマンスを発揮することがわかります。また、エラー分析を提供し、エラーを減らすための作業領域を提案します。私たちの文と判決のコーパスが利用可能になりました。', 'zh': '开信提取 (OIE) 自文本无督创结构化之任。 OIE常以下流为务,兼知识库构建,关系问答。 虽世物卫生组织法,独立领域,而主于报纸,百科全书网络文本。 于本文中,估世界动物卫生组织于本10异学科科学文本也。 为用二最先进OIE统,用众包法。 吾见世物卫生组织系科学本明不如百科全书本。 臣等犹供谬论,并议减误。 臣等所决与决语料库可用也。', 'hi': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) पाठ से संरचित जानकारी के असुरक्षित निर्माण का कार्य है। OIE अक्सर नॉलेज बेस निर्माण, संबंध निष्कर्षण, और प्रश्न उत्तर सहित डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों की एक संख्या के लिए एक प्रारंभिक बिंदु के रूप में उपयोग किया जाता है। जबकि OIE विधियों को डोमेन स्वतंत्र होने पर लक्षित किया जाता है, उन्हें मुख्य रूप से समाचार पत्र, विश्वकोश या सामान्य वेब पाठ पर मूल्यांकन किया गया है। इस लेख में, हम 10 विभिन्न विषयों से उत्पन्न होने वाले वैज्ञानिक ग्रंथों पर OIE के प्रदर्शन का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। ऐसा करने के लिए, हम एक भीड़-सोर्सिंग दृष्टिकोण का उपयोग करके दो अत्याधुनिक ओआईई सिस्टम का उपयोग करते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि OIE सिस्टम विश्वकोशीय पाठ की तुलना में वैज्ञानिक पाठ पर काफी खराब प्रदर्शन करते हैं। हम एक त्रुटि विश्लेषण भी प्रदान करते हैं और त्रुटियों को कम करने के लिए काम के क्षेत्रों का सुझाव देते हैं। वाक्यों और निर्णयों का हमारा कॉर्पस उपलब्ध कराया गया है।', 'ru': 'Извлечение открытой информации (OIE) - задача неконтролируемого создания структурированной информации из текста. МЭБ часто используется в качестве отправной точки для ряда последующих задач, включая построение базы знаний, извлечение отношений и ответы на вопросы. Хотя методы МЭБ нацелены на то, чтобы быть независимыми от доменов, они оцениваются главным образом на основе газетного, энциклопедического или общего веб-текста. В этой статье мы оцениваем работу МЭБ по научным текстам, исходящим из 10 различных дисциплин. Для этого мы используем две самые современные системы OIE, использующие краудсорсинговый подход. Мы находим, что системы МЭБ работают значительно хуже на научном тексте, чем на энциклопедическом. Мы также проводим анализ ошибок и предлагаем области работы, чтобы уменьшить количество ошибок. Наш свод приговоров и постановлений доступен.', 'ga': 'Is éard atá i gceist le Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte (OIE) faisnéis struchtúrtha a chruthú ó théacs gan mhaoirseacht. Is minic a úsáidtear OIE mar phointe tosaigh do roinnt tascanna iartheachtacha lena n-áirítear tógáil an bhunachar eolais, asbhaint an chaidrimh agus freagairt ceisteanna. Cé go ndírítear ar mhodhanna OIE a bheith neamhspleách ar an bhfearann, rinneadh meastóireacht orthu go príomha ar théacs nuachtáin, encyclopedic nó ginearálta gréasáin. San Airteagal seo, déanaimid measúnú ar fheidhmíocht OIE ar théacsanna eolaíocha as 10 ndisciplíní éagsúla. Chun é sin a dhéanamh, bainimid úsáid as dhá chóras OIE den scoth a úsáideann cur chuige sluafhoinsithe. Faighimid amach go bhfeidhmíonn córais OIE i bhfad níos measa ar théacs eolaíoch ná ar théacs ciclipéideach. Cuirimid anailís earráide ar fáil freisin agus molaimid réimsí oibre chun earráidí a laghdú. Cuirtear ár gcorpas pianbhreitheanna agus breithiúnais ar fáil.', 'ka': 'Name OIE ზოგიერთად გამოყენება როგორც დასაწყისი მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაო სამუშაო დავალებისთვის, როგორც ცნობიერების ბაზის შექმნა, შესახებ ექსტრაქცი მაგრამ OIE მეთოდის მიზეზი იყო, რომ დემონი უცნობიერი იყოს, ისინი პირველად განსაზღვრებულია განსაზღვრებაში, ანციკლოპედიული ან სამუშაო ტექსტში. ამ პექტიკში, ჩვენ OIE-ის გავამუშავებთ 10 განსხვავებული დისპლიონდან გამოიყენებული მეცნიერო ტექსტზე. ამას გავაკეთებთ, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ ორი მსოფლიო OIE სისტემას, რომელიც მსოფლიოს მიზემის გამოყენება. ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ OIE სისტემები მეცნიერო ტექსტიდან მნიშვნელოვანია, ვიდრე ანციკლოპედიული ტექსტიდან. ჩვენ შეცდომის ანალიზაციას დავიწყებთ და სამუშაო სამუშაო სამუშაო, რომ შეცდომის შეცდომის შემცირება. ნაქთჲრ კჲპოსჟ ჲრ ოპთჱნაუთ თ ჟყევნთწ ჟვ ნაოპაგთლ.', 'el': 'Η ανοικτή εξαγωγή πληροφοριών (ΟΕΕ) είναι το καθήκον της ανεξέλεγκτης δημιουργίας δομημένων πληροφοριών από κείμενο. Ο ΟΕΕ χρησιμοποιείται συχνά ως σημείο εκκίνησης για μια σειρά μεταγενέστερων εργασιών, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της κατασκευής βάσης γνώσεων, της εξαγωγής σχέσεων και της απάντησης ερωτήσεων. Ενώ οι μέθοδοι του ΟΕΕ στοχεύουν στην ανεξαρτησία των τομέων, έχουν αξιολογηθεί κυρίως σε εφημερίδες, εγκυκλοπαίδεια ή γενικά διαδικτυακά κείμενα. Στο άρθρο αυτό αξιολογούμε την απόδοση του ΟΕΕ σε επιστημονικά κείμενα που προέρχονται από δέκα διαφορετικούς κλάδους. Για να το κάνουμε αυτό, χρησιμοποιούμε δύο υπερσύγχρονα συστήματα που χρησιμοποιούν μια προσέγγιση Crowdsourcing. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι τα συστήματα του ΟΕΕ αποδίδουν σημαντικά χειρότερα σε επιστημονικό κείμενο από ό, τι σε εγκυκλοπαίδεια κείμενο. Παρέχουμε επίσης μια ανάλυση σφαλμάτων και προτείνουμε τομείς εργασίας για τη μείωση των σφαλμάτων. Το σώμα των ποινών και των αποφάσεων μας είναι διαθέσιμο.', 'hu': 'Az Open Information Extraction (OIE) a strukturált információk felügyelet nélküli létrehozásának feladata szövegből. Az OIE-t gyakran számos downstream feladat kiindulópontjaként használják, beleértve a tudásbázis építését, a kapcsolatok kitermelését és a kérdések megválaszolását. Míg az OIE módszerei a domain-függetlenségre irányulnak, azokat elsősorban újságban, enciklopédiában vagy általános webes szövegekben értékelték. Ebben a cikkben értékeljük az OIE teljesítményét 10 különböző tudományterületből származó tudományos szövegeken. Ehhez két legkorszerűbb OIE rendszert használunk közösségi forrásból. Úgy találjuk, hogy az OIE rendszerei jelentősen rosszabbak a tudományos szövegeknél, mint az enciklopédikus szövegeknél. Hibaelemzést is biztosítunk, és javasoljuk a hibák csökkentésére irányuló munkaterületeket. Ítéleteink és ítéleteink elérhetővé válnak.', 'lt': 'Atviros informacijos ekstrahavimas (OIE) yra nenorėto struktūrizuotos informacijos iš teksto kūrimo uždavinys. OIE dažnai naudojama kaip atskaitos taškas kelioms tolesnėms užduotims, įskaitant žinių bazės kūrimą, santykių gavybą ir klausimų atsakymą. Nors OIE metodai yra skirti nepriklausomai nuo sričių, jie pirmiausia buvo vertinami laikraščiuose, enciklopediniuose arba bendrajame interneto tekste. In this article, we evaluate the performance of OIE on scientific texts originating from 10 different disciplines.  Tam mes naudojame dvi naujausias OIE sistemas taikant visuomenės išteklių metodą. Matome, kad OIE sistemos moksliniame tekste gerokai blogiau veikia nei enciklopediniame tekste. Taip pat teikiame klaidų analizę ir siūlome darbo sritis klaidų mažinimui. Mūsų nuosprendžių ir sprendimų korpusas yra prieinamas.', 'it': "Open Information Extraction (OIE) è il compito della creazione non supervisionata di informazioni strutturate dal testo. L'OIE è spesso utilizzato come punto di partenza per una serie di compiti a valle, tra cui la costruzione di una base di conoscenze, l'estrazione delle relazioni e la risposta alle domande. Mentre i metodi OIE sono mirati ad essere indipendenti dal dominio, sono stati valutati principalmente su giornali, enciclopedici o testi web generali. In questo articolo valutiamo le prestazioni dell'OIE su testi scientifici provenienti da 10 discipline diverse. Per farlo, utilizziamo due sistemi OIE all'avanguardia che utilizzano un approccio di crowdsourcing. Troviamo che i sistemi OIE hanno prestazioni significativamente peggiori sul testo scientifico rispetto al testo enciclopedico. Forniamo anche un'analisi degli errori e suggeriamo aree di lavoro per ridurre gli errori. Il nostro corpus di sentenze e sentenze è reso disponibile.", 'mk': 'Отворена информација екстракција (OIE) е задачата на ненадгледуваното создавање на структурирани информации од текст. ОИЕ честопати се користи како почетна точка за неколку понатамошни задачи, вклучително и изградба на базата на знаење, извлекување на односи и одговор на прашања. Иако методите на ОИЕ се насочени на независност од доменот, тие се проценети главно во весниците, енциклопедите или генералниот веб-текст. Во оваа статија ја проценуваме изведбата на ОИЕ на научните тексти кои потекнуваат од 10 различни дисциплини. За да го направиме тоа, користиме два најсовремени системи на ОИЕ користејќи пристап на публички извори. Најдовме дека системите на ОИЕ работат значително полошо на научниот текст отколку на енциклопедичкиот текст. Ние, исто така, обезбедуваме анализа на грешки и предлагаме области на работа за намалување на грешките. Нашиот корпус на казни и пресуди е достапен.', 'ms': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) is the task of the unsupervised creation of structured information from text.  OIE is often used as a starting point for a number of downstream tasks including knowledge base construction, relation extraction, and question answering.  Sementara kaedah OIE ditujukan untuk menjadi bebas domain, mereka telah diuji secara utama pada surat khabar, enciklopedik atau teks web umum. Dalam artikel ini, kami menilai prestasi OIE pada teks saintifik yang berasal dari 10 disiplin yang berbeza. Untuk melakukannya, kita menggunakan dua sistem OIE terbaik menggunakan pendekatan sumber ramai. Kami mendapati bahawa sistem OIE melakukan lebih buruk pada teks saintifik daripada teks enciklopedik. Kami juga memberikan analisis ralat dan cadangkan kawasan kerja untuk mengurangi ralat. Korpus hukuman dan keputusan kami telah diberikan.', 'kk': 'Мәліметті ашу (OIE) мәтіннен құрылмаған мәліметтің құрылымының тапсырмасы. OIE көпшілікті білім негізгі құрылғы, қатынас тарқату және сұрақ жауап беру үшін бірнеше бағыттау тапсырмалар үшін бастау нүктесі ретінде қолданылады. OIE әдістері доменге тәуелсіз болу үшін мақсатталған, олар негізінде қағаз, енциклопедикалық немесе жалпы веб мәтінде оқиғалады. Бұл мақалада, 10 әртүрлі дисциплинадан бастаған ғылыми мәтіндердің OIE жұмысын бағалаймыз. Бұл үшін біз көпшілік көпшілік көпшілігін қолданатын OIE жүйелерін қолданамыз. ОIE жүйелері енциклопедикалық мәтіннен артық мәтінде тұрады. Қате анализ және қателерді азайту үшін жұмыс аумақтарын таңдап береміз. Біздің сұрақтар мен тұрақтар корпус қол жеткізілген.', 'mt': 'L-Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa (OIE) hija l-kompitu tal-ħolqien mhux sorveljat ta’ informazzjoni strutturata mit-test. L-OIE spiss tintuża bħala punt tat-tluq għal għadd ta’ kompiti downstream inkluż il-kostruzzjoni tal-bażi tal-għarfien, l-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet, u t-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet. Filwaqt li l-metodi tal-OIE huma mmirati biex ikunu indipendenti mid-dominju, dawn ġew evalwati primarjament fuq il-gazzetti, it-test enciklopediku jew it-test ġenerali fuq l-internet. F’dan l-artikolu, aħna jevalwaw il-prestazzjoni tal-OIE fuq testi xjentifiċi li joriġinaw minn 10 dixxiplini differenti. Biex nagħmlu dan, a ħna nużaw żewġ sistemi tal-OIE l-aktar avvanzati bl-użu ta’ approċċ ta’ crowd sourcing. Aħna nsibu li s-sistemi tal-OIE jwettqu riżultati ferm agħar fuq it-test xjentifiku milli fuq it-test enciklopediku. Aħna nipprovdu wkoll analiżi tal-iżbalji u nissuġġerixxu oqsma tax-xogħol biex jitnaqqsu l-iżbalji. Il-korpus tagħna ta’ sentenzi u sentenzi huma disponibbli.', 'no': 'Opna informasjonsekstraksjon (OIE) er oppgåva til den usikkerte opprettinga av strukturerte informasjonen frå tekst. OIE blir ofte brukt som ein startpunkt for mange nedstrekkoppgåver, inkludert kunnskapsbasekonstruksjon, relasjonsekstrahering og spørsmålssvar. Selv om OIE-metodar er målt på å vera domene uavhengig, har dei vurdere hovudsakelig på newspaper, encyclopedic or general web text. I denne artikkelen evaluerer vi effekten av OIE på vitenskapelige tekstar som kjem frå 10 forskjellige discipliner. For å gjøre det, bruker vi to kunstige OIE-systemer ved å bruka ein tilnærming av crowd sourcing. Vi finn at OIE-systemet utfører mykje verre på vitenskapelig tekst enn enkyclopeisk tekst. Vi gjev også ein feilanalyse og foreslår område i arbeidet for å redusera feil. Våre korpus av setningar og sprøyter er tilgjengeleg.', 'mn': 'Мэдээлэл нээх (OIE) нь текстээс бүтээгдсэн мэдээлэл үүсгэх ажил юм. OIE ихэвчлэн мэдлэгтэй суурь бүтээл, харилцаа гаргах, асуулт хариулт болох олон төвөгтэй ажлын эхлэл цэг болгон ашигладаг. OIE арга загвар нь зориулагдсан холбоотой тогтнолтой байхыг зориулсан ч, тэд анхны түвшинд сонин, анциклопик эсвэл ерөнхий веб текст дээр үнэлгээ өгсөн. Энэ бичлэгт бид 10 өөр салбараас гарч ирсэн шинжлэх ухааны бичлэг дээр OIE-ын үйл ажиллагааг үнэлдэг. Үүнийг хийхэд бид олон хүмүүсийн суурилуулах арга зам ашиглаж 2 урлагийн OIE системийг ашигладаг. ОIE системүүд шинжлэх ухааны текст дээр шинжлэх ухааны текст нь шинжлэх ухаанаас илүү муу байдаг. Мөн бид алдаа шинжилгээ өгч, алдаа багасгахын тулд ажлын хэсгийг санал болгож байна. Бидний өгүүлбэр, шүүмжлэх үйл ажиллагаа гаргаж байна.', 'pl': 'Otwarta ekstrakcja informacji (OIE) to zadanie nienadzorowanego tworzenia informacji ustrukturyzowanych z tekstu. OIE jest często używany jako punkt wyjścia do wielu dalszych zadań, w tym budowy bazy wiedzy, ekstrakcji relacji i odpowiedzi na pytania. Chociaż metody OIE mają być niezależne od domeny, oceniane zostały przede wszystkim na tekście gazetowym, encyklopedycznym czy ogólnym. W tym artykule oceniamy działania OIE na tekstach naukowych pochodzących z dziesięciu różnych dyscyplin. W tym celu stosujemy dwa najnowocześniejsze systemy OIE wykorzystujące podejście crowdsourcingowe. Odkrywamy, że systemy OIE działają znacznie gorzej na tekście naukowym niż tekst encyklopedyczny. Zapewniamy również analizę błędów i sugerujemy obszary pracy w celu ograniczenia błędów. Nasz korpus wyroków i orzeczeń jest udostępniony.', 'ml': '@ info OIE എപ്പോഴും തുടങ്ങുന്ന പോയിന്റായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. അറിവുകളുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനം, ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതും ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ച ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യതയായിരിക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d OIE രീതികളെ ലക്ഷ്യമാക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പത്രത്തില്\u200d, എക്സിക്ലോപെഡിക്ക ഈ ലേഖനത്തില്\u200d, 10 വ്യത്യസ്ത ശാസ്ത്രിക വാചകങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് സൃഷ്ടിക്കുന്ന ശാസ്ത്ര പദാവലികളുടെ പ്രകടനത്തെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d  അങ്ങനെ ചെയ്യാന്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ട് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഓയി സിസ്റ്റം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പ്രാധാന്യം സോര്\u200dസിങ്ങിങ്ങ് സ ശാസ്ത്ര പദാവലിയില്\u200d ശാസ്ത്രജ്ഞാനത്തിനെക്കാള്\u200d മോശമായി ഓയി സിസ്റ്റം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിക്കുന്നത് നമുക്ക് കണ തെറ്റുകള്\u200d കുറയ്ക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പിശക് അന്വേഷണം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. വിധികളും വിധികളും ഞങ്ങളുടെ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് ലഭിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'sr': 'Otvorena izvlačenja informacija (OIE) je zadatak neodređenog stvaranja strukturiranih informacija iz teksta. OIE se često koristi kao početna tačka za broj ležnih zadataka uključujući izgradnju baze znanja, izvlačenje odnosa i odgovor na pitanje. Iako su metode OIE ciljane da budu neovisne domene, oni su primarno procjenjivani na novinama, enciklopedijskim ili općem web tekstu. U ovom članku procjenjujemo izvršnost OIE-a o naučnim tekstima iz 10 različitih disciplina. Da bi to uradili, koristimo dva stanja umjetnih OIE sistema koristeći pristup crowd-sourcing. Nalazimo da OIE sistemi izvode značajno gore na znanstvenom tekstu od enciklopedičkog teksta. Takođe pružamo analizu greške i predlažemo područje rada da smanjimo greške. Naš korpus kazne i osude je dostupan.', 'so': "Ka soo saarista macluumaadka furan (OIE) waa shaqada aan la ilaalinayn abuuridda macluumaadka la dhisay ee qoraalka. OIE inta badan waxaa loo isticmaalaa goob bilowga ah hawlo badan oo webiga hoose ah, kuwaas oo ka mid ah dhismaha aasiga aqoonta, soo saarista xiriirka iyo jawaabta su'aalaha. Inta lagu talo galay qaababka OIE inay xor u ahaanayaan domain, waxaa loo qiimeynayaa ugu horeyn wargeyska, encyklopedik ama macluumaadka internetka oo dhan. Qoraalkan waxaynu qiimeynaynaa sameynta OIE oo ku saabsan qoraalka cilmiyiga ah ee ka soo dhashay 10 cilmi oo kala duduwan. Sida darteed waxaynu isticmaalnaa laba nidaam oo dowlad ah oo OIE-ka ah sida loo isticmaalo qaab kooxa. Waxaan heli nahay in nidaamka OIE ay si ka sii daran u sameeyaan qoraalka cilmiga ah oo ka sii daran qoraalka encyklopedika. Sidoo kale waxan kaloo siinaynaa baaritaanka khaladda, waxaana ka jeedinaynaa in meelaha shaqada laga koobo qaladyada. Xukummadayada iyo xukunnadayada waxaa la bixiyaa.", 'ro': 'Extragerea informațiilor deschise (OIE) este sarcina creării nesupravegheate a informațiilor structurate din text. OIE este adesea folosit ca punct de plecare pentru o serie de sarcini din aval, inclusiv construirea bazei de cunoștințe, extragerea relațiilor și răspunsul la întrebări. În timp ce metodele OIE vizează să fie independente de domenii, acestea au fost evaluate în principal pe ziare, enciclopedice sau web text general. În acest articol evaluăm performanța OIE pe texte științifice provenind din 10 discipline diferite. Pentru a face acest lucru, folosim două sisteme OIE de ultimă generație care utilizează o abordare de crowdsourcing. Considerăm că sistemele OIE funcționează semnificativ mai rău pe text științific decât pe text enciclopedic. De asemenea, oferim o analiză a erorilor și sugerăm domenii de activitate pentru reducerea erorilor. Corpusul nostru de sentințe și judecăți sunt puse la dispoziție.', 'si': 'විවෘත තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය (OIE) තමයි පාළුවෙන් නිර්මාණය කරපු තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය කරන වැඩය. OIE සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට පටන් ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට පටන් ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට භාවිතා වෙනවා දන්න අධ්\u200dයතා OIE විධානය අරමුණ වෙලා තියෙන්නේ ඩොමේන් ස්වත්වයෙන් වෙන්න, ඔවුන් ප්\u200dරධාන විධානයෙන් පුළුවන් වාර්තාවක මේ ලේඛනයේ අපි විවිධ විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරාය 10 නිසා විද්\u200dයාප්\u200dරායාත්මක පණිවිධානයේ OIE ගැන විශ්වාස කරන්නේ  ඒක කරන්න, අපි ප්\u200dරධාන OIE පද්ධතිය දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරනවා මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරධානයක් භාවිත කරන්න. අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් OIE පද්ධතියේ විද්\u200dයාත්මක පාළුවට වඩා විශ්වාසික පාළුවට වඩා වඩා නර අපි වැරදි විශ්ලේෂණයක් සහ වැරදි විශ්ලේෂණයක් සඳහා වැරදි වැරදි අඩු කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්න කරනවා. අපේ වාක්ය සහ විරුද්ධාවක් ප්\u200dරවේශ කරලා තියෙනවා.', 'sv': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) är uppgiften att utan övervakning skapa strukturerad information från text. OIE används ofta som utgångspunkt för ett antal nedströmsuppgifter, inklusive kunskapsbaskonstruktion, relationsutvinning och frågesvar. Även om OIE:s metoder är inriktade på att vara domänoberoende har de utvärderats främst på tidnings-, encyklopedisk- eller allmän webbtext. I den här artikeln utvärderar vi OIE:s resultat på vetenskapliga texter från 10 olika discipliner. För att göra det använder vi två toppmoderna OIE-system som använder en crowdsourcing-metod. Vi finner att OIE-system presterar betydligt sämre på vetenskaplig text än encyklopedisk text. Vi tillhandahåller också en felanalys och föreslår arbetsområden för att minska fel. Vår samling av domar och domar finns tillgängliga.', 'ta': 'தகவல் பிரித்தல் (OIE) உரையிலிருந்து உருவாக்கப்பட்ட தகவல் உருவாக்கப்படாத செயல் OIE தொடக்க புள்ளியாக பயன்படுத்தப்படுகிறது அறிவிப்பு அடிப்படை உருவாக்கம், தொடர்பு பெறுதல், மற்றும் கேள்வி பதில் உள்ள சில கீழ OIE முறைகள் தங்களது சுதந்திரமாக இருக்கும் போது, அவர்கள் முதன்மையாக தேதியில், சுழற்சி அல்லது பொது வலை உரையில் மதிப்பிடப்பட்டது. இந்த கட்டுரையில், நாம் 10 வேறு வித்தியாசமான வடிவமைப்புகளிலிருந்து ஆரம்பிக்கப்பட்ட அறிவியல் உரைகளின் செயல்பாட்டை  அதைச் செய்ய, நாம் இரண்டு நிலைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம் ஒரு கூட்டத்திற்கு மூல முறைமையை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். OIE அமைப்புகள் அறிவியல் உரையை விட மிகவும் மோசமாக செய்யும் என்பதை நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம். நாம் ஒரு பிழை ஆய்வு வழங்குகிறோம் மற்றும் வேலை பரப்பங்களை குறைக்க பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். எங்கள் வாக்குகள் மற்றும் விதிப்பங்கள் கொண்டுள்ளன.', 'ur': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) is the task of the unsupervised creation of structured information from text. OIE اغلبہ طور پر ایک شروع پوینٹ کے طور پر استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں ایک تعداد کے لائنٹریم ٹاکس کے لئے علم بنسٹ بنانا، ارتباط اخراج، اور سوال جواب دینے کے ساتھ۔ While OIE methods are targeted at being domain independent, they are primarily evaluated on newspaper, encyclopedic or general web text. اس مقالہ میں ہم OIE کی عملکرد کا ارزش دیتے ہیں 10 مختلف بصیرت سے نازل ہونے والی سائنس پیغام پر۔ ایسا کرنا چاہیے، ہم دو ایٹ اوی سیسٹم استعمال کرتے ہیں جماعت سورسینگ طریقے سے۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ OIE سیستموں نے سائنس پیغام سے بہت زیادہ بدتر عمل کیا ہے۔ ہم نے بھی ایک خطا تحلیل بھی پیش کیا ہے اور دنیا کے منطقه کو خطا کاٹنے کے لئے پیش کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے کلمات اور فیصلہ کے بدن موجود ہیں۔', 'uz': "@ info: status Name OIE usullari domen emas bo'lishi uchun qanday qilingan paytda, ularning newspaper, encyklopedik yoki umumiy veb matnning asosida qiymatlari mumkin. Bu maqolada biz 10 boshqa disiplar tomonidan yaratilgan ilmiy textlarning OIE bajarishni qiymatmiz. Bunday qilib, biz bir jamoatlarni boshqarish usuli bilan ikkita holatda OIE tizimdan foydalanamiz. Biz o'rganamiz, OIE tizimlari encyklopedik matnlardan eng juda qiyin ishlaydi. Biz xato analyzerni yaratamiz va ishning maydonlarini xatolarni kamaytirish talab qilamiz. Our corpus of sentences and judgments are made available.", 'vi': 'Việc khai thác thông tin (I.E) là nhiệm vụ tạo ra thông tin cấu trúc không giám sát từ văn bản. Oliver thường được dùng làm điểm khởi đầu cho một số công việc xuôi dòng bao gồm xây dựng căn cứ kiến thức, khai thác mối quan hệ, và câu hỏi trả lời. Các phương pháp của E nhằm mục đích là độc lập lãnh thổ, nhưng chúng được đánh giá đầu tiên trên các trang web toàn diện, bách khoa hay thông thường. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi đánh giá khả năng của Oliver về các văn bản khoa học xuất phát từ mười các lĩnh vực khác nhau. Để làm điều đó, chúng tôi sử dụng hai hệ thống dầu mỏ hiện đại. Chúng tôi thấy hệ thống I.E còn tệ hơn cấu trúc khoa học nhiều. Chúng tôi cũng phân tích lỗi và đề xuất các khu vực làm việc để giảm lỗi. Những hình phạt và phán quyết của chúng tôi được đưa ra.', 'bg': 'Откритото извличане на информация (OIE) е задачата на ненадзорното създаване на структурирана информация от текст. OIE често се използва като отправна точка за редица задачи надолу по веригата, включително изграждане на база от знания, извличане на връзки и отговаряне на въпроси. Докато методите на OIE са насочени към независимостта на домейна, те са оценени основно на вестници, енциклопедични или общи уеб текстове. В настоящата статия оценяваме ефективността на ОИЕ върху научни текстове, произхождащи от 10 различни дисциплини. За да направим това, ние използваме две най-съвременни системи на OIE, използвайки подход за групово снабдяване. Установяваме, че системите на OIE имат значително по-лошо представяне на научния текст, отколкото енциклопедичния текст. Също така предоставяме анализ на грешките и предлагаме области на работа за намаляване на грешките. Нашият корпус от присъди и присъди е достъпен.', 'nl': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) is de taak van het ongezien creëren van gestructureerde informatie uit tekst. OIE wordt vaak gebruikt als uitgangspunt voor een aantal downstreamtaken, waaronder kennisbasebouw, relatieontwikkeling en vragenbeantwoording. Hoewel OIE methoden gericht zijn op domeinonafhankelijk zijn, zijn ze voornamelijk geëvalueerd op kranten, encyclopedie of algemene webtekst. In dit artikel evalueren we de prestaties van OIE op wetenschappelijke teksten afkomstig uit tien verschillende disciplines. Hiervoor maken we gebruik van twee state-of-the-art OIE systemen met een crowdsourcing aanpak. We vinden dat OIE systemen significant slechter presteren op wetenschappelijke tekst dan encyclopedische tekst. We bieden ook een foutanalyse en stellen werkgebieden voor om fouten te verminderen. Ons corpus van vonnissen en vonnissen wordt ter beschikking gesteld.', 'hr': 'Otvorena izvlačenja informacija (OIE) je zadatak neodređenog stvaranja strukturiranih informacija iz teksta. OIE se često koristi kao početna točka za broj niz zadataka uključujući izgradnju baze znanja, izvlačenje odnosa i odgovor na pitanje. Iako su metode OIE ciljane na neovisnu domenu, oni su primarno procijenjeni na novinama, enciklopedijskim ili općem web tekstu. U ovom članku procjenjujemo učinkovitost OIE-a o znanstvenim tekstima iz 10 različitih disciplina. Da bi to uradili, koristimo dva stanja umjetnih OIE sustava koristeći pristup crowd-sourcing. Nalazimo da OIE sustavi izvode značajno gore na znanstvenom tekstu od enciklopedijskog teksta. Također pružamo analizu greške i predlažemo područje rada kako bi smanjili greške. Naš korpus kazne i osude je dostupan.', 'da': "Open Information Extraction (OIE) er opgaven med ikke-overvåget oprettelse af strukturerede oplysninger ud fra tekst. OIE bruges ofte som udgangspunkt for en række downstream-opgaver, herunder vidensbase opbygning, relationsudvinding og spørgsmål besvarelse. Mens OIE's metoder sigter mod at være domæneafhængige, er de primært blevet evalueret på avis, encyklopædi eller generel webtekst. I denne artikel evaluerer vi OIE's resultater på videnskabelige tekster fra 10 forskellige discipliner. For at gøre det bruger vi to state-of-the-art OIE-systemer ved hjælp af en crowd-sourcing tilgang. Vi finder ud af, at OIE-systemer fungerer betydeligt dårligere på videnskabelig tekst end på encyklopædisk tekst. Vi leverer også en fejlanalyse og foreslår arbejdsområder for at reducere fejl. Vores samling af domme og domme stilles til rådighed.", 'de': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) ist die Aufgabe der unbeaufsichtigten Erstellung strukturierter Informationen aus Text. OIE wird oft als Ausgangspunkt für eine Reihe von nachgelagerten Aufgaben verwendet, einschließlich Aufbau von Wissensdatenbank, Beziehungsextraktion und Beantwortung von Fragen. Während OIE-Methoden darauf abzielen, domänenunabhängig zu sein, wurden sie vor allem auf Zeitungs-, Enzyklopädie- oder allgemeinen Webtexten evaluiert. In diesem Artikel bewerten wir die Leistungsfähigkeit des OIE an wissenschaftlichen Texten aus zehn verschiedenen Disziplinen. Dafür setzen wir zwei hochmoderne OIE-Systeme im Crowdsourcing-Ansatz ein. Wir finden, dass OIE-Systeme bei wissenschaftlichen Texten deutlich schlechter abschneiden als enzyklopädische Texte. Wir erstellen auch eine Fehleranalyse und schlagen Arbeitsfelder vor, um Fehler zu reduzieren. Unser Korpus von Urteilen und Urteilen wird zur Verfügung gestellt.', 'fa': 'اخراج اطلاعات باز (OIE) وظیفه ایجاد ساختن اطلاعات ساخته شده از متن است. OIE اغلب به عنوان نقطه شروع برای تعدادی از کارهای پایین پایین استفاده می\u200cشود که شامل ساختن پایگاه دانش، استخراج ارتباط و پاسخ سوال است. در حالی که روش OIE به خاطر مستقل بودن دامنی هدف گرفته می\u200cشوند، آنها در اصل روی روزنامه، انکیلوپدیک یا متن وب عمومی ارزیابی می\u200cشوند. در این مقاله، ما عملکرد OIE را بر متن های علمی که از ۱۰ دسته مختلف تشکیل می دهند ارزیابی می کنیم. برای این کار، ما از دو سیستم استفاده از استفاده از یک طریق سرمایه گذاری جمعیت استفاده می کنیم. ما پیدا می\u200cکنیم که سیستم\u200cهای OIE در متن علمی بسیار بدتر از متن آنسیکلوپدیک انجام می\u200cدهند. ما همچنین یک تحلیل خطا را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و منطقه\u200cهای کار را برای کاهش خطاها پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم. جسد مجازات و قضاوت ما در دسترس هستند.', 'id': 'Open Information Extraction (OIE) is the task of the unsupervised creation of structured information from text.  OIE sering digunakan sebagai titik awal untuk beberapa tugas turun termasuk konstruksi dasar pengetahuan, ekstraksi hubungan, dan jawaban pertanyaan. Sementara metode OIE ditujukan untuk menjadi domain independen, mereka telah diuji terutama di koran, enciklopedi atau teks web umum. Dalam artikel ini, kami mengevaluasi prestasi OIE pada teks ilmiah yang berasal dari 10 disiplin yang berbeda. Untuk melakukannya, kami menggunakan dua sistem OIE terbaik menggunakan pendekatan sumber keramaian. Kami menemukan bahwa sistem OIE melakukan lebih buruk pada teks ilmiah daripada teks enciklopedik. Kami juga memberikan analisis kesalahan dan menyarankan area kerja untuk mengurangi kesalahan. Korporasi hukuman dan keputusan kita sudah tersedia.', 'tr': '[NORMAL] OIE köplenç a şak täblikler üçin bilim tabany gurluşy, baglanyşy açmak we soragy jogaplamak üçin başlangyç noktasy bolup ulanýar OIE yöntemleri domenýäsiz bolmak üçin amaçlandyrylýar, olar elbette gazete, enciklopetik ýa umumy web metinde deňlenýärler. Bu maksada, 10 dürli disiplinden başlayan OIE-niň ylmy metinlerinden çykyşyny çykýarys. Bunu yapmak üçin, toplam kaynaşma yaklaşmasını kullanan iki sanat sistemini kullanırız. OIE sistemalary enciklopedik metinden has hem erbet edip bilýäris. Biz hem hata analyzasyny berýäris we işiň bölgelerini ýalňyşlygyny azaltmak üçin maslahat berýäris. Çözümler we çözümleriň bedenimiz bar.', 'ko': '개방형 정보 추출(OIE)은 텍스트에서 구조화된 정보를 감독하지 않고 만드는 작업입니다.OIE는 일반적으로 지식 라이브러리 구축, 관계 추출 및 질문에 대한 답변 등 많은 다운스트림 작업의 시작점으로 사용됩니다.OIE 방법의 목표는 분야에 독립하는 것이지만 주로 신문, 백과사전 또는 일반 인터넷 텍스트에서 평가한다.본고에서 우리는 OIE가 10개의 서로 다른 학과에서 온 과학 텍스트에서의 표현을 평가했다.이를 위해 우리는 두 개의 가장 선진적인 OIE 시스템을 사용하고 크라우드소싱 방식을 채택했다.우리는 백과사전 텍스트에 비해 OIE 시스템이 과학 텍스트에서 훨씬 못하다는 것을 발견했다.우리는 또한 오류 분석을 제공하고 오류를 줄이는 업무 영역을 제안한다.우리의 문장과 판단 자료 라이브러리는 이미 제공되었다.', 'sw': 'Uchambuzi wa Habari Huru (OIE) ni jukumu la kutengeneza taarifa za ujenzi usiohifadhiwa kutoka kwa maandishi. OIE mara nyingi inatumika kama kituo cha mwanzo kwa kazi kadhaa za mito ya chini ikiwa ni pamoja na ujenzi wa msingi wa maarifa, utekelezaji wa mahusiano na majibu ya maswali. Wakati mbinu za OIE zinalengwa kuwa huru wa ndani, zimekuwa zikitambuliwa kwa kiasi kikubwa kwenye gazeti, encyclopedic au ujumla wa mtandao wa intaneti. Katika makala hii, tunatathmini utendaji wa OIE kuhusu ujumbe wa kisayansi ulioanzishwa kutoka disipuni 10 tofauti. Ili kufanya hivyo, tunatumia mifumo miwili ya hali ya sanaa ya OIE kwa kutumia mbinu za vyanzo vya umma. Tunapata kwamba mifumo ya OIE inafanya vibaya zaidi kwenye ujumbe wa kisayansi kuliko ujumbe wa utambulisho. Pia tunatoa uchambuzi wa makosa na tunapendekeza maeneo ya kazi kupunguza makosa. Makosa yetu ya hukumu na maamuzi yanapatikana.', 'af': "Open Informasie Uitpakking (OIE) is die taak van die ongeondersteunde skep van struktureerde inligting van teks. OIE word dikwels gebruik as 'n begin punt vir' n aantal onderstreem taak insluitend kennis basis konstruksie, verwanting uitpakking en vraag antwoord. Alhoewel OIE metodes ontvang word om domein onafhanklike te wees, is hulle eerste geevalueer op koerant, enkyclopediese of algemene web teks. In hierdie artikel, ons evalueer die effektuur van OIE op wetenskaplike teks wat van 10 verskillende dissipels uitgevoer word. Om dit te doen, gebruik ons twee staat van die kunste OIE stelsels met 'n skare-sourcing toegang. Ons vind dat OIE stelsels betekeurig verder uitvoer op wetenskaplike teks as enkyclopeediese teks. Ons verskaf ook 'n fout analiseer en voorstel gebiede van werk om foute te verminder. Ons korpus van setinge en verordeninge is beskikbaar.", 'sq': 'Zgjidhja e Informacionit të Hapur (OIE) është detyra e krijimit të pa mbikqyrur të informacionit të strukturuar nga teksti. OIE shpesh përdoret si pikë fillimi për një numër detyrash poshtë rrjedhës duke përfshirë ndërtimin e bazës së njohurive, nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve dhe përgjigjen e pyetjeve. Ndërsa metodat e OIE synojnë të jenë të pavarura në domeni, ato janë vlerësuar kryesisht në gazetë, enciklopedikë apo tekst të përgjithshëm në internet. Në këtë artikull, ne vlerësojmë performancën e OIE-së mbi tekstet shkencore që kanë origjinë nga 10 disiplina të ndryshme. Për ta bërë këtë, ne përdorim dy sisteme OIE-së më të moderne duke përdorur një qasje crowd sourcing. Ne zbulojmë se sistemi i OIE-së punon më keq në tekstin shkencor se teksti enciklopedik. Ne gjithashtu ofrojmë një analizë gabimesh dhe sugjerojmë fusha të punës për të reduktuar gabimet. Our corpus of sentences and judgments are made available.', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s OIE ብዙ ጊዜ የውይይት መሠረት፣ የግንኙነት ውጤት እና የጥያቄ መልስ እንዲሆን ለመጀመሪያ ነጥብ ይጠቀማል፡፡ የOIE ዘዴዎች ነፃ ሆኖ ሲሆን፣ በመጀመሪያ ገጽ፣ encyclopedic ወይም የጠቅላላ ድረ ገጽ ጽሑፍ ተረጋገጠ፡፡ በዚህ ጽሑፍ፣ የOIE ስርዓት ከ10 ልዩ ጥምቀት የደረሰውን የሳይንቀሳዊ ጽሑፎችን እናስተውላለን፡፡ እንደዚህ እናደርጋለን፣ ሁለት የሆኑት የኦআই-አካባቢ ሥርዓት እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የOIE ስርዓቶች በሳይንቀሳዊ ጽሑፍ ላይ ከኢንስክሎፕዩክ ጽሑፍ ይልቅ በጣም የከፋ እንደሆነ እናገኛለን፡፡ We also provide an error analysis and suggest areas of work to reduce errors.  የፍርድ እና ፍርድ ቁጥር የተገኘ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাকশন (OIE) টেক্সট থেকে সংরক্ষিত তথ্য সৃষ্টি করার কাজ। প্রায়শই ব্যবহার করা হয় বেশ কয়েকটি নিচে নদীর কাজের জন্য, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে জ্ঞানের ভেস নির্মাণ, সম্পর্ক বের করা এবং প্রশ্নের উত্তর যদিও ওআইE পদ্ধতি ডোমেইনের স্বাধীন হওয়ার লক্ষ্য নেয়া হয়, তাদের প্রধান সংবাদপত্র, এনসাইক্লোপেডিক অথবা সাধারণ ওয়েব টেক্সটে মূল্ এই প্রবন্ধটিতে আমরা বৈজ্ঞানিক লেখার প্রভাবের মূল্যায়ন করি যা ১০ বিভিন্ন শিক্ষার্থী থেকে তৈরি হয়েছে। তাই করার জন্য আমরা দুই রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের দুটি সিস্টেম ব্যবহার করি জনসোর্সিং প্রতিক্রিয়া ব্যবহার করে। আমরা খুঁজে পাচ্ছি যে অআইE সিস্টেম এনসাইক্লোপেডিক টেক্সটের চেয়ে বিজ্ঞানিক লেখায় খুব খারাপ করে। আমরা একটি ভুল বিশ্লেষণ প্রদান করি এবং কাজের ক্ষেত্রে ভুল কমানোর পরামর্শ দেই। আমাদের শাস্তি এবং বিচারের কোর্পাস পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'hy': 'Բաց տեղեկատվության արտահանումն է տեքստից կառուցված տեղեկատվության առանց վերահսկման ստեղծման խնդիրը: Այն հաճախ օգտագործվում է որպես սկզբնական կետ մի շարք հետագա խնդիրների համար, ներառյալ գիտելիքի հիմքի կառուցվածքը, հարաբերությունների վերացումը և հարցերի պատասխանը: Մինչդեռ ԱՄՆ-ի մեթոդները նշանակում են լինել անկախ բնագավառի, դրանք հիմնականում գնահատվել են թերթերի, հանրագիտարանի կամ ընդհանուր վեբ տեքստի վրա: Այս հոդվածի մեջ մենք գնահատում ենք ՄԱԿ-ի գիտական տեքստների արդյունքը 10 տարբեր ոլորտներից: Այսպիսով, մենք օգտագործում ենք երկու նորագույն համակարգ, որոնք օգտագործում են ժողովրդի կազմակերպման մոտեցում: We find that OIE systems perform significantly worse on scientific text than encyclopedic text.  Մենք նաև կատարում ենք սխալների վերլուծություն և առաջարկում ենք սխալների նվազեցնելու աշխատանքային ոլորտներ: Մեր նախադասությունների և դատաստանների մարմինը հասանելի է:', 'az': 'Açıq Malümatı Açırma (OIE) mətndən yapılmış məlumatın yaratmasının vəsiyyətidir. OIE çox zaman bilgi bazı inşalları, əlaqələr çıxarılması və sual cavab vermək üçün bir neçə a şağı iş üçün başlanğıç noktası olaraq istifadə edilir. OIE metodları domena bağımsız olmağa məcburiyyət edildikdə, onlar əslində gazetdə, enciklopedikdə və ya genel web mətndə değerlendirildilər. Bu məlumatda, 10 müxtəlif disciplindən gələn elmi məlumatların OIE performansını değerləşdiririk. Bəlkə, qövmünün istifadəsi ilə iki sanat OIE sistemini istifadə edirik. Biz OIE sistemlərinin enciklopedik metindən daha pis məlumatlarını görürük. Biz də xəta analizi təmin edirik və xətaları azaltmaq üçün işin bölgelerini təklif edirik. Bizim cümlələrimiz və hökmlərimiz mümkün deyildir.', 'bs': 'Otvorena izvlačenja informacija (OIE) je zadatak neodređenog stvaranja strukturiranih informacija iz teksta. OIE se često koristi kao početna tačka za broj ležnih zadataka uključujući izgradnju baze znanja, izvlačenje odnosa i odgovor na pitanje. Iako su metode OIE ciljane na neovisnu domenu, oni su primarno procjenjeni na novinama, enciklopedijskim ili općem web tekstu. U ovom članku procjenjujemo učinku OIE-a o naučnim tekstima iz 10 različitih disciplina. Da bi to uradili, koristimo dva stanja umjetnih OIE sustava koristeći pristup crowd-sourcing. Nalazimo da OIE sistemi izvode značajno gore na naučnom tekstu nego na enciklopedijskom tekstu. Također pružamo analizu greške i predlažemo područje rada da smanjimo greške. Naš korpus kazne i osude je dostupan.', 'ca': "L'extracció d'informació oberta (OIE) és la tasca de crear informació estructurada sense supervisió a partir del text. OIE is often used as a starting point for a number of downstream tasks including knowledge base construction, relation extraction, and question answering.  Mentre els mètodes de l'OIE estan dirigits a ser independents de dominis, s'han evaluat principalment en diaris, enciclopèdics o textos web generals. En aquest article, evaluem el rendiment de l'OIE en textos científics originaris de 10 disciplines diferents. Per fer-ho, fem servir dos sistemes més moderns de l'OIE fent servir un enfocament de crowd sourcing. Trobem que els sistemes de l'OIE actuen molt pitjor en text científic que en text enciclopèdic. També proporcionem una an àlisi d'errors i suggerem àrees de treball per reduir els errors. El nostre cos de frases i judicis està disponible.", 'cs': 'Otevřená extrakce informací (OIE) je úkolem bez dohledu vytvářet strukturované informace z textu. OIE se často používá jako výchozí bod pro řadu následných úkolů, včetně konstrukce znalostní báze, extrakce vztahů a zodpovězení otázek. Zatímco metody OIE jsou zaměřeny na doménovou nezávislost, byly hodnoceny především na novinových, encyklopedických nebo obecných webových textech. V tomto článku hodnotíme výkonnost OIE na vědeckých textech pocházejících z deseti různých disciplín. K tomu používáme dva nejmodernější OIE systémy využívající crowdsourcingový přístup. Zjišťujeme, že OIE systémy mají na vědeckém textu výrazně horší výkon než encyklopedický text. Poskytujeme také analýzu chyb a navrhujeme oblasti práce pro snížení chyb. Náš soubor trestů a rozsudků je zpřístupněn.', 'fi': 'Avoimen tiedonhaun (OIE) tehtävänä on luoda strukturoitua tietoa tekstistä valvomattomasti. OIE:ta käytetään usein lähtökohdaksi useissa jatkojalostustehtävissä, kuten tietopohjan rakentamisessa, suhteiden poimimisessa ja kysymyksiin vastaamisessa. OIE:n menetelmillä pyritään olemaan verkkotunnuksista riippumattomia, mutta niitä on arvioitu ensisijaisesti sanomalehtien, tietosanakirjojen tai yleisten web-tekstien perusteella. Tässä artikkelissa arvioimme OIE:n suorituskykyä 10 eri tieteenalan tieteellisissä teksteissä. Tätä varten käytämme kahta huippuluokan OIE-järjestelmää, jotka hyödyntävät joukkohankintaa. Mielestämme OIE:n järjestelmät toimivat tieteellisessä tekstissä huomattavasti huonommin kuin tietosanakirja. Tarjoamme myös virheanalyysin ja ehdotamme työmahdollisuuksia virheiden vähentämiseksi. Tuomiot ja tuomiot ovat saatavilla.', 'et': 'Avatud teabe väljavõtmine (OIE) on struktureeritud teabe järelevalveta loomise ülesanne tekstist. OIE-d kasutatakse sageli lähtepunktina mitmete järgmise etapi ülesannete jaoks, sealhulgas teadmistebaasi ehitamise, seoste väljavõtmise ja küsimustele vastamise korral. Kuigi OIE meetodid on suunatud domeenisõltumatuks olemisele, on neid hinnatud peamiselt ajalehe, entsüklopeedia või üldise veebiteksti põhjal. Käesolevas artiklis hindame OIE tulemuslikkust kümnest erinevast valdkonnast pärit teaduslike tekstide puhul. Selleks kasutame kahte tipptasemel OIE süsteemi, mis kasutavad ühishankimise lähenemisviisi. Leiame, et OIE süsteemid toimivad teadusliku teksti puhul oluliselt halvemini kui entsüklopeediline tekst. Pakume ka veaanalüüsi ja soovitame töövaldkondi vigade vähendamiseks. Meie karistuste ja kohtuotsuste korpus on kättesaadav.', 'jv': "MIME type description (MIME type) OIR often use as a start point for a number of downtream tasks Mungkin akses OIR ditambah cilik, sampeyan sampeyan domain seneng dipunangkamus, dhewe biasane supaya perintah, ancyclopedic karo teks web. Nang artikl iki, kita deweksul kanggo ngerasakno OIR tentang sak dadi sing sampeyan 10 Dayra wis dipoleh, kita gambar sistem iki-iki 'OSE' ganteng dadi wis diangkat oleh bantêr. Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih sistem OI sak sumulapakan langgar luwih-luwih kanggo teks sing bisa basa sing gagal. Awakdhéwé nganggo cara-cara kanggo nggawe barang nggawe gerakan kanggo nggawe eror. Bocah-bocah sing menehi awak dhéwé kanggo didasal lan ijol-ijol sing ngewehke boten.", 'sk': 'Odprto pridobivanje informacij (OIE) je naloga nenadzorovanega ustvarjanja strukturiranih informacij iz besedila. OIE se pogosto uporablja kot izhodišče za številne nadaljnje naloge, vključno z gradnjo baze znanja, pridobivanjem odnosov in odgovarjanjem na vprašanja. Medtem ko so metode OIE usmerjene v neodvisnost domene, so bile ocenjene predvsem na časopisnih, enciklopedijskih ali splošnih spletnih besedilih. V tem članku ocenjujemo uspešnost OIE na znanstvenih besedilih, ki izhajajo iz 10 različnih disciplin. Za to uporabljamo dva najsodobnejša sistema OIE, ki uporabljajo pristop množičnega vira. Ugotavljamo, da sistemi OIE delujejo bistveno slabše na znanstvenem besedilu kot enciklopedijskem besedilu. Zagotavljamo tudi analizo napak in predlagamo področja dela za zmanjšanje napak. Na voljo je naš korpus kazni in sodb.', 'he': 'הוצאת מידע פתוח (OIE) היא המשימה של יצירת מידע מובנה מבטקסט ללא השגחה. OIE משתמש לעתים קרובות כנקודת התחלה למספר משימות מתחתיות כולל בניית בסיס הידע, חיפוש מערכות יחסים, ומעניין שאלות. בעוד שיטות OIE מתכוונות להיות עצמאות בתחום, הם הוערכו בעיקר על עיתון, אנציקלופדית או טקסט אינטרנט כללי. במאמר הזה, אנו מעריכים את ההופעה של OIE על טקסטים מדעיים המקורים מ-10 משמעות שונות. כדי לעשות את זה, אנו משתמשים בשני מערכות OIE מצוינות באמצעות גישה למקורות קהל. אנחנו מוצאים שמערכות OIE מבצעות יותר גרועות משמעותית בטקסט מדעי מאשר טקסט אנציקלופדי. אנחנו גם מספקים ניתוח שגיאות ומצייעים אזורים של עבודה כדי להפחית שגיאות. קורפוס המשפטים והשפטים שלנו הופכים פנויים.', 'ha': "@ action: button Ana amfani da OIU ko da yawa kamar wata pointi mai fara wa wasu taskõki na ƙarƙashin ruwa, kamar mazaɓa na zance, zaɓen masu hushi da kuma masu tambaya. A lokacin da za'a zartar da shiryoyin OIU zuwa a zama masu tsayar da ɗamfyuta, to, an ƙaddara su mainlin rubutun, an kasa ciklopedik ko rubutun bango. A cikin wannan makala, Munã ƙaddara aikin OIU a kan takardar littãfin da aka fara daga wasu disiplin 10 dabam. To, don haka, Munã yi amfani da wasu na'ura biyu na-halin da aka sanar da OIU da wani matsayi na mutane. We find that OIE systems perform significantly worse on scientific text than encyclopedic text.  Kayya, Munã samar da wani anayyar ɓata kuma Muke shauri masu aiki da za su ƙara ɓata. Ana iya kammala cire da gareta.", 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་བཟོས་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁ་ཕྱེ་བ(OIE)ནི་ཡིག་གེ་ལས་བཟོ་བཀོད་མེད་པའི་བྱ་འགུལ་རེད། OIE འདི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ནི་མགོ་འཇུག་སའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་གྲངས་ཀ་ལས་འགོ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཤེས་གཞི་བཟོ་བརྩིས་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་སྐྱེས་ར OIE metodes are targeted at being domain independent, they have been evaluated primarily on paper, encyclopedic or general web text. ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་བྱས་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་འཇུག འདི་ལྟར་བྱས་ན། ང་ཚོས་མང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་རྩལ་བའི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཉིས་བེད་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་OIE་མ་ལག་གིས་སྦྱོར་དབྱིབས་ཡིག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དུ་འཕགས་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་གནད་དོན་ཕྱི་ཁམས་ཀྱི་སྟོན་བཤད་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོའི་ཚུར་བུའི་ཡིག་ཚང་དང་སྒྲིག་ཆེན་དག་སྤྲད་ཐུབ་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Simple Algorithms For Sentiment Analysis On Sentiment Rich, Data Poor Domains.', 'ar': 'خوارزميات بسيطة لتحليل المشاعر في المجالات الغنية بالبيانات والمشاعر الفقيرة.', 'fr': "Algorithmes simples pour l'analyse des sentiments sur les domaines riches en sentiments et pauvres en données", 'es': 'Algoritmos simples para el análisis de sentimientos en dominios ricos en sentimientos y pobres en datos.', 'pt': 'Algoritmos simples para análise de sentimentos em domínios ricos em sentimentos e pobres em dados.', 'ja': 'Sentiment Analysis On Sentiment Rich, Data Poor Domainsのシンプルなアルゴリズム。', 'zh': '用于情绪丰裕、数据差域。', 'hi': 'भावना रिच, डेटा गरीब डोमेन पर भावना विश्लेषण के लिए सरल एल्गोरिदम.', 'ru': 'Простые алгоритмы для анализа сентиментальности на богатых сентиментами, плохих доменах данных.', 'ga': 'Algartam Simplí Le hAghaidh Anailísiú Mothúcháin Ar Fhearainn atá Saibhir sa Mheint, agus go bhfuil Droch Sonraí acu.', 'ka': 'ვეთნჟრგვნთ ალდჲპთრმთ ჱა ანალთჱთწ ჱა ჟყნრთმვნრ ჱა ბჲდარა ნა ჟყნრთმვნრ.', 'el': 'Απλοί αλγόριθμοι για ανάλυση συναισθημάτων σε πλούσιους, φτωχούς τομείς συναισθημάτων.', 'hu': 'Egyszerű algoritmusok az érzelmek elemzéséhez az érzelmekben gazdag, adatszegény tartományokon.', 'it': "Algoritmi semplici per l'analisi dei sentimenti su domini ricchi di sentimenti e dati poveri.", 'kk': 'Sentiment Rich, Деректер күш домендерінде Sentiment анализ үшін қарапайым алгоритмдар.', 'mk': 'Simple Algorithms For Sentiment Analysis On Sentiment Rich, Data Poor Domains.', 'ml': 'സെന്റിമെന്റ് റിച്ചില്\u200d, ഡേറ്റാ പാവപ്പെട്ട ഡോമെന്\u200dസിനുള്ള സെന്റ് അലഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d', 'mt': 'Algoritmi sempliċi għall-Analiżi tas-Sentiment dwar oqsma fqira ta’ Sentiment Rich, Data Poor.', 'ms': 'Algoritma Mudah untuk Analisi Sentimen Pada Sentiment Rich, Data Domain Miskin.', 'mn': 'Sentiment Rich, Data Poor Domains-ийн Sentiment Analysis for Simple Algorithms.', 'pl': 'Proste algorytmy do analizy sentymentów w domenach bogatych w sentymenty, słabych danych.', 'no': 'Enkelte algoritme for sentralanalyser på sentrale rikt, datapåra domene.', 'ro': 'Algoritmi simpli pentru analiza sentimentelor pe domenii bogate în sentimente, date slabe.', 'sr': 'Jednostavni algoritmi za analizu sentimenta o bogatstvu sentimenta, podacima siromašnih domena.', 'so': 'Algorithms fudud For Sentiment Analysis on Sentiment Rich, Data poor Domains.', 'lt': 'Paprasti jautrumo analizės algoritmai, susiję su jautrumo turtingu, duomenų neturtingu sritimi.', 'sv': 'Enkla algoritmer för känsloanalys på känslorika, data dåliga domäner.', 'ur': 'Sentiment Rich، Data Poor Domains کے لئے ساده الگوریتم.', 'ta': 'உணர்வு நேரம் செலுத்தும் போது சுலபமான அல்gorithms, தரவு ஏழை தளங்கள்.', 'si': '喾冟窂喽膏窂喽编穵鈥嵿逗 喽囙督喾娻稖喾澿痘喾掄董喽膏穵', 'uz': 'Sentiment Analysis uchun oddiy algorithm', 'vi': 'Đơn giản Algorithms for Senloạn analysis on... stiloạn Rich, Data Poor Dome.', 'hr': 'Jednostavni algoritmi za analizu sentimenta o bogatstvu sentimenta, podaci siromašnih domena.', 'de': 'Einfache Algorithmen zur Sentiment Analyse auf sentimentreichen, datenarmen Domains.', 'nl': 'Eenvoudige algoritmen voor sentimentanalyse op sentimentrijke, data arme domeinen.', 'da': 'Enkle algoritmer til følelsesanalyse på følelsesrige, data dårlige domæner.', 'ko': '정서가 풍부하고 데이터가 부족한 분야에서 정서 분석을 하는 간단한 알고리즘.', 'fa': 'الگوریتم\u200cهای ساده برای تحلیل مجموعه\u200cای روی ثروتمندی، دامنهای فقیر داده\u200cها.', 'bg': 'Прости алгоритми за анализ на сентименти върху богати на сентименти домейни, бедни с данни.', 'tr': 'Sentiment Zenginden sorumlu analizi için basit Algoritmalar, Veri Zavallı alanlar.', 'af': 'Eenvoudige algoritme vir Sentiment Analysis op Sentiment Rich, Data Poor Domeine.', 'id': 'Algoritma sederhana untuk Analisi Sentiment pada Sentiment Rich, Data Domain Miskin.', 'sq': 'Algoritmet e thjeshta për analizën e ndjenjave në domenat e pasura të ndjenjave, të dhënave të varfëra.', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Պարզ ալգորիթմներ զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար զգացմունքների հարուստ, տվյալների աղքատ դաշտերի համար:', 'bs': 'Jednostavni algoritmi za analizu sentimenta o bogatstvu sentimenta, podaci siromašnih domena.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe rahisi wa Uchambuzi wa Wakati wa Tajiri, Watu Maskini wa Data.', 'cs': 'Jednoduché algoritmy pro analýzu sentimentů na sentiment bohaté, data chudé domény.', 'az': 'Sentiment Zenginlərin Sentiment Analizi üçün Basit Algoritlər, Data Poor Domains.', 'bn': 'সেন্টাইমেন্ট সম্পদে সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য সাধারণ অ্যালগরিদম, ডাটা দরিদ্র ডোমেন।', 'et': 'Lihtsad algoritmid sentiment analüüsi jaoks sentiment rikas, andmed puudulikud domeenid.', 'fi': 'Yksinkertaiset algoritmit tunteiden analysointiin Tunnerikkaista, Data Huono verkkotunnuksista.', 'ca': 'Simple Algorithms For Sentiment Analysis On Sentiment Rich, Data Poor Domains.', 'jv': 'Simple Algorithms For Sentiment Resolution', 'he': 'אלגוריתמים פשוטים לניתוח רגשות על תחושה עשירה, תחומות מסכנות נתונים.', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Preprosti algoritmi za analizo čustva na čustva bogatih, podatkovnih slabih domenah.', 'bo': 'Sentiment Analysis On Sentiment Rich, Data Poor Domains.'}
{'en': 'Standard word embedding algorithms learn vector representations from large corpora of text documents in an unsupervised fashion. However, the quality of word embeddings learned from these algorithms is affected by the size of training data sets. Thus, applications of these algorithms in domains with only moderate amounts of available data is limited. In this paper we introduce an algorithm that learns word embeddings jointly with a classifier. Our algorithm is called SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA leverages document label information to learn vector representations of words from a modest corpus of text documents by solving an optimization problem that minimizes a cost function with respect to both word embeddings and the weight vector used for classification. Experiments on several real world data sets show that SWESA has superior performance on domains with limited data, when compared to previously suggested approaches to word embeddings and sentiment analysis tasks.', 'ar': 'تتعلم خوارزميات تضمين الكلمات القياسية تمثيلات المتجهات من مجموعات كبيرة من المستندات النصية بطريقة غير خاضعة للإشراف. ومع ذلك ، فإن جودة الكلمات التي تم تعلمها من هذه الخوارزميات تتأثر بحجم مجموعات بيانات التدريب. وبالتالي ، فإن تطبيقات هذه الخوارزميات في المجالات ذات الكميات المعتدلة من البيانات المتاحة محدودة. في هذا البحث ، نقدم خوارزمية تتعلم زخارف الكلمات بالاشتراك مع المصنف. تسمى الخوارزمية الخاصة بنا SWESA (تضمين الكلمة الخاضعة للإشراف لتحليل المشاعر). تستفيد SWESA من معلومات ملصق المستند لتعلم تمثيلات متجهية للكلمات من مجموعة متواضعة من المستندات النصية عن طريق حل مشكلة تحسين تقلل من دالة التكلفة فيما يتعلق بكل من تضمين الكلمات ومتجه الوزن المستخدم في التصنيف. تُظهر التجارب على العديد من مجموعات بيانات العالم الحقيقي أن SWESA تتمتع بأداء فائق في المجالات ذات البيانات المحدودة ، عند مقارنتها بالأساليب المقترحة سابقًا لتضمين الكلمات ومهام تحليل المشاعر.', 'pt': 'Algoritmos de incorporação de palavras padrão aprendem representações vetoriais de grandes corpora de documentos de texto de forma não supervisionada. No entanto, a qualidade das incorporações de palavras aprendidas com esses algoritmos é afetada pelo tamanho dos conjuntos de dados de treinamento. Assim, as aplicações desses algoritmos em domínios com apenas quantidades moderadas de dados disponíveis são limitadas. Neste artigo, apresentamos um algoritmo que aprende a incorporação de palavras em conjunto com um classificador. Nosso algoritmo é chamado SWESA (Supervisioned Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). A SWESA aproveita as informações de rótulos de documentos para aprender representações vetoriais de palavras a partir de um modesto corpus de documentos de texto, resolvendo um problema de otimização que minimiza uma função de custo em relação às incorporações de palavras e ao vetor de peso usado para classificação. Experimentos em vários conjuntos de dados do mundo real mostram que a SWESA tem desempenho superior em domínios com dados limitados, quando comparado a abordagens sugeridas anteriormente para embeddings de palavras e tarefas de análise de sentimentos.', 'es': 'Los algoritmos de incrustación de palabras estándar aprenden representaciones vectoriales de grandes cuerpos de documentos de texto sin supervisión. Sin embargo, la calidad de las incrustaciones de palabras aprendidas de estos algoritmos se ve afectada por el tamaño de los conjuntos de datos de entrenamiento. Por lo tanto, las aplicaciones de estos algoritmos en dominios con solo cantidades moderadas de datos disponibles son limitadas. En este artículo presentamos un algoritmo que aprende la incrustación de palabras junto con un clasificador. Nuestro algoritmo se llama SWESA (incrustaciones de palabras supervisadas para el análisis de sentimientos). SWESA aprovecha la información de las etiquetas de los documentos para aprender representaciones vectoriales de palabras de un modesto corpus de documentos de texto al resolver un problema de optimización que minimiza una función de coste con respecto a la incrustación de palabras y al vector de peso utilizado para la clasificación. Los experimentos en varios conjuntos de datos del mundo real muestran que SWESA tiene un rendimiento superior en dominios con datos limitados, en comparación con los enfoques sugeridos anteriormente para las tareas de incrustación de palabras y análisis de opinión.', 'fr': "Les algorithmes d'intégration de mots standard apprennent les représentations vectorielles à partir de grands corpus de documents texte de manière non supervisée. Cependant, la qualité des intégrations de mots apprises à partir de ces algorithmes est affectée par la taille des ensembles de données d'apprentissage. Ainsi, les applications de ces algorithmes dans des domaines où seules des quantités modérées de données disponibles sont limitées. Dans cet article, nous présentons un algorithme qui apprend les intégrations de mots conjointement avec un classificateur. Notre algorithme s'appelle SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA exploite les informations d'étiquette de document pour apprendre les représentations vectorielles de mots à partir d'un petit corpus de documents texte en résolvant un problème d'optimisation qui minimise une fonction de coût en ce qui concerne à la fois les incorporations de mots et le vecteur de pondération utilisé pour la classification. Des expériences sur plusieurs ensembles de données réelles montrent que SWESA présente des performances supérieures sur les domaines avec des données limitées, par rapport aux approches suggérées précédemment pour l'intégration de mots et les tâches d'analyse des sentiments.", 'ja': '標準的な単語埋め込みアルゴリズムは、監督されていない方法で、大量のテキストドキュメントからベクトル表現を学習します。 しかし、これらのアルゴリズムから学んだ単語埋め込みの品質は、トレーニングデータセットのサイズによって影響を受ける。 したがって、利用可能なデータの中程度の量しかないドメインにおけるこれらのアルゴリズムの適用は限定される。 この論文では、分類子と共同で単語埋め込みを学習するアルゴリズムを紹介する。 私たちのアルゴリズムはSWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis)と呼ばれています。 SWESAは、文書ラベル情報を活用して、単語埋め込みと分類に使用される重みベクトルの両方に関するコスト関数を最小限に抑える最適化問題を解決することによって、控えめなテキスト文書のコーパスから単語のベクトル表現を学習する。 いくつかの現実世界のデータセットの実験では、SWESAは、単語埋め込みやセンチメント分析タスクに対する以前に提案されたアプローチと比較して、データが限られたドメインで優れたパフォーマンスを持っていることが示されています。', 'zh': '准词嵌算法以无监督之法档语料库学矢量示。 然从此算法中学者,受练数集大小。 故此数在於量中者,用有限也。 本文中,我们介了一种与分类器一起学习词算。 吾算法谓之SWESA(情析者监督式词嵌)。 SWESA 因文档标信,以决优化事,从度档库中学单词矢量为文,其优化最大者减其嵌嵌、权重矢量相关者函数。 数真实世界之实验,比之前言,SWESA有限之域。', 'hi': 'मानक शब्द एम्बेडिंग एल्गोरिदम एक असुरक्षित फैशन में पाठ दस्तावेजों के बड़े कॉर्पोरेट से वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखते हैं। हालांकि, इन एल्गोरिदम से सीखे गए शब्द एम्बेडिंग की गुणवत्ता प्रशिक्षण डेटा सेट के आकार से प्रभावित होती है। इस प्रकार, उपलब्ध डेटा की केवल मध्यम मात्रा के साथ डोमेन में इन एल्गोरिदम के अनुप्रयोग सीमित हैं। इस पेपर में हम एक एल्गोरिथ्म पेश करते हैं जो एक क्लासिफायर के साथ संयुक्त रूप से शब्द एम्बेडिंग सीखता है। हमारे एल्गोरिथ्म को SWESA (भावना विश्लेषण के लिए पर्यवेक्षित वर्ड एम्बेडिंग) कहा जाता है। SWESA एक अनुकूलन समस्या को हल करके पाठ दस्तावेज़ों के एक मामूली कॉर्पस से शब्दों के वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने के लिए दस्तावेज़ लेबल जानकारी का लाभ उठाता है जो शब्द एम्बेडिंग और वर्गीकरण के लिए उपयोग किए जाने वाले वजन वेक्टर दोनों के संबंध में लागत फ़ंक्शन को कम करता है। कई वास्तविक दुनिया डेटा सेट पर प्रयोगों से पता चलता है कि SWESA का सीमित डेटा वाले डोमेन पर बेहतर प्रदर्शन है, जब शब्द एम्बेडिंग और भावना विश्लेषण कार्यों के लिए पहले सुझाए गए दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना में।', 'ru': 'Стандартные алгоритмы встраивания слов изучают векторные представления из больших корпусов текстовых документов в неконтролируемой манере. Однако на качество вложений слов, извлеченных из этих алгоритмов, влияет размер наборов обучающих данных. Таким образом, применение этих алгоритмов в доменах с ограниченным объемом доступных данных ограничено. В этой статье мы вводим алгоритм, который изучает вложения слов совместно с классификатором. Наш алгоритм называется SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA использует информацию о метках документов для изучения векторных представлений слов из скромного корпуса текстовых документов путем решения задачи оптимизации, которая сводит к минимуму функцию стоимости в отношении как вложений слов, так и вектора веса, используемого для классификации. Эксперименты с несколькими наборами данных реального мира показывают, что SWESA имеет превосходную производительность в доменах с ограниченными данными по сравнению с ранее предложенными подходами к встраиванию слов и задачами анализа настроений.', 'ga': 'Foghlaimíonn gnáth-halgartaim leabú focal léirithe veicteoirí ó chorpra mór doiciméad téacs ar bhealach gan mhaoirseacht. Mar sin féin, cuireann méid na dtacar sonraí oiliúna isteach ar cháilíocht an leabú focal a fhoghlaimítear ó na halgartaim seo. Mar sin, tá teorainn le feidhmiú na n-algartam seo i bhfearainn nach bhfuil ach méideanna measartha de shonraí ar fáil iontu. Sa pháipéar seo tugaimid isteach algartam a fhoghlaimíonn leabaithe focal i gcomhpháirt le haicmitheoir. Tugtar SWESA (Leabaithe Focal Maoirsithe le haghaidh Anailís Mothúcháin) ar ár n-algartam. Déanann SWESA faisnéis ar lipéad doiciméad a ghiaráil chun léiriúcháin veicteoirí de fhocail ó chorpas measartha de dhoiciméid téacs a fhoghlaim trí fhadhb bharrfheabhsaithe a réiteach a íoslaghdaíonn feidhm chostais maidir le neadú focal agus an veicteoir meáchain a úsáidtear don rangú. Léiríonn turgnaimh ar roinnt tacair sonraí ón saol fíor go bhfuil feidhmíocht níos fearr ag SWESA ar fhearainn le sonraí teoranta, i gcomparáid leis na cineálacha cur chuige a moladh roimhe seo maidir le leabú focal agus tascanna anailíse meon.', 'hu': 'A szabványos szóbeágyazási algoritmusok felügyelet nélkül tanulnak vektorreprezentációkat a szöveges dokumentumok nagy tömegeiből. Az ezekből az algoritmusokból tanult szóbeágyazások minőségét azonban befolyásolja a képzési adatkészletek mérete. Ezért ezeknek az algoritmusoknak az alkalmazása csak mérsékelt mennyiségű adatot tartalmazó tartományokban korlátozott. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatunk egy algoritmust, amely egy osztályozóval közösen tanulja meg a szóbeágyazásokat. Algoritmusunkat SWESA (Felügyelt Szóbeágyazások az érzelmek elemzéséhez). A SWESA felhasználja a dokumentumcímke információit, hogy megtanulja a szavak vektoros ábrázolását egy szerény szöveges dokumentumok korpuszából, olyan optimalizálási problémával, amely minimalizálja a költségfüggvényt mind a szóbeágyazások, mind a besoroláshoz használt súlyvektor tekintetében. Több valós adatkészleten végzett kísérletek azt mutatják, hogy a SWESA kiváló teljesítménnyel rendelkezik a korlátozott adatokkal rendelkező tartományokon, összehasonlítva a korábban javasolt megközelítésekkel a szóbeágyazásokra és az érzelmek elemzésére.', 'el': 'Οι τυποποιημένοι αλγόριθμοι ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων μαθαίνουν διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις από μεγάλα σώματα εγγράφων κειμένου χωρίς επίβλεψη. Ωστόσο, η ποιότητα των ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων που μαθαίνονται από αυτούς τους αλγόριθμους επηρεάζεται από το μέγεθος των συνόλων δεδομένων κατάρτισης. Έτσι, οι εφαρμογές αυτών των αλγορίθμων σε τομείς με μόνο μέτρια ποσά διαθέσιμων δεδομένων είναι περιορισμένες. Στην παρούσα εργασία εισάγουμε έναν αλγόριθμο που μαθαίνει ενσωμάτωση λέξεων από κοινού με έναν ταξινομητή. Ο αλγόριθμος μας ονομάζεται Εποπτευμένη Ενσωμάτωση λέξεων για Ανάλυση Συναισθημάτων. Το χρησιμοποιεί πληροφορίες ετικετών εγγράφων για να μάθει διανυσματικές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων από ένα μέτριο σώμα εγγράφων κειμένου με την επίλυση ενός προβλήματος βελτιστοποίησης που ελαχιστοποιεί μια συνάρτηση κόστους τόσο όσον αφορά τις ενσωμάτωση λέξεων όσο και το διανυσματικό βάρος που χρησιμοποιείται για την ταξινόμηση. Τα πειράματα σε διάφορα σύνολα δεδομένων του πραγματικού κόσμου δείχνουν ότι η SWESA έχει ανώτερη απόδοση σε τομείς με περιορισμένα δεδομένα, σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενες προτεινόμενες προσεγγίσεις για ενσωμάτωση λέξεων και εργασίες ανάλυσης συναισθημάτων.', 'ka': 'სტანდარტური სიტყვა, რომელსაც ალგორიტიმები გავსწავლა ვიქტორის გამოსახულებები ტექსტური დოკუმენტების დიდი კოპორადან, არაფერიზებული სტ მაგრამ, ამ ალგორიტიმგან ვისწავლეთ სიტყვების გარეშე სიტყვების გარეშე მოცემული მონაცემების ზომადან გააკეთება. ამიტომ, ეს ალგორიტიმის პროგრამები დიომენში მხოლოდ მოხმარებული მონაცემების მონაცემების მრავლობა დაფარულია. ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში ალგორიტიმს ჩვენ ჩვენ შევცვალოთ, რომელიც სიტყვები კლასიფიკაციის ერთმანეთის შესწავლის. ჩვენი ალგორიტიმი სახელია SWESA (სიტყვის შემდეგება Sentiment Analysies-ისთვის). Name ექსპერიმენტები რამდენიმე მსოფლიოს მონაცემების შესახებ, რომ SWESA აქვს უფრო მეტი მონაცემები დომენტებით, როდესაც წინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინასწინას', 'it': "Gli algoritmi standard di incorporazione di parole imparano le rappresentazioni vettoriali da grandi corpora di documenti di testo in modo non supervisionato. Tuttavia, la qualità delle incorporazioni di parole apprese da questi algoritmi è influenzata dalle dimensioni dei set di dati di formazione. Pertanto, le applicazioni di questi algoritmi in domini con solo quantità moderate di dati disponibili sono limitate. In questo articolo introduciamo un algoritmo che impara le incorporazioni di parole insieme a un classificatore. Il nostro algoritmo si chiama SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA sfrutta le informazioni sull'etichetta dei documenti per imparare le rappresentazioni vettoriali delle parole da un modesto corpus di documenti di testo risolvendo un problema di ottimizzazione che minimizza una funzione di costo rispetto sia alle incorporazioni di parole che al vettore di peso utilizzato per la classificazione. Esperimenti su diversi set di dati del mondo reale mostrano che SWESA ha prestazioni superiori su domini con dati limitati, rispetto agli approcci precedentemente suggeriti per incorporazioni di parole e attività di analisi del sentiment.", 'ms': 'Algoritma penyembelihan perkataan piawai belajar mewakili vektor dari korpra besar dokumen teks dalam cara yang tidak diawasi. Namun, kualiti penyambungan perkataan yang belajar dari algoritma ini dipengaruhi oleh saiz set data latihan. Oleh itu, aplikasi algoritma ini dalam domain hanya dengan jumlah sederhana data yang tersedia adalah terbatas. Dalam kertas ini kita perkenalkan algoritma yang mempelajari pelengkapan perkataan bersama dengan pengklasifikasi. Algoritma kami dipanggil SWESA. SWESA leverages document label information to learn vector representations of words from a modest corpus of text documents by solving an optimization problem that minimizes a cost function with respect to both word embeddings and the weight vector used for classification.  Eksperimen pada beberapa set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahawa SWESA mempunyai prestasi yang lebih baik pada domain dengan data terbatas, apabila dibandingkan dengan pendekatan yang disarankan sebelumnya untuk penyambungan perkataan dan tugas analisis perasaan.', 'lt': 'Standartiniai žodžių įterpimo algoritmai iš didelio teksto dokumentų korporacijos nesustebimu būdu išmoko vektorių atvaizdus. Tačiau iš šių algoritmų įgytų žodžių įterpimo kokybę veikia mokymo duomenų rinkinių dydis. Taigi šių algoritmų taikymas srityse, kuriose turimi tik nedideli duomenys, yra ribotas. Šiame dokumente pristatome algoritmą, kuris moko žodžių įterpimą kartu su klasifikatoriumi. Mūsų algoritmas vadinamas SWESA. SWESA sutelkia dokumentų etiketės informaciją, kad būtų galima išsiaiškinti žodžių vektorius iš nedidelio teksto dokumentų rinkinio, išspręsdama optimizacijos problem ą, kuri sumažina sąnaudų funkciją tiek žodžių įterpimo, tiek klasifikacijai naudojamo svorio vektoriaus atžvilgiu. Kelių realiojo pasaulio duomenų rinkinių eksperimentai rodo, kad SWESA veikia geriau srityse, kuriose duomenys yra riboti, palyginti su anksčiau siūlomais požiūriais į žodžių įtraukimą ir jausmų analizės užduotis.', 'kk': 'Стандартты сөзді ендіру алгоритмдері тексті құжаттардың үлкен корпорасынан белгілерін үйренеді. Бірақ осы алгоритмдерден үйренген сөздердің сапасы деректер жиындарының өлшеміне әсер етеді. Сонымен, домендегі алгоритмдердің қолданбалары тек орташа деңгейі деректер саны шектелген. Бұл қағазда сөздерді классификаторымен бірге ендіру алгоритмін таңдаймыз. Алгоритміз SWESA деп аталады (Sentiment Analysis үшін басқару үшін сөздерді ендіру). SWESA мәтін құжаттардың артық корпусынан сөздерді көрсету үшін құжаттың жарлық мәліметін құжатты жарлық мәліметін түсіндіру үшін құжатты жарлық мәліметін түсіндіреді. Бұл сөздерді ендіру мен классификаци Бірнеше шын әлемдік деректер жинақтарындағы тәжірибелер SWESA- ның шектелген деректерді салыстырып, сөздерді ендіру және сезімдік анализ тапсырмаларына салыстырып, домендердің жақсы жұмыс істеуі', 'mk': 'Стандардните алгоритми за вградување на зборови научуваат репрезентации на вектори од голема корпора на текстови документи на ненадгледуван начин. However, the quality of word embeddings learned from these algorithms is affected by the size of training data sets.  Така, апликациите на овие алгоритми во домени со само умерени количини на достапни податоци се ограничени. Во овој весник претставуваме алгоритм кој научи зборови вградени заедно со класификатор. Нашиот алгоритм се вика SWESA. SWESA ги користи информациите за етикетата на документот за да ги научи векторните претставувања на зборовите од скромен корпус текстови документи со решавање на проблемот со оптимизација кој ја минимизира функцијата на трошоци во однос на зборовите внатрешни и векторот на тежина користен за класифи Експериментите на неколку набори податоци од реалниот свет покажуваат дека СВЕСА има надлежна резултат на домени со ограничени податоци, во споредба со претходно предложените пристапи кон вградувањето на зборови и задачите за анализа на чувствата.', 'ml': 'ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകള്\u200d ഉള്\u200dപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു എന്നാലും ഈ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളില്\u200d നിന്നും പഠിച്ച വാക്കുകളുടെ ഗുണവും പരിശീലനത്തിന്റെ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ വലിപ അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഡോമെന്\u200dസിലെ ഈ ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മുകളുടെ പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമേ ലഭ്യമായ വിവരങ്ങളുള്ളൂ കൂടിയിട്ടുള്ള In this paper we introduce an algorithm that learns word embeddings jointly with a classifier.  ഞങ്ങളുടെ ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം SWESA എന്നാണ് വിളിക്കുന്നത് (സെന്റിമെന്\u200dറ് അന്യായം വാക്കുകള്\u200dക്ക് സുപ്രദര്\u200dശിതമായ അ SWESA വാക്കുകളുടെ വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനായി വെക്റ്റര്\u200d വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വിവ പല യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോക ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങളിലുള്ള പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു SWESA ഡോമെന്\u200dസില്\u200d അത്യുത്തമമായ പ്രദര്\u200dശനം ഉണ്ടെന്ന്, അതിനു മുമ്പ', 'mn': 'Стандарттай алгоритмыг бий болгох алгоритмын хэлбэрээр томоохон текст баримтуудын гол корпораас илэрхийллийг суралцдаг. Гэвч эдгээр алгоритмоос сурсан үгний дундаж чанар өгөгдлийн сангийн хэмжээнд нөлөөлдөг. Тиймээс холбоотой эдгээр алгоритмын хэрэглээ зөвхөн нийтлэг хэмжээтэй мэдээллүүд хязгаарлагддаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид нэг хэвлэгчтэй хамтдаа үгийг сурах алгоритмыг танилцуулдаг. Бидний алгоритм нь SWESA гэдэг. SWESA нь текст баримтуудын бага зэрэгцээ хэмжээний хэлбэрээс векторын илэрхийллийг сурах үед баримтуудын загварын белгээний мэдээллийг ашиглаж, хуваалцах үед хэрэглэгддэг үнэтэй функцийг багасгах болон жин векторын бодлогыг шийдэх арга Дэлхийн хэдэн бодит өгөгдлийн хэмжээний туршилтууд нь SWESA-д хязгаарлагдсан өгөгдлийн талаар илүү сайн үйл ажиллагааг харуулж байна. Өмнө нь хэлсэн үгнээс, сэтгэл санааны шинжилгээ хийх үйл ажиллагаатай харьцуулсан ар', 'pl': 'Standardowe algorytmy osadzania słów uczą się reprezentacji wektorowych z dużych korpusów dokumentów tekstowych w sposób bez nadzoru. Na jakość osadzeń słów nauczonych z tych algorytmów wpływa jednak wielkość zestawów danych treningowych. Zastosowanie tych algorytmów w domenach o umiarkowanej ilości dostępnych danych jest ograniczone. W artykule przedstawiamy algorytm, który uczy się osadzeń słów wspólnie z klasyfikatorem. Nasz algorytm nazywa się SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA wykorzystuje informacje dotyczące etykiet dokumentu, aby uczyć się wektorowych reprezentacji słów z skromnego korpusu dokumentów tekstowych, rozwiązując problem optymalizacji, który minimalizuje funkcję kosztową zarówno w odniesieniu do osadzeń słów, jak i wektora wagi używanego do klasyfikacji. Eksperymenty na kilku zestawach danych świata rzeczywistego pokazują, że SWESA ma lepszą wydajność w domenach z ograniczonymi danymi w porównaniu do wcześniej sugerowanych podejść do osadzania słów i zadań analizy sentymentów.', 'no': 'Name Men kvaliteten på ordinnbygging lært frå desse algoritmene er påvirka av storleiken på opplæringsdatasett. Derfor er programmet av desse algoritmene i domene med berre moderate mengdar tilgjengelege data begrenset. I denne papiret introduserer vi ein algoritme som lærer ordinnbygging saman med ein klassifiserer. Algoritmen vårt er kalla SWESA (oversikte tekstinnbygging for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA leverer dokumentetikettinformasjon for å lære vektorrepresentasjonar av ord frå ein modest korpus av tekstdokument ved å løyse eit optimaliseringsproblem som minimerer ein kostnadsfunksjon med hensyn til både ord innebygging og vekvektoren som brukar for klassifikasjon. Eksperimentar på fleire verdsdata-sett viser at SWESA har høgare utvikling på domene med begrenset data, når det sammenlignet med tidlegare foreslått tilnærmingar til ordinnbygging og sentimentanalyseoppgåver.', 'mt': 'L-algoritmi standard tal-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem jitgħallmu r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi minn korpra kbira ta’ dokumenti tat-test b’mod mhux sorveljat. Madankollu, il-kwalità tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem imgħallma minn dawn l-algoritmi hija affettwata mid-daqs tas-settijiet ta’ dejta ta’ taħriġ. Għalhekk, l-applikazzjonijiet ta’ dawn l-algoritmi f’oqsma b’ammonti moderati biss ta’ dejta disponibbli huma limitati. F’dan id-dokument nintroduċu algoritmu li jitgħallem il-kliem inkorporati flimkien ma’ klassifikatur. L-algoritmu tagħna jissejjaħ SWESA. L-SWESA tagħmel ingranaġġ fuq l-informazzjoni dwar it-tikketta tad-dokument biex titgħallem ir-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-vetturi tal-kliem minn korpus modest ta’ dokumenti tat-test billi tissolva problem a ta’ ottimizzazzjoni li tnaqqas kemm il-funzjoni tal-ispejjeż fir-rigward kemm tal-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem kif ukoll tal-vettur tal-piż użat għall-klassifikazzjoni. L-esperimenti fuq diversi settijiet ta’ dejta tad-dinja reali juru li l-SWESA għandha prestazzjoni superjuri f’oqsma b’dejta limitata, meta mqabbla ma’ approċċi ssuġġeriti qabel għall-inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem u kompiti ta’ analiżi tas-sentimenti.', 'ro': 'Algoritmii standard de încorporare a cuvintelor învață reprezentări vectoriale din corpuri mari de documente text într-un mod nesupravegheat. Cu toate acestea, calitatea încorporărilor de cuvinte învățate din acești algoritmi este afectată de dimensiunea seturilor de date de formare. Astfel, aplicațiile acestor algoritmi în domenii cu numai cantități moderate de date disponibile sunt limitate. În această lucrare introducem un algoritm care învață încorporarea cuvintelor împreună cu un clasificator. Algoritmul nostru se numește SWESA (Supravegheat Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA utilizează informațiile referitoare la etichetele documentelor pentru a învăța reprezentări vectoriale ale cuvintelor dintr-un corpus modest de documente text, rezolvând o problemă de optimizare care minimizează o funcție de cost atât în ceea ce privește încorporarea cuvintelor, cât și vectorul de greutate utilizat pentru clasificare. Experimentele pe mai multe seturi de date din lumea reală arată că SWESA are performanțe superioare pe domenii cu date limitate, în comparație cu abordările sugerate anterior pentru încorporarea cuvintelor și sarcinile de analiză a sentimentului.', 'so': 'Hadalka caadiga ah ee ku qoran algorithm waxay bartaan qeybaha wadiiqooyinka ee warqadaha qoraalka ah oo waaweyn ku qoran qaab aan la ilaalinayn. Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa saameyn ku yeelan kara qiyaastii waxbarashada. Sidaa darteed codsashadan algorithamyadan ee gudaha ku yaala oo kaliya tiro moderate oo macluumaad ah. Warqadan waxaan ku soo bandhignaa Algoritm, kaas oo baranaya hadal ku qoran si wadajir ah. Algoritkanaga waxaa loogu yeeraa SWESA (Supervised Word Embeds for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA wuxuu sameynayaa macluumaad ku saabsan warqada macluumaadka qoriga ah si aad u barto vector representations of words from a modest corpus of text documents by solving a dhibaato optimization that minimizaa functioniga kharashka ku baxa labada hadal oo ku qoran iyo vectorka miisaanka ee loo isticmaalo fasax. Imtixaamo ku saabsan data-taranka dunida qaarkood waxay muujiyaan in SWESA ay ka samaysan yihiin meelaha ay ku haystaan macluumaad xad-gaar ah, marka la barbarbardhigo horay looga soo jeeday inay u soo dhowaadaan shaqooyin hadalka ka ka soo baxa iyo baaritaanka fikirka.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණික වචන ඇල්ගෝරිතම්ස් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිශ්ණතාවක් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් ලොකු කොර නමුත්, මේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් වලින් ඉගෙන ගත්ත වචන සම්බන්ධ විශේෂතාවට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා දත්ත සැට් වලි ඉතින්, ඩෝමේන් වල මේ ඇල්ගෝරිත්ම් වලින් ප්\u200dරයෝජනයේ ප්\u200dරයෝජනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනය විතරයි ප්\u200dරයෝජ මේ පත්තරේ අපි අල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක ඉගෙන ගන්නවා වචන සම්බන්ධයෙන් වචන සම්බන්ධයෙන්. අපේ ඇල්ගෝරිතම් කියලා SWESA කියනවා. Name ඇත්ත ලෝකයේ දත්ත සෙට් වලින් පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ SWESA ගැන සීමාවිත දත්ත තියෙන ප්\u200dරමාණයක් තියෙනවා කියලා, කලින් පරීක්ෂණය කරපු ව', 'sv': 'Standard ordinb채ddningsalgoritmer l채r sig vektorrepresentationer fr책n stora m채ngder textdokument p책 ett o철vervakat s채tt. Kvaliteten p책 ordinb채ddningar som l채rts sig fr책n dessa algoritmer p책verkas dock av storleken p책 tr채ningsdataupps채ttningar. Anv채ndningen av dessa algoritmer i dom채ner med endast m책ttliga m채ngder tillg채ngliga data 채r d채rf철r begr채nsad. I denna uppsats introducerar vi en algoritm som l채r sig ordinb채ddningar tillsammans med en klassificerare. V책r algoritm kallas SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA utnyttjar dokumentetikettinformation f철r att l채ra sig vektorrepresentationer av ord fr책n en blygsam samling textdokument genom att l철sa ett optimeringsproblem som minimerar en kostnadsfunktion med avseende p책 b책de ordinb채ddningar och viktvektorn som anv채nds f철r klassificering. Experiment p책 flera dataupps채ttningar i verkligheten visar att SWESA har 철verl채gsen prestanda p책 dom채ner med begr채nsad data, j채mf철rt med tidigare f철reslagna metoder f철r ordinb채ddning och sentimentalanalys.', 'ta': 'பெரிய நிறுவனமான உரை ஆவணங்களில் இருந்து நெறியின் பிரதிநிதிகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் இயல்பான சொல் ஆனால், இந்த ஆல்பரிமுறைகளிலிருந்து கற்றப்பட்ட வார்த்தைக் குறிப்பிடும் தரம் பயிற்சி தரவு அமைப்பு இவ்வாறு, களங்களில் உள்ள இந்த ஆல்பரிமுறைகளின் பயன்பாடு இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் ஒரு பிரிப்பாளருடன் சேர்ந்து வார்த்தைகளை கற்றுக் கொள்ளும் ஒரு ஆல்பரிதம் அறிவிக்கிற எங்கள் ஆல்gorithm SWESA என்று அழைக்கப்படுகிறது (உணர்வு வார்த்தை விளக்கம் செய்யப்பட்டுள்ளது) SWESA வார்த்தைகளின் முறைமையான உரை ஆவணங்களில் இருந்து வார்த்தைகளின் பகிர்ந்திரங்களை கற்றுக் கொள்ள வேண்டிய ஆவணத்தின் விவரம் தகவல்களை குறைவாக்குகிறது ஒரு முன பல உண்மையான உலக தரவு அமைப்புகளில் சோதனைகள் காண்பிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது SWESA உள்ள தளங்களில் உள்ள செயல்பாடு மேலான செயல்பாடு உள்ளது வரம்பு தரவுகளுடன் மேலா', 'ur': 'Standard word embedding algorithms learn vector representations from large corpora of text documents in an unsupervised fashion. لیکن ان الگوریتم سے یاد رکھے ہوئے کلمات کی کیفیت ڈیٹ سٹ کے اندازے پر اثر دی جاتی ہے. اسی طرح، ڈومین میں ان الگوریتم کے کاروبار صرف متوسط اندازے کے موجود ڈیٹا محدود ہیں. اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک الگوریتم کو معرفی کرتے ہیں جو کلیسائر کے ساتھ ایک کلیسائر کے ساتھ لغات کی تعلیم دیتا ہے۔ ہمارا الگوریتم SWESA نام لیتا ہے۔ SWESA لکھ لیبل معلومات کو لکھ دیتا ہے کہ لکھ دیکسٹ کے مطابق لکھ دینے کے لئے لکھ دینے کے لئے لکھ دینے کے لئے لکھ دینے کے لئے لکھ دینے کے لئے لکھ دینے کے لئے لکھ دینے کے لئے لکھ دینے کے لئے لکھ دیتے ہیں اور لکھ دینے کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. بہت سی حقیقی دنیاوی ڈیٹا سٹ کے تجربے دکھاتے ہیں کہ SWESA کے ذریعہ محدودہ ڈیٹا کے ذریعہ ڈیمین پر زیادہ عملکرد ہے، جب پہلے سے گزرے ہوئے کلمات ابڈینگ اور احساسات تحلیل کے کاموں کے مطابق مقرر ہوتے ہیں', 'sr': 'Standardne reči uključujući algoritme uče predstave vektora iz velike korporacije tekstnih dokumenta na neodređenom načinu. Međutim, kvalitet uključenih reči iz tih algoritma utječe na veličinu seta podataka obuke. Zato su primjene tih algoritma u domenama sa samo umjerenim količinama dostupnih podataka ograničene. U ovom papiru predstavljamo algoritam koji nauèi reè da se ukljuèuje zajedno sa klasifikatorom. Naš algoritam se zove SWESA (Nadzorni integraciji reči za analizu sentimenta). SWESA uvećava informacije o etiketi dokumenta kako bi naučila predstave vektora riječi iz skromnog korpusa tekstskih dokumenta, rešavajući problem optimizacije koji minimizira troškove funkcije u odnosu na obe uvođenje riječi i vektor težine koji se koristi za klasifikaciju. Eksperimenti na nekoliko pravih seta podataka na svijetu pokazuju da SWESA ima superiornu funkciju na domenama sa ograničenim podacima, u usporedbi sa prethodnim predloženim pristupima riječima ugrađenja i zadataka analize sentimenta.', 'uz': "Algoritlar ichida andoza so'z Lekin, bu algoritlardan oʻrganilgan so'zlarning sifatida taʼminlovchi maʼlumot moslamalarining hajmini qo'shiladi. Шундай қилиб, доменларда фақат moderat soni maʼlumot soni boʻlgan dasturlar chegara. Bu hujjatda biz bir so'zni bir klassifik bilan o'rganadigan algoritni anglatamiz. Algoritmiz SWESA (Sentiment Analysis uchun suhbat so'zlar maydonlari). SWESA leverages document label information to learn vector representations of words from a modest corpus of text documents by solving an optimization problem that minimizes a cost function with respect to both word embeddings and the weight vector used for classification.  Ko'pchilik dunyo maʼlumotlar tarkibida tajribalari SWESA'da cheksiz maʼlumotlar bilan bajariladigan amalni ko'rsatadi. Oldingi taʼminlovlovchi soʻzlardan foydalanish va hissiyotni analyzalash vazifalarini o'zgartirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Theo thuật toán tổng hợp từ ngữ học các biểu tượng vector từ tập đoàn văn bản lớn theo một cách không giám sát. Tuy nhiên, chất lượng của sự cấy ghép từ học được từ thuật toán này bị ảnh hưởng bởi kích thước của các tập tin. Do đó, ứng dụng của thuật toán này trong mỗi miền chỉ với một lượng nhỏ dữ liệu sẵn sàng là giới hạn. Trong bài báo này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một thuật toán học sự ghép từ với một người phân loại. Thuật toán của chúng tôi được gọi là VESA (Thay thế lời khai vị cho tình cảm phân tích). Công ty SWESA nhân tài liệu nhãn thông tin để học các biểu tượng vector của từ một tập đoàn văn bản khiêm tốn bằng cách giải quyết một vấn đề tối thiểu một chức năng chi phí với cả hai từ nhúng vào và véc- tơ trọng lượng dùng để phân loại. Thí nghiệm trên nhiều nhóm dữ liệu thế giới thực cho thấy SWAT có trình độ cao hơn trên miền với dữ liệu giới hạn, so với các phương pháp được đề nghị trước đối với các công trình ghép từ và phân tích cảm xúc.', 'da': 'Standard ordindlejringsalgoritmer lærer vektorrepræsentationer fra store korpora af tekstdokumenter på en ubevåget måde. Kvaliteten af ordindlejringer, der læres af disse algoritmer, påvirkes dog af størrelsen af træningsdatasæt. Anvendelsen af disse algoritmer i domæner med kun moderate mængder tilgængelige data er således begrænset. I denne artikel introducerer vi en algoritme, der lærer ordindlejringer sammen med en klassificering. Vores algoritme kaldes SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA udnytter dokumentetiketoplysninger til at lære vektorrepræsentationer af ord fra et beskedent korpus af tekstdokumenter ved at løse et optimeringsproblem, der minimerer en omkostningsfunktion med hensyn til både ordindlejringer og den vægtvektor, der anvendes til klassificering. Eksperimenter med flere datasæt i den virkelige verden viser, at SWESA har overlegen ydeevne på domæner med begrænsede data, sammenlignet med tidligere foreslåede tilgange til ordindlejringer og sentiment analyseopgaver.', 'nl': 'Standaard word embedded algoritmes leren vectorrepresentaties van grote corpora van tekstdocumenten op een onbeheerde manier. De kwaliteit van woordinsluitingen die uit deze algoritmes worden geleerd, wordt echter beïnvloed door de grootte van trainingsgegevenssets. De toepassingen van deze algoritmes in domeinen met slechts matige hoeveelheden beschikbare gegevens zijn dus beperkt. In dit artikel introduceren we een algoritme dat woordinbeddingen leert samen met een classificator. Ons algoritme heet SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA maakt gebruik van documentlabelinformatie om vectorrepresentaties van woorden te leren uit een bescheiden corpus van tekstdocumenten door een optimalisatieprobleem op te lossen dat een kostenfunctie minimaliseert met betrekking tot zowel woordinsluitingen als de gewichtsvector die wordt gebruikt voor classificatie. Experimenten op verschillende real world datasets tonen aan dat SWESA superieure prestaties heeft op domeinen met beperkte data, in vergelijking met eerder voorgestelde benaderingen voor woord embeddings en sentiment analyse taken.', 'id': 'Algoritma penyembedding kata standar belajar representation vektor dari korpora besar dokumen teks dengan cara yang tidak diawasi. Namun, kualitas penerbangan kata yang dipelajari dari algoritma ini dipengaruhi oleh ukuran set data latihan. Jadi, aplikasi algoritma-algoritma ini dalam domain hanya dengan jumlah moderat data tersedia terbatas. Dalam kertas ini kami memperkenalkan algoritma yang mempelajari kata-kata embedding bersama dengan klasifikasi. Algoritma kami disebut SWESA. SWESA leverages document label information to learn vector representations of words from a modest corpus of text documents by solving an optimization problem that minimizes a cost function with respect to both word embeddings and the weight vector used for classification.  Eksperimen pada beberapa set data dunia nyata menunjukkan bahwa SWESA memiliki prestasi yang lebih baik pada domain dengan data terbatas, ketika dibandingkan dengan pendekatan yang sebelumnya disarankan untuk penyambungan kata dan tugas analisis sentimen.', 'de': 'Standard-Algorithmen zur Einbettung von Wörtern lernen Vektorrepräsentationen aus großen Korpora von Textdokumenten auf unbeaufsichtigte Weise. Die Qualität der Worteinbettungen, die aus diesen Algorithmen gelernt werden, wird jedoch von der Größe der Trainingsdatensätze beeinflusst. Daher sind die Anwendungen dieser Algorithmen in Domänen mit nur moderaten Datenmengen begrenzt. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir einen Algorithmus vor, der Worteinbettungen gemeinsam mit einem Klassifikator lernt. Unser Algorithmus heißt SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA nutzt Dokumentbeschriftungsinformationen, um Vektordarstellungen von Wörtern aus einem bescheidenen Korpus von Textdokumenten zu lernen, indem ein Optimierungsproblem gelöst wird, das eine Kostenfunktion sowohl in Bezug auf Worteinbettungen als auch auf den Gewichtsvektor minimiert, der für die Klassifizierung verwendet wird. Experimente an mehreren realen Datensätzen zeigen, dass SWESA eine überlegene Leistung auf Domänen mit begrenzten Daten im Vergleich zu zuvor vorgeschlagenen Ansätzen für Worteinbettungen und Stimmungsanalyseaufgaben aufweist.', 'ko': '표준 단어 삽입 알고리즘은 대형 텍스트 문서 자료 라이브러리에서 무감독 방식으로 벡터 표시를 배운다.그러나 이러한 알고리즘에서 배운 단어가 삽입된 질은 훈련 데이터 집합의 크기에 영향을 받는다.따라서 이런 알고리즘은 소량의 사용 가능한 데이터만 있는 분야에서 응용하는 데 한계가 있다.본고에서 우리는 단어를 연합 분류기에 삽입하는 알고리즘을 소개했다.우리의 알고리즘은 SWESA(정서 분석의 감독어 삽입)이라고 불린다.SWESA는 문서 태그 정보를 활용하여 최적화된 문제를 해결함으로써 단어의 삽입과 분류에 사용되는 권중향량의 원가 함수를 최소화하고 소량의 텍스트 문서에서 단어의 벡터 표현을 배운다.여러 개의 실제 데이터 집합에서의 실험은 이전에 제기된 단어 삽입과 감정 분석 임무 방법에 비해 SWESA는 데이터가 제한된 분야에서 더욱 좋은 성능을 가진다는 것을 나타냈다.', 'bg': 'Стандартните алгоритми за вграждане на думи научават векторни изображения от големи корпуси на текстови документи без надзор. Въпреки това, качеството на вграждането на думи, научено от тези алгоритми, се влияе от размера на наборите от данни за обучение. По този начин приложенията на тези алгоритми в домейни с само умерени количества налични данни са ограничени. В тази статия въвеждаме алгоритъм, който изучава вграждането на думи съвместно с класификатор. Нашият алгоритъм се нарича контролирани словесни вграждания за анализ на чувствата. Използва информацията за етикета на документа, за да научи векторни изображения на думи от скромен корпус от текстови документи чрез решаване на проблем с оптимизацията, който свежда до минимум функцията на разходите по отношение както на вграждането на думи, така и на вектора на тежестта, използван за класификация. Експериментите с няколко набора от данни от реалния свят показват, че има по-добра производителност в домейни с ограничени данни, в сравнение с предишните предложения подходи към вграждането на думи и задачите за анализ на сентименти.', 'hr': 'Standardne riječi uključujući algoritme uče predstave vektora iz velike tijela tekstnih dokumenta na neodređenom načinu. Međutim, kvalitet uključenih riječi iz tih algoritma utječe na veličinu seta podataka obuke. Dakle, primjene tih algoritma u domenama s samo umjerenim količinama dostupnih podataka ograničene su. U ovom papiru predstavljamo algoritam koji uči riječ uključujući zajedno sa klasifikatorom. Naš algoritam se zove SWESA (nadzirani integraciji riječi za analizu sentimenta). SWESA primjenjuje informacije o etiketi dokumenta kako bi naučila predstavljanje vektora riječi iz skromnog tijela tekstskih dokumenta rješavajući problem optimizacije koji minimizira funkciju troškova u pogledu obje uvođenja riječi i vektora težine korištenog za klasifikaciju. Iskusi na nekoliko stvarnih seta podataka svijeta pokazuju da SWESA ima nadmoćne funkcije na domenama s ograničenim podacima, u usporedbi s prethodnim predloženim pristupima riječima ugrađenja i zadatkima analize osjećanja.', 'tr': 'Standart kelime içeri giren algoritmalar beklememiş bir şekilde metin belgelerinden vektör temsillerini öğrenir. Ýöne bu algoritmalardan öwrenen sözlerin keyfiýeti maglumat düzümlerinde täsir edýär. Böylece, bu sahypalar kömeklerde diňe orta sanlary bar. Bu kagyzda klasifikatçy bilen sözleri öwrenen bir algoritmus tanyşdyrýarys. Biziň algoritmimiz SWESA diýilir. SWESA, klasifikasyon için kullanılan vektör şeklinde kelimelerin ifadelerini öğrenmek için bir sene etiketli bilgileri yaratır Dünýä birnäçe hakyky maglumat düzümlerinde örän tejribeler SWESA-nyň domaýlarda ýokary ukyp bardygyny görkezýär. Öňki wagtlar kelime düzümlenmeleri we duýgular analizi uzmanlaryň ýagdaýynda degişseler.', 'af': "Standaard woord inbêer algoritme leer vektor voorstellings van groot korpora van teks dokumente in 'n ongeondersteunde modus. Maar die kwaliteit van woord inbêding wat van hierdie algoritme geleer word, is beïnvloor deur die grootte van onderwerp data stel. So, toepassings van hierdie algoritme in domeine met slegs moderate hoeveelheid beskikbare data is beperk. In hierdie papier introduseer ons 'n algoritme wat leer word inbêding saam met 'n klassifiseerder. Ons algoritme word SWESA genoem (ondersoekte woord ingesluit vir Sentiment Analysis). SWESA verwyder dokumentetiket inligting na leer vektor voorstellings van woorde van 'n modeste korpus van teks dokumente deur 'n optimalisasie probleem te los wat minimiseer' n koste funksie met respek na beide woord inbêring en die gewig vektor gebruik word vir klassifikasie. Eksperimente op verskeie regte wêreld data stelle vertoon dat SWESA superior effektuur het op domeine met beperkte data, wanneer vergelyk word met voorheen voorgestelde toegang tot woorde inbettings en sentimentanaliseerde taak.", 'sq': 'Algoritmet standard të përfshirjes së fjalëve mësojnë përfaqësime vektorësh nga korpora e madhe e dokumenteve teksti në një mënyrë të pazgjidhur. Megjithatë, cilësia e përfshirjeve të fjalëve të mësuara nga këto algoritme ndikohet nga madhësia e grupeve të të dhënave të trajnimit. Kështu, aplikimet e këtyre algoritmeve në fusha me vetëm sasi të moderuara të të dhënave të disponueshme janë të kufizuara. Në këtë letër ne prezantojmë një algoritëm që mëson fjalë të përfshira së bashku me një klasifikues. Algoritmi ynë quhet SWESA. SWESA përdorë informacionin e etiketës së dokumentit për të mësuar përfaqësimet vektore të fjalëve nga një korpus modest dokumentesh teksti duke zgjidhur një problem optimizmi që minimizon një funksion kosto lidhur me të dy përfshirjet e fjalëve dhe vektorin e peshës që përdoret për klasifikimin. Eksperimentet në disa grupe të dhënash të botës reale tregojnë se SWESA ka performancë më të lartë në domenat me të dhëna të kufizuara, kur krahasohet me qasjet e sugjeruara më parë ndaj përfshirjes së fjalëve dhe detyrave të analizës së ndjenjave.', 'fa': 'الگوریتم\u200cهای استاندارد الگوریتم\u200cها نمایش\u200cهای ویکتور را از شرکت بزرگ از سند\u200cهای متن در یک شکل غیرقابل استفاده یاد می\u200cگیرند. ولی کیفیت ابتدایی کلمه\u200cها که از این الگوریتم یاد گرفته\u200cاند، با اندازه مجموعه داده\u200cهای آموزش تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cگیرد. بنابراین، کاربردهای این الگوریتم\u200cها در دامنه\u200cها با فقط مقدار متوسط داده\u200cهای موجود محدود می\u200cشوند. در این کاغذ ما الگوریتم را معرفی می کنیم که کلمه\u200cای را با یک راهنمایی یاد می\u200cگیرد. الگوریتم ما به اسم SWESA نامیده می\u200cشود. Name تجربه\u200cها در مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای جهانی واقعی نشان می\u200cدهند که SWESA عملکرد بالاترین در مجموعه\u200cها با داده\u200cهای محدودیت دارد، در مقایسه با نزدیک\u200cهای پیش پیشنهاد پیشنهاد داده شده\u200cاند به کار\u200cهای تحلیل کردن کلمات و تحلیل احساسات.', 'am': 'የመስመር ቃላት መግለጫ አሌጎራትማር የዌብ መልዕክቶች ከትልቁ ኮርፖራ የጽሑፍ ሰነዶች በተጠበቀው ፎርማት ይማራሉ። ነገር ግን ከእነዚህ አጎርጂቶች የተማሩት የቃላት ጥሩ የድምፅ ጥሩ የድምፅ አካባቢ የዳታ አካባቢ መጠን ይጠቅማል፡፡ ስለዚህም፣ እነዚህን አጎርጂቶች በኮሜኖቹ ውስጥ በተመካከለኛ ቁጥር ብቻ የተገኘ የዳታ ቁጥር ግንኙነት ነው፡፡ በዚህ ጋዜጠኛ ቃላት ከታናቢው ጋር ቃላትን የሚያስተማርን መግለጫ እናስታውቃለን፡፡ Our algorithm is called SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis).  SWESA ሰነዱን አቀማመጥ የቃላት መልዕክት ማድረግ የዌብ ማሳየት ቃላትን ከጽሑፍ አካባቢ ሰነዱን ለመማር እና ለክፍል በተጠቃሚ ቃላት እና ሚዛን የሚጠቅመውን የክስ ስርዓት ጉዳይ በመፍታት ማቅረብ ነው፡፡ በአካባቢው የዓለም ዳታ ማዕከላዎች ላይ ፈተናዎች SWESA በአካባቢ ዳታዎች ላይ የተለየ ጥያቄ አለበት፡፡', 'hy': 'Ստանդարտ բառերը ներգրավելու ալգորիթմները սովորում են տեքստի փաստաթղթերի մեծ կառուցվածքից ոչ վերահսկված կերպով: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս ալգորիթմներից սովորված բառերի ներդրման որակը ազդում է ուսուցման տվյալների համակարգերի չափսից: Այսպիսով, այս ալգորիթմների կիրառումները տիեզերքում, որտեղ հասանելի տվյալների միայն չափազանց մեծ քանակը սահմանափակ է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք ալգորիթմ, որը սովորում է բառերը միասին դասակարգչի հետ: Մեր ալգորիթմը կոչվում է SWESA: SWESA-ն օգտագործում է փաստաթղթի պիտակների տեղեկատվությունը, որպեսզի սովորի տեքստի փաստաթղթերի համեղ կորպոսից բառերի վեկտորների ներկայացումները, լուծելով օպտիմացման խնդիր, որը նվազեցնում է արժեքային ֆունկցիան բառերի ներդրման և կշի Հարբեր իրական աշխարհի տվյալների համակարգերի փորձարկումները ցույց են տալիս, որ SWESA-ն ավելի լավ արդյունք ունի սահմանափակ տվյալներ ունեցող ոլորտներում, համեմատելով նախկինում առաջարկած մոտեցումների և զգացմունքների վերլուծության խնդիրն', 'sw': 'Neno la kawaida linalojumuisha na algorithi zinajifunza uwakilishi wa vector kutoka kwenye makampuni makubwa ya nyaraka za maandishi kwa namna isiyohifadhiwa. Hata hivyo, ubora wa ujumbe wa maneno uliojifunza kutoka kwenye miolori hii unaathirika na ukubwa wa seti za mafunzo. Kwa hiyo, matumizi ya algorithi hizi katika maeneo yenye kiasi kikubwa cha data kinachopatikana ni vizuizi. Katika karatasi hii tunaonyesha utambulisho ambao unajifunza maneno yanaingia pamoja na mwandishi. Ualgorithi wetu unaitwa SWESA (Ujumbe wa Mazungumzo ya Neno kwa Uchambuzi wa Wakati). SWESA inatumia taarifa za taarifa za taarifa za taarifa za taarifa za mtandaoni ili kujifunza uwakilizaji wa maneno kutoka kwenye makampuni yenye matumizi ya nyaraka za maandishi kwa kutatua tatizo la upashanaji ambalo linapunguza kazi za gharama kwa ajili ya maendeleo ya maneno na vector mizito inayotumiwa kwa ajili ya kutafsiri. Majaribio kwenye seti za data za dunia zinaonyesha kuwa SWESA ina ufanisi mkubwa zaidi kwenye maeneo yenye taarifa chache, ukilinganishwa na mapendekezo ya awali yanayowakabiliana na kazi za uchambuzi wa hisia.', 'bn': 'স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার্ড শব্দ বিভিন্ন অ্যালগোরিদম বিশাল কোর্পোরা থেকে ভেক্টর প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিখেছেন একটি অরক্ষিত ফ তবে এই অ্যালগরিদম থেকে শিক্ষিত শব্দের মানে প্রশিক্ষণের তথ্য সংক্রান্ত তথ্যের আকারে প্রভাব ফেলে। এভাবে ডোমেনের এই অ্যালগরিদমের অ্যাপ্লিকেশনগুলো শুধুমাত্র মধ্যবর্তী পরিমাণ উপস্থিত তথ্যের সীমিত। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি অ্যালগরিদম পরিচয় করিয়ে দিচ্ছি যা শব্দ শিখে একজন শ্রেণীবিদের সাথে যোগাযোগ করে। আমাদের অ্যালগরিদম SWESA (সেন্টাইমেন্ট বিশ্লেষণের জন্য সুপার্ভিস শব্দের বিশ্লেষণ)। SWESA লেভারেজের লেবেল লেবেল তথ্য শিখার জন্য ভেক্টরের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শেখার জন্য একটি অপারেশনের সমস্যা সমাধান করে টেক্সট ডকুমেন্ট থেকে শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্বে বেশ কয়েকটি বাস্তব বিশ্বের তথ্য সেটের পরীক্ষা দেখা যাচ্ছে যে এসওয়েসা ডোমেইনের উপর সীমিত তথ্য দিয়ে বেশী ভালো কর্মকাণ্ড রয়েছে, যখন পূর্বের পরামর্শ', 'bs': 'Standardne riječi koje uključuju algoritme uče predstave vektora iz velike tela tekstnih dokumenta na neodređenom načinu. Međutim, kvalitet uključenih riječi iz tih algoritma utječe na veličinu seta podataka obuke. Dakle, primjene tih algoritma u domenama sa samo umjerenim količinama dostupnih podataka su ograničene. U ovom papiru predstavljamo algoritam koji uči riječ ugrađenje zajedno sa klasifikatorom. Naš algoritam se zove SWESA (nadzorni integraciji riječi za analizu sentimenta). SWESA uvećava informacije o etiketi dokumenta kako bi naučila predstave vektora riječi iz skromnog korpusa tekstskih dokumenta rješavajući problem optimizacije koji minimizira funkciju troškova u odnosu na obje uvođenje riječi i vektor težine koji se koristi za klasifikaciju. Eksperimenti na nekoliko pravih seta podataka na svijetu pokazuju da SWESA ima superiornu funkciju na domenama sa ograničenim podacima, u usporedbi s prethodnim predloženim pristupima riječima ugrađenja i zadatkima analize osjećanja.', 'az': "Standardlı söz içərisində algoritlər vektorun göstərişlərini çox mətn belələrindən öyrənir. Ancaq bu algoritmlərdən öyrəndiyi sözlərin keyfiyyəti təhsil məlumatların böyüklüyü təsirləndirir. Beləliklə, domenalarda olan bu algoritmin uyğulamaları yalnız müəyyən ölçü verilən məlumatları sınırlandırılır. Bu kağızda sözləri gizlətməyi öyrənən bir algoritmi tanıyırıq. Algoritimiz SWESA deyildir. SWESA məktub belələrinin ən modest korpusundan sözlərin göstərilmələrini öyrənmək üçün belə məktub etiketi məlumatlarını təmizləyir ki, hər ikisi sözlərin içərisində və klasifikasiya üçün istifadə edilən a ğırlıq vektoru ilə malik funksiyasını azaltır. SWESA'nın küçük məlumatları olan neçə dünya verilənlərin təcrübələrində SWESA'nın sınırlı məlumatları ilə daha üstün performansı olduğunu göstərir.", 'fi': 'Standardit sanaupotusalgoritmit oppivat vektoriesityksiä suurista tekstidokumenteista valvomattomasti. Näistä algoritmeista opittujen sanaupotusten laatuun vaikuttaa kuitenkin harjoitustietokokonaisuuksien koko. Näin ollen näiden algoritmien sovellukset alueilla, joilla on vain kohtalainen määrä saatavilla olevaa tietoa, ovat rajallisia. Tässä työssä esitellään algoritmi, joka oppii sanan upotukset yhdessä luokittelijan kanssa. Algoritmimme nimi on SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA hyödyntää dokumentin tarratietoja oppiakseen vektoriesityksiä sanoista vaatimattomasta tekstidokumenttien korpusesta ratkaisemalla optimointiongelman, joka minimoi kustannusfunktion sekä sanaupotusten että luokittelussa käytetyn painovektorin suhteen. Useilla reaalimaailman datajoukoilla tehdyt kokeet osoittavat, että SWESA:lla on ylivoimainen suorituskyky alueilla, joilla on rajallinen data, verrattuna aiemmin ehdotettuihin lähestymistapoihin sanan upottamiseen ja tunteiden analysointiin.', 'et': 'Standardsed sõna manustamise algoritmid õpivad vektorikujutusi suurtest tekstidokumentide korpustest järelevalveta. Kuid nendest algoritmidest saadud sõnade manustamise kvaliteeti mõjutab koolitusandmekogumite suurus. Seega on nende algoritmide rakendused piiratud piiratud piirkondades, kus on ainult mõõdukas kogus olemasolevaid andmeid. Käesolevas töös tutvustame algoritmi, mis õpib sõna manustamist koos klassifitseerijaga. Meie algoritmi nimi on SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA kasutab dokumendi silditeavet, et õppida sõnade vektorkujutisi tagasihoidlikust tekstidokumendikorpusest, lahendades optimeerimisprobleemi, mis minimeerib kulufunktsiooni nii sõna manustamise kui ka klassifitseerimiseks kasutatava kaaluvektori osas. Mitme reaalse maailma andmekogumiga tehtud katsed näitavad, et SWESA on piiratud andmetega valdkondades parem võrreldes eelnevalt soovitatud lähenemisviisidega sõnade manustamisele ja sentimentaalüüsi ülesannetele.', 'cs': 'Standardní algoritmy vkládání slov se učí vektorové reprezentace z velkých korpusů textových dokumentů bez dohledu. Kvalita slovních vložení, která se z těchto algoritmů naučila, ovšem ovlivňuje velikost tréninkových datových sad. Aplikace těchto algoritmů v doménách s pouze středním množstvím dostupných dat je tedy omezená. V tomto článku představujeme algoritmus, který se učí vložení slov společně s klasifikátorem. Náš algoritmus se nazývá SWESA (Supervised Word Embeddings for Sentiment Analysis). SWESA využívá informace o štítku dokumentů k učení se vektorových reprezentací slov ze skromného korpusu textových dokumentů řešením optimalizačního problému, který minimalizuje funkci nákladů s ohledem na vložení slov i vektor hmotnosti používaný pro klasifikaci. Experimenty na několika skutečných datových sadách ukazují, že SWESA má vynikající výkon na doménách s omezenými daty ve srovnání s dříve navrženými přístupy k vložení slov a úlohám analýzy sentimentu.', 'ca': "Els algoritmes d'incorporació de paraules estàndards aprenen representacions vectorals de gran corpora de documents de text de manera no supervisada. Però la qualitat d'incorporació de paraules aprenguta d'aquests algoritmes està afectada per la mida dels conjunts de dades d'entrenament. Així, les aplicacions d'aquests algoritmes en dominis amb només quantitats moderades de dades disponibles són limitades. En aquest article introduim un algoritme que aprenen paraules incorporades juntament amb un classificador. El nostre algoritme es diu SWESA. SWESA aprofita la informació de l'etiqueta del document per aprendre representacions vectorials de paraules d'un còpus modest de documents de text resolvint un problem a d'optimització que minimitza una funció de cost en relació tant a l'incorporació de paraules com al vector de pes utilitzat per la classificació. Els experiments en diversos conjunts de dades del món real mostren que SWESA té un rendiment superior en dominis amb dades limitades, comparats amb els enfocaments suggerits anteriorment a l'incorporació de paraules i tasques d'anàlisi de sentiments.", 'jv': "Standard word embedding Algorithms slot type Kowe, aplikasi karo Algorithmu iki nang domain karo kabeh gambar dadi sing nesaturan nêmêr Nang pemilih iki, kita muddiwat karo Algorithm sing luhur gambarang sampeyan karo kelas Algorithm dhéwé nambah sWAS (super-Vised Word embedding for Sentiment Test). So that's like a vector vector User:", 'sk': 'Standardni algoritmi za vdelavo besed učijo vektorske predstavitve iz velikih korpusov besedilnih dokumentov na nenadzorovan način. Na kakovost vgradnje besed, pridobljenih iz teh algoritmov, pa vpliva velikost naborov podatkov o usposabljanju. Zato je uporaba teh algoritmov v domenah z zmernimi količinami razpoložljivih podatkov omejena. V prispevku predstavljamo algoritem, ki se uči vgradnje besed skupaj z klasifikatorjem. Naš algoritem se imenuje SWESA (nadzorovana vdelava besed za analizo čustev). SWESA izkorišča informacije o nalepkah dokumenta za učenje vektorskih predstavitev besed iz skromnega korpusa besedilnih dokumentov z reševanjem optimizacijskega problema, ki zmanjšuje stroškovno funkcijo tako v zvezi z vdelavami besed kot vektorjem teže, ki se uporablja za klasifikacijo. Eksperimenti na več resničnih naborih podatkov kažejo, da ima SWESA vrhunsko učinkovitost na področjih z omejenimi podatki v primerjavi s predhodno predlaganimi pristopi k vdelavi besed in nalogam analize občutkov.', 'he': 'אלגוריתמים של מילה סטנדרטית מלמדים מייצגים ווקטורים מגופה גדולה של מסמכים טקסטים באופן לא מעוקב. עם זאת, איכות המילים שנלמדו מהאלגוריתמים האלה מושפעת על ידי גודל קבוצת נתונים אימונים. כך, שימוש של אלגוריתמים אלה בתחומים עם כמויות מוצקות בלבד של נתונים זמינים מוגבלים. בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים אלגוריתם שלמד מילים קיבלות ביחד עם קלאסיפור. האלגוריתם שלנו נקרא SWESA. SWESA משתמש במידע של תווית מסמכים כדי ללמוד מייצגים ווקטורים של מילים מקוורפוס צנוע של מסמכים טקסטים על ידי לפתור בעיה אופטימיזציה שמעטה פונקציה עלות בנוגע לשני המילים וקטור המשקל שמשתמש להקליזציה. Experiments on several real world data sets show that SWESA has superior performance on domains with limited data, when compared to previously suggested approaches to word embeddings and sentiment analysis tasks.', 'ha': 'QXml Amma, sifar maganar da aka buƙata daga wannan algoritun, yana shawarar da girma tsarin data na tsari. Dakata, shirin ayuka na waɗannan algorityum cikin daidai da yawan data masu iya motsi kawai, ana ƙayyade. Ga wannan takardan, Munã ƙara wani algoriti wanda ya sanar da magana wanda ya shiga a sami da wani mai daraja. Ana kiran algoritmu SWESA (da aka ƙayyade maganar da aka ƙayyade wa Ana Fasa). @ label: listbox Tajararin da ke cikin wasu masu tsari na duniya masu gaskata sun nuna SWESA yana da mafi kyaun performance a kan duk da data na da tsari, idan da aka sammenkara shi a gabani da aka buɗa su zuwa zuwa aikin maganar da ke fitarwa da kuma analyza wa hisani.', 'bo': 'སྔོན་སྒྲིག་གི་ཡིག་གེ་ embedding algorithms learn vector representations from large corporation of text documents in an unsupervised fashion. ཡིན་ནའང་། སྒྲུབ་གྲངས་འདི་དག་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ལ་ཤེས་པའི་གསལ་གཞུང་གི་ཆེ་ཆུང་ལ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལ་རྒྱས་ཐལ དེར་བརྟེན། domains ནང་གི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་འདི་དག་གི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ཚད་འཇུག་པའི་གནས་སྟངས་རྫུན་མེད་པ་རེད། ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དབྱེ་བ་ཞིག་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་པའི་ཐ་སྙད་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཤིག་སྟོན་བྱེད། ང་ཚོའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་རྩིས་པ་འདི་SWESA ཞེས་ཡོད། SWESA leverages document label information to learn vector representations of words from a modest corpus of text documents by solving an optimization problem that minimizes a cost function with respect to both word embeddings and the weight vector used for classification. Experiments on several real world data sets show that SWESA has superior performance on domains with limited data, when compared to previously suggested approaches to word embeddings and sentiment analysis tasks.'}
{'en': 'Word-Level Loss Extensions for Neural Temporal Relation Classification', 'ar': 'امتدادات فقدان مستوى الكلمات لتصنيف العلاقة الزمانية العصبية', 'es': 'Extensiones de pérdida a nivel de palabras para la clasificación de relaciones neuronales temporales', 'fr': 'Extensions de perte au niveau des mots pour la classification de la relation temporelle neuronale', 'pt': 'Extensões de perda de nível de palavra para classificação de relação temporal neural', 'ja': '神経時間関係分類のための単語レベルの損失拡張', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका अस्थायी संबंध वर्गीकरण के लिए वर्ड-लेवल लॉस एक्सटेंशन', 'ru': 'Расширения потерь на уровне слов для классификации нейронно-временных связей', 'zh': '以神经时分类字级损益之', 'ga': "Eisínteachtaí Caillteanais Focal d'Aicmiú Néar-Chaidrimh Ama", 'hu': 'Szó-szintű veszteség kiterjesztések az idegrendszeri időkapcsolatok osztályozásához', 'el': 'Επεκτάσεις απώλειας σε επίπεδο λέξης για την ταξινόμηση των νευρωνικών προσωρινών σχέσεων', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Температуралық қатынас классификациясының сөз деңгейі жоғалу кеңейтулері', 'lt': 'Žodų praradimo laipsnio pratęsimai nervinių laikinųjų santykių klasifikacijai', 'ms': 'Sambungan Kehilangan Aras- Perkataan untuk Klasifikasi Hubungan Temporal Neural', 'it': 'Estensioni di perdita a livello di parola per la classificazione delle relazioni temporali neurali', 'mt': 'Estensjonijiet ta’ Telf fil-Livell tal-kliem għall-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Relazzjoni Temporali Newrali', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d ടെമ്പ്പോറല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനുള്ള വാക്ക്- നിലനില പ്രയോഗങ്ങള്\u200d നഷ്ടപ്പെട്ടു', 'mn': 'Үүний түвшинд халдвар буурсан мэдрэлийн температурын харилцааны классификацийн нэмэлт', 'no': 'Utvidingar for verking av ordnivået for nøyraltemperatorisk relasjonsklassifikasjon', 'pl': 'Rozszerzenia strat na poziomie słowa dla klasyfikacji relacji czasowych neuronowych', 'sr': 'Proširenje gubitka na nivou riječi za klasifikaciju neuralnog temporalnog odnosa', 'mk': 'Проширувања за загуба на ниво на зборови за класификација на невралните временски односи', 'ro': 'Extensii de pierdere la nivel de cuvinte pentru clasificarea relațiilor temporale neurale', 'si': 'Name', 'ta': 'வார்த்தை- மட்டத்தை இழந்துவிட்ட விரிவாக்கத்தை தற்காலிக தொடர்பு வகைப்பிற்கான', 'ur': 'Name', 'so': 'Heerka-heerka la’aanta la sii wado fasaxa sharciga ku meelgaarka ah', 'sv': 'Förlusttillägg på ordnivå för klassificering av neural temporal relation', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'nl': 'Word-Level Loss Extensions voor Neural Temporal Relation Classification', 'bg': 'Разширения на загуба на думи за класификация на неврална времева връзка', 'id': 'Ekstensi Kehilangan Tingkat Kata untuk Klasifikasi Hubungan Temporal Neural', 'da': 'Udvidelser af tab på ordniveau for klassificering af neural tidsmæssig relation', 'hr': 'Proširenje gubitka na razini riječi za klasifikaciju neuralnog temporalnog odnosa', 'ko': '신경 시간 관계 분류에 사용되는 단어급 손실 확장', 'sw': 'Kushindwa kwa kiwango cha maneno', 'de': 'Word-Level Loss Extensions für die Klassifizierung neuronaler temporaler Beziehungen', 'fa': 'استفاده\u200cهای خسارۀ سطح کلمه برای کلاسیف ارتباط معمولی عصبی', 'tr': 'Stencils', 'am': 'ፋይል sን መክፈት አልቻለም፦ %s፦ %s', 'sq': 'Word-Level Loss Extensions for Neural Temporal Relation Classification', 'bn': 'Word-Level Loss Extensions for Neural Temporal Relation Classification', 'az': '仃뙲慬⁔敭灯牡氠쒰汩얟歩泉饲⁋污獩晩歡獩祡珄넠쎼쎧쎼渠叉饶楹秉餭叉饶楹秉餠䭡秄녢⁕穡湴쒱污狄넊', 'af': 'Woord vlak verloor uitbreidings vir Neural Temporal Relasifikasie Klassifikasie', 'ca': 'Extensions de pèrdua a nivell de paraules per a la classificació de relació temporal neuronal', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bs': 'Proširenje gubitka na razini riječi za klasifikaciju neuralnog temporalnog odnosa', 'et': 'Sõnataseme kadu laiendused neuraalse ajalise seose klassifitseerimiseks', 'cs': 'Rozšíření ztrát na úrovni slova pro klasifikaci neurálních časových vztahů', 'fi': 'Sanatason häviölajennukset hermojen aikasuhteiden luokittelussa', 'jv': 'OU = VeriSign Trust Network', 'ha': 'Word-Level Loss Extensions for Neural Temporal Relation Classification', 'sk': 'Razširitve izgube besedne ravni za razvrstitev nevralnih časovnih relacij', 'he': 'מחדשות איבוד רמה מילים עבור שיעור יחסים זמניים נוירואליים', 'bo': 'Word-Level Loss Extensions for Neural Temporal Relation Classification'}
{'en': 'Unsupervised pre-trained word embeddings are used effectively for many tasks in natural language processing to leverage unlabeled textual data. Often these embeddings are either used as initializations or as fixed word representations for task-specific classification models. In this work, we extend our classification model’s task loss with an unsupervised auxiliary loss on the word-embedding level of the model. This is to ensure that the learned word representations contain both task-specific features, learned from the supervised loss component, and more general features learned from the unsupervised loss component. We evaluate our approach on the task of temporal relation extraction, in particular, narrative containment relation extraction from clinical records, and show that continued training of the embeddings on the unsupervised objective together with the task objective gives better task-specific embeddings, and results in an improvement over the state of the art on the THYME dataset, using only a general-domain part-of-speech tagger as linguistic resource.', 'es': 'Las incrustaciones de palabras no supervisadas y preentrenadas se utilizan eficazmente para muchas tareas del procesamiento del lenguaje natural para aprovechar los datos textuales sin etiqueta. A menudo, estas incrustaciones se utilizan como inicializaciones o como representaciones de palabras fijas para modelos de clasificación específicos de tareas. En este trabajo, ampliamos la pérdida de tareas de nuestro modelo de clasificación con una pérdida auxiliar no supervisada en el nivel de incrustación de palabras del modelo. Esto es para garantizar que las representaciones de palabras aprendidas contengan características específicas de la tarea, aprendidas del componente de pérdida supervisada, y características más generales aprendidas del componente de pérdida no supervisada. Evaluamos nuestro enfoque en la tarea de extracción de la relación temporal, en particular, la extracción de la relación de contención narrativa de los registros clínicos, y mostramos que la capacitación continua de las incorporaciones en el objetivo no supervisado junto con el objetivo de la tarea proporciona mejores incrustaciones específicas de la tarea y resultados en una mejora con respecto al estado de la técnica en el conjunto de datos THYME, utilizando solo un etiquetador de parte del habla de dominio general como recurso lingüístico.', 'ar': 'يتم استخدام عمليات تزوير الكلمات المدربة مسبقًا غير الخاضعة للإشراف بشكل فعال للعديد من المهام في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية للاستفادة من البيانات النصية غير المسماة. غالبًا ما يتم استخدام هذه الزخارف إما كتهيئة أو تمثيلات كلمات ثابتة لنماذج التصنيف الخاصة بالمهمة. في هذا العمل ، نقوم بتوسيع خسارة مهمة نموذج التصنيف الخاص بنا مع خسارة مساعدة غير خاضعة للرقابة على مستوى تضمين الكلمات في النموذج. هذا للتأكد من أن تمثيلات الكلمات التي تم تعلمها تحتوي على كل من الميزات الخاصة بالمهمة ، والتي تم تعلمها من مكون الخسارة الخاضعة للإشراف ، والمزيد من الميزات العامة التي تم تعلمها من مكون الخسارة غير الخاضع للإشراف. نقوم بتقييم نهجنا في مهمة استخراج العلاقة الزمنية ، على وجه الخصوص ، استخراج علاقة الاحتواء السردي من السجلات السريرية ، ونوضح أن التدريب المستمر لحفلات الزفاف على الهدف غير الخاضع للإشراف جنبًا إلى جنب مع هدف المهمة يعطي حفلات الزفاف الخاصة بالمهمة بشكل أفضل ، والنتائج في تحسين على أحدث ما توصل إليه العلم في مجموعة بيانات THYME ، باستخدام أداة تمييز جزء من الكلام للمجال العام فقط كمورد لغوي.', 'pt': 'As incorporações de palavras pré-treinadas não supervisionadas são usadas efetivamente para muitas tarefas no processamento de linguagem natural para alavancar dados textuais não rotulados. Muitas vezes, essas incorporações são usadas como inicializações ou como representações de palavras fixas para modelos de classificação específicos de tarefas. Neste trabalho, estendemos a perda de tarefas do nosso modelo de classificação com uma perda auxiliar não supervisionada no nível de incorporação de palavras do modelo. Isso é para garantir que as representações de palavras aprendidas contenham recursos específicos da tarefa, aprendidos do componente de perda supervisionada, e recursos mais gerais aprendidos do componente de perda não supervisionada. Avaliamos nossa abordagem na tarefa de extração de relação temporal, em particular, extração de relação de contenção narrativa de registros clínicos, e mostramos que o treinamento contínuo das incorporações no objetivo não supervisionado juntamente com o objetivo da tarefa fornece melhores incorporações específicas da tarefa e resulta em uma melhoria em relação ao estado da arte no conjunto de dados THYME, usando apenas um tagger de fala de domínio geral como recurso linguístico.', 'fr': "Les intégrations de mots pré-entraînées non supervisées sont utilisées efficacement pour de nombreuses tâches dans le traitement du langage naturel afin d'exploiter des données textuelles non étiquetées. Ces intégrations sont souvent utilisées soit comme initialisations, soit comme représentations de mots fixes pour des modèles de classification spécifiques à une tâche. Dans ce travail, nous étendons la perte de tâches de notre modèle de classification avec une perte auxiliaire non supervisée au niveau de l'intégration de mots du modèle. Cela permet de s'assurer que les représentations de mots apprises contiennent à la fois des caractéristiques spécifiques à la tâche, apprises à partir du composant de perte supervisée, et des caractéristiques plus générales apprises à partir de la composante de perte non supervisée. Nous évaluons notre approche sur la tâche d'extraction de relation temporelle, en particulier l'extraction de la relation de confinement narratif à partir de dossiers cliniques, et montrons que la formation continue des intégrations sur l'objectif non supervisé avec l'objectif de la tâche donne de meilleurs intégrations spécifiques à la tâche et des résultats dans une amélioration par rapport à l'état de la technique de l'ensemble de données THYME, en utilisant uniquement un marqueur de partie de langage général comme ressource linguistique.", 'ja': '教師なしの事前訓練された単語埋め込みは、ラベル付けされていないテキストデータを活用するために、自然言語処理の多くのタスクに効果的に使用されます。 多くの場合、これらの埋め込みは、初期化として、またはタスク固有の分類モデルの固定された単語表現として使用されます。 この作業では、分類モデルのタスクロスを、モデルの単語埋め込みレベルで監視されていない補助ロスで拡張します。 これは、学習された単語表現が、タスク固有の機能、監督された損失コンポーネントから学習された機能、および監督されていない損失コンポーネントから学習されたより一般的な機能の両方を含むことを保証するためです。 私たちは、時間的関係抽出、特に臨床記録からの物語的封じ込め関係抽出のタスクに関する私たちのアプローチを評価し、タスク目的と共に監督されていない目的への埋め込みの継続的なトレーニングが、より良いタスク固有の埋め込みを提供し、言語リソースとしての一般ドメイン部分の音声タグ付けのみを使用して、タイムデータセット上の最先端の改善をもたらすことを示します。', 'hi': 'असुरक्षित पूर्व-प्रशिक्षित शब्द एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में कई कार्यों के लिए प्रभावी ढंग से किया जाता है ताकि बिना लेबल वाले टेक्स्ट डेटा का लाभ उठाया जा सके। अक्सर इन एम्बेडिंग का उपयोग या तो प्रारंभिककरण के रूप में या कार्य-विशिष्ट वर्गीकरण मॉडल के लिए निश्चित शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व के रूप में किया जाता है। इस काम में, हम मॉडल के शब्द-एम्बेडिंग स्तर पर एक असुरक्षित सहायक हानि के साथ अपने वर्गीकरण मॉडल के कार्य हानि का विस्तार करते हैं। यह सुनिश्चित करने के लिए है कि सीखा शब्द प्रतिनिधित्व दोनों कार्य-विशिष्ट विशेषताएं हैं, पर्यवेक्षित हानि घटक से सीखा, और अधिक सामान्य सुविधाओं unsupervised हानि घटक से सीखा है। हम अस्थायी संबंध निष्कर्षण के कार्य पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, विशेष रूप से, नैदानिक रिकॉर्ड से कथा रोकथाम संबंध निष्कर्षण, और दिखाते हैं कि कार्य उद्देश्य के साथ-साथ असुरक्षित उद्देश्य पर एम्बेडिंग का निरंतर प्रशिक्षण बेहतर कार्य-विशिष्ट एम्बेडिंग देता है, और थाइमे डेटासेट पर कला की स्थिति में सुधार के परिणामस्वरूप,  भाषाई संसाधन के रूप में केवल एक सामान्य-डोमेन पार्ट-ऑफ-स्पीच टैगर का उपयोग करना।', 'ru': 'Неконтролируемые предварительно обученные вставки слов эффективно используются для многих задач в обработке естественного языка, чтобы использовать немеченные текстовые данные. Зачастую эти вложения используются либо как инициализации, либо как представления фиксированных слов для моделей классификации конкретных задач. В этой работе мы расширяем потерю задач нашей классификационной модели с неконтролируемой вспомогательной потерей на уровне встраивания слов модели. Это делается для обеспечения того, чтобы полученные представления слов содержали как специфические для конкретной задачи элементы, извлеченные из компонента контролируемых потерь, так и более общие элементы, извлеченные из компонента неконтролируемых потерь. Мы оцениваем наш подход к задаче извлечения временных связей, в частности, нарративного извлечения отношений сдерживания из клинических записей, и показываем, что непрерывное обучение вложений по неконтролируемой цели вместе с целью задачи дает лучшие вложения, специфичные для задачи, и приводит к улучшению по сравнению с уровнем техники на наборе данных ТИМЬЯНА, используя в качестве лингвистического ресурса только общедоменный тегер части речи.', 'zh': '无监督者预训练词嵌于有效自然语言处中之多务,以用未标之文本。 凡此诸初始化,或以为特定,或以为固定字。 于此,吾因模形之词以广分类之失。 所以保学也单词所以包监损组件学特定征,所以无监损组件也。 予评余于日月取任之法,特取叙性于临床录之中,以明无监督之嵌与务之练供其任特异性嵌,而较THYME数集上最新术有所改善。  唯用常域词性标器为言资。', 'ga': 'Baintear úsáid éifeachtach as leabú focal réamhoilte gan mhaoirseacht le haghaidh go leor tascanna i bpróiseáil teanga nádúrtha chun sonraí téacsúla neamhlipéadaithe a ghiaráil. Is minic a úsáidtear na leabaithe seo mar inisealacha nó mar léiriú focal seasta le haghaidh samhlacha aicmithe tasc-shonracha. San obair seo, leathnaímid tasc-chaillteanas ár múnla aicmithe le caillteanas cúnta gan mhaoirseacht ar leibhéal leabaithe focal na samhla. Déantar é seo lena chinntiú go mbeidh gnéithe a bhaineann go sonrach le tasc ar leith sna léirithe focal foghlamtha, a foghlaimíodh ón gcomhpháirt caillteanas maoirsithe, agus gnéithe níos ginearálta a foghlaimíodh ón gcomhpháirt caillteanas gan mhaoirseacht. Déanaimid luacháil ar ár gcur chuige maidir le heastóscadh an chaidrimh ama, go háirithe, eastóscadh caidreamh srianadh insinte ó thaifid chliniciúla, agus léirímid go dtugann oiliúint leanúnach leabaithe an chuspóra gan mhaoirseacht mar aon leis an tascchuspóir leabaithe tasc-shonracha níos fearr, agus torthaí i. feabhas ar an úrscothacht ar thacar sonraí THYME, gan úsáid a bhaint as ach clibeálaí cuid de chaint ginearálta fearainn mar acmhainn teanga.', 'hu': 'A felügyelet nélküli, előre képzett szóbeágyazásokat hatékonyan használják a természetes nyelvfeldolgozás során számos feladathoz, hogy felhasználják a címke nélküli szöveges adatokat. Gyakran ezeket a beágyazásokat inicializálásként vagy fix szóreprezentációként használják feladatspecifikus osztályozási modellekhez. Ebben a munkában osztályozási modellünk feladatvesztését felügyelet nélküli kiegészítő veszteséggel bővítjük a modell szóbeágyazási szintjén. Ez annak biztosítása érdekében, hogy a tanult szó reprezentációi tartalmazzák mind a feladatspecifikus jellemzőket, amelyeket a felügyelt veszteség összetevőből tanultak, mind a felügyelet nélküli veszteség összetevőből tanultak általánosabb jellemzőket. Értékeljük megközelítésünket az időbeli kapcsolat kivonásának feladatával kapcsolatban, különösen a klinikai feljegyzésekből származó narratív elszigetelési kapcsolat kivonásával kapcsolatban, és kimutatjuk, hogy a beágyazások felügyelet nélküli célra történő továbbképzése a feladat célkitűzésével együtt jobb feladatspecifikus beágyazásokat eredményez, és javul a THYME adatkészlet korszerűségéhez képest, kizárólag egy általános tartományú beszédrészes címkézőt használ nyelvi erőforrásként.', 'it': "Le incorporazioni di parole pre-addestrate non monitorate vengono utilizzate in modo efficace per molte attività nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale per sfruttare i dati testuali non etichettati. Spesso queste incorporazioni vengono utilizzate come inizializzazione o come rappresentazioni di parole fisse per modelli di classificazione specifici per attività. In questo lavoro, estendiamo la perdita di attività del nostro modello di classificazione con una perdita ausiliaria non supervisionata sul livello di word-embedding del modello. Questo per garantire che le rappresentazioni delle parole apprese contengano sia caratteristiche specifiche del compito, apprese dalla componente di perdita supervisionata, sia caratteristiche più generali apprese dalla componente di perdita non supervisionata. Valutiamo il nostro approccio sul compito dell'estrazione delle relazioni temporali, in particolare l'estrazione delle relazioni narrative di contenimento dalle cartelle cliniche, e mostriamo che la formazione continua degli embedding sull'obiettivo non supervisionato insieme all'obiettivo del compito dà migliori embedding specifici del compito e si traduce in un miglioramento rispetto allo stato dell'arte sul dataset THYME, utilizzando solo un tag part-of-speech di dominio generale come risorsa linguistica.", 'kk': 'Табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін көп тапсырмалар үшін алдын- ала оқылмаған сөздерді ендіру үшін қолданылады. Бұл ендіру көбінде не бастау ретінде, немесе тапсырманың ерекше классификациялық үлгілер үшін дұрыс сөздерді көрсету ретінде қолданылады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, үлгісінің сөздерді ендіру деңгейіндегі көмектесілмеген жоғалуымыз керек. Бұл үйренген сөздердің түсініктемелерінде басқару компонентінен оқылған тапсырманың екі қасиеттері бар екенін, және жоғалу компонентінен оқылған жалпы қасиеттері бар екенін тексеру үшін. Біз уақытша қатынастарды тарқату тапсырмасының тәсілдігін, осылай-ақ, клиникалық жазулардан тарқату қатынасын, және тапсырманың мақсатымен бірге жалғастырылмаған мақсаттың артықшылығын бақылап, тапсырманың артықшылығы артықшылығын жақсы құрып, THYME деректер жиынының Тек тілдік ресурс ретінде сөйлейтін жалпы доменнің бөлігін қолдану.', 'el': 'Οι μη εποπτευόμενες προ-εκπαιδευμένες ενσωματώσεις λέξεων χρησιμοποιούνται αποτελεσματικά για πολλές εργασίες επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας για να αξιοποιήσουν τα δεδομένα κειμένου χωρίς ετικέτα. Συχνά αυτές οι ενσωματώσεις χρησιμοποιούνται είτε ως αρχικές παραστάσεις είτε ως σταθερές αναπαραστάσεις λέξεων για μοντέλα ταξινόμησης συγκεκριμένων εργασιών. Σε αυτή την εργασία, επεκτείνουμε την απώλεια εργασίας του μοντέλου ταξινόμησης μας με μια μη επιτηρημένη βοηθητική απώλεια στο επίπεδο ενσωμάτωσης λέξεων του μοντέλου. Αυτό είναι για να διασφαλιστεί ότι οι αναπαραστάσεις των διδαχθέντων λέξεων περιέχουν τόσο συγκεκριμένα χαρακτηριστικά εργασίας, τα οποία μαθαίνονται από το στοιχείο της εποπτευόμενης ζημίας, όσο και πιο γενικά χαρακτηριστικά που μαθαίνονται από το στοιχείο της μη εποπτευόμενης ζημίας. Αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας στο έργο της εκχύλισης χρονικών σχέσεων, ιδίως της εκχύλισης αφηγηματικών δεσμών περιορισμού από κλινικά αρχεία, και αποδεικνύουμε ότι η συνεχής εκπαίδευση των ενσωμάτωσης στον μη επιτηρημένο στόχο σε συνδυασμό με τον στόχο εργασίας δίνει καλύτερες ενσωμάτωση σε συγκεκριμένες εργασίες, και οδηγεί σε βελτίωση έναντι της κατάστασης της τεχνολογίας στο σύνολο δεδομένων ΘΥΜΕ, χρησιμοποιώντας μόνο μια ετικέτα τμήματος ομιλίας γενικού τομέα ως γλωσσικό πόρο.', 'ka': 'უფრო მეტად განსწავლილი სიტყვების შებრძელება ეფექტიურად გამოყენება რამდენიმე რაოდენობებისთვის თავისუფალური ენის პროცესისთვის გამოყენება, რომ ტექსტულ ზოგჯერ ეს შებრუნებები იყენება ან ინციალიზაციას, ან როგორც განსაზღვრებული სიტყვის განსაზღვრებები კლასიფიკაციის მოდელებისთვის. ამ სამუშაოში ჩვენ კლასიფიკაციის მოდელის დასრულება ჩვენი მოდელის დასრულებაზე, რომელიც მოდელის სიტყვების დასრულებაში დასრულებული დასრულებული დასრულება. ეს უნდა დარწმუნოთ, რომ სწავლილი სიტყვების გამოსახულებები იყოს ორივე პარამეტრების განსახულებელი ფუნქციები, რომლებიც მონახულებული დაკავშირების კომპონენტიდან დასწ ჩვენ ჩვენი მოხმარება გერმალური შესახებ ექსტრაქციის დავამუშავებთ, განსაკუთრებით, კლინიკური შესახებ ექსტრაქციის შესახებ, და ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენი მოხმარება კლინიკური შესახებ და ჩვენ ჩვენ ჩვენი მოხმარების შესახებ, რომელიც არაფერიზებული მისახებ მხოლოდ ენერალური დიომინის ნაწილი სიტყვანის რესურსის გამოყენება.', 'mk': 'Ненадгледувани предобучени зборови се користат ефикасно за многу задачи во природното обработување јазик за да се користат необележани текстуални податоци. Често овие вградувања се користат или како иницијализации или како фиксни претставувања на зборови за модели за класификација специфични за задачите. Во оваа работа ја прошируваме загубата на нашиот класификациски модел со ненадгледувана помошна загуба на нивото на вградување на зборови на моделот. Ова е за да се осигура дека научените репрезентации на зборови содржат и специфични карактеристики за задачите, научени од компонентот за надгледувана загуба, како и поопшти карактеристики научени од компонентот за ненадгледувана загуба. Ние го проценуваме нашиот пристап на задачата за извлекување на временски односи, особено, извлекување на приказни за контролен однос од клиничките записи, и покажуваме дека континуираната обука на вложувањата на ненадгледуваната цел заедно со целта на задачата дава подобри вложувања специфични за задачите, и резултат во подобрување во однос на најсов @ info: tooltip', 'ms': 'Pencampuran perkataan pra-dilatih tidak diawasi digunakan secara efektif untuk banyak tugas dalam pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi untuk menggunakan data teks tidak ditabel. Biasanya penyembedding ini digunakan sama ada sebagai awalkan atau sebagai perwakilan perkataan tetap untuk model klasifikasi khusus tugas. Dalam kerja ini, kita memperluas kehilangan tugas model klasifikasi kita dengan kehilangan bantuan yang tidak diawasi pada tahap penyembedding perkataan model. Ini untuk memastikan perwakilan perkataan yang belajar mengandungi kedua-dua ciri-ciri khusus tugas, belajar dari komponen kehilangan yang diawasi, dan ciri-ciri yang lebih umum belajar dari komponen kehilangan yang tidak diawasi. Kami menilai pendekatan kita pada tugas ekstraksi hubungan sementara, terutamanya, ekstraksi hubungan penahanan naratif dari rekod klinik, dan menunjukkan bahawa latihan terus-menerus penerbangan pada objek yang tidak diawasi bersama dengan objektif tugas memberikan penerbangan yang lebih baik-spesifik tugas, dan mengakibatkan peningkatan atas kemajuan pada set data THYME, - menggunakan hanya sebahagian-domain-umum tagger ucapan sebagai sumber bahasa.', 'ml': 'നിരീക്ഷിച്ചിട്ടില്ലാത്ത വാക്കുകളുടെ എംപ്പോഡിങ്ങുകള്\u200d സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രാകൃതികമായി  എപ്പോഴും ഈ അകത്തേക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് തുടക്കത്തിനായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നുണ്ടോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ജോലി- പ്രത്യേകിച്ച ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d മോഡലിന്റെ ജോലി നഷ്ടത്തിലേക്ക് വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. മോഡലിന്റെ വാക്കില്\u200d നിന പഠിച്ച വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്കും ജോലി- പ്രത്യേകിച്ച പ്രതിഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഉണ്ടെന്നും, നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ട നഷ്ടത്തിന്\u200dറെ സംഘത്തില്\u200d നിന് ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d റെക്കോര്\u200dഡില്\u200d നിന്നുള്ള വിവരങ്ങളുടെ ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ നേര്\u200dക്ക് നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യം വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത വസ്തുക്കളില്\u200d നിന്നും സംരക്ഷിക്കു ഭാഷ വിഭവങ്ങളായി സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ജനറല്\u200d- ഡൊമൈന്\u200d ഭാഷ മാത്രം ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു.', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-kliem imħarrġa minn qabel mhux sorveljati jintużaw b’mod effettiv għal ħafna kompiti fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali biex tingħata spinta lid-dejta testwali mingħajr tikketta. Ta’ spiss dawn l-inkorporazzjonijiet jintużaw jew bħala inizjalizzazzjonijiet jew bħala rappreżentazzjonijiet fissi tal-kliem għal mudelli ta’ klassifikazzjoni speċifiċi għall-kompiti. F’dan ix-xogħol, aħna jestendu t-telf tal-kompitu tal-mudell ta’ klassifikazzjoni tagħna b’telf awżiljarju mhux sorveljat fuq il-livell ta’ inkorporazzjoni tal-kliem tal-mudell. Dan huwa biex jiġi żgurat li r-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-kliem imgħallma jkun fihom kemm karatteristiċi speċifiċi għall-kompitu, imgħallma mill-komponent tat-telf sorveljat, kif ukoll karatteristiċi aktar ġenerali mitgħallma mill-komponent tat-telf mhux sorveljat. Aħna jevalwaw l-approċċ tagħna dwar il-kompitu tal-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni temporali, b’mod partikolari, l-estrazzjoni tar-relazzjoni ta’ konteniment narrattiv mir-rekords kliniċi, u nuru li t-taħriġ kontinwu tal-inkorporazzjonijiet fuq l-objettiv mhux sorveljat flimkien mal-objettiv tal-kompitu jagħti inkorporazzjonijiet aħjar speċifiċi għall-kompitu, u jirriżulta f’titjib fuq l-aktar avvanzat fis-sett tad-dejta THYME, • l-użu biss ta’ tagger ta’ parti tad-diskors ta’ dominju ġenerali bħala riżorsa lingwistika.', 'mn': 'Байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн олон даалгаварын тулд сургалтын өмнө сургалтын хэлний нэгтгэл ашигладаг. Ихэвчлэн эдгээр нэвтрүүлэлтийг эхлэх эсвэл даалгаварын тодорхой хэлбэрийн загварын тодорхойлолтой үлгэр гэж ашигладаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид хуваариллагааны загварын алдагдлыг загварын хэмжээнд тусламжгүй алдагдаж байна. Энэ бол сургалтын үг нь ажлын тодорхой харилцааны хоёр талаарх харилцааны тодорхой харилцаатай байдлыг баталж, харилцааны алдагдлын компонентээс суралцагдсан, мөн баталгаагүй алдагдлын компонентээс илүү Бид цаг хугацааны хамааралтын ажил, ялангуяа, клиникийн бичлэгээс хамааралтай түүх хамааралтай холбоотой байдлыг үнэлгээж, ажлын зорилго дээр дасгал хөгжүүлэх зорилго дээр үргэлжлүүлсэн сургалтыг нь илүү сайн ажлын тодорхойлолтой холбоотой болон THYME өгөгдлийн сангийн урлагийн байдал дээр сайжруул Зөвхөн ярианы нэг хэсэг нь хэлний боловсрол гэж ашигладаг.', 'lt': 'Neprižiūrimas iš anksto parengtas žodžių įterpimas veiksmingai naudojamas daugeliui užduočių, susijusių su gamtiniu kalbų apdorojimu, siekiant suvienodinti pažymėtus tekstinius duomenis. Dažnai šie įterpimai naudojami kaip inicializacijos arba kaip fiksuoti žodžių atstovai konkrečioms užduotims priskiriamiems klasifikavimo modeliams. Šiame darbe išplečiame savo klasifikavimo modelio užduočių praradimą nepastebimu papildomu praradimu modelio žodžių įterpimo lygiu. Taip siekiama užtikrinti, kad įgytų žodžių pavyzdys apimtų tiek uždaviniams būdingus požymius, įgytus iš prižiūrimos nuostolių komponento, tiek bendresnius požymius, įgytus iš nepažiūrimos nuostolių komponento. Vertiname savo požiūrį į laikinųjų santykių išgavimo užduotį, visų pirma narracinių santykių sulaikymo išgavimą iš klinikinių įrašų, ir parodome, kad tęstinis įtraukimo į nepastebimą tikslą mokymas kartu su užduočių tikslu suteikia geresnę užduočių specifinę įtraukimą ir pagerina THYME duomenų rinkinio pažangą, - kaip kalbos išteklius naudoti tik bendrojo domeno kalbos dalies žymenį.', 'no': 'Ikkje oppretta først trengte ordinnbygging vert bruka effektivt for mange oppgåver i naturspråkshandsamaren for å leverara ukjende tekstdata. Desse innbyggingane vert anten brukte som oppstartar eller som fast ordrepresentasjonar for klassifikasjonsmodular for oppgåver spesifikke. I denne arbeida utvidar vi oppgåva i klassifikasjonsmodulen vårt med ein ukjend auxiliar tap på ordinnbyggingsnivået i modellen. Dette er å sikre på at den lærte ordrepresentasjonen inneheld både funksjonarspesifikke for oppgåve, lærte frå den oversikte tapkomponenten, og meir generelle funksjonar lærte frå den ikkje oppretta tapkomponenten. Vi evaluerer tilnærminga vårt på oppgåva av tidsstyrre relasjonsekstrahering, spesielt storatverksområdet med ekstrahering frå kliniske oppføringar, og viser at fortsett opplæring av innbyggingane på den ikkje-oppretta målet saman med oppgåvemålet gir betre oppgåve-spesifikke innbygging, og resulterer i ein forbedring over kunsten på THYME-datasettet, Bruk berre ein general-domain part-of-speech-tagger som linguistic resource.', 'ro': 'Încorporările de cuvinte pre-instruite nesupravegheate sunt utilizate eficient pentru multe sarcini în procesarea limbajului natural pentru a valorifica datele textuale fără etichete. Adesea, aceste încorporări sunt utilizate fie ca inițializări, fie ca reprezentări fixe de cuvinte pentru modelele de clasificare specifice activităților. În această lucrare, extindem pierderea sarcinii modelului nostru de clasificare cu o pierdere auxiliară nesupravegheată la nivelul de încorporare a cuvântului modelului. Acest lucru este pentru a se asigura că reprezentările cuvintelor învățate conțin atât caracteristici specifice sarcinii, învățate din componenta pierderii supravegheate, cât și caracteristici mai generale învățate din componenta pierderii nesupravegheate. Evaluăm abordarea noastră cu privire la sarcina extragerii relațiilor temporale, în special extragerea relațiilor narative de izolare din înregistrările clinice și demonstrăm că formarea continuă a încorporărilor pe obiectivul nesupravegheat împreună cu obiectivul sarcinii oferă încorporări mai bune specifice sarcinii și rezultă într-o îmbunătățire față de starea tehnologiei în setul de date THYME, utilizarea numai ca resursă lingvistică a unui etichetor cu părți de vorbire de domeniu general.', 'so': 'Waxyaabo badan oo lagu baaraandegayo afka dabiicadda ah waxaa loo isticmaalaa si faa’iido ah looga baaraandegayo hadal ka hor shaqeeya. Inta badan qalabkan waxaa loo isticmaalaa sida bilowga ama sida noocyo cayiman oo shaqo gaar ah. Shaqadan, waxaynu ku fidinnaa lumbarka shaqada ee sameynta iyo khasaaro aan la ilaalin karin oo ku saabsan heerka samoolka. Taasi waa in lagu xaqiijiyo in qeybaha la bartay ay ku jiraan labada shaqo oo gaar ah, oo laga baray qeybaha khasaaraha la ilaaliyey, iyo tayooyin badan oo laga bartay qeybta khasaarada ee aan la ilaalin. We evaluate our approach on the task of temporal relation extraction, in particular, narrative containment relation extraction from clinical records, and show that continued training of the embeddings on the unsupervised objective together with the task objective gives better task-specific embeddings, and results in an improvement over the state of the art on the THYME dataset, * isticmaalaya qeyb ka mid ah hadalka oo kaliya oo ah luqadaha.', 'pl': 'Nie nadzorowane wstępnie przeszkolone osadzenia słów są skutecznie wykorzystywane do wielu zadań w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego w celu wykorzystania nieoznakowanych danych tekstowych. Często osadzenia te są używane jako inicjalizacje lub jako stałe reprezentacje słów dla modeli klasyfikacji specyficznych dla zadania. W niniejszej pracy rozszerzamy stratę zadań modelu klasyfikacyjnego o stratę pomocniczą bez nadzoru na poziomie osadzenia słowa modelu. Ma to na celu zapewnienie, że reprezentacje nauczonych słów zawierają zarówno cechy specyficzne dla zadania, wyciągnięte z komponentu nadzorowanej straty, jak i bardziej ogólne cechy wyciągnięte z komponentu straty bez nadzoru. Oceniamy nasze podejście do zadania ekstrakcji relacji czasowych, w szczególności ekstrakcji relacji zatrzymujących narrację z rejestrów klinicznych i pokazujemy, że ciągłe szkolenie osadzeń na obiekcie bez nadzoru wraz z celem zadania daje lepsze osadzenia specyficzne dla zadania i skutkuje poprawą nad stanem techniki zbioru danych THYME, używanie tylko tagera części mowy ogólnej domeny jako zasobu językowego.', 'sv': 'Oserverade förkunskaperade ordinbäddningar används effektivt för många uppgifter i naturlig språkbehandling för att utnyttja osäkrade textdata. Ofta används dessa inbäddningar antingen som initialiseringar eller som fasta ordrepresentationer för aktivitetsspecifika klassificeringsmodeller. I detta arbete utökar vi vår klassificeringsmodells uppgiftsförlust med en oövervakad tilläggsförlust på modellens ordbäddningsnivå. Detta för att säkerställa att de lärda ordrepresentationerna innehåller både uppgiftsspecifika funktioner, lärda av den övervakade förlustkomponenten, och mer allmänna funktioner lärda av den oövervakade förlustkomponenten. Vi utvärderar vårt förhållningssätt till uppgiften med temporal relationsextraktion, särskilt narrativ inneslutningsrelation extraktion från kliniska journaler, och visar att fortsatt träning av inbäddningarna på det ouppvakade målet tillsammans med uppgiftsmålet ger bättre uppgiftsspecifika inbäddningar, och resulterar i en förbättring jämfört med det senaste inom THYME datauppsättningen. endast använda en allmän domän del av tal taggare som språklig resurs.', 'ur': 'غیر قابل تحصیل کی کلمات ابڈینگ کے لئے بہت سی کاموں کے لئے مناسب زبان پردازش کے لئے استعمال کئے جاتے ہیں۔ اغلب یہ ایمبڈینگ یا آغاز کے طور پر استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں یا تابع-مخصوص کلاسپی موڈل کے لئے مضبوط لفظ کے طور پر استعمال کیے جاتے ہیں. اس کام میں ہم اپنے کلاسپیٹ موڈل کے کام کے خسارہ کو مدل کے لفظ پر غیر قابل مددگار خسارہ کے ساتھ پھیلاتے ہیں۔ یہ مطمئن ہونا ہے کہ سیکھا ہوا کلمہ نمایش دونوں کام کا خاص ویژہ رکھتا ہے، جو نظر رکھی ہوئی خسارہ رقم سے سیکھا جاتا ہے، اور بہت عمومی ویژہ کو نقصان رقم سے سیکھا جاتا ہے. ہم نے اپنے طریقے کو موقت رابطہ نکالنے کے کام پر مطابق، مخصوصاً کلینیکی ریکوارڈ سے دائمی رابطہ کے ساتھ دائمی رابطہ نکالنے کا ارتباط کرتا ہے اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ غیرقابل مقررہ مقررہ پر دائمی رابطہ کی تعلیم ادامه دی جاتی ہے اور تابع مقررہ مقررہ مقررہ مقررہ کے ساتھ بہتر تابع مخصو صرف ایک ژنرال-ڈومین ٹاگر کا استعمال کرتا ہے زبان رسورس کے طور پر۔', 'ta': 'கண்காணிக்கப்படாத முன் பயிற்சியில்லாத வார்த்தை உள்ளடக்கங்கள் இயல்பான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் பல பணிகளுக்கு பயன்படுத்தப்படும் ம பெரும்பாலாக இந்த உள்ளடக்கங்கள் துவக்கத்தை அல்லது பணிக்குறிப்பிட்ட வகுப்பு மாதிரி இந்த வேலையில், நாம் எங்கள் வகுப்பிடிப்பு மாதிரியின் பணி இழப்பை விரிவாக்குகிறோம் மாதிரியின் வார்த்தை உள்ளிடும் நிலைய பாதுகாக்கப்பட்ட நஷ்டத்தின் பகுதியிலிருந்து கற்றப்பட்ட சொல்லின் குறிப்பிட்ட பண்புகள் இருந்தும், மற்றும் காப்பாற்றப்படாத நஷ்டத்தின் க நாம் தற்காலிக தொடர்பு பிரித்தல் செயல்பாட்டின் மீது எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை விளக்குகிறோம், குறிப்பாக, சில பதிவுகளில் இருந்து வெளியேறுதல் பற்றிய தகவல்களை பார்க்கவும், மற்றும் தொடர்ந்து கொள்ளும்  பொது டொமைன் பகுதி பேச்சு ஒட்டி மட்டும் மொழி மூலமாக பயன்படுத்துகிறது.', 'sr': 'Neobezbeđene predobučene reèi se koriste efikasno za mnoge zadatke u procesu prirodnog jezika kako bi se uticalo na nepobeležene tekstualne podatke. Često se ta uključenja koristi kao inicijalizacija ili kao određene reči za modele klasifikacije određenih zadataka. U ovom poslu, proširimo gubitak zadataka našeg klasifikacijskog modela sa neodređenim pomoænim gubitkom na nivou ukljuèenja reèi modela. To je da se osigura da se učena reč predstavlja obje posebne funkcije na zadatku, naučene iz nadziranog komponenta gubitka, i više općih karakteristika naučenih od neodređenog komponenta gubitka. Procjenjujemo naš pristup zadatku privremenog izvlačenja odnosa, posebno, izvlačenja priče o održavanju izvlačenja iz kliničkih podataka, i pokazujemo da nastavljanje obuke ugrađenja na neodređenom objektu zajedno sa zadatačkim ciljem daje bolji ugrađenje posebnih zadataka i rezultuje poboljšanje stanja umjetnosti na sastavu THYME podataka, Koristio je samo opšte-domene deo-govora kao jezički resurs.', 'si': 'ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාපනය සඳහා ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් නැති පාළුම් දත්ත ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරයෝජනයෙන් ප්\u200dරයෝජ සමහර වෙලාවට මේ ඇන්බින්ඩින්ග් විශේෂ විශේෂ මොඩේල්ස් වෙනුවෙන් පටන් ගන්න විදිහට භාවිත වෙනවා නැ මේ වැඩේ අපි අපේ විශේෂණ මොඩේල්ගේ වැඩක් නැති වෙන්නේ මොඩේල්ගේ වචනය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් නැති වෙන්නේ නැති වි මේක තමයි ඉගෙන ගත්ත වචන ප්\u200dරතිශේෂණයේ වැඩක් විශේෂ විශේෂ අවශ්\u200dය දෙන්නම් තියෙනවා කියලා බලන්න ප්\u200dරතිශේෂිත අවශ අපි අවශ්\u200dයය කරනවා අපේ ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ කාලය සම්බන්ධ විස්තරය, විශේෂයෙන්, සාර්තාවික සම්බන්ධ විස්තරය ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරවේශනය වි සාමාන්\u200dය-ඩෝමින් කොටස් එකක් විතරයි භාෂාවික සම්බන්ධයක් විතරයි.', 'vi': 'Không giám sát những từ ngữ được huấn luyện có hiệu quả trong nhiều công việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên để thu thập dữ liệu văn bản không được dán. Thông thường những sự nối này được dùng như khởi tạo hoặc là các biểu hiện từ cố định cho các mô hình phân hạng đặc nhiệm. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi mở rộng s ự mất mát của mô hình phân loại với một sự mất mát phụ trợ không giám sát trên mức độ tác từ của mô hình. Đây là để đảm bảo các biểu hiện từ đã học chứa cả các tính năng đặc biệt, được học từ thành phần mất mát giám sát, và các tính năng chung được học từ thành phần mất tích không giám sát. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp của chúng tôi về nhiệm vụ khai thác mối quan hệ thời gian, đặc biệt là giải cứu mối quan hệ cốt truyện từ các ghi chép lâm sàng, và cho thấy việc huấn luyện tiếp tục về sự nhúng tay vào mục tiêu không được giám sát cùng với mục tiêu nhiệm vụ mang lại những sự nhúng tay đặc biệt hơn, và kết quả là cải thiện trạng thái nghệ thuật trên bộ dữ liệu THYME, sử dụng một khẩu phần văn bản phổ thông như tài nguyên ngôn ngữ.', 'uz': "@ info: whatsthis @ info: whatsthis Bu ishda biz nasififning modelining vazifani o'zgartirib chiqaramiz modelning soʻzni qo'yish mumkin. @ info: whatsthis Biz vaqt aloqalarni ajratish vazifasini qiymatimiz, hozir, klinikal sahifalardan aloqalarni boshqarish muvaffaqiyatlarimizni ko'rsamiz va ishni saqlab qolmagan obʼekt bilan davom etish muvaffaqiyatlarini ko'rsatishimiz mumkin va vazifaning muhimkoniyatlarini yaxshi o'zgartiradi va THYME maʼlumotlar sohasida saqlash holatini bajaradi, @ info: whatsthis", 'nl': 'Onbewaakte vooraf getrainde woordinsluitingen worden effectief gebruikt voor veel taken in de verwerking van natuurlijke talen om gebruik te maken van niet-gelabelde tekstgegevens. Vaak worden deze insluitingen gebruikt als initialisaties of als vaste woordrepresentaties voor taakspecifieke classificatiemodellen. In dit werk breiden we het taakverlies van ons classificatiemodel uit met een onbeheerd hulpverlies op het woord-embedding niveau van het model. Dit is om ervoor te zorgen dat de geleerde woordrepresentaties zowel taakspecifieke kenmerken bevatten, die zijn geleerd van de begeleide verliescomponente, als meer algemene kenmerken die zijn geleerd van de niet-begeleide verliescomponente. We evalueren onze aanpak van de taak van temporele relatieontwikkeling, in het bijzonder, narrative containment relatieontwikkeling uit klinische dossiers, en tonen aan dat voortdurende training van de embeddings op het niet-begeleide objectief samen met de taakdoelstelling betere taakspecifieke embeddings oplevert, en resulteert in een verbetering ten opzichte van de state of the art op de THYME dataset, alleen gebruik maken van een tag voor delen van spraak in het algemene domein als taalbron.', 'da': 'Ikke-overvågede forududdannede ordindlejringer bruges effektivt til mange opgaver i naturlig sprogbehandling for at udnytte ikke-mærkede tekstdata. Ofte bruges disse indlejringer enten som initialiseringer eller som faste ordrepræsentationer for opgavespecifikke klassifikationsmodeller. I dette arbejde udvider vi vores klassifikationsmodells opgavetab med et uopvåget hjælpetab på modellens ordindlejringsniveau. Dette er for at sikre, at de lærte ord repræsentationer indeholder både opgavespecifikke funktioner, der er lært fra den overvågede tabskomponent, og mere generelle funktioner, der er lært fra den ikke-overvågede tabskomponent. Vi evaluerer vores tilgang til opgaven med tidsrelationsekstraktion, især fortællingsrelationekstraktion fra kliniske journaler, og viser, at videreuddannelse af indlejringerne på det uopvågede mål sammen med opgavemålet giver bedre opgavespecifikke indlejringer og resulterer i en forbedring i forhold til den nyeste teknologi på THYME datasættet, kun at bruge en del af tale-tagger til almindeligt domæne som sproglig ressource.', 'bg': 'Неконтролираните предварително обучени вграждания на думи се използват ефективно за много задачи в обработката на естествен език, за да се възползват от неетикетирани текстови данни. Често тези вграждания се използват или като инициализации, или като фиксирани думи за специфични задачи модели за класификация. В тази работа разширяваме загубата на задачи на нашия класификационен модел с ненадзорни спомагателни загуби на нивото на вграждане на думи на модела. Това е, за да се гарантира, че изображенията на научените думи съдържат както специфични за задачата характеристики, научени от компонента за надзорни загуби, така и по-общи характеристики, научени от компонента за ненадзорни загуби. Оценяваме подхода си към задачата за извличане на времеви взаимоотношения, по-специално извличане на поверителна връзка на задържане от клиничните записи, и показваме, че продължаващото обучение на вгражданията по ненаблюдаваната цел заедно с целта на задачата дава по-добри вграждания, специфични за задачата, и води до подобрение в сравнение с най-новите технологии на набора от данни като лингвистичен ресурс се използва само маркер за част от речта с общ домейн.', 'hr': 'Za mnoge zadatke u prirodnoj obradi jezika se učinkovito koriste nepotrebne predobučene riječi za uključivanje neizbiljnih tekstualnih podataka. Često se ta uključenja koristi kao inicijalizacija ili kao određene riječi za modele klasifikacije određenih zadataka. U ovom poslu, proširimo gubitak zadataka našeg modela klasifikacije sa neodređenim pomoćnim gubitkom na razini uključenog riječi modela. To je kako bi se osiguralo da predstavljanja učenih riječi sadrže obje posebne funkcije na zadatku, naučene iz nadziranog komponenta gubitka, te više općih karakteristika naučenih od neodređenog komponenta gubitka. Procjenjujemo naš pristup izvlačenju privremenih odnosa, posebno priče o izvlačenju priče iz kliničkih zapisa, i pokazujemo da nastavljanje obuke uvlačenja na neodređeni cilj zajedno s ciljem zadatka daje bolji uvlačenje određenih zadataka i rezultira poboljšanja stanja umjetnosti na sastavu THYME podataka, Koristeći samo općeg domena dio govora kao jezički resurs.', 'ko': '자연 언어 처리에서 감독이 없는 예비 트레이닝 단어 삽입은 표시되지 않은 텍스트 데이터를 활용하기 위해 많은 작업에 효과적으로 사용된다.일반적으로 이러한 삽입은 초기화하거나 특정한 작업의 분류 모델의 고정어 표시로 사용된다.이 작업에서 우리는 우리의 분류 모델의 임무 손실과 감독 보조 손실이 없는 단어 삽입 수준의 모델을 확장했다.이것은 학습된 단어가 임무의 특정한 특징(감독 손실 구성 요소에서 학습)도 포함하고 비감독 손실 구성 요소에서 배운 더욱 일반적인 특징도 포함하도록 확보하기 위한 것이다.우리는 시간 관계에서 임무를 추출하는 방법, 특히 임상 기록에서 서사적 포함 관계를 추출하고 무감독 목표와 임무 목표에서 삽입에 대한 교육을 계속하면 더욱 좋은 임무를 특정한 삽입을 제공할 수 있으며 백리향 데이터 집합의 최신 기술보다 개선될 수 있음을 나타냈다.일반 영역의 어성 표기만 언어 자원으로 사용한다.', 'id': 'Penampilan kata yang belum terlatih tanpa nadi digunakan secara efektif untuk banyak tugas dalam proses bahasa alami untuk mengambil alih data teks yang tidak ditandai. Biasanya penerbangan ini digunakan sebagai inisialisasi atau sebagai representation kata tetap untuk model klasifikasi spesifik tugas. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami memperluas kehilangan tugas model klasifikasi kami dengan kehilangan bantuan yang tidak diawasi pada tingkat penyampilan kata-kata model. Ini untuk memastikan bahwa representation kata belajar mengandung kedua ciri-ciri tugas-spesifik, belajar dari komponen kehilangan yang diawasi, dan ciri-ciri yang lebih umum belajar dari komponen kehilangan yang tidak diawasi. We evaluate our approach on the task of temporal relation extraction, in particular, narrative containment relation extraction from clinical records, and show that continued training of the embeddings on the unsupervised objective together with the task objective gives better task-specific embeddings, and results in an improvement over the state of the art on the THYME dataset, - menggunakan hanya bagian-domain-umum tagger pidato sebagai sumber bahasa.', 'sw': 'Ujumbe wa maneno yasiyoelezwa kabla yanatumiwa kwa ufanisi kwa kazi nyingi katika upasuaji wa lugha asili ili kutumia taarifa za msingi zisizoeleweka. Mara nyingi zote hizi zinatumiwa kama mwanzo au kama uwakilishi wa maneno madhubuti kwa mifano maalumu ya kazi. Katika kazi hii, tunaongeza kupoteza kazi yetu ya mpango wetu wa usambazaji na kupoteza kwa upatikanaji usioendelea kwenye kiwango cha maneno kinachowekwa katika mtindo huo. Hii ni kuhakikisha kuwa maonesho ya maneno yaliyojifunza yanahusu vipengele viwili maalumu vya kazi, zilizojifunzwa kutoka sehemu ya kupoteza, na vipengele vya jumla vinavyojifunza kutoka kwenye sehemu ya kupoteza bila kuhifadhiwa. Tutathmini hatua yetu juu ya jukumu la utekelezaji wa muda, hususani, utekelezaji wa mahusiano kutoka kwenye rekodi za kliniki, na kuonyesha kwamba mafunzo yanayoendelea kwenye malengo yasiyopangwa pamoja na lengo la kazi inaleta mabadiliko bora zaidi ya kazi, na yanasababisha kuboresha hali ya sanaa kwenye seti ya taarifa za THYME, kwa kutumia sehemu tu ya lugha kama rasilimali ya lugha.', 'tr': 'Taryh dili işleýän köp zady üçin baglanmaýan öňde bilinmegen söz integrasy ullanylýar. Köplenç bu girişmeler ya başlançylyk üçin ullanylýar, ya da täblisaň häzirki klasifikasyon nusgalary üçin sabit söz temsilleri bolar. Bu işde, klasifikasiýa nusgasymyzyň ýitilmegini modyň içine kömek ýitilmeýän bir nusgasy bilen uzatlaşdyrýarys. Bu ýer öwrenmeli sözleriň temsilleri hem zadyň has häsiýetleri bardygyny garaşdyrmak üçin, näme gözetli ýitirmek komponentinden öwrenmeli, hem daşary edilmedik ýitirmek komponentinden öwrenmeli döwletleri. Biziň ýaryşymyzy temporal baglanyşyň tapmaklygynyň görevini, özellikle,hekaýat saklanyşymyz kliniki kaynaklardan tapylmak üçin deňleýäris we bu maksadyň üstünde tapylmadyk maksadyň düzümlenmesini we bu maksadyň üstünde has gowy gören hasaplamalaryny berýäris we ol mekdeplerde sungatyň durumynyň üstünliklerini geliştirir, Diňe dil çeşmesi hökmünde jeneral-domena bir tagger ullanýar.', 'de': 'Unbeaufsichtigte vortrainierte Worteinbettungen werden für viele Aufgaben in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache effektiv eingesetzt, um unbeschriftete Textdaten zu nutzen. Oft werden diese Einbettungen entweder als Initialisierungen oder als feste Wortdarstellungen für aufgabenspezifische Klassifizierungsmodelle verwendet. In dieser Arbeit erweitern wir den Aufgabenverlust unseres Klassifikationsmodells um einen unbeaufsichtigten Hilfsverlust auf der Wort-Einbettungsebene des Modells. Dadurch soll sichergestellt werden, dass die erlernten Wortdarstellungen sowohl aufgabenspezifische Merkmale enthalten, die von der überwachten Verlustkomponente gelernt wurden, als auch allgemeinere Merkmale, die von der unbeaufsichtigten Verlustkomponente gelernt wurden. Wir evaluieren unsere Herangehensweise an die Aufgabe der temporalen Beziehungsextraktion, insbesondere die narrative Containment Relation Extraktion aus klinischen Aufzeichnungen, und zeigen, dass eine kontinuierliche Schulung der Einbettungen auf dem unbeaufsichtigten Ziel zusammen mit dem Aufgabenziel bessere aufgabenspezifische Einbettungen ermöglicht und zu einer Verbesserung gegenüber dem Stand der Technik auf dem THYME Datensatz führt. Verwenden Sie nur einen allgemeinen Teil-der-Sprache-Tagger als linguistische Ressource.', 'af': "Onondersoekte vooraf- ondersoekte woord inbêring word effektief gebruik vir baie taak in natuurlike taal verwerking om onabelde tekstuurde data te verwyder. Gedikwels word hierdie inbêring of gebruik as inisialiserings of as vaste woord verteenwoordes vir opdragspesifieke klassifikasie modele. In hierdie werk, on s uitbrei ons klassifikasie model se taak verloor met 'n onverondersteunde helper verloor op die woord-inbetering vlak van die model. Hierdie is om te verseker dat die geleerde woord voorstellings beide taak spesifieke funksies bevat, geleer van die verlore komponent, en meer algemene funksies geleer van die ongeondersteunde verlore komponent. Ons evalueer ons toegang op die taak van tydelike verwanting uitpakking, in particular, narrative containment relation extraction from clinical records, en wys dat voortdurende onderwerking van die inpakkings op die ononderwerpende objek saam met die taak doel beter opdragspesifieke inpakkinge gee, en resultaat in 'n verbetering oor die staat van die kuns op die dieme datastel, Gebruik slegs 'n algemene-domein deel-van-spraak-merker as lingwisiese hulpbron.", 'fa': 'برای بسیاری از کارهای در پرداخت زبان طبیعی برای تأکید داده\u200cهای متن غیرقابل استفاده می\u200cشوند. اغلب این ابتدایی یا به عنوان ابتدایی استفاده می\u200cشوند یا به عنوان نمایش\u200cهای کلمه ثابت برای مدل\u200cهای گروه\u200cبندی مشخص کار. در این کار، ما از دست دادن کارهای مدل classification ما با یک خسارت کمک غیرقابل تحمل در سطح کلمه وارد کردن مدل افزایش می کنیم. این برای مطمئن شدن است که نمایش\u200cدهندگان کلمه یاد گرفته\u200cاند، هر دو ویژه\u200cهای ویژه\u200cای مشخصه\u200cای دارند، که از بخش\u200cهای زیانکاری بررسی یاد گرفته\u200cاند، و ویژه\u200cهای عمومی بیشتر از بخش\u200cهای زیانکاری غیرقابل ما روش خود را در مورد کشیدن رابطه\u200cهای موقتی ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم، مخصوصاً رابطه\u200cهای داستان\u200cگذاری رابطه\u200cای از ثبت\u200cهای کلینیک، و نشان می\u200cدهیم که آموزش ادامه\u200cگذاری رابطه\u200cگذاری بر هدف غیرقابل تحریک شده با هدف وظیفه\u200cی وظیفه\u200cی وظیفه\u200cی وظیفه\u200cای بهتر را می\u200cدهد استفاده از فقط یک قسمتی از نقاشی کلمات به عنوان منابع زبان\u200cشناسی است.', 'hy': 'Անվերահսկված նախապատրաստված բառերի ներգրավումները արդյունավետ օգտագործվում են շատ առաջադրանքների համար բնական լեզվի վերամշակում, որպեսզի օգտագործեն անբնական տեքստային տվյալներ: Հաճախ այս ներդրումները կամ օգտագործվում են որպես ինիցիալիզացիաներ, կամ որպես հաստատուն բառերի ներկայացումներ խնդիրների մասնավոր դասակարգման մոդելների համար: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք ընդլայնում ենք մեր դասակարգման մոդելի խնդիրների կորստը մոդելի բառերի ներգրավման մակարդակի անվերահսկված օգնական կորստով: Սա նպատակն է վստահել, որ սովորված բառերի ներկայացումները պարունակում են երկու խնդիր-հատուկ հատկանիշներ, սովորված կորստի կառուցվածքից, և ավելի ընդհանուր հատկանիշներ, սովորված կորստի կառուցվածքից: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը ժամանակական հարաբերությունների վերացման խնդրի վրա, հատկապես, պատմությունների պահպանող հարաբերությունների վերացմանը կլինիկական ձայնագրություններից, և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ անվերահսկված օբյեկտիվի ներդրումների շարունակական վարժեքը միասին խնդրի օբյեկտիվի հետ ավելի լավ ներդրումներ են տալիս խնդիրների մասնավոր ներդրում - օգտագործելով միայն խոսքի ընդհանուր բնագավառի մասը որպես լեզվաբանական ռեսուրս:', 'am': 'ያልታወቀ የፊደል ተማሪ ቃላት ስብሰባዎች ለብዙዎች ስራ በተለየ ቋንቋ ማቀናጃ በተጠቃሚ ተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑን ፋይል አስቀምጥ በዚህ ስራ የክፍለ ሥርዓታችንን ሞዴል ክፍተት በሞዴል ላይ በተጠበቀው ቃላት አካባቢ ክፍል እናሳድጋለን፡፡ ይህ የተማሩት ቃላት ተሟጋቾች ከታዋቂው ጎዳና ተማሩ እና ከሳራ ክፍል የተማሩ የጠቃሚ ምርጫዎች እንዲኖሩ ነው፡፡ የጊዜው ግንኙነት ለመውጣት፣ በተለይም፣ የግንኙነት ግንኙነት ከቻይሎኒካዊ ደብዳቤዎች እንዲወስድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በቋንቋ ቋንቋ መጠቀም የተጠቃሚ-ድምፅ ክፍል ብቻ ነው፡፡', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় অনেক কাজের জন্য কার্যকর কর্মসূচি ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে পূর্ব প্রশিক্ষিত শব্দ বিভিন্ন প্রশিক্ষণের Often these embeddings are either used as initializations or as fixed word representations for task-specific classification models.  এই কাজে আমরা আমাদের শ্রেণীবিভাগ মডেলের কাজের ক্ষতি বাড়িয়ে দিচ্ছি মডেলের শব্দের বিভিন্ন স্তরের ক্ষেত্রে। এটা নিশ্চিত করার জন্য যে শিক্ষিত শব্দের প্রতিনিধিত্ব রয়েছে কাজ-নির্দিষ্ট বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর মধ্যে, পর্যবেক্ষণ করা হারানো কম্পোনেন্ট থেকে শি আমরা সাময়িক সম্পর্ক বের করার ব্যাপারে আমাদের পদক্ষেপ মূল্যায়ন করি, বিশেষ করে ক্লিনিক রেকর্ড থেকে বিস্তারিত সংশ্লিষ্ট সম্পর্ক বের করা হয়েছে এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে কাজের উদ্দেশ্যের সাথে সংরক্ষিত নির্দিষ ভাষার সম্পদ হিসেবে শুধুমাত্র একটি জেনারেল-ডোমেইন-এর ভাষণের অংশ ব্যবহার করে।', 'sq': 'Për shumë detyra në procesimin natyror të gjuhës përdoren përfshirjet e fjalëve të paratrajnuara që nuk mbikqyren në mënyrë të efektshme për të nxjerrë në dorë të dhënat tekstuale të pasjellura. Shpesh këto përfshirje përdoren ose si inicializime ose si përfaqësime të fjalëve të fiksuara për modelet e klasifikimit specifik për detyrat. Në këtë punë, zgjerojmë humbjen e detyrës s ë modelit tonë klasifikues me një humbje ndihmëse pa mbikqyrje në nivelin e përfshirjes së fjalëve të modelit. Kjo është për të siguruar që përfaqësimet e fjalëve të mësuara përmbajnë si karakteristikat specifike për detyrat, të mësuara nga komponenti i humbjes së mbikqyrur dhe karakteristikat më të përgjithshme të mësuara nga komponenti i humbjes së pa mbikqyrur. Ne vlerësojmë qasjen tonë në detyrën e nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve të përkohshme, veçan ërisht, nxjerrjen e marrëdhënieve të përmbajtjes narrative nga regjistrimet klinike, dhe tregojmë se trajnimi i vazhdueshëm i përfshirjeve në objektivin e pa mbikqyrur së bashku me objektivin e detyrës jep përfshirje më të mira specifike për detyrat dhe rezulton në një përmirësim mbi gjendjen e fundit në të dhënat - duke përdorur vetëm një pjesë-domain-të-fjalim si burim gjuhësor.', 'bs': 'Neobezbeđene predobučene riječi učinkovito se koriste za mnoge zadatke u procesu prirodnog jezika kako bi se uticalo na neoznačene tekstualne podatke. Često se ta uključenja koristi kao inicijalizacija ili kao određene riječi za modele klasifikacije određenih zadataka. U ovom poslu, proširimo gubitak zadataka našeg modela klasifikacije sa neodređenim pomoćnim gubitkom na nivou uključenog reči modela. To je kako bi se osiguralo da predstavljanja učenih riječi sadrže obje posebne funkcije na zadatku, naučene od komponenta gubitka nadziranog nadzora, i više općih karakteristika naučenih od komponenta neodređenog gubitka. Procjenjujemo naš pristup na zadatku izvlačenja privremenih odnosa, posebno, izvlačenja priče o održavanju priče iz kliničkih dosjea, i pokazujemo da nastavljanje obuke uvlačenja na neodređeni cilj zajedno sa zadatačkim ciljem daje bolji integraciji određenih zadataka i rezultira poboljšanja stanja umjetnosti na setu podataka THYME-a, Koristeći samo općeg domena dio govora kao jezički resurs.', 'ca': "Les integracions de paraules no supervisades s'utilitzen efectivament per a moltes tasques en el processament natural de llenguatges per aprofitar dades textuals no etiquetades. Sovint aquestes incorporacions s'utilitzen com a inicialitzacions o com a representacions de paraules fixes per a models de classificació específics per tasca. In this work, we extend our classification model's task loss with an unsupervised auxiliary loss on the word-embedding level of the model.  Això és per assegurar que les representacions de paraules aprengutes contén tant característiques específices de la tasca, aprenguts del component de pèrdua supervisada, com característiques més generals aprenguts del component de pèrdua no supervisada. Evaluam el nostre enfocament en la tasca de l'extracció temporal de relacions, en particular, l'extracció de la relació narrativa de contenció dels registres clínics, i demostram que la capacitat continuada de l'incorporació en l'objectiu no supervisat juntament amb l'objectiu de la tasca dóna millors incorporacions específices per a les tasques, i resulta en una millora sobre l'estat d'avançat del conjunt de dades THYME, utilitzant només un etiquetador de partde domini general com a recurso lingüístic.", 'cs': 'Nekontrolované předškolené vložení slov se efektivně používají pro mnoho úkolů při zpracování přirozeného jazyka a využívají tak neoznačených textových dat. Často se tato vložení používají buď jako inicializace nebo jako pevná reprezentace slov pro klasifikační modely specifické pro úlohy. V této práci rozšíříme ztrátu úloh našeho klasifikačního modelu o bezdozorovanou pomocnou ztrátu na úrovni slovního vložení modelu. Tím je zajištěno, aby reprezentace učených slov obsahovaly jak vlastnosti specifické pro úkoly, naučené ze složky ztráty s dohledem, tak obecnější vlastnosti naučené ze složky ztráty bez dohledu. Hodnotíme náš přístup k úkolu extrakce časových vztahů, zejména extrakce narativních kontejnerů z klinických záznamů, a ukazujeme, že pokračující trénink vložení na bez dohledu objektu společně s cílem úkolu poskytuje lepší zabudování specifických úkolů a vede ke zlepšení oproti stavu techniky na datové sadě THYME, používá jako jazykový zdroj pouze tagovač části řeči obecné domény.', 'az': 'Təbiətli dil işləməsində çox işlər üçün təhsil edilməmiş əvvəlcə təhsil edilməmiş sözlər içərisində istifadə edilir. Bunlar çox sıfırda ya başlanğıçlıqlar olaraq, ya da işin müəyyən edilmiş klasifikasyon modelleri üçün sabit söz göstəricisi olaraq istifadə edilər. Bu işdə, klasifikasiya modelinin işlərinin kaybını modelinin s özləri inkişaf etmə səviyyəsində müdafiə edilməmiş köməkçi kaybıyla uzatırıq. Bu, öyrənilmiş sözlərin təsirlərinin hər ikisinin işləri müəyyən edilmiş xüsusiyyətlərinin içində olmasını əmin etmək üçün, gözləyirlən ziyan komponentdən öyrənilmiş və müəyyən edilməmiş zəiflik komponentdən öyrənilmiş çox genel xüsusiy Biz müəyyən vaxtlı əlaqələr çıxarılması məqsədilə, özlərinə də, kliniki kayıtlardan çıxarılması haqqında danışmaq məqsədilə müəyyən edilməyən məqsədilə birlikdə müəyyən edilməmiş məqsədilə birlikdə müəyyən edilməyən məqsədilə birlikdə müəyyən edilmə məqsədilə daha yaxşı işin müəyyən edilməsi və THYME veri qutusundakı sanatın məq Sözlük etiketçisini dil çoxluğu kimi istifadə edir.', 'et': 'Järelevalveta eelnevalt koolitatud sõnade manustamist kasutatakse tõhusalt paljude looduskeelte töötlemise ülesannete puhul, et kasutada märgistamata tekstiandmeid. Sageli kasutatakse neid manustamisi kas initsialiseerimisena või fikseeritud sõnaesitustena ülesandespetsiifiliste klassifitseerimismudelite jaoks. Käesolevas töös laiendame oma klassifitseerimismudeli ülesannete kaotust järelevalveta abikaoga mudeli sõna-manustamise tasemel. Sellega tagatakse, et õppitud sõnade esitused sisaldavad nii ülesandepõhiseid funktsioone, mis on õppitud järelevalve alla kuuluva kahju komponendist, kui ka üldisemaid funktsioone, mis on õppinud järelevalveta kahju komponendist. Hindame oma lähenemisviisi ajaliste suhete ekstraheerimise ülesandele, eelk kasutatakse keelelise ressursina ainult ülddomeeni kõneosa sildistajat.', 'fi': 'Tarkkailemattomia esikoulutettuja sanaupotuksia käytetään tehokkaasti monissa luonnollisen kielen käsittelytehtävissä, joilla voidaan hyödyntää merkitsemättömiä tekstitietoja. Usein näitä upotuksia käytetään joko alustuksina tai kiinteinä sanaesityksinä tehtäväkohtaisissa luokitusmalleissa. Tässä työssä laajennamme luokittelumallimme tehtävähäviötä valvomattomalla apuhäviöllä mallin sanaupotustasolla. Näin varmistetaan, että opitut sanaesitykset sisältävät sekä valvotusta tappiokomponentista opittuja tehtäväkohtaisia ominaisuuksia että valvomattomasta tappiokomponentista opittuja yleisempiä ominaisuuksia. Arvioimme lähestymistapaamme ajallisten suhteiden erottamiseen, erityisesti narratiivisen säilöntäsuhteen erottamiseen kliinisistä rekistereistä, ja osoitamme, että valvomattomaan tavoitteeseen liittyvien upotusten jatkuva koulutus yhdessä tehtävätavoitteen kanssa parantaa tehtäväkohtaista upotusta ja parantaa THYME-aineiston nykytilaa. käyttää kielellisenä resurssina vain yleistä puheen osamerkintää.', 'sk': 'Nenadzorovane vnaprej usposobljene vdelave besed se učinkovito uporabljajo za številna opravila pri obdelavi naravnega jezika, da izkoristijo neoznačene besedilne podatke. Pogosto se te vdelave uporabljajo kot inicializacije ali kot fiksne besede za modele klasifikacije, specifične za opravila. V tem delu razširimo izgubo nalog našega klasifikacijskega modela z nenadzorovano pomožno izgubo na ravni vgradnje besed modela. S tem se zagotovi, da predstavitve učenih besed vsebujejo značilnosti, specifične za opravilo, ki se jih nauči komponenta nadzorovane izgube, in splošnejše značilnosti, ki se naučijo iz komponente izgube brez nadzora. Ocenjujemo naš pristop k nalogi ekstrakcije časovnih relacij, zlasti ekstrakcije pripovednih relacij zadrževanja iz kliničnih evidenc, in pokažemo, da nadaljnje usposabljanje vključitev v nenadzorovan cilj skupaj s ciljem naloge omogoča boljše vključevanje posameznih nalog in izboljšanje v primerjavi z najsodobnejšim stanjem podatkovnega nabora THYME, uporablja samo označevalnik dela govora s splošno domeno kot jezikovni vir.', 'ha': "QRegExp QXml Daga wannan aikin, Munã ƙara hasara na misalin misalinmu mai fassarawa da wata hasãra ba da tsari ba a sami tsare kan zane-faɗi cikin zane-faɗi na motel. Wannan na so dõmin ka yi amfani da shaidar maganar da aka sanar su ƙunsa da duk misfealumi na aikin, an sanar daga componin hasãra da aka tsare, kuma da tsari masu ƙaranci daga componin haske da aka tsare. Tuna ƙaddara hanyoyinmu a kan aikin zartar da masu mutane, hususan, masu fitarwa na haɗi da mazaɓa daga littafin nan da aka haife shi, kuma ke nũna cewa ana ƙara wa tsarin da aka tsare shi a kan abun da ba'a tsare shi ba sami tare da goan aikin, yana bãyar da mafiya amfani ga aikin da aka ƙayyade mafaka, kuma yana ƙara ƙaranci a kan halin sanar da na zaluman da za'a daidaita ta WYME, dictionary variant", 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Slackfree Text editor Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé nggawe geraksi barêng-barêng langkung nggambar luwih dumadhi, ning ngomong, aturan tanggal ngéwangaké katêpakan tanggal winih sing katêpakan karo ingkang injijolan sing ora bisa nguasai winih sing luwih dumadhi iki ngono nggawe aksi iki dadi sing ngendaliké nggawe geraksi ora oleh dumadhi, lan balik dhéwé ngerasai kapan kanggo Kelangan dataset Using only a General-domain share-of-language tagger as language language source.', 'he': "תוספות מילים לא מאומנות מראש משתמשות באופן יעיל למשימות רבות בעבודת שפת טבעית לעתים קרובות השימוש בתור ניזליזציות או בתור מילים קבועות למודלים מסוימים למשימות. In this work, we extend our classification model's task loss with an unsupervised auxiliary loss on the word-embedding level of the model.  זה כדי להבטיח שהמילים הנלמדות מכילות שני תכונות מסויימות למשימה, שנלמדו מרכיב האובדן המשגיח, והתכונות יותר כלליות שנלמדו מרכיב האובדן הלא משגיח. אנו מעריכים את הגישה שלנו על המשימה של חיפוש מערכת יחסים זמנית, במיוחד, חיפוש מערכת היחסים סיפורית מרשומות קליניים, ולהראות שהאימון המשיכי של התקפים על המטרה הלא מושגת יחד עם המטרה נותן תוקפים מסוימים למשימות טובים יותר, ומתוצאות בשיפור על המצב של המידע של THYME, - להשתמש רק בחלק כללי של תג הנאום כמשאב שפתי.", 'bo': 'རང་བཟོས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་སྔོན་གྲངས་ཀྱི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ནང་གི་བྱ་འགུལ་མང་ཙམ་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ། སྤྱད་དུས་ཀྱིས་གནས་སྟངས་འདི་དག་ལས་འགོ་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་འགོ་འཛུགས་དང་འཛུགས་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་སྟོན་པ་ལ་འཛུགས་ཡོད་པ། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ This is to ensure that the learned word representations contain both task-specific features, learned from the supervised loss component, and more general features learned from the unsupervised loss component. ང་ཚོས་རང་གི་མཐུན་སྣེ་ཚོར་འཕར་རིས་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་བྱ་ཚུལ་དེ་དམིགས་བསལ་བ། དམིགས་བསལ་ན། གནད་སྡུད་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་ནས་འཕར་རིས་བཀོད་པ་དང་ནང་དུ་འཕྲོ་མཐུད་ཡོད་པའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འཇུ སྐད་རིགས་ལུགས་ཀྱི་ཁོར་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁོ་ན་གཅིག་པུ་སྤྱོད་དགོས་པ་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Punctuation as Native Language Interference', 'ar': 'علامات الترقيم كتدخل في اللغة الأصلية', 'fr': "La ponctuation en tant qu'interférence de la langue maternelle", 'es': 'La puntuación como interferencia en el idioma nativo', 'pt': 'Pontuação como interferência de idioma nativo', 'ja': '母国語としての句読点の干渉', 'zh': '标点符号为母语所干', 'hi': 'मूल भाषा हस्तक्षेप के रूप में विराम चिह्न', 'ru': 'Пунктуация как вмешательство в родной язык', 'ga': 'Poncaíocht mar Chur isteach Teanga Dúchais', 'ka': 'სპენტექსუცია როგორც მსოფლიო ენის ინტერფერენცია', 'hu': 'Pontozás, mint anyanyelv interferencia', 'el': 'Στοιχεία ως παρεμβολή μητρικής γλώσσας', 'it': 'Punteggiatura come interferenza della lingua nativa', 'kk': 'Түпнұсқа тіл интерференциясы ретінде белгілеу', 'lt': 'Punctuation as Native Language Interference', 'mk': 'Пунктуација како интерференција на роден јазик', 'ms': 'Punktuasi sebagai Interferensi Bahasa asli', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഭാഷയുടെ ഇടപെടുത്താനുള്ള ശ്രദ്ധ', 'mn': 'Түүнчлэн хэл интерференц гэдэг тодорхойлолт', 'mt': 'Puntwazzjoni bħala Interferenza fil-Lingwa Nativa', 'no': 'Teikningar som følgjande språk- grensesnitt', 'pl': 'Interpunkcja jako zakłócenie języka ojczystego', 'ro': 'Punctuația ca interferență de limbă nativă', 'sr': 'Punkcija kao prirodni jezik Interferencija', 'si': 'ස්ථානික භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ විරාම විරාම', 'so': 'Punctuation as Native Language Interference', 'sv': 'Punktuering som modersmål störning', 'ta': 'இயல்பான மொழி இடைவெளி', 'ur': 'نقطہ جگہ زبان انٹرنفرنس کی طرح', 'vi': 'Chấm câu như xâm nhập ngôn ngữ', 'uz': 'Tashkilot', 'bg': 'Точка като интерференция на родния език', 'nl': 'Interferentie als interferentie in de moedertaal', 'da': 'Punktuering som indfødselssprog interferens', 'de': 'Interferenz in der Muttersprache', 'hr': 'Interferencija prirodnog jezika', 'id': 'Punktuasi sebagai Interferensi Bahasa asli', 'ko': '모국어 문장부호로서의 방해', 'fa': 'نقاط به عنوان تفاوت زبان طبیعی', 'sw': 'Kuzuia lugha za asili', 'af': 'Punktuasie as Natief Taal Interference', 'tr': 'Natal dil nişanlary häzirki', 'sq': 'Punktuimi si Ndërhyrje e gjuhës vendase', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Պունկցիան որպես բնիկ լեզվի ինտերֆերանս', 'az': 'Doğul Dil Interferencisi kimi Noqtalama', 'bs': 'Interferencija prirodnog jezika', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার ইন্টারফেন্স হিসেবে প্Punctuation', 'ca': 'La puntuació com a interferència en la llengua nativa', 'cs': 'Interpunkce jako narušení rodného jazyka', 'et': 'Punktsioon emakeele sekkumisena', 'fi': 'Välitys äidinkielen häiriönä', 'jv': 'Punctuation', 'ha': 'QShortcut', 'sk': 'Ločevanje kot motnje v maternem jeziku', 'he': 'הנקודה בתור הפרעה לשפה האמיתית', 'bo': 'སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་བར་ཐད་སྙམ།'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we describe experiments designed to explore and evaluate the impact of punctuation marks on the task of native language identification. Punctuation is specific to each language, and is part of the indicators that overtly represent the manner in which each language organizes and conveys information. Our experiments are organized in various set-ups : the usual multi-class classification for individual languages, also considering classification by language groups, across different proficiency levels, topics and even cross-corpus. The results support our hypothesis that punctuation marks are persistent and robust indicators of the native language of the author, which do not diminish in influence even when a high proficiency level in a non-native language is achieved.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نصف التجارب المصممة لاستكشاف وتقييم تأثير علامات الترقيم على مهمة تحديد اللغة الأم. علامات الترقيم خاصة بكل لغة ، وهي جزء من المؤشرات التي تمثل صراحة الطريقة التي تنظم بها كل لغة المعلومات وتنقلها. يتم تنظيم تجاربنا في مجموعات مختلفة: التصنيف المعتاد متعدد الفئات للغات الفردية ، مع الأخذ في الاعتبار أيضًا التصنيف حسب المجموعات اللغوية ، عبر مستويات الكفاءة المختلفة ، والموضوعات وحتى المجموعات المتقاطعة. تدعم النتائج فرضيتنا القائلة بأن علامات الترقيم هي مؤشرات ثابتة وقوية للغة الأم للمؤلف ، والتي لا تتضاءل في التأثير حتى عند تحقيق مستوى إتقان عالٍ للغة غير الأم.', 'es': 'En este artículo, describimos experimentos diseñados para explorar y evaluar el impacto de los signos de puntuación en la tarea de identificación del idioma nativo. La puntuación es específica de cada idioma y forma parte de los indicadores que representan abiertamente la manera en que cada idioma organiza y transmite la información. Nuestros experimentos se organizan en varias configuraciones: la clasificación habitual de varias clases para idiomas individuales, también teniendo en cuenta la clasificación por grupos de idiomas, en diferentes niveles de dominio, temas e incluso corpus cruzados. Los resultados apoyan nuestra hipótesis de que los signos de puntuación son indicadores persistentes y sólidos del idioma nativo del autor, que no disminuyen en influencia incluso cuando se alcanza un alto nivel de dominio de un idioma no nativo.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous décrivons des expériences conçues pour explorer et évaluer l'impact des signes de ponctuation sur la tâche d'identification de la langue maternelle. La ponctuation est spécifique à chaque langue et fait partie des indicateurs qui représentent ouvertement la manière dont chaque langue organise et transmet l'information. Nos expériences sont organisées selon différentes configurations\xa0: la classification multi-classes habituelle pour les langues individuelles, prenant également en compte la classification par groupes de langues, selon différents niveaux de compétence, sujets et même entre corpus. Les résultats confirment notre hypothèse selon laquelle les signes de ponctuation sont des indicateurs persistants et robustes de la langue maternelle de l'auteur, dont l'influence ne diminue pas même lorsqu'un haut niveau de compétence dans une langue non maternelle est atteint.", 'pt': 'Neste artigo, descrevemos experimentos projetados para explorar e avaliar o impacto dos sinais de pontuação na tarefa de identificação da língua nativa. A pontuação é específica para cada idioma e faz parte dos indicadores que representam abertamente a maneira como cada idioma organiza e transmite informações. Nossos experimentos são organizados em várias configurações: a usual classificação multiclasse para idiomas individuais, considerando também a classificação por grupos de idiomas, em diferentes níveis de proficiência, tópicos e até corpus cruzados. Os resultados corroboram nossa hipótese de que os sinais de pontuação são indicadores persistentes e robustos da língua nativa do autor, que não diminuem em influência mesmo quando se alcança um alto nível de proficiência em uma língua não nativa.', 'ja': '本稿では，母語識別の課題に対する句読点の影響を探求し，評価するための実験について述べる．句読点は各言語に固有のものであり、各言語が情報を整理して伝える方法を明確に表す指標の一部である。私たちの実験は、さまざまな設定で組織されています。個々の言語の通常のマルチクラス分類、言語グループによる分類、さまざまな熟練度レベル、トピック、さらにはクロスコーパスを考慮しています。この結果は、句読点が著者の母語の持続的で堅牢な指標であり、非母語の高い熟練度を達成しても影響力が低下しないという仮説を裏付けている。', 'zh': '本文之中,述指探估标点符号母语识事之实验。 标点符号者,言之所有也,指标之所指标也,明指标言之所传也。 臣等实验以诸设为率,常以单言多类类,亦思按语组,不同熟练程度,主题至跨语料库分之。 故持我者,标点符号人母语之久指标,虽非母语之高熟练程度,其影响力不衰。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम मूल भाषा की पहचान के कार्य पर विराम चिह्नों के प्रभाव का पता लगाने और मूल्यांकन करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किए गए प्रयोगों का वर्णन करते हैं। विराम चिह्न प्रत्येक भाषा के लिए विशिष्ट है, और संकेतकों का हिस्सा है जो स्पष्ट रूप से उस तरीके का प्रतिनिधित्व करते हैं जिसमें प्रत्येक भाषा संगठित होती है और जानकारी व्यक्त करती है। हमारे प्रयोगों को विभिन्न सेट-अप में व्यवस्थित किया जाता है: व्यक्तिगत भाषाओं के लिए सामान्य बहु-वर्ग वर्गीकरण, विभिन्न दक्षता स्तरों, विषयों और यहां तक कि क्रॉस-कॉर्पस में भाषा समूहों द्वारा वर्गीकरण पर भी विचार किया जाता है। परिणाम हमारी परिकल्पना का समर्थन करते हैं कि विराम चिह्न लेखक की मूल भाषा के लगातार और मजबूत संकेतक हैं, जो गैर-देशी भाषा में उच्च प्रवीणता स्तर प्राप्त होने पर भी प्रभाव में कमी नहीं करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В данной работе мы описываем эксперименты, предназначенные для изучения и оценки влияния знаков препинания на задачу идентификации родного языка. Знаки препинания специфичны для каждого языка и являются частью показателей, которые открыто представляют то, как каждый язык организует и передает информацию. Наши эксперименты организованы в различные структуры: обычная многоклассовая классификация для отдельных языков, также с учетом классификации по языковым группам, по различным уровням квалификации, темам и даже кросс-корпусу. Результаты подтверждают нашу гипотезу о том, что знаки препинания являются стойкими и надежными показателями родного языка автора, которые не уменьшаются по влиянию даже при достижении высокого уровня владения неродным языком.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid cur síos ar thurgnaimh atá deartha chun tionchar na marcanna poncaíochta ar thasc aithint teanga dhúchais a iniúchadh agus a mheas. Baineann an phoncaíocht go sonrach le gach teanga, agus tá sé mar chuid de na táscairí a léiríonn go soiléir an bealach a eagraíonn agus a chuireann gach teanga faisnéis in iúl. Eagraítear ár dturgnaimh i socruithe éagsúla: an gnáthrangú ilrang do theangacha aonair, ag smaoineamh freisin ar aicmiú de réir grúpaí teanga, thar leibhéil éagsúla oilteachta, topaicí agus fiú traschorpais. Tacaíonn na torthaí lenár hipitéis gur táscairí seasta agus láidre ar theanga dhúchais an údair iad na marcanna poncaíochta, nach laghdaítear tionchar fiú nuair a bhaintear leibhéal ard oilteachta amach sa teanga neamhdhúchais.', 'el': 'Στην παρούσα εργασία περιγράφονται πειράματα σχεδιασμένα για να διερευνήσουν και να αξιολογήσουν την επίδραση των σημείων στίξης στο έργο της ταυτοποίησης της μητρικής γλώσσας. Η στίξη είναι ειδική για κάθε γλώσσα και αποτελεί μέρος των δεικτών που αντιπροσωπεύουν ανοιχτά τον τρόπο με τον οποίο κάθε γλώσσα οργανώνει και μεταφέρει πληροφορίες. Τα πειράματά μας οργανώνονται σε διάφορες συνθέσεις: τη συνήθη πολυταξική ταξινόμηση για μεμονωμένες γλώσσες, λαμβάνοντας επίσης υπόψη την ταξινόμηση ανά γλωσσικές ομάδες, σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα επάρκειας, θέματα και ακόμη και σε πολλαπλά σώματα. Τα αποτελέσματα υποστηρίζουν την υπόθεσή μας ότι τα στίγματα είναι επίμονες και ισχυροί δείκτες της μητρικής γλώσσας του συγγραφέα, οι οποίοι δεν μειώνονται στην επιρροή ακόμη και όταν επιτυγχάνεται υψηλό επίπεδο επάρκειας σε μια μη μητρική γλώσσα.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban az írásjelek anyanyelvi azonosítási feladatra gyakorolt hatásának feltárására és értékelésére irányuló kísérleteket ismertetjük. A pontozás az egyes nyelvekre jellemző, és része azoknak a mutatóknak, amelyek nyíltan képviselik az egyes nyelvek információszervezésének és továbbításának módját. Kísérleteink különböző összeállításokban vannak szervezve: az egyes nyelvek szokásos többosztályú osztályozása, figyelembe véve a nyelvcsoportok szerinti osztályozást, különböző jártassági szinteket, témákat és akár keresztkorpuszt is. Az eredmények alátámasztják hipotézisünket, miszerint az írásjelek a szerző anyanyelvének tartós és erőteljes mutatói, amelyek még akkor sem csökkennek a hatásuk, ha magas szintű nem anyanyelvű nyelvtudást érnek el.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუმენტში ჩვენ აღწერეთ ექსპერიმენტები, რომელიც განაკეთებული იდენტიფიკაციის სამუშაო ენისთვის მონაცემების შედეგი და გავაკეთებთ. სპენტექცია ყოველ ენაზე განსაკუთრებულია, და იყო ინდექტორიების ნაწილი, რომლებიც ყოველ ენაზე ინფორმაცია და ინფორმაცია დააყენება. ჩვენი ექსპერიმენტები განსხვავებული კონფიგურაციაში ორგანიზებულია: განსხვავებული მრავალი კლასიფიკაცია განსხვავებული ენებისთვის, და კონფიგურაციას ენებისთვის ჯგუფებისთვის, განსხვავებული პროფი წარმოდგენები ჩვენი ჰიპოტეზეზაში იმუშაობენ, რომ პონქტუციის ნიშვნები მუშაობელია და ძალიან ინდექტირები ავტორის დედაქალური ენაზე, რომლებიც არ შემცირებენ ინტექტირებში, მაგრამ როდესაც', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, тіл тілді идентификациясының тапсырмасының нәтижесін зерттеу және оқу үшін құрылған тәжірибелерді анықтаймыз. Айнымалылар әрбір тіл үшін белгіленген, әрбір тіл туралы мәліметті құрастырып беретін индикаторлардың бөлігі. Біздің тәжірибеміз әртүрлі баптауларында орнатылады: әдеттегі көптеген тілдер үшін бірнеше класс классификациясы, сондай-ақ тіл топтарының классификациясын, әртүрлі профильдік деңгейінде, нақы Нәтижелер біздің гипотезамызды таңбалау белгілері автордың негізгі тілінің тұрақты және құпты индикаторларын қолдайды. Бұл әрекеттер негізгі тілдегі профильдік деңгейіндегі жоғары деңгейінде жеткізілме', 'it': "In questo articolo, descriviamo esperimenti progettati per esplorare e valutare l'impatto dei segni di punteggiatura sul compito di identificazione della lingua madre. La punteggiatura è specifica per ogni lingua e fa parte degli indicatori che rappresentano apertamente il modo in cui ogni lingua organizza e trasmette le informazioni. I nostri esperimenti sono organizzati in vari set-up: la consueta classificazione multi-classe per singole lingue, considerando anche la classificazione per gruppi linguistici, attraverso diversi livelli di competenza, argomenti e persino cross-corpus. I risultati confermano la nostra ipotesi che i segni di punteggiatura siano indicatori persistenti e robusti della lingua madre dell'autore, che non diminuiscono di influenza anche quando si raggiunge un alto livello di competenza in una lingua non nativa.", 'lt': 'In this paper, we describe experiments designed to explore and evaluate the impact of punctuation marks on the task of native language identification.  Punktuacija yra konkreči kiekvienai kalbai ir yra rodiklių, kurie akivaizdžiai rodo, kaip kiekviena kalba organizuoja ir perduoda informaciją, dalis. Mūsų eksperimentai organizuojami įvairiose grupėse: įprasta įvairių klasių klasifikacija atskiroms kalboms, taip pat atsižvelgiant į klasifikavimą pagal kalbų grupes, įvairius kompetencijos lygius, temas ir net tarpusavio klasifikavimą. Rezultatai patvirtina mūsų hipotezę, kad taškų žymenys yra nuolatiniai ir patikimi autoriaus gimtinės kalbos rodikliai, kurie nepamažėja įtakos net tuo atveju, kai pasiekiamas aukštas ne gimtinės kalbos įgūdžių lygis.', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, опишуваме експерименти дизајнирани за истражување и оценка на влијанието на точките на задачата на идентификацијата на родниот јазик. Пунктуацијата е специфична за секој јазик и е дел од индикаторите кои очигледно го претставуваат начинот на кој секој јазик организира и пренесува информации. Нашите експерименти се организирани во различни поставувања: вообичаената мултикласификација за индивидуални јазици, исто така земајќи во предвид класификацијата по јазички групи, преку различни нивоа на вештина, теми и дури преку корпус. Резултатите ја поддржуваат нашата хипотеза дека точните знаци се постојани и силни индикатори на родниот јазик на авторот, кои не намалуваат влијанието дури и кога се постигнува високо ниво на способност на нероден јазик.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. നാട്ടിലെ ഭാഷയുടെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാഷണത്തിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാ പ്രതികാരം ഓരോ ഭാഷയ്ക്കും പ്രത്യേകിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു, അതിന്റെ അടയാളങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു ഭാഗമാണ്, ഓരോ ഭാഷ സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുകയും വിവരങ നമ്മുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വ്യവസ്ഥകളില്\u200d സംഘടിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു: വ്യക്തിപരമായ പല-ക്ലാസ്സിന്റെ ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d സാധാരണ ഭാഷകള്\u200d ഈ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഹൈപ്പിയറ്റിനെ പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്നു. പാങ്ക്ഷന്\u200d ചിഹ്നങ്ങള്\u200d നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നതും രചയിതാവിന്റെ നാട്ടിലെ ഭാഷയുടെ അടയാളങ്ങളാണെന്നും, അത് പ', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan eksperimen yang direka untuk mengeksplorasi dan menilai kesan tanda titik pada tugas pengenalan bahasa asli. Titik adalah spesifik bagi setiap bahasa, dan adalah sebahagian dari indikator yang mewakili secara jelas cara setiap bahasa mengatur dan menyebarkan maklumat. Eksperimen kami disediakan dalam berbagai set-up: klasifikasi berbilang-kelas biasa untuk bahasa individu, juga mempertimbangkan klasifikasi oleh kumpulan bahasa, melalui aras kemampuan berbeza, topik dan bahkan cross-corpus. Hasilnya menyokong hipotesis kita bahawa tanda titik adalah indikator terus menerus dan kuat bahasa asli penulis, yang tidak mengurangi pengaruh walaupun aras keterampilan tinggi dalam bahasa bukan asli dicapai.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, aħna niddeskrivu esperimenti mfassla biex jesploraw u jevalwaw l-impatt tal-marki ta’ puntwazzjoni fuq il-kompitu tal-identifikazzjoni tal-lingwa nattiva. Il-puntwazzjoni hija speċifika għal kull lingwa, u hija parti mill-indikaturi li jirrappreżentaw b’mod ċar il-mod li bih kull lingwa torganizza u tgħaddi l-informazzjoni. Our experiments are organized in various set-ups: the usual multi-class classification for individual languages, also considering classification by language groups, across different proficiency levels, topics and even cross-corpus.  Ir-riżultati jappoġġjaw l-ipoteżi tagħna li l-marki ta’ puntwazzjoni huma indikaturi persistenti u robusti tal-lingwa nattiva tal-awtur, li ma jnaqqsux fl-influwenza anki meta jintlaħaq livell għoli ta’ profiċjenza f’lingwa mhux nattiva.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид үндэсний хэлний идентификацийн даалгаврын нөлөөг судалж, үнэлгээд зориулсан туршилтуудыг тайлбарлаж байна. Загвар нь хэл бүрт тодорхой бөгөөд хэл бүрт мэдээллийг зохион байгуулж, хуваалцдаг загваруудын нэг хэсэг юм. Бидний туршилтууд олон төрлийн байгууллагуудад зохион байгуулагддаг: хэл бүлэгтэй ихэвчлэн олон төрлийн ангилал, хэл бүлэгтэй ангилалд, өөр мэргэжлийн түвшинд, сэдэв болон cross-corpus хүртэл ангилалдаг. Үүний үр дүнд бидний тодорхойлолтыг дэмжиж байна гэвэл тодорхойлолтын тэмдэгт нь зохиолчдын эх хэл дээрх чадварын түвшинд хүртэл багасгаж чадахгүй байдаг.', 'pl': 'W artykule opisano eksperymenty mające na celu zbadanie i ocenę wpływu znaków interpunkcyjnych na zadanie identyfikacji języka ojczystego. Interpunkcja jest specyficzna dla każdego języka i jest częścią wskaźników, które jawnie reprezentują sposób, w jaki każdy język organizuje i przekazuje informacje. Nasze eksperymenty organizowane są w różnych konfiguracjach: zwykłą wieloklasową klasyfikację dla poszczególnych języków, uwzględniającą również klasyfikację według grup językowych, na różnych poziomach biegłości, tematykę, a nawet między korpusami. Wyniki wspierają naszą hipotezę, że znaki interpunkcyjne są trwałymi i solidnymi wskaźnikami języka ojczystego autora, które nie zmniejszają wpływu nawet przy osiągnięciu wysokiego poziomu znajomości języka nieojczystego.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, descriem experimente menite să exploreze și să evalueze impactul semnelor de punctuație asupra sarcinii identificării limbii materne. Punctuația este specifică fiecărei limbi și face parte din indicatorii care reprezintă în mod evident modul în care fiecare limbă organizează și transmite informații. Experimentele noastre sunt organizate în diferite setup-uri: clasificarea obișnuită pe mai multe clase pentru limbi individuale, luând în considerare și clasificarea pe grupuri lingvistice, pe diferite niveluri de competență, teme și chiar cross-corpus. Rezultatele susțin ipoteza noastră că semnele de punctuație sunt indicatori permanenți și robusti ai limbii materne a autorului, care nu diminuează influența chiar și atunci când se atinge un nivel ridicat de competență într-o limbă non-nativă.', 'no': 'I denne papiret beskriver vi eksperimenter designert for å utforska og evaluera effekten av punktmerker på oppgåva av identifikasjonen av språk. Punktering er spesifisert for kvar språk, og er ein del av indikatorene som viser korleis kvar språk organiserer og konverterer informasjon. Eksperimentane våre er organiserte i ulike oppsett: den vanlege multiklassesklassifikasjonen for individuelle språk, også gjennom klassifikasjonen etter språkkgrupper, på ulike profilenivå, emne og til og med kryskorpus. Resultatet støttar hypotesien vårt at punktmerke er persistent og robust indikatorer for den mottalespråken av forfatteren, som ikkje minner i påvirkninga sjølv når ein høg proficiencnivå i eit ikkje-mottalespråk er oppnådd.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo eksperimente dizajnirane za istraživanje i procjenu utjecaja znakova tačke na zadatak identifikacije jezika. Punkcija je specifična svakom jeziku, a to je deo indikatora koji predstavljaju način na koji svaki jezik organizuje i prenosi informacije. Naši eksperimenti su organizovani u različitim organizacijama: uobičajena multiklasična klasifikacija za pojedinačne jezike, takođe razmatrajući klasifikaciju jezičkih grupa, na različitim nivoima profila, temama i čak preko korpusa. Rezultati podržavaju našu hipotezu da su znakovi punkcije stalni i robni pokazivači rodnog jezika autora, koji ne smanjuju uticaj čak i kada se postigne visoka nivo profila na jeziku koji nije rođen.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පරීක්ෂණයක් විශ්වාස කරලා තියෙන්නේ ඉදිරිය භාෂාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්ෂණය ස විරාම විරාම විශේෂය හැම භාෂාවට විශේෂයි, ඒ වගේම සංඥාකයේ කොටස් කියලා හැම භාෂාව සංයෝජනය සහ තොරතු අපේ පරීක්ෂණය විවිධ සැටුම් වලට සැකසුම් කරලා තියෙනවා: සාමාන්\u200dය විශේෂ භාෂාවට විවිධ විශේෂ භාෂාවට, භාෂාව කණ්ඩායම් වල ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'so': 'Qoraalkan waxaynu ku qornaa imtixaanka loo qoray baaritaanka iyo qiimeynta saamaynta calaamadaha jidhka ee shaqada aqoonsiga afka hooyo. Waqtiga la qabsashada waxaa ku qoran luqad kasta, wuxuuna ka mid yahay mid ka mid ah calaamadaha aad u muuqata qaabka luqad walba lagu qabanayo oo lagu soo bandhigo macluumaad. Imtixaanadayada waxaa lagu qabanqaabiyaa kooxo kala duduwan: sida caadiga ah fasalka kala duduwan ee luuqadaha gaarka ah, waxaana sidoo kale ka fiirsanaya kooxaha luqada, heerarka aqoonta kala duduwan, maadooyinka iyo xittaa korpus. Sababtaasu waxay kaalmeeyaan labawejiyadeena in calaamadaha punctuuxa ay yihiin mid ku socda iyo waxyaabaha lagu tuuro luqada qofka qoraalka ah, taas oo aan saameyn ku dhimin xittaa marka lagu gaadho heerka aqoonta sare ee afka aan hooyo ahayn.', 'sv': 'I den här uppsatsen beskriver vi experiment som syftar till att utforska och utvärdera skiljetecken på uppgiften att identifiera modersmål. Punktueringen är specifik för varje språk och är en del av indikatorerna som tydligt representerar det sätt på vilket varje språk organiserar och förmedlar information. Våra experiment är organiserade i olika uppställningar: den vanliga flerklassklassificeringen för enskilda språk, även med hänsyn till klassificering efter språkgrupper, över olika kunskapsnivåer, ämnen och till och med korskorpus. Resultaten stöder vår hypotes att skiljetecken är ihållande och robusta indikatorer på författarens modersmål, som inte minskar i inflytande även när en hög kunskapsnivå i ett främmande språk uppnås.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்க மற்றும் பாங்கு குறியீட்டின் விளைவை மதிப்பிடுவதற்கு வடிவமைக்கப்பட்ட சோதனைகளை விவர Punctuation is specific to each language, and is part of the indicators that overrepresents the way in which each language organizes and conveys information. நம்முடைய சோதனைகள் பல வகுப்புகளில் நிறுவப்பட்டுள்ளது: தனியார் மொழிகளுக்கு வழக்கமான பல்வகுப்பு வகுப்பு, மொழி குழுக்களால் வகுப்புகளை பார்த்து, வேறு  முடிவுகள் எங்கள் குறிப்புகளை ஆதரிக்கிறது நிலையான மற்றும் ஆசிரியரின் நாட்ட மொழியின் குறிக்குறிகள் நிலையாக இருக்கும், அது பாதிப்பில் குறைக்கவில்', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں تفسیر کر رہے ہیں کہ مٹی زبان کی شناسایی کے کام پر نقطہ نشانیوں کے اثر کا تحقیق اور ارزش کرنے کے لئے طراحی کیا گیا ہے۔ Punctuation is specific to each language, and is part of the indicators that represent the way in which each language organizes and conveys information. ہماری آزمائش مختلف سٹ آپ میں سازمائش کی گئی ہے: ایک زبان کے لئے معمول multi-class classification، زبان گروہوں کے ذریعہ بھی کلاسیفوں کے ذریعہ، مختلف پروفسونسی سطح، موضوع اور حتی cross-corpus کے ذریعہ بھی مشورہ کیا جاتا ہے. نتیجے ہمارے فرضی کی مدد کرتے ہیں کہ نقطہ نشانیاں لکھنے والے کی ملک زبان کی ثابت اور ثابت نشانیاں ہیں، جو اثرات میں کمی نہیں کرتی اگرچہ ایک غیر ملک زبان میں ایک بلند پروفسی سطح پہنچ جاتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda, biz natiy tillar identifikasining vazifasini aniqlash va qidirish uchun yaratilgan tajribalarni anglatamiz. Davom etish har bir tillar uchun koʻrsatilgan, va har tillar boshqaruvchi va maʼlumotni qabul qiladigan xizmatlarning bir qismi. Bizning tajribalarimiz har xil tarmoqlar bilan qo'llangan: oddiy har xil tillar uchun ko'plab darajasining bir xil darajasi darajasi, va tillar guruhlari bilan ta'limni tasdiqlashni anglatmoqchimiz, har xil darajada, mavzular va har bir necha korpus. Natijalarni qo'llaydigan fikrlarni qo'llaydi, mualliflarning native tilini davom etish va roʻy qilish imkoniyatlarini qo'shish mumkin. Bu mualliflar natijadagi tillardan foydalanishi haqida o'zgarishni kamaytmaydi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi mô tả các thí nghiệm được thiết kế để khám phá và đánh giá tác động của dấu chấm (dấu chấm điểm) vào nhiệm vụ nhận diện ngôn ngữ bản xứ. Sự chấm điểm là đặc trưng cho mỗi ngôn ngữ, và là một phần của những diễn biến rõ ràng đại diện cho cách mà mỗi ngôn ngữ tổ chức và chuyển thông tin. Các thí nghiệm của chúng tôi được tổ chức trong nhiều nhóm, loại đa hạng thông thường cho các ngôn ngữ riêng, cũng xem xét phân loại bởi các nhóm ngôn ngữ, trải qua các trình độ, các chủ đề và thậm chí cả thể chất. Kết quả ủng hộ giả thuyết của chúng ta rằng dấu chấm là những dấu hiệu bền vững và vững chắc của ngôn ngữ tự do tác giả, mà không giảm tác động kể cả khi đạt được một mức độ thuận lợi cao trong ngôn ngữ không thổ.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel beschrijven we experimenten ontworpen om de impact van interpunctietekens op de taak van identificatie van moedertaal te onderzoeken en te evalueren. Interpunctie is specifiek voor elke taal en maakt deel uit van de indicatoren die openlijk de manier weergeven waarop elke taal informatie organiseert en overbrengt. Onze experimenten zijn georganiseerd in verschillende opstellingen: de gebruikelijke meerklassenclassificatie voor individuele talen, ook rekening houdend met classificatie per taalgroepen, over verschillende vaardigheidsniveaus, onderwerpen en zelfs cross-corpus. De resultaten ondersteunen onze hypothese dat interpunctietekens persistente en robuuste indicatoren zijn van de moedertaal van de auteur, die niet afnemen in invloed zelfs wanneer een hoog vaardigheidsniveau in een niet-moedertaal wordt bereikt.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия описваме експерименти, предназначени да изследват и оценят въздействието на пунктуационните знаци върху задачата за идентификация на родния език. Точката е специфична за всеки език и е част от показателите, които открито представят начина, по който всеки език организира и предава информация. Нашите експерименти са организирани в различни настройки: обичайната многокласна класификация за отделните езици, като се има предвид и класификация по езикови групи, на различни нива на владеене, теми и дори кръстосани корпуси. Резултатите подкрепят хипотезата ни, че пунктуационните знаци са устойчиви и стабилни индикатори за родния език на автора, които не намаляват влиянието си дори при постигане на високо ниво на владеене на чужд език.', 'da': 'I denne artikel beskriver vi eksperimenter designet til at undersøge og evaluere indvirkningen af tegnsætningsmærker på opgaven med modersmål identifikation. Punktueringen er specifik for hvert sprog og er en del af de indikatorer, der åbent repræsenterer den måde, hvorpå hvert sprog organiserer og formidler information. Vores eksperimenter er organiseret i forskellige opsætninger: den sædvanlige flerklasse klassifikation for individuelle sprog, også overvejer klassificering efter sproggrupper, på tværs af forskellige færdighedsniveauer, emner og endda cross-corpus. Resultaterne understøtter vores hypotese om, at tegnsætningsmærker er vedvarende og robuste indikatorer for forfatterens modersmål, som ikke formindsker i indflydelse, selv når der opnås et højt færdighedsniveau i et ikke-modersmål sprog.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo eksperimente dizajnirane za istraživanje i procjenu utjecaja znakova to čke na zadatak identifikacije jezika. Punkcija je specifična za svaki jezik i dio indikatora koji predstavljaju način na koji svaki jezik organizira i prenosi informacije. Naši eksperimenti su organizirani u raznim nastavama: uobičajena multiklasična klasifikacija za pojedinačne jezike, s obzirom na klasifikaciju jezičkih skupina, na različitim razinama profila, temama i čak preko korpusa. Rezultati podržavaju našu hipotezu da su znakovi punkcije stalni i robni pokazivači rodnog jezika autora, koji se ne smanjuju utjecaja čak i kada se postigne visoka razina profila na jeziku koji nije rodni.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag beschreiben wir Experimente zur Untersuchung und Bewertung des Einflusses von Interpunktionszeichen auf die Aufgabe der muttersprachlichen Identifikation. Interpunktion ist spezifisch für jede Sprache und ist Teil der Indikatoren, die offen die Art und Weise darstellen, in der jede Sprache Informationen organisiert und vermittelt. Unsere Experimente sind in verschiedenen Aufbauten organisiert: die übliche Mehrklassenklassifikation für einzelne Sprachen, auch unter Berücksichtigung der Klassifizierung nach Sprachgruppen, über verschiedene Leistungsstufen, Themen und sogar korpusübergreifend. Die Ergebnisse unterstützen unsere Hypothese, dass Satzzeichen persistente und robuste Indikatoren für die Muttersprache des Autors sind, die auch bei Erreichen eines hohen Sprachniveaus in einer Nicht-Muttersprache nicht an Einfluss verlieren.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menggambarkan eksperimen yang direncanakan untuk mengeksplorasi dan mengevaluasi dampak tanda punctuasi pada tugas identifikasi bahasa asli. Punktuasi spesifik bagi setiap bahasa, dan adalah bagian dari indikator yang jelas mewakili cara setiap bahasa mengatur dan menyebarkan informasi. Eksperimen kami terorganisir dalam berbagai set-up: klasifikasi multikelas biasa untuk bahasa individu, juga mempertimbangkan klasifikasi oleh kelompok bahasa, melalui tingkat kemampuan berbeda, topik dan bahkan cross-corpus. Hasilnya mendukung hipotesis kita bahwa tanda punctuasi adalah indikator persisten dan kuat bahasa asli penulis, yang tidak mengurangi pengaruh bahkan ketika tingkat keterampilan tinggi dalam bahasa bukan asli dicapai.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 문장부호가 모국어 식별 임무에 미치는 영향을 탐색하고 평가하기 위한 실험을 묘사했다.문장부호는 각 언어 특유의 것으로 각 언어가 정보를 조직하고 전달하는 방식을 공개적으로 나타내는 지표의 일부분이다.우리의 실험은 서로 다른 환경에서 진행되었다. 보통 개별 언어에 대한 여러 가지 분류였고 서로 다른 언어 그룹, 서로 다른 숙련 정도, 서로 다른 주제, 심지어 크로스 언어 자료 라이브러리의 분류도 고려했다.연구 결과는 문장부호가 작가의 모국어의 지속적이고 유력한 지표로 비모국어 수준이 비교적 높은 수준에 이르렀을 때도 그 영향이 약해지지 않는다는 가설을 지지했다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما آزمایش\u200cها را توصیف می\u200cکنیم که طراحی شده برای تحقیق و ارزیابی اثر نشانه\u200cهای نقطه\u200cگذاری بر وظیفه شناسایی زبان مادری است. نقطه\u200cای برای هر زبان خاص است، و بخشی از نشان\u200cدهندگان است که بالاخره روش\u200cهایی را که هر زبان اطلاعات را برگزیند و تغییر می\u200cدهد نشان می\u200cدهد. آزمایشات ما در مجموعه\u200cهای مختلف سازمان سازمان شده\u200cاند: کلاس\u200cهای مختلف برای زبان\u200cهای مختلف، همچنین با توجه به گروه\u200cهای زبان، در طبقه\u200cهای متفاوتی، موضوع\u200cهای مختلف و حتی کلاس\u200cهای متفاوتی به نظر می\u200cرسد. نتیجه\u200cها به فرضیه\u200cهای ما حمایت می\u200cکنند که نشانه\u200cهای نقطه\u200cهای نقطه\u200cهای ثابت و قوی از زبان مادری نویسنده\u200cاند، که حتی وقتی سطح دانش\u200cهای بالا در زبان غیر مادری رسیده شود، در تاثیر کمی نمی\u200cکند.', 'sw': 'In this paper, we describe experiments designed to explore and evaluate the impact of punctuation marks on the task of native language identification.  Udhibiti ni maalum kwa kila lugha, na ni sehemu ya ishara zinazoonyesha namna ambayo kila lugha huandaa na hutoa taarifa. Majaribio yetu yanaandaliwa katika makundi mbalimbali: maarufu ya darasa la aina mbalimbali kwa lugha binafsi, na pia ikifikiria kutanganisha kwa makundi ya lugha, katika viwango tofauti vya ufanisi, mada na hata vifaa vinavyovuka. Matokeo hayo yanaunga mkono nadharia yetu kwamba alama za uchunguzi ni endelevu na zinazoweka alama za lugha ya asili ya mwandishi, ambayo haipunguzi ushawishi hata kama kiwango cha juu cha ufanisi katika lugha isiyo ya asili inapofanikiwa.', 'af': "In hierdie papier beskrywe ons eksperimente ontwerp om die effekt van punktuasie merke op die taak van die taal-identifikasie te ondersoek en te evalueer. Punktuasie is spesifieke vir elke taal, en is deel van die indikators wat oorspronklik die wyse waarmee elke taal organiseer en verskyn inligting. Ons eksperimente is organiseer in verskillende opstelling: die gewoonlik multiklasklasklassifikasie vir individuele tale, ook aangesien klassifikasie deur taal groepe, oor verskillende profiesiteitsvlakke, onderwerpe en selfs cross-corpus. Die resultate ondersteun ons hipotees dat puntuasiemerke persistent en robust indikators van die moedertaal van die outeur is, wat nie verklein in influens selfs wanneer 'n hoë profiesiteitsvlak in 'n nie-natiewe taal bereik word nie.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda biz ene dillerin kimligine gözlemek we çykarmak üçin tassyklanýan deneyleri tassykladyrys. Noqtalama her dile takyk edilýär we her dil maglumaty düzenleyýän we görkezilýän görkezleriniň bir parçasidir. Biziň deneylerimiz birnäçe düzümler arasynda düzenlenýär: adatça köp klas klasifikasy birnäçe diller üçin, diller toparyna görä klasifikasyny, meýdança we hatda cross-corpus derejesinde düşünýärler. netijelerimiz biziň hipotesiýamyzda atam nişanlary awtoryň ene dilinde duran we güýçli işaretçilerini kömekleýär. Olar ene dilinde ýokary ukyplaryň üsti bir derejesi başarmaýan bolsa hem täsirleşmeýärler.', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne përshkruajmë eksperimente të dizajnuara për të eksploruar dhe vlerësuar ndikimin e shenjave pikturuese në detyrën e identifikimit të gjuhës natyrore. Punctuation is specific to each language, and is part of the indicators that overtly represent the manner in which each language organizes and conveys information.  Eksperimentet tona janë të organizuara në struktura të ndryshme: klasifikimi i zakonshëm i shumë klasave për gjuhët individuale, duke konsideruar gjithashtu klasifikimin nga grupet gjuhësore, nëpërmjet niveleve të ndryshme të aftësisë, temave dhe madje edhe ndër-korpus. Rezultatet mbështesin hipotezën tonë se shenjat e piktimit janë tregues të qëndrueshëm dhe të fortë të gjuhës natyrore të autorit, të cilat nuk zvogëlojnë ndikimin edhe kur arrihet një nivel i lartë aftësie në një gjuhë jo natyrore.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጾች ውስጥ የአገር ቋንቋ ማወቃቸውን ለመመርመር እና ለማስተዋል የሚደረገውን ፈተናዎች እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ቁጥጥር ለቋንቋው ሁሉ የተለየ ነው፣ ሁሉም ቋንቋዎች የሚያሰናክል እና መረጃዎችን የሚያሳውቀው ማሰናከል የሚለውጥ ማሳያ ክፍል ነው፡፡ ፈተናዎቻችን በተለያዩ አካባቢዎች ላይ ይዘጋጅተዋል፤ የተቀድሞ የቋንቋዎች ቋንቋዎች ለብዙዎች ክፍል እና በቋንቋው ቡድን በተለየ ልዩ አካል ደረጃዎች፣ ጉዳዮችን እና የቆርፓስ ክፍል እንኳ እንደተለያየ ነው፡፡ The results support our hypothesis that punctuation marks are persistent and robust indicators of the native language of the author, which do not diminish in influence even when a high proficiency level in a non-native language is achieved.', 'hy': "Այս թղթի մեջ մենք նկարագրում ենք փորձեր, որոնք նախագծված են որպեսզի ուսումնասիրեն և գնահատեն կետացման նշանների ազդեցությունը բնիկ լեզվի հայտնաբերման խնդրի վրա: Պունկցիան յուրաքանչյուր լեզու հատուկ է, և այն ցուցանիշների մի մասն է, որը ակնհայտորեն ներկայացնում է այն ձևը, ինչպես յուրաքանչյուր լեզու կազմակերպում է և փոխանցում է տեղեկատվությունը: Մեր փորձարկումները կազմակերպված են տարբեր կառուցվածքներում' սովորական բազմադասական դասակարգում անհատական լեզուների համար, նաև հաշվի առնելով դասակարգում լեզվի խմբերի, տարբեր մասնագիտության մակարդակների, թեմաների և նույնիսկ շրջակա Արդյունքները աջակցում են մեր հիպոթեզին, որ կետավորման նշանները հեղինակի բնիկ լեզվի մշտական և ուժեղ ցուցանիշներ են, որոնք չեն նվազում ազդեցության մեջ նույնիսկ երբ հասնում են ոչ բնիկ լեզվի բարձր մասնագիտության մակարդակի:", 'az': 'Bu kağızda, yerli dil kimliğinin işarətində nöqtələrin təsirlərini keşfetmək və değerləşdirmək üçün müəyyən edilmiş eksperimentləri təsdiq edirik. Hər dil üçün məlumatlar müəyyən edilir və hər dil məlumatları düzəltdiyi və bildirdiyi kimi məlumatların bir parçasıdır. Bizim eksperimentlərimiz müxtəlif qurğular içində organize edilmişdir: bəzisi dillər üçün çoxlu sınıf klasifikasyonu, dil qrupları ilə klasifikasyonu, müxtəlif profillik seviyeləri, məsələləri və hətta çoxlu korpuslar arasında düşünürlər. Sonuçlar bizim hipotezimizi dəstəkləyir ki, punktu işaretlərinin yazıcının anası dilinin istifadə edilməsi və güclü göstəricisidir, ki, yersiz dildə yüksək profillik seviyyəsi yetişirsə də təsir etməz.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা পরীক্ষার পরীক্ষা বর্ণনা করি যারা স্থানীয় ভাষার চিহ্নের প্রভাব বিস্ফোরণ এবং মূল্যায়ন করার জন্য পরীক্ষা করেছ Punctuation is specific to each language, and is part of the indicators that overtly represent the manner in which each language organizes and conveys information.  আমাদের পরীক্ষা বিভিন্ন সেট আপে আয়োজন করা হয়েছে: ব্যক্তিগত ভাষার জন্য সাধারণত বহুশ্রেণীর বিভিন্ন ভাষার বিভিন্ন দক্ষতা, বিষয়বস্তু এবং এমনকি ক্রাস ফলাফল আমাদের হিসেবে সমর্থন করে যে লেখকের স্থানীয় ভাষার নির্দেশকের চিহ্ন চিহ্ন চিহ্ন দেখা যাচ্ছে এবং তাদের নির্দেশক, যা কোন প্রভাব কমে যাচ্ছে না যদিও সে', 'cs': 'V tomto článku popisujeme experimenty určené k prozkoumání a hodnocení vlivu interpunkčních značek na úlohu identifikace rodného jazyka. Interpunkce je specifická pro každý jazyk a je součástí ukazatelů, které otevřeně reprezentují způsob, jakým každý jazyk organizuje a předává informace. Naše experimenty jsou organizovány v různých nastaveních: obvyklé vícetřídní klasifikace pro jednotlivé jazyky, také s ohledem na klasifikaci podle jazykových skupin, napříč různými úrovněmi znalostí, tématy a dokonce napříč korpusy. Výsledky podporují naši hypotézu, že interpunkční značky jsou trvalými a robustními ukazateli rodného jazyka autora, které nezmenšují vliv ani při dosažení vysoké úrovně znalosti v jiném jazyce.', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru opisujemo eksperimente dizajnirane za istraživanje i procjenu utjecaja znakova tačke na zadatak identifikacije jezika. Punkcija je specifična svakom jeziku, a to je dio indikatora koji predstavljaju način na koji svaki jezik organizira i prenosi informacije. Naši eksperimenti su organizovani u različitim nastavama: uobičajena multiklasična klasifikacija za pojedinačne jezike, također razmatrajući klasifikaciju jezičkih grupa, na različitim nivoima profila, temama i čak preko korpusa. Rezultati podržavaju našu hipotezu da su znakovi punkcije stalni i robni pokazivači rodnog jezika autora, koji ne smanjuju utjecaj čak i kada se postigne visoka nivo profila na jeziku koji nije rodni.', 'ca': "En aquest paper, descrivim experiments dissenyats per explorar i evaluar l'impacte de les marcas de puntuació en la tasca d'identificació de la llengua materna. La puntuació és específica per cada llengua i és part dels indicadors que representan overtament la manera en què cada llengua organitza i transmit informació. Els nostres experiments estan organitzats en diverses organitzacions: la classificació habitual de múltiples classes per llengües individuals, també considerant la classificació per grups de llengües, a diferents nivells d'aptitud, temes i fins i tot cross-corpus. The results support our hypothesis that punctuation marks are persistent and robust indicators of the native language of the author, which do not diminish in influence even when a high proficiency level in a non-native language is achieved.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös kirjeldame eksperimente, mille eesmärk on uurida ja hinnata vahemärkide mõju emakeele identifitseerimise ülesandele. Punktsioon on igale keelele spetsiifiline ja on osa näitajatest, mis näitavad selgelt, kuidas iga keel korraldab ja edastab teavet. Meie eksperimendid on organiseeritud erinevates ülesehitustes: tavapärane mitmeklassiline klassifikatsioon üksikutele keeltele, arvestades ka klassifikatsiooni keelerühmade kaupa, erinevate oskustasemete, teemade ja isegi korpustevaheliste kaupa. Tulemused toetavad meie hüpoteesi, et kirjavahemärgid on autori emakeele püsivad ja tugevad näitajad, mille mõju ei vähene isegi siis, kui saavutatakse kõrge taseme mitte-emakeeles.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä kuvataan kokeita, joiden tarkoituksena on tutkia ja arvioida välimerkkien vaikutusta äidinkielen tunnistamiseen. Tarkennus on kullekin kielelle ominaista, ja se on osa indikaattoreita, jotka selvästi kuvaavat tapaa, jolla kukin kieli organisoi ja välittää tietoa. Kokeet on järjestetty erilaisiin kokoonpanoihin: tavalliseen monikieliseen luokitteluun, joka huomioi myös kieliryhmien luokittelun, eri taitotasojen, aiheiden ja jopa cross-corpus -osioiden välillä. Tulokset tukevat hypoteesiamme siitä, että välimerkit ovat pysyviä ja vankkoja tekijän äidinkielen indikaattoreita, joiden vaikutus ei vähene, vaikka korkea kielitaito saavutettaisiin.', 'jv': 'Nang paper iki, kéné rambaran peringkat sing dibenakake nggawe gerasi nggawe gerasi punctuation mark kanggo nggawe gerasi ingkang dilangutan. spoken punctuation Awak dhéwé éntuk nggawe nang sampeyan akeh-sampeyan: multi-klass akhalamat ingkang sampeyan, gawe ngupakan kelas karo nggawe luwih bantuan, politenessoni sak tentang, tema sak ngono mulai-terakhi. Rejalongno ngerti suposipuntuan sing paling kelas puntuan kuwi, iso nguasai sing perbudhakan karo nganggep kuwi mau, sing ujaran kuwi mau kudu suposipuntuan sing gak dhéwé, kuwi mau iso nguasai suposipuntuan sing paling dhéwé kuwi, nik awak dhéwé kuwi dulungé awak dhéwé.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מתארים ניסויים שנועדו לחקור ולעריך את ההשפעה של סימני נקודה על המשימה של זיהוי שפה מקומית. הנקודה היא ספציפית לכל שפה, והיא חלק מהמדריכים שמייצגים באופן ברור את הדרך שבה כל שפה מארגנת ומעברת מידע. הניסויים שלנו מאורגנים במערכות שונות: הסיווג המולטלקס הרגיל לשפות בודדות, גם בהתחשב בסיווג על ידי קבוצות שפות, ברמות מומחיות שונות, נושאים ואפילו ברחבי הקורפוס. התוצאות תומכות בהיפתוזיה שלנו שסימני נקודה הם מדריכים עקשנים וחזקים של שפת ההורידה של הסופר, אשר לא מפחידים בשפעה אפילו כשרמת מומחיות גבוהה בשפה לא הורידה מושגת.', 'sk': 'V prispevku opisujemo poskuse, namenjene raziskovanju in ocenjevanju vpliva ločil na nalogo identifikacije maternega jezika. Točke so specifične za vsak jezik in so del kazalnikov, ki odkrito predstavljajo način, na katerega vsak jezik organizira in prenaša informacije. Naši eksperimenti so organizirani v različnih postavitvah: običajno večrazredno klasifikacijo posameznih jezikov, tudi klasifikacijo po jezikovnih skupinah, na različnih stopnjah strokovnosti, temah in celo medkorpusih. Rezultati podpirajo našo hipotezo, da so ločila trajni in robustni kazalniki maternega jezika avtorja, ki ne zmanjšujejo vpliva tudi pri doseganju visoke stopnje znanja tujega jezika.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã bayyana misãlai wanda aka yi designon su sami da kuma Mu ƙaddara matsayin alamar da aka yi wa musamman a kan aikin shaidar harshe na native. Taƙaitar da ake ƙayyade zuwa kowane harshe, kuma yana daga cikin alama waɗanda ke wakilisha shirin bayani da shirin da kõwace harshe ke organize da kuma ke gaya information. Ana ƙidãya masu cikin tsari masu yawa: mai zaman daraja na dabam-nau'i ko da za'a yi wa lugha guda, kuma ana yi tunãni ga fassarar-nau'i da jama'a-nau'in harsunan, a cikin daraja daban-dabam, madaidaici da kuma ko da nau'in-nau'i. Mataimakin na ƙarfafa misãlai da za'a iya ƙara alama na musamman da aka rubutu, da kuma ba ta ƙara mai amfani da shi ba, kõ da kuma idan an sami wata daraja mai girma cikin wata harshe na'asar ba.", 'bo': 'འུ་ཅག་གིས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་སྔོན་གྱི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་འཛིན་བྱས་མིན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་རྟགས་ལ་བལྟ་ཞིབ་དང་བསམ སྐད་རིགས་སོ་སོའི་བརྡ་སྟོན་པར་དམིགས་བསལ་བྱེད་ཡོད། དེ་ནི་སྐད ང་ཚོའི་བརྟག་ཞིབ་ནི་སྒྲིག་འཛིན་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ལས་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་ཡོད། གྲངས་འབོར་གྱི་ཚིག'}
{'en': 'Investigating Productive and Receptive Knowledge : A Profile for Second Language Learning', 'ar': 'التحقيق في المعرفة الإنتاجية والاستقبال: ملف تعريف لتعلم اللغة الثانية', 'es': 'Investigación del conocimiento productivo y receptivo: un perfil para el aprendizaje de una segunda lengua', 'fr': "À la recherche de connaissances productives et réceptives\xa0: un profil pour l'apprentissage d'une langue seconde", 'pt': 'Investigando o Conhecimento Produtivo e Receptivo: Um Perfil para Aprendizagem de Segunda Língua', 'ja': '生産的知識と受容的知識の調査：第二言語学習のためのプロファイル', 'hi': 'उत्पादक और ग्रहणशील ज्ञान की जांच: दूसरी भाषा सीखने के लिए एक प्रोफ़ाइल', 'ru': 'Исследование продуктивных и восприимчивых знаний: профиль для изучения второго языка', 'zh': '按生产性、接受性知:第二语言学其概', 'ga': "Eolas Táirgiúil agus Glactha a Iniúchadh: Próifíl d'Fhoghlaim an Dara Teanga", 'ka': 'პროექტიური და მიღებული მეცნიერების ინსტექტირება: მეორე ენის სწავლების პროფილი', 'hu': 'Termelékeny és befogadó tudás vizsgálata: profil a második nyelvtanuláshoz', 'el': 'Έρευνα παραγωγικής και δεκτικής γνώσης: Ένα προφίλ για τη μάθηση δεύτερης γλώσσας', 'it': "Indagine sulla conoscenza produttiva e ricettiva: un profilo per l'apprendimento della seconda lingua", 'lt': 'Produktyvių ir priimtinų žinių tyrimas: antrosios kalbos mokymosi profilis', 'kk': 'Продуктивті және алушы білім: Екінші тіл оқыту профилі', 'mk': 'Истражување на продуктивно и рецептивно знаење: профил за учење на вториот јазик', 'ms': 'Menyelidiki Pengetahuan Produktif dan Receptif: Profil untuk Belajar Bahasa Kedua', 'mt': 'Investigazzjoni ta’ Għarfien Produttiv u Riċettiv: Profil għat-Tagħlim tat-Tieni Lingwa', 'ml': 'പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Хоёрдугаар хэл суралцахын тулд', 'no': 'Investigasjon av produktiv og mottekebær kjenning: Eit profil for andre språk læring', 'pl': 'Badanie wiedzy produktywnej i recepcyjnej: profil nauki języka drugiego', 'sr': 'Istraživanje proizvodnje i primitivne znanja: Profil za učenje drugih jezika', 'ro': 'Investigarea cunoștințelor productive și receptive: un profil pentru învățarea limbii a doua', 'si': 'පරීක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරාප්තික දන්නය: දෙවෙනි භාෂා ඉගෙනීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරොෆේලය', 'ta': 'Investigating Productive and Receptive Knowledge: A Profile for Second Language Learning', 'so': 'Waxbarashada luuqadda labaad', 'sv': 'Utredning av produktiv och mottagande kunskap: En profil för andraspråksutbildning', 'ur': 'پیدا کرنے والی اور پذیرنے والی علم تحقیق کرنے والی: دوسری زبان تعلیم کے لئے ایک پروفئل', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Nghiên cứu về sản xuất và nhận thức: Hồ sơ về học ngôn ngữ thứ hai', 'bg': 'Проучване на продуктивните и приемливите знания: профил за обучение на втори език', 'nl': 'Onderzoek naar productieve en receptieve kennis: een profiel voor het leren van tweede talen', 'da': 'Undersøgelse af produktiv og modtagende viden: En profil for andetsprogsindlæring', 'hr': 'Istraživanje proizvodnje i primitivne znanja: Profil za učenje drugih jezika', 'id': 'Menyelidiki Pengetahuan Produktif dan Receptif: Profil untuk Belajar Bahasa Kedua', 'de': 'Produktives und rezeptives Wissen erforschen: Ein Profil für das Zweitsprachenlernen', 'ko': '산출성과 수용성 지식 조사: 제2 언어 학습 개황', 'tr': 'Etkileşikli we alyp bilgi maglumaty barlamak: Ikinji dil öwrenmesi üçin bir profil', 'sw': 'Tafiti la Uzalendo na Ujuzi: Utafiti wa Kufundisha Lugha ya pili', 'af': 'Voorskou Produktive en Ontvangende kennis: A Profile for Second Language Learning', 'sq': 'Investigating Productive and Receptive Knowledge: A Profile for Second Language Learning', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Պարունկտիվ և ընդունակ գիտելիքների ուսումնասիրությունը. երկրորդ լեզու սովորելու պրոֆիլ', 'bn': 'Investigating Productive and Receptive Knowledge: A Profile for Second Language Learning', 'az': '캻kinci Dil 칐yr톛nm톛si 칲칞칲n Profil', 'bs': 'Istraživanje proizvodnje i primitivne znanja: Profil za učenje drugih jezika', 'et': 'Tootlike ja vastuvõtlike teadmiste uurimine: teise keele õppe profiil', 'fa': 'تحقیق علم تولید و پذیرفته: یک پروژه برای یادگیری زبان دوم', 'cs': 'Zkoumání produktivních a recepčních znalostí: Profil pro výuku druhého jazyka', 'ca': "Investigar Conèixements Productius i Receptius: Un perfil d'aprenentatge de segona llengua", 'fi': 'Tuottavan ja vastaanottavan tiedon tutkiminen: toisen kielen oppimisen profiili', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness', 'sk': 'Raziskovanje produktivnega in receptivnega znanja: profil za učenje drugega jezika', 'ha': 'Ana ƙiƙiro Cilmi na Taurar da Akwai: A profile wa Learn Lugha na Duki', 'bo': 'Investigating Productive and Receiving Knowledge: A Profile for Second Language Learning', 'he': 'Investigating Productive and Receptive Knowledge: A Profile for Second Language Learning'}
{'en': 'The literature frequently addresses the differences in receptive and productive vocabulary, but grammar is often left unacknowledged in second language acquisition studies. In this paper, we used two corpora to investigate the divergences in the behavior of pedagogically relevant grammatical structures in reception and production texts. We further improved the divergence scores observed in this investigation by setting a polarity to them that indicates whether there is overuse or underuse of a grammatical structure by language learners. This led to the compilation of a language profile that was later combined with vocabulary and readability features for classifying reception and production texts in three classes : beginner, intermediate, and advanced. The results of the automatic classification task in both production (0.872 of F-measure) and reception (0.942 of F-measure) were comparable to the current state of the art. We also attempted to automatically attribute a score to texts produced by learners, and the correlation results were encouraging, but there is still a good amount of room for improvement in this task. The developed language profile will serve as input for a system that helps language learners to activate more of their passive knowledge in writing texts.', 'ar': 'غالبًا ما تتناول الأدبيات الاختلافات في المفردات الاستقبالية والإنتاجية ، ولكن غالبًا ما تُترك القواعد غير معترف بها في دراسات اكتساب اللغة الثانية. في هذه الورقة ، استخدمنا مجموعتين للتحقيق في الاختلافات في سلوك الهياكل النحوية ذات الصلة من الناحية التربوية في نصوص الاستقبال والإنتاج. لقد قمنا أيضًا بتحسين درجات الاختلاف التي لوحظت في هذا التحقيق من خلال تحديد قطبية لها تشير إلى ما إذا كان هناك استخدام مفرط أو قاصر للبنية النحوية من قبل متعلمي اللغة. أدى ذلك إلى تجميع ملف تعريف اللغة الذي تم دمجه لاحقًا مع ميزات المفردات وسهولة القراءة لتصنيف نصوص الاستقبال والإنتاج في ثلاث فئات: مبتدئ ومتوسط ومتقدم. كانت نتائج مهمة التصنيف التلقائي في كل من الإنتاج (0.872 من مقياس F) والاستقبال (0.942 من قياس F) قابلة للمقارنة مع الحالة الحالية للفن. حاولنا أيضًا أن ننسب تلقائيًا درجة إلى النصوص التي ينتجها المتعلمون ، وكانت نتائج الارتباط مشجعة ، ولكن لا يزال هناك مجال كبير للتحسين في هذه المهمة. سيكون ملف تعريف اللغة المطور بمثابة مدخلات لنظام يساعد متعلمي اللغة على تنشيط المزيد من معارفهم السلبية في كتابة النصوص.', 'fr': "La littérature aborde souvent les différences de vocabulaire réceptif et productif, mais la grammaire est souvent ignorée dans les études d'acquisition d'une langue seconde. Dans cet article, nous avons utilisé deux corpus pour étudier les divergences dans le comportement des structures grammaticales pertinentes sur le plan pédagogique dans les textes de réception et de production. Nous avons encore amélioré les scores de divergence observés dans cette enquête en leur attribuant une polarité qui indique s'il y a surutilisation ou sous-utilisation d'une structure grammaticale par les apprenants de langues. Cela a conduit à la compilation d'un profil linguistique qui a ensuite été combiné avec des fonctionnalités de vocabulaire et de lisibilité pour classer les textes de réception et de production dans trois classes\xa0: débutant, intermédiaire et avancé. Les résultats de la tâche de classification automatique en production (0,872 de la mesure F) et en réception (0,942 de la mesure F) étaient comparables à l'état actuel de la technique. Nous avons également essayé d'attribuer automatiquement une note aux textes produits par les apprenants, et les résultats de corrélation étaient encourageants, mais il reste encore beaucoup à faire dans cette tâche. Le profil linguistique développé servira d'entrée pour un système qui aide les apprenants de langues à activer davantage leurs connaissances passives dans la rédaction de textes.", 'pt': 'A literatura frequentemente aborda as diferenças no vocabulário receptivo e produtivo, mas a gramática muitas vezes é deixada de lado nos estudos de aquisição de segunda língua. Neste artigo, utilizamos dois corpora para investigar as divergências no comportamento de estruturas gramaticais pedagogicamente relevantes em textos de recepção e produção. Melhoramos ainda mais as pontuações de divergência observadas nesta investigação, definindo uma polaridade para eles que indica se há uso excessivo ou subutilizado de uma estrutura gramatical por alunos de línguas. Isso levou à compilação de um perfil de linguagem que posteriormente foi combinado com recursos de vocabulário e legibilidade para classificar textos de recepção e produção em três classes: iniciante, intermediário e avançado. Os resultados da tarefa de classificação automática tanto na produção (0,872 de F-measure) quanto na recepção (0,942 de F-measure) foram comparáveis ao atual estado da arte. Também tentamos atribuir automaticamente uma pontuação aos textos produzidos pelos alunos, e os resultados da correlação foram animadores, mas ainda há muito espaço para melhorias nessa tarefa. O perfil linguístico desenvolvido servirá como entrada para um sistema que ajuda os aprendizes de línguas a ativar mais seus conhecimentos passivos na escrita de textos.', 'es': 'La literatura con frecuencia aborda las diferencias en el vocabulario receptivo y productivo, pero la gramática a menudo no se reconoce en los estudios de adquisición de un segundo idioma. En este artículo, utilizamos dos corpus para investigar las divergencias en el comportamiento de las estructuras gramaticales pedagógicamente relevantes en los textos de recepción y producción. Mejoramos aún más las puntuaciones de divergencia observadas en esta investigación al establecerles una polaridad que indica si hay un uso excesivo o insuficiente de una estructura gramatical por parte de los estudiantes de idiomas. Esto llevó a la compilación de un perfil lingüístico que luego se combinó con funciones de vocabulario y legibilidad para clasificar los textos de recepción y producción en tres clases: principiante, intermedio y avanzado. Los resultados de la tarea de clasificación automática tanto en la producción (0,872 de la medida F) como en la recepción (0,942 de la medida F) fueron comparables al estado actual de la técnica. También intentamos atribuir automáticamente una puntuación a los textos producidos por los alumnos, y los resultados de la correlación fueron alentadores, pero todavía hay mucho margen de mejora en esta tarea. El perfil lingüístico desarrollado servirá como entrada para un sistema que ayuda a los estudiantes de idiomas a activar más sus conocimientos pasivos al escribir textos.', 'ja': '文献では、受容的語彙と生産的語彙の違いに頻繁に取り組んでいるが、文法はしばしば第二言語習得研究で認識されていないままにされている。 この論文では、2つのコーラを使用して、受容と生成テキストにおける教育学的に関連する文法構造の挙動の乖離を調査した。 この調査で観察されたスコアの乖離をさらに改善し、言語学習者による文法構造の過剰な使用または不十分な使用の有無を示す極性を設定しました。 これにより、初級、中級、上級の3つのクラスで受信テキストと制作テキストを分類するための語彙機能と読みやすさ機能が組み合わされた言語プロファイルが作成されました。 生産（ Ｆメジャーの０ ． ８ ７ ２ ）と受入（ Ｆメジャーの０ ． ９ ４ ２ ）の両方における自動分類タスクの結果は、現状と同等であった。 また、学習者が作成したテキストに自動的にスコアを帰属させようとし、相関結果は奨励されましたが、この課題にはまだまだ改善の余地があります。 開発された言語プロファイルは、言語学習者がテキストを書く際に受動的な知識をより有効にするのに役立つシステムの入力として役立ちます。', 'hi': 'साहित्य अक्सर ग्रहणशील और उत्पादक शब्दावली में अंतर को संबोधित करता है, लेकिन व्याकरण को अक्सर दूसरी भाषा अधिग्रहण अध्ययनों में अस्वीकृत छोड़ दिया जाता है। इस पेपर में, हमने रिसेप्शन और उत्पादन ग्रंथों में शैक्षणिक रूप से प्रासंगिक व्याकरणिक संरचनाओं के व्यवहार में विचलन की जांच करने के लिए दो कॉर्पोरेट का उपयोग किया। हमने इस जांच में देखे गए विचलन स्कोर में एक ध्रुवीयता स्थापित करके और सुधार किया है जो इंगित करता है कि भाषा सीखने वालों द्वारा व्याकरणिक संरचना का अधिक उपयोग या कम उपयोग किया गया है या नहीं। इसने एक भाषा प्रोफ़ाइल के संकलन का नेतृत्व किया जिसे बाद में तीन वर्गों में रिसेप्शन और उत्पादन ग्रंथों को वर्गीकृत करने के लिए शब्दावली और पठनीयता सुविधाओं के साथ जोड़ा गया था: शुरुआती, मध्यवर्ती और उन्नत। उत्पादन (एफ-माप के 0.872) और रिसेप्शन (एफ-माप के 0.942) दोनों में स्वचालित वर्गीकरण कार्य के परिणाम कला की वर्तमान स्थिति के बराबर थे। हमने शिक्षार्थियों द्वारा उत्पादित ग्रंथों के लिए स्वचालित रूप से एक स्कोर को विशेषता देने का भी प्रयास किया, और सहसंबंध परिणाम उत्साहजनक थे, लेकिन इस कार्य में सुधार के लिए अभी भी अच्छी मात्रा में जगह है। विकसित भाषा प्रोफ़ाइल एक ऐसी प्रणाली के लिए इनपुट के रूप में काम करेगी जो भाषा सीखने वालों को ग्रंथों को लिखने में अपने निष्क्रिय ज्ञान को सक्रिय करने में मदद करती है।', 'zh': '文献每议接受性生产性词汇之异,而语法在第二语言习得,往往不承。 本文之中,用两语料库以究接收、产业、教学之语法结构之异。 更进观发散分数,为之设极性,明言学者用未足语法构也。 此言配置文件之编译,当配置文件后与词汇合可读性功能,以三分其受业之文:初级,中级、上也。 生(F量值为0.872)受(F量值为0.942)自分者,与今技术水平等。 尝试自归因于文学之本,相关而令人鼓舞,然犹有大改其间者。 发言配置文件将为系统者输之,助言学者激活益动。', 'ru': 'В литературе часто рассматриваются различия в восприимчивой и продуктивной лексике, но грамматика часто остается непризнанной в исследованиях приобретения второго языка. В данной работе мы использовали два корпуса для исследования расхождений в поведении педагогически релевантных грамматических структур в текстах приема и производства. Мы дополнительно улучшили баллы дивергенции, наблюдаемые в этом исследовании, установив для них полярность, которая указывает на то, имеет ли место чрезмерное или недостаточное использование грамматической структуры изучающими язык. Это привело к составлению лингвистического профиля, который позже был объединен с лексикой и функциями удобочитаемости для классификации текстов для приема и производства по трем классам: начальный, промежуточный и продвинутый. Результаты задачи автоматической классификации как в производстве (0,872 F-измерения), так и в получении (0,942 F-измерения) были сопоставимы с текущим уровнем техники. Мы также попытались автоматически присваивать баллы текстам, подготовленным учащимися, и результаты корреляции были обнадеживающими, но в этой задаче все еще есть много возможностей для улучшения. Разработанный лингвистический профиль послужит исходным материалом для системы, которая поможет изучающим язык активировать больше своих пассивных знаний при написании текстов.', 'ga': 'Is minic a théann an litríocht i ngleic leis na héagsúlachtaí sa stór focal glactha agus táirgiúil, ach is minic a fhágtar an ghramadach gan aitheantas i staidéir ar shealbhú an dara teanga. Sa pháipéar seo, d’úsáideamar dhá chorpora chun éagsúlachtaí in iompar struchtúir ghramadaí atá ábhartha go hoideolaíoch i dtéacsanna glactha agus táirgthe a fhiosrú. D’fheabhsaíomar na scóir dhibhéirseachta a breathnaíodh san fhiosrúchán seo trí polaraíocht a leagan orthu a thabharfadh le fios an bhfuil ró-úsáid nó tearcúsáid á baint as struchtúr gramadaí ag foghlaimeoirí teanga. Mar thoradh air seo tiomsaíodh próifíl teanga a cuireadh le chéile níos déanaí le gnéithe foclóra agus inléiteachta chun téacsanna glactha agus léirithe a rangú i dtrí rang: bunleibhéal, meánrang agus ardleibhéal. Bhí torthaí an tasc aicmithe uathoibríoch sa dá tháirgeadh (0.872 de F-bheart) agus fáiltithe (0.942 de F-bheart) inchomparáide leis an staid reatha ealaíne. Rinneamar iarracht freisin scór a chur i leith téacsanna a rinne na foghlaimeoirí go huathoibríoch, agus ba ábhar misnigh iad na torthaí comhghaolmhaireachta, ach tá spás maith fós le feabhsú sa tasc seo. Feidhmeoidh an phróifíl teanga forbartha mar ionchur do chóras a chuidíonn le foghlaimeoirí teanga níos mó dá n-eolas éighníomhach a ghníomhachtú agus iad ag scríobh téacsanna.', 'ka': 'ლიტურატია წარმოიდგინდება პრექტიგური და პროექტიგური სიტყვებულაში განსხვავებების განსხვავებას, მაგრამ გრამმატიკა ხშირად დარჩენა მეორე ენის მიღება სწავლებაში. ამ დონტაქტში, ჩვენ გამოყენეთ ორი კოპორა, რომ გამოვიყენოთ განსხვავებების განსხვავებას პედაგოგიურად მნიშვნელოვანი გრამიკალური სტრუქტურების ქცევაში პროცე ჩვენ უფრო უფრო მეტად გავაკეთებეთ განსხვავებულება, რომელიც ამ პასუხში აჩვენებული განსხვავებულება, რომელიც ისინი პოლარიტურება, რომელიც განსხვავებს თუ არა განსხვავებული ან არა გამოყ ეს იქნება ენის პროფილის კომპილიაციას, რომელიც შემდეგ იქნება სიტყვალის და კითხვა შესაძლებელობის ფუნქციებით სამი კლასიში მიღება და პროდისტურის ტექსტის კლასიფიკაციაში: დაწყება, საშუალ სურათის მიმდინარებით შემდგომარებელია მომდინარებით (0.872 F-ზომის) და მიმდინარებით (0.942 F-ზომის) მომდინარებით. ჩვენ ასევე მოვცდილოთ ავტომატურად ატრიბუტირება ტექსტში, რომელიც სწავლებელების გამოიყენებულია, და კორელეციის შედეგები უფრო მუშაობელია, მაგრამ ამ დავალებში უფრო მნიშვნელოვან განვითარებული ენის პროფილი იქნება სისტემის შენახვა, რომელიც ენის სწავლებელების დახმარება, რომ ისინი პასიტური მეცნიერების გააკეთება ტექსტში.', 'hu': 'Az irodalom gyakran foglalkozik a fogékony és termelékeny szókincs különbségeivel, de a nyelvtan gyakran nem ismert a második nyelvtanulási tanulmányokban. Ebben a tanulmányban két korpuszt használtunk arra, hogy megvizsgáljuk a pedagógiailag releváns nyelvtani struktúrák viselkedésének eltéréseit a recepció és a produkciós szövegekben. Tovább javítottuk a vizsgálat során megfigyelt eltérési pontszámokat azzal, hogy polaritást állítottunk hozzájuk, amely azt jelzi, hogy a nyelvtanulók túlzott vagy alulfogyasztják-e a nyelvtani struktúrát. Ez vezetett egy nyelvi profil összeállításához, amelyet később szókincsekkel és olvashatósági funkciókkal kombináltak a fogadó- és gyártási szövegek három osztályba sorolására: kezdő, középfokú és haladó osztályba. Az automatikus osztályozási feladat eredményei mind a gyártásban (0,872 F-mérték), mind a fogadásban (0,942 F-mérték) összehasonlíthatóak voltak a technika jelenlegi állásával. Megpróbáltuk automatikusan a tanulók által készített szövegekhez rendelni a pontszámot, és a korrelációs eredmények bátorítóak voltak, de még mindig jó hely van a javításra ebben a feladatban. A kifejlesztett nyelvi profil egy olyan rendszer bemutatójaként szolgál, amely segít a nyelvtanulóknak abban, hogy passzív ismereteik többségét aktiválják a szövegírásban.', 'el': 'Η βιβλιογραφία συχνά ασχολείται με τις διαφορές στο δεκτικό και παραγωγικό λεξιλόγιο, αλλά η γραμματική συχνά δεν αναγνωρίζεται στις σπουδές εκμάθησης δεύτερης γλώσσας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, χρησιμοποιήσαμε δύο σώματα για να διερευνήσουμε τις αποκλίσεις στη συμπεριφορά εκπαιδευτικών σχετικών γραμματικών δομών στα κείμενα υποδοχής και παραγωγής. Βελτιώσαμε περαιτέρω τις βαθμολογίες αποκλίσεων που παρατηρήθηκαν στην παρούσα έρευνα θέτοντας μια πολικότητα σε αυτές που υποδεικνύει αν υπάρχει υπερχρήση ή υποχρησιμοποίηση μιας γραμματικής δομής από τους μαθητές γλωσσών. Αυτό οδήγησε στη σύνταξη ενός γλωσσικού προφίλ που αργότερα συνδυάστηκε με λεξιλόγιο και χαρακτηριστικά αναγνωσιμότητας για την ταξινόμηση κειμένων υποδοχής και παραγωγής σε τρεις τάξεις: αρχάριους, μεσαίους και προχωρημένους. Τα αποτελέσματα της αυτόματης ταξινόμησης τόσο στην παραγωγή (0.872 μέτρου F) όσο και στη λήψη (0.942 μέτρου F) ήταν συγκρίσιμα με την τρέχουσα κατάσταση της τεχνολογίας. Προσπαθήσαμε επίσης να αποδώσουμε αυτόματα μια βαθμολογία στα κείμενα που παράγονται από τους μαθητές, και τα αποτελέσματα συσχέτισης ήταν ενθαρρυντικά, αλλά εξακολουθούν να υπάρχουν πολλά περιθώρια βελτίωσης σε αυτό το έργο. Το αναπτυγμένο γλωσσικό προφίλ θα χρησιμεύσει ως εισαγωγή για ένα σύστημα που βοηθά τους μαθητές γλωσσών να ενεργοποιήσουν περισσότερες από τις παθητικές γνώσεις τους στη συγγραφή κειμένων.', 'it': "La letteratura affronta spesso le differenze nel vocabolario ricettivo e produttivo, ma la grammatica è spesso lasciata non riconosciuta negli studi di acquisizione della seconda lingua. In questo articolo, abbiamo utilizzato due corpora per indagare le divergenze nel comportamento di strutture grammaticali pedagogicamente rilevanti nei testi di ricezione e produzione. Abbiamo ulteriormente migliorato i punteggi di divergenza osservati in questa indagine impostando loro una polarità che indica se c'è un uso eccessivo o sottouso di una struttura grammaticale da parte degli studenti di lingue. Ciò ha portato alla compilazione di un profilo linguistico che è stato successivamente combinato con funzionalità di vocabolario e leggibilità per classificare i testi di ricezione e produzione in tre classi: principiante, intermedio e avanzato. I risultati del compito di classificazione automatica sia nella produzione (0,872 di misura F) che nella ricezione (0,942 di misura F) sono stati paragonabili allo stato attuale dell'arte. Abbiamo anche cercato di attribuire automaticamente un punteggio ai testi prodotti dagli studenti, e i risultati di correlazione erano incoraggianti, ma c'è ancora un buon margine di miglioramento in questo compito. Il profilo linguistico sviluppato servirà da input per un sistema che aiuta gli studenti di lingue ad attivare più delle loro conoscenze passive nella scrittura di testi.", 'lt': 'Literatūroje dažnai sprendžiami receptyvių ir produktyvių žodynų skirtumai, tačiau antrosios kalbos įgijimo tyrimų metu gramatika dažnai nepapažįstama. Šiame dokumente mes panaudojome dvi korporas, kad ištirtume skirtingus pedagoginiu požiūriu svarbių gramatinių struktūrų elgesį priėmimo ir gamybos tekstuose. Toliau pagerėjome šiame tyrime pastebėtus skirtumus nustatydami jiems poliarumą, rodantį, ar kalbų mokytojai per daug naudoja arba nepakankamai naudoja gramatinę struktūrą. This led to the compilation of a language profile that was later combined with vocabulary and readability features for classifying reception and production texts in three classes: beginner, intermediate, and advanced.  Automatinės klasifikacijos užduoties rezultatai gamyboje (0,872 F matavimo) ir priėmime (0,942 F matavimo) buvo panašūs į dabartinę pažangą. Taip pat bandėme automatiškai priskirti rezultatus moksleivių parengtiems tekstams, ir koreliacijos rezultatai buvo skatinami, tačiau šioje užduotyje vis dar yra daug vietos tobulinti. Sukurtas kalbų profilis bus naudojamas kaip įrašas sistemai, kuri padės kalbų mokytojams aktyvinti daugiau savo pasyvių žinių rašant tekstus.', 'kk': 'Әдебиеттік көбірек қабылдау және шығару сөздерінің айырмашылығын қалайды, бірақ грамматика көбірек екінші тіл алу зерттеулерінде білмейді. Бұл қағазда, біз педагогиялық грамматикалық құрылғыларды қабылдау және үйлесімдік мәтіндерінің қасиеттерінің қасиеттерінде екі корпорасын зерттеу үшін қолдандық. Біз бұл зерттеулерде көрінетін диверензиялық нәтижелерін жақсартып, олар тіл оқытушыларының грамматикалық құрылғысын қолдану немесе қолдануға тыс пайдаланын көрсетеді. Бұл үш сыныпта қабылдау және шығару мәтіндерін біріктіру үшін тіл профилін біріктіру үшін сөздер мен оқуға мүмкіндік мүмкіндіктерімен біріктірілген тіл профилін біріктіру үшін: бастаушы, орташа Екі жасалған (0, 872 F- measure) және алу (0, 942 F- measure) тапсырмасының автоматты түрлендіру тапсырмасының нәтижелері әлпетінің қазіргі күйіне салыстырылады. Сонымен қатар біз оқушылар жасалған мәтіндерге автоматты түрде нәтижесін атрибуттау әрекетіне әрекеттік келдік. Сонымен қатарлық нәтижелері көмектеседі, бірақ осы тапсырманың жақсарту үшін ә Жасалған тіл профилі тіл оқытушыларының пассивні білімдерін жазу мәтіндерінде көмектесетін жүйесіне енгізіледі.', 'mk': 'Литературата честопати ги решава разликите во рецептивниот и продуктивниот речник, но граматиката честопати останува непозната во студиите за набавување на вториот јазик. Во овој весник, употребивме две капори за да ги испитаме разликите во однесувањето на педагошки релевантните граматични структури во текстите за прием и производство. We further improved the divergence scores observed in this investigation by setting a polarity to them that indicates whether there is overuse or underuse of a grammatical structure by language learners.  Ова доведе до компилација на јазички профил кој подоцна беше комбиниран со речникот и карактеристиките за читање за класификација на рецепционните и производствените тексти во три класи: почетник, посреден и напредна. Резултатите од автоматската класификациска задача во производството (0,872 мерки Ф) и приемот (0,942 мерки Ф) беа споредливи со сегашната техничка состојба. Исто така, се обидовме автоматски да припишеме оценка на текстовите произведени од учениците, и резултатите на корелацијата беа охрабрувачки, но сé уште има многу место за подобрување во оваа задача. Разведен јазички профил ќе служи како влог за систем кој им помага на учениците на јазиците да активираат повеќе од нивното пасивно знаење во пишувањето текстови.', 'ml': 'സാഹിത്രം എപ്പോഴും റെക്സിപ്റ്റീവും ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്ന വാക്യങ്ങളില്\u200d വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കുന്നു. പക്ഷെ ഗ്രാമ്മാര്\u200d  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d രണ്ടു കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരുന്നു വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d വേണ്ടി പഠിക്കുന്ന സ്വഭാവത്തിന്റെ പ്രകൃ ഈ അന്വേഷണത്തില്\u200d കാണുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത സ്കോര്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തി. ഭാഷ പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയോ ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയോ ചെയ്യുന്നോ  This led to the compilation of a language profile that was later combined with vocabulary and readability features for classifying reception and production texts in three classes: beginner, intermediate, and advanced.  സ്വയം ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്ന ജോലിയുടെ ഫലം (0. 872 എഫ്- മീറ്റില്\u200d 0. 872) എന്നിട്ടും സ്വീകരിക്കുന്നതും (0. 942 എഫ്- മീറ്റില്\u200d 0. 942) ഈ പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പദാവലികള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു സ്കോര്\u200d സ്വയമായി പ്രഖ്യാപിക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിച്ചു. ബന്ധപ്പെട്ട ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d ആശ്വാസപ് ഭാഷ പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് സഹായിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റത്തിനുള്ള പ്രൊഫൈല്\u200d എഴുതുന്നതില്\u200d അവരുടെ ആഗ്രഹിക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'ms': 'Literatur sering mengatasi perbezaan dalam vokbulari penerima dan produktif, tetapi grammar sering ditinggalkan tidak dikenali dalam kajian pemberian bahasa kedua. Dalam kertas ini, kami menggunakan dua korpra untuk menyelidiki perbezaan dalam perilaku struktur grammatik yang berkaitan pedagogi dalam teks penerimaan dan produksi. Kami lebih meningkatkan skor perbezaan yang diperhatikan dalam penyelidikan ini dengan menetapkan polariti kepada mereka yang menunjukkan sama ada ada penggunaan berlebihan atau penggunaan rendah struktur grammatik oleh pelajar bahasa. Ini menyebabkan kumpilasi profil bahasa yang kemudian digabungkan dengan ciri-ciri vokbulari dan pembacaan untuk mengklasifikasi teks penerimaan dan produksi dalam tiga kelas: pemula, sementara, dan maju. The results of the automatic classification task in both production (0.872 of F-measure) and reception (0.942 of F-measure) were comparable to the current state of the art.  Kami juga cuba untuk atribut skor secara automatik kepada teks yang dihasilkan oleh pelajar, dan hasil korelasi adalah menguatkan, tetapi masih ada banyak ruang untuk memperbaiki tugas ini. Profil bahasa yang dikembangkan akan berkhidmat sebagai input bagi sistem yang membantu pelajar bahasa untuk mengaktifkan lebih banyak pengetahuan pasif dalam menulis teks.', 'mt': 'Il-letteratura spiss tindirizza d-differenzi fil-vokabulari riċettiv u produttiv, iżda l-grammatika spiss titħalla mhux rikonoxxuta fi studji dwar l-akkwist tat-tieni lingwa. F’dan id-dokument, użajna żewġ korpi biex ninvestigaw id-diverġenzi fl-imġiba ta’ strutturi grammatiċi pedagoġikament rilevanti fit-testi ta’ akkoljenza u produzzjoni. Aħna tejbu aktar il-punteġġi tad-diverġenza osservati f’din l-investigazzjoni billi stabbilixxejna polarità għalihom li tindika jekk hemmx użu żejjed jew użu baxx ta’ struttura grammatika minn dawk li jitgħallmu l-lingwi. Dan wassal għall-kumpilazzjoni ta’ profil lingwistiku li aktar tard kien ikkombinat ma’ karatteristiċi vokabulari u ta’ leġibbiltà għall-klassifikazzjoni tat-testi ta’ akkoljenza u produzzjoni fi tliet klassijiet: bidu, intermedjarju u avvanzat. Ir-riżultati tal-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni awtomatika kemm fil-produzzjoni (0.872 tal-miżura F) kif ukoll fir-riċeviment (0.942 tal-miżura F) kienu komparabbli mal-istat attwali tal-aħħar. Ippruvajna wkoll jattribwixxu awtomatikament punteġġ għat-testi prodotti mill-istudenti, u r-riżultati tal-korrelazzjoni kienu inkoraġġanti, iżda għad hemm lok tajjeb għal titjib f’dan il-kompitu. Il-profil tal-lingwa żviluppat se jservi bħala input għal sistema li tgħin lil dawk li jitgħallmu l-lingwi jattivaw aktar mill-għarfien passiv tagħhom bit-testi bil-miktub.', 'pl': 'Literatura często odnosi się do różnic w słownictwie otwartym i produktywnym, ale gramatyka jest często pozostawiana niepotwierdzona w badaniach nabywania drugiego języka. W artykule wykorzystaliśmy dwa korpusy do zbadania rozbieżności w zachowaniu istotnych pedagogicznie struktur gramatycznych w tekstach recepcyjnych i produkcyjnych. Dalej poprawiliśmy wyniki rozbieżności obserwowane w tym badaniu, ustawiając polaryzację, która wskazuje, czy istnieje nadmierne lub niewykorzystanie struktury gramatycznej przez uczących się języków. Doprowadziło to do stworzenia profilu językowego, który został później połączony z funkcjami słownictwa i czytelności dla klasyfikacji tekstów recepcyjnych i produkcyjnych w trzech klasach: początkujących, średnio zaawansowanych i zaawansowanych. Wyniki zadania automatycznej klasyfikacji zarówno w produkcji (0,872 miary F), jak i odbiorze (0,942 miary F) były porównywalne do obecnego stanu techniki. Staraliśmy się również automatycznie przypisać wynik tekstom wytwarzanym przez uczniów, a wyniki korelacji były zachęcające, ale nadal jest duża możliwość poprawy w tym zadaniu. Opracowany profil językowy będzie służył jako wejście do systemu, który pomaga uczącym się języków aktywować więcej swojej biernej wiedzy w pisaniu tekstów.', 'mn': 'Учир нь уран зохиол хүлээн авагч, үйлдвэрлэлтийн үгийн ялгааг ихэвчлэн хэлний худалдааны судалгаанд анзааргүй байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хоёр корпора ашиглаж, хүлээн авах, үйлдвэрлэлийн текстүүд дээрх грамматик бүтэц байдлын өөрчлөлтийг судалж байсан. Бид энэ судалгаанд ажиглагдсан өөрчлөлтийн тоонуудыг илүү сайжруулсан. Энэ нь хэлний сурагчид грамматикийн бүтэц хэрэглэгддэг эсвэл бага хэрэглэгддэг. Энэ нь дараа нь үг хэлний профилийн цуглуулалт болон унших чадвартай холбогдсон хэлний профилийг гурван ангид хүлээн авах, үйлдвэрлэх, дундаж, хөгжүүлэх хэлбэртэй хуваалцах боломжтой. Хоёр бүтээгдэхүүн (0.872 F-хэмжээний) болон хүлээн авах (0.942 F-хэмжээний) автоматжуулалтын даалгаврын үр дүн нь урлагийн орчинтай харьцуулагддаг байсан. Мөн бид сурагчид гаргасан textуудыг автоматжуулахыг хичээсэн. Харин харилцааны үр дүнд сэтгэл хөдлөх болсон. Гэхдээ энэ ажил дээр сайжруулах маш олон өрөө байгаа. Хөгжигдсэн хэлний профиль нь хэлний сурагчиддаа илүү хүчтэй мэдлэгийг бичиж бичиж чаддаг систем юм.', 'no': 'Litteraturet viser ofte forskjellingane i mottakavspråk og produktiv ordbok, men grammatikk blir ofte igjen ukjend i andre språk-hendingar. I denne papiret brukte vi to korpora for å undersøke forskjellene i atferden av pedagogisk relevante grammatiske strukturar i mottak og produksjonstekstar. Vi forbetra forskjellingspoeng som blir observert i denne undersøkinga ved å setja ein polaritet til dei som tyder på om det finst overbruk eller underbruk av eit grammatisk struktur av språkelærar. Dette førte til å kompilera eit språkprofil som seinare var kombinert med ordbokstavar og lesabilitetsfunksjonar for å klassifisera mottak og produksjonstekstar i tre klassar: startar, middelsnitt og avansert. Resultatet av den automatiske klassifikasjonen i både produksjonen (0,872 av F-målet) og mottakaren (0,942 av F-målet) var samanlikbar med den gjeldande tilstanden av kunsten. Vi prøvde også å automatisk attribuere eit poengsum til tekstar som er produsert av lærarar, og korrelasjonsresultatene vart oppfordrende, men det finst framleis ein god mykje rom for forbetringa i denne oppgåva. Dette utviklet språkprofilet vil kalle som inndata for eit systemet som hjelper språkprofiler å aktivera meir av dei pasive kunnskapene sine i skriving av tekstar.', 'ro': 'Literatura abordează frecvent diferențele dintre vocabularul receptiv și productiv, dar gramatica este adesea lăsată necunoscută în studiile de dobândire a limbii a doua. În această lucrare, am folosit două corpore pentru a investiga divergențele în comportamentul structurilor gramaticale relevante pedagogic în textele de recepție și producție. Am îmbunătățit și mai mult scorurile de divergență observate în această investigație prin stabilirea unei polarități pentru acestea care indică dacă există utilizarea excesivă sau subutilizarea unei structuri gramaticale de către cursanții de limbi străine. Acest lucru a dus la compilarea unui profil lingvistic care a fost ulterior combinat cu vocabularul și caracteristicile de citire pentru clasificarea textelor de recepție și producție în trei clase: începător, intermediar și avansat. Rezultatele sarcinii de clasificare automată atât în producție (0,872 de măsură F), cât și recepție (0,942 de măsură F) au fost comparabile cu stadiul actual al tehnologiei. De asemenea, am încercat să atribuim automat un scor textelor produse de cursanți, iar rezultatele corelației au fost încurajatoare, dar există încă un spațiu bun de îmbunătățire în această sarcină. Profilul lingvistic dezvoltat va servi drept intrare pentru un sistem care îi ajută pe cursanții de limbi străine să activeze mai multe cunoștințe pasive în scrierea textelor.', 'sr': 'Literatura često obrađuje razlike u prihvatnim i produktivnim rečenicama, ali gramatika često ostavlja nepoznat u studijama prikupljanja drugih jezika. U ovom papiru smo koristili dve korporacije da istražimo razlike u ponašanju pedagogički relevantnih gramatičkih struktura u tekstima prijema i proizvodnje. Nadalje smo poboljšali rezultate različitih pogleda koji su posmatrani u ovoj istrazi, postavljajući polarnost njima koji ukazuju na to da li postoji prekorištenje ili nepotrebna upotreba gramatičke strukture učenika jezika. To je dovelo do skupljanja jezičkog profila koji je kasnije kombinovan sa rečnicima i čitljivošću za klasifikaciju teksta prijema i proizvodnje u tri klase: početnik, posrednik i napredak. Rezultati automatskog zadatka klasifikacije u obje proizvodnje (0,872 F-mjere) i prijem (0,942 F-mjere) bili su usporedni sa trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti. Takođe smo pokušali automatski pripisati rezultat teksta proizvođenih učenicima, a rezultati korelacije su bili ohrabrujući, ali još uvek postoji dobra količina prostora za poboljšanje u ovom zadatku. Razvijen jezički profil će služiti kao ulaz za sistem koji pomaže učiteljima jezika da aktiviraju više njihovih pasivnih znanja u pismenim tekstima.', 'si': 'සාක්ෂිත්\u200dරය ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් වලින් වෙනස් වලින් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා, නමුත් ග්\u200dරාමාර්මාර්මාර්මාර්මාර්මාර් මේ පත්තරේ අපි කොර්පෝරා දෙකක් පාවිච්චි කරලා ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පෙඩාගෝජික විශ්වාසයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සහ උත්පත්ති  අපි මේ පරීක්ෂණයේ බලන්න පුළුවන් විවිධ ස්කෝර්ඩ් විශේෂ කරලා තියෙන්නේ එයාලට පුළුවන් ස්ථානයක් තියෙන්නේ කියලා තේරෙ මේක පස්සේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරොෆේල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙන්නේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරොෆේල් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ කරපු භාෂාව සහ කියවන්න පුළුවන ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විශේෂණ කාර්ය දෙන්නම (0.872 of F-Measuring) සහ ප්\u200dරවේශනය (0.942 of F-Measuring) ප්\u200dරවේශනයේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය ස්ථානය සමඟ සමුද අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් පරික්ෂණයක් පිළිගන්න උත්සාහ කළා, සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරික්ෂණයක් පිළිගන්න, ඒත් තවමත් මේ වැඩේ ව විකාශ කරපු භාෂාව ප්\u200dරොෆේල් විදියට පද්ධතියක් වෙනුවෙන් භාෂාව ඉගෙන ගන්න උදව් කරනවා ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරතික', 'so': 'Qoraanigu wuxuu marar badan u baaraandegaa kala duwan luqada qaabilaadda iyo waxyaabaha kordhaya, laakiin waxaa inta badan lagu daayaa qofka aan lagu baran karo barashada luqada labaad. Qoraalkan waxaan u isticmaalnay laba shirkad si aan u baarayno kala duwanaanshaha dabiicadda cilmiga ah ee xarumaha qaabilaadda iyo soo saarista. We further improved the divergence scores observed in this investigation by setting a polarity to them that indicates whether there is overuse or underuse of a grammatical structure by language learners.  Taas waxaa sababtay in la soo dhigo borofayl luuqad ah oo ugu dambeeyay lagu soo bandhigay aqoonta iyo waxyaabaha la akhriyo oo lagu qoro qoraalka qaabilaadda iyo dhaqaalaha saddexda fasalka: bilowga, dhexe iyo horumarinta. Fashihiisa iskuulka iskuulka ah ee dhamaan dhaqaalaha (0.872 qeybta F) iyo qaabilaadda (0.942 qeybta F-measure) waxay u eg jireen xaalada hore ee farshaxanka. Sidoo kale waxaan isku daynay in aan iskuul u dhigno qoraal ay u soo saareen ardayda, resultiyada xiriirka ayaa la dhiirrigelinayay, laakiin weli waxaa jirta qol aad u wanaagsan in la hagaajiyo shaqadan. Borofaylka afka la koray wuxuu u adeegayaa sida input, taasoo caawinaya barashada luqada si ay u shaqeeyaan aqoontooda faraha badan oo qoraalka.', 'sv': 'Litteraturen behandlar ofta skillnaderna i receptivt och produktivt ordförråd, men grammatiken lämnas ofta obemärkt i andraspråksundervisningar. I denna uppsats har vi använt oss av två korpor för att undersöka skillnader i beteendet hos pedagogiskt relevanta grammatiska strukturer i mottagnings- och produktionstexter. Vi förbättrade de avvikelsepoäng som observerats i denna undersökning ytterligare genom att sätta en polaritet till dem som indikerar om det finns överanvändning eller underanvändning av en grammatisk struktur av språkelever. Detta ledde till sammanställningen av en språkprofil som senare kombinerades med ordförråd och läsbarhetsfunktioner för att klassificera mottagnings- och produktionstexter i tre klasser: nybörjare, mellanliggande och avancerade. Resultaten av den automatiska klassificeringsuppgiften i både produktion (0,872 av F-mått) och mottagning (0,942 av F-mått) var jämförbara med nuvarande teknik. Vi försökte också automatiskt tillskriva en poäng till texter producerade av eleverna, och korrelationsresultaten var uppmuntrande, men det finns fortfarande gott om utrymme för förbättringar i denna uppgift. Den utvecklade språkprofilen kommer att fungera som input till ett system som hjälper språkinlärare att aktivera mer av sina passiva kunskaper i att skriva texter.', 'ta': 'இந்த எழுத்து வித்தியாசங்களை விரைவாக மற்றும் தயாரிப்பு சொல்வளத்திலும் வேறுபாடுகளை குறிப்பிடுகிறது, ஆனால் சிறிய மொழி பெறும இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாங்கள் இரண்டு நிறுவனத்தை பயன்படுத்தினோம் புரிந்துகொள்ளும் மற்றும் உருவாக்கும் உரையாடலில் பொருத்தமான கிராமா நாம் மேலும் இந்த விசாரணையில் பார்க்கப்பட்ட வேறுபாட்டு மதிப்பெண்களை மேம்படுத்தினோம் மொழி கற்றல்களால் மொழிப்படுத்துபவர்களால் மேல இது மூன்று வகுப்பில் பெறுதல் மற்றும் தயாரிப்பு உரைகளை வகுப்பதற்கான சொல்வள மற்றும் படிக்கக்கூடிய பண்புகளுடன் சேர்க்கப்பட்ட மொழி விவரக்குறிப்பினை  பொருளில் தானியக்க வகுப்பு பணியின் முடிவுகள் (0. 872 of F- அளவு) மற்றும் பெறுதல் (0. 942 of F- measure) தற்போதைய கலைத்தின் நிலையை ஒப்பிட்டது. கற்றல்கள் உருவாக்கப்பட்ட உரைகளுக்கு ஒரு புள்ளியை தானாகவே குறிப்பிட முயற்சி செய்தோம் மற்றும் இணைப்பு முடிவுகள் ஆச்சரியமாக இருந்தது, ஆனால்  உருவாக்கப்பட்ட மொழி விவரம் எழுத்துக்களில் உள்ளீட்டை செயல்படுத்த உதவும் முறைமைக்கு உள்ளீடாக சேவை செய்யும்.', 'ur': 'ادبیات بہت زیادہ مطابق پکڑنے والی اور پیدا کرنے والی کلمات میں اختلاف کرنے والی ہے، لیکن گرمات اکثر دوسری زبان حاصل کی تحقیقات میں ناپذیر چھوڑی جاتی ہے. اس کاغذ میں ہم نے دو شرکت کا استعمال کیا تھا کہ پڈوگوژیکی طریقے کے مطابق گراماتیکی ساختاروں کی اختلاف کا تحقیق کریں۔ ہم نے اس تحقیقات میں دیکھے ہوئے مختلف اسکوروں کو اضافہ کردیا کہ ان کے لئے ایک قطعہ مقرر کر دیتے ہیں جو نشان دیتے ہیں کہ زبان یاد کرنے والوں کے ذریعہ ایک گراماتیکی ساختار کی زیادہ استعمال یا کم استعمال ہے. یہ ایک زبان پروفائل کی تعلیم کی وجہ سے پہنچائی تھی جو اس کے بعد واژوکلاری اور پڑھنے کی طاقت کا فرصت تین کلاس میں پڑھنے اور پیدا کرنے کے لئے پیدا ہوا تھا: آغاز، میانڈیٹ، اور آگے بڑھنے کے لئے۔ پیدائش (0.872 F-measure) اور پذیرش (0.942 F-measure) کے موجود موجود حالت کے برابر تھے. اور ہم نے اپنے ساتھ ایک اسکور کو سکونٹ کرنے کی کوشش کی تھی جو علم والوں کے ذریعہ پیدا ہوئی تھی، اور اتصال نتیجے ہدایت دینے والے تھے، لیکن اب بھی اس کام میں بہت اچھی مقدار جگہ ہے۔ گھیرے ہوئے زبان پروفائل ایک سیستم کے لئے اپنا انپ وٹ بنے گا جو زبان تعلیم کرنے والوں کی مدد کرے گا کہ ان کے پیوست علم کو لکھنے میں زیادہ فعال کریں۔', 'uz': "Lekin grammatika ko'pincha ikkinchi tillar ta'lim o'qituvchilarida o'zgarishni boshlaydi. Bu qogʻozda biz ikkita kompaniya ishlatdik, o'smidagi bog'liq grammatik tuzuvlarining xususiyatlarini o'rganish uchun o'zgarishni o'rganamiz. Biz o'rganish tili o'rganish orqali grammatik tuzuvlarini ishlatishni yoki ishlatishni anglatdik. Name @ info: whatsthis Biz o'rganishlar yaratgan matnlarni avtomatik o'rganishga qo'llashga harakat qilamiz va bog'liq natijalari juda murakkab beradi, lekin bu vazifani yaxshi ko'paytirish uchun juda ko'p xona bor. Taʼminlovchi tillar profilini yozuvchi matnlarda qoʻllash uchun tillar o'rganishga yordam beradi.", 'vi': 'Văn chương thường xuyên đề cập đến những sự khác nhau trong ngôn ngữ dễ hiểu và có ích, nhưng văn học không bị ghi nhận trong các nghiên cứu ngôn ngữ học thứ hai. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đã dùng hai cơ thể để nghiên cứu sự khác biệt trong cách ứng xử của các cấu trúc văn hóa và chiêu thức giáo dục có liên quan. Chúng tôi đã cải thiện điểm khác biệt được ghi nhận trong cuộc điều tra này bằng cách đặt một quan điểm cho họ, cho thấy có sự lạm dụng hay không sử dụng sai cấu trúc ngôn ngữ của học sinh. Việc này dẫn tới việc soạn ra một hồ sơ ngôn ngữ mà sau này được kết hợp với các tính năng từ vựng và dễ đọc để phân loại văn bản tiếp đón và sản xuất theo ba lớp: bắt đầu, trung ương, và tiên. Kết quả của nhiệm vụ phân loại tự động trong cả sản xuất (0.872 của thước F) và tiếp nhận (0.92 của thước F) đều có thể so sánh với trạng thái hiện tại của nghệ thuật. Chúng tôi cũng đã cố gắng gán điểm cho các văn bản do học viên sản xuất, và kết quả tương quan rất tốt, nhưng vẫn còn nhiều chỗ để cải thiện trong nhiệm vụ này. The developed language profile sẽ phục vụ as nhập for a system that helps English students to active more of their thụ động knowledge in write text.', 'bg': 'Литературата често разглежда разликите в приемливия и продуктивния речник, но граматиката често не се признава при изучаването на втори език. В тази статия използвахме два корпуса, за да изследваме различията в поведението на педагогически значими граматически структури в приемането и производството на текстове. Освен това подобрихме резултатите от дивергенцията, наблюдавани в това изследване, като поставихме полярност към тях, която показва дали има прекомерно или недостатъчно използване на граматическа структура от учащите езици. Това води до съставяне на езиков профил, който по-късно е комбиниран с лексика и четливост функции за класифициране на приемни и продукционни текстове в три класа: начинаещи, междинни и напреднали. Резултатите от задачата за автоматична класификация както в производството (0,872 от мярката), така и в приемането (0,942 от мярката) са сравними с настоящото състояние на техниката. Също така се опитахме автоматично да приписваме оценка на текстовете, произведени от обучаемите, а резултатите от корелацията бяха окуражаващи, но все още има достатъчно място за подобрение в тази задача. Разработеният езиков профил ще служи като вход за система, която помага на обучаващите езици да активират повече от пасивните си знания при писането на текстове.', 'nl': 'De literatuur behandelt vaak de verschillen in receptieve en productieve woordenschat, maar grammatica wordt vaak niet erkend in tweede taalverwerving studies. In dit artikel hebben we twee corpora gebruikt om de divergenties in het gedrag van pedagogisch relevante grammaticale structuren in receptie- en productieteksten te onderzoeken. We hebben de divergentiescores in dit onderzoek verder verbeterd door een polariteit in te stellen die aangeeft of er sprake is van overmatig of ondergebruik van een grammaticale structuur door taallerenden. Dit leidde tot de samenstelling van een taalprofiel dat later werd gecombineerd met woordenschat en leesbaarheid voor het classificeren van receptie- en productieteksten in drie klassen: beginner, intermediate en gevorderde. De resultaten van de automatische classificatietaak in zowel productie (0,872 van F-maatregel) als ontvangst (0,942 van F-maatregel) waren vergelijkbaar met de huidige stand van de techniek. We hebben ook geprobeerd om automatisch een score toe te schrijven aan teksten geproduceerd door leerlingen, en de correlatieresultaten waren bemoedigend, maar er is nog veel ruimte voor verbetering in deze taak. Het ontwikkelde taalprofiel zal dienen als input voor een systeem dat taallerenden helpt om meer van hun passieve kennis te activeren in het schrijven van teksten.', 'da': 'Litteraturen omhandler ofte forskellene i receptive og produktive ordforråd, men grammatik efterlades ofte ubekendt i andresprogstudier. I denne artikel brugte vi to korpora til at undersøge forskellene i adfærden af pædagogisk relevante grammatiske strukturer i modtagelses- og produktionstekster. Vi forbedrede yderligere de divergens scores, der blev observeret i denne undersøgelse, ved at sætte en polaritet til dem, der indikerer, om der er overbrug eller underbrug af en grammatisk struktur af sproglærere. Dette førte til udarbejdelsen af en sprogprofil, der senere blev kombineret med ordforråd og læsbarhedsfunktioner til klassificering af modtagelses- og produktionstekster i tre klasser: nybegynder, mellemstore og avancerede. Resultaterne af den automatiske klassifikationsopgave i både produktion (0,872 F-mål) og modtagelse (0,942 F-mål) var sammenlignelige med den nuværende teknologi. Vi forsøgte også automatisk at tilskrive en score til tekster produceret af eleverne, og korrelationsresultaterne var opmuntrende, men der er stadig god plads til forbedringer i denne opgave. Den udviklede sprogprofil vil tjene som input til et system, der hjælper sprogelever med at aktivere mere af deres passive viden i at skrive tekster.', 'de': 'Die Literatur befasst sich häufig mit den Unterschieden im rezeptiven und produktiven Vokabular, aber Grammatik wird in Zweitsprachenerwerbungsstudien oft nicht anerkannt. In dieser Arbeit haben wir zwei Korpora verwendet, um die Divergenzen im Verhalten pädagogisch relevanter grammatikalischer Strukturen in Rezeptions- und Produktionstexten zu untersuchen. Wir haben die in dieser Untersuchung beobachteten Divergenzwerte weiter verbessert, indem wir ihnen eine Polarität setzen, die anzeigt, ob eine grammatische Struktur von Sprachlernenden zu stark oder zu wenig genutzt wird. Dies führte zur Erstellung eines Sprachprofils, das später mit Vokabular- und Lesbarkeitsmerkmalen kombiniert wurde, um Rezeptions- und Produktionstexte in drei Klassen einzuordnen: Anfänger, Fortgeschrittene und Fortgeschrittene. Die Ergebnisse der automatischen Klassifikationsaufgabe sowohl in der Produktion (0,872 von F-Maß) als auch im Empfang (0,942 von F-Maß) waren mit dem aktuellen Stand der Technik vergleichbar. Wir haben auch versucht, Texten, die von Lernenden produziert wurden, automatisch eine Punktzahl zuzuordnen, und die Korrelationsergebnisse waren ermutigend, aber es gibt noch viel Raum für Verbesserungen in dieser Aufgabe. Das entwickelte Sprachprofil soll als Input für ein System dienen, das Sprachlernenden hilft, mehr passives Wissen beim Schreiben von Texten zu aktivieren.', 'id': 'The literature frequently addresses the differences in receptive and productive vocabulary, but grammar is often left unacknowledged in second language acquisition studies.  Dalam kertas ini, kami menggunakan dua korpra untuk menyelidiki perbedaan dalam perilaku struktur grammatik pedagogis relevan dalam teks penerimaan dan produksi. We further improved the divergence scores observed in this investigation by setting a polarity to them that indicates whether there is overuse or underuse of a grammatical structure by language learners.  Ini menyebabkan kompilasi profil bahasa yang kemudian digabung dengan karakteristik vokal dan pembacaan untuk mengklasifikasi teks penerimaan dan produksi dalam tiga kelas: awal, intermediate, dan maju. Hasil dari tugas klasifikasi otomatis dalam kedua produksi (0,872 dari F-measure) dan penerimaan (0,942 dari F-measure) adalah bandingan dengan keadaan modern. Kami juga mencoba untuk otomatis atribut skor pada teks yang diproduksi oleh para pelajar, dan hasil korelasi yang mendorong, tetapi masih ada banyak ruang untuk memperbaiki tugas ini. Profil bahasa yang dikembangkan akan menjadi input untuk sistem yang membantu para pelajar bahasa untuk mengaktifkan lebih banyak pengetahuan pasif mereka dalam menulis teks.', 'ko': '문헌에서 수용성 어휘와 산출성 어휘의 차이를 자주 언급했지만 제2언어 습득 연구에서 문법은 인정을 받지 못했다.본고에서 우리는 두 개의 어료 라이브러리를 사용하여 문장을 받아들이고 생성하는 과정에서 교육과 관련된 문법 구조의 행위 차이를 조사했다.우리는 이 조사에서 관찰한 차이 점수를 한층 높여 언어 학습자가 문법 구조를 과도하게 사용하거나 충분히 사용하지 않았는지 보여주기 위해 극성을 설정했다.이로 인해 언어 프로필의 작성이 이루어졌다. 이 프로필은 나중에 어휘와 읽을 수 있는 특징을 결합시켜 수신과 생성 텍스트를 초급, 중급, 고급으로 세 가지로 나눈다.자동 분류 임무는 생산(0.872 F-measure)과 수신(0.942 F-measure)에서 현재 기술 수준과 비슷한 결과를 얻었다.우리는 또한 자동으로 점수를 학습자가 생성한 텍스트로 돌리려고 시도했는데, 관련 결과는 고무적이지만, 이 임무는 여전히 많은 개선 공간을 가지고 있다.개발된 언어 파일은 하나의 체계적인 입력으로 언어 학습자가 텍스트를 작성하는 데 더 많은 수동적인 지식을 활성화시키는 데 도움을 줄 것이다.', 'sw': 'Fasihi mara nyingi huzungumza tofauti katika lugha inayopokea na yenye uzalishaji, lakini gramma mara nyingi huachwa bila kuchukua katika tafiti za lugha ya pili. Katika gazeti hili, tulitumia kampuni mbili kuchunguza tofauti katika tabia za viwanjana zinazohusiana na miundombinu ya kiuchumi katika maandishi ya kukubaliana na uzalishaji. Tuliendelea kuboresha vipimo vya tofauti vilivyoonekana katika uchunguzi huu kwa kuwaweka uchaguzi wa kuwaonyesha kama kuna matumizi au kutumia muundo wa kiuchunguzi na wanafunzi wa lugha. Hii ilipelekea kukusanyika kwa profile ya lugha ambayo baadae iliunganishwa na vipengele vya lugha na kusoma kwa ajili ya kutangaza ujumbe wa kukubaliana na uzalishaji katika darasa tatu: mwanzo, wa kati, na wa juu. Matokeo ya kazi ya kujikutana katika uzalishaji wote (0.872 wa F-measure) na kupokea (0.942 wa F-measure) yalifanana na hali ya sasa ya sanaa. Tulijaribu pia kuelezea matokeo yaliyotengenezwa na wanafunzi, na matokeo ya mahusiano yalikuwa yanasisitiza, lakini bado kuna nafasi nzuri ya kuboresha kazi hii. Utafiti wa lugha zilizoendelea utahudumia kama input kwa mfumo ambao unawasaidia wanafunzi wa lugha kutengeneza maarifa yao ya kibiashara kwa kuandika maandishi.', 'fa': 'ادبیات اغلب تفاوت در کلمه\u200cهای پذیرفته و تولید کننده را درباره\u200cی فرق می\u200cکند، ولی گرامی اغلب در تحقیقات گیری دوم زبان باقی مانده می\u200cشود. در این کاغذ، ما از دو شرکت استفاده کردیم تا درباره تغییرات در رفتار ساختمان\u200cهای گراماتیکی که در دریافت و تولید می\u200cکنند تحقیق کنیم. ما در این تحقیقات امتیاز مختلفی را بهتر کردیم با تنظیم یک قطعیت برای آنها که نشان می دهد آیا استفاده از یک ساختار گرامیک توسط دانش آموزان زبان یا کم استفاده از یک ساختار گرامیک وجود دارد. این به ترکیب یک پروفایل زبانی که بعداً با ویژگی\u200cهای واژه\u200cنامه و خواندنی واژه\u200cهای دریافت و تولید کردن متن\u200cهای دریافت و تولید را در سه کلاس، ترکیب می\u200cکرد: آغاز کننده، میانگین و پیشرفته. نتیجه\u200cهای وضعیت جدایی خودکار در هر دو تولید (0.872 از اندازه F) و پذیرش (0.942 از اندازه F) مقایسه با وضعیت فعلی هنر بودند. ما همچنین سعی کردیم که یک امتیاز به متن\u200cهای تولید شده از دانش\u200cآموزان را به طور خودکار برگزینیم، و نتیجه\u200cهای ارتباط به آن رفع می\u200cدهند، ولی هنوز یک مقدار اتاق خوبی برای توسعه در این کار وجود دارد. پروفایل زبان توسعه به عنوان ورودی برای یک سیستم که به یادگیران زبان کمک می کند تا بیشتر از دانش های گذشته خود را در نوشتن متن فعال کند.', 'tr': 'Edebiýat köplenç alyp barýan we önümçilikli sözlerde tapawutlaryny barýar, ýöne gramatika köplenç ikinji dil alma öwrenmelerinde bilmeýän bolýar. Bu kagyzda, pedagogiýa gönül we üretim metinlerinde gramatik dürlikleriň davranışynda çalşyklaryny barlamak üçin iki korpora ulandyk. Biz bu soragynda gözleýän atšķirylyk sanlaryny ýüze düzəltdik we olara polarity düzenleyerek, dil öwrenmeleri tarapyndan gramatik strukturyň a şağı ullanyşyny ýa-da ulanmaýandygyny görkezýäris. Bu ýerde soňra sözler we okamak üçin sınıfta laňlama we üretim mektuplary täze etmek üçin bir dil profilini birleştirildi: başlançy, orta we gelişmiş. Her iki üretiň (0.872 f-ölçüsi) we alaňyň (0.942 f-ölçüsi) häzirki sanatyň durumyna ýakynlaşdyrylýar. Biz hem okamçylar tarapyndan üretilen tekstlere öz-özünden tanyş etmäge synanyşdyrdyk, ýöne şu işde gelişmek üçin hala gowy bir otag bar. Gelişmiş dil profili dillerini öwrenmegi üçin giriş sistemi üçin kömekleyär. Olar diller öwrenmegi üçin özleriniň passive bilgilerini tekstlerde janlaşdyrmak üçin kömekleyär.', 'af': "Die literateer is dikwels die verskilde in ontvangbare en produktiewe woordeboek aangespreek, maar grammatiek is dikwels onbekende in tweede taal aanvang studie verlaat. In hierdie papier het ons twee korpora gebruik om die verskillende ondersoek te doen in die gedrag van pedagogies relevante grammatiese strukture in ontvangstekste en produksie. Ons het verder die verskeidingstelling wat in hierdie ondersoek aangesien is, verbeter deur 'n polarisie aan hulle te stel wat indiek of daar oorbruik of onderbruik is van 'n grammatiese struktuur deur taal leerneerders. Hierdie het na die versameling van 'n taal profiel wat later gekombineer was met woordeboek en leesbaardige funksies vir klassifisering van ontvang en produksietekste in drie klasse: beginner, middel en gevorderd. Die resultate van die outomatiese klasifikasie taak in beide produksie (0.872 van F-maat) en ontvang (0.942 van F-maat) was vergelykbaar met die huidige staat van die kuns. Ons het ook probeer om outomaties 'n telling te attributeer na teks wat deur leerders geproduseer is, en die korrelasie resultate was bevestig, maar daar is nog nog 'n goeie hoeveelheid kamer vir verbetering in hierdie taak. Die ontwikkelde taal profiel sal dien as invoer vir 'n stelsel wat hulp taal leerders om meer van hul pasiewe kennis te aktiveer in skrifteteks.", 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ቃላት በሁለተኛው ቋንቋ ማግኘት በማድረግ የሚለውን መለያየት ያቆማል፡፡ In this paper, we used two corpora to investigate the divergences in the behavior of pedagogically relevant grammatical structures in reception and production texts.  በዚህ ምርመራ ላይ የተመለከተውን የልዩነት ነጥቦች በቋንቋ ተማሪዎቹ የተጠቃሚ ወይም የተጠቃሚ መሠረት መሆኑን ለማሳየት እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ይህም በሦስት ደረጃዎች ውስጥ የቋንቋ ፕሮፋይሎችን በመጠቀም፣ መጀመሪያ፣ መካከለኛ እና መካከለኛ እና ቅድሚያ እና ማስታወቂያውን ለመግለጥ የሥርዓት ጽሑፎችን በመጠቀም አቀረበ፡፡ የአሁኑን አርእስት (0.872 የF-measure) እና መቀበል (0.942 የF-መስፈሪያ) ይተያያያል፡፡ እናም ተማሪዎችን ለጽሑፎች የተደረጉትን ነጥብ በራስነት ለመፍጠር ሞክረናል፣ የግንኙነት ውጤቶች ግን ለዚህ ስራ ለመሻለል የሚደረግ ክፍል አለ፡፡ የቋንቋ ፕሮፋይሉ የቋንቋ ተማሪዎችን በጽሑፍ መጻሕፍት የሚጨምሩ እውቀታቸውን እንዲያሳስብ የሚረዳ ሲስተም ይደረጋል።', 'sq': 'Literatura shpesh trajton dallimet në fjalorin e pranueshëm dhe produktiv, por gramatika shpesh mbetet e panjohur në studimet e blerjes së gjuhës së dytë. Në këtë letër, ne përdorëm dy korpra për të hetuar dallimet në sjelljen e strukturave grammatike të rëndësishme pedagogjikisht në tekstet e pranimit dhe prodhimit. Ne përmirësuam më tej rezultatet e ndryshimeve të vëzhguara në këtë hetim duke vendosur një polaritet ndaj tyre që tregon nëse ka përdorim të tepërt apo nënpërdorim të një strukture grammatike nga mësuesit e gjuhës. Kjo çoi në kompilimin e një profili gjuhësh që më vonë u kombinua me fjalorin dhe karakteristikat e lexueshmërisë për klasifikimin e teksteve të pranimit dhe prodhimit në tre klasa: fillues, ndërmjetës dhe të avancuar. Rezultatet e detyrës automatike të klasifikimit në prodhimin (0.872 të masës F) dhe pranimin (0.942 të masës F) ishin të krahasueshme me gjendjen aktuale të artit. Ne gjithashtu u përpoqëm automatikisht të atribuojmë një rezultat teksteve të prodhuara nga mësuesit dhe rezultatet e korrelacionit ishin inkurajuese, por ende ka një sasi të mirë vend për përmirësim në këtë detyrë. Profili i zhvilluar i gjuhës do të shërbejë si hyrje për një sistem që ndihmon nxënësit e gjuhës të aktivizojnë më shumë nga njohuritë e tyre pasive në shkrimin e teksteve.', 'hy': "Գրագրությունը հաճախ վերաբերում է ընդունակ և արտադրողական բառարանի տարբերություններին, բայց գրագիտությունը հաճախ անհայտ է թողնում երկրորդ լեզվի ձեռք բերման ուսումնասիրություններում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք օգտագործեցինք երկու կոպորա' ուսումնասիրելու տարբերությունները ընդունման և արտադրման տեքստների դասաբանական կարևորությունների վարքագծի մեջ: Մենք նաև բարելավեցինք այս ուսումնասիրության ընթացքում հայտնաբերված տարբերությունների գնահատականները' նրանց կողմնականությունը սահմանելով, որը ցույց է տալիս, արդյոք լեզվի սովորողների գրամատիկական կառուցվածքի չափից շատ օգտագործում է, թե ոչ: Սա հանգեցրեց լեզվի պրոֆիլի կառուցմանը, որը ավելի ուշ համադրվում էր բառարանի և կարդալիության առանձնահատկությունների հետ ընդունման և արտադրման տեքստերի դասավորման համար երեք դասարանում՝ սկիզբնական, միջնական և առաջագա: Ավտոմատիկ դասակարգման խնդրի արդյունքները արտադրության (F-չափության 0.87 2) և ընդունման (F-չափության 0.942) մեջ համեմատություն էին ներկայիս տեխնոլոգիայի հետ: Մենք նաև փորձեցինք ավտոմատ գնահատել ուսանողների ստեղծված հաղորդագրությունները, և հարաբերակցության արդյունքները խրախուսում էին, բայց այս խնդրում դեռևս շատ տեղ կա զարգացման համար: Զարգացած լեզվի պրոֆիլը կծառայի որպես ներմուծք մի համակարգի համար, որը օգնում է լեզվի սովորողներին ակտիվացնել իրենց պասիվ գիտելիքները գրելու տեքստներում:", 'hr': 'Literatura često rješava razlike u prihvatnim i produktivnim riječnicima, ali gramatika često ostavlja bez potvrde u ispitivanjima prikupljanja drugih jezika. U ovom papiru smo koristili dvije korporacije kako bi istražili razlike u ponašanju pedagogički relevantnih gramatičkih struktura u tekstima prijema i proizvodnje. Nadalje smo poboljšali rezultate različitosti koje su primijećene u ovoj istrazi stavljajući polarnost na njih koji ukazuju na postojanje li prekorištenja ili nepotrebna primjena gramatičke strukture učiteljima jezika. To je dovelo do skupljanja jezičkog profila koji je kasnije kombiniran s riječničkim i čitljivim karakteristikama za klasifikaciju teksta prijema i proizvodnje u tri klase: početnik, posrednik i napredak. Rezultati automatskog zadatka klasifikacije u obje proizvodnje (0,872 F-mjere) i prijem (0,942 F-mjere) bili su usporedbeni s trenutnom stanju umjetnosti. Također smo pokušali automatski pripisati rezultat tekstova proizvođenih učenicima, a rezultati korelacije su ohrabrujući, ali još uvijek postoji dobra količina mjesta za poboljšanje u ovom zadatku. Razvijen jezički profil će služiti kao ulaz za sustav koji pomaže učiteljima jezika aktivirati više njihovih pasivnih znanja u pisaćim tekstima.', 'bn': 'সাহিত্য প্রায়শই রেসিপেটিভ এবং প্রযুক্তিগত শব্দভাণ্ডারের পার্থক্যের কথা বলে, কিন্তু গ্রামার প্রায়শই দ্বিতীয় ভাষায় কোনো প এই কাগজটিতে আমরা দুই কর্পোরা ব্যবহার করেছিলাম যাতে শিক্ষাগত সংক্রান্ত গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল কাঠামোর আচরণের বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ ভাষা শিক্ষার্থীদের দ্বারা গ্রামাটিক্যাল কাঠামো ব্যবহার করা কি না কিংবা গ্রামাটিক্যাল কাঠামো ব্যবহার করা যায়, আমরা এই তদন্তে দেখা প এটি একটি ভাষার প্রোফাইল সংগ্রহের কারণে পরে ভাষাভাষার এবং পাঠকতার বৈশিষ্ট্যের সাথে সংগ্রহ করা হয়েছিল তিন শ্রেণীতে গ্রাহক এবং প্রযুক্তি লেখার জন্য: শ স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে শ্রেণীর বর্তমান অবস্থার সাথে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে শ্রেণীর কাজের ফলাফল (0. 872 এফমেট) এবং গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে। আমরা স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে শিক্ষার্থীদের তৈরি করা লেখাগুলোর জন্য একটি স্কোর উল্লেখ করার চেষ্টা করেছিলাম, আর সম্পর্কের ফলাফল উৎসাহিত ছিল, কিন উন্নয়নশীল ভাষা প্রোফাইল একটি সিস্টেমের জন্য ইনপুট হিসেবে সাহায্য করবে যা ভাষা শিক্ষার্থীদের লেখা লেখায় তাদের প্র', 'az': 'Edebiyat çox çox alıcı və ürəkli sözlərdə fərqli olanları çəkir, amma gramatika çox zaman ikinci dil alma təhsil edilməsində bilinmədir. Bu kağıtda, biz pedagojik olaraq məlumatlarda olan qrammatik yapıların davranışlarında dəyişiklikləri incitmək üçün iki korpora istifadə etdik. Biz bu araştırmalarda gördüyünüz müxtəlif nöqtələri daha yaxşılaşdırdıq ki, dil öyrənənənlərin çox istifadə edilməsini və ya gramatika qurulması yoxdur. Bu, üç sınıfta alınma və üretim mətnlərini seçmək üçün sonradan sözlər və oxuya bilənlər ilə birləşdirilmiş dil profilinin birləşdirilməsinə səbəb verdi: başlançı, orta, və avans. İki ürək (0.872 F-ölçüsi) və alış (0.942 F-ölçüsi) ilə avtomatik klasifikasiya işlərinin sonuçları art ıqlıq durumu ilə bərabər idi. Biz də öyrənənənlər tərəfindən ürəklənmiş mətnlərə müəyyən edilməyə çalışırdıq. İlişkilərin sonuçları təşkil edirdi, amma bu işdə hələ də yaxşılıq etmək üçün çox çox yer var. Gelişmiş dil profili dillərini öyrənənənlərə daha çox biliklərini yazmaq üçün istifadə edən bir sistem üçün istifadə edəcək.', 'bs': 'Literatura često rješava razlike u prijemnoj i produktivnoj rečenici, ali gramatika često ostavlja nepoznatu u ispitivanjima prikupljanja drugih jezika. U ovom papiru smo koristili dvije korporacije da istražimo razlike u ponašanju pedagogički relevantne gramatičke strukture u tekstima prijema i proizvodnje. Dalje smo poboljšali rezultate različitih različitih pogleda koje su primijećene u ovoj istrazi, postavljajući im polarnost koja ukazuje na to da li postoji preupotreba ili nepotrebna upotreba gramatičke strukture učiteljima jezika. To je dovelo do skupljanja jezičkog profila koji je kasnije kombinovan sa rečnicima i čitljivošću za klasifikaciju teksta prijema i proizvodnje u tri klase: početak, posrednik i napredak. Rezultati automatskog zadatka klasifikacije u obje proizvodnje (0,872 F-mjere) i prijemu (0,942 F-mjere) bili su usporedbeni s trenutnim stanjem umjetnosti. Također smo pokušali automatski pripisati rezultat tekstova proizvođenih učenicima, a rezultati korelacije su ohrabrujući, ali još uvijek postoji dobra količina prostora za poboljšanje u ovom zadatku. Razvijen jezički profil će služiti kao ulaz za sistem koji pomaže učiteljima jezika da aktiviraju više svojih pasivnih znanja u pismenim tekstima.', 'cs': 'Literatura se často zabývá rozdíly ve vnímavé a produktivní slovní zásobě, ale gramatika je často nechávána v studiích osvojování druhého jazyka. V tomto článku jsme použili dva korpusy ke zkoumání divergencí v chování pedagogicky relevantních gramatických struktur v recepčních a produkčních textech. Dále jsme zlepšili divergenční skóre pozorované v tomto šetření nastavením polarity k nim, která indikuje, zda existuje nadměrné nebo nedostatečné využití gramatické struktury studenty jazyka. To vedlo k sestavení jazykového profilu, který byl později kombinován s funkcemi slovní zásoby a čitelnosti pro klasifikaci recepčních a produkčních textů ve třech třídách: začátečník, středně pokročilý a pokročilý. Výsledky automatické klasifikační úlohy jak ve výrobě (0,872 F-měřítka), tak příjmu (0,942 F-měřítka) byly srovnatelné se současným stavem techniky. Snažili jsme se také automaticky přiřadit skóre textům vytvořeným žáky a korelační výsledky byly povzbuzující, ale v tomto úkolu je stále velký prostor pro zlepšení. Vyvinutý jazykový profil bude sloužit jako vstup do systému, který pomáhá studentům aktivovat více pasivních znalostí při psaní textů.', 'ca': "La literatura sovint aborda les diferències en vocabulari receptiu i productiu, però la gramàtica sovint no es reconeix en estudis d'adquisició de segon llenguatge. En aquest article vam utilitzar dos corpores per investigar les divergències en el comportament de les estructures gramàtiques pedagògicament rellevants en els textos de recepció i producció. Vam millorar més les puntuacions de divergència observades en aquesta investigació establient una polaritat per a ells que indica si hi ha un ús excessiu o un ús insuficient d'una estructura gramàtica pels aprenents de llenguatges. Això va portar a la compilació d'un perfil de llenguatge que més tard es va combinar amb característiques vocabularis i llegibles per classificar els textos de recepció i producció en tres classes: principiant, intermediari i avançat. The results of the automatic classification task in both production (0.872 of F-measure) and reception (0.942 of F-measure) were comparable to the current state of the art.  També vam intentar atribuir automàticament una puntuació als textos produïts pels alumnes, i els resultats de la correlació eren alentadors, però encara hi ha molt espai per millorar aquesta tasca. El perfil de llenguatge desenvolupat servirà com entrada d'un sistema que ajuda als aprenents de llenguatge a activar més del seu coneixement passiu en escriure textos.", 'fi': 'Kirjallisuus käsittelee usein vastaanottavan ja tuottavan sanaston eroja, mutta kielioppi jää usein tunnustamatta toisen kielen oppimisessa. Tässä työssä käytimme kahta korporaa tutkiaksemme pedagogisesti merkityksellisten kielioppirakenteiden käyttäytymisen eroja vastaanotto- ja tuotantoteksteissä. Lisäksi paransimme tässä tutkimuksessa havaittuja eroja asettamalla niille polariteetin, joka osoittaa, onko kieliopillisen rakenteen liikakäyttöä vai alikäyttöä kieltenopiskelijoissa. Tämä johti kieliprofiilin koostamiseen, joka myöhemmin yhdistettiin sanastoon ja luettavuuteen luokiteltaessa vastaanotto- ja tuotantotekstejä kolmeen luokkaan: aloittelija, keskitason ja edistynyt. Automaattisen luokittelutehtävän tulokset sekä tuotannossa (0,872 F-mittaa) että vastaanotossa (0,942 F-mittaa) olivat verrattavissa nykytekniikan nykytilaan. Pyrimme myös automaattisesti antamaan pistemäärän oppijoiden tuottamille teksteille, ja korrelaatiotulokset olivat rohkaisevia, mutta tässä tehtävässä on vielä paljon parantamisen varaa. Kehitetty kieliprofiili toimii pohjana järjestelmään, joka auttaa kielioppijoita aktivoimaan enemmän passiivista osaamistaan tekstien kirjoittamisessa.', 'et': 'Kirjanduses käsitletakse sageli vastuvõtliku ja produktiivse sõnavara erinevusi, kuid teise keele omandamise uuringutes jäetakse grammatikat sageli tunnustamata. Käesolevas töös kasutasime kahte korpust, et uurida erinevusi pedagoogiliselt oluliste grammatiliste struktuuride käitumises vastuvõtu ja tootmise tekstides. Lisaks parandasime uurimises täheldatud erinevuste tulemusi, seades neile polaarsuse, mis näitab, kas keeleõppijad kasutavad grammatilist struktuuri üle või alakasutavad seda. See viis keeleprofiili koostamiseni, mis hiljem kombineeriti sõnavara ja loetavuse funktsioonidega vastuvõtu- ja tootmistekstide klassifitseerimiseks kolmes klassis: algaja, keskmine ja edasijõudnud. Automaatse klassifitseerimisülesande tulemused nii tootmises (0,872 F-meedet) kui ka vastuvõtmises (0,942 F-meedet) olid võrreldavad praeguse tehnika tasemega. Samuti püüdsime automaatselt anda hinde õppijate poolt toodetud tekstidele ning korrelatsiooni tulemused olid julgustavad, kuid selles ülesandes on veel palju arenguruumi. Arendatud keeleprofiil on sisendiks süsteemile, mis aitab keeleõppijatel aktiveerida rohkem passiivseid teadmisi teksti kirjutamisel.', 'sk': 'Literatura pogosto obravnava razlike v sprejemljivem in produktivnem besedišču, vendar slovnica pogosto ostane nepriznana v študiju pridobivanja drugega jezika. V prispevku smo z dvema korpusoma raziskali razlike v vedenju pedagoško relevantnih slovničnih struktur v sprejemnem in produkcijskem besedilu. Dodatno smo izboljšali različne ocene, opažene v tej preiskavi, tako da smo jim postavili polarnost, ki kaže, ali učenci jezikov preveč ali premalo uporabljajo slovnično strukturo. To je privedlo do sestave jezikovnega profila, ki je bil kasneje kombiniran z besediščem in berljivostjo za razvrščanje sprejemnih in produkcijskih besedil v tri razrede: začetniški, srednji in napredni. Rezultati avtomatske klasifikacijske naloge v proizvodnji (0,872 F-merila) in sprejemu (0,942 F-merila) so bili primerljivi s trenutnim stanjem tehnike. Prav tako smo poskušali samodejno pripisati oceno besedilom, ki so jih pripravili učenci, rezultati korelacije pa so bili spodbudni, vendar je še vedno veliko prostora za izboljšave v tej nalogi. Razvit jezikovni profil bo služil kot vhod za sistem, ki učencem jezikov pomaga aktivirati več pasivnega znanja pri pisanju besedil.', 'ha': "littafin na rubutu ko da yawa yana shawara da sãɓãnin da aka karɓi da takarda, kuma amma an bar karatun karatun a karɓi cikin littafin na farko. Ga wannan takardan, mun yi amfani da firma biyu dõmin mu yi anayya ga gaura a cikin aikin da ke da muhimmi na littãfin karɓãci da manunufi. Ko ƙari, Muka samar da ko'anar diffaniki wanda aka gani cikin wannan shirin da ke daidaita wani surori zuwa su mai nuna ko za'a yi amfani da shi ko kuma ba za'a yi amfani da wani matsayin grammati na da ma'abũta harshe. This led to the compilation of a language profile that was later combined with vocabulary and readability features for classifying reception and production texts in three classes: beginner, intermediate, and advanced.  Faramar aikin classified farat ɗaya cikin shirin gabatar da (0.842 wato F-meter) da aka sami (0.942 wato F-meter) zuwa na halin da ke kai. Kayya, Mun jarraba kokaci farat ɗaya ga matsayin waɗand a aka sanar da su, kuma matsalar da mazaɓa sun yi farin ciki, kuma amma yana da rabo mai kyau ga gyãra cikin wannan aikin. profilen harshen da aka buɗe zai yi amfani da shi kamar inputi wa tsarin na'ura da za'a ƙara wa masu lõkaci da harshen su yi amfani da su fara wani ƙari na'ura da ake rubũtãwa.", 'jv': 'Lisabasek adalah mengko ajeng-ajeng kapan pangan ing nggawe gerapakan karo pawaran winih lan sing rawuh dumadhi, maca, dadi kapan kanggo ngerasakno ujaran pangan langgar sing luwih apik. Nang kuwi iki, awak dhéwé nglanggar sampeyan pangan iki bakal ngelarang langgar barêng langgar sampeyan kaya nggawe barang kelas nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas nggawe tarjamahan lan textil sing uwong. Awak dhéwé éntuk luwih dumadhi sing nggawe geranggawe gerangkat luwih dumadhi iki, nik nggawe polarity awak dhéwé nggawe ngubah kaya perusahaan karo nggawe sistem sing gawe nguasai perusahaan o nggawe nguasai perusahaan langkung sampek. Digawe Rejaleng kapan kelompok nggambar sistem sing dibenalke nggawe Perintah (0. Awak dhéwé saiki ngejaraké auto-uteg nek kelompok nggawe texting gagal ning acara dadi, lan sekolahan kanggo nggawe barang seneng nggawe, njuk saiki ono mulai mbut sekolah dumadhi kanggo dianggap sing iki. Awakdhéwé éntuk panelanga kuwi nggawe input kanggo sistem sing bisa bantuan kanggo lewat langkung bantuan ing nggawe layar sing luwih bantuan kanggo kuwi nggambar textin.', 'bo': 'སྐད ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ཚོང་འབྲེལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་ལས་འགུལ་གྱི་སྣེ་ཚོགས་ལས་ ཚོང འུ་ཚོས་བརྟག་པར་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་གྲངས་མ་ཚད་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་མཐོང་བའི་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལ་ཡར་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་དང་། འདི་ནི་ཤུལ་ལས་བརྡ་སྐད་དང་ཀློག སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་པའི་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དབྱེ་རིམ་ལས་ཀྱི་གནད་སྡུད་དག་ཚད་གཉིས་པ(0.872 of F-measure)དང་ཕན་ཚུལ(0.942 of F-measure)འདི་ད་ལྟོའི་གནས་སྟངས་དང ང་ཚོས་ཀྱང་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཤེས་པ་ཚིག་ལས་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་ཞིག་གི་ཡིག The developed language profile will serve as input for a system that helps language learners to activate more of their passive knowledge in writing texts.', 'he': 'הספרות לעתים קרובות מתייחסת להבדלים במילים קבילים ויוצרים, אך גרמטיקה לעתים קרובות נשארת לא מוכרת במחקרי רכישת שפה שנייה. בעיתון הזה, השתמשנו בשני גופרות כדי לחקור את ההבדלים בהתנהגות של מבנים גרמטיים רלוונטיים מבחינה pedagoגית בטקסטים הקבלה והיצירה. We further improved the divergence scores observed in this investigation by setting a polarity to them that indicates whether there is overuse or underuse of a grammatical structure by language learners.  This led to the compilation of a language profile that was later combined with vocabulary and readability features for classifying reception and production texts in three classes: beginner, intermediate, and advanced.  התוצאות של משימה ההקלטה האוטומטית בייצור (0.872 של F-Measure) וקבלה (0.942 של F-Measure) היו שווים למצב האמנות הנוכחי. ניסינו גם לתייצב אוטומטית נקודה לטקסטים שנוצרים ע"י לומדים, ותוצאות הקשר היו מעודדות, אבל עדיין יש כמות טובה של מקום לשיפור במשימה הזאת. פרופיל השפה הפותח ישמש ככניסה למערכת שמעזרת ללמודים לשפה להפעיל יותר מידע הפסיבי שלהם בכתיבה טקסטים.'}
{'en': 'Corpus-based Content Construction', 'fr': 'Construction de contenu basée sur Corpus', 'ar': 'بناء المحتوى القائم على كوربوس', 'es': 'Construcción de contenido basada en corpus', 'pt': 'Construção de conteúdo baseada em corpus', 'ja': 'コーパスベースのコンテンツ構築', 'zh': '基于语料库', 'hi': 'कॉर्पस-आधारित सामग्री निर्माण', 'ru': 'Конструкция контента на основе корпуса', 'ga': 'Tógáil Ábhar Corpas-bhunaithe', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Κατασκευή περιεχομένου με βάση το σώμα', 'hu': 'Corpus-alapú tartalomkészítés', 'it': 'Costruzione di contenuti basata su Corpus', 'kk': 'Корпус негіздеген мазмұны құру', 'lt': 'Korpus grindžiamo turinio konstrukcija', 'mk': 'Конструкција на содржина на корпус', 'ms': 'Pembangunan Kandungan Berasas-Corpus', 'mt': 'Kostruzzjoni tal-Kontenut ibbażat fuq Corpus', 'ml': 'കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ ഉള്ളടക്കം', 'mn': 'Хэрэгцээ суурилсан Content Construction', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Konstrukcja treści oparta na korpusie', 'sr': 'Konstrukcija sadržaja na korpusu', 'ro': 'Construcție de conținut bazată pe corpus', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Buuxista waxyaabaha ku saleysan ee Corpus', 'sv': 'Corpusbaserad innehållskonstruktion', 'ta': 'கார்ப்ஸ் அடிப்படையிலான உள்ளடக்கம் கட்டமைப்பு', 'ur': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tập đoàn xây dựng', 'uz': 'Corpus-based Content Construction', 'bg': 'Конструкция на съдържание на корпус', 'da': 'Corpus- baseret indholdskonstruktion', 'nl': 'Constructie van inhoud op basis van corpus', 'hr': 'Konstrukcija sadržaja na korpusu', 'id': 'Corpus-based Content Construction', 'de': 'Korpusbasierte Inhaltserstellung', 'ko': '자료 라이브러리 기반 내용 구축', 'sw': 'Miundombinu yenye msingi wa Corpus', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'Mazmunlar', 'af': 'Name', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ', 'sq': 'Ndërtimi i përmbajtjeve me bazë në korpus', 'hy': 'Կորպուսի հիմնված պարունակության կառուցվածք', 'az': '칖st칲nl칲 M톛zmun Yap캼lmas캼', 'bs': 'Konstrukcija sadržaja na korpusu', 'bn': 'কোর্পাস ভিত্তিক বিষয়বস্তু নির্মাণ', 'cs': 'Konstrukce obsahu založeného na korpusu', 'et': 'Corpus-põhine sisuehitus', 'fi': 'Corpus-pohjainen sisällönrakenne', 'ca': 'Construcció de Content basada en Corpus', 'he': 'בניית תוכן מבוססת על קורפוס', 'ha': 'Cire Bayani da aka Basana Corbas', 'sk': 'Konstrukcija vsebine na podlagi Corpusa', 'jv': 'Content', 'bo': 'ཚོར་བ་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་ནང་དོན་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས'}
{'en': 'Enterprise content writers are engaged in writing textual content for various purposes. Often, the text being written may already be present in the enterprise corpus in the form of past articles and can be re-purposed for the current needs. In the absence of suitable tools, authors manually curate / create such content (sometimes from scratch) which reduces their productivity. To address this, we propose an automatic approach to generate an initial version of the author’s intended text based on an input content snippet. Starting with a set of extracted textual fragments related to the snippet based on the query words in it, the proposed approach builds the desired text from these fragment by simultaneously optimizing the information coverage, relevance, diversity and coherence in the generated content. Evaluations on standard datasets shows improved performance against existing baselines on several metrics.', 'es': 'Los redactores de contenido empresarial se dedican a escribir contenido textual para diversos fines. A menudo, el texto que se está redactando puede estar ya presente en el corpus empresarial en forma de artículos anteriores y puede reutilizarse para las necesidades actuales. En ausencia de herramientas adecuadas, los autores curan/crean manualmente dicho contenido (a veces desde cero), lo que reduce su productividad. Para hacer frente a esto, proponemos un enfoque automático para generar una versión inicial del texto previsto del autor en función de un fragmento de contenido de entrada. Comenzando con un conjunto de fragmentos de texto extraídos relacionados con el fragmento basado en las palabras de consulta que contiene, el enfoque propuesto construye el texto deseado a partir de estos fragmentos optimizando simultáneamente la cobertura de la información, la relevancia, la diversidad y la coherencia en el contenido generado. Las evaluaciones en conjuntos de datos estándar muestran un rendimiento mejorado en comparación con las líneas de base existentes en varias métricas.', 'pt': 'Os escritores de conteúdo corporativo estão envolvidos em escrever conteúdo textual para vários propósitos. Muitas vezes, o texto que está sendo escrito pode já estar presente no corpus da empresa na forma de artigos anteriores e pode ser reaproveitado para as necessidades atuais. Na ausência de ferramentas adequadas, os autores selecionam/criam manualmente esse conteúdo (às vezes do zero), o que reduz sua produtividade. Para resolver isso, propomos uma abordagem automática para gerar uma versão inicial do texto pretendido do autor com base em um trecho de conteúdo de entrada. A partir de um conjunto de fragmentos textuais extraídos relacionados ao trecho com base nas palavras de consulta nele, a abordagem proposta constrói o texto desejado a partir desses fragmentos otimizando simultaneamente a cobertura da informação, relevância, diversidade e coerência no conteúdo gerado. As avaliações em conjuntos de dados padrão mostram um desempenho aprimorado em relação às linhas de base existentes em várias métricas.', 'ar': 'يشارك كتّاب محتوى المؤسسة في كتابة محتوى نصي لأغراض مختلفة. في كثير من الأحيان ، قد يكون النص المكتوب موجودًا بالفعل في مجموعة المؤسسة في شكل مقالات سابقة ويمكن إعادة تصميمه لتلبية الاحتياجات الحالية. في حالة عدم وجود أدوات مناسبة ، يقوم المؤلفون يدويًا برعاية / إنشاء مثل هذا المحتوى (أحيانًا من نقطة الصفر) مما يقلل من إنتاجيتهم. لمعالجة هذا الأمر ، نقترح طريقة تلقائية لإنشاء نسخة أولية من النص المقصود للمؤلف بناءً على مقتطف محتوى الإدخال. بدءًا من مجموعة من الأجزاء النصية المستخرجة المتعلقة بالمقتطف بناءً على كلمات الاستعلام الموجودة فيه ، فإن النهج المقترح يبني النص المطلوب من هذه الأجزاء من خلال تحسين تغطية المعلومات والملاءمة والتنوع والاتساق في المحتوى الذي تم إنشاؤه في نفس الوقت. تُظهر التقييمات على مجموعات البيانات القياسية أداءً محسّنًا مقابل خطوط الأساس الحالية على العديد من المقاييس.', 'fr': "Les rédacteurs de contenu d'entreprise rédigent du contenu textuel à diverses fins. Souvent, le texte en cours de rédaction peut déjà être présent dans le corpus de l'entreprise sous la forme d'articles antérieurs et peut être adapté aux besoins actuels. En l'absence d'outils adaptés, les auteurs sélectionnent/créent manuellement ce type de contenu (parfois à partir de zéro), ce qui réduit leur productivité. Pour résoudre ce problème, nous proposons une approche automatique pour générer une version initiale du texte prévu par l'auteur sur la base d'un extrait de contenu d'entrée. En commençant par un ensemble de fragments textuels extraits liés à l'extrait basé sur les mots de requête qu'il contient, l'approche proposée construit le texte souhaité à partir de ces fragments en optimisant simultanément la couverture d'informations, la pertinence, la diversité et la cohérence dans le contenu généré. Les évaluations sur des ensembles de données standard montrent une amélioration des performances par rapport aux lignes de base existantes pour plusieurs mesures.", 'zh': '企业文编写者从事。 凡所编文,或以旧文存企业语料库,可针更调。 夫乏器者,手动谋/造此(或自始),降其工作效率也。 为此一自出,随所输片段生文本始。 询其本片段片段,立法同时优化生成覆盖率息,相关性多样性一致性,构之片段本。 据集评估,对数指标见基线,性能有所提高。', 'ja': 'エンタープライズコンテンツライターは、さまざまな目的のためにテキストコンテンツを書くことに従事しています。多くの場合、書かれているテキストは、過去の記事の形式でエンタープライズコーパスにすでに存在している可能性があり、現在のニーズのために再利用することができます。適切なツールがない場合、著者はそのようなコンテンツを（時には一から）手動でキュレーション/作成し、生産性を低下させます。これに対処するために、入力コンテンツスニペットに基づいて作成者の意図したテキストの初期バージョンを生成するための自動アプローチを提案します。クエリ単語に基づいて抽出されたスニペットに関連する一連のテキスト断片から始まり、提案されたアプローチは、生成されたコンテンツの情報カバレッジ、関連性、多様性、および一貫性を同時に最適化することによって、これらの断片から必要なテキストを構築します。標準データセットの評価では、いくつかの指標で既存のベースラインと比較してパフォーマンスが向上しています。', 'hi': 'एंटरप्राइज़ सामग्री लेखक विभिन्न उद्देश्यों के लिए पाठ्य सामग्री लिखने में लगे हुए हैं। अक्सर, लिखा जा रहा पाठ पहले से ही पिछले लेखों के रूप में एंटरप्राइज़ कॉर्पस में मौजूद हो सकता है और वर्तमान आवश्यकताओं के लिए फिर से उद्देश्य किया जा सकता है। उपयुक्त उपकरणों की अनुपस्थिति में, लेखक मैन्युअल रूप से ऐसी सामग्री (कभी-कभी खरोंच से) को क्यूरेट / बनाते हैं जो उनकी उत्पादकता को कम करता है। इसे संबोधित करने के लिए, हम एक इनपुट सामग्री स्निपेट के आधार पर लेखक के इच्छित पाठ का प्रारंभिक संस्करण उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक स्वचालित दृष्टिकोण का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। इसमें क्वेरी शब्दों के आधार पर स्निपेट से संबंधित निकाले गए पाठ्य टुकड़ों के एक सेट के साथ शुरू करते हुए, प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण उत्पन्न सामग्री में सूचना कवरेज, प्रासंगिकता, विविधता और सुसंगतता को एक साथ अनुकूलित करके इन टुकड़े से वांछित पाठ बनाता है। मानक डेटासेट पर मूल्यांकन कई मैट्रिक्स पर मौजूदा बेसलाइन के खिलाफ बेहतर प्रदर्शन दिखाता है।', 'ru': 'Писатели корпоративного контента занимаются написанием текстового контента для различных целей. Зачастую текст, который в настоящее время готовится, может уже присутствовать в корпоративном корпусе в форме прошлых статей и может быть использован для удовлетворения текущих потребностей. При отсутствии подходящих инструментов авторы вручную курируют/создают такой контент (иногда с нуля), что снижает их производительность. Для решения этой проблемы мы предлагаем автоматический подход к формированию исходной версии предполагаемого текста автора на основе фрагмента входного контента. Начиная с набора выделенных текстовых фрагментов, относящихся к фрагменту на основе содержащихся в нем слов запроса, предлагаемый подход строит из этого фрагмента желаемый текст путем одновременной оптимизации информационного охвата, релевантности, разнообразия и согласованности в сгенерированном контенте. Оценки стандартных наборов данных показывают улучшенную производительность по сравнению с существующими базовыми показателями по нескольким показателям.', 'ga': 'Bíonn scríbhneoirí ábhar fiontraíochta i mbun ábhar téacs a scríobh chun críocha éagsúla. Go minic, d’fhéadfadh an téacs atá á scríobh a bheith i láthair cheana féin sa chorpas fiontraíochta i bhfoirm alt san am a chuaigh thart agus is féidir é a athúsáid do na riachtanais reatha. In éagmais uirlisí oiriúnacha, coimeádann/cruthaíonn údair ábhar den sórt sin de láimh (uaireanta ón tús) a laghdaíonn a dtáirgiúlacht. Chun aghaidh a thabhairt air seo, molaimid cur chuige uathoibríoch chun leagan tosaigh de théacs beartaithe an údair a ghiniúint bunaithe ar mhír inneachair ionchuir. Ag tosú le sraith blúirí téacsacha eastósctha a bhaineann leis an mblúire bunaithe ar na focail cheistiúcháin ann, tógann an cur chuige atá beartaithe an téacs atá ag teastáil ó na blúirí seo trí chlúdach na faisnéise, ábharthacht, éagsúlacht agus comhleanúnachas an ábhair a ghintear a bharrfheabhsú ag an am céanna. Léiríonn measúnuithe ar thacair shonraí chaighdeánacha feidhmíocht fheabhsaithe i gcomparáid le bonnlínte reatha ar roinnt méadracht.', 'el': 'Οι συγγραφείς εταιρικού περιεχομένου ασχολούνται με τη συγγραφή κειμένου περιεχομένου για διάφορους σκοπούς. Συχνά, το κείμενο που γράφεται μπορεί να είναι ήδη παρόν στο εταιρικό σώμα με τη μορφή προηγούμενων άρθρων και μπορεί να επαναπροσδιοριστεί για τις τρέχουσες ανάγκες. Ελλείψει κατάλληλων εργαλείων, οι συγγραφείς επιμένουν/δημιουργούν χειροκίνητα τέτοιου περιεχομένου (μερικές φορές από το μηδέν), γεγονός που μειώνει την παραγωγικότητά τους. Για να αντιμετωπιστεί αυτό, προτείνουμε μια αυτόματη προσέγγιση για τη δημιουργία μιας αρχικής έκδοσης του προβλεπόμενου κειμένου του συγγραφέα με βάση ένα απόσπασμα περιεχομένου εισαγωγής. Ξεκινώντας από ένα σύνολο αποσπασμένων κειμένων που σχετίζονται με το απόσπασμα με βάση τις λέξεις ερωτήματος σε αυτό, η προτεινόμενη προσέγγιση χτίζει το επιθυμητό κείμενο από αυτά τα αποσπάσματα βελτιστοποιώντας ταυτόχρονα την κάλυψη πληροφοριών, τη συνάφεια, την ποικιλομορφία και τη συνοχή στο παραγόμενο περιεχόμενο. Οι αξιολογήσεις σε τυποποιημένα σύνολα δεδομένων δείχνουν βελτιωμένη απόδοση έναντι των υφιστάμενων γραμμών βάσης σε αρκετές μετρήσεις.', 'ka': 'ინტერპრაზიზის შემდგომარები ტექსტულის შემდგომარებით განსხვავებული მიზეზებისთვის დაწერა. წერილი ტექსტი შეიძლება უკვე იყოს სამუშაო კორპუსში წინ წერილის ფორმაში და შეიძლება ახლა განსაზღვრება მიმდინარე საჭიროებისთვის. შესაბამისი ხელსაწყობილობის არსებობაში, ავტორები ხელსახურად შექმნა/შექმნა ასეთი შემდგომარები (ზოგჯერ შემდგომარებით) რომელიც მათი პროდისტ ამის შესახებ, ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ავტორის მინდა ტექსტის საწყისო ვერსიის შექმნა ავტორის შესახებ ინფორმაციული შესახებ. სტრექტური ფრაგმენტების ნაწილიდან დაწყებული სტრექტური ფრაგმენტებით, რომელიც მისი კითხვის სიტყვებით დაბათებულია, საზოგადოებული პროგრამა შექმნა ამ ფრაგმენტიდან მოთხოვნილი ტექსტის შექმნა, ერთადერთად ინფ სტანდარტული მონაცემების განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებით უფრო მეტირებულია, რომელიც არსებობს ბაზის ხაზების განსაზღვრებით.', 'hu': 'A vállalati tartalomszerzők különböző célokra szöveges tartalmak írásával foglalkoznak. Gyakran előfordulhat, hogy az írás alatt álló szöveg már jelen van a vállalati korpuszban korábbi cikkek formájában, és a jelenlegi igényeknek megfelelően újra felhasználható. Megfelelő eszközök hiányában a szerzők manuálisan kezelik/hoznak létre ilyen tartalmakat (néha a semmiből), ami csökkenti termelékenységüket. Ennek megoldása érdekében automatikus megközelítést javasolunk a szerző tervezett szövegének kezdeti verziójának létrehozására egy beviteli tartalomrészlet alapján. A részletekhez kapcsolódó kivont szöveges töredékek halmazával kezdve a benne található lekérdezési szavak alapján a javasolt megközelítés ezekből a töredékekből a kívánt szöveget építi ki, egyidejűleg optimalizálva az információlefedettséget, relevanciát, sokszínűséget és koherenciát a generált tartalomban. A szabványos adatkészletek értékelései számos mutató alapján javult teljesítményt mutatnak a meglévő alapkészletekhez képest.', 'ms': 'Enterprise content writers are engaged in writing textual content for various purposes.  Biasanya, teks yang ditulis mungkin sudah hadir dalam korpus perusahaan dalam bentuk artikel yang lalu dan boleh ditujukan semula untuk keperluan semasa. Bila tiada alat yang sesuai, penulis secara manual mengkurasikan/mencipta kandungan tersebut (kadang-kadang dari kosong) yang mengurangkan produktifitas mereka. Untuk mengatasi ini, kami cadangkan pendekatan automatik untuk menghasilkan versi awal teks yang direncanakan penulis berdasarkan snippet kandungan input. Mula dengan set fragmen teks ekstrak yang berkaitan dengan snippet berdasarkan perkataan pertanyaan di dalamnya, pendekatan yang direncanakan membina teks yang diinginkan dari fragmen ini dengan simultan optimizasi penutupan maklumat, relevansi, pelbagai dan kesesuaian dalam kandungan yang dijana. Evaluasi pada set data piawai menunjukkan prestasi yang lebih baik terhadap garis dasar yang ada pada beberapa metrik.', 'so': "Qoreyda waxyaabaha ganacsigu waxay ku qoran yihiin wax ku qoran qorista qoraalka, sababo kala duduwan. Inta badan waxaa laga yaabaa in warqadda qoraalka lagu qoro ay shirkadda ku jirto nooca warqadaha hore, waana in loo qori karo baahida joogtada ah. Qoraaniyuhu waxyaabo ku habboon la’aanta ayaa si dhaqaale ah u kordhiya/sameynaya waxyaabaha caynkaas ah (marnaba marka laga bilaabo daboolka) taasoo hoos u dhigta dhaqaalaha. To address this, we propose an automatic approach to generate an initial version of the author's intended text based on an input content snippet.  Sida uu bilaabayo koox koox ah oo la xiriira suurtogal ah oo ku saabsan hadallada warqadda lagu qorayo, dhaqdhaqaaqa la soo jeeday ayaa dhisa qoraalka la doonayay oo ka soo qoray qeybahan islamarkaasna si siman ah u bedelmaya daboolka macluumaadka, xiriirka, kala duduwan iyo wadajirka ku jira waxyaabaha la sameeyay. Qiimeynta kooxda macluumaadka ee standardka ah waxaad ka heleysaa horumarinta sameynta oo ka hor jeeda saldhigyada hoose ee ku yaal oo kala duduwan.", 'ml': 'എൻട്രെപ്പ്രൈസ് ഉള്ളടക്കം എഴുതുന്നവര്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്ത കാരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കായി എഴുതുന്നതിലാണ്. എഴുതുന്ന പദാവലിയായിരിക്കുന്ന പാഠങ്ങള്\u200d നേരത്തെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായി കോര്\u200dപ്പറേഷനില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാകുമായിരിക്കാം. ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ആവശ്യങ് അനുയോജ്യമായ ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഇല്ലാത്തതിനാല്\u200d, ഇതുപോലുള്ള വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d കൈകാര്യമായി നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുക/ഉണ്ടാക്കുക (ചിലപ്പോള്\u200d  ഇതിനെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്താന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സ്വയമായ വഴിയോട് പ്രാര്\u200dത്ഥിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് ഉള്ളിലുള്ള സ്നിപ്പെറ്റ് അടി ചോദ്യ വാക്കുകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സ്നിപ്പിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തിയ ടെക്സ്റ്റുള്ള ഒരു കൂട്ടം പുറത്തെടുക്കപ്പെട്ട ട ടെക്സ്കുള്\u200d ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d തുടങ്ങുന് സാധാരണ ഡാറ്റാസറ്റുകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള ബെസ്റ്റേലൈനുകള്\u200dക്കെതിരായി മെറ്റിക്കുന്ന പ', 'kk': 'Америкалық мазмұны жазушылар мәтін мазмұнын түрлі мақсаттарына жазып тұрады. Көпшілік жазылған мәтін өткен мақалалар түрінде орындалуы мүмкін, және қазіргі қажеттерге қайта мақсат беруге болады. Жақсы құралдар жоқ болса, авторлар қолмен бұл мазмұнын (кейбірде жүгірткенде) қысқарту/ құру үшін өзінің производылығын азайтады. Бұл адресті түсіндіру үшін автордың мазмұның түсіндірілген мәтіннің бастапқы нұсқасын құру үшін автоматты түрде қатынау керек. Сұраныс сөздерінің негізінде сұраныс сөздеріне негізделген мәтіннің бөлшектерінен бастау керек мәтінні осы бөлшектерден бір-біріне мәліметтің мазмұнын оптимизациялау, мазмұнын, қатынасы, әртүрлігін және қатынасын жасау үшін Стандартты деректер қорларының оқиғалары бірнеше метрикалық негізгі жолдарына қарсы жылдамдығын көрсетеді.', 'sr': 'Pisači poduzetničkog sadržaja su uključeni u pisanje tekstualnog sadržaja za različite svrhe. Često, tekst koji se napiše može već biti prisutan u korpusu poduzeća u obliku prošlih članaka i može biti ponovno namjerena za trenutne potrebe. U nedostatku odgovarajućih alata, autori ručno iskrivljaju/stvaraju takav sadržaj (ponekad iz ogrebotine) koji smanjuje njihovu produktivnost. Da bi se ovo riješili, predlažemo automatski pristup da bi stvorili početnu verziju planiranog teksta autora na osnovu snippeta unutarnjeg sadržaja. Počevši sa setom izvlačenih tekstualnih fragment a povezanih sa snippetom na temelju reči u njemu, predloženi pristup izgradi željeni tekst iz ovog fragmenta istovremeno optimizujući pokrivanje informacija, relevantnost, raznolikost i saskašnost u proizvedenom sadržaju. Procjenjivanja standardnih seta podataka pokazuju poboljšanu učinku protiv postojećih osnovnih linija na nekoliko metrika.', 'mt': 'L-kittieba tal-kontenut tal-intrapriżi huma involuti bil-miktub fil-kontenut testwali għal diversi għanijiet. Ta’ spiss, it-test miktub jista’ jkun diġà preżenti fil-korpus tal-intrapriża fil-forma ta’ artikoli tal-passat u jista’ jerġa’ jiġi mmirat għall-ħtiġijiet attwali. Fin-nuqqas ta’ għodod xierqa, l-awturi jikkuraw/joħolqu b’mod manwali tali kontenut (xi kultant mill-bidu) li jnaqqas il-produttività tagħhom. Biex nindirizzaw dan, nipproponu approċċ awtomatiku biex niġġeneraw verżjoni inizjali tat-test maħsub tal-awtur ibbażat fuq snippet tal-kontenut tal-input. Filwaqt li jibda b’sett ta’ frammenti testwali estratti relatati mal-snippet ibbażat fuq il-kliem tal-mistoqsija fih, l-approċċ propost jibni t-test mixtieq minn dawn il-frammenti billi fl-istess ħin ottimizza l-kopertura tal-informazzjoni, ir-rilevanza, id-diversità u l-koerenza fil-kontenut iġġenerat. L-evalwazzjonijiet fuq settijiet ta’ dejta standard juru prestazzjoni mtejba meta mqabbla mal-linji bażi eżistenti fuq diversi metriċi.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරදේශ සාමාන්\u200dය ලේඛකයෝ විවිධ අරමුණ සඳහා පාළික සාමාන්ය ලියනවා. සමහර වෙලාවට ලියපු පාළුව දැනටමත් ප්\u200dරමාණ කර්පස් වලින් ඉන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට පසුගිය පාළුවන් වලින් ප්\u200dරමාණ යුක්තිය උපකරණය නැති වෙලාවට, ලේඛකයෝ අත්තර්ගයෙන් පිළිබඳින්න/නිර්මාණය කරන්න (සමහර වෙලාවට ස්ක්\u200dරැච්  මේක විශ්වාස කරන්න, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා ලේඛකයේ අනිවේශනය කරපු පාළුවේ පටන්ගත ස ස්නිප්ට් එක්ක සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පැත්තක් සෙට් එක්ක පටන් ගන්න, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්නේ, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයෙන් මෙම කැ ප්\u200dරමාණික දත්ත සැට් වල අවශ්\u200dයය පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට තියෙන්නේ මෙට්\u200dරික් වලින් ඉතිර', 'ro': 'Scriitorii de conținut întreprinderi sunt angajați în scrierea conținutului textual în diferite scopuri. Adesea, textul scris poate fi deja prezent în corpul întreprinderii sub formă de articole anterioare și poate fi reprodus pentru nevoile actuale. În absența unor instrumente adecvate, autorii selectează/creează manual un astfel de conținut (uneori de la zero), ceea ce reduce productivitatea lor. Pentru a rezolva acest lucru, propunem o abordare automată pentru a genera o versiune inițială a textului intenționat de autor pe baza unui fragment de conținut de intrare. Pornind de la un set de fragmente textuale extrase legate de fragment bazate pe cuvintele interogării din acesta, abordarea propusă construiește textul dorit din acest fragment, optimizând simultan acoperirea informațiilor, relevanța, diversitatea și coerența conținutului generat. Evaluările seturilor de date standard arată performanțe îmbunătățite față de liniile de referință existente pe mai multe măsurători.', 'no': 'Skrivarar av innhaldet i virksomheten er engasjert i skriving av tekstinnhald for ulike mål. Ofte kan teksten som er skriven allereie finst i virksomhetskorpus i form av siste artiklar, og kan gjenoppretta på nytt for dei gjeldande behov. Dersom det ikkje finst passande verktøy, oppretter forfattarane manuelt slik innhald (noen gong frå rulla) som reduserer produktiviteten. For å adressa dette, foreslår vi ein automatisk tilnærming for å laga ein startversjon av skriveprogrammet med tekst basert på eit innhaldssnippet. Startar med eit sett av ekstraherte tekstfragmenter relatert til snippet basert på spørsmålsord i det, bygger den foreslåde tilnærminga den ønskte teksten frå disse fragmentet ved å optimalisera informasjonsomslaget, relevant, mangfoldighet og koherens i den genererte innhaldet. Evalueringar på standardsetar viser forbetra utvikling mot eksisterande baselinjer på fleire metrikar.', 'it': "Gli autori di contenuti aziendali sono impegnati nella scrittura di contenuti testuali per vari scopi. Spesso, il testo in fase di scrittura può già essere presente nel corpus aziendale sotto forma di articoli passati e può essere riutilizzato per le esigenze attuali. In assenza di strumenti adeguati, gli autori curano/creano manualmente tali contenuti (a volte da zero) riducendo la loro produttività. Per risolvere questo problema, proponiamo un approccio automatico per generare una versione iniziale del testo previsto dall'autore sulla base di uno snippet di contenuto di input. Partendo da un insieme di frammenti testuali estratti relativi allo snippet basato sulle parole di query in esso contenute, l'approccio proposto costruisce il testo desiderato da questo frammento ottimizzando contemporaneamente la copertura delle informazioni, la pertinenza, la diversità e la coerenza nel contenuto generato. Le valutazioni su set di dati standard mostrano prestazioni migliorate rispetto alle linee di base esistenti su diverse metriche.", 'lt': 'Enterprise content writers are engaged in writing textual content for various purposes.  Dažnai rašomas tekstas gali būti pateiktas įmonės korpuse kaip ankstesni straipsniai ir gali būti iš naujo skirtas dabartiniams poreikiams tenkinti. Kadangi nėra tinkamų priemonių, autoriai rankiniu būdu tvarko arba sukuria tokį turinį (kartais iš nulio), kuris sumažintų jų našumą. Siekiant išspręsti šį klausimą, siūlome automatinį požiūrį, kad būtų sukurta pradinė autoriaus planuojamo teksto versija, pagrįsta įvesties turinio gabaritu. Pradedant iš ištrauktų tekstinių fragment ų, susijusių su pjūkliu, kuris grindžiamas jame esančiais užklausos žodžiais, siūlomas metodas sudaro pageidaujamą tekstą iš šių fragmentų tuo pačiu metu optimizuojant informacijos aprėptį, aktualumą, įvairovę ir sukaupto turinio nuoseklumą. Standartinių duomenų rinkinių vertinimai rodo, kad veiksmingumas, palyginti su esamomis bazinėmis linijomis, yra geresnis pagal kelis metrinius rodiklius.', 'mk': 'Пишувачите на содржини на претпријатието се ангажирани во пишување текстуална содржина за различни цели. Често, текстот што се напишува може да е веќе присутен во претпријатието во форма на минатите статии и може да биде повторно наменет за сегашните потреби. Во отсуството на соодветни алатки, авторите рачно ја курираат/создаваат ваквата содржина (понекогаш од нула) што ја намалува нивната продуктивност. За да го решиме ова, предложуваме автоматски пристап за генерирање на првична верзија на наменетиот текст на авторот базиран на рецепт на внесена содржина. Почнувајќи со сет екстрактирани текстуални фрагменти поврзани со снимката врз основа на зборовите од прашањето во неа, предложениот пристап го изградува желениот текст од овие фрагменти со истовремено оптимизирање на информациската покривка, релевантноста, различноста и коеоренцијата во генерираната содржина. Оценувањата на стандардните податоци покажуваат подобрена резултатност во однос на постојните бази на неколку метрики.', 'mn': 'Энтерпрайз бүтээгдэхүүний зохиолчид өөр төрлийн зорилгоор textual content бичиж байдаг. Заримдаа бичигдсэн текст өнгөрсөн бичлэгүүдийн хэлбэртэй байж болно. Одоо байгаа хэрэгцээнд дахин зориулж болно. Хэрэгтэй хэрэгсэл байхгүй байхад, зохиолчдын хувьд үйлдвэрлэлийг багасгаж буй эдгээр бүтээгдэхүүнийг (заримдаа гүйцэтгэх боломжтой байдлаас) хуулбарладаг. Үүнийг хэлэхэд бид автоматжуулсан арга зам зохиолчдын төлөвлөгөөний эхний хувилбарыг бий болгодог. Үүний квери үгнээс үндсэн хэдэн хэсэгт нэмэгдсэн текст хэсэгт эхлэхэд, санал өгсөн арга нь эдгээр хэсэгт хүсэлтэй текст бий болгодог. Стандарт өгөгдлийн сангийн үнэлгээ хэд хэдэн метрийн суурь шулууны эсрэг олон суурь шулуунуудыг сайжруулдаг.', 'pl': 'Autorzy treści korporacyjnych zajmują się pisaniem treści tekstowych do różnych celów. Często pisany tekst może być już obecny w korpusie przedsiębiorstwa w postaci wcześniejszych artykułów i może być ponownie przeznaczony do aktualnych potrzeb. W przypadku braku odpowiednich narzędzi autorzy ręcznie kurują/tworzą takie treści (czasem od podstaw), co zmniejsza ich produktywność. W tym celu proponujemy automatyczne podejście do generowania pierwszej wersji zamierzonego tekstu autora na podstawie fragmentu treści wejściowej. Zaczynając od zestawu ekstrahowanych fragmentów tekstowych związanych z fragmentem na podstawie zawartych w nim słów zapytania, proponowane podejście buduje pożądany tekst z tych fragmentów poprzez jednoczesną optymalizację zasięgu informacji, adekwatności, różnorodności i spójności w generowanej treści. Oceny standardowych zbiorów danych pokazują poprawę wydajności w stosunku do istniejących linii bazowych na kilku wskaźnikach.', 'sv': 'F철retagsinneh책llsskribenter 채r engagerade i att skriva textinneh책ll f철r olika 채ndam책l. Ofta kan den text som skrivs redan finnas med i f철retagskorpusen i form av tidigare artiklar och kunna oms채ttas f철r de aktuella behoven. I avsaknad av l채mpliga verktyg kan f철rfattarna manuellt kurera/skapa s책dant inneh책ll (ibland fr책n grunden) vilket minskar deras produktivitet. F철r att ta itu med detta f철resl책r vi en automatisk metod f철r att generera en f철rsta version av f철rfattarens avsedda text baserat p책 ett inmatningsinneh책llsutdrag. Med utg책ngspunkt fr책n en upps채ttning extraherade textfragment relaterade till utdraget baserat p책 fr책georden i det bygger den f철reslagna metoden den 철nskade texten fr책n dessa fragment genom att samtidigt optimera informationst채ckning, relevans, m책ngfald och samst채mmighet i det genererade inneh책llet. Utv채rderingar av standarddataupps채ttningar visar p책 f철rb채ttrad prestanda j채mf철rt med befintliga baslinjer p책 flera m채tv채rden.', 'ta': 'விருப்பங்களின் உள்ளடக்கங்கள் எழுதுபவர்கள் பல பொருட்களுக்கு எழுதும் உரை உள்ளடக்கத்தில் ஈடுபட்டுள்ளன. பெரும்பாலாக எழுதப்பட்ட உரை நிறுவனத்தின் குறியீட்டில் ஏற்கனவே இருக்கலாம் முந்தைய கட்டுரைகளின் வடிவத்தில் இருக்கலாம் மற்று பொருத்தமான கருவிகள் இல்லாமல், ஆசிரியர்கள் கைமுறையாக வளர்ச்சி/உருவாக்குகிறார் இதை முகவரிப்பதற்கு, ஆசிரியரின் துவக்க பதிப்பை உருவாக்க ஒரு உள்ளீட்டு உள்ளடக்கத்தை அடிப்படையில் உள்ளிடுக கேள்வி வார்த்தைகளை அடிப்படையில் தொடர்புடைய குறிப்புகளுடன் வெளியேற்றப்பட்ட உரை பிரிவுகளுடன் துவங்குகிறது, பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட செயல்பாடு உரையை உருவாக்குகிறது, உரு நிலையான தரவுத்தளங்களின் மதிப்புகள் பல மெட்ரிக்குகளில் இருக்கும் அடிப்படைகளுக்கு எதிராக மேம்படுத்தப்பட', 'ur': 'انٹرپرائز منصفات لکھنے والے مختلف مطالبوں کے لئے textual content لکھنے میں مشغول ہیں. اغلب، لکھی ہوئی پیغام پہلے ہی اپنا شرکت کرپوس میں موجود ہو سکتی ہے اور اغلب کے لائق کے لئے دوبارہ مقرر کر سکتی ہے. مناسب ابزار کے بغیر، لکھنے والوں کو اپنا ذریعہ دھوپ/پیدا کرتا ہے (بعض اوقات) جو ان کی پیدائش کم کرتا ہے۔ اس کے بارے میں ہم ایک آٹوٹی طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ لکھنے کے ارادہ کردہ متن کے آغاز نسخہ پیدا کریں اس کے سوال کلمات پر بنیاد اسنیپٹ کے ساتھ ایک مجموعہ سے شروع کیا گیا ہے، اس طرح پیش کیا گیا ہے کہ یہ ٹکڑے سے خواہشوں کا متن بنا رہا ہے، ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ اطلاعات کے پورے، اثرات، مختلف اور پیدا ہونے والی منصفات میں مزید اچھا کر رہا ہے. استاندارد ڈاٹ سٹ کے مطابق مطابق کے متریک پر موجود بنیس لینوں کے مقابلہ میں بہترین فعالیت دکھاتے ہیں.', 'uz': 'Enterprise tarkibi yozuvchilari muloqat uchun matn tarkibini yozishga ishlaydi. Odatda, yozilgan matn joriy keraklarni qaytadan foydalanishi mumkin. @ info @ info: whatsthis Name Name', 'vi': 'Các nhà soạn thảo nội dung con tầu được soạn thảo cho nhiều mục đích khác nhau. Thông thường, văn bản đang được viết có thể đã có mặt trong tập đoàn kinh doanh dưới dạng các bài báo cũ và có thể được định lại cho nhu cầu hiện tại. Nếu không có dụng cụ thích hợp, tác giả quản lý và tạo nội dung như thế (đôi khi từ vết xước) làm giảm năng suất của họ. Để giải quyết việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp tự động để tạo ra một phiên bản đầu tiên của tác giả dựa trên một phần trích nội dung. Bắt đầu bằng một nhóm các mảnh ghép có kết cấu với các mảnh vụn dựa trên các từ truy vấn trong nó, cách tiếp cận đề này xây dựng các văn bản mong muốn từ các mảnh vỡ này bằng cách đồng thời tăng tối đa khoảng trống thông tin, liên quan, đa dạng và liên quan trong nội dung đã tạo ra. Đánh giá các tập tin tiêu chuẩn cho thấy hiệu suất tốt hơn so với các bản mẫu tồn tại trên nhiều metric.', 'bg': 'Авторите на корпоративно съдържание се занимават с писане на текстово съдържание за различни цели. Често текстът, който се пише, може вече да присъства в корпуса на предприятието под формата на минали статии и да бъде преработен за текущите нужди. При липса на подходящи инструменти авторите ръчно уреждат/създават такова съдържание (понякога от нулата), което намалява тяхната производителност. За да се справим с това, предлагаме автоматичен подход за генериране на първоначална версия на предвидения от автора текст въз основа на фрагмент от входно съдържание. Започвайки с набор от извлечени текстови фрагменти, свързани с фрагмента въз основа на думите за заявка в него, предложеният подход изгражда желания текст от този фрагмент, като едновременно оптимизира информационното покритие, релевантността, разнообразието и съгласуваността в генерираното съдържание. Оценките на стандартните набори от данни показват подобрена производителност спрямо съществуващите базови линии по няколко показателя.', 'da': 'Virksomhedsindholdsforfattere er engageret i at skrive tekstindhold til forskellige formål. Ofte kan den tekst, der bliver skrevet, allerede være til stede i virksomhedskorpusset i form af tidligere artikler og kan genbruges til de aktuelle behov. I mangel af egnede værktøjer, forfattere manuelt kurerer/opretter sådant indhold (nogle gange fra bunden), hvilket reducerer deres produktivitet. For at løse dette foreslår vi en automatisk tilgang til at generere en første version af forfatterens påtænkte tekst baseret på et input indholdsstykke. Startende med et sæt ekstraherede tekstfragmenter relateret til udsnittet baseret på forespørgselsordene i det, bygger den foreslåede fremgangsmåde den ønskede tekst ud fra dette fragment ved samtidig at optimere informationsdækning, relevans, mangfoldighed og sammenhæng i det genererede indhold. Evalueringer af standarddatasæt viser forbedret ydeevne i forhold til eksisterende basislinjer på flere målinger.', 'nl': 'Enterprise content writers zijn bezig met het schrijven van tekstuele inhoud voor verschillende doeleinden. Vaak kan de geschreven tekst al aanwezig zijn in het ondernemingscorpus in de vorm van eerdere artikelen en kan worden aangepast aan de huidige behoeften. Bij afwezigheid van geschikte tools, cureren auteurs handmatig/creëren dergelijke content (soms vanaf nul), wat hun productiviteit vermindert. Om dit aan te pakken, stellen we een automatische aanpak voor om een eerste versie van de beoogde tekst van de auteur te genereren op basis van een input content snippet. Beginnend met een reeks geëxtraheerde tekstfragmenten gerelateerd aan het fragment op basis van de zoekwoorden erin, bouwt de voorgestelde aanpak de gewenste tekst uit dit fragment door tegelijkertijd de informatiedekking, relevantie, diversiteit en samenhang in de gegenereerde inhoud te optimaliseren. Evaluaties op standaard datasets tonen verbeterde prestaties ten opzichte van bestaande baselines op verschillende statistieken.', 'de': 'Enterprise Content Writer sind damit beschäftigt, Textinhalte für verschiedene Zwecke zu schreiben. Oft kann der zu schreibende Text bereits in Form vergangener Artikel im Unternehmenskorpus vorhanden sein und für die aktuellen Bedürfnisse neu bestimmt werden. In Ermangelung geeigneter Tools kuratieren/erstellen Autoren solche Inhalte manuell (manchmal von Grund auf), was ihre Produktivität reduziert. Um dies zu beheben, schlagen wir einen automatischen Ansatz vor, um eine erste Version des beabsichtigten Textes des Autors basierend auf einem Input Content Snippet zu generieren. Ausgehend von einer Reihe extrahierter Textfragmente, die auf das Snippet bezogen sind, basierend auf den darin enthaltenen Abfragewörtern, baut der vorgeschlagene Ansatz den gewünschten Text aus diesem Fragment auf, indem gleichzeitig die Informationsabdeckung, Relevanz, Vielfalt und Kohärenz im generierten Inhalt optimiert wird. Auswertungen von Standarddatensätzen zeigen eine verbesserte Leistung gegenüber bestehenden Baselines für mehrere Metriken.', 'hr': 'Pisači sadržaja poduzeća uključeni su u pisanje tekstualnog sadržaja za različite svrhe. Često, napisan tekst može već biti prisutan u poduzetničkom korpusu u obliku prošlih članaka i može se ponovno namjeriti za trenutne potrebe. U nedostatku odgovarajućih alata, autori ručno iskrivljaju/stvaraju takvu sadržaj (ponekad iz ogrebotine) koji smanjuje njihovu produktivnost. Da bi se ovo riješili, predlažemo automatski pristup stvaranju početne verzije planiranog teksta autora na temelju snippeta unutarnjeg sadržaja. Počevši sa skupom izvlačenih tekstualnih dijelova povezanih s snippetom na temelju riječi u njemu zapitivanja, predloženi pristup izgradi željeni tekst iz tih dijelova istovremeno optimizirajući pokrivanje informacija, relevantnost, raznolikost i saskašnost u proizvedenom sadržaju. Procjenjivanja standardnih seta podataka pokazuju poboljšanu učinku protiv postojećih osnovnih linija na nekoliko metrika.', 'ko': '기업 내용 작성자는 각종 목적을 위해 텍스트 내용을 작성하는 데 종사한다.일반적으로 작성 중인 텍스트는 과거 문장의 형식으로 기업 어료 라이브러리에 나타날 수 있고 현재의 수요에 따라 재구성할 수 있다.적합한 도구가 부족한 상황에서 작가가 수동으로 이런 내용을 기획/창설하면 그들의 업무 효율을 떨어뜨릴 수 있다.이 문제를 해결하기 위해 우리는 입력 내용 부분을 바탕으로 작가가 예상한 텍스트의 초기 버전을 자동으로 생성하는 방법을 제시했다.이 방법은 먼저 세션 중의 검색어에 따라 세션과 관련된 텍스트 세션을 추출하고 생성 내용 중의 정보 범위, 관련성, 다양성과 일치성을 동시에 최적화하여 이 세션에서 필요한 텍스트를 구축한다.표준 데이터 집합에 대한 평가에 따르면 몇 가지 지표에서 기존 기선에 비해 성능이 향상되었다.', 'id': 'Penulis konten perusahaan terlibat dalam menulis konten tekstual untuk berbagai tujuan. Biasanya, teks yang ditulis mungkin sudah hadir di Corpus Perusahaan dalam bentuk artikel yang lalu dan dapat ditujukan kembali untuk kebutuhan saat ini. Dalam ketidakhadiran peralatan yang cocok, penulis secara manual mengurus/menciptakan konten tersebut (terkadang dari nol) yang mengurangi produktivitas mereka. Untuk mengatasi hal ini, kami mengusulkan pendekatan otomatis untuk menghasilkan versi awal dari teks yang ditujukan oleh penulis berdasarkan potongan isi masukan. Mulai dengan set fragmen teks ekstraksi yang berhubungan dengan snippet berdasarkan kata-kata pertanyaan di dalamnya, pendekatan yang diusulkan membangun teks yang diinginkan dari fragmen ini dengan secara bersamaan optimisasi penutupan informasi, relevansi, diversitas dan koherensi dalam isi yang dihasilkan. Evaluasi pada set data standar menunjukkan prestasi yang lebih baik melawan garis dasar yang ada pada beberapa metrik.', 'sw': 'Waandishi wa maudhui ya Enterprise wanajihusisha na kuandika maudhui ya maandishi kwa sababu mbalimbali. Mara nyingi, maandishi yanayoandikwa inaweza tayari kuwepo kwenye viungo vya biashara kwa namna ya makala zilizopita na inaweza kutengenezwa tena kwa mahitaji ya sasa. Kwa kutokuwepo na vifaa vinavyofaa, waandishi wanazuia/kutengeneza maudhui yanayofanana kwa manufaa (wakati mwingine kutokana na vifaa hivyo) ambavyo hupunguza uzalishaji wao. Ili kukabiliana na hili, tunapendekeza mbinu za kujitokeza kutengeneza toleo la mwanzo la maandishi yaliyolengwa kwa kutumia vifaa vya maudhui. Kuanzia na mfululizo wa vipande vya maandishi vilivyotolewa na vifaa vinavyohusiana na kikosi hicho kinachohusiana na maneno ya utafiti ndani yake, mbinu zinazopendekezwa inajenga ujumbe unaotaka kutoka kwenye vipande hiki kwa kutumia maeneo yanayotokana na taarifa, yenye umuhimu, tofauti na ushirikiano katika maudhui yaliyozaliwa. Tathmini katika seti za takwimu za kawaida zinaonyesha utendaji mzuri dhidi ya misingi zilizopo kwenye mitindo kadhaa.', 'tr': 'Çeşitli mazmunlar ýazýanlary metin mazmunlaryny dürli amaçlar üçin ýazmakda çalyşýarlar. Köplenç ýazylýan tekst öňki makalaryň şeklinde öňki maksada bolup biler we häzirki gereklikleriň üçin ýene maksady berilebilir. Gowy esbaplar ýok bolmadykda, awtorlary elle çykarýar/bejerýärler şonuň maksadyny (käwagt çykarýan bolsa) özleriniň töredijilerini azaltýar. Bu adresi çykmak üçin, awtomatik taýýarlamak üçin awtomatik taýýarlamak isleýän metin başlangıçyny saýlamak üçin bir nusga teklip berýäris. Snippelere görşilen bir topar tekst parçalary bilen başlaýar, teklip eden sözleriň üstünde arzuw metini bu parçaktan hemişe bolan informasiýa örgütlerini optimize edir. Standart veri setirlerinde deňlenmeler birnäçe metrikde bar baz hatlaryň garşynda gowydyrylygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Onderwerp inhoud skrywers word in skrifte van tekstuul inhoud vir verskillende doels. Often, die teks wat geskryf word, dalk mag reeds voorsien wees in die bedieningskorpus in die vorm van verlede artikels en kan wees herdoen vir die huidige behoefte. In die absence van geskikte nutsprogramme, outeurs moet selfs koriëer/skep sodanige inhoud (soms van skrap) wat hulle produktiviteit verduur. Om hierdie adres te stel, voorstel on s 'n outomatiese toegang om 'n aanvanklike weergawe van die outeur se bedoelde teks te genereer op' n invoer inhoud snippet. Beginne met 'n stel van uitgepakte tekstuule fragmente wat verwante met die snippet gebaseer op die navraag woorde daarin, bou die voorgestelde toegang die verlangde teks van hierdie fragment deur samelewing die inligting omdekking, relevansie, diversiteit en koherens in die genereerde inhoud te optimaliseer. Evaluasies op standaard datastel vertoon verbeterde prestasie teen bestaande basisline op verskeie metries.", 'fa': 'نویسندگان محتویات Enterprise در نوشتن محتویات متن برای هدف مختلف مشترک هستند. معمولاً متن نوشته شده ممکن است از قبل در شرکت شرکت در شکل مقاله گذشته وجود داشته باشد و برای نیازهای فعلی دوباره هدف داده شود. در غیر از ابزارهای مناسب، نویسندگان با دستی این محتوای را (گاهی از خراب) می\u200cکند و می\u200cآفریند که فعالیت خود را کاهش می\u200cکند. برای حل این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک روش خودکار برای تولید نسخه\u200cی اولیه\u200cی متن مقرر شده\u200cی نویسنده بر اساس یک تنظیم محتوای ورودی. شروع به مجموعه از قطعه\u200cهای متن خارج شده\u200cای که مربوط به اسنکت بر اساس کلمات سوال در آن هستند، این دستور پیشنهاد متن خواسته را از این قطعه ساخته می\u200cکند با همزمان بهترین کردن پوشش اطلاعات، relevance, مختلف و هماهنگی در محتوای تولید شده. ارزیابی\u200cهای مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای استاندارد بر خلاف خطوط پایین\u200cهای موجود در چند متریک بهتر شده را نشان می\u200cدهد.', 'sq': 'Shkrimtarët e përmbajtjeve të ndërmarrjeve janë të angazhuar në shkrimin e përmbajtjeve tekstuale për qëllime të ndryshme. Shpesh, teksti që është shkruar mund të jetë tashmë i pranishëm në korpus ndërmarrjeje në form ën e artikujve të kaluar dhe mund të rishikohet për nevojat aktuale. Në mungesë të mjeteve të përshtatshme, autorët kurojnë/krijojnë manualisht përmbajtje të tilla (ndonjëherë nga zero) që reduktojnë produktivitetin e tyre. Për të trajtuar këtë, ne propozojmë një qasje automatike për të gjeneruar një version fillestar të tekstit të synuar të autorit bazuar në një pjesë të përmbajtjes s ë hyrjes. Duke filluar me një sërë fragment ësh tekstualë të nxjerra lidhur me snippet bazuar në fjalët e pyetjes në të, metoda e propozuar ndërton tekstin e dëshiruar nga këto fragmente duke optimizuar njëkohësisht mbulimin e informacionit, relevancën, diversitetin dhe koherencën në përmbajtjen e gjeneruar. Vlerësimet në grupet standarde të të dhënave tregojnë performancë të përmirësuar ndaj linjave bazë ekzistuese në disa metrika.', 'am': "የEnterprise content writers are involved in writing text content for various reasons. ብዙ ጊዜም የተጻፈው ጽሑፍ ባለፉት ጽሑፎች በክፍለ ክፍል ውስጥ ሊሆን ይችላል፡፡ በሚያስፈልገው መሣሪያዎች ባይኖሩ፣ ጸሐፊዎች ፍሬያቸውን የሚያጎድሉ እንደዚህ ያሉትን ማህበረሰብ (አንዳንድ ጊዜ ከክፈት) በመፍጠር/በመፍጠር እጃቸው ያስተካክላሉ፡፡ To address this, we propose an automatic approach to generate an initial version of the author's intended text based on an input content snippet.  በተጠያየቁ ቃላት ላይ በሚያሳየው የጽሑፍ ክፍሎች በተጀመረ ጊዜ በተፈጸመ የጽሑፍ ክፍሎች በተጠቃሚ ክፍል፣ የመረጃ ክፍተት፣ ተግባር፣ ልዩ ልዩነት እና አብዛኛነት በመጠቀም በተዘጋጀው ይታያል፡፡ ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s", 'hy': 'Եզրակազմակերպության պարունակության գրողները տարբեր նպատակներով գրում են տեքստալ պարունակություն: Հաճախ գրված տեքստը կարող է արդեն ներկա լինել ընկերության կորպոսում անցյալ հոդվածների տեսքով և կարող է վերաձևավորվել ներկա կարիքների համար: Անհրաժեշտ գործիքների բացակայության դեպքում հեղինակները ձեռքով կարգավորում են կամ ստեղծում այնպիսի պարունակություն (երբեմն զրոյից), որը նվազեցնում է իրենց արդյունավետությունը: Սա լուծելու համար մենք առաջարկում ենք ավտոմատիկ մոտեցում ստեղծելու հեղինակի մտածված տեքստի սկզբնական տարբերակը, հիմնված մուտքագրման պարունակության կտորի վրա: Սկսելով մի շարք արտահանված տեքստային մասնիկներից, որոնք կապված են կտորի հետ, հիմնված դրա հարցում գտնվող բառերի վրա, առաջարկված մոտեցումը կառուցում է ցանկացած տեքստը այս մասնիկներից միաժամանակ օպտիմացնում է տեղեկատվության ծածկումը, կարևորությունը, բազմազանությունը և համա Ստանդարտ տվյալների համակարգերի գնահատումները ցույց են տալիս բարելավված արդյունքները գոյություն ունեցող հիմնական գծերի համեմատ մի քանի մետրիկայի վրա:', 'az': 'Enterprise məlumatı yazıcıları müxtəlif məqsədilə məlumatı yazmağa çalışır. Yazılanmış məktub çox çox əvvəlki məktublərin forması ilə şirkət korpusu içində olar və həmin məktublərə yenidən məqsəd edilə bilər. Yaxşı vasitələr yoxduğunda, yazıcılar öz ürəkliyini azaltmaq üçün elə bir məlumatı (bəzən dəyişdirməkdən) qurtarar/yarat. Bunu çəkmək üçün, yazıcının fikirləşdirilmiş mətnin başlangıç versiyonunu yaratmaq üçün avtomatik bir yol təklif edirik. İçindəki sual sözlərə dayanan snippet ilə əlaqə edilən məktub parçaları ilə başlayınca, təklif edilən təklif bu parçalardan istədiyi məktub təklif edir, məlumat örtüyünü, məlumatlarını, müxtəlif, müxtəlif və müxtəlif məlumatların birlikdə optimizləndirir. Standardlı verilən qutuqların değerlendirmələri bir neçə metrik üstündə mevcut baz çətinlərinə qarşı daha yaxşı performans göstərir.', 'bn': 'বিভিন্ন উদ্দেশ্যের জন্য প্রযুক্তিগত বিষয়বস্তু লেখকদের লেখায় অংশগ্রহণ করা হয়েছে। প্রায়শই, লেখার লেখাটি পূর্বের প্রবন্ধের রূপে ইতোমধ্যে উপস্থিত হতে পারে এবং বর্তমান প্রয়োজনের জন্য পুনরায় উদ্দেশ্য প্রদান করা য যথাযথ টুলসের অভাবে লেখকদের এই ধরনের বিষয়বস্তু নির্মাণ/তৈরি করে (মাঝে মাঝে মাঝে থেকে) যা তাদের উৎপাদন কমিয়ে দেয়। এই বিষয়টি ঠিকানা করার জন্য আমরা একটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে প্রস্তাব করি লেখকের প্রথম সংস্করণ তৈরি করার জন্য একটি ইনপুটের বিষয়বস্তু স অনুসন্ধানের ভিত্তিতে স্নিপেটের সাথে সম্পর্কিত কিছু টেক্সটুল ভাঙ্গা দিয়ে শুরু করা শুরু করে, প্রস্তাবিত পদক্ষেপ এই ভাঙ্গার থেকে অনুসন্ধানের লেখা তৈরি করে এবং সাথ স্ট্যান্ডার্ডার ডাটাসেটের মূল্য প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে বেশ কয়েকটি মেট্রিকের বিভিন্ন বেস লাইনের বিরুদ্ধ', 'ca': "Els escriptors de continguts de l'empresa estan involucrats en escriure continguts textuals per diversos propòsits. Sovint, el text que està escrit potser ja està present al corpus empresarial en forma d'articles passats i pot ser redirect a les necessitats actuals. En ausencia d'eines adequades, els autors conserven/creen manualment aquest contingut (de vegades de zero) que redueix la seva productivitat. Per abordar això, proposem un enfocament automàtic per generar una versió inicial del text que l'autor intenta basant-se en un fragment de contingut d'entrada. Començant amb un conjunt de fragments textuals extraits relacionats amb el fragment basat en les paraules de pregunta que hi ha, l'enfocament proposat construeix el text desitjat d'aquest fragment optimitzant simultàniament la cobertura de la informació, la relevància, la diversitat i la coherencia del contingut generat. Les evaluacions dels conjunts de dades estàndard mostren un rendiment millorat en comparació amb les línies de base existents en diverses mètriques.", 'bs': 'Pisači sadržaja poduzeća uključeni su u pisanje tekstualnog sadržaja za različite svrhe. Često, tekst koji se napiše može već biti prisutan u korpusu poduzeća u obliku prošlih članaka i može se ponovno namjeriti za trenutne potrebe. U odsustvu odgovarajućih alata, autori ručno iskrivljaju/stvaraju takav sadržaj (ponekad iz ogrebotine) koji smanjuje njihovu produktivnost. Da bi se ovo riješili, predlažemo automatski pristup stvaranju početne verzije planiranog teksta autora na temelju snippeta unutarnjeg sadržaja. Počevši sa setom izvlačenih tekstualnih fragment a povezanih sa snippetom na temelju riječi u njemu, predloženi pristup izgradi željeni tekst iz ovog fragmenta istovremeno optimizirajući pokrivanje informacija, relevantnost, raznolikost i saskašnost u proizvedenom sadržaju. Procjenjivanja standardnih seta podataka pokazuju poboljšanu učinku protiv postojećih osnovnih linija na nekoliko metrika.', 'cs': 'Podnikoví autori obsahu se zabývají psaním textového obsahu pro různé účely. Často může být napsaný text již v korpusu podniku přítomen ve formě minulých článků a může být přepracován pro aktuální potřeby. V případě absence vhodných nástrojů autoři manuálně kurátorují/vytvářejí takový obsah (někdy od začátku), což snižuje jejich produktivitu. Pro řešení tohoto problému navrhujeme automatický přístup k generování počáteční verze autorova zamýšleného textu na základě vstupního obsahu úryvku. Navržený přístup vytváří z těchto fragmentů požadovaný text současně optimalizací pokrytí informací, relevance, diverzity a koherence generovaného obsahu. Hodnocení standardních datových sad ukazuje lepší výkon oproti stávajícím základním liniím na několika metrikách.', 'et': 'Ettevõtte sisukirjutajad tegelevad tekstisisu kirjutamisega erinevatel eesmärkidel. Sageli võib kirjutatav tekst juba esineda ettevõtte korpuses varasemate artiklite kujul ning seda saab praeguste vajaduste rahuldamiseks muuta. Sobivate tööriistade puudumisel kureerivad autorid käsitsi/loovad sellise sisu (mõnikord nullist), mis vähendab nende tootlikkust. Selle lahendamiseks pakume välja automaatse lähenemisviisi autori kavandatud teksti esialgse versiooni genereerimiseks sisendsisu lõike alusel. Alustades lõikega seotud ekstraheeritud tekstifragmentidest, mis põhinevad selles sisalduvatel päringusõnadel, ehitab väljapakutud lähenemisviis neist fragmentidest soovitud teksti, optimeerides samaaegselt genereeritud sisu infokatvust, asjakohasust, mitmekesisust ja sidusust. Standardsete andmekogumite hindamine näitab mitmete mõõdikute puhul paremat jõudlust võrreldes olemasolevate lähtejoontega.', 'fi': 'Yrityssisältöjen kirjoittajat ovat sitoutuneet kirjoittamaan tekstisisältöä eri tarkoituksiin. Usein kirjoitettava teksti saattaa olla jo olemassa yrityskorpusessa aikaisempien artikkeleiden muodossa ja sitä voidaan muokata nykyisiin tarpeisiin. Sopivien työkalujen puuttuessa kirjoittajat kuratoivat/luovat manuaalisesti tällaisen sisällön (joskus tyhjästä), mikä vähentää heidän tuottavuuttaan. Tämän ratkaisemiseksi ehdotamme automaattista lähestymistapaa alkuperäisen version luomiseen kirjoittajan tarkoittamasta tekstistä syötetyn sisältöpätkän perusteella. Aloittaen katkelmaan liittyvistä tekstifragmenteista, jotka perustuvat sen kyselysanoihin, ehdotettu lähestymistapa rakentaa halutun tekstin näistä fragmenteista optimoimalla samalla tuotetun sisällön kattavuutta, relevanssia, monimuotoisuutta ja johdonmukaisuutta. Standarditietoaineistojen arvioinnit osoittavat, että suorituskyky on parantunut useiden mittareiden nykyisiin perusviivoihin verrattuna.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Awak dhéwé, teks sing paling beraksi iso dianggo wong-wong liyo koyo ngono perusahaan anyar iki dadi sing bisa nguasai mbut iki dadi bisa diantesik kanggo ngilangno bisa pasang iki. Ngawe ora ono alat sing apik, autor kang manut nggawe/nggawe barang-manut (batik dadi nggolakno dolanan) sing bisa ndadekaan kanggo ndelok sing apik. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Mulai karo setekah sing perusahaan textual sing dibutuhke gambar ning kelangan kelangan winih, supoyo nggawe nggawe textil sing dikarepak nggawe karo perusahaan iki sampek iso nggawe informasi sing berarti basa awak dhéwé, ingkang dianggap lan koheres nggawe barang-barêng langgar sampek. Validity', 'ha': "Enterprise content writers are engaged in writing textual content for various purposes.  Koda yawa, kan an halarce matsayin da aka rubuta yanzu a cikin makaratan firma cikin tsarin da aka riga da kuma za a iya yin amfani da shi wa muhimman yanzu. Idan ba da alama masu daidaita, marubuci suna karya/ƙiƙira wannan maɓalli da hannayen hannunsa (daga marubuci) wanda ke ƙaranci manus da manus. Domin da za'a yi amfani da wannan, za'a buɗe wata hanyor farat ɗaya zuwa ka ƙiƙiro wani version na farko na rubutun mai amfani da shi, wanda aka yi amfani da shi, a kan wani filin da aka shigar. Aka fara da wani tsari na takardar matsayi wanda aka samu da shi na sami da ɓangaren ɗin-ɗin da aka samu da shi, wa'uran wanda aka yi niyyar ya kuɓutar da matsayin da aka yi nufin su daga wannan lumbar kwamfyutan, ko kuma ya yi amfani da shirin canza tsarin, masu hususanya, masu buƙata, da ɓanganci da kuma sassauta cikin maɓallin wanda aka ƙãga. Bayani kan daidaita danahan da aka daidaita, yana nuna mafarin gabatar da zaman shawarar da ke gaba a kan wasu mitiri.", 'sk': 'Pisatelji podjetniških vsebin se ukvarjajo s pisanjem besedilnih vsebin za različne namene. Pogosto je besedilo, ki se napiše, lahko že prisotno v korpusu podjetja v obliki preteklih člankov in ga je mogoče preoblikovati za trenutne potrebe. V odsotnosti ustreznih orodij avtorji ročno kurirajo/ustvarjajo takšne vsebine (včasih iz nič), kar zmanjšuje njihovo produktivnost. Za reševanje tega predlagamo avtomatski pristop k ustvarjanju začetne različice avtorjevega predvidenega besedila, ki temelji na delčku vhodne vsebine. Začenši z naborom ekstrahiranih besedilnih fragmentov, povezanih z delčkom, ki temeljijo na besedah poizvedbe v njem, predlagani pristop gradi želeno besedilo iz teh fragmentov s hkratnim optimizacijo informacijske pokritosti, relevantnosti, raznolikosti in skladnosti ustvarjene vsebine. Ocene standardnih naborov podatkov kažejo izboljšano učinkovitost glede na obstoječe osnovne vrstice pri več meritvah.', 'he': 'כותבי התוכן של העסקים מעורבים בכתיבת תוכן טקסטלי למטרות שונות. לעתים קרובות, הטקסט שנכתב עשוי כבר להיות נוכח בקורפוס העסקי בצורה של מאמרים בעבר ויכול להיות ממוקד מחדש לצרכים הנוכחים. בהיעדרות כלים מתאימים, הסופרים מקדימים/יוצרים תוכן כזה ידנית (לפעמים מאפס) שמפחית את היצירות שלהם. כדי להתמודד עם זה, אנו מציעים גישה אוטומטית לייצר גרסה ראשונה של הטקסט המתכוון של הסופר בהתבסס על חתיכת תוכן כניסה. בהתחלה עם קבוצה של חתיכות טקסטיות מווצאות שקשורות לחתיכה המבוססת על מילים השאלה בתוכה, הגישה המוצעת בונה את הטקסט הנרצח מהחתיכה הזו על ידי אופטימיזם באופן זמני את כיסוי המידע, הרלוונטיות, מגוון וקיונציה בתוכן המיוצר. הערכות על קבוצות נתונים סטנדרטיות מראות שיפור ביצועים נגד קווי הבסיס קיימים על מספר מטריות.', 'bo': "སྒེར་གྱི་ནང་དོན་པའི་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དོན་ཡིག་འབྲི་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་པའི་ཡིག ཉེར་སྤྱོད་བཏུབ་པའི་ལག་ཆ་མེད་དེ་ལས་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་དག་གི་སྐོར་ལས་ལག་སྟར་ཞིབ་འཇུག་དགོས། To address this, we propose an automatic approach to generate an initial version of the author's intended text based on an input content snippet. Starting with a set of extracted textual fragments related to the snippet based on the query words in it, the proposed approach builds the desired text from these fragment by simultaneously optimizing the information coverage, relevance, diversity and coherence in the generated content. Evaluations on standard datasets shows improved performance against existing baselines on several metrics."}
{'en': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'ar': 'وضع العلامات على قانون الحوار المستقل عن المجال وفقًا لمعيار ISO لوكلاء المحادثة', 'pt': 'Marcação da Lei de Diálogo Independente de Domínio ISO-Padrão para Agentes de Conversação', 'es': 'Etiquetado de la Ley de diálogo independiente del dominio estándar ISO para agentes conversacionales', 'fr': "Marquage d'acte de dialogue indépendant du domaine conforme à la norme ISO pour les agents conversationnels", 'zh': 'ISO 格域独立法案会话代标记', 'ja': '会話エージェントのためのISO標準ドメイン非依存ダイアログACTタグ付け', 'hi': 'आईएसओ-मानक डोमेन-स्वतंत्र संवाद अधिनियम संवादी एजेंटों के लिए टैगिंग', 'ru': 'ISO-стандарт Независимый от домена Закон Диалога Тегирование для Разговорных Агентов', 'ga': 'An tAcht um Chomhphlé Neamhspleách um Fhearann-Caighdeánach ISO-Clibeáil le haghaidh Gníomhairí Comhrá', 'ka': 'ISO- სტანდარტული დომენი- უცნობიერი დიალოგის აქტის მაგრამა', 'el': 'Τυποποιημένη πράξη για τον ανεξάρτητο διάλογο ISO για τους πράκτορες συνομιλίας', 'hu': 'ISO-szabvány Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'it': 'Etichettatura ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act per gli agenti di conversazione', 'mk': 'ISO- стандарден акт за независен дијалог за домен', 'kk': 'ISO- стандартты доменге тәуелсіз диалог ақпаратты агенттердің тегтері', 'lt': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഏജന്\u200dറുകള്\u200dക്കായി ISO- സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഡാര്\u200dഡ് ഡൊമെയിന്\u200d- സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ ഡയലോഗ് നിയമം', 'ms': 'Tagging Akt Dialog Independent Domain-Standard ISO untuk Agen Perbualan', 'mn': 'ISO-Стандарт Домен-Тусламжгүй Диалог Захидал', 'mt': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'ro': 'Etichetarea legii de dialog independent de domenii ISO pentru agenții de conversație', 'sr': 'ISO-standardni domeni-nezavisni zakon o dijalogu za razgovorne agente', 'pl': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagowanie dla agentów konwersacyjnych', 'no': 'ISO-standard domene-uavhengige dialogaktikk for samtaleagentar', 'si': 'ISO- ප්\u200dරමාණික ඩෝමේන්-ස්වතංත සංවාදය නියෝජිත සඳහා ටැග් කරන්න', 'so': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialog Act Tagging for Conversation Agents', 'sv': 'ISO-standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging för konversationsagenter', 'ta': 'ISO- நிலையான களம்- சுதந்திரமான உரையாடல் விதிமுறை உரையாடல் பேச்சு மென்னஞ்சல்களுக்கான ஒட்டுதல்', 'ur': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialog Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Định giá cho các đặc vụ đối thoại', 'bg': 'Етикетиране на Закона за независим от домейна диалог по стандарта ISO за разговорни агенти', 'da': 'ISO-standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'hr': 'ISO-standardni zakon o dijalogu neovisnim domenama za razgovorne agente', 'nl': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging voor Conversational Agents', 'de': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging für Conversational Agents', 'fa': 'قانون گفتگوی استاندارد ISO-Domain-Independent', 'id': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'ko': '세션 에이전트의 ISO 표준 도메인 독립 대화 비헤이비어 표시', 'sw': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'sq': 'ISO-Standard-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'tr': 'ISO-Standart Saýlaw Aýratçylar üçin Nişanlar Maglumaty', 'af': 'ISO-Standaard Domein-Onfhanklike Dialoog Wet Beteker vir Gespraak Agente', 'am': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialog Acting for Conversational Agents', 'hy': 'Խոսակցության գործիչների համար անկախ տարբերակի Ակտը', 'az': 'ISO-Standart Domain-Independent Dialog Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'bs': 'ISO-standardni zakon o domenu-nezavisnom dijalogu za razgovorne agente', 'bn': 'ISO-স্থান্ডার্ড ডোমেইন-স্বাধীন ডায়ালগ আইনের কথোপকথন এজেন্টের জন্য ট্যাগিং', 'ca': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagging for Conversational Agents', 'cs': 'ISO-Standard Domain-Independent Dialogue Act Tagování pro konverzační agenty', 'fi': 'ISO-standardin mukainen verkkotunnuksista riippumaton dialogilaki keskusteluagentteille', 'et': 'ISO-standardi domeenisõltumatu dialoogi seaduse märgistamine vestlusagentidele', 'jv': 'Page size', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Označevanje zakona o dialogu neodvisnem domenskem standardu ISO za pogovorne agente', 'he': 'ISO-סטנדרטית חוק דיאלוג ללא תלוי בתחום', 'bo': 'ISO-སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དྲ་ཁོངས་དང་ཁོངས་སྒྲིག་གི་ཌའི་ལོག་གནས་སྟངས་གྱི་ཤོག་བྱང་བ'}
{'en': 'Dialogue Act (DA) tagging is crucial for spoken language understanding systems, as it provides a general representation of speakers’ intents, not bound to a particular dialogue system. Unfortunately, publicly available data sets with DA annotation are all based on different annotation schemes and thus incompatible with each other. Moreover, their schemes often do not cover all aspects necessary for open-domain human-machine interaction. In this paper, we propose a methodology to map several publicly available corpora to a subset of the ISO standard, in order to create a large task-independent training corpus for DA classification. We show the feasibility of using this corpus to train a domain-independent DA tagger testing it on out-of-domain conversational data, and argue the importance of training on multiple corpora to achieve robustness across different DA categories.', 'fr': "Le balisage Dialogue Act (DA) est crucial pour les systèmes de compréhension de la langue parlée, car il fournit une représentation générale des intentions des locuteurs, sans être lié à un système de dialogue particulier. Malheureusement, les ensembles de données accessibles au public avec annotation DA sont tous basés sur des schémas d'annotation différents et sont donc incompatibles les uns avec les autres. De plus, leurs schémas ne couvrent souvent pas tous les aspects nécessaires à l'interaction homme-machine dans un domaine ouvert. Dans cet article, nous proposons une méthodologie pour mapper plusieurs corpus accessibles au public à un sous-ensemble de la norme ISO, afin de créer un vaste corpus de formation indépendant des tâches pour la classification DA. Nous montrons la faisabilité de l'utilisation de ce corpus pour former un tagger DA indépendant du domaine en le testant sur des données conversationnelles hors domaine, et soutenons l'importance de la formation sur plusieurs corpus pour atteindre la robustesse dans différentes catégories d'AD.", 'es': 'El etiquetado de la Ley de Diálogo (DA) es crucial para los sistemas de comprensión del lenguaje oral, ya que proporciona una representación general de las intenciones de los oradores, no vinculado a un sistema de diálogo en particular. Desafortunadamente, los conjuntos de datos disponibles públicamente con anotación DA se basan en diferentes esquemas de anotación y, por lo tanto, son incompatibles entre sí. Además, sus esquemas a menudo no cubren todos los aspectos necesarios para la interacción hombre-máquina de dominio abierto. En este artículo, proponemos una metodología para mapear varios corpus disponibles públicamente a un subconjunto de la norma ISO, con el fin de crear un gran corpus de capacitación independiente de la tarea para la clasificación de DA. Mostramos la viabilidad de usar este corpus para capacitar a un etiquetador de DA independiente del dominio que lo prueba en datos conversacionales fuera del dominio, y argumentamos la importancia de la capacitación en múltiples cuerpos para lograr solidez en diferentes categorías de DA.', 'ar': 'يعد وضع علامات قانون الحوار (DA) أمرًا بالغ الأهمية لأنظمة فهم اللغة المنطوقة ، حيث يوفر تمثيلًا عامًا لنوايا المتحدثين ، وليس مرتبطًا بنظام حوار معين. لسوء الحظ ، تستند جميع مجموعات البيانات المتاحة للجمهور مع شرح DA التوضيحي إلى مخططات توضيحية مختلفة وبالتالي فهي غير متوافقة مع بعضها البعض. علاوة على ذلك ، غالبًا لا تغطي مخططاتهم جميع الجوانب اللازمة للتفاعل بين الإنسان والآلة في المجال المفتوح. في هذه الورقة ، نقترح منهجية لتعيين العديد من المؤسسات المتاحة للجمهور لمجموعة فرعية من معيار ISO ، من أجل إنشاء مجموعة تدريب كبيرة مستقلة عن المهام لتصنيف DA. نعرض جدوى استخدام هذه المجموعة لتدريب أداة تمييز DA مستقلة عن المجال تختبرها على بيانات محادثة خارج المجال ، ونناقش أهمية التدريب على مجموعات متعددة لتحقيق القوة عبر فئات DA المختلفة.', 'pt': 'A marcação do Dialogue Act (DA) é crucial para os sistemas de compreensão da linguagem falada, pois fornece uma representação geral das intenções dos falantes, não vinculada a um sistema de diálogo específico. Infelizmente, conjuntos de dados disponíveis publicamente com anotação DA são todos baseados em diferentes esquemas de anotação e, portanto, incompatíveis entre si. Além disso, seus esquemas muitas vezes não cobrem todos os aspectos necessários para a interação homem-máquina de domínio aberto. Neste artigo, propomos uma metodologia para mapear vários corpora disponíveis publicamente para um subconjunto do padrão ISO, a fim de criar um grande corpus de treinamento independente de tarefas para classificação de DA. Mostramos a viabilidade de usar esse corpus para treinar um tagger DA independente de domínio testando-o em dados conversacionais fora do domínio e discutimos a importância do treinamento em vários corpora para obter robustez em diferentes categorias de DA.', 'ja': 'ダイアログアクト（ DA ）タグ付けは、特定のダイアログシステムに拘束されない、話者の意図の一般的な表現を提供するため、口語理解システムにとって重要である。残念ながら、DA注釈付きの公開データセットはすべて異なる注釈スキームに基づいているため、互いに互換性がありません。さらに、それらのスキームは多くの場合、オープンドメインの人間と機械の相互作用に必要なすべての側面をカバーしていない。本稿では、DA分類のための大規模なタスクに依存しないトレーニングコーパスを作成するために、いくつかの公開されているコーパスをISO標準のサブセットにマッピングする方法論を提案する。このコーパスを使用して、ドメインに依存しないDAタガーをトレーニングし、ドメイン外の会話データでテストすることの実現可能性を示し、さまざまなDAカテゴリで堅牢性を達成するために、複数のコーパスでトレーニングすることの重要性を主張しています。', 'hi': 'संवाद अधिनियम (डीए) टैगिंग बोली जाने वाली भाषा समझने वाली प्रणालियों के लिए महत्वपूर्ण है, क्योंकि यह वक्ताओं के इरादों का एक सामान्य प्रतिनिधित्व प्रदान करता है, जो किसी विशेष संवाद प्रणाली के लिए बाध्य नहीं है। दुर्भाग्य से, डीए एनोटेशन के साथ सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध डेटा सेट सभी विभिन्न एनोटेशन योजनाओं पर आधारित हैं और इस प्रकार एक-दूसरे के साथ असंगत हैं। इसके अलावा, उनकी योजनाएं अक्सर ओपन-डोमेन मानव-मशीन इंटरैक्शन के लिए आवश्यक सभी पहलुओं को कवर नहीं करती हैं। इस पेपर में, हम डीए वर्गीकरण के लिए एक बड़ा कार्य-स्वतंत्र प्रशिक्षण कॉर्पस बनाने के लिए आईएसओ मानक के सबसेट के लिए कई सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध कॉर्पोरेट को मैप करने के लिए एक पद्धति का प्रस्ताव करते हैं। हम इस कॉर्पस का उपयोग करने की व्यवहार्यता दिखाते हैं ताकि एक डोमेन-स्वतंत्र डीए टैगर को प्रशिक्षित किया जा सके, जो इसे आउट-ऑफ-डोमेन संवादात्मक डेटा पर परीक्षण करता है, और विभिन्न डीए श्रेणियों में मजबूती प्राप्त करने के लिए कई कॉर्पोरेट पर प्रशिक्षण के महत्व पर बहस करता है।', 'zh': '言法(DA)标于口语之至重,盖供言者之意,不受特定言之约束也。 不幸者,有DA注之公可用数据集都盖异注之方,故彼此不兼容。 此外,其方常无涵盖开域人机交互所须者。 本文中,发一法,映射数公语料库于ISO子集,以为DA类创一大任培训语料库。 臣等展用此语料库训练独立于域者 DA 标记器于域外对话数据上试其可行性,并论数语料库训练以成跨异 DA 类稳健性之要。', 'ru': 'Тегирование Закона о диалоге (DA) имеет решающее значение для систем понимания устного языка, поскольку оно обеспечивает общее представление намерений говорящих, не связанных с конкретной системой диалога. К сожалению, все общедоступные наборы данных с аннотациями DA основаны на различных схемах аннотаций и, таким образом, несовместимы друг с другом. Кроме того, их схемы часто не охватывают все аспекты, необходимые для взаимодействия человека и машины в открытом пространстве. В настоящем документе мы предлагаем методологию для сопоставления нескольких общедоступных корпусов с подмножеством стандарта ISO, чтобы создать большой независимый от задач учебный корпус для классификации DA. Мы показываем осуществимость использования этого корпуса для обучения домен-независимого DA-тегера, тестирующего его на внедоменных разговорных данных, и утверждаем важность обучения на нескольких корпусах для достижения устойчивости в различных категориях DA.', 'ga': 'Tá clibeáil an Achta um Chomhphlé (DA) ríthábhachtach do chórais tuiscint na teanga labhartha, toisc go soláthraíonn sé léiriú ginearálta ar intinn na gcainteoirí, nach bhfuil ceangailte le córas dialóige ar leith. Ar an drochuair, tá tacair sonraí atá ar fáil go poiblí le anótáil DA bunaithe ar scéimeanna nótaí éagsúla agus mar sin neamh-chomhoiriúnach lena chéile. Ina theannta sin, is minic nach gclúdaíonn a scéimeanna gach gné atá riachtanach le haghaidh idirghníomhú idir an duine agus an meaisín agus an talamh oscailte. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid modheolaíocht chun roinnt corparáidí atá ar fáil go poiblí a mhapáil chuig fo-thacar den chaighdeán ISO, chun corpas oiliúna mór tasc-neamhspleách a chruthú le haghaidh rangú LM. Léirímid an fhéidearthacht an corpas seo a úsáid chun clibeálaí DA neamhspleách ar an bhfearann a thraenáil agus é á thástáil ar shonraí comhrá lasmuigh den fhearann, agus áitímid an tábhacht a bhaineann le hoiliúint ar ilchorparáidí chun stóinseacht a bhaint amach thar chatagóirí éagsúla LM.', 'el': 'Η σήμανση νόμου διαλόγου (DA) είναι ζωτικής σημασίας για τα συστήματα κατανόησης της προφορικής γλώσσας, καθώς παρέχει μια γενική αναπαράσταση των προθέσεων των ομιλητών, που δεν δεσμεύονται σε ένα συγκεκριμένο σύστημα διαλόγου. Δυστυχώς, τα δημόσια διαθέσιμα σύνολα δεδομένων με σχολιασμό DA βασίζονται όλα σε διαφορετικά συστήματα σχολιασμού και συνεπώς ασυμβίβαστα μεταξύ τους. Επιπλέον, τα σχέδιά τους συχνά δεν καλύπτουν όλες τις πτυχές που απαιτούνται για την αλληλεπίδραση ανθρώπου-μηχανής ανοικτού τομέα. Στην παρούσα εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μεθοδολογία για να χαρτογραφήσουμε αρκετά δημόσια διαθέσιμα σώματα σε ένα υποσύνολο του προτύπου προκειμένου να δημιουργηθεί ένα μεγάλο εκπαιδευτικό σώμα ανεξάρτητα από τις εργασίες για ταξινόμηση DA. Δείχνουμε τη σκοπιμότητα της χρήσης αυτού του σώματος για να εκπαιδεύσουμε έναν ανεξάρτητο δείκτη που δοκιμάζει σε δεδομένα συνομιλίας εκτός τομέα, και υποστηρίζουμε τη σημασία της εκπαίδευσης σε πολλαπλά σώματα για την επίτευξη ανθεκτικότητας σε διαφορετικές κατηγορίες.', 'hu': 'A párbeszédtörvény (DA) címkézése kulcsfontosságú a beszélt nyelv megértési rendszerek számára, mivel általános képviseletet biztosít a beszélők szándékainak, nem kötődik egy adott párbeszédrendszerhez. Sajnos a DA jegyzeteléssel ellátott nyilvánosan elérhető adatkészletek mind különböző jegyzetelési sémákon alapulnak, így összeegyeztethetetlenek egymással. Ezenkívül rendszereik gyakran nem terjednek ki minden olyan aspektusra, amely a nyílt területű ember-gép interakcióhoz szükséges. Ebben a tanulmányban egy olyan módszertant javasolunk, amely több nyilvánosan hozzáférhető vállalat feltérképezésére szolgál az ISO szabvány egy részhalmazához, hogy létrehozzunk egy nagy feladatfüggetlen képzési korpuszt a DA osztályozáshoz. Megmutatjuk a korpusz használatának megvalósíthatóságát egy domain-független DA címkéző képzésére, amely a domain kívüli beszélgetési adatokon teszteli, és érvelünk annak fontosságáról, hogy több korpuszon képzést érjen el a különböző DA kategóriák robusztussága érdekében.', 'it': "La marcatura del Dialogue Act (DA) è fondamentale per i sistemi di comprensione della lingua parlata, in quanto fornisce una rappresentazione generale degli intenti degli oratori, non legata a un particolare sistema di dialogo. Sfortunatamente, i set di dati pubblicamente disponibili con annotazione DA sono tutti basati su diversi schemi di annotazione e quindi incompatibili tra loro. Inoltre, i loro schemi spesso non coprono tutti gli aspetti necessari per l'interazione uomo-macchina a dominio aperto. In questo articolo, proponiamo una metodologia per mappare diversi corpora pubblicamente disponibili a un sottoinsieme dello standard ISO, al fine di creare un corpus di formazione indipendente da compiti per la classificazione DA. Mostriamo la fattibilità di utilizzare questo corpus per formare un DA tagger indipendente dal dominio testandolo su dati conversazionali fuori dominio, e sosteniamo l'importanza della formazione su più corpora per ottenere robustezza tra diverse categorie DA.", 'ka': 'დიალოგის აკტი (DA) მონიშნელი სისტემებისთვის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, რადგან ის უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია სისტემებისთვის საერთო გამოსახულება, რომელიც განსახულებული დიალ ზუსტად, ყველაფერი განსხვავებული ანტორაციის სქემებზე დაბაზიან საშუალოდ მომხმარებული მონაცემები, რომელიც ერთმანეთისთვის არსებობს. დამატებით, ისინი სქემები ბევრად არ აკეთებს ყველა ადამიანის სახლედ სახლედ ადამიანის მანქანის ინტერქექციისთვის. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ მინდა მეტოლოგიას, რომელიც უფრო ადამიანურად ხელხილი კოპორაზე ISO სტანდარტის სუბსეტისთვის გავაკეთოთ, რომ DA კლასიფიკაციაში დიდი დავაკეთებული სამუშაო ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ ამ კორპუსს გამოყენება, რომ დავარწმუნოთ დიომინური საკუთარი საკუთარი კონტაქციო მონაცემების გარეშე მონაცემებით, და აჩვენებთ მნიშვნელობას მრავალ კორპორაზე, რომელიც გან', 'kk': 'Диалог Законы (DA) тегтері сөйлейтін тілдерді түсіну жүйелері үшін маңызды, себебі бұл сөйлейтінің мақсаттарының жалпы түсініктерін көрсетеді, бұл диалог жүйесіне байланыс Кешіріңіз, ДА жазбалары барлық деректер жиындары түрлі жазбалар сұлбаларына негізделген және бұл үшін бір-бірімен үйлесіміз емес. Сонымен қатар, олардың сұлбалары көбінесе ашылған доменге адамдар-машинаның интерфейсі үшін керек бүкіл аспекттерін жасырылмайды. Бұл қағазда біз бірнеше қол жеткізетін корпораға ISO стандарттың ішкі бөлігіне картасын қолданатын методологияны таңдаймыз. Ол үлкен тапсырманың тәуелді бақылау корпорасын DA классификациясының Біз осы корпус қолдану мүмкіндігін доменге тәуелсіз ДА тегжерін доменге қатысты конвертациялық деректерді тексеру үшін көрсету мүмкіндігін көрсету және бірнеше ДА категориясының қатынасын жеткізу үшін бірнеше кор', 'ms': 'Tagging Akt Dialog (DA) adalah penting bagi sistem pemahaman bahasa bercakap, kerana ia menyediakan perwakilan umum niat pembicara, tidak terikat ke sistem dialog tertentu. Malangnya, set data yang tersedia secara awam dengan anotasi DA semua berdasarkan skema anotasi yang berbeza dan oleh itu tidak serasi satu sama lain. Lagipun, skema mereka sering tidak meliputi semua aspek yang diperlukan untuk interaksi manusia-mesin domain terbuka. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan metodologi untuk memetakan beberapa korpra yang tersedia secara awam kepada subset standar ISO, untuk mencipta korpus latihan bebas tugas besar untuk klasifikasi DA. Kami menunjukkan kemungkinan menggunakan korpus ini untuk melatih tag DA independen domain mengujinya pada data percakapan luar domain, dan berdebat penting latihan pada korpora berbilang untuk mencapai kepekatan di seluruh kategori DA berbeza.', 'lt': 'Dialogo akto (DA) ženklinimas yra labai svarbus kalbos supratimo sistemoms, nes jame pateikiamas bendras kalbėtojų ketinimų atstovavimas, neprivalomas prie konkrečios dialogo sistemos. Deja, visuomenei prieinami duomenų rinkiniai su DA anotacija grindžiami skirtingomis anotacijos schemomis ir todėl nesuderinami. Be to, jų schemos dažnai neapima visų aspektų, būtinų atviros srities žmogaus ir mašinų sąveikai. Šiame dokumente siūlome metodiką, pagal kurią keli viešai prieinami korporai būtų nukreipti į ISO standarto pogrupį, kad būtų sukurtas didelis nepriklausomas nuo užduočių mokymo korpusas DA klasifikacijai. Mes parodome, kad įmanoma naudoti šį korpusą, kad būtų mokomas nepriklausomas nuo srities DA žymeklis, išbandantis jį ne srities pokalbių duomenimis, ir argumentuojame mokymo apie daugelį korpusų svarbą siekiant įvairių DA kategorijų patikimumo.', 'mt': 'It-tikkettar tal-Att ta’ Djalogu (DA) huwa kruċjali għas-sistemi ta’ fehim tal-lingwa mitkellma, peress li jipprovdi rappreżentanza ġenerali tal-intenzjonijiet tal-kelliema, mhux marbuta ma’ sistema ta’ djalogu partikolari. Sfortunatament, settijiet ta’ dejta disponibbli għall-pubbliku b’annotazzjoni tad-DA huma kollha bbażati fuq skemi differenti ta’ annotazzjoni u għalhekk inkompatibbli ma’ xulxin. Barra minn hekk, l-iskemi tagħhom spiss ma jkoprux l-aspetti kollha meħtieġa għall-interazzjoni ta’ dominju miftuħ bejn il-bniedem u l-magna. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu metodoloġija biex jiġu mmappjati diversi korpi disponibbli pubblikament għal sottosett tal-istandard ISO, sabiex jinħoloq korp kbir ta’ taħriġ indipendenti mill-kompiti għall-klassifikazzjoni DA. Aħna nuru l-fattibbiltà li nużaw dan il-korpus biex inħarrġu tikkettatur tad-DA indipendenti mid-dominju li jittestjaha fuq dejta ta’ konverżjoni barra mid-dominju, u jargumentaw l-importanza tat-taħriġ dwar korpuri multipli biex tinkiseb robustezza fil-kategoriji differenti tad-DA.', 'mk': 'Обележувањето на Актот за дијалог (ДА) е клучно за системите за разбирање на говорниот јазик, бидејќи обезбедува генерално претставување на намерите на говорниците, кои не се поврзани со одреден дијалог систем. За жал, јавно достапните датотеки со анотација на обвинителот се базирани на различни шеми на анотација и со тоа се несоодветни меѓусебно. Покрај тоа, нивните шеми честопати не ги покриваат сите аспекти потребни за интеракција на човек-машина на отворен домен. Во овој весник, предложуваме методологија за мапирање на неколку јавно достапни корпора на подгрупа на стандардот на ИСО, со цел да создадеме голем независен обукен корпус за класификација на ДА. Ја покажуваме физибилитетот на користењето на овој корпус за обука на независен адвокат кој ги тестира на податоци за разговори надвор од домен, и тврдиме важноста на обуката на повеќе корпуси за да постигне robustness во различни категории на адвокат.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ ബുദ്ധിമുട്ടുകള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി ഡയലോഗ് നിയമം (DA) ടാഗ്ഗിങ്ങ് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്. സംസാരിക്കുന്നവരുടെ ഉദ്ദ നിര്\u200dഭാഗ്യവശാല്\u200d, DA അഭിപ്രായശ്ചിത്രത്തോടൊപ്പം ലഭ്യമായ ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d എല്ലാം വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പദ്ധ Moreover, their schemes often do not cover all aspects necessary for open-domain human-machine interaction.  ഈ പേപ്പറില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കുറച്ച് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കോര്\u200dപ്പോര്\u200dക്ക് മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d ഒരു രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. ഐഎസോയുടെ സ്ഥാനത്തില ഈ കോര്\u200dപ്പസ് ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന് നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് ഡോമെന്\u200d സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യ DA ടാഗ്ഗര്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കുന്നതിന് വേറെ ഡോമെന്\u200d സംസാരിക്കാത്ത ഡേറ്റ', 'mn': 'Диалог хууль (DA) тагжинг нь хэлний ойлголтын системийн хувьд чухал. Яагаад гэвэл энэ нь илтгэгчийн зорилгоонуудын ерөнхий үзүүлэлт гаргадаг, тодорхой диалог системтэй холбоотой биш. Харамсалтай нь ДНБ-ын анзаарлын мэдээллийн сангууд бүгд өөр анзаарлын схемүүд дээр суурилсан, тиймээс хоорондоо харилцаагүй байдаг. Мөн тэдний схемүүд хүний машины харилцааныг нээлттэй холбоотой бүх асуудлыг ихэвчлэн дүүрэхгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон нийтэд ашиглах корпора-г ISO стандарттын нэг хэсэгт газрын зураг хийх арга зааж өгдөг. Бид энэ корпус ашиглах боломжтой байдлыг харуулж, ДОХ-ын засгийн газрын ярианы өгөгдлийн талаар шалгаж, олон корпорацийн сургалтын чухал талаар өөр ДОХ-ын категориудад хүчирхэг байдлыг хүргэх боломжтой гэж үздэг.', 'sr': 'Zakon o dijalogu (DA) označavanje je ključno za sisteme razumevanja govornih jezika, jer obezbeđuje opšte predstavljanje namjera govornika, ne vezano za određeni dijalogski sistem. Nažalost, javno dostupne komplete podataka sa annotacijom tužioca temeljene su na različitim šemima annotacija i tako se ne slažu međusobno. Osim toga, njihove šeme često ne pokrivaju sve aspekte potrebne za interakciju ljudskih mašina u otvorenom domenu. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodologiju da mapiramo nekoliko javno dostupnih korpora podgrupi ISO standard a, kako bi stvorili veliki nezavisni trening korpus za klasifikaciju tužioca. Pokazujemo mogućnost koristiti ovaj korpus da bi obučili domenu nezavisnog tužioca koji ga testira na podacima o razgovoru izvan domena i tvrdili važnost obuke na višestruko korporacije kako bi postigli robotu u različitim kategorijama tužioca.', 'ro': 'Etichetarea Legii Dialogului (DA) este crucială pentru sistemele de înțelegere a limbii vorbite, deoarece oferă o reprezentare generală a intențiilor vorbitorilor, fără a fi legată de un anumit sistem de dialog. Din păcate, seturile de date disponibile publicului cu adnotare DA sunt toate bazate pe scheme diferite de adnotare și, astfel, incompatibile unul cu celălalt. Mai mult decât atât, schemele lor adesea nu acoperă toate aspectele necesare interacțiunii om-mașină pe domeniu deschis. În această lucrare, propunem o metodologie de cartografiere a mai multor corpore disponibile public la un subset al standardului ISO, în scopul de a crea un corpus de instruire mare independent de sarcini pentru clasificarea DA. Arătăm fezabilitatea utilizării acestui corpus pentru a instrui un etichetor DA independent de domeniu care îl testează pe date conversaționale din afara domeniului și argumentăm importanța instruirii pe mai multe corpore pentru a obține robustețe în diferite categorii DA.', 'no': 'Dialogvindauget (DA) er nødvendig for språksforståkingssystemet, fordi det gjev eit generell representasjon av taleinnstillingane, ikkje knytt til eit bestemt dialogsystem. Dessverre er alle tilgjengelege datasett med DA-notasjon basert på ulike notasjonsskjema og derfor ikkje kompatibel med kvarandre. I tillegg dekkar dei skjemane ofte ikkje alle aspektane nødvendige for å interaksjona med menneskelige maskiner med opna domene. I denne papiret foreslår vi ein metodologi for å kartera fleire offentlig tilgjengelege korporar til ein undergruppe av ISO-standarden for å laga ein stor oppgåveavhengig treningskorporus for DA-klassifikasjon. Vi viser feilighet for å bruka denne korpusen for å trenga ein domeneuavhengig DA-tagger som testar det på utdomenet-konvertasjonsdata, og argumenterer viktigheten for å trenga på fleire korporar for å oppnå kraftighet i ulike DA-kategoriar.', 'pl': 'Tagowanie ustawy dialogowej (DA) ma kluczowe znaczenie dla systemów rozumienia języka mówionego, ponieważ zapewnia ogólną reprezentację intencji mówców, nie związane z konkretnym systemem dialogu. Niestety publicznie dostępne zbiory danych z adnotacją DA są oparte na różnych schematach adnotacji i tym samym ze sobą niekompatybilne. Ponadto ich schematy często nie obejmują wszystkich aspektów niezbędnych do interakcji człowiek-maszyna w otwartej domenie. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy metodologię mapowania kilku publicznie dostępnych korpusów do podzbioru normy ISO w celu stworzenia dużego niezależnego od zadań korpusu szkoleniowego dla klasyfikacji DA. Pokazujemy możliwość wykorzystania tego korpusu do treningu niezależnego od domeny tagera DA testującego go na danych konwersacyjnych poza domeną i argumentujemy znaczenie treningu na wielu korpusach w celu osiągnięcia solidności w różnych kategoriach DA.', 'so': 'Sharciga ku qoran (DA) tagging waa muhiim u ah nidaamka waxgarashada luuqada lagu hadlo, sababtoo ah waxay u fidisaa noocyada caadiga ah oo ku qoran qasabka hadalka ee aan ku xidhnayn nidaamka diyaar gaar ah. Nasiib xumaatooyinka dadweynaha waxaa dhammaantood ku saleysan qorshaha macluumaadka ee la xiriira DA, sidaas darteed isuguma habboona. Sidoo kale qorshahoodu marar badan ma qarisaan dhinacyada loo baahan yahay in lagu sameeyo qalabka dadka ee furan. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa qaabab aan u karno shirkado caadiga ah oo loo soo bandhigi karo koob ka mid ah calaamadda ISO, si aan u sameyno kooban waxbarasho oo aan iskuul u gaarin DA. Waxaynu tusnaynaa awoodda isticmaaliddan korpus si aan u tababarinno danaha DA oo xor ah, si aan ugu imtixaano macluumaad ka sheekeysan gudaha, waxaana ka doodaynaa muhiimka waxbarashada shirkado kala duduwan si ay u hesho boosaska kooxo kala duduwan oo DA.', 'si': 'සංවාදය නීතිය (DA) ටැග් කරන්න බොරු භාෂා තේරුම් පද්ධතිය සඳහා වැදගත් වැදගත් වෙනුවෙන් විශේෂයි, ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය ස්ථා අවාසනාවන්තයෙන්, DA කිරීම සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෙන් තොරතුරු සම්බන්ධතාවය හැමෝම වෙනස් කිරීම් සැකසුම් සඳහා වෙ ඒවගේම, ඔවුන්ගේ සැලසුම් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් මිනිස් මැෂින් සම්බන්ධ වෙනුවෙන් අවශ්\u200dය සියලුම් වලට මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා සම්පූර්ණයෙන් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් කොර්පෝරාවට ISO ස්ටැන්ඩර් එකේ සම්පූර්ණයකට, DA විශේෂණ අපි පෙන්වන්නේ මේ කෝර්පුස් එක ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ඩොමේන් එක්ක ස්වත්වයින් ඩොමේන් ටැග්ජර් එකක් පරීක්ෂණය කරන්න, ඒ වගේ', 'ta': 'பேசும் மொழி புரியும் அமைப்புகளுக்கு உரையாடல் விதிமானம் (DA) குறிப்பிடுதல் குறிப்பிட்ட உரையாடல் முறைமையில் பேசுபவர்களின் செ துரதிர்ஷ்டவசமாக, DA அறிவிப்புடன் பொதுவான தகவல் அமைப்புகள் அனைத்தும் வித்தியாசமான அறிவிப்பு முறைமைகளில் அடிப்படை மேலும், அவர்களுடைய திட்டம் பெரும்பாலாக திறந்த டோமைன் மனித இயந்திரம் இடைவெளியில் தேவைப்பட்ட அனைத்து பாகங இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம் பல பொதுவான நிறுவனத்தை ISO நிலையின் துணையில் வரைபடத்திற்கு, DA வகைப்பிற்கான பெரி We show the feasibility of using this corpus to train a domain-independent DA tagger testing it on out-of-domain conversational data, and argue the importance of training on multiple corpora to achieve robustness across different DA categories.', 'ur': 'ڈالیلوگ قانون (DA) ٹاگ بات کی زبان سمجھنے کی سیستموں کے لئے ضروری ہے، کیونکہ یہ بات کرنے والوں کے ارادہ کی عمومی نمایش دیتا ہے، جو ایک مخصوص ڈالیلوگ سیستموں کے ساتھ نہیں ہے۔ بدبختی کے ساتھ، ڈی ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ا ن کے ساتھ سارے دسترسی ڈیٹ سٹ مختلف انٹیٹ سیم پر بنے ہوئے ہیں اور اسی طرح ایک دوسرے کے ساتھ incompatible. اور ان کی چالیں اکثر اپنا طریقہ انسان-ماشین کی تعامل کے لئے ضرورت کی تمام منظروں کو پورے نہیں کرتی۔ اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک طریقہ پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں کہ ان کے سائس استاندارڈ کے سائسٹ میں چند سائل موجود کورپورا کا مکاسٹ کریں، اس لئے کہ ڈی ا کی کلاسیفوں کے لئے ایک بڑے کام-مستقل ترینس کورپوس بنائیں. ہم اس کورپوس کے استعمال کرنے کے لئے ایک ڈومین-مستقل ڈا ٹاگر کو آزمائش کے لئے دکھاتے ہیں جو اس کو دومین کے بیرون بحث ڈاٹی پر آزمائش کرتا ہے اور بہت سی کورپوروں پر تعلیم کا اہم بحث کرتا ہے کہ مختلف ڈا ا کے کاٹیوں میں طاقت حاصل کریں', 'sv': 'Dialoglagens (DA) märkning är avgörande för system för språkförståelse, eftersom den ger en allmän representation av talarnas avsikter, inte bunden till ett visst dialogsystem. Tyvärr är allmänt tillgängliga datauppsättningar med DA-notering alla baserade på olika anteckningsscheman och därmed oförenliga med varandra. Dessutom täcker deras system ofta inte alla aspekter som är nödvändiga för interaktion mellan människa och maskin. I denna uppsats föreslår vi en metod för att kartlägga flera offentligt tillgängliga koncerner till en delmängd av ISO-standarden, för att skapa en stor uppgiftsoberoende utbildningskorpus för DA-klassificering. Vi visar möjligheten att använda denna korpus för att träna en domänoberoende DA tagger som testar den på konversationsdata utanför domänen, och argumenterar för vikten av att träna på flera corpora för att uppnå robusthet över olika DA kategorier.', 'uz': "Name @ info Qo'shimcha, ularning qoliplari odatda ochiq domen-maskin interfeys uchun hamma qismini qaramaydi. Bu qogʻozda, biz ko'pchilik bogʻliq kompaniyalarni ISO standardidagi tub kompyuterga qarish usulni tahrirlash imkoniyat qilamiz, bu DDA sinf uchun katta vazifa muammolari kompyuterni yaratish uchun. Biz buni domen bilan muloqat maʼlumotlardan foydalanish uchun domen shaxsiy DA taggerni o'rganish imkoniyatini koʻramiz va boshqa DA turlariga o'rganish uchun ko'pchilik kompaniyalarida o'rganish muhimligini anglatamiz.", 'vi': 'Việc dán nhãn cho các hệ thống hiểu ngôn ngữ nói rất quan trọng, vì nó là sự đại diện chung của ý chí của người nói, không ràng buộc với một hệ thống đối thoại cụ thể. Đáng tiếc, các bộ dữ liệu công khai với chú thích DA đều dựa trên các kế hoạch ghi chú khác nhau và vì vậy mới không thích hợp với nhau. Hơn nữa, những kế hoạch của họ thường không bao gồm tất cả các khía cạnh cần thiết cho giao tiếp trên mạng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị một phương pháp vạch ra vài tập đoàn công khai có mặt trong một phần của tiêu chuẩn ISO, để tạo ra một tập đoàn huấn luyện độc lập lớn cho phân loại DA. Chúng tôi cho thấy khả năng sử dụng tập đoàn này để huấn luyện một máy phát thanh tự lập miền để thử nghiệm nó trên dữ liệu đối thoại ngoài lĩnh vực, và bàn luận về tầm quan trọng của việc đào tạo trên nhiều cơ thể để đạt độ bền vững trong các phân loại DA khác nhau.', 'hr': 'Zakon o dijalogu (DA) označavanje je ključno za sustave razumijevanja govornog jezika, jer pruža općem zastupanju namjera govornika, ne povezanog s određenim dijalogskim sustavom. Nažalost, javno dostupne komplete podataka s annotacijom tužioca temeljene su na različitim šemima annotacija i tako se ne slažu međusobno. Osim toga, njihove šeme često ne pokrivaju sve aspekte potrebne za interakciju ljudskih strojeva u otvorenom domenu. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodu da mapiramo nekoliko javno dostupnih korpora podskupini standard a ISO-a kako bi stvorili veliki nezavisni trening korpus za klasifikaciju tužioca. Mi pokazujemo mogućnost koristiti ovaj korpus kako bi obučili domenu nezavisni tužilac koji ga testira o izvan domena razgovornim podacima i tvrdili važnost obuke na višestruko korporacije kako bi postigli snagu u raznim kategorijama tužilaca.', 'da': 'Dialog Act (DA) mærkning er afgørende for talesprogforståelsessystemer, da den giver en generel repræsentation af talernes intentioner, ikke bundet til et bestemt dialogsystem. Desværre er offentligt tilgængelige datasæt med DA annotation alle baseret på forskellige annotationsordninger og dermed uforenelige med hinanden. Desuden dækker deres ordninger ofte ikke alle aspekter, der er nødvendige for åbent domæne menneske-maskine interaktion. I denne artikel foreslår vi en metode til kortlægning af flere offentligt tilgængelige corpora til en delmængde af ISO standarden, for at skabe et stort opgaveafhængigt træningskorpus til DA klassificering. Vi viser muligheden for at bruge dette korpus til at træne en domæneafhængig DA tagger, der tester det på samtaledata uden for domænet, og argumenterer for vigtigheden af træning på flere corpora for at opnå robusthed på tværs af forskellige DA kategorier.', 'nl': "Dialogue Act (DA) tagging is cruciaal voor gesproken taalverstandsystemen, omdat het een algemene representatie biedt van de intenties van sprekers, niet gebonden aan een bepaald dialoogsysteem. Helaas zijn publiekelijk beschikbare datasets met DA annotatie allemaal gebaseerd op verschillende annotatieschema's en dus incompatibel met elkaar. Bovendien bestrijken hun schema's vaak niet alle aspecten die nodig zijn voor open-domein mens-machine interactie. In dit artikel stellen we een methodologie voor om verschillende publiekelijk beschikbare corpora's in kaart te brengen aan een subset van de ISO-norm, om zo een groot taak-onafhankelijk trainingscorpus voor DA-classificatie te creëren. We tonen de haalbaarheid van het gebruik van dit corpus om een domein-onafhankelijke DA-tagger te trainen die het testt op out-of-domain conversationele data, en pleiten voor het belang van training op meerdere corpora's om robuustheid te bereiken in verschillende DA-categorieën.", 'bg': 'Маркирането на Закона за диалога (ДА) е от решаващо значение за системите за разбиране на говоримия език, тъй като осигурява общо представяне на намеренията на говорещите, които не са обвързани с конкретна система за диалог. За съжаление, публично достъпни набори от данни с анотация са базирани на различни схеми за анотация и следователно несъвместими помежду си. Освен това техните схеми често не обхващат всички аспекти, необходими за отворено взаимодействие човек-машина. В настоящата статия предлагаме методология за картографиране на няколко публично достъпни корпуса към подгрупа от стандарта с цел създаване на голям, независим от задачите корпус за обучение за класификация на ДА. Показваме осъществимостта на използването на този корпус за обучение на независим от домейна тагер, тестващ го върху извъндомейн разговорни данни, и твърдим важността на обучението върху множество корпуси за постигане на здравина в различните категории.', 'de': 'Dialogue Act (DA) Tagging ist fﾃｼr Sprachverstﾃ､ndnissysteme von entscheidender Bedeutung, da es eine allgemeine Darstellung der Absichten von Sprechern bietet, die nicht an ein bestimmtes Dialogsystem gebunden sind. Leider basieren ﾃｶffentlich verfﾃｼgbare Datensﾃ､tze mit DA-Annotation alle auf unterschiedlichen Annotationsschemata und sind daher untereinander inkompatibel. Darﾃｼber hinaus decken ihre Schemata oft nicht alle Aspekte ab, die fﾃｼr eine offene Mensch-Maschine-Interaktion erforderlich sind. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir eine Methodik vor, um mehrere ﾃｶffentlich verfﾃｼgbare Korpora einer Teilmenge des ISO-Standards zuzuordnen, um ein groﾃ歹s aufgabenunabhﾃ､ngiges Trainingskorpus fﾃｼr die DA-Klassifizierung zu schaffen. Wir zeigen die Machbarkeit dieses Korpus zu verwenden, um einen domﾃ､nenunabhﾃ､ngigen DA-Tagger zu trainieren, der ihn auf Gesprﾃ､chsdaten auﾃ歹rhalb der Domﾃ､ne testet, und argumentieren, wie wichtig es ist, an mehreren Korpora zu trainieren, um Robustheit ﾃｼber verschiedene DA-Kategorien hinweg zu erreichen.', 'id': 'Tagging Dialog Act (DA) adalah penting untuk sistem pemahaman bahasa yang dibicarakan, karena menyediakan representation umum niat pembicara, tidak terikat dengan sistem dialog tertentu. Sayangnya, set data yang tersedia publik dengan annotasi DA semua berdasarkan skema annotasi yang berbeda dan sehingga tidak kompatibel satu sama lain. Selain itu, skema mereka sering tidak meliputi semua aspek yang diperlukan untuk interaksi manusia-mesin domain terbuka. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan metodologi untuk memetakan beberapa korpra yang tersedia publik ke subset standar ISO, untuk menciptakan sebuah korpus latihan bebas tugas besar untuk klasifikasi DA. Kami menunjukkan feasibilitas menggunakan corpus ini untuk melatih penanda DA independen domain mengujinya pada data konversasi luar domain, dan berdebat penting pelatihan pada banyak corpora untuk mencapai kepekatan di berbagai kategori DA.', 'ko': '대화 행위(DA) 표기는 구어 이해 시스템에 매우 중요하다. 왜냐하면 이것은 말하는 사람의 의도를 일반적인 표현을 제공하고 특정한 대화 시스템의 제약을 받지 않기 때문이다.불행하게도 DA 주석이 있는 공공 사용 가능한 데이터 집합은 서로 다른 주석 방안을 바탕으로 하기 때문에 서로 호환되지 않는다.그 밖에 그들의 방안은 종종 개방역 인간과 기계의 상호작용에 필요한 모든 방면을 포함하지 않는다.본고에서 우리는 몇 개의 공개적으로 사용할 수 있는 자료 라이브러리를 ISO 표준의 서브집합에 비추어 대형 작업과 무관한DA분류 훈련 자료 라이브러리를 만드는 방법을 제시했다.우리는 이 자료 라이브러리를 사용하여 지역에 독립된 DA표 기자를 훈련시키는 타당성을 보여 주었고 역외 회화 데이터에서 이를 테스트했으며 여러 자료 라이브러리에서 훈련하는 중요성을 논증하여 서로 다른 DA류 간의 노봉성을 실현했다.', 'fa': 'برچسب کردن قانون گفتگو (DA) برای سیستم\u200cهای درک زبان صحبت بسیار مهم است، در نتیجه آن یک نمایش عمومی از هدف\u200cهای صحبت\u200cکنندگان را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند، که به یک سیستم گفتگو خاص مرتبط نیست. متاسفانه، مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای عمومی با اظهار داده\u200cی داده\u200cی داده\u200cی داده\u200cی داده\u200cی داده\u200cی داده\u200cی داده\u200cی همه بر برنامه\u200cهای اظهار متفاوتی بنیاد دارند و به همین\u200cطور با یکدیگر علاوه بر این، نقشه\u200cهایشان اغلب تمام نقشه\u200cهایی که نیاز دارند برای تعامل ماشین\u200cهای انسان\u200cباز را پوشش نمی\u200cدهند. در این کاغذ، ما یک روش پیشنهاد می کنیم که چند تا شرکت در دسترس عمومی را به یک زیر استاندارد ISO نقشه بگیریم، تا یک شرکت آموزش مستقل از کار بزرگ برای classification DA ایجاد کنیم. ما قابلیت استفاده از این کورپوس را نشان می دهیم تا یک تاجر دادگاهی مستقل به دامنه\u200cی دادگاهی آزمایش آن را در اطلاعات مکالمه\u200cهای خارج از دامنه\u200cها آموزش دهیم، و در مورد مهم آموزش تعلیم چندین شرکت برای رسیدن به قوی در کلاس\u200cهای دادگاهی متفاوت', 'tr': 'Di첵alogy Wezip (DA) taglamak g체rle첵채n diller d체힊체n체힊 sistemleri 체챌in 철r채n wajypdyr, seb채bi ol s철zleri흫 maksadyny d철w체r첵채r, be첵leki dijalog sistemine baglanma첵ar. Gynansakda, DA du첵gulamalary bilen publika mejbur maglumat setirleri farkl캇 du첵gulama 힊e첵lerine da첵an첵ar we bu 힊ekilde bir-biri bilen t채sir-t채sir d채l. Daha-da, olary흫 tasla첵anlary k철plen챌 a챌yk-domeny흫 adam-ma힊yny흫 etkile힊imi 체챌in gerekli 채hli aspektleri 철retme첵채r. Bu kagyzda, halkara mejbur korporaty흫 birn채챌e sany ISO standartdaky toparyna g철rkezmesini teklip edip, DA klasifikasy 체챌in be첵leki i힊i 첵ok 체챌in be첵leki ta첵첵arlanmagy 체챌in bir metodologi첵a teklip ed첵채ris Biz bu korpusu etkinle힊tirmek 체챌in domena ba휓캇ms캇z bir DA etiket챌isini domena s철hbetle힊me verileri 체zerinde test etmek 체챌in m체mkin챌iligi g철sterip, birn채챌e korporada g체챌l체 bir 힊ekilde ba힊armak 체챌in g체챌l체 bir 힊ekilde m체bahis edip duruyoruz.', 'sq': 'Etiketimi i Aktit të Dialogut (DA) është vendimtar për sistemet e kuptimit të gjuhës së folur, pasi ofron një përfaqësim të përgjithshëm të qëllimeve të folësve, jo të lidhur me një sistem të veçantë dialogu. Fatkeqësisht, grupet e të dhënave të disponueshme publikisht me anotacion të DA janë të gjitha bazuar në skema të ndryshme anotacioni dhe kështu jo kompatibile me njëri-tjetrin. Përveç kësaj, skemat e tyre shpesh nuk mbulojnë të gjitha aspektet e nevojshme për ndërveprimin njerëz-makinë në domini të hapur. Në këtë letër, propozojmë një metodologji për të hartuar disa korpra publikisht të disponueshme në një nëngrup të standartit ISO, me qëllim që të krijojmë një korpus të madh trajnimi të pavarur nga detyra për klasifikimin e DA. Ne tregojmë realizueshmërinë e përdorimit të këtij korpusi për të trajnuar një emërtues të pavarur në domeni të prokurorit që e teston atë në të dhënat e bisedimeve jashtë domenit, dhe argumentojmë rëndësinë e trajnimit në korpura të shumta për të arritur fuqinë në kategori të ndryshme prokurorit.', 'sw': 'Sheria ya Uzungumzo (DA) ni muhimu kwa mfumo wa kuelewa kwa lugha zinazozungumza, kwa sababu inatoa uwakilishi mkuu wa nia ya wazungumzaji, na sio kufungwa kwa mfumo wa mazungumzo fulani. Kwa bahati mbaya, seti za data zinazopatikana hadharani zinazohusu taarifa za DA zinazohusiana na mipango tofauti ya matangazo na hivyo hazipatikani. Zaidi ya hayo, mipango yao mara nyingi huwa hayafsiri mambo yote yanayohitajika kwa ajili ya uhusiano wa mashine ya binadamu. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza njia ya ramani baadhi ya makampuni yanayopatikana hadharani kwa mfululizo wa kiwango cha ISO, ili kutengeneza makampuni makubwa ya mafunzo yenye uhuru wa kazi kwa ajili ya kutangazwa kwa DA. Tunaonyesha uwezekano wa kutumia kampuni hii kufundisha gembo huru ya DA inayojaribu kwa kutoa taarifa za mazungumzo ya ndani, na kuongoza umuhimu wa mafunzo katika makampuni mbalimbali ili kupata ubakaji katika makundi mbalimbali ya DA.', 'af': "Dialoog Wet Ongelukkig, openlik beskikbaar data stelle met DA-annotasie is almal gebaseer op verskillende annotasie skeme en dus onkompatibel met mekaar. Ook, hulle skeme het dikwels nie alle aspekte wat nodig is vir open-domain mens-masjien interaksie oordek nie. In hierdie papier voorstel ons 'n metodologie om verskeie publiek beskikbaar korpora te kaart na 'n subartikel van die ISO-standaard, om 'n groot taak-onafhanklike onderwerp korporus te skep vir DA klasifikasie. Ons wys die feilikheid van die gebruik van hierdie korpus om 'n domein-onafhanklike DA-tagger te oefen om dit te testeer op buite-domein konversasionale data, en die belangrikheid van onderring op veelvuldige korpore om kragtigheid te bereik oor verskillende DA kategorie.", 'am': 'የDialog Act (DA) ማጠቃለያ ለቋንቋ ማስተዋል ስርዓት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ በርግጥ፣ የDA ማስታወቂያ የተገኘ የዳታ ዘርጊዎች ሁሉም በተለየ አካባቢ ፕሮግራሙን በመሠረት የተደረጉ ናቸው፡፡ ደግሞም ዘዴዎቻቸው ብዙ ጊዜ ለሰው-machine interaction የሚያስፈልገውን ሁሉ አይሸፍኑም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለDA መግለጫ ትልቅ የሥራ-ነፃ ትምህርት ካርፓር ለመፍጠር ብዙዎችን የሚችሉትን የኮርፖርቶችን ለማሳመር እናስጀጋለን፡፡ የዶሜን ዳታዎችን ለመፈትነቱ የዲ ዲ-አ-ነፃ ጋግሬን ለማስተማር እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'az': 'Dialog Act (DA) etiketi dillərin anlama sistemləri üçün çox mövcuddur, çünki bu danışanların niyyətlərinin genel göstəricisi təmin edir, müəyyən bir dialoq sisteminə bağlı deyildir. Necə olaraq, DA notlaması ilə açıq-aşkar verilən məlumat qurğuları müxtəlif notlama qurğularına dayanılır və buna görə də bir-birinə qarşılaşmaz. Əksinə, onların məqsədiləri çox çox açıq-domani insan-maşın müxtəlif olaraq bütün aspektlərini örtməz. Bu kağızda, bir metodoloji təklif edirik ki, bir neçə a çıq-aşkar mövcud korpora ISO standardun bir subgrupuna map a etmək üçün, DA klasifikasyonu üçün böyük iş-bağımsız təhsil korpusu yaratmaq üçün. Biz bu korpusu istifadə etmək üçün domain-bağımsız DA etiketçisini dəyişdirmək üçün dəyişiklik məlumatlarında imtahana çəkmək və müxtəlif DA kategoriyalarında güclülük yetirmək üçün çoxlu korpora təhsil etmənin münasibətini göstəririk.', 'bs': 'Zakon o dijalogu (DA) označavanje je ključno za sustave razumijevanja govornog jezika, jer pruža općem zastupanju namjera govornika, ne povezanog sa određenim dijalogskim sistemom. Nažalost, javno dostupne komplete podataka sa annotacijom tužioca temeljene su na različitim šemima annotacija i tako se ne slažu međusobno. Osim toga, njihove šeme često ne pokrivaju sve aspekte potrebne za interakciju ljudskih strojeva na otvorenom domenu. U ovom papiru predlažemo metodologiju da mapiramo nekoliko javno dostupnih korpora podgrupi ISO standard a, kako bi stvorili veliki nezavisni trening korpus za klasifikaciju tužioca. Mi pokazujemo mogućnost koristiti ovaj korpus kako bi obučili domenu nezavisni tužilac koji ga testira na izvan domena razgovornim podacima i tvrdili važnost obuke višestruke korporacije kako bi postigli robotu u raznim kategorijama tužilaca.', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ আইন (DA) ট্যাগিং ভাষা বুঝতে পারে ভাষার ব্যবস্থার জন্য গুরুত্বপূর্ণ, যেহেতু এটি ভাষণীদের উদ্দেশ্যের সাধারণ প্রতিনিধিত দুর্ভাগ্যবশত, প্রকাশ্য বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন পরিকল্পনার ভিত্তিতে প্রাপ্ত তথ্য সেট এবং তাই একে অপরের সাথে যো এছাড়াও, তাদের পরিকল্পনা প্রায়শই উন্মুক্ত ডোমেইন মানুষ-মেশিন ইন্টারনেশনের জন্য প্রয়োজনীয় সমস্ত প্রাপ্ত বি এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি বেশ কিছু প্রকাশ্যে প্রাপ্ত কর্পোরা আইএসও স্ট্যান্ডারের একটি সাবটের মানচিত্রে মানচিত্র প্রস্তাব করার জন্য, যা আমরা এই কোর্পাস ব্যবহার করে ডোমেইন-স্বাধীন ডিএডি ট্যাগার প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করার ব্যাপারটি প্রদর্শন করি ডোমেইনের বাইরে কথোপকথন তথ্যের পরীক্ষা করার জন্য এবং বিভিন্ন ডিএ', 'cs': 'Tagování Dialogue Act (DA) je klíčové pro systémy porozumění mluvenému jazyku, protože poskytuje obecné zobrazení záměrů mluvčích, které nejsou vázány na konkrétní dialogový systém. Bohužel veřejně dostupné datové sady s DA anotací jsou založeny na různých anotacích schématech a jsou tedy vzájemně nekompatibilní. Navíc jejich schémata často nezahrnují všechny aspekty nezbytné pro interakci člověk-stroj v otevřené doméně. V tomto článku navrhujeme metodiku mapování několika veřejně dostupných korpusů na podmnožinu ISO normy, s cílem vytvořit velký školicí korpus nezávislý na úkolech pro klasifikaci DA. Ukazujeme proveditelnost použití tohoto korpusu k tréninku doménově nezávislého DA tagéra testujícího ho na konverzačních datech mimo doménu a argumentujeme důležitost tréninku na více korpusech pro dosažení robustnosti napříč různými DA kategoriemi.', 'et': 'Dialoogiseaduse (DA) märgistamine on räägitava keele mõistmise süsteemide jaoks äärmiselt oluline, sest see annab üldise esinduse kõnelejate kavatsustest, mis ei ole seotud konkreetse dialoogisüsteemiga. Kahjuks põhinevad avalikult kättesaadavad DA-annotatsiooniga andmekogumid erinevatel annotatsiooniskeemidel ja seega üksteisega kokkusobimatud. Lisaks ei hõlma nende skeemid sageli kõiki aspekte, mis on vajalikud inimese ja masina vaheliseks suhtlemiseks avatud valdkonnas. Käesolevas töös pakume välja metoodika mitmete avalikult kättesaadavate korpuste kaardistamiseks ISO standardi alamhulka, et luua suur ülesannetest sõltumatu koolituskorpus DA klassifitseerimiseks. Näitame selle korpuse kasutamise teostatavust domeenist sõltumatu DA sildistaja koolitamiseks, mis testib seda domeeniväliste vestlusandmete põhjal, ning väidame, et oluline on koolitada mitmeid korpuseid, et saavutada erinevate DA kategooriate tugevus.', 'fi': 'Dialogue Act (DA) tagging on ratkaisevan tärkeää puhuttujen kielten ymmärtämisjärjestelmien kannalta, koska se tarjoaa yleisen edustuksen puhujien aikeista, ei sidottu tiettyyn vuoropuhelujärjestelmään. Valitettavasti julkisesti saatavilla olevat DA-merkinnällä varustetut aineistot perustuvat erilaisiin merkintäjärjestelmiin ja ovat siten yhteensopimattomia keskenään. Lisäksi niiden järjestelmät eivät usein kata kaikkia ihmisen ja koneen välisen avoimen vuorovaikutuksen kannalta välttämättömiä näkökohtia. Tässä työssä ehdotamme menetelmää, jolla kartoitetaan useita julkisesti saatavilla olevia korpusia ISO-standardin alaryhmään, jotta voidaan luoda suuri tehtäväriippumaton koulutuskorpus DA-luokitukseen. Osoitamme, että tätä korpusta voidaan käyttää toimialueesta riippumattoman DA-taggerin kouluttamiseen, joka testaa sitä toimialueen ulkopuolisella keskusteludatalla, ja väitämme, että on tärkeää kouluttaa useita korpusia, jotta saavutetaan kestävyys eri DA-kategorioissa.', 'hy': 'Խոսախոսական ակտիվ (DA) նշանները կարևոր են խոսվող լեզվի հասկանալու համակարգերի համար, քանի որ այն պարունակում է խոսվողների նպատակների ընդհանուր ներկայացումը, որը կապված չէ որոշակի խմբախոսական համակարգին: Դժբախտաբար, հանրային հասանելի տվյալների համակարգերը DA-ի նոտացիաներով հիմնված են տարբեր նոտացիաների համակարգերի վրա և դրանով անհամատեղելի միմյանց հետ: Moreover, their schemes often do not cover all aspects necessary for open-domain human-machine interaction.  Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք մեթոդոլոգիա, որպեսզի քարտեզագրենք բազմաթիվ հանրային հասանելի մարմիններ ինտերնետային ստանդարտի ենթախումբի վրա, որպեսզի ստեղծենք մի մեծ անկախ աշխատանքի ուսուցման մարմին DA դասա Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս այս կորպոսի իրականացման հնարավորությունը, որպեսզի վարժեցնենք բնագավառի անկախ դատավորական մարտահրավեր, որը ստուգում է այն արտաքին հաղորդակցման տվյալների վրա, և փաստարկում է բազմաթիվ կորպոռների ուսումնասիրության կարևորություն', 'ca': "L'etiquetage de la Llei de Diàleg (DA) és crucial per als sistemes de comprensió del llenguatge parlat, perquè proporciona una representació general de les intencions dels oradors, no vinculat a un sistema de diàleg particular. Malauradament, els conjunts de dades públicament disponibles amb anotació DA estan tots basats en diferents esquemes d'anotació i, per tant, incompatibles els uns amb els altres. A més, sovint els seus esquemes no cobreixen tots els aspectes necessaris per a la interacció de domini obert entre humans i màquines. En aquest paper, proposem una metodologia per mapear diverses corpores públicament disponibles a un subconjunt de l'estàndard ISO, per crear un gran corps d'entrenament independent de les tasques per a la classificació DA. Mostrem la viabilitat d'utilitzar aquest corpus per formar un etiquetador DA independent de domini que la teste en dades de conversació fora de domini, i argumentem la importància de formar múltiples corpores per aconseguir robustetat en diferents categories d'DA.", 'jv': 'dialog Lalah soalé, akeh hal-hal nganggo dolanan dadi sing perusahaan karo hal-hal, dadi sing dikenakno ning pancene yang segala macem gak bener Label Nang paper iki, kita mudhaya sistem kanggo mapaké karo perusahaan anyar kang dipunangé kapan banget nggawe stampen iso nggawe barang iso nggawe stampen iso nggawe Awak dhéwé éntuk perusahaan winih ning cara-cara sing nggawe lombak perusahaan-seneng nggawe wajih dumaten-seneng nggawe sistem sing gak dhéwé, gak dhéwé nggawe barang nggawe gerakan oleh dumaten gak dhéwé, perusahaan langgar-sistem sing perusahaan karo perusahaan sugir', 'ha': "@ action Babu'am, tsarin data masu da ake samun da shirin DA sun ƙayyade duk a kan shirin shiryarwa daban-daban, da haka bã ya kamfata da jũna. Za da haka, ma'anarsu ko da yawa bã su rufe duk matsayin da aka buɗe wa aikin mutane da ake buɗewa. Ga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa wata hanyoyi ta karta wasu koronata da ake iya nuna zuwa wani ƙarƙashin da aka daidaita na DAO, dõmin ya ƙiƙiro wata umarni mai girma wa zaman aikin da ba'a komai ba ga fassarar DA. We show the feasibility of using this corpus to train a domain-independent DA tagger testing it on out-of-domain conversational data, and argue the importance of training on multiple corpora to achieve robustness across different DA categories.", 'he': 'התג של חוק הדיולוגים (DA) הוא קריטי למערכות הבנה של שפת מדברת, כיוון שהוא מספק מייצג כללי של כוונות של מדברים, שלא קשור למערכת דיאולוגים מסויימת. למרבה הצער, קבוצות נתונים זמינות לציבור עם הערות של התובע המחוזי כולם מבוססים על תכניות הערות שונות ולכן לא מתאימות אחד עם השני. Moreover, their schemes often do not cover all aspects necessary for open-domain human-machine interaction.  בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים מטודולוגיה כדי למפות מספר גופות זמינות לציבור של סטנדרט ISO, כדי ליצור גופוס אימון גדול ללא משימה עבור מסווג התובע המחוזי. אנו מראים את האפשרות להשתמש בקורפוס הזה לאמן תובע התובע עצמאי בתחום לבדוק אותו על נתונים שיחה מחוץ לתחום, ולטוען על חשיבות האימונים על גופות רבות כדי להשיג חזקה בקטגוריות התובע המחוזי שונות.', 'sk': 'Označevanje zakona o dialogu (DA) je ključnega pomena za sisteme razumevanja govorjenega jezika, saj zagotavlja splošno predstavitev namenov govornikov, ki ni vezana na določen sistem dialoga. Na žalost javno dostopni nabori podatkov z označbo DA temeljijo na različnih shemah označevanja in so tako nezdružljivi med seboj. Poleg tega njihove sheme pogosto ne zajemajo vseh vidikov, potrebnih za odprto interakcijo med človekom in strojem. V prispevku predlagamo metodologijo za mapiranje več javno dostopnih korpusov v podsklop standarda ISO, da bi ustvarili velik korpus usposabljanja za klasifikacijo DA, neodvisno od nalog. Pokazali smo izvedljivost uporabe tega korpusa za usposabljanje domensko neodvisnega označevalca DA, ki ga testira na zunajdomenskih pogovornih podatkih, in trdili, da je pomembno usposabljanje na več korpusih za doseganje robustnosti v različnih kategorijah DA.', 'bo': 'ཌའི་ལོག ཡིན་ནའང་མི་མང་གིས་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཆ་སྤྱད་པར་སྤྱོད་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱས་པའི་བསྡུར་སྒྲིག ཁོང་ཚོའི་ལས་འཆར་གྱི་ལས་འཆར་ནི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དུ་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་དུས་ཡུལ་ཆ་ཡོངས་སྤྱོད་མེད། འུ་ཅག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དྲ་རྒྱ་སྟངས་ལ་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་ཡོད་པའི་མཐུན་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་བྱས་ནས་དབུལ་རྩ We show the feasibility of using this corpus to train a domain-independent DA tagger testing it on out-of-domain conversational data, and argue the importance of training on multiple corpora to achieve robustness across different DA categories.'}
{'en': 'Arrows are the Verbs of Diagrams', 'ar': 'السهام هي أفعال الرسوم البيانية', 'es': 'Las flechas son los verbos de los diagramas', 'pt': 'As setas são os verbos dos diagramas', 'fr': 'Les flèches sont les verbes des diagrammes', 'hi': 'तीर आरेखों की क्रियाएँ हैं', 'ru': 'Стрелки - это глаголы диаграмм', 'ja': '矢印はダイアグラムの動詞です', 'zh': '箭头者,图表之动词也', 'ga': 'Is ionann saigheada agus Briathra na Léaráidí', 'ka': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'el': 'Τα βέλη είναι τα ρήματα των διαγραμμάτων', 'hu': 'A nyilak a diagramok igéi', 'it': 'Le frecce sono i verbi dei diagrammi', 'mk': 'Стрелите се дејаграмските дејаграми', 'ms': 'Panah adalah Verb Diagram', 'kk': 'Жебелер диаграммалардың дербестері', 'mt': 'Il-vleġeġ huma l-Verbi tad-Dijagrammi', 'lt': 'Arrows are the Verbs of Diagrams', 'mn': 'Огторгууд бол диаграмм', 'ml': 'വിവരങ്ങളുടെ വേര്\u200dസ്', 'no': 'Pilar er diagramverktøyane', 'pl': 'Strzałki są czasownikami diagramów', 'ro': 'Săgețile sunt verbele diagramelor', 'si': 'Description', 'ta': 'வரைபடங்களின் வரைபடங்கள்', 'sv': 'Pilar är diagramverben', 'sr': 'Strijele su Verbi dijagrama', 'so': 'Arrimaha waa Jardirada', 'ur': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'uz': 'Diagrammalar soni', 'vi': 'Mũi tên là các Verbis of Diarams', 'bg': 'Стрелките са глаголите на диаграмите', 'da': 'Pile er diagramverber', 'nl': 'Pijlen zijn de werkwoorden van diagrammen', 'hr': 'Strijele su vrhovi dijagrama', 'id': 'Panah adalah Verb Diagram', 'fa': 'دفترها زبان دیاگرام هستند', 'tr': 'Bu çyklar Diagramlaryň Labyrlary', 'de': 'Pfeile sind die Verben von Diagrammen', 'ko': '화살표는 도표의 동사다', 'sq': 'Shqiponjat janë Verbet e Diagramave', 'sw': 'Mapinduzi ni Taifa ya Diagram', 'hy': 'Սլատերը դիագրամների բառերն են,', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'af': 'Name', 'bn': 'ডিয়ার্মের সার্ভার', 'az': 'Oqlar Diaqramlar캼n Veril톛rindir', 'ca': 'Les fletxes són els Verbes de Diagrames', 'cs': 'Šipky jsou slovesa diagramů', 'fi': 'Nuolet ovat kaavioiden verbejä', 'et': 'Nooled on skeemide tegusõnad', 'bs': 'Strijele su Verbe Diagrama', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'he': 'חצים הם מילים של דיאגרמים', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Puščice so glagoli diagramov', 'bo': 'མཇའ་རིས་འདི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ཀྱི་Verbs ཡིན་པ'}
{'en': 'Arrows are a key ingredient of schematic pictorial communication. This paper investigates the interpretation of arrows through linguistic, crowdsourcing and machine-learning methodology. Our work establishes a novel analogy between arrows and verbs : we advocate representing arrows in terms of qualitatively different structural and semantic frames, and resolving frames to specific interpretations using shallow world knowledge.', 'pt': 'As setas são um ingrediente chave da comunicação pictórica esquemática. Este artigo investiga a interpretação de flechas por meio da metodologia linguística, crowdsourcing e aprendizado de máquina. Nosso trabalho estabelece uma nova analogia entre flechas e verbos: defendemos a representação de flechas em termos de frames estruturais e semânticos qualitativamente diferentes, e a resolução de frames para interpretações específicas usando conhecimento superficial do mundo.', 'ar': 'الأسهم هي عنصر أساسي في الاتصال التصويري التخطيطي. تبحث هذه الورقة في تفسير الأسهم من خلال المنهجية اللغوية والتعهيد الجماعي والتعلم الآلي. يؤسس عملنا تشابهًا جديدًا بين الأسهم والأفعال: نحن ندعو إلى تمثيل الأسهم من حيث الأطر الهيكلية والدلالية المختلفة نوعياً ، وحل الإطارات لتفسيرات محددة باستخدام المعرفة السطحية للعالم.', 'es': 'Las flechas son un ingrediente clave de la comunicación pictórica esquemática. Este artículo investiga la interpretación de las flechas a través de la metodología lingüística, de crowdsourcing y de aprendizaje automático. Nuestro trabajo establece una analogía novedosa entre flechas y verbos: abogamos por representar las flechas en términos de marcos estructurales y semánticos cualitativamente diferentes, y resolver marcos a interpretaciones específicas utilizando conocimiento del mundo superficial.', 'fr': "Les flèches sont un élément clé de la communication picturale schématique. Cet article étudie l'interprétation des flèches par le biais de méthodologies linguistiques, de crowdsourcing et d'apprentissage automatique. Notre travail établit une nouvelle analogie entre les flèches et les verbes\xa0: nous préconisons de représenter les flèches en termes de cadres structuraux et sémantiques qualitativement différents, et de résoudre des cadres à des interprétations spécifiques en utilisant une connaissance superficielle du monde.", 'ja': '矢印は、概略的な絵のコミュニケーションの重要な要素です。この論文では、言語、クラウドソーシング、機械学習の方法論を通じて、矢印の解釈を調査します。私たちの研究は、矢印と動詞との間の斬新なアナロジーを確立しています。私たちは、質的に異なる構造的および意味的フレームの観点から矢印を表現し、浅い世界の知識を使用して特定の解釈にフレームを解決することを提唱しています。', 'zh': '镞者,示意图形通信之要也。 本文以语言学、众包、机器学术究其说。 吾事立新类于箭头、动词之间:吾言用质异构、语义框架以表镞,而以浅层世框架解析为特定说。', 'hi': 'तीर योजनाबद्ध सचित्र संचार का एक प्रमुख घटक हैं। यह पेपर भाषाई, क्राउडसोर्सिंग और मशीन-लर्निंग पद्धति के माध्यम से तीरों की व्याख्या की जांच करता है। हमारा काम तीर और क्रियाओं के बीच एक उपन्यास सादृश्य स्थापित करता है: हम गुणात्मक रूप से अलग-अलग संरचनात्मक और शब्दार्थ फ्रेम के संदर्भ में तीर का प्रतिनिधित्व करने की वकालत करते हैं, और उथले विश्व ज्ञान का उपयोग करके विशिष्ट व्याख्याओं के लिए फ्रेम को हल करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Стрелки являются ключевым ингредиентом схематического графического общения. В данной работе исследуется интерпретация стрелок с помощью лингвистической методологии, краудсорсинга и машинного обучения. Наша работа устанавливает романную аналогию между стрелками и глаголами: мы выступаем за представление стрелок в терминах качественно различных структурных и семантических кадров, и разрешение кадров к конкретным интерпретациям с использованием неглубоких мировых знаний.', 'ga': 'Is príomhghné den chumarsáid scéimreach phictiúrtha iad saigheada. Déanann an páipéar seo imscrúdú ar léirmhíniú saigheada trí mhodheolaíocht teanga, sluafhoinsiú agus meaisínfhoghlama. Bunaíonn ár gcuid oibre analaí nua idir saigheada agus briathra: molaimid saigheada a léiriú i dtéarmaí frámaí struchtúracha agus shéimeantacha atá difriúil go cáilíochtúil, agus frámaí a réiteach le léirmhínithe sonracha ag baint úsáide as eolas domhain éadomhain.', 'ka': 'Name ეს დოკუმენტი განსხვავებს სტრუქტურის ინტერპუქტურაციას ლინგურისტიკის, მუშაობის და მანქანის სწავლების მეტოლოგიით. ჩვენი სამუშაო პრომენო ანალოგია სტრუქტურების და გერბების შორის: ჩვენ ვაკეთებთ სამუშაო სტრუქტურების განსხვავებას განსხვავებული სტრუქტურების და სმენტიკური სტრუქტურების განსაზღვრება', 'hu': 'A nyilak a vázlatos képi kommunikáció kulcsfontosságú elemei. A tanulmány a nyilak értelmezését vizsgálja nyelvi, crowdsourcing és gépi tanulási módszertan segítségével. Munkánk új analógiát teremt a nyilak és igék között: a nyilak minőségi szempontból eltérő strukturális és szemantikai keretekben történő ábrázolását javasoljuk, a keretek konkrét értelmezésekhez pedig a sekély világtudás segítségével.', 'el': 'Τα βέλη είναι βασικό συστατικό της σχηματικής εικονογραφικής επικοινωνίας. Η παρούσα εργασία διερευνά την ερμηνεία των βέλους μέσω της γλωσσικής μεθοδολογίας, της μεθοδολογίας και της μηχανικής μάθησης. Το έργο μας καθιερώνει μια νέα αναλογία μεταξύ βέλους και ρήματος: υποστηρίζουμε την αναπαράσταση των βέλων με όρους ποιοτικά διαφορετικών δομικών και σημασιολογικών πλαισίων, και την επίλυση των πλαισίων σε συγκεκριμένες ερμηνείες χρησιμοποιώντας ρηχή γνώση του κόσμου.', 'it': "Le frecce sono un ingrediente chiave della comunicazione pittorica schematica. Questo articolo indaga l'interpretazione delle frecce attraverso la metodologia linguistica, crowdsourcing e machine-learning. Il nostro lavoro stabilisce una nuova analogia tra frecce e verbi: sosteniamo la rappresentazione delle frecce in termini di cornici strutturali e semantiche qualitativamente diverse, e la risoluzione di cornici a interpretazioni specifiche utilizzando una conoscenza superficiale del mondo.", 'lt': 'Strėlės yra pagrindinė schemos vaizdo ryšio sudedamoji dalis. This paper investigates the interpretation of arrows through linguistic, crowdsourcing and machine-learning methodology.  Mūsų darbas sukuria naują rodyklių ir žodžių analogiją: mes remiame rodyklių atstovavimą kokybiškai skirtingų struktūrinių ir semantinių rėmų atžvilgiu ir konkrečių aiškinimų sprendimą naudojant žemas pasaulio žinias.', 'mk': 'Стрелите се клучна состојка на шематска слична комуникација. Овој весник ја истражува интерпретацијата на стрелите преку лингвистичка, пулсурсерска и методологија на машинско учење. Нашата работа воспоставува нова аналогија помеѓу стрелите и стапките: застапуваме претставување стрели во поглед на квалитетно различни структурни и семантични рамки, и решавање рамки на специфични интерпретации користејќи плошко светско знаење.', 'kk': 'Жебелер - схематикалық сұлбалардың кілтті компоненті. Бұл қағаз лингвистикалық, көпшілікті және машина оқыту методологиясы арқылы жебелердің толқынуын зерттейді. Біздің жұмысымыз жебелер мен вербалар арасындағы романдық аналогиясын құрады: біз кәдімгі түрлі структуралық және семантикалық фреймдердің қасиетті түрлі жебелерді көрсетуді қолдаймыз, және фреймдерді өзгерту үшін', 'ms': 'Panah adalah bahan kunci komunikasi gambar skematik. Kertas ini menyelidiki interpretasi panah melalui metodologi bahasa, crowdsourcing dan pembelajaran mesin. Pekerjaan kami menentukan analogi baru antara panah dan verb: kami menyokong mewakili panah dalam terma kualitatif bingkai struktur dan semantik yang berbeza, dan menyelesaikan bingkai untuk interpretasi khusus menggunakan pengetahuan dunia rendah.', 'ml': 'സ്കീമാറ്റിയിലെ പിക്ടോറിയല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിന്റെ താക്കോലുകളാണ് അടയാളങ്ങള്\u200d. ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ അസ്ത്രീകളുടെ വ്യാഖ്യാനം അന്വേഷിക്കുന്നു. ഭാഷകാര്യത്തില്\u200d, പ്രധാനസ്ഥാനവും യന്ത്ര പഠിക നമ്മുടെ ജോലി അമ്പുകള്\u200dക്കും വാര്\u200dപ്പുകള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള ഒരു നോവല്\u200d അന്യായോജ്യം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു: നമ്മള്\u200d അമ്പുകളെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ്താ', 'pl': 'Strzałki są kluczowym składnikiem schematycznej komunikacji obrazowej. Niniejszy artykuł bada interpretację strzałek za pomocą metodologii językowej, crowdsourcingu i uczenia maszynowego. Nasza praca ustanawia nową analogię pomiędzy strzałkami i czasownikami: opowiadamy się za reprezentowaniem strzałek w kategoriach różnych jakościowo ram strukturalnych i semantycznych oraz rozdzielaniem ram do konkretnych interpretacji przy użyciu płytkiej wiedzy świata.', 'no': 'Pilar er ein nøkkelingredient av skjematisk piktogrammeny. Denne papiret undersøker tolkinga av piler gjennom lingvisk, crowdsourcing og maskinelæringsmetodologi. Arbeidet vårt oppretter eit nytt analogi mellom pilar og verbar: vi advokerer å representera pilar i uttrykk av kvalitativ ulike strukturære og semantiske rammer, og løyser rammer til spesifikke tolking ved hjelp av verdenskunnskap.', 'ro': 'Săgețile sunt un ingredient cheie al comunicării pictoriale schematice. Această lucrare investighează interpretarea săgeților prin metodologia lingvistică, crowdsourcing și machine-learning. Lucrarea noastră stabilește o nouă analogie între săgeți și verbe: susținem reprezentarea săgeților în termeni de cadre structurale și semantice diferite calitativ și rezolvarea cadrelor la interpretări specifice folosind cunoștințe superficiale ale lumii.', 'mt': 'Il-vleġeġ huma ingredjent ewlieni tal-komunikazzjoni stampata skematika. Dan id-dokument jinvestiga l-interpretazzjoni tal-vleġġa permezz ta’ metodoloġija lingwistika, crowdsourcing u ta’ tagħlim bil-magni. Our work establishes a novel analogy between arrows and verbs: we advocate representing arrows in terms of qualitatively different structural and semantic frames, and resolving frames to specific interpretations using shallow world knowledge.', 'mn': 'Огторгууд бол схематикийн зураг харилцааны чухал хэсэг юм. Энэ цаас нь хэлний, олон нийтийн сургалтын, машин суралцах методологийг судалдаг. Бидний ажил суу болон үг хоорондын шинэ шинжилгээ бий болгодог. Бид өөр өөр бүтэц болон семантик фрэймүүдийн хувьд суу илэрхийлэх загварыг дэмжиж, дэлхийн гүн зэрэг мэдлэг ашиглан тодорхой хэлбэрүүдийг шийдэх загваруудыг', 'sv': 'Pilar är en viktig ingrediens i schematisk bildkommunikation. Denna uppsats undersöker tolkningen av pilar genom språklig, crowdsourcing och maskininlärningsmetodik. Vårt arbete etablerar en ny analogi mellan pilar och verb: vi förespråkar att representera pilar i termer av kvalitativt olika strukturella och semantiska ramar, och att lösa ramar till specifika tolkningar med grund världskunskap.', 'ta': 'அம்புக்குறி திட்டமான பிக்டோரியல் தொடர்பு இந்த காகிதம் மொழிமை, மக்கள் மூலம் மற்றும் இயந்திரம் கற்றல் முறைமையில் அம்புகளின் விளக்கம் தேடுகிறது. எங்கள் வேலை அம்புகளுக்கும் வார்த்தைகளுக்குமிடையே ஒரு புதிய விளக்கச்சீட்டை உருவாக்குகிறது: நாம் குறிப்பிட்ட அம்புகளைக் குறிப்பிடும் அம்பு', 'sr': 'Strijele su ključni sastojak shematske fotografijske komunikacije. Ovaj papir istražuje interpretaciju strela kroz lingvistiku, crowdsourcing i metodologiju mašinskog učenja. Naš rad uspostavlja novu analogiju između strelica i verba: predstavljamo strele u smislu kvalitativno različitih strukturnih i semantičkih okvira i rešavanja okvira specifičnih interpretacija koristeći plitke svjetske znanje.', 'si': 'Description මේ පත්තර පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා භාෂාවික, සම්පූර්ණය සහ මැෂින් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරමාණ විද්\u200dයාවයෙන්. අපේ වැඩේ ස්ථාපනය කරනවා කුණු වර්ගයක් සහ වාර්තාවක් අතර: අපි ප්\u200dරතිනිධානය කරනවා කුණු වර්ගයක් සහ සැමැන්තික වර්ගයක් සඳහා විශේෂ වර්ගයක', 'so': 'Arrimaha waa wax ku saabsan xiriirka sawirada ah. Warqaddan wuxuu ku baaraandegaa fasirka fallaadhaha luuqadaha, koorasyada dadka iyo waxbarashada machine. Shuqulkayagu wuxuu sameynaa bedelyo saxda ah oo ku dhexaysa fallaadhaha iyo waxyaabaha: waxaynu talo siinnaa in laynoojiyaa fallaadhaha si kooban u kala duduwan dhismaha iyo dhaqdhaqaalaha kala duduwan, waxaana go’aanaynaa framemyada lagu turjumo si gaar ah oo lagu isticmaalo aqoonta dunida ee khaas ah.', 'ur': 'تیرے سیماتیک تصویر کی تعامل کی ایک کلی عنصر ہیں. یہ کاغذ زبان شناسی، جماعت سورسینگ اور ماشین سیکھنے کی طرح تیر کی تعبیر کی تحقیق کرتا ہے. ہمارا کام تیروں اور وربوں کے درمیان ایک نئی آنلوژی مقرر کرتا ہے: ہم تیروں کی نمایش کرنا کیفیت سے مختلف ساختاری اور سیمانٹی فرموں کے مطابق قول دیتے ہیں، اور فرموں کو مختلف تعبیروں کے مطابق مختلف تعبیروں کے مطابق فیصلہ کریں گے۔', 'uz': "Name Bu qogʻoz tillar, jamoatlar va mashinani o'rganish metodiga o'rganish orzularini aniqlaydi. Bizning ishimiz, oynalar va verblar orasidagi novel analog qo'shiladi: biz rasmlarni ko'paytirishni tasavvur qilamiz, va qatlamlar va semantik freymlarga ajratishni tasavvur qilamiz va chegara dunyoning aniqlik bilan foydalanish uchun foydalanuvchilarni aniqlash.", 'vi': 'Mũi tên là thành phần quan trọng của tín hiệu ảnh. Tờ giấy này nghiên cứu cách diễn giải của mũi tên qua phương pháp ngôn ngữ, họp báo và học máy móc. Công việc của chúng ta tạo ra một so sánh mới giữa các mũi tên và động từ: chúng ta ủng hộ đại diện các mũi tên theo độ phân biệt về cấu trúc và ngữ pháp khác nhau, và giải quyết các khung dẫn đến các diễn biến cụ thể bằng kiến thức nông nổi.', 'nl': 'Pijlen zijn een belangrijk ingrediënt van schematische picturale communicatie. Deze paper onderzoekt de interpretatie van pijlen door middel van linguïstische, crowdsourcing en machine learning methodologie. Ons werk creëert een nieuwe analogie tussen pijlen en werkwoorden: we pleiten voor het weergeven van pijlen in termen van kwalitatief verschillende structurele en semantische kaders, en het oplossen van frames naar specifieke interpretaties met behulp van ondiepe wereldkennis.', 'bg': 'Стрелките са ключова съставка на схематичната картинна комуникация. Настоящата статия изследва интерпретацията на стрели чрез лингвистична, кроудсорсинг и машинно обучение методология. Нашата работа установява нова аналогия между стрели и глаголи: застъпваме се за представяне на стрели по отношение на качествено различни структурни и семантични рамки и решаване на рамки до специфични интерпретации, използвайки плитко световно познание.', 'da': 'Pile er en vigtig ingrediens i skematisk billedkommunikation. Denne artikel undersøger fortolkningen af pile gennem sproglig, crowdsourcing og machine-learning metodologi. Vores arbejde etablerer en ny analogi mellem pile og verber: Vi går ind for at repræsentere pile i form af kvalitativt forskellige strukturelle og semantiske rammer og løse rammer til specifikke fortolkninger ved hjælp af overfladisk verdenskendskab.', 'id': 'Arrows adalah bahan kunci dari komunikasi skematik gambar. Kertas ini menyelidiki interpretasi panah melalui metodologi bahasa, crowdsourcing dan mesin belajar. Pekerjaan kami menentukan analogi baru antara panah dan verb: kami mendukung mewakili panah dalam terma kualitatif bingkai struktur dan semantis yang berbeda, dan memecahkan bingkai untuk interpretasi spesifik menggunakan pengetahuan dunia rendah.', 'ko': '화살표는 도형의 교류를 나타내는 관건적인 구성 부분이다.본고는 언어학, 패키지 및 기계 학습 방법을 통해arrows의 해석을 연구하고자 한다.우리의 작업은 화살표와 동사 사이에 새로운 유비를 세웠다. 우리는 서로 다른 구조와 의미 구조로 화살표를 표시하고 얕은 세계 지식을 사용하여 구조를 구체적인 해석으로 분해하자고 주장했다.', 'sw': 'Mapinduzi ni msingi wa mawasiliano ya pictorial. Makala hii inachunguza tafsiri ya pili kwa njia ya lugha, vyanzo vya umma na njia ya kujifunza mashine. Kazi yetu inatengeneza mchanganyiko wa riwaya kati ya upepo na maneno: tunatetea kuwawakilisha pili kwa namna ya miundombinu tofauti na sekunde, na kutatua miundombi ya tafsiri maalum kwa kutumia maarifa mbaya ya duniani.', 'fa': 'تیرها یک عنصر کلیدی از ارتباط تصویر تصویر سیستم هستند. این کاغذ تفسیر تیرها را از طریق روش زبان\u200cشناسی، سرمایه\u200cگذاری و روش یادگیری ماشین تحقیق می\u200cکند. کار ما یک شبیه\u200cشناسی رمانی بین تفنگ\u200cها و کلمه\u200cها را تشکیل می\u200cدهد: ما تفنگ\u200cهای نمایش دادن به عنوان فرم\u200cهای ساختاری و سنتی\u200cهای متفاوتی، و فرم\u200cها را حل می\u200cکنیم تا تفسیر خاصی با استفاده از دانش\u200cهای جهانی گسترده\u200cای.', 'tr': 'Goşlar şymatik görkezilişiň a çyk bilençidir. Bu kagyz lingwistiki, kalamsal we maşyny öwrenmek methodologiýasy bilen ok yorumyny barlap çykýar. Biziň işimiz oklaryň we sözleriň arasynda bir roman analogiýany düzəlýär: we dünýäde döwürülen bilgimiz bilen ukyplaryň üýtgetmegini we çözümleri çözýäris.', 'de': 'Pfeile sind ein wesentlicher Bestandteil der schematischen Bildkommunikation. Dieser Beitrag untersucht die Interpretation von Pfeilen durch linguistische, Crowdsourcing- und Machine-Learning-Methoden. Unsere Arbeit etabliert eine neuartige Analogie zwischen Pfeilen und Verben: Wir befürworten die Darstellung von Pfeilen in qualitativ unterschiedlichen strukturellen und semantischen Rahmen und die Auflösung von Frames zu spezifischen Interpretationen durch flaches Weltwissen.', 'af': "Pyle is 'n sleutel ingredient van skematiese fotokommunikasie. Hierdie papier ondersoek die uitlegging van pyle deur lingwisiese, verskeidende en masjien-leer metodologie. Ons werk stel 'n nuwe analogie tussen pyle en verbe: ons bevestig die verteenwoordigheid van pyle in terms van kwaliteit verskillende strukturele en semantiese rame, en die oplossing van rame tot spesifieke uitleggings deur te gebruik slag wêreld kennis.", 'hr': 'Strijele su ključni sastojak shematske fotografijske komunikacije. Ovaj papir istražuje interpretaciju strela kroz lingvistiku, crowdsourcing i metodologiju učenja strojeva. Naš rad utvrđuje novu analogiju između strelica i glazba: mi obraćamo zastupanje strelica u smislu kvalitativno različitih strukturnih i semantičkih okvira i rješavanja okvira specifičnih interpretacija koristeći plitke svjetske znanje.', 'hy': 'Սլատերը սխեմատիկ նկարային հաղորդակցման կարևոր բաղադրիչն են: Այս աշխատանքը ուսումնասիրում է սլանների մեկնաբանությունը լեզվաբանական, ժողովրդավարման և մեխանիզմի ուսումնասիրության մեթոդոլոգիայի միջոցով: Մեր աշխատանքը ստեղծում է նոր նմանություն սլանների և բայերի միջև. մենք պաշտպանում ենք սլանների ներկայացումը կառուցվածքային և սեմանտիկ շրջանների որակավոր տարբեր տեսակներում, և շրջաններ լուծելը հատուկ մեկնաբանությունների համար՝ օգտագործելով մակերեսային աշխարհի գիտել', 'bn': 'স্কীমিক পিক্টরিয়াল যোগাযোগের একটি মূল উপাদান। এই পত্রিকাটি ভাষার ভাষা, জনস্কোর্সিং এবং মেশিন শিক্ষার পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে তীরের ব্যাখ্যা অনুসন্ধান করেছে। Our work establishes a novel analogy between arrows and verbs: we advocate representing arrows in terms of qualitatively different structural and semantic frames, and resolving frames to specific interpretations using shallow world knowledge.', 'sq': 'Shigjetat janë një përbërës kyçe të komunikimit fotografik skematik. This paper investigates the interpretation of arrows through linguistic, crowdsourcing and machine-learning methodology.  Puna jonë krijon një analogji të re midis shigjetave dhe verbëve: ne mbrojmë përfaqësimin e shigjetave në terma kualitativisht të kornizave strukturore dhe semantike të ndryshme dhe zgjidhjen e kornizave për interpretime specifike duke përdorur njohuri të thella botërore.', 'am': 'Arrows are a key ingredient of schematic pictorial communication. ይህ ገጽ የፍላጻውን ፍቺዎች ቋንቋ፣ የሕዝብ ጉዳይ እና የመኪና ትምህርት ማድረግ ማድረግ ይፈልጋል፡፡ ሥራችን በአፍላጻዎችና በንግግር መካከል የሚኖር የአሁኑን መተረፊያ ያስተካክላል፤ ፍላጻዎችን በተለያዩ አካባቢና የsemantic ፍሬዎችን እናቆማለን፥ የዓለማዊ እውቀት በመጠቀም የተለየ ትርጓሜዎችን ለመፍረስ እናቆማለን፡፡', 'ca': "Arrows are a key ingredient of schematic pictorial communication.  Aquest article investiga l'interpretació de fletxes a través de la metodologia lingüística, crowdsourcing i d'aprenentatge automàtic. La nostra feina estableix una nova analogia entre fletxes i verbs: defensem representar fletxes en termes de quadres estructurals i semàntics qualitativament diferents, i resoldre quadres a interpretacions específiques utilitzant el coneixement mundial baix.", 'cs': 'Šipky jsou klíčovou složkou schématické obrazové komunikace. Tento článek zkoumá interpretaci šípů pomocí lingvistické, crowdsourcingové a strojového učení metodiky. Naše práce vytváří novou analogii mezi šípy a slovesami: obhajujeme reprezentování šípů z hlediska kvalitativně odlišných strukturálních a sémantických rámců a rozlišování rámců ke specifickým interpretacím pomocí mělkých znalostí světa.', 'et': 'Nooled on skemaatilise pildilise kommunikatsiooni võtmekomponent. Käesolevas töös uuritakse noolte tõlgendamist keelelise, ühishankimise ja masinõppe metoodika kaudu. Meie töö loob noolte ja tegusõnade vahel uudse analoogia: pooldame noolte esindamist kvalitatiivselt erinevates struktuurilistes ja semantilistes raamides ning raamide lahendamist konkreetsetele tõlgendustele madalate maailmateadmiste abil.', 'az': 'Oqlar schematic fotoğraf əlaqəsinin a çar maddə. Bu kağıt dil, qüvvətli və maşın öyrənmə metodolojisi ilə oxların yorumlarını incidir. Bizim işimiz oklar və verblər arasında yeni bir analoji təyin edir: biz küləkləri müxtəlif strukturlar və semantik çerçimlər ilə müəyyən edirik, və çətin dünya elmi vasitəsilə müəyyən tərzlərinə çəkiririk.', 'fi': 'Nuolit ovat keskeinen osa kaavioiden kuvallista viestintää. Tässä työssä tutkitaan nuolien tulkintaa kielellisen, joukkoistamisen ja koneoppimisen menetelmin. Työssämme luodaan uusi analogia nuolten ja verbien välillä: kannatamme nuolten esittämistä laadullisesti erilaisissa rakenteellisissa ja semanttisissa kehyksissä ja kehysten ratkaisemista tiettyihin tulkintoihin käyttäen matalaa maailmatuetoa.', 'bs': 'Strijele su ključni sastojak shematske fotografijske komunikacije. Ovaj papir istražuje interpretaciju strela kroz lingvistiku, crowdsourcing i metodologiju učenja mašina. Naš rad utvrđuje novu analogiju između strelica i verba: predstavljamo strelice u smislu kvalitativno različitih strukturnih i semantičkih okvira i rješavanja okvira specifičnih interpretacija koristeći plitke svjetske znanje.', 'jv': 'structural navigation Perintah iki dadi panjenengan kelas perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno sawar manipulan kanggo ngilanggar langgambar, akeh bantuan lan ngono kuwi macem nggambar. Awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem ana karo perbudhakan kanggo nyuggo lan ngawe barang kelas: kéné arèhku nggawe arrowlan tambah kuwi nggawe sistem karo semantar uhé, lan hukum sistem sing berartil nggawe tarjamahan kanggo ngilangno kejahatan kanggo ngerasakno versita awak dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Puščice so ključna sestavina shematske slikovne komunikacije. V prispevku raziskujemo interpretacijo puščic skozi jezikovno, množično in strojno učenje metodologijo. Naše delo vzpostavlja novo analogijo med puščicami in glagoli: zagovarjamo predstavljanje puščic v smislu kvalitativno različnih strukturnih in semantičnih okvirjev ter reševanje okvirjev v specifične interpretacije z uporabo plitvega svetovnega znanja.', 'he': 'חצים הם מרכיב מפתח לתקשורת תמונות. העבודה הזו חוקרת את הפרשנות של חצים באמצעות מטדולוגיה לשונית, משאבי קהל ומכונות ללמוד. העבודה שלנו קובעת אנלוגיה חדשה בין חצים וליבים: אנו מתייחסים לייצג חצים במונחים של מסגרות מבנה מבנה איכותית שונות ומסמנטיות, ולפתור מסגרות לפרשנות ספציפיות באמצעות ידע בעולם שטח.', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name Wannan karatun yana tambaya fassarar arru a cikin linguistic, mutane source da zane-zane. Arimakanmu yana samar da wani littafa mai nowaya a tsakanin kibiyoyi da abubuwa: Munã shawarar da masu wakilishi arru cikin muhimman firam masu tsari da sakan firam masu tarawa, kuma tuna yin raba firam da fassarar da ke amfani da kunnuwan duniya mai shaƙãwa.', 'bo': 'མདའ་རྟགས་ནི་འཆར་བརྙན་རིས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་ལ་མཐུན་ཁག་ཅིག་རེད ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་། སྐད་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་འདྲ་བཤུས་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་སྤྱོད། ང་ཚོའི་ལས་ཀ་ལྟ་བུའི་བཟོ་ཚིགས་དང་བྱ་ཚིག་དག་གི་བར་སྐད་གསར་གཏོང་ཞིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད།'}
{'en': 'Bridge Video and Text with Cascade Syntactic Structure', 'ar': 'جسر الفيديو والنص مع البنية النحوية المتتالية', 'pt': 'Faça uma ponte entre vídeo e texto com estrutura sintática em cascata', 'fr': 'Reliez la vidéo et le texte avec une structure syntaxique en cascade', 'es': 'Unir vídeo y texto con estructura sintáctica en cascada', 'ja': 'カスケード構文構造でビデオとテキストをブリッジ', 'zh': '用级联句法结构桥接视频及文本', 'hi': 'पुल वीडियो और कैस्केड वाक्यात्मक संरचना के साथ पाठ', 'ru': 'Мост видео и текста с каскадной синтаксической структурой', 'ga': 'Físeán agus Téacs an Droichid le Struchtúr Comhréire Cascáidigh', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Γέφυρα βίντεο και κειμένου με Cascade συντακτική δομή', 'hu': 'Videó és szöveg áthidalása kaszkád szintaktikus struktúrával', 'lt': 'Name', 'it': 'Bridge Video e testo con struttura sintattica a cascata', 'kk': 'Cascade синтактикалық құрылғының видео және мәтіні көшірмелеу', 'ms': 'Bridge Video and Text with Cascade Syntactic Structure', 'mk': 'Bridge Video and Text with Cascade Syntactic Structure', 'mn': 'Cascade Syntactic Structure', 'ml': 'കാസ്കേഡ് സിന്\u200dടാക്റ്റിക് സ്ട്രോക്റ്റിക്ക് കൊണ്ടുള്ള വീഡിയോ വാചകം', 'pl': 'Bridge wideo i tekst ze strukturą syntaktyczną kaskadową', 'mt': 'Vidjo u Test tal-Bridge bi Struttura Sintattika Kaskata', 'no': 'Bruk video og tekst med Cascade Syntaktisk struktur', 'so': 'Fiidiyow iyo Text with Cascade Syntactic', 'ro': 'Punte video și text cu structură sintactică cascadă', 'sr': 'Видео и текст моста са синтактичной структуре каскада', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Brygga video och text med kaskadsyntaktisk struktur', 'ta': 'பாலம் வீடியோ மற்றும் உரை', 'ur': 'کیسکے سینٹکتیک ساختار کے ساتھ بریج ویڈیو اور متن', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Giấy ảnh và văn bản với cấu trúc cú pháp Cascade', 'da': 'Brovideo og tekst med kaskadesyntaktisk struktur', 'bg': 'Мостово видео и текст с каскадна синтактична структура', 'nl': 'Brug video en tekst met cascade syntactische structuur', 'id': 'Bridge Video and Text with Cascade Syntactic Structure', 'de': 'Überbrücken von Video und Text mit Cascade Syntaktic Structure', 'hr': 'Most video i tekst s kaskadom sintaktičnom strukturom', 'ko': '연결 문법 구조를 갖춘 브리지 영상과 텍스트', 'sw': 'Video na Text with Cascade Syntactic', 'tr': 'Cascade Sentaktik Structure ile Videoyu we Metini Köprükle', 'fa': 'ویدئو و متن پل با ساختار سنتاکتیک Cascade', 'af': 'Bridge Video en Teks met Cascade Syntactic Structure', 'az': 'Cascade Sintaktik Yapısıyla Video və Metin Köprü', 'am': 'የፊደል ቪዲዮ እና ጽሑፍ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'ক্যাসেড সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কাঠামোর সাথে ব্রিজ ভিডিও এবং টেক্সট', 'bs': 'Most video i tekst sa kaskadom sintaktičnom strukturom', 'cs': 'Mostování videa a textu s kaskádovou syntaktickou strukturou', 'sq': 'Bridge Video dhe Tekst me Strukturën Sintaktike Kaskadë', 'et': 'Sildade video ja tekst kaskaadsüntaktilise struktuuriga', 'ca': 'Vídeo i text del pont amb estructura sintàctica cascada', 'fi': 'Silta video ja teksti Cascade Syntactic Structure', 'jv': 'Bridge Video karo Text karo Kascade Singatik structural', 'ha': 'Phonon:: MMF:: EffectFactory', 'he': 'וידאו וטקסט גשר עם מבנה סינטקטי קסקיד', 'sk': 'Most video in besedilo s kaskadno sintaktično strukturo', 'bo': 'Bridge Video and Text with Cascade Syntactic Structure'}
{'en': 'We present a video captioning approach that encodes features by progressively completing syntactic structure (LSTM-CSS). To construct basic syntactic structure (i.e., subject, predicate, and object), we use a Conditional Random Field to label semantic representations (i.e., motions, objects). We argue that in order to improve the comprehensiveness of the description, the local features within object regions can be used to generate complementary syntactic elements (e.g., attribute, adverbial). Inspired by redundancy of human receptors, we utilize a Region Proposal Network to focus on the object regions. To model the final temporal dynamics, Recurrent Neural Network with Path Embeddings is adopted. We demonstrate the effectiveness of LSTM-CSS on generating natural sentences : 42.3 % and 28.5 % in terms of BLEU@4 and METEOR. Superior performance when compared to state-of-the-art methods are reported on a large video description dataset (i.e., MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ar': 'نقدم طريقة شرح مقاطع الفيديو التي تشفر الميزات من خلال استكمال البنية النحوية تدريجيًا (LSTM-CSS). لبناء بنية نحوية أساسية (أي ، الموضوع ، المسند ، والكائن) ، نستخدم الحقل العشوائي الشرطي لتسمية التمثيلات الدلالية (أي الحركات ، الكائنات). نجادل أنه من أجل تحسين شمولية الوصف ، يمكن استخدام الميزات المحلية داخل مناطق الكائن لإنشاء عناصر نحوية تكميلية (على سبيل المثال ، السمة ، الظرف). مستوحاة من التكرار في المستقبلات البشرية ، نستخدم شبكة اقتراح المنطقة للتركيز على مناطق الكائن. لنمذجة الديناميات الزمنية النهائية ، تم اعتماد الشبكة العصبية المتكررة مع مسار التضمينات. نبرهن على فعالية LSTM-CSS في توليد جمل طبيعية: 42.3٪ و 28.5٪ من حيث BLEU @ 4 و METEOR. يتم الإبلاغ عن الأداء المتفوق عند مقارنته بأحدث الأساليب في مجموعة بيانات وصف الفيديو الكبيرة (على سبيل المثال ، MSR-VTT-2016).', 'fr': "Nous présentons une approche de sous-titrage vidéo qui code les fonctionnalités en complétant progressivement la structure syntaxique (LSTM-CSS). Pour construire une structure syntaxique de base (sujet, prédicat et objet), nous utilisons un champ aléatoire conditionnel pour étiqueter les représentations sémantiques (c'est-à-dire les mouvements, les objets). Nous soutenons que pour améliorer l'exhaustivité de la description, les caractéristiques locales dans les régions d'objets peuvent être utilisées pour générer des éléments syntaxiques complémentaires (par exemple, attribut, adverbial). Inspirés par la redondance des récepteurs humains, nous utilisons un réseau de propositions de régions pour nous concentrer sur les régions de l'objet. Pour modéliser la dynamique temporelle finale, Récurrent Neural Network with Path Embeddings est adopté. Nous démontrons l'efficacité de LSTM-CSS pour générer des phrases naturelles\xa0: 42,3\xa0% et 28,5\xa0% en termes de BLEU @4 et de METEOR. Des performances supérieures par rapport aux méthodes de pointe sont rapportées sur un ensemble de données de description vidéo volumineux (MSR-VTT-2016).", 'es': 'Presentamos un enfoque de subtítulos de video que codifica características completando progresivamente la estructura sintáctica (LSTM-CSS). Para construir una estructura sintáctica básica (es decir, sujeto, predicado y objeto), utilizamos un campo aleatorio condicional para etiquetar las representaciones semánticas (es decir, movimientos, objetos). Argumentamos que para mejorar la exhaustividad de la descripción, las características locales dentro de las regiones del objeto pueden usarse para generar elementos sintácticos complementarios (por ejemplo, atributo, adverbial). Inspirados por la redundancia de los receptores humanos, utilizamos una Red de Propuestas Regionales para centrarnos en las regiones objeto. Para modelar la dinámica temporal final, se adopta la Red Neural Recurrente con Incrustaciones de Ruta. Demostramos la eficacia de LSTM-CSS en la generación de sentencias naturales: 42,3% y 28,5% en términos de BLEU @4 y METEOR. Se informa de un rendimiento superior en comparación con los métodos más avanzados en un gran conjunto de datos de descripción de vídeo (por ejemplo, MSR-VTT-2016).', 'pt': 'Apresentamos uma abordagem de legendagem de vídeo que codifica recursos completando progressivamente a estrutura sintática (LSTM-CSS). Para construir a estrutura sintática básica (ou seja, sujeito, predicado e objeto), usamos um campo aleatório condicional para rotular representações semânticas (ou seja, movimentos, objetos). Argumentamos que, para melhorar a abrangência da descrição, os recursos locais dentro das regiões do objeto podem ser usados para gerar elementos sintáticos complementares (por exemplo, atributo, adverbial). Inspirados na redundância de receptores humanos, utilizamos uma Rede de Propostas de Região para focar nas regiões do objeto. Para modelar a dinâmica temporal final, é adotada a Rede Neural Recorrente com Embeddings de Caminhos. Demonstramos a eficácia do LSTM-CSS na geração de sentenças naturais: 42,3% e 28,5% em termos de BLEU@4 e METEOR. O desempenho superior quando comparado aos métodos de última geração é relatado em um grande conjunto de dados de descrição de vídeo (ou seja, MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ja': '構文構造（ LSTM - CSS ）を徐々に完成させることで特徴をエンコードするビデオキャプションアプローチを提示します。基本的な構文構造（すなわち、主語、述語、およびオブジェクト）を構築するには、条件ランダムフィールドを使用して、意味表現（すなわち、動き、オブジェクト）をラベル付けします。説明の包括性を向上させるために、オブジェクト領域内のローカル特徴を使用して、補完的な構文要素（例えば、属性、副詞）を生成することができると主張する。ヒト受容体の冗長性に触発されて、私たちはオブジェクト領域に焦点を当てるために領域提案ネットワークを利用します。最終的な時間ダイナミクスをモデル化するために、パス埋め込みを備えたリカレントニューラルネットワークが採用されています。自然文の生成におけるLSTM - CSSの有効性を実証しました： BLEU @ 4と流星の観点から42.3 ％と28.5 ％。最先端の方法と比較した場合の優れたパフォーマンスは、大規模なビデオ記述データセット（すなわち、MSR - VTT -2016 ）上で報告される。', 'zh': '建一视频字幕之法,以渐成之句法(LSTM-CSS)以编码功能。 本句法结构(主语、谓词、宾语)也,随机场以志语义(动)也。 臣愚以为崇述全面性,所以成互补者句法素(,性副词)也。 受体冗余启,因地提案网络以关之。 模拟终时动,用有径嵌递归神经网络。 证LSTM-CSS自然之有效性:BLEU@4 METEOR为42.3%28.5%。 比之先进,大视频述数集(即MSR-VTT-2016)告以卓异之能。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем подход к субтитрам видео, который кодирует признаки путем постепенного завершения синтаксической структуры (LSTM-CSS). Для построения базовой синтаксической структуры (т. е. предмета, предиката и объекта) мы используем условное случайное поле для обозначения семантических представлений (т. е. движений, объектов). Мы утверждаем, что для улучшения полноты описания, локальные признаки в пределах областей объекта могут быть использованы для генерации дополнительных синтаксических элементов (например, атрибута, наречия). Вдохновленные избыточностью человеческих рецепторов, мы используем региональную сеть предложений, чтобы сосредоточиться на объектных регионах. Для моделирования окончательной временной динамики принята рекуррентная нейронная сеть с вложенными траекториями. Мы демонстрируем эффективность LSTM-CSS по генерации естественных предложений: 42,3% и 28,5% в терминах BLEU@4 и МЕТЕОРИТА. Превосходная производительность по сравнению с современными методами представлена в большом наборе данных описания видео (т.е. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'hi': 'हम एक वीडियो कैप्शनिंग दृष्टिकोण प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो वाक्यात्मक संरचना (एलएसटीएम-सीएसएस) को उत्तरोत्तर पूरा करके सुविधाओं को एन्कोड करता है। बुनियादी वाक्यात्मक संरचना (यानी, विषय, विधेय और वस्तु) का निर्माण करने के लिए, हम शब्दार्थ प्रतिनिधित्व (यानी, गति, वस्तुओं) को लेबल करने के लिए एक सशर्त यादृच्छिक क्षेत्र का उपयोग करते हैं। हम तर्क देते हैं कि विवरण की व्यापकता में सुधार करने के लिए, ऑब्जेक्ट क्षेत्रों के भीतर स्थानीय विशेषताओं का उपयोग पूरक वाक्यात्मक तत्वों (जैसे, विशेषता, क्रियाविशेषण) उत्पन्न करने के लिए किया जा सकता है। मानव रिसेप्टर्स की अतिरेक से प्रेरित होकर, हम ऑब्जेक्ट क्षेत्रों पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने के लिए एक क्षेत्र प्रस्ताव नेटवर्क का उपयोग करते हैं। अंतिम अस्थायी गतिशीलता को मॉडल करने के लिए, पथ एम्बेडिंग के साथ आवर्तक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क को अपनाया जाता है। हम प्राकृतिक वाक्यों को उत्पन्न करने पर LSTM-CSS की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं: BLEU@4 और METEOR के संदर्भ में 42.3% और 28.5%। अत्याधुनिक तरीकों की तुलना में बेहतर प्रदर्शन एक बड़े वीडियो विवरण डेटासेट (यानी, MSR-VTT-2016) पर रिपोर्ट किया जाता है।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair cur chuige fotheidealú físeáin a ionchódaíonn gnéithe trí struchtúr comhréire (LSTM-CSS) a chomhlánú de réir a chéile. Chun bunstruchtúr comhréire a thógáil (i.e., ábhar, tuar, agus réad), bainimid úsáid as Réimse Randamach Coinníollach chun léirithe shéimeantacha a lipéadú (i.e., gluaisne, réada). Áitímid, chun cuimsitheacht an chur síos a fheabhsú, gur féidir na gnéithe áitiúla laistigh de réigiúin oibiachtúla a úsáid chun eilimintí comhréire comhlántacha a ghiniúint (m.sh., tréith, aidiacht). Arna spreagadh ag iomarcaíocht gabhdóirí daonna, úsáidimid Líonra Togra Réigiúin chun díriú ar na réigiúin oibiachtúla. Chun an dinimic ama deiridh a shamhaltú, glactar le Líonra Néarach Athfhillteach le Leabú Cosán. Léirímid éifeachtacht LSTM-CSS maidir le habairtí nádúrtha a ghiniúint: 42.3% agus 28.5% i dtéarmaí BLEU@4 agus METEOR. Déantar feidhmíocht shármhaith i gcomparáid le modhanna úrscothacha a thuairisciú ar thacar sonraí mór cur síos físeáin (i.e., MSR-VTT-2016).', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια προσέγγιση λεζάντας βίντεο που κωδικοποιεί χαρακτηριστικά συμπληρώνοντας προοδευτικά τη συντακτική δομή. Για την κατασκευή βασικής συντακτικής δομής (δηλ. υποκείμενο, υπαρκτό και αντικείμενο), χρησιμοποιούμε ένα υπό όρους τυχαίο πεδίο για να επισημάνουμε σημασιολογικές αναπαραστάσεις (π.χ. κινήσεις, αντικείμενα). Υποστηρίζουμε ότι προκειμένου να βελτιωθεί η πληρότητα της περιγραφής, τα τοπικά χαρακτηριστικά μέσα στις περιοχές αντικειμένων μπορούν να χρησιμοποιηθούν για την παραγωγή συμπληρωματικών συντακτικών στοιχείων (π.χ. χαρακτηριστικό, επίθετο). Εμπνευσμένοι από την πλεονασματικότητα των ανθρώπινων υποδοχέων, χρησιμοποιούμε ένα Δίκτυο Προτάσεων Περιοχής για να επικεντρωθούμε στις περιοχές αντικειμένων. Για να μοντελοποιηθεί η τελική χρονική δυναμική, υιοθετείται το Επαναλαμβανόμενο Νευρικό Δίκτυο με Ενσωματώσεις Διαδρομών. Αποδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα του στη δημιουργία φυσικών προτάσεων: 42.3% και 28.5% από άποψη BLEU@4 και METEOR. Οι ανώτερες επιδόσεις σε σύγκριση με τις σύγχρονες μεθόδους αναφέρονται σε ένα μεγάλο σύνολο δεδομένων περιγραφής βίντεο (δηλ., MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვიდეო შეტყობინება, რომელიც პროგრესიგურად სინტაქტიული სტრუქტურაციას (LSTM-CSS) დასრულებული ფუნქტურების კოდის. სინტაქტიური სტრუქტურის შექმნა (მაგალითად, subjekt, predicate, და Objekt) ჩვენ გამოყენებთ სტრუქტური პანენტური ფორმა, რომელიც სინტაქტიური გამოსახულებები (მაგალითად, მოძრაობები, обყ ჩვენ აღწერეთ, რომ საკუთარი სინტაქტიური ელემენტები (მაგალითად, ატრიბუტი, აბერბთალური) შეიძლება გამოიყენოთ ადგილური ფუნქციები საბექტიური რეგიონებში. ადამიანის რეცეპტორების შემდეგ გამოყენებული, ჩვენ გამოყენებთ რეგიონის პროგოზაციალური ქსელი, რომელსაც სახელის რეგიონონებში დავყენებთ. საბოლოო ტემპალიური დინამიკის მოდელისთვის, მომხმარებული ნეიროლური ქსელი გეზის შებრუნებებით დავიწყება. ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ LSTM-CSS-ის ეფექტიურობას, რომელიც ჩემი წარმოიდგინეთ ჩემი წარმოიდგინეთ: 42.3% და 28.5% წარმოიდგინეთ BLEU@4 თ მვრვჲპ. საუკეთესო გამოსახულება, როდესაც შემდგომარებულია ხელსახულების მეტოვებისთვის, უფრო დიდი ვიდეო გამოსახულება მონაცემებისთვის (MSR-VTT-2016).', 'hu': 'Olyan videófeliratozási megközelítést mutatunk be, amely a szintaktikus struktúra fokozatos befejezésével (LSTM-CSS) kódolja a funkciókat. Az alapvető szintaktikus struktúra (azaz tárgy, predikátum és objektum) létrehozásához feltételes véletlenszerű mezőt használunk a szemantikai reprezentációk (azaz mozgások, objektumok) címkézésére. Azt állítjuk, hogy a leírás átfogóságának javítása érdekében az objektumrégiókon belüli helyi jellemzők felhasználhatók kiegészítő szintaktikus elemek (pl. attribútum, hirdető) generálására. Az emberi receptorok redundanciájának inspirálására egy Regionális Javaslat Hálózatot használunk az objektumrégiókra. A végső idődinamika modellezéséhez az Útvonalbeágyazásokkal ellátott ismétlődő ideghálózatot alkalmazzák. Bemutatjuk az LSTM-CSS hatékonyságát a természetes mondatok létrehozásában: 42,3%, 28,5% a BLEU@4 és METEOR. A legkorszerűbb módszerekhez képest kiváló teljesítményt jelentenek egy nagy videóleírási adatkészleten (azaz MSR-VTT-2016).', 'lt': 'Pateikiame vaizdo antraštės metodą, koduojantį savybes laipsniškai užbaigiant sintaksinę struktūrą (LSTM-CSS). Siekiant sukurti pagrindinę sintaksinę struktūrą (t. y. objektą, predikatą ir objektą), naudojame sąlyginį atsitiktinį lauką ženklinant semantinius rodmenis (t. y. judesius, objektus). Mes teigiame, kad siekiant pagerinti aprašymo išsamumą objektų regionuose esančios vietos savybės gali būti naudojamos papildomiems sintaksiniams elementams (pvz., požymiams, neigiamiems) gaminti. Įkvėpta dėl žmogaus receptorių atleidimo, mes naudojame Regiono pasiūlymų tinklą, kad sutelktume dėmesį į objektų regionus. Siekiant modeliuoti galutinę temporalinę dinamiką, patvirtinamas pakartotinis nervinis tinklas su kelio įdėjimais. Mes parodome LSTM-CSS veiksmingumą gamtinių sakinių sukūrimui: 42,3 % ir 28,5 % pagal BLEU@4 ir METEOR. Didesni rezultatai, palyginti su naujausiais metodais, pateikiami dideliame vaizdo aprašymo duomenų rinkinyje (t. y. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'mk': 'Презентираме пристап на видео наслов кој ги кодира карактеристиките со прогресивно комплетирање на синтактичката структура (LSTM- CSS). За да изградиме основна синтактичка структура (т.е., субјект, предикат и објект), користиме условно случајно поле за да ги означиме семантичките претставувања (т.е., движења, објекти). Ние тврдиме дека со цел да се подобри целосноста на описот, локалните карактеристики во регионите на објектите може да се користат за генерирање комплементарни синтактички елементи (на пример, атрибут, аварбиски). Инспирирани од отпуштање на човечки рецептори, користиме Регионална мрежа за предлози за да се фокусираме на регионите на објектите. За да се моделира финалната температурна динамика, се усвои рекурентната неурална мрежа со вклопување на патиштата. Демонстрираме ефикасност на ЛСТМ-ЦСС во генерирањето природни казни: 42,3 отсто и 28,5 отсто во поглед на BLEU@4 И Метеор. Супер резултат во споредба со најновите методи се известува на голем видео опис на податоци (т.е., MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan pendekatan captioning video yang mengekod ciri-ciri dengan melanjutkan struktur sintaktik (LSTM-CSS). To construct basic syntactic structure (i.e., subject, predicate, and object), we use a Conditional Random Field to label semantic representations (i.e., motions, objects).  Kami menyangka bahawa untuk meningkatkan keseluruhan keterangan, ciri-ciri setempat dalam kawasan objek boleh digunakan untuk menghasilkan unsur sintaktik komplementari (cth., atribut, adverbial). Terinspirasi oleh penerima manusia, kami menggunakan Rangkaian cadangan Kawasan untuk fokus pada kawasan objek. Untuk model dinamik sementara terakhir, Rangkaian Neural Berulang dengan Pencampuran Laluan diterima. Kami menunjukkan kegunaan LSTM-CSS pada menghasilkan kalimat semulajadi: 42.3% dan 28.5% dalam terma BLEU@4  and METEOR.  Performasi tertinggi bila dibandingkan dengan kaedah-kaedah-state-of-the-art dilaporkan pada set data keterangan video yang besar (iaitu MSR-VTT-2016).', 'it': "Presentiamo un approccio di didascalia video che codifica le caratteristiche completando progressivamente la struttura sintattica (LSTM-CSS). Per costruire una struttura sintattica di base (cioè soggetto, predicato e oggetto), utilizziamo un campo casuale condizionale per etichettare rappresentazioni semantiche (cioè movimenti, oggetti). Sosteniamo che al fine di migliorare la completezza della descrizione, le caratteristiche locali all'interno delle regioni oggetto possono essere utilizzate per generare elementi sintattici complementari (ad esempio attributo, avverbio). Ispirati dalla ridondanza dei recettori umani, utilizziamo una rete di proposte regionali per concentrarsi sulle regioni oggetto. Per modellare le dinamiche temporali finali, viene adottata la rete neurale ricorrente con incorporazioni di percorso. Dimostriamo l'efficacia di LSTM-CSS nella generazione di frasi naturali: 42,3% e 28,5% in termini di BLEU@4 e METEOR. Prestazioni superiori rispetto ai metodi all'avanguardia sono riportate su un set di dati di descrizione video di grandi dimensioni (es., MSR-VTT-2016).", 'kk': 'Біз синтактикалық құрылымды (LSTM- CSS) бағдарламасын бітіру арқылы бейне айдарының арқылы кодтамыз. Негізгі синтактикалық құрылғыны құру үшін (мысалы, тақырыбы, предикциялық және нысанды) semantiкалық түрлендіруді белгілеу үшін Кездейсоқ өрісін қолданамыз. Біз айтып тұрмыз, синтактикалық элементтерді жасау үшін, нысандардың ортасындағы жергілікті мүмкіндіктері қолданылады (мысалы, атрибут, adverbial) синтактикалық элементтерді құру үшін қолданылады. Адам қабылдаушыларының қайта қалпына көмектесілген, нысандардың аумағына назар аумағын қолдану үшін Оңтүстік Желісін қолданамыз. Соңғы уақытша динамиканы үлгілеу үшін, жолды ендіру үшін қайталанатын нейралы желі қолданылады. Біз LSTM-CSS табиғи сөйлемелерді құру үшін әсер ететінін көрсетедік: 42,3% мен 28,5% қатар BLEU@4 және МЕТЕОР. Үлкен видео сипаттамасының деректер жиынында (мысалы, MSR-VTT-2016) әдістерімен салыстырылғанда жұмыс істеу әдістері бар.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw approċċ ta’ video captioning li jikkodifika l-karatteristiċi billi timtela progressivament l-istruttura sintattika (LSTM-CSS). Biex nibnu struttura sintattika bażika (jiġifieri, suġġett, predikat, u oġġett), a ħna nużaw Qasam Kundizzjonali Random biex nittikkettaw rappreżentazzjonijiet semantiċi (jiġifieri, movimenti, oġġetti). Aħna jargumentaw li sabiex tittejjeb il-komprensività tad-deskrizzjoni, il-karatteristiċi lokali fi ħdan ir-reġjuni tal-oġġetti jistgħu jintużaw biex jiġġeneraw elementi sintattiċi kumplimentari (e ż., attribut, avverbial). Inspirat mis-sensja ta’ riċetturi umani, a ħna nużaw Netwerk ta’ Proposti tar-Reġjun biex niffokaw fuq ir-reġjuni tal-oġġett. Biex tiġi mudellata d-dinamika temporali finali, huwa adottat Netwerk Newrali Rikorrenti b’Embeddings tal-Passaġġi. Jiġu murija l-effikaċja tal-LSTM-CSS fuq il-ġenerazzjoni ta’ sentenzi naturali: 42.3% u 28.5% f’termini ta’  BLEU@4 - u METEOR. Prestazzjoni superjuri meta mqabbla mal-metodi l-aktar avvanzati huma rrappurtati fuq sett kbir ta’ dejta tad-deskrizzjoni tal-vidjo (jiġifieri, MSR-VTT-2016).', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy podejście do podpisów wideo, które koduje funkcje poprzez stopniowe uzupełnianie struktury składni (LSTM-CSS). Aby skonstruować podstawową strukturę składni (tj. podmiot, predykat i obiekt), używamy warunkowego pola losowego do oznaczania reprezentacji semantycznych (tj. ruchów, obiektów). Twierdzimy, że w celu poprawy kompleksowości opisu, lokalne cechy w regionach obiektów mogą być wykorzystane do generowania uzupełniających się elementów składni (np. atrybutu, przysłówki). Zainspirowani redundancją ludzkich receptorów, wykorzystujemy Sieć Regionów Proposal Network, aby skupić się na regionach obiektów. Aby zamodelować ostateczną dynamikę czasową, przyjęta jest sieć powtarzająca się z osadzeniem ścieżki. Wykazujemy skuteczność LSTM-CSS w generowaniu zdań naturalnych: 42,3% i 28,5% pod względem BLEU@4 i METEOR. Najwyższa wydajność w porównaniu do najnowocześniejszych metod jest zgłaszana na dużym zbiorze danych opisu wideo (tj. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു വീഡിയോ ക്യാപ്റ്റിങ്ങ് ചെയ്യുന്ന പ്രാധാന്യം നിര്\u200dണ്ണയിക്കുന്നു. അതിന്റെ പ്രാഗത്തില്\u200d സിന്റാ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലെ സിനിട്ടാക്കിക്കൂട്ടക്കൂട്ടക്കൂട്ടത്തെ (ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, വിഷയത്തിന്റെ കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനായി), നിസ്ഥിതി വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുവാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാദിക്കുന്നു മനുഷ്യരുടെ റെസ്റ്ററുകളുടെ കുറച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു പ്രദേശത്തിന്റെ പ്രൊപോസ്സാല്\u200d നെറ്റോര്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോ അവസാനത്തെ സമയത്തിന്റെ ഡൈനാമിക്ക് മാതൃകയാക്കുവാന്\u200d, പാത്ത് എംബെഡിങ്ങുകളുമായി വീണ്ടും ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെയുറല സ്വാഭാവിക വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എല്\u200dസ്റ്റി-സിസിന്\u200dറെ പ്രഭാവം കാണിച്ചുകൊട BLEU@4 പിന്നെ മെറ്റര്\u200d. Superior performance when compared to state-of-the-art methods are reported on a large video description dataset (i.e., MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm o abordare de subtitrare video care codează caracteristicile prin completarea progresivă a structurii sintactice (LSTM-CSS). Pentru a construi structura sintactică de bază (adică subiect, predicat și obiect), folosim un câmp aleatoriu condiționat pentru a eticheta reprezentări semantice (adică mișcări, obiecte). Susținem că, pentru a îmbunătăți caracteristicile locale din regiunile obiectelor pot fi utilizate pentru a genera elemente sintactice complementare (de exemplu, atribut, adverbial). Inspirați de redundanța receptorilor umani, utilizăm o rețea de propunere regională pentru a ne concentra pe regiunile obiectelor. Pentru a modela dinamica temporală finală, este adoptată Rețeaua Neurală Recurentă cu Încorporarea Căilor. Demonstrăm eficacitatea LSTM-CSS în generarea propozițiilor naturale: 42,3% și 28,5% în termeni de BLEU@4 şi METEOR. Performanțele superioare în comparație cu metodele de ultimă generație sunt raportate pe un set de date de descriere video mare (adică MSR-VTT-2016).', 'no': 'Vi viser ein video-tittelmetode som kodar funksjonar ved å fullføra syntaksisk struktur (LSTM-CSS). For å konstruere grunnleggjande syntaksiske struktur (t.d. emne, predikat og objekt), bruker vi ein vilkårleg tilfeldig for å merke semantiske representasjonar (t.d. mottak, objekt). Vi argumenterer at for å forbetra den kompleksiteten av beskrivelsen kan lokale funksjonane i objektområde brukast til å laga komplementar syntaktiske elementar (f.eks. attributt, adverbial). På redundansjon av menneske mottakarar bruker vi eit område førehandsvising for å fokusera på objektområdene. For å modellere den siste tidlegare dynamikken, vert gjentakelig nøyralnettverk med bane innebygd. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten av LSTM-CSS på å laga natursetningar: 42,3 % og 28,5 % i tillegg til BLEU@4 og METEOR. Første utvikling når sammenligninga med kunstmetodar vert rapportert på ein stor dataset for videobeskriving (t.d. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'mn': 'Бид шинжлэх ухааны бүтэц (LSTM-CSS) дээр хөгжүүлэхээр шинжлэх ухааныг коддог видео захирах арга зам өгсөн. Энгийн синтактик бүтэц (т.е. сургууль, сургууль, урд, объект) бүтээхийн тулд бид semantic илэрхийллүүдийг (т.е. хөдөлгөөн, объект) гэх шаардлагатай санамсаргүй талбарыг ашигладаг. Бид тодорхойлолтын бүрэн тодорхойлолтыг сайжруулахын тулд объектын бүс нутгийн орчин чанар нэмэлт синтактик элементүүд боловсруулахын тулд ашиглаж болно. Хүмүүсийн хүлээн авагчдын дунджаас сэтгэл хөдлөл бид объектын бүс нутагт анхаарлаа хандуулахын тулд бүс нутагтай хувилбарыг ашиглаж байна. Сүүлийн цаг хугацааны динамикийг загварчлахын тулд, Path Embedding-тай дахин дахин сэтгэл мэдрэлийн сүлжээ хэрэглэгддэг. Бид LSTM-CSS-ийн байгалийн өгүүлбэр үүсгэхэд нөлөөтэй байдлыг харуулж байна: 42.3% болон 28.5% BLEU@4 МЕТЕОР. Үндсэн бичлэгийн тодорхойлолт өгөгдлийн сан дээр харьцуулахад гайхалтай үйл ажиллагаа (яг MSR-VTT-2016).', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qaab la qabsado fiidiyowga, kaasoo ku qoran qaab horumar ah oo ku dhamaystiraya dhismaha syntactic (LSTM-CSS). Si aan u dhisno dhismaha aasaasiga ah (tusaale ahaan mada, horumarista, iyo wax walbo), waxaynu isticmaalnaa beerta xaaladaha ah e e xaaladaha ah, si aan u qorno qaybaha semantika (tusaale ahaan dhaqdhaqaaqyada, waxyaabaha). Waxaynu ka sheekaynaynaa in si loo hagaajiyo aasaasiga sawirka, waxaa loo isticmaali karaa goobaha deegaanka laga soo jeedo meelaha la isku xiriira (tusaale ahaan qalabka, caawimaadda). Waxaynu isticmaalnaa shabakadda soonaha ee soonaha, si aan ugu kalsoonaanno agagaarka. Si aad u sameyneyso noocyada ugu dambeeya, waxaa la soo qaadaa shabakadda nooca ee ku soo socda wadada. Waxaynu muujinnaa shaqaalaha LSTM-CSS oo ku saabsan dhalashada xukunka asalka ah: 42.3% iyo 28.5% sida BLEU@4  and METEOR.  Sameynta sameynta marka la barbaranayo hababka farshaxanka waxaa lagu soo sheegaa sawirka fiidiyowga oo weyn (i.e. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ta': 'நாம் ஒரு வீடியோ பெறுதல் செயல்பாட்டை குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டு குறியீட்டுகளை முன்னேற்றி ஒத்திசைவு அமைப்பு அடிப்படை ஒத்திசைவு அமைப்பை உருவாக்க (அதாவது, பொருள், குறிப்பு, மற்றும் பொருள்), நாம் ஒரு நிலையான குறிப்பிட்ட புலம் பெமான்டிக் குறிப்பிட விளக்கத்தின் சூழ்நிலையை மேம்படுத்துவதற்காக நாம் விவாதம் செய்கிறோம், பொருள் இடங்களில் உள்ள உள்ள உள்ள உள்ள தன்மைகள் சிக்கலான ஒத்திசைவு உறுப மனித பெறுநர்களின் குறைவு கொண்டு, நாம் ஒரு பிரிவின் குணங்கள் வலைப்பின்னலை பயன்படுத்தி பொருள் இடங்களை கவனம் செலுத்த கடைசி தற்காலிக இயந்திரத்தை உருவாக்க, திரும்ப பாதை உடைவுகளுடன் நிகழ்ந்த புதிய பிணையத்தின் வலைப்பின்னல் ப நாம் LSTM-CSS விளைவை இயல்பான வாக்கியங்களை உருவாக்கும் பொழுது காட்டுகிறோம்: 42.3% மற்றும் 28.5% என்பதை காண்பிக BLEU@4 - மற்றும் METEOR. ஒரு பெரிய விடியோ விவரிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பில் ஒப்பிடும் நிலையில் செயல்பாடு செயல்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது (அதாவது, MSR- VTT- 2016).', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo pristup snimke koji kodira karakteristike progresivno završavajući sintaktičku strukturu (LSTM-CSS). Da bi izgradili osnovnu sintaktičku strukturu (tj. predikat, predikat i objekt), koristimo uslovno slučajno polje za označavanje semantičkih predstava (tj. kretanja, objekata). Predlažemo da bi se, kako bi poboljšali sveobuhvatljivost opisa, lokalne karakteristike unutar oblasti objekata mogu koristiti za stvaranje komplementarnih sintaktičnih elementa (npr. atributa, adverbijalnih). Inspirirali smo od redundancije ljudskih receptora, iskoristili smo regionalnu prijedlogu mrežu da se fokusiramo na oblasti objekata. Da bi modelio konačnu temporalnu dinamiku, prihvaćena je ponovna Neuralna mreža sa uključenjem puteva. Pokazujemo učinkovitost LSTM-CSS na stvaranju prirodnih rečenica: 42,3% i 28,5% u smislu BLEU@4 I METEOR. Najviša prednost u usporedbi s metodama umjetnosti prijavljena se na velikom setu podataka o video opisu (tj. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'si': 'Name මූලික සංකේතික ස්ථාපනය නිර්මාණය කරන්න (ඉතින්, විශේෂය, ප්\u200dරධානය, සහ ප්\u200dරධානයක්), අපි සංකේතික සංකේතික ප්\u200dරධානයක් ලේබ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා කියලා විස්තර විස්තරයේ සම්පූර්ණතාවක් වැඩ කරන්න, ස්ථානික විශේෂතාවක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම මිනිස්සු ප්\u200dරවේශකයන්ගේ ප්\u200dරවේශකයක් නිර්මාණය කරලා, අපි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් ප්\u200dරවේශකය ජාලයට ප්\u200dරවේශකය කරනවා මුළ අන්තිම කාලකාලික විද්\u200dයාපනය විද්\u200dයාපනය කරන්න, මාර්ගය සම්බන්ධ විද්\u200dයාපනය සමග ආයෙත් න්\u200dයුරල ජ අපි LSTM-CSS එකේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණතාවය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්නේ: 42.3% සහ 28.5% ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වගේ BLEU@4 ඒ වගේම මේටර්. වීඩියෝ විවෘත්ත විස්තර දත්ත සූදානයක් විතරයි (MSR-VTT-2016).', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar en bildtext metod som kodar funktioner genom att successivt slutföra syntaktisk struktur (LSTM-CSS). För att konstruera grundläggande syntaktisk struktur (dvs ämne, predikat och objekt), använder vi ett Villkorligt slumpmässigt fält för att märka semantiska representationer (dvs rörelser, objekt). Vi hävdar att för att förbättra beskrivningens heltäckande karaktär kan lokala egenskaper inom objektregioner användas för att generera kompletterande syntaktiska element (t.ex. attribut, adverbial). Inspirerad av redundans av mänskliga receptorer använder vi ett Region Proposal Network för att fokusera på objektregionerna. För att modellera den slutliga tidsdynamiken används Återkommande neurala nätverk med sökvägsinbäddningar. Vi visar hur effektivt LSTM-CSS genererar naturliga meningar: 42,3% och 28,5% i termer av BLEU@4 och METEOR. Överlägsen prestanda jämfört med de senaste metoderna rapporteras på ett stort dataset för videobeskrivningar (dvs MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ur': 'ہم ایک ویڈیو کاپٹینگ طریقہ پیش کریں گے جو سینٹکتیک ساختاری (LSTM-CSS) کے مطابق فکرات کو پیدائش کرتی ہے۔ بنیادی سینٹاکتیک ساختار بنانے کے لئے (یعنی موضوع، پیشڈیکٹ، اور اتوبیٹ) ہم ایک شرط ناقص فیلڈ کا استعمال کرتے ہیں سیمنٹی نمایش (یعنی حرکت، اتوبیٹ) کے لئے۔ ہم argue that in order to improve the comprehensiveness of the description, the local features in object regions can be used to generate complementary syntactic elements (e.g., attribute, adverbial). انسان ریسپٹروں کی سرمایہ کے ذریعے ہمیں ایک منطقه کی پیشگوئل نیٹورک کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ اس کے منطقه پر تمرکز کریں. آخری tempral dynamics کی مدل کے لئے، مسیر ایمبڈینگ کے ساتھ دوبارہ نیورال نیورل نیٹ ورک قبول کیا جاتا ہے. ہم نے LSTM-CSS کی مثبت دکھائی ہے کہ طبیعی جماعت جوڑنے پر 42.3% اور 28.5% BLEU@4 اور ذکر. اچھی عملکرد جب آهنت کی حالت کے مقابلہ میں ایک بڑے ویڈیو ویڈیو سپٹ ڈیٹسٹ پر گزاری جاتی ہے (یعنی MSR-VTT-2016).', 'uz': "Биз видео кўчириш таркибида кўрсатамиз, у мосламаларини давомли контактик сохта (LSTM-CSS) билан бажаришга уринади. Asosiy syntactik tuzuvlarini yaratish uchun (m'tibor, predefinit va obʼekt), bu holat maydonni semantik representations (balki motivatlar, obʼektlar) yordamida foydalanamiz. Biz murakkab qilamiz, taʼrifning murakkablarini oshirish uchun, obʼekt maydonidagi lokal xususiyatlarni murakkablik syntactik elementlarini yaratish mumkin (m. g. attribute, adverbial). Inson qabul qiluvchilarini kamaytirish orqali imkoniyat qilamiz, biz obʼekt maydonlariga foydalanish uchun Regional Proposal Tarmoqni foydalanamiz. @ info: whatsthis Biz asl so'zlarni yaratish uchun LSTM-CSS ta'sirini ko'rsatdik: 42.3% va 28.5% bilan BLEU@4 va METEOR. Name", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một phương pháp đánh giá video có thể mã hóa tính năng bằng cách tăng dần cấu trúc cú pháp (LSTM-CSS). Để xây dựng cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cấu trúc cú pháp cơ bản (v.d. vật thể, Đặt, và đối tượng), chúng tôi sử dụng trường báo động ngẫu nhiên để nhãn hiệu các biểu tượng ngữ (v.d., chuyển động, vật thể). Chúng tôi cho rằng để cải thiện sự bao quát của mô tả, các tính năng địa phương trong vùng đối tượng có thể được dùng để tạo các yếu tố cấu tạo cộng (v.d., thuộc tính, từ dự). Lấy cảm hứng từ dự phòng thụ thể nhân loại, chúng tôi sử dụng "Mạng Thần Mẹ" để tập trung vào các vùng đối tượng. Để mô hình tính khí thời gian cuối cùng, sẽ được chọn liên kết thần kinh với Nhúng đường dẫn. Chúng tôi đã chứng minh hiệu quả của LSD-CSS về việc phát ra các câu tự nhiên: 2.3=* và 25=.* về dạng BLEU@4 và MEERor. Hiệu suất cao so với các phương pháp hiện đại được báo cáo trên một bộ dữ liệu mô tả video lớn (tức là: MSR-VT-Ngực).', 'bg': 'Представяме подход за видео надписване, който кодира функции чрез постепенно завършване на синтактична структура (ЛСТМ-ССС). За да изградим основна синтактична структура (т.е. обект, предикат и обект), използваме условно случайно поле за етикетиране на семантични представяния (т.е. движения, обекти). Ние твърдим, че за да се подобри изчерпателността на описанието, локалните характеристики в обектните региони могат да бъдат използвани за генериране на допълнителни синтактични елементи (напр. атрибут, adverbial). Вдъхновени от излишността на човешките рецептори, ние използваме мрежа за регионални предложения, за да се фокусираме върху обектните региони. За моделиране на окончателната времева динамика се приема повтаряща се неврална мрежа с вграждания на пътища. Демонстрираме ефективността на ЛСТМ-ССУ при генерирането на естествени изречения: 42.3% и 28.5% по отношение на BLEU@4 и Метеор. Високо представяне в сравнение с най-съвременните методи се отчита на голям набор от данни за видео описание (т.е. МСР-ВТТ-2016).', 'nl': 'We presenteren een video ondertiteling benadering die functies codeert door geleidelijk syntactische structuur (LSTM-CSS) aan te vullen. Om basissyntactische structuur te construeren (dat wil zeggen subject, predicaat en object), gebruiken we een voorwaardelijk willekeurig veld om semantische representaties (dat wil zeggen bewegingen, objecten) te labelen. We stellen dat om de volledigheid van de beschrijving te verbeteren, de lokale kenmerken binnen objectgebieden kunnen worden gebruikt om complementaire syntactische elementen te genereren (bijv. attribuut, adverbial). Geïnspireerd door redundantie van menselijke receptoren, maken we gebruik van een Regio Proposal Network om ons te richten op de objectgebieden. Om de uiteindelijke temporele dynamiek te modelleren, wordt Recurrent Neural Network met Pad Embeddings gebruikt. We demonstreren de effectiviteit van LSTM-CSS bij het genereren van natuurlijke zinnen: 42,3% en 28,5% in termen van BLEU@4 en METEOR. Superieure prestaties in vergelijking met state-of-the-art methoden worden gerapporteerd op een grote videobeschrijving dataset (d.w.z., MSR-VTT-2016).', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer en video billedtekst tilgang, der koder funktioner ved gradvist at fuldføre syntaktisk struktur (LSTM-CSS). For at konstruere grundlæggende syntaktisk struktur (dvs. emne, prædikat og objekt), bruger vi et betinget tilfældigt felt til at mærke semantiske repræsentationer (dvs. bevægelser, objekter). Vi hævder, at for at forbedre beskrivelsens omfattende karakter kan de lokale træk i objektområder bruges til at generere supplerende syntaktiske elementer (f.eks. attribut, adverbial). Inspireret af redundans af menneskelige receptorer, bruger vi et Region Proposal Network til at fokusere på objektområderne. Til at modellere den endelige tidsdynamik vedtages tilbagevendende neuralt netværk med stiindlejringer. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten af LSTM-CSS på at generere naturlige sætninger: 42,3% og 28,5% i form af BLEU@4 og METEOR. Overlegen ydeevne sammenlignet med state-of-the-art metoder rapporteres på et stort datasæt af videobeskrivelser (dvs. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo pristup snimke koji kodira karakteristike progresivno završavajući sintaktičku strukturu (LSTM-CSS). Za izgradnju osnovne sintaktičke strukture (tj. teme, predikat i objekt), koristimo uslovno slučajno polje za označavanje semantičkih predstava (tj. kretanja, objekata). Predlažemo da bi se u cilju poboljšavanja sveobuhvatnosti opisa lokalne karakteristike u regijama objekata mogle koristiti za stvaranje komplementarnih sintaktičnih elementa (npr. atributa, reklamna). Inspired by redundancy of human receptors, we use a region Proposal Network to focus on the object regions. Za model konačne temporalne dinamike, usvojena je ponovna neuronska mreža s uključenjem puteva. Pokazujemo učinkovitost LSTM-CSS-a u stvaranju prirodnih rečenica: 42,3% i 28,5% u smislu BLEU@4 I METEOR. Najviši učinkoviti u usporedbi s metodama umjetnosti prijavljeni su na velikom sastavu podataka o video opisu (tj. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren einen Video-Untertitelungsansatz, der Funktionen durch schrittweise Vervollständigung der syntaktischen Struktur (LSTM-CSS) kodiert. Um eine grundlegende syntaktische Struktur (d.h. Subjekt, Prädikat und Objekt) zu konstruieren, verwenden wir ein Bedingtes Zufallsfeld, um semantische Repräsentationen (d.h. Bewegungen, Objekte) zu kennzeichnen. Wir argumentieren, dass zur Verbesserung der Vollständigkeit der Beschreibung die lokalen Merkmale innerhalb von Objektregionen verwendet werden können, um ergänzende syntaktische Elemente (z.B. Attribut, Adverbial) zu generieren. Inspiriert von der Redundanz menschlicher Rezeptoren nutzen wir ein Region Proposal Network, um uns auf die Objektregionen zu konzentrieren. Zur Modellierung der endgültigen zeitlichen Dynamik wird das wiederkehrende neuronale Netzwerk mit Path Embeddings übernommen. Wir demonstrieren die Effektivität von LSTM-CSS bei der Generierung natürlicher Sätze: 42,3% und 28,5% in Bezug auf BLEU@4 und METEOR. Eine überlegene Leistung im Vergleich zu modernen Methoden wird auf einem großen Video-Description-Datensatz (z.B. MSR-VTT-2016) berichtet.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan pendekatan video captioning yang mengkode fitur dengan secara progresif menyelesaikan struktur sintaksi (LSTM-CSS). Untuk membangun struktur sintaksi dasar (i.e., subjek, predikasi, dan objek), kami menggunakan Medan Kondisional Random untuk label representation semantis (i.e., gerakan, objek). Kami argumentasi bahwa untuk meningkatkan keseluruhan deskripsi, ciri-ciri lokal di dalam daerah objek dapat digunakan untuk menghasilkan elemen sintaksi komplementari (contohnya atribut, adverbial). Terinspirasi oleh redundansi reseptor manusia, kami menggunakan Rangkaian Proposisi Daerah untuk fokus pada daerah objek. To model the final temporal dynamics, Recurrent Neural Network with Path Embeddings is adopted.  Kami menunjukkan efektivitas LSTM-CSS pada menghasilkan kalimat alami: 42,3% dan 28,5% dalam terma BLEU@4 Dan METEOR. Performasi superior ketika dibandingkan dengan metode terbaik dilaporkan pada set data deskripsi video besar (i.e., MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ko': '우리는 문법구조(LSTM-CSS)를 점차적으로 완성하여 특징을 인코딩하는 영상 자막 방법을 제시했다.기본적인 문법 구조(즉 주어, 술어와 목적어)를 구축하기 위해 우리는 조건의 임의적인 장소에서 의미 표시(즉 운동, 목적어)를 표시한다.우리는 묘사의 전면성을 높이기 위해 대상 구역 내의 국부적 특징을 이용하여 서로 보완하는 문법 요소(예를 들어 정어, 장어)를 생성할 수 있다고 생각한다.인류가 쓸데없는 계발을 받아 우리는 지역 제안 네트워크를 이용하여 목표 지역을 주목한다.최종 시간 동태를 모델링하기 위해 경로가 끼워진 귀속 신경 네트워크를 사용했다.우리는 LSTM-CSS가 자연 문장 생성에 있어서의 유효성을 보여 주었다. 언어 능력에 있어서는 각각 42.3%와 28.5%였다.BLEU@4별똥별도 있고.가장 선진적인 방법에 비해 대형 영상 묘사 데이터 집합(즉 MSR-VTT-2016)의 성능이 우수하다.', 'fa': 'ما یک روش عنوان ویدئو را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که ویدئو با توجه به طور پیشرفت ساختار سنتاکتیک (LSTM-CSS) کود می\u200cکند. برای ساختن ساختار سنتاکتیک بنیادی (یعنی موضوع، پیشدیک و شیء) ما از یک میدان تصادفی شرایط استفاده می\u200cکنیم تا نمایش\u200cهای سنتاکتی (یعنی حرکت\u200cها، شیء\u200cها) برچسب کنیم. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که برای توضیح کامل توضیح، ویژه\u200cهای محلی در منطقه\u200cهای شیء می\u200cتوانند برای تولید عناصر سنتاکتی اضافه\u200cای (مثال، ویژه\u200cای، اضافه\u200cای) استفاده می\u200cشوند. توسط سرمایه\u200cگذاری پذیرفتگان انسان، شبکه پیشنهاد منطقه را برای تمرکز روی منطقه\u200cهای شیء استفاده می\u200cکنیم. برای مدل آخرین دینامیک موقتی، شبکه عصبی دوباره با انجمن مسیر پذیرفته می شود. ما فعالیت LSTM-CSS را بر تولید جمله طبیعی نشان می دهیم: 42.3 درصد و 28.5 درصد BLEU@4 و معاون عملکرد فوق العاده در مقایسه با روش\u200cهای هنر در مجموعه داده\u200cهای توصیف ویدئو بزرگ گزارش می\u200cشود (به عنوان MSR-VTT-2016).', 'tr': 'Bir video kelimesi şeklinde sintaktik yapısını tamamlayan şekilde kodlayan şekilde gösteririz. Esasy sintaktik struktur inşa etmek üçin (meselâ, subet, öňrikli we zady) semantik temisleri etiketlemek üçin bir Taýraty sahypa ullanys Biz tassyýanyň döwletlerini geliştirmek üçin, zadyň bölgelerindeki ýerleri supplementer sintaktik elementler döretmek üçin ullanylabilir (mysal. atribut, adverbial). Adamlar kabulleriniň azalmagy bilen nähili ukyplandyrylýar, biz bölgelerde fokus etmek üçin Region Mazmunlyk Network ullanýarys. Son zamaly dinamiky öräne nusgala Biz LSTM-CSS täsirli sözleri döretmäge täsirleýäni görkeýäris: 42.3% we 28.5% duýdury BLEU@4 we METEOR. Ýüksek Görniş Opşenler', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një qasje video titullimi që kodon karakteristikat duke kompletuar progressivisht strukturën sintaktike (LSTM-CSS). Për të ndërtuar strukturën bazë sintaktike (pra, subjekt, predikatë dhe objekt), ne përdorim një fushë të caktuar për të etiketuar përfaqësimet semantike (pra, lëvizje, objekte). Ne argumentojmë se me qëllim që të përmirësohet plotësia e përshkrimit, karakteristikat lokale brenda rajoneve të objektit mund të përdoren për të gjeneruar elemente sintaktike komplementare (për shembull atributi, kundërshtarë). Inspired by redundancy of human receptors, we utilize a Region Proposal Network to focus on the object regions.  Për të modeluar dinamikën përfundimtare të përkohshme, miratohet rrjeti i përsëritur neurol me përfshirjet e rrugës. Ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e LSTM-CSS në gjenerimin e dënimeve natyrore: 42.3% dhe 28.5% lidhur me BLEU@4 Dhe METEOR. Performanca më e lartë kur krahasohet me metodat më të larta janë raportuar në një set të madh të të dhënave për përshkrimin e videos (pra, MSR-VTT-2016).', 'af': "Ons stel 'n video-kapsie toegang wat kodeer funksies deur progresief voltooiing van sintaktieke struktuur (LSTM-CSS). Om basiese sintaktika struktuur te konstrukteer Ons argumenteer dat om die komplementasie van die beskrywing te verbeter, kan die plaaslike funksies binne voorwerp regione gebruik word om komplementare sintaktieke elemente te genereer (bv. attribute, adverbial). Ons gebruik 'n Regie Proposale Netwerk om op die voorwerp regione te fokus. To model the final temporal dynamics, Recurrent Neural Network with Path Embeddings is adopted. Ons wys die effektiviteit van LSTM-CSS op die genereer van natuurlike setinge: 42.3% en 28.5% ingevolge BLEU@4 en METEOR. Hoogte prestasie wanneer vergelyk word met state-of-the-art metodes op 'n groot video beskrywing datastel (bv. MSR-VTT-2016).", 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha mbinu ya kuchukua video inayojumuisha vipengele vya video kwa kuendelea kuutimiza muundo wa pamoja (LSTM-CSS). Kujenga muundo wa msingi wa ushirikiano (yaani mada, utabiri na vitu), tunatumia uwanja wa hali ya kawaida kwa ajili ya kuweka maoni ya kimapenzi (yaani, hatua, vitu). Tunajadili kuwa ili kuboresha ufahamu wa maelezo hayo, vipengele vya ndani ya maeneo ya vitu vinaweza kutumika kutengeneza vipengele vya uunganyiko wa kompyuta (kwa mfano, kifaa, biashara). Kuhamasishwa na kupunguza kwa wakubaguzi wa binadamu, tunatumia Mtandao wa Mkoa wa Taifa ili kuitilia makini kwenye maeneo hayo. Ili kuweka mfano wa nguvu za muda wa mwisho, Mtandao wa Karibu unaoendelea na Mipango ya Mitandao ya Jiji imechukuliwa. Tunaonyesha ufanisi wa LSTM-CSS kuhusu kutengeneza hukumu za asili: asilimia 42.3 na asilimia 28.5 kwa mujibu wa BLEU@4  and METEOR.  Utendaji mkubwa ukilinganishwa na mbinu za sanaa zinaripotiwa kwenye seti kubwa ya taarifa za video (yaani, MSR-VTT-2016).', 'am': 'የቪዲዮ አካባቢ የፊደሎችን አካባቢ (LSTM-CSS) በማድረግ እየተጨማሪን አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ መሠረት ሳንተቲክ (ምሳሌ ጉዳዩ፣ አስቀድሞ እና አካባቢ) ለመሥራት፣ የባሕላዊ እርሻ ለsemantic መልዕክቶች (ምሳሌ መንቀሳቅስ፣ አካባቢዎች) እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ የአካባቢው ክልሎች ውስጥ ያሉ የአካባቢው ግንኙነት አካባቢ አካላትን ለመፍጠር (ምሳሌ አካባቢ፣ አካባቢ) የሰው ተቀባዮች በኩል በማሳየፍ፣ የአካባቢ ክልሎች ላይ ለመጠቀም እናስጠጋለን፡፡ የመጨረሻው ሰዓት dynamics ለመምረጥ አቅራቢያ መረብ በመንገድ ውስጥ ካልተካክሉ ጋር ተቀምጦአል፡፡ የLSTM-CSS ፍጥረት የፍጥረት ፍርድ መፍጠርን እናሳያቸዋለን: 42.3 በመቶ እና 28.5 በመቶ BLEU@4 እኔት Superior performance when compared to state-of-the-art methods are reported on a large video description dataset (i.e., MSR-VTT-2016).', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք տեսահոլովակ վերնագրման մոտեցում, որը կոդավորում է հատկանիշները, առաջընթացիկ ավարտելով սինտակտիկ կառուցվածքը (LSMT-CSS). To construct basic syntactic structure (i.e., subject, predicate, and object), we use a Conditional Random Field to label semantic representations (i.e., motions, objects).  Մենք պնդում ենք, որ որպեսզի բարելավենք նկարագրության ամբողջությունը, օբյեկտի տարածքներում գտնվող տեղական հատկությունները կարող են օգտագործվել համալրացող սինտակտիկ տարրերի (օրինակ առանձնահատկություն, հակառակ) ստեղծելու համար: Հոգեշնչված մարդկային ընդունողների անհրաժեշտության շնորհիվ, մենք օգտագործում ենք հատվածի առաջարկների ցանց, որպեսզի կենտրոնանանք օբյեկտների հատվածների վրա: Որպեսզի մոդելավորենք վերջնական ժամանակային դինամիկան, ընդունվում է կրկնվող նյարդային ցանցը ճանապարհի ներգրավման միջոցով: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս LSMT-CSS-ի արդյունավետությունը բնական նախադասությունների ստեղծման վրա: 42.3 և 28.5 տոկոսը BLEU@4 և "Մետեոր"։ Վիդեոյի նկարագրման մեթոդների հետ համեմատած գերազանցությունը հայտարարվում է մեծ տեսագրության տվյալների համակարգում (այսինքն, MSR-VT-2016).', 'az': "Biz sintaktik quruluş (LSTM-CSS) ilə fəaliyyətləri kodlayan video başlıqlarının tərzini göstəririk. Basit sintaktik quruluş inşa etmək üçün (məsələn, predikt və objekt), semantik göstəriciləri etiketləmək üçün şəkildə Random Field istifadə edirik. Biz müzakirə edirik ki, təfsirlərin münasibətini yaxşılaşdırmaq üçün, objek bölgelerində yerli xüsusiyyətlər tamamlayıcı sintaktik elementləri yaratmaq üçün istifadə edilə bilər. İnsan receptorlarının çoxluğu ilə təşkil edilmişdir, objektlər bölgesinə odaqlanmaq üçün Bölgesi Proposal Network istifadə edirik. Son zamanlı dinamik modelini göstərmək üçün, yol içərisində yenidən nöral Ağı qəbul edilir. Biz LSTM-CSS'nin təbiətli cümlələri yaratmaq üçün təsir etdiyimizi göstəririk: 42.3% və 28.5%-i BLEU@4 Və Özü də yada sal ! Ən böyük video tanımlama verilənlərin quruluğu ilə müqayisədə üstün performansı (MSR-VTT-2016).", 'bn': 'আমরা একটি ভিডিও ক্যাপ্টেশনের ক্ষেত্রে উপস্থাপন করছি যা এনকোডের বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী সম্পূর্ণ করে (এলসিএমএস-সিসি)। মৌলিক সিন্ট্যাক্টিক কাঠামো তৈরি করার জন্য (যেমন বিষয়, প্রাপ্ত এবং বস্তু), আমরা একটি রূপান্তরিক ক্ষেত্র ব্যবহার করি সেমেন্টিক প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্ আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে বর্ণনার সুবিধা উন্নত করার জন্য, বস্তুর বিভিন্ন অঞ্চলের স্থানীয় বৈশিষ্ট্য তৈরি করতে পারে (যেমন বৈশিষ্ট্য, বিজ্ঞাপন) মানুষের রেসিপেটরের ক্ষেত্রে অনুপ্রাণিত হয়েছে, আমরা একটি অঞ্চলের প্রোপসাল নেটওয়ার্ক ব্যবহার করেছি এই বস্তুর প্রতি মনোযো পাথ এমবেডিং দ্বারা পুনরায় নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক গ্রহণ করা হয়েছে। আমরা প্রাকৃতিক শাস্তি তৈরি করার জন্য এলসিএমসিএস-এর কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করছি: ৪২. ৩% এবং ২৮. BLEU@4 - এবং মেটোর। বিশাল ভিডিও বর্ণনা ডাটাসেট (যেমন এমএসআর-ভিটিটি-২০১৬) এর তুলনায় সুপারিয়ার প্রদর্শন করা হয়।', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo pristup snimke koji kodira karakteristike progresivno završavajući sintaktičku strukturu (LSTM-CSS). Da bi izgradili osnovnu sintaktičku strukturu (tj. temu, predikaciju i objektu), koristimo uslovno slučajno polje za označavanje semantičkih predstavljanja (tj. kretanja, objekata). Predlažemo da bi se u cilju poboljšavanja sveobuhvatnosti opisa lokalne karakteristike unutar regiona objekata mogle koristiti za stvaranje komplementarnih sintaktičnih elementa (npr. atributa, adverbijalnih). Inspired by redundancy of human receptors, we use a region Proposal Network to focus on the object regions. Da bi modelio konačnu temporalnu dinamiku, usvojena je ponovna neuronska mreža sa uključenjem puteva. Mi pokazujemo učinkovitost LSTM-CSS na stvaranju prirodnih rečenica: 42,3% i 28,5% u smislu BLEU@4 I METEOR. Najviši učinkoviti u usporedbi s metodama umjetnosti prijavljeni su na velikom setu podataka o video opisu (tj. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ca': "Presentam un enfocament de captionització de vídeo que codifica les característiques completant progressivament l'estructura sinàctica (LSTM-CSS). Per a construir una estructura sinàctica bàsica (és a dir, tema, predicat i object e), utilitzem un Camp Condicional Random per etiquetar representacions semàntiques (és a dir, moviments, objectes). Afirmem que per millorar la comprensió de la descripció, les característiques locals dins les regions d'objectes poden ser utilitzades per generar elements sinàctics complementars (per exemple, atributs, adverbials). Inspirat per la redundancia de receptors humans, utilitzem una xarxa de proposacions de regió per centrar-nos en les regions objectes. Per modelar la dinàmica temporal final, s'adopta una xarxa neuronal recurrent amb incorporacions de camí. Demonstrem l'eficacia del LSTM-CSS en generar frases naturals: 42,3% i 28,5% en termes de BLEU@4 i METEOR. El rendiment superior comparat amb els mètodes més moderns es reporta en un gran conjunt de dades de descripció de vídeo (i.e., MSR-VTT-2016).", 'cs': 'Představujeme přístup k titulkům videa, který kóduje funkce postupným doplňováním syntaktické struktury (LSTM-CSS). Pro konstrukci základní syntaktické struktury (tj. subjekt, predikát a objekt) používáme podmíněné náhodné pole k označení sémantických reprezentací (tj. pohybů, objektů). Tvrdíme, že za účelem zlepšení komplexnosti popisu lze lokální rysy v oblastech objektů využít k generování doplňkových syntaktických prvků (např. atribut, adverbial). Inspirováni redundancí lidských receptorů využíváme síť Region Proposal Network, která se zaměřuje na objektové oblasti. Pro modelování konečné časové dynamiky je přijata opakovaná neuronová síť s vložením cesty. Demonstrujeme účinnost LSTM-CSS při generování přirozených vět: 42,3% a 28,5% z hlediska BLEU@4 a METEOR. Vynikající výkon ve srovnání s nejmodernějšími metodami jsou hlášeny na velké sadě dat popisu videa (tj. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'et': 'Esitleme video pealdiste käsitlust, mis kodeerib funktsioone järk-järgult täiendades süntaktilist struktuuri (LSTM-CSS). Põhilise süntaktilise struktuuri (st subjekti, predikaadi ja objekti) ehitamiseks kasutame semantiliste esituste (st liikumiste, objektide) märgistamiseks tingimuslikku juhusväli. Väidame, et kirjelduse terviklikkuse parandamiseks saab objektipiirkondade kohalikke omadusi kasutada täiendavate süntaktiliste elementide (nt atribuut, adverbial) genereerimiseks. Inimretseptorite redundantsusest inspireerituna kasutame objektipiirkondade ettepanekute võrgustikku. Lõpliku ajalise dünaamika modelleerimiseks võetakse kasutusele korduv neurovõrk teepõimimistega. Näitame LSTM-CSS efektiivsust loomulike lausete genereerimisel: 42,3% ja 28,5% mõistes BLEU@4 ja METEOR. Suures videokirjelduse andmekogumis (st MSR-VTT-2016) on esitatud tipptasemel meetoditega võrreldes kõrgem jõudlus.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme videotekstityksen, joka koodaa ominaisuuksia asteittain täydentämällä syntaktista rakennetta (LSTM-CSS). Syntaktisen perusrakenteen (subjektin, predikaatin ja objektin) rakentamiseen käytämme ehdollista satunnaiskenttää semanttisten esitysten (liikkeen, objektin) merkitsemiseen. Väitämme, että kuvauksen kattavuuden parantamiseksi kohdealueiden paikallisia piirteitä voidaan käyttää täydentävien syntaktisten elementtien tuottamiseen (esim. attribuutti, adverbiaali). Ihmisreseptorien redundanssin innoittamana käytämme Region Proposal Network -verkostoa keskittymään kohdealueisiin. Lopullisen aikadynamiikan mallintamiseksi otetaan käyttöön Toistuva hermoverkosto polkusulautuksilla. Osoitamme LSTM-CSS:n tehokkuuden luonnollisten lauseiden tuottamisessa: 42,3% ja 28,5% suhteessa BLEU@4 ja METEOR. Suuressa videokuvauksessa (MSR-VTT-2016) raportoidaan huippuluokan suorituskyky verrattuna uusimpiin menetelmiin.', 'jv': 'Name structural navigation Awak dhéwé nglanggar-Awak iki nggawe akeh akeh akeh akeh luwih-luwih dumadhi winih sing dikarepuné, iso dianggap oleh dumadhi winih jenis-jenis Manculine text-editor-action Awak dhéwé éntuk efek kanggo langgar barang-barêng nggambar barang-barêng: 34.3% lan 32.5% sing dirangé kapan BLEU@4 lan METOR. Laptop" and "Desktop', 'he': 'אנו מציגים גישה לכותבת וידאו שמקודמת תכונות על ידי השלים במדרגות מבנה סינטקטי (LSTM-CSS). כדי לבנות מבנה סינטאקטי בסיסי (כלומר, נושא, מתייחס, ואבייקט), אנו משתמשים בשדה אקראי תנאי כדי לקבוע מייצגים סמנטיים (כלומר תנועות, אובייקטים). אנו טוענים כי כדי לשפר את היכולת של התיאור, המאפיינים המקומיים בתוך אזורי האובייקטים יכולים להשתמש כדי ליצור אלמנטים סינטקטיים נוספים (לדוגמה, תכונה, פריבי). Inspired by redundancy of human receptors, we utilize a Region Proposal Network to focus on the object regions.  כדי לדוגמא את הדינמיקה הזמנית האחרונה, רשת נוירולית מחדשת עם קידום דרכים מאומצת. אנחנו מראים את היעילות של LSTM-CSS על יוצר משפטים טבעיים: 42.3% ו-28.5% במונחים של BLEU@4 ומטאור. ביצועים גבוהים בהשוואה לשיטות חדשות מודיעות על קבוצת נתונים גדולה לתיאור וידאו (כלומר, MSR-VTT-2016).', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo pristop video napisovanja, ki kodira funkcije s postopnim dopolnjevanjem sintaktične strukture (LSTM-CSS). Za izgradnjo osnovne sintaktične strukture (tj. subjekt, predikat in predmet) uporabljamo pogojno naključno polje za označevanje semantičnih predstavitev (tj. gibov, predmetov). Trdimo, da je za izboljšanje celovitosti opisa mogoče lokalne značilnosti znotraj objektnih regij uporabiti za ustvarjanje komplementarnih sintaktičnih elementov (npr. atribut, adverbial). Z navdihom nad redundanco človeških receptorjev uporabljamo Region Proposal Network, ki se osredotoča na objektne regije. Za modeliranje končne časovne dinamike je sprejeto ponavljajoče se živčno omrežje z vdelavami poti. Prikazujemo učinkovitost LSTM-CSS pri ustvarjanju naravnih stavkov: 42,3% in 28,5% v smislu BLEU@4 in METEOR. Vrhunska zmogljivost v primerjavi z najsodobnejšimi metodami se poroča na velikem naboru podatkov o videoopisu (tj. MSR-VTT-2016).', 'ha': 'Tuna halatar da wani hanyor faniki na video wanda ke kodi feature game da tafiya ku cika tsarin syntactic (LTRM-SAS). Za iya ƙi ƙiro tsarin asalin syntactic (misali, adana, kuma abun), za\'a yi amfani da wani Fifield na Kwamfyuta wanda aka ƙayyade zuwa matsayin semantic (misali, motsi, abubuwa). Munã jãyayya cẽwa, dõmin a improve bincike wa misalin, za\'a iya amfani da abũbuwan cikin wurãren abun da za\'a ƙiƙira ƙanshi masu ƙaranci (misali, halin, busara). Inspired by the Redidance of humanity receiptors, we use a region Networknet to fokus on ƙananan abubuwa. To model the final temporal dynamics, Recurrent Neural Network with Path Embeddings is adopted.  Tuna nuna aikin LTRM-SAS kan iya ƙara cewa: 42.3% da 28.5% da za\'a yi BLEU@4 "Kuma NA. @ action: button', 'bo': 'Name To construct basic syntactic structure (i.e. subject, predicate, and object), we use a Conditional Random Field to label semantic representations (i.e. motions, objects). འུ་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལྡོག་འདི་ཡོད་ཚད་དཀའ་རྒྱས་ཡོད་ཚད་ལ། འུ་ཅག་གི་ཆེད་འཛིན་པ་ཚོའི་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ལ་བསླབ་ན་ངེད་ཚོས་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་དྲ་བ་སྤྱད་ནས་དངོས་པོ་སྣང To model the final temporal dynamics, Recurrent Neural Network with Path Embeddings is adopted. འུ་ཅག་གིས་སྤྱིར་བཏོན་པའི་ཚིག་རྟགས་ལྟར་ཡན་ལག་སྟར་བཀྲམ་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།42.3% དང་། 28.5% BLEU@4 སྟོན་འདུག་མཁན་དང་ སྣང་བའི་ཞལ་འཛུགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་བཟོ་བ་སྣང་བའི་བརྙན་ཐོག་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བ་ཞིག་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Multi-task and Multi-lingual Joint Learning of Neural Lexical Utterance Classification based on Partially-shared Modeling', 'ar': 'التعلم المشترك متعدد المهام ومتعدد اللغات لتصنيف الكلام المعجمي العصبي بناءً على النمذجة المشتركة جزئيًا', 'fr': "Apprentissage conjoint multitâche et multilingue de la classification des énoncés lexicaux neuronaux sur la base d'une modélisation partiellement partagée", 'es': 'Aprendizaje conjunto multitarea y multilingüe de la clasificación de enunciados léxicos neuronales basada en modelos parcialmente compartidos', 'pt': 'Aprendizado Conjunto Multitarefa e Multilíngue da Classificação Neural de Enunciados Lexicais com Base em Modelagem Parcialmente Compartilhada', 'ja': '部分共有モデリングに基づくニューラル・レキシカル・ウタランス分類の多重課題と多言語共同学習', 'zh': '盖部分共建模者神经词汇语类多任务多言合学', 'hi': 'आंशिक रूप से साझा मॉडलिंग के आधार पर तंत्रिका लेक्सिकल उच्चारण वर्गीकरण के बहु-कार्य और बहुभाषी संयुक्त सीखना', 'ru': 'Многозадачное и многоязычное совместное обучение нейро-лексической классификации речи на основе частично разделяемого моделирования', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Chomhpháirteach Ilthasc agus Ilteangach ar Aicmiú Néar-Labhair Foclaíochta bunaithe ar Mhúnlú Páirt-roinnte', 'ka': 'მრავალური დავალება და მრავალური მრავალური ერთადერთი სწავლება ნეირალური ლექსიკალური გამოყენება კლასიფიკაციაზე, რომელიც ფართობით გაყოფილი მოდელირებაზე ბაზიან', 'hu': 'Többfeladatos és többnyelvű közös tanulás a neurális lexikális kimutatás osztályozásáról Részlegesen megosztott modellezés alapján', 'el': 'Πολυγλωσσική Κοινή Μάθηση Νευρικής Λεξικής Κατάταξης Εκφράσεων με βάση τη μερική κοινή Μοντελοποίηση', 'it': "Apprendimento congiunto multi-task e multilingue della classificazione dell'uteranza lessicale neurale basata sulla modellazione parzialmente condivisa", 'lt': 'Daugiaužduotis ir daugiakalbis jungtinis mokymasis neurologinės leksinės įrangos klasifikacijoje remiantis daliniu modeliavimu', 'kk': 'Көптеген тапсырма мен көптеген тілді нейралық лексикалық уттеранс классификациясын біріктіру', 'mk': 'Многу задачи и мултијазично заедничко учење на неуралната лексикална класификација базирано на делумно споделено моделирање', 'ml': 'പാര്\u200dട്ടില്\u200d പങ്കാളിയാക്കിയ മോഡില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയ നെയുറല്\u200d ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d എട്ട്രെറന്\u200dസ് ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200dസിഷന്\u200d', 'mn': 'Олон даалгавар болон олон хэлний нийлбэр мэдрэлийн сэтгэл хөдлөлийн хэрэглээний классификацийг хэсэг хэсэг хуваалцах загварын үндсэн', 'ms': 'Pembelajaran Berberbilang-tugas dan Berberbilang-bahasa Klasifikasi Utteransi Lexik Neural berdasarkan Modeling Berbahagian', 'mt': 'Multi-task and Multi-lingual Joint Learning of Neural Lexical Utterance Classification based on Partially-shared Modeling', 'no': 'Fleiroppgåve og fleirspråk samanlikning av nøyralleksisk brukarklassifikasjon basert på delvis delt modellering', 'pl': 'Wielozadaniowe i wielojęzyczne wspólne uczenie się neuronowej klasyfikacji wyrażeń w oparciu o modelowanie częściowo wspólne', 'ro': 'Învățarea comună multilingvă și multilingvă a clasificării exteranței neurale bazată pe modelarea parțial partajată', 'sr': 'Višestruki zadatak i višejezičko zajedničko učenje klasifikacije Neuralne leksičke upotrebe na temelju delovično dijeljenog modela', 'si': 'ගොඩක් වැඩ සහ ගොඩක් භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධ විදියට න්\u200dයූරාල ලෙක්සිකාල් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය ක්\u200dරියාසිකාරණය සඳහා අංක', 'so': 'Multi-task and Multi-lingual Joint Learning of Neural Lexical Utterance Classification based on Partially-shared Modeling', 'sv': 'Multifunktions- och flerspråkigt gemensamt lärande av Neural Lexical Utterance Klassificering baserad på delvis delad modellering', 'ta': 'பாகமாக பகிர்ந்து பகிர்ந்த மாதிரியை அடிப்படையிலான நெயுரல் லெக்சிக்சியல் முடிவு வகுப்பில் கற்றுக் கொண்ட பல- பணி மற்றும', 'ur': 'Multi-task and Multi-lingual Joint Learning of Neural Lexical Utterance Classification based on Partially-shared Modeling', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Truyền thuyết ngôn ngữ đa năng và đa ngôn ngữ đồng', 'bg': 'Многофункционално и многоезично съвместно изучаване на класификацията на невралната лексикална изява въз основа на частично споделено моделиране', 'da': 'Flersproget og flersproget fælles læring af Neural Lexical Utterance Klassificering baseret på delvis delt modellering', 'nl': 'Meertalig en meertalig Gezamenlijk Leren van Neural Lexical Utterance Classification gebaseerd op Gedeeltelijk Gedeelde Modeling', 'de': 'Mehraufgaben- und mehrsprachiges gemeinsames Lernen neurolexikaler Utteranzklassifikation basierend auf partiell-shared Modelling', 'id': 'Multi-task dan Multi-lingual Joint Learning of Neural Lexical Utterance Classification based on Partially-shared Modeling', 'ko': '부분 공유 모델을 바탕으로 하는 신경 어휘 언어 분류 다중 임무 다중 언어 연합 학습', 'hr': 'Višestruki zadatak i višejezičko zajedničko učenje klasifikacije Neuralnog leksičkog upotrebe na temelju djelomično dijeljenog modela', 'sw': 'Kazi nyingi na Ufunzi wa Kiungo cha Lugha nyingi wa Kufunza Kutokana na Utumiaji wa Kiasili wa Lexico kwa msingi wa Modeling', 'tr': 'Birnäçe zady we Birnäçe dilli Niral Lexical Utterans Çykyşlygyny Birleşen Öwrenme', 'af': 'Multi-task en Multi-lingual Joint Learning of Neural Lexical Utterance Classification based on Partially-shared Modeling', 'sq': 'Mësimi i përbashkët shumëdetyror dhe shumëgjuhësor i klasifikimit të përdorimit lexik neuronal bazuar në modelimin pjesërisht të përbashkët', 'am': 'Multi-task and Multi-language Learning of Neural Lexical Utterance Classification based on partially-shared Modeling', 'az': 'Daha çox iş və çox dilli birləşdirilmiş Nöral Leksikal Utterans Klasifikasiyasını Bölüm paylaşılmış Modelinə dayanan', 'hy': 'Բազմահատուկ և բազմալեզու համախմբված նյարդային լեքսիկական օգտագործման դասակարգման սովորելը, հիմնված մասամբ կիսվող մոդելների վրա', 'bn': 'পার্টিশেয়ার ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক নিউরাল লেক্সিক্যাল উট্রেন্স ক্লাসিং এর বহুভাষা কাজ এবং বহুভাষা যুক্তি', 'bs': 'Višestruki zadatak i višejezičko zajedničko učenje klasifikacije Neuralne leksičke upotrebe na temelju djelomično dijeljenog modela', 'cs': 'Víceúkolové a vícejazyčné společné učení neurální lexikální klasifikace vyjádření založené na částečně sdíleném modelování', 'ca': "L'aprenentatge conjunt multitasca i multilingüe de la classificació de l'utilitat neural lèxica basat en modelament parcialment compartit", 'fa': 'تعلیم تعلیم مجدد و تعلیم مجدد زبان تعلیم استفاده کننده\u200cهای عصبی بر اساس مدل\u200cهای تقسیم مشترک', 'fi': 'Osittain jaettuun mallinnukseen perustuvan neuroleksikoisen ilmaisun monitehtävä- ja monikielinen yhteinen oppiminen', 'et': 'Osaliselt jagatud modelleerimisel põhineva neuraalse leksiaalse väljendi klassifikatsiooni mitmekeelne ja mitmekeelne ühine õppimine', 'jv': 'Multi-task lan Multi-language Joint Learning of Neral Lextance Utterance', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Večopravilno in večjezično skupno učenje klasifikacije nevronske leksične izraze na podlagi delno deljenega modeliranja', 'he': 'למידה משותפת רבה-משימות ורבות-שפות של שימוש עצבי לקסי מבוסס על מודל משותף חלקי', 'bo': 'སྣ་མང་བོའི་ལས་འགན་དང་སྣ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་མཐུན་ཅན་གྱི་སྒེར་གྱི་སྤྱོད་སྟངས་ཉམས་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་རིགས'}
{'en': 'This paper is an initial study on multi-task and multi-lingual joint learning for lexical utterance classification. A major problem in constructing lexical utterance classification modules for spoken dialogue systems is that individual data resources are often limited or unbalanced among tasks and/or languages. Various studies have examined joint learning using neural-network based shared modeling ; however, previous joint learning studies focused on either cross-task or cross-lingual knowledge transfer. In order to simultaneously support both multi-task and multi-lingual joint learning, our idea is to explicitly divide state-of-the-art neural lexical utterance classification into language-specific components that can be shared between different tasks and task-specific components that can be shared between different languages. In addition, in order to effectively transfer knowledge between different task data sets and different language data sets, this paper proposes a partially-shared modeling method that possesses both shared components and components specific to individual data sets. We demonstrate the effectiveness of proposed method using Japanese and English data sets with three different lexical utterance classification tasks.', 'ar': 'هذه الورقة عبارة عن دراسة أولية حول التعلم المشترك متعدد المهام واللغات لتصنيف النطق المعجمي. تتمثل المشكلة الرئيسية في إنشاء وحدات تصنيف الكلام المعجمي لأنظمة الحوار المنطوق في أن موارد البيانات الفردية غالبًا ما تكون محدودة أو غير متوازنة بين المهام و / أو اللغات. درست دراسات مختلفة التعلم المشترك باستخدام النمذجة المشتركة القائمة على الشبكة العصبية ؛ ومع ذلك ، ركزت دراسات التعلم المشتركة السابقة على نقل المعرفة عبر المهام أو نقل المعرفة عبر اللغات. من أجل دعم كل من التعلم المشترك متعدد المهام ومتعدد اللغات في وقت واحد ، تتمثل فكرتنا في تقسيم تصنيف الكلام المفرد العصبي الحديث بشكل صريح إلى مكونات خاصة باللغة التي يمكن مشاركتها بين المهام المختلفة والمكونات الخاصة بالمهمة. التي يمكن مشاركتها بين لغات مختلفة. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، من أجل نقل المعرفة بشكل فعال بين مجموعات بيانات المهام المختلفة ومجموعات بيانات اللغة المختلفة ، تقترح هذه الورقة طريقة نمذجة مشتركة جزئيًا تمتلك مكونات ومكونات مشتركة خاصة بمجموعات البيانات الفردية. نوضح فعالية الطريقة المقترحة باستخدام مجموعات البيانات اليابانية والإنجليزية مع ثلاث مهام مختلفة لتصنيف الكلام المعجمي.', 'es': 'Este artículo es un estudio inicial sobre el aprendizaje conjunto multitarea y multilingüe para la clasificación de enunciados léxicos. Un problema importante en la construcción de módulos de clasificación de enunciados léxicos para sistemas de diálogo oral es que los recursos de datos individuales a menudo están limitados o desequilibrados entre tareas y/o idiomas. Varios estudios han examinado el aprendizaje conjunto utilizando modelos compartidos basados en redes neuronales; sin embargo, los estudios previos de aprendizaje conjunto se centraron en la transferencia de conocimientos entre tareas o entre idiomas. Con el fin de apoyar simultáneamente el aprendizaje conjunto multitarea y multilingüe, nuestra idea es dividir explícitamente la clasificación de enunciados léxicos neuronales de última generación en componentes específicos del lenguaje que se pueden compartir entre diferentes tareas y componentes específicos de tareas que se pueden compartir entre idiomas diferentes. Además, para transferir eficazmente el conocimiento entre diferentes conjuntos de datos de tareas y conjuntos de datos de diferentes idiomas, este documento propone un método de modelado parcialmente compartido que posee componentes compartidos y componentes específicos de conjuntos de datos individuales. Demostramos la eficacia del método propuesto utilizando conjuntos de datos en japonés e inglés con tres tareas diferentes de clasificación de enunciados léxicos.', 'fr': "Cet article est une première étude sur l'apprentissage mixte multitâche et multilingue pour la classification des énoncés lexicaux. Un problème majeur dans la construction de modules de classification des énoncés lexicaux pour les systèmes de dialogue oral est que les ressources de données individuelles sont souvent limitées ou déséquilibrées entre les tâches et/ou les langues. Diverses études ont examiné l'apprentissage conjoint à l'aide de la modélisation partagée basée sur les réseaux neuronaux\xa0; cependant, les études précédentes sur l'apprentissage conjoint étaient axées sur le transfert de connaissances entre les tâches ou entre les langues. Afin de prendre en charge simultanément l'apprentissage mixte multitâche et multilingue, notre idée est de diviser explicitement la classification des énoncés lexicaux neuronaux de pointe en composants spécifiques à la langue qui peuvent être partagés entre différentes tâches et en composants spécifiques à une tâche pouvant être partagés entre différentes langues. En outre, afin de transférer efficacement les connaissances entre différents ensembles de données de tâches et différents ensembles de données linguistiques, cet article propose une méthode de modélisation partiellement partagée qui possède à la fois des composants partagés et des composants spécifiques à des ensembles de données individuels. Nous démontrons l'efficacité de la méthode proposée en utilisant des ensembles de données japonais et anglais avec trois tâches de classification des énoncés lexicaux différents.", 'pt': 'Este artigo é um estudo inicial sobre aprendizagem conjunta multitarefa e multilíngue para classificação de enunciados lexicais. Um grande problema na construção de módulos de classificação de enunciados lexicais para sistemas de diálogo falado é que os recursos de dados individuais são frequentemente limitados ou desequilibrados entre tarefas e/ou idiomas. Vários estudos examinaram o aprendizado conjunto usando modelagem compartilhada baseada em rede neural; no entanto, estudos anteriores de aprendizagem conjunta se concentraram na transferência de conhecimento entre tarefas ou entre idiomas. A fim de apoiar simultaneamente o aprendizado conjunto multitarefa e multilíngue, nossa ideia é dividir explicitamente a classificação de expressão lexical neural de última geração em componentes específicos do idioma que podem ser compartilhados entre diferentes tarefas e componentes específicos da tarefa que podem ser compartilhados entre diferentes idiomas. Além disso, a fim de transferir efetivamente o conhecimento entre diferentes conjuntos de dados de tarefas e conjuntos de dados de diferentes linguagens, este artigo propõe um método de modelagem parcialmente compartilhado que possui componentes compartilhados e componentes específicos para conjuntos de dados individuais. Demonstramos a eficácia do método proposto usando conjuntos de dados em japonês e inglês com três tarefas diferentes de classificação de enunciados lexicais.', 'ja': 'この論文は、語彙的発話分類のための多タスクおよび多言語共同学習に関する初期の研究である。 口語対話システムのための語彙発話分類モジュールを構築する際の大きな問題は、個々のデータリソースがタスクおよび／または言語間で制限または不均衡であることが多いことである。 様々な研究は、ニューラルネットワークに基づく共有モデリングを使用して共同学習を検討してきた。しかし、以前の共同学習研究は、タスク間または言語間の知識伝達のいずれかに焦点を当てていた。 マルチタスクと多言語共同学習の両方を同時にサポートするために、私たちのアイデアは、最先端のニューラル辞書発話分類を、異なるタスク間で共有できる言語固有のコンポーネントと、異なる言語間で共有できるタスク固有のコンポーネントに明示的に分割することです。 また、異なるタスクデータセットと異なる言語データセットとの間で効果的に知識を伝達するために、共有コンポーネントと個々のデータセットに固有のコンポーネントの両方を所有する部分共有モデリング手法を提案した。 日本語と英語のデータセットと3つの異なる発話分類タスクを使用して、提案された方法の有効性を実証します。', 'zh': '本文者,多任务与多语言合学于词汇语之类也。 言语系统词汇言语分类模块一大要,单数资源,在任/言语之间,常为限数不平。 诸治已用神经网络者建模以省合学。 然前之合学侧重于跨言移也。 夫兼多任务与多言合学,吾意将先进神经词汇语类明分而共之特定组件与可以异言而共之特定组件。 又异务数集,异言数集之间,有效移知,立一共享之建模,既有共享组件,又有特定于数集之组件。 用日语、英语数集及三词汇语分类以效有效性。', 'hi': 'यह पेपर लेक्सिकल उच्चारण वर्गीकरण के लिए बहु-कार्य और बहुभाषी संयुक्त सीखने पर एक प्रारंभिक अध्ययन है। बोली जाने वाली संवाद प्रणालियों के लिए लेक्सिकल उच्चारण वर्गीकरण मॉड्यूल के निर्माण में एक बड़ी समस्या यह है कि व्यक्तिगत डेटा संसाधन अक्सर कार्यों और / या भाषाओं के बीच सीमित या असंतुलित होते हैं। विभिन्न अध्ययनों ने तंत्रिका-नेटवर्क आधारित साझा मॉडलिंग का उपयोग करके संयुक्त सीखने की जांच की है; हालांकि, पिछले संयुक्त सीखने के अध्ययन ने या तो क्रॉस-टास्क या क्रॉस-लिंगुअल ज्ञान हस्तांतरण पर ध्यान केंद्रित किया। बहु-कार्य और बहुभाषी संयुक्त शिक्षा दोनों का एक साथ समर्थन करने के लिए, हमारा विचार स्पष्ट रूप से अत्याधुनिक तंत्रिका लेक्सिकल उच्चारण वर्गीकरण को भाषा-विशिष्ट घटकों में विभाजित करना है जिन्हें विभिन्न कार्यों और कार्य-विशिष्ट घटकों के बीच साझा किया जा सकता है जिन्हें विभिन्न भाषाओं के बीच साझा किया जा सकता है। इसके अलावा, विभिन्न कार्य डेटा सेट और विभिन्न भाषा डेटा सेटों के बीच ज्ञान को प्रभावी ढंग से स्थानांतरित करने के लिए, यह पेपर आंशिक रूप से साझा मॉडलिंग विधि का प्रस्ताव करता है जिसमें व्यक्तिगत डेटा सेट के लिए विशिष्ट साझा घटक और घटक दोनों होते हैं। हम तीन अलग-अलग लेक्सिकल उच्चारण वर्गीकरण कार्यों के साथ जापानी और अंग्रेजी डेटा सेट का उपयोग करके प्रस्तावित विधि की प्रभावशीलता का प्रदर्शन करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Эта статья является первоначальным исследованием по многозадачному и многоязычному совместному обучению для классификации лексических высказываний. Основная проблема при построении модулей классификации лексических высказываний для систем разговорного диалога заключается в том, что индивидуальные ресурсы данных часто ограничены или несбалансированы между задачами и/или языками. Различные исследования изучали совместное обучение с использованием совместного моделирования на основе нейронной сети; однако предыдущие исследования совместного обучения были сосредоточены либо на межзадачной, либо на межязыковой передаче знаний. Чтобы одновременно поддерживать как многозадачное, так и многоязычное совместное обучение, наша идея состоит в том, чтобы явно разделить самую современную классификацию нейронных лексических высказываний на языковые компоненты, которые могут быть разделены между различными задачами и специфическими для задач компонентами, которые могут быть разделены между различными языками. Кроме того, для эффективной передачи знаний между разными наборами данных о задачах и разными наборами языковых данных в настоящем документе предлагается частично разделяемый метод моделирования, который обладает как общими компонентами, так и компонентами, характерными для отдельных наборов данных. Мы демонстрируем эффективность предложенного метода с использованием японских и английских наборов данных с тремя различными задачами классификации лексических высказываний.', 'ga': 'Is staidéar tosaigh é an páipéar seo ar chomhfhoghlaim ilthasc agus ilteangach le haghaidh aicmiú cainte. Fadhb mhór a bhaineann le modúil aicmithe foclóireachta a chruthú le haghaidh córais chomhphlé labhartha is ea go mbíonn acmhainní sonraí aonair teoranta nó neamhchothromaithe go minic i measc tascanna agus/nó teangacha. Scrúdaigh staidéir éagsúla comhfhoghlaim ag baint úsáide as samhaltú comhroinnte atá bunaithe ar néarghréasán; áfach, dhírigh comhstaidéir foghlama roimhe seo ar aistriú tras-tasc nó tras-teangach. Chun tacú go comhuaineach le comhfhoghlaim ilthasc agus ilteangach, is é an smaoineamh atá againn ná aicmiú cainte nua-aimseartha néarfhoclach a roinnt go sainráite i gcomhpháirteanna a bhaineann go sonrach le teanga ar féidir iad a roinnt idir tascanna éagsúla agus comhpháirteanna a bhaineann go sonrach le tasc. is féidir a roinnt idir teangacha éagsúla. Ina theannta sin, d’fhonn eolas a aistriú go héifeachtach idir thacair sonraí tascanna éagsúla agus tacair sonraí teanga éagsúla, molann an páipéar seo modh samhaltaithe páirt-roinnte ina bhfuil comhpháirteanna agus comhpháirteanna comhroinnte a bhaineann go sonrach le tacair sonraí aonair. Léirímid éifeachtacht an mhodha atá molta agus úsáid á baint as tacair sonraí Seapáinise agus Bhéarla le trí thasc éagsúla maidir le haicmiú foclóireachta.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз - көптеген тапсырмалар мен көптеген тілдерді сөйлеу үшін бастапқы зерттеу. Лексикалық сөйлеу үшін диалог жүйелерінің үлгі мәселелерін құру үшін әрбір деректер ресурстары тапсырмалар мен/немесе тілдер арасында шектелмеген немесе балансыз. Түрлі зерттеулер неврал желінің ортақтастырылған модельдерді қолдану арқылы біріктірілген оқытуды зерттеді; Бірақ алдыңғы біріктіру зерттеулері біріктірілген тапсырмалар немесе тілді білім аударуына көмектеседі. Бірақ бірнеше тапсырма мен бірнеше тілдерді біріктіру үшін бірнеше тілдерді бірнеше тапсырмалар мен тапсырмаларды бірнеше тілдер арасында ортақтастыруға мүмкін, біздің идеямыз күй- жай невралдық лексикалық сөйлеу үшін тілдерді ерекше компоненттерге бөлу үші Қосымша, басқа тапсырма деректер жиындарының мен басқа тіл деректер жиындарының білімдерін ең жақсы аудару үшін, бұл қағаз жеке деректер жиындарына бөлек ортақтастырылған компоненттер мен компоненттердің бөлек бөлек Біз жапон және ағылшын тілінің деректер баптауларының үш түрлі лексикалық сөйлеу баптауларының тапсырмаларын қолданатын әдістерін көрсетедік.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy első tanulmány a többfeladatos és többnyelvű közös tanulásról a lexikális besorolás besorolására. A beszélt párbeszédrendszerek lexikai beszédosztályozási moduljainak létrehozásában komoly probléma az, hogy az egyes adatforrások gyakran korlátozottak vagy kiegyensúlyozatlanok a feladatok és/vagy nyelvek között. Különböző tanulmányok vizsgálták a közös tanulást neurális hálózat alapú megosztott modellezéssel; A korábbi közös tanulmányok azonban a feladatok közötti vagy a nyelvek közötti tudásátadásra összpontosítottak. Annak érdekében, hogy egyidejűleg támogassuk a többfeladatos és többnyelvű közös tanulást, elképzelésünk az, hogy a legkorszerűbb neurális lexikális besorolást kifejezetten felosztjuk nyelvspecifikus komponensekre, amelyek megoszthatók különböző feladatok és feladatspecifikus komponensek között, amelyek megoszthatók a különböző nyelvek között. Emellett a különböző feladatadatkészletek és a különböző nyelvi adatkészletek közötti ismeretek hatékony átadása érdekében a tanulmány egy részben megosztott modellezési módszert javasol, amely mind az egyes adatkészletekre jellemző megosztott komponenseket, mind komponenseket tartalmaz. A javasolt módszer hatékonyságát japán és angol adatkészletekkel mutatjuk be három különböző lexikális besorolási feladattal.', 'it': "Questo articolo è uno studio iniziale sull'apprendimento congiunto multi-task e multilingue per la classificazione dell'espressione lessicale. Un problema importante nella costruzione di moduli di classificazione lessicale per i sistemi di dialogo parlato è che le risorse di dati individuali sono spesso limitate o sbilanciate tra compiti e/o lingue. Vari studi hanno esaminato l'apprendimento congiunto utilizzando modelli condivisi basati su reti neurali; Tuttavia, i precedenti studi congiunti di apprendimento si sono concentrati sul trasferimento di conoscenze tra compiti e lingue. Al fine di supportare contemporaneamente sia l'apprendimento congiunto multi-task che multilingue, la nostra idea è quella di dividere esplicitamente la classificazione dell'espressione lessicale neurale all'avanguardia in componenti specifici della lingua che possono essere condivisi tra compiti diversi e componenti specifici del compito che possono essere condivisi tra lingue diverse. Inoltre, al fine di trasferire efficacemente le conoscenze tra diversi set di dati di attività e diversi set di dati linguistici, questo articolo propone un metodo di modellazione parzialmente condiviso che possiede sia componenti condivisi che componenti specifici per singoli set di dati. Dimostriamo l'efficacia del metodo proposto utilizzando set di dati giapponesi e inglesi con tre diversi compiti di classificazione lessicale delle parole.", 'ka': 'ეს წიგნი არის მრავალური დავალების და მრავალური ენგუფიკაციის კლასიფიკაციისთვის დასაწყება. ლექსიკალური სიტყვების კლასიფიკაციის მოდულების კონფიგურაცია სისტემისთვის მნიშვნელოვანი პრობლემა იყო, რომ ინდიველური ინდიველური მონაცემების რესურსი ბევრად და განსხვავებული სწავლებები შემოწმება ერთადერთი სწავლების გამოყენებული ნეიროლური ქსელის დამატებული მოდელირება; მაგრამ, წინა ერთადერთი სწავლების სწავლების კონუქტირებულია თუ კრისი რაოდენობის, ან კრისი ენგური ცნობიერების გადატანისაზე. ერთადერთად მნიშვნელოვანი და მნიშვნელოვანი მნიშვნელოვანი მსგავსი სასწავლად, ჩვენი იდეა არის განსხვავებული ენების განსხვავებული კომპონენტების განსხვავება, რომელიც შეიძლება გაყოფილი განსხვავებული რაოდენტების და რაოდენტების განსხვავებული კომპო დამატებით, განსხვავებული სამუშაო მონაცემების კომპონენტების და განსხვავებული ენის მონაცემების კომპონენტების შორის ეფექტიურად გადატანისთვის, ეს დააწყება განსხვავებული მონაცემებ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ სამი განსხვავებული ლექსიკალური სიტყვების კლასიფიკაციის საქმედებით წაპონული და ინგლისური მონაცემების გამოყენება.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία είναι μια αρχική μελέτη για την πολλαπλή και πολυγλωσσική κοινή μάθηση για την ταξινόμηση λεξικού λόγου. Ένα σημαντικό πρόβλημα στην κατασκευή μονάδων ταξινόμησης λεξικών εκφρασμού για συστήματα προφορικού διαλόγου είναι ότι οι μεμονωμένοι πόροι δεδομένων είναι συχνά περιορισμένοι ή ανισόρροποι μεταξύ των καθηκόντων ή/και των γλωσσών. Διάφορες μελέτες έχουν εξετάσει την κοινή μάθηση χρησιμοποιώντας κοινή μοντελοποίηση βασισμένη σε νευρωνικά δίκτυα. Ωστόσο, οι προηγούμενες κοινές μαθησιακές μελέτες επικεντρώθηκαν είτε στη διασυνοριακή είτε στη διασυνοριακή μεταφορά γνώσεων. Προκειμένου να υποστηρίξουμε ταυτόχρονα τόσο την πολυγλωσσική όσο και την πολυγλωσσική κοινή μάθηση, η ιδέα μας είναι να διαιρέσουμε ρητά την υπερσύγχρονη ταξινόμηση νευρωνικής λεξικής εκφρασίας σε γλωσσικά συγκεκριμένα συστατικά που μπορούν να μοιραστούν μεταξύ διαφορετικών εργασιών και εξειδικευμένων στοιχείων που μπορούν να μοιραστούν μεταξύ διαφορετικών γλωσσών. Επιπλέον, προκειμένου να μεταφερθεί αποτελεσματικά η γνώση μεταξύ διαφορετικών συνόλων δεδομένων εργασιών και διαφορετικών συνόλων δεδομένων γλώσσας, η παρούσα εργασία προτείνει μια μερικώς κοινή μέθοδο μοντελοποίησης που διαθέτει τόσο κοινά συστατικά όσο και συστατικά ειδικά για μεμονωμένα σύνολα δεδομένων. Επιδεικνύουμε την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης μεθόδου χρησιμοποιώντας ιαπωνικά και αγγλικά σύνολα δεδομένων με τρεις διαφορετικές εργασίες ταξινόμησης λεξικών εκφρασμού.', 'mk': 'Овој документ е првична студија за мултизадачно и мултијазичко заедничко учење за класификација на лексички израз. Голем проблем во изградбата на модули за класификација на лексикалните изрази за системите на разговараниот дијалог е тоа што индивидуалните ресурси на податоци честопати се ограничени или небалансирани меѓу задачите и/или јазиците. Разни студии го испитаа заедничкото учење користејќи заедничко моделирање базирано на нервната мрежа; сепак, претходните заеднички студии на учење се фокусираа или на крстозадачен или крстојазичен трансфер на знаење. Со цел истовремено да го поддржуваме и мултијазичкото заедничко учење, нашата идеја е експлицитно да ја поделиме најновата класификација на неуралната лексикална израза на јазик-специфични компоненти кои можат да се споделат помеѓу различните задачи и задачи-специфични компоненти кои можат да се сподел Покрај тоа, со цел ефикасно да се пренесе знаење помеѓу различните датотеки на задачи и различни јазични датотеки, овој документ предлага делумно споделен метод на моделирање кој поседува и споделени компоненти и компоненти специфични за индивидуалните датот Демонстрираме ефикасност на предложениот метод користејќи јапонски и англиски податоци со три различни класификациски задачи за лексикална израза.', 'lt': 'This paper is an initial study on multi-task and multi-lingual joint learning for lexical utterance classification.  Pagrindinproblema kuriant kalbos dialogo sistemoms skirtus tekstinius žodžių klasifikavimo modulius yra ta, kad atskiri duomenų ištekliai dažnai yra riboti arba nesubalansuoti tarp užduočių ir (arba) kalbų. Įvairūse tyrimuose buvo nagrinėjamas bendras mokymasis naudojant pasidalijamąjį modeliavimą, pagrįstą nervų tinklu; tačiau ankstesniuose bendruose mokymosi tyrimuose daugiausia dėmesio buvo skiriama kryžminiam ar tarpkalbiniam žinių perdavimui. Siekiant tuo pačiu metu remti daugiakalbį ir daugiakalbį bendrą mokymąsi, mūsų idėja yra aiškiai suskirstyti naujausią neurologinio lexinio išraiško klasifikaciją į kalbos specifinius komponentus, kurie gali būti dalijami skirtingomis užduotimis ir užduotims specifiniais komponentais, kurie gali būti dalijami skirtingomis kalbomis. Be to, siekiant veiksmingai perduoti žinias tarp skirtingų užduočių duomenų rinkinių ir skirtingų kalbų duomenų rinkinių, šiame dokumente siūlomas dalinis modeliavimo metodas, kuriame yra ir bendri komponentai, ir atskiriems duomenų rinkiniams būdingi komponentai. Mes parodome siūlomo metodo veiksmingumą naudojant japonų ir anglų duomenų rinkinius su trimis skirtingomis leksinių žodžių klasifikavimo užduotimis.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini adalah kajian awal tentang pembelajaran berkaitan berbilang-tugas dan berbilang-bahasa untuk klasifikasi perkataan leksikal. Masalah utama dalam membina modul klasifikasi ungkapan leksikal untuk sistem dialog bercakap adalah bahawa sumber data individu sering terbatas atau tidak seimbang diantara tugas dan/atau bahasa. Pelbagai kajian telah memeriksa pembelajaran kongsi menggunakan model kongsi berasaskan rangkaian saraf; bagaimanapun, kajian belajar kongsi terdahulu fokus pada sama ada tugas salib atau pemindahan pengetahuan salib bahasa. Untuk secara bersamaan menyokong pembelajaran kongsi berbilang-tugas dan berbilang-bahasa, idea kita adalah untuk membahagikan secara eksplicit kelasukan ungkapan leksikal saraf-state-of-the-art ke komponen-bahasa-spesifik yang boleh dikongsi antara tugas berbeza dan komponen-tugas-spesifik yang boleh dikongsi antara bahasa-bahasa yang berbeza. Selain itu, untuk memindahkan pengetahuan secara efektif antara set data tugas yang berbeza dan set data bahasa yang berbeza, kertas ini melaporkan kaedah pemodelan berkongsi-bahagian yang mengandungi komponen berkongsi dan komponen yang spesifik untuk set data individu. Kami menunjukkan kegunaan kaedah yang diusulkan menggunakan set data Jepun dan Inggeris dengan tiga tugas klasifikasi perkataan leksikal yang berbeza.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ ആദ്യമാണ് പല-ജോലിയിലും പല-ഭാഷകളിലുമുള്ള യൂട്ടിലും പഠിക്കുന്നത്. ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ക്ലാ സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന ലെക്സിക്കല്\u200d വാക്കുകള്\u200d ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്കല്\u200d ഘടകങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഒരു പ് ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റര്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി പങ്കുവെച്ച് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പല പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d പരിശോധിച എന്നാലും മുമ്പുള്ള യൂട്ട് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പഠനങ്ങള്\u200d ക്രിസ്റ്റ് ജോലിയിലോ ക്രിസ്ലിങ്ങ് വിവരങ്ങള ഒരേ സമയത്ത് പല-ജോലിയും പല-ഭാഷകളുമായി പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനും പിന്തുണയ്ക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ ആശയം വ്യക്തമായി വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകള്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d പങ്കിടാവുന്ന വ്യത്യസ്ത ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും ജോലിക്കുറി കൂടാതെ, വ്യത്യസ്ത കാര്യങ്ങളുടെ ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷ ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും തമ്മിലുള്ള അറിവ് സ്വാധാരണമായി മാറ്റാന്\u200d ഈ പത ജപ്പാനീസും ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഡേറ്റാ സജ്ജീകരണങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയുടെ പ്രവർത്തികമാണ', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас бол олон ажлын, олон хэл хэлний хэлэлцээний хэлэлцээний судалгааны эхний судалгаа юм. Сүүлийн диалог системийн хэлэлцээний хэлний хэлэлцээний хэлэлцээний модульуудыг бүтээх гол асуудал нь хэн нэгэн мэдээллийн нөөц бүтээгдэхүүнд ажил болон/эсвэл хэл хоорондоо баланслагүй эсвэл балансл Ихэнх судалгаанууд мэдрэлийн сүлжээний хуваалцагдсан моделийг ашиглан хамтдаа суралцах судалгаа судалсан. Гэхдээ өмнөх нийлбэр суралцах судалгаа нь олон ажил эсвэл олон хэл мэдлэг шилжүүлэхэд төвлөрсөн. Бидний санаа нь олон ажил болон олон хэл суралцах үйл ажиллагааг дэмжихийн тулд өөр хэл хоорондоо хуваалцах боломжтой олон ажил болон үйл ажиллагааны тодорхой компонентуудын хоорондоо хуваалцах юм. Түүнчлэн, өөр ажлын өгөгдлийн санг болон өөр хэл өгөгдлийн сангийн хоорондын мэдлэгийг эффективно шилжүүлэхийн тулд энэ цаасан нь хэсэгт хуваалцагдсан моделийн аргыг санал болгодог. Бид Япон болон Англи хэлний өгөгдлийн сангуудыг ашиглан санал өгсөн аргын үр дүнг харуулж байна.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument huwa studju inizjali dwar tagħlim konġunt b’ħafna kompiti u b’ħafna lingwi għall-klassifikazzjoni tal-espressjoni lexika. Problema ewlenija fil-kostruzzjoni ta’ moduli ta’ klassifikazzjoni ta’ dikjarazzjoni lexikali għal sistemi ta’ djalogu mitkellma hija li r-riżorsi individwali tad-dejta spiss ikunu limitati jew mhux bilanċjati fost il-kompiti u/jew il-lingwi. Diversi studji eżaminaw tagħlim konġunt bl-użu ta’ mudellar konġunt ibbażat fuq netwerk newrali; madankollu, studji konġunti ta’ tagħlim preċedenti ffukaw jew fuq trasferiment ta’ għarfien bejn kompiti jew lingwi. Sabiex fl-istess ħin jappoġġjaw kemm it-tagħlim konġunt multikompiti kif ukoll multilingwi, l-idea tagħna hija li taqsam espliċitament il-klassifikazzjoni tal-espressjoni newrali lexika l-aktar avvanzata f’komponenti speċifiċi għall-lingwa li jistgħu jinqasmu bejn kompiti differenti u komponenti speċifiċi għall-kompiti li jistgħu jinqasmu bejn lingwi differenti. Barra minn hekk, sabiex l-għarfien jiġi trasferit b’mod effettiv bejn settijiet differenti ta’ dejta ta’ kompiti u settijiet differenti ta’ dejta lingwistika, dan id-dokument jipproponi metodu ta’ mmudellar parzjalment kondiviż li għandu kemm komponenti kondiviżi kif ukoll komponenti speċifiċi għal settijiet ta’ dejta individwali. We demonstrate the effectiveness of proposed method using Japanese and English data sets with three different lexical utterance classification tasks.', 'pl': 'Niniejszy artykuł jest wstępnym badaniem nad wielozadaniowym i wielojęzycznym wspólnym uczeniem się dla klasyfikacji wypowiedzi leksykalnej. Głównym problemem w konstruowaniu modułów klasyfikacji wypowiedzi leksykalnej dla systemów dialogu mówionego jest to, że poszczególne zasoby danych są często ograniczone lub niezrównoważone między zadaniami i/lub językami. Różne badania badały wspólne uczenie się przy użyciu modelowania wspólnego opartego na sieciach neuronowych; Jednakże wcześniejsze wspólne badania nauczania koncentrowały się na transferze wiedzy między zadaniami lub między językami. Aby jednocześnie wspierać wspólne uczenie się wielozadaniowe i wielojęzyczne, naszą ideą jest wyraźne podzielenie najnowocześniejszej klasyfikacji neuronowej leksykalicznej wypowiedzi na komponenty specyficzne dla języka, które mogą być dzielone między różnymi zadaniami i komponenty specyficzne dla zadań, które mogą być dzielone między różnymi językami. Ponadto, w celu skutecznego transferu wiedzy między różnymi zbiorami danych zadań i różnymi zbiorami danych językowych, w artykule zaproponowano metodę modelowania częściowo współdzielonego, która posiada zarówno wspólne komponenty, jak i komponenty specyficzne dla poszczególnych zbiorów danych. Wykazujemy skuteczność proponowanej metody z wykorzystaniem japońskich i angielskich zbiorów danych z trzema różnymi zadaniami klasyfikacji wypowiedzi leksykalnej.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare este un studiu inițial privind învățarea comună multilingvă și multilingvă pentru clasificarea cuvântului lexical. O problemă majoră în construirea modulelor de clasificare a expresiei lexicale pentru sistemele de dialog vorbit este că resursele individuale de date sunt adesea limitate sau dezechilibrate între sarcini și/sau limbi. Diverse studii au examinat învățarea comună folosind modelarea comună bazată pe rețele neurale; Cu toate acestea, studiile anterioare comune de învățare s-au concentrat pe transferul de cunoștințe între sarcini sau între limbi. Pentru a susține simultan atât învățarea comună multilingvă, cât și învățarea multilingvă, ideea noastră este de a împărți în mod explicit clasificarea cuvântului lexical neural de ultimă generație în componente specifice limbii, care pot fi partajate între diferite sarcini și componente specifice sarcinilor, care pot fi partajate între diferite limbi. În plus, pentru a transfera eficient cunoștințe între seturi de date de sarcini diferite și seturi de date lingvistice diferite, lucrarea propune o metodă de modelare parțial partajată care posedă atât componente partajate, cât și componente specifice seturilor de date individuale. Demonstrăm eficacitatea metodei propuse folosind seturi de date japoneze și engleze cu trei sarcini diferite de clasificare a pronunțării lexicale.', 'no': 'Denne papiret er ein opphavsreduksjon om fleire oppgåver og fleire språk samanlæring for klassifikasjon av leksiske uttaler. Ein stor problem i konstruksjon av klassifikasjonsmodular for tale dialogsystemer er at individuelle dataressursar ofte er begrenset eller ikkje balansert blant oppgåver og/eller språk. Dei ulike studiane har undersøkt samanlikningar med delte modellering på neuralnettverk. Førre samanlikningsstudar er imidlertid fokuserte på anten krysslingsoppgåve eller krysslingskunnskap overføring. For å støtte samtidig både fleire oppgåver og fleire språk samanlæring, er ideen vårt å eksplisisere status-of-the-art neural lexical utterance klassifikasjon til språk-spesifikke komponentar som kan deles mellom ulike oppgåver og oppgåve-spesifikke komponentar som kan deles mellom ulike språk. I tillegg kan denne papiret foreslå ein delvis delt modelleringsmetode som har både delte komponentar og komponentar spesifisert for individuelle datasett for å overføra kunnskap mellom ulike oppgåvedata og ulike språkedata. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten av foreslått metode med datasett i japansk og engelsk med tre forskjellige klassifikasjonsprogrammer.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats är en inledande studie om flerspråkigt och flerspråkigt gemensamt lärande för lexikal uttorklassificering. Ett stort problem med att konstruera lexikala ordklasseringsmoduler för talade dialogsystem är att enskilda dataresurser ofta är begränsade eller obalanserade mellan uppgifter och/eller språk. Olika studier har undersökt gemensamt lärande med hjälp av neuralnätverksbaserad delad modellering; Tidigare gemensamma inlärningsstudier fokuserade dock på antingen tvärvetenskaplig eller språklig kunskapsöverföring. För att samtidigt stödja både flerspråkigt och flerspråkigt gemensamt lärande, är vår idé att uttryckligen dela upp state-of-the-art neural lexical yttrance klassificering i språkspecifika komponenter som kan delas mellan olika uppgifter och uppgiftsspecifika komponenter som kan delas mellan olika språk. För att effektivt kunna överföra kunskap mellan olika uppgiftsdatauppsättningar och olika språkdatauppsättningar föreslår denna uppsats dessutom en delvis delad modelleringsmetod som har både delade komponenter och komponenter specifika för enskilda datauppsättningar. Vi visar hur effektiv den föreslagna metoden är med hjälp av japanska och engelska datauppsättningar med tre olika lexikala ordningsklassificeringsuppgifter.', 'so': 'Kanu waa waxbarashada bilowga ah oo ku saabsan waxbarashada iskuulka luuqadaha kala duduwan iyo barashada iskuulka luuqadaha luuqadaha kala duduwan. Dhibaato muhiim ah oo ku saabsan dhisidda qaababka fasaxa hadalka lexicka ee nidaamka kala hadlaya waa in hantida macluumaadka gaarka ah inta badan ay ku xadgudbaan ama aan ku balancin yihiin shaqada iyo/ama luuqadaha. Waxbarashooyin kala duduwan waxay ku baarayeen waxbarasho wadajir ah oo ku isticmaalaya sameynta shabakadda neurada ee lagu qeybeeyey; Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxbarashada hore ee iskuulka wadajirka ah waxay ku xiran yihiin wareejinta aqoonta luuqadaha. Si loo caawiyo waxbarashada iskuulaadka kala duduwan iyo waxbarashada iskuulka luuqadaha kala duduwan, fikradaynu waa inuu si cad u kala qeybiyaa fasaxa hadalka nexelka ah oo kala duduwan luuqadaha oo kala duduwan iyo qeybaha shaqada kala duduwan oo kala duduwan u dhexeeya luuqadaha kala duduwan. Intaas waxaa dheer in warqaddan loo beddelo aqoonta si faa’iido leh oo u dhexeeya kooxda macluumaadka shaqada oo kala duduwan iyo sawirada luuqadaha kala duduwan, qoraalkaas wuxuu ka soo jeedaa qaab tusaale ah oo qayb ahaan loo qeybeeyo oo leedahay qayb-qayb ah iyo qeybo gaar ah oo u qoran sawirada gaarka ah. Waxaynu muujinnaa faa’iidada qaababka la soo jeedo oo lagu isticmaalayo macluumaadka Japoniya iyo Ingiriiska oo ah saddex shaqooyin oo kala duduwan fasaxa hadalka leksis ah.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir je početna studija o multi-task i multi-jezičkom zajedničkom učenju za klasifikaciju leksičkog rečenja. Veliki problem u konstrukciji klasifikacijskih modula za rečene dijalogske sisteme je da su pojedinačne resurse podataka često ograničene ili nepravedno među zadacima i/ili jezicima. Razni ispitivanja ispitivali su zajedničko učenje koristeći zajedničku modeliranje na neuralnoj mreži; međutim, prethodne zajedničke studije učenja fokusirane su na prijenos prekršnog zadatka ili prekršnog jezika znanja. Da bismo istovremeno podržali multi-task i multi-jezičko zajedničko učenje, naša ideja je da se pojasno podelimo klasifikaciju države umjetne neuralleksičke reči u jezičke komponente koje mogu podijeliti između različitih zadataka i određenih komponenta zadataka koje mogu podijeliti između različitih jezika. Osim toga, kako bi učinkovito prebacili znanje između različitih seta podataka zadatka i različitih seta podataka jezika, ovaj papir predlaže metodu podjele modela koja poseduje i zajedničke komponente i komponente specifične za pojedinačne sete podataka. Pokazujemo učinkovitost predložene metode koristeći japanske i engleske podatke sa tri različite klasifikacije leksičkih reči.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තර තමයි විශේෂ කාර්යය සහ විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සම්බන්ධ විශේෂණය සඳහා පටන් ගත්ත අධ්\u200dයානය. කතා කරපු සංවාද පද්ධතිය සඳහා ලෙක්සිකල් කියන්න විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්ණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තමයි විව විවිධ අධ්\u200dයානය සම්බන්ධ ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් නමුත්, කලින් සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ ඉගෙනගන්න අධ්\u200dයානය කරලා තියෙන්නේ ක්\u200dරිස් සමාන්\u200dයයෙන් විශේෂ කාර්යය සහ විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සමාන්\u200dයයෙන් ඉගෙනගන්න, අපේ අදහසය තමයි විශේෂ භාෂාවක් සමාන්\u200dයයෙන් භාෂාවක් විශේෂ කාර්යයෙන් භාෂ ඒ වගේම, වෙනස් වැනස් වැනස් වැඩසටහන් දත්ත සැට් සහ වෙනස් භාෂා දත්ත සැට් අතර දැනගන්න, මේ පැත්තේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් ක අපි ජාපානි සහ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි දත්ත සෙට් විවිධිය ලෙක්සිකල් කියන විශේෂ විශේෂණ වැඩක් තුනක් තියෙන්', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் பல- பணிகள் மற்றும் பல- மொழிகள் இணைப்பு கற்றுக் கொள்ள முதல் படிப்பாகும் லெக்சிகல் வார்த்தை வகைப்பிற்காக. பேசும் உரையாடல் முறைமைகளுக்கான லெக்சிக்சியல் பேச்சு வகைப்படுத்தல் கூற்றை உருவாக்கும் பிரச்சினையான பிரச்சினை பல்வேறு ஆய்வுகள் புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் பங்கீட்டு மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்தி இணைய கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சேர்ந் ஆனால், முந்தைய இணைய கற்றுக்கொண்டுள்ள ஆய்வுகள் குறிக்கும் செயல் அல்லது மொழிமொழியின் அறிவு மாற்றுதல்  அதே நேரத்தில் பல மொழிகளும் பல மொழிகளும் ஒன்றாக கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பொருட்களுக்கும் ஆதரவு செய்ய நம் யோசனை வெளிப்படையாக பிரிக்க வேண்டும் என்றால் வெளிப்படையாக புதிய மொழியின் மொழியின மேலும், வேறு வேலை தகவல் அமைப்புகள் மற்றும் வேறு மொழி தரவுகள் அமைப்புகளுக்கும் இடையேயுள்ள அறிவை வெளிப்படையாக மாற்ற வேண்டுமானால், இந்த த தாள் பகுதி  ஜாப்பானிய மற்றும் ஆங்கிலத்தின் தரவு அமைப்புகளை பயன்படுத்தி முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முறையில் மூன்று வேறு வித்தியாசமா', 'ur': 'یہ کاغذ بہت سے کام اور بہت سی زبان کی تعلیم کے بارے میں ایک آغاز تحقیق ہے۔ زبان کی کلیسی کلیسی کلیسی موڈیول بنانے کے لئے ایک بڑا مشکل ہے کہ ایک شخص ڈیٹا رسورسوں کبھی کاموں اور/یا زبانوں کے درمیان محدود یا نابرال ہو جاتے ہیں. مختلف تحقیقات نے نئورل نیٹورک میں مشترک موڈلینگ کے مطابق مشترک تعلیم کی آزمائش کی ہے۔ لیکن پہلے مشترک سیکھنے کی مطالعہ یا کرسٹ ٹیسی ٹیسی ٹریسی پر تمرکز کی گئی تھی۔ اس لئے کہ ایک دوسرے طریقے سے بہت سے کام اور بہت سے زبان کے ملنے کی تعلیم کی مدد کریں، ہماری نظر یہ ہے کہ ہماری نظر صریح طریقے سے مختلف دنیا اور دنیا کے مختلف ملکیتوں کے درمیان تقسیم کریں جو مختلف زبانوں کے درمیان تقسیم کئے جائیں۔ اس کے علاوہ، مختلف ٹاکس ڈیٹ سٹ اور مختلف زبان ڈیٹ سٹ کے درمیان علم کو اثبات کے ساتھ انتقال کرنے کے لئے، یہ کاغذ ایک حصہ سے مشترک موڈلینگ طریقہ پیش کرتا ہے جسے ایک دائمی ڈیٹ سٹ کے لئے مشترک شریک رقم ہم نے جاپانی اور انگلیسی ڈیٹ سٹ کے مطابق پیشنهاد کی طریقہ کے مثبت کو دکھایا ہے کہ تین مختلف لکسیکل کلیکسیکل کلیسی ٹاکس کے ساتھ۔', 'uz': "Bu sahifa bir necha vazifa va ko'plab tillar bir necha tillar bir xil tilni o'rganish uchun birinchi o'rganish. Name Har xil taʼminlovlar neyrol tarmoq asosida bogʻliq modeli yordamida bir nechta o'rganishni o'rganishni o'rgandi; lekin oldingi birinchi o'rganishni o'rganish o'qituvchilari, har bir qanchalik vazifani yoki ikkinchi tillarda o'rganishni o'zgartirish mumkin. Bir xil vazifalar va bir necha tillar bir necha tillar o'rganishni qoʻllash uchun bizning fikrimimizni boshqa tillar orasidagi neyron leksikal so'zning darajasini o'zgartirish mumkin va har xil vazifalar va vazifa xossa komponentlariga qayta boʻlishi mumkin. Qoʻshimcha, har xil vazifa maʼlumotlar tarkibini va har xil tillar maʼlumotlari tarkibida ajratish uchun, bu hujjat bir qismi boʻlishilgan komponent va komponentlarni bir xil maʼlumot moslamalariga ega boʻlgan qismi modellash usulini koʻrsatiladi. Biz yaponiya va ingliz tili ma'lumotlarni yordamida qo'llangan usulning effektligini ko'rsatamiz va uch xil so'zlarni bir xil darajalashtirish vazifalarini ko'rsatdik.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này là nghiên cứu đầu tiên về việc học chung đa nhiệm vụ và đa ngôn ngữ cho phân loại phát ngôn ngữ. Một vấn đề lớn trong việc chế tạo mô- đun phân bổ ngôn ngữ cho hệ thống đối thoại ngôn ngữ là các nguồn dữ liệu cá nhân thường bị hạn chế hoặc không cân bằng giữa các công việc và/hay ngôn ngữ. Các nghiên cứu khác nhau đã kiểm tra việc học chung dựa trên mạng thần kinh. Tuy nhiên, các nghiên cứu chung trước chỉ tập trung vào việc giao nhiệm vụ hay truyền ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Để hỗ trợ đồng thời cho việc học chung đa nhiệm và đa ngôn ngữ, ý tưởng của chúng ta là hiển nhiên chia ra các thành phần ngôn ngữ đặc biệt có thể chia sẻ các nhiệm vụ khác nhau và các thành phần đặc nhiệm có thể chia sẻ các ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Thêm vào đó, để có hiệu quả truyền sự hiểu biết giữa các nhóm dữ liệu nhiệm vụ khác nhau và các nhóm dữ liệu ngôn ngữ khác nhau, tờ giấy này đề xuất một phương pháp tạo mẫu được chia sẻ có cả các thành phần và thành phần đặc trưng cho mỗi bộ dữ liệu cá nhân. Chúng tôi chứng minh hiệu quả của phương pháp được đề nghị sử dụng các bộ dữ liệu Nhật và Anh với ba công việc phân loại bằng từ khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представлява първоначално проучване на многозадачите и многоезичното съвместно обучение за класификация на лексикалните изказвания. Основен проблем при изграждането на модули за класификация на лексикалните изказвания за системите за говорен диалог е, че отделните ресурси от данни често са ограничени или небалансирани между задачите и/или езиците. Различни проучвания са изследвали съвместното учене чрез използване на споделено моделиране, базирано на невронна мрежа; Въпреки това, предишни съвместни проучвания за учене са фокусирани върху междузадачи или междуезичен трансфер на знания. За да подкрепим едновременно многофункционалното и многоезичното съвместно обучение, нашата идея е изрично да разделим най-съвременната класификация на невронните лексикални изказвания на специфични за езика компоненти, които могат да бъдат споделени между различни задачи и специфични за задачата компоненти, които могат да бъдат споделени между различните езици. В допълнение, с цел ефективно прехвърляне на знания между различни набори от данни от задачи и различни езикови набори от данни, тази статия предлага частично споделен метод за моделиране, който притежава както споделени компоненти, така и компоненти, специфични за отделните набори от данни. Демонстрираме ефективността на предложения метод с помощта на японски и английски набор от данни с три различни задачи за класификация на лексикалните изказвания.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir je početno ispitivanje o multi-task i multi-jezičkom zajedničkom učenju za klasifikaciju leksičkog govora. Veliki problem u konstrukciji klasifikacijskih modula za govorene dijalogske sustave je da su pojedinačne resurse podataka često ograničene ili nepravedno između zadataka i/ili jezika. Raznim ispitivanjima ispitivali su zajedničko učenje koristeći dijeljeno modeliranje neuromreže; međutim, prethodne zajedničke studije učenja usredotočile su se na prijenos prekršnog zadatka ili prekršnog jezičkog znanja. Da bismo istovremeno podržali multi-task i multi-jezičko zajedničko učenje, naša ideja je da se pojasno podelimo klasifikaciju države umjetne neuralleksičke govore u dijelove jezičkih komponenta koje mogu dijeliti između različitih zadataka i određenih komponenta zadataka koje mogu dijeliti između različitih jezika. Osim toga, kako bi učinkovito prebacili znanje između različitih seta podataka zadatka i različitih seta podataka jezika, ovaj papir predlaže djelomično dijeljenu modeliranju metodu koja posjeduje zajedničke komponente i komponente posebne za pojedinačne sete podataka. Mi pokazujemo učinkovitost predloženog metoda koristeći japanske i engleske podatke sa tri različite klasifikacijske zadatke za leksičku izjavu.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit ist eine erste Studie zum Mehraufgaben- und Mehrsprachenlernen zur lexikalischen Äußerungsklassifikation. Ein großes Problem bei der Konstruktion lexikalischer Äußerungsklassifikationsmodule für gesprochene Dialogsysteme besteht darin, dass einzelne Datenressourcen zwischen Aufgaben und/oder Sprachen oft begrenzt oder unausgewogen sind. Verschiedene Studien untersuchten gemeinsames Lernen unter Verwendung neuraler netzwerkbasierter Shared Modeling; Bisherige gemeinsame Lernstudien konzentrierten sich jedoch entweder auf aufgabenübergreifenden oder sprachübergreifenden Wissenstransfer. Um gleichzeitig das Mehraufgaben- und Mehrsprachenlernen zu unterstützen, ist es unsere Idee, moderne neurale lexikalische Äußerungsklassifikation explizit in sprachspezifische Komponenten zu unterteilen, die zwischen verschiedenen Aufgaben geteilt werden können, und aufgabenspezifische Komponenten, die zwischen verschiedenen Sprachen geteilt werden können. Um Wissen zwischen verschiedenen Aufgabendatensätzen und verschiedenen Sprachdatensätzen effektiv zu transferieren, wird in diesem Beitrag eine teilgeteilte Modellierungsmethode vorgeschlagen, die sowohl gemeinsame Komponenten als auch spezifische Komponenten für einzelne Datensätze enthält. Wir demonstrieren die Wirksamkeit der vorgeschlagenen Methode anhand japanischer und englischer Datensätze mit drei verschiedenen lexikalischen Äußerungsklassifikationsaufgaben.', 'da': 'Denne artikel er en indledende undersøgelse af flere opgaver og flersproget fælles læring til leksikal ytringsklassifikation. Et stort problem ved opbygningen af lexikale taleklassifikationsmoduler til taledialogsystemer er, at individuelle dataressourcer ofte er begrænsede eller ubalancerede mellem opgaver og/eller sprog. Forskellige undersøgelser har undersøgt fælles læring ved hjælp af neural-netværk baseret delt modellering; Tidligere fælles læringsundersøgelser fokuserede imidlertid på enten tværs af opgaver eller tværsproget vidensoverførsel. For samtidig at understøtte både flere opgaver og flersproget fælles læring, er vores idé eksplicit at opdele state-of-the-art neural leksikal ytance klassificering i sprogspecifikke komponenter, der kan deles mellem forskellige opgaver og opgavespecifikke komponenter, der kan deles mellem forskellige sprog. For effektivt at overføre viden mellem forskellige opgavedatasæt og forskellige sprogdatasæt foreslår denne artikel desuden en delvist delt modelleringsmetode, der besidder både delte komponenter og komponenter, der er specifikke for de enkelte datasæt. Vi demonstrerer effektiviteten af den foreslåede metode ved hjælp af japanske og engelske datasæt med tre forskellige leksikalske ytringsklassifikationsopgaver.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel is een eerste studie over meertalig en meertalig gezamenlijk leren voor lexicale uitsprekingsclassificatie. Een groot probleem bij het bouwen van lexicale uitsprekingsclassificatiemodules voor gesproken dialoogsystemen is dat individuele gegevensbronnen vaak beperkt of onevenwichtig zijn tussen taken en/of talen. Verschillende studies hebben gezamenlijk leren onderzocht met behulp van op neurale netwerken gebaseerde gedeelde modellering; Eerdere gezamenlijke leerstudies richtten zich echter op taakverdeling of taaloverschrijdende kennisoverdracht. Om tegelijkertijd zowel meertalig als meertalig gezamenlijk leren te ondersteunen, is ons idee om state-of-the-art neurale lexicale uitsprekingsclassificatie expliciet te verdelen in taalspecifieke componenten die kunnen worden gedeeld tussen verschillende taken en taakspecifieke componenten die kunnen worden gedeeld tussen verschillende talen. Om kennis effectief over te dragen tussen verschillende taakgegevens en verschillende taalgegevenssets, stelt dit document een gedeeltelijk gedeelde modelleringsmethode voor die zowel gedeelde componenten als componenten bevat die specifiek zijn voor individuele datasets. We demonstreren de effectiviteit van de voorgestelde methode met behulp van Japanse en Engelse datasets met drie verschillende lexicale uitspraakclassificatietaken.', 'id': 'Kertas ini adalah sebuah studi awal tentang belajar bersama multi-tugas dan multibahasa untuk klasifikasi utterance lexik. Masalah utama dalam membangun modul klasifikasi utterance lexik untuk sistem dialog berbicara adalah bahwa sumber daya data individu sering terbatas atau tidak seimbang antara tugas dan/atau bahasa. Beberapa studi telah memeriksa belajar bersama menggunakan model berbasis jaringan saraf; bagaimanapun, studi belajar kongsi sebelumnya fokus pada baik tugas salib atau transfer pengetahuan salib bahasa. Untuk secara bersamaan mendukung pembelajaran berbagai tugas dan berbagai bahasa, ide kita adalah secara eksplicit membagi klasifikasi kalimat lexik saraf terbaik ke komponen spesifik bahasa yang dapat dibagi antara tugas berbeda dan komponen spesifik tugas yang dapat dibagi antara bahasa berbeda. Selain itu, untuk secara efektif memindahkan pengetahuan antara set data tugas yang berbeda dan set data bahasa yang berbeda, kertas ini mengusulkan metode modeling berbagi-bagian yang memiliki komponen berbagi dan komponen spesifik untuk set data individu. Kami menunjukkan efektivitas dari metode yang diusulkan menggunakan set data Jepang dan Inggris dengan tiga tugas klasifikasi kata-kata leksikal yang berbeda.', 'sw': 'Makala hii ni utafiti wa mwanzo kuhusu kazi nyingi na kujifunza pamoja kwa lugha mbalimbali kwa ajili ya kutangaza lugha za lexico. Tatizo kubwa katika kujenga vifaa vya usambazaji wa mazungumzo ya lexico kwa mfumo wa mazungumzo yanayozungumzwa ni kuwa rasilimali binafsi mara nyingi zinazuiwa au hazina usawa kati ya kazi na/au lugha. Tafiti mbalimbali zimejaribu kujifunza pamoja kwa kutumia mifano ya ushirikiano wa mitandao ya kijamii; Hata hivyo, tafiti zilizopita za kujifunza pamoja zilikuwa zinalenga makini au uhamishaji wa maarifa ya lugha mbalimbali. Ili kwa wakati mmoja kuunga mkono kazi nyingi na kujifunza pamoja kwa lugha nyingi, wazo letu ni kuwagawanya kwa uwazi katika ufafanuzi wa lugha ya kisasa katika vifaa maalum vya lugha ambavyo vinaweza kusambazwa kati ya kazi tofauti na sehemu maalum za kazi ambazo zinaweza kusambazwa kati ya lugha tofauti. Kwa kuongeza, ili kuhamisha maarifa yenye ufanisi kati ya seti za taarifa tofauti za kazi na seti za data tofauti za lugha, gazeti hili linapendekeza mbinu inayoshirikiana na sehemu zote zinazoshirikiana na vifaa hususani kwa seti za data binafsi. Tunaonyesha ufanisi wa mbinu zilizopendekezwa kwa kutumia taarifa za Kijapani na Kiingereza zenye kazi tatu tofauti za kujieleza kwa lugha.', 'ko': '본고는 어휘와 언어 분류의 다중 임무 다중 언어 연합 학습에 대해 초보적인 연구를 진행하였다.구어 대화 시스템을 위해 어휘 언어 분류 모듈을 구축하는 주요한 문제는 임무와/또는 언어 간의 단일 데이터 자원이 유한하거나 불균형하다는 것이다.각종 연구는 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 공유 모델링을 사용하는 연합 학습을 검증했다.그러나 이전의 연합 학습 연구는 임무를 뛰어넘거나 언어 지식을 뛰어넘는 데 중심을 두었다.다중 임무와 다중 언어의 연합 학습을 동시에 지원하기 위해 우리의 생각은 가장 선진적인 신경 어휘 언어를 서로 다른 임무 사이에서 공유할 수 있는 언어의 특정 성분과 서로 다른 언어 사이에서 공유할 수 있는 임무의 특정 성분으로 명확하게 구분하는 것이다.그 밖에 서로 다른 임무 데이터 집합과 서로 다른 언어 데이터 집합 사이에서 지식을 효과적으로 전달하기 위해 본고는 일부 공유의 모델링 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 공유된 구성 요소와 특정한 데이터 집합의 구성 요소를 가진다.우리는 일본어와 영어 데이터 집합을 사용하여 세 가지 서로 다른 어휘와 언어 분류 임무를 통해 제시한 방법의 유효성을 검증했다.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک مطالعه اولیه در مورد تعلیم مشترک و تعلیم متعدد زبان برای کلاس زبان است. یک مشکل بزرگی در ساختن مدول\u200cهای کلمه\u200cهای زبانی برای سیستم\u200cهای گفتگو است که منابع داده\u200cهای فردی اغلب محدود یا نابرابری میان وظیفه\u200cها و/یا زبانها هستند. مطالعه\u200cهای مختلف با استفاده از مدل\u200cسازی مشترک به شبکه عصبی تحقیق کرده\u200cاند. با این حال، مطالعه\u200cهای مشترک یادگیری قبلی روی انتقال علم متفاوت یا متفاوت زبان تمرکز شده است. برای همزمان پشتیبانی از یادگیری متفاوت و متفاوت زبان، ایده ما این است که به طور واضح جدا کردن کلمه\u200cهای عصبی هنری به عنوان بخش\u200cهای مخصوص زبان\u200cها که می\u200cتوانند بین وظیفه\u200cهای متفاوت و بخش\u200cهای مشخص وظیفه\u200cای که می\u200cتوانند بین زبان\u200cهای متفاوت تقسیم شوند. در addition, for effectively transferring knowledge between different task data and different language data sets, this paper proposes a partially shared modeling method that has both components and components specific to individual data sets. ما فعالیت روش پیشنهاد را با استفاده از مجموعه داده های ژاپنی و انگلیسی با سه کار مختلف مختلف کلام زبانی نشان می دهیم.', 'af': "Hierdie papier is 'n aanvanklike studie op multi-taak en multi-taal joint leer vir leksiese uitsprekking klasifikasie. 'n Groot probleem in die konstruksie van leksiese uitspraak klasifikasie modules vir gespreek dialoog stelsels is dat individuele data hulpbronne dikwels beperk of onbalanse is onder opdragte en/of taal. Verskeie studie het joint learning ondersoek met gebruik van neuralnetwerk gebaseerde gedeelde modellering; maar voorige joint learning studies fokus op of kruistaak of kruistale kennis oordrag. Om eenmaal te ondersteun beide multi-taak en multi-tale joint leer, is ons idee om state-of-the-art neural lexical uitspraak klasifikasie in taal-spesifieke komponente te te deel wat tussen verskillende taak en taak-spesifieke komponente wat tussen verskillende tale gedeel kan word. In addition, in order to effectively transfer knowledge between different task data sets and different language data sets, this paper proposes a partially-shared modeling method that possesses both shared components and components specific to individual data sets. Ons wys die effektiviteit van voorgestelde metode met gebruik van japanse en Engelse data stelle met drie verskillende leksiese uitspraak klasifikasie taak.", 'tr': 'Bu kagyz köp-täblik we köp-dilli söz klasifikasy üçin öwrenmek barada başlangyç öwrenmesi. Gürleýän dijal sistemleri üçin leksiýal sözlerin klasifikasyýa modüllerini in şa etmekde esasy mesele şudyr ki, birnäçe maglumat çeşmeleri görenler we/ýa diller arasynda çykarylmaýar ýada täsirleýän. Birnäçe öwrenmeler neural netijesinde paylaşyk modellendirmek üçin birleşik öwrenmeleri bardylar. Ýöne öňki bilen birleşik öwrenmek öwrenmeleri ýa-da birnäçe işi, ýa-da birnäçe dil bilim transfersine üns berdi. Birnäçe-zady we köp dilli birleşik öwrenmegi üçin, biziň pikirimiz dürli diller arasynda paýlaşyp bilen aýratyn taýýarlanan eserler bilen aýratyn bölmek üçin. Munuň üçin, dürli gören maglumatlary we dürli dil maglumatlary arasynda bilimi täsirli terjime etmek üçin, bu kagyz birnäçe maglumat düzümleri üçin paýlaşan bölümleri we bölümleri üçin paýlaşan bir modelleme yöntemi teklip edýär. Biz japonça we iňlisçe maglumat düzümlerini üç beýleki sözleşme işi bilen teklip eden täsirini görkeýäris.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument është një studim fillestar mbi mësimin e përbashkët me shumë detyra dhe shumë gjuhë për klasifikimin e shprehjes lexike. Një problem i madh në ndërtimin e moduleve klasifikuese të shprehjes lexike për sistemet e dialogut të folur është se burimet individuale të të dhënave shpesh janë të kufizuara apo të paekuilibruara midis detyrave dhe/ose gjuhëve. Various studies have examined joint learning using neural-network based shared modeling;  megjithatë, studimet e mëparshme të përbashkëta të mësimit u përqëndruan në transferimin e njohurive ndër-detyrë apo ndër-gjuhës. Me qëllim që të mbështesim njëkohësisht si mësimin e përbashkët multi-detyrash dhe shumë-gjuhësh, ideja jonë është të ndajmë eksplicitisht klasifikimin e shprehjes lexike neurale në komponente specifike gjuhës që mund të ndahen midis detyrave të ndryshme dhe komponenteve specifike detyrash që mund të ndahen midis gjuhëve të ndryshme. Përveç kësaj, me qëllim që të transferohet në mënyrë efektive njohuria midis grupeve të dhënash të ndryshme të detyrave dhe grupeve të dhënash të ndryshme gjuhësh, ky dokument propozon një metodë modelimi pjesërisht të ndarë që posedon si komponente të ndara, ashtu edhe komponente specifike për grupet individuale të dhënash. Ne demonstrojmë efektshmërinë e metodës së propozuar duke përdorur grupe të dhënash japoneze dhe angleze me tre detyra të ndryshme klasifikimi lexik të shprehjes.', 'hy': 'Այս աշխատանքը սկզբնական ուսումնասիրություն է բազմախնդիրների և բազմալեզու ընդհանուր ուսումնասիրության համար լեքսիկական արտահայտության դասակարգման համար: Խոսվող երկխոսային համակարգերի լեքսիկական արտահայտության դասակարգման մոդուլների կառուցվածքի հիմնական խնդիրը այն է, որ անհատական տվյալների ռեսուրսները հաճախ սահմանափակված են կամ անհավասարակշռություն են հանձնարա Տարբեր ուսումնասիրություններ ուսումնասիրեցին միասին սովորելը՝ օգտագործելով նյարդային ցանցի հիմնված ընդհանուր մոդելներ: այնուամենայնիվ, նախորդ ընդհանուր ուսումնասիրությունները կենտրոնացրեցին գիտելիքների փոխանցման և փոխանցման վրա: Որպեսզի միաժամանակ աջակցենք բազմահանգստային և բազմալեզու ընդհանուր ուսումնասիրությունը, մեր գաղափարն այն է, որ բաժանենք նորագույն նյարդային լեքսիկական արտահայտությունների դասակարգը լեզվի մասնավոր բաղադրիչների, որոնք կարող են բաժանել տարբեր առաջադրանքների և առաջադրանքների մասնավոր Ավելին, որպեսզի արդյունավետ տեղափոխվեն գիտելիքները տարբեր խնդիրների տվյալների համակարգերի և տարբեր լեզվի տվյալների համակարգերի միջև, այս հոդվածը առաջարկում է մասամբ կիսված մոդելներ ձևավորելու մեթոդ, որը ունի անհատական տվյա Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս առաջարկված մեթոդի արդյունավետությունը՝ օգտագործելով ճապոնական և անգլերեն տվյալների համակարգեր, որոնք ունեն երեք տարբեր լեքսիկական արտահայտությունների դասակարգման խնդիրներ:', 'az': 'Bu kağıt çoxlu işlər və çoxlu dilli öyrənmək üçün ilk təhsil edir. Sözlü dialoq sistemlərinin dilləri üçün dil sözləri klasifikasiya modullarını in şa etmək üçün böyük problemi, indir verilən kaynaqlar çox zaman işlər və/və ya dillər arasında çəkilir. Müxtəlif təhsil nöral ağ sistemində paylaşılmış modellərlə birlikdə öyrənmək təhsil etdi; Ancaq əvvəlki birləşdirilmiş öyrənmə təhsilələri ya çoxlu iş, ya da çoxlu dil bilgi transferisinə odaqlanırlar. Həmçinin çoxlu işi və çoxlu dil birlikdə öyrənmək üçün, fikrimiz müxtəlif dillər arasında paylaşılabilir, müxtəlif işlər və task-specific komponentlərin arasında paylaşılabilir. Bu kağıt, fərqli işlər verilənlərin və fərqli dil verilənlərin arasındakı bilgiləri dəyişdirmək üçün, ayrılıq komponentlərin və komponentlərin bəzi verilənlərin dəyişdirilməsi üçün paylaşılmış modellik metodlarını təklif edir. Biz Japon və İngilizce məlumatları ilə təklif edilmiş metodların etkinliğini göstəririk, üç müxtəlif dil sözləri klasifikasiya görevləri ilə.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটি মাল্টিকাল ভাষা এবং বহুভাষী ভাষায় লেক্সিক্যাল ভাষার বিভাগের জন্য শিক্ষা প্রথম গবেষণা। কথোপকথনের ডায়ালগ সিস্টেমের জন্য লেক্সিক্সিয়াল বক্তৃতা বিভক্ত মডিউল নির্মাণ করার একটি বড় সমস্যা হচ্ছে যে কাজ এবং/অথবা ভাষার মধ্যে প্র Various studies have examined joint learning using neural-network based shared modeling;  তবে পূর্ববর্তী যৌথ শিক্ষা শিক্ষা ক্রস-কাজ অথবা ক্রস-ভাষায় জ্ঞান পরিবর্তনের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। একই সাথে বহুভাষা কাজ এবং বহুভাষী যোগাযোগ শিক্ষার সমর্থন করার জন্য আমাদের ধারণা হচ্ছে স্পষ্ট ভাবে ভাষায় বিভক্ত করা যায় যা ভিন্ন ভাষার মধ্যে ভাগাভাগি করা যায়। এছাড়াও, বিভিন্ন কাজের তথ্য সেট এবং বিভিন্ন ভাষা তথ্য সেটের মধ্যে জ্ঞান কার্যকর পরিবর্তন করার জন্য এই কাগজটি একটি অংশ ভাগাভাগি মেডেলিং পদ্ধতি প্রস্ত আমরা প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতির কার্যক্রম প্রদর্শন করি জাপানি এবং ইংরেজী তথ্য ব্যবহার করে তিনটি ভিন্ন লেক্সিক্যাল ভাষার বাক্য', 'ca': "Aquest paper és un estudi inicial sobre aprenentatge conjunt multitascat i multilingüístic per a classificar l'expressió lèxica. Un problema major en la construcció de móduls de classificació de l'expressió lèxica per als sistemes de diàleg parlat és que els recursos de dades individuals sovint són limitats o desequilibrats entre tasques i/o llengües. Divers estudis han examinat l'aprenentatge conjunt fent servir models compartits basats en xarxes neurals; però els estudis conjunts anteriors s'han centrat en la transfer ència de coneixements transversals o translingües. Per sostenir simultàniament l'aprenentatge conjunt multitascat i multilingüístic, la nostra idea és dividir explícitament la classificació d'expressions neurals lècsiques més modernes en components específics de llenguatge que poden compartir entre diverses tasques i components específics de tasques que poden compartir entre diferents llenguatges. A més, per transferir eficaçment el coneixement entre diferents conjunts de dades de tasca i diferents conjunts de dades lingüístices, aquest paper propon un mètode de modelació parcialment compartit que posseeix tant components compartits com components específics per conjunts de dades individuals. Demonstrem l'eficacia del mètode proposat utilitzant conjunts de dades japonès i anglès amb tres tasques de classificació d'expressions lexiques diferents.", 'cs': 'Tento článek je počáteční studií o víceúkolovém a vícejazyčném společném učení pro klasifikaci lexikálních výroků. Hlavním problémem při konstrukci modulů lexikální klasifikace výroků pro systémy mluveného dialogu je, že jednotlivé datové zdroje jsou často omezené nebo nevyvážené mezi úkoly a/nebo jazyky. Různé studie zkoumaly společné učení pomocí sdíleného modelování založeného na neuronových sítích; Předchozí studie společného vzdělávání se však zaměřily buď na přenos znalostí mezi úkoly, nebo na přenos znalostí mezi jazyky. Abychom současně podpořili víceúkolové i vícejazyčné společné učení, naší myšlenkou je explicitně rozdělit nejmodernější klasifikaci neuronové lexikální výslovnosti na jazykové komponenty, které lze sdílet mezi různými úkoly a komponenty specifické pro úkoly, které mohou být sdíleny mezi různými jazyky. V zájmu efektivního přenosu znalostí mezi různými datovými sadami úkolů a různými jazykovými datovými sadami navrhuje tento článek metodu částečně sdíleného modelování, která obsahuje jak sdílené komponenty, tak komponenty specifické pro jednotlivé datové sady. Demonstrujeme efektivitu navržené metody pomocí japonských a anglických datových sad se třemi různými úlohami klasifikace lexikálních výrazů.', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir je početno ispitivanje o multi-task i multi-jezičkom zajedničkom učenju za klasifikaciju leksičkog govora. Veliki problem u konstrukciji klasifikacijskih modula za rečene dijalogske sustave je da se pojedinačni resursi podataka često ograničavaju ili nisu ravnoteženi među zadacima i/ili jezicima. Raznim ispitivanjima ispitivali su zajedničko učenje koristeći zajedničku modelizaciju neuromreže; međutim, prethodna zajednička studija učenja usredotočena je na prenošenje preko zadataka ili preko jezika znanja. Da bismo istovremeno podržali multi-task i multi-jezičko zajedničko učenje, naša ideja je da se isključivo podelimo klasifikaciju države umjetne neuralleksičke govore u jezičke komponente koje mogu dijeliti između različitih zadataka i određenih komponenta zadataka koje mogu dijeliti između različitih jezika. Osim toga, kako bi učinkovito prebacili znanje između različitih seta podataka zadatka i različitih seta podataka jezika, ovaj papir predlaže djelomično dijeljenu modeliranju metodu koja posjeduje zajedničke komponente i komponente specifične za pojedinačne sete podataka. Pokazujemo učinkovitost predložene metode koristeći japanske i engleske podatke sa tri različite klasifikacije leksičkih govora.', 'et': 'Käesolev töö on esialgne uuring mitmeülesandelise ja mitmekeelse ühisõppe kohta leksikaalse kõnede klassifitseerimiseks. Peamine probleem kõneleva dialoogi süsteemide leksikaalse väljenduse klassifitseerimise moodulite ehitamisel on see, et üksikud andmeressursid on sageli piiratud või tasakaalustamata ülesannete ja/või keelte vahel. Mitmed uuringud on uurinud ühist õppimist, kasutades neurovõrgupõhist jagatud modelleerimist; varasemad ühised õppeuuringud keskendusid siiski kas ülesannetevahelisele või keeleülesele teadmiste edastamisele. Selleks et toetada üheaegselt nii mitme- kui ka mitmekeelset ühisõpet, on meie idee selgesõnaliselt jagada tipptasemel neuroleksikaalsete väljendite klassifikatsioon keelespetsiifilisteks komponentideks, mida saab jagada erinevate ülesannete vahel ja ülesandespetsiifilisteks komponentideks, mida saab jagada erinevate keelte vahel. Selleks et tõhusalt edastada teadmisi erinevate ülesannete andmekogumite ja erinevate keeleandmekogumite vahel, pakub käesolev töö välja osaliselt jagatud modelleerimismeetodi, mis sisaldab nii ühiseid komponente kui ka üksikutele andmekogumitele spetsiifilisi komponente. Näitame väljapakutud meetodi efektiivsust, kasutades jaapani ja inglise keele andmekogumeid kolme erineva leksikaalse kõnede klassifitseerimise ülesandega.', 'fi': 'Tämä tutkielma on alustava tutkimus monikielisestä ja monikielisestä yhteisoppimisesta sanaston luokittelussa. Suurin ongelma sanaston luokittelumoduulien rakentamisessa puhuttuun vuoropuheluun on se, että yksittäiset tietoresurssit ovat usein rajallisia tai epätasapainoisia tehtävien ja/tai kielten välillä. Useissa tutkimuksissa on tarkasteltu yhteistä oppimista neuroverkkopohjaisella jaetulla mallinnuksella. Aiemmissa yhteisissä oppimistutkimuksissa keskityttiin kuitenkin joko tehtävien tai kielten väliseen tiedonsiirtoon. Jotta voitaisiin samanaikaisesti tukea sekä monikielistä että monikielistä yhteistä oppimista, ideamme on jakaa selkeästi huipputekninen neuroleksikaalinen lauseiden luokittelu kielikohtaisiin komponentteihin, jotka voidaan jakaa eri tehtävien kesken ja tehtäväkohtaisiin komponentteihin, jotka voidaan jakaa eri kielten kesken. Lisäksi, jotta tietoa voitaisiin siirtää tehokkaasti eri tehtäväaineistojen ja eri kieliaineistojen välillä, tässä työssä ehdotetaan osittain jaettua mallinnusmenetelmää, jossa on sekä jaettuja komponentteja että yksittäisille aineistoille ominaisia komponentteja. Esittelemme ehdotetun menetelmän tehokkuuden japanin ja englannin aineistoilla kolmella eri sanastoluokituksen tehtävällä.', 'am': 'ይህ ገጽ በብዙ ስራ እና በብዙ ቋንቋዎች የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ተማሪ የመጀመሪያ ትምህርት ነው፡፡ A major problem in constructing lexical utterance classification modules for spoken dialogue systems is that individual data resources are often limited or unbalanced among tasks and/or languages.  የተለያዩ ትምህርት በኔural-network በመጠቀም የተካፈሉትን ምሳሌ በመጠቀም አብረው ትምህርት መርምረዋል፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ የቀድሞው የስራ ትምህርት ወይም የቋንቋ ቋንቋ እውቀት መቀናቀል ተማርቷል፡፡ በተጨማሪው ሥራ እና በብዙ ቋንቋዎች ተማሪ እና በብዛት ቋንቋዎች ተማሪ ለመደጋገም አእምሮታችን የልዩ ቋንቋዎች መካከል በተለየ ልዩ አድራጊዎች እና አድራሻ-ምርጥ ክፍሎች መካከል የሚካፈሉ የልዩ ቋንቋዎች መሆኑን ግልፅ ለመለየት ነው፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ ልዩ ልዩ የሥርዓት ዳታዎችን እና ልዩ ቋንቋ ዳታዎችን ማሰናከል እውቀትን ለመለወጥ ይችላል፡፡ የጃፓንኛ እና እንግሊዘኛ ዳታዎችን በመጠቀም የተዘጋጀውን ሥርዓት ሦስት ልዩ ልዩ ልዩ ንግግር መግለጫ ሥርዓት እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'sk': 'Prispevek je začetna študija večopravilnega in večjezičnega skupnega učenja za klasifikacijo leksikalnih izgovorov. Glavni problem pri gradnji klasifikacijskih modulov leksikalnega izgovora za sisteme govorjenega dialoga je, da so posamezni viri podatkov pogosto omejeni ali neuravnoteženi med nalogami in/ali jeziki. Različne študije so preučile skupno učenje z uporabo skupnega modeliranja na podlagi nevronskih omrežij; Vendar so se predhodne skupne študije učenja osredotočile na mednalogo ali medjezični prenos znanja. Da bi hkrati podprli večopravilno in večjezično skupno učenje, je naša ideja, da izrecno razdelimo najsodobnejšo klasifikacijo nevralnih leksikalnih izgovorov na jezikovne komponente, ki jih je mogoče deliti med različnimi nalogami, in komponente, ki jih je mogoče deliti med različnimi jeziki. Poleg tega, da bi učinkovito prenesli znanje med različnimi nabori podatkov opravil in jezikovnimi nabori podatkov, ta prispevek predlaga metodo delno deljenega modeliranja, ki vsebuje komponente v skupni rabi in komponente, specifične za posamezne nabore podatkov. Učinkovitost predlagane metode prikazujemo z uporabo japonskih in angleških podatkovnih nizov s tremi različnimi nalogami klasifikacije leksikalnih izgovorov.', 'ha': "Wannan karatun na farkon karanta a kan aikin mulki-aiki da ke karanta littafan mulki-lugha masu ƙaranci wa classified maganar leksisi. Wata masĩfa mai girma a ƙiƙiro modulin classified na magana na leksi wa'urar zauren akwatin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani na zauren akwatin bayani kawai, ana ƙayyade manyan data ko kuma ba su daidaita a tsakanin aikin da/ko harshen. Haƙĩƙa, ƙidãya masu karatun mutane sun yi ƙidãya da amfani da motel mai share a shirin neural-net; A lokacin da aka riga karɓi karatun na halartar da aka zura makini a kan wani aikin aiki na tsohon-aikin ko kuma a samurar muhimmin ilimi na cikin-harshen. In order to simultaneously support both multi-task and multi-lingual joint learning, our idea is to explicitly divide state-of-the-art neural lexical utterance classification into language-specific components that can be shared between different tasks and task-specific components that can be shared between different languages.  Da wannan takardar, dõmin ka motsa ilmi wajen inganci a tsakanin data na aikin aiki daban da tsari masu nau'i cikin harshen, wannan kafin yana ƙayyade wata shiryarwa mai raba-raba-share da shi ke mallakar duk compocompokhyuta da compoNoni masu ƙayyade zuwa tsarin data guda. Tuna nũna fikanci da za'a yi amfani da data na Japane da Ingiriya na haɗi taskõki uku daban-daban fassarar magana.", 'jv': 'Perintah iki dadi basa sing sampek mulai multi-task lan uga-lengkang sampek mulai kanggo kelalen langgar. Mungkin sak kudu nggawe modul kanggo nggawe luwih operasi kanggo sistem dialog sing digawe Laptop" and "Desktop politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé éntuk efekat kanggo nyenggunaké ngerasakno dadi Japang karo Gambaran karo telu alam sing wisasakno', 'he': 'העיתון הזה הוא מחקר ראשון על הלימודים המשותפים של משימות רבות ולימודים משותפים רבות לשונות עבור קליזציה של מילים לקסיים. A major problem in constructing lexical utterance classification modules for spoken dialogue systems is that individual data resources are often limited or unbalanced among tasks and/or languages.  מחקרים שונים בדקו את הלימודים המשותפים באמצעות מודל משותף מבוסס ברשת עצבית; למרות זאת, מחקרי לימוד משותפים קודמים התמקדו או על העברת ידע בין משימות או שפתיים. על מנת לתמוך באותו הזמן בין למידה משותפת רבת משימות ובין למידה משותפת רבת שפות, הרעיון שלנו הוא לחלק באופן ברור את מסגרת המילים הנוירואליות העצבית המאוחדת למרכיבים ספציפיים לשפה שאפשר לחלוק בין משימות שונות ומרכיבים ספציפיים למשימה שאפשר לחלוק בין שפות שונות. בנוסף, כדי להעביר הידע בין קבוצות מידע משימות שונות לבין קבוצות מידע שפה שונות, העבודה הזו מציעה שיטת מודל משותפת חלקית We demonstrate the effectiveness of proposed method using Japanese and English data sets with three different lexical utterance classification tasks.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བུ་འདི་ནི་སྣ་མང་བོའི་ལས་འགན་དང་སྐད་རིགས་སྣ་མང་བོའི་མཐུན་ཚོགས་སློབ་རྩོལ་བ་ཞིག་རེད། སྐད་ཡིག་གི་གཏམ་གླེང་གི་འཇུག་སྣོད་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཚད་ལ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཀྱི་དཀའ་ངལ་ཅིག་ཡིན་ན། དབུལ་མཐུད་དྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་སྤྱོད་པའི་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་གྱི་སྣ་ཚོགས་རེ་བརྟག་དཔྱད་བྱས་པ་ཡིན། ཡིན་ནའང་། སྔོན་གྱི་སློབ་གྲྭའི་ནང་དུ་གླེང་སྒྲུང་འདིའི་མཐུན་སྣུམ་ལས་བློ་གཏོང་ནི་ In order to simultaneously support multi-task and multi-lingual joint learning, our idea is to explicitly divide state-of-the-art neural lexical utterance into language-specific components that can be shared between tasks and task-specific components that can be shared between different languages. འོན་ཀྱང་། བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྒྲིག ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་ཇུཔ་དང་ཨིན་རིས་ཡིག་གི་ཚད་གཞི་སྒྲིག་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་ཡོད་པའི་ལྟ་བུ་གསུམ་'}
{'en': 'Source Critical Reinforcement Learning for Transferring Spoken Language Understanding to a New Language', 'ar': 'مصدر التعلم التعزيزي النقدي لنقل فهم اللغة المنطوقة إلى لغة جديدة', 'pt': 'Aprendizado de Reforço Crítico de Origem para Transferir Compreensão da Língua Falada para um Novo Idioma', 'es': 'Fuente: Aprendizaje de refuerzo crítico para transferir la comprensión del lenguaje oral a un nuevo idioma', 'fr': 'Apprentissage par renforcement critique pour transférer la compréhension de la langue parlée vers une nouvelle langue', 'ja': '口語理解を新しい言語に転移するためのソースの重要な強化学習', 'hi': 'एक नई भाषा के लिए बोली जाने वाली भाषा समझ को स्थानांतरित करने के लिए स्रोत महत्वपूर्ण सुदृढीकरण सीखना', 'zh': '转口语为新语源', 'ru': 'Исходное обучение критическому подкреплению для перевода понимания разговорного языка на новый язык', 'ga': 'Foinse Athneartú Criticiúil Foghlaim chun Tuiscint ar Theanga Labhartha a Aistriú go Teanga Nua', 'hu': 'Forrás Kritikus megerősítési tanulás a beszélt nyelv megértésének új nyelvre történő átadásához', 'ka': 'Source Critical Reinforcement Learning for Transferring Spoken Language Understanding to a New Language', 'el': 'Πηγή Κρίσιμη Μάθηση Ενίσχυσης για τη μεταφορά της κατανόησης της Μιλημένης Γλώσσας σε μια Νέα Γλώσσα', 'lt': 'Šaltinis Kritinis mokymasis stiprinti kalbos supratimo perkėlimą į naują kalbą', 'kk': 'Көзінің критикалық қолдауын жаңа тіліне аудару үшін оқыту', 'it': 'Fonte Critical Reinforcement Learning per trasferire la comprensione della lingua parlata a una nuova lingua', 'mk': 'Source Critical Reinforcement Learning for Transferring Spoken Language Understanding to a New Language', 'ms': 'Source Critical Reinforcement Learning for Transferring Spoken Language Understanding to a New Language', 'ml': 'സ്രോതസ്സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ക്രിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d പുതിയ ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നു', 'mn': 'Шинэ хэл руу шинэ хэл руу илтгэх зорилготой хэлний тухай эх үүсвэрийн хязгаарлалтыг нэмэгдүүлэх суралцах', 'mt': 'Sors Tagħlim ta’ Tisħiħ Kritiku għat-Trasferiment ta’ Ftehim tal-Lingwa Kkellma għal Lingwa Ġdida', 'no': 'Læring av kjeldekritiske støtte for overføring av språk til eit ny språk', 'pl': 'Źródło Krytyczne uczenie się wzmocnienia dla przenoszenia rozumienia języka mówionego do nowego języka', 'ro': 'Sursa de învățare critică de consolidare pentru transferul înțelegerii limbii vorbite într-o limbă nouă', 'sr': 'Izvorno kritično pojačanje učenja za prebacivanje razumevanja govornog jezika na novi jezik', 'so': 'Macluumaadka afka kala wareejinta', 'ta': 'Name', 'sv': 'Källa Kritiskt Förstärkt lärande för överföring av talad språkförståelse till ett nytt språk', 'si': 'ස්පූක් භාෂාව සම්පූර්ණයෙන් අළුත් භාෂාව සම්පූර්ණය කරනවා කියලා මූලික විශේෂ වි', 'ur': 'سورج کریٹریک افراد سیکھنے کے لئے اسپاک زبان سمجھنے کے لئے ایک نوی زبان میں', 'uz': 'Source Critical Reinforcement Learning for Transferring Spoken Language Understanding to a New Language', 'vi': 'Nguồn tin phát ngôn ngữ học phát ngôn ngữ mới phát triển mạnh mẽ', 'bg': 'Източник: Критично обучение за подсилване на знанията за говорен език на нов език', 'da': 'Kildekritisk forstærkning af læring til overførsel af talt sprogforståelse til et nyt sprog', 'nl': 'Bron Critical Reinforcement Learning voor het overbrengen van gesproken taal begrip naar een nieuwe taal', 'hr': 'Izvor kritičnog pojačanja učenja za prebacivanje razumijevanja govornog jezika na novi jezik', 'de': 'Source Critical Reinforcement Learning für den Transfer gesprochener Sprache in eine neue Sprache', 'id': 'Source Critical Reinforcement Learning for Transferring Spoken Language Understanding to a New Language', 'ko': '핵심 강화 학습, 구어 이해를 새로운 언어로 전환', 'sw': 'Chanzo cha Kufundisha Kikoso cha Kujifunza kwa Lugha ya Kubadilisha Kuelewa kwa lugha mpya', 'tr': 'Taryh dili Taze dile düşünmek üçin ködleme', 'fa': 'یادگیری مربوط به تغییر یادگیری زبان زبان حرف زده به زبان جدید', 'af': "Bron Kritieke Verbevesting Leer vir Oordra Spoken Taal Verstaan na 'n Nuwe Taal", 'am': 'እና', 'az': '쎖祲즙湭즙欠쎼쎧쎼渠쎖祲즙湭즙欠쎼쎧쎼渠淉饮拉餠䭲楴楫⁑쎼癶즙獩⁙敮椠䑩泉餠奥湩⁄楬즙⁄쎼얟쎼湭즙權', 'sq': 'Burimi Përforcimi Kritik Mësimi për Transferimin e Gjuhave të Fjalëzuara', 'hy': 'Առաջինը Խոսվող լեզուների փոխանցման կարևոր ուժեղացումը', 'bn': 'সূত্র একটি নতুন ভাষায় বুঝতে পারে', 'bs': 'Izvor kritičnog pojačanja učenja za prebacivanje razumijevanja govornog jezika na novi jezik', 'ca': 'Font Aprendència de reforç crític per transferir la comprensió del llenguatge parlat a un nou llenguatge', 'cs': 'Zdroj Kritické posílení učení pro přenos mluveného jazyka do nového jazyka', 'et': 'Allikas Kriitilise tugevdamise õppimine räägitava keele mõistmise ülekandmiseks uude keelde', 'fi': 'Lähde: Kriittinen vahvistusoppiminen puhuttujen kielten ymmärtämisen siirtämiseksi uudelle kielelle', 'jv': 'Pernak-pernik Pasing', 'sk': 'Vir Učenje kritične okrepitve za prenos razumevanja govorjenega jezika v nov jezik', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מקור חיבור קריטי למידה להעברת שפה מדברת הבנה לשפה חדשה', 'bo': 'ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཆེན་གཏོང་མཁན་ལྡན་སྐྱོང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་སྐྱེལ་གྱིས་ཕན་ཚུན་བསྐྱེད་ཚད་ལ།'}
{'en': 'To deploy a spoken language understanding (SLU) model to a new language, language transferring is desired to avoid the trouble of acquiring and labeling a new big SLU corpus. An SLU corpus is a monolingual corpus with domain / intent / slot labels. Translating the original SLU corpus into the target language is an attractive strategy. However, SLU corpora consist of plenty of semantic labels (slots), which general-purpose translators can not handle well, not to mention additional culture differences. This paper focuses on the language transferring task given a small in-domain parallel SLU corpus. The in-domain parallel corpus can be used as the first adaptation on the general translator. But more importantly, we show how to use reinforcement learning (RL) to further adapt the adapted translator, where translated sentences with more proper slot tags receive higher rewards. Our reward is derived from the source input sentence exclusively, unlike reward via actor-critical methods or computing reward with a ground truth target sentence. Hence we can adapt the translator the second time, using the big monolingual SLU corpus from the source language. We evaluate our approach on Chinese to English language transferring for SLU systems. The experimental results show that the generated English SLU corpus via adaptation and reinforcement learning gives us over 97 % in the slot F1 score and over 84 % accuracy in domain classification. It demonstrates the effectiveness of the proposed language transferring method. Compared with naive translation, our proposed method improves domain classification accuracy by relatively 22 %, and the slot filling F1 score by relatively more than 71 %.', 'ar': 'لنشر نموذج فهم اللغة المنطوقة (SLU) على لغة جديدة ، يكون نقل اللغة أمرًا مطلوبًا لتجنب مشكلة اكتساب مجموعة كبيرة جديدة من وحدات SLU وتصنيفها. مجموعة SLU هي مجموعة أحادية اللغة مع تسميات المجال / الهدف / الفتحة. تعتبر ترجمة مجموعة SLU الأصلية إلى اللغة الهدف استراتيجية جذابة. ومع ذلك ، تتكون SLU corpora من الكثير من الملصقات الدلالية (الفتحات) ، والتي لا يمكن لمترجمي الأغراض العامة التعامل معها جيدًا ، ناهيك عن الاختلافات الثقافية الإضافية. تركز هذه الورقة على مهمة نقل اللغة بالنظر إلى مجموعة وحدات SLU المتوازية في المجال. يمكن استخدام مجموعة النصوص المتوازية في المجال كأول تعديل للمترجم العام. ولكن الأهم من ذلك ، أننا نوضح كيفية استخدام التعلم المعزز (RL) لمزيد من التكيف مع المترجم المكيف ، حيث تحصل الجمل المترجمة مع المزيد من علامات الفتحات المناسبة على مكافآت أعلى. تُستمد مكافأتنا من جملة الإدخال المصدر حصريًا ، على عكس المكافأة من خلال الأساليب الحرجة للممثل أو المكافأة الحاسوبية بجملة هدف الحقيقة الأساسية. ومن ثم يمكننا تكييف المترجم في المرة الثانية ، باستخدام مجموعة SLU أحادية اللغة الكبيرة من اللغة المصدر. نقوم بتقييم نهجنا على نقل اللغة الصينية إلى الإنجليزية لأنظمة SLU. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن مجموعة SLU الإنجليزية التي تم إنشاؤها من خلال التعلم المعزز والتكيف يعطينا أكثر من 97٪ في درجة F1 وأكثر دقة بنسبة 84٪ في تصنيف المجال. يوضح فعالية المقترح\nطريقة نقل اللغة. بالمقارنة مع الترجمة الساذجة ، تعمل طريقتنا المقترحة على تحسين دقة تصنيف المجال بنسبة 22٪ نسبيًا ، وتملأ الفتحة درجة F1 بنسبة تزيد نسبيًا عن 71٪.', 'pt': 'Para implantar um modelo de compreensão de linguagem falada (SLU) para um novo idioma, a transferência de idioma é desejada para evitar o problema de adquirir e rotular um novo grande corpus SLU. Um corpus SLU é um corpus monolíngue com rótulos de domínio/intenção/slot. Traduzir o corpus SLU original para o idioma de destino é uma estratégia atraente. No entanto, os corpora SLU consistem em muitos rótulos semânticos (slots), com os quais os tradutores de propósito geral não conseguem lidar bem, sem mencionar as diferenças culturais adicionais. Este artigo se concentra na tarefa de transferência de linguagem dado um pequeno corpus SLU paralelo no domínio. O corpus paralelo no domínio pode ser usado como a primeira adaptação do tradutor geral. Mas, mais importante, mostramos como usar o aprendizado por reforço (RL) para adaptar ainda mais o tradutor adaptado, onde frases traduzidas com tags de slot mais adequadas recebem recompensas mais altas. Nossa recompensa é derivada exclusivamente da sentença de entrada de origem, ao contrário da recompensa por meio de métodos críticos do ator ou recompensa de computação com uma sentença alvo de verdade. Assim, podemos adaptar o tradutor pela segunda vez, usando o grande corpus SLU monolíngue do idioma de origem. Avaliamos nossa abordagem na transferência do idioma chinês para o inglês para sistemas SLU. Os resultados experimentais mostram que o corpus SLU em inglês gerado por meio do aprendizado de adaptação e reforço nos dá mais de 97% na pontuação do slot F1 e mais de 84% de precisão na classificação de domínio. Demonstra a eficácia da proposta\nmétodo de transferência de idioma. Comparado com a tradução ingênua, nosso método proposto melhora a precisão da classificação de domínio em relativamente 22%, e a pontuação F1 de preenchimento de slot em relativamente mais de 71%.', 'es': 'Para implementar un modelo de comprensión del lenguaje oral (SLU) en un nuevo idioma, se desea transferir el idioma para evitar el problema de adquirir y etiquetar un nuevo corpus grande de SLU. Un corpus SLU es un corpus monolingüe con etiquetas de dominio/intención/ranura. Traducir el corpus original de SLU al idioma de destino es una estrategia atractiva. Sin embargo, los corpus de SLU consisten en un montón de etiquetas semánticas (slots), que los traductores de propósito general no pueden manejar bien, sin mencionar las diferencias culturales adicionales. Este artículo se centra en la tarea de transferencia de idiomas dado un pequeño corpus SLU paralelo en el dominio. El corpus paralelo dentro del dominio se puede utilizar como la primera adaptación en el traductor general. Pero lo que es más importante, mostramos cómo utilizar el aprendizaje por refuerzo (RL) para adaptar aún más el traductor adaptado, donde las oraciones traducidas con etiquetas de ranura más adecuadas reciben mayores recompensas. Nuestra recompensa se deriva exclusivamente de la oración de entrada de la fuente, a diferencia de la recompensa a través de métodos críticos para el actor o el cálculo de la recompensa con una oración objetivo de verdad fundamental. Por lo tanto, podemos adaptar el traductor por segunda vez, utilizando el gran corpus monolingüe de SLU del idioma de origen. Evaluamos nuestro enfoque sobre la transferencia del idioma chino al inglés para los sistemas SLU. Los resultados experimentales muestran que el corpus de inglés SLU generado a través del aprendizaje de adaptación y refuerzo nos da más del 97% en la puntuación F1 de la ranura y más del 84% de precisión en la clasificación de dominios. Demuestra la eficacia de la propuesta\nmétodo de transferencia de idioma. En comparación con la traducción ingenua, nuestro método propuesto mejora la precisión de la clasificación de dominios en un 22%, y la puntuación F1 de llenado de espacios en relativamente más del 71%.', 'fr': "Pour déployer un modèle de compréhension de la langue parlée (SLU) dans une nouvelle langue, le transfert de langue est souhaité afin d'éviter les problèmes liés à l'acquisition et à l'étiquetage d'un nouveau grand corpus SLU. Un corpus SLU est un corpus monolingue avec des étiquettes de domaine/intent/emplacement. La traduction du corpus original de la SLU dans la langue cible est une stratégie intéressante. Cependant, les corpus SLU sont constitués de nombreuses étiquettes sémantiques (slots), que les traducteurs polyvalents ne peuvent pas bien gérer, sans parler des différences culturelles supplémentaires. Cet article se concentre sur la tâche de transfert de langue dans un petit corpus SLU parallèle dans le domaine. Le corpus parallèle dans le domaine peut être utilisé comme première adaptation sur le traducteur général. Mais plus important encore, nous montrons comment utiliser l'apprentissage par renforcement (RL) pour adapter davantage le traducteur adapté, où les phrases traduites avec des balises d'emplacement plus appropriées reçoivent des récompenses plus élevées. Notre récompense est dérivée exclusivement de la phrase source, contrairement à la récompense via des méthodes critiques pour l'acteur ou une récompense informatique avec une phrase cible de vérité de terrain. Nous pouvons donc adapter le traducteur une seconde fois, en utilisant le grand corpus monolingue SLU de la langue source. Nous évaluons notre approche du transfert du chinois vers l'anglais pour les systèmes SLU. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que le corpus SLU anglais généré via l'apprentissage par adaptation et renforcement nous donne plus de 97\xa0% dans le score F1 et plus de 84\xa0% de précision dans la classification des domaines. Cela démontre l'efficacité de la proposition\nméthode de transfert de langue. Par rapport à la traduction naïve, notre méthode proposée améliore la précision de la classification des domaines de relativement 22\xa0% et le score F1 de remplissage des fentes de relativement plus de 71\xa0%.", 'ja': '口語理解（ SLU ）モデルを新しい言語に展開するには、新しい大きなSLUコーパスを取得してラベル付けする手間を避けるために、言語転送が望まれます。 SLUコーパスは、ドメイン/インテント/スロットラベルを持つ単一言語コーパスです。 元のSLUコーパスをターゲット言語に翻訳することは、魅力的な戦略です。 しかし、SLUコーポラは多くのセマンティックラベル（スロット）で構成されており、汎用翻訳者は、追加の文化の違いは言うまでもなく、うまく処理できません。 本稿では、小さなドメイン内並列SLUコーパスを与えられた言語転送タスクに焦点を当てる。 ドメイン内の並列コーパスは、一般的な翻訳者の最初の適応として使用することができます。 しかし、より重要なことは、より適切なスロットタグを持つ翻訳された文章がより高い報酬を受け取る適応翻訳者をさらに適応させるために強化学習（ RL ）を使用する方法を示すことです。 当社の報酬は、アクター重要な方法による報酬や、グラウンドトゥルースターゲット文によるコンピューティング報酬とは異なり、ソース入力文からのみ得られます。 したがって、ソース言語の大きな単一言語SLUコーパスを使用して、翻訳者を2回目に適応させることができます。 SLUシステムのための中国語から英語への移行に関するアプローチを評価します。 実験結果は、適応と強化学習を介して生成された英語SLUコーパスが、スロットF 1スコアで97 ％以上、ドメイン分類で84 ％以上の精度を与えてくれることを示しています。 提案の有効性を示している\n言語転送方法。ナイーブな翻訳と比較して、提案された方法は、ドメイン分類の精度を相対的に22%向上させ、スロット充填F 1スコアを相対的に71%以上向上させます。', 'zh': '口语解 (SLU) 模样部署到新语言,须言语传输以避取新大 SLU 语料库之烦。 SLU语料库者,域/意/插槽标签之单语语料库也。 将原始 SLU 语料库翻译成的言语是一个有吸引力的方略。 然SLU语料库多(插槽)于语义,通用翻译人员不能善处之,无论他文化差异也。 本文重点介给定一小域内并行SLU语料库语传输任。 域内并行语料库通用翻译器上首改编。 然要在强化(RL)以应改编之翻译人员,其有插槽标者,将加奖励。 我们的奖励全由源输句,这与通过演员要术或用本事的句计奖不同。 故可再调翻译器,用源语大单语SLU语料库。 评估SLU统中文至英文转学术。 实验结果表明以应化成英语SLU语料库,得分过于插槽F1评分,97%过于域准确率84%。 其明拟议之有效性\n语移法。 比之素译,将域类准确率增22%,槽填F1得分71%以上。', 'hi': 'एक बोली जाने वाली भाषा समझ (एसएलयू) मॉडल को एक नई भाषा में तैनात करने के लिए, भाषा स्थानांतरण एक नए बड़े एसएलयू कॉर्पस को प्राप्त करने और लेबल करने की परेशानी से बचने के लिए वांछित है। एक SLU कॉर्पस डोमेन / इरादे / स्लॉट लेबल के साथ एक मोनोलिंगुअल कॉर्पस है। लक्ष्य भाषा में मूल SLU कॉर्पस का अनुवाद करना एक आकर्षक रणनीति है। हालांकि, एसएलयू कॉर्पोरेट में बहुत सारे शब्दार्थ लेबल (स्लॉट) होते हैं, जो सामान्य उद्देश्य वाले अनुवादक अच्छी तरह से संभाल नहीं सकते हैं, न कि अतिरिक्त संस्कृति मतभेदों का उल्लेख करने के लिए। यह पेपर एक छोटे से इन-डोमेन समानांतर SLU कॉर्पस को दिए गए कार्य को स्थानांतरित करने वाली भाषा पर केंद्रित है। इन-डोमेन समानांतर कॉर्पस का उपयोग सामान्य अनुवादक पर पहले अनुकूलन के रूप में किया जा सकता है। लेकिन इससे भी महत्वपूर्ण बात यह है कि हम दिखाते हैं कि अनुकूलित अनुवादक को आगे अनुकूलित करने के लिए सुदृढीकरण सीखने (आरएल) का उपयोग कैसे किया जाए, जहां अधिक उचित स्लॉट टैग के साथ अनुवादित वाक्यों को उच्च पुरस्कार प्राप्त होते हैं। हमारा इनाम स्रोत इनपुट वाक्य से विशेष रूप से प्राप्त होता है, अभिनेता-महत्वपूर्ण तरीकों या एक जमीनी सत्य लक्ष्य वाक्य के साथ कंप्यूटिंग इनाम के माध्यम से इनाम के विपरीत। इसलिए हम स्रोत भाषा से बड़े मोनोलिंगुअल एसएलयू कॉर्पस का उपयोग करके दूसरी बार अनुवादक को अनुकूलित कर सकते हैं। हम SLU प्रणालियों के लिए अंग्रेजी भाषा को स्थानांतरित करने के लिए चीनी पर हमारे दृष्टिकोण का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों से पता चलता है कि अनुकूलन और सुदृढीकरण सीखने के माध्यम से उत्पन्न अंग्रेजी एसएलयू कॉर्पस हमें स्लॉट एफ 1 स्कोर में 97% से अधिक और डोमेन वर्गीकरण में 84% से अधिक सटीकता देता है। यह प्रस्तावित की प्रभावशीलता को दर्शाता है\nभाषा स्थानांतरण विधि. भोले अनुवाद की तुलना में, हमारी प्रस्तावित विधि अपेक्षाकृत 22% द्वारा डोमेन वर्गीकरण सटीकता में सुधार करती है, और स्लॉट 71% से अधिक द्वारा F1 स्कोर को भरने वाला स्लॉट।', 'ru': 'Чтобы развернуть модель понимания разговорного языка (SLU) на новый язык, желательно перевести язык, чтобы избежать проблем с приобретением и маркировкой нового большого корпуса SLU. Корпус SLU представляет собой одноязычный корпус с метками домена/намерения/слота. Перевод оригинального корпуса SLU на целевой язык является привлекательной стратегией. Тем не менее, корпуса SLU состоят из множества семантических меток (слотов), с которыми переводчики общего назначения не могут справиться хорошо, не говоря уже о дополнительных культурных различиях. В настоящем документе основное внимание уделяется задаче переноса языка с учетом небольшого параллельного корпуса SLU. Внутридоменный параллельный корпус может быть использован в качестве первой адаптации на общем переводчике. Но что более важно, мы показываем, как использовать обучение подкреплению (RL) для дальнейшей адаптации адаптированного переводчика, где переведенные предложения с более правильными тегами слотов получают более высокие награды. Наше вознаграждение получается исключительно из исходного входного предложения, в отличие от вознаграждения с помощью критически важных методов или вычислительного вознаграждения с целевым предложением истины. Следовательно, мы можем адаптировать переводчика во второй раз, используя большой одноязычный корпус SLU из исходного языка. Мы оцениваем наш подход к переводу китайского языка на английский для систем SLU. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что сформированный английский корпус SLU посредством обучения адаптации и подкреплению дает нам более 97% в оценке F1 и более 84% точности в классификации областей. Демонстрирует эффективность предлагаемого\nпо сравнению с наивным переводом предлагаемый нами способ повышает точность классификации домена относительно на 22%, а показатель заполнения слота F1 относительно более чем на 71%.', 'ga': 'Chun samhail um thuiscint teanga labhartha (SLU) a imscaradh chuig teanga nua, tá aistriú teanga ag teastáil chun an deacracht a bhaineann le corpas mór SLU nua a fháil agus a lipéadú a sheachaint. Is corpas aonteangach é corpas SLU le lipéid fearainn/intinne/sliotán. Straitéis tharraingteach is ea bunchorpas SLU a aistriú go dtí an sprioctheanga. Mar sin féin, is éard atá i gcorpas SLU neart lipéid shéimeantacha (sliotáin), nach féidir le haistritheoirí ginearálta a láimhseáil go maith, gan trácht ar dhifríochtaí breise cultúir. Díríonn an páipéar seo ar an tasc aistrithe teanga nuair a thugtar corpas beag comhthreomhar SLU san fhearann. Is féidir an corpas comhthreomhar in-fearainn a úsáid mar an chéad oiriúnú ar an aistritheoir ginearálta. Ach níos tábhachtaí fós, léirímid conas foghlaim athneartaithe (RL) a úsáid chun an t-aistritheoir oiriúnaithe a oiriúnú tuilleadh, áit a bhfaigheann abairtí aistrithe le clibeanna sliotán níos cuí luach saothair níos airde. Díorthaítear ár luach saothair go heisiach ón abairt ionchur foinseach, murab ionann agus luach saothair trí mhodhanna aisteoir-chriticiúil nó luach saothair ríomhaireachta le sprioc-phianbhreith fhírinneachta. Mar sin is féidir linn an t-aistritheoir a oiriúnú an dara huair, ag baint úsáide as an gcorpas mór aonteangach SLU ón mbunteanga. Déanaimid meastóireacht ar ár gcur chuige maidir le haistriú na Síne go Béarla do chórais SLU. Léiríonn na torthaí turgnamhacha go dtugann corpas SLU Béarla ginte trí fhoghlaim oiriúnaithe agus athneartaithe os cionn 97% dúinn sa scór sliotán F1 agus breis agus 84% cruinneas i rangú fearainn. Léiríonn sé éifeachtacht an bheartaithe\nmodh aistrithe teanga. I gcomparáid le haistriúchán naive, feabhsaítear cruinneas aicmithe fearainn de réir ár modh molta thart ar 22%, agus an scór líonadh sliotán F1 réasúnta níos mó ná 71%.', 'hu': 'A beszélt nyelv megértésének (SLU) modelljének új nyelvre történő telepítéséhez a nyelvátvitelre van szükség, hogy elkerüljük az új nagy SLU korpusz megszerzésének és címkézésének problémáját. Az SLU korpusz egy egynyelvű korpusz, amely tartomány/szándék/slot címkékkel rendelkezik. Vonzó stratégia az eredeti SLU korpusz célnyelvre történő fordítása. A SLU corpora azonban rengeteg szemantikai címkéből áll, amelyeket az általános célú fordítók nem tudnak jól kezelni, nem is beszélve a további kultúra különbségekről. Ez a tanulmány a nyelvátviteli feladatra összpontosít, amelyet egy kis tartományon belüli párhuzamos SLU korpusz kapott. Az általános fordító első adaptációjaként a tartományon belüli párhuzamos korpusz használható. De ami még fontosabb, megmutatjuk, hogyan lehet a megerősítő tanulást (RL) használni az adaptált fordító további adaptálásához, ahol a megfelelőbb slot címkékkel rendelkező fordított mondatok nagyobb jutalmat kapnak. A jutalom kizárólag a forrás beviteli mondatból származik, ellentétben a színészkritikus módszerekkel vagy a számítástechnikai jutalommal egy alap igazság célmondattal. Így a fordítót másodszor is alkalmazhatjuk, a forrásnyelvből származó nagy, egynyelvű SLU korpusz segítségével. Értékeljük megközelítésünket a kínai-angol nyelvű transzferrel kapcsolatban SLU rendszerek esetében. A kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy az adaptációs és erősítési tanulással generált angol SLU korpusz több mint 97%-os F1 pontszámot és 84%-os pontosságot ad a domain osztályozásban. A javaslat hatékonyságát bizonyítja\nnyelvátviteli módszer. A naiv fordítással összehasonlítva javasolt módszerünk viszonylag 22%-kal javítja a domain osztályozási pontosságát, az F1 pontszámot viszonylag több mint 71%-kal.', 'it': "Per implementare un modello di comprensione della lingua parlata (SLU) in una nuova lingua, il trasferimento della lingua è desiderato per evitare il problema di acquisire e etichettare un nuovo corpus SLU grande. Un corpus SLU è un corpus monolingue con etichette di dominio/intent/slot. Tradurre il corpus originale SLU nella lingua di destinazione è una strategia interessante. Tuttavia, i corpora SLU sono costituiti da un sacco di etichette semantiche (slot), che i traduttori generici non possono gestire bene, per non parlare di ulteriori differenze culturali. Questo articolo si concentra sul compito di trasferimento linguistico dato un piccolo corpus parallelo SLU in-domain. Il corpus parallelo in-domain può essere utilizzato come primo adattamento sul traduttore generale. Ma cosa più importante, mostriamo come utilizzare l'apprendimento di rinforzo (RL) per adattare ulteriormente il traduttore adattato, dove frasi tradotte con tag slot più appropriati ricevono premi più elevati. La nostra ricompensa è derivata esclusivamente dalla frase di input sorgente, a differenza della ricompensa tramite metodi critici per gli attori o calcolo della ricompensa con una frase target di verità di base. Quindi possiamo adattare il traduttore la seconda volta, utilizzando il grande corpus monolingue SLU dalla lingua di origine. Valutiamo il nostro approccio sul trasferimento dalla lingua cinese all'inglese per i sistemi SLU. I risultati sperimentali mostrano che il corpus SLU inglese generato attraverso l'apprendimento di adattamento e rinforzo ci dà oltre il 97% nel punteggio F1 slot e oltre l'84% di precisione nella classificazione dei domini. Essa dimostra l'efficacia della proposta\nmetodo di trasferimento linguistico. Rispetto alla traduzione ingenua, il nostro metodo proposto migliora l'accuratezza della classificazione del dominio relativamente del 22% e il punteggio F1 di riempimento dello slot relativamente superiore al 71%.", 'lt': 'Siekiant įdiegti kalbos supratimo (SLU) model į į naują kalbą, norima kalbos perdavimą išvengti sunkumų įsigyti ir ženklinti naują didelį SLU korpusą. SLU corpus yra vienakalbis corpus su domeno/ketinimo/laiko tarpsnių etiketėmis. Originalaus SLU korpuso vertimas į tikslinę kalbą yra patraukli strategija. Tačiau SLU corpora sudaro daug semantinių etikečių (laiko tarpsnių), kurių bendrosios paskirties vertėjai negali gerai tvarkyti, nekalbant apie papildomus kultūros skirtumus. Šiame dokumente daugiausia dėmesio skiriama kalbų perdavimo užduotims, suteiktoms mažam lygiagrečiam SLU korpusui. Domeno lygiagretus korpus gali būti naudojamas kaip pirmasis bendrojo vertėjo pritaikymas. Tačiau svarbiau, mes parodysime, kaip naudoti mokymąsi sustiprinimu (RL) pritaikyti pritaikytą vertėją, kur vertiami sakiniai su tinkamesniais laiko tarpsnių ženklais gauna didesnį atlygį. Mūsų atlyginimas gaunamas išimtinai iš pradinio įvadinio sakinio, priešingai nei atlyginimas taikant aktorių kritinius metodus arba apskaičiuojant atlyginimą su tiksliniu tiksliniu sakiniu. Hence we can adapt the translator the second time, using the big monolingual SLU corpus from the source language.  Vertiname savo požiūrį į kinų ir anglų kalbų perdavimą SLU sistemoms. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad sukauptas anglų SLU korpus prisitaikymo ir stiprinimo mokymosi būdu suteikia daugiau kaip 97 % laiko tarpsnių F1 balais ir daugiau kaip 84 % tikslumo srities klasifikacijoje. Jis rodo siūlomo\nlanguage transferring method.  Palyginti su neišvengiamais vertimais, mūsų siūlomas metodas gerina domeno klasifikacijos tikslumą santykinai 22 proc., o laiko tarpsnių F1 balas santykinai daugiau kaip 71 proc.', 'ka': 'სიტყვების მოდელს ახალი ენაში გამოყენებლად, ენათა გადატანსტირება უნდა გამოცდილობა ახალი SLU კორპუსს მიიღება და მინიშნოთ. SLU კჲპოსჟ ვ მჲნჲლთნდსჟკთ კჲპოსჟ ჟ ეჲმთნ/თნრვპვნრ/ჟლჲრ. ადგილური SLU კორპუსს მისაღების ენაში გადაწყვანა არის ატრაქტიური სტრატიგია. თუმცა, SLU კოპორა იყოს ბევრი სემონტიკური ლაბეტების (პროტების) შესახებ, რომელიც საერთო მიზეზი ტრანსტრალიტორი არ შეუძლიათ კარგი გადაწყენოთ, არა დამატე ეს დოკუმენტი კონუქტირებულია ენის გადატანსტრების პარალელი SLU კოპპუსზე, რომელიც მიიღეთ პარალელი დოკუმენში. პარალელური კორპუსი დიომინში შეიძლება გამოიყენება როგორც პირველი აკაპექტირება საერთო წარმოქმედებაში. მაგრამ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, ჩვენ ვიჩვენებთ როგორ გამოიყენება სწავლებელი სწავლებელი (RL) სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვ ჩვენი სამუშაო იქნება მხოლოდ მხოლოდ, არსებობით არქტორის კრიტიკური მეტოვებით, ან მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ სინამდვილეების მიხედვით. ამიტომ ჩვენ შეგვიძლია მეორე ჯერ გავაკეთოთ შესაძლებელი მონოლუგური SLU კორპუსის გამოყენებაში. ჩვენ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა კინელიური ენაზე SLU სისტემებისთვის გადატანქმებაზე. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ შექმნილი ინგლისური SLU კორპუსი ადაპტიფიკაციის და სწავლების გამოყენებით გვაქვს 97% დამატებით F1 წარმოდგენით და 84% დამატებით დიომინის კლასიფი ეს გამოჩვენება, რომ პროგრამების ეფექტიურობა\nენის გადატვირთვა მეტი. ჩვენი პროგრამის გადაწყვეტილი პროგრამით, ჩვენი პროგრამის პროგრამის კლასიფიკაციის წარმოდგენება 22%-ით, და პროგრამის გადატანა F1 წარმოდგენება 71%-ზე უფრო მეტი.', 'el': 'Για την ανάπτυξη ενός μοντέλου κατανόησης προφορικής γλώσσας (SLU) σε μια νέα γλώσσα, η μεταφορά γλώσσας είναι επιθυμητή για να αποφευχθεί ο κόπος απόκτησης και επισήμανσης ενός νέου μεγάλου σώματος SLU. Ένα σώμα SLU είναι ένα μονογλωσσικό σώμα με ετικέτες τομέων/προθέσεων/αυλακώσεων. Η μετάφραση του αρχικού σώματος SLU στη γλώσσα-στόχο είναι μια ελκυστική στρατηγική. Ωστόσο, τα σώματα αποτελούνται από πολλές σημασιολογικές ετικέτες (αυλακώσεις), τις οποίες οι μεταφραστές γενικής χρήσης δεν μπορούν να χειριστούν καλά, για να μην αναφέρουμε πρόσθετες πολιτισμικές διαφορές. Η παρούσα εργασία επικεντρώνεται στην εργασία μεταφοράς γλωσσών με ένα μικρό παράλληλο σώμα SLU εντός του τομέα. Το παράλληλο σώμα μπορεί να χρησιμοποιηθεί ως η πρώτη προσαρμογή στον γενικό μεταφραστή. Αλλά το πιο σημαντικό, δείχνουμε πώς να χρησιμοποιήσετε τη μάθηση ενίσχυσης (για να προσαρμόσετε περαιτέρω τον προσαρμοσμένο μεταφραστή, όπου μεταφρασμένες προτάσεις με πιο κατάλληλες ετικέτες αυλακώσεων λαμβάνουν υψηλότερες ανταμοιβές. Η ανταμοιβή μας προέρχεται αποκλειστικά από την πρόταση εισόδου πηγής, σε αντίθεση με την ανταμοιβή μέσω μεθόδων κρίσιμης σημασίας για τον ηθοποιό ή την υπολογιστική ανταμοιβή με μια βασική πρόταση στόχου αλήθειας. Έτσι μπορούμε να προσαρμόσουμε τον μεταφραστή για δεύτερη φορά, χρησιμοποιώντας το μεγάλο μονογλωσσικό σώμα από τη γλώσσα προέλευσης. Αξιολογούμε την προσέγγισή μας για τη μεταφορά κινεζικής σε αγγλική γλώσσα για συστήματα SLU. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το παραγόμενο αγγλικό σώμα μέσω της εκμάθησης προσαρμογής και ενίσχυσης μας δίνει πάνω από 97% στη βαθμολογία και πάνω από 84% ακρίβεια στην ταξινόμηση τομέων. Αποδεικνύει την αποτελεσματικότητα της προτεινόμενης οδηγίας.\nμέθοδος μεταφοράς γλώσσας. Σε σύγκριση με την αφελή μετάφραση, η προτεινόμενη μέθοδος βελτιώνει την ακρίβεια ταξινόμησης τομέων κατά σχετικά 22%, και το σκορ πλήρωσης αυλακώσεων κατά σχετικά περισσότερο από 71%.', 'mk': 'За да се распореди моделот за разбирање на говорниот јазик (СЛУ) на нов јазик, се посакува пренесување на јазик за да се избегне проблемот со набавувањето и етикетирањето на нов голем СЛУ корпус. SLU корпус е монојазичен корпус со ознаки на домен/намера/слот. Преведувањето на оригиналниот SLU корпус во метниот јазик е атрактивна стратегија. Сепак, СЛУ корпората се состои од многу семантични етикети (слотови), кои преведувачите со општи цели не можат да ги справат добро, а да не спомнувам дополнителни културни разлики. Оваа хартија се фокусира на задачата за пренесување на јазик со мал паралелен SLU корпус во домен. Паралел корпус во домен може да се користи како прва адаптација на генералниот преведувач. Но, што е поважно, ние покажуваме како да се користи зајакнувачкото учење (RL) за понатамошно адаптирање на адаптираниот преведувач, каде преведените реченици со посоодветни локации добиваат повисоки награди. Our reward is derived from the source input sentence exclusively, unlike reward via actor-critical methods or computing reward with a ground truth target sentence.  Hence we can adapt the translator the second time, using the big monolingual SLU corpus from the source language.  Го проценуваме нашиот пристап кон пренесувањето на кинески на англиски јазик за SLU системи. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека генерираниот англиски SLU корпус преку адаптација и зајакнување учење ни дава над 97 отсто во резултатот F1 и над 84 отсто точност во класификацијата на домените. Истиот ја покажува ефикасноста на предложените\nlanguage transferring method.  Во споредба со наивен превод, нашиот предложен метод ја подобрува точноста на класификацијата на домените за релативно 22 отсто, а вредноста на полнење на резултатот на F1 за релативно повеќе од 71 отсто.', 'mt': 'Biex jintuża mudell ta’ fehim tal-lingwa mitkellma (SLU) għal lingwa ġdida, it-trasferiment tal-lingwa huwa mixtieq biex jiġi evitat il-problema tal-akkwist u t-tikkettar ta’ korpus ġdid kbir ta’ SLU. SLU corpus huwa corpus monolingwi b’tikketti tad-dominju/intenzjoni/slot. It-traduzzjoni tal-korpus SLU oriġinali fil-lingwa fil-mira hija strateġija attraenti. Madankollu, SLU corpora tikkonsisti f’ħafna tikketti semantiċi (slots), li tradutturi b’skop ġenerali ma jistgħux jimmaniġġjaw tajjeb, biex ma jissemmewx differenzi kulturali addizzjonali. Dan id-dokument jiffoka fuq il-kompitu tat-trasferiment tal-lingwi minħabba SLU corpus parallel żgħir fid-dominju. Il-korpus parallel fid-dominju jista’ jintuża bħala l-ewwel adattament fuq it-traduttur ġenerali. Iżda b’mod aktar importanti, nuru kif għandna nużaw it-tagħlim ta’ rinforz (RL) biex nadattaw aktar it-traduttur adattat, fejn sentenzi tradotti b’tikketti ta’ slots aktar xierqa jirċievu premji ogħla. Our reward is derived from the source input sentence exclusively, unlike reward via actor-critical methods or computing reward with a ground truth target sentence.  Għalhekk nistgħu nadattaw lit-traduttur it-tieni darba, bl-użu tal-korpus SLU monolingwi kbir mil-lingwa tas-sors. Aħna jevalwaw l-approċċ tagħna dwar it-trasferiment tal-lingwa Ċiniża għal dik Ingliża għas-sistemi SLU. Ir-riżultati sperimentali juru li s-SLU corpus ġenerat bl-adattament u t-tagħlim ta’ rinforz jagħtina aktar minn 97% fil-punteġġ tas-slot F1 u aktar minn 84% fil-klassifikazzjoni tad-dominju. Dan juri l-effettività tal-proposta\nmetodu ta’ trasferiment tal-lingwa. Meta mqabbel mat-traduzzjoni naiva, il-metodu propost tagħna jtejjeb il-preċiżjoni tal-klassifikazzjoni tad-dominju b’relattivament 22%, u l-punteġġ F1 tal-mili tas-slots b’relattivament aktar minn 71%.', 'kk': 'Тілді түсініктерді (SLU) үлгісін жаңа тіліне ауыстыру үшін тілді ауыстыру жаңа үлкен SLU корпус алу және белгілеу мәселелерін қабылдауға болады. SLU корпус - домен/мақсат/слот жарлықтары бар монолингі корпус. Бастапқы SLU корпусын мақсатты тіліне аудару - таңдау стратегиясы. Бірақ SLU корпорасы бірнеше семантикалық жарлықтардан (слоттар) тұрады, оларды жалпы мақсатты аударушылар дұрыс әрекет етпейді, қосымша мәдениеттің айырмашылығын айтпайды. Бұл қағаз тілді аудару тапсырмасына кішкентай доменде параллелі SLU корпус берілген тілді аудару тапсырмасына көздейді. Доменде параллель корпус жалпы аудармалардың алғашқы адаптациясы ретінде қолданылады. Бірақ ең маңызды, біз қолданылған аудармаларды қалай қолдану үшін қолдануға (RL) қолдануға болады. Бұл сөздерді оң дұрыс слот тегтеріне аударып тұрады. Біздің мәліметіміз көзінің келтірілген мәліметінен қарамастырылады. Актор-критикалық әдістерімен немесе мәліметті есептеу арқылы жергілікті дәл мә Сондықтан біз аударғышты екінші рет, көздегі тілден үлкен монолингі SLU корпус қолдануға болады. Біз қытайша тілдерді SLU жүйелеріне аудару үшін ағылшын тілдеріне қатынасызды бағалаймыз. Тәжірибелікті нәтижелер ағылшын SLU корпусын адаптациялау және күшейту оқыту арқылы 97% дегенді көрсетеді және домен классификациясындағы 84% деген дұрыстығын көрсетеді. Бұл таңдалған нәтижесін көрсетеді\nтіл аудару әдісі. Найтив аудармасымен салыстырылып, қолданыстағы әдіміміз доменнің классификациясының дұрыстығын салыстырып 22%- мен F1 нәтижесін салыстырып 71% дегеннен артық көмектеседі.', 'ml': 'സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ ബുദ്ധിയുടെ (SLU) മോഡല്\u200d പുതിയ ഭാഷയിലേക്ക് അയയ്ക്കാന്\u200d, ഭാഷ മാറ്റം വരുത്താനും ഒരു പുതിയ SLU കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ലഭ ഒരു SLU കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് ഒരു മോണോളില്\u200d ഭാഷ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസാണ്, ഡൊമൈന്\u200d/ഗ്രോട്ട്/സ്ലോട്ട് ലേബ്ലേറ്റുകള്\u200d ഉള്ളത്. ആദ്യമായ SLU കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ ലക്ഷ്യഭാഷിയിലേക്ക് അഭിപ്രായം ചെയ്യുന്നത് വളരെ ആകര്\u200dഷകരമായ ഒരു strategy ആണ്. എന്നാലും SLU കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ കൂടുതല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് ലേബിളുകളുടെ (സ്ലോട്ടുകള്\u200d) ഉള്ള ഒരുപാട് കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സംസ്കാര വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d സൂക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് ഡൊമെയിനില്\u200d ഒരു ചെറിയ പാര്\u200dളേല്\u200d എസ്എല്\u200d യു കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് നല്\u200dകിയ ഭാഷ മാറ്റുന് ഡൊമെയിനിലെ പാരാളല്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് പൊതുവായ പരിഭാഷകനിലെ ആദ്യത്തെ അഡാപ്റ്റേഷനായി ഉപയോഗിക്കാം. കൂടുതല്\u200d പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ടതാണ്, നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊടുക്കുന്നത് എങ്ങനെയാണ് പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്(RL) ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നതെന്ന് കൂടുതല്\u200d പരിഭാഷ നമ്മുടെ പ്രതിഫലം സ്രോതസ്സ് ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വിധിയില്\u200d നിന്ന് മാത്രമാണ് വന്നത്, നടത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്ന പ്രതിഫലം പോലെയുള് അതുകൊണ്ട് നമുക്ക് രണ്ടാമത്തേതായി പരിഭാഷകനെ മാറ്റാന്\u200d കഴിയും, സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷയില്\u200d നിന്നും വലിയ മോണോളില്\u200dലാങ്കല്\u200d എസ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ചൈനീസിലേക്ക് ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് ഭാഷ മാറ്റുന്നതിലേക്ക് നമ്മുടെ പ്രായോഗ്യം വിലയിച്ചു കൊടുക്ക The experimental results show that the generated English SLU corpus via adaptation and reinforcement learning gives us over 97% in the slot F1 score and over 84% accuracy in domain classification.  പ്രോഗ്രാന്തിക്കപ്പെട്ടതിന്\u200dറെ ഫലം അത് പ്രത്യക്ഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു\nഭാഷ മാറ്റുന്ന രീതി നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതിയില്\u200d 22% ക്ലാസിഫിക്കേഷന്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. എഫ്1 സ്കോര്\u200d നിറയ്ക്കുന്ന സ്ലോട', 'ms': 'Untuk menggunakan model pemahaman bahasa bercakap (SLU) ke bahasa baru, pemindahan bahasa diinginkan untuk menghindari kesulitan untuk mendapatkan dan mengetikkan korpus SLU besar baru. Sebuah corpus SLU adalah corpus monobahasa dengan label domain/niat/slot. Menerjemahkan korpus asli SLU ke dalam bahasa sasaran adalah strategi menarik. Namun, korpra SLU terdiri dari banyak label semantik (slot), yang penerjemah-tujuan umum tidak dapat menangani dengan baik, untuk tidak menyebutkan perbezaan budaya tambahan. Kertas ini fokus pada tugas pemindahan bahasa diberikan corpus SLU selari kecil dalam domain. Corpus selari dalam domain boleh digunakan sebagai penyesuaian pertama pada penerjemah umum. Tetapi yang lebih penting, kita menunjukkan bagaimana menggunakan pembelajaran kuasa (RL) untuk menyesuaikan lebih lanjut penerjemah tersesuai, di mana kalimat diterjemahkan dengan tag slot yang lebih tepat menerima hadiah yang lebih tinggi. Our reward is derived from the source input sentence exclusively, unlike reward via actor-critical methods or computing reward with a ground truth target sentence.  Oleh itu, kita boleh menyesuaikan penerjemah kali kedua, menggunakan corpus SLU monobahasa besar dari bahasa sumber. Kami menilai pendekatan kita pada bahasa Cina ke bahasa Inggeris pemindahan untuk sistem SLU. Hasil percubaan menunjukkan bahawa corpus SLU Inggeris yang dijana melalui penyesuaian dan pembelajaran kuasa memberikan kita lebih dari 97% dalam skor slot F1 dan lebih dari 84% akurasi dalam klasifikasi domain. Ia menunjukkan kegunaan\nkaedah pemindahan bahasa. Berbanding dengan terjemahan naif, kaedah kami yang diusulkan meningkatkan ketepatan klasifikasi domain dengan relatif 22%, dan slot mengisi skor F1 dengan relatif lebih dari 71%.', 'pl': 'Aby wdrożyć model rozumienia języka mówionego (SLU) w nowym języku, pożądany jest transfer języka, aby uniknąć trudności związanych z nabyciem i etykietowaniem nowego dużego korpusu SLU. Korpus SLU to jednojęzyczny korpus z etykietami domeny/intencji/slot. Atrakcyjną strategią jest tłumaczenie oryginalnego korpusu SLU na język docelowy. Korpusy SLU składają się jednak z mnóstwa etykiet semantycznych (slotów), z którymi tłumacze ogólnego przeznaczenia nie mogą dobrze sobie poradzić, nie wspominając o dodatkowych różnicach kulturowych. Niniejszy artykuł skupia się na zadaniu transferu języka przy małym w domenie równoległym korpusie SLU. Korpus równoległy w domenie może być wykorzystany jako pierwsza adaptacja na tłumacza ogólnego. Ale co ważniejsze, pokazujemy, jak wykorzystać uczenie wzmocnienia (RL) do dalszej adaptacji adaptowanego tłumacza, gdzie przetłumaczone zdania z bardziej odpowiednimi tagami slotowymi otrzymują wyższe nagrody. Nasza nagroda pochodzi wyłącznie z źródłowego zdania wejściowego, w przeciwieństwie do nagrody za pomocą metod krytycznych dla aktorów lub obliczania nagrody z podstawowym zdaniem docelowym prawdy. Dzięki temu możemy dostosować tłumacza po raz drugi, korzystając z dużego jednojęzycznego korpusu SLU z języka źródłowego. Oceniamy nasze podejście do transferu języka chińskiego na angielski dla systemów SLU. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że generowany angielski korpus SLU poprzez adaptację i uczenie się wzmacniające daje nam ponad 97% w wyniku F1 slotu oraz ponad 84% dokładności w klasyfikacji domen. Wykazuje skuteczność proponowanego\nmetoda transferu języka. W porównaniu z naiwnym tłumaczeniem, nasza proponowana metoda poprawia dokładność klasyfikacji domen o stosunkowo 22%, a wynik F1 wypełniający sloty stosunkowo więcej niż 71%.', 'no': 'For å utføra eit praktisk språk-forståelse (SLU) modell til ein ny språk, vil språk-overføring unngå problemet for å henta og merke eit ny stor SLU-korpus. Ein SLU-korpus er ein monolingual korpus med domene/intent/slot-merkelappar. Omsetjing av originalen SLU-korpus til målspråket er eit attraktiv strategi. Men SLU-korpora inneheld mange semantiske merkelappar (plaster), som generelle målsettingar ikkje kan handtera godt, ikkje å gjera ekstra kulturforskjeller. Denne papiret fokuserer på språk overføring oppgåva gitt ein liten i domene parallell SLU corpus. Parallel korpus i domenet kan brukast som første tilpassing på den generelle omsetjaren. Men meir viktig viser vi korleis å bruka reinforcementlæring (RL) for å endra tilpassa den tilpassa omsetjaren, der omsetjinga med meir rettige plass- taggar får høgare tiltak. Ver rekning er avhengig frå kjeldeinndatasetninga eksklusivt, i motsetning av rekninga via actor-kritiske metoder eller rekninga av rekninga med eit grunnleggjande sannhetsteikn. Derfor kan vi tilpassa omsetjaren den andre gongen ved å bruka den store monospråk SLU-korpusen frå kjeldespråket. Vi evaluerer tilnærminga vårt på kinesisk til engelsk språk for SLU-systemet. Den eksperimentelle resultatene viser at den genererte engelske SLU-korpusen via adaptasjon og reinforcement-læring gir oss over 97% i plass F1- poeng og over 84% nøyaktighet i domeneklassifikasjon. Det viser effektiviteten av den foreslåde\nspråk overføringsmetode. Sammenlignet med naive omsetjing, vår foreslått metode forbedrar domeneklassifikasjon med relativt 22%, og plassen fyller F1- poeng med relativt meir enn 71%.', 'ro': 'Pentru a implementa un model de înțelegere a limbii vorbite (SLU) într-o limbă nouă, se dorește transferul limbii pentru a evita problemele de achiziționare și etichetare a unui nou corp mare SLU. Un corpus SLU este un corpus monolingv cu etichete de domeniu/intenție/slot. Traducerea corpului original SLU în limba țintă este o strategie atractivă. Cu toate acestea, corporele SLU constau în numeroase etichete semantice (sloturi), pe care traducătorii de uz general nu le pot gestiona bine, ca să nu mai vorbim de diferențele culturale suplimentare. Această lucrare se concentrează pe sarcina de transfer al limbii dată unui corpus paralel SLU în domeniu mic. Corpusul paralel în domeniu poate fi folosit ca prima adaptare a traducătorului general. Dar, mai important, vă arătăm cum să utilizați învățarea de armare (RL) pentru a adapta în continuare traducătorul adaptat, în cazul în care propozițiile traduse cu etichete slot mai adecvate primesc recompense mai mari. Recompensa noastră este derivată exclusiv din propoziția de introducere sursă, spre deosebire de recompensa prin metode critice de actor sau de calcul recompensa cu o propoziție țintă a adevărului de bază. Astfel, putem adapta traducătorul a doua oară, folosind corpul mare monolingv SLU din limba sursă. Evaluăm abordarea noastră privind transferul limbii chineze în engleză pentru sistemele SLU. Rezultatele experimentale arată că corpul SLU generat în limba engleză prin adaptare și învățare de armare ne oferă peste 97% în scorul F1 slot și peste 84% precizie în clasificarea domeniului. Aceasta demonstrează eficacitatea propunerii\nmetoda de transfer al limbii. Comparativ cu traducerea naivă, metoda noastră propusă îmbunătățește precizia clasificării domeniilor cu relativ 22%, iar scorul F1 de umplere a sloturilor cu relativ mai mult de 71%.', 'mn': 'Холбоотой хэл ойлголтын загварыг шинэ хэл руу шилжүүлэхийн тулд, хэл шилжүүлэх нь шинэ том SLU корпус олж авах болон маркирлах асуудлыг алдахыг хүсч байна. SLU корпус бол холбоотой/зорилго/слотын жагсаалтай ганц хэлний корпус юм. Үнэндээ SLU корпус зорилготой хэл руу орлуулах нь татам стратеги юм. Гэхдээ SLU корпора нь ихэнх семантик загвар (слотууд) байдаг. Энэ нь ерөнхий зорилго зорилготой орчууд сайн ажиллаж чадахгүй, нэмэлт соёлын ялгааг хэлэхгүй. Энэ цаас SLU корпус гэх жижиг хэлний шилжүүлэх ажил дээр анхаарлаа хандуулдаг. Энд параллел корпус ерөнхий хөгжүүлэгчийн анхны адилтгал болгож ашиглаж болно. Гэхдээ илүү чухал нь бид хэрхэн хөгжүүлэх суралцаа (RL) хэрхэн ашиглах вэ гэдгийг харуулж байна. Төрсөлдөг хөгжүүлэгчдийг илүү зөв слотын тегтэй хөгжүүлэгчдийн шагналыг илүү өндөр авдаг. Бидний шагнал нь эх үүсвэрийн өгүүлбэрээс гарч ирсэн юм. Актор-чухал арга замаар шагналыг эсвэл шагналыг жинхэнэ жинхэнэ өгүүлбэрээр тооцоолж байдаг. Тиймээс бид хөгжүүлэгчийг хоёр дахь удаа зохион байгуулж болно, эх үүсвэрийн хэлээс том SLU корпус ашиглаж болно. Бид Хятад хэл дээр SLU системийн хувьд англи хэл руу шилжүүлэх аргыг үнэлдэг. Ингээд туршилтын үр дүнд Англи СЛU корпус боловсруулсан адаптацийн болон нэмэгдүүлэх сургалтын аргаар бидэнд F1-н слот дээр 97%-аас илүү хувирдаг ба дотоод хуваалтын зөв 84%-аас илүү тодорхой байдаг. Энэ нь зөвхөн санал өгсөн\nхэл дамжуулах арга. Сайн орчуулалтын харьцуулахад бидний санал дэвшүүлсэн арга нь холбооны хуваалтын тодорхойлолтыг харьцуулахад 22%-аар сайн сайжруулдаг ба F1 оноо 71% аас илүү сайжруулдаг.', 'so': 'Si aad u soo dirto muusikada waxgarashada afka (SLU) oo lagu hadlo luqad cusub, waxaa laga doonayaa in laga fogeeyo dhibaatada helitaanka iyo baaritaanka koofiyadda cusub ee SLU. Qoriga SLU waa hal qof oo ay leedahay labeecada caadiga ah. Turjumista asalka ah ee SLU waa qoraal adag. Si kastaba ha ahaatee shirkadda SLU waxaa ka mid ah calaamado badan oo kala duduwan (sawiraad), kuwaas oo turjumayaasha guud si wanaagsan u maamuli karaan, si uusan ugu sheegin kala duwan dhaqanka kale. Kanu warqaddaas wuxuu ku kalsoonaadaa shaqada ku wareejinta luqada, kaas oo lagu siiyey mid yar oo ku qoran SLU korpus. Turjubaanka guud waxaa lagu isticmaali karaa kaarka lambarka ah. Laakiin si muhiimka ah, waxaynu tusnaynaa sida loo isticmaalayo waxbarashada kordhiska (RL) si aan u beddelo turjubaanka la hagay, meesha lagu turjumay hadallada lagu qoray alaabta saxda ah oo lagu qoray, waxay heli karaan mushaar sare. Our reward is derived from the source input sentence exclusively, unlike reward via actor-critical methods or computing reward with a ground truth target sentence.  Sidaas darteed turjubaanka mar labaad ayaannu ku beddeli karnaa luqada asalka ah ee SLU-ka. Waxaynu qiimeynaynaa qaabilaada ku saabsan afka ingiriisiga ee lagu wareejiyo nidaamka SLU. Imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qofka afka Ingiriiska ka soo dhashay ee iskuulka kordhiska iyo horumarinta barashada ayaa nooga siiya in ka badan 97% oo ku qoran iskuulka F1 iyo in ka badan 84% saxa fasaxa gudaha. waxay muujisaa shaqada la soo jeeday\nhabka bedelka luqada Isbarbardhigtii tarjumaadda naive ah, qaababkayaga la soo jeeday wuxuu kordhiyaa saxda fasalka internetka, wuxuuna ka buuxinayaa kooxda F1 qiimeynta si ka badan 71 boqolkiiba.', 'sv': 'För att implementera en modell för talad språkförståelse (SLU) på ett nytt språk är språköverföring önskvärd för att undvika besväret med att förvärva och märka en ny stor SLU-korpus. En SLU-korpus är en enspråkig korpus med domän/intent/slot etiketter. Att översätta SLU:s ursprungliga korpus till målspråket är en attraktiv strategi. SLU Corpora består dock av massor av semantiska etiketter (slots), som generella översättare inte kan hantera väl, för att inte tala om ytterligare kulturskillnader. Denna uppsats fokuserar på den språköverförande uppgiften givet en liten parallell SLU-korpus inom domänen. Den parallella korpusen inom domänen kan användas som den första anpassningen på den allmänna översättaren. Men ännu viktigare är att vi visar hur man använder armering learning (RL) för att ytterligare anpassa den anpassade översättaren, där översatta meningar med mer korrekta spelautomater får högre belöning. Vår belöning härrör uteslutande från källinmatningen, till skillnad från belöning via skådespelarkritiska metoder eller beräkning av belöning med en grundsanning målmening. Därför kan vi anpassa översättaren andra gången med hjälp av den stora enspråkiga SLU-korpusen från källspråket. Vi utvärderar vårt förhållningssätt till kinesiska till engelska språköverföring för SLU-system. De experimentella resultaten visar att den genererade engelska SLU-korpusen via anpassnings- och förstärkningsinlärning ger oss över 97% i slot F1 poäng och över 84% noggrannhet i domänklassificering. Det visar att det föreslagna förslaget är effektivt.\nMetod för språköverföring. Jämfört med naiv översättning förbättrar vår föreslagna metod domänklassificeringsnoggrannheten med relativt 22%, och spelfyllningen F1 poäng med relativt mer än 71%.', 'sr': 'Da bi razumeo govorno jezičko razumijevanje (SLU) model na novi jezik, potrebno je prebacivanje jezika da izbjegne nevolje prikupljanja i označavanja novog velikog SLU korpusa. SLU korpus je monojezički korpus sa etiketama domena/namjere/slot a. Prevoditi originalni SLU korpus na ciljni jezik je privlačna strategija. Međutim, SLU korpora sastoji se od mnogih semantičkih etiketa (slota), koje prevoditelji generalne svrhe ne mogu dobro podnijeti, ne spominjati dodatne razlike kulture. Ovaj papir se fokusira na posao prebacivanja jezika s obzirom na mali paralelni SLU korpus u domenu. Paralelni korpus u domenu može se iskoristiti kao prva adaptacija generalnog prevodioca. Ali važnije je da pokažemo kako da koristimo učenje pojačanja (RL) kako bi se dalje prilagodila prilagođeni prevoditelj, gdje prevedena rečenica sa odgovarajućim znakovima slota primaju veće nagrade. Naša nagrada dolazi iz izvorne rečenice, isključivo, za razliku od nagrade kroz kritične metode glumca ili računalo nagradu sa ciljnom rečenicom istine. Zato možemo prilagoditi prevoditelja drugi put, koristeći veliki monojezički SLU korpus iz izvornog jezika. Procjenjujemo naš pristup kineskom premeštaju engleskog jezika za SLU sisteme. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da proizvedeni engleski SLU korpus kroz adaptaciju i učenje pojačanja daje nam više od 97% u rezultatu F1 slota i preko 84% tačnosti u klasifikaciji domena. To pokazuje učinkovitost predloženog\nmetoda prebacivanja jezika. U usporedbi sa naivnim prevodom, naša predložena metoda poboljšava tačnost klasifikacije domena za relativno 22%, i slot ispunjavanja rezultata F1 relativno više od 71%.', 'si': 'කතා කරපු භාෂාව තේරුම (SLU) මොඩල් අලුත් භාෂාවෙන්, භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා අලුත් ලොකු SLU කොර්පස් එකක් ගන් SLU කොර්පස් එක තමයි මොනෝභාෂික කොර්පස් එකක්. මූලික SLU කොර්පුස්ව මුළික භාෂාවට අනුවාදනය කරන්න පුළුවන් භාෂාවක් වගේ. නමුත්, SLU කොර්පෝරා එක්ක සෙමැන්ටික් ලෙබෙල්ල (ස්ලෝට්) ගොඩක් තියෙන්නේ, ඒ සාමාන්\u200dය-අදහස් විදියට ප්\u200dරතිකාරකයන්ට මේ පැත්තේ භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා ක්\u200dරියාව පොඩි ප්\u200dරවර්තනයක් තියෙන්නේ SLU කොර්පස්. සාමාන්\u200dය වාර්තකයේ පළමුවෙනි සමාන්\u200dය කොර්පස් වලින් භාවිත කරන්න පුළුවන්. ඒත් වැදගත් වැදගත්, අපි පෙන්වන්නේ කොහොමද උදව්වන්නේ ඉගෙනගන්නේ (RL) කියලා, අනුමාණික වාර්තාකරණය සඳහා වාර්තාකරණය කරන්න අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන ඉතින් අපිට පුළුවන් දෙවෙනි වතාවක් වාර්තාවක් සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, මුළු භාෂාවෙන් ලොකු එක භාෂාවක් SL අපි චීනි භාෂයෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාෂයේ SLU පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරනවා කියලා අපේ අවශ්\u200dය ව පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ ඉංග්\u200dරීසි SLU කොර්පුස් එක සැකසුම් සහ උපරීක්ෂණය සඳහා උපරීක්ෂණය සඳහා අපිට 97% වඩා දෙනවා F1 ක ඒක පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක්\nභාෂාව ස්ථානය කරන්න විධානය. අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාපනය සමඟ සම්බන්ධයෙන්, අපේ ප්\u200dරශ්න විද්\u200dයාපනය සම්බන්ධයෙන් ඩොමේන් ක්\u200dරියාපනය සම්බන්ධයෙන් 22%, සහ', 'ta': 'பேசும் மொழி ஒரு எஸ்எல்யு கோர்ப்ஸ் டொமைன்/இலக்கு/செருகுக்கு சிட்டைகள் உள்ளது. இலக்கு மொழிக்கு மொழியை மொழிபெயர்ப்பு முதல் SLU கார்ப்ஸ் ஒரு ஆச்சரியமான திட்டம். ஆனால், SLU நிறுவனத்தில் கூடுதல் கூடுதல் கலாச்சார வேறுபாடுகளை குறிப்பிட முடியாது. Name The domain- in- the parallel corpus can be used as the first adaptation on the general translator. ஆனால் முக்கியமானது, அதிக சரியான வாக்குறிகளுடன் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு சொல்லப்பட்ட வாக்கியங்களுடன் மொழிபெயர்ப்பினை மேலும் மாற்ற வேண்டும் என் எங்கள் கூலி மூலத்தின் உள்ளீட்டு வாக்கியத்திலிருந்து மட்டும் கிடைக்கப்பட்டது, நடிகர் சுருக்கமான முறைகள் மூலம் அல்லது ஒரு நிலை  Hence we can adapt the translator the second time, using the big monolingual SLU corpus from the source language.  SLU அமைப்புகளுக்காக எங்கள் சீனா மொழி மொழியை மாற்றுவதற்கு எங்கள் செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம். பரிசோதனை முடிவு இது பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட விளைவை காட்டுகிறது\nமொழி மாற்றும் முறைமை நைய மொழிபெயர்ப்பாட்டை ஒப்பிட்டால், எங்கள் பரிந்துரைய முறைமையில் களம் வகைப்பாட்டின் சரியை 22%, மற்றும் சுருக்கமாக F1 புள்ளியை நி', 'ur': 'ایک بات کی زبان سمجھنے کے لئے (SLU) مدل کو نوی زبان میں استعمال کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ زبان کا انتقال کرنا چاہتا ہے کہ ایک نوی بڑی SLU کورپوس حاصل کرنے اور لیبل کرنے کے مشکل سے منع کرے۔ ایک SLU کورپوس ایک منوزبانی کورپوس ہے جو ڈمین/انتظام/لٹ لیبل کے ساتھ ہے. موجود SLU کورپوس کو موجود زبان میں ترجمہ کرنا ایک اچھا استراتژی ہے۔ However, SLU corpora consists of many semantic labels (slots), which general-purpose translators cannot handle well, not to mention additional culture differences. This paper focuses on the language transferring task given a small in-domain parallel SLU corpus. ڈومین میں پارالٹ کورپوس کی پہلی تغییرات کے طور پر استعمال کر سکتا ہے. لیکن زیادہ اہم نشان دیتے ہیں کہ مضبوط تعلیم (RL) کو اضافہ کرنے کے لئے کس طرح استعمال کرنا ہے، جہاں مضبوط جگہ مضبوط جگہ لٹ ٹاگ کے ساتھ ترجمہ کیا جاتا ہے، اس میں بہت اضافہ پاتے ہیں. ہمارا اجر صرف سورج اینپ جماعت سے پایا گیا ہے، جو اکٹر کریٹریک طریقے سے بدلہ یا مزدوری کی کمپیوٹ کرتی ہے، ایک حقیقی مقررہ جماعت کے ساتھ. اسی وجہ سے ہم دوسری بار ترجمہ کو اضافہ کر سکتے ہیں، سورج زبان سے بزرگ ایک زبان کے SLU کورپوس کے استعمال سے۔ ہم چینی کے ذریعہ انگلیسی زبان کے ذریعے اپنے طریقے کا ارزش کرتے ہیں جو SLU سیسٹم کے لئے انتقال کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش کے نتائج دکھاتے ہیں کہ انگلیسی SLU کورپوس کو اضافہ اور مضبوط تعلیم کے ذریعے ہمیں 97% سے زیادہ دیتا ہے F1 سکوٹ میں اور 84% سے زیادہ دقیق ڈومین کلاسیک میں۔ یہ پیشنهاد کی عمدگی دکھاتا ہے\nزبان انتقال روش. نائب ترجمہ کے ساتھ مقایسہ ہوا، ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقہ ڈومین کلاسپیٹ کی دقیقیت 22% کے ذریعہ سے بہتر ہوتی ہے، اور اسلوٹ F1 سکوٹ کو 71% سے زیادہ پورا کرتی ہے۔', 'uz': "Name Name @ info: whatsthis Lekin SLU kompaniyasi bir necha semantik baytlarda (slotlarda) iborat. Umumiy qanday tarjima qiluvchilar yaxshi taʼminlov qila olmaydi, qoʻshimcha madaniyalar ўзгаришларни hisoblash uchun emas. Name Name Lekin eng muhimi bo'lsa, biz o'rganishni qanday qo'shish uchun o'rganishni qo'shish uchun o'rganish (RL) ishlatishni ko'rsamiz. Bu yerda bir so'zlarni ko'proq saqlash teglari bilan tarjima qilish mumkin. Bizning muvaffaqiyatlarimiz faqat manbasiga kiritish muvaffaqiyatlaridan olingan, actor-critical usullar orqali o'xshash paydo ko'rsatish mumkin. Hence we can adapt the translator the second time, using the big monolingual SLU corpus from the source language.  Biz Xitoycha tilida SLU tizimlari uchun o'zgarishga tilimizni qiymatimiz. Tasavvur natijalari esa ingliz tili SLU corpusi tahrirlash va o'rganishni qo'yish orqali 97% dan ortiq keladi F1 scorida va domen darajasiga 84% dan ortiq. Bu so'zlarning tashkilotlarini ko'rsatadi\ntilni almashtirish usuli. @ info: whatsthis", 'vi': 'Để áp dụng một mô hình ngôn ngữ đã nói (chậm hiểu) vào một ngôn ngữ mới, người ta muốn chuyển ngôn ngữ để tránh rắc rối giành được và hiệu chỉnh một tập đoàn tiềm năng tiềm năng lớn mới. Một tập đoàn tiềm năng là một tập thể độc ngôn với nhãn hiệu miền/mục đích/khe hở. Dịch tập đoàn tiềm năng gốc vào ngôn ngữ đích là một chiến lược hấp dẫn. Tuy nhiên, chất dẻo có rất nhiều nhãn theo ngữ nghĩa (các rãnh) mà dịch viên chung không thể xử lý tốt, chưa kể đến sự khác biệt văn hóa. Tờ giấy này tập trung vào nhiệm vụ chuyển ngôn ngữ với một tập đoàn tiềm năng tiềm năng tiềm tàng nhỏ. Tập thể song song song trong miền có thể được dùng làm cơ cấu đầu tiên của phiên dịch chung. Nhưng quan trọng hơn, chúng tôi cho thấy cách sử dụng việc học củng cố (RL) để thích nghi thêm thông dịch, nơi câu đã dịch với các thẻ suất thích hợp nhận phần thưởng cao hơn. Phần thưởng của chúng tôi được hưởng độc quyền từ câu đầu vào, không giống như phần thưởng qua các phương pháp quan trọng hay phần thưởng tính toán với một câu chữ đích thực. Do đó chúng ta có thể thay đổi phiên dịch lần thứ hai, sử dụng phương pháp tiềm năng tiềm thức lớn từ ngôn ngữ nguồn. Chúng tôi đánh giá phương pháp chuyển sang ngôn ngữ Anh cho hệ thống SLE. Các kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy rằng tập đoàn tiềm năng Anh ngữ nhờ nghiên cứu sửa đổi và củng cố cung cấp cho chúng ta hơn 97. trong số con số F1. và hơn 84. độ chính xác trong phân loại miền. Nó chứng minh hiệu quả của dự án\nCách chuyển ngôn ngữ. So với bản dịch ngây thơ, phương pháp đề nghị của chúng ta cải thiện độ chính xác phân loại miền với giá trị tương đối 22=, và tỷ lệ suất suất điền F1 với tỉ lệ cao hơn 71.', 'bg': 'За да се внесе модел за разбиране на говоримия език (СЛУ) на нов език, е желано прехвърлянето на език, за да се избегнат трудностите при придобиването и етикетирането на нов голям корпус. Корпусът е едноезичен корпус с етикети на домейн/намерение/слот. Превеждането на оригиналния корпус на целевия език е привлекателна стратегия. Корпората обаче се състои от много семантични етикети (слотове), с които преводачите с общо предназначение не могат да се справят добре, да не говорим за допълнителните културни различия. Настоящата статия се фокусира върху задачата за пренасяне на езика, дадена на малък паралелен корпус в домейна. Паралелният корпус може да се използва като първа адаптация на общия преводач. Но по-важното е, че ние показваме как да използваме усилвателното обучение, за да адаптираме адаптирания преводач, където преведените изречения с по-подходящи слот тагове получават по-високи награди. Нашата награда се получава изключително от изходното изречение, за разлика от наградата чрез критични за актьорите методи или изчислителна награда с целево изречение на истината. Така можем да адаптираме преводача за втори път, използвайки големия едноезичен корпус от изходния език. Ние оценяваме нашия подход за трансфер на китайски към английски език за системи. Експерименталните резултати показват, че генерираният английски корпус чрез адаптиране и подсилване на обучението ни дава над 97% в резултат на слот и над 84% точност в класификацията на домейна. Доказва ефективността на предложените\nметод за прехвърляне на език. В сравнение с наивния превод, предложеният ни метод подобрява точността на класификацията на домейните с относително 22%, а оценката за запълване на слотове с относително повече от 71%.', 'hr': 'Da bi se razumio govorni jezik (SLU) model na novi jezik, željela je prebaciti jezik kako bi se izbjegao nevolja prikupljanja i označavanja novog velikog SLU korpusa. SLU korpus je monojezički korpus s etiketama domena/namjere/slot a. Prevoditi originalni SLU korpus na ciljni jezik je privlačna strategija. Međutim, SLU tijelo sastoji se od dosta semantičkih etiketa (slota), koje se prevoditelji generalne svrhe ne mogu dobro podnijeti, ne spominjati dodatne razlike kulture. Ovaj papir se fokusira na zadatak prebacivanja jezika s obzirom na mali paralelni SLU korpus u domenu. Paralelni korpus u domenu može se koristiti kao prva prilagodba općeg prevodioca. Ali još važnije, pokazujemo kako koristiti učenje pojačanja (RL) kako bi se dalje prilagodila prilagođeni prevoditelj, gdje prevedena rečenica sa odgovarajućim znakovima slota primaju veće nagrade. Naša nagrada je proizvedena iz izvornog ulaznog rečenica isključivo, za razliku od nagrade kroz kritične metode glumca ili računalo nagradu sa ciljnom kaznom istine. Stoga možemo prilagoditi prevoditelja drugi put, koristeći veliki monojezički SLU korpus iz izvornog jezika. Procjenjujemo naš pristup kineskom premještaju engleskog jezika za SLU sustave. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da proizvedeni engleski SLU korpus kroz adaptaciju i učenje pojačanja daje nam više od 97% u rezultatu F1 slota i preko 84% preciznosti u klasifikaciji domena. To pokazuje učinkovitost predloženog\nmetoda prebacivanja jezika. U usporedbi s naivnim prevodom, naša predložena metoda poboljšava preciznost klasifikacije domena relativno 22%, a slot ispunjavajući rezultat F1 relativno više od 71%.', 'da': 'For at implementere en talesprogforståelsesmodel (SLU) til et nyt sprog ønskes sprogoverførsel for at undgå besværet med at erhverve og mærke et nyt stort SLU korpus. Et SLU-korpus er et ensproget korpus med domæne/intent/slot etiketter. At oversætte det oprindelige SLU-korpus til målsproget er en attraktiv strategi. SLU corpora består imidlertid af masser af semantiske etiketter (slots), som generelle oversættere ikke kan håndtere godt, for ikke at nævne yderligere kulturelle forskelle. Denne artikel fokuserer på sprogoverførselsopgaven givet et lille parallelt SLU-korpus. Den in-domæne parallelle korpus kan bruges som den første tilpasning på den generelle oversætter. Men vigtigere er, at vi viser, hvordan man bruger forstærkningslæring (RL) til yderligere at tilpasse den tilpassede oversætter, hvor oversatte sætninger med mere passende slot tags får højere belønninger. Vores belønning stammer udelukkende fra kildeindgangssætningen, i modsætning til belønning via skuespillerkritiske metoder eller beregning belønning med en grundlæggende sandhedsmålssætning. Derfor kan vi tilpasse oversætteren anden gang ved hjælp af det store ensprogede SLU korpus fra kildesproget. Vi evaluerer vores tilgang til kinesisk til engelsk sprogoverførsel til SLU systemer. De eksperimentelle resultater viser, at det genererede engelske SLU korpus via tilpasning og forstærkning læring giver os over 97% i slot F1 score og over 84% nøjagtighed i domæneklassificering. Det viser effektiviteten af det foreslåede forslag\nsprogoverførselsmetode. Sammenlignet med naiv oversættelse forbedrer vores foreslåede metode domæneklassificeringsnøjagtigheden med relativt 22%, og slot fyldning F1 score med relativt mere end 71%.', 'nl': 'Om een gesproken taalbegrip (SLU) model in een nieuwe taal te implementeren, is taaloverdracht gewenst om de moeite van het verwerven en labelen van een nieuw groot SLU-corpus te vermijden. Een SLU corpus is een eentalig corpus met domein/intent/slot labels. Het vertalen van het originele SLU-corpus naar de doeltaal is een aantrekkelijke strategie. SLU-corpora bestaat echter uit tal van semantische labels (slots), die universele vertalers niet goed aankunnen, om nog maar te zwijgen van extra cultuurverschillen. Dit artikel richt zich op de taaloverdrachttaak met een klein in-domein parallel SLU corpus. Het in-domein parallelle corpus kan worden gebruikt als eerste bewerking op de algemene vertaler. Maar belangrijker is dat we laten zien hoe we versterking learning (RL) kunnen gebruiken om de aangepaste vertaler verder aan te passen, waarbij vertaalde zinnen met meer juiste slot tags hogere beloningen krijgen. Onze beloning wordt uitsluitend afgeleid van de broninvoerzin, in tegenstelling tot beloning via actor-kritische methoden of het berekenen van beloning met een basis waarheid doelzin. Zo kunnen we de vertaler de tweede keer aanpassen met behulp van het grote eentalige SLU-corpus uit de brontaal. We evalueren onze aanpak van Chinees naar Engels taaloverdracht voor SLU-systemen. De experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat het gegenereerde Engelse SLU corpus via adaptatie en versterking leren ons meer dan 97% geeft in de slot F1 score en meer dan 84% nauwkeurigheid in domeinclassificatie. Het bewijst de doeltreffendheid van de voorgestelde maatregelen.\ntaaloverdrachtsmethode. Vergeleken met naïeve vertaling, verbetert onze voorgestelde methode de nauwkeurigheid van de domeinclassificatie met relatief 22%, en de slotvullende F1 score met relatief meer dan 71%.', 'de': 'Um ein Sprachverständnismodell (SLU) für eine neue Sprache einzusetzen, ist der Sprachtransfer erwünscht, um die Schwierigkeiten beim Erwerb und Beschriften eines neuen großen SLU-Korpus zu vermeiden. Ein SLU-Korpus ist ein einsprachiger Korpus mit Domain/Intent/Slot Labels. Die Übersetzung des ursprünglichen SLU-Korpus in die Zielsprache ist eine attraktive Strategie. SLU-Korpora bestehen jedoch aus vielen semantischen Labels (Slots), mit denen Allgemeinübersetzer nicht gut umgehen können, ganz zu schweigen von zusätzlichen Kulturunterschieden. Diese Arbeit konzentriert sich auf die Sprachübertragungsaufgabe mit einem kleinen in-domain parallelen SLU-Korpus. Der in-domain parallele Korpus kann als erste Anpassung an den Generalübersetzer verwendet werden. Aber noch wichtiger ist, dass wir zeigen, wie man Enhancement Learning (RL) nutzt, um den angepassten Übersetzer weiter anzupassen, wo übersetzte Sätze mit angemesseneren Slot Tags höhere Belohnungen erhalten. Unsere Belohnung wird ausschließlich aus dem Quelleingangssatz abgeleitet, anders als Belohnung durch akteurkritische Methoden oder Berechnung der Belohnung mit einem Grundsatz der Wahrheit. So können wir den Übersetzer zum zweiten Mal anpassen, indem wir das große einsprachige SLU-Korpus aus der Ausgangssprache verwenden. Wir evaluieren unseren Ansatz zur Übertragung von Chinesisch auf Englisch für SLU-Systeme. Die experimentellen Ergebnisse zeigen, dass der durch Adaptation und Verstärkungslernen generierte englische SLU-Korpus über 97% im Slot F1 Score und über 84% Genauigkeit in der Domänenklassifikation liefert. Es zeigt die Wirksamkeit der vorgeschlagenen\nSprachübertragungsmethode. Im Vergleich zur naiven Übersetzung verbessert unsere vorgeschlagene Methode die Genauigkeit der Domänenklassifikation um relativ 22%, und die Slot Füllung F1 Score um relativ mehr als 71%.', 'id': 'Untuk memposisikan model pemahaman bahasa berbicara (SLU) ke bahasa baru, pemindahan bahasa diinginkan untuk menghindari kesulitan memperoleh dan mengetikkan korpus SLU besar baru. Sebuah SLU corpus adalah corpus monobahasa dengan label domain/tujuan/slot. Menerjemahkan corpus asli SLU ke bahasa sasaran adalah strategi menarik. Namun, SLU corpora terdiri dari banyak label semantis (slots), yang penerjemah tujuan umum tidak dapat menangani dengan baik, untuk tidak menyebutkan perbedaan budaya tambahan. Kertas ini fokus pada tugas pemindahan bahasa yang diberikan sebuah SLU corpus paralel kecil dalam domain. The in-domain parallel corpus can be used as the first adaptation on the general translator.  Namun yang paling penting, kami menunjukkan bagaimana menggunakan belajar pengingkatan (RL) untuk lebih lanjut menyesuaikan penerjemah yang disesuaikan, di mana kalimat diterjemahkan dengan tag slot yang lebih tepat menerima hadiah yang lebih tinggi. Hadiah kami berasal dari kalimat input sumber eksklusif, tidak seperti hadiah melalui metode kritis aktor atau penghitungan hadiah dengan kalimat sasaran kebenaran dasar. Oleh karena itu kita dapat menyesuaikan penerjemah kedua kalinya, menggunakan corpus SLU monobahasa besar dari bahasa sumber. Kami mengevaluasi pendekatan kita pada bahasa Cina ke bahasa Inggris yang dipindahkan untuk sistem SLU. Hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa corpus SLU Inggris yang dihasilkan melalui pengadaptasi dan pembelajaran bantuan memberikan kita lebih dari 97% dalam skor slot F1 dan lebih dari 84% akurasi dalam klasifikasi domain. Ini menunjukkan efektivitas yang diusulkan\nmetode pemindahan bahasa. Compared with naive translation, our proposed method improves domain classification accuracy by relatively 22%, and the slot filling F1 score by relatively more than 71%.', 'sw': 'Kutumia muundo wa kuelewa lugha inayozungumzwa (SLU) kwa lugha mpya, uhamishaji wa lugha unalengwa kuepuka matatizo ya kupata na kuitaja kampuni mpya ya SLU. Shirika la SLU ni chombo cha lugha ya kiutani na maabara ya ndani/lengo/slot. Kutafsiri makampuni ya asili ya SLU katika lugha ya lengo ni mkakati wa kuvutia. Hata hivyo, kampuni ya SLU inajumuisha alama nyingi za kisasa (mistari), ambazo watafsiri wa jumla hawawezi kukabiliana vizuri, wala kutotaja tofauti za utamaduni wa ziada. Papa hii inajikita kwenye kazi ya kuhamisha lugha iliyotolewa na makampuni madogo yaliyofanana na SLU. Kikosi cha usambazaji wa ndani kinaweza kutumika kama upatikanaji wa kwanza kwa mtafsiri mkuu. Lakini muhimu zaidi, tunaonyesha namna ya kutumia elimu ya kuuza (RL) ili kubadilisha zaidi watafsiri aliyependekezwa, ambapo kutafsiri sentensi yenye alama sahihi zaidi zinazopata malipo ya juu. Malipo yetu yametolewa kutoka kwenye hukumu ya kituo hicho pekee, tofauti na malipo kwa njia za muhimu za mwigizaji au kuchukua malipo kwa hukumu ya ukweli ya msingi. Kwa hiyo tunaweza kubadilisha tafsiri kwa mara ya pili, kwa kutumia viungo vikubwa vya SLU katika lugha ya asili. Tunatathmini mbinu yetu kuhusu lugha ya Kiingereza kwa ajili ya mfumo wa SLU. The experimental results show that the generated English SLU corpus via adaptation and reinforcement learning gives us over 97% in the slot F1 score and over 84% accuracy in domain classification.  Inaonyesha ufanisi wa pendekezo\nnjia ya kuhamisha lugha. Kulinganishwa na tafsiri ya kibinafsi, mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa inaboresha uhakika wa usawa wa ndani kwa asilimia 22, na kurasa inayojaza vipimo vya F1 kwa kiasi kikubwa zaidi ya asilimia 71.', 'fa': 'برای استفاده از یک مدل درک زبانی صحبت می\u200cکند (SLU) به زبان جدید، انتقال زبانی می\u200cخواهد از مشکلات دریافت و برچسب یک کورپوس بزرگ SLU فرار کند. یک کورپوس SLU یک کورپوس تنها زبان است که با برچسب\u200cهای دومین/هدف/نقشه\u200cهای نقشه است. ترجمه شرکت اصلی SLU به زبان هدف یک استراتژی جذابی است. با این حال، شرکت SLU از بسیاری از نقاشی\u200cهای semantic (slots) است که ترجمه\u200cکنندگان هدف عمومی نمی\u200cتوانند خوب کنترل کنند، و نه به تفاوت فرهنگ اضافه اشاره کنند. این کاغذ روی کار انتقال زبان را تمرکز می\u200cکند که به یک کوچک کوچک در دامنه متفاوت SLU کوچک داده شده است. شرکت پارالی در دامنه می تواند به عنوان اولین تغییرات تولید کننده عمومی استفاده شود. ولی مهمتر است که ما نشان می دهیم چگونه از یادگیری افزایش (RL) استفاده کنیم تا بیشتر ترجمه\u200cکننده\u200cی ترجمه\u200cکننده را adapt کنیم، جایی که جمله\u200cهای ترجمه\u200cکننده با نقاشی\u200cهای نقاشی مناسب\u200cتر پاداش بالاتر را می\u200cگیرند پاداش ما از محکوم ورودی منبع خالص به اختلاف پاداش از طریق روش\u200cهای سنجیده\u200cی بازیگر یا پاداش محکوم کردن با یک محکوم هدف حقیقت زمینی است. بنابراین ما می توانیم ترجمه را دومین بار با استفاده از کورپوس بزرگ یک زبان SLU از زبان منبع adapt کنیم. ما روش چینی را به زبان انگلیسی انتقال برای سیستم\u200cهای SLU ارزیابی می\u200cکنیم. نتیجه آزمایشی نشان می دهد که کورپوس انگلیسی SLU تولید شده از طریق تعلیم سازی و افزایش یادگیری بیش از 97 درصد در نقطه F1 و بیش از 84 درصد دقیق تولید کردن درمیان ما را می دهد. این نشان می دهد که فعالیت پیشنهاد\nروش انتقال زبان. در مقایسه با ترجمه ساده، روش پیشنهاد ما دقیق ترجمه کردن دامنه را با نسبت ۲۲ درصد بهتر می\u200cکند، و نقطه\u200cای که امتیاز F1 را با نسبت به 71 درصد پر می\u200cکند.', 'ko': '구어 이해(SLU) 모델을 새로운 언어에 배치하기 위해서는 새로운 대형 SLU 자료 라이브러리를 가져오고 표시하는 번거로움을 피하기 위해 언어 이동이 필요하다.SLU 자료 라이브러리는 도메인/의도/간격 태그가 있는 단일 자료 라이브러리입니다.원본 SLU 자료 라이브러리를 목표 언어로 번역하는 것은 매우 매력적인 전략이다.그러나 SLU 자료 라이브러리는 대량의 의미 라벨(홈)으로 구성되어 있어 통용 번역자가 이런 라벨을 잘 처리할 수 없고 추가적인 문화 차이는 말할 것도 없다.본고는 주로 작은 역내 병행 SLU 자료 라이브러리의 언어 이전 임무를 연구한다.역내 평행 어료 라이브러리는 일반 번역자에 대한 첫 번째 개편으로 쓸 수 있다.그러나 더 중요한 것은 강화학습(RL)을 어떻게 사용하여 조정된 번역자를 더욱 조정하는지 보여주는 것이다. 이런 상황에서 더욱 적합한 시간 표시를 가진 번역문장은 더욱 높은 보답을 얻을 수 있다.우리의 보상은 완전히 입력 문장에서 나온 것으로 배우의 비판 방법이나 기본적인 사실 목표 문장을 사용하여 보상을 계산하는 것과 다르다.따라서 우리는 원시 언어의 대형 단어 SLU 자료 라이브러리를 사용하여 번역자를 두 번째로 개편할 수 있다.SLU 시스템에 대한 중국어 변환 방법을 평가했습니다.실험 결과 학습에 적응하고 강화함으로써 생성된 영어 SLU 어료 라이브러리는 틈새 F1 평점에서 97%, 영역 분류에서 84%를 넘는 정확도를 보였다.이것은 이 방법의 유효성을 증명하였다\n언어 이동 방법.소박한 번역에 비해 본고가 제시한 방법은 22%의 영역 분류 정확도를 높였고 틈새 충전 F1 득점을 71% 이상 높였다.', 'tr': 'G체rle첵채n dil d체힊체n체힊i (SLU) nusgasyny t채ze bir dile g철챌체rmek 체챌in, dil terjime etmek 체챌in t채ze uly SLU korpusu almak we etiketlemek kyn챌ylygyndan 챌ykmak isle첵채r. An SLU corpus is a monolingual corpus with domain/intent/slot labels. 횜흫ki SLU korpusyny maksady흫 diline terjime etmek - lezzetli stratejidir. 횦철ne, SLU k철p체ri semantik etiketlerden bolup, umumy maksady terjimeleri흫 gowy ba힊aryp bilme첵채n, a힊캇r캇 k체lt체ri흫 체첵tge힊iklerini a첵tmak 체챌in. Bu kagyz SLU k철p체si i챌inde ki챌i bir domenyda berilen dil aktarma t채bligine 체ns ber첵채r. domain parallel korpusu umumiy terjimede ilkinji adaptasyon olarak kullan캇labilir. Emma i흫 wajyp bolsa, biz esaplary dogry slot t채gleri bilen terjime eden s철zlerni흫 체st체ne t채gleri ala첵arys. Bizi흫 t채mi첵etimiz 챌e힊me giri힊 s철zlerinden di흫e, akt철r-kritik y철ntemleri bilen t채mi첵eti 첵ok, 첵철ne 첵erli dogry s철zleri흫 bilen t채mi첵eti hasaplamaga m체mkin ed첵채r. 힇onu흫 체챌in biz terjime챌ini ikinji gezek 체첵tgedip bileris, t채ze monodil SLU korpusyndan ullan첵arys. SLU sistemalary 체챌in Hyta첵 dilinde I흫lis챌e diline golamyzy 챌yk첵arys. Deneymeli netijeler guruldyran I흫lisi흫 SLU korpusyny흫 adaptasy첵a we g체챌lendirme 철wrenmesi 체챌in bize 97% 체stden 체st tut첵andygyny g철rkez첵채r. Bu teklip etkinle힊igini g철rkez첵채r.\ndil tar Na첵w terjime bilen g철r채, teklip eden metodumyz domena klasifikasy첵asyny흫 dogrylygyny 22%-채 g철r채 geli힊첵채r we slot dolduran F1 notlaryny 71%-den k철p g철r채 geli힊첵채r.', 'af': "Om 'n praat taal verstanding (SLU) model na' n nuwe taal te verwyder, taal oordraging is gewens om die probleem van aanvang en etiket van 'n nuwe groot SLU korpus te vervaar. 'n SLU korpus is 'n monolinglike korpus met domein/doel/slot etikette. Vertaling van die oorspronklike SLU korpus in die doel taal is 'n atraktive strategie. Alhoewel, SLU korpora bestaan van volledige semantiese etikette (slots), wat algemeen- doel vertalingers kan nie goed behandel nie, nie om addisionele kultuur verskille te mentioneer nie. Hierdie papier fokus op die taal oordrag taak gegee 'n klein in- domein parallele SLU corpus. Die in- domein parallele korpus kan gebruik word as die eerste aanpassing op die algemene vertaling. Maar meer belangrik, wys ons hoe om versterking leer (RL) te gebruik om die aanpasde vertaling verder te pas waar vertalings met meer regverdige slot etikette ontvang hoër vergelde. Ons loon is uitgelei van die bron invoer seting eksklusief, ongelukkig loon deur actor-kritiese metodes of rekenaar loon met 'n grond waarheid doel seting. Daarom kan ons die vertaling die tweede keer aanpas, gebruik die groot monolinguele SLU korpus van die bron taal. Ons evalueer ons toegang op Sjinees na Engels taal oordrag vir SLU stelsels. Die eksperimentale resultate wys dat die genereerde Engelse SLU korpus deur aanpassing en versterking leer gee ons oor 97% in die slot F1 punt en oor 84% presies in domein klasifikasie. Dit wys die effektiviteit van die voorgestelde\ntaal oordragmetode. Vergelyk met naive vertaling, ons voorgestelde metode verbeter domein klasifikasie-presisie deur relativief 22%, en die slot met F1-telling met relativief meer as 71%.", 'sq': 'Për të vendosur një model të kuptimit të gjuhës së folur (SLU) në një gjuhë të re, transferimi i gjuhës është i dëshiruar për të shmangur problemet e blerjes dhe etiketimit të një korpusi të ri të madh SLU. Një corpus SLU është një corpus monogjuhës me etiketa domini/qëllimi/slot. Trakthimi i trupit origjinal SLU në gjuhën e objektivit është një strategji tërheqëse. Megjithatë, korpra SLU përbëhet nga shumë etiketa semantike (slots), të cilat përkthyesit me qëllim të përgjithshëm nuk mund të trajtojnë mirë, pa përmendur dallime shtesë kulturore. Ky dokument përqëndrohet në detyrën e transferimit të gjuhës të dhënë një korpus të vogël SLU paralel në domeni. Korpus paralel në domeni mund të përdoret si përshtatja e parë në përkthyesin e përgjithshëm. Por më e rëndësishme, ne tregojmë se si të përdorim mësimin e forcimit (RL) për të përshtatur më tej përkthyesin e përshtatur, ku fjalët e përkthyera me etiketa më të përshtatshme slot marrin shpërblime më të larta. Shpërblimi ynë vjen vetëm nga fjala e hyrjes së burimit, ndryshe nga shpërblimi nëpërmjet metodave kritike aktorit apo llogaritjes së shpërblimit me një fjalë të vërtetë objektiv. Kështu ne mund të përshtatemi përkthyesin herën e dytë, duke përdorur corpus të madh SLU monogjuhës nga gjuha e burimit. Ne vlerësojmë qasjen tonë në gjuhën kineze në gjuhën angleze që transferohet për sistemet SLU. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se trupi anglez SLU i gjeneruar nëpërmjet mësimit të përshtatjes dhe forcimit na jep mbi 97% në pikën e slot F1 dhe mbi 84% saktësi në klasifikimin e domenit. Ajo demonstron efektshmërinë e propozuar\nmetoda e transferimit të gjuhës. Compared with naive translation, our proposed method improves domain classification accuracy by relatively 22%, and the slot filling F1 score by relatively more than 71%.', 'hy': 'Խոսվող լեզվի հասկացության (ՍԼU) մոդելի օգտագործման համար նոր լեզվի համար, լեզվի փոխանցումը ցանկանում է խուսափել նոր մեծ ՍԼU-ի կորպուսի գնելու և նշանակելու խնդիրներից: ՍԼՈ կորպուսը միալեզու կորպուս է, որն ունի տիեզերքի, նպատակի և վայրի պիտակներ: Առաջին ՍԼՈ կորպոսի թարգմանումը նպատակային լեզվի մեջ գրավիչ ռազմավարություն է: Սակայն, ՍԼU-ի կոպորան բազմաթիվ սեմանտիկ պիտակներ է կազմում, որոնք ընդհանուր նպատակով թարգմանիչները չեն կարող լավ վերաբերվել, չնշելով ավելին մշակութային տարբերությունները: Այս հոդվածը կենտրոնանում է լեզվի փոխանցման խնդրի վրա, որը տրվում է մի փոքր բնագավառի զուգահեռ Դոմենային զուգահեռ կորպուսը կարող է օգտագործվել որպես ընդհանուր թարգմանիչի առաջին ադապտացիան: Բայց ավելի կարևոր է, որ մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, թե ինչպես օգտագործել ուժեղացման ուսումնասիրությունը (RL) ադապտացված թարգմանիչը, որտեղ թարգմանված նախադասությունները ավելի ճիշտ վայրերի նշաններով ավելի բարձր վարձ են ստանում: Մեր պարգևը ստացվում է միայն աղբյուր ներմուծի նախադասությունից, ի տարբերություն արժեքը դերասան-կարևոր մեթոդների կամ հաշվարկների պարգևի միջոցով հիմնական ճշմարտության նպատակային նախադասությամբ: Այդ իսկ պատճառով մենք կարող ենք երկրորդ անգամ հարմարեցնել թարգմանիչը, օգտագործելով մեծ միալեզվով ՍԼU կորպուսը աղբյուր լեզվից: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոտեցումը Չինաստանի և Անգլերենի լեզվի փոխանցման հարցում The experimental results show that the generated English SLU corpus via adaptation and reinforcement learning gives us over 97% in the slot F1 score and over 84% accuracy in domain classification.  Այն ցույց է տալիս առաջարկված\nլեզվի փոխանցման մեթոդ: Համեմատելով նայիվ թարգմանման հետ, մեր առաջարկված մեթոդը բարելավում է տիեզերքի դասակարգման ճշգրտությունը հարաբերականորեն 22 տոկոսով, իսկ F1-ի գնահատականը լցված վայրի ընթացքում հարաբերականորեն ավելի քան 71 տո', 'az': 'Sözlü dil anlayışı modelini yeni dilə istifadə etmək üçün dil alması yeni böyük SLU korpusu almaq və etiketləmək çətinliklərindən çəkinmək istəyir. SLU korpusu domena/niyyət/slot etiketləri olan monodilli korpusdur. Özgür SLU korpusu məqsəd dilinə çevirilən bir stratejidir. Ancaq SLU korporası çox semantik etiketlərdən ( slot ) idi. Bunlar genel məqsədilə təkrarlayıcılar yaxşı başa düşə bilməzlər, həmçinin artıq mədəniyyətlərin fərqləşmələrini danışmaqla deyillər. Bu kağıt küçük domena parallel SLU korpusu verilən dil transferinçisi işin ə odaqlanır. Domenin paralel korpusu genel çeviricilərin ilk adaptasiya olaraq istifadə edilə bilər. Lakin daha önemlidir ki, biz həmin cümlələri daha yaxşı slot etiketləri ilə tercümə edilən cümlələri daha yüksək mükafatları alır. Bizim mükafatlarımız, oyuncu kritik metodları vasitəsilə mükafatlarına bənzər, yaxud yerli haqq sözləri ilə mükafatları hesablamaq üçün mənbə giriş cümləsindən istisna edilir. Buna görə də biz tercüməni ikinci dəfə, böyük monodil SLU korpusu mənbə dilindən istifadə edə bilərik. Biz Çinli dillərin SLU sistemləri üçün İngilizə dilinə tərəf gəlməsini təmin edirik. Müxtəlif sonuçlar göstərir ki, İngilizə SLU korpusu uyğunlaşdırma və güclü öyrənmə vasitəsilə olaraq yaratdığı İngilizə SLU korpusu bizi F1 nöqtəsində 97%-dən artırar və domain klasifikasyonunda 84%-dən daha doğruluğu verir. Bu təklif olunan təsirlərin\ndil qeyd metodu. Nəvi tercümə ilə qarşılaşdırıldığımız təklif metodumuz domain klasifikasiyasının doğruluğunu 22%-dən artırar və F1 nöqtəsini 71%-dən artırar.', 'bs': 'Da bi razumeo govorno jezičko razumijevanje (SLU) model na novi jezik, potrebno je prebacivanje jezika izbjegavati nevolje prikupljanja i označavanja novog velikog SLU korpusa. SLU korpus je monojezički korpus sa etiketama domena/namjere/slot a. Prevoditi originalni SLU korpus na ciljni jezik je privlačna strategija. Međutim, SLU korpora sastoji se od dosta semantičkih etiketa (slota), koje prevoditelji generalne svrhe ne mogu dobro podnijeti, ne spominjati dodatne razlike kulture. Ovaj papir se fokusira na zadatak prebacivanja jezika s obzirom na mali paralelni SLU korpus u domenu. Paralelni korpus u domenu može se koristiti kao prva prilagodba generalnog prevodioca. Ali još važnije, pokazujemo kako koristiti učenje pojačanja (RL) kako bi se dalje prilagodila prilagođeni prevoditelj, gdje prevedena rečenica sa odgovarajućim znakovima slota primaju veće nagrade. Naša nagrada je proizvedena iz izvorne rečenice, isključivo, za razliku od nagrade kroz kritične metode glumca ili računalo nagradu sa ciljnom kaznom istine. Stoga možemo prilagoditi prevoditelja drugi put, koristeći veliki monojezički SLU korpus iz izvornog jezika. Procjenjujemo naš pristup kineskom premještaju engleskog jezika za SLU sisteme. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da proizvedeni engleski SLU korpus kroz adaptaciju i učenje pojačanja daje nam više od 97% u rezultatu F1 slota i preko 84% tačnosti u klasifikaciji domena. To pokazuje učinkovitost predloženog\nmetoda prebacivanja jezika. U usporedbi s naivnim prevodom, naša predložena metoda poboljšava preciznost klasifikacije domena za relativno 22%, a slot ispunjavanja rezultata F1 za relativno više od 71%.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ ማስተዋል (SLU) ሞዴል ወደ አዲስ ቋንቋ ለመስጠት፣ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል አዲስ ትልቅ SLU ኮርፓስ ማግኘት መከራን ለመራቀቅ ይፈልጋል፡፡ የSLU ኮርፓስ የዶሜን/የዓይነት/ደረጃ/የመስመር ምልክቶች ነው። የመጀመሪያው SLU ኮርፓስ ወደ አካላዊ ቋንቋ መግለጫ የአሳማሚ strategy ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የSLU ኮርፖርት ብዙዎች የsemantic ምልክቶች (slot) ናቸው፡፡ ይህ ፕሮግራም በቋንቋው ለመለወጥ ስራ ላይ ትኩረት ነው፡፡ በ-domain-parallel corpus በመጀመሪያው ማቀናጃ በአጠቃላይ ትርጓሜ ላይ ይደረጋል፡፡ ነገር ግን አብልጦ የበለጠው፣ እንዴት አበረታዊ ትምህርት (RL) ለመጠቀም እናሳያቸዋለን፡፡ የዋጋችን ዋጋ ከመጀመሪያው የውይይት ውይይት ብቻ ነው፣ በተለየ አካባቢ እና በመሬት አካላቢ ክፍል ዋጋ ወይም ዋጋ እንደተካፈለ ነው፡፡ ስለዚህም ከዋና ቋንቋ የተለየውን ትልቁ የSLU ኮርፓስ በመጠቀም ትርጉሙን ሁለተኛ ጊዜ እናስተካክል ዘንድ እንችላለን፡፡ We evaluate our approach on Chinese to English language transferring for SLU systems.  የፈተናው ውጤቶች የኢንግሊዝኛ SLU ካርፓስ በመቀናቀል እና በማስተማር የሆኑት የኢንጂልዩን አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እየጨመረ የF1 ደረጃ ቁጥር እየጨመረን 97 በመቶ እና በውይይት ግንኙነት ላይ 84 በመቶ ክፍተት ያሳየናል፡፡ የደገመውን ጥያቄ ያሳያል\nቋንቋ በጥያቄ ትርጓሜ በተደረገ፣ በተፈጻሚ ሥርዓታችን የዶሜን መግለጫ ትክክለኛነት በ22 በመቶ ያሳድጋል፣ ስክሮቱም F1 score በሚያበዛው 71 በመቶ ያበዛል፡፡', 'cs': 'Pro nasazení modelu porozumění mluveného jazyka (SLU) do nového jazyka je žádoucí přenos jazyka, aby se zabránilo potížím se získáním a označováním nového velkého SLU korpusu. Korpus SLU je jednojjazyčný korpus s popisky domén/intent/slot. Překlad původního korpusu SLU do cílového jazyka je atraktivní strategie. Korpusy SLU se však skládají z mnoha sémantických štítků (slotů), které univerzální překladatelé nedokážou dobře zvládnout, nemluvě o dalších kulturních rozdílech. Tento článek se zaměřuje na úlohu přenosu jazyka s malým in-doménovým paralelním SLU korpusem. Paralelní korpus v doméně lze použít jako první adaptaci na obecného překladatele. Ale co je důležitější, ukážeme, jak využít zesílení učení (RL) k dalšímu přizpůsobení adaptovaného překladatele, kde přeložené věty s vhodnějšími sloty tagy dostávají vyšší odměny. Naše odměna je odvozena výhradně ze zdrojové vstupní věty, na rozdíl od odměny pomocí metod kritických pro herce nebo výpočtu odměny se základní cílovou větou pravdy. Tím můžeme překladatele přizpůsobit podruhé pomocí velkého jednojjazyčného SLU korpusu ze zdrojového jazyka. Hodnotíme náš přístup k přenosu čínštiny do angličtiny pro SLU systémy. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že generovaný anglický SLU korpus prostřednictvím adaptace a zesílení učení nám dává více než 97% v slotu F1 skóre a přes 84% přesnost v klasifikaci domén. Dokazuje účinnost navrhovaného\nmetoda přenosu jazyka. Ve srovnání s naivním překladem, naše navržená metoda zlepšuje přesnost klasifikace domény relativně 22%, a skóre F1 vyplňující sloty o relativně více než 71%.', 'bn': 'নতুন ভাষায় একটি কথা বলা ভাষা বুঝতে (এসএলইউ) মডেল প্রদান করার জন্য, ভাষা পরিবর্তনের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে নতুন একটি বড় এসএলউ কোর্পাস গ্রহণ এবং লেবেল করা An SLU corpus is a monolingual corpus with domain/intent/slot labels.  টার্গেট ভাষায় মূল SLU কোর্পাস অনুবাদ করা একটি আকর্ষণীয় কৌশল। তবে এসএলইউ কোর্পোরার মধ্যে অনেক সেমেন্টিক লেবেল (স্লোট), যেখানে সাধারণ উদ্দেশ্যের অনুবাদক ভালোভাবে সামলাতে পারে না, আরো সংস এই পত্রিকাটি একটি ছোট্ট এসএলইউ কোর্পাস দিয়ে ভাষা পরিবর্তন করার কাজের উপর মনোযোগ দিয়েছে। ডোমেইনের প্যারালেল কোর্পাস সাধারণ অনুবাদকের প্রথম অ্যাডপেটশন হিসেবে ব্যবহার করা যাবে। But more importantly, we show how to use reinforcement learning (RL) to further adapt the adapted translator, where translated sentences with more proper slot tags receive higher rewards.  আমাদের পুরস্কার শুধুমাত্র সূত্র ইনপুটের কারাদণ্ড থেকে পেয়েছে, অভিনেত্রী সমালোচনা পদ্ধতির মাধ্যমে পুরস্কার না করা হয়েছে অথব তাই আমরা দ্বিতীয় বার অনুবাদককে মানাতে পারি, উৎস ভাষা থেকে বিশাল মোনোলিভাল এসএলউ কোর্পাস ব্যবহার করে। আমরা চীনা থেকে ইংরেজি ভাষার প্রতি এসএলইউ সিস্টেম পরিবর্তনের জন্য আমাদের পদক্ষেপ মূল্যায়ন করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখা যাচ্ছে যে তৈরি করা ইংরেজি এসএলইউ কোর্পাসের মাধ্যমে ক্ষেত্রে এবং শিক্ষা বাড়িয়ে দেয়া হয়েছে স্লোট এফ১ স্কোরে এবং ডোমেইনের ব এটি প্রস্তাবিত প্রভাব প্রদর্শন করেছেন\nভাষা ট্রান্সফার্সিং পদ্ধতি। নাইভ অনুবাদের তুলনায়, আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি ২২ শতাংশের মাধ্যমে ডোমেইন ক্লাসিফিকেশনের সঠিকভাবে উন্নত করে, এবং স্লোটটি এফ১ স্কোর পূ', 'ca': "Per implementar un model d'enteniment del llenguatge parlat (SLU) a un nou llenguatge, es desitge transferir el llenguatge per evitar el problema d'adquirir i etiquetar un nou gran corpus SLU. Un corpus SLU és un corpus monolingüe amb etiquetes de domini/intenció/slot. La traducció del corpus original de la SLU al llenguatge d'objectiu és una estratègia atractiva. Tanmateix, el corpora SLU consisteix en moltes etiquetes semàntiques (slots), que els traductors de propòsit general no poden manejar bé, per no parlar de diferències culturals adicionals. Aquest paper es centra en la tasca de transferència de llenguatges dada un petit corpus SLU paral·lel en domini. El cos paral·lel en domini es pot utilitzar com la primera adaptació del traductor general. Però, més important, mostrem com utilitzar l'aprenentatge de reforç (RL) per adaptar més el traductor adaptat, on les frases traduïdes amb etiquetes de slot més adequades rebuen premis més altes. La nostra recompensa es deriva exclusivament de la frase d'entrada de font, a diferència de la recompensa a través de mètodes crítics per actor o de calcul amb una frase d'objectiu de veritat fonamental. Així que podem adaptar el traductor la segona vegada, utilitzant el gran corpus SLU monolingüe de la llengua d'origen. Evaluam el nostre enfocament en la transferència de llenguatge xinès a anglès per sistemes SLU. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el corpus anglès SLU generat mitjançant l'aprenentatge d'adaptació i reforç ens dóna més del 97% en la puntuació de slot F1 i més del 84% en la classificació de domini. Demostra l'eficacia de la proposta\nlanguage transferring method.  Comparat amb la traducció naiva, el nostre mètode proposat millora la precisió de la classificació del domini en relativament 22%, i l'interval que omple la puntuació F1 en relativament més del 71%.", 'et': 'Räägitud keele mõistmise mudeli (SLU) kasutuselevõtmiseks uuele keelele soovitakse keeleülekannet, et vältida probleeme uue suure SLU korpuse omandamise ja märgistamisega. SLU korpus on ühekeelne korpus, millel on domeeni/kavatsuse/pesa sildid. Algse SLU korpuse tõlkimine sihtkeelde on atraktiivne strateegia. SLU korpused koosnevad siiski paljudest semantilistest siltidest (pesadest), millega üldotstarbelised tõlkijad hästi hakkama ei saa, rääkimata täiendavatest kultuurierinevustest. Käesolev töö keskendub keeleülekande ülesandele, mis on antud väikese domeenisisese paralleelse SLU korpuse. Domeenisisest paralleelkorpust saab kasutada üldtõlkija esimese kohandusena. Kuid mis veelgi tähtsam, näitame, kuidas kasutada tugevdamisõpet (RL) kohandatud tõlkija edasiseks kohandamiseks, kus tõlgitud laused, millel on õigemad pesamärgid, saavad suuremat tasu. Meie tasu tuletatakse ainult lähtelausest, erinevalt tasust näitleja kriitiliste meetodite või arvutamise tasust põhjaliku tõe sihtlausega. Seega saame tõlkijat teist korda kohandada, kasutades lähtekeelest pärit suurt ühekeelset SLU korpust. Hindame oma lähenemisviisi hiina ja inglise keele ülekandmisele SLU süsteemide jaoks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et genereeritud inglise SLU korpus kohanemise ja tugevdamise õppe kaudu annab meile üle 97% pesa F1 skoori ja üle 84% täpsuse domeeni klassifitseerimisel. See näitab kavandatud meetmete tõhusust.\nkeeleülekande meetod. Võrreldes naiivse tõlkega parandab meie pakutud meetod domeeni klassifitseerimise täpsust suhteliselt 22% ja pesa täitmise F1 skoori suhteliselt rohkem kui 71%.', 'fi': 'Puhutun kielen ymmärtämismallin (SLU) käyttöönotto uudelle kielelle edellyttää, että kielensiirtoa vältetään uuden suuren SLU-korpusen hankkiminen ja merkitseminen. SLU-korpus on monikielinen korpus, jossa on domain/intent/slot labels. Alkuperäisen SLU-korpusen kääntäminen kohdekielelle on houkutteleva strategia. SLU-korpusissa on kuitenkin paljon semanttisia tunnisteita (slotteja), joita yleiskääntäjät eivät pysty käsittelemään hyvin, puhumattakaan muista kulttuurieroista. Tässä artikkelissa keskitytään kielensiirtotehtävään pienen rinnakkaisen SLU-korpusen avulla. In-domain parallel corpus voidaan käyttää yleiseen kääntäjään liittyvänä ensimmäisenä mukautuksena. Mutta mikä tärkeintä, näytämme, miten tehosteoppimista (RL) käytetään mukautettua kääntäjää edelleen mukauttamaan, jossa käännetyt lauseet, joissa on oikeat slot tagit, saavat korkeammat palkkiot. Palkkiomme johdetaan yksinomaan lähteen syöttölauseesta, toisin kuin palkinto näyttelijäkriittisillä menetelmillä tai laskentapalkinnolla perustuvalla totuustavoitelauseella. Näin voimme mukauttaa kääntäjää toisen kerran käyttämällä lähdekielestä saatavaa isoa yksikielistä SLU-korpusta. Arvioimme lähestymistapaamme kiinan ja englannin kielen siirtoon SLU-järjestelmissä. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että generoitu englanninkielinen SLU-korpus mukautumisen ja vahvistuksen oppimisen kautta antaa meille yli 97% F1-pisteen ja yli 84% tarkkuuden toimialueen luokittelussa. Se osoittaa ehdotetun\nkielen siirtomenetelmä. Verrattuna naiiviin käännöksiin ehdotettu menetelmä parantaa verkkotunnuksen luokittelutarkkuutta suhteellisen 22% ja slot filling F1 -pisteitä suhteellisen yli 71%.', 'ha': "Ko da za'a cire wani misali da aka faɗa (SLU) zuwa wata harshe na yanzu, za'a so in karkatar da harshen don a iya zartar da matsayin ka sami kuma ka yi amfani da wata takardar SLU mai girma. Shirin SLU na wata wata nau'i na monoli-harshen, yana da alama guda/point/slot. @ action A lokacin da SLU na ƙunsa da wasu alama masu semanti (slot), wanda fassarar-jumla ba su iya amfani da shi ba, kuma bã dõmin su faɗa wasu musamman na kultur. This paper focuses on the language transferring task given a small in-domain parallel SLU corpus.  @ info: whatsthis Amma kuma mafi muhimu, za mu nũna jinsi za mu yi amfani da ƙari wa learning na ƙaranci (RL) dõmin ka sake adadi da fassarar da aka adatar da shi, a inda an fassarar da salon da tagogi masu daidaita ko kuma za'a mottar da ijãra mafi girma. Ana motsa sakamakonmu daga cikin tsarin da aka shigar da shi kawai, kafin kwatankan sakamakon mai aikin-mai-kure ko kuma an sami sakamakon da aka yi musu ciri da maganar gaskiya. Daga wannan, za mu iya daidaita tarabũta na biyu, ko kuma mu yi amfani da nau'in mai girma na SLU daga harshen source. Tuna ƙaddara hanyarmu a kan harshen Kiitcha zuwa muhimmin Ingiriya Matarin da aka jarraba yana nũna cewa makampuni ya ƙididdige SLU na da adaptation da ƙaranci yana bã mu da akan 97% cikin fassaran F1 na rubutun kuma akan 84% na daidaita cikin fasalin guda. Ina nuna aikin da aka faɗa\ndictionary variant @ info: whatsthis", 'he': 'כדי לפרסם מודל להבין שפה מדברת (SLU) לשפה חדשה, מעברת שפה מבוקשת כדי להימנע מהבעיה להשיג ותיקוי קופוס SLU גדול חדש. קורפוס SLU הוא קורפוס מונושפתי עם תוויות שטח/כוונה/סגור. העברת הקורפוס המקורי של SLU לשפה המטרה היא אסטרטגיה מושכת. בכל אופן, גופורה SLU מורכבת ממספר של תוויות סמנטיות (slots), אשר תורגמים למטרה כללית לא יכולים להתמודד היטב, שלא לדבר על הבדלים בתרבות נוספים. This paper focuses on the language transferring task given a small in-domain parallel SLU corpus.  הקורפוס המקביל בתחום יכול להשתמש בתור התאמה הראשונה על התרגם הכללי. אבל יותר חשוב, אנחנו מראים איך להשתמש ללמוד התגבורה (RL) כדי להסתגל יותר את התרגם המתאים, שבו משפטים מתרגמים עם תגים מקום יותר מתאימים מקבלים פרסים גבוהים יותר. הפרס שלנו מוביל משפט הכניסה המקורי בלבד, בניגוד לפרס באמצעות שיטות קריטיות שחקן או מחשב פרס עם משפט מטרה של אמת אדמה. לכן אנחנו יכולים להתאים את התרגם בפעם השנייה, באמצעות הקורפוס המונושפתי SLU הגדול מהשפה המקורית. We evaluate our approach on Chinese to English language transferring for SLU systems.  התוצאות הניסיוניים מראות שהקורפוס האנגלי SLU שנוצר באמצעות לימוד התאמה והתגבורה נותן לנו יותר מ-97% בתוצאות F1 של המטוס ויותר מ-84% בדיקת בקליפסיה של שטח. זה מראה את היעילות של\nשיטת העברת שפה. בהשוואה לתרגום נאיבי, השיטה המוצעת שלנו משפר את מדויקת ההקלטה בתחום על ידי 22% יחסית, והמקום המלא את נקודת F1 על ידי יותר מ-71% יחסית.', 'sk': 'Za uvedbo modela razumevanja govorjenega jezika (SLU) v nov jezik je želen prenos jezika, da se izognemo težavam pri pridobivanju in označevanju novega velikega korpusa SLU. SLU korpus je enojezični korpus z oznakami domene/namena/reže. Prevajanje izvirnega korpusa SLU v ciljni jezik je privlačna strategija. Vendar pa so korpusi SLU sestavljeni iz veliko semantičnih oznak (rež), s katerimi splošni prevajalci ne morejo dobro obvladati, da ne omenjam dodatnih kulturnih razlik. Ta prispevek se osredotoča na nalogo prenosa jezika v majhnem domenskem vzporednem korpusu SLU. Kot prva prilagoditev splošnega prevajalca se lahko uporabi vzporedni korpus v domeni. Še pomembneje pa je, da pokažemo, kako uporabiti ojačevalno učenje (RL) za nadaljnje prilagajanje prilagojenega prevajalca, kjer prevedeni stavki z ustreznejšimi režnimi oznakami prejmejo višje nagrade. Naša nagrada izhaja izključno iz izvornega vhodnega stavka, za razliko od nagrade prek metod kritičnih igralcev ali računalniške nagrade z osnovnim ciljnim stavkom resnice. Tako lahko prevajalca drugič prilagodimo z velikim enojezičnim korpusom SLU iz izvornega jezika. Ocenjujemo naš pristop k prenosu kitajščine v angleščino za sisteme SLU. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da ustvarjeni angleški SLU korpus prek prilagoditve in ojačitve učenja nam daje več kot 97% reže F1 in več kot 84% natančnost pri klasifikaciji domen. Dokazuje učinkovitost predlaganega\nmetoda prenosa jezika. V primerjavi z naivnim prevodom naša predlagana metoda izboljša natančnost klasifikacije domen za sorazmerno 22%, rezultat polnjenja reže F1 pa za sorazmerno več kot 71%.', 'jv': 'Ngawe nggoleki model sing ngerasakno banget (SLU) nggo langa sing luwih, ngerintakno langkung kudu ngegoleki seneng nggoleki kudu nggoleki ujaran karo perusahaan sugih SLU mbuh sing apik. A SLU Body is a Monlanguage Body with domain/enth/slot label. It is a multi-language task. Terjamahan kelompok SLU anyar nganggo alêng nggawe gerakan sampeyan aksi. politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Perintah sing dipun nggo langkung nggawe langkung nggawe babagan kelas nang-domain Paralele SLU Body. domain slot type Awakdhéwé mengko perusahaan kelompok sing nggawe kelompok dadi, or a dianggo barang beraksi operater-critik apakno karo dolang nggawe barang kebuturan kanggo ngilangno langgar kuwi mau. Kaya awak dhéwé iso nggunaké terjamahan kanggo mbengok dhéwé, iso nggambar cara-cara sing lunak SLU kuwi padha ingkang sampek. Awak dhéwé éntuk dhéwé ngerasakno ning carane kanggo nggalawih Inggris kanggo sistem SLU. Rejection Bilih iso ngomongke efekat karo nggawé\ntextattr In this context, the slot filling F1 punctuation was + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + + .', 'bo': 'To deploy a spoken language understanding (SLU) model to a new language, language transferring is desired to avoid the trouble of acquiring and labeling a new big SLU corpus. An SLU corpus is a monolingual corpus with domain/intent/slot labels. ཐོག་མའི་SLU་ཡུལ་གྱི་དབུས་འབྲེལ་འདི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་རེད། However, SLU corpora consists of plenty of semantic labels (slots), which general-purpose translators cannot handle well, not to mention additional culture differences. ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་སྐད་ཡིག་དང་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཀྱི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་བློ་གཏད་འདུག The in-domain parallel corpus can be used as the first adaptation on the general translator. But more importantly, we show how to use reinforcement learning (RL) to further adapt the adapted translator, where translated sentences with more proper slot tags receive higher rewards. ང་ཚོའི་རྗེས་འབྲས་དེ་ཐོག་མའི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ནང་ལས་མེད་པར་ཐད་ཡོད་པ་མ་རེད། Hence we can adapt the translator the second time, using the big monolingual SLU corpus from the source language. We evaluate our approach on Chinese to English language transferring for SLU systems. The experimental results show that the generated English SLU corpus via adaptation and reinforcement learning gives us over 97% in the slot F1 score and over 84% accuracy in domain classification. དེ་གིས་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་གྲུབ་འབྲེལ་བ་དེ་\nསྐད་རིགས་སྐྱེལ་འདྲེན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ། Compared with naive translation, our proposed method improves domain classification accuracy by relatively 22%, and the slot filling F1 score by relatively more than 71%.'}
{'en': 'Graph Based Decoding for Event Sequencing and Coreference Resolution', 'ar': 'فك تشفير قائم على الرسم البياني لتسلسل الأحداث وقرار Coreference', 'fr': "Décodage basé sur des graphes pour le séquençage d'événements et la résolution de", 'es': 'Decodificación basada en gráficos para secuenciación de eventos y resolución de correferencias', 'pt': 'Decodificação baseada em gráfico para sequenciamento de eventos e resolução de correferência', 'ja': 'イベントシーケンシングとコアレファレンス分解能のためのグラフベースのデコード', 'zh': '事序共推理解析图形之解码', 'ru': 'Декодирование на основе графиков для секвенирования событий и разрешения ядра', 'hi': 'ग्राफ़ आधारित घटना अनुक्रमण और Coreference संकल्प के लिए डिकोडिंग', 'ga': 'Díchódú Graif-Bhunaithe le haghaidh Seicheamhú Imeachtaí agus Réiteach Croítheachta', 'ka': 'მოვლენების შემდეგების და შემდეგების რეზოციონციისთვის გრაფიკის ბაზი დეკოდირება', 'el': 'Αποκωδικοποίηση βασισμένη σε γραφήματα για τη διαδοχή συμβάντων και την επίλυση συναναστροφής', 'hu': 'Graf alapú dekódolás eseménysekvenciához és Coreferencia felbontáshoz', 'it': 'Decodifica basata su grafico per sequenza di eventi e risoluzione di coreferenza', 'lt': 'Įvykių sekimo ir koreferencinio sprendimo pagal grafiką kodavimas', 'kk': 'Оқиғалар ретінде және қасиеттердің айырмашылығының графикалық негізгі декодтамасы', 'mk': 'Graph Based Decoding for Event Sequencing and Coreference Resolution', 'mt': 'Dikodifikazzjoni bbażata fuq il-Grafika għas-Sekwenzjar tal-Avvenimenti u r-Riżoluzzjoni tal-Koreferenza', 'ms': 'Pengekodan Berasas Graf untuk Pengurutan Peristiwa dan Resolusi Kesempatan', 'ml': 'സംഭവത്തിന്റെ സംവിധാനത്തിന്റെയും കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസിന്റെയും വിശദീകരണത്തിനുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനമാ', 'mn': 'Үүний дарааллаар болон хамгийн сайн шийдвэрлэлийн график үндсэн шийдвэрлэл', 'pl': 'Dekodowanie oparte na wykresie dla sekwencji zdarzeń i rozdzielczości Coreference', 'no': 'Comment', 'ro': 'Decodare bazată pe grafic pentru secvențierea evenimentelor și rezoluția corefenței', 'sr': 'Графика базена декодирање за решање случаја и решање коференције', 'si': 'අවස්ථාව පරීක්ෂණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය විශේෂණය සඳහා ග්\u200dරාෆ් ආධාරිත සංකේතනය', 'so': 'Kaararka aasaasiga ah ee dhacda', 'sv': 'Grafbaserad avkodning för händelsesekvensering och Coreference upplösning', 'ta': 'நிகழ்வு பின்பற்றுதல் மற்றும் தெளிவுத்திறனுக்கு அடிப்படையான வரைப்படம் குறியீடு', 'ur': 'گراف بنیادی دیکوڈینگ ایڈینٹ سکوئنس اور قابل رخصت کے لئے', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Bộ giải mã tần số sự kiện và giải quyết', 'bg': 'Графично базирано декодиране за последователност на събития и резолюция на кореференцията', 'hr': 'Grafik osnovan dekodiranje za sekvenciju događaja i rezoluciju korisnosti', 'nl': 'Grafische decodering voor gebeurtenissequencing en Coreference Resolutie', 'da': 'Grafbaseret dekodning til hændelsessekvensering og Coreference-opløsning', 'de': 'Graphbasierte Dekodierung für Ereignissequenzierung und Coreferenz-Auflösung', 'id': 'Decoding Berdasarkan Graf untuk Pengurutan Kejadian dan Resolusi Koreferensi', 'ko': '그림 기반 이벤트 정렬 및 공지 해독', 'fa': 'رمزبندی بنیاد گراف برای تنظیم و حل\u200cسازی پیشرفت رویدادها', 'sw': 'Kifungu cha Graph kinachotumiwa kwa ajili ya Kuzunguka na Kupitia Ushindi wa Tukio', 'tr': 'Geditiň sıralanjak we üstünlik Çaşyrymy üçin Grafik tabanly Ködleme', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Graph Based Decoding for Event Sequencing and Coreference Resolution', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'bn': 'ইভেন্ট সেকেন্সিং এবং সংশোধনের জন্য গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক কোডিং', 'hy': 'Գրաֆիայի հիմնված կոդավորումը իրադարձությունների հաջորդականության և կորեֆերանսի լուծման համար', 'az': 'Vaqialar Sequencing və Ölçü Çözünürlüyü üçün Grafik Üstündəki Dekodlandırma', 'bs': 'Dekodiranje na grafiku za sekvenciju događaja i rezoluciju korisnosti', 'ca': "Descodificació basada en gràfics per a la seqüència d'events i la resolució de coreferència", 'et': 'Graafikapõhine dekodeerimine sündmuste järjestuse ja korrektseerimise lahenduse jaoks', 'cs': 'Grafové dekódování pro sekvencování událostí a rozlišení koreference', 'fi': 'Kaaviopohjainen dekoodaus tapahtumasekvensointia ja korferenssiresoluutiota varten', 'jv': 'Graph', 'he': 'קידוד מבוסס על Graph עבור עקבות אירועים ופתרון מצוות', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Dekodiranje na osnovi grafikona za zaporedje dogodkov in ločljivost Coreference', 'bo': 'འབྲི་རིས་གཞི་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་དང་ཁྱད་པར་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་གཏོང'}
{'en': 'Events in text documents are interrelated in complex ways. In this paper, we study two types of relation : Event Coreference and Event Sequencing. We show that the popular tree-like decoding structure for automated Event Coreference is not suitable for Event Sequencing. To this end, we propose a graph-based decoding algorithm that is applicable to both tasks. The new decoding algorithm supports flexible feature sets for both tasks. Empirically, our event coreference system has achieved state-of-the-art performance on the TAC-KBP 2015 event coreference task and our event sequencing system beats a strong temporal-based, oracle-informed baseline. We discuss the challenges of studying these event relations.', 'fr': "Les événements des documents texte sont interdépendants de manière complexe. Dans cet article, nous étudions deux types de relation\xa0: la coréférence d'événements et le séquençage d'événements. Nous montrons que la structure de décodage arborescente populaire pour la coréférence d'événements automatisée ne convient pas au séquençage d'événements. À cette fin, nous proposons un algorithme de décodage basé sur des graphes qui est applicable aux deux tâches. Le nouvel algorithme de décodage prend en charge des ensembles de fonctionnalités flexibles pour les deux tâches. De manière empirique, notre système de coréférence d'événements a atteint des performances de pointe sur la tâche de coréférence d'événements TAC-KBP 2015 et notre système de séquençage d'événements bat une base de référence solide basée sur le temps et informée par Oracle. Nous discutons des défis liés à l'étude de ces relations entre événements.", 'pt': 'Eventos em documentos de texto são inter-relacionados de maneiras complexas. Neste artigo, estudamos dois tipos de relação: Correferência de Eventos e Sequenciamento de Eventos. Mostramos que a estrutura de decodificação popular em árvore para a Correferência de Eventos automatizada não é adequada para o Sequenciamento de Eventos. Para tanto, propomos um algoritmo de decodificação baseado em grafos aplicável a ambas as tarefas. O novo algoritmo de decodificação oferece suporte a conjuntos de recursos flexíveis para ambas as tarefas. Empiricamente, nosso sistema de correferência de eventos alcançou desempenho de última geração na tarefa de correferência de eventos TAC-KBP 2015 e nosso sistema de sequenciamento de eventos supera uma linha de base forte baseada em tempo e informada por oráculo. Discutimos os desafios de estudar essas relações de eventos.', 'ar': 'الأحداث في المستندات النصية مترابطة بطرق معقدة. في هذا البحث ، ندرس نوعين من العلاقة: إرتباط الأحداث وتسلسل الأحداث. نظهر أن بنية فك التشفير الشبيهة بالشجرة من أجل معالجة الأحداث الآلية غير مناسبة لتسلسل الأحداث. تحقيقا لهذه الغاية ، نقترح خوارزمية فك التشفير القائمة على الرسم البياني التي تنطبق على كلتا المهمتين. تدعم خوارزمية فك التشفير الجديدة مجموعات الميزات المرنة لكلتا المهمتين. من الناحية التجريبية ، حقق نظامنا المرجعي للحدث أداءً متطورًا في مهمة مرجع حدث TAC-KBP 2015 ويتفوق نظام تسلسل الأحداث لدينا على خط أساس زمني قوي ومستند إلى أوراكل. نناقش تحديات دراسة هذه العلاقات الحدث.', 'es': 'Los eventos en los documentos de texto están interrelacionados de formas complejas. En este artículo, estudiamos dos tipos de relación: Correferencia de eventos y Secuenciación de eventos. Mostramos que la popular estructura de decodificación en forma de árbol para la correferencia de eventos automatizada no es adecuada para la secuenciación de eventos. Para ello, proponemos un algoritmo de decodificación basado en gráficos que sea aplicable a ambas tareas. El nuevo algoritmo de decodificación admite conjuntos de funciones flexibles para ambas tareas. Empíricamente, nuestro sistema de correferencia de eventos ha logrado un rendimiento de vanguardia en la tarea de correferencia de eventos TAC-KBP 2015 y nuestro sistema de secuenciación de eventos supera una sólida línea de base basada en oráculos y basada en el tiempo. Discutimos los desafíos de estudiar estas relaciones de eventos.', 'ja': '文書ドキュメント内のイベントは、複雑な方法で相互に関連しています。本稿では、事象コアリファレンスと事象シーケンスという2種類の関係を研究する。自動イベントコアリファレンスの一般的なツリー状デコード構造は、イベントシーケンスには適していないことを示しています。このために、両方のタスクに適用可能なグラフベースのデコードアルゴリズムを提案します。新しいデコードアルゴリズムは、両方のタスクの柔軟な機能セットをサポートします。経験的に、当社のイベントコアレファレンスシステムは、TAC - KBP 2015イベントコアレファレンスタスクで最先端のパフォーマンスを達成しており、当社のイベントシーケンシングシステムは、強力な時間ベースの、オラクルインフォームドベースラインに勝っています。これらの事象関係を研究する上での課題について論じる。', 'ru': 'События в текстовых документах взаимосвязаны сложными способами. В этой статье мы изучаем два типа отношений: ядро события и последовательность событий. Показано, что популярная деревоподобная структура декодирования для автоматизированного Event Coreference не подходит для Event Sequencing. Для этого мы предлагаем алгоритм декодирования на основе графа, который применим к обеим задачам. Новый алгоритм декодирования поддерживает гибкие наборы функций для обеих задач. Эмпирически, наша система базовой оценки событий достигла самых современных результатов в решении задачи базовой оценки событий TAC-KBP 2015, и наша система секвенирования событий превосходит сильную временную базовую линию, основанную на оракулах. Обсуждаем проблемы изучения этих событийных отношений.', 'zh': '本文档中事以杂相关系。 本文:共推理序。 明于自事协征之流行树状解码结构不宜于事序。 此二务者,图形解码算法也。 新解码算法两功集。 以经验之,吾事协统于 TAC-KBP 2015 事协征,吾事统破基于时、预言机之强基线。 我们讨论这件事情。', 'hi': 'पाठ दस्तावेज़ों में ईवेंट जटिल तरीकों से परस्पर संबंधित होते हैं. इस पेपर में, हम दो प्रकार के संबंधों का अध्ययन करते हैं: इवेंट कोरफेरेंस और इवेंट सीक्वेंसिंग। हम दिखाते हैं कि स्वचालित ईवेंट कोरेफेरेंस के लिए लोकप्रिय ट्री-जैसी डिकोडिंग संरचना ईवेंट अनुक्रमण के लिए उपयुक्त नहीं है। इस अंत तक, हम एक ग्राफ-आधारित डिकोडिंग एल्गोरिथ्म का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो दोनों कार्यों पर लागू होता है। नया डिकोडिंग एल्गोरिथ्म दोनों कार्यों के लिए लचीले सुविधा सेट का समर्थन करता है। अनुभवजन्य रूप से, हमारे ईवेंट कोरेफेरेंस सिस्टम ने टीएसी-केबीपी 2015 ईवेंट कोरेफेरेंस कार्य पर अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन हासिल किया है और हमारी घटना अनुक्रमण प्रणाली एक मजबूत अस्थायी-आधारित, ओरेकल-सूचित बेसलाइन को हरा देती है। हम इन घटना संबंधों का अध्ययन करने की चुनौतियों पर चर्चा करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Tá idirghaol idir imeachtaí i ndoiciméid téacs ar bhealaí casta. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid staidéar ar dhá chineál caidrimh: Croílár Imeachtaí agus Seicheamhú Imeachtaí. Léirímid nach bhfuil an struchtúr díchódaithe tóir ar nós crann le haghaidh Croílár Imeachta uathoibrithe oiriúnach do Sheicheamhú Imeachtaí. Chuige sin, molaimid algartam díchódaithe graf-bhunaithe a bhaineann leis an dá thasc. Tacaíonn an algartam díchódaithe nua le tacair ghnéithe solúbtha don dá thasc. Go heimpíreach, tá feidhmíocht úrscothach bainte amach ag ár gcóras croíláir imeachtaí ar thasc croíláir imeachtaí TAC-KBP 2015 agus sáraíonn ár gcóras seicheamhaithe imeachtaí bonnlíne láidir ama-bhunaithe, atá bunaithe ar oracle. Pléimid na dúshláin a bhaineann le staidéar a dhéanamh ar na caidrimh imeachtaí seo.', 'ka': 'ტექსტის დოკუმენტებში მოვლენები კომპლექსიკური გზებით დაკავშირებულია. ჩვენ ამ წიგნაში ორი ტიპის შესახებ სწავლობთ: მოვლენების შესახებ და მოვლენების შესახებ. ჩვენ ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომ მოვლენების შემდეგ მოვლენების კონფერენციის სტრუქტურაცია, როგორც პოლიპური ხე, არ არის საჭირო მოვლენების შემდეგ. ეს მიზეზით, ჩვენ დავწყვებთ გრაფიკური განსხვავებული ალგორიტიმ, რომელიც ორივე დავალებისთვის მოსაძლევა. ახალი რეკოდირება ალგორიტიმი ძალიან ძალიან გრძნობა ორივე დავალებისთვის. ჩვენი მოვლენების წარმოდგენების სისტემა გავაკეთება TAC-KBP 2015 მოვლენების წარმოდგენება და ჩვენი მოვლენების წარმოდგენების სისტემა ძალიან ტემპალური, ორაკულ ინფორმაციული ფესტილის გარეშე. ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ამ მოვლენების შესახებ განსხვავება.', 'el': 'Τα γεγονότα στα έγγραφα κειμένου αλληλοσυνδέονται με πολύπλοκους τρόπους. Στην παρούσα εργασία μελετούμε δύο τύπους σχέσεων: Συναντήσεις Εκδηλώσεων και Ακολουθία Εκδηλώσεων. Δείχνουμε ότι η δημοφιλής δομή αποκωδικοποίησης δέντρου για την αυτοματοποιημένη συνάφεια συμβάντων δεν είναι κατάλληλη για ακολουθία συμβάντων. Για το σκοπό αυτό, προτείνουμε έναν αλγόριθμο αποκωδικοποίησης βασισμένο σε γραφήματα που είναι εφαρμόσιμος και στις δύο εργασίες. Ο νέος αλγόριθμος αποκωδικοποίησης υποστηρίζει ευέλικτα σύνολα χαρακτηριστικών και για τις δύο εργασίες. Εμπειρικά, το σύστημα συγχορήγησης γεγονότων μας έχει επιτύχει την τελευταία απόδοση στην εργασία συγχορήγησης γεγονότων και το σύστημα αλληλουχίας γεγονότων μας ξεπερνά μια ισχυρή χρονική βάση, ενημερωμένη από το μαντείο βάση. Συζητούμε τις προκλήσεις της μελέτης αυτών των σχέσεων εκδηλώσεων.', 'hu': 'A szöveges dokumentumokban szereplő események összetett módon kapcsolódnak egymáshoz. Ebben a tanulmányban kétféle kapcsolatot tanulmányozunk: Esemény Coreferencia és Esemény Sequencing. Megmutatjuk, hogy az automatizált Esemény Koreference népszerű, fa-szerű dekódolási struktúrája nem alkalmas Esemény Szekvenciázásra. Ennek érdekében egy grafikon alapú dekódolási algoritmust javasolunk, amely mindkét feladatra alkalmazható. Az új dekódolási algoritmus rugalmas funkciókészleteket támogat mindkét feladathoz. Empirikusan eseménycoreferencia rendszerünk a TAC-KBP 2015 eseménycoreferencia feladat legkorszerűbb teljesítményét érte el, eseménysekvenciáló rendszerünk pedig egy erős időalapú, orákulumok alapján tájékoztatott alapot üt. Az eseménykapcsolatok tanulmányozásának kihívásait vitatjuk meg.', 'it': "Gli eventi nei documenti di testo sono interconnessi in modi complessi. In questo articolo, studiamo due tipi di relazione: Event Coreference e Event Sequencing. Mostriamo che la popolare struttura di decodifica ad albero per la Coreferenza automatica degli eventi non è adatta per la Sequenza degli eventi. A tal fine, proponiamo un algoritmo di decodifica basato su grafici applicabile a entrambe le attività. Il nuovo algoritmo di decodifica supporta set di funzionalità flessibili per entrambe le attività. Empiricamente, il nostro sistema di coreferenza eventi ha raggiunto prestazioni all'avanguardia nell'attività di coreferenza eventi TAC-KBP 2015 e il nostro sistema di sequenziamento eventi batte una base base temporale forte e informata dagli oracoli. Discutiamo le sfide dello studio di questi rapporti di evento.", 'mk': 'Настаните во текстовите документи се меѓусебно поврзани на сложени начини. Во овој весник, студираме два вида врски: современост на настаните и секвенција на настаните. Ние покажуваме дека популарната декодирана структура на дрво за автоматизирана соодветност на настаните не е соодветна за секвенцирање на настаните. За ова, предложуваме алгоритм за декодирање базиран на график кој е применлив за двете задачи. Новиот алгоритм за декодирање поддржува флексибилни сетови на функции за двете задачи. Импирички, нашиот систем на конференција на настаните постигна најдобра резултат на задачата за конференција на настаните TAC-KBP 2015 и нашиот систем на секвенцирање на настаните победи на силна температурна основа, информирана со оракл. Разговараме за предизвиците од проучувањето на овие односи со настаните.', 'lt': 'Tekstų dokumentuose įvykiai yra tarpusavyje susiję sudėtingais būdais. Šiame dokumente mes tiriame dviejų rūšių santykius: įvykių koreferenciją ir įvykių seką. Mes rodome, kad populiari medžio tipo dekodinimo struktūra automatizuotai įvykių koreferencijai netinka įvykių sekimui. Šiuo tikslu siūlome grafiniu būdu pagrįstą dekodinimo algoritmą, kuris taikomas abiem užduotims. Naujasis dekodiavimo algoritmas remia lanksčius abiejų užduočių savybių rinkinius. Empiriškai, mūsų renginių koreferencijos sistema pasiekė pažangiausius rezultatus TAC-KBP 2015 renginių koreferencijos užduotyje, o mūsų renginių sekos sistema nugalėjo tvirtą laiku pagrįstą, orakuliu pagrįstą pradinę vertę. Mes aptariame šių renginių santykių tyrimo iššūkius.', 'kk': 'Мәтін құжаттарындағы оқиғалар комплекс түрлерде байланысты. Бұл қағазда екі қатынас түрлерін зерттейміз: оқиға қатынасы және оқиғалар ретінде қатынасы. Автоматты оқиғалар бағдарламасының декодтау құрылғысы оқиғалар ретінде жақсы емес дегенді көрсету. Бұл үшін, екі тапсырма үшін қолданылатын график негіздеген декодтау алгоритмін ұсынамыз. Жаңа декодтау алгоритмі екі тапсырмалар үшін гибкілді қасиеттерді қолдайды. Оқиғалардың таңдау жүйесі таңдау-KBP 2015 оқиғалардың таңдау тапсырмасының күйін жеткіздік. Оқиғалардың таңдау жүйесіміз уақытша негізделген, оракулық мәліметті негізделген негізгі жолды жеткізеді. Біз бұл оқиға қатынасын оқыту үшін мәселелерді талқылаймыз.', 'ms': 'Peristiwa dalam dokumen teks berkaitan antara satu sama lain dalam cara kompleks. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari dua jenis hubungan: Kesuaian Kejadian dan Pengurusan Kejadian. We show that the popular tree-like decoding structure for automated Event Coreference is not suitable for Event Sequencing.  Untuk tujuan ini, kita cadangkan algoritma penyahkodan berdasarkan graf yang berlaku untuk kedua-dua tugas. Algoritma penyahkodan baru menyokong set ciri fleksibel untuk kedua-dua tugas. Empirikal, sistem persatuan peristiwa kita telah mencapai prestasi terbaik pada tugas persatuan peristiwa TAC-KBP 2015 dan sistem persatuan peristiwa kita mengalahkan dasar yang berdasarkan tempoh yang kuat dan diberitahu orakul. Kami membincangkan cabaran untuk mempelajari hubungan peristiwa ini.', 'ml': 'പദാവലിയുടെ രേഖകളിലുള്ള അവസ്ഥ സങ്കീര്\u200dണ്ണമായ രീതികളില്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d രണ്ടു തരം ബന്ധം പഠിക്കുന്നു: നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിച്ചുകൊടുക്കുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട മരത്തിന്റെ പോലുള്ള ഡികോഡിങ്ങ് ക്രമീകരണം സ്വയം സംഭവിക്കുന്ന കോ ഈ അവസാനത്തിനു വേണ്ടി നമ്മള്\u200d ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഡെക്കോഡിങ്ങ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിത്മ് പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന് പുതിയ ഡെക്കോഡിങ് ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം രണ്ടു ജോലികള്\u200dക്കും ഫ്ലോക്സിബിള്\u200d ഗുണഗണങ്ങള്\u200d പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുന്ന ശാസ്ത്രീയമായി, ടാസി-കെബിപി-২০১৫ സംഭവത്തിന്\u200dറെ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് ജോലിയില്\u200d നമ്മുടെ സംഭവങ്ങളുടെ കോര്\u200dഫെന്\u200dസ് സിസ്റ്റം സംവിധാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ സ്ഥിതിയില്\u200d ന We discuss the challenges of studying these event relations.', 'mt': "L-avvenimenti fid-dokumenti tat-test huma interrelatati b’modi kumplessi. F’dan id-dokument, nistudjaw żewġ tipi ta’ relazzjoni: il-Koreferenza tal-Avvenimenti u s-Sekwenzjar tal-Avvenimenti. Aħna nuru li l-istruttura popolari ta’ dekodifikazzjoni simili għas-siġar għall-Koreferenza awtomatizzata tal-Avvenimenti mhijiex adattata għas-Sekwenzar tal-Avvenimenti. Għal dan il-għan, nipproponu algoritmu ta’ dekodifikazzjoni bbażat fuq il-grafika li huwa applikabbli għa ż-żewġ kompiti. The new decoding algorithm supports flexible feature sets for both tasks.  Empirically, our event coreference system has achieved state-of-the-art performance on the TAC-KBP 2015 event coreference task and our event sequencing system beats a strong temporal-based, oracle-informed baseline.  Aħna niddiskutu l-isfidi tal-istudju ta' dawn ir-relazzjonijiet ta' avvenimenti.", 'mn': 'Текст баримтын үйл явдал нарийн төвөгтэй аргаар холбоотой. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хоёр төрлийн харилцааны судалгаа хийдэг: үйл явдлын төлөвлөгөө, үйл явдлын дарааллаа. Бид автоматжуулсан үйл явдлын хувьд алдартай мод шиг загварын загварын бүтэц нь үйл явдлын дарааллын хувьд хэрэгтэй биш гэдгийг харуулж байна. Энэ төгсгөлд бид график дээр суурилсан шилжүүлэлтийн алгоритм нь хоёр ажил дээр хэрэглэгддэг. Шинэ кодлох алгоритм нь хоёр даалгавруудын хувьд гишүүн боломжийг дэмждэг. Харин үнэндээ бидний үйл явдлын тайвны систем 2015 оны TAC-KBP үйл явдлын тайвны ажил дээр урлагийн үйл явдлыг хүргэсэн бөгөөд бидний үйл явдлын дарааллын систем хүчтэй цаг хугацааны үндсэн, орчин үгийн мэдээллийн суурь шугам хүргэсэн. Бид эдгээр үйл явдлын харилцааны судлах сорилтуудыг ярьж байна.', 'no': 'Hendingar i tekstdokument er interrelaterte på komplekse måtar. I denne papiret studerer vi to typar relasjon: hendingskyting og hendingskyting. Vi viser at den populære treliknande dekodingsstrukturen for automatisk hendingsreferanse ikkje er passande for hendingsreferansen. I denne slutten foreslår vi ein grafikkbasert dekodingsalgoritme som er tilgjengeleg for begge oppgåver. Den nye kodingsalgoritmen støttar fleksibel funksjonen for begge oppgåver. Emnisk har vårt hendingsgrensesystem oppnådd i TAC-KBP 2015-hendingsgrensesoppgåva, og vårt hendingsgrensesystem slår ein sterk tidsbasert, orakulert baseline. Vi diskuterer utfordringane for å studera desse hendingsbehandlingane.', 'pl': 'Zdarzenia w dokumentach tekstowych są ze sobą powiązane w złożony sposób. W niniejszym artykule badamy dwa rodzaje relacji: Coreference zdarzeń i sekwencjonowanie zdarzeń. Pokazujemy, że popularna drzewopodobna struktura dekodowania dla zautomatyzowanego Event Coreference nie nadaje się do sekwencji zdarzeń. W tym celu proponujemy algorytm dekodowania oparty na wykresie, który ma zastosowanie do obu zadań. Nowy algorytm dekodowania obsługuje elastyczne zestawy funkcji dla obu zadań. Empirycznie nasz system współdziałania zdarzeń osiągnął najnowocześniejszą wydajność w zakresie zadania współdziałania zdarzeń TAC-KBP 2015, a nasz system sekwencjonowania zdarzeń pokonuje silną podstawę opartą na czasie, opartą na wyroczni. Omawiamy wyzwania związane z badaniem tych relacji wydarzeniowych.', 'ro': 'Evenimentele din documentele text sunt interconectate în moduri complexe. În această lucrare, studiem două tipuri de relație: Coreferența Evenimentelor și Sequența Evenimentelor. Arătăm că populara structură de decodare a copacilor pentru Coreferența automată a Evenimentelor nu este potrivită pentru Sequența Evenimentelor. În acest scop, propunem un algoritm de decodare bazat pe grafice care este aplicabil ambelor sarcini. Noul algoritm de decodare acceptă seturi flexibile de caracteristici pentru ambele sarcini. Din punct de vedere empiric, sistemul nostru de corefență a evenimentelor a obținut performanțe de ultimă generație în ceea ce privește sarcina de corefență a evenimentelor TAC-KBP 2015, iar sistemul nostru de secvențiere a evenimentelor bate o bază de referință puternică bazată pe timp, informată de oracol. Discutăm provocările studiului acestor relații de eveniment.', 'sr': 'Događaji u tekstskim dokumentima su međusobno povezani na kompleksni način. U ovom papiru proučavamo dve vrste odnosa: korisnost događaja i sekvencija događaja. Pokazujemo da popularna struktura poput drveta za dekodiranje automatskih događaja nije odgovarajuća za sekvenciju događaja. Za taj cilj predlažemo algoritam za dekodiranje na grafiku koji se primjenjuje obe zadatke. Novi algoritam za dekodiranje podržava fleksibilne funkcije za obe zadatke. U praksi, naš sistem korisnosti događaja postigao je izvedbu države umjetnosti na zadatku korisnosti događaja TAC-KBP 2015, a naš sistem sekvencije događaja prebije jaku temporalnu, oralnu informaciju o osnovnoj liniji. Razgovaramo o izazovima proučavanja ovih odnosa o događajima.', 'so': 'Dhacdooyinka dukumentiyada qoraalka ah waxay ku xiran yihiin qaab adag. Warqaddan waxaan ku baranaynaa laba nooc oo kala duduwan xiriirka: Xafiiska dhacda iyo dhacdooyinka. Waxan tusnaynaa in dhismaha deynta oo u eg dhirta maamul ah ee koronta dhacdooyinka aan dhaqdhaqaaqsan looma habboona dhamaadka dhacdooyinka. Taas darteed waxaynu soo jeedaynaa algorithm oo ku saleysan sawirida oo ku habboon labada shaqo. Algorithm cusub oo codsiga ah wuxuu taageeraa heerarka aqoonta leh ee labada shaqaalaha. Xilli ahaan, nidaamka dhacdooyinkeena waxay gaadhay xaaladda farshaxanta ee xafiiska dhacdooyinka TAC-KBP 2015 iyo nidaamka dhacda ee dhacda waxay ku garaacaysaa si xoog leh oo ugu horeysa fasaxa hore. We discuss the challenges of studying these event relations.', 'ta': 'Events in text documents are interrelated in complex ways.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் இரண்டு வகையான தொடர்பை படிக்கிறோம்: நிகழ்வு மாற்றம் மற்றும் நிகழ்வு தொடர்புகள். நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் என்றால் தானியங்கி செய்யப்பட்ட நிகழ்வு மாற்றத்திற்கு பொதுவான குறியீடு அமைப்பு இந்த முடிவிற்கு, நாம் வரைபடத்தில் அடிப்படையான குறிமுறையீட்டு வரைபடத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். இவை இரு பணிகளுக புதிய குறியீட்டு பட்டியல் இருவரும் செயல்களுக்கும் flexible தன்மைகளை ஆதரிக்கிறது. வெற்றிகரமாக, எங்கள் நிகழ்வு குறிப்பு அமைப்பு TAC-KBP 2015 நிகழ்வு குறிப்பு செயல்பாட்டின் நிலையில் உள்ளது மற்றும் எங்கள் நிகழ்வு பின்வரும் அமைப்பு வலிமையா நாம் இந்த நிகழ்வு உறவுகளை படிப்பதற்கான சவால்களை விவாதம் செய்கிறோம்.', 'si': 'ලිපින් දස්තාවේදි අවස්ථාවය සංවිද්\u200dය විදියට සම්බන්ධ වෙනවා. මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරකාර දෙකක් සම්බන්ධ විදියට පරීක්ෂා කරනවා: අවස්ථානය සහ අවස්ථානය පරීක්ෂණය අපි පෙන්වන්නේ ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණ වර්ගයක් වගේ සංකේතනය මේ අවසානයෙන්, අපි ග්\u200dරාෆ් අධාරිත ආධාරිත ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරනවා ඒක දෙන්නම් වැඩකට ප්\u200dර අළුත් ඩිකෝඩ් ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එක්ක සැකසුම් දෙන්නම් වෙනුවෙන් සැකසුම් සහයි. අධ්\u200dයාත්මක විදියට, අපේ සිද්ධ වැඩසටහන් පද්ධතිය TAC-KBP 2015 සිද්ධ වැඩසටහන් ක්\u200dරියාෆරේන්ස් වැඩසටහන් සහ අපේ සිද්ධ වැඩසටහන් පද්ධතිය බලන්නේ ක අපි මේ සම්බන්ධ සම්බන්ධයක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කතා කරනවා.', 'sv': 'Hﾃ､ndelser i textdokument hﾃ､nger samman pﾃ･ komplexa sﾃ､tt. I denna uppsats studerar vi tvﾃ･ typer av relation: Event Coreference och Event Sequencing. Vi visar att den populﾃ､ra trﾃ､dliknande avkodningsstrukturen fﾃｶr automatiserad Event Coreference inte ﾃ､r lﾃ､mplig fﾃｶr Event Sequencing. Fﾃｶr detta ﾃ､ndamﾃ･l fﾃｶreslﾃ･r vi en grafbaserad avkodningsalgoritm som ﾃ､r tillﾃ､mplig pﾃ･ bﾃ･da uppgifterna. Den nya avkodningsalgoritmen stﾃｶder flexibla funktionsuppsﾃ､ttningar fﾃｶr bﾃ･da uppgifterna. Empiriskt sett har vﾃ･rt hﾃ､ndelsecoreferenssystem uppnﾃ･tt toppmoderna prestanda pﾃ･ TAC-KBP 2015 hﾃ､ndelsecoreferensuppgift och vﾃ･rt hﾃ､ndelsesekvenseringssystem slﾃ･r en stark tidsbaserad, orakelbaserad baslinje. Vi diskuterar utmaningarna med att studera dessa hﾃ､ndelserelationer.', 'ur': 'ٹیکسٹ دکھانوں میں اتفاقات پیچیدہ طریقے سے متصل ہیں. ہم اس کاغذ میں دو قسم کی نسبت پڑھتے ہیں: Event Coreference اور Event Sequencing. ہم دکھاتے ہیں کہ مثال شہید درخت جیسی دکھانے والی ساختار اتمام حادثہ کے لئے اچھی طرح نہیں ہے۔ اس کے لئے ہم ایک گراف بنیادی ڈیکوڈینگ الگوریتم کو پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو دونوں کاموں کے لئے لازم ہے. نوی ڈیکوڈینگ الگوریٹم دونوں کاموں کے لئے ہلکسیبل فکریٹ سٹ کی مدد کرتا ہے. مالک طور پر، ہماری حادثہ مہربانی سیسٹم نے TAC-KBP 2015 حادثہ مہربانی کا کام پہنچایا ہے اور ہماری حادثہ سکونس سیسٹم نے ایک قوی موقتی بنیادی، اوراکل-اطلاع کی بنیادی لین کو دھنسا دیا ہے. ہم نے ان حادثہ رابطہ کی تحقیق کرنے کے مشکلات کی بحث کر رہے ہیں.', 'uz': "Matn hujjatdagi hodisalar murakkab usullar bilan bogʻliq. Bu qogʻozda biz ikki tur munosabatlarni o'rganamiz: hodisa Koreference va hodisa cheksiz. @ info: whatsthis Mana bu hodisa, biz ikkita vazifalar uchun grafik asosida kodlash algorithini talab qilamiz. Name Bizning hodisa tizimimiz TAC-KBP 2015 hodisa xavfsiz vazifasini amalga oshadi va hodisa qisqatlash tizimimizni vaqt asosida, orangi yordam berilgan asosiy bazasini bajaradi. Biz shu hodisa munosabatlarini o'rganishni qiziqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Sự kiện trong văn bản liên kết với nhau theo cách phức tạp. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi nghiên cứu hai loại mối quan hệ: sự thật... Chúng tôi cho thấy cấu trúc tự động của các cây thích hợp để giải mã sự kiện khẩn cấp không thích hợp cho tần số sự kiện. Chúng tôi đề xuất một thuật to án giải mã dựa vào đồ thị có thể sử dụng cho cả hai nhiệm vụ. Thuật toán giải mã mới hỗ trợ các cài đặt linh hoạt cho cả hai nhiệm vụ. Nghiêm túc mà nói, hệ thống hồng cầu sự kiện của chúng ta đã đạt được trình độ cao nhất về các sự kiện kiểu cao về thời gian và thông tin cơ bản về nhà tiên tri. Chúng ta thảo luận về thử thách trong việc nghiên cứu các mối quan hệ.', 'bg': 'Събитията в текстови документи са взаимосвързани по сложни начини. В тази статия изучаваме два вида взаимоотношения: кореференция на събитията и последователност на събитията. Показваме, че популярната дървесна декодираща структура за автоматизирана кореференция на събития не е подходяща за последователност на събития. За тази цел предлагаме графичен алгоритъм за декодиране, който е приложим и за двете задачи. Новият алгоритъм за декодиране поддържа гъвкави набори от функции за двете задачи. Емпирично нашата система за кореференция на събитията постигна най-съвременни резултати по задачата за кореференция на събитията и нашата система за последователизиране на събитията надминава силна времева база, информирана за оракулите. Обсъждаме предизвикателствата на изучаването на тези събития отношения.', 'nl': 'Gebeurtenissen in tekstdocumenten zijn op complexe manieren met elkaar verbonden. In dit artikel bestuderen we twee soorten relaties: Event Coreference en Event Sequencing. We tonen aan dat de populaire boomachtige decoderingsstructuur voor geautomatiseerde Event Coreference niet geschikt is voor Event Sequencing. Hiervoor stellen we een grafiekgebaseerd decoderingsalgoritme voor dat op beide taken toepasbaar is. Het nieuwe decoderingsalgoritme ondersteunt flexibele functiesets voor beide taken. Empirisch gezien heeft ons event coreference systeem state-of-the-art prestaties behaald op de TAC-KBP 2015 event coreference taak en ons event sequencing systeem verslaat een sterke temporele, oracle-geïnformeerde baseline. We bespreken de uitdagingen van het bestuderen van deze evenementrelaties.', 'hr': 'Događaji u tekstskim dokumentima su međusobno povezani na kompleksni način. U ovom papiru proučavamo dvije vrste odnosa: korisnost događaja i sekvencija događaja. Pokazujemo da popularna struktura poput drveta za dekodiranje automatskih događaja nije odgovarajuća za sekvenciju događaja. Za taj cilj predlažemo algoritam za dekodiranje na grafiku koji se primjenjuje oba zadatka. Novi algoritam za dekodiranje podržava fleksibilne funkcije za obje zadatke. Empirički, naš sustav korisnosti događaja postigao je postignuće postupak stanja umjetnosti na zadatku korisnosti događaja TAC-KBP 2015, a naš sustav sekvencije događaja pobjeđuje jaku vremensku, oralnu podršku informiranog na temelju. Razgovaramo o izazovima proučavanja ovih odnosa o događajima.', 'da': 'Begivenheder i tekstdokumenter er indbyrdes forbundet på komplekse måder. I denne artikel studerer vi to typer relationer: Event Coreference og Event Sequencing. Vi viser, at den populære trælignende dekodningsstruktur til automatiseret Event Coreference ikke er egnet til Event Sequencing. Til dette formål foreslår vi en grafbaseret afkodningsalgoritme, der gælder for begge opgaver. Den nye afkodningsalgoritme understøtter fleksible funktionssæt til begge opgaver. Empirisk set har vores hændelsescoreferencesystem opnået state-of-the-art performance på TAC-KBP 2015 hændelsescoreferenceopgaven, og vores hændelsessekvenseringssystem slår en stærk tidsbaseret, orakel-informeret baseline. Vi diskuterer udfordringerne ved at studere disse begivenhedsrelationer.', 'de': 'Ereignisse in Textdokumenten sind auf komplexe Weise miteinander verknüpft. In diesem Beitrag untersuchen wir zwei Arten von Beziehungen: Event Coreferenz und Event Sequencing. Wir zeigen, dass die beliebte baumartige Dekodierungsstruktur für automatisierte Event Coreference nicht für Event Sequencing geeignet ist. Zu diesem Zweck schlagen wir einen graphenbasierten Dekodieralgorithmus vor, der für beide Aufgaben anwendbar ist. Der neue Decodieralgorithmus unterstützt flexible Feature-Sets für beide Aufgaben. Empirisch hat unser Event-Coreferenz-System bei der TAC-KBP 2015 Event-Coreferenz-Aufgabe den neuesten Stand der Technik erreicht und unser Event-Sequencing-System übertrifft eine starke zeitliche, oracle-informierte Baseline. Wir diskutieren die Herausforderungen der Erforschung dieser Ereignisbeziehungen.', 'id': 'Peristiwa dalam dokumen teks berhubungan dengan cara yang rumit. Dalam kertas ini, kami mempelajari dua jenis hubungan: Kesempatan Kejadian dan Sekuensi Kejadian. Kami menunjukkan bahwa struktur dekoding seperti pohon populer untuk Koreferensi Peristiwa otomatis tidak cocok untuk Pengurutan Peristiwa. Untuk tujuan ini, kami mengusulkan algoritma dekodasi berdasarkan grafik yang berlaku untuk kedua tugas. Algoritma dekoding baru mendukung set fitur fleksibel untuk kedua tugas. Empiris, sistem koreferensi peristiwa kita telah mencapai prestasi terbaik pada tugas koreferensi peristiwa TAC-KBP 2015 dan sistem sekuensi peristiwa kita mengalahkan dasar yang kuat berdasarkan waktu, informasi orakul. Kita membahas tantangan untuk mempelajari hubungan acara ini.', 'ko': '텍스트 문서의 이벤트는 복잡한 방식으로 서로 연결됩니다.본고에서 우리는 두 가지 유형의 관계, 즉 사건 공지와 사건 순서를 연구했다.우리는 자동 이벤트 공동 인용에 사용되는 유행 트리 디코딩 구조가 이벤트 정렬에 적합하지 않다는 것을 발견했다.이를 위해 우리는 이 두 가지 임무에 적용되는 그림 기반 디코딩 알고리즘을 제시했다.새로운 디코딩 알고리즘은 두 가지 임무의 유연성을 지원한다.경험적으로 볼 때 우리의 이벤트 협동 참고 시스템은 TAC-KBP 2015 이벤트 협동 참고 임무에서 가장 선진적인 성능을 얻었다. 우리의 이벤트 정렬 시스템은 시간 기반의oracle가 알고 있는 강력한 기선을 격파했다.우리는 이 사건들의 관계를 연구하는 도전에 대해 토론했다.', 'sw': 'Matukio katika nyaraka za maandishi yanahusiana kwa njia ngumu. Katika karatasi hii, tunasoma aina mbili za mahusiano: Matukio ya tukio na Matukio. Tunaonyesha kuwa muundo maarufu wa kuboresha matukio yanayofanana na mti kwa ajili ya Baraza la Tukio la kujitegemea hautoshi kufuatia matukio. Kwa mwisho huu, tunapendekeza Algorithi ya kuboresha kwa picha inayotumika kwa kazi zote. Ualgorithi mpya wa decodi unaunga mkono vipengele vya vifaa vinavyoweza kufanya kazi hizo mbili. Kwa ujumla, mfumo wa tukio letu umefanikiwa uwezekano wa aina ya sanaa katika kazi ya mkutano wa tukio la TAC-KBP 2015 na mfumo wetu wa tukio hilo unapiga msingi mkali wa muda wa muda, unaohusika kwa muda. Tunajadili changamoto za kusoma mahusiano haya ya tukio.', 'fa': 'اتفاقات در سند متن به طریق پیچیده ارتباط دارند. در این کاغذ، ما دو نوع رابطه را مطالعه می کنیم: تعادل اتفاق و تعادل اتفاق. ما نشان می دهیم که ساختار دکوندن مانند درخت محبوب برای رضایت اتفاق اتفاق افتاد مناسب برای رضایت اتفاق نیست. برای این قسمت، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم الگوریتم\u200cای که بر هر دو کاری قابل تغییر دهنده\u200cای است. الگوریتم\u200cهای جدید دکوندیدن ویژه\u200cهای متفاوتی برای هر دو کار را پشتیبانی می\u200cکند. در حقیقت، سیستم رضایت حادثه\u200cی ما بر روی عملیات رضایت حادثه\u200cی TAC-KBP ۲۰۱۵ رسیده است و سیستم رضایت حادثه\u200cی ما یک پایین\u200cخط بسیار سخت بر اساس موقتی و آگاهی\u200cهای آگاهی بر اساس استفاده می\u200cکند. ما در مورد چالش\u200cهای تحقیق این رابطه\u200cها صحبت می\u200cکنیم.', 'tr': 'Senediň ehleleri karmaşık yönlerde geçirilýär. Bu kagyzda, iki hili baglaýyşyň düzümi öwrenip otyrýarys: hadysyň döwletleri we hadysyň düzümi. Biz Popüler ağaç ýaly otomatik bolan hady diňe gollaşyk taýýarlamasynyň däldigini görkeýäris. Bu üçin, iki işe uygun grafik tabanly kodleme algoritmini teklip edip görýäris. Täze bir ködleme algoritmi iki işe üçin fleksibil özellikleri arkalaýar. Muharram bolsa, olarymyz howpsuzlyk sistemamyz TAC-KBP 2015-nji ýyldaky taýýarlama täsirinde çykyşymyzy ýetdi we olarymyz yzarlamak sistemamyz çalt wagtlara daýarlyk we orakla bilgili daýarlyk çykyşymyzy bardyr. Biz bu çykyş baglaşyklary öwrenmegiň kynçylyklaryny gürrüň edýäris.', 'sq': 'Ngjarjet në dokumentet e tekstit janë të ndërlidhura në mënyra komplekse. Në këtë letër, ne studiojmë dy lloje lidhjesh: Koreferencën e ngjarjeve dhe Sekuencën e ngjarjeve. Ne tregojmë se struktura e dekodimit popullor si pemë për Koreferencën e ngjarjeve automatike nuk është e përshtatshme për Sekuencën e ngjarjeve. Për këtë qëllim, ne propozojmë një algoritëm dekodimi bazuar në grafik që është i aplikueshëm për të dy detyrat. Algoritmi i ri i dekodimit mbështet ngritjet fleksible të funksioneve për të dy detyrat. Empirikisht, sistemi ynë i konferencës së ngjarjeve ka arritur shfaqjen më të lartë në detyrën e konferencës së ngjarjeve TAC-KBP 2015 dhe sistemi ynë i sekuencës së ngjarjeve mundet një bazë të fortë të bazuar në kohë, të informuar nga orakulli. Ne diskutojmë sfidat e studimit të këtyre marrëdhënieve të ngjarjeve.', 'af': "@ info: whatsthis In hierdie papier, ondersoek ons twee tipes verwanting: Event Koreferensie en Event Sequencing. Ons wys dat die populêre boom- soos dekodering struktuur vir outomatiese gebeurtenis voorkeur is nie geskikbaar vir gebeurtenisvolgorde nie. Na hierdie einde voorstel ons 'n graafgebaseerde dekoderingsalgoritme wat toewenbaar is vir beide taak. Die nuwe dekoderingsalgoritme ondersteun fleksibele funksie stel vir beide taak. Regtig, ons gebeurtenis koreferensie stelsel het state-of-the-art-performance op die TAC-KBP 2015 gebeurtenis koreferensie taak bereik en ons gebeurtenis sekwensiestelsel slaan 'n sterk tydsgebaseerde, orakel-inligtige basisline. Ons bespreek die uitdagings om hierdie gebeurtenis te studeer.", 'am': 'ሁኔታ፦ በዚህ ገጽ ውስጥ ሁለት ዓይነት የግንኙነት ዓይነት እና የጉዳዩ ክፍል እና የሁኔታ ግንኙነት እና ትምህርት እናደርጋለን፡፡ እናሳያቸዋለን የዛፍ የሚመስል አቀማመጥ መሠረት ለገቢው የጉዳዩ ክፍል ለሁኔታ እቅድ አይገባውም፡፡ ለዚህ መጨረሻ፣ ለሁለቱ ስራዎች የሚጠቅመውን የgraph-based የድምፅ አቋራጭ መፍጠር እናስባለን፡፡ አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር በተለይ፣ የግንኙነታችን የክፍለ ዘመቻ ስርዓት TAC-KBP 2015 የግንኙነታችንን ክፍለ ሥርዓት አግኝቷል፡፡ We discuss the challenges of studying these event relations.', 'hy': "Տեքստի փաստաթղթերի իրադարձությունները փոխկապակցված են բարդ ձևերով: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք երկու տեսակի հարաբերություններ' իրադարձությունների համաձայն և իրադարձությունների հաջորդականություն: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս, որ ծառի նման կոդավորման հայտնի կառուցվածքը ավտոմատիկ իրադարձությունների կորֆերանսի համար չի համապատասխանում իրադարձությունների հաջորդականության համար: Այս նպատակով, մենք առաջարկում ենք գծագրի վրա հիմնված բաժանելու ալգորիթմ, որը կիրառվում է երկու խնդիրների համար: The new decoding algorithm supports flexible feature sets for both tasks.  Իմպերիկապես, մեր իրադարձությունների կորֆերենսի համակարգը հասել է 2015-ի իրադարձությունների կորֆերենսի հանձնարարության վերաբերյալ լավագույն արդյունքներին, և մեր իրադարձությունների հաջորդականության համակարգը հաղթահարում է ժամանակային հիմքի ուժեղ հիմքը, որը տեղեկացված է ժառան Մենք քննարկում ենք այս իրադարձությունների հարաբերությունների ուսումնասիրելու մարտահրավերները:", 'az': 'Mətn belələrində olanlar kompleks yollarla bağlı olarlar. Bu kağızda, iki növ bağlantı öyrənirik: Vaqialar Öyrənməsi və Vaqialar Sequenci. Bizim göstəririk ki, ağac kimi avtomatik olaraq kodlama yapısı olaraq yaxşılıqları olaraq seçmək üçün uyğun deyildir. Bu səbəbdə, hər iki işə uyğun bir grafik tabanlı kodlama algoritmi təklif edirik. Yeni kodlama algoritmi iki işin üçün fleksibil xüsusiyyətləri dəstəkləyir. İmparatorlıq olaraq, olaraq mərhəmət sistemimiz TAC-KBP 2015 olaraq mərhəmət törətməsini başa düşdü və olaraq seçmə sistemimiz möhkəm vaxtlı, oralıq-bilgili temel çətinlərini yendi. Biz bu olaraq əlaqələrini öyrənmək üçün çətinliklərlə mübahisə edirik.', 'bn': 'টেক্সট ডকুমেন্টের অনুষ্ঠান কমপ্লিক্স দ্বারা সংযুক্ত। এই পত্রিকায় আমরা দুটি ধরনের সম্পর্ক গবেষণা করছি: ইভেন্ট কোরেফারেন্স এবং ইভেন্ট সেকেন্সিং। আমরা দেখাচ্ছি যে স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ইভেন্ট কোরেফারেন্সের জন্য জনপ্রিয় গাছের মতো ডিকোডিং কাঠামো যথেষ্ট নয়। এই পর্যন্ত আমরা একটি গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক ডিকোডিং অ্যালগরিদম প্রস্তাব করি যা উভয় কাজের জন্য প্রয়োজন। নতুন ডিকোডিং অ্যালগরিদম উভয় কাজের জন্য ফ্লিক্সিবল বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী সেট সমর্থন করে। সামান্য ভাবে আমাদের অনুষ্ঠানের কোরেফেন্স সিস্টেম টাসি-কেবিপি ২০১৫ সালের অনুষ্ঠানের কোরেন্স কর্মসূচিতে রাষ্ট্রের পরিস্থিতি পেয়েছে এবং আমাদের আমরা এই অনুষ্ঠানের সম্পর্ক পড়ার চ্যালেঞ্জ নিয়ে আলোচনা করি।', 'ca': "Els esdeveniments dels documents de text estan relacionats de maneres complexes. En aquest article estudiem dos tipus de relació: Coreferència d'Events i Seqüenciació d'Events. Mostrem que l'estructura popular de decodificació de l'arbre per a la Coreferència d'Events automatitzada no és adequada per a la seqüència d'Events. Per això, proposem un algoritme de decodificació basat en gràfics aplicable a les dues tasques. El nou algoritme de decodificació suporta conjunts de característiques flexibles per a les dues tasques. Empiricament, el nostre sistema de coreferència d'esdeveniments ha aconseguit un rendiment més avançat en la tasca de coreferència d'esdeveniments TAC-KBP 2015 i el nostre sistema de seqüenciació d'esdeveniments va superar una base basada temporalment i informada en oracle. Discutem els reptes d'estudiar aquestes relacions.", 'cs': 'Události v textových dokumentech jsou vzájemně propojeny složitými způsoby. V tomto článku studujeme dva typy vztahů: Coreference událostí a sekvence událostí. Ukazujeme, že populární struktura dekódování stromu pro automatizovanou akci Coreference není vhodná pro sekvenci událostí. Za tímto účelem navrhujeme dekódovací algoritmus založený na grafech, který je použitelný na obě úlohy. Nový dekódovací algoritmus podporuje flexibilní sady funkcí pro obě úkoly. Empiricky dosáhl náš systém koreference událostí nejmodernějšího výkonu na úkolu koreference událostí TAC-KBP 2015 a náš systém sekvencování událostí překonává silný časově založený na věštcích. Diskutujeme o výzvách při studiu těchto vztahů.', 'bs': 'Događaji u tekstskim dokumentima su međusobno povezani na kompleksni način. U ovom papiru proučavamo dvije vrste odnosa: korisnost događaja i sekvencija događaja. Pokazujemo da popularna struktura dekodiranja sličnog drveta za automatsku pristojnost događaja nije prikladna za sekvencu događaja. Za taj cilj predlažemo algoritam za dekodiranje na grafiku koji se primjenjuje oba zadatka. Novi algoritam za dekodiranje podržava fleksibilne funkcije za obje zadatke. Empirički, naš sistem korisnosti događaja postigao je izvedbu stanja umjetnosti na zadatku korisnosti događaja TAC-KBP 2015, a naš sistem sekvencije događaja pobjeđuje jaku temeljnu, oralnu osnovnu liniju. Razgovaramo o izazovima proučavanja ovih odnosa o događajima.', 'et': "Tekstidokumentides sisalduvad sündmused on omavahel keeruliselt seotud. Käesolevas töös uurime kahte tüüpi seoseid: sündmuste korrektseerimine ja sündmuste järjestamine. Näitame, et populaarne puusarnane dekodeerimisstruktuur automatiseeritud Event Coreference'i jaoks ei sobi Event Sequencing'i jaoks. Selleks pakume välja graafilise dekodeerimise algoritmi, mis sobib mõlemale ülesandele. Uus dekodeerimisalgoritm toetab paindlikke funktsioonikomplekte mõlema ülesande jaoks. Empiiriliselt on meie sündmuste koreferentsi süsteem saavutanud tipptasemel tulemused TAC-KBP 2015 sündmuste koreferentsi ülesandel ja meie sündmuste järjestamise süsteem ületab tugevat ajapõhist oraakkelipõhist algtaset. Arutleme nende üritussuhete uurimise väljakutseid.", 'fi': 'Tekstiasiakirjojen tapahtumat liittyv瓣t toisiinsa monimutkaisella tavalla. T瓣ss瓣 artikkelissa tutkimme kahdenlaisia suhteita: Event Coreference ja Event Sequencing. Osoitamme, ett瓣 suosittu puunkaltainen dekooderirakenne automaattiselle tapahtumakorferenssille ei sovellu tapahtumasekvensointiin. T瓣t瓣 varten ehdotamme graafiseen dekoodausalgoritmiin perustuvaa algoritmia, joka soveltuu molempiin teht瓣viin. Uusi dekoodausalgoritmi tukee joustavia ominaisuuksia molempiin teht瓣viin. Empiirisesti tapahtumakoreferenssij瓣rjestelm瓣mme on saavuttanut huipputason suorituskyvyn TAC-KBP 2015 tapahtumakoreferenssiteht瓣v瓣ss瓣 ja tapahtumasekvensointij瓣rjestelm瓣mme voittaa vahvan aikapohjaisen oraakkelipohjaisen l瓣ht繹tilanteen. Keskustelemme n瓣iden tapahtumasuhteiden tutkimisen haasteista.', 'jv': "eventpage Nang pemilih iki, kéné milih akèh klember akèh lanung: Awak dhéwé ngerasakno karo hal-hal sing dibutdecoding kanggo ngerasakno akèh 'events corefection' ora tau nggawe kanggo events Seyenging. Nyong-ngobro iki, kita supoyo nggawe barang-kotang Algorithm sing bisa dadi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe decoding Ngucap tidak, sistem coreferning anyar iki wis ngerasai state-of-the-arts nggawe gerapakan karo coreferning task kanggo rerayane seneng nggawe events sewenging sistem sumungo sistem sing dianggawe daftar na sistem sing basa temu pental, ora iso nggawe barang-sistem sing perusahaan Awak dhéwé beraksi perbudhakan kanggo nglanggar nggawe barang iki.", 'he': 'אירועים במסמכים טקסטים קשורים אחד לשני בדרכים מורכבות. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו לומדים שני סוגים של יחסים: אנחנו מראים שהמבנה הפופולרי של הפענוח דומה לעצים לאירועים אוטומטיים לא מתאים לעקוף אירועים. למטרה זו, אנו מציעים אלגוריתם לפענוח מבוסס בגרף שימשיך לשני המשימות. האלגוריתם החדש של הפענוח תומך בתוכניות גמישות לשני המשימות. באימפריה, מערכת הקשר שלנו לאירועים השיגה ביצועים חדשים במשימת הקשר לאירועים TAC-KBP 2015 ומערכת הקשר האירועים שלנו מנצחת בסיס זמני חזק ומודע על אורקל. אנחנו מדברים על האתגרים של למדת יחסי האירועים האלה.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Ga wannan takardan, munã karatun nau'i biyu masu husũma: Shirin Hanyar Haƙin da Cikakken Bayani. Tuna nũna cewa, tsarin kodinta-kamar itãce na umare wa Corfence na farat-ɗabi'a ba ya daidai ga Duk da Bayan Aiki ba. Ga wannan, Munã goyyar da algoritin kodi a kan grafi wanda ake amfani da dukansu. The new decoding algorithm supports flexible feature sets for both tasks.  Ina amfani da shi, ma'anarmu na aikin ranar-sanar ta sami halin ta TAC-KBP 2015 Munã jãyayya masu muramman da ke karanta mazaunin waɗannan.", 'sk': 'Dogodki v besedilnih dokumentih so medsebojno povezani na kompleksne načine. V tem prispevku preučujemo dve vrsti relacij: korferenco dogodkov in zaporedje dogodkov. Pokazali smo, da priljubljena drevesni dekodirna struktura za avtomatizirano korferenco dogodkov ni primerna za zaporedje dogodkov. V ta namen predlagamo grafski dekodirni algoritem, ki se uporablja za obe nalogi. Nov algoritem dekodiranja podpira prilagodljive nabore funkcij za obe opravili. Empirično je naš sistem koreference dogodkov dosegel najsodobnejšo uspešnost pri nalogi koreference dogodkov TAC-KBP 2015, naš sistem zaporedja dogodkov pa premaga močno časovno osnovno osnovno osnovno osnovo, ki temelji na oraklu. Razpravljamo o izzivih preučevanja teh dogodkovnih odnosov.', 'bo': 'ཡིག་གེའི་ཡིག་གེའི་ནང་དུ་བྱུང་བ་དེ་ཚོར་འདྲེན་གྱི་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་དང་འབྲེལ་བ་ཡིན། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་འབྲེལ་བ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་ལྟ་བུའི་མཐུན་སྐྱེས་བ་དང་། ང་ཚོས་རང་འགུལ་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་ལྟར་སྤྱོད་པའི་རྩ་འབྲེལ་རྩིས་བ་བཟོ་བའི་དབྱིབས མཐའ་མར་དེ་ལ། ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱིས་བྱ་རིམ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཞི་རྟེན་པའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཞིག་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། The new decoding algorithm supports flexible feature sets for both tasks. དེ་ལྟ་བུའི་དོན་ལས། ང་ཚོའི་བྱ་འགུལ་གདོང་རིམ་གྱི་མ་ལག་གིས་TAC-KBP་ལྟ་བུའི་གནས་སྟངས་གདོང་བསྐྱོད་དང་། དུས་ཚོད་བྱ་འགུལ་གྱི་མ་ལག ང་ཚོས་བྱ་འགུལ་འབྲེལ་བ་འདི་དག་གི་གདོང་ལེན་དག་གི་གོ་སྐབས་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System : Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'ar': 'نظام الفائز بتحدي ذكاء المحادثة NIPS لعام 2017: وكيل محادثة قائم على المهارة مع مدير حوار خاضع للإشراف', 'pt': 'Sistema Vencedor do NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017: Agente de conversação baseado em habilidades com gerente de diálogo supervisionado', 'es': 'Sistema ganador del NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017: Agente conversacional basado en habilidades con administrador de diálogos supervisado', 'fr': 'Système gagnant du NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017\xa0: Agent conversationnel basé sur les compétences avec gestionnaire de dialogue supervisé', 'ja': 'NIPS会話型インテリジェンスチャレンジ2017勝者システム：監督されたダイアログマネージャーを持つスキルベースの会話型エージェント', 'ru': 'Система победителей NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017: разговорный агент на основе навыков с диспетчером диалога под надзором', 'hi': 'NIPS संवादात्मक खुफिया चैलेंज 2017 विजेता प्रणाली: पर्यवेक्षित संवाद प्रबंधक के साथ कौशल-आधारित संवादात्मक एजेंट', 'zh': 'NIPS 2017 年会言智能挑战赛获胜者统:盖技能之对摄,有监督之管理器', 'ga': 'Córas Buaiteora Dúshlán Faisnéise Comhrá 2017 NIPS: Gníomhaire Comhrá bunaithe ar scil le Bainisteoir Dialóige Maoirsithe', 'ka': 'NIPS კონტაქციონალური ინტელექტის გარეშე 2017 ვიღებელი სისტემა: Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'el': 'Σύστημα νικητών: Πρακτορής συνομιλίας βασισμένος σε δεξιότητες με εποπτευόμενο διαχειριστή διαλόγου', 'hu': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Győztes Rendszer: Készségalapú beszélgetési ügynök felügyelt párbeszédkezelővel', 'it': 'Sistema vincitore NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017: agente di conversazione basato sulle competenze con responsabile di dialogo supervisionato', 'lt': 'NIPS konversacinės žvalgybos uždavinys 2017 m. laimėtojo sistema: įgūdžiais pagrįstas konversacinis agentas su prižiūrimu dialogo valdytoju', 'kk': 'NIPS конвертациялық интеллективтік шақыру 2017 жетілдіруші жүйесі: Бақылау диалог менеджері менеджерімен бақылап тұрған конвертациялық агенті', 'mk': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Победнички систем: Конверзационален агент со надгледуван менаџер на дијалози', 'ms': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'mt': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'ml': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'mn': 'NIPS ярилцлага Оюун ухааны шалгалт 2017 Хөрсөн систем: Сургуульд суурилсан ярилцлагын агентай Нэгдсэн Диалог Менежер', 'pl': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 System zwycięzców: Agent konwersacyjny oparty na umiejętnościach z nadzorowanym menedżerem dialogów', 'sr': 'NIPS Konverzacionalni obaveštajni izazov 2017. pobednièki sistem: Konverzacioni agent na praksi sa nadzornim menadžerom dijaloga', 'ro': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Sistemul câștigător: Agent conversațional bazat pe abilități și Manager de dialog supravegheat', 'si': 'NIPS කතා කරණාකරණ සංවාදය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 2017 විනාශ පද්ධතිය: ස්කිල් අධාරිත කතා කරණාකරණ නියෝජිත සං', 'sv': 'Vinnarsystem för NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017: Skill-based Conversational Agent med övervakad dialogchef', 'ta': 'Comment', 'so': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skill-based conversation Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'ur': 'NIPS مکالمانی ایٹلینگ چالینگ 2017 وینر سیسٹم: اسکیل-بنیاد مکالمانی اگنٹ سپرویز ڈیلوگ منڈیر کے ساتھ', 'no': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skildebasert samtaleagent med overvakt dialoghandsamar', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'NIPS Giao thông tình báo Challeng bây-7 Winner System: Skill-based Conversation Agent with Supervisced Dialogo Manager', 'bg': 'Система за победители: базиран на умения разговорен агент с надзорен мениджър на диалога', 'hr': 'NIPS razgovorni obavještajni izazov za pobjednički sustav 2017: Konverzacioni agent na temelju vještina s upraviteljem nadzornog dijaloga', 'nl': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winnersysteem: op vaardigheden gebaseerde gespreksagent met begeleide dialoogmanager', 'da': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Vindersystem: Færdighedsbaseret samtaleagent med supervised Dialog Manager', 'de': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skill-based Conversational Agent mit Supervised Dialog Manager', 'id': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'fa': 'پیروزی برنده سیستم مکالمه\u200cهای صحبت NIPS ۲۰۱۷: مامور مکالمه\u200cهای روشن با مدیر محافظت دیalog تحت نظر', 'ko': 'NIPS 대화 스마트 챌린지 2017 승자 시스템: 기술 기반 대화 에이전트 및 감독 대화 관리자', 'sw': 'Changamoto la Kielelezi la NIPS 2017 Mfumo wa Mshindi: Shirika la mazungumzo lililoko kwenye magonjwa na Mkurugenzi wa Dialog', 'af': 'NIPS Gespraakte Inteligenskap Opdrag 2017 Winner Stelsel: Skill-gebaseerde Gespraakte Agent met Supervised Dialoog Bestuurder', 'tr': 'NIPS Geçmişi Maglumaty Otomatik Gözetme 2017 Ýarnyş Sistemi: Iňlisi Görkezilen диалог Müdiri bilen Batyr', 'sq': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skills-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'am': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'hy': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Winner System: Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'bn': 'এনআইপিএস আলোচনায় তথ্য চ্যালেঞ্জ ২০১৭ বিজয়ী সিস্টেম: স্কিল ভিত্তিক আলোচনা এজেন্ট সুপারভিস্ট ডায়ালগ ম্যানেজার সহ', 'az': 'NIPS Konuşuşuş İngilizci Tərcümə 2017 Winner Sistemi: Skill-based Konuşuşuş Aģentəri Supervised Dialog Manager ilə', 'bs': 'NIPS Konverzacionalni obavještajni izazov za pobjednički sustav 2017: Konverzacioni agent na praksi s nadzornim menadžerom dijaloga', 'ca': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 System de guanyadors: Agent de conversació basat en habilitats amb gestionar diàleg supervisat', 'et': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Võitjate süsteem: oskustepõhine vestlusagent koos järelevalvega dialoogihalduriga', 'cs': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Systém vítězů: Konverzační agent založený na dovednostech s dozorovaným dialogovým manažerem', 'fi': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 Voittajajärjestelmä: Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'jv': 'NIASS conversationsal Sapil Mindelung 2011 Winter System: Skill-basa conversationsal ajan karo super Vised Dialog Administrator', 'sk': 'NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 zmagovalni sistem: spretnosti temelječi pogovorni agent z nadzorovanim upraviteljem dialoga', 'he': 'NIPS Conversation Intelligence Challenge 2017 מערכת המנצחים: סוכן שיחה מבוסס על כישורים עם מנהל דיאלוגים משגיח', 'bo': 'NIPS གཏམ་གླེང་གཏོང་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ལྟ་བུ་གཏོང་ལོགས་2017 རྒྱལ་ཁབ་མ་ལག: Skill-based Conversational Agent with Supervised Dialog Manager'}
{'en': 'We present bot#1337 : a dialog system developed for the 1st NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). The aim of the competition was to implement a bot capable of conversing with humans based on a given passage of text. To enable conversation, we implemented a set of skills for our bot, including chit-chat, topic detection, text summarization, question answering and question generation. The system has been trained in a supervised setting using a dialogue manager to select an appropriate skill for generating a response. The latter allows a developer to focus on the skill implementation rather than the finite state machine based dialog manager. The proposed system bot#1337 won the competition with an average dialogue quality score of 2.78 out of 5 given by human evaluators. Source code and trained models for the bot#1337 are available on GitHub.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o bot#1337: um sistema de diálogo desenvolvido para o 1º NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). O objetivo da competição era implementar um bot capaz de conversar com humanos com base em uma determinada passagem de texto. Para permitir a conversa, implementamos um conjunto de habilidades para nosso bot, incluindo bate-papo, detecção de tópicos, resumo de texto, resposta a perguntas e geração de perguntas. O sistema foi treinado em um ambiente supervisionado usando um gerenciador de diálogo para selecionar uma habilidade apropriada para gerar uma resposta. O último permite que um desenvolvedor se concentre na implementação da habilidade em vez do gerenciador de diálogo baseado em máquina de estado finito. O sistema proposto bot#1337 venceu a competição com uma pontuação média de qualidade de diálogo de 2,78 de 5 dada por avaliadores humanos. O código-fonte e os modelos treinados para o bot#1337 estão disponíveis no GitHub.', 'es': 'Presentamos bot #1337: un sistema de diálogo desarrollado para el 1st NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConVai). El objetivo de la competencia era implementar un bot capaz de conversar con humanos a partir de un pasaje de texto dado. Para permitir la conversación, implementamos un conjunto de habilidades para nuestro bot, que incluyen charlas, detección de temas, resumen de texto, respuesta a preguntas y generación de preguntas. El sistema ha sido entrenado en un entorno supervisado utilizando un administrador de diálogo para seleccionar una habilidad adecuada para generar una respuesta. Esto último permite que un desarrollador se centre en la implementación de habilidades en lugar de en el administrador de diálogos basado en máquinas de estados finitos. El bot #1337 del sistema propuesto ganó la competencia con un puntaje promedio de calidad de diálogo de 2.78 sobre 5 otorgado por evaluadores humanos. El código fuente y los modelos entrenados para el bot #1337 están disponibles en GitHub.', 'ar': 'نقدم bot # 1337: نظام حوار تم تطويره لتحدي ذكاء المحادثة الأول NIPS 2017 (ConvAI). كان الهدف من المسابقة هو تنفيذ روبوت قادر على التحدث مع البشر بناءً على مقطع معين من النص. لتمكين المحادثة ، قمنا بتطبيق مجموعة من المهارات لروبوتنا ، بما في ذلك الدردشة الشيت ، واكتشاف الموضوع ، وتلخيص النص ، والإجابة على الأسئلة ، وإنشاء الأسئلة. تم تدريب النظام في بيئة خاضعة للإشراف باستخدام مدير حوار لاختيار مهارة مناسبة لتوليد استجابة. يسمح الأخير للمطور بالتركيز على تنفيذ المهارات بدلاً من مدير الحوار القائم على آلة الحالة المحدودة. ربح نظام bot # 1337 المقترح في المنافسة بمتوسط نقاط جودة حوار 2.78 من 5 قدمها مقيِّمون بشريون. يتوفر كود المصدر والنماذج المدربة للبوت # 1337 على GitHub.', 'fr': "Nous présentons le bot #1337\xa0: un système de dialogue développé pour le 1er NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Le but du concours était de mettre en place un bot capable de converser avec des humains sur la base d'un passage de texte donné. Pour permettre la conversation, nous avons mis en place un ensemble de compétences pour notre bot, y compris le clavardage, la détection de sujets, la synthèse de texte, la réponse aux questions et la génération de questions. Le système a été formé dans un environnement supervisé à l'aide d'un gestionnaire de dialogue afin de sélectionner une compétence appropriée pour générer une réponse. Ce dernier permet au développeur de se concentrer sur l'implémentation des compétences plutôt que sur le gestionnaire de dialogue basé sur une machine à états finis. Le robot système #1337 proposé a remporté le concours avec un score moyen de qualité de dialogue de 2,78 sur 5 attribué par des évaluateurs humains. Le code source et les modèles formés pour le bot #1337 sont disponibles sur GitHub.", 'ja': 'BOT # 1337をご紹介します。これは、NIPS会話インテリジェンスチャレンジ2017 （ ConvAI ）のために開発されたダイアログシステムです。コンペティションの目的は、テキストの特定の一節に基づいて人間と会話できるボットを実装することでした。会話を可能にするために、チャットチャット、トピックの検出、テキストの要約、質問の回答、質問の生成など、ボットのための一連のスキルを実装しました。システムは、応答を生成するための適切なスキルを選択するために、ダイアログマネージャーを使用して、監督された環境でトレーニングされています。後者は、開発者が有限状態マシンベースのダイアログマネージャではなく、スキルの実装に焦点を当てることを可能にする。提案されたシステムボット＃ 1337は、人間の評価者から与えられた5つのうち2.78の平均的な対話品質スコアで競争に勝利しました。ボット# 1337のソースコードとトレーニング済みモデルは、GitHubで入手できます。', 'zh': '余介bot#1337:为2017年第一NIPS对智能挑战赛(ConvAI)发之对。 比赛者,所以成文给定也段落与人言机器人。 为言机器人施技,闲题检文摘要。 统已教于监管理器,以应其能。 后之人许开发人员专于技能,非有限状态机之对管理器。 拟议之统机器人#1337赢得比赛,人伦平对分为2.78分(满分5分)。 机器人#1337之源代码,可得而GitHub也。', 'hi': 'हम बॉट # 1337 प्रस्तुत करते हैं: 1 एनआईपीएस संवादात्मक खुफिया चुनौती 2017 (ConvAI) के लिए विकसित एक संवाद प्रणाली। प्रतियोगिता का उद्देश्य पाठ के दिए गए मार्ग के आधार पर मनुष्यों के साथ बातचीत करने में सक्षम एक बॉट को लागू करना था। वार्तालाप को सक्षम करने के लिए, हमने अपने बॉट के लिए कौशल का एक सेट लागू किया, जिसमें चिट-चैट, विषय का पता लगाना, पाठ सारांशीकरण, प्रश्न उत्तर और प्रश्न पीढ़ी शामिल हैं। सिस्टम को प्रतिक्रिया उत्पन्न करने के लिए एक उपयुक्त कौशल का चयन करने के लिए एक संवाद प्रबंधक का उपयोग करके एक पर्यवेक्षित सेटिंग में प्रशिक्षित किया गया है। उत्तरार्द्ध एक डेवलपर को परिमित राज्य मशीन आधारित संवाद प्रबंधक के बजाय कौशल कार्यान्वयन पर ध्यान केंद्रित करने की अनुमति देता है। प्रस्तावित सिस्टम बॉट # 1337 ने मानव मूल्यांकनकर्ताओं द्वारा दिए गए 5 में से 2.78 के औसत संवाद गुणवत्ता स्कोर के साथ प्रतियोगिता जीती। स्रोत कोड और बॉट # 1337 के लिए प्रशिक्षित मॉडल गिटहब पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Представляем бот№1337: диалоговую систему, разработанную для 1-го конкурса NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Целью конкурса было внедрение бота, способного общаться с людьми на основе данного отрывка текста. Чтобы включить разговор, мы реализовали набор навыков для нашего бота, включая чат, обнаружение темы, резюмирование текста, ответы на вопросы и генерацию вопросов. Система была обучена в контролируемой обстановке с использованием менеджера диалога для выбора соответствующего навыка для генерирования ответа. Последний позволяет разработчику сосредоточиться на реализации навыка, а не на диспетчере диалоговых окон на основе конечного автомата. Предлагаемая система Bot#1337 выиграла конкурс со средним баллом качества диалога 2,78 из 5, предоставленным оценщиками-человеками. Исходный код и обученные модели для бота#1337 доступны на GitHub.', 'ga': "Cuirimid bot #1337 i láthair: córas dialóige a forbraíodh don 1ú Dúshlán Faisnéise Comhrá NIPS 2017 (ConvAI). Ba é aidhm an chomórtais bot a chur i bhfeidhm a bheadh in ann comhrá a dhéanamh le daoine bunaithe ar sliocht áirithe téacs. Chun comhrá a chumasú, chuireamar sraith scileanna i bhfeidhm dár bot, lena n-áirítear chit-chat, braite topaicí, achoimre téacs, freagra ceisteanna agus giniúint ceisteanna. Cuireadh oiliúint ar an gcóras i suíomh maoirsithe ag baint úsáide as bainisteoir dialóige chun scil chuí a roghnú chun freagairt a ghiniúint. Ligeann an dara ceann d'fhorbróir díriú ar chur i bhfeidhm na scileanna seachas ar an mbainisteoir dialóige bunaithe ar mheaisín stát críochta. Bhuaigh an córas bot#1337 atá beartaithe an comórtas le meánscór cáilíochta idirphlé 2.78 as 5 tugtha ag meastóirí daonna. Tá cód foinse agus samhlacha oilte don bot # 1337 ar fáil ar GitHub.", 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα διαλόγου που αναπτύχθηκε για την 1η πρόκληση συνομιλίας 2017 (ConvAI). Στόχος του διαγωνισμού ήταν να εφαρμόσει ένα ρομπότ ικανό να συνομιλεί με ανθρώπους με βάση ένα δεδομένο απόσπασμα κειμένου. Για να καταστεί δυνατή η συνομιλία, εφαρμόσαμε ένα σύνολο δεξιοτήτων για το ρομπότ μας, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της συνομιλίας, της ανίχνευσης θεμάτων, της σύνοψης κειμένου, της απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις και της δημιουργίας ερωτήσεων. Το σύστημα έχει εκπαιδευτεί σε εποπτευόμενο περιβάλλον χρησιμοποιώντας έναν διαχειριστή διαλόγου για να επιλέξει μια κατάλληλη ικανότητα για τη δημιουργία μιας απόκρισης. Το τελευταίο επιτρέπει σε έναν προγραμματιστή να επικεντρωθεί στην υλοποίηση δεξιοτήτων και όχι στον διαχειριστή διαλόγου πεπερασμένης κατάστασης που βασίζεται στη μηχανή διαλόγου. Το προτεινόμενο σύστημα κέρδισε τον διαγωνισμό με μέση βαθμολογία ποιότητας διαλόγου 2.78 στα 5 που δόθηκε από ανθρώπους αξιολογητές. Ο πηγαίος κώδικας και τα εκπαιδευμένα μοντέλα για το ρομπότ#1337 είναι διαθέσιμα στο GitHub.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a bot#1337-es párbeszédrendszert, amelyet az 1. NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI) kifejlesztettek. A verseny célja egy olyan bot megvalósítása volt, amely egy adott szövegrész alapján képes emberekkel beszélgetni. A beszélgetés lehetővé tétele érdekében robotunk számára számos készséget alkalmaztunk, beleértve a csevegést, a témák észlelését, a szövegösszefoglalást, a kérdések megválaszolását és a kérdések generálását. A rendszert felügyelt környezetben képezték egy párbeszédkezelő segítségével, hogy kiválassza a megfelelő készséget a válasz generálásához. Ez utóbbi lehetővé teszi a fejlesztő számára, hogy a készség megvalósítására összpontosítson a véges állapotú gép alapú párbeszédkezelő helyett. A javasolt 1337-es rendszerbot az emberi értékelők által adott 5-ből 2,78 átlagos párbeszédminőségi pontszámmal nyerte meg a versenyt. A bot#1337 forráskódja és képzett modellei elérhetők a GitHub-on.', 'kk': 'Біз bot# 1337: 2017 жылдың 1- ші NIPS конвертациялық интеллекті шақыру үшін жасалған диалог жүйесі. Конкурстың мақсаты - адамдармен сөйлесу мүмкіндігін көмектесетін мәтін жолына негізделген ботты орындау. Сөйлесуді рұқсат ету үшін, біз bot үшін бірнеше нақты жұмыс істедік: chit- chat, нақышты анықтау, мәтін тұжырымдамасы, сұрақ жауап және сұрақ құру үшін. Жүйе жауап беру үшін дұрыс таңдау үшін диалог менеджерін қолданып бақылау параметрлерінде оқылған. Соңғы жасаушыларға диалог менеджерінің орнына аяқталған күй- жай меңзерінің күй- жай жүйесіне назар ауыстыруға мүмкіндік береді. Бұл жүйелік bot# 1337 адамдардың бағалаушыларының орташа диалогтың сапасы нәтижесімен 2,78 жылдамасын жетті. Бұл bot# 1337 үшін көзі код мен оқылған үлгілер GitHub- да бар.', 'it': "Vi presentiamo bot#1337: un sistema di dialogo sviluppato per la 1a NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Lo scopo del concorso era quello di implementare un bot in grado di dialogare con gli esseri umani sulla base di un dato passaggio di testo. Per consentire la conversazione, abbiamo implementato una serie di competenze per il nostro bot, tra cui chit-chat, rilevamento degli argomenti, sintesi del testo, risposta alle domande e generazione delle domande. Il sistema è stato addestrato in un ambiente supervisionato utilizzando un gestore di dialogo per selezionare un'abilità appropriata per generare una risposta. Quest'ultimo permette a uno sviluppatore di concentrarsi sull'implementazione delle competenze piuttosto che sul gestore di dialogo basato su macchine a stato finito. Il robot di sistema proposto #1337 ha vinto il concorso con un punteggio medio di qualità del dialogo di 2,78 su 5 dati dai valutatori umani. Il codice sorgente e i modelli addestrati per il bot#1337 sono disponibili su GitHub.", 'lt': 'We present bot#1337: a dialog system developed for the 1st NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI).  Konkurencijos tikslas buvo įgyvendinti robotą, galintį kalbėti su žmonėmis remiantis tam tikra teksto dalimi. To enable conversation, we implemented a set of skills for our bot, including chit-chat, topic detection, text summarization, question answering and question generation.  Sistema buvo apmokyta prižiūrima aplinka, naudojant dialogo valdytoją, kad būtų galima pasirinkti tinkamą atsako sukūrimo įgūdį. Pastaruoju atveju kūrėjas gali sutelkti dėmesį į įgūdžių įdiegimą, o ne į užbaigtos būsenos mašinos dialogo valdytoją. The proposed system bot#1337 won the competition with an average dialogue quality score of 2.78 out of 5 given by human evaluators.  Šaltinis kodas ir parengti roboto #1337 modeliai pateikiami GitHub tinklalapyje.', 'mk': 'Презентираме робот# 1337: дијалошки систем развиен за првиот преговарачки интелигенциски предизвик на NIPS 2017 (ConvAI). Целта на натпреварот беше да спроведе робот способен да разговара со луѓето врз основа на одреден текст. To enable conversation, we implemented a set of skills for our bot, including chit-chat, topic detection, text summarization, question answering and question generation.  Системот е обучен во надгледувано поставување користејќи менаџер на дијалог за избор на соодветна вештина за генерирање одговор. Последниот овозможува развивачот да се фокусира на имплементацијата на вештини наместо на менаџерот на дијалози базиран на крајна состојба на машина. Предложениот системски бот#1337 победи на натпреварот со просечна оценка на квалитетот на дијалогот од 2,78 од 5, дадена од човечките оценки. Изворен код и тренирани модели за роботот #1337 се достапни на GitHub.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ബോട്ട് # 1337: ആദ്യത്തെ NIPS സംസാരത്തിലെ ഇന്\u200dറലിജെന്\u200dസ് ചാലഞ്ചെന്\u200dജ് 2017 (കോണ്\u200dവിഐഎ) നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ച ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ പ്രതിയോഗിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഒരു ബോട്ട് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നത് മനുഷ്യരോടൊപ്പം സംസാരിക്കാന സംസാരം പ്രാവര്\u200dത്തികമാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ ബോട്ടിന് ഒരു കൂട്ടം കഴിവുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിച്ചു, ചിറ്റ് ചാറ്റ്, പ്രഭാഷണം കണ്ടെ ഒരു ഉത്തരം ഉണ്ടാക്കുന്നതിനായി ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് മാനേജര്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d നിരീക്ഷിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന അവസാനം സ്റ്റേറ്റ് മെഷീന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തുള്ള ഡയലോഗ് മാനേജരിനെക്കാള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിവുകള്\u200d പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പി പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സിസ്റ്റം ബോട്ട് # 1337, ഒരു സാധാരണ ഡയലോഗ് സാക്ഷ്യം സ്കോര്\u200dട്ട് സ്കോര്\u200d 2. 78 ല്\u200d നിന്നും മനുഷ്യര ഗിറ്റ്ഹുബില്\u200d സ്രോതസ്സ് കോഡും പരിശീലന മോഡലുകളും ലഭ്യമാണ്.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan bot#1337: sistem dialog yang dikembangkan untuk cabaran kecerdasan percakapan NIPS pertama 2017 (ConvAI). Tujuan pertandingan adalah untuk melaksanakan robot yang mampu berbincang dengan manusia berdasarkan satu laluan teks tertentu. Untuk memungkinkan perbualan, kami melaksanakan set kemahiran untuk robot kami, termasuk chat-chat, pengesan topik, ringkasan teks, jawapan soalan dan generasi soalan. Sistem telah dilatih dalam tetapan yang diawasi menggunakan pengurus dialog untuk memilih kemahiran yang sesuai untuk menghasilkan balasan. Yang terakhir membenarkan pembangun untuk fokus pada pelaksanaan kemahiran daripada pengurus dialog berdasarkan mesin keadaan tertentu. The proposed system bot#1337 won the competition with an average dialogue quality score of 2.78 out of 5 given by human evaluators.  Source code and trained models for the bot#1337 are available on GitHub.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer bot# 1337: eit dialogsystemet utvikla for den første NIPS konversjonale intelligens utfordringen 2017 (ConvAI). Målet på konkurransen var å implementera ein bot som kan konvertera med menneske basert på eit gitt tekst- passasjon. For å slå på samtalen, implementerte vi eit sett av ferdighetar for boten vårt, inkludert chit-chat, emne-oppdaging, tekstsamansering, spørsmål-svar og spørsmål-generering. Systemet er trent i eit oversikt innstilling ved å bruka ein dialoghandsamar for å velja eit passande kvalitet for å laga ein svar. Dei siste lèt ein utviklar fokusere på praktiske implementasjonen i staden for dialoghandsamaren som er basert på avslutta tilstandsmashine. Det foreslåde system bot#1337 vann konkurransen med gjennomsnittlig dialogkvalitetskort på 2,78 av 5 som gjeven av menneskelige evalueringar. Kjeldekode og trengte modeller for bot# 1337 er tilgjengeleg på GitHub.', 'mn': 'Бид bot#1337-г танилцуулж байна: 2017 оны НИП-ын ярилцлагын оюун ухааны шалгалт (ConvAI) 1-р диалог системийг хөгжүүлсэн. Дөрсөлдөөний зорилго нь хүмүүстэй ярилцаж чадах ботуудыг хөгжүүлэх байсан. Дэлхийг ашиглахын тулд бид bot-ын хувьд хэдэн чадварыг хэрэгжүүлсэн. Читт-сүүлт, сэдэв олох, текст дуран дуран, асуулт хариулт болон асуулт гаргах үед. Энэ систем хариу үйлдвэрлэх боломжтой чадварыг сонгохын тулд диалог менежер ашиглаж, удирдлагатай байгууллаганд суралцагдсан. Эцэст нь хөгжүүлэгчид чадваруудын дасгал хөгжүүлэгч диалог менеджерын оронд төгсгөл байдал дээр анхаарах боломжтой. Баталсан системийн bot#1337 нь хүн төрөлхтний оюутнуудын 5-аас 2.78 дундаж диалог чанартай өрсөлдөөнийг ялсан. Гитхаб дээр эх үүсвэрийн код болон сургалтын загвар өгөгдсөн.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw robot#1337: sistema ta’ djalogu żviluppata għall-ewwel Sfida ta’ Intelliġenza Konversazzjonali tan-NIPS 2017 (ConvAI). L-għan tal-kompetizzjoni kien li jimplimenta robot li kapaċi jikkonverti mal-bnedmin abbażi ta’ passaġġ partikolari tat-test. Biex nippermettu l-konverżjoni, implimentajna sett ta’ ħiliet għall-robot tagħna, inkluż iċ-ċatt-chat, l-individwazzjoni tas-suġġetti, is-sommarju tat-test, it-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet u l-ġenerazzjoni tal-mistoqsijiet. Is-sistema ġiet imħarrġa f’ambjent sorveljat bl-użu ta’ maniġer tad-djalogu biex jagħżel ħila xierqa għall-ġenerazzjoni ta’ rispons. Dan tal-a ħħar jippermetti li żviluppatur jiffoka fuq l-implimentazzjoni tal-ħiliet minflok fuq il-maniġer tad-djalogu bbażat fuq il-magna tal-istat finit. Is-sistema proposta bot#1337 rebħet il-kompetizzjoni b’punteġġ medju ta’ kwalità tad-djalogu ta’ 2.78 minn kull 5 mogħtija mill-evalwaturi umani. Il-kodiċi tas-sors u mudelli mħarrġa għall-robot#1337 huma disponibbli fuq GitHub.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy bot#1337: system dialogowy opracowany dla I NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Celem konkursu było wdrożenie bota zdolnego do rozmowy z ludźmi na podstawie danego fragmentu tekstu. Aby umożliwić rozmowę, wdrożyliśmy zestaw umiejętności dla naszego bota, w tym chit-chat, wykrywanie tematów, podsumowanie tekstu, odpowiadanie na pytania i generowanie pytań. System został przeszkolony w nadzorowanym otoczeniu za pomocą menedżera dialogu w celu wyboru odpowiedniej umiejętności do generowania odpowiedzi. Ten ostatni pozwala deweloperowi skupić się na implementacji umiejętności, a nie na menedżerze dialogowym opartym na maszynie skończonego stanu. Zaproponowany system bot#1337 wygrał konkurs ze średnim wynikiem jakości dialogu 2,78 z piątej oceny przez ludzkich oceniaczy. Kod źródłowy i przeszkolone modele bota#1337 są dostępne na GitHub.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo bot#1337: sistem dijaloga razvijen za prvi izazov razgovorne obavještajne službe NIPS 2017 (ConvAI). Cilj takmičenja je bio da provede robot sposoban da razgovara sa ljudima na temelju određenog prolaza teksta. Da bismo omogućili razgovor, proveli smo skup vještina za naš robot, uključujući čit-chat, otkrivanje tema, sažetanje teksta, odgovor na pitanja i generaciju pitanja. Sistem je obučen u nadzornom nastavu koristeći menadžera dijaloga kako bi izabrao odgovarajuću vještinu za stvaranje odgovora. Posljednji omogućava razvijaču da se fokusira na implementaciju vještina umjesto upravljača dijaloga na završnoj državnoj mašini. Predloženi sistemski bot #1337 osvojio je konkurenciju sa prosječnim rezultatima kvalitete dijaloga od 2,78 od 5 koji su dobili ljudski procjenitelji. Izvorni kod i obučeni modeli za robot#1337 dostupni su na GitHubu.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm bot#1337: un sistem de dialog dezvoltat pentru prima ediție NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Scopul concursului a fost de a implementa un bot capabil să converseze cu oamenii pe baza unui pasaj dat de text. Pentru a permite conversația, am implementat un set de abilități pentru robotul nostru, inclusiv chit-chat, detectarea subiectelor, rezumarea textului, răspunsul la întrebări și generarea de întrebări. Sistemul a fost instruit într-un cadru supravegheat folosind un manager de dialog pentru a selecta o abilitate adecvată pentru generarea unui răspuns. Acesta din urmă permite unui dezvoltator să se concentreze pe implementarea abilităților mai degrabă decât pe managerul de dialog bazat pe mașini de stat finit. Robotul de sistem propus #1337 a câștigat competiția cu un scor mediu de calitate a dialogului de 2,78 din 5 dat de evaluatorii umani. Codul sursă și modelele instruite pentru bot # 1337 sunt disponibile pe GitHub.', 'si': 'අපි බොට්#1337 ප්\u200dරදේශ කරනවා: 1 NIPS කතා කරණාකරණ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් 2017 (ConvAI) සඳහා සංවාද පද්ධතියක් විකාශ කරනවා. ප්\u200dරදේශයේ අලක්ෂාව තමයි මිනිස්සුන්ට පැත්තක් පැත්තක් අධාරිත කරන්න පුළුවන් බොට් එකක් ප්\u200dරදේශ කරන්න. සංවාදය සක්\u200dරිය කරන්න, අපි අපේ බොට්ටුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්න සහ ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ කරලා තියෙනවා. පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න සඳහා සංවාද ප්\u200dරධානකයෙක් භාවිත කරලා බලන්න සැකසුම් වලට ප්\u200dරශ අන්තිම විකාසකයෙක්ට අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්න පුළුවන් විකාසකයෙක්ට අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වි මිනිස්සු විශ්ලේෂකයෙන් දෙන්න පුළුවන් පද්ධතිය බොට්#1337 සාමාන්\u200dය සංවාද ප්\u200dරමාණයක් අවස්ථාවක් සමග 2 භාවිත කෝඩ් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරලා තියෙන්නේ බොට්#1337 වලින් GitHub වලින්.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar bot#1337: ett dialogsystem utvecklat för första NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Syftet med tävlingen var att implementera en bot som kunde kommunicera med människor utifrån en given textpassage. För att möjliggöra konversation implementerade vi en uppsättning färdigheter för vår bot, inklusive chit-chat, ämnesidentifiering, textsammanfattning, frågesvar och frågegenerering. Systemet har tränats i en övervakad miljö med hjälp av en dialoghanterare för att välja lämplig kompetens för att generera ett svar. Det senare tillåter en utvecklare att fokusera på färdighetsimplementeringen snarare än den finita tillståndsmaskinens dialoghanterare. Den föreslagna systembot#1337 vann tävlingen med en genomsnittlig dialogkvalitetspoäng på 2,78 av 5 som ges av mänskliga utvärderare. Källkod och utbildade modeller för bot#1337 finns tillgängliga på GitHub.', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo wadaynaa bot#1337: nidaamka dialogue oo u horumariyey 1st NIPS Challenge Intelligence 2017 (ConvAI). Ujeedada qasbadu waa in la sameeyo bot awoodi karo in la hadlo dadka ku saleysan baasabka qoraalka la siiyey. To enable conversation, we implemented a set of skills for our bot, including chit-chat, topic detection, text summarization, question answering and question generation.  Isticmaalka waxaa lagu tababaray qaab ilaaliya oo lagu isticmaalayo maamulaha dialogue si uu u doorto aqoon ku haboon oo uu sameynayo jawaab. Qofka dambe wuxuu qofka horumarinaya ku kalsoonaan karaa qaabilaada aqoonta, taas oo aan aheyn maamulka diyaarinta dowladda ee ku saleysan qoraalka. Isticmaalka la soo jeeday bot #1337 waxay ku guuleysay tartanka qiimeynta diyaarinta ee ugu dhexeeya 2,78 oo ka mid ah 5 qiimeeyayaasha dadka. GitHub waxaad ka heleysaa sumada Source and models la tababaray bot #1337.', 'ta': 'நாம் இப்போது பாட்# 1337: முதல் NIPS உரையாடல் முறைமை உருவாக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது 2017 (கான்விஏ). The aim of the competition was to implement a bot capable of conversing with humans based on a given passage of text.  பேச்சை செயல்படுத்த, நாங்கள் எங்கள் பாட்டுக்கு ஒரு சில திறமைகளை செயல்படுத்தினோம், சிட்ட-அரட்டை, தலைப்பு கண்டுபிடிப்பு, உரை சுர Name பின்னணி மாநிலை இயந்திரம் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள உரையாடல் மேலாளரை விட திறமை செயல்பாட்டை கவனம் செலுத்த அனுமதிக்கும் உர முன்நிர்ணயிக்கப்பட்ட அமைப்பு பாட் # 1337 ஒரு சராசரியான உரையாடல் தரம் மதிப்பு மதிப்பு மதிப்பெண்ணால் இந்த போட்டினை வெற்றி மூல குறியீடு மற்றும் பயிற்சி மாதிரிகள் கிட்ஹுப் மீது கிடைக்கும்.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ bot# 1337: დიალოგური სისტემა, რომელიც განვითარებულია პირველი NIPS კონტაქციონალური ინტელექციის განსახულებაში 2017 (ConvAI). კონკრენტების მიზეზი იყო, რომ პროტიქტის შესაძლებლობად ადამიანებთან გასაუბრობა. ჩვენ ჩვენი ბოტისთვის კონფიგურაციის შესაძლებლობისთვის, ჩვენ ჩვენი ბოტისთვის კონფიგურაციას გამოყენეთ, შესაძლებლობისთვის chit-chat, ტექსტის განახლება, ტექს Name შემდეგ განვითარებელი შესაძლებელია განვითარებელისთვის კონსტურაციას კონსტურაციას მხოლოდ განვითარებელი დიალოგის მენეჯერი. პროგრამეტული სისტემის ბოტი #1337 გავიღეთ კონსპენტირება საშუალო დიალოგის კაvalitātის მონაცემებით 2.78 წლის 5 წლის მონაცემებით. თჱრჲფნთწრ კჲე თ რპვნთპანთ მჲევლთ ჱა ბჲრ# 1337 ჟვ ოპთლთფარ ნა GitHub.', 'ur': 'ہم bot#1337 کو پیش کرتے ہیں: ایک диалог سیسٹم 2017 کے لئے پیدا ہوا ہے۔ مقابلہ کا موقع یہ تھا ہم نے اپنے بوٹ کے لئے ایک مجموعہ کائنات کی عملہ کی ہے، جیسے چیٹ-چیٹ، ٹیپٹ شناسایی، ٹیکس ترکیب، سوال جواب اور سوال نسل کے شامل ہے. سیسٹم کو ایک ڈیلوگ منڈیر کے مطابق نظارت کی جگہ کے لئے ایک جواب جوڑنے کے لئے مناسب استعداد انتخاب کرنے کے لئے سٹم کی تعلیم دی گئی ہے. پچھلے نے ایک ڈوئیلوگر کو قابلیت کی عملومات پر تمرکز کرنا اجازت دیتا ہے فینٹ سٹیٹ ماشین بنیاد ڈیلوگر منڈیر کے بجائے۔ پیشنهاد سیسٹم bot#1337 نے انسان کی ارزیابی کرنے والوں کے ذریعے 2.78 کی آسانی کے ساتھ مسابقه کو غالب کیا۔ بوٹ#1337 کے لئے سراسر کوڈ اور تربین کی موڈل GitHub پر موجود ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu yerda bot # 1337: birinchi NIPS muloqat so'zlari 2017 (KonvAI) uchun yaratilgan muloqat tizimi. O'tibor berish uchun odamlar bilan bog'lash mumkin bo'lishi mumkin. Talab qilishni yoqish uchun, biz bot uchun ko'plab suhbat, mavzu aniqlash, matn hisoblanishi, savol javob berish va savol generalida yetkazmiz. Name Name Tashqi qilingan tizim bot # 1337 rivojlanuvchisi, oddiy evaluatorlar 5 tomonidan 2.78 dan 2.78 qiymati darajasi bilan o'zgartirdi. Bot # 1337 uchun manba kodi va taʼminlovchi modellar GitHub'da mavjud.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu bot\\ 35; 1337: một hộp thoại được phát triển cho công trình Điều tra tình báo NIPS Thứ nhất K1 (ConvAAI). Mục đích của cuộc thi là thực hiện một con robot có khả năng trò chuyện với con người dựa trên một đoạn văn bản cụ thể. Để mở cuộc trò chuyện, chúng tôi thực hiện một bộ kỹ năng cho robot của mình, gồm chit-chat, phát hiện chuyên đề, tóm tắt văn bản, câu hỏi và thế hệ câu hỏi. Hệ thống đã được huấn luyện trong một thiết lập giám sát, sử dụng một người quản lý đối thoại để chọn một kỹ năng thích hợp để tạo ra phản ứng. Phần sau cho phép một nhà phát triển tập trung vào sự ứng dụng kỹ năng thay vì quản lý hộp thoại cấu tạo cỗ máy đã giới hạn. Hệ thống đã đề nghị trở nên dễ dàng hơn bởi những người phân tích chất lượng trung bình trong cuộc đối thoại. Mã nguồn và các mô hình huấn luyện cho con robot\\ 35; 1337 có sẵn trên GitHub.', 'nl': 'We presenteren bot#1337: een dialoogsysteem ontwikkeld voor de 1e NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Het doel van de wedstrijd was om een bot te implementeren die in staat is om met mensen te praten op basis van een bepaalde passage van tekst. Om conversatie mogelijk te maken, hebben we een reeks vaardigheden geïmplementeerd voor onze bot, waaronder chit-chat, topic detection, tekst samenvatting, vragen beantwoorden en vragen genereren. Het systeem is getraind in een begeleide omgeving met behulp van een dialoogmanager om een geschikte vaardigheid te selecteren voor het genereren van een reactie. Dit laatste stelt een ontwikkelaar in staat om zich te concentreren op de vaardigheidsimplementatie in plaats van de finite state machine gebaseerde dialoogmanager. De voorgestelde systeembot#1337 won de competitie met een gemiddelde dialoogkwaliteitsscore van 2,78 van 5, gegeven door menselijke beoordelaars. Broncode en getrainde modellen voor de bot#1337 zijn beschikbaar op GitHub.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer bot#1337: et dialogsystem udviklet til 1. NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Formålet med konkurrencen var at implementere en bot, der kunne tale med mennesker baseret på en given tekstpassage. For at muliggøre samtale implementerede vi en række færdigheder til vores bot, herunder chit-chat, emneovervågning, tekstopsummering, spørgsmålsbesvarelse og spørgsmålsgenerering. Systemet er uddannet i en overvåget indstilling ved hjælp af en dialoghåndtering til at vælge en passende færdighed til at generere et svar. Sidstnævnte giver en udvikler mulighed for at fokusere på færdighedsimplementeringen snarere end den finite state maskine baserede dialoghåndtering. Den foreslåede systembot#1337 vandt konkurrencen med en gennemsnitlig dialog kvalitet score på 2,78 ud af 5 givet af menneskelige evaluatorer. Kildekode og trænede modeller til bot#1337 er tilgængelige på GitHub.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo bot#1337: dijalogski sustav razvijen za prvi izazov NIPS razgovorne obavještajne obavještajne izazove 2017 (ConvAI). Cilj natjecanja je bio provesti robot sposoban razgovarati s ljudima na temelju određenog prolaza teksta. Da bismo omogućili razgovor, proveli smo skup vještina za naš robot, uključujući čit-chat, otkrivanje tema, sažetak teksta, odgovor na pitanja i generaciju pitanja. Sistem je obučen u nadzornom nastavu koristeći menadžera dijaloga kako bi izabrao odgovarajuću vještinu za stvaranje odgovora. Posljednji omogućava razvijaču fokusirati se na provedbu vještina umjesto upravljača dijaloga na temelju krajnjeg državnog stroja. Predloženi robot sustava #1337 osvojio je natjecanje s prosječnim rezultatom kvalitete dijaloga od 2,78 od 5 koji su dobili procjene ljudskih procjenara. Izvorni kod i obučeni modeli za robot#1337 dostupni su na GitHubu.', 'bg': 'Представяме бот#1337: диалогова система, разработена за първото предизвикателство за разговорно разузнаване 2017 (Конвай). Целта на конкурса беше да внедри бот, способен да разговаря с хора въз основа на даден текст. За да позволим разговора, ние внедрихме набор от умения за нашия бот, включително чат, откриване на теми, обобщаване на текст, отговор на въпроси и генериране на въпроси. Системата е обучена в контролирана обстановка, използвайки мениджър на диалози, за да избере подходящо умение за генериране на отговор. Последното позволява на разработчика да се фокусира върху изпълнението на уменията, а не върху машинния мениджър на диалоговия прозорец. Предложеният системен бот#1337 спечели конкурса със среден резултат за качество на диалога от 2.78 от 5, дадени от човешки оценители. Изходен код и обучени модели за бота # 1337 са налични в ГитХъб.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren bot#1337: ein Dialogsystem, das für die erste NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI) entwickelt wurde. Ziel des Wettbewerbs war es, einen Bot zu implementieren, der in der Lage ist, mit Menschen zu kommunizieren, basierend auf einer bestimmten Textpassage. Um Konversation zu ermöglichen, implementierten wir eine Reihe von Fähigkeiten für unseren Bot, einschließlich Chit-Chat, Themenerkennung, Textzusammenfassung, Fragebeantwortung und Fragegenerierung. Das System wurde in einer überwachten Umgebung unter Verwendung eines Dialogmanagers trainiert, um eine geeignete Fähigkeit für die Generierung einer Antwort auszuwählen. Letzteres ermöglicht es einem Entwickler, sich auf die Implementierung von Fertigkeiten anstatt auf den Finite State Machine basierten Dialogmanager zu konzentrieren. Das vorgeschlagene System bot#1337 gewann den Wettbewerb mit einem durchschnittlichen Dialogqualitätsscore von 2,78 von 5 von menschlichen Evaluatoren. Quellcode und trainierte Modelle für den bot#1337 sind auf GitHub verfügbar.', 'ko': '우리는bot#1337: 2017년 제1회 NIPS 대화 스마트 도전경기(ConvAI)를 위해 개발한 대화 시스템을 소개한다.경기의 목적은 로봇이 주어진 텍스트 구간에 따라 인간과 대화할 수 있도록 하는 것이다.대화를 실현하기 위해 우리는 우리의 로봇을 위해 채팅, 화제 검측, 텍스트 요약, 질문 대답과 질문 생성을 포함한 일련의 기능을 실현했다.이 시스템은 이미 감독이 있는 환경에서 교육을 받고 대화 관리자를 사용하여 적당한 기술을 선택하여 응답을 생성한다.후자는 개발자가 유한상태기 기반의 대화상자 관리자가 아니라 기술 실현에 전념할 수 있도록 한다.제안된 시스템 로봇 #1337이 경기에서 이겼고 인공 평가원이 제시한 5점 중 평균 대화의 질은 2.78점이었다.GitHub에서는 bot#1337의 소스 코드와 교육을 받은 모델을 제공합니다.', 'tr': "Biz bot#1337: 1-nji NIPS gürrüňlik Intelligence Challenge 2017-nji ýylda gelişmiş bir dialog sistemi. Rekabetin amacı, insanlarla verilen bir metin geçmesine dayanabilen bir bot yapmaktı. Qonuşmalary etkinleştirmek üçin, botlarymyz üçin bir topar ukyplary implemented etdik, bir tema oňlamak üçin, metin jemzalamak üçin, soragy jogap we soragy döretmek üçin. Bu sistem bir janlaşdyrmak üçin ýeterli ukyp saýlamak üçin bir dialog müdiri ullanýar. Soňky bir döwletçi, beýik durum makinelerine dayanan döwlet müdiri ýerine ukyp görkezmäge rugsat berýär. Görkezilen sistem bot#1337 adamlaryň deňlendirişleri tarapyndan 2.78 sany derejesi bilen duşuşyk gazandy. GitHub'da görkezilen ködler we eğitilenen nusgalar bar.", 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha bot #1337: Mfumo wa mazungumzo ulioandaliwa kwa ajili ya Mgogo wa kwanza wa Mazungumzo ya Ujasusi wa NIPS 2017 (ConvAI). Lengo la ushindani ni kutekeleza boti yenye uwezo wa kuzungumza na binadamu kwa kutumia ujumbe maalumu wa maandishi. Ili kuwezesha mazungumzo, tulitekeleza ujuzi mkubwa wa boti yetu, ikiwa ni pamoja na mazungumzo ya mazungumzo, kutambua mada, muhtasari wa maandishi, majibu na kizazi cha maswali. Mfumo umefundishwa katika kituo kinachofuatiliwa kwa kutumia mkusanyiko wa mazungumzo ili kuchagua ujuzi sahihi wa kutengeneza jibu. Baadae ya pili inaruhusu mwendeshaji wa kutumia ujuzi badala ya mashine ya serikali yenye msingi wa mazungumzo. Mfumo wa pendekezo #1337 ulishinda ushindani huo kwa kiwango cha wastani cha mazungumzo ya wastani cha 2.78 kati ya 5 zilizotolewa na watafiti wa binadamu. Kodi za vyanzo na mifano ya mafunzo ya bot #1337 zinapatikana kwenye GitHub.', 'fa': 'ما bot#1337 را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم: یک سیستم محاورۀ محاورۀ تحقیقات اطلاعات صحبت NIPS ۲۰۱۷ (ConvAI). هدف رقابت این بود که یک ربات قادر به گفتگو با انسانها بر اساس یک مسیر متن داده باشد. برای فعال کردن صحبت، ما مجموعه مهارت برای bot خود را اجرای کردیم، شامل صحبت چیت، شناسایی موضوع، جمع کردن متن، جواب سوال و نسل سوال. سیستم در تنظیمات مراقبت از استفاده از یک مدیر محاوره برای انتخاب مهارت مناسب برای تولید پاسخ آموزش داده شده است. آخرین اجازه می\u200cدهد که یک توسعه\u200cپذیر روی عملکرد مهارت تمرکز کند به جای مدیر محاورۀ محدوده\u200cی ماشین محدودیت. سیستم\u200cهای پیشنهاد bot#1337 با امتیاز کیفیت گفتگوی متوسط ۲.78 از ۵ که توسط ارزیابگران انسان داده می\u200cشود رقابت را برد. کد منبع و مدل آموزش آموزش برای bot# 1337 در GitHub موجود هستند.', 'am': '#1337: ለመጀመሪያ NIPS የኢንተርኔት የኢንተርኔት ጥያቄ 2017 (ConvAI) የተዘጋጀውን የጦማሪያን ስርዓት አቀረብን፡፡ ተቃውሞው ግን ከሰው ጋር ለመነጋገር የሚችል ቦት ነው፡፡ ለንግግር ለማስቻል፣ ለመቀበል እና ለመጠያየቅ ትውልድ እና ለመጠያየቅ ትውልድ እና ለመጠያየቅ ትውልድ እና ለጥያቄ ጥያቄን እና ለጥያቄ ብዙዎችን አስተማርተናል፡፡ በጥያቄ መምረጡ የተጠቃሚ እውቀትን ለመምረጥ በተጠቃሚ ማስተካከል ሲስተማርቷል፡፡ የመጨረሻው ጥያቄ የመስመር መስኮት ማሰናከል በሚያሳየው ጥያቄ ማሰናከል ይልቅ በአካባቢው ላይ ማክበር ይችላል፡፡ The proposed system bot#1337 won the competition with an average dialogue quality score of 2.78 out of 5 given by human evaluators.  Source code and trained models for the bot#1337 are available on GitHub.', 'af': "Ons stel bot# 1337 voor 'n dialoog stelsel ontwikkel vir die 1ste NIPS Gespraakte Inteligenskappe 2017 (ConvAI). Die doel van die sameswerking was om 'n bot te implementeer wat in staat kan omskakel met mense wat op 'n gegewe oorgang van teks gebaseer is. Om gesprekslyk te aktiveer, het ons 'n stel van kunstenaars vir ons bot geïmplementeer, insluitend chit-chat, onderwerp-opdekking, teks opsomming, vraag antwoord en vraaggenering. Name Die laaste laat toe 'n ontwikkelaar na fokus op die kunstenaar implementering eerder as die beëindige staatsmasjien gebaseerde dialoog bestuurder. Die voorgestelde stelsel bot#1337 wen die samenskap met 'n gemiddelde dialoog kwaliteit telling van 2.78 uit 5 gegee deur menslike evalueerders. Bronkode en opgelei modele vir die bot# 1337 is beskikbaar op GitHub.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim bot#1337: një sistem dialog i zhvilluar për sfidën e parë të NIPS Conversational Intelligence 2017 (ConvAI). Qëllimi i konkurrencës ishte të zbatonte një robot të aftë për të biseduar me njerëzit bazuar në një pasazh të caktuar teksti. Për të mundësuar bisedën, ne zbatuam një sërë aftësive për robotin tonë, duke përfshirë bisedën e bisedës, zbulimin e temave, përmbledhjen e tekstit, përgjigjen e pyetjeve dhe gjenerimin e pyetjeve. Sistemi është trajnuar në një vendosje të mbikqyrur duke përdorur një menaxher dialogu për të zgjedhur një aftësi të përshtatshme për krijimin e një përgjigje. Kjo e fundit lejon një zhvillues të përqëndrohet në zbatimin e aftësive në vend të menaxhuesit të dialogut të bazuar në makinën e kufizuar. The proposed system bot#1337 won the competition with an average dialogue quality score of 2.78 out of 5 given by human evaluators.  Kodi burimi dhe modelet e trajnuara për robotin #1337 janë në dispozicion në GitHub.', 'bn': 'আমরা বর্তমানে বোট #১৩৩৭: প্রথম এনআইপিএস আলোচনায় তদন্তের চ্যালেঞ্জ ২০১৭ (কনভিএই) জন্য একটি ডায়ালগ ব্যবস্থা উন্নয়ন করেছে। প্রতিযোগিতার লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে একটি বট বাস্তবায়িত করার যা মানুষের সাথে কথোপকথন করতে সক্ষম, যা একটি প্রদত্ত পাসেজের উপর ভিত কথোপকথন সক্রিয় করার জন্য আমরা আমাদের বটের জন্য কিছু দক্ষতা বাস্তবায়িত করেছি, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে চিট-চ্যাট, বিষয় সন্ধান, টেক্সট সার্মি একটি ডায়ালগ ম্যানেজার ব্যবহার করে সিস্টেমের প্রশিক্ষণ প্রশিক্ষণ করা হয়েছে যাতে একটি প্রতিক্রিয়া তৈরি করার জন্য একটি যথা সর্বশেষে একটি ডেভেলপারের অনুমতি দেয় যে সুন্দর রাষ্ট্রীয় মেশিন ভিত্তিক ডায়ালগ ম্যানেজারের চেয়ে দক্ষতা প্রয় প্রস্তাবিত সিস্টেম বোট #১৩৩৭ মানুষের মূল্যবোধকারীদের দ্বারা সাধারণ ডায়ালগের মানের স্কোর দিয়ে প্রতিযোগিতায় ২.  বোট #1337 এর জন্য সূত্র কোড এবং প্রশিক্ষিত মডেল গিটহাবে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'az': "Biz bot#1337'i göstəririk: 2017-ci NIPS Konversiyal Intelligence Challenge (ConvAI) üçün ilk dəyişiklik sistemi. Yarışmağın məqsədi insanlarla müzakirə edə biləcək robot istifadə etməkdir. Söhbətlərimizi fəallaşdırmaq üçün bot üçün bir takım yeteneklik təyin etdik, həmçinin chit-chat, məlumat keşfetməsi, məlumat toplaması, sual cavab vermək və sual nəsili içərisində. Sistem, cavab yaratmaq üçün uyğun yetenekliyi seçmək üçün dijalog müdürünün istifadəsində gözləmə qurğularında təhsil edildi. Sonrakı müəyyən edənin müəyyən edilmiş müəyyən məlumatı maşına dayanan dijalog müdürünün yerinə yeteneklik işlətməsinə odaqlanmasına izin verir. İstemləndirilən sistem bot#1337 insan değerlendiricilərin verdiyi ortalama dijalog qiyməti müqayisədə 2,78 dərəcəsi ilə müqayisədə qaldı. Bot#1337 üçün mənbə kodu və təhsil edilmiş modellər GitHub'da faydalanır.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo bot#1337: sistem dijaloga razvijen za prvi izazov NIPS razgovorne inteligencije 2017 (ConvAI). Cilj konkurencije je bio provesti robot sposoban razgovarati s ljudima na temelju određenog prolaza teksta. Da bismo omogućili razgovor, proveli smo skup vještina za našeg robota, uključujući čit-chat, otkrivanje tema, sažetak teksta, odgovor na pitanja i generaciju pitanja. Sistem je obučen u nadzornom nastavu koristeći menadžera dijaloga kako bi izabrao odgovarajuću vještinu za stvaranje odgovora. Posljednji omogućava razvijaču da se fokusira na provedbu vještina umjesto upravljača dijaloga na temelju krajnjeg državnog stroja. Predloženi sistemski bot #1337 osvojio je natjecanje s prosječnim rezultatom kvalitete dijaloga od 2,78 od 5 koji su dobili ljudski procjenitelji. Izvorni kod i obučeni modeli za robot#1337 dostupni su na GitHubu.', 'cs': 'Představujeme bot#1337: dialogový systém vyvinutý pro první NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Cílem soutěže bylo implementovat bota schopného komunikovat s lidmi na základě dané pasáže textu. Abychom umožnili konverzaci, implementovali jsme pro našeho bota sadu dovedností, včetně chit-chat, detekce témat, shrnutí textu, odpovědi na otázky a generování otázek. Systém byl vyškolen v dohledovém prostředí pomocí dialogového manažera k výběru vhodné dovednosti pro generování odpovědi. Druhý umožňuje vývojáři soustředit se na implementaci dovedností spíše než na správce dialogu založeného na konečném stavu stroje. Navržený systém bot#1337 vyhrál soutěž s průměrným skórem kvality dialogu 2,78 z pěti lidských hodnotících. Zdrojový kód a školené modely pro bota#1337 jsou k dispozici na GitHubu.', 'et': 'Tutvustame bot#1337: dialoogisüsteemi, mis on välja töötatud esimese NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI) jaoks. Konkursi eesmärgiks oli luua robot, mis suudab inimestega vestelda antud tekstilõigu alusel. Vestluse võimaldamiseks rakendasime oma boti jaoks mitmeid oskusi, sealhulgas vestlust, teemade tuvastamist, teksti kokkuvõtlikkust, küsimustele vastamist ja küsimuste genereerimist. Süsteemi on koolitatud järelevalve all, kasutades dialoogihaldurit, et valida sobiv oskus reageerimiseks. Viimane võimaldab arendajal keskenduda oskuste rakendamisele, mitte piiratud oleku masinapõhisele dialoogihaldurile. Kavandatud süsteemrobot#1337 võitis konkursi keskmise dialoogi kvaliteediskooriga 2,78 inimhindajate antud viiest. Lähtekood ja treenitud mudelid bot#1337 on saadaval GitHub.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme bot#1337: dialogijärjestelmän, joka on kehitetty ensimmäiseen NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 -haasteeseen (ConvAI). Kilpailun tavoitteena oli toteuttaa robotti, joka pystyy keskustelemaan ihmisten kanssa tietyn tekstin perusteella. Keskustelun mahdollistamiseksi toteutimme botillemme joukon taitoja, kuten chatin, aiheen havaitsemisen, tekstien yhteenvedon, kysymysten vastaamisen ja kysymysten luomisen. Järjestelmä on koulutettu valvotussa ympäristössä valintaikkunan hallintatyökalulla sopivan taidon valitsemiseksi vastauksen tuottamiseksi. Jälkimmäisen avulla kehittäjä voi keskittyä taitojen toteutukseen sen sijaan, että finite state machine based dialog manager. Ehdotettu järjestelmäbotti #1337 voitti kilpailun keskimääräisellä dialogin laatupisteellä 2,78 ihmisen arvioijien viidestä. Lähdekoodi ja koulutetut mallit botille #1337 ovat saatavilla GitHubissa.', 'id': 'We present bot#1337: a dialog system developed for the 1st NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI).  The aim of the competition was to implement a bot capable of conversing with humans based on a given passage of text.  Untuk memungkinkan percakapan, kami menerapkan set keterampilan untuk robot kami, termasuk chat-chat, deteksi topik, ringkasan teks, jawaban pertanyaan dan generasi pertanyaan. The system has been trained in a supervised setting using a dialogue manager to select an appropriate skill for generating a response.  Yang terakhir memungkinkan seorang pengembang untuk fokus pada implementasi keterampilan daripada manajer dialog berbasis mesin keadaan terbatas. Robot sistem yang diusulkan # 1337 memenangkan kompetisi dengan skor kualitas dialog rata-rata 2,78 dari 5 diberikan oleh evaluasi manusia. Kode sumber dan model terlatih untuk robot #1337 tersedia di GitHub.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Բոթ#1337: ՆիՊՍ-ի առաջին հաղորդակցման ինտելեգենցիայի մարտահրավերի համար զարգացած երկխոսային համակարգ 2017 թվականին (Կանվայ): The aim of the competition was to implement a bot capable of conversing with humans based on a given passage of text.  To enable conversation, we implemented a set of skills for our bot, including chit-chat, topic detection, text summarization, question answering and question generation.  The system has been trained in a supervised setting using a dialogue manager to select an appropriate skill for generating a response.  The latter allows a developer to focus on the skill implementation rather than the finite state machine based dialog manager.  Առաջարկված համակարգի բոտ#1337 հաղթեց մրցակցությունը մարդկային գնահատողների կողմից 2.78-ից 5-ից ստացված միջին հաջողության արդյունքում: Բոտոբոտի #1337 կոդի աղբյուրն ու վարժեցված մոդելները հասանելի են ԳիթՀուբի վրա:', 'ca': "Presentam el bot#1337: un sistema de diàleg desenvolupat per al primer repte de conversació NIPS 2017 (ConvAI). The aim of the competition was to implement a bot capable of conversing with humans based on a given passage of text.  Per poder conversar, vam implementar un conjunt d'habilitats per al nostre robot, incloent converses, detecció de temes, resum de text, resposta a preguntes i generació de preguntes. The system has been trained in a supervised setting using a dialogue manager to select an appropriate skill for generating a response.  The latter allows a developer to focus on the skill implementation rather than the finite state machine based dialog manager.  El sistema proposat bot#1337 va guanyar la competició amb una puntuació mitjana de qualitat del diàleg de 2,78 de cada 5 proporcionada per evaluadors humans. Source code and trained models for the bot#1337 are available on GitHub.", 'ha': "Tuna yanzu bot #1337: wata zauren akwatin bayani na farkon NIPS Conversal Inteligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Yayinsa da jigon ta kasance a cika wani bot mai iya iya iya yi magana da mutum a kan wani zaɓanci na littãfi. Ga idan an fara mazaɓa, sai mu yi amfani da wasu masu ƙarfi wa mazaɓa masu iya hanyarmu, kamar mazaɓa-mazaɓa, muhimmin matsayi, masu jibi da tambayar da kuma danne na tambayi. An sanar da shi na tsari cikin tsarin tsari da za'a yi amfani da manajan zauren akwatin bayani don ya zaɓi wani zane masu daidaita wa ka sami matsayi. Gani na yarda wani mai developer ya zura zura zura zura zura kan manajan zauren akwatin bayani na ƙayyade shirin ayuka na ƙayyade. Ga wanda aka buɗa na'urar kwamfyuta #1337 ya rinjãyi game da wani nau'in mazaɓa mai tsawo na zauren akwatin bayani na 2.78 daga 5 wanda aka bai wa mutum na ƙaddara. Kodi na kodi da aka sanar da shi wa bot #1337 za'a iya samar da GitHub.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam bot#1337: dialogni sistem, razvit za 1. NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). Cilj natečaja je bil vzpostaviti bot, ki je sposoben pogovarjati z ljudmi na podlagi določenega odlomka besedila. Da bi omogočili pogovor, smo za naš bot uvedli nabor veščin, vključno s klepetanjem, zaznavanjem teme, povzemanjem besedila, odgovarjanjem na vprašanja in ustvarjanjem vprašanj. Sistem je bil usposobljen v nadzorovani nastavitvi z uporabo upravljalca dialoga za izbiro ustrezne spretnosti za ustvarjanje odziva. Slednji omogoča razvijalcu, da se osredotoči na implementacijo spretnosti in ne na upravljalnik pogovornih pogovorov s strojem s končnim stanjem. Predlagani sistemski bot#1337 je zmagal na tekmovanju s povprečno oceno kakovosti dialoga 2,78 od 5, ki so jo dali človeški ocenjevalci. Izvorna koda in usposobljeni modeli za bot#1337 so na voljo na GitHub.', 'jv': '#1 Rayakno Panjenengan iki wis nguasai bot sing gawe nguasai mêng wong liyane karo wong liyane sing nyimpen karo seneng bersatu. Jejaring Sistem kang dipoleh nduwe akeh ngubungke nggo sistem menejer dialog kanggo nambah cara sing apik kanggo nggawe barang. Laptop" and "Desktop Ngubah bener Suoro kode lan model sing ditambah nggo bot', 'he': "אנחנו מציגים את רובוט #1337: מערכת דיאלוג שפותחת לאתגר המודיעין השיחה הראשון של NIPS 2017 (ConvAI). המטרה של התחרות הייתה להפעיל רובוט מסוגל לשוחח עם בני אדם מבוסס על מעבר מסוים של טקסט. כדי לאפשר שיחה, הפענחנו קבוצת כישורים עבור הרובוט שלנו, כולל שיט-צ'ט, גילוי נושאים, סאמריזציה טקסטית, עניין שאלות ודור שאלות. המערכת הואמנה במצב מבוקש באמצעות מנהל דיאלוג כדי לבחור כישור מתאים לייצור תגובה. האחרון מאפשר לפיתוח להתמקד בהפעלת הכישורים במקום במנהל הדיולוגים המבוסס על מכונת המדינה הגבוהה. רובוט המערכת המוצעת # 1337 זכה בתחרות עם תוצאה איכות דיאלוג ממוצע של 2.78 מתוך 5 שנתנה על ידי מערכי אנושיים. קוד מקור ומודלים מאומנים עבור הרובוט #1337 זמינים על GitHub.", 'bo': 'We present bot#1337: a dialog system developed for the 1st NIPS Conversational Intelligence Challenge 2017 (ConvAI). དཀའ་ངལ་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཡིག་གི་ཚིག་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་མི་དང་མཉམ་དུ་གཏོང་བ་སྤྱོད་པའི་bot གླེང་མོལ་ནུས་ཡོད་པར་བཟོ་བ་ལ་ང་ཚོས་bot་དང་གླེང་མོལ་དང་གཏོང་ཁེལ་བྱེད་པའི་སྣ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གཏོང་གི་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རྟགས མ་ལག་ནི་ལྟ་རྟོག མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་གནས་སྟངས་དང་གཞི་བརྟེན་པའི་ཌའི་ལོག་དོ་དམ་པ་ལས་སྟོན་རྩོམ་སྒྲིག་པ་ལ་དམིགས་གཏད་བཅུག་པ The proposed system bot#1337 won the competition with an average dialog quality score of 2.78 out of 5 given by human evaluators. bot#1337འདི་GitHub ནང་གི་ཐོག་ཁུངས་ཨང་དང་མཛོད་ཁང་གི་མིག་དཔེ་གཟུགས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'AMR Beyond the Sentence : the Multi-sentence AMR corpus', 'ar': 'AMR بعد الجملة: مجموعة AMR متعددة الجمل', 'fr': 'La résistance aux antimicrobiens au-delà de la peine\xa0: le corpus multisentence sur la RAM', 'es': 'AMR más allá de la sentencia: el corpus AMR de múltiples frases', 'pt': 'AMR Além da Sentença: o corpus AMR Multi-sentença', 'ja': 'AMR Beyond the Sentence: The Multi - sentence AMR corpus', 'ru': 'AMR Beyond the Sentence: The Multi-Sentence AMR corpus', 'zh': '越句AMR:多句AMR语料库', 'hi': 'एएमआर वाक्य से परे: बहु-वाक्य एएमआर कॉर्पस', 'ga': 'AMB Thar na Pianbhreithe: an corpas AMR Il-abairte', 'ka': 'AMR წესების გარეშე: მრავალი წესების AMR კორპუსი', 'hu': 'AMR Beyond the Sentence: a többmondatos AMR corpus', 'el': 'Πέρα από την πρόταση: το σώμα πολλαπλών προτάσεων', 'it': 'AMR Beyond the Sentence: il corpus AMR multi-frase', 'kk': 'Сөздің үстінен AMR: AMR корпус көп сөздері', 'lt': 'AMR Beyond the sentence: the Multisentence AMR corpus', 'mk': 'АМР надвор од реченицата: Мулти реченица АМР корпус', 'ms': 'AMR Beyond the Sentence: the Multi-sentence AMR corpus', 'ml': 'ശാസ്ത്രത്തിനു പുറത്തുള്ള AMR: മണ്ടി വാക്ക് AMR കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ്', 'mt': 'AMR Lil hinn mis-Sentenza: il-korpus AMR b’sentenzi multipli', 'mn': 'Үүний дараа AMR: олон өгүүлбэр AMR корпус', 'no': 'AMR etter setninga: AMR- korpusen for fleire setningar', 'pl': 'AMR Poza zdaniem: wielozadaniowy korpus AMR', 'ro': 'AMR Dincolo de sentință: corpul AMR cu mai multe propoziții', 'sr': 'AMR Iza kazne: Multi sentence AMR corpus', 'si': 'AMR වචනය පිටිපස්සේ: ගොඩක් වචනය AMR කොර්පස්', 'so': 'AMR ka sokow xukunka: AMR korpus', 'sv': 'AMR Bortom meningen: AMR-korpusen med flera meningar', 'ta': 'வாக்குப் பின்னால் AMR: The Multi- sentence AMR Corpus', 'ur': 'AMR فیصلہ کے بعد: Multi sentence AMR corpus', 'uz': 'Hujjatning orqali AMR: Multi- sentence AMR corpus', 'vi': 'AMR vượt biên bản bản bản bản án Hình sự AMR', 'nl': 'AMR Beyond the Sentence: het AMR corpus met meerdere zinnen', 'hr': 'AMR Iza kazne: multi-sentence AMR corpus', 'bg': 'АМР отвъд присъдата: корпус от многоизречения АМР', 'da': 'AMR Beyond te Sentence: den flere sætninger AMR corpus', 'de': 'AMR Jenseits des Satzes: Das mehrsätzige AMR-Korpus', 'id': 'AMR Beyond the Sentence: Multi-sentence AMR corpus', 'fa': 'AMR Beyond the sentence: the Multisentence AMR corpus', 'af': 'AMR buite die woord: die Multi sentence AMR corpus', 'sq': 'AMR Përtej Dënimit: Korpus AMR me shumë fjalë', 'sw': 'AMR Zaidi ya hukumu: Makosa ya Kimataifa', 'tr': 'AMR Sözünün ötesinde: Çok cümle AMR corpus', 'am': 'ከፈረደው ውጭ AMR: የብዙ ፍርድ አሜሪካ ኮርፓስ', 'hy': 'ԱՄՌ Առաջին դատողությունը. բազմադատողության ԱՄՌ կորպուսը', 'bn': 'শাস্তির পাশে এমআর: বহুবারের শাস্তি এমআর কোর্পাস', 'az': 'Sözünün ardınca AMR: Multi-sentence AMR corpus', 'bs': 'AMR Iza kazne: Multi sentence AMR corpus', 'ca': 'AMR més enllà de la Sentencia: el corpus AMR multi-frases', 'cs': 'AMR za větou: vícevětový AMR korpus', 'et': 'AMR pärast karistust: mitme lausega AMR korpus', 'fi': 'AMR tuomion takana: monilauseinen AMR-korpus', 'ko': '문장 이외의 AMR: 다중 문장 AMR 자료 라이브러리', 'jv': 'AM R sing dibutuhke Sentensi: dadi Multi-Sentensi AM R', 'ha': "AMR Bayon Al'arshi: The multi-filin AMR Cornas", 'he': 'AMR מעבר למשפט:', 'sk': 'AMR onkraj obsodbe: korpus AMR z več stavki', 'bo': 'AMR Sentence Beyond: the Multi-sentence AMR corpus'}
{'en': 'There are few corpora that endeavor to represent the semantic content of entire documents. We present a corpus that accomplishes one way of capturing document level semantics, by annotating coreference and similar phenomena (bridging and implicit roles) on top of gold Abstract Meaning Representations of sentence-level semantics. We present a new corpus of this annotation, with analysis of its quality, alongside a plausible baseline for comparison. It is hoped that this Multi-Sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) may become a feasible method for developing rich representations of document meaning, useful for tasks such as information extraction and question answering.', 'ar': 'هناك عدد قليل من المجاميع التي تسعى لتمثيل المحتوى الدلالي للوثائق بأكملها. نقدم مجموعة تُنجز طريقة واحدة لالتقاط دلالات مستوى المستند ، من خلال التعليق التوضيحي على المرجع والظواهر المماثلة (التجسير والأدوار الضمنية) فوق تمثيلات المعنى المجردة الذهبية من دلالات مستوى الجملة. نقدم مجموعة جديدة من هذا التعليق التوضيحي ، مع تحليل جودته ، جنبًا إلى جنب مع خط أساس معقول للمقارنة. من المأمول أن تصبح مجموعة AMR متعددة الجمل (MS-AMR) طريقة مجدية لتطوير تمثيلات غنية لمعنى المستند ، ومفيدة لمهام مثل استخراج المعلومات والإجابة على الأسئلة.', 'pt': 'São poucos os corpora que procuram representar o conteúdo semântico de documentos inteiros. Apresentamos um corpus que realiza uma maneira de capturar semântica em nível de documento, anotando correferência e fenômenos semelhantes (ponte e papéis implícitos) em cima de Representações de significado abstrato de ouro de semântica em nível de sentença. Apresentamos um novo corpus desta anotação, com análise de sua qualidade, juntamente com uma linha de base plausível para comparação. Espera-se que este corpus AMR Multi-Sentence (MS-AMR) possa se tornar um método viável para o desenvolvimento de representações ricas do significado do documento, útil para tarefas como extração de informações e resposta a perguntas.', 'es': 'Hay pocos corpus que se esfuercen por representar el contenido semántico de documentos completos. Presentamos un corpus que logra una forma de capturar la semántica a nivel de documento, anotando fenómenos de correferencia y similares (roles puente e implícitos) sobre representaciones de significado abstracto de oro de semántica a nivel de oración. Presentamos un nuevo corpus de esta anotación, con análisis de su calidad, junto con una línea de base plausible para la comparación. Se espera que este corpus AMR de múltiples frases (MS-AMR) pueda convertirse en un método factible para desarrollar representaciones ricas del significado de los documentos, útiles para tareas como la extracción de información y la respuesta a preguntas.', 'fr': "Il existe peu de corpus qui tentent de représenter le contenu sémantique de documents entiers. Nous présentons un corpus qui réalise une façon de capturer la sémantique au niveau du document, en annotant la coréférence et les phénomènes similaires (rôles de pontage et implicites) au-dessus des représentations de signification abstraite d'or de la sémantique au niveau de la phrase. Nous présentons un nouveau corpus de cette annotation, avec une analyse de sa qualité, ainsi qu'une base de référence plausible pour la comparaison. On espère que ce corpus AMR multi-phrases (MS-AMR) pourra devenir une méthode réalisable pour développer des représentations riches de la signification d'un document, utile pour des tâches telles que l'extraction d'informations et la réponse aux questions.", 'ja': '文書全体の意味的な内容を表現しようとするコーパはほとんどありません。私たちは、文レベルの意味論の抽象的意味論表現の上に、コアリファレンスと同様の現象（ブリッジと暗黙の役割）を注釈することによって、文書レベルの意味論をキャプチャする1つの方法を達成するコーパスを提示します。我々は、比較のための妥当なベースラインとともに、その品質の分析とともに、この注釈の新しいコーパスを提示します。このMulti - Sentence AMRコーパス（ MS - AMR ）は、情報抽出や質問応答などのタスクに役立つ、文書の意味の豊富な表現を開発するための実現可能な方法になることが期待されます。', 'zh': '少语料库力示全文档之语义。 发一语料库,句语义黄金抽象注同源类(桥接隐式角色)以成获文档语义之义。 发此注新语料库,析其质量,与一理较基线。 愿此多句AMR语料库(MS-AMR)可以为发文档义之可行,可以信息取问。', 'hi': 'कुछ कॉर्पोरेट हैं जो पूरे दस्तावेजों की शब्दार्थ सामग्री का प्रतिनिधित्व करने का प्रयास करते हैं। हम एक कॉर्पस प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो दस्तावेज़ स्तर के शब्दार्थ पर कब्जा करने का एक तरीका पूरा करता है, जो सोने के सार अर्थ वाक्य-स्तर के शब्दार्थ के प्रतिनिधित्व के शीर्ष पर सह-सम्मेलन और इसी तरह की घटनाओं (ब्रिजिंग और अंतर्निहित भूमिकाओं) को एनोटेट करके। हम तुलना के लिए एक प्रशंसनीय आधार रेखा के साथ इसकी गुणवत्ता के विश्लेषण के साथ, इस एनोटेशन का एक नया कॉर्पस प्रस्तुत करते हैं। यह आशा की जाती है कि यह बहु-वाक्य एएमआर कॉर्पस (एमएस-एएमआर) दस्तावेज़ अर्थ के समृद्ध प्रतिनिधित्व विकसित करने के लिए एक व्यवहार्य विधि बन सकता है, जो जानकारी निष्कर्षण और प्रश्न उत्तर देने जैसे कार्यों के लिए उपयोगी है।', 'ru': 'Существует несколько корпусов, которые пытаются представить семантическое содержание целых документов. Мы представляем корпус, который выполняет один из способов захвата семантики на уровне документа, аннотируя ядро и подобные явления (мостиковые и неявные роли) поверх золотого абстрактного смыслового представления семантики на уровне предложения. Мы представляем новый корпус этой аннотации с анализом ее качества, а также правдоподобную базовую линию для сравнения. Следует надеяться, что этот многопрофильный корпус АМР (MS-AMR) может стать осуществимым методом для разработки насыщенных представлений смысла документа, полезных для таких задач, как извлечение информации и ответы на вопросы.', 'ga': 'Is beag corpora a dhéanann iarracht ábhar shéimeantach na ndoiciméad iomlán a léiriú. Cuirimid corpas i láthair a chuireann bealach amháin i gcrích chun séimeantaic leibhéal doiciméad a ghabháil, trí chroílár agus feiniméin chomhchosúla (róil idirlinne agus intuigthe) a anótáil ar bharr an óir Léirithe Brí Teibí de shéimeantaic ar leibhéal na habairte. Cuirimid corpas nua den nóta seo i láthair, mar aon le hanailís ar a cháilíocht, mar aon le bunlíne inchreidte chun comparáid a dhéanamh. Táthar ag súil go bhféadfadh an corpas AMR Il-abairtí (MS-AMR) seo a bheith ina mhodh indéanta chun léiriúcháin shaibhre de bhrí doiciméad a fhorbairt, a bheidh úsáideach le haghaidh tascanna ar nós eastóscadh faisnéise agus ceisteanna a fhreagairt.', 'el': 'Υπάρχουν λίγα σώματα που προσπαθούν να αναπαραστήσουν το σημασιολογικό περιεχόμενο ολόκληρων εγγράφων. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σώμα που επιτυγχάνει έναν τρόπο καταγραφής της σημασιολογίας σε επίπεδο εγγράφου, σχολιάζοντας τη συνάφεια και παρόμοια φαινόμενα (γεφυρώνοντας και έμμεσους ρόλους) πάνω από το χρυσό κείμενο. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα νέο σώμα αυτού του σχολιασμού, με ανάλυση της ποιότητάς του, παράλληλα με μια εύλογη βάση σύγκρισης. Ελπίζουμε ότι αυτό το σώμα πολλαπλών φράσεων μπορεί να γίνει μια εφικτή μέθοδος για την ανάπτυξη πλούσιων αναπαραστάσεων της έννοιας εγγράφων, χρήσιμη για εργασίες όπως η εξαγωγή πληροφοριών και η απάντηση ερωτήσεων.', 'hu': 'Kevés corpora törekszik arra, hogy képviselje a teljes dokumentumok szemantikai tartalmát. Egy olyan korpuszt mutatunk be, amely a dokumentumszintű szemantika rögzítésének egyik módját valósítja meg, a coreferencia és hasonló jelenségek (áthidaló és implicit szerepek) megjegyzésével aranyszintű Absztrakt Jelentési Reprezentációk mondatszintű szemantika. Ennek a megjegyzésnek az új korpuszát mutatjuk be, amelynek minőségének elemzésével, valamint egy valószínű összehasonlítási alap mellett. Reméljük, hogy ez a többmondatos AMR korpusz (MS-AMR) megvalósítható módszer lehet a dokumentum jelentésének gazdag ábrázolására, amely hasznos olyan feladatokhoz, mint az információk kinyerése és a kérdések megválaszolása.', 'ka': 'თმა ნწკჲლკჲ კჲპოჲპა, კჲთრჲ ჟვ ჲოთრგარ ეა ოპვეჟრაგწრ უწლჲრჲ ეჲკსმვნრთ ჱა ჟვმანრთფვნ კჲნრვპ. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ კორპუსს, რომელიც ერთი გზა გავაკეთებს დოკუმენტიკის სიმენტიკის წინასწორებაზე, რომელიც წინასწორებულობა და სხვადასხვა ფენომენები (წინასწორება და იმპლიციტური პროლები) წინასწორებული აბსტრაქ ჩვენ ჩვენ ახალი კორპუსს ამ ამოტაციაზე, მისი კაalitეტის ანალიზაციით, შემდგომარებისთვის შესახებ შესახებ დავიწყებთ. იმედია, რომ ეს მრავალი სიტყვის AMR კოპპუსი (MS-AMR) შეიძლება იყოს შესაძლებელი პროცემი, როგორც ინფორმაციის ექსტრაქცია და კითხვის პასუხისთვის განვითარება დიდი გამოსახულებების განვითარება', 'it': "Ci sono pochi corpora che si sforzano di rappresentare il contenuto semantico di interi documenti. Presentiamo un corpus che realizza un modo di catturare la semantica a livello di documento, annotando coreferenza e fenomeni simili (ponti e ruoli impliciti) in cima all'oro Rappresentazioni astratte di significato della semantica a livello di frase. Presentiamo un nuovo corpus di questa annotazione, con analisi della sua qualità, insieme a una base plausibile per il confronto. Si spera che questo corpus AMR Multi-Sentence (MS-AMR) possa diventare un metodo fattibile per sviluppare ricche rappresentazioni del significato dei documenti, utili per compiti come l'estrazione di informazioni e la risposta alle domande.", 'lt': 'Keletas korporų stengiasi atstovauti semantiniam dokumentų turiniui. Mes pristatome korpusą, kuris pasiekia vieną būdą sugauti dokumentų lygmens semantiką, anotuojant koreferenciją ir panašius reiškinius (tiltų ir implicit ų vaidmenų) virš aukso Abstract Meaning Representations of sentence-level semantics. Mes pristatome naują šios anotacijos korpusą su jos kokybės analize kartu su tikėtina palyginimo pradine verte. Tikimasi, kad šis daugiakalbis AMR korpus (MS-AMR) gali tapti įmanomu būdu plėtoti daug dokumentų reikšmės atstovavimų, naudingų tokioms užduotims kaip informacijos gavimas ir atsakymas į klausimus.', 'kk': 'Барлық құжаттардың семантикалық мазмұнын көрсету үшін бірнеше корпора бар. Біз құжат деңгейіндегі семантикалық деңгейінің бір түрін алтын абстракт деңгейінде ұқсас және ұқсас пайдалануларды жазып тұрады. Біз осы жаңа жазбалардың корпусын көрсеткіздік, салыстыру үшін, салыстыруға болатын негізгі сызықтың жағында анализ болады. Бұл көп сөз AMR корпус (MS- AMR) құжаттың баяны түсініктемелерін жасау үшін, мәліметті тарқату мен сұрақ жауап беру үшін пайдалы тапсырмалар үшін мүмкін болуы мүмкін.', 'mk': 'Постојат неколку корпора кои се обидуваат да ја претстават семантичната содржина на цели документи. Презентираме корпус кој постигнува еден начин да ја фати семантиката на нивото на документите, со анотирање на соодветноста и слични феномени (мост и имплицитни улоги) врз златото Апстрактно значење претставувања на семантиката на нивото на речениците. Презентираме нов корпус од оваа анотација, со анализа на нејзиниот квалитет, заедно со веројатна основа за споредба. Се надева дека овој Мулти-судски АМР корпус (МС-АМР) може да стане фезибилен метод за развој на богати претставувања на значењето на документот, корисни за задачи како што се извлекувањето на информации и одговорите на прашањата.', 'ms': 'Ada beberapa korpra yang berusaha mewakili kandungan semantik seluruh dokumen. Kami memperkenalkan sebuah korpus yang mencapai satu cara untuk menangkap semantik aras dokumen, dengan menyatakan persamaan dan fenomena yang serupa (jembatan dan peranan implicit) di atas emas Abstract Meaning Representations of sentence-level semantics. Kami memperkenalkan korpus baru annotasi ini, dengan analisis kualitinya, di samping dasar yang boleh dibandingkan. Ia diharapkan bahawa korpus AMR Multi-Sentence (MS-AMR) ini mungkin menjadi kaedah yang boleh dilakukan untuk mengembangkan perwakilan kaya makna dokumen, berguna untuk tugas seperti ekstraksi maklumat dan jawapan soalan.', 'ml': 'എല്ലാ രേഖകളുടെയും സെമാന്റിക് ഉള്ളടക്കം പ്രതിനിധിയ്ക്കാന്\u200d ശ്രമിക്കുന്ന കോര്\u200dപ്പോരാ കുറച്ചുപ സ്വര്\u200dണ്ണ അബ്രാക്ട്രാക്റ്റ്റ് സെമാന്റിക്കിന്റെ മുകളില്\u200d പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് മുകളില്\u200d സ്വര്\u200dണ ഈ പ്രശ്നത്തിന്\u200dറെ പുതിയ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസിനെ ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നു, അതിന്\u200dറെ ഗുണവിശേഷവും, അതിന്\u200dറെ താല്\u200dപര്യത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ ഈ പല-ശിക്ഷ AMR കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് (MS-AMR) പ്രതീക്ഷിക്കുന്നത് രേഖയുടെ അര്\u200dത്ഥം സമ്പന്നതയുള്ള പ്രതിനിധികളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു സാധ്യതയാകും, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d', 'mt': 'There are few corpora that endeavor to represent the semantic content of entire documents.  Aħna nippreżentaw korpus li jwettaq mod wieħed ta’ kif tinqabad semantika fil-livell tad-dokument, billi ninnotaw il-koreferenza u fenomeni simili (rwoli ta’ pont u impliċiti) fuq id-deheb Rappreżentazzjonijiet ta’ tifsira assoluta tas-semantika fil-livell tas-sentenza. Aħna nippreżentaw korpus ġdid ta’ din l-annotazzjoni, b’analiżi tal-kwalità tagħha, flimkien ma’ linja bażi plawżibbli għat-tqabbil. Huwa ttamat li dan il-korpus AMR b’Sentenza Multi (MS-AMR) jista’ jsir metodu fattibbli għall-iżvilupp ta’ rappreżentazzjonijiet rikki ta’ tifsira tad-dokument, utli għal kompiti bħall-estrazzjoni tal-informazzjoni u t-tweġiba għall-mistoqsijiet.', 'mn': 'Бүх баримтуудын семантик бүтээгдэхүүнийг илэрхийлдэг хэдэн корпора байдаг. Бид баримтын төвшин семантикийг авах нэг арга хийдэг корпус гаргаж байна. Алтан Абстрактын төвшин хэмжээний семантикийн төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөөний төлөвлөгөө болон төстэй үйл явдлыг илэрхийлж байна. Бид үүнийг харьцуулахад итгэлтэй суурь шугамын хамт шинэ корпус илэрхийлдэг. Мөн олон өгүүлбэр AMR корпус (MS-AMR) нь баримтын утгатай баян илэрхийллийг хөгжүүлэх боломжтой арга болж чадна. Мэдээлэл татах болон асуулт хариулт зэрэг үйл ажиллагаанд ашигтай.', 'no': 'Det er få korpora som prøver å representera semantiske innhaldet i heile dokument. Vi presenterer eit korpus som fullførar ein måte å henta semantikk i dokumentnivå, ved å merke på koreferanse og liknande fenomenar (brytingar og implisitte roller) på toppen av gull abstrakt, betyr Representasjonar av setningsnivå semantikk. Vi presenterer ein ny korpus av denne notasjonen, med analyse av kvaliteten, saman med eit uttrykkelig baseline for sammenlikning. Det er håpent at denne Multi-Sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) kan bli ein feilig metode for å utvikla rike representasjonar av dokumentbetyr, nyttig for oppgåver som informasjonsekstraksjon og spørsmål.', 'pl': 'Istnieje niewiele korpusów, które starają się reprezentować semantyczną treść całych dokumentów. Przedstawiamy korpus, który realizuje jeden sposób przechwytywania semantyki na poziomie dokumentu, poprzez adnotację koreferencji i podobnych zjawisk (pomostowych i domyślnych ról) na szczycie złota. Przedstawiamy nowy korpus tej adnotacji wraz z analizą jej jakości oraz wiarygodną bazą podstawową do porównania. Mamy nadzieję, że wielozdaniowy korpus AMR (MS-AMR) może stać się wykonalną metodą tworzenia bogatych reprezentacji znaczenia dokumentów, przydatną do zadań takich jak ekstrakcja informacji i odpowiadanie na pytania.', 'ro': 'Există puține corpore care încearcă să reprezinte conținutul semantic al documentelor întregi. Prezentăm un corpus care realizează o modalitate de captare a semanticii la nivel de document, prin adnotarea corefenței și a fenomenelor similare (poding și roluri implicite) pe lângă aur. Prezentăm un nou corpus al acestei adnotări, cu analiza calității sale, alături de o bază plauzibilă pentru comparație. Se speră că acest corpus AMR cu mai multe sentințe (MS-AMR) poate deveni o metodă fezabilă pentru dezvoltarea de reprezentări bogate ale semnificației documentelor, util pentru sarcini precum extragerea informațiilor și răspunsul la întrebări.', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණ ලිපින්තුවන්ගේ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණ සම්පූර්ණය පෙන්වන්න උත්සාහ කරනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරදේශ කර්පුස් එකක් විදියට පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් විදියට ලිපින්ත සෙමැන්ටික් අල්ලගන්න එකක් විදියට, පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් සහ සමාන ප්\u200dරදේශ (බ්\u200d අපි අලුත් කොර්පස් එකක් පෙන්වන්නේ මේ කිරීමේ විශේෂණයේ විශ්ලේෂණය සමග, සම්බන්ධ විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්න පුළු ඒක බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනවා මේ Multi-Sentence AMR Corpus (MS-AMR) විශ්වාස වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහක් වෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහක් ව', 'so': "Waxaa jira shirkad yar oo isku dayaya in ay ka mid noqoto kooxda dukumentiyada oo dhan. We present a corpus that accomplishes one way of capturing document level semantics, by annotating coreference and similar phenomena (bridging and implicit roles) on top of gold Abstract Meaning Representations of sentence-level semantics.  Waxaynu soo bandhignaa koob cusub oo ku saabsan qiimaheeda, iyadoo lagu sameynayo sameynta saldhig macquul ah. Waxaa rajaynayaa in qabashadan AMR (MS-AMR) uu noqon karo qaab suurtagal ah oo horumarinta hodan u ah wakiilada dukumentiga micnaheedu yahay, oo uu faa’iido u yahay shaqaalaha tusaale ahaan soo bixinta macluumaadka iyo jawaabta su'aalaha.", 'sv': 'Det finns få korpora som försöker representera det semantiska innehållet i hela dokument. Vi presenterar en korpus som åstadkommer ett sätt att fånga dokumentnivåsemantik, genom att kommentera coreferens och liknande fenomen (överbryggning och implicit roller) ovanpå guld Abstrakt Meaning Representations of meningsnivå semantik. Vi presenterar en ny korpus av denna notering, med analys av dess kvalitet, tillsammans med en rimlig baslinje för jämförelse. Förhoppningen är att denna Multi-Sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) kan bli en genomförbar metod för att utveckla rika representationer av dokumentinnebörd, användbar för uppgifter som informationsutvinning och frågesvar.', 'sr': 'Postoji nekoliko korporacija koji pokušavaju da predstavljaju semantički sadržaj celih dokumenta. Predstavljamo korpus koji postiže jedan način da uhvati semantiku na nivou dokumenta, annotirajući pristojnost i slične fenomene (ponašanje i implicitne uloge) na vrhu zlatnog abstrakta, znači predstave semantika na nivou kazne. Predstavljamo novi korpus ovog annotacije sa analizom kvalitete, pored uvjerljivog početnog linije za usporedbu. Nada se da će ovaj korpus multi-kazni AMR (MS-AMR) postati mogući način za razvoj bogatih predstavljanja dokumenta značenja, korisnog za zadatak poput izvlačenja informacija i odgovora na pitanje.', 'ta': 'முழு ஆவணங்களின் பெம்மான்டிக் உள்ளடக்கத்தை குறிப்பிட முயற்சி செய்ய சில நிறுவனத்தில் உள்ளது. நாம் ஒரு குறிப்பை கொண்டு வருகிறோம் அது ஒரு வழி ஆவண நிலை பெமான்டிக்களை பிடித்துக் கொள்ள முடியும், போன்ற பொருள் மற்றும் போன்ற விஷயங்களை வெளிப்படுத்துகிறது, ப நாம் இந்த அறிவிப்பின் புதிய குறியீட்டை கொண்டு வருகிறோம், அதன் தரம் ஆராய்ச்சியுடன், ஒப்பிட முடியாத அடிப்பகுதி இந்த பல வாக்குறிப்பு AMR குறிப்பு (MS- AMR) ஆவணத்தின் பொருள் வளர்ந்த பிரிவுகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கு ஒரு சாத்தியமான முறையாக இருக்கலாம், தகவல் வெளியீட்டு', 'ur': 'بہت کم شرکت ہیں جو تمام دفتروں کی سیمانٹی منصوبات کی نمایش کرنے کی کوشش کرتی ہیں. ہم ایک کورپوس کو پیش کرتے ہیں جو ایک طریقہ تک دفتر سمانٹیکوں کو پکڑنے کے لئے کامل کرتا ہے، یعنی مجلس سمانٹیکوں کے اوپر سونے کے مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق مطابق ہم نے اس اظہار کی ایک نئی کورپوس کو پیش کیا ہے، اس کی کیفیت کا تحلیل، مقایسہ کے لئے قابل بوسیل لین کے ساتھ۔ امیدوار ہے کہ یہ Multi-Sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) سند کی مطلب کے ثروتمند نمونات کی تخلیق کرنے کے لئے ایک قابل طریقہ ہو سکتا ہے، جیسے اطلاعات اضافہ اور سوال جواب کے لئے فائدہ اٹھانے کے لئے۔', 'uz': "Butun hujjatning semantik tarkibini tashkil qilish uchun bir necha kompaniya bor. Biz hujjat darajasini olib tashlash uchun bir yo'l narsa hozir qilamiz. Bu dokument darajasini olib tashlash va bir xil narsalarning yuqoridagi gull Abstract tarkibini o'zgartirish mumkin. Biz bu taqdimotning sifatini aniqlash bilan yangi qo'shish qo'shishni hozir qilamiz. Bu bir nechta Sensor AMR (MS-AMR) kompyuteri mumkin, hujjatning ma'nosini taqdim qilish mumkin, maʼlumot chiqarish va savol javobi kabi vazifalar uchun foydalanishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Có rất ít Hạ sĩ cố gắng đại diện cho nội dung văn bản của to àn bộ tài liệu. Chúng tôi giới thiệu một tập thể đạt được một cách để nắm giữ nền văn học bằng cách ghi chú kinh tế và những hiện tượng tương tự (kết nối và các vai trò tiềm ẩn) trên đỉnh vàng, trừu tượng tượng tượng tượng tượng tượng về mặt ngữ pháp ở mức án. Chúng tôi đưa ra một tập thể mới về ghi chú này, cùng với phân tích chất lượng của nó, cùng với một cơ sở dựa chính đáng để so sánh. Hy vọng rằng loại đa án này có thể trở thành một phương pháp thực hiện khả thi để phát triển những biểu tượng đầy đủ về ý nghĩa tài liệu, hữu dụng cho các công việc như đào bới thông tin và câu trả lời câu hỏi.', 'nl': "Er zijn weinig corpora's die proberen de semantische inhoud van hele documenten weer te geven. We presenteren een corpus dat één manier bereikt om semantiek op documentniveau vast te leggen, door coreferentie en soortgelijke fenomenen (overbrugging en impliciete rollen) te annoteren bovenop goud Abstract Betekenis Representaties van semantiek op zinsniveau. We presenteren een nieuw corpus van deze annotatie, met analyse van de kwaliteit ervan, naast een plausibele baseline voor vergelijking. Men hoopt dat dit multi-sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) een haalbare methode kan worden voor het ontwikkelen van rijke representaties van documentbetekenis, nuttig voor taken zoals informatie extractie en vragen beantwoorden.", 'bg': 'Има малко корпори, които се стремят да представят семантичното съдържание на цели документи. Представяме корпус, който осъществява един от начините за улавяне на семантиката на ниво документ, чрез анотиране на кореференция и подобни явления (мостови и имплицитни роли) върху злато. Представяме нов корпус от тази анотация, с анализ на нейното качество, заедно с правдоподобна база за сравнение. Надява се, че този корпус с множество присъди може да се превърне в осъществим метод за разработване на богато представяне на значението на документа, полезно за задачи като извличане на информация и отговаряне на въпроси.', 'da': 'Der er få corpora, der bestræber sig på at repræsentere det semantiske indhold af hele dokumenter. Vi præsenterer et korpus, der udfører en måde at fange dokumentniveau semantik på, ved at kommentere coreference og lignende fænomener (broforbindelse og implicitte roller) oven på guld Abstrakt Betydning Repræsentationer af sætningsniveau semantik. Vi præsenterer et nyt korpus af denne annotation, med analyse af dens kvalitet, sammen med en plausibel basislinje til sammenligning. Det håbes, at dette Multi-Sentence AMR korpus (MS-AMR) kan blive en mulig metode til at udvikle rige repræsentationer af dokumentbetydning, nyttig til opgaver som informationsudvinding og spørgsmål besvarelse.', 'hr': 'Postoji nekoliko korporacija koji pokušavaju predstavljati semantički sadržaj cijelog dokumenta. Predstavljamo korpus koji postigne jedan način da uhvati semantiku razine dokumenta, navodimo pristojnost i slične fenomene (ponašanje i implicitne uloge) na vrhu zlatnog Abstrakta, značajnog predstavljanja semantika na razini kazne. Predstavljamo novi korpus ovog annotacije s analizom kvalitete, zajedno s uvjerljivom početnom linijom za usporedbu. Nada se da će ova multikazna AMR corpus (MS-AMR) postati moguća metoda za razvoj bogatih predstavljanja značaja dokumenta, korisna za zadatke poput izvlačenja informacija i odgovora na pitanje.', 'id': 'There are few corpora that endeavor to represent the semantic content of entire documents.  Kami mempersembahkan sebuah korpus yang mencapai satu cara untuk menangkap tingkat dokumen semantik, dengan menganoterasi koreferensi dan fenomena yang sama (jembatan dan peran implicit) di atas emas Abstrakt Artinya Perwakilan dari tingkat kalimat semantik. Kami mempersembahkan tubuh baru dari anotasi ini, dengan analisis kualitasnya, di samping dasar yang dapat dibandingkan. Diharapkan bahwa Multi-Sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) ini mungkin menjadi metode yang dapat dilakukan untuk mengembangkan representation kaya dari arti dokumen, berguna untuk tugas seperti ekstraksi informasi dan menjawab pertanyaan.', 'de': 'Es gibt nur wenige Korpora, die versuchen, den semantischen Inhalt ganzer Dokumente darzustellen. Wir präsentieren einen Korpus, der eine Möglichkeit zur Erfassung der Semantik auf Dokumentenebene erreicht, indem Coreferenz und ähnliche Phänomene (Brücken- und implizite Rollen) auf Gold-Ebene kommentiert werden. Wir präsentieren einen neuen Korpus dieser Annotation mit Analyse ihrer Qualität sowie eine plausible Vergleichsgrundlage. Es wird gehofft, dass dieses mehrsätzige AMR-Korpus (MS-AMR) zu einer praktikablen Methode für die Entwicklung reichhaltiger Repräsentationen von Dokumentbedeutungen wird, nützlich für Aufgaben wie Informationsextraktion und Fragebeantwortung.', 'fa': 'کمی از شرکت ها هستند که تلاش می کنند که محتوای semantic از تمام مدارک را نشان دهند. ما یک جسد را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که یک راهی از دستگیری سطح سند سنتی را انجام می\u200cدهد، با نشان دادن رضایت و اتفاقات مشابهی (نقش\u200cهای مشابهی) روی بالای سطح سنتی طلا، معنی نمایش\u200cهای سنتی\u200cهای سطح مجازات است. ما یک کورپوس جدید از این آهنگ را با تحلیل کیفیتش با یک خط پایین قابل توجه برای مقایسه پیشنهاد می کنیم. امیدوار می\u200cشود که این شرکت AMR Multi-sentence (MS-AMR) ممکن است روش موفقیت برای توسعه نمایش\u200cهای ثروتمندی از معنی سند باشد، مفید برای وظیفه\u200cهایی مانند استخراج اطلاعات و جواب سوال باشد.', 'sw': 'Kuna makampuni machache yanayojitahidi kuwakilisha maudhui ya nusu ya nyaraka zote. Tunawasilisha makampuni yanayofanikiwa namna moja ya kuchukua sekta ya nyaraka, kwa kutangaza utangazaji na mambo yanayofanana (madaraja na jukumu linalofanana) juu ya mabadiliko ya dhahabu yanayomaanisha Representation of sentences-level sentences. We present a new corpus of this annotation, with analysis of its quality, alongside a plausible baseline for comparison.  Ni matumaini kwamba kampuni hii ya Makosa mengi ya AMR (MS-AMR) inaweza kuwa njia inayowezekana kwa kuendeleza uwakilishi tajiri wa maana ya dokumentari, yenye manufaa kwa kazi kama vile utoaji habari na jibu la maswali.', 'tr': 'Tüm senelerin semantik meselesini temsil etmek için çabalayan birkaç korpora var. Biz bir korpusy semantik derejesini ele almak üçin bir şekilde taýýarlaýarys, howply we meňzeşli parçalar altyn süýtgeli semantik üstünde duýýarlar. Biz bu duygulamanın yeni bir korpusunu, kalitesini çözümleyip, karşılaştırmak için düşünebilir bir basit çizginin yanında sunuyoruz. Bu Multi-Sentence AMR korpus (MS-AMR) senediň beýleki ifadelerini geliştirmek üçin mümkin bir yöntem bolup biler, bilgi çıkarma we sorag jogaplama ýaly täbliklere üçin faydaly täblir diýip umyt edilýär.', 'af': "Daar is 'n paar korpora wat probeer om die semantiese inhoud van hele dokumente te verteenwoordig. Ons stel 'n korpus voor wat een manier van die opvang van dokumentvlak semantieke voldoen, deur die aanmerking van koreferensie en soortgelyke fenomene (bruiding en inplisite roles) op die top van goud Abstrak betekende voorstellings van setvlak semantieke. Ons stel 'n nuwe korpus van hierdie annotasie, met analiseer van sy kwaliteit, by 'n verligbare basislin vir vergelyking. Dit is hoop dat hierdie Multi-Sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) dalk 'n feasibel metode kan word vir die ontwikkeling van ryke voorstellings van dokument betekening, gebruiklik vir opdragte soos inligting uittrek en vraag antwoord.", 'sq': 'Ka pak korpra që përpiqen të përfaqësojnë përmbajtjen semantike të të gjithë dokumenteve. Ne paraqesim një korpus që arrin një mënyrë për të kapur nivelin e dokumenteve semantike, duke vënë në dukje koreferencën dhe fenomene të ngjashme (lidhje dhe role implicite) mbi të artën Abstract Meaning Representations of sentence-level semantics. We present a new corpus of this annotation, with analysis of its quality, alongside a plausible baseline for comparison.  Shpresohet se ky korpus AMR Multi-Sentence (MS-AMR) mund të bëhet një metodë e realizueshme për zhvillimin e përfaqësimeve të pasura të kuptimit të dokumentit, të dobishme për detyra të tilla si nxjerrja e informacionit dhe përgjigja e pyetjeve.', 'am': 'በሁሉም ሰነዱን የsemantic ውይይት ለማሳየት የሚሞክሩ ጥቂት ኮርፖርት አሉ፡፡ ሰነድ ደረጃውን ማነሳት አንድ መንገድ እናደርጋለን፡፡ We present a new corpus of this annotation, with analysis of its quality, alongside a plausible baseline for comparison.  ይህ ብዙው የስርዓት አሜሪካ ኮርፓስ (MS-AMR) የሰነድ ሀብታም መልዕክቶች ማሳሳየት የሚችል ማድረግ እንዲሆን ተስፋ ያደርጋል፡፡', 'hy': 'Կան մի քանի կապորա, որոնք փորձում են ներկայացնել ամբողջ փաստաթղթերի սեմանտիկ պարունակությունը: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի մարմին, որը իրականացնում է փաստաթղթի մակարդակի սեմանտիկայի մեկ ձևը, նկարագրելով համաձայն և նմանատիպ երևույթներ (կապի և ենթադրական դերեր) ոսկու վրա Աբստրակտ նշանակության սեմանտիկայի ներկայացումներ նախադասության մակարդակի դերերի վրա: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այս նոտացիայի նոր մարմինը, որի որակի վերլուծությամբ, համեմատության հավանական հիմքի կողմից: It is hoped that this Multi-Sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) may become a feasible method for developing rich representations of document meaning, useful for tasks such as information extraction and question answering.', 'az': 'Bütün belələrin semantik məlumatını göstərməyə çalışan az korpora var. Biz belə bir korpusu göstəririk ki, belə bir səviyyə semantik almaq üçün, qızıl-səviyyə semantik üstündə gözəllik və bənzər parçalar təşkil edir. Biz bu məlumatın yeni bir korpusu göstəririk, onun kalitetinin analizi ilə, müqayisədə müəyyən edilə bilən baz çizginin yanında. Bu Multi-Sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) belə ümid edilir ki, bəzi məlumatları çıxartmaq və sual cavab vermək kimi məlumatlar üçün zəngin təşkil etmək üçün mümkün bir yol olar.', 'bn': 'কিছু কোর্পোরা আছে যারা পুরো নথির প্রতিনিধিত্ব করার চেষ্টা করছে। আমরা একটি কোর্পাস উপস্থাপন করেছি যা নথির স্তরের সেমান্টিক্স গ্রহণ করার একটি উপায় অর্জন করেছে, যা কোরেফেন্স এবং একই ধরনের ব্যাপারের (ব্রিজিং এবং গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ভূমিকা) বিব আমরা এই বিরক্তির একটি নতুন কোর্পাস উপস্থাপন করেছি, তার মানের বিশ্লেষণের সাথে তুলনায় একটি প্লেসিয়াসেলাইনের বেসাইন। It is hoped that this Multi-Sentence AMR corpus (MS-AMR) may become a feasible method for developing rich representations of document meaning, useful for tasks such as information extraction and question answering.', 'bs': 'Postoji nekoliko korporacija koji pokušavaju predstaviti semantički sadržaj cijelog dokumenta. Predstavljamo korpus koji postigne jedan način da uhvati semantiku na nivou dokumenta, annotirajući pristojnost i slične fenomene (predstavljajući i implicitne uloge) na vrhu zlatnog abstrakta, znači predstavljanje semantika na nivou kazne. Predstavljamo novi korpus ovog annotacije sa analizom kvalitete, zajedno s uvjerljivom početnom linijom za usporedbu. Nada se da će ova multikazna AMR korpusa (MS-AMR) postati moguća metoda za razvoj bogatih predstavljanja značaja dokumenta, korisna za zadatke poput izvlačenja informacija i odgovora na pitanje.', 'cs': 'Existuje jen málo korpusů, které se snaží reprezentovat sémantický obsah celých dokumentů. Představujeme korpus, který dosahuje jednoho způsobu, jak zachytit sémantiku na úrovni dokumentu, anotováním koreference a podobných jevů (přemostění a implicitní role) na vrcholu zlatého významu. Představujeme nový korpus této anotace s analýzou její kvality a věrohodnou základnou pro srovnání. Doufáme, že tento vícevětový AMR korpus (MS-AMR) se může stát praktickou metodou pro rozvoj bohatých reprezentací významu dokumentů, užitečnou pro úkoly, jako je extrakce informací a odpověď na otázky.', 'ca': "There are few corpora that endeavor to represent the semantic content of entire documents.  Presentam un corpus que aconsegueix una manera de capturar la semàntica del nivell de documents, anotant la coreferència i fenomens similars (rols de pont i implícits) a sobre de l'or Representacions de significat abstract de la semàntica del nivell de frases. Presentam un nou cos d'aquesta anotació, amb anàlisi de la seva qualitat, juntament amb una plausible base de comparació. Esperem que aquest corpus AMR Multi-Sentence (MS-AMR) pugui convertir-se en un mètode viable per desenvolupar representacions rics de significat documental, útils per tasques com l'extracció d'informació i la resposta a preguntes.", 'fi': 'On vain muutamia korpusia, jotka pyrkivät edustamaan kokonaisten asiakirjojen semanttista sisältöä. Esitämme korpusen, joka toteuttaa yhden tavan dokumenttitason semantiikkaa kuvaamalla koreferenssia ja vastaavia ilmiöitä (silta- ja implisiittiroolit) kullan päälle. Esitämme tästä merkinnästä uuden korpusen, jossa analysoidaan sen laatua, sekä uskottavan vertailukohdan. Toivotaan, että tästä usean lauseen AMR-korpusesta (MS-AMR) tulisi toteuttamiskelpoinen menetelmä dokumentin merkityksen monipuolisen esittämisen kehittämiseksi, joka on hyödyllinen esimerkiksi tiedonkeruun ja kysymysten vastaamisen kaltaisissa tehtävissä.', 'et': 'On vähe korpuseid, mis püüavad esindada tervete dokumentide semantilist sisu. Esitleme korpuse, mis saavutab ühe võimaluse jäädvustada dokumenditasandi semantikat, märkides kulda peale kortereferentsi ja sarnaseid nähtusi (sild- ja kaudsed rollid). Esitame selle annotatsiooni uue korpuse koos selle kvaliteedi analüüsiga ning usutava võrdlusaluse. Loodetakse, et sellest mitme lausega AMR korpusest (MS-AMR) võib saada teostatav meetod dokumentide tähenduse rikkaliku esitamise väljatöötamiseks, mis on kasulik selliste ülesannete täitmiseks nagu teabe väljavõtmine ja küsimustele vastamine.', 'ko': '문서 전체의 의미 내용을 표시하려는 자료 라이브러리는 드물다.우리는 문장급 의미의 황금 추상적 의미 표시에 공지와 유사한 현상(교접과 은식 역할)을 주석함으로써 문서급 의미를 포획하는 방법을 실현했다.우리는 이 주석의 새로운 어료 라이브러리를 제공했고 그 질을 분석했으며 합리적인 비교 기준을 제공했다.이 여러 문장의 AMR 자료 라이브러리(MS-AMR)가 풍부한 문서의 의미 표시를 개발하는 실행 가능한 방법이 되어 정보 추출과 문답 등 임무에 유용하기를 바란다.', 'jv': 'Ana durung kelas opo-opo sing nguasai nggawe barang semanti karo dokumen sing apik. Rayong Awak dhéwé éntuk karo perusahaan anyar iki dadi, dadi kapan karo ngono nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe gerarané. Awakdhéwé éné kabèh Multi-Sentense AM R coro iki (MP-AM R) iso dianggawe ngubah perusahaan kanggo nggawe gambar barang nggawe basa gambar nggawe dokumen sing dikarepaké, gambar nggo langkung dianggawe informasi lan mbubatuhé cegawe persok.', 'he': 'יש מעט קבורות שמנסות לייצג את התוכן הסמנטי של מסמכים שלמים. We present a corpus that accomplishes one way of capturing document level semantics, by annotating coreference and similar phenomena (bridging and implicit roles) on top of gold Abstract Meaning Representations of sentence-level semantics.  אנחנו מציגים קורפוס חדש של ההערכה הזאת, עם ניתוח של איכותה, לצד בסיס אמין לשוואה. מקווה שהגוף AMR (MS-AMR) הזה יוכל להפוך לשיטה אפשרית לפיתוח מייצגים עשירים של משמעות מסמכים, שימושיים למשימות כמו חיפוש מידע ולעניין שאלות.', 'ha': "Babu kaɗan daga makampuni da ke jarraba wakin takardar aiki na semanti. Tuna halatar da wani nau'i wanda ke kamfata matsayin daraja na dokuman, ko kuma za mu yi bayani ga abubuwa da misãlin abu (rabo da tarakin tarayya) a kan saman ayukan ayuka na zama Repositori na semanti-daraja. Tuna sami wani nau'i na wannan mai zartar da shi, kan anayyar sifantinsa, da kuma a sami wani basalin da za'a sami. Ana ƙaunar cẽwa, wannan girmar AMR-Muda-Mallaka (MA-AMR) za ta kasance wata hanyoyi mai iya iya iya motsar masu riki wakin takardar, yana da amfani ga aikin kama da zartar da masu tambayar.", 'sk': 'Obstaja malo korpusov, ki si prizadevajo predstavljati semantično vsebino celotnih dokumentov. Predstavljamo korpus, ki uresničuje en način zajemanja semantike na ravni dokumenta, z označevanjem koreference in podobnih pojavov (premostitvene in implicitne vloge) na vrhu zlata. Predstavljamo nov korpus te opombe z analizo njene kakovosti in verjetno osnovo za primerjavo. Upamo, da lahko ta korpus AMR z več stavki (MS-AMR) postane izvedljiva metoda za razvoj bogatih predstavitev pomena dokumenta, ki je koristna za naloge, kot sta pridobivanje informacij in odgovarjanje na vprašanja.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་ལས་དབུགས་ཆ་ཉུང་ཡིག་གེ་ཡིག་ཆ་ཡོངས་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མངོན་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་མེད། We present a corpus that accomplishes one way of capturing document level semantics, by annotating coreference and similar phenomena (bridging and implicit roles) on top of gold Abstract Meaning Representations of sentence-level semantics. ང་ཚོས་མཐུན་སྐུལ་འདིའི་མཐུན་རྩིས་གསར་བ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདི་གི་སྣ་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་མཐུད་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་(MS-AMR)རིགས'}
{'en': 'Learning Visually-Grounded Semantics from Contrastive Adversarial Samples', 'ar': 'تعلم دلالات الأساس المرئي من عينات الخصومة المتباينة', 'pt': 'Aprendendo semântica visualmente fundamentada a partir de amostras adversariais contrastantes', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de la semántica basada en la visualización a partir de muestras contradictorias contrastivas', 'fr': "Apprentissage de la sémantique visuelle à partir d'échantillons contradictoires contrastifs", 'ja': '対照的な対照的なサンプルから視覚的に基礎づけられたセマンティクスを学ぶ', 'hi': 'Contrastive Adversarial नमूने से नेत्रहीन-आधारित शब्दार्थ सीखना', 'zh': '学于比样本,基于视听之语义', 'ru': 'Изучение визуально обоснованной семантики из контрастных враждебных выборок', 'ga': 'Ag Foghlaim Shéimeantaic Amharcbhunaithe ó Shamplaí Sáraimh Chodarsnacha', 'ka': 'კონტრასტიური კონტრასტიური კონტრასტიური გამოსახულებიდან ვიზუალურად გადასწავლობა', 'el': 'Μάθηση οπτικά θεμελιωμένων σημαματικών από αντικρουόμενα δείγματα', 'hu': 'Vizuálisan alapozott szemantikák tanulása kontrasztív mellékhatásokból', 'lt': 'Mokymasis vizualiai pagrįstais sementais iš kontrastinių nepageidaujamų mėginių', 'mk': 'Learning Visually-Grounded Semantics from Contrastive Adversarial Samples', 'kk': 'Контрастырмалы конверсариялық үлгілерден көрінетін семантикаларды оқыту', 'it': 'Imparare la semantica basata sulla terra visiva da campioni avversi contrastanti', 'mt': 'Learning Visually-Grounded Semantics from Contrastive Adversarial Samples', 'ml': 'കാഴ്ചപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്റിക്സ് പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'ms': 'Mempelajari Semantik Bertanah-Lihat Dari Sampel Berlawan Kontras', 'mn': 'Харамсалтай сэтгэл зүйн жишээнээс харагдаж сурах', 'pl': 'Uczenie się wizualnie uzasadnionej semantyki z kontrastywnych próbek przeciwnych', 'ro': 'Învățarea semanticelor bazate pe pământ vizual din eșantioane adverse contrastive', 'no': 'Læring av synleg område semiantikk frå kontrastiv konserversarial prøver', 'sr': 'Naučenje vizualno-ugrozenog semantika iz kontrastivnih saveznih primjera', 'ta': 'தொடர்புடைய மாதிரிகளிலிருந்து பார்வையான நிலைப்படுத்தப்பட்ட Semantics', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරතිශීල සාමාන්ත්\u200dරික සැමැන්ටික් ඉගෙන ගන්න', 'so': 'Barista muuqashada aragtida', 'sv': 'Att lära sig visuellt grundad semantik från kontrastiva negativa prover', 'ur': 'کنٹراسٹیو اڈورسٹریال نمونے سے بینائل-گروڈ سیمانٹیک سیکھ رہی ہے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học nói ảo từ mẫu tương phản phản sứ quán', 'bg': 'Научаване на визуално обоснована семантика от контрастивни противоречиви проби', 'nl': 'Visueel gegronde semantica leren van contrasterende tegenstrijdige monsters', 'da': 'Læring af visuelt begrundede semantikker fra kontrastive negative prøver', 'hr': 'Naučenje vizualno-podzemne semantike iz kontrastivnih prosvjetiteljskih primjera', 'de': 'Visuell fundierte Semantik aus kontrastiven negativen Proben lernen', 'ko': '비교 대항 견본에서 시각적 기초적 의미를 배우다', 'id': 'Belajar Semantik Berdasarkan Visual Dari Sampel Kuntrak', 'fa': 'یاد گرفتن سیمانتیک\u200cهای بینایی\u200cای از نمونه\u200cهای تجاوز کنترستی', 'sw': 'Kujifunza Semantics zilizotumwa na Visual From Contrastive Adversive', 'sq': 'Mësimi i Semantikave të Bazuara nga Shembujt Kundërshtarës', 'tr': 'Görsel tabanlı semantikler öğrenmek Kontrastsal Maceral örneklerinden', 'af': 'Leer van Visuel- Grounded Semantics van kontrastiewe Adversariale Bispelinge', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Վիզուալ հիմնված սեմանտիկա սովորելը հակադրական հակադրական օրինակներից', 'az': '䭯湴牡獴污얟擄녲쒱揄넠䅤癥牳慲楡氠쎖祲즙湭즙權', 'bn': 'দৃশ্যমান ভূমিকম্পের সেমান্টিক শিখা যাচ্ছে', 'bs': 'Naučenje vizualno-podzemne semantike iz kontrastivnih prosvjetarskih primjera', 'ca': 'Aprendre Semàtics Visualment-Grounded a partir de mostres adversaris contrastius', 'cs': 'Učení vizuálně uzemněné sémantiky z kontrastivních nepříznivých vzorků', 'et': 'Visuaalselt põhjendatud semantika õppimine kontrastiivsetest kõrvaltoimetest', 'fi': 'Visuaalisesti pohjautuvan semantiikan oppiminen kontrastiivisista haittanäytteistä', 'jv': 'Learning Visual-Gruundd semanti from contraststive Advertary Sample', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Učenje vizualno osnovane semantike iz kontrastnih neželenih vzorcev', 'he': 'ללמוד סמנטיקה מבחינה ראייתית מדגימות נגד', 'bo': 'Learning Visually-Grounded Semantics from Contrastive Adversarial Examples'}
{'en': 'We study the problem of grounding distributional representations of texts on the visual domain, namely visual-semantic embeddings (VSE for short). Begin with an insightful adversarial attack on VSE embeddings, we show the limitation of current frameworks and image-text datasets (e.g., MS-COCO) both quantitatively and qualitatively. The large gap between the number of possible constitutions of real-world semantics and the size of parallel data, to a large extent, restricts the model to establish a strong link between textual semantics and visual concepts. We alleviate this problem by augmenting the MS-COCO image captioning datasets with textual contrastive adversarial samples. These samples are synthesized using language priors of human and the WordNet knowledge base, and enforce the model to ground learned embeddings to concrete concepts within the image. This simple but powerful technique brings a noticeable improvement over the baselines on a diverse set of downstream tasks, in addition to defending known-type adversarial attacks. Codes are available at https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'es': 'Estudiamos el problema de anclar las representaciones distribucionales de textos en el dominio visual, es decir, las incrustaciones visual-semánticas (VSE). Comenzando con un ataque contradictorio perspicaz contra las incrustaciones de VSE, mostramos la limitación de los marcos actuales y los conjuntos de datos de imagen-texto (por ejemplo, MS-COCO) tanto cuantitativa como cualitativamente. La gran brecha entre el número de posibles constituciones de la semántica del mundo real y el tamaño de los datos paralelos, en gran medida, restringe el modelo para establecer un fuerte vínculo entre la semántica textual y los conceptos visuales. Aliviamos este problema al aumentar los conjuntos de datos de subtítulos de imágenes de MS-COCO con muestras contradictorias textuales contrastivas. Estas muestras se sintetizan utilizando los antecedentes del lenguaje humano y la base de conocimientos de WordNet, y hacen cumplir el modelo para basar las incorporaciones aprendidas en conceptos concretos dentro de la imagen. Esta técnica simple pero poderosa aporta una mejora notable con respecto a las líneas de base en un conjunto diverso de tareas posteriores, además de defender ataques adversarios de tipo conocido. Los códigos están disponibles en https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ar': 'ندرس مشكلة تأريض التمثيلات التوزيعية للنصوص على المجال المرئي ، أي الزخارف المرئية الدلالية (VSE للاختصار). ابدأ بهجوم عدائي ثاقب على حفلات الزفاف في VSE ، نعرض قيود الأطر الحالية ومجموعات بيانات نص الصورة (على سبيل المثال ، MS-COCO) من الناحيتين الكمية والنوعية. الفجوة الكبيرة بين عدد الدساتير الممكنة لدلالات العالم الحقيقي وحجم البيانات المتوازية ، إلى حد كبير ، يقيد النموذج لإنشاء رابط قوي بين الدلالات النصية والمفاهيم المرئية. نحن نخفف من هذه المشكلة عن طريق زيادة مجموعات البيانات التوضيحية للصور MS-COCO مع عينات نصية متناقضة معادية. يتم تجميع هذه العينات باستخدام مقدمات اللغة للإنسان وقاعدة المعرفة WordNet ، وفرض النموذج لتأسيس الزخارف المكتسبة لمفاهيم ملموسة داخل الصورة. تجلب هذه التقنية البسيطة والفعالة تحسينًا ملحوظًا على الخطوط الأساسية في مجموعة متنوعة من المهام النهائية ، بالإضافة إلى الدفاع عن الهجمات العدائية المعروفة. الرموز متاحة على https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'fr': "Nous étudions le problème de la mise à la terre des représentations distributionnelles de textes dans le domaine visuel, à savoir les embeddings visuel-sémantiques (VSE en abrégé). Commençons par une attaque contradictoire perspicace contre les intégrations de TBE, nous montrons les limites des cadres actuels et des ensembles de données image-texte (par exemple, MS-COCO) à la fois quantitativement et qualitativement. L'écart important entre le nombre de constitutions possibles de la sémantique du monde réel et la taille des données parallèles limite, dans une large mesure, le modèle à établir un lien étroit entre la sémantique textuelle et les concepts visuels. Nous atténuons ce problème en augmentant les jeux de données de sous-titrage d'images MS-COCO avec des échantillons contradictoires textuels contrastifs. Ces exemples sont synthétisés à l'aide de language priors of human et de la base de connaissances WordNet, et appliquent le modèle pour ancrer les intégrations apprises à des concepts concrets au sein de l'image. Cette technique simple mais puissante apporte une amélioration notable par rapport aux bases pour un ensemble diversifié de tâches en aval, en plus de la défense contre les attaques adverses de type connu. Les codes sont disponibles sur https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.", 'pt': 'Estudamos o problema de fundamentar representações distributivas de textos no domínio visual, nomeadamente embeddings visual-semânticos (VSE para abreviar). Comece com um ataque adversário perspicaz em embeddings VSE, mostramos a limitação das estruturas atuais e conjuntos de dados de texto de imagem (por exemplo, MS-COCO) quantitativa e qualitativamente. A grande lacuna entre o número de constituições possíveis da semântica do mundo real e o tamanho dos dados paralelos, em grande medida, restringe o modelo a estabelecer uma forte ligação entre a semântica textual e os conceitos visuais. Amenizamos esse problema aumentando os conjuntos de dados de legendagem de imagens MS-COCO com amostras contrastantes textuais. Essas amostras são sintetizadas usando linguagens anteriores da base de conhecimento humana e da WordNet e reforçam o modelo para fundamentar as incorporações aprendidas em conceitos concretos na imagem. Essa técnica simples, mas poderosa, traz uma melhoria notável sobre as linhas de base em um conjunto diversificado de tarefas downstream, além de defender ataques adversários de tipo conhecido. Os códigos estão disponíveis em https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'zh': '论其视域上以文本为本,视语义嵌(简称VSE)。 自VSE嵌之对抗性,始于量定性之上框架与图像文本数据集(如MS-COCO)之局限性。 今世语义者,或数与并行大小相去,限以文本语义视名之固。 吾以文本增样本MS-COCO图像字幕数据集以纾之。 此示例用人之言先验与 WordNet 知识库合者,以强制执行为名学。 此简而功能强大之术,非守御已知之对抗性攻外,而下流之务明矣。 代码在 https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C。', 'hi': 'हम दृश्य डोमेन पर ग्रंथों के ग्राउंडिंग वितरण प्रतिनिधित्व की समस्या का अध्ययन करते हैं, अर्थात् दृश्य-शब्दार्थ एम्बेडिंग (संक्षेप में वीएसई)। वीएसई एम्बेडिंग पर एक व्यावहारिक प्रतिकूल हमले के साथ शुरू करें, हम वर्तमान ढांचे और छवि-पाठ डेटासेट (जैसे, एमएस-सीओसीओ) की सीमा को मात्रात्मक और गुणात्मक रूप से दोनों दिखाते हैं। वास्तविक दुनिया के शब्दार्थ के संभावित संविधानों की संख्या और समानांतर डेटा के आकार के बीच बड़ा अंतर, काफी हद तक, मॉडल को पाठ्य शब्दार्थ और दृश्य अवधारणाओं के बीच एक मजबूत लिंक स्थापित करने के लिए प्रतिबंधित करता है। हम MS-COCO छवि कैप्शन डेटासेट को पाठ्य विरोधाभासी प्रतिकूल नमूनों के साथ बढ़ाकर इस समस्या को कम करते हैं। इन नमूनों को मानव और वर्डनेट नॉलेज बेस की भाषा प्राथमिकताओं का उपयोग करके संश्लेषित किया जाता है, और छवि के भीतर ठोस अवधारणाओं के लिए सीखे गए एम्बेडिंग को जमीन पर लागू करने के लिए मॉडल को लागू किया जाता है। यह सरल लेकिन शक्तिशाली तकनीक ज्ञात-प्रकार के प्रतिकूल हमलों का बचाव करने के अलावा, डाउनस्ट्रीम कार्यों के विविध सेट पर बेसलाइन पर एक ध्यान देने योग्य सुधार लाती है। कोड https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C पर उपलब्ध हैं।', 'ru': 'Изучаем проблему заземления дистрибутивных представлений текстов на визуальном домене, а именно визуально-семантических вложений (VSE сокращенно). Начиная с проницательной враждебной атаки на вложения VSE, мы показываем ограничение текущих фреймворков и наборов данных изображения-текста (например, MS-COCO) как в количественном, так и в качественном отношении. Большой разрыв между количеством возможных конституций реальной семантики и размером параллельных данных в значительной степени ограничивает модель, чтобы установить прочную связь между текстовой семантикой и визуальными концепциями. Мы облегчаем эту проблему путем дополнения наборов данных с субтитрами изображений MS-COCO текстовыми контрастными состязательными образцами. Эти примеры синтезированы с использованием языковых прерогатив базы знаний человека и WordNet, и обеспечивают применение модели к конкретным концепциям в рамках изображения. Этот простой, но мощный метод приносит заметное улучшение по сравнению с базовыми линиями на разнообразном наборе задач ниже по потоку, в дополнение к защите известного типа враждебных атак. Коды доступны по адресу https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ja': '視覚領域上のテキストの分布表現、すなわち視覚的セマンティック埋め込み（略してVSE ）の基礎付けの問題を研究している。 VSE埋め込みに対する洞察に富んだ対抗攻撃から始まり、現在のフレームワークと画像テキストデータセット（ MS - COCOなど）の制限を定量的および定性的に示します。 現実世界のセマンティクスの可能な構成の数と並列データのサイズとの間の大きなギャップは、テキストセマンティクスと視覚的概念との間の強力なリンクを確立するためのモデルを大きく制限します。 MS - COCO画像キャプションデータセットをテキスト対照サンプルで拡張することで、この問題を軽減します。 これらのサンプルは、人間の言語の前歴とWordNetの知識ベースを使用して合成され、学習された埋め込みを画像内の具体的な概念にグラウンドするためにモデルを適用します。 このシンプルだが強力なテクニックは、既知のタイプの対抗攻撃を防御するだけでなく、多様なダウンストリームタスクのベースラインに対して顕著な改善をもたらします。コードはhttps://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-Cで入手できます。', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar an bhfadhb a bhaineann le huiríll dáileacháin na dtéacsanna a bhunú ar an bhfearann amhairc, eadhon leabú amhairc-shéimeantach (VSE go gairid). Tosaigh le ionsaí sáraíochta léirsteanach ar leabaithe VSE, léirímid teorannú creataí reatha agus tacair sonraí íomhá-théacs (m.sh., MS-COCO) go cainníochtúil agus go cáilíochtúil. Cuireann an bhearna mhór idir líon na mbunreachtanna féideartha de shéimeantaic an domhain fíor agus méid na sonraí comhthreomhara, go pointe mór, srian ar an tsamhail chun nasc láidir a bhunú idir shéimeantaic théacsúil agus coincheapa amhairc. Déanaimid an fhadhb seo a mhaolú trí thacair sonraí fortheidealaithe íomhánna MS-COCO a mhéadú le samplaí sáraíochta téacsúla codarsnacha. Déantar na samplaí seo a shintéisiú trí úsáid a bhaint as tosaíochtaí teanga an duine agus as an mbunachar eolais WordNet, agus forfheidhmíonn siad an tsamhail chun leabú a foghlaimíodh le coincheapa nithiúla laistigh den íomhá. Tugann an teicníocht shimplí ach chumhachtach seo feabhas suntasach thar na bunlínte ar thacar ilghnéitheach de thascanna iartheachtacha, chomh maith le hionsaithe sáraíochta a bhfuil aithne orthu a chosaint. Tá cóid ar fáil ag https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ვისწავლეთ პრობლემა, რომელიც ვიზუალური დიომინში ტექსტის განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრებების განსაზღვრება, ანუ ვიზუალური-ჟენმანტიური ინბევინებების განსაზღვრება დავიწყეთ VSE ინტებიზნეციების შესახებ განსაზღვრებელი განსაზღვრებით, ჩვენ მიმდინარე ფრამების და გამოსახულების ტექსტის მონაცემების დაზღვრება (მაგალითად MS-COCO) კოლუტატიურად და კვალიტატი დიდი განსხვავება რეალური მსოფლიოს სიმენტიკის შესაძლებელი კონსტრუქციების რაოდენობის და პარალელური მონაცემების ზომას, დიდი ზომაში, მოდელის შესაძლებლობად ტექსტულ სიმენტიკის და ვიზუალური კ ჩვენ ამ პრობლემას გადავიწყებთ, MS-COCO გამოსახულების შესახებ მონაცემების შესახებ ტექსტულური კონტაქტიური ანგარიალური მონაცემებით. ამ წიგნალების სინტესტიზება ადამიანის და WordNet მეცნიერების ბაზის წინასწარმოდგენით და მოდელის შესაძლებლობად დასწავლილი ინტებიზებების გამოყენება კონკრეტული კონტესტის შესაძლებლო ეს მარტივი, მაგრამ ძალიან ტექნექტიკის შესაძლებლობელი გასაკეთება ბაზის ხაზების განსხვავებული ნაწილზე, დამატებით უცნობილი ტიპის ანგარიალური ატაკების შესაძლებლობა. კოდეები შესაძლებელია https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε το πρόβλημα της γειώσεως των διανεμητικών αναπαραστάσεων κειμένων στον οπτικό τομέα, δηλαδή των οπτικών-σημασιολογικών ενσωμάτωσης (εν συντομία). Ξεκινώντας με μια διορατική αντίπαλη επίθεση στις ενσωματώσεις δείχνουμε τον περιορισμό των υφιστάμενων πλαισίων και των συνόλων δεδομένων εικόνας-κειμένου (π.χ., τόσο ποσοτικά όσο και ποιοτικά. Το μεγάλο χάσμα μεταξύ του αριθμού των πιθανών συνταγμάτων της πραγματικής σημασιολογίας και του μεγέθους των παράλληλων δεδομένων, σε μεγάλο βαθμό, περιορίζει το μοντέλο για να δημιουργήσει μια ισχυρή σύνδεση μεταξύ κειμενικής και οπτικών εννοιών. Ανακουφίζουμε αυτό το πρόβλημα συμπληρώνοντας τα σύνολα δεδομένων λεζάντας εικόνων με αντικρουόμενα δείγματα κειμένου. Αυτά τα δείγματα συνθέτονται χρησιμοποιώντας γλωσσικά προηγούμενα της ανθρώπινης και της βάσης γνώσης και επιβάλλουν το μοντέλο να θεμελιώσει τις μαθημένες ενσωματώσεις σε συγκεκριμένες έννοιες μέσα στην εικόνα. Αυτή η απλή αλλά ισχυρή τεχνική φέρνει μια αξιοσημείωτη βελτίωση έναντι των βασικών γραμμών σε ένα ποικίλο σύνολο μεταγενέστερων εργασιών, εκτός από την υπεράσπιση γνωστών εχθρικών επιθέσεων. Οι κωδικοί είναι διαθέσιμοι στο https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'hu': 'Vizuális területen vizsgáljuk a szövegek disztribúciós reprezentációjának alapozásának problémáját, nevezetesen vizuális-szemantikai beágyazásokat (röviden VSE). Kezdjük a VSE beágyazások elleni támadással, bemutatjuk a jelenlegi keretrendszerek és a kép-szöveg adatkészletek korlátozását (pl. MS-COCO) mennyiségi és minőségi szempontból egyaránt. A valós világi szemantika lehetséges alkotmányainak száma és a párhuzamos adatok mérete közötti nagy szakadék nagymértékben korlátozza a modellt, hogy erős kapcsolatot teremtsen a szöveges szemantika és a vizuális fogalmak között. Ezt a problémát úgy oldjuk meg, hogy az MS-COCO képfeliratozó adatkészleteket szöveges kontrasztos ellentétes mintákkal bővítjük. Ezeket a mintákat az emberi és a WordNet tudásbázis nyelvi előzményeinek felhasználásával szintetizálják, és a modellt arra kényszerítik, hogy a tanult beágyazásokat konkrét koncepciókra alapozzák a képen belül. Ez az egyszerű, de erőteljes technika észrevehető javulást hoz az alapvonalakhoz képest a különböző downstream feladatok során, amellett, hogy megvédi az ismert típusú ellenféltámadásokat. A kódok a következő címen érhetők el: https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'it': "Studiamo il problema della messa a terra delle rappresentazioni distributive dei testi sul dominio visivo, vale a dire incorporazioni visual-semantic (VSE in breve). Iniziando con un attacco avversario perspicace alle incorporazioni VSE, mostriamo la limitazione dei framework attuali e dei set di dati immagine-testo (ad esempio MS-COCO) sia quantitativamente che qualitativamente. Il grande divario tra il numero di possibili costituzioni della semantica del mondo reale e la dimensione dei dati paralleli, in larga misura, limita il modello a stabilire un forte legame tra semantica testuale e concetti visivi. Risolviamo questo problema aumentando i set di dati MS-COCO per la didascalia delle immagini con campioni contrastanti testuali. Questi campioni sono sintetizzati utilizzando i precedenti linguistici dell'uomo e della base di conoscenze WordNet, e rafforzano il modello per basare gli incorporamenti appresi su concetti concreti all'interno dell'immagine. Questa tecnica semplice ma potente porta un notevole miglioramento rispetto alle linee di base su una serie diversificata di attività a valle, oltre a difendere attacchi avversari di tipo noto. I codici sono disponibili all'indirizzo https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.", 'kk': 'Көрініс домендегі мәтіндерді тарату үшін мәселелерін зерттеу мәселесін зерттейміз, мәселесі көрініс- семантикалық ендіру (VSE қысқа үшін). VSE ендіруіне қарапайым белсендік жағдайдан басталып, қазіргі фреймдер мен кескінді мәтін деректер қорларының шектеуді (мысалы, MS- COCO) санатты және квалификациялық шектеуді көрсетеді. Шын әлемдегі семантикалық конституциялардың саны мен параллель деректердің өлшемі үлкен шектеу үшін моделі текстік семантикалық және көрінетін концепциялар арасындағы күшті сілтемен құру үшін шектеп береді. Бұл мәселеді MS- COCO кескін айдарындағы деректер қорларын мәтіндік контрастырмалы қарсы үлгілерімен көтеріп, көтеріп алдық. Бұл үлгілер адам мен WordNet білім негізінен алдындағы тілдерді синтезализацияланады және үлгілерді кескіндегі конкретті концепциялар үшін зерттеу үйренілген ендіру үшін көмектеседі. Бұл қарапайым, бірақ күшті техника белгілі түрлі негізгі тапсырмалардың негізгі жолдарын жақсарту үшін, белгілі түрлі негізгі жағдайларды қолдауға арналған жұмыс істейді. Кодтар бар https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'lt': 'We study the problem of grounding distributional representations of texts on the visual domain, namely visual-semantic embeddings (VSE for short).  Pradėdami apčiuopiamą priešingą išpuolį prieš VSE įterpimus, mes parodysime dabartinių sistemų ir vaizdo teksto duomenų rinkinių (pvz., MS-COCO) ribojimą tiek kiekybiškai, tiek kokybiškai. Didelis atotrūkis tarp galimų realiojo pasaulio semantikos konstitucijų skaičiaus ir lygiagrečių duomenų dydžio didžiąja dalimi apriboja model į stipriai susieti tekstinę semantiką su vizualinėmis koncepcijomis. Mes palengviname šią problem ą, padidindami MS-COCO vaizdo pavadinimų duomenų rinkinius tekstiniu kontrastiniu priešingu pavyzdžiu. Šie mėginiai sintetizuojami naudojant žmogaus ir WordNet žinių bazės kalbinius precedentus ir užtikrinant model į, kuriuo grindžiami mokomi įdėjimai į konkrečias vaizdo koncepcijas. This simple but powerful technique brings a noticeable improvement over the baselines on a diverse set of downstream tasks, in addition to defending known-type adversarial attacks.  Kodai pateikiami https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'mk': 'Го проучуваме проблемот со основањето на дистрибуционалните претставувања на текстите на визуелниот домен, имено визуелно-семантични вградувања (ВСЕ на кратко). Почнете со свесен непријателски напад врз вградувањата на VSE, ја покажуваме ограничувањето на актуелните рамки и податоците од слика-текст (на пример, MS-COCO) како квантитивно, така и квалитетно. Големата празнина помеѓу бројот на можните устави на семантиката во реалниот свет и големината на паралелните податоци, во голема мера, го ограничува моделот за воспоставување силна врска помеѓу текстуалната семантика и визуелните концепти. Го олеснуваме овој проблем со зголемување на нацртаните податоци на сликите на MS-COCO со текстуални контрастивни противници примероци. Овие примероци се синтезирани со користење на јазичките претходни јазици на човечката база на знаење и WordNet, и го спроведуваат моделот за основа на научени внатрешни концепти во конкретните концепти во сликата. Оваа едноставна, но моќна техника донесе значително подобрување над основните линии на различни задачи, покрај одбраната на познатите непријателски напади. Codes are available at  https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari masalah mendasarkan perwakilan distribusi teks pada domain visual, iaitu penyampilan visual-semantik (VSE singkat). Mulakan dengan serangan musuh yang jelas terhadap penyambungan VSE, kami tunjukkan keterangan bingkai semasa dan set data imej-teks (cth., MS-COCO) secara kuantitatif dan kualitatif. The large gap between the number of possible constitutions of real-world semantics and the size of parallel data, to a large extent, restricts the model to establish a strong link between textual semantics and visual concepts.  Kami mengurangi masalah ini dengan menambah set data pengepala imej MS-COCO dengan sampel lawan kontras teks. Sampel ini disintesis menggunakan latar belakang bahasa bagi manusia dan pangkalan pengetahuan WordNet, dan memaksa model untuk tanah penerbangan belajar ke konsep konkrit dalam imej. Teknik sederhana tetapi berkuasa ini membawa peningkatan yang dapat dilihat atas garis dasar pada set berbeza tugas turun, selain mempertahankan serangan musuh jenis diketahui. Kod tersedia di https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'mn': 'Бид харагдаж байгаа хүмүүсийн хуваарилцааны үзүүлэлтийг суурилуулах асуудлыг судалж байна. Энэ нь харагдаж байгаа-семантийн үзүүлэлт (VSE) юм. VSE-н нэвтрүүлэлтийн тухай ойлгомжтой эсрэгчийн атлаас эхлэхэд бид одоогийн фрэйм болон зураг-текст өгөгдлийн сангийн хязгаарлалтыг харуулдаг. Бодит ертөнцийн шинжлэх ухаан болон параллель өгөгдлийн хэмжээнд байж болох боломжтой байгууллагын тоо хоорондын том зай нь textual semantics болон visual concepts хоорондын хүчтэй холбоотой загварыг хязгаарладаг. Бид энэ асуудлыг MS-COCO зураг зураг хадгалах өгөгдлийн санг текст эсрэг эсрэг жишээлүүдтэй нэмэгдүүлж багасгаж байна. Эдгээр жишээ нь хүн болон WordNet-ийн мэдлэг суурь дээр хэлэлцээний өмнөх хэл болон сургалтын загварыг суралцаж, зураг доторх конкретний ойлголтын тулд сургалтын загварыг зохион байгуулдаг. Энэ энгийн боловч хүчирхэг техник нь мэдэгдэх төрлийн эсрэг дайснуудыг хамгаалах нэмэлтэй олон төрлийн ажил дээрх суурь шугам дээр анхаарлаа сайжруулдаг. Код https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'pl': 'Badamy problem uziemienia reprezentacji dystrybucyjnych tekstów w domenie wizualnej, a mianowicie osadzeń wizualno-semantycznych (w skrócie VSE). Rozpoczynamy od wnikliwego ataku przeciwnego na osadzenia VSE, pokazujemy ograniczenia obecnych frameworków i zbiorów danych obrazowo-tekstowych (np. MS-COCO) zarówno ilościowo, jak i jakościowo. Duża różnica między liczbą możliwych konstytucji semantyki rzeczywistego świata a wielkością danych równoległych w dużym stopniu ogranicza model do ustanowienia silnego powiązania między semantyką tekstową a koncepcjami wizualnymi. Łagodzimy ten problem poprzez rozszerzenie zbiorów danych podpisów obrazów MS-COCO o kontrastywne próbki tekstowe. Próbki te są syntetyzowane przy użyciu językowych priorytetów ludzkiej bazy wiedzy WordNet i wymuszają model do uziemienia nauczonych osadzeń do konkretnych koncepcji w obrazie. Ta prosta, ale potężna technika przynosi zauważalną poprawę nad liniami bazowymi w różnym zestawie zadań niższego szczebla, oprócz obrony znanych ataków przeciwników. Kody dostępne są na stronie internetowej https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ml': 'We study the problem of grounding distributional representations of texts on the visual domain, namely visual-semantic embeddings (VSE for short).  VSE അകത്തുവരുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഉള്\u200dക്കാഴ്ചയുള്ള വിരോധമായ ആക്രമണത്തില്\u200d തുടങ്ങിയാല്\u200d, നിലവിലുള്ള ഫ്രെയിമ്പുകളും ഇമേജ് ടേക്സ്റ്റേറ്റ് ഡ യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ ലോകത്തിലെ സെമാന്റിക്കുകളുടെ സാധ്യതയുടെ എണ്ണത്തിന്റെയും പാരാലിള്\u200d ഡാറ്റായുടെയും വലിപ്പം തമ്മിലുള്ള വലിയ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d, വലിയ വിധം  MS-CO ചിത്രം കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നം ലളിപ്പിക്കുന്നു. ടെക്സ്ചൂള്\u200d വിരോധമായ എതിര്\u200dപ്പുകള്\u200d  ഈ ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d മനുഷ്യന്റെയും വാര്\u200dഡ്നെറ്റിന്റെയും അറിവുള്ള ബേസിന്റെയും മുമ്പുള്ള ഭാഷ ഉപയോഗിച്ച് ഒരുമിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് മ ഈ എളുപ്പമുള്ള പക്ഷെ ശക്തിയുള്ള സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും നോക്കുന്ന മെച്ചപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ് കോഡുകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'mt': 'Aħna nistudjaw il-problema tal-bażi tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet distributtivi tat-testi fuq id-dominju viżwali, jiġifieri l-inkorporazzjonijiet viżwali-semantiċi (VSE għal qasir). Bidu b’attakk avversarju ċar fuq l-inkorporazzjonijiet tal-VSE, aħna nuru l-limitazzjoni tal-oqfsa attwali u tas-settijiet tad-dejta bit-test tal-immaġni (e ż., MS-COCO) kemm kwantitattivament kif ukoll kwalitattivament. Id-differenza kbira bejn in-numru ta’ kostituzzjonijiet possibbli ta’ semantika fid-dinja reali u d-daqs ta’ dejta parallel a, fil-biċċa l-kbira, tirrestrinġi l-mudell biex tiġi stabbilita rabta qawwija bejn is-semantika testwali u l-kunċetti viżivi. Aħna nistaffu din il-problema billi nżidu s-settijiet tad-dejta tal-intestatura tal-immaġni MS-COCO b’kampjuni kontrastivi kontrastivi testwali. Dawn il-kampjuni huma sintetizzati bl-użu ta’ prijoritajiet lingwistiċi tal-bniedem u tal-bażi ta’ għarfien WordNet, u jinfurzaw il-mudell biex jitħallew l-inkorporazzjonijiet imgħallma f’kunċetti konkreti fl-immaġni. Din it-teknika sempliċi iżda qawwija ġġib titjib notevoli fuq il-linji bażi fuq sett varjat ta’ kompiti downstream, flimkien mad-difiża ta’ attakki avversarji tat-tip magħruf. Codes are available at  https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'si': 'අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අධ්\u200dයානය කරන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දිහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් දිහා ප VSE සම්බන්ධ විරෝධ විරෝධ විරෝධ වෙනුවෙන් පටන් ගන්න, අපි දැන් ප්\u200dරතිරූධ විරෝධ විරෝධ විරෝධ විරෝධ වීම සහ පිළිබඳ විස සමාන්තික දත්ත අතර ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සමාන්තික සම්බන්ධයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහ අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නය වැඩි කරනවා MS-COCO පින්තූර පින්තූර කැප්සයින් දත්ත සෙට් එක්ක විශේෂය කරන්න. මේ සාම්ප්ලේස් මිනිස්සුන්ගේ භාෂාව සහ WordNet දන්න අධ්\u200dයානය සඳහා භාෂාව භාෂාව සම්බන්ධ කරනවා, සහ පින්තූරයේ සාම් මේ සරල නමුත් ශක්තිමත් තාක්ෂණය ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් දැනගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් තියෙනවා, දැනගන්න ප්\u200dරතිකාර ව කෝඩ් ලැබුනා https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'sr': 'Proučavamo problem podizanja distribucijskih predstavljanja teksta na vizualnom domenu, a to je vizualno-semantički integraciji (VSE kratko). Počnite sa nevidljivim adversarnim napadom na VSE integracije, pokazujemo ograničenje trenutnih okvira i podataka o tekstu slika (npr. MS-COCO) kvantitativno i kvalitativno. Velika razlika između broja mogućih ustava semantika u stvarnom svijetu i veličine paralelnih podataka u velikoj mjeri ograničava model da uspostavi jaku vezu između tekstualnih semantika i vizualnih koncepta. Smanjujemo ovaj problem povećanjem kompeta podataka za snimanje slika MS-COCO sa tekstualnim kontrastnim adversarnim uzorcima. Ovi uzorci su sintetizirani korištenjem jezika pre ljudske i WordNet znanstvene baze, i primoravajući model na zemlju naučene integracije na konkretne koncepte unutar slike. Ova jednostavna, ali moćna tehnika dovodi do primjetnog poboljšanja na osnovne linije na različite skupine ležnih zadataka, osim brane poznatih neprijateljskih napada. Kodovi su dostupni na https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ro': 'Studiem problema reprezentărilor distribuționale la sol ale textelor pe domeniul vizual, și anume încorporările vizual-semantice (VSE pe scurt). Începem cu un atac adversar profund asupra încorporărilor VSE, arătăm limitarea cadrelor curente și seturilor de date imagine-text (de exemplu, MS-COCO) atât cantitativ, cât și calitativ. Diferența mare dintre numărul de constituții posibile ale semanticii din lumea reală și dimensiunea datelor paralele, în mare măsură, limitează modelul pentru a stabili o legătură puternică între semantica textuală și conceptele vizuale. Soluționăm această problemă prin mărirea seturilor de date pentru subtitrarea imaginilor MS-COCO cu mostre adversare contrastante textuale. Aceste eșantioane sunt sintetizate folosind antecedentele lingvistice ale bazei de cunoștințe umane și WordNet și impun modelul pentru a soluționa încorporările învățate la concepte concrete din imagine. Această tehnică simplă, dar puternică aduce o îmbunătățire vizibilă față de liniile de bază pe un set divers de sarcini în aval, pe lângă apărarea atacurilor adversare cunoscute de tip. Codurile sunt disponibile la adresa: https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar problemet med att jorda distributionsrepresentationer av texter på den visuella domänen, nämligen visuell-semantiska inbäddningar (VSE kort). Börja med en insiktsfull motvillig attack på VSE-inbäddningar, visar vi begränsningen av nuvarande ramverk och bild-textdataset (t.ex. MS-COCO) både kvantitativt och kvalitativt. Den stora klyftan mellan antalet möjliga konstitutioner av verklig semantik och storleken på parallella data begränsar till stor del modellen att etablera en stark koppling mellan textsemantik och visuella begrepp. Vi lindrar detta problem genom att utöka MS-COCO bildtextningsdatauppsättningen med textkontrastiva kontradiktiva prover. Dessa prover syntetiseras med hjälp av språkliga förklaringar från människa och WordNet kunskapsbas, och genomdriva modellen för att grunda lärda inbäddningar till konkreta koncept i bilden. Denna enkla men kraftfulla teknik ger en märkbar förbättring jämfört med baslinjerna på en mängd olika uppgifter nedströms, förutom att försvara kända typer av motståndare attacker. Koder finns tillgängliga på https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'so': 'Dhibaatada qayb-qaybinta ee qoraalka ee muuqashada (VSE) waxaynu baranaynaa dhibaatada ku saabsan meelaha ay aragtidu leedahay, tusaale ahaan meelaha loo soo galo ee muuqashada (VSE) ee gaaban. Iska bilaabo weerar cadaawayaal ah oo ku qoran VSE, waxaynu muujinnaa xadhiidka sameynta iyo sawirada macluumaadka (e.g. MS-CO) oo ku qoran qiyaas iyo qiyaasti. Dhaqdhaqaaq weyn oo u dhexeeya tirada suurtagalka ah ee dhaqdhaqaaqyada caalamiga ah iyo qiyaastii macluumaadka lambarka ah, si waaweyn ayuu u xadgudbay modelka si uu u dhiso xiriir xoog leh oo u dhexeeya fikrada dhaqanka iyo fikrada aragga. Waxaannu u fududaynaa dhibaatadan si aan u kordhino sawirada MS-CO oo lagu barto taariikhda macluumaadka samooyinka ka ka geesta ah ee qoraalka. Tusaaladan waxaa lagu wada ururiyaa isticmaalka horumarinta afka dadka iyo aasaaska aqoonta ee WordNet, waxaana lagu qasbaa tusaalahaas si ay u bartaan sawirka kafaarada. Teknonikadan sahlan laakiin xoogga badan ayaa bedelka hoose looga dhigaa shaqooyin kala duduwan oo webiga hoose ku yaal, kaas oo ka sokow ilaalinta weerarka cadaawayaasha ah. Kaararka waxaa laga helaa https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ta': 'காட்சி தளத்தில் உள்ள உரையின் பங்கீட்டு பிரதிநிதிகளை நாம் படிக்கும் பிரச்சனையில், பார்வையில் பெரிய பார்வையில் பெரி VSE உட்பொதித்தல் மீது ஒரு உணர்வு எதிர்பார்வை துவங்கு, நாம் தற்போதைய சட்டங்கள் மற்றும் உரை தகவல் அமைப்புகளின் எல்லையைக் காட்டுகிறோம் (உ. ம் MS- CO)  சாத்தியமான உலக அமைப்புகளின் எண்ணிக்கையில் பெரிய இடைவெளியில் இருக்கும் இணைய தரவுகளின் அளவு, பெரிய அளவில், மாதிரியை கட்டுப்படுத்தி உரை பெமான்டிக்கு We alleviate this problem by augmenting the MS-COCO image captioning datasets with textual contrastive adversarial samples.  இந்த மாதிரிகள் மனிதன் முன்னுரிமையை பயன்படுத்தி மொழியின் முன்னுரிமையைக் கொண்டு ஒன்றிணைக்கப்படுகிறது, மற்றும் மாதிரி பிம்பத்திற்க இந்த எளிமையான ஆனால் சக்தியுடைய தொழில்நுட்பம் அடிப்படைகளில் பார்க்கக்கூடிய முன்னேற்றத்தை கொண்டு வருகிறது, பல்வேறு கீழ்நீர குறியீடுகள் கிடைக்கும் https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ur': 'ہم دیکھنے والی ڈومین کے متعلق تفریق کے متعلق تفریق کا مسئلہ پڑھتے ہیں، یعنی visual-semantic embeddings (VSE کوتاہی کے لئے). VSE ابڈینگ پر ایک بصیرت مقابلہ حملہ سے شروع کریں، ہم موجود فرمورک اور تصویر-ٹیکسٹ ڈیٹ سٹ (جیسے MS-COCO) کی محدودیت اور کیفیت کے ساتھ دکھاتے ہیں. حقیقی دنیاوی سیمانٹیکوں کی امکانات کی تعداد کے درمیان بہت بڑی فاصلہ اور سائل ڈیٹا کی اندازہ، بہت بڑی اندازہ سے، مدل کو تنگ کر دیتا ہے کہ textual semantics اور visual concepts کے درمیان ایک قوی لینک پیدا کرے. ہم اس مسئلہ کو آسان کر رہے ہیں MS-COCO تصویر کاپٹیونٹ ڈیٹ سٹ کے ساتھ ٹیکسٹل کنٹرسیٹ مخالف نمونے کے ساتھ. یہ نمونے انسان اور WordNet علم بنسس سے پہلے زبان کی استعمال کرتے ہیں اور نمونے کو زمین میں سیکھا گیا ہے کہ انڈینگ کو تصویر کے اندر قطعی نظریں کے لئے مضبوط کر دیں۔ یہ سادہ لیکن طاقتور تکنیک ایک متفاوت طریقے پر بنسٹ لینوں پر اضافہ کرتا ہے، ایک مختلف طریقے کے کاموں کے ساتھ، جاننے والی طرح مخالف حملہ کی حفاظت کے علاوہ۔ کوڈ موجود ہیں https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'no': 'Vi studerer problemet med å grunnleggja distribusjonelle representasjonar av tekstar på den visuelle domenet, som er visuelle semantiske innbygging (VSE for kort). Start med eit ugjennomsiktig adversarialt attack på VSE-innbygging, viser vi grensesnittet for gjeldande rammeverk og datasett for biletet-tekst (f.eks. MS-COCO) både kvantitativ og kvalitativ. Det store avstanden mellom antall moglege konstitusjonar av semantikk frå verdensverden og storleiken på parallelle data, til stor stor storleik, avgrenserer modellen for å oppretta ein sterk lenkje mellom tekst- semantikk og visuelle konseptar. Vi løyser denne problemen ved å auka MS-COCO-biletettittelsettet med tekstuelle kontrastære kontrastære prøver. Desse prøvene er syntetiserte med språk før menneske og WordNet-kunnskapsbasen, og utfører modellen til bakgrunnlærte innbygging til konkrete konseptar i biletet. Dette enkle, men kraftige teknikken får ein merkelig forbedring over baselinjene på ein ulike set av nedstremde oppgåver, i tillegg til å beskytte kjente typar adversariske attackar. Kodar er tilgjengelege på https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'uz': "Biz ko'rinadigan domenning matnlarni o'rganish muammolarini o'rganamiz, ko'rinish semantik tarkibini (kichkina VSE) ko'rinishimiz muammolari. Comment Muhimlik dunyodagi semantika soni va parallel maʼlumotning hajmi orasidagi katta gap, texnologiya semantika va ko'rinadigan fikrlarning orasidagi katta bogʻlash usulini ko'rsatadi. We alleviate this problem by augmenting the MS-COCO image captioning datasets with textual contrastive adversarial samples.  Ushbu misollar inson va WordNet maʼlumot bazasi bilan birlashtirilgan tildan foydalaniladi, va bu modelni rasmga koʻpaytirish uchun o'rganish mumkin. Bu oddiy, lekin kuchi texnologiya asosiy asboblarning asosida ko'plab o'zgarishni bajaradi. Ko'pchilik tashkilotlarini saqlashdan foydalanishidan foydalanadi. Kodlash usuli mavjud https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu vấn đề về các biểu tượng phân phát văn bản trên lĩnh vực hình ảnh, là sự gắn liền hình ảnh/////////////// Bắt đầu bằng một cuộc tấn công sâu sắc vào sự nhúng tay của VS, chúng tôi cho thấy giới hạn các khung thời gian và các tập tin văn bản ảnh (v.d., xơ rải rác) về mặt lượng và chất chất lượng. Sự khác biệt lớn giữa việc thực sự phân biệt khái niệm thực tế và kích thước của dữ liệu song song, hạn chế mô hình để thiết lập mối liên kết mạnh mẽ giữa ngữ pháp và các khái niệm thị giác. Chúng ta giải quyết vấn đề này bằng cách tăng cường hình ảnh xơ rải rác trên bảng thông tin bằng các mẫu tương đối. Những mẫu này được tổng hợp bằng những sơ lược ngôn ngữ của con người và từ nguồn kiến thức WordNet, và áp dụng các mô hình để ngăn chặn sự tác hợp học về các khái niệm cụ thể trong ảnh. Một kỹ thuật đơn giản nhưng mạnh mẽ này mang đến một sự tiến bộ đáng chú ý trên nền tảng của một loạt các công việc xuôi dòng khác nhau, ngoài việc bảo vệ các cuộc tấn công đối nghịch nổi tiếng. Mật mã có sẵn ở https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'bg': 'Изследваме проблема за заземяване на дистрибуционните представи на текстовете във визуалния домейн, а именно визуално-семантични вграждания (накратко ВСЕ). Започваме с проницателна противоречива атака върху вгражданията, показваме ограничението на текущите рамки и набори данни изображение-текст (напр. както количествено, така и качествено. Голямата разлика между броя на възможните конституции на семантиката от реалния свят и размера на паралелните данни до голяма степен ограничава модела, за да установи силна връзка между текстовата семантика и визуалните концепции. Ние облекчаваме този проблем чрез увеличаване на наборите от данни за надписи на изображения с текстови контрастни контрастни мостри. Тези образци са синтезирани с помощта на езикови приоритети на човешката и базата знания и прилагат модела, за да се обоснове наученото вграждане на конкретни концепции в изображението. Тази проста, но мощна техника носи забележимо подобрение над базовите линии на разнообразен набор от задачи надолу по веригата, в допълнение към защитата на известен тип противникови атаки. Кодовете са достъпни на адрес: https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'da': 'Vi studerer problemet med at grounding distributionelle repræsentationer af tekster på det visuelle domæne, nemlig visuel-semantiske embeddings (VSE for kort). Begynd med et indsigtsfuldt modstandskraft angreb på VSE-indlejringer, viser vi begrænsningen af nuværende rammer og billede-tekst datasæt (f.eks. MS-COCO) både kvantitativt og kvalitativt. Den store kløft mellem antallet af mulige forfatninger af den virkelige verdens semantik og størrelsen af parallelle data begrænser i høj grad modellen til at etablere en stærk forbindelse mellem tekstsemantik og visuelle begreber. Vi afhjælper dette problem ved at forøge MS-COCO billedtekstdatasæt med tekstkontrastive kontradiktive prøver. Disse prøver er syntetiseret ved hjælp af sprogforudsætninger for mennesker og WordNet vidensbase, og håndhæve modellen til at basere lærte indlejringer til konkrete begreber i billedet. Denne enkle, men kraftfulde teknik bringer en mærkbar forbedring i forhold til basislinjerne på et forskelligartet sæt downstream opgaver, ud over at forsvare kendte type modstandsarrang. Koderne er tilgængelige på https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'nl': 'We bestuderen het probleem van het aarden van distributierepresentaties van teksten op het visuele domein, namelijk visueel-semantische embeddings (kortweg VSE). Begin met een inzichtelijke tegenstrijdige aanval op VSE embeddings, we tonen de beperking van huidige frameworks en beeld-tekst datasets (bijv. MS-COCO) zowel kwantitatief als kwalitatief. De grote kloof tussen het aantal mogelijke constituties van de reële semantiek en de grootte van parallelle data beperkt het model voor een groot deel om een sterke link tussen tekstsemantiek en visuele concepten tot stand te brengen. We verlichten dit probleem door de MS-COCO beeldondertiteling datasets uit te breiden met tekstuele contrastieve tegenstrijdige samples. Deze samples worden gesynthetiseerd met behulp van taalpriors van de mens en de WordNet kennisbank, en dwingen het model om geleerde embeddings te gronden in concrete concepten binnen het beeld. Deze eenvoudige maar krachtige techniek brengt een merkbare verbetering ten opzichte van de basislijnen op een diverse set downstream taken, naast het verdedigen van bekende tegenstanders aanvallen. Codes zijn beschikbaar op: https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'hr': 'Proučavamo problem podizanja distribucijskih predstavljanja teksta na vizualnom domenu, a to je vizualno-semantičko ugrađenje (VSE kratko). Počet ćemo s značajnim adversarnim napadom na VSE ugrađenje, pokazujemo ograničenje trenutnih okvira i podataka o tekstu slika (npr. MS-COCO) kvantitativno i kvalitativno. Veliki razlog između broja mogućih ustava semantika u stvarnom svijetu i veličine paralelnih podataka u velikoj mjeri ograničava model za uspostavljanje jake veze između tekstualnih semantika i vizualnih koncepta. Ovaj problem olakšavamo povećanjem kompeta podataka o kapciji slika MS-COCO-a s tekstualnim kontrastnim protivnim uzorcima. Ovi uzorci su sintezirani korištenjem jezika prije ljudskog i WordNet znanstvenog baze i primjenjivanjem modela na zemlju naučenih integracija na konkretne koncepte unutar slike. Ova jednostavna, ali moćna tehnika donosi primjetljivo poboljšanje na osnovnim linijama na različite skupine ležnih zadataka, osim obrane poznatog tipa protivnih napada. Kodovi su dostupni na https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen das Problem der Erdung verteilter Repräsentationen von Texten auf der visuellen Domäne, nämlich visuell-semantische Einbettungen (kurz VSE). Beginnen wir mit einem aufschlussreichen Gegenangriff auf VSE-Einbettungen, zeigen wir die Begrenzung aktueller Frameworks und Bild-Text-Datensätze (z.B. MS-COCO) sowohl quantitativ als auch qualitativ auf. Die große Lücke zwischen der Anzahl möglicher Konstitutionen realer Semantik und der Größe paralleler Daten schränkt das Modell weitgehend ein, um eine starke Verbindung zwischen textueller Semantik und visuellen Konzepten herzustellen. Wir lindern dieses Problem, indem wir die MS-COCO Bildunterschriftsdatensätze mit kontrastiven Textsamples ergänzen. Diese Beispiele werden anhand von Sprachprioren des Menschen und der WordNet Wissensbasis synthetisiert und erzwingen das Modell, gelernte Einbettungen in konkrete Konzepte innerhalb des Bildes zu begründen. Diese einfache, aber leistungsstarke Technik bringt eine spürbare Verbesserung gegenüber den Basislinien bei einer Vielzahl von nachgelagerten Aufgaben, zusätzlich zur Verteidigung bekannter gegnerischer Angriffe. Codes sind erhältlich unter https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari masalah mendirikan representation distribusional teks pada domain visual, yaitu penerbangan visual-semantis (VSE singkat). Mulai dengan serangan musuh yang jelas terhadap pembangunan VSE, kami menunjukkan batasan dari bingkai saat ini dan dataset image-text (contohnya, MS-COCO) baik kuantitatif maupun kualitatif. Luaran besar antara jumlah konstitusi kemungkinan dari semantik dunia nyata dan ukuran data paralel, dalam jumlah besar, membatasi model untuk menetapkan hubungan kuat antara semantik tekstual dan konsep visual. Kami mengurangi masalah ini dengan meningkatkan dataset captioning gambar MS-COCO dengan sampel kontras teks. Sampel-sampel ini disintesis menggunakan bahasa sebelumnya dari manusia dan pangkalan pengetahuan WordNet, dan memaksa model untuk tanah belajar embedding ke konsep konkrit dalam gambar. Teknik sederhana tapi kuat ini membawa peningkatan yang dapat dilihat di garis dasar pada set berbagai tugas turun, selain mempertahankan serangan musuh tipe dikenal. Kode tersedia di https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ko': '우리는 텍스트 분포가 시각 영역에 나타난 기초적인 문제, 즉 시각적 의미 삽입(약칭 VSE)을 연구했다.VSE 삽입에 대한 깊은 대항적 공격부터 우리는 정량과 정성 두 가지 측면에서 현재 프레임워크와 이미지 텍스트 데이터 집합(예를 들어 MS-COCO)의 한계를 보여 주었다.현실 세계의 의미가 구성될 수 있는 수량과 병행 데이터의 크기 간의 커다란 차이는 모델이 텍스트의 의미와 시각 개념 사이에 강력한 관계를 구축하는 것을 어느 정도 제한했다.우리는 MS-COCO 이미지 자막 데이터 집합과 텍스트 대비 대항성 견본을 늘려 이 문제를 완화시켰다.이러한 견본은 인류의 언어 선험지식과WordNet지식 라이브러리를 사용하여 합성한 것으로 이 모델을 강제로 집행하여 학습한 것을 이미지의 구체적인 개념에 삽입한다.이미 알고 있는 유형의 대항적 공격을 방어하는 것 외에 이런 간단하지만 강력한 기술은 일련의 하류 임무에서 기선보다 현저하게 개선되었다.코드는https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'fa': 'ما مشکل توزیع نمایش\u200cهای تقسیم\u200cکننده\u200cای از متن\u200cها روی دامنه\u200cی دیده\u200cای را مطالعه می\u200cکنیم، یعنی انجمن\u200cهای دیده\u200cسیمانتی (VSE برای کوتاه). با حمله دشمنی مشاهده\u200cای روی ابتدایی VSE شروع کنیم، ما محدودیت فرم\u200cهای فعلی و مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای تصویر-متن (مثال MS-COCO) هر کدام به اندازه\u200cای و به اندازه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهیم. فاصله بزرگ بین تعداد قانون ممکن سیمانتیک\u200cهای جهان واقعی و اندازه داده\u200cهای متفاوتی به اندازه\u200cی بزرگ، مدل را محدود می\u200cکند تا یک ارتباط قوی بین سیمانتیک\u200cهای متناوتی و مفهوم\u200cهای دیده\u200cای بسازد. ما این مشکل را با افزایش مجموعه\u200cهای عنوان تصویر MS-COCO با نمونه\u200cهای مقاومت متفاوتی متصل می\u200cکنیم. این نمونه\u200cها با استفاده از زبان قبل از دانش انسان و بنیاد WordNet متصل می\u200cشوند، و مدل را به زمینی مطالعه\u200cهای یاد گرفته به عنوان نظریه\u200cهای مشخص در داخل تصویر اجرا می\u200cکنند. این تکنیک ساده ولی قدرتمند، توسط خطوط پایین\u200cهای متفاوتی از کار های پایین\u200cترین، به اضافه از دفاع از حمله\u200cهای دشمنی\u200cهای شناخته شده، بهترین توسعه می\u200cکند. کدها در دسترس هستند https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'sw': 'Tunafuatilia tatizo la kuwakilisha mabadiliko ya maandishi yanayohusu maeneo yanayoonekana, yaani mabadiliko ya kisasa (VSE kwa muda mfupi). Begin with an insightful adversarial attack on VSE embeddings, we show the limitation of current frameworks and image-text datasets (e.g., MS-COCO) both quantitatively and qualitatively.  Mgawanyo mkubwa kati ya idadi ya katiba inayowezekana ya semantics halisi duniani na ukubwa wa taarifa za usambazaji, kwa kiwango kikubwa, unazuia muundo wa kutengeneza kiungo kikubwa kati ya semantics na dhana za kuona. Tunaondolea tatizo hili kwa kuongeza picha za MS-CO zinazoelezea taarifa kwa sampuli tofauti za kisasa. Mifano hii imeunganishwa kwa kutumia kipaumbele cha lugha za binadamu na msingi wa maarifa ya WordNet, na kuilazimisha mtindo wa ardhi unajifunza kuingia mawazo makubwa ndani ya picha hiyo. Teknolojia hii rahisi lakini yenye nguvu inaleta maendeleo mabaya ya msingi juu ya kazi mbalimbali za mito, pamoja na kutetea mashambulizi yanayojulikana kama yanayopingana. Kodi zinapatikana katika https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'tr': 'Biz g철rsel domenydeki tekstlerin da휓캇t캇m temsillerini temizlemek sorunu 챌al캇힊캇yoruz, yani visual-semantik embeddings (VSE k캇sa bir 힊ekilde). VSE giri힊imlerine g 철z 철흫체n챌 te흫kili salyk bilen ba힊la흫, h채zirki frameworklary흫 we surat-metin veri setirlerini흫 limitini (mesel창, MS-COCO) hem 철l챌체de we mykdarlyk derejesini g철rkez. Ger챌ek d체nyan캇n semantikleri ve paralel verilerin 철l챌체si aras캇ndaki b체y체k bir ayla힊ma, b체y체k 철l챌체de modeli textual semantik ve g철rsel d체힊체nceler aras캇nda g체챌l체 bir ba휓lant캇 olu힊turmak i챌in s캇n캇rlar. MS-COCO resim kapsi첵asyny흫 hatlaryny tekst kontrast te흫kil nusgalary bilen 체첵tgeden bu meseleni azalt첵arys Bu nusgalar adamlary흫 철흫ki dilinden we WordNet bilgi bazyndan ullan첵arlar we suraty흫 i챌indeki konkretler d체힊체nj채ni흫 체챌in 철r채n netijesini 챌ykar첵arlar. Bu basit 첵철ne g체첵챌li tekniki첵a tana첵an te흫kil te흫galyklary goramak 체챌in 체첵tge힊meler 체챌in 체첵tge힊ik bolar. K철dler bar https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'af': "Ons studeer die probleem van grondgebruikering van verspreidingsonderstellings van teks op die visuele domein, naamlik visuele- semantiese inbêdings (VSE vir kort). Begin met 'n insightful adversarial attack on VSE embeddings, ons wys die beperking van huidige rameworks en beeldteks datastelle (bv. MS- COCO) beide kvantitatiewe en kwaliteit. Die groot gap tussen die aantal moontlike konstitusies van reël- wêreld semantieke en die grootte van parallele data, tot 'n groot uitbreiding, beperk die model om 'n sterk skakel tussen tekstuele semantieke en visuele konsepte te stel. Ons verminder hierdie probleem deur die MS- COCO beeldkapsie van datastelle te vergroot met tekstuele kontrastiewe teenstandaarie voorbeelde. Hierdie voorbeelde is sintetiseer met die gebruik van taal vooraf van die menslike en die WordNet kennis basie, en die model versterk na grond leer inbettings na betekene konsepte binne die beeld. Hierdie eenvoudige maar kragtige teknike bring 'n opmerkbere verbetering oor die basisline op 'n verskeie stel van onderstreem taak, in addition to the defending of known-type adversarial attacks. Kodes is beskikbaar by https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.", 'sq': 'Ne studiojmë problemin e bazimit të përfaqësimeve shpërndarëse të teksteve në domenin vizual, veçanërisht përfshirjeve vizual-semantike (VSE për shkurt). Filloni me një sulm të dukshëm kundërshtar kundër përfshirjeve të VSE-së, ne tregojmë kufizimin e kuadrateve aktuale dhe të dhënave të tekstit të imazhit (për shembull, MS-COCO) si kuantitativisht ashtu edhe kualitativisht. Ndryshimi i madh midis numrit të kushtetutave të mundshme të semantikës botërore reale dhe madhësisë së të dhënave paralele, në një shkallë të madhe, kufizon modelin për të ngritur një lidhje të fortë midis semantikës tekstuale dhe koncepteve vizuale. Ne e lehtësojmë këtë problem duke rritur grupet e të dhënave të titullimit të imazhit MS-COCO me kampione kontraste tekstuale kundërshtare. Këto mostra sintetizohen duke përdorur paraardhësit e gjuhës së njerëzve dhe bazën e njohurive WordNet, dhe duke forcuar modelin për të themeluar përfshirjet e mësuara në konceptet konkrete brenda imazhit. Kjo teknikë e thjeshtë por e fuqishme sjell një përmirësim të dukshëm mbi linjat bazë në një sërë të ndryshme detyrash poshtë rrjedhës, përveç mbrojtjes së sulmeve kundërshtare të llojit të njohur. Kodet janë në dispozicion në https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'hy': 'We study the problem of grounding distributional representations of texts on the visual domain, namely visual-semantic embeddings (VSE for short).  Սկսենք տեսանելի հակառակորդ հարձակումից VSE ի ներդրումների վրա, մենք ցույց ենք տալիս ներկայիս շրջանների սահմանափակումները և պատկեր-տեքստի տվյալների համակարգերը (օրինակ, SM-COCOCOS) քանակական և որակային առումով: Իրական աշխարհի սեմանտիկայի հնարավոր սահմանադրությունների և զուգահեռ տվյալների չափի միջև մեծ մասամբ սահմանափակում է մոդելը, որպեսզի ստեղծվի ուժեղ կապ տեքստալ սեմանտիկայի և վիզուալ հասկացությունների միջև: Մենք նվազեցնում ենք այս խնդիրը, ավելացնելով ՄՍ-ԿՕԿՕ պատկերների վերնագրման տվյալների համակարգերը տեքստային հակադրական հակադրական նմուշներով: Այս նմուշները սինթեզվում են օգտագործելով մարդկային և WordNet-ի գիտելիքների հիմքերի լեզվի նախկին հիմքերը, և ստիպում են մոդելը, որպեսզի պատկերի մեջ կոնկրետ հասկացություններ ներառվեն: Այս պարզ, բայց ուժեղ տեխնիկան հանգեցնում է նշանակալի բարելավում հիմնական գծերի վերաբերյալ հետագա խնդիրների բազմազան շարքերի վրա, բացի հայտնի հակառակորդ հարձակումների պաշտպանությունից: Գործիքները հասանելի են https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'am': 'የጽሑፎችን አካባቢ መልዕክቶች በመጠቀም እናስተምራለን፡፡ የVSE አካባቢዎች ላይ በተቃዋሚ ጥያቄ መጀመሪያ፣ የአሁኑን ፍሬም እና የምስል-ጽሑፍ ዳርቻዎች (ምሳሌ MS-CO) ቁጥጥር እና በተለይ እናሳየዋለን፡፡ The large gap between the number of possible constitutions of real-world semantics and the size of parallel data, to a large extent, restricts the model to establish a strong link between textual semantics and visual concepts.  ይህንን ጉዳይ የኢሜএস-ኮ ምስሉን በመጨመር እናሳድጋለን፡፡ እነዚህ ምሳሌዎች ከሰው በፊት ቋንቋ እና የWordNet እውቀት መቀመጫዎች የተሰበሰቡ ናቸው፣ ሞዴላዎቹንም በመሬት የተማሩትን አካባቢዎች በምስል ውስጥ ለመቆጣጠር ይችላሉ፡፡ ይህ ቀላል ነገር ግን ኃይለኛ ስህተት፣ በአውራጆች ላይ በተለያዩ የፈሳሾች ስራ ላይ የሚታወቀው ተቃዋሚዎች መጋረጃዎችን ከመጠበቅ የበለጠ ትክክል ማድረግ ነው፡፡ የሆሄያት ኮድ https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'az': 'Görünür domeində mətnlərin dağıtılması problemlərini öyrənirik, bu da görsel-semantik dağıtımlar (VSE qısa vaxt). VSE inbingləri üzərində g özəl bir düşmənçilik saldırısıyla başlayın, həmin frameworkların və görüntü-metin veri qurğularının sınırlarını göstəririk. Gerçek dünyanın semantik və paralel məlumatların böyüklüyü arasındakı böyük sədd, modeli textual semantics və visual concepts arasında möhkəm bir bağlantı yaratmaq üçün səbəb edir. Biz bu problemi, MS-COCO görüntü başlıqlarını artıraraq, textual contrastive adversarial nümunələrlə birlikdə məlumatları azaldırıq. Bu nümunələr insan və WordNet elm üssünün əvvəlkiləri ilə dil vasitəsilə sintezlənir və modeli şəkillərin içində konkrete fikirlərə götürülüb öyrəndiyi yerə götürülür. Bu basit fakat güclü teknik, bilinmiş nümunə düşmənçilik saldıqlarını qorumaq üçün, müxtəlif düşmənçi işlərin üstündə müxtəlif tədbirlərin üstündə görünümlü yaxşılıqlarını gətirir. Kodlar faydalanır https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'bn': 'আমরা দৃশ্যমান ডোমেইনে টেক্সটের প্রতিনিধিত্ব বিতরণের সমস্যা গবেষণা করছি, যার মধ্যে দৃশ্য-সেম্যান্টিক বিভিন্ন প্রতিনিধি (ভিস ভিসি বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন আক্রমণের উপর দৃষ্টিভঙ্গিত বিরোধী আক্রমণ শুরু করে, আমরা বর্তমান ফ্রেম্যাক্টর এবং ছবি টেক্সটের ডেটাসেট (উদাহরণস্বরূপ এমএস- সি)  পৃথিবীর সম্ভাব্য সংবিধান এবং প্যারালেল ডাটার আকারের মধ্যে সম্ভাব্য বিশ্বের সংখ্যা বিশাল বিভাগের মধ্যে বিভাগ বিভাগের মধ্যে বিশাল বিভাগ, যা  আমরা এই সমস্যাটিকে কমিয়ে দিই এমএস- ককো ছবিকে বাড়িয়ে দিয়ে ডাটাসেটের ক্যাপ্টেশনের মাধ্যমে টেক্সুয়াল বিরোধী প্রতিরোধী নমু এই নমুনাগুলো মানুষ এবং ওয়ার্ডনেটের জ্ঞান বেসের পূর্ববর্তী ভাষা ব্যবহার করে একত্রিত করা হয়েছে এবং এই মডেলটি চিত্রের মধ্যে কনক্রিট ধারণার জন্ এই সহজ কিন্তু শক্তিশালী প্রযুক্তি বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন বিভিন্ন ধরনের নীচের কাজের উপর ভিত্তিক উন্নতি প্রদান করে, পরিচিত-ধরনের বিরোধী  কোড পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'bs': 'Proučavamo problem temeljenja distribucijskih predstavljanja teksta na vizualnom domenu, a to je vizualno-semantičko ugrađenje (VSE kratko). Počinjemo sa značajnim adversarnim napadom na VSE ugrađenje, pokazujemo ograničenje trenutnih okvira i podataka o tekstu slika (npr. MS-COCO) kvantitativno i kvalitativno. Velika razlika između broja mogućih ustava semantika u stvarnom svijetu i veličine paralelnih podataka u velikoj mjeri ograničava model za uspostavljanje jake veze između tekstualnih semantika i vizualnih koncepta. Ovaj problem olakšavamo povećanjem kompleta podataka za snimanje slika MS-COCO sa tekstualnim kontrastnim adversarnim uzorcima. Ovi uzorci se sintetiziraju sa jezikom prije ljudskog i WordNet znanja baze, i primjenjuju model na zemlju naučene integracije na konkretne koncepte unutar slike. Ova jednostavna, ali moćna tehnika donosi primjetljivo poboljšanje na osnovnim linijama na različite skupine ležnih zadataka, osim brane poznatih neprijateljskih napada. Kodovi su dostupni na https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'cs': 'Studujeme problém uzemnění distribučních reprezentací textů na vizuální doméně, konkrétně vizuálně-sémantické vložení (zkráceně VSE). Začneme vhledným nepřátelským útokem na VSE vložení, ukážeme omezení současných frameworků a obrazových textových datových sad (např. MS-COCO) jak kvantitativně, tak kvalitativně. Velká propast mezi počtem možných konstitucí sémantiky reálného světa a velikostí paralelních dat do značné míry omezuje model na vytvoření silné vazby mezi textovou sémantikou a vizuálními koncepty. Tento problém zmírňujeme rozšířením datových sad pro popisky obrazů MS-COCO o textové kontrastní kontrastní vzorky. Tyto vzorky jsou syntetizovány s použitím jazykových priorů lidské a znalostní báze WordNet a vynucovány model tak, aby základní naučené vložení do konkrétních konceptů v rámci obrazu. Tato jednoduchá, ale výkonná technika přináší výrazné zlepšení nad základními liniemi na různé sadě následných úkolů, kromě obrany známého typu protivních útoků. Kódy jsou k dispozici na adrese https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ca': "We study the problem of grounding distributional representations of texts on the visual domain, namely visual-semantic embeddings (VSE for short).  Comencem amb un atac adversari intel·ligent contra les incorporacions VSE, demostram la limitació dels marcs actuals i dels conjunts de dades imatges-text (com MS-COCO) tant quantitativament com qualitativament. La gran diferència entre el nombre de constitucions possibles de la semàntica del món real i la mida de les dades paralleles, en gran medida, limita el model per establir un fort enllaç entre la semàntica textual i els conceptes visuals. We alleviate this problem by augmenting the MS-COCO image captioning datasets with textual contrastive adversarial samples.  Aquestes mostres són sintetitzades fent servir els antecedents lingüístics de la base de coneixements humana i WordNet, i forçant el model a terra d'incorporacions aprengutes a conceptes concrets dins la imatge. Aquesta tècnica simple però poderosa porta una millora notable sobre les línies de base en un conjunt divers de tasques avall, a més de defensar atacs adversaris de tipus conegut. Els codis estan disponibles en https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.", 'et': 'Uurime tekstide jaotuslike representatsioonide maandamise probleemi visuaalses valdkonnas, nimelt visuaalsemantiliste manustamiste (VSE lühidalt). Alustades läbimõistliku vasturünnakuga VSE manustamisele, näitame praeguste raamistike ja pilditeksti andmekogumite (nt MS-COCO) piiranguid nii kvantitatiivselt kui kvalitatiivselt. Suur lõhe reaalmaailma semantika võimalike konstitutsioonide arvu ja paralleelsete andmete suuruse vahel piirab suuresti mudelit, et luua tugev seos tekstisemantika ja visuaalsete kontseptsioonide vahel. Me leevendame seda probleemi, täiendades MS-COCO piltide pealdiste andmekogumeid tekstiliste kontrastsete kontrastsete näidistega. Need näidised on sünteesitud inimeste ja WordNeti teadmistebaasi keeleprioriteetide abil ning need jõustavad mudeli, et põhjendada õppitud põimimist konkreetsetele kontseptsioonidele pildis. See lihtne, kuid võimas tehnika toob lisaks teadaolevat tüüpi vastasrünnakute kaitsmisele märgatava paranemise võrreldes lähtejoontega mitmesuguste alljärgnevate ülesannete puhul. Koodid on kättesaadavad aadressil https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme ongelmaa, joka liittyy tekstien jakeluun visuaalisella alueella eli visuaalis-semanttisiin upotuksiin (VSE). Aloitamme oivaltavalla VSE:n upotuksiin kohdistuvalla vastakkaisella hyökkäyksellä, näytämme nykyisten kehysten ja kuva-teksti-aineistojen (esim. MS-COCO) rajoitukset sekä määrällisesti että laadullisesti. Todellisen semantiikan mahdollisten konstituutioiden määrän ja rinnakkaisaineiston koon suuri ero rajoittaa mallia luomaan vahvan yhteyden tekstisemantiikan ja visuaalisten käsitteiden välille. Vähennämme tätä ongelmaa lisäämällä MS-COCO-kuvatekstitystietoja kontrastiivisilla kontrastinäytteillä. Nämä näytteet on syntetisoitu käyttäen ihmisen kieliprioriteetteja ja WordNet-tietopohjaa, ja ne vahvistavat mallin pohjaksi opittuja upotuksia konkreettisiin käsitteisiin kuvan sisällä. Tämä yksinkertainen mutta tehokas tekniikka tuo huomattavaa parannusta lähtötasoon verrattuna monimuotoisiin loppupään tehtäviin sen lisäksi, että se puolustaa tunnettuja vastustajia. Koodit ovat saatavilla osoitteessa https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'jv': 'We read the question of background Distribubution representations of texts on the Visual domain, namely Vis-semanti embedding (VSE for shorter). Begin with an outlhhul contrastary strike on VSE embedding, we show the limitation of current frame-marks and image-text dataset string" in "context_BAR_stringLink We are about to AllProgress Sampur iki dipunanggé kuwi nggunaké kesempatan pangan ning larang sampek karo awak dhéwé nang word net, lan tigempakan modèl kanggo awak dhéwé ngerasakno sampek kang sampek sampek. lah structural navigation https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'sk': 'Proučujemo problem označevanja distribucijskih reprezentacij besedil na vizualni domeni, in sicer vizualno-semantičnih vdelav (VSE). Začnemo z vpoglednim kontradiktorskim napadom na VSE vdelave, prikazujemo omejitev trenutnih okvirov in naborov podatkov slike-besedila (npr. MS-COCO) tako kvantitativno kot kvalitativno. Velika vrzel med številom možnih konstitucij realne semantike in velikostjo vzporednih podatkov v veliki meri omejuje model za vzpostavitev močne povezave med besedilno semantiko in vizualnimi koncepti. Ta problem bomo ublažili tako, da povečamo nabore podatkov o napisu slik MS-COCO z besedilnimi kontrastnimi kontrastnimi kontrastnimi vzorci. Ti vzorci so sintetizirani z uporabo jezikovnih predhodnikov človeka in WordNet baze znanja ter uveljavljajo model za utemeljitev naučenih vključitev v konkretne koncepte znotraj podobe. Ta preprosta, vendar zmogljiva tehnika prinaša opazno izboljšanje nad osnovnimi vrstami pri različnih nalogah, poleg tega, da brani znane nasprotne napade. Kode so na voljo na spletni strani https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים את הבעיה של קישום מייצגים פיצוצים של טקסטים על התחום החזוי, כלומר מייצגים ויזואליים-סמנטיים (VSE בקצרה). להתחיל עם התקפה יריבית ברורה על תוכניות VSE, אנחנו מראים את הגבלה של המסגרות הנוכחיות והמסגרות מידע טקסט-תמונה (למשל MS-COCO) באופן כמוני ובאופן איכותי. הפער הגדול בין מספר החוקים האפשריים של סמנטיקה בעולם האמיתי לגודל של נתונים מקבילים, במידה גדולה, מגביל את המודל כדי להקים קשר חזק בין סמנטיקה טקסטולית למחשבות ויזואליים. אנחנו מקלים את הבעיה הזאת על ידי הגדילה של תאריך נתונים של MS-COCO עם דגימות נגד נגד טקסט. דגימות אלה מסינטזיות באמצעות קודמות שפה של האדם ובסיס הידע של WordNet, ולהכריח את הדוגמאל לקרקע ללמודים קישורים למחשבות בטונים בתוך התמונה. טכניקה פשוטה אבל חזקה זו מביאה שיפור ברור מעל קווי הבסיס על קבוצה מגוונת של משימות מתחתיות, בנוסף להגנה על תקיפות יריבות מסוג ידוע. קודים זמינים ב https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.', 'ha': "Munã karatun matsalar da aka raba mabalin littattafani na rubutun da ke iya gani, kamar masu ganin-semantic da ake ƙara (V SA kaɗan). @ info: whatsthis Kiɓa girma tsakanin ƙidãyar da ake iya cikin katuni na masu iya cikin-duniya masu hushi da girma da data masu parallel, yana ƙudura motel dõmin ya daidaita wani link mai ƙarfi tsakanin na semantiki na rubutu da zato mai gani. Yana sauƙaƙara wannan muammãni da za'a ƙara zanen SMA-CO da zanen tsari na database da misãlai masu motsi na rubutu. @ info Wannan techni mai sauƙi, kuma mai ƙarfi na zo da mafiya kyau a kan asalin, a kan wasu aikin aiki na dabam-duram, da kuma bayan tsari wa-nau'in-abun da aka sani. Ana sami kodi da https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.", 'bo': 'We study the problem of grounding distributional representations of texts on the visual domain, namely visual-semantic embeddings (VSE for short). Begin with an insightful adversarial attack on VSE embeddings, we show the limitation of current frameworks and image-text datasets (e.g., MS-COCO) both quantitatively and qualitatively. See also བྱུང་བའི་རྩ་ཁྲིམས་ཆེན་དག་གི་ཚད་དང་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་སྐྱེལ་བ་དང་ཆེ་ཆུང་ཉིད་ཅིག་གི་ཚད་ཆེ་བའི་བར་སྟོང་ཞིང་ཡོད་པ་ལས་དབྱེ་བ་དག་གི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཤིག ང་ཚོས་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུ་རྐྱེན་ལེན་བྱེད་ན་གྱིས་MS-COCO གཟུགས་རིས་བཀོད་སྒྲིག་གི་ཡིག་ཆ དཔེ་དབྱིབས་འདི་དག་གི་མིང་དང་ཡིག་ཆ་གི་སྔོན་འཛིན་པའི་སྐད་རིགས་དང་གྲངས་ཤེས་ཀྱི་གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལ་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་སྟངས This simple but powerful technique brings a noticeable improvement over the baselines on a diverse set of downstream tasks, in addition to defending known-type adversarial attacks. ཡིག་རྟགས་སྤྱོད་ཚར་བ https://github.com/ExplorerFreda/VSE-C.'}
{'en': 'Structured Representation Learning for Online Debate Stance Prediction', 'pt': 'Aprendizagem de representação estruturada para previsão de postura de debate online', 'ar': 'تعلم التمثيل المنظم للتنبؤ بموقف المناقشة عبر الإنترنت', 'es': 'Aprendizaje de representación estructurada para predicción de posturas de debate', 'fr': 'Apprentissage de la représentation structurée pour la prédiction de position', 'ja': 'オンラインデビューのための構造化された表現学習のスタンス予測', 'hi': 'संरचित प्रतिनिधित्व ऑनलाइन बहस रुख भविष्यवाणी के लिए सीखना', 'ru': 'Обучение структурированному представлению для прогнозирования позиции онлайн-дебатов', 'zh': '在线辩立场之结构化以示学', 'ga': 'Ionadaíocht Struchtúrtha a Fhoghlaim le hAghaidh Seasamh Díospóireachta Ar Líne', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Διαρθρωμένη Εκπροσώπευση Μάθηση για την πρόβλεψη Στάσης Συζήτηση', 'hu': 'Strukturált reprezentációs tanulás az online vitahelyzet előrejelzéséhez', 'it': 'Apprendimento strutturato della rappresentazione per la previsione della posizione del dibattito online', 'kk': 'Онлайн жөндеу станциясы үшін құрылған Representation Learning for Online Debate Stance Prediction', 'lt': 'Struktūrinis atstovavimo mokymasis interneto diskusijų pozicijų prognozėje', 'mk': 'Структурирано учење на претставништво за предвидување на станот на онлајн дебата', 'ms': 'Perwakilan Terstruktur Belajar untuk Prediksi Kedudukan Debat Online', 'ml': 'ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d ഡീബെറ്റ് സ്റ്റേന്\u200dസ് മുന്\u200dഗണന പഠിപ്പിക്കുന്ന പ്രതിനിധി', 'mt': 'Tagħlim Strutturat tar-Rappreżentanza għat-Tbassir tal-Istanza tad-Dibattitu Online', 'mn': 'Интернет Debate Stance төлөвлөгөөний бүтээгдэхүүний суралцах', 'no': 'Comment', 'pl': 'Nauka o strukturyzowanej reprezentacji dla prognozowania stanu debaty online', 'ro': 'Învățarea structurată a reprezentării pentru predicția stării de dezbatere online', 'sr': 'Strukturalno predstavljanje učenja za predstavu online debata', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Baritaanka u baaraandegista danaha internetka', 'sv': 'Strukturerad representation lärande för online debatt Stance förutsägelse', 'ta': 'இணைய வாதாரண முன்னுரிமைக்கான கட்டப்பட்ட பிரதிநிகழ்வு கற்றுக்கொடுக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது', 'ur': 'ساختہ ریسپانسیٹ سیکھنا آنلاین ڈیبٹ سٹنس پرڈیکشن کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Học đại diện trang mạng cho dự đoán sinh trang', 'bg': 'Учене на структурирано представителство за прогнозиране на позицията на дебата онлайн', 'nl': 'Gestructureerde Representatie Leren voor Online Debatstandvoorspelling', 'hr': 'Strukturirano predstavljanje učenje za predviđanje internetske rasprave', 'da': 'Struktureret repræsentation læring til online debat Stance forudsigelse', 'de': 'Structured Representation Learning für Online Debatte Stance Prediction', 'id': 'Perwakilan Struktur Belajar untuk Prediksi Standas Debat Online', 'ko': '온라인 변론 자세 예측에 사용되는 구조화 표징 학습', 'fa': 'نمایش ساختار یادگیری برای پیشنهاد جدایی در آنلاین', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa ajili ya Ujadala wa Mtandaoni', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk Debat Stensi Beýikleri üçin Structured Representative öwrenmek', 'af': 'Struktuurde voorstelling Leer vir Online Debate Stance voorstelling', 'sq': 'Përfaqësuesi i strukturuar Mëson për parashikimin e qëndrimit të debatit online', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'hy': 'Օնլայն քննարկումների կանխատեսման համար կառուցվածքային ներկայացուցիչ սովորելը', 'az': '캻nternet Debat Stensi 칐yr톛nm톛si', 'bn': 'অনলাইন বিতর্ক করার জন্য প্রতিনিধি শিক্ষা', 'bs': 'Strukturalno predstavljanje učenja za predstavu online debata', 'cs': 'Učení strukturované reprezentace pro online predikci postoje debaty', 'ca': 'Aprendència estructurada de representació per predicció de la posició de debat en línia', 'et': 'Struktureeritud esinduse õppimine online debati seisundi prognoosimiseks', 'fi': 'Structured Representation Learning for Online Debate Stance Ennuste', 'jv': 'structural representation Learning for online Debate STAdikion', 'he': 'מייצגה מובנה ללמוד לקיום דיון באינטרנט', 'ha': 'dictionary variant', 'sk': 'Učenje strukturiranega predstavništva za napoved stanja spletne debate', 'bo': 'རྩིས་གཞུང་གི་བསྡུས་བརྗོད་པ། དྲ་བ་ལ་ཆེན་འཇུག་གནས་ཀྱི་བསམ་འཆར་སྤེལ་བ།'}
{'en': 'Online debates can help provide valuable information about various perspectives on a wide range of issues. However, understanding the stances expressed in these debates is a highly challenging task, which requires modeling both textual content and users’ conversational interactions. Current approaches take a collective classification approach, which ignores the relationships between different debate topics. In this work, we suggest to view this task as a representation learning problem, and embed the text and authors jointly based on their interactions. We evaluate our model over the Internet Argumentation Corpus, and compare different approaches for structural information embedding. Experimental results show that our model can achieve significantly better results compared to previous competitive models.', 'ar': 'يمكن أن تساعد المناقشات عبر الإنترنت في توفير معلومات قيمة حول وجهات نظر مختلفة حول مجموعة واسعة من القضايا. ومع ذلك ، فإن فهم المواقف التي تم التعبير عنها في هذه المناقشات مهمة صعبة للغاية ، والتي تتطلب نمذجة كل من المحتوى النصي وتفاعلات المحادثة بين المستخدمين. النهج الحالية تتخذ نهج تصنيف جماعي ، والذي يتجاهل العلاقات بين مواضيع النقاش المختلفة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح النظر إلى هذه المهمة على أنها مشكلة تعلم تمثيلية ، وتضمين النص والمؤلفين معًا بناءً على تفاعلاتهم. نقوم بتقييم نموذجنا عبر مجموعة الحجج على الإنترنت ، ومقارنة الأساليب المختلفة لتضمين المعلومات الهيكلية. تظهر النتائج التجريبية أن نموذجنا يمكن أن يحقق نتائج أفضل بشكل ملحوظ مقارنة بالنماذج التنافسية السابقة.', 'pt': 'Os debates online podem ajudar a fornecer informações valiosas sobre várias perspectivas sobre uma ampla gama de questões. No entanto, compreender as posições expressas nesses debates é uma tarefa altamente desafiadora, que requer modelar tanto o conteúdo textual quanto as interações conversacionais dos usuários. As abordagens atuais adotam uma abordagem de classificação coletiva, que ignora as relações entre os diferentes tópicos de debate. Neste trabalho, sugerimos encarar esta tarefa como um problema de aprendizagem de representação, e incorporar o texto e os autores conjuntamente com base em suas interações. Avaliamos nosso modelo no Corpus de Argumentação da Internet e comparamos diferentes abordagens para incorporação de informações estruturais. Os resultados experimentais mostram que nosso modelo pode alcançar resultados significativamente melhores em comparação com os modelos concorrentes anteriores.', 'es': 'Los debates en línea pueden ayudar a proporcionar información valiosa sobre diversas perspectivas sobre una amplia gama de temas. Sin embargo, entender las posturas expresadas en estos debates es una tarea muy desafiante, que requiere modelar tanto el contenido textual como las interacciones conversacionales de los usuarios. Los enfoques actuales adoptan un enfoque de clasificación colectiva, que ignora las relaciones entre los diferentes temas de debate. En este trabajo, sugerimos ver esta tarea como un problema de aprendizaje de representación e integrar el texto y los autores de forma conjunta en función de sus interacciones. Evaluamos nuestro modelo a través del Corpus de Argumentación de Internet y comparamos diferentes enfoques para la incorporación de información estructural. Los resultados experimentales muestran que nuestro modelo puede lograr resultados significativamente mejores en comparación con los modelos anteriores de la competencia.', 'fr': "Les débats en ligne peuvent aider à fournir des informations précieuses sur divers points de vue sur un large éventail de questions. Cependant, comprendre les positions exprimées dans ces débats est une tâche très difficile, qui nécessite de modéliser à la fois le contenu textuel et les interactions conversationnelles des utilisateurs. Les approches actuelles adoptent une approche de classification collective, qui ignore les relations entre les différents sujets de débat. Dans ce travail, nous suggérons de considérer cette tâche comme un problème d'apprentissage de la représentation, et d'intégrer le texte et les auteurs conjointement en fonction de leurs interactions. Nous évaluons notre modèle sur l'Internet Argumentation Corpus et comparons différentes approches pour l'intégration d'informations structurelles. Les résultats expérimentaux montrent que notre modèle peut atteindre des résultats nettement meilleurs par rapport aux modèles concurrents précédents.", 'ja': 'オンラインディベートは、幅広い問題に関するさまざまな視点に関する貴重な情報を提供するのに役立ちます。しかし、これらのディベートで示されたスタンスを理解することは非常に困難な課題であり、テキストコンテンツとユーザーの会話インタラクションの両方をモデリングする必要があります。現在のアプローチは、異なる議論トピック間の関係を無視した集合分類アプローチをとる。この研究では、この課題を表現学習の問題として捉え、テキストと著者の相互作用に基づいて共同で埋め込むことを提案します。私たちはインターネット上の議論コーパスを通じてモデルを評価し、構造的な情報埋め込みのためのさまざまなアプローチを比較します。実験結果は、当社のモデルが以前の競合モデルと比較して大幅に優れた結果を得ることができることを示しています。', 'zh': '在线辩有助于博论者。 然知其极具挑战性也,文本与用户言互动建模。 今法用集体分类之法,忽于异论主题之间。 于此为学,以文为用。 以互联网论证语料库评我形势,较其消息之异法。 实验结果表明,比之前争,吾形可以取明。', 'ru': 'Онлайновые дебаты могут помочь предоставить ценную информацию о различных точках зрения по широкому кругу вопросов. Однако понимание позиций, выраженных в этих дебатах, является очень сложной задачей, которая требует моделирования как текстового контента, так и разговорных взаимодействий пользователей. В нынешних подходах используется коллективный классификационный подход, который игнорирует взаимосвязи между различными темами обсуждений. В этой работе мы предлагаем рассматривать эту задачу как задачу репрезентационного обучения, и встраивать текст и авторов совместно на основе их взаимодействий. Мы оцениваем нашу модель через Интернет Argumentation Corpus и сравниваем различные подходы к встраиванию структурной информации. Экспериментальные результаты показывают, что наша модель может достичь значительно лучших результатов по сравнению с предыдущими конкурентными моделями.', 'ga': 'Is féidir le díospóireachtaí ar líne cabhrú le heolas luachmhar a sholáthar faoi dhearcaí éagsúla ar raon leathan saincheisteanna. Mar sin féin, is tasc an-dúshlánach é an seasamh a chuirtear in iúl sna díospóireachtaí seo a thuiscint, rud a éilíonn múnla a dhéanamh ar ábhar téacsach agus ar idirghníomhaíochtaí comhrá na n-úsáideoirí. Glacann cur chuige reatha cur chuige comhchoiteann aicmithe, rud a thugann neamhaird ar na gaolmhaireachtaí idir ábhair éagsúla díospóireachta. Sa saothar seo, molaimid féachaint ar an tasc seo mar fhadhb foghlama ionadaíochta, agus an téacs agus na húdair a leabú i gcomhpháirt bunaithe ar a n-idirghníomhaíochtaí. Déanaimid luacháil ar ár múnla thar an gCorpas Argóintí Idirlín, agus déanaimid comparáid idir cuir chuige éagsúla chun faisnéis struchtúrach a leabú. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha gur féidir lenár múnla torthaí i bhfad níos fearr a bhaint amach i gcomparáid le samhlacha iomaíocha roimhe seo.', 'hi': 'ऑनलाइन बहस मुद्दों की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला पर विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणों के बारे में मूल्यवान जानकारी प्रदान करने में मदद कर सकती है। हालांकि, इन बहसों में व्यक्त किए गए रुख को समझना एक अत्यधिक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है, जिसके लिए पाठ्य सामग्री और उपयोगकर्ताओं के संवादात्मक इंटरैक्शन दोनों को मॉडलिंग की आवश्यकता होती है। वर्तमान दृष्टिकोण एक सामूहिक वर्गीकरण दृष्टिकोण लेते हैं, जो विभिन्न बहस विषयों के बीच संबंधों को अनदेखा करता है। इस काम में, हम इस कार्य को एक प्रतिनिधित्व सीखने की समस्या के रूप में देखने का सुझाव देते हैं, और पाठ और लेखकों को उनकी बातचीत के आधार पर संयुक्त रूप से एम्बेड करते हैं। हम इंटरनेट तर्क कॉर्पस पर हमारे मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करते हैं, और संरचनात्मक जानकारी एम्बेडिंग के लिए विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणों की तुलना करते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल पिछले प्रतिस्पर्धी मॉडल की तुलना में काफी बेहतर परिणाम प्राप्त कर सकता है।', 'ka': 'ინტერნეტიური დიბუტები შეუძლიათ უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი ინფორმაცია განსხვავებული პერსპუტების შესახებ მნიშვნელოვანი განსხვავებული პრო მაგრამ ამ დიბატებში გამოსახულებული სტანციების გაგრძნობა ძალიან შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა, რომელიც მჭირდება ტექსტური შემდგომარები და გამოყენებელი კონტაქციო ინტერქ მიმდინარე შესაძლებლობები კოლექტიფიკაციის კოლექსიფიკაციის პროგრამის გამოყენება, რომელიც განსხვავებული debatური ტემების განმავლობაში იგნორიცია ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ მინდომ ამ სამუშაოს გადავადგინოთ როგორც განსწავლების პრობლემა, და ტექსტის და ავტორის ერთადერთად დავყენოთ ისინი ინტერქციაზე. ჩვენ ინტერნეტი არგუმენტების კორპოსზე ჩვენი მოდელის შესაბამისება და სტრუქტურული ინფორმაციის შესაბამისთვის განსხვავებული გადასწორება. ექსპერიმენტიური შედეგი ჩვენი მოდელის შესაძლებელია ძალიან უკეთესი შედეგი, როგორც წინა კონკენტებური მოდელისთვის შედგენა.', 'hu': 'Az online viták segíthetnek értékes információkat nyújtani a különböző kérdésekkel kapcsolatos perspektívákról. A vitákban kifejezett álláspontok megértése azonban rendkívül kihívást jelentő feladat, amely mind a szöveges tartalom, mind a felhasználók beszélgetési interakcióinak modellezését igényli. A jelenlegi megközelítések kollektív osztályozási megközelítést alkalmaznak, amely figyelmen kívül hagyja a különböző vitatémák közötti kapcsolatokat. Ebben a munkában javasoljuk, hogy ezt a feladatot reprezentációs tanulási problémának tekintsük, és közösen ágyazzuk be a szöveget és a szerzőket interakcióik alapján. Modellünket az Internet Argumentation Corpus segítségével értékeljük, és összehasonlítjuk a strukturális információk beágyazásának különböző megközelítéseit. Kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy modellünk jelentősen jobb eredményeket érhet el a korábbi versenyképes modellekhez képest.', 'el': 'Οι διαδικτυακές συζητήσεις μπορούν να βοηθήσουν στην παροχή πολύτιμων πληροφοριών σχετικά με διάφορες προοπτικές σε ένα ευρύ φάσμα θεμάτων. Ωστόσο, η κατανόηση των στάσεων που εκφράζονται σε αυτές τις συζητήσεις είναι ένα εξαιρετικά δύσκολο έργο, το οποίο απαιτεί τη μοντελοποίηση τόσο του κειμένου όσο και των αλληλεπιδράσεων των χρηστών. Οι τρέχουσες προσεγγίσεις ακολουθούν μια προσέγγιση συλλογικής ταξινόμησης, η οποία αγνοεί τις σχέσεις μεταξύ διαφορετικών θεμάτων συζήτησης. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε να δούμε αυτό το έργο ως ένα μαθησιακό πρόβλημα αναπαράστασης και να ενσωματώσουμε το κείμενο και τους συγγραφείς από κοινού με βάση τις αλληλεπιδράσεις τους. Αξιολογούμε το μοντέλο μας μέσω του Σώματος επιχειρηματολογίας Διαδικτύου και συγκρίνουμε διαφορετικές προσεγγίσεις για την ενσωμάτωση δομικών πληροφοριών. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας μπορεί να επιτύχει σημαντικά καλύτερα αποτελέσματα σε σύγκριση με προηγούμενα ανταγωνιστικά μοντέλα.', 'it': 'I dibattiti online possono aiutare a fornire informazioni preziose su varie prospettive su una vasta gamma di questioni. Tuttavia, comprendere le posizioni espresse in questi dibattiti è un compito altamente impegnativo, che richiede la modellazione sia dei contenuti testuali che delle interazioni conversazionali degli utenti. Gli approcci attuali adottano un approccio di classificazione collettiva, che ignora le relazioni tra i diversi argomenti di dibattito. In questo lavoro, suggeriamo di considerare questo compito come un problema di apprendimento di rappresentazione, e incorporare il testo e gli autori congiuntamente in base alle loro interazioni. Valutiamo il nostro modello attraverso Internet Argumentation Corpus e confrontiamo diversi approcci per incorporare informazioni strutturali. I risultati sperimentali dimostrano che il nostro modello può ottenere risultati significativamente migliori rispetto ai precedenti modelli competitivi.', 'mk': 'Онлајн дебатите можат да помогнат во обезбедувањето вредни информации за различни перспективи за голем број прашања. Сепак, разбирањето на ставовите изразени во овие дебати е многу предизвикувачка задача, која бара моделирање на текстуалната содржина и разговорите на корисниците. Сегашните пристапи прифаќаат колективен класификациски пристап, кој ги игнорира односите помеѓу различните теми на дебатата. Во оваа работа, предлагаме оваа задача да се смета за проблем со учењето на претставниците, и да се вклучи текстот и авторите заедно базирани на нивните интеракции. Го проценуваме нашиот модел преку Интернет Аргументација Корпус, и споредуваме различни пристапи за вклучување структурни информации. Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашиот модел може да постигне значително подобри резултати во споредба со претходните конкурентни модели.', 'kk': 'Онлайн дискуссиялар көптеген мәселелер туралы әртүрлі қараулар туралы мәлімет беруге көмектеседі. Бірақ бұл дискуссияларда көрсетілген жағдайларды түсіну - мәтіндік мазмұнын да, пайдаланушылардың сәйкес қатынасын да үлгілеу керек. Қолданыстағы жағдайлары бірнеше дискуссиялық тақырыптардың қатынасын елемейді. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, бұл тапсырманы біріктіру мәселесі ретінде көрсетуді және мәтін мен авторларды біріктіріп, олардың қатынастарына негізделгенін көрсетуді ұсынамыз. Интернет аргументациялық корпус арқылы моделімізді оқу және структуралық мәліметтерді ендіру үшін әртүрлі арқылы салыстырып көреміз. Эксперименталдық нәтижелері біздің моделіміздің алдыңғы конкурс үлгілерімен салыстырып, өте жақсы нәтижелерді жеткізе алады.', 'lt': 'Online diskusijos gali padėti teikti vertingą informaciją apie įvairias perspektyvas įvairiais klausimais. Tačiau šiose diskusijose išreikštos pozicijos supratimas yra labai sudėtinga užduotis, dėl kurios reikia modeliuoti tekstinį turinį ir naudotojų tarpusavio sąveiką. Dabartiniai metodai taikomi kolektyvinio klasifikavimo metodui, kuris ignoruoja skirtingų diskusijų temų santykius. Šiame darbe siūlome šią užduotį vertinti kaip atstovavimo mokymosi problem ą ir kartu įtraukti tekstą ir autorius, grindžiamus jų sąveika. Vertiname savo model į interneto argumentavimo korpuse ir palyginame įvairius struktūrinės informacijos įtraukimo metodus. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis gali pasiekti gerokai geresnių rezultatų, palyginti su ankstesniais konkurenciniais modeliais.', 'ml': 'വ്യത്യസ്തമായ വിഷയങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള വിവിധ വിവരങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിലപിടിച്ചുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d വിവ എന്നാലും ഈ വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d പ്രസ്താവിക്കുന്ന സ്ഥിതികള്\u200d മനസ്സിലാക്കുന്നത് വളരെ വിലപിടിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ജോലിയാണ്. അതിന്റെ ടെക്സ്ക ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ അടുത്തുള്ള അടുത്തുണ്ടാക്കുന്നത് വ്യത്യസ്ത വിവരങ്ങളുടെ തമ്മിലുള്ള ബന്ധം അവഗണിക്കുന്നു. ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, ഈ ജോലിയെ പഠിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിയായ പ്രശ്നമായി കാണാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ആലോചിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നെ ടെക്സ്റ ഇന്റര്\u200dനെറ്റ് അര്\u200dഗ്മെന്റേഷന്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്സിനെക്കുറിച്ച് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുകയും, സ്ഥാനിക വി പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിച്ചു കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d മുന്\u200dപ് മത്സരിക്കുന്ന മോഡലുകള്\u200dക്ക് താല്\u200dപ്പര്', 'mt': 'Id-dibattiti onlajn jistgħu jgħinu jipprovdu informazzjoni siewja dwar diversi perspettivi dwar firxa wiesgħa ta’ kwistjonijiet. Madankollu, il-fehim tal-pożizzjonijiet espressi f’dawn id-dibattiti huwa kompitu ta’ sfida kbira, li jeħtieġ l-immudellar kemm tal-kontenut testwali kif ukoll tal-interazzjonijiet ta’ konverżjoni tal-utenti. L-approċċi attwali jieħdu approċċ ta’ klassifikazzjoni kollettiva, li jinjora r-relazzjonijiet bejn suġġetti differenti ta’ dibattitu. F’dan ix-xogħol, nissuġġerixxu li nqisu dan il-kompitu bħala problem a ta’ rappreżentazzjoni tat-tagħlim, u ninkorporaw it-test u l-awturi b’mod konġunt ibbażati fuq l-interazzjonijiet tagħhom. Aħna jevalwaw il-mudell tagħna permezz tal-Internet Argumentation Corpus, u nqabblu approċċi differenti għall-inkorporazzjoni tal-informazzjoni strutturali. Ir-riżultati esperimentali juru li l-mudell tagħna jista’ jikseb riżultati aħjar b’mod sinifikanti meta mqabbel ma’ mudelli kompetittivi preċedenti.', 'ms': 'Online debates can help provide valuable information about various perspectives on a wide range of issues.  Namun, memahami pendapat yang diungkapkan dalam perdebatan ini adalah tugas yang sangat mencabar, yang memerlukan pemodelan kandungan teks dan interaksi perbualan pengguna. pendekatan semasa mengambil pendekatan klasifikasi kolektif, yang mengabaikan hubungan antara topik debat yang berbeza. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan untuk melihat tugas ini sebagai masalah pembelajaran mewakili, dan memasukkan teks dan penulis bersama-sama berdasarkan interaksi mereka. Kami menilai model kami melalui Internet Argumentation Corpus, dan membandingkan pendekatan yang berbeza untuk penyambungan maklumat struktur. Keputusan percubaan menunjukkan bahawa model kita boleh mencapai keputusan yang jauh lebih baik dibandingkan dengan model kompetitif sebelumnya.', 'mn': 'Онлайн талаар ярилцлага олон асуудлын талаар олон ойлголтын тухай үнэ цэнэтэй мэдээлэл өгөх боломжтой. Гэхдээ эдгээр ярилцлаганд илэрхийлж байгаа нөхцөл байдлыг ойлгох нь маш хэцүү ажил юм. Энэ нь текст бүтээгдэхүүн болон хэрэглэгчдийн ярилцлагын харилцаа хоёуланг загварчлах хэрэгтэй. Одоогийн арга баримтууд нийгмийн хэлэлцээний арга хэрэгтэй. Энэ нь өөр хэлэлцээний сэдэв хоорондын харилцааныг үгүйсгэдэг. Энэ ажил дээр бид үүнийг суралцах бодлого гэж үзэх, текст болон зохиолчдыг хамтран харилцааны үндсэн харилцааны төлөө оруулахыг сануулдаг. Бид Интернет аргументацийн корпус дээр загварын загварыг үнэлэх, бүтэц мэдээллийн нэгтгэх өөр арга загварыг харьцуулж байна. Эмчилгээний үр дүнд бидний загвар өмнөх өрсөлдөөний загвартай харьцуулахад илүү сайн үр дүнг гаргаж чадна.', 'no': 'Internettdebatar kan hjelpa til å gjera verdileg informasjon om ulike perspektiv på eit stor rekke av problemar. Men å forstå stasjonen uttrykket i desse debatane er ein veldig vanskeleg oppgåve, som krev å modellere både tekstinnhaldet og samtalesambandet til brukarar. Nåværende tilnærmingar tar ein kolektiv klassifikasjonsklasseringstilnærming, som ignorerer forholdet mellom ulike debattemne. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi å sjå denne oppgåva som eit problem med læring av representasjon, og innbøyra teksten og utviklarane samsvart basert på interaksjonen sine. Vi evaluerer modellen vårt over Internettargumenteringskorpus, og samanliknar ulike tilnærmingar for strukturinformasjon innebygging. Eksperimentale resultat viser at modellen vårt kan nå betydelig bedre resultat sammenlignet med førre konkurentære modeller.', 'pl': 'Debaty online mogą pomóc dostarczyć cennych informacji na temat różnych perspektyw na szeroki zakres zagadnień. Zrozumienie stanowisk wyrażonych w tych debatach jest jednak bardzo wyzwaniem, które wymaga modelowania zarówno treści tekstowych, jak i interakcji konwersacyjnych użytkowników. Obecne podejścia przyjmują podejście do klasyfikacji zbiorowej, które ignoruje relacje między różnymi tematami debaty. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy postrzeganie tego zadania jako problemu uczenia się reprezentacji i wspólne osadzenie tekstu i autorów w oparciu o ich interakcje. Oceniamy nasz model przez Internet Argumentation Corpus i porównujemy różne podejścia do osadzania informacji strukturalnych. Wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że nasz model może osiągnąć znacznie lepsze wyniki w porównaniu do poprzednich modeli konkurencyjnych.', 'ro': 'Dezbaterile online pot contribui la furnizarea de informații valoroase despre diferite perspective pe o gamă largă de probleme. Cu toate acestea, înțelegerea pozițiilor exprimate în aceste dezbateri este o sarcină extrem de provocatoare, care necesită modelarea atât a conținutului textual, cât și a interacțiunilor conversaționale ale utilizatorilor. Abordările actuale adoptă o abordare de clasificare colectivă, care ignoră relațiile dintre diferitele subiecte de dezbatere. În această lucrare, vă sugerăm să vedeți această sarcină ca o problemă de învățare reprezentativă și să încorporați textul și autorii împreună pe baza interacțiunilor lor. Evaluăm modelul nostru prin Internet Argumentation Corpus și comparăm diferite abordări pentru încorporarea informațiilor structurale. Rezultatele experimentale arată că modelul nostru poate obține rezultate semnificativ mai bune comparativ cu modelele competitive anterioare.', 'sr': 'Onlineske debate mogu pomoći da pruže vrijedne informacije o raznim perspektivama o širokom nizu pitanja. Međutim, razumevanje stavova izraženih u ovim debatima je veoma izazovan zadatak, koji zahteva modelizaciju tekstualnog sadržaja i razgovornih interakcija korisnika. Trenutni pristupi uzimaju kolektivni pristup klasifikacije, koji ignorira odnose između različitih tema debata. U ovom poslu predlažemo da ovaj zadatak smatramo problemom predstavljanja učenja i uključimo tekst i autore zajedno na temelju njihovih interakcija. Procjenjujemo naš model preko Internetskog Argumentacijskog korpusa i uspoređujemo različite pristupe za integraciju strukturnih informacija. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model može postići značajno bolje rezultate u usporedbi sa prethodnim konkurentnim modelima.', 'si': 'ඇන්ලයින් කතා කරන්න පුළුවන් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන විවිධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන විශේෂ තොරතු නමුත්, මේ වාර්තාවේ ප්\u200dරකාශ කරපු ස්ථානය තේරුම් ගන්න බොහොම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම පාළුවන් සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජකය ප්\u200dරස්තූත විදියට සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විදියට අවස්ථාවක් ගන්නවා, ඒකෙන් වෙනස් විදියට විදියට විදි මේ වැඩේ අපි මේ වැඩේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට බලන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන අපි අන්තර්ජාලයේ වාර්තාව කොර්පුස් වල අපේ මොඩල් විශ්වාස කරනවා, සහ වෙනස් අනුවිධාන තොරතුරු ඇතුළට සම පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ මොඩල් එක්ක ගොඩක් හොඳ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර ව', 'so': "debaashooyinka internetka waxaad ka caawin kartaa macluumaad qiimaan ah oo ku saabsan aragtida kala duduwan ee su'aalo kala duduwan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee, garashada xaaladaha debankaas lagu muujiyey waa shaqa aad u adag, kaas oo u baahan yahay tusaale-sameynta waxyaabaha qoraalka ah iyo xiriirka hadalka isticmaalayaasha. Dhaqdhaqaaqyada joogtada ah waxay qaadataa qaabilaad iskuul u kala duduwan, taas oo ka jeeda xiriirka ka dhexeeya mada debada kala duduwan. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaan ka jeedaynaa in shaqadaas loo arago dhibaato ku saabsan waxbarashada, waxaana ku soo bandhigaynaa qoraalka iyo qoraalka, si wada jir ah oo ku saleysan xiriirkooda. Tusaalkayaga waxaynu qiimeynaynaa korrupada heshiiska Internetka, waxaynu isbarbardhignaa qaabab kala duduwan oo macluumaadka dhismaha ku jira. Imtixaanka waxaa muuqda in modellkayagu uu gaadhi karo matooyin aad u wanaagsan oo la barbardhigi karo tusaalooyin hore oo iskhilaafsan.", 'ta': 'இணைய விவாதத்தில் பலவிதமான பிரச்னைகள் பற்றிய மதிப்புரிய தகவல் வழங்கலாம். எனினும், இந்த விவாதத்தில் கூறிய நிலைகளை புரிந்து கொள்ளும் என்பது ஒரு மிகவும் சவாலிக்கும் செயலாகும், இது உரை உள்ளடக்கத்தையும தற்போதைய நெருங்குகள் ஒரு தொகுதி வகுப்பு முறையை எடுத்து, அது வேறு விவாதமான விவாதம் தலைப்புகளுக்கிடையில்  இந்த வேலையில், நாம் இந்த பணியை ஒரு பிரதிநிதியாக கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் பிரச்சனையாக பார்க்க பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், மற்றும நாங்கள் இணையத்தின் அறிவிப்பு கார்புஸ் மீது எங்கள் மாதிரியை மதிப்பிடுகிறோம், மற்றும் அமைப்பு தகவல் உள்ளடக்கிய வே முயற்சி முடிவுகள் காட்டுகிறது முந்தைய வழக்கும் மாதிரிகளுக்கு ஒப்பிடும் முறையான முறையில் எங்கள் மாத', 'sv': 'Onlinedebatter kan bidra till värdefull information om olika perspektiv på en rad olika frågor. Att förstå de ståndpunkter som uttrycks i dessa debatter är dock en mycket utmanande uppgift, vilket kräver att modellera både textinnehåll och användarnas konversationsinsatser. Nuvarande tillvägagångssätt använder sig av en kollektiv klassificering, som bortser från sambanden mellan olika debattämnen. I detta arbete föreslår vi att se denna uppgift som ett representationsinlärningsproblem, och bädda in texten och författarna gemensamt baserat på deras interaktioner. Vi utvärderar vår modell över Internet Argumentation Corpus och jämför olika tillvägagångssätt för integrering av strukturell information. Experimentella resultat visar att vår modell kan uppnå betydligt bättre resultat jämfört med tidigare konkurrenskraftiga modeller.', 'ur': "آنلاین کی بحث بہت سی مسائل کے بارے میں بہت سی نظریوں کے بارے میں ارزش دار معلومات کی مدد کر سکتے ہیں. لیکن یہ بحث میں ظاہر ہونے کی موقعیت سمجھنے کی ضرورت ہے ایک بہت اچانک کام ہے جس کی مدل کی ضرورت ہے both textual content and user's conversational interactions. موجود طریقے ایک جمع طریقہ طریقہ لیتے ہیں جو مختلف بحث موضوع کے درمیان رابطہ کو نادانی کرتی ہے. اس کام میں ہم نے اس کام کو ایک نمایش کی تعلیم مسئلہ کے طور پر دیکھنے کی توفیق دیتے ہیں اور ان کے ارتباط پر متن اور لکھنے والوں کو ایک ساتھ جمع کر دیتے ہیں. ہم انٹرنیٹ آرگومنٹ کرپوس کے ذریعے ہماری مدل کا ارزش کرتے ہیں اور ساخترکی معلومات میں مختلف طریقے کے مطابق مقایسہ کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہمارا موڈل اگلے مسابقات موڈل کے مقابلہ میں بہتر نتیجے پہنچ سکتا ہے۔", 'uz': "Name Lekin, bu debatlardagi holatlarni tushunish juda qiziqarli vazifa, bu tugmalar tarkibini va foydalanuvchilar bilan muloqat interfektlarini modellash kerak. Joriy murojaat mavzulari орасида bogʻlamalarni eʼtibor beradi. Bu ishda, biz bu vazifani o'rganish muammolari sifatida ko'rinishimiz talab qilamiz, va matn va mualliflarni ularning interfektlari asosida birlashtirish mumkin. Biz Internetning Argumentation Corpusi modelimizni qiymatimiz, va tuzilishining turli maʼlumot uchun boshqa usullarini kamaytirish. Tajriba natijalari esa modelmiz oldingi kompetitiv modellarga kamaytirish juda yaxshi natijalarni topishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chương trình trực tuyến có thể cung cấp thông tin đáng giá về những quan điểm khác nhau về một loạt các vấn đề. Tuy nhiên, hiểu được những ý kiến được đưa ra trong cuộc tranh luận này là một nhiệm vụ rất khó khăn, cần thiết thiết phải mô tả nội dung kết cấu và quan hệ đối thoại của người dùng. Các phương pháp hiện tại chọn một phương pháp phân loại chung, lờ đi quan hệ giữa các chủ đề tranh luận khác nhau. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề nghị xem nhiệm vụ này như một vấn đề học về đại diện, và tác giả được kết hợp văn bản và tác giả dựa trên tương tác của họ. Chúng tôi đánh giá mô hình trên Tập Đoàn nghiên cứu Mạng, và so sánh các phương pháp khác nhau về việc nhúng thông tin cấu trúc. Kết quả thí nghiệm cho thấy mẫu của chúng ta có thể đạt kết quả tốt hơn nhiều so với các mô hình cạnh tranh trước.', 'bg': 'Онлайн дебатите могат да помогнат за предоставянето на ценна информация за различни перспективи по широк спектър от въпроси. Разбирането на позициите, изразени в тези дебати, обаче е изключително предизвикателна задача, която изисква моделиране както на текстово съдържание, така и на разговорните взаимодействия на потребителите. Настоящите подходи възприемат колективен подход за класификация, който пренебрегва връзките между различните теми на дебата. В тази работа предлагаме тази задача да се разглежда като проблем за представяне на обучението и да се вгради текста и авторите съвместно въз основа на техните взаимодействия. Ние оценяваме нашия модел чрез Интернет Аргументаtion Corpus и сравняваме различни подходи за вграждане на структурна информация. Експерименталните резултати показват, че нашият модел може да постигне значително по-добри резултати в сравнение с предишните конкурентни модели.', 'nl': 'Online debatten kunnen waardevolle informatie verschaffen over verschillende perspectieven op een breed scala van onderwerpen. Het begrijpen van de standpunten die in deze debatten tot uitdrukking komen, is echter een zeer uitdagende taak, waarvoor zowel tekstuele inhoud als conversatie interacties van gebruikers moeten worden gemodelleerd. De huidige benaderingen hanteren een collectieve classificatiebenadering, waarbij de relaties tussen verschillende discussieonderwerpen worden genegeerd. In dit werk stellen we voor om deze taak te zien als een representatie learning probleem, en de tekst en auteurs gezamenlijk te integreren op basis van hun interacties. We evalueren ons model via het Internet Argumentation Corpus en vergelijken verschillende benaderingen voor structurele informatie embedding. Experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat ons model aanzienlijk betere resultaten kan behalen ten opzichte van eerdere concurrerende modellen.', 'da': 'Online debatter kan hjælpe med at give værdifuld information om forskellige perspektiver på en lang række spørgsmål. Men at forstå holdningerne udtrykt i disse debatter er en yderst udfordrende opgave, som kræver modellering af både tekstindhold og brugernes samtaler. De nuværende tilgange anvender en kollektiv klassifikationsmetode, som ignorerer forholdet mellem forskellige debattemner. I dette arbejde foreslår vi at se denne opgave som et repræsentationslæringsproblem og integrere teksten og forfatterne i fællesskab baseret på deres interaktioner. Vi evaluerer vores model over Internet Argumentation Corpus og sammenligner forskellige tilgange til integrering af strukturel information. Eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores model kan opnå betydeligt bedre resultater sammenlignet med tidligere konkurrencedygtige modeller.', 'hr': 'Online rasprave mogu pomoći pružiti vrijedne informacije o različitim perspektivama o širokom nizu pitanja. Međutim, razumijevanje stavova izraženih u ovim debatima je vrlo izazovan zadatak koji zahtijeva modelizaciju tekstualnog sadržaja i razgovornih interakcija korisnika. Trenutni pristupi uzimaju kolektivni pristup klasifikacije, koji ignorira odnose između različitih tema debata. U ovom poslu predlažemo da ovaj zadatak smatramo problemom predstavljanja učenja i uključimo tekst i autore zajedno na temelju njihovih interakcija. Procjenjujemo naš model preko Internetskog argumentacijskog korpusa i uspoređujemo različite pristupe za integraciju strukturnih informacija. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model može postići značajno bolje rezultate u usporedbi s prethodnim konkurentnim modelima.', 'de': 'Online-Debatten können wertvolle Informationen über verschiedene Perspektiven auf ein breites Spektrum von Themen liefern. Das Verständnis der Positionen, die in diesen Debatten zum Ausdruck gebracht werden, ist jedoch eine sehr anspruchsvolle Aufgabe, die es erfordert, sowohl textuelle Inhalte als auch die Konversationsinteraktionen der Nutzer zu modellieren. Aktuelle Ansätze verfolgen einen kollektiven Klassifizierungsansatz, der die Zusammenhänge zwischen verschiedenen Diskussionsthemen ignoriert. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir vor, diese Aufgabe als Repräsentationslernproblem zu betrachten und Text und Autoren basierend auf ihren Interaktionen gemeinsam einzubetten. Wir evaluieren unser Modell über das Internet Argumentation Corpus und vergleichen verschiedene Ansätze zur strukturellen Informationseinbettung. Experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unser Modell im Vergleich zu früheren Wettbewerbsmodellen deutlich bessere Ergebnisse erzielen kann.', 'id': 'Debat online dapat membantu menyediakan informasi yang berharga tentang berbagai perspektif pada berbagai masalah. Namun, memahami posisi yang diungkapkan dalam debat ini adalah tugas yang sangat menantang, yang membutuhkan model konten teks dan interaksi konversasi pengguna. Pendekatan saat ini mengambil pendekatan klasifikasi kolektif, yang mengabaikan hubungan antara topik debat yang berbeda. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami menyarankan untuk melihat tugas ini sebagai masalah pembelajaran representation, dan memasukkan teks dan penulis bersama berdasarkan interaksi mereka. Kami mengevaluasi model kami melalui Internet Argumentation Corpus, dan membandingkan pendekatan yang berbeda untuk penerbangan informasi struktural. Hasil eksperimen menunjukkan bahwa model kita dapat mencapai hasil yang jauh lebih baik dibandingkan dengan model kompetitif sebelumnya.', 'ko': '온라인 토론은 광범위한 문제에 대한 다양한 관점에 대한 귀중한 정보를 제공하는 데 도움이 된다.그러나 이러한 변론에서 표현된 입장을 이해하는 것은 매우 도전적인 임무로 텍스트 내용과 사용자의 대화 상호작용을 모델링해야 한다.현재의 방법은 집단 분류법을 채택하여 서로 다른 변론 주제 간의 관계를 소홀히 했다.이 작업에서, 우리는 이 임무를 표징 학습 문제로 간주하고, 텍스트와 작가 간의 상호작용에 따라 이를 공동으로 삽입할 것을 건의합니다.우리는 인터넷 변론 자료 라이브러리에서 우리의 모델을 평가하고 서로 다른 구조 정보 삽입 방법을 비교했다.실험 결과는 이전의 경쟁 모델에 비해 우리 모델이 더 좋은 결과를 얻을 수 있음을 나타냈다.', 'sw': 'Mjadala wa mtandaoni unaweza kusaidia kutoa taarifa za thamani kuhusu mitazamo mbalimbali kuhusu masuala mengi. Hata hivyo, kuelewa mtazamo uliotolewa katika mjadala huu ni jukumu la changamoto kubwa, ambalo linahitaji kuonyesha maudhui ya msingi na mazungumzo ya watumiaji. Matokeo ya sasa yanachukua mbinu za usambazaji wa pamoja, ambayo hupuuza uhusiano kati ya mada tofauti za mjadala. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza kuona kazi hii kama uwakilishi wa tatizo la kujifunza, na kuingiza ujumbe wa maandishi na waandishi pamoja kwa kutumia mahusiano yao. Tunatathmini mfano wetu juu ya Shirika la Ujadala wa Intaneti, na kulinganisha mbinu tofauti za taarifa za ujenzi. Matokeo ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mtindo wetu unaweza kupata matokeo bora zaidi kuliko mifano ya zamani ya ushindani.', 'tr': '횉altylyk debatlar 체첵tge힊ik meseleler barada ynamly maglumatlar berip biler. 횦철ne bu debatlarda g철r체n첵채n durumlary d체힊체nmek 철r채n kyn챌ylyk uzmanydyr. Bu hem tekst mazmunlaryny흫 hem ullan챌ylary흫 urumsalyklaryny흫 철r채n 챌ykmasyny gerek. H채zirki gola첵lar jemgy첵etli klasifikasy흫 tassyklamasyny al첵ar, bu da farkl캇 debatlar temalaryny흫 bagla힊yny g철rmezden 챌yk첵ar. Bu i힊de biz bu zady 철wrenmek 체챌in temsil etmek we metin we awtorlary bir aralygyna da첵arlamak maslahat ber첵채ris. Bizim modelimizi internet Argumentasy Kop체s체 체zerinde de흫lendirip, d체zg체n 힊ekilde d체zg체n hereketlerimizi kar힊캇la힊t캇r캇p, Ara힊dyrylyk netijelerimiz nusgymyzy흫 철흫ki d철wlet nusgalaryna g철r채 has gowy netijelerimizi 첵etip biljekdigini g철rkez첵채r.', 'fa': 'بحث\u200cهای آنلاین می\u200cتوانند اطلاعات ارزشمند را در مورد نظر\u200cهای مختلف در مجموعه\u200cی مشکلات فراوان بدهند. با این حال، فهمیدن وضعیت\u200cهایی که در این بحث\u200cها توضیح داده می\u200cشود یک کار بسیار سخت\u200cکننده است که نیاز دارد مدل\u200cسازی محتوای متن و مصاحبه\u200cهای مصاحبه\u200cی کاربران باشد. دسترسی فعلی یک دسترسی محرمانه جمع می\u200cگیرد که رابطه\u200cهای بین موضوع بحث متفاوت را نادیده می\u200cدهد. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می کنیم که این کار را به عنوان یک مشکل یادگیری نمایش کنیم و متن و نویسندگان را به همراه بر روی تعاملات آنها بنویسیم. ما مدل خود را بر روی کورپوس آرژوماتیک اینترنت ارزیابی می کنیم و از طریق های مختلف برای اطلاعات ساختار مقایسه می کنیم. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهد که مدل ما می\u200cتواند نتیجه\u200cهای خیلی بهتر را در مقایسه با مدل\u200cهای مسابقه\u200cی قبلی به دست آورد.', 'af': "Online ële debate kan help verskaf waarde inligting oor verskillende perspeksies op 'n groot reek van probleme. Maar verstaan die standighede wat in hierdie debate uitgevoer is, is 'n baie pragtige taak, wat vereis om te modelleer beide tekstuurlike inhoud en gebruikers se gesprekslyke interaksies. Huidige toegangs neem 'n kolektiewe klasifikasie toegang, wat ignoreer die verwantings tussen verskillende debatte onderwerpe. In hierdie werk stel ons voorstel om hierdie taak as 'n voorstelling leer probleem te sien en die teks en outeurs bymekaar te inbêer op hul interaksies. Ons evalueer ons model oor die Internet Argumentasie Korpus en vergelyk verskillende toegang vir strukturele inligting in. Eksperimentale resultate wys dat ons model beter resultate kan bereik, vergelyk met vorige mededingsmodele.", 'sq': 'Debatet online mund të ndihmojnë të ofrojnë informacion të vlefshëm rreth perspektivave të ndryshme mbi një gamë të gjerë çështjesh. Megjithatë, kuptimi i qëndrimeve të shprehura në këto debate është një detyrë shumë sfiduese, e cila kërkon modelimin si të përmbajtjes tekstuale ashtu dhe të ndërveprimeve bisedimore të përdoruesve. Përqasjet aktuale marrin një qasje klasifikimi kolektiv, e cila injoron marrëdhëniet midis temëve të ndryshme të debatit. Në këtë punë, ne sugjerojmë të shohim këtë detyrë si një problem përfaqësimi mësimi, dhe të përfshijmë tekstin dhe autorët së bashku bazuar në ndërveprimet e tyre. Ne vlerësojmë modelin tonë nëpërmjet Internetit Argumentation Corpus, dhe krahasojmë metoda të ndryshme për përfshirjen e informacionit strukturor. Rezultatet eksperimentale tregojnë se modeli ynë mund të arrijë rezultate më të mira ndjeshëm krahasuar me modelet e mëparshëm konkurruese.', 'am': 'የኢንተርኔት ውይይቶች በተለያዩ ጉዳዮች ላይ የተዋበ መረጃዎችን ማግኘት ይችላል፡፡ ነገር ግን በዚህ ውይይቶች ውስጥ የተደረገውን ግንኙነት ለማስተዋል የጽሑፍ ውይይት እና የተጠቃሚ ግንኙነት ማሳየት የሚያስፈልገው ትክክለኛ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ የአሁኑ ግንኙነት በተለያዩ ውይይቶች መካከል ግንኙነትን ይሸሻል፡፡ በዚህ ስራ፣ ይህንን ስራ ትምህርት መግለጫ መሆኑን እና የጽሑፉን እና ጸሐፊዎቹን በተጠቃሚ ግንኙነታቸውን በመጠቀም እናስባለን፡፡ We evaluate our model over the Internet Argumentation Corpus, and compare different approaches for structural information embedding.  ፈተና ፍሬዎች ሞዴሌዎቻችን ከቀድሞው ተቃዋሚዎች ጋር በሚያሳየው ትልቅ ፍሬዎችን እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'az': 'İnternet müzakirələri müxtəlif məsələlər barəsində müxtəlif perspektivlər haqqında qiymətli məlumatlar təmin edə bilər. Ancaq bu müzakirlərdə ifadə edilən durumları anlamaq çox çətin bir iş idi, ki, textual məlumatları və istifadəçilərin müzakirələrini modelləşdirmək lazımdır. Hazırkı tərzlər kolektiv klasifikasiya tərzini alır, bu da müxtəlif müzakirə məsələləri arasındakı ilişkiləri görməz. Bu işdə, biz bu işi öyrənmək problemi kimi görünməyi və məktubu və yazarları birlikdə onların əlaqələrinə dayanan bir yerə yerləşdirməyi tavsiye edirik. İnternet Argumentasyonu Korpusu ilə modellərimizi değerləşdiririk və strukturlu məlumatlar içərisində müxtəlif yollarla karşılaşdırırıq. Müvəffəqiyyət sonuçları göstərir ki, modellərimiz əvvəlki müəllif modellərlə qarşılaşdığı ən yaxşı sonuçları artırabilir.', 'bn': 'Online debates can help provide valuable information about various perspectives on a wide range of issues.  তবে এই বিতর্কে প্রকাশিত অবস্থাগুলো বুঝতে পারে যে বিষয়টি অত্যন্ত চ্যালেঞ্জিক কাজ, যা টেক্সুয়াল বিষয়বস্তু এবং ব্যবহারকারীদের বর্তমান প্রতিক্রিয়া একটি সম্মিলিত বিভিন্ন বিতর্কের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক উপেক্ষা করে। এই কাজে আমরা এই কাজের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা নিয়ে প্রতিনিধিত্বের সমস্যা হিসেবে দেখার পরামর্শ দিচ্ছি এবং লেখকদের তাদের কা আমরা ইন্টারনেট আর্গুমেন্টেশন কোর্পাসের উপর আমাদের মডেল মূল্য দিচ্ছি এবং কাঠামোর তথ্য বিভিন্ন উপায়ের তুলনা করি। পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের মডেল পূর্ববর্তী প্রতিযোগিতার মডেলের তুলনায় ভালো ফলাফল অর্জন করতে পারে।', 'bs': 'Onlineske rasprave mogu pomoći pružiti vrijedne informacije o raznim perspektivama o širokom nizu pitanja. Međutim, razumijevanje stavova izraženih u tim debatima je veoma izazovan zadatak, koji zahtijeva modelizaciju tekstualnog sadržaja i razgovornih interakcija korisnika. Trenutni pristupi uzimaju kolektivni pristup klasifikacije, koji ignorira odnose između različitih tema debata. U ovom poslu predlažemo da ovaj zadatak smatramo problemom predstavljanja učenja i uključimo tekst i autore zajedno na temelju njihovih interakcija. Procjenjujemo naš model preko Internetskog Argumentacijskog korpusa i uspoređujemo različite pristupe za integraciju strukturnih informacija. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naš model može postići značajno bolje rezultate u usporedbi sa prethodnim konkurentnim modelima.', 'ca': "Els debats en línia poden ajudar a proporcionar informació valiosa sobre diverses perspectives sobre una gran varietat de temes. Però entendre les posicions expresses en aquests debats és una tasca molt difícil, que requereix modelar tant el contingut textual com les interaccions conversacionals dels usuaris. Els enfocaments actuals adopten un enfocament de classificació col·lectiva, que ignora les relacions entre diferents temes de debat. En aquesta feina, suggerem veure aquesta tasca com un problem a d'aprenentatge de representació, i incorporar el text i els autors junts basats en les seves interaccions. Evaluam el nostre model a través del Corps d'Argumentació d'Internet, i comparem diferents enfocaments d'incorporació d'informació estructural. Els resultats experimentals mostren que el nostre model pot aconseguir resultats significativament millors comparats amb models competitius anteriors.", 'cs': 'Online debaty mohou pomoci poskytnout cenné informace o různých pohledech na širokou škálu otázek. Porozumění postojům vyjádřeným v těchto debatách je však velmi náročným úkolem, který vyžaduje modelování textového obsahu i konverzačních interakcí uživatelů. Současné přístupy používají přístup kolektivní klasifikace, který ignoruje vztahy mezi různými diskusními tématy. V této práci navrhujeme vnímat tento úkol jako problém reprezentace učení a vložit text a autory společně na základě jejich interakcí. Vyhodnocujeme náš model pomocí internetového argumentačního korpusu a porovnáváme různé přístupy pro vložení strukturálních informací. Experimentální výsledky ukazují, že náš model může dosáhnout výrazně lepších výsledků ve srovnání s předchozími konkurenčními modely.', 'et': 'Veebiarutelud võivad aidata anda väärtuslikku teavet erinevate perspektiivide kohta paljudes küsimustes. Ent aruteludes väljendatud seisukohtade mõistmine on väga keeruline ülesanne, mis nõuab nii tekstisisu kui ka kasutajate vestlussuhtluse modelleerimist. Praegused lähenemisviisid kasutavad kollektiivset klassifitseerimist, mis ignoreerib erinevate aruteluteemade vahelisi seoseid. Käesolevas töös soovitame vaadata seda ülesannet kui representatsiooniõppe probleemi ning integreerida teksti ja autorid ühiselt nende koostoimete põhjal. Hindame oma mudelit Interneti Argumentatsioonikorpuse kaudu ja võrdleme erinevaid lähenemisviise struktuuriinfo manustamiseks. Eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel suudab saavutada oluliselt paremaid tulemusi võrreldes varasemate konkurentsivõimeliste mudelitega.', 'fi': 'Verkkokeskustelut voivat auttaa tarjoamaan arvokasta tietoa erilaisista näkökulmista monenlaisiin kysymyksiin. Keskusteluissa esitettyjen kantojen ymmärtäminen on kuitenkin erittäin haastava tehtävä, joka vaatii sekä tekstisisällön että käyttäjien keskusteluvuorovaikutuksen mallintamista. Nykyisissä lähestymistavoissa käytetään kollektiivista luokittelua, joka jättää huomiotta eri keskusteluaiheiden väliset suhteet. Tässä työssä ehdotamme, että tämä tehtävä nähdään esitysoppimisen ongelmana ja että teksti ja tekijät upotetaan yhdessä vuorovaikutuksen perusteella. Arvioimme malliamme Internet Argumentation Corpuksen kautta ja vertaamme erilaisia lähestymistapoja rakennetiedon upottamiseen. Kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että mallimme voi saavuttaa huomattavasti parempia tuloksia verrattuna aikaisempiin kilpailumalleihin.', 'hy': 'Օնլայն քննարկումները կարող են օգնել տրամադրել արժեքավոր տեղեկատվություն տարբեր տեսանկյունների մասին տարբեր հարցերի վերաբերյալ: Այնուամենայնիվ, այս քննարկումների ընթացքում արտահայտված դիրքերի հասկանալը շատ դժվար խնդիր է, որը պահանջում է մոդելներ կազմել, ինչպես տեքստային պարունակությունը, ինչպես նաև օգտագործողների հաղորդակցման շփումները: Այսօրվա մոտեցումները ընդունում են հավաքական դասակարգման մոտեցում, որը անտեսում է տարբեր քննարկության թեմաների միջև եղած հարաբերությունները: Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք, որ այս խնդիրը դիտարկենք որպես ներկայացման ուսուցման խնդիր, և միասին ներառենք տեքստը և հեղինակները, հիմնված իրենց փոխազդեցության վրա: Մենք գնահատում ենք մեր մոդելը ինտերնետի բանավեճման կորպոսի միջոցով և համեմատում ենք տարբեր մոտեցումներ կառուցվածքային ինֆորմացիայի ներգրավման համար: Փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը կարող է ունենալ ավելի լավ արդյունքներ, համեմատած նախորդ մրցակցության մոդելների հետ:', 'jv': 'online Nanging, nggunakake langkung sampeyan wigatinipun dumalapun dumalapun dumalapun iki, akeh kudu nggawe kudu modalapun kudu nggawe barang teks karo perusahaan langgar sampeyan wigatinipun. Awak nggawe sistem sing dibutuhke kategori sing nggawe Nang gunggo iki, kita suggersul nggawe nggawe task iki dadi repréntasi perbudhakan kanggo kelas supoyo ciliane, lan uga nggunakake seng lan autor lan tambah sing basa nang interaksi iki. Kernel Perintah sing paling dhéwé kuwi model sing bisa ngomong gawe akeh njaluk luwih apik karo model sing sampek sing luwih dumadhi.', 'he': 'דיונים באינטרנט יכולים לעזור לספק מידע ערך על נקודות מבט שונות על מגוון רחב של נושאים. עם זאת, ההבנה של עמדות המבוטאות בדיונים האלה היא משימה מאתגרת מאוד, שדורשת דוגמניות גם לתוכן טקסטלי וגם אינטראקציות השיחה של המשתמשים. הגישות הנוכחיות לוקחות גישה קליפורנית קולקטיבית, שמתעלמת מהמערכות היחסים בין נושאי דיון שונים. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים לראות את המשימה הזאת כבעיית לימוד מייצגת, ולקבל את הטקסט והסופרים ביחד מבוססים על אינטראקציות שלהם. אנו מעריכים את הדוגמא שלנו על ידי קורפוס האינטרנט Argumentation Corpus, ולהשוות גישות שונות לתכנית מידע מבנה. תוצאות ניסויים מראות שהדוגמא שלנו יכולה להשיג תוצאות טובות יותר משמעותיות בהשוואה לדוגמאות תחרותיות קודמות.', 'ha': "QNetworkAccessFileBackend A lokacin da aka fahimta misãlai da aka bayyana cikin wannan jãyayai, yana da wani abu mai girma, wanda yana buƙata misalin ayuka na littafin rubutu da masu haɗi da masu amfani da shi. Yin hanyoyin yanzu, za'a karɓi wata matsayi mai rarraba jama'a, wanda yana ƙyale da mazaɓa tsakanin maɓallin jayaya dabam-daban. Daga wannan aikin, Munã shawarar da mu ga ganin wannan aikin kamar wata mataimaki mai halartawa, kuma Mu shigar da littãfi da marubuci a sami-bincike masu shawara. Tuna ƙaddara misalinmu a kan Shirin Argumentation na Intanet, kuma munã daidaita hanyoyin dabam-dabam ga masu tsari da aka shigar da shi. Matarin jarrabai na nuna cewa misalinmu yana iya sami matsala mai girma sammeni da misãlai na farko.", 'sk': 'Spletne razprave lahko pomagajo zagotoviti dragocene informacije o različnih perspektivah o širokem naboru vprašanj. Vendar pa je razumevanje stališč, izraženih v teh razpravah, zelo zahtevna naloga, ki zahteva modeliranje besedilnih vsebin in pogovornih interakcij uporabnikov. Trenutni pristopi uporabljajo pristop kolektivne klasifikacije, ki ignorira odnose med različnimi temami razprave. V tem delu predlagamo, da to nalogo vidimo kot problem reprezentacijskega učenja in vključimo besedilo in avtorje skupaj na podlagi njihovih interakcij. Naš model ocenjujemo preko Internetnega Argumentacijskega Corpusa in primerjamo različne pristope za vgradnjo strukturnih informacij. Eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da lahko naš model doseže bistveno boljše rezultate v primerjavi s prejšnjimi konkurenčnimi modeli.', 'bo': 'དྲ་རྒྱའི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་གིས་དཀའ་ངལ་ཁྱད་པར་རིན་ཐང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་སྐོར་གྱི་རོགས་རམ་ཐུབ། འོན་ཀྱང་། གླེང་མོལ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་གནས་ཚུལ་འདི་ལ་ཁག་ཆེ་བའི་བྱ་སྤྱོད་ཅིག་ཡོད་པ་དང་ཐིག་ཡིག་གི་ནང་དོན་ ད་ལྟོའི་གནད་དོན་གནད་དོན་ཡུལ་གྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་འཛིན་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ཞིག་ལ་ཡོད། འུ་ཅག་གིས་ལས་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་བྱ ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས ལག་འཚོལ་བ་སྐྱེས་བ་དག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་མ་དཔེ་གཟུགས་རིས་འདྲ་བ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་མཐུན'}
{'en': 'Argumentation Synthesis following Rhetorical Strategies', 'ar': 'التوليف الجدلي بعد الاستراتيجيات البلاغية', 'pt': 'Síntese Argumentativa seguindo Estratégias Retóricas', 'es': 'Síntesis de la argumentación siguiendo estrategias retóricas', 'fr': "Synthèse d'argumentation suivant des stratégies rhétoriques", 'ja': '修辞戦略に従った論証合成', 'zh': '修辞策下论综', 'ru': 'Синтез аргументации в соответствии с риторическими стратегиями', 'hi': 'बयानबाजी रणनीतियों के बाद तर्क संश्लेषण', 'ga': 'Sintéis Argóint a leanann Straitéisí Rheitrice', 'hu': 'Argumentáció Szintézis retorikai stratégiákat követően', 'el': 'Σύνθεση επιχειρημάτων σύμφωνα με τις ρητορικές στρατηγικές', 'ka': 'არგუმენტაციის სინტეზა რეტორიკალური სტრატეგიების შემდეგ', 'it': 'Sintesi delle argomentazioni a seguito di strategie retoriche', 'kk': 'Реторикалық стратегияларды келесі аргументация синтезасы', 'lt': 'Argumentacijos sintezė pagal retorines strategijas', 'mt': 'Sinteżi tal-Argumentazzjoni wara Strateġiji Retoriċi', 'mk': 'Синтеза на аргументација по реторичките стратегии', 'ml': 'റെറ്റോറിക്കല്\u200d സ്ട്രേറ്റേജികളുടെ പിന്നാലെ അര്\u200dഗമെന്റേഷന്\u200d സിനിറ്റീസ്', 'ms': 'Sintesis Argumentasi mengikut Strategi Rhetorical', 'pl': 'Synteza argumentacji według strategii retorycznych', 'ro': 'Sinteza argumentației în urma strategiilor retorice', 'mn': 'Риторикийн стратегийн дараа аргументацийн синтез', 'si': 'රීටෝරිකාල සංදේශ පස්සේ ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරමණ සංවිධානය', 'sr': 'Argumentacijska sinteza nakon retorijske strategije', 'no': 'Argumentasjonsintez etter retoriske strategier', 'so': 'Heshiiska heshiiska ka soo socda', 'sv': 'Argumentation Syntes efter retoriska strategier', 'ur': 'ریٹروریک استراتژی کے پیچھے آرژومنٹ سینٹس', 'ta': 'ஆராமர்த்து ஒத்திசைவு', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tâm lý theo hướng tu từ', 'nl': 'Argumentatiesynthese volgens retorische strategieën', 'bg': 'Аргументационен синтез след реторични стратегии', 'da': 'Argumentation Syntese efter retoriske strategier', 'hr': 'Argumentacijska sinteza nakon retorijske strategije', 'de': 'Argumentationssynthese nach rhetorischen Strategien', 'id': 'Sintesis Argumentasi mengikuti Strategi Rhetorical', 'fa': 'سینتز ارتباط از طریق استراتژی ریتریک', 'ko': '수사 전략 하의 의논문 종합', 'sw': 'Argumentation Synthesis following Rhetorical Strategies', 'af': 'Argumentasie Senteze volgens retoriese strategies', 'tr': 'Rhetorikal Strategiýasy öňünde duşurmek Sentezi', 'sq': 'Sinteza e argumentimit pas Strategjive Retorike', 'hy': 'Ռետորական ռազմավարությունների հետևից', 'az': 'Rhetorical Strategies ardınca Argumentasyon Sintezi', 'am': 'የመስኮት ምርጫዎች', 'bn': 'আর্গুমেন্টেশন সিন্টিস রিটোরিক্যাল স্ট্যাটেজি', 'ca': "La síntesi d'argumentació segons les estratègies retòriques", 'bs': 'Argumentacijska sinteza nakon retorijske strategije', 'cs': 'Argumentační syntéza podle rétorických strategií', 'et': 'Argumentatsiooni süntees retooriliste strateegiate järgi', 'fi': 'Argumentaation synteesi retoristen strategioiden jälkeen', 'jv': 'Validity', 'sk': 'Sinteza argumentacije po retoričnih strategijah', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'Argumentation Synthesis following Rhetorical Strategies', 'he': 'תסמונת הטענות לאחר אסטרטגיות רטוריות'}
{'en': 'Persuasion is rarely achieved through a loose set of arguments alone. Rather, an effective delivery of arguments follows a rhetorical strategy, combining logical reasoning with appeals to ethics and emotion. We argue that such a strategy means to select, arrange, and phrase a set of argumentative discourse units. In this paper, we model rhetorical strategies for the computational synthesis of effective argumentation. In a study, we let 26 experts synthesize argumentative texts with different strategies for 10 topics. We find that the experts agree in the selection significantly more when following the same strategy. While the texts notably vary for different strategies, especially their arrangement remains stable. The results suggest that our model enables a strategical synthesis.', 'ar': 'نادرا ما يتحقق الإقناع من خلال مجموعة فضفاضة من الحجج وحدها. بدلاً من ذلك ، يتبع التسليم الفعال للحجج استراتيجية بلاغية ، تجمع بين التفكير المنطقي ومناشدة الأخلاق والعاطفة. نحن نجادل بأن مثل هذه الاستراتيجية تعني اختيار وترتيب وصياغة مجموعة من وحدات الخطاب الجدلي. في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بنمذجة الاستراتيجيات البلاغية للتوليف الحسابي للحجج الفعالة. في إحدى الدراسات ، سمحنا لـ 26 خبيرًا بتجميع نصوص جدلية باستراتيجيات مختلفة لعشرة مواضيع. نجد أن الخبراء يتفقون في الاختيار أكثر بشكل ملحوظ عند اتباع نفس الإستراتيجية. بينما تختلف النصوص بشكل ملحوظ باختلاف الاستراتيجيات ، خاصةً أن ترتيبها يظل مستقرًا. تشير النتائج إلى أن نموذجنا يتيح توليفًا استراتيجيًا.', 'fr': "La persuasion est rarement obtenue uniquement par un ensemble vague d'arguments. Une présentation efficace des arguments suit plutôt une stratégie rhétorique, combinant un raisonnement logique avec des appels à l'éthique et à l'émotion. Nous soutenons qu'une telle stratégie consiste à sélectionner, organiser et formuler un ensemble d'unités de discours argumentatives. Dans cet article, nous modélisons des stratégies rhétoriques pour la synthèse informatique d'une argumentation efficace. Dans le cadre d'une étude, nous avons laissé 26 experts synthétiser des textes argumentatifs avec différentes stratégies pour 10 sujets. Nous constatons que les experts sont nettement plus d'accord sur la sélection lorsqu'ils suivent la même stratégie. Bien que les textes varient considérablement selon les stratégies, leur disposition reste stable. Les résultats suggèrent que notre modèle permet une synthèse stratégique.", 'es': 'La persuasión rara vez se logra a través de un conjunto de argumentos flexibles. Más bien, una presentación eficaz de argumentos sigue una estrategia retórica, que combina el razonamiento lógico con apelaciones a la ética y la emoción. Argumentamos que tal estrategia significa seleccionar, organizar y formular un conjunto de unidades de discurso argumentativas. En este artículo, modelamos estrategias retóricas para la síntesis computacional de la argumentación eficaz. En un estudio, permitimos que 26 expertos sintetizaran textos argumentativos con diferentes estrategias para 10 temas. Nos parece que los expertos están de acuerdo en la selección significativamente más cuando se sigue la misma estrategia. Si bien los textos varían notablemente para las diferentes estrategias, especialmente su disposición se mantiene estable. Los resultados sugieren que nuestro modelo permite una síntesis estratégica.', 'pt': 'A persuasão raramente é alcançada apenas por meio de um conjunto solto de argumentos. Em vez disso, uma entrega eficaz de argumentos segue uma estratégia retórica, combinando raciocínio lógico com apelos à ética e à emoção. Argumentamos que tal estratégia significa selecionar, organizar e frasear um conjunto de unidades discursivas argumentativas. Neste artigo, modelamos estratégias retóricas para a síntese computacional de argumentação eficaz. Em um estudo, deixamos 26 especialistas sintetizarem textos argumentativos com diferentes estratégias para 10 tópicos. Constatamos que os especialistas concordam significativamente na seleção quando seguem a mesma estratégia. Embora os textos variem notavelmente para diferentes estratégias, especialmente seu arranjo permanece estável. Os resultados sugerem que nosso modelo permite uma síntese estratégica.', 'ja': '説得は、一連のゆるい議論を通じて単独で達成されることはほとんどありません。むしろ、議論の効果的な配信は、論理的な推論と倫理と感情への訴求を組み合わせた修辞的な戦略に従っています。私たちは、このような戦略は、一連の議論的言説単位を選択し、配置し、表現することを意味すると主張しています。この論文では、効果的な議論の計算的合成のための修辞戦略をモデル化した。ある研究では、26人の専門家に、10のトピックについて異なる戦略を持つ議論テキストを統合させました。同じ戦略を踏むと、専門家の方が選考に大幅に同意していることがわかります。テキストは異なる戦略のために顕著に異なるが、特にそれらの配置は安定したままである。この結果は、我々のモデルが戦略的な合成を可能にすることを示唆している。', 'zh': '说少以解散之论。 反此,有效者传循修辞策,将逻辑推理与德情合。 臣愚以为择置论单元。 于本文中,拟有效论算综之修辞策。 使26位专家10主题综其异同之论。 臣等见当循同策,专家择中更一。 虽文本殊策,而其列犹定。 结果表明,吾道合矣。', 'ru': 'Убеждение редко достигается только с помощью расплывчатого набора аргументов. Скорее, эффективное изложение аргументов следует риторической стратегии, сочетающей логические рассуждения с призывами к этике и эмоциям. Мы утверждаем, что такая стратегия означает выбор, упорядочение и формулирование набора аргументативных единиц дискурса. В данной работе мы моделируем риторические стратегии вычислительного синтеза эффективной аргументации. В исследовании мы позволили 26 экспертам синтезировать аргументативные тексты с разными стратегиями по 10 темам. Мы видим, что эксперты при выборе значительно больше сходятся во мнении, когда следуют той же стратегии. Хотя тексты заметно различаются в зависимости от различных стратегий, особенно их расположение остается стабильным. Результаты показывают, что наша модель обеспечивает стратегический синтез.', 'hi': 'अनुनय शायद ही कभी अकेले तर्कों के एक ढीले सेट के माध्यम से प्राप्त किया जाता है। इसके बजाय, तर्कों का एक प्रभावी वितरण एक बयानबाजी रणनीति का पालन करता है, नैतिकता और भावनाओं की अपील के साथ तार्किक तर्क का संयोजन करता है। हम तर्क देते हैं कि इस तरह की रणनीति का मतलब तर्कसंगत प्रवचन इकाइयों के एक सेट का चयन, व्यवस्था और वाक्यांश करना है। इस पेपर में, हम प्रभावी तर्क के कम्प्यूटेशनल संश्लेषण के लिए बयानबाजी रणनीतियों को मॉडल करते हैं। एक अध्ययन में, हम 26 विशेषज्ञों को 10 विषयों के लिए विभिन्न रणनीतियों के साथ तर्कसंगत ग्रंथों को संश्लेषित करने देते हैं। हम पाते हैं कि एक ही रणनीति का पालन करते समय विशेषज्ञ चयन में काफी अधिक सहमत होते हैं। जबकि ग्रंथ विशेष रूप से विभिन्न रणनीतियों के लिए भिन्न होते हैं, विशेष रूप से उनकी व्यवस्था स्थिर रहती है। परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारा मॉडल एक रणनीतिक संश्लेषण को सक्षम बनाता है।', 'ga': 'Is annamh a dhéantar áitimh a bhaint amach trí shraith scaoilte argóintí amháin. Ina ionad sin, leanann seachadadh éifeachtach argóintí straitéis reitriciúil, a chomhcheanglaíonn réasúnaíocht loighciúil le hachomhairc maidir le heitic agus mothúcháin. Áitímid go gciallaíonn straitéis den sórt sin sraith aonad dioscúrsa argóinteach a roghnú, a shocrú agus a chur in iúl. Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid múnla de straitéisí reitriciúil do shintéis ríomhaireachtúil argóinteachta éifeachtach. I staidéar, ligeamar do 26 saineolaí téacsanna argóinteacha a shintéisiú le straitéisí éagsúla le haghaidh 10 n-ábhar. Faighimid go n-aontaíonn na saineolaithe i bhfad níos mó sa roghnú agus iad ag leanúint na straitéise céanna. Cé go bhfuil éagsúlacht shuntasach sna téacsanna do straitéisí éagsúla, go háirithe tá a n-eagrú seasmhach. Tugann na torthaí le tuiscint go gcumasaíonn ár múnla sintéis straitéiseach.', 'el': 'Η πειθώ σπάνια επιτυγχάνεται μέσω ενός χαλαρού συνόλου επιχειρημάτων και μόνο. Αντίθετα, μια αποτελεσματική παράδοση επιχειρημάτων ακολουθεί μια ρητορική στρατηγική, συνδυάζοντας τη λογική λογική συλλογιστική με εκκλήσεις στην ηθική και το συναίσθημα. Υποστηρίζουμε ότι μια τέτοια στρατηγική σημαίνει να επιλέξετε, να οργανώσετε και να διατυπώσετε ένα σύνολο μονάδων επιχειρηματολογικού λόγου. Στην παρούσα εργασία, μοντελοποιούμε ρητορικές στρατηγικές για την υπολογιστική σύνθεση αποτελεσματικής επιχειρηματολογίας. Σε μια μελέτη, αφήσαμε 26 εμπειρογνώμονες να συνθέσουν επιχειρηματολογικά κείμενα με διαφορετικές στρατηγικές για δέκα θέματα. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι οι εμπειρογνώμονες συμφωνούν σημαντικά περισσότερο στην επιλογή όταν ακολουθούν την ίδια στρατηγική. Ενώ τα κείμενα διαφέρουν σημαντικά για διαφορετικές στρατηγικές, ιδιαίτερα η διευθέτηση τους παραμένει σταθερή. Τα αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι το μοντέλο μας επιτρέπει μια στρατηγική σύνθεση.', 'hu': 'A meggyőzést ritkán lehet elérni egyedül egy laza vitával. Az érvek hatékony közlése inkább retorikai stratégiát követ, amely ötvözi a logikus érvelést az etikára és az érzelmekre való felhívással. Azt állítjuk, hogy egy ilyen stratégia azt jelenti, hogy kiválasztjuk, elrendezzük és kifejezzük az érvelő diskurzusi egységeket. Jelen tanulmányban retorikai stratégiákat modellezünk a hatékony érvelés számítástechnikai szintézisére. Egy tanulmányban 26 szakértő szintetizálhatja a 10 témára vonatkozó különböző stratégiákkal rendelkező argumentációs szövegeket. Úgy találjuk, hogy a szakértők jelentősen jobban egyetértenek a kiválasztásban, ha ugyanazt a stratégiát követik. Bár a szövegek különböző stratégiák szerint jelentősen eltérnek, különösen azok elrendezése stabil marad. Az eredmények arra utalnak, hogy modellünk stratégiai szintéziset tesz lehetővé.', 'it': "La persuasione è raramente raggiunta attraverso una serie di argomenti sciolti da soli. Piuttosto, una consegna efficace di argomenti segue una strategia retorica, che combina ragionamento logico con appelli all'etica e all'emozione. Sosteniamo che una tale strategia significhi selezionare, organizzare e formulare un insieme di unità di discorso argomentative. In questo articolo modelliamo strategie retoriche per la sintesi computazionale di argomentazione efficace. In uno studio, abbiamo permesso a 26 esperti di sintetizzare testi argomentativi con diverse strategie per 10 argomenti. Troviamo che gli esperti concordano molto di più nella selezione quando seguono la stessa strategia. Mentre i testi variano notevolmente a seconda delle diverse strategie, in particolare la loro disposizione rimane stabile. I risultati suggeriscono che il nostro modello consente una sintesi strategica.", 'kk': 'Бірақ аргументтер аргументтерінің жалғыз жиілігі арқылы өзгертілмейді. Әйтпесе, аргументтердің эффективті жеткізу реторикалық стратегиясынан келеді, логикалық сезімдерді этика мен емоцияларға қосылумен біріктіреді. Бұл стратегия аргументтік дискурстық бірліктерді таңдау, реттеу және сөздерді таңдау үшін деп айтып тұрмыз. Бұл қағазда, біз жұмыс аргументацияның компьютерлік синтезасының реторикалық стратегияларын үлгіледік. Біз зерттеулерде 26 эксперттердің 10 нақыштың аргументалдық мәтіндерін синтезализациялауға мүмкіндік бердік. Біз эксперттер таңдағанда бір стратегияны келесі кезде көбірек болады. Бұл мәтіндер әртүрлі стратегиялар үшін өзгертілген, әсіресе олардың баптаулары дұрыс болады. Нәтижелер біздің үлгіміз стратегиялық синтезиясын мүмкіндік береді.', 'lt': 'Tik nedidelis argumentų rinkinys retai užtikrina persekiojimą. Veiksmingas argumentų pateikimas atitinka retorinę strategiją, derinančią logišką pagrįstumą su apeliacijomis į etiką ir emocijas. Mes teigiame, kad tokia strategija reiškia pasirinkti, tvarkyti ir išreikšti argumentacinių diskurso vienetų rinkinį. Šiame dokumente modeliuojame retorines veiksmingo argumentavimo skaičiavimo sintezės strategijas. Tyrimo metu 26 ekspertai sutelkia argumentacinius tekstus su skirtingomis 10 temų strategijomis. Matome, kad ekspertai pasirinkdami šią pačią strategiją daug labiau sutinka. While the texts notably vary for different strategies, especially their arrangement remains stable.  Rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų modelis leidžia atlikti strateginę sintezę.', 'mk': 'Персуацијата ретко се постигнува само преку слободни аргументи. Наместо тоа, ефективното пренесување на аргументите следи реторичка стратегија, комбинирајќи логично размислување со апелиции на етика и емоции. Ние тврдиме дека ваква стратегија значи избор, организација и фраза на сет аргументативни дискурсни единици. Во овој весник, ние моделираме реторички стратегии за компјутативната синтеза на ефикасната аргументација. Во студијата, дозволивме 26 експерти да синтетизираат аргументативни тексти со различни стратегии за 10 теми. Најдовме дека експертите се согласуваат во селекцијата значително повеќе кога ја следат истата стратегија. Иако текстовите се особено различни за различни стратегии, особено нивниот аранжман останува стабилен. Резултатите покажуваат дека нашиот модел овозможува стратешка синтеза.', 'ml': 'വ്യക്തിപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് കുറച്ച് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വാക്കുകള്\u200d മാത്രമാണ്. പകരം, വാദ്യാഭ്യാസം വിവരിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് ഒരു ഹെറ്റോററിക്കല്\u200d സ്ട്രായ്ട്രീജിക്ക് പിന്തുടരുന്നു. ലോഗിക്കല്\u200d കാരണങ് ഇതുപോലുള്ള ഒരു പദ്ധതിയാണ് തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നത്, സംഘടിപ്പിക്കുന്നത്, പിന്നെ ഒരു കൂട്ടം വാദ്യാഭാഷണ സംസ ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d സാധാരണമായ വാദ്യാഭാഷണത്തിന്റെ കണക്കൂട്ടുണ്ടാക്കുന്ന സിന്തീസിന്റെ മാതൃകയാണ്. ഒരു പഠനത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d 26 വിശേഷിപ്പുകാര്\u200dക്ക് വ്യത്യസ്ത വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d അനുവദിക നമ്മള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്തുന്നു വിശേഷക്കാര്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്നതില്\u200d ഏറെ കൂടുതല്\u200d സമ്മതിക്കുന്നുണ്ടെന്ന്. വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രവർത്തകങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പദ്ധതികള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമായിരിക്കുമ്പോഴും, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് അവരുടെ സ അതിന്റെ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d നിര്\u200dദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ മോഡല്\u200d ഒരു സാങ്കേതിക സംവിധാനം പ്രാപ്തികമാക്ക', 'mt': 'Il-persważjoni rarament tinkiseb permezz ta’ sett ta’ argumenti maħlul waħdu. Minflok, twettiq effettiv ta’ argumenti jsegwi strateġija retorika, li tgħaqqad ir-raġunament loġiku ma’ appelli għall-etika u l-emozzjoni. Aħna jargumentaw li strateġija bħal din tfisser l-għa żla, l-arranġament u l-frażi ta’ sett ta’ unitajiet ta’ diskors argumentattivi. F’dan id-dokument, aħna nimmudellaw strateġiji retoriċi għas-sinteżi komputattiva ta’ argumentazzjoni effettiva. Fi studju, a ħna nħallu 26 espert jissinteżizzaw testi argumentattivi b’strateġiji differenti għal 10 suġġetti. Aħna nsibu li l-esperti jaqblu fl-għażla b’mod sinifikanti aktar meta jsegwu l-istess strateġija. Filwaqt li t-testi jvarjaw b’mod partikolari għal strateġiji differenti, speċjalment l-arranġament tagħhom jibqa’ stabbli. Ir-riżultati jissuġġerixxu li l-mudell tagħna jippermetti sinteżi strateġika.', 'ka': 'პერსუაცია წარმოდგენა მხოლოდ არგუმენტების გარეშე. მაგრამ, არგუმენტების ეფექტიური გადატანა რეტორიკალური სტრატიგია, რომელიც ლოგიკური არგუმენტების შემყვებით არგუმენტებით ეტიკა და ემოცია. ჩვენ არგებთ, რომ ასეთი სტრატიგია ნიშნავს არჩევა, არგება და ფრაზა არგუმენტური დისკურსის ერთეულების ნაწილი. ამ დომენტში, ჩვენ რეტორიკალური სტრატიგიების მოდელურება ეფექტიური არგუმენტიის კომპუტაციალური სინტეზისთვის. ჩვენ 26 ექსპერტის სინტეზიზაცია აპირმენტიური ტექსტის განსხვავებული სტრატიგიებით 10 ტექსტის შესახებ. ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომ ექსპერტები არჩეულებში უფრო მნიშვნელოვანია, როდესაც იგივე სტრატიგიის შემდეგ იყო. თუმცა ტექსტი განსხვავებულია განსხვავებული სტრატიგიებისთვის, განსაკუთრებით მათი განსხვავება დარჩენა. წარმოდგენების შესახებ, რომ ჩვენი მოდელი სტრატიკალური სინტეზეზის შესაძლებლობა.', 'pl': 'Przekonywanie rzadko osiąga się poprzez luźny zestaw argumentów. Skuteczne podawanie argumentów jest raczej strategią retoryczną, łączącą logiczne rozumowanie z apelami do etyki i emocji. Twierdzimy, że taka strategia oznacza wybór, aranżację i sformułowanie zestawu argumentatywnych jednostek dyskursu. W niniejszym artykule modelujemy strategie retoryczne dla obliczeniowej syntezy efektywnej argumentacji. W badaniu pozwalamy 26-ekspertom syntetyzować teksty argumentatywne z różnymi strategiami dla dziesięciu tematów. Uważamy, że eksperci zgadzają się w selekcji znacznie więcej, kiedy stosują tę samą strategię. Chociaż teksty różnią się znacznie w zależności od różnych strategii, zwłaszcza ich układ pozostaje stabilny. Wyniki sugerują, że nasz model umożliwia strategiczną syntezę.', 'ro': 'Convingerea este rareori obținută doar printr-un set liber de argumente. Mai degrabă, o livrare eficientă a argumentelor urmează o strategie retorică, combinând raționamentul logic cu apelurile la etică și emoție. Susținem că o astfel de strategie înseamnă selectarea, aranjarea și exprimarea unui set de unități argumentative de discurs. În această lucrare, modelăm strategii retorice pentru sinteza computațională a argumentării eficiente. Într-un studiu, am lăsat 26 de experți să sintetizeze texte argumentative cu diferite strategii pentru 10 subiecte. Considerăm că experții sunt de acord în selecție semnificativ mai mult atunci când urmează aceeași strategie. Deși textele variază în mod semnificativ în funcție de strategiile diferite, în special aranjamentul lor rămâne stabil. Rezultatele sugerează că modelul nostru permite o sinteză strategică.', 'ms': 'Persuasion jarang dicapai melalui set argumen yang hilang sahaja. Sebaliknya, penghantaran argumen yang efektif mengikut strategi retorik, menggabungkan alasan logik dengan panggilan etika dan emosi. Kami membantah bahawa strategi seperti itu bermakna untuk memilih, mengatur, dan frasa set unit diskors argumentatif. Dalam kertas ini, kita model strategi retorik untuk sintesis komputasi argumen yang efektif. Dalam sebuah kajian, kami biarkan 26 ahli sintesis teks argumensif dengan strategi berbeza untuk 10 topik. We find that the experts agree in the selection significantly more when following the same strategy.  Sementara teks terutama berbeza untuk strategi berbeza, terutama perjanjian mereka tetap stabil. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahawa model kita membolehkan sintesis strategik.', 'sr': 'Persuacija se rijetko postiže samo kroz oslobođeni skup argumentacija. Umesto toga, efikasna dostavljanja argumenata slijedi retoričku strategiju, kombinirajući logički razum sa apelujem na etiku i emocije. Tvrdimo da takva strategija znaèi da odaberemo, organizujemo i izrazimo skup argumentativnih diskursnih jedinica. U ovom papiru modeliramo retoričke strategije za računalnu sintezu efikasne argumentacije. U studiji dozvolili smo 26 stručnjaka da sinteziraju argumentativne tekste sa različitim strategijama za 10 tema. Nalazimo da se stručnjaci slažu u izboru značajno više kada prate istu strategiju. Dok se teksti posebno razlikuju za različite strategije, posebno njihov dogovor ostaje stabilan. Rezultati sugeriraju da naš model omogućava stratešku sintezu.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විතරයි. වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පිළිබඳ විදිහට පස්සේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනවා, ලෝකික ප්\u200dර අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ඒ විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තෝරාගන්න, සැකසුම් කරන්න, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තෝරාගන්න. මේ පැත්තට, අපි ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන පණිවිඩය සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නය කරනවා. අධ්\u200dයානයක් වලින්, අපි විශේෂය 26 විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වලින අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාසියෝ තෝරාගැනීමේ විශ්වාසියෙන් වඩා විශේෂයෙන් එකතු ව වෙනස් සැලසුම් විශේෂයෙන් වෙනස් විදියට වෙනස් වුනා වගේම, විශේෂයෙන්ම ඔවුන්ගේ සැලසුම් ස් ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිපත්තියක් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරනවා කියලා.', 'mn': 'Хүмүүс зөвхөн алдагдсан аргументуудын хувьд бага зэрэг амжилттай. Үүний оронд, аргументуудын үр дүнтэй хандлага нь реторикийн стратегийг дагадаг. Логикийн урам зориулалтыг эрхийн, сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тухай холбоотой. Бид ийм стратеги нь аргументын ярианы нэгжүүдийг сонгох, зохион байгуулах гэсэн утгатай. Энэ цаасан дээр бид үр дүнтэй аргументын тооцоололтын шинжлэх ухааны реторикийн стратегийг загварлаж байна. Судалгаанд 26 мэргэжилтэн 10 сэдэв дахь өөр стратегийг арга хэмжээгээр арга хэмжээгээр бичсэн. Бид нар мэргэжилтнүүд адилхан стратегийг дагах үед сонголт дээр илүү тохиромжтой байдаг. Шинэ бичлэгүүд ялангуяа өөр стратегийнхээ хувьд өөрчлөгдсөн ч, ялангуяа тэдний төлөвлөгөө тогтмол байдаг. Үүний үр дүнд бидний загвар стратегик шинжлэх ухаан болох боломжтой гэсэн үг.', 'no': 'Persuasjon er ofte oppnådd gjennom ein feil sett av argumenter alene. I staden følgjer eit retorisk strategi med ein effektiv oppføring av argumenter, og kombinerer logisk redeksjon med appel til etikk og emosjon. Vi argumenterer at slike strategi betyr å velja, ordna og frase eit sett av argumentativ diskurseiningar. I denne papiret modeller vi retoriske strategiar for datasintezen av effektiv argument. I eit studie la vi 26 ekspertar syntisere argumentativ tekst med ulike strategiar for 10 tema. Vi finn at ekspertane samsvarer med utvalet mykje meir når det følgjer samme strategi. Mens tekstane er spesielt varierte for ulike strategiar, særleg forandringa sitt er stabil. Resultatet tyder på at modellen vårt slår på ein strategisk syntese.', 'ur': 'مطمئن بہت ہی کم ہوتا ہے ایک بے ہودہ مجموعہ کے ذریعہ۔ بلکہ مثال بحث کے مطابق اچھی تحویل کی پیروی کرتی ہے ایک رئتوریک استراتژی کی پیروی کرتی ہے، اور منطقی بحث کو اخلاقی اور احساسات کے ساتھ آواز دیتی ہے. ہم جھگڑتے ہیں کہ اس طرح کا استراتژی ایک مجموعہ جھگڑنے کے واحدوں کا انتخاب, ترکیب اور فرض کرنے کا مطلب ہے اس کاغذ میں، ہم کامپیوتر کی سینٹسیس کے لئے ریتوریک استراتژی مدل کرتے ہیں۔ ایک تحقیق میں، ہم نے 26 متخصص بحثوں کو 10 موضوع کے لئے مختلف استراتژی کے ساتھ بحثات سنٹیزی کرنا اجازت دی۔ ہم دیکھتے ہیں کہ متخصص گزینے میں بہت زیادہ موافق ہیں جب ایک طریقہ کے پیچھے آتے ہیں۔ اگرچہ پیغام مختلف طریقوں کے لئے مختلف ہیں، مخصوصاً ان کے طریقے ثابت رہتے ہیں۔ نتیجے ان سے پیش کرتے ہیں کہ ہماری مدل ایک استراتژیک سینسٹز کو امکان دیتا ہے.', 'so': 'Inta yar waxaa la gaadhaa iskuul oo keliya. Markaas waxaa suurtagal ah in qiimaha faa’iido leh la soo bixiyo waxaa raaca qoraal cilmi ah, wuxuuna ku soo bandhigaa sabab rasmi ah oo la xiriira racfaanka diinta iyo fikrada. Waxaynu ka fekeraynaa in qoraalkaas oo kale loola jeedo in la doorto, la qabanqaabiyo, iyo in lagu hadlo noocyo badan oo sheekeysi ah. Qoraalkan waxaynu sameynaa qalabka takhasuska ee xisaabta ee hadalka faa’iidada ah. Waxbarashada waxaynu 26 khabiir ah ku daynay qoraal talobixinta oo kala duduwan oo ku qoran qoraal-qoraal kala duduwan 10 mada. Waxaynu ognahay in khabiiriyiintu ay ku heshiiyaan doorashooyinka si ka badan marka ay soo raacaan qoraal isku mid ah. Inta ay qoraaladu si gaar ah u kala duwan yihiin qorshaha kala duduwan, khusuusan qorshahoodu waxay sii jiraan mid adag. Midhaha resultadu waxay ka muuqataa in modelkeenu uu qaban karo isbitaal strategis ah.', 'sv': 'Övertalelse uppnås sällan enbart genom en lös uppsättning argument. En effektiv argumentation följer snarare en retorisk strategi som kombinerar logiskt resonemang med vädjanden till etik och känslor. Vi hävdar att en sådan strategi innebär att välja, ordna och formulera en uppsättning argumentativa diskursenheter. I denna uppsats modellerar vi retoriska strategier för beräkningssyntes av effektiv argumentation. I en studie låter vi 26 experter syntetisera argumentativa texter med olika strategier för 10 ämnen. Vi finner att experterna är betydligt mer överens i urvalet när de följer samma strategi. Texterna varierar avsevärt för olika strategier, men framför allt är deras utformning stabil. Resultaten tyder på att vår modell möjliggör en strategisk syntes.', 'ta': 'தனிப்பட்ட வார்த்தைகள் மட்டுமே ஒரு வெறும் வார்த்தைகள் மூலம் குறைவாக பெறுகிறது. அதற்கு பதிலாக, வார்ப்புகளை வெளிப்படுத்துவதற்கு விருப்பங்கள் பின்பற்றுகிறது, இசை மற்றும் உணர்வுகளுக்கு அழைப்புகளை கூ நாம் விவாதம் செய்து தேர்ந்தெடுக்க, அமைப்பு, மற்றும் வார்த்தையான வார்த்தையாட்டு பேச்சு அலகுகள் சொல் இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் வெளிப்படையான தருகாரத்தின் கணிப்பாட்டு ஒத்திசைவை மாதிரியும். ஒரு ஆராய்ச்சியில், நாம் 26 சிறப்பாளர்களை வேறு வித்தியாசமான திட்டங்களுடன் ஒருங்கிணைக்கலாம். தேர்ந்தெடுப்பு பின்பற்றும் போது தேர்வு மிகவும் முக்கியமானது என்று நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்கிறோம். வேறு திட்டங்களுக்கு உரைகள் மாறுபட்டிருக்கும் போது, குறிப்பாக அவர்களுடைய நிறுவனம் உறுதியாக இருக்க முடிவுகள் எங்கள் மாதிரி ஒரு strategical synthesis செயல்படுத்துகிறது என்று பரிந்துரைக்கிறது.', 'uz': "Shaxsiy shaxsiyat faqat o'zgarishlar bilan keladi. Ko'rsatganda, argumentlarni ajratishni tashkil qilish o'zgarishga ega bo'ladi, o'ylab va hissiyot bilan foydalanish uchun logical sabablarni birlashtirish mumkin. Biz shu strategiya bir narsalarni tanlash, tayyorlash va bir narsalar bir tomonidan iborat qilishimiz mumkin. Bu qogʻozda, biz kompyuterning tashkilotlarini tasavvur qilish uchun retorik strategiyasini modellaymiz. Biz 26 ekspert shunday o'rganishni 10 madam uchun boshqa qiymatlar matnlarini birlashtirishga ruxsat beramiz. Biz o'rganamiz, yaxshilar bir xil strategiya qo'shilganda tanlash uchun juda qiziqarli bo'lganligini o'rganamiz. Matnlar boshqa strategiya uchun o'zgaruvchi bo'lganda, hususan ularning o'zgarishlari stabil qoladi. The results suggest that our model enables a strategical synthesis.", 'vi': 'Hiếm khi thuyết phục được thực hiện chỉ bằng một loạt các lý lẽ lỏng lẻo. Thay vào đó, việc đưa ra lý lẽ hiệu quả là theo một chiến lược tu từ, kết hợp logic với những lý lẽ về đạo đức và cảm xúc. Chúng tôi cho rằng một chiến lược như vậy có nghĩa là chọn, sắp xếp, và diễn đạt một loạt các đơn vị đàm luận tranh luận. Trong bài viết này, chúng tôi mô tả các chiến lược tu từ để tổng kết kết các luận hiệu quả. Trong một nghiên cứu, chúng tôi để 26 các chuyên gia tổng hợp các văn bản nghiên cứu với các chiến lược khác nhau cho mười chủ đề. Chúng tôi thấy các chuyên gia đồng ý trong việc chọn lựa nhiều hơn khi làm theo một chiến lược tương tự. Nội dung văn bản rất khác với các chiến lược khác nhau, đặc biệt là cách sắp xếp ổn định. Kết quả cho thấy mô hình của chúng ta có khả năng tổng hợp chiến lược.', 'da': 'Overtalelse opnås sjældent gennem et løst sæt argumenter alene. En effektiv fremførelse af argumenter følger snarere en retorisk strategi, der kombinerer logisk ræsonnement med appeller til etik og følelser. Vi hævder, at en sådan strategi betyder at vælge, arrangere og udtrykke et sæt argumenterende diskursenheder. I denne artikel modellerer vi retoriske strategier til beregningsmæssig syntese af effektiv argumentation. I en undersøgelse lader vi 26 eksperter syntetisere argumenterende tekster med forskellige strategier for 10 emner. Vi finder, at eksperterne er væsentligt mere enige i udvælgelsen, når de følger den samme strategi. Selv om teksterne varierer betydeligt for de forskellige strategier, er deres arrangement stadig stabil. Resultaterne tyder på, at vores model muliggør en strategisk syntese.', 'bg': 'Убеждаването рядко се постига само чрез свободни аргументи. По-скоро ефективното представяне на аргументи следва реторична стратегия, съчетаваща логическо разсъждение с призиви към етика и емоция. Ние твърдим, че такава стратегия означава да се избере, подреди и формулира набор от аргументативни дискурсни единици. В настоящата статия моделираме реторични стратегии за изчислителен синтез на ефективна аргументация. В едно проучване позволихме на 26 експерти да синтезират аргументативни текстове с различни стратегии по 10 теми. Установяваме, че експертите са съгласни в подбора значително повече, когато следват една и съща стратегия. Въпреки че текстовете значително се различават за различните стратегии, особено тяхното подреждане остава стабилно. Резултатите показват, че нашият модел позволява стратегически синтез.', 'nl': 'Overtuiging wordt zelden bereikt door een losse reeks argumenten alleen. Een effectieve argumentatie volgt eerder een retorische strategie, waarbij logisch redeneren wordt gecombineerd met oproepen tot ethiek en emotie. We argumenteren dat een dergelijke strategie betekent om een reeks argumentatieve discourseenheden te selecteren, te ordenen en te formuleren. In dit artikel modelleren we retorische strategieën voor de computationele synthese van effectieve argumentatie. In een studie laten we 26 experts argumentatieve teksten samenstellen met verschillende strategieën voor tien onderwerpen. We vinden dat de experts het beduidend meer eens zijn in de selectie bij het volgen van dezelfde strategie. Hoewel de teksten voor verschillende strategieën sterk verschillen, blijft vooral hun opstelling stabiel. De resultaten suggereren dat ons model een strategische synthese mogelijk maakt.', 'hr': 'Persuacija se rijetko postiže samo kroz oslobođeni skup argumentacija. Umjesto toga, učinkovito dostavljanje argumenata slijedi retoričku strategiju, kombinirajući logički razum s apelujem na etiku i emocije. Tvrdimo da takva strategija znači izabrati, organizirati i izraziti skup argumentativnih diskursnih jedinica. U ovom papiru modeliramo retoričke strategije za računalnu sintezu učinkovite argumentacije. U ispitivanju dozvolili smo 26 stručnjaka sintezirati argumentativne tekste s različitim strategijama za 10 tema. Nalazimo da se stručnjaci slažu u izboru značajno više kada slijedimo istu strategiju. Iako se teksti posebno razlikuju za različite strategije, posebno njihov dogovor ostaje stabilan. Rezultati sugeriraju da naš model omogućava strategičku sintezu.', 'de': 'Überzeugung wird selten durch eine lose Reihe von Argumenten allein erreicht. Vielmehr folgt eine effektive Argumentation einer rhetorischen Strategie, die logisches Denken mit Appellen an Ethik und Emotion verbindet. Wir argumentieren, dass eine solche Strategie bedeutet, eine Reihe von argumentativen Diskurseinheiten auszuwählen, zu arrangieren und zu formulieren. In diesem Beitrag modellieren wir rhetorische Strategien für die computergestützte Synthese effektiver Argumentation. In einer Studie lassen wir 26-Experten argumentative Texte mit unterschiedlichen Strategien für zehn Themen synthetisieren. Wir finden, dass sich die Experten in der Auswahl deutlich mehr einig sind, wenn sie dieselbe Strategie verfolgen. Während die Texte je nach Strategie sehr unterschiedlich sind, bleibt vor allem ihre Anordnung stabil. Die Ergebnisse legen nahe, dass unser Modell eine strategische Synthese ermöglicht.', 'id': 'Persuasi jarang dicapai melalui set argumen yang terbuka sendirian. Rather, an effective delivery of arguments follows a rhetorical strategy, combining logical reasoning with appeals to ethics and emotion.  Kami berdebat bahwa strategi seperti itu berarti untuk memilih, mengatur, dan frasa set unit diskors argumensif. In this paper, we model rhetorical strategies for the computational synthesis of effective argumentation.  Dalam sebuah studi, kami membiarkan 26 ahli sintesis teks argumensif dengan strategi yang berbeda untuk 10 topik. Kami menemukan bahwa para ahli setuju dalam seleksi jauh lebih ketika mengikuti strategi yang sama. Sementara teks terutama berbeda untuk strategi berbeda, terutama pengaturan mereka tetap stabil. Hasilnya menunjukkan bahwa model kita memungkinkan sintesis strategis.', 'sw': 'Mtu hufanikiwa kwa nadra sana kupitia mjadala huru pekee. Rather, an effective delivery of arguments follows a rhetorical strategy, combining logical reasoning with appeals to ethics and emotion.  Tunajadili kuwa mkakati huu unamaanisha kuchagua, kuandaa, na kuelezea baadhi ya vitengo vya mazungumzo yanayojadili. Katika gazeti hili, tunaweka mbinu za maneno kwa mfumo wa kompyuta wa mazungumzo yenye ufanisi. Katika utafiti, tuwaacha wataalam 26 kuungana na ujumbe wa hoja na mikakati tofauti kwa mada 10. Tunawaona kwamba wataalam wanakubaliana na uchaguzi kwa kiasi kikubwa kufuatia mkakati huo. Wakati maandishi yanatofautiana kwa mikakati tofauti, hususani mikakati yao bado ni imara. Matokeo yanapendekeza kuwa muundo wetu unawezesha muungano wa kimkakati.', 'fa': 'احساس کمی از طریق مجموعه\u200cهای بی\u200cخفیف تنها رسیده می\u200cشود. به جای این، تحویل موثری از بحث\u200cها یک استراتژی ریتوریک را پیروی می\u200cکند و منطق منطقی را با دعوت به اخلاقی و احساسات ترکیب می\u200cکند. ما بحث می\u200cکنیم که این استراتژی یعنی انتخاب، ترتیب و عبارت یک مجموعه از واحدهای صحبت مطمئنی است. در این کاغذ، ما استراتژی\u200cهای بازیگری برای سازمان محاسبه\u200cهای اختلاف موثر مدل می\u200cکنیم. در یک مطالعه، ما اجازه دادیم ۲۶ متخصص متخصص با استراتژی های مختلف برای ۱۰ موضوع متصل کنند. ما فهمیدیم که متخصص ها در انتخاب بیشتری موافق هستند وقتی از یک استراتژی پیروی می کنند. در حالی که متن\u200cها مخصوصا برای استراتژی\u200cهای مختلف تغییر می\u200cکنند، مخصوصاً پیمانشان ثابت است. نتیجه\u200cها پیشنهاد می\u200cدهند که مدل ما یک ترکیب استراتژیک را توان می\u200cدهد.', 'tr': 'Yüregi ýok bir topar tarapyndan az bolsa ýeterlik ýetişir. Ýöne, argümanlaryň täsirli teslimaty retorikalan stratejiýanyň yzyndan geler, lojik düşünüşmeleri etika we duýgyna degişmäne bilen birleşdirýär. Bütin bir stratejiýanyň sözlerini saýlamak, düzenlemek we sözlemek üçin bir topar argenti diskusiýa birimlerini saýlamak üçin meýilleşdirilýäris. Bu kagyzda, hesaplamak sistemasynda etkinji argumentatyň retorikalary strategiýalary nusgala edýäris Bir çalışma içinde 26 ekspertler 10 tema üçin dürli stratejikler bilen pikirlenýän mektuplary çykarmaga rugsat berýärler. Biz uzmanlaryň saýlawda bir strategiýany yzarlaýanda, saýlawda has hem köp ylalaşyklary tapýarys. Metinler dürli stratejiler üçin üýtgeşikli bolsa-da özleriniň düzenlemesi stabildir. netijeler biziň nusgamyzyň stratejik sintezi mümkin edýändigini maslahat berýär.', 'af': "Persuasie word eers deur 'n losse stel argumente alleen bereik. In plaas van 'n effektief oorwinning van argumente volg 'n retoriese strategie, met die kombinasie van logiese redening met appealers na etika en emosie. Ons argumenteer dat so 'n strategie beteken om 'n stel van argumentatiewe diskursie eenhede te kies, te organiseer en te frase. In hierdie papier, ons model retoriese strategies vir die rekenasiesinteze van effektief argumentasie. In 'n studie laat ons 26 eksperte argumentatiewe teks sintetiseer met verskillende strategies vir 10 onderwerpe. Ons vind dat die eksperte ooreenkomstig in die keuse betekenlik meer wanneer die selfde strategie volg. Alhoewel die tekste verander spesifieke vir verskillende strategies, veral hulle aanpassing bly stabile. Die resultate stel voorstel dat ons model 'n strategiese sintetis kan aktiveer.", 'sq': 'Persuazimi rrallë arrihet vetëm nëpërmjet një grupi argumentesh të lira. Përkundrazi, një dorëzim efektiv i argumenteve pason një strategji retorike, duke kombinuar arsyetimin logjik me apelet ndaj etikës dhe emocioneve. Ne argumentojmë se një strategji e tillë do të thotë të zgjedhësh, të rregullosh dhe të shprehësh një sërë njësive argumentuese diskursi. Në këtë letër, ne modelojmë strategji retorike për sintezën kompjuterike të argumenteve efektive. Në një studim, ne lejojmë 26 ekspertë të sintetizojnë tekste argumentuese me strategji të ndryshme për 10 temë. Ne zbulojmë se ekspertët janë dakord në zgjedhjen më tepër kur ndjekin të njëjtën strategji. Ndërsa tekstet ndryshojnë veçanërisht për strategji të ndryshme, veçanërisht marrëveshja e tyre mbetet e qëndrueshme. Rezultatet sugjerojnë se modeli ynë mundëson një sintezë strategjike.', 'am': 'መግለጫ በተለየ ክርክሮች ብቻውን ይደርስበታል፡፡ በተጨማሪም የአውራጆች አካባቢ ማድረግ በሐሳብ እና እውቀት ጥያቄን ለመቀላቀል የሚከተል የlogical ምክር እና ጥያቄን በመጠቀም ነው፡፡ እንደዚህ ባለ ተቃውሞ መምረጥ፣ ማሰናከል እና የተቃውሞ የንግግር ክፍሎች ለመምረጥ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ ጉዳይ እናሳውቃለን፡፡ በተማርክ ውስጥ 26 ባለመሳፍንት አካባቢ ጽሑፎችን በተለየ ትርጉም ለ10 ትክክለኛ ጥያቄ እናስቀምጣለን፡፡ ባለመሳፍንት የመረጠውን ትምህርት በተከተሉ ጊዜ እጅግ አብልጠው እንደተማመን እናገኛለን፡፡ While the texts notably vary for different strategies, especially their arrangement remains stable.  ፍሬዎቹ ሞዴላያችን የstrategical Synthesis እንዲችል ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Հազվադեպ է հազվադեպ հաջողությունը հասնում միայն տարբեր բանավեճերի միջոցով: Փոխարենը, բանավեճերի արդյունավետ արտահայտությունը հետևում է ռետորական ռազմավարությանը, որը համադրում է տրամաբանական մտածելակերպը բարոյականության և զգացմունքների կոչ: Մենք պնդում ենք, որ այդպիսի ռազմավարություն նշանակում է ընտրել, կազմակերպել և արտահայտել մի շարք բանավեճող խոսակցության միավորներ: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք մոդելավորում ենք էֆեկտիկ բանավեճի հաշվարկման սինթեզի ռետորական ռազմավարությունները: Հետազոտության մեջ մենք թույլ տվեցինք 26 մասնագետներին սինթեզել բանավեճ տեքստերը 10 թեմայի համար տարբեր ռազմավարություններով: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ մասնագետները համաձայնվում են ընտրության մեջ ավելի շատ, երբ հետևում են նույն ռազմավարության: While the texts notably vary for different strategies, especially their arrangement remains stable.  Արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր մոդելը հնարավորություն է տալիս ռազմավարական սինթեզի:', 'bn': 'ব্যক্তিগত ব্যক্তিত্ব একা একা যুক্তির মাধ্যমে খুব কম অর্জন করা হচ্ছে। তার পরিবর্তে যুক্তি প্রদানের কার্যকর একটি কৌশল অনুসরণ করে, যা নৈতিক এবং আবেগের প্রতি আবেদনের মাধ্যমে যৌক্তিক কারণের সাথে জড়িয় আমরা যুক্তি দিচ্ছি যে এই ধরনের কৌশল নির্বাচন, সংগঠিত এবং বিভিন্ন যুক্তিগত কথোপকথন ইউনিট বানানোর মানে। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা কার্যকর যুক্তি নিয়ে কৌশলের সাথে গণনা করতে পারি। একটি গবেষণায়, আমরা ২৬ জন বিশেষজ্ঞ যুক্তিগত যুক্তিগত টেক্সটের সাথে একত্রিত করে দিয়েছি ১০ বিষয়ের জন্য বিভিন্ন ক আমরা দেখতে পাচ্ছি যে বিশেষজ্ঞরা একই কৌশল অনুসরণ করে নির্বাচনে অনেক গুরুত্বপূর্ণ একমত। যখন লেখাগুলো বিভিন্ন কৌশলের জন্য বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন, বিশেষ করে তাদের প্রতিষ্ঠান এখনো স্থি ফলাফল পরামর্শ দেয় যে আমাদের মডেল একটি কৌশলগত সিন্টিসেজ সক্রিয় করে।', 'ko': '설득력은 일련의 느슨한 논점만으로는 실현되기 어렵다.반대로 논점의 효과적인 표현은 하나의 수사 전략에 따라 논리적 추리와 도덕과 감정적 호소를 결합시킨다.우리는 이런 전략은 한 조의 논문 단원을 선택하고 배정하며 표현하는 것을 의미한다고 생각한다.이 논문에서 우리는 효과적인 논증의 계산 합성을 위해 수사 전략 모델을 세웠다.한 연구에서 우리는 26명의 전문가에게 10개의 주제를 서로 다른 전략의 논문으로 합성시켰다.우리는 같은 전략을 따를 때 전문가들의 선택적 일치성이 현저히 높아진다는 것을 발견했다.비록 텍스트는 전략에 따라 현저한 차이가 존재하지만, 특히 그것들의 배열 방식은 안정적이다.그 결과 우리의 모델은 전략적 종합을 실현했다.', 'cs': 'Přesvědčování je zřídka dosaženo pouze prostřednictvím volné sady argumentů. Efektivní předávání argumentů se spíše říká rétorickou strategií, která kombinuje logické uvažování s odvoláním na etiku a emoce. Argumentujeme, že taková strategie znamená vybrat, uspořádat a frázovat soubor argumentativních diskurzních jednotek. V tomto článku modelujeme rétorické strategie pro výpočetní syntézu efektivní argumentace. Ve studii jsme nechali 26 odborníky syntetizovat argumentativní texty s různými strategiemi pro deset témat. Zjišťujeme, že odborníci se ve výběru shodují výrazně více, když sledují stejnou strategii. Zatímco texty se podle různých strategií liší, zejména jejich uspořádání zůstává stabilní. Výsledky naznačují, že náš model umožňuje strategickou syntézu.', 'ca': "Rarament s'aconsegueix la persecució només amb un conjunt d'arguments lliures. Rather, an effective delivery of arguments follows a rhetorical strategy, combining logical reasoning with appeals to ethics and emotion.  Argumentem que aquesta estratègia vol dir seleccionar, organitzar i frasar un conjunt d'unitats argumentatives de discurs. En aquest paper, modelem estratègies retòriques per a la síntesi computacional de l'argumentació efectiva. En un estudi, vam deixar 26 experts sintetitzar textos argumentatius amb diferents estratègies per 10 temes. Trobem que els experts estan d'acord molt més en la selecció quan segueixen la mateixa estratègia. Mentre que els textos varien especialment per diferents estratègies, especialment el seu arreglo segueix estable. Els resultats suggereixen que el nostre model permet una síntesi estratègica.", 'bs': 'Persuacija se rijetko postiže samo kroz oslobođeni skup argumentacija. Umesto toga, učinkovito dostavljanje argumenata slijedi retoričku strategiju, kombinirajući logički razum sa apelujem na etiku i emocije. Tvrdimo da takva strategija znači izabrati, organizirati i frazirati skup argumentativnih diskurskih jedinica. U ovom papiru modeliramo retoričke strategije za računalnu sintezu efikasne argumentacije. U studiji dozvolili smo 26 stručnjaka da sinteziraju argumentativne tekste sa različitim strategijama za 10 tema. Nalazimo da se stručnjaci slažu u izboru značajno više kada prate istu strategiju. Iako se teksti posebno razlikuju za različite strategije, posebno njihov dogovor ostaje stabilan. Rezultati sugeriraju da naš model omogućava strategičku sintezu.', 'az': 'İnsanlıq yalnız müəyyən bir dəstə argumenti vasitəsilə çox az başa düşər. Əksinə, müzakirələrin etkili tətbiq edilməsi bir retorik strateji ilə etik və duygulara gələn lojik müzakirə ilə birləşdirir. Biz mübahisə edirik ki, bu strateji bir dəstə argumentativ danışma birliklərini seçmək, düzenlemek və ifadə etmək istəyir. Bu kağızda, biz müvəffəqiyyətli argumentlərin hesablama sintezi üçün retorik stratejilərini modelləyirik. Biz 26 ekspertlərə 10 məsələlər üçün müxtəlif stratejilər ilə müxtəlif məsələlər sintezləşdirməyə izin verdik. Biz müsəlmanların seçimlərdə eyni strateji təqib etdikdə daha çox anlaşırlar. Mətnlər müxtəlif stratejilər üçün müxtəlif dəyişiklikdə, xüsusilə onların düzenlemesi möhkəmdir. Sonuçlarımız modellərimizin stratejik sintezi yaratmasını iddia edir.', 'et': 'Veenamist saavutatakse harva üksnes lahtise argumentide kaudu. Pigem järgib tõhus argumentide esitamine retoorilist strateegiat, mis ühendab loogilise arutluse üleskutsetega eetikale ja emotsioonidele. Väidame, et selline strateegia tähendab argumentatiivsete diskursusüksuste valimist, korraldamist ja sõnastamist. Käesolevas töös modelleerime retoorilisi strateegiaid efektiivse argumentatsiooni arvutuslikuks sünteesiks. Uuringus laseme 26 eksperdil sünteesida argumentatiivseid tekste erinevate strateegiatega 10 teema kohta. Leiame, et sama strateegia järgides nõustuvad eksperdid valikuga oluliselt rohkem. Kuigi tekstid erinevate strateegiate puhul on märkimisväärselt erinevad, on eriti nende korraldus stabiilne. Tulemused näitavad, et meie mudel võimaldab strateegilist sünteesi.', 'fi': 'Suostuttelua saadaan harvoin aikaan pelkästään löysällä argumentilla. Päinvastoin, tehokas argumenttien toimittaminen noudattaa retorista strategiaa, jossa yhdistyvät looginen päättely vetoomuksiin etiikkaan ja tunteisiin. Väitämme, että tällainen strategia tarkoittaa argumentoivien diskurssiyksiköiden valitsemista, järjestämistä ja ilmaisua. Tässä työssä mallinnamme retorisia strategioita tehokkaan argumentoinnin laskennalliseen synteesiin. Tutkimuksessa annoimme 26 asiantuntijan syntetisoida argumentoivia tekstejä eri strategioilla kymmenelle aiheelle. Asiantuntijat ovat samaa mieltä valinnasta huomattavasti enemmän, kun he noudattavat samaa strategiaa. Vaikka tekstit vaihtelevat huomattavasti eri strategioiden osalta, erityisesti niiden järjestely pysyy vakaana. Tulokset viittaavat siihen, että mallimme mahdollistaa strategisen synteesin.', 'ha': "Ina kama da sauri bã za a sãmu mutane ba fãce da bakan jãyayai. Kayya, mai bãyar da shirin jãyayya mai inganci yana biyar wani takwai na fikanci, kuma yana haɗa jãyayya masu lokaci da sami'a zuwa tamkar da hisia. Tuna faɗa cewa wannan tukaci yana ma'anar za'a zãɓe, ta sami, kuma da sauri masu haɗi da magana masu husũma. Ga wannan takardan, za'a sami takwai na ƙidãya da ke samu'in da za'a yi mataimaki. Kuma a cikin wani littafi, sai mu bar 26 masu fitawa su haɗa matsayin muhimmada da aka sami takwai masu cikin muhimmi 10. Muna gane cewa masu sani sun yarda da zãɓen yana mai girma a lokacin da ke biyar shirin wannan. Kuma a lokacin da matsayin suka sãɓã wa takwai-takwai, hasa'a, kayan da su yana madawwama. Mataimakin yana gaya cewa misalinmu yana iya amfani da wani sigarin kimatiki.", 'sk': 'Prepričevanje je redko doseženo samo z ohlapnimi argumenti. Namesto tega učinkovito predstavljanje argumentov sledi retorični strategiji, ki združuje logično razmišljanje s pozivi k etiki in čustvom. Trdimo, da takšna strategija pomeni izbrati, urediti in izraziti nabor argumentativnih diskurznih enot. V prispevku modeliramo retorične strategije za računalniško sintezo učinkovite argumentacije. V študiji smo 26 strokovnjakov dopustili sintetizirati argumentativna besedila z različnimi strategijami za 10 tem. Ugotavljamo, da se strokovnjaki pri izboru bistveno bolj strinjajo, ko sledijo isti strategiji. Besedila se sicer zelo razlikujejo glede na različne strategije, zlasti njihova ureditev ostaja stabilna. Rezultati kažejo, da naš model omogoča strateško sintezo.', 'he': 'לעיתים נדירות ניתן להשיג התרדפות באמצעות קבוצה משוחררת של ויכוחים לבד. במקום זאת, משלוח יעיל של טיעונים עוקב אחרי אסטרטגיה רטורית, שילוב הגיון הגיוני עם התביעות לאתיקה ורגשות. We argue that such a strategy means to select, arrange, and phrase a set of argumentative discourse units.  בעיתון הזה, אנחנו דוגמנים אסטרטגיות רטוריות לסינטזה מחשבית של ויכוח יעיל. במחקר נתנו 26 מומחים לסינטזיה טקסטים טיעונים עם אסטרטגיות שונות עבור 10 נושאים. אנחנו מוצאים שהמומחים מסכימים בבחירה הרבה יותר כשעוקבים אחרי אותה אסטרטגיה. למרות שהטקסטים שונים במיוחד לאסטרטגיות שונות, במיוחד ההסדר שלהם נשאר יציב. התוצאות מציעות שהמודל שלנו מאפשר סינטזה אסטרטגית.', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་མཚོན་རྟགས་གཅིག་ནི་ཁྱད་དུ་འཚམས་པའི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་ཀྱི་སྐོར་རྟགས་གཅིག་པ་ལས་ཉར་རྒྱུ་བྱུང་། དེ་ལས། སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ་བྱེད་སྟངས་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་དཔོན་རིམ་ཞིག་དང་། འུ་ཅག་གིས་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་སྲུང་སྐྱོབ་ཞིག་འདིས་སེལ་འཐུ་བྱེད་དང་། སྒྲིག་སྟངས་དང་ཕུར འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་སྒྲུབ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་ཕྱོགས་ཀྱི་མཐར་འཁོར་སྐྱོད་དང་། ལྟ་བ་ཞིག་གིས་བརྗོད་ཐོག་ནང་ང་ཚོས་དགའ་ཕྱོགས་26ཡིས་གཏོང་གི་ཚིག་རྣམས་སྦྱར་བ་འདུག ངལ་རྩོལ་བ་ཚོས་སྐྱོན་པ་ཚོས་གདམ་ཀ་འདིའི་ནང་གི་ཐབས་ལམ་གཅིག་དང་རྗེས་སུ་གཏོང་དགོས་པར་གནང་བ་ ཡི་གེའི་ནང་དུ་ཡི་གེའི་ཁྱད་པར་སྒྲིག་འགོད་མི་འདྲ་བ་དང་། ཁྱད་པར་ཁོང་ཚོའི་གོ་སྟངས་རྫན་ནམ་མེད། རྐྱེན་འབྲས་བ་དག་གི་མ་དབྱིབས་དཔྱད་སྒྲུབ་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཞིག་ལ་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ་རེད།', 'jv': 'Perverses Rasane, dadi sing paling kelas nêmêr, dadi sing bakal kelas nêmêr, dadi sing beraksi luwih nêmêr lan kuwi tindakan. Awak dhéwé ngerti banjuré beraksi yang pisan, nguasar-ayan lan ngaweh sistem sing dibenakno sing dikarepaké awak dhéwé. Nang paper iki, kita model sing retorasi sistem sing dumadhining sistem komputer Nang alih sing, kita lho cara-cara sing luwih alam sing sampeyan luwih gambar ng seneng pisar sing sampeyan kanggo 10 tembaran Awak dhéwé luwih-luwih wong sabanjuré awak dhéwé ngerasah luwih basa nang sampeyan iki. Wurung-Wurung sing paling-paling nggambar kanggo kalah-arah sing sampeyan, supoyo sak ujaran sing beraksi. Rejalekan suggeruju kanggo model sing bisa nyelangan seneng pisan istratek.'}
{'en': 'Sequence-to-Sequence Learning for Task-oriented Dialogue with Dialogue State Representation', 'ar': 'التعلم من التسلسل إلى التسلسل للحوار الموجه نحو المهام مع تمثيل دولة الحوار', 'pt': 'Aprendizado de Sequência a Sequência para Diálogo Orientado a Tarefas com Representação de Estado de Diálogo', 'es': 'Aprendizaje secuencia a secuencia para un diálogo orientado a tareas con representación estatal de diálogo', 'fr': "Apprentissage séquentiel pour un dialogue axé sur les tâches avec représentation de l'état du dialogue", 'ja': 'タスク指向の対話のための順序から順序への学習対話の状態表現', 'zh': '向事序至序学与对语', 'hi': 'संवाद राज्य प्रतिनिधित्व के साथ कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद के लिए अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम अधिगम', 'ru': 'Последовательное обучение для ориентированного на задачу диалога с представлением состояния диалога', 'ga': 'Foghlaim Seicheamh-go-Seicheamh do Chomhphlé atá Dírithe ar Thasc agus Ionadaíocht Stáit Agallaimh', 'ka': 'დიალოგის სახელსაწყოთა რესენტაციათან დავალების დასაწყოთა დიალოგის შესწავლება', 'hu': 'Szekvencia-szekvencia tanulás feladatorientált párbeszéd a párbeszéd állam képviseletével', 'kk': 'Диалог күйін таңдау диалогының тапсырма бағытталған диалогының реттеу- және реттеу оқытуы', 'el': 'Μάθηση διαδοχής σε ακολουθία για διάλογο προσανατολισμένο στην εργασία με εκπροσώπηση κράτους διαλόγου', 'lt': 'Mokymasis iš eilės į eilę rengiant dialogą su dialogo valstybės atstovybe', 'it': 'Apprendimento sequenziale per il dialogo orientato alle attività con la rappresentanza dello Stato del dialogo', 'ml': 'ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് പ്രതിനിധി', 'mk': 'Учење од секвенција до секвенција за дијалог ориентиран на задачи со државна претстава на дијалогот', 'ms': 'Pelajaran Sequence-to-Sequence for Task-oriented Dialog with Dialog State Representation', 'mt': 'Tagħlim minn sekwenza għal sekwenza għal Djalogu orjentat lejn ix-Xogħol mar-Rappreżentanza tal-Istat tad-Djalogu', 'pl': 'Nauka sekwencyjna dla dialogu zorientowanego na zadania z reprezentacją państwa dialogu', 'mn': 'Диалог улс төрийн төлөөлөвлөгөөтэй ажлын төлөөлөгч диалогын дараагийн дараагийн дараагийн суралцах', 'no': 'Læring av sekvens til sekvens for oppgåveorientert dialogvindauge med dialogtilstand', 'ro': 'Învățarea secvențială la secvență pentru dialogul orientat spre sarcini cu reprezentanța statului dialogului', 'si': 'සංවාද ස්ථානය ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සඳහා වැඩක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථානය සඳහා වැඩක් ප්\u200dරතිස්ථාපනය සඳහා කාර්යා', 'sr': 'Naučenje sekvence do sekvence za dijalog orijentiran na zadatke sa predstavljanjem države dijaloga', 'so': 'QDialog', 'ta': 'வேலை திருப்திய உரையாடலுடன் உரையாடல் மாநிலை பார்வையுடன் கற்றுக் கொள்ள வேண்டும் வரிசை', 'ur': 'ٹاکس کی اورٹینٹ ڈیلوگ کے لئے سئکونس-تا-سئکونس سکونٹ سکونٹ', 'sv': 'Sekvens till sekvens lärande för arbetsinriktad dialog med dialogstatens representation', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Chương trình lập trình giáo dục', 'bg': 'Обучение последователност към последователност за ориентиран към задачите диалог с представителство на държавата в диалога', 'da': 'Sekvens-til-sekvens læring for opgaveorienteret dialog med dialogstatens repræsentation', 'hr': 'Naučenje sekvence do sekvence za dijalog orijentiran na zadatke s predstavljanjem države dijaloga', 'nl': 'Sequence-to-Sequence Leren voor taakgerichte dialoog met Dialoog State Representation', 'de': 'Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Lernen fĂ¼r den aufgabenorientierten Dialog mit DialogzustandsreprĂ¤sentation', 'id': 'Pelajaran Sequence-to-Sequence untuk Dialog Orientasi-Tugas dengan Perwakilan Negara Dialog', 'ko': '대화 상태 표징을 바탕으로 하는 임무형 대화 순서 대순 학습', 'fa': 'یادگیری سعادت به سعادت برای محاورۀ مسیر کار با نمایش وضعیت محاورۀ محاورۀ', 'sw': 'Kujifunza kwa mfululizo wa pili kwa ajili ya mazungumzo ya kazi na Taifa ya Uwakilishi', 'tr': 'Görev Görniş Görniş Dialogy üçin yzlanma-täsirli öwrenmek', 'af': 'Sequence- to- sequence Learning for Task- oriented Dialog with Dialog State Representation', 'sq': 'Mësimi nga sekuenca në sekuencë për dialogun e orientuar në detyrë me përfaqësimin e shtetit të dialogut', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'hy': 'Հաջորդականություն-հաջորդականություն սովորելու խնդիրների վրա ուղղությամբ խոսակցության համար', 'bn': 'ডায়ালগ রাষ্ট্রীয় প্রতিনিধিত্বের সাথে কাজের প্রতিনিধিত্বের জন্য কেন্দ্র-থেকে সেকেন্ড শিক্ষা শিক্ষা', 'ca': 'Aprendiment de secuencia a secuencia per diàleg orientat a les tasques amb representació estatal del diàleg', 'cs': 'Sekvence-to-Sekvence učení pro úkolově orientovaný dialog se zastoupením dialogu', 'bs': 'Naučenje sekvence do sekvence za dijalog orijentiran na zadatke sa predstavljanjem države dijaloga', 'et': 'Järjest järjestusse õppimine ülesandepõhiseks dialoogiks dialoogi riigi esindusega', 'fi': 'Sequence-to-Sequence Learning for Task-oriented Dialogue with Dialogue State Representation', 'az': 'Dənaloğu Eyalet İşləri Göstüyü ilə Gözəl Göstüyü Dənaloğu üçün Sequence-to-Sequence Öyrənməsi', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Učenje zaporedja v zaporedje za dialog, usmerjen v naloge, s predstavništvom države v dialogu', 'jv': 'Seyense-to-Seyense Learning for task-Orientation Dialog with Dialog state representation', 'he': 'לימוד רצף-לרצף לדיולוג ממוקד למשימות עם מייצג מדינת הדיולוג', 'bo': 'sequence-to-sequence Learning for Task-oriented Dialog with Dialog State Representation'}
{'en': 'Classic pipeline models for task-oriented dialogue system require explicit modeling the dialogue states and hand-crafted action spaces to query a domain-specific knowledge base. Conversely, sequence-to-sequence models learn to map dialogue history to the response in current turn without explicit knowledge base querying. In this work, we propose a novel framework that leverages the advantages of classic pipeline and sequence-to-sequence models. Our framework models a dialogue state as a fixed-size distributed representation and use this representation to query a knowledge base via an attention mechanism. Experiment on Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset shows that our framework significantly outperforms other sequence-to-sequence based baseline models on both automatic and human evaluation.', 'ar': 'تتطلب نماذج خطوط الأنابيب الكلاسيكية لنظام الحوار الموجه نحو المهام نمذجة واضحة لحالات الحوار ومساحات العمل المصنوعة يدويًا للاستعلام عن قاعدة المعرفة الخاصة بالمجال. على العكس من ذلك ، تتعلم نماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل تعيين سجل الحوار للاستجابة في الدور الحالي دون استعلام قاعدة المعرفة الصريحة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح إطار عمل جديدًا يستفيد من مزايا خطوط الأنابيب الكلاسيكية ونماذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل. يقوم إطار العمل الخاص بنا بنمذجة حالة الحوار كتمثيل موزع بحجم ثابت واستخدام هذا التمثيل للاستعلام عن قاعدة معرفية عبر آلية انتباه. تُظهر التجربة على مجموعة بيانات الحوار متعددة الأدوار والموجهة نحو المهام في ستانفورد أن إطار عملنا يتفوق بشكل كبير على النماذج الأساسية الأخرى القائمة على التسلسل إلى التسلسل في كل من التقييم التلقائي والبشري.', 'pt': 'Modelos de pipeline clássicos para sistema de diálogo orientado a tarefas requerem modelagem explícita dos estados de diálogo e espaços de ação feitos à mão para consultar uma base de conhecimento específica do domínio. Por outro lado, os modelos de sequência a sequência aprendem a mapear o histórico do diálogo para a resposta no turno atual sem consulta explícita da base de conhecimento. Neste trabalho, propomos uma nova estrutura que aproveita as vantagens dos modelos clássicos de pipeline e sequência a sequência. Nosso framework modela um estado de diálogo como uma representação distribuída de tamanho fixo e usa essa representação para consultar uma base de conhecimento por meio de um mecanismo de atenção. A experiência com o Conjunto de Dados de Diálogo Orientado a Tarefas Multi-turn e Multidomínio de Stanford mostra que nossa estrutura supera significativamente outros modelos de linha de base baseados em sequência a sequência na avaliação automática e humana.', 'es': 'Los modelos clásicos de canalización para el sistema de diálogo orientado a tareas requieren un modelado explícito de los estados de diálogo y espacios de acción hechos a mano para consultar una base de conocimientos específica del dominio. Por el contrario, los modelos secuencia a secuencia aprenden a mapear el historial de diálogos con la respuesta en el turno actual sin necesidad de realizar consultas explícitas a la base de conocimientos. En este trabajo, proponemos un marco novedoso que aprovecha las ventajas de los modelos clásicos de canalización y secuencia a secuencia. Nuestro marco modela un estado de diálogo como una representación distribuida de tamaño fijo y utiliza esta representación para consultar una base de conocimientos a través de un mecanismo de atención. El experimento en Stanford Multi-Turn Multi-domain Task Oriented Dialogue Dataset muestra que nuestro marco supera significativamente a otros modelos de referencia basados secuencia a secuencia en la evaluación automática y humana.', 'fr': "Les modèles de pipeline classiques pour les systèmes de dialogue orientés tâches nécessitent une modélisation explicite des états de dialogue et des espaces d'action conçus à la main pour interroger une base de connaissances spécifique à un domaine. Inversement, les modèles séquence à séquence apprennent à associer l'historique des dialogues à la réponse dans le tour en cours sans requérir explicitement la base de connaissances. Dans ce travail, nous proposons un nouveau cadre qui tire parti des avantages des modèles classiques de pipeline et de séquence à séquence. Notre structure modélise un état de dialogue sous la forme d'une représentation distribuée de taille fixe et utilise cette représentation pour interroger une base de connaissances via un mécanisme d'attention. L'expérience sur le jeu de données de dialogue orienté tâche multi-domaines multi-tours de Stanford montre que notre framework surpasse de manière significative les autres modèles de référence basés séquence à séquence en termes d'évaluation automatique et humaine.", 'ja': 'タスク指向のダイアログシステムの古典的なパイプラインモデルは、ドメイン固有のナレッジベースを照会するために、ダイアログの状態と手作業で作成されたアクションスペースを明示的にモデリングする必要があります。逆に、シーケンスツーシーケンスモデルは、明示的な知識ベースクエリなしに、現在のターンで応答にダイアログ履歴をマッピングすることを学ぶ。本作では、古典的なパイプラインモデルとシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルの利点を活用した斬新なフレームワークを提案する。私たちのフレームワークは、固定サイズの分散表現として対話状態をモデル化し、この表現を使用して注意メカニズムを介してナレッジベースを照会します。Stanford Multi - turn Multi - domain Task - oriented Dialogue Datasetの実験は、自動評価と人間評価の両方で、当社のフレームワークが他のシーケンスツーシーケンスベースベースラインモデルを大幅に上回っていることを示しています。', 'zh': '向之对统经管形显式建模须对话、手工操作之间,以询特定于域之知识库。 反是,序及序学历史记录映射应时,无所显式知识库问。 于此等事,发一新框架,宜框架因经管序之势。 吾框架以言建模为分布式,以问知识库。 斯坦福多回合多领数集上之实验,吾框架自与人工评事,皆显优于他基线。', 'hi': 'कार्य-उन्मुख संवाद प्रणाली के लिए क्लासिक पाइपलाइन मॉडल को डोमेन-विशिष्ट ज्ञान आधार को क्वेरी करने के लिए संवाद राज्यों और हाथ से तैयार किए गए एक्शन स्पेस को स्पष्ट रूप से मॉडलिंग की आवश्यकता होती है। इसके विपरीत, अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल स्पष्ट ज्ञान आधार क्वेरी के बिना वर्तमान मोड़ में प्रतिक्रिया के लिए संवाद इतिहास को मैप करना सीखते हैं। इस काम में, हम एक उपन्यास ढांचे का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो क्लासिक पाइपलाइन और अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल के लाभों का लाभ उठाता है। हमारा ढांचा एक निश्चित आकार के वितरित प्रतिनिधित्व के रूप में एक संवाद राज्य को मॉडल करता है और इस प्रतिनिधित्व का उपयोग एक ध्यान तंत्र के माध्यम से ज्ञान के आधार को क्वेरी करने के लिए करता है। स्टैनफोर्ड मल्टी-टर्न मल्टी-डोमेन टास्क-ओरिएंटेड डायलॉग डेटासेट पर प्रयोग से पता चलता है कि हमारा ढांचा स्वचालित और मानव मूल्यांकन दोनों पर अन्य अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम आधारित बेसलाइन मॉडल को काफी हद तक बेहतर बनाता है।', 'ru': 'Классические модели конвейеров для системы диалога, ориентированной на решение конкретных задач, требуют четкого моделирования состояний диалога и созданных вручную пространств действий для запроса базы знаний, специфичной для конкретной области. И наоборот, модели последовательности к последовательности учатся сопоставлять историю диалога с ответом в текущем повороте без явного запроса базы знаний. В этой работе мы предлагаем новую структуру, которая использует преимущества классических моделей трубопроводов и последовательностей. Наша структура моделирует состояние диалога как распределенное представление фиксированного размера и использует это представление для запроса базы знаний через механизм внимания. Эксперимент по многовитковому многодоменному ориентированному на задачи диалоговому набору данных Стэнфорда показывает, что наша структура значительно превосходит другие базовые модели, основанные на последовательности к последовательности, как на автоматической оценке, так и на оценке человеком.', 'ga': 'Teastaíonn samhlacha píblíne clasaiceacha le haghaidh córas comhphlé tasc-dhírithe ar shamhaltú sainráite ar na stáit idirphlé agus ar spásanna gníomhaíochta lámhcheardaithe chun bonn eolais a bhaineann go sonrach le fearann a fhiosrú. Os a choinne sin, foghlaimíonn samhlacha seicheamh-go-seicheamh conas stair idirphlé a mhapáil ar an bhfreagra ina dhiaidh sin gan aon cheistiú follasach ar bhonn eolais. Sa obair seo, molaimid creat nua a ghiaráil na buntáistí a bhaineann le samhlacha clasaiceacha píblíne agus seicheamh go seicheamh. Múnlaíonn ár gcreat staid idirphlé mar léiriú dáilte ar mhéid seasta agus úsáidtear an léiriú seo chun bonn eolais a fhiosrú trí mheicníocht aird. Léiríonn turgnamh ar Thacar Sonraí Comhphlé Il-fearainn Tasc-dhírithe Il-uaine Stanford go sáraíonn ár gcreat samhlacha bonnlíne eile atá bunaithe ar sheicheamh go seicheamh ar mheastóireacht uathoibríoch agus daonna araon.', 'ka': 'Name შეცდომად, sequence-to-sequence მოდელები შესწავლობენ დიალოგის ისტორიას მიმდინარე შეცდომაზე გადასწავლობენ, რომელიც არაფერი იცნობის ბაზის კითხვა. ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ პრომენტის პრომენტის ფრამეტრი, რომელიც კლასიკური პრომენტის და სკენესკენესკენესკენესკენესკენესკენესკენესკენესკენ ჩვენი ფრამეტური მოდელები დიალოგის ღირება როგორც განსაზღვრებული განსაზღვრება და გამოიყენება ამ გამოსახულებას, რომ ცნობიერების ბაზის შესახებ აღმოჩენოთ მონიშ სტანფორდის მრავალემენტი დავალების დიალოგის მონაცემების გამოცდილობა ჩვენი ფრამეტრი მნიშვნელოვანია, რომ ჩვენი ფრამეტრი სხვა მონაცემების მნიშვნელოვანი მოდელები ორივე ავტომატიკური და ადამიანი', 'hu': 'A feladatorientált párbeszédrendszerekhez használt klasszikus csővezeték-modellek a párbeszédállapotok és a kézzel készített műveleti terek explicit modellezését igénylik egy tartományspecifikus tudásbázis lekérdezéséhez. Ezzel szemben a szekvencia-sorrend modellek megtanulják feltérképezni a párbeszédelőzményeket az aktuális fordulóban adott válaszhoz, kifejezett tudásbázis lekérdezés nélkül. Ebben a munkában olyan új keretrendszert javasolunk, amely kihasználja a klasszikus csővezeték és szekvencia-szekvencia modellek előnyeit. Keretrendszerünk rögzített méretű elosztott reprezentációként modellezi a párbeszédállapotot, és ezt a reprezentációt arra használja, hogy egy figyelemmechanizmus segítségével lekérdezzen egy tudásbázist. A Stanford Multi-Turn Multi-Domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset kísérletei azt mutatják, hogy keretrendszerünk jelentősen felülmúlja a többi szekvencia alapú alapmodellt mind az automatikus, mind az emberi értékelés során.', 'el': 'Τα κλασικά μοντέλα αγωγών για σύστημα διαλόγου προσανατολισμένο στην εργασία απαιτούν ρητή μοντελοποίηση των καταστάσεων διαλόγου και των χειροποίητων χώρων δράσης για να αναζητήσετε μια βάση γνώσεων συγκεκριμένου τομέα. Αντίθετα, τα μοντέλα αλληλουχίας σε αλληλουχία μαθαίνουν να αντιστοιχούν το ιστορικό διαλόγου στην απάντηση στην τρέχουσα στροφή χωρίς ρητές ερωτήσεις βάσης γνώσεων. Στην εργασία αυτή, προτείνουμε ένα νέο πλαίσιο που αξιοποιεί τα πλεονεκτήματα των κλασικών μοντέλων σωληνώσεων και ακολουθίας-ακολουθίας. Το πλαίσιο μας μοντελοποιεί μια κατάσταση διαλόγου ως μια κατανεμημένη αναπαράσταση σταθερού μεγέθους και χρησιμοποιεί αυτή την αναπαράσταση για να εξετάσει μια βάση γνώσεων μέσω ενός μηχανισμού προσοχής. Το πείραμα στο σύνολο δεδομένων διαλόγου πολλαπλών στροφών στο Στάνφορντ δείχνει ότι το πλαίσιο μας ξεπερνά σημαντικά άλλα μοντέλα βάσης βασισμένα σε ακολουθία σε ακολουθία τόσο στην αυτόματη όσο και στην ανθρώπινη αξιολόγηση.', 'it': "I modelli classici di pipeline per il sistema di dialogo orientato alle attività richiedono una modellazione esplicita degli stati di dialogo e degli spazi d'azione creati a mano per interrogare una base di conoscenze specifica del dominio. Al contrario, i modelli sequenza-sequenza imparano a mappare la cronologia dei dialoghi alla risposta a turno corrente senza interrogare esplicitamente la base di conoscenze. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un nuovo framework che sfrutta i vantaggi dei classici modelli pipeline e sequenza-sequenza. Il nostro framework modella uno stato di dialogo come rappresentazione distribuita a dimensione fissa e usa questa rappresentazione per interrogare una base di conoscenza tramite un meccanismo di attenzione. Esperimento su Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset mostra che il nostro framework supera significativamente altri modelli di base basati su sequenza a sequenza sia sulla valutazione automatica che umana.", 'lt': 'Klasiškiems į užduotis orientuotos dialogo sistemos vamzdynų modeliams reikia aiškiai modeliuoti dialogo būkles ir rankinius veiksmų erdves, kad būtų galima paklausti konkrečiai sričiai skirtos žinių bazės. Priešingai, iš eilės į eilę modeliai mokosi nukreipti dialogo istoriją į atsaką dabartiniu metu be aiškių žinių bazės klausimų. Šiame darbe siūlome naują sistemą, kuria būtų naudojami klasikinių vamzdynų ir sekos modelių privalumai. Mūsų pagrindų modeliai yra dialogo būklė kaip fiksuoto dydžio paskirstytas atstovavimas ir naudoja šį atstovavimą, kad būtų galima kreiptis į žinių bazę per dėmesio mechanizmą. Eksperimentas dėl Stanfordo kelių sričių dialogo duomenų rinkinio, orientuoto į užduotis, rodo, kad mūsų sistema gerokai viršija kitus iš eilės į eilę pagrįstus pradinius modelius tiek automatiniu, tiek žmogaus vertinimu.', 'kk': 'Тапсырма бағытталған диалог жүйесінің классикалық түйінгі үлгілері диалог күйін мен қолмен құрылған әрекеттер бос орындарын доменге ерекше білім негізін сұрау үшін керек. Осымен қатар, таңдалған мәлімет негізгі сұраныс жоқ, диалог журналына жауап беру үлгілері көрсетіледі. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, классикалық конепциялық және реттеу үлгілерінің артықшылығын көмектесетін романдық қоршауын ұсынамыз. Біздің қоршау үлгілеріміз диалогтың күйі, бұл үлгілерді бөлшектелген түрлі өлшемі ретінде, білім негізін механизмі арқылы сұрау үшін қолданыңыз. Стенфорд көп- аударылған көп- доменге көп- аударылған тапсырмалар диалог деректер бағдарламасы, қоршауымыз автоматты түрде және адамдардың оқиғаларына негізгі негізгі үлгілерді басқа реттерге негізгі түрде жасайд', 'mk': 'Класичните нафтоводски модели за системот на дијалог ориентиран на задачите бараат експлицитно моделирање на состојбите на дијалогот и рачно направени простори за акција за да се побара база на знаење специфична за домен. Напротив, моделите од секвенца до секвенца учат да ја мапираат историјата на дијалогот на одговорот во тековниот ред без експлицитно прашање на базата на знаење. Во оваа работа, предложуваме нова рамка која ги искористува предностите на класичните гасоводи и моделите од секвенца до секвенца. Нашиот рамковен модел е дијалошка состојба како фиксна дистрибуирана репрезентација и користи ја оваа репрезентација за да побараш база на знаење преку механизам на внимание. Експериментот на Стенфорд Multi-turn Multi-domain Task Oriented Dialogue Dataset покажува дека нашата рамка значително ги надминува другите основни модели базирани на секвенца на автоматска и човечка проценка.', 'ms': 'Model paip klasik untuk sistem dialog orientasi tugas memerlukan pemodelan secara eksplicit keadaan dialog dan ruang tindakan buatan-tangan untuk tanya asas pengetahuan spesifik domain. Sebaliknya, model jujukan-ke-jujukan belajar untuk peta sejarah dialog kepada balasan pada giliran semasa tanpa tanya pangkalan pengetahuan secara eksplicit. Dalam kerja ini, kami melamar kerangka baru yang menggunakan keuntungan dari saluran paip klasik dan model urutan-ke-urutan. Our framework models a dialogue state as a fixed-size distributed representation and use this representation to query a knowledge base via an attention mechanism.  Eksperimen pada Set Data Dialog Berhenti-Berhenti-Berhenti-Berhenti-Berhenti-Berhenti-Berhenti-Berhenti-Berhenti Stanford menunjukkan bahawa kerangka kita secara signifikan melebihi model dasar lain berdasarkan jujukan-ke-jujukan pada penilaian automatik dan manusia.', 'mt': 'Il-mudelli klassiċi tal-pipeline għas-sistema ta’ djalogu orjentata lejn ix-xogħol jeħtieġu mudell espliċitu tal-istati tad-djalogu u l-ispazji ta’ azzjoni maħduma bl-idejn biex jitolbu bażi ta’ għarfien speċifika għad-dominju. Għall-kuntrarju, il-mudelli minn sekwenza għal sekwenza jitgħallmu jimmappjaw l-istorja tad-djalogu għar-rispons min-naħa attwali mingħajr mistoqsijiet espliċiti dwar il-bażi tal-għarfien. F’dan ix-xogħol, qed nipproponu qafas ġdid li jiġġenera l-vantaġġi tal-mudelli klassiċi ta’ pipeline u sequence-to-sequence. Il-mudelli ta’ qafas tagħna huma stat ta’ djalogu bħala rappreżentanza distribwita ta’ daqs fiss u jużaw din ir-rappreżentanza biex jistaqsu bażi ta’ għarfien permezz ta’ mekkaniżmu ta’ attenzjoni. L-esperiment dwar is-Sett ta’ Dejta ta’ Djalogu Multidirezzjonali orjentat lejn ix-Xogħol ta’ Stanford juri li l-qafas tagħna huwa sinifikattivament akbar minn mudelli bażiċi oħra bbażati fuq sekwenza għal sekwenza kemm fuq evalwazzjoni awtomatika kif ukoll fuq il-bniedem.', 'mn': 'Тапсын ориентиролт диалог системийн классик хоолойн загварууд диалог байр суурь болон гар бүтээсэн үйл явц загваруудыг тодорхойлох шаардлагатай. Ялангуяа, дарааллаас дарааллын загварууд тодорхой мэдлэгтэй суурь суралцахгүй хариултын түүхийг газрын зураг зурж суралцдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид классик хоолойн шугам, дарааллын дарааллын загварын ашиг ашиглан шинэ хэлбэрийг санал болгож байна. Бидний хэмжээний загварын загвар нь тодорхой хэмжээтэй хуваагдсан загварын төлөвлөгөө болгож, энэ загварыг анхаарал төлөвлөгөөний механизм аргаар мэдлэг суурь шалгахад ашигладаг. Стэнфорд олон-холбоотой олон-холбоотой даалгавартай диалог өгөгдлийн сангуудын туршилт нь бидний хэлбэрээр автоматик болон хүн төрөлхтний оюутнууд дээр бусад дарааллаар дарааллаар суурь шугам загваруудын үндсэн загварууды', 'ml': 'ജോലി തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് സിസ്റ്റത്തിനുള്ള ക്ലാസിക് പൈപ്പെലൈന്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റുകളും കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളു മറ്റൊരു സാധാരണയായാല്\u200d, വ്യക്തമായ അറിവുള്ള ബേസ് ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യാതിരിക്കുന്ന ഡയലോഗ് ചരിത്രം മാപ്പ് ചെയ്യാന്\u200d പഠിക്ക ഈ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു നോവല്\u200d ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് പ്രാദോപ്പ് ചെയ്യുന്നു. അത് ക്ലാസിക് പൈപ്പെലിന്\u200dറെയും സെക്കന്\u200dസ്  നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമ്പോര്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു ഡയലോഗ് സ്റ്റേറ്റ് രാജ്യം നിശ്ചയിച്ച വലിപ്പം വിതരണ പ്രതിനിധിയായി ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു.  സ്റ്റാന്\u200dഫോര്\u200dഡില്\u200d പല- ടൈന്\u200d ടാസ്ക്- മാറ്റി ഡയലോഗ് ഡേറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ പരീക്ഷണം കാണിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ ഫ്രെയിമോര്\u200dക്ക് വേറെ സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മാത', 'no': 'Name Sammenlignet lærer sequence-to-sequence-modeller å kartera dialoghistorien til svaret i gjeldande område utan eksplisitt kunnskapsbasespørjing. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit nytt rammeverk som leverer fordelene av klassiske rørslinjer og sekvens-til-sekvensmodeller. Våre rammemodeller er eit dialogtilstand som eit fast storleik distribuert representasjon og bruk denne representasjonen for å spørja eit kunnskapsbasen via ein oppmerksmekanisme. Experiment on Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialog Dataset viser at vårt rammeverk utfører betydelig andre baseline-modeller som er basert på sequence-to-sequence på både automatisk og menneskelig evaluering.', 'pl': 'Klasyczne modele rurociągów dla systemu dialogu zorientowanego na zadania wymagają jednoznacznego modelowania stanów dialogu i ręcznie tworzonych przestrzeni działania w celu zapytania bazy wiedzy specyficznej dla danej domeny. Odwrotnie modele sekwencji do sekwencji uczą się mapować historię dialogu do odpowiedzi w bieżącej kolejce bez wyraźnego zapytania bazy wiedzy. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy nowatorski framework, który wykorzystuje zalety klasycznych modeli rurociągu i sekwencji-do-sekwencji. Nasz framework modeluje stan dialogu jako reprezentację rozproszoną o stałej wielkości i używa tej reprezentacji do zapytania bazy wiedzy za pomocą mechanizmu uwagi. Eksperyment na Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset pokazuje, że nasz framework znacznie przewyższa inne modele bazowe oparte na sekwencji, zarówno na automatycznej, jak i ludzkiej ocenie.', 'ro': 'Modelele clasice de conducte pentru sistemul de dialog orientat spre sarcini necesită modelarea explicită a stărilor de dialog și a spațiilor de acțiune create manual pentru a interoga o bază de cunoștințe specifică domeniului. Dimpotrivă, modelele secvență-la-secvență învață să mapeze istoricul dialogurilor la răspunsul curent, fără interogarea explicită a bazei de cunoștințe. În această lucrare, propunem un cadru nou care valorifică avantajele modelelor clasice de conducte și secvență-la-secvență. Cadrul nostru modelează o stare de dialog ca o reprezentare distribuită de dimensiuni fixe și folosește această reprezentare pentru a interoga o bază de cunoștințe printr-un mecanism de atenție. Experimentul pe Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset arată că cadrul nostru depășește semnificativ alte modele de bază bazate pe secvență la secvență, atât pe evaluarea automată, cât și pe cea umană.', 'so': "Tusaalada sawirada ee fasax ah ee ku qoran nidaamka diyaarinta shaqada waxay u baahan yihiin tusaale cad oo ku sawiraya wadamada dialogka iyo meelaha ay gacanta ku shaqeeyaan si ay wax u weydiinaan aasaaska aqoonta gaar ah ee gudaha. Conversely, sequence-to-sequence models learn to map dialogue history to the response in current turn without explicit knowledge base querying.  Markaas waxan, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa firaaqad warqada ah oo kordhiya faa'iidada dhaqaalaha kalsiqiga iyo tusaalaha isbedelka. Shaqooyinkayada ayaa sameynaya dowlad dialogue ah oo ah mid u kala qaybsan qaab adag ah, waxaadna u isticmaaleysa qaabilsan si aad u weydiisato aasaaska aqoonta si ay u weydiisato mechanism aad taxadar u leedahay. Imtixaanka ku saabsan jardiinada cashuurta ee Stanford Multi-Domain ee loo soo jeeday waxay muuqataa in firaaqadeenu aad iyo aad u muuqato samooyin kale oo ku saleysan midab-labaad oo lagu qoray sameynta qaababka hoose ee bilowga ah iyo qiimeynta biniaadaba.", 'sr': 'Klasični modeli pipeline za sistem dijaloga orijentiranog na zadatke zahtevaju eksplicitno modeliranje stanja dijaloga i prostora akcije koje su napravljene rukama da bi se ispitivali baza znanja specifičnog domena. U suprotnom, modeli sekvence do sekvence nauče mapirati povijest dijaloga na odgovor u trenutnom okviru bez objašnjenja pitanja baze znanja. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi okvir koji utiče na prednost klasičnog naftovoda i modela sekvence do sekvence. Naši okvirni modeli dijalog država kao određena veličina raspodjeljena predstavljanja i koristi ovu predstavljanje da bi ispitivali bazu znanja putem mehanizma pažnje. Eksperiment o multi-domenijskom podacima o dijalogu s orientacijama multidomenijskih zadataka pokazuje da naš okvir značajno iznosi druge osnovne modele bazirane na sekvenci na sekvenci i na automatsku i ljudsku procjenu.', 'sv': 'Klassiska pipeline-modeller för uppgiftsorienterat dialogsystem kräver explicit modellering av dialogtillstånd och handgjorda åtgärdsområden för att fråga en domänspecifik kunskapsbas. Omvänt lär sig sekvens-till-sekvensmodeller att kartlägga dialoghistoriken till svaret i nuvarande tur utan att uttryckligen fråga i kunskapsbasen. I detta arbete föreslår vi ett nytt ramverk som utnyttjar fördelarna med klassiska pipeline- och sekvensmodeller. Vårt ramverk modellerar ett dialogtillstånd som en distribuerad representation i fast storlek och använder denna representation för att fråga en kunskapsbas via en uppmärksamhetsmekanism. Experiment på Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset visar att vårt ramverk avsevärt överträffar andra sekvens-till-sekvensbaserade baslinjemodeller på både automatisk och mänsklig utvärdering.', 'si': 'Name වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, sequence-to-sequence මොඩල් ඉගෙන ගන්නේ සංවාදය ඉතිහාසය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවට ප්\u200dරතික්\u200d මේ වැඩේ අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා ක්\u200dරියාත්මක පායිප්ලින් සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් කරනවා. අපේ පරීක්ෂක මෝඩල් සංවාදයක් ස්ථිර ප්\u200dරමාණයක් විතරයි ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වගේ සංවාදය ස්ථිර ප්\u200dරමාණයක් වගේ සං ස්ටැන්ෆෝර්ඩ් Multi-turn Multi-domain ක්\u200dරියාව-ප්\u200dරමාණය සංවාදය දත්ත සංවාදය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ සංවාදය විශේෂයෙන් අනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරමාණය-to-sequence අධික', 'ur': 'تابع-oriented диалог سیسٹم کے لئے کلاسیک پائپ لین موڈل کے لئے صریح موڈلینگ کی ضرورت ہے کہ диалог کی حالت اور ہاتھ-کرفٹ کی اقدام کی جگہ ایک ڈومین-خاص علم بنسس کے سوال کریں. بغیر اس کے، سفارشی-تا-سفارشی موڈل مکاپیٹ تاریخ کی مکاپیٹ کی سیکھتے ہیں، حالانکہ سفارشی علم بنسٹ سوال کے بغیر اس کے جواب میں سفارشی کریں. اس کام میں ہم ایک نو فرمیک پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں جو کلاسیک پائیپ لین اور سطح سے سطح کی مدل کا فائدہ اضافہ کرتا ہے۔ ہمارے فرمیٹ موڈل ایک دیالوگ کی حالت کو ایک مضبوط اندازہ کے طور پر تقسیم کیا گیا ہے اور اس نمونات کو ایک سمجھنے کی بنیاد کے ذریعہ سوال کرنے کے لئے استعمال کریں۔ Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialog Dataset پر تجربہ دکھاتا ہے کہ ہمارا فرمود ایک دوسری سطح-to-sequence بنسټ لین موڈل کو اتماٹی اور انسان کی ارزیابی پر زیادہ اضافہ کرتا ہے.', 'ta': 'செயல் முறைமையில் செலுத்தப்பட்ட உரையாடல் முறைமைக்கான சிறந்த பைப்பெல்லின் மாதிரிகள் தேவைப்படும் உரையாடல் நாடுகள் மற்றும் கைமுறை செய மாறாக, வரிசையில் இருந்து தொடர்ச்சி மாதிரிகள் தற்போதைய முறையில் உள்ள விடையை வரைபடத்திற்கான உரையாடல் வரலாற்றிற்கு கற் இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய சட்டத்தை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். அது கிளாசிக் பைப்லைன் விருப்பங்கள் மற்றும் பின்வரிசை மாத எங்கள் சட்டத்தின் மாதிரி ஒரு உரையாடல் நிலையை நிறைவேற்ற அளவு பங்கீட்டு பிரதிநிதியாக்கி இந்த குறிப்பிட்ட பிரதிநியோ ஸ்டான்போர்டின் பல- முறை பல- domain பணி செயல்பாட்டு திசையாக்கப்பட்ட உரையாடல் தகவல் அமைப்பு சோதனையை காட்டுகிறது எங்கள் சட்டத்தை முக்கியமாக மற்ற சட்டத்திற்கு அடிப', 'uz': "Name Ikkilamchi tugmalar birikmasi Bu ishda, biz klassik pipeline va seksirlik modellarini qo'llab qo'yish uchun novel freymini anglatamiz. Bizning freymlarimiz muloqat holati taʼminlovchi darajasi sifatida taʼminot bazasini foydalanish va foydalanish Stanford Multi- tur multi- domen vazifa muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat muloqat taʼminlovchi muloqat maʼlumotlar satrini koʻrsatish mumkin. Ushbu freymmiz avtomatik va inson qiymatlari haqida boshqa chegara va seksirlik modellarini bajaradi.", 'vi': 'Những mô hình đường ống cổ điển cho hệ thống thoại hướng dẫn nhiệm vụ đòi hỏi người mẫu rõ ràng của các bang hội thoại và các khoảng hành động tự thủ công để truy vấn một căn cứ hiểu biết cụ thể miền. Ngược lại, các mô- trình-tới-trình tự học cách vạch bản đồ lịch sử đối với các phản ứng hiện thời mà không cần phải hỏi về căn cứ kiến thức rõ ràng. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một cơ sở mới nắm bắt lợi thế của các mô hình đường ống cổ điển và chuỗi-tới-trình. Các mô hình khung của chúng ta, một trạng thái đối thoại như mô tả phân phối kích thước cố định, và sử dụng nó để truy vấn một căn cứ kiến thức qua một cơ chế tập trung. Thí nghiệm trên hệ thống truy cập đa miền Stanford Bố thí cho thấy cơ sở của chúng ta hoàn thiện nhiều thứ hơn những mô hình cơ bản dựa trên cả tự động lẫn con người.', 'bg': 'Класическите модели на тръбопроводи за ориентирана към задачите диалогова система изискват изрично моделиране на състоянието на диалога и ръчно изработени пространства за действие, за да се направи заявка за специфична за домейн база знания. Обратно, моделите последователност към последователност се научават да картографират историята на диалоговия диалог към отговора в текущия ред без изрично запитване на базата от знания. В тази работа предлагаме нова рамка, която използва предимствата на класическите модели за тръбопроводи и последователност към последователност. Нашата рамка моделира състояние на диалог като разпределено представяне с фиксиран размер и използва това представяне, за да зададе запитване на база от знания чрез механизъм за внимание. Експериментът на Станфорд Многодомейнен диалогов набор от данни показва, че нашата рамка значително превъзхожда други базови модели, базирани на последователност по последователност, както при автоматична, така и при човешка оценка.', 'hr': 'Klasični modeli cijevi za sustav dijaloga usmjeren na zadatke zahtijevaju pojasno modeliranje stanja dijaloga i mjesta djelovanja koje su napravljene rukama kako bi se ispitivali baza znanja specifičnog domena. U suprotnom, modeli sekvence do sekvence nauče mapirati povijest dijaloga na odgovor u trenutnom okviru bez objašnjenja pitanja baze znanja. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi okvir koji utječe na prednost klasičnih modela cijevi i sekvencije. Naši okvirni modeli dijalog država kao određena veličina raspodjeljena predstavljanja i koristi taj predstavljanje kako bi se zahtijevala baza znanja putem mehanizma pažnje. Eksperiment o multidomeničkim podacima o dijalogu usmjerenim na višedomenički zadaci pokazuje da naš okvir značajno iznosi druge osnovne modele osnovne na sekvenciji bazirane na sekvenciji i na automatsku i ljudsku procjenu.', 'da': 'Klassiske pipeline modeller til opgaveorienteret dialogsystem kræver eksplicit modellering af dialogtilstande og håndlavede handlingsrum for at forespørge en domænespecifik vidensbase. Omvendt lærer sekvens-til-sekvens modeller at kortlægge dialoghistorik til svaret i nuværende sving uden eksplicit videnbase forespørgsler. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en ny ramme, der udnytter fordelene ved klassiske pipeline- og sekvens-to-sekvensmodeller. Vores ramme modellerer en dialogtilstand som en distribueret repræsentation i fast størrelse og bruger denne repræsentation til at forespørge en vidensbase via en opmærksomhedsmekanisme. Eksperimenter med Stanford Multi-Turn Multi-Domain Opgaveorienteret Dialogue Datasæt viser, at vores framework betydeligt overgår andre sekvens-til-sekvensbaserede baseline modeller på både automatisk og menneskelig evaluering.', 'nl': 'Klassieke pijplijnmodellen voor taakgericht dialoogsysteem vereisen expliciete modellering van de dialoogstaten en handmatige actieruimten om een domein-specifieke kennisbank te raadplegen. Omgekeerd leren sequence-to-sequence modellen om dialooggeschiedenis in kaart te brengen aan de respons in de huidige beurt zonder expliciete vragen in de kennisbank. In dit werk stellen we een nieuw framework voor dat gebruik maakt van de voordelen van klassieke pijpleidingen en sequence-to-sequence modellen. Ons framework modelleert een dialoogstatus als een gedistribueerde representatie van vaste grootte en gebruikt deze representatie om via een aandachtsmechanisme een kennisbasis te bevragen. Experimenten met Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset tonen aan dat ons framework aanzienlijk beter presteert dan andere sequence-to-sequence baseline modellen op zowel automatische als menselijke evaluatie.', 'id': 'Model pipeline klasik untuk sistem dialog orientasi tugas memerlukan model eksplicit negara dialog dan ruang aksi yang dibuat tangan untuk menanyai dasar pengetahuan spesifik domain. Conversely, sequence-to-sequence models learn to map dialog history to the response in current turn without explicit knowledge base querying. In this work, we propose a novel framework that leverages the advantages of classic pipeline and sequence-to-sequence models.  Model cadangan kami sebuah negara dialog sebagai representation distribusi ukuran tetap dan menggunakan representation ini untuk menanyai dasar pengetahuan melalui mekanisme perhatian. Eksperimen di Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset menunjukkan bahwa kerangka kita secara signifikan melebihi model dasar berbasis urutan-urutan lain pada evaluasi otomatis dan manusia.', 'de': 'Klassische Pipeline-Modelle für aufgabenorientierte Dialogsysteme erfordern eine explizite Modellierung der Dialogzustände und handgefertigte Aktionsräume, um eine domänenspezifische Wissensdatenbank abzufragen. Umgekehrt lernen Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modelle, den Dialogverlauf der Antwort im aktuellen Zug abzubilden, ohne explizite Wissensdatenbank-Abfragen durchzuführen. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir ein neuartiges Framework vor, das die Vorteile klassischer Pipeline- und Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modelle nutzt. Unser Framework modelliert einen Dialogzustand als verteilte Repräsentation fester Größe und nutzt diese Repräsentation, um eine Wissensdatenbank über einen Aufmerksamkeitsmechanismus abzufragen. Experimente mit Stanford Multi-Turn Multi-Domain Task-Oriented Dialogue Dataset zeigen, dass unser Framework andere sequenz-to-sequenz basierte Baseline-Modelle sowohl bei der automatischen als auch bei der menschlichen Auswertung deutlich übertrifft.', 'sw': 'Mfano wa mfumo wa mazungumzo yenye ufanisi wa juhudi unahitaji kuonyesha mifano ya mazungumzo na maeneo ya vitendo vilivyopangwa mkono ili kuuliza msingi wa maarifa maalum wa ndani. Kwa ujumla, mifano ya mfululizo-hadi mfululizo wanajifunza kupata ramani ya historia ya mazungumzo ya majibu ya sasa bila kutafuta msingi wa maarifa wazi. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza mfumo wa riwaya unaoendelea faida za pipeline za klassic na mifano ya mfululizo. Miundombi yetu inaonyesha hali ya mazungumzo kama uwakilishi wa kiwango kikubwa na kutumia uwakilishi huu ili kuuliza msingi wa maarifa kupitia mfumo wa kutangaza. Tatizo la Stanford kwa mara nyingi kwa ajili ya Dokumu za Tamko zilizoelekezwa kwa majadiliano mengi inaonyesha kwamba mfumo wetu unafanya mifano mingine ya msingi kwa mfululizo unaofanana na upasuaji wa binadamu.', 'ko': '임무를 위한 대화 시스템의 고전적인 파이프 모델은 대화 상태와 수동으로 구축된 동작 공간을 현저하게 모델링하여 특정 분야의 지식 라이브러리를 조회해야 한다.반대로 시퀀스에서 시퀀스 모델 학습은 대화의 역사를 현재 라운드의 응답에 비추고 현식의 지식 라이브러리 조회가 필요하지 않습니다.이 작업에서 우리는 새로운 구조를 제시했는데, 이것은 고전적인 파이프와 서열에서 서열 모델까지의 장점을 이용했다.우리의 프레임워크는 대화 상태를 고정된 크기의 분포식 표시로 모델링하고 이 표시를 주의 메커니즘을 통해 지식 라이브러리를 조회합니다.스탠퍼드대 다회적 다영역 임무 가이드 대화 데이터 집합에서의 실험에 따르면 우리의 구조는 자동과 인공 평가에서 서열을 바탕으로 하는 다른 기선 모델보다 현저히 우수하다.', 'fa': 'مدل لوله\u200cهای کلاسیک برای سیستم محاورۀ محاورۀ مشخص کار نیاز دارد که مدل مشخص کردن وضعیت محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ فعالیت\u200cهای دستی برای پرسیدن پایگاه علمی ویژه\u200cای به دامنه باشد. در عوض، مدل\u200cهای sequence-to-sequence یاد می\u200cگیرند که تاریخ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ محاورۀ پاسخ در حال حاضر بدون سؤال پایگاه دانش مشخص را نقشه\u200cبندی کند. در این کار، ما یک چهارچوب رمانی پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که سودهایی از لوله\u200cهای کلاسیک و مدل\u200cهای ردیابی به ردیابی را تأثیر می\u200cدهد. مدلهای چهارچوب ما یک وضعیت محاوره به عنوان یک نمایش اندازه ثابت تقسیم شده و از این نمایش استفاده کنید تا از طریق یک مکانیسم توجه پایگاه دانش را بپرسید. تجربه روی نمونه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای داستان\u200cهای مشخص\u200cشده\u200cی مکالمه\u200cهای زیادی روی تغییر مدل\u200cهای پایه\u200cخط\u200cهای بنیادی\u200cهای استنفورد را نشان می\u200cدهد که چهارچوب\u200cهای ما به طور معنی از مدل\u200cهای پایه\u200cخط\u200cهای پایه\u200cای بر روی ارزیابی\u200cهای', 'sq': 'Modelet klasike të tubacioneve për sistemin e dialogut të orientuar ndaj detyrave kërkojnë modelimin eksplicit të shteteve të dialogut dhe hapësirave të veprimit të ndërtuar me dorë për të kërkuar një bazë njohurie specifike për domenin. Përkundrazi, modelet sekuencë në sekuencë mësojnë të hartojnë historinë e dialogut ndaj përgjigjes në radhën aktuale pa pyetje eksplicite të bazës së njohurive. In this work, we propose a novel framework that leverages the advantages of classic pipeline and sequence-to-sequence models.  Korniza jonë modelon një shtet dialog si një përfaqësim të shpërndarë me madhësi fikse dhe përdor këtë përfaqësim për të kërkuar një bazë njohurie nëpërmjet një mekanizmi vëmendjeje. Eksperimenti në Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Dialog-oriented Task-Oriented Dataset tregon se kuadri ynë mbivlerëson ndjeshëm modele të tjera bazuar në sekuencë-në-sekuencë si në vlerësimin automatik ashtu dhe njerëzor.', 'am': "ዶሴ `%s'ን ማስፈጠር አልተቻለም፦ %s በተለየ ጊዜ የክፍለ ምርጫዎች አካባቢ ምርጫዎች በዚህ ሥራ፣ የቅድመ የክላሲ ፖሊስ እና የክፍለ ሥርዓት ዓይነቶች የሚጠቅመውን የረኀብ ፍሬማር እና መፍጠር እናደርጋለን፡፡ የፍሬም ሥርዓታችን አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና እውቀትን መቀመጫን በመጠየቅ እውቀት አካባቢ ለመጠየቅ የሚችሉትን አካባቢ አካል ነው፡፡ የስቴንፎርድ Multi-turn Multi-Domain Task-oriented Dialog Dataset ፍሬማችን በራሱ እና በሰው ማስታወቂያ ላይ የተመሳሳይ ሌሎችን የሥርዓት-ወደ-sequence ጥያቄ ምሳሌዎችን በማድረግ የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡", 'af': "Klassieke pyplyn modele vir taak-orienteerde dialoog stelsel benodig eksplisiese modeling van die dialoog staatste en hand-gebruikte aksie spasies om 'n domein-spesifieke kennis basis te vra. Omgeskakel, volgorde-na-volgorde modele leer na kaart dialoog geskiedenis na die antwoord in huidige skakel sonder eksplisiese kennis basis vraag. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n nuwe raamwerk wat die voordeel van klassieke pyplyn en sekwensies-na-sekwensiemodelle verwyder. Ons raamwerkmodele 'n dialoog staat as 'n vaste grootte verspreiding verspreiding en gebruik hierdie verspreiding om 'n kennis basis te vra deur 'n aandag mekanisme. Eksperiment op Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Opdrag-orienteerde Dialoog Databasis vertoon dat ons raamwerk betekeurig uitvoer ander volgorde-na-volgorde gebaseerde basisline modele op beide automatiese en menslike evaluering.", 'tr': 'Görev görkezilen dijal sistemi üçin klasik pipeline nusgalary dijal durumlaryny we elimden gelen aksiyon seleňleri bir domen häzirki bilgi bazyny sorgulamak üçin belli modelleri gerek. Geçersizçe, sequence-to-sequence modeller takyk bilgi bazy soraglamadan geçmişi kartlamagy öwrenýär. Bu işde, biz klasik pipeliniň we sıralar modelleriniň üstünliklerini etmäne bir roman çerçevesini teklip edip görýäris. Bizim çerçeve modellerimiz dikkati meýdança şeklinde dağıtılýan bir dialog durumumu we bu representasyony bilgi üsütini sorgulamak üçin ullan. Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Görevler Görevleri Görevlenen Dialog Maglumatlarynyň bardygyny görkezýär. Biziň çeräbimiz otomatik we adamlaryň deňleşmelerinde başga sequence-to-sequence daýanýan basit modelleriniň üstüne çykýandygyny görkezýär.', 'hy': 'Պատրաստ հաղորդակցման համակարգի դասական խողովակաշարի մոդելները պահանջում են բացատրական մոդելներ կազմելու երկրների և ձեռքով ստեղծված գործողությունների տարածքների համար, որպեսզի հարցնենք տիեզերական գիտելիքների հիմքը: Հակառակը, հաջորդականության-հաջորդականության մոդելները սովորում են քարտեզագրել պատմությունը ներկայիս հաջորդականության պատասխանին առանց բացատրական գիտելիքի հիմքի հարցերի: In this work, we propose a novel framework that leverages the advantages of classic pipeline and sequence-to-sequence models.  Մեր կառուցվածքային մոդելները դասախոսական վիճակ են, որպես ֆիքսավոր չափի բաշխված ներկայացուցիչ և օգտագործում են այս ներկայացուցիչ գիտելիքի հիմքի հարցում ուշադրության մեխանիզմի միջոցով: Ստենֆորդի բազմահատվածների բազմահատվածների բազմահատվածների բազմահատվածների փորձը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր շրջանակը նշանակաբար գերազանցում է մարդկային և ավտոմատիկ գնահատման հիմնական մոդելներին, որոնք հիմնված են հաջորդականությամբ:', 'bn': 'Classic pipeline models for task-oriented dialogue system require explicit modeling the dialogue states and hand-crafted action spaces to query a domain-specific knowledge base.  বর্তমান পর্যন্ত প্রতিক্রিয়ার প্রতিক্রিয়ায় ডায়ালগ ইতিহাস মানচিত্রের শিক্ষা প্রদান করে সেকেন্স- থেকে সেকেন্স- সেকেন্ এই কাজে আমরা একটি উপন্যাস ফ্রেমের প্রস্তাব করছি যা ক্লাসিক পাইপেলাইনের সুবিধা এবং সেকেন্স-থেকে মোডেলের সুবিধা প্রদান করে। আমাদের ফ্রেম কাঠামো একটি ডায়ালগ রাষ্ট্রের মডেল একটি স্থায়ী আকার বিতরণের প্রতিনিধিত্ব হিসেবে ব্যবহার করে একটি মনোযোগ মেক্স স্ট্যানফোর্ডের মাল্টিফোর্ডের মাল্টিক ডোমেইন টাস্ক-এর দিক দিয়ে ডায়ালগ ডাটাসেটের পরীক্ষা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের ফ্রেমের কাঠামো স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে এবং', 'az': 'Görüş-tərəf dialoglı sistemi üçün klasik bor çizgi modelləri dəyişdirilməsi üçün dəyişdirilmiş durumları və əl-yaratdığı eyni məqsədilərin dəyişdirilməsi lazımdır. Dərgahca, sequence-to-sequence modelləri müəyyən bir bilgi bazı soruşması olmadan müəyyən bir dəyişiklik keçmişi müəyyən etməyi öyrənirlər. Bu işdə, klasik pipeline və sequence-to-sequence modellərin faydalarını dəyişən yeni bir çerçive təklif edirik. Bizim framework modellərimiz diyalog durumu sabit ölçüdə dağıtılmış göstəricisi olaraq və bu göstəricisi bilgi üssünü bir mehanizmi vasitəsilə soruşmaq üçün istifadə edin. Stanford çoxlu-dönüş çoxlu-domani Task-oriented Dialog Datasitləri barəsindəki təcrübə göstərilir ki, qurğumuz otomatik və insan değerlendirmələrində başqa sequence-to-sequence tabanlı baz çizgi modellərdən daha çox üstün olduğunu göstərir.', 'ca': "Els models clàssics de pipeline del sistema de diàleg orientat a les tasques requereixen modelar explícitament els estats de diàleg i espais d'acció artificials a mà per consultar una base de coneixements específica per domini. Per altra banda, els models de seqüència a seqüència aprenen a mapejar la història del diàleg a la resposta al voltant actual sense preguntar explícitament la base de coneixements. En aquest treball, proposem un nou marc que aprofiti les avantatges dels models clàssics de pipeline i seqüència a seqüència. El nostre marc modela un estat de diàleg com una representació distribuida de mida fixa i utilitza aquesta representació per consultar una base de coneixements mitjançant un mecanisme d'atenció. L'experiment de Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Dialog-oriented Task Dataset mostra que el nostre marc supera significativament altres models basats en seqüència a seqüència en l'evaluació automàtica i humana.", 'bs': 'Klasični modeli pipeline za sistem dijaloga orijentiranog na zadatke zahtijevaju eksplicitno modeliranje stanja dijaloga i prostora za akcije koje su napravljene rukama da bi se ispitivali baza znanja specifičnog domena. U suprotnom, modeli sekvence do sekvence nauče mapirati povijest dijaloga na odgovor u trenutnom okviru bez objašnjenja pitanja baze znanja. U ovom poslu predlažemo novi okvir koji utiče na prednost klasičnih modela cijevi i sekvencijskih modela. Naši okvirni modeli dijalog država kao određena veličina raspodjeljena predstavljanja i koristi ovu predstavljanje kako bi ispitivali bazu znanja putem mehanizma pažnje. Eksperiment o multidomenijskom podacima o dijalogu usmjerenom na multidomenijski zadatak pokazuje da naš okvir značajno iznosi druge osnovne modele osnovne na sekvenciji bazirane na sekvenciji i na automatsku i ljudsku procjenu.', 'cs': 'Klasické modely potrubí pro dialogový systém orientovaný na úlohy vyžadují explicitní modelování stavů dialogu a ručně vytvořené akční prostory pro dotaz na znalostní bázi specifické pro doménu. Naopak modely sekvence na sekvenci se naučí mapovat historii dialogů k odpovědi v aktuálním tahu bez explicitního dotazu znalostní báze. V této práci navrhujeme nový rámec, který využívá výhod klasických modelů potrubí a sekvence-na-sekvence. Náš framework modeluje stav dialogu jako distribuovanou reprezentaci pevné velikosti a používá ji k dotazu na znalostní bázi prostřednictvím mechanismu pozornosti. Experiment na Stanfordské multi-doménové dialogové sadě orientované na úlohy ukazuje, že náš framework výrazně předčí ostatní modely založené na sekvenci založené na základě automatického i lidského hodnocení.', 'et': 'Ülesandepõhise dialoogisüsteemi klassikalised torujuhtmete mudelid nõuavad dialoogi olekute selget modelleerimist ja käsitsi loodud tegevusruume, et pärida domeenipõhist teadmistebaasi. Seevastu õpivad jada-jada mudelid kaardistama dialoogi ajalugu praeguse vastusega ilma selgesõnalise teadmistebaasi päringuta. Selles töös pakume välja uudse raamistiku, mis kasutab ära klassikaliste torujuhtmete ja järjestusest järjestuseni mudelite eeliseid. Meie raamistik modelleerib dialoogi olekut fikseeritud suurusega hajutatud esindusena ja kasutab seda teadmistebaasi päringuteks tähelepanumehhanismi kaudu. Stanfordi mitmepöörde mitmevaldkondliku ülesandepõhise dialoogi andmekogumi eksperiment näitab, et meie raamistik on oluliselt parem kui teised järjestusepõhised baasmudelid nii automaatse kui ka inimese hindamise puhul.', 'fi': 'Tehtävälähtöisen dialogijärjestelmän perinteiset putkimallit edellyttävät vuoropuhelutilojen eksplisiittistä mallintamista ja käsin luotuja toimintatiloja toimialueekohtaisen tietokannan kyselyyn. Päinvastoin sekvenssimallit oppivat kartoittamaan dialogihistorian nykyiseen vasteeseen ilman nimenomaista tietopohjakyselyä. Tässä työssä ehdotamme uutta kehystä, joka hyödyntää klassisten putki- ja sekvenssimallien etuja. Kehyksemme mallintaa dialogitilaa kiinteäkokoisena hajanaisena esityksenä ja käyttää sitä tietopohjan kyselyyn huomiomekanismin kautta. Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Datasetin kokeilu osoittaa, että viitekehyksemme suoriutuu merkittävästi muista sekvenssipohjaisista perusmalleista sekä automaattisessa että inhimillisessä arvioinnissa.', 'jv': 'Name command Nang barêng-barêng iki, kita unêmên mrogram kuwi banjur kuwi nggawe barang nggawe barang nggawe barang lansangan karo model sing wis arah tarjamahan karo sekondiki. Kita sistem model dialog state as a fixed-size Distributed representation and use this representation to query a knownMonitor vendor 480', 'he': 'דוגמני צינורות קלאסיים למערכת דיאלוג ממוקדת למשימות דוגמנים דוגמנים ברורות את מדיני הדיולוג וחלל פעולה מיוחדים כדי לבקש בסיס ידע ספציפי לתחום. בניגוד לכך, דוגמנים רצף לרצף לומדים למפות היסטוריה של דיאלוג לתגובה בתור הנוכחי בלי שאלות ברורות בסיס ידע. בעבודה הזו, אנו מציעים מסגרת חדשה שמגבירה את יתרונות של צינורות קלאסיים ודוגמנים רצף לרצף. המסגרת שלנו דוגמנית מדיום דיאלוג כמייצג מופזר בגודל קבוע ושימוש באמצעות מייצג זה כדי לבקש בסיס ידע באמצעות מנגנון תשומת לב. Experiment on Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset shows that our framework significantly outperforms other sequence-to-sequence based baseline models on both automatic and human evaluation.', 'sk': 'Klasični modeli cevovodov za sistem dialoga, usmerjen v opravila, zahtevajo eksplicitno modeliranje stanj dialoga in ročno izdelane akcijske prostore za poizvedbo baze znanja, specifične za domeno. Nasprotno pa se modeli zaporedja v zaporedje naučijo kartirati zgodovino dialoga z odzivom v trenutnem obratu brez eksplicitnega poizvedbe baze znanja. V tem delu predlagamo nov okvir, ki izkorišča prednosti klasičnih modelov cevovodov in modelov zaporedja do zaporedja. Naš okvir modelira stanje dialoga kot porazdeljeno reprezentacijo fiksne velikosti in jo uporablja za poizvedbo baze znanja prek mehanizma pozornosti. Eksperiment na Stanfordovem naboru podatkov o dialogu, usmerjenih v več področjih, je pokazal, da je naš okvir bistveno boljši od drugih osnovnih modelov, ki temeljijo na zaporedju v zaporedje, tako pri samodejnem kot pri človeškem ocenjevanju.', 'ha': '@ action: button Babu, misãlai masu saka-zuwa-sequence sun yi amfani da yin ramani da jerin zauren akwatin bayanin da ake karɓa wa kwanan turu yanzu, kuma bã da tambayin bayan ilmi na bayyane. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗa wani firam na nowaya wanda ke ƙara amfani da misãlai na danna-sauri. Salon firam masu motsa wata halin zauren zauren akwatin bayani kamar shirin da aka raba shi mai girma kuma ya yi amfani da wannan wakiyyani dõmin ya tambayi wani bango na ilmi a bayani don a sami wani matsayin muhalli. Experiment on Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialogue Dataset shows that our framework significantly outperforms other sequence-to-sequence based baseline models on both automatic and human evaluation.', 'bo': 'Classic pipeline models for task-oriented dialog system require explicit modeling the dialog states and hand-crafted action spaces to query a domain-specific knowledge base. དེ་ལྟར་འགྱུར་བ། sequence-to-sequence models་གིས་སྔོན་འཕགས་པའི་དབྱིབས་རིགས་གཞི་བསམ་བློ་གཏོང་ལ་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་ལ་ལོ་རྒྱུས་མཐུན་སྐ In this work, we propose a novel framework that leverages the advantages of classic pipeline and sequence-to-sequence models. Our framework models a dialog state as a fixed-size distributed representation and use this representation to query a knowledge base via an attention mechanism. Experiment on Stanford Multi-turn Multi-domain Task-oriented Dialog Dataset shows that our framework significantly outperforms other sequence-to-sequence based baseline models on both automatic and human evaluation.'}
{'en': 'Incorporating Deep Visual Features into Multiobjective based Multi-view Search Results Clustering', 'es': 'Incorporación de funciones visuales profundas en la agrupación de resultados de búsqueda multivista basada en objetivos múltiples', 'ar': 'دمج الميزات المرئية العميقة في مجموعات نتائج البحث متعددة العرض القائمة على الأهداف المتعددة', 'pt': 'Incorporando recursos visuais profundos no agrupamento de resultados de pesquisa de múltiplas visualizações baseado em multiobjetivos', 'fr': 'Intégration de fonctionnalités visuelles approfondies dans le regroupement de résultats de recherche multi-vues basé sur des objectifs multiples', 'ru': 'Включение глубоких визуальных функций в многоцелевую кластеризацию результатов многопрофильного поиска', 'ja': 'マルチオブジェクトベースのマルチビュー検索結果クラスタリングにディープビジュアル機能を組み込む', 'hi': 'गहरी दृश्य सुविधाओं को बहुउद्देशीय आधारित बहु-दृश्य खोज परिणाम क्लस्टरिंग में शामिल करना', 'zh': '将深度视觉整合至於多视图搜索聚类中', 'ga': 'Ag Ionchorprú Gnéithe Amhairc dhomhain i gCnuasú Torthaí Cuardaigh Ilchuspóireacha atá bunaithe ar Ilchuspóirí', 'hu': 'Mélyvizuális funkciók beépítése többcélú keresési eredmények klaszterelésébe', 'el': 'Ενσωμάτωση βαθέων οπτικών χαρακτηριστικών σε σύμπλεγμα αποτελεσμάτων αναζήτησης πολλαπλών στόχων', 'kk': 'Көп мақсатты көптеген көптеген іздеу нәтижелерін қарау', 'lt': 'Įtraukti gilią vizualinę savybę į daugiametės paieškos rezultatų grupavimą', 'ka': 'მრავალექტიური ძალიან ვიზუალური ფექტურების შექმნა მრავალექტიური ძიება', 'ms': 'Memasukkan Ciri-ciri Visual Dalam Dalam ke Pengkumpulan Hasil Carian Berberapa-Paparan Berberapa Objektif', 'it': 'Incorporare funzionalità visive profonde in cluster multi-view basati su più obiettivi', 'mt': 'L-inkorporazzjoni ta’ Karatteristiċi Viżwali Profondi fil-Klassifikazzjoni tar-Riżultati tat-Tfittxija Multiviżwali bbażata fuq Multiobjettivi', 'no': 'Inkorporasjon av dyppa visuelle funksjonar i fleirmålsk basert søkjeresultat', 'mk': 'Вклучување на длабоки визуелни карактеристики во мултиобјективно базирано мултиобјективно разгледување на резултатите од пребарувањето', 'ro': 'Încorporarea caracteristicilor vizuale profunde în gruparea rezultatelor căutării multi-vizualizare bazată pe mai multe obiective', 'ml': 'ആഴത്തില്\u200d കാഴ്ചയുടെ വിശേഷതകള്\u200d അളവിലേക്കു് അടയാളപ്പെടുത്തുന്ന പല കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d തെരച്ചില്\u200d അനുഭവിക്കുന്ന', 'mn': 'Ихэнх зорилготой олон үзэл хайлтын үр дүнг нэмж', 'si': 'ගොඩක් දැක්ක ප්\u200dරකෘතිවිශේෂ විශේෂතාවක් ගොඩක් අක්ෂිත විශේෂතාවක් අධාරිත විශේෂ විශේෂ', 'sv': 'Integrera djupa visuella funktioner i flerobjektivsbaserad flervy Sökresultat Clustering', 'pl': 'Włączanie głębokich funkcji wizualnych do klastrowania wyników wyszukiwania opartych na wielobiektywach', 'ta': 'பல பார்வை அடிப்படையில் உள்ள பல பார்வை தேடும் முடிவுகளை கட்டுப்பாட்டில் ஆழமான பார்வையின் தன்மை', 'sr': 'Uključujući duboke vizualne karakteristike u multiobjektivne rezultate pretraživanja na višeobjektivnim pogledima', 'so': 'Kuwiisa Deep Visual Features into Multiobjective based on Search Results Clustering', 'ur': 'Multiobjective based Multi view Search Results Clustering', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Cấu hình ảnh sâu trong kết quả tìm kiếm đa mục tiêu', 'da': 'Integrering af dybe visuelle funktioner i multiobjektivbaseret Multi-view søgeresultatklyngning', 'bg': 'Включване на задълбочени визуални функции в мултиобективно базирано мултиизгледно групиране на резултатите от търсенето', 'de': 'Einbindung von Deep Visual Features in Multi-Objective-basierte Multi-View Search Results Clustering', 'id': 'Menginkorporasikan Features Visual Dalam Dalam ke Pengkumpulan Hasil Pencarian Multi-view Berdasarkan Multiobjektif', 'nl': 'Opnemen van diepe visuele functies in multiobjectives gebaseerde multiview zoekresultaten clustering', 'hr': 'Uključujući duboke vizualne karakteristike u skupljanje rezultata multiobjektivnih pretraživanja', 'tr': 'ګڼ Görnöş Görnöşiklikleri Birden Görnöşiklik Görnöşikliklere girişdirilýär', 'af': 'Inkorporeer Deep Visuele Features in Multiobjective Based Multi- view Soektog Results Clustering', 'sq': 'Duke përfshirë karakteristikat vizuale të thella në grupimin e rezultateve të kërkimit multiobjektiv', 'fa': 'شامل ویژه\u200cهای بینایی عمیق در کلاستر نتایج جستجوی چندین نظر', 'ko': '깊은 시각적 특징을 다목적 기반의 다시도 검색 결과 집합에 융합시키다', 'sw': 'Kuingiza Tamko za Kideep Visual katika Matokeo ya Matokeo ya Search Multi-view', 'az': 'Çoxlu objektif-tabanlı çoxlu-görünüş Arama Növbələri Clustering', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'bs': 'Uključujući duboke vizualne karakteristike u skupinu multiobjektivnih rezultata pretraživanja na višeobjektivnim pogledima', 'hy': 'Խիրջ տեսողական հատկություններ ներառելը բազմաօբյեկտիվ հիմնված բազմատեսողական որոնման արդյունքների խմբագրման մեջ', 'cs': 'Začlenění hlubokých vizuálních funkcí do klastrování vícecílových výsledků vyhledávání', 'bn': 'গভীর দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলী অনুসন্ধানের ফলাফল ক্লাস্টিং এ অন্তর্ভুক্ত করা হচ্ছে', 'ca': 'Incorporar Característiques Visuals Profundes en un agrupament de resultats de recerca multiobjectius', 'fi': 'Syvien visuaalisten ominaisuuksien sisällyttäminen moniobjektiiviseen Multi-view Hakutulosten klusterointiin', 'et': 'Sügavate visuaalsete funktsioonide lisamine mitmeobjektiivsesse otsingutulemuste klastrisse', 'jv': 'Ombudhakan ngerasai Visual Obèran kanggo Multiobject batir Multi-view Search Effects clustering', 'he': 'מכיל תכונות חזותיות עמוקות לתוצאות חיפוש רבות מבוססת על אובייקטיבי רבים', 'sk': 'Vključitev globokih vizualnih funkcij v večobjektivno osnovano večnamensko združevanje rezultatov iskanja', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'ནང་དུ་མཐོང་ནུས་བའི་རྣམ་པ་མང་ཆོས་འབྱུང་བའི་ཁྱད་ཆོས་འབྱུང་བའི་འཚོལ་བཤེར་འབྲས་མང་ཆོས་མཐོང་བ'}
{'en': 'Current paper explores the use of multi-view learning for search result clustering. A web-snippet can be represented using multiple views. Apart from textual view cued by both the semantic and syntactic information, a complimentary view extracted from images contained in the web-snippets is also utilized in the current framework. A single consensus partitioning is finally obtained after consulting these two individual views by the deployment of a multiobjective based clustering technique. Several objective functions including the values of a cluster quality measure measuring the goodness of partitionings obtained using different views and an agreement-disagreement index, quantifying the amount of oneness among multiple views in generating partitionings are optimized simultaneously using AMOSA. In order to detect the number of clusters automatically, concepts of variable length solutions and a vast range of permutation operators are introduced in the clustering process. Finally, a set of alternative partitioning are obtained on the final Pareto front by the proposed multi-view based multiobjective technique. Experimental results by the proposed approach on several benchmark test datasets of SRC with respect to different performance metrics evidently establish the power of visual and text-based views in achieving better search result clustering.', 'ar': 'تستكشف الورقة الحالية استخدام التعلم متعدد العروض لتجميع نتائج البحث. يمكن تمثيل مقتطف الويب باستخدام طرق عرض متعددة. بصرف النظر عن العرض النصي المرتبط بكل من المعلومات الدلالية والنحوية ، يتم أيضًا استخدام طريقة عرض مجانية مستخرجة من الصور الموجودة في مقتطفات الويب في إطار العمل الحالي. يتم الحصول أخيرًا على تقسيم إجماع فردي بعد استشارة هاتين النظرتين الفرديتين من خلال نشر تقنية تجميع متعددة الأهداف. يتم تحسين العديد من الوظائف الموضوعية بما في ذلك قيم قياس جودة الكتلة التي تقيس مدى جودة التقسيمات التي تم الحصول عليها باستخدام وجهات نظر مختلفة ومؤشر عدم اتفاق الاتفاق ، وتحديد مقدار التوحيد بين وجهات النظر المتعددة في إنشاء الأقسام في وقت واحد باستخدام AMOSA. من أجل الكشف عن عدد المجموعات تلقائيًا ، يتم تقديم مفاهيم الحلول المتغيرة الطول ومجموعة واسعة من عوامل التقليب في عملية التجميع. أخيرًا ، يتم الحصول على مجموعة من التقسيم البديل على واجهة باريتو النهائية من خلال التقنية المقترحة متعددة الأهداف القائمة على الرؤية المتعددة. النتائج التجريبية من خلال النهج المقترح على العديد من مجموعات بيانات الاختبار المعياري لـ SRC فيما يتعلق بمقاييس الأداء المختلفة تحدد بوضوح قوة العروض المرئية والقائمة على النص في تحقيق تجميع أفضل لنتائج البحث.', 'es': 'El documento actual explora el uso del aprendizaje multivista para la agrupación de resultados de búsqueda. Un fragmento web se puede representar mediante varias vistas. Además de la visión textual indicada por la información semántica y sintáctica, en el marco actual también se utiliza una vista complementaria extraída de las imágenes contenidas en los fragmentos web. Finalmente se obtiene una partición de consenso única después de consultar estos dos puntos de vista individuales mediante el despliegue de una técnica de agrupación basada en múltiples objetivos. Varias funciones objetivas, incluidos los valores de una medida de calidad de clúster que mide la bondad de las particiones obtenidas utilizando diferentes puntos de vista y un índice de acuerdo-desacuerdo, que cuantifica la cantidad de unidad entre múltiples vistas en la generación de particiones, se optimizan simultáneamente con AMOSA. Para detectar automáticamente el número de clústeres, se introducen conceptos de soluciones de longitud variable y una amplia gama de operadores de permutación en el proceso de agrupación. Finalmente, se obtiene un conjunto de particiones alternativas en el frente final de Pareto mediante la técnica multiobjetivo basada en múltiples vistas propuesta. Los resultados experimentales del enfoque propuesto en varios conjuntos de datos de prueba de referencia de SRC con respecto a diferentes métricas de rendimiento evidentemente establecen el poder de las vistas visuales y basadas en texto para lograr una mejor agrupación de resultados de búsqueda.', 'pt': 'O artigo atual explora o uso do aprendizado de múltiplas visualizações para agrupamento de resultados de pesquisa. Um snippet da Web pode ser representado usando várias visualizações. Além da visualização textual orientada pelas informações semânticas e sintáticas, uma visualização complementar extraída das imagens contidas nos trechos da web também é utilizada no framework atual. Um único particionamento de consenso é finalmente obtido após consultar essas duas visões individuais pela implantação de uma técnica de agrupamento baseada em multiobjetivos. Várias funções objetivas, incluindo os valores de uma medida de qualidade de cluster medindo a qualidade dos particionamentos obtidos usando diferentes visualizações e um índice de concordância-discordância, quantificando a quantidade de unidade entre várias visualizações na geração de particionamentos são otimizadas simultaneamente usando AMOSA. Para detectar o número de clusters automaticamente, conceitos de soluções de comprimento variável e uma vasta gama de operadores de permutação são introduzidos no processo de clustering. Finalmente, um conjunto de particionamentos alternativos são obtidos na frente de Pareto final pela técnica multiobjetivo baseada em multivisão proposta. Os resultados experimentais da abordagem proposta em vários conjuntos de dados de teste de benchmark de SRC com relação a diferentes métricas de desempenho evidentemente estabelecem o poder de visualizações visuais e baseadas em texto para obter um melhor agrupamento de resultados de pesquisa.', 'fr': "Le présent article explore l'utilisation de l'apprentissage multivue pour le regroupement des résultats de recherche. Un extrait Web peut être représenté à l'aide de plusieurs vues. Outre la vue textuelle indiquée par les informations sémantiques et syntaxiques, une vue complémentaire extraite des images contenues dans les extraits Web est également utilisée dans le cadre actuel. Un partitionnement par consensus unique est finalement obtenu après consultation de ces deux vues individuelles par le déploiement d'une technique de clustering basée sur des objectifs multiples. Plusieurs fonctions objectives, y compris les valeurs d'une mesure de qualité de grappe mesurant la qualité des partitionnements obtenus à l'aide de différentes vues et un indice d'accord-désaccord, quantifiant le degré d'unité parmi de multiples vues lors de la génération de partitionnements sont optimisées simultanément à l'aide d'AMOSA. Afin de détecter automatiquement le nombre de clusters, des concepts de solutions de longueur variable et une vaste gamme d'opérateurs de permutation sont introduits dans le processus de clustering. Enfin, un ensemble de partitionnement alternatif est obtenu sur le front de Pareto final par la technique multi-objectifs basée sur plusieurs vues proposée. Les résultats expérimentaux de l'approche proposée sur plusieurs ensembles de données de test de référence de SRC en ce qui concerne différentes mesures de performance établissent évidemment la puissance des vues visuelles et textuelles pour obtenir un meilleur regroupement des résultats de recherche.", 'ja': '現在の論文では、検索結果のクラスタリングにおけるマルチビューラーニングの使用について検討している。 ウェブスニペットは、複数のビューを使用して表すことができます。 セマンティック情報と構文情報の両方によってキューされるテキストビューとは別に、ウェブスニペットに含まれる画像から抽出される補完的なビューも、現在のフレームワークで利用されます。 多目的ベースのクラスタリング技術の展開によって、これら2つの個別の見解を参照した後、単一のコンセンサス分割が最終的に得られる。 異なるビューを使用して取得されたパーティションの良さを測定するクラスタ品質測定値と、パーティション生成における複数のビュー間の一体性の量を定量化する合意-合意インデックスを含むいくつかの客観的な関数は、AMOSAを使用して同時に最適化される。 クラスタの数を自動的に検出するために、可変長解と膨大な範囲の順列演算子の概念をクラスタリングプロセスで紹介します。 最後に、提案されたマルチビューベースの多目的テクニックによって、最終的なパレートの前面で一連の代替パーティショニングが得られる。 異なるパフォーマンスメトリクスに関するSRCのいくつかのベンチマークテストデータセットに関する提案されたアプローチによる実験結果は、明らかに、より良い検索結果クラスタリングを達成するための視覚的およびテキストベースのビューのパワーを確立します。', 'zh': '本文讨索聚类用多视图学。 可用数视图示 Web 代码段。 自语义、句法信息视图外,今框架犹用Web片段中所包取免费视图。 因部分多聚类之术,咨询独视图,终获共识分。 用 AMOSA 同时优化数函数,量用不同视图所得区优度者集群量直与协议分歧指数(量化生成区数视图之间单一性量)。 为自动检测聚类之数,聚类引可变长算符。 最后,因所发多视图多方, 于终帕累托前得一组代分区. 其法在SRC之数测试数据集上针性能指标之实验,明立可视化、文本之视图,搜索聚类之力也。', 'hi': 'वर्तमान पेपर खोज परिणाम क्लस्टरिंग के लिए बहु-दृश्य सीखने के उपयोग की पड़ताल करता है। एक वेब-स्निपेट को एकाधिक दृश्यों का उपयोग करके दर्शाया जा सकता है। शब्दार्थ और वाक्यात्मक जानकारी दोनों द्वारा cued पाठ्य दृश्य के अलावा, वेब-स्निपेट में निहित छवियों से निकाले गए एक मानार्थ दृश्य का उपयोग वर्तमान ढांचे में भी किया जाता है। एक एकल आम सहमति विभाजन अंततः एक multiobjective आधारित clustering तकनीक की तैनाती द्वारा इन दो व्यक्तिगत विचारों से परामर्श करने के बाद प्राप्त किया जाता है। विभिन्न विचारों और एक समझौते-असहमति सूचकांक का उपयोग करके प्राप्त विभाजन की अच्छाई को मापने वाले क्लस्टर गुणवत्ता उपाय के मूल्यों सहित कई उद्देश्य कार्यों, विभाजन उत्पन्न करने में कई दृश्यों के बीच एकता की मात्रा को मापने के लिए AMOSA का उपयोग करके एक साथ अनुकूलित किया जाता है। स्वचालित रूप से क्लस्टरों की संख्या का पता लगाने के लिए, क्लस्टरिंग प्रक्रिया में चर लंबाई समाधानों की अवधारणाओं और क्रमपरिवर्तन ऑपरेटरों की एक विशाल श्रृंखला पेश की जाती है। अंत में, वैकल्पिक विभाजन का एक सेट प्रस्तावित बहु-दृश्य आधारित बहुउद्देशीय तकनीक द्वारा अंतिम परेटो मोर्चे पर प्राप्त किया जाता है। विभिन्न प्रदर्शन मैट्रिक्स के संबंध में एसआरसी के कई बेंचमार्क परीक्षण डेटासेट पर प्रस्तावित दृष्टिकोण द्वारा प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम स्पष्ट रूप से बेहतर खोज परिणाम क्लस्टरिंग प्राप्त करने में दृश्य और पाठ-आधारित दृश्यों की शक्ति स्थापित करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В настоящем документе исследуется использование многовидового обучения для кластеризации результатов поиска. Веб-сниппет может быть представлен с использованием нескольких представлений. Помимо текстового представления, основанного как на семантической, так и на синтаксической информации, в текущей структуре также используется дополнительное представление, извлеченное из изображений, содержащихся в веб-сниппах. Единое консенсусное разделение, наконец, достигается после консультаций по этим двум отдельным представлениям путем развертывания метода кластеризации, основанного на многоцелевом подходе. Одновременно с использованием AMOSA оптимизируется несколько целевых функций, включая значения показателя качества кластера, измеряющего качество секционирования, полученного с использованием различных представлений и индекса согласования-расхождения, количественно определяющего величину единства между несколькими представлениями при генерации секционирования. Для автоматического определения количества кластеров в процесс кластеризации вводятся понятия решений переменной длины и широкий спектр операторов перестановок. Наконец, набор альтернативных секционирования получают на конечном фронте Парето с помощью предложенного многоцелевого метода, основанного на многовидовом представлении. Экспериментальные результаты, полученные с помощью предложенного подхода на нескольких эталонных тестовых наборах данных SRC в отношении различных показателей производительности, очевидно, устанавливают силу визуальных и текстовых представлений для достижения лучшей кластеризации результатов поиска.', 'ga': 'Scrúdaíonn páipéar reatha úsáid na foghlama ilamhairc chun torthaí cuardaigh a bhraisliú. Is féidir blúire gréasáin a léiriú ag úsáid amhairc iolracha. Seachas an t-amharc téacsúil atá tugtha ag an bhfaisnéis shéimeantach agus chomhréire araon, úsáidtear radharc comhlántach a bhaintear as íomhánna atá sna míreanna gréasáin sa chreat reatha freisin. Faightear críochdheighilt comhthola aonair ar deireadh tar éis dul i gcomhairle leis an dá thuairim aonair seo trí úsáid a bhaint as teicníocht cnuasaithe bunaithe ar ilchuspóirí. Déantar roinnt feidhmeanna oibiachtúla, lena n-áirítear luachanna braisle tomhais cáilíochta a thomhaiseann leas na ndeighiltí a fhaightear trí úsáid a bhaint as tuairimí éagsúla agus innéacs easaontaithe comhaontaithe, ag baint úsáide as AMOSA ag an am céanna chun méid na haontachta i measc tuairimí iolracha a chainníochtú le linn deighiltí a ghiniúint. Chun líon na mbraislí a bhrath go huathoibríoch, tugtar isteach coincheapa réitigh faid athraitheach agus raon leathan oibreoirí iomalartaithe sa phróiseas braisliú. Ar deireadh, faightear sraith de dheighilt mhalartach ar thaobh deiridh Pareto leis an teicníc ilchuspóra ilamhairc atá beartaithe. Is léir ó thorthaí turgnamhacha ón gcur chuige atá beartaithe ar roinnt tacar sonraí tástála tagarmhairc de chuid SRC maidir le méadrachtaí feidhmíochta éagsúla, go mbunaítear cumhacht tuairimí amhairc agus téacs-bhunaithe chun cnuasach torthaí cuardaigh níos fearr a bhaint amach.', 'el': 'Η τρέχουσα εργασία διερευνά τη χρήση της μάθησης πολλαπλών προβολών για τη συγκέντρωση αποτελεσμάτων αναζήτησης. Ένα απόσπασμα ιστού μπορεί να αναπαραχθεί χρησιμοποιώντας πολλαπλές προβολές. Εκτός από την άποψη κειμένου που προέρχεται τόσο από τη σημασιολογική όσο και από τη συντακτική πληροφορία, στο τρέχον πλαίσιο χρησιμοποιείται και μια συμπληρωματική προβολή που εξάγεται από εικόνες που περιέχονται στα αποσπάσματα ιστού. Τελικά επιτυγχάνεται μία ενιαία κατανομή συναίνεσης μετά από διαβούλευση με αυτές τις δύο μεμονωμένες απόψεις με την ανάπτυξη μιας τεχνικής ομαδοποίησης βασισμένης σε πολλαπλούς στόχους. Αρκετές αντικειμενικές λειτουργίες, συμπεριλαμβανομένων των τιμών ενός μέτρου ποιότητας συμπλέγματος που μετρά την καλοσύνη των διαιρέσεων που λαμβάνονται χρησιμοποιώντας διαφορετικές απόψεις και έναν δείκτη συμφωνίας-διαφωνίας, ποσοτικοποιώντας το ποσό της ενότητας μεταξύ πολλαπλών προβολών στη δημιουργία κατατμήσεων βελτιστοποιούνται ταυτόχρονα χρησιμοποιώντας AMOSA. Προκειμένου να ανιχνευθεί αυτόματα ο αριθμός των συστάδων, εισάγονται έννοιες λύσεων μεταβλητού μήκους και ένα ευρύ φάσμα χειριστών μεταμόρφωσης στη διαδικασία ομαδοποίησης. Τέλος, ένα σύνολο εναλλακτικών διαιρέσεων λαμβάνεται στο τελικό μέτωπο με την προτεινόμενη τεχνική πολλαπλών στόχων βασισμένη σε πολλαπλές προβολές. Τα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα της προτεινόμενης προσέγγισης σε διάφορα σύνολα δοκιμών αναφοράς σε σχέση με διαφορετικές μετρήσεις απόδοσης αποδεικνύουν προφανώς τη δύναμη των οπτικών και κειμένων προβολών στην επίτευξη καλύτερης ομαδοποίησης αποτελεσμάτων αναζήτησης.', 'ka': 'მიმდინარე დოკუმენტი განსხვავების გამოყენება მრავალური ხედის სწავლების შესაძლებლობა შესაძლებლობის კლასტერისთვის. Name ტექსტუალური ხედვის დამატებით, რომელიც სენმანტიკური და სინტაქტიკური ინფორმაციაზე, კომპლიმენტური ხედვის, რომელიც ვებ- სენიპტებში შეექმნილი სურათებიდან გამოყენებული სურა ერთი კონსენსუსის გაყოფილება საკუთოდ მიიღება, როდესაც ამ ორი ინდიველური ხედის კონსლუტერების შესახებ მულტი ობიექტიური კლასტერების ტექნოგიის გამოყენება. რამდენიმე ობიექტიური ფუნქციები, რომლებიც კლასტერის კალიტურის მნიშვნელობის მნიშვნელობები, რომლებიც განსხვავებული ხელსახულებების საშუალებას და განსხვავებული ინდექსის გამოყენებას მიიღებულია, რამდენიმე ხელსახულებში ერთადერთ კლასტრების რაოდენობის ავტომატურად განახლებისთვის, შეცვლელი სიგრძე განსაზღვრების კონცექტები და დიდი პერმუტაციის პროცექტების განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრებისთვის კლა საბოლოოდ, ალტენტრუმენტური პოტიციაციის კონფინალური პერეტო წინაღებულია მრავალური ხელსაწყოთა მრავალური ტექნოგიაზე. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენები, რომლებიც საკუთარ ბენქმენტიური ტესტის მონაცემების მონაცემების შესახებ სხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვადასხვა მე', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány a többnézetes tanulás használatát vizsgálja a keresési eredmények klaszterezéséhez. A webes részletek több nézetben is képviselhetők. A szemantikai és szintaktikai információk által egyaránt szöveges nézeten kívül a webes részletekben található képekből kinyert kiegészítő nézetet is használjuk a jelenlegi keretrendszerben. Végül egyetlen konszenzus felosztásra kerül sor, miután egy többcélú klaszterezési technika alkalmazásával konzultálták ezt a két egyedi nézetet. Számos objektív függvényt, beleértve a különböző nézetekkel kapott partíciók jóságát mérő fürtminőségi mérő értékeit, valamint egy megállapodás-nézeteltérési index számszerűsítését, a több nézet közötti egység mennyiségét számszerűsítő partíciók generálásában egyidejűleg optimalizáljuk az AMOSA segítségével. A klaszterek számának automatikus felismerése érdekében a klaszterezési folyamatban a változó hosszúságú megoldások koncepcióit és a permutációs operátorok széles skáláját vezetik be. Végezetül a Pareto végső fronton alternatív partíciók sorozatát szerezzük meg a javasolt multi-view alapú multiobjektív technika segítségével. A különböző teljesítménymutatókra vonatkozó kísérleti eredmények a javasolt megközelítés által az SRC több benchmark tesztadatállományára vonatkozó kísérleti eredmények nyilvánvalóan megállapítják a vizuális és szövegalapú nézetek hatékonyságát a jobb keresési eredmények klaszterezésében.', 'it': "L'articolo attuale esplora l'uso dell'apprendimento multi-view per il clustering dei risultati di ricerca. Un frammento web può essere rappresentato utilizzando più viste. Oltre alla visione testuale suggerita sia dalle informazioni semantiche che sintattiche, nell'attuale framework viene utilizzata anche una visualizzazione complementare estratta dalle immagini contenute nei web-snippet. Un'unica suddivisione consensuale è infine ottenuta dopo aver consultato queste due opinioni individuali mediante l'implementazione di una tecnica di clustering basata su più obiettivi. Diverse funzioni oggettive tra cui i valori di una misura di qualità del cluster che misura la bontà delle partizioni ottenute utilizzando viste diverse e un indice di accordo-disaccordo, quantificando la quantità di unità tra viste multiple nella generazione di partizioni sono ottimizzate simultaneamente utilizzando AMOSA. Al fine di rilevare automaticamente il numero di cluster, nel processo di clustering vengono introdotti concetti di soluzioni a lunghezza variabile e una vasta gamma di operatori di permutazione. Infine, sul fronte Pareto finale si ottiene un insieme di partizioni alternative con la tecnica multiobiettivo proposta. I risultati sperimentali ottenuti dall'approccio proposto su diversi set di dati di test benchmark di SRC rispetto a diverse metriche di performance stabiliscono chiaramente la potenza delle visualizzazioni visive e testuali nel raggiungimento di un migliore cluster dei risultati di ricerca.", 'kk': 'Қолданыстағы қағаз іздеу нәтижесін кластерлеу үшін көптеген көрініс үйренуді зерттейді. Бірнеше көрініс арқылы веб- скрипті көрсетіледі. Семантикалық және синтактикалық мәліметтердің мәтіннің көрінісінен басқа, веб- снипеттерде бар кескіндерден шығарылған комплименталдық көрініс қолданылады. Бір консенсус бөлімі бірнеше тәртіпсіздігін бірнеше мақсатты кластерлік техникасын орындау арқылы осы екі жеке көріністі сұрақтан кейін алады. Бөлімдерді құру кезінде бірнеше мақсатты функциялар, бірнеше көріністер мен келістіктерді қатынау индексі арқылы бірнеше мақсатты бөлімдер сапасының мәндері, бірнеше бөлімдерді құру кезінде бірнеше бөлімдердің сапасын өлшейтін, бі Класттардың санын автоматты түрде анықтау үшін, айнымалы ұзындығының шешімдері мен көп пермутациялық операторлардың аумағын кластерлеу процесінде көрсетіледі. Соңында, көп көрініс негіздеген көп мақсатты техникалық арқылы соңғы парeto бағдарламасында альтернативті бөлімдеу жиыны алады. Түрлі істеу метрикасына қатынау арқылы көптеген SRC тест деректер қорларының көптеген тәртіпсіздік нәтижелері көрінетін және мәтін негіздеген көріністердің күшін жақсы іздеу нәтижелерін білу үшін', 'lt': 'Dabartiniame dokumente nagrinėjamas daugiapakopio mokymosi naudojimas paieškos rezultatų klasifikavimui. Name Be tekstinio vaizdo, kurį rodo semantinė ir sintetinė informacija, dabartinėje sistemoje taip pat naudojamas papildomas vaizdas, išgautas iš tinklalapiuose esančių vaizdų. A single consensus partitioning is finally obtained after consulting these two individual views by the deployment of a multiobjective based clustering technique.  Kartu naudojant AMOSA optimizuojamos kelios objektyvios funkcijos, įskaitant klasterio kokybės matavimo vertybes, matuojančias skaidymų gerumą, gautą naudojant skirtingas peržiūras, ir susitarimo ir nesutarimo indeksą, kiekybiškai įvertinant daugelio peržiūrų vieningumą sukuriant skaidymus. Siekiant automatiškai nustatyti klasterių skaičių, klasterizavimo procese įtraukiamos kintamojo ilgio sprendimų sąvokos ir daugelis permutacijos operatorių. Galiausiai galutiniame Pareto priekinėje dalyje alternatyvių dalijimų rinkinys gaunamas siūlomu daugialypiu būdu pagrįstu daugialypiu metodu. Eksperimentiniai rezultatai pagal siūlomą metodą dėl kelių SRC bandymų duomenų rinkinių, susijusių su skirtingais veikimo rodikliais, akivaizdžiai nustato vizualinės ir tekstiniu požiūriu pagrįstos galios siekiant geresnio paieškos rezultatų klasifikavimo.', 'mt': 'Id-dokument attwali jesplora l-użu ta’ tagħlim b’diversi viżijiet għall-raggruppament tar-riżultati tat-tiftix. Tista’ tiġi rrappreżentata snippet fuq l-internet bl-użu ta’ diversi fehmiet. Minbarra l-vista testwali indikata kemm mill-informazzjoni semantika kif ukoll minn dik sinrattika, fil-qafas attwali tintuża wkoll vista kumplimentari estratta minn immaġni li jinsabu fil-snippets tal-internet. Fl-a ħħar nett jinkiseb tqassim ta’ kunsens wieħed wara li jiġu kkonsultati dawn iż-żewġ fehmiet individwali bl-użu ta’ teknika ta’ raggruppament ibbażata fuq diversi objettivi. Several objective functions including the values of a cluster quality measure measuring the goodness of partitionings obtained using different views and an agreement-disagreement index, quantifying the amount of oneness among multiple views in generating partitionings are optimized simultaneously using AMOSA.  Sabiex jiġi identifikat l-għadd ta’ raggruppamenti awtomatikament, fil-proċess ta’ raggruppament jiġu introdotti kunċetti ta’ soluzzjonijiet ta’ tul varjabbli u firxa vast a ta’ operaturi ta’ permutazzjoni. Fl-a ħħar nett, sett ta’ qsim alternattiv jinkiseb fuq il-quddiem finali Pareto bit-teknika multioġġettiva proposta bbażata fuq viżjoni multipla. Ir-riżultati esperimentali bl-approċċ propost dwar diversi settijiet ta’ dejta tat-testijiet ta’ referenza tal-SRC fir-rigward ta’ metriċi ta’ prestazzjoni differenti evidentement jistabbilixxu s-saħħa tal-fehmiet viżivi u bbażati fuq it-test biex jinkiseb raggruppament aħjar tar-riżultati tat-tiftix.', 'mk': 'Сегашната хартија ја истражува употребата на мултипогледно учење за групирање на резултатите на пребарувањето. Веб- фрлач може да се претставува со користење на повеќе погледи. Освен текстуалниот поглед обележан од семантичките и синтактичките информации, комплиментарниот поглед изваден од сликите што се содржат во веб- резервите, исто така, се користи во сегашната рамка. Еден консензус поделба конечно се добива по консултацијата со овие два индивидуални погледи со распоредувањето на мултиобјективна техника на групирање. Неколку објективни функции, вклучително и вредностите на квалитетната мерка на групата за мерење на добрината на поделбите добиени со користење на различни погледи и индекс на договор-несогласување, квантификувањето на количината на единственост меѓу многуте погледи во генерирањето на поделбите се Со цел автоматски да се детектира бројот на групи, во процесот на групирање се воведени концепти на решенија со променлива должина и голем оператор на пермутација. Конечно, набор алтернативни поделби се добиваат на финалниот фронт на Парето со предложената мултиобјективна техника базирана на мултипоглед. Експерименталните резултати од предложениот пристап на неколку тестирани тестови на СРЦ во однос на различните метрики на перформанса очигледно ја утврдуваат моќта на визуелните и текстовите погледи за постигнување подобро групирање на резултатите на пребарувањето.', 'ms': 'Kertas semasa mengeksplorasi penggunaan pembelajaran berbilang-paparan untuk kumpulan hasil gelintar. Name Selain paparan teks yang ditandai oleh maklumat semantik dan sintaktik, paparan komplimentar yang diekstrak dari imej yang terdapat dalam snippets-web juga digunakan dalam kerangka semasa. Sekatan konsensus tunggal akhirnya dicapai selepas konsultasi kedua-dua pemandangan individu ini dengan penerbangan teknik berkumpul berdasarkan objektif berbilang. Beberapa fungsi objektif termasuk nilai ukuran kualiti kelompok mengukur kebaikan sekatan yang dicapai menggunakan paparan berbeza dan indeks kesepakatan-ketidaksetujuan, kuantifikasi jumlah kesepakatan diantara paparan berbilang dalam menghasilkan sekatan adalah optimum secara bersamaan menggunakan AMOSA. Untuk mengesan bilangan kelompok secara automatik, konsep penyelesaian panjang pembolehubah dan julat luas operator permutasi diperkenalkan dalam proses kelompok. Akhirnya, set sekatan alternatif diperoleh di hadapan Pareto akhir oleh teknik berbilang-objektif berdasarkan penampilan berbilang. Hasil percubaan dengan pendekatan yang diusulkan pada beberapa set data ujian benchmark SRC berkaitan dengan metrik prestasi yang berbeza jelas menetapkan kuasa pemandangan visual dan berdasarkan teks dalam mencapai kelompok hasil gelintar yang lebih baik.', 'ml': 'നിലവിലുള്ള പേപ്പറില്\u200d തെരച്ചിലുള്ള ഫലം ക്ലാസ്റ്റര്\u200d ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി പല-കാഴ്ച പഠിക്കു ഒരു വെബ്- സ്നിപ്പെറ്റ് പല കാഴ്ചകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ച് പ്രതിനിധിയിലാക്കുവാന്\u200d സാധ്യമല്ല. Apart from textual view cued by both the semantic and syntactic information, a complimentary view extracted from images contained in the web-snippets is also utilized in the current framework.  ഈ രണ്ടു വ്യക്തിക കാഴ്ചകളെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയശേഷം ഒരു ഒറ്റ സമ്മതിക്കുന്ന വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d അവസാനം ലഭിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. ഒരു പലതിഷ്ടമ വ്യത്യസ്ത കാഴ്ചകളും ഒരു കരാറിന്റെ വിഭിന്നത്തിന്റെ സൂക്ഷ്മതയും ഉപയോഗിച്ച് കിട്ടിയ വിഭാഗങ്ങളുടെ നന്മയും അളന്നുകൊണ്ട് ക്ലോസ്റ്റര്\u200d വിലയുടെ മൂല്ല്യങ്ങളും കൂടുതല്\u200d സാധ്യ സ്വയം ക്ലാസ്റ്ററുകളുടെ എണ്ണം കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d വേറിയല്\u200d നീളം പരിഹരണങ്ങളുടെ ആശയങ്ങളും വിശാലമായ വിധികളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d പരിചയപ്പെടുത അവസാനം, പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട പല്ലിക്കാഴ്ചയുടെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള പല്ലിക്കൂട്ടിക സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യയുടെ അവസാന വ്യത്യസ്ത പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കുന്ന മെറ്റിക്കളുടെ വ്യത്യസ്തമായ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പരീക്ഷണത്തിനുള്ള പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള പ്രോദ്ദേശിച', 'pl': 'Aktualny artykuł analizuje wykorzystanie uczenia się wielu widoków do klastrowania wyników wyszukiwania. Web-fragment może być reprezentowany przy użyciu wielu widoków. Oprócz widoku tekstowego wykorzystywanego zarówno przez informacje semantyczne, jak i składniowe, w obecnym frameworku wykorzystywany jest również komplementarny widok uzyskany z obrazów zawartych w fragmentach sieci. Po konsultacji z tymi dwoma indywidualnymi poglądami uzyskuje się ostatecznie pojedyncze podziały konsensusowe poprzez wdrożenie techniki klastrowania opartej na wielobiektywnych obiektach. Kilka obiektywnych funkcji, w tym wartości miernika jakości klastra mierzącego dobroć partycji uzyskanych przy użyciu różnych widoków oraz indeksu porozumienia-braku zgody, ilościowo określającego ilość jedności między wieloma widokami w generowaniu partycji, zostało optymalizowane jednocześnie za pomocą AMOSA. W celu automatycznego wykrycia liczby klastrów w procesie klastrowania wprowadzane są koncepcje rozwiązań o zmiennej długości oraz szeroki zakres operatorów permutacji. Wreszcie, zestaw alternatywnego partycjonowania uzyskuje się na końcowym froncie Pareto za pomocą proponowanej wieloosobowej techniki opartej na wieloosobowym widoku. Wyniki eksperymentalne zaproponowane podejście na kilku zestawach danych testów referencyjnych SRC w odniesieniu do różnych wskaźników wydajności wyraźnie potwierdzają moc widoków wizualnych i tekstowych w osiągnięciu lepszego klastrowania wyników wyszukiwania.', 'mn': 'Одоогийн цаас олон үзэл суралцахын тулд хайлтын үр дүнг хэвлэхэд ашигладаг. Веб-снип олон үзэл ашиглаж болно. Текст болон синтактик мэдээллээс хоёуланг харж байгаагаас гадна Веб-снип-д дүрслэгдсэн зурагнуудын тусламжтай хариулт нь одоогийн хэмжээнд ч хэрэглэгддэг. Эцэст нь нэг зөвшөөрөл хуваалцах нь олон зорилготой бүлэг технологийг ашигласнаар эдгээр хоёр хүмүүсийн үзэл бодлогыг зөвлөсөн дараа олсон. Ихэнх зорилготой функцүүд, хамгийн сайн хэмжээний утга нь өөр үзэл, зөвшөөрөлт бус байдлын индексийг ашиглан авсан хуваарилцааны сайн хэмжээсүүдийг хэмжээгээр, олон үзэл дээр нэгдлийн хэмжээсүүдийн хэмжээсүүдийг тооцоолж, олон үзэл дээ Блостуудын тоо автоматаар тодорхойлохын тулд өөрчлөлтийн урт шийдвэрлэлүүдийн ойлголт болон маш олон пермутацийн операторын тоо бүрдүүлэгдэх процесс юм. Эцэст нь олон үзэл дээр суурилсан олон зорилготой техник дээр төгсгөл Парето дээр шинэ захирал хуваалцаа гаргадаг. ШХАБ-ын олон салбарын тест өгөгдлийн хэмжээний туршилтын үр дүнд өөр үйл ажиллагааны метрикийн тухай харилцааны, текст суурилсан үзүүлэлтийн хүч чадлыг илүү сайхан хайх үр дүнг цуглуулахад тодорхой байгуулдаг.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරස්තූත පත්තුර පරීක්ෂණය ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරකෘතිය පාවිච්චි කරන්න පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න. Name සමාන්තික සහ සංකේතික තොරතුරු දෙන්නම් පැත්තක් දර්ශනය නිසා, වෙබ් ස්නිපෙට්ට් වල තියෙන පින්තූර වලින් පින්තූරයක් ප්\u200dරති අන්තිමේදී මේ ප්\u200dරතිකාරයෝ දෙකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙන පස්සේ එක්ක එක්ක සම්බන්ධතාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙ ක්ලාස්ටර් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂතාවක් අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් අවශ්\u200dය විශේෂතාවක් පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා විවිධ ප්\u200dරකාරයක් සහ සම්බන්ධ විශ ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් ස්වයංක්\u200dරමයෙන් අංකය හොයාගන්න, වෙනස් විසින් විසින් විසින් සහ විසින් විසින් විසින් සම්බන්ධ අන්තිමේදි, වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් වෙනුවෙන් පරීටෝ අන්තිම ප්\u200dරධානයෙන් පිළිගන්නවා. ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට ප්\u200dරශ්ණාත්මක ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ දත්ත සෙට්ටුවට SRC වෙනස් විදියට පරී', 'so': 'Current paper explores the use of multi-view learning for search result clustering.  Internetka waxaa lagu soo bandhigi karaa aragtida kala duduwan. Sidoo kale waxaa lagu isticmaalaa aragti qoraal ah oo ku qoran macluumaadka sawirada iyo sawirada bogga internetka. qeyb-qeyb keliya waxaa la helaa marka la wada taliyo labadan arag oo gaar ah kadibna la soo dirayo teknikada dhaqaalaha oo la soo saaro. Shaqooyin badan oo la jeedo, kuwaas oo ku jira qiimaha qiimaha qiimaha cluster ah oo ku qiyaasa wanaagga qeybinta lagu helay isticmaalka aragtida kala duduwan iyo kaarka heshiiska isku qiimeynta, waxaa lagu qiyaasaa tirada isku qiimeynta aragtida kala duduwan marka la sameeyo qeybiyayaasha waxaa la isticmaalaa AMOSA. Si aad u ogaato lambarka isboortiga, waxaa lagu soo bandhigaa fikrada meelaha kala duwan oo kala duwan, iyo shaqeeyayaasha fasaxa oo kala duduwan. Ugu dambaysta waxaa laga helaa qeybo kala duduwan ee ugu dambeeya Pareto horteeda, waxaa laga helaa teknolojiyo faro badan oo lagu talo galay. Imtixaanka waxaa ka soo baxay qaababka la soo jeeday in ay soo gaadhaan koobo ka mid ah sameynta imtixaanka SRC oo ku saabsan imtixaanka kala duduwan oo ay ka muuqato xoogga muuqashada iyo aragtida qoraalka si ay u hesho resultada raadinta oo ka wanaagsan.', 'no': 'Gjeldande papir utforskar bruken av fleirvisingslæring for søkjeresultatet. Eit nettsnippet kan representerast med fleire visingar. I siden av tekstvisinga med både semantiske og syntaktiske informasjon, brukar også eit komplimeringsvising ut frå bilete som inneheld i nettsnippets i gjeldande rammeverket. Ein enkelt konsenspartisjon er til slutt fått etter konsultering av desse to individuelle synlege ved utføring av ein multimålsk basert klasteringsteknikk. Fleire målsettingsfunksjonar inkluderer verdiane for ein klasterkvalitetmål som målar godt partisjonar som er fått med forskjellige visingar og eit avtaleindeks for avtale, som kvantifiserer kvantifikasjonen av uniteten mellom fleire visingar i oppretting av partisjonar blir optimalisert samtidig med AMOSA. For å oppdaga talet på kluster automatisk, vert konseptar på variabel lengde løysingar og ein stor område av permutasjonsprosektarar innført i klasseringsprosessen. Ein set alternative partisjonar vert henta på den siste Pareto-framsida av den foreslåde multivisningsbaserte multiobjektive teknikken. Eksperimentale resultat av den foreslåde tilnærming på fleire benchmark test-datasett av SRC med hensyn til ulike funksjonsmetrikar, tydelig oppretter kraft på synlege og tekstbaserte visingar i å nå bedre søkingsresultat.', 'ro': 'Lucrarea curentă explorează utilizarea învățării multi-view pentru clusterizarea rezultatelor căutării. Un fragment web poate fi reprezentat folosind mai multe vizualizări. Pe lângă vizualizarea textuală cu informația semantică și sintactică, în cadrul actual este utilizată și o vizualizare complementară extrasă din imaginile conținute în fragmentele web. În cele din urmă, se obține o partiționare unică de consens după consultarea acestor două puncte de vedere individuale prin implementarea unei tehnici de clusterizare bazate pe mai multe obiective. Mai multe funcții obiective, inclusiv valorile unei măsurători de calitate a clusterului care măsoară bunătatea partițiilor obținute folosind vizualizări diferite și un indice de acord-dezacord, cuantificând cantitatea de unitate dintre vizualizările multiple în generarea partițiilor sunt optimizate simultan folosind AMOSA. Pentru a detecta automat numărul de clustere, în procesul de clustere sunt introduse concepte de soluții cu lungime variabilă și o gamă largă de operatori de permutare. În cele din urmă, un set de partiții alternative sunt obținute pe frontul Pareto final prin tehnica multiobiectivă propusă bazată pe mai multe vizualizări. Rezultatele experimentale prin abordarea propusă pe mai multe seturi de date de testare de referință ale SRC în ceea ce privește diferitele măsurători de performanță stabilesc în mod evident puterea vizualizărilor vizuale și bazate pe text în obținerea unei mai bune clusterizări a rezultatelor căutării.', 'sr': 'Trenutni papir istražuje upotrebu učenja višepogleda za skupljanje rezultata pretraživanja. Web snippet se može predstaviti koristeći višestruki pogled. Osim tekstualnog pogleda koje su pokazale semantičke i sintaktičke informacije, komplimentni pogled izvučen iz slika koje su sadržane u web snippets takođe se koristi u sadašnjoj okviru. Konačno se pojedinačno razdvajanje konsenzusa dobije nakon konsultovanja ovih dva pojedinačnog mišljenja po rasporedu multiobjektivne tehnike skusteringa. Nekoliko objektivnih funkcija uključujući vrijednosti mjere kvalitete skupine za mjerenje dobrote particije koje su dobile koristeći različite poglede i indeks neslaganja sporazuma, kvantificirajući količinu jedinstva između višestrukih pogleda u stvaranju particije, istovremeno se optimiziraju koristeći AMOSA. Da bi se automatski otkrilo broj klasera, koncepti promjennih rješenja dužine i ogromni opseg permutacijskih operatora uvedeni su u skustering procesu. Konačno, na konačnoj strani Pareto dobija skup alternativnog particije predloženim multiobjektivnim tehnikama na temelju multiobjektivnog pogleda. Eksperimentalni rezultati predloženog pristupa na nekoliko serija podataka SRC-a u pogledu različitih tehnika provedbe očigledno uspostavljaju moć vizuelnih i tekstualnih pogleda u ostvarivanju boljih skupljanja rezultata pretraživanja.', 'sv': 'Nuvarande uppsats undersöker användningen av multi-view lärande för sökresultatklustring. Ett webbsnitt kan representeras med flera vyer. Bortsett från textvy med både semantisk och syntaktisk information, används även en kompletterande vy extraherad från bilder som finns i webbsnippet i nuvarande ramverk. En enda konsensusdeling erhålls slutligen efter samråd med dessa två individuella synpunkter genom införandet av en flermålsbaserad klusterteknik. Flera objektiva funktioner, inklusive värdena för ett klusterkvalitetsmått som mäter godheten hos partitioneringar erhållna med hjälp av olika vyer och ett avtal-oenighetsindex, kvantifiera mängden enhet mellan flera vyer vid generering av partitioneringar optimeras samtidigt med AMOSA. För att automatiskt kunna upptäcka antalet kluster introduceras koncept för lösningar med variabel längd och ett stort antal permutationsoperatörer i klusterprocessen. Slutligen erhålls en uppsättning alternativ partitionering på den slutliga Pareto fronten genom den föreslagna multiview-baserade multiobjektiva tekniken. Experimentella resultat med det föreslagna tillvägagångssättet på flera benchmark testdatauppsättningar av SRC med avseende på olika prestandamått fastställer uppenbarligen kraften hos visuella och textbaserade vyer för att uppnå bättre sökresultatklustring.', 'ta': 'தற்போதைய தாள் பல காட்சியின் படிக்கை பயன்படுத்தலை தேடும் முடிவுகளை தேடுகிறது. ஒரு வலை சுட்டி பல காட்சிகளை பயன்படுத்தி குறிப்பிட முடியும். தற்போதைய சட்டத்தில் உள்ள பிம்பங்களில் இருந்து கொண்டு பாதிக்கப்பட்ட உரைய காட்சி மற்றும் ஒத்திசைவு தகவலால் துணைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது அல்லது தற்ப இந்த இரண்டு தனிப்பட்ட காட்சிகளை பராமரித்த பின்னர் ஒரே ஒதுங்கீட்டு பிரிவு கிடைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது பல பொருள்களை அடிப்படையான தொழில பல பொருள்களின் செயல்பாடுகளில் உள்ள கிளாஸ்டர் தரம் அளவின் மதிப்புகளைக் கொண்டு வேறு பார்வைகள் மற்றும் ஒரு ஒப்பந்தம்- விருப்பப்படுத்தல் சுட்டிக்குறியீட்டை பயன்படுத்தி பி தானாகவே கிளாஸ்டரின் எண்ணிக்கையை கண்டுபிடி இறுதியில், பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பல காட்சியின் அடிப்படையில் உள்ள கடைசி பார்டோ முன்னால் ஒரு மாற்று பிரிவு பெருக்கல் கிட பரிந்துரையான முடிவுகளால் SRC யின் பல பென்க்மார்க் சோதனை தரவுத்தளங்கள் மீது முன்னோக்கப்பட்ட முடிவுகள் வேறு செயல்பாடு முறைகளை பற்றி தெளிவாக', 'ur': 'اوسنی کاغذ لکھنے کے لئے بہت سی نظر کی تعلیم کا استعمال کرتا ہے۔ Name سنٹیوال کی نظر کے علاوہ جو سیمانٹیکی اور سینٹکتیک معلومات کے ذریعے نشان دی گئی ہے، ایک نمایش نظر جو ویب-اسنیپٹ میں لکھی ہوئی تصاویروں سے بھی اٹھایا گیا ہے اور وہاں ہی موجود فرم میں استعمال کیا جاتا ہے. ایک کنسوس پارتیشن آخر میں ان دو شخصی نظریں کی مشورت کے بعد ملتی موجود آزمائش کی تقویت کے ذریعہ سے ملتی ہے اور بہت سی موجود فعالیتوں کے شامل ایک کلسٹر کیلوٹیٹ موتوں کے مطابق جو مختلف نظر و اختلاف کے مطابق حاصل ہونے والی پارتیٹیوں کی بھلائی کے مطابق مطابق کرتا ہے اور ایک معاملہ-اختلاف انڈیکس کے مطابق مطابق کرتا ہے، پارتیٹیوں کے پیدا کرنے میں بہت سی کلسٹر کی تعداد اپنے ساتھ پتہ لگانے کے لئے، متغیر طول حل کی نظریں اور بہت سے متغیر اپراتر کی مدت کلسٹرینگ پرسس میں پیش کیے جاتے ہیں. بالآخر، ایک مجموعہ مختلف پارٹیٹیوں کا سٹ آخری پارٹو کے سامنے پیش کیا گیا ہے multi-view متعدد موجود تکنیک کے ذریعے۔ مختلف فعالیت میٹریک کے معاملہ میں مختلف فیصلہ کے متریک کے معاملہ میں مختلف بنچم مارک ٹیسٹوں پر پیشنهاد کی طریقے کے ذریعہ سے آزمائش کا نتیجہ معلوم ہوتا ہے کہ بہتر تلاش نتیجے کا کلسٹر پہنچانے کے لئے visual اور text-based views کا', 'uz': "Name Name Name Endi bu ikkita oddiy ko'rinishni tashqarishdan keyin bir bir bir bir bir bir bir bir bir bir bir bir bir bir bir bir xil fikrlarni tashqi qilishdan keyin keladi. Bir necha obʼekt funksiyalari, boshqa ko'zlarni ko'paytirish imkoniyatlarini oʻzgartirish va AMOSA bilan bir necha koʻrinishida ajratish imkoniyatlarning qiymatlarini moslash mumkin. Natijalarning soni avtomatik aniqlash uchun oʻzgaruvchining qiymatlari va kengaytirish operatorlari bilan boshlanadi. Endi, boshqa qismlarga o'zgartirish boshqa o'zgarishlar qo'llaniladi, ilova qilingan ko'pgina ko'plab-ko'plab teknologiya asosida. Name", 'vi': 'Tài liệu hiện thời nghiên cứu về việc học nhiều cảnh để phân tích kết quả tìm kiếm. Một phần trên mạng có thể được đại diện bằng nhiều ô xem. Ngoại trừ kết cấu được tạo ra bởi thông tin ngữ pháp và cú pháp, một góc nhìn bổ sung chiết xuất từ ảnh trong các đoạn trên mạng cũng được dùng trong khung hình hiện thời. Kết quả đạt được một sự phân chia đồng thuận đơn lẻ sau khi xem xét hai quan điểm cá nhân này bằng cách triển khai một kỹ thuật phân biệt đa mục tiêu. Một số chức năng mục tiêu bao gồm các giá trị của một thước đo chất lượng cụm được phân chia bằng cách nhìn khác nhau và một số điểm bất đồng, định lượng lượng lượng lượng hợp nhất giữa nhiều quan điểm trong việc tạo ra các bộ phân tách được tăng cẩn song thời dùng AMOSA. Để tự động phát hiện số cụm, trong quá trình tụ tập được đưa ra các khái niệm về các giải pháp dài biến thể và một loạt các công ty sắp xếp vị trí rộng lớn. Cuối cùng, một bộ phân tách được tạo ra ở mặt trước của Papa cuối cùng do kỹ thuật đa khách điệu được đề xuất. Kết quả thí nghiệm do phương pháp được đề nghị với một số tập tin mẫu thử tiêu chuẩn của SR-C với các đo trình lượng khác nhau hiển nhiên xác định sức mạnh của quan điểm thị giác quan và văn bản về việc đạt kết quả tìm kiếm tốt hơn.', 'da': 'Det aktuelle dokument undersøger brugen af multi-view læring til klyngning af søgeresultater. Et webstykke kan repræsenteres ved hjælp af flere visninger. Bortset fra den tekstmæssige opfattelse, der er inspireret af både semantiske og syntaktiske oplysninger, anvendes også en supplerende visning udvundet fra billeder indeholdt i web-snippets i den nuværende ramme. Der opnås endelig en enkelt konsensuspartition efter høring af disse to individuelle synspunkter ved indførelse af en multiobjektivbaseret klyngeteknik. Flere objektive funktioner, herunder værdierne af en klyngekvalitetsmåling, der måler godheden af opdelinger opnået ved hjælp af forskellige visninger og et aftale-uenighedsindeks, der kvantificerer mængden af enhed blandt flere visninger i generering af opdelinger optimeres samtidig ved hjælp af AMOSA. For automatisk at registrere antallet af klynger indføres begreber af løsninger med variabel længde og en lang række permutationsoperatører i klyngeprocessen. Endelig opnås et sæt alternativ opdeling på den endelige Pareto front ved hjælp af den foreslåede multi-view baserede multiobjektiv teknik. Eksperimentelle resultater ved den foreslåede tilgang på flere benchmark testdatasæt af SRC med hensyn til forskellige præstationsmålinger fastslår tydeligvis styrken af visuelle og tekstbaserede visninger til at opnå bedre søgeresultatklyngning.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия изследва използването на обучение с множество изгледи за клъстериране на резултатите от търсенето. Уеб-фрагмет може да бъде представен с помощта на няколко изгледа. Освен текстовия изглед, подсигурен от семантичната и синтактичната информация, в настоящата рамка се използва и допълнителен изглед, извлечен от изображенията, съдържащи се в уеб-фрагментите. Най-накрая се получава единно консенсусно разделяне след консултация с тези две индивидуални възгледи чрез внедряване на многообективна технология на клъстериране. Няколко обективни функции, включително стойностите на измерване на качеството на клъстера, измерващи добротата на преградите, получени чрез различни изгледи, и индекс на съгласие-несъгласие, количествено определяне на размера на единността между множество изгледи при генерирането на прегради, са оптимизирани едновременно с помощта на AMOSA. С цел автоматично откриване на броя на клъстерите, в процеса на клъстериране се въвеждат концепции за решения с променлива дължина и широк спектър от пермутационни оператори. Накрая, набор от алтернативни разделения са получени на крайния Парето фронт чрез предложената многообективна техника, базирана на множество изгледи. Експерименталните резултати от предложения подход върху няколко сравнителни тестови набора от данни на СРС по отношение на различни показатели за ефективност очевидно установяват силата на визуалните и текстово-базираните изгледи за постигане на по-добро клъстериране на резултатите от търсенето.', 'hr': 'Trenutni papir istražuje upotrebu učenja višepogleda za skupljanje rezultata pretraživanja. Web snippet se može predstaviti s višestrukim pogledom. Osim tekstualnog pogleda koje su pokazale semantičke i sintaktičke informacije, komplimentni pogled izvučen iz slika sadržane u web snippets također se koristi u sadašnjoj okviru. Nakon savjetovanja s ovim dvije pojedinačne mišljenje nakon razvoja multiobjektivne skusteringske tehnike, konačno se dobije jedinstveno razmjerenje konsenzusa. Nekoliko objektivnih funkcija uključujući vrijednosti mjere kvalitete skupine za mjerenje dobrote djelovanja dobivenih s različitim pogledima i indeks neslaganja sporazuma, kvantificirajući količinu jedinstva među višestrukim pogledima u stvaranju djelovanja, istovremeno se optimiziraju koristeći AMOSA. Kako bi se automatski otkrilo broj skupina, koncepti promjennih rješenja dužine i ogromni raspon permutacijskih operatora uvedeni su u skustering procesu. Konačno, skup alternativnog dijelivanja na konačnom predstavu Pareto dobija predložena multiobjektivna tehnika na temelju višepogleda. Eksperimentalni rezultati predloženog pristupa na nekoliko stanica ispitivanja podataka SRC-a u odnosu na različite mjere učinkovitosti očigledno utvrđuju moć vizuelnih i tekstualnih pogleda u postizanju boljih skupljanja rezultata pretraga.', 'nl': 'Het huidige artikel onderzoekt het gebruik van multi-view learning voor het clusteren van zoekresultaten. Een web-fragment kan worden weergegeven met behulp van meerdere weergaven. Afgezien van tekstuele weergave die wordt veroorzaakt door zowel de semantische als syntactische informatie, wordt in het huidige framework ook een complementaire weergave geëxtraheerd uit afbeeldingen in de web-snippets gebruikt. Een enkele consensus partitionering wordt uiteindelijk verkregen na raadpleging van deze twee individuele standpunten door de inzet van een multiobjectieve gebaseerde clusteringstechniek. Verschillende objectieve functies, waaronder de waarden van een clusterkwaliteitsmeting die de goedheid van partities meet verkregen met behulp van verschillende weergaven en een overeenkomst-meningsindex, kwantificeert de hoeveelheid eenheid tussen meerdere weergaven bij het genereren van partities, worden tegelijkertijd geoptimaliseerd met AMOSA. Om het aantal clusters automatisch te detecteren, worden concepten van oplossingen met variabele lengte en een breed scala aan permutatieoperatoren geïntroduceerd in het clusteringsproces. Ten slotte wordt een reeks alternatieve partitionering verkregen op het uiteindelijke Pareto front door de voorgestelde multi-view gebaseerde multi-objectieve techniek. Experimentele resultaten van de voorgestelde aanpak op verschillende benchmark test datasets van SRC met betrekking tot verschillende performance metrics bewijzen duidelijk de kracht van visuele en tekstgebaseerde weergaven bij het bereiken van betere zoekresultaten clustering.', 'ko': '본고는 다시도 학습이 검색 결과 집합에서의 응용을 탐구했다.웹 코드 세그먼트를 표시하기 위해 여러 개의 보기를 사용할 수 있습니다.의미와 문법 정보 알림의 텍스트 보기를 제외하고 현재 프레임워크는 웹 세션에 포함된 이미지에서 추출한 보충 보기를 사용합니다.다목적 기반의 분류 기술을 배치하여 이 두 개의 단독 보기를 참고한 후에 최종적으로 단일 일치성 구역을 얻는다.AMOSA를 사용하여 여러 대상 함수를 동시에 최적화했으며, 이는 서로 다른 뷰를 사용하여 얻은 분할 우수도를 측정하는 클러스터 질량 메트릭 값과 일치-불일치 지수를 측정하고, 분할 생성 시 여러 뷰 간의 일치성을 계량화하는 것입니다.자동적으로 집계수를 검출하기 위해 집계 과정에서 변장해와 대량치환산자의 개념을 도입했다.마지막으로 제시된 다시도를 바탕으로 하는 다목적 기술을 통해 최종 파르토리코 전방에서 예비 구역을 얻었다.이 방법은 SRC의 여러 기준 테스트 데이터 집합에서 서로 다른 성능 지표에 대한 실험 결과 시각과 텍스트를 바탕으로 하는 보기가 더욱 좋은 검색 결과 집합을 실현하는 데 강력한 기능을 가진다는 것을 보여준다.', 'sw': 'Current paper explores the use of multi-view learning for search result clustering.  Kifaa cha mtandaoni kinaweza kuonyeshwa kwa kutumia maoni kadhaa. Pamoja na mtazamo wa kimsingi ulioandaliwa na taarifa za kisasa na ushirikiano, mtazamo wa heshima uliotengenezwa kutoka kwenye picha zilizowekwa kwenye vifaa vya mtandao unatumiwa pia katika mfumo wa sasa. Kugawanywa kwa makubaliano ya moja hatimaye imepata baada ya kushauriana na maoni haya mawili ya watu binafsi kwa kutumika teknolojia yenye msingi wa utamaduni. Shughuli kadhaa za malengo ikiwa ni pamoja na thamani ya kiwango cha ubora wa chama kinachopima vizuri vya upigaji kura zilizopatikana kwa kutumia mtazamo tofauti na index ya makubaliano na kutofautiana, inayokadiria kiasi cha ushirikiano miongoni mwa maoni mbalimbali katika kutengeneza vipengele vinavyofanikiwa kwa wakati mmoja kwa kutumia AMOSA. Ili kutambua idadi ya viungo vya vifaa vya kujitegemea, dhana ya suluhisho mbalimbali za muda mrefu na mengi mengi ya wateja ruhusa yanaanzishwa katika mchakato wa kuingia. Mwisho, mfululizo wa chama mbadala unapatikana kwenye maeneo ya mwisho ya Pareto na teknolojia ya mtazamo wa mambo mengi yenye utamaduni. Matokeo ya majaribio yaliyotokana na mbinu zilizopendekezwa juu ya seti kadhaa za taarifa za uchunguzi wa benchmark za SRC kwa kuhusiana na mbinu tofauti za utendaji zinazoonyesha kwa dhahiri kuanzisha nguvu ya maoni yanayotokana na maandishi ya maoni yanayosimamia katika kupata matokeo bora ya kutafuta.', 'fa': 'کاغذ فعلی استفاده از یادگیری چندین دیدگاه برای جستجوی نتیجه\u200cهای جستجو را تحقیق می\u200cکند. Name بجز دیدگاه متن که توسط اطلاعات semantic و syntactic نشان داده شده، یک دیدگاه تعریفی که از تصاویر محتوای وب-snippets استفاده شده در چهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچهارچ بالاخره از مشورت این دو نظر شخصی با استفاده از یک تکنیک گروهی بسیاری از هدف\u200cهای زیادی به دست آورده می\u200cشود. تعدادی عملکرد هدف، شامل ارزش یک اندازه کیفیت کلاستر که با استفاده از دیده های مختلف و نشانه های اختلاف با توافق به اندازه\u200cگیری نیکویی از بخش\u200cهایی که با استفاده از دیده\u200cهای مختلف یافته\u200cاند، مقدار واحدی در میان دیده\u200cهای مختلف در تولید بخش\u200cهایی با استفاده از AMOSA به اندازه\u200cگی برای شناسایی تعداد کلاس\u200cها به طور خودکار، نظریه\u200cها از راه حل\u200cهای طول متغیر و یک مجموعه\u200cی عملکرد\u200cهای تغییر\u200cپذیر در فرایند کلاستر معرفی می\u200cشوند. بالاخره، یک مجموعه تقسیم جایگزینی توسط تکنیک متعدد هدف پیشنهاد در پارتو نهایی گرفته می شود. نتیجه\u200cهای تجربه توسط دستور پیشنهاد روی مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cهای آزمایش سنجیره\u200cای از SRC در مورد متریک\u200cهای فعالیت متفاوتی مشخصا قدرت دیده\u200cهای و متن در رسیدن نتیجه\u200cهای جستجوی بهتر را ثابت می\u200cکند.', 'de': 'Der aktuelle Beitrag untersucht die Verwendung von Multi-View-Learning für das Clustering von Suchergebnissen. Ein Web-Snippet kann mit mehreren Ansichten dargestellt werden. Neben der textuellen Ansicht, die sowohl durch semantische als auch syntaktische Informationen erzeugt wird, wird im aktuellen Framework auch eine ergänzende Ansicht verwendet, die aus Bildern extrahiert wird, die in den Web-Snippets enthalten sind. Eine einheitliche Konsens-Partitionierung wird schließlich nach Konsultation dieser beiden Einzelansichten durch den Einsatz einer multiobjektiven Clustering-Technik erreicht. Mehrere objektive Funktionen, einschließlich der Werte eines Clusterqualitätsmaßes, das die Güte von Partitionen misst, die mit verschiedenen Ansichten und einem Übereinkunft-Unstimmigkeitsindex erhalten wurden, und die Quantifizierung der Einheit zwischen mehreren Ansichten bei der Erzeugung von Partitionen, werden gleichzeitig mit AMOSA optimiert. Um die Anzahl der Cluster automatisch zu erkennen, werden Konzepte von Lösungen mit variabler Länge und eine Vielzahl von Permutationsoperatoren in den Clustering-Prozess eingeführt. Schließlich wird eine Reihe alternativer Partitionierungen auf der endgültigen Pareto-Front durch die vorgeschlagene Multi-View-basierte Multiobjektive-Technik erhalten. Experimentelle Ergebnisse des vorgeschlagenen Ansatzes an mehreren Benchmark-Testdatensätzen von SRC in Bezug auf verschiedene Leistungsmetriken belegen offensichtlich die Leistungsfähigkeit visueller und textbasierter Ansichten bei der Erzielung besserer Suchergebnisse Clustering.', 'id': 'Kertas saat ini mengeksplorasi penggunaan pembelajaran multipandangan untuk kumpulan hasil pencarian. Sebuah snippet web dapat dirwakili menggunakan pemandangan berbilang. Selain pandangan teks yang disebut oleh informasi semantis dan sintaks, pandangan komplimentar yang diekstraksi dari gambar yang terkandung di web-snippets juga digunakan dalam kerangka saat ini. Sebuah partisi konsensus tunggal akhirnya diperoleh setelah konsultasi dua pemandangan individu ini dengan penerbangan teknik clustering berbasis multiobjektif. Beberapa fungsi objektif termasuk nilai dari ukuran kualitas klaster mengukur kebaikan partisi yang diperoleh menggunakan pandangan berbeda dan indeks kesepakatan-ketidaksetujuan, mengurangi jumlah kesepakatan diantara pemandangan berbilang dalam menghasilkan partisi yang optimisasi secara bersamaan menggunakan AMOSA. Untuk mendeteksi jumlah kelompok secara otomatis, konsep solusi panjang variabel dan jangkauan besar dari operator permutasi diperkenalkan dalam proses kelompok. Akhirnya, set partisi alternatif diperoleh di depan Pareto akhir oleh teknik multiobjektif berbasis multi-view yang diusulkan. Hasil eksperimental dengan pendekatan yang diusulkan pada beberapa set data ujian benchmark dari SRC mengenai metrik prestasi yang berbeda jelas menetapkan kekuatan pandangan visual dan berdasarkan teks dalam mencapai clustering hasil pencarian yang lebih baik.', 'sq': 'Gazeta aktuale eksploron përdorimin e mësimit me shumë pamje për grupimin e rezultateve të kërkimit. Një snippet web mund të përfaqësohet duke përdorur shumë pamje. Përveç pamjes tekstuale të shënuar si nga informacioni semantik ashtu edhe sintaktik, një pamje komplimentare e nxjerrë nga imazhet e përmbajtura në pjesët e rrjetit përdoret gjithashtu në kuadrin aktual. Një ndarje e vetme konsensusi arrihet më në fund pasi konsultohet me këto dy pikëpamje individuale nga vendosja e një teknike grupimi me bazë shumëobjektive. Disa funksione objektive duke përfshirë vlerat e një mase cilësie klasteri që matë mirësinë e ndarjeve të fituara duke përdorur pamje të ndryshme dhe një indeks marrëveshjeje-mosmarrëveshjeje, duke kuantifikuar sasinë e njësisë midis pamjeve të shumta në krijimin e ndarjeve optimizohen në të njëjtën kohë duke përdorur AMOSA. Për të zbuluar numrin e grupeve automatikisht, konceptet e zgjidhjeve të gjatësisë së ndryshme dhe një gamë të gjerë operatorësh permutacioni futen në procesin e grupimit. Më në fund, një sërë ndarjeje alternative arrihet në front përfundimtar Pareto nga teknika multiobjektive e propozuar. Rezultatet eksperimentale nga qasja e propozuar mbi disa grupe të dhënash për test in e SRC lidhur me metrikat e ndryshme të performancës me sa duket vendosin fuqinë e pamjeve vizuale dhe të bazuara në tekst në arritjen e grupimit më të mirë të rezultateve të kërkimit.', 'am': 'የአሁኑ ገጽ የዶሴ ፍለጋውን ለመጠቀም የተጠቃሚ የብዙ ተመልከት ማድረግ ይፈልጋል፡፡ ምርጫዎች የጽሑፍ ተመልከት በሴሜንቲካዊ እና Syntactic መረጃዎች ካደረገ በቀር፣ በመረብ-ስንቀሳቃዎች ውስጥ ካለው ምስሎች በተለየ ውጤት በአሁኑ ፍሬማር ላይ የተጠቀም ነው፡፡ በሁለቱ ጥያቄዎችን ከመጠቀም በኋላ አንዲት አንድ አንድ ማጋራት አካሄድ አግኝቷል፡፡ Several objective functions including the values of a cluster quality measure measuring the goodness of partitionings obtained using different views and an agreement-disagreement index, quantifying the amount of oneness among multiple views in generating partitionings are optimized simultaneously using AMOSA.  ለራሱ የተለየ የረዘመ መፍትሄቶችን እና በተለየ ብዙ ፈቃድ ተሟጋቾችን በመግለጥ ይደረጋሉ፡፡ በመጨረሻም በተዘጋጀው ብዙአዊ ዓይነት የተመሳሳይ ብዙአዊ የፖርቲካዊ ቴክኖክ በመጨረሻው ፓሮቲ ፊት ላይ የተለየ የሌሎችን ክፍል አግኝቷል፡፡ በተለየ የስርዓት ሜትሪኮች ላይ የተፈተና የፊደል ውጤቶች በሁለት benchmark ፈተና ድምፅ ላይ የSRC ጥያቄዎችን በመግኘት የራእይ እና የጽሑፍ ተመልከቶች ኃይል ማግኘት በማድረግ ግልፅ ይችላል፡፡', 'tr': "Häzirki kagyz netijesi üçin multi-görnöş öwrenmeniň ullanyşyny keşfetýär. _BAR_ Semantik we sintaktik maglumatlar tarapyndan berilen tekst görnöşinden başga, web snippetlerinde ähli çerçewde hem ullanylýar. Bir konsensus paýlaşmagy soňunda bu iki pikir indiriň görüşlerini multiobjektif tabanly klasterlik teknikleriniň döredilmesinden soňra berilýär. Çeşitli görüntüleri we anlaşmazlyk bozmazlyk indeksini ulanarak alan çuklar kalitesiniň ölçüsi dahil edilen birnäçe maksady fonksiyonlary, bölümleri oluşturmak üçin birleşik görüntülerinde birleşik noktalaryň ölçüsi we öngörülmek üçin bir arada optimize edilir AMOSA ullanýar. Klaster sayısını otomatik olarak tanımlamak için, değişken uzunluğun çözümlerinin ve küçük permutasyon operatörlerinin oluşan bir dizi oluşturulmuş süreçte. Soňunda, multi-görnöşim tabanly multi-objektif tekniki tarapyndan soňky Pareto öňünde golaýlaşýar. SRC'yň birnäçe benchmark testi sanatynda görkezilen çykyş metrikleri bilen tanyş edilen nusgalary görsel we metin tabanly görüntüleriniň üstini gowy arama netijesini klusterlemek üçin gurnalaýar.", 'hy': 'Այսօրվա թղթին ուսումնասիրում է բազմատեսակ ուսումնասիրության օգտագործումը որոնման արդյունքների խմբագրման համար: Վեբ-կտորը կարող է ներկայացվել բազմաթիվ տեսանկյուններով: Բացի տեքստալ տեսանկյունից, որը նշանակում է սեմանտիկ և սինտակտիկ ինֆորմացիա, ներկայիս շրջանում օգտագործվում է նաև համալրավոր տեսանկյուն, որը ստացվում է վեբ-կտորներում գտնվող պատկերներից: A single consensus partitioning is finally obtained after consulting these two individual views by the deployment of a multiobjective based clustering technique.  Several objective functions including the values of a cluster quality measure measuring the goodness of partitionings obtained using different views and an agreement-disagreement index, quantifying the amount of oneness among multiple views in generating partitionings are optimized simultaneously using AMOSA.  Կլաստերների թիվը ինքնաբերաբար հայտնաբերելու համար փոփոխական երկարության լուծումների գաղափարները և բազմաթիվ պարունակող գործիչներ են ներկայացվում խմբավորումների ընթացքում: Վերջապես, այլընտրանքային բաժանման մի շարք են ստացվում վերջնական Pareto-ի առջևում առաջարկված բազմատեսակ հիմնված բազմաօբյեկտիվ տեխնիկայի միջոցով: Փորձարկվող արդյունքները, ըստ առաջարկված մոտեցումից, որոշ համեմատական թեստերի տվյալների համակարգերի, որոնք վերաբերվում են տարբեր արդյունավետության մետրիկներին, ակնհայտորեն հաստատում են տեսողական և տեքստի հիմնված տեսանկյունների ուժը ավելի', 'af': "Huidige papier ondersoek die gebruik van multi- view leer vir soektog resultaat clustering. Name Behalwe van tekstuele aansig aangeteken deur beide die semantiese en sintaktisike inligting, 'n komplimente aansig uitgevoer van beelde wat in die web- snippets bevat is, is ook gebruik in die huidige raamwerk. 'n Eenvoudige konsensse partisiering word eindelik ontvang na die raadpleeg van hierdie twee individuele besigte deur die uitvoering van 'n multiobjektiewe gebaseerde klasteringstekniks. Verskeie objektiewe funksies insluitend die waardes van 'n klaster kwaliteit maat met die goeie van partisies wat verkry word deur verskillende aansigte en 'n ooreenkomstig- ontsamming indeks, die hoeveelheid van eenheid onder veelvuldige aansigte in die genereer van partisies is eenmaal optimaliseer deur AMOSA te gebruik. Om die nommer van klasters outomaties te beskry, word konsepte van veranderlike lengte oplossing en 'n groot omvang van permutasie operators in die klastering proses ingevoer. Eindelik word 'n stel alternatiewe partisie op die eindelike Pareto voorkant ontvang deur die voorgestelde multi-besigtig gebaseerde multiobjektiewe tekniks. Eksperimentale resultate deur die voorgestelde toegang op verskeie benchmark toets datastel van SRC met betrekking na verskeie prestasie metries duidelik die krag van visuele en teksbaseerde aansigte stel in die beskikking van beter soektog resultaat clustering.", 'ca': "El paper actual explora l'ús de l'aprenentatge multivista per agrupar els resultats de la recerca. A web-snippet can be represented using multiple views.  A part de la vista textual indicada tant per la informació semàntica com sinàctica, també s'utilitza una vista complementar extraïda d'imatges contenues en els fragments web en el marc actual. Una sola divisió consensual es obté finalment després de consultar aquestes dues opinions individuals amb l'implantació d'una tècnica multiobjectiva de agrupament. Diverses funcions objectives, incloent els valors d'una mesura de qualitat d'un agrupament que mesura la bonitat de les partitions obtenides fent servir diferents vistes i un índex d'acord-desacord, quantificant la quantitat d'unitat entre múltiples vistes en generar partitions, s'optimizen simultàniament fent servir AMOSA. In order to detect the number of clusters automatically, concepts of variable length solutions and a vast range of permutation operators are introduced in the clustering process.  Finalment, un conjunt de partitions alternatives es obté al front final de Pareto amb la tècnica multiobjectiva proposada basada en múltiples vistes. Els resultats experimentals segons l'enfocament proposat en diversos conjunts de dades de prova d'SRC en relació a diferents mètrics de rendiment evidentment establezen el poder de les vistes visuals i basades en text per aconseguir una millor agrupació de resultats de cerca.", 'bs': 'Trenutni papir istražuje upotrebu učenja višepogleda za skupljanje rezultata pretraživanja. Web snippet se može predstaviti koristeći višestruke poglede. Osim tekstualnog pogleda koji je pokazao semantičke i sintaktičke informacije, komplimentni pogled izvučen iz slika koje su sadržane u web snippets također se koristi u sadašnjoj okviru. Konačno se pojedinačno razdvajanje konsenzusa dobije nakon savjetovanja s ovim dvije pojedinačne mišljenje po rasporedu multiobjektivne tehnike skusteringa. Nekoliko objektivnih funkcija uključujući vrijednosti mjere kvalitete skupine za mjerenje dobrote particije koje su dobile koristeći različite poglede i indeks neslaganja sporazuma, kvantificirajući količinu jedinstva između višestrukih pogleda u stvaranju particije, istovremeno se optimiziraju koristeći AMOSA. Da bi se automatski otkrilo broj klastara, koncepti promjennih rješenja dužine i ogromni opseg permutacijskih operatora uvedeni su u skustering procesu. Konačno, skup alternativnog dijelivanja na konačnom ispred Pareto dobija je predložena multiobjektivna tehnika na temelju multiobjektivnog pogleda. Eksperimentalni rezultati predloženog pristupa na nekoliko središnjih testova podataka SRC-a u pogledu različitih mjerila učinkovitosti očigledno utvrđuju moć vizuelnih i tekstualnih pogleda u ostvarivanju boljih skupljanja rezultata pretraživanja.', 'cs': 'Současný článek zkoumá využití vícezobrazeného učení pro shlukování výsledků vyhledávání. Web-fragment může být reprezentován pomocí více zobrazení. Kromě textového pohledu, který využívá jak sémantické, tak syntaktické informace, je v současném frameworku využíván i komplementární pohled extrahovaný z obrázků obsažených v webových úryvcích. Po konzultaci těchto dvou individuálních názorů je konečně dosaženo jediného konsensusního rozdělení nasazením multiobjektivní techniky clusterování. Několik objektivních funkcí včetně hodnot měřícího kvalitu clusteru měřících dobrotu rozdělení získaných pomocí různých pohledů a indexu shody-neshody, kvantifikace jednotnosti mezi více pohledy při generování oddělení je optimalizováno současně pomocí AMOSA. Za účelem automatické detekce počtu clusterů jsou v clusterovém procesu zavedeny koncepty řešení variabilní délky a široké spektrum permutačních operátorů. Konečně je získána sada alternativního rozdělení na konečné Paretově frontě navrženou multiobjektivní technikou založenou na vícepohledech. Experimentální výsledky navrženého přístupu na několika referenčních testovacích datových sadách SRC s ohledem na různé výkonnostní metriky evidentně potvrzují sílu vizuálních a textových zobrazení při dosažení lepšího shlukování výsledků vyhledávání.', 'az': 'Şimdiki kağıt çoxlu görünüş öyrənməsini arama sonuçları clustering üçün istifadə edir. İnternet-snippet çoxlu görünüş vasitəsilə ifadə edilə bilər. Semantik və sintaktik məlumatlar tərəfindən əlavə edilən textual görünüş istisnasından başqa, web-snippets içində daxil edilən şəkillərdən əlavə edilən kompliment görünüş də hökmən frameworkdə istifadə edilir. Bu iki individual görünüşünü mübahisə etdikdən sonra, çoxlu objektif tabanlı clustering tekniklərinin istifadə etdiyi təqdirdə təkcə bir konsensu paylaşılması qəbul edilir. Müxtəlif görünüşlər və anlaşma-razılıq indeksi ilə əlaqələnmiş parçacılıqların yaxşılığını ölçüb, çoxlu görünüşlər arasındakı birliklik dəyişikliyini ölçürmək üçün çoxlu müəyyən etdik fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli fərqli Klaster sayını avtomatik olaraq tanıtmaq üçün, dəyişiklik uzunluğunun çətinliklərinin və böyük permutasyon operatörlərinin səviyyəsini clustering prosesində tanıdılar. Sonunda, çoxlu görünüşlü çoxlu objektif tekniki tərəfindən son Pareto önündə alternatif bölümü alır. Dərgahlı performans metrikləri haqqında, görünür və metin tabanlı görüntülərin gücünü daha yaxşı arama sonuçları clusterinə çatdırmaq üçün təklif edilən çoxlu benchmark sınama veri qurularında təcrübə etdiyi təcrübə sonuçları ilə təcrübə sonuçları təşkil', 'bn': 'বর্তমান কাগজ অনুসন্ধানের ফলাফল ক্লাস করার জন্য অনেক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি শিক্ষা ব্যবহারের ব্যবহার বিশেষ করে। একটি ওয়েব স্নিপেট অনেক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি ব্যবহার করে প্রতিনিধিত্ব করা যাবে। সেমেন্টিক এবং সিন্ট্যাক্টিক তথ্য দ্বারা যে টেক্সচুয়াল ভিউ দ্বারা সংরক্ষণ করেছে তা ছাড়া, বর্তমান ফ্রেম্যাক্কারের মধ্যে ওয়েব- স্নিপ্ট A single consensus partitioning is finally obtained after consulting these two individual views by the deployment of a multiobjective based clustering technique.  বেশ কয়েকটি উদ্দেশ্য ফাংশন, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে ক্লাস্টার মানের মূল্য, বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি এবং চুক্তি বৈষম্যের সূচি মাপ করা হয়েছে, যার মধ্যে বিভিন্ন দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি তৈর স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ক্লাস্টারের সংখ্যা সনাক্ত করার জন্য, বিভিন্ন দীর্ঘ সমাধানের ধারণা এবং অনেক বিশাল পরিমাণ অপারেটর প্রক্রিয়ায় পরিচা অবশেষে প্রস্তাবিত বহুভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক বহুভিত্তিক প্রযুক্তির মাধ্যমে চূড়ান্ত প্যারেটো সামনে বিকল্প বিভাগের একটি স প্রস্তাবিত বেনম্যার্ক টেস্ট ডাটাসেটের বেশ কয়েকটি পরীক্ষার ফলাফলের ফলে বিভিন্ন ভিন্ন প্রদর্শনের মাধ্যমে দৃশ্য এবং টেক্সভিত্তিক দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি', 'et': 'Käesolevas dokumendis uuritakse mitmevaatelise õppe kasutamist otsingutulemuste klastrite jaoks. Veebilõike saab esitada mitme vaate abil. Lisaks semantilisele ja süntaktilisele informatsioonile põhinevale tekstivaatele kasutatakse praeguses raamistikus ka veebilõikudes sisalduvatest piltidest eraldatud täiendavat vaadet. Pärast nende kahe individuaalse vaatega konsulteerimist saavutatakse lõpuks üks konsensus, kasutades mitmeeesmärgilist klastrite moodustamise meetodit. AMOSA abil optimeeritakse samaaegselt mitmeid objektiivseid funktsioone, sealhulgas klastri kvaliteedimõõtmise väärtusi, mis mõõdavad erinevate vaatete abil saadud vaheseinte headust, ning kokkuleppe-lahkarvamuse indeksit, mis kvantifitseerib mitme vaate ühtsuse hulka vaheseinte genereerimisel. Klastrite arvu automaatseks tuvastamiseks võetakse klastrite protsessis kasutusele muutuva pikkusega lahenduste kontseptsioonid ja suur hulk permutatsiooni operaatoreid. Lõpuks saadakse lõplikul Pareto rindel alternatiivsed partitsioonid kavandatud mitmevaatepõhise mitmeobjektiivse tehnika abil. Kavandatud lähenemisviisi eksperimentaalsed tulemused mitme SRC võrdlusandmekogumi kohta seoses erinevate jõudlusnäitajatega näitavad ilmselt visuaalsete ja tekstipõhiste vaadete võimsust parema otsingutulemuste klastrite saavutamisel.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa tarkastellaan monikulmaisen oppimisen käyttöä hakutulosten klusteroinnissa. Verkkokatkelmaa voidaan esittää useilla näkymillä. Sekä semanttisen että syntaktisen tiedon ohjaaman tekstinäkymän lisäksi nykyisessä viitekehyksessä hyödynnetään myös verkkokatkelmien kuvista poimittua täydentävää näkymää. Näiden kahden yksittäisen näkemyksen kuulemisen jälkeen päästään lopulta yksimielisyyteen käyttämällä monitavoitteista klusterointitekniikkaa. AMOSA-ohjelmalla optimoidaan samanaikaisesti useita objektiivisia funktioita, kuten eri näkymillä saatujen osioiden hyvyyttä mittaavan klusterin laatumittarin arvot ja yhteisymmärrys-erimielisyysindeksi sekä useiden näkymien yhtenäisyyden kvantifiointi osioiden luomisessa. Jotta klusterien lukumäärä voidaan tunnistaa automaattisesti, klusterointiprosessissa otetaan käyttöön konsepteja vaihtelevan pituuden ratkaisuista ja laaja valikoima permutaatiooperaattoreita. Lopullisella Pareto-rintamalla saadaan vaihtoehtoinen osiointi ehdotetulla moninäkymäpohjaisella moniobjektiivisella tekniikalla. Ehdotetun lähestymistavan kokeelliset tulokset useista SRC:n vertailuaineistoista eri suorituskykymittareiden osalta osoittavat selvästi visuaalisten ja tekstipohjaisten näkymien voiman paremman hakutulosten klusteroinnin saavuttamisessa.', 'jv': 'politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness web-styletextattr Mbok itong gambar textual ProgressBarUpdates Where am I to detect the number of clusters automatically Tulung, sampeyan Alternate Ndoleh sing paling-paling nggambar nganggep kuwi nggawe sapa nyimpen dadi nggawe barang kanggo nggawe barang seneng nggawe barang nggawe sistem sing kalagayut nggawe ngubah bisa ngilanggar tarjamahan karo nggambar oleh dumateng.', 'sk': 'Trenutni prispevek raziskuje uporabo učenja v več pogledih za združevanje rezultatov iskanja. Spletni delček je mogoče predstaviti z več pogledi. Poleg besedilnega pogleda s semantičnimi in sintaktičnimi informacijami se v trenutnem okviru uporablja tudi dopolnilni pogled iz slik, ki jih vsebujejo spletni delčki. Po posvetovanju s temi dvema posameznima stališčema se končno doseže enotna razdelitev soglasja z uvedbo večciljne tehnike grozdov. Več objektivnih funkcij, vključno z vrednostmi merjenja kakovosti grozda za merjenje dobre particije, pridobljene z uporabo različnih pogledov, in indeksom soglasja-neskladja, ki količinsko opredeljuje količino enotnosti med več pogledi pri ustvarjanju particij, so hkrati optimizirane z uporabo AMOSA. Za samodejno zaznavanje števila grozdov so v procesu grozdov uvedeni koncepti rešitev spremenljive dolžine in širok spekter permutacijskih operaterjev. Nazadnje je na končni Pareto fronti pridobljen niz alternativnih delitev s predlagano večnamensko tehniko, ki temelji na več pogledih. Eksperimentalni rezultati predlaganega pristopa na več referenčnih preskusnih naborih podatkov SRC glede na različne meritve uspešnosti očitno vzpostavljajo moč vizualnih in besedilnih pogledov pri doseganju boljšega grozdja rezultatov iskanja.', 'he': 'הנייר הנוכחי חוקר את השימוש של לימוד מרובי-ראייה לקבוצת תוצאות חיפוש. Name מלבד הנוף הטקסטלי שנמצא על ידי מידע סמנטי וסינטקטי, הנוף המתאים שנוצא מתמונות שנמצאים בחתיכות האינטרנט משתמש גם במסגרת הנוכחית. סוף סוף ניתן להחלקת קונסנסונסוס אחת לאחר שייעוץ לשני הנקודות הפרטיות האלה על ידי השימוש של טכניקת קבוצה מבוססת על אובייקטיבי רבים. מספר תפקידים אובייקטיביים כולל ערכים של מדידת איכות קבוצה המדידה את הטובה של מחלקות שנקבלו באמצעות צופים שונים ואינדיקס הסכם-לא-הסכם, המדידה את כמות היחידה בין צופים רבים ביצירת מחלקות אופטימליזציה באופן זמני באמצעות AMOSA. על מנת לגלות את מספר הקלאסטרים באופן אוטומטי, מושגים של פתרונות אורך משתנה וטווח רחב של מנהלי הפרעות מוצגים בתהליך הקלאסטרים. סוף סוף, קבוצה של מחלקה אלטרנטיבית מושגת בחזית Pareto הסופית על ידי הטכניקה המבוססת Multi-view המוצעת. Experimental results by the proposed approach on several benchmark test datasets of SRC with respect to different performance metrics evidently establish the power of visual and text-based views in achieving better search result clustering.', 'ha': "@ action: button An iya nuna wani ɗin-shirin web da za'a yi amfani da wasu viewõni. Babu ganin littafin da aka ƙara bayan laban information na semantic da syntactic, ana amfani da wani mai nuna da aka fito daga zanen da ke cikin zanen-snuffles da ke cikin wannan firam. A ƙarshen a sãmu rabi guda a bayan ka yi mãkirci ga waɗannan biyu na dabam-dabam da aka deploy tamko-tarakin mai baka multi-objeyoyin. Babu masu yiwuwa masu amfani da tsarin nau'i a komai, ko kuma ana ƙaddara nau'in daidaita ko kuma a sami da AMOSA. To, dõmin ka gane yawan 'yar'awa' farat ɗaya, za'a introduce zato masu shirya wa zaman cire-daban da wasu masu amfani da duranci mai girma. Haƙĩƙa, za'a sami wani rabo na dabam-dabar a gaba ga Parato na ƙarshen, da aka goyyade multi-vieni masu bakin multi ɓalli. Tajararin matsalar da aka buƙata hanyarwa a kan wasu matsayin jarrabo na SRC da masu husu masu motsi na daban-performance, ana tabbatar da ƙarfin gani da matsayin da ke sami matsayin su sami matsayin da ke ƙaranci matsalar search.", 'bo': 'ད་ལྟོའི་ཤོག་བྱང་ཐོག་གི་དབྱིབས་འཚོལ་བཤེར་སྐབས་སྣ་མང་བོའི་ལྟ་སྟངས་སྤྱོད་པར་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ ཝེབ་སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འགོད་པ་ཞིག་ལྟ་ཀློག་སྟངས་མང་ཙམ་བེད་སྤྱོད་ནས་མངོན་འཆར་བྱེད་ཐུབ Apart from textual view cued by both the semantic and syntactic information, a complimentary view extracted from images contained in the web-snippets is also used in the current framework. དབྱེ་ཚུལ་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག་དང་མཐར་རྗེས་སུ་ངོས་འཛིན་གྱི་མཐོང་སྣང་ཚུལ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲས་བ་རེད། Several objective functions including the values of a cluster quality measure measuring the goodness of partitionings obtained using different views and an agreement-disagreement index, quantifying the amount of oneness among multiple views in generating partitionings are optimized simultaneously using AMOSA. To detect the number of clusters automatically, concepts of variable length solutions and a wide range of permutation operators are introduced in the clustering process. མཐའ་མར་དུ། ཚབ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ཞིག་ནི་མཐའ་མཇུག་གི་པེ་རོགས་སྔོན་མོའི་ནང་དུ་ཐོབ་ཡོད། Experimental results by the proposed approach on several benchmark test datasets of SRC with respect to different performance metrics evidently establish the power of visual and text-based views in achieving better search result clustering.'}
{'en': 'AnlamVer : Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish-Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'ar': 'AnlamVer: مجموعة بيانات تقييم النموذج الدلالي للغة التركية - تشابه الكلمات والارتباط بها', 'pt': 'AnlamVer: conjunto de dados de avaliação de modelo semântico para turco - semelhança e relação de palavras', 'fr': "AnLamver\xa0: Jeu de données d'évaluation de modèle sémantique pour turc - Similitude des mots et parenté", 'es': 'AnLamver: Conjunto de datos de evaluación de modelos semánticos para turco - Semejanza y relación de palabras', 'ja': 'AnlamVer ：トルコ語の意味モデル評価データセット-単語の類似性と関連性', 'zh': 'AnlamVer曰:土耳其语语义质数集 - 单词相似性与相关性', 'hi': 'AnlamVer: तुर्की के लिए शब्दार्थ मॉडल मूल्यांकन डेटासेट - शब्द समानता और संबंधितता', 'ru': 'AnlamVer: Набор данных оценки семантической модели для турецкого языка - подобие и сходство слов', 'ga': 'AnlamVer: Tacar Sonraí Measúnaithe Séimeantach don Tuircis - Cosúlacht Focal agus Gaolmhar', 'el': 'Σύνολο δεδομένων αξιολόγησης σημασιολογικών μοντέλων για την ομοιότητα και τη συγγένεια λέξεων στα τουρκικά', 'hu': 'AnlamVer: Szemantikus modell értékelési adatkészlet török számára - Word Hasonlóság és kapcsolat', 'kk': 'АнламVer: Түрк үшін Semantic Model Evaluation Data Database - Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'it': 'AnlamVer: Set di dati di valutazione del modello semantico per il turco - somiglianza e relazione delle parole', 'lt': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'mk': 'АламВер: Семантичен модел на податок за евалуација за турски - сличност на зборови и врска', 'ml': 'ആന്\u200dലാംവെര്\u200d: തുര്\u200dക്കിക്കുവേണ്ടി സെമാന്റിക് മോഡല്\u200d എവിലേഷന്\u200d ഡാറ്റാസറ്റ് സജ്ജമാക്കുക - വാക്ക് സ', 'mt': "AnlamVer: Sett ta' Dejta ta' Valutazzjoni Mudell Semantiku għat-Turkiż - Similarità tal-kliem u Relazzjoni", 'ka': 'Name', 'mn': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Data Data for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'AnlamVer: Zestaw danych oceny modelu semantycznego dla podobieństwa i powiązania słowa tureckiego', 'sr': 'AnlamVer: Semantički podaci za ocjenu modela za tursku - sličnost riječi i povezanost', 'si': 'Name', 'ms': 'AnlamVer: Set Data Evaluasi Model Semantik untuk Turki - Perasaan Kata dan Perhubungan', 'ro': 'AnlamVer: Set de date de evaluare a modelelor semantice pentru limba turcă - Similaritate și relație cu cuvintele', 'ta': 'AnlamVer: செமாண்டிக் மாதிரி மதிப்பீடு தகவல் அமைப்பு', 'so': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'sv': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset för Turkiska - Ordlikhet och relation', 'ur': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'vi': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model evasion Datset for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relationity', 'uz': 'AnlamVer: Turkish uchun Semantic Model evaluation maʼlumoti', 'bg': 'Набор от данни за оценка на семантичен модел за турски език - сходство и свързаност на думите', 'nl': 'AnlamVer: Semantische Model Evaluatie Dataset voor Turks met Woordgelijkenis en Verwantheid', 'da': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Datasæt for Tyrkisk - Word Lighed og Related', 'hr': 'AnlamVer: Semantički podaci za ocjenu modela za tursku - sličnost riječi i povezanost', 'ko': 'AnlamVer: 터키어 어휘 유사도 및 연관도 의미 모델 평가 데이터 세트', 'fa': 'AnlamVer: Databases Evaluation Model Semantic Data for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'de': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish and Word Ähnlichkeit and Relatedness', 'id': 'AnlamVer: Dataset Evaluasi Model Semantik untuk Turki - Persamaan Kata dan Hubungan', 'sw': 'AnlamVer: Taarifa za Uchunguzi wa Modeli za Kijinsia kwa Uturuki - Neno Kufanana na Kuhusiana', 'tr': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'AnlamVer: Dataset Semantik Model Evaluation for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relationship', 'am': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'hy': 'ԱնլամՎեր. Թուրքիայի համար սեմանտիկ մոդելի գնահատման տվյալներ - Բառերի նմանությունը և հարաբերությունը', 'bn': 'অ্যানাম্বার: তুরস্কের জন্য সেম্যান্ডিক মোডেল মুক্তির তথ্য সেট- শব্দ সমতা এবং সম্পর্ক', 'bs': 'AnlamVer: Semantički podaci za ocjenu modela za tursku - sličnost riječi i povezanost', 'et': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish - Sõnade sarnasus ja seotus', 'az': 'AnlamVer: Türkiçi üçün Semantik Model Evaluasyon Verici - Kelimin Similarity and Relatedness', 'ca': "AnlamVer: Estat de dades d'evaluació de models Semàtics per turc - Similaritat de paraules i relació", 'cs': 'AnlamVer: Dataset vyhodnocování sémantických modelů pro tureckou a slovní podobnost a souvislost', 'fi': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish - Sanan samankaltaisuus ja yhteys', 'sk': 'AnlamVer: Semantični model evalvacijski nabor podatkov za turščino - podobnost besed in povezanost', 'jv': 'ANLAVer: semanti model invaluation dataase for turk - Word Similrity and Relatidness', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'AnlamVer: Semantic Model Evaluation Dataset for Turkish - Word Similarity and Relatedness', 'he': 'AnlamVer: עריכת נתונים של מודל סמנטי לטורקית - דומות מילים וקשר'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present AnlamVer, which is a semantic model evaluation dataset for Turkish designed to evaluate word similarity and word relatedness tasks while discriminating those two relations from each other. Our dataset consists of 500 word-pairs annotated by 12 human subjects, and each pair has two distinct scores for similarity and relatedness. Word-pairs are selected to enable the evaluation of distributional semantic models by multiple attributes of words and word-pair relations such as frequency, morphology, concreteness and relation types (e.g., synonymy, antonymy). Our aim is to provide insights to semantic model researchers by evaluating models in multiple attributes. We balance dataset word-pairs by their frequencies to evaluate the robustness of semantic models concerning out-of-vocabulary and rare words problems, which are caused by the rich derivational and inflectional morphology of the Turkish language.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم AnlamVer ، وهي مجموعة بيانات تقييم نموذج دلالي للغة التركية مصممة لتقييم تشابه الكلمات ومهام الارتباط بالكلمات أثناء التمييز بين هاتين العلاقتين عن بعضهما البعض. تتكون مجموعة البيانات الخاصة بنا من 500 زوج من الكلمات تم شرحها بواسطة 12 موضوعًا بشريًا ، ولكل زوج درجتان مميزتان للتشابه والارتباط. يتم اختيار أزواج الكلمات لتمكين تقييم النماذج الدلالية التوزيعية من خلال سمات متعددة للكلمات وعلاقات أزواج الكلمات مثل التردد والتشكيل والتماسك وأنواع العلاقات (على سبيل المثال ، المرادفات والتضاد). هدفنا هو تقديم رؤى للباحثين النموذجيين الدلاليين من خلال تقييم النماذج في سمات متعددة. نحن نوازن بين أزواج كلمات مجموعة البيانات بتردداتها لتقييم قوة النماذج الدلالية المتعلقة بمشاكل الكلمات غير المفردات والكلمات النادرة ، والتي تنتج عن التشكل الثري الاشتقاقي والانعكاسي للغة التركية.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos AnLamver, que es un conjunto de datos de evaluación de modelos semánticos para turco diseñado para evaluar las tareas de similitud de palabras y relación de palabras mientras discrimina esas dos relaciones entre sí. Nuestro conjunto de datos consta de 500 pares de palabras anotados por 12 sujetos humanos, y cada par tiene dos puntuaciones distintas de similitud y parentesco. Los pares de palabras se seleccionan para permitir la evaluación de modelos semánticos distributivos mediante múltiples atributos de palabras y relaciones de pares de palabras, como frecuencia, morfología, concreción y tipos de relación (por ejemplo, sinonimia, antonimia). Nuestro objetivo es proporcionar información a los investigadores de modelos semánticos mediante la evaluación de modelos en múltiples atributos. Equilibramos los pares de palabras del conjunto de datos por sus frecuencias para evaluar la solidez de los modelos semánticos relacionados con problemas de palabras raras y fuera de vocabulario, que son causados por la rica morfología derivacional e inflexional de la lengua turca.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos o AnlamVer, que é um conjunto de dados de avaliação de modelo semântico para turco projetado para avaliar tarefas de similaridade e parentesco de palavras enquanto discrimina essas duas relações uma da outra. Nosso conjunto de dados consiste em 500 pares de palavras anotados por 12 sujeitos humanos, e cada par tem duas pontuações distintas para similaridade e parentesco. Os pares de palavras são selecionados para permitir a avaliação de modelos semânticos distribucionais por múltiplos atributos de palavras e relações de pares de palavras, como frequência, morfologia, concretude e tipos de relação (por exemplo, sinonímia, antonímia). Nosso objetivo é fornecer insights para pesquisadores de modelos semânticos, avaliando modelos em múltiplos atributos. Nós equilibramos pares de palavras do conjunto de dados por suas frequências para avaliar a robustez dos modelos semânticos sobre problemas de palavras raras e fora do vocabulário, que são causados pela rica morfologia derivacional e flexional da língua turca.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons AnLamver, qui est un jeu de données d'évaluation de modèle sémantique pour le turc conçu pour évaluer les tâches de similitude de mots et de relations entre les mots tout en discriminant ces deux relations l'une de l'autre. Notre ensemble de données se compose de 500 paires de mots annotées par 12 sujets humains, et chaque paire possède deux scores distincts pour la similitude et la parenté. Les paires de mots sont sélectionnées pour permettre l'évaluation de modèles sémantiques distributionnels par de multiples attributs de mots et des relations de paires de mots tels que la fréquence, la morphologie, le caractère concret et les types de relations (par exemple, synonymie, antonymie). Notre objectif est de fournir des informations aux chercheurs en modèles sémantiques en évaluant des modèles dans de multiples attributs. Nous équilibrons les paires de mots des ensembles de données en fonction de leurs fréquences afin d'évaluer la robustesse des modèles sémantiques concernant les problèmes de non-vocabulaire et de mots rares, qui sont causés par la riche morphologie dérivationnelle et flexionnelle de la langue turque.", 'ja': '本稿では、AnlamVerを紹介する。AnlamVerは、トルコ語の意味モデル評価データセットであり、言葉の類似性と単語の関連性のタスクを評価しながら、これら2つの関係を互いに区別するように設計されている。当社のデータセットは、１ ２人のヒト対象によって注釈された５ ０ ０のワードペアで構成されており、各ペアには、類似性及び関連性に関する２つの異なるスコアがある。単語ペアは、単語の複数の属性と、頻度、形態、具体性、および関係タイプ（例えば、同義語、対義語）などの単語ペア関係による分布的意味モデルの評価を可能にするように選択される。私たちの目的は、複数の属性のモデルを評価することによって、意味モデル研究者に洞察を提供することです。私たちは、トルコ語の豊富な派生的および変形的形態によって引き起こされる語彙外および希少な単語の問題に関するセマンティックモデルの堅牢性を評価するために、データセットの単語ペアをその頻度によってバランスさせます。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем AnlamVer, который представляет собой набор данных для оценки семантической модели для турецкого языка, предназначенный для оценки сходства слов и задач, связанных со словом, при этом различая эти два отношения друг от друга. Наш набор данных состоит из 500 пар слов, аннотированных 12 субъектами-человеками, и каждая пара имеет два различных балла сходства и родства. Пары слов выбираются для оценки семантических моделей распределения по множеству атрибутов слов и отношений между парами слов, таких как частота, морфология, конкретность и типы отношений (например, синонимичность, антонимия). Наша цель состоит в том, чтобы предоставить информацию исследователям семантических моделей, оценивая модели по нескольким атрибутам. Мы уравновешиваем пары слов датасета по их частотам для оценки устойчивости семантических моделей, касающихся внесловных и редких проблем слов, которые вызваны богатой производной и инфлексивной морфологией турецкого языка.', 'zh': '本文有AnlamVer,此一于土耳其语者语义模评数据集,指估单词相似性与单词相关性任,兼别此二者。 吾数集由12人受试者注500单词对成,每单词于相似性、相关性有二分。 择词对者,所以单词数性与词对(如频率,形容,具体性与形(,同义词反义词))评布语义形也。 吾所以质数性者,语义所以为见也。 衡数集单词对,以质语义之鲁棒性,及词汇外罕见之单词,此土耳其语之饶,屈折之形也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम AnlamVer प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो तुर्की के लिए एक शब्दार्थ मॉडल मूल्यांकन डेटासेट है जो एक दूसरे से उन दो संबंधों को भेदभाव करते हुए शब्द समानता और शब्द संबंधित कार्यों का मूल्यांकन करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। हमारे डेटासेट में 12 मानव विषयों द्वारा एनोटेट किए गए 500 शब्द-जोड़े होते हैं, और प्रत्येक जोड़ी में समानता और संबंधितता के लिए दो अलग-अलग स्कोर होते हैं। शब्द-युग्मों को शब्दों और शब्द-युग्म संबंधों जैसे आवृत्ति, आकृति विज्ञान, ठोसता और संबंध प्रकारों (जैसे, पर्यायवाची, विलोम) की कई विशेषताओं द्वारा वितरणात्मक शब्दार्थ मॉडल के मूल्यांकन को सक्षम करने के लिए चुना जाता है। हमारा उद्देश्य कई विशेषताओं में मॉडल का मूल्यांकन करके शब्दार्थ मॉडल शोधकर्ताओं को अंतर्दृष्टि प्रदान करना है। हम डेटासेट शब्द-जोड़े को उनकी आवृत्तियों से संतुलित करते हैं ताकि आउट-ऑफ-शब्दावली और दुर्लभ शब्दों की समस्याओं से संबंधित शब्दार्थ मॉडल की मजबूती का मूल्यांकन किया जा सके, जो तुर्की भाषा के समृद्ध व्युत्पत्ति और इन्फ्लेक्शनल आकृति विज्ञान के कारण होते हैं।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair AnlamVer, ar tacar sonraí meastóireachta samhail shéimeantach é don Tuircis atá deartha chun tascanna cosúlachta focal agus coibhneas focal a mheas agus an dá chaidreamh sin a idirdhealú óna chéile. Is éard atá inár dtacar sonraí ná 500 péire focal agus anót déanta orthu ag 12 ábhar daonna, agus tá dhá scór ar leith ag gach péire maidir le cosúlacht agus gaol. Roghnaítear péirí focal le gur féidir samhlacha dáileacháin shéimeantacha a mheas de réir tréithe iolracha na bhfocal agus an chaidrimh péire focal amhail minicíocht, deilbhíocht, coincréit agus cineálacha caidrimh (m.sh. comhchiallacht, comhchiallaigh). Tá sé mar aidhm againn léargais a chur ar fáil do thaighdeoirí samhlacha shéimeantacha trí mhúnlaí i dtréithe iolracha a mheas. Déanaimid comhardú ar phéirí focal tacair sonraí de réir a gcuid minicíochtaí chun stóinseacht na múnlaí séimeantacha a bhaineann le fadhbanna as foclóra agus focail neamhchoitianta a mheas, arb iad deilbhíocht shaibhir díorthaigh agus infhillte na Tuirce is cúis leo.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε το το οποίο είναι ένα σύνολο δεδομένων αξιολόγησης σημασιολογικού μοντέλου για τα τουρκικά σχεδιασμένο για την αξιολόγηση εργασιών ομοιότητας λέξεων και συγγένειας λέξεων, ενώ διακρίνει αυτές τις δύο σχέσεις μεταξύ τους. Το σύνολο δεδομένων μας αποτελείται από 500 ζεύγη λέξεων σχολιασμένα από δώδεκα ανθρώπινα υποκείμενα, και κάθε ζευγάρι έχει δύο διακριτές βαθμολογίες για ομοιότητα και συγγένεια. Τα ζεύγη λέξεων επιλέγονται για να καταστεί δυνατή η αξιολόγηση των διανεμητικών σημασιολογικών μοντέλων με πολλαπλές ιδιότητες λέξεων και σχέσεων λέξης-ζεύγους, όπως συχνότητα, μορφολογία, συγκεκριμένη και τύποι σχέσεων (π.χ. συνώνυμη, αντωνυμία). Στόχος μας είναι να παράσχουμε πληροφορίες στους ερευνητές σημασιολογικών μοντέλων αξιολογώντας μοντέλα σε πολλαπλά χαρακτηριστικά. Ισορροπούμε ζεύγη λέξεων δεδομένων με βάση τις συχνότητές τους για να αξιολογήσουμε την αξιοπιστία των σημασιολογικών μοντέλων σχετικά με προβλήματα εκτός λεξιλογίου και σπάνιων λέξεων, τα οποία προκαλούνται από την πλούσια μορφολογία παραγώγων και καμπυλών της τουρκικής γλώσσας.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk az AnlamVer-t, amely egy török szemantikai modell értékelési adathalmaz, amelynek célja a szóhasonlóság és a szókapcsolat feladatainak értékelése, miközben ezt a két kapcsolatot megkülönbözteti egymástól. Adatkészletünk 500 szópárból áll, amelyeket 12 emberi alany jegyzetelt, és mindegyik párnak két különböző pontszáma van a hasonlóság és a kapcsolattartás tekintetében. A szópárokat úgy választják ki, hogy lehetővé tegyék az eloszlási szemantikai modellek értékelését szavak és szópár kapcsolatok többféle attribútuma alapján, mint például a frekvencia, morfológia, konkrétség és kapcsolattípusok (pl. szinonimák, antonimia). Célunk, hogy betekintést nyújtsunk a szemantikai modellkutatók számára többféle attribútumú modellek értékelésével. Az adatkészlet szópárokat gyakoriságuk alapján egyensúlyozzuk, hogy értékeljük a szókincsen kívüli és ritka szavak problémáira vonatkozó szemantikai modellek robusztusságát, melyeket a török nyelv gazdag derivatív és inflexiós morfológiája okoz.', 'ka': 'ამ დოკუნეში ჩვენ ანლამგერს გავაჩვენოთ, რომელიც არის შამანტიკური მოდელური განსაზღვრების მონაცემები, რომელიც ტერქიური განაზღვრებულია სიტყვების სხვადასხვა და სიტყვების შესახებ დავამუშ ჩვენი მონაცემების კონფიგურაცია არის 500 სიტყვების კონფიგურაცია, რომელიც 12 ადამიანის მისამართებით, და ყოველ კონფიგურაცია აქვს ორი განსხვავებული მონაცემები იგივე ს სიტყვების ზოგები მონიშნულია, რომ გადაწყვეტა განსაზღვრებული სმენტიკური მოდელების გადაწყვეტილებას მრავალი სიტყვების და სიტყვების შესახებ, როგორც სიტყვები, მორპოლოგია, შესახებ და შესახებ ტიპების გადაწ ჩვენი მიზეზი არის სემონტიკური მოდელის შესწავლობისთვის მოდელის შესახებ, რამდენიმე ატრიბუტებში მოდელის შესახებ. ჩვენ დავაბალანეთ მონაცემების სიტყვების პრობლემები, რომლებიც რულქური ენის ბეჭდვი განსხვავებული და ინფლექციონალური მოპოლოგიაზე გამოიყენებულია.', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo AnlamVer, che è un set di dati di valutazione di modelli semantici per il turco progettato per valutare le attività di somiglianza delle parole e di relazione delle parole, discriminando queste due relazioni l'una dall'altra. Il nostro set di dati è composto da 500 coppie di parole annotate da 12 soggetti umani, e ogni coppia ha due punteggi distinti per somiglianza e relazione. Le coppie di parole sono selezionate per consentire la valutazione dei modelli semantici distributivi mediante attributi multipli di parole e relazioni di coppia di parole come frequenza, morfologia, concretezza e tipi di relazione (ad esempio sinonimia, antonimia). Il nostro obiettivo è fornire approfondimenti ai ricercatori di modelli semantici valutando modelli in più attributi. Equilibriamo le coppie di parole di set di dati in base alle loro frequenze per valutare la robustezza dei modelli semantici riguardanti problemi di out-of-vocabulary e parole rare, causati dalla ricca morfologia derivativa e inflessionale della lingua turca.", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда, біз AnlamVer-ді таңдаймыз. Бұл Түрк үшін сөздердің ұқсастығын және сөздердің ұқсастығын бағалау үшін бұл екі қатынастарды бөліскен семантикалық үлгілеу деректері. Біздің деректер жиынымыз, 12 адам тақырыбында белгіленген 500 сөз жиілігі болады. Әрбір жиілігімізде ұқсас пен қатынасыз үшін екі түрлі нәтижесі бар. Бірнеше сөздер мен сөздердің бірнеше қасиеттері, жиілігі, морфология, тәуелсіздік және қатынасыз түрлері (мысалы, синонимия, антония) үшін үлестіру үшін сөздер екеуі таңдалды. Біздің мақсатымыз бірнеше атрибуттарда үлгілерді бағалау үшін семантикалық үлгілер зерттеушілеріне қарау. Біз деректер қорларының сөздерінің жиілігін балансиру үшін, тіркек тілінің баяндамалы және әсерлікті морфологиясының баяндамалы мәселелері туралы семантикалық үлгілерін балансиру үшін.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ആന്\u200dലാമേരിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു. അത് തുര്\u200dക്കിക്കുള്ള ഒരു സെമാന്റിക്ക് മാതൃകയുടെ വിശ്വാസത്തിനുള്ള ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റാണ്. ഈ രണ്ട്  ഞങ്ങളുടെ ഡാറ്റാസെറ്റിന്റെ 500 വാക്ക് ജോട്ടികളില്\u200d നിന്നും 12 മനുഷ്യരെ വിഷമമാക്കിയിരിക്കുന്നു. ഓരോരുത്തര്\u200dക്കും ഒരുപോല വാക്കുകളുടെയും വാക്കുകളുടെയും രണ്ട് ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെയും വിതരണ മോഡലുകളുടെയും മൂല്യം വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള വാക്ക് ജോട്ടുകാര്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്തിരിക്കുന്നു.  നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഒരുപാട് ഗുണപൂര്\u200dണ്ണത്തിലെ മോഡലുകളെ വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നതിനാല്\u200d സെമാന്റിക് മോഡല്\u200d പരിശീല സെമാന്റിക് മോഡലുകളുടെ വസ്ത്രം പരിഗണിക്കുന്നതിനെക്കുറിച്ച്, വാക്കുകളില്ലാത്തതിനെക്കുറിച്ചും ചുരുക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw AnlamVer, li huwa sett ta’ dejta semantiku ta’ evalwazzjoni tal-mudell għat-Turki mfassal biex jevalwa l-kompiti ta’ similarità tal-kelma u relatati mal-kelma filwaqt li jiddiskriminaw dawk iż-żewġ relazzjonijiet minn xulxin. Is-sett tad-dejta tagħna jikkonsisti f’500 par ta’ kliem annotati minn 12-il individwu uman, u kull par għandu żewġ punteġġi distinti għal similarità u relazzjoni. Jintgħażlu pari ta’ kliem biex jippermettu l-evalwazzjoni ta’ mudelli semantiċi distributtivi permezz ta’ attributi multipli ta’ kliem u relazzjonijiet bejn pari ta’ kliem bħal frekwenza, morfoloġija, konkretezza u tipi ta’ relazzjoni (e ż., sinonimja, antonimja). L-għan tagħna huwa li nipprovdu fehmiet lir-riċerkaturi tal-mudell semantiku billi nivvalutaw mudelli f’diversi attributi. Aħna nibbilanċjaw il-pari tal-kliem tas-sett tad-dejta bil-frekwenzi tagħhom biex jevalwaw ir-robustezza tal-mudelli semantiċi li jikkonċernaw problemi barra mill-vokabulari u kliem rari, li huma kkawżati mill-morfoloġija derivattiva u inflezzjonali rikka tal-lingwa Torka.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome AnlamVer, kuris yra semantinio modelio Turkijos vertinimo duomenų rinkinys, skirtas vertinti žodžių panašumą ir žodžių ryšio užduotis, diskriminuojant šiuos du santykius vienas nuo kito. Mūsų duomenų rinkinį sudaro 500 žodžių pora, užrašyta 12 žmonių, ir kiekviena pora turi du skirtingus panašumo ir ryšio taškus. Parinktos žodžių poros, kad būtų galima įvertinti paskirstymo semantinius modelius pagal kelis žodžių ir žodžių poros santykių požymius, pvz., dažnį, morfologiją, konkretumą ir santykių tipus (pvz., sinonimiją, antonimiją). Our aim is to provide insights to semantic model researchers by evaluating models in multiple attributes.  Mes suderiname duomenų rinkinį žodžių poromis pagal jų dažnius, kad įvertintume semantinių modelių, susijusių su ne žodžių žodžių ir retų žodžių problemomis, patikimumą, kurią sukelia turtinga išvestinė ir nepertraukiama turkų kalbos morfologija.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид АнламVer-г танилцуулж байна. Энэ бол Турк-ын семантик загварын үнэлэх өгөгдлийн санаа юм. Энэ хоёр харилцааны хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хоорондоо хо Бидний өгөгдлийн сангууд нь 12 хүний сурагчид зориулсан 500 үг хоёр байдаг. Хоёр бүр адилхан, харилцааны хоёр төрлийн тоо байдаг. Хоёр үг хоёр нь хуваарилцааны семантик загварын үнэлгээг олон үг, үг хоёр харилцааны олон өөрчлөлт, жишээ нь ихэвчлэл, морфологи, тодорхойлолт, харилцааны төрлүүд (жишээ нь синоними, антонимийн харилцааны харилцааны тухай) боло Бидний зорилго бол семантик загварын судлаачид олон асуудлын загварыг үнэлэхээр ойлголт өгөх юм. Бид өгөгдлийн хэлбэрүүдийг тэдний ихэвчлэн баланслахын тулд тэдний хэмжээний хэлбэрүүдийн баян, нөлөөлдөг хэлбэрээс ховор үгийн асуудлуудын талаар баланслагддаг.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan AnlamVer, yang merupakan set data penilaian model semantik untuk Turki direka untuk menilai persamaan perkataan dan tugas hubungan perkataan sementara mendiskriminasi kedua-dua hubungan antara satu sama lain. Set data kita terdiri dari 500 pasangan perkataan yang dicatat oleh 12 subjek manusia, dan setiap pasangan mempunyai dua skor yang berbeza untuk persamaan dan hubungan. Pasangan perkataan dipilih untuk membolehkan penilaian model semantik distribusi dengan atribut berbilang perkataan dan hubungan pasangan perkataan seperti frekuensi, morfologi, konkrit dan jenis hubungan (cth., sinonimi, antonimi). Tujuan kita adalah untuk memberikan pandangan kepada penyelidik model semantik dengan menilai model dalam atribut berbilang. Kami seimbang pasangan kata-kata dataset dengan frekuensi mereka untuk menilai kekuatan model semantik yang berkaitan dengan masalah perkataan luar-vocabulari dan perkataan langka, yang disebabkan oleh morfologi derivasi dan inflectional bahasa Turki yang kaya.', 'mk': 'Во овој документ, го претставуваме АламВер, кој е семантичен модел за проценка на податоците за Турците дизајниран за проценка на зборовите сличност и задачите за врска со зборовите, истовремено дискриминирајќи ги овие два односи меѓусебно. Нашите податоци се состојат од 500 зборови парови кои се анотирани од 12 човечки субјекти, и секој пар има две различни оценки за сличност и врска. Зборови се избрани за да се овозможи проценката на дистрибуционалните семантични модели со повеќе атрибути на зборови и односи зборови-парови како што се фреквенцијата, морфологијата, конкретноста и типовите на односи (на пример синонимијата, анонимијата). Нашата цел е да обезбедиме информации за семантичните истражувачи на моделот со проценка на моделите во повеќе атрибути. We balance dataset word-pairs by their frequencies to evaluate the robustness of semantic models concerning out-of-vocabulary and rare words problems, which are caused by the rich derivational and inflectional morphology of the Turkish language.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy AnlamVer, który jest zestawem danych do oceny modelu semantycznego dla tureckiego przeznaczonym do oceny zadań podobieństwa słów i powiązania słów przy jednoczesnym rozróżnieniu tych dwóch relacji od siebie. Nasz zestaw danych składa się z 500-par słów adnotacyjnych przez dwunastu osób ludzkich, a każda para ma dwie odrębne wyniki podobieństwa i powiązania. Para słowa są wybierane w celu umożliwienia oceny dystrybucyjnych modeli semantycznych przez wiele atrybutów słów i relacji słowo-pary, takich jak częstotliwość, morfologia, konkretność i rodzaje relacji (np. synonimia, antonimia). Naszym celem jest dostarczenie informacji badaczom modeli semantycznych poprzez ocenę modeli w wielu atrybutach. Równoważymy zbiory danych o ich częstotliwość, aby ocenić solidność modeli semantycznych dotyczących problemów poza słownictwem i rzadkimi słowami, które są spowodowane bogatą morfologią pochodną i inflekcyjną języka tureckiego.', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo AnlamVer, koji je semantički model za ocjenjivanje podataka za tursku dizajniranu za procjenjivanje sličnosti riječi i zadataka povezanosti sa riječima dok diskrimiramo te dve odnose jedni od drugih. Naš komplet podataka sastoji od 500 rečnih parova annotiranih od 12 ljudskih subjekta, i svaki par ima dva različita rezultata za sličnost i povezanost. Izabrani su parovi riječi kako bi omogućili procjenu distribucijskih semantičkih modela višestrukim atributima riječi i odnosa riječi, kao što su frekvencija, morfologija, konkretnost i vrste odnosa (npr. sinonija, antonimija). Naš cilj je da pružimo uvide semantičkim modelima istraživačima procjenom modela u višestrukim atributima. Mi balanciramo parove riječi po njihovim frekvencijama kako bi procenili robustnost semantičkih modela u vezi problema sa izvan rečenika i rijetkim riječima, koje su uzrokovane bogatim derivacijskim i inflektionalnim morfologijom turskog jezika.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm AnlamVer, care este un set de date de evaluare a modelului semantic pentru limba turcă conceput pentru a evalua sarcinile de similitudine cu cuvintele și relația cuvintelor, discriminând în același timp cele două relații una de cealaltă. Setul nostru de date constă din 500 de perechi de cuvinte adnotate de 12 subiecți umani, iar fiecare pereche are două scoruri distincte pentru similaritate și relație. Perechile de cuvinte sunt selectate pentru a permite evaluarea modelelor semantice distribuționale prin atribute multiple de cuvinte și relații de perechi de cuvinte, cum ar fi frecvența, morfologia, concretența și tipurile de relații (de exemplu sinonimia, antonimia). Scopul nostru este de a oferi perspective cercetătorilor de modele semantice prin evaluarea modelelor în atribute multiple. Echilibrăm perechile de cuvinte din seturile de date prin frecvențele lor pentru a evalua robustețea modelelor semantice referitoare la problemele cu cuvinte ieșite din vocabular și rare, cauzate de bogata morfologie derivată și inflexională a limbii turce.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi AnlamVer, som er ein semantisk modellevalueringsdataset for tyrkisk utvikla for å evaluere ordsimilaritet og ordrelatede oppgåver medan diskriminerer desse to forholdene frå kvarandre. Datasettet vårt inneheld 500 ord-par som er merkt av 12 menneske emner, og kvar par har to ulike poeng for liknande og relatede. Ordpar er valt for å slå på evalueringa av distribusjonssemantiske modeller med fleire attributt av ord og ord- par- relasjonar som frekvens, morfologi, konkretens og relasjonstypar (f. eks. synonym, antonym). Målet vårt er å gje innsikt til semantiske modeller ved å evaluera modeller i fleire attributt. Vi balanserer ordpar med dei frekvensene for å evaluera kraftigheten av semantiske modeller som er gjennomført ekstra ordet og sjeldre ordproblemer, som er forårsaket av rike derivasjonale og infleksjonelle morfologi i tyrkisk språk.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaynu ku qornaa AnlamVer, kaas oo ah danbiyada qiimeynta qaabka ah ee Turki, oo loo qoray inuu qiimeeyo shaqooyinka isku mid ah iyo hadalka la xiriira marka lagu takooriyo labadaas xiriir midka kale. Taariikhdayada waxaa ka mid ah 500 eray oo labo ah oo ay dhibaataysan 12 maadooyin oo dadku, labada laboodna waxay leeyihiin laba kooxood oo kala duduwan isku mid ah iyo isku xiriir. Waxaa loo doortay qof labo ah in lagu qiimeeyo tusaale ahaan noocyada qaybsiga qaybinta ah e e hadal iyo isku xiriir labo badan, sida frequency, morphology, xukunka iyo noocyada xiriirka (tusaale ahaan synonymy, antonymy). Ujeedkeennu waa in aan waxyaabaha la siiyo baaritaanka muuqashada semantika ah si ay ugu qiimeyso muuqashooyin badan. Waxaannu u balansinnaa macluumaadka labada noocyo ah si aan u qiimeyno daboolka noocyada semantika ah oo ku saabsan dhibaatooyin aan ku jirin hadalka iyo hadalka saxda ah, taas oo sababta qofka hodanka ah oo ku saabsan dhaqdhaqaaqa afka Turki.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi AnlamVer, som är en semantisk modellutvärderingsdata för turkiska utformad för att utvärdera ordlikhet och ordrelaterade uppgifter samtidigt som dessa två relationer diskrimineras från varandra. Vårt dataset består av 500 ordpar kommenterade av 12 mänskliga ämnen, och varje par har två distinkta poäng för likhet och släktskap. Ordpar väljs för att möjliggöra utvärdering av distributionsmässiga semantiska modeller genom flera attribut för ord och ordpar relationer såsom frekvens, morfologi, konkretitet och relationstyper (t.ex. synonym, antonymi). Vårt mål är att ge insikter till semantiska modellforskare genom att utvärdera modeller i flera attribut. Vi balanserar dataset ordpar med deras frekvenser för att utvärdera robustheten hos semantiska modeller avseende problem med outvokabulär och sällsynta ord, som orsakas av den rika härledda och böjliga morfologin av det turkiska språket.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි ඇන්ලාම්වෙර් වෙනුවෙන්, ඒක තර්කිෂ් විශ්වාසය සඳහා විශ්වාසය සහ වචනය සම්බන්ධතාවක් විශ්වාස කරන්න සෙමැන්ටික් මද අපේ දත්ත සේට් එක්ක මිනිස් විදියට පිළිබඳු වචනය 500ක් තියෙනවා, හැම දෙන්නම් එක්කෙනෙක්ට විශේෂ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ සම්බන් Word-pares are Choosed to make the evalution of the District semantic Model by Multi Attribes of Words and Word-Pair ties, e.g. frequection, Morphyology, Concertness and Connection Types (e.g., synonicmy, Antnymy). Note this is a KRunner keyword;% 1 is a KRunner keyword;% 2 is a KRunner keyword;% 3 is a KRunner keyword අපේ අරමුණ තමයි සෙමැන්ටික් මොඩල් පරීක්ෂකයන්ට පරීක්ෂක විශ්වාස කරනවා මොඩේල් වලට විශේෂ කරන්න. අපි දත්ත සැකසුම් වචනය සමඟ ඔවුන්ගේ අවුරුද්ධයෙන් සෙමැන්ටික් මොඩේල්ස් වලින් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ගැන බලාපොරොත්තු කරනවා, ඒ වගේම තුර්කිස් භාෂාව', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم AnlamVer کو پیش کرتے ہیں، جو ترکیس کے لئے ایک سیمانتی موڈل کا ارزیابی ڈاٹ سٹ ہے کہ کلمات کی برابری اور کلمات کی ارتباط کا ارزیابی کرے اور ان دونوں رابطہ ایک دوسرے سے جدا کرے۔ ہمارے ڈاٹ سٹ میں پانچ کلمات جوڑوں میں سے ہے جو 12 انسانوں کے ذریعہ مشورہ کئے گئے ہیں، اور ہر جوڑ کے لئے دو مختلف نمونے ہیں برابری اور تعلق کے لئے۔ کلمات جوڑوں کو انتخاب کیا جاتا ہے کہ کلمات اور کلمات جوڑوں کے بہت سی خصوصوں کے ذریعہ تقسیم سیمنٹی موڈلیوں کا ارزش کریں (جیسے فرکانس، مورفولوژی، concreteness اور ارتباط طریقوں کے ذریعہ (جیسے سینونیمی، آنٹنیمی) کے ذریعہ۔ ہمارا مطلب یہ ہے کہ سیمانٹی موڈل تحقیقات کرنے والوں کے لئے بصیرت حاصل کریں اور بہت سی اثرات میں موڈل کا ارزش کریں۔ ہم ان کے فرکانسوں سے ڈاٹ سٹ کے کلمات جوڑوں کو برابریل کرتے ہیں کہ ان کی بغیر کلمات اور نادر کلمات مشکلات کے بارے میں سیمنٹی موڈل کی طاقت کا ارزش کریں، جو ترکیس کی زبان کی ثروت اور اثرات کی موجود کی وجہ سے ہے.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கியத்தில், நாம் அன்லாம் வெர்க் காண்பிக்கிறோம். இது துருக்கிக்கான ஒரு பாதிப்பு மாதிரி மதிப்பு தகவல் அமைப்பு. இந்த இரண்டு தொடர்புகளை விவா 12 மனித பொருள்களால் குறிப்பிடப்பட்ட 500 வார்த்தை ஜோடி இருக்கும், ஒவ்வொரு ஜோடியும் சமமாக மற்றும் இணைப்பு வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் வார்த்தைகள் மற்றும் ஜோடி இணைப்புகள் மூலம் பல குணங்களால் பங்கீட்டு semantic மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பிட செயல்படுத்த வேண்டும் சொல்ல- ஜோடி ஜோடி தேர்ந பல குணங்களின் மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பிட்டு மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பதற்காக நமது இலக்கு உணர்வுகளை அளிக்கும். துருக்கி மொழியின் பணக்கத்தான பொருள் மற்றும் குறைந்த வார்த்தைகள் பற்றிய பெம்மான்டிக் மாதிரிகளை மதிப்பதற்காக நாம் தரவு சொல்லை ஜோடி பெண்களை அளக்கி', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozda biz AnlamVerni hozir qilamiz, bu Turkish uchun semantik model qiymati maʼlumoti. Bu ikkita munosabatlarni birga taklif qilish uchun so'zni o'xshash va so'zlar bilan bog'liq vazifalarini qiymatga ega bo'ladi. Bizning maʼlumotlarimizning 500 so'zlar bir 12 inson odamlar tomonidan tashkilgan so'zlar bor, va har bir ikki qo'l bir xil bir xil va bog'liq uchun. Name Bizning maqsadimiz bir necha shakllarda modellarni qiymatish uchun semantik model researchalarni qo'llash uchun. Биз маълумотларни жуфт-жуфт таркиб этиб, улар фойдаланиши учун симментнинг модейларини тафаккур қилиш учун бажаришимиз, у таркиб тил ичидаги мазкур қиз сўзлар ва қизиқ сўзлар мушкилиларини аниқлаш учун ҳисобланади.", 'vi': 'In this paper, we giới thiệu AnlamVer, which is a semantics model assessment dataset for Turkish design to describe worm similar and words relationsity missing and discrimination these two relationship from one. Bộ dữ liệu của chúng tôi gồm 500 từ-pair chú ý bởi 12 người dân, và mỗi cặp có hai điểm khác nhau về điểm tương đồng và tương quan. Các cặp từ được chọn để cho phép đánh giá các mô hình giao tiếp theo theo ngữ pháp theo đa năng của các từ và các mối quan hệ hai từ như tần số, morphology, Thực tế và các kiểu liên quan (v.d., đồng nghĩa, antonymy). Mục tiêu của chúng tôi là cung cấp kiến thức cho các nhà nghiên cứu mẫu giáo ngữ nghĩa bằng cách đánh giá các mô hình. Chúng tôi cân bằng các từ ngữ bằng tần số của chúng để đánh giá độ bền vững của các mô hình ngữ pháp về vấn đề ngôn ngữ không vốn có và các từ hiếm, gây ra bởi sự sắp xếp từ ngữ của ngôn ngữ Thổ Nhĩ Kỳ giàu có.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi AnlamVer, som er et semantisk model evalueringsdatasæt for tyrkisk designet til at evaluere ordlighed og ordrelaterede opgaver, samtidig med at de to relationer diskrimineres fra hinanden. Vores datasæt består af 500 ordpar kommenteret af 12 menneskelige emner, og hvert par har to forskellige scorer for lighed og relaterethed. Ordpar vælges for at muliggøre evaluering af distributionsmæssige semantiske modeller ved hjælp af flere attributter af ord og ord-par relationer såsom frekvens, morfologi, konkretitet og relationstyper (f.eks. synonymi, antonymi). Vores mål er at give indsigt til semantiske modelforskere ved at evaluere modeller i flere attributter. Vi balancerer datasæt ordpar ved deres frekvenser for at vurdere robustheden af semantiske modeller vedrørende problemer med uden for ordforråd og sjældne ord, som skyldes den rige afledte og fleksible morfologi af det tyrkiske sprog.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we AnlamVer, een semantisch model evaluatie dataset voor Turks ontworpen om woordgelijkenis en woordverwantschap taken te evalueren terwijl deze twee relaties van elkaar worden onderscheiden. Onze dataset bestaat uit 500 woordparen geannoteerd door twaalf mensen, en elk paar heeft twee verschillende scores voor gelijkenis en verwantschap. Woordparen worden geselecteerd om de evaluatie van distributionele semantische modellen mogelijk te maken aan de hand van meerdere attributen van woorden en woord-paar relaties zoals frequentie, morfologie, concretheid en relatietypen (bijv. synoniem, antoniem). Ons doel is om inzicht te geven aan semantische modellonderzoekers door modellen in meerdere attributen te evalueren. We balanceren dataset woordparen op basis van hun frequenties om de robuustheid van semantische modellen met betrekking tot out-of-vocabulaire en zeldzame woordproblemen te evalueren, die worden veroorzaakt door de rijke afgeleide en flexionele morfologie van de Turkse taal.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir AnlamVer vor, einen semantischen Modellauswertungsdatensatz für Türkisch, der entwickelt wurde, um Wortähnlichkeits- und Wortverwandtheitsaufgaben zu bewerten und diese beiden Beziehungen voneinander zu unterscheiden. Unser Datensatz besteht aus 500 Wortpaaren, die von zwölf menschlichen Subjekten annotiert wurden, und jedes Paar hat zwei unterschiedliche Noten für Ähnlichkeit und Verwandtschaft. Wortpaare werden ausgewählt, um die Auswertung verteilter semantischer Modelle anhand mehrerer Attribute von Wörtern und Wort-Paar-Beziehungen wie Frequenz, Morphologie, Konkretheit und Beziehungstypen (z.B. Synonymie, Antonymie) zu ermöglichen. Unser Ziel ist es, Erkenntnisse für semantische Modellforscher zu liefern, indem Modelle in mehreren Attributen bewertet werden. Wir gleichen Datensatz-Wortpaare durch ihre Häufigkeit aus, um die Robustheit semantischer Modelle bezüglich Out-of-Vokabular und seltener Wörter Probleme zu bewerten, die durch die reiche Ableitung und Flexionsmorphologie der türkischen Sprache verursacht werden.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo AnlamVer, koji je semantički model ocjenjivanja podataka Turske dizajnirana za procjenu sličnosti riječi i zadataka veze s riječima dok diskriminiraju te dvije odnose jedni od drugih. Naš komplet podataka sastoji se od 500 riječnih parova annotiranih od 12 ljudskih ispitanika, i svaki par ima dva različita rezultata za sličnost i povezanost. Izabrani su parovi riječi kako bi omogućili procjenu distribucijskih semantičkih modela višestrukim atributima riječi i odnosa riječi, kao što su frekvencija, morfologija, konkretnost i vrste odnosa (npr. sinonija, antonimija). Naš cilj je pružiti uvid semantičkim modelima istraživačima procjenom modela u višestrukim atributima. Mi balanciramo riječi-par podataka njihovim frekvencijama kako bi procijenili snažnost semantičkih modela u vezi problema s izvanrednim riječima i rijetkim riječima, koje su uzrokovane bogatim derivacijskim i inflekcionalnom morfologijom turskog jezika.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме семантичен модел от данни за оценка на турски език, предназначен да оцени задачите за сходство с думи и свързаност с думите, като същевременно дискриминира тези две отношения една от друга. Нашият набор от данни се състои от 500 двойки думи, анотирани от 12 човека, и всяка двойка има две отделни оценки за сходство и свързаност. Думи-двойки се избират, за да се даде възможност за оценка на разпределителните семантични модели чрез множество атрибути на думи и отношения дума-двойка като честота, морфология, конкретност и типове релации (напр. синонимия, антонимия). Нашата цел е да предоставим прозрения на изследователите на семантични модели чрез оценка на модели в множество атрибути. Балансираме набор от данни думи-двойки по техните честоти, за да оценим здравината на семантичните модели, свързани с проблемите извън речника и редките думи, които са причинени от богатата деривативна и флексионна морфология на турския език.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 AnlamVer를 소개했는데 이것은 터키어 의미 모델 평가 데이터 집합으로 단어의 유사성과 단어의 관련성 임무를 평가하고 이 두 가지 관계를 구분하는 데 목적을 둔다.우리의 데이터 집합은 12명의 수험자가 주석한 500쌍의 단어로 구성되어 있으며, 단어마다 두 개의 서로 다른 유사성과 관련성 점수가 있다.단어 쌍을 선택하는 것은 단어와 단어 대 관계의 여러 속성을 통해 분포 의미 모델, 예를 들어 주파수, 어형, 구체성과 관계 유형(예를 들어 동의어, 반의어)을 평가하기 위한 것이다.우리의 목표는 여러 속성에서 모델을 평가함으로써 의미 모델 연구원들에게 견해를 제공하는 것이다.우리는 주파수를 통해 데이터 집합의 쌍을 균형 있게 하고 의미 모델이 어휘표 밖과 보기 드문 단어 문제에서의 안정성을 평가하는데 이런 문제들은 터키 언어의 풍부한 파생과 굴절 형태로 인해 발생한 것이다.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan AnlamVer, yang merupakan set data evaluasi model semantis untuk Turki yang direncanakan untuk evaluasi persamaan kata dan tugas hubungan kata sambil diskriminasi kedua hubungan antara satu sama lain. Seting data kami terdiri dari 500 pasangan kata yang dicatat oleh 12 subjek manusia, dan setiap pasangan memiliki dua skor yang berbeda untuk persamaan dan hubungan. Pasangan kata dipilih untuk memungkinkan evaluasi model semantis distribusi dengan atribut berbilang kata dan hubungan pasangan kata seperti frekuensi, morfologi, konkrit dan tipe hubungan (contohnya, sinonimi, antonimi). Tujuan kita adalah untuk menyediakan penglihatan kepada peneliti model semantis dengan mengevaluasi model dalam atribut berbilang. We balance dataset word-pairs by their frequencies to evaluate the robustness of semantic models concerning out-of-vocabulary and rare words problems, which are caused by the rich derivational and inflectional morphology of the Turkish language.', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili, tunawasilisha AnlamVer, ambalo ni takwimu za uchunguzi wa mifano kwa Uturuki zilizo na lengo la kutathmini maneno yanayofanana na maneno yanayohusiana na wakati wa kutenganisha mahusiano hayo mawili yanayotokana nayo. Taarifa zetu ni ndoa 500 za maneno yanayoudhiwa na mada 12 za binadamu, na kila wawili wana vipimo viwili tofauti kwa usawa na uhusiano. Word-pairs are selected to enable the evaluation of distributional semantic models by multiple attributes of words and word-pair relations such as frequency, morphology, concreteness and relation types (e.g., synonymy, antonymy).  Lengo letu ni kuwapa mitazamo kwa watafiti wa mifano ya sekunde kwa kutathmini mifano kadhaa. Tunasababisha takwimu za takwimu kwa mara nyingi za maneno kwa ajili ya kutathmini uvunjaji wa mifano ya semantiki kuhusu matatizo ya kutokuwa na maneno machache, ambayo yanasababishwa na matatizo yanayotokana na matajiri na yenye ushawishi wa kifolojia wa lugha ya Uturuki.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda, Biz AnlamVer'i görkeýäris. Bu Türkçe üçin semantik nusgasy çykyş hasaplanja düzeni sözleriň meňzeşliklerini we sözleriň gabdalyklaryny deňlemek üçin düzenlenýäris. Veri setimiz, 12 kişinin tarafından ifade edilen 500 kelime çift ve her çift benzeri ve uyuşturucu için iki farklı noktadır. Sözler çift sanly paýlaşma semantik nusgalarynyň çykyşyny söz we söz çift baglaýyşlaryň birnäçe hasaplamasyna mümkin edmek üçin saýlandyrylýar (mysal. synonymy, antonymy). Biziň maksadymyz semantik nusgalary barlamak üçin örän atributlerde nusgalary deňleýändir. Semantik nusgalaryň ýüze çykyp we nadir söz meselelerini çykarmak üçin, olaryň frekanslaryna görä verilen iň koplaryny çykarýarys. Bu şekilde Türkçe diliniň baý döredilişi we etkileşikli morfologiýasy tarapyndan sebäp bolan.", 'af': "In hierdie papier stel ons AnlamVer voor, wat is 'n semantiese model evalueringsdatastel vir Turkse ontwerp om woorde gelykbaarheid en woorde verwantigheid opdragte te evalueer terwyl daardie twee verwantighede van mekaar diskrimineer. Ons datastel bestaan van 500 woorde-paar wat deur 12 menslike onderwerpe aangeteken is, en elke paar het twee verskillende punte vir gelykheid en verwantigheid. Woord-paar word gekies om die evaluering van verspreidingssemantiese modele te aktiveer deur veelvuldige eienskappe van woorde en woorde-paar relasies soos frekwensie, morfologie, concretenes en verhouding tipes (bv. synonyme, antonyme). Ons doel is om insigte te verskaf aan semantiese model resekers deur model in veelvuldige eienskappe te evalueer. Ons balanseer die datastel woorde-paar deur hulle frekwensies om die kragtigheid van semantiese modele te evalueer oor uit-woorde en selfde woorde probleme wat veroorsaak word deur die ryk afgeleide en infleksionele morfologie van die Turkse taal.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim AnlamVer, i cili është një grup i të dhënave semantike për vlerësimin e modelit për turqin të dizajnuar për të vlerësuar ngjashmërinë e fjalëve dhe detyrat e lidhjes me fjalët duke diskriminuar këto dy marrëdhënie nga njëri-tjetri. Të dhënat tona përbëhen nga 500 palë fjalësh të shënuara nga 12 subjekte njerëzore, dhe çdo palë ka dy pikë të ndryshme për ngjashmëri dhe lidhje. Parët e fjalëve janë zgjedhur për të mundësuar vlerësimin e modeleve semantike shpërndarëse me atribute të shumta të fjalëve dhe marrëdhënieve të palëve të fjalëve të tilla si frekuenca, morfologjia, konkretiteti dhe llojet e marrëdhënieve (për shembull sinonimia, antonimia). Qëllimi ynë është të ofrojmë kuptime për kërkuesit e modelit semantik duke vlerësuar modelet në atribute të shumta. Ne balancojmë çiftet e të dhënave me frekuencat e tyre për të vlerësuar fuqinë e modeleve semantike lidhur me problemet e fjalëve të rralla dhe jashtë fjalëve, të cilat shkaktohen nga morfologjia e pasur derivuese dhe të pasjellshme e gjuhës turke.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما AnlamVer را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که یک مجموعهٔ داده\u200cهای ارزیابی مدل semantic برای تورکی طراحی شده است تا وظیفه\u200cهای شبیه\u200cانگیز کلمات و ارتباط کلمات را ارزیابی کند در حالی که این دو رابطه را از یکدیگر جدا می\u200cکند مجموعه داده\u200cهای ما از ۵۰۰ جفت کلمه\u200cای است که توسط ۱۲ عنوان انسان نوشته شده است، و هر جفت دو امتیاز مختلف برای شباهت و ارتباط دارد. جفت کلمه برای فعال کردن ارزیابی مدل\u200cهای semantic تقسیم با ویژه\u200cهای متعدد کلمه\u200cها و ارتباطهای جفت کلمه\u200cها مثل فرکانس، مورفولوژی، قطعیت و ارتباط\u200cها (مثل: synonymy, antonymy) انتخاب می\u200cشوند. هدف ما این است که با ارزیابی مدل\u200cها در ویژه\u200cهای متعدد به محققان مدل\u200cشناسی مشاهده کنیم. ما جفت\u200cهای داده\u200cها را با فرکانس\u200cهایشان تعادل می\u200cکنیم تا قدرتمندی مدل\u200cهای semantic در مورد مشکلات خارج از کلمات و کلمات نادر را ارزیابی کند، که توسط مورفولوژی ثروتمندی و اثرات زبان ترکیه باعث می\u200cشود.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም ውስጥ የሁለቱን ግንኙነት በተለያዩ ጊዜ ቃላትን እና ቃላትን በማስተካከል እና ቃላትን የሚያስተምር የዓይነ መልዕክት የቱርክ ዳታዎችን አቀረብን፡፡ Our dataset consists of 500 word-pairs annotated by 12 human subjects, and each pair has two distinct scores for similarity and relatedness.  ቃላት-ዓይነቶች (e.g. synonymy, antonymy) እና ቃላት እና የሁለት ሁኔታ ግንኙነትን እንደምትችል በአካባቢ አካባቢ እና ቃላት አካባቢ ምርጫዎች የእኛ ስልጣን የsemantic model researchers በብዛት ምርጫዎች ማረጋገጥ ነው፡፡ የቱርክ ቋንቋ ባለ ሀብታሞች እና የግልጾች እና የግልጾች ንግግር መከራ የሚደረገውን የሴሜንቲካ ምሳሌዎችን ለማስተዋል የዳታ-ሁለት ቃላትን በቁጥጥር እናስተካክላለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք Անլամերը, որը թուրքերի համար սեմանտիկ մոդելի գնահատման տվյալների համակարգ է, որը ստեղծված է որպեսզի գնահատի բառի նմանությունը և բառի կապվածությունը, միևնույն ժամանակ խտրականում է այդ երկու հարաբեր Մեր տվյալների համակարգը կազմված է 500 բառերի զույգերից, որոնք գրված են 12 մարդկային թեմայի կողմից, և յուրաքանչյուր զույգ ունի երկու տարբեր գնահատականներ նմանության և հարաբերության համար: Բառերի զույգերը ընտրվում են, որպեսզի հնարավորություն ունենան բառերի և բառերի զույգերի բազմաթիվ առանձնահատկությունների օգնությամբ բառերի և զույգերի հարաբերությունների, ինչպիսիք են հաճախականությունը, մորֆոլոգիան, կոնկրետությունը և հարաբերությունների տեսակները (օրինակ Մեր նպատակն է հասկանալ սեմանտիկ մոդելների հետազոտողներին՝ գնահատելով մոդելները բազմաթիվ առանձնահատկություններում: Մենք հավասարակշռում ենք տվյալների համակարգը բառեր-զույգեր իրենց հաճախականությունների միջոցով, որպեսզի գնահատենք սեմանտիկ մոդելների կայունությունը բառերի և հազվադեպ բառերի խնդիրների մասին, որոնք առաջացել են թուրք լեզվի հարուստ ծառայությունների և անկյունների մորֆո', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo AnlamVer, koji je semantički model za ocjenu podataka za turske dizajnirane za procjenu sličnosti riječi i zadataka veze sa riječima, dok diskrimiramo te dve odnose jedni od drugih. Naš komplet podataka se sastoji od 500 rečnih parova annotiranih od 12 ljudskih subjekta, i svaki par ima dva različita rezultata za sličnost i povezanost. Izabrani su parovi riječi kako bi omogućili procjenu distribucijskih semantičkih modela višestrukim atributima riječi i odnosa riječi, kao što su frekvencija, morfologija, konkretnost i vrste odnosa (npr. sinonija, antonimija). Naš cilj je pružiti uvid semantičkim modelima istraživačima procjenjivanjem modela u višestrukim atributima. Mi ravnotežavamo parove riječi po njihovim frekvencijama kako bi procijenili robustnost semantičkih modela u vezi problema s izvan riječih riječi, koje su uzrokovane bogatim derivacijskim i inflekcionalnom morfologijom turskog jezika.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme AnlamVer, což je sémantický model hodnocení dat pro turečtinu určený k hodnocení úloh slovní podobnosti a slovní souvislosti při rozlišování těchto dvou vztahů od sebe. Náš datový soubor se skládá z 500 slovních párů anotovaných dvanácti lidskými subjekty a každý pár má dvě odlišné skóre pro podobnost a souvislost. Slovní páry jsou vybrány tak, aby umožnily vyhodnocení distribučních sémantických modelů více atributů slov a slovo-párových vztahů, jako je frekvence, morfologie, konkrétnost a typy vztahů (např. synonymie, antonymie). Naším cílem je poskytnout poznatky výzkumníkům sémantických modelů hodnocením modelů v různých atributech. Vyvážíme datové páry slov podle jejich frekvencí a hodnotíme robustnost sémantických modelů týkajících se problémů mimo slovní zásobu a vzácných slov, které jsou způsobeny bohatou derivací a flexiční morfologií tureckého jazyka.', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা আন্লাম ভের উপস্থাপন করছি, যা তুরস্কের জন্য একটি সেমেন্টিক মডেল মুল্যায়নের ডাটাসেট, যার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে শব্দের সমতা এবং শব্দের সম্পর্কের ক আমাদের ডাটাসেটের মধ্যে ৫০০ শব্দের জোড়া আছে যারা ১২ জন মানুষের বিষয়বস্তু দ্বারা বিরক্তিকর, আর প্রত্যেক জোড়ার মধ্যে একই সা শব্দ এবং শব্দ-জোড়া সম্পর্কের বেশ কয়েকটি বৈতরণের সেম্যান্টিক মডেলের মূল্য সক্রিয় করার জন্য শব্দ-জোড়া নির্বাচিত হয়েছে, যেমন ফ্রাইজেন্স, মরোফোলিজি, কনফিটিকে আমাদের উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে সেমান্টিক মডেল গবেষকদের দৃষ্টিভঙ্গি দিয়ে বেশ কয়েকটি বৈশিষ্ট্যের মোডেলের মাধ্যমে ম আমরা তুরস্ক ভাষার বাইরে শব্দভাষা এবং দুর্বল শব্দের সমস্যা সম্পর্কে সেম্যান্টিক মডেলের পোশাকের বিষয়টি মূল্য করার জন্য তাদের ফ্রেন্সের মাধ্যমে তথ্য জোড়ার', 'az': "Bu kağızda, AnlamVer'i göstərdik. Bu, Türkiyə üçün semantik modeli değerlendirmə verilər qurduğu, sözlərin bənzəriliyini və sözlərin bağlılığını değerlendirmək üçün təşkil edilmişdir. Bizim verilənlərimiz 12 insan tarafından bildirilmiş 500 söz cütündür, hər çiftə də eyni olmaq və bağlılıq üçün iki müxtəlif nöqtələri vardır. Sözlük çift səviyyəti, morfoloji, nöqsanlıq və bağlantı türləri (məsələn, sinonimi, antonimi) ilə dağıtılış semantik modellərin müəyyən edilməsi üçün seçildilər. Bizim amacımız semantik modellər araştırmalarına çoxlu xüsusiyyətlərdə modelləri değerlendirməkdir. Biz verilən sözlər qurmaqlarını sıxınlıqları ilə çəkirik ki, Türkiyə dilinin zəngin təşkil və etkileşimli morfolojisinin səbəbi olaraq səbəb olan semantik modellərin güclülüyünü değerləşdirmək üçün verilən sözlər qurmaqlarını çəkirik.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame türgi keele semantilise mudeli hindamise andmekogumit AnlamVer, mille eesmärk on hinnata sõnade sarnasust ja sõnadega seotud ülesandeid, eristades samas neid kahte seost üksteisest. Meie andmekogum koosneb 500 sõnapaarist, mida on märkinud 12 inimese, ja igal paaril on kaks erinevat skoori sarnasuse ja seose kohta. Sõna-paarid valitakse selleks, et võimaldada jaotussemantiliste mudelite hindamist sõnade mitme atribuudi ja sõna-paari suhete abil, nagu sagedus, morfoloogia, konkreetsus ja seostüübid (nt sünonüümia, antonüümia). Meie eesmärk on anda semantilise mudeli uurijatele ülevaadet, hinnates mudeleid mitmes atribuudis. Tasakaalustame andmekogumi sõnapaare nende sageduste järgi, et hinnata semantiliste mudelite tugevust sõnavara- ja haruldaste sõnadega seotud probleemide puhul, mida põhjustab türgi keele rikas tuletis- ja paindlik morfoloogia.', 'ca': "En aquest article, presentem AnlamVer, que és un conjunt de dades semàntics de l'evaluació del model turc dissenyat per evaluar la similitud de paraules i les tasques de relació de paraules mentre discriminem aquestes dues relacions entre elles. Our dataset consists of 500 word-pairs annotated by 12 human subjects, and each pair has two distinct scores for similarity and relatedness.  Les parelles de paraules es seleccionen per poder evaluar els models semàntics distribucionals amb múltiples atributs de paraules i relacions entre parelles de paraules com la freqüència, la morfologia, la concretetat i els tipus de relació (per exemple, la sinonimia, l'antonimia). El nostre objectiu és proporcionar insights als investigadors de model semàntic evaluant models en múltiples atributs. Equilibrem els parells de paraules de dades per les seves freqüències per avaluar la robustet dels models semàntics en relació amb problemes de paraules fora de vocabulari i rares, que són causats per la morfologia rica derivada i inflexional de la llengua turca.", 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään AnlamVer, semanttisen mallin arviointiaineisto turkkilaiselle kielelle, joka on suunniteltu arvioimaan sanojen samankaltaisuutta ja sanasidonnaisuutta sekä erottamaan nämä kaksi suhdetta toisistaan. Aineistomme koostuu 500 sanaparista, joihin on merkitty 12 ihmistä, ja jokaisella parilla on kaksi erillistä pisteytystä samankaltaisuuden ja yhteyden suhteen suhteen. Sanaparit valitaan siten, että voidaan arvioida jakauman semanttisia malleja useiden sanojen attribuuttien ja sanaparin suhteiden avulla, kuten taajuus, morfologia, konkretiteetti ja suhdetyypit (esim. synonyymi, antonyymi). Tavoitteenamme on tarjota tietoa semanttisten mallien tutkijoille arvioimalla malleja useissa attribuuteissa. Tasapainotamme sanapareja niiden taajuuksien perusteella semanttisten mallien kestävyyttä sanaston ulkopuolisissa ja harvinaisissa sanastoongelmissa, jotka johtuvat turkin kielen rikkaasta derivaatiomorfologiasta ja taipumuksesta.', 'jv': 'Nan pepul iki, awak dhéwé nggawe anlemVer, iki dadi semanti model asserti dataset kanggo turk iki dadi nggawe asserti parat karo awak dhéwé karo awak dhéwé kesempatan sampek awak dhéwé, winih dhéwé iso disiplikasi perusahaan langgar sampek winih. Perintah-dataset ditawakdhéwé wis mungkut 500 kelompok sing ditawakdhéwé 12 perbudhakan, lan kabèh iki dadi wis mungkut karo podho sing dibarahak karo ngregani. Mobil gambar Helah iku, dadi kanggo ngilanggar ulih dumaten kanggo cercetat model semanti Awak dhéwé beraksi dataset pawaran-pawaran karo kesalahan kanggo kuwi nggawe sistem sing perbudhakan karo perbudhakan kelas-kelas karo perbudhakan kelas', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da AnlamVer, wanda ke samar da masani na sami-sami zuwa ga Tirkiki, don ya yi amfani da aikin maganar da ke daidaita da maganar da kuma idan ana gauraya masu danganta biyu daga ɗayan. FayiyinMu na sami ɗabi'a daga nau'i 200 sau-biyu wanda aka yi cũtar da mutane 12, kuma kõwane nau'i yana da nau'i biyu masu daidaita da masu husũma. An zãɓi nau'in-nau'in magana dõmin a tafiyar da evaluation of misãlai masu sakan da aka raba shi game da wasu misãlai na magana da danganta biyu kamar misali, misali, mutalogi, concrete da nau'i (misali, sunonimi, antonimi). Gayinmu ne ke iya samar da misalin misãlai na semantiki game da evaluation misalin misãlai masu yawa. Tuna balancewa masu daidaita magana-nau'i da misalin mutane, ko kuma don ka yi amfani da ruwan mutane, ko kuma don ka yi amfani da ruwan misãlai na semantiki masu cikin masu haske da kuma masu sauri, wanda ke saba da matajirin matalauci da mutane na harshen Tirkiki.", 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo AnlamVer, ki je semantični model evalvacijskega nabora podatkov za turščino, namenjen ocenjevanju podobnosti besed in povezanosti besed ob razlikovanju teh dveh relacij med seboj. Naš nabor podatkov je sestavljen iz 500 parov besed z oznakami 12 ljudi, vsak par pa ima dve različni oceni za podobnost in povezanost. Besedni pari so izbrani tako, da se omogoči vrednotenje distribucijskih semantičnih modelov z več atributi besed in relacij besednih parov, kot so frekvenca, morfologija, konkretnost in vrste relacij (npr. sinonimija, antonimija). Naš cilj je zagotoviti vpogled raziskovalcem semantičnih modelov z vrednotenjem modelov v več atributih. Za oceno robustnosti semantičnih modelov izven besedišča in redkih besednih težav, ki jih povzroča bogata derivacijska in inflekcijska morfologija turškega jezika, uravnotežimo nabor podatkov besednih parov po njihovih frekvencah.', 'bo': 'འོག་གི་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་AnlamVer་ལ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། ང་ཚོའི་ཡིག་ཆ་ཚང་ལྟར་མིང་གི་གནད་དོན་མིང་གི་ཕྱེད་༥༠༠་ཅན་ཡིན། Word-pairs are selected to enable the evaluation of distributional semantic models by multiple attributes of words and word-pair relations such as frequency, morphology, concreteness and relation types (e.g., synonymy, antonymy). ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཚོར་བ་དང་སྐྱེས་པའི་མིག་རྩལ་བ་ལྟ་རྟོག་པ་དེ་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་དཔེ་གཏོང་དང་། We balance dataset word-pairs by their frequencies to evaluate the robustness of semantic models concerning out-of-vocabulary and rare words problems, which are caused by the rich derivational and inflectional morphology of the Turkish language.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את אנלמורה, אשר הוא קבוצת מידע הערכה סמנטית של דוגמנים לטורקים שנועדת כדי להעריך דמיון מילים ומשימות קשר מילים בזמן ההבדל בין שני היחסים האלה אחד מהשני. קבוצת המידע שלנו מורכבת מ-500 זוגות מילים שנמצאים על ידי 12 נושאים אנושיים, וכל זוג יש שני נקודות ברורות לדמיון ולקשר. זוגות מילים נבחרו כדי לאפשר את הערכה של דוגמנים סמנטיים פיצועים על ידי תכונות רבות של מילים ומערכות יחסים מילים-זוגות כמו תדירות, מורפולוגיה, קונצרטיות וסוגי יחסים (למשל סינונימיה, אנטונימיה). Our aim is to provide insights to semantic model researchers by evaluating models in multiple attributes.  אנו מאזנים את קבוצת מילים זוגות על ידי התדירות שלהם כדי להעריך את החזקה של דוגמנים סמנטיים בנוגע לבעיות לא-מילים ומילים נדירות, שגורמות על ידי המורפולוגיה העשירה של השפה הטורקית.'}
{'en': 'Arguments and Adjuncts in Universal Dependencies', 'ar': 'الحجج والضوابط في التبعيات العالمية', 'fr': 'Arguments et adjonctions dans les dépendances universelles', 'es': 'Argumentos y complementos en las dependencias universales', 'pt': 'Argumentos e Adjuntos em Dependências Universais', 'ja': '普遍的な依存関係における引数と補助', 'zh': '通用赖项中参数及佐项', 'hi': 'यूनिवर्सल निर्भरताओं में तर्क और सहायक', 'ru': 'Аргументы и дополнения в универсальных зависимостях', 'ga': 'Argóintí agus Aidiachtaí i Spleáchais Uilíocha', 'ka': 'არგუმენტები და აეჯენქტები სამუშაო განსაზღვრებით', 'hu': 'Érvek és kiegészítők az univerzális függőségekben', 'el': 'Τα επιχειρήματα και οι προσάρτητες σε καθολικές εξαρτήσεις', 'it': 'Argomenti e allegati nelle dipendenze universali', 'lt': 'Argumentai ir priedai visuotinėse priklausomybėse', 'ms': 'Arguments and Adjuncts in Universal Dependencies', 'mt': 'Argumenti u Konġunti fid-Dipendenzi Universali', 'kk': 'Жалпы тәуелдіктердің аргументтері мен жаңартулары', 'no': 'Argument og tillegg i universelle avhengighet', 'mn': 'Дэлхийн хамааралтай аргументууд болон нийлүүлэгч', 'ml': 'യൂണിവല്\u200d ആശ്രയികളില്\u200d ആര്\u200dഗമെന്റുകളും ആഡ്ജുന്റുകളും', 'mk': 'Arguments and Adjuncts in Universal Dependencies', 'ro': 'Argumente și adjuncte în dependențele universale', 'so': 'Argentinaha iyo xiriirka ku xiran masruufka jaamacadda', 'sr': 'Argumenti i dodatke u univerzalnim zavisnicama', 'sv': 'Argument och tillägg i universella beroenden', 'pl': 'Argumenty i przyłączniki w zależnościach powszechnych', 'ur': 'Universal Dependencies میں اردوмент اور اضافہ', 'ta': 'பொதுவான சார்புகளில் உள்ள ஆரம்புகள் மற்றும் சேர்ப்புகள்', 'si': 'විශාල විශේෂතාවක් සහ සම්පූර්ණය', 'vi': 'Đối số và Adjuncts trong Các Phủ nhận chung', 'uz': 'Umumiy qoĘ»llanmalar', 'bg': 'Аргументи и добавки в универсални зависимости', 'nl': 'Argumenten en adjuncten in universele afhankelijkheden', 'hr': 'Argumenti i dodatke u univerzalnim ovisnosti', 'da': 'Argumenter og tilknytninger i universelle afhængigheder', 'de': 'Argumente und Adjunkte in universellen Abhängigkeiten', 'id': 'Argumen dan tambahan dalam Dependensi Universal', 'fa': 'آرژانس\u200cها و اضافه\u200cها در اعتماد جهانی', 'ko': '범의존 중의 변원과 부가어', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo na watunga mkono ulimwengu', 'tr': 'Halkara baglançylar we nusgalar', 'af': 'Argumente en Adjuncts in Universal Dependencies', 'sq': 'Argumente dhe lidhje në varësitë universale', 'am': 'Arguments and Adjuncts in Universal Dependencies', 'hy': 'Համաշխարհային կախվածություններում գտնվող բանավեճերը և կապերը', 'az': 'Universal Dependencil톛rd톛 Argumentl톛r v톛 Adjuncts', 'bn': 'বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভরের আর্গুমেন্ট এবং অ্যাডজান্ট', 'bs': 'Argumenti i dodatke u univerzalnim zavisnicama', 'ca': 'Arguments and Adjuncts in Universal Dependencies', 'cs': 'Argumenty a přídavky v univerzálních závislostech', 'et': 'Argumentid ja lisandid universaalsetes sõltuvustes', 'fi': 'Argumentit ja liitännäiset yleismaailmallisissa riippuvuuksissa', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Argumenti in dodatki v univerzalnih odvisnostih', 'he': 'Arguments and Adjuncts in Universal Dependencies', 'jv': 'Delokan karo AdJunct nang Universal Dihalungan', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་རྟེན་འབྲེལ་ནང་གི་སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་དང་མཉམ་སྒྲིག་ཆས'}
{'en': 'The aim of this paper is to argue for a coherent Universal Dependencies approach to the core vs. non-core distinction. We demonstrate inconsistencies in the current version 2 of UD in this respect   mostly resulting from the preservation of the argumentadjunct dichotomy despite the declared avoidance of this distinction   and propose a relatively conservative modification of UD that is free from these problems.', 'ar': 'الهدف من هذه الورقة هو الدفاع عن نهج متماسك التبعيات العالمية للتمييز الأساسي مقابل غير الأساسية. نظهر التناقضات في الإصدار الحالي 2 من UD في هذا الصدد - ناتج غالبًا عن الحفاظ على الحجة - ثنائية الفصل الملحقة على الرغم من التجنب المعلن لهذا التمييز - ونقترح تعديلًا متحفظًا نسبيًا لـ UD خالٍ من هذه المشاكل.', 'fr': "Le but de cet article est de plaider en faveur d'une approche cohérente des dépendances universelles pour la distinction entre cœur et non-noyau. Nous démontrons des incohérences dans la version actuelle 2 de UD à cet égard — résultant principalement de la préservation de la dichotomie argument—adjonction malgré l'évitement déclaré de cette distinction — et proposons une modification relativement conservatrice de UD qui soit exempte de ces problèmes.", 'pt': 'O objetivo deste artigo é defender uma abordagem coerente de Dependências Universais para a distinção central versus não central. Demonstramos inconsistências na versão atual 2 do UD a esse respeito – principalmente resultantes da preservação da dicotomia argumento-adjunto apesar da declarada evitação dessa distinção – e propomos uma modificação relativamente conservadora do UD que esteja livre desses problemas.', 'es': 'El objetivo de este artículo es abogar por un enfoque coherente de las Dependencias Universales para la distinción entre el núcleo y el no básico. Demostramos inconsistencias en la versión 2 actual de la UD a este respecto, en su mayoría resultantes de la preservación del argumento, dicotomía adjunta a pesar de que se ha declarado que se evita esta distinción, y proponemos una modificación relativamente conservadora de la UD que esté libre de estos problemas.', 'ja': '本稿の目的は、コアと非コアの区別に対する一貫した普遍的依存関係アプローチを主張することである。我々は、この点で現在のバージョン2のUDに矛盾があることを実証し、主にこの区別の回避が宣言されているにもかかわらず、引数補助二分法の保存に起因するものであり、これらの問題がない比較的保守的なUDの修正を提案する。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर का उद्देश्य कोर बनाम गैर-कोर अंतर के लिए एक सुसंगत सार्वभौमिक निर्भरता दृष्टिकोण के लिए बहस करना है। हम इस संबंध में यूडी के वर्तमान संस्करण 2 में विसंगतियों का प्रदर्शन करते हैं - ज्यादातर इस भेद के घोषित परिहार के बावजूद तर्क-सहायक द्वंद्व के संरक्षण के परिणामस्वरूप - और यूडी के अपेक्षाकृत रूढ़िवादी संशोधन का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो इन समस्याओं से मुक्त है।', 'ru': 'Целью настоящего документа является аргументация согласованного подхода к различию между основными и неосновными зависимостями. Мы демонстрируем несоответствия в текущей версии 2 UD в этом отношении – в основном в результате сохранения аргументации - адъюнктивной дихотомии, несмотря на заявленное избегание этого различия – и предлагаем относительно консервативную модификацию UD, которая свободна от этих проблем.', 'zh': '本文者,论连贯通用赖法以别心非核心。 吾证UD之本2于此之不一 - 盖存论 - 辅二分法,虽宣避其异 - 而建一守之UD改,无此问也。', 'ga': 'Is é aidhm an pháipéir seo argóint a dhéanamh ar son cur chuige comhleanúnach um Spleáchas Uilíoch i leith an chroí-idirdhealaithe vs. Léirímid neamhréireachtaí sa leagan reatha 2 de UD ina leith seo – go príomha mar thoradh ar chaomhnú na hargóine–déchotóime comhcheangailte in ainneoin gur dearbhaíodh an t-idirdhealú seo a sheachaint – agus molaimid modhnú measartha coimeádach ar UD atá saor ó na fadhbanna seo.', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტის მისამართი არის აპირუქტირება კონდენტური სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო სამყარო განსხვავებაზე. ჩვენ მიმდინარე UD-ის მიმდინარე ვერსიაში არსებობას ჩვენ გამოჩვენებთ, რომელიც უფრო დიქოტომიის დახმარებადან შემდეგ არსებულ დიქოტომიის დახმარებადან გამოწყენება, მაგრამ ამ განსხვავებაზე განსხვავებული განსხვავებას გამოწყენება და', 'el': 'Στόχος της παρούσας εργασίας είναι να υποστηρίξει μια συνεκτική προσέγγιση των Οικουμενικών Εξαρτήσεων στη διάκριση πυρήνα έναντι μη πυρήνα. Αποδεικνύουμε ασυνέπειες στην τρέχουσα έκδοση 2 της UD από αυτή την άποψη, οι οποίες ως επί το πλείστον προκύπτουν από τη διατήρηση της διχοτομίας επιχειρημάτων-συμπληρωματικών παρά την δηλωμένη αποφυγή αυτής της διάκρισης και προτείνουμε μια σχετικά συντηρητική τροποποίηση της UD που είναι απαλλαγμένη από αυτά τα προβλήματα.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmány célja egy koherens univerzális függőségek megközelítése mellett érvelni a mag és nem mag megkülönböztetést. Ebben a tekintetben az UD jelenlegi 2. verziójában következetlenségeket mutatunk ki - amelyek többnyire az érvelést kiegészítő kettősség fenntartásából erednek, annak ellenére, hogy ezt a különbséget nyilvánították ki -, és javasoljuk az UD viszonylag konzervatív módosítását, amely mentes ezektől a problémáktól.', 'it': "Lo scopo di questo articolo è quello di sostenere un approccio coerente delle dipendenze universali alla distinzione core vs. non core. Dimostriamo incoerenze nell'attuale versione 2 della UD in questo senso - principalmente derivanti dal mantenimento della dicotomia argomentativa-aggiunta nonostante la dichiarata elusione di questa distinzione - e proponiamo una modifica relativamente conservativa della UD che sia esente da questi problemi.", 'lt': 'Šio dokumento tikslas – remtis nuosekliu visuotinės priklausomybės požiūriu į pagrindinius ir ne pagrindinius skirtumus. Šiuo atžvilgiu parodome neatitikimus dabartinėje UD 2 versijoje - daugiausia dėl argument ų ir papildomos dichotomijos išsaugojimo nepaisant deklaruoto šio skirtumo vengimo - ir siūlome palyginti konservatyviai pakeisti UD, kuri nebūtų susijusi su šiomis problemomis.', 'ms': 'Tujuan kertas ini adalah untuk berdebat untuk pendekatan Dependensi Universal yang konsisten kepada perbezaan inti vs. bukan inti. Kami menunjukkan ketidakkonsistensi dalam versi 2 UD semasa dalam hal ini - kebanyakan yang berasal dari penyimpanan dikotomi argumen-tambahan walaupun dinyatakan penghindaran perbezaan ini - dan melamar perubahan relatif konservatif UD yang bebas dari masalah ini.', 'ml': 'ഈ പേപ്പറിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യം ഒരു സഹജമായ യൂണിവണ്ണല്\u200d ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടിയാണ്, കോണിലേക്കുള്ള വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക് എത ഈ വ്യത്യാസത്തില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഒഴിവാക്കുന്നതിന് ശേഷം യുഡിയുടെ ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ സംരക്ഷണത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്ന രണ്ട് പതിപ്പുകളില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു', 'mk': 'Целта на овој документ е да се тврди за кохерентен пристап на универзалните зависности кон јадрото против нејадрото разлика. Демонстрираме несогласувања во сегашната верзија 2 на УД во врска со ова - претежно резултат од зачувувањето на дихотомијата со аргумент и покрај прогласеното избегнување на оваа разлика - и предложуваме релативно конзервативна модификација на УД која е ослободена од овие проблеми.', 'mt': "L-għan ta’ dan id-dokument huwa li jargumenta għal approċċ koerenti tad-Dipendenzi Universali għad-distinzjoni ewlenija kontra dik mhux ewlenija. Aħna nuru inkonsistenzi fil-verżjoni attwali 2 tal-UD f'dan ir-rigward - l-aktar li jirriżultaw mill-preservazzjoni tad-dikotomija miżjuda mal-argument minkejja l-evitar iddikjarat ta' din id-distinzjoni - u nipproponu modifika relattivament konservattiva tal-UD li hija ħielsa minn dawn il-problemi.", 'pl': 'Celem niniejszego artykułu jest argumentowanie spójnego podejścia Uniwersalnych zależności do rozróżnienia rdzenia od nierdzenia. Wykazujemy niespójności w obecnej wersji 2 UD w tym zakresie, wynikające głównie z zachowania dychotomii argument-adjunct pomimo deklarowanego unikania tego rozróżnienia i proponujemy stosunkowo konserwatywną modyfikację UD wolną od tych problemów.', 'ro': 'Scopul acestei lucrări este de a argumenta pentru o abordare coerentă a Dependențelor Universale a distincției de bază vs. non-core. Demonstrăm inconsecvențe în versiunea actuală 2 a UD în acest sens - rezultate în principal din păstrarea dicotomiei argument-adjuvantă în ciuda evitării declarate a acestei distincții - și propunem o modificare relativ conservatoare a UD, care este liberă de aceste probleme.', 'sr': 'Cilj ovog papira je da se raspravljamo za sasvim pristup univerzalnim zavisnostima jezgre protiv nejezgre-razlike. Pokazujemo nesklade u trenutnoj verziji 2 UD-a u ovom pogledu - uglavnom rezultat očuvanja dodatne dikhotomije argumenta, uprkos deklariranom izbjegavanju ove razlike - i predlažemo relativno konzervativnu modifikaciju UD-a koja je slobodna od ovih problema.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаздың мақсаты - негізгі емес түрлендіктерге қатынау көмегімен қатынау. Біз UD нұсқасында қазіргі 2- нұсқасында қайсылықтығын көрсетедік - көпшілігіміз бұл бөлімдерден аргументті қосылған дихотомияны сақтауға қарайды - және бұл мәселелерден бос болған UD- нұсқасының салыстырмалы консервативті ө', 'no': 'Målet på denne papiret er å argumentere for ein koherent universell avhengighet tilnærming til kjernespesifikasjonen mot ikkje kjernespesifikasjonen. Vi demonstrerer inkonsistensingar i den gjeldande versjonen 2 av UD i denne hendinga - hovudsakelig som resulterer frå å lagring av argument-adjunkte dikhotomien, selv om den deklarerte unngåva av denne forskjellen - og foreslår ein relativt konservativ endring av UD som er fri frå desse problemene.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අලක්ෂණය තමයි සම්බන්ධ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විරුද්ධ විශේෂ වෙනුවෙන් ප අපි ප්\u200dරකාශ කරනවා UD ගැන ප්\u200dරස්තූතිය 2 වර්ගයක් වලින් අවුරුද්ධතාවක් වලින් - සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් අවුරුද්ධතාවක් වලින් ප්\u200dරතිකාශ කරනවා මේ අවුරුද්ධතාවක් වලින් ප', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасны зорилго нь ертөнцийн хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай хамааралтай байдлын гол эсрэг үндсэн ялгааг харьцуулах юм. Бид одоогийн UD-ын 2 хувилбарт бус байдлыг харуулж байна. Олон талаар аргументаар нэмэгдсэн дихотомийн хадгалагдах боломжтой. Энэ ялгааг тодорхойлж чадахгүй ч гэсэн харьцангуй харьцангуй харьцангуй UD-ын өөрчлөлт гаргаж байна.', 'so': 'Ujeedada warqaddan waa in la doodo qiimo-xirfadeedka jaamacadda ee isku xiran u soo dhowaaday xiliga koonfureed ee aan kooban kala duwanaanayn. Waxaannu muujinnaa khiyaano ku saabsan warqadda UD 2 ee hada ah, taas darteed ugu badnaan ilaalinta suurtagalka, haba kastoo lagu naadiyey inuu ka fogaado kala duwanaanta- waxaana soo jeedinayaa beddelinta UD oo aan ka bilaabanayn dhibaatooyinkaas.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தின் இaim is to argue for a coherent Universal dependency approach to the core vs. core-non-core distinction. இந்த வித்தியாசத்தை தவிர்க்கும் போதும், தற்போதைய ய யுடி பதிப்பு 2 ல் பிரச்சனைகளை காட்டுகிறோம் - இந்த பிரச்சனைகளிலிருந்து இலவசமாக இருக்கும் பொருட்டு வார்த்தையை ப', 'sv': 'Syftet med denna uppsats är att argumentera för en sammanhängande Universal Dependences approach för kärna vs icke-kärna distinktion. Vi visar på inkonsekvenser i den nuvarande versionen 2 av UD i detta avseende - främst till följd av bevarandet av den argument-adjungerade dikotomin trots det deklarerade undvikandet av denna åtskillnad - och föreslår en relativt konservativ ändring av UD som är fri från dessa problem.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ کا مطلب یہ ہے کہ ایک مشترک Universal Dependencies کے لئے کور vs. non-core جدائی کے نزدیک بحث کرنا ہے. ہم اس کے بارے میں UD کے اوسنی نسخہ ۲ میں مختلف باتیں دکھاتے ہیں - بہت زیادہ جہالت کی حفاظت کے نتیجہ میں یہ مختلف اختلاف کے منھ پھیر لیا گیا ہے - اور UD کی نسبت محافظت کی تغییر پیش کرتا ہے جو ان مشکلوں سے آزاد ہے۔', 'vi': 'Mục tiêu của tờ giấy này là tranh luận về một phương pháp liên quan quan quan đến kể cả phân biệt lõi và không lõi. Chúng tôi chứng minh sự mâu thuẫn trong phiên bản UD hiện thời thứ hai về vấn đề này... phần lớn là kết quả từ việc bảo vệ sự phân rẽ bất hợp lý bất chấp sự né tránh rõ ràng của sự phân biệt này... và đề nghị một thay đổi UD khá bảo thủ không dính đến các vấn đề này.', 'uz': "Bu qogʻozning maqsadi, bir birinchi Universal Dependencings o'zgarishga murakkab qilish mumkin. Biz bu yerda Joriy kompyuterning 2 versiyasida muvaffaqiyatlarni ko'rsatamiz - ko'pchilik bu fikrlarni yordam berayotganda, argumentni saqlash va bu muammoladan foydalanishni davom etishga sababdi - va bu muammolar bilan bir qisqarli xavfsiz UD'ni o'zgartirishni talab qilamiz.", 'bg': 'Целта на тази статия е да се твърди за съгласуван подход на универсалните зависимости към разграничението между ядреното и неядреното. Доказваме несъответствия в настоящата версия 2 на СД в това отношение - най-вече произтичащи от запазването на аргумент-допълващата дихотомия въпреки обявеното избягване на това разграничение - и предлагаме сравнително консервативна модификация на СД, която е свободна от тези проблеми.', 'nl': 'Het doel van dit artikel is om te pleiten voor een coherente universele afhankelijkheidsbenadering van het core vs. non-core onderscheid. We tonen inconsistenties in de huidige versie 2 van UD in dit opzicht aan die voornamelijk voortvloeien uit het behoud van de argument-adjunct dichotomie ondanks de verklaarde vermijding van dit onderscheid en stellen een relatief conservatieve wijziging van UD voor die vrij is van deze problemen.', 'da': 'Formålet med denne artikel er at argumentere for en sammenhængende Universal Dependences tilgang til kerne vs. ikke-kerne skelnen. Vi påviser uoverensstemmelser i den nuværende version 2 af UD i denne henseende - hovedsagelig som følge af bevarelsen af den argumenttilføjede dikotomi på trods af den erklærede undgåelse af denne sondring - og foreslår en relativt konservativ ændring af UD, der er fri for disse problemer.', 'hr': 'Cilj ovog papira je raspravljati se za saskaņotan pristup univerzalnim zavisnostima jezgre protiv neodglasne razlike. Pokazujemo nesklade u trenutnoj verziji 2 UD-a u tom pogledu - uglavnom rezultat očuvanja dodatne dikhotomije argumenta uprkos proglašenom izbjegavanju te razlike - i predlažemo relativno konzervativnu modifikaciju UD-a koja je slobodna od tih problema.', 'de': 'Das Ziel dieser Arbeit ist es, für einen kohärenten Universal Dependencies Ansatz zur Kern- vs. Nicht-Kern-Unterscheidung zu argumentieren. Wir zeigen Inkonsistenzen in der aktuellen Version 2 von UD in dieser Hinsicht, die größtenteils aus der Erhaltung der Argument-Adjunct-Dichotomie trotz der deklarierten Vermeidung dieser Unterscheidung resultieren, und schlagen eine relativ konservative Modifikation der UD vor, die frei von diesen Problemen ist.', 'id': 'The aim of this paper is to argue for a coherent Universal Dependencies approach to the core vs. non-core distinction.  Kami menunjukkan ketidakkonsistensi dalam versi 2 UD saat ini dalam hal ini - kebanyakan berasal dari pemeliharaan dikotomi argumen-tambahan meskipun dideklarasikan menghindari perbedaan ini - dan mengusulkan modifikasi relatif konservatif UD yang bebas dari masalah ini.', 'ko': '본고의 목적은 핵심과 비핵심 구분에 일치된 통용 의존 방법을 제공하는 것이다.우리는 UD의 현재 버전 2가 이 방면에서 일치하지 않는다는 것을 증명했다. 주로 이런 차이를 피했다고 성명했지만 논점 부가 이분법을 보류하고 UD에 대해 상대적으로 보수적인 수정을 해서 이런 문제를 피하는 것을 건의했기 때문이다.', 'fa': 'هدف این کاغذ این است که برای یک دسترسی بستگی جهانی هماهنگ به مرکز علیه جدایی غیر مرکز بحث کنیم. ما در نسخه ۲ از UD در این مورد مخالفت را نشان می دهیم - بیشتر از حفظ دیکوتومی که با وجود اعلام داده شده از این تفاوت - و پیشنهاد یک تغییر نسبتا محافظت از UD که از این مشکلات آزاد است.', 'sw': 'Lengo la gazeti hili ni kujadili kutegemea uungwaji wa kutegemea ulimwengu wa ulimwengu wa pamoja na utofauti usio wa msingi. Tunaonyesha ukosefu wa kutokuwepo kwa toleo la hivi karibuni la UDD katika suala hili – hasa hivyo kutokana na ulinzi wa utambulisho wa hoja pamoja na kutangazwa kuepuka na utofauti huu – na kupendekeza mabadiliko ya kihafidhina ya UDD ambayo haiko huru na matatizo haya.', 'af': "Die doel van hierdie papier is om te argueer vir 'n koerende Universele Afwykelighede toegang tot die kern teen nie-kern afwykelighede. Ons wys inkonsistensies in die huidige weergawe 2 van UD in hierdie respek - meeste resultaat van die opserving van die argument-adjunct dikhotomy, selfs die verklaar uitbreiding van hierdie verskil - en voorstel 'n relativief konservatiewe verandering van UD wat vry is van hierdie probleme.", 'sq': 'The aim of this paper is to argue for a coherent Universal Dependencies approach to the core vs. non-core distinction.  Ne demonstrojmë moskonsistenca në version in e tanishëm 2 të UD në këtë lidhje - kryesisht që rezulton nga ruajtja e dikotomisë së shtuar-argument pavarësisht nga shmangia e deklaruar e kësaj dallimi - dhe propozojmë një modifikim relativisht konservativ të UD që është i lirë nga këto probleme.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzyň maksady şu wagtyň ýerleşýän uniwersaly ynamlyklaryň çekirde-de çekirde döwürmekdir. Biz häzirki UD-yň 2-nji wersiýasynda pächasyzlyklary görkeýäris - köplenç bu a ýlaýyşyň üýtgemegine rağmen argüm-ýeňil dikhotomyň sagdyndan netijesi bar - we bu meselelerden boş bolan UD-yň relativ konservatýa üýtgemesini teklip edip görkeýäris.', 'am': 'የዚህ ፕሮግራም ጉዳዩ አካባቢ እና አካባቢ ሳይሆን የዓለማዊ ደጋፊዎች ግንኙነት ለመቀበል ነው፡፡ በሁለተኛው የዩዲ ሪፖርት 2 ውስጥ ጥላቻን እናሳየዋለን፡፡ ይህ ትርጉም ምንም እንኳን በተለየ አዋቂውን አዋቂ ጥያቄን በመጠበቅ እና ከዚህም ጉዳዮች ነፃ ከሆነው የዩዲ አካባቢ ማሻሻሻል እናሳልቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի նպատակն է փաստարկել համապատասխան համաշխարհային կախվածությունների մոտեցումը հիմնական և ոչ հիմնական տարբերակում: Մենք ցույց ենք տալիս անհամապատասխանությունները UD-ի ներկայիս 2-րդ տարբերակում այս հարցում, որոնք հիմնականում հանգեցնում են բանավեճի-ավելացված դիկոտոմիայի պահպանումից, չնայած այս տարբերակի հայտարարված խուսափման, և առաջարկում ենք UD-ի հարաբերականորեն պահպանողական փոփոխություն, որը', 'az': 'Bu kağıtların məqsədi, birləşdirilmiş Universal Dependencilərin core-non-core fərqləməsi üçün mübahisə etməkdir. Biz bu tərzdə UD 2-nin hökmünün müqabiliyyətlərini göstəririk - çox olaraq bu fərqlənmədən uzaqlaşdırılmasına rağmen argument-adjunct dikhotomya təhlükəsizlik göstərir - və bu problemlərdən uzaq olan UD-nin relativi konservativ dəyişikliyini təbliğ edirik.', 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকার উদ্দেশ্য হচ্ছে এক সাথে বিশ্ববিদ্যালয়ের নির্ভরের কাছে যুক্তি প্রদান করার জন্য। আমরা বর্তমান সংস্করণে ইউডির ২ সংস্করণের অসংখ্যা প্রদর্শন করি- বেশীরভাগ এই বিচ্ছিন্ন প্রতিরোধ করা সত্ত্বেও যুক্তি সংরক্ষণের ফলে যুক্তি প্রদান করা হয়েছে- এবং এই সমস্যার মুক্তি থেকে ই', 'bs': 'Cilj ovog papira je da se raspravlja za saskaņotan pristup univerzalnim zavisnostima jezgre protiv neodglasne razlike. Pokazujemo nesklade u trenutnoj verziji 2 UD-a u tom pogledu - uglavnom rezultat očuvanja dodatne dikhotomije argumenta uprkos proglašenom izbjegavanju ove razlike - i predlažemo relativno konzervativnu modifikaciju UD-a koja je slobodna od tih problema.', 'cs': 'Cílem tohoto článku je argumentovat pro koherentní univerzální závislosti při rozlišování jádra vs. ne-jádra. V tomto ohledu demonstrujeme nesrovnalosti v současné verzi 2 UD, které jsou většinou vyplývající z zachování argument-adjunct dichotomie navzdory deklarovanému vyhnutí se tomuto rozlišení a navrhujeme relativně konzervativní modifikaci UD, která je bez těchto problémů.', 'et': 'Käesoleva dokumendi eesmärk on toetada sidusat lähenemisviisi universaalsetele sõltuvustele põhiliste ja mitte-tuumikute eristamisel. Näitame selles suhtes vastuolusid UD praeguses versioonis 2, mis tulenevad peamiselt argumendi-täiendava dikotoomia säilimisest vaatamata sellele, et seda eristamist väljendati, ning teeme ettepaneku UD suhteliselt konservatiivseks muutmiseks, mis ei sisalda neid probleeme.', 'fi': 'Tämän artikkelin tavoitteena on esittää johdonmukaista lähestymistapaa yleismaailmallisten riippuvuuksien erottamiseen ydin- ja muiden kuin ydinjärjestelmien välillä. Osoitamme epäjohdonmukaisuuksia UD:n nykyisessä versiossa 2 tässä suhteessa - lähinnä seurausta argumentti-adjunt-dikotomian säilyttämisestä huolimatta siitä, että tämä ero on ilmoitettu vältetyksi - ja ehdotamme suhteellisen konservatiivista UD:n muuttamista, joka ei sisällä näitä ongelmia.', 'ca': "L'objectiu d'aquest paper és argumentar per un enfocament coherent de Dependencies Universals a la distinció central i no central. Demonstrem inconsistencies en la versió 2 actual de l'UD en aquest sentit - principalment resultant de la conservació de la dicotomia adjuntiva a l'argumentació malgrat l'evitació declarada d'aquesta distinció - i proposem una modificació relativament conservadora de l'UD que està lliure d'aquests problemes.", 'ha': "Yayinsa da wannan takarda shine a yi jãyayya dõmin a yi wata wadangan Duniyõyin Universal Deputies zuwa ga tsakanin tsakanin versa-bincike. Tuna nũna masu ɓarna a cikin version 2 na UD na yanzu cikin wannan masu hushi - maiti'a yana ƙara tsari da dihotomi ingawa da aka kirãye sigar wannan rabo - kuma tuna buƙata mai tsaro na UD wanda bai zama sai ba daga matabbata ba.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nglanggar kuwi nganggo urip kanggo koherengé Universal Dijewisan kanggo nganggo sampek karo nek coro-sampek Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar karbote sampek ning versi 2(UT) sing nggawe barêng-barêng kuwi - supoyo iso nggawe gerapakan karo iso nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan karo iso nggawe gerakan dhéwé -iso nggawe akeh perusahaan karo iso nggawe gerakan karo perusahaan dumadhi kuwi mau.', 'sk': 'Cilj tega članka je zagovarjati skladen pristop univerzalnih odvisnosti k razlikovanju med jedrom in nejedrom. V zvezi s tem dokazujemo neskladnosti v sedanji različici 2 UD, ki so večinoma posledica ohranitve dikotomije argument-dodatek kljub deklariranemu izogibanju temu razlikovanju, in predlagamo relativno konzervativno spremembo UD, ki je brez teh težav.', 'bo': 'The aim of this paper is to argue for a coherent Universal Dependencies approach to the core vs. non-core distinction. We demonstrate inconsistencies in the current version 2 of UD in this respect - mostly resulting from the preservation of the argument-adjunct dichotomy despite the declared avoidance of this distinction - and propose a relatively conservative modification of UD that is free from these problems.', 'he': 'המטרה של הנייר הזה היא להתווכח על גישה תואם של תלויות יוניברסליות לבדיקה הליבה נגד לא הליבה. אנו מראים אי-תואמות בגרסה 2 הנוכחית של UD בנוגע לזה - בעיקר שנוצאות משמורת הדיקוטומיה הנוספת-הטיעון למרות המהירות המכריחה של ההבדל הזה - ולהציע שינוי יחסית שמשמר של UD אשר חופשי מהבעיות האלה.'}
{'en': 'Distinguishing affixoid formations from compounds', 'ar': 'تمييز التكوينات اللاصقة عن المركبات', 'es': 'Distinguir las formaciones affixoides de los compuestos', 'pt': 'Distinguindo formações afixóides de compostos', 'fr': 'Distinguer les formations affixoïdes des composés', 'ja': 'アフィクソイド形成を化合物から区別すること', 'zh': '分词缀体成和化合物', 'hi': 'यौगिकों से प्रत्ययय संरचनाओं को अलग करना', 'ru': 'Отличие аффиксоидных образований от соединений', 'ga': 'Idirdhealú a dhéanamh idir foirmíochtaí affixoid ó chomhdhúile', 'ka': 'აფიქსიოდის ფორმაციების შემდეგ განსაზღვრება', 'el': 'Διακρίνοντας τους σχηματισμούς αλληλοειδών από ενώσεις', 'it': 'Distinguere formazioni affissoidi dai composti', 'kk': 'Тіркелгендерден афиксоид пішімдерін шектеу', 'ms': 'Mempecahkan formasi afixoid dari komponen', 'mk': 'Различувачки афиксоидни формации од композиции', 'ml': 'ആഫിക്സോയിഡ് ഫോര്\u200dമെന്\u200dറുകള്\u200d കൂട്ടത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും മാറ്റുന്നു', 'hu': 'Az affixoid képződmények megkülönböztetése a vegyületektől', 'mn': 'Афиксоидын хэлбэрийг холбоотой', 'lt': 'Suskirstymo afiksoidų formacijos iš junginių', 'no': 'Avdeling av affixoidformateringar frå samlingar', 'mt': 'Formazzjonijiet affissojdi li jiddistingwu minn komposti', 'pl': 'Odróżnianie formacji afiksoidów od związków', 'ro': 'Distinguerea formațiunilor afixoide de compuși', 'sr': 'Odvajanje afiksoidnih formacija od spojeva', 'si': 'සම්පූර්ණයෙන් ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක විශේෂ කරන්න', 'so': 'Qeymeynta iskudarka', 'sv': 'Skilja affixoidformationer från föreningar', 'ta': 'பொருளிலிருந்து affixoid வடிவமைப்புகளை பிரிக்கிறது', 'ur': 'افیکسئڈ فرموزوں کو ترکیب سے تقسیم کرنے والا ہے', 'uz': 'affixoid formatlarini kompyuterdan olib tashlash', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bg': 'Различаване на афиксоидните образувания от съединенията', 'da': 'Skilling af affixoidformationer fra forbindelser', 'nl': 'Het onderscheiden van affixoïde formaties van verbindingen', 'id': 'Memperbedakan formasi afixoid dari komponen', 'de': 'Unterscheidung von affixoiden Formationen von Verbindungen', 'ko': '분류 점액 구조와 화합물을 구분하다', 'sw': 'Kuondoa vipengele vya affixoid kutoka vifaa', 'fa': 'جدا کردن فرم\u200cهای آفیکسوید از ترکیب\u200cها', 'af': 'Verwyder affixoid formasies van verbindings', 'hr': 'Odvajanje afiksoidnih formacija iz spojeva', 'am': 'drawable-action', 'hy': 'Distinguishing affixoid formations from compounds', 'az': 'Birlikl…ôrd…ôn affixoid formatlarƒ±nƒ± ayƒ±rmaq', 'bn': 'Distinguishing affixoid formations from compounds', 'bs': 'Odvajanje afiksoidnih formacija iz spojeva', 'tr': 'Birjanlardan affiksoydan aýrylýar', 'cs': 'Rozlišení afixoidních formací od sloučenin', 'et': 'Kinksoidide eristamine ühenditest', 'fi': 'Kiinnitysmuodostumien erottaminen yhdisteistä', 'ca': 'Formacions afixoides distintives dels composts', 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i formimeve afixoide nga komponetet', 'jv': 'Cage', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'sk': 'Razlikovanje afiksoidnih formacij od spojin', 'he': 'מפרסמים פיקסוידים ממרכיבים', 'bo': 'compounds'}
{'en': 'We study German affixoids, a type of morpheme in between affixes and free stems. Several properties have been associated with them   increased productivity ; a bleached semantics, which is often evaluative and/or intensifying and thus of relevance to sentiment analysis ; and the existence of a free morpheme counterpart   but not been validated empirically. In experiments on a new data set that we make available, we put these key assumptions from the morphological literature to the test and show that despite the fact that affixoids generate many low-frequency formations, we can classify these as affixoid or non-affixoid instances with a best F1-score of 74 %.', 'ar': 'ندرس اللواحق الألمانية ، نوع من مورفيم بين اللواحق والسيقان الحرة. ارتبطت العديد من الخصائص بها - زيادة الإنتاجية ؛ دلالات مبيضة ، والتي غالبًا ما تكون تقييمية و / أو مكثفة وبالتالي ذات صلة بتحليل المشاعر ؛ ووجود نظير شكلي حر - ولكن لم يتم التحقق من صحته تجريبياً. في التجارب على مجموعة بيانات جديدة نوفرها ، وضعنا هذه الافتراضات الرئيسية من الأدبيات المورفولوجية للاختبار ونوضح أنه على الرغم من حقيقة أن الألقاب تولد العديد من التكوينات منخفضة التردد ، يمكننا تصنيفها على أنها حالات لاحقة أو غير ملحقة مع أفضل درجة F1 بنسبة 74٪.', 'es': 'Estudiamos los affixoides alemanes, un tipo de morfema entre afijos y tallos libres. Se les han asociado varias propiedades: aumento de la productividad; una semántica blanqueada, que a menudo es evaluativa y/o intensificadora y, por lo tanto, de relevancia para el análisis de sentimientos; y la existencia de una contraparte de morfema libre, pero no ha sido validada empíricamente. En experimentos sobre un nuevo conjunto de datos que ponemos a disposición, pusimos a prueba estas suposiciones clave de la literatura morfológica y demostramos que, a pesar del hecho de que los affixoides generan muchas formaciones de baja frecuencia, podemos clasificarlas como instancias de affixoides o no affixoides con una mejor puntuación de F1 del 74%.', 'ja': 'ドイツ語のアフィクソイドを研究しており、アフィクソイドと遊離茎の間にあるモルフェームの一種である。生産性の向上、しばしば評価的かつ／または強化的であり、したがって感情分析に関連する漂白された意味論、および自由なモルフェーム対応物の存在など、いくつかの特性がそれらに関連付けられているが、実証的には検証されていない。利用可能な新しいデータセットの実験において、我々は、形態学的文献からこれらの重要な仮定を試験に置き、アフィクソイドが多くの低周波形成を生成するにもかかわらず、これらを、74%の最高のF 1スコアを有するアフィクソイドまたは非アフィクソイドのインスタンスとして分類することができることを示した。', 'pt': 'Estudamos os afixóides alemães, um tipo de morfema entre afixos e radicais livres. Várias propriedades têm sido associadas a eles – aumento de produtividade; uma semântica branqueada, muitas vezes avaliativa e/ou intensificadora e, portanto, de relevância para a análise de sentimentos; e a existência de uma contraparte de morfema livre – mas não validada empiricamente. Em experimentos em um novo conjunto de dados que disponibilizamos, testamos essas premissas-chave da literatura morfológica e mostramos que, apesar do fato de afixóides gerarem muitas formações de baixa frequência, podemos classificá-las como instâncias afixóides ou não afixóides com uma melhor pontuação F1 de 74%.', 'fr': "Nous étudions les affixoïdes allemands, un type de morphème entre les affixes et les tiges libres. Plusieurs propriétés leur ont été associées — une productivité accrue\xa0; une sémantique blanchie, souvent évaluative et/ou intensifiante et donc pertinente pour l'analyse des sentiments\xa0; et l'existence d'un homologue morphème libre — mais qui n'a pas été validée empiriquement. Dans des expériences sur un nouvel ensemble de données que nous mettons à disposition, nous avons testé ces hypothèses clés tirées de la littérature morphologique et avons montré que, malgré le fait que les affixoïdes génèrent de nombreuses formations à basse fréquence, nous pouvons les classer comme des instances affixoïdes ou non affixoïdes avec un meilleur score F1 de 74\xa0%.", 'zh': '考德语词缀,介于词缀、自由词干之间语素。 有几个属性 - 高生产力。 漂白之语义,常质/强化,故与情析相关。 及自由语素对应物之存 - 未经经验。 凡新集之实验,试形态学文献之要,虽众低频所成,可分其类为定或非附实,最F1分为74%。', 'ru': 'Мы изучаем немецкие аффиксоиды, тип морфемы между аффиксами и свободными стеблями. С ними связано несколько свойств – повышение производительности; обесцвеченная семантика, которая часто является оценочной и/или интенсифицирующей и, таким образом, имеет отношение к анализу настроений; и существование свободного аналога морфемы – но не была подтверждена эмпирически. В экспериментах на новом наборе данных, который мы предоставляем, мы помещаем эти ключевые предположения из морфологической литературы в тест и показываем, что, несмотря на то, что аффиксоиды генерируют много низкочастотных образований, мы можем классифицировать их как аффиксоидные или неафиксоидные экземпляры с лучшим показателем F1 74%.', 'hi': 'हम जर्मन affixoids, चिपकने और मुक्त उपजी के बीच में morpheme का एक प्रकार का अध्ययन. कई गुण उनके साथ जुड़े हुए हैं - उत्पादकता में वृद्धि; एक ब्लीच किए गए शब्दार्थ, जो अक्सर मूल्यांकन और / या तेज होता है और इस प्रकार भावना विश्लेषण के लिए प्रासंगिकता का होता है; और एक मुक्त morpheme समकक्ष का अस्तित्व - लेकिन अनुभवजन्य रूप से मान्य नहीं किया गया है। एक नए डेटा सेट पर प्रयोगों में जो हम उपलब्ध कराते हैं, हम इन प्रमुख मान्यताओं को रूपात्मक साहित्य से परीक्षण में डालते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि इस तथ्य के बावजूद कि चिपकने वाले कई कम आवृत्ति संरचनाओं को उत्पन्न करते हैं, हम इन्हें 74% के सर्वश्रेष्ठ एफ 1-स्कोर के साथ चिपकाया या गैर-चिपकने वाले उदाहरणों के रूप में वर्गीकृत कर सकते हैं।', 'ga': 'Déanaimid staidéar ar affixoids Gearmánacha, cineál moirféime idir greamáin agus gais saor in aisce. Tá baint ag roinnt maoine leo – táirgiúlacht mhéadaithe; 648/2012 Téacs atá ábhartha maidir leis an LEE shéimeantaic thuartha, a bhíonn meastóireachtach agus/nó dianaithe go minic agus a bhaineann dá réir sin le hanailís ar mheontacht; agus comhghleacaí saor-mhoirféime a bheith ann – ach nach bhfuil bailíochtaithe go heimpíreach. I dturgnaimh ar thacar sonraí nua a chuirimid ar fáil, chuireamar na príomhbhoinn tuisceana seo ón litríocht moirfeolaíoch go dtí an tástáil agus taispeánann muid, ainneoin go ngineann affixoids go leor foirmíochtaí íseal-minicíochta, is féidir linn iad seo a rangú mar chásanna affixoid nó neamh-affixoid. le scór F1 is fearr de 74%.', 'hu': 'Tanulmányozzuk a német affixoidokat, egyfajta morfémát az affixek és a szabad szárak között. Számos tulajdonság kapcsolódott hozzájuk - növelt termelékenység; fehérített szemantika, amely gyakran értékelő és/vagy intenzívebb, és így releváns a szentimentális elemzés szempontjából; és egy szabad morfém megfelelő létezése - de empirikusan nem hitelesítették. Az általunk rendelkezésre bocsátott új adatkészleten végzett kísérletek során a morfológiai szakirodalomból ezeket a kulcsfontosságú feltételezéseket teszteljük, és azt mutatjuk, hogy annak ellenére, hogy az affixoidok számos alacsony frekvenciájú képződményt generálnak, azokat a legjobb F1 pontszámmal rendelkező affixoid vagy nem affixoid példányként tudjuk besorolni.', 'el': 'Μελετάμε γερμανικά αφιξοειδή, ένα είδος μορφώματος ανάμεσα στις προσθήκες και τους ελεύθερους μίσχους. Αρκετές ιδιότητες έχουν συσχετιστεί με αυτούς με αυξημένη παραγωγικότητα. μια λευκασμένη σημασιολογία, η οποία συχνά είναι αξιολογητική ή/και εντατική και συνεπώς έχει σχέση με την ανάλυση συναισθημάτων· και την ύπαρξη ενός ελεύθερου μορφέμιου ομολόγου, αλλά δεν έχει επικυρωθεί εμπειρικά. Σε πειράματα σε ένα νέο σύνολο δεδομένων που διαθέτουμε, θέτουμε σε δοκιμή αυτές τις βασικές υποθέσεις από τη μορφολογική βιβλιογραφία και αποδεικνύουμε ότι παρά το γεγονός ότι τα αφιξοειδή παράγουν πολλούς σχηματισμούς χαμηλής συχνότητας, μπορούμε να τα ταξινομήσουμε ως επιπξοειδή ή μη συγγενικά περιστατικά με καλύτερη βαθμολογία του 74%.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ გერმანეთის აფიქსიოდის სწავლავთ, როგორც მორფემის ტიპი აფიქსის და თავისუფალი სტექსის შორის. რამდენიმე მნიშვნელობები მათთან დაკავშირებულია - პროექტივიტება. სენტიმენტიკები, რომელიც ხშირად განსაზღვრებულია და/ან ინტენსტირებულია და ამიტომ სენტიმენტიკის ანალიზაციისთვის შესაძლებელია; და თავისუფალი მორფემის კონტეპორტის არსებობას - მაგრამ არ იყო იმპერიკურად გადაწყენებული. ექსპერიმენტებში ახალი მონაცემების კონფიგურაციაში, რომელიც ჩვენ დავწყებთ, ჩვენ მოპოროლოგიური ლიტურატიდან გამოყენებთ და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ფაქტი, რომ აფიქსიოდიები წარმოიქმნენ მრავალ ფორმაციები, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია ამ კონფიქსიოდის ან', 'it': "Studiamo affissoidi tedeschi, un tipo di morfema tra affissi e steli liberi. Diverse proprietà sono state associate a loro - aumento della produttività; una semantica sbiancata, spesso valutativa e/o intensificante e quindi rilevante per l'analisi sentimentale; e l'esistenza di una controparte morfema libera - ma non è stata convalidata empiricamente. In esperimenti su un nuovo set di dati che mettiamo a disposizione, mettiamo alla prova queste ipotesi chiave dalla letteratura morfologica e mostriamo che nonostante il fatto che gli affissoidi generano molte formazioni a bassa frequenza, possiamo classificarle come istanze affissoidi o non affissoidi con un miglior punteggio F1 del 74%.", 'kk': 'Біз неміс афиксоидтерді зерттейміз, афикс мен бос стимстер арасындағы морфем түрі. Олармен бірнеше қасиеттер байланысты - үйлесімдік көтерілді; көпшілікті оқу және/немесе көбейту және сезімдік анализиясының маңыздығы болады. және бос морфемді қарсы партнері бар, бірақ империялық тексерілмеген. Қолданатын жаңа деректер жиынының тәжірибелерінде, морфологиялық литературасынан тестіріп, афиксоидтердің көп жиілік пішімдерін жасағанда, бұларды афиксоид не афиксоид нәтижелерінде 74% деген ең жақсы F1- нәтижелерімен классификациялық болып,', 'lt': 'Mes tiriame vokiečių afiksoidus, tam tikrą formą tarp klijų ir laisvų kamienų. Su jomis susijusios kelios savybės – padidėjęs našumas; švelninta semantika, kuri dažnai vertina ir (arba) stiprina ir todėl yra svarbi jautrumo analizei; ir laisvo morfo analogo egzistavimas, bet nebuvo patvirtintas empiriniu būdu. Eksperimentuose su nauju duomenų rinkiniu, kurį mes pateikiame, mes išbandėme šias pagrindines prielaidas iš morfologinės literatūros ir parodome, kad nepaisant to, kad afiksoidai sukuria daug mažo dažnio formacijų, mes galime jas klasifikuoti kaip afiksoidinius arba neifiksuotus atvejus, kurių geriausias F1 balas yra 74 %.', 'mk': 'Студираме германски афиксоиди, еден вид на морфем помеѓу приклучоците и слободните стомаци. Неколку сопствености се поврзани со нив - зголемена продуктивност; бележана семантика, која честопати е оценувачка и/или интензивирачка и со тоа е релевантна за анализата на чувствата; и постоењето на слободен колега на морфемот - но не било потврдено емпирично. Во експериментите на новите податоци кои ги поставуваме достапни, ги ставаме овие клучни претпоставки од морфолошката литература на тестот и покажуваме дека и покрај фактот дека афиксоидите генерираат многу формации со ниска фреквенција, можеме да ги класификуваме како афиксоидни или неафиксоидни инстанции со најдобра оценка на F1 од 74', 'ms': 'Kami mempelajari afixoid Jerman, jenis morfen di antara afiks dan stem bebas. Beberapa ciri-ciri telah berkaitan dengan mereka - meningkat produktifiti; semantik berwarna putih, yang sering diuji dan/atau meningkatkan dan dengan itu berkaitan dengan analisis perasaan; dan keberadaan rakan-rakan morfen percuma -- tetapi tidak disahkan secara empirik. Dalam eksperimen pada set data baru yang kita buat tersedia, kita letakkan asumsi kunci dari literatur morfologi ke ujian dan menunjukkan bahawa walaupun afixoid menghasilkan banyak format frekuensi rendah, kita boleh klasifikasikan ini sebagai contoh afixoid atau bukan-afixoid dengan skor F1 terbaik 74%.', 'mt': 'Aħna nistudjaw affissojdi Ġermaniżi, tip ta’ morfem bejn twaħħil u stemi ħielsa. Ġew assoċjati magħhom diversi proprjetajiet – żieda fil-produttività; semantika ibbliċjata, li spiss tkun evalwattiva u/jew li tintensifika u għalhekk ta’ rilevanza għall-analiżi tas-sentimenti; u l-eżistenza ta’ kontroparti ta’ morfa ħielsa – iżda ma ġietx validata empirikament. Fl-esperimenti fuq sett ġdid ta’ dejta li nagħmlu disponibbli, a ħna nqiegħdu dawn is-suppożizzjonijiet ewlenin mil-letteratura morfoloġika għat-test u nuru li minkejja l-fatt li l-affissjojdi jiġġeneraw ħafna formazzjonijiet ta’ frekwenza baxxa, nistgħu nikklassifikawhom bħala każijiet affissjojdi jew mhux affissjojdi bl-aħjar punteġġ F1 ta’ 74%.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ജര്\u200dമ്മന്\u200d അഫിക്സോയിഡുകള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു തരം മോര്\u200dഫെമിയില്\u200d നിന്നും സ്വതന്ത്രമായ സ്റ്റേമിനും  കുറച്ചു സ്വത്തുക്കള്\u200d അവയോടൊപ്പം ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു- വളര്\u200dന്ന വിഭവങ്ങള്\u200d; ഒരു കഷ്ടപ്പെട്ട സെമാന്റിക്കുകള്\u200d, അതിന്റെ പ്രാവശ്യം വിലാസപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d വിവേക സ്വതന്ത്രമായ ഒരു മോര്\u200dഫീമിന്\u200dറെ കൂട്ടാളിയുടെ നിലനില്\u200dക്കുന്നതും, പക്ഷെ സാമ്രാജ്യത്തില്\u200d തെളിവുള്ള നമ്മള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്ന പുതിയ വിവരങ്ങളുടെ പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d നിന്ന് ഈ താക്കോലുകള്\u200d പരീക്ഷണത്തിലേക്ക് വെച്ച് കാണിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. അഫിക്സോയിഡുകള്\u200d ഒരുപാട് കുറഞ്ഞ ഫ്രെയിന്\u200dസ് ഫോര്\u200dമെന', 'mn': 'Бид Германы афиксоидыг судалдаг. Афикс болон үнэгүй стэмс хоорондын морфем юм. Ихэнх өөрчлөлт нь тэднээс холбогдсон - үйлдвэрлэлт нэмэгдсэн. сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээнд ихэвчлэн үнэлэх, /эсвэл нэмэгдүүлэх, тэгээд сэтгэл хөдлөлийн шинжилгээнд хамааралтай. Мөн үнэгүй морфем хэмжээний байр суурь байдаг. Гэхдээ эзэмшигтэй хэмжээнд баталагдсан. Шинэ өгөгдлийн хэмжээний туршилтууд дээр морфологикийн уран зохиолынхаа чухал тодорхойлолтуудыг шалгалт руу оруулж, ихэвчлэн ихэвчлэн бага хэмжээст хэмжээсүүд бий болгодог ч бид эдгээрийг эффиксоид эсвэл эффиксоид биш тодорхойлолтуудын хувьд 74% хувьд хува', 'no': 'Vi studerer tysk affiksoidd, ein type morphem mellom affikslar og fri stemmer. Fleire eigenskapar er tilknytta med dei - økt produktivitet; ein blågde semantikk, som ofte er evaluering og/eller intensifisering og derfor er relevant til sentimentanalyser; og eksisterende av ein fri morfmellom - men ikkje er validert empirisk. I eksperimenter på eit nytt datasett som vi gjer tilgjengeleg, legg vi disse nøkkelassumpsjonane frå morfologiske litteratur til testen og viser at selv om det faktum at affixoid generer mange låg frekvensformasjonar, kan vi klassifisere desse som affixoid eller ikkje-affixoid-instansene med en beste F1-poeng med 74 %.', 'pl': 'Badamy afiksoidy niemieckie, rodzaj morfemu pomiędzy afiksami a wolnymi łodygami. Kilka właściwości zostało z nimi związanych o zwiększonej wydajności; wybieloną semantykę, która często jest oceniająca i/lub intensyfikująca, a tym samym ma znaczenie dla analizy sentymentów; oraz istnienie wolnego odpowiednika morfemu, ale nie zostało zweryfikowane empirycznie. W eksperymentach na nowym zbiorze danych, który udostępniamy, poddajemy testowi te kluczowe założenia z literatury morfologicznej i pokazujemy, że pomimo faktu, że afiksoidy generują wiele formacji niskiej częstotliwości, możemy je sklasyfikować jako afiksoidy lub nieafiksoidy o najlepszym wyniku F1 74%.', 'ro': 'Studiem afixoizii germani, un tip de morfem intre afixe si tulpini libere. Mai multe proprietăți au fost asociate cu ele - productivitate crescută; o semantică albită, adesea evaluată și/sau intensificată și, prin urmare, relevantă pentru analiza sentimentelor; și existența unui contrapartid morfem liber - dar nu a fost validată empiric. În experimentele pe un nou set de date pe care îl punem la dispoziție, am pus aceste ipoteze cheie din literatura morfologică la încercare și am arătat că, în ciuda faptului că afixoizii generează multe formațiuni cu frecvență joasă, le putem clasifica ca instanțe afixoide sau non-afixoide cu cel mai bun scor F1 de 74%.', 'sr': 'Mi proučavamo njemačke afiksioide, vrstu morfije između afiksa i slobodnih stepenica. S njima je povezano nekoliko vlasništva - povećana produktivnost; krvarena semantika, koja je često procjenjivana i/ili intenzivna i tako važna za analizu sentiment a; i postojanje slobodnog morfemskog kolega, ali nije potvrđeno empirički. U eksperimentima na novom setu podataka koje se bavimo dostupnim, stavili smo ključne pretpostavke iz morfološke literature na test i pokazali da, uprkos činjenici da afiksioidi generiraju mnoge niske frekvencije formacije, možemo ih klasifikirati kao afiksioidne ili ne afiksioidne slučajeve sa najboljim F1 rezultatom od 74%.', 'so': 'Waxaynu barannaa dhibaatooyin Jarmal ah, noocyo kale oo morpheme ah oo u dhexeeya tababaro xor ah iyo tababaro lacag la’aan ah. Waxyaabo badan oo iyaga la xiriiray - dhaqaalaha kordhay; Semitiniyada labka leh, kaasoo marar badan qiimeynaya iyo/ama kordhiya, taas oo ku saabsan baaritaanka xisaabta; iyo in ay jiraan saaxiib xor ah, laakiin aan lagu xaqiijiyey si caqli ah. Imtixaanka sawirada cusub ee aan ka sameyno, waxaynu imtixaanka u dhignay malaha ugu muhiimsan ee sawirada morphologiga ah, waxaana tusaynaa in inkastoo ay affixoid dhashaan qaab badan oo dhaqdhaqaaqsan, waxaan u kala qaybsan karnaa xaaladaha affixoid ama aan affixoid aheyn oo ugu fiican F1 boqolkiiba 74 boqolkiiba.', 'sv': 'Vi studerar tyska affixoider, en typ av morfem mellan affix och fria stjälkar. Flera fastigheter har förknippats med dem - ökad produktivitet; blekt semantik, som ofta är utvärderande och/eller intensifierande och därmed av relevans för sentimentalanalys. och förekomsten av en fri morfem motsvarighet - men inte validerats empiriskt. I experiment på en ny datauppsättning som vi gör tillgänglig testar vi dessa grundläggande antaganden från den morfologiska litteraturen och visar att trots det faktum att affixoider genererar många lågfrekventa formationer, kan vi klassificera dessa som affixoida eller icke-affixoida instanser med en bästa F1-poäng på 74%.', 'si': 'අපි ජර්මන් ඇෆික්සෝයිඩ්ස් අධ්\u200dයානය කරනවා, ප්\u200dරතිකාරයක් සහ නිදහස් ස්ටීම් අතර. ගොඩක් විශේෂතාවක් ඔවුන්ට සම්බන්ධ වෙලා තියෙනවා - විශේෂ විශේෂතාවක්; සිමාන්තික විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒක සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරනවා සහ/නැති විශ්වාස කරනවා, ඒ වගේම දැනුම් විශ්වාස ක ඒ වගේම නිදහස් මෝර්ෆේම් එක්ක සම්පූර්ණයක් තියෙන්නේ - ඒත් සාධාරණයෙන් විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නෑ In exams on a new data set that we make Avail, we set up this key assumption from the Morphiology Litteratura to the testing and show that, though the case that Afix oils generous a lot of low-frequection formions, we can classifie them as Afix or non-Afix cases with a good F1-score of 74%.', 'ta': 'நாம் ஜெர்மன் ஒப்புக்கோடுகளை படிக்கிறோம், துண்டுகள் மற்றும் இலவச தடங்களுக்கிடையில் ஒரு வகையான மாற்று  பல பண்புகள் அவர்களுடன் தொடர்பு கொண்டிருக்கின்றன - வளர்ச்சியை அதிகரித்துள்ளது; ஒரு குதிர்ந்த பெம்மென்டிக்ஸ், அது பெரும்பாலும் மதிப்புணர்வு மற்றும்/அல்லது அதிகரிக்கும் மற்றும் உணர்வு ஆராய மேலும் ஒரு இலவச சொல்லும் கூட்டாளி இருப்பது - ஆனால் வெறுமையாக செலுத்தப்பட்டதில்லை. In experiments on a new data set that we make available, we put these key assumptions from the morphological literature to the test and show that despite the fact that affixoids generate many low-frequency formations, we can classify these as affixoid or non-affixoid instances with a best F1-score of 74%.', 'ur': 'ہم جرمانی افکسوئڈز کی تعلیم کرتے ہیں، ایک طرح مورفکس اور آزاد سٹم کے درمیان. ان کے ساتھ بہت سی خصوصی مشترک ہیں - اضافہ ہونے والی ایک مبتلا سیمانٹیک ہے، جو اغلب آزمائش اور/یا زیادہ کرتا ہے اور اس طرح احساسات تحلیل کے بارے میں اضافہ کرتا ہے، اور ایک آزاد موفورفیم کنٹرپارت کی موجودگی ہے لیکن مضبوط طور پر validated نہیں کی گئی۔ ہم نے ایک نوی ڈیٹ سٹ کے آزمائش میں یہ کلید فرضیوں کو آزمائش میں ڈال دیا اور دکھائے کہ افکسوئڈ بہت کم فرکانسی فرضیوں کو پیدا کرتا ہے، ہم ان کو افکسوئڈ یا غیر افکسوئڈ اینسٹس کے طور پر 74% کے بہترین F1-اسکور سے کلاس کر سکتے ہیں۔', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi nghiên cứu cam kết Đức, một loại morphine tương đồng giữa chất dán và thân cây tự do. Một số thuộc tính đã được liên kết với chúng tăng suất; một ngữ pháp có màu trắng, mà thường được đánh giá và/ hay tăng cường và vì vậy có liên quan đến phân tích cảm xúc; và sự tồn tại của một bản hợp tác morphine miễn phí... nhưng chưa được xác thực. Trong các thí nghiệm trên một bộ dữ liệu mới mà chúng tôi đưa ra, chúng tôi đặt những giả thiết quan trọng này từ các tác phẩm lịch sử cho đến kết quả xét nghiệm và cho thấy rằng mặc dù cam kết tạo ra nhiều cấu hình tần số thấp, chúng tôi có thể phân loại chúng như là chứng cứ đính hôn hay không cam kết với số lượng F1-ghi số vi 74.', 'uz': "Biz Olmon affixoid turlarini o'rganamiz, affeks va o'xshash holatlarning orasidagi turi morphemni o'rganamiz. Several properties have been associated with them - increased productivity;  qo'llangan semantika, bu ko'pincha qiymati va/yoki ko'paytirish va hissiyot analyzerga muhimi bo'ladi. Bu bilan biroz morphem bilan ishlatilgan bo'lishi mumkin- lekin shunday tashkilotga haqiqiqiy emas. Yangi maʼlumotlar tizimida biz imtiyozni morfologik litteratoridan o'ylab, biz bu kalitlarni sinovga qo'yishingiz mumkin va affikoid ko'plab freym formatlarini yaratishni ko'rsatdik, biz buni affikoid yoki affixoid holatlarini 74 foiz darajasi bilan bir yaxshi bir necha F1 darajaga qarab olamiz.", 'nl': 'We bestuderen Duitse affixoïden, een soort morfem tussen affixen en vrije stengels. Verschillende eigenschappen zijn met hen geassocieerd met verhoogde productiviteit; een gebleekte semantiek, die vaak evaluerend en/of intensiverend is en dus relevant is voor sentimentanalyse; en het bestaan van een vrije morfeme tegenhanger, maar niet empirisch gevalideerd. In experimenten met een nieuwe dataset die we beschikbaar stellen, testen we deze belangrijke aannames uit de morfologische literatuur en laten we zien dat ondanks het feit dat affixoïden veel laagfrequente formaties genereren, we deze kunnen classificeren als affixoïde of niet-affixoïde instanties met een beste F1-score van 74%.', 'bg': 'Изследваме немски афиксоиди, вид морфем между афиксите и свободните стъбла. Няколко свойства са свързани с тях - повишена производителност; избелена семантика, която често е оценителна и/или интензивна и следователно е от значение за анализа на сентимента; и съществуването на свободен морфемен контрагент - но не е валидиран емпирично. При експерименти с нов набор от данни, който предоставяме, ние поставяме тези ключови предположения от морфологичната литература на тест и показваме, че въпреки факта, че афиксоидите генерират много нискочестотни формации, можем да ги класифицираме като афиксоидни или неафиксоидни инстанции с най-добър резултат от 74%.', 'da': 'Vi studerer tyske affixoider, en type morfem mellem affixes og frie stængler. Flere egenskaber er blevet forbundet med dem - øget produktivitet; en bleget semantik, som ofte er evaluerende og/eller intensiverende og dermed er relevant for sentimentalanalyse og eksistensen af en fri morfem modpart - men ikke valideret empirisk. I eksperimenter med et nyt datasæt, som vi stiller til rådighed, sætter vi disse vigtige antagelser fra den morfologiske litteratur til test og viser, at trods det faktum, at affixoider genererer mange lavfrekvente formationer, kan vi klassificere disse som affixoide eller ikke-affixoide instanser med en bedste F1-score på 74%.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen deutsche Affixoide, eine Art Morphem zwischen Affixen und freien Stämmen. Mehrere Eigenschaften wurden mit ihnen in Verbindung gebracht, um die Produktivität zu erhöhen; eine gebleichte Semantik, die oft evaluativ und/oder intensivierend ist und somit für die Sentimentanalyse relevant ist; und die Existenz eines freien Morphem-Gegenstandes, aber nicht empirisch validiert. In Experimenten an einem neuen Datensatz, den wir zur Verfügung stellen, stellen wir diese wesentlichen Annahmen aus der morphologischen Literatur auf den Prüfstand und zeigen, dass wir trotz der Tatsache, dass Affixoide viele niederfrequente Formationen erzeugen, diese als affixoide oder nicht-affixoide Instanzen mit einem besten F1-Score von 74%.', 'hr': 'Mi proučavamo njemačke afiksioide, vrstu morfije između afiksa i slobodnih štapića. S njima je povezano nekoliko vlasništva - povećana produktivnost; krvarena semantika, koja je često procjenjivana i/ili intenzivna i stoga važna za analizu osjećaja; i postojanje slobodnog morfemskog kolega, ali nije potvrđeno empirički. U eksperimentima na novom sastavu podataka koje smo učinili dostupnim, stavili smo ključne pretpostavke iz morfološke književnosti na test i pokazali da, uprkos činjenici da afiksioidi stvaraju mnoge niske frekvencije, možemo klasifikirati ove kao afiksioidne ili ne afiksioidne slučajeve s najboljim F1 rezultatom od 74%.', 'ko': '우리는 독일어 접미사, 접미사와 자유 어간 사이의 어소를 연구한다.이와 관련된 몇 가지 속성은 생산력의 향상이다.담백한 의미는 일반적으로 평가적/또는 강화된 것이기 때문에 정서 분석과 관련이 있다.그리고 자유어소 대응물의 존재는 경험적으로 검증되지 않았다.우리가 제공한 새로운 데이터 집합에서의 실험에서 우리는 형태학 문헌에서 이러한 관건적인 가설을 테스트에 사용했고 부착체가 많은 저주파 구조를 생성했지만 부착체 또는 비부착체로 분류할 수 있음을 나타냈으며 F1의 최적 점수는 74% 였다.', 'sw': 'Tunafuatilia misingi ya Ujerumani, a in a ya kifo kati ya misingi na misingi huru. Utumi kadhaa umeunganishwa nao - uzalishaji unaongezeka; ambazo mara nyingi huvumbua na/au kuongezeka na hivyo umuhimu wa uchambuzi wa hisia; na kuwepo kwa wapinzani wa kifo huru –lakini haijathibitishwa kwa msimamo. Katika majaribio ya taarifa mpya tunayopatikana, tunaweka dhana hizi muhimu kutoka fasihi ya kifolojia kwenda kwenye jaribio na kuonyesha kwamba pamoja na ukweli kwamba utaratibu huo unatengeneza viwango vingi vya umeme wa chini, tunaweza kuifananisha hizi kama matukio ya affixoid au yasiyo ya affixoid kwa kiwango kikubwa cha F1 asilimia 74.', 'id': 'Kami mempelajari afixoid Jerman, jenis morfen di antara afiks dan stem bebas. Beberapa properti telah terkait dengan mereka - meningkat produktivitas; semantik yang berwarna putih, yang sering evaluasi dan/atau mengintensifikasi dan demikian relevan untuk analisis sentimen; dan keberadaan counterpart morpheme gratis -- tapi tidak dipastikan secara empiris. Dalam eksperimen pada set data baru yang kita buat tersedia, kami menempatkan asumsi kunci dari literatur morfologi ke ujian dan menunjukkan bahwa meskipun fakta bahwa afixoid menghasilkan banyak formasi frekuensi rendah, kita dapat mengklasifikasikan ini sebagai kasus afixoid atau non-afixoid dengan skor F1 terbaik 74%.', 'sq': "Ne studiojmë afixoide gjermane, një lloj morfe midis afiksioneve dhe plumbave të lira. Disa prona janë lidhur me to - rritja e produktivitetit; a bleached semantics, which is often evaluative and/or intensifying and thus of relevance to sentiment analysis;  dhe ekzistencën e një homologu të morfemës së lirë - por nuk u vlerësua empirisht. Në eksperimente në një grup të ri të dhënash që ne i bëjmë të disponueshme, ne i vëmë këto supozime kyçe nga literatura morfologjike në provë dhe tregojmë se pavarësisht nga fakti se afixoidat gjenerojnë shumë formacione të frekuencës së ulët, ne mund t'i klasifikojmë këto si raste afixoide apo jo afixoide me një rezultat F1 më të mirë prej 74%.", 'tr': 'Biz nemesçe afiksioidleri, afiks we boş süýşüň arasynda bir şekilde morpheme okaýarys. Olar bilen birnäçe häsiýetler bar - töredijilik öňünde; Karlanýan semantika, köplenç duýgym analyzasyna deň ýagdaýlaýar we/ýa şiddetlendirir we şeýle diýmek üçin duýgym analyzasyna örän wajyplaýar; Özgür bir morfüm karşılığının varlığı - fakat değerlendirilmedi. Täze bir maglumat setirinde mümkin edip biljek deneylerde, bu a çary sahypalary morfolojik edebiýatyndan test ede goýýarys we ol gyzyklanýan faktlaryň kän düşük frekans şeklinde döretmesine rağmen biz bu sahypalary afiksioid ýa-da afiksioid döredilmesi üçin 74% iň gowy bir F1 अंश bilen klasifik edip bileris.', 'fa': 'ما افیکسوید آلمانی را مطالعه می کنیم، یک نوع مورفیم بین افیکس ها و استخوان آزاد. چندتا ویژگی با آنها ارتباط دارند - فعالیت افزایش داده شده است. که اغلب ارزیابی و/یا افزایش می\u200cکند و به نتیجه به تحلیل احساسات مربوط می\u200cشود. و وجود یک همکاری مورفیم آزاد، ولی به صورت امپراطوری تایید نشده است. در آزمایش\u200cهایی روی مجموعه داده\u200cهای جدید که ما در دسترسی می\u200cدهیم، این فرضیه\u200cهای کلید را از ادبیات مورفولوژیکی به آزمایش گذاشتیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که با وجود این حقیقت که افیکسوید بسیاری از فرکانس\u200cهای کم تولید می\u200cکند، ما می\u200cتوانیم این را به عنوان instances افیکسوید یا غیر افیکسوید با بهترین نمونه\u200cای از', 'am': 'የጀርመን አፍሪካዮችን እና በአካባቢዎች እና ነፃ ድምጾች መካከል የሞርፊሜን ዓይነት እና እናስተምራለን፡፡ ብዙ ምርጫዎች ከእነርሱ ጋር ተገናኝተዋል - ትክክል ፍሬት ያበዛል፤ የተነሳ ስምናንት፣ ብዙ ጊዜም በማስተዋል እና/ወይም ማደጋጋገል እና እንደዚህም አስተያየት ማሰናከል ፍላጎት ነው፡፡ and the existence of a free morpheme counterpart - but not been validated empirically.  በአዲስ ዳታዎች ማግኘት በተፈተና ውስጥ፣ እነዚህን ቁጥሮች ከሞሮፎሎጂ litterature ወደ ፈተና እናሳያቸዋለን እናሳያቸዋለን፤ አፍሪክዮችም ብዙ ዝቅተኛ ቁጥጥር ፍሬት እንዲወስድ እንችላለን፡፡', 'af': "Ons studeer Duitse affixoids, 'n tipe morpheme tussen affixes en vry stamme. Verskeie eienskappe is geassosieer met hulle - vergroot produktiviteit; â\x80\x99n bloedgemaakte semantieke wat dikwels evalueer en/of intensifiseer is en daarom van relevansie aan sentimentanalisie; en die eksistensie van 'n vry morfême teenstelling - maar nie gevaliseer is empiriese nie. In eksperimente op 'n nuwe data stel wat ons beskikbaar maak, sit ons hierdie sleutel aanvaardes van die morfologiese literature na die toets en wys dat, behalwe die feit dat affixoids baie lae-frekwensieformasies genereer, kan ons hierdie as affixoid of non-affixoid voordelings klassifiseer met 'n beste F1-telling van 74%.", 'bn': 'We study German affixoids, a type of morpheme in between affixes and free stems.  বেশ কিছু বৈশিষ্ট্য তাদের সাথে যোগাযোগ করা হয়েছে- উৎপাদন বৃদ্ধি; ক্ষতিগ্রস্ত সেমেন্টিক্স, যা প্রায়শই মূল্যায়ন করে এবং/অথবা বৃদ্ধি করে এবং এভাবে আবেগ বিশ্লেষণের প্রয়োজন। এবং একটি মুক্ত মর্ফিম প্রতিপক্ষের অস্তিত্ব - কিন্তু সামাজ্যিক ভাবে বৈধ নয়। একটি নতুন তথ্য সেটে আমরা পাওয়া যাচ্ছি, আমরা এই গুরুত্বপূর্ণ ধারণা পরীক্ষায় রেখে দিয়েছি এবং দেখাচ্ছি যে এফিক্সোইড অনেক কম-ফ্রায়েন্স ফরম্যাশন তৈরি করেছে সত্ত্বেও আমরা এগুলোকে আফিক্সোয়াড বা অআফি', 'az': 'Biz Almanca afiksioidləri təhsil edirik, affiks və boş stems arasında bir tür morfim. Onlarla bir neçə xüsusiyyət bağlı oldu - artıqlıq təhsil etdi. çox dəyişiklik və/yaxud artırmaq və bu səbəbdən hiss analizi ilə çoxluğu ilə dəyişiklik edən bir semantik; və özgür bir morfüm karşılığının varlığı - amma empirik olaraq təsdiqlənmədi. Bizim faydalandırdığımız yeni məlumat quruluğunda təcrübələrdə bu anahtar təcrübələrini morfolojik qismətindən sınamağa qoyduq və göstərdik ki, afiksioidlərin çox düşük freqsiyyət formatlarını yaratmasına rağmen, biz onları afiksioid və ya afiksioid olaraq 74%-dən ən yaxşı F1 dərəcəsi ilə dəyişdirə bilərik.', 'cs': 'Studujeme německé afixoidy, typ morfemu mezi afixem a volnými stonky. Několik vlastností bylo spojeno s nimi se zvýšenou produktivitou; bělená sémantika, která je často hodnotící a/nebo intenzivnější a má tedy význam pro sentimentovou analýzu; a existence volného morfemového protějšku, ale nebyla ověřena empiricky. V experimentech na novém datovém souboru, který zpřístupníme, testujeme tyto klíčové předpoklady z morfologické literatury a ukazujeme, že navzdory skutečnosti, že afixoidy generují mnoho nízkofrekvenčních formací, můžeme je klasifikovat jako afixoidní nebo neafixoidní instance s nejlepším F1 skóre 74%.', 'et': 'Uurime saksa afiksoide, mis on kinnituste ja vabade varrede vahel paiknevat morfeemi. Nendega on seotud mitmeid omadusi - suurenenud tootlikkus; pleegitatud semantika, mis on sageli hindav ja/või intensiivistuv ja seega oluline sentimentaalüüsi seisukohalt; ja vaba morfeemi vastandi olemasolu - kuid seda ei ole empiiriliselt kinnitatud. Uue andmekogumiga tehtud katsetes katsetame morfoloogilise kirjanduse peamisi eeldusi ja näitame, et vaatamata asjaolule, et afiksoidid tekitavad palju madala sagedusega moodustusi, saame neid klassifitseerida afiksoidseteks või mitteafiksoidseteks juhtudeks, mille F1-skoor on 74%.', 'fi': 'Tutkimme saksalaisia affoideja, eräänlaista morfeemia affeemien ja vapaiden varsien välissä. Niihin on liitetty useita ominaisuuksia - lisääntynyt tuottavuus; valkaistu semanttiikka, joka on usein arvioiva ja/tai voimistuva ja siten merkityksellinen tunteiden analysoinnin kannalta; ja vapaan morfeemin olemassaolo - mutta sitä ei ole validoitu empiirisesti. Kokeissa, joissa käytämme uutta aineistoa, testaamme nämä morfologisen kirjallisuuden keskeiset oletukset ja osoitamme, että vaikka afiksoidit tuottavat monia matalataajuuksisia muodostelmia, voimme luokitella nämä afiksoidiksi tai ei-afiksoidiksi esiintymiksi, joilla on paras F1-pistemäärä 74%.', 'hy': "Մենք ուսումնասիրում ենք գերմանացի աֆիքսոյդները, մի տեսակ մորֆեմ կապերի և ազատ արմատների միջև: Նրանց հետ կապված են բազմաթիվ հատկանիշներ' արդյունավետության աճ, դատարկ սեմանտիկա, որը հաճախ գնահատում է և (կամ) ինտենսիվորում է և հետևաբար կարևոր է զգացմունքների վերլուծության համար: and the existence of a free morpheme counterpart - but not been validated empirically.  In experiments on a new data set that we make available, we put these key assumptions from the morphological literature to the test and show that despite the fact that affixoids generate many low-frequency formations, we can classify these as affixoid or non-affixoid instances with a best F1-score of 74%.", 'ca': "We study German affixoids, a type of morpheme in between affixes and free stems.  Algunes propietats s'han associat amb elles - una productivitat incrementada; a bleached semantics, which is often evaluative and/or intensifying and thus of relevance to sentiment analysis;  i l'existència d'una contrapartida de morpheme gratuïta - però no va ser validada empíricament. En experiments d'un nou conjunt de dades que fem disponibles, vam posar aquestes suposicions clau de la literatura morfològica a la prova i demostrar que malgrat el fet que els afixoides generin moltes formacions de baixa freqüència, podem classificar-les com a instances afixoides o no afixoides amb una millor puntuació F1 del 74%.", 'bs': 'Proučavamo njemačke afiksioide, vrstu morfije između afiksa i slobodnih stepenica. S njima je povezano nekoliko vlasništva - povećana produktivnost; krvarena semantika, koja je često procjenjivana i/ili intenzivna i stoga relevantna za analizu osjećaja; i postojanje slobodnog morfemskog kolega, ali nije potvrđeno empirički. U eksperimentima na novom setu podataka koje se bavimo dostupnim, stavili smo ključne pretpostavke iz morfološke literature na test i pokazali da, uprkos činjenici da afiksioidi stvaraju mnoge niske frekvencije formacije, možemo ih klasifikirati kao afiksioidne ili ne afiksioidne slučajeve sa najboljim F1 rezultatom od 74%.', 'sk': 'Preučujemo nemške afiksoide, vrsto morfema med pritrditvami in prostimi stebli. Z njimi je bilo povezanih več lastnosti - povečana produktivnost; beljena semantika, ki je pogosto ocenjevalna in/ali intenzivnejša in je tako pomembna za analizo čustva; in obstoj prostega morfema - vendar ni bil empirično potrjen. V poskusih na novem naboru podatkov, ki ga dajemo na voljo, smo testirali te ključne predpostavke iz morfološke literature in pokazali, da kljub dejstvu, da afiksoidi ustvarjajo številne nizkofrekvenčne formacije, jih lahko razvrstimo kot afiksoidne ali neafiksoidne primere z najboljšo oceno F1 74%.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé gadhah ikeng alam kuwi "afiksoid" lan soko "forme" merupan karo "kemper" lan "format layers-action semanti sing dibenalke, sing wis diujaraké karo/o nggawe lan ijol-ijolan ngono kuwi dianggapiane kanggo anawisan siyenge; punika Taning Nanging dolanan sing beraksi barêng-barêng nggambar gawe ngéwang kuwi, kéné iso ngewehku perusahaan seneng dolanan cara-seneng nggawe lan bukane kuwi nggawe sistem sing nyimpen karo hal kudu penting nggawe winih dhéwé', 'he': 'אנחנו לומדים אפקסואידים גרמניים, סוג של מורפם בין הקשורים לסטים חופשיים. מספר תכונות היו קשורות אליהם - יצירות גדולה; a bleached semantics, which is often evaluative and/or intensifying and thus of relevance to sentiment analysis;  והקיומו של שותף מופרף חופשי - אבל לא מאושר באמפריה. בניסויים על קבוצת נתונים חדשה שאנחנו פועלים זמינות, אנחנו שמים את ההנחות המפתחות האלה מהספרות המורפולוגית למבחן ולהראות שלמרות העובדה שאפיקסואידים יוצרים הרבה פורמטציות בתדר נמוך, אנחנו יכולים לקlassifiק אותם כמקרים אפקסואידים או לא אפקסואידים עם נקודת F1 הטובה ביותר של 74%.', 'ha': "Tuna karatun affikoid na Jamanya, wata irin morféme a tsakanin affiks da baka. An ƙara musu dũkiyõyi mãsu yawa. Sura'ura da aka raunana, wanda ake ƙaddara shi a gaba ɗaya da/ko kuma yana ƙaranci da yana da muhimmada ga analisin hisia; da kuma an sami mutane na komai ba - kuma ba a sami komai ba. Ko cikin jarrabo masu tsari da za'a samar da waɗannan mazaɓan mazaɓa daga littafan morfologi zuwa jarraba, kuma za mu nuna cewa, kuma kõ da gaskiya affikoid za'a ƙãga wasu tsaro masu ƙaranci-Frequency, za'a iya ƙayyade waɗannan kamar shirin affikoid ko kuwa ba-affikoid na da kyakkyawan F1-score na 74%.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྣམ་པ་གཉིས་ཀྱི་དབྱིབས་སྤེལ་གཉིས་ལས་དབར་གྱི་རྩིས་བ་དང་རང་དབང་དབར་གྱི་རྒྱུན་རིས་ལ་བསླབས་བྱས ཁོང་ཚོ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་ངོ་བོ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་སྐྱེས་འབྲེལ་རྒྱས་གཏོང་བ་རེད། སྤྱིར་བཏང་ཡོད་པའི་ཟུར་བ་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་ཞིབ་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། རང་དབང་གི་བསྒྱུར་རིས་ཀྱི་ཡོད་པ་ཞིག་རེད། འོན་ཀྱང་ནི་རང་དབང་རིས་བདེ་བ་ཞིག་བྱེད་མ་ཐུབ། In experiments on a new data set that we make available, we put these key assumptions from the morphological literature to the test and show that despite the fact that affixoids generate many low-frequency formations, we can classify these as affixoid or non-affixoid instances with a best F1-score of 74%.'}
{'en': 'A Survey on Open Information Extraction', 'ar': 'مسح على استخراج المعلومات المفتوحة', 'es': 'Una encuesta sobre la extracción abierta de información', 'pt': 'Uma pesquisa sobre extração de informações abertas', 'fr': "Une enquête sur l'extraction d'informations ouvertes", 'ja': 'オープン情報抽出に関する調査', 'zh': '开信提取', 'hi': 'खुली जानकारी निष्कर्षण पर एक सर्वेक्षण', 'ru': 'Обследование по вопросам извлечения открытой информации', 'ga': 'Suirbhé ar Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte', 'ka': 'გახსნა ინფორმაციის ექსტრექციის შესახებ', 'el': 'Έρευνα για την εξαγωγή ανοικτών πληροφοριών', 'hu': 'A nyílt információk kivonásáról szóló felmérés', 'it': "Un sondaggio sull'estrazione di informazioni aperte", 'kk': 'Ашық мәліметті тарқату туралы зерттеу', 'lt': 'Atviros informacijos gavimo apklausa', 'mk': 'A Survey on Open Information Extraction', 'ms': 'Survey on Open Information Extraction', 'ml': 'തുറക്കുന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്താക്കുന്നതിനെപ്പറ്റി ഒരു പരിശോധന', 'mt': 'Stħarriġ dwar l-Estrazzjoni ta’ Informazzjoni Miftuħa', 'no': 'Name', 'mn': 'Нээлтэй мэдээлэл татах талаар судалгаа', 'pl': 'Badanie dotyczące otwartego wydobycia informacji', 'ro': 'Un sondaj privind extragerea informațiilor deschise', 'sr': 'Ispitivanje otvorene informacije', 'si': 'විවෘත තොරතුරු නිර්මාණය ගැන පරීක්ෂණයක්', 'so': 'Baaritaanka soo saarista macluumaadka furan', 'sv': 'En undersökning om utvinning av öppen information', 'ur': 'کھولی معلومات اضافہ پر ایک تحقیق', 'ta': 'திறந்த தகவல் பிரித்தல் பற்றிய ஒரு பரிசோதனை', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'A Survey on Open Information Rút ra', 'bg': 'Проучване относно откритото извличане на информация', 'nl': 'Een enquête over open informatieextractie', 'hr': 'Ispitivanje otvorene informacije', 'da': 'En undersøgelse om udvinding af åben information', 'de': 'Eine Umfrage zur offenen Informationsgewinnung', 'sw': 'Tafiti la Utoa wa Habari Huru', 'tr': 'Maglumat A çmak barada bir gözlenme', 'af': 'Name', 'fa': 'یک تحقیق در مورد خروج اطلاعات باز', 'sq': 'Një sondazh mbi nxjerrjen e informacionit të hapur', 'id': 'Survey on Open Information Extraction', 'ko': '개방 정보 추출에 대해 종합적으로 서술하다.', 'am': 'የኩነቶች መረጃ ማውጣት', 'hy': 'Comment', 'az': 'A çıq Malümatı Açırması', 'cs': 'Průzkum o otevřené extrakci informací', 'bs': 'Ispitivanje otvorene informacije', 'ca': "Un estudi sobre l'extracció d'informació oberta", 'et': 'Avatud teabe väljavõtmise uuring', 'bn': 'খোলা তথ্য এক্সট্র্যাকশন সম্পর্কে একটি জরিপ', 'fi': 'Avointa tiedonhankintaa koskeva kysely', 'sk': 'Raziskava o odprtem pridobivanju informacij', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'חקירה על יצירת מידע פתוח', 'bo': 'ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་འཕགས་ཀྱི་བརྗོད་སྟངས'}
{'en': 'We provide a detailed overview of the various approaches that were proposed to date to solve the task of Open Information Extraction. We present the major challenges that such systems face, show the evolution of the suggested approaches over time and depict the specific issues they address. In addition, we provide a critique of the commonly applied evaluation procedures for assessing the performance of Open IE systems and highlight some directions for future work.', 'ar': 'نحن نقدم نظرة عامة مفصلة عن الأساليب المختلفة التي تم اقتراحها حتى الآن لحل مهمة استخراج المعلومات المفتوحة. نقدم التحديات الرئيسية التي تواجهها هذه الأنظمة ، ونعرض تطور الأساليب المقترحة بمرور الوقت ونصور القضايا المحددة التي تعالجها. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، نقدم نقدًا لإجراءات التقييم المطبقة بشكل شائع لتقييم أداء أنظمة Open IE وإبراز بعض الاتجاهات للعمل في المستقبل.', 'pt': 'Fornecemos uma visão detalhada das várias abordagens que foram propostas até o momento para resolver a tarefa de extração de informações abertas. Apresentamos os principais desafios que tais sistemas enfrentam, mostramos a evolução das abordagens sugeridas ao longo do tempo e descrevemos as questões específicas que abordam. Além disso, fornecemos uma crítica dos procedimentos de avaliação comumente aplicados para avaliar o desempenho de sistemas Open IE e destacamos algumas direções para trabalhos futuros.', 'es': 'Proporcionamos una descripción detallada de los diversos enfoques que se han propuesto hasta la fecha para resolver la tarea de Extracción de Información Abierta. Presentamos los principales desafíos a los que se enfrentan estos sistemas, mostramos la evolución de los enfoques sugeridos a lo largo del tiempo y describimos los problemas específicos que abordan. Además, ofrecemos una crítica de los procedimientos de evaluación comúnmente aplicados para evaluar el rendimiento de los sistemas Open IE y destacamos algunas direcciones para el trabajo futuro.', 'fr': "Nous donnons un aperçu détaillé des différentes approches proposées à ce jour pour résoudre la tâche d'extraction d'informations ouvertes. Nous présentons les principaux défis auxquels ces systèmes sont confrontés, montrons l'évolution des approches suggérées au fil du temps et décrivons les problèmes spécifiques qu'ils abordent. En outre, nous présentons une critique des procédures d'évaluation couramment appliquées pour évaluer les performances des systèmes Open IE et soulignons certaines orientations pour les travaux futurs.", 'ja': 'オープン情報抽出の課題を解決するためにこれまで提案されたさまざまなアプローチの詳細な概要を提供します。私たちは、そのようなシステムが直面する主要な課題を提示し、時間の経過とともに提案されたアプローチの進化を示し、それらが取り組む特定の問題を描写します。さらに、オープンIEシステムのパフォーマンスを評価するために一般的に適用される評価手順を批評し、今後の作業の方向性を強調します。', 'hi': 'हम विभिन्न दृष्टिकोणों का एक विस्तृत अवलोकन प्रदान करते हैं जो ओपन इन्फॉर्मेशन एक्सट्रैक्शन के कार्य को हल करने के लिए आज तक प्रस्तावित किए गए थे। हम उन प्रमुख चुनौतियों को प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो ऐसी प्रणालियों का सामना करती हैं, समय के साथ सुझाए गए दृष्टिकोणों के विकास को दिखाती हैं और उन विशिष्ट मुद्दों को चित्रित करती हैं जिन्हें वे संबोधित करते हैं। इसके अलावा, हम ओपन आईई सिस्टम के प्रदर्शन का आकलन करने के लिए आमतौर पर लागू मूल्यांकन प्रक्रियाओं की आलोचना प्रदान करते हैं और भविष्य के काम के लिए कुछ दिशाओं को उजागर करते हैं।', 'zh': '臣等备言迄今为止为开信取任之法。 我们说了这系统的主要,展示了说法随时推移而演变,并述了他们所决定的具体。 此外Open IE统性能者,常以评程为言,而强其方面。', 'ru': 'Мы представляем подробный обзор различных подходов, которые были предложены на сегодняшний день для решения задачи извлечения открытой информации. Мы представляем основные проблемы, с которыми сталкиваются такие системы, показываем эволюцию предлагаемых подходов с течением времени и описываем конкретные проблемы, которые они решают. Кроме того, мы критикуем широко применяемые процедуры оценки для оценки производительности открытых систем ИС и выделяем некоторые направления будущей работы.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid forbhreathnú mionsonraithe ar fáil ar na cineálacha cur chuige éagsúla a moladh go dtí seo chun an tasc a bhaineann le Eastóscadh Faisnéise Oscailte a réiteach. Cuirimid i láthair na mórdhúshláin atá le sárú ag córais den sórt sin, taispeánann muid éabhlóid na gcur chuige molta le himeacht ama agus léirímid na saincheisteanna sonracha a dtugann siad aghaidh orthu. Ina theannta sin, tugaimid léirmheas ar na nósanna imeachta meastóireachta a chuirtear i bhfeidhm go coitianta chun feidhmíocht na gcóras Open IE a mheasúnú agus leagaimid béim ar roinnt treoracha le haghaidh oibre amach anseo.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ განვითავსებთ განსხვავებული მიღებების განსაზღვრება, რომლებიც ახლა გახსნა ინფორმაციის ექსტრაქციის დასაწყისთვის. ჩვენ აჩვენებთ მნიშვნელოვანი გამოცდილებები, რომლებიც ასეთი სისტემები წარმოდგენენა, ჩვენ აჩვენებთ წარმოდგენებული წარმოდგენების ეგოლუციას დროში და გამოსა დამატებით, ჩვენ გავაკეთებთ კრიტიკური პროცემების, რომელიც საერთოდ გამოყენებულია განსაზღვრება IE სისტემის გამოყენებას და განაწერებას მომავალეთ მუშაობისთვის.', 'el': 'Παρέχουμε μια λεπτομερή επισκόπηση των διαφόρων προσεγγίσεων που προτάθηκαν μέχρι σήμερα για την επίλυση του έργου της Ανοιχτής Εκχύλισης Πληροφοριών. Παρουσιάζουμε τις μεγάλες προκλήσεις που αντιμετωπίζουν τα συστήματα αυτά, παρουσιάζουμε την εξέλιξη των προτεινόμενων προσεγγίσεων με την πάροδο του χρόνου και απεικονίζουμε τα συγκεκριμένα ζητήματα που αντιμετωπίζουν. Επιπλέον, παρέχουμε κριτική στις κοινώς εφαρμοζόμενες διαδικασίες αξιολόγησης για την αξιολόγηση της απόδοσης των ανοικτών συστημάτων και επισημαίνουμε ορισμένες κατευθύνσεις για μελλοντικές εργασίες.', 'hu': 'Részletes áttekintést nyújtunk azokról a megközelítésekről, amelyeket eddig javasoltunk az Open Information Extraction feladatának megoldására. Bemutatjuk azokat a főbb kihívásokat, amelyekkel az ilyen rendszerek szembesülnek, bemutatjuk a javasolt megközelítések idővel történő fejlődését és bemutatjuk azokat a konkrét kérdéseket, amelyekkel foglalkoznak. Ezenkívül kritikát adunk a nyílt IE rendszerek teljesítményének értékelésére szolgáló általánosan alkalmazott értékelési eljárásokról, és kiemeljük a jövőbeli munka néhány irányát.', 'it': "Forniamo una panoramica dettagliata dei vari approcci proposti fino ad oggi per risolvere il compito di Open Information Extraction. Presentiamo le principali sfide che tali sistemi devono affrontare, mostriamo l'evoluzione degli approcci suggeriti nel tempo e descriviamo le questioni specifiche che affrontano. Inoltre, forniamo una critica delle procedure di valutazione comunemente applicate per valutare le prestazioni dei sistemi Open IE e evidenziamo alcune direzioni per il lavoro futuro.", 'kk': 'Ашылған мәлімет тарқатуының тапсырмасын шешу үшін қолданылған әртүрлі қасиеттер туралы егжей- тегжейі қарап көрсеткіміз. Біз бұл жүйелердің негізгі мәселелерін таңдаймыз, уақыт бойынша ұсынылған жағдайлардың эволюциясын көрсетеді және олардың өзінің адресін көрсетеді. Қосымша, біз Open IE жүйелерінің істеу жүйелерін оқу үшін көпшілік қолданылатын оқу процедурлерінің критикасын береміз және келесі жұмыс үшін кейбір бағыттарды таңдап көреміз', 'lt': 'Pateikiame išsamią įvairių iki šiol pasiūlytų metodų atviros informacijos ekstrakcijos uždaviniui išspręsti apžvalgą. Mes pristatome pagrindinius iššūkius, su kuriais susiduria tokios sistemos, parodome siūlomų metodų raidą laikui bėgant ir apibūdiname konkrečius klausimus, su kuriais jos sprendžia. Be to, kritikuojame bendrai taikomas vertinimo procedūras, skirtas įvertinti atvirų IE sistemų veiksmingumą, ir pabrėžiame kai kurias būsimo darbo kryptis.', 'mt': "Aħna nagħtu ħarsa ġenerali dettaljata lejn id-diversi approċċi li ġew proposti s'issa biex jissolvew il-kompitu ta' Estrazzjoni ta' Informazzjoni Miftuħa. Aħna nippreżentaw l-isfidi ewlenin li qed jiffaċċjaw sistemi bħal dawn, nuru l-evoluzzjoni tal-approċċi ssuġġeriti maż-żmien u niddeskrivu l-kwistjonijiet speċifiċi li jindirizzaw. Barra minn hekk, a ħna nipprovdu kritika tal-proċeduri ta’ evalwazzjoni applikati b’mod komuni għall-valutazzjoni tal-prestazzjoni tas-sistemi ta’ IE Miftuħa u ninfasizzaw xi direzzjonijiet għal xogħol futur.", 'ml': 'തുറന്ന വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ ജോലി തീരുമാനിക്കാന്\u200d നിര്\u200dദേശിച്ച പല വഴികളെക്കുറിച്ചും വിശദീ ഇത്തരം സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ മുന്നില്\u200d എത്തുന്ന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട വിലാസങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു. നിര്\u200dദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട സമയ അതുകൂടാതെ, നമ്മള്\u200d പ്രയോഗിച്ച സാധാരണ വിലാസപ്രക്രിയകളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രശ്നമുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു. തുറന്ന IE സിസ്റ്റമുകളുടെ', 'mn': 'Бид өнөөдөр нээлттэй мэдээллийн хайлтын ажлыг шийдэх боломжтой олон арга замыг нарийвчлан харуулж байна. Бид ийм системийн тулгарч байгаа гол сорилтуудыг харуулж, хугацаанд санал өгсөн ойлголтын хөгжлийг харуулж, тэдний тулгарсан тодорхой асуудлуудыг харуулж байна. Мөн бид нээлттэй IE системийн үйлдвэрлэлийг үнэлэх болон ирээдүйн ажлын зарим зүйлсийг тодорхойлох олон нийтийн хэрэглэгдсэн үнэлгээний процедурын шаардлагатай.', 'no': 'Vi gjev ei detaljert oversikt over dei ulike tilnærmingane som vart foreslått til dag for å løysa oppgåva av opna informasjon- ekstrahering. Vi presenterer dei viktige utfordringane som slike systema står opp, viser utviklinga av dei foreslåtte tilnærmingane over tid og viser dei spesifikke problemene dei adresserer. I tillegg tilbyr vi ein kritik av dei vanleg brukte evalueringsprosedyrane for å vurdere utviklinga av Opne IE-systemet og markere nokre retningar for framtidige arbeid.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy szczegółowy przegląd różnych dotychczasowych podejść do rozwiązania zadania Open Information Extraction. Przedstawiamy najważniejsze wyzwania stojące przed takimi systemami, pokazujemy ewolucję proponowanych podejść w czasie oraz przedstawiamy konkretne zagadnienia, którymi się zajmują. Ponadto przedstawiamy krytykę powszechnie stosowanych procedur oceny wydajności systemów Open IE oraz wskazujemy kierunki przyszłych prac.', 'ro': 'Oferim o imagine de ansamblu detaliată a diverselor abordări propuse până în prezent pentru a rezolva sarcina Extracției Informațiilor Deschise. Prezentăm provocările majore cu care se confruntă astfel de sisteme, prezentăm evoluția abordărilor propuse în timp și descriem problemele specifice pe care le abordează. În plus, oferim o critică a procedurilor de evaluare aplicate în mod obișnuit pentru evaluarea performanței sistemelor Open IE și evidențiem câteva direcții pentru activitatea viitoare.', 'sr': 'Mi pružamo detaljni pregled različitih pristupa koji su predloženi do sada da riješimo zadatak izvlačenja otvorene informacije. Predstavljamo velike izazove sa kojima se takvi sistemi suočavaju, pokazujemo evoluciju predloženih pristupa tokom vremena i pokazujemo specifične probleme koje se bave. Osim toga, pružamo kritiku često primjenjenih procedura procjene za procjenu provedbe sustava otvorenih IE-a i naglašavamo neke upute za budući rad.', 'si': 'අපි විස්තර ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් දෙන්නේ විවිධ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙන්නේ විවිධ ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් තියෙන්නේ විවිධ විසි අපි ඒ වගේ පද්ධතිය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න, වෙලාවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් පෙන්වන්න, ඔවුන් ප ඒ වගේම, අපි සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරපු විශ්වාස පද්ධතිය අවශ්\u200dය කරන්න සඳහා සාමාන්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරපු පද්ධතිය සඳහා විශ්ව', 'so': 'Waxaannu soo dirnaa warqado faa’iido ah oo lagu talo galay inay xalliyaan shaqada soo saarista macluumaadka furan. Waxaannu keenaynaa dhibaatooyin muhiimka ah oo ay soo jeedaan nidaamkan, waxaannu tusnaynaa bedelka soo jeedinta la soo jeeday waqtiga badan, waxaana muujinaynaa dhibaatooyin gaar ah oo ay ka sheekaystaan. Intaas waxaa dheer oo aan qalabka qiimeynta ee caadiga ah ee lagu sameeyo qiimeynta sameynta nidaamka furan ee IE-ka iyo tusino hagitaan shaqada mustaqbalka ah.', 'sv': 'Vi ger en detaljerad översikt över de olika tillvägagångssätt som hittills föreslagits för att lösa uppgiften med Open Information Extraction. Vi presenterar de stora utmaningar som sådana system står inför, visar utvecklingen av de föreslagna tillvägagångssätten över tid och skildrar de specifika frågor de tar itu med. Dessutom ger vi en kritik av de allmänt tillämpade utvärderingsförfarandena för att bedöma prestanda hos Open IE-system och belyser några riktningar för framtida arbete.', 'ta': 'திறந்த தகவல் வெளியீட்டு பணியை தீர்க்க பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட பல்வேறு முறைகளை நாம் ஒரு விவரமான மேலோடு காண்பிக்க We present the major challenges that such systems face, show the evolution of the suggested approaches over time and depict the specific issues they address.  மேலும், நாம் பொதுவான பயன்படுத்தப்பட்ட மதிப்புரைகள் செயல்களின் செயல்பாட்டை மதிப்பிட வேண்டும் மற்றும் எதிர்கால வேலைக்கு சில த', 'ur': 'ہم نے ان مختلف طریقوں کے بارے میں ایک تفصیل نظر پیش کیے ہیں جن کو تازگی کے لئے پیش کیے گئے تھے کہ کھولتا ہوا معلومات اخراج کا کام حل کرنے کے لئے۔ ہم بڑے چالوں کو دکھاتے ہیں جن کے سامنے ایسے سیستموں کے سامنے موجود ہوتے ہیں، وہاں تک پہنچنے کی پیش آئی جاتی ہیں اور وہاں مشرکین موجودات کو دکھاتے ہیں جنہیں وہ سمجھتے ہیں. اس کے علاوہ، ہم نے عموماً عموماً اپنا ارزیابی پردازگاروں کا ایک کریٹیک پیدا کیا ہے کہ ان کے عملہ کا ارزیابی کریں اور آگے کے کام کے لئے کچھ طریقے ہدایت کریں.', 'mk': 'Ние обезбедуваме детално преглед на различните пристапи кои се предложени досега за решавање на задачата на Отворена информација екстракција. Ги претставуваме главните предизвици со кои се соочуваат ваквите системи, ја покажуваме еволуцијата на предложените пристапи со текот на времето и ги опишуваме специфичните прашања кои ги решаваат. Покрај тоа, ние обезбедуваме критика за заеднички аплицираните процедури за проценка на резултатите на отворените ИЕ системи и истакнуваме некои насоки за идната работа.', 'ms': 'Kami menyediakan paparan ringkasan pelbagai pendekatan yang diusulkan hingga kini untuk menyelesaikan tugas Ekstraksi Maklumat Buka. Kami memperkenalkan cabaran utama yang sistem tersebut hadapi, menunjukkan evolusi pendekatan yang disarankan melalui masa dan menggambarkan isu-isu khusus yang mereka hadapi. Selain itu, kami menyediakan kritik prosedur penilaian yang biasa dilaksanakan untuk menilai prestasi sistem IE terbuka dan menyatakan beberapa arah untuk kerja masa depan.', 'uz': "Biz sanada ochiq maʼlumotni ajratish vazifasini olish uchun talab qilingan har xil usullarni taʼrif qilamiz. Biz shu tizimlarni ko'rib turadigan eng muhim muammolarni ko'rsatumiz, iloji vaqtdan uzoqlashni ko'rsatamiz va ular murakkab qilayotgan mahsulotlarni ko'rsatdik. Ko'pchilik, biz oddiy qo'llangan qiymatlar vazifalarini qiymatga qo'llayapmiz, ochiq IE tizim tizimini tasavvur qilishga va kelajak ishga bir nechta yoʻlni ko'rsatdik.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi cung cấp một thông tin chi tiết về các phương pháp khác nhau được đề xuất cho đến nay để giải quyết công việc khai thác thông tin. Chúng tôi đưa ra những thử thách lớn mà các hệ thống này phải đối mặt, cho thấy sự tiến hóa của các phương pháp được đề nghị qua thời gian và mô tả các vấn đề cụ thể mà họ giải quyết. Thêm vào đó, chúng tôi đưa ra phê bình các thủ tục đánh giá thường được áp dụng để đánh giá khả năng của các hệ thống Open Iễ và nhấn mạnh vài hướng cho công việc tương lai.', 'nl': 'We geven een gedetailleerd overzicht van de verschillende benaderingen die tot nu toe werden voorgesteld om de taak van Open Information Extraction op te lossen. We presenteren de grote uitdagingen waarmee dergelijke systemen worden geconfronteerd, tonen de evolutie van de voorgestelde benaderingen in de loop van de tijd en beschrijven de specifieke kwesties die ze aanpakken. Daarnaast geven we een kritiek op de veelgebruikte evaluatieprocedures voor het beoordelen van de prestaties van Open IE-systemen en belichten we enkele richtingen voor toekomstig werk.', 'da': 'Vi giver et detaljeret overblik over de forskellige tilgange, der blev foreslået til dato for at løse opgaven med Open Information Extraction. Vi præsenterer de store udfordringer, som sådanne systemer står over for, viser udviklingen i de foreslåede tilgange over tid og skildrer de specifikke spørgsmål, de behandler. Derudover giver vi en kritik af de almindeligt anvendte evalueringsprocedurer til vurdering af resultaterne af Open IE-systemer og fremhæver nogle retninger for fremtidigt arbejde.', 'bg': 'Предлагаме подробен преглед на различните подходи, които са предложени до момента за решаване на задачата за извличане на отворена информация. Представяме основните предизвикателства, пред които са изправени тези системи, показваме еволюцията на предложените подходи във времето и описваме конкретните проблеми, с които се занимават. В допълнение, ние предоставяме критика на често прилаганите процедури за оценяване на ефективността на отворените системи и подчертаваме някои насоки за бъдеща работа.', 'hr': 'Mi pružamo detaljni pregled različitih pristupa koji su do sada predloženi za rješavanje zadatka izvlačenja otvorenih informacija. Predstavljamo velike izazove s kojima se takvi sustavi suočavaju, pokazuju evoluciju predloženih pristupa tijekom vremena i pokazuju specifične pitanja koje se bave. Osim toga, pružamo kritiku često primjenjenih postupka procjene za procjenu učinkovitosti sustava otvorenih IE-a i naglašavamo neke upute za budući rad.', 'de': 'Wir geben einen detaillierten Überblick über die verschiedenen Ansätze, die bisher vorgeschlagen wurden, um die Aufgabe der Open Information Extraction zu lösen. Wir stellen die großen Herausforderungen vor, mit denen solche Systeme konfrontiert sind, zeigen die Entwicklung der vorgeschlagenen Ansätze im Laufe der Zeit auf und stellen die spezifischen Themen dar, die sie behandeln. Darüber hinaus geben wir eine Kritik an den häufig angewandten Evaluationsverfahren zur Leistungsbewertung von Open IE Systemen und zeigen einige Richtungen für zukünftige Arbeiten auf.', 'fa': 'ما یک نظر جزئیات از روش\u200cهای مختلف را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که برای حل کار اخراج اطلاعات باز است. ما چالش های بزرگی که این سیستم ها روبرو می شوند را نشان می دهیم، تکامل روبرو های پیشنهاد را در طول زمان نشان می دهیم و مشکلات خاصی را نشان می دهیم که آنها روبرو می شوند. در addition, we provide a critique of the commonly applied evaluation procedures for assessing the performance of Open IE systems and highlight some directions for future work.', 'id': 'Kami menyediakan overview rincian dari berbagai pendekatan yang diusulkan hingga saat ini untuk memecahkan tugas Ekstraksi Informasi Buka. Kami memperlihatkan tantangan utama yang dihadapkan sistem tersebut, menunjukkan evolusi pendekatan yang disarankan melalui waktu dan menggambarkan masalah spesifik yang mereka hadapi. Selain itu, kami menyediakan kritik dari prosedur evaluasi yang biasanya dilaksanakan untuk menilai prestasi sistem IE terbuka dan mempertimbangkan beberapa arah untuk kerja di masa depan.', 'ko': '우리는 지금까지 개방된 정보 추출 임무를 해결하기 위해 제기된 각종 방법을 상세하게 개술하였다.우리는 이러한 시스템이 직면한 주요 도전을 소개하고, 건의하는 방법이 시간에 따라 변화하는 것을 보여주며, 그것들이 해결하는 구체적인 문제를 묘사했다.또한 개방형 IE 시스템의 성능을 평가하는 일반적인 평가 프로그램에 대해 논평을 하고 미래 작업의 방향을 강조했다.', 'af': "Ons verskaf 'n gedetale oorskou van die verskeie toepassings wat voorgestel word tot dag om die taak van Open Informasie uitpak te los. Ons stel die grootste uitdagings wat sodanige stelsels aangesig is, wys die evolusie van die voorgestelde toegang oor tyd en vertoon die spesifieke aandag wat hulle adreseer. In addition, we provide a critique of the commonly applied evaluation procedures for assessing the performance of Open IE systems and highlight some directions for future work.", 'sw': 'Tunatoa mtazamo wa kina kuhusu mbinu mbalimbali zilizopendekezwa mpaka sasa ili kutatua juhudi la Kujitoa Habari Huru. Tunawasilisha changamoto kubwa ambazo mifumo kama hizi inakabiliwa, tunaonyesha mabadiliko ya mapendekezo yanayowakabili kwa muda mwingine na kuonyesha masuala maalum wanayoihusu. Zaidi ya hayo, tunatoa ukosoaji wa taratibu zilizotumika mara nyingi kwa ajili ya kutathmini ufanisi wa mfumo wa Uhuru wa IE na kuonyesha baadhi ya njia za kazi za baadaye.', 'sq': 'We provide a detailed overview of the various approaches that were proposed to date to solve the task of Open Information Extraction.  Ne paraqesim sfidat e mëdha me të cilat përballen sistemet e tilla, tregojmë evolucionin e qasjeve të sugjeruara gjatë kohës dhe përshkruajmë çështjet specifike që ata trajtojnë. Përveç kësaj, ne ofrojmë një kritikë të procedurave të përbashkët të vlerësimit për vlerësimin e performancës së sistemeve të hapura IE dhe theksojmë disa drejtime për punën e ardhshme.', 'tr': 'Aç Maglumaty Açmak üçin häzirki nusgasyny çözmek üçin häzirki taýýarlar barada detaylar bir bakış temin edýäris Biz şeýle sistemalaryň karşılaşan esasy kynçylyklary görkeýäris, wagtyň yzynda teklip eden gollaşyklaryň evolusiýasyny görkeýäris we olaryň çykyş meselelerini belli edip görkeýäris. Munuň üçin Aç IE sistemalarynyň janlaşdyrylygyny we gelejekde işiň üçin birnäçe yönlerini bejermek üçin edilen çykyş proselleriniň kritiklerini berýäris.', 'am': 'ከክፈት የመረጃ መረጃ ማውጣት ስራ ለመፈጸም በተዘጋጀው የልዩ ልዩ ደረጃዎች ላይ የተዘረጉትን አዋጅ እናደርጋለን፡፡ እንደነዚህ ሲስተም የሚቃወሙትን ታላላቆቹን ጥቃቄዎች እናሳየዋለን፣ የግልጹ ጉዳዮችን ለጊዜው የሚደርስበትን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ የኢሜይል ስርዓት ውጤትን ለማስተዋል እና ለኋለኛይቱ ስርዓት የሚደረገውን አንዳንድ መንገድ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'We provide a detailed overview of the various approaches that were proposed to date to solve the task of Open Information Extraction.  Մենք ներկայացնում ենք այն մեծ մարտահրավերները, որոնց հանդիպում են նման համակարգերը, ցույց ենք տալիս առաջարկված մոտեցումների էվոլյուցիան ժամանակի ընթացքում և ներկայացնում նրանց լուծվող հատուկ խնդիրները: Ավելին, մենք ծառայում ենք սովորաբար կիրառված գնահատման գործընթացների քննադատությունը, որպեսզի գնահատենք բաց ինտերնետային ինտերնետային համակարգերի արդյունավետությունը և նշենք որոշ ուղղություններ ապագա աշխատանքի համար', 'ca': "Oferem una visió detallada dels diversos enfocaments proposats fins ara per resoldre la tasca d'Extracció d'Informació oberta. Presentam els principals reptes que aquests sistemes enfronten, demostrem l'evolució dels enfocaments suggerits al llarg del temps i descrivim els problemes específics que aborden. In addition, we provide a critique of the commonly applied evaluation procedures for assessing the performance of Open IE systems and highlight some directions for future work.", 'az': 'Açıq Malümatı Açırması işini çəkmək üçün təbliğ edilən müxtəlif tərzlərin detaylı bir nəzəriyyəti təmin edirik. Biz bu sistemlərə üz verən ən ən böyük çətinlikləri göstəririk, təklif olunan yaxınlıqların dəyişikliyini zamanında göstəririk və onların çəkdikləri məsələləri göstəririk. Əvvəlcə, a çıq IE sistemlərinin performansını değerləşdirmək və gələcək işlər üçün bəzi yönəltmələri istifadə etmək üçün çoxlu uyğun değerlənmə prosedürlərinin kritiklərini təmin edirik.', 'cs': 'Poskytujeme podrobný přehled různých přístupů, které byly doposud navrženy k řešení úkolu Open Information Extraction. Prezentujeme hlavní výzvy, kterým tyto systémy čelí, ukazujeme vývoj navrhovaných přístupů v průběhu času a popisujeme konkrétní otázky, které řeší. Dále poskytujeme kritiku běžně používaných hodnotících postupů pro hodnocení výkonnosti systémů Open IE a upozorňujeme na některé směry pro budoucí práci.', 'bn': 'খোলা তথ্য বিনিময়ের কাজ সমাধানের জন্য প্রস্তাবিত বিভিন্ন উপায়ের উপর আমরা বিস্তারিত পর্যবেক্ষণ দিয়েছি। আমরা প্রধান চ্যালেঞ্জের সামনে উপস্থিত করি যে এই ধরনের সিস্টেমের মুখোমুখি হচ্ছে, তাদের প্রস্তাবিত সময়ের বেশী সময়ের বিবর্তনে এছাড়াও, আমরা সাধারণত মূল্যবোধ প্রক্রিয়ার সমালোচনা দিয়েছি উন্মুক্ত আই.ই. সিস্টেমের প্রভাব মূল্যায়নের জন্য এবং ভবিষ্যতের কিছু', 'bs': 'Mi pružamo detaljni pregled različitih pristupa koji su predloženi do sada da riješimo zadatak izvlačenja otvorene informacije. Predstavljamo velike izazove s kojima se takvi sistemi suočavaju, pokazujemo evoluciju predloženih pristupa tijekom vremena i pokazujemo specifične probleme koje se bave. Osim toga, pružamo kritiku često primjenjene procjene za procjenu učinkovitosti sustava otvorenih IE-a i naglašavamo neke upute za budući rad.', 'et': 'Anname üksikasjaliku ülevaate erinevatest lähenemisviisidest, mis on seni välja pakutud avatud informatsiooni väljavõtmise ülesande lahendamiseks. Tutvustame selliste süsteemide peamisi probleeme, näitame väljapakutud lähenemisviiside arengut aja jooksul ja kirjeldame konkreetseid probleeme, millega need tegelevad. Lisaks kritiseerime avatud IE süsteemide tulemuslikkuse hindamisel tavaliselt rakendatavaid hindamismenetlusi ning toome esile mõned suunad tulevaseks tööks.', 'fi': 'Tarjoamme yksityiskohtaisen yleiskatsauksen eri lähestymistavoista, joita tähän mennessä on ehdotettu avoimen tiedonhaun tehtävän ratkaisemiseksi. Esittelemme tällaisten järjestelmien suurimmat haasteet, näytämme ehdotettujen lähestymistapojen kehityksen ajan mittaan ja kuvaamme niihin liittyviä erityiskysymyksiä. Lisäksi kritisoimme yleisesti sovellettavia arviointimenettelyjä Open IE -järjestelmien suorituskyvyn arvioinnissa ja korostamme suuntaviivoja tulevaan työhön.', 'jv': 'Genjer Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan sing dikarepaké karo sistem sing sampeyan, iso nglanggar evolusyon karo hal-sampek kanggo nggawe barang nggawe ngubah perusahaan neng sistem sing apik tur angel. Nambah, awak dhéwé ngewehke critik saben nggawe aturan asseksi barêng nggawe sistem Open SE lan nggawe barang dhéwé kanggo nggawe barang langgar sampeyan kanggo nggawe barang langgar.', 'he': 'אנחנו מספקים מבט מפורט של הגישויים השונים שהצעו עד היום כדי לפתור את המשימה של מחלץ מידע פתוח. אנו מציגים את האתגרים הגדולים שמערכות כאלה מתמודדות איתם, מראים את האבולוציה של הגישויים המוצעים במהלך הזמן, ומציירים את הנושאים המסופרים שהם מתמודדים איתם. בנוסף, אנו מספקים קריטיקה של תהליכי הערכה הנוכחים באופן רגיל עבור הערכה של מערכות IE פתוחות ומדגישים כמה כיוונים לעבודה עתידית.', 'sk': 'Zagotavljamo podroben pregled različnih pristopov, ki so bili predlagani do danes za reševanje naloge odprtega pridobivanja informacij. Predstavljamo glavne izzive, s katerimi se takšni sistemi soočajo, prikazujemo razvoj predlaganih pristopov skozi čas in prikazujemo posebna vprašanja, ki jih obravnavajo. Poleg tega predstavljamo kritiko splošno uporabljenih ocenjevalnih postopkov za ocenjevanje uspešnosti odprtih sistemov IE in poudarjamo nekatere smeri za prihodnje delo.', 'ha': "Mu buga wani misãlai na bayyane wa masu hanyõyin da aka buƙata a yanzu dõmin a raba aikin Cikakken Bayani da Agaji. Muna halatar da gamuwa masu ƙaranci da za'a haɗa wannan na'ura, za'a nũna juurin muhimmanci da aka buƙata a lokacin, kuma Mu nuna masu ƙayyadadde masu husũma da su. In a ƙaranci, Munã samar da wata crisis na da daidaita masu amfani da matsayin evaluation da ake amfani da wajen muhimmanci na aikin IU na buɗe, kuma Muke nuna wasu shiryarwa ga aikin nan gaba ɗaya.", 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་དུས་ཚོད་ལྟ་བུའི་གནད་དོན་ཕྱིར་གཏོང་བཤེར་གྱི་བྱ་འགུལ་གསལ་བཤད་ཞིག་བྱིན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རིག་ལ་མ་ལག་གདོང་ལེན་པ་གནད་དོན་དག་གི་དཀའ་གདོང་ལེན་མང་པོ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འོན་ཀྱང་། ང་ཚོས་ཁྱེར་པས་(Open IE)མ་ལག་གི་སྒྲུབ་རིམ་ལ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་ཀྱི་ལས་རྟགས་ལྡན་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པ་དང་མ་འོངས'}
{'en': 'Design Challenges and Misconceptions in Neural Sequence Labeling', 'ar': 'تحديات التصميم والمفاهيم الخاطئة في وضع العلامات على التسلسل العصبي', 'es': 'Desafíos de diseño y conceptos erróneos en el etiquetado de secuencias neur', 'pt': 'Desafios de design e equívocos na rotulagem de sequência neural', 'fr': "Défis de conception et idées fausses dans l'étiquetage des séquences neuron", 'ja': '神経配列ラベリングにおける設計上の課題と誤解', 'zh': '神经序标记挑战及误解', 'hi': 'तंत्रिका अनुक्रम लेबलिंग में डिजाइन चुनौतियां और गलत धारणाएं', 'ru': 'Проблемы проектирования и неверные представления о маркировке нейронных последовательностей', 'ga': 'Dúshláin Dearaidh agus Míthuiscintí i Lipéadú Seicheamh Néarach', 'hu': 'Tervezési kihívások és félreértések a neurális szekvencia címkézésben', 'ka': 'შეცდომები და შეცდომა კონფექციები ნეიროლური წერტილის ჩვენებაში', 'kk': 'Нейрондық реттеу жарлығындағы шақыруларды және қате ойларды құру', 'el': 'Προκλήσεις σχεδιασμού και λανθασμένες αντιλήψεις στη σήμανση νευρωνικής ακολουθίας', 'it': "Sfide di progettazione e malintesi nell'etichettatura di sequenza neurale", 'mk': 'Дизајн предизвици и лоши концепции во означувањето на нервалната секвенција', 'ms': 'Cipta cabaran dan kesalahkonsepsi dalam Label Kelajuan Neural', 'lt': 'Projekto iššūkiai ir klaidingos sąvokos, susijusios su nervų sekos ženklinimu', 'ml': 'നെയുറല്\u200d സെക്കന്റ് ലാബില്\u200dങ്ങില്\u200d ചെല്ലുകളും തെറ്റുകളും ഡിസൈന്\u200d ചെയ്യുക', 'mt': 'Sfidi tad-Disinn u Konċezzjonijiet Mhux Konċessi fit-Tikkettar tas-Sekwenza Newrali', 'pl': 'Wyzwania projektowe i błędne koncepcje w etykietowaniu sekwencji neuronowej', 'mn': 'Сэтгэл дагавар болон буруу ойлголтыг төсөөл', 'no': 'Design Challenges and Misconceptions in Neural Sequence Labeling', 'ro': 'Provocări de proiectare și concepții greșite în etichetarea secvențelor neurale', 'sr': 'dizajnirajte izazove i pogrešne koncepcije u označavanju neuroloških sekvencija', 'so': 'Design Challenges and Misconceptions in Neural Sequence Labeling', 'sv': 'Design Utmaningar och missuppfattningar i Neural Sequence Labeling', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් හා වැරදි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න', 'ta': 'நெயுரால் வரிசையில் சவால்கள் மற்றும் தவறான கருத்துக்களை வடிவமை', 'ur': 'نئورل سکوئنس لابلینگ میں چالینگ اور غلط نظریں طراحی کریں', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Thiết kế thách đấu và nhận thức sai trong nhãn hiệu bánh tâm thần', 'bg': 'Предизвикателства и погрешни схващания при етикетирането на неврални последователности', 'nl': 'Ontwerpuitdagingen en misvattingen in Neural Sequence Labeling', 'hr': 'dizajnirajte izazove i pogrešne koncepcije u označavanju neurološke sekvence', 'da': 'Design udfordringer og misforståelser i Neural Sequence Labeling', 'de': 'Designherausforderungen und Missverständnisse bei der Kennzeichnung von neuronalen Sequenzen', 'ko': '신경 서열 표기 중의 디자인 도전과 오해', 'fa': 'طراحی چالش\u200cها و تفکرات اشتباهی در برچسب\u200cبندی\u200cهای عصبی', 'id': 'Design Challenges and Misconceptions in Neural Sequence Labeling', 'sw': 'Design Changamoto na Mawazo yasiyoeleweka katika Mazungumzo ya Neural Labeling', 'af': 'Design Challenges and Misconceptions in Neural Sequence Labeling', 'sq': 'Design Challenges and Misconceptions in Neural Sequence Labeling', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'tr': 'Däşer-döwletlerinde hat we nädogry düşünjeleri tasarla', 'hy': 'Նախագծման մարտահրավերները և սխալ հասկացությունները նյարդային հաջորդականության նշաններում', 'bn': 'নিউরাল সেকেন্স ল্যাবিলিং-এ চ্যালেঞ্জ এবং ভুল ধারণা ডিজাইন করুন', 'bs': 'dizajnirajte izazove i pogrešne koncepcije u označavanju neurološke sekvence', 'az': 'N칬ral Sequence Labelind톛 칂칬z칲ml톛r v톛 Misconceptions Design', 'cs': 'Návrhové výzvy a mylné představy v označování neuronových sekvencí', 'et': 'Neuraalsete järjestuste märgistamise disaini väljakutsed ja väärarusaamad', 'ca': "Desafiaments de disseny i malconceptions en l'etiqueta de la seqüència neuronal", 'fi': 'Neurologisten sekvenssien merkintöjen suunnitteluhaasteet ja väärinkäsitykset', 'jv': 'design', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'עיצוב אתגרים ומגיעות לא נכונות בתווית רצף עצבי', 'sk': 'Oblikovalni izzivi in napačne predstave pri označevanju nevralnih zaporedj', 'bo': 'Neural Sequence Labeling ནང་དུ་དམིགས་འཛུགས་དང་བློ་གཏོང་ལ་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'We investigate the design challenges of constructing effective and efficient neural sequence labeling systems, by reproducing twelve neural sequence labeling models, which include most of the state-of-the-art structures, and conduct a systematic model comparison on three benchmarks (i.e. NER, Chunking, and POS tagging). Misconceptions and inconsistent conclusions in existing literature are examined and clarified under statistical experiments. In the comparison and analysis process, we reach several practical conclusions which can be useful to practitioners.', 'ar': 'نحن ندرس تحديات التصميم لبناء أنظمة وسم التسلسل العصبي الفعالة والفعالة ، من خلال إعادة إنتاج اثني عشر نموذجًا لوسم التسلسل العصبي ، والتي تشمل معظم الهياكل الحديثة ، وإجراء مقارنة نموذجية منهجية على ثلاثة معايير (أي NER ، التقسيم ووضع علامات نقاط البيع). يتم فحص المفاهيم الخاطئة والاستنتاجات غير المتسقة في الأدبيات الموجودة وتوضيحها في إطار التجارب الإحصائية. في عملية المقارنة والتحليل ، نتوصل إلى العديد من الاستنتاجات العملية التي يمكن أن تكون مفيدة للممارسين.', 'pt': 'Investigamos os desafios de design da construção de sistemas de rotulagem de sequências neurais eficazes e eficientes, reproduzindo doze modelos de rotulagem de sequências neurais, que incluem a maioria das estruturas de última geração, e conduzimos uma comparação sistemática de modelos em três referências (ou seja, NER, Chunking e marcação POS). Equívocos e conclusões inconsistentes na literatura existente são examinados e esclarecidos em experimentos estatísticos. No processo de comparação e análise, chegamos a várias conclusões práticas que podem ser úteis para os profissionais.', 'fr': "Nous étudions les défis de conception liés à la construction de systèmes de marquage de séquences neuronales efficaces et efficients, en reproduisant douze modèles de marquage de séquences neuronales, qui incluent la plupart des structures de pointe, et nous effectuons une comparaison systématique de modèles sur trois points de référence (c'est-à-dire NER, Chunking et POS marquage). Les idées fausses et les conclusions contradictoires de la littérature existante sont examinées et clarifiées dans le cadre d'expériences statistiques. Dans le processus de comparaison et d'analyse, nous arrivons à plusieurs conclusions pratiques qui peuvent être utiles aux praticiens.", 'es': 'Investigamos los desafíos de diseño de la construcción de sistemas de etiquetado de secuencias neuronales efectivos y eficientes, mediante la reproducción de doce modelos de etiquetado de secuencias neuronales, que incluyen la mayoría de las estructuras más modernas, y realizamos una comparación sistemática de modelos en tres puntos de referencia (es decir, NER, Chunking y POS etiquetado). Los conceptos erróneos y las conclusiones inconsistentes en la literatura existente se examinan y aclaran en experimentos estadísticos. En el proceso de comparación y análisis, llegamos a varias conclusiones prácticas que pueden ser útiles para los profesionales.', 'ja': '我々は、最先端の構造の大部分を含む１ ２のニューラル配列標識モデルを再現することによって、効果的かつ効率的なニューラル配列標識システムを構築することの設計上の課題を調査し、３つのベンチマーク（すなわち、ＮＥＲ、チャンキング、及びＰＯＳタグ付け）について体系的なモデル比較を行う。既存の文献における誤解と一貫性のない結論は、統計的実験の下で検討され、明確化される。比較および分析プロセスでは、実践者に役立ついくつかの実用的な結論に達します。', 'hi': 'हम बारह तंत्रिका अनुक्रम लेबलिंग मॉडल को पुन: उत्पन्न करके, प्रभावी और कुशल तंत्रिका अनुक्रम लेबलिंग सिस्टम के निर्माण की डिजाइन चुनौतियों की जांच करते हैं, जिसमें अधिकांश अत्याधुनिक संरचनाएं शामिल हैं, और तीन बेंचमार्क (यानी एनईआर, चंकिंग और पीओएस टैगिंग) पर एक व्यवस्थित मॉडल तुलना करते हैं। मौजूदा साहित्य में गलत धारणाओं और असंगत निष्कर्षों की जांच की जाती है और सांख्यिकीय प्रयोगों के तहत स्पष्ट किया जाता है। तुलना और विश्लेषण प्रक्रिया में, हम कई व्यावहारिक निष्कर्षों पर पहुंचते हैं जो चिकित्सकों के लिए उपयोगी हो सकते हैं।', 'zh': '又见十二神经序标记模形(多最先进之构)以究有效与高效之神经序列标记系统之计挑战,并于三准(即NER,Chunking与POS标记)较之。 计实验中检查和澄清见文之误异。 比较之间,得数从业者之实。', 'ru': 'Мы исследуем проблемы проектирования построения эффективных и действенных систем маркировки нейронных последовательностей, путем воспроизведения двенадцати моделей маркировки нейронных последовательностей, которые включают большинство современных структур, и проводим систематическое сравнение моделей по трем критериям (т.е. NER, Chunking и POS-метки). Ошибочные представления и противоречивые выводы в существующей литературе изучаются и уточняются в рамках статистических экспериментов. В процессе сравнения и анализа мы пришли к нескольким практическим выводам, которые могут быть полезны для практиков.', 'ga': "Déanaimid imscrúdú ar na dúshláin dearaidh a bhaineann le córais lipéadaithe seicheamh néaraigh éifeachtacha agus éifeachtacha a thógáil, trí dhá mhúnla déag lipéadaithe seicheamh néaraigh a atáirgeadh, lena n-áirítear an chuid is mó de na struchtúir úrscothacha, agus déanaimid comparáid chórasach samhail ar thrí thagarmharc (i.e. NER, Chunking, agus clibeáil POS). Déantar míthuiscintí agus conclúidí neamhréireacha sa litríocht atá ann cheana a scrúdú agus a shoiléiriú faoi thurgnaimh staidrimh. Sa phróiseas comparáide agus anailíse, déanaimid roinnt conclúidí praiticiúla a d'fhéadfadh a bheith úsáideach do chleachtóirí.", 'ka': 'ჩვენ განსხვავებთ ეფექტიური და ეფექტიური ნეიროლური წერტილების სისტემის კონფიგურაციის განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრება, 12 ნეიროლური წერტილების წერტილების მოდელი, რომელიც უფრო მეტი წერტილების სტრუქტურების განსაზღვრება და სამი წერტილების სისტემისტიურ შეცდომა კონფექციები და არსებობი დასრულებები არსებობს ლეტებერიოში გამოყენება და განახსენება სტატისტური ექსპერიმენტებში. შემდგომარება და ანალიზის პროცესში, ჩვენ მივიღეთ რამდენიმე პრაქტიკური გადაწყვეტილებები, რომლებიც პრაქტიკონტებისთვის საჭიროა.', 'hu': 'A hatékony és hatékony neurális szekvencia címkéző rendszerek kialakításának tervezési kihívásait vizsgáljuk tizenkét neurális szekvencia címkéző modell reprodukálásával, amelyek magukban foglalják a legmodernebb struktúrákat, és három referenciaértéken (NER, Chunking és POS címkézés) szisztematikus modellösszehasonlítást végezünk. Statisztikai kísérletek keretében vizsgáljuk és tisztázzuk a meglévő szakirodalom téves elképzeléseit és következetlen következtetéseit. Az összehasonlítási és elemzési folyamat során számos olyan gyakorlati következtetésre jutunk, amelyek hasznosak lehetnek a szakemberek számára.', 'kk': 'Біз эффективті және эффективті невралдық реттеу жарлықты құру жүйелерін зерттеп, 12 невралдық реттеу жарлықты жарлықты жарлықты жарлықты моделдерді қайта жасап, олардың көпшілігінің көпшілігі жалғастырып, үш белгілерден жүйелік үлгілеу үлг Статистикалық тәжірибелер бойынша дұрыс түсініктерді тексеру және анықтау. Сәйкестік және анализ процесінде біз бірнеше практикалық шешімдерге пайдалы болады.', 'lt': 'Tiriame projektavimo i ššūkius, susijusius su veiksmingų ir veiksmingų nervų sekos ženklinimo sistemų kūrimu, atkuriant dvylika nervų sekos ženklinimo modelių, kurie apima daugumą moderniausių struktūrų, ir sistemingai lyginamos trijų lyginamųjų taškų (t. y. NER, Chunking ir POS ženklinimas) modeliai. Įgyvendinant statistinius eksperimentus nagrinėjamos ir paaiškinamos klaidingos sąvokos ir nenuoseklios esamos literatūros išvados. Palyginimo ir analizės procese pasiekiame keletą praktinių išvadų, kurios gali būti naudingos specialistams.', 'el': 'Ερευνούμε τις σχεδιαστικές προκλήσεις της κατασκευής αποτελεσματικών και αποτελεσματικών συστημάτων σήμανσης νευρωνικών ακολουθιών, αναπαράγοντας δώδεκα μοντέλα σήμανσης νευρωνικών ακολουθιών, τα οποία περιλαμβάνουν τις περισσότερες από τις σύγχρονες δομές, και διεξάγουμε μια συστηματική σύγκριση μοντέλων σε τρία σημεία αναφοράς (δηλ. και σήμανση και σήμανση). Οι παρεξηγήσεις και τα ασυνεπή συμπεράσματα της υπάρχουσας βιβλιογραφίας εξετάζονται και αποσαφηνίζονται με στατιστικά πειράματα. Στη διαδικασία σύγκρισης και ανάλυσης, καταλήγουμε σε αρκετά πρακτικά συμπεράσματα που μπορούν να είναι χρήσιμα για τους επαγγελματίες.', 'it': "Investighiamo le sfide progettuali della costruzione di sistemi di etichettatura delle sequenze neurali efficaci ed efficienti, riproducendo dodici modelli di etichettatura delle sequenze neurali, che includono la maggior parte delle strutture all'avanguardia, e conduciamo un confronto sistematico dei modelli su tre parametri di riferimento (cioè NER, Chunking e POS tagging). Le idee sbagliate e le conclusioni incoerenti nella letteratura esistente sono esaminate e chiarite nell'ambito di esperimenti statistici. Nel processo di confronto e analisi, giungiamo a diverse conclusioni pratiche che possono essere utili ai professionisti.", 'ml': 'ന്യൂറല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള സാധാരണ വ്യവസ്ഥകള്\u200d നാം പരിശോധിക്കുന്നു, പന്ത്രണ്ട് ന്യൂറല്\u200d സെക്കന്റ് ലേബില്\u200d മോഡലുകള്\u200d പുനര്\u200dമ്മിപ്പിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d, അതില്\u200d മിക്കവാറും കലാകാര്\u200dട്ടില നിലവിലുള്ള സാഹിത്യത്തില്\u200d അസംശയങ്ങളും അസാധ്യതയില്ലാത്ത പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d പരിശോധിക്കപ്പെടുകയും വ്യക്തമാക്കുകയും  പരിപാടികള്\u200dക്ക് ഉപയോഗിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്ന കുറച്ച് പ്രാകൃതിക അവസ്ഥ നമ്മള്\u200d എത്തിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു.', 'mk': 'Ние ги истражуваме предизвиците за дизајн во изградбата на ефикасни и ефикасни системи за означување на нервната секвенца, со репродукција на дванаесет модели за означување на нервната секвенца, кои вклучуваат повеќето најсовремени структури, и спроведуваме систематска споредба на моделот на три референтни значки (т.е. НЕР, Чанкинг Погрешни концепции и несогласни заклучоци во постоечката литература се испитуваат и објаснуваат во рамките на статистичките експерименти. Во процесот на споредба и анализа, постигнуваме неколку практични заклучоци кои може да бидат корисни за практичарите.', 'mt': 'Aħna ninvestigaw l-isfidi tad-disinn tal-bini ta’ sistemi effettivi u effiċjenti ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenzi newrali, billi nirreproduċu tnax-il mudell ta’ tikkettar tas-sekwenzi newrali, li jinkludu l-biċċa l-kbira tal-istrutturi l-aktar avvanzati, u nagħmlu paragun sistematiku tal-mudell fuq tliet punti ta’ riferiment (jiġifieri NER, Chunking, u POS tagging). Il-kunċetti żbaljati u l-konklużjonijiet inkonsistenti fil-letteratura eżistenti huma eżaminati u ċċarati taħt esperimenti statistiċi. Fil-proċess ta’ tqabbil u analiżi, nilħqu diversi konklużjonijiet prattiċi li jistgħu jkunu utli għall-prattikanti.', 'mn': 'Бид үр дүнтэй, үр дүнтэй мэдрэлийн дарааллын маркетингийн системийг бүтээх дизайны сорилтуудыг судалж, 12 мэдрэлийн дарааллын маркетингийн загваруудын ихэнх нь урлагийн байр суурь бүтээгдэхүүнд оруулж, 3 салбарт систематик загварын харьцуулалт хийдэг. Харин одоогийн уран зохиолын буруу ойлголт болон буруу тодорхойлолтууд статистикийн туршилтаар шалгаж, тодорхойлогддог. Хэрэв харьцуулах болон шинжилгээний үйл ажиллагаанд хэрэглэх боломжтой олон практикийн шинжилгээнд хүрч чадна.', 'ms': 'Kami menyelidiki cabaran rancangan untuk membina sistem label urutan saraf yang berkesan dan berkesan, dengan mengembalikan 12 model label urutan saraf, yang termasuk kebanyakan struktur yang terbaik, dan melakukan perbandingan model sistemik pada tiga tanda referensi (iaitu NER, Chunking, dan POS tagging). Kesimpulan yang salah dan kesimpulan yang tidak konsisten dalam literatur yang ada diperiksa dan diterangkan di bawah eksperimen statistik. Dalam proses perbandingan dan analisis, kita mencapai beberapa kesimpulan praktik yang boleh berguna untuk ahli latihan.', 'no': 'Vi undersøker utfordringane for konstruksjon av effektiv og effektiv neuralsekvensmerkingssystemer ved å reprodusera tolv neuralsekvensmerkingsmodular, som inkluderer dei fleste av kunststrukturene, og gjer eit systematisk modell sammenligning på tre benchmarker (t.d. NER, Chunking og POS-merking). Feilkonseptasjonar og inkonsistente konklusjonar i eksisterande literatur vert undersøkt og klart under statistiske eksperimenter. I sammenlikningsprosessen og analysen når vi fleire praktiske konklusjonar som kan vera nyttig for praktikere.', 'pl': 'Badamy wyzwania projektowe związane z budową efektywnych i efektywnych systemów znakowania sekwencji neuronowych poprzez odtworzenie dwunastu modeli znakowania sekwencji neuronowych, które obejmują większość najnowocześniejszych struktur, oraz przeprowadzamy systematyczne porównanie modeli na trzech wskaźnikach referencyjnych (tj. NER, Chunking i POS taging). Błędne koncepcje i niespójne wnioski w istniejącej literaturze są badane i wyjaśniane w ramach eksperymentów statystycznych. W procesie porównywania i analizy dochodzimy do kilku praktycznych wniosków, które mogą być przydatne dla praktyków.', 'so': 'Waxaynu baaraynaa dhibaatooyinka dhismaha nidaamka hababka neurada e e faa’iido leh oo faa’iido leh, marka lagu soo celiyo noocyada labelinta ee neurada, taas oo ku jira noocyada ugu badnaan dhismaha farshaxanka, waxaana sameynaynaa model nidaamka ah oo isbarbardhigi kara saddex qiimo (tusaale ahaan NER, Chunking, iyo POS tagging). Shaqoyinka iyo dhamaadka aan la qiimeyn karin ee warqada heysta waxaa lagu baarayaa oo lagu caddeeyaa imtixaanka takhasuska. Isbarbardhigga iyo baaritaanka, waxaynu gaadhnaa dhamaadyo caafimaad ah oo faa’iido u leh shaqaalaha.', 'si': 'අපි පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා විද්\u200dයාපනය අවශ්\u200dයාවක් නිර්මාණය සහ හැකිරීමක් නිර්මාණය පද්ධතිය ලේබල් පද්ධතිය, නිර්මාණය පද්ධතියෙන් නිර්මාණය ලේබල් පද්ධතියෙන් ප්\u200dරවර්තනය කරන්න, ම වැරැද්ධ පරීක්ෂණය සහ නිසාමාන්\u200dය අවස්ථාවක් තියෙන්නේ සාධ්\u200dයාත්මක පරීක්ෂණය සහ පරීක්ෂණය කරනවා. සම්පූර්ණය සහ විශ්ලේෂණය ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවෙන්, අපි ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න පුළුවන්', 'ro': 'Investigăm provocările de proiectare ale construcției de sisteme eficiente și eficiente de etichetare a secvențelor neurale, prin reproducerea a douăsprezece modele de etichetare a secvențelor neurale, care includ majoritatea structurilor de ultimă generație, și efectuăm o comparație sistematică a modelelor pe trei criterii de referință (NER, Chunking și POS tagging). Conceptele greșite și concluziile inconsecvente din literatura de specialitate existentă sunt examinate și clarificate în cadrul experimentelor statistice. În procesul de comparație și analiză, ajungem la mai multe concluzii practice care pot fi utile practicienilor.', 'sr': 'Istražujemo dizajnske izazove konstrukcije efikasnih i efikasnih sistema označavanja neuralnih sekvencija, reproduktujući dvanaest model a označavanja neuralnih sekvencija, koji uključuju većinu struktura stanja umjetnosti, i provodimo sistematsku usporedbu modela na tri kriterije (tj. NER, Chunking i POS označavanje). Pogrešne koncepcije i nesporazumne zaključke u postojećoj literaturi pregledavaju se i objašnjavaju pod statističkim eksperimentima. U usporedbi i analiziranju postižemo nekoliko praktičnih zaključaka koji mogu biti korisni praktičarima.', 'sv': 'Vi undersöker designutmaningarna med att bygga effektiva och effektiva neurala sekvensmärkningssystem genom att reproducera tolv neurala sekvensmärkningsmodeller, som inkluderar de flesta av de senaste strukturerna, och genomför en systematisk modelljämförelse på tre riktmärken (dvs NER, Chunking och POS-märkning). Missuppfattningar och inkonsekventa slutsatser i befintlig litteratur undersöks och klargörs under statistiska experiment. I jämförelse- och analysprocessen kommer vi fram till flera praktiska slutsatser som kan vara användbara för praktiker.', 'ta': 'நாம் வடிவமைப்பு சவால்களை வடிவமைப்பதற்கான தேவையான முறைமைகளை உருவாக்குவதற்கான வடிவமைப்பு செயல்பாடுகளை தேர்வு செய்கிறோம், மூன்று பாங்குகளை ஒப்பிடும் மூன்று பாங்குகளை செய்கிறது. இருக்கும் எழுத்தாக்கத்தில் இருக்கும் கருத்துக்கள் மற்றும் நிலையான முடிவுகள் புள்ளிவிவரமான சோதனைகளின் கீழ In the comparison and analysis process, we reach several practical conclusions which can be useful to practitioners.', 'ur': 'ہم طراحی چالوں کی تحقیق کرتے ہیں کہ عمدہ اور عمدہ نیورل سطح لیبلینگ سیستم بنانے کے لئے، بارہ نیورل سطح لیبلینگ موڈل کو دوبارہ پیدا کریں، جن میں اکثریت آرتی ساختاروں میں شامل ہے، اور تین بینچمارک (یعنی NER, Chunking, اور POS ٹاگنگ) کے ساتھ سیستم موڈل مقایسہ کریں۔ موجود ادبیات میں غلط اندازے اور غلط نتیجے آزمائش اور تفصیل کی جاتی ہیں مقایسہ اور تحلیل پرسس میں ہم بہت سی قابل نتیجے پہنچ رہے ہیں جو تجارت کرنے والوں کے لئے فائدہ پاسکتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Biz tasavvur qilamiz, tashqi va effektiv neyrolik tarkibini ishlab chiqarish muammolarini o'rganamiz. Bu ikkita neyrol tarkibini tahrirlash modellarini qayta chiqarish mumkin. Bu holatning ko'pchiligi holatning holati tuzilishi mumkin, va uchta balbalar bilan bir tizim modelini ishlab chiqarish mumkin. Mavjud litteratordagi g'oyalar va muvaffaqiyatli murakkablar statistik imtiyozlar davomida aniqlanadi va aniqlanadi. Tasavvur qilish va taʼminlovchi jarayonlarida biz bir necha practical murakkablariga erishimiz, bu foydalanuvchilarga foydali bo'lishi mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi đi ều tra thử thách thiết kế xây dựng hệ thống phân tích dây thần kinh hiệu quả và hiệu quả, bằng cách tái tạo các mô hình thần kinh, gồm hầu hết các cấu trúc hiện đại, và tiến hành một so sánh mô hình có hệ thống có hệ thống theo ba điểm (tức là cái góc, Chunking, và kết vị trí nhét). Những nhận thức sai và những kết luận mâu thuẫn trong văn học đã có được kiểm tra và làm sáng tỏ trong các thí nghiệm thống kê. Trong quá trình so sánh và phân tích, chúng tôi đưa ra nhiều kết luận thực tế có ích cho các bác sĩ.', 'bg': 'Проучваме проектните предизвикателства при изграждането на ефективни и ефикасни системи за етикетиране на невронни последователности чрез възпроизвеждане на дванадесет модела за етикетиране на невронни последователности, които включват повечето от най-съвременните структури, и провеждаме систематично сравнение на моделите на три еталона (т.е. маркиране). В рамките на статистически експерименти се изследват и изясняват погрешните схващания и несъответствията в съществуващата литература. В процеса на сравняване и анализ стигаме до няколко практически заключения, които могат да бъдат полезни за практикуващите.', 'da': 'Vi undersøger designudfordringerne ved at konstruere effektive og effektive neurale sekvensmærkningssystemer ved at reproducere tolv neurale sekvensmærkningsmodeller, som omfatter de fleste af de state-of-the-art strukturer, og foretager en systematisk model sammenligning på tre benchmarks (dvs. NER, Chunking og POS tagging). Misforståelser og inkonsekvente konklusioner i eksisterende litteratur undersøges og afklares under statistiske forsøg. I sammenlignings- og analyseprocessen kommer vi frem til flere praktiske konklusioner, som kan være nyttige for praktikere.', 'nl': 'We onderzoeken de ontwerpuitdagingen van het bouwen van effectieve en efficiënte neurale sequentie labeling systemen, door twaalf neurale sequentie labeling modellen te reproduceren, die de meeste state-of-the-art structuren bevatten, en voeren een systematische modelvergelijking uit op drie benchmarks (NER, Chunking en POS tagging). Misvattingen en inconsistente conclusies in bestaande literatuur worden onderzocht en verduidelijkt door middel van statistische experimenten. In het vergelijkings- en analyseproces komen we tot verschillende praktische conclusies die nuttig kunnen zijn voor beoefenaars.', 'hr': 'Istražujemo izazove dizajna konstrukcije učinkovitih i učinkovitih sustava označavanja neuralne sekvence, reproduktujući 12 model a označavanja neuralne sekvence, koji uključuju većinu struktura stanja umjetnosti, i provoditi sistematsku usporedbu modela na tri značke (tj. NER, Chunking i POS označavanje). Pogrešne koncepcije i neskladne zaključke u postojećoj literaturi pregledavaju se i objašnjavaju pod statističkim eksperimentima. U usporedbi i analiziranju postigli smo nekoliko praktičnih zaključaka koji mogu biti korisni praktičarima.', 'id': 'Kami menyelidiki tantangan desain untuk membangun sistem label urutan saraf yang efektif dan efisien, dengan mereproduksi 12 model label urutan saraf, yang termasuk kebanyakan struktur state-of-the-art, dan melakukan perbandingan model sistematis pada tiga benchmark (i.e. NER, Chunking, dan POS tagging). Salah konsepsi dan kesimpulan yang tidak konsisten dalam literatur yang ada diperiksa dan dibersihkan dalam eksperimen statistik. Dalam proses perbandingan dan analisis, kami mencapai beberapa kesimpulan praktis yang dapat berguna untuk praktek.', 'de': 'Wir untersuchen die Designherausforderungen bei der Konstruktion effektiver und effizienter neuronaler Sequenzmarkierungssysteme, indem wir zwölf neuronale Sequenzmarkierungsmodelle reproduzieren, die die meisten modernen Strukturen enthalten, und führen einen systematischen Modellvergleich auf drei Benchmarks (d.h. NER, Chunking und POS Tagging) durch. Missverständnisse und inkonsistente Schlussfolgerungen in der bestehenden Literatur werden in statistischen Experimenten untersucht und geklärt. Im Vergleichs- und Analyseprozess kommen wir zu mehreren praktischen Schlussfolgerungen, die für Praktiker nützlich sein können.', 'ko': '우리는 12개의 신경 서열 표기 모델(대다수의 가장 선진적인 구조를 포함)을 복제하여 효과적이고 효율적인 신경 서열 표기 시스템을 구축하는 디자인 도전을 연구하고 세 가지 기준(즉 NER, 블록과 단어 표기)에서 체계적인 모델을 비교한다.기존 문헌 중의 오해와 일치하지 않는 결론은 통계 실험에서 검증되고 해명되었다.비교와 분석 과정에서 우리는 실용적인 결론을 얻어냈는데 이런 결론은 종업자에게 유용하다.', 'fa': 'ما به طراحی چالش\u200cهای طراحی از ساختن سیستم\u200cهای برچسب\u200cبندی نورال موثرت و موثرت، با تولید دوازده مدل برچسب\u200cبندی نورال را تحقیق می\u200cکنیم، که بیشتر ساختارهای حالت هنری شامل می\u200cشود، و یک مدل سیستمی در مقایسه با سه برچسب\u200cبندی (یعنی NER, Chunking, and POS tagging) انجام می\u200cدهیم. تفکرات اشتباهی و نتیجه\u200cهای غیرقابل توجه در ادبیات موجود تحقیق می\u200cشوند و تحقیق می\u200cشوند و توضیح می\u200cشوند. در فرایند مقایسه و تحلیل، ما به چندین نتیجه\u200cهای عملی رسیدیم که می\u200cتوانند برای تمرین\u200cکنندگان مفید باشند.', 'tr': 'Biz etkinji we etkinji neiral dizaýnlyk etiketleme sistemlerini gurnamak üçin dizaýnlyk kynçylygyny çözdirip, 12 nural dizaýnlyk etiketleme modellerini tekrarlamak bilen,olaryň i ň köp bölegi ýagdaýynda sistematik modelleri üç etiketleme bilen karşılaştyrylyp barýarys. Öň bar edebiýatynda ýalňyş düşünjeler we nädogry çözümler statistik deneylerin altynda barlanýar. Karşılaştyrylyk we çözümleme prosesinde, okuwçylar üçin faydaly bolan birnäçe praktik çözümleri ýetýäris.', 'sw': 'Tunafahamu changamoto za kutengeneza mfumo wa mifumo yenye ufanisi na yenye ufanisi wa taratibu, kwa kutengeneza mifano mifumo miwili ya michezo ya uburali kumi na mbili, ambayo inajumuisha miundombinu mingi ya hali ya sanaa, na kutengeneza mifano ya mfumo unaofanana na bendera tatu (yaani NNER, Chunking, na pigo la POS). Kudhani na hitimisho lisilo na ukweli katika fasihi iliyopo zinachunguzwa na kinafafanuliwa chini ya majaribio ya takwimu. Katika mchakato wa kulinganisha na uchambuzi, tunafikia hitimisho kadhaa za kisiasa ambazo zinaweza kuwa na manufaa kwa wataalamu.', 'af': "Ons ondersoek die ontwerp uitdagings van die konstruksie van effektief en effektief neuralsekwensiemerking stelsels deur twaalf neuralsekwensiemerking model e te reproduseer, wat die meeste van die state-of-the-kunstens strukture insluit en 'n sistematiese model vergelyking op drie benchmarke (bv. NER, Chunking, en POS merking) te doen. Verkeerde konseptasies en inkonsistente conclusions in bestaande literateit word ondersoek en uitduidelik onder statistiese eksperimente. In die vergelyking en analiseringproses, kom ons verskeie praktiese konklusies wat vir praktisers nuttig kan wees.", 'hy': 'We investigate the design challenges of constructing effective and efficient neural sequence labeling systems, by reproducing twelve neural sequence labeling models, which include most of the state-of-the-art structures, and conduct a systematic model comparison on three benchmarks (i.e. NER, Chunking, and POS tagging).  Գոյություն ունեցող գրականության սխալ հասկացությունները և անհամապատասխան եզրակացությունները ուսումնասիրում են և պարզաբանում վիճակագրական փորձարկումների ժամանակ: Համեմատության և վերլուծության ընթացքում մենք հասնում ենք մի քանի պրակտիկ եզրակացությունների, որոնք կարող են օգտակար լինել փորձագետների համար:', 'sq': 'We investigate the design challenges of constructing effective and efficient neural sequence labeling systems, by reproducing twelve neural sequence labeling models, which include most of the state-of-the-art structures, and conduct a systematic model comparison on three benchmarks (i.e. NER, Chunking, and POS tagging).  Gabimet dhe përfundimet jo konsistente në literaturën ekzistuese janë shqyrtuar dhe sqaruar në kuadrin e eksperimenteve statistike. Në procesin e krahasimit dhe analizës, arrijmë disa përfundime praktike që mund të jenë të dobishme për praktikantët.', 'az': 'Biz effektiv və effektiv nöral seçmə etiketləmə sistemlərini inşa etmək üçün dizayn çətinliklərini incidirik, 12 nöral seçmə etiketləmə modellərini yenidən inşa edərək, həmçinin sanat quruluşlarının çoxunu daxil edər və üç benchmarklərin sistematik modellərini saldırır. Müəyyən edicilərdə yanlış fikirlər və müəyyən sonuçlar statistik eksperimentlərin altında təsdiqlənir. Qarşılaşdırma və analizi sürətində, biz təhsil edənlərə faydalı olaraq çoxlu praktik sonuçlarına ulaşırıq.', 'am': 'አሥራ ሁለት የነዌብ የሥርዓት ደረጃዎችን በመቀነስ እና በብዛት የሥርዓት ግንኙነት እና ሦስት benchmarks በሚያሳየው የፖስቲካዊ ግንኙነት እና የፖስቲካዊ ግንኙነትን እና የስርዓት ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የስሕተት እና የቋንቋ ውይይት በሚኖሩት የጽሑፍ ፍጥረቶች በstatistical ፈተና ውስጥ ይፈታሉ፡፡ በተስተያየትና በማስተካከል፣ ለተማሪዎች የሚጠቅመውን ብዙዎች የውጤት ማስረጃዎችን እናደርጋለን፡፡', 'bn': 'আমরা কার্যকর এবং কার্যকর নিউরেল সিস্টেম নির্মাণের চ্যালেঞ্জ নির্মাণের চ্যালেঞ্জের তদন্ত করি ১২ নিউরেল সেকেন্ড লেবেলিং মডেল পুনরুদ্ধার করে, যার মধ্যে বেশীরভাগ রাষ্ট্র-শিল্পের কাঠামোর মধ্য বিদ্যমান সাহিত্যে বিভ্রান্ত ধারণা এবং অস্থিরতা সমাপ্তি পরীক্ষার অধীনে পরীক্ষা করা হয় এবং পরিসংখ্যান পরীক্ষার বিষয় তুলনা এবং বিশ্লেষণ প্রক্রিয়ায় আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি বাস্তবিক সমাপ্তি পৌঁছাই যা প্রশিক্ষকদের জন্য উপকার হতে পারে।', 'cs': 'Zkoumáme návrhové výzvy konstrukce efektivních a efektivních systémů značení neuronových sekvencí reprodukcí dvanácti modelů značení neuronových sekvencí, které zahrnují většinu nejmodernějších struktur, a provádíme systematické srovnání modelů na třech benchmarkech (tj. NER, Chunking a POS tagging). Pomocí statistických experimentů jsou zkoumány a objasněny chybné koncepce a nekonzistentní závěry ve stávající literatuře. V procesu srovnání a analýzy dospějeme k několika praktickým závěrům, které mohou být užitečné pro odborníky.', 'et': 'Uurime tõhusate ja efektiivsete närvijadade märgistussüsteemide loomise väljakutseid, reprodutseerides kaheteistkümne närvijadade märgistusmudeli, mis hõlmavad enamikku kaasaegseid struktuure, ning teostame süstemaatilise mudelite võrdluse kolme võrdlusnäitaja (nt NER, Chunking ja POS märgistamine). Statistiliste eksperimentide käigus uuritakse ja selgitatakse olemasolevas kirjanduses eksiarvamusi ja vastuolulisi järeldusi. Võrdluse ja analüüsi käigus jõuame mitmetele praktilistele järeldustele, mis võivad praktikutele kasulikud olla.', 'bs': 'Istražujemo dizajnske izazove konstrukcije efikasnih i efikasnih sustava označavanja neuralnih sekvencija, reprodukcijom 12 model a označavanja neuralnih sekvencija, koji uključuju većinu struktura stanja umjetnosti, i provodimo sistematsku usporedbu modela na tri značke (tj. NER, Chunking i POS označavanje). Pogrešne koncepcije i neskladne zaključke u postojećoj literaturi pregledavaju se i objašnjavaju pod statističkim eksperimentima. U usporedbi i analiziranju postignemo nekoliko praktičnih zaključaka koji mogu biti korisni praktičnicima.', 'ca': "Investiguem els reptes de disseny de la construcció de sistemes eficients i eficients d'etiquetar seqüències neuronals, reproduint doce models d'etiquetar seqüències neuronals, que inclouen la majoria de les e structures més avançades, i fem una comparació sistemàtica de models en tres punts de referència (és a dir, NER, Chunking i POS). Els errors de concepte i les inconsistents conclusions de la literatura existent es examinen i es clarifiquen en experiments estadístics. En el procés de comparació i anàlisi, arribem a diverses conclusions pràctiques que poden ser útils per als metges.", 'fi': 'Tutkimme tehokkaiden ja tehokkaiden neurosekvenssimerkint철j채rjestelmien suunnittelun haasteita toistamalla kaksitoista neurosekvenssimerkint철mallia, jotka sis채lt채v채t suurimman osan uusimmista rakenteista, ja teemme systemaattisen mallivertailun kolmella vertailuarvolla (NER, Chunking ja POS tagging). Kirjallisuudessa esiintyvi채 v채채rink채sityksi채 ja ep채johdonmukaisia johtop채채t철ksi채 tutkitaan ja selvennet채채n tilastollisissa kokeissa. Vertailu- ja analyysiprosessissa p채채dymme useisiin k채yt채nn철n johtop채채t철ksiin, joista voi olla hy철ty채 ammattilaisille.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan nggawe barang nggawe titil karo nggawe sistem sing berartil nêran sekénksi sing, dadi nyong nggawe model sing berartil teka nambarang, sing nyimpen karo hal-kebutuhan karo hal-kebutuhan. Tulung Where', 'ha': "Tuna ƙidãya masu ƙidãya masu tsarin matsayin neural da masu amfani da matsayi mai amfani da shi, a cikin dubuɗe misãlai na rubutun rubutu biyu, wanda ke ƙara mafi yawansu masu cikin-halin-kungiyar, kuma ke sami motel mai daidaita misãlai uku (misali, NER, Chunking, da tagning na PoS). An jarraba misfanikin da fassaran da ba'a daidai a cikin littafin da ke da shi, kuma an bayyana shi a cikin jarrabar statistical. Ga tsofarin da aka yi fassara, za mu isa zuwa matsayin masu halin da ke da amfani ga mataimaki.", 'he': 'אנו חוקרים את אתגרי העיצוב של בניית מערכות תווית רצף עצבי יעילות ויעילות, על ידי שיחזור 12 דוגמנים תווית רצף עצבי, שכוללים רוב המבנים המאודניים, ויערכו שידור מודל שיטתי על שלושה נקודות רמזים (כלומר NER, Chunking, POS tagging). הרעיונות הלא נכונות ומסקנות לא תואמות בספרות קיימת נבדקות ומבהרות תחת ניסויים סטטיסטיים. בתהליך ההשוואה והניתוח, הגענו למספר מסקנות מעשיות שיכולות להיות שימושיות למאמנים.', 'sk': 'Preučujemo izzive oblikovanja konstrukcije učinkovitih in učinkovitih sistemov označevanja nevronskih zaporedij s reprodukcijo dvanajstih modelov označevanja nevronskih zaporedij, ki vključujejo večino najsodobnejših struktur, in izvajamo sistematično primerjavo modelov na treh merilih (npr. označevanje NER, Chunking in POS). Napačne predstave in neskladne zaključke v obstoječi literaturi so preučene in pojasnjene s statističnimi poskusi. V procesu primerjave in analize dosežemo več praktičnih zaključkov, ki so lahko koristni za strokovnjake.', 'bo': 'We investigate the design challenges of constructing effective and efficient neural sequence labeling systems, by reproducing twelve neural sequence labeling models, which include most of the state-of-the-art structures, and conduct a systematic model comparison on three benchmarks (i.e. NER, Chunking, and POS tagging). གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཡིག་རྩལ་ནང་དུ་Misconceptions and inconsistent conclusions are examined and clarified under statistical experiments. In the comparison and analysis process, we reach several practical conclusions which can be useful to practitioners.'}
{'en': 'Neural Network Models for Paraphrase Identification, Semantic Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference, and Question Answering', 'ar': 'نماذج الشبكة العصبية لتعريف إعادة الصياغة والتشابه النصي الدلالي والاستدلال اللغوي الطبيعي والإجابة على الأسئلة', 'fr': "Modèles de réseaux neuronaux pour l'identification par paraphrase, la similitude textuelle sémantique, l'inférence du langage naturel et la réponse aux", 'es': 'Modelos de redes neuronales para la identificación de paráfrasis, la similitud textual semántica, la inferencia del lenguaje natural y la respuesta a preguntas', 'pt': 'Modelos de rede neural para identificação de paráfrases, similaridade textual semântica, inferência de linguagem natural e resposta a perguntas', 'ja': 'パラフレーズ識別、セマンティックテキストの類似性、自然言語の推論、質問の回答のためのニューラルネットワークモデル', 'hi': 'व्याख्या पहचान के लिए तंत्रिका नेटवर्क मॉडल, शब्दार्थ पाठ्य समानता, प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान, और प्रश्न उत्तर', 'ru': 'Нейросетевые модели для идентификации парафраз, семантического текстового сходства, вывода естественного языка и ответов на вопросы', 'zh': '以释义识、语义文本相似性、自然语言理问答之神经网络', 'ga': 'Samhlacha Líonra Néaracha le hAghaidh Aithrí a Aithint, Cosúlacht Téacs Shéimeantach, Tátal Teanga Nádúrtha, agus Freagairt Cheisteanna', 'ka': 'ნეიროლური ქსელის მოდელები პარაფრეზის იდენტიფიკაციისთვის, Semantic Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference, და Question Answering', 'hu': 'Neurális hálózati modellek parafrázaizonosításhoz, szemantikus szöveghasonlósághoz, természetes nyelvi inferenciához és kérdések megválaszolásához', 'el': 'Μοντέλα νευρωνικών δικτύων για τον προσδιορισμό παραφράσεων, τη σημαντική ομοιότητα κειμένων, την εξαγωγή φυσικών γλωσσών και την απάντηση ερωτήσεων', 'it': 'Modelli di rete neurale per identificazione parafrasica, somiglianza testuale semantica, inferenza del linguaggio naturale e risposta alle domande', 'mk': 'Neural Network Models for Paraphrase Identification, Semantic Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference, and Question Answering', 'lt': 'Neural Network Models for Paraphrase Identification, Semantic Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference, and Question Answering', 'ms': 'Name', 'kk': 'Парафразды идентификациялау үшін нейрондық желі үлгілері, семантикалық мәтіннің ұқсастығы, табиғлық тіл қатынасы және сұрақ жауап беру үшін', 'ml': 'പാരാഫ്രസ് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതിനുള്ള നെയുറല്\u200d ശൃംഖല മോഡലുകള്\u200d, സെമാന്റിക് ടെക്സ്റ്റൌണ്ടിക് സമമാണ്, സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്', 'pl': 'Neuronowe modele sieci identyfikacji parafraz, podobieństwa tekstowego semantycznego, wnioskowania języka naturalnego i odpowiadania na pytania', 'mt': 'Mudelli tan-Netwerk Newrali għall-Identifikazzjoni tal-Parafrażi, Similarità Tekstiva Semantika, Inferenza tal-Lingwa Naturali, u Tweġiba għall-Mistoqsijiet', 'mn': 'Paraphrase Identification, Semantic Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference, and Question Answering for Neural Network Models for Paraphrase Identification, Semantic Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference, and Question Answering', 'ro': 'Modele de rețea neurală pentru identificarea parafrazei, similaritatea textuală semantică, inferența limbajului natural și răspunsul la întrebări', 'no': 'Neuralnettverksmodeller for parafrase- identifisering, semiantisk tekstlikning, naturspråk- forskjelling og spørsmålssvar', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්න පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ, සෙමැන්ටික් පාළුවන් සමාන්\u200dයය, ස්වභාවික භාෂාව ප්\u200dරශ්නය, සහ ප්\u200dරශ්නය', 'sv': 'Neurala nätverksmodeller för parafrasidentifiering, semantisk textlikhet, naturlig språkinferens och frågesvar', 'sr': 'Neuralna mreža modela za identifikaciju parafraze, semantičnu tekstualnu sličnost, prirodnu jeziku i odgovor na pitanja', 'so': "Isticmaalka shabakadda ee asalka ah ee aqoonsiga Paraphrase, Semantic Textual Similarity, Inference Luqada asalka ah iyo jawaabta su'aalaha", 'ur': 'پارافریز شناسایی کے لئے نیورال نیٹ ورک موڈل، سیمنٹی ٹکسٹیول سیمیلیٹی، طبیعی زبان انفارنس، اور سوال جواب دینے کے لئے', 'ta': 'Paraphrase அடையாளம், Semantic Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference, and Query answers', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Chế độ mạng thần kinh cho khả năng nhận dạng thành cụm từ, Similarity, ngôn ngữ tự nhiên, và câu hỏi trả lời', 'bg': 'Модели на невронна мрежа за идентификация на парафрази, семантична текстова сходство, естествен език и отговор на въпроси', 'hr': 'Neuralna mreža modela za identifikaciju parafraze, semantičku tekstualnu sličnost, prirodnu jeziku i odgovor na pitanja', 'da': 'Neurale netværksmodeller til identifikation af parafraser, semantisk tekstuel lighed, naturlig sproginferens og spørgsmål besvarelse', 'nl': 'Neurale Netwerkmodellen voor Parafrase Identificatie, Semantische Textuele Gelijkheid, Natuurlijke Taal Inferentie en Vragen Beantwoorden', 'de': 'Neuronale Netzwerkmodelle für Paraphrasen-Identifikation, semantische Textgleichheit, natürliche Sprachfolge und Fragebeantwortung', 'ko': '해석 식별, 의미 텍스트의 유사성, 자연 언어 추리와 문답에 사용되는 신경 네트워크 모델', 'id': 'Model Jaringan Neural untuk Identifikasi Parafrasa, Semantik Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference, dan Pertanyaan Jawaban', 'fa': 'Models Network Neural for Paraphrase Identification, Semantic Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference, and Question Answering', 'sw': 'Modeli za Mtandao wa Kiasili kwa Kutambua Paraphrase, Similarity of the Semantic Text, Introduction of Natural language, and Question answers', 'tr': 'Parafraz Kimligi, Semantik Metiniň Similatýasyny, Natal Dil Inferensiýasy we Sorag Jogapy üçin Nural Network Modelleri', 'af': 'Neural Netwerk Modelle vir Parafrase Identifikasie, Semantiese Tekstuele Ligging, Natuurlike Taal Inferensie en Fraag Antwoord', 'am': 'የውይይት መረብ ሞዴል ለParaphrase Identification, Semantic Textual Similarity, Natural language Inference and Question answers', 'sq': 'Modelet e rrjetit neuronal për identifikimin e parafrazave, ngjashmërinë tekstuale Semantike, Inferencën e gjuhës natyrore dhe përgjigjen e pyetjeve', 'hy': 'Նյարդային ցանցի մոդելները պարաֆրեզի հայտնաբերման, սեմանտիկ տեքստոլային նմանության, բնական լեզվի ինֆերանսի և հարցերի պատասխանի համար', 'az': 'Parafraza Kimlik, Semantik Textual Similarity, T…ôbi…ôtli Dil Inferensi v…ô sual cavab verm…ôk ΟΦΟßΟΦn nΟΕral AΡü Modell…ôri', 'bn': 'প্যারাফ্রাজ পরিচয়, সেম্যান্টিক টেক্সটেক্সটুয়াল সমতা, প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রভাব এবং প্রশ্নের উত্তর', 'bs': 'Neuralna mreža modela za identifikaciju parafraze, semantičnu tekstualnu sličnost, prirodnu jezičku neprijateljstvo i odgovor na pitanja', 'ca': 'Models de xarxa neuronal per identificar parafrases, similitud textual Semàtica, influència en llenguatges naturals i resposta a preguntes', 'cs': 'Modely neuronových sítí pro identifikaci parafráze, sémantickou textovou podobnost, odvoz přirozeného jazyka a odpověď na otázky', 'et': 'Närvivõrgu mudelid parafraaside identifitseerimiseks, semantiliseks tekstisarnasuseks, loomuliku keele järeldusteks ja küsimustele vastamiseks', 'fi': 'Neuroverkkomallit parafraasien tunnistamiseen, semanttiseen tekstiin vastaamiseen, luonnollisen kielen päättelyyn ja kysymyksiin vastaamiseen', 'jv': 'Samsul Neral Network', 'he': 'מודלים רשת עצבית לזהות פראפרזיה, דמיון טקסטלי סמנטי, רשת שפת טבעית, ותשובה לשאלות', 'sk': 'Modeli živčnih omrežij za identifikacijo parafraz, semantično besedilno podobnost, sklepanje naravnega jezika in odgovarjanje na vprašanja', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'དཔེ་དབུས་མཐུད་དྲ་མ་དབྱིབས་གཟུགས་རིས་ངོས་འཛིན་དང་ semantic Textual Similarity, Natural Language Inference དང་ Question Answering'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we analyze several neural network designs (and their variations) for sentence pair modeling and compare their performance extensively across eight datasets, including paraphrase identification, semantic textual similarity, natural language inference, and question answering tasks. Although most of these models have claimed state-of-the-art performance, the original papers often reported on only one or two selected datasets. We provide a systematic study and show that (i) encoding contextual information by LSTM and inter-sentence interactions are critical, (ii) Tree-LSTM does not help as much as previously claimed but surprisingly improves performance on Twitter datasets, (iii) the Enhanced Sequential Inference Model is the best so far for larger datasets, while the Pairwise Word Interaction Model achieves the best performance when less data is available. We release our implementations as an open-source toolkit.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقوم بتحليل العديد من تصميمات الشبكات العصبية (وتنوعاتها) لنمذجة أزواج الجملة ومقارنة أدائها على نطاق واسع عبر ثماني مجموعات بيانات ، بما في ذلك تحديد إعادة الصياغة والتشابه النصي الدلالي واستنتاج اللغة الطبيعية ومهام الإجابة على الأسئلة. على الرغم من أن معظم هذه النماذج قد زعمت أداءً متطورًا ، إلا أن الأوراق الأصلية غالبًا ما كانت تتحدث عن واحدة أو مجموعتين من مجموعات البيانات المختارة. نحن نقدم دراسة منهجية ونبين أن (1) ترميز المعلومات السياقية بواسطة LSTM والتفاعلات بين الجمل أمر بالغ الأهمية ، (2) لا يساعد Tree-LSTM بقدر ما زُعم سابقًا ولكنه يحسن الأداء بشكل مفاجئ على مجموعات بيانات Twitter ، (3) يعد نموذج الاستدلال التسلسلي المحسّن هو الأفضل حتى الآن لمجموعات البيانات الأكبر ، بينما يحقق نموذج التفاعل بين الكلمات المزدوجة أفضل أداء عند توفر بيانات أقل. نصدر تطبيقاتنا كأداة مفتوحة المصدر.', 'es': 'En este artículo, analizamos varios diseños de redes neuronales (y sus variaciones) para el modelado de pares de oraciones y comparamos su rendimiento ampliamente en ocho conjuntos de datos, incluida la identificación de paráfrasis, la similitud textual semántica, la inferencia del lenguaje natural y las tareas de respuesta a preguntas. Aunque la mayoría de estos modelos han afirmado tener un rendimiento de vanguardia, los documentos originales a menudo informan sobre solo uno o dos conjuntos de datos seleccionados. Proporcionamos un estudio sistemático y demostramos que (i) la codificación de la información contextual mediante LSTM y las interacciones entre frases son fundamentales, (ii) Tree-LSTM no ayuda tanto como se afirmó anteriormente, pero sorprendentemente mejora el rendimiento en los conjuntos de datos de Twitter, (iii) el Modelo de Inferencia Secuencial Mejorado es el mejor mucho para conjuntos de datos más grandes, mientras que el modelo de interacción de palabras en pareja logra el mejor rendimiento cuando hay menos datos disponibles. Publicamos nuestras implementaciones como un kit de herramientas de código abierto.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, analisamos vários designs de redes neurais (e suas variações) para modelagem de pares de frases e comparamos seu desempenho extensivamente em oito conjuntos de dados, incluindo identificação de paráfrases, semelhança textual semântica, inferência de linguagem natural e tarefas de resposta a perguntas. Embora a maioria desses modelos tenha reivindicado desempenho de última geração, os artigos originais geralmente relataram apenas um ou dois conjuntos de dados selecionados. Fornecemos um estudo sistemático e mostramos que (i) codificar informações contextuais por LSTM e interações entre frases são críticas, (ii) Tree-LSTM não ajuda tanto quanto afirmado anteriormente, mas surpreendentemente melhora o desempenho em conjuntos de dados do Twitter, (iii) o O Enhanced Sequential Inference Model é o melhor até agora para conjuntos de dados maiores, enquanto o Pairwise Word Interaction Model alcança o melhor desempenho quando menos dados estão disponíveis. Lançamos nossas implementações como um kit de ferramentas de código aberto.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous analysons plusieurs modèles de réseaux neuronaux (et leurs variations) pour la modélisation de paires de phrases et nous comparons leurs performances dans huit ensembles de données, y compris l'identification de paraphrase, la similitude textuelle sémantique, l'inférence du langage naturel et les tâches de réponse aux questions. Bien que la plupart de ces modèles aient revendiqué des performances de pointe, les articles originaux ne faisaient souvent état que d'un ou deux ensembles de données sélectionnés. Nous fournissons une étude systématique et montrons que (i) l'encodage des informations contextuelles par LSTM et les interactions inter-phrases sont essentiels, (ii) Tree-LSTM n'aide pas autant que ce qui a été prétendu précédemment mais améliore étonnamment les performances sur les ensembles de données Twitter, (iii) le modèle d'inférence séquentielle amélioré est le meilleur loin pour les ensembles de données plus volumineux, tandis que le modèle d'interaction de mots par paires permet d'obtenir les meilleures performances lorsque moins de données sont disponibles. Nous publions nos implémentations sous forme de boîte à outils open source.", 'ja': 'この論文では、文のペアモデリングのためのいくつかのニューラルネットワークデザイン（およびそのバリエーション）を分析し、パラフレーズの識別、意味的なテキストの類似性、自然言語の推論、および質問応答タスクを含む8つのデータセットにわたってそれらのパフォーマンスを広範囲にわたって比較します。これらのモデルのほとんどは最先端のパフォーマンスを主張しているが、オリジナルの論文では、選択された1つまたは2つのデータセットのみについて報告されることが多い。私たちは、系統的な研究を提供し、(i) LSTMによる文脈情報のエンコードと文章間相互作用が重要であること、(ii)ツリー- LSTMは、以前に主張されたほどではないが、Twitterデータセットのパフォーマンスを驚くほど向上させること、(iii)拡張シーケンシャルインタラクションモデルは、より大きなデータセットにとって今のところ最適である一方で、ペアワイズワードインタラクションモデルは、より少ないデータが利用可能なときに最高のパフォーマンスを達成することを示しています。オープンソースのツールキットとして実装をリリースします。', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы анализируем несколько конструкций нейронных сетей (и их вариации) для моделирования пар предложений и сравниваем их производительность по восьми наборам данных, включая идентификацию перефразов, семантическое текстовое сходство, вывод естественного языка и задачи на ответы на вопросы. Хотя большинство из этих моделей заявляют о самых современных характеристиках, в первоначальных документах часто сообщалось только об одном или двух отобранных наборах данных. Мы проводим систематическое исследование и показываем, что (i) кодирование контекстной информации с помощью LSTM и взаимодействие между предложениями имеют решающее значение, (ii) Tree-LSTM не так помогает, как утверждалось ранее, но неожиданно улучшает производительность в наборах данных Twitter, (iii) расширенная модель последовательного вывода является лучшей до сих пор для больших наборов данных, в то время как модель парного взаимодействия слов достигает лучшей производительности, когда доступных данных меньше. Мы выпускаем наши реализации в виде инструментария с открытым исходным кодом.', 'zh': '于本文之中,析句建模之数神经网络(及其变体),博较其八数之集,释义识语义相似性,自然语言理问答。 虽多称最先进之性,然原始论文常告一二定之数集。 吾共一统之论,明(i)因LSTM句之交以上下文息编码至重,(ii)Tree-LSTM助不如前言,而令人讶其增Twitter数集之性,(iii)增其次推理模型迄今为止大集之最,而单词交用少成也。 吾将遂为开源工具包出。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम वाक्य जोड़ी मॉडलिंग के लिए कई तंत्रिका नेटवर्क डिजाइन (और उनकी विविधताओं) का विश्लेषण करते हैं और आठ डेटासेट में बड़े पैमाने पर उनके प्रदर्शन की तुलना करते हैं, जिसमें व्याख्यात्मक पहचान, शब्दार्थ पाठ्य समानता, प्राकृतिक भाषा अनुमान और प्रश्न उत्तर देने वाले कार्य शामिल हैं। यद्यपि इनमें से अधिकांश मॉडलों ने अत्याधुनिक प्रदर्शन का दावा किया है, मूल कागजात अक्सर केवल एक या दो चयनित डेटासेट पर रिपोर्ट किए जाते हैं। हम एक व्यवस्थित अध्ययन प्रदान करते हैं और दिखाते हैं कि (i) LSTM और इंटर-वाक्य इंटरैक्शन द्वारा प्रासंगिक जानकारी एन्कोडिंग महत्वपूर्ण हैं, (ii) ट्री-एलएसटीएम पहले दावा किए गए रूप में ज्यादा मदद नहीं करता है लेकिन आश्चर्यजनक रूप से ट्विटर डेटासेट पर प्रदर्शन में सुधार करता है, (iii) एन्हांस्ड अनुक्रमिक अनुमान मॉडल बड़े डेटासेट के लिए अब तक का सबसे अच्छा है, जबकि पेयरवाइज वर्ड इंटरैक्शन मॉडल कम डेटा उपलब्ध होने पर सबसे अच्छा प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है। हम एक ओपन-सोर्स टूलकिट के रूप में अपने कार्यान्वयन जारी करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, déanaimid anailís ar roinnt dearaí líonra néaracha (agus a n-éagsúlachtaí) le haghaidh samhaltú péire abairtí agus déanaimid comparáid idir a bhfeidhmíocht go forleathan thar ocht dtacar sonraí, lena n-áirítear sainaithint athinsint, cosúlacht théacsúil shéimeantach, tátal teanga nádúrtha, agus tascanna freagartha ceisteanna. Cé go bhfuil feidhmíocht úrscothach á éileamh ag formhór na múnlaí seo, is minic nach dtuairiscigh na páipéir bhunaidh ach ar cheann amháin nó dhá thacar sonraí roghnaithe. Cuirimid staidéar córasach ar fáil agus léirímid (i) go bhfuil sé ríthábhachtach faisnéis chomhthéacsúil a ionchódú de réir LSTM agus idirghníomhaíochtaí idir-abairtí, (ii) Ní chabhraíonn Tree-LSTM oiread agus a éilítear roimhe seo ach is ionadh é go bhfeabhsaítear feidhmíocht ar thacair sonraí Twitter, (iii) an Is í an tSamhail Tátail Sheicheamhaí Feabhsaithe an ceann is fearr go dtí seo do thacair sonraí níos mó, agus baineann Samhail Idirghníomhaíocht Focal Pairwise an fheidhmíocht is fearr amach nuair a bhíonn níos lú sonraí ar fáil. Scaoilimid ár bhfeidhmiúcháin mar fhoireann uirlisí foinse oscailte.', 'ka': 'ამ გვერდიში, ჩვენ ვიანალიზებთ რამდენიმე ნეიროლური ქსელის განაზღვრების (და მათი განაზღვრების) მოდელირებისთვის და მათი მუშაობის გამოყენებას 8 მონაცემების კონფიგურაციისთვის განაზღვრებით, როგორც პარაფრეზის მაგრამ ამ მოდელების უფრო დიდი მოდელეები აღმოჩნეთ სიცოცხლის შესახებ, ორიგინალური დოკუმენტები მხოლოდ ერთ ან ორი მონიშნული მონაცემების შესახებ ჩვენ სისტემატიური სწავლა და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ (i) კონტექსტური ინფორმაცია LSTM-ზე და კონტექსტური კონტექსტური ინფორმაციაზე კრიტიკურია, ii) ხე-LSTM არ იმუშაობს რამდენიმე მხოლოდ მხოლოდ, მაგრამ საინტერესტური დიატურის კონტექსტ მაშინ, როცა მხარეს სიტყვების ინტერქექციის მოდელი მიიღებს უკეთესი გამოსახულება, როცა უკეთესი მონაცემები ხელსახულია. ჩვენ განვითარებთ ჩვენი ინმპლექციები როგორც ახლა გამოსახულებელი ხელსაწყობილობა.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, αναλύουμε διάφορα σχέδια νευρωνικών δικτύων (και τις παραλλαγές τους) για τη μοντελοποίηση ζευγαριού προτάσεων και συγκρίνουμε εκτενώς την απόδοσή τους σε οκτώ σύνολα δεδομένων, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της αναγνώρισης παραφράσεων, της σημασιολογικής ομοιότητας κειμένου, της συμπερασμάτων φυσικής γλώσσας και των εργασιών απάντησης σε ερωτήσεις. Αν και τα περισσότερα από αυτά τα μοντέλα έχουν διεκδικήσει επιδόσεις τελευταίας τεχνολογίας, τα πρωτότυπα έγγραφα συχνά αναφέρονται σε ένα ή δύο επιλεγμένα σύνολα δεδομένων. Παρέχουμε μια συστηματική μελέτη και καταδεικνύουμε ότι (i) η κωδικοποίηση πληροφοριών περιβάλλοντος από το LSTM και οι αλληλεπιδράσεις μεταξύ των προτάσεων είναι κρίσιμες, (ii) το Tree-LSTM δεν βοηθά τόσο όσο ισχυριζόταν προηγουμένως αλλά βελτιώνει εκπληκτικά την απόδοση στα σύνολα δεδομένων, (iii) το βελτιωμένο μοντέλο διαδοχικής συμπερασμάτων είναι το καλύτερο μέχρι στιγμής για μεγαλύτερα σύνολα δεδομένων, ενώ το μοντέλο αλληλεπίδρασης λέξεων επιτυγχάνει την καλύτερη απόδοση όταν είναι διαθέσιμα λιγότερα δεδομένα. Απελευθερώνουμε τις υλοποιήσεις μας ως εργαλειοθήκη ανοιχτού κώδικα.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban több neurális hálózati tervet (és azok variációit) elemezünk a mondatpár modellezéséhez és teljesítményüket széles körben összehasonlítjuk nyolc adathalmazban, beleértve parafrázai azonosítást, szemantikai szöveghasonlóságot, természetes nyelvi következtetést és kérdésre válaszoló feladatokat. Bár ezek a modellek többsége korszerű teljesítményt igényelt, az eredeti cikkek gyakran csak egy vagy két kiválasztott adathalmazról számoltak be. Szisztematikus tanulmányt készítünk, és kimutatjuk, hogy (i) a kontextuális információk LSTM és mondatok közötti interakciók kódolása kritikus, (ii) a Tree-LSTM nem segít annyira, mint korábban állították, de meglepően javítja a Twitter adatkészletek teljesítményét, (iii) a fokozott szekvenciális fertőzési modell eddig a legjobb nagyobb adatkészletek esetében, Míg a Páros szóinterakciós modell akkor éri el a legjobb teljesítményt, ha kevesebb adat áll rendelkezésre. Megvalósításainkat nyílt forráskódú eszközkészletként adjuk ki.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente analizuojame keletą nervinių tinklų dizainų (ir jų variantų) sakinių poros modeliavimui ir išsamiai palyginame jų rezultatus aštuoniuose duomenų rinkiniuose, įskaitant parafrazės identifikavimą, semantinį tekstinį panašumą, gamtinę kalbos išvadą ir klausimų atsakymo užduotis. Nors dauguma šių modelių teigė, kad jie yra moderniausi, originaluose dokumentuose dažnai pateikiama tik vienas ar du atrinkti duomenų rinkiniai. Pateikiame sistemingą tyrimą ir parodome, kad i) kontekstinės informacijos kodavimas naudojant LSTM ir tarpsakinių sąveika yra labai svarbi, ii) medžio LSTM nepadeda tiek, kiek anksčiau buvo teigiama, bet stebinamai pagerina Twitter duomenų rinkiniuose veikiančius rezultatus, iii) iki šiol geriausias didesnių duomenų rinkinių nuoseklių nuorodų modelis, - nors poros žodžių sąveikos modelis pasiekia geriausius rezultatus, kai yra mažiau duomenų. Mes paskelbiame savo įgyvendinimus kaip atvirojo kodo priemonių rinkinį.', 'it': "In questo articolo analizziamo diversi progetti di reti neurali (e le loro variazioni) per la modellazione delle coppie di frasi e confrontiamo ampiamente le loro prestazioni in otto set di dati, tra cui l'identificazione della parafrasi, la somiglianza testuale semantica, l'inferenza del linguaggio naturale e le attività di risposta alle domande. Sebbene la maggior parte di questi modelli abbia rivendicato prestazioni all'avanguardia, i documenti originali spesso riportavano solo uno o due set di dati selezionati. Forniamo uno studio sistematico e dimostriamo che (i) la codifica delle informazioni contestuali tramite LSTM e le interazioni tra frasi sono critiche, (ii) Tree-LSTM non aiuta quanto affermato in precedenza, ma migliora sorprendentemente le prestazioni sui set di dati di Twitter, (iii) il modello di inferenza sequenziale potenziato è il migliore finora per set di dati più grandi, mentre il modello di interazione Word Pairwise raggiunge le migliori prestazioni quando sono disponibili meno dati. Rilasciamo le nostre implementazioni come toolkit open source.", 'mk': 'Во овој весник, анализираме неколку нервни мрежни дизајни (и нивни варијации) за моделирање на парови на реченици и ги споредуваме нивните резултати екстремно низ осум податоци, вклучувајќи идентификација на парафрази, семантична текстуална сличност, природна инференција на јазикот и задачи И покрај тоа што повеќето од овие модели тврдеа дека се најдобри, оригиналните весници често се јавуваат за само еден или два избрани податоци. We provide a systematic study and show that (i) encoding contextual information by LSTM and inter-sentence interactions are critical, (ii) Tree-LSTM does not help as much as previously claimed but surprisingly improves performance on Twitter datasets, (iii) the Enhanced Sequential Inference Model is the best so far for larger datasets, @ info: tooltip Ние ги ослободуваме нашите имплементации како алатки на отворен код.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menganalisis beberapa rancangan rangkaian saraf (dan variasi mereka) untuk pemodelan pasangan kalimat dan membandingkan prestasi mereka secara luas melalui lapan set data, termasuk pengenalisan parafrasa, persamaan tekstual semantik, kesimpulan bahasa biasa, dan tugas menjawab soalan. Walaupun kebanyakan model ini telah mengklaim prestasi state-of-the-art, kertas asal sering melaporkan hanya satu atau dua set data yang dipilih. Kami menyediakan kajian sistemik dan menunjukkan bahawa (i) pengekodan maklumat kontekstual oleh LSTM dan interaksi antar-kalimat adalah kritikal, (ii) Tree-LSTM tidak membantu sebanyak yang dikatakan sebelumnya tetapi mengejutkan meningkatkan prestasi pada set data Twitter, (iii) Model Rencana Sekuensional Tingkat adalah yang terbaik sejauh ini untuk set data yang lebih besar, Sementara Model Interaksi Kata Berpasangan mencapai prestasi terbaik bila data kurang tersedia. Kami melepaskan implementasi kami sebagai alat sumber terbuka.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз бірнеше неврал желінің дизайнтарын (және олардың айнымалылығыларын) сұрақтар үшін анализ және олардың әрекеттерін сегіз деректер жиындарында көптеген салыстырып, парафраз идентификациясы, семантикалық мәтіннің ұқсас,  Бұл үлгілердің көпшілігі бір не екі ғана таңдалған деректер жиынына қарай жазылады. Біз жүйелік зерттеулерді беріп, LSTM және мәліметтердің арасындағы мәліметтері (i) кодтамасыз мәліметін көрсетедік, ii) Бұтақ- LSTM алдындағы мәліметтердің көмегімен келмейді, бірақ Твиттер деректер қорларындағы әрекеттерді жақсы жасайды, (iii) Кеңейтілг Қосымша мәліметтер қол жеткізгенде, парақша сөз интерактивтік моделі ең жақсы істеу үшін жеткізеді. Ашық көзі құралдар құралы ретінде іске асырамыз.', 'mt': "F’dan id-dokument, nagħmlu analiżi ta’ diversi disinji tan-netwerks newrali (u l-varjazzjonijiet tagħhom) għall-immudellar ta’ pari ta’ sentenzi u nqabblu l-prestazzjoni tagħhom b’mod estensiv f’tmien settijiet ta’ dejta, inklużi identifikazzjoni tal-parafrażi, similarità testwali semantika, inferenza lingwistika naturali, u kompiti li jwieġbu għall-mistoqsijiet. Għalkemm ħafna minn dawn il-mudelli ddikjaraw prestazzjoni avvanzata, id-dokumenti oriġinali spiss irrappurtaw fuq sett ta’ dejta magħżul wieħed jew tnejn biss. Aħna nipprovdu studju sistematiku u nuru li (i) l-ikkodifikar tal-informazzjoni kuntestwali minn LSTM u l-interazzjonijiet bejn sentenzi huma kritiċi, (ii) Tree-LSTM ma jgħinx daqs kemm iddikjarat qabel i żda b’mod sorprendenti jtejjeb il-prestazzjoni fuq settijiet ta’ dejta Twitter, (iii) il-Mudell ta’ Inferenza Sekwenzjali mtejjeb huwa l-a ħjar sa issa għal settijiet ta’ dejta akbar, • waqt li l-Mudell ta’ Interazzjoni tal-Kliem tal-Parir jikseb l-aħjar prestazzjoni meta jkun hemm inqas dejta disponibbli. Aħna nirrilaxxaw l-implimentazzjoni tagħna bħala sett ta' għodod b'sors miftuħ.", 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэд хэдэн мэдрэлийн сүлжээний дизайнуудыг (мөн өөрчлөлтүүд) өгүүлбэр хоёр модель хийхэд, тэдний үйл ажиллагааг найм өгөгдлийн сүлжээнд маш их харьцуулж, мөн парафразын тодорхойлолт, semantic textual similarity, байгалийн хэл ха Эдгээр загваруудын ихэнх нь урлагийн үйл ажиллагааг хүлээн зөвхөн нэг эсвэл хоёр сонгогдсон өгөгдлийн санд хэлж байдаг. Бид систематикийн судалгаа өгч, LSTM болон интерфейсийн харилцаа холбоотой (i) орчин үеийн кодлогын мэдээллийг хамгийн чухал, ii) мод-LSTM нь өмнө нь хэлэхэд ч тусалдаггүй, гэхдээ гайхалтай нь Twitter өгөгдлийн сангийн үйл ажиллагааг сайжруулдаг, (iii) Хамгийн их өгөгдлийн сангийн хамгийн сайхан загвар Pairwise Word Interaction Model нь бага өгөгдлийн хэрэглэгдэхэд хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг. Бид өөрсдийгөө нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн хэрэгсэл хувилбар болгоно.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d വാക്കിന്റെ ജോടി മോഡലിങ് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനായി പല പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട നെയുറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് ഡിസൈനിങ്ങള്\u200d അന്വേഷിക്കുകയും, എട്ട് ഡാറ്റാസറ ഈ മോഡലുകളില്\u200d മിക്കവേറെ മാതൃകങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കിലും ആദ്യമായ പേപ്പറുകള്\u200d ഒരോ രണ്ടോ തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത We provide a systematic study and show that (i) encoding contextual information by LSTM and inter-sentence interactions are critical, (ii) Tree-LSTM does not help as much as previously claimed but surprisingly improves performance on Twitter datasets, (iii) the Enhanced Sequential Inference Model is the best so far for larger datasets, കുറഞ്ഞ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുമ്പോള്\u200d പൈര്\u200dവൈസ് വാക്ക് ഇന്\u200dറര്\u200dക്ഷന്\u200d മോഡല്\u200d ഏറ്റവും മികച്ച പ്രദര്\u200dശനം എത്ത ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഞങ്ങളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങളെ തുറന്നുവെക്കുന്ന ഉപകരണങ്ങളായി വിടുന്നു.', 'pl': 'W niniejszym artykule analizujemy kilka projektów sieci neuronowych (i ich wariacje) dla modelowania par zdań i szeroko porównujemy ich wydajność w ośmiu zbiorach danych, w tym identyfikację parafraz, semantyczne podobieństwo tekstowe, wnioskowanie języka naturalnego i zadania odpowiadania na pytania. Chociaż większość z tych modeli uznała najnowocześniejszą wydajność, oryginalne prace często opisywane są tylko na jednym lub dwóch wybranych zbiorach danych. Przeprowadzamy systematyczne badania i pokazujemy, że (i) kodowanie informacji kontekstowych przez LSTM i interakcje między zdaniami ma kluczowe znaczenie, (ii) Tree-LSTM nie pomaga tak bardzo, jak wcześniej twierdzono, ale zaskakująco poprawia wydajność w zbiorach danych Twittera, (iii) Enhanced Sequential Inference Model jest najlepszy jak dotąd dla większych zbiorów danych, Podczas gdy model interakcji słowa Pairwise osiąga najlepszą wydajność, gdy dostępna jest mniej danych. Wydajemy nasze implementacje jako zestaw narzędzi open source.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, analizăm mai multe proiecte de rețele neurale (și variațiile acestora) pentru modelarea perechilor de propoziții și comparăm performanțele lor extensiv în opt seturi de date, inclusiv identificarea parafrazei, similitudinea textuală semantică, inferența limbajului natural și sarcinile de răspuns la întrebări. Deși majoritatea acestor modele au pretins performanțe de ultimă generație, lucrările originale au raportat adesea doar pe unul sau două seturi de date selectate. Oferim un studiu sistematic și arată că (i) codificarea informațiilor contextuale prin LSTM și interacțiunile dintre fraze sunt critice, (ii) Tree-LSTM nu ajută atât de mult pe cât s-a afirmat anterior, dar îmbunătățește surprinzător performanța seturilor de date Twitter, (iii) Modelul de infecție secvențială îmbunătățit până acum pentru seturi de date mai mari, în timp ce modelul de interacțiune cu cuvintele pereche obține cea mai bună performanță atunci când sunt disponibile mai puține date. Lansăm implementările noastre ca un set de instrumente open-source.', 'no': 'I denne papiret analyserer vi fleire neuralnettverksdesignar (og variasjonane sine) for setningar par modellering og sammenlignar utviklinga sine utviklinga ekstra over åtte datasett, inkludert parafrase identifikasjon, semantisk tekstulikhet, naturspråk-infeksjon og spørsmål som svarar på oppgåver. Selv om dei fleste av desse modelane har påkravd at det er tilstanden av kunsten, rapporterte dei opprinnelige papirene ofte på berre én eller to valte datasett. Vi gjev eit systematisk studie og viser at i) kodingskontekstinformasjon av LSTM og intersetningar er kritisk, ii) Tre-LSTM hjelper ikkje så mykje som tidlegare foregått, men overraska forbetrar utviklinga på Twitter-datasett, (iii) Det forbetra sekvensiske inferensmedlen er den beste så langt for større datasett, Når det er mindre data tilgjengeleg, er det beste utviklinga som skal gjerast. Vi løyser implementasjonane våre som eit opna kjeldeverktøykassett.', 'so': "Qoraalkan waxaynu ku sawirannaa shabakado neurada ah (iyo kala bedelashadooda) labada nooc oo xabsi ah oo sameynaya sameyntooda si ballaadhan oo u simin karnaa siddeed databases oo dhan, kuwaas oo ah aqoonsiga fasaxa, isku mid ah qoraalka saxda ah, cudurka afka dabiicadda ah, iyo su'aalaha jawaabta. In kastoo samooyinkaas intooda badan ay codsadeen xaalad sameynta farshaxanka, warqadaha asalka ah waxey marar badan ku qoran yihiin hal ama laba sawir oo la doortay. Waxbarashada nidaamka ah ayaannu siinaynaa (i) kooban macluumaadka ku saabsan ee LSTM iyo xil-xiriirka kala duduwan waa muhiim, (ii) Tree-LSTM ma caawinayo sida uu horay u sheegay, laakiin si yaab leh ayuu u beddelaa muuqashada arimaha Twitterka, (iii) Modelka la kordhiyey xilliga Inference waa ugu wanaagsan tan ugu weyn sawirada macluumaadka, Imtixaanka macluumaadka Interaction Modelka Pairwise wuxuu gaadhaa mid ugu wanaagsan marka laga helo macluumaad ka yar. Waxqabashadayada waxaan u bixinaynaa qalabka ay furan yihiin.", 'sr': 'U ovom papiru analiziramo nekoliko dizajna neuralne mreže (i njihovih varijacija) za modeliranje par rečenica i uspoređujemo njihovu provedbu široko preko osam seta podataka, uključujući identifikaciju parafraza, semantičku tekstualnu sličnost, prirodnu jezičku infekciju i odgovore na pitanja. Iako je većina ovih modela tvrdila da su predstave umjetnosti, originalni papiri su često prijavili na samo jednu ili dve selekcije podataka. Predstavljamo sistematsku studiju i pokazujemo da su i) kontekstualne informacije kodiranja LSTM-om i interrečeničkim interrečenicama kritične, ii) Drvo-LSTM ne pomaže toliko koliko je prethodno tvrdilo, ali iznenađujuće poboljšava učinkovitost na setima podataka Twitter-a, iii) Najbolji je model povećanog sekvencijskog infekcije do sada za veće sete podataka, Dok model interakcije reèi za parenje postiže najbolji izvršak kada je dostupno manje podataka. Puštamo naše implementacije kao otvoreni izvor alata.', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ, අපි විශ්ලේෂණය කරන්නේ කිසිම න්\u200dයූරාල ජාල විද්\u200dයාපය (සහ ඔවුන්ගේ වෙනස් විද්\u200dයාපය) වර්තනය සඳහා ඔවුන්ගේ ප්\u200dරමාණය විසිද්ධ විසිද්ධ විසි හැබැයි මේ මොඩල් ගොඩක් මොඩල් එක්කෙන් තෝරාගත්ත දත්ත සේට් එක්කෙන් එක්කෙන් දෙකක් විතරයි. අපි පද්ධතිය පරීක්ෂණයක් සහ පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට, LSTM වලින් සංකේතන පද්ධතිය තොරතුරු සංකේතනයක් සංකේතනයක් සංකේතනයක් සංකේතනයක් සංකේතනයක් වලින් සංකේතනයක් ව සම්පූර්ණ වචන සම්පූර්ණ වචන සම්පූර්ණ මොඩේල් අඩුම දත්ත ලැබුනාම හොඳම වැඩසටහන් ලැබෙනවා. අපි අපේ ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරවෘත්තියක් වෙනුවෙන්.', 'ta': 'இந்த காக்கத்தில், நாம் வாக்கிய ஜோடி மாதிரியாக்கத்திற்கு பல புதிய பிணைய வடிவமைப்புகள் (மற்றும் மாறிகள்) பரிசோதிக்கிறோம் மற்றும் அவர்கள் செயல்பாடு விரிவாக எட்டு தரவுத்த Although most of these models have claimed state-of-the-art performance, the original papers often reported on only one or two selected datasets.  நாம் ஒரு திட்டமான ஆய்வு வழங்குகிறோம் மற்றும் (i) LSTM மற்றும் வாக்கிய இடைவெளி இடைவெளியீடுகள் குறியீட்டு தகவல் முக்கியமாக உள்ளது என்றும் காட்டுகிறோம். (ii) மரம்- LSTM முன்னோடு கூறிய முறைய பார்வைஸ் வார்த்தை இடைவெளி மாதிரி கிடைக்கும் போது குறைந்த தகவல் கிடைக்கும் போது சிறந்த செயல்பா நாம் எங்கள் செயல்பாடுகளை ஒரு திறந்த மூலம் கருவிப்பெட்டியாக விடுவோம்.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats analyserar vi flera neurala nätverkskonstruktioner (och deras variationer) för meningsparmodellering och jämför deras prestanda i stor utsträckning över åtta datauppsättningar, inklusive parafraseidentifiering, semantisk textlikhet, naturlig språkinferens och frågesvarsuppgifter. Även om de flesta av dessa modeller har hävdat state-of-the-art prestanda, rapporterade de ursprungliga rapporterna ofta endast om en eller två utvalda datauppsättningar. Vi tillhandahåller en systematisk studie och visar att (i) kodning av kontextuell information med LSTM och interaktioner mellan meningar är avgörande, (ii) Tree-LSTM hjälper inte så mycket som tidigare påståtts men överraskande förbättrar prestanda på Twitter datauppsättningar, (iii) Enhanced Sequential Inference Model är den bästa hittills för större datauppsättningar, medan parvis Word Interaction Model uppnår bästa prestanda när mindre data är tillgängliga. Vi släpper våra implementeringar som en verktygslåda med öppen källkod.', 'ur': 'ہم نے اس کاغذ میں چند نورول نیورل نیٹ ورک ڈیزائن (اور ان کی تغییرات) کو مجلس جوڑی موڈلینگ کے لئے تحقیق کر لیا اور ان کی عملکرد آٹھ ڈیٹ سٹ میں مزید مزید مقایسہ کر لیا ہے، شامل پارافریز شناسایی، سیمانٹی ٹیکسٹ کی مثال، طبیعی اگرچہ ان کی اکثریت مدلکوں نے ایٹیٹ کی پرورشش کی تعریف کی ہے، اصلی کاغذ اکثر صرف ایک یا دو چند ڈیٹ سٹ پر گزارے گئے ہیں. ہم ایک سیستم تحقیق دیتے ہیں اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ LSTM اور inter-sentence interactions کے ذریعہ (i) اکنوڈینگ کنٹکسٹیوال معلومات ضروری ہے، ii) Tree-LSTM اس طرح بھی مدد نہیں کرتا جس طرح پہلے پکارا گیا تھا لیکن ترویٹر ڈیٹسٹ پر اضافہ کرتا ہے، iii) اضافہ کی سکنٹیول انفورنس موڈل بڑے ڈیٹسٹ کے لئے بہترین ہے جبکہ پایرویز ورڈ انٹراکس موڈل بہترین فعالیت حاصل کرتا ہے جب کم ڈیٹا موجود ہوتا ہے۔ ہم اپنے عملومات کو کھولنے کے ساتھ وسیلکیٹ کے طور پر چھوڑ دیتے ہیں.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda biz bir necha neyrolik tarmoqning dizayni (va ularning oʻzgarishlari) nazar qilamiz va ularning natijasini 8 ta maʼlumotlar tarkibida ajratuvchi qilamiz, paraphrasning identifikasini, semantik texnologiya bir xil, tabiiy tilning infeksiyati, va javoblar javoblarida savol qilamiz. Agar bu modellarning ko'pchiligi sanam jarayonlarining holatini davom etadi, asl hujjatlar faqat bir yoki ikkita tanlangan maʼlumotlar tarkibida koʻrsatilgan. Biz bir tizimiy tizim taʼminlovchi qilamiz va (i) LSTM va maxsus interfeys interfeyslari muhim maʼlumotni kodlash mumkin, (ii) Tree-LSTM oldin davom etilgan narsa ham yordam olmaydi, balki Twitter maʼlumotlariga bajarish muvaffaqiyatli yordam beradi, (iii) Bir necha xil foydalanish modeli eng katta maʼlumot sahifalarida eng yaxshi, @ info: whatsthis Biz ishlashimizni ochiq manba asboblar sifatida chiqaramiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi phân tích vài thiết kế mạng thần kinh (và sự biến đổi của chúng) cho việc tạo mẫu án đôi và so sánh khả năng của chúng rộng rãi qua tám bộ dữ liệu, bao gồm khả năng nhận dạng trừu tượng, nét văn bản, ngụ ý ngôn tự nhiên, và việc trả lời câu hỏi. Mặc dù hầu hết các mô hình này đã được yêu cầu hiệu suất hiện đại, nhưng các giấy gốc thường được ghi lại chỉ trên một hoặc hai bộ dữ liệu đã chọn. Chúng tôi cung cấp một nghiên cứu có hệ thống và cho thấy: i) cấu hình các thông tin ngữ cảnh của LSD và các tương tác liên kết kết nhau là rất quan trọng, trong khi bạn đạt được hiệu ứng tốt nhất khi có ít dữ liệu. Chúng tôi công bố các thiết bị như nguồn mở.', 'da': 'I denne artikel analyserer vi flere neurale netværksdesigns (og deres variationer) til sætningsparmodellering og sammenligner deres ydeevne udførligt på tværs af otte datasæt, herunder parafraseidentifikation, semantisk tekstlighed, naturlig sprog inferens og spørgsmål besvarelse opgaver. Selvom de fleste af disse modeller har krævet state-of-the-art ydeevne, rapporterede de originale papirer ofte om kun et eller to udvalgte datasæt. Vi leverer en systematisk undersøgelse og viser, at (i) kodning af kontekstuelle oplysninger ved hjælp af LSTM og interaktioner mellem sætninger er kritiske, (ii) Tree-LSTM hjælper ikke så meget som tidligere hævdet, men forbedrer overraskende ydeevnen på Twitter datasæt, (iii) den forbedrede sekventielle inference model er den bedste hidtil for større datasæt, mens Pairwise Word Interaction Model opnår den bedste ydeevne, når færre data er tilgængelige. Vi frigiver vores implementeringer som et open source værktøjssæt.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel analyseren we verschillende ontwerpen van neurale netwerken (en hun variaties) voor zinsparen modellering en vergelijken we hun prestaties uitgebreid met acht datasets, waaronder parafrase identificatie, semantische tekstuele gelijkenis, natuurlijke taal inferentie en vragenbeantwoordingstaken. Hoewel de meeste van deze modellen state-of-the-art prestaties claimen, rapporteerden de originele artikelen vaak over slechts één of twee geselecteerde datasets. We bieden een systematische studie en laten zien dat (i) het coderen van contextuele informatie door LSTM en interacties tussen zinnen cruciaal zijn, (ii) Tree-LSTM niet zoveel helpt als eerder beweerd maar verrassend de prestaties op Twitter datasets verbetert, (iii) het Enhanced Sequential Inference Model is het beste tot nu toe voor grotere datasets, Terwijl het Pairwise Word Interaction Model de beste prestaties behaalt wanneer er minder gegevens beschikbaar zijn. We brengen onze implementaties uit als een open-source toolkit.', 'bg': 'В тази статия анализираме няколко дизайна на невронни мрежи (и техните вариации) за моделиране на двойки изречения и сравняваме тяхното представяне широко в осем набора от данни, включително идентификация на парафрази, семантична текстова сходство, изводи на естествен език и задачи за отговор на въпроси. Въпреки че повечето от тези модели твърдят за най-съвременни резултати, оригиналните доклади често отчитат само един или два избрани набора от данни. Ние предоставяме систематично проучване и показваме, че (i) кодирането на контекстуалната информация чрез LSTM и взаимодействията между изреченията са от решаващо значение, (ii) Tree-LSTM не помага толкова, колкото се твърди по-рано, но изненадващо подобрява ефективността на наборите от данни в Туитър, (iii) подобреният модел на последователни заключения е най-добрият досега за по-големи набори от данни, докато моделът за взаимодействие с двойки думи постига най-добра производителност, когато има по-малко данни. Ние пускаме нашите реализации като набор от инструменти с отворен код.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru analiziramo nekoliko dizajna neuralne mreže (i njihove varijacije) za modeliranje par rečenica i uspoređujemo njihovu učinku široko preko osam seta podataka, uključujući identifikaciju parafraza, semantičku tekstualnu sličnost, infekciju prirodnog jezika i odgovarajuće zadatke pitanja. Iako je većina tih modela tvrdila da su postupak umjetnosti, originalni papiri često prijavili na samo jednu ili dvije odabrane podatke. Predstavljamo sistematsko ispitivanje i pokazujemo da je (i) kontekstalna informacija o kodiranju LSTM-om i interrečeničkim interrečenicama kritična, ii) Drvo-LSTM ne pomaže toliko koliko je prethodno zahtjevano, ali iznenađujuće poboljšava učinkovitost na Twitter podacima, iii) Najbolji je model povećanog sekvencijskog infekcije do sada za veće podatke, Dok Model interakcije riječi Pairwise postigne najbolji učinkovit kad je dostupno manje podataka. Puštamo naše provedbe kao otvoreni izvorski alat.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag analysieren wir mehrere neuronale Netzentwürfe (und ihre Variationen) für die Modellierung von Satzpaaren und vergleichen ihre Leistung umfassend über acht Datensätze, einschließlich Paraphrasen-Identifikation, semantische Textähnlichkeit, natürliche Sprache Inferenz und Fragebeantwortung Aufgaben. Obwohl die meisten dieser Modelle auf dem neuesten Stand der Technik sind, berichteten die Originalpapiere oft nur über ein oder zwei ausgewählte Datensätze. Wir stellen eine systematische Studie vor und zeigen, dass (i) die Kodierung von Kontextinformationen durch LSTM und Interaktionen zwischen Sätzen entscheidend ist, (ii) Tree-LSTM nicht so viel hilft, wie bisher behauptet, aber überraschend die Leistung auf Twitter-Datensätzen verbessert, (iii) das Enhanced Sequential Inference Model ist das bisher beste für größere Datensätze, Während das Pairwise Word Interaction Model die beste Leistung erzielt, wenn weniger Daten verfügbar sind. Wir veröffentlichen unsere Implementierungen als Open-Source Toolkit.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami menganalisis beberapa desain jaringan saraf (dan variasi mereka) untuk model pasangan kalimat dan membandingkan prestasi mereka secara ekstensif di delapan set data, termasuk identifikasi parafrasa, persamaan tekstual semantis, kesimpulan bahasa alami, dan tugas menjawab pertanyaan. Although most of these models have claimed state-of-the-art performance, the original papers often reported on only one or two selected datasets.  Kami menyediakan sebuah studi sistematis dan menunjukkan bahwa (i) pengekodan informasi kontekstual oleh LSTM dan interaksi antara kalimat adalah kritis, (ii) Tree-LSTM tidak membantu sebanyak yang diklaim sebelumnya tetapi mengejutkan meningkatkan prestasi pada set data Twitter, (iii) Enhanced Sequential Inference Model adalah yang terbaik sejauh ini untuk set data yang lebih besar, - sementara Model Interaksi Kata Pairwise mencapai prestasi terbaik ketika lebih sedikit data tersedia. Kami melepaskan implementasi kami sebagai alat sumber terbuka.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 문장 모델링에 사용되는 몇 가지 신경 네트워크 디자인(그리고 변체)을 분석했고 8개의 데이터에서 그들의 성능을 집중적으로 비교했다. 이는 해석 식별, 의미-텍스트 유사성, 자연 언어 추리와 문답 임무를 포함한다.비록 이들 모델 중 대다수가 가장 선진적인 성능을 가지고 있다고 주장하지만, 최초의 논문은 보통 한두 개의 선택한 데이터 집합만 보고했다.우리는 체계적인 연구를 제공했고 (i) LSTM을 통해 상하문 정보와 문장 간의 상호작용을 인코딩하는 것이 중요하다는 것을 보여 주었다. (ii) 트리 LSTM은 이전에 주장했던 것처럼 도움이 되지 않았지만 트위터 데이터 집합의 성능을 놀랍게도 향상시켰다. (iii) 증강된 순서 추리 모델은 지금까지 비교적 큰 데이터 집합에 가장 좋은 것이다.사용 가능한 데이터가 적을 때 쌍사 상호작용 모델은 최상의 성능을 얻을 수 있다.우리는 개원 도구 패키지의 형식으로 우리의 실현을 발표한다.', 'sw': 'In this paper, we analyze several neural network designs (and their variations) for sentence pair modeling and compare their performance extensively across eight datasets, including paraphrase identification, semantic textual similarity, natural language inference, and question answering tasks.  Ingawa mifano mingi hii imedai hali ya utendaji wa sanaa, karatasi za awali mara nyingi zilipotiwa juu ya seti moja au mbili zilizochaguliwa. Tunatoa utafiti wa mfumo na kuonyesha (i) kupata taarifa za muda mfupi za LSTM na mahusiano ya hukumu tofauti ni muhimu, (ii) Mti-LSTM haisaidia sana kama ilivyodai zamani lakini kwa kushangaza kuboresha utendaji wa taarifa za twita, (iii) Modeli wa Uingiliaji wa Marekani wa Marekani ya Kukuzwa mara kwa mara ni bora mpaka sasa kwa seti kubwa zaidi, wakati ambapo Modeli ya Mitandao ya Mitandao ya Kauli ya Pairwise inafanikiwa ufanisi mzuri zaidi pale takwimu zisizo sahihi. Tunaachia utekelezaji wetu kama kituo cha chanzo cha wazi.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما چندین طراحی شبکه عصبی (و تغییرات آنها) را برای نمونه\u200cسازی جفت جمله\u200cها تحلیل می\u200cکنیم و عملکرد آنها را به وسیله\u200cی هشت مجموعه\u200cهای داده\u200cها مقایسه می\u200cکنیم، شامل شناسایی پارافراز، شبیه\u200cسازی متن\u200cشناسی semantic textual، عفونت زبان ط اگرچه اکثر این مدلها اجرای موقعیت هنری را ادعا کردند، کاغذهای اصلی اغلب بر فقط یک یا دو مجموعه داده انتخاب شده گزارش داده اند. ما یک تحقیق سیستماتی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم و نشان می\u200cدهیم که اطلاعات متوسط (i) رمزبندی توسط LSTM و ارتباطات متوسط جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی جمله\u200cی متوسط ضروری است, (ii) درخت-LSTM به اندازه\u200cای که پیش از این گفته شده کمک نمی\u200cکند، ولی تعجب\u200cکننده\u200cای در مجمو در حالی که مدل تفاوت کلمه جفت به بهترین فعالیت در موقع دسترسی داده\u200cهای کمتر رسیده است. ما کاربردهای خود را به عنوان یک کیت ابزار منبع باز آزاد می کنیم.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyzda, biz bir näçe näyral şebek taslamalaryny çözümleýäris (we olaryň çeşitlerini) sözlem çift modellendirmek üçin we olaryň netijelerini sekiz sanat setirlerinde, parafraz tanyşlygyny, semantik tekst meňzeşliklerini, tebigy dillerini alyp barýarys we jogap bermegi üçin karşılaýa Bu nusgalaryň köp bölegi sagat taýýarlanmagyny iddia edýän bolsa-de, başlangyç gazetler diňe bir ýa-da iki sany saýlanan datasetlerde köplenç rapor etdiler. Biz sistem bir araşdyrma temin edip, LSTM tarapyndan (i) ködleme müteaksti maglumatlary we sözleşmeler arasynda gaty möhüm däldir, (ii) Ağa ç-LSTM öňki sözleşi şen ýaly kömek etmän ýöne Twitter veri setirlerinde täsir edip ýöreýär, (iii) Yükselen Täsirli Döwletler Modeli ullanyň iň gowydyr, Geçmiş Maglumat Etkileşimi Mody çykaryp biljek wagtynda iň gowy hereket gazanýar. Biz implementasiýalarymyzy açyk-çeşme esbap çykarmak üçin seredip berýäris.', 'af': "In hierdie papier, ons analyseer verskeie neuralnetwerk ontwerkings (en hul veranderinge) vir setningpaar modellering en vergelyk hulle prestasie uitbreidig oor agt datastelle, insluitend parafrase identifiseering, semantiese tektuele gelykenis, natuurlike taal inferensie en vraag antwoord opdragte. Alhoewel die meeste van hierdie modele het state-of-the-art-prestasie aanbeveel, het die oorspronklike papiere dikwels op slegs een of twee gekose datastel rapporteer. Ons verskaf 'n sistematiese studie en wys dat (i) enkodering contextual inligting deur LSTM en inter-sentence interaksies is kritiese, (ii) Boom-LSTM hulp nie so veel as voorheen aangevra nie, maar verwonderlik verbeter prestasie op Twitter datastelle, (iii) die Verbeter Sequential Inferensie Model is die beste so far vir groter datastelle, terwyl die Pairwise Woord Interaksie Model die beste prestasie bereik wanneer minder data beskikbaar is. Ons verlos ons implementasies as 'n open-bron nutsbalk.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne analizojmë disa dizajne të rrjetit nervor (dhe variacionet e tyre) për modelimin e çifteve të fjalëve dhe krahasojmë performancën e tyre në mënyrë të gjerë nëpërmjet tetë grupeve të dhënash, duke përfshirë identifikimin e parafrazave, ngjashmërinë tekstuale semantike, inferencën natyrore të gjuhës dhe detyrat që përgjigjen pyetjeve. Megjithëse shumica e këtyre modeleve kanë pretenduar shfaqje më të moderne, gazetat origjinale shpesh raportojnë vetëm në një apo dy grupe të dhënash të zgjedhur. Ne ofrojmë një studim sistematik dhe tregojmë se (i) kodimi i informacionit kontekstual nga LSTM dhe ndërveprimet ndër-fraza janë kritike, (ii) pema-LSTM nuk ndihmon aq sa pretendohet më parë por befasueshëm përmirëson performancën në grupet e të dhënave të Twitter, (iii) Modeli i Përmirësuar i Inferencës Sekuenciale është më i miri deri tani për grupet e të dhënave më të mëdha, - ndërsa Modeli i Interaksionit të Fjalëve të Parëve arrin performancën më të mirë kur janë më pak të dhëna në dispozicion. Ne lëshojmë zbatimin tonë si një paketë mjete me burim të hapur.', 'am': 'በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ ለፍርድ ሁለት ዓይነቶች ማሳየት እና ስምንት ዳታተሮችን በትልቅ እናስተያያየዋለን፣ paraphrase identification፣ semantic ጽሑፍ ብጤት፣ የፍጥረት ቋንቋ ውጤት እና የመመልስ ስራዎችን እናስተያየዋለን፡፡ ምንም እንኳን አብዛኛዎቹ እነዚህ ዓይነቶች የ-የ-አርእስት ሥርዓት አካባቢ ሲሉ፣ የመጀመሪያዎቹ ደብዳቤዎች ብዙ ጊዜ በአንድ ወይም ሁለት የተመረጠው ዳታ ማዕከላዎች ብቻ ተዘጋጅተዋል፡፡ የኢንተርኔት ትምህርት እና (i) የሆኑት የLSTM እና የውይይት ግንኙነት የግንኙነት መረጃ አቀማሚ እንደሆነ እናሳያቸዋለን፣ (ii) ዛፍ-LSTM አስቀድሞ እንደጠየቀው ነገር ግን በትዊተር ዳታተሮችን ያሳድጋል፣ (iii) ለትልቁ ዳታዎችን የሚጠቅመው የግንኙነት አካባቢ ሞዴል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን የመስመር ቃላት ማቀናጃ ሞዴል ከታናሹ ዳታ በተገኘ ጊዜ የበለጠ ጥያቄን ያገኛል፡፡ የግንኙነታችንን የተከፈተ የኩነቶች መሣሪያን እናስቀራለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք վերլուծում ենք մի քանի նյարդային ցանցի դիզայներ (և դրանց տարբերությունները) նախադասությունների զույգ մոդելավորման համար և համեմատում ենք դրանց արտադրողությունը էքսպանցիորեն ութ տվյալների համակարգերում, ներառյալ պարաֆրեզի հայտնաբերումը, սեմանտիկ տեքստային նմանություն Չնայած այս մոդելներից շատերը հայտարարել են ամենաբարձր արդյունքներ, սկզբնական թղթերը հաճախ հայտարարել են միայն մեկ կամ երկու ընտրված տվյալների մասին: Մենք ապահովում ենք սիստեմատիկ ուսումնասիրություն և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ i) կոնտեքստոնալ ինֆորմացիան LSMT-ի միջև և նախադասությունների շփման միջոցով կարևոր է, երկու) ծառ-LSMT չի օգնում այնքան, ինչքան նախկինում հայտարարվել է, բայց զարմանալիորեն բարելավում է Թվիթերի տվյալների համակարգերի արտադրողությունը, երևի՝ բարելավված հաջորդ - մինչ զույգչային բառերի ինտերակցիայի մոդելը լավագույն արդյունք է ստանում, երբ ավելի քիչ տվյալներ կան: Մենք հրապարակում ենք մեր իրականացումները որպես բաց կոդ գործիքներ:', 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি নিউরেল নেটওয়ার্ক ডিজাইন বিশ্লেষণ করি শাস্তি জোড়া মডেলিং করার জন্য (এবং তাদের ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভ যদিও এদের বেশীরভাগ মডেলগুলো দাবি করেছে শিল্পের অবস্থান, তবে মূল কাগজগুলো প্রায়শ শুধুমাত্র একটি অথবা দুই নির্বাচিত তথ আমরা একটি সিস্টেমিক গবেষণা প্রদান করি এবং দেখাচ্ছি (আমি) এলস্টিএম এবং বিভিন্ন কারাদণ্ডের সাথে সংক্রান্ত তথ্য সমালোচনা, (২) গাছ-এলস্টিএম এর পূর্বে দাবি করা যাচ্ছে তা বেশি সমালোচনা করে না, কিন্ কিন্তু যখন তথ্য কম পাওয়া যায় তখন প্যায়ারওয়ার্ড ইন্টার্কেশন মোডেল সেরা ভালো কর্মসূচি পায়। আমরা উন্মুক্ত সোর্স টুলবিট হিসেবে আমাদের বাস্তবতা প্রকাশ করি।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru analiziramo nekoliko dizajna neuralne mreže (i njihovih varijacija) za modeliranje par rečenica i uspoređujemo njihovu provedbu široko preko osam seta podataka, uključujući identifikaciju parafraza, semantičku tekstualnu sličnost, infekciju prirodnog jezika i odgovore na pitanja. Iako je većina tih modela tvrdila da su predstave umjetnosti, originalni papiri su često prijavili na samo jednu ili dvije odabrane podatke. Predstavljamo sistematsko istraživanje i pokazujemo da su i) kontekstualne informacije kodiranja LSTM-om i interrečeničkim interrečenicama kritične, ii) Drvo-LSTM ne pomaže toliko koliko je prethodno izjavljeno, ali iznenađujuće poboljšava učinkovitost na Twitter-ovim setima podataka, iii) Najbolje je za veće podatake povećanje sekvencijskog modela, Dok Model interakcije riječi o parovima postigne najbolje izvršenje kada je dostupno manje podataka. Puštamo naše implementacije kao otvoreni izvorski alat.', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, biz bir neçə nöral ağ dizaynlarını (və variasiyonlarını) cümlələr çift modellik üçün analiz edirik və onların performanslarını sekiz verilən qutularda geniş bir şekilde qarşılaşdırırıq, parafraz tanıması, semantik tekst oxuması, doğal dil infeksiyonu və sorğu cavab verən işləri də dahil edirik. Bu modellərin əksəriyyəti təhsil göstəricisi iddia etdiyi halda, orijinal kağıtlar yalnız bir ya da iki seçilmiş veri qutusunda bildirilir. Biz sistematik bir təhsil təyin edirik və göstəririk ki, LSTM və cümlələrlə birlikdə kodlama müxtəlif məlumatları kritik olaraq, i i) Ağac-LSTM daha əvvəlki təhsil etdiyimiz kimi kömək etmirdi, ancaq Twitter verilənlərin təhsil qurularında şa şırtıcı olaraq, iii) Enhanced Sequential Inference Modeli böyük verilənlər quruları üçün ən yaxşıdır. Həmçinin Pairwise Word Interaction Modeli daha az verilən zaman ən yaxşı performansı başa düşər. Bizim implementasiyonlarımızı açıq-kaynaklı araç kitabı olaraq yayındırırıq.', 'ca': "En aquest article, analitzem diversos dissenys de xarxa neural (i les seves variacions) per modelar parelles de frases i comparem el seu rendiment extensament en vuit conjunts de dades, incloent identificació de parafrases, similitud textual semàntica, inferència de llenguatge natural i tasques de resposta a preguntes. Tot i que la majoria d'aquests models han afirmat actuació més avançada, els articles originals sovint informen només sobre un o dos conjunts de dades seleccionats. Oferecem un estudi sistemàtic i demostrem que (i) codificar la informació contextual per LSTM i les interaccions entre frases són crítiques, (ii) Tree-LSTM no ajuda tant com va afirmar abans, però sorprenentment millora el rendiment dels conjunts de dades de Twitter, (iii) el Modell de Inferència Sequencial millorat és el millor fins ara per a conjunts de dades més grans, - mentre que el Model d'Interacció de Pars aconsegueix el millor rendiment quan hi ha menys dades disponibles. Vam publicar les nostres implementacions com un conjunt d'eines de codi obert.", 'cs': 'V tomto článku analyzujeme několik návrhů neuronových sítí (a jejich variací) pro modelování párů vět a rozsáhlě porovnáváme jejich výkonnost napříč osmi datovými sadami, včetně identifikace parafráze, sémantické textové podobnosti, inference přirozeného jazyka a úloh zodpovězení otázek. Ačkoli většina těchto modelů vyžaduje nejmodernější výkon, původní články často uváděly pouze jednu nebo dvě vybrané datové sady. Poskytujeme systematickou studii a ukazujeme, že (i) kódování kontextových informací LSTM a interakcí mezi větami jsou klíčové, (ii) Tree-LSTM nepomáhá tolik, jak dříve tvrdilo, ale překvapivě zlepšuje výkon na Twitterových datových sadách, (iii) Enhanced Sequential Inference Model je zatím nejlepší pro větší datové sady, zatímco Pairwise Word Interaction Model dosahuje nejlepšího výkonu, když je k dispozici méně dat. Naše implementace vydáváme jako open-source toolkit.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös analüüsime lausepaari modelleerimiseks mitmeid neurovõrgu kujundusi (ja nende variatsioone) ja võrdleme nende jõudlust põhjalikult kaheksa andmekogumi vahel, sealhulgas parafraaside identifitseerimise, semantilise tekstisarnasuse, looduskeele järelduse ja küsimustele vastamise ülesannete vahel. Kuigi enamik neist mudelitest on nõudnud tipptasemel jõudlust, esitasid algsed dokumendid sageli ainult ühe või kahe valitud andmekogumi kohta. Pakume süstemaatilist uuringut ja näitame, et i) kontekstiteabe kodeerimine LSTM-i ja lausedevaheliste interaktsioonide abil on kriitiline, (ii) Tree-LSTM ei aita nii palju kui varem väideti, kuid üllatavalt parandab Twitteri andmekogumite jõudlust, (iii) täiustatud järjestikuste järelduste mudel on seni parim suuremate andmekogumite puhul, Samas saavutab paarwise Word interaktsiooni mudel parima jõudluse, kui andmeid on vähem. Me avaldame oma rakendused avatud lähtekoodiga tööriistakampaktina.', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa analysoimme useita lauseparimallinnusten neuroverkkomalleja (ja niiden variaatioita) ja vertaamme niiden suorituskykyä laajasti kahdeksassa aineistossa, mukaan lukien parafraasitunnistus, semanttinen tekstien samankaltaisuus, luonnollisen kielen päättely ja kysymystehtävät. Vaikka useimmat näistä malleista ovat väittäneet huipputason suorituskykyä, alkuperäiset artikkelit raportoivat usein vain yhdestä tai kahdesta valitusta aineistosta. Tarjoamme systemaattisen tutkimuksen ja osoitamme, että (i) kontekstitietojen koodaaminen LSTM:n avulla ja lauseiden väliset vuorovaikutukset ovat kriittisiä, (ii) Tree-LSTM ei auta niin paljon kuin aiemmin väitettiin, mutta yllättäen parantaa suorituskykyä Twitter-aineistoissa, (iii) Enhanced Sequential Inference Model on tähän mennessä paras suuremmille aineistoille, Pairwise Word Interaction Model saavuttaa parhaan suorituskyvyn, kun käytettävissä on vähemmän tietoja. Julkaisemme toteutuksemme avoimen lähdekoodin työkalupakkina.', 'ha': "Daga wannan takardan, Munã yin anayyar da wasu tsarin tarakin neural (da variablensu) wa misalin sigar biyu biyu kuma Muke sami da fasalinsu faɗi kowaci a kowaci takwas ɗin, kamar sunan faɗi na fassarar, da misalin littafin semantic, mala'a cikin harshe na naturaci, da kuma masu tambayi masu karɓa. Ingawa mafi yawansu masu motsi sun dace halin-mai-kunyar, takardar farko sun yi daidai a kan tsari guda ko biyu wanda aka zãɓe. Tuna samar da wani fitina na'ura da kuma Mu nuna (i) kodi da information masu hushi na LSSM da interfekt-hukumi, masu muhimmi, (ii) Tree-LSSM bã ya amfani da abin da ya dace a gabãni, kuma amma yana ƙaranci babban rabo a kan mutane na Twitter, (ii) Modalin da aka ƙara na ƙaranci masu haɗi da masana-tarakin aiki na ƙaranci, During an sami Model da Aiki na Pairhikima, ya sami mafi kyaun aikin idan da za'a iya ƙaranci data. Tuna sakar da kewayenmu kamar wata taska mai buɗewa.", 'sk': 'V prispevku analiziramo več modelov nevronskih omrežij (in njihovih variacij) za modeliranje stavkov in obsežno primerjamo njihovo zmogljivost v osmih naborih podatkov, vključno z identifikacijo parafraz, semantično besedilno podobnostjo, sklepanjem naravnega jezika in nalogami odgovarjanja na vprašanja. Čeprav je večina teh modelov zahtevala najsodobnejšo uspešnost, so prvotni prispevki pogosto poročali o samo enem ali dveh izbranih naborih podatkov. Zagotavljamo sistematično študijo in pokažemo, da je (i) kodiranje kontekstualnih informacij s pomočjo LSTM in interakcij med stavki ključnega pomena, (ii) Tree-LSTM ne pomaga toliko, kot je bilo že navedeno, ampak presenetljivo izboljšuje učinkovitost Twitterjevih naborov podatkov, (iii) izboljšan zaporedni model ugotavljanja je doslej najboljši za večje nabore podatkov, Medtem ko model interakcije z besedami v parih doseže najboljšo učinkovitost, ko je na voljo manj podatkov. Naše implementacije objavljamo kot odprtokodni nabor orodij.', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנו מנתחים כמה עיצובים של רשת עצביות (והשונות שלהם) לדוגמא של זוג משפטים, ושוואים את ביצועיהם באופן רחב בכל שמונה קבוצות נתונים, כולל זיהוי פראפרזיה, דמיון טקסטי סמנטי, תוצאות שפה טבעית, ומשימות לענות על שאלות. למרות שרוב הדוגמנים האלה טענו ביצועים חדשים, העיתונים המקוריים דיווחו לעתים קרובות על קבוצת נתונים אחת או שתיים בלבד. אנחנו מספקים מחקר שיטתי ולהראות כי (i) הקוד מידע קונטקסטי על ידי LSTM ואינטראקציות בין משפטים הם קריטיים, (ii) עץ-LSTM לא עוזר כמו שטוען קודם אבל משפר באופן מפתיע ביצועים על קופסטי נתונים טוויטר, (iii) מודל התקף רציני משפר הוא הטוב ביותר עד כה עבור קופסטי נתונים גדולים יותר, בזמן שדוגמן הפעולה של מילים זוג משיג את ההופעה הטובה ביותר כשפחות נתונים זמינים. We release our implementations as an open-source toolkit.', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki, kita maneh alat kanggo nyeyane nggawe netbaek (karo cah-cah variant) kanggo nyeyane kapan pangan karo nggawe gerarangkar sampek basa sing wis luwih nggawe dataset politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngewehi sistem kanggo ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno ngono (i) informasi contextual sing nggawe lan interaksi langgar wigatiningan kalah-wigatiningan karo peringatan (i) jenis ne terus akeh lanjut dhéwé, teka-LTT M kuwi susahé awak dhéwé, nggo ngerasakno akeh operasi awak dhéwé dataset-tuwit; i ii) Mèhke Kelangan Sekondêr Info model sing luwih politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness Awak dhéwé ngewehke aplikasi kanggo kelompok Open-source', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་དབུས་གཞུང་གི་བཟོ་བཅོས་སྣེ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་དཔྱད་བྱས་ན། སྔོན་སྒྲིག་འདི་དག་གྲངས་ཀ་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡིག་ཆའི་གནས་སྟངས ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་ལྟ་སྟངས་དང་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་གསལ་བཤད་དང་སྟོན་ན། While the Pairwise Word Interaction Model achieves the best performance when less data is available. ང་ཚོས་ཁ་ཕྱེས་པའི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིག་ལ་ཉེན་སྒྲིག་ཆས་ཤིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'Authorless Topic Models : Biasing Models Away from Known Structure', 'ar': 'نماذج موضوع غير مؤلف: نماذج متحيزة بعيدًا عن البنية المعروفة', 'fr': 'Modèles thématiques sans auteur\xa0: biaiser les modèles par rapport à la structure connue', 'es': 'Modelos de temas sin autor: sesgar los modelos lejos de la estructura conocida', 'pt': 'Modelos de tópicos sem autor: modelos de polarização longe da estrutura conhecida', 'ja': '著者のいないトピックモデル：既知の構造から離れたモデルの偏見', 'zh': '无作者主题模:使模形远知结构', 'hi': 'Authorless Topic Models: Biasing Model दूर ज्ञात संरचना से दूर', 'ru': 'Модели без авторитарной темы: Предвзятость моделей вдали от известной структуры', 'ga': 'Múnlaí Ábhair Gan Údar: Múnlaí a Laofacht Amach ó Struchtúr Aitheanta', 'ka': 'ავტორებელი ტემიკური მოდელები: მოდელები ცნობილი სტრუქტურიდან გარეშე', 'el': 'Χωρίς συγγραφέα θεματικά μοντέλα: Προσωριμότητα μοντέλων μακριά από γνωστές δομές', 'hu': 'Szerző nélküli téma modellek: A modellek eltávolítása az ismert struktúrától', 'it': 'Modelli di argomento senza autore: Biasing Modelli lontano dalla struttura conosciuta', 'kk': 'Авторсыз нақыштар үлгілері: Белгілі құрылғыдан тыс үлгілер', 'lt': 'Beautoriai teminiai modeliai: nuo žinomos struktūros atsiliekantys abipusiai modeliai', 'mk': 'Модели за безавторски теми: Модели за навреда далеку од познатата структура', 'ms': 'Model Topik Tanpa Penulis: Model Biasing Jauh dari Struktur Diketahui', 'mt': 'Authorless Topic Models: Biasing Models Away from Known Structure', 'ml': 'അധികാരിയില്ലാത്ത പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d: അറിഞ്ഞ സ്ട്രോക്ട്രൂട്ടില്\u200d നിന്നും ബൈസിംഗ് മോഡ', 'mn': 'Шинэ зохиолгүй сэдвийн загварууд: Мэдэх бүтээгдэхүүнээс хол загварууд', 'no': 'Autentiserte emnemodular: Gjennomsiktige modeller vekk frå kjende struktur', 'ro': 'Modele de subiect fără autor: Modele Biasing departe de structura cunoscută', 'pl': 'Modele tematyczne bezautorskie: Biasing models from known structure', 'sr': 'Bez autorskih tema modela: Odmaknuti modeli daleko od poznate strukture', 'si': 'විශේෂයක් නැති විදේශ මොඩේල්: දන්න ප්\u200dරවෘතියෙන් දකින්න ප්\u200dරවෘතියෙන් පිටත් වෙන්න', 'so': "Maamulka la'aanta: Bising Models Away from Known Structure", 'sv': 'Författarlösa ämnesmodeller: Biasing modeller bort från känd struktur', 'ta': 'உரிமையில்லாத தலைப்பு மாதிரிகள்:', 'ur': 'بغیر لکھی موضوع موڈل: معلوم ساختار سے دور ہونے والے موڈل', 'uz': 'Mavzu modellari: Bising Models Away from Known Structure', 'vi': 'Chế độ âm bản chưa chính xác: Mẫu giả rời khỏi cấu trúc được biết', 'bg': 'Темни модели без автори: Предубедени модели далеч от познатата структура', 'nl': 'Auteursloze topic modellen: Voorstelling van modellen weg van bekende structuur', 'hr': 'Bezvanični modeli teme: rastući modeli daleko od poznate strukture', 'da': 'Forfatterløse emne modeller: Biasing modeller væk fra kendt struktur', 'de': 'Authorless Topic Models: Vorurteile von Modellen weg von bekannter Struktur', 'id': 'Model Topik Tak Berautor: Model Biasing Jauh dari Struktur Terkenal', 'ko': '무작가 테마 모델: 모델을 이미 알고 있는 구조에서 벗어나게 합니다', 'fa': 'مدل موضوع بدون نویسی: مدل\u200cهای دور از ساختار معلوم', 'af': 'Outeur Onderwerp Modelle: Biasing Modelle Weg van bekende struktuur', 'sw': 'Modala zisizo na mamlaka za mada: Kusini Modeli Kuondoka na Miundombinu inayofahamika', 'sq': 'Modelet e temave pa autor: Modelet e bllokimit larg strukturës së njohur', 'tr': 'Otomatik nusga', 'am': 'ነጥብ', 'hy': 'Արձակագրված թեմայի մոդելներ. ճանաչված կառուցվածքից հեռացող մոդելները', 'bn': 'ক্ষমতা নেই বিষয় মোডেল: জানা যায় কৌশল থেকে বাইজিং মডেল দূরে থাকুন', 'az': 'M칲톛llif m톛s톛l톛l톛r: Bil톛n Yaz캼l캼qdan uzaq Modell톛r', 'bs': 'Bezvanični modeli teme: Bijanje modela daleko od poznate strukture', 'ca': "Models de tòpics sense autors: Models de biasing lluny de l'estructura coneguda", 'cs': 'Bezautorské tématické modely: zaujaté modely daleko od známé struktury', 'et': 'Autorita teemamudelid: Eelarvamudelid kaugemal tuntud struktuurist', 'fi': 'Tekijättömät aihemallit: Biasing mallit kaukana tunnetusta rakenteesta', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'ha': '@ action: button', 'sk': 'Brez avtorjev tematski modeli: pristranski modeli stran od znane strukture', 'he': 'דוגמנים נושאים ללא עוצמה: דוגמנים ניזונים רחוקים ממבנה ידוע', 'bo': 'རྩོམ་པ་མེད་པའི་གནད་དོན་དབྱིབས་དཔེ་གཞུང་ལ་འགྲོ་བཞིན་པའི་མ་དབྱིབས།'}
{'en': 'Most previous work in unsupervised semantic modeling in the presence of metadata has assumed that our goal is to make latent dimensions more correlated with metadata, but in practice the exact opposite is often true. Some users want topic models that highlight differences between, for example, authors, but others seek more subtle connections across authors. We introduce three metrics for identifying topics that are highly correlated with metadata, and demonstrate that this problem affects between 30 and 50 % of the topics in models trained on two real-world collections, regardless of the size of the model. We find that we can predict which words cause this phenomenon and that by selectively subsampling these words we dramatically reduce topic-metadata correlation, improve topic stability, and maintain or even improve model quality.', 'fr': "La plupart des travaux antérieurs sur la modélisation sémantique non supervisée en présence de métadonnées partaient du principe que notre objectif était de mieux corréler les dimensions latentes avec les métadonnées, mais dans la pratique, c'est souvent le contraire qui est vrai. Certains utilisateurs veulent des modèles thématiques qui mettent en évidence les différences entre, par exemple, les auteurs, mais d'autres recherchent des liens plus subtils entre les auteurs. Nous introduisons trois mesures pour identifier les sujets fortement corrélés avec les métadonnées, et démontrons que ce problème affecte entre 30 et 50\xa0% des sujets dans les modèles formés sur deux collections du monde réel, quelle que soit la taille du modèle. Nous constatons que nous pouvons prédire quels mots sont à l'origine de ce phénomène et qu'en sous-échantillonnant sélectivement ces mots, nous réduisons considérablement la corrélation sujet-métadonnées, améliorons la stabilité des sujets et maintenons voire améliorons la qualité du modèle.", 'ar': 'افترضت معظم الأعمال السابقة في النمذجة الدلالية غير الخاضعة للرقابة في وجود البيانات الوصفية أن هدفنا هو جعل الأبعاد الكامنة أكثر ارتباطًا بالبيانات الوصفية ، ولكن من الناحية العملية يكون العكس تمامًا صحيحًا. يرغب بعض المستخدمين في نماذج الموضوعات التي تبرز الاختلافات بين المؤلفين ، على سبيل المثال ، بينما يبحث البعض الآخر عن اتصالات أكثر دقة عبر المؤلفين. نقدم ثلاثة مقاييس لتحديد الموضوعات التي ترتبط ارتباطًا وثيقًا بالبيانات الوصفية ، ونثبت أن هذه المشكلة تؤثر على ما بين 30 و 50٪ من الموضوعات في النماذج المدربة على مجموعتين من العالم الحقيقي ، بغض النظر عن حجم النموذج. نجد أنه يمكننا التنبؤ بالكلمات التي تسبب هذه الظاهرة وأنه من خلال أخذ عينات فرعية انتقائية لهذه الكلمات ، فإننا نحد بشكل كبير من ارتباط البيانات الوصفية للموضوع ، وتحسين استقرار الموضوع ، والحفاظ على جودة النموذج أو حتى تحسينها.', 'es': 'La mayoría de los trabajos anteriores en modelos semánticos no supervisados en presencia de metadatos han supuesto que nuestro objetivo es hacer que las dimensiones latentes estén más correlacionadas con los metadatos, pero en la práctica ocurre exactamente lo contrario. Algunos usuarios quieren modelos de temas que destaquen las diferencias entre, por ejemplo, los autores, pero otros buscan conexiones más sutiles entre los autores. Presentamos tres métricas para identificar temas que están altamente correlacionados con los metadatos y demostramos que este problema afecta entre el 30 y el 50% de los temas de los modelos entrenados en dos colecciones del mundo real, independientemente del tamaño del modelo. Descubrimos que podemos predecir qué palabras causan este fenómeno y que, al submuestrear selectivamente estas palabras, reducimos drásticamente la correlación entre el tema y los metadatos, mejoramos la estabilidad del tema y mantenemos o incluso mejoramos la calidad del modelo.', 'pt': 'A maioria dos trabalhos anteriores em modelagem semântica não supervisionada na presença de metadados assumiu que nosso objetivo é tornar as dimensões latentes mais correlacionadas com os metadados, mas na prática o exato oposto geralmente é verdadeiro. Alguns usuários desejam modelos de tópicos que destaquem as diferenças entre, por exemplo, autores, mas outros buscam conexões mais sutis entre os autores. Apresentamos três métricas para identificar tópicos altamente correlacionados com metadados e demonstramos que esse problema afeta entre 30 e 50% dos tópicos em modelos treinados em duas coleções do mundo real, independentemente do tamanho do modelo. Descobrimos que podemos prever quais palavras causam esse fenômeno e que, ao subamostrar seletivamente essas palavras, reduzimos drasticamente a correlação tópico-metadados, melhoramos a estabilidade do tópico e mantemos ou até melhoramos a qualidade do modelo.', 'ja': 'メタデータの存在下での監視されていない意味モデリングにおける以前の仕事のほとんどは、私たちの目標が潜在的な次元をメタデータとより相関させることであると仮定していますが、実際にはまったく逆のことがよくあります。一部のユーザーは、著者間の違いを強調するトピックモデルを望んでいますが、他のユーザーは著者間のより微妙なつながりを求めています。メタデータと高度に相関するトピックを特定するための3つの指標を紹介し、この問題が、モデルのサイズに関係なく、2つの現実世界のコレクションでトレーニングされたモデルのトピックの30 ～ 50%に影響を与えることを示します。どの単語がこの現象を引き起こすかを予測することができ、これらの単語を選択的にサブサンプリングすることで、トピックとメタデータの相関を劇的に減らし、トピックの安定性を向上させ、モデルの品質を維持または向上させることができます。', 'zh': '元数所存,多前无监督语义建模事皆假设,使潜维度与元更相关,而在实践中事实往往相反。 诸用户欲显见异同,其他用户欲跨其微妙。 引入三指标以识元数之高下,证其大小,皆两真实世界合习之 30% 50% 之题也。 吾见可测单词致此,且择地而单词采样之,可显降主题元数相关性,增题稳定性,以至模形。', 'ru': 'Большинство предыдущих работ в неконтролируемом семантическом моделировании при наличии метаданных предполагали, что наша цель состоит в том, чтобы сделать скрытые измерения более коррелированными с метаданными, но на практике часто верно прямо противоположное. Некоторые пользователи хотят тематические модели, которые подчеркивают различия между, например, авторами, но другие ищут более тонкие связи между авторами. Мы вводим три метрики для идентификации тем, которые в значительной степени коррелируют с метаданными, и демонстрируем, что эта проблема затрагивает от 30 до 50% тем в моделях, обученных на двух реальных коллекциях, независимо от размера модели. Мы обнаружили, что мы можем предсказать, какие слова вызывают это явление, и что, выборочно подвыбирая эти слова, мы резко снижаем корреляцию между темами и метаданными, улучшаем стабильность тем и поддерживаем или даже улучшаем качество модели.', 'hi': 'मेटाडेटा की उपस्थिति में असुरक्षित शब्दार्थ मॉडलिंग में अधिकांश पिछले काम ने माना है कि हमारा लक्ष्य अव्यक्त आयामों को मेटाडेटा के साथ अधिक सहसंबद्ध बनाना है, लेकिन व्यवहार में सटीक विपरीत अक्सर सच होता है। कुछ उपयोगकर्ता विषय मॉडल चाहते हैं जो उदाहरण के लिए, लेखकों के बीच अंतर को उजागर करते हैं, लेकिन अन्य लेखकों में अधिक सूक्ष्म कनेक्शन की तलाश करते हैं। हम मेटाडेटा के साथ अत्यधिक सहसंबद्ध विषयों की पहचान करने के लिए तीन मीट्रिक पेश करते हैं, और प्रदर्शित करते हैं कि यह समस्या मॉडल के आकार की परवाह किए बिना, दो वास्तविक दुनिया के संग्रहों पर प्रशिक्षित मॉडल में 30 से 50% विषयों के बीच प्रभावित करती है। हम पाते हैं कि हम भविष्यवाणी कर सकते हैं कि कौन से शब्द इस घटना का कारण बनते हैं और इन शब्दों को चुनिंदा रूप से उप-नमूना करके हम नाटकीय रूप से विषय-मेटाडेटा सहसंबंध को कम करते हैं, विषय स्थिरता में सुधार करते हैं, और मॉडल की गुणवत्ता को बनाए रखते हैं या यहां तक कि सुधार करते हैं।', 'ga': 'Ghlac an chuid is mó den obair a rinneadh roimhe seo ar shamhaltú shéimeantach gan mhaoirseacht i láthair na meiteashonraí leis gurb é an sprioc atá againn ná toisí folaigh a dhéanamh níos comhghaolaithe le meiteashonraí, ach go praiticiúil is minic a mhalairt ar fad fíor. Teastaíonn samhlacha topaicí ó roinnt úsáideoirí a leagann béim ar na difríochtaí idir údair, mar shampla, ach lorgaíonn daoine eile naisc níos caolchúisí idir údair. Tugaimid isteach trí mhéadracht chun topaicí a aithint a bhfuil an-chomhghaolú acu le meiteashonraí, agus léirímid go mbíonn tionchar ag an bhfadhb seo ar idir 30 agus 50% de na topaicí i samhlacha atá oilte ar dhá bhailiúchán fíordhomhanda, beag beann ar mhéid na samhla. Faighimid amach gur féidir linn a thuar cé na focail is cúis leis an bhfeiniméan seo agus trí na focail seo a fhoshampláil go roghnach go laghdaítear go mór an comhghaolmhaireacht idir topaicí agus meiteashonraí, go bhfeabhsaítear cobhsaíocht topaicí, agus go gcoimeádaimid nó fiú feabhsaítear cáilíocht na samhla.', 'el': 'Οι περισσότερες προηγούμενες εργασίες στη μη επιτηρούμενη σημασιολογική μοντελοποίηση με παρουσία μεταδεδομένων έχουν υποθέσει ότι στόχος μας είναι να κάνουμε τις λανθάνουσες διαστάσεις πιο συσχετισμένες με τα μεταδεδομένα, αλλά στην πράξη το ακριβώς αντίθετο συμβαίνει συχνά. Ορισμένοι χρήστες θέλουν μοντέλα θεμάτων που επισημαίνουν τις διαφορές μεταξύ, για παράδειγμα, συγγραφέων, αλλά άλλοι αναζητούν πιο λεπτές συνδέσεις μεταξύ των συγγραφέων. Παρουσιάζουμε τρεις μετρήσεις για τον προσδιορισμό θεμάτων που σχετίζονται ιδιαίτερα με τα μεταδεδομένα και καταδεικνύουμε ότι αυτό το πρόβλημα επηρεάζει μεταξύ 30 και 50% των θεμάτων σε μοντέλα που εκπαιδεύονται σε δύο πραγματικές συλλογές, ανεξάρτητα από το μέγεθος του μοντέλου. Διαπιστώνουμε ότι μπορούμε να προβλέψουμε ποιες λέξεις προκαλούν αυτό το φαινόμενο και ότι με την επιλεκτική υποδειγματοληψία αυτών των λέξεων μειώνουμε δραματικά τη συσχέτιση θεμάτων-μεταδεδομένων, βελτιώνουμε τη σταθερότητα του θέματος και διατηρούμε ή ακόμα βελτιώνουμε την ποιότητα του μοντέλου.', 'hu': 'A metaadatok jelenlétében végzett felügyelet nélküli szemantikai modellezés legtöbb korábbi munkája azt feltételezte, hogy célunk a látens dimenziók korrelálása a metaadatokkal, de a gyakorlatban gyakran pontosan az ellenkezője igaz. Egyes felhasználók olyan témamodelleket szeretnének, amelyek kiemelik például a szerzők közötti különbségeket, mások viszont finomabb kapcsolatokat keresnek a szerzők között. Három mutatót vezetünk be a metaadatokkal erősen korrelált témák azonosítására, és bemutatjuk, hogy ez a probléma a két valós gyűjteményben képzett modellek témáinak 30-50%-át érinti, függetlenül a modell méretétől. Úgy találjuk, hogy meg tudjuk jósolni, hogy mely szavak okozzák ezt a jelenséget, és hogy ezeknek a szavaknak a szelektív részegyűjtésével drasztikusan csökkentjük a téma-metaadatok korrelációját, javítjuk a téma stabilitását, fenntartjuk vagy akár javítjuk a modell minőségét.', 'ka': 'უფრო მეტი წინა სამუშაო სამუშაო სემონტიკური მოდელეციაში მეტადატატატატატატატატატატატატატატატატატატური მოდელეციაში დავწერა, რომ ჩვენი მიზეზი უფრო ზოგიერთი მომხმარებელი მინდა ტემების მოდელები, რომლებიც განსხვავებების განსხვავებას, მაგრამ სხვა ავტორების განსხვავებას, მაგრამ სხვა მოსხვავებელი უფრო ჩვენ სამი მეტრიკის განვიცნობისთვის, რომელიც მეტადეტატებით ძალიან კოლექალურია, და გამოჩვენებთ, რომ ეს პრობლემა 30-50% შორის მოდელების მოდელში, რომელიც ორი რეალური მსოფლიო კოლექციაში განაკეთებული ჩვენ ვიფიქრობთ, რომელსაც სიტყვები ამ ფენომენს წარმოიდგინს და რომ ამ სიტყვების გამოყენებით ჩვენ დირამიკურად გამოკლებით ტემატიკური მეტადატატატატატიკური კორელაცია, ტემატიკური სტაბი', 'it': "La maggior parte dei lavori precedenti nella modellazione semantica non supervisionata in presenza di metadati ha assunto che il nostro obiettivo è quello di rendere le dimensioni latenti più correlate ai metadati, ma in pratica è spesso vero l'esatto contrario. Alcuni utenti vogliono modelli di argomenti che evidenzino le differenze tra, ad esempio, gli autori, ma altri cercano connessioni più sottili tra gli autori. Introduciamo tre metriche per identificare argomenti altamente correlati ai metadati e dimostriamo che questo problema interessa tra il 30 e il 50% degli argomenti in modelli formati su due collezioni del mondo reale, indipendentemente dalle dimensioni del modello. Troviamo che siamo in grado di prevedere quali parole causano questo fenomeno e che sottosamplando selettivamente queste parole riduciamo drasticamente la correlazione argomento-metadati, miglioriamo la stabilità dell'argomento e manteniamo o addirittura miglioriamo la qualità del modello.", 'lt': 'Most previous work in unsupervised semantic modeling in the presence of metadata has assumed that our goal is to make latent dimensions more correlated with metadata, but in practice the exact opposite is often true.  Kai kurie naudotojai nori teminių modelių, kurie pabrėžia skirtumus tarp, pavyzdžiui, autorių, bet kiti siekia subtilesnių ryšių tarp autorių. Įdiegiame tris metrinius rodiklius, kad būtų galima nustatyti temas, kurios yra labai susijusios su metaduomenimis, ir įrodome, kad ši problema daro poveikį 30–50 proc. temų modeliuose, parengtuose dviejuose realaus pasaulio kolekcijose, nepriklausomai nuo modelio dydžio. Matome, kad galime prognozuoti, kokie žodžiai sukelia šį reiškinį, ir kad atrankiniu būdu šiuos žodžius žymiai sumažinsime temų ir metaduomenų koreliaciją, pagerinsime temų stabilumą ir išlaikysime arba net pagerinsime modelio kokybę.', 'ms': 'Most previous work in unsupervised semantic modeling in the presence of metadata has assumed that our goal is to make latent dimensions more correlated with metadata, but in practice the exact opposite is often true.  Sesetengah pengguna mahu model topik yang menyatakan perbezaan antara, contohnya, penulis, tetapi yang lain mencari sambungan yang lebih halus di seluruh penulis. Kami memperkenalkan tiga metrik untuk mengenalpasti topik yang sangat berkorrelasi dengan metadata, dan menunjukkan bahawa masalah ini mempengaruhi antara 30 dan 50% topik dalam model yang dilatih pada dua koleksi dunia nyata, tidak kira saiz model. Kami mendapati bahawa kita boleh meramalkan perkataan mana yang menyebabkan fenomena ini dan bahawa dengan menandakan secara selektif perkataan ini kita mengurangkan secara dramatis korelasi topik-metadata, meningkatkan kestabilan topik, dan mempertahankan atau bahkan meningkatkan kualiti model.', 'kk': 'Метадеректердің барлығында алдыңғы өзгертілмеген семантикалық модельдің көпшілігі біздің мақсатымыз келесі өлшемдерді метадеректермен көбірек қатынау деп ойлады, бірақ әрекетте қарсы қатынау көбірек шын Кейбір пайдаланушылар авторлар арасындағы айырмашылығын бояулау үлгілерін қалайды, бірақ басқалар авторлар арасындағы артық қосылымдарды іздейді. Метадеректермен байланысты тақырыптарды анықтау үш метрикалық метрикалық тақырыптарын таңдап, мәселе үлгісінің өлшеміне қарамастан, 30- 50% деген тақырыптардың екі шын әлемді жинақтардың ортасында тәжірибесін көрсетеді. Біз бұл панелінің қайсы сөздерінің себебін таңдай аламыз. Бұл сөздерді таңдап таңдап, нақыштың метадеректерінің корелациясын көтеріп, нақыштардың стабильностігін жақсартып, үлгі сапасын қалдырып, немесе да', 'mk': 'Повеќето претходни работи во ненадгледуваното семантичко моделирање во присуството на метададани претпоставуваат дека нашата цел е да ги направиме тајните димензии поврзани со метаданите, но во практиката точно спротивното честопати е вистина. Некои корисници сакаат темски модели кои ги истакнуваат разликите меѓу, на пример, авторите, но други бараат посуптилни врски меѓу авторите. Ние воведуваме три метрики за идентификување теми кои се високо поврзани со метададаните, и демонстрираме дека овој проблем влијае на помеѓу 30 и 50 отсто од темите во модели обучени на две реални колекции, без оглед на големината на моделот. Најдовме дека можеме да предвидеме кои зборови го предизвикуваат овој феномен и дека со селективно подпримерување на овие зборови драматично ја намалуваме корелацијата тема-метададани, ја подобруваме стабилноста на темата и одржуваме или дури подобруваме квалитетот на моделот.', 'mt': "Il-biċċa l-kbira tax-xogħol preċedenti fl-immudellar semantiku mhux sorveljat fil-preżenza tal-metadejta jassumi li l-għan tagħna huwa li d-dimensjonijiet moħbija jsiru aktar korrelati mal-metadejta, iżda fil-prattika l-kuntrarju eżatt ħafna drabi huwa veru. Xi utenti jridu mudelli tematiċi li jenfasizzaw id-differenzi bejn, pereżempju, l-awturi, iżda oħrajn ifittxu konnessjonijiet aktar subtili bejn l-awturi. Aħna nintroduċu tliet metriċi għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ suġġetti li huma korrelati ħafna mal-metadejta, u nippruvaw li din il-problema taffettwa bejn 30 u 50% tas-suġġetti f’mudelli mħarrġa fuq żewġ kollezzjonijiet tad-dinja reali, irrispettivament mid-daqs tal-mudell. Aħna nsibu li nistgħu nipprojbixxu liema kliem jikkawżaw dan il-fenomenu u li permezz ta' sottokampjunar selettiv ta' dawn il-kliem naqsu drammatikament il-korrelazzjoni bejn it-temi u l-metadejta, intejbu l-istabbiltà tat-temi, u nżommu jew saħansitra jtejbu l-kwalità tal-mudell.", 'ml': 'മെറ്റാഡാറ്റിന്റെ സന്നിധിയില്\u200d സംരക്ഷിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത സെമാന്റിക് മോഡലിങില്\u200d മുമ്പുള്ള ജോലി നമ്മുടെ ലക്ഷ്യം മെറ്റാഡാറ്റിനോട് കൂടു ചില ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് പ്രമേയത്തിന്റെ മോഡലുകള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്. ഉദാഹരണത്തിനായി രചയിതാക്കള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ വ്യത്യാസങ്ങള്\u200d  മെറ്റാഡാറ്റായി ബന്ധപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കളെ കണ്ടുപിടിക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മൂന്നു മെട്രിക്ക് പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഈ പ്രശ്നം മോഡലിന്റെ വലിപ്പം വെച നമുക്ക് പ്രവചിക്കാന്\u200d കഴിയുന്നത് ഏത് വാക്കുകളാണെന്നും, ഈ വാക്കുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുത്ത് ഈ വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് നമുക്ക് പ്രവചിക്കാന്\u200d കഴി', 'mn': 'Өмнөх ажил мета-өгөгдлийн байр суурь дамжуулагдаагүй семантик модельчлалын ихэнх нь бидний зорилго бол соронзон хэмжээсүүд мета-өгөгдлийг илүү холбоотой гэдгийг ойлгосон. Гэхдээ практикт яг эсрэг нь ихэвчлэн үнэн Зарим хэрэглэгчид зохиолчдын ялгааг тодорхойлох сэдвийн загваруудыг хүсч байна. Жишээлбэл, зохиолчдын ялгааг тодорхойлох боломжтой. Харин бусад нь зохиолчдын хооронд Бид мета өгөгдлийн хамааралтай сэдвүүдийг тодорхойлох гурван метр загварыг тайлбарлаж, энэ асуудал нь загварын хэмжээсүүдийн 30-50%-ын хоорондох загварын хоёр бодит ертөнцийн цуглуулга дээр сургалтын загварын хоорондоо нөлөөлдөг гэдгийг хар Бид энэ явдалд ямар үг үүсгэдгийг таамаглаж болох вэ гэдгийг бид таамаглаж чадна. Тэдгээр үгүүдийг сонголтой хэлбэрээр бид сэдэв-мета-өгөгдлийн холбоотой байдлыг багасгаж, сэдэв тогтвортой байдлыг сайжруулж, загварын', 'no': 'Dei fleste førre arbeida i usikkerte semantiske modellering i tilstand til metadata har anta at målet vårt er å gjera latente dimensjonar meir korrelatert med metadata, men i praksis er det nøyaktige motsatt ofte sann. Noen brukarar ønskjer temamodeller som markerer ulike forskjeller mellom utviklarane, for eksempel, men andre søk meir subtil tilkopling mellom utviklarane. Vi introduserer tre metrikar for å identifisera emne som er svært korrelatert med metadata, og demonstrerer at dette problemet påvirkar mellom 30 og 50 % av emnene i modelane trengte på to verdssamlingar uansett storleiken på modellen. Vi finn at vi kan foregå kva ord forårsaker denne fenomenen, og at ved utvalgt understreking av desse ordene vi dramatisk reduserer korrelasjon med temametadata, forbetra temastabilitet, og vedlikehald eller til og med forbetra modellkvalitet.', 'pl': 'Większość poprzednich prac nad nienadzorowanym modelowaniem semantycznym w obecności metadanych zakładała, że naszym celem jest uczynienie ukrytych wymiarów bardziej skorelowanych z metadanymi, ale w praktyce jest często odwrotnie. Niektórzy użytkownicy chcą modeli tematów, które podkreślają różnice między np. autorami, ale inni szukają bardziej subtelnych powiązań między autorami. Wprowadzamy trzy wskaźniki identyfikacji tematów, które są silnie skorelowane z metadanymi i pokazujemy, że problem ten dotyczy od 30 do 50% tematów w modelach trenowanych na dwóch zbiorach rzeczywistych, niezależnie od wielkości modelu. Odkrywamy, że możemy przewidzieć, które słowa powodują to zjawisko i że poprzez selektywne podpróbkowanie tych słów dramatycznie zmniejszamy korelację tematu-metadanych, poprawiamy stabilność tematu, a nawet utrzymujemy lub poprawiamy jakość modelu.', 'ro': 'Cele mai multe lucrări anterioare în modelarea semantică nesupravegheată în prezența metadatelor au presupus că scopul nostru este de a face dimensiunile latente mai corelate cu metadatele, dar în practică exact opusul este adesea adevărat. Unii utilizatori doresc modele de subiecte care evidențiază diferențele dintre, de exemplu, autori, dar alții caută conexiuni mai subtile între autori. Introducem trei măsurători pentru identificarea subiectelor care sunt foarte corelate cu metadatele și demonstrăm că această problemă afectează între 30 și 50% din subiectele din modele instruite pe două colecții din lumea reală, indiferent de dimensiunea modelului. Descoperim că putem prezice ce cuvinte cauzează acest fenomen și că prin subsamplarea selectivă a acestor cuvinte reducem dramatic corelația subiect-metadate, îmbunătățim stabilitatea subiectului și menținem sau chiar îmbunătățim calitatea modelului.', 'sr': 'Većina prethodnog rada u neodređenom semantičkom modelima u prisustvu metapodataka pretpostavila je da je naš cilj da se latentne dimenzije više povezuju sa metapodacima, ali u praksi je tačno suprotno često istinito. Neki korisnici žele modele teme koji naglašavaju razlike između, na primer, autora, ali drugi traže suptilne veze preko autora. Predstavljamo tri metrike za identifikaciju tema koje su vrlo povezani sa metapodacima i pokazujemo da ovaj problem utiče na 30 do 50% teme u modelima obučenih na dve kolekcije stvarnog svijeta, bez obzira na veličinu modela. Nalazimo da možemo predvidjeti koji reči uzrokuju ovaj fenomen i da, selektivno potpojavljujući te reči, dramatično smanjujemo korelaciju tema-metadatova, poboljšavamo temu stabilnost, i održavamo ili čak poboljšavamo kvalitet modela.', 'so': 'Shaqo badan oo hore oo ku shaqeynaya sameynta semantika aan la ilaalinayn waxay ka fikirtay in goalkeenu yahay in uu ka dhigo qaybaha ugu dambeeya ay ka sii xiran yihiin metadata, laakiin sida badan waa run. Isticmaalayaasha qaarkood waxay u baahan yihiin tusaale ahaan qoraal-qoraal, laakiin qaar kale waxay doonayaan xiriir aad u fudud oo qoraal ka mid ah. Waxaynu soo bandhignaa saddex metric si aan u aqoonsanno maadooyinka aad u kala xiran metadata, waxaynu caddaynaynaa in dhibaatadanu saameyn ku yeelan karto 30-50% ka mid ah maadooyinka lagu baray labada ururada dunida ee halis ah, haba kastoo ay tahay tirada modellka. Waxaynu heli karnaa inaannu ka hor dhigi karno hadalladan sababto waxyaabahan, si aan u sii kordhinno hadalladan, si gaar ah ayaannu ugu hoosaysiinno isku xiriirka arimaha, hagaajinno qalabka mada, waxaana sii korinaynaa ama sii korinaynaa qiimaha modellka.', 'sv': 'De flesta tidigare arbeten med oövervakad semantisk modellering i närvaro av metadata har antagit att vårt mål är att göra latenta dimensioner mer korrelerade med metadata, men i praktiken är det ofta exakt motsatsen. Vissa användare vill ha ämnesmodeller som belyser skillnader mellan till exempel författare, men andra söker mer subtila kopplingar mellan författare. Vi introducerar tre mätvärden för att identifiera ämnen som är starkt korrelerade med metadata, och visar att detta problem påverkar mellan 30 och 50% av ämnena i modeller tränade på två verkliga samlingar, oavsett modellens storlek. Vi finner att vi kan förutsäga vilka ord som orsakar detta fenomen och att genom selektivt subsampling av dessa ord minskar vi dramatiskt ämnes-metadata korrelation, förbättrar ämnesstabilitet och upprätthåller eller till och med förbättrar modellkvaliteten.', 'si': 'මෙටාඩාතාවයේ ඉදිරියට පිරිසිදුම වැඩක් නැති සැමැන්තික මොඩේටික් විදියට හිතුවා අපේ අරමුණය තමයි මෙටාඩාතාවයෙන් වඩා සම්බන්ධ වෙන් සමහර ප්\u200dරයෝජකයෝ අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ විදිහට වෙනස් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය, උදාහරණයෙන්, ලේඛකය, නමුත් අනිත් ලේඛකයෙන්  අපි මෙටාඩේටා එක්ක ගොඩක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තුනක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තියෙනවා, ඒ වගේම මෙටාඩේටා එක්ක ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්න අපිට හොයාගන්න පුළුවන් කියලා අපිට පුළුවන් විශ්වාස කරන්න මොන වචන දෙයක් මේ සිද්ධ වෙන්නේ කියලා, ඒ වගේම අපි මේ වචන් විශ්වාස සංවේදනය අ', 'ta': 'மெட்டேடா இருப்பதில் பெரும்பாலான முந்தைய வேலை பாதுகாப்பாக்கப்படாத மாதிரியில் முன்னாலும் செய்திருக்கிறது நமது இலக்கு சமீபத்தில் வடி Name நாம் மூன்று முறைகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும், மாதிரியின் அளவு இல்லாமல், இந்த பிரச்சினையை மாதிரிகளில் பயிற்சி செய்யப்பட்ட இரண்டு உண்மையான உலக தொகுப்புகளில் 30 இந்த வார்த்தைகள் என்ன காரணம் என்பதை நாம் முன்வாக்க முடியும் என்று நாம் கண்டுபிடிக்க முடியும் என்று, இந்த வார்த்தைகளை தேர்ந்தெடுத்தால் இந்த வார்', 'ur': 'مٹا ڈاٹا کے حضور بہت سے پہلے کی عملیات مٹا ڈاٹا کے مطابق غیر قائم ہوئی سیمنٹی موڈلینگ میں ہے یہ سمجھ رہا ہے کہ ہمارا مقصد یہ ہے کہ لاٹینٹ ڈاٹا ڈاٹا ڈاٹا سے زیادہ تعلق کرنا ہے لیکن عملیات میں دقیق مخال بعض کارساز ٹوپ موڈل چاہتے ہیں جو لکھنے والوں کے درمیان تفاوت ہیلاک کرتی ہیں، مثال کے لئے، لیکن دوسرے لکھنے والوں کے درمیان زیادہ کم اتصال تلاش کرتے ہیں. ہم تین متریک کو معلوم کرتے ہیں جو مٹا ڈیٹا کے ساتھ بہت سی تعلق ہے اور دکھاتے ہیں کہ یہ مسئلہ 30 اور 50% کے درمیان موضوع کو دو حقیقی دنیاوی جماعتوں پر آموزش کی جاتی ہے، ماڈل کی اندازہ کے بغیر بھی۔ ہمیں معلوم ہے کہ ہم بتائیں کہ کس کلمات کو یہ روشنی کا سبب بنا رہے ہیں اور یہ کلمات کو انتخاب سے زیادہ زیادہ کم کر رہے ہیں، موضوع ثابت قدم سے زیادہ کم کر رہے ہیں، اور موڈل کی کیفیت کو بھی ادا کر رہے ہیں یا بھی زیادہ اچھی کر رہے ہیں.', 'uz': "Koʻpchilik taʼminlovchi semantik modelidagi ishni metadata mavjud deb tushunadi, bizning eng oxirgi chegaralarni metadata bilan ko'proq bog'liq qilishimiz mumkin, lekin harakat qilishda juda ham ham ko'p true. Some users want topic models that highlight differences between, for example, authors, but others seek more subtle connections across authors.  Biz juda katta metadata bilan bog'liq mavzularni aniqlash uchun uchta metrikni anglatamiz va bu muammola modelning oʻlchami bilan o'rganish mumkin, bu muammolarning 30- 50% dan 50% mavzuga ega beradi. Biz shunday so'zlar qanday so'zlar sabablarini predictincha qilamiz va bu so'zlarni tanlangan so'zlarni o'zgartirishimiz mumkin, mavzu stabilisini oshirish, modelning sifatini ko'paytirish va o'zgartirish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Phần lớn tác phẩm trước của việc tạo mẫu đơn không được giám sát trong sự hiện diện của siêu dữ liệu đã cho rằng mục tiêu của chúng ta là làm cho các kích thước tiềm ẩn phù hợp với siêu dữ liệu, nhưng trong thực tế thì ngược lại thường là đúng. Một số người dùng muốn các mô hình chủ đề đề đề đề đề làm sáng tỏ sự khác nhau giữa các tác giả, nhưng một số khác tìm kiếm những kết nối tinh tế hơn. Chúng tôi giới thiệu ba thước đo để xác định các chủ đề có mối quan hệ chặt chẽ với siêu dữ liệu, và chứng minh rằng vấn đề này ảnh hưởng đến giữa 30 và 50+ các chủ đề trong các mô hình được huấn luyện trên hai bộ sưu tập thế giới thực, bất kể kích thước của mô hình. Chúng ta có thể dự đoán từ nào gây ra hiện tượng này, và bằng cách ẩn mình các từ này, chúng ta sẽ giảm tối đa mối tương quan về siêu dữ liệu, cải thiện tính ổn định chủ đề, và duy trì hoặc thậm chí cải thiện chất lượng mô hình.', 'bg': 'Повечето предишни работи по ненадзорни семантични модели в присъствието на метаданни предполагат, че нашата цел е да направим латентните измерения по-корелирани с метаданните, но на практика често е вярно точно обратното. Някои потребители искат тематични модели, които подчертават разликите между, например, авторите, но други търсят по-фини връзки между авторите. Въвеждаме три показателя за идентифициране на теми, които са силно свързани с метаданните, и демонстрираме, че този проблем засяга между 30 и 50% от темите в модели, обучени по две колекции от реалния свят, независимо от размера на модела. Откриваме, че можем да предскажем кои думи причиняват това явление и че чрез селективно подмодулиране на тези думи драстично намаляваме корелацията тема-метаданни, подобряваме стабилността на темата и поддържаме или дори подобряваме качеството на модела.', 'nl': 'Het meeste eerdere werk in onbeheerde semantische modellering in aanwezigheid van metadata heeft aangenomen dat ons doel is om latente dimensies meer gecorreleerd te maken met metadata, maar in de praktijk is vaak het exacte tegenovergestelde waar. Sommige gebruikers willen topic modellen die verschillen benadrukken tussen bijvoorbeeld auteurs, maar anderen zoeken subtielere verbanden tussen auteurs. We introduceren drie statistieken voor het identificeren van onderwerpen die sterk gecorreleerd zijn met metadata, en tonen aan dat dit probleem betrekking heeft op tussen 30 en 50% van de onderwerpen in modellen die zijn getraind op twee real-world collecties, ongeacht de grootte van het model. We ontdekken dat we kunnen voorspellen welke woorden dit fenomeen veroorzaken en dat we door deze woorden selectief te subsamplen drastisch de topic-metadata correlatie verminderen, de topic stabiliteit verbeteren en de modelkwaliteit behouden of zelfs verbeteren.', 'da': 'De fleste tidligere arbejder med uovervåget semantisk modellering i tilstedeværelse af metadata har antaget, at vores mål er at gøre latente dimensioner mere korreleret med metadata, men i praksis er det nøjagtige modsatte ofte sandt. Nogle brugere ønsker emnemodeller, der fremhæver forskelle mellem f.eks. forfattere, men andre søger mere subtile forbindelser på tværs af forfattere. Vi introducerer tre metrics til at identificere emner, der er stærkt korreleret med metadata, og demonstrerer, at dette problem påvirker mellem 30 og 50% af emnerne i modeller, der er trænet på to virkelige samlinger, uanset modellens størrelse. Vi finder ud af, at vi kan forudsige, hvilke ord der forårsager dette fænomen, og at ved selektivt subsampling af disse ord reducerer vi dramatisk emne-metadata korrelation, forbedrer emnestabiliteten og opretholder eller endda forbedrer modelkvaliteten.', 'hr': 'Većina prethodnog rada u neodređenom semantičkom modelima u prisutnosti metapodataka pretpostavila je da je naš cilj učiniti latentne dimenzije povezanije s metapodacima, ali u praksi je često tačno suprotno istinito. Neki korisnici žele modele teme koji naglašavaju razlike između, na primjer, autora, ali drugi traže suptilne veze između autora. Predstavljamo tri metrike za identifikaciju teme koje su vrlo povezani s metapodacima i pokazujemo da ovaj problem utječe na 30 do 50% teme u modelima obučenim na dva kolekcija stvarnog svijeta, bez obzira na veličinu modela. Nalazimo da možemo predvidjeti koje riječi uzrokuju ovaj fenomen i da, selektivno potpojeći te riječi, dramatično smanjujemo korelaciju temskih metapodataka, poboljšavamo stabilnost teme i održavamo ili čak poboljšavamo kvalitetu modela.', 'id': 'Kebanyakan pekerjaan sebelumnya dalam model semantis tidak diawasi dalam kehadiran metadata telah mengasumsikan bahwa tujuan kita adalah membuat dimensi tersembunyi lebih berkorelasi dengan metadata, tetapi pada praktek kebalikannya sering benar. Beberapa pengguna ingin model topik yang menyatakan perbedaan antara, misalnya, penulis, tetapi yang lain mencari koneksi yang lebih halus di antara penulis. Kami memperkenalkan tiga metrik untuk mengidentifikasi topik yang sangat berkorelasi dengan metadata, dan menunjukkan bahwa masalah ini mempengaruhi antara 30 dan 50% topik dalam model yang dilatih pada dua koleksi dunia nyata, tidak peduli ukuran model. Kami menemukan bahwa kita dapat memprediksi kata-kata mana yang menyebabkan fenomena ini dan bahwa dengan secara selektif subsampel kata-kata ini kita dramatis mengurangi korelasi topik-metadata, meningkatkan stabilitas topik, dan mempertahankan atau bahkan meningkatkan kualitas model.', 'de': 'Die meisten bisherigen Arbeiten in der unüberwachten semantischen Modellierung in Gegenwart von Metadaten gehen davon aus, dass unser Ziel darin besteht, latente Dimensionen stärker mit Metadaten zu korrelieren, aber in der Praxis ist oft das genaue Gegenteil der Fall. Einige Benutzer möchten Themenmodelle, die Unterschiede zwischen beispielsweise Autoren hervorheben, aber andere suchen subtilere Verbindungen zwischen Autoren. Wir führen drei Metriken für die Identifizierung von Themen ein, die stark mit Metadaten korrelieren, und zeigen, dass dieses Problem zwischen 30 und 50% der Themen in Modellen betrifft, die auf zwei realen Sammlungen trainiert wurden, unabhängig von der Größe des Modells. Wir stellen fest, dass wir vorhersagen können, welche Wörter dieses Phänomen verursachen und dass wir durch gezielte Subsampling dieser Wörter die Korrelation zwischen Thema und Metadaten drastisch reduzieren, die Themenstabilität verbessern und die Modellqualität erhalten oder sogar verbessern.', 'ko': '원데이터가 존재하는 무감독의 의미 모델링에 있어 이전의 대다수 업무는 우리의 목표가 잠재적인 차원과 원데이터가 더욱 관련되도록 하는 것이라고 가정했지만 실천에서 상황은 정반대였다.일부 사용자는 테마 모델이 작가 간의 차이를 돋보이게 하기를 원하지만, 다른 사용자들은 작가 간에 더욱 미묘한 관계를 맺기를 원한다.우리는 세 가지 지표를 도입하여 원 데이터의 높이와 관련된 주제를 식별하고 이 문제가 두 실제 세계 집합에서 훈련하는 모델 중 30%에서 50%의 주제에 영향을 미칠 수 있음을 증명한다. 모델의 크기를 막론하고.우리는 어떤 단어가 이런 현상을 초래할지 예측할 수 있다. 선택적으로 이런 단어를 2차 표본 추출을 통해 우리는 주제원 데이터의 관련성을 현저하게 낮추고 주제의 안정성을 높일 수 있으며 심지어 모델의 질을 향상시킬 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Kazi nyingi zilizopita katika mifano ya kishindani isiyo na uhakika katika uwepo wa taarifa za metadata imedhani kuwa lengo letu ni kufanya mitazamo ya hivi karibuni yanayohusiana zaidi na taarifa za meta, lakini katika mazingira ya kinyume chake ni kweli mara nyingi. Baadhi ya watumiaji wanahitaji mifano ya mada inayoonyesha tofauti kati ya, kwa mfano, waandishi, lakini wengine wanatafuta viungo vizuri zaidi kwa waandishi. Tunawasilisha mbinu tatu kwa kutambua mada zinazohusiana sana na taarifa za meta, na kuonyesha kwamba tatizo hili linaathiri kati ya asilimia 30 na 50 ya mada katika mifano inayofundishwa kwa mikusanyiko miwili ya dunia halisi bila kujali ukubwa wa mifano. Tunapata kwamba tunaweza kutabiri maneno gani yanasababisha hali hii na kwamba kwa kutangaza maneno haya kwa uchaguzi tunapunguza uhusiano wa taarifa za mada, kuboresha ustawi wa mada, na kuhakikisha au kuboresha viwango vya mifano.', 'tr': 'Metadata bolan öňki işiň köp görnüşmegen semantik modelleşdirýän işlerimiziň maksadymyz metadata bilen ýakyn öňki ölçümleri döretmekdir diýip pikir edýär, ýöne praktika çenli nusgatymyz köplenç doğrudyr. Käbir ulananlar meýdança nusgalary ýagtylamak üçin meýdança örän üýtgeşmeleri isleýär, ýöne başgalar awtorlaryň arasynda gaty kiçi baglaýyşlary gözleýär. Biz metadata bilen ylalaşykly temalary tanamak üçin üç metrik bilen alýarys we bu meseleniň 30 we 50% sany nusgalaryň iki dünýäde bilim sistemasynda täsir edýändigini görkez. Biz bu äpişgäniň nähili sözleriniň sebäpli bolandygyny tahmin edip bileris we bu sözlerin üstüne süýtgedeniňi tema-meta-daňlygyny aşdyryp, tema stabiliýatyny gowurap, we nusgasyny sagda we hatda nusgasyny gowurap bileris.', 'af': 'Die meeste vorige werk in ononderwerpende semantiese modellering in die voorsiening van metadata het aangeneem dat ons doel is om latente dimensies meer verbind te maak met metadata, maar in praksie die presies teenwoordig is dikwels waar. Sommige gebruikers wil onderwerp modele hê wat verlig verskilte tussen, byvoorbeeld, outeure, maar ander soek meer onderwerp verbindings oor outeure. Ons introduseer drie metries vir die identifiseer van onderwerpe wat baie verbind is met metadata, en wys dat hierdie probleem beïnvloor tussen 30 en 50% van die onderwerpe in modele wat onderwerp is op twee reël wêreld versameling, ongeag van die grootte van die model. Ons vind dat ons kan voorskou watter woorde hierdie fenomen veroorsaak en dat deur selekteer hierdie woorde ondersteun, ons dramatiese onderwerp-metadata-korrelasie, onderwerp onderwerp stabiliteit en onderhou of selfs verbeter model kwaliteit.', 'sq': 'Shumica e punës së mëparshme në modelimin semantik pa mbikqyrje në praninë e metatë ka supozuar se qëllimi ynë është të bëjmë dimensionet e fshehta më të korrelacionuara me metatë, por në praktikë e kundërta është shpesh e vërtetë. Disa përdorues duan modele tematike që theksojnë dallimet midis, për shembull, autorëve, por të tjerë kërkojnë lidhje më subtile midis autorëve. Ne futim tre metrika për identifikimin e temave që janë shumë të lidhura me metatë dhe demonstrojmë se ky problem ndikon midis 30 dhe 50% të temave në modele të trajnuara në dy koleksione të botës reale, pavarësisht nga madhësia e modelit. We find that we can predict which words cause this phenomenon and that by selectively subsampling these words we dramatically reduce topic-metadata correlation, improve topic stability, and maintain or even improve model quality.', 'am': 'ብዙዎቹ በተጠበቀው ስምናኒካዊ ምሳሌ በመሆኗ በመዳረጃዎች አካሄዱን አቃውሞ የፍላጎታችንን እውቀት ከmetadata ጋር እንዲያበዛ ነው፡፡ አንዳንዶች ተጠቃሚዎች የውይይት ምሳሌ፣ ጸሐፊዎች እና ሌሎች ግን በጸሐፊዎቹ መካከል የተጨማሪን ግንኙነት ይፈልጋሉ፡፡ በሙሉ የሚታሰሩ መሆኑን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ ይህንን ቃላት ማንኛውን እንዲያሳየው እና እነዚህን ቃሎች በተመረጠን አካባቢ እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Անցյալ աշխատանքի մեծ մասը ոչ վերահսկված սեմանտիկ մոդելավորման մեջ մետատվյալների ներկայությամբ ենթադրել է, որ մեր նպատակն է ավելի կապված դարձնել թաքնված չափերը մետատվյալների հետ, բայց իրականում հակառակը հակառակը հաճախ ճիշտ է: Որոշ օգտագործողներ ուզում են թեմային մոդելներ, որոնք նշանակում են, օրինակ, հեղինակների միջև տարբերությունները, բայց ուրիշները ավելի նուրբ կապեր են փնտրում հեղինակների միջև: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք երեք մետրիկ, որպեսզի բացահայտենք թեմաներ, որոնք շատ կապված են մետատվյալների հետ, և ցույց ենք տալիս, որ այս խնդիրը ազդում է նյութերի 30-50 տոկոսի միջև երկու իրական աշխարհի հավաքածուների մեջ, անկախ մոդելի չափից: Մենք հայտնաբերում ենք, որ մենք կարող ենք կանխատեսել, թե ինչ բառեր են առաջացնում այս երևույթին և որ ընտրական ենթագծելով այս բառերը մենք դրամական նվազեցնում ենք թեմա-մետատվյալների կապը, բարելավում թեմայի կայունությունը, պահպանում կամ նույնիսկ բարելավում ենք մոդելի', 'bn': 'মেটাডার উপস্থিতির উপস্থিতিতে অরক্ষিত সেমান্টিক মডেলের বেশীরভাগ কাজ ধারণা করেছে যে আমাদের লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সম্প্রতি মেটাডাটার সাথে আরো সম্পর্কিত কিছু ব্যবহারকারীরা বিষয়বস্তু মডেল চায় যেগুলোর মধ্যে পার্থক্য উল্লেখ করে, যেমন লেখক, কিন্তু অন্যরা লেখকদের সাথে আর আমরা তিনটি মিট্রিক চিহ্নিত করি যা মেটাডারের সাথে অত্যন্ত সংশ্লিষ্ট বিষয় চিহ্নিত করার জন্য এবং প্রদর্শন করি যে এই সমস্যা মডেলের মাঝে ৩০ থেকে ৫০% বিষয়ের উপর প্রভাব ফেলে দে We find that we can predict which words cause this phenomenon and that by selectively subsampling these words we dramatically reduce topic-metadata correlation, improve topic stability, and maintain or even improve model quality.', 'bs': 'Većina prethodnog rada u neodređenom semantičkom modelima u prisutnosti metapodataka pretpostavila je da je naš cilj da se latentne dimenzije više povezuju sa metapodacima, ali u praksi je tačno suprotno često istinito. Neki korisnici žele modele teme koji naglašavaju razlike između, na primjer, autora, ali drugi traže suptilne veze preko autora. Predstavljamo tri metrike za identifikaciju teme koje su vrlo povezani sa metapodacima i pokazujemo da ovaj problem utječe na 30 do 50% teme u modelima obučenim na dva kolekcija realnog svijeta, bez obzira na veličinu modela. Nalazimo da možemo predvidjeti koje riječi uzrokuju ovaj fenomen i da, selektivno potpojeći te riječi, dramatično smanjujemo korelaciju tema-metadatova, poboljšavamo stabilnost teme, i održavamo ili čak poboljšavamo kvalitet modela.', 'ca': "La majoria dels treballs anteriors en la modelació semàntica sense supervisió en presença de metadades han assumit que el nostre objectiu és fer les dimensions latents més correlacionades amb les metadades, però en la pràctica el contrari és sovint veritat. Alguns usuaris volen models de tema que destaquen les diferències entre, per exemple, autors, però altres busquen conexions més subtils entre autors. Introduïm tres mètriques per identificar temes altament correlats amb les metadades, i demostram que aquest problema afecta entre el 30 i el 50% dels temes en models entrenats en dues col·leccions del món real, independentment de la mida del model. Trobem que podem predir quines paraules provoquen aquest fenomen i que, subsamplando selectivament aquestes paraules, reduïm dramàticament la correlació entre tema i metadades, millorem l'estabilitat del tema i mantenim o fins i tot millorem la qualitat del model.", 'cs': 'Většina předchozích prací v bezdozorovém sémantickém modelování za přítomnosti metadat předpokládá, že naším cílem je zvýšit korelaci latentních dimenzí s metadaty, ale v praxi je často pravda přesný opak. Někteří uživatelé chtějí tématické modely, které zdůrazňují rozdíly například mezi autory, ale jiní hledají jemnější spojení mezi autory. Představujeme tři metriky pro identifikaci témat, která jsou vysoce korelovaná s metadaty, a demonstrujeme, že tento problém ovlivňuje mezi 30 a 50% témat modelů trénovaných na dvou reálných sbírkách, bez ohledu na velikost modelu. Zjišťujeme, že můžeme předpovědět, která slova tento jev způsobují a že selektivním subvzorkováním těchto slov dramaticky snižujeme korelaci témat-metadat, zlepšujeme stabilitu témat a udržujeme či dokonce zlepšujeme kvalitu modelu.', 'fa': 'بیشتر کارهای قبلی در مدل\u200cسازی semantic غیرقابل توجه در حضور متداده فرض کرده است که هدف ما این است که اندازه\u200cهای latent با متداده\u200cها بیشتر ارتباط داشته باشیم، ولی در تمرین برعکس دقیق اغلب حقیقت است. بعضی از کاربران می\u200cخواهند مدل\u200cهای موضوع را که تفاوت بین مثال، نویسندگان را مشخص می\u200cکنند، ولی بقیه از طریق نویسندگان ارتباط\u200cهای زیادی بیشتر می\u200cخواهند. ما سه متری را برای شناسایی موضوع که با متداده های زیادی ارتباط دارند معرفی می کنیم، و نشان می دهیم که این مشکل بین ۳۰ تا ۵۰ درصد موضوع را در مدل\u200cهای آموزش داده شده در دو جمع\u200cآوری دنیای واقعی تحت تاثیر قرار می\u200cدهد، با وجود اندازه مدل. ما می توانیم پیش بینی کنیم که کدام کلمات باعث این پدیده شدن است و با انتخاب انتخاب این کلمات را به شدت تعامل موضوع و متداده\u200cهای موضوع کاهش می\u200cدهیم، استواری موضوع را بهبود می\u200cدهیم، و حتی کیفیت مدل را حفظ می\u200cکنیم یا حتی بهتر می\u200cکنیم.', 'et': 'Enamik varasemaid järelevalveta semantilise modelleerimise töid metaandmete juuresolekul on eeldanud, et meie eesmärk on muuta latentsed dimensioonid metaandmetega paremini korrelatsiooniliseks, kuid praktikas on tihti tõsi täpselt vastupidine. Mõned kasutajad soovivad teemamudeleid, mis rõhutavad näiteks autorite erinevusi, kuid teised otsivad autorite vahel peenemaid seoseid. Tutvustame kolme mõõdikut teemade tuvastamiseks, mis on metaandmetega kõrgelt korrelatsioonis, ning näitame, et see probleem mõjutab 30–50% teemadest mudelites, mis on koolitatud kahe reaalmaailma kollektsiooniga, olenemata mudeli suurusest. Leiame, et suudame ennustada, millised sõnad seda nähtust põhjustavad ja et nende sõnade valikulise alamvõimendamisega vähendame oluliselt teema-metaandmete korrelatsiooni, parandame teema stabiilsust ja säilitame või isegi parandame mudeli kvaliteeti.', 'fi': 'Useimmat aiemmat valvomattoman semanttisen mallinnuksen työt metatiedon läsnä ollessa ovat olettaneet, että tavoitteenamme on tehdä piilevistä ulottuvuuksista enemmän korreloituneita metatietoihin, mutta käytännössä täsmälleen päinvastainen on usein totta. Jotkut käyttäjät haluavat teemamalleja, jotka korostavat esimerkiksi kirjoittajien välisiä eroja, mutta toiset etsivät hienovaraisempia yhteyksiä kirjoittajien välillä. Esittelemme kolme mittaria sellaisten aiheiden tunnistamiseksi, jotka korreloivat voimakkaasti metatietoihin, ja osoitamme, että ongelma vaikuttaa 30–50 prosenttiin malleissa, jotka on koulutettu kahteen reaalimaailman kokoelmiin, riippumatta mallin koosta. Havaitsemme, että voimme ennustaa mitkä sanat aiheuttavat tämän ilmiön ja että valikoimalla näitä sanoja aliarvioimme merkittävästi aihe-metadatan korrelaatiota, parannamme aiheen vakautta ja ylläpidämme tai jopa parannamme mallin laatua.', 'az': 'Əvvəlki işlər metadata vasitəsində müəyyən edilməmiş semantik modellərdə çox əvvəlki işlər məqsədimizin metadata ilə daha yaxınlaşdırılması olduğunu iddia edir, amma praksidə tam tersi çox doğrudur. Bazı istifadəçilər təsəvvür modellərini istəyirlər ki, məsələn, yazıcılar arasındakı fərqliyi işıqlandırır, amma digərləri yazıcılar arasında daha çox çətin bağlantıları axtarır. Biz metadata ilə çox bağlı olan məsələləri tanıtmaq üçün üç metrik təşkil edirik və bu problem in modellərin böyüklüyünə baxmayaraq 30-50% arasında təşkil edildiyini göstəririk. Biz bu fenomenin nə sözlərinin səbəbi olduğunu təmin edirik və bu sözləri seçimlə dəyişdirirək, tema-metadata bağlantısını dəyişdirir, məsələlərin stabiliyyətini düzəltərək və modellərin keyfiyyətini qoruyub saxlayacağıq və ya hətta düzəltərək.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem sing gak nggawe semanti kuwi ora bisa perusahaan metadata anyar iki dadi, nik awak dhéwé tanggal nggawe Dimension sing beraksi barêng metadata, lho ngomong in praksi yang pakan-pakan sing apik tenan. Perintah bener tentang model tema sing nglanggar kalambut nang sampek, sampek, penulih, uga maneh sing nganggo sampeyan luwih basa sing paling autor. Awak dhéwé éntuk sistem telu maneh kanggo nggawe tema sing luwih dumateng iki dadi metadata, lan ngono nggambaran kuwi kesempakan iki sak cara-sak 30 lan 30% sing pernik tema sing ditambah ning model iki dadi nggawe barang langgar sampeyan gerusahaan iki, gawe kaya langgar sampeyan model. Awak dhéwé iso nglanggar ngerti pawaran kuwi nggawe Perintah menehi iki ngono nglanggar ujaran gambaran iki kita dadi nggawe gerakan perusahaan metadata nggawe tema-metadata, luwih basa stabil atik lan ngawe isih bakal terus mèd.', 'sk': 'Večina prejšnjih del v nenadzorovanem semantičnem modeliranju v prisotnosti metapodatkov je predvidevala, da je naš cilj, da bi latentne dimenzije bolj korelacirale z metapodatki, vendar je v praksi pogosto ravno nasprotno. Nekateri uporabniki želijo tematske modele, ki poudarjajo razlike med avtorji, na primer, drugi pa iščejo bolj subtilne povezave med avtorji. Predstavljamo tri meritve za prepoznavanje teme, ki so močno povezane z metapodatki, in dokazujemo, da ta problem vpliva med 30 in 50% teme v modelih, usposobljenih za dve resnični zbirki, ne glede na velikost modela. Ugotavljamo, da lahko predvidimo, katere besede povzročajo ta pojav in da s selektivnim podvzorčenjem teh besed dramatično zmanjšamo korelacijo tema-metapodatki, izboljšamo stabilnost teme in ohranjamo ali celo izboljšujemo kakovost modela.', 'ha': "Babu mafi yawan aikin da aka riga a a cikin misalin da aka tsare na semantic a presence of metadata sun yi zaton goanmu za ta sanya duffai masu ƙaranci mafi ɗauki da metadata, kuma amma a cikin aikin da ke daidaita motsi daidai na gaske ne. Babu wasu masu amfani da shi, suna son misãlai masu haske diffaniki a tsakanin, misali, ma'abũta, kuma amma wasu suna nẽman tsari masu ƙaranci a tsakanin marubuci. Tuna ƙara mitomi uku dõmin ka gane topogi waɗanda ke da girmama sana da metadata, kuma ke nuna cewa wannan muammãni yana yi wa amfani da tsakanin 30 da 50% daga maɓalli cikin misalin an sanar da su a cikin dukka biyu masu cikin duniya gaskiyar, kuma ko da girma na motel. Tuna gane cewa munã iya gane cewa wanne maganar za'a halatar da wannan abu, kuma a kanza mu ƙara muhimmada-metadata, za'a kyautata tabbatarwa ga madaidaici, kuma za mu tsare ko ko ko kuma za mu kyautata sifar misali.", 'he': 'רוב העבודה הקודמת בהדגמה סמנטית ללא השגחה בנוכחות מטאנתות הנחה שהמטרה שלנו היא לגרום למימדים הלא מוגבלים להתחבר יותר למטאנתות, אך למעשה ההפך בדיוק לעתים קרובות נכון. חלק משתמשים רוצים דוגמנים נושאים שמדגישים הבדלים בין, לדוגמה, סופרים, אבל אחרים מחפשים קשרים עדינים יותר בין סופרים. אנחנו מציגים שלושה מטריות לזהות נושאים שקשורים באופן גבוה למטאנתות, ולהראות שהבעיה הזאת משפיעה בין 30 ל-50% מהנושאים בדוגמנים מאומנים על שני אוסף עולם אמיתי, ללא קשר לגודל של הדוגמנים. אנו מוצאים שאנחנו יכולים לחזות אילו מילים גורמות לתופעה הזאת, ושעל ידי תחתום בחרותי של מילים אלה אנו מפחידים באופן דרמטי תקשורת נושא-מטנדה, לשפר את יציבות הנושא, ולשמור או אפילו לשפר את איכות המודל.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་ནི་ཕྱོགས་ཉེར་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་རིགས་རྩལ་མེད་པའི་སྔོན་གྱི་ལྟ་བུའི་ནང་དུ་བཏོན་ཡོད་པའི་ཆེས་ཉིད་ཅིག་ཡིན་པས། སྤྱོད་མཁན་ལ་ཤས་ཀྱི་གནད་དོན་མིག་དཔེར་ན། དཔེར་ན། རྩོམ་པ་པོ་དང་། གཞན་པོ་རྣམས་རྩོམ་པ་པོ་དང་མཉམ་དུ་subtle སྦྲེལ ང་ཚོས་མ་ཟད་འཛིན་གྱི་གནད་དོན་དག་ཚང་མི་གཅིག་གི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པའི་མགོ་རིམ་གསུམ་སྟོན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་མཐོང་ཐུབ་པ་དེ་ཡི་གེ་གཟུགས་རིས་འདི་ལ་གསལ་བཤད་ནི་གང་ཡིན་པ་དང་།'}
{'en': 'SGM : Sequence Generation Model for Multi-label Classification', 'ar': 'SGM: نموذج توليد التسلسل لتصنيف متعدد الملصقات', 'es': 'SGM: Modelo de generación de secuencias para la clasificación de etiquetas múltiples', 'pt': 'SGM: Modelo de Geração de Sequência para Classificação Multirrótulo', 'fr': 'SGM\xa0: Modèle de génération de séquences pour la classification multi-étiquettes', 'ja': 'SGM ：マルチラベル分類のためのシーケンス生成モデル', 'hi': 'SGM: मल्टी-लेबल वर्गीकरण के लिए अनुक्रम जनरेशन मॉडल', 'zh': 'SGM:多标其序', 'ru': 'SGM: Модель генерации последовательностей для многоуровневой классификации', 'ga': "SGM: Samhail Ghiniúint Seicheamh d'Aicmiú Illipéad", 'ka': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'hu': 'SGM: Szekvencia generálási modell a többcímkés osztályozáshoz', 'el': 'Μοντέλο δημιουργίας ακολουθίας για την ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών ετικετών', 'lt': 'SGM: Daugiaženklio klasifikavimo sekos generacijos modelis', 'it': 'SGM: Modello di generazione di sequenze per la classificazione multi-etichetta', 'mk': 'SGM: Модел на генерација на секвенција за класификација со повеќе етикети', 'kk': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'ms': 'SGM: Model Jenerasi Sejuwen untuk Klasifikasi Label-berbilang', 'ml': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'mt': 'SGM: Mudell tal-Ġenerazzjoni tas-Sekwenza għall-Klassifikazzjoni Multi-Tikketta', 'mn': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'no': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'pl': 'SGM: Model generowania sekwencji dla klasyfikacji wieloznakowych', 'sr': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'ro': 'SGM: Model de generare a secvențelor pentru clasificarea cu mai multe etichete', 'si': 'SGM: Multi- label Classified', 'so': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'ur': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'sv': 'SGM: Sequence Generation Model for Multi-Label Classification', 'ta': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'uz': 'SGM: Multi- label klassification uchun seans yaratish modeli', 'vi': 'Kiểu tạo chuỗi dãy cho hạng đa nhãn', 'bg': 'SGM: Модел за генериране на последователност за класификация с множество етикети', 'hr': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'de': 'SGM: Sequence Generation Model für Multi-Label Klassifizierung', 'nl': 'SGM: Sequence Generation Model voor Multi-label Classificatie', 'id': 'SGM: Model Generasi Sekuensi untuk Klasifikasi Multi-label', 'da': 'SGM: Sekvensgenereringsmodel for klassificering af flere mærker', 'ko': 'SGM: 다중 태그 분류를 위한 시퀀스 생성 모델', 'fa': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'sw': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'am': 'SGM: Sequence Generation Model for Multi-label Classification', 'sq': 'SGM: Model i Gjenerimit të Sekuencës për Klasifikimin Multi-label', 'af': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'hy': 'ՍԳՄ: Հաջորդականության ստեղծման մոդել բազմաթիվ պիտակների դասավորման համար', 'az': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'bn': 'Please see http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'bs': 'Please take the official translations! You find them here: http: // europa. eu. int/ eur- lex/ lex/ LexUriServ/ LexUriServ. do? uri=CELEX: 32001L0059: EN: HTML', 'ca': 'SGM: Model de generació de seqüències per a classificar múltiples etiquetes', 'cs': 'SGM: Model generování sekvencí pro klasifikaci více štítků', 'tr': 'SGM: Multi-label Classification', 'et': 'SGM: järjestuse genereerimise mudel mitmemärgisega klassifitseerimiseks', 'fi': 'SGM: Sequence Generation Model for Multi-label Classification', 'jv': 'Next >', 'sk': 'SGM: Model generacije zaporedja za razvrščanje več oznak', 'ha': '@ item Spelling dictionary', 'he': 'SGM:', 'bo': 'SGM: Sequence Generation Model for Multi-label Classification'}
{'en': 'Multi-label classification is an important yet challenging task in natural language processing. It is more complex than single-label classification in that the labels tend to be correlated. Existing methods tend to ignore the correlations between labels. Besides, different parts of the text can contribute differently for predicting different labels, which is not considered by existing models. In this paper, we propose to view the multi-label classification task as a sequence generation problem, and apply a sequence generation model with a novel decoder structure to solve it. Extensive experimental results show that our proposed methods outperform previous work by a substantial margin. Further analysis of experimental results demonstrates that the proposed methods not only capture the correlations between labels, but also select the most informative words automatically when predicting different labels.', 'ar': 'يعد التصنيف متعدد العلامات مهمة مهمة ولكنها صعبة في معالجة اللغة الطبيعية. إنه أكثر تعقيدًا من التصنيف أحادي التسمية حيث تميل الملصقات إلى الترابط. تميل الطرق الحالية إلى تجاهل الارتباطات بين التسميات. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يمكن أن تساهم أجزاء مختلفة من النص بشكل مختلف في التنبؤ بالتسميات المختلفة ، وهو ما لا تعتبره النماذج الحالية. في هذا البحث ، نقترح عرض مهمة التصنيف متعدد العلامات على أنها مشكلة إنشاء تسلسل ، وتطبيق نموذج إنشاء تسلسل بهيكل فك ترميز جديد لحلها. تظهر النتائج التجريبية المكثفة أن أساليبنا المقترحة تفوق أداء العمل السابق بهامش كبير. يوضح التحليل الإضافي للنتائج التجريبية أن الطرق المقترحة لا تلتقط فقط الارتباطات بين الملصقات ، بل تحدد أيضًا الكلمات الأكثر إفادة تلقائيًا عند توقع تسميات مختلفة.', 'fr': "La classification multi-étiquettes est une tâche importante mais complexe dans le traitement du langage naturel. Elle est plus complexe que la classification en une seule étiquette dans la mesure où les étiquettes ont tendance à être corrélées. Les méthodes existantes ont tendance à ignorer les corrélations entre les étiquettes. En outre, différentes parties du texte peuvent contribuer différemment à la prédiction des différentes étiquettes, ce qui n'est pas pris en compte par les modèles existants. Dans cet article, nous proposons de considérer la tâche de classification multi-étiquettes comme un problème de génération de séquences, et d'appliquer un modèle de génération de séquence avec une nouvelle structure de décodeur pour le résoudre. Des résultats expérimentaux approfondis montrent que les méthodes que nous proposons surpassent largement les travaux précédents. Une analyse plus poussée des résultats expérimentaux démontre que les méthodes proposées non seulement saisissent les corrélations entre les étiquettes, mais sélectionnent également automatiquement les mots les plus informatifs lors de la prédiction de différentes étiquettes.", 'pt': 'A classificação multirrótulo é uma tarefa importante, porém desafiadora, no processamento de linguagem natural. É mais complexa do que a classificação de rótulo único, pois os rótulos tendem a ser correlacionados. Os métodos existentes tendem a ignorar as correlações entre os rótulos. Além disso, diferentes partes do texto podem contribuir de forma diferente para a previsão de diferentes rótulos, o que não é considerado pelos modelos existentes. Neste artigo, propomos ver a tarefa de classificação multirrótulo como um problema de geração de sequência e aplicar um modelo de geração de sequência com uma nova estrutura de decodificador para resolvê-lo. Extensos resultados experimentais mostram que nossos métodos propostos superam o trabalho anterior por uma margem substancial. Uma análise mais aprofundada dos resultados experimentais demonstra que os métodos propostos não apenas capturam as correlações entre os rótulos, mas também selecionam as palavras mais informativas automaticamente ao prever diferentes rótulos.', 'es': 'La clasificación de etiquetas múltiples es una tarea importante pero desafiante en el procesamiento del lenguaje natural. Es más compleja que la clasificación de una sola etiqueta, ya que las etiquetas tienden a estar correlacionadas. Los métodos existentes tienden a ignorar las correlaciones entre las etiquetas. Además, diferentes partes del texto pueden contribuir de manera diferente a la predicción de diferentes etiquetas, lo que no se tiene en cuenta en los modelos existentes. En este artículo, proponemos ver la tarea de clasificación de etiquetas múltiples como un problema de generación de secuencias y aplicar un modelo de generación de secuencias con una estructura de decodificador novedosa para resolverlo. Los amplios resultados experimentales muestran que nuestros métodos propuestos superan el trabajo anterior por un margen sustancial. Un análisis más detallado de los resultados experimentales demuestra que los métodos propuestos no solo capturan las correlaciones entre las etiquetas, sino que también seleccionan las palabras más informativas automáticamente al predecir diferentes etiquetas.', 'ja': 'マルチラベル分類は、自然言語処理における重要でありながら困難な課題です。ラベルが相関する傾向があるという点で、シングルラベル分類よりも複雑である。既存の方法は、ラベル間の相関を無視する傾向があります。さらに、テキストの異なる部分は、既存のモデルでは考慮されていない異なるラベルを予測するために異なる寄与をすることができます。本稿では，マルチラベル分類課題をシーケンス生成問題として捉え，新規のデコーダ構造を持つシーケンス生成モデルを適用して解くことを提案する．広範囲にわたる実験結果は、提案された方法が以前の仕事をかなり上回っていることを示しています。実験結果のさらなる分析は、提案された方法がラベル間の相関関係を捕捉するだけでなく、異なるラベルを予測するときに最も情報量の多い単語を自動的に選択することを示している。', 'zh': '多标类自然语言一要而有挑战性务。 其比单标签分类更杂,盖标签往往相关也。 今有法向忽标签之相关性。 此外,文本不同,可见不同,此见模之所不虑也。 本文以多署分类为序,而以新型解码器为法。 博之实验结果表明,相去远矣。 实验者益分析表明,所出之法,不独捕其相关性,而占候自择信息量最大者。', 'hi': 'बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण में एक महत्वपूर्ण अभी तक चुनौतीपूर्ण कार्य है। यह एकल-लेबल वर्गीकरण की तुलना में अधिक जटिल है जिसमें लेबल सहसंबद्ध होते हैं। मौजूदा तरीके लेबल के बीच सहसंबंधों को अनदेखा करते हैं। इसके अलावा, पाठ के विभिन्न हिस्से विभिन्न लेबल की भविष्यवाणी करने के लिए अलग-अलग योगदान कर सकते हैं, जिसे मौजूदा मॉडल द्वारा नहीं माना जाता है। इस पेपर में, हम बहु-लेबल वर्गीकरण कार्य को अनुक्रम पीढ़ी की समस्या के रूप में देखने का प्रस्ताव करते हैं, और इसे हल करने के लिए एक उपन्यास विकोडक संरचना के साथ एक अनुक्रम पीढ़ी मॉडल लागू करते हैं। व्यापक प्रयोगात्मक परिणाम बताते हैं कि हमारे प्रस्तावित तरीके पिछले काम को पर्याप्त मार्जिन से बेहतर बनाते हैं। प्रयोगात्मक परिणामों के आगे के विश्लेषण से पता चलता है कि प्रस्तावित तरीके न केवल लेबल के बीच सहसंबंधों को कैप्चर करते हैं, बल्कि विभिन्न लेबलों की भविष्यवाणी करते समय स्वचालित रूप से सबसे अधिक जानकारीपूर्ण शब्दों का चयन भी करते हैं।', 'ru': 'Многоуровневая классификация является важной, но сложной задачей в обработке естественного языка. Он является более сложным, чем классификация с использованием одной этикетки, поскольку этикетки, как правило, коррелируются. Существующие методы, как правило, игнорируют корреляции между метками. Кроме того, различные части текста могут по-разному способствовать прогнозированию различных меток, что не учитывается существующими моделями. В данной работе предлагается рассматривать задачу многоуровневой классификации как задачу генерации последовательностей и для ее решения применять модель генерации последовательностей с новой структурой декодера. Обширные экспериментальные результаты показывают, что предлагаемые нами методы значительно превосходят предыдущую работу. Дальнейший анализ экспериментальных результатов показывает, что предлагаемые методы не только фиксируют корреляции между метками, но и подбирают наиболее информативные слова автоматически при прогнозировании различных меток.', 'ga': 'Is tasc tábhachtach ach dúshlánach é rangú illipéid i bpróiseáil nádúrtha teanga. Tá sé níos casta ná aicmiú aon-lipéid sa mhéid is go mbíonn na lipéid comhghaolaithe de ghnáth. Is gnách go dtugann modhanna atá ann faoi láthair neamhaird ar na comhghaolta idir lipéid. Ina theannta sin, féadfaidh codanna éagsúla den téacs rannchuidiú difriúil a dhéanamh chun lipéid éagsúla a thuar, rud nach measann samhlacha atá ann cheana. Sa pháipéar seo, molaimid féachaint ar an tasc aicmithe il-lipéad mar fhadhb giniúna seicheamh, agus múnla giniúna seicheamh a chur i bhfeidhm le struchtúr díchódóra úrscéal chun é a réiteach. Léiríonn torthaí turgnamhacha fairsinge go sáraíonn ár modhanna molta obair roimhe seo le corrlach suntasach. Léirítear le hanailís bhreise a dhéanamh ar thorthaí na dturgnamh go ndéanann na modhanna atá beartaithe, ní hamháin na comhghaolta idir lipéid a ghabháil, ach freisin go roghnaíonn siad na focail is faisnéiseach go huathoibríoch agus lipéid éagsúla á dtuar.', 'ka': 'Multi-label კლასიფიკაცია არის მნიშვნელოვანი, მაგრამ შესაძლებელი რაოდენობა თავისუფალური ენის პროცესიაში. ეს უფრო კომპლექსიკურია, ვიდრე ერთი ლაბლის კლასიფიკაციაში, რომ ლაბლიები კომპლექსიკურიან. Existing methods tend to ignore the correlations between labels. შემდეგ, ტექსტის განსხვავებული ნაწილები შეიძლება განსხვავებული მარტიკების განსაზღვრება, რომელიც არ იქნება მსგავსი მოდელებით. ამ დომენტში ჩვენ მინდომა მრავალური კლასიფიკაციის დავადგინოთ როგორც წერტილების პრობლემა, და მინდომა წერტილების მოდელს პრობლემა პრობლემა სტრუქტურაციის შესახე გაფართლებული ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენა, რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენებული მეტოვები უფრო მნიშვნელოვანი სამუშაოდ გავაკეთება. ექსპერიმენტიური წარმოდგენების დამატებით ანალიზია, რომ პროგენტირებული მეტოვები არა მხოლოდ მარტივის შორის კორელაციები, მაგრამ აირჩიეთ ყველაზე ინფორმაციური სიტყვე', 'it': "La classificazione multi-etichetta è un compito importante ma impegnativo nell'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale. È più complessa della classificazione monoetichetta in quanto le etichette tendono ad essere correlate. I metodi esistenti tendono ad ignorare le correlazioni tra etichette. Inoltre, diverse parti del testo possono contribuire in modo diverso per prevedere etichette diverse, cosa che non è considerata dai modelli esistenti. In questo articolo, proponiamo di vedere il compito di classificazione multi-etichetta come un problema di generazione di sequenza e applicare un modello di generazione di sequenza con una nuova struttura di decodificatore per risolverlo. Ampi risultati sperimentali dimostrano che i nostri metodi proposti superano notevolmente il lavoro precedente. Un'ulteriore analisi dei risultati sperimentali dimostra che i metodi proposti non solo catturano le correlazioni tra etichette, ma selezionano automaticamente le parole più informative quando predicono etichette diverse.", 'hu': 'A többcímkés osztályozás fontos, mégis kihívást jelentő feladat a természetes nyelvfeldolgozásban. Ez bonyolultabb, mint az egycímkés osztályozás, mivel a címkék általában korrelálódnak. A meglévő módszerek hajlamosak figyelmen kívül hagyni a címkék közötti összefüggéseket. Emellett a szöveg különböző részei eltérően járulhatnak hozzá a különböző címkék előrejelzéséhez, amit a meglévő modellek nem vesznek figyelembe. Ebben a tanulmányban azt javasoljuk, hogy a többcímkés osztályozási feladatot sorozatgyártási problémának tekintsük, és egy új dekóderstruktúrával rendelkező sorozatgyártási modell alkalmazásával oldjuk meg. A kiterjedt kísérleti eredmények azt mutatják, hogy javasolt módszereink jelentős mértékben felülmúlják a korábbi munkákat. A kísérleti eredmények további elemzése azt mutatja, hogy a javasolt módszerek nemcsak a címkék közötti korrelációkat rögzítik, hanem automatikusan kiválasztják a leginformatívabb szavakat a különböző címkék előrejelzésekor.', 'el': 'Η ταξινόμηση πολλαπλών ετικετών είναι μια σημαντική αλλά προκλητική εργασία στην επεξεργασία φυσικής γλώσσας. Είναι πιο περίπλοκη από την ταξινόμηση μίας ετικέτας, δεδομένου ότι οι ετικέτες τείνουν να συσχετίζονται. Οι υπάρχουσες μέθοδοι τείνουν να αγνοούν τους συσχετισμούς μεταξύ ετικετών. Εκτός αυτού, διαφορετικά μέρη του κειμένου μπορούν να συμβάλουν διαφορετικά για την πρόβλεψη διαφορετικών ετικετών, κάτι που δεν λαμβάνεται υπόψη από τα υπάρχοντα μοντέλα. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε να δούμε την εργασία ταξινόμησης πολλαπλών ετικετών ως πρόβλημα δημιουργίας ακολουθίας, και να εφαρμόσουμε ένα μοντέλο παραγωγής ακολουθίας με μια νέα δομή αποκωδικοποιητή για να το λύσουμε. Τα εκτεταμένα πειραματικά αποτελέσματα δείχνουν ότι οι προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι ξεπερνούν σημαντικά τις προηγούμενες εργασίες. Περαιτέρω ανάλυση των πειραματικών αποτελεσμάτων αποδεικνύει ότι οι προτεινόμενες μέθοδοι όχι μόνο καταγράφουν τις συσχετίσεις μεταξύ ετικετών, αλλά και επιλέγουν αυτόματα τις πιο ενημερωτικές λέξεις κατά την πρόβλεψη διαφορετικών ετικετών.', 'kk': 'Көп белгілер классификациясы - табиғи тілдерді өңдеу үшін маңызды, бірақ әсер ететін тапсырма. Жарлықтар бір жарлық жарлықтардан бір жарлық жарлықтардан артық болып жатыр. Бар әдістер жарлықтар арасындағы сәйкестіктерді елемейді. Мәтіннің әртүрлі бөлігі басқа жарлықтарын алдын ала алу үшін әртүрлі түрлі жарлықтарды алдын ала алады. Бұл үлгілер болмайды. Бұл қағазда біз бірнеше белгілерді тапсырманы реттеу мәселесі ретінде қарау және реттеу үшін романдық декодер құрылғысын шешу үшін реттеу үлгісін қолданамыз. Кеңейтілген тәжірибелі нәтижелер біздің таңдалған әдістеріміз алдыңғы жұмыс ішінде көп жиегі бойынша істейді. Тәжірибелі нәтижелердің қосымша анализ жарлықтар арасындағы көмектесулерді тек жарлықтардың көмектесулерін алмайтынын көрсетеді, бірақ басқа жарлықтарды алдында оның көмектесулер', 'lt': 'Daugiaženklis klasifikavimas yra svarbus, tačiau sudėtingas uždavinys gamtos kalbų apdorojimo srityje. Tai sudėtingesnė nei vienos etiketės klasifikacija, nes etiketės paprastai koreliuojamos. Esami metodai paprastai ignoruoja etikečių koreliacijas. Besides, different parts of the text can contribute differently for predicting different labels, which is not considered by existing models.  Šiame dokumente siūlome, kad daugiametės klasifikacijos užduotis būtų laikoma sekos generacijos problem a ir kad būtų galima ją išspręsti taikant sekos generacijos model į su nauja dekoderio struktūra. Išsamūs eksperimentiniai rezultatai rodo, kad mūsų siūlomi metodai gerokai viršija ankstesnį darbą. Tolesnė eksperimentinių rezultatų analizė rodo, kad siūlomi metodai ne tik apima etikečių koreliacijas, bet ir automatiškai pasirinka informaciniausius žodžius, nuspėjant skirtingas etiketes.', 'mk': 'Класификацијата со повеќе ознаки е важна, но тешка задача во природното обработување на јазиците. Покомплексна е отколку класификација со една етикета, бидејќи етикетите се поврзани. Постојаните методи обично ги игнорираат корелациите помеѓу етикетите. Покрај тоа, различни делови од текстот можат да придонесат различно за предвидување на различни етикети, кои не се сметаат за постоечки модели. In this paper, we propose to view the multi-label classification task as a sequence generation problem, and apply a sequence generation model with a novel decoder structure to solve it.  Експерименталните резултати покажуваат дека нашите предложени методи ја надминуваат претходната работа со значителна маргина. Понатамошната анализа на експерименталните резултати покажува дека предложените методи не само ги заземаат корелациите помеѓу етикетите, туку и ги избираат најинформативните зборови автоматски кога се предвидуваат различните етикети.', 'ml': 'സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷയുടെ പ്രക്രിയഭാഷ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d ഒരു പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ജോലിയാണ്. ഒരു ലേബിലേറ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷനെക്കാള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d സങ്കല്\u200dപ്പിക്കുന്നതാണു് ലേബിളുകള്\u200d കൂടുതല്\u200d ബന്ധപ്പെ നിലവിലുള്ള രീതികള്\u200d ലേബലുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d അവഗണിക്കുന്നു. വ്യത്യസ്ത ചിഹ്നങ്ങള്\u200d പ്രവചിക്കുന്നതിന് വേറെ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പങ്ക് ചെയ്യാം, നിലവിലുള്ള മോഡലുകള്\u200d കൊണ്ട ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല-ലേറ്റ് ക്ലാസ്ഫിക്ഷന്\u200d ജോലി ഒരു സെക്കന്റ് തലമുറതലമുറകള്\u200d പ്രശ്നമായി കാണാന്\u200d പ്രായശ്ചിത്തം ചെയ്യുന്നു. ഒരു സെ വിശാലമായ പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200d മുമ്പ് ജോലി നടത്തുന് പരീക്ഷണ ഫലങ്ങളുടെ വിശദീകരണം കൂടുതല്\u200d കാണിക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട രീതികള്\u200d ലേബിളുകള്\u200dക്കിടയിലെ ബന്ധങ്ങള്\u200d മാത്രമല്ല,', 'ms': 'Multi-label classification is an important yet challenging task in natural language processing.  Ia lebih kompleks daripada klasifikasi label tunggal dalam bahawa label cenderung berkorelasi. Kaedah yang wujud cenderung mengabaikan korelasi antara label. Selain itu, bahagian-bahagian berbeza teks boleh menyumbang berbeza untuk meramalkan label berbeza, yang tidak dianggap oleh model yang wujud. Dalam kertas ini, kami cadangkan untuk melihat tugas klasifikasi multi-label sebagai masalah generasi urutan, dan laksanakan model generasi urutan dengan struktur dekoder baru untuk menyelesaikannya. Hasil percubaan yang luas menunjukkan bahawa kaedah kami diusulkan melampaui kerja terdahulu dengan margin yang besar. Analisis lanjut keputusan eksperimen menunjukkan bahawa kaedah yang diusulkan tidak hanya menangkap korelasi antara label, tetapi juga memilih perkataan yang paling maklumat secara automatik bila meramalkan label yang berbeza.', 'mt': 'Il-klassifikazzjoni multitikketta hija kompitu importanti iżda diffiċli fl-ipproċessar tal-lingwi naturali. Huwa aktar kumpless mill-klassifikazzjoni b’tikketta waħda minħabba li t-tikketti għandhom it-tendenza li jkunu korrelati. Il-metodi eżistenti għandhom it-tendenza li jinjoraw il-korrelazzjonijiet bejn it-tikketti. Barra minn hekk, partijiet differenti tat-test jistgħu jikkontribwixxu b’mod differenti għat-tbassir ta’ tikketti differenti, li mhuwiex ikkunsidrat minn mudelli eżistenti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nipproponu li nqisu l-kompitu ta’ klassifikazzjoni b’ħafna tikketti bħala problem a ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ sekwenzi, u napplikaw mudell ta’ ġenerazzjoni ta’ sekwenzi b’struttura ġdida ta’ dekoder biex jissolvewh. Riżultati esperimentali estensivi juru li l-metodi proposti tagħna jaqbżu x-xogħol preċedenti b’marġini sostanzjali. Analiżi ulterjuri tar-riżultati sperimentali turi li l-metodi proposti mhux biss jaqbdu l-korrelazzjonijiet bejn it-tikketti, iżda wkoll jagħżlu l-kliem l-aktar informativ awtomatikament meta jipprevedu tikketti differenti.', 'mn': 'Олон-загварын хуваалтыг байгалийн хэл үйлдвэрлэлийн тулд чухал боловч шаардлагатай ажил юм. Эдгээр загварууд холбогдолтой байдаг нь нэг загвараас илүү төвөгтэй. Existing methods tend to ignore the correlation between labels. Үүнээс гадна өөр хэсгүүд нь өөр өөр загваруудыг таамаглах боломжтой болно. Үүнийг суурь загварууд нь ойлгохгүй. Энэ цаасан дээр бид олон загварын хуваалцааны ажлыг дарааллын үеийн асуудал гэж үзэх, дарааллын үеийн загварыг шийдвэрлэх шинэ загвартай ашиглана. Өнгөрсөн туршилтын үр дүнд бидний санал өгсөн арга нь өмнөх ажил дээр маш их зай болж чадна. Дараа нь туршилтын үр дүн шинжилгээ нь зөвхөн тэмдэгтийн хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондын хоорондоо биш, мөн өөр тэмдэгтийг таамаглахад хамгийн их мэдээ', 'pl': 'Klasyfikacja wieloznakowa jest ważnym, ale wymagającym zadaniem w przetwarzaniu języka naturalnego. Jest to bardziej złożone niż klasyfikacja pojedynczej etykiety, ponieważ etykiety mają tendencję do korelacji. Istniejące metody mają tendencję do ignorowania korelacji między etykietami. Poza tym różne części tekstu mogą różnie przyczynić się do przewidywania różnych etykiet, co nie jest uwzględniane przez istniejące modele. W niniejszym artykule proponujemy postrzeganie zadania klasyfikacji wielu etykiet jako problemu generowania sekwencji i zastosowanie modelu generowania sekwencji z nową strukturą dekodera do jego rozwiązania. Obszerne wyniki eksperymentalne pokazują, że proponowane metody znacznie przewyższają poprzednie prace. Dalsza analiza wyników eksperymentalnych pokazuje, że proponowane metody nie tylko uchwycają korelacje między etykietami, ale również automatycznie wybierają najbardziej informacyjne słowa przy przewidywaniu różnych etykiet.', 'no': 'Klassifikasjon for fleire merkelapper er ein viktig enno vanskeleg oppgåve i naturspråk. Det er meir komplekse enn enkelt merkelapp- klassifikasjon i at merkelappene tenderer å vera korrelaterte. Etter eksisterande metodar har tendens til å ignorera korrelasjonane mellom merkelappar. I tillegg kan ulike deler av teksten bidra til ulike måtar for å foregå forskjellige merkelappar, som ikkje er anslått av eksisterande modeller. I denne papiret foreslår vi å sjå multimerkelapplasseringsoppgåva som eit problem med sekvensgenerasjon, og bruka ein sekvensgenerasjonsmodell med eit roman dekoderstruktur for å løysa det. Ekstra eksperimentelle resultat viser at våre foreslåde metodar utfører tidlegare arbeid med ein stor margin. Fleire analyser av eksperimentelt resultat viser at dei foreslåde metodane ikkje berre hentar korrelasjonane mellom merkelappar, men også velje dei mest informativte ord automatisk når du foreslår forskjellige merkelappar.', 'sr': 'Većina etiketa klasifikacija je važan, ali izazovni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Kompleksniji je od jedinstvene klasifikacije u tome da su etikete navodno povezani. Postoje metode obično ignoriraju korelaciju između etiketa. Osim toga, različiti dijelovi teksta mogu doprinijeti drugačije za predviđanje različitih etiketa, koje se ne smatra postojećim modelima. U ovom papiru predlažemo da pogledamo posao klasifikacije multi-etiketa kao problem generacije sekvence i primjenjujemo model generacije sekvence sa novom strukturom dekodera kako bi je rešili. Eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naši predloženi metodi iznose prethodni rad sa velikom marginom. Daljnja analiza eksperimentalnih rezultata pokazuje da predložene metode ne samo hvataju korelacije između etiketa, nego i odaberi najinformativnije reči automatski kada predviđaju različite etikete.', 'ro': 'Clasificarea cu mai multe etichete este o sarcină importantă, dar dificilă în procesarea limbajului natural. Este mai complexă decât clasificarea pe etichetă unică, deoarece etichetele tind să fie corelate. Metodele existente tind să ignore corelațiile dintre etichete. În plus, diferite părți ale textului pot contribui diferit la prezicerea diferitelor etichete, ceea ce nu este luat în considerare de modelele existente. În această lucrare, propunem să vedem sarcina de clasificare cu mai multe etichete ca o problemă de generare a secvențelor și să aplicăm un model de generare a secvențelor cu o structură nouă de decodor pentru a o rezolva. Rezultatele experimentale extinse arata ca metodele noastre propuse depasesc lucrarile anterioare cu o marja substantiala. Analiza ulterioară a rezultatelor experimentale demonstrează că metodele propuse nu numai că capturează corelațiile dintre etichete, ci selectează automat cuvintele cele mai informative atunci când prezic etichete diferite.', 'si': 'Multi- label classification is a vital but challenging job in the Native language processing. ඒක තරම් ලේබුල් වලට වඩා සංකෘතියි. ලේබුල් වලට සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන්. ඉතින් ඉතින් විධානය ලේබෙල් අතර සම්බන්ධය අවධානය කරන්න පුළුවන්. ඒ වගේම, පාළුවේ වෙනස් කොටස් වලින් වෙනස් ලේබිල් අනතුරු කරන්න පුළුවන් වෙනස් විදිහට ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න, ඒක මේ පත්තරේ අපි ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා මාලික් ලේබල් විශේෂණ වැඩක් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදිහට බලන්න, ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විදි පරීක්ෂණ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාරය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ ප්\u200dරතිචාරිත විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාර වැඩ පරීක්ෂණ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ ප්\u200dරතිචාර ප්\u200dරතිචාර විදිහට ලේබල් අතර සම්බන්ධතා විතරක් නෙ', 'so': 'Takhasuska kala duduwanu waa mid muhiim ah laakiin waa mid dhibaataysan shaqo ka baaraandegista luqada dabiicadda ah. Waa ka adag tahay fasalka isku mid ah, marka calaamadaha lagu xiriiro. Wadamada joogta waa inay ka jeedaan xiriirka alaabta u dhexeeya. Intaas waxaa kale oo laga yaabaa in qeybo kala duduwan ay ku qeyb qaadan karaan si kala duwan looga sii sheego calaamado kala duduwan, taas oo aan lagu fiirsanayn modello heysta. Qoraalkan waxaynu soo jeedaynaa in aan u aragno shaqada fasaxa kala duduwan sida dhibaato qarniga dabadeed, waxaana ku dalbanaynaa model qarniga dabaasha oo leh dhismo saxda codcodsiga si aan u xallino. Imtixaanka badan waxay muuqataa in qaababkayaga la soo jeeday ay ay sameeyaan shaqadii hore oo ay ku jirtay marxalad aad u weyn. Baaritaanka kale ee arimaha imtixaanka waxaa ka muuqda in qaababka la soo jeeday ay aysan qabsan isku xiriirka alaabta oo keliya, laakiin sidoo kale dooro hadalka ugu macluumaadka badan marka aad wax ka sii sheegto calaamado kala duduwan.', 'ta': 'பல- விளக்கச்சீட்டு வகைப்படுத்தல் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்பாட்டில் சவாலிக்கும் பணியாகும். சிட்டைகள் இணைக்கப்பட்டு இருக்கும் என்பதை விட சிக்கலாகும். இருக்கும் முறைகள் சிட்டைகளுக்கு இடையே இணைப்பை புறக்கணிக்கும். Besides, different parts of the text can contribute differently for predicting different labels, which is not considered by existing models.  இந்த காகிதத்தில், பல விளக்கச்சீட்டு வகைப்படுத்தல் செயலை பின்வரும் உருவாக்கும் பிரச்சனையாக பார்க்க நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம், பின்வரு விரிவான சோதனை முடிவு மேலும் சோதனையின் முடிவுகளின் முறைகள் தெரிவிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது முன்னிருப்பிய முறைகள் சிட்டைகளுக்கு இடையே இணைப்பை மட்டும் பிடிக்கவில', 'ur': 'Multi-label classification is an important but challenging task in natural language processing. یہ ایک لابل کلاسپیٹ سے زیادہ پیچیدہ ہے جس میں لابل متصل ہوتے ہیں. Existing methods tend to ignore the correlations between labels. اس کے علاوہ، متن کے مختلف حصے مختلف لابلوں کی پیش آنے کے لئے مختلف طریقے سے اضافہ کرسکتے ہیں، جو موجود موجود موڈل کے ذریعے نہیں سمجھتے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم نے multi-label classification task کو ایک سطح نسل کے مسئلہ کے طور پر دیکھنے کے لئے پیشنهاد کریں، اور اس کو حل کرنے کے لئے ایک سطح نسل موڈل کے ساتھ استعمال کریں. اکسٹنسیٹ آزمائش نتیجے دکھاتے ہیں کہ ہماری پیشنهاد کی طریقے اگلے کام سے زیادہ محدودیت کے ذریعہ سے کام کرتے ہیں۔ آزمائش نتیجے کے اضافہ تحلیل دکھاتے ہیں کہ پیشنهاد کی طریقے صرف لیبل کے درمیان تعلقات کو پکڑتے نہیں ہیں بلکہ بہترین معلومات کی کلمات کو اپنے ساتھ انتخاب کرتے ہیں جب مختلف لیبل کی پیشنهاد کرتے ہیں.', 'sv': 'Klassificering av flera etiketter är en viktig men utmanande uppgift i naturlig språkbehandling. Det är mer komplext än klassificering med en etikett eftersom etiketterna tenderar att korreleras. Befintliga metoder tenderar att ignorera korrelationerna mellan etiketter. Dessutom kan olika delar av texten bidra olika för att förutsäga olika etiketter, vilket inte beaktas av befintliga modeller. I denna uppsats föreslår vi att se multi-label klassificering uppgiften som ett sekvensgenereringsproblem, och tillämpa en sekvensgenereringsmodell med en ny avkodningsstruktur för att lösa den. Omfattande experimentella resultat visar att våra föreslagna metoder överträffar tidigare arbete med en betydande marginal. Ytterligare analys av experimentella resultat visar att de föreslagna metoderna inte bara fångar korrelationerna mellan etiketter, utan också väljer de mest informativa orden automatiskt när olika etiketter förutses.', 'uz': "Koʻp yorliq darajalashtirish asosiy tilni boshqarish vazifasi muhim. @ info: whatsthis Mavjud usullar tugmalar orasidagi bogʻlamalarni eʼtibor beradi. Ushbu esa, matnning turli qismlari boshqa tugmalarni koʻrsatish uchun boshqa qismlarni bajarishi mumkin. Bu mavjud modellar tomonidan koʻrsatilmaydi. Bu hujjatda, biz bir necha ko'plab-ketlik vazifani seksiz yaratish muammosi sifatida ko'rib chiqarishni talab qilamiz va seksiz yaratish modelini ishlatish uchun qoʻllanmalar tuzilishini tugatamiz. Extensive experimental results show that our proposed methods outperform previous work by a substantial margin.  Koʻproq tajriba natijalarini taʼminlashni koʻrsatish mumkin, ilova qilingan usullar tugmalar orasidagi bogʻlamalarni faqat qabul qilishi mumkin, balki boshqa tugmalarni koʻrsatilganda eng haqida maʼlumot soʻzlarni avtomatik tanlang.", 'vi': 'Phân loại đa nhãn là một nhiệm vụ quan trọng nhưng khó khăn trong việc xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên. Nó phức tạp hơn việc phân loại nhãn đơn, vì các nhãn có xu hướng tương quan nhau. Sự liên kết giữa các nhãn có xu hướng bị lờ mờ. Thêm vào đó, các phần khác nhau của văn bản có thể đóng góp khác nhau để dự đoán các nhãn khác nhau, mà không được xem xét bởi các mô hình hiện tại. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi đề nghị xem nhiệm vụ phân loại đa nhãn như một vấn đề sản sinh hàng loạt, và áp dụng một mô hình sản xuất chuỗi với một cấu trúc giải mã mới để giải mã nó. Những kết quả thử nghiệm dồi dào cho thấy phương pháp của chúng tôi vượt trội hơn những công việc trước với một khoảng cách khá lớn. Phân tích tiếp theo của kết quả thử nghiệm cho thấy các phương pháp không chỉ thu thập các mối tương quan giữa các nhãn, mà còn tự động chọn các từ thông tin nhất khi dự đoán các nhãn khác nhau.', 'bg': 'Класификацията с множество етикети е важна, но предизвикателна задача в обработката на естествения език. Тя е по-сложна от класификацията с единичен етикет, тъй като етикетите са склонни да бъдат корелирани. Съществуващите методи са склонни да игнорират корелациите между етикетите. Освен това различните части от текста могат да допринесат различно за предвиждането на различни етикети, което не се разглежда от съществуващите модели. В настоящата статия предлагаме да разгледаме задачата за класификация на множество етикети като проблем за генериране на последователност и да приложим модел за генериране на последователност с нова декодерна структура за решаването му. Обширните експериментални резултати показват, че предложените от нас методи надминават предишната работа със съществен марж. Допълнителният анализ на експерименталните резултати показва, че предложените методи не само улавят корелациите между етикетите, но и избират автоматично най-информативните думи при предвиждането на различни етикети.', 'nl': 'Multi-label classificatie is een belangrijke maar uitdagende taak in de verwerking van natuurlijke taal. Het is complexer dan single-label classificatie omdat de labels vaak gecorreleerd zijn. Bestaande methoden negeren de correlaties tussen labels. Bovendien kunnen verschillende delen van de tekst verschillend bijdragen aan het voorspellen van verschillende labels, wat bij bestaande modellen niet in aanmerking wordt genomen. In dit artikel stellen we voor om de multi-label classificatietaak te zien als een sequentie generatie probleem, en een sequentie generatie model toe te passen met een nieuwe decoder structuur om het op te lossen. Uitgebreide experimentele resultaten tonen aan dat onze voorgestelde methoden eerder werk aanzienlijk overtreffen. Verdere analyse van experimentele resultaten toont aan dat de voorgestelde methoden niet alleen de correlaties tussen labels vastleggen, maar ook automatisch de meest informatieve woorden selecteren bij het voorspellen van verschillende labels.', 'da': 'Klassificering af flere mærker er en vigtig, men udfordrende opgave i naturlig sprogbehandling. Det er mere komplekst end enkeltmærket klassificering, idet etiketterne har tendens til at være korrelerede. Eksisterende metoder har tendens til at ignorere korrelationen mellem etiketter. Desuden kan forskellige dele af teksten bidrage forskelligt til at forudsige forskellige etiketter, hvilket ikke tages i betragtning af eksisterende modeller. I denne artikel foreslår vi at se multi-label klassifikationsopgaven som et sekvensgenereringsproblem, og anvende en sekvensgenereringsmodel med en ny dekoderstruktur til at løse den. Omfattende eksperimentelle resultater viser, at vores foreslåede metoder overgår tidligere arbejde med en betydelig margin. Yderligere analyse af eksperimentelle resultater viser, at de foreslåede metoder ikke kun fanger korrelationen mellem etiketter, men også automatisk vælger de mest informative ord, når de forudsiger forskellige etiketter.', 'de': 'Die Multi-Label-Klassifizierung ist eine wichtige, aber herausfordernde Aufgabe in der Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache. Sie ist komplexer als die Einzeletikettenklassifizierung, da die Etiketten tendenziell korreliert sind. Bestehende Methoden neigen dazu, die Korrelationen zwischen Labels zu ignorieren. Außerdem können verschiedene Teile des Textes unterschiedlich zur Vorhersage verschiedener Labels beitragen, was von bestehenden Modellen nicht berücksichtigt wird. In diesem Beitrag schlagen wir vor, die Multi-Label-Klassifikationsaufgabe als Sequenzgenerationsproblem zu betrachten und ein Sequenzgenerationsmodell mit einer neuartigen Decoder-Struktur anzuwenden, um es zu lösen. Umfangreiche experimentelle Ergebnisse zeigen, dass unsere vorgeschlagenen Methoden bisherige Arbeiten deutlich übertreffen. Weitere Analysen experimenteller Ergebnisse zeigen, dass die vorgeschlagenen Methoden nicht nur die Korrelationen zwischen Labels erfassen, sondern auch automatisch die aussagekräftigsten Wörter auswählen, wenn verschiedene Labels vorhergesagt werden.', 'id': 'Klasifikasi multi-label adalah tugas penting namun menantang dalam proses bahasa alami. It is more complex than single-label classification in that the labels tend to be correlated.  Metode yang ada cenderung mengabaikan korelasi antara label. Selain itu, bagian berbeda dari teks dapat berkontribusi berbeda untuk memprediksi label berbeda, yang tidak dianggap oleh model yang ada. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengusulkan untuk melihat tugas klasifikasi multi-label sebagai masalah generasi urutan, dan menerapkan model generasi urutan dengan struktur dekoder baru untuk menyelesaikannya. Hasil eksperimen yang luas menunjukkan bahwa metode kami yang diusulkan melampaui pekerjaan sebelumnya dengan margin yang besar. Analisis lanjut dari hasil percobaan menunjukkan bahwa metode yang diusulkan tidak hanya menangkap korelasi antara label, tetapi juga memilih kata yang paling informatif secara otomatis ketika memprediksi label yang berbeda.', 'ko': '다중 라벨 분류는 자연 언어 처리에서 중요하고 도전적인 임무이다.그것은 단일 라벨보다 분류가 더 복잡하다. 왜냐하면 라벨은 왕왕 서로 관련되어 있기 때문이다.기존의 방법은 종종 라벨 간의 관련성을 소홀히 한다.그 밖에 텍스트의 서로 다른 부분은 서로 다른 라벨을 예측하는 데 서로 다른 공헌을 할 수 있는데 이것은 기존 모델이 고려하지 않은 것이다.본고에서 우리는 다중 라벨 분류 작업을 하나의 서열 생성 문제로 간주하고 새로운 디코더 구조를 가진 서열 생성 모델을 응용하여 이 문제를 해결할 것을 제안한다.대량의 실험 결과에 의하면 우리가 제시한 방법은 이전의 일보다 매우 큰 우세를 보였다.실험 결과에 대한 진일보한 분석에 따르면 제시된 방법은 라벨 간의 관련성을 포착할 수 있을 뿐만 아니라 서로 다른 라벨을 예측할 때 정보량이 가장 많은 단어를 자동으로 선택할 수 있다.', 'sw': 'Utawala wa lugha nyingi ni muhimu lakini unachanganya kazi katika upasuaji wa lugha asili. Ni tatizo zaidi ya kutangazwa kwa viungo pekee kwa kuwa maabara yanakuwa yanahusiana. mbinu zilizopo huenda kupuuza uhusiano kati ya mabango. Zaidi ya hayo, sehemu mbalimbali za maandishi yanaweza kusaidia tofauti kwa kutabiri alama tofauti, ambazo hazitachukuliwa na miundo mbili zilizopo. Katika karatasi hii, tunapendekeza kuona jukumu la usambazaji wa mitandao mbalimbali kama tatizo la kizazi cha mfululizo, na kutumia muundo wa kizazi cha mfululizo na muundo wa kudhibiti riwaya ili kutatua. Matokeo mengi ya majaribio yanaonyesha kuwa mbinu zetu zilizopendekezwa kuandaa kazi zilizopita na marufuku makubwa. Uchambuzi zaidi wa matokeo ya majaribio unaonyesha kuwa mbinu zilizopendekezwa siyo tu zinazozungumzia uhusiano kati ya mabango, bali pia kuchagua maneno ya taarifa zaidi kwa kujitegemea wakati utabiri maabara tofauti.', 'fa': 'گروه\u200cبندی بسیاری از برچسب\u200cها یک کار مهم هنوز در پرداخت زبان طبیعی است. این ترکیب بیشتری از یک برچسب است که برچسب\u200cها معمولاً مرتبط می\u200cشوند. روش\u200cهایی که وجود دارند، عادت دارند ارتباطات بین برچسب\u200cها را نادیده بگیرند. علاوه بر این، بخش\u200cهای متفاوت از متن می\u200cتواند برای پیش\u200cبینی برچسب\u200cهای متفاوتی، که توسط مدل\u200cهای موجود به نظر نمی\u200cرسد، به طور متفاوتی تولید کند. در این کاغذ، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که کارهای مختلف برنامه\u200cهای مختلف را به عنوان یک مشکل نسل\u200cهای مختلف ببینیم، و یک مدل نسل\u200cهای مختلف را با یک ساختار دکوردر رمانی برای حلش انجام دهیم. نتیجه\u200cهای آزمایشی گسترده\u200cای نشان می\u200cدهد که روش پیشنهاد ما با مرز بزرگی کار پیشینیان را انجام می\u200cدهد. تحلیل بیشتری از نتایج آزمایشی نشان می\u200cدهد که روش پیشنهاد نه تنها ارتباط بین برچسب\u200cها را گرفته می\u200cشود، بلکه همچنین سخن\u200cهای اطلاعاتی را در حال پیش\u200cبینی از برچسب\u200cهای مختلف خودکار انتخاب می\u200cکند.', 'tr': 'Birnäçe etiket klasifikasy tebigy dil işleýişinde mähüm, ýöne täze bir täze täze täze. Etiketler bir etiketden daha karmaşık bir şekilde düzgün. Öň bar yöntemler etiketler arasynda habarlary görmezden çykýar. Munuň ýagdaýda, metiniň beýleki parçalary üýtgeşik etiketlerden öňünden geçirmek üçin üýtgedip biler. Bu kagyzda, biz multi-etiket sanlaşdyrma täblisini sıralama meselesi hökmünde görkezmäge teklip edip, we çözmek üçin bir taýýarlama täblisini taýýarlama nusgasyna uygulapdyrys. Taryhdan denetimli netijelerimiz teklip eden yönlerimiziň öňki işi möhüm gabdaly bilen çykarmagyny görkezýär. Derrew netijeler analysi görkezilýän çözümler diňe etiketleriň arasynda degişmeleri däl, ýöne üýtgeşik sözlerini öz-özüne görkez.', 'af': "Multi- label klasifikasie is 'n belangrike, nog praat opdrag in natuurlike taal verwerking. Dit is meer kompleks as enkele etiket klasifikasie in wat die etikette tendeer na wees korrelasie. Bestaande metodes tendeer na ignoreer die korrelasies tussen etikette. Buitend kan verskillende dele van die teks anders bydra vir die voorskou van verskillende etikette, wat nie aangeneem word deur bestaande modele nie. In hierdie papier, ons voorstel om die multi-etiket klassifikasie taak as 'n sekwensiegenerasie probleme te sien, en toewend 'n sekwensiegenerasie model met 'n roman dekoderstruktuur om dit te los. Ekstensiewe eksperimentele resultate vertoon dat ons voorgestelde metodes voortvoer vorige werk deur 'n groot marge. Verdere analisie van eksperimentele resultate bevestig dat die voorgestelde metodes nie slegs die korrelasies tussen etikette vervang nie, maar ook kies die mees informatiewe woorde automaties wanneer verskillende etikette voorskou word.", 'hr': 'Većina etiketa klasifikacija je važan, ali izazovni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Kompleksniji je od jedinstvene klasifikacije u tome da su etikete navikle da se koreliraju. Postoje metode obično ignoriraju korelacije između etiketa. Osim toga, različiti dijelovi teksta mogu doprinijeti drugačije za predviđanje različitih etiketa, koje se ne smatra postojećim modelima. U ovom papiru predlažemo gledati multietički klasifikacijski zadatak kao problem generacije sekvence i primjenjivati model generacije sekvence sa novom strukturom dekodera kako bi ga riješili. Prošireni eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naši predloženi metodi iznose prethodni rad značajnom marginom. Daljnja analiza eksperimentalnih rezultata pokazuje da predložene metode ne samo hvataju korelacije između etiketa, nego i odaberi najinformativnije riječi automatski kada predviđaju različite etikete.', 'sq': 'Klasifikimi i shumë-etiketave është një detyrë e rëndësishme por e vështirë në procesimin natyror të gjuhës. Është më kompleks se klasifikimi i një etikete në atë që etiketat kanë tendencë të korrelohen. Metodat ekzistuese tenderojnë të injorojnë korrelacionet midis etiketave. Përveç kësaj, pjesë të ndryshme të tekstit mund të kontribuojnë ndryshe për parashikimin e etiketave të ndryshme, e cila nuk konsiderohet nga modelet ekzistuese. Në këtë letër, ne propozojmë të shohim detyrën e klasifikimit me shumë etiketa si një problem të gjenerimit të sekuencës, dhe të aplikojmë një model të gjenerimit të sekuencës me një strukturë të re dekoderi për ta zgjidhur atë. Rezultatet eksperimentale të gjera tregojnë se metodat tona të propozuara tejkalojnë punën e mëparshme me një margin thelbësor. Further analysis of experimental results demonstrates that the proposed methods not only capture the correlations between labels, but also select the most informative words automatically when predicting different labels.', 'bn': 'প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার প্রক্রিয়ায় বহুল লেবের ক্লাসাফেশন একটি গুরুত্বপূর্ণ কাজ। এটা একটি লেবেলের চেয়ে বেশি জটিল যে লেবেলের সংশ্লিষ্ট ব্যবহার করে থাকে। বিদ্যমান পদ্ধতি লেবেলের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক উপেক্ষা করে। এছাড়াও, টেক্সটের বিভিন্ন অংশ ভিন্ন ভিন্ন ভিন্ন লেবেল প্রত্যাশিত করতে পারে, যা বর্তমান মডেল দ্বারা বিবেচনা করা  এই কাগজটিতে আমরা প্রস্তাব করছি বহুল লেবেলের ক্লাসাফিকেশন কাজের একটি সেকেন্স প্রজন্ম সমস্যা হিসেবে দেখতে এবং একটি সেকেন্ড প্রজন্ম মডেল প্রয়োগ কর বিস্তারিত পরীক্ষার ফলাফল দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি পূর্ববর্তী কাজের মাধ্যমে প্রযোজ্য একটি ব পরীক্ষার ফলাফলের আরো বিশ্লেষণ প্রদর্শন করে যে প্রস্তাবিত পদ্ধতি শুধুমাত্র লেবেলের মধ্যে সম্পর্ক গ্রহণ করা নয়, কিন্তু বিভিন্ন লেবেলের ভবিষ্যদ্ব', 'hy': 'Բազմաթիվ պիտակների դասակարգման կարևոր, սակայն դժվար խնդիր է բնական լեզվի վերամշակում: Այն ավելի բարդ է, քան մեկ պիտակ դասակարգումը, որովհետև պիտակները հակված են փոխկապակցվել: Գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները հակված են անտեսել պիտակների միջև կապը: Ավելին, տեքստի տարբեր մասերը կարող են տարբեր կերպ ներդրումներ ունենալ տարբեր պիտակների կանխատեսման համար, որոնք գոյություն ունեցող մոդելների կողմից չեն համարվում: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք առաջարկում ենք դիտարկել բազմաթիվ պիտակների դասակարգման խնդիրը որպես հաջորդականության սերունդների խնդիր, և կիրառել հաջորդականության սերունդների մոդելը նոր դեկոդերի կառուցվածքով այն լուծելու համար: Մեծ փորձարկման արդյունքները ցույց են տալիս, որ մեր առաջարկած մեթոդները շատ ավելի շատ են արտադրում նախորդ աշխատանքը: Փորձարկվող արդյունքների հետագա վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ առաջարկված մեթոդները ոչ միայն ներկայացնում են պիտակների միջև կապը, այլ նաև ինքնաբերաբար ընտրում են ամենատեղեկատվական բառերը տարբեր պիտակների կանխատեսման ժամանակ:', 'am': 'ብዙ-label መግለጫ ግን በተፈጠረው ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል የተጠቃሚ ነው፡፡ ማተሚያዎች በተለየ አንዲት ብሔራዊ መግለጫ ይጨመርበታል፡፡ የአሁኑ ዘዴዎች በምልክቶች መካከል ግንኙነትን ለመራቀቅ ይጠይቃሉ። በተጨማሪም፣ የጽሑፉ ልዩ ክፍሎች ለልዩ ልዩ መለያ ምልክቶችን ለማሳየት ይችላል፣ ይህም በተገኘ ዓይነቶች አይመለከትም፡፡ በዚህ ፕሮግራም፣ በብዙ-label classification ስራዎችን እንደ ተከታታይ ትውልድ መከራ እና የመስኮት ትውልድ ምሳሌ እናደርጋለን፡፡ በብዛት ፈተና ፍሬዎች የሞከረ ሥርዓታችን የቀድሞውን ሥራ በጥያቄ አርእስት የሚያሳየው ነው፡፡ በተፈተና ውጤቶች ላይ አስተያየት የተዘጋጀው ሥርዓቶች በምልክቶች መካከል ግንኙነት ብቻ አይደለም ነገር ግን በተለዩ ምልክቶች በተመለከተ ጊዜ የተመረጠውን ቃላት በራሱ ላይ ምረጡ፡፡', 'bs': 'Većina etiketa klasifikacija je važan, ali izazovni zadatak u procesu prirodnog jezika. Kompleksniji je od jedinstvene klasifikacije u tome da su etikete navikle da budu korelacirane. Postoje metode obično ignoriraju odnose između etiketa. Osim toga, različiti dijelovi teksta mogu doprinijeti drugačije za predviđanje različitih etiketa, koje se ne smatra postojećim modelima. U ovom papiru predlažemo da vidimo multietiketni klasifikacijski zadatak kao problem generacije sekvence i primjenjujemo model generacije sekvence sa novom strukturom dekodera kako bi je riješili. Provećani eksperimentalni rezultati pokazuju da naši predloženi metodi iznose prethodni rad značajnom marginom. Daljnja analiza eksperimentalnih rezultata pokazuje da predložene metode ne samo hvataju korelacije između etiketa, nego i odaberi najinformativnije riječi automatski kada predviđaju različite etikete.', 'ca': "La classificació multietiqueta és una tasca important però difícil en el processament natural de llenguatges. És més complexa que la classificació d'una única etiqueta en que les etiquetes tendeixen a correlacionar-se. Els mètodes existents tendeixen a ignorar les correlacions entre etiquetes. A més, diferents parts del text poden contribuir de manera diferent per predir diferents etiquetes, que no es considera pels models existents. En aquest paper, proposem veure la tasca de classificació multietiqueta com un problem a de generació de seqüències i aplicar un model de generació de seqüències amb una nova estructura de decodificació per resoldre-la. Els grans resultats experimentals mostren que els nostres mètodes proposats superen la feina anterior en un marge substancial. Una altra anàlisi dels resultats experimentals demostra que els mètodes proposats no només capturen les correlacions entre etiquetes, sinó també seleccionen automàticament les paraules més informatives quan predeixen diferents etiquetes.", 'cs': 'Klasifikace více štítků je důležitým, ale náročným úkolem ve zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Je složitější než klasifikace s jedním štítkem, protože etikety mají tendenci být korelovány. Stávající metody mají tendenci ignorovat korelace mezi štítky. Kromě toho mohou různé části textu různě přispět k předpovědi různých štítků, což existující modely nezohledňují. V tomto článku navrhujeme pohlížet na úlohu klasifikace více štítků jako na problém generování sekvencí a k jeho řešení aplikovat model generování sekvencí s novou strukturou dekodéru. Rozsáhlé experimentální výsledky ukazují, že naše navrhované metody výrazně překonávají předchozí práci. Další analýza experimentálních výsledků ukazuje, že navržené metody nejen zachycují korelace mezi etiketami, ale také automaticky vybírají nejinformativnější slova při predikci různých etiket.', 'et': 'Mitme märgisega klassifitseerimine on oluline, kuid keeruline ülesanne looduskeele töötlemisel. See on keerulisem kui ühekordse märgisega klassifitseerimine, kuna märgised kipuvad olema korrelatsioonis. Olemasolevad meetodid kipuvad sildide vahelisi seoseid eirama. Lisaks võivad erinevad tekstiosad erinevate märgiste prognoosimisel erinevalt kaasa aidata, mida olemasolevad mudelid ei arvesta. Käesolevas töös teeme ettepaneku vaadata mitme märgisega klassifitseerimisülesannet kui jada genereerimise probleemi ja rakendada jada genereerimise mudelit uudse dekoodristruktuuriga selle lahendamiseks. Ulatuslikud eksperimentaalsed tulemused näitavad, et meie kavandatud meetodid ületavad varasemat tööd märkimisväärselt. Eksperimentaalsete tulemuste edasine analüüs näitab, et kavandatud meetodid ei hõlma mitte ainult märgiste vahelisi korrelatsioone, vaid valivad automaatselt ka kõige informatiivsemad sõnad erinevate märgiste prognoosimisel.', 'fi': 'Monimerkkinen luokittelu on tärkeä mutta haastava tehtävä luonnollisen kielen käsittelyssä. Se on monimutkaisempi kuin yhden merkin luokitus, koska merkinnät yleensä korreloivat. Nykyisissä menetelmissä ei yleensä oteta huomioon merkintöjen välisiä korrelaatioita. Lisäksi tekstin eri osat voivat vaikuttaa eri tavoin erilaisten etikettien ennustamiseen, mitä olemassa olevat mallit eivät ota huomioon. Tässä työssä ehdotamme, että monimerkkinen luokittelutehtävä nähdään sekvenssin generointiongelmana ja että sen ratkaisemiseen sovelletaan sekvenssin generointimallia, jossa on uusi dekooderirakenne. Laajat kokeelliset tulokset osoittavat, että ehdotetut menetelmät ylittävät aikaisemman työn huomattavasti. Kokeellisten tulosten jatkoanalyysi osoittaa, että ehdotetut menetelmät eivät ainoastaan tallenna merkintöjen välisiä korrelaatioita, vaan myös valitsevat informatiivisimmat sanat automaattisesti eri merkintöjä ennakoitaessa.', 'az': 'Çoxlu etiketli klasifikasyon təbiətli dil işləməsində mövcuddur, amma çətin işləmədir. Etiketler bir etiket klasifikasiyasından daha kompleks olar ki, etiketlər bağlı olarlar. Existing metodlar etiketlər arasındakı bağlantıları ignore edir. Təkcə, məktubun müxtəlif bölümləri, mövcud modellərlə görünməyən müxtəlif etiketlər təmin etmək üçün fərqli olar. Bu kağızda, çoxlu etiketli klasifikasyon işini seçmək üçün seçmə nəticəsi problemi kimi görmək və yeni dekoder yapısıyla seçmə modelini uygulamaq üçün seçmə modelini təklif edirik. Müxtəlif təcrübələrimizin əvvəlki işləri böyük bir dərəcə ilə daha çox təcrübə edir. Müxtəlif sonuçların daha çox analizi göstərir ki, təbliğ edilmiş metodlar yalnız etiketlər arasındakı bağlantıları alır, lakin müxtəlif etiketlər təbliğ edərkən ən çox informativ sözləri avtomatik olaraq seçin.', 'jv': 'email-custom-header-Security Yuta akeh komplikasi luwih podho kelas nang etiket sing wis ana structural navigation politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertivepoliteness In this paper, we proposal to view the multi-label AllProgressBar politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive', 'ha': '@ item: inmenu Text Completion @ label: listbox @ action: inmenu Bayan haka, rabõ masu sãɓãni na matsayin zai iya ƙara wa bambanci dõmin ka ƙayyade alama daban, wanda ba a ƙaddara shi ba da misãlai da ke gaba. Daga wannan takardan, Munã buɗa mu nuna aikin classified na multi-label kamar wata matabbaci na ƙarshen dabam, kuma mu yi amfani da misalin kizafi na dabam da wani matsayin koda don ya sami shi. Matarin jarrabai masu ƙaranci ya nuna cewa hanyoyinmu da aka buƙata aiki na gaba da wani margin mai girma. Further analysis of experimental results demonstrates that the proposed methods not only capture the correlations between labels, but also select the most informative words automatically when predicting different labels.', 'sk': 'Klasifikacija z več oznakami je pomembna, vendar zahtevna naloga pri obdelavi naravnega jezika. To je bolj zapleteno od klasifikacije z eno oznako, saj so oznake ponavadi korelacije. Obstoječe metode običajno ignorirajo korelacije med oznakami. Poleg tega lahko različni deli besedila različno prispevajo k napovedovanju različnih oznak, kar obstoječi modeli ne upoštevajo. V prispevku predlagamo, da si nalogo klasifikacije več oznak ogledamo kot problem generacije zaporedja in uporabimo model generacije zaporedja z novo strukturo dekoderja za njeno rešitev. Obsežni eksperimentalni rezultati kažejo, da naše predlagane metode precej presegajo predhodno delo. Nadaljnja analiza eksperimentalnih rezultatov kaže, da predlagane metode ne zajemajo le korelacij med oznakami, temveč tudi samodejno izberejo najbolj informativne besede pri napovedovanju različnih oznak.', 'he': 'מסווג תווים רבים הוא משימה חשובה אבל מאתגרת בעבודת שפת טבעית. זה יותר מורכב מאשר סיווג תווית אחת כי התוויות נוטות להתחבר. שיטות קיימות נוטות להתעלם מהקשרים בין תוויות. חוץ מזה, חלקים שונים של הטקסט יכולים לתרום בצורה שונה לחזות תוויות שונות, שלא נחשבים על ידי דוגמנים קיימים. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציעים להבין את משימת ההקליטה המולטיבית כבעיה של דור רצף, ולהשתמש במודל דור רצף עם מבנה חדש של מפענח כדי לפתור אותו. תוצאות ניסויים רחבות מראות שהשיטות המוצעות שלנו מעליות את העבודה הקודמת על ידי שווה משמעותית. ניתוח נוסף של תוצאות ניסויים מראה שהשיטות המוצעות לא רק משתפות את הקשר בין תוויות, אלא גם לבחור את המילים המידעיות ביותר באופן אוטומטי כשצפוי תוויות שונות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་མང་བྲལ་དབྱེ་སྟངས་ནི་རང་བཞིན་སྐད་རིགས་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་ལས་འགུལ་ནི་གལ་ཆེན་ཤིག་ཡིན། labels tend to be correlated. It is more complex than single-label classification in that the labels tend to be correlated. གནས་ཡུལ་གྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དེ་ཤོག་བྱང་དབར་གྱི་མཐུན་རྟགས་སྣང་མེད་བསྐྱུར་བྱེད་ཡོད། Besides, different parts of the text can contribute differently for predicting different labels, which is not considered by existing models. In this paper, we propose to view the multi-label classification task as a sequence generation problem, and apply a sequence generation model with a novel decoder structure to solve it. རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་འགོད་བྱས་ཆོས་ཉིད་ཅིག་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་དམིགས Further analysis of experimental results demonstrates that the proposed methods not only capture the correlations between labels, but also select the most informative words automatically when predicting different labels.'}
{'en': 'Abbreviation Expander-a Web-based System for Easy Reading of Technical Documents', 'ar': 'متوسع الاختصار - نظام قائم على الويب لقراءة المستندات الفنية بسهولة', 'es': 'Abbreviation Expander: un sistema basado en la web para una fácil lectura de documentos técnicos', 'pt': 'Expansor de abreviaturas - um sistema baseado na Web para fácil leitura de documentos técnicos', 'fr': 'Abbreviation Expander - un système basé sur le Web pour faciliter la lecture de documents techniques', 'ja': '略語拡張機能-技術文書を簡単に読み取るためのWebベースのシステム', 'hi': 'संक्षिप्त नाम विस्तारक - तकनीकी दस्तावेजों के आसान पढ़ने के लिए एक वेब-आधारित प्रणाली', 'zh': '缩写扩展器 - 基于Web之统,而轻读术文档', 'ru': 'Расширитель сокращений - веб-система для удобного чтения технической документации', 'ga': 'Expander Giorrúchán - Córas Gréasánbhunaithe chun Doiciméid Theicniúla a Léamh go Éasca', 'el': 'Σύστημα με βάση το διαδίκτυο για την εύκολη ανάγνωση τεχνικών εγγράφων', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Rövidítés Expander - webalapú rendszer a műszaki dokumentumok könnyű olvasására', 'kk': 'Кеңейту кеңейтуші - Техниялық құжаттарды оқу үшін Веб негіздеген жүйе', 'it': 'Abbreviation Expander - un sistema basato sul Web per una facile lettura dei documenti tecnici', 'ms': 'Pengembang Persingkatan - Sistem berdasarkan Web untuk Pembacaan Mudah Dokumen Teknik', 'lt': 'Trumpai skaitomų techninių dokumentų interneto sistema', 'mk': 'Проширувач на кратенија - веб- базиран систем за лесно читање на технички документи', 'ml': 'എളുപ്പമുള്ള രേഖകള്\u200d വായിക്കുവാന്\u200d വേബ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു വെബ്ലേറ്റ് സിസ്റ്റമാണ് അബ്രെവിയഷന്\u200d എക്സ്', 'no': 'Forkortstørrar – eit nettbasert system for enkelt lesing av tekniske dokument', 'mt': "Espenditur ta' Taqsira - Sistema bbażata fuq l-Internet għall-qari faċli tad-Dokumenti Tekniċi", 'pl': 'Skrót Expander bazujący na sieci Web System do łatwego odczytu dokumentów technicznych', 'mn': 'Багасгалт дэвшигч - Техникийн баримтуудын хялбар унших вэб-суурилсан систем', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් විස්තර කරන්න - වෙබ් අධාරිත පද්ධතියක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තේක්ෂණික විස්තර කියවන්න ලේ', 'ro': 'Abreviation Expander - un sistem bazat pe Web pentru citirea ușoară a documentelor tehnice', 'so': 'Abbreviation Expander - a Web-based system for Easy Reading of Technical Documents', 'sr': 'Укрећање расширеница - систем базиран на веб за леко читање технических документа', 'sv': 'Förkortning Expander - ett webbaserat system för enkel läsning av tekniska dokument', 'ur': 'کمزور پھیلانے والا - تخنیکی دکھانوں کے آسان پڑھنے کے لئے ویب بنیادی سیسٹم', 'ta': 'சுலபமான தொழில்நுட்ப ஆவணங்களை படிப்பதற்கான இணைய- அடிப்படையான முறைமை', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'KCharselect unicode block name Dịch bởi HDVNBITS.ORG', 'bg': 'Укращение Експандер - уеб базирана система за лесно четене на технически документи', 'nl': 'Afkorting Expander fea Web-based Systeem voor het gemakkelijk lezen van technische documenten', 'hr': 'Prošiljač smanjenja - sustav na internetu za lakše čitanje tehničkih dokumenta', 'da': 'Forkortelse Expander - et webbaseret system til nem læsning af tekniske dokumenter', 'ko': '약어 확장기 - 기술 문서를 쉽게 읽을 수 있는 네트워크 기반 시스템', 'de': 'Abkürzung Expander fea Web-basiertes System zum einfachen Lesen technischer Dokumente', 'id': 'Pengembang Persingkatan - Sistem berdasarkan Web untuk Pembacaan Mudah Dokumen Teknik', 'fa': 'گسترۀ تنظیم - یک سیستم بنیاد وب برای خواندن آسانی از سند تکنیکی', 'sw': 'Mtengenezaji wa upinzani - Mfumo wa mtandaoni kwa ajili ya kusoma nyaraka za Kiteknolojia rahisi', 'sq': 'Shpërthimtari - një sistem i bazuar në internet për leximin e lehtë të dokumenteve teknike', 'tr': 'Kiçirçe Zolakyşçy - Tehnik Senedleri ýeňil okamak üçin Web tabanly Sistem', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'af': "Afbreiding Uitbreiding -  'n Web-gebaseerde Stelsel vir maklik Lees van Tehnieke Dokumente", 'bs': 'Prošiljač smanjenja - sistem na internetu za lakše čitanje tehničkih dokumenta', 'az': 'Qısqandırma Yapışçısı - Tehnik Dökümətlərin Easy Reading Sistemi', 'ca': "Extensor d'abreviaturs - un sistema web per llegir fàcilment els documents tècnics", 'et': 'Lühend Expander - veebipõhine süsteem tehniliste dokumentide lihtsaks lugemiseks', 'fi': 'Lyhenne Expander - Web-pohjainen järjestelmä teknisten asiakirjojen helppoon lukemiseen', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'প্রযুক্তিগত নথি পড়ার জন্য একটি ওয়েব ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম', 'cs': 'Zkratka Expander Web-based Systém pro snadné čtení technických dokumentů', 'jv': 'abbreviation Expander - a web-bazed System for Simply Reading of Teknik', 'sk': 'Kratica Expander - spletni sistem za enostavno branje tehničnih dokumentov', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מרחב קיצורים - מערכת מבוססת באינטרנט לקרוא קל של מסמכים טכניים', 'bo': 'Abbreviation Expander - a Web-based System for Easy Reading of Technical Documents'}
{'en': 'Abbreviations and acronyms are a part of textual communication in most domains. However, abbreviations are not necessarily defined in documents that employ them. Understanding all abbreviations used in a given document often requires extensive knowledge of the target domain and the ability to disambiguate based on context. This creates considerable entry barriers to newcomers and difficulties in automated document processing. Existing abbreviation expansion systems or tools require substantial technical knowledge for set up or make strong assumptions which limit their use in practice. Here, we present Abbreviation Expander, a system that builds on state of the art methods for identification of abbreviations, acronyms and their definitions and a novel disambiguator for abbreviation expansion in an easily accessible web-based solution.', 'ar': 'الاختصارات والمختصرات جزء من الاتصال النصي في معظم المجالات. ومع ذلك ، لا يتم تعريف الاختصارات بالضرورة في المستندات التي تستخدمها. غالبًا ما يتطلب فهم جميع الاختصارات المستخدمة في مستند معين معرفة واسعة بالمجال الهدف والقدرة على إزالة الغموض بناءً على السياق. وهذا يخلق حواجز كبيرة أمام الوافدين الجدد وصعوبات في المعالجة الآلية للوثائق. تتطلب أنظمة أو أدوات توسيع الاختصارات الحالية معرفة فنية كبيرة لإعداد أو وضع افتراضات قوية تحد من استخدامها في الممارسة. هنا ، نقدم Abbreviation Expander ، وهو نظام يعتمد على أحدث الأساليب لتحديد الاختصارات والمختصرات وتعريفاتها ومزيل غموض جديد لتوسيع الاختصارات في حل سهل الوصول إليه على شبكة الإنترنت.', 'es': 'Las abreviaturas y los acrónimos forman parte de la comunicación textual en la mayoría de los dominios. Sin embargo, las abreviaturas no se definen necesariamente en los documentos que las emplean. La comprensión de todas las abreviaturas utilizadas en un documento dado a menudo requiere un amplio conocimiento del dominio de destino y la capacidad de eliminar la ambigüedad en función del contexto. Esto crea barreras de entrada considerables para los recién llegados y dificultades en el procesamiento automatizado de documentos. Los sistemas o herramientas de expansión de abreviaturas existentes requieren un conocimiento técnico sustancial para su configuración o hacen suposiciones sólidas que limitan su uso en la práctica. Aquí presentamos Abbreviation Expander, un sistema que se basa en métodos de última generación para la identificación de abreviaturas, acrónimos y sus definiciones y un novedoso desambiguador para la expansión de abreviaturas en una solución web de fácil acceso.', 'pt': 'Abreviaturas e siglas fazem parte da comunicação textual na maioria dos domínios. No entanto, as abreviaturas não são necessariamente definidas nos documentos que as empregam. Compreender todas as abreviaturas usadas em um determinado documento geralmente requer amplo conhecimento do domínio de destino e a capacidade de desambiguar com base no contexto. Isso cria barreiras de entrada consideráveis para recém-chegados e dificuldades no processamento automatizado de documentos. Os sistemas ou ferramentas de expansão de abreviaturas existentes requerem conhecimento técnico substancial para configurar ou fazer suposições fortes que limitam seu uso na prática. Aqui, apresentamos Abbreviation Expander, um sistema que se baseia em métodos de última geração para identificação de abreviaturas, siglas e suas definições e um novo desambiguador para expansão de abreviaturas em uma solução baseada na web de fácil acesso.', 'fr': "Les abréviations et les acronymes font partie de la communication textuelle dans la plupart des domaines. Toutefois, les abréviations ne sont pas nécessairement définies dans les documents qui les utilisent. La compréhension de toutes les abréviations utilisées dans un document donné nécessite souvent une connaissance approfondie du domaine cible et la capacité de lever l'ambiguïté en fonction du contexte. Cela crée des barrières d'entrée considérables pour les nouveaux arrivants et des difficultés dans le traitement automatisé des documents. Les systèmes ou outils d'extension d'abréviation existants nécessitent des connaissances techniques substantielles pour leur mise en place ou émettent des hypothèses solides qui limitent leur utilisation dans la pratique. Nous présentons ici Abbreviation Expander, un système qui s'appuie sur des méthodes de pointe pour l'identification des abréviations, des acronymes et de leurs définitions et un nouvel outil de désambiguïsation pour l'expansion des abréviations dans une solution Web facilement accessible.", 'ja': '略語と頭字語は、ほとんどのドメインでテキストコミュニケーションの一部です。ただし、それらを採用する文書では必ずしも略語が定義されているわけではない。所与の文書で使用されるすべての略語を理解するには、多くの場合、ターゲットドメインの広範な知識と、文脈に基づいて曖昧さを解消する能力が必要である。これにより、新規参入者にかなりの参入障壁が生じ、自動化された文書処理が困難になります。既存の略語拡張システムまたはツールは、実践での使用を制限する設定または強力な仮定を立てるための実質的な技術的知識を必要とします。ここで、私たちは、略語、頭字語、およびそれらの定義を識別するための最先端の方法と、簡単にアクセス可能なウェブベースのソリューションにおける略語拡張のための新規の曖昧さ解消器を基に構築されたシステムである、略語拡張器を提示します。', 'zh': '缩写、首字母缩略词多领文本之分。 然缩写未必定义于用其文档也。 知给定文档之所有缩写常须博知域中,而得以上下文消歧义。 此新手大入壁,亦为自动化文档之难也。 今缩写广其统用,设其强设,以限其在实践用。 此言缩写扩展器者,先进之缩写也,首字母缩略词及其定义之统,与易访之基于Web之解决方案缩写新型消歧义器。', 'ru': 'Сокращения и аббревиатуры являются частью текстового общения в большинстве областей. Однако сокращения необязательно определяются в документах, в которых они используются. Понимание всех аббревиатур, используемых в данном документе, часто требует обширных знаний о целевой области и умения распутать в зависимости от контекста. Это создает значительные входные барьеры для новичков и трудности в автоматизированной обработке документов. Существующие системы или инструменты расширения аббревиатур требуют значительных технических знаний для создания или делают сильные допущения, которые ограничивают их использование на практике. Здесь мы представляем Abbreviation Expander, систему, которая основана на современных методах идентификации аббревиатур, аббревиатур и их определений и новый дезагрегатор для расширения аббревиатуры в легкодоступном веб-решении.', 'hi': 'संक्षेप और संक्षिप्त नाम अधिकांश डोमेन में पाठ्य संचार का एक हिस्सा हैं। हालांकि, संक्षेप ों को आवश्यक रूप से उन दस्तावेजों में परिभाषित नहीं किया गया है जो उन्हें नियोजित करते हैं। किसी दिए गए दस्तावेज़ में उपयोग किए जाने वाले सभी संक्षिप्त रूपों को समझने के लिए अक्सर लक्ष्य डोमेन के व्यापक ज्ञान और संदर्भ के आधार पर विभाजित करने की क्षमता की आवश्यकता होती है। यह नए लोगों के लिए काफी प्रवेश बाधाओं और स्वचालित दस्तावेज़ प्रसंस्करण में कठिनाइयों बनाता है। मौजूदा संक्षिप्त रूप विस्तार प्रणालियों या उपकरणों को स्थापित करने या मजबूत धारणाओं को बनाने के लिए पर्याप्त तकनीकी ज्ञान की आवश्यकता होती है जो व्यवहार में उनके उपयोग को सीमित करते हैं। यहां, हम संक्षेप विस्तारक प्रस्तुत करते हैं, एक प्रणाली जो संक्षिप्त रूपों, संक्षिप्त शब्दों और उनकी परिभाषाओं की पहचान के लिए कला विधियों की स्थिति पर बनाती है और आसानी से सुलभ वेब-आधारित समाधान में संक्षिप्त रूप विस्तार के लिए एक उपन्यास disambiguator।', 'ga': 'Is cuid den chumarsáid théacsúil i bhformhór na bhfearann iad na giorraithe agus na hacrainmneacha. Ní gá, áfach, giorrúcháin a shainiú sna doiciméid a úsáideann iad. Is minic go mbíonn gá le heolas fairsing ar an spriocfhearann agus leis an gcumas dí-athbhrí a dhéanamh bunaithe ar chomhthéacs chun gach giorrúchán a úsáidtear i ndoiciméad ar leith a thuiscint. Cruthaíonn sé seo bacainní iontrála suntasacha ar núíosaigh agus deacrachtaí maidir le próiseáil doiciméad uathoibrithe. Teastaíonn eolas teicniúil substaintiúil ó chórais nó uirlisí leathnaithe giorrúchán atá ann cheana chun iad a bhunú nó chun toimhdí láidre a dhéanamh a chuireann srian lena n-úsáid go praiticiúil. Anseo, cuirimid i láthair Giorrúchán Expander, córas a thógann ar na modhanna úrscothacha chun giorrúcháin, acrainmneacha agus a sainmhínithe a aithint agus díréimire úr le haghaidh leathnú giorrúchán i réiteach gréasán-bhunaithe atá inrochtana go héasca.', 'hu': 'A rövidítések és rövidítések a szöveges kommunikáció részét képezik a legtöbb területen. A rövidítéseket azonban nem feltétlenül határozzák meg az azokat alkalmazó dokumentumokban. Az adott dokumentumban használt rövidítések megértése gyakran széles körű ismeretre van szükség a céltartományról és a kontextus alapján való egyértelműsítésre. Ez jelentős belépési akadályokat okoz az újonnan érkezők számára, és nehézségeket okoz az automatizált dokumentumfeldolgozás terén. A meglévő rövidítésbővítő rendszerek vagy eszközök jelentős műszaki ismereteket igényelnek ahhoz, hogy olyan erős feltételezéseket hozzanak létre vagy tegyenek, amelyek korlátozzák azok gyakorlati használatát. Itt bemutatjuk az Abbreviation Expander rendszert, amely a rövidítések, rövidítések és azok definícióinak azonosítására szolgáló korszerű módszerekre épül, valamint egy új egyértelműsítő rövidítés kiterjesztésének egy könnyen hozzáférhető webalapú megoldásban.', 'ka': 'აკრონიმები ტექსტური კომუნიკაციის ნაწილი უფრო დიომენში. მაგრამ კრებრაციები არ უნდა განსაზღვრულია დოკუმენტებში, რომლებიც დოკუმენტებს გამოყენებენ. ამ დოკუმენტში გამოიყენებული ყველა კრებრაციების შესახებ უფრო გამოიყენება უფრო გამოიყენება მინიშვნელოვანი დიომინზე და შესაძლებლობა განსხვავება კონ ეს შექმნა ძალიან გადაწყვეტილებელი ბარირები ახალგაზრდა და განმავლობელი დოკუმენტის პროცესიაში. არსებობს სისტემი ან ხელსაწყობილობის გაფართლების სისტემი ან ხელსაწყობილობის შესაძლებელი ტექნიკური მეცნიერება, რომლებიც პრაქტიკულაში გამოყენებას და აქ ჩვენ ჩვენ აჩვენებთ აკრძალებული გაფართლებელი, სისტემა, რომელიც ახალგაფართლების, აკრონიმის და მათი განსაზღვრების განსაზღვრებისთვის განაზღვრებისთვის სურათების გაფართლებისთვის, და პრომენტის განსაზღვრების', 'it': "Abbreviazioni e acronimi fanno parte della comunicazione testuale nella maggior parte dei domini. Tuttavia, le abbreviazioni non sono necessariamente definite nei documenti che le utilizzano. Comprendere tutte le abbreviazioni utilizzate in un dato documento richiede spesso una conoscenza approfondita del dominio di destinazione e la capacità di disambiguare in base al contesto. Ciò crea notevoli barriere all'ingresso per i nuovi arrivati e difficoltà nell'elaborazione automatizzata dei documenti. I sistemi o gli strumenti esistenti di espansione delle abbreviazioni richiedono conoscenze tecniche sostanziali per creare o formulare ipotesi solide che ne limitino l'uso nella pratica. Qui presentiamo Abbreviation Expander, un sistema che si basa su metodi all'avanguardia per l'identificazione di abbreviazioni, acronimi e loro definizioni e un nuovo disambiguatore per l'espansione delle abbreviazioni in una soluzione web facilmente accessibile.", 'lt': 'Abbreviations and acronyms are a part of textual communication in most domains.  Tačiau santrumpos nebūtinai apibrėžiamos dokumentuose, kuriuose jos naudojamos. Suprantant visus tam tikrame dokumente naudojamus santrumpas dažnai reikia išsamių žinių apie tikslinę sritį ir gebėjimų išspręsti dviprasmiškus klausimus atsižvelgiant į aplinkybes. Tai sukuria dideles patekimo į rinką kliūtis naujiems asmenims ir sunkumų automatizuojant dokumentų apdorojimą. Esamoms santrumpų plėtros sistemoms ar priemonėms reikalingos didelės techninės žinios, kad būtų sukurtos arba daromos tvirtos prielaidos, ribojančios jų naudojimą praktikoje. Čia pristatome santrumpų išplėtimo sistemą, kuri grindžiama naujausiais santrumpų, akronimų ir jų apibrėžimų identifikavimo metodais ir nauju santrumpų išplėtimo aiškinamuoju būdu lengvai prieinamame internetiniame sprendime.', 'el': 'Οι συντομεύσεις και τα ακρωνύμια αποτελούν μέρος της γραπτής επικοινωνίας στους περισσότερους τομείς. Ωστόσο, οι συντομεύσεις δεν ορίζονται απαραίτητα σε έγγραφα που τις χρησιμοποιούν. Η κατανόηση όλων των συντομεύσεων που χρησιμοποιούνται σε ένα δεδομένο έγγραφο συχνά απαιτεί εκτεταμένη γνώση του τομέα-στόχου και τη δυνατότητα διασφάλισης με βάση το πλαίσιο. Αυτό δημιουργεί σημαντικά εμπόδια εισόδου στους νεοεισερχόμενους και δυσκολίες στην αυτοματοποιημένη επεξεργασία εγγράφων. Τα υπάρχοντα συστήματα επέκτασης συντομεύσεων ή εργαλεία απαιτούν ουσιαστικές τεχνικές γνώσεις για τη δημιουργία ή τη δημιουργία ισχυρών υποθέσεων που περιορίζουν τη χρήση τους στην πράξη. Εδώ, παρουσιάζουμε το σύστημα που βασίζεται σε σύγχρονες μεθόδους για τον προσδιορισμό συντομεύσεων, ακρωνύμων και ορισμού τους και έναν νέο αποσαφηνιστή για την επέκταση συντομεύσεων σε μια εύκολα προσβάσιμη διαδικτυακή λύση.', 'kk': 'Көшірмелеу мен акронимдер көпшілігінде мәтін коммуникациясының бөлігі. Бірақ бұл құжаттарды қолданатын құжаттарда қысқартуларды анықталмайды. Келтірілген құжатта қолданылатын барлық қысқартуларды түсіну көбінде мақсатты доменге және контексті негіздеген қысқартуларды өзгерту мүмкіндігі керек. Бұл автоматты түрде құжатты өзгерту үшін жаңа келгендерге және қиындықтардың маңызды жазылу бардықтарын құрады. Бар қысқарту жүйелері немесе құралдар қолдануды шектеу үшін көп техникалық білім керек немесе тәжірибеде қолдануды шектеу үшін күшті таңдау керек. Мұнда біз қысқарту кеңейтушін, қысқарту әдістерін, акронимдерді, анықтамаларды анықтау күйіне құратын жүйе жұмыс ішінде жұмыс ішінде жасайтын қысқарту кеңейтушін және романдың қысқарту кеңейтуі үшін веб- негіздегі', 'ms': 'Persingkatan dan akronim adalah sebahagian dari komunikasi teks dalam kebanyakan domain. Namun, pendekatan tidak perlu ditakrif dalam dokumen yang menggunakannya. Memahami semua pendekatan yang digunakan dalam dokumen tertentu sering memerlukan pengetahuan luas bagi domain sasaran dan kemampuan untuk nyahambiguasi berdasarkan konteks. Ini mencipta halangan masukan yang besar bagi orang baru dan kesulitan dalam pemprosesan dokumen automatik. Sistem atau alat pengembangan pendekatan yang wujud memerlukan pengetahuan teknikal yang sah untuk ditetapkan atau membuat asumsi yang kuat yang membatasi penggunaan mereka dalam praktek. Di sini, kita perkenalkan Penambang Persingkatan, sistem yang membina pada kaedah seni untuk pengenalan pendekatan, akronim dan definisi mereka dan penyelesaian baru untuk pengembangan pendekatan dalam penyelesaian berasaskan web yang mudah diakses.', 'mk': 'Abbreviations and acronyms are a part of textual communication in most domains.  Сепак, кратенијата не се неопходно дефинирани во документите кои ги вработуваат. Разбирањето на сите кратенки кои се користат во одреден документ честопати бара широко знаење за доменот на целта и способноста да се разјасни врз основа на контекст. Ова создава значителни бариери за влез за новите лица и тешкотии во автоматизираното обработување на документите. Постојаните системи или алатки за проширување на кратението бараат значително техничко знаење за воспоставување или правење силни претпоставки кои ја ограничуваат нивната употреба во практиката. Тука, го претставуваме Абривација Експандер, систем кој се базира на најсовремени методи за идентификација на кратенија, акроними и нивни дефиниции и нов дејамбигуатор за експанзија на кратението во лесно пристапно веб-базирано решение.', 'mn': 'Багасгал, акроним нь ихэнх хэсэгт бичсэн харилцааны нэг хэсэг юм. Гэхдээ тодорхойлолтууд хэрэглэдэг баримт дээр тодорхойлж чадахгүй. Дараагийн баримт хэрэглэгдсэн бүх тодорхойлолтуудыг ойлгохын тулд зорилготой холбооны талаар олон тодорхойлолтуудын мэдлэг болон нөхцөл байдлын үндсэн байдлын талаар бага зэрэг Энэ нь шинэ хүмүүст автоматжуулан баримт боловсруулахын тулд маш их хүнд оролцох баримт үүсгэдэг. Бага зэрэг тохиромжтой өргөн систем эсвэл хэрэгсэл нь ажиллагаанд хэрэглэгдэхийг хязгаарлахын тулд маш их техник мэдлэг хэрэгтэй. Энд бид Abbreviation Expander-г харуулж байна. Энэ нь тодорхойлолт, акроним, түүний тодорхойлолтуудыг тодорхойлох урлагийн арга замын тухай бий болгодог систем юм.', 'ml': 'അബ്രെയിവേഷനുകളും അക്രോണിമിഷങ്ങളും മിക്കവാദികളില്\u200d മിക്കവാദികളുടെ ടെക്സ്കൂള്\u200d കമ്മിക്കേഷനില്\u200d  എന്നാലും അബ്രെയിവേഷനുകള്\u200d അവയെ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന രേഖകളില്\u200d വ്യക്തമാക്കിയിട്ടില്ല. കൊടുത്ത രേഖയില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന എല്ലാ അബ്രിവേഷനുകളും പലപ്പോഴും ലക്ഷ്യം ഡൊമെയിനെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശാലമായ അറിവുകളും വി പുതിയ രേഖകളുടെ പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d നിന്നും പ്രയാസങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടിയുള്ള എന്\u200dട്രിക്ക് തടസ്സങ്ങള്\u200d ഇത് സ നിലവിലുള്ള വികസിപ്പ് സിസ്റ്റം അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d സ്ഥാപിക്കുന്നതിനോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d അവരുടെ ഉപയോഗം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനത്തില്\u200d  ഇവിടെ, നമ്മള്\u200d അബ്രെയിവേഷന്\u200d എക്സ്പെന്\u200dഡര്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്ന ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത്, അബ്രെയിവേഷന്\u200d രീതിയില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നത്, അബ്രെയിവേ', 'mt': 'It-taqsiriet u l-akronimi huma parti mill-komunikazzjoni testwali fil-biċċa l-kbira tad-dominji. Madankollu, it-taqsiriet mhumiex neċessarjament definiti fid-dokumenti li jimpjegawhom. Understanding all abbreviations used in a given document often requires extensive knowledge of the target domain and the ability to disambiguate based on context.  Dan joħloq ostakli konsiderevoli għad-dħul għal dawk ġodda u diffikultajiet fl-ipproċessar awtomatizzat tad-dokumenti. Sistemi jew għodod eżistenti ta’ espansjoni ta’ abbrevjazzjoni jeħtieġu għarfien tekniku sostanzjali għat-twaqqif jew jagħmlu suppożizzjonijiet b’saħħithom li jillimitaw l-użu tagħhom fil-prattika. Hawnhekk, qed nippreżentaw Abbreviation Expander, sistema li tibni fuq metodi l-aktar avvanzati għall-identifikazzjoni ta’ abbreviazzjonijiet, akronimi u d-definizzjonijiet tagħhom u diżambigwatur ġdid għall-espansjoni ta’ abbreviazzjonijiet f’soluzzjoni faċilment a ċċessibbli fuq l-internet.', 'no': 'Forkortingar og akronymar er ein del av tekstkommunikasjon i dei fleste domene. Det er imidlertid ikkje nødvendig forkortingar definert i dokument som brukar dei. For å forstå alle forkortingar som vert bruka i eit oppgjeven dokument krev ofte utvida kunnskap om måldområdet og kapasiteten for å slå av sambandet basert på kontekst. Dette oppretter mykje oppføringsbehandlar for nye kommander og vanskeleghetar i automatisk dokumenthandsaming. Det eksisterande forkortingssystemet eller verktøy krev stor teknisk kunnskap for å setja opp eller gjera sterke antar som grenserer bruken av dei i praksis. Her viser vi forskrivingsutvidaren, eit system som bygger på tilstanden til kunstmetodane for identifisering av forkortingar, akronymar og definisjonane sine og eit roman disambiguator for forkortingar i ei enkelt tilgjengeleg nettbasert løysing.', 'pl': 'Skróty i akronimy są częścią komunikacji tekstowej w większości dziedzin. Jednak skróty nie muszą być definiowane w dokumentach, które je stosują. Zrozumienie wszystkich skrótów używanych w danym dokumencie często wymaga szerokiej znajomości domeny docelowej oraz umiejętności dyjednoznaczności w oparciu o kontekst. Stwarza to znaczne bariery wejścia dla nowych osób oraz trudności w zautomatyzowanym przetwarzaniu dokumentów. Istniejące systemy rozszerzania skrótów lub narzędzia wymagają znacznej wiedzy technicznej do ustanowienia lub podejmowania silnych założeń ograniczających ich stosowanie w praktyce. Przedstawiamy tutaj system Abbreviation Expander, który opiera się na najnowocześniejszych metodach identyfikacji skrótów, akronimów i ich definicji oraz nowatorski dyambiguator rozszerzania skrótów w łatwo dostępnym rozwiązaniu internetowym.', 'so': 'Iswidhishka iyo aqoonsiga waa qeyb ka mid ah macluumaadka qoraalka ee meelaha badan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qalabka laguma caddeyn dukumentiyada shaqada. Markii aad ogaato in dhammaan tababarida lagu isticmaalo dukumenti la qoray ay ay marar badan u baahan yihiin aqoonta aad u dheer oo ku saabsan deegaanka goalka iyo awoodda aad ku burin karto daboolka. Taasi waxay u abuurtaa qalabka soo gelinta ee dadka cusub iyo dhibaatooyin ay ku jirtaan baaraandegista dukumentiga oo gaarka ah. Isticmaalka koritaanka ama qalabka waxaa loo baahan yahay aqoonta xirfadda ah si loo dhiso ama uu u sameeyo malayo xoog leh oo ku xadgudba isticmaalkooda. Halkan, waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa qalabka abbreviation, nidaam oo ku dhisaya xaalada farshaxanka, aqoonsiga abbaaraha, aqoonsiga iyo sawirkooda iyo kala soocmaalka warqada ah, si fudud ugu fudud xafiiska internetka.', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ ඇක්රෝනිම් වලින් විශාල සම්බන්ධයේ කොටසක්. නමුත්, සංක්\u200dරීයාවල් ඔවුන්ව භාවිත කරපු ලිපින්ත වලට අවශ්\u200dය විශ්වාස කරන්නේ නැහැ. දෙන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට භාවිත කරපු සියලු සංක්\u200dරියාවක් තේරුම් ගන්න අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා ලක්ෂ ප්\u200dරමාණය සහ සංක Name ඉතින් ඉතින් ප්\u200dරශ්නය විස්තරණ පද්ධතිය හෝ උපකරණය අවශ්\u200dය විශාල තාක්ෂණික දන්නවට අවශ්\u200dය වෙනවා නැත්තම මෙන්න, අපි අවශ්\u200dය විශාලකයෙන්, විශාල විශාලකයෙන්, අක්\u200dරෝනිම් සහ ඔවුන්ගේ විශේෂණය සඳහා අවශ්\u200dය විශාලකයෙන්, සුරක්ෂිත විශාලකයෙන් ප්\u200d', 'ro': 'Abrevierile și acronimele fac parte din comunicarea textuală în majoritatea domeniilor. Cu toate acestea, abrevierile nu sunt neapărat definite în documentele care le utilizează. Înțelegerea tuturor abrevierilor utilizate într-un anumit document necesită adesea cunoaștere extinsă a domeniului țintă și capacitatea de a dezambiguiza în funcție de context. Acest lucru creează obstacole considerabile la intrare în calea noilor veniți și dificultăți în procesarea automatizată a documentelor. Sistemele sau instrumentele existente de extindere a abrevierilor necesită cunoștințe tehnice substanțiale pentru a crea sau a face ipoteze solide care limitează utilizarea lor în practică. Aici prezentăm Abbreviation Expander, un sistem care se bazează pe metode de ultimă oră pentru identificarea abrevierilor, acronimelor și definițiilor acestora și un nou dezambiguizator pentru expansiunea abrevierilor într-o soluție ușor accesibilă pe web.', 'sr': 'Ubrzavanje i akronima su deo tekstualne komunikacije u većini domena. Međutim, kratkosti nisu neophodno definisani u dokumentima koji ih zapošljavaju. Razumevanje svih saobraćaja korištenih u određenom dokumentu često zahteva široko znanje ciljnog domena i sposobnosti disambiguacije na temelju konteksta. To stvara značajne barijere za ulazak novog dolaska i poteškoće u automatskom obradi dokumenta. Postojeći sistemi proširenja saobraćaja ili alata zahtevaju značajno tehničko znanje za uspostavljanje ili napraviti jake pretpostavke koje ograničavaju njihovu upotrebu na praksi. Ovdje predstavljamo razvijač smanjenja, sistem koji se temelji na stanju umetničkih metoda za identifikaciju kratkoća, akronima i njihovih definicija i novog disambiguatora za proširenje kratkog razvoja u lako dostupnom rešenju na internetu.', 'ta': 'பெரும்பாலான நிரல் தொடர்புகளில் ஒரு பகுதியாக உள்ளது. However, abbreviations are not necessarily defined in documents that employ them. கொடுக்கப்பட்ட ஆவணத்தில் பயன்படுத்தப்படும் அனைத்து குறிப்புகளையும் புரிந்து கொள்வது போல் குறிப்பிட்ட கூட்டத்தின்  இது புதிய உள்ளீட்டு தடைப்புகள் மற்றும் தானியங்கி ஆவண செயல்படுத்தலில் சிக்கல் Existing abbreviation expansion systems or tools require substantial technical knowledge for set up or make strong assumptions which limit their use in practice.  இங்கு, நாம் காண்பிக்கிறோம் ஒரு அமைப்பு, எளிதாக அணுகக்கூடிய இணைய தீர்வுத் தீர்வுகளில் உள்ள கலை முறைமைகளை அடையாளம் செய்யும் கலை முறைகளின் மீது கட்டுப்படுத்தும்', 'sv': 'Förkortningar och akronymer är en del av textkommunikation inom de flesta områden. Förkortningar definieras dock inte nödvändigtvis i dokument som använder dem. Att förstå alla förkortningar som används i ett givet dokument kräver ofta omfattande kunskaper om måldomänen och förmåga att skilja sig från kontext. Detta skapar betydande inträdeshinder för nyanlända och svårigheter med automatiserad dokumentbehandling. Befintliga förkortningssystem eller verktyg kräver betydande tekniska kunskaper för att kunna upprätta eller göra starka antaganden som begränsar användningen av dem i praktiken. Här presenterar vi Abbreviation Expander, ett system som bygger på toppmoderna metoder för identifiering av förkortningar, akronymer och deras definitioner och en ny disambiguator för förkortningsexpansion i en lättillgänglig webbaserad lösning.', 'ur': 'بہت سی دامنوں میں تخمین اور آکرونیم کا ایک حصہ ہے۔ However, abbreviations are not necessarily defined in documents that use them. ایک دکھائی دکھائی میں استعمال کئے ہوئے تمام مخلوقات کو سمجھنے کی ضرورت ہے کہ موقعیت ڈومین کے معاملہ میں بہت زیادہ علم اور متصلہ پر بنیاد رکھنے کی قابلیت بغیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ یہ نئی آئیں کرنے والوں کے لئے بہت زیادہ وارد آنٹر بازیوں کو پیدا کرتا ہے اور آزاد دکھانے کی پردازی میں مشکلات۔ Existing abbreviation expansion systems or tools require substantial technical knowledge for set up or make strong assumptions which limit their use in practice. یہاں، ہم کمزور پھیلانے والے کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک سیستم جو آسان طور پر دسترسی حاصل کرنے والی ویب بنیاد کے حل میں آسان طریقے کے لئے آهنگ طریقے پر بناتا ہے۔', 'vi': 'Các thuật ngữ và các chữ ký là một phần của kết cấu trong phần lớn miền. Tuy nhiên, các loại viết tắt không cần thiết được xác định trong những tài liệu sử dụng. Hiểu được tất cả các loại viết tắt được sử dụng trong một tài liệu đã đưa ra thường là yêu cầu hiểu biết rộng về đích và khả năng biến dạng dựa trên ngữ cảnh. Việc này tạo ra những rào cản cho người mới đến và khó khăn trong việc xử lý tài liệu tự động. Các hệ thống viết tắt mở rộng cần thiết kiến thức kỹ thuật quan trọng để thiết lập hoặc thực hiện những giả thiết mạnh mẽ hạn chế sử dụng của nó. Ở đây, chúng tôi giới thiệu Người dãn đại diện, một hệ thống xây dựng dựa trên các phương pháp nghệ thuật để xác định các loại viết tắt, các từ cấu tạo và định nghĩa của chúng, và một bộ phân dạng mới cho việc mở rộng các loại viết tắt trong một giải pháp có sẵn.', 'uz': "Ko'pchilik va ko'pchilik davlatlarda matn aloqalarining bir qismi. Lekin, tadbirlik ularni ishlab chiqaradigan hujjatlarga aniqlanmagan emas. Koʻrsatilgan hujjatda ishlatilgan hamma abbreviations ko'pincha foydalanuvchi domen haqida kengaytirish kerak va muhit asosida ajratish imkoniyati kerak. Name Name Bu yerda biz Abbreviation Expander, o'zgarishlar, acronymlar va taʼriflarini aniqlashning holatida yaratadigan tizim va yangi qismlarini aniqlash uchun foydalanuvchi, foydalanish uchun foydalanilgan veb-asosida yordam ajratish uchun.", 'hr': 'Ukratak i akronim su dio tekstualne komunikacije u većini domena. Međutim, kratkosti nisu neophodno definisani u dokumentima koji ih zapošljavaju. Razumijevanje svih skraćenja korištenih u određenom dokumentu često zahtijeva široko znanje ciljnog domena i sposobnosti disambiguacije na temelju konteksta. To stvara značajne barijere ulaska na nove dolaze i teškoće u obradi automatskih dokumenta. Postojeći sustavi proširenja skraćenja ili alata zahtijevaju značajno tehničko znanje za uspostavljanje ili napraviti jake pretpostavke koje ograničavaju njihovu uporabu na praksi. Ovdje predstavljamo proširenje smanjenja, sustav koji se temelji na stanju umjetničkih metoda za identifikaciju kratkoća, akronima i njihovih definicija i novog disambiguatora za proširenje kratkoća u lako dostupnom web rješenju.', 'da': 'Forkortelser og akronymer er en del af tekstkommunikation på de fleste områder. Forkortelser er imidlertid ikke nødvendigvis defineret i dokumenter, der anvender dem. At forstå alle forkortelser, der anvendes i et givet dokument, kræver ofte omfattende kendskab til måldomænet og evnen til at adskille sig baseret på kontekst. Dette skaber betydelige adgangsbarrierer for nyankomne og vanskeligheder med automatiseret dokumentbehandling. Eksisterende forkortelsesudvidelsessystemer eller -værktøjer kræver betydelig teknisk viden til at etablere eller fremsætte stærke antagelser, der begrænser deres anvendelse i praksis. Her præsenterer vi Abbreviation Expander, et system, der bygger på state of te art metoder til identifikation af forkortelser, akronymer og deres definitioner og en ny disambiguator for forkortelsesudvidelse i en let tilgængelig webbaseret løsning.', 'de': 'Abkürzungen und Akronyme sind in den meisten Bereichen Teil der Textkommunikation. Abkürzungen sind jedoch nicht unbedingt in Dokumenten definiert, in denen sie verwendet werden. Das Verständnis aller in einem Dokument verwendeten Abkürzungen erfordert oft umfangreiche Kenntnisse der Zieldomäne und die Fähigkeit, kontextbezogen zu disambiguaren. Dies schafft erhebliche Einstiegshürden für Neulinge und Schwierigkeiten bei der automatisierten Dokumentenverarbeitung. Bestehende Abkürzungserweiterungssysteme oder Tools erfordern erhebliche technische Kenntnisse für den Aufbau oder treffen starke Annahmen, die ihren Einsatz in der Praxis einschränken. Hier präsentieren wir Abkürzung Expander, ein System, das auf modernsten Methoden zur Identifizierung von Abkürzungen, Akronymen und deren Definitionen aufbaut und einen neuartigen Disambiguator zur Abkürzungserweiterung in einer leicht zugänglichen webbasierten Lösung.', 'nl': 'Afkortingen en acroniemen maken deel uit van tekstcommunicatie in de meeste domeinen. De afkortingen worden echter niet noodzakelijkerwijs gedefinieerd in documenten waarin ze worden gebruikt. Het begrijpen van alle afkortingen die in een bepaald document worden gebruikt vereist vaak uitgebreide kennis van het doeldomein en de mogelijkheid om te verduidelijken op basis van context. Dit leidt tot aanzienlijke toegangsbelemmeringen voor nieuwkomers en moeilijkheden bij geautomatiseerde documentverwerking. Bestaande afkortingsuitbreidingssystemen of -tools vereisen aanzienlijke technische kennis voor het opzetten of maken van sterke aannames die het gebruik ervan in de praktijk beperken. Hier presenteren we Abkürzing Expander, een systeem dat voortbouwt op state-of-the-art methoden voor het identificeren van afkortingen, acroniemen en hun definities en een nieuwe disambiguator voor afkortingsuitbreiding in een gemakkelijk toegankelijke webgebaseerde oplossing.', 'bg': 'Съкращенията и акронимите са част от текстовата комуникация в повечето области. Обаче съкращенията не са задължително определени в документите, които ги използват. Разбирането на всички съкращения, използвани в даден документ, често изисква обширни познания за целевия домейн и способността да се разграничава въз основа на контекста. Това създава значителни бариери за навлизане на новодошлите и трудности при автоматизираната обработка на документи. Съществуващите системи или инструменти за разширяване на съкращенията изискват значителни технически познания за създаването или изготвянето на силни предположения, които ограничават използването им на практика. Тук представяме система, която се основава на най-съвременните методи за идентифициране на съкращения, акроними и техните дефиниции и нов дисамбигуатор за разширяване на съкращенията в лесно достъпно уеб базирано решение.', 'fa': 'کاهش\u200cسازی و آکرونیم بخشی از ارتباط متن در بیشتر دامنه\u200cها هستند. با این حال، کوتاه\u200cها به طور لازم در سند\u200cهایی که آنها را استفاده می\u200cکنند تعریف نمی\u200cشوند. دریافت تمام کوتاه\u200cهای استفاده در یک سند داده اغلب نیاز دارد که علم گسترده\u200cای از دامنه هدف و توانایی که بر پایه\u200cی محیط ناپدید شوند نیاز دارد. این باعث می\u200cشود مانع وارد شدن بسیار بزرگی برای پیدا کنندگان جدید و مشکلات در پرداخت سند خودکار باشد. سیستم\u200cهای گسترش یا ابزارهای کوتاه\u200cای موجود نیاز به دانش فنی\u200cهای زیادی برای ایجاد یا ساختن فرضیه\u200cهای قوی که استفاده\u200cشان را در تمرین محدود می\u200cکنند. در اینجا، ما یک سیستم کوتاه\u200cسازی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، که روی حالت روش\u200cهای هنری برای شناسایی کوتاه\u200cسازی، آکرونیم\u200cها و تعریف\u200cهایشان، و یک ناامبی\u200cگاتور رمانی برای گسترش کوتاه\u200cسازی در یک راه حل بسیار راحت دسترسی به وب می\u200cرسد.', 'tr': 'Azatlar we akronymlar köp sahypalarda tekst iletişimi ýagdaýdyr. Bu şekilde, kısayollar işleýän dokumentlerde belli edilmez. Berilen bir senede kullanılan bütün kısayolları anlamak köplenç hedef domeniň bilgisini ve kontekste dayanan şekilde azaltmak başarısızlığı gerek. Bu täze gelenler üçin möhüm giriş barrierleri döredir we otomatik sened işlemesinde kynçylyklar. Öň bar kısaytlar sistemleri ýa-da esbaplar praktikada ullanyşyny çykarmak üçin örän teknik bilgileri gerek. Bu ýerde, küçümsel döwletleri, kısayollaryň, akronymlaryň we olaryň tanyşlaryny we saýlamak üçin kiçiräk döwletlerini a ňsatlyk bilen elýeterli web çözümlerini tanamak üçin sungat döwletlerini üýtgeden bir sisteme görkezip berýäris.', 'ko': '대부분의 분야에서 줄임말과 알파벳 줄임말은 텍스트 교류의 일부분이다.그러나 약어를 사용하는 파일에 반드시 약어를 정의하는 것은 아니다.주어진 문서에 사용된 모든 줄임말을 이해하려면 목표역에 대한 광범위한 이해가 필요하고 상하문에 따라 잘못된 뜻을 없앨 수 있다.이것은 신입생들에게 상당히 큰 진입 장벽을 조성했고 자동화 문서 처리에도 어려움을 가져왔다.기존의 줄임말 확장 시스템이나 도구는 대량의 기술 지식을 필요로 하여 설정하거나 강력한 가설을 만들어야 하기 때문에 실천에서의 사용을 제한한다.여기서 우리는 줄임말 확장기를 소개한다. 이것은 줄임말, 알파벳 줄임말과 그 정의를 식별하는 최신 방법을 바탕으로 한 시스템, 그리고 쉽게 접근할 수 있는 웹 기반 해결 방안에서 줄임말 확장을 하는 신형 컨트롤러이다.', 'id': 'Persingkatan dan akronima adalah bagian dari komunikasi tekstual di kebanyakan domain. Namun, penderaan tidak diperlukan didefinisikan dalam dokumen yang menggunakannya. Mengerti semua penderaan yang digunakan dalam dokumen tertentu sering membutuhkan pengetahuan ekstensif dari domain target dan kemampuan untuk menyatakan berdasarkan konteks. Ini menciptakan penghalang masuk yang konsiderel untuk orang baru dan kesulitan dalam proses dokumen otomatis. Sistem atau alat ekspansi pendekatan yang ada membutuhkan pengetahuan teknik yang besar untuk mengatur atau membuat asumsi yang kuat yang membatasi penggunaan mereka dalam praktek. Here, we present Abbreviation Expander, a system that builds on state of the art methods for identification of abbreviations, acronyms and their definitions and a novel disambiguator for abbreviation expansion in an easily accessible web-based solution.', 'af': "Afbreidings en akronime is 'n deel van tekstuul kommunikasie in die meeste domeine. Maar toekorting is nie noodsaaklik gedefinieerd in dokumente wat hulle gebruik word nie. Die verstaan van alle kruifbreidings gebruik in 'n gegewe dokument benodig dikwels uitbreidige kennis van die doel domein en die moontlik om te ontwikkel gebaseer op konteks. Hierdie skep aansienlike inskrywing hinders vir nuwe kommers en moeilikhedes in outomatiese dokumentverwerking. Bestaande kruifbreiding uitbreiding stelsels of nutsprogramme benodig substantiele tegniese kennis vir opstel of maak sterke aanvaardes wat hulle gebruik in praksie beperk. Hier, ons stel 'n Stelsel wat op staat van die kuns metodes bou vir identifiseer van kruifbreidings, akronime en hul definisies en 'n roman ontsammings vir kruifbreiding uitbreiding in 'n maklik toeganklik web-gebaseerde oplossing.", 'am': 'በአብዛኞቹ ሀገሮች ውስጥ የጽሑፍ ግንኙነት ማቀናቀል ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳን፣ ጥብቀት በሚገዙት ሰነድ ላይ ግለጥ አይደለም፡፡ በተሰጠው ሰነድ ውስጥ የሚጠቀሙትን ሁሉ በመስተዋል ብዙ ጊዜ የአካላቢውን ዶሜን እና በሥርዓት መሠረት ማሳየት ስልጣን ያስፈልጋል፡፡ This creates considerable entry barriers to newcomers and difficulties in automated document processing.  የአሁኑ ስብሰባ ወይም መሣሪያዎች የስብሰባ መፍታት ወይም መሣሪያዎች ጥያቄ የስህተት እውቀት ያስፈልጋል፡፡ ወደዚህ፣ በአብሪዌያዊ አካባቢ አካባቢሽን፣ አክሮኒም እና ግንኙነታቸውን እና የመረጃ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና የኢንተርኔት አካባቢ አካባቢዩዩዩአር በመስጠት ላይ በተቀላል ማግኘት የሚችል የድረ ገጽ ማቀናጃ ነው', 'sw': 'Vitendo vya upinzani na vifua vingi ni sehemu ya mawasiliano ya ujumbe katika maeneo mengi. However, abbreviations are not necessarily defined in documents that employ them.  Kuelewa vibaya vyote vilivyotumiwa katika nyaraka maalumu mara nyingi vinahitaji ufahamu mkubwa wa ndani ya malengo na uwezo wa kutofautisha kwa muktadha. Hii inatengeneza vikwazo vingi vya kuingia kwa wageni wapya na matatizo katika upasuaji wa nyaraka binafsi. Existing abbreviation expansion systems or tools require substantial technical knowledge for set up or make strong assumptions which limit their use in practice.  Hapa, tunamweka Mtandao wa Uvurugu, mfumo unaoanzisha hali ya njia za sanaa za kutambua vibaya, utambulisho na maelezo yao na ubaguzi wa riwaya kwa ajili ya kuongezeka kwa unyanyasaji katika ufumbuzi wa kirahisi wa mtandao wa intaneti.', 'sq': 'Shkurtimet dhe akronimet janë pjesë e komunikimit tekstual në shumicën e domeneve. Megjithatë, shkurtimet nuk janë domosdoshmërisht të përcaktuara në dokumentet që i përdorin ato. Përkuptimi i të gjitha shkurtimeve të përdorura në një dokument të caktuar shpesh kërkon njohuri të gjerë të domenisë objektive dhe aftësinë për të çambiguar bazuar në kontekst. Kjo krijon pengesa të konsiderueshme hyrjeje për të rinjtë dhe vështirësi në procesimin automatik të dokumenteve. Existing abbreviation expansion systems or tools require substantial technical knowledge for set up or make strong assumptions which limit their use in practice.  Këtu, ne paraqesim Shprehjen Shprehje Shprehje, një sistem që ndërton në metodat më të larta për identifikimin e shkurtimeve, akronimeve dhe përkufizimeve të tyre dhe një çambiguator i ri për zgjerimin e shkurtimeve në një zgjidhje të lehtë të përdorueshme në internet.', 'bs': 'Ubrzavanje i akronima su dio tekstualne komunikacije u većini domena. Međutim, kratkosti nisu neophodno definisani u dokumentima koji ih zapošljavaju. Razumijevanje svih skraćenja korištenih u određenom dokumentu često zahtijeva široko znanje ciljnog domena i sposobnosti disambiguacije na temelju konteksta. To stvara značajne barijere ulaska za nove dolaze i poteškoće u automatskoj obradi dokumenta. Postojeći sistemi proširenja kratkoća ili alata zahtijevaju značajno tehničko znanje za uspostavljanje ili napraviti jake pretpostavke koje ograničavaju njihovu upotrebu na praksi. Ovdje predstavljamo proširenje smanjenja, sistem koji se temelji na stanju umjetničkih metoda za identifikaciju kratkoća, akronima i njihovih definicija i novog disambiguatora za proširenje kratkoća u jednostavno dostupnom web rješenju.', 'hy': 'Կարճիռները և ակրոնիմները տեքստալ հաղորդակցման մասն են մեծամասնության ոլորտներում: However, abbreviations are not necessarily defined in documents that employ them.  Տեղադրված փաստաթղթի մեջ օգտագործվող բոլոր կարճումները հասկանալը հաճախ պահանջում է ընդլայնված գիտելիք նպատակային տիեզերքի մասին և կոնտեքստի վրա հիմնված բացատրելու ունակությունից: This creates considerable entry barriers to newcomers and difficulties in automated document processing.  Գոյություն ունի կարճ ընդլայնման համակարգեր կամ գործիքներ, որոնք պահանջում են նշանակալի տեխնիկական գիտելիքներ ստեղծելու համար կամ կայացնելու հզոր ենթադրություններ, որոնք սահմանափակում են նրանց օգտագործումը իրական Այստեղ մենք ներկայացնում ենք Ագրավիացիայի ընդլայնողը, մի համակարգ, որը հիմնված է կարճվածքների, ակրոնիմների և դրանց սահմանումների հայտնաբերման ամենաբարձր մեթոդների վրա, և կարճվածքների ընդլայնման նոր անբացատրողը հեշտությամբ հասանելի վեբ-հիմնված լուծում:', 'cs': 'Zkratky a zkratky jsou součástí textové komunikace ve většině domén. Zkratky však nejsou nutně definovány v dokumentech, které je používají. Porozumění všem zkratkám používaným v daném dokumentu často vyžaduje rozsáhlé znalosti cílové domény a schopnost rozlišovat na základě kontextu. To vytváří značné vstupní překážky pro nováčky a obtíže v automatizovaném zpracování dokumentů. Stávající zkratkové rozšiřovací systémy nebo nástroje vyžadují značné technické znalosti pro nastavení nebo vytváření silných předpokladů, které omezují jejich použití v praxi. Zde představujeme Abbreviation Expander, systém, který staví na nejmodernějších metodách identifikace zkratek, zkratek a jejich definicí a nový disambiguator pro rozšíření zkratek ve snadno přístupném webovém řešení.', 'et': 'Lühendid ja lühendid on enamikus valdkondades tekstikommunikatsiooni osa. Lühendid ei ole siiski tingimata määratletud dokumentides, kus neid kasutatakse. Kõikide konkreetses dokumendis kasutatavate lühendite mõistmine nõuab sageli ulatuslikke teadmisi sihtdomeenist ja võimet kontekstist lähtuvalt eristada. See tekitab uutele tulnukatele märkimisväärseid sisenemistõkkeid ja raskusi dokumentide automatiseeritud töötlemisel. Olemasolevad lühendite laiendamise süsteemid või vahendid nõuavad olulisi tehnilisi teadmisi, et luua või teha tugevaid eeldusi, mis piiravad nende kasutamist praktikas. Siin tutvustame süsteemi, mis põhineb lühendite, akronüümide ja nende määratluste identifitseerimise tipptasemel meetoditel ning uudset lühendite laiendamise selgitust hõlpsasti kättesaadavas veebipõhises lahenduses.', 'az': 'Qısqancılıqlar və akronimlər əksəriyyətdə tekst iletişiminin bir parçasıdır. Lakin, qısqartmalar onları istifadə edən belələrdə təyin edilməz. Beləliklə belə bir dökümdə kullanılan bütün qısmarları anlamaq məqsəd domeinin geniş bilgi və məlumatların dəyişdirilməsi bacarılması lazımdır. Bu, yeni gələnlər üçün çox çətin giriş səbəbi yaradır və avtomatik döküm işləməsində çətinliklər yaradır. Əvvəlki qısqartma genişləmə sistemləri və vasitələri təqdirdə istifadə edilməsini müəyyən edən və ya güclü fikirləri qurmaq üçün çox tehnik bilgi lazımdır. Burada, küçük genişləyici, qısqartmalar, akronimlər və tanımları təsdiqləmək üçün asanlıqla internet tabanlı çətinliklərdə asanlıqla müvəffəqiyyətə istifadə edən bir sistem göstəririk.', 'bn': 'বেশীরভাগ ডোমেনের টেক্সচুয়াল যোগাযোগের অংশ। কিন্তু তাদের কাজ করা নথিপত্রে নির্ধারণ করা হয় না। নির্দিষ্ট নথিতে ব্যবহৃত সকল অপব্যবহার বুঝতে প্রায়শই লক্ষ্য ডোমেইনের বিস্তারিত জ্ঞান এবং প্রেক্ষাপটের ভিত্তিতে বি এটি স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ডকুমেন্ট প্রক্রিয়ায় নতুন প্রবেশাধিকার এবং কষ্ট তৈরি করে। বিদ্যমান বিস্তৃত ব্যবস্থা বা টুলের বিস্তারিত প্রযুক্তিগত জ্ঞানের প্রয়োজন, যা তাদের ব্যবহারের সীমাবদ্ধ করে দেয়। Here, we present Abbreviation Expander, a system that builds on state of the art methods for identification of abbreviations, acronyms and their definitions and a novel disambiguator for abbreviation expansion in an easily accessible web-based solution.', 'fi': 'Lyhenteet ja lyhenteet ovat osa tekstiviestintää useimmilla aloilla. Lyhenteitä ei kuitenkaan välttämättä määritellä niitä käyttävissä asiakirjoissa. Kaikkien tietyssä asiakirjassa käytettyjen lyhenteiden ymmärtäminen edellyttää usein laajaa tietoa kohdealueesta ja kykyä erottaa toisistaan kontekstin perusteella. Tämä aiheuttaa huomattavia maahantulon esteitä uusille tulokkaille ja vaikeuksia automaattisessa asiakirjojen käsittelyssä. Nykyiset lyhenteiden laajennusjärjestelmät tai -välineet edellyttävät huomattavaa teknistä tietämystä tai tekevät vahvoja oletuksia, jotka rajoittavat niiden käyttöä käytännössä. Tässä esitellään lyhenteiden, lyhenteiden ja niiden määritelmien tunnistamiseen käytettäviä viimeisimpiä menetelmiä hyödyntävä järjestelmä lyhenteiden, lyhenteiden ja niiden määritelmien tunnistamiseen sekä uusi lyhenteiden laajennuksen selittäjä helposti saavutettavassa verkkopohjaisessa ratkaisussa.', 'ca': "Les abreviacions i acronimes formen part de la comunicació textual en la majoria de dominis. No obstant això, les abreviacions no són necessariament definides en documents que les empleguen. Understanding all abbreviations used in a given document often requires extensive knowledge of the target domain and the ability to disambiguate based on context.  Això crea barreres considerables d'entrada per als nou arrivants i dificultats en el processament automatitzat de documents. Els sistemes o eines d'expansió de l'abreviatura existents requereixen coneixement tècnic substancial per crear o fer suposicions fortes que limitan el seu ús en la pràctica. Here, we present Abbreviation Expander, a system that builds on state of the art methods for identification of abbreviations, acronyms and their definitions and a novel disambiguator for abbreviation expansion in an easily accessible web-based solution.", 'jv': 'Sampeyan karo akuronim kuwi pating langkung wigatining teks politenessoffpolite"), and when there is a change ("assertive Learning all abbreviations used in a given document often obligates expanded knowings of the goal domain and the power to disablmbigute supported on context. Punika andhadurah akeh barêng-barêng nggawe nang pangunakno sing dumateng lan gampang Sayensi Iki, kita ngubah Uber Expander,sistem sing nggawe supoyo perusahaan karo hal-perusahaan kanggo kowé nggunakakno', 'ha': "Abbrazil da akronymi sune rabo daga mazaɓa na littafi cikin masu yawa. Babu lazima ba za'a bayyana abubuwa ba cikin takardar aiki da ke amfani da su. Ana fahimta duk abõkan da aka yi amfani da cikin takardar da aka bai wa shi, ana ƙayyade ilmi mai faɗi ga duk wanda aka yi amfani da shi kuma ma'abũcin ya bambanci a kan muhalli. This creates considerable entry barriers to newcomers and difficulties in automated document processing.  Akwai tsarin faɗaɗawa da ake kai yanzu ko kayan aiki, sun ƙayyade wani ilmi mai girma wa daidaita ko kuma ya sami zato mai ƙarfi da zato da za'a tsare amfani da su cikin aikin. Hiki, Munã halatar da Expander Abbration, wata na'urar wanda ke samar da halin na kunnuwa wa'anar yin ganin abubuwa, akronym da fassararsu da bangonsu da wani raba-buƙata na yanzu-faɗin da za'a samu'a sami'a mai sauƙi a samu'in da za'a iya samu'a sami zuwa-bango.", 'sk': 'Kratice in kratice so del besedilne komunikacije v večini področij. Vendar pa okrajšave niso nujno opredeljene v dokumentih, ki jih uporabljajo. Razumevanje vseh okrajšav, ki se uporabljajo v danem dokumentu, pogosto zahteva obsežno poznavanje ciljne domene in sposobnost razločitve glede na kontekst. To povzroča znatne ovire za vstop novincev in težave pri avtomatizirani obdelavi dokumentov. Obstoječi sistemi ali orodja za razširitev okrajšav zahtevajo bistveno tehnično znanje za vzpostavitev ali močne predpostavke, ki omejujejo njihovo uporabo v praksi. Predstavljamo vam sistem Abbreviation Expander, ki temelji na najsodobnejših metodah za identifikacijo okrajšav, okrajšav in njihovih definicij ter nov razložitelj za razširitev okrajšav v enostavno dostopni spletni rešitvi.', 'he': 'קיצורים ואקרונימים הם חלק מהתקשורת טקסטלית ברוב התחומים. עם זאת, התקצרות לא בהכרח מוגדרות במסמכים שמעסיקים אותן. להבין את כל התקצרות שמשתמשות במסמך מסוים דורשות לעתים קרובות ידע רחב של שטח המטרה והיכולת לנתק בהתבסס על הקשר. זה יוצר מחסומים כניסה משמעותיים למגירים חדשים וקשיקות בעבודת מסמכים אוטומטית. Existing abbreviation expansion systems or tools require substantial technical knowledge for set up or make strong assumptions which limit their use in practice.  Here, we present Abbreviation Expander, a system that builds on state of the art methods for identification of abbreviations, acronyms and their definitions and a novel disambiguator for abbreviation expansion in an easily accessible web-based solution.', 'bo': 'དབྱིབས་བཟོ་བ་དང་མཚོན་རྟགས་མང་ཆེ་ཤོས་ཡིག་གི་འབྲེལ་ལམ་གྱི་ཆ་ཤས་ཤིག་རེད། ཡིན་ནའང་དེ་དག་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་བཤད་ཀྱི་མིན་པར་གཏོང་བ་མེད། ཡིག་གེའི་ནང་དུ་བྱིན་ཡོད་པའི་ཆ་ཤས་ཆ་ཡོད་པ་ལ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་དམིགས་ཡུལ་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་དང་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་དང་། འདིས་དུས་ཡིག་ཆ་ལས་སྦྱོར་བའི་དུས་ཚོད་ལ་བཀག Existing shortcuts expansion system or tools require substantial technical knowledge for set up or make strong assumptions which limit their use in practice. འདིར་ངེད་ཚོའི་ནང་དུ་Abbreviation Expander(Expander)འཆར་བཤེར་བྱེད་པ་ཞིག་གིས་སྒྱུ་རྩལ་གྱི་གནས་སྟངས་ལ་ངོས་འཛིན་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'The INCEpTION Platform : Machine-Assisted and Knowledge-Oriented Interactive Annotation', 'ar': 'منصة INCEpTION: الشرح التفاعلي المدعوم آليًا والمعرفي', 'es': 'La plataforma Inception: anotación interactiva asistida por máquinas y orientada al conocimiento', 'pt': 'A plataforma INCEpTION: anotação interativa assistida por máquina e orientada ao conhecimento', 'fr': 'La plateforme Inception\xa0: Annotation interactive assistée par machine et axée sur les connaissances', 'ja': 'INCEpTIONプラットフォーム：機械支援と知識指向のインタラクティブアノテーション', 'zh': 'INCEpTION 平台:机器佐交互式注', 'hi': 'INCEPTION प्लेटफ़ॉर्म: मशीन-असिस्टेड और नॉलेज-ओरिएंटेड इंटरएक्टिव एनोटेशन', 'ru': 'Платформа INCEpTION: Интерактивная аннотация, основанная на машинном оборудовании и знаниях', 'ga': 'An tArdán INCEpTION: Anótáil Idirghníomhach Meaisín-Chuidithe agus Eolas-dhírithe', 'ka': 'INCEpTION პლატორმა', 'el': 'Η πλατφόρμα Η πλατφόρμα διαδραστική σημείωση υποβοηθούμενη από τη μηχανή και τη γνώση προσανατολισμένη', 'hu': 'Az INCEpTION platform: gépi segítségnyújtás és tudásorientált interaktív jegyzékek', 'it': 'La piattaforma INCEpTION: annotazione interattiva assistita dalla macchina e orientata alla conoscenza', 'kk': 'INCEpTION платформасы: Машина көмектесілген және білім бағытталған интерактивті жазбалар', 'mk': 'Платформата ИНЦЕПЦИЈА: Интерактивна анотација со помош на машина и ориентирана на знаење', 'ms': 'Platform INCEpTION: Annotasi Interaktif Bantuan Mesin dan Orientasi Pengetahuan', 'ml': 'INCEpTION പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോം: യന്ത്രങ്ങള്\u200d സഹായിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്നു, അറിവ്- മൂലപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ഇന്\u200dസെപ്പിഷന', 'mt': 'Il-Pjattaforma ta’ INĊEPZZJONI: Annotazzjoni Interattiva Aħjuna mill-Magni u Orientata lejn l-Għarfien', 'mn': 'ИНСЕПЦИЙ Платформ: Машин-тусламжтай, мэдлэг-эхлэлтэй интерактив нээлт', 'no': 'INCEpTION', 'pl': 'Platforma INCEpTION: Interaktywna adnotacja wspomagana maszynowo i zorientowana na wiedzę', 'sr': 'Platforma INCEpTION: Interaktivna Annotacija s mašinom pomaganja i znanja', 'ro': 'Platforma INCEpTION: Adnotare interactivă asistată de mașină și orientată spre cunoaștere', 'si': 'INCEpTION ප්ලැට්ෆෝම්: මැෂින්-සහයෝජනය සහ දන්නවන්-ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක කිරීම', 'lt': 'INCEpTION Platform: Machine-assisted and Knowledge-oriented Interactive Annotation', 'so': 'Qoraalka INCEpTION: Machine-assisted and Knowledge-oriented Interactive Annotation', 'sv': 'INCEpTION-plattformen: Maskinassisterad och kunskapsorienterad interaktiv notering', 'ta': 'INCEpTION திட்டம்: இயந்திரம் உதவியும் அறிவியலும் தூர்ந்தெடுக்கப்பட்ட இடைவெளிப்பாடு', 'ur': 'The INCEpTION Platform: Machine-Assisted and Knowledge-Oriented Interactive Annotation', 'uz': 'INCEpTION platformiName', 'vi': 'Máy trợ giúp máy và người hướng nhận thức thông báo tương tác', 'nl': 'Het INCEpTION Platform: Machine-Assisted and Knowledge-Oriented Interactive Annotation', 'da': 'INCEpTION-platformen: Maskinassisteret og vidensorienteret interaktiv notering', 'bg': 'Платформата ИНЦЕПЦИОН: Машинно подпомагана и ориентирана към знанието интерактивна анотация', 'hr': 'Platforma INCEpTION: Interaktivna izjava za pomoć strojeva i znanja', 'id': 'Platform INCEpTION: Anotasi Interaktif Dibantu Mesin dan Orientasi Ketahuan', 'ko': '시작 플랫폼: 기계 보조와 지식을 위한 상호작용 주석', 'fa': 'Platform INCEpTION: Annotation Interactive with Machine-Assisted and Knowledge-Oriented', 'de': 'Die INCEpTION Plattform: Machine-Assisted and Knowledge-Oriented Interactive Annotation', 'sw': 'Jukwaa la INCEpTION: Tangazo la moja kwa moja la Mashine na Utetezi', 'af': 'Die INCEpTION Platform: Masjien-Assistent en kennis-Orienteerde Interaktiewe Notasie', 'sq': 'Platforma INCEpTION: Anotacion Interaktiv i ndihmuar nga makina dhe i orientuar në njohuri', 'tr': 'INCEpTION Platform:Machine-Assisted and Knowledge-Oriented Interactive Annotation', 'am': 'ምርጫዎች', 'az': 'INCEpTION Platformu: Makin-Yardımcı və Bilim-Orientli Interaktiv Annotation', 'hy': 'INCEption պլատֆորմը. մեքենայով օգտագործված և գիտելիքով հիմնված ինտերակտիվ նշում', 'bn': 'ইনসেপ্টিশন প্ল্যাটফর্ম: মেশিন- সহযোগিতা এবং জ্ঞান-অর্থিত ইন্টারনেটিভ ইন্টারেক্টিভ অ্যানোটেশন', 'bs': 'Platforma INCEpTION: Interaktivna Annotacija za pomoć mašine i orientaciju znanja', 'cs': 'Platforma INCEpTION: strojově asistovaná a znalostně orientovaná interaktivní anotace', 'ca': 'La plataforma INCEpTION: Anotació interactiva orientada a la màquina i al coneixement', 'et': 'INCEpTION platvorm: masinaabiga ja teadmistele orienteeritud interaktiivne annotatsioon', 'fi': 'INCEpTION-alusta: Koneavusteinen ja tietoon perustuva interaktiivinen huomautus', 'jv': 'INSEpTITITITITITING', 'he': 'פלטפורמה INCEpTION: הערה אינטראקטיבית מועזרת במכונה ומאוריינת למידע', 'sk': 'Platforma INCEpTION: strojno podprta in znanje usmerjena interaktivna opomba', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'INCEpTION Platform: Machine-Assisted and Knowledge-Oriented Interactive Annotation'}
{'en': 'We introduce INCEpTION, a new annotation platform for tasks including interactive and semantic annotation (e.g., concept linking, fact linking, knowledge base population, semantic frame annotation). These tasks are very time consuming and demanding for annotators, especially when knowledge bases are used. We address these issues by developing an annotation platform that incorporates machine learning capabilities which actively assist and guide annotators. The platform is both generic and modular. It targets a range of research domains in need of semantic annotation, such as digital humanities, bioinformatics, or linguistics. INCEpTION is publicly available as open-source software.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o INCEpTION, uma nova plataforma de anotação para tarefas, incluindo anotação interativa e semântica (por exemplo, vinculação de conceitos, vinculação de fatos, população de base de conhecimento, anotação de quadro semântico). Essas tarefas são muito demoradas e exigentes para os anotadores, especialmente quando são usadas bases de conhecimento. Resolvemos esses problemas desenvolvendo uma plataforma de anotação que incorpora recursos de aprendizado de máquina que auxiliam e orientam ativamente os anotadores. A plataforma é genérica e modular. Tem como alvo uma variedade de domínios de pesquisa que precisam de anotação semântica, como humanidades digitais, bioinformática ou linguística. INCEpTION está disponível publicamente como software de código aberto.', 'ar': 'نقدم INCEpTION ، وهو نظام أساسي جديد للتعليقات التوضيحية للمهام بما في ذلك التعليق التوضيحي التفاعلي والدلالي (على سبيل المثال ، ربط المفهوم ، وربط الحقائق ، ومجموعة قاعدة المعرفة ، والتعليق التوضيحي للإطار الدلالي). تستغرق هذه المهام وقتًا طويلاً وتتطلب الكثير من أصحاب التعليقات التوضيحية ، خاصةً عند استخدام قواعد المعرفة. نعالج هذه المشكلات من خلال تطوير نظام أساسي للتعليقات التوضيحية يشتمل على إمكانات التعلم الآلي التي تساعد المعلقين وتوجههم بشكل فعال. النظام الأساسي عام ووحدات معيارية. يستهدف مجموعة من مجالات البحث التي تحتاج إلى شرح توضيحي ، مثل العلوم الإنسانية الرقمية أو المعلوماتية الحيوية أو اللغويات. INCEpTION متاح للجمهور كبرنامج مفتوح المصدر.', 'fr': "Nous présentons Inception, une nouvelle plateforme d'annotation pour les tâches comprenant l'annotation interactive et sémantique (par exemple, la liaison de concepts, la liaison de faits, la population de la base de connaissances, l'annotation de cadres sémantiques). Ces tâches sont très longues et exigeantes pour les annotateurs, en particulier lorsque des bases de connaissances sont utilisées. Nous résolvons ces problèmes en développant une plateforme d'annotation qui intègre des fonctionnalités d'apprentissage automatique qui assistent et guident activement les annotateurs. La plateforme est à la fois générique et modulaire. Il cible un éventail de domaines de recherche nécessitant une annotation sémantique, tels que les humanités numériques, la bioinformatique ou la linguistique. Inception est accessible au public en tant que logiciel open source.", 'es': 'Presentamos Inception, una nueva plataforma de anotación para tareas que incluye anotaciones interactivas y semánticas (por ejemplo, vinculación de conceptos, vinculación de hechos, población de base de conocimientos, anotación de marcos semánticos). Estas tareas requieren mucho tiempo y requieren mucho tiempo para los anotadores, especialmente cuando se utilizan bases de conocimientos. Abordamos estos problemas mediante el desarrollo de una plataforma de anotación que incorpora capacidades de aprendizaje automático que ayudan y guían activamente a los anotadores. La plataforma es genérica y modular. Se dirige a una variedad de dominios de investigación que necesitan anotación semántica, como las humanidades digitales, la bioinformática o la lingüística. Inception está disponible públicamente como software de código abierto.', 'ja': 'インタラクティブおよびセマンティックアノテーション（例えば、概念リンク、事実リンク、ナレッジベースの母集団、セマンティックフレームアノテーション）を含むタスクのための新しいアノテーションプラットフォームであるINCEpTIONを紹介します。これらのタスクは、特に知識ベースが使用されている場合、注釈者にとって非常に時間がかかり、要求されます。私たちは、注釈者を積極的に支援し、指導する機械学習機能を組み込んだ注釈プラットフォームを開発することで、これらの問題に対処しています。プラットフォームはジェネリックとモジュラーの両方です。これは、デジタル人文科学、バイオインフォマティクス、または言語学など、意味論的注釈を必要とする幅広い研究領域を対象としている。INCEpTIONは、オープンソースのソフトウェアとして公開されています。', 'zh': '引入INCEpTION,此一新注平台,以包交互式、语义注(如,其概链接,事实链接,知识库填充,语义框架注)在内也。 甚耗时且高注器,尤在用知识库时。 开一包机器学平台以决之,当平台可自助导之。 其台既通,亦模块化也。 其指列须语义注领域,如数人文科学,生物信息学语言学。 INCEpTION为开源软件明给。', 'hi': 'हम INCEpTION, इंटरैक्टिव और शब्दार्थ एनोटेशन सहित कार्यों के लिए एक नया एनोटेशन प्लेटफ़ॉर्म पेश करते हैं (उदाहरण के लिए, अवधारणा लिंकिंग, तथ्य लिंकिंग, नॉलेज बेस आबादी, सिमेंटिक फ्रेम एनोटेशन)। ये कार्य एनोटेटर के लिए बहुत समय लेने वाले और मांग कर रहे हैं, खासकर जब ज्ञान के आधार का उपयोग किया जाता है। हम एक एनोटेशन प्लेटफ़ॉर्म विकसित करके इन मुद्दों को संबोधित करते हैं जिसमें मशीन सीखने की क्षमताएं शामिल हैं जो सक्रिय रूप से एनोटेटरों की सहायता और मार्गदर्शन करती हैं। प्लेटफ़ॉर्म जेनेरिक और मॉड्यूलर दोनों है। यह शब्दार्थ एनोटेशन की आवश्यकता में अनुसंधान डोमेन की एक श्रृंखला को लक्षित करता है, जैसे कि डिजिटल मानविकी, जैव सूचना विज्ञान, या भाषाविज्ञान। INCEpTION सार्वजनिक रूप से ओपन-सोर्स सॉफ़्टवेयर के रूप में उपलब्ध है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем INCEpTION, новую платформу аннотаций для задач, включающих интерактивную и семантическую аннотацию (например, связывание понятий, связывание фактов, популяцию базы знаний, семантическую аннотацию фреймов). Эти задачи занимают очень много времени и требуют много времени для аннотаторов, особенно когда используются базы знаний. Мы решаем эти вопросы путем разработки платформы аннотаций, которая включает в себя возможности машинного обучения, которые активно помогают и направляют аннотаторы. Платформа является как общей, так и модульной. Он нацелен на ряд исследовательских областей, нуждающихся в семантической аннотации, таких как цифровые гуманитарные науки, биоинформатика или лингвистика. INCEpTION является общедоступным программным обеспечением с открытым исходным кодом.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid INCEpTION isteach, ardán nua nótaí le haghaidh tascanna lena n-áirítear anótáil idirghníomhach agus shéimeantach (m.sh., nascadh coincheap, nascadh fíricí, daonra bonn eolais, anótáil fráma shéimeantach). Tógann na nótaí seo an-chuid ama agus éilitheach ar na tascanna seo, go háirithe nuair a úsáidtear bunachair eolais. Tugaimid aghaidh ar na saincheisteanna seo trí ardán nótaí a fhorbairt a ionchorpraíonn cumais mheaisínfhoghlama a chuidíonn agus a threoraíonn anótálaithe go gníomhach. Tá an t-ardán cineálach agus modúlach araon. Díríonn sé ar raon réimsí taighde a dteastaíonn anótáil shéimeantach uathu, amhail na daonnachtaí digiteacha, bithfhaisnéisíocht, nó teangeolaíocht. Tá INCEPTION ar fáil go poiblí mar bhogearraí foinse oscailte.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ INCEpTION-ს ჩვენებთ, ახალი ანოტაციის პლატატი დავალებებისთვის, რომელიც ინტერრაქტიური და ჟენმანტიური ანოტაცია (მაგალითად, კონცექტის დაკავშირება, ფაქტის დაკავშირება, ცოც ეს დავალებები მნიშვნელოვანი დროის გამოყენება და მოთხოვრება ანტოტორორებისთვის, განსაკუთრებით როცა მეცნიერების ბაზები გამოყენება. ჩვენ ამ პრობლემების გავაკეთებთ, რომელიც მაქინის სწავლების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც აქტიურად დახმარებენ და მოწყობინებენ ანტოტორიების გავაკეთებით. პლატატრამია ორივე განსაკუთრებულია და მოდულია. ეს მიზეზიან სემონტიკური ანოტაცია, როგორც დიზიტალური ადამიანი, ბიოინფორმატიკა, ან ლენგურისტიკა. INCEpTION ადამიანურად ხელმისაწყებელია როგორც გახსნა ფონტური პროგრამა.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk az INCEpTION-t, egy új megjegyzési platformot az interaktív és szemantikus megjegyzésekhez (például koncepciós összekapcsolás, ténykapcsolás, tudásbázis populáció, szemantikus keretjegyzés). Ezek a feladatok nagyon időigényesek és igényesek a kommentátorok számára, különösen, ha tudásbázisokat használnak. Ezeket a problémákat olyan megjegyzési platformot fejlesztünk ki, amely magában foglalja a gépi tanulási képességeket, amelyek aktívan segítik és irányítják a kommentátorokat. A platform általános és moduláris. Szemantikai megjegyzéseket igénylő kutatási területek széles skáláját célozza meg, mint például a digitális humán tudományok, a bioinformatika vagy a nyelvészet. Az INCEpTION nyilvánosan elérhető nyílt forráskódú szoftverként.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια νέα πλατφόρμα σχολιασμού για εργασίες που περιλαμβάνουν διαδραστική και σημασιολογική σχολιασμό (π.χ. σύνδεση εννοιών, σύνδεση γεγονότων, πληθυσμός βάσεων γνώσης, σημειολογική σχολιασμός πλαισίων). Αυτές οι εργασίες είναι πολύ χρονοβόρες και απαιτητικές για τους σχολιαστές, ειδικά όταν χρησιμοποιούνται βάσεις γνώσεων. Αντιμετωπίζουμε αυτά τα ζητήματα αναπτύσσοντας μια πλατφόρμα σχολιασμού που ενσωματώνει δυνατότητες μηχανικής μάθησης που βοηθούν ενεργά και καθοδηγούν τους σχολιαστές. Η πλατφόρμα είναι τόσο γενική όσο και μορφωματική. Στοχεύει σε μια σειρά ερευνητικών τομέων που χρειάζονται σημασιολογική σχολιασμό, όπως οι ψηφιακές ανθρωπιστικές επιστήμες, η βιοπληροφορική ή η γλωσσολογία. Το INCEpTION είναι διαθέσιμο στο κοινό ως λογισμικό ανοιχτού κώδικα.', 'it': 'Introducemo INCEpTION, una nuova piattaforma di annotazione per attività che includono annotazioni interattive e semantiche (ad esempio, collegamento di concetti, collegamento di fatti, popolazione di base di conoscenze, annotazione di frame semantici). Questi compiti richiedono molto tempo e richiedono molto tempo per gli annotatori, soprattutto quando si utilizzano basi di conoscenza. Affrontiamo questi problemi sviluppando una piattaforma di annotazione che incorpora funzionalità di apprendimento automatico che aiutano attivamente e guidano gli annotatori. La piattaforma è generica e modulare. Si rivolge a una serie di settori di ricerca che necessitano di annotazione semantica, come le scienze umanistiche digitali, la bioinformatica o la linguistica. INCEpTION è pubblicamente disponibile come software open source.', 'lt': 'Įdiegiame INCEpTION, naują anotacijos platform ą užduotims, įskaitant interaktyvią ir semantinę anotaciją (pvz., sąvokų susiejimą, faktų susiejimą, žinių bazės populiaciją, semantinę anotaciją). Šios užduotys labai trukdo ir reikalauja anotatorių, ypač naudojant žinių bazes. Šiuos klausimus sprendžiame plėtojant anotacijos platform ą, kurioje būtų įtraukti mechanizmų mokymosi gebėjimai, kurie aktyviai padeda ir vadovauja anotatoriams. Platforma yra ir generinė, ir modulinė. It targets a range of research domains in need of semantic annotation, such as digital humanities, bioinformatics, or linguistics.  INCEpTION yra viešai prieinama kaip atvirojo kodo programinė įranga.', 'kk': 'Біз INCEpTION, интерактивті және семантикалық жазбалар үшін тапсырмалар үшін жаңа жазбалар платформасын келтіреміз (мысалы, концепциялық сілтеме, фактикалық сілтеме, білім негізгі қолданыстар,  Бұл тапсырмалар жаңалықтар үшін уақытты пайдалану және талап етеді, осылайша білім негізі қолданылатында. Біз бұл мәселелерді механикалық оқыту мүмкіндіктеріне көмектесу және жаңартушыларға көмектесу платформасын жасап береміз. Платформа жалпы және модульдер екеуі. Бұл бірнеше зерттеу домендерінің семантикалық белгілері керек, мысалы цифрлық адамзат, биомақпаратика немесе лингвистикалық. INCEpTION ашық көзі бағдарлама ретінде ашық.', 'mk': 'Ние воведуваме ИНЦЕПЦИЈА, нова платформа за анотација за задачи вклучувајќи интерактивна и семантична анотација (на пример, концепт поврзување, факт поврзување, популација на базата на знаење, семантична рамка анотација). Овие задачи потрошуваат многу време и бараат анотатори, особено кога се користат базите на знаење. We address these issues by developing an annotation platform that incorporates machine learning capabilities which actively assist and guide annotators.  Платформата е обична и модуларна. Целта на истражувачките домени во потреба од семантична анотација, како што се дигиталните човештви, биоинформатиката или лингвистиката. INCEpTION is publicly available as open-source software.', 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan INCEpTION, platform a anotasi baru untuk tugas termasuk anotasi interaktif dan semantik (cth., pemautan konsep, pemautan fakta, populasi asas pengetahuan, anotasi bingkai semantik). Tugas-tugas ini sangat menghabiskan masa dan memerlukan penganotator, terutama apabila pangkalan pengetahuan digunakan. Kami mengatasi isu-isu ini dengan mengembangkan platform anotasi yang mengangkut kemampuan pembelajaran mesin yang aktif membantu dan pandu anotasi. Platform adalah generik dan modular. Ia sasarkan julat bidang kajian yang memerlukan anotasi semantik, seperti kemanusiaan digital, bioinformatik, atau bahasa. INCEpTION tersedia secara awam sebagai perisian sumber terbuka.', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d ഇന്\u200dസെപ്പിറ്റിയോണ്\u200d, ജോലികള്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു പുതിയ പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോമിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഇന്\u200dസെപ്പ്റ്ററേഷന്\u200d പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോര്\u200dമാര്\u200d ഇടപെട്ടിര ഈ ജോലികള്\u200d വളരെ സമയമാണ് ഭക്ഷണം ചെയ്യുന്നത്. വിചാരിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് അറിവുകളുടെ  ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഈ പ്രശ്നങ്ങളെക്കുറിച്ച് വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന ഒരു പ്ലാറ്റ്\u200cഫോമില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു. അത് മെഷീന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്ലാറ്റ്ഫോം സാധാരണ പ്രകൃതിയും മോഡ്യൂളുമാണ്. അതിന്റെ ലക്ഷ്യത്തിന് സെമാന്റിക്ക് അഭിപ്രായം ആവശ്യമുള്ള ഒരു പരിശോധന ഡോമെന്\u200dസിനെ ലക്ഷ്യമാക്കുന്നു. ഡിജിറ്റല്\u200d മനുഷ്യര്\u200d,  തുറന്ന-സോഴ്സ് സോഫ്റ്റര്\u200d ആയി ഇന്\u200dസെപ്റ്റിഷന്\u200d പ്രസ്താവികമായി ലഭ്യമാകുന്നു.', 'mt': "Aħna nintroduċu INCEpTION, pjattaforma ġdida ta’ annotazzjoni g ħal kompiti inklużi annotazzjoni interattiva u semantika (pereżempju, konnessjoni tal-kunċett, konnessjoni tal-fatti, popolazzjoni bbażata fuq l-għarfien, annotazzjoni semantika tal-qafas). Dawn il-kompiti jieħdu ħafna ħin u jeħtieġu ħafna annotaturi, speċjalment meta jintużaw il-bażijiet tal-għarfien. Aħna nindirizzaw dawn il-kwistjonijiet billi niżviluppaw pjattaforma ta' annotazzjoni li tinkorpora kapaċitajiet ta' tagħlim bil-magni li tassisti u tiggwida b'mod attiv l-annotaturi. Il-pjattaforma hija kemm ġenerika kif ukoll modulari. Din timmira firxa ta’ oqsma ta’ riċerka li jeħtieġu annotazzjoni semantika, bħall-umanitajiet diġitali, il-bijoinformatika, jew il-lingwistika. L-INĊEPZZJONI hija disponibbli pubblikament bħala softwer b’sors miftuħ.", 'mn': 'Бид INCEpTION-г, интерактив, семантик анзаарлын тухай ажиллагааны шинэ анзаарлын платформ болгодог. Эдгээр үйл ажиллагаа нь мэдлэг суурь хэрэглэгдэхэд маш цаг хугацаа хэрэглэж, эсвэл хүлээн зөвшөөрөх хүсэлтэй. Бид эдгээр асуудлуудыг машины суралцах чадваруудыг нэмэгдүүлж, тэмдэглэгчийг удирдаж байгаа анзаарах платформ боловсруулахад тусалдаг. Платформ нь ерөнхий болон модуль юм. Энэ нь олон судалгааны сүлжээний зорилго, жишээ нь цифрийн хүн төрөлхтөн, биологийн мэдээлэл, эсвэл хэл судлаачид хэрэгтэй. INCEpTION олон нийтэд нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн програм болон ашиглах боломжтой.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer INCEpTION, ein ny notasjonsplattform for oppgåver, inkludert interaktiv og semantisk notasjon (f.eks. konseptlenking, faktisk lenking, kunnskapsbasepopulasjon, semantisk rammerking). Desse oppgåvene er veldig tidspunkt for å bruka og kreva for merknader, spesielt når kunnskapsbaser vert bruka. Vi handterar desse problemene ved å utvikla eit notasjonsplattform som inkluderer maskinelæringskapasiteten som aktivt hjelper og hjelper til merkingar. Plattform er både generiske og modular. Det målar eit rekke forskningsdomene som treng for semantisk annotasjon, som digital menneskeheter, bioinformatikk eller lingvisk. INCEpTION er offentlig tilgjengeleg som opna kjeldeprogramvare.', 'pl': 'Wprowadzamy INCEpTION, nową platformę adnotacyjną dla zadań obejmujących adnotację interaktywną i semantyczną (np. linkowanie koncepcji, linkowanie faktów, populację bazy wiedzy, adnotację ramek semantycznych). Zadania te są bardzo czasochłonne i wymagające dla adnotatorów, zwłaszcza gdy używane są bazy wiedzy. Rozwiązujemy te problemy, tworząc platformę adnotacyjną, która zawiera możliwości uczenia maszynowego, które aktywnie pomagają i kierują adnotatorami. Platforma jest zarówno ogólna, jak i modułowa. Dotyczy on szeregu dziedzin badawczych wymagających adnotacji semantycznej, takich jak nauki humanistyczne cyfrowe, bioinformatyka czy lingwistyka. INCEpTION jest publicznie dostępny jako oprogramowanie open source.', 'ro': 'Introducem INCEpTION, o nouă platformă de adnotare pentru sarcini care includ adnotare interactivă și semantică (de exemplu, legătura conceptului, legătura faptelor, populația bazei de cunoștințe, adnotare cadru semantic). Aceste sarcini necesită foarte mult timp și solicită adnotatorilor, mai ales atunci când sunt utilizate baze de cunoștințe. Rezolvăm aceste probleme prin dezvoltarea unei platforme de adnotare care încorporează capacități de învățare automată care asistă și ghidează activ adnotatorii. Platforma este atât generică, cât și modulară. Acesta vizează o serie de domenii de cercetare care necesită adnotare semantică, cum ar fi științe umaniste digitale, bioinformatică sau lingvistică. INCEpTION este disponibil public ca software open-source.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo INCEpTION, novu annotacijsku platformu za zadatke uključujući interaktivnu i semantičku annotaciju (npr. koncept povezivanja, povezivanja činjenica, populaciju baze znanja, semantičku annotaciju). Ovi zadaci su vrlo vremenski potrošenje i zahtevanje za annotatore, posebno kada se koriste baze znanja. Mi rješavamo te probleme razvijajući platformu za annotaciju koja uključuje sposobnosti za učenje mašina koji aktivno pomažu i vode annotatore. Platforma je i generièna i modularna. To je ciljano na niz istraživačkih domena koji trebaju semantičku annotaciju, poput digitalnih čovečanstva, bioinformatike ili lingvistike. INCEpTION je javno dostupan kao software otvorenog izvora.', 'si': 'අපි INCEpTION වෙනුවෙන්, අළුත් ක්\u200dරියාකාරීය සහ සෙමැන්ටික් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වෙනුවෙන් අළුත් ක්\u200dරියාත්මක ප්\u200dලේ මේ වැඩසටහන් ගොඩක් වෙලාව භාවිතා කරන්න සහ අවශ්\u200dය වෙන්නේ, විශේෂයෙන්ම දන්න අධාරණය භාවිතා කරල අපි මේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ මැෂින් ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධ ව සාමාන්\u200dය සහ මොඩ්යුලර් දෙන්නම්. ඒක ඉලක්කන් කරන්නේ සිමාන්තික ප්\u200dරවේශනයක් අවශ්\u200dයයි, ඩිජිටල් මනුෂ්\u200dයය, ජීවිත තොරතුරු ක්\u200dරියාත්මක, නැත්තම්  INCEpTION සාර්වාධාරණයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශයෙන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරවේශය කරන්න පුළුවන්.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa INCEpTION, jardiino cusub oo shaqooyin ku saabsan dhibaato dhexe iyo semantic (tusaale ahaan fikir isku xiran, runta isku xiran, ku xiriira aasaasiga aqoonta, tababarka semantika). Shaqooyinkaasu waa goor aad u badan isticmaal iyo aad u baahan yihiin dhibaatooyinka, khusuusan marka lagu isticmaalo saldhigyada aqoonta. Waxaannu arrimahan ku sheekeynaynaa horumarinta qorshaha la sheekeysto, kaas oo ku qoraya awoodda waxbarashada machadka, kaas oo si fircoon u caawinaya iyo hagitaanka dadka dhibaataysa. Jardiinooyinku waa mid caadi ah iyo mid caadi ah. Waxay u baahan tahay meelo waxbarasho badan oo loo baahan yahay caqabadaha semantika, tusaale ahaan humanitaanka dijitaalka, bioinformatiyada ama luuqadaha. INCEpTION wuxuu si bayaan ah u heli karaa software furan.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar INCEpTION, en ny anteckningsplattform för uppgifter inklusive interaktiv och semantisk anteckning (t.ex. konceptlänkning, faktablänkning, kunskapsbaspopulation, semantisk ramanteckning). Dessa uppgifter är mycket tidskrävande och krävande för kommentatorer, särskilt när kunskapsbaser används. Vi tar itu med dessa problem genom att utveckla en anteckningsplattform som innehåller maskininlärningsfunktioner som aktivt hjälper och vägleder kommentatorer. Plattformen är både generisk och modulär. Den riktar sig till en rad forskningsområden som behöver semantisk notering, såsom digital humaniora, bioinformatik eller lingvistik. INCEpTION är allmänt tillgänglig som programvara med öppen källkod.', 'ta': 'நாம் INCEpTION, பணிகளுக்கான புதிய அறிவிப்பு தளத்தை அறிவி அறிவு அடிப்படைகள் பயன்படுத்தப்படும்போது இந்த செயல்கள் மிகவும் நேரம் பயன்படுத்துகிறது மற்றும் அறிவிப்பாளர்களு நாம் இந்த பிரச்சனைகளை தேர்ந்தெடுத்து ஒரு அறிவிப்பு முறைமையை உருவாக்குகிறோம். இது இயந்திரத்தில் கற்றுக் கொள்ளும்  நிறுவனம் பொதுவான மற்றும் வகையாக இருக்கும். It targets a range of research domains in need of semantic annotation, such as digital humanities, bioinformatics, or linguistics.  திறந்த மூல மென்பொருளாக INCEpTION பொதுவாக கிடைக்கும்.', 'ur': 'ہم INCEpTION کو پہنچا دیتے ہیں، ایک نئی اظہار پٹوٹ پلٹَمٹَمٹی اور سیمانٹی اظہار کے شامل ہے۔ یہ کام بہت وقت کے کھانے اور سوال کرنے والے ہیں، مخصوصا جب علم کی بنیاد استعمال کی جاتی ہے۔ ہم ان مسائلوں کو اس طرح مشورہ کریں گے کہ ایک نوٹیشن پلٹورم کو پیدا کریں جو ماشین سکونت کے قابلیت میں شامل ہوتی ہے جو فعال سے مدد کرتی ہے اور ہدایت کرنے والوں کو راہ دکھاتے ہیں۔ پلٹورم دونوں جسمانی اور موڈولر ہیں۔ یہ ایک مختلف تحقیق دامنین کے مطابق سیمنٹی اظہار کی ضرورت ہے، جیسے ڈیجیٹل انسانیت، بیولومنٹیک، یا زبان شناسی. INCEpTION عمومی طور پر کھلی سوٹوفر کے طور پر موجود ہے.', 'uz': "Biz vazifalar uchun yangi taʼminlovchi platformni (m. g. interaktiv va semantik taʼminlovchi fikr bilan bogʻlash, haqiqiqiy bogʻlanish, maʼlumot bazasi jamoasi, semantik chegara taʼminlovchi). Bu vazifalar juda vaqt ishlatiladi va taʼminlovchilar uchun talab qilinadi, hususan илм asosida foydalanayotganda. Biz bu muammolarni taʼminlovchi platformni yaratishimiz mumkin. Mashining o'rganish qobiliyatlarini aktiv yordam qiladi va taʼminlovchilarga yordam beradi. Platform umumiy va moduldir. Bu qanchalik taʼminlovchi domenelarni anglatadi, huddi raqamli inson, bioinformatika yoki lingvistika kabi o'zgarishga ega. @ info: status", 'vi': 'Chúng ta sẽ giới thiệu INEpruột, một chương trình ghi chú mới cho các công việc bao g ồm ghi chú tương tác và ngữ pháp (v.v., sự kết nối khái niệm, sự liên kết dữ kiện, dân số kiến thức, ngữ pháp ngữ pháp. Những công việc này đòi hỏi rất nhiều thời gian cho người chú giải, đặc biệt khi sử dụng căn cứ kiến thức. Chúng ta giải quyết những vấn đề này bằng cách phát triển một chương trình ghi chú có khả năng học máy tính hỗ trợ và hướng dẫn sử dụng. The platform is both generic and modular. Nó nhắm vào một loạt các lĩnh vực nghiên cứu cần chú ý theo ngữ pháp, như kỹ thuật Nhân loại số, sinh học, ngôn ngữ. INCHElượn là phần mềm mở nguồn công khai.', 'bg': 'Представяме нова платформа за анотация за задачи, включващи интерактивна и семантична анотация (напр. свързване на концепции, свързване на факти, популация на база знания, анотация на семантична рамка). Тези задачи отнемат много време и изискват анотатори, особено когато се използват бази от знания. Ние решаваме тези проблеми, като разработваме платформа за анотация, която включва възможности за машинно обучение, които активно подпомагат и ръководят анотаторите. Платформата е едновременно генерична и модулна. Той е насочен към редица изследователски области, които се нуждаят от семантична анотация, като цифрови хуманитарни науки, биоинформатика или лингвистика. ИНЦЕПЦИОН е публично достъпен като софтуер с отворен код.', 'nl': 'We introduceren INCEpTION, een nieuw annotatieplatform voor taken waaronder interactieve en semantische annotatie (bijv. concept linking, fact linking, kennisbasis populatie, semantische frame annotatie). Deze taken zijn zeer tijdrovend en veeleisend voor annotators, vooral wanneer kennisdatabases worden gebruikt. We pakken deze problemen aan door een annotatieplatform te ontwikkelen dat machine learning mogelijkheden bevat die annotators actief ondersteunen en begeleiden. Het platform is zowel generiek als modulair. Het richt zich op een reeks onderzoeksdomeinen die semantische annotatie nodig hebben, zoals digitale geesteswetenschappen, bioinformatica of linguïstiek. INCEpTION is publiekelijk beschikbaar als open-source software.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer INCEpTION, en ny annoteringsplatform til opgaver, herunder interaktive og semantiske annoteringer (f.eks. konceptlinking, fact linking, vidensbase population, semantisk ramme annotering). Disse opgaver er meget tidskrævende og krævende for kommentatorer, især når vidensbaser anvendes. Vi løser disse problemer ved at udvikle en annoteringsplatform, der indeholder maskinlæringsmuligheder, som aktivt hjælper og vejleder kommentatorer. Platformen er både generisk og modulær. Det er rettet mod en række forskningsområder, der har brug for semantisk annotation, såsom digital humaniora, bioinformatik eller lingvistik. INCEpTION er offentligt tilgængelig som open source software.', 'de': 'Wir stellen INCEpTION vor, eine neue Annotationsplattform für Aufgaben einschließlich interaktiver und semantischer Annotation (z.B. Concept Linking, Fact Linking, Knowledge Base Population, semantischer Frame Annotation). Diese Aufgaben sind für Annotatoren sehr zeitaufwendig und anspruchsvoll, insbesondere wenn Wissensbasen genutzt werden. Wir lösen diese Probleme, indem wir eine Annotationsplattform entwickeln, die maschinelles Lernen integriert, die Annotatoren aktiv unterstützt und leitet. Die Plattform ist sowohl generisch als auch modular. Es richtet sich an eine Reihe von Forschungsbereichen, die semantische Annotation benötigen, wie Digital Humanities, Bioinformatik oder Linguistik. INCEpTION ist öffentlich als Open-Source-Software verfügbar.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo INCEpTION, novu annotacijsku platformu za zadatke uključujući interaktivnu i semantičku annotaciju (npr. koncept povezivanja, povezivanje činjenica, populaciju baze znanja, semantičku annotaciju). Ovi zadaci su vrlo vrijeme potrošnje i zahtjevanje annotatora, posebno kada se koriste baze znanja. Mi rješavamo te probleme razvijajući platformu za annotaciju koja uključuje sposobnosti za učenje strojeva koji aktivno pomažu i vode annotatore. Platforma je i generična i modularna. Cilja se niz istraživačkih domena u potrebi semantičke annotacije, poput digitalnih čovječanstva, bioinformatike ili lingvistike. INCEpTION je javno dostupan kao software otvorenog izvora.', 'ko': '우리는 인터랙티브와 의미 주석(예를 들어 개념 링크, 사실 링크, 지식 라이브러리 충전, 의미 구조 주석)을 포함하는 새로운 임무 주석 플랫폼을 소개했다.이러한 임무는 주석자에게 매우 시간이 걸리고 요구가 높으며, 특히 지식 라이브러리를 사용할 때 매우 높다.우리는 주석 플랫폼을 개발함으로써 이런 문제들을 해결할 수 있다. 이 플랫폼은 기계 학습 기능을 결합시켜 주석자를 적극적으로 도와주고 지도할 수 있다.이 플랫폼은 통용되고 모듈화되었다.그것은 디지털 인문, 생물 정보학, 언어학 등 의미 표시가 필요한 일련의 연구 분야를 대상으로 한다.《도몽공간》은 공개적인 소스 오픈 소프트웨어다.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan INCEpTION, sebuah platform annotasi baru untuk tugas termasuk annotasi interaktif dan semantis (contohnya, kontak menghubungkan, fakta menghubungkan, populasi dasar pengetahuan, bingkai semantis annotasi). Tugas-tugas ini sangat menghabiskan waktu dan menuntut untuk anotator, terutama ketika pangkalan pengetahuan digunakan. Kami mengatasi masalah ini dengan mengembangkan platform anotasi yang mengangkut kemampuan belajar mesin yang aktif membantu dan memimpin anotasi. Platformnya adalah generik dan modular. Ini menargetkan berbagai bidang penelitian yang membutuhkan anotasi semantis, seperti kemanusiaan digital, bioinformasi, atau bahasa. INCEpTION is publicly available as open-source software.', 'tr': "INCEpTION'y, täze täze täzelikler üçin täze täzelikler plazmyna g örkezip başladyk. Bu zadlar ýazgytçylar üçin wagtyň tüketmegi we gerekli bolup geçirjek bolýar, ýöne bilim baseleri ulanylýandygynda. Biz bu meseleleri maşyny öwrenmek ukyplaryny etmäniň we ýazgytçylara kömekleýän aňladma platformasyny geliştirmek bilen çözýäris. Plataforma hem modüler. Bu sistemada semantik duýdurma gerekli çarpma sahypalaryny, digital adamlary, bioinformatikler ýa-da lingwistikler ýaly çarpma sahypalaryny maksat edýär. Açyk-karnak software hökmünde janlaşmak bar.", 'af': "Ons introduseer INCEpTION, 'n nuwe annotasie platform a vir opdragte insluitend interaktiewe en semantiese annotasie (bv. konsepte verkoppeling, feit verkoppeling, kennisbasis bevolking, semantiese raam annotasie). Hierdie taak is baie tyd wat vir annotators verbruik en vra, veral wanneer kennis bases gebruik word. Ons adres hierdie probleme deur 'n annotasie platform te ontwikkel wat masjien leer kapasiteite inkorpreer wat aktief hulp en lei aan annotators. Die platform is beide generieke en modular. Dit doen 'n reek van ondersoek domeine in nodig van semantiese annotasie, soos digitale humaniteite, bioinformatike of lingwisiese. INCEpTION is openlik beskikbaar as open-bron sagteware.", 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha INCEpTION, jukwaa jipya la matangazo kwa kazi ikiwa ni pamoja na matatizo yanayohusiana na yanayosemekana (mfano, dhana inayounganisha, kuunganisha ukweli, idadi ya watu wa msingi wa maarifa, matangazo ya mifumo ya sekunde). Kazi hizi ni wakati wa matumizi na kudai wachochezi, hasa pale ambapo misingi ya maarifa yanatumika. Tunajadili masuala haya kwa kutengeneza jukwaa la kutangaza ambalo linajumuisha uwezo wa kujifunza mashine ambalo linasaidia na kuwaongoza wachochezi. Jukwaa hilo ni la kawaida na la kawaida. Inalenga maeneo mengi ya utafiti yanayohitaji kuchanganyikiwa kidini, kama vile binadamu wa kidijitali, taarifa za kibaiolojia au lugha. INCEpTION inapatikana hadharani kama programu huru.', 'fa': 'ما INCEpTION را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک پلاکتر جدید آگاهی برای وظیفه\u200cهایی که شامل آگاهی interactive و semantic (مثال مفهوم ارتباط، ارتباط حقیقت، جمعیت بنیادی علم، آگاهی فرم\u200cهای semantic) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم. این وظیفه\u200cها زمان بسیار استفاده و درخواست برای آشنا کنندگان است، مخصوصا وقتی پایگاه دانش استفاده می\u200cشود. ما این مسائل را با توسعه یک پلیتفرم اظهار می\u200cکنیم که توانایی یادگیری ماشین را شامل می\u200cکند که فعالی کمک می\u200cکنند و راهنمایی کنند. پلاکتر هم کلی و مودول است. هدف بسیاری از دامنهای تحقیقات که نیاز به اظهار سنتی دارند، مانند انسانیت دیجیتال، بیولومتیک یا زبان\u200cشناسی است. INCEpTION به طور عمومی به عنوان نرم\u200cافزار منبع باز دسترسی دارد.', 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë INCEpTION, një platform ë të re anotacioni për detyrat duke përfshirë anotacionin interaktiv dhe semantik (për shembull, lidhjen e konceptit, lidhjen e fakteve, popullsinë e bazës së njohurive, anotacionin e kuadrit semantik). Këto detyra janë shumë kohëconsumuese dhe kërkuese për anotatorët, veçanërisht kur përdoren bazat e njohurive. Ne i trajtojmë këto çështje duke zhvilluar një platform ë anotacioni që përfshin aftësitë e mësimit të makinave që ndihmojnë dhe udhëzojnë aktivisht anotatorët. Platforma është gjenerike dhe modulare. Ajo synon një gamë të fushave kërkimore në nevojë për anotacion semantik, të tilla si njerëzia dixhitale, bioinformatika apo gjuhësore. INCEpTION është në dispozicion publik si softuer me burim të hapur.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք INCEption-ը, նոր annoտացիոն հարթակը, որը ներառում է ինտերակտիվ և սեմանտիկ annoտացիա (օրինակ, գաղափար կապված, փաստեր կապված, գիտելիքի հիմնական բնակչություն, սեմանտիկ շրջանակի annoտացիա): Այս խնդիրները շատ ժամանակ են պահանջում և պահանջում annoտորների համար, հատկապես երբ օգտագործվում են գիտելիքների հիմքերը: Մենք լուծում ենք այս խնդիրները, ստեղծելով annoտացիայի հարթակ, որը ներառում է մեքենային ուսուցման ունակություններ, որոնք ակտիվ օգնում են և ուղղում են annoտացիաներին: Այս հարթակը ընդհանուր և մոդուլյար է: Այն նշանակում է մի շարք հետազոտությունների ոլորտներ, որոնց կարիքն ունի սեմանտիկ նոտացիա, ինչպիսիք են թվային մարդկային գիտությունները, բիոինֆորմատիկան կամ լեզվաբանությունը: INCEption-ը հանրային հասանելի է որպես բաց աղբյուր ծրագիր:', 'az': "Biz INCEpTION'u, interaktiv və semantik notlamalar içərisində işlər üçün yeni notlama platformu təşkil edirik. Bu işlər çox vaxt istifadə edir və tələb edir, özlərinə də elm üssələri istifadə edildikdə. Biz bu məsələlərə qarşılaşdırırıq, maşın öyrənmə qabiliyyətlərini fəaliyyətlə kömək edir və annotatorları doğru yola yönəldir. Platforma hər ikisi generik və modul. Bu, bir çox araştırma sahələrinə məcburiyyət edir, bənzər dijital insanlıqları, bioinformatikləri və ya dil istiqamətlərinə ehtiyacı vardır. INCEpTION açıq-kaynak proqramı olaraq yayılır.", 'am': 'የኢንCEpTION፣ ለስራ ማቀናቀል እና የsemantic ማስታወቂያ የሚኖረውን አዲስ ማስታወቂያ ፕሮግራም እናቀርባታለን (ምሳሌ ምሳሌ ማሳያየት፣ እውነተኛ ግንኙነት፣ እውቀት መቀመጫው፣ የsemantic ፍሬም አቀማመጥ) እነዚህም ስራዎች ብዙ ጊዜ የሚጠቅሙና የሚያስጨንቃቸው ናቸው፤ ይልቁንም የእውቀት መቀመጫዎች በተጠቃሚ ጊዜ ነው፡፡ እነዚህን ጉዳዮች በተጨማሪና በተቃውሞው ማስተማር ኃይል እንዲያሰናከል እናሳውቃለን፡፡ ፕላንፎርማው የgeneric እና ሞዴል ነው፡፡ የዲጂተል አናውንት፣ የbioinformatics ወይም ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ሲሆን የሚያስፈልጋቸው የፍጥረት አካባቢዎች ግንኙነቶችን ያሳያል፡፡ INCEpTION እንደ ክፈት-source ሶፍትዌር የተገኘ ግልፅ', 'bn': 'আমরা ইনসেপ্টিয়ন, কাজের জন্য একটি নতুন বিবেচনা প্ল্যাটফর্ম, যার মধ্যে রয়েছে ইন্টারনেটিভ এবং সেম্পেন্টিক ক্ষেত্র (যেমন ধারণা লিঙ্ক, সত্যিকার লিংক,  এই কাজগুলো খুব সময় খাওয়া এবং বিরক্তিকর কাজের জন্য দাবি করছে, বিশেষ করে যখন জ্ঞানের বেস ব্যবহার করা হয়। আমরা এই বিষয়গুলো নিয়ে আলোচনা করি একটি বিস্তারিত প্ল্যাটফর্ম উন্নয়নের মাধ্যমে যা মেশিন শিক্ষা শিক্ষার ক্ষমতা যা সক্রিয় করে ব The platform is both generic and modular.  এর লক্ষ্য হচ্ছে সেমেন্টিক বিভিন্ন গবেষণার প্রয়োজন, যেমন ডিজিটাল মানবিকতা, বায়োতজাতি অথবা ভাষায়। ইনসেপ্টিশন খোলা সোর্স সফটওয়্যার হিসেবে প্রকাশ্যে পাওয়া যাচ্ছে।', 'ca': "Introduïm INCEpTION, una nova plataforma d'anotació per tasques que inclouen anotació interactiva i semàntica (per exemple, connexió de concept e, connexió de fets, població de base de coneixement, anotació de marc semàntic). Aquestes tasques consumeixen molt de temps i exigeixen anotators, especialment quan s'utilitzen les bases de coneixement. Afectem aquests problemes desenvolupant una plataforma d'anotació que incorpora capacitats d'aprenentatge màquinari que activament ajuden i guien els anotators. La plataforma és tant genèrica com modular. Observa una gama de dominis de recerca que necessiten anotació semàntica, com les humanitats digitals, la bioinformàtica o la lingüística. L'INCEpTION està disponible públicament com software de codi obert.", 'cs': 'Představujeme INCEpTION, novou anotační platformu pro úkoly včetně interaktivní a sémantické anotace (např. propojení konceptů, propojení faktů, populace znalostní báze, anotace sémantického rámce). Tyto úkoly jsou pro anotátory velmi časově náročné a náročné, zejména pokud jsou používány znalostní báze. Tyto problémy řešíme vývojem anotace platformy, která zahrnuje možnosti strojového učení, které aktivně pomáhají a vedou anotátory. Platforma je obecná i modulární. Zaměřuje se na řadu výzkumných oblastí, které potřebují sémantickou anotaci, jako jsou digitální humanitní vědy, bioinformatika nebo lingvistika. INCEpTION je veřejně dostupný jako open source software.', 'et': 'Tutvustame INCEpTIONI, uut annotatsiooniplatvormi, mis hõlmab interaktiivseid ja semantilisi annotatsioone (nt kontseptsioonide sidumine, faktide sidumine, teadmistebaasi populatsioon, semantiline raami annotatsioon). Need ülesanded on märgistajate jaoks väga aeganõudvad ja nõudlikud, eriti kui kasutatakse teadmistebaase. Me tegeleme nende probleemidega, arendades välja annotatsiooniplatvormi, mis sisaldab masinõppe võimalusi, mis aktiivselt aitavad ja juhivad annotatoreid. Platvorm on nii üldine kui ka modulaarne. See on suunatud mitmetele semantilist märgistust vajavatele uurimisvaldkondadele, nagu digitaalne humanitaarteadus, bioinformaatika või lingvistika. INCEpTION on avalikult kättesaadav avatud lähtekoodiga tarkvarana.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo INCEpTION, novu annotacijsku platformu za zadatke uključujući interaktivnu i semantičku annotaciju (npr. koncept povezivanja, povezivanje činjenica, populaciju baze znanja, semantičku annotaciju). Ovi zadaci su vrlo vremenski potrošenje i zahtjev za annotatore, posebno kada se koriste baze znanja. Mi rješavamo te probleme razvijajući platformu za annotaciju koja uključuje sposobnosti za učenje strojeva koji aktivno pomažu i vodi annotatore. Platforma je i generična i modularna. To je ciljano na niz istraživačkih domena u potrebi semantičke annotacije, poput digitalnih čovječanstva, bioinformatike ili lingvistike. INCEpTION je javno dostupan kao software otvorenog izvora.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme INCEpTION-alustan, joka sisältää vuorovaikutteisia ja semanttisia annotointeja (esim. konseptien linkittäminen, faktojen linkittäminen, tietopohjan populaatio, semanttiset kehykset). Nämä tehtävät ovat hyvin aikaa vieviä ja vaativia annotattoreille, varsinkin kun käytetään tietokantoja. Käsittelemme näitä kysymyksiä kehittämällä huomautusalustan, joka sisältää koneoppimisominaisuuksia, jotka aktiivisesti avustavat ja ohjaavat huomautuksia. Alusta on sekä yleinen että modulaarinen. Se kohdistuu useisiin semanttisia merkintöjä tarvitseviin tutkimusaloihin, kuten digitaalisiin humanistisiin tieteisiin, bioinformatiikkaan tai kielitieteeseen. INCEpTION on julkisesti saatavilla avoimen lähdekoodin ohjelmistona.', 'ha': "Tuna ƙara wa INCEpTIon, wata platform na takarda wa aikin da ke samu'a haɗi da shirin tarayya da semanti (misali, shirin da zato, da haɗi da fakta, da mutane na danne ga ilmi, da zane-zane kan firam na semantic). Wannan aikin su yana da amfani da kuma suna tambaya wa matalauta, hasa'a, idan an amfani da kayan ilmi. Munã shawarar da waɗannan masu zartar da su wajen developer wata platform mai sanarwa, da ta shigar da abincin zane-zane da za'a yi mataimaki ko kuma ta shiryar da masu bastarwa. An sami duk kasa da damaci. Tana goa da wasu matsakaita masu amfani da surar mutane, kamar mutane na digitali, ko cikin linguistic. @ info: whatsthis", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo INCEpTION, novo platformo za opombe za opravila, ki vključujejo interaktivne in semantične opombe (npr. povezovanje konceptov, povezovanje dejstev, populacijo baze znanja, semantične opombe okvirja). Te naloge so zelo dolgotrajne in zahtevne za označevalce, še posebej pri uporabi baz znanja. Ta vprašanja rešujemo z razvojem platforme za opombe, ki vključuje zmogljivosti strojnega učenja, ki aktivno pomagajo in vodijo opombe. Platforma je generična in modularna. Osredotoča se na vrsto raziskovalnih področij, ki potrebujejo semantično označevanje, kot so digitalna humanistika, bioinformatika ali jezikoslovje. INCEpTION je javno dostopen kot odprtokodna programska oprema.', 'jv': 'We nyenggunian INCepTITITI, nggawe sistem sing gawe nggawe tarjamahan karo bebasan cara nggawe tarjamahan lan semanti (adil. seneng: nggawe linking, nggawe dino, populasi nggawe sabanjur, semanti frame). Awak dhéwé éntuk kanggo disimpen lan mangan kanggo ngilanggar-ujaran, ngomong nik pakan ngerasakno sing nyimpen. Awak dhéwé éntuk perbudhakan iki dadi nggawe sistem anyar tentang kanggo tukang karo perbudhakan kanggo nggawe barang nggawe lan tambah bantuan liyane kuwi. Laptop" and "Desktop Punika awak dhéwé éntuk akèh sing gawe nguasai perbudhakan semantar, kaya nguasai perbudhakan digit, biyokoinformatiki, lan nggambar. INSEpTIKA kang publikan kanggo sampeyan Open-source software', 'he': 'אנו מציגים INCEpTION, פלטפורמת הערות חדשה למשימות כולל הערות אינטראקטיבית וסמנטית (לדוגמה, קשר מושג, קשר עובדות, אוכלוסיית בסיס ידע, הערות סמנטית מסגרת). המשימות האלה משתמשות בזמן ומדורשות למציאות, במיוחד כשמשתמשים בסיסי ידע. אנחנו מתמודדים עם הנושאים האלה על ידי פיתוח פלטפורמת ציונים שמכילה יכולות למידה מכונות שמעזרות באופן פעיל ומדריך ציונים. הפלטפורמה גנרית ומודולרית. הוא ממטר מגוון של מגוונים מחקרים שזקוקים להציעה סמנטית, כמו אנושיות דיגיטליות, ביואינפורטיקה או שפתית. INCEpTION זמינה לציבור בתוכנה מקור פתוח.', 'bo': 'We introduce INCEpTION, a new annotation platform for tasks including interactive and semantic annotation (e.g., concept linking, fact linking, knowledge base population, semantic frame annotation). བྱ་བ་འདི་དག་གི་དུས་ཚོད་སྒོ་སོང་དང་སྙན་སྲིད་པ་ལ་དགོས་མཁན་ཆེན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོས་རྐྱེན་འདི་དག་ལ་བསྐྱེད་དུས་གཏོང་གི་གླེང་སྒྲུང་ནང་གི་མ་ལག་གི་སློབ་རྩོལ་ནུས་ཤུགས་ཡོད་པ་དང་ལྟ་སྟངས གླེང་སྒྲོམ་འདི་རྣམས་དང་མི་དབྱིབས་མཐུན་གཉིས་ལས་ཡིན། It targets a range of research domains in need of semantic annotation, such as digital humanity, bioinformatics, or linguistics. INCEpTION་ནི་ཁ་ཕྱེས་ཐོག་མཉེན་ཆས་ལ་མང་ཆོས་སྤྱོད་རུང་བའི་མཉེན་ཆས་ཡིན་པ'}
{'en': 'JeSemE : Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'ar': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Explore of Language Change Phenomena', 'pt': 'JeSemE: Intercalando Semântica e Emoções em um Web Service para Exploração de Fenômenos de Mudança de Linguagem', 'es': 'JeseMe: Entrelazando semántica y emociones en un servicio web para la exploración de los fenómenos del cambio del lenguaje', 'fr': "JesEme\xa0: Entrelacement sémantique et émotions dans un service Web pour l'exploration des phénomènes de changement de langue", 'ja': 'JeSemE:言語変化現象の探求のためのWebサービスにおける意味論と感情の相互作用', 'zh': 'JeSemE曰:Web交错语义情,以索言变', 'hi': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'ru': 'JeSemE: Переплетение семантики и эмоций в веб-службе для изучения феноменов языковых изменений', 'ga': 'JeSemE: Séimeantaic agus Mothúcháin Idirleatha i Seirbhís Gréasáin chun Feiniméin Athraithe Teanga a Iniúchadh', 'ka': 'JeSemE: Semantics და Emotions Interleaving in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'hu': 'JeSemE: Szemantika és érzelmek összekapcsolása egy webszolgáltatásban a nyelvváltozás jelenségeinek feltárására', 'el': 'Διασύνδεση Σημματικών και Συναισθημάτων σε μια Υπηρεσία Διαδικτύου για την Εξερεύνηση φαινομένων Γλωσσικής Αλλαγής', 'it': "JeSemE: Interlasciare semantica ed emozioni in un servizio web per l'esplorazione dei fenomeni di cambiamento linguistico", 'mk': 'JeSemE: Интерлајнирање на семантиките и емоциите во веб-сервисот за истражување на феномените на промена на јазикот', 'kk': 'JeSemE: Тілді өзгерту феноманын зерттеу веб қызметінің семантикалық және көңіл күйлерін интерлекстеу', 'lt': 'JeSemE: Semantikų ir emocijų tarpusavio sąveika interneto tarnyboje kalbos pokyčių reiškiniams ištirti', 'ms': 'JeSemE: Memantar Semantik dan Emosi dalam Servis Web untuk Penjelasan Fenomena Perubahan Bahasa', 'mn': 'JeSemE: Холбоо өөрчлөлтийн феномын судалгааны Веб үйлчилгээнд Semantics болон Emotions Interleaving in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'mt': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'ml': 'ജെസെമെയി: ഭാഷ മാറ്റം മാറ്റുന്നതിനുവേണ്ടി വെബ്ബ് സേവനത്തില്\u200d സെമാന്റിക്കുകളും എംഗ്യൂഷനുകളും വിട്ടുപോക', 'no': 'JeSemE: Interforlate semantikk og emosjonar i ein netttenest for utforsking av språk endringsfenomen', 'ro': 'JeSemE: Interleagă semantica și emoțiile într-un serviciu web pentru explorarea fenomenelor schimbării limbii', 'sr': 'JeSemE: Interpolacija semantika i emocija u web servisu za istraživanje fenomene promene jezika', 'pl': 'JeSemE: Przełączanie semantyki i emocji w serwisie internetowym dla badania zjawisk zmian językowych', 'si': 'JesemE: සෙමැන්ටික්ස් සහ භාවිතාවක් සඳහා වෙබ සේවාවේ භාෂාව වෙනස් ප්\u200dරවේශනය සඳහා', 'so': 'JeSemE: Interleaves Semantics and Emotions in laga helo adeegga internetka for the Exploration of Language Change Fiemomena', 'sv': 'JeSemE: Att sammanfläta semantik och känslor i en webbtjänst för utforskning av språkförändringsfenomen', 'ta': 'ஜெசெம்E: மொழி மாற்றும் பொருள் மாற்றும் பொருள்', 'ur': 'جسمی: سیمنٹیکس اور ایموٹیس کو ایک ویب سپرس میں زبان تغییر فینومین کے تحقیق کے لئے انتشار کرنا', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Mẹ kiếp: Giao dịch Trung thực và cảm xúc vào một dịch vụ truy tìm ngôn ngữ biến đổi', 'bg': 'Прекъсване на семантики и емоции в уеб услуга за изследване на явленията на езиковата промяна', 'nl': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Fenomena', 'hr': 'JeSemE: Interleaving semantika i emocije u web službi za istraživanje fenomene promjene jezika', 'da': 'JeSemE: Indblanding af semantik og følelser i en webtjeneste til udforskning af sprogforandringsfænomener', 'de': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'id': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'fa': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'ko': 'JeSemE: 웹 서비스에서 의미와 감정을 교차시켜 언어 변화 현상을 탐색하다', 'sw': 'JeSemE: Kuacha Semantic and Emotions katika huduma ya Mtandao kwa ajili ya Kuelezea Mabadiliko ya Lugha', 'af': "JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in 'n Web diens vir die Utspraak van Taal Verander Fenomena", 'tr': "JeSemE: Semantik ve duyguları dil değiştirme fenomeni incelemek için bir Web Servisi'nde Interleaving", 'sq': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'am': 'JeSemE: Semantics and Emotions Interleaves in an Web Service for the Exploration of language Phenomena', 'hy': 'Յեսմե. Լեզու փոփոխության ֆենոմենների ուսումնասիրության վեբ-ծառայությունում', 'az': 'JeSemE: Dil Değişiklik Fenomeni Exploration üçün Web Servisində Semantik və Emotikləri Interleaving', 'bn': 'জেসেমই: ভাষা পরিবর্তনের ফিনোমেনা পরিবর্তনের জন্য ওয়েব সার্ভিসে সেম্যান্টিক এবং অনুভূতিগুলোকে ইন্টারনেট পরিত্যাগ', 'bs': 'JeSemE: Interpolacija semantika i emocija u web službi za istraživanje fenomene promjene jezika', 'ca': "JeSemE: Interdeixar Semàtics i Emotions en un servei web per l'exploració de fenomens de canvi de llenguatge", 'cs': 'JeSemE: Propojení sémantiky a emocí ve webové službě pro průzkum jevů jazykových změn', 'et': 'JeSeme: Semantika ja emotsioonide vaheldumine veebiteenuses keelekasutuse nähtuste uurimiseks', 'fi': 'JeSeme: Semantiikan ja tunteiden jättäminen verkkopalvelussa kielimuutosten tutkimiseen', 'jv': 'JesemE: interleft semanti karo emusik lan web service kanggo Ketokeraksi banjur kelas banjur nomena', 'he': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena', 'ha': 'JeSemEK: Ina saka Semantics and Emails in an Saura wa Kyaushe wa Kyaushe', 'sk': 'JeSeme: Medsebojna semantika in čustva v spletni storitvi za raziskovanje pojavov jezikovnih sprememb', 'bo': 'JeSemE: Interleaving Semantics and Emotions in a Web Service for the Exploration of Language Change Phenomena'}
{'en': 'We here introduce a substantially extended version of JeSemE, an interactive website for visually exploring computationally derived time-variant information on word meanings and lexical emotions assembled from five large diachronic text corpora. JeSemE is designed for scholars in the (digital) humanities as an alternative to consulting manually compiled, printed dictionaries for such information (if available at all). This tool uniquely combines state-of-the-art distributional semantics with a nuanced model of human emotions, two information streams we deem beneficial for a data-driven interpretation of texts in the humanities.', 'ar': 'نقدم هنا نسخة موسعة بشكل كبير من JeSemE ، وهو موقع ويب تفاعلي لاستكشاف معلومات متغيرة الوقت مشتقة حسابيًا بصريًا حول معاني الكلمات والمشاعر المعجمية التي تم تجميعها من خمس مجموعات نصية كبيرة غير متزامنة. تم تصميم JeSemE للباحثين في العلوم الإنسانية (الرقمية) كبديل لاستشارة القواميس المجمعة والمطبوعة يدويًا لمثل هذه المعلومات (إذا كانت متوفرة على الإطلاق). تجمع هذه الأداة بشكل فريد بين أحدث دلالات التوزيع مع نموذج دقيق للعواطف البشرية ، وهما تدفقات معلومات نعتبرها مفيدة للتفسير المستند إلى البيانات للنصوص في العلوم الإنسانية.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos aqui uma versão substancialmente estendida do JeSemE, um site interativo para explorar visualmente informações variantes no tempo derivadas computacionalmente sobre significados de palavras e emoções lexicais montadas a partir de cinco grandes corpora de texto diacrônico. JeSemE é projetado para acadêmicos nas humanidades (digitais) como uma alternativa à consulta de dicionários impressos e compilados manualmente para tais informações (se disponíveis). Essa ferramenta combina semântica distributiva de última geração com um modelo diferenciado de emoções humanas, dois fluxos de informações que consideramos benéficos para uma interpretação orientada por dados de textos nas humanidades.', 'fr': "Nous présentons ici une version considérablement étendue de JeseMe, un site Web interactif permettant d'explorer visuellement des informations temporelles dérivées par ordinateur sur les significations des mots et les émotions lexicales assemblées à partir de cinq grands corpus de textes diachroniques. JesEme est conçu pour les chercheurs en sciences humaines (numériques) comme une alternative à la consultation de dictionnaires imprimés et compilés manuellement pour obtenir de telles informations (si disponibles). Cet outil combine de manière unique une sémantique distributionnelle de pointe avec un modèle nuancé des émotions humaines, deux flux d'informations que nous jugeons utiles pour une interprétation basée sur les données de textes en sciences humaines.", 'es': 'Presentamos aquí una versión sustancialmente ampliada de JeseMe, un sitio web interactivo para explorar visualmente información computacionalmente derivada de la variación temporal sobre el significado de las palabras y las emociones léxicas reunidas a partir de cinco grandes cuerpos de texto diacrónico. JeseMe está diseñado para académicos de humanidades (digitales) como una alternativa a la consulta de diccionarios impresos y compilados manualmente para obtener dicha información (si es que están disponibles). Esta herramienta combina de manera única la semántica distributiva de última generación con un modelo matizado de las emociones humanas, dos flujos de información que consideramos beneficiosos para una interpretación basada en datos de textos en las humanidades.', 'ja': 'ここでは、JeSemEの実質的に拡張されたバージョンを紹介します。JeSemEは、5つの大きなダイアクロニックテキスト団体から組み立てられた単語の意味と語彙的感情に関する計算的に導出された時間変数情報を視覚的に探索するためのインタラクティブなウェブサイトです。JeSemEは、（デジタル）人文科学の学者のために設計されており、そのような情報のために手動で編纂され印刷された辞書を参照する代わりに使用されます（可能であれば）。このツールは、最先端の分布セマンティクスと微妙な人間の感情のモデルをユニークに組み合わせています。人文科学におけるテキストのデータ駆動の解釈には、2つの情報ストリームが有益であると考えています。', 'zh': '此言JeSemE之一大幅广版本,此一交互式网站也,所以直观求五大历文本语料库中组装成单词义词汇情之数也。 JeSemE为(数)人文学科学者设意,以为阅手动编译印刷词典以取此息(若有)代者。 特以最先进之分布语义与人情之微相合,以为此二信息流利于人文学科文本数驱之说也。', 'hi': 'हम यहां JeSemE के एक काफी विस्तारित संस्करण का परिचय देते हैं, जो नेत्रहीन रूप से कम्प्यूटेशनल रूप से व्युत्पन्न समय-संस्करण जानकारी की खोज के लिए एक इंटरैक्टिव वेबसाइट है जो शब्द अर्थों और पांच बड़े डायक्रोनिक टेक्स्ट कार्पोरा से इकट्ठे हुए लेक्सिकल भावनाओं पर है। JeSemE (डिजिटल) मानविकी में विद्वानों के लिए मैन्युअल रूप से संकलित, ऐसी जानकारी के लिए मुद्रित शब्दकोशों से परामर्श करने के विकल्प के रूप में डिज़ाइन किया गया है (यदि बिल्कुल भी उपलब्ध हो)। यह उपकरण विशिष्ट रूप से मानव भावनाओं के एक सूक्ष्म मॉडल के साथ अत्याधुनिक वितरण ता्मक शब्दार्थ को जोड़ता है, दो सूचना धाराएं जिन्हें हम मानविकी में ग्रंथों की डेटा-संचालित व्याख्या के लिए फायदेमंद मानते हैं।', 'ru': 'Здесь мы представляем существенно расширенную версию JeSemE, интерактивного веб-сайта для визуального изучения вычислительно-вариантной по времени информации о значениях слов и лексических эмоциях, собранных из пяти больших диахронических текстовых корпусов. JeSemE предназначен для ученых в области (цифровых) гуманитарных наук в качестве альтернативы консультированию вручную составленных, печатных словарей для такой информации (если таковые имеются вообще). Этот инструмент уникально сочетает в себе самую современную дистрибутивную семантику с нюансовой моделью человеческих эмоций, двух информационных потоков, которые мы считаем полезными для основанной на данных интерпретации текстов в гуманитарных науках.', 'ga': 'Tugaimid isteach anseo leagan atá leathnaithe go substaintiúil de JeSemE, suíomh Gréasáin idirghníomhach chun eolas amhairc-athraitheach a dhíorthaítear go ríomhaireachtúil ar bhrí na bhfocal agus ar mhothúcháin léacsacha a chruinnítear ó chúig chorpora mhóra téacs déachónacha a fhiosrú. Tá JeSemE deartha do scoláirí sna daonnachtaí (digiteacha) mar rogha eile ar fhoclóirí clóite a chuirtear le chéile de láimh le haghaidh faisnéise den sórt sin (má tá fáil orthu in aon chor). Nascann an uirlis seo séimeantaic dháilte den scoth le múnla nuance de mhothúcháin dhaonna, dhá shruth faisnéise a mheasaimid a bheadh tairbheach do léirmhíniú sonraí-tiomáinte ar théacsanna sna daonnachtaí.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ აქ ჩვენ JeSemE-ის მნიშვნელოვანი განზომილებული ვერსია, ინტერრაქტიური საბეჭატი ვიზუალურად კომპუტაციალურად განზომილებული სიტყვების შესახებ და ლექსიკალური ემოციების ინფორმაცია, რომელიც ხუთ JeSemE იქნება სტუდენტებისთვის (დიზიტალური) ადამიანისთვის (დიზიტალური) სტუდენტებისთვის, როგორც ალტენტიფიკაცია, როგორც ხელსახურად კომპილექტირებული, დაშ ეს ხელსაწყოფილი ერთადერთად შემყვებს სახელსაწყოფილი სემენტიკებით ადამიანის ემოციების ნუანცირებული მოდელით, ორი ინფორმაციის სტრიმი, რომელიც ჩვენ ვფიქრობთ ბენექტიური მონაცემებისთვის ტექსტის ინტე', 'hu': 'Itt bemutatjuk a JeSemE lényegesen kiterjesztett verzióját, egy interaktív weboldalt, amely vizuálisan feltárja a számítástechnikailag származtatott idővariáns információkat a szójelentésekről és lexikai érzelmekről, öt nagy diakrónikus szövegkorpusból. A JeSemE-t a (digitális) bölcsészettudományok tudósainak tervezték, mint alternatívája a manuálisan összeállított, nyomtatott szótárak ilyen információkhoz (ha egyáltalán rendelkezésre állnak). Ez az eszköz egyedülállóan ötvözi a legkorszerűbb disztribúciós szemantikát az emberi érzelmek árnyalt modelljével, két információs folyamatot, amelyeket előnyösnek tartunk a humán tudományok szövegeinek adatközpontú értelmezésében.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε εδώ μια ουσιαστικά εκτεταμένη έκδοση του ενός διαδραστικού ιστότοπου για την οπτική διερεύνηση υπολογιστικά παραγόμενων πληροφοριών χρονικής παραλλαγής σχετικά με τις έννοιες λέξεων και τα λεξικά συναισθήματα που συγκεντρώνονται από πέντε μεγάλα διαχρονικά σώματα κειμένου. Το έχει σχεδιαστεί για μελετητές των (ψηφιακών) ανθρωπιστικών επιστημών ως εναλλακτική λύση στη συμβουλευτική χειροκίνητα καταρτισμένων, τυπωμένων λεξικών για τέτοιες πληροφορίες (εάν υπάρχουν καθόλου). Αυτό το εργαλείο συνδυάζει μοναδικά την υπερσύγχρονη σημασιολογία διανομής με ένα διαφοροποιημένο μοντέλο ανθρώπινων συναισθημάτων, δύο ροές πληροφοριών που θεωρούμε χρήσιμες για μια ερμηνεία κειμένων στις ανθρωπιστικές επιστήμες.', 'it': "Qui presentiamo una versione sostanzialmente estesa di JeSemE, un sito web interattivo per esplorare visivamente le informazioni computazionali derivate dalla variante temporale sui significati delle parole e sulle emozioni lessicali assemblate da cinque grandi corpore diacroniche di testo. JeSemE è progettato per gli studiosi delle scienze umanistiche (digitali) in alternativa alla consultazione di dizionari stampati manualmente per tali informazioni (se disponibili). Questo strumento combina in modo univoco la semantica distributiva all'avanguardia con un modello sfumato di emozioni umane, due flussi di informazioni che riteniamo utili per un'interpretazione data-driven dei testi nelle discipline umanistiche.", 'lt': 'Čia pristatome iš esmės išplėstą JeSemE versiją, interaktyvią interneto svetainę, kuria vizualiai ištiriama skaičiavimo būdu gauta informacija apie žodžio reikšmę ir leksines emocijas, surinktas iš penkių didelių diachroninių tekstų korporų. JeSemE is designed for scholars in the (digital) humanities as an alternative to consulting manually compiled, printed dictionaries for such information (if available at all).  Ši priemonė vieninteliu būdu derina naujausią paskirstymo semantiką su nuancijuotu žmogaus emocijų modeliu, du informacijos srautai, kuriuos, mūsų nuomone, naudingi interpretuojant tekstus žmogiškosiose mokslo srityse remiantis duomenimis.', 'kk': 'Біз осында JeSemE-нің көп кеңейтілген нұсқасын, компьютерлік және бес үлкен диагроникалық мәтін корпорасынан біріктірілген сөздердің мәліметтері және лексикалық емоцияларды зерттеу үшін интерактивті вебсайт JeSemE бұл мәлімет үшін (цифрлық) адамзаттардың білімдер үшін қолмен компиляцияланған, басып шығарылған сөздік сөздіктерінің альтернативі ретінде құрылған. Бұл құрал бір-біріншіден адамдардың эмоцияларының күй- жай дистрибуторлық семантикаларын біріктіреді. Біз адамдардың мәліметтерінің мәтіндерін біріктіру үшін бір мәліметтің құрылғысын біріктіреді.', 'mk': 'Овде претставуваме значително продолжена верзија на JeSemE, интерактивна веб-страница за визуелно експлоатирање на временски варијанти информации за зборовите и лексичките емоции собрани од пет големи дијахронични текстови корпора. JeSemE е дизајниран за научниците во (дигиталните) човечките науки како алтернатива за консултација со рачно компилирани, печатени речници за вакви информации (ако воопшто се достапни). Оваа алатка единствено ја комбинира најсовремената дистрибуционална семантика со нианциран модел на човечки емоции, два информациски потоки кои ние сметаме за корисни за интерпретација на текстовите во човештвото.', 'ml': 'നമ്മളിവിടെ ജെസെമെയിന്റെ വിശാലമായ ഒരു പതിപ്പിനെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തിയിരിക്കുന്നു. അഞ്ചു വലിയ ഡയറക്രോണിക്ക് ടെക്സ്കോര്\u200dപ്പില്\u200d നിന്നും ഒരുമിച്ച വാക് JeSemE is designed for scholars in the (digital) humanities as an alternative to consulting manually compiled, printed dictionaries for such information (if available at all).  ഈ ഉപകരണം മനുഷ്യരുടെ വികാരങ്ങളുടെ മാതൃകയോടൊപ്പം മനുഷ്യരുടെ വിവേകങ്ങളുടെ സെമാന്റിക്സിനെ മാത്രമാണ് ഒരുമിച്ചുകൂട്ടുന്നത്. രണ്ട് വിവരങ്ങളുടെ അര', 'ms': 'We here introduce a substantially extended version of JeSemE, an interactive website for visually exploring computationally derived time-variant information on word meanings and lexical emotions assembled from five large diachronic text corpora.  JeSemE dirancang untuk saintis dalam kemanusiaan (digital) sebagai alternatif untuk berkonsultasi kamus dikumpil secara manual, dicetak untuk maklumat tersebut (jika ada sama sekali). Alat ini menggabungkan semantik distribusi terbaik dengan model emosi manusia yang berwarna-warna, dua aliran maklumat yang kita anggap berguna untuk interpretasi teks didalam alam alam manusia.', 'no': 'Vi introduserer ein vast utvida versjon av JeSemE, eit interaktiv nettstad for å forsøke informasjon om datavariantene som er utvikla frå dataverdiane og leksiske emosjonar som er samlet frå fem store diakroniske tekstkorpora. JeSemE er designert for lernane i (digital) menneskene som alternativ for å konsultera manuelt kompilerte, utskrifte ordbokar for slike informasjon (viss det er tilgjengeleg). Dette verktøyet kombinerer omfattende semantikk i kunsten med ein nuansert modell av menneske emosjonar, to informasjonsstrømmer vi ser nyttig for ein datadrivt tolking av tekstar i menneskeheten.', 'mt': 'Hawnhekk nintroduċu verżjoni sostanzjalment estiża ta’ JeSemE, websajt interattiva għall-esplorazzjoni viżwali ta’ informazzjoni dwar varjanti ta’ żmien derivati b’mod komputattiv dwar it-tifsiriet tal-kelma u emozzjonijiet lexiċi mmuntati minn ħames korpuri kbar ta’ test dijakroniku. JeSemE huwa ddisinjat għal studjanti fl-umanitajiet (diġitali) bħala alternattiva għall-konsultazzjoni ta’ dikjararji stampati kkumpilati manwalment għal tali informazzjoni (jekk disponibbli kollha). Din l-għodda tgħaqqad b’mod uniku s-semantika distributtiva l-aktar avvanzata ma’ mudell nuanzat ta’ emozzjonijiet umani, żewġ flussi ta’ informazzjoni li nqisu li huma ta’ benefiċċju għal interpretazzjoni tat-testi fl-umanitajiet ibbażata fuq id-dejta.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy znacznie rozszerzoną wersję JeSemE, interaktywnej strony internetowej służącej do wizualnego badania obliczeniowo pochodzących z wariantów czasowych informacji o znaczeniach słowa i emocjach leksykalnych zbudowanych z pięciu dużych diachronicznych korpusów tekstowych. JeSemE jest przeznaczony dla naukowców nauk humanistycznych (cyfrowych) jako alternatywa dla konsultacji ręcznie skompilowanych, drukowanych słowników dla takich informacji (jeśli są w ogóle dostępne). Narzędzie to w wyjątkowy sposób łączy najnowocześniejszą semantykę dystrybucyjną z niuansowanym modelem ludzkich emocji, dwoma strumieniami informacji, które uważamy za korzystne dla interpretacji tekstów w humanistyce opartej na danych.', 'mn': 'Бид энд JeSemE-ийн маш өргөн хувилбарыг танилцуулж байна. Компьютерийн хувилбар дээр таван том хэмжээний текст корпорас цуглуулагдсан үеийн утгатай мэдээлэл болон сэтгэл хөдлөлийн тухай харилцааны интерактив вебсайт юм. JeSemE нь (дижитал) хүн төрөлхтний мэргэжилтнүүд дээр гараараа бүтээгдэхүүний, хэвлэгдэх үгийг (хэрвээ бүтээгдэхүүний тулд) зөвлөх боломжтой болсон. Энэ хэрэгсэл нь хүн төрөлхтний сэтгэл хөдлөлийн төвшин хуваарилцааны төвшин зэрэгцээ, хүн төрөлхтний мэдрэмжтэй хоёр мэдээллийн урсгал нь хүн төрөлхтний текстүүдийн тухай мэдээллийн тухай үнэ цэнэтэй гэж боддог.', 'ro': 'Introducem aici o versiune substanțial extinsă a JeSemE, un site interactiv pentru explorarea vizuală a informațiilor derivate computațional în varianta timpului despre semnificațiile cuvintelor și emoțiile lexicale asamblate din cinci corpuri mari diacronice de text. JeSemE este conceput pentru oamenii de știință umanistă (digital) ca alternativă la consultarea dicționarelor compilate manual, tipărite pentru astfel de informații (dacă sunt disponibile, la toate). Acest instrument combină în mod unic semantica distribuțională de ultimă generație cu un model nuanțat al emoțiilor umane, două fluxuri de informații pe care le considerăm benefice pentru o interpretare bazată pe date a textelor din științele umaniste.', 'sr': 'Ovde predstavljamo značajno produženu verziju JeSemE, interaktivnu stranicu za vizualno istraživanje informacija o računalno izvedenim vremenskim varijantima o smislama riječi i leksičkim emocijama okupljenim iz pet velikih dijagronskih tekstskih korpora. JeSemE je dizajniran za učenike u (digitalnom) humanitetu kao alternativa za konsultaciju ručno kompileranih, štampanih rečnika za takve informacije (ako je uopšte dostupan). Ovaj alat jedinstveno kombinira distribucijsku semantiku države umjetnosti sa nuanciranim modelom ljudskih emocija, dve informativne tekme koje smatramo korisnim za interpretaciju teksta na podacima u ljudskom stanju.', 'so': "Halkan waxaynu soo bandhignaa warqad aad u ballaadhan JeSemE, kaas oo ah bogagga internetka oo aad aragtida ka baahan tahay macluumaad saameyn ah oo ku saabsan macluumaad kala duwan oo ku saabsan hadalka micneheeda iyo fikrada leksikada ah oo ka soo urursan shan shirkad oo aad u weyn. JeSemE waxaa loogu talagalay ardayda ku jira (digital) dadkooda sida mid kale oo la talin karo macluumaadka la soo qoray qof gacanta lagu soo qoray, oo laga soo daabacay dictionary ku qoran (haddii ay ku jirto). Qoraankan waxaa si gaar ah looga soo ururiyaa qayb-qaybinta farshaxanka, kaas oo ah qaab ka mid ah dabeecada biniaadamka, labada dureer oo macluumaadka waxaan u malaynaynaa mid faa'iido u leh turjumidda farshaxanka dadka.", 'ur': 'ہم یہاں جسمی کی ایک بڑی وسیع ویب سائٹ کی معلومات کریں گے جو کمپیوٹر کے ذریعے پیدا ہوئے وقت-variant معلومات کے بارے میں لکھی معلومات اور لکسیکل احساسات پانچ بڑے دیاگرنیک ٹیکس کورپور سے جمع کیے گئے ہیں۔ جسمی (ڈیجیٹل) انسانوں میں علماء کے لئے طراحی کی گئی ہے، اس طرح کی اطلاعات کے لئے (اگر کچھ بھی موجود ہو تو) مطلوب کرنے کے لئے مطلوب کرنے کی alternativa ہے۔ یہ وسیلہ ایک طرح کے ساتھ انسان کی احساسات کی نائنس موڈل کے ساتھ ملتا ہے، دو معلومات سیریموں کو ہم نے انسانوں میں لکھے ہوئے متن کی تعبیر کے لئے فائدہ سمجھا ہے.', 'sv': 'Vi introducerar här en betydligt utökad version av JeSemE, en interaktiv webbplats för visuellt utforskande av beräkningsmässigt härledd tidsvariant information om ordbetydelser och lexikala känslor samlade från fem stora diakroniska textkorpor. JeSemE är utformad för forskare inom (digital) humaniora som ett alternativ till att konsultera manuellt sammanställda, tryckta ordböcker för sådan information (om tillgänglig alls). Detta verktyg kombinerar unikt toppmodern distributionsemantik med en nyanserad modell av mänskliga känslor, två informationsflöden som vi anser vara fördelaktiga för en datadriven tolkning av texter inom humaniora.', 'si': 'අපි මෙතන ඉන්නේ ජෙසෙම් ගේ විශාල විස්තර වැඩසටහනයක් පෙන්වන්න, ප්\u200dරවේශ වැඩසටහනයක් පරීක්ෂණය විදියට පරීක්ෂණය කරලා පරීක්ෂණය විස්තර වි JesemE is Designed for science in the (Digital) Humanities as an alternator to advise handfully compile, printing dictdictions for so info (if any) for them. මේ උපකරණය එක්කෙනෙක් සම්බන්ධ වෙන්නේ මිනිස්සු හැඟීමක් වලින් ස්ථානය-of-the-art විස්තර විස්තර ක්\u200dරියාත්මක විදියට, අපි හිතන්නේ මානස්ත', 'ta': 'நாம் இங்கே ஜெசெம்E யின் ஒரு பெரிய விரிவாக்கப்பட்ட பதிப்பை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம், ஒரு இடைவெளிச்சார்ந்த இணையதளத்தை கண்டுபிடிக்க வேண்டும் சொல்லாத மாறிகள ஜெசெம்E மாணவர்களுக்காக வடிவமைக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது (இலக்கம்) மனிதர்களுக்காக ஒரு மாற்று கைமுறையாக சேகரிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது, இது போன்ற தகவலுக்கான இந்த கருவி தனிப்பட்டுள்ளதாக மனித உணர்வுகளின் மாதிரி மாதிரி பங்கீட்டு அமைப்புகளைக் கூட்டுகிறது, மனிதர்களில் நாம் ஒரு தரவு இயக்கப்பட்ட உரையை விளக்க', 'uz': "Biz bu yerda juda katta kengaytirilgan JeSemE versiyasini ko'rib chiqish uchun o'z so'zlar va leksikal hisoblarining 5 katta diakronisk matn kompaniyasidan bir qanchalik hisoblanadigan soʻzning ma'lumotni ko'rganish uchun interaktiv veb- saytdan foydalanamiz. JeSemE (raqamli) insonlarda o'quvchilarni qoʻlbola kompyuterga, bosib chiqarish lugʻatlarga boshqarish uchun o'quvvat qilinadi (agar kerak boʻlsa). Bu asbobi oddiy hissiyotning holatini o'zgartirish holatiga qo'yish modeli bilan birlashadi, biz insonlarda ma'lumot tarjima qiladigan ma'lumot tarjimalarni qo'shish uchun foydalanishimiz mumkin.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi xin giới thiệu một phiên bản rộng lớn của Jeo, một trang web tương tác để tìm hiểu theo kinh nghiệm các thông tin về tiềm thức từ ngữ và cảm xúc văn bản rộng lớn tập hợp từ năm kinh nguyệt lớn. Ngọc Trinh được thiết kế cho các học giả trong giới Nhân loại (số) như một cách thay thế cho việc tư vấn biên tập bằng tay, từ điển in để cung cấp thông tin như vậy (nếu có). Công cụ này kết hợp một giao thức phân phối ngữ văn học tiên tiến nhất với một mô hình cảm xúc của con người khác, hai dòng thông tin mà chúng tôi cho là thuận lợi cho việc hiểu các văn bản trong nhân loại.', 'nl': 'We introduceren hier een aanzienlijk uitgebreide versie van JeSemE, een interactieve website voor het visueel verkennen van computerafgeleide tijdvariantinformatie over woordbetekenissen en lexicale emoties samengesteld uit vijf grote diachrone tekstcorpora. JeSemE is bedoeld voor wetenschappers in de (digitale) geesteswetenschappen als alternatief voor het raadplegen van handmatig samengestelde, gedrukte woordenboeken voor dergelijke informatie (indien beschikbaar). Deze tool combineert op unieke wijze state-of-the-art distributionele semantiek met een genuanceerd model van menselijke emoties, twee informatiestromen die we nuttig achten voor een data-gedreven interpretatie van teksten in de geesteswetenschappen.', 'bg': 'Тук представяме съществено разширена версия на интерактивен уебсайт за визуално изследване на изчислително извлечена времево-варираща информация за значенията на думите и лексикалните емоции, събрани от пет големи диахронични текстови корпуса. ДжеСемЕ е предназначен за учени в (дигиталните) хуманитарни науки като алтернатива на консултирането на ръчно съставени, печатни речници за такава информация (ако изобщо са налични). Този инструмент уникално съчетава най-съвременната дистрибуционна семантика с нюансиран модел на човешките емоции, два информационни потока, които считаме за полезни за базираната на данни интерпретация на текстовете в хуманитарните науки.', 'hr': 'Ovdje predstavljamo značajno produženu verziju JeSemE, interaktivnu stranicu za vizualno istraživanje informacija o računalno proizvedenim vremenskim varijantima o smislama riječi i leksičkim emocijama okupljenim iz pet velikih dijagronskih tekstova tijela. JeSemE je dizajniran za učenike u (digitalnom) čovječanstvu kao alternativa za savjetovanje ručno sastavljenih, štampljenih riječnika za takve informacije (ako je uopće dostupno). Ovaj alat jedinstveno kombinira distribucijsku semantiku države umjetnosti sa nuanciranim modelom ljudskih emocija, dvije informativne tekme koje smatramo korisnim za interpretaciju teksta na podacima u čovječanstvu.', 'da': 'Vi introducerer her en væsentligt udvidet version af JeSemE, en interaktiv hjemmeside til visuelt at udforske beregningsmæssigt afledt tidsvariant information om ordbetydninger og leksikske følelser samlet fra fem store diakroniske tekstkorpora. JeSemE er designet til forskere inden for (digital) humaniora som et alternativ til at konsultere manuelt kompilerede, trykte ordbøger for sådanne oplysninger (hvis tilgængelige overhovedet). Dette værktøj kombinerer unikt state-of-the-art distributionsmæssig semantik med en nuanceret model af menneskelige følelser, to informationsstrømme, som vi finder gavnlige for en datadrevet fortolkning af tekster i humaniora.', 'ko': 'JeSemE의 확장판을 소개합니다. 이것은 다섯 개의 대형 역사 텍스트 자료 라이브러리에서 수집한 의미와 어휘 감정의 계산이 파생된 시변 정보를 시각적으로 탐색하는 데 사용되는 인터랙티브 사이트입니다.JeSemE는 인문 학과의 학자들을 위해 설계된 것으로 수동으로 편집하고 인쇄한 사전을 대체하여 이러한 정보를 얻을 수 있다.이 도구는 가장 선진적인 분포어의학과 인류 감정의 미묘한 모델을 독특하게 결합시켜 이 두 가지 정보 흐름이 데이터 구동의 방식으로 인문 학과의 텍스트를 해석하는 데 도움이 된다고 본다.', 'de': 'Wir stellen hier eine wesentlich erweiterte Version von JeSemE vor, einer interaktiven Website zur visuellen Erforschung computergestützter Zeitvarianteninformationen zu Wortbedeutungen und lexikalischen Emotionen, zusammengestellt aus fünf großen diachronen Textkorpora. JeSemE richtet sich an Wissenschaftlerinnen und Wissenschaftler der (digitalen) Geisteswissenschaften als Alternative zur Beratung manuell zusammengestellter, gedruckter Wörterbücher für solche Informationen (sofern überhaupt verfügbar). Dieses Tool kombiniert auf einzigartige Weise modernste Verteilungssemmeantik mit einem differenzierten Modell menschlicher Emotionen, zwei Informationsströme, die wir für eine datengetriebene Interpretation geisteswissenschaftlicher Texte als vorteilhaft erachten.', 'id': 'Kami di sini memperkenalkan versi JeSemE yang sangat diperluaskan, sebuah situs interaktif untuk secara visual mengeksplorasi informasi variasi waktu berasal dari komputasi tentang arti kata dan emosi lexik yang terkumpul dari lima korpora teks diakronis besar. JeSemE is designed for scholars in the (digital) humanities as an alternative to consulting manually compiled, printed dictionaries for such information (if available at all).  Alat ini unik menggabungkan semantik distribusi state-of-the-art dengan model nuansi emosi manusia, dua aliran informasi yang kita anggap berguna untuk interpretasi teks didalam alam alam manusia.', 'fa': 'ما اینجا یک نسخه بسیار گسترده\u200cای از JeSemE را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک وبسایت متفاوتی برای تحقیق دادن اطلاعات زمان\u200cهای متفاوت\u200cهای کامپیوتری در مورد معنی\u200cهای کلمات و احساسات زبان\u200cشناسی که از پنج شرکت متن\u200cهای دیاکرونی بزرگ جمع شده است. جسمی برای دانشمندان در انسان\u200cهای (دیجیتال) به عنوان جایگزینی برای مشاوره\u200cهای دستی جمع شده، لغوی\u200cهای چاپ شده برای این اطلاعات (اگر کامل موجود باشد) طراحی شده است. این ابزار به طور تکلیف سیمانتیک\u200cهای تقسیم هنری را با یک مدل احساسات انسان نابود می\u200cکند، دو سیم اطلاعات که ما فکر می\u200cکنیم برای تفسیر متن\u200cهای در انسان\u200cها به عنوان داده\u200cهای منافع است.', 'sw': 'Hapa tunaonyesha toleo la JeSemE lililopandishwa kwa kiasi kikubwa, tovuti ya moja kwa moja kwa moja kwa ajili ya kutafuta taarifa tofauti za muda zinazotokana na maana ya maneno na hisia za lexico zilizokusanyika kutoka makampuni matano makubwa ya simu za kihisia. JeSemE imeundwa kwa wanafunzi katika wanadamu (dijitali) kama mbadala ya kushauriana kwa mikononi, madikteta ya kuchapishwa kwa ajili ya taarifa kama haya (kama inapatikana). Kifaa hiki kinaunganisha hali ya usambazaji wa sanaa kwa mtindo wa hisia za binadamu, mitandao miwili ya taarifa tunakadiria kuwa in a faida kwa tafsiri ya maandishi yanayoendeshwa na taarifa katika binadamu.', 'af': "Ons hier introduseer 'n betekende uitgebreide weergawe van JeSemE, 'n interaktiewe webwerp vir visuele uitsoek van rekenaar afgeleide tyd-variasie inligting oor woorde betekening en leksiese emosies wat van vyf groot diakronise teks korpora versamel het. JeSemE is ontwerp vir onderwysers in die (digitale) humaniteite as 'n alternatief om handsamelekteerde, drukkeerde woordeboeke vir sodanige inligting te raak (indien beskikbaar is). Hierdie gereedskap kombinieer staat-van-die-kunsten verspreidingssemantieke met 'n nuanced model van menslike emosies, twee inligting strome wat ons deel nuttig vir 'n data-gedrywe uitlegging van teks in die menslike mense.", 'tr': "Biz bu ýerde JeSemE'nin möhüm uzatlanmış bir wersiýasyny tanyşdyrýarys, kalýumsal şeklinde taýýarlanmış zamanly wariant bilgilerini we beş uly dijaonik metin korporatyndan çykyp bilen çykar. JeSemE (digital) adamlary üçin bu maglumatlar üçin elimden birleşmiş, çaplan sözlükler bolup tasarlanýar (eger hiç hili meňzeş bolsa). Bu araç ynsan duýgularynyň durumyny ýekeje bir şekilde çykýar, adamlaryň duýgularynyň nusgasy bilen, biziň pikir edip bilýän iki informasiýa akrymy adamlaryň içinde ýazylan metinlerin terjime etmäge yararlydyr diýip pikir edýäris.", 'am': 'ወደዚህ፣ የይሴሜን መልዕክት፣ በአምስት ትልቁ የጽሑፍ ኮርፖርት የተሰበሰቡ የጊዜው ተቃውሞ ማህበረሰብ እና የሌክሲካዊ እውቀት የተለየ የኢትዮጵያ ድረ ገጽ እና የተለየ የኢትዮጵያ ድረ ገጽ እና ማሳየት ነው፡፡ JeSemE (digital) ለሰብዓዊ (digital) ተማሪዎችን እጃቸውን አቀማመጥ፣ የዚህ መረጃ መዝገብ መዝገብ የመዝገብ መዝገብ መዝገብ መዝገብ መዝገብ (ቢገኝ) የሚለውጥ ምረጡ ነው፡፡ ይህ መሣሪያው የሰው አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ አካባቢ እና ሁለት የመረጃ ወንዞች በሰብአዊ አካባቢ የጽሑፎችን ትርጓሜ ለመጠቀም እናስባለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Ne këtu prezantojmë një version thelbësor të JeSemE, një uebsajt interaktiv për eksplorimin vizual të informacionit të përdorur nga llogaria kohore-variante mbi kuptimet e fjalës dhe emocionet lexike të mbledhura nga pesë korpra të mëdha teksti diakronik. JeSemE është dizajnuar për shkencëtarët në humanitetet (dixhitale) si një alternativë për të konsultuar fjalorët e kompiluar manualisht dhe të shtypur për të tillë informacion (nëse janë në dispozicion). Ky mjet kombinon në mënyrë unike semantikën shpërndarëse të moderne me një model nuancuar të emocioneve njerëzore, dy rrjedha informacioni që ne e konsiderojmë të dobishme për një interpretim të teksteve në njerëzi të bazuar në të dhëna.', 'hy': 'Այստեղ մենք ներկայացնում ենք Յեսեմ-ի հիմնականում ընդլայնված տարբերակը, ինտերակտիվ վեբկայք, որն օգտագործում է հաշվարկների առումով ստացված ժամանակի տարբերակի տեղեկատվությունը բառերի իմաստների և լեքսիկական զգացմունքների մասին, հավաքված հինգ մեծ դիաքրոնիկ տե JeSemE is designed for scholars in the (digital) humanities as an alternative to consulting manually compiled, printed dictionaries for such information (if available at all).  Այս գործիքը միանգամայն համադրում է ամենաբարձր տարածման սեմանտիկայը մարդկային զգացմունքների նյուանսավոր մոդելի հետ, երկու տեղեկատվական հոսքերի հետ, որոնք մենք կարծում ենք օգտակար մարդկային գիտությունների տեքստների ինտերպրեցիայի համար:', 'bn': 'We here introduce a substantially extended version of JeSemE, an interactive website for visually exploring computationally derived time-variant information on word meanings and lexical emotions assembled from five large diachronic text corpora.  জেসেমই (ডিজিটাল) মানবিক শিক্ষার্থীদের জন্য বিকল্প হিসেবে গঠন করা হয়েছে হাতে সংগ্রহ করা হয়েছে এবং এই ধরনের তথ্যের জন্য মুদ্রণ করা অভিভাবক এই টুলটি মানব অনুভূতির মডেল দিয়ে একত্রিত করে শিল্প-শিল্প-বিতরণের রাষ্ট্রের সেমান্টিকের সাথে একত্রিত করে, দুটি তথ্য প্রবাহিত যা আমরা মানবতার', 'bs': 'Ovdje predstavljamo značajno produženu verziju JeSemE, interaktivnu stranicu za vizualno istraživanje informacija o računalno izvedenim vremenskim varijantima o smislama riječi i leksičkim emocijama okupljenim iz pet velikih dijagronskih tekstnih korpora. JeSemE je dizajniran za učenike u (digitalnom) čovečanstvu kao alternativa za konsultaciju ručno sastavljenih, štampljenih riječnika za takve informacije (ako je uopšte dostupno). Ovaj alat jedinstveno kombinira distribucijsku semantiku države umjetnosti sa nuanciranim modelom ljudskih emocija, dvije informativne tekme koje smatramo korisnim za interpretaciju teksta na podacima u čovječanstvu.', 'az': 'Biz burada, beş böyük diakroniki mətn korporasından toplanmış kelimelər anlama və leksik duyguları barəsində görünümlü müxtəlif bir JeSemE versiyasını tanıyırıq. JeSemE (dijital) insanlıqların elm sahibləri üçün bu məlumatlar üçün (heç vaxt mövcud deyilsə) əl-əl birləşdirilmiş, yazılmış sözlər kimi məsləhət edilir. Bu araç insan duygularının nuancı modeli ilə, insanların məlumatlarını verilən məlumatların yorumlaması üçün faydalı hesab edirik.', 'ca': "Aquí presentem una versió substancialment estesa de JeSemE, una pàgina web interactiva per explorar visualment informació derivada computacionalment de variacions de temps sobre significats de paraules i emocions lècsiques assemblades de cinc grans corpores de text diacrònic. JeSemE està dissenyat per a estudiants de les humanitats (digitals) com una alternativa a consultar diccionaris compilats manualment i impresos per aquesta informació (si està disponible en absolut). Aquesta eina combina únicament la senàntica de distribució més moderna amb un model nuansat d'emocions humanes, dos fluxos d'informació que considerem útils per una interpretació basada en dades dels textos a les humanitats.", 'cs': 'Představujeme výrazně rozšířenou verzi JeSemE, interaktivního webu pro vizuální zkoumání výpočetně odvozených časově variantních informací o slovních významech a lexikálních emocích sestavených z pěti velkých diachronických textových korpusů. JeSemE je určen pro odborníky z (digitálních) humanitních věd jako alternativa k poradenství ručně sestavených, tištěných slovníků pro tyto informace (pokud jsou vůbec k dispozici). Tento nástroj unikátně kombinuje nejmodernější distribuční sémantiku s nuancovaným modelem lidských emocí, dva informační toky, které považujeme za přínosné pro datově řízenou interpretaci textů v humanitních vědách.', 'et': 'Tutvustame siin sisuliselt laiendatud versiooni JeSeme, interaktiivse veebilehe visuaalseks uurimiseks arvutuslikult tuletatud ajavariantide infot sõna tähendustest ja leksikaalsetest emotsioonidest, mis on kogutud viiest suurest diakroonilisest tekstikorpusest. JeSeme on mõeldud (digitaalsete) humanitaarteaduste teadlastele alternatiivina käsitsi koostatud trükitud sõnaraamatute konsulteerimisele sellise teabe jaoks (kui see on üldse kättesaadav). See tööriist ühendab unikaalselt kaasaegse distributsioonisemantika inimemotsioonide nüanssidega, kahte infovoogu, mida peame kasulikuks humanitaarteaduste tekstide andmepõhiseks tõlgendamiseks.', 'fi': 'Tässä esittelemme olennaisesti laajennetun version JeSeme-sivustosta, joka on interaktiivinen sivusto, jonka avulla voidaan visuaalisesti tutkia laskennallisesti johdettua aikamuunnosta tietoa sanamerkityksistä ja leksikaalisista tunteista, jotka on koottu viidestä suuresta diakroonisesta tekstikorpusta. JeSeme on suunniteltu (digitaalisten) humanististen tieteiden tutkijoille vaihtoehtona manuaalisesti koottujen, painettujen sanakirjojen konsultoinnille tällaista tietoa varten (jos saatavilla ollenkaan). Tämä työkalu yhdistää ainutlaatuisesti uusimman jakelusemantiikan ihmisen tunteiden vivahteikkaaseen malliin, jotka ovat kaksi tietovirtaa, joita pidämme hyödyllisinä humanististen tieteiden tekstien datavetoisessa tulkinnassa.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo bistveno razširjeno različico JeSeme, interaktivne spletne strani za vizualno raziskovanje računalniško izpeljanih časovnih različic informacij o besednih pomenih in leksikalnih čustvih, zbranih iz petih velikih diakroničnih besedilnih korpusov. JeSeme je namenjen znanstvenikom iz (digitalnih) humanističnih ved kot alternativa svetovanju ročno sestavljenih tiskanih slovarjev za takšne informacije (če so sploh na voljo). To orodje edinstveno združuje najsodobnejšo distribucijsko semantiko z niansiranim modelom človeških čustev, dveh informacijskih tokov, za katera menimo, da sta koristna za podatkovno usmerjeno interpretacijo besedil v humanistiki.', 'ha': 'Tuna nuna wani version mai shimfiɗawa na JeSemU, an samu wani website mai shirin yin jarraba ga gannai da ake samu da wasu information masu variant na lokaci da ke samu daga makampuni matabbata mai girma na diaron matsayi. JeSemE is designed for scholars in the (digital) humanities as an alternative to consulting manually compiled, printed dictionaries for such information (if available at all).  Wannan zane yana koma da shirin-state-of-the-art na sami da wata motel mai nufi wa hisãbin mutum, da kõguna biyu masu yiwuwa yana da amfani ga fassarar mutane da aka tafiyar da shi a cikin mutane.', 'he': 'אנחנו מכירים כאן גרסה מורחבת משמעותית של JeSemE, אתר אינטראקטיבי עבור חיפוש חזותי מידע משתני זמן מושלם מחשבי JeSemE מעוצב למלמידים בני האנושות (דיגיטליים) כחלופה לייעוץ במילונים המתופסים ומאוספים ידנית למידע כזה (אם זמינים בכלל). הכלי הזה משלב באופן מיוחד סמנטיקה פיצוץ מצוינת עם מודל ניאונס של רגשות אנושיים, שני זרמים מידע שאנחנו חושבים שימושיים לפרשנות הנתונים של טקסטים באנושיות.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntuk akeh versi JesemE, akeh interactive website nggawe bisa nguasai informasi Time-variant kanggo kelas barang gambar lan sampeyan langgar sampek winih dhéwé JesemE wis disenyarno kanggo alim-alim kanggo perbudhakan ning (digit) sing alim kanggo nguasai manut, gambaran diketeksi kanggo informasi sing dibutuhke (nek bisa nêmên). Instrumpén iki ngono perusahaan-perusahaan semanti sing gak perusahaan karo model sing gak perusahaan, gambaran kelas informasi sing awak dhéwé sawetara bener kanggo ngerasakno gambaran seneng ngregani martapit karo perusahaan anyar.', 'bo': 'We here introduce a substantially extended version of JeSemE, an interactive website for visually exploring computationally derived time-variant information on word meanings and lexical emotions assembled from five large diachronic text corpora. JeSemE འདི་ལ་ཆེན་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ལས་(གྲངས་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ཆེད་དུ་འཇུག་རྒྱུ་དང་)སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཆ་རྣམས་ལག་ཐོག་སྒྲིག་ཕྱོགས་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པའི་གནད་དོན་ཆ་རྩ This tool uniquely combines state-of-the-art distributional semantics with a nuanced model of human emotions, two information streams we consider beneficial for a data-driven interpretation of texts in the humanity.'}
{'en': 'T-Know : a Knowledge Graph-based Question Answering and Infor-mation Retrieval System for Traditional Chinese Medicine', 'ar': 'T-Know: نظام إجابة للأسئلة قائم على الرسم البياني للمعرفة ونظام استرداد المعلومات للطب الصيني التقليدي', 'es': 'T-Know: un sistema de respuesta a preguntas y recuperación de información basado en gráficos de conocimientos para la medicina tradicional china', 'pt': 'T-Know: um Sistema de Resposta a Perguntas e Recuperação de Informações baseado em Gráfico de Conhecimento para Medicina Tradicional Chinesa', 'fr': "T-Know\xa0: un système de réponse aux questions et de recherche d'informations basé sur un graphe de connaissances pour la médecine traditionnelle chinoise", 'ja': 'T - Know ：ナレッジグラフに基づく質問の回答と中医学のためのインフォメーション検索システム', 'zh': 'T-Know曰:图谱中医问与信息检索统', 'hi': 'टी-पता है: एक ज्ञान ग्राफ-आधारित प्रश्न उत्तर और Infor-mation पारंपरिक चीनी चिकित्सा के लिए पुनर्प्राप्ति प्रणाली', 'ru': 'T-Know: основанная на графе знаний система ответов на вопросы и поиска информации для традиционной китайской медицины', 'ga': 'T-Know: Córas Eolais-bhunaithe um Fhreagra ar Cheisteanna agus um Fhaisnéis do Leigheas Síneach Traidisiúnta', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Ένα σύστημα απάντησης και ανάκτησης ερωτήσεων με βάση το γράφημα γνώσης για την παραδοσιακή κινεζική ιατρική', 'hu': 'T-Know: egy tudásgraf alapú kérdésválaszadó és információs visszaszerző rendszer a hagyományos kínai orvostudomány számára', 'kk': 'T-Know: графикалық білім жауап беру жүйесі және мәліметті жауап беру жүйесі әдетті қытайша медицина үшін', 'it': 'T-Know: un sistema di risposta alle domande basato su grafici di conoscenza e di recupero delle informazioni per la medicina tradizionale cinese', 'lt': 'T-Know: žiniomis pagrįsta atsakymų į klausimus ir informacijos gavimo sistema tradiciniam Kinijos vaistui', 'mk': 'Т-Know: систем за одговори на прашања и добивање информации за традиционална кинеска медицина', 'ms': 'T-Know: Sistem Penerimaan Pertanyaan dan Maklumat Berasas Graf Pengetahuan untuk Ubat China Tradisional', 'mn': 'T-Know: Хятад уламжлалтын эмчилгээний мэдлэг график дээр суралцах асуулт хариулт, мэдээллийн сэтгэл авах систем', 'ml': 'ടി- അറിയിക്കുക: പാഠമായ ചൈനീസ് മരുന്നിനുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200dക്കുള്ള അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ചോദ്യം ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കുന്', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'T-Know: oparty na wykresie wiedzy system odpowiedzi na pytania i informacji dla tradycyjnej medycyny chińskiej', 'ro': 'T-Know: un sistem de răspuns la întrebări bazat pe grafice de cunoștințe și de recuperare a informațiilor pentru medicina tradițională chineză', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'T-Ogaanta: Jawaalka warqada aqoonta iyo jawaabta iyo warbixinta nidaamka dib u laabashada dhakhaatiirta Shiino', 'sr': 'T-Know: sistem odgovora na pitanja na grafiku znanja i povratka informacija za tradicionalnu kinesku medicinu', 'sv': 'T-Know: ett kunskapsgrafbaserat frågesvarssystem för traditionell kinesisk medicin', 'ta': 'T- தெரியும்: பாரம்பரிய சீன மருத்துவர்களுக்கான அறிவு வரைகலைச் சார்ந்த கேள்வி', 'mt': 'T-Know: Sistema ta’ Rispons għall-Mistoqsijiet ibbażata fuq Grafika tal-Għarfien u ta’ Qligħ ta’ Informazzjoni għall-Mediċina Ċiniża Tradizzjonali', 'ur': 'T-Know: ایک علم Graph-based سوال جواب اور Infor-mation Retrieval System for Traditional Chinese medicine', 'uz': 'T-Know: a Knowledge Graph-based Question Answering and Infor-mation Retrieval System for Traditional Chinese Medicine', 'vi': 'T-Know: Một Nhà câu hỏi Có thắc mắc về nhà tù truyền thống Trung học', 'nl': 'T-Know: een kennisgrafiek gebaseerd vragenantwoord en infor-matie retrieve systeem voor traditionele Chinese geneeskunde', 'bg': 'Т-знае: система за отговор на въпроси и събиране на информация за традиционната китайска медицина, базирана на графика на знанието', 'da': 'T-Know: et vidensgrafbaseret spørgsmål besvarelse og information hentning system for traditionel kinesisk medicin', 'hr': 'T-Know: sustav odgovora na pitanja na grafiku znanja i povratka informacija za tradicionalnu kinesku medicinu', 'de': 'T-Know: ein Wissensdiagramm-basiertes Fragebeantworterungs- und Infor-mationssystem für die Traditionelle Chinesische Medizin', 'id': 'T-Know: sebuah Jawaban Pertanyaan Berdasarkan Graf Pengetahuan dan Sistem Penerimaan Informasi untuk Medis Tradisional Cina', 'fa': 'Name', 'tr': 'T-Know: a Bilgi Grafik tabanly sorag jogap we informasiýa geri alma Sistemi Däpli Çinçe ilatynyň(Traditional Chinese medicine) üçin', 'sw': 'T-Know: a Knowledge Graph-based Question Answering and Infor-mation Retrieval System for Traditional Chinese Medicine', 'af': 'T-Know: 芒聙聶n kennis grafiek-gebaseerde vraag antwoord en inligting-matie-ontvangstelsel vir tradisionele Sjinese Mediese', 'sq': 'T-Know: një sistem përgjigjesh pyetjeve dhe marrjes së informacionit për mjekësinë tradicionale kineze', 'am': 'T-ማወቅ: የባሕላዊው ቻይንኛ መድኃኒት የመስጠት ጥያቄ እና የመረጃ ምርጫዎች መመለስ ስርዓት', 'hy': 'T-Know. գիտելիքի գրաֆիկով հիմնված հարցերի պատասխաններ և տեղեկատվություն ստանալու համակարգ ավանդական չինական բժշկության համար', 'az': 'T-Know: A Knowledge Graph Based Question Answer and Infor-mation Retrieval System for Traditional Chinese Medicine', 'bn': 'টি- জানো: ঐতিহ্যবাহী চীনা মেডিকেনের জন্য একটি জ্ঞান গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক প্রশ্নের উত্তর এবং তথ্য-মেটিশন পুনরুদ্ধার সিস্টেম', 'bs': 'T-Know: sistem odgovora na pitanja na grafiku znanja i osvajanja informacija za tradicionalnu kinesku medicinu', 'cs': 'T-Know: znalostní graf založený na odpovědi na otázky a informační systém pro tradiční čínskou medicínu', 'ca': 'T-Know: a Knowledge Graph-based Question Answering and Infor-mation Retrieval System for Traditional Chinese Medicine', 'et': 'T-Know: teadmiste graafik-põhine küsimustele vastamise ja teabe saamise süsteem traditsioonilise hiina meditsiini jaoks', 'ko': 'T-Know: 지식도 기반의 한의학 문답 및 정보 검색 시스템', 'fi': 'T-Know: Knowledge Graph -pohjainen kysymys- ja tiedonhakujärjestelmä perinteiselle kiinalaiselle lääketieteelle', 'jv': 'T-knownMonitor vendor', 'he': 'T-Know: מערכת השיגור של שאלות ומידע מבוססת על גרף ידע לרפואה סינית מסורתית', 'sk': 'T-Know: sistem odgovarjanja na vprašanja in informacij za tradicionalno kitajsko medicino, ki temelji na grafičnem znanju', 'ha': "T-sani: A matsala wanda aka ƙayyade na Narrafi na Jarrabi'a na jibar da Shirin Motsarwa na Agar-Matukin wa Taifa na Daidaicin China", 'bo': 'T-Know : a Knowledge Graph based Question Answering and Info-mation Retrieval System for Traditional Chinese Medicine'}
{'en': 'T-Know is a knowledge service system based on the constructed knowledge graph of Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM). Using authorized and anonymized clinical records, medicine clinical guidelines, teaching materials, classic medical books, academic publications, etc., as data resources, the system extracts triples from free texts to build a TCM knowledge graph by our developed natural language processing methods. On the basis of the knowledge graph, a deep learning algorithm is implemented for single-round question understanding and multiple-round dialogue. In addition, the TCM knowledge graph also is used to support human-computer interactive knowledge retrieval by normalizing search keywords to medical terminology.', 'ar': 'T-Know هو نظام خدمة معرفي يعتمد على الرسم البياني المعرفي المبني للطب الصيني التقليدي (TCM). باستخدام السجلات السريرية المصرح بها والمجهولة المصدر ، والمبادئ التوجيهية الطبية الطبية ، والمواد التعليمية ، والكتب الطبية الكلاسيكية ، والمنشورات الأكاديمية ، وما إلى ذلك ، كمصادر بيانات ، يستخرج النظام ثلاث مرات من النصوص المجانية لإنشاء رسم بياني لمعرفة الطب الصيني التقليدي من خلال طرق معالجة اللغة الطبيعية المطورة لدينا. على أساس الرسم البياني للمعرفة ، يتم تنفيذ خوارزمية التعلم العميق لفهم السؤال من جولة واحدة والحوار متعدد الجولات. بالإضافة إلى ذلك ، يُستخدم الرسم البياني للمعرفة في الطب الصيني التقليدي أيضًا لدعم استرجاع المعرفة التفاعلي بين الإنسان والحاسوب من خلال تطبيع كلمات البحث الرئيسية مع المصطلحات الطبية.', 'pt': 'T-Know é um sistema de serviço de conhecimento baseado no gráfico de conhecimento construído da Medicina Tradicional Chinesa (MTC). Usando registros clínicos autorizados e anônimos, diretrizes clínicas de medicamentos, materiais didáticos, livros médicos clássicos, publicações acadêmicas, etc., como recursos de dados, o sistema extrai triplos de textos livres para construir um gráfico de conhecimento de MTC por nossos métodos de processamento de linguagem natural desenvolvidos. Com base no gráfico de conhecimento, um algoritmo de aprendizado profundo é implementado para compreensão de perguntas de rodada única e diálogo de várias rodadas. Além disso, o gráfico de conhecimento do TCM também é usado para dar suporte à recuperação interativa do conhecimento humano-computador, normalizando as palavras-chave de pesquisa para a terminologia médica.', 'fr': "T-Know est un système de service de connaissances basé sur le graphe de connaissances construit de la médecine traditionnelle chinoise (MTC). En utilisant des dossiers cliniques autorisés et anonymisés, des directives cliniques médicales, du matériel didactique, des livres médicaux classiques, des publications académiques, etc., comme ressources de données, le système extrait des triplets de textes libres pour créer un graphe de connaissances en MTC à l'aide de nos méthodes de traitement du langage naturel développées. Sur la base du graphe de connaissances, un algorithme d'apprentissage profond est mis en œuvre pour la compréhension des questions à un tour et un dialogue à plusieurs tours. En outre, le graphe de connaissances MTC est également utilisé pour faciliter la récupération interactive des connaissances homme-machine en normalisant les mots-clés de recherche par rapport à la terminologie médicale.", 'es': 'T-Know es un sistema de servicio de conocimiento basado en el gráfico de conocimiento construido de la Medicina Tradicional China (MTC). Utilizando registros clínicos autorizados y anónimos, guías clínicas de medicamentos, materiales didácticos, libros médicos clásicos, publicaciones académicas, etc., como recursos de datos, el sistema extrae triples de textos libres para construir un gráfico de conocimiento de MTC mediante nuestros métodos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural desarrollados. Sobre la base del gráfico de conocimiento, se implementa un algoritmo de aprendizaje profundo para la comprensión de preguntas de una sola ronda y el diálogo de varias rondas. Además, el gráfico de conocimientos de TCM también se utiliza para apoyar la recuperación interactiva de conocimientos humano-ordenador mediante la normalización de las palabras clave de búsqueda con la terminología médica.', 'ja': 'T - Knowは、中医学（ TCM ）の構築された知識グラフに基づいた知識サービスシステムです。認可され匿名化された臨床記録、医学臨床ガイドライン、教材、古典的な医学書、学術出版物などをデータリソースとして使用し、当社が開発した自然言語処理方法により、無料テキストから3つの要素を抽出し、TCMナレッジグラフを構築します。知識グラフに基づいて、単一ラウンドの質問理解と複数ラウンドの対話のための深層学習アルゴリズムが実装されている。さらに、TCMナレッジグラフは、検索キーワードを医学用語に正規化することにより、人間とコンピュータの対話型ナレッジ検索をサポートするためにも使用されます。', 'zh': 'T-Know者,中医药(TCM)之知图谱构之服务体系。 统以授权匿名临床记录、医学临床指南、教材、经典医学书籍、学术出版物等为数据资源,因我等开发自然语言处分之法,于自由文本中提取三元组,构中医知识图谱。 图谱知之基,深习算法,单轮问多轮对。 此外中医知识图谱用将搜索关键字规范化为医学术语以支人机交互检。', 'hi': 'T-Know एक ज्ञान सेवा प्रणाली है जो पारंपरिक चीनी चिकित्सा (TCM) के निर्मित ज्ञान ग्राफ पर आधारित है। डेटा संसाधनों के रूप में अधिकृत और अनाम नैदानिक रिकॉर्ड, चिकित्सा नैदानिक दिशानिर्देश, शिक्षण सामग्री, क्लासिक चिकित्सा पुस्तकें, अकादमिक प्रकाशन, आदि का उपयोग करके, सिस्टम हमारे विकसित प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण विधियों द्वारा टीसीएम ज्ञान ग्राफ बनाने के लिए मुक्त ग्रंथों से तीन गुना निकालता है। ज्ञान ग्राफ के आधार पर, एकल-दौर प्रश्न समझ और बहु-दौर संवाद के लिए एक गहरी सीखने की एल्गोरिथ्म लागू की जाती है। इसके अलावा, टीसीएम ज्ञान ग्राफ का उपयोग चिकित्सा शब्दावली के लिए खोज कीवर्ड को सामान्य करके मानव-कंप्यूटर इंटरैक्टिव ज्ञान पुनर्प्राप्ति का समर्थन करने के लिए भी किया जाता है।', 'ru': 'T-Know - это система обслуживания знаний, основанная на построенном графике знаний традиционной китайской медицины (TCM). Используя авторизованные и анонимные клинические записи, клинические рекомендации по медицине, учебные материалы, классические медицинские книги, академические публикации и т. д., в качестве ресурсов данных, система извлекает трижды из свободных текстов, чтобы построить график знаний TCM с помощью наших разработанных методов обработки естественного языка. На основе графа знаний реализован алгоритм глубокого обучения для одноразового понимания вопросов и многораундового диалога. Кроме того, график знаний TCM также используется для поддержки интерактивного поиска знаний между человеком и компьютером путем нормализации ключевых слов поиска в медицинской терминологии.', 'ga': 'Is córas seirbhíse eolais é T-Know atá bunaithe ar ghraf eolais tógtha de Leigheas Sínis Traidisiúnta (TCM). Trí úsáid a bhaint as taifid chliniciúla údaraithe agus anaithnide, treoirlínte cliniciúla leighis, ábhair teagaisc, leabhair leighis clasaiceacha, foilseacháin acadúla, etc., mar acmhainní sonraí, baineann an córas trí oiread as téacsanna saor in aisce chun graf eolais TCM a thógáil ag ár modhanna próiseála teanga nádúrtha forbartha. Ar bhonn ghraif an eolais, cuirtear algartam foghlama domhain i bhfeidhm chun tuiscint a fháil ar cheist aon bhabhta agus idirphlé iolrach. Ina theannta sin, úsáidtear graf eolais TCM freisin chun tacú le haisghabháil eolais idirghníomhach duine-ríomhaire trí eochairfhocail chuardaigh a normalú go téarmaíocht leighis.', 'ka': 'T-Know არის ცნობიერი სერვისისტემა, რომელიც განსაზღვრებული ცნობიერების გრაფიკური ჩინეთის მედიცინის (TCM) დაბაზიან. შესაძლებელია და ანონიმიზებული კლინიკური წიგნის გამოყენება, მედიცინიკური კლინიკური მოწყობილობები, კლასიკური მედიციური წიგნი, აკადემიკური პუბუციაციები, ანუნიმიზებული კლინიკური წიგნის გამოყენება, როგორც მო მეცნიერების გრაფიკის ბაზაზე, ძალიან სწავლებელი ალგორიტიმ იმპლექტირებულია ერთხელ კითხვების შესახებ და მრავალ კითხვების დიალოგისთვის. დამატებით, TCM ცნობიერების გრაფიკის გამოყენება ადამიანის-კომპიუტერის ინტერექტიური ცნობილების მიღებად გამოყენება, რომელიც მედიციური ტერმინოლოგიაში ძი', 'el': 'Το T-Know είναι ένα σύστημα υπηρεσιών γνώσης που βασίζεται στο δομημένο γράφημα γνώσης της Παραδοσιακής Κινέζικης Ιατρικής (TCM). Χρησιμοποιώντας εξουσιοδοτημένα και ανώνυμα κλινικά αρχεία, ιατρικές κλινικές οδηγίες, διδακτικό υλικό, κλασικά ιατρικά βιβλία, ακαδημαϊκές δημοσιεύσεις κ.λπ., ως πόρους δεδομένων, το σύστημα εξάγει τριπλάσια από ελεύθερα κείμενα για να δημιουργήσει ένα γράφημα γνώσης με τις αναπτυγμένες μεθόδους επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας. Με βάση το γράφημα γνώσης, εφαρμόζεται ένας αλγόριθμος βαθιάς μάθησης για την κατανόηση των ερωτήσεων ενός γύρου και τον διάλογο πολλαπλών κύκλων. Επιπλέον, το γράφημα γνώσης χρησιμοποιείται επίσης για την υποστήριξη της διαδραστικής ανάκτησης γνώσης ανθρώπου-υπολογιστή με την ομαλοποίηση λέξεων-κλειδιών αναζήτησης στην ιατρική ορολογία.', 'hu': 'A T-Know egy tudásszolgáltató rendszer, amely a hagyományos kínai orvostudomány (TCM) konstruált tudásdiagramján alapul. Az engedélyezett és anonimizált klinikai feljegyzések, orvosi klinikai iránymutatások, oktatóanyagok, klasszikus orvosi könyvek, tudományos kiadványok stb. felhasználásával adatforrásként a rendszer háromszor kivonja a szabad szövegekből, hogy kifejlesztett természetes nyelvfeldolgozási módszereink segítségével készítsen egy TCM ismeretgráfot. A tudásdiagram alapján egy mélytanulási algoritmus kerül bevezetésre az egykörös kérdések megértésére és a többkörös párbeszédre. Ezenkívül a TCM tudásdiagramot az ember-számítógép interaktív tudáskeresésének támogatására is használják azáltal, hogy a keresési kulcsszavakat az orvosi terminológiába normalizálják.', 'it': 'T-Know è un sistema di servizi di conoscenza basato sul grafico costruito della conoscenza della Medicina Tradizionale Cinese (TCM). Utilizzando cartelle cliniche autorizzate e anonime, linee guida cliniche mediche, materiali didattici, libri medici classici, pubblicazioni accademiche, ecc., come risorse dati, il sistema estrae triple dai testi liberi per costruire un grafico della conoscenza TCM con i nostri metodi di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale sviluppati. Sulla base del grafico della conoscenza, viene implementato un algoritmo di deep learning per la comprensione delle domande a ciclo singolo e il dialogo a ciclo multiplo. Inoltre, il grafico della conoscenza TCM viene utilizzato anche per supportare il recupero interattivo della conoscenza uomo-computer normalizzando le parole chiave di ricerca alla terminologia medica.', 'lt': 'T-Know yra žinių paslaugų sistema, pagrįsta sukonstruota tradicinio Kinijos vaisto (TCM) žinių grafika. Using authorized and anonymized clinical records, medicine clinical guidelines, teaching materials, classic medical books, academic publications, etc., as data resources, the system extracts triples from free texts to build a TCM knowledge graph by our developed natural language processing methods.  Remiantis žinių grafiku, diegiamas gilaus mokymosi algoritmas, skirtas vienkartiniam klausimų supratimui ir daugiapvaliniam dialogui. Be to, TCM žinių grafikas taip pat naudojamas žmonių ir kompiuterių interaktyvių žinių gavimui remti normalizuojant paieškos raktus medicininei terminologijai.', 'mk': 'T-Know е систем за служба на знаење базиран на конструираниот граф на знаење на традиционалната кинеска медицина (TCM). Користејќи авторизирани и анонимни клинички записи, клинички упатства за медицина, наставни материјали, класични медицински книги, академски публикации итн., како ресурси на податоци, системот извлекува три пати од бесплатни тексти за да изгради граф на знаење на ТЦМ На основа на графикот на знаење, се имплементира алгоритм за длабоко учење за еднокружно разбирање на прашањата и повеќекратен дијалог. Покрај тоа, графот за познавање на ТЦМ, исто така, се користи за поддршка на преземањето интерактивно знаење помеѓу луѓето и компјутерите со нормализација на клучните зборови за пребарување во медицинската терминологија.', 'kk': 'T-Know - Тәдімгі Қытай медицина (TCM) негіздеген білім қызметі жүйесі. Рұқсат етілген және анонимдалған клиникалық жазуларды қолдану, медицина клиникалық бағыттаулары, материаларды оқыту, классикалық медицина кітаптары, академикалық жазулары және т. б. деректер ресурстары ретінде, жүйе тұтас мәтіндерден үш рет Білім графикасының негізінде, бірнеше сұрақтарды түсініп, бірнеше жұмыс диалогын түсініп алгоритм істейді. Қосымша, TCM мәлімет графикасы де адамды- компьютердің интерактивті мәліметтерді алу үшін медицина терминологиясына іздеу үшін қолданылады.', 'ms': 'T-Know adalah sistem perkhidmatan pengetahuan berdasarkan graf pengetahuan terbina dari ubat tradisional Cina (TCM). Menggunakan rekod klinik yang dibenarkan dan anonim, panduan klinik perubatan, bahan pengajar, buku perubatan klasik, penerbitan akademik, dll., sebagai sumber data, sistem mengekstrak tiga kali dari teks percuma untuk membina graf pengetahuan TCM dengan kaedah pemprosesan bahasa alam yang telah dikembangkan. Berdasarkan graf pengetahuan, algoritma pembelajaran dalam dilaksanakan untuk pemahaman soalan bulat tunggal dan dialog bulat berbilang. Selain itu, graf pengetahuan TCM juga digunakan untuk menyokong penghasilan pengetahuan interaktif manusia-komputer dengan normalisasi kata kunci carian ke terminologi perubatan.', 'ml': 'ടി- വ്യൂ പാഠമായ ചൈനീസ് മരുന്നുകളുടെ പരിജ്ഞാനത്തിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ച ഒരു പരിജ്ഞാന സേവന സിസ്റ അനുമതിക്കപ്പെട്ടിരിക്കുന്ന ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d റെക്കോര്\u200dഡുകള്\u200d, മെഡിക്കല്\u200d ക്ലിനിക്കല്\u200d ഗ്രാഡുകള്\u200d, ഉപദേശിക്കുന്ന വസ്തുക്കള്\u200d, ക്ലാസിക്കല്\u200d മെഡിക്കല്\u200d പുസ്തകങ്ങള്\u200d, അക്കാഡിക് പ്രസ്ത അറിവുള്ള ഗ്രാഫിന്\u200dറെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്തില്\u200d, ഒരു ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന ആല്\u200dഗോരിതം പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കപ്പെടുന്നു. ഒരു ചോ കൂടാതെ, ടിസിഎമിന്റെ അറിവ് ഗ്രാഫും മനുഷ്യന്\u200d കമ്പ്യൂട്ടര്\u200d ഇന്റര്\u200dവ്യൂട്ടിക്കേറ്റ് വിജ്ഞാനം തുണയ്ക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന', 'mt': 'T-Know is a knowledge service system based on the constructed knowledge graph of Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM).  Bl-użu ta’ rekords kliniċi awtorizzati u anonimizzati, linji gwida kliniċi dwar il-mediċina, materjali tat-tagħlim, kotba mediċi klassiċi, pubblikazzjonijiet akkademiċi, eċċ., bħala riżorsi tad-dejta, is-sistema testrakta tliet darbiet minn testi ħielsa biex tibni grafika tal-għarfien tat-TCM permezz tal-metodi naturali tal-ipproċessar tal-lingwi żviluppati tagħna. Abbażi tal-grafika tal-għarfien, algoritmu ta’ tagħlim profond huwa implimentat għall-fehim ta’ mistoqsijiet b’ċiklu wieħed u djalogu b’ċiklu multiplu. In addition, the TCM knowledge graph also is used to support human-computer interactive knowledge retrieval by normalizing search keywords to medical terminology.', 'no': 'T-Know er eit kunnskapstenestesystem basert på den konstruerte kunnskapsgrafen på tradisjonelle kinesiske medisinske (TCM). Bruk autoriserte og anonymerte kliniske oppføringar, medicinske kliniske retningslinjer, læring av materialar, klassiske medisinske bøker, akademiske publikasjonar osv., som dataressursar, pakkar systemet ut trådeler frå fri tekstar for å bygge ein TCM-kjennomsnittgraf ved våre utvikla naturspråk-handteringsmetoder. På kunnskapsgrafen er ein dyp læringsalgoritme implementert for å forstå enkelrundt spørsmål og fleirrundt dialogvindauge. I tillegg vert TCM-kunnskapsgrafen også brukt for å støtta interaktiv kunnskap for henting av menneskeldatamaskinen ved å normalisera søkjenøkkelord til medisinsk terminologi.', 'pl': 'T-Know to system usług wiedzy oparty na skonstruowanym wykresie wiedzy Tradycyjnej Medycyny Chińskiej (TCM). Korzystając z autoryzowanych i zanonimizowanych rejestrów klinicznych, wytycznych klinicznych medycznych, materiałów dydaktycznych, klasycznych książek medycznych, publikacji akademickich itp., jako zasobów danych system wyciąga trzykrotnie z wolnych tekstów w celu zbudowania wykresu wiedzy TCM za pomocą opracowanych przez nas metod przetwarzania języka naturalnego. Na podstawie wykresu wiedzy implementowany jest algorytm głębokiego uczenia do rozumienia pytań jednokrągłych i dialogu wielokrągłego. Ponadto wykres wiedzy TCM jest również wykorzystywany do wspierania interaktywnego pobierania wiedzy człowiek-komputer poprzez normalizację słów kluczowych wyszukiwania do terminologii medycznej.', 'ro': 'T-Know este un sistem de servicii de cunoaștere bazat pe graficul de cunoaștere construit al medicinei tradiționale chineze (TCM). Utilizând înregistrări clinice autorizate și anonime, ghiduri clinice medicale, materiale didactice, cărți medicale clasice, publicații academice etc., ca resurse de date, sistemul extrage triple din textele libere pentru a construi un grafic de cunoștințe TCM prin metodele noastre de procesare a limbajului natural dezvoltate. Pe baza graficului cunoștințelor, este implementat un algoritm de învățare profundă pentru înțelegerea întrebărilor pe o singură rundă și dialogul pe mai multe runde. În plus, graficul cunoștințelor TCM este, de asemenea, utilizat pentru a sprijini recuperarea interactivă a cunoștințelor om-calculator prin normalizarea cuvintelor cheie de căutare la terminologia medicală.', 'mn': 'T-Know бол Хятад уламжлалтын эмчилгээний (TCM) мэдлэг график дээр байгуулсан мэдлэг үйлчилгээний систем юм. Хэрэглэгдсэн, нэрлэгдсэн клиникийн бичил баримтуудыг ашиглаж, эмнэлгийн клиникийн удирдагч, материал зааж, классик эмнэлгийн ном, академикийн нийтлэл гэх мэт, өгөгдлийн баялаг, систем бидний хөгжсөн байгалийн хэлний үйлдвэрлэлийн арга замаар ТСМ мэдлэгийн гра Мэдлэгийн график дээр гүн гүнзгий суралцах алгоритм нь нэг эргэн тойрон асуулт ойлгох болон олон эргэн тойрон диалог дээр хэрэглэгддэг. ТСМ мэдлэг график мөн хүн-компьютерийн интерактив мэдлэг авахын тулд эмнэлгийн терминологийн хайлтын түлхүүр үгийг нормалчлахад ашигладаг.', 'sr': 'T-Know je sistem usluga znanja baziran na izgrađenom grafiku znanja tradicionalne kineske medicine (TCM). Koristeći odobrene i anonimne kliničke ploče, medicinske kliničke vodiče, predavanje materijala, klasične medicinske knjige, akademijske publikacije itd., kao resurse podataka, sistem izvlači trostruko iz besplatnih tekstova kako bi sagradili grafik znanja TCM-a našim razvijenim metodama obrade prirodnog jezika. Na osnovu grafika znanja, duboko učenje se provede algoritam za razumevanje jednokrupnog pitanja i višekrupnog dijaloga. Osim toga, grafik znanja TCM takođe se koristi za podršku privlačenja interaktivnih znanja ljudskih kompjutera normaliziranjem ključnih riječi za pretraživanje medicinske terminologije.', 'si': 'T-Know තමයි දැනගන්න සේවා පද්ධතියක් පද්ධතියේ සංවිධානය චීනි වෛද්\u200dයය (TCM) ගැන සිද්ධ විදියට අ Using authorised and Anonymized climatic Records, pharmaceName දන්නවන ග්\u200dරාෆ් වලින්, ගොඩක් ඉගෙන ගන්න ඇල්ගෝරිතම් එකක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් තේරුම් ගන්න සහ ගොඩක් වතුරු සංවා එතකොට, TCM දන්නවන ග්\u200dරාෆ් එක්ක මිනිස්සු පරිගණකය සම්බන්ධ වෙන්න පුළුවන් දන්නවන්න සඳහා භාවිත වෙනවා වෛද', 'so': 'T-Know waa nidaamka adeegga aqoonta oo ku saleysan sawirka aqoonta ee dhakhaatiirta Shiinaha (TCM). Sida loo isticmaalayo warqadaha dhakhaatiirta ee loo ogolaaday oo aan la magacaabin, hagitaanka dhakhaatiirta dhakhaatiirta, waxbarashada, buugaagta caafimaadka, warqadaha akademiga, tusaale ahaan macluumaadka, nidaamka wuxuu ka soo saaraa marxalado lacag la’aan ah si uu u dhiso xarunta aqoonta TCM ee loo horumariyey qaababka baaritaanka afka dabiicadda ah. On the basis of the knowledge graph, a deep learning algorithm is implemented for single-round question understanding and multiple-round dialogue.  Intaas waxaa dheer oo lagu isticmaalaa maamulka aqoonta TCM in lagu kaalmeeyo helitaanka aqoonta dhexe ee dadka kambiyuutarka ah, si caadi ah ugu caadi karo hadalka raadinta oo ku qoran terminologi caafimaadka.', 'sv': 'T-Know är ett kunskapstjänstesystem baserat på den konstruerade kunskapsgrafen för traditionell kinesisk medicin (TCM). Med hjälp av auktoriserade och anonymiserade kliniska journaler, medicinska kliniska riktlinjer, undervisningsmaterial, klassiska medicinska böcker, akademiska publikationer etc., som dataresurser, extraherar systemet tredubblingar från fria texter för att bygga en TCM kunskapsgraf med våra utvecklade metoder för behandling av naturligt språk. Utifrån kunskapsgrafen implementeras en djupinlärningsalgoritm för enkel frågeförståelse och flerrundig dialog. Dessutom används TCM-kunskapsgrafen också för att stödja mänsklig-dator interaktiv kunskapssökning genom att normalisera sökord till medicinsk terminologi.', 'ur': 'T-Know is a knowledge service system based on the constructed knowledge graph of Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM). اجازت دی گئی اور غیر نام کی کلینیکی ریکوردوں کی استعمال کی جاتی ہے، داروغی کلینیکی ریکوردوں کی استعمال کی جاتی ہے، مواد سکھاتی ہے، کلاسیک پزشکی کتاب، علمی کتاب، اگلے، ڈاٹی رسسور کے طور پر، سیستم نے تین تین تین تین تین تین متخصہ سے استعمال کیا ہے تاکہ ہم نے تی علم گراف کی بنیاد پر، ایک عمیق تعلیم الگوریتم ایک راند سوال سمجھنے اور بہت سی راندوں کی گفتگو کے لئے لازم کیا جاتا ہے. اور اضافہ، TCM علم گراف بھی انسان-کمپیوٹر کے پیدا کرنے کی مدد کے لئے استعمال کیا جاتا ہے اس طرح جہاد کلیدوں کو پزشکی ٹریمولوژی کے ذریعہ مطابق کرتا ہے۔', 'ta': 'T-Know is a knowledge service system based on the constructed knowledge graph of Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM).  அனுமதிக்கப்பட்ட மற்றும் anonymousized சில பதிவுகளை பயன்படுத்துகிறது, மருத்துவ சிகிச் செயல் வழிகாட்டிகள், கற்பிக்கைகள், வகுப்பான மருத்துவப் புத்தகங்கள், கலைஞர் புத்தகங்கள், etc., தரவு மூலங்கள் ஆக அறிவு வரைப்படத்தை அடிப்படையில், ஒரு ஆழமான கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் கலைப்பொருள் தனிச்சுற்று கேள்வி புரிந்து கொள்ளும் பல கூடுதலாக, TCM அறிவு வரைபடம் மருத்துவ முனையத்திற்கு வழக்கமாக தேடும் விசை வார்த்தைகளை வழக்கமாக்குவதற்கு ஆதரிக்க பயன்படும்.', 'uz': "T-Know is a knowledge service system based on the constructed knowledge graph of Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM).  Ruxsat berilgan va anonymous klinikal sahifalardan foydalanish, tizim klinikal qoidalari, o'qituvchi materiallar, klassik medikam kitoblar, akademik publikaslari, masalan maʼlumotlar manbalari sifatida, tizim o'zimning tabiiy tili boshqaruvchilarimiz usuli uchun TCM ta'rif grafikni yaratish uchun uchta ta ta'limdan chiqaradi. Ogohlantirish grafik asosida, juda qiyin o'rganish algorithi bir necha soʻzni tushunish va bir necha harf muloqat oynasi uchun ishlatiladi. Koʻproq, TCM haqida maʼlumot grafik boshqa kompyuter interactive knowledge olish uchun foydalanadi. Qidirish tugmalar soʻzlarini tibbiy terminologiga qoʻllash uchun foydalanadi.", 'vi': 'T-Know là một hệ thống dịch vụ kiến thức dựa trên đồ thị kiến thức về Y học Trung truyền thống (TCM). Sử dụng các hồ sơ y tế được cấp phép và ẩn danh, các hướng dẫn y học, các vật liệu y tế cổ điển, các cuốn sách y khoa học, vân vân, như nguồn dữ liệu, hệ thống thu thập các văn bản miễn phí để phát triển một đồ thị kiến thức TCM bằng các phương pháp xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên phát triển. Dựa trên đồ thị kiến thức, một thuật toán học sâu được áp dụng cho việc hiểu biết một vòng câu hỏi và đối thoại nhiều vòng. Hơn nữa, đồ thị kiến thức TCM cũng được dùng để hỗ trợ việc lấy tri thức tương tác giữa người và máy tính bằng cách làm hoá từ khóa tìm kiếm vào thuật ngữ y học.', 'bg': 'Т-Ноу е система за услуги на знанието, базирана на изградената графика на знанието по Традиционна китайска медицина. Използвайки оторизирани и анонимизирани клинични записи, медицински клинични указания, учебни материали, класически медицински книги, академични публикации и др., като ресурси за данни, системата извлича тройки от свободни текстове, за да изгради графика на знанието чрез разработените ни методи за обработка на естествения език. Въз основа на графиката на знанието се прилага алгоритъм за дълбоко обучение за еднокръгово разбиране на въпросите и многокръгов диалог. Освен това графиката на знанието за ТМ се използва и за подпомагане на човешко-компютърното интерактивно извличане на знания чрез нормализиране на ключовите думи за търсене към медицинската терминология.', 'hr': 'T-Know je sustav službe znanja temeljen na izgrađenom grafiku znanja tradicionalnog kineskog medicina (TCM). Koristeći odobrene i anonimne kliničke podatke, kliničke upute za lijekove, predavanje materijala, klasične medicinske knjige, akademijske publikacije itd., kao resurse podataka, sustav izvlači trostruke iz besplatnih tekstova kako bi sagradili grafik znanja TCM-a našim razvijenim metodama obrade prirodnog jezika. Na temelju grafika znanja, duboko učenje se provede algoritam za razumijevanje jednokrupnog pitanja i višekrupnog dijaloga. Osim toga, grafik znanja TCM također se koristi za podršku uzbune interaktivnih znanja u ljudskom računalu normaliziranjem ključnih riječi pretraživanja medicinskoj terminologiji.', 'da': 'T-Know er et vidensservicesystem baseret på den konstruerede vidensgraf for traditionel kinesisk medicin (TCM). Ved hjælp af autoriserede og anonymiserede kliniske journaler, medicinkliniske retningslinjer, undervisningsmaterialer, klassiske medicinbøger, akademiske publikationer osv., som dataressourcer, udtrækker systemet tredobbelt fra frie tekster for at opbygge en TCM vidensgraf ved hjælp af vores udviklede metoder til behandling af natursprog. På baggrund af vidensgrafen er der implementeret en deep learning algoritme til single-round spørgsmål forståelse og flere-round dialog. Derudover bruges TCM vidensgrafen også til at understøtte menneske-computer interaktiv videnshentning ved at normalisere søgeord til medicinsk terminologi.', 'nl': 'T-Know is een kennisservicesysteem gebaseerd op de geconstrueerde kennisgrafiek van Traditionele Chinese Geneeskunde (TCM). Met behulp van geautoriseerde en geanonimiseerde klinische dossiers, medische klinische richtlijnen, lesmateriaal, klassieke medische boeken, academische publicaties, enz., als gegevensbronnen, haalt het systeem drievoudig uit vrije teksten om een TCM-kennisgrafiek te bouwen met behulp van onze ontwikkelde natuurlijke taalverwerkingsmethoden. Op basis van de kennisgrafiek wordt een deep learning algoritme geïmplementeerd voor enkelronde vragen begrip en meerronde dialoog. Daarnaast wordt de TCM-kennisgrafiek ook gebruikt om interactieve kennisterugwinning tussen mens en computer te ondersteunen door zoekwoorden te normaliseren naar medische terminologie.', 'id': 'T-Know adalah sistem layanan pengetahuan berdasarkan grafik pengetahuan terbuat dari Medis Tradisional Cina (TCM). Menggunakan catatan klinik yang diberi otorisasi dan anonim, petunjuk klinik obat, bahan pengajaran, buku medis klasik, publikasi akademik, dll., sebagai sumber data, sistem mengekstrak tiga kali dari teks gratis untuk membangun grafik pengetahuan TCM oleh metode pemprosesan bahasa alam kita. Berdasarkan grafik pengetahuan, algoritma belajar dalam dieksploitasi untuk pemahaman pertanyaan satu-ronde dan dialog berbilang-ronde. In addition, the TCM knowledge graph also is used to support human-computer interactive knowledge retrieval by normalizing search keywords to medical terminology.', 'de': 'T-Know ist ein Wissensdienstleistungssystem, das auf dem konstruierten Wissensgraphen der Traditionellen Chinesischen Medizin (TCM) basiert. Unter Verwendung autorisierter und anonymisierter klinischer Aufzeichnungen, medizinischer klinischer Richtlinien, Lehrmaterialien, klassischer medizinischer Bücher, akademischer Publikationen usw. als Datenressourcen extrahiert das System dreifache aus freien Texten, um einen TCM-Wissensgraphen mit Hilfe unserer entwickelten natürlichen Sprachverarbeitungsmethoden zu erstellen. Auf Basis des Knowledge Graph wird ein Deep Learning Algorithmus für das Einrunden Fragenverständnis und den Mehrrunden Dialog implementiert. Darüber hinaus wird der TCM Knowledge Graph auch verwendet, um die interaktive Wissenssuche zwischen Mensch und Computer zu unterstützen, indem Suchbegriffe auf medizinische Terminologie normalisiert werden.', 'sw': 'T-Know ni mfumo wa huduma ya ufahamu unaotengenezwa na ufahamu wa matibabu ya Kichina ya Taifa (TCM). Using authorized and anonymized clinical records, medicine clinical guidelines, teaching materials, classic medical books, academic publications, etc., as data resources, the system extracts triples from free texts to build a TCM knowledge graph by our developed natural language processing methods.  Kwa msingi wa picha ya maarifa, utaratibu wa kujifunza kwa kina umetekelezwa kwa ajili ya kuelewa swali moja kwa moja na mazungumzo mengi. Zaidi ya hayo, grafu ya maarifa ya TCM pia inatumiwa kuunga mkono upatikanaji wa maarifa yanayohusiana na kompyuta ya binadamu kwa kutumia kawaida ya maneno ya kutafuta kwa ajili ya terminalology ya kitabibu.', 'ko': 'T-Know는 구축된 한의학 지식도를 바탕으로 한 지식 서비스 시스템이다.이 시스템은 익명의 임상기록, 의학임상지침, 교재, 고전의학서적, 학술출판물 등을 데이터 원천으로 삼아 우리가 개발한 자연언어처리방법을 활용해 무료 텍스트에서 3원조를 추출해 중의학지식도를 구축한다.지식도를 토대로 단일 문제 이해와 다중 대화의 깊이 있는 학습 알고리즘을 실현했다.이 밖에 중의약지식도는 검색 키워드를 의학 용어로 규범화함으로써 인간과 기계의 상호작용 지식 검색을 지원한다.', 'fa': 'T-Know یک سیستم خدمات علمی است که بر اساس گراف علمی ساخته شده از داروی سنتی چینی (TCM) است. استفاده از ثبت\u200cهای کلینیکی اجازه داده و غیرنامیده شده، هدایت\u200cهای کلینیکی پزشکی، ماده\u200cهای آموزش، کتابهای پزشکی کلاسیک، توسط منبع دانشگاهی، و غیر از این، سیستم سه بار از متن آزاد برای ساختن یک گراف دانشگاهی TCM با روش\u200cهای پرداخت زبان طبیعی تو بر اساس گراف دانش، یک الگوریتم عمیق یادگیری برای درک یک سؤال و گفتگو متعدد گرد و متعدد گرد انجام می شود. علاوه بر این، گراف دانش TCM همچنین برای پشتیبانی از بازیابی دانش\u200cهای متفاوتی انسان و کامپیوتر با تعیین کردن کلیدهای جستجو به ترمینالوژی پزشکی استفاده می\u200cشود.', 'sq': 'T-Know është një sistem shërbimi i njohurive bazuar në grafikun e ndërtuar të njohurive të Mjekësisë Tradicionale Kineze (TCM). Duke përdorur regjistrime klinike të autorizuara dhe anonimizuara, udhëzime klinike mjekësore, materiale mësuese, libra klasike mjekësore, publikime akademike, etj., si burime të dhënash, sistemi nxjerr tre herë nga tekstet e lira për të ndërtuar një grafik njohurie TCM nga metodat tona të zhvilluara natyrore të procesimit të gjuhës. Në bazë të grafikut të njohurive, një algoritëm mësimi i thellë zbatohet për kuptimin e një raundi pyetjeje dhe dialogun e shumëraundit. Përveç kësaj, grafiku i njohurive TCM përdoret gjithashtu për të mbështetur marrjen e njohurive interaktive njerëzor-kompjuter duke normalizuar fjalët kyçe të kërkimit në terminologjinë mjekësore.', 'tr': 'T-Know - Däpli Çinçe ilat ilatynyň (TCM) grafynda guruldygy bilim sistemasy. Mümkin we anonymyz kliniki kaynaklary ullanýar, derman kliniki düzgünlerden, materiýalary öwretmek, klasik lukmançy kitaplar, akademiki publikatlar we şeýle däl., maglumat çeşmeleri bolsa, sistemam boş tekstlerden üç sany çykarýar we çykarýan tebigy dil işlemek üçin TCM bilim grafisini gurmak üçin ç Bilim grafynyň esasynda, çuly öwrenme algoritmi ýekeje gezek soragy düşünmek we çenli gezek dialogda implementedilir. TCM bilgi grafyny hem insan-kompýuter interaktiwny bilgi almak üçin ulanylýar. Arama açarlaryny lukmanyň terminologiýasyna düzenlemek üçin ullanýar.', 'hy': 'T-Know-ը գիտելիքի ծառայությունների համակարգ է, որը հիմնված է ավանդական չինական բժշկության (ԹԿՄ) գիտելիքի գծագրի վրա: Օգտագործելով թույլատրված և աննույնացված կլինիկական փաստաթղթեր, բժշկական կլինիկական ուղղություններ, ուսուցման նյութեր, դասական բժշկական գրքեր, ակադեմիական հրատարակություններ և այլն, որպես տվյալներ, համակարգը հանում է երեք անգամ ազատ տեքստներից, որպես Գիտելու գրաֆիկի հիմնականությամբ, խորը սովորելու ալգորիթմ իրականացվում է մեկ շրջանակի հարցի հասկանալու և բազմաշրջանակի երկխոսության համար: Ավելին, ԹԿՄ-ի գիտելիքների գրաֆիկը նաև օգտագործվում է մարդկային-համակարգիչների ինտերակտիվ գիտելիքների վերադարձման աջակցությամբ՝ բժշկական տերմինոլոգիայի համար գլխավոր բառերը նորմալ փնտր', 'af': "T-Know is 'n kennis diens stelsel gebaseer op die konstrukteer kennis graf van tradisionele Sjinese Mediese (TCM). Gebruik van toegelaat en anonymiseerde kliniske opneem, medikasie kliniske gidselinge, onderrig materiale, klassieke mediese boeke, akademiese publikasies, ensfh., as data hulpbronne, uitvoer die stelsel drie maal uit vry teks om 'n TCM kennisgraaf te bou deur ons ontwikkelde natuurlike taal verwerking metodes. Op die basis van die kennis grafiek word 'n diep leer algoritme implementeer vir enkel ronde vraag verstanding en veelvuldige ronde dialoog. In addition, the TCM knowledge graph is also used to support human-computer interactive knowledge retrieval by normalizing search keywords to medical terminology.", 'bn': 'টি-উই হচ্ছে ঐতিহ্যবাহী চীনা মেডিকেন (টিসিএম) নির্মিত জ্ঞানের গ্রাফের ভিত্তিতে একটি জ্ঞান সার্ভিস স। Using authorized and anonymized clinical records, medicine clinical guidelines, teaching materials, classic medical books, academic publications, etc., as data resources, the system extracts triples from free texts to build a TCM knowledge graph by our developed natural language processing methods.  জ্ঞানের গ্রাফের ভিত্তিতে একটি গভীর শিক্ষার অ্যালগরিদম ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে একাউন্ড রাউন্ডের ব্যাপারে বুঝতে এবং বহুরা এছাড়াও টিসিএম জ্ঞান গ্রাফ মানব-কম্পিউটারের ইন্টারভেক্ট জ্ঞান পুনরুদ্ধারের সমর্থন করা হয়েছে চিকিৎসার টার্মিনোলজিত', 'am': 'T-እውቀት የባሕላዊው ቻይና መድኃኒት (TCM) የተመሠረተ እውቀት ግንኙነት ሲስተም ነው፡፡ ተፈቅዶ እና ያልታወቀ የፕሮግራም ሪኮች፣ የሕኪና ቅድሚያ መሪና፣ ትምህርት materials፣ ክላሲካዊ መድኃኒት መጽሐፎች፣ አካዳሚክ ፕሬጀክቶች፣ እንደዳታ ሀብት፣ ስርዓት ሀብት፣ የስርቨርስቲም የTCM እውቀት ቀረፍ በመሠረት በተደረገ ቋንቋ ፕሮጀክቶማችንን ለመሥራት ሲሞ On the basis of the knowledge graph, a deep learning algorithm is implemented for single-round question understanding and multiple-round dialogue.  በተጨማሪም የTCM እውቀት ግራፍ ደግሞ ለሰው-ኮምፒውተር interactive እውቀት ማድረግ ይጠቅማል፤ የፈልግ ቃላትን ለጥምቀት ተርሚኖጂ በማስተካከል ይጠቅማል።', 'bs': 'T-Know je sistem službe znanja baziran na izgrađenom grafiku znanja tradicionalnog kineskog medicina (TCM). Koristeći odobrene i anonimne kliničke ploče, kliničke vodiče medicine, predavanje materijala, klasične medicinske knjige, akademijske publikacije itd., kao resurse podataka, sistem izvlači trostruke iz besplatnih tekstova kako bi sagradili grafik znanja TCM-a našim razvijenim metodama obrade prirodnog jezika. Na osnovu grafika znanja, duboko učenje se provede algoritam za razumijevanje jednokrupnog pitanja i višekrupnog dijaloga. Osim toga, grafik znanja TCM također se koristi za podršku uzbune interaktivnih znanja u ljudskom kompjuteru normaliziranjem ključnih riječi pretraživanja medicinske terminologije.', 'az': 'T-Know Tradicionali √áin Medicinin (TCM) m…ôhsullarńĪnńĪn inŇüa edilmiŇü elm grafńĪna dayanan elm hizmeti sistemidir. M√ľ…ôyy…ôn v…ô anoniml…ôndirilmiŇü kliniki kayńĪtlar, tńĪbbńĪ kliniki r…ôhb…ôrl…ôr, materyall…ôri √∂yr…ôtm…ôk, klasik tńĪbbi kitablar, akademik yayńĪnlamalar v…ô b…ôs. m…ôlumat kaynaqlarńĪ kimi, sistem t…ôhsil edilmiŇü t…ôbi…ôtli dil iŇül…ôm…ô metodlarńĪmńĪzla TCM elm grafńĪnńĪ inŇüa etm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn √ľ√ß d…ôf…ô boŇü m…ôlumatdan √ßńĪxarńĪr. Bilm…ô grafńĪnńĪn …ôslind…ô, bir t…ôr…ôfli sual anlaŇüńĪlmasńĪ v…ô √ßoxlu √ßevreli dialoglar √ľ√ß√ľn derin √∂yr…ônm…ô algoritmi t…ôyin edilir. ∆Źvv…ôlc…ô, TCM bilgi grafńĪ da insan-kompjuter interaktif bilgi almasńĪnńĪ d…ôst…ôkl…ôm…ôk √ľ√ß√ľn istifad…ô edilir, arama anahtar s√∂zl…ôrini medicin terminoloji √ľ√ß√ľn normaliz…ô ed…ôr…ôk.', 'cs': 'T-Know je systém znalostních služeb založený na konstruovaném znalostním grafu tradiční čínské medicíny (TCM). S využitím autorizovaných a anonymizovaných klinických záznamů, medicínských klinických pokynů, výukových materiálů, klasických lékařských knih, akademických publikací apod. jako datových zdrojů, systém extrahuje trojnásobek z volných textů a vytvoří graf znalostí TCM pomocí našich vyvinutých metod zpracování přirozeného jazyka. Na základě znalostního grafu je implementován algoritmus hlubokého učení pro porozumění jednotlivých otázek a vícekolový dialog. Kromě toho se graf znalostí TCM používá také k podpoře interaktivního vyhledávání znalostí člověk-počítač normalizací vyhledávacích klíčových slov na lékařskou terminologii.', 'ca': "T-Know és un sistema de serveis de coneixement basat en la gràfica de coneixement construïda de la medicina xinesa tradicional (TCM). Utilitzant registres clínics autorizats i anònims, directrius clínics de medicina, materials d'ensenyament, llibres mèdics clàssics, publicacions acadèmiques, etc., com a recursos de dades, el sistema extrau triples de textos lliures per construir un gràfic de coneixement TCM segons els nostres mètodes naturals de processament de llenguatges. Sobre la base del gràfic del coneixement, es implementa un algoritme d'aprenentatge profund per entendre una sola pregunta i diàleg múltiple. A més, el gràfic del coneixement TCM també s'utilitza per sostenir la recuperació interactiva del coneixement humà-ordinador normalitzant les paraules clau de la cerca a la terminologia mèdica.", 'fi': 'T-Know on perinteisen kiinalaisen lääketieteen (TCM) tietokaavioon perustuva tietopalvelujärjestelmä. Käyttämällä valtuutettuja ja anonymisoituja kliinisiä tietoja, lääketieteen kliinisiä ohjeita, opetusmateriaaleja, klassisia lääketieteellisiä kirjoja, akateemisia julkaisuja jne., järjestelmä poimii kolminkertaiset vapaista teksteistä luodakseen TCM-tietokaavion kehitettyjen luonnollisten kielten käsittelymenetelmien avulla. Tietokaavion pohjalta toteutetaan syväoppimisen algoritmi yhden kierroksen kysymysten ymmärtämiseen ja monimutkaiseen dialogiin. Lisäksi TCM-tietograafilla tuetaan ihmisen ja tietokoneen vuorovaikutteista tiedonhakua normalisoimalla hakusanat lääketieteen terminologiaan.', 'et': 'T-Know on teadmisteenuse süsteem, mis põhineb traditsioonilise hiina meditsiini (TCM) ehitatud teadmiste graafikul. Kasutades volitatud ja anonüümseks muudetud kliinilisi andmeid, meditsiini kliinilisi juhiseid, õppematerjale, klassikalisi meditsiinilisi raamatuid, akadeemilisi väljaandeid jne andmeressurssidena, ekstraheerib süsteem vabadest tekstidest kolmekordselt, et luua TCM teadmiste graafik meie väljatöötatud looduskeele töötlemise meetodite abil. Teadmistegraafiku alusel rakendatakse sügavõppe algoritm ühe ringi küsimuste mõistmiseks ja mitme ringi dialoogiks. Lisaks kasutatakse TCM teadmiste graafikut ka inimese-arvuti interaktiivse teadmiste hankimise toetamiseks, normaliseerides otsingusõnad meditsiiniterminoloogiasse.', 'jv': 'T-know iku sistem sing paling nggawe ngerti dadi supoyo nggawe barang ngerti Tradisunikan Chinese (TTM). Ngawe nguwe Perintah pergunakan lan Ngawe Perintah Pangan sing berarti, nggawe barang dhéwé, nggawe barang nggambar kuwi padha, buku dhéwé, pipitik pancen, lan uga, gambar nggambar data, sistem iso nggawe pas kuwi wis mbut gawe nguasai perusahaan seneng pisan sing perusahaan kanggo nggawe nggawe perusahaan nggambar kebebasan Nanging basa ning diagram matang, Algorithm kuwi nggawe sistem sing dibenakake kanggo langgar sapa-rundan nganggep sistem sing gawe Nambah, akeh graf matan dumaten, digawe dumaten kamu komputer sing ngendalikno karo perbudhakan kanggo ngerasakno dumateng kapan pangan keywords kanggo terminal sawian.', 'he': 'T-Know היא מערכת שירות ידע מבוססת על גרף ידע בנוי של רפואה סינית מסורתית (TCM). בשימוש רשומות קליניות אושרות ואנונימיות, כיוונים רפואיים קליניים, חומרים לימודים, ספרים רפואיים קלאסיים, פרסומות אקדמיות, וכו"כ, כמשאבי נתונים, המערכת מוציאה שלוש מטקסטים חינם לבנות גרף ידע TCM על ידי שיטות עיבוד שפה טבעית התפתחות על בסיס גרף הידע, אלגוריתם למידה עמוקה מופעל להבנה של שאלות אחת מסיבה ודיולוג מסיבות רבות. בנוסף, גרף הידע של TCM משמש גם כדי לתמוך בחזרת הידע אינטראקטיבי אנושי-מחשב על ידי נורמליזציה של מילים מפתחות חיפוש לטרמינולוגיה רפואית.', 'sk': 'T-Know je sistem storitev znanja, ki temelji na grajenem znanju tradicionalne kitajske medicine (TCM). S pomočjo pooblaščenih in anonimiziranih kliničnih evidenc, medicinskih kliničnih smernic, učnega gradiva, klasičnih medicinskih knjig, akademskih publikacij itd. kot podatkovnih virov sistem izvleče trojnike iz prostih besedil za gradnjo grafikona znanja TCM z našimi razvitimi metodami obdelave naravnega jezika. Na podlagi grafikona znanja se izvaja algoritem globokega učenja za enokrožno razumevanje vprašanj in večkrožni dialog. Poleg tega se graf znanja TCM uporablja tudi za podporo interaktivnemu pridobivanju znanja med človekom in računalnikom z normalizacijo iskalnih ključnih besed v medicinsko terminologijo.', 'ha': "T-Go is a system of service that is known based on the an gina graph of Tragic China Legend (TCM). Yi amfani da littafin da aka yi yarda da kuma an ambaci, shiryarwa na madaidaici, da shiryarwa na hanyoyi na madaidaici, da masu amfani da abubuwa, littattafai na classic, littattafai na akadi, da fassarar da zane-zane, da fassarar mutane, na'urar da fassarar data, na sami misalin littafin da ba'a ba da amfani ba, dõmin ya gina a karatun na kunnufi na TCM na da A kan kan karatun na ilmi, an cika algoriti mai ƙidãya wa fahimtar tambaya guda-runa da zauren akwatin bayani masu yawa. Da wannan, aka yi amfani da graphi na ilmi na TCM don ya ƙarfafa motsi na masu haɗi da ilmi na mutane a cikin kwamfyuta don a yi amfani da su a daidaita kalmõmi na search zuwa taƙaitori.", 'bo': 'T-Know is a knowledge service system based on the constructed knowledge graph of Traditional Chinese Medicine (TCM). Using authorized and anonymized clinical records, medicine clinical guidelines, teaching materials, classic medical books, academic publications, etc., as data resources, the system extracts triples from free texts to build a TCM knowledge graph by our developed natural language processing methods. གཞི་རྟེན་ནས་ཤེས་པའི་གྲལ་རིམ་གྱི་སྒྲིག་སྟངས་གཙོ་བོ་ཞིག་ནི་རྣམ་པ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་གྲལ་སྒྲིག TCM་ལ་ཤེས་པའི་ཚད་རིས་འདི་ཡང་སྤྱད་ནས་འདིར་སྤྱད་ནས་མི་དང་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ནང'}
{'en': 'HiDE : a Tool for Unrestricted Literature Based Discovery', 'ar': 'HiDE: أداة لاكتشاف الأدب غير المقيد', 'es': 'HiDe: una herramienta para el descubrimiento sin restricciones basado en la literatura', 'fr': 'HIde\xa0: un outil de découverte basée sur la littérature sans restriction', 'pt': 'HiDE: uma ferramenta para descoberta irrestrita baseada em literatura', 'ja': 'HiDE ：制限のない文献ベースの発見のためのツール', 'zh': 'HiDE曰:文献之无限也', 'ru': 'HiDE: Инструмент для неограниченного открытия на основе литературы', 'hi': 'HiDE: अप्रतिबंधित साहित्य आधारित डिस्कवरी के लिए एक उपकरण', 'ga': 'HIDE: Uirlis le haghaidh Fionnachtana Neamhshrianta Bunaithe ar Litríocht', 'el': 'Ένα εργαλείο για την απεριόριστη ανακάλυψη βασισμένη στη λογοτεχνία', 'ka': 'HiDE: ბოლო განსაზღვრებული ლიტურატურის მოწყობილობა', 'it': 'HidE: uno strumento per la scoperta basata sulla letteratura senza restrizioni', 'kk': 'HiDE: Шектелмеген әдебиеттің негізделген іздеу құралыName', 'lt': 'HiDE: neribotos literatūros atskleidimo priemonė', 'mk': 'HiDE: алатка за неограничено откритие базирано на литература', 'ms': 'HiDE: Alat untuk Penemuan Berasas Literatur Tanpa Hadiran', 'ml': 'ഹിഡിഇ: പരിധിയില്ലാത്ത സാഹിത്രത്തിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഡിസ്ക്രീവിനുള്ള ഉപകരണം', 'mt': 'HiDE: Għodda għall-Iskopri Bażat fuq il-Litteratura Mhux Restrett', 'hu': 'HiDE: egy eszköz a korlátlan irodalmi alapú felfedezéshez', 'no': 'HiDE: eit verktøy for ugjennomsiktig literatur basert oppdaging', 'mn': 'HiDE: Хязгааргүй зохиолын үндсэн нээлт', 'pl': 'HiDE: narzędzie do nieograniczonego odkrywania opartego na literaturze', 'sr': 'HiDE: alat za neograničenu književnost na osnovu otkrivanja', 'ro': 'HidE: un instrument pentru descoperirea bazată pe literatură nelimitată', 'si': 'හිඩි: අනතිරික්ෂිත සාක්ෂිත්\u200dරය සඳහා උපකරණයක්', 'so': 'HiDE: Tool for Discovery Literature Based', 'ta': 'குறிப்பு: வரம்பில்லாத மாதிரி அடிப்படையான கண்டுபிடிப்பிற்கான கருவி', 'sv': 'HiDE: ett verktyg för obegränsat litteraturbaserad upptäckt', 'ur': 'HiDE: غیرمحدودہ صحیح بنیاد دیسکوری کے لئے ایک ابزار', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hide: một công cụ cho án văn học không ràng buộc', 'hr': 'HiDE: alat za neograničenu književnost osnovano otkrivanje', 'bg': 'Скриване: инструмент за неограничено литературно откритие', 'nl': 'HiDE: een hulpmiddel voor onbeperkte literatuurgebaseerde ontdekking', 'da': 'HidE: et værktøj til ubegrænset litteraturbaseret opdagelse', 'de': 'HiDE: ein Werkzeug zur uneingeschränkten literaturbasierten Entdeckung', 'fa': 'HiDE: یک ابزار برای پیدا کردن ادبیات غیرمحدود', 'id': 'HiDE: Alat untuk Penemuan Berdasarkan Literatur Tak Terbatas', 'ko': '숨김: 무제한 문헌에 기반한 발견 도구', 'sw': 'paper size', 'tr': 'HiDE: Mümkin Edebiýatynyň esasy üçin bir araç', 'af': 'HiDE: √¢¬Ä¬ôn Nutsprogramme vir onbeperkte Literature Based Discovery', 'am': 'መሣሪያዎች', 'sq': 'HiDE: një mjet për zbulimin e bazuar në letër të pakufizuar', 'hy': 'ՀիԴԵ: Անսահմանափակ գրականության հիմնված բացահայտության գործիք', 'az': 'HiDE: Qısırılmamış Edebiyat Aracı', 'bs': 'HiDE: alat za neograničenu književnost na osnovu otkrivanja', 'bn': 'HiDE: অবৈধ সাহিত্য ভিত্তিক ডিসাক্রির জন্য একটি টুল', 'ca': 'HiDE: Una eina per descobrir literatura sense restriccions', 'cs': 'HiDE: nástroj pro neomezené objevování založené na literatuře', 'fi': 'HidE: työkalu rajattomaan kirjallisuuteen perustuvaan etsintään', 'et': 'HidE: piiramatu kirjanduse avastamise tööriist', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'HiDE: כלי גילוי בספרות ללא מוגבלות', 'jv': 'HiDES: alat kanggo Kebebasan Digetari Gak Beogran', 'sk': 'HiDE: orodje za neomejeno odkrivanje književnosti', 'bo': 'HiDE: a Tool for Unrestricted Literature Based Discovery'}
{'en': 'As the quantity of publications increases daily, researchers are forced to narrow their attention to their own specialism and are therefore less likely to make new connections with other areas. Literature based discovery (LBD) supports the identification of such connections. A number of LBD tools are available, however, they often suffer from limitations such as constraining possible searches or not producing results in real-time. We introduce HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), an online knowledge browsing tool which allows fast access to hidden knowledge generated from all abstracts in Medline. HiDE is fast enough to allow users to explore the full range of hidden connections generated by an LBD system. The tool employs a novel combination of two approaches to LBD : a graph-based approach which allows hidden knowledge to be generated on a large scale and an inference algorithm to identify the most promising (most likely to be non trivial) information. Available at https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ar': 'مع زيادة كمية المنشورات يوميًا ، يضطر الباحثون إلى تضييق انتباههم إلى تخصصهم وبالتالي يقل احتمال إقامة روابط جديدة مع المجالات الأخرى. يدعم الاكتشاف المستند إلى الأدب (LBD) تحديد مثل هذه الاتصالات. يتوفر عدد من أدوات LBD ، ومع ذلك ، فإنها غالبًا ما تعاني من قيود مثل تقييد عمليات البحث المحتملة أو عدم إنتاج نتائج في الوقت الفعلي. نقدم HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer) ، وهي أداة تصفح معرفية عبر الإنترنت تتيح الوصول السريع إلى المعرفة المخفية الناتجة عن جميع الملخصات في Medline. يعد HiDE سريعًا بما يكفي للسماح للمستخدمين باستكشاف النطاق الكامل للاتصالات المخفية التي تم إنشاؤها بواسطة نظام LBD. تستخدم الأداة مزيجًا جديدًا من نهجين لـ LBD: نهج قائم على الرسم البياني يسمح بإنشاء المعرفة المخفية على نطاق واسع وخوارزمية الاستدلال لتحديد المعلومات الواعدة (على الأرجح غير تافهة). متاح على https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'fr': "Comme le nombre de publications augmente chaque jour, les chercheurs sont contraints de se concentrer sur leur propre spécialité et sont donc moins susceptibles d'établir de nouveaux liens avec d'autres domaines. La découverte basée sur la littérature (LBD) permet d'identifier de telles connexions. Un certain nombre d'outils DBL sont disponibles, mais ils souffrent souvent de limitations telles que la restriction des recherches possibles ou l'absence de résultats en temps réel. Nous présentons HIde (Hidden Discovery Explorer), un outil de navigation des connaissances en ligne qui permet d'accéder rapidement aux connaissances cachées générées à partir de tous les résumés de Medline. HIde est suffisamment rapide pour permettre aux utilisateurs d'explorer la gamme complète des connexions cachées générées par un système LBD. L'outil utilise une nouvelle combinaison de deux approches de la DBL\xa0: une approche basée sur des graphiques qui permet de générer des connaissances cachées à grande échelle et un algorithme d'inférence pour identifier les informations les plus prometteuses (les plus susceptibles d'être non triviales). Disponible à l'adresse https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc", 'es': 'A medida que la cantidad de publicaciones aumenta a diario, los investigadores se ven obligados a limitar su atención a su propia especialidad y, por lo tanto, es menos probable que establezcan nuevas conexiones con otras áreas. El descubrimiento basado en la literatura (LBD) admite la identificación de dichas conexiones. Hay varias herramientas LBD disponibles, sin embargo, a menudo tienen limitaciones, como restringir posibles búsquedas o no producir resultados en tiempo real. Presentamos HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), una herramienta de búsqueda de conocimiento en línea que permite un acceso rápido al conocimiento oculto generado a partir de todos los resúmenes de Medline. HIde es lo suficientemente rápido como para permitir a los usuarios explorar toda la gama de conexiones ocultas generadas por un sistema LBD. La herramienta emplea una combinación novedosa de dos enfoques para LBD: un enfoque basado en gráficos que permite generar conocimiento oculto a gran escala y un algoritmo de inferencia para identificar la información más prometedora (que probablemente no sea trivial). Disponible en https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'pt': 'À medida que a quantidade de publicações aumenta diariamente, os pesquisadores são forçados a concentrar sua atenção em sua própria especialidade e, portanto, são menos propensos a fazer novas conexões com outras áreas. A descoberta baseada em literatura (LBD) suporta a identificação de tais conexões. Várias ferramentas LBD estão disponíveis, no entanto, muitas vezes sofrem de limitações, como restringir possíveis pesquisas ou não produzir resultados em tempo real. Apresentamos o HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), uma ferramenta de navegação de conhecimento online que permite acesso rápido ao conhecimento oculto gerado a partir de todos os resumos no Medline. O HiDE é rápido o suficiente para permitir que os usuários explorem toda a gama de conexões ocultas geradas por um sistema LBD. A ferramenta emprega uma nova combinação de duas abordagens para o LBD: uma abordagem baseada em grafos que permite que o conhecimento oculto seja gerado em larga escala e um algoritmo de inferência para identificar as informações mais promissoras (provavelmente não triviais). Disponível em https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ja': '出版物の量が日々増加するにつれて、研究者は自分自身の専門分野に注目することを強いられ、したがって他の分野との新しいつながりを作る可能性は低くなります。 文献に基づく発見（ ＬＢＤ ）は、そのような接続の同定を支援する。 いくつかのLBDツールが利用可能ですが、可能な検索を制約したり、リアルタイムで結果を生成しないなどの制限に苦しむことがよくあります。 私たちは、Medlineのすべての抄録から生成された隠された知識に素早くアクセスできるオンラインナレッジブラウジングツール、HiDE （ Hidden Discovery Explorer ）を紹介します。 HiDEは、ユーザーがLBDシステムによって生成されたすべての隠された接続を探索するのに十分な速度です。 このツールは、LBDへの2つのアプローチを斬新に組み合わせたものを採用しています。グラフベースのアプローチは、隠された知識を大規模に生成することができ、推論アルゴリズムは、最も有望な（ほんの些細なことである可能性が最も高い）情報を特定します。https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdiscから入手できます。', 'hi': 'जैसा कि प्रकाशनों की मात्रा दैनिक रूप से बढ़ती है, शोधकर्ताओं को अपनी विशेषज्ञता पर अपना ध्यान सीमित करने के लिए मजबूर किया जाता है और इसलिए अन्य क्षेत्रों के साथ नए कनेक्शन बनाने की संभावना कम होती है। साहित्य आधारित खोज (एलबीडी) ऐसे कनेक्शनों की पहचान का समर्थन करता है। कई एलबीडी उपकरण उपलब्ध हैं, हालांकि, वे अक्सर संभावित खोजों को बाधित करने या वास्तविक समय में परिणाम उत्पन्न नहीं करने जैसी सीमाओं से पीड़ित होते हैं। हम HiDE (हिडन डिस्कवरी एक्सप्लोरर) पेश करते हैं, एक ऑनलाइन ज्ञान ब्राउज़िंग टूल जो मेडलाइन में सभी सार तत्वों से उत्पन्न छिपे हुए ज्ञान तक तेजी से पहुंच की अनुमति देता है। HiDE उपयोगकर्ताओं को एक LBD सिस्टम द्वारा उत्पन्न छिपे हुए कनेक्शन की पूरी श्रृंखला का पता लगाने की अनुमति देने के लिए पर्याप्त तेज़ है। उपकरण एलबीडी के लिए दो दृष्टिकोणों के एक उपन्यास संयोजन को नियोजित करता है: एक ग्राफ-आधारित दृष्टिकोण जो छिपे हुए ज्ञान को बड़े पैमाने पर उत्पन्न करने की अनुमति देता है और सबसे अधिक आशाजनक (गैर तुच्छ होने की संभावना है) जानकारी की पहचान करने के लिए एक अनुमान एल्गोरिथ्म। https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc पर उपलब्ध', 'ru': 'По мере того как количество публикаций увеличивается ежедневно, исследователи вынуждены сужать свое внимание к своей собственной специализации и поэтому с меньшей вероятностью устанавливают новые связи с другими областями. Открытие на основе литературы (LBD) поддерживает идентификацию таких связей. Имеется ряд инструментов LBD, однако они часто страдают от таких ограничений, как ограничение возможных поисков или отсутствие результатов в режиме реального времени. Мы представляем HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), онлайн-инструмент для просмотра знаний, который обеспечивает быстрый доступ к скрытым знаниям, генерируемым из всех рефератов в Medline. HiDE достаточно быстрый, чтобы пользователи могли исследовать весь спектр скрытых соединений, созданных системой LBD. Инструмент использует новую комбинацию двух подходов к LBD: графоподобный подход, который позволяет генерировать скрытые знания в большом масштабе, и алгоритм вывода для выявления наиболее перспективной (скорее всего, не тривиальной) информации. Доступно по адресу https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'zh': '随出版物增益,讲求注意,故不太可能与他域更始。 盖文献之见(LBD)赞识之也。 诸LBD器用,然其常限者,或搜索或不可得实时也。 吾入HiDE(藏见资源管理器),此在线之流览器用,可速访Medline之所有摘要生之隐也。 HiDE足以速,许用户探索LBD统生成者悉隐接。 二LBD新合:基于图形,许大生隐匿,及推理算法,以识最愿(最有是非凡)。 可在 https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ga': 'De réir mar a thagann méadú laethúil ar líon na bhfoilseachán, cuirtear iallach ar thaighdeoirí a n-aird a chaolú ar a speisialtóireacht féin agus mar sin is lú an seans go ndéanfaidh siad naisc nua le réimsí eile. Tacaíonn fionnachtain bunaithe ar litríocht (LBD) le naisc den sórt sin a aithint. Tá roinnt uirlisí LBD ar fáil, áfach, is minic a bhíonn srianta orthu mar shrianadh ar chuardaigh féideartha nó gan torthaí a tháirgeadh i bhfíor-am. Tugaimid isteach HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), uirlis brabhsála eolais ar líne a cheadaíonn rochtain tapa ar eolas folaithe a ghintear ó gach coimriú in Medline. Tá HiDE tapa go leor chun ligean d’úsáideoirí an raon iomlán de naisc fholaithe a ghineann córas LBD a iniúchadh. Úsáideann an uirlis meascán nua de dhá chur chuige maidir le LBD: cur chuige graf-bhunaithe a cheadaíonn eolas folaithe a ghiniúint ar scála mór agus algartam tátail chun an fhaisnéis is bisiúla (is dócha nach bhfuil fánach) a shainaithint. Ar fáil ag https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'hu': 'Ahogy a publikációk mennyisége naponta növekszik, a kutatók kénytelenek leszűkíteni a figyelmüket saját szakterületükre, ezért kevésbé valószínű, hogy új kapcsolatokat alakítanak ki más területekkel. Az irodalmi alapú felfedezés (LBD) támogatja az ilyen kapcsolatok azonosítását. Számos LBD eszköz áll rendelkezésre, azonban gyakran olyan korlátozásoktól szenvednek, mint a lehetséges keresések korlátozása vagy a valós idejű eredmények elkerülése. Bemutatjuk a HidE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), egy online tudás böngésző eszközt, amely lehetővé teszi a Medline összes absztraktjából generált rejtett tudáshoz való gyors hozzáférést. A HidE elég gyors ahhoz, hogy a felhasználók felfedezzék az LBD rendszer által generált rejtett kapcsolatok teljes skáláját. Az eszköz két megközelítés új kombinációját alkalmazza az LBD-vel kapcsolatban: egy grafikon alapú megközelítés, amely lehetővé teszi a rejtett tudás nagy léptékű generálását, és egy következtetési algoritmus, amely azonosítja a legígéretesebb (valószínűleg nem triviális) információkat. Elérhető a következő címen: https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'el': 'Καθώς η ποσότητα των εκδόσεων αυξάνεται καθημερινά, οι ερευνητές αναγκάζονται να περιορίσουν την προσοχή τους στη δική τους εξειδίκευση και συνεπώς είναι λιγότερο πιθανό να δημιουργήσουν νέες συνδέσεις με άλλους τομείς. Η βιβλιογραφική ανακάλυψη υποστηρίζει τον προσδιορισμό τέτοιων συνδέσεων. Ορισμένα εργαλεία είναι διαθέσιμα, ωστόσο, συχνά υποφέρουν από περιορισμούς όπως ο περιορισμός των πιθανών αναζητήσεων ή η μη παραγωγή αποτελεσμάτων σε πραγματικό χρόνο. Παρουσιάζουμε ένα διαδικτυακό εργαλείο αναζήτησης γνώσεων που επιτρέπει γρήγορη πρόσβαση σε κρυμμένες γνώσεις που παράγονται από όλες τις αφηγήσεις στο Medline. Η HiDE είναι αρκετά γρήγορη ώστε να επιτρέπει στους χρήστες να εξερευνήσουν το πλήρες φάσμα των κρυφών συνδέσεων που παράγονται από ένα σύστημα LBD. Το εργαλείο χρησιμοποιεί έναν νέο συνδυασμό δύο προσεγγίσεων για την LBD: μια προσέγγιση βασισμένη σε γραφήματα που επιτρέπει την παραγωγή κρυφής γνώσης σε μεγάλη κλίμακα και έναν αλγόριθμο συμπερασμάτων για τον προσδιορισμό των πιο ελπιδοφόρων (πιθανότατα να μην είναι ασήμαντες) πληροφοριών. Διατίθεται στο https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ka': 'როგორც პუბულიკაციების რაოდენობა ყოველთვის გაზრდება, მსწავლობელი უნდა თავისთვის სპეციალიზმისთვის გაზრუნოთ და ამიტომ უფრო მეტი შესაძლებელია ახალი დაკავშ ლიტურატურის განვიხოვრება (LBD) იყენებს ასეთი კავშირებების განვიხოვრებას. მაგრამ ბევრი LBD ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა ხელსაწყოთა, როგორც შესაძლებელი ძიებების შესაძლებელობის შესაძლებელობა, ან რეალური დროში შესაძლებელობის შესაძლებელობა არ მო ჩვენ შევაჩვენეთ HiDE (დახურებული Discovery Explorer), ინტერნეტის მეცნიერების ბრაუზაციის ხელსაწყოფილი, რომელიც ძალიან ძალიან დახმარება საკუთარი მეცნიერების შექმნა ყველა აბს HiDE ძალიან ძალიან ბრძნელია, რომ მომხმარებელი განსხვავებენ LBD სისტემიდან შექმნილი დახმარებული კავშირებების უფრო პანზიმი. Name ხელსაწყო https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'it': "Con l'aumento quotidiano della quantità di pubblicazioni, i ricercatori sono costretti a restringere l'attenzione alla propria specializzazione e sono quindi meno propensi a stabilire nuovi collegamenti con altri settori. La scoperta basata sulla letteratura (LBD) supporta l'identificazione di tali connessioni. Diversi strumenti LBD sono disponibili, tuttavia, spesso soffrono di limitazioni come limitare possibili ricerche o non produrre risultati in tempo reale. Vi presentiamo HidE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), uno strumento di navigazione della conoscenza online che consente un rapido accesso alle conoscenze nascoste generate da tutti gli abstract di Medline. HiDE è abbastanza veloce da consentire agli utenti di esplorare l'intera gamma di connessioni nascoste generate da un sistema LBD. Lo strumento utilizza una nuova combinazione di due approcci alla LBD: un approccio basato su grafici che consente di generare conoscenze nascoste su larga scala e un algoritmo di inferenza per identificare le informazioni più promettenti (molto probabilmente non banali). Disponibile a https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc", 'lt': 'Kadangi leidinių skaičius kasdien didėja, mokslininkai priversti savo dėmesį sutrumpinti savo specializacijai ir todėl mažiau tikėtina, kad jie prisijungs prie kitų sričių. Literatūros pagrindu pagrįstas atradimas (LBD) padeda nustatyti tokius ryšius. Vis dėlto esama keleto LBD priemonių, kurioms dažnai būdingi apribojimai, pavyzdžiui, galimų paieškų apribojimai arba rezultatų negauta realiuoju laiku. Mes pristatome HiDE (Paslėpto aptikimo žvalgytoją), internetinę žinių naršymo įrangą, kuri leidžia greitai susipažinti su paslėptomis žiniomis, gautomis iš visų Medline abstraktų. HiDE yra pakankamai greita, kad naudotojai galėtų ištirti visą slepiamų jungčių, kurias sukuria LBD sistema, spektrą. Įrengiant šią priemonę naudojamas naujas dviejų LBD metodų derinys: grafiniu būdu grindžiamas metodas, leidžiantis gauti paslėptas žinias dideliu mastu, ir išvados algoritmas, kuriuo siekiama nustatyti labiausiai žadantią (labiausiai tikėtina, kad ji nėra triviali) informaciją. Galima rasti https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'kk': 'Публикациялардың саны күнделік күнделігінде, зерттеушілері өзінің өзінің специализмдігіне қарай тұрып, басқа аумақтарымен жаңа байланыстар жасау мүмкін емес. Әдебиттік негіздеген табу (LBD) бұл қосылымдарды анықтау үшін қолданады. Бірақ, LBD құрылғыларының бірнеше нәтижесі бар, олар мүмкін іздеуді шектеу немесе шын уақытта нәтижелерді жасау үшін шектеулерден тұрады. Біз HiDE (жасырын Discovery Explorer), онлайн мәліметтерді шолу құралы, Medline- дегі барлық абстрактерінен жасырылған мәліметтерге жылдам қатынауға мүмкіндік береді. HiDE LBD жүйесі құрылған жасырын қосылымдардың толық аумағын зерттеу үшін пайдаланушыларға жеткілікті жетпейді. Бұл құрал LBD- ге екі жағдай жасалған романды қолдану: график негізінде жасырылған білімдерді үлкен масштабында жасауға мүмкіндік беретін және ең үлкен мәліметті анықтауға мүмкіндік беретін алгоритм. Бар https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'mk': 'Со оглед на тоа што количината на публикации секојдневно се зголемува, истражувачите се принудени да го намалат своето внимание на својот специјализам и затоа се помалку веројатни да направат нови врски со другите области. Откривањето базирано на литература (LBD) го поддржува идентификацијата на ваквите врски. A number of LBD tools are available, however, they often suffer from limitations such as constraining possible searches or not producing results in real-time.  Ние го претставуваме HiDE (Скриен откритие експлоатор), онлајн алатка за прелистување на знаење која овозможува брз пристап до скриено знаење генерирано од сите апстракти во Medline. HiDE е доволно брз за да им овозможи на корисниците да го истражуваат целиот домет на скриени врски генерирани од LBD систем. Инструментот употребува нова комбинација на два пристапи до LBD: пристап базиран на график кој овозможува сокриено знаење да се генерира на голема маса и алгоритм на инференција за идентификување на најветувачките (најверојатно не тривијални) информации. Доступно на https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ms': 'Sebagaimana jumlah penerbitan meningkat sehari-hari, peneliti terpaksa mempersempit perhatian mereka kepada spesialis mereka sendiri dan oleh itu lebih kurang kemungkinan untuk membuat hubungan baru dengan kawasan lain. Penemuan berasaskan literatur (LBD) menyokong pengenalan sambungan tersebut. Beberapa alat LBD tersedia, bagaimanapun, mereka sering menderita terhad seperti mengharamkan carian yang mungkin atau tidak menghasilkan keputusan dalam masa sebenar. Kami perkenalkan HiDE (Penjelajah Penjelasan Tersembunyi), alat pelayaran pengetahuan online yang membolehkan akses cepat ke pengetahuan tersembunyi yang dijana dari semua abstrakt dalam Medline. HiDE is fast enough to allow users to explore the full range of hidden connections generated by an LBD system.  Alat ini menggunakan kombinasi baru dua pendekatan ke LBD: pendekatan berdasarkan graf yang membolehkan pengetahuan tersembunyi dijana pada skala besar dan algoritma kesimpulan untuk mengenalpasti maklumat yang paling berjanji (kemungkinan tidak kecil). Tersedia pada https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'mt': 'Hekk kif il-kwantità ta’ pubblikazzjonijiet tiżdied kuljum, ir-riċerkaturi huma mġiegħla jnaqqsu l-attenzjoni tagħhom għall-ispeċjalizzazzjoni tagħhom stess u għalhekk huma inqas probabbli li jagħmlu konnessjonijiet ġodda ma’ oqsma oħra. L-iskoperta bbażata fuq il-letteratura (LBD) tappoġġja l-identifikazzjoni ta’ tali konnessjonijiet. Għadd ta’ għodod LBD huma disponibbli, madankollu, ta’ spiss isofru minn limitazzjonijiet bħal restrizzjoni ta’ tiftix possibbli jew li ma jipproduċux riżultati f’ħin reali. Aħna nintroduċu HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), għodda ta’ tbaħħir tal-għarfien onlajn li tippermetti aċċess rapidu għal għarfien moħbi ġġenerat mill-astratti kollha f’Medline. HiDE hija mgħaġġla biżżejjed biex tippermetti lill-utenti jesploraw il-firxa sħiħa ta’ konnessjonijiet moħbija ġġenerati minn sistema LBD. L-għodda tuża kombinazzjoni ġdida ta’ żewġ approċċi għall-LBD: approċċ ibbażat fuq grafika li jippermetti li l-għarfien moħbi jiġi ġġenerat fuq skala kbira u algoritmu ta’ inferenza biex tiġi identifikata l-informazzjoni l-aktar promettenti (li x’aktarx ma tkunx trivjali). Disponibbli fuq https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ml': 'ദിവസവും പ്രകടനം വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിക്കുന്നത് കൊണ്ട് നിങ്ങളുടെ ശ്രദ്ധ കാണിക്കുന്നവര്\u200d അവരുടെ സ്വന്തം പ്രത്യേകശാസ്ത്രത്തിന് ശ്രദ്ധ Literature based discovery (LBD) supports the identification of such connections.  എല്\u200dബിഡി ഉപകരണങ്ങള്\u200d കിട്ടുന്നുണ്ട്, എങ്കിലും സാധ്യതയുള്ള തെരച്ചിലുകള്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതോ അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d യഥാര്\u200dത്ഥ സമയത് ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഹിഡിഇയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു. ഒളിഞ്ഞിരിക്കുന്ന ഡിസ്ക്വറി എക്സ്പ്ലോറര്\u200d, ഒരു ഓണ്\u200dലൈന്\u200d അറിവ് ബ്രൌസിങ് ഉപകരണത്തിന് അത് മെഡ ഒരു LBD സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഉണ്ടാക്കിയ ഒളിഞ്ഞ ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ പൂര്\u200dണ്ണമായ പരിശോധിക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ഹിഡിഇ ഉപകരണം ലിബിഡിയിലേക്ക് രണ്ട് സാധാരണകളുടെ രണ്ട് നോവല്\u200d കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലുള്ള ഒരു സാധ്യതയാണ് അത് ഒരു വലിയ തൂക്കില്\u200d നിന്നും  ലഭ്യമല്ല https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'no': 'Som mengden av publikasjonar øker daglig, vert forskere tvinge å redusera oppmerksomheten til eigne spesialisme, og derfor er mindre sannsynleg å lage nye tilkoplingar med andre område. Literaturebasert oppdaging (LBD) støttar identifiseringa av slike tilkoplingar. Dei er likevel tilgjengelege mange LBD-verktøya, men ofte går frå avgrensingar, slik som avgrensing av moglege søk eller ikkje produsering av resultat i verkeleg tid. Vi introduserer HiDE (gøymde oppdagingsutforskar), eit nettlesingsverktøy som tillater rask tilgang til gøymde kunnskap laga frå alle abstraktar i Medline. HiDE er rask nok for å tillata brukarar til å utforska heile område av gøymde tilkoplingar laga av ein LBD- system. Verktøyet brukar eit romansk kombinasjon av to tilnærmingar til LBD: eit grafbasert tilnærming som tillater gøymde kunnskap å laga på stor skala og ein infeksjonsgoritme for å identifisera dei mest foreslåande (mest sannsynlegvis ikkje trivial) informasjonen. Tilgjengeleg ved https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'pl': 'Ponieważ ilość publikacji zwiększa się z dniem na dzień, naukowcy są zmuszeni zawęzić uwagę na własną specjalizację i w związku z tym są mniej prawdopodobni nawiązywania nowych powiązań z innymi dziedzinami. Literatura based discovery (LBD) wspiera identyfikację takich powiązań. Dostępna jest szereg narzędzi LBD, jednak często cierpią one z powodu ograniczeń, takich jak ograniczenie możliwości wyszukiwania lub brak wyników w czasie rzeczywistym. Wprowadzamy HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), narzędzie do przeglądania wiedzy online, które umożliwia szybki dostęp do ukrytej wiedzy generowanej ze wszystkich abstraktów w Medline. HiDE jest wystarczająco szybki, aby umożliwić użytkownikom zbadanie pełnego zakresu ukrytych połączeń generowanych przez system LBD. Narzędzie wykorzystuje nowatorską kombinację dwóch podejść do LBD: podejścia opartego na wykresie, które umożliwia generowanie ukrytej wiedzy na dużą skalę oraz algorytmu wnioskowania umożliwiającego identyfikację najbardziej obiecujących (najprawdopodobniej nietrywialnych) informacji. Dostępne pod adresem https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'sr': 'Pošto se količina publikacija povećava svakodnevno, istraživači su prisiljeni da suze svoju pažnju na vlastiti specijalizam i stoga su manje verovatne da se povežu sa drugim područjima. Otkriće na književnosti (LBD) podržava identifikaciju takvih veza. Međutim, dostupno je broj alata LBD-a, često pati od ograničenja kao što ograničavaju moguće pretrage ili ne proizvode rezultate u realnom vremenu. Upoznajemo HiDE (skriveni istraživač otkrivanja), internet znanja koji omogućava brz pristup skrivenim znanjima koji su proizvedeni iz svih abstraktata u Medlinu. HiDE je dovoljno brz da dozvoli korisnicima da istražuju pun raspon skrivenih veza koji je stvorio sustav LBD-a. Instrument koristi novu kombinaciju dva pristupa LBD-u: grafički pristup koji omogućava da se skriveno znanje stvara na velikoj skali i algoritmu inferencije kako bi identifikovao najobećavajuće (najverovatnije ne trivialne) informacije. Dostupno https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ro': 'Pe măsură ce numărul de publicații crește zilnic, cercetătorii sunt obligați să-și restrângă atenția la specializarea lor și, prin urmare, sunt mai puțin probabil să creeze noi conexiuni cu alte domenii. Descoperirea bazată pe literatură (LBD) sprijină identificarea unor astfel de conexiuni. O serie de instrumente LBD sunt disponibile, cu toate acestea, acestea suferă adesea de limitări, cum ar fi restricționarea posibilelor căutări sau lipsa de a produce rezultate în timp real. Introducem HidE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), un instrument online de navigare a cunoștințelor care permite accesul rapid la cunoștințele ascunse generate din toate rezumatele din Medline. HidE este suficient de rapid pentru a permite utilizatorilor să exploreze întreaga gamă de conexiuni ascunse generate de un sistem LBD. Instrumentul utilizează o combinație nouă de două abordări pentru LBD: o abordare bazată pe grafice care permite generarea cunoștințelor ascunse la scară largă și un algoritm de inferență pentru a identifica cele mai promițătoare (cel mai probabil a fi non triviale) informații. Disponibil la https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'mn': 'Өдөр тутмын хэмжээний хэмжээг нэмэгдүүлснээр судлаачид анхаарлыг өөрсдийн мэргэжлийн төлөө багасгаж, бусад хэсэгт шинэ холбоотой байх боломжгүй. Соёл зохиолын үндсэн нээлт (LBD) нь ийм холбоотой холбоотой тодорхойлолтыг дэмжиж байна. Гэхдээ олон LBD хэрэгсэл хангалттай байдаг. Тэд ихэвчлэн хайлтыг хязгаарлах эсвэл бодит хугацаанд үр дүнг бүтээхгүй. Бид HiDE-г (нуугдсан Discovery Explorer), онлайн мэдлэг шинжлэх ухааны хөтөлбөрийг танилцуулдаг. Энэ нь Medline-ын бүх абстрактуудаас гарсан нуугдсан мэдлэгийг хурдан ашиглах боломжтой. HiDE нь хэрэглэгчид LBD системээс гаргасан бүрэн нууцтай холбоотуудыг судалж болох хангалттай хурдан байна. Энэ хэрэгсэл нь LBD-д хоёр шинэ арга барилгыг ашигладаг: график суурилсан арга барилгыг том хэмжээнд нуугдмал мэдлэг болон хамгийн амлалтай мэдээллийг тодорхойлж чадна. Холбоотой https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'si': 'හැමදාම ප්\u200dරකාශනයක් විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂ විශේෂකයෙන් ඔවුන්ගේ අවධානය අඩු කරන්න බලාපොරොත්තු වෙනවා ඒ ව සාක්ත්\u200dරිය අධාරිත හොයාගන්න (LBD) ඒ වගේ සම්බන්ධ පරික්ෂණය සහය පරික්ෂණය සහය කරනවා. LBD උපකරණයක් ගොඩක් අවස්ථාවක් තියෙනවා, නමුත්, ඔවුන් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන් සීමාවන් වලින් සීමාවන් අවස්ථාවන් වෙන්න අපි හිඩී (හුඟින් හොයාගන්න හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරකාශකය), ඇන්ලයින් දන්න බ්\u200dරාව්ස් උපකරණයක්, මෙඩ්ලායින් වල සියළු අවස්ථ @ info Name අවස්ථාව https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'sv': 'I takt med att mängden publikationer ökar dagligen tvingas forskarna att begränsa sin uppmärksamhet till sin egen specialisering och är därför mindre benägna att knyta nya kopplingar till andra områden. Litteraturbaserad upptäckt (LBD) stöder identifieringen av sådana kopplingar. Ett antal LBD-verktyg finns tillgängliga, men de lider ofta av begränsningar som att begränsa möjliga sökningar eller inte producera resultat i realtid. Vi introducerar HidE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), ett online kunskapsbläddringsverktyg som ger snabb tillgång till dold kunskap genererad från alla abstracts i Medline. HiDE är tillräckligt snabb för att tillåta användare att utforska hela utbudet av dolda anslutningar som genereras av ett LBD-system. Verktyget använder en ny kombination av två tillvägagångssätt för LBD: ett grafbaserat tillvägagångssätt som gör det möjligt att generera dold kunskap i stor skala och en slutsatssalgoritm för att identifiera den mest lovande (troligen icke triviala) informationen. Tillgänglig på https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'so': 'Sida ay tirada cashuurqaadayaashu maalin walba korodhsadaan ayaa cilmi-baaritaanka loo qasbaa inay u fududeeyaan warqadooda gaarka ah, sababtaas darteed waxay ka yaraan yihiin inay xiriir cusub la xiriiraan meelaha kale. Literature based discovery (LBD) supports the identification of such connections.  Si kastaba ha ahaatee waxaa heli kara qalabka LBD qaarkood oo ay marar badan u xanuunsadaan xaduudaha sida dhisidda raadinta suurtagalka ah ama aan soo saarin sababo waqti halis ah. Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa HiDE (Hidden Discovery), qalabka browska aqoonta ee internetka ah, kaas oo si dhaqso ah u isticmaali karta aqoonta qarsoon oo ka soo dhashay dhamaan dhamaan waxyaabaha la sameeyo ee wakhtiga. HiDE waxay ku filan tahay si dhaqso ah in uu isticmaalayaasha u ogolaado in ay baaraandegaan xiriirka qarsoon oo dhan oo ay ka soo dhashay nidaamka LBD. Qalabku wuxuu soo bandhigaa warqad labaad oo ku habboon LBD: qaab maamul ah oo ku sawira in aqoonta qarsoon lagu sameeyo daruur weyn iyo qoraal baahida ah si uu u ogaado macluumaadka ugu ballan badan (ugu macquul ahaan mid a an la mid ahayn). Waxaad heli kartaa https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ta': 'ஒவ்வொரு நாளும் பரப்புகளின் அளவு அதிகரிக்கும் போது, ஆராய்ச்சியாளர்கள் அவர்களுடைய சொந்த பரிசோதனையை குறைக்க வேண்டும். அதனால் அவர்கள்  இம்மைய இணைப்புகளின் அடிப்படையான கண்டுபிடிப்பு (LBD) ஆதரிக்கிறது. @ info: whatsthis நாங்கள் HiDE (மறைந்து கண்டுபிடிப்பான்) அறிவிப்பு உலாவும் கருவியை அறிமுகப்படுத்துகிறோம். இது முறைமையில் உள்ள அனைத்து மறைந்த அறிவிப Name கருவி LBD க்கு ஒரு புதிய சேருமிடத்தை பயன்படுத்துகிறது: ஒரு வரைபடத்திற்கு அடிப்படையில் உள்ள அறிவை பெரிய அளவில் உருவாக்க அனுமதிக்கும் மற்றும் குறைவான முறைமையில்  இருக்கிறது https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ur': 'جس طرح جماعتیں روزہ زیادہ اضافہ ہوتی ہیں، تحقیقات کرنے والوں کو اپنا ذهن اپنے مخصوص طریقے سے تنگ کرنے کے لئے مجبور کیا جاتا ہے اور اسی وجہ سے دوسرے منطقه کے ساتھ نئی اتصال کرنے کے لئے کم احتمال ہے۔ اس طرح کی اتصال کی شناسایی کی مدد کرتی ہے. لیکن بہت سی LBD ابزار موجود ہیں، ان کی کثرت سے زیادہ محدودیتیں ہیں جیسے ممکن جستجوں کو محدود کرنے یا اصل زمانہ میں نتیجے پیدا نہیں کرتے۔ ہم نے HiDE (مخفی دیسکوری اگلور) کو پہنچا دیتے ہیں، ایک آنلاین علم برائینگ ابزار جو مدلین کے تمام اگلوٹ سے پیدا ہوئے پوشیدہ علم کے لئے تیز دسترسی دیتا ہے۔ HiDE ایک LBD سیسٹم کے ذریعے پیدا ہوئے چھپائے اتصال کے تمام مخفی حصہ کو دیکھنے کے لئے کافی تیز ہے۔ یہ وسیلہ LBD کے دو طریقوں کی نو ترکیب کا استعمال کرتا ہے: ایک گراف بنیادی طریقہ جو چھپائے جانے کی اجازت دیتا ہے کہ ایک بڑے مقدار پر پیدا ہو جائے اور ایک نقصان الگوریٹم کو بہترین وعدہ دینے کے لئے (بہت ممکن ہے کہ غیر تربیل) معلومات پہچان سکے۔ Available at https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'uz': "Ko'pchiliklar har kuni ko'paytirishda, qidiruvchilar ularning tayyorlariga maktabni yaratishga qanday qiladi va shunday qilib boshqa maydonlar bilan yangi aloqalar yaratish kerak. Name @ info Biz HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), Online maʼlumot brauzeri asbobi bilan ishlatish imkoniyatini beradi. Bu davom etilgan hamma maʼlumotlardan foydalanishga ruxsat beradi. Name Asboblar LBD uchun ikkita usulni birlashtirishni ishlatadi: grafik asosida yaratilgan narsalarni katta balandda yaratishga ruxsat beradi va eng yaxshi ko'proq algoritni aniqlashga imkoniyat beradi. Mavjud https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc", 'vi': 'Khi số lượng hàng ngày tăng lên, các nhà nghiên cứu buộc phải thu hẹp sự chú ý về chuyên môn của mình và do đó ít có khả năng kết nối mới với các lĩnh vực khác. Phát hiện theo nền văn học (LBD) hỗ trợ việc xác định các kết nối. Tuy nhiên, có một số công cụ LBD sẵn sàng, chúng thường bị giới hạn như hạn tìm kiếm có thể hoặc không có kết quả trong thời gian thực. Chúng tôi giới thiệu Hide (Hidden Khám Khám Khám Explorer), một công cụ duyệt kiến thức trực tuyến cho phép truy cập nhanh tới kiến thức bị giấu được tạo ra từ mọi thác trong Medline. Hide đủ nhanh để cho phép người dùng khám phá to àn bộ các kết nối ẩn tạo bởi hệ thống LBD. Công cụ sử dụng một kết hợp mới của hai phương pháp sắp đặt cho LBD: một phương pháp dựa trên đồ thị cho phép tạo ra những kiến thức bị ẩn trên quy mô lớn và một thuật to án nhận biết để xác định những thông tin hứa hẹn nhất (có thể là không tầm thường). Có sẵn ở https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'bg': 'Тъй като броят на публикациите нараства ежедневно, изследователите са принудени да ограничат вниманието си към собствената си специализация и следователно е по-малко вероятно да създадат нови връзки с други области. Литературно базирано откритие (LBD) поддържа идентифицирането на такива връзки. Налични са редица инструменти, но те често страдат от ограничения като ограничаване на възможните търсения или липса на резултати в реално време. Представяме ви онлайн инструмент за сърфиране на знания, който позволява бърз достъп до скрито знание, генерирано от всички абстракции в Медлайн. Той е достатъчно бърз, за да позволи на потребителите да изследват пълната гама от скрити връзки, генерирани от система. Инструментът използва нова комбинация от два подхода към LBD: графичен подход, който позволява да се генерира скрито знание в голям мащаб и алгоритъм за заключение, за да се идентифицира най-обещаващата (най-вероятно не е тривиална) информация. На разположение на адрес: https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'da': 'Efterhånden som antallet af publikationer stiger dagligt, er forskerne tvunget til at indsnævre deres opmærksomhed til deres egen specialisering og er derfor mindre tilbøjelige til at knytte nye forbindelser til andre områder. Litteraturbaseret opdagelse (LBD) understøtter identifikation af sådanne forbindelser. En række LBD-værktøjer er tilgængelige, men de lider ofte af begrænsninger såsom begrænsning af mulige søgninger eller ikke at producere resultater i realtid. Vi introducerer HidE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), et online viden browsing værktøj, der giver hurtig adgang til skjult viden genereret fra alle abstracts i Medline. HidE er hurtig nok til at give brugerne mulighed for at udforske hele spektret af skjulte forbindelser genereret af et LBD-system. Værktøjet anvender en ny kombination af to tilgange til LBD: en grafbaseret tilgang, der gør det muligt at generere skjult viden i stor skala, og en inference algoritme til at identificere de mest lovende (mest sandsynligt ikke trivielle) oplysninger. Tilgængelig på https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'nl': 'Naarmate de hoeveelheid publicaties dagelijks toeneemt, worden onderzoekers gedwongen hun aandacht te beperken tot hun eigen specialisme en zullen daardoor minder snel nieuwe verbindingen leggen met andere gebieden. Literature based discovery (LBD) ondersteunt de identificatie van dergelijke verbanden. Een aantal LBD-tools zijn beschikbaar, maar ze hebben vaak te maken met beperkingen zoals het beperken van mogelijke zoekopdrachten of het niet produceren van resultaten in real-time. We introduceren HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), een online kennisbrowsing tool die snelle toegang biedt tot verborgen kennis gegenereerd uit alle abstracts in Medline. HiDE is snel genoeg om gebruikers in staat te stellen om het volledige scala aan verborgen verbindingen gegenereerd door een LBD-systeem te verkennen. De tool maakt gebruik van een nieuwe combinatie van twee benaderingen van LBD: een grafiekgebaseerde benadering waarmee verborgen kennis op grote schaal kan worden gegenereerd en een inferentiealgoritme om de meest veelbelovende (waarschijnlijk niet triviale) informatie te identificeren. Beschikbaar op: https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'hr': 'Pošto se količina publikacija svakodnevno povećava, istraživači su prisiljeni suziti svoju pažnju na svoj specijalizam i stoga su manje vjerojatni da će se novi povezati s drugim područjima. Otkriće na književnosti (LBD) podržava identifikaciju takvih veza. Međutim, dostupno je broj alata LBD-a, često pate od ograničenja poput ograničenja mogućih pretrage ili ne proizvodnje rezultata u realnom vremenu. Predstavljamo HiDE (skriveni istraživač otkrivanja), internetski znanstveni sustav koji omogućava brzi pristup skrivenim znanjima proizvedenim iz svih apstrakta u Medlinu. HiDE je dovoljno brz da dozvoli korisnicima da istražuju pun raspon skrivenih veza koje je stvorio sustav LBD-a. Instrument koristi novu kombinaciju dva pristupa LBD-u: pristup na grafiku koji omogućava da se skriveni znanje proizvede na velikoj mjeri i algoritmu infekcije kako bi identifikovao najobećavajuće (najvjerojatnije da nije trivialne) informacije. Dostupno https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'de': 'Da die Zahl der Publikationen täglich zunimmt, sind Forscher gezwungen, ihre Aufmerksamkeit auf ihr eigenes Fachgebiet zu beschränken und sind daher weniger geneigt, neue Verbindungen zu anderen Bereichen herzustellen. Literaturbasierte Entdeckung (LBD) unterstützt die Identifizierung solcher Zusammenhänge. Eine Reihe von LBD-Tools stehen zur Verfügung, sie leiden jedoch oft unter Einschränkungen wie der Einschränkung möglicher Suchvorgänge oder der Nichtgenerierung von Ergebnissen in Echtzeit. Wir stellen HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer) vor, ein Online-Knowledge Browsing-Tool, das einen schnellen Zugriff auf verborgenes Wissen ermöglicht, das aus allen Abstracts in Medline generiert wird. HiDE ist schnell genug, um die gesamte Bandbreite versteckter Verbindungen zu erkunden, die von einem LBD-System erzeugt werden. Das Tool verwendet eine neuartige Kombination aus zwei Ansätzen für LBD: einem graphenbasierten Ansatz, der es ermöglicht, verborgenes Wissen in großem Maßstab zu generieren, und einem Inferenzalgorithmus, um die vielversprechendsten (wahrscheinlich nicht trivialen) Informationen zu identifizieren. Erhältlich unter https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'id': 'Karena jumlah publikasi meningkat sehari-hari, para peneliti dipaksa untuk mempersempit perhatian mereka kepada spesialisme mereka sendiri dan oleh itu lebih sedikit kemungkinan untuk membuat koneksi baru dengan daerah lain. Penemuan berbasis literatur (LBD) mendukung identifikasi koneksi tersebut. Beberapa alat LBD tersedia, bagaimanapun, mereka sering menderita dari batasan seperti menghalangi pencarian kemungkinan atau tidak menghasilkan hasil dalam waktu nyata. Kami memperkenalkan HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), alat pelayaran pengetahuan online yang memungkinkan akses cepat ke pengetahuan tersembunyi yang dihasilkan dari semua abstrak di Medline. HiDE cukup cepat untuk memungkinkan pengguna untuk mengeksplorasi jangkauan lengkap koneksi tersembunyi yang dibuat oleh sistem LBD. Alat ini menggunakan kombinasi baru dari dua pendekatan ke LBD: pendekatan berdasarkan grafik yang memungkinkan pengetahuan tersembunyi untuk dihasilkan pada skala besar dan algoritma kesimpulan untuk mengidentifikasi informasi yang paling berjanji (kemungkinan tidak trivial). Tersedia di https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ko': '출판물의 수가 날로 늘어나면서 연구원들은 자신의 전공 분야에 집중해야 하기 때문에 다른 분야와 새로운 관계를 맺을 수 없다.문헌 기반의 발견(LBD)은 이런 관계를 식별할 수 있다.많은 LBD 도구를 사용할 수 있지만, 예를 들어 가능한 검색을 제한하거나 결과를 실시간으로 생성하지 않는 등 제한을 받는다.Hidden Discovery Explorer(Hidden Discovery Explorer)는 Medline의 모든 요약에서 생성된 숨겨진 지식을 빠르게 액세스할 수 있는 온라인 지식 탐색 도구입니다.Hide는 LBD 시스템에서 생성된 모든 숨겨진 연결을 탐색할 수 있는 속도를 제공합니다.이 도구는 두 가지 LBD 방법의 새로운 조합을 채택했다. 하나는 도형을 바탕으로 하는 방법으로 대규모로 숨겨진 지식을 생성할 수 있고, 다른 추리 알고리즘은 가장 희망적인 정보를 식별하는 데 사용된다.가능https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'sw': 'Wakati idadi ya kuchapisha inaongezeka kila siku, watafiti wanalazimika kupunguza mitazamo yao kwa wataalam wao wenyewe na kwa hiyo wanaweza kufanya mawasiliano mapya na maeneo mengine. Ugunduzi wa fasihi (LBD) unaunga mkono kutambua viungo hivyo. A number of LBD tools are available, however, they often suffer from limitations such as constraining possible searches or not producing results in real-time.  Tunawasilisha HiDE (Mtunguzaji wa Kujificha Kujificha), zana ya kutangaza maarifa ya mtandaoni ambayo inaruhusu kupata ufahamu wa haraka uliotengenezwa kutokana na vifaa vyote vya kujificha katika kipindi hiki. HiDE imetosha kwa haraka kuwaruhusu watumiaji kuchunguza kiwango kamili cha viungo vya siri vilivyotengenezwa na mfumo wa LBD. Kifaa hicho kinatumia muunganiko wa riwaya wa mbili kwa ajili ya LBD: mbinu yenye msingi wa picha ambayo inaruhusu ufahamu wa siri kutengenezwa kwa kiwango kikubwa na utambulisho usio na upungufu wa taarifa za kutambua matumaini zaidi (pengine si vibaya). Inapatikana kwa https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'fa': 'همانطور که تعداد منتشر روزانه افزایش می\u200cدهد، محققان مجبور می\u200cشوند توجه خود را به ویژه\u200cهای خود تنگ کنند و به این دلیل کمتر احتمال است که ارتباط جدید با منطقه\u200cهای دیگر بسازند. کشف ادبیات بر اساس ادبیات (LBD) شناسایی چنین ارتباطات را پشتیبانی می\u200cکند. ولی تعدادی از ابزارهای LBD در دسترسی دارند، اغلب از محدودیت\u200cهایی مانند محدودیت جستجوهای ممکن یا نتیجه\u200cهایی در زمان واقعی در دسترسی ندارند. ما HiDE (Explorer hidden Discovery) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک ابزار جستجوی دانش آنلاین که به سرعت دسترسی به دانش مخفی که از همه مطلق\u200cهای مدلین تولید شده است، اجازه می\u200cدهد. HiDE به اندازه کافی سریع است که اجازه دهد کاربران برای تحقیق کردن مجموعه کامل ارتباطات مخفی که توسط یک سیستم LBD تولید شده است. ابزار یک ترکیب نوی از دو دستور به LBD استفاده می\u200cکند: یک دستور بر اساس گراف که اجازه می\u200cدهد دانش مخفی را در یک مقیاس بزرگ تولید کند و یک الگوریتم عفونی برای شناسایی بهترین اطلاعات (احتمالاً غیر ترکیبی) باشد. موجود در https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'sq': 'Ndërsa sasia e publikimeve rritet çdo ditë, kërkuesit janë të detyruar të ngushtojnë vëmendjen e tyre ndaj specializmit të tyre dhe prandaj kanë më pak gjasa të bëjnë lidhje të reja me fusha të tjera. Zbulimi bazuar në letër (LBD) mbështet identifikimin e lidhjeve të tilla. Një numër mjete LBD janë në dispozicion megjithatë, ato shpesh vuajnë nga kufizime të tilla si kufizimi i kërkimeve të mundshme apo jo prodhimi i rezultateve në kohë reale. Ne prezantojmë HiDE, një mjet për shfletimin e njohurive online që lejon hyrjen e shpejtë në njohuritë e fshehta të gjeneruara nga të gjitha abstraktet në Medline. HiDE është mjaft i shpejtë për të lejuar përdoruesit të eksplorojnë gamën e plotë të lidhjeve të fshehta të gjeneruara nga një sistem LBD. Mjet përdorë një kombinim të ri të dy qasjeve për LBD: një qasje bazuar në grafik që lejon që njohuritë e fshehta të gjenerohen në një shkallë të madhe dhe një algoritëm përfundimi për të identifikuar informacionin më premtues (me shumë gjasa të mos jetë trivial). Të disponueshme në https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'tr': "Çaplaryň köp sany günlük artýandygynda, araştyranlaryň öz spesialistiklerine ünsüni azaltmak üçin mejbur edýärler we şonuň üçin başga bölekler bilen täze bir baglaşyk etmäge az pikir edýärler. Edebiýat tabanly keşfedilmegi (LBD) şol ýaly baglaýyşlaryň tanymyny destekleýär. Ýöne birnäçe LBD esbaplar bar, olar mümkin sözlerni çykarýan ýaly mümkin sözlerni çykarýan ýa-da netijeleri çykarmaýarlar. Biz HiDE'i (gizli atkrip Gezgini) tanyşdyrýarys, bu internet bilem ahtarma aralygy Medline'iň ähli abstraktlardan döredilen bilimleri ýüz tutmalydygy üçin tiz hereket edip bilýäris. Ullançylaryň LBD sistemi tarapyndan döredilen gizli baglaýyşlaryny gözlemek üçin ýeterlik tiz. Bu araç LBD'a iki gollanşyk baglanmasynyň bir romanyny ulanýar: grafik tabanly bir gollanmasyny üçin gizlenen bilgileri uly ölçekde döretmäge mümkin edýär we iň uly söz berýän algoritmä tanyşdyrylýar Nagt https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc", 'af': "As die hoeveelheid van publikasies dag vergroot word, word ondersoekers verdwyn om hul aandag na hul eie spesialisme te verdwyn en daarom minder waarskynlik om nuwe verbindings met ander gebied te maak. Literature-gebaseerde ontdekking (LBD) ondersteun die identifikasie van sodanige verbindings. 'n Nommer van LBD-nutsprogramme is egter beskikbaar, hulle lyk dikwels van beperking soos beperking van moontlike soektog of nie produseer resultate in reël-tyd nie. Ons introduiseer HiDE (verberg Ontdekkeur Ontdekkeur), ' n onlinese kennis blaaier hulpmiddel wat toelaat vinnige toegang tot verborge kennis genereer van alle abstrakte in Medline. Hide is vinnig genoeg om gebruikers te laat toe om die volledige omvang van weggesteekte verbindings te oorskryf deur 'n LBD stelsel. Die hulpmiddel gebruik 'n roman kombinasie van twee toegang tot LBD: ' n graafgebaseerde toegang wat toelaat versteekte kennis te genereer word op 'n groot skaal en 'n inferensie algoritme om die mees beloftende (mees waarskynlik nie triviale) inligting te identifiseer. Beskikbaar by https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc", 'am': 'በዕለት ዕለት ዕለት የሚጨምሩ ብዛት፣ አስተማሪዎቹ የራሳቸውን ባለምህርት አሳብ እንዲያሳድጉ ግድ አሉ፤ ስለዚህ ከሌሎች አገር ጋር አዲስ ግንኙነት ሊያደርጉ አይችሉም፡፡ የፊደል ቅርጽ ምርጫዎች ምንም እንኳን የLBD መሣሪያዎች ብዙ ጊዜ እንደተቻለ መርጊያውን ለማግኘት ወይም ፍሬዎችን በመስጠት ባይችሉ ከግንኙነት መከራ ይቀበላሉ፡፡ HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), የመረጃ እውቀት መቃኛ (የመረጃ መቃኛ) እናስጠጋለን፡፡ HiDE ፈጥኖ ይበቃል መሣሪያው ወደ LBD የሚደረገውን የሁለትን ደረጃዎች አቀማመጥ ነው፤ የgraph-based የእውቀትን እውቀት በተለየ ትልቅ ክፍል እና የተሰወረውን የአልgorithም ማውቀትን ማረጋገጥ ይችላል፡፡ የሥዕል ምርጫዎች https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'hy': 'Քանի որ հրատարակությունների քանակը ամեն օր աճում է, հետազոտողները ստիպված են նվազեցնել իրենց ուշադրությունը իրենց սեփական մասնագետին, և դրա համար ավելի քիչ հավանական են նոր կապեր կապել այլ ոլորտների հետ: Գրագրականությամբ հիմնված հայտնագործությունը (LBD) աջակցում է նման կապերի բացահայտումը: Շատ LBD գործիքներ հասանելի են, սակայն նրանք հաճախ տառապում են սահմանափակումներից, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ հնարավոր որոնումների սահմանափակումները կամ արդյունքներ չեն ստանում իրական ժամանակում: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք ՀիԴ (թաքնված բացահայտություն ուսումնասիրություն), ինտերնետային գիտելիքների բրաուզայի գործիք, որը հնարավորություն է տալիս արագ հասնել թաքնված գիտելիքներին, որոնք ստեղծվել են բոլոր աստրակտներից, որոն Հիդեն բավականին արագ է, որպեսզի թույլ տա օգտագործողներին ուսումնասիրել LBD համակարգի կողմից ստեղծված թաքնված կապերի ամբողջ շարքը: Այն օգտագործում է LBD-ի երկու մոտեցումների նոր համակցություն՝ գծագրային հիմնված մոտեցում, որը թույլ է տալիս թաքնված գիտելիքները ստեղծվել մեծ մասշտաբով, և հետևյալ ալգորիթմ, որպեսզի բացահայտենք ամենախոստացնող (ամենահավանական է, որ ոչ փոքրիկ) տեղեկա Տեղադրելի է https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'bn': 'যেহেতু প্রকাশিত প্রতিদিনের পরিমাণ বেড়ে যায়, গবেষকদের নিজেদের বিশেষজ্ঞের দিকে তাদের মনোযোগ কমিয়ে দেয়া হয় এবং তাই তারা অন্যা সাহিত্যের ভিত্তিক আবিষ্কার (LBD) এই সংযোগের পরিচয় সমর্থন করে। তবে কিছু এলবিডি টুল পাওয়া যায়, তারা প্রায়শই সীমাবদ্ধতা থেকে কষ্ট পায় যেমন সম্ভাব্য অনুসন্ধান নির্ধারণ করে অথবা আসল সময়ে ফলাফল প আমরা হিডিএ (লুকিয়ে রাখা ডিস্কভারি এক্সপ্লোরার), একটি অনলাইন জ্ঞান ব্রাউজিং টুল, যা মেডিলাইনের সকল আকটপ্রেক্ট থেকে তৈরি করা জ্ঞান HiDE is fast enough to allow users to explore the full range of hidden connections generated by an LBD system.  টুলটি লিবিডির কাছে দুটি প্রতিযোগিতার সাথে একটি উপন্যাস সংযোগ ব্যবস্থা করেছে: একটি গ্রাফ ভিত্তিক উপায় যা একটি বিশাল পর্যায়ে লুকিয়ে থাকা জ্ঞান তৈরি করা যায় এবং একটি  বিদ্যমান https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'bs': 'Pošto se količina publikacija povećava svakodnevno, istraživači su prisiljeni da suze svoju pažnju na svoj specijalizam i stoga su manje vjerojatni da će se novi povezati sa drugim područjima. Otkriće na književnosti (LBD) podržava identifikaciju takvih veza. Međutim, dostupno je broj alata LBD-a, često pati od ograničenja kao što ograničavaju moguće pretrage ili ne proizvode rezultate u realnom vremenu. Upoznajemo HiDE (skriveni istraživač otkrivanja), internet znanja koji omogućava brzi pristup skrivenim znanjima koji su proizvedeni iz svih abstraktata u Medlinu. HiDE je dovoljno brz da dozvoli korisnicima da istražuju pun raspon skrivenih veza koje je stvorio sustav LBD-a. Instrument koristi novu kombinaciju dva pristupa LBD-u: grafički pristup koji omogućava da se skriveno znanje stvara na velikoj skali i algoritmu inferencije kako bi identifikovao najobećavajuće (najvjerojatnije da nije trivialna) informacije. Na raspolaganju https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'az': "Yazılımlar günlük artırdığı kimi, araştırmacılar öz spesializməsinə dikkatini azaltmağa məcbur edilirlər və buna görə də başqa məmləkətlərlə yeni bağlantılar yaratmağa daha az mümkün deyillər. Edebiyat tabanlı keşif (LBD) bu bağlantıların kimliğini dəstəkləyir. Lakin bir neçə LBD vasitələri faydalanır ki, onlar mümkün araştırmaları müdafiə etmək və ya həqiqət zamanda sonuçları ürəkləmək üçün mümkün müddətlərdən sıxılırlar. Biz HiDE'i (gizli Discovery Explorer) ilə tanıdırıq. Bu, Medline'deki bütün abstraktlardan yaratdığı gizli bilgilərə hızlı müvəffəq edər. HiDE LBD sistemindən yaratdığı gizli bağlantıların tamamilə səviyyəsini keşfetməyə imkan vermək üçün kifayət hızlı olur. Bu araç LBD üçün yeni iki tərəfindən istifadə edir: grafik tərəfindən gizli bilgiləri böyük ölçüdə yaratmağa və ən vəd verici (çox kiçik olmayan) məlumatları tanıtmağa imkan verir. Available at https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc", 'ca': "A mesura que la quantitat de publicacions augmenta diariament, els investigadors estan obligats a limitar la seva atenció al seu propi especialisme i, per tant, tenen menys probabilitat de crear noves connexions amb altres àrees. El descobriment basat en la literatura (LBD) suporta la identificació d'aquestes connexions. Una sèrie d'eines LBD estan disponibles, però sovint pateixen limitacions com limitar les possibilitats de cerca o no produir resultats en temps real. Introduïm HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), una eina de navegació de coneixements en línia que permet accés ràpid a coneixements ocults generats de totes les abstractes de Medline. HiDE és prou ràpid per permetre als usuaris explorar la gamma completa de connexions ocultes generades per un sistema LBD. L'eina utilitza una nova combinació de dos enfocaments a la LBD: un enfocament basat en gràfics que permet generar coneixements ocults a gran escala i un algoritme de inferència per identificar la informació més prometedora (probablement no trivial). Disponible en https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc", 'cs': 'Vzhledem k tomu, že množství publikací denně roste, jsou vědci nuceni zúžit svou pozornost na vlastní specializaci, a proto je méně pravděpodobné, že navazují nové vazby s jinými oblastmi. Literature based discovery (LBD) podporuje identifikaci těchto souvislostí. K dispozici je řada nástrojů LBD, často však trpí omezeními, jako je omezení možného vyhledávání nebo nevytváření výsledků v reálném čase. Představujeme HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), online nástroj pro procházení znalostí, který umožňuje rychlý přístup ke skrytým znalostem generovaným ze všech abstraktů v Medline. HiDE je dostatečně rychlý, aby uživatelé mohli prozkoumat celou řadu skrytých připojení generovaných systémem LBD. Nástroj využívá novou kombinaci dvou přístupů k LBD: přístupu založeného na grafech, který umožňuje generování skrytých znalostí ve velkém měřítku a algoritmu inference pro identifikaci nejslibnějších (s největší pravděpodobností netriviálních) informací. K dispozici na adrese https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'fi': 'Julkaisujen määrän kasvaessa päivittäin tutkijat joutuvat rajoittamaan huomionsa omaan erikoisalaansa, minkä vuoksi he eivät todennäköisesti saa uusia yhteyksiä muihin aloihin. Literature based discovery (LBD) tukee tällaisten yhteyksien tunnistamista. Useita LBD-työkaluja on saatavilla, mutta ne kärsivät usein rajoituksista, kuten mahdollisten hakujen rajoittamisesta tai tulosten tuottamisesta reaaliajassa. Esittelemme HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), online-tiedon selailutyökalu, joka mahdollistaa nopean pääsyn piilotettuun tietoon, joka on luotu kaikista Medlinen abstrakteista. HiDE on riittävän nopea, jotta käyttäjät voivat tutkia kaikkia LBD-järjestelmän luomia piilotettuja yhteyksiä. Työkalu käyttää uudenlaista yhdistelmää kahdesta lähestymistavasta LBD: graafiseen lähestymistapaan perustuvaa lähestymistapaa, joka mahdollistaa piilotetun tiedon tuottamisen suuressa mittakaavassa, ja päättelyalgoritmia, jolla tunnistetaan lupaavimmat (todennäköisimmin ei-triviaalit) tiedot. Saatavilla osoitteessa https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'et': "Kuna väljaannete hulk iga päev suureneb, on teadlased sunnitud piirama tähelepanu oma erialale ja loovad seetõttu vähem uusi sidemeid teiste valdkondadega. Kirjanduspõhine avastus (LBD) toetab selliste ühenduste tuvastamist. Saadaval on mitmed LBD tööriistad, kuid sageli kannatavad nad piirangute all, nagu võimalike otsingute piiramine või tulemuste mitte andmine reaalajas. Tutvustame HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), online teadmiste sirvimise tööriista, mis võimaldab kiiret juurdepääsu varjatud teadmistele, mis on genereeritud kõigist Medline'i abstraktidest. HiDE on piisavalt kiire, et võimaldada kasutajatel uurida kõiki varjatud ühendusi, mida loob LBD süsteem. Tööriist kasutab uudset kombinatsiooni kahest lähenemisviisist: graafikapõhine lähenemine, mis võimaldab luua varjatud teadmisi suures ulatuses, ja järeldusalgoritm, et tuvastada kõige paljulubavam (tõenäolisemalt mittetiviaalne) teave. Saadaval aadressil https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc", 'jv': 'Taning ing akeh liyane sing ditambah akeh pisan neng sapa-loro, manggadahi bisa nguasai winih dhéwé kanggo awak dhéwé kanggo ngerasakno perusahaan winih dhéwé, lan kaya ngono kuwi ora bisa dianggap Anya nggawe sistem Anya. Perusahaan seneng ngêstir éntuk (LBD) kang dipunangé kara sampeyan Jaringan Text editor Awakdhéwé nyebatasan HiDES (Sak Digakir Bukak), arah online kesalahan kanggo nyebu dhéwé kanggo mbanjurakno sing nyebatasan kanggo kebebasan ilhamak dhéwé nang medline hidden Tool tip connected mode https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'he': 'כיוון שהכמות של פרסומות מגבילה ביום יום, החוקרים נאלצים לצמצם את תשומת לבם למיוחד שלהם ולכן הם פחות סבירים ליצור קשרים חדשים עם אזורים אחרים. גילוי בספרות (LBD) תומך בזיהוי קשרים כאלה. למרות זאת, מספר כלים LBD זמינים, הם לעתים קרובות סובלים מגבלות כגון מכריצות חיפושים אפשריים או לא יוצרים תוצאות בזמן אמיתי. אנו מציגים HiDE (Explorer גילוי מוסתר), כלי חיפוש ידע באינטרנט שמאפשר גישה מהירה לידע מוסתר שנוצר מכל המאסטרקטים במדליין. HiDE מספיק מהיר כדי לאפשר למשתמשים לחקור את טווח מלא של קשרים חבויים שנgenerו על ידי מערכת LBD. הכלי משתמש בשילוב חדש של שתי גישות ל-LBD: גישה מבוססת בגרף שמאפשרת ליצור ידע חבוי בסולם גדול ואלגוריתם ההנחה לזהות את המידע המבטיח ביותר (סביר להניח שהוא לא טריוויאלי). זמין ב https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'ha': "Ga da yawan takarda ko da yau, an lazimta mãsu ƙidãya wa watafiti su zama masu bincike ga masu sani, kuma don haka bã zã su iya ƙaranci haɗi da waɗansu wurãren dabam. @ info: status Ana iya ƙayyade wasu zanen LBD, kuma amma, ana zartar da su a ƙayyadadde kamar yin tsari da ake iya yin searches ko kuma bã su sami matsalar da lokaci da ke gaskata. Tuna nuna shirin bayani na Hide (Explorer da aka ɓõye), wata zane na Browse na ilmi mai kwamfyuta, wanda ke yarda a iya iya samun zane da aka ɓõye daga duk abubuwan da aka ƙãga Babban. @ info: whatsthis Wannan shirin ya yi amfani da wata takardar nodu biyu masu haɗi zuwa LBD: wata hanyor grafi wanda ke yarda a iya ƙiƙiro ilmi wanda aka ɓõye ta kan girma, da kuma an gane algorisi na ƙaranci dõmin ya gane information masu yi wa'adi da mafi yawansa (ana yiwuwa ba'a yi fasalin) ba. Ana da wani https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc", 'sk': 'Ker se število publikacij vsak dan povečuje, morajo raziskovalci omejiti pozornost na lastno specializacijo, zato je manj verjetno, da bodo vzpostavili nove povezave z drugimi področji. Literature based discovery (LBD) podpira identifikacijo takih povezav. Na voljo je številna orodja LBD, vendar pa pogosto trpijo zaradi omejitev, kot je omejevanje možnih iskanj ali neustreznost ustvarjanja rezultatov v realnem času. Predstavljamo vam HiDE (Hidden Discovery Explorer), spletno orodje za brskanje po znanju, ki omogoča hiter dostop do skritega znanja, ustvarjenega iz vseh povzetkov v Medlineu. HiDE je dovolj hiter, da uporabnikom omogoča raziskovanje celotnega nabora skritih povezav, ki jih ustvarja sistem LBD. Orodje uporablja novo kombinacijo dveh pristopov k LBD: grafični pristop, ki omogoča ustvarjanje skritega znanja v velikem obsegu, in sklepni algoritem za identifikacijo najbolj obetavnih (verjetno netrivialnih) informacij. Na voljo na spletni strani https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc', 'bo': 'དཔར་བསྐྲུན་གྱི་གྲངས Literature based discovery (LBD) supports the identification of such connections. ཡིན་ནའང་། LBD ལག་ཆ་ཤས་གཅིག ང་ཚོས་HiDE(hidden Discovery Explorer)ལ་དྲ་བ་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱི་གནས་ཚུལ་ལྟ་བཤེར་སྤྱོད་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་སྤྲོད་ཡོད། HiDE ཡིས་LBD་མ་ལག་གིས་གསར་བསྐྲུན་པའི་ཡིབ་ཡོད་པའི་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་ཡོངས་རྫོགས་ལ་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་ཆོག་ཡོད། The tool employs a novel combination of two approaches to LBD: a graph-based approach which allows hidden knowledge to be generated on a large scale and an inference algorithm to identify the most promising (most likely to be non trivial) information. སྤྱོད་རུང་བ https://skye.shef.ac.uk/kdisc'}
{'en': 'Utilizing Graph Measure to Deduce Omitted Entities in Paragraphs', 'ar': 'استخدام مقياس الرسم البياني لاستنتاج الكيانات المحذوفة في الفقرات', 'pt': 'Utilizando Medida de Gráfico para Deduzir Entidades Omitidas em Parágrafos', 'fr': 'Utilisation de la mesure graphique pour déduire les entités omises dans les paragraphes', 'es': 'Uso de la medida gráfica para deducir entidades omitidas en los párrafos', 'ja': 'グラフメジャーを活用して、パラグラフで省略されたエンティティを減らす', 'hi': 'अनुच्छेदों में छोड़े गए निकायों को कम करने के लिए ग्राफ़ माप का उपयोग करना', 'zh': '以形度推段落中省之实体', 'ru': 'Использование меры графа для вычета пропущенных сущностей в абзацах', 'ga': 'Úsáid a bhaint as Beart Grafa chun Aonáin Fágtha sna hAilt a Bhaint as', 'ka': 'გამოყენება გრაფიკური განზომილების გამოყენება განზომილებული ელემენტების პარაგრაფიკში', 'el': 'Χρήση του μέτρου γραφήματος για την αφαίρεση των παραλειμμένων οντοτήτων σε παραγράφους', 'hu': 'A grafikus intézkedés használata a kihagyott szervezetek levonására a bekezdésekben', 'it': 'Utilizzo della misura grafica per dedurre le entità eliminate nei paragrafi', 'mk': 'Користење на мерка на график за отстранување на избеганите ентитети во параграфите', 'kk': 'Графикалық өлшемдерді бөлшектерде шектеу үшін қолдану', 'lt': 'Grafinių priemonių naudojimas siekiant sumažinti neteisėtus subjektus straipsniuose', 'ml': 'പാരാഗ്രാപ്പുകളില്\u200d ഒമിറ്റിട്ടുള്ള എന്റിറ്റികള്\u200d ഡെയൂട്ട് ചെയ്യുന്നതിനുള്ള ഗ്രാഫ്റ്റ് അളവ', 'mt': 'L-użu tal-Miżura tal-Grafika biex jitnaqqsu l-Entitajiet Omitti fil-Paragrafi', 'mn': 'График хэмжээсүүдийг график хэмжээсүүдийг тодорхойлохын тулд', 'ro': 'Utilizarea măsurii grafice pentru deducerea entităților eliminate în paragrafe', 'ms': 'Mengguna Ukuran Graf untuk Kurangkan Entiti Terlepas dalam Paragraf', 'no': 'Brukar grafikkmåling for å deklara omsette einingar i avsnitt', 'sr': 'Koristenje mjere grafika za smanjenje ometanih podataka u odstavcima', 'si': 'ග්\u200dරාෆ් මාර්ගය ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් ප්\u200dරතිචාරයෙන් අන්තිම අන්', 'pl': 'Wykorzystanie środka wykresu do dedukcji pominiętych podmiotów w paragrafach', 'sv': 'Använda grafmått för att avdrage utelämnade enheter i paragrafer', 'ur': 'گراف مطالعہ کو پاراگراف میں غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غیر غ', 'so': 'Isticmaalidda qiyaastii Graph ee degenaanshaha ee baaraargada', 'ta': 'அளபுருக்களில் ஒதுக்கப்பட்ட உள்ளீடுகளை நீக்க வரைபடத்தின் அளவை பயன்படுத்துகிறது', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dùng thước đo đồ họa cho các đơn vị mặc dù hạn trong Đoạn Đoạn', 'bg': 'Използване на графична мярка за приспадане на пропуснати субекти в параграфи', 'hr': 'Koristenje mjere grafika za smanjenje ometanih podataka u odstavcima', 'nl': "Gebruik van grafiekmaatregel om weggelaten entiteiten in alinea's in te trekken", 'da': 'Anvendelse af grafforanstaltninger til fradrag af udeladte enheder i afsnit', 'de': 'Verwendung von Graph Measure, um ausgelassene Entitäten in Absätzen abzuziehen', 'id': 'Menggunakan Ukuran Graf untuk mengurangi Entitas Terlepas dalam Paragraf', 'ko': '도측도를 이용하여 단락에서 생략된 실체를 추정하다', 'af': 'Gebruik Grafiese Maat om Omgekeerde Eenhede in Paragraaf te verwyder', 'tr': 'Grafik Etkinliklerini Paragraflarda Ewez etmek üçin ullanýar', 'sw': 'Kwa kutumia hatua ya Graph kwa ajili ya kuzuia kampeni zilizotolewa katika Paragraph', 'sq': 'Përdorimi i masave grafike për të zvogëluar njësitë e shpëtuara në paragrafa', 'fa': 'استفاده از اندازه\u200cهای گراف برای کاهش کردن شرکت\u200cهای پرده\u200cشده در پاراگراف', 'hy': 'Օգտագործելով գրաֆիկի չափումը առանցքներում բաց թողնելու համար', 'am': 'አዲስ ዶሴ ፍጠር', 'az': 'Grafik ölçüsünü Paragraflarda Bölüşdürülən Entitələri əskiltmək üçün istifadə edilir', 'bs': 'Koristenje mjere grafika za smanjenje ometanih podataka u odstavcima', 'ca': 'Utilitzar la mesura de gràfic per deduir les entitats omitidas als paràgrafs', 'fi': 'Graafisen toimenpiteen käyttäminen poisjätettyjen yhteisöjen vähentämiseen kappaleissa', 'bn': 'প্যারাগ্রাফ ব্যবহার করা হচ্ছে প্যারাগ্রাফের অমিটেড এন্টিটির জন্য', 'cs': 'Použití grafového opatření k odečtení opomenutých subjektů v odstavcích', 'et': 'Graafilise meetme kasutamine lõigetes loetletud üksuste mahaarvamiseks', 'jv': 'Ngawe Perintah Graph kang Dedusé Entité Omited nang Paragraphs', 'he': 'להשתמש במדידת גרף כדי לחלץ את היחידות המעופפות בתפרקים', 'sk': 'Uporaba grafičnega ukrepa za odbitek omejenih subjektov v odstavkih', 'ha': 'Utilizing Graph Measure to Deduce Omitted Entities in Paragraphs', 'bo': 'སྤྱད་ནས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་ཚད་ལྟར་ཡན་ལག་སྟར་བྱེད་པའི་སྣང་ཚུལ་ཚོད་འབྲི་བཞིན་པ'}
{'en': 'This demo deals with the problem of capturing omitted arguments in relation extraction given a proper knowledge base for entities of interest. This paper introduces the concept of a salient entity and use this information to deduce omitted entities in the paragraph which allows improving the relation extraction quality. The main idea to compute salient entities is to construct a graph on the given information (by identifying the entities but without parsing it), rank it with standard graph measures and embed it in the context of the sentences.', 'ar': 'يتعامل هذا العرض التوضيحي مع مشكلة التقاط الحجج المحذوفة في استخراج العلاقة مع إعطاء قاعدة معرفية مناسبة للكيانات ذات الاهتمام. تقدم هذه الورقة مفهوم الكيان البارز وتستخدم هذه المعلومات لاستنتاج الكيانات المحذوفة في الفقرة مما يسمح بتحسين جودة استخراج العلاقة. الفكرة الرئيسية لحساب الكيانات البارزة هي إنشاء رسم بياني للمعلومات المعينة (عن طريق تحديد الكيانات ولكن دون تحليلها) ، وتصنيفها بمقاييس الرسم البياني القياسية وتضمينها في سياق الجمل.', 'fr': "Cette démonstration traite du problème de la capture d'arguments omis lors de l'extraction de relations avec une base de connaissances appropriée pour les entités d'intérêt. Cet article introduit le concept d'entité saillante et utilise ces informations pour déduire les entités omises dans le paragraphe, ce qui permet d'améliorer la qualité de l'extraction des relations. L'idée principale pour calculer des entités saillantes est de construire un graphique sur les informations données (en identifiant les entités mais sans les analyser), de le classer avec des mesures graphiques standard et de l'intégrer dans le contexte des phrases.", 'es': 'Esta demostración trata el problema de capturar argumentos omitidos en la extracción de relaciones dada una base de conocimiento adecuada para las entidades de interés. Este artículo introduce el concepto de entidad destacada y utiliza esta información para deducir entidades omitidas en el párrafo, lo que permite mejorar la calidad de extracción de la relación. La idea principal para calcular las entidades destacadas es construir un gráfico sobre la información dada (identificando las entidades pero sin analizarla), clasificarlo con medidas gráficas estándar e integrarlo en el contexto de las oraciones.', 'pt': 'Esta demonstração lida com o problema de capturar argumentos omitidos na extração de relação, dada uma base de conhecimento adequada para entidades de interesse. Este artigo introduz o conceito de entidade saliente e utiliza esta informação para deduzir entidades omitidas no parágrafo o que permite melhorar a qualidade da extração da relação. A ideia principal para calcular entidades salientes é construir um gráfico sobre as informações fornecidas (identificando as entidades, mas sem analisá-las), classificá-las com medidas gráficas padrão e incorporá-las no contexto das frases.', 'ja': 'このデモでは、関心のあるエンティティの適切な知識ベースを考慮して、関連抽出で省略された引数をキャプチャする問題を扱います。本稿では、顕著な実体の概念を紹介し、この情報を用いて、関係抽出の質を向上させることができるパラグラフの省略された実体を推論する。顕著なエンティティを計算する主なアイデアは、与えられた情報に基づいてグラフを構築することです（エンティティを識別しますが、それを解析することはできません）、標準的なグラフメジャーでそれをランク付けし、文のコンテキストに埋め込むことです。', 'hi': 'यह डेमो संबंध निष्कर्षण में छोड़े गए तर्कों को कैप्चर करने की समस्या से संबंधित है, जो ब्याज की संस्थाओं के लिए एक उचित ज्ञान आधार दिया गया है। यह पेपर एक प्रमुख इकाई की अवधारणा का परिचय देता है और इस जानकारी का उपयोग पैराग्राफ में छोड़ी गई संस्थाओं को कम करने के लिए करता है जो संबंध निष्कर्षण गुणवत्ता में सुधार की अनुमति देता है। मुख्य संस्थाओं की गणना करने का मुख्य विचार दी गई जानकारी पर एक ग्राफ का निर्माण करना है (संस्थाओं की पहचान करके लेकिन इसे पार्स किए बिना), इसे मानक ग्राफ उपायों के साथ रैंक करें और इसे वाक्यों के संदर्भ में एम्बेड करें।', 'zh': '此治在关取省略参数,并为感趣之实体以给知识库。 本文引著实体之概,因此推断出段落中省略之实体,以重关系取质。 计著实之要,构一图于给定息(识实而不解析其),以标准图度量而序销其上下文。', 'ru': 'Это демо касается проблемы захвата пропущенных аргументов в отношении извлечения при наличии надлежащей базы знаний для объектов, представляющих интерес. В настоящем документе вводится понятие существенной сущности и эта информация используется для вывода опускаемых сущностей в параграфе, что позволяет улучшить качество извлечения отношений. Основная идея вычисления выраженных сущностей заключается в построении графа на заданной информации (путем идентификации сущностей, но без их анализа), ранжировании его по стандартным показателям графа и встраивании его в контекст предложений.', 'ga': 'Déileálann an taispeántas seo leis an bhfadhb a bhaineann le hargóintí a fágadh ar lár maidir le heastóscadh a ghabháil i bhfianaise bonn eolais ceart d’aonáin leasa. Tugann an páipéar seo coincheap an aonáin shuntasaigh isteach agus úsáidtear an fhaisnéis seo chun eintitis a fágadh ar lár sa mhír a bhaint amach a cheadaíonn feabhas a chur ar cháilíocht eastósctha an choibhneasa. Is é an príomh-smaoineamh le haonáin shuntasacha a ríomh ná graf a dhéanamh ar an eolas a thugtar (trí na heintitis a aithint ach gan é a pharsáil), é a rangú le tomhais chaighdeánacha ghraif agus é a leabú i gcomhthéacs na n-abairtí.', 'el': 'Αυτή η επίδειξη ασχολείται με το πρόβλημα της σύλληψης παραλειμμένων επιχειρημάτων σε σχέση με την εξαγωγή μιας κατάλληλης βάσης γνώσεων για οντότητες ενδιαφέροντος. Η παρούσα εργασία εισάγει την έννοια μιας σημαντικής οντότητας και χρησιμοποιεί αυτές τις πληροφορίες για να συμπεράνει τις παραλείψεις οντότητες στην παράγραφο που επιτρέπει τη βελτίωση της ποιότητας εξαγωγής σχέσης. Η κύρια ιδέα για τον υπολογισμό των σημαντικών οντοτήτων είναι να κατασκευάσουμε ένα γράφημα πάνω στις δεδομένες πληροφορίες (προσδιορίζοντας τις οντότητες αλλά χωρίς να τις αναλύσουμε), να το ταξινομήσουμε με τυποποιημένα μέτρα γραφής και να το ενσωματώσουμε στο πλαίσιο των προτάσεων.', 'hu': 'Ez a demó azzal a problémával foglalkozik, hogy a vonatkozások kivonásával kapcsolatos kihagyott argumentumokat rögzítsünk, amelyek megfelelő tudásbázist biztosítanak az érdeklődő entitások számára. Ez a tanulmány bemutatja a kiemelkedő entitás fogalmát, és ezeket az információkat arra használja, hogy levonhassa a kihagyott entitásokat a bekezdésben, amely lehetővé teszi a kapcsolatkivonás minőségének javítását. A kiemelkedő entitások kiszámításának fő ötlete az, hogy grafikont készítsünk az adott információról (az entitások azonosításával, de elemzés nélkül), rangsoroljuk a standard grafikonméretekkel és beágyazzuk a mondatok kontextusába.', 'ka': 'ეს დემოდომის შესახებ პრობლემა, რომელიც ინტერესტის ინტერესტიებისთვის მარტივი ცნობიერების ბაზა გადაიყენებული არსებული არსებულების შესახებ. ეს წერტილის კონფიგურაციას დააყენება სილექციური ინტერტიკის კონფიგურაციას და ამ ინფორმაციას გამოყენება, რომელიც პრაპაგრაფიკში გადასრულებული ინტერტიკების გადასრულ მნიშვნელოვანი იდეა, რომელიც გადაწყენებული ინფორმაციის გრაფიკურაცია (ინფორმაციის განსაზღვრებით, მაგრამ განაზღვრებით), გადაწყენება სტანდარტული გრაფიკური მიზემებით და გადაწყენება სიტყვებ', 'kk': 'Бұл демократия аргументтерді түсіру мәселесіне сәйкес келеді. Бұл аргументтерді қалай түсіру мүмкіндіктер үшін дұрыс білім негізі келтірілген. Бұл қағаз сәйкестік нысанның концепциясын келтіріп, бұл мәліметті бөлшектегі жоқ нысандарды есептеу үшін қолданылады. Бұл қағаз сәйкестік сапасын жақсарту мүмкінді Салиенттік нысандарды есептеу негізгі идеясы келтірілген мәліметтің графикасын құру (нысандарды анықтау арқылы, бірақ талдау арқылы), оны стандартты графикалық өлшемдермен сақтап, сөйлемелердің контекстіне ендіру.', 'it': "Questa demo affronta il problema di catturare argomenti omessi nell'estrazione di relazione data una base di conoscenza adeguata per le entità di interesse. Questo articolo introduce il concetto di entità saliente e utilizza queste informazioni per dedurre entità omesse nel paragrafo che consente di migliorare la qualità di estrazione della relazione. L'idea principale per calcolare entità salienti è quella di costruire un grafico sulle informazioni date (identificando le entità ma senza analizzarle), classificarlo con misure grafiche standard e incorporarlo nel contesto delle frasi.", 'ms': 'Demo ini berurusan dengan masalah menangkap argumen yang terlepas dalam pengekstrakan hubungan diberikan asas pengetahuan yang tepat untuk entiti yang berminat. Kertas ini memperkenalkan konsep entiti yang penting dan gunakan maklumat ini untuk kesimpulan entiti yang terlepas dalam paragraf yang membolehkan memperbaiki kualiti ekstraksi hubungan. Idea utama untuk menghitung entiti penting ialah membina graf pada maklumat yang diberikan (dengan mengenalpasti entiti tetapi tanpa menghurahkannya), mengatur dengan ukuran graf piawai dan memasukkannya dalam konteks kalimat.', 'ml': 'താല്\u200dപര്യമുള്ള വസ്തുക്കള്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടിയുള്ള വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d പിടിച്ചെടുക്കുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ പ്രശ്നത്തില്\u200d ഈ ഡെമോ പ്രശ്നം  ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഒരു സാറ്റന്\u200dറിയുടെ ആശയം പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുകയും ഈ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുകയും ചെയ്യുന്നു. ബന്ധം പുറത്തെടുക്കുന്നതിന്റെ സ കൊടുക്കപ്പെട്ട വിവരങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒരു ഗ്രാഫ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതാണു് (വസ്തുക്കളെ തിരിച്ചറിയുന്നതു് പക്ഷെ പാര്\u200dക്ക് ചെയ്യാതിരിക്കുന്നതു്) അതിനെ', 'mt': 'Din id-demostrazzjoni tittratta l-problem a tal-qbid ta’ argumenti omissi fir-rigward tal-estrazzjoni minħabba bażi ta’ għarfien xierqa għall-entitajiet ta’ interess. Dan id-dokument jintroduċi l-kunċett ta’ entità salienti u juża din l-informazzjoni biex jitnaqqsu l-entitajiet omissi fil-paragrafu li jippermetti titjib fil-kwalità tar-relazzjoni tal-estrazzjoni. L-idea ewlenija li jiġu kkalkulati entitajiet salienti hija li jinbena graff fuq l-informazzjoni mogħtija (billi jiġu identifikati l-entitajiet iżda mingħajr ma tiġi analizzata), tiġi kklassifikata b’miżuri standard ta’ graff u tinkorporata fil-kuntest tas-sentenzi.', 'mk': 'Оваа демонстрација се занимава со проблемот со снимањето на отпуштените аргументи во врска со извлекувањето со соодветна база на знаење за ентитетите од интерес. This paper introduces the concept of a salient entity and use this information to deduce omitted entities in the paragraph which allows improving the relation extraction quality.  The main idea to compute salient entities is to construct a graph on the given information (by identifying the entities but without parsing it), rank it with standard graph measures and embed it in the context of the sentences.', 'mn': 'Энэ демократ сонирхолтой байгууллагуудын тулд зөв мэдлэг суурь өгөгдсөн аргументуудыг авах асуудлыг харуулдаг. Энэ цаас шингээлтэй бүтээгдэхүүний ойлголтыг тайлбарлаж, энэ мэдээллийг тодорхойлох боломжтой холбоотой бүтээгдэхүүнийг гаргах чадварыг сайжруулахад ашигладаг. Цэвэрлэх элементүүдийг тооцоолох гол санаа бол өгсөн мэдээллийн график бүтээж (элементүүдийг тодорхойлох гэхдээ хуваалцахгүй), стандарт график хэмжээсүүдийг тооцоолж өгүүлбэрт оруулах юм.', 'lt': 'Šis demonstravimas sprendžia problem ą, susijusią su praleistų argumentų, susijusių su gavyba, surinkimu, atsižvelgiant į tinkamą suinteresuotųjų subjektų žinių bazę. Šiame dokumente įvedama svarbiausio ūkio subjekto sąvoka ir ši informacija naudojama neatsižvelgiamiems ūkio subjektams atskaityti toje dalyje, kuri leidžia pagerinti santykių gavybos kokybę. The main idea to compute salient entities is to construct a graph on the given information (by identifying the entities but without parsing it), rank it with standard graph measures and embed it in the context of the sentences.', 'no': 'Denne demonstrasjonen gjer problemet med å henta omilte argumenter i forhold til utpakking, som gjev eit rett kunnskapsbasen for interessante einingar. Denne papiret introduserer konsepten på ein salient entitet og bruker denne informasjonen for å dekryptera utgåte entiteter i avsnittet som tillater å forbetra relasjonskvaliteten til utpakking. Hovudsideen for å rekna ut salient- einingar er å konstruere eit graf på den oppgjevne informasjonen (ved identifisering av einingar, men utan tolking av dei), å rekna det med standardige grafmålingar og innbøyra det i konteksten av setningane.', 'sr': 'Ovaj demo se odnosi na problem uhvaćenja omiljenih argumenata u odnosu na ekstrakciju s obzirom na pravu bazu znanja za entitate interesa. Ovaj papir predstavlja koncept salijenog entiteta i koristi ovu informaciju kako bi se odbacili ostavljene entitete u odstavci koji omogućava poboljšanje kvalitete izvlačenja odnosa. Glavna ideja da raèunamo salijantne entitete je da izgradimo grafik o odreðenoj informaciji (identifikovanjem entiteta ali bez analize), da ga postavimo standardnim grafičkim mjerama i ukljuèimo u kontekst rečenica.', 'si': 'මේ ප්\u200dරධානය ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සම්බන්ධයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනුවෙන මේ පැත්තේ සිලියින් වලින් වලින් තියෙන්නේ සැලසුම් වලින් සැලසුම් සඳහා මේ තොරතුරු භාවිතා කරනවා මේ පැත්තේ අතිරික් ප්\u200dරධාන අදහසක් විශ්වාස කරන්න ප්\u200dරධාන අදහසක් තමයි දෙන්න තොරතුරු ග්\u200dරාෆ් එකක් නිර්මාණය කරන්න (පරීක්ෂණය නැති විශ්වාස කරන්න), ස්ථානි', 'pl': 'Demo zajmuje się problemem uchwycenia pominiętych argumentów w ekstrakcji relacji przy zapewnieniu odpowiedniej bazy wiedzy dla podmiotów interesujących. W artykule przedstawiono koncepcję istotnego podmiotu i wykorzystuje te informacje do wywnioskowania pominiętych podmiotów w akapicie, co pozwala na poprawę jakości ekstrakcji relacji. Głównym pomysłem obliczania istotnych jednostek jest skonstruowanie wykresu na podanych informacjach (poprzez identyfikację jednostek, ale bez jego analizowania), porównanie go ze standardowymi miarami wykresu i osadzenie go w kontekście zdań.', 'ro': 'Acest demo abordează problema capturării argumentelor omise în legătură cu extragerea relației, dată fiind o bază de cunoștințe adecvată pentru entitățile de interes. Această lucrare introduce conceptul de entitate importantă și utilizează aceste informații pentru a deduce entitățile omise din paragraf, ceea ce permite îmbunătățirea calității extragerii relației. Ideea principală de a calcula entitățile saliente este de a construi un grafic pe informațiile date (prin identificarea entităților, dar fără a le analiza), de a-l clasifica cu măsuri grafice standard și de a-l încorpora în contextul propozițiilor.', 'sv': 'Denna demo behandlar problemet med att fånga utelämnade argument i relation utvinning givet en lämplig kunskapsbas för enheter av intresse. Denna uppsats introducerar begreppet en framträdande entitet och använder denna information för att härleda utelämnade entiteter i stycket vilket gör det möjligt att förbättra relationsutdragningskvaliteten. Huvudidén för att beräkna framträdande entiteter är att konstruera en graf på den givna informationen (genom att identifiera entiteterna men utan att tolka den), rangordna den med standardgrafmått och bädda in den i sammanhanget med meningarna.', 'ta': 'இந்த குறிப்பு விட்டுவிடப்பட்ட தொடர்பு வெளியீட்டில் விளக்கங்களை எடு இந்த தாள் ஒரு விற்பனை பொருளின் கருத்தினை குறிப்பிடுகிறது மற்றும் இந்த தகவலை பயன்படுத்தி தவிர்க்கப்பட்ட உருப்படிகளை பத்தில் வெளியேற விற்பனை பொருள்களை கணக்கிட முக்கிய கருத்து கொடுக்கப்பட்ட தகவல்களின் மேல் வரைபடத்தை உருவாக்க (பொருள்களை அடையாளம் ஆனால் பாகுபடாமல்) நிலையான வரைகலை அளவு', 'ur': 'یہ ڈیمو اس مشکل کے بارے میں مشکل ہے کہ علاقه کے اختیاروں کے لئے ایک ٹھیک علم بنسس کے ساتھ چھوڑ دیے جاتے ہیں. This paper introduces the concept of a salient entity and use this information to deduct missing entities in the paragraph which allows improvement of the relationship extraction quality. اسلایٹ ایٹیونیٹوں کی کمپیوٹ کرنے کی اصلی نظر یہ ہے کہ عطا کیے ہوئے معلومات پر ایک گراف بنائیں (انٹیونیٹوں کو پہچان کر لیکن اسے پارس نہ کریں) اسے استاندارڈ گراف اندازے سے رنگ کریں اور اس کو جماعت کے کنارے میں داخل کریں.', 'so': 'Deemadaas wuxuu ka baaraandegayaa dhibaatada la qabsashada wadajirka la xiriira la soo saaray, taasoo lagu siiyo aasaaska aqoonta saxda ah ee ay tahay mid xiiseynaya. Kanu wuxuu soo bandhigayaa fikrada jidhka, wuxuuna isticmaalaa macluumaadkaas si ay u gaaraan alaabta aan laga reebin, kaas oo u ogolaada inuu kordhiyo qiimaha soo bixinta xiriirka. Fikirada ugu horeysa in lagu xisaabiyo alaabta mushaarku waa in lagu sameynayo sawir ku saabsan macluumaadka la siiyey (marka lagu aqoonsado alaabta, laakiin aan la baarayn), si lagu qiyaaso qiyaastii standardka ah oo lagu qoro qoraalka.', 'uz': 'Name Ushbu qog\xa0Ľoz sahifaning fikrini ko\xa0Ľrsatish va bu ma\xa0ľlumotni qo\xa0Ľllash mumkin. Ulanish sifatini oshirish imkoniyatini bajaradi. Name', 'vi': 'Đối tượng này giải quyết vấn đề bắt giữ các lý lẽ không được liệt kê về cách khai thác các mối quan hệ dựa trên kiến thức thích đáng cho các thực thể thú vị. Tờ giấy này giới thiệu khái niệm về một thực thể nổi tiếng và dùng thông tin này để suy luận các thực thể bị bỏ quên trong đoạn này, cho phép cải thiện chất lượng hấp dẫn. Điều quan trọng nhất để tính to án các thực thể nổi tiếng là xây dựng một đồ thị dựa trên thông tin đã đưa ra (bằng cách xác định các thực thể mà không phân tích nó), phân cấp nó bằng các biện pháp đồ thị tiêu chuẩn và cấy nó vào trong các câu.', 'nl': 'Deze demo behandelt het probleem van het vastleggen van weggelaten argumenten in relatie extractie met een goede kennisbasis voor entiteiten van belang. Dit artikel introduceert het concept van een opvallende entiteit en gebruikt deze informatie om weggelaten entiteiten in de paragraaf af te leiden, waardoor de kwaliteit van de relatieontwikkeling kan worden verbeterd. Het belangrijkste idee om opvallende entiteiten te berekenen is om een grafiek te construeren op de gegeven informatie (door de entiteiten te identificeren maar zonder deze te parsen), te rangschikken met standaard grafiekmaten en het in te sluiten in de context van de zinnen.', 'bg': 'Това демо разглежда проблема с улавянето на пропуснати аргументи във връзка с извличането на връзка, като се дава подходяща база от знания за субектите от интерес. В настоящата статия се въвежда концепцията за видно образувание и се използва тази информация, за да се извадят пропуснати образувания в абзаца, което позволява подобряване на качеството на извличане на връзката. Основната идея за изчисляване на видните обекти е да се изгради графика върху дадената информация (като се идентифицират същностите, но без да се анализира), да се класира със стандартни графични мерки и да се вгради в контекста на изреченията.', 'da': 'Denne demo beskæftiger sig med problemet med at fange udeladte argumenter i relation ekstraktion givet en ordentlig vidensbase for enheder af interesse. Dette dokument introducerer begrebet en fremtrædende enhed og bruger disse oplysninger til at udlede udeladte enheder i afsnittet, som gør det muligt at forbedre relationsudvindingskvaliteten. Hovedideen til at beregne fremtrædende enheder er at konstruere en graf på de givne oplysninger (ved at identificere enhederne, men uden at fortolke det), rangere det med standard grafmål og integrere det i konteksten af sætningerne.', 'hr': 'Ovaj demo se odnosi na problem uhvaćenja omiljenih argumenata u odnosu na ekstrakciju s obzirom na odgovarajuću bazu znanja za subjekte interesa. Ovaj papir predstavlja koncept salijanog subjekta i koristi te informacije kako bi se smanjili ostavljene subjekte u odstavci koji omogućava poboljšati kvalitet izvlačenja odnosa. Glavna ideja za računalo salijanih subjekta je izgraditi graf o određenim informacijama (identificirajući subjekte ali bez analize), postaviti ga standardnim mjerama grafika i ugrađivati ga u kontekstu rečenica.', 'de': 'Diese Demo befasst sich mit dem Problem, ausgelassene Argumente bei der Beziehungsextraktion zu erfassen, wenn eine angemessene Wissensbasis für Entitäten von Interesse vorhanden ist. Diese Arbeit stellt das Konzept einer salienten Entität vor und verwendet diese Informationen, um ausgelassene Entitäten im Absatz abzuleiten, was eine Verbesserung der Beziehungsextraktionsqualität ermöglicht. Die Hauptidee zur Berechnung von auffälligen Entitäten besteht darin, einen Graphen auf der gegebenen Information zu konstruieren (indem die Entitäten identifiziert werden, aber ohne sie zu parsen), ihn mit Standardgraphenmaßwerten zu rangieren und in den Kontext der Sätze einzubetten.', 'ko': '본 시연은 관계 추출에서 생략된 파라미터를 포획하는 문제를 처리하여 관심 있는 실체에 적당한 지식 라이브러리를 제공할 것이다.본고는 현저한 실체 개념을 도입하고 이 정보를 이용하여 단락에서 생략된 실체를 추정하여 관계 추출의 질을 향상시킨다.현저한 실체를 계산하는 주요 사상은 주어진 정보에 하나의 그림(실체를 식별하지만 실체를 해석하지 않음)을 구성하고 표준적인 도량으로 이를 정렬하여 문장의 상하문에 삽입하는 것이다.', 'fa': 'این نمایش با مشکل گرفتن arguments omitted در ارتباط استخراج به عنوان یک پایگاه دانش مناسب برای شرکتهای سود است. این کاغذ مفهوم یک شرکت استفاده می\u200cکند و از این اطلاعات استفاده می\u200cکند تا از شرکت\u200cهای استفاده شده در پاراگراف تخمین کند که اجازه می\u200cدهد کیفیت استخراج ارتباط را بهتر کند. ایده اصلی برای محاسبه کردن شرکت\u200cهای طبیعی این است که یک گراف بر اطلاعات داده شده ساخته شود (با شناسایی شرکت\u200cها ولی بدون تقسیم آن) با اندازه\u200cهای گراف استاندارد آن را با اندازه\u200cهای گراف و در محیط جمله\u200cها وارد کنید.', 'sw': 'Demo hii inahusiana na tatizo la kuchukua hoja zisizo na maana yanayoachwa kuhusiana na uteuzi uliotokana na msingi wa maarifa sahihi kwa vitu vya maslahi. Gazeti hili linaonyesha dhana ya muumbaji na kutumia taarifa hii ili kutambua vifaa vilivyoachwa katika paragraph ambayo inaruhusu kuboresha kiwango cha utoaji wa uhusiano. Wazo kuu la kuhesabu vifaa vya mauzaji ni kutengeneza picha juu ya taarifa zilizopewa (kwa kutambua taasisi hizo lakini bila kuichapisha), kuingiza kwa hatua za kawaida na kuingiza katika muktadha wa hukumu hizo.', 'id': 'Demo ini berurusan dengan masalah menangkap argumen yang dilupakan dalam hubungan ekstraksi diberikan dasar pengetahuan yang tepat untuk entitas yang tertarik. This paper introduces the concept of a salient entity and use this information to deduce omitted entities in the paragraph which allows improving the relation extraction quality.  Ide utama untuk menghitung entitas yang penting adalah untuk membangun grafik pada informasi yang diberikan (dengan mengidentifikasi entitas tetapi tanpa menghindarinya), mengatur dengan ukuran grafik standar dan memasukkannya dalam konteks kalimat.', 'af': "Hierdie demo verwerk met die probleem van verwerpgemaakte argumente in verhouding van uittrekking gegee 'n regte kennis basis vir entiteite van belang. Hierdie papier introduseer die konsepte van 'n salient entiteit en gebruik hierdie inligting om verwerp entiteite in die paragraaf te uittrek wat toelaat die verwanting van uittrekkingkwaliteit verbeter. Die hoofde idee om salient entiteite te bereken is om 'n graaf op die gegewe inligting te konstrukteer (deur die entiteite identifiseer maar sonder dit te ontlees), dit met standaard graaf maatskappe te reken en dit in die konteks van die teikens inbêer.", 'am': 'ይህ አዲስ የውይይት ማስታወቂያ ውይይት ለመውጣት የተሻለ እውቀት መቀመጫ ነው፡፡ ይህ ገጽ የግል አካባቢ አካባቢውን ያስታውሳል፣ ይህንም መረጃ በክፍሉ ውስጥ በተዉት አካላትን ለመግለጥ ይቻላል፡፡ የግል አካባቢዎች መቆጣጠር የዋነኛው አካሄድ በተሰጠው መረጃዎች ላይ መዝገብ ነው (አካባቢዎችን ማረጋገጥ ግን ማዘጋጀት አይችልም), በተደላደል ቀለም መጠቀሚያ እና በተቃዋሚው ክፍል ውስጥ ክፍል ውስጥ አግኝቷል፡፡', 'tr': 'Bu demo gyzyklanýan guramlar üçin dogry bilim üssüni golaýlaşdyrmak meselesi bilen çykýar. Bu kagyz salient bir zatyň düşünjüni tanyşdyrýar we bu maglumaty paragrafda terk edilen guramlary çykarmak üçin ullanýar. Bu hat harplary çykarmak howpsuzlygyny geliştirmege mümkin edýär. Sösalient gabdalyklary hasaplamak üçin esasy ideýa berilen maglumatyň bir grafiki in şa etmekdir (zatlary tanyşdyrmak üçin, oňa tanyşdyrmadyk bolsa), ony standart grafik ölçümleri bilen düzümlendir we sözleriň kontekstinde girdir.', 'hy': 'Այս դեմոն լուծում է խնդիրը, որ վերցնում է բաց թողնված բանավեճերը հանելու հարաբերության մեջ, որոնք համապատասխան գիտելիքի հիմք են տալիս հետաքրքրված կազմակերպություններին: Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է կարևոր միավորի գաղափարը և օգտագործում է այս տեղեկատվությունը բաժանում բացահայտված միավորների հանելու համար, որը թույլ է տալիս բարելավել հարաբերությունների վերացման որակը: Հիմնական գաղափարն այն է, որ հաշվարկենք հիմնական միավորները, որ կառուցենք տվյալ տեղեկատվության վրա գծագիր (անվանելով միավորները, բայց առանց վերլուծելու դրանք), դասավորենք այն ստանդարտ գծագիր չափով և ներառենք այն նախադասությունների կոնտեքստում:', 'sq': 'Kjo demo merret me problem in e kapjes së argumenteve të braktisura në lidhje me nxjerrjen e dhënë një bazë njohurie të përshtatshme për njësitë e interesit. Ky dokument fut konceptin e një njësie të rëndësishme dhe përdorë këtë informacion për të përfshirë njësitë e braktisura në paragraf që lejon përmirësimin e cilësisë së nxjerrjes së marrëdhënieve. Ideja kryesore për të llogaritur njësitë e rëndësishme është të ndërtohet një grafik mbi informacionin e dhënë (duke identifikuar njësitë por pa e analizuar), të renditet me masa standarde grafike dhe të përfshihet në kontekstin e fjalëve.', 'az': 'Bu demo istifadə edən məsələlər üçün müəyyən bir bilgi bazı verilmiş olaraq tərk edilmiş argumentləri almaq problemi ilə çəkilir. Bu kağıt çətinlikli bir məlumatın fikrini təşkil edir və bu məlumatı paragrafdakı tərk edilən məlumatı çəkmək üçün istifadə edir ki, əlaqəsi çıxarmaq keyfiyyətini yaxşılaşdırmağa imkan verir. Səlilin məlumatlarını hesablamaq üçün əsas fikir verilən məlumatların grafını in şa etməkdir (məlumatları tanımayaraq, onu ayırmadan), standart graflı ölçüləri ilə dəyişdirib cümlələrin məlumatlarına daxil etməkdir.', 'ca': "Aquesta demostració tracta del problem a de capturar arguments omitits en relació amb l'extracció, donant una base de coneixement adequada a entitats d'interess. Aquest paper introdueix el concepte d'una entitat salient i utilitza aquesta informació per deduir entitats omitidas al paràgraf que permet millorar la qualitat de l'extracció de relació. La idea principal de calcular les entitats salients és construir un gràfic sobre la informació dada (identificant les entitats però sense analitzar-la), classificar-la amb mesures estàndard de gràfic i incorporar-la en el context de les frases.", 'cs': 'Tato demo se zabývá problematikou zachycení vynechaných argumentů při extrakci vztahů za předpokladu správné znalostní báze pro subjekty zájmu. Tento článek představuje koncept významné entity a využívá těchto informací k odvození vynechaných entit v odstavci, což umožňuje zlepšit kvalitu extrakce vztahu. Hlavní myšlenkou výpočtu významných entit je sestavit graf na dané informaci (identifikací entit, ale bez jej analýzy), zařadit jej standardními grafovými měřítky a vložit do kontextu vět.', 'fi': 'Tämä demo käsittelee ongelmaa, joka koskee puuttuvien argumenttien kaappaamista suhteessa poimimiseen, koska sillä on asianmukainen tietopohja kiinnostuksen kohteena oleville yhteisöille. Tämä artikkeli esittelee merkittävän kokonaisuuden käsitteen ja käyttää näitä tietoja päätelläkseen kappaleesta puuttuvat kokonaisuudet, mikä mahdollistaa suhteen uuttamisen laadun parantamisen. Tärkein ajatus merkittävien entiteettien laskennassa on rakentaa graafi annetusta tiedosta (tunnistamalla entiteetit mutta jäsentämättä sitä), sijoittaa se standardimittareilla ja upottaa se lauseiden kontekstiin.', 'bn': 'এই গণতন্ত্রের ব্যাপারে স্বার্থের জন্য একটি সঠিক জ্ঞানের বেস দিয়েছে যে বিষয়বস্তুর জন্য ছাড়া যাওয়া যুক্তি নিয়ে যা এই পত্রিকাটি একটি ব্যবহারকারী বস্তুর ধারণাকে উপস্থাপন করে এবং এই তথ্য ব্যবহার করে প্যাপ্লাগে ছেড়ে যাওয়া বস্তুগুলো নির্ধারণ করার জন্য যা সম্পর্ প্রধান ধারণা হচ্ছে প্রদত্ত তথ্যের উপর একটি গ্রাফ তৈরি করা (বস্তুকে চিহ্নিত করে কিন্তু পার্সিং ছাড়াই) এটি স্থান্ডার গ্রাফ পদক্ষেপ দিয়ে স্থাপন', 'bs': 'Ovaj demo se odnosi na problem uhvaćenja omiljenih argumenata u odnosu na ekstrakciju s obzirom na pravu bazu znanja za entitate interesa. Ovaj papir predstavlja koncept salijenog subjekta i koristi ovu informaciju kako bi se odbacili ostavljene subjekte u odstavci koji omogućava poboljšanje kvalitete izvlačenja odnosa. Glavna ideja za računalo salijantnih entitata je izgraditi graf o određenoj informaciji (identificirajući entitete ali bez analize), rankirati ga standardnim grafskim mjerama i ugrađivati ga u kontekstu rečenica.', 'et': 'See demo käsitleb probleemi, mis puudutab puuduvate argumentide kogumist seose ekstraheerimisel, pakkudes huvi pakkuvatele üksustele nõuetekohast teadmistebaasi. Käesolevas dokumendis tutvustatakse silmapaistva üksuse mõistet ja kasutatakse seda teavet lõikes välja jäetud üksuste järeldamiseks, mis võimaldab parandada seose ekstraheerimise kvaliteeti. Peamine idee silmapaistvate üksuste arvutamiseks on luua graafik antud teabe kohta (identifitseerides üksused, kuid seda parsimiseta), järjestada see standardsete graafikumõõdudega ja manustada see lausete konteksti.', 'jv': 'Dimension iki trus mengko perkoro sing nggawe kelompok aturan spikeng pangan ning rabi luwih dumateng, winih dumateng kita dipenepakan kelompok nggo wong liyane Perintah iki dadi nggawe kelompok Entèni sing luwih hayo lan gambar informasi iki bakal ngubah Entèni sing beraksi kanggo ingkang dipunangé kapan tanggal nggap Jejaring', 'he': 'הדמו הזה מתמודד עם הבעיה של לתפוס ויכוחים שנעלמו בנוגע לחלץ יחסים נתן בסיס ידע מתאים ליחידות של עניין. העבודה הזו מכניסה את הרעיון של יחידה מפורסמת ושימוש במידע הזה כדי להעלות יחידות שנעלמו בפרק שמאפשרת לשפר את איכות היחסים. הרעיון העיקרי לחשב יחידות מפורסמות הוא לבנות גרף על המידע הנתון (על ידי זיהוי היחידות אבל בלי לחקור אותו), לדרג אותו במדידות גרף סטנדרטיים ולקבל אותו בתוך הקשר של המשפטים.', 'ha': "Wannan diode yana shawarar da matsayin ka kãma argument da ba'a yi saurãre ba a cikin shirin cire da aka ba da wani bane ga masu sani na daman riba. Wannan takardan na ƙunsa da zaɓen wani abu mai salon da kuma ya yi amfani da wannan maɓalli dõmin ya cire abubuwa da aka bari a cikin Paragran da ya yarda da gyãra tsarin masu cire-abun. Maɓani na ƙidãya wa abun salitacce shine ya sami wani grafi na kan maɓallin da aka ba (da za'a gane abun amma idan ba'a yi parse da shi ba), ka sarrafa shi da gwargwadon ƙaddari na daidaita kuma ka shigar da shi cikin mazaunin gafala.", 'sk': 'Ta demo obravnava problem zajemanja izpuščenih argumentov v zvezi s pridobivanjem relacij z ustrezno bazo znanja za interesne subjekte. Ta prispevek uvaja koncept pomembnega subjekta in uporablja te informacije za sklepanje izpuščenih subjektov v odstavku, ki omogoča izboljšanje kakovosti ekstrakcije relacije. Glavna ideja za izračun pomembnih entitet je graditi graf na danih informacijah (z identifikacijo entitet, vendar brez razčlenitve), ga razvrstiti s standardnimi grafičnimi merili in ga vgraditi v kontekst stavkov.', 'bo': 'སྤྱི་ཚོགས་ཀྱི་འཛམ་གླིང་འདིས་དུས་གཏོང་ཁང་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་སྒྲུབ་རྟགས་ལ་འཛིན་ཐབས་བའི་དཀའ་ངལ་བ་དང་མཐུན་ཁང་ཞིག་ ཤོག The main idea to compute salient entities is to construct a graph on the given information (by identifying the entities but without parsing it), rank it with standard graph measures and embed it in the context of the sentences.'}
{'en': 'SetExpander : End-to-end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi-Context Term Embeddings', 'ar': 'SetExpander: توسيع مجموعة المصطلح من طرف إلى طرف استنادًا إلى عمليات تضمين مصطلح متعدد السياقات', 'pt': 'SetExpander: Expansão do conjunto de termos de ponta a ponta com base em incorporações de termos de vários contextos', 'fr': "SetExpander\xa0: extension d'ensemble de termes de bout en bout basée sur des intégrations de termes multi-contextes", 'es': 'SetExpander: expansión de conjuntos de términos de extremo a extremo basada en incrustaciones de términos multicontexto', 'ja': 'SetExpander:マルチコンテキスト用語埋め込みに基づくエンドツーエンド用語セットの拡張', 'zh': 'SetExpander:基于多上下文术语嵌端术语集衍', 'ru': 'SetExpander: Сквозное расширение набора терминов на основе мультиконтекстных вложений терминов', 'hi': 'SetExpander: एंड-टू-एंड टर्म सेट विस्तार बहु-प्रसंग शब्द एम्बेडिंग के आधार पर', 'ga': 'SetExpander: Leathnú Tacair Téarma Deireadh go Deireadh Bunaithe ar Leabaithe Téarma Il-Chomhthéacs', 'hu': 'SetExpander: End-to-end kifejezéskészlet bővítése többkörnyezeti kifejezések alapján', 'ka': 'გაფართლებელი: ბოლოდან ბოლოდან ბოლოდან დასრულებული ტერმინის გაფართლების გაფართება', 'el': 'Επέκταση συνόλου όρων από τέλος σε τέλος βασισμένη σε ενσωμάτωση όρων πολλαπλών πλαισίων', 'kk': 'Жаңартушыны орнату: Көптеген контексті терминдің ендіріміне негізделген ең жаңартуын орнату', 'it': 'SetExpander: Espansione end-to-end del set di termini basata su incorporazioni di termini multi-contesto', 'ms': 'SetExpander: Setkan Kembangan Setkan Terma Akhir-Akhir Berdasarkan Pencampuran Terma Berkonteks Berberbilang', 'ml': 'സെറ്റ്Expander: End- to- end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi- Context Term Embeddings', 'lt': 'SetExpander: Term Set Expansion Based on Multi-Context Term Embeddings', 'mk': 'Сет', 'mt': 'SetExpander: End-to-end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi-Context Term Embeddings', 'ro': 'SetExpander: Expansiune completă a setului de termeni bazată pe încorporări de termeni multi-context', 'mn': 'Тодруулагч: Эцэст хүртэл төгсгөл термин Олон-контекст термин нэмж', 'no': 'Vel utvidar: Slutt- til- slutt- termin Vel utviding basert på fleire konteksttermin- innbygging', 'pl': 'SetExpander: kompleksowe rozszerzenie zestawu terminów oparte na wielokontekstowych osadzeniach terminów', 'sv': 'SetExpander: Utvidgning av termuppsättningar från slut till slut baserad på inbäddade termer med flera kontexter', 'ta': 'விரிவாக்கி', 'sr': 'SetExpander: Term za kraj na kraj postavi proširenje na osnovu uključenja višekontekstskih termina', 'si': 'ප්\u200dරසාරකය සැකසුම් කරන්න: අවසාන අවසාන අවසාන අවසාන අවසානය සැකසුම් විසාරයක් ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරසාරකය අවසානය', 'so': 'SetExpander: End-to-end Term Set Expansion Based on Meelaha Soohdinta badan', 'ur': 'SetExpander: End- to- end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi Context Term Embeddings', 'uz': 'SeshExpander: End to- end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi- Content Term Embedments', 'vi': 'Thiết lập mở rộng: các môi trường đặt tới cuối cùng', 'bg': 'SetExpander: разширение на набор от термини от край до край въз основа на вграждания на термини от няколко контекста', 'nl': 'SetExpander: End-to-end Term Set Uitbreiding op basis van Multi-Context Term Embeddings', 'hr': 'SetExpander: Term za kraj na kraj postavi proširenje na osnovu uključenja višekontekstnih termina', 'da': 'SetExpander: End-to-end termsæt udvidelse baseret på multi-kontekst term integrering', 'de': 'SetExpander: End-to-End Term Set Erweiterung basierend auf Multi-Context Term Embeddings', 'id': 'SetExpander: End-to-end Term Set Expansion Berdasarkan Term Embedding Multi-Context', 'ko': 'SetExpander: 다중 상하문 용어를 기반으로 한 포괄적인 용어집 확장', 'fa': 'تنظیم گسترش\u200cدهنده: Term End- to- end تنظیم گسترش بر پایه\u200cبندی Term Multi Context', 'sw': 'Expander: End-to-end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi-Content Term Embedding', 'af': 'Stel Uitbreiding: Einde- na- einde Term Stel Uitbreiding Baseer op Veelvuldige Konteks Term Inbeeldings', 'tr': 'Çaplanjak', 'sq': 'SetExpander: End-to-end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi-Context Term Embeddings', 'am': 'Expander: End-to-end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi-Context Term Embeddings', 'hy': 'Տեղադրել', 'az': '쿮lav톛 Et', 'bn': 'SetExpander: End-to-end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi-Context Term Embeddings', 'ca': 'SetExpander: Extensió del conjunt de termes de final a final basada en incorporacions de termes multicontextuals', 'bs': 'SetExpander: Term do kraja postavi proširenje na osnovu uključenja višekontekstskih termina', 'cs': 'SetExpander: Rozšíření sady termínů od konce do konce založené na vícekontextových vloženích termínů', 'et': 'SetExpander: lõpust lõpuni terminikomplekti laiendus, mis põhineb mitme konteksti termini manustamisel', 'fi': 'SetExpander: P채채t채 p채채h채n -termijoukon laajennus, joka perustuu usean kontekstin termien upotuksiin', 'jv': 'Expander: End-to-end Terminal Set Expansion', 'he': 'SetExpander', 'sk': 'SetExpander: razširitev nabora izrazov od konca do konca, ki temelji na vdelah večkontekstnih izrazov', 'ha': 'SetExpander: End-to-end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi-Context Term Embeddings', 'bo': 'SetExpander: End-to-end Term Set Expansion Based on Multi-Context Term Embeddings'}
{'en': 'We present SetExpander, a corpus-based system for expanding a seed set of terms into a more complete set of terms that belong to the same semantic class. SetExpander implements an iterative end-to end workflow for term set expansion. It enables users to easily select a seed set of terms, expand it, view the expanded set, validate it, re-expand the validated set and store it, thus simplifying the extraction of domain-specific fine-grained semantic classes. SetExpander has been used for solving real-life use cases including integration in an automated recruitment system and an issues and defects resolution system. A video demo of SetExpander is available at https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv.', 'ar': 'نقدم SetExpander ، وهو نظام قائم على المجموعة لتوسيع مجموعة أولية من المصطلحات إلى مجموعة أكثر اكتمالاً من المصطلحات التي تنتمي إلى نفس الفئة الدلالية. يقوم SetExpander بتنفيذ سير عمل تكراري من طرف إلى طرف لتوسيع مجموعة المدة. إنه يمكّن المستخدمين من تحديد مجموعة أولية من المصطلحات بسهولة ، وتوسيعها ، وعرض المجموعة الموسعة ، والتحقق من صحتها ، وإعادة توسيع المجموعة التي تم التحقق من صحتها وتخزينها ، وبالتالي تبسيط استخراج الفئات الدلالية الدقيقة الخاصة بالمجال. تم استخدام SetExpander لحل حالات الاستخدام الواقعية بما في ذلك التكامل في نظام التوظيف الآلي ونظام حل المشكلات والعيوب. يتوفر عرض فيديو لـ SetExpander على https://drive.google.com/open؟id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o SetExpander, um sistema baseado em corpus para expandir um conjunto semente de termos em um conjunto mais completo de termos que pertencem à mesma classe semântica. O SetExpander implementa um fluxo de trabalho iterativo de ponta a ponta para expansão do conjunto de termos. Ele permite aos usuários selecionar facilmente um conjunto inicial de termos, expandi-lo, visualizar o conjunto expandido, validá-lo, re-expandir o conjunto validado e armazená-lo, simplificando assim a extração de classes semânticas refinadas específicas do domínio. O SetExpander foi usado para resolver casos de uso da vida real, incluindo integração em um sistema de recrutamento automatizado e um sistema de resolução de problemas e defeitos. Uma demonstração em vídeo do SetExpander está disponível em https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'es': 'Presentamos setExpander, un sistema basado en corpus para expandir un conjunto de términos semilla en un conjunto más completo de términos que pertenecen a la misma clase semántica. SetExpander implementa un flujo de trabajo iterativo de principio a fin para la expansión del conjunto de términos. Permite a los usuarios seleccionar fácilmente un conjunto inicial de términos, expandirlo, ver el conjunto ampliado, validarlo, volver a expandir el conjunto validado y almacenarlo, simplificando así la extracción de clases semánticas específicas del dominio. SetExpander se ha utilizado para resolver casos de uso de la vida real, incluida la integración en un sistema de contratación automatizado y un sistema de resolución de problemas y defectos. Hay disponible una demostración en vídeo de SetExpander en https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv.', 'fr': "Nous présentons SetExpander, un système basé sur corpus qui permet d'étendre un ensemble initial de termes en un ensemble plus complet de termes appartenant à la même classe sémantique. SetExpander implémente un flux de travail itératif de bout en bout pour l'extension des ensembles de termes. Il permet aux utilisateurs de sélectionner facilement un ensemble initial de termes, de le développer, de visualiser l'ensemble développé, de le valider, de réétendre l'ensemble validé et de le stocker, simplifiant ainsi l'extraction de classes sémantiques fines spécifiques au domaine. SetExpander a été utilisé pour résoudre des cas d'utilisation réels, y compris l'intégration dans un système de recrutement automatisé et un système de résolution des problèmes et des défauts. Une vidéo de démonstration de SetExpander est disponible à l'adresse https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv.", 'ja': 'SetExpanderは、シード用語のセットを同じセマンティッククラスに属するより完全な用語のセットに拡張するためのコーパスベースのシステムです。SetExpanderは、タームセット拡張のための反復的なエンドツーエンドのワークフローを実装します。これにより、ユーザーは簡単に用語のシードセットを選択し、展開し、展開されたセットを表示し、検証し、検証されたセットを再展開して保存することができ、ドメイン固有の細かいセマンティッククラスの抽出を簡素化できます。SetExpanderは、自動採用システムと問題および欠陥解決システムへの統合を含む、実際のユースケースを解決するために使用されています。SetExpanderのビデオデモはhttps://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rvでご覧いただけます。', 'hi': 'हम SetExpander, शब्दों के एक बीज सेट को एक ही शब्दार्थ वर्ग से संबंधित शब्दों के अधिक पूर्ण सेट में विस्तारित करने के लिए एक कॉर्पस-आधारित प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं। SetExpander शब्द सेट विस्तार के लिए एक पुनरावर्ती एंड-टू-एंड वर्कफ़्लो लागू करता है. यह उपयोगकर्ताओं को आसानी से शर्तों के बीज सेट का चयन करने, इसका विस्तार करने, विस्तारित सेट को देखने, इसे मान्य करने, मान्य सेट को फिर से विस्तारित करने और इसे स्टोर करने में सक्षम बनाता है, इस प्रकार डोमेन-विशिष्ट ठीक-दाने वाले शब्दार्थ वर्गों के निष्कर्षण को सरल बनाता है। SetExpander का उपयोग वास्तविक जीवन के उपयोग के मामलों को हल करने के लिए किया गया है जिसमें एक स्वचालित भर्ती प्रणाली और एक मुद्दों और दोषों के समाधान प्रणाली में एकीकरण शामिल है। SetExpander का एक वीडियो डेमो https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv पर उपलब्ध है।', 'zh': '吾言 SetExpander者,语料库之统也,以广其种术语为一语义之类术语集。 SetExpander 为术语集致迭代端。 使用户得轻择术语种集,展之,视其所广,验之,复展者验集并存之,而简特定于域细粒度语义类之提取。 SetExpander既用于现实生活用例,至于自招聘系统及阙陷解之。 SetExpander之视频可 https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv。', 'ru': 'Представляем SetExpander, систему на основе корпуса для расширения семенного набора терминов в более полный набор терминов, которые принадлежат одному и тому же семантическому классу. SetExpander реализует итеративный сквозной рабочий процесс для расширения набора терминов. Это позволяет пользователям легко выбирать начальный набор терминов, расширять его, просматривать расширенный набор, проверять его, повторно расширять проверенный набор и хранить его, таким образом упрощая извлечение тонкозернистых семантических классов, специфичных для домена. SetExpander был использован для решения реальных случаев использования, включая интеграцию в автоматизированную систему подбора персонала и систему решения проблем и дефектов. Демонстрационный ролик SetExpander доступен по адресу https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'ga': 'Cuirimid SetExpander i láthair, córas atá bunaithe ar chorpas chun sraith síl téarmaí a leathnú go sraith téarmaí níos iomláine a bhaineann leis an aicme shéimeantach chéanna. Cuireann SetExpander sreabhadh oibre atriallach deireadh go deireadh i bhfeidhm le haghaidh leathnú tacair téarma. Cuireann sé ar chumas na n-úsáideoirí sraith síl téarmaí a roghnú go héasca, é a leathnú, féachaint ar an tacar méadaithe, é a bhailíochtú, an tacar bailíochtaithe a athleathnú agus é a stóráil, rud a shimplíonn eastóscadh aicmí séimeantaice míne atá sainiúil don fhearann. Baineadh úsáid as SetExpander chun cásanna úsáide fíorshaoil a réiteach lena n-áirítear comhtháthú i gcóras earcaíochta uathoibrithe agus córas réitigh fadhbanna agus lochtanna. Tá taispeántas físeáin de SetExpander ar fáil ag https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'ka': 'ჩვენ SetExpander-ს გამოყენებთ, რომელიც კოპუსური სისტემა, რომელიც უფრო დასრულებული სისტემაში იყოს იგივე სემენტიკური კლასის სისტემაში სისტემა. Name ეს მომხმარებელი ძალიან გამოიყენება სიტყვების სექტის გამოყენება, გაფართვა, გავაკეთება, გავაკეთება, გავაკეთებული სექტის გამოყენება და დამართვა, ამიტომ განსხვავება დიომინის სექტიფიკური სემენტიკური Name SetExpander- ის ვიდეო დემო ხელსაწყობილობაName https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a SetExpander-t, egy korpusz alapú rendszert, amely egy magkészletet kiterjeszt egy teljesebb kifejezéskészletre, amely ugyanahhoz a szemantikai osztályhoz tartozik. A SetExpander egy iteratív end-to-end munkafolyamatot hajt végre a kifejezéskészlet bővítéséhez. Lehetővé teszi a felhasználók számára, hogy egyszerűen kiválaszthassák a kifejezéseket, kiterjesszék azt, megtekinthessék a kibővített készletet, validálhassák azt, újra kiterjesszék a validált készletet és tárolják azt, így egyszerűsítve a tartomány-specifikus finomszemcsés szemantikai osztályok kinyerését. A SetExpander használatát valós használati esetek megoldására használták, beleértve az automatizált toborzási rendszerbe való integrációt, valamint egy probléma- és hibakezelési rendszert. A SetExpander videó demója elérhető a következő oldalon: https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα βασισμένο στο σώμα για την επέκταση ενός συνόλου όρων σε ένα πληρέστερο σύνολο όρων που ανήκουν στην ίδια σημασιολογική τάξη. Το υλοποιεί μια επαναλαμβανόμενη ροή εργασίας από το τέλος σε το τέλος για την επέκταση συνόλου όρων. Επιτρέπει στους χρήστες να επιλέξουν εύκολα ένα σύνολο όρων, να το επεκτείνουν, να το δουν, να το επικυρώσουν, να επεκτείνουν εκ νέου το επικυρωμένο σύνολο και να το αποθηκεύσουν, απλοποιώντας έτσι την εξαγωγή ειδικών σημασιολογικών κλάδων. Το έχει χρησιμοποιηθεί για την επίλυση πραγματικών περιπτώσεων χρήσης, συμπεριλαμβανομένης της ενσωμάτωσης σε ένα αυτοματοποιημένο σύστημα πρόσληψης και ένα σύστημα επίλυσης προβλημάτων και ελαττωμάτων. Μια επίδειξη βίντεο του SetExpander είναι διαθέσιμη στη διεύθυνση https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'kk': 'Біз SetExpander, корпус негізіндегі жүйесін бір семантикалық класына қатысты терминлер жиынын кеңейту үшін келтіреміз. Орнату Бұл пайдаланушылардың тәртібін оңай таңдау, кеңейтілген тәртібін көру, тексеру, тексерілген тәртібін қайта кеңейтіп сақтау мүмкіндігін мүмкіндік береді, сондықтан доменге ерекше тәртіпті семантикалық классын тарқату ү SetExpander автоматты түрде жұмыс істеу жүйесінде, мәселелерді және шешу жүйесінде жұмыс істеу үшін шын- өмір жүйесін шешу үшін қолданылды. SetExpander видео демократиясы бар https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'it': "Presentiamo SetExpander, un sistema basato su corpus per espandere un set di termini seed in un insieme più completo di termini che appartengono alla stessa classe semantica. SetExpander implementa un flusso di lavoro iterativo end-to-end per l'espansione del set di termini. Consente agli utenti di selezionare facilmente un set di termini seme, espanderlo, visualizzare il set espanso, convalidarlo, ri-espandere il set convalidato e memorizzarlo, semplificando così l'estrazione di classi semantiche a grana fine specifiche del dominio. SetExpander è stato utilizzato per risolvere casi d'uso reali, compresa l'integrazione in un sistema di reclutamento automatizzato e un sistema di risoluzione di problemi e difetti. Una demo video di SetExpander è disponibile su https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .", 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan SetExpander, sistem berasaskan corpus untuk mengembangkan set benih terma ke set terma yang lebih lengkap yang terma yang milik kelas semantik yang sama. SetExpander melaksanakan aliran kerja end-to-end iteratif untuk pengembangan set terma. Ia membolehkan pengguna memilih set benih terma dengan mudah, mengembangkannya, melihat set yang dikembangkan, sahkan ia, mengembangkan semula set yang sah dan simpan ia, dengan demikian mempermudahkan ekstraksi kelas semantik yang bersifat-spesifik domain. SetExpander telah digunakan untuk memecahkan kes penggunaan nyata termasuk integrasi dalam sistem rekrutan automatik dan sistem resolusi masalah dan cacat. Demo video SetExpander tersedia di https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome SetExpander, korpusu grindžiamą sistemą, skirtą išplėsti sėklos sąvokų rinkinį į išsamesnį sąvokų rinkinį, priklausantį tai pačiai semantinei klasei. SetExpander įgyvendina pakartotinį darbo srautą nuo pabaigos iki pabaigos, kad būtų galima išplėsti terminą. Ji leidžia naudotojams lengvai pasirinkti sėklos sąvokų rinkinį, išplėsti jį, peržiūrėti išplėstą rinkinį, patvirtinti jį, iš naujo išplėsti patvirtintą rinkinį ir saugoti jį, taip supaprastinant dominijai būdingų smulkiai grūdytų semantinių klasių ekstrahavimą. SetExpander buvo naudojamas realaus naudojimo atvejams spręsti, įskaitant integraciją į automatizuotą įdarbinimo sistemą ir problemų bei defektų sprendimo sistemą. Name https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'mk': 'Го претставуваме Сет Експандер, систем базиран на корпус за проширување на семето на повеќе комплетни термини кои припаѓаат на истата семантична класа. SetExpander имплементира итеративен тек од крај до крај за експанзија на поставениот термин. Тоа им овозможува на корисниците лесно да изберат семето на термини, да го прошират, да го погледнат проширениот семето, да го валидираат, повторно да го прошират валидираниот семето и да го зачуваат, со што ќе се поедностави екстракцијата на семантичните класи специфични за домен. SetExpander е употребен за решавање на случаите на искористување во реалниот живот, вклучително и интеграција во автоматизиран регрутирачки систем и систем за решавање на проблеми и дефекти. Name https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw SetExpander, sistema bbażata fuq il-korpus għall-espansjoni ta’ sett ta’ termini taż-żerriegħa f’sett aktar komplut ta’ termini li jappartjenu għall-istess klassi semantika. SetExpander jimplimenta fluss ta’ xogħol iterattiv minn tarf sa tarf għall-espansjoni tas-sett ta’ terminu. Jippermetti lill-utenti jagħżlu faċilment sett ta’ termini taż-żerriegħa, jespanduha, jarawha s-sett estiż, jivvalidawha, jespanduha mill-ġdid is-sett ivvalidat u jaħżnuha, u b’hekk jissimplifikaw l-estrazzjoni ta’ klassijiet semantiċi b’żerriegħa fina speċifiċi għad-dominju. SetExpander intuża għas-soluzzjoni ta’ każijiet ta’ użu fil-ħajja reali inkluż l-integrazzjoni f’sistema ta’ reklutaġġ awtomatizzata u sistema ta’ riżoluzzjoni ta’ kwistjonijiet u difetti. Demo video ta’ SetExpander hija disponibbli fuq https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'no': 'Vi presenterer SetExpander, eit korpusbasert system for å utvida ei frøsett av vilkår til ein meir fullstendig set av vilkår som tilhøyrer samme semantisk klasse. OppsettExpander implementerer ein iterativ slutt til slutt på arbeidsflate for utviding av utviding. Det gjer at brukarar kan velja ei setning av begreper enkelt, utvida den, visa utvida settet, validera den, utvida den validerte settet på nytt og lagra den, slik at du forenklar utpakkinga av domenespesifikke finkorne semantiske klasser. SetExpander er er brukt for å løysa tilfelle for bruk av verkeleg liv, inkludert integrering i eit automatisk rekrutteringssystem og eit problem og oppløysingssystem. Name https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy SetExpander, oparty na korpusie system rozszerzania zestawu terminów nasiennych na bardziej kompletny zestaw terminów należących do tej samej klasy semantycznej. SetExpander implementuje iteracyjny przepływ pracy od końca do końca dla rozszerzania zestawu terminów. Pozwala użytkownikom łatwo wybrać zestaw nasienny terminów, rozszerzyć go, przeglądać rozszerzony zestaw, walidację, ponownie rozszerzyć zweryfikowany zestaw i przechowywać go, upraszczając tym samym ekstrakcję drobnoziarnistych klas semantycznych specyficznych dla domeny. SetExpander został wykorzystany do rozwiązywania rzeczywistych przypadków użycia, w tym integracji z zautomatyzowanym systemem rekrutacji oraz systemem rozwiązywania problemów i wad. Demo wideo SetExpander jest dostępne na stronie internetowej https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'ml': 'നമ്മള്\u200d സെറ്റ്എക്സ്പാന്\u200dഡരെ കോര്\u200dപ്പുസ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് കാണിക്കുന്നത്. ഒരു വിത്തുകള്\u200d വികസിപ്പിക്കുന്നത SetExpander implements an iterative end-to end workflow for term set expansion.  അത് ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് വിത്രമുള്ള വിത്തുകള്\u200d തെരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാന്\u200d എളുപ്പമാക്കുന്നു, വിശാലമായ സെറ്റ് വിശാലമാക്കുക, വിശാലമായ സെറ്റ് കാണുക, അതിനെ പരിശ സെറ്റ്Expander has been used to solve real-life cases including integration in a automatically recruitment system and a problem and error resolution system. സെറ്റ്എപ്പാന്\u200dഡരിന്റെ വീഡിയോ ഡിമോ ലഭ്യമല്ല https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm SetExpander, un sistem bazat pe corpuri pentru extinderea unui set de termeni de sămânță într-un set mai complet de termeni care aparțin aceleiași clase semantice. SetExpander implementează un flux de lucru iterativ end-to-end pentru extinderea setului de termeni. Acesta permite utilizatorilor să selecteze cu ușurință un set de termeni, să-l extindă, să vizualizeze setul extins, să-l valideze, să re-extindă setul validat și să-l stocheze, simplificând astfel extragerea claselor semantice specifice domeniului cu granulație fină. SetExpander a fost folosit pentru rezolvarea cazurilor de utilizare din viața reală, inclusiv integrarea într-un sistem automatizat de recrutare și un sistem de soluționare a problemelor și defectelor. Un demo video al SetExpander este disponibil la https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'mn': 'Бид SetExpander-г корпус суурилсан системийг ижил семантийн хичээл дээрх томъёог нэмэгдүүлэх болно. SetExpander нь томъёогоор нэмэгдүүлэх үед дахин эцэст нь дуусах ажлын flowыг дамжуулдаг. Энэ нь хэрэглэгчид жимсний хэлбэрийг амархан сонгож, нэмэгдүүлж, нэмэгдсэн хэлбэрийг харж, шийдвэрлэсэн хэлбэрийг дахин нэмэгдүүлж, хадгалах боломжтой болгодог. Иймээс холбоотой тодорхой жимсний хэлбэрийг хялбарчилж байна. SetExpander нь бодит амьдралын хэрэглээний тухай бодохын тулд автоматжуулан ажиллах систем болон асуудал болон шийдвэрлэлтийн систем дээр нэгтгэгдэл ашиглаж байна. SetExpander-ын бичлэгийн үзүүлэлт https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo SetExpander, sistem osnovan na korpusu za proširenje set a semena u kompletniji set termina koji pripadaju istoj semantičkoj klasi. SetExpander implementira iterativni krajnji do kraja radni tok za proširenje određenog termina. To omogućava korisnicima da lako izaberu setu uslova semena, prošire ga, vide širenu setu, potvrde ga, ponovo proširi potvrđenu setu i skladište ga, tako jednostavljajući izvlačenje semantičkih klasa specifičnih domena. SetExpander je korišćen za rješavanje slučajeva korištenja realnog života uključujući integraciju u automatski sistem regrutovanja i probleme i rešenje defekata. Video demo SetExpandera je dostupan na https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv -Da.', 'si': 'Name සැකසුම් කරුණු අවසානය සඳහා අවසානය සඳහා අවසානය සඳහා අවසානය කරනවා. Name Name Name https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'so': 'Waxaan soo wadaa SetExpander, taas oo ah nidaam ku saleysan korpus oo ku kala firdhiya abuur qayb ah oo ka mid ah fasalka isku mid ah. SetExpander wuxuu sameeyaa dhamaadka shaqada si uu u dhamaado booska waqtiga la ballanqaaday. Waxay isticmaalayaasha si fudud u dooran yihiin midhaha lagu qoray, kala fidin karo, fiiri saxda la kordhiyey, xaqiijin, ku fidin, beddelin saxda la shaqeeyay oo ku wareejin karo, sidaa darteed si fudud looga soo bixiyo fasalka deymiga ah oo cayiman. SetExpander waxaa loo isticmaalay in lagu xalliyo xaaladaha isticmaalka nolosha ee halista ah, kuwaas oo ku jira la-qabsashada nidaamka shaqada oo bilowga ah iyo dhibaatooyinka iyo nidaamka xafiiska shaqada. Fiidiyowga SetExpander waxaad ka heleysaa https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'ta': 'SetExpander, a corpus-based system for expanding a seed of terms into a more complete set of terms that belong to the same semantic class. SetExpander implements an iterative end-to end workflow for term set expansion.  Name SetExpander has been used to solve real life cases including integration in a automatically recruitment system and a problem and defects resolution systems. SetExpander இன் வீடியோ டோமா கிடைக்கும் https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'ur': 'ہم SetExpander کو دکھاتے ہیں، ایک قارپوس بنیاد سیستم کے لیے ایک قسم کی شرایطوں کو زیادہ کامل ترتیب میں پھیلانے کے لیے جو ایک سیمنٹی کلاس کے ملتے ہیں۔ SetExpander ایک iterative end-to-end workflow لکھتا ہے term set expansion کے لئے. یہ استعمال کرنے والوں کو آسان طریقے سے ایک صندوق کے مجموعہ سے انتخاب کرنا، اسے پھیلانا، گھسیٹ کے مجموعہ کو دیکھنا، اس کی validation کے مجموعہ کو دوبارہ پھیلانا اور اسے ذخیره کرنا امکان دیتا ہے، اسی طرح ڈومین کے مخصوص صندوق کے دانے کے نکالنے کو ساد SetExpander کو واقعی زندگی کا استعمال کیسس حل کرنے کے لئے استعمال کیا گیا ہے، جیسے اتماٹی ریکارٹ سیسٹم میں اتماٹ کرنا اور مسائل اور حل سیسٹم میں تخلیق کرنا ہے. Name https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar SetExpander, ett korpusbaserat system för att expandera en fröuppsättning termer till en mer komplett uppsättning termer som tillhör samma semantiska klass. SetExpander implementerar ett iterativt end-to-end arbetsflöde för termuppsättningsutvidgning. Det gör det möjligt för användare att enkelt välja en fröuppsättning termer, expandera den, visa den utökade uppsättningen, validera den, expandera den validerade uppsättningen och lagra den, vilket förenklar utvinningen av domänspecifika finkorniga semantiska klasser. SetExpander har använts för att lösa verkliga användningsfall inklusive integration i ett automatiserat rekryteringssystem och ett problem- och fellösning system. En videodemo av SetExpander finns tillgänglig på https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'uz': "Biz SetExpander, bir semantik sinfga ega bo'lgan bir xil sonlarning sonlarni ko'paytirish uchun corpus asosiy tizim. SetExpander an iterative end- to end workflow for term set expansion. Name @ info: whatsthis SetExpander' ning video demoni mavjud emas https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu Setrộng, một hệ thống cơ thể để mở rộng một bộ điều khoản của hạt giống thành một bộ hợp lệ hoàn hảo thuộc về cùng một lớp ngữ pháp. Thiết lập mở rộng dòng chảy kết thúc lặp lại cho khả năng mở rộng tập hợp lâu dài. Nó cho phép người dùng dễ dàng chọn một chuỗi hạt giống, mở rộng nó, xem bộ đã mở rộng, thẩm tra nó, tái mở rộng bộ đã xác định và lưu trữ nó, bằng cách đơn giản hóa việc khai thác các lớp ngữ pháp đặc trưng của miền. Thiết lập rộng đã được dùng để giải quyết các trường hợp sử dụng trong đời sống thực, bao gồm việc nhập vào một hệ thống tuyển dụng tự động và một hệ thống giải quyết vấn đề và lỗi. Một bộ dạng video của Setrộng có sẵn ở https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv Không.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer SetExpander, et korpusbaseret system til at udvide et frøsæt af termer til et mere komplet sæt af termer, der tilhører den samme semantiske klasse. SetExpander implementerer en iterativ end-to-end-workflow til udvidelse af termsæt. Det giver brugerne mulighed for nemt at vælge et frøsæt af termer, udvide det, se det udvidede sæt, validere det, udvide det validerede sæt og gemme det, hvilket forenkler udtrækningen af domænespecifikke finkornede semantiske klasser. SetExpander er blevet brugt til at løse virkelige brugssager, herunder integration i et automatiseret rekrutteringssystem og et problem- og fejlløsningssystem. En video demo af SetExpander er tilgængelig på https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'nl': 'We presenteren SetExpander, een corpus-gebaseerd systeem voor het uitbreiden van een seed set termen naar een completere set termen die tot dezelfde semantische klasse behoren. SetExpander implementeert een iteratieve end-to-end workflow voor uitbreiding van termijnsets. Het stelt gebruikers in staat om eenvoudig een seed set termen te selecteren, uit te breiden, de uitgebreide set te bekijken, te valideren, de gevalideerde set opnieuw uit te breiden en op te slaan, waardoor de extractie van domeinspecifieke fijngranige semantische klassen wordt vereenvoudigd. SetExpander is gebruikt voor het oplossen van real-life use cases, waaronder integratie in een geautomatiseerd recruitment systeem en een issues and defect oplossing systeem. Een video demo van SetExpander is beschikbaar op https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'bg': 'Представяме система, базирана на корпус, за разширяване на семеен набор от термини в по-пълен набор от термини, които принадлежат към един и същ семантичен клас. Въвежда итеративен работен поток от край до край за разширяване на набор от термини. Тя позволява на потребителите лесно да избират набор от термини, да го разширяват, да виждат разширения набор, да го валидират, да разширят отново валидирания набор и да го съхраняват, като по този начин опростяват извличането на специфични за домейна фино зърнести семантични класове. СетЕкспандър се използва за решаване на реални случаи на употреба, включително интеграция в автоматизирана система за набиране на персонал и система за решаване на проблеми и дефекти. Видео демо на SetExpander е достъпно на https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo SetExpander, sustav temeljnog na korpusu za proširenje set a pojma sjemena u kompletniji set pojma koji pripadaju istoj semantičkoj klasi. SetExpander provodi iterativni krajnji do kraja radni tok za proširenje određenog termina. To omogućava korisnicima lako odabrati setu pojma sjemena, proširiti ga, vidjeti širenu setu, potvrditi ga, ponovno proširiti potvrđenu setu i čuvati ga, tako jednostavljajući izvlačenje semantičkih klasa specifičnih domena. SetExpander se koristi za rješavanje slučajeva korištenja stvarnog života uključujući integraciju u automatski sustav regrutacije i probleme i rješavanje defekata. Video demo SetExpander je dostupan na https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv -Da.', 'id': 'Kami memperkenalkan SetExpander, sistem berdasarkan corpus untuk memperluas set benih terma ke set terma yang lebih lengkap yang terma milik kelas semantis yang sama. SetExpander mengimplementasikan aliran kerja iteratif akhir-akhir untuk ekspansi set istilah. Ini memungkinkan pengguna untuk mudah memilih set benih terma, mengembangkannya, melihat set yang dikembangkan, mengembangkannya, mengembangkan ulang set yang ditetapkan dan menyimpannya, dengan demikian mempermudahkan ekstraksi kelas semantis spesifik domain. SetExpander telah digunakan untuk memecahkan kasus penggunaan hidup nyata termasuk integrasi dalam sistem rekrutan otomatis dan sistem resolusi masalah dan cacat. Demo video SetExpander tersedia di https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv Apa?', 'de': 'Wir stellen SetExpander vor, ein korpusbasiertes System zur Erweiterung eines Seed-Satzes von Begriffen in einen vollständigeren Satz von Begriffen, die derselben semantischen Klasse angehören. SetExpander implementiert einen iterativen End-to-End-Workflow für die Termset-Erweiterung. Es ermöglicht Benutzern, einfach einen Seed-Satz von Begriffen auszuwählen, zu erweitern, den erweiterten Satz anzuzeigen, zu validieren, den validierten Satz neu zu erweitern und zu speichern, wodurch die Extraktion domänenspezifischer feinkörniger semantischer Klassen vereinfacht wird. SetExpander wurde zur Lösung realer Anwendungsfälle eingesetzt, einschließlich der Integration in ein automatisiertes Rekrutierungssystem und ein Problem- und Fehlerlösungssystem. Eine Videodemo von SetExpander ist verfügbar unter https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'ko': '우리는 피드 용어집을 같은 의미류에 속하는 더 완전한 용어집으로 확장하는 데 사용되는 SetExpander를 소개했다.SetExpander는 용어집 확장을 위해 끝에서 끝까지 반복되는 작업 흐름을 실현했다.이것은 사용자로 하여금 용어의 피드 집합을 쉽게 선택하게 하고, 그것을 전개하고, 확장 집합을 보고, 검증하고, 다시 확장 검증 집합을 저장하여 특정 영역의 세립도 의미류 추출을 간소화시켰다.SetExpander는 자동 채용 시스템과 문제 및 결함 해결 시스템에 통합된 현실 생활의 용례를 해결하는 데 사용되었다.SetExpander의 비디오 데모는https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'fa': 'ما SetExpander را نشان می دهیم، یک سیستم بر اساس کورپوس برای گسترش یک مجموعه از شرایط به یک مجموعه کامل ترین شرایط که به یک کلاس semantic تعلق دارند. Name این اجازه می\u200cدهد کاربران را به آسانی یک مجموعه از شرایط برگزینند، گسترش دهند، مجموعه گسترش دهند، تایید دهند، مجموعه تایید شده را دوباره گسترش دهند و آن را ذخیره کنند، بنابراین استخراج کلاس\u200cهای طبیعه\u200cای ویژه\u200cای را ساده\u200cسازی می\u200cکند. SetExpander برای حل پرونده\u200cهای استفاده از زندگی واقعی استفاده می\u200cشود، شامل تفریق در یک سیستم استخدام\u200cکننده\u200cی خودکار و یک مسئله و سیستم حل\u200cسازی\u200cها. Name https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha SetExpander, mfumo wa msingi wa makampuni kwa ajili ya kupanua mfumo wa mifumo katika mifumo kamili inayomilikiwa na darasa hilo la kishindani. SetExpander anatendekeza mwisho wa kazi kwa ajili ya kuongezeka kwa muhula. Inawezesha watumiaji kuchagua mfumo wa mimea, kuinua, kuona seti ya kuongezeka, kuhakikisha, kuipandisha tena seti iliyothibitishwa na kuyaweka, kwa hiyo inawezesha kuondolewa kwa darasa maalum za mahusiano. SetExpander imetumiwa kwa kutatua matumizi ya maisha halisi ikiwa ni pamoja na ushirikiano katika mfumo wa ujenzi wa kujitegemea na masuala na tatizo la utatuzi. Demo ya video ya SetExpander inapatikana katika https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'tr': "Biz SetExpander'i, bir korpus tabanly sistemini bir semantik sınıfına ait bir türlü türleri a çmak üçin bir sisteme görkeýäris. Expander Ullançylaryň bir termyny a ňsatjag saýlamagyny mümkin edýär, oňa genişleýän termyny görkez, geçirilýän termyny gaýşartyp, geçirilýän termyny gaýşartyp bilýär we şonuň üçin bu şekilde tokaýyň spesifik termynyň açylmasyny bejer. Oýnap çykyşçysy faýllary otomatik gaýşartma sisteminde bir integrasy we mesele we çözümleme sisteminde çözmek üçin ullanýar. SetExpander üçin bir wideo demo bar https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .", 'sq': 'Ne prezantojmë SetExpander, një sistem bazuar në korpus për zgjerimin e një sëre të termave të farës në një sërë më të plotë termash që i përkasin të njëjtit klasë semantike. SetExpander zbaton një rrjedhje pune nga fundi në fund për zgjerimin e caktuar afat. It enables users to easily select a seed set of terms, expand it, view the expanded set, validate it, re-expand the validated set and store it, thus simplifying the extraction of domain-specific fine-grained semantic classes.  SetExpander është përdorur për zgjidhjen e rasteve të përdorimit të jetës reale duke përfshirë integrimin në një sistem rekrutimi automatik dhe një sistem zgjidhjeje çështjesh dhe defektesh. Një demo video e SetExpander është në dispozicion në https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv - Po.', 'af': "Ons stel SetExpander voor te stel, 'n korpusbaseerde stelsel vir uitbreiding van 'n nageslag stel van terme in' n meer volledige stel van terme wat aan dieselfde semantiese klas behoort. Name Dit laat gebruikers maklik kies 'n saad stel van terme, uitbrei dit, sien die uitbrei stel, geldigheid dit, heruitbrei die geldigheid stel en stoor dit, sodat die uitbreiding van domein-spesifieke fyn-graan semantiese klasse eenvoudig word. Name 'n Videodemo van SetExpander is beskikbaar by https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .", 'am': 'SetExpander (SetExpander) በአንድ ትምህርት ክፍል የሚሆነውን የሥርዓት ሥርዓት መዘርጋቸውን ለመዘርፍ እናሳድጋለን፡፡ SetExpander implements an iterative end-to end workflow for term set expansion.  የተጠቃሚዎች የዘር ቁጥር ለመምረጥ በቀላል ይችላል፣ ስፋት፣ ስፋት ማተሚያ፣ አስተካክለው፣ ያስተካክለው፣ የተሰራ መስመር ማሰናከል እና በመለወጥ ይችላል፡፡ SetExpander is used to solve real life uses cases including integration in an automatically recruited system and a problem and defect resolution systems. የቪዲዮ ዶሴ https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք "Սետ-Էքսպանդերը", մի կորպուսի հիմնված համակարգ, որն ընդլայնում է տերմինների սերմերի շարքը ավելի ամբողջական շարք տերմիների, որոնք պատկանում են նույն սեմանտիկ դասին: Comment Այն հնարավորություն է տալիս օգտագործողներին հեշտությամբ ընտրել սերմերի հատվածը, ընդլայնել այն, դիտել ընդլայնված հատվածը, հավասարեցնել այն, վերաընդլայնել հավասարված հատվածը և պահել այն, այնպես պարզ դարձնելով բնագավառի մասնավոր գեղեցիկ սեմանտիկ դասե Comment Comment https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'bn': 'আমরা সেটএক্সপ্যান্ডারকে উপস্থাপন করছি একটি কোর্পাসের ভিত্তিক সিস্টেম, যারা একই সেমেন্টিক ক্লাসের অন্তর্ভুক্ত একটি বিন্দু শর্ SetExpandr বিস্তৃতির জন্য একটি আইটেটেরেটিভ শেষ- শেষ পর্যন্ত কার্যফ্লুয়ার প্রয়োগ করে। এটি ব্যবহারকারীদের সহজে একটি বিটের শর্ত নির্বাচন করতে সক্রিয় করে, বিস্তারিত সেট দেখতে পারে, বিস্তারিত সেট দেখতে পায়, বৈধ, বৈধ সেট পুনরায় ব্যবহার করে সংরক্ষণ করতে সক্ষম হয় এবং ত সেটএক্সপ্যান্ডার ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে বাস্তব জীবন ব্যবহারের ক্ষেত্র সমাধানের জন্য, যার মধ্যে স্বয়ংক্রিয় রেকর্মসিস্টেমে একত্ সেটএক্সপ্যান্ডারের একটি ভিডিও ডিমো পাওয়া যাচ্ছে https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv ...', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo SetExpander, sistem baziran na korpusu za proširenje set a semena u kompletniji set termina koji pripadaju istoj semantičkoj klasi. SetExpander implementira iterativni krajnji do kraja radni tok za proširenje određenog termina. To omogućava korisnicima lako odabrati setu termina, proširiti ga, pogledati širenu setu, potvrditi ga, ponovno proširiti potvrđenu setu i čuvati ga, tako jednostavljajući izvlačenje semantičkih klasa specifičnih domena. SetExpander je korišćen za rješavanje slučajeva korištenja realnog života uključujući integraciju u automatski sistem regrutovanja i probleme i rješavanje defekata. Video demo SetExpander je dostupan na https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv -Da.', 'cs': 'Představujeme SetExpander, korpusový systém pro rozšiřování sady termínů do kompletnější sady termínů, které patří do stejné sémantické třídy. SetExpander implementuje iterativní end-to-end workflow pro rozšiřování termínové sady. Umožňuje uživatelům snadno vybrat sadu semen, rozšířit ji, zobrazit rozšířenou sadu, ověřit ji, znovu rozšířit ověřenou sadu a uložit ji, čímž se zjednodušuje extrakce jemně zraněných sémantických tříd specifických pro doménu. SetExpander byl použit pro řešení reálných případů použití včetně integrace do automatizovaného náborového systému a systému řešení problémů a vad. Video demo SetExpander je k dispozici na adrese https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'ca': "Presentam SetExpander, un sistema basat en corpus per expandir un conjunt de termes de semilles en un conjunt més complet de termes que pertanyen a la mateixa classe semàntica. SetExpander implements an iterative end-to end workflow for term set expansion.  Permet als usuaris seleccionar fàcilment un conjunt de termes de semilles, expandir-lo, veure el conjunt expand it, validar-lo, re-expandir el conjunt validat i emmagatzemar-lo, simplificant així l'extracció de classes semàntiques fins grans específices per domini. SetExpander s'ha utilitzat per resoldre casos d'ús en realitat, incloent la integració en un sistema de reclutatge automatitzat i un sistema de resolució de problemes i defectes. A video demo of SetExpander is available at  https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .", 'et': 'Tutvustame SetExpanderit, korpuspõhist süsteemi terminite seemnekogumi laiendamiseks täielikumaks terminikogumiks, mis kuuluvad samasse semantilisesse klassi. SetExpander rakendab terminikomplekti laiendamiseks iteratiivse otsast lõpuni töövoo. See võimaldab kasutajatel hõlpsasti valida terminite seemnekomplekti, laiendada, vaadata laiendatud komplekti, valideerida, uuesti laiendada valideeritud komplekti ja salvestada, lihtsustades seeläbi domeenispetsiifiliste peeneteraliste semantiliste klasside ekstraheerimist. SetExpander on kasutatud reaalsete kasutusjuhtumite lahendamiseks, sealhulgas integreerimiseks automatiseeritud värbamissüsteemi ning probleemide ja defektide lahendamise süsteemi. SetExpander video demo on saadaval aadressil https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'az': "Biz SetExpander'i, corpus-based sistemi ilə birlikdə eyni semantik sınıfının tamamlanması üçün bir türlü şartları genişləmək üçün göstəririk. Qısqa qurğulaması üçün fərqli uzaqlaşdırma üçün iterativ son-to-end çalışma akışını işlədir. Bu, istifadəçilərin çoxlu şartları asanlıqla seçməsini, genişlənməsini, genişlənməsini, təsdiqlənməsini, təsdiqlənmiş qutuyu yenidən genişlənməsini və onu saxlamasını fərqləndirir. Beləliklə, domena müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyən müəyyə SetExpander həyat istifadəsi məqsədilərini otomatik istifadə sistemində integrasiya və problemləri və çətinlikləri sistemində çəkmək üçün istifadə edildi. SetExpander'in video demosi mövcuddur https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .", 'fi': 'Esittelemme SetExpander, korpuspohjaisen järjestelmän termien siemenjoukon laajentamiseksi täydellisemmäksi termikokonaisuudeksi, joka kuuluu samaan semanttiseen luokkaan. SetExpander toteuttaa iteratiivisen päästä päähän -työnkulun termijoukon laajentamista varten. Sen avulla käyttäjät voivat helposti valita termien siemenjoukon, laajentaa sitä, tarkastella laajennettua joukkoa, vahvistaa sen, laajentaa validoitua joukkoa uudelleen ja tallentaa sen, mikä yksinkertaistaa verkkotunnuskohtaisten hienorakeisten semanttisten luokkien uuttamista. SetExpanderia on käytetty tosielämän käyttötapausten ratkaisemiseen, mukaan lukien integrointi automatisoituun rekrytointijärjestelmään sekä ongelmien ja vikojen ratkaisujärjestelmään. SetExpanderin videodemo on saatavilla osoitteessa https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo SetExpander, korpusni sistem za razširitev semenskega nabora izrazov v bolj popoln nabor izrazov, ki spadajo v isti semantični razred. SetExpander izvaja iterativni potek dela od konca do konca za razširitev nabora izrazov. Uporabnikom omogoča enostavno izbiro semenskega nabora izrazov, razširitev, ogled razširjenega nabora, potrditev, ponovno razširitev potrjenega nabora in shranjevanje, s čimer se poenostavi ekstrakcija drobnozrnatih semantičnih razredov, specifičnih za domeno. SetExpander se uporablja za reševanje resničnih primerov uporabe, vključno z integracijo v avtomatiziran sistem zaposlovanja in sistem za reševanje težav in napak. Video demo SetExpander je na voljo na spletni strani https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv  .', 'ha': 'Tuna halatar da SetExpander, wata na\'urar da aka samar da shi a kan cire wani salon maganar kwamfyuta zuwa wani cikakken ƙayyade da ke cikin daraja guda. SetExpander na zartar da wani iteative end-to-end workspace for duration set widget. Ina amfani da mai amfani da shi, ana sauƙi da za\'a zãɓi wani ɗin tsari na tsari, ya nuna shi, mai faɗa ɗawa, kuma ya gaskata shi, ya sake faɗaɗa tsarin da aka ingace shi, kuma ya adana shi, don ya daidaita kuma ana daidaita shi, don a yi amfani da kwamfyutan sunayen-na-da aka ƙayyade fasalar na-danna. An amfani da SetExpander dõmin yin solar da masu amfani da halin rãyuwa, kamar integratewa cikin na\'urar rekodi mai farat ɗaya da wata masu zartar da kuma masu kuskure na\'urar buƙata. An iya samar da wani video na SetExpander a kan https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv Ya ce: "Yã ku mutãne!', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים את SetExpander, מערכת מבוססת על קורפוס להרחיב קבוצת זרע של תנאים לתוך קבוצת תנאים יותר מושלמת שייכות לאותה כיתה סמנטית. SetExpander מפעיל זרם עבודה סוף-סוף איטריטיבי עבור הרחיבה של קבוצת מונחים. זה מאפשר למשתמשים לבחור בקלות קבוצת תווים זרעים, להרחיב אותו, להסתכל על קבוצת הרחבה, לאשר אותו, לאפשר מחדש את קבוצת האישור האישור ולחסן אותו, כך להפשיט את ההוצאה של שיעורי סמנטיים מיוחדים לתחום. SetExpander השתמש בפתרון מקרים שימוש בחיים אמיתיים כולל אינטגרציה במערכת גיוס אוטומטית ומערכת פתרון בעיות ופגיעות. דמו וידאו של SetExpander זמין ב https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv -כן.', 'jv': 'Kita gunakake SetExpander, sistem sistem sing basa batir karo perusahaan kanggo ngelakan winih sing berarti in komplete sing berarti podho kelas semanti iki. Expander It enables user to readly select a semiset of terms, expand it, view the expanded set, Valdate it, a re-expand the valid set and backup it, so Simplificating the extract of domain-special Fin-cered semanti CLASS. SetExpander wis digawe kanggo disimpen pengguna sistem sing otomatik pengguna ngubah perusahaan ala. Video dego SetExpander kang sampeyan nang https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་སྔོན་འཛུགས་པ་གཅིག་གི་རྩིས་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་SetExpander་ནི་ཚིག་རྩིས་གཞི་རྟེན་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྔོན་བསྐྱེད་པའི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལ་བསྡུར་ སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པ་ལ་བསྐྱར་རྗེས་མཇུག་བསྡུས་ནུས་ཚོད་གཞི་སྒྲིག་བྱེད་པ It enables users to easily select a seed set of terms, expand it, view the expanded set, validate it, re-expand the validated set and store it, thus simplifying the extraction of domain-specific fine-grained semantic classes. སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་པ་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དུས་འཚོལ་བའི་ཚེ་ལག་ལེན་འཐབ་པར་སྒྲིག་འཛུགས་བྱེད་སྤྱོད་ཡོད། SetExpander ཡི་བརྙན་རིས་སྤྱོད་ཐུབ་པ https://drive.google.com/open?id=1e545bB87Autsch36DjnJHmq3HWfSd1Rv .'}
{'en': 'Simulating Language Evolution : a Tool for Historical Linguistics', 'ar': 'محاكاة تطور اللغة: أداة لعلم اللغة التاريخي', 'fr': "Simuler l'évolution du langage\xa0: un outil pour la linguistique historique", 'es': 'Simulación de la evolución del lenguaje: una herramienta para la lingüística histórica', 'pt': 'Simulando a evolução da linguagem: uma ferramenta para a linguística histórica', 'ja': '言語進化のシミュレーション：歴史的言語学のためのツール', 'zh': '拟语进化:史语言学之具', 'hi': 'अनुकरण भाषा विकास: ऐतिहासिक भाषाविज्ञान के लिए एक उपकरण', 'ru': 'Имитация языковой эволюции: инструмент для исторической лингвистики', 'ga': 'Insamhladh Éabhlóid Teanga: Uirlis don Teangeolaíocht Stairiúil', 'el': 'Προσομοίωση της εξέλιξης της γλώσσας: ένα εργαλείο για την ιστορική γλωσσολογία', 'hu': 'A nyelvfejlődés szimulációja: a történelmi nyelvészet eszköze', 'ka': 'სიმულაცია ენის ევოლუცია: ისტორიური ლინგისტიკის ხელსაწყო', 'lt': 'Kalbos Evolution simuliavimas: istorinės kalbos įrankis', 'mk': 'Симулирање на јазичката еволуција: алатка за историска јазика', 'it': "Simulare l'evoluzione del linguaggio: uno strumento per la linguistica storica", 'kk': 'Тілді Evolution- ға ұқсас ету: тарихлық лингвистикалық құралы', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ Evolution സിമുലേറ്റ് ചെയ്യുന്നു', 'no': 'Simulerer språk Evolution: eit verktøy for historisk linguistics', 'ms': 'Simulasi Evolution Bahasa: Alat untuk Bahasa Sejarah', 'mt': 'Simulazzjoni tal-Evoluzzjoni Lingwistika: Għodda għal Lingwistika Storika', 'mn': 'Холын эволюцийг тооцоолж байна: түүхийн хэлний хөгжлийн хэрэгсэл', 'ro': 'Simularea evoluției limbajului: un instrument pentru lingvistică istorică', 'sr': 'Simulacija jezika evolucije: alat za istorijsku lingwistiku', 'so': 'Evolution: Tool for Historical Linguistics', 'si': 'භාෂා විස්තරය සැකසුම් කරනවා: ඉතිහාසික භාෂාව සඳහා උපකරණය', 'pl': 'Symulacja ewolucji języka: narzędzie dla językownictwa historycznego', 'ta': 'மொழி Evolution பாவனைப்படுத்தல்: வரலாற்று இணைப்பு கருவி', 'sv': 'Simulering av språkutveckling: ett verktyg för historisk lingvistik', 'ur': 'زبان ایولیوشن سیمولیٹ کی جاتی ہے: ایک تاریخی لینگیستیک کے لئے ابزار', 'uz': 'Tilni moslash', 'vi': 'Mô phỏng trình diễn tiến ngôn ngữ: một công cụ ngôn ngữ', 'bg': 'Симулиране на езиковата еволюция: инструмент за историческа лингвистика', 'hr': 'Simulacija jezičke evolucije: alat za istorijsku lingwistiku', 'nl': 'Simuleren van taalevolutie: een hulpmiddel voor historische taalkunde', 'da': 'Simulation Language Evolution: et værktøj til historisk lingvistik', 'de': 'Simulation der Sprachentwicklung: ein Werkzeug für die historische Linguistik', 'id': 'Simulasi Evolution Bahasa: Alat untuk Bahasa Sejarah', 'fa': 'شبیه\u200cسازی ایولوشن زبان: ابزار برای زبان تاریخی', 'ko': '모의 언어 변천: 역사 언어학의 도구', 'sw': 'A tool for Historical Linguistics', 'af': "Simulasie Taal Evolution:  'n Nutsprogramme vir Historiese Linguistics", 'tr': 'Dili janlaşdyrma', 'sq': 'Simulimi i evolucionit të gjuhës: një mjet për gjuhët historike', 'am': 'የቋንቋ አድራሻ', 'hy': 'Լեզու էվոլյուցիայի սիմուլյացիան: Պատմական լեզուների գործիք', 'az': 'Dil Evolution simulasyonu: Tarihi Linguistics üçün', 'bn': 'ভাষা সিমুলেটিং Evolution: ঐতিহাসিক লিঙ্গিস্টিকের জন্য একটি টুল', 'bs': 'Simulacija jezičke evolucije: alat za istorijsku lingwistiku', 'ca': "Simular l'evolució del llenguatge: una eina per a la lingüística històrica", 'et': 'Keele evolutsiooni simuleerimine: ajaloolise lingvistika tööriist', 'cs': 'Simulace jazykové evoluce: nástroj pro historickou lingvistiku', 'fi': 'Kielen kehityksen simulointi: historiallisen kielitieteen työkalu', 'jv': 'Simulate Language evoluson: a Tool for histogram Linguistis', 'he': 'הסימולציה של האבולוציה בשפה: כלי לשונות היסטוריות', 'ha': '@ action', 'sk': 'Simulacija jezikovne evolucije: orodje za zgodovinsko jezikoslovje', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་བརྙན་ཞིབ་བཟོ་བྱེད། ལོ་རྒྱུས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་ལག་ཆ་ཞིག་ཡིན།'}
{'en': 'Language change across space and time is one of the main concerns in historical linguistics. In this paper, we develop a language evolution simulator : a web-based tool for word form production to assist in historical linguistics, in studying the evolution of the languages. Given a word in a source language, the system automatically predicts how the word evolves in a target language. The method that we propose is language-agnostic and does not use any external knowledge, except for the training word pairs.', 'ar': 'يعد تغيير اللغة عبر المكان والزمان أحد الاهتمامات الرئيسية في علم اللغة التاريخي. في هذه الورقة ، قمنا بتطوير محاكي تطور اللغة: أداة قائمة على الويب لإنتاج نماذج الكلمات للمساعدة في علم اللغة التاريخي ، في دراسة تطور اللغات. بالنظر إلى كلمة في لغة المصدر ، يتنبأ النظام تلقائيًا بكيفية تطور الكلمة في اللغة الهدف. الطريقة التي نقترحها لا تعرف اللغة ولا تستخدم أي معرفة خارجية ، باستثناء أزواج الكلمات التدريبية.', 'es': 'El cambio de idioma a través del espacio y el tiempo es una de las principales preocupaciones de la lingüística histórica. En este artículo, desarrollamos un simulador de evolución del lenguaje: una herramienta basada en la web para la producción de formas de palabras para ayudar en la lingüística histórica, en el estudio de la evolución de los idiomas. Dada una palabra en un idioma de origen, el sistema predice automáticamente cómo evolucionará la palabra en el idioma de destino. El método que proponemos es independiente del idioma y no utiliza ningún conocimiento externo, excepto los pares de palabras de entrenamiento.', 'fr': "Le changement de langue à travers l'espace et le temps est l'une des principales préoccupations de la linguistique historique. Dans cet article, nous développons un simulateur d'évolution linguistique\xa0: un outil basé sur le Web pour la production de formes de mots afin d'aider à la linguistique historique, à étudier l'évolution des langues. En fonction d'un mot dans une langue source, le système prédit automatiquement l'évolution du mot dans une langue cible. La méthode que nous proposons est indépendante de la langue et n'utilise aucune connaissance externe, à l'exception des paires de mots d'apprentissage.", 'pt': 'A mudança da linguagem no espaço e no tempo é uma das principais preocupações da linguística histórica. Neste artigo, desenvolvemos um simulador de evolução de linguagem: uma ferramenta baseada na web para produção de formas de palavras para auxiliar em linguística histórica, no estudo da evolução das línguas. Dada uma palavra em um idioma de origem, o sistema prevê automaticamente como a palavra evolui em um idioma de destino. O método que propomos é agnóstico de linguagem e não usa nenhum conhecimento externo, exceto para os pares de palavras de treinamento.', 'ja': '空間と時間の間の言語の変化は、歴史言語学における主な懸念の1つです。本稿では、言語進化シミュレータを開発する。これは、歴史的言語学において、言語の進化を研究する際に役立つ、言語形態生成のためのウェブベースのツールである。ソース言語の単語が与えられた場合、システムは自動的にその単語がターゲット言語でどのように進化するかを予測する。私たちが提案する方法は言語に依存せず、トレーニングワードのペアを除いて外部知識を使用しません。', 'hi': 'अंतरिक्ष और समय में भाषा परिवर्तन ऐतिहासिक भाषाविज्ञान में मुख्य चिंताओं में से एक है। इस पेपर में, हम एक भाषा विकास सिम्युलेटर विकसित करते हैं: भाषाओं के विकास का अध्ययन करने में, ऐतिहासिक भाषाविज्ञान में सहायता करने के लिए शब्द रूप उत्पादन के लिए एक वेब-आधारित उपकरण। एक स्रोत भाषा में एक शब्द को देखते हुए, सिस्टम स्वचालित रूप से भविष्यवाणी करता है कि शब्द एक लक्ष्य भाषा में कैसे विकसित होता है। जिस विधि का हम प्रस्ताव करते हैं वह भाषा-अज्ञेयवादी है और प्रशिक्षण शब्द जोड़े को छोड़कर किसी भी बाहरी ज्ञान का उपयोग नहीं करता है।', 'zh': '跨空与时语,史语言学大关注点一。 本文发一语进化模拟器:一本于Web之词形生产工具,施于史语言学,究其变。 给定源言语之单词,自占其单词。 吾道无关言语,非训练词之外,无所用知。', 'ru': 'Изменение языка в пространстве и во времени является одной из главных проблем в исторической лингвистике. В этой статье мы разрабатываем симулятор эволюции языка: веб-инструмент для создания словесной формы, чтобы помочь в исторической лингвистике, в изучении эволюции языков. При наличии слова в исходном языке система автоматически предсказывает, как слово развивается в целевом языке. Предлагаемый нами метод является языкодиагностическим и не использует никаких внешних знаний, за исключением пар обучающих слов.', 'ga': 'Tá athrú teanga trasna spáis agus ama ar cheann de na príomhábhair imní sa teangeolaíocht stairiúil. Sa pháipéar seo, forbraimid ionsamhlóir éabhlóide teanga: uirlis ghréasán-bhunaithe do tháirgeadh foirme focal chun cabhrú leis an teangeolaíocht stairiúil, agus staidéar á dhéanamh ar éabhlóid na dteangacha. Nuair a thugtar focal i dteanga fhoinseach, déanann an córas a thuar go huathoibríoch conas a fhorbraíonn an focal i sprioctheanga. Is modh teanga-agnostic an modh atá á mholadh againn agus ní úsáideann sé aon eolas seachtrach, ach amháin i gcás na mbeirteanna focal oiliúna.', 'ka': 'ენის ცვლილება სამყარო და დროში არის ისტორიური ლენგურისტიკაში ერთი მნიშვნელოვანია. ჩვენ ამ დოკუნეში ენის ეგოლუციის სიმულეტორია განვითარებთ: საბოლო ფორმის პროექტირების სახელი, ისტორიური ენგოლისტიკში, ენების ეგოლუციის განვითარებაში. სიტყვა მხოლოდ მხოლოდ მხოლოდ სიტყვაში, სისტემა ავტომატურად წინასწორებს თუ როგორ სიტყვა მხოლოდ ენაში განვითარება. მეტი, რომელიც ჩვენ გვეძლევთ, არის ენის ადნოსტიული და არ გამოყენებს გარეშე ცნობილება, მაგრამ გარეშე სიტყვების ორივე.', 'hu': 'A nyelvváltozás téren és időn át a történelmi nyelvészet egyik legfontosabb problémája. Ebben a tanulmányban egy nyelvevolúciós szimulátort fejlesztünk ki: egy webalapú szóformák előállítására szolgáló eszköz a történelmi nyelvészetben, a nyelvek evolúciójának tanulmányozásában. Ha egy szót adott egy forrásnyelven, a rendszer automatikusan előrejelzi, hogyan fejlődik a szó egy célnyelven. Az általunk javasolt módszer nyelv-agnosztikus és nem használ semmilyen külső ismeretet, kivéve a képzési szópárokat.', 'el': 'Η γλωσσική αλλαγή σε διάστημα και χρόνο είναι μία από τις κύριες ανησυχίες της ιστορικής γλωσσολογίας. Στην παρούσα εργασία, αναπτύσσουμε έναν προσομοιωτή γλωσσικής εξέλιξης: ένα διαδικτυακό εργαλείο για την παραγωγή μορφών λέξεων για να βοηθήσει στην ιστορική γλωσσολογία, στη μελέτη της εξέλιξης των γλωσσών. Δεδομένου μιας λέξης σε μια γλώσσα προέλευσης, το σύστημα προβλέπει αυτόματα πώς η λέξη εξελίσσεται σε μια γλώσσα-στόχο. Η μέθοδος που προτείνουμε είναι γλωσσικό-αγνωστική και δεν χρησιμοποιεί καμία εξωτερική γνώση, εκτός από τα ζεύγη λέξεων εκπαίδευσης.', 'it': "Il cambiamento linguistico attraverso lo spazio e il tempo è una delle principali preoccupazioni della linguistica storica. In questo articolo sviluppiamo un simulatore di evoluzione linguistica: uno strumento web per la produzione di forme di parole per assistere nella linguistica storica, nello studio dell'evoluzione delle lingue. Data una parola in una lingua di origine, il sistema predice automaticamente come la parola evolve in una lingua di destinazione. Il metodo che proponiamo è linguistico-agnostico e non utilizza alcuna conoscenza esterna, ad eccezione delle coppie di parole di formazione.", 'mk': 'Промената на јазикот низ вселената и времето е една од главните загрижености во историската јазика. Во овој весник развиваме симулатор за еволуција на јазикот: веб-базирана алатка за производство на форма на зборови за помош во историската јазика, во студирањето на еволуцијата на јазиците. Со оглед на збор на изворен јазик, системот автоматски предвидува како зборот еволуира на метен јазик. Методот кој го предложуваме е јазик-агностичен и не користи никакво надворешно знаење, освен парови на зборови за тренинг.', 'kk': 'Тіл бос мен уақыт арасындағы өзгерістер тарихлық лингвистикалықтағы негізгі қатынастарының бірі. Бұл қағазда тілдерді эволюциялау симуляторы жасадық: тілдердің эволюциясын оқу үшін, тарихлық лингвистикалықта көмектесу үшін веб- негіздегі сөздердің құралы. Көздегі тілде сөз болса, жүйе сөздің мақсатты тілде қалай өзгертілгенін анықтайды. Біз қолданатын әдіс - тіл агностикалық және сыртқы білім қолданбады, бірақ оқыту сөздерінің екеуі ғана.', 'lt': 'Kalbos pokyčiai erdvėje ir laike yra vienas pagrindinių istorinės kalbos problemų. Šiame dokumente sukuriame kalbos evoliucijos simuliatorių: internetinę įrangą žodžių formos gamybai, kuri padeda istorinėje kalboje, studijuoja kalbų evoliuciją. Atsižvelgiant į žodį šaltinio kalba, sistema automatiškai numato, kaip žodis vystosi tiksline kalba. Mūsų siūlomas metodas yra kalbų agnostika ir juo nenaudojamos jokios išorinės žinios, išskyrus mokymo žodžių poras.', 'ms': 'Language change across space and time is one of the main concerns in historical linguistics.  Dalam kertas ini, kami mengembangkan simulator evolusi bahasa: alat berasaskan web untuk produksi bentuk perkataan untuk membantu dalam bahasa sejarah, dalam mempelajari evolusi bahasa. Berikan perkataan dalam bahasa sumber, sistem secara automatik meramalkan bagaimana perkataan berevolusi dalam bahasa sasaran. Kaedah yang kami cadangkan adalah bahasa-agnostik dan tidak menggunakan pengetahuan luar, kecuali pasangan perkataan latihan.', 'mn': 'Холбоо орон зай, цаг хугацааны өөрчлөлт нь түүхийн хэл хэлний хамгийн чухал асуудал юм. Энэ цаасан дээр бид хэлний хөгжлийн симуляторыг хөгжүүлж байна: хэлний хөгжлийг судлах, түүхэн хэлний хөгжлийн тусламжтайгаар илтгэх вэб-суурилсан хэрэгсэл. Нөхцөл хэл дээр үг бий болгосон учраас, систем нь тэгшитгэл хэл дээр үг хэрхэн хөгжлийг автоматаар таамагладаг. Бидний санал дэвшүүлэх арга бол хэл-агностик, гадаад ч мэдлэг хэрэглэхгүй. Сургуулийн үгийг хоёр дахин ашиглахгүй.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ സ്ഥലത്തും സമയവും മാറ്റുന്നത് ചരിത്ര ഭാഷയിലെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട കാര്യങ്ങളില്\u200d ഒന്നാണ്. ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ഭാഷ വികസ്ഥാനത്തിന്റെ സിമുലേറ്റര്\u200d നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നു; വാക്കിന്റെ രൂപത്തിന്റെ രൂപത്തില്\u200d ഉല്\u200dപാദിപ്പിക്കാ ഒരു സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഭാഷയില്\u200d ഒരു വാക്ക് കൊടുത്താല്\u200d സിസ്റ്റം സ്വയം വാക്ക് എങ്ങനെയെന്ന് പ്രവചിക്കുന്നു നമ്മുടെ പ്രോദേശിപ്പിക്കുന്ന രീതി', 'mt': 'It-tibdil fil-lingwa tul l-ispazju u ż-żmien huwa wieħed mit-tħassib prinċipali fil-lingwistika storika. F’dan id-dokument, qed niżviluppaw simulatur tal-evoluzzjoni tal-lingwi: għodda bbażata fuq l-internet għall-produzzjoni tal-formoli tal-kliem biex tgħin fil-lingwistika storika, fl-istudju tal-evoluzzjoni tal-lingwi. Minħabba kelma f’lingwa tas-sors, is-sistema tipprevedi awtomatikament kif il-kelma tevolvi f’lingwa fil-mira. Il-metodu li nipproponu huwa lingwistiku-agnostiku u ma juża l-ebda għarfien estern, ħlief għall-pari tal-kliem ta’ taħriġ.', 'pl': 'Zmiana języka w przestrzeni i czasie jest jednym z głównych problemów w językoznawstwie historycznym. W niniejszym artykule opracowujemy symulator ewolucji języka: internetowe narzędzie do produkcji form słowa, które pomaga w językoznawstwie historycznym, w badaniu ewolucji języków. Biorąc pod uwagę słowo w języku źródłowym, system automatycznie przewiduje, jak słowo ewoluuje w języku docelowym. Proponowana przez nas metoda jest językowo-agnostyczna i nie wykorzystuje żadnej zewnętrznej wiedzy, z wyjątkiem par słów szkoleniowych.', 'no': 'Språk-endring gjennom rommet og tid er ein av dei viktigste bekymringane i historiske språk. I denne papiret utviklar vi eit språk-evolusjonssymulator: eit nettbasert verktøy for ord-form-produksjon for å hjelpa i historisk språk, i å studera utviklinga av språk. Gjennomsikt eit ord i eit kjeldespråk, forventar systemet automatisk korleis ordet utviklar i eit målspråk. Metoden vi foreslår er språk-agnostisk og brukar ikkje nokon eksterne kunnskap, unntatt for opplæringsordpar.', 'ro': 'Schimbarea limbii în spațiu și timp este una dintre principalele preocupări în lingvistica istorică. În această lucrare, dezvoltăm un simulator de evoluție a limbilor: un instrument bazat pe web pentru producția de forme de cuvinte pentru a asista în lingvistica istorică, în studierea evoluției limbilor. Dat fiind un cuvânt într-o limbă sursă, sistemul prezice automat modul în care cuvântul evoluează într-o limbă țintă. Metoda pe care o propunem este agnostică lingvistică și nu folosește cunoștințe externe, cu excepția perechilor de cuvinte de formare.', 'si': 'භාෂාව අවසානය සහ වෙලාවෙන් වෙනස් වෙන්නේ ඉතිහාසික භාෂාවිද්\u200dයාවේ ප්\u200dරධාන ප්\u200dරශ්නයක මේ පත්තරේ අපි භාෂාව විකෘතිය සිමුලේටර් විස්තර කරනවා: වෙබ් අධාරිත විකෘතිය සඳහා පත්තික භාෂාවිකාශයේ උදව් කරන පද්ධතිය ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් වචනයක් ප්\u200dරවෘත භාෂයෙන් ඉන්න, වචනය ස්වයංක්\u200dරියාවිතයෙන් ප්\u200d අපි සැලසුම් කරපු විදියට භාෂාව-agnoසික් වෙන්නේ ඒ වගේම ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් පාවිච්චි කරන්නේ නැහැ, ප්\u200dරයෝ', 'so': 'Luqadu waa mid ka mid ah kuwa ugu muhiimsan luuqadaha taariikhda. Warqaddan waxaynu horumarinnaa simulator bedelka luqada: qalabka ku saleysan internetka ee wax ka soo saarista foomka hadalka si ay uga caawiyaan luuqadaha taariikhda ah, si aan u barano bedelka luqadaha. Sida uu ku qoro hadal af af nooc ah, nidaamka wuxuu si gaar ah u sheegaa sida hadalku ugu beddelo luqada goalka. Midabka aan soo jeedno waa luqada afka, waxna uma isticmaalo aqoonta dibadda ah, labo waxbarasho mooyaane.', 'sv': 'Språkförändring över tid och rum är en av de viktigaste problemen inom historisk lingvistik. I denna uppsats utvecklar vi en språkevolutionssimulator: ett webbaserat verktyg för ordformsproduktion för att hjälpa till i historisk lingvistik, att studera språkens utveckling. Med ett ord på ett källspråk förutspår systemet automatiskt hur ordet utvecklas på ett målspråk. Metoden som vi föreslår är språkagnostisk och använder ingen extern kunskap, förutom utbildningsordparen.', 'ta': 'மொழி இடைவெளி மற்றும் நேரம் மாறுதல் வரலாற்று மொழிகளில் ஒரு முதன்மையான கவலைகள். இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு மொழி வளர்ச்சி பாவனையை உருவாக்குகிறோம்: வரலாற்று மொழிகளின் மாற்றத்தை படிப்பதற்கு உதவி செய்ய வலைப்பொருள் உருவ ஒரு மூல மொழியில் ஒரு வார்த்தையை கொடுத்தால், கணினியில் தானாகவே இந்த வார்த்தையை எத்தனை மொழியில் வளருகிறது என நாம் பரிந்துரைக்கும் முறையில் மொழி- குறுக்குத் தான் மற்றும் பயிற்சி சொல்லை ஜோடி தவிர எந்த வெளி அறிவும', 'sr': 'Promjena jezika preko svemira i vremena je jedna od glavnih briga u istorijskoj lingvistiki. U ovom papiru razvijamo simulator jezičke evolucije: internet-bazirani alat za proizvodnju riječi za pomoć u istorijskom jeziku, u proučavanju evolucije jezika. S obzirom na reč na izvornom jeziku, sistem automatski predviđa kako se reč razvija na ciljnom jeziku. Način koji predlažemo je jezik-agnostik i ne koristi nikakvo vanjsko znanje, osim za trening riječi par.', 'ur': 'زبان کی جگہ اور زمانہ میں تغییر ہے تاریخی زبان شناسی میں سب سے زیادہ مشکل ہے۔ اس کاغذ میں، ہم ایک زبان تکامل سیمولوٹر بناتے ہیں: ایک ویب بنیادی ابزار لکھنے کے لئے تاریخی زبان شناسی میں مدد کرنے کے لئے، زبانوں کی تکامل کی تحقیق کرنے کے لئے۔ ایک کلمہ سراسر زبان کے ذریعہ سے، سیسٹم اپنے ساتھ تغییر دیتا ہے کہ کلمہ ایک موجود زبان میں کس طرح تکامل ہوتی ہے۔ ہم نے اس طریقہ کی پیشنهاد کی ہے کہ زبان-agnostic ہے اور کسی خارجی علم کے سوا کوئی استعمال نہیں کرتا۔', 'uz': "Tilni oʻzgartirish va vaqt bilan o'zgartirish tarixi tillarida eng asosiy g'oyalar. Bu hujjatda, biz tillar evolyutsiya simuliyatorini yaratishiz: tarixi tillariga yordam berish uchun veb asosiy vositasi, tarixiy tillarning evolyutsiyatini o'rganish uchun yordam beramiz. Manba tilda so'z boʻlgan boʻlsa, tizim avtomatik so'z qanday foydalanishini predict qiladi. Biz tasavvur qilayotgan usul - til-agnostik, va tashqi bilimni ishlatish mumkin, faqat so'zlar ikkita so'zlarini o'rganish mumkin.", 'vi': 'Sự biến đổi ngôn ngữ qua không gian và thời gian là một trong những vấn đề chính trong ngôn ngữ lịch sử. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi phát triển một giả lập phát triển ngôn ngữ: một công cụ dựa trên mạng để sản xuất từ ngữ để hỗ trợ ngôn ngữ lịch sử, nghiên cứu tiến hóa ngôn ngữ. Dựa vào ngôn ngữ nguồn, hệ thống tự động dự đoán cách phát triển từ này theo ngôn ngữ đích. Phương pháp chúng tôi đề nghị là ngôn ngữ-chẩn có và không dùng bất kỳ kiến thức bên ngoài ngoại trừ các từ ngữ tập.', 'bg': 'Езиковата промяна в пространството и времето е една от основните проблеми в историческата лингвистика. В настоящата статия разработваме симулатор на езикова еволюция: уеб-базиран инструмент за производство на думи, за да подпомогнем историческата лингвистика, при изучаването на еволюцията на езиците. Давайки дума на изходен език, системата автоматично прогнозира как думата еволюира в целевия език. Методът, който предлагаме, е езиково-агностичен и не използва никакви външни познания, с изключение на обучителните двойки думи.', 'da': 'Sprogforandringer på tværs af rum og tid er en af de vigtigste bekymringer i historisk lingvistik. I denne artikel udvikler vi en sprogevolutionssimulator: et webbaseret værktøj til ordformsproduktion til at hjælpe med historisk lingvistik, med at studere sprogets udvikling. Med et ord på et kildesprog forudsiger systemet automatisk, hvordan ordet udvikler sig på et målsprog. Den metode, vi foreslår, er sprogagnostisk og bruger ikke nogen ekstern viden, bortset fra uddannelsesordpar.', 'hr': 'Promjena jezika širom svemira i vremena je jedna od glavnih briga u istorijskom jeziku. U ovom papiru razvijamo simulator jezičke evolucije: internetski alat za proizvodnju riječi oblika pomoći povijesnim jezičkim jezicima, u proučavanju evolucije jezika. S obzirom na riječ izvornog jezika, sustav automatski predviđa kako se riječ razvija na ciljnom jeziku. Način koji predlažemo je jezik-agnostik i ne koristi nikakve vanjske znanje, osim za trening riječi par.', 'nl': 'Taalverandering in ruimte en tijd is een van de belangrijkste aandachtspunten in de historische taalkunde. In dit artikel ontwikkelen we een taalevolutiesimulator: een web-based hulpmiddel voor woordvormproductie om te helpen in de historische taalkunde, bij het bestuderen van de evolutie van de talen. Bij een woord in een brontaal voorspelt het systeem automatisch hoe het woord evolueert in een doeltaal. De methode die wij voorstellen is taal-agnostisch en maakt geen gebruik van externe kennis, behalve de trainingswoordparen.', 'de': 'Sprachwechsel über Raum und Zeit hinweg ist eines der Hauptanliegen der historischen Linguistik. In diesem Beitrag entwickeln wir einen Sprachentwicklungssimulator: ein webbasiertes Werkzeug zur Wortformproduktion, um die historische Linguistik bei der Erforschung der Evolution der Sprachen zu unterstützen. Bei einem Wort in einer Ausgangssprache prognostiziert das System automatisch, wie sich das Wort in einer Zielsprache entwickelt. Die von uns vorgeschlagene Methode ist sprachagnostisch und verwendet kein externes Wissen, mit Ausnahme der Trainingswortpaare.', 'id': 'Perubahan bahasa melalui ruang dan waktu adalah salah satu kepentingan utama dalam bahasa sejarah. Dalam kertas ini, kami mengembangkan simulator evolusi bahasa: alat berdasarkan web untuk produksi bentuk kata untuk membantu dalam bahasa sejarah, dalam mempelajari evolusi bahasa. Berikan kata dalam bahasa sumber, sistem secara otomatis memprediksi bagaimana kata berevolusi dalam bahasa sasaran. Metode yang kami sarankan adalah bahasa-agnostik dan tidak menggunakan pengetahuan luar apapun, kecuali untuk pasangan kata latihan.', 'fa': 'تغییر زبان در فضا و زمان یکی از نگرانی اصلی در زبان تاریخی است. در این کاغذ، ما یک شبیه\u200cساز تکامل زبانی را توسعه می\u200cکنیم: یک ابزار بر اساس وب برای تولید کلمه\u200cای برای کمک در زبان\u200cشناسی تاریخی، در تحقیق تکامل زبانها. با توجه به یک کلمه در زبان منبع، سیستم به طور خودکار پیش بینی می\u200cکند که کلمه چگونه در زبان هدف تغییر می\u200cدهد. روش ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم زبان-agnostic است و از هیچ دانش خارجی استفاده نمی\u200cکند، به جز جفت آموزش کلمه\u200cها.', 'sw': 'Mabadiliko ya lugha katika anga na muda ni moja ya hofu kubwa katika lugha za kihistoria. Katika karatasi hii, tunatengeneza mfululizo wa mabadiliko ya lugha: zana yenye mtandaoni kwa ajili ya uzalishaji wa neno ili kusaidia katika lugha za kihistoria, kwa kusoma mabadiliko ya lugha. Kwa kutumia neno katika lugha ya vyanzo, mfumo unatabiri namna neno linavyoendelea kwa lugha ya lengo. Namna tunazopendekeza ni lugha ya kifua na haitumii maarifa yoyote ya nje, isipokuwa kwa ajili ya mafunzo maneno mawili.', 'ko': '시공간을 뛰어넘는 언어 변화는 역사 언어학이 주목하는 주요 문제 중의 하나다.본고에서 우리는 언어 진화 시뮬레이터를 개발했다. 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 어형 생성 도구로 역사 언어학이 언어의 진화를 연구하는 데 도움을 주었다.소스 언어의 한 단어를 지정하면 시스템은 이 단어가 목표 언어에서의 변화를 자동으로 예측한다.우리가 제시한 방법은 언어가 알 수 없는 것으로 훈련어를 제외하고는 어떠한 외부 지식도 사용하지 않는다.', 'af': "Taal verander oor ruimte en tyd is een van die hoofbelang in historiese lingwisies. In hierdie papier ontwikkel ons 'n taal evolusie simuleerder: â\x80\x99n web-gebaseerde hulpmiddel vir woord vorm produksie om te help in historiese lingwisies, in die ondersoek van die evolusie van die tale. As 'n woord in 'n bron taal gegee, die stelsel outomaties voorskou hoe die woord in 'n doel taal ontwikkeld word. Die metode wat ons voorstel is taal agnostik en gebruik nie enige eksterne kennis nie, behalwe vir die onderwerp woord paar.", 'sq': 'Ndryshimi i gjuhës nëpër hapësirë dhe kohë është një nga shqetësimet kryesore në gjuhën historike. Në këtë letër, ne zhvillojmë një simulator evolucioni gjuhësh: një mjet në internet për prodhimin e form ës së fjalëve për të ndihmuar në gjuhën historike, në studimin e evolucionit të gjuhëve. Duke dhënë një fjalë në një gjuhë burimi, sistemi parashikon automatikisht se si fjala zhvillohet në një gjuhë objektive. Metoda që propozojmë është gjuhë-agnostike dhe nuk përdor asnjë njohuri të jashtme, përveç çifteve të fjalës stërvitëse.', 'tr': 'Diller meýdança we wagtyň arasynda geçmiş dilleriniň esasy aladalaryndan biri. Bu kagyzda, biz dil evolusiýasyny bejerip gelip otyrýarys: web-tabanly söz ýüklemek üçin taryhy lingwistiklerde, dillerin evolusiýasyny öwrenmek üçin bir araç çykarýarys. Sözi bir çeşme dilinde görä, sistemiň sözüň bir maksada dilinde nähili gelinýändigini otomatik çaklaýar. Biziň teklip eden yöntemimiz dili-agnostik we daşarydaky bilim ýöne, iki söz okuwçylygy üçin ulanmaýar.', 'hy': 'Լեզուների փոփոխությունը տարածության և ժամանակի միջև պատմական լեզվաբանության հիմնական խնդիրներից մեկն է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք զարգանում ենք լեզվի էվոլյուցիայի սիմուլյացիա՝ մի վեբ-հիմնված գործիք բառերի ձևերի արտադրման համար, որպեսզի օգնենք պատմական լեզվաբանության մեջ, լեզվի էվոլյուցիայի ուսումնասիրելիս: Առաջին լեզվով բառ առնելով, համակարգը ինքնաբերաբար կանխատեսում է, թե ինչպես է բառը զարգանում նպատակային լեզվով: Մենք առաջարկում ենք լեզվի ագնոստիկ մեթոդը և չի օգտագործում արտաքին գիտելիքներ, բացառությամբ զույգերի վարժեցման բառերի համար:', 'am': 'ቋንቋ በቁጥር እና ሰዓት የሚለውጥ ታሪካዊ ቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች ውስጥ የመጀመሪያው ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ የቋንቋ አናውንት ምሳሌዎችን እናሳድጋለን፤ ታሪካዊ ቋንቋ ቋንቋ ትምህርት ለማስተማርና የቋንቋዎችን ፍለጎት ለመረዳት የቃላት መልክ ትምህርት የተደረገ የመረጃ ዕቃ ነው፡፡ በአሁኑ ቋንቋ አንዲት ቃል በመስጠት፣ ሲስተም ቃሉ በአካባቢ ቋንቋ እንዴት እንደሚለወጥ ይናገራል፡፡ የምናስፈልገው ልማድ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ-አፎስቲ ነው እና ለየትምህርት ቃል ሁለት ሳይሆን ውጭ እውቀት አይጠቅምም፡፡', 'az': 'Dil kosmos və zaman arasındakı dəyişiklik tarihi dillərin ən böyük endirilənlərindən biridir. Bu kağızda, dil evrimi simülatörünü təhsil edirik: dillərin evrimini öyrənmək üçün, keçmiş dillərdə kömək etmək üçün web-tabanlı bir vasitəsi. Sözlük dilində bir söz görsəniz, sistem bu sözün məqsəd dilində necə tədbir edir. Bizim təklif etdiyimiz metod dil-agnostik və heç bir dış bilgi istifadə etməz, yalnız təhsil sözlərinin çift istifadəsidir.', 'bs': 'Promjena jezika preko svemira i vremena je jedna od glavnih briga u istorijskom jeziku. U ovom papiru razvijamo simulator jezičke evolucije: internetski alat za proizvodnju riječi za pomoć u istorijskom jeziku, u proučavanju evolucije jezika. S obzirom na riječ na izvornom jeziku, sistem automatski predviđa kako se riječ razvija na ciljnom jeziku. Metod koji predlažemo je jezik-agnostik i ne koristi nikakvo vanjsko znanje, osim za trening riječi par.', 'bn': 'সারা জায়গায় ভাষা পরিবর্তন এবং সময়ের মূল উদ্বেগ হল ঐতিহাসিক ভাষায়। In this paper, we develop a language evolution simulator: a web-based tool for word form production to assist in historical linguistics, in studying the evolution of the languages.  একটি উৎস ভাষায় একটি শব্দ দিয়ে সিস্টেম স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী করে যে শব্দটি কিভাবে লক্ষ্য ভাষায় উন্নয়ন আমরা যে পদ্ধতি প্রস্তাব করি তা হচ্ছে ভাষার বাইরে কোন জ্ঞান ব্যবহার করে না, কিন্তু প্রশিক্ষণের শব্দ জোড়া ছাড়া।', 'ca': "Language change across space and time is one of the main concerns in historical linguistics.  En aquest article desenvolupem un simulador d'evolució de llengües: una eina web per a produir paraules per ajudar a la lingüística històrica, a estudiar l'evolució de les llengües. Dant una paraula en una llengua de font, el sistema prediu automàticament com evoluciona la paraula en una llengua d'objectiu. The method that we propose is language-agnostic and does not use any external knowledge, except for the training word pairs.", 'cs': 'Jazyková změna napříč prostorem a časem je jedním z hlavních problémů historické lingvistiky. V tomto článku vyvíjíme simulátor jazykové evoluce: webový nástroj pro tvorbu slovních forem, který pomáhá v historické lingvistice, při studiu evoluce jazyků. Vzhledem k slovu ve zdrojovém jazyce systém automaticky předpovídá, jak se slovo vyvíjí v cílovém jazyce. Metoda, kterou navrhujeme, je jazykově-agnostická a nevyužívá žádné vnější znalosti s výjimkou párů tréninkových slov.', 'et': 'Keele muutus läbi aja ja ruumi on ajaloolise keeleteaduse üks peamisi muresid. Käesolevas töös töötame välja keele evolutsiooni simulaatori: veebipõhise tööriista sõnavormi tootmiseks, et aidata ajaloolises keeleteaduses, keelte evolutsiooni uurimisel. Sõna lähtekeeles prognoosib süsteem automaatselt, kuidas sõna sihtkeeles areneb. Meie pakutav meetod on keelega agnostiline ja ei kasuta välisteadmisi, välja arvatud koolitussõnapaarid.', 'fi': 'Kielen muutos avaruudessa ja ajassa on yksi historian kielitieteen tärkeimmistä huolenaiheista. Tässä työssä kehitämme kielen evoluutiosimulaattorin: web-pohjaisen sanamuotojen tuottamisen työkalun, joka auttaa historiallisessa kielitieteessä, kielten evoluution tutkimisessa. Kun sana on lähdekielellä, järjestelmä ennustaa automaattisesti, miten sana kehittyy kohdekielellä. Ehdotettu menetelmä on kieliagnostinen eikä käytä mitään ulkoista tietoa, paitsi koulutussanapareja.', 'sk': 'Jezikovna sprememba skozi prostor in čas je ena glavnih skrbi v zgodovinskem jezikoslovju. V prispevku smo razvili simulator jezikovne evolucije: spletno orodje za produkcijo besednih oblik, ki pomaga v zgodovinski jezikoslovnosti, pri preučevanju evolucije jezikov. Ob upoštevanju besede v izvornem jeziku sistem samodejno napoveduje, kako se beseda razvija v ciljnem jeziku. Metoda, ki jo predlagamo, je jezikovno-agnostična in ne uporablja nobenega zunanjega znanja, razen za par učnih besed.', 'ha': "Sauya harshe kan duk fili da lokaci yana daga cikin muhimmin muhimmada cikin harshen historical. Daga wannan takardan, Munã developer wani mai motsi ga kwamfyutan ayuka na harshe: zane-zane wanda ke samar da ɗabi'a wa zane-zane na zane-zane wa tsarin magana dõmin ya taimaki cikin lingui na historical, a kan karatun buƙatan harsunan. Gida wata magana cikin harshe na source, na'ura na ƙayyade magana farat ɗaya ko da ya buɗe magana cikin harshen wanda aka yi amfani da. Yakunan da Muke gabatar da shi, shi ne lugha-agnostic kuma bã ya amfani da wani ilmi wanda ke gaba fãce idan an yi tattalin maganar biyu.", 'he': 'שינוי השפה במרחב וזמן הוא אחד הדאגה העיקרית בלשונית היסטורית. בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מפתחים סימולטור לאבולוציה של שפות: כלי מבוסס באינטרנט לייצור צורת מילים כדי לסייע בשפה היסטורית, ללמוד את האבולוציה של השפות. בהתחשב במילה בשפה המקורית, המערכת אוטומטית חושפת איך המילה מתפתחת בשפה המטרה. השיטה שאנחנו מציעים היא שפה-אגנוסטית ולא משתמשת בכלל ידע חיצוני, חוץ מזוגי מילים האימון.', 'jv': 'Suara Ngubah ing sakjang pangan lan aku sampeyan kanggo langkung banjur ing sakjane tualah. Nang pentungé iki, awak dhéwé nggawe sistem sistem evolusyon lengkang: sistem sing basa web nggawe perbudhakan kanggo nglanggar tarjamahan kanggo ngerwih urip lan ijol-ijolan lengkang. Nanging kelas ing pancening ing lang dadi, sistem kang dipunanggé kuwi kapan kelas nang ingkang dadi. Awak dhéwé nggunakake tresnaning kuwi tanggal-asno lan ora nggambar ngerasah panelah, njuk dianggap kanggo kelas-ingkang.', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ནི་བར་སྟོང་དང་དུས་ལ་བསྒྱུར་བཅོས་ནི་ལོ་རྒྱུས་སྐད་ཡིག་གནས་ཚུལ་ལས་གཅིག་རེད། ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་སྐད་རིགས་ལྟ་རྩལ་བ་ཞིག་ཆགས་པ་དེ་གསར་བསྐྲུན་འབད་ནི། དྲ་རྩལ་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་ཡིག་ཆ་གསར་གཏོང་ཆེ ཐོག་ཁུངས་སྐད་ཡིག་ནང་གི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་ལ་བཤད་པ་ལས། མ་ལག་གིས་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག འུ་ཅག་གི་བསམ་འཆར་བྱས་པའི་ལམ་ལུགས་ནི་སྐད་ཡིག་གཟུགས་རིས་དང་། ཕྱི་རིང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་གང་ཡང་བེད་སྤྱོད་མེད། དམི'}
{'en': 'Cool English : a Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Learner Corpora', 'ar': 'اللغة الإنجليزية الرائعة: نظام تصحيح الأخطاء النحوي المستند إلى مجموعة كبيرة من المتعلمين', 'es': 'Cool English: un sistema de corrección de errores gramaticales basado en corpus de grandes alumnos', 'fr': "Cool English\xa0: un système de correction d'erreurs grammaticales basé sur de grands corpus d'apprenants", 'pt': 'Cool English: um sistema de correção de erros gramaticais baseado em grandes corpos de aprendizes', 'ja': 'クールな英語：大規模な学習者コーポラに基づく文法的誤り訂正システム', 'ru': 'Cool English: система коррекции грамматических ошибок на основе больших корпусов учащихся', 'zh': '酷英语:大学习者语料库语法纠错统', 'hi': 'शांत अंग्रेजी: बड़े शिक्षार्थी निगम पर आधारित एक व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार प्रणाली', 'ga': 'Béarla Cool: Córas Ceartúcháin Earráidí Gramadaí Bunaithe ar Chorpóra Mór-Fhoghlaimeora', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Cool English: nyelvtani hibajavító rendszer nagy tanulói korpora alapján', 'el': 'Ένα σύστημα διόρθωσης γραμματικών σφαλμάτων βασισμένο στο Μεγάλο Σώμα Μαθητών', 'it': 'Cool English: un sistema di correzione degli errori grammaticali basato su grandi corpi di apprendimento', 'kk': 'Жақсы ағылшын тілінде: Үлкен оқытушылар корпорасына негізделген граматикалық қате түзету жүйесі', 'mk': 'Cool English: a Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Learner Corpora', 'lt': 'Cool English: a Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Learning Corpora', 'ms': 'Bahasa Inggeris Keren: Sistem Pembetulan Ralat Grammatik Berdasarkan Korpora Pelajar Besar', 'ml': 'കൂള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ്: വലിയ ലെയര്\u200d കോര്\u200dപ്പോറയില്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് പരിശോധന സിസ്റ്റം', 'mt': 'Ingliż kiesaħ: Sistema ta’ Korrezzjoni ta’ Żbalji Grammatiċi bbażata fuq Korpora ta’ Tagħlim Kbar', 'mn': 'Гайхалтай Англи: Том сурагчийн сайжруулах систем', 'pl': 'Fajny angielski: system korekcji błędów gramatycznych oparty na dużym korpusie uczących się', 'no': 'Kul engelsk: eit grammatisk feilrettingssystem basert på stor læringskorpora', 'ro': 'Cool English: un sistem de corectare a erorilor gramaticale bazat pe corpul mare de elevi', 'sr': 'Cool English: Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Learner Corpora', 'sv': 'Cool English: ett grammatiskt felkorrigeringssystem baserat på stora elever Corpora', 'si': 'නියමයි ඉංග්\u200dරීසියා: ලොකු ඉගෙනගන්න කෝර්පෝරා වලින් විශාල ප්\u200dරදේශ පද්ධතියක්', 'so': 'Ingiriis Cool: a Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Lear Corpora', 'ta': 'குளிர் ஆங்கிலம்:', 'ur': 'اچھی انگلیسی: ایک گراماتیکل خطا اصلاح سیسٹم بزرگ یادگار کورپورا پر بنیاد ہے', 'uz': 'Eng yaxshi inglizcha: katta oĘ»rnatilgan katta markaziya asosida grammatika xato toĘ»gĘ»ri tizimi', 'vi': 'Tiếng Anh thông minh: một hệ thống sửa lỗi lỗi lỗi theo tập minh lớn.', 'bg': 'Готин английски: система за корекция на граматични грешки, базирана на корпора на големи ученици', 'da': 'Cool engelsk: et grammatisk fejlkorrektionssystem baseret på store lærere korpora', 'hr': 'Kul engleski: Gramatični sustav korištenja greška temeljen na velikoj učiteljskoj korpori', 'nl': 'Cool Engels: een grammatical foutcorrectie systeem gebaseerd op groot lerend corpora', 'de': 'Cool English: ein grammatisches Fehlerkorrektursystem basierend auf einem großen Lernkorpora', 'fa': 'انگلیسی باحالی: یک سیستم اصلاح خطای گراماتیک بر اساس کورپورا بزرگ یادگیر', 'id': 'Inggris keren: Sistem Koreksi Galat Grammatis Berdasarkan Korpora Pelajar Besar', 'ko': '쿨 영어: 대형 학습자 어료 라이브러리 기반의 문법 오류 수정 시스템', 'af': "Kool Engels:  'n Gramatiese Fout Korreksie Stelsel Baseer op Groot Leer Korpora", 'sw': 'Kiingereza cha kawaida: Mfumo wa Uharibifu wa Kitakwimu unaotengenezwa na kampuni kubwa ya Kiongozi', 'tr': 'Maýyp Iňlisçe: Ullakan Öwreniň Koparyna Datalýan Grammatik Hata Dopasy Sistemi', 'sq': 'English Cool: a Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Learning Corpora', 'am': 'Cool English: a Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Learner Corpora', 'az': '캻yi 캻ngilizce: B칲y칲k 칐yr톛n톛n C톛rpora dayanan Gramatik Hata D칲z톛ltm톛 Sistemi', 'hy': 'Հրաշալի անգլերեն: Գրամատիկ սխալների ուղղումների համակարգ, հիմնված մեծ ուսանողների կորպորայի վրա', 'bn': 'সুন্দর ইংরেজী: বড় শিক্ষা কোর্পোরার উপর ভিত্তিক একটি গ্রামাটিক্যাল ত্রুটি সংস্কার সিস্টেম', 'ca': "Inglés genial: un sistema de correcció d'errors gramàtics basat en una gran corpora d'aprenentatge", 'cs': 'Cool English: gramatický systém pro opravu chyb založený na velkém korpusu učitelů', 'bs': 'Cool English: Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Learner Corpora', 'et': 'Lahe inglise keel: grammatiline vigade parandamise süsteem, mis põhineb suurel õppija korpusel', 'fi': 'Cool English: Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Learner Corpora', 'jv': 'Sumangkat Inggris: Sistem Dohak Gramatik Gak Cocok Sistem Ngawe Bocah Learner', 'sk': 'Cool English: slovnični sistem popravljanja napak, ki temelji na velikih učniških korpusih', 'he': 'אנגלית מגניבה: מערכת תיקון שגיאות גרמטיות מבוססת על גופת למלמידה גדולה', 'ha': '@ item Text character set', 'bo': 'Cool English: a Grammatical Error Correction System Based on Large Learner Corpora'}
{'en': 'This paper presents a grammatical error correction (GEC) system that provides corrective feedback for essays. We apply the sequence-to-sequence model, which is frequently used in machine translation and text summarization, to this GEC task. The model is trained by EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), a large learner corpus annotated with grammatical errors and corrections. Evaluation shows that our system achieves competitive performance on a number of publicly available testsets.', 'fr': "Cet article présente un système de correction d'erreur grammaticale (GEC) qui fournit une rétroaction corrective pour les dissertations. Nous appliquons le modèle séquence à séquence, qui est fréquemment utilisé dans la traduction automatique et la synthèse de texte, à cette tâche GEC. Le modèle est formé par EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), un vaste corpus d'apprenants annoté avec des erreurs grammaticales et des corrections. L'évaluation montre que notre système atteint des performances concurrentielles sur un certain nombre d'ensembles de tests accessibles au public.", 'ar': 'تقدم هذه الورقة نظام تصحيح الأخطاء النحوية (GEC) الذي يوفر تغذية راجعة تصحيحية للمقالات. نحن نطبق نموذج التسلسل إلى التسلسل ، والذي يستخدم بشكل متكرر في الترجمة الآلية وتلخيص النص ، على مهمة GEC هذه. تم تدريب النموذج من قبل قاعدة بيانات اللغة المفتوحة EF-Cambridge (EFCAMDAT) ، وهي مجموعة كبيرة من المتعلمين مزودة بتوضيحات للأخطاء النحوية والتصحيحات. يُظهر التقييم أن نظامنا يحقق أداءً تنافسيًا في عدد من مجموعات الاختبارات المتاحة للجمهور.', 'pt': 'Este artigo apresenta um sistema de correção de erros gramaticais (GEC) que fornece feedback corretivo para redações. Aplicamos o modelo de sequência a sequência, que é frequentemente usado em tradução automática e sumarização de texto, a esta tarefa GEC. O modelo é treinado pelo EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), um grande corpus de aprendizes anotado com erros gramaticais e correções. A avaliação mostra que nosso sistema alcança desempenho competitivo em vários conjuntos de testes disponíveis publicamente.', 'es': 'Este artículo presenta un sistema de corrección de errores gramaticales (GEC) que proporciona retroalimentación correctiva para los ensayos. Aplicamos el modelo secuencia a secuencia, que se utiliza con frecuencia en la traducción automática y el resumen de textos, a esta tarea de GEC. El modelo está entrenado por EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), un gran corpus de alumnos con anotaciones de errores gramaticales y correcciones. La evaluación muestra que nuestro sistema logra un rendimiento competitivo en una serie de conjuntos de pruebas disponibles públicamente.', 'hi': 'यह पेपर एक व्याकरणिक त्रुटि सुधार (जीईसी) प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करता है जो निबंधों के लिए सुधारात्मक प्रतिक्रिया प्रदान करता है। हम अनुक्रम-से-अनुक्रम मॉडल को लागू करते हैं, जिसका उपयोग अक्सर मशीन अनुवाद और पाठ सारांशीकरण में किया जाता है, इस जीईसी कार्य के लिए। मॉडल को EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT) द्वारा प्रशिक्षित किया जाता है, जो व्याकरणिक त्रुटियों और सुधारों के साथ एनोटेट किया गया एक बड़ा शिक्षार्थी कॉर्पस है। मूल्यांकन से पता चलता है कि हमारा सिस्टम कई सार्वजनिक रूप से उपलब्ध टेस्टसेट पर प्रतिस्पर्धी प्रदर्शन प्राप्त करता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье представлена система грамматической коррекции ошибок (GEC), которая обеспечивает корректирующую обратную связь для эссе. Мы применяем модель последовательности к последовательности, которая часто используется в машинном переводе и обобщении текста, к этой задаче GEC. Модель обучается с помощью открытой языковой базы данных EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), представляющей собой большой корпус учащихся, снабженный аннотациями с грамматическими ошибками и исправлениями. Оценка показывает, что наша система достигает конкурентных показателей по ряду общедоступных тестовых наборов.', 'ja': '本稿では，エッセイの修正フィードバックを提供する文法的誤り訂正（ GEC ）システムを紹介する．機械翻訳およびテキストの要約で頻繁に使用されるシーケンスツーシーケンスモデルをこのGECタスクに適用します。このモデルは、EF - Cambridge Open Language Database （ EFCAMDAT ）によって訓練されています。EFCAMDATは、文法的な誤りと修正が注釈された大きな学習者コーパスです。評価によると、当社のシステムは、いくつかの公開されているテストセットで競争力のあるパフォーマンスを達成しています。', 'zh': '本文引一语法纠错(GEC)系统,当系统为论文以正反馈。 凡机器翻译、文摘要之序,宜于此 GEC 。 其EF-Cambridge开言数据库(EFCAMDAT)教,此大学者语料库,带语法错误正注也。 评估者,吾之系于众公可用之试集上得竞争力之性也。', 'ga': 'Cuireann an páipéar seo i láthair córas ceartúcháin earráide gramadaí (GEC) a sholáthraíonn aiseolas ceartaitheach le haghaidh aistí. Cuirimid an tsamhail seicheamh-go-seicheamh, a úsáidtear go minic i meaisín-aistriúchán agus achoimre téacs, i bhfeidhm ar an tasc seo GEC. Tá an tsamhail traenáilte ag EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), corpas mór foghlaimeora a bhfuil earráidí gramadaí agus ceartúcháin nótaí air. Léiríonn meastóireacht go mbaineann ár gcóras feidhmíocht iomaíoch amach ar roinnt tacar tástála atá ar fáil go poiblí.', 'ka': 'ეს დრამმატიკური შეცდომა რედაქტირება (GEC) სისტემა, რომელიც რედაქტირებული რედაქტირების შეცდომა რედაქტირების შეცდომა. ჩვენ მივიღეთ sequence-to-sequence მოდელს, რომელიც მხოლოდ მაქინის გადაწყვეტილებაში და ტექსტის გადაწყვეტილებაში გამოყენება, ამ GEC დავალებაში. მოდელი EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT) გამოცემულია, დიდი სწავლებელი corpus, რომელიც გრამიკალური შეცდომებით და რედაქტირებით აღმოჩენა. ჲუვნაუთწ ოჲკაჱგა, ფვ ნაქარა ჟთჟრვმა ჟრთდნაგა კჲნკპვნრთგნა ოპაგთრვლნჲჟრ ნა ნწკჲლკჲ ოსბლთფნჲ ოპთლჲზვნთ რვჟრვჟრთ.', 'hu': 'Ez a tanulmány egy nyelvtani hibakorrekciós (GEC) rendszert mutat be, amely korrekciós visszajelzést ad esszékhez. Ehhez a GEC feladathoz a gépi fordításban és szövegösszefoglalásban gyakran használt szekvencia-sorrend modellt alkalmazzuk. A modellt az EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT) képzi, amely egy nagy tanulókorpusz nyelvtani hibákkal és javításokkal. Az értékelés azt mutatja, hogy rendszerünk versenyképes teljesítményt ér el számos nyilvánosan elérhető tesztkészleten.', 'el': 'Η παρούσα εργασία παρουσιάζει ένα σύστημα διόρθωσης γραμματικών σφαλμάτων (GEC) που παρέχει διορθωτική ανατροφοδότηση για δοκίμια. Εφαρμόζουμε το μοντέλο ακολουθίας σε ακολουθία, το οποίο χρησιμοποιείται συχνά στη μηχανική μετάφραση και την περίληψη κειμένου, σε αυτήν την εργασία GEC. Το μοντέλο εκπαιδεύεται από τη βάση δεδομένων ανοικτής γλώσσας EF-Cambridge (EFCAMDAT), ένα μεγάλο σώμα μαθητών με σχολιασμούς γραμματικών σφαλμάτων και διορθώσεων. Η αξιολόγηση δείχνει ότι το σύστημά μας επιτυγχάνει ανταγωνιστικές επιδόσεις σε μια σειρά από δημόσια διαθέσιμα δοκιμαστικά σύνολα.', 'it': 'Questo articolo presenta un sistema di correzione degli errori grammaticali (GEC) che fornisce feedback correttivi per i saggi. A questo compito GEC applichiamo il modello sequenza-sequenza, spesso utilizzato nella traduzione automatica e nella sintesi del testo. Il modello è formato da EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), un corpus di studenti ampio annotato con errori grammaticali e correzioni. La valutazione dimostra che il nostro sistema raggiunge prestazioni competitive su un certo numero di test disponibili pubblicamente.', 'mk': 'Овој документ претставува систем за корекција на граматичките грешки (GEC) кој обезбедува корективна реакција за есеите. Го применуваме моделот од секвенца до секвенца, кој често се користи за машински превод и резултат на текстот, на оваа GEC задача. Моделот е трениран од EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), голем ученички тело анотиран со граматички грешки и корекции. Оценката покажува дека нашиот систем постигнува конкурентни резултати на голем број јавно достапни тестови.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pateikiama gramatinės klaidų koregavimo sistema (GEC), kuria pateikiama ištaisomoji atsakomybė už egzaminus. Šioje GEC užduotyje taikome sekos po sekos model į, kuris dažnai naudojamas vertimui mašinomis ir teksto santraukoms. The model is trained by EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), a large learner corpus annotated with grammatical errors and corrections.  Vertinimas rodo, kad mūsų sistema siekia konkurencinių rezultatų daugeliu viešai prieinamų bandymų rinkinių.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағаз тексеру үшін дұрыс жауап беретін грамматикалық қате түзету жүйесін көрсетеді. Бұл GEC тапсырмасына, машинаны аудару мен мәтін тұжырымдамасында көбірек қолданылатын sequence- to- sequence үлгісін қолдануға болады. Бұл үлгі EF- Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT) бақылады, грамматикалық қателермен және түзетулерден жазылған үлкен оқыту корпус. Біздің жүйеміздің көпшілік қол жеткізетін сынақтардың бірнеше жеткізетін жағдайды оқиғалау көрсетіледі.', 'ms': 'Kertas ini menghasilkan sistem pembetulan ralat grammatik (GEC) yang menyediakan balas balik pembetulan untuk esei. Kami menerapkan model urutan-ke-urutan, yang sering digunakan dalam terjemahan mesin dan ringkasan teks, untuk tugas GEC ini. Model dilatih oleh Pangkalan Data Bahasa Buka EF-Cambridge (EFCAMDAT), mayat pelajar besar yang dicatat dengan ralat grammatik dan perbaikan. Evaluasi menunjukkan bahawa sistem kita mencapai prestasi kompetitif pada sejumlah set ujian yang tersedia secara awam.', 'mt': 'Dan id-dokument jippreżenta sistema ta’ korrezzjoni ta’ żbalji grammatiċi (GEC) li tipprovdi rispons korrettiv għall-esejs. Aħna napplikaw il-mudell minn sekwenza għal sekwenza, li ta’ spiss jintuża fit-traduzzjoni bil-magna u fil-qosor tat-test, għal dan il-kompitu tal-GEC. Il-mudell huwa mħarreġ mill-EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), korp kbir ta’ studenti annotat b’żbalji grammatiċi u korrezzjonijiet. Evaluation shows that our system achieves competitive performance on a number of publicly available testsets.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаас эссийн зөв хариуг гаргадаг грамматикийн алдаа зөвшөөрүүлэх системийг харуулдаг. Бид энэ GEC үйл ажилд олон удаа машин хөрөнгө оруулалт болон текст цуглуулалт ашигладаг дарааллын дарааллын загварыг ашиглаж байна. Энэ загвар нь EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT) болон грамматикийн алдаа болон зөв загвартай том сурагчийн корпус болон сурагчийн сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын багш болон сургалтын сургалтын сургалтын ба Дүндэслэл нь бидний систем олон нийтэд ашиглах тестийн хэмжээнд өрсөлдөг үйл ажиллагааг гаргадаг.', 'no': 'Denne papiret viser eit grammatisk feilretting (GEC) system som tilbyr korrektivt tilbakemelding for essar. Vi bruker sequence-to-sequence-modellen, som ofte vert brukt i maskinsomsetjing og tekstsammendrag, til denne GEC-oppgåva. Modellen vert trent av EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), eit stor læringskorpus med grammatiske feil og korreksjonar. Evalueringa viser at systemet vårt når det gjer konkurentivt utvikling på fleire tilgjengelege testsett.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d എസ്സികള്\u200dക്കുള്ള ശരിയായ ഫിബിബ്ബാക്ക് നല്\u200dകുന്ന ഗ്രാമാറ്റിക്കല്\u200d പിശക് സിസ്റ്റം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഞങ്ങള്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷവും ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ചുരുക്കത്തിലും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന സെക്കന്\u200dസ് മോഡല്\u200d പ്രയോഗിക്കുന്നു, ഈ ജിസി ജോലിക്ക്. എഫ്- കാമ്പ്രിഡ്ജ് തുറക്കുന്ന ഭാഷ ഡേറ്റാബേസ് (EFCAMDAT), ഗ്രാമാമ്രിക്കല്\u200d തെറ്റുകളും പരിശീലിക്കുന്ന ഒരു വലിയ പഠിക്കുന്ന കോര നമ്മുടെ സിസ്റ്റത്തിന്റെ പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട പരീക്ഷണങ്ങളില്\u200d എതിര്\u200dക്കുന്ന പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d എതിര്\u200dക്കുന്നു', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiono system korekcji błędów gramatycznych (GEC), który zapewnia korekcję zwrotną dla esejów. Do tego zadania GEC stosujemy model sekwencji-sekwencji, który jest często stosowany w tłumaczeniu maszynowym i podsumowaniu tekstu. Model jest trenowany przez EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), duży korpus uczących się z adnotacją błędów gramatycznych i poprawek. Ocena pokazuje, że nasz system osiąga konkurencyjną wydajność na wielu publicznie dostępnych zestawach testowych.', 'ro': 'Această lucrare prezintă un sistem de corecție a erorilor gramaticale (GEC) care oferă feedback corectiv pentru eseuri. Aplicăm modelul secvență-la-secvență, care este frecvent utilizat în traducerea automată și rezumarea textului, la această sarcină GEC. Modelul este instruit de EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), un corpus mare de cursanți adnotat cu erori gramaticale și corecții. Evaluarea arată că sistemul nostru atinge performanțe competitive pe o serie de seturi de teste disponibile public.', 'sr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja sistem za ispravu grešaka (GEC) koji pruža korektnu reakciju za eseje. Primjenjujemo model sekvence-do-sekvence, koji se često koristi u prevodu i sažetku teksta na ovaj GEC zadatak. Model je obučen od strane EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), velikog učenika korpusa annotiranog gramatičnim greškama i korekcijama. Evaluacija pokazuje da naš sistem postigne konkurentne funkcije na broju javno dostupnih testova.', 'si': 'Name අපි පණිවිඩයෙන් පණිවිඩයෙන් පණිවිඩය සහ පණිවිඩයෙන් පණිවිඩයෙන් භාවිත කරනවා, මේ GEC වැඩයට. The Model is Trained by EF-Cambridge Open language Data (EFCAMDAT), a Large learner Corpus, annuted with gram error and corrections. පරීක්ෂණය පෙන්වන්නේ අපේ පද්ධතිය සාමාජික පරීක්ෂණ සැකසුම් ගොඩක් ගොඩක් සාමාන්\u200dය විදියට ප්\u200dර', 'so': 'Kanu warqaddan wuxuu diyaariyaa hagaajinta qalabka grammatical (GEC) nidaamka ah oo hagaajiya feedback a saxda ah ee fasaxyada. Waxaynu ku isticmaalnaa muusikada xilliga, kaas oo marar badan lagu isticmaalaa turjumaadda machine iyo qoraalka, sababta GEC. Tusaalada waxaa lagu tababariyaa saldhigga afka furan ee EF-Cambridge (EFCAMDAT), koobanka waxbarashada oo aad u weyn oo lagu tababariyey qaladka grammatika iyo hagitaanka. Qiimeyntu wuxuu muuqanayaa in nidaamkayagu uu sameynayo sameynta iskutallaabta ku saabsan imtixaanka dadweynaha.', 'sv': 'Denna uppsats presenterar ett system för grammatisk felkorrigering (GEC) som ger korrigerande feedback för uppsatser. Vi tillämpar sekvens-till-sekvensmodellen, som ofta används i maskinöversättning och textsammanfattning, på denna GEC-uppgift. Modellen utbildas av EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), en stor elevkorpus kommenterad med grammatiska fel och korrigeringar. Utvärderingen visar att vårt system uppnår konkurrenskraftig prestanda på ett antal allmänt tillgängliga testset.', 'ta': 'இந்த தாள் சிக்கல் பிழை திருத்தம் (GEC) அமைப்பை கொடுக்கிறது, இது விளையாட்டுக்கு சரியான பதில் செய்யும். இந்த GEC செயல்பாட்டிற்கு நாம் வரிசையில் இருக்கும் தொடர் மாதிரியை பயன்படுத்துகிறோம். இந்த மாதிரி EF- கேம்பிரிஜ் திறந்த மொழி தரவுத்தளத்தால் பயிற்சி செய்யப்படுகிறது (EFCAMDAT), வரைப்பட பிழைகள் மற்றும் திருத்தங்கள் உடன்  Evaluation shows that our system achieves competitive performance on a number of publicly available testsets.', 'ur': 'This paper presents a grammatical error correction (GEC) system that provides corrective feedback for essays. ہم نے sequence-to-sequence Model کو لازم کیا ہے، جو ماشین ترجمہ اور متن ترجمہ میں بہت زیادہ استعمال کیا جاتا ہے، اس GEC کام پر۔ یہ مدل EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT) کے ذریعہ تطالب کیا گیا ہے، ایک بڑی سیکھنے والے کورپوس جو گراماتیکی خطا اور اصلاح کے ساتھ مشورہ کیا گیا ہے. ارزیابی دکھاتی ہے کہ ہماری سیستم ایک جماعت کے موجود ٹیسٹ سٹ پر مسابقات کی عملکرد حاصل کرتی ہے.', 'uz': "Name Bu GEC vazifasiga ko'paytirish mumkin. Name Evaluation shows that our system achieves competitive performance on a number of publicly available testsets.", 'vi': 'Tờ giấy này trình bày một hệ thống sửa lỗi sai ngữ pháp (GEC) cung cấp phản hồi sửa chữa cho các bài luận. Chúng tôi áp dụng các mô hình lặp lại, thường được dùng trong việc dịch chuyển máy và tóm tắt văn bản, vào nhiệm vụ GED. The model is educated by F-Cambridge Open Ngôn ngữ Database (ECAMDAT), a large student Corpus notted with grammatical lỗi và sửa sai. Bài đánh giá cho thấy hệ thống của chúng ta đạt được thành quả cạnh tranh trên một số bộ thử công khai.', 'bg': 'Настоящата статия представя система за граматическа корекция на грешки (ГЕК), която осигурява корективна обратна връзка за есета. За тази задача прилагаме модела последователност към последователност, който често се използва в машинния превод и обобщаването на текста. Моделът се обучава от базата данни с отворен език (ЕФКАМДАТ), голям корпус на учащите, анотиран с граматически грешки и корекции. Оценката показва, че нашата система постига конкурентни резултати на редица публично достъпни тестове.', 'da': 'Denne artikel præsenterer et grammatisk fejlkorrektionssystem (GEC), der giver korrigerende feedback til essays. Vi anvender sekvens-til-sekvens modellen, som ofte anvendes i maskinoversættelse og tekst resuméering, til denne GEC-opgave. Modellen er uddannet af EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), et stort elevkorpus med kommentarer til grammatiske fejl og rettelser. Evaluering viser, at vores system opnår konkurrencedygtige resultater på en række offentligt tilgængelige testsæt.', 'hr': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja gramatički korišteni sustav greške (GEC) koji pruža korektnu povratku za eseje. Primjenjujemo model sequence-to-sequence, koji se često koristi u prevodu strojeva i sažetku teksta na ovaj GEC zadatak. Model je obučen od strane EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), velikog učenika korpusa annotiranog gramatičkim greškama i ispravama. Procjenjivanje pokazuje da naš sustav postigne konkurentne učinke na broju javno dostupnih testova.', 'nl': 'Dit artikel presenteert een grammatical error correction (GEC) systeem dat corrigerende feedback geeft voor essays. Op deze GEC-taak passen we het sequence-to-sequence model toe, dat vaak wordt gebruikt in machinevertaling en tekstsamenvatting. Het model is getraind door EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), een groot leercorpus met grammaticale fouten en correcties. Evaluatie toont aan dat ons systeem concurrerende prestaties behaalt op een aantal publiek beschikbare testsets.', 'ko': '본고는 논문에 교정적 피드백을 제공하는 문법 오류 교정(GEC) 시스템을 제시했다.GEC 작업에는 기계 번역 및 텍스트 요약에 자주 사용되는 시퀀스를 적용합니다.이 모델은 EFCAMDAT(EFCAMDAT)에서 훈련한 것으로 EFCAMDAT는 문법 오류와 수정이 표시된 대형 학습자 자료 라이브러리이다.평가에 의하면, 우리 시스템은 많은 공개적으로 사용할 수 있는 테스트 집합에서 경쟁력 있는 성능을 실현하였다.', 'id': 'This paper presents a grammatical error correction (GEC) system that provides corrective feedback for essays.  Kami menerapkan model urutan-ke-urutan, yang sering digunakan dalam terjemahan mesin dan ringkasan teks, untuk tugas GEC ini. Model ini dilatih oleh EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), tubuh mahasiswa besar yang dicatat dengan kesalahan grammatika dan koreksi. Evaluasi menunjukkan bahwa sistem kita mencapai prestasi kompetitif pada sejumlah set tes yang tersedia publik.', 'fa': 'این کاغذ یک سیستم اصلاح خطای گراماتیکی (GEC) را نشان می\u200cدهد که برگشت اصلاح برای امتحان را پیشنهاد می\u200cدهد. ما مدل sequence-to-sequence را تفاوت می\u200cکنیم، که اغلب در ترجمه\u200cهای ماشین و ترجمه\u200cهای متن برای این کار GEC استفاده می\u200cشود. Model is trained by EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), a large learner corpus annotated with grammatical errors and corrections. ارزیابی نشان می دهد که سیستم ما روی تعداد آزمایش\u200cهای دسترسی عمومی به انجام رقابت رسیده است.', 'de': 'Diese Arbeit stellt ein grammatisches Fehlerkorrektursystem (GEC) vor, das korrigierendes Feedback für Aufsätze liefert. Für diese GEC-Aufgabe wenden wir das Sequenz-zu-Sequenz-Modell an, das häufig in der maschinellen Übersetzung und Textzusammenfassung verwendet wird. Das Modell wird von EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT) trainiert, einem großen Lernkorpus mit grammatikalischen Fehlern und Korrekturen. Die Auswertung zeigt, dass unser System bei einer Reihe von öffentlich zugänglichen Testsets wettbewerbsfähig ist.', 'sw': 'Gazeti hili linaonyesha mfumo wa uharibifu wa makosa ya grammatika (GEC) ambao unatoa maoni sahihi kwa ajili ya madrasa. Tunatumia mifano ya mfululizo kwa mfululizo, ambayo mara nyingi hutumika katika tafsiri za mashine na muhtasari wa maandishi, katika kazi hii ya GEC. Mfano huu unafundishwa na Mfumo wa Lugha ya EF-Cambridge (EFCAMDAT), makampuni makubwa ya wanafunzi yanayohusishwa na makosa na sahihi ya kiuchumi. Uchunguzi unaonyesha kwamba mfumo wetu unapata ufanisi wa ushindani katika seti kadhaa zinazopatikana hadharani.', 'sq': 'Ky dokument paraqet një sistem korrektimi të gabimeve grammatike (GEC) që ofron përgjigje korrektive për esejat. Ne aplikojmë model in sekuencë-në-sekuencë, i cili përdoret shpesh në përkthimin e makinave dhe përmbledhjen e tekstit, në këtë detyrë GEC. Modeli është trajnuar nga EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), një trup i madh mësues i shënuar me gabime grammatike dhe korreksione. Vlerësimi tregon se sistemi ynë arrin performancë konkurruese në një numër grupesh testuese të disponueshme publikisht.', 'tr': 'Bu kagyz çykyşlar üçin dogry terjime eden gramatik hata düzeltmegini (GEC) sistemini görkezýär. Biz bu GEC täblisasine köplenç ulanýarys Bu nusga EF-Cambridge Aç Dil Databasy (EFCAMDAT) tarapyndan bilinýär, gramatik ýalňyşlar we düzeldiler bilen duýýan uly öwrenen korpus. Taýýarlama sistemamyzyň halkara bar testiler üçin rekabet etmäge ýetip barýandygyny görkezýär.', 'af': "Hierdie papier stel 'n grammatiese fout korreksie (GEC) stelsel wat korrektive terugmelding verskaf vir besoeke. Ons wend die volgorde-na-volgorde model toe, wat dikwels gebruik word in masjien vertaling en teks opsomming, na hierdie GEC taak. Die model is opgelei deur EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), â\x80\x99n groot leerneerder corpus wat met grammatiese foute en korreksies aangetel is. Evaluasie wys dat ons stelsel rekenaar effektuur op 'n aantal openlik beskikbaar teststelle bereik.", 'am': 'ይህ ፕሮግራም የግራማ ስህተት ማቀናጃ (GEC) ስርዓት ለቋንቋዎች ጥያቄን የሚያሳውቅ ነው፡፡ We apply the sequence-to-sequence model, which is frequently used in machine translation and text summarization, to this GEC task.  ሞዴል በEF-Cambridge ክፈት ቋንቋ ዳታ መቀመጫው (EFCAMDAT) የተማረ ነው፡፡ ማስታወቂያው ስርዓታችን በተገኘ የህዝብ ፈተናዎች ላይ የሚቻለውን ትክክለኛዎችን እንዲያገኝ ያሳያል፡፡', 'hy': 'Այս հոդվածը ներկայացնում է գրամատիկ սխալների ուղղումների համակարգ, որը պարունակում է ուղղումներ էսսերի համար: Մենք կիրառում ենք հաջորդականության-հաջորդականության մոդելը, որը հաճախ օգտագործվում է մեքենայի թարգմանման և տեքստի համառոտագրման մեջ, այս աշխատանքի համար: Մոդելը վարժեցվում է ԵՖ-Քեմբրիջի Աբաց լեզվի տվյալների հիմքում (EFCAMDAT ը), մի մեծ ուսանողական մարմին, որը գրամատիկական սխալներով և ուղղումներով նշում է: Արժեքը ցույց է տալիս, որ մեր համակարգը համընդհանուր արդյունք է ստանում մի շարք հանրային հնարավորությունների վրա:', 'bs': 'Ovaj papir predstavlja gramatički korišteni sistem greške (GEC) koji pruža korektnu reakciju za eseje. Primjenjujemo model sequence-to-sequence, koji se često koristi u prevodu i sažetku teksta na ovaj GEC zadatak. Model je obučen od strane EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), velikog učenika korpusa annotiranog gramatičnim greškama i korekcijama. Evaluacija pokazuje da naš sistem postigne konkurentne učinke na broju javno dostupnih testova.', 'ca': "Aquest article presenta un sistema de correcció d'errors gramàtics (GEC) que proporciona feedback correctiu per als assais. Aplicam el model de seqüència a seqüència, que s'utilitza sovint en traducció automàtica i resum de text, a aquesta tasca GEC. El model està entrenat per EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), un gran cos d'aprenent anotat amb errors gramàtics i correccions. L'evaluació demostra que el nostre sistema aconsegueix un rendiment competitiu en un cert nombre de conjunts de tests disponibles al públic.", 'bn': 'এই পত্রিকা একটি গ্রাম্যাটিক্যাল ত্রুটিকাল সংশোধনের সাথে উপস্থাপন করেছে যা প্রস্তাবের জন্য সঠিক প্রতিক্রিয়া প আমরা মেশিন অনুবাদ এবং টেক্সট সংক্রান্ত সংক্রান্ত মোডেল প্রয়োগ করি, যা প্রায়শ এই GEC কাজে ব্যবহৃত। এফ-ক্যাম্ব্রিজ উন্মুক্ত ভাষা ডাটাবেস (EFCAMDAT) এই মডেল প্রশিক্ষণ প্রদান করেছে, একটি বিশাল শিক্ষার্থী কোর্পাস, যা গ্রাম্যাটিক প্রতিযোগিতা দেখাচ্ছে যে আমাদের সিস্টেম প্রতিযোগিতায় প্রতিযোগিতা প্রদর্শন করা হয়েছে বেশ কয়েকটি প্রকাশ্', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös on esitatud grammatilise veaparanduse (GEC) süsteem, mis annab paranduslikku tagasisidet esseedele. Sellele GEC ülesandele rakendame sageli masintõlkes ja teksti kokkuvõtluses kasutatavat jadast jadasse mudelit. Mudelit koolitab EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), suur õppijate korpus, millel on grammatilisi vigu ja parandusi. Hindamine näitab, et meie süsteem saavutab konkurentsivõimelise tulemuse mitmete avalikult kättesaadavate testikomplektide puhul.', 'cs': 'Tento článek představuje systém gramatické korekce chyb (GEC), který poskytuje korektivní zpětnou vazbu pro eseje. Na tento GEC úkol aplikujeme sekvenční model, který se často používá v strojovém překladu a textovém shrnutí. Model je trénován EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), velkým korpusem žáků s anotacemi gramatických chyb a korekcí. Hodnocení ukazuje, že náš systém dosahuje konkurenčního výkonu na řadě veřejně dostupných testovacích sadách.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esitellään kieliopillisen virheen korjausjärjestelmä (GEC), joka antaa korjaavaa palautetta esseistä. Tähän GEC-tehtävään sovelletaan sekvenssi-to-sekvenssimallia, jota käytetään usein konekäännöksessä ja tekstiyhteenvedossa. Mallia kouluttaa EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), suuri oppijoiden korpus, johon on merkitty kieliopillisia virheitä ja korjauksia. Arviointi osoittaa, että järjestelmämme saavuttaa kilpailukykyisen suorituskyvyn useilla julkisesti saatavilla olevilla testeillä.', 'az': 'Bu kağıt çətinliklər üçün düzgün reaksiya verən gramatik xəta düzəltməsi (GEC) sistemini göstərir. Biz bu GEC işin ə sequence-to-sequence modeli uygulayırıq, maşın çevirilməsi və mətn yığışdırmasında sık vaxt istifadə edilir. Model EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT) təhsil edilir. Bu çox öyrənən korpus, grammatik hataları və düzəltmələri ilə bildirilmişdir. Vəziyyət sistemimizin bir neçə nümunə verilən sınama qurğularının müqayisədə müqayisədi performansını başa çatdığını göstərir.', 'jv': 'Laptop" and "Desktop Tulung model iso disenyongno karo eF-mbridge Open Language databak Wanggang', 'ha': "Wannan takardar da ke bãyar da wata kure na grammatisk kure na gyare (GEC) da ke samar da baka mai daidaita wa fassarar. Tuna amfani da misalin-zuwa-sequence, wanda ake yi amfani da shi mara yawa cikin fassarar maɓalli da muharin matsayi, zuwa wannan aikin GEC. An sanar da shirin ayuka na EF-Cambrige Canza na nuna cewa, na'asarmu yana sãmun mafarin aiki mai ƙidido a cikin wasu misãlai da ake samu.", 'sk': 'V prispevku je predstavljen sistem slovničnega popravka napak (GEC), ki zagotavlja korektivne povratne informacije za eseje. Za to GEC nalogo uporabljamo model zaporedja v zaporedje, ki se pogosto uporablja pri strojnem prevajanju in povzemanju besedila. Model usposablja EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), velik korpus učencev z oznakami slovničnih napak in popravkov. Ocena kaže, da naš sistem dosega konkurenčno uspešnost na številnih javno dostopnih testnih sklopih.', 'he': 'הנייר הזה מציג מערכת תיקון שגיאות גרמטית (GEC) שמספקת חזרה תיקונה למאמרים. אנו משתמשים במודל הרצף לרצף, שמשתמש לעתים קרובות בתרגום מכונות ותסכם טקסט, למשימה GEC הזו. המודל מאומן על ידי EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), גופה גדולה של לומדים שמשמעה על ידי טעויות גרמטיות ותיקונים. הערכה מראה שהמערכת שלנו משיגה ביצועים תחרותיים על מספר טסטים זמינים לציבור.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིས་ཚོད་ལྟ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་པའི་སྐད་རིམ་གྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བདེ་སྒྲིག་འགོད་བྱེད་སྐབས་འཆར་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། We apply the sequence-to-sequence model, which is frequently used in machine translation and text summarization, to this GEC task. The model is trained by EF-Cambridge Open Language Database (EFCAMDAT), a large learner corpus annotated with grammatical errors and corrections. རྒྱ་ཆེ་ཞིབ་ཀྱིས་མ་མང་གི་སྤྱོད་པའི་བརྟག་དཔྱད་ཚད་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་གྲངས་སུ་རྒྱལ་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བ་རེད།'}
{'en': 'KIT Lecture Translator : Multilingual Speech Translation with One-Shot Learning', 'ar': 'مترجم محاضرة KIT: ترجمة الكلام متعدد اللغات مع التعلم بلقطة واحدة', 'pt': 'Tradutor de Palestra KIT: Tradução de Fala Multilíngue com Aprendizado One-Shot', 'es': 'Traductor de conferencias KIT: traducción de voz multilingüe con aprendizaje único', 'fr': 'KIT Lecture Translator\xa0: traduction vocale multilingue avec apprentissage unique', 'ja': 'キット講義翻訳者：ワンショット学習による多言語音声翻訳', 'zh': 'KIT讲座译:多语言语音译与一次性学', 'hi': 'KIT व्याख्यान अनुवादक: एक शॉट सीखने के साथ बहुभाषी भाषण अनुवाद', 'ru': 'Переводчик лекций KIT: Многоязычный перевод речи с однократным обучением', 'ga': 'Aistritheoir Léacht KIT: Aistriúchán Urlabhra Ilteangach le Foghlaim Aon-Shot', 'ka': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Multilingual Speech Translation with One- Shot Learning', 'hu': 'KIT Előadás Fordító: Többnyelvű beszédfordítás egyszeri tanulással', 'el': 'Μεταφραστής διαλέξεων του KIT: Πολυγλωσσική μετάφραση ομιλίας με μάθηση με μία ματιά', 'kk': 'Comment', 'it': 'Traduttore KIT Lecture: traduzione vocale multilingue con apprendimento one-shot', 'lt': 'KIT pamokų vertėjas: daugiakalbis kalbos vertimas su vienkartiniu mokymusi', 'mt': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Multilingual Speech Translation with One-Shot Learning', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'Name', 'pl': 'KIT Wykładowy tłumacz: Wielojęzyczne tłumaczenie mowy z jednorazowym uczeniem się', 'ms': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Multilingual Speech Translation with One-Shot Learning', 'ro': 'Traducător de lecție KIT: Traducere de vorbire multilingvă cu învățare unică', 'si': 'Comment', 'no': 'Comment', 'so': 'Turjubaan', 'ta': 'KIT விரிவாக்க மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர்:', 'sv': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Flerspråkig talöversättning med One-Shot lärande', 'ur': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Multilingual Speech Translation with One-Shot Learning', 'mn': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Multilingual Speech Translation with One-Shot Learning', 'sr': 'KIT prevoditelj lekcije: multijezički prevoditelj govora sa jednostavnim učenjem', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Bộ dịch thuyết trình KIT: phát ngôn ngữ rộng Phát âm với Phát ngôn một cú ảnh', 'da': 'KIT Foredrag Oversætter: Flersproget taleoversættelse med One-Shot Learning', 'bg': 'Преводач на лекция: Многоезичен речен превод с еднократно обучение', 'hr': 'KIT prevoditelj lekcije: prevoditelj višejezičkih govora s jednosnim učenjem', 'nl': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Meertalige spraakvertaling met One-Shot Learning', 'de': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Mehrsprachige Sprachübersetzung mit One-Shot Learning', 'id': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Multilingual Speech Translation with One-Shot Learning', 'ko': 'KIT 강좌 번역: 다국어 음성 번역, 일회성 학습', 'fa': 'Comment', 'sw': 'Utafiri wa Kitetesi: Tafsiri ya lugha ya Ki-Lugha yenye mafunzo ya moja', 'tr': 'KIT Lectur terjimeçisi: Çoklu dilli söz terjimeçisi Bir Taýdan Öwrenmek bilen', 'sq': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Multilingual Speech Translation with One-Shot Learning', 'af': 'Comment', 'am': 'መግለጫ', 'hy': 'Comment', 'bn': 'KIT লেক্টর অনুবাদক: এক-শিক্ষা দিয়ে বহুভাষী ভাষার অনুবাদ', 'az': 'Comment', 'bs': 'KIT prevoditelj lekcije: multijezički prevoditelj govora sa jednosnim učenjem', 'ca': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Multilingual Speech Translation with One-Shot Learning', 'cs': 'KIT Překladatel přednášek: Vícejazyčný překlad řeči s jednorázovým učením', 'et': 'KIT Loeng Tõlkija: mitmekeelne kõne tõlkimine ühe võimalusega õppida', 'fi': 'KIT Luento Kääntäjä: Monikielinen puheen kääntäminen yhden laukauksen oppimisella', 'jv': 'KiT Lektur Inggal Tulung: Terjamahan kanggo Kemerdekaan Siji', 'sk': 'KIT Predavanje prevajalec: Večjezični govorni prevod z enkratnim učenjem', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'KIT Lecture Translator: Multilingual Speech Translation with One-Shot Learning', 'bo': 'KIT སྨུག་གཞུང་གཏོང་པ། སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་སྐད་རིགས་འདིའི་ཚིག་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་One-Shot Learning'}
{'en': 'In today’s globalized world we have the ability to communicate with people across the world. However, in many situations the language barrier still presents a major issue. For example, many foreign students coming to KIT to study are initially unable to follow a lecture in German. Therefore, we offer an automatic simultaneous interpretation service for students. To fulfill this task, we have developed a low-latency translation system that is adapted to lectures and covers several language pairs. While the switch from traditional Statistical Machine Translation to Neural Machine Translation (NMT) significantly improved performance, to integrate NMT into the speech translation framework required several adjustments. We have addressed the run-time constraints and different types of input. Furthermore, we utilized one-shot learning to easily add new topic-specific terms to the system. Besides better performance, NMT also enabled us increase our covered languages through multilingual NMT. % Combining these techniques, we are able to provide an adapted speech translation system for several European languages.', 'pt': 'No mundo globalizado de hoje, temos a capacidade de nos comunicar com pessoas em todo o mundo. No entanto, em muitas situações, a barreira do idioma ainda apresenta um grande problema. Por exemplo, muitos estudantes estrangeiros que chegam ao KIT para estudar são inicialmente incapazes de acompanhar uma palestra em alemão. Por isso, oferecemos um serviço automático de tradução simultânea para estudantes. Para cumprir essa tarefa, desenvolvemos um sistema de tradução de baixa latência que é adaptado para palestras e abrange vários pares de idiomas. Embora a mudança da tradução automática estatística tradicional para a tradução automática neural (NMT) tenha melhorado significativamente o desempenho, integrar a NMT à estrutura de tradução de fala exigiu vários ajustes. Abordamos as restrições de tempo de execução e diferentes tipos de entrada. Além disso, utilizamos o aprendizado único para adicionar facilmente novos termos específicos de tópicos ao sistema. Além de um melhor desempenho, o NMT também nos permitiu aumentar nossos idiomas cobertos por meio do NMT multilíngue. % Combinando estas técnicas, somos capazes de fornecer um sistema de tradução de fala adaptado para várias línguas europeias.', 'fr': "Dans le monde globalisé d'aujourd'hui, nous avons la capacité de communiquer avec des personnes du monde entier. Cependant, dans de nombreuses situations, la barrière de la langue constitue toujours un problème majeur. Par exemple, de nombreux étudiants étrangers qui viennent étudier au KIT ne peuvent initialement pas suivre un cours en allemand. C'est pourquoi nous proposons un service d'interprétation simultanée automatique pour les étudiants. Pour accomplir cette tâche, nous avons développé un système de traduction à faible latence qui est adapté aux cours magistraux et couvre plusieurs paires de langues. Alors que le passage de la traduction automatique statistique traditionnelle à la traduction automatique neuronale (NMT) a considérablement amélioré les performances, l'intégration de la NMT dans le cadre de traduction vocale a nécessité plusieurs ajustements. Nous avons abordé les contraintes d'exécution et les différents types de saisie. De plus, nous avons utilisé l'apprentissage unique pour ajouter facilement de nouveaux termes spécifiques au système. Outre de meilleures performances, la NMT nous a également permis d'augmenter le nombre de langues couvertes grâce à la NMT multilingue.\xa0% En combinant ces techniques, nous sommes en mesure de fournir un système de traduction vocale adapté à plusieurs langues européennes.", 'ar': 'في عالم اليوم المعولم لدينا القدرة على التواصل مع الناس في جميع أنحاء العالم. ومع ذلك ، في العديد من المواقف لا يزال حاجز اللغة يمثل مشكلة رئيسية. على سبيل المثال ، لا يتمكن العديد من الطلاب الأجانب القادمين إلى KIT للدراسة في البداية من متابعة محاضرة باللغة الألمانية. لذلك ، نحن نقدم خدمة الترجمة الفورية التلقائية للطلاب. لإنجاز هذه المهمة ، قمنا بتطوير نظام ترجمة منخفض التأخير يتكيف مع المحاضرات ويغطي عدة أزواج لغوية. بينما أدى التحول من الترجمة الآلية الإحصائية التقليدية إلى الترجمة الآلية العصبية (NMT) إلى تحسين الأداء بشكل ملحوظ ، فإن دمج NMT في إطار ترجمة الكلام يتطلب العديد من التعديلات. لقد تناولنا قيود وقت التشغيل وأنواع مختلفة من المدخلات. علاوة على ذلك ، استخدمنا التعلم بلقطة واحدة لإضافة مصطلحات جديدة خاصة بالموضوع إلى النظام بسهولة. إلى جانب الأداء الأفضل ، مكنتنا NMT أيضًا من زيادة لغاتنا المغطاة من خلال NMT متعدد اللغات. بدمج هذه التقنيات ، نحن قادرون على توفير نظام ترجمة حديث مُكيف للعديد من اللغات الأوروبية.', 'es': 'En el mundo globalizado de hoy, tenemos la capacidad de comunicarnos con personas de todo el mundo. Sin embargo, en muchas situaciones, la barrera del idioma sigue siendo un problema importante. Por ejemplo, muchos estudiantes extranjeros que vienen a KIT para estudiar inicialmente no pueden seguir una clase de alemán. Por lo tanto, ofrecemos un servicio de interpretación simultánea automática para los estudiantes. Para cumplir con esta tarea, hemos desarrollado un sistema de traducción de baja latencia que se adapta a las clases magistrales y cubre varios pares de idiomas. Si bien el cambio de la traducción automática estadística tradicional a la traducción automática neuronal (NMT) mejoró significativamente el rendimiento, la integración de la NMT en el marco de traducción de voz requirió varios ajustes. Hemos abordado las limitaciones de tiempo de ejecución y los diferentes tipos de entrada. Además, utilizamos el aprendizaje único para añadir fácilmente al sistema nuevos términos específicos de un tema. Además de un mejor rendimiento, la NMT también nos permitió aumentar nuestros idiomas cubiertos a través de la NMT multilingüe.% Combinando estas técnicas, podemos ofrecer un sistema de traducción de voz adaptado para varios idiomas europeos.', 'ja': '今日のグローバル化された世界では、私たちは世界中の人々とコミュニケーションをとる能力を持っています。 しかしながら、多くの状況では、言語障壁は依然として大きな問題を提示している。 たとえば、多くの外国人学生が勉強のためにキットに来ており、最初はドイツ語の講義に従うことができません。 したがって、自動同時通訳サービスを学生向けに提供しています。 このタスクを達成するために、私たちは講義に適応し、いくつかの言語ペアをカバーする低遅延翻訳システムを開発しました。 従来の統計機械翻訳からニューラル機械翻訳（ NMT ）への切り替えはパフォーマンスを大幅に向上させたが、NMTを音声翻訳フレームワークに統合するにはいくつかの調整が必要であった。 実行時の制約とさまざまなタイプの入力に対処しました。 さらに、ワンショット学習を活用して、新しいトピック固有の用語をシステムに簡単に追加しました。 パフォーマンスの向上に加えて、NMTは多言語NMTを通じてカバー言語を増やすことも可能にしました。 %これらのテクニックを組み合わせることで、ヨーロッパのいくつかの言語に適応した音声翻訳システムを提供することができます。', 'hi': 'आज की वैश्वीकृत दुनिया में हमारे पास दुनिया भर के लोगों के साथ संवाद करने की क्षमता है। हालांकि, कई स्थितियों में भाषा बाधा अभी भी एक प्रमुख मुद्दा प्रस्तुत करती है। उदाहरण के लिए, अध्ययन करने के लिए केआईटी में आने वाले कई विदेशी छात्र शुरू में जर्मन में एक व्याख्यान का पालन करने में असमर्थ हैं। इसलिए, हम छात्रों के लिए एक स्वचालित एक साथ व्याख्या सेवा प्रदान करते हैं। इस कार्य को पूरा करने के लिए, हमने एक कम-विलंबता अनुवाद प्रणाली विकसित की है जो व्याख्यान के लिए अनुकूलित है और कई भाषा जोड़े को कवर करती है। जबकि पारंपरिक सांख्यिकीय मशीन अनुवाद से न्यूरल मशीन अनुवाद (एनएमटी) में स्विच ने प्रदर्शन में काफी सुधार किया, एनएमटी को भाषण अनुवाद ढांचे में एकीकृत करने के लिए कई समायोजन की आवश्यकता थी। हमने रन-टाइम बाधाओं और विभिन्न प्रकार के इनपुट को संबोधित किया है। इसके अलावा, हमने सिस्टम में आसानी से नए विषय-विशिष्ट शब्दों को जोड़ने के लिए एक-शॉट सीखने का उपयोग किया। बेहतर प्रदर्शन के अलावा, एनएमटी ने हमें बहुभाषी एनएमटी के माध्यम से हमारी कवर की गई भाषाओं को बढ़ाने में भी सक्षम बनाया। इन तकनीकों को मिलाकर, हम कई यूरोपीय भाषाओं के लिए एक अनुकूलित भाषण अनुवाद प्रणाली प्रदान करने में सक्षम हैं।', 'zh': '当今全球化世界,有力与世界各地人交。 然而众情者,语言障碍犹一大要也。 如外国学生KIT学者,初不得以德语讲。 故为诸生供自同声传译事。 开一译之统,宜用讲座而涵盖多种语言是也。 虽从旧计机器翻译至神经机器翻译(NMT)转显性能,然集NMT于语音翻译框架,须有调整。 我已解行时,约束与异类。 因一次性学轻添新主题特定术语。 自非善性外,NMT使多言NMT增我覆语。 合此术者,能为欧洲语数种,为改编语音译系统。', 'ru': 'В сегодняшнем глобализованном мире мы имеем возможность общаться с людьми по всему миру. Однако во многих ситуациях языковой барьер по-прежнему представляет собой серьезную проблему. Например, многие иностранные студенты, приезжающие в KIT для учебы, изначально не могут прослушать лекцию на немецком языке. Поэтому мы предлагаем студентам услугу автоматического синхронного перевода. Для выполнения этой задачи мы разработали систему перевода с низкой задержкой, которая адаптирована к лекциям и охватывает несколько языковых пар. Хотя переход от традиционного статистического машинного перевода к нейронному машинному переводу (НМП) значительно улучшил производительность, для интеграции НМП в структуру речевого перевода потребовалось несколько корректировок. Мы рассмотрели ограничения времени выполнения и различные типы входных данных. Кроме того, мы использовали одноразовое обучение, чтобы легко добавлять в систему новые термины, относящиеся к конкретным темам. Помимо лучшей производительности, NMT также позволила нам увеличить количество языков, на которых мы говорим, благодаря многоязычной NMT. % Объединяя эти техники, мы можем предоставить адаптированную систему перевода речи для нескольких европейских языков.', 'ga': 'I saol domhandaithe an lae inniu tá an cumas againn cumarsáid a dhéanamh le daoine ar fud an domhain. Mar sin féin, i go leor cásanna is ceist mhór fós an bhacainn teanga. Mar shampla, tá go leor mac léinn ón iasacht a thagann go KIT chun staidéar a dhéanamh ar dtús in ann léacht a dhéanamh sa Ghearmáinis. Mar sin, cuirimid seirbhís uathoibríoch ateangaireachta comhuaineach ar fáil do mhic léinn. Chun an tasc seo a chomhlíonadh, tá córas aistriúcháin íseal-fhola forbartha againn atá curtha in oiriúint do léachtaí agus a chlúdaíonn go leor péirí teangacha. Cé gur tháinig feabhas suntasach ar fheidhmíocht an aistrithe ó Aistriú Meaisín Staitistiúil traidisiúnta go dtí Aistriú Meaisín Néarach (NMT), bhí roinnt coigeartuithe ag teastáil chun NMT a chomhtháthú sa chreat aistriúcháin cainte. Thugamar aghaidh ar na srianta ama rite agus ar na cineálacha éagsúla ionchuir. Ina theannta sin, d’úsáideamar foghlaim aonghuth chun téarmaí nua a bhain go sonrach le topaicí a chur leis an gcóras go héasca. Seachas feidhmíocht níos fearr, chuir NMT ar ár gcumas ár dteangacha clúdaithe a mhéadú trí NMT ilteangach. % Trí na teicníochtaí seo a chomhcheangal, táimid in ann córas aistriúcháin cainte oiriúnaithe a sholáthar do roinnt teangacha Eorpacha.', 'el': 'Στον σημερινό παγκοσμιοποιημένο κόσμο έχουμε την ικανότητα να επικοινωνούμε με ανθρώπους σε όλο τον κόσμο. Ωστόσο, σε πολλές περιπτώσεις το γλωσσικό εμπόδιο εξακολουθεί να αποτελεί σημαντικό ζήτημα. Για παράδειγμα, πολλοί ξένοι φοιτητές που έρχονται στο KIT για να σπουδάσουν δεν μπορούν αρχικά να παρακολουθήσουν μια διάλεξη στα γερμανικά. Ως εκ τούτου, προσφέρουμε μια αυτόματη υπηρεσία ταυτόχρονης διερμηνείας για τους φοιτητές. Για να εκπληρώσουμε αυτό το καθήκον, έχουμε αναπτύξει ένα μεταφραστικό σύστημα χαμηλής καθυστέρησης, το οποίο είναι προσαρμοσμένο σε διαλέξεις και καλύπτει διάφορα γλωσσικά ζεύγη. Ενώ η μετάβαση από την παραδοσιακή στατιστική μηχανική μετάφραση στη νευρωνική μηχανική μετάφραση (NMT) βελτίωσε σημαντικά την απόδοση, για να ενσωματωθεί η NMT στο πλαίσιο μετάφρασης ομιλίας απαιτούσε αρκετές προσαρμογές. Αντιμετωπίσαμε τους περιορισμούς χρόνου εκτέλεσης και τους διαφορετικούς τύπους εισαγωγής. Επιπλέον, χρησιμοποιήσαμε τη μάθηση μιας βολής για να προσθέσουμε εύκολα νέους θεματικούς όρους στο σύστημα. Εκτός από την καλύτερη απόδοση, το NMT μας επέτρεψε επίσης να αυξήσουμε τις καλυμμένες γλώσσες μας μέσω της πολυγλωσσικής NMT.% Συνδυάζοντας αυτές τις τεχνικές, είμαστε σε θέση να παρέχουμε ένα προσαρμοσμένο σύστημα μετάφρασης ομιλίας για διάφορες ευρωπαϊκές γλώσσες.', 'hu': 'A mai globalizált világban képesek vagyunk kommunikálni az emberekkel a világ minden táján. Sok helyzetben azonban a nyelvi akadály továbbra is komoly kérdést jelent. Például sok külföldi diák, akik tanulni akarnak a KIT-re, kezdetben nem tudnak német nyelvű előadást követni. Ezért automatikus szinkrontolmácsolási szolgáltatást kínálunk a hallgatók számára. Ennek érdekében kifejlesztettünk egy alacsony késleltetésű fordítási rendszert, amely az előadásokhoz igazított és több nyelvpárt lefed. Míg a hagyományos statisztikai gépi fordításról a neurális gépi fordításra (NMT) való áttérés jelentősen javította a teljesítményt, az NMT beszédfordítási keretrendszerbe való integrálásához számos módosítást igényelt. Foglalkoztunk a futási idő korlátaival és a különböző típusú bemenetekkel. Ezenkívül egyszeri tanulást használtunk arra, hogy könnyedén új témaspecifikus kifejezéseket adjunk hozzá a rendszerhez. A jobb teljesítmény mellett az NMT lehetővé tette számunkra, hogy többnyelvű NMT segítségével növeljük a lefedett nyelveket.% Ezeknek a technikáknak a kombinációjával több európai nyelv számára is képesek vagyunk adaptált beszédfordítási rendszert biztosítani.', 'ka': 'დოლობალური მსოფლიოში ჩვენ გვაქვს შესაძლებლობა სამყაროს ადამიანებთან კომუნიკაცია. მაგრამ, ბევრი სიტაციაში ენის ბარიერი უკვე მნიშვნელოვანია. მაგალითად, ბევრი განსხვავებული სტუდენტები KIT-ს გასწავლად დავიწყებენ დასაწყველად ვერ შეუძლებელია გერმანეთში ლვკურაციას. ამიტომ, ჩვენ სტუდენტებისთვის ავტომატიკური სერვისი განსხვავება. ამ დავალების შესაძლებელად, ჩვენ განვითარებეთ ცოტაციის სისტემა, რომელიც ელექციებისთვის აეპორტირებულია და რამდენიმე ენის ზოგებისთვის შესაძლებელია. თუმცა ტრადიციონალური სტატისტიკური მაქსინის გადატვირთან ნეიროლური მაქსინის გადატვირთან (NMT) მნიშვნელოვანად უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო უფრო მეტად გამო ჩვენ გავაკეთებეთ გავაკეთებული დროის შედრებები და განსხვავებული გზები. დამატებით, ჩვენ ერთი სტრიქტის სწავლების გამოყენება სისტემაში ახალი ტემების განსაკუთრებული სიტყვების დამატებისთვის. უკეთესი სამუშაო დამატებით, NMT მოგვიძლია ჩვენთვის მრავალენგური NMT-ის გამოყენებას გავიზრდით. ამ ტექნექციების შესაძლებლობა, ჩვენ შეგვიძლია აპექტირებული სისტემის შესაძლებლობა რამდენიმე ვროპოლიო ენებისთვის.', 'mk': 'Во денешниот глобализиран свет имаме способност да комуницираме со луѓето низ целиот свет. Сепак, во многу ситуации јазичката бариера сé уште претставува големо прашање. На пример, многу странски студенти кои доаѓаат на КИТ за учење не можат првично да следат предавање на германски. Затоа, нудиме автоматска симултантна интерпретација за студентите. To fulfill this task, we have developed a low-latency translation system that is adapted to lectures and covers several language pairs.  While the switch from traditional Statistical Machine Translation to Neural Machine Translation (NMT) significantly improved performance, to integrate NMT into the speech translation framework required several adjustments.  Ги решивме ограничувањата на времето на бегство и различните видови на внесување. Покрај тоа, употребивме еднопатно учење за лесно да додадеме нови термини специфични за тема во системот. Покрај подобрите резултати, НМТ, исто така, ни овозможи да ги зголемиме нашите покриени јазици преку мултијазичен НМТ. % Комбинирајќи ги овие техники, можеме да обезбедиме адаптиран систем за преведување на говорот за неколку европски јазици.', 'lt': 'Šiandien globalizuotame pasaulyje turime galimybę bendrauti su žmonėmis visame pasaulyje. Tačiau daugeliu atvejų kalbos kliūtis vis dar kelia svarbų klausimą. Pavyzdžiui, daugelis užsienio studentų, atvykstančių į KIT studijuoti, iš pradžių negali mokytis vokiečių kalba. Todėl mes siūlome studentams automatinę vienu metu vertimo žodžiu paslaugą. To fulfill this task, we have developed a low-latency translation system that is adapted to lectures and covers several language pairs.  Nors perėjimas nuo tradicinio statistikos mašinų vertimo prie neuroninių mašinų vertimo (NMT) gerokai pagerėjo rezultatai, norint integruoti NMT į kalbos vertimo sistemą reikėjo keleto koregavimų. We have addressed the run-time constraints and different types of input.  Be to, mes naudojome vienkartinį mokymąsi, kad į sistemą lengvai pridėtume naujus konkrečiai temai būdingus terminus. Be geresnių rezultatų, NMT taip pat leido mums padidinti savo kalbas daugiakalbėmis NMT. Suderindami šiuos metodus galime sukurti pritaikytą kalbos vertimo sistemą kelioms Europos kalboms.', 'it': "Nel mondo globalizzato di oggi abbiamo la capacità di comunicare con le persone di tutto il mondo. Tuttavia, in molte situazioni la barriera linguistica presenta ancora un problema importante. Ad esempio, molti studenti stranieri che vengono al KIT per studiare non sono inizialmente in grado di seguire una lezione in tedesco. Pertanto, offriamo un servizio di interpretazione simultanea automatica per gli studenti. Per svolgere questo compito, abbiamo sviluppato un sistema di traduzione a bassa latenza che si adatta alle lezioni frontali e copre diverse coppie linguistiche. Mentre il passaggio dalla tradizionale traduzione automatica statistica alla traduzione automatica neurale (NMT) ha migliorato significativamente le prestazioni, per integrare l'NMT nel framework di traduzione vocale ha richiesto diversi aggiustamenti. Abbiamo affrontato i vincoli di runtime e i diversi tipi di input. Inoltre, abbiamo utilizzato l'apprendimento one-shot per aggiungere facilmente nuovi termini specifici per l'argomento al sistema. Oltre a migliorare le prestazioni, NMT ci ha anche permesso di aumentare le nostre lingue coperte attraverso NMT multilingue.% Combinando queste tecniche, siamo in grado di fornire un sistema di traduzione vocale adattato per diverse lingue europee.", 'ml': 'ഇന്നുള്ള ലോകത്തില്\u200d നമുക്ക് ലോകത്തുള്ള ആളുകളോടൊപ്പം ബന്ധപ്പെടാനുള്ള കഴിവുണ്ട്. എന്നാലും, പല സാഹചര്യങ്ങളിലും, ഭാഷ തടസ്സപ്പെടുത്തുന്നത് പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഒരു പ്രശ്നമാണ്. ഉദാഹരണത്തിന്, കിടിയിലേക്ക് പഠിക്കാന്\u200d വന്ന പല വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്കും ആദ്യം ജര്\u200dമ്മനിലെ പ്രസ്താവിക അതുകൊണ്ട്, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സ്വയമായി വിശദീകരിക്കുന്ന വിദ്യാര്\u200dത്ഥികള്\u200dക്ക് സേവനം നല്\u200dകുന്നു. ഈ ജോലി പൂര്\u200dത്തിയാക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു കുറഞ്ഞ ലാറ്റന്\u200dസി പരിഭാഷയുടെ സിസ്റ്റം നിര്\u200dമ്മിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഭാഷ പാഠമായ സ്റ്റാറ്റിസ്റ്റിസ്റ്റിക്കല്\u200d മെഷീനില്\u200d നിന്നും നെയുറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരിഭാഷത്തിലേക്ക് മാറ്റുമ്പോള്\u200d NMT പ്രവര്\u200dത്തനങ്ങള്\u200d വളരെ മെച്ചപ We have addressed the run-time constraints and different types of input.  അതിനുശേഷം, നമ്മള്\u200d ഒരു ഷോട്ട് പഠിക്കുന്നത് സിസ്റ്റത്തിലേക്ക് പുതിയ പ്രത്യേക വിധികള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കാന്\u200d ഉപയോഗ നല്ല പ്രദര്\u200dശനം കൂടാതെ, NMT നമ്മള്\u200dക്ക് നമ്മുടെ പൊതിഞ്ഞ ഭാഷകള്\u200d മുഴുവന്\u200d എംഎംടിയിലൂടെ വര്\u200dദ്ധിപ്പിച്ച ഈ സാങ്കേതികവിദ്യകള്\u200d കൂട്ടിച്ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നുവെങ്കില്\u200d നമുക്ക് ഒരു പ്രസംഗ വാക്ക് വിഭാഷണ സിസ്റ്റ', 'mt': 'Fid-dinja globalizzata tal-lum għandna l-kapaċità li nikkomunikaw man-nies madwar id-dinja. Madankollu, f’ħafna sitwazzjonijiet l-ostaklu lingwistiku għadu jippreżenta kwistjoni ewlenija. Pereżempju, ħafna studenti barranin li ġejjin fil-KIT biex jistudjaw inizjalment ma jistgħux isegwu lezzjoni bil-Ġermaniż. Għalhekk, noffru servizz awtomatiku ta’ interpretazzjoni simultanja għall-istudenti. Biex twettaq dan il-kompitu, żviluppajna sistema ta’ traduzzjoni b’latenza baxxa li hija adattata għal lezzjonijiet u tkopri diversi pari lingwistiċi. Filwaqt li l-bidla mit-Traduzzjoni tradizzjonali tal-Makkinarju Statistiku għat-Traduzzjoni tal-Makkinarju Newrali (NMT) tejbet b’mod sinifikanti l-prestazzjoni, biex l-NMT jiġi integrat fil-qafas tat-traduzzjoni tad-diskors kien jeħtieġ diversi aġġustamenti. Aħna indirizzajna r-restrizzjonijiet fuq il-perjodu ta’ żmien u t-tipi differenti ta’ input. Barra minn hekk, użajna tagħlim b’darba biex faċilment iżżid termini ġodda speċifiċi għas-suġġett mas-sistema. Besides better performance, NMT also enabled us increase our covered languages through multilingual NMT. %  Meta nikkombinaw dawn it-tekniki, nistgħu nipprovdu sistema adattata tat-traduzzjoni tad-diskors għal diversi lingwi Ewropej.', 'ms': 'Di dunia globalisasi hari ini kita mempunyai kemampuan untuk berkomunikasi dengan orang-orang di seluruh dunia. Namun, dalam banyak situasi penghalang bahasa masih menghasilkan isu utama. Contohnya, ramai pelajar asing yang datang ke KIT untuk belajar tidak dapat mengikut pelajaran dalam bahasa Jerman. Oleh itu, kami menawarkan perkhidmatan interpretasi simultan automatik untuk pelajar. Untuk memenuhi tugas ini, kami telah mengembangkan sistem terjemahan ketinggalan rendah yang disesuaikan kepada pelajaran dan meliputi beberapa pasangan bahasa. Sementara pemindahan dari Penerjemahan Mesin Statistik tradisional ke Penerjemahan Mesin Neural (NMT) meningkatkan prestasi yang signifikan, untuk mengintegrasikan NMT ke dalam kerangka penyerjemahan ucapan memerlukan beberapa pelarasan. We have addressed the run-time constraints and different types of input.  Selain itu, kami menggunakan pembelajaran satu-shot untuk mudah menambah terma baru-spesifik topik ke sistem. Selain prestasi yang lebih baik, NMT juga membolehkan kita meningkatkan bahasa kita meliputi melalui NMT berbilang bahasa. % Menggabungkan teknik ini, kita boleh menyediakan sistem terjemahan ucapan yang sesuai untuk beberapa bahasa Eropah.', 'no': 'I dagens globalisert verden har vi kapasiteten til å kommunisera med menneske over verden. I mange situasjonar har språkbehandlinga likevel eit stort problem. For eksempel, mange eksterne studenter som kommer til KIT til å studera er ikkje i stand til å følgja eit leksjon i tysk. Derfor tilbyr vi ein automatisk tolkingsteneste for studenten samtidig. For å fullføra denne oppgåva, har vi utvikla eit låg latensingsomsetjingssystem som er tilpassa til leksjonar og dekker fleire språkopar. Mens omsetjinga frå tradisjonell statistisk maskinsomsetjing til neuralmaskinsomsetjing (NMT) er betydelig forbetra utviklinga, må NMT integrere i taleomsetjingsframmeverket nødvendig fleire justeringar. Vi har adressert avgrensingane for køyrende og ulike typar inndata. I tillegg brukte vi ein liten læring for å enkelt leggja til nye temaspesifikke vilkår i systemet. I tillegg til betre utviklingar, slått NMT også på å auka våre dekke språk gjennom fleirspråk NMT. % Kombinerer vi desse teknikkene, kan vi tilpassa eit tilpassa taleomsetjingssystem for fleire europeiske språk.', 'pl': 'W dzisiejszym zglobalizowanym świecie mamy możliwość komunikowania się z ludźmi na całym świecie. Jednak w wielu sytuacjach bariera językowa nadal stanowi poważny problem. Na przykład wielu zagranicznych studentów przyjeżdżających do KIT na studia początkowo nie jest w stanie uczestniczyć w wykładzie w języku niemieckim. Dlatego oferujemy usługę automatycznego tłumaczenia symultanicznego dla studentów. Aby spełnić to zadanie, opracowaliśmy system tłumaczeń o niskich opóźnieniach, który jest dostosowany do wykładów i obejmuje kilka par językowych. Podczas gdy przejście z tradycyjnego statystycznego tłumaczenia maszynowego na neuronowe tłumaczenie maszynowe (NMT) znacznie poprawiło wydajność, integracja NMT z frameworkiem tłumaczenia mowy wymagała kilku dostosowań. Zajęliśmy się ograniczeniami czasu uruchomienia i różnymi rodzajami danych wejściowych. Ponadto wykorzystaliśmy one-shot learning, aby łatwo dodać nowe terminy specyficzne dla danego tematu do systemu. Oprócz lepszej wydajności, NMT pozwoliło nam również zwiększyć nasze objęte językami poprzez wielojęzyczne NMT.% Łącząc te techniki, jesteśmy w stanie zapewnić dostosowany system tłumaczenia mowy dla kilku języków europejskich.', 'ro': 'În lumea globalizată de astăzi avem capacitatea de a comunica cu oamenii din întreaga lume. Cu toate acestea, în multe situații bariera lingvistică prezintă încă o problemă majoră. De exemplu, mulți studenți străini care vin la KIT pentru a studia sunt inițial incapabili să urmeze o prelegere în limba germană. Prin urmare, oferim un serviciu automat de interpretare simultană pentru studenți. Pentru a îndeplini această sarcină, am dezvoltat un sistem de traducere cu latență redusă, adaptat la prelegeri și acoperă mai multe perechi de limbi. În timp ce trecerea de la traducerea automată statistică tradițională la traducerea automată neurală (NMT) a îmbunătățit semnificativ performanța, pentru a integra NMT în cadrul traducerii vorbirii a necesitat mai multe ajustări. Am abordat constrângerile de funcționare și diferitele tipuri de intrare. Mai mult decât atât, am folosit o singură învățare pentru a adăuga cu ușurință noi termeni specifice subiectului la sistem. Pe lângă performanțe mai bune, NMT ne-a permis, de asemenea, să creștem limbile noastre acoperite prin intermediul NMT multilingv.% Combinând aceste tehnici, putem oferi un sistem adaptat de traducere vocală pentru mai multe limbi europene.', 'mn': 'Өнөөдөр дэлхийн ертөнцөд бидэнд дэлхийн хүмүүстэй холбоотой чадвар байна. Гэхдээ олон нөхцөлд хэл хязгаар нь үндсэн асуудал бий болдог. Жишээлбэл, олон гадаад сурагчид КИТ-д суралцаж ирж Герман хэлний лекцийг дагаж чадахгүй. Тиймээс бид оюутнуудын хувьд автоматжуулах үйлчилгээ автоматжуулдаг. Энэ ажлыг хийхэд бид хэдэн хэл хоёрыг дамжуулж, лекцийг дамжуулж, хэдэн хэл хоёрыг дамжуулан бага-сүүлийн орчуулах системийг бүтээсэн. Хэдийгээр уламжлалт Статистикийн Машины хөгжлийн мэдрэлийн машины хөгжлийн хөгжлийн (NMT) хөгжлийн үйл ажиллагааг маш сайжруулсан ч NMT-г илтгэлийн хөгжлийн хөгжлийн хэлбэрээр нь олон өөр Бид цаг хугацааны хязгаарлалтыг, өөр төрлийн орлуулалтыг харуулсан. Мөн бид системд шинэ сэдвийн тодорхойлолтыг амархан нэмэхэд нэг шалтгаан сургалтыг ашигласан. Хамгийн сайн үйл ажиллагааны гадна, NMT нь бидэнд олон хэл NMT-ээр мөн хөгжүүлсэн хэлнүүдийг нэмэгдүүлж чадна. Эдгээр техникуудыг нэгтгэхэд бид олон Европын хэл дээр адилхан ярианы орчуулах системийг хангаж чадна.', 'sr': 'U današnjem globalizovanom svijetu imamo sposobnost da komuniciramo sa ljudima širom sveta. Međutim, u mnogim situacijama jezička barijera još uvijek predstavlja veliki problem. Na primer, mnogi strani studenti koji dolaze u KIT da prouče nisu u mogućnosti pratiti predavanje na njemačkom jeziku. Zato nudimo automatsku službu istovremenog interpretacije studentima. Da bi ispunili ovaj zadatak, razvili smo sistem prevoda sa niskom latencijom koji se prilagodi predavanjima i pokriva nekoliko jezičkih parova. Iako je prekidač iz tradicionalnog prevoda statističkih mašina u neurološki prevod mašine (NMT) značajno poboljšao provedbu, da bi integrirao NMT u okvir prevoda govora potrebno je nekoliko prilagodba. Odrešili smo ograničenja trčanja i različite vrste ulaska. Osim toga, iskoristili smo jednostavno učenje kako bi lako dodali novi uslovi za tema u sistem. Osim boljih predstava, NMT nam je takođe omogućio da povećamo naše pokrivene jezike preko multijezičkih NMT. % Spojiti te tehnike, mi smo u stanju da pružimo prilagođeni sistem prevoda govora za nekoliko evropskih jezika.', 'si': 'අද ග්\u200dරස්ථාවික ලෝකයේ අපිට ලෝකයේ මිනිස්සුන්ට සම්බන්ධ කරන්න පුළුවන් තියෙනවා. නමුත්, බොහොම ස්ථානයක් තියෙන්නේ භාෂාව අවධානයක් තියෙනවා. උදාහරණයෙන්, ගොඩක් පුද්ගලික විද්\u200dයාඥාරියෝ KIT වලට ආවා අධ්\u200dයානය කරන්න පටන් ගන්න බෑ ජර්මන් වල ඉ ඉතින්, අපි ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විද්\u200dයාපිත සේවාව සඳහා ස්වයංක්\u200dරීය විද්\u200dයාපිත විද්\u200dයාපිත සේව මේ වැඩේ පුරවර්තනය කරන්න, අපි අඩු ලේටෙන්සි වාර්තාව පද්ධතියක් විවෘත කරලා තියෙන්නේ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සහ භාෂා සාමාන්\u200dය ස්ථිතික පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය පද්ධතිය (NMT) පද්ධතිය වාර්ථාවක් වෙනුවෙන් ස්විච්ච විශ්වාස කරනවා නමු අපි දැනගන්න වෙලාවක් සීමාව සහ වෙනස් ප්\u200dරමාණ වර්ගයක් ලැබුනා. තවත්, අපි පද්ධතියට අළුත් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සමහර විදිහට අළුත් විශේෂ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් අයිති කරන් වඩා හොඳ වැඩක් තියෙන්නේ, NMT එක්ක අපිට සක්\u200dරිය කරලා තියෙන්නේ අපේ ආරක්ෂිත භාෂාවල් විශේෂ කරල මේ තාක්ෂණය සම්බන්ධ කරන්න, අපිට පුළුවන් යුරෝපිය භාෂාවක් වෙනස් වලට කතාව පද්ධතියක් සම්බන්', 'so': 'Dunida caalamiga maanta waxaynu awood u leennahay in la xiriirno dadka dunida oo dhan. Si kastaba ha ahaatee xaaladaha badan qalabka luuqadu weli wuxuu keenaa arrin muhiim ah. Tusaale ahaan ardayda ajnabiga ah oo u imaanaya KIT waxbarashada bilowga ma raaci karaan barashada Jarmalka. Sidaa darteed waxaynu ardayda u bixinaynaa adeega turjumaadda oo iskuul ah. Si aan u dhamaadno shuqulkaas, waxaan horumarinnay nidaam turjumista hoos u yar oo u habboon luqadaha, waxaana ku daboolnay laba nooc oo luqad ah. Inta lagu badalo tarjumaadka Statistical Machine Turjumidda Neural Machine (NMT) waxaa loo baahan yahay mid aad u hagaajiya horumarinta, si uu NMT ugu integriyo shirkadda turjumaadda oo hadalka looga baahan yahay mid hagid ah. Waxaannu macaamiloonay xadgudubyada waqtiga lagu soconayo iyo noocyo kala duduwan oo input ah. Furthermore, waxaynu isticmaalnay waxbarasho hal suurad ah si fudud ugu daro saxda cusub ee nidaamka. Besides better performance, NMT also enabled us increase our covered languages through multilingual NMT. %  Isku sameynta teknikadan waxaynu awoodi karnaa in lagu sameynayo nidaam turjumista luuqada afka Yurub oo la mid ah.', 'sv': 'I dagens globaliserade värld har vi förmågan att kommunicera med människor över hela världen. I många situationer utgör dock språkbarriären fortfarande en viktig fråga. Till exempel kan många utländska studenter som kommer till KIT för att studera inledningsvis inte följa en föreläsning på tyska. Därför erbjuder vi en automatisk simultantolkning för studenter. För att uppfylla denna uppgift har vi utvecklat ett översättningssystem med låg fördröjning som är anpassat för föreläsningar och täcker flera språkpar. Medan övergången från traditionell statistisk maskinöversättning till neural maskinöversättning (NMT) förbättrade prestandan avsevärt, krävde flera justeringar för att integrera NMT i talöversättningsramen. Vi har tagit itu med körtidsbegränsningarna och olika typer av indata. Dessutom använde vi engångsinlärning för att enkelt lägga till nya ämnesspecifika termer i systemet. Förutom bättre prestanda gjorde NMT det också möjligt för oss att öka våra täckta språk genom flerspråkig NMT.% Genom att kombinera dessa tekniker kan vi erbjuda ett anpassat talöversättningssystem för flera europeiska språk.', 'ur': 'آج کے گلوبرال دنیا میں ہم کو دنیا میں لوگوں کے ساتھ رابطہ کرنے کا قابل ہے۔ However, in many situations the language barrier still presents a major problem. مثال یہ ہے کہ بہت سے غریب استاد کیٹ کے پاس آتے ہیں جو آغاز سے جرمن میں لکتوری کے پیچھے نہیں آتے۔ لہٰذا ہم نے دانش آموزوں کے لئے ایک دوسری تفسیر کی خدمت کی۔ اس کام کو پورا کرنے کے لئے ہم نے ایک کم لاٹنسیٹ ترجمہ سیسٹم کو ایجاد کیا ہے جو لکتوروں کے ساتھ مطابق ہے اور بہت سی زبان جوڑوں کو پورا کرتا ہے۔ حالانکہ نئورل ماشین کی ترجمہ (NMT) سے نئورل ماشین کی ترجمہ (NMT) سے سوچ بہت اچھی عملکرد کی جگہ، NMT کو کلام ترجمہ فرمود میں جمع کرنے کے لئے بہت سی تعمیرات کی ضرورت تھی۔ ہم نے چلنے کے وقت محدودیت اور مختلف طریقے اینپیٹ کے بارے میں دریافت کیا ہے۔ اور اس کے بعد ہم نے ایک شٹ کی تعلیم کا استعمال کیا ہے تاکہ سیسٹم میں نئی ٹوپ ویسی شرایط اضافہ کریں۔ اچھی فعالیت کے علاوہ، NMT نے ہمیں بہت سی زبانوں کے NMT سے زیادہ فعال کر دیا۔ یہ تکنیک پیدا کرنے کے لئے ہم بہت سی اروپائی زبانوں کے لئے ایک مطابق سخنرانی ترجمہ سیستم کے لئے قادر ہیں۔', 'ta': 'இன்றைய உலகத்தில் நாம் உலக மக்களுடன் தொடர்பு கொள்ள முடியும். ஆனால், பல நிலைகளில், மொழி தடை இன்னும் முக்கிய பிரச்சனையை கொண்டு வருகிறது. உதாரணமாக, பல வெளிநாட்டு மாணவர்கள் KIT படிப்பதற்கு வருகின்றனர் முதலில் ஜெர்மனில் ஒரு பொருளை பின்பற்ற முடியாத எனவே, நாம் மாணவர்களுக்கு ஒரு தானியங்கி ஒரு அதே நேரத்தில் விளக்கம் சேவையை வழங்குகிறோம். இந்த பணியை நிறைவேற்ற, நாங்கள் ஒரு குறைந்த நேரம் மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அமைப்பை உருவாக்கியிருக்கிறோம். அது பொருத்தமான பாரம்பரிய புள்ளிவிவரமான இயந்திரத்திலிருந்து நெயுரல் இயந்திரத்திற்கு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு (NMT) மாற்றும் போது, NMT மொழிபெயர்ப்பு மொழிபெயர்ப நாங்கள் ஓடும் நேர கட்டுப்பாடுகள் மற்றும் வேறு வகையான உள்ளீடுகளை முகவரிக்கிறோம். மேலும், நாங்கள் கணினியில் புதிய தலைப்பு- குறிப்பிட்ட விளக்கங்களை சேர்க்க ஒரு சுட்டி கற்றுக்கொள்ள பயன்பட மேலும் சிறந்த செயல்பாடு தவிர, NMT நம்மை பல மொழி NMT மூலம் மூலம் மூடப்பட்ட மொழிகளை அதிகரிக்க செயல்படுத்தியது. இந்த தொழில்நுட்பங்களை சேர்த்து, நாம் சில ஐரோப்பிய மொழிகளுக்கு ஒப்புரிய பேச்சு மொழிபெயர்ப்பு அம', 'kk': 'Бүгін жалпы әлемдегі әлемдегі адамдармен қатынау мүмкіндігіміз бар. Бірақ көптеген жағдайда тіл бариері әлі маңызды мәселелерді көрсетеді. Мысалы, КИТ-ке келген артық студенттердің көпшілігі неміс тілінде лекциясын қарай алмайды. Сондықтан біз студенттердің автоматты түрлендіру қызметін жеткіземіз. Бұл тапсырманы орындау үшін біз бірнеше тіл екеуін жасап, лекцияларға өзгертілген төменгі аудару жүйесін жасадық. Дәстүрлі статистикалық машинаның аудармасынан нейрондық машинаның аудармасына (NMT) жылдамдығын өзгерту үшін NMT- ті сөздердің аудармасына бірнеше түзету керек болады. Біз орындалған уақыттың шектеулерін және басқа түрлерін жасадық. Қосымша, жүйеге жаңа нақышты арнаулы сөздерді оңай қосу үшін бір түрлі оқытуды қолдандық. Жақсы істеу арқылы NMT тілдерімізді көп тілді NMT арқылы көп тілдерімізді көтеруге мүмкіндік береді. Бұл техникаларды біріктіру үшін бірнеше Еуропалық тілдер үшін адаптацияланған сөйлеу жүйесін қолдануға болады.', 'uz': "Bugun dunyo bo'lgan dunyoda biz dunyo bo'ylab odamlar bilan bog'lash imkoniyati bor. Lekin ko'pchilik holatda tilning qismlari juda muhim muammolar keladi. Masalan, KIT o'qish uchun ko'pchilik o'quvchilari o'rganishni boshlaydi, Olmonchaga o'qishni o'rganib olmaydi. Biz o'quvchilar uchun avtomatik o'quvvat tarjima xizmatini beramiz. Bu vazifani ishga tushirish uchun biz tahrirlash tizimini yaratdik va bir necha tillar ikkita xil tilni qaraydi. Name Biz ishga tushirilgan vaqt chegaralari va turli kiritish turlarini boshqaramiz. Furthermore, we utilized one-shot learning to easily add new topic-specific terms to the system.  Bu yaxshi ishni aytganda, NMT bizni bir necha tilning tili yordamida qo'llangan tilimizni ko'paytirishga yordam beradi. % Bu suhbatlar bilan bir nechta yevropacha tilga murojaat qilish tizimini yaratib olamiz.", 'vi': 'Trong thế giới to àn cầu ngày hôm nay chúng tôi có khả năng giao tiếp với mọi người trên thế giới. Tuy nhiên, trong nhiều tình huống, rào chắn ngôn ngữ vẫn là vấn đề quan trọng. Ví dụ, nhiều sinh viên ngoại quốc đến KIT để học đầu tiên không thể theo một bài giảng bằng tiếng Đức. Chúng tôi cung cấp dịch vụ giải thích đồng thời tự động cho học sinh. Để hoàn thành nhiệm vụ này, chúng tôi đã phát triển một hệ thống dịch phiên bản chậm trễ có thể thích nghi với bài giảng và bao gồm nhiều cặp ngôn ngữ. Mặc dù việc chuyển đổi từ máy tính truyền thống sang dịch máy thần kinh (NMB) đã cải thiện đáng kể các thành quả, để hoà NMT vào bộ dịch giọng diễn tả cần nhiều điều chỉnh. Chúng tôi đã đối mặt với giới hạn thời gian chạy và các loại nhập. Hơn nữa, chúng tôi sử dụng một phát để dễ dàng thêm các điều khoản đặc biệt về chủ đề vào hệ thống. Bên cạnh hiệu ứng tốt hơn, công ty NMT đã cho chúng ta nhiều ngôn ngữ hơn Kết hợp các kỹ thuật này, chúng tôi có thể cung cấp một hệ thống dịch chuyển ngôn ngữ thích nghi cho nhiều ngôn ngữ Châu Âu.', 'bg': 'В днешния глобализиран свят ние имаме способността да общуваме с хората по целия свят. Въпреки това, в много ситуации езиковата бариера все още представлява основен проблем. Например, много чуждестранни студенти, които идват в КИТ, за да учат, първоначално не могат да следват лекция на немски език. Затова предлагаме автоматичен симултанен превод за студенти. За да изпълним тази задача, разработихме система за превод с ниска латентност, която е адаптирана към лекции и обхваща няколко езикови двойки. Докато преминаването от традиционния статистически машинен превод към неврален машинен превод (НМТ) значително подобри производителността, интегрирането на НМТ в рамката за речен превод изисква няколко корекции. Разгледахме ограниченията във времето за изпълнение и различните видове входни данни. Освен това използвахме еднократно обучение, за да добавим лесно нови специфични за темата термини към системата. Освен по-добра производителност, НМТ ни позволи да увеличим нашите покрити езици чрез многоезична НМТ.% Комбинирайки тези техники, ние сме в състояние да предоставим адаптирана система за превод на реч за няколко европейски езика.', 'hr': 'U današnjem globalizovanom svijetu imamo sposobnost komuniciranja sa ljudima širom svijeta. Međutim, u mnogim situacijama jezička barijera još uvijek predstavlja veliki problem. Na primjer, mnogi strani studenti koji dolaze u KIT da prouče nisu u mogućnosti pratiti predavanje na njemačkom jeziku. Stoga nudimo automatsku službu istovremenog interpretacije studentima. Za ispunjavanje ovog zadatka razvili smo sistem prevoda s niskom latencijom koji se prilagođa predavanjima i pokriva nekoliko jezičkih parova. Iako je prekidač iz tradicionalnog prevoda statističkih strojeva u neuronski prevod strojeva (NMT) značajno poboljšao učinkovitost, kako bi integrirao NMT u okvir prevoda govora potrebno je nekoliko prilagodba. Mi smo riješili ograničenja trčanja i različite vrste ulaska. Osim toga, iskoristili smo jednostavno učenje kako bi lako dodali novi uslovi specifičnih tema u sustav. Osim boljih učinka, NMT nam je također omogućio povećati naše pokrivene jezike preko multijezičkih NMT. % Spojiti te tehnike, možemo pružiti prilagođeni sustav prevoda govora za nekoliko europskih jezika.', 'da': 'I nutidens globaliserede verden har vi evnen til at kommunikere med mennesker over hele verden. I mange situationer udgør sprogbarrieren imidlertid stadig et stort problem. For eksempel er mange udenlandske studerende, der kommer til KIT for at studere, ikke i første omgang i stand til at følge et foredrag på tysk. Derfor tilbyder vi en automatisk simultantolkningsservice for studerende. For at opfylde denne opgave har vi udviklet et oversættelsessystem med lav ventetid, der er tilpasset foredrag og dækker flere sprogpar. Mens skiftet fra traditionel statistisk maskinoversættelse til neural maskinoversættelse (NMT) forbedrede ydeevnen betydeligt, krævede det flere justeringer for at integrere NMT i taleoversættelsesrammerne. Vi har taget fat på driftstidsbegrænsningerne og forskellige typer input. Desuden brugte vi one-shot læring til nemt at tilføje nye emnespecifikke termer til systemet. Udover bedre ydeevne gjorde NMT os også i stand til at øge vores dækkede sprog gennem flersproget NMT.% Ved at kombinere disse teknikker kan vi tilbyde et tilpasset taleoversættelsessystem til flere europæiske sprog.', 'nl': 'In de geglobaliseerde wereld van vandaag hebben we de mogelijkheid om te communiceren met mensen over de hele wereld. In veel situaties vormt de taalbarrière echter nog steeds een groot probleem. Zo zijn veel buitenlandse studenten die naar het KIT komen om te studeren in eerste instantie niet in staat om een lezing in het Duits te volgen. Daarom bieden wij een automatische simultaantolkdienst aan voor studenten. Om deze taak te vervullen, hebben we een vertaalsysteem met lage latentie ontwikkeld dat is aangepast aan lezingen en meerdere taalparen omvat. Terwijl de overstap van traditionele statistische machinevertaling naar neuronale machinevertaling (NMT) de prestaties aanzienlijk verbeterde, vereiste de integratie van NMT in het spraakvertaalframework verschillende aanpassingen. We hebben aandacht besteed aan de runtime beperkingen en verschillende soorten input. Bovendien gebruikten we one-shot learning om eenvoudig nieuwe topic-specifieke termen toe te voegen aan het systeem. Naast betere prestaties heeft NMT ons ook in staat gesteld onze gedekte talen te vergroten door meertalige NMT.% Door deze technieken te combineren, zijn we in staat om een aangepast spraakvertaalsysteem te bieden voor verschillende Europese talen.', 'de': 'In der heutigen globalisierten Welt haben wir die Fähigkeit, mit Menschen auf der ganzen Welt zu kommunizieren. In vielen Situationen stellt die Sprachbarriere jedoch nach wie vor ein großes Problem dar. So können viele ausländische Studierende, die zum Studium an das KIT kommen, zunächst nicht an einer Vorlesung auf Deutsch teilnehmen. Daher bieten wir einen automatischen Simultandolmetscher-Service für Studenten an. Um diese Aufgabe zu erfüllen, haben wir ein latenzfreies Übersetzungssystem entwickelt, das an Vorlesungen angepasst ist und mehrere Sprachpaare abdeckt. Während der Wechsel von der traditionellen statistischen maschinellen Übersetzung zur neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzung (NMT) die Leistung deutlich verbesserte, erforderte die Integration von NMT in das Sprachübersetzungs-Framework mehrere Anpassungen. Wir haben die Laufzeitbeschränkungen und verschiedene Arten von Eingaben angesprochen. Darüber hinaus nutzten wir One-Shot-Learning, um dem System neue themenspezifische Begriffe hinzuzufügen. Neben einer besseren Leistung ermöglichte NMT es uns auch, unsere abgedeckten Sprachen durch mehrsprachiges NMT zu erweitern.% Durch die Kombination dieser Techniken sind wir in der Lage, ein angepasstes Sprachübersetzungssystem für mehrere europäische Sprachen bereitzustellen.', 'id': 'Di dunia globalisasi hari ini kita memiliki kemampuan untuk berkomunikasi dengan orang-orang di seluruh dunia. Namun, dalam banyak situasi penghalang bahasa masih menunjukkan masalah utama. Contohnya, banyak siswa asing yang datang ke KIT untuk belajar tidak dapat mengikuti kuliah dalam bahasa Jerman. Oleh karena itu, kami menawarkan layanan interpretasi simultan otomatis untuk siswa. Untuk memenuhi tugas ini, kami telah mengembangkan sistem terjemahan rendah-latensi yang disesuaikan untuk kuliah dan meliputi beberapa pasangan bahasa. Sementara pemindahan dari Translation Statistical Machine tradisional ke Translation Neural Machine (NMT) meningkatkan prestasi yang signifikan, untuk mengintegrasikan NMT ke dalam rangkaian terjemahan pidato membutuhkan beberapa penyesuaian. Kami telah mengatasi batas waktu berjalan dan jenis input yang berbeda. Selain itu, kami menggunakan satu-shot belajar untuk mudah menambah istilah-istilah topik-spesifik baru ke sistem. Selain prestasi yang lebih baik, NMT juga memungkinkan kita meningkatkan bahasa kita yang tertutup melalui NMT berbilang bahasa. % Menggabungkan teknik-teknik ini, kita dapat menyediakan sistem terjemahan pidato yang disesuaikan untuk beberapa bahasa Eropa.', 'fa': 'در دنیای جهانی امروز توانایی داریم با مردم در جهان ارتباط برقرار کنیم. با این حال، در بسیاری از موقعیت\u200cها بازداشت زبان هنوز یک مسئله بزرگی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. برای مثال، بسیاری از دانش آموزان خارجی که برای مطالعه به KIT آمدند نتوانند در ابتدای یک سخنرانی در آلمان پیروی کنند. بنابراین، ما یک خدمت تفسیر اتوماتیک برای دانش آموزان پیشنهاد می کنیم. تا این کار را انجام دهیم، سیستم ترجمه پایین ترجمه را توسعه کردیم که به سخنرانی adapted to lectures and covers several language pairs. در حالی که تغییر از تغییر ماشین آمار سنتی به ترجمه ماشین عصبی (NMT) عملکرد بسیار بهتر شد، تا NMT را به چهارچوب ترجمه سخنرانی به چندین تغییرات نیاز داشت. ما محدودیت زمان اجرا و نوع ورودی مختلف را درباره\u200cی اجرا کرده\u200cایم. علاوه بر این، ما از یادگیری یک تصویر استفاده کردیم تا به آسانی شرایط جدید با موضوع خاص به سیستم اضافه کنیم. غیر از عملکرد بهتر، NMT هم به ما توانایی داد که زبان های مخفی را از طریق NMT multilingual افزایش دهیم. با ترکیب این تکنیک\u200cها، ما می\u200cتوانیم سیستم ترجمه\u200cهای سخنرانی را برای چند زبان اروپایی تحویل دهیم.', 'sw': 'Katika ulimwengu ulimwengu wa leo tuna uwezo wa kuwasiliana na watu duniani kote. Hata hivyo, katika hali nyingi, kizuizi cha lugha bado kinaleta suala kubwa. For example, many foreign students coming to KIT to study are initially unable to follow a lecture in German.  Kwa hiyo, tunatoa huduma za kujitegemea kwa ajili ya wanafunzi. Ili kuitimiza kazi hii, tumetengeneza mfumo wa kutafsiri wa kiwango cha chini ambacho umechanganyika kwa ajili ya lugha na kupandisha ndoa kadhaa za lugha. Wakati kubadilishwa kutoka Kifaa cha Takwimu cha Kiasili kwa Tafsiri ya Mashine ya Kifaransa (NMT) iliboresha ufanisi mkubwa, kuiunganisha NMT katika mfumo wa kutafsiri hotuba unahitaji kuboresha mabadiliko kadhaa. Tumezungumzia vikwazo vya muda unaoendelea na aina mbalimbali za input. Zaidi ya hayo, tulitumia kujifunza kwa moja kwa urahisi kuongeza muhimu mpya wa mada maalum kwenye mfumo. Zaidi ya utendaji mzuri, NMT pia ilituwezesha kuongeza lugha zetu zilizoandikwa kwa lugha mbalimbali za NMT. % Kuunganisha mbinu hizi, tunaweza kutoa mfumo wa kutafsiri wa lugha kadhaa za Ulaya.', 'tr': "Şu gün globalized dünýäde dünýäde adamlary bilen habarlaşmak ukyplarymyz bar. Ýöne köp ýagdaýda dil çykyşynyň esasy meselesi bar. mysal ýaly Köp daşarydaky okuwçylar KIT'e gelip bilmeýärler başlangyçda nemesçe sözläni yzarlamaýarlar. Şol sebäpli biz okuwçylar üçin awtomatik bir terjime hökmüni teklip edýäris. Bu zady doldurmak üçin biz esasy terjime sistemini döredip, okuwçylara üýtgeden we birnäçe dil çiftlerini örän netijeler. Däpli Statistik Maşynyň terjimesinden näyral Maşynyň terjimesine (NMT) täsirinden has gowurak geçirdi, we NMT-i söz terjimesine birnäçe üýtgewler gerek bolup durýar. Biz çykyş wagtyň çykyşyny we beýleki girişi çykardyk. Munuň üçin sistema täze tema has suratlary aňsatjag goşmak üçin bir at öwrenmesini ulandyk. Örän gowy ukyplaryň ýagdaýynda, NMT köp dillerimizi NMT bilen köp dillerimizi artdyrmagy mümkin etdi. % Bu teknikleri birleşdirmek üçin biz birnäçe Ewropa diller üçin üýtgeşik çykyş sistemasyny saýlayabiliris.", 'af': "In vandag se globaliseerde wêreld het ons die moontlikheid om met mense te kommuniseer oor die wêreld. Maar in baie situasies stel die taal-barrier nog 'n groot probleem voor. Byvoorbeeld, baie vreemde studente kom na KIT om te studeer is begin nie moontlik na volg 'n leksie in Duits. Daarom, ons offer 'n outomatiese eenvoudige uitleggingsdiens vir studente. Om hierdie taak te volbring, het ons 'n lae latensie vertalingsstelsel ontwikkel wat aan onderwerpe aanpas is en verskeie taal paar oordeel. Terwyl die skakel van tradisionele Statistiese Masjien Vertaling na Neurale Masjien Vertaling (NMT) betekeurig verbeterde prestasie, om NMT in die spraak vertaling raamwerk te integreer wat verskeie aanpassings benodig het. Ons het die hardlooptyd beheinings en verskillende tipes invoer adres gegee. Ons het ook een-skoot leer gebruik om nuwe onderwerp-spesifieke terme aan die stelsel te voeg maklik by te voeg. Buitend beter prestasie, het NMT ons ook geskied om ons oordekte tale te vermeerder deur multitaal NMT. % Om hierdie teknike te kombinerer, kan ons 'n aanpasbare spraak vertalingsstelsel vir verskeie Europeese tale verskaf.", 'sq': 'Në botën e globalizuar të sotme ne kemi aftësinë për të komunikuar me njerëzit anembanë botës. However, in many situations the language barrier still presents a major issue.  For example, many foreign students coming to KIT to study are initially unable to follow a lecture in German.  Prandaj, ne ofrojmë një shërbim automatik interpretimi simultan për studentët. Për të përmbushur këtë detyrë, kemi zhvilluar një sistem përkthimi me vonesë të ulët që është i përshtatur për leksionet dhe mbulon disa çifte gjuhësh. Ndërsa ndërrimi nga Traktatori tradicional i Makinës Statistike në Traktatorin e Makinës Neurale (NMT) përmirësoi ndjeshëm performancën, për të integruar NMT në kuadrin e përkthimit të fjalës kërkoi disa rregullime. Ne kemi trajtuar kufizimet e kohës së vrasjes dhe llojet e ndryshme të hyrjes. Përveç kësaj, ne përdorëm mësimin me një mundësi për të shtuar lehtë terma të reja specifike për temë në sistem. Përveç performancës më të mirë, NMT na lejoi gjithashtu të rritim gjuhët tona të mbuluara nëpërmjet NMT shumëgjuhës. % Duke kombinuar këto teknika, ne jemi në gjendje të sigurojmë një sistem të përshtatur përkthimi të fjalës për disa gjuhë evropiane.', 'am': 'ዛሬ በዓለምአቀፍ ከሰዎች ጋር ማነጋገር ኃይል አለን፡፡ ነገር ግን በብዙ ሁኔታ የቋንቋው ግንብ ገና ታላቅ ጉዳይ ነው፡፡ ለምሳሌ፣ ብዙዎች የውጭ ተማሪዎች ወደ KIT ለመተማር በመጀመሪያ በጀርመን የጀርመን ትምህርት ለመከተል አይችሉም፡፡ ስለዚህ ለተማሪዎቹ የራሳቸውን ትርጉም አገልግሎት እናቀርባለን፡፡ ይህንን ስራ ለመፈጸም፣ ለንግግር እና ለቋንቋዎች ሁለት ዓይነቶችን ለመዘጋጀት የሚያስፈልገውን የዝግታ ትርጉም ስርዓት መግለጫ አግኝተናል፡፡ ከባሕላዊው statistical machine ትርጓሜ ወደ ነዌral መኪን ትርጓሜ (NMT) በተለየ ጊዜ የNMT ትርጓሜ ወደ ንግግር ትርጓሜ ፍሬም ለመጠቀም በብዙ አስተካክል ያስፈልጋል። የድምፅ ሰዓት ግንኙነቶችን እና ልዩ ዓይነቶችን ይዞታሉ፡፡ በተጨማሪም፣ አንዲት ፎቶ ትምህርት ለመጨመር አዲስ የውይይት ግንኙነት ለመጨመር ተጠቃሚ ነበር፡፡ ከክፍለ ስርዓት በቀር NMT ደግሞ በቋንቋ ቋንቋዎቻችንን በብዙ ቋንቋዎች አበዛን፡፡ እነዚህን ቴክኖችንን በመስጠት፣ ለብዙዎች የኢትዮጵያ ቋንቋዎች የንግግር ትርጉም ስርዓት ማድረግ እናችላለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Այսօրվա գլոբալիզացված աշխարհում մենք կարող ենք հաղորդակցվել մարդկանց հետ ամբողջ աշխարհում: However, in many situations the language barrier still presents a major issue.  Օրինակ, շատ օտար ուսանողներ, ովքեր գալիս են KIT-ի ուսումնասիրելու համար, սկզբում չեն կարողանում գերմաներեն լեկտում հետևել: Այսպիսով, մենք աշակերտներին միաժամանակ ավտոմատիկ մեկնաբանական ծառայություն ենք առաջարկում: Այս խնդիրը կատարելու համար մենք զարգացրել ենք ցածր ուշացության թարգմանման համակարգ, որը հարմարեցվում է դասերին և ներառում է մի քանի լեզվի զույգեր: Մինչդեռ տեղափոխությունը ավանդական վիճակագրական մեքենայի թարգմանությունից նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանությունը (NMT) նշանակալի բարելավեց արդյունքը, որպեսզի ինտեգրենք NMT-ը խոսքի թարգմանման շրջանակի մեջ, պա Մենք լուծել ենք ընթացքի ժամանակի սահմանափակումները և տարբեր տեսակի ներմուծքները: Ավելին, մենք օգտագործեցինք մեկ անգամ սովորելը, որպեսզի հեշտությամբ ավելացնենք համակարգին նոր թեմահատուկ տերմիներ: Բացի ավելի լավ արդյունքներից, NMT-ը թույլ տվեց մեզ նաև բարձրացնել մեր ծածկված լեզուները բազմալեզու NMT-ի միջոցով: Այս մեթոդները համադրելով, մենք կարող ենք ապահովել խոսքի թարգմանման համակարգ մի քանի եվրոպական լեզուների համար:', 'az': "Bu gün globalizmiş dünyada dünyada insanlarla iletişim edə bilərik var. Ancaq çox şəkildə dil barəsində hələ də böyük bir məsəl göstərir. Məsələn, KIT təhsil etmək üçün bir çox xərcli öyrənənənlər ilk dəfə Almanlıq dilində təhsil edə bilməzlər. Beləliklə, öğrencilər üçün bir-birinə avtomatik interpretasyon servisi təklif edirik. Bu işi yerinə yetirmək üçün, biz təkrarlara uyğun və çoxlu dil çiftlərini örtüb düşük latenci təkrarlama sistemini düzəltdik. NMT'i söhbətə çevirmə çerçivesinin çevirməsindən nöral maşına çevirməsindən nöral maşına tərcümə etməkdən dəyişiklik artırdı. Biz fərqli vaxt müəyyənləşdirmələrini və fərqli inşallarını çəkdik. Daha sonra, sistemə yeni məsələlər müəyyən edilən şəkilləri asanlıqla birləşdirmək üçün bir dəfə öyrənməyi istifadə etdik. Daha yaxşı performans istisna olmaqla, NMT bizim dilimizi çoxlu dil NMT vasitəsilə artırmağa qadir etmişdir. Bu teknikləri birləşdirmək üçün çoxlu Avropa dillərinə uyğunlaşdırılmış danışma sistemini sağlayabilirik.", 'bn': 'আজকের বিশ্বের বিশ্বের মানুষের সাথে যোগাযোগের ক্ষমতা আছে। তবে অনেক পরিস্থিতিতে ভাষার বাধাগুলো এখনো একটা বিশাল বিষয় উপস্থাপন করে। উদাহরণস্বরূপ, অনেক বিদেশী ছাত্র কিটিতে পড়ার জন্য আসছে তারা প্রথমে জার্মানে একটি ভাষণ অনুসরণ করতে পারে না। তাই আমরা ছাত্রছাত্রীদের জন্য স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে ব্যাখ্যা সেবা প্রদান করি। এই কাজ সম্পূর্ণ করার জন্য আমরা একটি কম-লাতেন্সি অনুবাদ সিস্টেম উন্নয়ন করেছি যা ভাষণের সাথে মিলিত এবং কভার করে বেশ কয়েকটি ভা যখন ঐতিহ্যবাহী পরিসংখ্যান মেশিন থেকে নিউরাল মেশিন অনুবাদ (এনএমটি) অনুবাদের পরিবর্তনের পরিবর্তনগুলো গুরুত্বপূর্ণ উন্নত করে, যাতে এনএমটিকে ভাষণ আমরা চালানো সময়ের নিয়ম এবং বিভিন্ন ধরনের ইনপুটের কথা বলেছি। এছাড়াও, আমরা একটি গুলি শিক্ষা ব্যবহার করেছি সিস্টেমে নতুন বিষয়-নির্দিষ্ট শর্ত যোগ করার জন্য। আরো ভালো প্রদর্শন ছাড়া, এনএমটি আমাদের অনেক ভাষার মাধ্যমে আমাদের ভাষা বৃদ্ধি করতে সক্ষম হয়েছে। Combining these techniques, we are able to provide an adapted speech translation system for several European languages.', 'bs': 'U današnjem globalizovanom svijetu imamo sposobnost komuniciranja sa ljudima širom svijeta. Međutim, u mnogim situacijama jezička barijera još uvijek predstavlja veliki problem. Na primjer, mnogi strani studenti koji dolaze u KIT da prouče nisu u mogućnosti pratiti predavanje na njemačkom jeziku. Stoga nudimo automatsku istovremenu interpretaciju za studente. Da bi ispunili ovaj zadatak, razvili smo sistem prevoda sa niskom latencijom koji se prilagođa predavanjima i pokriva nekoliko jezičkih parova. Iako je prekidač iz tradicionalnog prevoda statističkih strojeva u neuronski prevod strojeva (NMT) značajno poboljšao učinkovitost, kako bi integrirao NMT u okvir prevoda govora potrebno je nekoliko prilagodba. Mi smo riješili ograničenja trčanja vremena i različite vrste ulaska. Osim toga, iskoristili smo jednostavno učenje kako bi lako dodali novi uslovi specifičnih tema sistemu. Osim boljih učinka, NMT nam je također omogućio povećati naše pokrivene jezike preko multijezičkih NMT. % Spojiti te tehnike, mi smo u stanju pružiti prilagođen sustav prevoda govora za nekoliko evropskih jezika.', 'ca': "En el món globalitzat d'avui en dia tenim l'habilitat de comunicar-nos amb la gent de tot el món. No obstant això, en moltes situacions la barrera lingüística encara representa un problema important. Per exemple, molts estudiants estrangers que venen a KIT per estudiar inicialment no poden seguir una conferència en alemany. Therefore, we offer an automatic simultaneous interpretation service for students.  Per a cumplir aquesta tasca, hem desenvolupat un sistema de traducció de baixa latencia adaptat a les conferències i que cobre diverses parelles de llenguatges. Mentre que el canvi de traducció tradicional de màquines estadístiques a traducció de màquines neurals (NMT) va millorar significativament el rendiment, per integrar NMT en el marc de traducció del discurs va requerir diversos ajustes. Hem abordat les restriccions del temps d'execució i diferents tipus d'entrada. A més, vam utilitzar l'aprenentatge d'una sola oportunitat per afegir fàcilment termes específics al sistema. A més de millor rendiment, la NMT també ens va permetre augmentar les nostres llengües cobertas mitjançant la NMT multilingüe. % Combinant aquestes tècniques, podem proporcionar un sistema adaptat de traducció de la llengua per a diverses llengües europees.", 'cs': 'V dnešním globalizovaném světě máme schopnost komunikovat s lidmi po celém světě. V mnoha situacích však jazyková bariéra stále představuje zásadní problém. Například mnoho zahraničních studentů, kteří přicházejí ke studiu na KIT, nemohou zpočátku sledovat přednášku v němčině. Proto nabízíme pro studenty službu automatického simultánního tlumočení. Pro splnění tohoto úkolu jsme vyvinuli překladový systém s nízkou latencí, který je přizpůsoben přednáškám a pokrývá několik jazykových párů. Zatímco přechod od tradičního statistického strojového překladu na neuronový strojový překlad (NMT) výrazně zlepšil výkon, integrace NMT do rámce překladu řeči vyžadovala několik úprav. Řešili jsme omezení běhu a různé typy vstupu. Kromě toho jsme využili jednorázové učení k snadnému přidání nových tématických termínů do systému. Kromě lepšího výkonu nám NMT také umožnilo zvýšit naše pokryté jazyky prostřednictvím vícejazyčného NMT.% Kombinací těchto technik jsme schopni poskytnout přizpůsobený systém překladu řeči pro několik evropských jazyků.', 'et': 'Tänapäeva globaliseerunud maailmas on meil võime suhelda inimestega üle kogu maailma. Kuid paljudes olukordades on keelebarjäär endiselt oluline probleem. Näiteks ei saa paljud KIT-i õppima tulevad välisüliõpilased esialgu saksakeelset loengut jälgida. Seetõttu pakume õpilastele automaatset sünkroontõlke teenust. Selle ülesande täitmiseks oleme välja töötanud madala latentsusega tõlkesüsteemi, mis on kohandatud loengutele ja hõlmab mitut keelepaari. Kuigi traditsiooniliselt statistiliselt masintõlkelt neuroaalsele masintõlkele üleminek parandas oluliselt jõudlust, nõudis NMT integreerimine kõnetõlke raamistikku mitmeid kohandusi. Oleme käsitlenud tööaja piiranguid ja erinevat liiki sisendeid. Lisaks kasutasime ühekordset õppimist uute teemapõhiste terminite hõlpsaks lisamiseks süsteemi. Lisaks paremale jõudlusele võimaldas NMT meil suurendada oma kaetud keeli mitmekeelse NMT kaudu.% Neid tehnikaid kombineerides suudame pakkuda kohandatud kõnetõlkesüsteemi mitmetele Euroopa keeltele.', 'fi': 'Nykypäivän globalisoituneessa maailmassa meillä on kyky kommunikoida ihmisten kanssa ympäri maailmaa. Monissa tilanteissa kielimuuri on kuitenkin edelleen merkittävä ongelma. Esimerkiksi monet KIT:iin opiskelemaan tulevat ulkomaalaiset opiskelijat eivät aluksi pysty seuraamaan saksankielistä luentoa. Siksi tarjoamme automaattisen simultaanitulkkauspalvelun opiskelijoille. Tämän tehtävän suorittamiseksi olemme kehittäneet matalaviiveellisen käännösjärjestelmän, joka on mukautettu luentoihin ja kattaa useita kielipareja. Vaikka siirtyminen perinteisestä tilastollisesta konekäännöksestä neurokonekäännökseen (NMT) paransi merkittävästi suorituskykyä, NMT:n integrointi puheen käännöskehykseen vaati useita säätöjä. Olemme käsitelleet käyttöaikarajoituksia ja erityyppisiä panoksia. Lisäksi käytimme kertaoppimista lisätäksemme järjestelmään helposti uusia aihekohtaisia termejä. Paremman suorituskyvyn lisäksi NMT antoi meille mahdollisuuden lisätä katettuja kieliä monikielisen NMT:n kautta.% Yhdistämällä nämä tekniikat pystymme tarjoamaan räätälöidyn puhekäännösjärjestelmän useille eurooppalaisille kielille.', 'ko': '오늘날 세계화의 세계에서 우리는 세계 각지의 사람들과 교류할 능력이 있다.그러나 많은 상황에서 언어 장애는 여전히 주요한 문제이다.예를 들어 KIT에 와서 공부하는 많은 외국 학생들이 처음에는 독일어 강좌를 알아듣지 못했다.따라서 우리는 학생들에게 자동 동시통역 서비스를 제공한다.이 임무를 완수하기 위해 우리는 저연속 번역 시스템을 개발했는데 이 시스템은 강좌에 적용되고 여러 언어의 쌍을 포함한다.전통적인 통계기기에서 신경기계번역(NMT)으로 전환하는 전환은 성능을 현저히 향상시켰지만 NMT를 음성번역 프레임워크에 통합하려면 약간의 조정이 필요하다.우리는 실행 시 제약과 서로 다른 유형의 입력을 해결했다.그 밖에 우리는 일회성 학습을 이용하여 시스템에 새로운 주제별 용어를 쉽게 추가할 수 있다.NMT는 더 나은 성능 외에 다국어 NMT를 통해 우리의 커버 언어를 늘릴 수 있도록 한다이러한 기술을 결합하면 우리는 몇 가지 유럽 언어에 적합한 음성 번역 시스템을 제공할 수 있다.', 'jv': 'Nang-iki ning dunya luwih-luwih lan ning awak dhéwé wis ngerasakno karo hal-hal iki ning dunya iki. Nanging, akeh durung akeh durung, barêng-barêng kuwi durung mesthi nang angka sing luwih apik. Sampeyan, akeh umur-umur sing wis rabi kanggo kelas NIT kuwi bisa nguasah pawaran kanggo kelas terapek ning jerman. Kaya, awak dhéwé nyulung ngewehi sistem sampeyan akeh perusahaan kanggo merak-muriyen. kanggo nggawe task iki, dhewe nyulung sistem sing titimbang kelas-layang kanggo tukang karo lectura karo akeh bantayan bangsa. Eror menyang kelas nang mbugal gal sing dibutuhi saben Stastik Manus Terjamahan kanggo Neral Mas Terjamahan (NMT), kang dipoleh bantuan ngono nggawe NMT kanggo nganggo tarjamahan kanggo kalagayuni nyong. Awale Mungkin, awak dhéwé nggunakake sistem sistem iki dadi seneng nggawe tema sing apik. Lah luwih akeh sing luwih-luwih tenan, NMT iso ngejaraké awak dhéwé nggawe langkang sampeyan kanggo NMT luwih-luwih. % Ngawe jenis teknik sing iki, kita iso ngejaraké sistem kanggo tarjamahan kanggo alih bangsane Yusufan.', 'sk': 'V današnjem globaliziranem svetu imamo sposobnost komuniciranja z ljudmi po vsem svetu. Vendar pa jezikovna ovira v številnih primerih še vedno predstavlja pomembno vprašanje. Na primer, mnogi tuji študenti, ki prihajajo v KIT na študij, sprva ne morejo slediti predavanju v nemščini. Zato za študente nudimo storitev avtomatskega simultanega tolmačenja. Za izpolnitev te naloge smo razvili sistem prevajanja z nizko latenco, ki je prilagojen predavanjem in pokriva več jezikovnih parov. Medtem ko je prehod s tradicionalnega statističnega strojnega prevajanja na nevralnega strojnega prevajanja (NMT) bistveno izboljšal učinkovitost, je bilo za vključitev NMT v okvir govornega prevajanja potrebnih več prilagoditev. Obravnavali smo omejitve časa delovanja in različne vrste vnosov. Poleg tega smo uporabili enostavno učenje za enostavno dodajanje novih tematskih izrazov v sistem. Poleg boljše učinkovitosti nam je NMT omogočil tudi povečanje pokritih jezikov prek večjezične NMT.% S kombinacijo teh tehnik lahko zagotovimo prilagojen sistem prevajanja govora za več evropskih jezikov.', 'ha': "A cikin duniya da ke cikin yau, ina da awo ga mu yi wasiyya da mutane a cikin duniya. Hata da haka, a cikin abu mãsu yawa, gaura na harshe yana zuwa wani matsayi mai girma. Misali, masu yawa na karatun bakin da suke zuwa KIT dõmin su karanta, ba za su iya ƙara wani hoto a Jamanci ba. Saboda haka, Munã bãyar da wani aikin fassarar farat ɗaya zuwa ga wanan. Dõmin ku cika wannan aikin, Mun buɗa wani na'urar fassarar aiki na ƙara-latent wanda ke adadi da shi zuwa littafa da kuma ke rufe wasu nau'i biyu cikin harshen. While the switch from traditional Statistical Machine Translation to Neural Machine Translation (NMT) significantly improved performance, to integrate NMT into the speech translation framework required several adjustments.  Mun yi jãyayya wa'ura na tafiyar lokaci da wasu nau'i dabam-dabam. Furan haka, mun yi amfani da wa'azi da shirin gaba ɗaya dõmin mu ƙara wasu muhimmada na'ura zuwa na'ura. Bayani da mafiya kyauta, NMT na yarda da mu ƙara harsunmu masu rufe da zanen NMT. % Akwai masu haɗi da wannan masu gafaka, za'a iya iya samar da tsari na fassarar magana masu adadi wa wasu harshen Yurubiya.", 'he': 'בעולם הגלובליזציה היום יש לנו את היכולת לתקשר עם אנשים ברחבי העולם. עם זאת, במצבים רבים המחסום לשפה עדיין מציג בעיה גדולה. לדוגמה, תלמידים זרים רבים שבאים לקי.איי.טי ללמוד אינם מסוגלים לראשונה לעקוב אחר הרצאה בגרמנית. לכן, אנחנו מציעים שירות הפרשנות באוטומטי באותו זמני לסטודנטים. כדי למלא את המשימה הזאת, פיתחנו מערכת תרגום נמוכה בהתאם לרצאות וכסה כמה זוגות שפות. בעוד המעבר ממכונה סטטיסטית מסורתית לתרגום מכונת נוירולית (NMT) השתפר באופן משמעותי ביצועים, כדי להשתלב NMT במסגרת התרגום הנאום דרש כמה שינויים. התייחסנו למגבלות הזמן לרוץ וסוגים שונים של כניסה. בנוסף, השתמשנו בהלימוד היחיד כדי להוסיף בקלות תנאי נושאי ספציפיים חדשים למערכת. Besides better performance, NMT also enabled us increase our covered languages through multilingual NMT. %  בשילוב הטכניקות האלה, אנחנו מסוגלים לספק מערכת תרגום נאום מתאימה לכמה שפות אירופאיות.', 'bo': 'དེ་རིང་འཛམ་གླིང་ཡོད་པའི་འཇིག་རྟེན་དེ་ལ་ང་ཚོ་སྤྱི་ཚོགས་དང་མཉམ་དུ་འབྲེལ་འདུག ཡིན་ནའང་། གནས་སྟངས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་བཀག་དམ་དུ་གཏོང་བའི་དོན་རྐྱེན་ཏུ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཏུ་ དཔེར་ན། ཕྱི་རྒྱལ་ཁབ་གྱི་སློབ་ཆ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་KIT ལ་ནང་འདྲི་ཞིབ་བྱེད་རྒྱུ་དང་། དེར་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་ཤེས་པ་ཚོར་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་དབྱེ་སེལ་འཛིན་གྱི་ཞབས་ཞུ་བ་བྱིན་པ་རེད། བྱ་འགུལ་འདི་ཡོངས་སྒྲུབ་པར་ང་ཚོས་ཚོའི་རིམ་ལུགས་པ་དེ་སློབ་ཚུལ་གྱི་སྐད་ཆ་ཤས་མཉམ་དུ་བཟོ་བཅོས་བའི་ལུགས་ཤིག་ཆ རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་སྔོན་སྲོལ་གྱི་ཚད་རྩིས་འཁོར་གྱི་ཚིག We have addressed the run-time constraints and different types of input. ད་དུང་བརྟེན། ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་གི་གནད་དོན་གཅིག་གི་སློབ་གྲྭར་བ་སྤྱོད་ནས་མ་ལག་གི་ཐོག དེ་ལས་ཕལ་ཐོག་ཚད་ལེགས་པ་ཞིག་ཏུ་NMT་གིས་ང་ཚོའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་མཐུན་བཟོ་བཅུག་པ། ང་ཚོས་ལག་རྩལ་འདི་དག་མཉམ་སྦྲེལ་མཐུད་བྱེད་པར་དབང་རྩལ་སྤྲོད་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་ལུགས་དང་།'}
{'en': 'LanguageNet : Learning to Find Sense Relevant Example Sentences', 'ar': 'LanguageNet: تعلم إيجاد الجمل ذات الصلة المنطقية', 'fr': "LanguageNet\xa0: Apprendre à trouver des phrases d'exemple pertinentes", 'pt': 'LanguageNet: Aprendendo a encontrar frases de exemplo relevantes com sentido', 'es': 'LanguageNet: Aprender a encontrar oraciones de ejemplo relevantes para los sentidos', 'ja': 'LanguageNet ：関連する例文を見つけるための学習', 'ru': 'LanguageNet: Учимся находить релевантные примеры предложений', 'zh': '语言网:学求有意例句', 'hi': 'LanguageNet: भावना प्रासंगिक उदाहरण वाक्यों को खोजने के लिए सीखना', 'ga': 'LanguageNet: Ag Foghlaim Smaointe A Fháil ar Shamplaí ábhartha', 'ka': 'Name', 'it': 'LanguageNet: Imparare a trovare senso frasi di esempio pertinenti', 'kk': 'LanguageNet: Sense Relevant Example Sentences', 'hu': 'LanguageNet: Megtanulás értelmezni releváns példamondatokat', 'el': 'Μάθετε να βρίσκετε σχετικές παραδειγματικές προτάσεις', 'ms': 'LanguageNet: Belajar untuk Cari Huruf Contoh Relevant', 'lt': 'Language Net: Mokymasis ieškoti reikšmingų pavyzdžių sakinių', 'mk': 'Language Net: Научи да најдеш релевантни примерни реченици', 'mt': 'LanguageNet: Tagħlim biex issib Sentenzi Eżempji Relevanti tas-Sens', 'mn': 'LanguageNet: мэдрэмжтэй жишээ олж сурах', 'ml': 'ഭാഷയുടെ നെറ്റ്: സെന്\u200dസിന്\u200dറെ ആവശ്യമുള്ള ഉദാഹരണങ്ങള്\u200d കണ്ടെത്താന്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നു', 'pl': 'LanguageNet: Nauka znalezienia sensu istotnych przykładowych zdań', 'no': 'LanguageNet: Læring å finna uttrykk for eksempel', 'sr': 'LanguageNet: Naučenje pronalaženja odgovarajućih primjernih rečenica', 'ro': 'LanguageNet: Învățarea de a găsi sens Sentințe relevante de exemplu', 'sv': 'LanguageNet: Att lära sig hitta mening relevanta exempelmeningar', 'so': 'Luqada: Baro tusaale ahaan daryeelka lamaanaha', 'si': 'භාෂාNet: වාර්තාව හොයාගන්න ප්\u200dරශ්නය සම්බන්ධ උදාහරණ වචනය', 'ta': 'மொழி வலைப்பின்னல்: அனுப்புநர் உதாரணம் வாக்குறுதிகளை கண்டுபிடிக்க கற்றுக்கொள்வது', 'ur': 'Language Net: Sense Relevant Example Sentences', 'vi': 'LanguageNet: học cách tìm cảm xúc Thông thường câu nói', 'uz': 'Til', 'hr': 'LanguageNet: Naučenje pronaći odgovarajuće primjerne izraze', 'bg': 'Научете се да намирате смисъл подходящи примерни изречения', 'nl': 'LanguageNet: Leren zintuigrelevante voorbeeldzinnen te vinden', 'da': 'LanguageNet: Lære at finde mening relevante eksempelssætninger', 'ko': 'LanguageNet: 의미와 관련된 예문 찾기 학습', 'id': 'LanguageNet: Belajar untuk Mencari Sense Pertanyaan Contoh Relevant', 'de': 'LanguageNet: Lernen, sinnrelevante Beispielsätze zu finden', 'fa': 'زبانNet: یاد گرفتن برای پیدا کردن کلمات مثال مربوط به حساب', 'tr': 'LanguageNet: Senediň ýagdaýyny tapmak öwrenmek', 'sq': 'LanguageNet: Mësoni të gjeni fjalë të rëndësishme për shembull', 'af': 'LanguageNet: Leer om te soek Sense Relevant Voorbeeld', 'sw': 'Lugha: Kujifunza Kutafuta Mifano ya Kuhusu Sensi', 'bn': 'ভাষাভাষী নেটওয়ার্ক: সেন্স সম্পর্কিত সাধারণ উদাহরণ খুঁজে বের করতে শিখুন', 'hy': 'լեզուNet: Սովորել զգացմունքներ գտնել հարմար օրինակ նախադասություններ', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'az': 'Dil Net: S칬zl칲y칲 칐yr톛nm톛k 칲칞칲n 칐yr톛nm톛k', 'bs': 'LanguageNet: Naučenje pronaći odgovarajuće primjerne kazne', 'ca': 'LanguageNet: Learning to Find Sense Relevant Example Sentences', 'cs': 'LanguageNet: Naučit se najít smysl relevantní příklady vět', 'et': 'LanguageNet: õppimine leidma mõistuse asjakohaseid näidislauseid', 'fi': 'LanguageNet: Oppiminen löytämään järkeä koskevat esimerkkilauseet', 'jv': 'Languagenet: Learning to Find Sense Relative Expression', 'sk': 'LanguageNet: učenje iskanja ustreznih primernih stavkov', 'ha': '@ action', 'he': 'Language Net: ללמוד למצוא חוש דוגמאות רלוונטיות', 'bo': 'LanguageNet: གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་དང་འབྲེལ་བའི་དཔེར་བརྗོད་ཚིག་རྟོགས'}
{'en': 'In this paper, we present a system, LanguageNet, which can help second language learners to search for different meanings and usages of a word. We disambiguate word senses based on the pairs of an English word and its corresponding Chinese translations in a parallel corpus, UM-Corpus. The process involved performing word alignment, learning vector space representations of words and training a classifier to distinguish words into groups of senses. LanguageNet directly shows the definition of a sense, bilingual synonyms and sense relevant examples.', 'ar': 'في هذه الورقة ، نقدم نظام LanguageNet ، الذي يمكن أن يساعد متعلمي اللغة الثانية في البحث عن معاني واستخدامات مختلفة لكلمة. نحن نزيل غموض معاني الكلمات بناءً على أزواج الكلمة الإنجليزية والترجمات الصينية المقابلة لها في مجموعة موازية ، UM-Corpus. تضمنت العملية إجراء محاذاة الكلمات ، وتعلم تمثيلات فضاء متجه للكلمات وتدريب المصنف على تمييز الكلمات في مجموعات من الحواس. تُظهر LanguageNet بشكل مباشر تعريف المعنى والمرادفات ثنائية اللغة وإحساس الأمثلة ذات الصلة.', 'es': 'En este artículo, presentamos un sistema, LanguageNet, que puede ayudar a los estudiantes de un segundo idioma a buscar diferentes significados y usos de una palabra. Desambiguamos los sentidos de las palabras basándonos en los pares de una palabra en inglés y sus correspondientes traducciones al chino en un corpus paralelo, UM-Corpus. El proceso implicó la alineación de palabras, el aprendizaje de representaciones de palabras en el espacio vectorial y el entrenamiento de un clasificador para distinguir las palabras en grupos de sentidos. LanguageNet muestra directamente la definición de un sentido, sinónimos bilingües y ejemplos relevantes para el sentido.', 'pt': 'Neste artigo, apresentamos um sistema, LanguageNet, que pode ajudar os aprendizes de segunda língua a procurar diferentes significados e usos de uma palavra. Desambiguamos os sentidos das palavras com base nos pares de uma palavra em inglês e suas traduções chinesas correspondentes em um corpus paralelo, UM-Corpus. O processo envolveu realizar o alinhamento de palavras, aprender representações de palavras no espaço vetorial e treinar um classificador para distinguir palavras em grupos de sentidos. LanguageNet mostra diretamente a definição de um sentido, sinônimos bilíngues e exemplos relevantes de sentido.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons un système, LanguageNet, qui peut aider les apprenants d'une langue seconde à rechercher différentes significations et différents usages d'un mot. Nous désambiguïdisons les sens des mots en fonction des paires d'un mot anglais et de ses traductions chinoises correspondantes dans un corpus parallèle, UM-Corpus. Le processus impliquait l'alignement des mots, l'apprentissage des représentations spatiales vectorielles des mots et la formation d'un classificateur pour distinguer les mots en groupes de sens. LanguageNet affiche directement la définition d'un sens, des synonymes bilingues et des exemples pertinents.", 'ja': 'この論文では、第二言語学習者が言葉のさまざまな意味と用法を検索するのに役立つシステム、LanguageNetを提示します。私たちは、並列コーパスであるUM -コーパスの英単語とそれに対応する中国語の翻訳のペアに基づいて、単語の感覚を曖昧にします。このプロセスには、単語の整列を実行し、単語のベクトル空間表現を学習し、単語を感覚のグループに区別するための分類子を訓練することが含まれていた。LanguageNetは、センス、バイリンガル同義語、および関連するセンスの例の定義を直接示している。', 'zh': '本文中,立一系统,LanguageNet,可以助第二语言学者搜索单词异义用法。 以英语单词对并行语料库UM-Corpus中文翻译以消单词义之歧义。 事涉行单词齐,学单词者向量空示及训练分类器以分单词为感官组。 LanguageNet直示一义,双语同义词与义相关者也。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में, हम एक प्रणाली, LanguageNet प्रस्तुत करते हैं, जो दूसरी भाषा के शिक्षार्थियों को एक शब्द के विभिन्न अर्थों और उपयोगों की खोज करने में मदद कर सकता है। हम एक समानांतर कॉर्पस, UM-Corpus में एक अंग्रेजी शब्द और इसके संबंधित चीनी अनुवादों के जोड़े के आधार पर शब्द इंद्रियों को विभाजित करते हैं। इस प्रक्रिया में शब्द संरेखण करना, शब्दों के वेक्टर स्पेस अभ्यावेदन सीखना और शब्दों को इंद्रियों के समूहों में अलग करने के लिए एक क्लासिफायर को प्रशिक्षित करना शामिल था। LanguageNet सीधे एक अर्थ, द्विभाषी पर्यायवाची और अर्थ प्रासंगिक उदाहरणों की परिभाषा दिखाता है।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем систему LanguageNet, которая может помочь учащимся второго языка искать различные значения и употребления слова. Мы разобщаем смыслы слов на основе пар английского слова и его соответствующих китайских переводов в параллельном корпусе, UM-Corpus. Процесс включал в себя выполнение выравнивания слов, изучение векторных пространственных представлений слов и обучение классификатора для разделения слов на группы чувств. LanguageNet напрямую показывает определение смысла, двуязычные синонимы и соответствующие примеры смысла.', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair córas, LanguageNet, a chuideoidh le foghlaimeoirí dara teanga chun bríonna agus úsáidí éagsúla focal a chuardach. Déanaimid díbhrí ar chiall na bhfocal bunaithe ar phéirí an fhocail Bhéarla agus ar na haistriúcháin chomhfhreagracha Sínise i gcorpas comhthreomhar, UM-Corpus. Is éard a bhí i gceist leis an bpróiseas ná ailíniú focal a dhéanamh, léiriúcháin spáis veicteora focal a fhoghlaim agus aicmitheoir a oiliúint chun focail a idirdhealú i ngrúpaí céadfaí. Léiríonn LanguageNet an sainmhíniú ar chiall, comhchiallaigh dhátheangacha agus samplaí a bhaineann le ciall.', 'hu': 'Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a LanguageNet rendszert, amely segítséget nyújt a második nyelvtanulóknak abban, hogy egy szó különböző jelentéseit és használatát keressék. Egy angol szó párjai és annak megfelelő kínai fordításai alapján egyértelműsítjük a szóérzékeket egy párhuzamos korpuszban, UM-Corpus-ban. A folyamat magában foglalta a szóigazítás végrehajtását, a szavak vektoros térreprezentációinak tanulását, valamint egy osztályozó képzését, hogy a szavakat érzékcsoportokra különböztesse meg. A LanguageNet közvetlenül bemutatja az érzék definícióját, a kétnyelvű szinonimákat és az érzék releváns példákat.', 'ka': 'ამ წიგნაში ჩვენ ვიყენებთ სისტემი, LanguageNet, რომელიც შეუძლია მეორე ენის სწავლებელებს განსხვავებული სიტყვას და სიტყვას გამოყენებას. ჩვენ ამბიგუტურებთ სიტყვას ინგლისური სიტყვას და მისი შესაბამისი კინესური ტრანგუტურების პარალელი კორპუსში UM-კორპუსში. პროცესი შესახებ სიტყვების დასწორება, ვისწავლობა გვქტორის სიტყვების განსაკუთრებები და კლასიფიკაციის განსაკუთრება სიტყვების განსაკუთრებისთვის სიტყვებ LanguageNet-ის განსაზღვრების, ორიენგური სინონიმების და შესაძლებელი მაგალითების განსაზღვრებას ჩვენებს.', 'it': "In questo articolo, presentiamo un sistema, LanguageNet, che può aiutare gli studenti di seconda lingua a cercare diversi significati e usi di una parola. Disambiguamo i sensi delle parole sulla base delle coppie di una parola inglese e delle corrispondenti traduzioni cinesi in un corpus parallelo, UM-Corpus. Il processo prevedeva l'allineamento delle parole, l'apprendimento delle rappresentazioni spaziali vettoriali delle parole e l'addestramento di un classificatore a distinguere le parole in gruppi di sensi. LanguageNet mostra direttamente la definizione di un senso, sinonimi bilingui e esempi rilevanti di senso.", 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα σύστημα, το οποίο μπορεί να βοηθήσει τους μαθητές δεύτερης γλώσσας να αναζητήσουν διαφορετικές έννοιες και χρήσεις μιας λέξης. Διασαφηνίζουμε τις αισθήσεις λέξεων με βάση τα ζεύγη μιας αγγλικής λέξης και τις αντίστοιχες κινεζικές μεταφράσεις της σε ένα παράλληλο σώμα, UM-Corpus. Η διαδικασία περιελάμβανε την εκτέλεση ευθυγράμμισης λέξεων, την εκμάθηση διανυσματικών διαστημικών αναπαραστάσεων λέξεων και την εκπαίδευση ενός ταξινομητή για να διακρίνει λέξεις σε ομάδες αισθήσεων. Το δείχνει άμεσα τον ορισμό μιας έννοιας, δίγλωσσα συνώνυμα και παραδείγματα σχετικά με τις αισθήσεις.', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan sistem, LanguageNet, yang boleh membantu pelajar bahasa kedua untuk mencari makna dan penggunaan perkataan yang berbeza. Kita nyahjelaskan perasaan perkataan berdasarkan pasangan perkataan Inggeris dan terjemahan yang sepadan dengan bahasa Cina dalam korpus selari, UM-Corpus. Proses melibatkan melaksanakan penyesuaian perkataan, mempelajari persembahan ruang vektor perkataan dan melatih pengelasah untuk membezakan perkataan ke dalam kumpulan sens. LanguageNet menunjukkan secara langsung takrifan bagi sens, sinonim bilingual dan rasa contoh yang relevan.', 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз LanguageNet жүйесін таңдаймыз. Бұл екінші тіл оқытушыларға әртүрлі мәліметтерді және сөздің қолдануын іздеуге көмектесе алады. Біз ағылшын сөздің екеуіне негізделген сөз сезімдерін бұғаттамыз және оның параллел корпус, UM-Корпус тізімінде сәйкесті қытайша аудармаларына негізделген. Сөздерді түзету, вектордың кеңістігін үйрену және сөздерді сезімдер тобына түзету үшін классификаторын оқыту процесі. LanguageNet тіркелген мәліметті, екі тілді синонимдер мен маңызды мысалдар анықтамасын көрсетеді.', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome sistemą LanguageNet, kuri gali padėti antrosios kalbos mokytojams ieškoti skirtingų reikšmių ir žodžio naudojimo. Mes išskaičiuojame žodžių jutimus, pagrįstus anglų žodžio poromis ir atitinkamomis kinų vertimomis lygiagrečiu korpusu, UM-Corpus. Šis procesas buvo susijęs su žodžių suderinimu, žodžių mokymu vektorių erdvėje ir klasifikatoriaus mokymu, kad žodžiai būtų atskirti į jutimų grupes. LanguageNet tiesiogiai rodo sąvokos apibrėžimą, dvikalbius sinonimus ir susijusius jausmų pavyzdžius.', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d, ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ഒരു സിസ്റ്റമാണ് കൊണ്ടുവരുന്നത്, ലാഗ്വേജ് നെറ്റ്, അത് രണ്ടാമത്തെ ഭാഷ പഠിക്കുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് സഹായിക്കാ ഒരു ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി വാക്കിന്റെ അനുഭവങ്ങള്\u200d വിശ്വാസിക്കുന്നു വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രക്രിയയില്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d സ്പെയിന്\u200dറ് പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്നതും, വാക്കുകളുടെ പ്രതിനിധികള്\u200d പഠിക്കുന ഭാഷ നെറ്റ് നേരിട്ട് ഒരു വിശദീകരണത്തിന്റെ വിശദീകരണം കാണിക്കുന്നു, രണ്ടു ഭാഷ സിനോണിയാമുകളുടെയും വിവ', 'mk': 'Во овој весник, претставуваме систем, LanguageNet, кој може да им помогне на учениците на вториот јазик да бараат различни значења и употреби на збор. We disambiguate word senses based on the pairs of an English word and its corresponding Chinese translations in a parallel corpus, UM-Corpus.  Процесот вклучуваше спроведување на зборови, учење на векторни вселенски претставувања на зборови и обука на класификатор за разлика на зборови во групи на сетила. LanguageNet директно ја покажува дефиницијата на чувство, двојјазични синоними и чувство релевантни примери.', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument, nippreżentaw sistema, LanguageNet, li tista’ tgħin lil dawk li jitgħallmu t-tieni lingwa jfittxu tifsiriet u użu differenti ta’ kelma. Aħna niżambigwaw sensi tal-kelma bbażati fuq il-pari ta’ kelma Ingliża u t-traduzzjonijiet Ċiniżi korrispondenti tagħha f’korpus parallel, UM-Corpus. Il-proċess involva t-twettiq tal-allinjament tal-kliem, it-tagħlim tar-rappreżentazzjonijiet tal-ispazju tal-vetturi tal-kliem u t-taħriġ ta’ klassifikatur biex jiddistingwi l-kliem fi gruppi ta’ sensi. LanguageNet turi direttament id-definizzjoni ta’ sens, sinonimi bilingwi u eżempji rilevanti ta’ sens.', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy system LanguageNet, który może pomóc uczącym się języka drugiego w poszukiwaniu różnych znaczeń i zastosowań słowa. Rozdzielamy zmysły słowa na podstawie par angielskiego słowa i odpowiadających im chińskim tłumaczeniom w równoległym korpusie UM-Corpus. Proces obejmował wyrównanie słów, uczenie się przestrzeni wektorowej reprezentacji słów i szkolenie klasyfikatora do rozróżniania słów na grupy zmysłów. LanguageNet pokazuje bezpośrednio definicję sensu, dwujęzyczne synonimy i istotne przykłady sensu.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi eit systemet, LanguageNet, som kan hjelpa til andre språkelærar for å søkja etter ulike meningar og bruk av eit ord. Vi undersøker ordfølelser basert på parene av ein engelsk ord og sine tilsvarande kinesiske omsetjingar i ein parallell korpus, UM-Corpus. Prosessen som involverer utføring av ordjusteringa, læring av vektorromrepresentasjonar av ord og opplæring av eit klassifiserer for å distinere ord i grupper av sensar. SpråkNet viser direkte definisjonen av ein følelse, bilinguelt synonym og følelse relevant eksemplar.', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид Language Net системийг тайлбарлаж байна. Энэ нь хоёр дахь хэл сурагчид өөр утгатай утгатай болон үг ашиглах тусламжтай. Бид англи хэлний үгийн хоёрын үндсэн үг болон хамааралтай Хятад хэлний хөгжлийн параллел Корпус, UM-Корпус-ын үндсэн мэдрэмжийг бууруулдаг. Энэ үйл явц нь үг хэмжээг хийх, векторын орон зай суралцах, үгийг мэдрэмжүүдийн бүлгүүдэд ялгаалан хэлбэрийг нь ангилалдаг. LanguageNet шууд мэдрэмжтэй, хоёр хэл хэлний шинжлэх ухааны тодорхойлолтыг харуулдаг.', 'ro': 'În această lucrare, prezentăm un sistem, LanguageNet, care poate ajuta elevii de limbă a doua să caute diferite sensuri și utilizări ale unui cuvânt. Deambiguizăm simțurile cuvintelor bazate pe perechile unui cuvânt englez și traducerile corespunzătoare chinezești într-un corpus paralel, UM-Corpus. Procesul a implicat realizarea alinierii cuvintelor, învățarea reprezentărilor vectoriale ale cuvintelor și instruirea unui clasificator pentru a distinge cuvintele în grupuri de simțuri. LanguageNet arată direct definiția unui sens, sinonime bilingve și exemple relevante de sens.', 'si': 'මේ පත්තරේ අපි පද්ධතියක්, භාෂානේට් එකක් පෙන්වන්න පුළුවන්, ඒකෙන් දෙවෙනි භාෂාව ඉගෙන ගන්න පුළුවන් දෙව අපි ඉංග්\u200dරීසි වචනයක් වලින් සම්බන්ධ කරනවා වචනයක් වලින් සහ ඒකේ සම්බන්ධ චීනි වාර්ථාවක් වලින් අවස්ථාවක් න පරීක්ෂණය සම්පූර්ණයෙන් වචන සම්පූර්ණය කරන්න, වෙක්ටර් අවසානය ඉගෙන ගන්න වචන සහ වචන සම්පූර්ණයෙන් වචන සම් Name', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem, LanguageNet, koji može pomoći drugim učenicima jezika da traže različite smisla i korištenje riječi. Mi disambigujemo osjećaje riječi na temelju parova engleske riječi i njegovih odgovarajućih kineskih prevoda u paralelnom korpusu UM-Corpus. Proces uključuje izvršavanje poravnanja riječi, učenje svemira vektora predstavljanja riječi i obuku klasifikatora da razlikuje riječi u grupe čula. LanguageNet direktno pokazuje definiciju smisla, dvojezičkih sinonima i osjećaja relevantnih primjera.', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi ett system, LanguageNet, som kan hjälpa andraspråkslärare att söka efter olika betydelser och användningsområden för ett ord. Vi ogiltigförklarar ordsinnena baserat på paren av ett engelskt ord och dess motsvarande kinesiska översättningar i en parallell korpus, UM-Corpus. Processen innebar att utföra ordjustering, lära sig vektorrumsrepresentationer av ord och träna en klassificerare att skilja ord i grupper av sinnen. LanguageNet visar direkt definitionen av en mening, tvåspråkiga synonymer och sinnesrelaterade exempel.', 'so': 'Warqaddan waxaan ku soo qornaa nidaam luqada ah, kaas oo caawinaya barashada luqada labaad si aad u raadsato micnaho kala duduwan iyo isticmaalka hadalka. Waxaynu kala duduwanaa fikrada hadalka ku saabsan hadalka Ingiriiska iyo turjummadiisa ku haboon Shiinaha oo isku mid ah korpus, UM-Corpus. Xarunta ayaa ku saabsan sameynta isbedelinta hadalka, barashada goobta jidhka oo u eg hadalka iyo barashada fasax si uu erayada u kala soocaayo guud. Luqada internetka si toos ah ayaa u muujiya tusaalooyin la xiriira maandooriyaha, labada luuqadood oo kala duduwan iyo fikrada.', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் ஒரு அமைப்பு, மொழி நெட்டு, அது இரண்டாவது மொழி கற்றுக்கொள்ள முடியும் வேறு வார்த்தையின் மொழிகளைய ஒரு ஆங்கிலத்தின் ஜோடி சொல்லை அடிப்படையில் வார்த்தை உணர்வுகளை குறைக்கும் மற்றும் அதன் ஒத்திசைன மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளை இணைய கார Name மொழி வலைப்பின்னல் நேரடியாக ஒரு உணர்வு, இரு மொழி ஒத்திசைவு மற்றும் தொடர்பு உதாரணங்களை காட்டுகிறது.', 'ur': 'اس کاغذ میں ہم ایک سیستم، زبان نیٹ کو پیش کرتے ہیں، جو دوسری زبان کی تعلیم کرنے والوں کی مدد کرسکتا ہے کہ ایک کلمہ کی مختلف معنی اور استعمال کی تلاش کریں۔ ہم ایک انگلیسی لفظ کے جوڑوں پر بنیاد لفظ کا احساس ناکام کر رہے ہیں اور اس کے مطابق چینی ترجمہ ایک parallel corpus، UM-Corpus میں۔ کلیسٹر کی تعلیم کرنا، ویکتور کی جگہ سیکھنا اور کلیسٹر کی تعلیم کرنے کے لئے کلیسٹر کے گروہوں میں کلیسٹر کی تعلیم کرنا ہے. زبان نیٹ مستقیماً ایک سمجھ کی تعریف دکھاتا ہے، دو زبان سینونیم اور معاملہ مثالیں.', 'uz': "Bu hujjatda, biz tillar Netni hozir qilamiz, bu ikkinchi tillar o'rganishni boshqa ma'lumot va foydalanishni qidirish mumkin. Biz bir so'zlarni ingliz tildagi so'zlar asosida o'z xitoycha tarjimalarni o'zgartiradiк. Name Til Net haqida ma'lumotni, ikkita tillar synonym va ma'lumot misollarini aniqlaydi.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống, LanguageNet, thứ hai có thể giúp học giả tìm kiếm ý nghĩa khác nhau và sử dụng một từ. Chúng tôi phân tích các giác quan từ ngữ dựa trên đôi của một từ Anh và những bản dịch Trung Quốc tương ứng trong một tập kết song, um-Corpus. Cách này cần tạo ra sự chấp nhận lời, biết được về chính không gian của nó và dạy một người phân biệt mật lời nó thành thành các cá LanguageNet trực tiếp thể hiện định nghĩa của nghĩa, đồng nghĩa hai thứ và ví dụ liên quan đến nó.', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we een systeem, LanguageNet, dat tweetalige leerlingen kan helpen om te zoeken naar verschillende betekenissen en gebruiken van een woord. We maken woordzinnen duidelijk op basis van de paren van een Engels woord en de bijbehorende Chinese vertalingen in een parallel corpus, UM-Corpus. Het proces omvatte het uitvoeren van woorduitlijning, het leren van vectorruimterepresentaties van woorden en het trainen van een classificator om woorden in groepen zintuigen te onderscheiden. LanguageNet toont direct de definitie van een zin, tweetalige synoniemen en zintuigrelevante voorbeelden.', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме система, която може да помогне на обучаемите на втори език да търсят различни значения и употреби на дадена дума. Разясняваме сетивата на думата въз основа на двойките английска дума и съответните ѝ китайски преводи в паралелен корпус, УМ-Корпус. Процесът включва извършване на подравняване на думите, изучаване на векторни пространствени изображения на думи и обучение на класификатор за разграничаване на думите в групи от сетива. Показва дефиницията на смисъл, двуезични синоними и подходящи примери.', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi et system, LanguageNet, som kan hjælpe andresprogelever med at søge efter forskellige betydninger og anvendelser af et ord. Vi adskiller ordsanser baseret på par af et engelsk ord og dets tilsvarende kinesiske oversættelser i et parallelt korpus, UM-Corpus. Processen omfattede udførelse af ordjustering, læring af vektorrum repræsentationer af ord og træning af en klassifikation til at skelne ord i grupper af sanser. LanguageNet viser direkte definitionen af en sans, tosprogede synonymer og sanse relevante eksempler.', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir ein System vor, LanguageNet, das Zweitsprachenlernern helfen kann, nach verschiedenen Bedeutungen und Verwendungen eines Wortes zu suchen. Wir disambiguieren Wortsinne basierend auf den Paaren eines englischen Wortes und seinen entsprechenden chinesischen Übersetzungen in einem parallelen Korpus, UM-Corpus. Der Prozess umfasste die Durchführung von Wortausrichtung, das Erlernen von Vektorraumdarstellungen von Wörtern und das Training eines Klassifikators, um Wörter in Gruppen von Sinnen zu unterscheiden. LanguageNet zeigt direkt die Definition eines Sinnes, zweisprachige Synonyme und sinnrelevante Beispiele.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem, LanguageNet, koji može pomoći drugim učiteljima jezika u potrazi za različitim smislama i korištenjem riječi. Mi disambigujemo osjećaje riječi na temelju parova engleske riječi i njegovih odgovarajućih kineskih prevoda u paralelnom korpusu UM-Corpus. Proces uključuje obavljanje rješenja riječi, učenje vektorskog prostora predstavljanja riječi i obuku klasifikatora kako bi razlikovao riječi u grupe čula. LanguageNet direktno pokazuje definiciju smisla, dvojezičkih sinonima i osjećaja relevantnih primjera.', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini, kami mempersembahkan sistem, LanguageNet, yang dapat membantu para pelajar bahasa kedua untuk mencari makna dan penggunaan yang berbeda dari kata. Kami memadamkan perasaan kata berdasarkan sepasang kata Inggris dan terjemahan Cina yang sesuai dengan sebuah korpus paralel, UM-Corpus. The process involved performing word alignment, learning vector space representations of words and training a classifier to distinguish words into groups of senses.  LanguageNet secara langsung menunjukkan definisi dari sebuah rasa, sinonim bilingual dan rasa contoh relevan.', 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 두 번째 언어 학습자가 단어의 서로 다른 의미와 용법을 찾을 수 있도록 도와주는 LanguageNet이라는 시스템을 제시했다.우리는 평행 자료 라이브러리 UM 자료 라이브러리에서 영어 단어와 그에 대응하는 중국어 번역에 따라 단어의 뜻을 없앴다.이 과정은 단어의 정렬을 실행하고 단어의 벡터 공간 표시를 배우며 트레이닝 분류기가 단어를 감각 그룹으로 구분하는 것을 포함한다.LanguageNet은 의미의 정의, 이중 동의어와 의미와 관련된 예를 직접 보여 준다.', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ، ما یک سیستم زبان نیت را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم که می\u200cتواند به دانش آموزان دوم زبان کمک کند تا به جستجوی معناهای مختلف و استفاده از یک کلمه بگردند. ما احساسات کلمه\u200cای را بر اساس جفت کلمه انگلیسی و ترجمه\u200cهای چینی\u200cای که مربوط به یک کورپوس parallel UM-Corpus می\u200cشوند، ناپدید می\u200cکنیم. این فرایند شامل انجام تعیین کلمات، یاد گرفتن نمایش فضای ویکتوری از کلمات و آموزش دادن کلمات به گروهی از حس\u200cها است. زبان\u200cنیت مستقیما تعریف یک حس، سینونیم دو زبان و مثال مربوط به حس می\u200cکند.', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda biz bir sistemi, Dil Net'i görkezip bolýarys. Bu ikinji dil öwrenmeleriň beýleki anlamlyklary we sözüň ullanyşyny gözlemek üçin kömek edip biler. Iňlisçe sözleriniň çift sanyny we parallel korpusda täsirli Çin çe terjimelerini köçürtýäris. Bu işlem kelime çözümlemesi, vektör uzay ifadelerini öğrenmek ve kelimeleri sens gruplarına ayırmak için klasifikatçı eğitimlendirdi. Diller Net düzgün bir duýgynyň, iki dil synonymlaryň definisyonyny görkezýär we möhüm mysal duýýar.", 'af': "In hierdie papier stel ons 'n stelsel, LanguageNet, wat tweede taal leerneerders kan help om verskillende betekenings en gebruike van 'n woord te soek. Ons ontwikkel woord senses gebaseer op die paar van 'n Engels woord en sy ooreenstemmende Sjinese vertalings in 'n parallele korpus, UM-Corpus. Die proses wat insluit word oplyn, leer vektorruimte voorstellings van woorde en onderwerp 'n klassifiseerder om woorde in groepe van senses te onderwerp. LanguageNet vertoon direk die definisie van 'n sin, twee tale sinonime en sens relevante voorbeelde.", 'sq': 'Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim një sistem, LanguageNet, i cili mund të ndihmojë mësuesit e gjuhës së dytë të kërkojnë kuptime dhe përdorime të ndryshme të një fjale. Ne çambiguajmë ndjenjat e fjalës bazuar në çiftet e një fjale angleze dhe përkthimet e saj kineze në një korpus paralel, UM-Corpus. The process involved performing word alignment, learning vector space representations of words and training a classifier to distinguish words into groups of senses.  LanguageNet tregon drejtpërdrejt përcaktimin e një sensi, sinonimeve dygjuhëse dhe ndjejnë shembuj të rëndësishëm.', 'am': 'በዚህ ገጽ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ መረብ፣ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ ተማሪዎችን መልክ እና የቃልን መጠቀም ለመፈለግ ይችላል፡፡ የንግግሊዝኛ ቃላት እና የቻይና ትርጓሜዎች በተለይ ኮርፓስ እናስቀሳቅሳለን፡፡ የፕሮግራም ቃላትን አቀማመጥ፣ የዌctor ስፍራን መማር ቃላትን እና ቃላትን ለክፍለ ጉዳዮች ለመለየት እና አስተማሪ ነው፡፡ ቋንቋ መረብ አቀናኝነትን፣ ሁለት ቋንቋዎች እና አስተያያየት ምሳሌዎችን ያሳየዋል፡፡', 'sw': 'In this paper, we present a system, LanguageNet, which can help second language learners to search for different meanings and usages of a word.  Tunapambanua hisia za maneno kwa kutumia neno la Kiingereza na tafsiri zake zinazofanana na Kichina katika makampuni yanayofanana, UM-Corpus. Mchakato huo ulihusisha kutengeneza maneno, kujifunza nafasi ya barabara ya kujifunza wakiwakilisha maneno na kumfundisha mfanuzi wa kutofautisha maneno katika makundi ya hisia. Lugha Mtandao unaonyesha maelezo ya maana, synonyesha lugha mbili na mifano muhimu ya maana.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք մի համակարգ, լեզուNet, որը կարող է օգնել երկրորդ լեզվի ուսանողներին բառի տարբեր իմաստներ և օգտագործումներ փնտրել: Մենք բառերը բացատրում ենք անգլերեն բառի երկու և դրա համապատասխան չինական թարգմանությունների վրա զուգահեռ կորպուսում, ՕՄ-Կորպուսում: The process involved performing word alignment, learning vector space representations of words and training a classifier to distinguish words into groups of senses.  Lingue Net-ը անմիջապես ցույց է տալիս զգայարանի սահմանումը, երկլեզու սինոնիմները և զգայարանի նշանակալի օրինակները:', 'az': 'Bu kağızda, bir dil öyrənməyənlərə müxtəlif anlama və sözlərin istifadələrini axtarmağa yardım edə bilən bir sistem, LanguageNet göstəririk. Biz İngilizə sözünün çiftlərinə və onun paralel korpus, UM-Corpus içində olan Çincə tercümələrinə dayanan kelimeləri dəyişdiririk. Sözləri tərəfləndirmək, vektor alanı öyrənmək və sözləri hisslərin dəstələrinə ayırmaq üçün klasifikatçıya təhsil edir. LanguageNet doğrudan anlayış, iki dil sinonimlərin və hisslərin məsəllərini göstərir.', 'ca': "En aquest article presentem un sistema, LanguageNet, que pot ajudar els alumnes de segona llengua a buscar diferents significats i ús d'una paraula. Desambiguem els sentits de paraules basats en els parells d'una paraula anglesa i les seves traduccions xineses correspondents en un corpus paral·lel, UM-Corpus. El procés consistia en realitzar l'alliniament de paraules, aprendre representacions espacials per vectors de paraules i formar un classificador per distingir paraules en grups de sentits. LanguageNet mostra directament la definició d'un sentit, sinonims bilingües i exemples rellevants.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা একটি সিস্টেম, ভাষাগুয়েজ নেট, যা দ্বিতীয় ভাষা শিক্ষার্থীদের সাহায্য করতে পারে একটি শব্দের বিভিন্ন অর আমরা একটি ইংরেজি শব্দের জোড়ার ভিত্তিতে শব্দের অনুভূতি বিভ্রান্ত করি এবং তার সাথে চীনা অনুবাদের সাথে সংশ্লিষ্ট কর্পুস, ইউএ এই প্রক্রিয়ার মধ্যে শব্দ প্রতিনিধিত্ব, ভেক্টরের স্পেসের প্রতিনিধিত্ব শিক্ষা এবং বিভিন্ন গ্রুপে শব্দ পার্থক্য করা ভাষাগুলোর নেটওয়ার্ক সরাসরি দেখিয়ে দেখাচ্ছে একটি মানসিক, দুই ভাষার সিনোনিয়াম এবং অনুমানের প্রযুক্ত উদা', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo sistem, LanguageNet, koji može pomoći drugim učiteljima jezika u potrazi za različitim smislama i korištenjem riječi. Mi disambigujemo osjećaje riječi na temelju parova engleske riječi i njegovih odgovarajućih kineskih prevoda u paralelnom korpusu UM-Corpus. Proces uključuje obavljanje poravnanja riječi, učenje svemira vektora predstavljanja riječi i obuku klasifikatora kako bi razvilo riječi u grupe čula. LanguageNet direktno pokazuje definiciju smisla, dvojezičkih sinonima i osjećaja relevantnih primjera.', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme systém LanguageNet, který může pomoci studentům druhého jazyka hledat různé významy a použití slova. Rozdělujeme slovní smysly na základě párů anglického slova a jeho odpovídajících čínských překladů v paralelním korpusu UM-Corpus. Proces zahrnoval provádění zarovnávání slov, učení se vektorových prostorových reprezentací slov a trénink klasifikátoru rozlišovat slova do skupin smyslů. LanguageNet přímo ukazuje definici smyslu, dvojjazyčná synonyma a smyslově relevantní příklady.', 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame süsteemi LanguageNet, mis aitab teise keele õppijatel otsida sõna erinevaid tähendusi ja kasutusviise. Me eristame sõnatundeid inglise sõna paaride ja selle vastavate hiina tõlkete alusel paralleelkorpuses UM-Corpus. Protsess hõlmas sõnade joondamist, sõnade vektoriruumi kujutamist ja klassifitseerija koolitamist eristama sõnu meelterühmadeks. LanguageNet näitab otseselt tähenduse määratlust, kakskeelseid sünonüüme ja tähendusega seotud näiteid.', 'fi': 'Tässä työssä esittelemme LanguageNet-järjestelmän, joka auttaa toisen kielen oppijoita etsimään eri merkityksiä ja käyttötapoja sanalle. Selitämme sanaaistit englanninkielisen sanan parien ja sitä vastaavien kiinalaisten käännösten perusteella rinnakkaiskorpusessa UM-Corpus. Prosessiin kuului sanalinjauksen suorittaminen, sanojen vektoriavaruusesitysten oppiminen ja luokittelijan kouluttaminen erottamaan sanat aistiryhmiksi. LanguageNet näyttää suoraan merkityksen määritelmän, kaksikieliset synonyymit ja merkitykseen liittyviä esimerkkejä.', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo sistem LanguageNet, ki lahko učencem drugega jezika pomaga iskati različne pomene in uporabo besede. Besedne čute razločimo na podlagi parov angleške besede in njenih ustreznih kitajskih prevodov v vzporednem korpusu UM-Corpus. Proces je vključeval poravnavo besed, učenje vektorskih prostorskih predstavitev besed in usposabljanje klasifikatorja za razlikovanje besed v skupine čutov. LanguageNet neposredno prikazuje opredelitev pomena, dvojezične sinonime in pomembne primere.', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da wani na'urar, Lugha'in da za'a iya taimakon su da ma'abũta lugha na biyu dõmin su nẽmi manyan mutane da amfani da sune-zane. Ba mu rarraba saurin magana a kan maganar Ingiriya da fassararsa mai daidai na China cikin parallel Corbas, UM-Corbus. Kirarin da za'a sami tsari da kalmar, mai sanar da filin aiki na shiryarwa na maganar kuma ya yi amfani da wani mai rarrabẽwa dõmin ya rarrabe magana zuwa jama'a-jama'a. LanguageNet directly shows the definition of a sense, bilingual synonyms and sense relevant examples.", 'jv': 'Nang pepul iki, awak dhéwé mulai sistem, Languagenet, sing iso ngbantuan luwih bantuan kanggo nggunakake tarjamahan lan nggambar aturan sing berkas. Awak dhéwé nglanggar aturan pangan sing isiné supoyo Perancis lan padha nganggo tarjamahan itlanjut Hyun Genjer Languagenet bukane diperaksi perusahaan seneng, nggambar kelangan anyar karo seneng pisan bangsane', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה, אנחנו מציגים מערכת, LanguageNet, שיכולה לעזור ללמודים לשפה שנייה לחפש משמעות שונות ושימושים של מילה. אנחנו מנותקים את חושים מילים מבוססים על זוגות מילה אנגלית והתרגומות הסיניות המתאימות שלהם בקורפוס מקביל, UM-קורפוס. התהליך כולל ביצוע התאמה במילים, ללמוד ייצוגי חלל ווקטורים של מילים ואימון מסווג כדי להבדיל מילים לקבוצות של חושים. LanguageNet מראה ישירות את הגדרה של תחושה, סינונימות שתיים-լեשות וחושה דוגמאות רלוונטיות.', 'bo': 'ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་མ་ལག་ཞིག་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་རྩོམ་པ་གཉིས་པ་ལ་རོགས ང་ཚོས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་ཐ་སྙད་ཅིག་དང་འདིའི་ཆོས་ཚིག་དང་མཐུན་པའི་ཚིག་རྩིས་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་མཐུན་སྒྲིག The process involved performing word alignment, learning vector space representations of words and training a classifier to distinguish words into groups of senses. སྐད་ཡིག་Net(LanguageNet)ཡིས་རང་འགུལ་ལྟ་བུའི་ངོས་འཛིན་དང་། སྐད་རིགས་གཉིས་ཀྱི་མཚོན་རྟགས་དང་། དཔེར་ན།'}
{'en': 'Lingke : a Fine-grained Multi-turn Chatbot for Customer Service', 'ar': 'Lingke: روبوت محادثة متعدد الأدوار دقيق الحبيبات لخدمة العملاء', 'pt': 'Lingke: um chatbot multi-turno refinado para atendimento ao cliente', 'es': 'Lingke: un chatbot multigiro muy detallado para el servicio de atención al cliente', 'fr': 'Lingke\xa0: un chatbot multi-tours à grain fin pour le service client', 'ja': 'Lingke ：カスタマーサービス用の細かいマルチターンチャットボット', 'zh': '灵科:客户服务细粒度多轮机器人', 'ru': 'Lingke: мелкозернистый многооборотный чат-бот для обслуживания клиентов', 'hi': 'Lingke: ग्राहक सेवा के लिए एक ठीक दानेदार मल्टी-टर्न चैटबॉट', 'ga': 'Lingke: Chatbot Iliompaithe mínghlan le haghaidh Seirbhíse do Chustaiméirí', 'ka': 'Name', 'hu': 'Lingke: egy finomszemcsés többfordulós chatbot az ügyfélszolgálathoz', 'el': 'Ένα λεπτόκοκκο Chatbot πολλαπλών στροφών για την εξυπηρέτηση πελατών', 'it': 'Lingke: un Chatbot multiturno a grana fine per il servizio clienti', 'lt': 'Lingke: a Fine-grained Multi-turn Chatbot for Customer Service', 'kk': 'Сілтеме: клиенттер қызметі үшін көптеген шатботты жақсы қылуName', 'mk': 'Лингје: фин разговор за мултикруг за клиентска услуга', 'ml': 'സ്വകാര്യ സേവനത്തിനുവേണ്ടി ഒരു നല്ല പിടിച്ചിരിക്കുന്ന പല- തിരിച്ചുമാറ്റുന്ന ചട്ട്ബോട്', 'ms': 'Lingke', 'mn': 'Холбоо: Хэрэглэгчийн үйлчилгээний хувьд сайн үржүүлсэн олон шатбот', 'ro': 'Lingke: un Chatbot multi-turn cu granule fine pentru Serviciul Clienți', 'mt': 'Lingwa: Biċċiet ta’ Diskussjoni b’ħafna dawriet irfinati għas-Servizz tal-Klijenti', 'no': 'Name', 'pl': 'Lingke: drobnoziarnisty multi-turn chatbot dla obsługi klienta', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Xiriikhda adeegga macaamiisha', 'sv': 'Lingke: en finkornig Multi-Turn Chatbot för kundtjänst', 'ta': 'இணைப்பு', 'ur': 'Lingke: a Fine-grained Multi-turn Chatbot for Customer Service', 'sr': 'Lingke: Fine-grained Multi-turn Chatbot for Customer Service', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Tắt đoạn cuối cho dịch vụ khách hàng', 'bg': 'Финозърнест многозавъртан чатбот за обслужване на клиенти', 'nl': 'Lingke: een fijne multi-turn chatbot voor klantenservice', 'da': 'Lingke: en finkornet Multi-Turn Chatbot til kundeservice', 'hr': 'Lingke: Fine-grained Multi-turn Chatbot za klijentsku službu', 'id': 'Lingke: sebuah percakapan berbeda-berbeda dengan gandum untuk Layanan Pelanggan', 'de': 'Lingke: ein feinkörniger Multi-Turn Chatbot für den Kundenservice', 'fa': 'Lingke: یک Chatbot Multi-turn برای خدمات مشتری', 'ko': 'Lingke: 고객 서비스에 사용되는 세립도 멀티 라운드 채팅 로봇', 'sw': 'Lingke: kituo cha Chatbot kilichokamatwa vizuri kwa ajili ya huduma ya wateja', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk: Customer Servis üçin Köp-Taýdalanýan Çatbot', 'af': "Lingke:  'n Fine- grained Multi- turn Chatbot vir Customer Service", 'sq': 'Lingke: një bisedë me shumë kthesa të bukura për shërbimin e klientëve', 'am': 'Link: a fine-grafted Multi-turn Chatbot for Customer Service', 'bn': 'লিঙ্ক: স্বনির্বাচিত সার্ভিসের জন্য একটি ভালো গ্রেফতার করা বহুবার চ্যাটবোট', 'hy': 'Լինգ. հաճախորդ ծառայության համար բազմաշարժվող գեղեցիկ խոսակցություն', 'az': 'Lingke: Müştəçi Hızmeti üçün çoxlu-dönüş Chatbot', 'bs': 'Lingke: Fine-grained Multi-turn Chatbot for Customer Service', 'cs': 'Lingke: jemnozrnný multi-turn chatbot pro zákaznický servis', 'et': 'Lingke: peeneteteraline mitmekäiguline jutubot klienditeeninduse jaoks', 'ca': 'Lingke: una conversa de múltiples girs fins per al Servici Client', 'fi': 'Lingke: Hienorakeinen Multi-Turn Chatbot asiakaspalveluun', 'jv': 'structural navigation', 'sk': 'Lingke: drobnozrnat večobratni Chatbot za službo strankam', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Lingke: שיחת שיחות רבות מסתובבות מעולה לשירות לקוחות', 'bo': 'སྦྲེལ་མཐུད：Customer Service་ལ་ཆ་རྐྱེན་ལ་བཏོན་པའི་སྣ་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གི་གླེང་མོལ་བྱེད་པ'}
{'en': 'Traditional chatbots usually need a mass of human dialogue data, especially when using supervised machine learning method. Though they can easily deal with single-turn question answering, for multi-turn the performance is usually unsatisfactory. In this paper, we present Lingke, an information retrieval augmented chatbot which is able to answer questions based on given product introduction document and deal with multi-turn conversations. We will introduce a fine-grained pipeline processing to distill responses based on unstructured documents, and attentive sequential context-response matching for multi-turn conversations.', 'ar': 'عادةً ما تحتاج روبوتات المحادثة التقليدية إلى كتلة من بيانات الحوار البشري ، خاصةً عند استخدام طريقة التعلم الآلي الخاضعة للإشراف. على الرغم من أنه يمكنهم التعامل بسهولة مع إجابة السؤال من نقطة واحدة ، إلا أن الأداء عادة ما يكون غير مرضٍ في الدورات المتعددة. في هذه الورقة ، نقدم Lingke ، وهو روبوت محادثة معزز لاسترجاع المعلومات قادر على الإجابة على الأسئلة بناءً على مستند تقديم منتج معين والتعامل مع المحادثات متعددة الأدوار. سنقدم معالجة خط أنابيب دقيقة لتقطير الاستجابات بناءً على المستندات غير المهيكلة ، ومطابقة استجابة السياق المتسلسلة اليقظة للمحادثات متعددة الأدوار.', 'pt': 'Os chatbots tradicionais geralmente precisam de uma massa de dados de diálogo humano, especialmente ao usar o método de aprendizado de máquina supervisionado. Embora eles possam lidar facilmente com respostas de perguntas de um turno, para vários turnos o desempenho geralmente é insatisfatório. Neste artigo, apresentamos o Lingke, um chatbot de recuperação de informações aumentada que é capaz de responder a perguntas com base em um determinado documento de introdução do produto e lidar com conversas multi-turn. Apresentaremos um processamento de pipeline refinado para destilar respostas baseadas em documentos não estruturados e correspondência de resposta de contexto sequencial atenta para conversas de vários turnos.', 'es': 'Los chatbots tradicionales suelen necesitar una gran cantidad de datos de diálogo humano, especialmente cuando utilizan un método de aprendizaje automático supervisado. Aunque pueden manejar fácilmente la respuesta a preguntas de un solo turno, para múltiples turnos el rendimiento suele ser insatisfactorio. En este artículo, presentamos Lingke, un chatbot aumentado de recuperación de información que es capaz de responder preguntas basadas en un documento de presentación del producto dado y tratar conversaciones de varios turnos. Introduciremos un procesamiento de canalización detallado para destilar respuestas basadas en documentos no estructurados, y una atenta correspondencia secuencial de respuestas de contexto para conversaciones de varios turnos.', 'fr': "Les chatbots traditionnels ont généralement besoin d'une masse de données de dialogue humain, en particulier lorsqu'ils utilisent une méthode d'apprentissage automatique supervisé. Bien qu'ils puissent facilement répondre à des questions en un tour, les performances sont généralement insatisfaisantes pour les tours multiples. Dans cet article, nous présentons Lingke, un chatbot amélioré de récupération d'informations capable de répondre aux questions basées sur un document d'introduction de produit donné et de gérer des conversations à plusieurs tours. Nous allons introduire un traitement de pipeline précis pour distiller des réponses basées sur des documents non structurés, et une correspondance contextuelle séquentielle attentive pour les conversations à tours multiples.", 'ja': '従来のチャットボットは、特に監視された機械学習方法を使用する場合、通常、大量の人間の対話データを必要とします。シングルターンの質問に簡単に対応できますが、マルチターンの場合、パフォーマンスは通常満足のいくものではありません。本稿では、与えられた製品紹介ドキュメントに基づいて質問に答え、マルチターンの会話に対処できる情報検索拡張チャットボットであるLingkeを紹介する。構造化されていない文書に基づいて応答を蒸留するための細かいパイプライン処理と、マルチターン会話のための注意深い順次コンテキスト応答マッチングを導入します。', 'zh': '古之聊天机器人常须众人对数,特用督机器学法。 虽易为回答,然于多回合,常不称意。 本文引Lingke,此信息检索增强型聊天机器人,能以给定物对文档多更番对。 吾将言一细粒度之管道,以炼基于非结构化文档之应,而多轮次对细心之序上下文应匹也。', 'hi': 'पारंपरिक चैटबॉट्स को आमतौर पर मानव संवाद डेटा के द्रव्यमान की आवश्यकता होती है, खासकर जब पर्यवेक्षित मशीन लर्निंग विधि का उपयोग किया जाता है। हालांकि वे आसानी से एकल-बारी के प्रश्न का उत्तर देने से निपट सकते हैं, बहु-मोड़ के लिए प्रदर्शन आमतौर पर असंतोषजनक होता है। इस पेपर में, हम लिंगके, एक सूचना पुनर्प्राप्ति संवर्धित चैटबॉट प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो दिए गए उत्पाद परिचय दस्तावेज़ के आधार पर सवालों के जवाब देने और बहु-बारी से बातचीत से निपटने में सक्षम है। हम असंरचित दस्तावेजों के आधार पर प्रतिक्रियाओं को डिस्टिल करने के लिए एक ठीक-दाने वाली पाइपलाइन प्रसंस्करण पेश करेंगे, और बहु-बारी वार्तालापों के लिए चौकस अनुक्रमिक संदर्भ-प्रतिक्रिया मिलान करेंगे।', 'ru': 'Традиционным чат-ботам обычно требуется масса данных человеческого диалога, особенно при использовании метода контролируемого машинного обучения. Хотя они могут легко справиться с ответом на вопрос в один ход, для многооборотного исполнения обычно неудовлетворительно. В этой статье мы представляем Lingke, дополненный чат-бот для извлечения информации, который способен отвечать на вопросы на основе данного документа о введении продукта и иметь дело с многооборотными разговорами. Мы введем мелкозернистую обработку трубопровода для дистилляции ответов на основе неструктурированных документов и внимательное последовательное сопоставление контекста и ответа для многооборотных разговоров.', 'ga': 'De ghnáth bíonn gá le mórchuid sonraí idirphlé daonna ó chatbots traidisiúnta, go háirithe agus modh foghlama meaisín maoirsithe á úsáid. Cé gur féidir leo déileáil go héasca le ceisteanna aon chasadh a fhreagairt, is gnách go mbíonn an fheidhmíocht míshásúil i gcás il-chasaidh. Sa pháipéar seo, cuirimid i láthair Lingke, chatbot méadaithe aisghabhála faisnéise atá in ann ceisteanna a fhreagairt bunaithe ar dhoiciméad tugtha isteach an táirge agus déileáil le comhráite iliompaithe. Tabharfaimid isteach píblíne mín-phróiseála chun freagraí a dhriogadh bunaithe ar dhoiciméid neamhstruchtúrtha, agus comhoiriúnú comhthéacs-freagra seicheamhach le haghaidh comhráite iliompaithe.', 'hu': 'A hagyományos chatbotoknak általában rengeteg emberi párbeszédadatra van szükségük, különösen ha felügyelt gépi tanulási módszert használnak. Bár könnyen megbirkózhatnak az egyfordulós kérdések megválaszolásával, a többfordulós teljesítmény általában nem kielégítő. Ebben a tanulmányban bemutatjuk a Lingke-et, egy információvisszakereső kiterjesztett chatbot, amely képes válaszolni a kérdésekre adott termékbevezető dokumentum alapján, és többfordulós beszélgetéseket kezelni. Bevezetünk egy finom szemcsés csővezeték-feldolgozást a strukturálatlan dokumentumok alapján történő válaszok desztillálására, valamint figyelmes szekvenciális kontextus-válaszok egyeztetésére a többfordulós beszélgetésekhez.', 'el': 'Τα παραδοσιακά χρειάζονται συνήθως μια μάζα δεδομένων ανθρώπινου διαλόγου, ειδικά όταν χρησιμοποιούν εποπτευμένη μέθοδο μηχανικής μάθησης. Αν και μπορούν εύκολα να αντιμετωπίσουν την απάντηση μιας ερώτησης, για την πολλαπλή στροφή η απόδοση είναι συνήθως μη ικανοποιητική. Σε αυτή την εργασία, παρουσιάζουμε ένα ενισχυμένο chatbot ανάκτησης πληροφοριών που είναι σε θέση να απαντήσει σε ερωτήσεις με βάση το δεδομένο έγγραφο εισαγωγής προϊόντων και να ασχοληθεί με συζητήσεις πολλαπλών στροφών. Θα εισαγάγουμε μια λεπτόκοκκη επεξεργασία αγωγών για την απόσταξη απαντήσεων βασισμένων σε μη δομημένα έγγραφα, και προσεκτική διαδοχική αντιστοίχιση περιβάλλοντος-απόκρισης για συζητήσεις πολλαπλών στροφών.', 'ka': 'ტრადიციონალური ქარბოტები საერთოდ ადამიანის დიალოგის მონაცემების მასი უნდა იჭირდება, განსაკუთრებით როდესაც მაქსინური სწავლების მეტი გამო მაგრამ ისინი შეუძლიათ ადვილურად გადაწყენოთ ერთი კითხვის პასუხისთვის, რადგან მრავალურად გადაწყენოთ, პროცენტურაცია უბრალოდ არაფექტურა ამ დოკუმენტში, ჩვენ Lingke-ს გამოყენებთ ინფორმაცია, რომელიც შეუძლებელია გაუკეთოთ კითხვების შესაძლებლობა, რომელიც მიიღებული პროდუმენტის შესახებ დოკუმენტის შესახებ ჩვენ დავიყენებთ წარმოდგენილი პროცესი, რომელიც განსხვავებული პასუხები, რომელიც არ განსხვავებული დოკუმენტებზე ბაზეულია, და მრავალური პასუხებისთვის შესაბამისი კონტექსკენტი', 'it': "I chatbot tradizionali di solito hanno bisogno di una massa di dati di dialogo umano, specialmente quando utilizzano il metodo di apprendimento automatico supervisionato. Anche se possono facilmente affrontare la risposta alle domande a un solo turno, per più turni la prestazione è solitamente insoddisfacente. In questo articolo presentiamo Lingke, un chatbot potenziato per il recupero delle informazioni che è in grado di rispondere alle domande sulla base di un dato documento introduttivo del prodotto e gestire conversazioni a più turni. Introdurremo un'elaborazione di pipeline a grana fine per distillare le risposte basate su documenti non strutturati e un'attenta corrispondenza sequenziale contesto-risposta per conversazioni a più turni.", 'mk': 'На традиционалните чатботи обично им треба маса на податоци од човечкиот дијалог, особено кога се користат методите на набљудувано машинско учење. Иако тие лесно можат да се справат со одговорот на еднообратно прашање, за повеќето вртења претставата обично не е задоволна. Во овој весник, го претставуваме Лингке, информациско преземање зголемен chatbot кој може да одговори на прашања базирани на даден документ за воведување на производот и да се справи со мултиобратни разговори. We will introduce a fine-grained pipeline processing to distill responses based on unstructured documents, and attentive sequential context-response matching for multi-turn conversations.', 'kk': 'Дәстүрлі шатботтар кәдімгі адамдардың диалог деректерінің массасы керек, өзгертілген машинаны оқыту әдісін қолданғанда. Олар бір қарсы сұрақ жауап беруге оңай айналысуға болады, бірнеше қарсы өзгертуге болады. Бұл қағазда Lingke-ті таңдаймыз. Мәліметті көптеген сұрақтарды берілген құжаттың негізінде жауап бере алатын және көптеген сұрақтарды қалай алатын сұрақтарды алу үшін көптеген Біз құрылмаған құжаттарға негізделген жауаптарды, көптеген сәйкестіктерге сәйкестік контексті жауап беру үшін жауаптарды таңдап береміз.', 'lt': 'Tradiciniams pokalbiams paprastai reikia daug žmogaus dialogo duomenų, ypač naudojant prižiūrėtą mašininio mokymosi metodą. Nors jos gali lengvai spręsti vienkartinio atsakymo į klausimus klausimus klausimus klausimus, daugkartinio atsakymo atveju rezultatai paprastai nepatenkinami. Šiame dokumente pristatysime Lingke, informacinį paiešką papildantį chatbot ą, kuris gali atsakyti į klausimus, pagrįstus konkrečiu produkto įvedimo dokumentu ir sprendžia daugkartinius pokalbius. Įdiegsime smulkių grūdų vamzdynų apdorojimą distiliuojant atsakus, pagrįstus nestruktūrizuotais dokumentais, ir atidžiai sekančiu konteksto ir atsako derinimu daugiakalbiams.', 'ms': 'Chatbot tradisional biasanya memerlukan mass a data dialog manusia, terutama bila menggunakan kaedah pembelajaran mesin yang dikendalikan. Walaupun mereka mudah menangani jawapan soalan satu pusingan, untuk berbilang pusingan prestasi biasanya tidak puas. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan Lingke, pemulihan maklumat chatbot ditambah yang mampu menjawab soalan berdasarkan dokumen perkenalan produk yang diberikan dan berurusan dengan perbualan berbilang pusingan. Kami akan memperkenalkan pemprosesan saluran paip yang sempurna untuk mencurahkan balasan berdasarkan dokumen yang tidak terstruktur, dan perhatian sekuensi sambungan-balasan untuk perbualan berbilang pusingan.', 'ml': 'പാട്ടികമായ ചട്ട്ബോട്ടുകള്\u200d സാധാരണ മനുഷ്യരുടെ ഡയലോഗ് ഡേറ്റായുള്ള ഒരു വലിയ വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ആവശ്യമുണ്ട്, പ്രത്യേകിച്ച് മ അവര്\u200dക്ക് ഒരു തിരിച്ചു പോകാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുന്ന ചോദ്യങ്ങളുടെ ഉത്തരം ചോദിക്കാന്\u200d സാധിക്കുമെങ്കിലും, പല്ലാത്തിര ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d നമ്മള്\u200d ലിങ്കെയിനെ കാണിക്കുന്നു, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d വീണ്ടെടുക്കുന്ന ഒരു വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d കൂട്ടിചേര്\u200dക്കുന്ന ചട്ട്ബോട്ട്, കൊടുത് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കപ്പെടാത്ത രേഖകള്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ഉത്തരങ്ങള്\u200d വ്യത്യസ്തമാക്കുവാനും പിന്നീട് സംസാരിക്കുന്ന പൈപ്പെലിന്\u200d പ്രതികരണങ്ങള്\u200dക്ക്', 'mt': "Il-chatbots tradizzjonali normalment jeħtieġu mass a ta’ dejta dwar id-djalogu uman, speċjalment meta jużaw metodu ta’ tagħlim bil-magni sorveljat. Għalkemm jistgħu faċilment jittrattaw it-tweġibiet għal mistoqsijiet b’dawra waħda, għal diversi dawriet il-prestazzjoni normalment mhijiex sodisfaċenti. F’dan id-dokument, qed nippreżentaw Lingke, chatbot miżjud għall-ġbir ta’ informazzjoni li jista’ jwieġeb mistoqsijiet ibbażati fuq dokument ta’ introduzzjoni tal-prodott partikolari u jittratta konverżjonijiet b’diversi dawriet. Aħna se jintroduċu proċessar tal-pajpijiet b'ħbub irfinati biex jiġu distillati risponsi bbażati fuq dokumenti mhux strutturati, u tqabbil attent sekwenzjali bejn il-kuntest u r-rispons għal konverżjonijiet b'ħafna dawriet.", 'no': 'Tradisjonale pratbottar treng vanlegvis masse av menneskelige dialogvindauge, spesielt når du brukar overvakte maskinelæringsmetode. Selv om dei kan enkelt handsama med svar på svar på enkelt snu, for fleire snu er utviklinga vanlegvis ugyldig. I denne papiret presenterer vi Lingke eit informasjon om å henta opp augmentert samtale som kan svara på spørsmål basert på oppgjeven dokument for introduksjon av produkt og handsama med fleire omtaler. Vi vil introdusera ein fyrst røyringsprosessering for å distillere svar basert på ustrukturte dokument, og tilhøyrande kontekstsvar som passar med fleire omtaler.', 'mn': 'Хувийн ярианы байдлаар хүний диалог өгөгдлийн масс хэрэгтэй, ялангуяа машин суралцах арга хэрэглэх үед. Хэдийгээр тэд ганц эргэлт асуултын хариултыг амархан зохицуулж чадна. Учир нь олон эргэлт үйл ажиллагаа ихэвчлэн хэцүү байдаг. Энэ цаасан дээр бид Lingke-г илтгэдэг. Мэдээлэл дээр нэмэгдүүлсэн яриа гаргаж өгсөн бүтээгдэхүүний нэмэгдүүлсэн асуултуудад хариулт өгч, олон өөрчлөлт яриагаа хийх боломжтой. Бид бүтээгдэхүүн биш баримтуудын үндсэн хариултыг сайжруулахын тулд сайжруулагдсан хоолойн шугамны үйлдвэрлэл хийх болно. Мөн олон өөрчлөлт ярилцлагын дараагийн дараагийн хариултын үйлдвэрлэл удирдах болно.', 'ro': 'Chatbotii tradiționali au nevoie de obicei de o masă de date de dialog uman, mai ales atunci când utilizează metoda de învățare automată supravegheată. Deși se pot ocupa cu ușurință de răspunsul la întrebări cu un singur rând, pentru mai multe rânduri performanța este de obicei nesatisfăcătoare. În această lucrare, vă prezentăm Lingke, un chatbot augmentat de recuperare a informațiilor care este capabil să răspundă la întrebări pe baza documentului de introducere a produsului dat și să se ocupe de conversații multi-turn. Vom introduce o procesare a conductelor cu granule fine pentru distilarea răspunsurilor pe baza documentelor nestructurate și o potrivire atentă secvențială context-răspuns pentru conversațiile cu mai multe rânduri.', 'sr': 'Tradicionalni razgovor obično treba masu podataka o ljudskom dijalogu, posebno kada koristi metodu učenja nadgledanih strojeva. Iako mogu lako rešiti odgovor na jednookrenuto pitanje, jer je više okrenuto izvedba obično neodoljiva. U ovom papiru predstavljamo Lingke, povećan razgovor o informacijama koji može odgovoriti na pitanja na temelju datog dokumenta za uvođenje proizvoda i rješavati razgovore o mnogim okretanjima. Upoznaæemo obraðivanje zgodnog naftovoda na destilaciji odgovora na osnovu neostrukturnih dokumenta i pažnju na sekvencijski odgovor na kontekst odgovor za višestruke razgovore.', 'si': 'සාමාන්\u200dය චැට්බෝට්ස් සාමාන්\u200dයයෙන්ම මිනිස් සංවාද දත්ත අවශ්\u200dයයි, විශේෂයෙන්ම පරික්ෂා කර ඔවුන්ට ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරතිච්චාරයක් ලේසියෙන් වැඩ කරන්න පුළුවන් නමුත්, ගොඩක් ප්\u200dරශ්න වෙනස් වෙ මේ පත්තරේ අපි Lingke වෙනුවෙන්, තොරතුරු ප්\u200dරාප්ත කතාබට් එකක් පිළිගන්න පුළුවන් විදිහට ප්\u200dරශ්න ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරතික්ෂා කරන අපි හොඳ ක්\u200dරේන්ඩ් පායිප්ලින් ප්\u200dරක්\u200dරියාවක් සැකසුම් කරන්න ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාවක් විස්තර කරනවා නැති විස්තාරයක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරතික්\u200dරියාව', 'sv': 'Traditionella chatbots behöver vanligtvis en massa mänskliga dialogdata, särskilt när de använder övervakad maskininlärningsmetod. Även om de lätt kan hantera svar på frågor med en enda vändning, för flera vändningar är prestandan vanligtvis otillfredsställande. I denna uppsats presenterar vi Lingke, en förstärkt chatbot för informationshämtning som kan svara på frågor baserat på givet produktintroduktionsdokument och hantera konversationer i flera omgångar. Vi kommer att introducera en finkornig pipeline bearbetning för att destillera svar baserat på ostrukturerade dokument, och noggrann sekventiell kontext-responsmatchning för konversationer i flera omgångar.', 'pl': 'Tradycyjne chatboty zwykle potrzebują masy danych dialogowych człowieka, zwłaszcza podczas stosowania metody nadzorowanego uczenia maszynowego. Chociaż mogą łatwo poradzić sobie z odpowiedzią na pytania pojedynczego obrotu, w przypadku wielokrotu wydajność jest zwykle niezadowalająca. W niniejszym artykule przedstawiamy Lingke, rozszerzony chatbot, który jest w stanie odpowiedzieć na pytania w oparciu o dany dokument wprowadzający produkt i zajmować się rozmowami wielokrotnymi. Wprowadzimy precyzyjne przetwarzanie rurociągu, aby destylować odpowiedzi w oparciu o nieustrukturyzowane dokumenty, oraz uważne sekwencyjne dopasowywanie odpowiedzi kontekstu do rozmów wielokrotnych.', 'so': "Sida caadiga ah waxaa loo baahan yahay macluumaad kala duduwan diyaarinta dadka, khusuusan marka lagu isticmaalo qaababka waxbarashada machine la ilaaliyo. In kastoo ay si fudud uga macaamiloon karaan jawaabta su'aalaha hal jeer ah, waayo tababarku inta badan waa suurtagal. Warqadan waxaynu ku soo qornaa Lingke, kaas oo ah bandhig-koritaanka macluumaadka, kaas oo awoodi kara inuu ka jawaabo su'aalo ku saabsan warqada la soo bandhigayo oo lagu qorayo warqado badan oo la soo bandhigayo. Waxaannu soo bandhignaynaa baaritaanka dhaqdhaqaaqa ah si aan u kala soocno jawaabaha looga dhigo dukumentiyada aan la dhisay, iyo jawaabta xilliga dambe oo u eg hadallada kala duduwan.", 'ur': 'سنتی چٹبوٹ معمولاً انسان کے ڈالیٹ کے ماساس کی ضرورت ہے، مخصوصا جب سوپریش ماشین سیکھنے کی طریقہ استعمال کرتے ہیں. Though they can easily deal with single-turn question replying, for multi-turn the performance is usually unsatisfactory. اس کاغذ میں ہم Lingke کو ایک معلومات پیدا کریں جو اضافہ ہوئی چاٹبوٹ کو جواب دینے کی طاقت رکھتا ہے اور بہت سی تبر کی باتوں سے جواب دینے کی طاقت رکھتا ہے. ہم ایک پائيپ لائن پرسس کریں گے جو غیر ساختہ دفتروں پر بنیاد رکھے ہوئے پائيپ لائن پرسس کریں گے، اور بہت سی تبر کی باتوں کے بارے میں موافقت کے ساتھ موافقت کے ساتھ موافقت کے ساتھ موافقت کے ساتھ موافقت کریں گے.', 'ta': 'பாரம்பரிய அரட்டைகள் வழக்கமாக மனித உரையாடல் தகவல் பெரிய தேவைப்படுகிறது, குறிப்பாக கண்காணிக்கப்பட்ட இயந்திரத்தை பயன்பட அவர்கள் சுலபமாக ஒற்றைத் திரும்பும் கேள்விக்கு பதில் எடுத்துக் கொள்ள முடியும் போது இந்த காகிதத்தில், நாம் லிங்கே காண்பிக்கிறோம், ஒரு தகவல் மீட்டெடுக்கப்பட்ட அரட்டை மேம்படுத்தப்பட்டுள்ளது. இது கொடுக்கப்பட்ட பொருள் ம நாம் உருவாக்கப்படாத ஆவணங்களை அடிப்படையில் பிரித்துக் கொள்ள ஒரு நன்றாக்கப்பட்ட பைப்லைன் செயல்பாட்டை அறிவிக்க வேண்டும் மற்றும் பின்வரு', 'uz': "Name Agar ular bir necha boshqa savol javoblarini boshqara oladigan bo'lsa, ko'p marta ko'proq bajarish oddiy emas. In this paper, we present Lingke, an information retrieval augmented chatbot which is able to answer questions based on given product introduction document and deal with multi-turn conversations.  Biz quyidagi hujjatlar asosida javoblarni ajratish uchun yaxshi qo'llab-qo'llangan, va bir necha xil muloqonlar bilan mos keladigan xizmatning javob berishni anglatamiz.", 'vi': 'Thường thì chat truyền thống cần dữ liệu cuộc đối thoại con người, đặc biệt khi dùng phương pháp học máy giám sát. Mặc dù họ có thể dễ dàng trả lời câu hỏi một lượt, nhưng với kết quả đa chiều thì không hài lòng. Trong tờ giấy này, chúng tôi giới thiệu Lingke, một tên khùng được truy tìm thông tin. Người có thể trả lời câu hỏi dựa trên một tài liệu giới thiệu sản phẩm đã đưa ra và đối phó với các cuộc đối thoại đa lượt. Chúng tôi sẽ tiến hành việc xử lý các đường ống sang trọng để chưng cất các phản ứng dựa trên các tài liệu không cấu trúc, và đáp ứng bối cảnh cẩn thận cho các cuộc trò chuyện sắp tới.', 'bg': 'Традиционните чатботи обикновено се нуждаят от масивна информация за човешки диалог, особено когато използват метод за контролирано машинно обучение. Въпреки че те могат лесно да се справят с отговора на въпроси с един завой, за многозавой изпълнението обикновено е незадоволително. В тази статия представяме разширен чат бот за извличане на информация, който е в състояние да отговаря на въпроси въз основа на даден документ за въвеждане на продукта и да се занимава с многократни разговори. Ще въведем фина обработка на тръбопроводи, за да дестилираме отговорите въз основа на неструктурирани документи, и внимателно последователно съвпадение на контекст-отговор за многократни разговори.', 'hr': 'Tradicionalni razgovor obično trebaju masu podataka o ljudskom dijalogu, posebno kada koriste metodu učenja nadgledanih strojeva. Iako mogu lako riješiti odgovor na jednookretanje pitanja, jer je više okretanja činjenica obično neodoljiva. U ovom papiru predstavljamo Lingke, povećan razgovor koji može odgovoriti na pitanja na temelju datog dokumenta o uvođenju proizvoda i rješavati razgovore o višeokretanju. Predstavit ćemo obrađivanje zgodnog cijevina na destilaciji odgovora na temelju nestrukturiranih dokumenta i pažnju na sekvencijsku reakciju u kontekstu odgovarajuće odgovore na višestruke razgovore.', 'nl': 'Traditionele chatbots hebben meestal een massa menselijke dialooggegevens nodig, vooral wanneer ze gebruik maken van begeleide machine learning methode. Hoewel ze gemakkelijk kunnen omgaan met het beantwoorden van single-turn vragen, voor multi-turn zijn de prestaties meestal onbevredigend. In dit artikel presenteren we Lingke, een uitgebreide chatbot die vragen kan beantwoorden op basis van een gegeven productintroductiedocument en multi-turn gesprekken kan behandelen. We zullen een fijngranige pipeline verwerking introduceren om reacties te distilleren op basis van ongestructureerde documenten, en attente sequentiële context-response matching voor multi-turn gesprekken.', 'da': 'Traditionelle chatbots har normalt brug for en masse menneskelige dialogdata, især når de bruger overvåget maskinlæringsmetode. Selvom de nemt kan håndtere spørgsmålsbesvarelse med én omgang, er præstationen normalt utilfredsstillende for flere omgange. I denne artikel præsenterer vi Lingke, en informationshentning augmented chatbot, som er i stand til at besvare spørgsmål baseret på givet produktintroduktionsdokument og håndtere flere-turn samtaler. Vi vil indføre en finkornet pipeline behandling til destillering af svar baseret på ustrukturerede dokumenter, og opmærksom sekventiel kontekst-responsmatchning til multi-turn samtaler.', 'de': 'Traditionelle Chatbots benötigen in der Regel eine Menge menschlicher Dialogdaten, insbesondere wenn sie überwachte maschinelle Lernmethoden verwenden. Obwohl sie leicht mit der Beantwortung von Single-Turn-Fragen umgehen können, ist die Leistung für Multi-Turn in der Regel unbefriedigend. In diesem Beitrag stellen wir Lingke vor, einen erweiterten Chatbot, der in der Lage ist, Fragen basierend auf gegebenen Produkteinführungsdokumenten zu beantworten und Multi-Turn-Gespräche zu bearbeiten. Wir werden eine feingranulare Pipeline-Verarbeitung einführen, um Antworten basierend auf unstrukturierten Dokumenten zu destillieren, und ein aufmerksames sequenzielles Kontext-Antwort-Matching für Multi-Turn-Gespräche.', 'fa': 'صحبت\u200cهای سنتی معمولاً به جمعیت داده\u200cهای محاورۀ محاورۀ انسان نیاز دارند، مخصوصا در زمان استفاده از روش یادگیری ماشین نظارت شده. اگرچه آنها می توانند به راحتی با پاسخ سوال یک تبدیل کند، برای چند تبدیل عملکرد معمولاً بی تفاوتی است. در این کاغذ، ما لینک را پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم، یک صحبت اطلاعاتی که می\u200cتواند به سوالات پاسخ دهد بر اساس سند معرفی تولید محصولات داده شده و با صحبت\u200cهای مختلف تبدیل کند. ما یک پردازش لوله\u200cهای قشنگ به پاسخ\u200cهایی که بر اساس مدارک\u200cهای غیرساخته\u200cاند، و پاسخ\u200cهای پایه\u200cهای پایه\u200cهای پایه\u200cهای زیادی برای گفتگو\u200cهای زیادی متفاوت را معرفی می\u200cکنیم.', 'ko': '전통적인 채팅 로봇은 통상적으로 대량의 인간 대화 데이터를 필요로 하는데, 특히 감독이 있는 기계 학습 방법을 사용할 때이다.비록 그들은 단일 라운드의 질문에 대한 대답을 쉽게 처리할 수 있지만, 다중 라운드의 경우 성능이 보통 만족스럽지 못하다.본고에서 우리는 정보 검색 증강 채팅 로봇 링크를 소개했는데 이것은 주어진 제품에 따라 문서에 따라 문제를 대답하고 여러 라운드의 대화를 처리할 수 있다.우리는 비구조화된 문서에 기반한 응답을 추출하기 위해 세분화된 파이프 처리를 도입하고, 여러 라운드 대화에 자세한 순서와 상하문 응답이 일치하도록 도입할 것이다.', 'id': 'Chatbot tradisional biasanya membutuhkan mass a data dialog manusia, terutama ketika menggunakan metode belajar mesin yang diawasi. Meskipun mereka mudah berurusan dengan menjawab pertanyaan satu putaran, untuk multi putaran pertunjukan biasanya tidak memuaskan. Dalam kertas ini, kami memperkenalkan Lingke, sebuah informasi retrieval chatbot yang meningkat yang mampu menjawab pertanyaan berdasarkan dokumen penemuan produk yang diberikan dan berurusan dengan percakapan multi-turn. Kami akan memperkenalkan proses saluran pipa yang baik untuk mendistril respon berdasarkan dokumen yang tidak terstruktur, dan perhatian sekwensial konteks-respon yang cocok untuk percakapan multi-putar.', 'sw': 'Mazungumzo ya kitamaduni mara nyingi yanahitaji takwimu za mazungumzo ya binadamu, hususani kwa kutumia mbinu za kujifunza mashine zilizotazama. Ingawa wanaweza kukabiliana na swali moja kwa moja, kwa kuwa, kwa mara nyingi, utendaji huo unakuwa usio sahihi. Katika gazeti hili, tunawasilisha Lingke, kituo cha habari kinachotumiwa kwa ujumbe ambacho kinaweza kujibu maswali yanayotokana na nyaraka ya utambulisho wa bidhaa na kupambana na mazungumzo mengi. Tutakutambulisha upasuaji wa pipesi mzuri wa kutofautisha majibu kwa kutumia nyaraka zisizo na ujenzi, na mwitikio wa mazingira yanayofanana na mazungumzo mengi.', 'tr': "Däpli soňunlar bilen adatça adam dialogy maglumatynyň bir topary gerek, ýöne näme üçin gözetli maşyny öwrenmek yöntemi ulanýanda. Olar ýekeje gezek soragynyň jogabyny aňsatlyk bilen çözip bilerler, bir köp gezek eserleşmek adatça täsirli däldir. Bu kagyzda Lingke'i görkezip bolýarys, gelişmiş sohbetleri almak üçin maglumat almak üçin munuň beren täsir giriş senedine daýan ýar we köp çenli söhbetleri bilen çözebilir. Biz gaty bir pipet işlemegini döredilmedik senediň daýanýar ýaly çykyşlara taýýarlamak üçin tanyş ederis we olaryň yzynda näçe çenli sözleşmeler üçin yzarlanýan kontekst jogabyny tanyşdyrjak.", 'af': "Tradisjoneel chatbots het gewoonlik 'n masse van menslike dialoog data nodig, veral wanneer die superviseerde masjien leermeetode gebruik word. Alhoewel hulle maklik kan behandel met enkel-draai vraag antwoord, vir multi-draai die prestasie is gewoonlik onbevestig. In hierdie papier, ons stel Lingke voor 'n inligting ontvang vergroot gesprekslys wat kan antwoord vrae gebaseer op gegewe produkt inligting dokument en behandel met meer- draai gesprekslys. Ons sal 'n fyn-graad pyplin-prosessering introduseer om reaksies te distiseer wat gebaseer is op ongestruktureerde dokumente, en aanvaarlik sekwensielle konteks-antwoord ooreenstemmende vir multi-draai gesprekke.", 'sq': 'Tradicional chatbots usually need a mass of human dialogue data, especially when using supervised machine learning method. Megjithëse ata mund të trajtojnë lehtë përgjigjen e pyetjeve me një kthesë të vetme, për shumë kthesa shfaqja është zakonisht e pakënaqur. Në këtë letër, ne paraqesim Lingke, një informacion marrje chatbot shtuar që është në gjendje të përgjigjet pyetjeve të bazuara në dokumentin e dhënë të futjes së prodhimit dhe të trajtojnë bisedimet me shumë kthesa. Ne do të futim një përpunim tubacioni të hollë për të distiluar përgjigjet bazuar në dokumente të paistrukturuara dhe përputhje të vëmendshme sekuencuese konteksti-përgjigje për bisedime shumëkthese.', 'am': 'ባሕላዊው አካባቢዎች የሰው ማነሻ ዳታዎችን በብዛት ያስፈልጋሉ፤ በተለየ ጥናት ማስተማር ዘዴን በተጠቃሚ ጊዜ ነው፡፡ ምንም እንኳ አንዲት ጥያቄን በመቀበል የሚችሉ ቢሆንም፣ የብዙ ጥያቄው በተለየ ጊዜ ይደሰታልና፡፡ በዚህ ገጽ ላይ Lingke፣ የመረጃ ማስታወቂያ የተጨማሪው አካባቢ ቦት እናቀርባታለን፡፡ በተመሠረቱት ሰነዶች ላይ መልስ ለመለየት እና በተጨማሪው የግንኙነት መልስ ለብዙዎች ተቃውሞ ለመለየፍ ጥያቄን እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'hy': 'Traditional chatbots usually need a mass of human dialogue data, especially when using supervised machine learning method.  Չնայած, որ նրանք հեշտությամբ կարող են լուծել մեկ անգամ հարցերի պատասխանը, բազմաանգամ ներկայացումը սովորաբար անբավարար է: Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք Linkhe-ը, տեղեկատվության վերաբերյալ ավելացված շտաբոտը, որը կարողանում է պատասխանել հարցերին, հիմնված տվյալ ներկայացման փաստաթղթի վրա և գործ ունենալ բազմահատուկ զրույցների հետ: Մենք կներկայացնենք գեղեցիկ խողովակաշարերի վերլուծություն, որպեսզի բաժանենք արձագանքները, հիմնված չկառուցված փաստաթղթերի վրա, և ուշադիր հաջորդականության կոնտեքստի-արձագանքի համապատասխանը բազմահատված զրույ', 'az': "Növbətiyyətli söhbətlər genellikle insan dialoğu məlumatının qüvvəsinə ihtiyacı vardır, özlərinə də maşın öyrənməsi metodlarını istifadə edərkən. Əgər onlar tək dönüş suala cavab verə bilərlərsə də, çoxlu dönüş üçün performansı genellikle istifadə etməz. Bu kağızda Lingke'i göstərdik, çoxlu dönüş danışmalarına görə verilən məhsullar təyin edilən suallarına cavab verə bilər. Biz müəyyən edilməmiş dökümlərə dayanan cavab verəcək və çoxlu dönüş müzakirələrinə uyğun təsirli müzakirə cavab verəcəyik.", 'bn': 'ঐতিহ্যবাহী চ্যাটবোট সাধারণত মানুষের ডায়ালগের ব্যাপক তথ্য প্রয়োজন, বিশেষ করে যখন পর্যবেক্ষণ করা মেশিন শিক্ষা পদ্ধত যদিও তারা এক প্রশ্নের উত্তরের সাথে সহজে প্রশ্নের সাথে মিলিয়ে নিতে পারে, কারণ মাল্টির প্রদর্শন সাধারণত অসাধারণত। এই কাগজটিতে আমরা লিঙ্কেকে উপস্থাপন করছি একটি তথ্য পুনরুদ্ধারের তথ্য প্রাপ্ত চ্যাটবোট, যা প্রযুক্ত প্রযুক্তি প্রযুক্তি প্রযুক্তি নির্মিত নথিপত্রের ভিত্তিতে প্রতিক্রিয়া বিচ্ছিন্ন করার জন্য আমরা একটি সুন্দর গ্রেফতার করা পাইপেলিন প্রক্রিয়ার পরিচালনা করব এবং অনেক প্রতিক্রি', 'cs': 'Tradiční chatboti obvykle potřebují množství dat lidského dialogu, zejména pokud používají metodu strojového učení s dohledem. I když se mohou snadno vypořádat s odpovědí na otázky s jedním otočením, pro více otočení je výkon obvykle neuspokojivý. V tomto článku představujeme Lingke, rozšířený chatbot s vyhledáváním informací, který je schopen odpovědět na otázky na základě daného dokumentu o úvodu produktu a řešit multi-turn konverzace. Představíme jemné zpracování potrubí pro destilaci odpovědí založených na nestrukturovaných dokumentech a pozorné sekvenční porovnávání kontextových odpovědí pro konverzace s více obraty.', 'et': "Traditsioonilised chatbotid vajavad tavaliselt massilist inimdialoogi andmeid, eriti juhendatud masinõppe meetodit kasutades. Kuigi nad suudavad hõlpsasti toime tulla ühe pöördega küsimustele vastamisega, on mitme pöördega jõudlus tavaliselt ebarahuldav. Käesolevas töös tutvustame Lingke'i, infohankimise täiendatud jutuboti, mis suudab vastada antud toote tutvustusdokumendi põhjal küsimustele ja tegeleda mitmekäiguliste vestlustega. Tutvustame peenrahalist torujuhtmete töötlemist, et destilleerida vastuseid struktureerimata dokumentide põhjal, ning tähelepanelikku järjestikust konteksti-vastuste sobitamist mitmekäiguliste vestluste jaoks.", 'bs': 'Tradicionalni chatbots obično trebaju masu podataka o ljudskom dijalogu, posebno kada koriste metodu učenja nadgledanih strojeva. Iako mogu lako riješiti odgovor na jednookrenuto pitanje, jer je više okrenuto izvedba obično nezadovoljna. U ovom papiru predstavljamo Lingke, povećan razgovor koji može odgovoriti na pitanja na temelju datog dokumenta za uvođenje proizvoda i rješavati se mnogim razgovorima. Predstavit ćemo proces finog zrnca na destilaciji odgovora na temelju nestrukturiranih dokumenta i pažnju na sekvencijski odgovor konteksta za višestruke razgovore.', 'ca': "Els chatbots tradicionals normalment necessiten una mass a de dades del diàleg humà, especialment quan utilitzen mètodes d'aprenentatge màquinari supervisades. Though they can easily deal with single-turn question answering, for multi-turn the performance is usually unsatisfactory.  En aquest article, presentem Lingke, un chatbot augmentat de recuperació d'informació que és capaç de respondre a preguntes basades en un document d'introducció del producte i tractar de converses múltiples. Introduirem un processament de tubacions fines per a distillar respostes basades en documents no estructurats, i una atenció secuencial de resposta contextual per a converses a múltiples voltants.", 'fi': 'Perinteiset chatbotit tarvitsevat yleensä paljon ihmisten dialogitietoja, erityisesti ohjattua koneoppimista käytettäessä. Vaikka he pystyvät helposti käsittelemään yhden käännöksen kysymyksiin vastaamista, monikäännöksen suorituskyky on yleensä epätyydyttävä. Tässä artikkelissa esitellään Lingke, tiedonhaun laajennettu chatbotti, joka pystyy vastaamaan kysymyksiin tietyn tuotteen esittelyasiakirjan perusteella ja käsittelemään monimutkaisia keskusteluja. Esittelemme hienorakeisen putkenkäsittelyn, joka tislaa vastauksia jäsentämättömiin asiakirjoihin perustuen, ja tarkkaavaisen peräkkäisen kontekstivasteen vastaamisen monimutkaisiin keskusteluihin.', 'sk': 'Tradicionalni chatboti običajno potrebujejo množico podatkov o človeškem dialogu, zlasti pri uporabi nadzorovane metode strojnega učenja. Čeprav se lahko enostavno ukvarjajo z odgovorom na vprašanja z enim obratom, je zmogljivost za več obratov običajno nezadovoljiva. V prispevku predstavljamo Lingke, povečan klepetalni bot za pridobivanje informacij, ki je sposoben odgovarjati na vprašanja na podlagi določenega uvodnega dokumenta izdelka in se ukvarjati s pogovori v več obratih. Uvedli bomo drobnozrnato obdelavo cevovodov, ki bo pridobila odzive na podlagi nestrukturiranih dokumentov, in pozorno zaporedno ujemanje kontekstnega odziva za več obratov pogovorov.', 'ha': "KCharselect unicode block name Kuma kõ da sun iya yi sauƙin haɗi da tambayi guda-dabam, don haka da sauri-dabam-dabam, aikin aiki na dabam-dabam, bã ya kasancẽwa. Ga wannan takardan, Munã halatar da Lingke, wata shirin motsari da aka ƙara bayani na takardar da aka nuna, wanda yana iya iya iya jibar wa maswali a kan karatun da takardar da aka nuna da kuma Muke haɗa mazaɓa masu yawa. Za fara wani shirin pipipilin da aka samu da shi ga rarraba masu karɓarsa a kan takardar takardan da ba'a tsare shi ba, kuma masu saurãre matsayin muhimman da ke daidaita wa mazaɓa masu yawa.", 'jv': 'Tradisyonal karbot adalah butuh langgar sampeyan karo data dialog uwong Nanging ketoke kok iso ngegampang gampangn karo perusahaan sing ngomong, njuk multi-tur efang dianggap kuwi mau. Nang pepulan iki, kita nambah Lingke , informasi nggawe gerapakan karo paket sing apik batar tentang kanggo cebagian sing bisa supoyo sing bisa basa karo dokumen nyeraning apa ora bisa nggawe karo multi-conversations . Awak dhéwé bakal nambah corasar sing dibenalke nggawe barang langgar sampeyan karo dokumen sing gak NGC', 'he': "צ'אטבוטים מסורתיים בדרך כלל זקוקים למסה של נתונים של דיאלוג אנושי, במיוחד כשמשתמשים בשיטת למידת מכונות מבוקרת. למרות שהם יכולים להתמודד בקלות עם עניין על שאלות מסתובבת אחת, במקרה מסתובב רבים ההופעה בדרך כלל לא מרוצה. בעיתון הזה, אנו מציגים את לינג'י, השיג מידע שטבוט מוגדל שיכול לענות על שאלות מבוססת על מסמך הכניסה של מוצר מסוים ולהתמודד עם שיחות רבות פעמים. אנחנו נציג עיבוד צינורות מעולה כדי למחוק תגובות מבוססות על מסמכים לא מבושלים, ותאמה רצפית תשומת לב קונטקסט-תגובה התאמה לשיחות רבות פנים.", 'bo': 'རྒྱུན་ལྡན་གྱི་གླེང་སྒྲོམ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱུན་ལྡན་མིན་པའི་ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆ་དགོས། ཁྱད་པར་ནུས་མཐུན་སྣུམ་ དེ་དག་ནི་ཁོང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་གཅིག་གཡུལ་གྱི་དྲི་ཚིག་ལན་གསལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་ལས་སླ་གཏོང་མི་འདུག ཤོག་བྱང་འདིའི་ནང་དུ་ང་ཚོས་གྲངས་སུ་Lingke་ལ་སྟོན་པ་ཡིན། ཆ་འཕྲིན་ཡིག་ཆའི་ནང་དུ་རྒྱ་བསྐྱེད་པའི་གླེང་མོལ་གྱི་ནང་དུ་གཏོང་ལ་མཐུན་ ང་ཚོས་བློ་གཏོང་བའི་རྩིས་འཁོར་ཞིག་ལ་སྒྲིག་མེད་པའི་ཡིག་ཆ་དང་ལྟ་བུའི་རྗེས་སུ་འབྲེལ་བ་ཞིག་སྟོན་དགོས།'}
{'en': 'Writing Mentor : Self-Regulated Writing Feedback for Struggling Writers', 'ar': 'موجه الكتابة: ملاحظات الكتابة المنظمة ذاتيًا للكتاب المتعثرين', 'es': 'Mentor de escritura: Retroalimentación autorregulada de escritura para escritores', 'pt': 'Mentor de Redação: Feedback de Escrita Autorregulado para Escritores com Dificuldades', 'fr': "Mentor en rédaction\xa0: commentaires d'écriture autorégulés pour les écrivains", 'ja': 'ライティングメンター：苦労するライターのための自主規制ライティングフィードバック', 'hi': 'लेखन संरक्षक: संघर्षरत लेखकों के लिए स्व-विनियमित लेखन प्रतिक्रिया', 'ru': 'Письменный наставник: Саморегулируемая письменная обратная связь для борющихся писателей', 'zh': '作导师:苦挣作家供自我调节作反馈', 'ga': 'Meantóir Scríbhneoireachta: Aiseolas Scríbhneoireachta Féin-Rialaithe do Scríbhneoirí atá ag streachailt', 'hu': 'Írás mentor: Önszabályozott írás visszajelzés a küzdő íróknak', 'el': 'Σύμβουλος γραφής: Αυτορυθμιζόμενη ανατροφοδότηση γραφής για τους αγωνιζόμενους συγγραφείς', 'it': 'Writing Mentor: Feedback di scrittura autoregolato per scrittori in difficoltà', 'kk': 'Жазу мәзірі: Өзінің түрлі жазу жазбалары', 'ka': 'მენტორი დაწერა: სტრუგლიური წერილებისთვის თავიდან რედაქტირებული წერილების გამოსახულება', 'lt': 'Rašymo menatorius: savireguliuojamas rašymo atsakas kovojantiems rašytojams', 'mk': 'Пишувачки ментор: Саморегулиран запишувачки одговор за борбените писатели', 'ml': 'എഴുതുന്ന മെന്റര്\u200d: സ്വയം നിയന്ത്രിക്കപ്പെട്ട എഴുതുന്നതിനുള്ള ഫീഡ്ബേക്കു് സ്ട്രാഗ്ലിങ് എഴ', 'mn': 'Мэдээж бичих: Өөрийгөө зөвхөн зөвхөн бичих мэдээллийн хариу', 'ms': 'Mentor Penulisan: Balas Penulisan Teratur Sendiri untuk Penulis Menarung', 'no': 'Skrivemenyen: Sjølvregulert skrivetilbakemelding for skrivarar', 'ro': 'Mentor de scriere: Feedback-ul autoreglementat de scriere pentru scriitori în dificultate', 'sr': 'Пишање менитора: Саморегулирана писања врата за писачи', 'mt': 'Mentur tal-kitba: Rispons tal-kitba awtoregolat għall-kittieba li qed jiġġieldu', 'pl': 'Mentor pisania: Samoregulowane pisanie opinii zwrotnej dla trudnych pisarzy', 'sv': 'Skrivmentor: Självreglerad skrivfeedback för kämpande författare', 'ta': 'எழுதும் பட்டியல்:', 'si': 'ලියුම් මෙන්ටර්: ස්වයංග්\u200dරීය ලියුම් ප්\u200dරතිචාර', 'so': 'Qorinta Mentor: Self-Regulated Writing Feedback for Struggling Writers', 'ur': 'منٹر لکھ رہا ہے: استرگلٹ لیٹر کے لئے خود رسمیل لکھنے کا فیڈبک', 'uz': '@ info: whatsthis', 'vi': 'Viết tới thư mục: ngừng viết tự quy định cho người viết', 'nl': 'Schrijfmentor: Zelfgereguleerde schrijffeedback voor worstelende schrijvers', 'bg': 'Писане Ментор: Саморегулирана обратна връзка за писатели със затруднения', 'da': 'Writing Mentor: Selvreguleret skrivefeedback til kæmpende forfattere', 'hr': 'Pisanje Mentora: Samoregularni Pisanje Vraćanje za pisace', 'de': 'Schreiben Mentor: Selbstreguliertes Schreiben Feedback für kämpfende Autoren', 'id': 'Mentor Penulisan: Balas Penulisan Terregulir Sendiri untuk Penulis Bertarung', 'ko': '창작 지도교사: 발버둥치는 작가에게 자기 조절의 창작 피드백을 제공한다.', 'fa': 'نوشتن مدیر: برگشت نوشتن خودتنظیم برای نویسندگان', 'sq': 'Mentori i shkrimit: Përkthimi i shkrimit i rregulluar vetë për shkrimtarët e luftës', 'tr': 'Menuçy ýazylýa: Çaşmak üçin özünden düzenli ýazma arkasy', 'af': 'Skryf Kieslys: Selfgereguleer Skryf Voorwerp vir Struggling Skrifters', 'am': 'Writing Mentor: Self-Regulated Writing Feedback for Struggling Writers', 'sw': 'Kipinduzi cha kuandika: Feedback kwa ajili ya waandishi wa vita', 'hy': 'Գրության մենտոր. ինքնավերահսկվող գրելու արձագանքը պայքարելու գրողների համար', 'az': 'Mentor yazılır: Öz-düzgün Yazıcılar üçün Öz-düzgün Yazılır', 'bs': 'Pisanje Mentora: Samoregularna povratka pisanja za pisace', 'bn': 'লিখছেন মেন্টর: স্বয়ংক্রিয় লেখকদের জন্য নিয়ন্ত্রণ নিয়ন্ত্রণ লিখছেন ফিডব্যাক', 'ca': "Mentor d'escriptura: Feedback d'escriptura autoregulat per escriptors lluitants", 'cs': 'Mentor psaní: Samoregulovaná zpětná vazba psaní pro bojující spisovatele', 'et': 'Kirjutamise mentor: isereguleeritud kirjutamise tagasiside probleemsetele kirjanikele', 'fi': 'Writing Mentor: Itsesäännelty kirjoittaminen Palaute vaikeuksissa oleville kirjoittajille', 'jv': 'Delimit Mentor: Self-Regulated Tulising Ketoken kanggo Ketoke Ngubah', 'he': 'זכר כתיבה: חזרה כתיבה מוסדרת עצמית עבור כותבים נלחמים', 'sk': 'Mentor pisanja: Samoregulirane povratne informacije za pisatelje v težavah', 'ha': '@ info: whatsthis', 'bo': 'འདེམས་ཐོ་འབྲི་བཞིན་པ：རང་ཉིད་ཀྱིས་སྒྲིག་འཇུག་བྱེད་པའི་རྣམ་གྲངས་ལ་མཚམས་འཇོག་སྣོད'}
{'en': 'Writing Mentor is a free Google Docs add-on designed to provide feedback to struggling writers and help them improve their writing in a self-paced and self-regulated fashion. Writing Mentor uses natural language processing (NLP) methods and resources to generate feedback in terms of features that research into post-secondary struggling writers has classified as developmental (Burstein et al., 2016b). These features span many writing sub-constructs (use of sources, claims, and evidence ; topic development ; coherence ; and knowledge of English conventions). Prelimi- nary analysis indicates that users have a largely positive impression of Writing Mentor in terms of usability and potential impact on their writing.', 'es': 'Writing Mentor es un complemento gratuito de Google Docs diseñado para proporcionar comentarios a los escritores con dificultades y ayudarlos a mejorar su escritura a su propio ritmo y autorregulado. Writing Mentor utiliza métodos y recursos de procesamiento del lenguaje natural (NLP) para generar retroalimentación en términos de características que la investigación sobre escritores con dificultades postsecundarias ha clasificado como de desarrollo (Burstein et al., 2016b). Estas características abarcan muchas subconstrucciones de escritura (uso de fuentes, afirmaciones y evidencia; desarrollo de temas; coherencia y conocimiento de las convenciones de inglés). El análisis preliminar indica que los usuarios tienen una impresión muy positiva de Writing Mentor en términos de usabilidad y potencial impacto en su escritura.', 'ar': 'الكتابة مينتور هي إضافة مجانية لمستندات Google مصممة لتقديم ملاحظات للكتاب المتعثرين ومساعدتهم على تحسين كتاباتهم بطريقة ذاتية التنظيم. يستخدم برنامج Writing Mentor أساليب وموارد معالجة اللغة الطبيعية (NLP) لتوليد التغذية الراجعة من حيث الميزات التي صنفتها الأبحاث في الكتاب المكافحين في مرحلة ما بعد الثانوية على أنها تنموية (Burstein et al.، 2016b). تمتد هذه الميزات إلى العديد من التراكيب الفرعية للكتابة (استخدام المصادر والادعاءات والأدلة ؛ تطوير الموضوع ؛ التماسك ؛ ومعرفة اصطلاحات اللغة الإنجليزية). يشير التحليل الأولي إلى أن لدى المستخدمين انطباع إيجابي إلى حد كبير عن برنامج الكتابة مينتور من حيث سهولة الاستخدام والتأثير المحتمل على كتاباتهم.', 'fr': "Writing Mentor est un module complémentaire gratuit de Google Docs conçu pour fournir des commentaires aux écrivains en difficulté et les aider à améliorer leur écriture de manière autonome et autorégulée. Writing Mentor utilise des méthodes et des ressources de traitement du langage naturel (PNL) pour générer une rétroaction en termes de caractéristiques que la recherche sur les écrivains en difficulté de niveau postsecondaire a classées comme développementales (Burstein et al., 2016b). Ces fonctionnalités couvrent de nombreuses sous-constructions d'écriture (utilisation de sources, de revendications et de preuves\xa0; développement de sujets\xa0; cohérence\xa0; et connaissance des conventions anglaises). L'analyse préliminaire indique que les utilisateurs ont une impression largement positive de Writing Mentor en termes de convivialité et d'impact potentiel sur leur écriture.", 'pt': 'O Writing Mentor é um complemento gratuito do Google Docs projetado para fornecer feedback a escritores com dificuldades e ajudá-los a melhorar sua escrita de maneira auto-regulada e com ritmo próprio. O Writing Mentor usa métodos e recursos de processamento de linguagem natural (PNL) para gerar feedback em termos de recursos que a pesquisa em escritores com dificuldades pós-secundárias classificou como de desenvolvimento (Burstein et al., 2016b). Esses recursos abrangem muitos subconstrutos de escrita (uso de fontes, alegações e evidências; desenvolvimento de tópicos; coerência; e conhecimento das convenções inglesas). A análise preliminar indica que os usuários têm uma impressão amplamente positiva do Writing Mentor em termos de usabilidade e impacto potencial em sua escrita.', 'ja': 'Writing MentorはGoogleドキュメントの無料アドオンです。苦労しているライターにフィードバックを提供し、自己ペースで自己調整された方法でライティングを向上させることを目的としています。ライティングメンターは、自然言語処理（ NLP ）の方法とリソースを使用して、発達障害を抱えている中等教育後のライターの研究が発達障害として分類されている特徴の観点からフィードバックを生成します（ Burstein et al., 2016 b ）。これらの特徴は、多くの執筆下位構造（ソース、クレーム、エビデンスの使用、トピック開発、一貫性、および英語の慣習の知識）にまたがっている。プレリミナリー分析は、ユーザビリティとライティングへの潜在的な影響の観点から、ユーザーがライティングメンターにほぼ肯定的な印象を持っていることを示している。', 'zh': 'Writing Mentor者,免费之Google Docs插件,供反馈于苦挣之家,助以定进度自我调节之作。 作师用自然语言(NLP)术资生反馈,反馈出于高等教育,归类为发展性(Burstein等,2016b)。 其特征越群写作子结构(源,声明证据;主题一致性,及英语例)。 初分析表明,用户于可用性、潜于导师。', 'hi': 'लेखन संरक्षक एक मुफ्त Google डॉक्स ऐड-ऑन है जिसे संघर्षरत लेखकों को प्रतिक्रिया प्रदान करने और उन्हें आत्म-पुस्तक और आत्म-विनियमित फैशन में अपने लेखन को बेहतर बनाने में मदद करने के लिए डिज़ाइन किया गया है। लेखन संरक्षक प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण (एनएलपी) विधियों और संसाधनों का उपयोग करता है ताकि उन विशेषताओं के संदर्भ में प्रतिक्रिया उत्पन्न की जा सके जो पोस्ट-माध्यमिक संघर्षशील लेखकों में अनुसंधान ने विकासात्मक (बर्स्टीन एट अल। ये विशेषताएं कई लेखन उप-निर्माणों (स्रोतों, दावों और सबूतों का उपयोग; विषय विकास; सुसंगतता; और अंग्रेजी सम्मेलनों का ज्ञान) तक फैली हुई हैं। प्रारंभिक विश्लेषण इंगित करता है कि उपयोगकर्ताओं के पास उनके लेखन पर प्रयोज्य और संभावित प्रभाव के संदर्भ में लेखन संरक्षक की काफी हद तक सकारात्मक धारणा है।', 'ru': 'Writing Mentor - это бесплатное дополнение к Документам Google, предназначенное для обратной связи с писателями, которые борются за успех, и помогающее им улучшать свои навыки письма в саморегулируемой и саморегулируемой манере. Writing Mentor использует методы и ресурсы обработки естественного языка (NLP), чтобы генерировать обратную связь с точки зрения особенностей, которые исследования писателей, борющихся за пост-среднюю школу, классифицировали как развитие (Burstein et al., 2016b). Эти особенности охватывают многие письменные субконструкции (использование источников, утверждений и доказательств; разработка тем; согласованность; и знание английских конвенций). Предварительный анализ показывает, что пользователи имеют в основном положительное впечатление от Writing Mentor с точки зрения удобства использования и потенциального влияния на их письмо.', 'ga': 'Is breiseán Google Docs saor in aisce é Writing Mentor atá deartha chun aiseolas a sholáthar do scríbhneoirí atá ag streachailt agus chun cabhrú leo a gcuid scríbhneoireachta a fheabhsú ar bhealach féin-luas agus féinrialaithe. Úsáideann Meantóir na Scríbhneoireachta modhanna agus acmhainní próiseála teanga nádúrtha (NLP) chun aiseolas a ghiniúint i dtéarmaí gnéithe atá rangaithe mar thaighde forbraíochta ar scríbhneoirí iar-mheánscoile atá ag streachailt (Burstein et al., 2016b). Cuimsíonn na gnéithe seo go leor fothógálacha scríbhneoireachta (úsáid foinsí, éilimh agus fianaise; forbairt topaicí; comhleanúnachas; agus eolas ar choinbhinsiúin an Bhéarla). Léiríonn réamhanailís go bhfuil tuiscint dhearfach den chuid is mó ag úsáideoirí ar an Meantóireachta Scríbhneoireachta i dtéarmaí inúsáidteachta agus tionchar féideartha ar a gcuid scríbhneoireachta.', 'ka': 'მენტორის წერილება არის თავისუფალი Google Docs დამატება, რომელიც განაზღვრებულია წერილებისთვის თავისუფალი და თავისუფალი რედაქტირებულია. მენტორის დაწერის გამოყენება ნატარული ენის პროცესი (NLP) მეტოვები და რესურსები, რომლებიც გამოყენება ფუნქციების შესახებ, რომლებიც პოსკენდერიური ბრუნდური ოთატორებში კლასიფიკაცია განვითარება ეს მნიშვნელობები უფრო მეტი წერილის საკუთარი კონფიგურაციების გამოყენება (გამოყენება, წარმოდგენების და წარმოდგენების გამოყენება; თემების განვითარება; თა ოპველთმთ- ნაპთ ანალთჱთწ ოჲკაჱგა, ფვ', 'el': 'Ο μέντορας γραφής είναι ένα δωρεάν πρόσθετο που έχει σχεδιαστεί για να παρέχει ανατροφοδότηση σε αγωνιζόμενους συγγραφείς και να τους βοηθήσει να βελτιώσουν τη συγγραφή τους με αυτορυθμικό και αυτορυθμιζόμενο τρόπο. Ο μέντορας γραφής χρησιμοποιεί μεθόδους και πόρους επεξεργασίας φυσικής γλώσσας για να δημιουργήσει ανατροφοδότηση από την άποψη των χαρακτηριστικών που η έρευνα σε μεταγενέστερους αγωνιζόμενους συγγραφείς έχει ταξινομήσει ως αναπτυξιακά (κ.α., 2016β). Αυτά τα χαρακτηριστικά καλύπτουν πολλές υποκατασκευές γραφής (χρήση πηγών, ισχυρισμών και αποδεικτικών στοιχείων, ανάπτυξη θεμάτων, συνοχή και γνώση των Αγγλικών συμβάσεων). Προκαταρκτική ανάλυση δείχνει ότι οι χρήστες έχουν μια σε μεγάλο βαθμό θετική εντύπωση για το Writing Mentor από την άποψη της χρηστικότητας και του δυνητικού αντίκτυπου στη συγγραφή τους.', 'it': "Writing Mentor è un add-on gratuito di Google Docs progettato per fornire feedback agli scrittori in difficoltà e aiutarli a migliorare la loro scrittura in modo autonomo e autoregolamentato. Writing Mentor utilizza metodi e risorse di elaborazione del linguaggio naturale (NLP) per generare feedback in termini di caratteristiche che la ricerca sugli scrittori postsecondari in difficoltà ha classificato come evolutive (Burstein et al., 2016b). Queste caratteristiche coprono molti sub-costrutti di scrittura (uso di fonti, affermazioni e prove; sviluppo di argomenti; coerenza; e conoscenza delle convenzioni inglesi). L'analisi preliminare indica che gli utenti hanno un'impressione ampiamente positiva di Writing Mentor in termini di usabilità e potenziale impatto sulla loro scrittura.", 'hu': 'A Writing Mentor egy ingyenes Google Dokumentumok kiegészítő, amelyet arra terveztek, hogy visszajelzést adjon a küzdő íróknak, és segítsen nekik fejleszteni írásukat öntempójú és önszabályozott módon. Az Írás Mentor természetes nyelvfeldolgozási (NLP) módszereket és erőforrásokat használ arra, hogy visszajelzést generáljon a poszt-másodlagos küzdelemmel küzdő írók kutatása fejlesztési szempontból (Burstein et al., 2016b). Ezek a tulajdonságok számos írási alkonstrukcióra kiterjednek (források, állítások és bizonyítékok használata; témafejlesztés; koherencia; és az angol konvenciók ismerete). Az előzetes elemzés azt mutatja, hogy a felhasználóknak nagyrészt pozitív benyomása van a Writing Mentorral a használhatóság és az írásukra gyakorolt potenciális hatás tekintetében.', 'lt': 'Rašymo Mentorius yra nemokamas Google Docs papildymas, skirtas atsiliepimui sunkių rašytojų atžvilgiu ir padėti jiems patobulinti jų rašymą savarankiškai ir savireguliuojama forma. Rašymo vadovas naudoja natūralius kalbų apdorojimo metodus ir išteklius, kad gautų grįžtamąją informaciją apie ypatumus, kuriuos moksliniai tyrimai, susiję su po vidurinės mokyklos sunkumus patiriančiais rašytojais, klasifikuoja kaip vystymąsi (Burstein et al., 2016b). Šios charakteristikos apima daugelį rašymo sudedamųjų dalių (šaltinių, teiginių ir įrodymų naudojimas, temų kūrimas, nuoseklumas ir anglų konvencijų žinios). Išankstinė analizė rodo, kad naudotojai iš esmės teigiamai įspūdžia rašomojo rašytojo naudojimą ir galimą poveikį jų rašymui.', 'ms': 'Mentor Penulisan adalah tambahan Google Docs percuma yang direka untuk memberikan balas balik kepada penulis yang sedang berjuang dan membantu mereka memperbaiki penulisan mereka dengan cara yang berjalan sendiri dan mengatur diri sendiri. Mentor menulis menggunakan kaedah dan sumber pemprosesan bahasa semulajadi (NLP) untuk menghasilkan balas balik dalam terma ciri-ciri yang penyelidikan penulis yang berjuang setelah sekunder telah diklasifikasikan sebagai pembangunan (Burstein et al., 2016b). Ciri-ciri ini meliputi banyak subkonstruksi penulisan (penggunaan sumber, tuntutan, dan bukti; pembangunan topik; kesesuaian; dan pengetahuan konvensi Inggeris). Prelimi- nary analysis indicates that users have a largely positive impression of Writing Mentor in terms of usability and potential impact on their writing.', 'kk': 'Мәзірлерді жазу - жазушыларға қайта жауап беру үшін Google Docs қосымшасын қосу және өзіңіздің жазуын өзіңізге және өзіңіздің баптауларына көмектесу үшін құрылған. Жазу Менюторы табиғлық тілдерді өңдеу (NLP) әдістерін және ресурстарды біріктіру үшін біріктіру үшін біріктіру әдістерін біріктіру үшін біріктіріп, біріктірілген жазушыларды (Бурштейн et al., 2016b). Бұл мүмкіндіктер көптеген жазу субконструкциялары (көзі, жазулар, мәліметтер, нақыштарды жасау, соғыстылық, ағылшын конвенциясының білімі). Prelimi- nary анализ пайдаланушылардың жазуға және жазуға мүмкіндік нәрселері бар дегенді көрсетеді.', 'mt': 'Il-Mentur tal-kitba huwa Google Docs addizzjonali mingħajr ħlas iddisinjat biex jipprovdi feedback lill-kittieba li qed ifittxu diffikultajiet u jgħinhom itejbu l-kitba tagħhom b’mod awto-regolat u b’pass mgħa ġġel. Writing Mentor uses natural language processing (NLP) methods and resources to generate feedback in terms of features that research into post-secondary struggling writers has classified as developmental (Burstein et al., 2016b).  These features span many writing sub-constructs (use of sources, claims, and evidence; topic development; coherence; and knowledge of English conventions).  Analiżi preliminari tindika li l-utenti għandhom impressjoni fil-biċċa l-kbira pożittiva tal-Mentur tal-kitba f’termini ta’ użu u impatt potenzjali fuq il-kitba tagħhom.', 'mk': 'Writing Mentor is a free Google Docs add-on designed to provide feedback to struggling writers and help them improve their writing in a self-paced and self-regulated fashion.  Пишувачкиот ментор користи природни методи и ресурси за процес на јазик (НЛП) за да генерира реакција во однос на карактеристиките кои истражувањето на пост-секундарните писатели во борба се класификува како развојни (Бурстејн и г.н., 2016б). Овие карактеристики опфаќаат многу потконструкции за пишување (употреба на извори, тврдења и докази, развој на темата, кохеренција и знаење на англиските конвенции). Прелиминарната анализа покажува дека корисниците имаат поголем позитивен впечаток на Пишувачкиот ментор во поглед на употребливоста и потенцијалното влијание на нивното пишување.', 'ml': 'എഴുതുന്നത് മെന്റോര്\u200d ഒരു സ്വതന്ത്രമായ ഗൂഗിള്\u200d ഡോക്സുകള്\u200d ചേര്\u200dക്കുന്നതാണ്. എഴുത്തുകാരുടെ പൊരുത്തുന്നതിന് പകര്\u200dത്തുന്നതിന് പകര്\u200dപ എഴുതുന്നത് മെന്റോര്\u200d സ്വാഭാവിക ഭാഷ പ്രക്രിയശ്ചിത്വവും വിഭവങ്ങളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു. പിന്നീട് സെക്കന്റര്\u200d പോരാടുന്ന എഴുതുന്നവര്\u200dക്ക് പഠിക്കാന ഈ വിഭാഗങ്ങള്\u200d പലര്\u200dക്കും സബ് കെട്ടിടം എഴുതുന്നുണ്ടാക്കുന്നു (സോര്\u200dസുകള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, വിവരങ്ങള്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്നു, പ്രധാ പ്രാമ്പത്തിയിലെ അന്വേഷണം വ്യക്തമാക്കുന്നു ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് എഴുതുന്നതിന്\u200dറെ മെന്ററിന്\u200dറെ പ്രാധാന്യം പ്രാപ്തികമാ', 'mn': 'Ментор бичих нь үнэгүй Google Docs нэмэгдүүлэгч, зохиолчдын тухай хариу хандуулахын тулд зохион байгуулагч, өөртөө зохион байгуулагч, өөртөө зохион байгуулахын тулд зохион байгуулагч юм. Ментор бичих нь байгалийн хэл процесс (NLP) арга болон нөөцийг ашигладаг. Хоёрдугаар дайрах зохиолчдын судалгаа нь хөгжлийн хувьсалыг (Бурштейн et al., 2016b). Эдгээр нь олон бичиж буй суб-бүтээлүүд (эх үүсвэр, утга, баталгаа, сэдвийн хөгжлийн хэрэглээ, сэдвийн хөгжлийн тухай, нийгэмдэл, Англи хэлний шинжлэх ухааны тухай). Prelimi-nary analysis indicates that users have a huge positive impression of Writing Mentor in terms of use and potential impact on their writing.', 'sr': 'Pisanje Mentor a je slobodan dodatak Google Docs dizajniran da pruži reakciju piscima koji se bore i pomognu im da poboljšaju svoj pisanje na samoopakovanom i samooreguliranom načinu. Pisanje Mentora koristi prirodne metode obrade jezika (NLP) i resurse za stvaranje reakcije u smislu karakteristika koje su istraživanje u piscima za postsekundarnu borbu klasifikovano kao razvoj (Burstein et al., 2016b). Ove karakteristike šire mnoge podkonstrukcije pisanja (korištenje izvora, tvrdnji i dokaza, razvoj teme, saskašnost i znanje engleskih konvencija). Preliminarna analiza ukazuje na to da korisnici imaju veoma pozitivan utisak na pisanje Mentor a u smislu korisnosti i potencijalnog utjecaja na njihovo pisanje.', 'no': 'Skriving av Mentor er ein fri Google Docs-tillegg designert for å tilbya tilbakemelding til skrivarar og hjelpa dem å forbedra skrivinga sine i ein sjølvpakke og selvregulert måte. Skrivemenøren brukar naturlege språkprosesseringsmetoder og ressursar for å laga tilbakemeldingar ved hjelp av funksjonar som forskning til postsekundære strålbrukarar har klassifisert som utviklingar (Burstein et al., 2016b). Desse funksjonane utvidar mange underkonstruksjonar for skriving (bruk av kjelde, etterspørseler og beviser, utvikling av emne, koherens og kunnskap av engelske konvensjonar). Preliminar analyse tyder på at brukarar har eit stort positivt uttrykk på skrivementoren i uttrykk av brukbarhet og potensielt påvirkning på skriveprogrammet.', 'pl': 'Writing Mentor to bezpłatny dodatek Dokumenty Google zaprojektowany, aby dostarczyć opinię zwrotną dla zmagających się pisarzy i pomóc im poprawić ich pisanie w sposób samoregulowany i samoregulowany. Writing Mentor wykorzystuje metody i zasoby przetwarzania języka naturalnego (NLP), aby generować informacje zwrotne w zakresie funkcji, które badania nad pisarzami zmagającymi się z pośrednim stopniem klasyfikowały jako rozwojowe (Burstein et al., 2016b). Funkcje te obejmują wiele podkonstruktów pisania (wykorzystanie źródeł, twierdzeń i dowodów; rozwój tematu; spójność; znajomość konwencji angielskich). Analiza wstępna wskazuje, że użytkownicy mają w dużej mierze pozytywne wrażenie Writing Mentor pod względem użyteczności i potencjalnego wpływu na ich pisanie.', 'ro': 'Writing Mentor este un add-on gratuit Google Docs conceput pentru a oferi feedback scriitorilor care se luptă și pentru a-i ajuta să-și îmbunătățească scrierea într-un mod auto-ritmat și auto-reglementat. Writing Mentor folosește metode și resurse de procesare a limbajului natural (PNL) pentru a genera feedback în ceea ce privește caracteristicile pe care cercetarea scriitorilor postsecundari în dificultate le-a clasificat ca fiind dezvoltatoare (Burstein et al., 2016b). Aceste caracteristici cuprind multe subconstructe scrise (utilizarea surselor, afirmațiilor și dovezilor; dezvoltarea subiectelor; coerență; și cunoașterea convențiilor engleze). Analiza preliminară indică faptul că utilizatorii au o impresie pozitivă despre Writing Mentor în ceea ce privește utilizarea și impactul potențial asupra scrierii lor.', 'si': 'මෙන්ටර් ලියනය තමයි නිදහස් ගූගුල් ඩොක්ස් එක්කන් සැකසුම් කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙන්න සැකසුම් කරලා ලේඛකයන්ට ප්\u200dරතිචාර දෙන්න හැක ලියුම් මෙන්ටර් භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය (NLP) විධානය සහ ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය සඳහා ප්\u200dරවෘතිකරණය සඳහ මේ විශේෂතාවන් ගොඩක් ලියුම් සුබ-නිර්මාණය (මුළුවන්, ප්\u200dරශ්න, සහ සාක්ෂික ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්, විශේෂ විකාශ ප්\u200dරීලිමි- නාරි විශ්ලේෂණය පෙන්වන්නයි ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ට ඔවුන්ගේ ලියනයේ ලියනය සහ ප්\u200dරයෝජනයක් තියෙනවා කියලා.', 'ur': 'منٹر لکھنے کا ایک منفی گوگل ڈاکس اضافہ ہے جو لکھنے والوں کے لئے فیڈ پک پہنچانے کے لئے طراحی کیا گیا ہے اور ان کی لکھنے کی مدد کرتا ہے کہ ان کے لکھنے کو اضافہ کریں منٹر لکھنے کے لئے طبیعی زبان پرسس (NLP) طریقے اور منابع کا استعمال کرتا ہے کہ فیڈ پک ایجاد کریں جس طریقے کے مطابق دوسری جہاد کرنے والے لکھنے والوں کی تحقیق پوسٹ-دوسری جہاد کے لکھنے والے لکھنے والوں کو اگلوشنی کے طور پر (برشتین et یہ بہت سی لکھنے والی مثالیں ہیں۔ پرلیمین- ناری تحلیل نشان دیتا ہے کہ کارساز ان کے لکھنے پر استعمال کرنا اور امکانات اثر کے مطابق استعمال کرنے کے لئے بہت بڑی مثبت اثر رکھتے ہیں.', 'ta': 'எழுதும் மென்டர் என்பது ஒரு இலவச கூகுல் ஆவணங்கள் சேர்க்கப்பட்டது, எழுதுபவர்களுக்கு போராடுவதற்கு பதில் அளிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது மற்றும் அவர்கள் எழுதுவத எழுதும் மென்டார் இயற்கையான மொழி செயல்படுத்தல் (NLP) முறைமைகளையும் முறைமை இந்த குணங்கள் பல துணை கட்டுப்பாடுகளை உருவாக்குகின்றன (மூலங்கள், கூறுதல், மற்றும் தெளிவாக்கங்கள் பயன்படுத்தி, தலைப்புகள் உருவாக்கம்;  முன்னோட்டு ஆராய்ச்சி குறிப்பிடுகிறது பயனர்கள் எழுதும் மென்டரின் எழுதும் பயன்பாடு மற்றும் எழுதும் சாத்தியமான விளைவுகளை க', 'so': 'Qoraalka macluumaadka qorista waa qof xor ah oo ku dari kara qoraalka Googleyda, kaas oo loo qoray in loo siiyo feedbacyo si ay u dagaallanto qoraalka qoraalka iyo si ay u hagaajiyaan qorniinkooda qaab u eg iyo si aan u qasabo. Qoraalka Mentor wuxuu isticmaalaa qaabab ka baaraandegista afka dabiiciga ah (NLP) iyo hantida si loo sameeyo feedback, sida loo qoro qoraalka dagaalalka ka dambeeya ee qoraalka la dagaallanta (Burstein et al., 2016b). Waxyaabahaas waxaa ku qoran qoraalo hoos-dhismo badan (isticmaalka sourcees, claims, iyo caddeynta; horumarinta; wadajirka; aqoonta shirkadaha Ingiriiska). Baaritaanka hore waxaa loola jeedaa in isticmaalayaasha ay leeyihiin fikr aad u wanaagsan oo ku saabsan isticmaalka iyo saameyn ku saabsan qoritaanka.', 'sv': 'Writing Mentor är ett gratis Google Dokument tillägg som utformats för att ge feedback till kämpande författare och hjälpa dem att förbättra sitt skrivande i ett självtempo och självreglerat sätt. Writing Mentor använder metoder och resurser för att generera feedback i termer av funktioner som forskning om postsekundära kämpande författare har klassificerat som utvecklingsmässiga (Burstein et al., 2016b). Dessa funktioner spänner över många skrivunderkonstruktioner (användning av källor, påståenden och bevis, ämnesutveckling, samstämmighet och kunskap om engelska konventioner). Preliminära analys indikerar att användare har ett i stort sett positivt intryck av Writing Mentor vad gäller användbarhet och potentiell påverkan på sitt skrivande.', 'uz': "Name Name Bu xususiyatlar ko'pchilik tub tuzuvlar (manbanlar, davom etish, va hodisalar foydalanishi; mavzu taʼminlovchisi; birlashtirish; ingliz koniyatlarini taʼrif qilish). Birinchi taʼminlovchi foydalanuvchilar yozish menyusi bilan yozish qobiliyati va yozish natijasi haqida juda yaxshi fikrlari bor.", 'vi': 'Viết Mentor là một tài liệu Google thêm tự do được thiết kế để cung cấp phản hồi cho các nhà văn đang vật lộn và giúp họ cải thiện chữ viết theo một cách tự do và tự điều chỉnh. Viết Mentor sử dụng phương pháp xử lý ngôn ngữ tự nhiên (NLP) và nguồn lực để cung cấp phản hồi về các yếu tố mà nghiên cứu về các nhà văn chống chọi hậu cấp đã được phân loại là bộ phận phát triển (Burstein et al., 2006b). Những tính năng này bao gồm nhiều cấu trúc chữ viết (sử dụng các nguồn tin, yêu cầu, và bằng chứng; phát triển chủ đề, sự đồng bộ, và kiến thức về các tục lệ Anh). Bản phân tích sơ bộ cho thấy người dùng có ấn tượng tốt về việc viết thư, về khả năng sử dụng và tác động tiềm năng trong việc viết.', 'bg': 'Писане Ментор е безплатна добавка за Документи, предназначена да предоставя обратна връзка на борещите се писатели и да им помогне да подобрят писането си по самостоятелен и саморегулиран начин. Писане Ментор използва методи и ресурси за обработка на естествения език (НЛП), за да генерира обратна връзка по отношение на характеристиките, които изследванията на писателите, борещи се след средното образование, са класифицирали като развиващи се (Бърстийн и др., 2016б). Тези функции обхващат много подконструкти за писане (използване на източници, твърдения и доказателства; разработване на темата; съгласуваност; и познания за английските конвенции). Предварителният анализ показва, че потребителите имат до голяма степен положително впечатление за Писане Ментор по отношение на използваемостта и потенциалното въздействие върху писането им.', 'da': 'Writing Mentor er en gratis Google Docs add-on designet til at give feedback til kæmpende forfattere og hjælpe dem med at forbedre deres skrivning i en selvstændig og selvreguleret måde. Writing Mentor bruger metoder og ressourcer til at generere feedback i form af funktioner, som forskning i postsekundære kæmpende forfattere har klassificeret som udviklingsmæssige (Burstein et al., 2016b). Disse funktioner spænder over mange skriveunderkonstruktioner (brug af kilder, påstande og beviser, emneudvikling, sammenhæng og viden om engelske konventioner). Indledende analyse indikerer, at brugerne har et stort positivt indtryk af Writing Mentor med hensyn til brugervenlighed og potentiel indflydelse på deres skrivning.', 'nl': 'Writing Mentor is een gratis Google Docs add-on ontworpen om feedback te geven aan worstelende schrijvers en hen te helpen hun schrijven te verbeteren op een zelfgestuurde en zelfgereguleerde manier. Writing Mentor maakt gebruik van Natural Language Processing (NLP) methoden en bronnen om feedback te genereren in termen van functies die onderzoek naar postsecundaire worstelende schrijvers heeft geclassificeerd als ontwikkelend (Burstein et al., 2016b). Deze kenmerken omvatten vele schrijfsubconstructen (gebruik van bronnen, beweringen en bewijsmateriaal; topic ontwikkeling; coherentie; en kennis van Engelse conventies). Uit voorafgaande analyse blijkt dat gebruikers een grotendeels positieve indruk hebben van Writing Mentor op het gebied van bruikbaarheid en mogelijke impact op hun schrijven.', 'de': 'Writing Mentor ist ein kostenloses Google Docs Add-on, das entwickelt wurde, um Autoren mit Schwierigkeiten Feedback zu geben und ihnen zu helfen, ihr Schreiben in einer selbstregulierten und selbstregulierten Weise zu verbessern. Writing Mentor verwendet Natural Language Processing (NLP)-Methoden und Ressourcen, um Feedback in Bezug auf Merkmale zu generieren, die die Forschung an postsekundären kämpfenden Autoren als entwicklungsfähig eingestuft hat (Burstein et al., 2016b). Diese Merkmale umfassen viele Schreib-Unterkonstruktionen (Verwendung von Quellen, Behauptungen und Beweisen, Themenentwicklung, Kohärenz und Kenntnisse englischer Konventionen). Die vorläufige Analyse zeigt, dass Nutzer einen weitgehend positiven Eindruck von Writing Mentor hinsichtlich Usability und potenzieller Auswirkung auf ihr Schreiben haben.', 'id': 'Menulis Mentor adalah Google Docs add-on gratis yang direncanakan untuk memberikan feedback kepada penulis yang sedang berjuang dan membantu mereka memperbaiki menulis mereka dengan cara yang sesuai dengan diri sendiri dan mengatur diri sendiri. Mentor menulis menggunakan metode dan sumber daya pemprosesan bahasa alam (NLP) untuk menghasilkan feedback dalam terma ciri-ciri yang penelitian pada penulis-penulis post-sekunder berjuang telah diklasifikasi sebagai pengembangan (Burstein et al., 2016b). Karakteristik ini meliputi banyak sub-konstruksi menulis (penggunaan sumber, klaim, dan bukti; pembangunan topik; koherensi; dan pengetahuan konvensi Inggris). Analisis awal-nary menunjukkan bahwa pengguna memiliki kesan yang paling positif dari Mentor menulis dalam terma penggunaan dan dampak potensial pada menulis mereka.', 'ko': 'Writing Mentor는 고군분투하는 작가에게 피드백을 제공하고, 글쓰기 수준을 스스로 조절할 수 있도록 돕는 무료 Google Docs 추가 구성 요소입니다.Writing Mentor는 자연언어처리(NLP) 방법과 자원을 사용해 중학교 이후 어려운 작가에 대한 연구를 발전적인 특징으로 분류해 피드백(Burstein 등, 2016b)을 생성한다.이러한 특징은 많은 글쓰기 서브구조(출처, 주장과 증거의 사용, 주제 발전, 일관성, 그리고 영어 습관 지식)를 뛰어넘었다.초보적인 분석에 의하면 가용성과 창작에 미치는 잠재적인 영향에 대해 사용자가 창작 지도교사에 대한 인상은 대체적으로 적극적이다.', 'hr': 'Pisanje Mentor a je slobodan dodatak Google Docs dizajniran kako bi omogućilo reakciju piscima koji se bore i pomoglo im poboljšati pismo na samoporučenom i samoporučenom načinu. Pisanje Mentora koristi metode i resurse prirodnog obradivanja jezika (NLP) kako bi se stvorilo povratak u smislu karakteristika koje su istraživanje u piscima za postsekundarnu borbu klasifikirano kao razvoj (Burstein et al., 2016b). Te karakteristike šire mnoge podkonstrukcije pisanja (korištenje izvora, zahtjeva i dokaza, razvoj teme, saskaņonost i znanje engleskih konvencija). Preliminarna analiza ukazuje na to da korisnici imaju veliki pozitivan utisak pisanja Mentor a u smislu korisnosti i potencijalnog utjecaja na njihovo pisanje.', 'sw': 'Akiandika Mentor ni doktari huru za Google zinazoongeza lengo la kutoa maoni kwa ajili ya kuwapigania vita waandishi na kuwasaidia kuboresha uandishi wao kwa namna ya kujitajiri na yenyewe kudhibitiwa. Akiandika Mentor hutumia mbinu na rasilimali za upasuaji wa lugha asilia (NLP) ili kutengeneza maoni kwa vipengele ambavyo utafiti wa waandishi wa mgogoro wa sekondari umekuwa ukiendelea (Burstein et al, 2016 b). Tamko hizi zinajumuisha majengo mengi ya kuandika subira (matumizi ya vyanzo, madai na ushahidi; maendeleo ya mada; ushirikiano; na maarifa ya makubaliano ya Kiingereza). Uchambuzi wa awali unaonyesha kuwa watumiaji wana mtazamo chanya wa kuandika Mentor kwa sababu ya matumizi na uwezekano wa athari za kuandika.', 'af': "Skryf Mentor is 'n vry Google Docs byvoeg-op ontwerp om terugmelding te verskaf na struikende skrifters en hulp hulle hul skrif te verbeter in 'n selfpak en self-regulateer modus. Skryf Mentor gebruik natuurlike taal-prosessering metodes en hulpbronne om terugmelding te genereer in terms van funksies wat ondersoek binne post-sekondeerde struikende skrywers as ontwikkeling geklassifiseer het (Burstein et al., 2016b). Hierdie funksies spandeer baie skryfbare subkonstruksies (gebruik van bronne, aandrukkings en getuienis; onderwerp ontwikkeling; koherens en kennis van Engelske konvensies). Prelimi- nary analisie wys dat gebruikers 'n groot positiewe indrukking van Skryf Mentor in terms of gebruikbaarheid en potentiele invloek op hulle skryf het.", 'fa': 'نوشتن Mentor یک دوکتر آزاد گوگل است که طراحی شده است تا به نویسندگان مبارزه کند و به آنها کمک کند که نوشتن خود را در یک طریقه خود و خود کنترل کند. نوشتن منتور از روش\u200cهای پردازش زبان طبیعی و منابع برای تولید پشتیبانی به عنوان ویژگی\u200cهایی که تحقیقات به نویسندگان بعد از دومین مبارزه به عنوان توسعه (Burstein et al., 2016b) classified as development (NLP) استفاده می\u200cکند. این ویژه\u200cها بسیاری از زیر ساختمان\u200cهای نوشته (استفاده از منابع، ادعا و شواهد، توسعه موضوع، هماهنگی و دانش کنفرانس\u200cهای انگلیسی) را گسترش می\u200cدهند. تحلیل پیشینی- نارنی نشان می دهد که کاربران اثر بسیار مثبتی از نوشتن منتور در مورد استفاده و تاثیر پتانسیل بر نوشتن آنها دارند.', 'tr': 'Mentöre ýazmak özgür Google Docs-lary ýazçylaryna jogap berebilmek üçin düzenlenen bir Google Docs eklenýändir we olara öz-özüne özüni belleýän we özüni belleýän şeklinde ýazmaklaryny geliştirmek üçin kömek edip biler. Mentöre ýazmak tebigy dil işlemegi (NLP) yöntemleri we çeşmelerini bejermek üçin tekrar etmek üçin ikinji gezek mücadele eden ýazşylara araştyrmalary gelişmegi (Burstein et al., 2016b). Bu köp ýazma altyndaky düzümleri (çeşmeler, iddialar we kanunlar ulanmaklary, meňzeş gelişmeler; ýerleşmelik we Iňlisçe düzümlerniň bilimi) ýagdaýlaýar. Prelimi ýet-narkotik analýusiýasynda ullançylaryň ýazma çykyşyna we olaryň ýazma täsirinde örän uly möhüm tejribesi bardygyny görkezýär.', 'sq': "Mentori i shkrimit është një shtesë e lirë Google Docs të dizajnuar për t'u dhënë feedback shkrimtarëve të vështirë dhe t'i ndihmojë ata të përmirësojnë shkrimin e tyre në një mënyrë të vetërregulluar dhe të vetërregulluar. Mentori i shkrimit përdor metodat dhe burimet e procesimit natyror të gjuhës (NLP) për të gjeneruar feedback në lidhje me funksionet që kërkimi në shkrimtarët pas-sekondarë që luftojnë ka klasifikuar si zhvillues (Burstein et al., 2016b). Këto karakteristika përfshijnë shumë nënkonstrukta shkrimi (përdorimin e burimeve, pretendimeve dhe provave; zhvillimin e temës; koherencën dhe njohurinë e konventave angleze). Analiza paraprake tregon se përdoruesit kanë një përshtypje kryesisht pozitive të Mentorit të Shkrimit lidhur me përdorueshmërinë dhe ndikimin potencial në shkrimin e tyre.", 'az': 'Mentor yazmaq müharibəsində yazıcılara geri cavab vermək üçün özgür Google Docs ekləməsidir və öz-özünə müəyyən edilmiş modunda yazmaqlarını düzəltmələrinə kömək edir. Mentor yazılması təbiətli dil işləməsi (NLP) metodlarını və resurslarını, ikinci müharibədən sonra müharibə yazıcıların araştırması təhsil edilməsi üçün istifadə edir (Burstein et al., 2016b). Bu xüsusiyyətlər çoxlu yazıb-inşallarını genişləyir (kaynaqlar, iddialar, dəlillər, məsələlər təşkil etmək, təşkil etmək və İngilis konvencijlərin bilgi). Prelimi-nary analizi istifadəçilərin yazmaq və yazmaq üzərində mümkün olan mümkün təsirlərinin çox pozitif təsiri olduğunu göstərir.', 'am': 'የጽሑፍ ማናተር ነጻ ጉግል ዳነቶች የተጨማሪው መልስ ጥያቄ ለጽሑፎች ለመታገል እና ጽሑፋቸውን በራሳቸው አካባቢ እና በራሳቸው ተሟጋቾች በመስጠት ይረዳቸዋል፡፡ የሚጻፍት ምናtor የፍጥረታዊ ቋንቋ ማቀናቀል (NLP) methods and resources to produce feedback in terms of features that reset post-secondary strict writers as developmental (Burstein et al, 2016 b). እነዚህ አካባቢዎች ብዙዎችን የደብዳቤ አካባቢዎች (የመsource, claims እና ማስረጃ፤ የጉዳዩ አካባቢ፣ ጥያቄ እና የእንግሊዝኛ ጉዳዮች ማወቅ) የመጀመሪያው ትምህርት ትምህርት የተጠቃሚዎች የጽሑፍ ማህበረሰብ እና በጽሑፎቻቸው ላይ የችሎታዊ ጉዳይ የጽሑፍ ማሳየት የሚያስፈልጉት፡፡', 'bn': 'লেখা মেন্টর একটি মুক্ত গুগল ডাক্তার যোগ করার জন্য ডিজাইন করা হয়েছে লেখকদের সংগ্রামের জন্য প্রতিক্রিয়া প্রদান করা এবং তাদের লেখার সাহায্য লেখা মেন্টর প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়া এবং সম্পদ ব্যবহার করে ফিডিব্যাক তৈরি করার ব্যাপারে যে বৈশিষ্ট্যাবলীর পর সংগ্রামের লেখকদের গবেষণা উন্নয়ন হিসেবে ব These features span many writing sub-constructs (use of sources, claims, and evidence; topic development; coherence; and knowledge of English conventions).  প্রাথমিক বিশ্লেষণ নির্দেশ করছে যে ব্যবহারকারীদের লেখার উপর ব্যবহার এবং সম্ভাব্য প্রভাব তাদের লেখার ব্যাপারে লেখা মেন্টরের ব্', 'hy': 'Գրելու մենտորն անվճար Google Docs-ի ավելացումն է, որը նախագծված է, որպեսզի ապահովել արձագանքներ պայքարելու գրողներին և օգնել նրանց բարելավել իրենց գրությունը ինքնուրույն և ինքնուրույն կառավարվող ձևով: Գրելու մենտորն օգտագործում է բնական լեզվի վերամշակման (ՆԼՊ) մեթոդներ և ռեսուրսներ, որպեսզի ստեղծի արձագանք այն հատկանիշների առումով, որոնք հետերկրորդական պայքարում պայքարում գրողների հետազոտությունները դասակարգել են որպես զար Այս հատկությունները ներառում են շատ գրական ենթակառուցվածքներ (աղբյուրների, փաստարկների և ապացույցների օգտագործումը, թեմայի զարգացումը, կատարելականությունը և անգլերենի համոզմունքների գիտելիքը): Նախադական վերլուծությունը ցույց է տալիս, որ օգտագործողները գրողի մենտորի վրա գլխավոր առումով դրական տպավորություն ունեն օգտագործելիության և պոտենցիալ ազդեցության առումով իրենց գրելու վրա:', 'ca': "Writing Mentor és un complement gratuït de Google Docs dissenyat per proporcionar feedback a escriptors en dificultats i ajudar-los a millorar la seva escriptura d'una manera autoregulada. Writing Mentor uses natural language processing (NLP) methods and resources to generate feedback in terms of features that research into post-secondary struggling writers has classified as developmental (Burstein et al., 2016b).  Aquestes característiques abarcan molts subconstruits d'escriptura (ús de fonts, afirmacions i evidències; desenvolupament de temes; coerència; i coneixement de convencions angleses). L'anàlisi preliminar indica que els usuaris tenen una impressió molt positiva del Mentor d'Escritura en termes d'utilitzabilitat i d'impacte potencial en la seva escriptura.", 'cs': 'Psaní mentor je bezplatný doplněk Dokumenty Google navržený tak, aby poskytoval zpětnou vazbu potížícím se spisovatelům a pomohl jim zlepšit jejich psaní vlastním tempem a samoregulovaným způsobem. Writing Mentor používá metody a zdroje zpracování přirozeného jazyka (NLP) k generování zpětné vazby z hlediska funkcí, které výzkum postsekundárních bojujících autorů klasifikoval jako vývojové (Burstein et al., 2016b). Tyto funkce zahrnují mnoho podkonstruktů psaní (použití zdrojů, tvrzení a důkazů, vývoj tématu, soudržnost a znalost anglických konvencí). Předběžná analýza ukazuje, že uživatelé mají z velké míry pozitivní dojem na Writing Mentor z hlediska použitelnosti a potenciálního vlivu na jejich psaní.', 'bs': 'Pisanje Mentor a je slobodan dodatak Google Docs dizajniran za pružanje reakcije piscima koji se bore i pomoći im da poboljšaju svoj pisanje na samoporučeni i samoporučeni način. Pisanje Mentora koristi metode i resurse prirodnog obradivanja jezika (NLP) kako bi se stvorila reakcija u smislu karakteristika koje su istraživanje u piscima za postsekundarnu borbu klasifikovano kao razvoj (Burstein et al., 2016b). Ove karakteristike šire mnoge podkonstrukcije pisanja (korištenje izvora, tvrdnji i dokaza, razvoj teme, saskašnost i znanje engleskih konvencija). Preliminarna analiza ukazuje na to da korisnici imaju veliki pozitivan utisak pisanja Mentor a u smislu korisnosti i potencijalnog utjecaja na njihovo pisanje.', 'et': 'Writing Mentor on tasuta Google Dokumentide lisandmoodul, mille eesmärk on anda tagasisidet raskustes olevatele kirjanikele ja aidata neil parandada oma kirjutamist enesetempolisel ja isereguleeritaval moel. Writing Mentor kasutab loodusliku keele töötlemise (NLP) meetodeid ja ressursse tagasiside saamiseks funktsioonide osas, mida keskkoolijärgsete raskustega kirjanike uuringud on klassifitseerinud arenguks (Burstein jt., 2016b). Need omadused hõlmavad paljusid kirjutamise alamkonstruktsioone (allikate, väidete ja tõendite kasutamine; teemade arendamine; sidusus; inglise keele konventsioonide tundmine). Esialgne analüüs näitab, et kasutajatel on Writing Mentorist üldiselt positiivne mulje kasutatavuse ja võimaliku mõju poolest nende kirjutamisele.', 'fi': 'Writing Mentor on ilmainen Google Docs -lisäosa, joka on suunniteltu antamaan palautetta vaikeuksissa oleville kirjoittajille ja auttamaan heitä parantamaan kirjoittamistaan omatahtisella ja itsesääntelyisellä tavalla. Writing Mentor käyttää luonnollisia kielenkäsittelymenetelmiä ja resursseja tuottaakseen palautetta ominaisuuksista, jotka toisen asteen jälkeisten kamppailevien kirjailijoiden tutkimus on luokitellut kehityksen mukaisiksi (Burstein et al., 2016b). Nämä ominaisuudet kattavat monia kirjoittamisen alakonstruktioita (lähteiden, väitteiden ja todisteiden käyttö, aihepiirin kehittäminen, johdonmukaisuus ja englannin käytäntöjen tuntemus). Alustava analyysi osoittaa, että käyttäjillä on pitkälti positiivinen käsitys Writing Mentorista käytettävyyden ja mahdollisen vaikutuksen kannalta kirjoittamiseen.', 'jv': 'Nyong Mentor kuwi wis bebas Google Doks nambah kanggo ngilanggar tarjamahan kanggo ngilanggar tarjamah lan nganggep bantuan karo nglanggar kuwi mau isura awak dhéwé lan sampeyan sampeyan. Ngubah Mentor Punika-punika sing paling-akeh sing paling-akeh dumateng. prelimi- nary maneh menehi kuwi, diutag-utek yen manut karo pawaran luwih apik sing apik dadi kaé Mentor nggambar nggambar aturan tapi kanggo ngubah dhéwé kuwi mau.', 'sk': 'Writing Mentor je brezplačen dodatek Google Dokumenti, ki je namenjen zagotavljanju povratnih informacij pisateljem v težavah in jim pomaga izboljšati pisanje na samotemp in samoreguliran način. Writing Mentor uporablja metode in vire obdelave naravnega jezika (NLP) za ustvarjanje povratnih informacij v smislu značilnosti, ki so jih raziskave postkundarnih borilnih pisateljev razvrstile kot razvojne (Burstein et al., 2016b). Te značilnosti obsegajo številne podkonstrukte pisanja (uporaba virov, trditev in dokazov, razvoj teme, skladnost in poznavanje angleških konvencij). Preliminarna analiza kaže, da imajo uporabniki v veliki meri pozitiven vtis Writing Mentorja v smislu uporabnosti in potencialnega vpliva na njihovo pisanje.', 'ha': 'Writing Mentor is an ƙara Google Docs on ɗari wanda aka design a bãyar da feedback zuwa yin yãƙi ga mutane na rubuci kuma yana taimakon su improve their writing in a form farat-paced and-controlled. Writing Mentor ya yi amfani da shiryoyin ayuka na as al in harshen (NLP) da resource dõmin ya iya ƙiƙiro feedback cikin misalin feature that research can be classified as developed (Burstin et al., 2016b). Wannan feature na ƙarfafa wasu masu rubutu masu ƙaranci (na amfani da sources, daidai da shaidar; maɓalli; sambawa; da sanin shiryoyin ayukan Ingiriya). Prelimi- nary analysis indicates that users have a largely positive impression of Writing Mentor in terms of usability and potential impact on their writing.', 'he': 'המנזר בכתיבה הוא תוספת חופשית של גוגל דוקטורים שנועדת כדי לספק חזרה לכותבים המאבקים ולעזור להם לשפר את הכתיבה שלהם באופן עצמי מוקדם. "מנטור הכתיבה" משתמש בשיטות ועבודת שפת טבעית (NLP) כדי ליצור חזרה במונחים שמחקר על סופרים מאבקים אחרי התיכון מסווג כפיתוח (Burstein et al., 2016b). המאפיינים האלה מגיעים למרבה מתבנות כתיבה (השימוש במקורים, טענות וראיות; פיתוח נושא; תואם; וידע על קונספונסיות אנגלית). ניתוח מראשי מצביע שלמשתמשים יש רושם חיובי בעיקר של מנטור כתיבה במונחים של אפשרות להשתמש והשפעה פוטנציאלית על כתיבה שלהם.', 'bo': 'འདེམས་ཐོ་གསར་པ་ནི་རང་དབང་གི་Google Docs སྒྲིག་འཇུག་ཟམ་ཞིག་ཡིན་པས་རྩོམ་པ་ལ་དཀའ་ངལ འདེམས་ཐོག་འདིས་གསར་བརྗོད་ཀྱིས་རང་རུང་བའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ལས་སྦྱོར་ཀྱི་ཐབས་ལམ་དང་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཐོག འདི་དག་གི་འབྲི་བརྗོད་ཁང་མང་པོ་ཞིག་ཡིན་ཏེ། རྣམ་གྲངས་མེད་པའི་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་དེ་ནི་སྤྱོད་མཁན་གྱིས་འབྲི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ཀྱི་རྣམ་པ་ལྟར་མང་ཤོས་ཡོད་པ་དང་འགྱུར'}
{'en': 'Sensala : a Dynamic Semantics System for Natural Language Processing', 'fr': 'Sensala\xa0: un système sémantique dynamique pour le traitement du langage naturel', 'ar': 'Sensala: نظام دلالات ديناميكي لمعالجة اللغة الطبيعية', 'pt': 'Sensala: um sistema de semântica dinâmica para processamento de linguagem natural', 'es': 'Sensala: un sistema semántico dinámico para el procesamiento del lenguaje natural', 'ru': 'Sensala: Система Динамической Семантики для Обработки Естественного Языка', 'ja': 'Sensala ：自然言語処理のための動的セマンティクスシステム', 'zh': 'Sensala曰:自然语言动语义统也', 'hi': 'Sensala: प्राकृतिक भाषा प्रसंस्करण के लिए एक गतिशील शब्दार्थ प्रणाली', 'ga': 'Sensala: Córas Séimeantaic Dinimiciúla do Phróiseáil Teanga Nádúrtha', 'ka': 'Name', 'el': 'Σενσάλα: Δυναμικό Σημαντικό Σύστημα Επεξεργασίας Φυσικής Γλώσσας', 'hu': 'Sensala: dinamikus szemantikai rendszer a természetes nyelvfeldolgozáshoz', 'kk': 'Sensala a: a Dynamic Semantics System for Natural Language Processing', 'lt': 'Sensala: dinaminė Semantinė gamtos kalbų apdorojimo sistema', 'it': "Sensala: un sistema semantico dinamico per l'elaborazione del linguaggio naturale", 'mk': 'Сенсала: динамски семантичен систем за процес на природен јазик', 'ms': 'Sensala: Sistem Semantik Dinamik untuk Pemprosesan Bahasa Alami', 'ml': 'Sensala: a Dynamic Semantics System for Natural Language Processing', 'mt': 'Sensala: Sistema Semantika Dinamika għall-Ipproċessar tal-Lingwi Naturali', 'mn': 'Sensala: a Dynamic Semantics System for Natural Language Processing', 'pl': 'Sensala: dynamiczny system semantyczny do przetwarzania języka naturalnego', 'ro': 'Sensala: un sistem semantic dinamic pentru procesarea limbajului natural', 'sr': 'Sensala: dinamički semantički sistem prirodnog jezika', 'no': 'SensalaName', 'sv': 'Sensala: ett dynamiskt semantiskt system för behandling av naturligt språk', 'so': 'Sensala: nidaamka dabiiciga', 'si': 'සෙන්සාලා', 'ta': 'சென்சாலா', 'ur': 'سنسالا: ایک داینامیک سیمانٹیکس سیسٹم طبیعی زبان پرسس کے لئے', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'nhạy cảm: một Hệ thống trung thành khí động cho Quá trình ngôn ngữ tự nhiên', 'bg': 'Сензала: динамична семантична система за обработка на естествения език', 'hr': 'Sensala: dinamički semantički sustav prirodnog jezika', 'da': 'Sensala: et dynamisk semantisk system til behandling af naturligt sprog', 'nl': 'Sensala: een dynamisch semantisch systeem voor de verwerking van natuurlijke taal', 'de': 'Sensala: ein dynamisches semantisches System zur Verarbeitung natürlicher Sprache', 'ko': 'Sensala: 자연 언어 처리에 사용되는 동적 의미 시스템', 'fa': 'سنسالا: یک سیستم سیمانتیک دینامیک برای پرداخت زبان طبیعی', 'sw': 'Sensala: Mfumo wa Semantiki ya Kidynamic wa Utafiti wa lugha ya asili', 'af': 'SensalaName', 'id': 'Sensala: Sistem Semantik Dinamik untuk Proses Bahasa Alami', 'am': 'Sensala: a dynamic Semantics System for Natural language Processing', 'sq': 'Sensala: a Dynamic Semantics System for Natural Language Processing', 'tr': 'Sensala:a Dynamic Semantics System for Natural Language Processing', 'bn': 'সেনসালা: প্রাকৃতিক ভাষা প্রক্রিয়ার জন্য ডায়ানিমিক সেমান্টিক সিস্টেম', 'bs': 'Sensala: dinamički semantički sistem prirodnog jezika', 'hy': 'Սենսալա. բնական լեզվի վերլուծության դինամիկ սեմանտիկ համակարգ', 'ca': 'Sensala: un sistema dinàmic de Semàtics per al processament de llenguatges naturals', 'az': 'Sensala: təbiətli dil işləməsi üçün dinamik Semantik Sistemi', 'cs': 'Sensala: dynamický sémantický systém pro zpracování přirozeného jazyka', 'fi': 'Sensala: dynaaminen semanttinen järjestelmä luonnollisen kielen käsittelyyn', 'et': 'Sensala: dünaamiline semantika süsteem looduskeele töötlemiseks', 'jv': 'Sensalah: a dynamics semanti System for Normal Language Proceding', 'sk': 'Sensala: dinamični semantični sistem za obdelavo naravnega jezika', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'bo': 'སེན་སཱལ།', 'he': 'Sensala: מערכת סמנטיקה דינמית לעבודת שפת טבעית'}
{'en': 'Here we describe Sensala, an open source framework for the semantic interpretation of natural language that provides the logical meaning of a given text. The framework’s theory is based on a lambda calculus with exception handling and uses contexts, continuations, events and dependent types to handle a wide range of complex linguistic phenomena, such as donkey anaphora, verb phrase anaphora, propositional anaphora, presuppositions and implicatures.', 'ar': 'هنا نصف Sensala ، إطار مفتوح المصدر للتفسير الدلالي للغة الطبيعية الذي يوفر المعنى المنطقي لنص معين. تعتمد نظرية الإطار على حساب لامدا مع معالجة الاستثناءات وتستخدم السياقات والتواصلات والأحداث والأنواع التابعة للتعامل مع مجموعة واسعة من الظواهر اللغوية المعقدة ، مثل الجاذبية الحميرية ، والجاذبية الافتراضية ، والافتراضات والتضمينات.', 'pt': 'Aqui descrevemos o Sensala , um framework de código aberto para a interpretação semântica da linguagem natural que fornece o significado lógico de um determinado texto. A teoria do framework é baseada em um cálculo lambda com tratamento de exceção e usa contextos, continuações, eventos e tipos dependentes para lidar com uma ampla gama de fenômenos linguísticos complexos, como anáfora de burro, anáfora de frase verbal, anáfora proposicional, pressuposições e implicaturas.', 'es': 'Aquí describimos Sensala, un marco de código abierto para la interpretación semántica del lenguaje natural que proporciona el significado lógico de un texto dado. La teoría del marco se basa en un cálculo lambda con manejo de excepciones y utiliza contextos, continuaciones, eventos y tipos dependientes para manejar una amplia gama de fenómenos lingüísticos complejos, como la anáfora del burro, la anáfora de la frase verbal, la anáfora proposicional, las presuposiciones y las implicaciones.', 'fr': "Nous décrivons ici Sensala, un framework open source pour l'interprétation sémantique du langage naturel qui fournit le sens logique d'un texte donné. La théorie du framework est basée sur un calcul lambda avec gestion des exceptions et utilise des contextes, des continuations, des événements et des types dépendants pour gérer un large éventail de phénomènes linguistiques complexes, tels que l'anaphore de l'âne, l'anaphore de phrase verbale, l'anaphore propositionnelle, les présuppositions et les implicatures.", 'ja': 'ここでは、与えられたテキストの論理的意味を提供する、自然言語の意味論的解釈のためのオープンソースフレームワークであるSensalaについて説明します。フレームワークの理論は、例外処理を伴うラムダ微積分に基づいており、文脈、連続性、事象、および依存型を使用して、ロバのアナフォラ、動詞句のアナフォラ、命題のアナフォラ、前提条件、および暗示などの幅広い複雑な言語現象を処理します。', 'zh': '述Sensala于此,自然语言语义解之开源框架,供给定文本之逻辑。 框架理本于异lambda演算,而用上下文续之,事与依类处杂语,如驴子anaphora,动词短语anaphora命题anaphora,前提讽示。', 'hi': 'यहां हम सेंसाला का वर्णन करते हैं, जो प्राकृतिक भाषा की शब्दार्थ व्याख्या के लिए एक खुला स्रोत ढांचा है जो किसी दिए गए पाठ का तार्किक अर्थ प्रदान करता है। फ्रेमवर्क का सिद्धांत अपवाद हैंडलिंग के साथ एक लैम्ब्डा कैलकुलस पर आधारित है और जटिल भाषाई घटनाओं की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला को संभालने के लिए संदर्भों, निरंतरताओं, घटनाओं और निर्भर प्रकारों का उपयोग करता है, जैसे कि गधा एनाफोरा, क्रिया वाक्यांश एनाफोरा, प्रस्तावात्मक एनाफोरा, presuppositions और inflictures।', 'ru': 'Здесь мы описываем Sensala, открытый исходный фреймворк для семантической интерпретации естественного языка, который обеспечивает логическое значение данного текста. Теория фреймворка основана на лямбда исчислении с обработкой исключений и использует контексты, продолжения, события и зависимые типы для обработки широкого спектра сложных лингвистических явлений, таких как ослиная анафора, глагольная фраза анафора, пропозиционная анафора, предположения и импликатуры.', 'ga': 'Anseo déanaimid cur síos ar Sensala , creat foinse oscailte do léirmhíniú shéimeantach na teanga nádúrtha a sholáthraíonn brí loighciúil téacs áirithe. Tá teoiric an chreata bunaithe ar calcalas lambda le láimhseáil eisceachta agus úsáidtear comhthéacsanna, leanúnachas, imeachtaí agus cineálacha cleithiúnacha chun raon leathan feiniméin chasta theangeolaíocha a láimhseáil, mar anaphora asail, anaphora frása briathartha, anaphora tairgthe, toimhdí agus impleachtanna.', 'ka': 'აქ ჩვენ განახსენებთ სენსალა, რომელიც განახსენებული ტექსტის ლოგიკური ნიშნავს სიმენტიკური ინტერპექტირებას. პარამეტრის თეორია იგივეა, როგორც მაღალი ანაფორა, გერბალური ფრაზა ანაფორა, პროგრამეტური ანაფორა, პროგრამეტური ანაფორა, პროგრამეტური პრესპოზაციები და იმპლიკური ტიპები.', 'el': 'Εδώ περιγράφουμε ένα πλαίσιο ανοικτού κώδικα για τη σημασιολογική ερμηνεία της φυσικής γλώσσας που παρέχει τη λογική έννοια ενός συγκεκριμένου κειμένου. Η θεωρία του πλαισίου βασίζεται σε έναν λογισμό με χειρισμό εξαιρέσεων και χρησιμοποιεί πλαίσια, συνεχείς, γεγονότα και εξαρτώμενους τύπους για να χειριστεί ένα ευρύ φάσμα πολύπλοκων γλωσσικών φαινομένων, όπως η ανάφορα γαϊδουριών, η ανάφορα ρήματος, η ανάφορα προτάσεων, οι προϋποθέσεις και οι επιπτώσεις.', 'hu': 'Itt leírjuk a Sensalát, egy nyílt forráskódú keretrendszert a természetes nyelv szemantikai értelmezésére, amely egy adott szöveg logikai jelentését biztosítja. A keretrendszer elmélete kivételes kezeléssel ellátott lambda kalkuluson alapul, és kontextusokat, folytonosságokat, eseményeket és függő típusokat használ a komplex nyelvi jelenségek széles skálájának kezelésére, mint például a szamár anafóra, az ige kifejezés anafóra, propozicionális anafóra, feltételezések és implicációk.', 'lt': 'Čia apibūdiname Sensala , atviro kodo sistemą semantiniam natūralios kalbos aiškinimui, kuris suteikia tam tikro teksto logišką reikšmę. Sistemos teorija grindžiama lambda apskaičiavimu, išskyrus tvarkymą ir naudojimą kontekstais, tęsimais, renginiais ir priklausomais tipais, kad būtų galima spręsti įvairius sudėtingus kalbinius reiškinius, pvz., asilų anaforą, žodžių frazės anaforą, siūlomą anaforą, prielaidas ir pasekmes.', 'it': "Qui descriviamo Sensala , un framework open source per l'interpretazione semantica del linguaggio naturale che fornisce il significato logico di un dato testo. La teoria del framework si basa su un calcolo lambda con gestione delle eccezioni e utilizza contesti, continue, eventi e tipi dipendenti per gestire una vasta gamma di fenomeni linguistici complessi, come l'anafora asino, l'anafora verbale, l'anafora proposizionale, i presupposti e le implicazioni.", 'ml': 'ഇവിടെ നാം സെന്\u200dസാലായെ വിവരിക്കുന്നു, ഒരു തുറന്ന സോര്\u200dസ്സ് ഫ്രെയിമാര്\u200dക്ക് വേണ്ടി സ്വാഭാഷ വിശദീകരിക്കുന്നു. അത കൈകാര്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതിനെക്കൂടാതെ ഈ ഫ്രെയിമ്പിന്റെ തിയറിയിട്ടുള്ള കാല്\u200dക്കൂളിസിന്റെ അടിസ്ഥാനത്താണ്, കോണ്\u200dട്ടെക്സ്റ്റുകള്\u200d, തുടര്\u200dന്നുനില്\u200dക്കുന്നത്, സംഭവങ്ങളും ആശ്രയിക്കുന്നത', 'kk': 'Мұнда сенсалы, табиғи тілдің семантикалық түсініктемесінің ашық көзі қоршауын таңдаймыз. Бұл жерде келтірілген мәтіннің логикалық мәліметін көрсетеді. Фреймердің теориясы ламбда калькуласына негізделген және контексттерді қамтамасыз ету және қолданып, жалғастыру, оқиғалар және тәуелді түрлері көптеген тілінгвистикалық пайдаланушылардың көптеген аумағын қамтамасыз түрлеріне негізделген, мысалы, нафора,', 'mk': 'Овде ја опишуваме Сенсала , рамка на отворен извор за семантичната интерпретација на природниот јазик која го обезбедува логичното значење на даден текст. Теоријата на рамката е базирана на ламбда калкул со исклучок употреба на контексти, продолжувања, настани и зависни типови за справување со широк опсег на сложени јазички феномени, како што се осрана анафора, јазичка фраза анафора, предложна анафора, претпоставувања и импликации.', 'ms': 'Di sini kita menggambarkan Sensala , kerangka sumber terbuka untuk interpretasi semantik bahasa alam yang menyediakan makna logik bagi teks tertentu. Teori kerangka ini berdasarkan kalkulus lambda dengan pengecualian mengendalikan dan menggunakan konteks, lanjutan, peristiwa dan jenis bergantung untuk mengendalikan julat luas fenomena bahasa kompleks, seperti anafora keledai, anafora frasa verb, anafora proposisi, anggapan dan implikasi.', 'mt': "Hawnhekk niddeskrivu Sensala , qafas ta » sors miftuħ għall-interpretazzjoni semantika tal-lingwa naturali li tipprovdi t-tifsira loġika ta » test partikolari. The framework's theory is based on a lambda calculus with exception handling and uses contexts, continuations, events and dependent types to handle a wide range of complex linguistic phenomena, such as donkey anaphora, verb phrase anaphora, propositional anaphora, presuppositions and implicatures.", 'no': 'Her beskriver vi Sensala, eit opna kjelderammeverk for semantisk tolking av naturspråk som tilbyr logisk betydning av ei gitt tekst. Rammeteorien er basert på ein lambda kalkulus med unntak for handtering og bruk kontekstar, kontinuering, hendingar og avhengige typar for handtering av ein stor rekke komplekse lingviske fenomenar, som donkey anaphora, verb phrase anaphora, propositional anaphora, presuppositions and implicatures.', 'pl': 'Opisujemy tutaj Sensalę jako open source framework do semantycznej interpretacji języka naturalnego, który zapewnia logiczne znaczenie danego tekstu. Teoria ramowa opiera się na rachunku lambda z obsługą wyjątków i wykorzystuje konteksty, kontynuacje, zdarzenia i typy zależne do obsługi szerokiej gamy złożonych zjawisk językowych, takich jak anafora osła, anafora fraz czasownikowych, anafora propozycyjna, założenia i implikacje.', 'mn': 'Энд бид Сенсалаг, байгалийн хэл дээр нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн хэлбэрийг тайлбарлаж өгөгдсөн текстийн логик утгыг өгдөг. Фрэмбэйтийн онол нь гайхалтай харилцаа, үргэлжлүүлэлт, үйл явдал болон хамааралтай төрлийн хэлбэрийн үзэгдэл дээр суурилсан байдаг.', 'ro': 'Aici descriem Sensala , un cadru open source pentru interpretarea semantică a limbajului natural care oferă sensul logic al unui anumit text. Teoria cadrului se bazează pe un calcul lambda cu manipulare excepțională și utilizează contexte, continuări, evenimente și tipuri dependente pentru a gestiona o gamă largă de fenomene lingvistice complexe, cum ar fi anafora măgarului, fraza verbală anafora, anafora propozițională, presupuneri și implicații.', 'sr': 'Ovde opisujemo Sensalu , okvir otvorenog izvora semantičkog tumačenja prirodnog jezika koji pruža logično smisao određenog teksta. Teorija okvira je temeljena na lambdnom kalkularu s a izuzetnim rukovanjem i korištenjem konteksta, nastavljanja, događaja i zavisnih vrsta kako bi se bavili širom niza složenih jezičkih fenomena, poput anafore magarca, anafore verbalne fraze, predložene anafore, predstave i implikatora.', 'si': "මෙතන අපි සෙන්සාලාව විස්තර කරනවා , ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත භාෂයේ සැමැන්තික අභිවාදය සඳහා ප්\u200dරතිභාවිත විස්තර කිර The system's Theorie is based on a Lambda calculus with extra handling and use Contexts, ongoation, cases and Dependent types to manage a vast series of comprehensed language fences, e.g. donkey anaphora, verb Phrase anaphora, voorsiinational anaphora, Presup locations and implaccature.", 'so': 'Halkan waxaynu ku qornaa Sensala, taas oo ah noocyo furan oo ah fasirka afka dabiicadda ah, kaas oo micneheeda logical ah ee qoraalka la siiyey. Tiirarka firaaqada waxaa lagu saleyn karaa kalkulus lambda, iyadoo aan lagu isticmaali karo qoraalo, sii-socda, dhacdooyinka iyo noocyo ay ku xiran yihiin inay xambaaraan waxyaabo kala duduwan oo luuqadaha qalloocan ah, tusaale ahaan dameer anaphora, hadal anafora ah, anafora la soo jeedo, tababaro-horaadka iyo waxyaabaha la xiriiro.', 'sv': 'Här beskriver vi Sensala , ett open source ramverk för semantisk tolkning av naturspråk som ger den logiska innebörden av en given text. Ramverkets teori bygger på en lambdaanalk med undantagshantering och använder sammanhang, kontinuioner, händelser och beroende typer för att hantera ett brett spektrum av komplexa språkliga fenomen, såsom åsnanafora, verbfras anafora, propositiell anafora, antaganden och implikationer.', 'ta': 'இங்கே நாம் சென்சாலாவை விவரிக்கிறோம், ஒரு திறந்த மூலத்தின் சட்டத்தை கொடுக்கப்பட்ட உரையின் ஆராய்ச்சிக்கு அர்த்தம இந்த சட்டத்தின் திட்டம் ஒரு lambda calculus அடிப்படையாகும் மற்றும் செயல்பாடு, தொடர்ந்து, நிகழ்வுகள் மற்றும் சார்ந்த வகைகளை பயன்படுத்தும் வேறு சிக்கலான மொழிகள் போன்ற மொழியை பாதுகாப்பாற்றுவதற்கு, கழ', 'ur': 'یہاں ہم سنسالا کو ایک کھلے سراسر فرم کی تعبیر کے لئے بیان کرتے ہیں جو ایک مقررہ متن کی منطقی تعبیر کرتا ہے۔ چوکاٹ کا نظریہ ایک لامبڈا کالکول پر بنیاد ہے جس میں مختلف کنٹکسٹ لینے اور استعمال کرتا ہے، کنٹکسٹ، ادامه، حادثہ اور منتصرف طریقے ہیں، جسے گدھے کی آنفورا، وربو فریز آنفورا، پیشنهادی آنفورا، پیشنهادی موقعیت اور اثبات کے مطابق ہے.', 'uz': "Bu yerda Sensala'ni o'rganamiz, asl tilning semantik tarjima qilishi uchun ochiq manbasi tarjima qilamiz. Bu bir doim matnning logical ma'nosini beradi. The framework's theory is based on a lambda calculus with exception handling and uses contexts, continuations, events and dependent types to handle a wide range of complex linguistic phenomena, such as donkey anaphora, verb phrase anaphora, propositional anaphora, presuppositions and implicatures.", 'vi': 'Ở đây chúng ta mô tả nhạy cảm một nguồn mở cho ngữ pháp theo ngữ pháp tự nhiên cung cấp ý nghĩa logic của một văn bản đã đưa ra. Kiểu lý thuyết của bộ khung dựa trên một cấu trúc màu cừu, ngoại trừ s ử dụng các tình huống, liên tục, các sự kiện và các dạng phụ thuộc để xử lý một loạt các hiện tượng ngôn ngữ phức tạp, như lừa đảo Anaphora, từ ngữ anaphora, Anaphora câu tuyên truyền, ngụ ý và ám ảnh.', 'bg': 'Тук описваме Сензала, отворен код рамка за семантична интерпретация на естествен език, която осигурява логическото значение на даден текст. Теорията на рамката се основава на ламбда изчисление с изключение и използва контексти, продължения, събития и зависими типове, за да се справи с широк спектър от сложни лингвистични явления, като магарешка анафора, глаголна фраза анафора, пропорционална анафора, предположения и импликации.', 'da': 'Her beskriver vi Sensala , en open source ramme for semantisk fortolkning af natursprog, der giver den logiske betydning af en given tekst. Rammernes teori er baseret på en lambda calculus med undtagelseshåndtering og bruger sammenhænge, fortsættelser, begivenheder og afhængige typer til at håndtere en bred vifte af komplekse sproglige fænomener, såsom æselanaphora, verbsætning anaphora, propositional anaphora, forudsætninger og implikationer.', 'hr': 'Ovdje opisujemo Sensala , okvir otvorenog izvora za semantičko tumačenje prirodnog jezika koji pruža logičko značenje određenog teksta. Teorija okvira temeljena je na lambdnom kalkularu s izuzetnim rješavanjem i korištenjem konteksta, nastavljanja, događaja i zavisnih vrsta kako bi se bavili širokim rasponom složenih jezičkih fenomena, poput anafore magarca, anafore verbalne fraze, predložene anafore, predstave i implikacije.', 'de': 'Hier beschreiben wir Sensala als Open Source Framework für die semantische Interpretation natürlicher Sprache, das die logische Bedeutung eines gegebenen Textes liefert. Die Theorie des Frameworks basiert auf einem Lambda-Kalkül mit Ausnahmebehandlung und verwendet Kontexte, Fortsetzungen, Ereignisse und abhängige Typen, um eine breite Palette komplexer linguistischer Phänomene zu behandeln, wie Esel-Anaphora, Verb-Phrasen-Anaphora, Satz-Anaphora, Annahmen und Implikationen.', 'id': 'Di sini kita menggambarkan Sensala, sebuah rangka sumber terbuka untuk interpretasi semantis bahasa alam yang menyediakan arti logis dari teks tertentu. Teori kerangka ini berdasarkan kalkulasi lambda dengan pengecualian menangani dan menggunakan konteks, lanjutan, peristiwa dan tipe tergantung untuk menangani jangkauan luas fenomena bahasa kompleks, seperti anafora keledai, frasa verb anafora, anafora proposisional, predoposisi dan implikasi.', 'nl': 'Hier beschrijven we Sensala, een open source framework voor de semantische interpretatie van natuurlijke taal dat de logische betekenis van een bepaalde tekst geeft. De theorie van het framework is gebaseerd op een lambda calculus met uitzondering behandeling en gebruikt contexten, continuaties, gebeurtenissen en afhankelijke types om een breed scala van complexe linguïstische fenomenen, zoals ezel anafora, werkwoord frase anafora, propositionale anafora, vooronderstellingen en implicaties aan te pakken.', 'sw': 'Hapa tunaelezea Sensala , mfumo wa vyanzo huru wa tafsiri ya lugha ya asili inayoelezea maana ya kimaadili ya maandishi yaliyopewa. nadharia ya miundombi hiyo inategemea na kalkulu ya lambda isipokuwa na mikakati ya kutekeleza na kutumia misingi, endelevu, matukio na aina inayotegemea ili kukabiliana na aina mbalimbali za lugha, kama vile anasifa ya punda, maneno yanayoelezea, anaphora mapendekezo, vituo vya mbele na madhara.', 'fa': 'اینجا ما سنسالا را توصیف می\u200cکنیم، یک چهارچوب منبع باز برای تعبیر سیمانتیک زبان طبیعی که معنی منطقی یک متن داده می\u200cشود. تئوری چهارچوب بر اساس یک شماره لامبدا با استثناء کنترل و استفاده از موضوع، ادامه، اتفاق\u200cها و نوع\u200cهای بستگی برای کنترل یک مجموعه\u200cای از پدیده\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی پیچیده، مانند آنفورا، عبارت\u200cهای اصلی، آنفورا، پیشنهاد\u200cهای پیشنهاد، وضعیت\u200cهای پیشنهاد و اثبات\u200cهای پیچیده است.', 'tr': 'Bu ýerde biz Sensalany, tebigat diliniň semantik terjimesini berilen metiniň lojik anlamyny saýlaýar. Çerçevesiniň teoriýasy lambda kalkulüs üne daýanýar we daşary duşuşyklary, dowamlary, bolup geçirmeler we baglanyşyk türleri, eşek anafora, verb frazy anafora, teklip etmeli anafora we netijesini çykarmak üçin daýanýar.', 'ko': '여기에 우리는 자연 언어의 의미 해석에 사용되는 소스 구조를 설명하고 텍스트에 주어진 논리적 의미를 제공한다.이 프레임워크의 이론은 lambda 연산과 이상 처리를 바탕으로 상하문, 연속체, 사건과 의존 유형을 이용하여 광범위한 복잡한 언어 현상을 처리한다. 예를 들어 당나귀 반지, 동사 단어 반지, 명제 반지, 예설과 의미 등이다.', 'am': 'እዚህ ሲሳላን የተሰጠውን የጽሑፍ ማህበረሰብ የፍጥረት ቋንቋን ለመተረጉም የተከፈተ የኩነቶች ፍሬም እናሳውቃለን፡፡ የፍሬም ዝና፣ በተጨማሪው፣ ሁኔታዎች፣ ሁኔታዎች እና በተማመሳሳይ ቋንቋዎችን፣ እንደአህያ አንፎራ፣ የንግግር ቃላት እናንፎራ፣ የፊደል አናፎራ፣ ጥያቄዎችን እና ጥያቄዎችን ለመቀበል፣ በተጨማሪው የቋንቋ ቋንቋዎች አካባቢዎችን ለመቀበል የሚደገፍ ነው፡፡', 'hy': 'Այստեղ մենք նկարագրում ենք Սենսալան, բնական լեզվի սեմանտիկ մեկնաբանության բաց կոդը, որը տրամադրում է որոշ տեքստի տրամաբանական իմաստը: Համակարգի տեսությունը հիմնված է լամբդայի մակարդակի վրա, բացառությամբ վերահսկելով և օգտագործելով կոնտեքստներ, շարունակություններ, իրադարձություններ և կախված տեսակներ, որպեսզի վերահսկեն բարդ լեզվաբանական երևույթներ, ինչպիսիք են էշի անաֆորան, բայի արտահայտությունը անաֆորան, առաջարկած անաֆոր', 'sq': 'Këtu përshkruajmë Sensala, një kuadër burimi i hapur për interpretimin semantik të gjuhës natyrore që ofron kuptimin logjik të një teksti të caktuar. Teoria e kuadrit është bazuar në një kalkulat lambda me përjashtim të trajtimit dhe përdorimit të konteksteve, vazhdimeve, ngjarjeve dhe llojeve të varura për të trajtuar një gamë të gjerë fenomenesh gjuhësore komplekse, të tilla si anafora gomari, anafora e frazës verbore, anafora propozicionale, supozime dhe implikime.', 'bn': 'এখানে আমরা সেনসালাকে বর্ণনা করি প্রাকৃতিক ভাষার সাম্প্রাকৃতিক ব্যাখ্যার জন্য একটি উন্মুক্ত সোর্স ফ্রেম, যা একটি প্ এই ফ্রেমের তত্ত্ব ব্যতীত ক্যালাকুলাস ব্যতীত একটি লাম্বাদা ক্যালাকুলাসের উপর ভিত্তিতে রয়েছে এবং ব্যবহার করে প্রতিযোগিতা, চলতে থাকে, অনুষ্ঠান এবং নির্ভরশীল ধরনের ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে, যেমন গাধা আনাফোরা,', 'az': 'Beləliklə, biz Sensalayı, təbiətli dilin semantik yorumluğuna a çıq mənbə çerçivesini təsdiqləyirik ki, belə bir mətnin lojik anlamı verir. Çerçivesinin nəzəriyyəsi lambda kalkulası istisna olmaqla, müxtəlif işləri, davranışları, vaxtları və müvəffəqiyyətlər istifadə etmək üçün çoxlu kompleks dil fenomenlərini idarə etmək üçün, məs ələlər anafora, verb fraza anafora, təklif anafora, presupposesiyalar və implikatlar kimi.', 'af': "Hier beskrywe ons Sensala ,  ' n oop bron raamwerk vir die semantiese uitlegging van natuurlike taal wat die logiese betekening van 'n gegewe teks verskaf. Die raamwerk se teorie is gebaseer op 'n lambda kalkulus met uitsondering behandeling en gebruik kontekste, voortgaande, gebeurtenis en afhanklike tipes om 'n groot reek van komplekse lingwisiese fenomene te hanteer, soos esel anafora, verb frase anafora, voorstellings anafora, voorstellings en inplikature.", 'et': 'Siin kirjeldame Sensala , avatud lähtekoodiga raamistik semantiline tõlgendamine looduskeel, mis annab loogilise tähenduse antud teksti. Raamistiku teooria põhineb lambda arvutusel erandite käsitlemisega ning kasutab kontekste, jätkumisi, sündmusi ja sõltuvaid tüüpe, et käsitleda mitmesuguseid keerulisi keelelisi nähtusi, nagu eesli anafoor, verbifraas anafoor, propositsionaalne anafoor, eeldused ja kaasatused.', 'cs': 'Zde popisujeme Sensalu jako open source framework pro sémantickou interpretaci přirozeného jazyka, který poskytuje logický význam daného textu. Teorie rámce je založena na lambda kalkulu s manipulací s výjimkami a využívá kontexty, pokračování, události a závislé typy k zpracování široké škály složitých jazykových jevů, jako je oslí anafora, slovesová fráze anafora, výroková anafora, předpoklady a implikace.', 'bs': 'Ovdje opisujemo Sensalu , okvir otvorenog izvora za semantičko tumačenje prirodnog jezika koji pruža logičko značenje određenog teksta. Teorija okvira temeljena je na lambdnom kalkulu s a izuzetnim rukovanjem i korištenjem konteksta, nastavka, događaja i ovisnih tipova kako bi se bavili širom niza složenih jezičkih fenomena, poput anafore magarca, anafore verbalne fraze, predložene anafore, predstave i implikatora.', 'ca': "Aquí descrivim Sensala, un marc de codi obert per a la interpretació semàntica del llenguatge natural que proporciona el significat lògic d'un text. La teoria del marc es basa en un càlcul de lambda amb excepció de manejar i utilitzar contextos, continuacions, esdeveniments i tipus dependent s per manejar una gran varietat de fenomens lingüístics complexes, com l'anafora d'asnes, l'anafora de frases verboses, l'anafora proposicional, les presuncions i les implicacions.", 'fi': 'Tässä kuvaamme Sensala , avoimen lähdekoodin kehys semanttinen tulkinta luonnollisen kielen, joka tarjoaa loogisen merkityksen tietyn tekstin. Kehyksen teoria perustuu lambda-laskentaan poikkeuksen käsittelyllä ja käyttää konteksteja, jatkumia, tapahtumia ja riippuvaisia tyyppejä käsittelemään monenlaisia monimutkaisia kielellisiä ilmiöitä, kuten aasianaforaa, verbifaasianaforaa, propositionaalista anaforaa, olettamuksia ja implikaatioita.', 'jv': 'Iki kéné rambarang Sensalan, sampeyan bungkar bukar kanggo semanti nglarang langa adalah sing ngewehke nggawe sensalan seneng pisan seneng dadi apik. Seneng theoriya sing diangkat nggunakake karo akeh kelas rampung lan gampang ning manut karo pakem nggawe barang, urip, dadi, eventune lan mulalah sing dipun nguasakno sing nyimpen karo akeh gampang akeh lan akeh akeh akeh akeh akeh lanjut, seneng donkey anaphora, verb seneng anaphora, suposiyonal anaphora, presupposition lan tambahan.', 'sk': 'Tukaj opisujemo Sensala , odprtokodni okvir za semantično interpretacijo naravnega jezika, ki zagotavlja logični pomen danega besedila. Teorija okvira temelji na lambdnem računu z obravnavanjem izjem in uporablja kontekste, nadaljevanja, dogodke in odvisne tipe za obravnavanje širokega spektra kompleksnih jezikovnih pojavov, kot so oslova anafora, glagolna fraza anafora, proposicijska anafora, predpostavke in implikacije.', 'ha': "Halin ne muna bayyana Sesala, wata firam mai buɗewa wa fassarar harshen asimi da ke ga fassarar da littãfin da aka ba. Faran firam na ɗauki a kan kalkulus ɗin lambda fãce idan ya yi amfani da shiryoyin, masu daidai, masu shiryuwa, da shiryuwa da wasu irin mutane da ke dõgara su yi amfani da wasu kalmõmi masu husũma na cikin linguistic, kamar anafora, misalin maganar jãkuna, na fassarar da za'a yi amfani da fanikin da za'a yi amfani da shi.", 'he': 'כאן אנחנו מתארים את סנסלה, מסגרת מקור פתוח לפרשנות סמנטית של שפה טבעית שמספקת את המשמעות הגיונית של טקסט מסוים. תיאוריה של המסגרת מבוססת על מחשב לאמבדה עם חוט טיפול ומשתמש בקשר, תמשיכות, אירועים וטיפוסים תלויים כדי לטפל בטווח רחב של תופעות שפותיות מורכבות, כמו אנפורה חמור, אנפורה ביטוי מילים, אנפורה מציעה, הניחושים וההשלכות.', 'bo': "འདིར་ང་ཚོས་སྐྱེས་སྐད་ཡིག་གི་semantic interpretation་ཀྱི་རང་རིས་སྐྱེས་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་ལྟ་བུ་དང་ཁ་འབྱེད་ཀྱི་རྒྱུ་དངོས་ཀྱི་གནད་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ The framework's theory is based on a lambda calculus with exception handling and uses contexts, continuations, events and dependent types to handle a wide range of complex linguistic phenomena, such as donkey anaphora, verb phrase anaphora, propositional anaphora, presuppositions and implicatures."}
{'en': 'On-Device Neural Language Model Based Word Prediction', 'ar': 'نموذج اللغة العصبية على الجهاز القائم على التنبؤ بالكلمات', 'es': 'Predicción de palabras basada en modelos de lenguaje neuronal en el dispositivo', 'fr': 'Prédiction de mots basée sur un modèle de langage neuronal intégré', 'pt': 'Previsão de palavras baseada em modelo de linguagem neural no dispositivo', 'ja': 'デバイス上の神経言語モデルに基づく単語予測', 'zh': '盖设备之神经语言模形之单词占也', 'hi': 'ऑन-डिवाइस तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल आधारित वर्ड भविष्यवाणी', 'ru': 'Прогнозирование слов на основе нейронной языковой модели на устройстве', 'ga': 'Tuar Focal Bunaithe ar Mhúnla Teanga ar an nGléas', 'el': 'Πρόβλεψη λέξεων βάσει μοντέλων νευρωνικής γλώσσας στη συσκευή', 'ka': 'მოწყობილობის ნეირალური ენათის მოდელი', 'it': 'Predizione delle parole basata sul modello di linguaggio neurale sul dispositivo', 'kk': 'Құрылғыдағы нейралық тіл үлгісі', 'lt': 'Įrenginio neurologinio kalbos modelio žodžių prognozė', 'hu': 'Eszközön belüli neurális nyelvmodell alapú szóelőrejelzés', 'ms': 'Prediksi Kata Berasas Model Bahasa Neural Pada Peranti', 'ml': 'On-Device Neural Language Model Based Word Prediction', 'mk': 'Предвидување на зборови базирани на моделот на неврален јазик на уредот', 'mn': 'Хэрэглэгч дээр мэдрэлийн хэл загварын үндсэн үг', 'pl': 'Prognozowanie słowa oparte na modelu języka neuronalnego na urządzeniu', 'mt': 'On-Device Neural Language Model Based Word Prediction', 'si': 'උපකරණයේ නියම භාෂා මොඩල් අධාරිත වචනය', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Predicție bazată pe modelul de limbaj neural pe dispozitiv', 'so': 'Qoraalka afka Neural ee ku saleysan qoraalka', 'sr': 'Neuralni jezik na uređaju osnovan predviđanje reči', 'sv': 'Ordprognos baserad på neural språkmodell på enheten', 'ta': 'சாதனத்தின் புதிய மொழி மாதிரி அடிப்படையான வார்த்தை முன்னுரிமை', 'ur': 'اون- دستگاه نیورال زبان موڈل بنیاد لغات پیش بینی', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Dự đoán ngôn ngữ thần kinh trên thiết bị', 'bg': 'Прогнозиране на думи, базирано на неврален език на устройството', 'da': 'Ordforudsigelse baseret på neural sprogmodel på enheden', 'nl': 'Op het apparaat gebaseerde woordvoorspelling op basis van neurale taal', 'hr': 'Model neuralnog jezika na uređaju osnovan predviđanje riječi', 'de': 'Neuronale Sprachmodellbasierte Wortvorhersage auf dem Gerät', 'id': 'Prediksi kata berdasarkan Model Bahasa Neural pada Perangkat', 'fa': 'نماد زبان عصبی روی دستگاه', 'ko': '설비 신경 언어 모델 기반 단어 예측', 'sw': 'Utawala wa Lugha ya Kifaransa', 'tr': 'Çaltylyk Neural Dili nusgala', 'af': 'Op- Toestel Nurale Taal Model Basies Woord Voorwoording', 'sq': 'Parashikimi i fjalëve bazuar në modelin e gjuhës nervore në dispozitë', 'am': 'ቋንቋ', 'hy': 'Արժեքի նյարդային լեզվի մոդել հիմնված բառերի կանխատեսումը', 'az': 'AygÄ±tlar NĂ¶ral Dili Modeli TÉ™k SĂ¶zĂĽ Ă–n', 'bn': 'অনডিভাইস নিউরেল ভাষা মডেল ভিত্তিক শব্দের পছন্দ', 'bs': 'Model neuralnog jezika na uređaju osnovan predviđanje riječi', 'ca': 'Predicció de paraules basada en el model de llenguatge neuronal en el dispositiu', 'cs': 'Předpověď slova založená na modelu neuronového jazyka na zařízení', 'et': 'Seadme neurokeele mudelil põhinev sõnaprognoos', 'fi': 'Laitteen hermokielimalliin perustuva sanaennuste', 'jv': 'echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world', 'sk': 'Napoved besed na osnovi modela živčnega jezika na napravi', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'ניתוח מילים מבוסס על מודל שפה נוירולית במכשיר', 'bo': 'སྒྲིག་ཆས་དང་འཁྲིལ་སྐྱོད་དབྱིབས་སྐད་རིགས་དཔེ་གཞི་བརྗོད་པའི་ཡིག་གེ་སྟོན་པ'}
{'en': 'Recent developments in deep learning with application to language modeling have led to success in tasks of text processing, summarizing and machine translation. However, deploying huge language models for the mobile device such as on-device keyboards poses computation as a bottle-neck due to their puny computation capacities. In this work, we propose an on-device neural language model based word prediction method that optimizes run-time memory and also provides a real-time prediction environment. Our model size is 7.40 MB and has average prediction time of 6.47 ms. Our proposed model outperforms the existing methods for word prediction in terms of keystroke savings and word prediction rate and has been successfully commercialized.', 'ar': 'أدت التطورات الأخيرة في التعلم العميق مع التطبيق على نمذجة اللغة إلى النجاح في مهام معالجة النصوص والتلخيص والترجمة الآلية. ومع ذلك ، فإن نشر نماذج لغوية ضخمة للجهاز المحمول ، مثل لوحات المفاتيح الموجودة على الجهاز ، يمثل الحساب بمثابة عنق زجاجة نظرًا لقدراتها الحسابية الضئيلة. في هذا العمل ، نقترح طريقة التنبؤ بالكلمات القائمة على نموذج اللغة العصبية على الجهاز والتي تعمل على تحسين ذاكرة وقت التشغيل وتوفر أيضًا بيئة توقع في الوقت الفعلي. حجم نموذجنا 7.40 ميجا بايت ويبلغ متوسط وقت التنبؤ 6.47 مللي ثانية. يتفوق نموذجنا المقترح على الأساليب الحالية للتنبؤ بالكلمات من حيث توفير ضغطات المفاتيح ومعدل التنبؤ بالكلمات وقد تم تسويقه بنجاح.', 'es': 'Los desarrollos recientes en el aprendizaje profundo con aplicación al modelado del lenguaje han llevado al éxito en las tareas de procesamiento de textos, resúmenes y traducción automática. Sin embargo, la implementación de enormes modelos de lenguaje para el dispositivo móvil, como los teclados de los dispositivos, plantea a la computación como un cuello de botella debido a sus capacidades de cálculo insignificantes. En este trabajo, proponemos un método de predicción de palabras basado en un modelo de lenguaje neuronal en el dispositivo que optimiza la memoria en tiempo de ejecución y también proporciona un entorno de predicción en tiempo real. El tamaño de nuestro modelo es de 7.40MB y tiene un tiempo de predicción promedio de 6.47 ms. Nuestro modelo propuesto supera a los métodos existentes para la predicción de palabras en términos de ahorro de pulsaciones de teclas y tasa de predicción de palabras, y se ha comercializado con éxito.', 'pt': 'Desenvolvimentos recentes em aprendizado profundo com aplicação à modelagem de linguagem levaram ao sucesso em tarefas de processamento de texto, resumo e tradução automática. No entanto, a implantação de grandes modelos de linguagem para o dispositivo móvel, como teclados no dispositivo, coloca a computação como um gargalo devido às suas capacidades computacionais insignificantes. Neste trabalho, propomos um método de previsão de palavras baseado em modelo de linguagem neural no dispositivo que otimiza a memória em tempo de execução e também fornece um ambiente de previsão em tempo real. O tamanho do nosso modelo é de 7,40 MB e tem um tempo médio de previsão de 6,47 ms. Nosso modelo proposto supera os métodos existentes para previsão de palavras em termos de economia de pressionamento de tecla e taxa de previsão de palavras e foi comercializado com sucesso.', 'fr': "Les récents développements dans le deep learning avec application à la modélisation linguistique ont permis de réussir les tâches de traitement de texte, de synthèse et de traduction automatique. Cependant, le déploiement d'énormes modèles de langage pour les appareils mobiles, tels que les claviers intégrés, pose le calcul comme un goulot d'étranglement en raison de leurs faibles capacités de calcul. Dans ce travail, nous proposons une méthode de prédiction de mots basée sur un modèle de langage neuronal sur appareil qui optimise la mémoire d'exécution et fournit également un environnement de prédiction en temps réel. La taille de notre modèle est de 7,40 Mo et a un temps de prédiction moyen de 6,47 ms. Notre modèle proposé surpasse les méthodes existantes de prédiction de mots en termes d'économies de frappe et de taux de prédiction de mots et a été commercialisé avec succès.", 'ru': 'Недавние разработки в области глубокого обучения с применением к языковому моделированию привели к успеху в задачах обработки текста, обобщения и машинного перевода. Тем не менее, развертывание огромных языковых моделей для мобильных устройств, таких как клавиатуры на устройстве, представляет вычисления как бутылочную горловину из-за их небольших вычислительных возможностей. В этой работе мы предлагаем метод предсказания слов на основе нейронной языковой модели на устройстве, который оптимизирует память во время выполнения, а также обеспечивает среду предсказания в реальном времени. Размер нашей модели составляет 7,40 МБ и имеет среднее время прогнозирования 6,47 мс. Наша предлагаемая модель превосходит существующие методы прогнозирования слов с точки зрения экономии при нажатии клавиш и скорости прогнозирования слов и была успешно коммерциализирована.', 'ja': '言語モデリングへの応用を伴うディープラーニングの最近の発展は、テキスト処理、要約、および機械翻訳のタスクの成功につながっています。しかしながら、デバイス上のキーボードなどのモバイルデバイスのための巨大な言語モデルを展開することは、それらのわずかな計算能力のために、ボトルネックとしての計算をもたらす。本研究では、実行時メモリを最適化し、リアルタイム予測環境も提供する、デバイス上のニューラル言語モデルに基づく単語予測法を提案する。当社のモデルサイズは7.40MBで、平均予測時間は6.47ミリ秒です。当社が提案するモデルは、キーストロークの節約とワード予測レートの観点から、既存のワード予測の方法を上回り、製品化に成功しています。', 'zh': '深学于言建模最新已成文本、总结、机器翻译之事。 然为移备部署大语(如设备者键盘)以其微计算能力为瓶颈。 设神经言模之单词,优化行内存,以备实时占。 大小为 7.40MB,均占时为 6.47 毫秒。 吾所谓击键省单词预测率优于今者单词占,已成商业化矣。', 'hi': 'भाषा मॉडलिंग के लिए आवेदन के साथ गहरी सीखने में हाल के विकास ने पाठ प्रसंस्करण, सारांश और मशीन अनुवाद के कार्यों में सफलता हासिल की है। हालांकि, मोबाइल डिवाइस के लिए विशाल भाषा मॉडल को तैनात करना जैसे ऑन-डिवाइस कीबोर्ड उनकी पुण्य गणना क्षमताओं के कारण बोतल-गर्दन के रूप में गणना करता है। इस काम में, हम एक ऑन-डिवाइस तंत्रिका भाषा मॉडल आधारित शब्द भविष्यवाणी विधि का प्रस्ताव करते हैं जो रन-टाइम मेमोरी को अनुकूलित करता है और एक वास्तविक समय भविष्यवाणी वातावरण भी प्रदान करता है। हमारे मॉडल का आकार 7.40MB है और 6.47 ms का औसत पूर्वानुमान समय है। हमारा प्रस्तावित मॉडल कीस्ट्रोक बचत और शब्द भविष्यवाणी दर के संदर्भ में शब्द भविष्यवाणी के लिए मौजूदा तरीकों को मात देता है और सफलतापूर्वक व्यावसायीकरण किया गया है।', 'ga': 'Mar gheall ar fhorbairtí a rinneadh le déanaí ar dhomhainfhoghlaim maidir le cur i bhfeidhm ar shamhaltú teanga, d’éirigh go maith le tascanna próiseála téacs, achoimre agus aistriúchán meaisín. Mar sin féin, má imscartar samhlacha teanga ollmhóra don ghléas soghluaiste ar nós méarchláir ar an ngléas, cruthaítear an ríomhaireacht mar mhuineál mar gheall ar a n-inniúlachtaí ríofa. Sa obair seo, molaimid modh tuar focal atá bunaithe ar mhúnla teanga néareolaíoch ar an ngléas a uasmhéadaíonn cuimhne an ama rite agus a sholáthraíonn timpeallacht réamh-mheastacháin fíor-ama freisin. Is é ár méid múnla ná 7.40MB agus tá meán-am réamhaisnéise de 6.47 ms. Sáraíonn ár múnla molta na modhanna reatha chun focal a thuar i dtéarmaí coigilteas eochairbhuillí agus ráta tuartha focal agus rinneadh tráchtálú rathúil uirthi.', 'hu': 'A nyelvmodellezésre való alkalmazással kapcsolatos mélytanulás közelmúltbeli fejleményei sikerrel jártak a szövegfeldolgozás, az összefoglalás és a gépi fordítás feladataiban. Azonban a hatalmas nyelvi modellek telepítése mobil eszközökre, mint például az eszközön lévő billentyűzetek, a számítást palacknyakként jelenti apró számítási kapacitásuk miatt. Ebben a munkában egy eszközön belüli neurális nyelvmodell alapú szóelőrejelzési módszert javasolunk, amely optimalizálja a futásidős memóriát és valós idejű előrejelzési környezetet is biztosít. Modellünk mérete 7,40 MB és átlagos előrejelzési idő 6,47 ms. Javasolt modellünk a billentyűleütés-megtakarítás és a szó-előrejelzés aránya tekintetében felülmúlja a meglévő módszereket, és sikeresen kereskedelembe került.', 'el': 'Πρόσφατες εξελίξεις στη βαθιά μάθηση με εφαρμογή στη γλωσσική μοντελοποίηση έχουν οδηγήσει σε επιτυχία σε εργασίες επεξεργασίας κειμένου, σύνοψης και μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Ωστόσο, η ανάπτυξη τεράστιων γλωσσικών μοντέλων για την κινητή συσκευή, όπως τα πληκτρολόγια της συσκευής, θέτει τον υπολογισμό ως εμπόδιο λόγω των μικροσκοπικών ικανοτήτων υπολογισμού τους. Σε αυτή την εργασία, προτείνουμε μια μέθοδο πρόβλεψης λέξεων βασισμένη σε μοντέλο νευρωνικής γλώσσας που βελτιστοποιεί τη μνήμη εκτέλεσης και παρέχει επίσης ένα περιβάλλον πρόβλεψης σε πραγματικό χρόνο. Το μέγεθος του μοντέλου μας είναι 7.40και έχει μέσο χρόνο πρόβλεψης 6.47 μ. Το προτεινόμενο μοντέλο ξεπερνά τις υπάρχουσες μεθόδους πρόβλεψης λέξεων όσον αφορά την εξοικονόμηση πληκτρολογίου και το ποσοστό πρόβλεψης λέξεων και έχει κυκλοφορήσει επιτυχώς.', 'ka': 'შემდეგ განვითარება ტექსტის პროცესის, საკითხვა და მანქანის გადაწყვეტილების დამუშაობაში დაიწყება. მაგრამ, მობილური მოწყობილობისთვის დიდი ენის მოდელეების გამოყენება, როგორც მოწყობილობის კლავიფორმაციის კომპუტიკაცია, როგორც ბუტური სახელის შესაძლებლობად, მათი კომ ამ სამუშაოში, ჩვენ დავიწყებთ ნეიროლური ენის მოდელს, რომელიც პროგრამიზებს სიტყვის წინასწორება, რომელიც პროგრამიზებს წინასწორებული სიტყვის მეხსიერება და ასევე რე ჩვენი მოდელური ზომა არის 7,40MB და საშუალო წარმოდგენების დრო 6,47 ms. ჩვენი მოდელური მოდელი გავაკეთება სიტყვების წარმოდგენების მიმდინარეობის მეტოვებისთვის სიტყვების წარმოდგენების და სიტყვების წ', 'it': "I recenti sviluppi nel deep learning con applicazione alla modellazione linguistica hanno portato al successo nelle attività di elaborazione del testo, sintesi e traduzione automatica. Tuttavia, l'implementazione di enormi modelli linguistici per i dispositivi mobili come le tastiere sul dispositivo pone il calcolo come un collo di bottiglia a causa delle loro scarse capacità di calcolo. In questo lavoro, proponiamo un metodo di predizione delle parole basato sul modello di linguaggio neurale sul dispositivo che ottimizza la memoria run-time e fornisce anche un ambiente di predizione in tempo reale. La nostra dimensione del modello è di 7,40 MB e ha un tempo medio di previsione di 6,47 ms. Il nostro modello proposto supera i metodi esistenti per la previsione delle parole in termini di risparmio di tasti e tasso di previsione delle parole ed è stato commercializzato con successo.", 'lt': 'Naujausi gilaus mokymosi pokyčiai taikant kalbų modeliavimą padėjo sėkmingai atlikti tekstų apdorojimo, santraukų ir mašininio vertimo užduotis. Tačiau naudojant didelius kalbinius modelius mobiliajam prietaisui, pavyzdžiui, prietaiso klaviatūroms, dėl jų mažų skaičiavimo pajėgumų skaičiavimas yra buteliuko kaklas. Šiame darbe siūlome įrenginio nervinės kalbos modeliu pagrįstą žodžių prognozavimo metodą, kuris optimizuoja veikimo laiko atmintį ir taip pat užtikrina realiojo laiko prognozavimo aplinką. Mūsų modelio dydis yra 7,40 MB ir vidutinis prognozavimo laikas yra 6,47 ms. Mūsų siūlomas model is yra didesnis už esamus žodžių prognozavimo metodus, kiek tai susiję su raktų sutaupymu ir žodžių prognozavimo greičiu, ir sėkmingai parduotas.', 'mk': 'Неодамнешните настани во длабоко учење со апликација на јазичното моделирање доведоа до успех во задачите на процесор на текст, резимулација и машински превод. Сепак, распоредувањето на огромни јазички модели за мобилниот уред, како што се клучевите на уредот, претставува компјутација како шише-врат поради нивните мали компјутерски капацитети. Во оваа работа, предложуваме модел на нервен јазик на уредот кој се базира на метод за предвидување на зборови кој оптимизира меморија на тек-времето и исто така обезбедува средина за предвидување во реално време. Нашата големина на моделот е 7,40 МБ и има просечно време за предвидување од 6,47 МБ. Нашиот предложен модел ги надминува постоечките методи за предвидување на зборови во поглед на заштедите од клучеви и стапката на предвидување на зборови и успешно е комерцијализиран.', 'kk': 'Қолданбаларды тіл моделинге қолдану үшін жаңа оқыту үшін жаңа жағдайлардың өзгерістері мәтін өңдеу, тұжырымдамасын және машинаны аудару тапсырмаларында сәтт Бірақ, құрылғыдағы пернетақталардың үлкен тіл үлгілерін, мысалы, оның есептеу мүмкіндіктерінің себебі, есептеу үшін қоршау үлгілері болады. Бұл жұмыс ішінде, құрылғыдағы невралдық тіл үлгісін негізделген сөздерді таңдау әдісін таңдаймыз. Бұл уақыт жады оптимизациялау және сондай-ақ шын уақытты таңдау ор Біздің үлгі өлшеміміз 7,40Мб. және орташа 6,47 мс. бақылау уақыты бар. Біздің таңдалған үлгіміз сөздерді бақылау әдістерін сөздерді сақтау және сөздерді бақылау жылдамдығында жұмыс істейді.', 'ml': 'ഭാഷ മോഡലോഡിങ്ങിലേക്കുള്ള പ്രയോഗത്തിന്റെ ആഴത്തില്\u200d പഠിക്കുന്ന പ്രവർത്തനങ്ങളില്\u200d അടുത്തുള്ള പ്രവർത്തനങ് However, deploying huge language models for the mobile device such as on-device keyboards poses computation as a bottle-neck due to their puny computation capacities.  ഈ ജോലിയില്\u200d, നമ്മള്\u200d ഉപകരണത്തിന്റെ ന്യൂറല്\u200d ഭാഷ മോഡല്\u200d പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കുന്നു. വാക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ള പ്രവചന രീതി നമ്മുടെ മോഡലിന്റെ വലിപ്പം 7.40എം. ബിറ്റിന്റെ സാധാരണ പ്രവചിക്കുന്ന സമയം 6.47 മിറ്റിന്റെ സമയമാണ്. നമ്മുടെ പ്രൊദ്ദേശിക്കപ്പെട്ട മോഡല്\u200d നിലവിലുള്ള രീത', 'mn': 'Сүүлийн үед хэл загварын талаар суралцах гүн гүнзгий хөгжлийн хөгжлийг текст процесс, жишээлбэл болон машины хөгжлийн үйл ажиллагаанд амжилттай болгодог. Гэвч маш том хэл загварын загварыг хөдөлгөөн дээрх төхөөрөмж дээрх клавиатурууд нь тооцоололтой тооцоололтой байдлаар хөдөлгөж байдаг. Энэ ажлын тулд бид төхөөрөмж дээрх мэдрэлийн хэл загварын үндсэн үг таамаглах арга загварыг сануулж, ажиллах цаг хугацааны санамж, мөн бодит цаг хугацааны таамаглах орчинд хангадаг. Бидний загварын хэмжээ нь 7.40МБ, дундаж таамаглах цаг нь 6.47 мс. байдаг. Бидний санал өгсөн загвар нь товчтой хэмжээний хадгалах, үгний таамаглах хурдаас илүү амжилттай худалдан авсан.', 'no': 'Nyleg utviklingar i dypt læring med program til språk-modellering har ført til suksess i oppgåver av teksthandsaming, samansering og maskinsomsetjing. Dette er imidlertid å utføra stor språk-modeller for mobileininga, som tastatur på eininga, for eksempel at datatastane på eininga plasserer kalkulasjonen som ein botnehald på grunn av dei påverka kalkulasjonskapasitetene. I denne arbeiden foreslår vi eit modell på eininga for neuralspråk basert ordforhåndsvisingsmetode som optimaliserer minne på køyringtid og tilbyr også eit verkeleg tidsspråving. Modellstorleiken vårt er 7,40 MB og har gjennomsnittlig foregåve tid på 6,47 ms. Vårt foregåve modell utfører dei eksisterande metodane for ordforhåndsvising i forhold til lagring av nøkkelstreka og forhåndsvising av ord og er vellykkeleg komercialisert.', 'mt': 'Żviluppi reċenti fit-tagħlim fil-fond bl-applikazzjoni għall-mudell tal-lingwi wasslu għal suċċess fil-kompiti tal-ipproċessar tat-test, is-sommarju u t-traduzzjoni bil-magna. Madankollu, l-użu ta’ mudelli lingwistiċi kbar għall-apparat mobbli bħall-klaviaturi fuq l-apparat jippreżenta l-komputazzjoni bħala għonq tal-flixkun minħabba l-kapaċitajiet ta’ komputazzjoni żgħar tagħhom. F’dan ix-xogħol, nipproponu metodu ta’ tbassir tal-kliem ibbażat fuq mudell tal-lingwa newrali fuq l-apparat li jtejjeb il-memorja ta’ run-time u jipprovdi wkoll ambjent ta’ tbassir f’ħin reali. Id-daqs tal-mudell tagħna huwa ta’ 7.40MB u għandu żmien medju ta’ tbassir ta’ 6.47 ms. Il-mudell propost tagħna jaqbeż il-metodi eżistenti għat-tbassir tal-kliem f’termini ta’ ffrankar ta’ keystroke u rata ta’ tbassir tal-kliem u ġie kkummerċjalizzat b’suċċess.', 'pl': 'Ostatnie rozwoje w zakresie głębokiego uczenia z zastosowaniem modelowania językowego doprowadziły do sukcesu w zadaniach przetwarzania tekstu, podsumowywania i tłumaczenia maszynowego. Jednak wdrożenie ogromnych modeli językowych dla urządzeń mobilnych, takich jak klawiatury urządzeń, stawia obliczenia jako butelkę ze względu na ich małe możliwości obliczeniowe. W niniejszej pracy proponujemy metodę prognozowania słów opartą na modelu języka neuronowego na urządzeniu, która optymalizuje pamięć czasu uruchomienia, a także zapewnia środowisko prognozowania w czasie rzeczywistym. Nasz model wynosi 7,40MB i ma średni czas przewidywania 6,47 ms. Nasz proponowany model przewyższa istniejące metody przewidywania słów pod względem oszczędności naciśnięć klawiszy i współczynnika przewidywania słów i został z powodzeniem skomercjalizowany.', 'sr': 'Nedavni razvoj dubokog učenja sa aplikacijom na jezički modeling doveo je do uspeha u zadatke obrade teksta, sažetke i prevode mašine. Međutim, raspoređivanje ogromnih jezičkih modela za mobilni uređaj kao što su na uređaju tastature postavljaju računalo kao vrat boce zbog njihovih punih kapaciteta računala. U ovom poslu predlažemo model neuralnog jezika na uređaju bazirani na metodi predviđanja riječi koja optimizira pamćenje trčanog vremena i pruža i okruženje predviđanja pravog vremena. Naša veličina modela je 7,40MB i ima prosječno predviđanje vrijeme od 6,47 ms. Naš predloženi model iznosi postojeće metode predviđanja riječi u smislu uštećenja ključnih udara i stope predviđanja riječi i uspešno je komercijalizovana.', 'ro': 'Evoluțiile recente în învățarea profundă cu aplicația la modelarea limbilor străine au condus la succes în sarcinile de procesare a textului, rezumare și traducere automată. Cu toate acestea, implementarea unor modele lingvistice uriașe pentru dispozitivele mobile, cum ar fi tastaturile pe dispozitiv, reprezintă calculul ca un gât de sticlă datorită capacităților lor de calcul mici. În această lucrare, propunem o metodă de predicție a cuvintelor bazată pe modelul de limbaj neural pe dispozitiv, care optimizează memoria run-time și oferă, de asemenea, un mediu de predicție în timp real. Dimensiunea modelului nostru este de 7.40MB și are un timp mediu de predicție de 6.47 ms. Modelul nostru propus depășește metodele existente de predicție a cuvintelor în ceea ce privește economisirea tastei și rata de predicție a cuvintelor și a fost comercializat cu succes.', 'sv': 'Den senaste utvecklingen inom djupinlärning med tillämpning av språkmodellering har lett till framgång i uppgifter som textbehandling, sammanfattning och maskinöversättning. Att distribuera enorma språkmodeller för mobila enheter som tangentbord på enheten innebär dock beräkning som en flaskhals på grund av deras ringa beräkningskapacitet. I detta arbete föreslår vi en on-device neural språkmodell baserad ordprediktionsmetod som optimerar körtidsminnet och även ger en realtidsprediktionsmiljö. Vår modell storlek är 7,40 MB och har en genomsnittlig förutsägelsetid på 6,47 ms. Vår föreslagna modell överträffar de befintliga metoderna för ordförutsägelse när det gäller knapptryckning och ordförutsägelsehastighet och har framgångsrikt kommersialiserats.', 'si': 'භාෂාව මොඩිලින් එක්ක ගොඩක් අභිවිධානය සඳහා ගොඩක් අභිවිධානය සඳහා ගොඩක් අභිවිධානය සඳහා පරිස් නමුත්, මෝබියුල් උපකරණය සඳහා ලොකු භාෂා මොඩේල් විසින් විශාල භාෂාව ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න, වගේම උපකරණයේ කීවබෝඩ් වලින් ඔ මේ වැඩේ අපි උපකරණයේ න්\u200dයූරල් භාෂාවක් අධාරිත විදියට පරීක්ෂණය විදියට ප්\u200dරතිචාරයක් ප්\u200dරතිචාර කරනවා ඒ වගේම දැ අපේ මොඩල් ප්\u200dරමාණය 7.40මැබියා වගේම සාමාන්\u200dය ප්\u200dරමාණය 6.47 මිස් වලින් තියෙනවා. අපේ ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය ප්\u200dරමාණය කරනවා වචන ප්\u200dරමාණය වලින්', 'so': 'Waxbarashada aad u dhow ee lagu barto codsashada sameynta luuqada waxaa liibaanay shaqooyinka baaraandegista qoraalka, koorsiga iyo turjumidda machine. Si kastaba ha ahaatee qalabka telefoonka waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa tusaale ahaan qalabka telefoonka lagu soo dirayo qaabab luuqad badan, sida looxyada qalabka caadiga ah waxaa lagu xisaabiyaa awoodooda xisaabinta darteed. Markaas waxan shaqada, waxaynu soo jeedaynaa model afka neurada ah oo ku saleysan qaabka sii-sheegidda hadalka oo ku qoran ah, kaas oo optimisiya xusuusta waqtiga lagu soconayo, waxaadna sidoo kale siineysaa deegaan la sii sheego waqtiga ah. Meherka modellkayagu waa 7.40MB wuxuuna leeyahay waqti la sii sheegayo 6.47 ms. Tusaalkayaga la soo jeeday ayaa ka muujiya qaababka joogta ah oo la sii sheegayo hadalka, taas oo ah badbaadada qalabka iyo heerka wax la sii sheego oo lagu liibaaniyey.', 'ur': 'زبان موڈلینگ کے ساتھ عمیق تعلیم کے ساتھ اگلے اگلوں کی تغییرات کی تغییرات کو متن پرسسس، سراسر سازی اور ماشین ترجمہ کے کاموں میں موفقیت دی گئی ہے. However, deploying huge language models for the mobile device such as on-device keyboards poses computation as a bottle-neck due to their puny computation capacities. اس کام میں، ہم نے ایک ایسی دستگاه نائرول زبان کی موڈل کی پیش بینی کی طریقہ پیش بینی کرتی ہے جو چلنے کی زمانہ یاد کرتا ہے اور ایک حقیقی زمان کی پیش بینی کی محیط بھی پیش بینی کرتا ہے. ہماری مدل کی اندازہ 7.40MB ہے اور اس کے متوسط 6.47 ms کی پیش بینی کی وقت ہے. ہماری پیش بینی کی مدل کلی استروک کے ذریعہ اور کلمات کی پیش بینی کے مطابق موجود طریقے سے زیادہ مطابق کرتا ہے اور موفق طور پر تجارت کی گئی ہے.', 'ms': 'Recent developments in deep learning with application to language modeling have led to success in tasks of text processing, summarizing and machine translation.  Namun, menggunakan model bahasa besar untuk peranti bimbit seperti papan kekunci peranti-peranti pose pengiraan sebagai leher botol kerana kapasiti pengiraan kecil mereka. Dalam kerja ini, kami cadangkan satu kaedah ramalan perkataan berdasarkan model bahasa saraf pada peranti yang mengaktifkan memori masa berjalan dan juga menyediakan persekitaran ramalan masa sebenar. Saiz model kita adalah 7.40MB dan mempunyai masa ramalan rata-rata 6.47 ms. Model kami diusulkan melampaui kaedah sedia ada untuk ramalan perkataan dalam terma simpanan strok kunci dan kadar ramalan perkataan dan telah berjaya dijual.', 'ta': 'மொழி மாதிரி வடிவமைப்புடன் அண்மையில் கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் முன்னேற்றங்கள் உரை செயல்படுத்தல், சுருக்குதல் மற்றும் இயந் However, deploying large language models for the mobile device such as on-device keyboards is computation as a bottle-neck because of their puny calculation capabilities. இந்த வேலையில், நாம் ஒரு சாதனத்தின் மூலம் புதிய மொழி மாதிரி முறைமையை பரிந்துரைக்கிறோம். செயல்படும் நேரத்தை நினைவகத்தை மேம்படுத் எங்கள் மாதிரி அளவு 7.40MB ஆகும் சராசரி முன்வாக்கி நேரம் 6.47 மி. நம் பரிந்துரைக்கப்பட்ட மாதிரி வார்த்தை முன்வாக்கி சேமிப்பு மற்றும் வார்த்தை முன்வாக்கி வ', 'uz': "Name Lekin, uyali uskunalar uchun katta til modellarini ajratish mumkin, huddi uskunalar tugmalari qiymati qobiliyatlari sababchi boʻlgan tugmalar birikmasiga hisoblanadi. Bu ishda, biz bu usulni bajarish vaqt xotirasi amalga oshirish va haqiqiqiy vaqt oldinga muhimkoniyatlarni bajarish mumkin. Bizning modelning oʻlchami 7.40MB va o'rtasida 6.47 m'ning o'rtasida o'rtacha prediction vaqti bor. Bizning davomida modelimiz tugmalar saqlash va soʻzni prediction rate va muvaffaqiyatli ishlab chiqaradi.", 'vi': 'Những phát triển gần đây trong việc học sâu với ứng dụng để tạo mẫu ngôn ngữ đã dẫn đến thành công trong các công việc xử lý văn bản, tóm tắt và phiên dịch máy. Tuy nhiên, sử dụng những mô hình ngôn ngữ khổng lồ cho thiết bị di động như những tấm bàn phím trên thiết bị đặt ra tính to án như một cái bình thường do khả năng tính toán nho nhỏ của chúng. Trong công việc này, chúng tôi đề xuất một phương pháp dự đoán ngôn ngữ thần kinh dựa trên thiết bị. Một phương pháp tối ưu tiên trí nhớ chạy thời gian và cung cấp một môi trường dự đoán thời gian thực. Mẫu của chúng tôi là 7.40MB và có thời gian dự đoán trung bình của 6.47 m. Đề nghị của chúng tôi hoàn thiện khả năng dự đoán các phương pháp dự đoán từ đã có trong tỉ lệ tiết kiệm và dự đoán từ khóa và đã được thương lượng thành công.', 'bg': 'Последните разработки в областта на дълбокото учене с приложение към езиковото моделиране доведоха до успех в задачите по текстова обработка, обобщаване и машинен превод. Въпреки това, разгръщането на огромни езикови модели за мобилното устройство, като клавиатури на устройства, поставя изчисленията като бутилка врата поради техните малки изчислителни способности. В тази работа предлагаме метод за предсказване на думи, базиран на невронен език на устройството, който оптимизира паметта за изпълнение и също така осигурява среда за предсказване в реално време. Размерът на модела ни е 7.40МБ и средното време за прогнозиране е 6.47 Предложеният модел надминава съществуващите методи за прогнозиране на думи по отношение на спестяване на клавишите и скоростта на прогнозиране на думи и е успешно комерсиализиран.', 'nl': 'Recente ontwikkelingen in deep learning met toepassing op taalmodellering hebben geleid tot succes in taken van tekstverwerking, samenvatting en machinevertaling. Het inzetten van enorme taalmodellen voor het mobiele apparaat, zoals toetsenborden op het apparaat, stelt berekening echter als een bottle-neck vanwege hun kleine rekencapaciteiten. In dit werk stellen we een op neuraal taalmodel gebaseerde woordvoorspellingsmethode voor die het runtime geheugen optimaliseert en ook een real-time voorspellingsomgeving biedt. Onze modelgrootte is 7.40MB en heeft een gemiddelde voorspellingstijd van 6.47 ms. Ons voorgestelde model overtreft de bestaande methoden voor woordvoorspelling in termen van toetsaanslag besparingen en woordvoorspelling snelheid en is succesvol gecommercialiseerd.', 'da': 'Den seneste udvikling inden for dyb læring med anvendelse til sprogmodellering har ført til succes i opgaver med tekstbehandling, opsummering og maskinoversættelse. Men implementering af enorme sprogmodeller til den mobile enhed såsom on-device keyboards udgør beregning som en flaskehalse på grund af deres ynkelige beregningskapaciteter. I dette arbejde foreslår vi en on-device neural sprogmodel baseret ordforudsigelsesmetode, der optimerer run-time hukommelse og også giver et real-time forudsigelsesmiljø. Vores modelstørrelse er 7,40 MB og har en gennemsnitlig forudsigelsestid på 6,47 ms. Vores foreslåede model overgår de eksisterende metoder til ordforudsigelse med hensyn til tastetryksbesparelser og ordforudsigelseshastighed og er blevet markedsført med succes.', 'de': 'Neuere Entwicklungen im Deep Learning mit Anwendung auf Sprachmodellierung haben zu erfolgreichen Aufgaben der Textverarbeitung, Zusammenfassung und maschinellen Übersetzung geführt. Allerdings stellt der Einsatz riesiger Sprachmodelle für mobile Endgeräte wie On-Device-Tastaturen die Berechnung aufgrund ihrer winzigen Rechenkapazitäten als Flaschenhals dar. In dieser Arbeit schlagen wir eine auf neuronalem Sprachmodell basierende Wortvorhersagemethode vor, die den Laufzeitspeicher optimiert und auch eine Echtzeit-Vorhersageumgebung bereitstellt. Unsere Modellgröße beträgt 7,40MB und hat eine durchschnittliche Vorhersagezeit von 6,47 ms. Unser vorgeschlagenes Modell übertrifft die bestehenden Methoden zur Wortvorhersage in Bezug auf Tastendruck Einsparungen und Wortvorhersage Rate und wurde erfolgreich kommerzialisiert.', 'hr': 'Nedavni razvoji dubokog učenja s primjenom na jezički modeling doveli su do uspjeha u zadatke obrade teksta, sažetke i prevode strojeva. Međutim, raspoređivanje ogromnih jezičkih modela za mobilni uređaj kao što su na uređaju ključne ploče postavljaju računalo kao vrat boce zbog njihovih punih kapaciteta računala. U ovom poslu predlažemo model neuralnog jezika na uređaju temeljenu metodu predviđanja riječi koja optimizira pamćenje trčanog vremena i pruža i okruženje predviđanja realnog vremena. Naša veličina modela je 7,40MB i ima prosječno predviđanje vrijeme od 6,47 ms. Naš predloženi model iznosi postojeće metode predviđanja riječi u smislu ušteđenja ključnih udara i stope predviđanja riječi i uspješno je reklamirana.', 'ko': '최근 몇 년 동안 언어 모델링에서의 깊이 있는 학습의 응용에 따라 텍스트 처리, 정리와 기계 번역 분야에서 성공을 거두었다.그러나 모바일 기기에 커다란 언어 모델(예를 들어 기기의 키보드)을 배치하는 것은 계산 능력 부족으로 인해 계산의 병목이 될 수 있다.이 작업에서 우리는 설비 신경 언어 모델을 바탕으로 하는 단어 예측 방법을 제시했다. 이 방법은 운행 시 메모리를 최적화하고 실시간 예측 환경을 제공했다.우리의 모델 크기는 7.40MB이고 평균 예측 시간은 6.47밀리초이다. 우리가 제시한 모델은 키 절약과 단어 예측률 면에서 기존의 단어 예측 방법보다 우수하며 상업화에 성공했다.', 'id': 'Kebangunan baru-baru ini dalam belajar dalam dengan aplikasi untuk model bahasa telah menyebabkan sukses dalam tugas proyeksi teks, penglihatan dan terjemahan mesin. Namun, menggunakan model bahasa besar untuk perangkat bergerak seperti papan kekunci pada perangkat pose komputasi sebagai leher botol karena kapasitas komputasi kecil mereka. Dalam pekerjaan ini, kami mengusulkan model bahasa saraf berbasis pada perangkat metode prediksi kata yang optimisasi ingatan waktu berjalan dan juga menyediakan lingkungan prediksi waktu nyata. Ukuran model kita adalah 7,40 MB dan memiliki rata-rata waktu prediksi 6,47 ms. Model kami diusulkan melampaui metode yang ada untuk prediksi kata dalam terma simpanan keystroke dan kadar prediksi kata dan telah berjaya komersialisasi.', 'sw': 'Maendeleo ya hivi karibuni katika kujifunza kwa kina na matumizi ya utoaji wa lugha yamesababisha mafanikio katika kazi za upasuaji wa maandishi, muhtasari na tafsiri ya mashine. Hata hivyo, kutuma mifano makubwa ya lugha kwa vifaa vya mkononi kama vile vipande vya vifaa vya vifaa vya vifaa vinaweza kuhesabiwa kama mfuko wa chupa kwa sababu ya uwezo wao wa kompyuta. Katika kazi hii, tunapendekeza modeli ya lugha ya kiurasia inayohusiana na utabiri wa neno ambalo inawezesha kukumbuka kwa muda na pia inatoa mazingira ya kutabiri kwa muda halisi. Kiwango chetu cha mifano ni 7.40MB na kina muda wa kutabiri wa wastani wa mita 6.47.', 'fa': 'توسعه های اخیرا در یادگیری عمیق با کاربرد به مدل زبانی به موفقیت در کارهای پرداخت متن، جمع کردن و ترجمه دستگاه رسیده است. با این حال، استفاده از مدل\u200cهای زبانی بزرگ برای دستگاه موبایل مانند کلید\u200cهای روی دستگاه محاسبات را به عنوان گردن بطری به خاطر توانایی محاسبات آنها قرار می\u200cدهد. در این کار، ما پیشنهاد می\u200cکنیم یک مدل روش پیش\u200cبینی کلمات بر روی دستگاه روش زبان عصبی که حافظه\u200cی اجرای زمان را بهترین می\u200cکند و همچنین یک محیط پیش\u200cبینی زمان واقعی را پیشنهاد می\u200cکند. اندازه مدل ما 7.40MB است و زمان پیش بینی متوسط 6.47 ms دارد. مدل پیشنهاد ما روش\u200cهای موجود برای پیش بینی کردن کلمه را به عنوان ذخیره\u200cهای ضربه\u200cهای کلید و نرخ پیش بینی کلمه\u200cها و با موفقیت تجارت شده است.', 'tr': 'Ullany힊 철wrenmek 체챌in uygulamalar bilen dil modellendirmek 체챌in 첵okary metin i힊lemegi, jemgy첵etleme we ma힊yny흫 terjimelerinde ba힊arnyga 첵철redi. 횦철ne, 철r채n uly dil nusgalary 체챌in 철r채n k철p체힊 hasaplamak ukyplaryna seb채bi hatlary bo첵nun챌 힊eklinde i힊le첵채r. Bu i힊de, biz device 체zerinde n채ural dil modinde s철z 철n체mleme y철ntemi teklip edip, zamany janla힊dyrmak 체챌in we 챌yky힊 zamany 철n체mleme y철ntemi sa첵la첵arlar. Bizi흫 modelimiz 7.40MB ululykda we orta 챌aklama wagtymyz 6.47 ms. Ta첵첵arlanan nusgasymyz ki챌i gezek ga첵d etmek we s철zleri흫 철ng철r체m derejesi 체챌in bar d채ldir we 체st체ne komersiallyk edildi.', 'sq': 'Zhvillimet e fundit në mësimin e thellë me aplikimin në modelimin e gjuhës kanë çuar në sukses në detyrat e procesimit të tekstit, përmbledhjes dhe përkthimit automatik. Megjithatë, vendosja e modeleve të mëdha gjuhësh për pajisjet e lëvizshme të tilla si tastieret e pajisjeve paraqet llogaritjen si një qafë shishe për shkak të kapaciteteve të tyre të vogla të llogaritjes. Në këtë punë, propozojmë një metodë parashikimi të fjalëve të modelit të gjuhës nervore të pajisjeve që optimizon kujtesën e kohës së lëvizjes dhe siguron gjithashtu një mjedis parashikimi në kohë reale. Madhësia jonë e modelit është 7.40 MB dhe ka një kohë mesatare parashikimi prej 6.47 ms. Modeli ynë i propozuar ekziston metodat ekzistuese për parashikimin e fjalëve lidhur me kursimet e goditjeve të çelësave dhe normën e parashikimit të fjalëve dhe është tregtuar me sukses.', 'hy': 'Լեզու մոդելավորման ընթացքում օգտագործվող համակարգչային ուսումնասիրության վերջին զարգացումները հանգեցրել են տեքստի վերամշակման, համառոտագրման և մեքենային թարգմանման խնդիրների հաջողության: Այնուամենայնիվ, բջջային սարքի մեծ լեզվի մոդելների օգտագործումը, ինչպիսիք են օրինակ սարքի ստեղծանիչները, համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային համակարգչային հնարավորությունների պատճառով է, որ նրանք փոքր Այս աշխատանքի ընթացքում մենք առաջարկում ենք մի նյարդային լեզվի մոդել, որը հիմնված է բառերի կանխատեսման մեթոդի վրա, որը օպտիմացնում է ընթացքի ժամանակի հիշողությունը և նաև ապահովում է իրական ժամանակի կանխատեսման միջավայր: Մեր մոդելի չափսը 7.40 ՄԲ է և ունի միջին կանխատեսման ժամանակ 6.47 ՄԲ: Մեր առաջարկված մոդելը արտադրում է բառերի կանխատեսման գոյություն ունեցող մեթոդները բառերի խնայողության և բառերի կանխատեսման արագության առումով և հաջողությամբ արտադրվում է:', 'am': 'በቋንቋ ምሳሌ መግለጫ ላይ በጥልቅ ትምህርት ውስጥ የሚደረግ ግንኙነቶች የጽሑፍ ማቀናቀል፣ ማጠቃለያ እና መሳሳይ ትርጉም በሚደረጉት ስራዎች ውስጥ ድል አግኝቷል፡፡ ነገር ግን የድምጽ ቋንቋ ምሳሌዎችን ለመስጠት፣ የድምፅ አካባቢዎች የኮንቦርቶቹን ቁጥጥር በቁጥጥር አካባቢ አንገቱ ነው፡፡ በዚህ ሥራ ላይ የናውሬል ቋንቋ ምሳሌ ለመፍጠር የሚደረገውን የቃላትን ቅድሚያ ማድረግ እና የጊዜውን ማስታወሻ ማቀናቀል እና እውነተኛውን የጊዜውን ትንቢት አካባቢ እናደርጋለን፡፡ የሞዴል መጠን 7.40MB ነው የ6.47 ሚትር ጥያቄ አለው። በተዘጋጀን ሞዴል የቃልን ትንቢት ማድረግ እና የቃላትን ትንቢት ማድረግ እና የንግግር ትንቢት ቁጥጥር በመስጠት የተሻለ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Dil modellərinə uyğulama ilə çox çətin öyrənmələrin son dəyişiklikləri mətn işləməsi, qurğulama və maşına çeviriş işlərində başarısız olaraq gəldi. Lakin, mobil avadanlığı üçün böyük dil modellərini, cihaz anahtarları kimi, hesablama qabiliyyətləri üzündən şiddətli boyunları olaraq hesablama məqsədilə təşkil edir. Bu işdə, biz on-device nöral dil modeli təklif edirik ki, çalışma zamanı yadına optimizləndirir və həmçinin həqiqət zamanlı tədbir çevresini təklif edir. Modelimiz ölçüsü 7,40MB və ortalama tədbir vaxtı 6,47 ms. Bizim tədbir modelimiz anahtar sıxıntıları və sözlərin tədbir hüquqları ilə müvəffəqiyyəti ilə yazılmış və müvəffəqiyyətlə ticarət edilmişdir.', 'bn': 'ভাষার মডেলিং দ্বারা গভীর শিক্ষার সাম্প্রতিক উন্নয়নের ফলে টেক্সট প্রক্রিয়া, সার্মিনিং এবং মেশিন অনুবাদের কাজে স তবে মোবাইল ডিভাইসের জন্য বিশাল ভাষার মডেল প্রস্তুত করা হচ্ছে, যেমন ডিভাইসের কীবোর্ড তাদের বোতল-ঘাড়ের কারণে তাদের গণনার ক্ষমতার কা এই কাজে আমরা একটি ডিভাইসের নিউরেল ভাষার মডেল প্রস্তাব করি ভিত্তিক শব্দের ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী পদ্ধতি যা চালানো সময়ের মেমরি অপ্রায়িক করে এবং তার আমাদের মডেলের আকার ৭. ৪০এমবিট এবং সাধারণত ভবিষ্যদ্বাণী সময় ৬. ৪৭ মিটার। আমাদের প্রস্তাবিত মডেল কীস্ট্রোক সংরক্ষণ এবং শব্দ ভবিষ্যৎবাণী হারের মাধ্যমে বিদ', 'bs': 'Nedavni razvoj dubokog učenja s aplikacijom na jezički modeling doveo je do uspjeha u zadatke obrade teksta, sažetke i prevode strojeva. Međutim, raspoređivanje ogromnih jezičkih modela za mobilni uređaj kao što su na uređaju tastature postavljaju računalo kao vrat boce zbog njihovih punih kapaciteta računala. U ovom poslu predlažemo metodu predviđanja riječi na uređaju koji optimizira pamćenje trčanog vremena i pruža i okruženje predviđanja realnog vremena. Naša veličina modela je 7,40MB i ima prosječno predviđanje vrijeme od 6,47 ms. Naš predloženi model iznosi postojeće metode predviđanja riječi u smislu ušteđenja ključnih udara i stope predviđanja riječi i uspješno je komercijalizovana.', 'cs': 'Nedávný vývoj hlubokého učení s aplikací na jazykové modelování vedl k úspěchu v úkolech zpracování textu, shrnutí a strojového překladu. Nasazení obrovských jazykových modelů pro mobilní zařízení, jako jsou klávesnice na zařízení, však představuje výpočet jako láhev kvůli jejich malým výpočetním kapacitám. V této práci navrhujeme metodu predikce slov založenou na neuronovém jazykovém modelu na zařízení, která optimalizuje běžnou paměť a také poskytuje prostředí predikce v reálném čase. Naše velikost modelu je 7,40MB a má průměrnou predikční dobu 6,47 ms. Náš navržený model překonává stávající metody predikce slova z hlediska úspor stisků klávesy a míry predikce slova a byl úspěšně komercializován.', 'ca': "Els desenvolupaments recents en l'aprenentatge profund amb l'aplicació a la modelació lingüística han portat a l'èxit en tasques de processament de text, resum i traducció màquina. Tanmateix, desplegar grans models de llenguatge per al dispositiu mòbil, com els teclats en dispositiu, representa la computació com un coll de botella a causa de les seves petites capacitats de computació. En aquesta feina, proposem un mètode de predicció de paraules basat en un model de llenguatge neural en dispositiu que optimitza la memòria en temps d'execució i també proporciona un entorn de predicció en temps real. La nostra mida del model és de 7,40 MB i té un temps de predicció mitjà de 6,47 ms. El nostre model proposat supera els mètodes existents de predicció de paraules en termes d'estalvi de frases clau i de velocitat de predicció de paraules i ha estat comercialitzat amb èxit.", 'af': "Onlangse ontwikkelinge in diep leer met toepassing na taal modellering het na sukses gelei in opdragte van teks verwerking, opsomming en masjien vertaling. Maar, wat groot taal modelles vir die mobile toestel soos op-toestel sleutelbord plaas berekening as 'n bottelnek vanweë hul punt rekenaar kapasiteit. In hierdie werk voorstel ons 'n op-toestel neurale taal model gebaseerde woord voorskou metode wat optimaliseer looptyd geheue en ook verskaf 'n reël-tyd voorskou omgewing. Ons model grootte is 7.40mb en het gemiddelde voorskou tyd van 6.47 ms. Ons voorgestelde model uitvoer die bestaande metodes vir woord voorskou in terms van sleutelstrak stooring en woord voorskou tempo en is suksesvol komercialiseer.", 'et': 'Hiljutised arengud sügavõppes keele modelleerimise rakendamisega on viinud edu teksti töötlemise, kokkuvõtluse ja masintõlke ülesannetes. Kuid tohutute keelemudelite kasutuselevõtt mobiilseadmele, nagu seadme klaviatuurid, kujutab arvutust oma väikese arvutusvõimekuse tõttu pudelikaela. Käesolevas töös pakume välja seadme neurokeele mudelil põhineva sõna ennustamise meetodi, mis optimeerib tööaja mälu ja pakub ka reaalajas ennustamiskeskkonda. Meie mudeli suurus on 7,40 MB ja keskmine prognoosiaeg 6,47 ms. Meie kavandatud mudel ületab olemasolevaid sõna prognoosimise meetodeid klahvivajutuste säästmise ja sõna prognoosimise kiiruse osas ning on edukalt turustatud.', 'fi': 'Syväoppimisen viimeaikainen kehitys kielimallinnukseen on johtanut menestykseen tekstinkäsittelyn, yhteenvedon ja konekääntämisen tehtävissä. Kuitenkin valtavien kielimallien käyttöönotto mobiililaitteelle, kuten laitteen näppäimistöt, asettaa laskennan pullonkaulaksi niiden mitättömien laskentakykyjen vuoksi. Tässä työssä ehdotamme laitepohjaista sanaennustusmenetelmää, joka optimoi ajomuistin ja tarjoaa myös reaaliaikaisen ennusteympäristön. Mallimme koko on 7,40 MB ja sen keskimääräinen ennusteaika on 6,47 ms. Ehdotettu malli on nopeampi kuin nykyiset sananennustusmenetelmät näppäinpainalluksen säästöjen ja sananennustusnopeuden suhteen ja se on kaupallistettu menestyksekkäästi.', 'jv': 'FindOK Nonecal, depicting enormo language modes for the mobile device like on-device keybindings puts accountation as a bot In this job, we proposal an on modellu waenganggo sampeyan wis 7.400MB dan cadeh wektu preiant 6.7 ms in', 'sk': 'Nedavni razvoj globokega učenja z uporabo jezikovnega modeliranja je pripeljal do uspeha pri nalogah obdelave besedila, povzetka in strojnega prevajanja. Vendar pa uvajanje ogromnih jezikovnih modelov za mobilno napravo, kot so tipkovnice na napravi, predstavlja računalništvo kot vrat steklenice zaradi svojih majhnih računalniških zmogljivosti. V tem delu predlagamo metodo napovedovanja besed z nevronskim jezikom na napravi, ki optimizira delovni pomnilnik in zagotavlja tudi okolje napovedovanja v realnem času. Velikost modela je 7,40 MB in ima povprečni čas napovedi 6,47 ms. Naš predlagani model presega obstoječe metode napovedovanja besed v smislu prihrankov pri tipkah in hitrosti napovedovanja besed in je bil uspešno komercializiran.', 'he': 'התפתחות האחרונות בלמדה עמוקה עם שימוש לדוגמאת שפות הובילו להצלחה במשימות של עיבוד טקסט, מסכם ותרגום מכונות. However, deploying huge language models for the mobile device such as on-device keyboards poses computation as a bottle-neck due to their puny computation capacities.  In this work, we propose an on-device neural language model based word prediction method that optimizes run-time memory and also provides a real-time prediction environment.  הגודל של המודל שלנו הוא 7.40 MB ויש לו זמן צפוי ממוצע של 6.47 ms. המודל המוצע שלנו מתגבר על השיטות הקיומות לחזוי מילים במונחים של חסכון מכת מפתח וקצב צפוי מילים והוא הופך למסחר בהצלחה.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis A lokacin da, ka aika da misãlai mai girma wa shirin ayuka mai mobile kamar kwamfyutan kayan kwamfyuta kan shirin ayuka, yana da lissafa kamar wani abu da ke cikin wuri-wuri, saboda da abincin ya kamata. Daga wannan aikin, Munã buɗe wani misali na'urar harshen neural a kan shirin ayuka, yana da amfani da shiryoyin ayuka na shaidar ɗabi'a da lokaci na tafiyar da kuma yana samar da mazaɓa mai bayani na lokaci da ke gaskata. Kimar misalinmu ya zama 7,40Mb kuma yana da lokaci mai bayani na 6.47 misãlai wanda aka buƙata yana ƙaranci da hanyoyinMu masu buƙata wa kungiyar maganar da ke cikin muhimmin adana ko kuma an sami babban rabo.", 'bo': 'Recent developments in deep learning with application to language modeling have led to success in tasks of text processing, summarizing and machine translation. ཡིན་ནའང་སྐུད In this work, we propose an on-device neural language model based word prediction method that optimizes run-time memory and also provides a real-time prediction environment. ང་ཚོའི་མ་དབྱིབས་ཀྱི་ཆེ་ཆུང་དེ་7ས་40ས་ཡོད་པས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྔོན་ཚུལ་གྱི་དུས་བཏང་ཡོད།'}
{'en': 'WARP-Text : a Web-Based Tool for Annotating Relationships between Pairs of Texts', 'ar': 'WARP-Text: أداة قائمة على الويب لتوضيح العلاقات بين أزواج من النصوص', 'pt': 'WARP-Text: uma ferramenta baseada na Web para anotar relacionamentos entre pares de textos', 'es': 'Warp-text: una herramienta basada en web para anotar relaciones entre pares de textos', 'fr': 'Warp-Text\xa0: un outil Web pour annoter les relations entre des paires de textes', 'ja': 'WARP - Text ：テキストのペア間の関係をアノテーションするためのWebベースのツール', 'hi': 'WARP-पाठ: ग्रंथों के जोड़े के बीच संबंध Annotating के लिए एक वेब-आधारित उपकरण', 'ru': 'WARP-Text: веб-инструмент для аннотирования отношений между парами текстов', 'zh': 'WARP-Text曰:一者, Web 之具也', 'ga': 'WARP-Text: Uirlis Ghréasánbhunaithe chun An Caidreamh idir Péire Téacsanna a Anó', 'ka': 'Comment', 'el': 'Ένα εργαλείο βασισμένο στο διαδίκτυο για την παρατήρηση σχέσεων μεταξύ ζευγαριών κειμένων', 'hu': 'WARP-Text: egy webalapú eszköz a szövegpárok közötti kapcsolatok jegyzetelésére', 'it': 'WARP-Text: uno strumento basato sul Web per annotare le relazioni tra coppie di testi', 'kk': 'WARP- мәтін: мәтіннің қосымшалар арасындағы қатынастарды белгілеу құралы', 'lt': 'WARP tekstas: internetinė įrankis tekstų poroms skirtų santykių anotacijai', 'mk': 'WARP- текст: веб- базирана алатка за анатирање на односите помеѓу паровите на тексти', 'ml': 'വാര്\u200dപ്- പദാവലി: പദാവലികളുടെ ഇടയിലുള്ള വെബ്- അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഒരു ഉപകരണം', 'mn': 'WARP-Текст: Текст хоорондын хоорондын харилцааныг анзаарах Веб-үндсэн хэрэгсэл', 'no': 'WARP- tekst: eit nettbasert verktøy for annotering relasjonar mellom Pair av tekst', 'mt': 'Test WARP: Għodda bbażata fuq l-Internet għall-Annotazzjoni tar-Relazzjonijiet bejn Pawġi ta’ Testi', 'pl': 'WARP-Text: internetowe narzędzie do komentowania relacji między parami tekstów', 'ro': 'WARP-Text: un instrument bazat pe Web pentru adnotarea relațiilor dintre perechi de texte', 'sr': 'WARP-tekst: Web-bazirani alat za annotaciju odnosa između pare teksta', 'sv': 'WARP-Text: ett webbaserat verktyg för att kommentera relationer mellan par av texter', 'si': 'WARP- පාළුව: පාළුවන් සම්බන්ධතාවක් අතර සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා වෙබ- ආධාරිත උපකරණය', 'ms': 'WARP-Text: a Web-Based Tool for Annotating Relationships between Pairs of Texts', 'so': 'WARP-Text: a Web-Based Tool for Annotation Relations between Pairs of Texts', 'ta': 'WARP- உரை: உரைகளின் இடையே தொடர்புகளை அறிவிப்பதற்கான இணைய- அடிப்படையான கருவி', 'ur': 'WARP- TEXT: ایک ویب- بنیادی تولید ٹیکسٹ کے جوڑوں کے درمیان رابطہ نوٹ کرنے کے لئے', 'uz': 'Comment', 'vi': 'Lời cảnh báo: Công cụ Dùng nội dung giải thích mối quan hệ giữa các bút', 'bg': 'Уеб-базиран инструмент за анотиране на взаимоотношения между двойки текстове', 'da': 'WARP-Text: et webbaseret værktøj til notering af relationer mellem par tekster', 'nl': 'WARP-Text: een web-based hulpmiddel voor het annoteren van relaties tussen paren van teksten', 'hr': 'WARP-tekst: internetski alat za annotaciju odnosa između pare teksta', 'ko': 'WARP Text: 텍스트 쌍 간의 관계를 주석화하는 웹 기반 도구', 'de': 'WARP-Text: ein webbasiertes Werkzeug zur Annotation von Beziehungen zwischen Textpaaren', 'id': 'WARP-Text: a Web-Based Tool for Annotating Relationships between Pairs of Texts', 'fa': 'متن WARP: یک ابزار بنیاد وب برای نوشتن رابطه بین جفت متن', 'sw': 'WARP-Maandishi: Kifaa cha Kutumia Mtandao kwa Kutangaza uhusiano kati ya Maandishi ya Maandishi', 'sq': 'WARP-Text: një mjet i bazuar në internet për të vënë në dukje marrëdhëniet midis dy teksteve', 'tr': 'WARP-Metin: Metin Pairs of Texts arasındaki ilişkileri duyurmak için web tabanlı bir araç', 'am': 'WARP-Text: a Web-Based Tool for Annotating Relations between Pairs of Texts', 'af': "Warp- Teks: ' n Webgebaseerde hulpmiddel vir aanmerking van verwantings tussen Pairs van Teks", 'hy': 'Warp-Text. տեքստի զույգերի միջև հարաբերությունների նշումների վեբ-հիմնված գործիք', 'bn': 'WARP-Text: a Web-Based Tool for Annotating Relationships between Pairs of Texts', 'ca': 'WARP-Text: una eina web per anotar les relacions entre parelles de textos', 'cs': 'WARP-Text: webový nástroj pro anotování vztahů mezi páry textů', 'bs': 'WARP-tekst: internetski alat za annotaciju odnosa između pare teksta', 'fi': 'WARP-Text: Web-pohjainen työkalu tekstiparien välisten suhteiden merkitsemiseen', 'et': 'WARP-Text: veebipõhine tööriist tekstipaaride vaheliste suhete annoteerimiseks', 'az': 'WARP-Metin: Metin İşləri arasındakı İlişkiləri Annotating üçün Web-Based Tool', 'jv': 'WARP-Teks: a web-Based Tool for Text', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'Name', 'sk': 'WARP-Text: spletno orodje za označevanje odnosov med parom besedil', 'bo': 'WARP-Text: a Web-Based Tool for Annotating Relationships between Pairs of Texts'}
{'en': 'We present WARP-Text, an open-source web-based tool for annotating relationships between pairs of texts. WARP-Text supports multi-layer annotation and custom definitions of inter-textual and intra-textual relationships. Annotation can be performed at different granularity levels (such as sentences, phrases, or tokens). WARP-Text has an intuitive user-friendly interface both for project managers and annotators. WARP-Text fills a gap in the currently available NLP toolbox, as open-source alternatives for annotation of pairs of text are not readily available. WARP-Text has already been used in several annotation tasks and can be of interest to the researchers working in the areas of Paraphrasing, Entailment, Simplification, and Summarization, among others.', 'ar': 'نقدم WARP-Text ، وهي أداة مفتوحة المصدر قائمة على الويب لشرح العلاقات بين أزواج من النصوص. يدعم WARP-Text التعليقات التوضيحية متعددة الطبقات والتعريفات المخصصة للعلاقات بين النص وداخل النص. يمكن إجراء التعليقات التوضيحية بمستويات دقة مختلفة (مثل الجمل أو العبارات أو الرموز). يحتوي WARP-Text على واجهة سهلة الاستخدام سهلة الاستخدام لكل من مديري المشاريع والمعلقين. يملأ WARP-Text فجوة في مربع أدوات البرمجة اللغوية العصبية المتاح حاليًا ، حيث لا تتوفر بدائل مفتوحة المصدر للتعليق التوضيحي لأزواج النص. تم استخدام WARP-Text بالفعل في العديد من مهام التعليقات التوضيحية ويمكن أن تكون ذات فائدة للباحثين العاملين في مجالات إعادة الصياغة والاستنتاج والتبسيط والتلخيص ، من بين أمور أخرى.', 'es': 'Presentamos Warp-text, una herramienta web de código abierto para anotar relaciones entre pares de textos. El texto de deformación admite anotaciones de múltiples capas y definiciones personalizadas de relaciones intertextuales e intratextuales. La anotación se puede realizar en diferentes niveles de granularidad (como oraciones, frases o fichas). Warp-text tiene una interfaz intuitiva y fácil de usar tanto para los gestores de proyectos como para los anotadores. El texto de distorsión llena un vacío en la caja de herramientas de PNL actualmente disponible, ya que las alternativas de código abierto para la anotación de pares de texto no están disponibles fácilmente. El texto Warp ya se ha utilizado en varias tareas de anotación y puede ser de interés para los investigadores que trabajan en las áreas de Paráfrasis, Implicación, Simplificación y Resumen, entre otras.', 'fr': "Nous présentons Warp-Text, un outil Web open source pour annoter les relations entre des paires de textes. Warp-Text prend en charge les annotations multicouches et les définitions personnalisées des relations intertextuelles et intra-textuelles. L'annotation peut être effectuée à différents niveaux de granularité (tels que des phrases, des phrases ou des jetons). Warp-Text possède une interface intuitive et conviviale à la fois pour les chefs de projet et les annotateurs. Warp-Text comble une lacune dans la boîte à outils NLP actuellement disponible, car les alternatives open source pour l'annotation de paires de texte ne sont pas facilement disponibles. Le texte Warp a déjà été utilisé dans plusieurs tâches d'annotation et peut intéresser les chercheurs travaillant dans les domaines de la paraphrase, de l'implication, de la simplification et de la synthèse, entre autres.", 'pt': 'Apresentamos o WARP-Text, uma ferramenta baseada na web de código aberto para anotar relacionamentos entre pares de textos. O WARP-Text suporta anotações multicamadas e definições personalizadas de relacionamentos intertextuais e intratextuais. A anotação pode ser realizada em diferentes níveis de granularidade (como frases, frases ou tokens). O WARP-Text possui uma interface intuitiva e amigável tanto para gerentes de projeto quanto para anotadores. WARP-Text preenche uma lacuna na caixa de ferramentas de PNL atualmente disponível, pois alternativas de código aberto para anotação de pares de texto não estão prontamente disponíveis. O WARP-Text já foi utilizado em diversas tarefas de anotação e pode ser de interesse dos pesquisadores que atuam nas áreas de Parafraseamento, Enlace, Simplificação e Sumarização, entre outras.', 'ja': 'WARP - Textは、テキストのペア間の関係をアノテーションするためのオープンソースのWebベースのツールです。WARP - Textは、テキスト間およびテキスト内関係の多層アノテーションおよびカスタム定義をサポートしています。注釈は、異なる粒度レベル（文章、フレーズ、またはトークンなど）で実行できます。WARP - Textは、プロジェクトマネージャーとアノテーターの両方にとって直感的で使いやすいインターフェースを備えています。WARP - Textは、現在利用可能なNLPツールボックスのギャップを埋めます。テキストのペアのアノテーションのためのオープンソースの代替手段は容易には利用できないためです。WARP - Textはすでにいくつかの注釈タスクで使用されており、パラフレーズ、エンターテイメント、簡略化、要約などの分野で働く研究者にとって興味深いものとなり得る。', 'hi': 'हम WARP-Text, ग्रंथों के जोड़े के बीच संबंधों को एनोटेट करने के लिए एक ओपन-सोर्स वेब-आधारित उपकरण प्रस्तुत करते हैं। WARP-Text बहु-परत एनोटेशन और अंतर-पाठ्य और इंट्रा-टेक्स्टसंबंधों की कस्टम परिभाषाओं का समर्थन करता है। एनोटेशन को विभिन्न ग्रैन्युलैरिटी स्तरों (जैसे वाक्यों, वाक्यांशों या टोकन) पर किया जा सकता है। WARP-पाठ दोनों परियोजना प्रबंधकों और annotators के लिए एक सहज ज्ञान युक्त उपयोगकर्ता के अनुकूल इंटरफ़ेस है. WARP-Text वर्तमान में उपलब्ध NLP टूलबॉक्स में एक अंतर भरता है, क्योंकि पाठ के जोड़े के एनोटेशन के लिए ओपन-सोर्स विकल्प आसानी से उपलब्ध नहीं हैं। WARP-Text का उपयोग पहले से ही कई एनोटेशन कार्यों में किया जा चुका है और दूसरों के बीच, पैराफ्रेसिंग, Entailment, सरलीकरण और सारांश के क्षेत्रों में काम करने वाले शोधकर्ताओं के लिए रुचि का हो सकता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем WARP-Text, веб-инструмент с открытым исходным кодом для аннотирования связей между парами текстов. WARP-Text поддерживает многоуровневую аннотацию и пользовательские определения интертекстуальных и внутритекстуальных отношений. Аннотация может быть выполнена на разных уровнях детализации (например, предложения, фразы или маркеры). WARP-Text имеет интуитивно понятный пользовательский интерфейс как для менеджеров проектов, так и для аннотаторов. WARP-Text заполняет пробел в существующем наборе инструментов NLP, поскольку альтернативы с открытым исходным кодом для аннотирования пар текста не всегда доступны. WARP-Text уже использовался в нескольких задачах аннотации и может представлять интерес для исследователей, работающих в областях перефразирования, влечения, упрощения и суммирования, среди прочих.', 'zh': '吾言WARP-Text者,Web之开源具,所以注文也。 WARP-Text 持文本间与文本内所系多批注自定义。 可以粒度级(句、短语、表)行批注。 WARP-Text有直观用户好界面,宜用项目经理注。 WARP-Text补NLP工具箱之空白,以解文之开源易得也。 WARP-Text既施于数注,而在释义,简化摘要域之人,可得而乐也。', 'ga': 'Cuirimid WARP-Text i láthair, uirlis foinse oscailte gréasán-bhunaithe chun an caidreamh idir péirí téacsanna a anó. Tacaíonn WARP-Text le nótáil ilchiseal agus sainmhínithe saincheaptha ar chaidrimh idirthéacsúla agus laistigh den téacs. Is féidir anótáil a dhéanamh ag leibhéil ghráinneacha éagsúla (amhail abairtí, frásaí, nó comharthaí). Tá comhéadan iomasach so-úsáidte ag WARP-Text do bhainisteoirí tionscadail agus do nótaíadóirí araon. Líonann WARP-Text bearna sa bhosca uirlisí NLP atá ar fáil faoi láthair, toisc nach bhfuil roghanna foinse oscailte eile le haghaidh péirí téacs a nótaí ar fáil go héasca. Baineadh úsáid as WARP-Text cheana féin i roinnt tascanna anótála agus is féidir leis a bheith ina ábhar spéise do na taighdeoirí atá ag obair sna réimsí a bhaineann le hAthphrasú, Ceanglúchán, Simpliú agus Achoimriú, i measc nithe eile.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a WARP-Text, egy nyílt forráskódú webalapú eszközt a szövegpárok közötti kapcsolatok jegyzetelésére. A WARP-Text támogatja a többrétegű jegyzetelést és a szövegközi és szövegközi kapcsolatok egyéni definícióit. A jegyzékek különböző szemcsézettségi szinteken végezhetők (például mondatok, kifejezések vagy tokenek). A WARP-Text intuitív felhasználóbarát felülettel rendelkezik mind a projektmenedzserek, mind a kommentátorok számára. A WARP-Text hiányt tölt ki a jelenleg rendelkezésre álló NLP eszköztárban, mivel nem állnak rendelkezésre nyílt forráskódú alternatívák a szövegpárok jegyzetelésére. A WARP-Text már számos jegyzetelési feladatban is használható, és érdekes lehet többek között a parafrazírozás, a kiterjesztés, az egyszerűsítés és az összefoglalás területén dolgozó kutatók számára.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα εργαλείο ανοικτού κώδικα για την παρατήρηση σχέσεων μεταξύ ζευγαριών κειμένων. Το κείμενο υποστηρίζει σχολιασμούς πολλαπλών επιπέδων και προσαρμοσμένους ορισμούς μεταξύ κειμένων και ενδοκειμένων σχέσεων. Οι σχολιασμοί μπορούν να εκτελεστούν σε διαφορετικά επίπεδα κοκκοποίησης (όπως προτάσεις, φράσεις ή μάρκες). Το κείμενο έχει μια διαισθητική φιλική προς το χρήστη διεπαφή τόσο για τους διαχειριστές έργων όσο και για τους σχολιαστές. Το κείμενο γεμίζει ένα κενό στο τρέχον διαθέσιμο πλαίσιο εργαλείων καθώς οι εναλλακτικές λύσεις ανοιχτού κώδικα για τη σχολιασμό ζευγαριών κειμένου δεν είναι άμεσα διαθέσιμες. Το κείμενο έχει ήδη χρησιμοποιηθεί σε διάφορες εργασίες σχολιασμού και μπορεί να αποτελέσει ενδιαφέρον για τους ερευνητές που εργάζονται στους τομείς της παράφρασης, της εκσυγχρονισμού, της απλοποίησης και της συνοψίας, μεταξύ άλλων.', 'kk': 'Мәтін арасындағы қатынастарды белгілеу үшін WARP- мәтін, ашық көзінің веб- бағдарламасын көрсету құралы. WARP- мәтін бірнеше қабатты жазбаларды және мәтіннің ішкі қатынасының өзгертілген анықтамаларын қолдайды. Анықтама түрлі грануляриялық деңгейінде орындалады (мәтін, сөздер, сөздер немесе белгілер секілді). WARP- Text жоба менеджері мен жазбалар үшін интерфейсі интерфейсі бар. WARP- мәтін қазіргі NLP құралдар панелінде бос орынды толтыру, себебі ашық көзі мәтіннің екі жазуларының альтернативтері оқылмайды. WARP- мәтін бірнеше жазбалар тапсырмаларында қолданылды және басқалардың арасында парафраз, толтыру, қарапайым және тұжырымдамасында жұмыс істейтін зерттеушерге көмектесуі мүмкін.', 'it': "Vi presentiamo WARP-Text, uno strumento open source basato sul web per annotare le relazioni tra coppie di testi. WARP-Text supporta annotazioni a più livelli e definizioni personalizzate delle relazioni intertestuali e intratestuali. Le annotazioni possono essere eseguite a diversi livelli di granularità (come frasi, frasi o token). WARP-Text ha un'interfaccia intuitiva e facile da usare sia per project manager che per annotatori. WARP-Text colma una lacuna nella casella degli strumenti PNL attualmente disponibile, poiché le alternative open source per l'annotazione di coppie di testo non sono facilmente disponibili. WARP-Text è già stato utilizzato in diversi compiti di annotazione e può essere di interesse per i ricercatori che lavorano nelle aree di parafrasi, Entailment, Semplificazione e Riassunto, tra gli altri.", 'mk': 'Презентираме WARP- Text, веб- алатка со отворен код за анотирање на врските помеѓу парови текстови. WARP- TextName Анотацијата може да се изврши на различни нивоа на грануларност (како што се речениците, фразите или знаците). WARP- TextName WARP- Text ја пополнува празнината во моментално достапната NLP алатка, бидејќи алтернативите на отворен код за анотација на парови текст не се лесно достапни. WARP-Text веќе е употребен во неколку задачи за анотација и може да биде од интерес за истражувачите кои работат во областите на парафразирање, загриженост, поедноставување и сумирање, меѓу другите.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome WARP-Text, atviro kodo interneto priemonę, skirtą anotuoti santykius tarp tekstų poros. WARP-Text remia įvairių sluoksnių anotaciją ir savitas tarptekstinių ir tekstinių santykių apibrėžtis. Anotacija gali būti atliekama skirtingais granuliarumo lygiais (pvz., sakiniais, frazėmis ar simboliais). WARP- Text turi intuityvią naudotojui palankią sąsają tiek projektų valdytojams, tiek anotatoriams. WARP-Text fills a gap in the currently available NLP toolbox, as open-source alternatives for annotation of pairs of text are not readily available.  WARP-Text jau buvo naudojamas keliose anotacijos užduotyse ir gali būti naudingas mokslininkams, dirbantiems, be kita ko, parafrazės, sutrikimo, supaprastinimo ir santraukos srityse.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ WARP- ტექსტის გამოსახულებათ, საბოლო მხოლოდ საქაღალდე ინტექსტის გამოსახულებლად ტექსტის ორივე შესახებების შესახებ. Name ანოტაცია შეიძლება განსხვავებული გრანულაციის დონოლებში გავაკეთოთ (როგორც სიტყვები, ფრაზები, ან სიტყვები). Name WARP- ტექსტი განსხვავებს მიმდინარე ხელსაწყოთა NLP ხელსაწყოთა საქაღალდე, რადგან ტექსტის ზოგის ანოტაციისთვის გახსნილი საქაღალდენტები არ შესაძლებელია. WARP-ტექსტი უკვე გამოყენებულია რამდენიმე ანტორაციის დავალებში და შეიძლება იყოს ინტერესტი პარაფრაციის, განმავლობის, განმავლობის და კომპანიზაციის განმავლობაში მუშაობელებისთვის.', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan WARP-Text, alat berasaskan web sumber terbuka untuk anotasi hubungan antara pasangan teks. WARP- Text menyokong anotasi berbilang- lapisan dan definisi suai hubungan antar- teks dan intra- teks. Anotasi boleh dilakukan pada aras granulariti yang berbeza (seperti kalimat, frasa, atau token). WARP- Text mempunyai antaramuka intuitif user- friendly kedua- dua untuk pengurus projek dan penganotator. WARP-Text mengisi ruang dalam kotak alat NLP yang tersedia sekarang, kerana alternatif sumber terbuka untuk anotasi pasangan teks tidak tersedia dengan mudah. WARP-Text telah digunakan dalam beberapa tugas anotasi dan boleh berminat bagi penyelidik yang bekerja di kawasan Parafrasasi, Kesakitan, Permudahan, dan Penapisan, antara lain.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw WARP-Text, għodda bbażata fuq l-internet b’sors miftuħ għall-annotazzjoni tar-relazzjonijiet bejn pari ta’ testi. WARP-Text supports multi-layer annotation and custom definitions of inter-textual and intra-textual relationships.  L-annotazzjoni tista’ ssir f’livelli differenti ta’ granularità (bħal sentenzi, frażijiet, jew tokens). WARP-Text għandu interfaċċja intwittiva faċli għall-utent kemm għall-maniġers tal-proġetti kif ukoll għall-annotaturi. WARP-Text jimla lakuna fil-kaxxa tal-għodod NLP disponibbli bħalissa, peress li alternattivi open-source għall-annotazzjoni ta’ pari ta’ test mhumiex disponibbli faċilment. WARP-Text diġà ntuża f’diversi kompiti ta’ annotazzjoni u jista’ jkun ta’ interess għar-riċerkaturi li jaħdmu fl-oqsma tal-Parafrażizzazzjoni, il-Ħsara, is-Simplifikazzjoni u s-Sommarju, fost oħrajn.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d വാര്\u200dപ്പ്-ടെക്സ്റ്റ്, ഒരു തുറന്ന വെബ്സോര്\u200dസ് അടിസ്ഥാനമായ ഉപകരണത്തിനായി കാണിക്കുന്നു. രണ്ടു ഇണകള്\u200dക വാര്\u200dപ്- ലെക്സ്റ്റ് പല-layer അറിയിപ്പും സ്വന്തം വിശദീകരണങ്ങളും തമ്മിലുള്ള ടെക്സ്ചുളിലുള്ള ബന്ധങ്ങളുടെ വിവരങ്ങളും പ വ്യത്യസ്ത ഗ്രാന്റിയുടെ നിലങ്ങളില്\u200d അറിയിപ്പ് പ്രവര്\u200dത്തിപ്പിക്കാം (വാക്കുകള്\u200d, വാക്കുകള്\u200d, അല്ലെങ്കില്\u200d ഒള പ്രോജക്റ്റ് മാനേജര്\u200dമാര്\u200dക്കും അഭിപ്രായങ്ങള്\u200dക്കും വേണ്ടി വാര്\u200dപ്- ടെക്സ്റ്റ് ഉപയോക്താവിന്റെ സു ഇപ്പോഴത്തെ ലഭ്യമാകുന്ന NLP ഉപകരണപ്പെട്ടിയില്\u200d വ്യാപ്പ്- ടെക്സ്റ്റ് നിര്\u200dമ്മിക്കുന്നതിനാല്\u200d ഇപ്പോള്\u200d ലഭ്യമാകുന്ന ഒര വാര്\u200dപ്പി- ലേഖനം ഒരുപാട് വിചാരിക്കുന്ന ജോലികളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിച്ചിരിക്കുന്നു. മറ്റുള്ളവര്\u200dക്കിടയില്\u200d പാരാഫ്രാസിങ്ങ്, എടുത്തുകൊടുക്കുന്', 'mn': 'Бид WARP-Текст, нээлттэй эх үүсвэртэй веб-суурилсан хэрэгсэл, хоёр текст хоорондын харилцааныг анзаарлах боломжтой. WARP-Текст нь олон давхар анзаарлыг дэмжиж байна. Мөн бичсэн, интро-текст харилцааны өөрчлөлтийн тодорхойлолтуудыг дэмжиж байна. Өөр хэлбэрийн гранулацийн түвшинд (жишээ нь өгүүлбэрүүд, өгүүлбэрүүд, эсвэл тэмдэгт) дамжуулж болно. WARP-Текст төслийн менеджерлүүд болон анзаарагчдын интерфейс байдаг. WARP-Текст өнөөдрийн NLP хэрэгслийн хайрцаг дээр зай дүүргэж байна. Яагаад гэвэл нээлттэй эх үүсвэрийн сонголтууд текст хоёр нь амархан хангалттай байхгүй. WARP-Текст аль хэдийн анзаарлын ажил дээр хэрэглэгдсэн бөгөөд зарим нь Paraphrasing, Entailment, Simplification, Summarization хэсэгт ажилладаг судлаачид сонирхолтой болно.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer WARP- Text, eit nettbasert verktøy for å merka forholdet mellom par tekstar. WARP- tekst støttar fleire lag- notasjon og eigendefinerte definisjonar av mellomtekst- og intra- tekst- relasjonar. Merknad kan utførast på ulike granularitetsnivå (som setningar, fraser eller teikn). WARP- Text har ein intuitivt brukarvennlig grensesnitt både for prosjekthandsamarar og annotatorar. @ info WARP- tekst er allereie brukt i fleire notasjonsoppgåver og kan vera interessant for forskere som arbeider i områda Parafrasing, Entailment, Simplification og Samarisering, medan andre.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy WARP-Text, otwarte narzędzie internetowe do adnotacji relacji między parami tekstów. WARP-Text obsługuje adnotację wielowarstwową oraz niestandardowe definicje relacji między tekstem i wewnątrz tekstu. Annotacja może być wykonywana na różnych poziomach granularności (takich jak zdania, zwroty lub tokeny). WARP-Text posiada intuicyjny, przyjazny dla użytkownika interfejs zarówno dla menedżerów projektów, jak i adnotatorów. WARP-Text wypełnia lukę w obecnie dostępnym zestawie narzędzi NLP, ponieważ alternatywy open source dla adnotacji par tekstu nie są łatwo dostępne. WARP-Text został już wykorzystany w kilku zadaniach adnotacyjnych i może być zainteresowany dla naukowców pracujących m.in. w obszarach Parafrazowania, Entailment, Uproszczenia i Podsumowania.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm WARP-Text, un instrument open-source bazat pe web pentru adnotarea relațiilor dintre perechi de texte. WARP-Text suportă adnotarea pe mai multe straturi și definițiile personalizate ale relațiilor inter-textuale și intratextuale. Adnotare poate fi efectuată la diferite niveluri de granularitate (cum ar fi propoziții, fraze sau jetoane). WARP-Text are o interfață intuitivă și ușor de utilizat atât pentru managerii de proiect, cât și pentru adnotatori. Warp-Text umple o lacună în caseta de instrumente NLP disponibilă în prezent, deoarece alternative open source pentru adnotare de perechi de text nu sunt ușor disponibile. WARP-Text a fost deja folosit în mai multe sarcini de adnotare și poate fi de interes pentru cercetătorii care lucrează în domeniile parafrazării, Entailment, Simplificare și Sumarizare, printre altele.', 'so': 'Waxaynu soo wadaynaa WARP-Text, kaas oo ah qalabka internetka oo furan, si aan u caddeyno xiriirka kala duduwan qoraalka. WARP-Text wuxuu taageeraa qalabka kala duduwan iyo sawirro caadi ah oo ku qoran xiriirka kala duduwan iyo qoraalka iyo qoraalka. Wargelinta waxaa lagu sameyn karaa heerarka barwaaqada kala duduwan (tusaale ahaan imtixaanka, hadalka ama calaamado). WARP-Text waxay leedahay Interfac u eg isticmaale-friendly, taasoo ay leedahay maamulaha arrimaha project iyo dhibaatooyinka. WARP-Text wuxuu si fudud u buuxinayaa boxka qoraalka qoriga ah ee currently la isticmaalayo NLP, sababtoo ah furan fursad oo ay u baahan yihiin qalabka ay isku noocyo ah. WARP-Text waxaa horay loogu isticmaalay shaqooyin badan oo la xiriira, waxaana laga yaabaa inaad xiiseyso cilmi-baaritaanka ka shaqeeya meelaha ay ka shaqeeyaan meelaha Paraphrasing, Elementation, Simplification iyo Suurtogal.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar WARP-Text, ett webbaserat verktyg med öppen källkod för att kommentera relationer mellan par texter. WARP-Text stöder flerlagers anteckningar och anpassade definitioner av intertextuella och intratextuella relationer. Notering kan utföras på olika granularitetsnivåer (till exempel meningar, fraser eller tokens). WARP-Text har ett intuitivt användarvänligt gränssnitt både för projektledare och kommentatorer. WARP-Text fyller en lucka i den för närvarande tillgängliga NLP-verktygslådan, eftersom alternativ med öppen källkod för anteckningar av par text inte är lätt tillgängliga. WARP-Text har redan använts i flera anteckningsuppgifter och kan vara av intresse för forskare som arbetar inom bland annat parafrasering, Entailment, Förenkling och Sammanfattning.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo WARP-Text, alat na internetu otvorenog izvora za annotaciju odnosa između parova teksta. WARP-Text podržava višeslojne annotacije i obične definicije međutekstualnih i intra-tekstualnih odnosa. Annotacija se može izvršiti na različitim nivoima granularnosti (poput rečenica, rečenica ili znakova). WARP-Text ima intuitivno prijateljski interfejs za korisnike i za menadžere projekta i annotatore. WARP- Text napuni prazninu u sadašnjoj raspoloženoj kutiji NLP alata, jer alternativa otvorenih izvora za annotaciju par teksta nisu lako dostupna. WARP-Text je već korišćen u nekoliko zadataka za annotaciju i može biti zainteresovan za istraživače koji rade u područjima parafrazacije, uklanjanja, jednostavljanja i sajmarizacije, među ostalima.', 'ta': 'நாம் WARP-உரையை காண்பிக்கிறோம், ஒரு திறந்த மூலம் இணைய அடிப்படையிலான கருவி WARP- உரை பல- அடுக்கு அறிவிப்பு மற்றும் தனிப்பயன் விவரிப்புகளை ஆதரிக்கிறது இடைநெடுக்கல் மற்றும் உள்ள- உரை தொடர்புகள். வேறு வித்தியாசமான நிலைகளில் அறிவிப்பு செயல்படுத்தலாம் (வாக்கியங்கள், சொற்றொடர், அல்லது குறிப்புகள் போன்ற). WARP- Text has an intuitive user- friendly interface for both project managers and annotators. WARP-Text fills a gap in the currently available NLP toolbox, as open-source alternatives for annotation of pairs of text are not readily available.  WARP- Text has already been used in several annotation tasks and can be interesting for researchers working in the areas of Paraphrasing, Email, Simplification and சுருக்கம்.', 'si': 'අපි WARP- පාළුවක්, පාළුවක් සම්බන්ධතාවක් සඳහා විවෘත වෙබ් ප්\u200dරමාණය සඳහා විවෘත කරන්න පුළුවන්. Name වෙනස් ග්\u200dරැන්ලූරියාත්මක ස්තූතියෙන් ප්\u200dරවේශනය කරන්න පුළුවන් (වචන, ප්\u200dරවේශය, නැත්තම් ටොකන්ස Name @ info WARP-Text දැනටමත් ප්\u200dරයෝජනය කරලා තියෙන්නේ වැඩක් වැඩක් තියෙන්නේ, සම්පූර්ණය, සම්පූර්ණය, සම්පූර්ණය, සම්පූර්ණය, අනිත් අත', 'ur': 'ہم WARP-Text کو پیش کرتے ہیں، ایک اوپن-سورس ویب-بنیاد تولیل جو متن کے جوڑوں کے درمیان رابطہ کا نوٹیٹ کرتا ہے. WARP-Text multi layer annotation and custom definitions of inter textual and intra-textual relationships. اپنا اظہار مختلف سطح پر عمل کر سکتا ہے WARP- TEXT میں پروژے منڈیروں اور اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا اپنا ا WARP- Text currently available NLP toolbox میں ایک فاصلہ بھرا رہا ہے، کیونکہ کھولا-سورس الٹ پیغام کے جوڑوں کے لئے آسانی کے ساتھ موجود نہیں ہیں. WARP-Text پہلے سے بہت سے اظہارات کے کاموں میں استعمال کیا گیا ہے اور ان کے لئے ایک دوسرے کے درمیان پارافریزنگ, پاکیزگی, سادگی اور جمع کرنا کے منطقه میں کام کرنے والوں کے لئے علاقہ ہے.', 'uz': 'Biz WARP-Matn bilan bir necha matnlar orasidagi bogʻlamalarni ajratish uchun ochiq mavjud asbobi. Name @ info: whatsthis Name @ info Name', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu WARP-Text, một công cụ web dựa trên nguồn mở để ghi chú các mối quan hệ giữa các cặp văn bản. Ghi chú nhiều lớp và định nghĩa cho các mối quan hệ nội cấu và kết cấu. Chú thích có thể được thực hiện ở các mức độ hạt khác nhau (như câu, cụm từ, hay hiệu ứng). Tin nóng hổi có một giao diện hữu ích trực tiếp cho cả người quản lý dự án và người chú thích. Lời cảnh báo sẽ lấp đầy khoảng trống trong hộp công cụ NLP hiện thời, vì nguồn gốc thay thế cho ghi chú các cặp chữ không dễ dàng có. Lời cảnh báo đã được sử dụng trong nhiều nhiệm vụ ghi chú và có thể có hứng thú với các nhà nghiên cứu làm việc trong lĩnh vực Khả năng, Tóm tắt, Đơn giản, và Tóm tắt.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer WARP-Text, et open source webbaseret værktøj til annotering af relationer mellem par tekster. WARP-Text understøtter flerlags annotering og brugerdefinerede definitioner af intertekstuelle og intratekstuelle relationer. Anmærkninger kan udføres på forskellige granularitetsniveauer (såsom sætninger, sætninger eller tokens). WARP-Text har en intuitiv brugervenlig grænseflade både for projektledere og kommentatorer. WARP-Text udfylder et hul i den aktuelt tilgængelige NLP-værktøjskasse, da open source-alternativer til notering af par tekst ikke er let tilgængelige. WARP-Text har allerede været brugt i flere anmærkningsopgaver og kan være af interesse for forskere, der arbejder inden for bl.a. Parafrasering, Entailment, Forenkling og Summarization.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo WARP-Text, alat na internetu otvorenog izvora za annotaciju odnosa između parova teksta. WARP-Text podržava višeslojne annotacije i obične definicije međutekstualnih i unutrašnjih tekstualnih odnosa. Annotacija se može provesti na različitim razinama granularnosti (poput rečenica, rečenica ili znakova). WARP- Text ima intuitivno prijateljski interfejs za korisnike i za upravljače projekta i annotatore. WARP- Text napuni prazninu u sadašnjoj raspoloženoj kutiji NLP alata, jer alternativa otvorenih izvora za annotaciju par teksta nisu lako dostupna. WARP-Text je već korišten u nekoliko zadataka za annotaciju i može biti zainteresovan istraživačima koji rade u područjima parafrazacije, uklanjanja, jednostavljanja i sažetka, među ostalima.', 'bg': 'Представяме уеб базиран инструмент с отворен код за анотиране на взаимоотношенията между двойки текстове. Поддържа многослойна анотация и персонализирани дефиниции на интертекстови и вътретекстови взаимоотношения. Анотацията може да се извършва на различни нива на гранулираност (като изречения, фрази или символи). Текст има интуитивен лесен за ползване интерфейс както за ръководители на проекти, така и за анотатори. Текстът запълва празнота в наличната понастоящем кутия с инструменти, тъй като алтернативите с отворен код за анотация на двойки текст не са лесно достъпни. Текстът вече се използва в няколко задачи за анотация и може да бъде от интерес за изследователите, работещи в областите Парафразиране, Опростяване, Обобщение и др.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan WARP-Text, sebuah alat web berasaskan sumber terbuka untuk anotasi hubungan antara pasangan teks. WARP- Text mendukung anotasi multi- lapisan dan definisi suai hubungan intertekstual dan intratekstual. Annotasi dapat dilakukan pada tingkat granularitas yang berbeda (seperti kalimat, frasa, atau token). WARP-Text has an intuitive user-friendly interface both for project managers and annotators.  WARP-Text mengisi ruang dalam kotak alat NLP yang tersedia saat ini, karena alternatif sumber terbuka untuk anotasi sepasang teks tidak readily tersedia. WARP-Text telah digunakan dalam beberapa tugas anotasi dan dapat menarik perhatian bagi para peneliti yang bekerja di daerah Parafrasasi, Kesulitan, Simplifikasi, dan Penapisan, diantara lainnya.', 'nl': 'We presenteren WARP-Text, een open-source web-based tool voor het annoteren van relaties tussen paren van teksten. WARP-Text ondersteunt meerlaagse annotatie en aangepaste definities van intertekstuele en intratekstuele relaties. Annotatie kan worden uitgevoerd op verschillende granulariteitsniveaus (zoals zinnen, zinnen of tokens). WARP-Text heeft een intuïtieve gebruikersvriendelijke interface voor zowel projectmanagers als annotatoren. WARP-Text vult een gat in de momenteel beschikbare NLP toolbox, omdat open-source alternatieven voor annotatie van tekstparen niet direct beschikbaar zijn. WARP-Text is al gebruikt in verschillende annotatietaken en kan interessant zijn voor de onderzoekers die onder andere werken op het gebied van Parafraseren, Entailment, Vereenvoudiging en Samenvatting.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren WARP-Text, ein webbasiertes Open-Source-Tool zur Annotation von Beziehungen zwischen Textpaaren. WARP-Text unterstützt mehrschichtige Annotation und benutzerdefinierte Definitionen intertextueller und intratextueller Beziehungen. Anmerkungen können auf verschiedenen Granularitätsstufen (wie Sätzen, Phrasen oder Token) ausgeführt werden. WARP-Text verfügt über eine intuitive, benutzerfreundliche Oberfläche sowohl für Projektmanager als auch für Kommentatoren. WARP-Text schließt eine Lücke in der aktuell verfügbaren NLP Toolbox, da Open-Source-Alternativen zur Annotation von Textpaaren nicht ohne weiteres verfügbar sind. WARP-Text wurde bereits in mehreren Annotationsaufgaben eingesetzt und kann für Forscher, die unter anderem in den Bereichen Paraphrasing, Entailment, Simplification und Summarisation tätig sind, von Interesse sein.', 'sw': 'Tunaweza kuwasilisha ujumbe wa WARP, zana iliyo wazi ya mtandaoni kwa kutangaza uhusiano kati ya jumbe mbili za maandishi. WARP-Text inaunga mkono matangazo ya viwanja vingi na ufafanuzi wa utambulisho wa mahusiano yanayohusiana na teknolojia. Tangazo linaweza kutekelezwa katika viwango tofauti vya uchunguzi (kama vile sentensi, maneno au alama). WARP-Text ina mahusiano ya mtumiaji yenye urafiki kwa ajili ya maafisa wa mradi na matangazo. WARP Uandishi wa WARP tayari umetumiwa katika kazi kadhaa za kutangaza na inaweza kuwa na maslahi kwa watafiti wanaofanya kazi katika maeneo ya Paraphrase, Uwekezaji, Uwekezaji na Ujumbe, pamoja na wengine.', 'fa': 'ما متن WARP- را نشان می دهیم، یک ابزار ابزار منبع باز برای نویسندگی رابطه بین جفت متن. WARP-Text از تعریف\u200cهای متعدد لایه\u200cهای متعدد و تعریف\u200cهای متعدد متن و متن\u200cمتن را پشتیبانی می\u200cکند. توضیح می\u200cتواند در سطح گرانولیت متفاوت انجام شود (مثل جمله\u200cها، جمله\u200cها، یا علامت\u200cها). Name متن WARP- یک فاصله در جعبه ابزار NLP در حال حاضر پر می\u200cکند، زیرا alternatives منبع باز برای یادآوری جفت متن به راحتی در دسترس نیستند. WARP-Text از قبل در چندین وظیفه اظهار دادن استفاده شده و می تواند برای محققان که در منطقه\u200cهای پارافراینگ، پاداش\u200cسازی، ساده\u200cسازی و جمع\u200cسازی کار می\u200cکنند، علاقه داشته باشد.', 'tr': 'Biz WARP-Metini, iki metin arasynyň baglaýyşlaryny aýdyrmak üçin açyk-kaynakly web aralygyny görkeýäris. WARP-Metin inter-textual ve intra-textual ilişkilerin çoklu-katlanmış duýdurmalaryny we şahsal tanımlaryny destekleýär. Ýagtylama farklı granularlyk derejesinde gerçekleşebilir (sözler, sözler, ya da tymsallar ýaly). WARP-Metin Projekt müdiri we ýazgytçylar üçin bir nähili arkadaşy görnöşi bar. _BAR_ WARP-Metin eýýäm birnäçe duýdurma işinde ullanýar we Parafraz, Hesaplama we Samariýa bölgelerinde işleýänler üçin gyzyklanýar.', 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim WARP-Text, një mjet web-bazuar me burim të hapur për të anotuar marrëdhëniet midis dy teksteve. WARP-Text mbështet anotacionin me shumë nivele dhe përcaktimin e personalizuar të marrëdhënieve ndërtekstuale dhe intratekstuale. Anotacioni mund të kryehet në nivele të ndryshme granulariteti (të tilla si fraza, fraza apo token). WARP-Text ka një interfaqe intuitive miqësore me përdoruesin si për menaxhuesit e projekteve ashtu edhe për anotatorët. WARP-Text mbush një boshllëk në kutinë e mjeteve aktualisht të disponueshme NLP, pasi alternativat me burim të hapur për anotimin e çifteve teksti nuk janë të disponueshme lehtë. WARP-Text është përdorur tashmë në disa detyra të anotacionit dhe mund të jetë i interesuar për kërkuesit që punojnë në fushat e parafrazimit, ngatërrimit, thjeshtimit dhe përmbledhjes, midis të tjerëve.', 'ko': 'WARP Text는 텍스트 쌍의 관계를 설명하는 데 사용되는 소스 기반 웹 기반 도구입니다.텍스트 왜곡은 다중 주석과 텍스트 간 및 텍스트 내 관계에 대한 사용자 정의를 지원합니다.주석은 문장, 단어, 표기 등 입도 단계에서 실행할 수 있습니다.WARP Text는 프로젝트 관리자 및 주석에게 직관적인 사용자 친화적 인터페이스를 제공합니다.비뚤어진 텍스트는 현재 사용 가능한 NLP 도구 상자의 공백을 메웁니다. 주석에 대한 기존 소스 텍스트가 없기 때문입니다.WARP 텍스트는 이미 여러 주석 임무에 사용되고 있어 해석, 내포, 간소화, 요약 등 분야에서 일하는 연구원들이 흥미를 느낄 수 있다.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Warp-Text-ը, բաց աղբյուր ցանցի հիմնված գործիք, որը նշում է երկու տեքստների միջև եղած հարաբերությունները: Warp- TextComment Անոտացիան կարելի է կատարել տարբեր մակարդակներում (ինչպիսիք են նախադասությունները, արտահայտությունները կամ նշանները): Warp-Tex-ը ունի ինտուիտիվ օգտագործողական ինտերֆեյս նախագծի ղեկավարների և նոտատորների համար: Warp- TextComment Warp-Tex-ը արդեն օգտագործվել է որոշ annoտացիոն խնդիրների ընթացքում և կարող է հետաքրքրվել հետազոտողների համար, ովքեր աշխատում են օրինակ պարաֆրազիզացիայի, հիվանդության, պարզաբանության և համառոտագրության ոլորտներում:', 'bn': 'আমরা ওয়ার্প-টেক্সটের উপস্থাপন করছি, একটি উন্মুক্ত সোর্স ওয়েব ভিত্তিক টুল, যার মধ্যে জোড়া টেক্সটের সম্পর্ক বিরক্ত কর ওয়ার্প- টেক্সট অনেক স্তরের টেক্সচুয়াল এবং ইন্টাক্চুয়ালের সম্পর্কের স্বনির্ধারিত বর্ণনা সমর্থন করে। বিভিন্ন গ্রানুনালিটি স্তরে ঘোষণা প্রদর্শন করা যাবে (যেমন বাক্য, বাক্য, বা প্রতীক)। ওয়ার্প- টেক্সট প্রকল্প ম্যানেজার এবং অ্যান্ট্যান্টেটরের জন্য ব্যবহারকারী বন্ধুত্বপূর্ণ ইন্টারফেস আছ বর্তমানে বিদ্যমান NLP টুলবাক্সে WARP- টেক্সট একটি gap পূর্ণ করে দেয়, যেহেতু জোড়া টেক্সটের অ্যান্টারেশনের জন্য খোলা উৎস বিকল ওয়ার্প-টেক্সট ইতোমধ্যে বেশ কয়েকটি বিভিন্ন কাজে ব্যবহার করা হয়েছে এবং অন্যদের মধ্যে প্যারাফ্রাজিং, ইমেইলেমেন্ট, সাধারণ এবং সামার্মিক সংক্রান্', 'am': 'በሁለት ዓይነት ጽሑፎች መካከል ግንኙነትን ለመግለጽ የክፈት የድረ ገጽ መሠረት ነው፡፡ text-tool-action ምርጫዎች የWARP-ጽሑፍ ለፕሮጀክት አዳራጆች እና ማስታወቂያዎች የሚሆን ተጠቃሚ-friendly interface አላቸው። WARP-ጽሑፍ የአሁኑን NLP ቱልባር ውስጥ ክፈት ያደርጋል፤ የክፈት-source alternations for annotation of pairs of text are not readily available. WARP-ጽሑፍ አስቀድሞ በተጠቃሚ ስራ ላይ ተጠቃሚ እና በሌሎችም መካከል በፓራፍራሲን፣ ኢንተርሚናል፣ ቀላል እና ማጠቃለያ ለሚሠሩ አስተማሪዎች ላይ ውጤት ይቻላል፡፡', 'af': "Ons stel WARP- Text voor 'n open- source web- based nutsprogram vir annotering van verwantings tussen paar teks. WARP- Text ondersteun multi- layer annotasie en pasmaak definisies van inter- textual en intra- textual relasies. Annotasie kan uitgevoer word by verskillende granulariteit vlakke (soos teikens, frase of tekens). WARP- Text het 'n intuitiewe gebruiker- vriendelike koppelvlak beide vir projek bestuurders en annotators. Name Warp- Text vul 'n spasie in die huidiglik beskikbaar NLP nutsboks, as open- source alternatiewe vir annotasie van paar teks is nie leeg beskikbaar nie. WARP-Text is reeds gebruik in verskeie annotasie taak en kan interesse wees vir die resekers wat werk in die areas van Parafrasing, Entailment, Simplification en Opsomming, onder ander.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo WARP-Text, alat na internetu otvorenog izvora za annotaciju odnosa između parova teksta. WARP-Text podržava višeslojne annotacije i obične definicije međutekstualnih i intra-tekstualnih odnosa. Annotacija se može izvršiti na različitim nivoima granularnosti (poput rečenica, fraze ili znakova). WARP-Text ima intuitivno korisnički interfejs za upravljače projekta i annotatore. WARP- Text puni prazninu u sadašnjoj raspoloženoj kutiji NLP alata, jer alternativa otvorenih izvora za annotaciju par teksta nisu lako dostupna. WARP-Text je već korišten u nekoliko zadataka za annotaciju i može biti zainteresovan za istraživače koji rade u područjima parafrazacije, uklanjanja, jednostavljanja i sažetka, među ostalima.', 'ca': "We present WARP-Text, an open-source web-based tool for annotating relationships between pairs of texts.  WARP-Text suporta anotació multicapa i definicions personalitzades de relacions intertextuals i intratextuals. L'anotació es pot fer a diferents nivells de granularitat (com les frases, frases o fitxes). WARP-Text té una interfície intuïtiva per a l'usuari, tant per als gestors de projectes com per als anotators. WARP-Text omple un buit en la caixa d'eines NLP actualment disponible, perquè no són fàcilment disponibles alternatives de codi obert per anotar parells de text. WARP-Text ja ha estat utilitzat en diverses tasques d'anotació i pot ser d'interès per als investigadors que treballen en les àrees de Parafrasió, Malaltia, Simplificació i Resumizació, entre altres.", 'cs': 'Představujeme WARP-Text, open-source webový nástroj pro anotování vztahů mezi páry textů. WARP-Text podporuje vícevrstvé anotace a vlastní definice intertextových a intratextových vztahů. Anotace lze provádět na různých úrovních granularity (například věty, fráze nebo žetony). WARP-Text má intuitivní uživatelsky přívětivé rozhraní jak pro projektové manažery, tak pro anotátory. WARP-Text vyplňuje mezeru v aktuálně dostupném nástrojovém boxu NLP, protože open source alternativy pro anotaci párů textu nejsou snadno dostupné. WARP-Text již byl použit v několika anotacích a může být zajímavý pro výzkumníky pracující mimo jiné v oblasti parafrázování, vylepšení, zjednodušení a shrnutí.', 'az': 'Biz WARP-Metni, açıq-kaynaklı web vasitəsini, iki mətn arasındakı ilişkiləri notlamaq üçün göstəririk. WARP-Metin çoxlu-katlı xəbərdarlıqlarını və şəkildə tərzim tərzlərini dəstəkləyir. Nöqtə müxtəlif granularlıq səviyyələrində (cümlələr, sözlər, ya da möcüzələr kimi) işlədilir. WARP-Metin proyekt müdürü və annotatorları üçün intuitiv istifadəçi dostu интерфейсi var. WARP- Metin müəyyən edilən NLP vasitələri qutusunda boşluq doldurur, çünki a çıq mənbə alternatifi metin çiftləri açıq-aydın faydalanır. WARP-Text artıq bir neçə bildiriş işində istifadə edilmişdir və başqalarının arasında Parafrasing, Səflət, Yaxınlaşdırma və Toplaşdırma bölələrində çalışan araştırmacılara maraq olar.', 'et': 'Esitleme WARP-Texti, avatud lähtekoodiga veebipõhist tööriista tekstipaaride vaheliste suhete annoteerimiseks. WARP-Text toetab mitmekihilist annoteerimist ja tekstidevaheliste ja tekstisiseste suhete kohandatud definitsioone. Annotatsiooni saab teha erinevatel täpsustasemetel (nt laused, laused või märgid). WARP-Textil on intuitiivne kasutajasõbralik liides nii projektijuhtidele kui ka annotatoritele. WARP-Text täidab praegu saadaval oleva NLP tööriistakasti lünka, kuna avatud lähtekoodiga alternatiivid tekstipaaride annoteerimiseks ei ole kergesti kättesaadavad. WARP-Texti on juba kasutatud mitmetes märgistusülesannetes ja see võib olla huvitav teadlastele, kes töötavad muu hulgas parasõnastamise, ekstraheerimise, lihtsustamise ja kokkuvõtte valdkonnas.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme WARP-Textin, avoimen lähdekoodin verkkopohjaisen työkalun tekstiparien välisten suhteiden merkitsemiseen. WARP-Text tukee monikerroksisia merkintöjä ja tekstienvälisten ja tekstienvälisten suhteiden mukautettuja määritelmiä. Annotointia voidaan tehdä eri tarkkuustasoilla (kuten lauseita, lauseita tai poletteja). WARP-Textissä on intuitiivinen käyttäjäystävällinen käyttöliittymä sekä projektipäälliköille että huomautuksille. WARP-Text täyttää aukon saatavilla olevassa NLP-työkalulaatikossa, koska avoimen lähdekoodin vaihtoehtoja tekstiparien merkintöihin ei ole helposti saatavilla. WARP-Textiä on jo käytetty useissa huomautustehtävissä ja se voi kiinnostaa tutkijoita, jotka työskentelevät muun muassa parafrasoinnin, lyhentämisen, yksinkertaistamisen ja tiivistelmän aloilla.', 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé nggawe WAPP-Text, online-source web tool nggawe barang nggawe barang kelas tengah sampeyan winih WARP-Text Ngubah multi-layer anntations lan custom definetions of inter-textual and Inta-textual ratios. structural navigation name text ProgressBarUpdates', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים WARP-טקסט, כלי מבוסס באינטרנט מקור פתוח להציג מערכות יחסים בין זוגות טקסטים. Name הערות ניתנות לבצע ברמות גורניות שונות (כמו משפטים, ביטויים או סימנים). WARP- Text יש ממשק אינטואיטיבי ידידותי למשתמשים גם למנהלים פרוייקטים וגם למכתבים. WARP- Text מלא פתאום בתיבת הכלים NLP הנוכחית כרגע, כיוון שאליטרנטיבות מקור פתוח לציון של זוגות טקסט לא זמינות בקלות. WARP-Text כבר השתמש בכמה משימות ציונים ויכול להיות מעניין למחקרים שעובדים באזורים של פראפרסיזציה, מחלה, פשטות, וסומריזציה, בין אחרים.', 'ha': "Tuna halatar da WWWP-Text, wata zanar kwamfyuta mai buɗe wa zane-zane-zane dõmin ka zartar da danganta tsakanin takardar miski biyu. WWWP-Text na ƙarfafa zane-zane masu motsi na masu motsi na fassarar masu tsakanin-text da masu cikin-text. Ana iya tafiyar da sanarwa a cikin zane-zane-zane (kamar magana, magana, ko ãyõyi). WWWP-Text yana da wani interfekt mai amfani da mai inganci zuwa manajan mazaɓa da matangazo. WWATP-Text na cika wani gap a cikin zanar aiki da ake iya kai yanzu, kamar da masu buɗe wa masu nuna wa kwanan-yanzu biyu ba za'a iya amfani da sauri ba. An amfani da WWWP-Text a cikin wasu aikin sanarwa masu kuma yana iya amfani da watan masu aiki da ke cikin wurãren Parafrasizi, Cikakken Haka, da kuma Jummariɗawa da wasu.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam WARP-Text, odprtokodno spletno orodje za označevanje relacij med paroma besedil. WARP-Text podpira večplastne opombe in definicije po meri medbesedilnih in znotraj besedilnih odnosov. Anotacije se lahko izvajajo na različnih ravneh natančnosti (kot so stavki, stavki ali žetoni). WARP-Text ima intuitiven uporabniku prijazen vmesnik tako za projektne vodje kot za opozorilce. WARP-Text zapolni vrzel v trenutno razpoložljivem orodju NLP, saj odprtokodne alternative za označevanje parov besedila niso takoj na voljo. WARP-Besedilo se je že uporabljalo pri več nalogah označevanja in je lahko zanimivo za raziskovalce, ki delajo na področjih parafraziranja, pojasnjevanja, poenostavitve in povzetka, med drugim.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་WARP-ཡི་གེ་ཡིག་གེ་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དང་ཁ་ཕྱེས་ཁུངས་ཀྱི་ཝེབ་གཞི་བྱས་པའི་ལག་ཆ་ཁུངས་སྟོན་པ WARP-Text supports multi-layer annotation and custom definitions of inter-textual and intra-textual relationships. དྲན་སྐུལ་འདི་ལྟ་བུའི་ཚད་རྒྱ་འཕགས་ཀྱི་ཚད་ལ་སྒྲུབ་ཐུབ་པ་ཡིན། WARP-Text has an intuitive user-friendly interface both for project managers and annotators. WARP-Text fills a gap in the currently available NLP toolbox, as open-source alternatives for annotation of pairs of text are not readily available. WARP-Text འདི་སྔོན་ལྟ་བུའི་བཀོལ་སྤྱོད་བྱས་ཟིན་བྱས་ལས་འཛམ་གླིང་གི་གནས་ཚུལ་ཁ་ཤས་ཀྱི་ནང་དུ་ཡོད་པ་དང་། བརྡ་སྤྲོད་དང་། སྤྲོད་སྟངས་དང་ཐ་སྙད་'}
{'en': 'A Chinese Writing Correction System for Learning Chinese as a Foreign Language', 'ar': 'نظام تصحيح الكتابة الصينية لتعلم اللغة الصينية كلغة أجنبية', 'pt': 'Um sistema de correção de escrita chinesa para aprender chinês como língua estrangeira', 'es': 'Un sistema de corrección de la escritura china para aprender chino como lengua extranjera', 'fr': "Un système de correction de l'écriture chinoise pour apprendre le chinois langue étrangère", 'zh': '以学对外汉语汉语为正统', 'ja': '外国語としての中国語を学習するための中国語の書き込み訂正システム', 'ru': 'Система коррекции китайской письменности для изучения китайского языка как иностранного', 'hi': 'एक विदेशी भाषा के रूप में चीनी सीखने के लिए एक चीनी लेखन सुधार प्रणाली', 'ga': 'Córas Ceartúcháin Scríbhneoireachta Síneach chun an tSínis a Fhoghlaim mar Theanga Iasachta', 'el': 'Ένα κινεζικό σύστημα διόρθωσης γραφής για την εκμάθηση κινεζικών ως ξένης γλώσσας', 'hu': 'Kínai írásjavító rendszer a kínai mint idegen nyelv tanulásához', 'it': 'Un sistema di correzione della scrittura cinese per imparare il cinese come lingua straniera', 'ka': 'Name', 'kk': 'Name', 'ms': 'A Chinese Writing Correction System for Learning Chinese as a Foreign Language', 'ml': 'വിദേശ ഭാഷയായി പഠിക്കുന്നതിനുള്ള ചൈനീസ് എഴുതുന്ന സിസ്റ്റമാണു്', 'mn': 'Хятадын Хятадын гадаад хэл болон суралцах зөв систем', 'no': 'Name', 'mt': 'Sistema Ċiniża ta’ Korrezzjoni għall-Kiri għat-Tagħlim taċ-Ċiniż bħala Lingwa Barranija', 'lt': 'Kinijos rašymo korekcijos sistema, skirta mokytis kinų kaip užsienio kalbos', 'ro': 'Un sistem de corectare a scrierii chinezești pentru învățarea limbii chineze ca limbă străină', 'sr': 'Kineski korišteni sistem za učenje kineskog kao stranog jezika', 'pl': 'Chiński system korekcji pisma do nauki chińskiego jako języka obcego', 'mk': 'Кинески систем за корекција на пишување за учење кинески како странски јазик', 'so': 'A Chinese Writing Correction System for Learning China as a foreign language', 'si': 'Name', 'sv': 'Ett kinesiskt skrivkorrigeringssystem för att lära sig kinesiska som främmande språk', 'ta': 'Name', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Hệ thống Cải huấn viết tiếng Trung để học tiếng Trung làm ngoại ngữ', 'bg': 'Система за корекция на китайското писане за изучаване на китайски като чужд език', 'nl': 'Een Chinees Schrijfcorrectiesysteem voor het leren van Chinees als vreemde taal', 'hr': 'Kineski sustav isprave pisanja za učenje kineskog kao stranog jezika', 'de': 'Ein chinesisches Schreibkorrektursystem zum Lernen von Chinesisch als Fremdsprache', 'da': 'Et kinesisk skrivekorrektionssystem til at lære kinesisk som fremmedsprog', 'id': 'Sistem Koreksi Tulisan Cina untuk belajar bahasa Cina sebagai bahasa asing', 'fa': 'Name', 'ko': '대외 중국어 학습을 위한 중국어 작문 수정 시스템', 'af': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mfumo wa Uharibifu wa Kichina wa Kuandika kwa Kufundisha Kichina kama Lugha ya Kigeni', 'sq': 'Një sistem korektimi kinez shkrimi për mësimin kinez si gjuhë e huaj', 'am': 'ቻይንኛ የጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ ስርዓት የቻይንኛ ቋንቋ', 'tr': '횉in챌e da힊ary dil bolup 철wrenmek 체챌in bir 횉in챌e 첵azym d체zenlemesi sistemi', 'az': 'Çincə dili öyrənmək üçün Çincə Yazılış Düzəltmə Sistemi', 'hy': 'Չինաստանի գրողական ուղղության համակարգը չինական լեզու սովորելու համար', 'bs': 'Kineski korišteni sistem pisanja za učenje kineskog kao stranog jezika', 'ca': "Un sistema de correcció d'escriptura xinès per aprendre xinès com a llenguatge estranger", 'fi': 'Kiinalaisen kirjoittamisen korjausjärjestelmä kiinalaisen kielen oppimiseen vieraana kielenä', 'et': 'Hiina kirjutamise parandussüsteem hiina keele kui võõrkeele õppimiseks', 'bn': 'বিদেশী ভাষা হিসেবে চীনা শিক্ষার জন্য চীনা লেখক সংশোধন সিস্টেম', 'cs': 'Systém korekce čínského psaní pro výuku čínštiny jako cizího jazyka', 'sk': 'Sistem za popravljanje kitajskega pisanja za učenje kitajskega kot tujega jezika', 'jv': 'Sistem Chinese Nyambut kanggo nggambar barang Panjenengan Jejaring', 'ha': 'KCharselect unicode block name', 'he': 'מערכת תיקון כתיבה סינית ללמוד סיני כשפה זרה', 'bo': 'རྒྱ་ནག་ལ་ཕྱི་ཡིག་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཤེས་པའི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཤེས་ཀྱི་རྩོམ་འབྲི་ནིའི་མ་ལག་ཅིག'}
{'en': 'We present a Chinese writing correction system for learning Chinese as a foreign language. The system takes a wrong input sentence and generates several correction suggestions. It also retrieves example Chinese sentences with English translations, helping users understand the correct usages of certain grammar patterns. This is the first available Chinese writing error correction system based on the neural machine translation framework. We discuss several design choices and show empirical results to support our decisions.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos um sistema de correção da escrita chinesa para aprender chinês como língua estrangeira. O sistema pega uma frase de entrada errada e gera várias sugestões de correção. Ele também recupera exemplos de frases em chinês com traduções em inglês, ajudando os usuários a entender os usos corretos de certos padrões gramaticais. Este é o primeiro sistema de correção de erros de escrita em chinês disponível baseado na estrutura de tradução automática neural. Discutimos várias opções de design e mostramos resultados empíricos para apoiar nossas decisões.', 'ar': 'نقدم نظام تصحيح الكتابة الصيني لتعلم اللغة الصينية كلغة أجنبية. يأخذ النظام جملة إدخال خاطئة ويولد عدة اقتراحات للتصحيح. كما أنه يسترجع أمثلة الجمل الصينية مع الترجمات الإنجليزية ، مما يساعد المستخدمين على فهم الاستخدامات الصحيحة لأنماط قواعد معينة. هذا هو أول نظام متاح لتصحيح أخطاء الكتابة باللغة الصينية يعتمد على إطار عمل الترجمة الآلية العصبية. نناقش العديد من خيارات التصميم ونعرض نتائج تجريبية لدعم قراراتنا.', 'es': 'Presentamos un sistema de corrección de la escritura china para aprender chino como lengua extranjera. El sistema toma una frase de entrada incorrecta y genera varias sugerencias de corrección. También recupera ejemplos de oraciones en chino con traducciones al inglés, lo que ayuda a los usuarios a comprender el uso correcto de ciertos patrones gramaticales. Este es el primer sistema de corrección de errores de escritura en chino disponible basado en el marco de traducción automática neuronal. Discutimos varias opciones de diseño y mostramos resultados empíricos para respaldar nuestras decisiones.', 'fr': "Nous présentons un système de correction de l'écriture chinoise pour apprendre le chinois en tant que langue étrangère. Le système prend une phrase erronée et génère plusieurs suggestions de correction. Il récupère également des exemples de phrases chinoises avec des traductions en anglais, ce qui aide les utilisateurs à comprendre les usages corrects de certains modèles grammaticaux. Il s'agit du premier système de correction d'erreur d'écriture chinois disponible basé sur le framework de traduction automatique neuronale. Nous discutons de plusieurs choix de conception et présentons des résultats empiriques pour étayer nos décisions.", 'zh': '建一中文以正统,以学中文为外语。 统用误输句并成数更正议。 又检带英文翻译汉语句示例,助用户解语法式正法。 此首基于神经机器翻译框架之中文书纠错统也。 论数计而择之,展经验以赞其策。', 'ru': 'Представляем китайскую систему коррекции письменности для изучения китайского языка как иностранного. Система принимает неправильное входное предложение и генерирует несколько предложений по исправлению. Он также извлекает примеры китайских предложений с английскими переводами, помогая пользователям понять правильное использование определенных грамматических паттернов. Это первая доступная китайская система коррекции ошибок письма, основанная на нейронном механическом переводе. Мы обсуждаем несколько вариантов дизайна и показываем эмпирические результаты в поддержку наших решений.', 'ja': '外国語として中国語を学習するための中国語の書き込み訂正システムを提示しています。システムは間違った入力文を取り、いくつかの修正提案を生成します。また、英語の翻訳を使用して中国語の文章の例を取得し、ユーザーが特定の文法パターンの正しい使用法を理解するのに役立ちます。これは、ニューラル機械翻訳フレームワークに基づいた最初の利用可能な中国語の書き込みエラー訂正システムです。私たちは、いくつかのデザインの選択肢について話し合い、意思決定をサポートするための実証的な結果を示します。', 'hi': 'हम एक विदेशी भाषा के रूप में चीनी सीखने के लिए एक चीनी लेखन सुधार प्रणाली प्रस्तुत करते हैं। सिस्टम एक गलत इनपुट वाक्य लेता है और कई सुधार सुझाव उत्पन्न करता है। यह अंग्रेजी अनुवाद के साथ उदाहरण चीनी वाक्यों को भी पुनः प्राप्त करता है, जिससे उपयोगकर्ताओं को कुछ व्याकरण पैटर्न के सही उपयोगों को समझने में मदद मिलती है। यह तंत्रिका मशीन अनुवाद ढांचे के आधार पर पहली उपलब्ध चीनी लेखन त्रुटि सुधार प्रणाली है। हम कई डिजाइन विकल्पों पर चर्चा करते हैं और हमारे निर्णयों का समर्थन करने के लिए अनुभवजन्य परिणाम दिखाते हैं।', 'ga': 'Cuirimid i láthair córas ceartúcháin scríbhneoireachta Síneach chun an tSínis a fhoghlaim mar theanga iasachta. Glacann an córas abairt ionchur mícheart agus gineann sé roinnt moltaí ceartúcháin. Aisghabhann sé freisin abairtí Sínis shamplacha le haistriúcháin Béarla, ag cuidiú le húsáideoirí tuiscint a fháil ar úsáidí cearta patrúin gramadaí áirithe. Is é seo an chéad chóras ceartaithe earráide scríbhneoireachta Síneach atá ar fáil bunaithe ar an gcreat néar-aistriúcháin meaisín. Pléimid go leor roghanna dearaidh agus léirímid torthaí eimpíreacha chun tacú lenár gcinntí.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a kínai írásjavító rendszert a kínai mint idegen nyelv tanulására. A rendszer rossz beviteli mondatot vesz, és több javítási javaslatot generál. Az angol fordításokkal ellátott kínai mondatokat is visszakeresi, segítve a felhasználókat bizonyos nyelvtani minták helyes használatának megértésében. Ez az első elérhető kínai írási hibajavító rendszer, amely a neurális gépi fordítási keretrendszeren alapul. Több tervezési lehetőséget vitatunk meg és empirikus eredményeket mutatunk be döntéseink alátámasztására.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε ένα κινεζικό σύστημα διόρθωσης γραφής για την εκμάθηση κινέζικων ως ξένης γλώσσας. Το σύστημα παίρνει μια λάθος πρόταση εισόδου και παράγει αρκετές προτάσεις διόρθωσης. Επίσης ανακτά παραδείγματα κινέζικων προτάσεων με αγγλική μετάφραση, βοηθώντας τους χρήστες να κατανοήσουν τις σωστές χρήσεις ορισμένων γραμματικών προτύπων. Αυτό είναι το πρώτο διαθέσιμο κινεζικό σύστημα διόρθωσης σφαλμάτων γραφής βασισμένο στο νευρωνικό πλαίσιο μηχανικής μετάφρασης. Συζητούμε διάφορες επιλογές σχεδιασμού και παρουσιάζουμε εμπειρικά αποτελέσματα για να υποστηρίξουμε τις αποφάσεις μας.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome Kinijos rašymo koregavimo sistemą, skirtą mokytis kinų kaip užsienio kalbos. The system takes a wrong input sentence and generates several correction suggestions.  Ji taip pat gauna pavyzdžius Kinijos sakinius su anglų vertimais, padedant naudotojams suprasti teisingą tam tikrų gramatinių modelių naudojimą. Tai pirmoji galima Kinijos rašymo klaidų koregavimo sistema, pagrįsta nervinės mašinos vertimo sistema. Mes diskutuojame apie kelis projektavimo pasirinkimus ir parodomi empiriniai rezultatai, kuriais remiami mūsų sprendimai.', 'kk': 'Біз қытайша тілді оқыту үшін қытайша жазуды түзету жүйесін таңдаймыз. Жүйелік қате келтірілген сөзді қабылдап, бірнеше түзету ұсынысын құрады. Сонымен қатар, ағылшын тілінде қытайша сөйлемелерді, пайдаланушыларға кейбір грамматикалық үлгілердің дұрыс қолдануын түсінуге көмектеседі. Бұл невралдық компьютерді аудару фрейміне негіздеген бірінші Қытай жазу қатесін түзету жүйесі. Біз бірнеше дизайнның таңдауларын талқылап, шешімдерімізді қолдау үшін империялық нәтижелерді көрсетуіміз керек.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ ჩინეთიური წერილების კონფიგურაციის სისტემა ჩინეთიური სახელის გასწავლებისთვის. Name ეს ასევე ჩინეთი სიტყვალების მაგალითად ინგლისური თარგუმებით მიიღებს, რომელიც გამოიყენებელი განსხვავებული გრამატური შაბლოების მართლა გამოყენება ეს არის პირველი ჩინეთის წერის შეცდომა შეცდომა სისტემა, რომელიც ნეიროლური მაქსინის გადაწყვეტილების ფრამეტზე დაბაზიან. ჩვენ განვისაუბრებთ რამდენიმე მონიშნულები და ჩვენ მოჩვენებთ ემპერიკური წარმოდგენები, რომლებიც ჩვენი წარმოდგენების დაეხმარება', 'it': 'Presentiamo un sistema di correzione della scrittura cinese per imparare il cinese come lingua straniera. Il sistema prende una frase di input sbagliata e genera diversi suggerimenti di correzione. Recupera anche frasi cinesi di esempio con traduzioni in inglese, aiutando gli utenti a capire gli usi corretti di alcuni modelli grammaticali. Questo è il primo sistema di correzione degli errori di scrittura cinese disponibile basato sul framework di traduzione automatica neurale. Discutiamo diverse scelte progettuali e mostriamo risultati empirici a supporto delle nostre decisioni.', 'ml': 'ചൈനീസ് വിദേശ ഭാഷയായി പഠിക്കുന്നതിന് വേണ്ടി ഒരു ചൈനീസ് എഴുതുന്ന സിസ്റ്റം ഞങ്ങള്\u200d കാണിക്ക സിസ്റ്റത്തില്\u200d ഒരു തെറ്റായ ഇന്\u200dപുട്ട് വാക്ക് എടുക്കുന്നു. കുറച്ചു സംസാരിക്കുന്ന ശുദ്ധ ചൈനീസ് വാക്കുകള്\u200d ഇംഗ്ലീഷ് പരിഭാഷകളുടെ ഉപയോക്താക്കള്\u200dക്ക് ചില ഗ്രാമ്മാര്\u200d മാതൃകങ്ങളുടെ ശരിയായ ഉപയോഗിക്കുന ഇതാണ് ആദ്യം ലഭ്യമായ ചൈനീസ് എഴുതുന്നതില്\u200d പിശക് തിരിച്ചറിയുന്ന സിസ്റ്റമാണ്. ന്യൂറല്\u200d മെഷീന്\u200d പരി നമ്മുടെ തീരുമാനത്തെ പിന്തുണക്കാന്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d പല ഡിസൈന്\u200d തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കുന്ന തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കകളെക്കു', 'mn': 'Бид Хятад улсын хэл болон суралцахын тулд Хятадын бичил засах системийг танилцуулдаг. Систем буруу орхих өгүүлбэрийг аваад олон зөв санал гаргадаг. Энэ нь мөн Хятад өгүүлбэрийг Англи хэлний хэлбэрээр авч, хэрэглэгчид зарим грамматикийн загварын зөв хэрэглээ ойлгоход тусалдаг. Энэ бол хамгийн анхны Хятадын бичих алдаа засах систем юм. Бид олон загварын сонголтыг ярьж, шийдвэрийг дэмжихийн тулд эзэмшигтэй үр дүнг харуулж байна.', 'mk': 'Презентираме кинески систем за корекција на пишување за учење кинески како странски јазик. The system takes a wrong input sentence and generates several correction suggestions.  Исто така, добива пример кинески реченици со англиски преводи, помагајќи им на корисниците да ги разберат правилните употреби на одредени граматични шеми. Ова е првиот достапен кинески систем за корекција на грешки во пишувањето базиран на нервната машинска преводна рамка. We discuss several design choices and show empirical results to support our decisions.', 'mt': "Aħna nippreżentaw sistema ta’ korrezzjoni tal-kitba Ċiniża għat-tagħlim taċ-Ċiniż bħala lingwa barranija. The system takes a wrong input sentence and generates several correction suggestions.  It also retrieves example Chinese sentences with English translations, helping users understand the correct usages of certain grammar patterns.  Din hija l-ewwel sistema disponibbli għall-korrezzjoni tal-iżbalji tal-kitba Ċiniża bbażata fuq il-qafas tat-traduzzjoni tal-magni newrali. Aħna niddiskutu diversi għażliet ta' disinn u nuru riżultati empiriċi biex nappoġġjaw id-deċiżjonijiet tagħna.", 'ms': 'Kami memperkenalkan sistem perbaikan tulisan Cina untuk belajar bahasa Cina sebagai bahasa asing. The system takes a wrong input sentence and generates several correction suggestions.  Ia juga mengambil contoh kalimat Cina dengan terjemahan Inggeris, membantu pengguna memahami penggunaan yang betul bagi corak grammar tertentu. Ini adalah sistem pembetulan ralat tulisan Cina yang pertama yang tersedia berdasarkan kerangka terjemahan mesin saraf. Kami membincangkan beberapa pilihan desain dan menunjukkan hasil empirik untuk menyokong keputusan kami.', 'pl': 'Prezentujemy chiński system korekcji pisma do nauki chińskiego jako języka obcego. System przyjmuje błędne zdanie wejściowe i generuje kilka sugestii korekty. Pobiera również przykładowe zdania chińskie z tłumaczeniami angielskimi, pomagając użytkownikom zrozumieć prawidłowe zastosowanie niektórych wzorców gramatycznych. Jest to pierwszy dostępny chiński system korekcji błędów pisania oparty na neuronowym frameworku tłumaczenia maszynowego. Omawiamy kilka wyborów projektowych i pokazujemy wyniki empiryczne, które wspierają nasze decyzje.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer ein kinesisk skrivekorrigeringssystem for å lære kinesisk som eit eksternt språk. Systemet tar ein feil innsetjing og lagar fleire rettingsforslag. Det hentar også eksempel kinesiske setningar med engelsk oversettelsar, og hjelper brukarar å forstå korrekte brukar av enkelte grammønster. Dette er den første tilgjengelege kinesiske skrivefeilkorrigeringssystemet basert på rammeverket for omsetjing av neiralmaskin. Vi diskuterer fleire design val og viser empiriske resultat for å støtte avgjøringane våre.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm un sistem de corecție a scrisului chinezesc pentru învățarea limbii chineze ca limbă străină. Sistemul ia o propoziție greșită de introducere și generează mai multe sugestii de corecție. De asemenea, recuperează exemple de propoziții chinezești cu traduceri în limba engleză, ajutând utilizatorii să înțeleagă utilizările corecte ale anumitor tipare gramaticale. Acesta este primul sistem de corectare a erorilor de scriere chinezească disponibil bazat pe cadrul de traducere automată neurală. Discutăm mai multe opțiuni de proiectare și prezentăm rezultate empirice pentru a susține deciziile noastre.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo kineski sistem isprave pisanja za učenje kineskog kao stranog jezika. Sistem uzima pogrešnu rečenicu za ulazak i stvara nekoliko prijedloga za ispravu. Takođe dobija primjer kineske rečenice sa engleskim prevodom, pomažući korisnicima da razumeju prave korištenje određenih gramatičkih obrazaca. Ovo je prvi dostupni kineski sistem za korištenje grešaka na osnovu okvira prevođenja neuralnih mašina. Razgovaramo o nekoliko izbora dizajna i pokažemo empiričke rezultate kako bi podržali naše odluke.', 'si': 'අපි චීනියාව විදේශ භාෂාවක් විදියට ඉගෙන ගන්න චීනියාව ලියනය විධානයක් පෙන්වන්න පද්ධතිය වැරදි ඇතුළු වාක්ය ගන්නවා ඒ වගේම වැරදි සැලසුම් විසින් සැලසුම් ලැබෙනවා. ඒකෙන් ඉංග්\u200dරීසි භාවිතය සමඟ චීන් වචන් උදාහරණය ලබාගන්නවා, ප්\u200dරයෝජකයන්ට සම්පූර්ණ විශේෂයේ  මේක තමයි පළමුවෙනි ප්\u200dරවේශයක් තියෙන්න පුළුවන් චීනි ලියනය වැරදි පද්ධතිය ප්\u200dරවේශනය විසඳ අපි විද්\u200dයාපනය විකල්පයක් කතා කරනවා ඒ වගේම අපේ තීරණාවට උදව් කරන්න ප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dරතිප්\u200dර', 'so': "Waxaynu soo bandhignaynaa nidaam hagaajinta Shiino oo ku qoraya barashada Shiino oo af qalaad ah. nidaamka wuxuu qaadaa hab khalad ah, wuxuuna sameeyaa hagitaan badan. Waxaad sidoo kale helaysaa tusaale ahaan qoraalaha Shiino oo ku qoran turjubaan Ingiriis, kaas oo caawinaya isticmaalaha saxda ah ee qaababka kala duduwan. Kanu waa marka ugu horeysa qorista khaladda ee Shiino oo qoraya habaarka ku saleysan framemka turjumista maskaxda cudurka. Waxaannu kala sheekeynaynaa doorashooyin badan oo design ah, waxaana tusnaa resultooyin faa'iido leh oo ay kaalmeeyaan go'aankayaga.", 'sv': 'Vi presenterar ett kinesiskt skrivkorrigeringssystem för att lära sig kinesiska som främmande språk. Systemet tar en felaktig inmatning mening och genererar flera korrigeringsförslag. Den hämtar också exempel kinesiska meningar med engelska översättningar, vilket hjälper användare att förstå rätt användning av vissa grammatiska mönster. Detta är det första tillgängliga kinesiska skrivfelkorrigeringssystemet baserat på det neurala maskinöversättningsramen. Vi diskuterar flera designval och visar empiriska resultat för att stödja våra beslut.', 'ta': 'நாங்கள் ஒரு சீனா எழுதும் திருத்தம் அமைப்பை ஒரு வெளிநாட்டு மொழியாக கற்றுக்கொள்ளும் சீன்கள். கணினி தவறான உள்ளீட்டு வாக்கியத்தை எடுத்து பல திருத்தம் பரிந்துரைகளை உருவாக்குகிறது. இது உதாரணமாக சீனா வாக்கியங்களை ஆங்கிலத்தில் மொழிபெயர்ப்புகளுடன் கொண்டு எடுத்துகாட்டுகிறது, சில சில குறிப்பிட புதிய இயந்திர மொழிபெயர்ப்பு சட்டத்தை அடிப்படையில் சீனா எழுதும் பிழை திருத்தம் அமைப்பு இது முதல் கிட We discuss several design choices and show empirical results to support our decisions.', 'ur': 'ہم چینی کی زبان کی تعلیم کے لئے ایک چینی لکھنے کی اصلاح سیسٹم کو پیش کرتے ہیں۔ سیسٹم ایک غلط اینٹ ویٹ لیتا ہے اور بہت سی اصلاح پیشنهاد پیدا کرتا ہے. یہ مثال بھی انگلیسی ترجمہ کے ساتھ چینی جماعتیں حاصل کرتا ہے، اور کارساز کو مطلب سمجھنے کی مدد کرتا ہے۔ یہ نئورل ماشین ترجمہ فرم پر بنیاد رکھا ہوا پہلی موجود چینی لیکن خطا ترجمہ سیسٹم ہے. ہم نے بہت سی طراحی انتخاب کی بحث کی اور ہمارے فیصلے کی مدد کرنے کے لئے امپریز نتیجے دکھائے۔', 'uz': "Biz Xitoycha tilni o'rganish uchun o'xshash tizimni o'rganamiz. Name Bu xitoycha so'zlarni ingliz tarjimalar bilan tarjima qilish uchun foydalanuvchilarga haqiqida foydalanish mumkin. Name Biz bir necha dizayning tanlanganni javob beramiz va o'zimizni qo'llashga ishonch qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu một hệ thống chỉnh sửa chữ Trung Quốc để học tiếng Trung làm ngoại ngữ. Hệ thống nhận một câu nhập sai và đưa ra nhiều đề nghị sửa chữa. Nó cũng lấy được ví dụ câu Trung Quốc bằng cách dịch tiếng Anh, giúp người dùng hiểu cách sử dụng chính xác của vài mô hình ngữ pháp. Đây là hệ thống sửa lỗi tín dụng đầu tiên của Trung Quốc dựa trên cơ sở dịch chuyển cỗ máy thần kinh. Chúng tôi thảo luận nhiều lựa chọn thiết kế và cho thấy kết quả có kinh nghiệm để ủng hộ quyết định.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer et kinesisk skrivekorrektionssystem til at lære kinesisk som fremmedsprog. Systemet tager en forkert input sætning og genererer flere korrektionsforslag. Den henter også eksempler på kinesiske sætninger med engelske oversættelser, hvilket hjælper brugerne med at forstå den korrekte anvendelse af visse grammatiske mønstre. Dette er det første tilgængelige kinesiske skrivefejlkorrektionssystem baseret på den neurale maskinoversættelsesramme. Vi diskuterer flere designvalg og viser empiriske resultater til støtte for vores beslutninger.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo kineski sustav isprave pisma za učenje kineskog kao stranog jezika. Sistem uzima pogrešnu rečenicu za ulazak i proizvodi nekoliko prijedloga za ispravu. Također dobija primjer kineske rečenice s engleskim prevodom, pomažući korisnicima razumijeti ispravne korištenje određenih gramatičkih obrazaca. Ovo je prvi dostupni kineski sustav za korištenje grešaka na temelju okvira prevoda neuralnih strojeva. Razgovaramo o nekoliko izbora dizajna i pokažemo empiričke rezultate kako bi podržali naše odluke.', 'bg': 'Представяме система за корекция на китайското писане за изучаване на китайски като чужд език. Системата взема грешно въведено изречение и генерира няколко предложения за корекция. Той също така извлича примерни китайски изречения с английски преводи, като помага на потребителите да разберат правилното използване на определени граматически модели. Това е първата налична китайска система за корекция на грешки, базирана на рамката за невронен машинен превод. Обсъждаме няколко избора на дизайн и показваме емпирични резултати в подкрепа на нашите решения.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren ein chinesisches Schreibkorrektursystem zum Erlernen von Chinesisch als Fremdsprache. Das System nimmt einen falschen Eingabesatz und generiert mehrere Korrekturvorschläge. Es ruft auch chinesische Beispielsätze mit englischen Übersetzungen ab und hilft Benutzern, die korrekte Verwendung bestimmter Grammatikmuster zu verstehen. Dies ist das erste verfügbare chinesische Schreibfehlerkorrektionssystem, das auf dem neuronalen maschinellen Übersetzungs-Framework basiert. Wir diskutieren verschiedene Designoptionen und zeigen empirische Ergebnisse auf, die unsere Entscheidungen unterstützen.', 'nl': 'We presenteren een Chinees schrijfcorrectiesysteem voor het leren van Chinees als vreemde taal. Het systeem neemt een verkeerde invoerzin en genereert verschillende correctiesuggesties. Het haalt ook voorbeeld Chinese zinnen met Engelse vertalingen op, zodat gebruikers het juiste gebruik van bepaalde grammaticapatronen begrijpen. Dit is het eerste beschikbare Chinese schrijffoutcorrectiesysteem gebaseerd op het neurale machinevertaalframework. We bespreken verschillende ontwerpkeuzes en tonen empirische resultaten ter ondersteuning van onze beslissingen.', 'sw': 'Tunawasilisha mfumo wa kuandika sahihi wa China kwa kujifunza China kama lugha ya kigeni. Mfumo unachukua hukumu isiyo sahihi na inatengeneza mapendekezo kadhaa ya sahihi. Vilevile vile inapata hukumu za Kichina yenye tafsiri za Kiingereza, na kuwasaidia watumiaji kuelewa matumizi sahihi ya baadhi ya mitindo ya grammani. This is the first available Chinese writing error correction system based on the neural machine translation framework.  Tunajadili chaguo kadhaa za ubunifu na kuonyesha matokeo ya msisitizo ili kuunga mkono maamuzi yetu.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan sistem koreksi tulisan Cina untuk belajar bahasa Cina sebagai bahasa asing. Sistem mengambil kalimat masukan yang salah dan menghasilkan beberapa saran koreksi. Ini juga mengambil contoh kalimat Cina dengan terjemahan Inggris, membantu pengguna memahami penggunaan yang benar dari pola grammar tertentu. Ini adalah sistem koreksi kesalahan tulisan Cina pertama yang tersedia berdasarkan kerangka terjemahan mesin saraf. Kami mendiskusikan beberapa pilihan desain dan menunjukkan hasil empiris untuk mendukung keputusan kami.', 'ko': '우리는 대외 중국어 학습에 사용되는 중국어 작문 오류 수정 시스템을 제시했다.시스템이 잘못된 입력 문장을 수신하고 여러 개의 수정 제안을 생성합니다.또한 영어 번역이 있는 중국어 문장의 예시를 검색하여 사용자가 일부 문법 모델의 정확한 용법을 이해하도록 돕는다.이것은 처음으로 신경 기계 번역 프레임워크를 바탕으로 한 중국어 작문 오류 수정 시스템이다.우리는 몇 가지 디자인 선택을 토론했고 우리의 결정을 지지하는 실증 결과를 보여 주었다.', 'fa': 'ما سیستم اصلاح نوشتن چینی را برای یادگیری چینی به عنوان زبان خارجی نشان می دهیم. سیستم یک جمله وارد اشتباه می\u200cگیرد و چند پیشنهاد اصلاح می\u200cکند. همچنین جمله\u200cهای چینی را با ترجمه\u200cهای انگلیسی به عنوان مثال می\u200cرساند، کمک به کاربر می\u200cکند که استفاده\u200cهای درست از الگوهای برخی گرامی را درک کنند. این اولین سیستم اصلاح خطای نوشتن چینی است که بر اساس چهارچوب ترجمه ماشین عصبی وجود دارد. ما در مورد چند انتخاب طراحی صحبت می کنیم و نتایج امپراتیک را برای حمایت تصمیمات ما نشان می دهیم.', 'tr': 'Biz Hytaý dili öwrenmek üçin Hytaý ýazma düzeltmegi sistemasyny tanyşdyrýarys. Sistem ýalňyş girdi sözlemi alan we birnäçe düzeltmek maslahatlary bar. Bu hem Çinçe sözleriň Iňlisçe terjimeleri bilen ýazyklanýar, ullançylaryň belli gramatik nusgalarynyň dogrylygyny düşünmesine kömek edýär. Bu nural maşynyň terjimesine dayanan ilkinji bar Çinçe ýazma hata düzeltmegi sistemidir. Biz birnäçe dizayn saýlawlary gürrüň edýäris we kararymyzy desteklemek üçin empirik netijeleri görkeýäris.', 'am': 'የቻይና ጽሑፍ ማቀናጃ ስርዓት የቻይንኛ ቋንቋ ለመማር ነው፡፡ ሲስተም የስህተት ግንኙነት ያስወግዳል ብዙም አስተካክሎችን ይፈጥራል፡፡ ለምሳሌ የቻይና ቃላት በንግግሊዝኛ ትርጓሜዎች እና በተጨማሪው ትርጓሜዎች፣ የተጠቃሚዎቹን የአንዳንዱ የግራማር ዓይነቶች ጥሩ ተጠቃሚዎችን ለማስተዋል ይረዳል፡፡ ይህ የቻይና የፊተኛውን የጽሑፍ ስህተት ማቀናጃ ስርዓት ነው በናውራዊ መሣሪያው ትርጉም ፍሬም የተገኘ ነው። ብዙ የዲጅን ምርጫዎች እና ማስረጃችንን ለመደጋገም የሚችሉትን ፍሬዎች እናሳየዋለን፡፡', 'af': "Ons stel 'n Sjinese skryfkorreksie stelsel voor die Sjinese as 'n vreemde taal te leer. Die stelsel neem 'n verkeerde invoer seting en genereer verskeie korreksie voorstellings. Dit kry ook voorbeeld Sjinese setnings met Engels vertalings, wat gebruikers die korrekte gebruik van sekere grammatiese patrone verstaan. Hierdie is die eerste beskikbaar Sjinese skryffout korreksie stelsel gebaseer op die neurale masjien vertaling raamwerk. Ons bespreek verskeie design keuses en wys empiriese resultate om ons besluite te ondersteun.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim një sistem korektimi kinez për shkrimin për mësimin kinez si një gjuhë të huaj. Sistemi merr një fjalim të gabuar të hyrjes dhe gjeneron disa sugjerime korrektimi. Ajo merr gjithashtu shembuj fjalësh kineze me përkthime angleze, duke ndihmuar përdoruesit të kuptojnë përdorimin e saktë të disa modeleve gramatike. This is the first available Chinese writing error correction system based on the neural machine translation framework.  Ne diskutojmë disa zgjedhje dizajni dhe tregojmë rezultate empirike për të mbështetur vendimet tona.', 'bn': 'চীনা বিদেশী ভাষা হিসেবে শিক্ষা প্রদানের জন্য একটি চীনা লেখা সংস্কার সিস্টেম উপস্থাপন করি। সিস্টেম ভুল ইনপুটের বাক্য গ্রহণ করে বেশ কয়েকটি সংশোধনী পরামর্শ তৈরি করে। এছাড়াও এটি চীনা বাক্যের উদাহরণ পুনরুদ্ধার করে ইংরেজী অনুবাদ দিয়ে, যার ফলে ব্যবহারকারীদের সাহায্য করে কিছু গ্রামার প নিউরুল মেশিন অনুবাদের ফ্রেমের ভিত্তিক ভিত্তিক ভাবে চীনা লেখা ত্রুটি সংশোধনের সিস্টেম এটি প্রথম আমরা বেশ কয়েকটি ডিজাইন নির্বাচন নিয়ে আলোচনা করি এবং আমাদের সিদ্ধান্ত সমর্থনের জন্য ক্ষমতাশালী ফলাফল দেখাই', 'az': 'Biz Çincə dili öyrənmək üçün Çincə yazıb düzəltmə sistemini daxil edirik. Sistem yanlış girdi cümləsini alır və bir neçə düzəltmə təsirlərini yaradır. Bu həmçinin İngilizə çevirilənləri ilə Çin cümlələri də məsəl alır, bəzi grammatik növlərinin doğru istifadələrini anlamağa yardım edir. Bu nöral mašin çeviri çeviri frameyasına dayanan ilk mümkün Çin yazma xətası düzeltme sistemidir. Biz bir neçə dizayn seçimləri mübahisə edirik və kararlarımızı dəstəkləmək üçün empirik sonuçlarını göstəririk.', 'bs': 'Predstavljamo kineski sistem isprave pisanja za učenje kineskog kao stranog jezika. Sistem uzima pogrešnu rečenicu za ulazak i stvara nekoliko prijedloga za ispravu. Također dobija primjer kineske rečenice sa engleskim prevodom, pomažući korisnicima da razumiju ispravne upotrebe određenih gramatičkih obrazaca. Ovo je prvi dostupni kineski sistem za korištenje greške na osnovu okvira prevoda neuralnih strojeva. Razgovaramo o nekoliko izbora dizajna i pokažemo empiričke rezultate kako bi podržali naše odluke.', 'ca': "Presentam un sistema de correcció d'escriptura xinès per aprendre xinès com a llengua estrangera. El sistema pren una frase d'entrada equivocada i genera diverses suggericions de correcció. També obté exemples de frases xineses amb traduccions d'anglès, ajudant els usuaris a entendre els usos correctes de certs patrons gramàtics. This is the first available Chinese writing error correction system based on the neural machine translation framework.  Discutem diverses opcions de disseny i demostram resultats empírics per sostenir les nostres decisions.", 'cs': 'Představujeme systém korekce čínského psaní pro výuku čínštiny jako cizího jazyka. Systém vezme špatnou vstupní větu a generuje několik návrhů na opravu. Také načítá příklady čínských vět s anglickými překlady, což pomáhá uživatelům porozumět správnému použití určitých gramatických vzorů. Jedná se o první dostupný čínský systém korekce chyb psaní založený na neuronovém strojovém překladu frameworku. Diskutujeme několik možností designu a ukazujeme empirické výsledky, které podporují naše rozhodnutí.', 'et': 'Esitame hiina kirjaliku parandussüsteemi hiina keele kui võõrkeele õppimiseks. Süsteem võtab vale sisendlause ja tekitab mitu parandusettepanekut. See toob ka näidiseid hiina lauseid inglise tõlketega, aidates kasutajatel mõista teatud grammatika mustrite õiget kasutamist. See on esimene kättesaadav Hiina kirjutamisvigade parandamise süsteem, mis põhineb neuro masintõlke raamistikul. Arutame mitmeid disainivalikke ja näitame empiirilisi tulemusi, mis toetavad meie otsuseid.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք չինական գրության ուղղության համակարգ չինական լեզու սովորելու համար: Համակարգը սխալ ներմուծի նախադասություն է վերցնում և որոշ կարգավորման առաջարկներ է ստեղծում: Այն նաև վերցնում է օրինակ չինական նախադասություններ անգլերեն թարգմանություններով, օգնելով օգտագործողներին հասկանալ որոշ գրամական կաղապարների ճիշտ օգտագործումը: Սա առաջին հասանելի չինական ձախողումների ուղղելու համակարգն է, որը հիմնված է նյարդային մեքենայի թարգմանման շրջանակի վրա: Մենք քննարկում ենք որոշ դիզայնի ընտրություններ և ցույց ենք տալիս էմպրիկական արդյունքներ մեր որոշումների աջակցության համար:', 'fi': 'Esittelemme kiinalaisen kirjoittamisen korjausj채rjestelm채n kiinalaisen kielen oppimiseen vieraana kielen채. J채rjestelm채 ottaa v채채r채n sy철tt철lauseen ja luo useita korjausehdotuksia. Se my철s hakee esimerkkej채 kiinankielisist채 lauseista englanninkielisill채 k채채nn철ksill채, mik채 auttaa k채ytt채ji채 ymm채rt채m채채n tiettyjen kielioppimallien oikeat k채ytt철tavat. T채m채 on ensimm채inen saatavilla oleva kiinalainen kirjoitusvirheiden korjausj채rjestelm채, joka perustuu neurokonek채채nn철skehykseen. Keskustelemme useista suunnitteluvalinnoista ja n채yt채mme empiirisi채 tuloksia p채채t철ksenteon tueksi.', 'ha': "Munã halatar da tsarin rubutu na China don ka iya karanta Kiniya kamar harshe na ajabu. @ info: whatsthis Yana riƙe misali da misali, sarrafai na China da fassarar Ingiriya, yana taimakon mãsu amfani da su fahimta amfani da masu inganci na misãlai na grammar. Wannan na farkon rubũtun ɓata mai iya amfani da China, na rubũtar da shi, a kan salon da zanen fassarar ɗin maɓallin aikin neural. Munã jãyayya zaɓen zaɓani masu yawa kuma munã nũna matsalatan da za'a ƙarfafa mabaryaranmu.", 'jv': 'Awak dhéwé éntukno sistem kanggo nggambar barang Cino nganggo tresnané. Sistem deweke kelakon kelakon kelakon seneng pisan lan ngeweke sambah supoyo coragen. Rasane nganggep ngeweh mbugal sing dibutun barang Chinese karo terjamahan Inggris, ngjut oleh pengguna ngregani pengguna adalah Iki iku sapa sistem sing dibutuhke tresnaning, sing basa ning tuhake Jejaral Awak dhéwé pisan langgar-pisan winih sing dibenakaké lan ngerasakno perbudhakan empirek kanggo nggawe karaman sing disimperasé awak dhéwé.', 'sk': 'Predstavljamo sistem kitajskega popravka pisanja za učenje kitajskega kot tujega jezika. Sistem vzame napačen vnosni stavek in ustvari več predlogov za popravke. Pridobi tudi primere kitajskih stavkov z angleškimi prevodi, kar uporabnikom pomaga razumeti pravilno uporabo določenih slovničnih vzorcev. To je prvi razpoložljiv kitajski sistem za popravljanje napak pri pisanju, ki temelji na okviru nevronskega strojnega prevajanja. Razpravljamo o več izbirah oblikovanja in prikazujemo empirične rezultate, ki podpirajo naše odločitve.', 'he': 'אנחנו מציגים מערכת תיקון כתיבה סינית ללמוד סיני כשפה זרה. המערכת לוקחת משפט כניסה לא נכון ויוצרה כמה הצעות תיקון. It also retrieves example Chinese sentences with English translations, helping users understand the correct usages of certain grammar patterns.  זו מערכת תיקון שגיאות כתיבה הסינית הראשונה שזמינה בהתבסס על סגרת התרגום של מכונת העצבית. אנחנו מדברים על כמה בחירות עיצוב ונראה תוצאות אמפיריות לתמוך בהחלטות שלנו.', 'bo': 'ང་ཚོས་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་ཕྱི་ཡིག་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་ཤེས་པའི་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་བྲིས་འཛིན་གྱི་མ་ལག་ཅིག་སྟོན་ཡོད། མ་ལག་གི་འཇུག་སྣོད་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་བྱས་མེད་པའི་ཚིག འདིས་དབྱིན་ཡིག་གི་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ལ་དཔེར་བརྗོད་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད། འདི་ནི་རྒྱ་ནག་གི་འབྲི་ནུས་ཀྱི་ནོར་འཁྲུལ་ལུགས་ཀྱི་འགྲེལ་བཤད་ཀྱི་མ་ལག་དང་པོ་ཞིག་རེད། ང་ཚོས་རང་ཉིད་ཀྱི་གདམ་ཁ་གདམ་གསེས་མང་པོ་ཞིག་གིས་བཤད་ནས་ཐད་རྙེད་ཐུབ་པའི་གྲངས་སུ་མཐོང་བ།'}
{'en': 'LTV : Labeled Topic Vector', 'ar': 'LTV: ناقل الموضوع المسمى', 'es': 'LTV: vector de tema etiquetado', 'fr': 'LTV\xa0: vecteur de sujet étiqueté', 'pt': 'LTV: Vetor de tópico rotulado', 'ja': 'LTV:ラベル付きトピックベクトル', 'zh': 'LTV:题向量', 'hi': 'LTV: लेबल विषय वेक्टर', 'ru': 'LTV: меченый вектор темы', 'ga': 'LTV: Veicteoir Ábhar Lipéadaithe', 'el': 'LTV: Διάνυσμα θέματος με ετικέτα', 'ka': 'LTV: ჩვენებული ტემიკური ვექტორი', 'hu': 'LTV: feliratozott témakörök', 'it': 'LTV: vettore argomento etichettato', 'mk': 'LTV: Вектор со означена тема', 'kk': 'LTV: Белгіленген нақышты векторы', 'lt': 'LTV: paženklintas teminis vektorius', 'mt': 'LTV: Labeled Topic Vector', 'mn': 'ЛТV: Мэдээлэгдсэн сэдвийн вектор', 'ms': 'LTV: Vektor Topik Dilabel', 'ml': 'LTV: ലേബെല്\u200dഡ് ടോപ്പ് വെക്റ്റര്\u200d', 'no': 'LTV: Etikettet temavektor', 'pl': 'LTV: Etykietowany wektor tematu', 'ro': 'LTV: Vector subiect etichetat', 'sr': 'LTV: Označeni tema vektor', 'so': 'LTV: Vector tixraac', 'sv': 'LTV: Etiketterad ämnesvektor', 'si': 'LTV: ලේබල් විද්\u200dයාව වෙක්ටර්', 'ur': 'لٹی وی: لیبل ٹیپٹ ویکتور', 'ta': 'LTV: விளக்கப்பட்ட தலைப்பு நெறி', 'vi': 'LV: Vetor theo chủ đề đã dán', 'uz': 'LTV: Yorliq mavzu vector', 'da': 'LTV: Mærket emnevektor', 'de': 'LTV: Beschrifteter Themenvektor', 'bg': 'LTV: Етикетиран тематичен вектор', 'nl': 'LTV: Labeled Topic Vector', 'hr': 'LTV: Označeni temski vektor', 'id': 'LTV: Vektor Topik Labeled', 'sw': 'LTV: Vector ya Mada yenye alama', 'tr': 'LTV: Etiketlenýan Meýdança', 'af': 'LTV: Gemerkte Onderwerp Vektor', 'ko': 'LTV:주제 벡터 표시하기', 'fa': 'LTV: ویکتور موضوع مشخص شده', 'am': 'LTV: Labeled Topic Vector', 'sq': 'LTV: Vektori me temë të etiketuar', 'hy': 'LTV: Labeled Topic Vector', 'az': 'LTV: Etilmiş Mevzu Vektoru', 'ca': 'LTV: Vector temàtic etiquetat', 'bs': 'LTV: Označeni temski vektor', 'bn': 'LTV: লেবেল করা বিষয় ভেক্টর', 'et': 'LTV: Sildistatud teemavektor', 'cs': 'LTV: Vektor označeného tématu', 'fi': 'LTV: otsikoitu aihevektori', 'jv': 'text-editor-action', 'sk': 'LTV: Označen vektor teme', 'he': 'LTV: Vector נושא מצוין', 'ha': 'LTV: QShortcut', 'bo': 'LTV : ཁ་ཡིག་གི་གནད་དོན་སྟངས་ཚོར་བ'}
{'en': 'In this paper we present LTV, a website and API that generates labeled topic classifications based on the Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), an international standard for topic classification in libraries. We introduce nnDDC, a largely language-independent natural network-based classifier for DDC, which we optimized using a wide range of linguistic features to achieve an F-score of 87.4 %. To show that our approach is language-independent, we evaluate nnDDC using up to 40 different languages. We derive a topic model based on nnDDC, which generates probability distributions over semantic units for any input on sense-, word- and text-level. Unlike related approaches, however, these probabilities are estimated by means of nnDDC so that each dimension of the resulting vector representation is uniquely labeled by a DDC class. In this way, we introduce a neural network-based Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'ar': 'نقدم في هذه الورقة البحثية LTV ، وهو موقع ويب وواجهة برمجة تطبيقات تنشئ تصنيفات موضوعية معنونة بناءً على تصنيف ديوي العشري (DDC) ، وهو معيار دولي لتصنيف الموضوعات في المكتبات. نقدم nnDDC ، وهو مُصنِّف طبيعي قائم على الشبكة يعتمد على اللغة إلى حد كبير لـ DDC ، والذي قمنا بتحسينه باستخدام مجموعة واسعة من الميزات اللغوية لتحقيق درجة F تبلغ 87.4٪. لإثبات أن أسلوبنا لا يعتمد على اللغة ، نقوم بتقييم nnDDC باستخدام ما يصل إلى 40 لغة مختلفة. نشتق نموذج موضوع يعتمد على nnDDC ، والذي يولد توزيعات احتمالية على الوحدات الدلالية لأي إدخال على مستوى المعنى والكلمة والنص. على عكس الأساليب ذات الصلة ، ومع ذلك ، يتم تقدير هذه الاحتمالات عن طريق nnDDC بحيث يتم تمييز كل بُعد من أبعاد تمثيل المتجه الناتج بشكل فريد بواسطة فئة DDC. بهذه الطريقة ، نقدم الفضاء الدلالي الناجم عن المصنفات العصبية المستندة إلى الشبكة (nnCISS).', 'es': 'En este artículo presentamos LTV, un sitio web y una API que genera clasificaciones de temas etiquetados basadas en la Clasificación Decimal de Dewey (DDC), un estándar internacional para la clasificación de temas en las bibliotecas. Presentamos NNdDC, un clasificador basado en red natural en gran medida independiente del idioma para DDC, que optimizamos utilizando una amplia gama de características lingüísticas para lograr una puntuación F del 87,4%. Para demostrar que nuestro enfoque es independiente del idioma, evaluamos NNdDC utilizando hasta 40 idiomas diferentes. Derivamos un modelo de tema basado en NdDC, que genera distribuciones de probabilidad sobre unidades semánticas para cualquier entrada a nivel de sentido, palabra y texto. Sin embargo, a diferencia de los enfoques relacionados, estas probabilidades se estiman por medio de NndDC, de modo que cada dimensión de la representación vectorial resultante está etiquetada de forma única por una clase de DDC. De esta manera, introducimos un Espacio Semántico Inducido por Clasificadores (NNCIS) basado en redes neuronales.', 'fr': "Dans cet article, nous présentons LTV, un site Web et une API qui génèrent des classifications de sujets étiquetés basées sur la Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), une norme internationale pour la classification des sujets dans les bibliothèques. Nous introduisons nnDDC, un classificateur basé sur un réseau naturel largement indépendant de la langue pour DDC, que nous avons optimisé à l'aide d'un large éventail de fonctionnalités linguistiques afin d'obtenir un score F de 87,4\xa0%. Pour montrer que notre approche est indépendante de la langue, nous évaluons nnDDC en utilisant jusqu'à 40 langues différentes. Nous dérivons un modèle thématique basé sur nnDDC, qui génère des distributions de probabilité sur des unités sémantiques pour toute entrée au niveau des sens, des mots et du texte. Contrairement aux approches connexes, cependant, ces probabilités sont estimées au moyen de nnDDC de sorte que chaque dimension de la représentation vectorielle résultante soit étiquetée de manière unique par une classe DDC. De cette façon, nous introduisons un espace sémantique induit par un classificateur basé sur un réseau de neurones (NNCISS).", 'pt': 'Neste artigo apresentamos o LTV, um site e API que gera classificações de tópicos rotulados com base na Classificação Decimal de Dewey (DDC), um padrão internacional para classificação de tópicos em bibliotecas. Apresentamos o nnDDC, um classificador baseado em rede natural amplamente independente de linguagem para DDC, que otimizamos usando uma ampla variedade de recursos linguísticos para atingir um F-score de 87,4%. Para mostrar que nossa abordagem é independente do idioma, avaliamos o nnDDC usando até 40 idiomas diferentes. Derivamos um modelo de tópico baseado em nnDDC, que gera distribuições de probabilidade sobre unidades semânticas para qualquer entrada em nível de sentido, palavra e texto. Ao contrário de abordagens relacionadas, no entanto, essas probabilidades são estimadas por meio de nnDDC para que cada dimensão da representação vetorial resultante seja rotulada exclusivamente por uma classe DDC. Desta forma, introduzimos um Espaço Semântico Induzido por Classificador baseado em rede neural (nnCISS).', 'ja': '本稿では、ライブラリにおけるトピック分類の国際標準であるデューイ十進分類（ DDC ）に基づいてラベル付けされたトピック分類を生成するウェブサイトおよびAPIであるLTVを紹介する。私たちは、DDCのための主に言語に依存しない自然なネットワークベースの分類子であるnnDDCを紹介します。これは、幅広い言語学的特徴を使用して最適化され、87.4 ％のFスコアを達成しました。私たちのアプローチが言語に依存しないことを示すために、私たちは最大40の異なる言語を使用してnnDDCを評価します。我々は、nnDDCに基づいてトピックモデルを導出します。これは、センスレベル、ワードレベル、テキストレベルのあらゆる入力のセマンティック単位にわたる確率分布を生成します。しかし、関連するアプローチとは異なり、これらの確率は、結果として生じるベクター表現の各次元がＤＤＣクラスによって一意に標識されるように、ｎｎＤＤＣによって推定される。このようにして、ニューラルネットワークベースのClassifier - Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS)を導入する。', 'zh': '本文,我们介绍了 LTV,这是一个基于杜威十进制分类 (DDC) 生成标记主题分类的网站和 API,DDC 是图书馆中主题分类的国际标准。 吾入 nnDDC,此独立之大略也,网络之 DDC 器也,博言而优化之,成 87.4% F 之数。 为证吾法与语言无关,吾辈用多至40种异语评估nnDDC。 推导出一 nnDDC 之题,当于语义单元上为义、单词、文本等级输生概率分布。 然而异于法者,此概率以 nnDDC 度之,故生向量之维度,皆 DDC 类也。 以此引入一神经网络之器,诱语义空(nnCISS)。', 'hi': 'इस पेपर में हम एलटीवी, एक वेबसाइट और एपीआई प्रस्तुत करते हैं जो डेवी दशमलव वर्गीकरण (डीडीसी) के आधार पर लेबल किए गए विषय वर्गीकरण उत्पन्न करता है, जो पुस्तकालयों में विषय वर्गीकरण के लिए एक अंतरराष्ट्रीय मानक है। हम एनएनडीडीसी, डीडीसी के लिए एक बड़े पैमाने पर भाषा-स्वतंत्र प्राकृतिक नेटवर्क-आधारित क्लासिफायर पेश करते हैं, जिसे हमने 87.4% के एफ-स्कोर को प्राप्त करने के लिए भाषाई विशेषताओं की एक विस्तृत श्रृंखला का उपयोग करके अनुकूलित किया है। यह दिखाने के लिए कि हमारा दृष्टिकोण भाषा-स्वतंत्र है, हम 40 विभिन्न भाषाओं का उपयोग करके एनएनडीडीसी का मूल्यांकन करते हैं। हम एनएनडीडीसी पर आधारित एक विषय मॉडल प्राप्त करते हैं, जो अर्थ-, शब्द- और पाठ-स्तर पर किसी भी इनपुट के लिए शब्दार्थ इकाइयों पर संभाव्यता वितरण उत्पन्न करता है। संबंधित दृष्टिकोणों के विपरीत, हालांकि, इन संभावनाओं का अनुमान एनएनडीडीसी के माध्यम से लगाया जाता है ताकि परिणामी वेक्टर प्रतिनिधित्व के प्रत्येक आयाम को विशिष्ट रूप से डीडीसी वर्ग द्वारा लेबल किया जा सके। इस तरह, हम एक तंत्रिका नेटवर्क-आधारित क्लासिफायर-प्रेरित सिमेंटिक स्पेस (एनएनसीसीआईएसएस) पेश करते हैं।', 'ru': 'В этой статье мы представляем LTV, веб-сайт и API, который генерирует маркированные классификации тем на основе десятичной классификации Дьюи (DDC), международного стандарта классификации тем в библиотеках. Мы представляем nnDDC, в значительной степени независимый от языка естественный сетевой классификатор для DDC, который мы оптимизировали с использованием широкого диапазона лингвистических признаков для достижения F-оценки 87,4%. Чтобы показать, что наш подход не зависит от языка, мы оцениваем nnDDC, используя до 40 различных языков. Мы выводим тематическую модель, основанную на nnDDC, которая генерирует распределения вероятностей по семантическим единицам для любого ввода на уровне смысла, слова и текста. Однако, в отличие от родственных подходов, эти вероятности оцениваются с помощью nnDDC, так что каждое измерение результирующего векторного представления уникально помечено классом DDC. Таким образом, мы вводим нейронную сеть на основе Классификатор-индуцированного семантического пространства (nnCISS).', 'ga': 'Sa pháipéar seo cuirimid LTV i láthair, suíomh Gréasáin agus API a ghineann aicmithe topaicí lipéadaithe bunaithe ar Aicmiú Deachúil Dewey (DDC), caighdeán idirnáisiúnta maidir le haicmiú topaicí i leabharlanna. Tugaimid isteach nnDDC, aicmitheoir líonra nádúrtha teanga-neamhspleách don chuid is mó le haghaidh DDC, a rinneamar leas iomlán a bhaint as ag baint úsáide as raon leathan de ghnéithe teanga chun scór F de 87.4% a bhaint amach. Chun a thaispeáint go bhfuil ár gcur chuige neamhspleách ó thaobh teanga de, déanaimid measúnú ar nnDDC ag baint úsáide as suas le 40 teanga éagsúil. Díorthaíonn muid múnla topaicí atá bunaithe ar nnDDC, a ghineann dáiltí dóchúlachta thar aonaid shéimeantacha d’aon ionchur ar leibhéal ciall, focal agus téacs. Murab ionann agus cuir chuige gaolmhara, áfach, déantar na dóchúlachtaí seo a mheas trí bhíthin nnDDC ionas go mbeidh gach gné den léiriú veicteora mar thoradh air sin lipéadaithe go sainiúil ag aicme DDC. Ar an mbealach seo, tugaimid isteach Spás Séimeantach Aicmitheora-Ionduchtaithe (nnCISS) néar-bhunaithe.', 'el': 'Σε αυτή την εργασία παρουσιάζουμε έναν ιστότοπο και έναν ιστότοπο που παράγει χαρακτηρισμένες ταξινομήσεις θεμάτων με βάση την δεκαδική ταξινόμηση ενός διεθνούς προτύπου για την ταξινόμηση θεμάτων σε βιβλιοθήκες. Παρουσιάζουμε έναν σε μεγάλο βαθμό γλωσσικό ανεξάρτητο φυσικό ταξινομητή δικτύου για τον οποίο βελτιστοποιήσαμε χρησιμοποιώντας ένα ευρύ φάσμα γλωσσικών χαρακτηριστικών για να επιτύχουμε μια βαθμολογία 87,4%. Για να δείξουμε ότι η προσέγγισή μας είναι γλωσσική ανεξάρτητη, αξιολογούμε τη χρήση έως και 40 διαφορετικών γλωσσών. Παράγουμε ένα θεματικό μοντέλο βασισμένο στο το οποίο παράγει διανομές πιθανοτήτων σε σημασιολογικές μονάδες για οποιαδήποτε εισαγωγή σε επίπεδο αισθήσεων, λέξεων και κειμένου. Σε αντίθεση με τις σχετικές προσεγγίσεις, ωστόσο, αυτές οι πιθανότητες υπολογίζονται με τη βοήθεια του έτσι ώστε κάθε διάσταση της προκύπτουσας διανυσματικής αναπαράστασης να επισημαίνεται μοναδικά από μια κατηγορία DDC. Με αυτόν τον τρόπο, εισάγουμε ένα νευρωνικό δίκτυο βασισμένο στον κατηγοριοποιητή Σημαντικό Χώρο (nnCISS).', 'it': "In questo articolo presentiamo LTV, un sito web e API che genera classificazioni tematiche etichettate basate sulla classificazione decimale Dewey (DDC), uno standard internazionale per la classificazione tematica nelle biblioteche. Introducemo nnDDC, un classificatore naturale basato sulla rete per DDC, ampiamente indipendente dalla lingua, che abbiamo ottimizzato utilizzando una vasta gamma di caratteristiche linguistiche per ottenere un punteggio F dell'87,4%. Per dimostrare che il nostro approccio è indipendente dalla lingua, valutiamo nnDDC utilizzando fino a 40 lingue diverse. Otteniamo un modello di argomento basato su nnDDC, che genera distribuzioni di probabilità su unità semantiche per qualsiasi input a livello di senso, parola e testo. A differenza degli approcci correlati, tuttavia, queste probabilità sono stimate per mezzo di nnDDC in modo che ogni dimensione della rappresentazione vettoriale risultante sia etichettata in modo univoco da una classe DDC. In questo modo, introduciamo uno spazio semantico basato su una rete neurale basato su Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).", 'kk': 'Бұл қағазда біз LTV, сайт мен API дегенді көрсетедік, оның Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC) негізінде нақышты классификациясын жазылатын нақышты классификацияларын, жиындарда халықаралық стандарт. Біз DDC үшін көбірек тілді тәуелсіз желінің классификаторын таныстық. Бұл желінің көбірек лингвистикалық мүмкіндіктерінің аумағын ашып, 87,4% деген F- score жеткізу үшін оптимизацияландық. Біздің тәсіліміздің тілі тәуелсіз дегенді көрсету үшін, nnDDC-ды 40 тілдерге қолдану үшін бағалаймыз. Біз nnDDC негіздеген нақыштың үлгісін құрамыз. Бұл семантикалық бірліктерінің сезім, сөз және мәтін деңгейіндегі кіріс үшін мүмкіндік үлгілерін құрамыз. Бірақ бұл мүмкіндіктерді nnDDC түрінде бағалады, сондықтан әрбір вектордың өлшемі DDC класынан бірге жазылады. Бұл түрде, біз невралды желі негіздеген классификатор көмектесетін семантикалық бос орын (nnCISS) таныстық.', 'hu': 'Jelen tanulmányban bemutatjuk az LTV-t, egy weboldalt és API-t, amely a Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC) alapján készít címkézett témaosztályozásokat, amely a könyvtárak témaosztályozására vonatkozó nemzetközi szabvány. Bemutatjuk az nnDDC-t, egy nagyrészt nyelvfüggetlen természetes hálózati osztályozót a DDC-hez, amelyet a nyelvi funkciók széles skálájával optimalizáltunk, hogy 87,4%-os F-pontszámot érjünk el. Annak érdekében, hogy megközelítésünk nyelvfüggetlen, akár 40 különböző nyelven értékeljük az nnDDC-t. Az nnDDC-n alapuló témamodellt származtatjuk, amely valószínűségi eloszlásokat generál szemantikai egységek fölött bármely érzék-, szó- és szövegszintű bemenet esetében. A kapcsolódó megközelítésekkel ellentétben azonban ezeket a valószínűségeket az nnDDC segítségével becsüljük meg úgy, hogy az így kapott vektorreprezentáció minden dimenzióját egyedileg DDC osztály jelöli meg. Így vezetünk be egy neurális hálózat alapú Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'mk': 'Во овој весник претставуваме ЛТВ, веб-страница и АПИ кои генерираат означени класификации на теми базирани на Децималната класификација на Дуи (DDC), меѓународен стандард за класификација на теми во библиотеките. Ние го претставуваме nnDDC, претежно независен од јазик природен мрежен класификатор за DDC, кој го оптимизиравме користејќи широк опсег на јазички карактеристики за да постигнеме F-оценка од 87,4 отсто. За да покажеме дека нашиот пристап е независен од јазикот, ние го проценуваме nnDDC користејќи до 40 различни јазици. Ние изведуваме темски модел базиран на nnDDC, кој генерира веројатни дистрибуции преку семантични единици за било кој влог на смислено, зборно и текстово ниво. За разлика од поврзаните пристапи, сепак, овие веројатности се проценуваат со помош на nnDDC така што секоја димензија на резултатот на претставувањето на векторите е единствено означена од класа DDC. In this way, we introduce a neural network-based Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'ml': 'ഈ പത്രത്തില്\u200d ഞങ്ങള്\u200d എല്\u200dടിവിയെയും എപിഐയെയും കൂട്ടിക്കൊണ്ടിരിക്കുന്നു. അത് ഡീവി ഡെസിമാല്\u200d ക്ലാസിഷന്\u200d അടിസ്ഥാനത്തിലാക്കുന്ന പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട നമ്മള്\u200d എണ്\u200dഡിഡിസിയെ പരിചയപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു, പ്രധാനപ്പെട്ട ഭാഷ-സ്വാതന്ത്ര്യമായ നെറ്റ്\u200cവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി സ്വാഭാവികമായ ഒരു ക്ലാസ്ഫിഫിക്കറ്റ്  To show that our approach is language-independent, we evaluate nnDDC using up to 40 different languages.  എണ്\u200dഡിഡിസിയെ അടിസ്ഥാനമാക്കിയിട്ടുള്ള ഒരു പ്രധാന മോഡല്\u200d നമുക്ക് ലഭ്യമാക്കുന്നു. അത് സെമാന്റിക് യൂണിറ്റുകളില്\u200d വിതരണം ഉണ്ടാ വ്യത്യസ്ത സാഹചര്യങ്ങള്\u200d വെക്റ്റര്\u200d പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെ എല്ലാ ഭാഗങ്ങളും ഡിഡിസി ക്ലാസിന്റെ പ്രതിനിധിക്കുന്നതിന്റെയും പ്രതിനിധികളാല ഇങ്ങനെയാണ്, നമ്മള്\u200d ന്യൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റൂറല്\u200d നെറ്റോവര്\u200dക്ക് അടിസ്ഥാനമായി ക്ലാസിഫയര്\u200d സെമാന്\u200dറിക് സ്പെയിസ് പരിചയപ്പെട', 'lt': 'Šiame dokumente pristatome LTV, interneto svetainę ir API, kuriose sukuriamos pažymėtos temų klasifikacijos, grindžiamos Dewey dešimtine klasifikacija (DDC), tarptautiniu temų klasifikavimo bibliotekose standartu. Įdiegiame nnDDC, daugiausia kalbomis nepriklausomą natūralaus tinklo klasifikatorių DDC, kurį optimizavome naudojant įvairias kalbines savybes, kad pasiektume 87,4 % F rezultatą. Kad parodytume, kad mūsų požiūris nepriklauso nuo kalbos, vertiname nnDDC naudojant iki 40 skirtingų kalbų. Mes sukuriame teminį model į, pagrįstą nnDDC, kuris sukuria tikimybės paskirstymą per semantinius vienetus bet kokiam įvedimui senso, žodžio ir teksto lygiu. Tačiau, priešingai nei susiję metodai, šios tikimybės apskaičiuojamos naudojant nnDDC, kad kiekvienas iš jų gauto vektoriaus atstovavimo matmuo būtų išskirtinai paženklintas DDC klase. Tokiu būdu įdiegiame nervų tinklu pagrįstą klasifikuojančią semeninę erdvę (nnCISS).', 'mt': 'F’dan id-dokument qed nippreżentaw LTV, websajt u API li jiġġeneraw klassifikazzjonijiet tematiċi ttikkettati bbażati fuq il-Klassifikazzjoni Dewey Decimal (DDC), standard internazzjonali għall-klassifikazzjoni tematika fil-libreriji. Aħna nintroduċu nnDDC, klassifikatur naturali bbażat fil-biċċa l-kbira fuq in-netwerk indipendenti mil-lingwa għad-DDC, li a ħna ottimizzajna bl-użu ta’ firxa wiesgħa ta’ karatteristiċi lingwistiċi biex jinkiseb punteġġ F ta’ 87.4%. Biex jintwera li l-approċċ tagħna huwa indipendenti mil-lingwa, aħna jevalwaw nnDDC bl-użu ta’ sa 40 lingwa differenti. Aħna nidderivaw mudell tematiku bbażat fuq nnDDC, li jiġġenera distribuzzjonijiet ta’ probabbiltà fuq unitajiet semantiċi għal kwalunkwe input fuq livell ta’ sens, kelma u test. Għall-kuntrarju ta’ approċċi relatati, madankollu, dawn il-probabbiltà huma stmati permezz ta’ nnDDC sabiex kull dimensjoni tar-rappreżentanza tal-vettur li tirriżulta tkun tikkettata unikament minn klassi DDC. B’dan il-mod, a ħna nintroduċu Spazju Semantiku Indutt minn Klassifikatur ibbażat fuq in-netwerk newrali (nnCISS).', 'ka': 'ამ დომენტში ჩვენ LTV, საიბეტი და API, რომელიც წარმოიქმნა ტემენტიკური კლასიფიკაციას, რომელიც Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC) დაბაზიან, ინტერსონაციული სტანდარული ტემენტიკური კლასიფიკაციაზე ლი ჩვენ განვითავსებთ nnDDC, მნიშვნელოვანი ენერგიის განსაზღვრებული ნახვა ქსელის კლასიფიკაცია, რომელიც ჩვენ განვითავსებდით, რომელიც უფრო დიდი ენერგისტიკური ფუნქციების გამოყენება, რომ F-score 87. რომ ჩვენი წარმოდგენა ენის განსაზღვრებულია, ჩვენ განსაზღვრებულია nnDDC-ს გამოყენებული 40 განსხვავებული ენებისთვის. ჩვენ განვითარებთ თემების მოდელი, რომელიც nnDDC-ზე დაბაზიან, რომელიც იქნება შესაძლებლობა განყოფილებების სიმენტიკური ერთეულების შესაძლებლობა სიმენტიკური ერთეულების შესაძლებლობა,  მაგრამ ამ შესაძლებლობების განსხვავებაში nnDDC-ის გამოყენება, რადგან შემდეგ გვქტორის გამოყენება განსხვავებული განსხვავება DDC-ის კლასის განსხვავებული განსხვავება ერთადერთიან. ასე, ჩვენ ჩვენ შევცვალობთ ნეიროლური ქსელის დაბათებული კლასიფიური სემანტიკური სამყარო (nnCISS).', 'ms': 'Dalam kertas ini kami perkenalkan LTV, laman web dan API yang menghasilkan klasifikasi topik yang ditabel berdasarkan Klasifikasi Dewey Decimal (DDC), piawai antarabangsa untuk klasifikasi topik di perpustakaan. Kami memperkenalkan nnDDC, pengklasifikasi semulajadi berdasarkan bahasa-bebas untuk DDC, yang kami optimizkan menggunakan julat luas ciri-ciri bahasa untuk mencapai skor F 87.4%. Untuk menunjukkan bahawa pendekatan kita adalah bebas bahasa, kita menilai nnDDC menggunakan sehingga 40 bahasa yang berbeza. We derive a topic model based on nnDDC, which generates probability distributions over semantic units for any input on sense-, word- and text-level.  Tidak seperti pendekatan berkaitan, bagaimanapun, kemungkinan-kemungkinan ini diharapkan melalui nnDDC sehingga setiap dimensi perwakilan vektor yang berasal adalah ditabel unik oleh kelas DDC. Dengan cara ini, kami memperkenalkan Ruang Seman Diinduksi oleh Klasifikasi-Berasas Rangkaian saraf (nnCISS).', 'ro': 'În această lucrare prezentăm LTV, un site web și API care generează clasificări de subiecte etichetate bazate pe Clasificarea Decimală Dewey (DDC), un standard internațional pentru clasificarea subiectelor în biblioteci. Introducem nnDDC, un clasificator natural bazat pe rețea, în mare parte independent de limbă, pentru DDC, pe care l-am optimizat folosind o gamă largă de caracteristici lingvistice pentru a obține un scor F de 87,4%. Pentru a arăta că abordarea noastră este independentă de limbă, evaluăm nnDDC folosind până la 40 de limbi diferite. Obținem un model de subiect bazat pe nnDDC, care generează distribuții de probabilitate peste unitățile semantice pentru orice intrare la nivel de sens, cuvânt și text. Spre deosebire de abordările conexe, aceste probabilități sunt estimate prin intermediul nnDDC astfel încât fiecare dimensiune a reprezentării vectoriale rezultate să fie etichetată unic de o clasă DDC. În acest fel, introducem un spațiu semantic indus de clasificatori (nnCISS) bazat pe rețele neurale.', 'no': 'I denne papiret presenterer vi LTV, ein nettstad og API som lagar merkelige temaklassifikasjonar basert på Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), eit internasjonal standard for temaklassifikasjon i biblioteket. Vi introduserer nnDDC, eit stort språk-uavhengig naturlig nettverksbasert klassifisering for DDC, som vi optimalisera med eit brett område lingviske funksjonar for å oppnå ein F-score med 87,4%. For å visa at tilnærming vårt er språk-uavhengig, evaluerer vi nnDDC med opp til 40 ulike språk. Vi deriverer eit temamodell basert på nnDDC, som lagar sannsynlighetsgruppa over semantiske einingar for alle inndata på sannsynlighetsgruppa, ord og tekstnivå. Desse sannsynlege tilnærmingane er imidlertid beregne av nnDDC slik at kvar dimensjon av den resulterte vektorrepresentasjonen er enkelt merket av ein DDC-klasse. På denne måten introduserer vi ein neuralnettverk basert semiantisk plass (nnCISS).', 'sr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo LTV, stranicu i API koja stvara označene klasifikacije tema na temelju Dewey Decimal klasifikacije (DDC), međunarodni standard klasifikacije tema u bibliotekama. Predstavljamo nnDDC, većinom nezavisni prirodni klasifikator za DDC-u, koji smo optimizirali koristeći širok niz jezičkih karakteristika kako bi postigli F-rezultat od 87,4%. Da bismo pokazali da je naš pristup nezavisni jezik, procjenjujemo nnDDC koristeći do 40 različitih jezika. Izvodimo model teme na osnovu nnDDC-a, koji stvara verovatnoće distribucije preko semantičkih jedinica za bilo koji ulaz na razinu smisla, reči i teksta. Za razliku od povezanih pristupa, međutim, ova verovatnoća se procjenjuju od strane nnDDC tako da je svaka dimenzija rezultatnog predstavljanja vektora jedinstveno označena klasom DDC. Na taj naèin predstavljamo neuralnu mrežu pod klasifikacijom semiantičkog prostora (nnCISS).', 'si': 'මේ පැත්තේ අපි LTV, වැබැයිට් සහ API එකක් පෙන්වන්නේ, ඒකෙන් ලේබල් කරපු විදේශ වර්ගයක් ලේබල් කරපු විදේශ වර්ගයක් ලේබල් කරනවා ඩේවේ ඩිස අපි DDC වෙනුවෙන් විශාල භාෂාවක් ස්වාභිත ජාතික ජාතික විශේෂකයෙක් පෙනුම් කරනවා, ඒක අපි ලොකු භාෂාවික විශේෂකයක් භාවිතා ක පෙන්වන්න අපේ භාෂාව ස්ථාවත් වෙන්නේ කියලා, අපි වෙනස් භාෂාව 40ක් වෙනුවෙන් නිර්මාණය කරනවා. අපි ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා නිර්මාණයක් නිර්මාණය කරනවා, ඒකෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් සෙමැන්ටික් යුනිටිකයෙන් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක්  ඒත් සම්බන්ධ වෙක්ටර් ප්\u200dරතිනිධානයට වෙනස් වෙනුවෙන්, මේ සංභාවත්වය අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන් අනුවෙන මෙහෙම විදියට, අපි න්\u200dයූරල් ජාලයේ අධාරිත ක්ලාසිෆාර් ඉන්දික් සෙමාන්ටික් තැනක් පෙනුම් කරනවා.', 'so': 'Warqadan waxaynu ku soo qornaa LTV, bogga shabakadda iyo API oo ku soo bandhigaya fasaxyada mada lagu qoray oo ku saleysan fasaxa Dewey Decimal (DDC), kaas oo ah standardka caalamiga ah ee warqadaha mada ku qoran. Waxaannu soo bandhignaa DDC, taas oo ah kooxa shabakadda asalka ah oo ugu weyn oo ku saabsan afka, taas oo a an ku isticmaalnay noocyo badan oo luuqad ah si aan u gaadhno koox F-score 87.4 boqolkiiba. Si aan u muujinno in qaababkayagu uu yahay mid aan luqad laheyn, waxaynu qiimeynaynaa INDC isticmaalka ugu badnaan 40 luuqadood oo kala duduwan. Waxaynu helaynaa muusiko ku saabsan nnDC, kaas oo sababto qayb ka gaaraya qalabka semantika, mid kasta oo ku qoran waxgarasho-, hadal- iyo heerka text. Dhaqdooyinka kala duwan ee la xiriiro, habase yeeshee suurtagalkaas waxaa lagu qiimeeyaa dhaqdhaqaaq u gaar ah oo lagu soo bandhigi karo fasalka DDC. Sidan darteed waxaynu soo bandhignaa shabakadda neurada ee ku saleysan klassifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'sv': 'I denna uppsats presenterar vi LTV, en webbplats och API som genererar märkta ämnesklassificeringar baserat på Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), en internationell standard för ämnesklassificering i bibliotek. Vi introducerar nnDDC, en i stort sett språkoberoende naturlig nätverksbaserad klassificerare för DDC, som vi optimerade med hjälp av ett brett spektrum av språkliga funktioner för att uppnå en F-poäng på 87,4%. För att visa att vårt tillvägagångssätt är språkoberoende utvärderar vi nnDDC med upp till 40 olika språk. Vi härleder en ämnesmodell baserad på nnDDC, som genererar sannolikhetsfördelningar över semantiska enheter för varje input på sense-, ord- och textnivå. Till skillnad från relaterade metoder uppskattas dock dessa sannolikheter med hjälp av nnDDC så att varje dimension av den resulterande vektorrepresentationen märks unikt av en DDC-klass. På detta sätt introducerar vi ett neuralt nätverksbaserat Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'pl': 'W artykule przedstawiamy LTV, stronę internetową i API generującą klasyfikacje etykietowanych tematów w oparciu o Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), międzynarodowy standard klasyfikacji tematów w bibliotekach. Wprowadzamy nnDDC, w dużej mierze niezależny od języka naturalny klasyfikator sieciowy DDC, który zoptymalizowaliśmy przy użyciu szerokiej gamy cech językowych, aby osiągnąć wynik F 87,4%. Aby pokazać, że nasze podejście jest niezależne od języka, oceniamy nnDDC używając maksymalnie 40 różnych języków. Wywodzimy model tematyczny oparty na nnDDC, który generuje rozkłady prawdopodobieństwa na jednostkach semantycznych dla dowolnego wejścia na poziomie sensu, słowa i tekstu. W przeciwieństwie do podejść powiązanych, prawdopodobieństwa te są jednak oszacowane za pomocą nnDDC tak, że każdy wymiar wynikowej reprezentacji wektorowej jest jednoznacznie oznaczony przez klasę DDC. W ten sposób wprowadzamy opartą na sieci neuronowej klasyfikowaną przestrzeń semantyczną (nnCISS).', 'ta': 'இந்த காகிதத்தில் நாம் LTV, ஒரு வலைதளத்தில் மற்றும் API, அது குறிப்பிட்ட தலைப்பு வகைப்புகளை உருவாக்குகிறது, Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), நூலகங்களில் உள்ள தலைப்பு  நாம் என்டிடிசி. சிறிய மொழி- சுதந்து இயற்கை வலைப்பின்னல் வகுப்பாளரை குறிப்பிடுகிறோம். இதை நாம் விரிவான மொழி குணங்களை பயன்படுத்தி 87.4% - புள்ளிகள எங்கள் முன்னேற்றம் மொழி சுதந்திரமாக இருக்கும் என்பதை காட்டுவதற்கு, நாம் என்டிடிசி 40 வேறு மொழிகளை பயன்படுத nnDC அடிப்படையில் நாம் ஒரு தலைப்பு மாதிரி கிடைத்துள்ளோம், அது புரிந்த, வார்த்தை மற்றும் உரை நிலையில் எந்த உள்ளீடு வெக்டர் பிரதிநிதியின் ஒவ்வொரு பரிமானமும் டிடிசி வகுப்பால் தனிப்பட்டதாக குறிக்கப்பட்டுள்ளது. இந்த வழியில், நாம் ஒரு புதிய வலைப்பின்னல் அடிப்படையிலுள்ள வகுப்பாளர் சுட்டி செமாண்டிக் இடைவெளி( nnCISS).', 'ur': 'ہم اس کاغذ میں LTV، ایک ویب سائٹ اور API پیش کرتے ہیں جو دیوی دسمیل کلاسیفٹ (DDC) پر بنیاد لکھی ہوئی ٹوپ کلاسیفٹ کی لکھی ہوئی ٹوپ کلاسیفٹ کے لئے ایک منطقی استاندارڈ ہے۔ ہم نے nnDDC کو معرفی کریں، ایک بڑی زبان-غیر مستقل طبیعی نیٹورک کے سامنے بنیاد رکھا ہوا کلاسیر، جسے ہم نے 87.4% کے F-score کو پہنچانے کے لئے بہت زیادہ زبان شناسی ویژگی کے مطابق استعمال کر دیا۔ کہ ہمارا طریقہ زبان سے بے اختیار ہے، ہم نے nnDDC کو 40 مختلف زبانوں کے مطابق ارزش کر لیا ہے۔ ہم نے nnDDC پر بنیاد رکھی ایک موضوع موڈل پیدا کیا ہے، جو سیمانٹی یونیٹوں پر احتمال تقسیم کرتا ہے، جو کچھ سمجھ، کلمات اور متن-سطح پر اضافہ کرتی ہے۔ لیکن ان احتمالات کو انڈی ڈی سی کے ذریعے مطابق مقرر کیا جاتا ہے تاکہ نتیجہ والکتر کی ہر اندازہ ایک DDC کلاس کے ذریعے ایک طرح لکھی جاتی ہے. اس طرح، ہم ایک نیورل نیٹ ورک کی بنیادی کلاسیفور-انڈیس سیمنٹی فضا (nnCISS) کو معرفی کرتے ہیں۔', 'mn': 'Энэ цаасан дээр бид ЛТВ, вэбсайт болон API-г бий болгож байна. Энэ нь Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), номын сан дээрх олон улсын сэдвийн классификацийн стандарт юм. Бид ДДК-ын ихэнх хэл-хамааралтай байгалийн сүлжээний үндсэн хэлбэрээс хамааралтай байгалийн сүлжээний хуваарилагч nnDDC-г танилцуулдаг. Тэгээд бид F-score 87.4%-г хүртэл олон хэлний чадварыг ашиглан сайж Бидний арга зам нь хэл-хамааралтай гэдгийг харуулахын тулд бид nnDDC-г 40 өөр хэл хүртэл үнэлдэг. Бид nnDDC-н үндсэн сэдвийн загварын загвар гаргадаг. Энэ нь ямар ч мэдрэмж, үг болон текст-түвшинд ямар ч мэдрэмж болон semantic нэгжүүд дээр хуваарилах магадлал юм. Гэхдээ холбоотой ойлголтын ялгаатай, энэ магадлал нь nnDDC-н аргаар тооцоолж байгаа учраас үр дүнтэй векторын хэмжээсүүд бүр DDC-н ангид ганц хэмжээтэй тэмдэглэгддэг. Иймээс бид мэдрэлийн сүлжээнд суурилсан классифер-индукцион Semantic Space (nnCISS) гэдгийг танилцуулдаг.', 'uz': "Bu sahifada biz LTV, veb- sahifa va API dasturlarini yaratadigan Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC) asosida yaratish mumkin, maktablarda mavzu darajasining international standardi. Biz DDC uchun juda katta tillar bilan o'xshash tarmoq taʼminlovchini ishlatimiz. Biz bu DDC uchun juda ko'p tillar imkoniyatlarini foydalanish uchun 87.4% (F- scorning F- scorini ishga tushirish uchun juda ko'p tarmoq imkoniyatlarni yordam berdik. Ko'rsatish uchun bizning fikrimiz tilning o'xshash tili, biz yangi DDC 40dan boshqa tillardan foydalanishni qiymatmiz. Biz yangi DDC asosida mavzu modeli yaratdik. Bu bir narsa ma'lumot, so'z va matn darajasi uchun semantik biriklarga qayta tarqatishni yaratadi. Shunday qilib, boshqa bog'liq murakkablarini yanDDC orqali qidirish mumkin, va natijasida vektor representiyasi har bir qismi DDC sinf bilan uning notoʻgʻri. Bu yerda biz neyrolik tarmoqning asosidagi klassifier semantik romanini (nnCISS) qilamiz.", 'vi': 'Trong tờ giấy này chúng tôi giới thiệu LV, một trang web và API để tạo ra các phân loại đề xuất xuất xuất xuất xuất về chủ đề dựa trên Chữ Thập Thập Dewey (DDC), một tiêu chuẩn quốc tế cho việc phân loại chủ đề trong các thư viện. Chúng tôi giới thiệu Tết Công An, một người phân loại tự nhiên tự do ngôn ngữ, dựa vào DDC, mà chúng tôi đã nâng cao khả năng sử dụng một loạt các tính năng ngôn ngữ rộng để đạt được số lượng 84. Để chứng minh cách tiếp cận của chúng ta độc lập ngôn ngữ, chúng ta đánh giá Tết Công ty bằng cách dùng tới bốn mươi ngôn ngữ khác nhau. Chúng ta nhận được một mô hình chủ đề dựa trên chuẩn chuẩn niên nọ, nó tạo ra các phân chia xác suất trên các đơn vị theo ngữ pháp cho bất kỳ mục nhập nào. Không giống các phương pháp liên quan, tuy nhiên, khả năng này được tính toán bằng non GDC để mỗi chiều của đại diện vector Kết quả chỉ được nhãn bởi một lớp DDC. Bằng cách này, chúng ta giới thiệu một Vũ trụ Semantic kỳ diệu liên kết với hệ thần kinh', 'nl': 'In dit artikel presenteren we LTV, een website en API die gelabelde topic classificaties genereert op basis van de Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), een internationale standaard voor topic classificatie in bibliotheken. We introduceren nnDDC, een grotendeels taalonafhankelijke natuurlijke netwerk-gebaseerde classificator voor DDC, die we hebben geoptimaliseerd met behulp van een breed scala aan taalkundige kenmerken om een F-score van 87,4%. Om aan te tonen dat onze aanpak taalonafhankelijk is, evalueren we nnDDC met maximaal 40 verschillende talen. We leiden een topic model af op basis van nnDDC, dat waarschijnlijkheidsverdelingen genereert over semantische eenheden voor elke input op zintuig-, woord- en tekstniveau. In tegenstelling tot verwante benaderingen worden deze waarschijnlijkheden echter geschat door middel van nnDDC zodat elke dimensie van de resulterende vectorrepresentatie uniek wordt gelabeld door een DDC klasse. Op deze manier introduceren we een op neuraal netwerk gebaseerde Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'bg': 'В настоящата статия представяме уеб сайт и API, който генерира етикетирани класификации на теми въз основа на Десетичната класификация на Дюи (ДДК), международен стандарт за класификация на темите в библиотеките. Ние въвеждаме НДДК, до голяма степен независим от езика естествен мрежов класификатор за ДДК, който оптимизирахме, използвайки широк спектър от лингвистични характеристики, за да постигнем F-score от 87,4%. За да покажем, че нашият подход е независим от езика, ние оценяваме НДДК, използвайки до 40 различни езика. Извличаме тематичен модел, базиран на който генерира вероятностни разпределения върху семантични единици за всеки вход на ниво смисъл, дума и текст. За разлика от свързаните подходи обаче, тези вероятности се оценяват чрез nDDC, така че всяко измерение на полученото векторно представяне е уникално обозначено от клас DDC. По този начин ние въвеждаме базирано на невронна мрежа Класификатор-индуцирано Семантично пространство (nCISS).', 'de': 'In diesem Beitrag stellen wir LTV vor, eine Website und API, die beschriftete Themenklassifikationen basierend auf der Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC) generiert, einem internationalen Standard für die Themenklassifizierung in Bibliotheken. Wir stellen nnDDC vor, einen weitgehend sprachunabhängigen natürlichen netzwerkbasierten Klassifikator für DDC, den wir mit einer Vielzahl sprachlicher Merkmale optimiert haben, um einen F-Score von 87,4%. Um zu zeigen, dass unser Ansatz sprachunabhängig ist, evaluieren wir nnDDC mit bis zu 40 verschiedenen Sprachen. Wir leiten ein auf nnDDC basierendes Themenmodell ab, das Wahrscheinlichkeitsverteilungen über semantische Einheiten für jede Eingabe auf Sinn-, Wort- und Textebene generiert. Im Gegensatz zu verwandten Ansätzen werden diese Wahrscheinlichkeiten jedoch mittels nnDDC geschätzt, so dass jede Dimension der resultierenden Vektorrepräsentation eindeutig durch eine DDC-Klasse gekennzeichnet ist. Auf diese Weise führen wir einen auf neuronalem Netzwerk basierenden Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS) ein.', 'hr': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo LTV, stranicu i API koja stvara označene klasifikacije teme na temelju Dewey Decimal klasifikacije (DDC), međunarodni standard klasifikacije teme u bibliotekama. Predstavljamo nnDDC, većinom nezavisni klasifikator prirodne mreže baziran na jeziku za DDC, koji smo optimizirali s širom niza jezičkih karakteristika kako bi postigli F-rezultat od 87,4%. Da bi pokazali da je naš pristup nezavisni jezik, procjenjujemo nnDDC koristeći do 40 različitih jezika. Nalazimo model teme na temelju nnDDC, koji stvara vjerojatnost distribucije preko semantičkih jedinica za bilo koji ulaz na razinu smisla, riječi i teksta. Za razliku od povezanih pristupa, međutim, ove vjerojatnosti procjenjuju pomoću nnDDC-a tako da je svaka dimenzija rezultatnog predstavljanja vektora jedinstveno označena klasom DDC-a. Na taj način, predstavljamo neuralnu mrežu pod klasifikacijom semiantičkog prostora (nnCISS).', 'da': 'I denne artikel præsenterer vi LTV, en hjemmeside og API, der genererer mærkede emneklassificeringer baseret på Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), en international standard for emneklassificering i biblioteker. Vi introducerer nnDDC, en stort set sproguafhængig naturlig netværksbaseret klassificering af DDC, som vi optimerede ved hjælp af en bred vifte af sproglige funktioner for at opnå en F-score på 87,4%. For at vise, at vores tilgang er sproguafhængig, evaluerer vi nnDDC ved hjælp af op til 40 forskellige sprog. Vi udleder en emnemodel baseret på nnDDC, som genererer sandsynlighedsfordelinger over semantiske enheder for ethvert input på sans-, ord- og tekstniveau. I modsætning til relaterede tilgange estimeres disse sandsynligheder imidlertid ved hjælp af nnDDC, således at hver dimension af den resulterende vektorrepræsentation er unikt mærket af en DDC-klasse. På denne måde introducerer vi et neuralt netværk baseret Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'sw': 'Katika gazeti hili tunalowasilisha LTV, tovuti na API ambalo linatengeneza vipengele vya mada kwa kutumia Maktaba ya Dewey Decimal (DDC), kiwango cha kimataifa cha kutangaza mada katika maktaba. Tunawasilisha nnDC, mchangazaji wa mtandao huru wa lugha yenye asili ya asili kwa ajili ya DDC, ambao tulikuwa na optimizi kwa kutumia vipengele vingi vya lugha ili kufikia kiwango cha F-score cha asilimia 87.4. Ili kuonyesha kuwa mbinu yetu ni huru ya lugha, tunatathmini NDC kwa kutumia hadi lugha 40 tofauti. Tunatoa mtindo wa mada unaotengenezwa na nnDC, ambao unasababisha usambazaji wa uwezekano wa vitengo vya kimapenzi kwa ajili ya vitu vyote vya maana, maneno na viwango vya maandishi. Tofauti na mbinu zinazohusiana, hata hivyo, uwezekano huu unakadiriwa kwa njia ya nnDC ili kila upeo wa uwakilishi wa vector unaonyesha kipekee na darasa la DDC. Kwa namna hii, tunatambua eneo la msingi wa mtandao wa neura linalohusiana na mwandishi wa aina ya sekondari (nnCISS).', 'id': 'Dalam kertas ini kami mempersembahkan LTV, sebuah website dan API yang menghasilkan klasifikasi topik yang ditabel berdasarkan Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), standar internasional untuk klasifikasi topik di perpustakaan. Kami memperkenalkan nnDDC, sebuah klasifikasi alam berdasarkan kebanyakan bahasa-bebas untuk DDC, yang kami optimisasikan menggunakan jangkauan lebar dari fitur bahasa untuk mencapai skor F 87,4%. To show that our approach is language-independent, we evaluate nnDDC using up to 40 different languages.  Kami menghasilkan model topik berdasarkan nnDDC, yang menghasilkan distribusi kemungkinan atas unit semantis untuk input apapun pada tingkat sensor, kata dan teks. Tidak seperti pendekatan terkait, bagaimanapun, kemungkinan-kemungkinan ini diharapkan melalui nnDDC sehingga setiap dimensi dari representation vektor yang berasal adalah unik ditabel oleh kelas DDC. Dengan cara ini, kami memperkenalkan ruang Seman Diinduksi oleh Klasifikator berdasarkan jaringan saraf (nnCISS).', 'fa': 'در این کاغذ ما LTV، یک وبسایت و API را نشان می دهیم که کلاسیف دهم دیوی (DDC) یک استاندارد بین المللی برای کلاسیف موضوع در کتابخانه\u200cها تولید می\u200cکند. ما nnDDC را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک رابطه\u200cکننده\u200cی شبکه طبیعی بسیار مستقل به زبان\u200cها برای DDC، که با استفاده از مجموعه\u200cی ویژگی\u200cهای زبان\u200cشناسی گسترده\u200cای برای رسیدن یک نقطه F-score 87.4 درصد. برای نشان دادن که روش ما به زبان مستقل است، ما nnDDC را با استفاده از ۴۰ زبان مختلف ارزیابی می کنیم. ما یک مدل موضوع را بر اساس nnDDC تولید می\u200cکنیم که احتمال توزیع احتمال بر واحدهای semantic برای هر ورودی بر اساس حس، کلمه و سطح متن تولید می\u200cکند. با این وجود، این احتمالات به وسیله nnDDC تقدیر می\u200cشود تا هر اندازه نمایش ویکتور نتیجه\u200cای از یک کلاس DDC یک نقاشی باشد. به این طریق، ما یک فضای متوسط به شبکه عصبی معرفی می\u200cکنیم (nnCISS).', 'tr': "Bu kagyzda LTV, bir website we API we Dewey Decimal Klassifikasyona (DDC) we kitaphanalarda meýdança topar klasifikasiýasy üçin halkara derejesi bar. DDC'a görkezilýän nnDDC, DDC üçin adatça dillerden uzaklaşsyz, bir F düzümi 87.4%-den ýetmek üçin düzümlendirdik. Biziň ýaryşymyz dili boýunça bolandygyny görkezmek üçin, biz nnDDC'i 40 dürli dillerden üýtgedýäris. Biz nnDDC'a daýanýan bir tema nusgasyny çykarýarys. Bu semantik bir nusgasy üçin her hili girişi duýgunça, söz we metin derejesini döreýär. Ancak, bu mümkün zamanlar nnDDC vasitəsine görä hasaplanýar, böylece netijeli vektör çarpyşynyň her boyutynyň bir DDC sınıpy tarapyndan bir tek etiket edildi. Bu şekilde, nöral a ğdan tabanlı Klasifir-Indikli Semantik alan (nnCISS) tanıştırıyoruz.", 'af': "In hierdie papier voorsien ons LTV, 'n webbladsy en API wat genereer etiketeerde onderwerp klasifikasies gebaseer op die Dewey Decimal Klassifikasie (DDC), â\x80\x99n internasionale standaard vir onderwerp klasifikasie in biblioteke. Ons introduseer nnDDC, 'n groot taal-onafhanklike natuurlike netwerk-gebaseerde klassifiseerder vir DDC, wat ons optimaliseer met 'n wyde reek lingwisiese funksies om 'n F-telling van 87.4%, te bereik. Om ons toegang te wys is taal-onveilig, evalueer ons nnDDC met gebruik tot 40 verskillende tale. Ons ontvang 'n onderwerp model gebaseer op nnDDC, wat genereer waarskynlik verspreidings oor semantiese eenhede vir enige invoer op sin -, woord- en teks- vlak. Ongelyks van verwante toegange, maar hierdie waarskynlikheide word deur middel van nnDDC gespesifiseer sodat elke dimensie van die resulteerde vektorvoorstelling enieke gemerk word deur 'n DDC klas. Op hierdie manier introduiseer ons 'n neurale netwerk gebaseerde klassifier-ingestelde semiantiese spasie (nnCISS).", 'ko': '본고에서 우리는 두웨이십진분류(DDC)를 바탕으로 하는 사이트와 API를 소개했는데 이 분류는 도서관 주제 분류의 국제 표준이다.우리는 nnddc를 도입했다. 이것은 기본적으로 언어에 독립된 자연 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 DDC 분류기로서 우리는 광범위한 언어 특징을 사용하여 이를 최적화하여 87.4%의 F 점수를 얻었다.우리의 방법이 언어에 독립되어 있음을 증명하기 위해서, 우리는 40가지에 달하는 다른 언어를 사용하여 nndDC를 평가한다.우리는 nnddc를 기반으로 한 주제 모델을 추론했는데 이 모델은 의미 단원에서 어떠한 의미, 단어와 텍스트 단계의 입력에 확률 분포를 생성한다.그러나 관련 방법과 달리 이러한 확률은 nnddc를 통해 추정되기 때문에 얻은 벡터가 표시하는 모든 차원은 하나의DDC류가 유일하게 표시한다.이런 방식을 통해 우리는 신경 네트워크를 바탕으로 하는 분류기 유도 의미 공간(nncISS)을 도입했다.', 'hy': 'Այս թղթի մեջ մենք ներկայացնում ենք LTV-ը, վեբ կայք և API-ը, որը ստեղծում է թեմային դասակարգումներ, որոնք հիմնված են Դույի տասնամյակ դասակարգում (DDD), գրադարաններում թեմային դասակարգումների միջազգային ստանդարտ: Մենք ներկայացնում ենք անկախ լեզվից անկախ բնական ցանցի դասակարգիչը, որը մենք օպտիմացնում էինք օգտագործելով լեզվաբանական առանձնահատկություններ 87.4 տոկոսի F-գնահատականի հասնելու համար: Որպեսզի ցույց տանք, որ մեր մոտեցումը անկախ է լեզվից, մենք գնահատում ենք անգլերեն անգլերեն անգլերեն անգլերեն անգլերեն անգլերեն անգլերեն անգլերեն անգ Մենք ստեղծում ենք նյութական մոդել, որը հիմնված է nn DDDD-ի վրա, որը ստեղծում է հավանականության տարածումներ սեմանտիկ միավորների վրա իմաստային, բառերի և տեքստի մակարդակի ցանկացած ներմուծի համար: Սակայն, ի տարբերություն կապված մոտեցումներին, այս հավանականությունները գնահատվում են նDDD-ի միջոցով, այնպես որ արտադրված վեկտորի ներկայացման յուրաքանչյուր չափը միանգամայն նշանված է DDD-ի դասի կողմից: In this way, we introduce a neural network-based Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'am': 'In this paper we present LTV, a website and API that generates labeled topic classifications based on the Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), an international standard for topic classification in libraries.  አዲስ DDC፣ ለDDC የቋንቋ-ነፃ የተገኘውን የፍጥረት መረብ መተካከለኛን እናስታውቃለን፡፡ የቋንቋ-ነፃ መሆኑን ለማስታወቂያ፣ አዲስ ዲ ዲ ሲን ከ40 ልዩ ቋንቋዎች ለመጠቀም እናስተውለታለን፡፡ በ nnDC የተመሳሳይ የጉዳዩ ሞዴል እናገኛለን፡፡ በተለየ ግንኙነት ግንኙነት ግን፣ እነዚህ ምናልባት የዲዲ ዲ ሲ በኩል ይቆጥራሉ፡፡ እንደዚሁም የናውሬል መረብ-based የክላሲያዊ የስሜናክኛ ስፍራን (nnCISS) እናሳውቃለን፡፡', 'sq': 'Në këtë letër prezantojmë LTV, një uebsajt dhe API që gjeneron klasifikime të etiketuara tematike bazuar në klasifikimin Dewey Decimal (DDC), një standard ndërkombëtar për klasifikimin e temave në biblioteka. Ne prezantojmë nnDDC, një klasifikues natyror me bazë në rrjetin e pavarur nga gjuha për DDC, i cili optimizuam duke përdorur një gamë të gjerë karakteristikësh gjuhësore për të arritur një rezultat F prej 87.4%. Për të treguar se qasja jonë është e pavarur nga gjuha, ne vlerësojmë nnDDC duke përdorur deri në 40 gjuhë të ndryshme. Ne nxjerrim një model tematik bazuar në nnDDC, i cili gjeneron shpërndarje probabiliteti mbi njësitë semantike për çdo hyrje në nivelin e kuptimit, fjalës dhe tekstit. Ndryshe nga qasjet e lidhura, megjithatë, këto probabilitete vlerësohen nëpërmjet nnDDC në mënyrë që çdo dimension i përfaqësimit të vektorit që rezulton të jetë etiketuar unikisht nga një klasë DDC. Në këtë mënyrë, ne paraqesim një hapësirë Semantike të klasifikuar nga rrjeti nervor (nnCISS).', 'az': "Bu kağızda, Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC) vasitəsilə yazılmış məsələlər klasifikasyonuna dayanan LTV, internasional məsələlər klasifikasyonu və API-ni göstəririk. DDC üçün böyük dil-bağımsız təbiətli a ğ klasifikası olan nnDDC'i tanıdırıq. Bu da 87.4%-dən F-score yetirmək üçün geniş dil özellikləri ilə optimizləndirdik. Bizim tərəfimizin dildən bağımsız olduğunu göstərmək üçün, nnDDC'i 40 fərqli dillərə istifadə edərək değerləşdiririk. NDDC vasitəsilə dayanan bir məsəl modeli yaradırıq, bu da semantik ünvanların hər hansı bir hissə, söz və mətn səviyyəsindəki giriş üçün mümkün olaraq dağıtılır. Ancaq bu mümkün olaraq, nDDC vasitəsilə müəyyən edilir ki, növbəti vektör göstəricisinin hər ölçüsü DDC sınıfından təkcə etiket edilir. Bəlkə, biz nöral a ğ tabanlı Klasifikalı Semantik Uzay (nnCISS) ilə tanışırıq.", 'bn': 'এই কাগজটিতে আমরা এলটিভি, একটি ওয়েবসাইট এবং এপিআই-এর উপস্থাপন করছি যা লেবেল বিষয়বস্তু তৈরি করেছে ডিউই ডেসিমাল ক্লাসিকেশন (ডিডিসি), লাইব্রেরীর একটি আন্তর্জাত আমরা এনডিডিসিকে পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই, যিনি ডিডিসির জন্য বেশীরভাগ ভাষা-স্বাধীন প্রাকৃতিক নেটওয়ার্ক-ভিত্তিক শ্রেণীবিষয়ক, যা আমরা ব্যবহার করেছি বিস্তৃত ভাষ দেখানোর জন্য আমাদের প্রতিক্রিয়া ভাষা স্বাধীন, আমরা এনডিডিসি ৪০ ভিন্ন ভাষায় ব্যবহার করছি। আমরা এনডিডিসি ভিত্তিক একটি বিষয় মডেল পেয়েছি, যা সেম্পেন্টিক ইউনিটের উপর বিতরণের সম্ভাবনা তৈরি করে যায় যে কোনো ইনপুটের জন্য অনুভূতি-,  তবে এনডিডিসির মাধ্যমে এই সম্ভাবনা বিভিন্ন সম্পর্কে সম্পর্কিত উপায় হিসেবে হিসেব করা হচ্ছে, যাতে ফলাফল ভেক্টর প্রতিনিধিত্বের প্রত্যেকটি মাত্রা ডিড এভাবে আমরা নিউরাল নেটওয়ার্ক ভিত্তিক ক্লাসিফায়ার-ইন্ডুকেড সেম্যান্টিক স্পেস (এনসিএসএস) পরিচয় করিয়ে দেই।', 'bs': 'U ovom papiru predstavljamo LTV, stranicu i API koja stvara označene klasifikacije tema na temelju Dewey Decimal klasifikacije (DDC), međunarodni standard klasifikacije tema u bibliotekama. Predstavljamo nnDDC, većinom nezavisni prirodni klasifikator za DDC-u, koji smo optimizirali s širom niza jezičkih karakteristika kako bi postigli F-rezultat od 87,4%. Da bi pokazali da je naš pristup nezavisan jezik, procjenjujemo nnDDC koristeći do 40 različitih jezika. Nalazimo model teme na osnovu nnDDC-a, koji stvara verovatnoće distribucije preko semantičkih jedinica za bilo koji ulaz na razinu smisla, riječi i teksta. Za razliku od povezanih pristupa, međutim, ove vjerojatnosti procjenjuju pomoću nnDDC-a tako da je svaka dimenzija rezultatnog predstavljanja vektora jedinstveno označena klasom DDC-a. Na taj način predstavljamo neuralnu mrežu pod klasifikacijom semiantičkog prostora (nnCISS).', 'ca': "En aquest article presentem LTV, una pàgina web i API que genera classificacions de temes etiquetades basades en la Classificació Dewey Decimal (DDC), un estàndard internacional per la classificació de temes a les biblioteques. Introduïm nnDDC, un classificador natural basat en xarxa independent del llenguatge per DDC, que vam optimitzar fent servir una gran varietat de característiques lingüístices per aconseguir un puntuatge F del 87,4%. Per demostrar que el nostre enfocament és independent del llenguatge, evaluem nnDDC utilitzant fins a 40 llengües diferents. Deriem un model temàtic basat en nnDDC, que genera distribucions de probabilitat sobre unitats semàntiques per qualsevol entrada en nivell de sentit, paraula i text. A diferència dels enfocaments relacionats, però aquestes probabilitats es calculen mitjançant nnDDC de manera que cada dimensió de la representació del vector resultant està etiquetada únicament per una classe DDC. D'aquesta manera, introduïm un espai Semàtic Classificat-Induced (nnCISS) basat en la xarxa neural.", 'et': 'Käesolevas töös tutvustame LTV-d, veebisaiti ja API-d, mis genereerib märgistatud teemaklassifikatsioone, mis põhineb rahvusvahelisel teemaklassifikatsiooni standardil Dewey kümnendklassifikatsioonil (DDC). Tutvustame nnDDC-d, suures osas keelesõltumatut looduslikku võrgupõhist klassifikaatorit DDC-le, mida optimeerisime kasutades laia valikut keelelisi funktsioone, et saavutada F-skoor 87,4%. Et näidata, et meie lähenemine on keelesõltumatu, hindame nnDDC kuni 40 erinevat keelt. Tuletame teemamudeli, mis põhineb nnDDC-l, mis genereerib tõenäosusjaotusi semantiliste ühikute üle mis tahes sisendi tähendus-, sõna- ja tekstitasandil. Erinevalt seotud lähenemisviisidest hinnatakse neid tõenäosusi nnDDC abil, nii et saadud vektori esituse iga dimensiooni on kordumatult märgistatud DDC klassi abil. Sel viisil tutvustame närvivõrgul põhinevat klassifikaatori indutseeritud semantilist ruumi (nnCISS).', 'fi': 'Tässä artikkelissa esittelemme LTV:n, verkkosivuston ja API:n, joka tuottaa otsikoituja aiheluokituksia, jotka perustuvat Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC) -standardiin, joka on kansainvälinen aiheluokitusstandardi kirjastoissa. Esittelemme nnDDC:n, pitkälti kielestä riippumattoman luonnollisen verkkopohjaisen luokituksen DDC:lle, jonka optimoimme useilla kieliominaisuuksilla saavuttaaksemme 87,4 prosentin F-pisteen. Osoittaaksemme, että lähestymistapamme on kieliriippumaton, arvioimme nnDDC:tä jopa 40 eri kielellä. Johdatamme nnDDC:hen perustuvan teemamallin, joka tuottaa todennäköisyysjakaumia semanttisten yksiköiden yli mitä tahansa syötettä varten merkityksen-, sanan- ja tekstitasolla. Toisin kuin toisiinsa liittyvät lähestymistavat, nämä todennäköisyydet arvioidaan nnDDC:n avulla siten, että tuloksena olevan vektoriesityksen jokainen ulottuvuus on yksilöllisesti merkitty DDC-luokkaan. Tällä tavoin otamme käyttöön neuroverkkopohjaisen Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'cs': 'V tomto článku představujeme LTV, webovou stránku a API, která generuje označené tématické klasifikace založené na Deweyově desetinné klasifikaci (DDC), mezinárodním standardu pro klasifikaci témat v knihovnách. Představujeme nnDDC, z velké části jazykově nezávislý přirozený síťový klasifikátor DDC, který jsme optimalizovali pomocí široké škály jazykových vlastností pro dosažení F-skóre 87,4%. Abychom ukázali, že náš přístup je jazykově nezávislý, hodnotíme nnDDC pomocí až 40 různých jazyků. Odvozujeme tématický model založený na nnDDC, který generuje rozdělení pravděpodobnosti nad sémantickými jednotkami pro libovolný vstup na smyslové, slovní a textové úrovni. Na rozdíl od souvisejících přístupů se však tyto pravděpodobnosti odhadují pomocí nnDDC tak, že každá dimenze výsledné vektorové reprezentace je jedinečně označena DDC třídou. Tímto způsobem představujeme sémantický prostor založený na neuronové síti (nnCISS).', 'jv': 'Nang pepulan iki kita nambah LTV, website lan Api sing ngewehken bantuan kelas niune digenalko tema sing basa ning DeWe DeDeHad CLSS (DD), awak dhéwé basa luwih dumadhil kanggo kelas niune cara-lanian sing dibenalke nyebuturan DDD Rasané awak dhéwé ngerasakno kanggo ngerasakno ning limi-nesaturan, dhewe assekyusakno nggunakake nggawe barang gambar kanggo kalah-karang langa. We generated a tema model supported on NDD, that generated likely Distributions about semanti unit for all input on sans-, word- and text-evel. Display boxes Nang iki maneh, kita semester seneng pisan kelas basan di netek nyebutur', 'sk': 'V prispevku predstavljamo LTV, spletno stran in API, ki ustvarja označene tematske klasifikacije na podlagi Deweyeve decimalne klasifikacije (DDC), mednarodnega standarda za klasifikacijo tematik v knjižnicah. Predstavljamo nnDDC, večinoma jezikovno neodvisni naravni mrežni klasifikator za DDC, ki smo ga optimizirali z uporabo širokega nabora jezikovnih značilnosti, da bi dosegli F-rezultat 87,4%. Da bi dokazali, da je naš pristop jezikovno neodvisen, ocenjujemo nnDDC z uporabo do 40 različnih jezikov. Izpeljemo tematski model, ki temelji na nnDDC, ki ustvarja verjetnostne porazdelitve preko semantičnih enot za vsak vnos na smiselni, besedni in besedilni ravni. Za razliko od sorodnih pristopov pa so te verjetnosti ocenjene s pomočjo nnDDC, tako da je vsaka dimenzija pridobljene vektorske reprezentacije enolično označena z razredom DDC. Na ta način predstavljamo neuralno omrežje, ki temelji na Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS).', 'ha': "Ga wannan takardan da Muke halatar da LTV, wani website da ANI wanda ke iya samar da jarrabãwa ga maɓallin da aka ƙayyade shi a kan salon da aka ƙayyade Deway Classification (DDC), wata nau'in kimatacce na classifiseri ga maɓalli cikin littattafai. We introduce nnDDC, a largely language-independent natural network-based classifier for DDC, which we optimized using a wide range of linguistic features to achieve an F-score of 87.4%.  Ga ka nuna cewa hanyarmu ne da ba'a hura harshe ba, za mu yi amfani da yanDDC a cikin wasu harshe 40 daban. Tuna sami wani motsi na madaidaici a kan asansa da nnDC, wanda ke samun rabo masu yiwuwa a kan duk nau'i na semanti'in da aka gaskata wani masu hankali-, kalma- da matsayi. Aka ƙidãya masu hususann hanyõyi da suka yi husũma, amma, an ƙaddara wannan masu yiwuwa na rubutun na nnDC, don haka, ko duk girgije na wakilishi na sakan hanyoyi na daban ana ƙayyade shi unike da wani daraja na DDC. Kamar wannan ne, Muke ƙara da wani zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane-zane (nnCISS).", 'bo': 'In this paper we present LTV, a website and API that generates labeled topic classifications based on the Dewey Decimal Classification (DDC), an international standard for topic classification in libraries. ང་ཚོས་DDC(nnDDC)དང་སྐད་ཡིག་ཆ་ཁྱད་ཆེ་བའི་རང་བཞིན་གྱི་མིའི་འབྲེལ་མཐུད་དེ་གྲངས་སྒྲིག་གིས་DDC་ལ་འཛིན་ཡོད། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་འབྲི་ནི་སྐད་རིགས་ལ་རང་བཞིན་པ་ཡིན་པ་ལས་དབྱེ་ཞིབ་བྱེད་དགོས། ང་ཚོའི་གཟུགས་འབྲི་ནི་ཌི་ We derive a topic model based on nnDDC, which generates probability distributions over semantic units for any input on sense-, word- and text-level. ཡིན་ནའང་། འབྲེལ་བ་ཡོད་པའི་གཟུགས་འགྱུར འདི་ལྟར། ང་ཚོས་གཞི་བརྟེན་ནས་དྲ་བ་ཞིག་སྤྲོད་དགོས་པའི་Classifier-Induced Semantic Space (nnCISS)', 'he': 'בעיתון הזה אנו מציגים LTV, אתר ואפי.פי. שיוצרים מסווגים נושאים מסומנים על בסיס הסווג העשירי של דואי (DDC), סטנדרט בינלאומי לסווג נושאים בספריות. We introduce nnDDC, a largely language-independent natural network-based classifier for DDC, which we optimized using a wide range of linguistic features to achieve an F-score of 87.4%.  כדי להראות שהגישה שלנו היא עצמאית לשפה, אנו מעריכים nnDDC בשימוש עד 40 שפות שונות. אנו משיגים מודל נושאי מבוסס על nnDDC, אשר יוצר פיצוי סבירות על יחידות סמנטיות לכל כניסה ברמה הגיונית, מילה וטקסט. בניגוד לגישויים הקשורים, בכל אופן, הסבירות האלה מוערכות באמצעות nnDDC כך שכל מימדים של ייצוג הוקטור הנוצא מוטבעים באופן מיוחד על ידי שיעור DDC. בדרך זו, אנחנו מציגים חלל סמנטי מונע על ידי רשת עצבית (nnCISS).'}
{'en': 'A Cross-lingual Messenger with Keyword Searchable Phrases for the Travel Domain', 'fr': 'Un messager multilingue avec des phrases interrogeables par mot-clé pour le domaine du voyage', 'ar': 'رسول متعدد اللغات مع جمل الكلمات الرئيسية للبحث في مجال السفر', 'pt': 'Um mensageiro multilíngue com frases pesquisáveis por palavras-chave para o domínio de viagens', 'es': 'Un mensajero multilingüe con frases de búsqueda de palabras clave para el dominio de viajes', 'ja': 'トラベルドメイン用のキーワード検索可能なフレーズを持つクロスリンガルメッセンジャー', 'zh': '有游域关键字可搜短语跨语信使', 'hi': 'यात्रा डोमेन के लिए खोजशब्द खोज योग्य वाक्यांशों के साथ एक क्रॉस-भाषी मैसेंजर', 'ru': 'Кросс-лингвистический мессенджер с ключевыми фразами для домена путешествий', 'ga': 'Teachtaire Trastheangach le Frásaí Inchuardaithe Eochairfhocal don Fhearann Taistil', 'hu': 'Egy többnyelvű üzenetküldő kulcsszó kereshető kifejezésekkel az utazási tartományhoz', 'el': 'Ένας διαγώνσιος αγγελιοφόρος με λέξεις-κλειδιά για τον τομέα των ταξιδιών', 'it': 'Un Messenger multilingue con frasi ricercabili per parole chiave per il dominio di viaggio', 'kk': 'Кілтті сөзді іздеу үшін көптілік мәліметті хабарлауName', 'lt': 'A Cross-lingual Messenger with Keyword Searchable Phrases for the Travel Domain', 'ka': 'Name', 'mk': 'Name', 'ml': 'കീവോര്\u200dഡ് തിരഞ്ഞെടുക്കാവുന്ന വാക്കുകളുമായി ക്രോസ്- ലിങ്കുല്\u200d ദൂതന്\u200dName', 'ms': 'Name', 'mn': 'Төвөрмөц хэлний захирагч, Keyword Search chable phrases for the Travel Domain', 'pl': 'Komunikator wielojęzyczny z wyszukiwanymi słowami kluczowymi frazami dla domeny podróży', 'no': 'Name', 'ro': 'Un mesager interlingv cu fraze de căutare cuvinte cheie pentru domeniul de călătorie', 'si': 'Name', 'so': 'Wargeer luqada Cross-luqada leh Keyword Searchable Erayad for Safarka', 'sv': 'Ett flerspråkigt Messenger med sökbara fraser för resedomänen', 'ta': 'Name', 'sr': 'Krozjezički Messenger sa ključnim riječima za putovanje domena', 'mt': 'A Cross-lingual Messenger with Keyword Searchable Phrases for the Travel Domain', 'ur': 'Name', 'uz': 'Name', 'vi': 'Một sứ mạng xuyên ngôn ngữ với từ khóa tìm kiếm các cụm từ cho miền du lịch', 'bg': 'Междуезичен посланик с фрази за търсене на ключови думи за домейна за пътуване', 'nl': 'Een meertalige boodschapper met zoekwoorden doorzoekbare zinnen voor het Reisdomein', 'da': 'En tværsproget Messenger med søgeordssøgbare sætninger til rejsedomænet', 'hr': 'Prejezični poslanik s ključnim riječima za putovanje domena', 'id': 'Seorang Pesan Berbahasa Salib dengan Frasa Pencarian Kata Kunci untuk Domain Perjalanan', 'de': 'Ein sprachübergreifender Messenger mit Suchbegriffen für die Travel Domain', 'ko': '다양한 언어의 사절로 관광 분야에 키워드 검색 단어를 제공한다.', 'fa': 'Name', 'sw': 'Mjumbe wa lugha yenye maneno yanayotafuta', 'af': 'Name', 'sq': 'Një Profet ndërgjuhësor me fjalë kyçe të kërkueshme për domenin e udhëtimit', 'tr': 'Keyword Syýahat Sahypasy üçin Ullanyş Dilli Mesajlaşma', 'am': 'Name', 'bn': 'Name', 'hy': 'Խոսքերային հաղորդագրություն ճանապարհորդական դաշտի փնտրելի բառերով', 'ca': 'Un missatger translingüe amb frases clau que es poden buscar pel domini de viatges', 'cs': 'Cross-jazyčný posel s klíčovými slovy vyhledávatelné fráze pro cestovní doménu', 'et': 'Keeleülene sõnumitooja koos võtmesõna otsitavate väljenditega reisi domeenile', 'bs': 'Prejezični poslanik sa ključnim riječima za putovanje domena', 'fi': 'Monikielinen Messenger, jossa on hakusanahakuisia lauseita matkaverkkotunnukselle', 'az': 'S톛f톛r톛 Domenin Anahtar s칬zl톛ri il톛 X톛rcli El칞isi', 'jv': 'ProgressBarUpdates', 'sk': 'Večjezični Messenger s ključnimi besedami iskalnih fraz za potovalno domeno', 'he': 'שליח משולב שפתיים עם פרזים ניתן לחפש במילה מפתחת לתחום הנסיעה', 'ha': 'A Cross-lingual Messenger with Keyword Searchable Phrases for the Travel Domain', 'bo': 'སྐད་ཆ་འཕྲིན་གཅིག་དང་གཙོ་ཚིག་གི་བརྗོད་ཐོག་ལ་འཚོལ་ཐུབ་པའི་ཚིག་རྗེས་ཀྱི་འགྲུལ་སྤྱོད་མི་ཐུབ་པ།'}
{'en': 'We present Qutr (Query Translator), a smart cross-lingual communication application for the travel domain. Qutr is a real-time messaging app that automatically translates conversations while supporting keyword-to-sentence matching. Qutr relies on querying a database that holds commonly used pre-translated travel-domain phrases and phrase templates in different languages with the use of keywords. The query matching supports paraphrases, incomplete keywords and some input spelling errors. The application addresses common cross-lingual communication issues such as translation accuracy, speed, privacy, and personalization.', 'ar': 'نقدم Qutr (Query Translator) ، وهو تطبيق تواصل ذكي متعدد اللغات لمجال السفر. Qutr هو تطبيق مراسلة في الوقت الفعلي يقوم تلقائيًا بترجمة المحادثات مع دعم مطابقة الكلمات الرئيسية إلى الجملة. يعتمد Qutr على الاستعلام عن قاعدة بيانات تحتوي على عبارات مجال السفر وقوالب عبارات شائعة الاستخدام ومترجمة مسبقًا بلغات مختلفة باستخدام الكلمات الرئيسية. تدعم مطابقة الاستعلام إعادة الصياغة والكلمات الرئيسية غير المكتملة وبعض الأخطاء الإملائية في الإدخال. يعالج التطبيق مشكلات الاتصال المشتركة بين اللغات مثل دقة الترجمة والسرعة والخصوصية والتخصيص.', 'pt': 'Apresentamos o Qutr (Query Translator), um aplicativo inteligente de comunicação multilíngue para o domínio das viagens. Qutr é um aplicativo de mensagens em tempo real que traduz automaticamente as conversas enquanto suporta correspondência de palavra-chave para frase. O Qutr baseia-se na consulta de um banco de dados que contém frases de domínio de viagem pré-traduzidas comumente usadas e modelos de frases em diferentes idiomas com o uso de palavras-chave. A correspondência de consulta suporta paráfrases, palavras-chave incompletas e alguns erros de ortografia de entrada. O aplicativo aborda problemas comuns de comunicação em vários idiomas, como precisão da tradução, velocidade, privacidade e personalização.', 'es': 'Presentamos Qutr (Query Translator), una aplicación inteligente de comunicación multilingüe para el dominio de los viajes. Qutr es una aplicación de mensajería en tiempo real que traduce automáticamente las conversaciones a la vez que admite la coincidencia de palabras clave a frases. Qutr se basa en la consulta de una base de datos que contiene frases y plantillas de frases de dominio de viaje pretraducidas de uso común en diferentes idiomas con el uso de palabras clave. La coincidencia de consultas admite paráfrasis, palabras clave incompletas y algunos errores ortográficos de entrada. La aplicación aborda problemas comunes de comunicación multilingüe, como la precisión de la traducción, la velocidad, la privacidad y la personalización.', 'fr': "Nous présentons Qutr (Query Translator), une application de communication multilingue intelligente pour le domaine du voyage. Qutr est une application de messagerie en temps réel qui traduit automatiquement les conversations tout en prenant en charge la correspondance mot-clé/phrase. Qutr repose sur l'interrogation d'une base de données qui contient des phrases de domaine de voyage prétraduites couramment utilisées et des modèles de phrases dans différentes langues à l'aide de mots clés. La mise en correspondance des requêtes prend en charge les paraphrases, les mots-clés incomplets et certaines fautes d'orthographe. L'application répond aux problèmes courants de communication multilingue tels que la précision, la rapidité, la confidentialité et la personnalisation de la traduction.", 'zh': '介Qutr(问翻译器),此旅行之智也,跨言通信应用程序。 Qutr是一款实时消息传应用程序,可自译对,兼赞关键字句之匹。 Qutr赖询一数据库,数据库用关键字以存异言者常预译旅行域短语短语模板。 询匹配释义、不完关键字与诸输拼写错误。 其应用程序解常见跨语通信,如译准确性、速度、隐私、个性化。', 'ja': '旅行ドメイン向けのスマートなクロスリンガルコミュニケーションアプリケーションであるQutr （ Query Translator ）をご紹介します。Qutrは、キーワードと文章のマッチングをサポートしながら会話を自動的に翻訳するリアルタイムのメッセージングアプリです。Qutrは、一般的に使用されている事前翻訳されたトラベルドメインのフレーズとフレーズテンプレートをキーワードを使用して異なる言語で保持するデータベースをクエリすることに依存しています。クエリマッチングは、パラフレーズ、不完全なキーワード、いくつかの入力スペルエラーをサポートします。このアプリケーションは、翻訳の精度、速度、プライバシー、パーソナライズなどの一般的なクロスリンガル通信の問題に対処します。', 'hi': 'हम Qutr (क्वेरी अनुवादक), यात्रा डोमेन के लिए एक स्मार्ट क्रॉस-लिंगुअल संचार अनुप्रयोग प्रस्तुत करते हैं। Qutr एक वास्तविक समय संदेश अनुप्रयोग है कि स्वचालित रूप से वार्तालापों का अनुवाद करता है जबकि खोजशब्द-से-वाक्य मिलान का समर्थन करता है. Qutr एक डेटाबेस है कि आमतौर पर इस्तेमाल किया पूर्व-अनुवादित यात्रा डोमेन वाक्यांशों और वाक्यांश टेम्पलेट्स खोजशब्दों के उपयोग के साथ विभिन्न भाषाओं में आयोजित करता है क्वेरी पर निर्भर करता है. क्वेरी मिलान पैराफ़्रेज़, अपूर्ण कीवर्ड और कुछ इनपुट वर्तनी त्रुटियों का समर्थन करता है. एप्लिकेशन अनुवाद सटीकता, गति, गोपनीयता और निजीकरण जैसे सामान्य क्रॉस-लिंगुअल संचार मुद्दों को संबोधित करता है।', 'ru': 'Мы представляем Qutr (Query Translator), интеллектуальное приложение для межъязыковой коммуникации в сфере путешествий. Qutr - это приложение для обмена сообщениями в режиме реального времени, которое автоматически переводит разговоры, поддерживая сопоставление ключевых слов и предложений. Qutr полагается на запрос базы данных, которая содержит широко используемые предварительно переведенные фразы и шаблоны фраз на разных языках с использованием ключевых слов. Согласование запросов поддерживает перефразы, неполные ключевые слова и некоторые орфографические ошибки ввода. Приложение решает общие вопросы межъязыковой коммуникации, такие как точность перевода, скорость, конфиденциальность и персонализация.', 'ga': 'Cuirimid Qutr (Query Translator) i láthair, feidhmchlár cumarsáide cliste tras-teanga don réimse taistil. Is aip teachtaireachtaí fíor-ama é Qutr a aistríonn comhráite go huathoibríoch agus a thacaíonn le meaitseáil eochairfhocal-go-abairt. Braitheann Qutr ar bhunachar sonraí a cheistiú ina bhfuil frásaí fearainn taistil agus teimpléid frásaí réamhaistrithe a úsáidtear go coitianta i dteangacha éagsúla agus úsáid á baint as eochairfhocail. Tacaíonn meaitseáil na bhfiosrúchán le hathróga, le heochairfhocail neamhiomlána agus le roinnt earráidí litrithe ionchuir. Tugann an feidhmchlár aghaidh ar shaincheisteanna cumarsáide tras-teangacha coitianta amhail cruinneas aistriúcháin, luas, príobháideacht agus pearsanú.', 'el': 'Παρουσιάζουμε μια έξυπνη εφαρμογή επικοινωνίας για τον τομέα των ταξιδιών. Το είναι μια εφαρμογή μηνυμάτων σε πραγματικό χρόνο που μεταφράζει αυτόματα συνομιλίες, ενώ υποστηρίζει το ταίριασμα λέξης-λέξης-φράσης. Το Qutr βασίζεται στην αναζήτηση μιας βάσης δεδομένων που περιέχει συνήθως χρησιμοποιούμενες προ-μεταφρασμένες φράσεις ταξιδιωτικού τομέα και πρότυπα φράσεων σε διαφορετικές γλώσσες με τη χρήση λέξεων-κλειδιών. Η αντιστοίχιση ερωτήματος υποστηρίζει παραφράσεις, ελλιπείς λέξεις-κλειδιά και μερικά ορθογραφικά λάθη εισαγωγής. Η εφαρμογή αντιμετωπίζει κοινά γλωσσικά ζητήματα επικοινωνίας, όπως ακρίβεια μετάφρασης, ταχύτητα, ιδιωτικότητα και εξατομίκευση.', 'ka': 'ჩვენ Qutr (Query Translator), სხვადასხვა სამუშაო სამუშაო კომუნიკაციის პროგრამის გამოსახულება. Qutr არის რეალური დროის შეტყობინება პროგრამა, რომელიც ავტომატურად შეტყობინებს პარამეტრებების შესაძლებელად კონფიგურაციას. Qutr- ს დარწმუნება ბაზატურის კითხვაზე, რომელიც სახელსაწყისოდ გამოყენებული საზოგადომის ფრაზები და ფრაზების შაბლოები განსხვავებული ენაზებით გასაყენებული სიტყვების Name პროგრამის შესახებ საერთო მრავალური კომუნიკაციის პრობლემები, როგორც წარმატება, სიჩქარე, პირადგილება და პირადგილება.', 'hu': 'Bemutatjuk a Qutr (Query Translator), egy intelligens, többnyelvű kommunikációs alkalmazás az utazási domain számára. Qutr egy valós idejű üzenetküldő alkalmazás, amely automatikusan lefordítja a beszélgetéseket, miközben támogatja a kulcsszó-mondat egyezést. A Qutr egy olyan adatbázis lekérdezésére támaszkodik, amely általánosan használt, előre lefordított utazási domain kifejezéseket és kifejezési sablonokat tartalmaz különböző nyelveken kulcsszavak használatával. A lekérdezések egyezése támogatja a parafrázisokat, a hiányos kulcsszavakat és néhány beviteli helyesírási hibát. Az alkalmazás kezeli a gyakori, többnyelvű kommunikációs problémákat, mint például a fordítás pontossága, sebessége, adatvédelem és személyre szabás.', 'it': "Vi presentiamo Qutr (Query Translator), un'applicazione intelligente di comunicazione multilingue per il settore dei viaggi. Qutr è un'app di messaggistica in tempo reale che traduce automaticamente le conversazioni supportando la corrispondenza parola a frase. Qutr si basa sull'interrogazione di un database che contiene frasi di dominio di viaggio pre-tradotte comunemente usate e modelli di frasi in diverse lingue con l'uso di parole chiave. La corrispondenza delle query supporta parafrase, parole chiave incomplete e alcuni errori di ortografia di input. L'applicazione affronta problemi comuni di comunicazione cross-lingual come accuratezza della traduzione, velocità, privacy e personalizzazione.", 'kk': 'Біз Qutr (Сұраныс аударғышы), саяхаттар доменінің бірнеше тілді коммуникациялық қолданбаны көрсетедік. Qutr - тізімге сәйкес келетін сөйлемелерді автоматты түрде аудару үшін шын уақытты хабарлау бағдарламасы. Qutr көпшілікті басқа тілдер тілдерінде көпшілікті алдын- аударылған жүгірткі домендегі сөздер мен сөздер үлгілерін сұрауға тәуелді. Сұраныстың сәйкестігі парафразларды, толық кілттер сөздерін және кейбір келтірілген емле қатесін қолдайды. Бұл қолданбаның ағылшын тілдерді ақпараттың дұрыстығы, жылдамдығы, жеке және өзгертілігі секілді жалпы ақпараттық мәселелерін шешуі.', 'lt': 'Mes pristatome Qutr (Query Translator), išmanią kelionės srities tarpkalbinį ryšį. Comment Qutr priklauso nuo duomenų bazės, kurioje dažnai naudojamos iš anksto išverstos kelionės domeno frazės ir frazės šablonai skirtingomis kalbomis, klausimo naudojant raktinius žodžius. Klausimų atitikimas remia parafrazes, neišsamius raktinius žodžius ir kai kurias įrašymo rašymo klaidas. Paraiškoje nagrinėjami bendri tarpkalbiniai ryšiai, pavyzdžiui, vertimo tikslumas, greitis, privatumas ir asmeniškumas.', 'mk': 'We present Qutr (Query Translator), a smart cross-lingual communication application for the travel domain.  Qutr е апликација за испраќање пораки во реално време која автоматски преведува разговори додека поддржува совпаѓање на клучниот збор со реченица. Qutr се потпира на барање на база на податоци која содржи често употребени препрепреведени фрази и шаблони на фрази во различни јазици со употреба на клучни зборови. The query matching supports paraphrases, incomplete keywords and some input spelling errors.  Апликацијата ги решава заедничките прашања на меѓујазичната комуникација како што се преведувачката точност, брзината, приватноста и персонализацијата.', 'ml': 'ഞങ്ങള്\u200d ക്വോര്\u200dട്ട് കൊടുക്കുന്നു (ചോദ്യം ട്രാന്\u200dസ്ട്രാന്\u200dസ്റ്റര്\u200d), യാത്ര ഡോമെയിനുള്ള ഒരു സ്മാര്\u200dട്ട കീവോര്\u200dഡ്- ലേക്ക്- വാക്ക് പിന്തുണയ്ക്കുമ്പോള്\u200d സ്വയം സംസാരം പരിഭാഷപ്പെടുത്തുന്നു വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളില്\u200d ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന വാക്കുകളും വ്യത്യസ്ത ഭാഷകളിലെ വാക്കുകളും ഉപയോഗിക്കുന്ന ഒരു ഡാറ്റാബേസ് ചോദ്യം ചെയ്യുന്നതി @ info: status The application addresses common cross-lingual communication issues such as translation accuracy, speed, privacy, and personalization.', 'no': 'Vi presenterer Qutr (spørsmål- omsetjaren), eit smart krysspråk- kommunikasjonsprogram for reisområdet. Qutr er eit verkeleg meldingsprogram som automatisk oversetter samtaler mens nøkkelord- til- setjing støttar. Qutr dependerer på å spørja ein database som inneheld vanlegvis brukte før omsetjingsfrasar og fråmalar i ulike språk med bruk av nøkkelord. Spørjinga passar støttar parafrasar, ufullstende nøkkelord og nokre innskriftsfeil. Programmet adresserer felles krysspråkskommunikasjonsspørsmål, slik som omsetjingsakritet, fart, privat og personalisering.', 'mn': 'Бид Qutr (query Translator), аялал холбооны ухаантай хэлний харилцааны програм болгож байна. Qutr бол үнэндээ цаг хугацаанд яриаг автоматаар орлуулж өгүүлэх апп юм. Qutr нь түлхүүр үгсийг ашиглан аль хэдийн аль хэлбэрээр ашигладаг өгөгдлийн сан дээр хадгалагддаг. Квери холбогдох нь параграфийг дэмждэг, дуусгагүй түлхүүр үг болон зарим орноос үлгэрүүлэх алдаа. Программ нь олон хэлний харилцааны асуудлуудыг харуулдаг. Жишээлбэл, хурдан, хувийн байдал, хувь хүн төрөлхтөн.', 'pl': 'Przedstawiamy Qutr (Query Translator), inteligentną aplikację komunikacji wielojęzycznej dla domeny podróży. Qutr to aplikacja do wiadomości w czasie rzeczywistym, która automatycznie tłumaczy rozmowy, obsługując jednocześnie dopasowanie słów kluczowych do zdania. Qutr polega na zapytaniu bazy danych, która zawiera powszechnie używane wstępnie przetłumaczone zwroty domen podróżnych i szablony fraz w różnych językach z wykorzystaniem słów kluczowych. Dopasowanie zapytań obsługuje parafrazy, niekompletne słowa kluczowe i niektóre błędy pisowni wejścia. Aplikacja rozwiązuje powszechne problemy komunikacji między językami, takie jak dokładność tłumaczenia, szybkość, prywatność i personalizacja.', 'sr': 'Predstavljamo Qutr (prevoditelj pretraživanja), pametnu prijavu za međujezičku komunikaciju za domenu putovanja. Qutr je aplikacija za pravo vrijeme poruke koja automatski prevodi razgovore dok podržava odgovarajuće ključne reči na rečenicu. Qutr se oslanja na ispitivanje baze podataka koja drži uobičajeno korištene pre-prevedene rečenice putovanja domena i šablone fraze na različitim jezicima sa korištenjem ključnih rečenica. Preispitivanje podržava parafraze, nepotpune ključne reči i neke greške za pisanje. Prijava se bavi zajedničkim problemima međujezičke komunikacije kao što su preciznost prevoda, brzina, privatnost i personalizacija.', 'mt': 'Aħna nippreżentaw Qutr (Query Translator), applikazzjoni intelliġenti ta’ komunikazzjoni translingwi għad-dominju tal-ivvjaġġar. Qutr is a real-time messaging app that automatically translates conversations while supporting keyword-to-sentence matching.  Il-Qutr jiddependi fuq it-talba għal database li fiha frażijiet ta’ dominju tal-ivvjaġġar tradotti minn qabel u mudelli ta’ frażijiet użati b’mod komuni f’lingwi differenti bl-użu ta’ kliem ewlieni. It-tqabbil tal-mistoqsijiet jappoġġja parafrażijiet, kliem ewlieni mhux kompluti u xi żbalji fl-ortografija tal-input. L-applikazzjoni tindirizza kwistjonijiet komuni ta’ komunikazzjoni translingwi bħall-preċiżjoni tat-traduzzjoni, il-veloċità, il-privatezza, u l-personalizzazzjoni.', 'si': 'අපි ක්වොට්\u200dර් (ප්\u200dරශ්න අනුවාදකයා), ස්මාර්ට් විශාල භාෂාවික සම්බන්ධ ක්\u200dරියාත්මක වැඩසටහන්  Name QTR ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් වෙනස් භාෂාවක් සමග වෙනස් භාෂාවක් සඳහා ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ප්\u200dර Name අන්වියෝජනය සමාන භාෂාවික සම්බන්ධ ප්\u200dරශ්නයක් ලැබෙනවා වගේම වාර්තාව, වේගය, පුද්ගලිකතාවය, සහ', 'ms': 'Kami perkenalkan Qutr (Query Translator), aplikasi komunikasi saling bahasa yang bijak untuk domain perjalanan. Qutr adalah aplikasi mesej masa-nyata yang secara automatik menerjemahkan perbualan semasa menyokong persamaan perkataan-kunci. Qutr relies on querying a database that holds commonly used pre-translated travel-domain phrases and phrase templates in different languages with the use of keywords.  Perpadanan pertanyaan menyokong parafrasa, kata kunci tidak lengkap dan beberapa ralat ejaan input. The application addresses common cross-lingual communication issues such as translation accuracy, speed, privacy, and personalization.', 'so': 'Qoraalka safarka waxaad ka heleysaa codsiga la xiriira luuqadaha aad leedahay. Qoraalka qoraalku waa app-boostada si dhab ah, kaasoo si automatic ah u turjumaya hadallada, marka uu kaalmeeyo qofka ku habboon erayga-to-sentence. Qoraalka qoraalku wuxuu ku xiran yahay codsiga wargelinta oo ay inta badan isticmaali karto luqado kala duduwan safar-domain iyo qoraal ku qoran luqado kala duduwan. The query matching supports paraphrases, incomplete keywords and some input spelling errors.  Codsigu wuxuu macaamiloodaa arrimaha la xiriira luuqadaha kala duduwan, tusaale ahaan saxda turjumaadda, badbaadada, gaarka loo leeyahay iyo shakhsiyeed.', 'sv': 'Vi presenterar Qutr (Query Translator), en smart tvärspråkig kommunikationsapplikation för resedomänen. Qutr är en meddelandeapp i realtid som automatiskt översätter konversationer samtidigt som det stöder sökord-till-mening matchning. Qutr förlitar sig på att fråga en databas som innehåller vanliga förkortade resedomänfraser och frasmallar på olika språk med hjälp av sökord. Frågmatchningen stöder parafraser, ofullständiga sökord och vissa inmatningsfel. Applikationen tar itu med vanliga kommunikationsproblem som översättningsnoggrannhet, hastighet, integritet och personalisering.', 'ro': 'Vă prezentăm Qutr (Query Translator), o aplicație inteligentă de comunicare între limbi pentru domeniul turismului. Qutr este o aplicație de mesagerie în timp real care traduce automat conversațiile, susținând în același timp potrivirea cuvinte cheie-la-propoziție. Qutr se bazează pe interogarea unei baze de date care conține expresii pre-traduse și șabloane de expresii în diferite limbi, utilizând cuvinte cheie. Potrivirea interogării acceptă parafraze, cuvinte cheie incomplete și unele erori de ortografie de intrare. Aplicația abordează probleme comune de comunicare între limbi, cum ar fi acuratețea traducerii, viteza, confidențialitatea și personalizarea.', 'ta': 'நாம் குறியீடு (கேள்வி மொழிபெயர்ப்பாளர்) பயணிப்பு களத்திற்கான ஒரு smart cross-மொழி தொடர்பு பயன்பாடு குறிப்பு ஒரு உண்மையான- நேரம் செய்தி பயன்பாடு அது விசைவார்த்தையை பொருத்தும் போது தானாகவே மொழிபெயர்ப்பை மொழிபெயர முன்மொழிபெயர்ப்பட்ட பயணம்- domain சொற்றொடர்கள் மற்றும் வெவ்வேறு மொழிகளில் சொற்றொடர் வார்த்தைகளை பயன்படுத்தி தரவுத்தளத்தை கேள்வி ச @ info: whatsthis பயன்பாடு மொழிமொழியின் தொடர்பு பொதுவான பிரச்சனைகளை மொழிபெயர்ப்பு சரியானது, வேகம், தனிப்பட்ட மற்றும் தனிப்பட்டியல', 'ur': 'ہم Qutr (Query Translator) کو سفر دامین کے لئے ایک سمجھ کرس زبان کی تعلیم کاربرد پیش کریں گے۔ Qutr ایک حقیقی زمانی پیغام رسانے والی اپنا کاروبار ہے جو اپنے ساتھ باتوں کو ترجمہ کرتا ہے جب کلیدورڈ سے کلمز ملاقات کی مدد کرتا ہے. Qutr ایک ڈیٹابیس کے سوال پر اعتماد کرتا ہے جو کلورڈ کے استعمال کے ساتھ بہت سے پہلے ترجمہ کیا جاتا ہے. Name یہ کاروبار مشترک مختلف زبان کی ارتباط مسئلہ کے بارے میں لگا رہا ہے جیسے ترجمہ دقیق، سرعت، خصوصی اور شخصیزی.', 'uz': 'Biz Qutr (soʻrov tarjima qiluvchi), Sayor domen uchun juda smart koʻp tilning aloqa dasturi. Name Qutr relies on querying a database that holds commonly used pre-translated travel-domain phrases and phrase templates in different languages with the use of keywords.  @ info Name', 'vi': 'Chúng tôi giới thiệu Qur (Query Dịch), một ứng dụng giao thông ngôn ngữ thông minh cho miền du lịch. Qur là một ứng dụng nhận tin nhắn thời gian thực, nó sẽ tự động chuyển tiếp, vừa hỗ trợ kết nối từ khoá tới câu. Anh Qur phụ thuộc vào việc tìm kiếm một cơ sở dữ liệu chứa các cụm từ du lịch và từ điển dịch trước tại các ngôn ngữ khác nhau bằng từ khoá. Việc khớp yêu cầu hỗ trợ liệt giải, từ khoá chưa hoàn thành và một số lỗi chính tả. Ứng dụng đề cập đến các vấn đề liên quan đến ngôn ngữ khác nhau như độ chính xác dịch, tốc độ, riêng tư, và tư nhân.', 'hr': 'Predstavljamo Qutr (prevoditelj ispitivanja), smart cross-lingual communication application for the travel domain. Qutr je program za pravo vrijeme poruke koji automatski prevodi razgovore dok podržava odgovaranje ključnih riječi na rečenicu. Qutr se oslanja na ispitivanje baze podataka koja drži uobičajeno korištene preprevedene formule i formule iz domena putovanja na različitim jezicima s korištenjem ključnih riječi. Preispitivanje zahtjeva podržava parafraze, nepotpune ključne riječi i neke greške pisanja. Prijava se bavi zajedničkim problemima međujezičkih komunikacija poput preciznosti prevoda, brzine, privatnosti i personalizacije.', 'bg': 'Представяме ви интелигентно междуезично приложение за комуникация в областта на пътуванията. Това е приложение за съобщения в реално време, което автоматично превежда разговори, като същевременно поддържа съвпадение от ключова дума към изречение. Кутр разчита на търсенето на база данни, която съдържа често използвани предварително преведени фрази и шаблони за фрази на различни езици с използване на ключови думи. Съвпадението на заявката поддържа парафрази, непълни ключови думи и някои правописни грешки. Приложението разглежда често срещани междуезични комуникационни проблеми като точност на превода, скорост, поверителност и персонализиране.', 'da': 'Vi præsenterer Qutr (Query Translator), en smart tværsproget kommunikationsapplikation til rejse domæne. Qutr er en real-time messaging app, der automatisk oversætter samtaler og understøtter søgeord-til-sætning matchning. Qutr er afhængig af at forespørge en database, der indeholder almindeligt anvendte præ-oversatte rejse-domæne sætninger og sætningsskabeloner på forskellige sprog ved hjælp af søgeord. Forespørgselsmatchningen understøtter parafraser, ufuldstændige søgeord og nogle input stavefejl. Programmet løser almindelige tværsprogede kommunikationsspørgsmål såsom oversættelsesnøjagtighed, hastighed, privatliv og personalisering.', 'nl': 'We presenteren Qutr (Query Translator), een slimme cross-lingual communicatie applicatie voor het reisdomein. Qutr is een real-time messaging app die automatisch conversaties vertaalt en tegelijkertijd trefwoord-naar-zin matching ondersteunt. Qutr vertrouwt op het opvragen van een database die veelgebruikte pre-vertaalde reisdomeinzinnen en zinsjablonen in verschillende talen bevat met behulp van trefwoorden. De query matching ondersteunt parafrases, onvolledige zoekwoorden en sommige invoerspellingsfouten. De applicatie behandelt veelvoorkomende meertalige communicatieproblemen zoals vertaalnauwkeurigheid, snelheid, privacy en personalisatie.', 'id': 'Kami mempersembahkan Qutr (Query Translator), aplikasi komunikasi saling bahasa yang cerdas untuk domain perjalanan. Qutr adalah aplikasi pesan waktu nyata yang secara otomatis menerjemahkan konversasi sementara mendukung persamaan kata kunci-ke-kalimat. Qutr bergantung pada pertanyaan database yang mengandung frasa pre-terjemahan domain perjalanan biasa digunakan dan templat frasa dalam bahasa yang berbeda dengan menggunakan kata kunci. Pertandingan pertanyaan mendukung parafrasa, kata kunci tidak lengkap dan beberapa kesalahan ejaan masukan. Aplikasi ini mengatasi masalah komunikasi transbahasa umum seperti akurasi terjemahan, kecepatan, privasi, dan personalisasi.', 'de': 'Wir präsentieren Qutr (Query Translator), eine intelligente, sprachübergreifende Kommunikationsanwendung für die Reisedomäne. Qutr ist eine Echtzeit-Messaging-App, die Konversationen automatisch übersetzt und gleichzeitig Keyword-to-Satz-Matching unterstützt. Qutr verlässt sich auf die Abfrage einer Datenbank, die häufig verwendete vorübersetzte Travel-Domain-Phrasen und Phrasenvorlagen in verschiedenen Sprachen mit Hilfe von Schlüsselwörtern enthält. Der Abfrageabgleich unterstützt Paraphrasen, unvollständige Keywords und einige Eingabefehler. Die Anwendung adressiert gängige Probleme der sprachübergreifenden Kommunikation wie Übersetzungsgenauigkeit, Geschwindigkeit, Datenschutz und Personalisierung.', 'sw': 'Tunaonyesha Qutr (Tafsiri wa Questi), tumizi la mawasiliano yenye asili ya lugha moja kwa moja kwa ajili ya maeneo ya safari. Kitumizi hiki ni programu ya ujumbe wa muda halisi ambalo hutafsiri mazungumzo binafsi wakati akiunga mkono maneno-to-sentence inayolinganisha. Utafiti unategemea kutafuta kituo cha database ambacho kina matumizi mara nyingi ya maneno ya safari-domain na namba za a in a tofauti katika lugha mbalimbali kwa matumizi ya maneno. The query matching supports paraphrases, incomplete keywords and some input spelling errors.  Utumiaji huo unatumia masuala yanayohusu mawasiliano ya lugha tofauti kama vile ufafanuzi sahihi, haraka, faragha na binafsi.', 'fa': 'ما Qutr (Query Translator) را معرفی می\u200cکنیم، یک کاربرد ارتباط متوسط زبان باهوش برای دامنه سفر. Name Qutr بستگی دارد از سوال داده\u200cهای داده\u200cای که معمولاً عبارت\u200cهای پیش\u200cترجمه\u200cای و عبارت\u200cهای عبارت را در زبان\u200cهای مختلف با استفاده از کلمات\u200cهای کلید استفاده می\u200cکند. پیمانۀ سؤال پیدا کردن پارافریز ، کلمات کلید کامل و بعضی اشتباه\u200cهای نوشتن ورودی را پشتیبانی می\u200cکند. این کاربرد مشکلات ارتباط متفاوتی مثل دقیق ترجمه، سرعت، خصوصی و شخصیت مشترک را درباره\u200cی مشکلات متفاوتی مشترک می\u200cکند.', 'tr': "Biz Qutr'i (Query Translator), syýahat domeny üçin akylly bir çarpaz dilli komunikaçy uygulamasyny tanyşdyrýarys. CtrlName Qutr adlanan öňünden terjime edilen terjime eden bir databank frazlerini we frazlerini başga dillerde üýtgedir. Söňleýän soragy parafrazler, tüňsiz kellsözler we käbir giriş ymlanyň hatalaryny destekleýär. Programden çykyş dillerden çykyş görkezilişi meselelerini, terjime edilen dogrylygyny, tizlikleri, hususiyetleri we şahsyzlygyny görkez.", 'af': "Ons voorsien Qutr (Navraag Vertaling),  'n smart kruistale kommunikasie toepassing vir die reis domein. Qutr is 'n reël- tyd boodskap toepassing wat automaties vertaling gesprekke terwyl ondersteun sleutelwoord- na- sentence ooreenstem. Qutr verlig op die vraag van 'n databasis wat gewoonlik gebruik word voor- vertaalde reise- domein frase en frase templates in verskillende tale met die gebruik van sleutelwoorde. Die navraag ooreenstemmende ondersteun parafrase, onvolledige sleutelwoorde en sommige invoer spel foute. Die toepassing adres gemeenskaplike kruistale kommunikasie aandag soos vertalingspresies, spoed, privateit en persoonalisasie.", 'sq': 'Ne paraqesim Qutr (Query Translator), një aplikacion i zgjuar komunikimi ndërgjuhësor për domenin e udhëtimit. Qutr është një aplikacion mesazh në kohë reale që përkthen automatikisht bisedimet duke mbështetur përshtatjen e fjalës-në-fjalë. Qutr mbështetet në kërkimin e një baze të dhënash që mban fraza të përdorura para-përkthyera të dominit të udhëtimit dhe modele fraze në gjuhë të ndryshme me përdorimin e fjalëve kyçe. Përkatësia e pyetjes mbështet parafrazat, fjalët kyçe të pakompletuara dhe disa gabime të shkrimit të hyrjes. Aplikimi trajton çështje të përbashkëta komunikimi ndërgjuhësor të tilla si saktësia e përkthimit, shpejtësia, privatësia dhe personalizimi.', 'am': 'የቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የመግለጫ ፕሮግራም ብልሃተኛ ፕሮግራም ነው፡፡ መግለጫ መግለጫ የጭብጥ ምርጫዎች ፕሮግራሙ የቋንቋ ቋንቋ-ቋንቋ የመግለጫ ጉዳዮች እንደትርጉም እርግጠኛ፣ ፈጥኖ፣ የግል ግልኙነት እና የግልፅነት ጉዳይ አድራጊ ነው፡፡', 'az': 'Biz Qutr (Query Translator), səyahət domeini üçün akıllı çox dilli iletişim proqramını göstəririk. Qutr, anahtar sözləri ilə sözləri dəstəkləyici vaxt istifadə edərkən öz-özünə danışmaq üçün istifadə edən həqiqət vaxtlı mesajlaşma uyğulamadır. Qutr, anahtar sözlərinin istifadəsi ilə çox əvvəl tərcümə edilmiş səyahət domain sözləri və fraz şabloları ilə müxtəlif dillərdə istifadə edilən veritabanın soruşmasına təvəkkül edir. Sənə uyğunlaşdırma parafrazləri, tamamlanmış anahtar sözləri və bəzi girdi imzalama hatalarını dəstəkləyir. Uyğulama, çeviriş doğruluğu, hızlılığı, gizlilik və kişilik məsələləri kimi çox dilli komunikasyon problemlərini çəkir.', 'hy': 'Մենք ներկայացնում ենք Qtr (Փորձի թարգմանիչ), ճանապարհորդության ոլորտի խելացի հաղորդակցման ծրագիր: Qutr is a real-time messaging app that automatically translates conversations while supporting keyword-to-sentence matching.  Comment Հարցման համապատասխանությունը աջակցում է պարաֆրեզներ, անկատարյալ բառեր և որոշ սխալներ գրելու համար: The application addresses common cross-lingual communication issues such as translation accuracy, speed, privacy, and personalization.', 'ko': '우리는 Qutr(조회 번역)를 소개했는데 이것은 관광 분야에 사용되는 스마트 크로스 언어 통신 응용 프로그램이다.Qutr는 대화를 자동으로 번역할 수 있는 실시간 메시지 프로그램으로 키워드와 문장의 일치를 지원합니다.Qutr는 서로 다른 언어에서 자주 사용하는 사전 번역 관광 분야의 짧은 말과 짧은 말 템플릿을 저장하는 데이터베이스에 의존한다.검색은 해석, 불완전한 키워드, 입력 맞춤법 오류를 지원합니다.이 응용 프로그램은 번역의 정확성, 속도, 프라이버시, 개성화 등 흔히 볼 수 있는 다중 언어 교류 문제를 해결했다.', 'ca': "Presentam Qutr (Query Translator), una aplicació intel·ligent de comunicació translingüística per al domini de viatge. Qutr és una aplicació de missatges en temps real que tradueix automàticament converses mentre suporta la combinació de paraules clau a frases. Qutr es basa en la consulta d'una base de dades que conté frases de domini de viatge pre-traducides i models de frases en diferents llengües amb l'ús de paraules clau. La comparació de preguntes suporta parafrases, parafrases clau incompletes i alguns errors d'ortografia d'entrada. The application addresses common cross-lingual communication issues such as translation accuracy, speed, privacy, and personalization.", 'bs': 'Predstavljamo Qutr (prevoditelj pretraživanja), pametnu međujezičku komunikaciju za domenu putovanja. Qutr je program za pravo vrijeme poruke koji automatski prevodi razgovore dok podržava odgovarajuće ključne riječi na rečenicu. Qutr se oslanja na ispitivanje baze podataka koja drži uobičajeno korištene preprevedene fraze i formule na različitim jezicima s korištenjem ključnih riječi. Preispitivanje podržava parafraze, nepotpune ključne riječi i neke greške za pisanje. Prijava se bavi zajedničkim problemima međujezičke komunikacije kao što su preciznost prevoda, brzina, privatnost i personalizacija.', 'bn': 'আমরা কোট্রের (প্রশ্ন অনুবাদক), ভ্রমণ ডোমেইনের জন্য একটি স্মার্ট ক্রস-ভাষায় যোগাযোগ অ্যাপ্লিকেশন। কীবোর্ড- থেকে বাক্য সমর্থন করার সময় স্বয়ংক্রিয়ভাবে কথোপকথন অনুবাদ করা হচ্ছে। কীওয়ার্ড ব্যবহারের মাধ্যমে সাধারণত ভ্রমণ- ডোমেইন বাক্য ব্যবহার করা একটি ডাটাবেস অনুসন্ধানের উপর কোট্রার্ট নির্ভর করে বিভিন্ন ভাষায় অনুসন্ধানের সঙ্গে মিলিত প্যারাফ্রেক্স, সম্পূর্ণ কী শব্দ এবং কিছু ইনপুট বানান ভুল সমর্থন করে। অ্যাপ্লিকেশন সাধারণ ভাষায় যোগাযোগের বিষয়গুলোকে সাধারণ বিষয়গুলোর সাথে ঠিক করে, যেমন অনুবাদ, গতি, গোপনীয়তা এবং ব্যক', 'cs': 'Představujeme Qutr (Query Translator), chytrou komunikační aplikaci pro cestovní doménu. Qutr je aplikace pro zprávy v reálném čase, která automaticky překládá konverzace a zároveň podporuje porovnávání klíčových slov k větě. Qutr spoléhá na dotazování databáze, která obsahuje běžně používané přeložené fráze cestovní domény a šablony frází v různých jazycích s použitím klíčových slov. Přiřazení dotazů podporuje parafráze, neúplná klíčová slova a některé pravopisné chyby vstupu. Aplikace řeší běžné problémy komunikace mezi jazyky, jako je přesnost překladu, rychlost, soukromí a personalizace.', 'et': 'Esitleme Qutr (Query Translator), nutikas keeleülene suhtlusrakendus reisi domeenile. Qutr on reaalajas sõnumite rakendus, mis automaatselt tõlgib vestlusi, toetades samal ajal märksõna lause sobitamist. Qutr toetub andmebaasi päringutele, mis sisaldab sageli kasutatavaid eeltõlgitud reisi domeeni fraase ja fraasimalle erinevates keeltes, kasutades märksõnu. Päringu sobitamine toetab parafraase, mittetäielikke märksõnu ja mõningaid sisendõigekirjavigu. Rakendus käsitleb levinud keeleülese suhtluse küsimusi, nagu tõlke täpsus, kiirus, privaatsus ja isikupärastamine.', 'fi': 'Esittelemme Qutr (Query Translator), älykäs monikielinen viestintäsovellus matkailualalla. Qutr on reaaliaikainen viestisovellus, joka kääntää keskustelut automaattisesti ja tukee avainsana lauseeseen vastaamista. Qutr luottaa kyselyyn tietokannasta, joka sisältää yleisesti käytettyjä esikäännettyjä matkaverkkotunnuksen lauseita ja lausemalleja eri kielillä avainsanojen avulla. Kyselyn täsmäytys tukee parafraaseja, keskeneräisiä avainsanoja ja joitakin kirjoitusvirheitä. Sovellus käsittelee yleisiä monikielisiä viestintäongelmia, kuten käännösten tarkkuutta, nopeutta, yksityisyyttä ja personointia.', 'jv': 'We present KTR (query translation), a bright, inter-language komunikasi program for the njeneng domain Language CTR MyUserName on freenode echoH e l l o space w o r l d periodHelloworldHello world Aplikasi nduwe akeh bantugan kelangan langkung sampeyan anyar tentang, seneng kabèh, njujuran, pribadi lan perspekntasi.', 'he': 'We present Qutr (Query Translator), a smart cross-lingual communication application for the travel domain.  Qutr is a real-time messaging app that automatically translates conversations while supporting keyword-to-sentence matching.  Qutr סומך על בקשת בסיס הנתונים שמחזיק ביטויים של תחום הנסיעה המתורגמים מראש ושימוש בפרטים של ביטויים בשפות שונות עם השימוש במילים מפתחות. התאמת השאלות תומכת בפרמיזים, מילים מפתחות לא מלאות וכמה שגיאות תיאום כניסה. היישום מתמודד עם בעיות תקשורת משותפות בין שפות, כמו מדויקת התרגום, מהירות, פרטיות ואישיות.', 'ha': "@ info: whatsthis Qutr wani app ne mai gaske da aka sarrafa magana farat ɗaya idan yana ƙara taimakon maɓallin-zuwa-cewa wanda ya daidaita. KCharselect unicode block name QScriptBreakpointsModel Shiryoyin ayukan ya yi amfani da masu husũma na haɗi cikin lugha-ɗabi'a kamar tsari na fassarar, farat, farat ɗaya, da farat ɗaya, da kuma masu mutane.", 'sk': 'Predstavljamo vam Qutr (Query Translator), pametno večjezično komunikacijsko aplikacijo za potovalno domeno. Qutr je aplikacija za sporočanje v realnem času, ki samodejno prevaja pogovore, medtem ko podpira ujemanje ključnih besed v stavek. Qutr se zanaša na poizvedbo zbirke podatkov, ki vsebuje pogosto uporabljene vnaprej prevedene besede in besedne predloge v različnih jezikih z uporabo ključnih besed. Ujemanje poizvedbe podpira parafraze, nepopolne ključne besede in nekatere napake v črkovanju vnosa. Aplikacija obravnava pogosta medjezična komunikacijska vprašanja, kot so natančnost prevodov, hitrost, zasebnost in personalizacija.', 'bo': 'We present Qutr (Query Translator), a smart cross-lingual communication application for the travel domain. Qutr འདི་ལ་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་གཏམ་གླེང་སྒྲུབ་འདི་དང་རང་འགུལ་གྱིས་རྒྱབ་སྐྱོར་བའི་གཙོ་ཚིག་དང་ཚིག་མཐུན་སྒྲིག་ཡོད་པ Qutr relies on querying a database that holds commonly used pre-translated travel-domain phrases and phrase templates in different languages with the use of keywords. The query matches the paraphrases, incomplete keywords and some input spelling errors. ཉེར་སྤྱོད་འདིས་སྤྱིར་བཏང་བའི་སྐད་རིགས་ཀྱི་འབྲེལ་འདྲེན་དག་གི་གནད་དོན་དག་འདྲ་བྱེད་ཀྱི་ཡོད།'}
